Мы не думаем, что это проблема. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы включили датчик количества и оставили его включенным на несколько часов, чтобы мы могли понять, что происходит. Даже при той скорости, которая использовалась в последние несколько часов, это не будет проблемой, но мы хотели бы найти способ контролировать это устройство, чтобы оно не доставляло вам неудобств, и чтобы вас это не беспокоило. Именно поэтому мы хотим некоторое время понаблюдать за этим. Нам не нравится идея, что вам придется снижать или повышать давление кажды
A
好的，弗雷德。我们这里的通讯
了解。ディーク、操縦モードは手動、ジャイロはケージ、操縦スイッチはオフ。燃料は45パーセントと42パーセント、酸素は76パーセントと100パーセント。スーツの蒸気口の温度は68度で、キャビンの水量過多の警告灯が点灯した。計器の針は20度まで下がった。キャビンの水量を6度くらいにリセ
Roger. Underst
はい。お渡ししたメモはこれで結構ですが、後ほど変更する可能性もあります。
Understand - I just 
Roger. Mike, als du vor einer Weile damit experimentiert hast und wir die Totzone wieder reduziert haben, ging man davon aus, dass die Totzone um die neue Fluglage zentriert war, die wir zu diesem Zeitpunkt hatten. Seitdem sind wir in Nick- und Gierwinkel um einige Grad von dieser Lage abgewichen, sodass das Fluggerät, wenn wir die von uns beschriebene Prozedur durchführen – also ACCEL COMMAND, alle AUTO SELECT-Schalter und dann RATE COMMAND aktivieren –, versuchen würde, in die Nick- und Gierlage zurückzukehren, die es vor dem Reduzieren der Totzone hatte. Das können wir verhindern, indem wir – unmittelbar bevor wir RATE COMMAND über die MANUAL ATTITUDE-Schalter aktivieren – den SPACECRAFT CONTROL-Schalter kurz auf „Manuell“ und dann wieder zurück stell
Können wir das jetzt verschieben? Wir sind momen
वे अपना ब्लोडाउन पै
Huh
Neuer
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们通过戈德斯通卫星清晰地接收到了你们的
Ah, on le voi
ठीक है, जैक। रुकिए। हमें इसे FLIGHT को देना है, और इसमें लगभग एक या दो मिनट लगेंगे। आपको जगाने के लिए क्षमा करें, लेकिन एक मिनट का समय लीजिए, फिर हम इसे आपको पढ़कर सुना
罗杰，巴兹。我
음, 점점 어두워지네요. 여기도 어두워 보여요, 짐. 앞으로 며칠 밤이나 낮에 우리가 무엇을 볼 수 있고 무엇을 볼 수 없는지
Roger, I say again, 42 Bravo Split ∆V. 40. 120. 1+O7. 2+30. 
आगे बढ़ो ह्यूस्टन, मिथुन 
يا إلهي، انظر إلى مولتكه؛ إنه المفضل لدي... انظر إلى ذلك الوغد. أترى كل تلك الطرق - الطرق
Apollo 11,
자, 다시 한번 말씀드리겠습니다. 잠시 기다려 주십
杰克
VO
와, 우리 우주선에 걸린 하중이 엄청나네.
कमांड मॉड्
ठीक है। समझ गया। चलिए देखते हैं आपके लिए और क्या है, जिम। मिडकोर्स-2 पर लगभग 23 फीट प्रति सेकंड की गति दिख रही है, लगभग प्रतिगामी और समय पर। और यह अब काफी स्थिर है। आपकी जानकारी के लिए, और आपको इ
Ok, Joe. La spia di monitor
ठीक है। हम इसे लगभग एक घंटे पहले करने की बात कर रहे हैं; लेकिन पूर्व-जांच में, जिन चीजों को हमने बंद किया उनमें से एक सेकेंडरी लूप भी था। और उन्हें इसे दोबारा
Senden im Blindflug. Sichtverbindung. Die verstrichene Zeit am Boden beträgt laut meiner Markierung 4 Stunden, 29 Minuten und 30 Sekunden. Senden im Blindflug an A
휴스턴, 컬럼비아. 댓글을 남겨주세요. 아주 잘 작동했습니다. 제가 표시한 분화구는 존 영이 설명한 130번 분
Okay. Du rufst sie an; d
ठीक है, फ्रेड। जो मैंने आपको दिया है, वह कमांड मॉड्यूल की अम्बिलिकल से बिजली हटाने के अंत में है। और आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, इस पूरी प्रक्रिया के बाद और जब आप कमांड मॉड्यूल में ट्रांसफर करने के लिए तैयार हों, उस समय अम्बिलिकल से बिज
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. До места сброса отходов осталось примерно минута, а до места сброса — 14 минут. Если можете, сообщите примерн
Okay, 6 – okay, ungefähr
罗杰，13岁。由于氧气罐2的液
قاعدة ترانكويليتي، ه
分かりました。
रात में अवलोकन के लिए रेटिकल को पर्याप्त रूप से मंद नहीं किया जा सकता। खिड़की में तारों को फिर से चिह्नित करें, यानी ग्रस को... थॉरस ठीक केंद्र रेखा से नीचे आ रहा है। लगभग 5 डिग्री दाईं ओर घूम सकते हैं, जिससे डेड रेकनिंग के लिए पर्याप्त होगा। फिर लगभग 5 डिग्री बाईं ओर घूमें, जो काफी स्पष्ट होगा। रेट्रो के लिए, यह एक बहुत अच्छा सेटअ
सूट कूलिंग को छोड़कर बाकी सभी सिस्टम ठीक हैं, और निश्चित रूप से - इस समय डोम का तापम
太陽が再び視界の真ん中にきました... これが日没時の太陽の位置なので、おおよそこ
よし。給水バルブを閉める。
Those guys down there in the press room did 
सबसे पहले, मैं ऑटोमेटिक रीएंट्री मोड में हूँ; जायरो सामान्य हैं; पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है; सभी कॉन्फ़िगरेशन रीएंट्री मोड में हैं; रेट जायरो के लिए बाईपास स्विच सामान्य स्थिति में है। आपको ईंधन की जानकारी दे रहा हूँ, ऑटोमेटिक टैंक 90% भरा है, मैनुअल मोड में भी लगभग 90% भरा है। अब आपको स
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。我们
Okay. Ich glaube, ich habe das falsch verstanden. Ihr habt das VHF-Signal 
Du bist ganz gut dabei; deine Gimbals arbeiten etwas mehr, als ich vermutet hätte, aber
L'ho aperto. Lo s
Jack, qui è Houston. Vogliamo che tu tenga la luce accesa e le luci accese in modo da poter vedere dentro, e che lasci la batteria spenta - la batteria A spenta - e, al momento opportuno, la metteremo su MAIN A. E terremo la luce accesa in modo da poter ottenere una l
今、ジムの側は昼間で、私の側を見るとまだ星がいくつか見えます。宇宙船の向きを、片側が暗くなるように設定できるようです。反対側は昼間です。ジムの側は間違いなく昼間で、私の側は暗いです。飛行初期、ブースターから小さなホタルを眺めながら、いかに暗くて、どのように見えるかに気づいた時、これが私を最も驚かせた
That's affirm. I'm going to first of all just quickly run through the times of the major events, and then we'll go back and fill in some of the details. Okay. Entry interface is at 142 hours 40 minutes; 6-1/2 hours, roughly prior to that or at about, we'll start this whole thing going by applying HEATER POWER, by checking the CM/ temperatures and preheating the CM/ if required, and we suspect we'll probably want to do that. We'll have detailed procedures up for it later. At about 6 hours prior to or about, we will commence powering up the, powering up the, using the modified / 30-minute checklist, which you have used for the previous midcourse. Then shortly, just before 5 hours, prior to or at about, we'll want you in the attitude for a body axis alinement, using the Earth terminator like we did before; and as soon as we have that, we'll perform -7, which looks like, now, about a 2-foot-per-second burn or about 15 seconds of. And I'm told that it's down to 1-1/2 now, so it's comfortably within the margin. Okay. When we do that, we'll immediately start the maneuver to the service module jettison attitude, which will be in plane since we're jettisoning it earlier than we usually do. We don't need, and don't want, the out-of-plane component. So it'll be in plane with the service module pointed back out along the radius vector. We will then commence to get the command module ready for service module SEP, including command module checkout and hot fire, and a
Роджер. Дождь наконец-то пре
Apollo 8, H
ठीक है। अब पैनल 8 पर, मुझे आपको उन सर्किट ब्रेकरों की संख्या बतानी होगी जिन्हें हम खोलना चाहते हैं, इसलिए 
Bene. Buona lettura. Procediamo verso il basso nella pagina. Interruttore "BALANCE COUPLE", "BALANCE COUPLE OFF". Bene, fino all'ultima riga prima di meno 2 minuti: "COMMANDER THROTTLE, MINIMUM; LMP to JETS". A meno 2 minuti, cancella "400 più 1". A meno 1 minuto, cancella "MASTER ARM, ON". A meno 10 secondi, aggiungi "MANUAL ULLAGE". A più 5 secondi, cancella "DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, ON;" aggiungi ", 40 percento". Bene, "Al momento dell'accensione, se non si avvia, premere il pulsante di AVVIAMENTO manuale; se a
好了，我们现在开始拆第11卷胶片。我们刚拆完第9卷。看起来第9卷的指示灯亮了。我们最好检查一下第8卷的指示灯是不是也亮着。可能是胶片盒的问题导致指
我当时正
Je 
わかりました。OMNIは順調です。ちょうど真ん中のジンバルの角度を見ていた
分かりました。
Fort e
رو
नहीं, ये वही तीन हैं जो हमारे पास पह
现在看起来相当稳
Deux, trois, voire quatre pas tranquilles suffisent pour s'arrêter presque en
Roger. Ich habe dich deutlich verstanden.
Ricevuto. Or
Okay. Die Informationen darunter, beginnend mit „Kamera-Erdschein-Fotos konfigurieren“ bis einschli
هذه هي غرفة عمليات هيوستن CAP. تفضل، ث
रॉजर। मैंने ऑटो मोड में डॉक किया, और जैसा कि मैंने कहा, मुझे संपर्क का क्षण ठीक से याद नहीं था। मैं डॉकिंग प्रोब इंडिकेटर्स को बार-बार चेक कर रहा था। मुझे दो बारबर पोल मिले, जिससे पता चला कि तीनों कैप्चर लैच - कैप्चर लैच नहीं, बल्कि तीनों... लैच - जुड़ गए थे, और हम सॉफ्ट डॉक हो गए थे। उस समय स्थिति काफी स्थिर लग रही थी। तो, मैंने फ्री मोड में जाकर खिड़की से बाहर देखा और स्थिति अभी भी स्थिर लग रही थी; और मैंने प्राइमरी 2 बॉटल फायर कर दी। उसी समय, दोनों वाहनों के बीच एक चक्कर शुरू हो गया, मुझे नहीं पता किस वजह से। शायद थ्रस्टिंग की वजह से या शायद यह पहले से ही बन रहा था, और मैंने ध्यान नहीं दिया था। खैर, प्रोब के रिट्रैक्ट के दौरान, यॉ हुआ - मेरे अनुमान से लगभग 15 डिग्री का यॉ हुआ, और मुझे वापस ऑन करना पड़ा, फ्री स्विच को ऑटो मोड में वापस करना पड़ा, और इसे कम करने की कोशिश करनी पड़ी; और मुझे लगता है कि नील भी यही कर रहा था। मैं उसे अपने अनुभव के बारे में बताने दूंगा। और मुझे लगा कि हमें सफल रिट्रैक्ट और हार्ड डॉ
Sì. Puoi manovrare, Jim
Il est 17h21 GMT et je ne sais pas exactement dans quelle direction je pointe, mais il y a une multitude de rayons qui s'élèvent de la terre vers le ciel. On dirait le lever du soleil. Les rayons sont bien verticaux et je prends deux photos avec mon Contarex. 
روجر. العد التنازلي قصير: ١ ٢ ٣
您好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。关于您的低温设备，请您将所有四个低温加热器设置为自动模式，并关闭所有四个低温
حسنًا. شكرًا لك. نأمل أن نتمكن، عند تشغيل وحدة التحكم غدًا أو لاحقًا اليوم، من تحديد مصدر هذا الصوت بدقة أكبر. لكن فريق التوجيه يقول إنهم لم يلحظوا أي آثار لتسرب في بياناتهم، وأن كمية ضئيلة جدًا كافية للتأ
अरे, इससे एक सवाल उठता है। हम जानना चाहते थे कि आप लोग प्रोब और ड्रोग को कहाँ रखने की योजना बना रहे हैं? हमें एक संभावना यह सूझ
Это Хьюстон. Приня
Хорошо, Джек. Я перечитаю шаги, которые ты мне уже дал. Панель 250 CB BAT A, ВВОД ПИТАНИЯ/ПОСТУПА, з
هذه هي الصداقة السابعة. 
Роджер, Фред. Хотел бы подтвердить, что вы получаете питьевую воду из командного модуля, и если вы можете оценить, сколько воды вы используете с течением времени и сколько уже использов
ठीक है। अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। मेरे पास आपके लिए एक और छोटा सा अपडेट है, और यह पेज G/9-2 पर मौजूद मिटाने योग्य मेमोरी वा
알겠습니다. 현재
Apollo 8, Houston. Prevediamo un cu
... أقرأ ل
Roger. If you'd like to take some pictures, we recommend using ma
11, это Хьюстон. В момент срабатывания вашего циклического аккумулятора мы работали с низкой скоростью передачи данных и, следовательно, не получали параметр расхода кислорода. Мы предполагаем, что то, что вы видите, вероятно, является нормальным. То есть, это, вероятно, то, что мы ожидаем от 
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir schalten die Uplink-Verbindung für etwa zwei Minuten auf das Upvoice-Backup um. Die Umschaltung kann 
맞습니다. 다음으로, CB 패널 16, BAT FEED TI
了
ठीक है। 7:30 बजे, 
रॉजर। इस स्टेटसाइड पास पर लगभग 2 मिनट ब
Здравствуйт
Roger. Du bist etwas unzuverlässig zurückgekommen. Unser O2-Durchflusssensor scheint deutlich schlechter geworden zu sein. Ich habe ihn mir gerade beim letzten Wasserspeicherzyklus angesehen, und er hat nur ganz k
Когда я был на улице, я заметил на окне Джима какое-то покрытие снаружи. Однажды, когда я задел его плечом или рукой, оно размазалось по всей поверхности, и верхняя часть лобового стек
로저. 한 가지 더 말씀드리자면, 알려주신 제어점 시간이 약간 어긋나 있고, 이 지도들을 비교해
Аполлон - Колумбия, э
Si la 
알겠습니다. 말씀하신 대로라면 온보드 벡터를 사용하고 벡터를 슬롯에 남겨둔
네. 11번 패널에서 회로 차단기를 닫아주세요.
Ok, Acquario. Il passo successivo è prendere il sacchetto interno che hai taglia
روجر. الهدوء. اعلم أن هناك الكثير من الوجوه المبتسمة في هذه 
Bene. Fred-o sta per ritirare l'ac
Nun bin ich wieder beim Kreuz des Südens mit dem hell
Yes, Joe. We did, and it kind of looked like 
推進剤の量 - 残り約61%で
حسناً يا 
フェイスプレートは閉じている。鼻を拭くためとレンズをク
Ergebnis 
짐, 저희는 그렇게 하
这是Sigma Seven，展示的是日出时分倒飞，偏航角90度的效果。最直观的感受
是的，我拿到了所有优惠。我听杰克给你简要介绍了通讯模式，你有什么问题吗
정말 훌륭합니다. 저희는 이 회사의 레이저를 찾고 있었는데 아직까지 마땅한 제품을
Roger, peux-tu activer ton interrupteur de lecture de quantité, s'il te 
روجر. سنبدأ بأخبار العالم. شهدت ليلة عيد الميلاد إشادة واسعة برواد فضاء أبولو 8 الأمريكيين، وتعبيرًا عن الآمال في تعاون دولي في استكشاف الفضاء، وذلك مع بث رسائل التهنئة العالمية بينما كانت المركبة الفضائية الصغيرة تدور حول القمر. حتى في العالم الشيوعي، كان هناك حماس كبير لأول رحلة بشرية إلى القمر. في موسكو، استذكر العالم السوفيتي أناتولي بيسارانوف كيف تبادلت بلاده والولايات المتحدة المعرفة الفضائية سابقًا، وتوقع أن تؤدي رحلة أبولو 8 إلى مزيد من التعاون. في كوبا، أعادت إذاعة هافانا بث برنامج صوت أمريكا لإبلاغ مستمعيها بخطاب أبولو 8. وقال مسؤولو صوت أمريكا إنها المرة الأولى التي تُبث فيها أي من برامج الوكالات الأمريكية عبر إذاعة هافانا. تابعت تشيكوسلوفاكيا رحلة القمر عبر تغطية تلفزيونية واسعة النطاق؛ وفي بودابست، المجر، لم يكن الناس يتحدثون إلا عن هذا الحدث في القطارات والحافلات. في العالم غير الشيوعي، حبس موظفو المكاتب والمتسوقون أنفاسهم بينما كانت المركبة الفضائية تُجهز للانطلاق نحو الأرض. أشاد الفرنسيون في الشوارع بالخبرة الأمريكية والإنجاز الفضائي، وهتف بعض المشاهدين الذين تابعوا صور القمر على التلفزيون "رائع!". وفي لندن، اكتظت المتاجر والحانات بحشود من المتسوقين لمشاهدة صور فوهات القمر على التلفزيون. وأوضح برنارد لوفيل، أبرز علماء الفلك الفضائيين في بريطانيا، والذي ك
ठीक है। चेतावनी "400 प्लस शून्य" के बाद है: एसीए पर फिर से डिटेंट से बाहर न जाएं। समाप
双子星4号，休斯顿。在最近几次绕地球飞行中，你们是否大量使用了轨道姿态管理系统（
Okay. Können
Und Jim, nur zur Info: Ich habe das Eingabefeld. Ich habe auch die Wetterübersicht für das Landegebiet, die du wahrscheinlich
GETRC 01
خبر محلي آخر: احترق مبنى محكمة مقاطعة هانتسفيل قبل فجر أمس، ما يشير إلى عودة أعمال البناء هناك. ثم ننتقل إلى خبر آخر عن العائلات المنتظرة. هذا التقرير بقلم آن جيمس، مراسلة صحيفة "بوست". قالت فاليري أندرس عشية عيد الميلا
알겠습니다, 잭. 상승 신호를 확보했으니, 그 정보를 이용해 도킹 대략적인 정렬을 잡아주고, 서비스 모듈 분리 자세로 전환한 다음, 전원을 켤 때까지 기다렸다가 도킹 대략적인 정렬을 잡고, 좋은 별들을 골라 정확한 정렬을 제공할 겁니다. 서비스 모듈 분리 자세에서 찾을 수 있는 태양에서 멀리 떨어져 있는 별들을 몇 개 고를 수 있을 것 같네요. 이
रॉजर, 11. आपके टीवी का एटीट्यूड रोल 261, पिच 090, यॉ 000 होगा। हाई गेन एंगल: पिच प्लस 28, यॉ 271। इससे बाईं ओर 
Полагаю, я пил воду и 
私があなたにその印を与えたとき、それがすべてだったの
عاد جهاز Tr-10 إلى وضعه الطبيعي. لقد فعلت ذلك سابقًا. حسنًا، حصلنا على ضغط البدلة. تفضل بإلقاء نظرة أخرى على العواكس هنا. 250 تساوي 141 درجة، و150 تساوي حوالي 107 درجات. هذا جيد. وضع الاستعداد هو... 7. قريب جدًا من درجة حرارة الجو. سلبي، بل أقل قليلًا... ضغط المقصورة حوالي 5.3 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة، وهو مثالي. درجة حرارة قبة البدلة 72 درجة. درجة حرارة قبة المقصورة 45 و
마침 지금 우리가 얘기하던 주제였네요. 트렁크 덮개
Джим, когда закончишь пере
Esatto. Andiamo al pannello 382. I primi uno, due, tre, quattro sono invariati. Vogliamo che la valvola SEC EVAP H2O CONTROL sia su OFF e che la valvola PRIM EVAP H2O CONTROL sia su 
Вперёд, Спокойствие.
로저. 패널 점검 결과는 다음과 같습니다. 왼쪽 패널의 퓨즈 스위치는 이전에 보고된 내용과 동일하며, 다시 말씀
짐, 얼마나 자세히 볼 수 
Andare
Gemini 4，休斯顿 CAP
Судя по уровню сигнала, похоже, что мы попали в зону бокового лепестка диаграммы направленности с помощью антенны с высоким коэффициентом уси
Roger, verste
Okay. Wir messen
로저.
Bene. Questo introduce la Luna. Possiamo v
Возможно, мне придётся провести время в другом карантине, помимо того, который для мен
Sie können den Motor vor 
그런 것 같네
燃料のより正確な値は、もし指先で確認できれば78、78（パーセント）です。逆噴射前です。逆噴射を実行するように設定しました。自動制御、逆噴射後、フライ・バイ・ワイヤに切り替えて再突入軸まで機首を上げ、修正します。逆噴射後、フライ・バイ・ワ
了解。結構で
罗杰。我们现在看到的是从东太平洋的航天器拍摄的地球中心景象。我们还没能直接看到夏威夷群岛，但可以清晰地看到北美洲西海岸。美国、圣华金谷、内华达山脉、下加利福尼亚州、墨西哥一直到阿卡普尔科和尤卡坦半岛；还能看到
로저, 하와이, 오로라 세븐. 잘 들립니다.
프로그램 52를 실행하는 동안 프로그램 알람 401이 발생했는데, 이는 계속 진행하면 짐벌 록 현상이 발생할 수 있음
حسنًا يا جاك. ارجع إلى إجراء شحن البطارية الذي شرحته لك. ولإيقاف الشحن، ما عليك سوى كتابة "فتح" أو "إيقاف" بجوار مفتاح الدائرة الذي أعطيتك إياه. في اللوحة 250، قاطع الدائرة الذي فتحته بالفعل؛ في اللوحة 275، طاقة العاكس 2 الرئيسية B، مفتوحة؛ اللوحة 5، مرحل البطارية BAT A، مفتوحة؛ وحدة الاستشعار AC BUS 2، مفتوحة، إشار
ठीक है। हम आपके अगले मध्यमार्ग के निर्धारित समय पर, यानी प्रवेश बिंदु से 2 घंटे पहले, 1.4 फुट प्रति सेकंड की बर्न दर का अनुमान लगा रहे हैं, जिससे प्रवेश बिंदु पर आपका गामा एक डिग्री के दसवे
友谊
그쪽은 나쁘지 않아 보
Eagle, Houston. It appeared to us when you were doing the,
Е
Apollo 11, Houston. O
휴스턴에서 
Roger. Sono Friendship Seven su UHF. Ciao d
Okay. Wenn Sie Ihr Manöverbuch zur Hand nehmen – das letzte Manöver, das wir Ihnen für den Überflug g
Okay. Dieses Sech
Okay. I think we got those. We w
ठीक है। वज़न 
300フィート下、3.5メートル、前進47フィート。上昇中 - 1分ごとに1機、下降1.5メ
はい。那覇RESCUE1と那覇SEARC
水瓶座，休斯
Roger, e ora te lo passiamo. Ho bevuto circa 12 sorsi d'acqua e credo che Jim ne abbia bevuti probabilmen
मैं ज़रूर करूँगा। लेक
我的头盔里似乎有
알겠습니다. 좋은 생각입니다. 탱크 수위가 너무 높았는데, 압력 스위치가 닫혀 히터 작동을 시작하기를 기다리는 동안 탱크 1의 압력이 조금 더 떨어져서 경고등이 켜졌습니다. 그래서 탱크 2 히터를 
جاك، هذا هيوستن. نريدك أن تُبقي الجهاز مضاءً وأن تُبقي الأضواء مضاءة حتى تتمكن من الرؤية بالداخل، وأن تُبقي البطارية A مطفأة، وفي الوقت المناسب، سن
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 중간 항로 수정 번호 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, 피치 및 요 트림 없음, TIG 150 29 5453, -00048, 모든 볼 추가, +00001 075 159 328; HA는 없음; HP +00230 00048 011 00048; 육분의 별 03 0908 382. 보어사이트 별 블록, 사용 가능 없음. 위도 +1102, -17204 11803 36275 195 03 33, 
Это Хьюстон, я — Аполлон-8. Вперёд
ت
Roger, Frank, concernant ce réservoir d'hélium dans le quadrant A, il semble que nous vous ayons inquiétés inutilement à ce sujet. Apparemment, il n'y a pas de problème. Nous avons consulté quelques experts et le problème a été considérablement réduit. Par ailleurs, les équipes sur place soupçonnent que Jim vise l'étoile numéro 22 au lieu de la 02, ce qui pourrait expliquer c
Je vous demanderais d'allumer le ventilateur de cabine pendant deux minutes, puis de l'éteindre dès que possible, à titre de petite expérienc
Actually, we're g
Uno di questi 
Okay. I got your 33-1 load up. I've got your 33-1 backup guidance quantities when you're prepared to copy. We had a little problem last pass. We had a complete power fa
D'ac
골드스톤, 휴스턴 CAP 커
Gemini 4, qui Houston CAP COM
Oh, ok. Bene, grazie
هيوستن، أبولو 11. اكتمل شحن البطارية، وتقرير حالة الطاقم كال
Okay. We'll buy wh
알겠습니다. 그렇게 하겠습니다. 찰리, 여기에는 아무런 제약 조건이 없는 것 같은
जी हाँ। हम इसे नैरो बीम विड्थ पर नहीं ला पा रहे हैं। हमने ऑटो ट्रैक या रीएक्क्वेस्ट मोड पर स्विच करने की 
Okay. Understand. secon
هيوستن، أبولو 11. ما زلنا نشغل مرو
روجر، يا فريندشيب سفن. أنتم ثلاثة في ث
Okay. I'm just about 28,
Okay, down in the middle of the page on line 9, we're just going to strike out the "Activate VHF for COMM 
まあ、彼は
حسناً،
罗杰。飞越 SPS/G&N：62815，加 097，减 020 070 54 5944，减 00028，加 00023，加 00069，269 149 312 NA，加 00221 00078 001 00034，01 2185 227 NA，减
तुम कई दिनों
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। यह गुआयमास कैप कॉम है। आपकी आवाज़ अभी थोड़ी अस्पष्ट है, लेकिन समझ में आ 
...мы потребляем ток в районе 13-14 
さて、食事についてコメントさせてください。これまでオレンジジュースの袋、つまり私が水を入れた袋（オレンジジュースがどんな形で
우리가 지금 어디에
Sバンドでは受信
And, Houston, it's doubtful right now whether we'll be able to see the stars in this configuration. The only way we could possibly get alinement is with the Earth and the terminator or the Moon and its terminator and I'd sure like to have you look at a powerdown - keeping th
わかりました。104時間後、つまり今から約20時間後、18時間後に中間軌道修正を検討しています。風速は毎秒7フィートしかありません。もう一つの選択肢は、再び軌道に戻れない可能性があるため、現状維持して軌道修正を遅らせることです。現在検討しているのはそのようなことですが、念のためお知らせしたいのは、現在フェアウェイのほぼ真ん中にいるということです。現在の追跡では、中間軌道は設定されておらず、ガンマは6.51ではなく7.11です。つまり、既に軌道上にいるということです。
Okay. D
Ecc
रॉजर। समझ गया। हमें बहुत खुशी है कि आपको वह म
Roger. J'ai deux ou trois autres choses à vous signaler, Mike. Nous devons interrompre la charge de la batterie B. De plus
Hai intenzione di accendere
Siamo 
ठीक है। जैक, मुझे जो समझ आया, उसके अनुसार प्रक्रिया में यह माना जाता है कि सभी अच्छी बैटरियां चालू हैं, और बैटरी नंबर 6 सामान्य रूप से काम कर रही है
दुर्भाग्यवश, वे आंकड़े यहाँ दर्ज नहीं हो पाए। अगर आप फ्रेड हाइज़ के चार्ट को देखेंगे, तो उसमें 11 बजे की स्थिति पर एक आंकड़ा है जो शोर स्तर दर्शाता है। मुझे वोल्टेज 
En observant les alentours, le contraste est globalement dû à l'ombre portée par le soleil: un gris très clair, un halo autour de mon ombre et de celle de mon casque. En regardant au loin, le contraste est maximal car la couleur environnante reste a
Хорошо. Это площадка с углом наклона +90 градусов. /G&N, 63825, минус 1.54, пл
Et, je suppose que pour cette dernière manœuvre à mi-parcours, il faudrait commencer à l'étudier assez tôt, si nous en avons la possibilité, pr
ठीक है। हमने मुख्य पैराशूट खोल दिया है। यह डीरीफ हो चुका है; हमने सिंगल-पॉइंट रिलीज़ कर दिया ह
还有你的
Es sieht nun so aus, als würden wir Ihre Plattform etwa 45 Minuten früher als im Flugplan vorgesehen in Betrieb nehmen. Die Flugzeit beträgt dann 95 + 19 Minuten. Das wird 
알
好的
إنه 
इससे मेरे
Tranqu
Okay, Houston. Wir zeigen 47,3 m
حسنًا يا جيم. في الصفحة 2-107، نوصيك بحذف ذلك والاكتفاء بالنهج نفسه. منصتك ممتازة، ولا نرى ضرورة لهذا التعديل. على أي حال، سيتم التطرق إليه مجددًا. وأيضًا، في الصفحة نفسها، نود حذف عبارة "بدء نقع المقصورة في البرد".
Ich verst
यह बिल्कुल सही है। दरअसल, जैक के पास आपके पैड्स की एक सूची है, फ्रेडो, इसलिए आप यह सब खत्म होने के बाद उनकी समीक्षा कर सकते हैं
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Будьте готовы к пер
لا، ليس بداخله شيء. إنه هواء. من المفترض أن أضعه في صندوق الط
Х
달 착륙선에 있는 이 카메라 덮개 말이에요. 잠시 생각해 보세요. 저는 이걸 장착했고, 앞으로 바꿀 필요성을 전혀 못 느끼겠어요. 지금도 잘 작동하는데, 만약 우주 유영 전에 고장이 나면 그때 가서 바꿔야 할 이
حسناً، لقد أنزلتُ واقي ال
حسنًا. يُرجى العلم أن الحمل على جهاز الكمبيوتر
Quad C ist die höchste Temperatur, die wir haben;
13، هيوستن. نعم. أنت جاهز لتشغيل ذراع إطلاق النا
Yes, there's a moose down here you just wouldn't believe. There's the biggest one yet. God, it's huge! It is enormous! It's so big I can't even get it in the window. You want to loo
Roger, verstanden. Besteht dieser zeitweise auftretende Fehler, der vor wenigen Minuten noch bestand, im
Идт
こんにちは、アポロ11号です。ヒューストン。もしお読みいただけましたら、この態度は通信機にとって非常に悪
Есть ли у вас основания для использова
On dirait un
Gemini 4, ici Houston CAP COM. Si vous êtes en transmission, nous ne recevons pas, mais nous vous demandons de laisser l'interrupteur de votre ordinateur allumé et votre inter
Думаю, я получу свой, как только выйду на в
Здравствуйте, Ап
Un petit cratère d'impact, bien défini et assez récent, se 
よく聞こえ
Roger. This range sequence is a phenomenon we get on down-voice backup; in this mode, the ranging and the voice share the same channels, so we have to periodically check and make sure that they are not interfering with 
부정적
सूर्यास्त बेहद शानदार होते हैं। सूरज डूबने के बाद धरती काली हो जाती है। धरती पर पहली पट्टी लाल होती
OK. Bien reçu, Jim. Parfait. Sais-tu si Jack a pris des photos par la fenêtre 5? Était-elle encore embuée?
Stow in 
Jack, es ist sehr komfortabel. Wir haben es schon mehrmals durchgeführt und führen es gerade wieder durch. Wir haben es sowohl hier in Houston als auch am Cape geübt. Nur während der Plattformausrichtung, wenn Sie sich auf den Abschluss der Landung vorbereiten, müssen Sie möglicherweise etwas vorausschauender planen.
So, Buzz, dieser Gegenstand hier bei Canaries. LOS, 23:36; Trinkwassererhitzer, Hauptgeb
로저입니다. 휴스턴에서 컴퓨터 문제와 관련하여 다음 
Okay. For today, we'd like you on to make a trunnion bias determination, prior to sightings as called out in procedures, and also one afterwards. Our intent here is to check out the possibility that some sort of thermal effect may be giving you errors in the angular read-out in the sextant. The bias that you get beforehand should be incorporated, that is a PROCEED on NOUN 87 after you get two consecutive measurements equal to within 0.003 degrees. And, of course, move the trunnion off a couple of degrees between the measurements. The Earth should be a lot smaller in your field of view today. I'm, sure you're a lot more qualified to tell us about that
D'accord. Alors au moins jusqu'à ce qu'i
分かりました。パネル
Molto bene. Grazie mille. Non hai niente da dire? 
रॉजर। केप का कहना है कि वे फिलहाल पूरी स्थिति से बेहद संतुष्ट हैं। विशेष रूप से, ईसीएस सिस्टम की समस्या स्वतः ही हल हो गई, और उन्हें लगता है कि आप वहां की पूरी स
روجر. سنقوم بتصوير تسلس
*** А у вас есть сигнал на телевизоре? К
मैं तो बस ऐसे ही मज़ाक कर रहा हूँ; आपक
Pour les temps d'exposition, on vise u
Apollo 11, Houston. We see you 
Ты же знаешь, что так нельзя. Ха! Х
सारी चीज़ें देखने में 
Vous avez trouvé des tarifs qui 
١١، ما زلنا نرصد معدلات على مركبتك الفضائية أعلى من المعدلات التي نرغب بها لاس
La temperatura è di circa 111, la pressione dell'elio... Vuoi s
Nein, ich habe nicht kopiert. Ich lese sie nur gelegentl
Ok, Bill. Credo di voler concludere con un ultimo appunto sull'uso del vettore di stato di bordo per il 4. Dopo averci pensato ancora un po' a terra, devono iniziare a creare gli 's' e a fare tutti i calcoli, e invece di rimandare o rifare tutto, andremo avanti con le procedure che abbiamo sempre usato. Per quanto riguarda l'orbita lunare, abbiamo esaminato la questione e abbiamo diversi ragazzi - Jack Schmitt e soci nella stanza sul retro - che stanno studiando l'effetto dei vostri finestrini. E, in sostanza, sembra che ci siano due opzioni che avranno un impatto su quel 2. Una delle opzioni, ovviamente, sarà semplicemente quella di far scambiare i posti a sedere a te e Jim e lasciare che Jim guardi fuori e prenda il suo SAM in quel modo, e un'altra opzione sarà quella di far girare l'aereo e lasciare che Jim punti le ottiche il più avanti possibile e prenda il suo SAM attraverso il telescopio. E immagino che vorremmo avere qualche vostra opinione su cosa pensate di poter fare con i finestrini; Se avete qualche idea, vorremmo tenerne conto e procedere 
— Disjoncteur enclenché? Les deux
11, ह्यूस्टन। वर्तमान पूर्वानुमान के अनुसार, आपके राहत क्षेत्र में मौसम अनुकूल है: 2000 फुट की ऊंचाई पर छिटपुट बादल, 70 डिग्री से 13 समुद्री मील की हवा, 10 मील की दृश्यता और समुद्र की लहरें लगभग 4 फुट ऊंची हैं। कल के पूर्वानुमान में हवाई के पूर्व में लगभग 500 से 1000 मील की दूरी पर स्थित उष्णकटिबंधीय तूफान क्लाउडिया को दिखाया गया था। कल दोपहर पृथ्वी के उपग्रहों द्वारा ली गई तस्वीरों म
Houston. Le ventilateur cryogénique est en marche; le rése
ठीक है। मैं अब दूसरे ओम्नी पर हूँ। मै
Хо
結構です
Sw
Nachdem wir uns stabilisiert hatten, überprüften wir unser gesamtes Schubregelungssystem und stellten fest, dass wir keine Gier- oder 
232를 굴리세요. 꽤 멀리 굴리셨
D'accord. Et toi, Jack, renseigne-toi sur son utilisation pour
Proprio in quel momento stavamo sorvolando la serie di crateri Messier, guardandoli verticalmente, e nel Messier A possiamo vedere blocchi di buone dimensioni sul fondo del cratere. Non
अगर आप उसे जगा सकते हैं, तो क्यों न आप उससे प
نتفق على ذلك على أرض ال
Vous reculez? D'accord. Je suis prêt à entamer ma manœuvre de lacet si cela vous co
روجر. أفهم أنك تريد إيقاف تشغيل منارة المساعدة ACQ الخا
Закат довольно впечатляющий, думаю, не стоит тратить много времени на его созерцание. Он очень интересный. Ещё меня поражает, насколько темно, когда глаза не адаптированы. Я определённо вижу какое-то покрытие на окне. Возвращаюсь к VOX в диапазоне UHF-hi для передачи. Открываю визор, чтобы протереть правый микрофон. Я его лизнул. Закрываю визор. Визор сразу же загерметизировался, чтобы схема скафандра могла начать работать. Не хочу снова с ней возиться. Вентиляционное отверстие скафандра держится очень хорошо, около 68 градусов. Так что купол снова поднимется. Сейчас он поднят на 76, 75. По-видимому, это более высокое значение — то, что нам нужно. Думаю, добавлю ещё полбалла, и, возможно, мы её зафиксируем. Наконец-то становится про
ت
يا جاك، يا برج الدلو. بينما تفكر - قبل أن نواجه مشاكل الاتصال، كنا نتساءل عما إذا كان ينبغي علينا توصيل نظ
Du brauchst die mit hoher Verstärkung, Houston, o
रॉ
रॉजर। क्या आप उनसे हमारे प्रॉप 
Род
Фред, мне сложн
D'accord. Bien sûr. Buzz, veuillez allumer le ventilateur du réservoir d'oxygène numéro 2. Et, 11, concernant l'étalonnage de vos optiques, avez-vous poursuivi o
ठीक है। आपके पहले और दूसरे रीप्रेशराइजेशन के बीच, उस प्रतीक्षा अवधि में, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपने रेडिएटर को बाईपास मो
Tranquility, Houston. It ought to be a little quieter up there now. We 
Okay, zurück zu Bedienfeld 250. CB BAT Bravo POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING, schließen. Als Nächstes: MDC 3, AC INVERTER 2 auf MAIN B. AC INVERTER 2, AC BUS 1, einschalten. Als Nächstes: Bedienfeld 5: AC INVERTER AC BUS 1 auf UP, TLM auf COMMAND RESET, dann AUS. Anschließend OMNI auswählen. Bitte zurü
Roger. Capisco. Ora ascolta, se pensi che sia così importante, continueremo a farlo e non 
Roger. All systems look good on the ground here. That's all we have unless you have somethin
好的。首先要确认交流电已接通，也就是面板 16 上的逆变器 2 断路器已闭合。然后，在面板 11 的“飞行显示”部分，我们需要确认 GASTA 和 COMMANDER 的断路器已闭合。同样在面板 11 下，GASTA 和 COMMANDER 的交流母
Fokus auf Unendlich. Den sollten Sie unbedingt auf Unendlich lassen. Beim Zoomen wird man Sie wah
Columbia, Houston. Hai ricevuto una copia di dati, a b
हेलो ह्यूस्टन
Eagle, Houston. L'inizializzazione
روجر. تم نسخ نقطة الحضيض 86 ميلاً
Wenn – ich bin mir gerade nicht sicher, wi
Roger, Jack. Puisque nous avons les données, nous prévoyons de les utiliser pour effectuer un alignement grossier vers l'amarrage. Ensuite, en position de largage du module de
Хорошо. Это была проверка положения Земли и Солнца, Джон. Мы немного приблизились к Луне. И маневр TC+2 по-прежнему будет выполняться со скоростью ок
Okay.
Sì, invece di farmelo chiedere, devo chiedergli di 
لا، لم يحدث
Roger, 
Sapevo che se lo avesse fatto abbastanza
N'hésitez pas à utiliser votre système d'identification de 
जब बैटरी चार्ज करना बंद करने का समय हो जाए तो मुझे फोन कर देना, ठीक है? 
Да, это так, не 
مايك، هناك عدد هائل من الأجسام في موقع الهبوط. هذا سيسعد جاك شميدت حقًا. نظام التصويب الآلي يتتبع الهدف بدقة متناهية، والقمتان العاليتان بارزتان بشكل رائ
Ok, Jim. "Quando sei in assetto, ACA porta l'ago dell'errore fuori dal fermo a zero. Quindi imposta il TIMER EVENTO", e ti faremo un conto alla rovescia quando arriverai a
わか
Apollo 8, Houston. OMNI Bravo, b
你知道，Tim
A
روجر، مدارك لا يتلاشى بال
Je vais donc désactiver la VHF-A et l
这些
— Весь наш анализ основан на 
حسنًا. لنرى الآن. حقيبتك موجودة في الحقيبة على شكل حر
C'est ce qu'Edw
Родж
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया। मेरा पहला चक्कर लग
ا
Okay, Jim. Wir wollen dir da entgegenkommen; es ist ein Thema, das wir mit dir besprechen wollten. Wir haben darüber nachgedacht, und unsere Meinung dazu ist – natürlich liegt die Entscheidung bei dir, aber wenn wir die Vor- und Nachteile abwägen, hast du ja bereits den Vorteil genannt. Wir führen kurz vor EI minus einer Stunde eine Luken-Integritätsprüfung durch, und wenn diese beschädigt ist, hättest du große Schwierigkeiten, in die Anzüge zu schlüpfen. Andererseits könnten die Anzüge dich erheblich verlangsamen, ganz abgesehen von der Zeit zum Anziehen. Außerdem besteht die Sorge, dass dir nach einer gewissen Zeit in den Anzüg
ठीक है, मुझे लगता है कि मेरा एकमात्र सवाल पहले भाग से संबंधित है - बिल्कुल पहले भाग से, जहाँ मुझे केवल BAT 6 चालू करने और फिर सभी DESCENT बैटरियों को बंद करने के लिए कहा गया है। 
D'accord, Ken. Et la liste de contrôle G&C 
Roger. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie während dieses Überflugs bei Ascension einen HF-Check durchf
Roger. 
Okay. It's 750
Roger. Would you ver - We've lost COMM with you for about the last 10 minutes. Would you verify that the S band track switch is
ロジャー、こちらシグマ・セブン。ジー
제미니 4호, 하와이 CAP C
Roger. Nous avons l'allumage
고마워요, 짐
Rog
そこから下は、「窓のシェードを取り外す」と一番下の「OMNI D を取得する」を除いてすべて
Hier spricht Apollo 8, live vom Mond. Wir mussten die Fernsehkameras wechseln. Zuerst zeigten wir Ihnen die Erde, die wir die letzten 16 Stunden beobachtet haben. Jetzt schalten wir um, um Ihnen den Mond zu zeigen, über den wir die letzten 16 Stunden in 96 Kilometern Höhe geflogen sind. Bill Anders, Jim Lovell und ich haben den Tag vor Weihnachten hier oben verbracht, Experimente durchgeführt, Fotos gemacht und die Triebwerke unseres Raumschiffs gezündet, um Manöver durchzuführen. Wir folgen nun der Spur, der wir den ganzen Tag gefolgt sind, und nehmen Sie mit zu einem Monduntergang. Der Mond ist für jeden von uns etwas anderes. Ich denke, jeder von uns hat seinen eigenen Eindruck von dem, was er heute gesehen hat. Mein Eindruck ist, dass es eine riesige, einsame, abweisende Existenz ist, eine unendliche Leere, die aussieht wie Wolken über Wolken aus Bimsstein, und sicherlich kein besonders einladender Ort zu
Роджер, Базз. Это запись PAD, MPL, начинающаяся с номера 05, 35 - исправление - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, плюс 1102, минус 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 69, все четыре строки - NA. Продолжаем с D ноль: 400 02 09. RET затемнения, 00 17 03 38 08 20. Звезда секстанта, 02 0945 149. Звезда на оси обзора - Скорпион тета, это Скорпион тета. Вверх 315, вправо 35, вектор подъема вверх. И комментарии: В этой записи PAD не предполагается промежуточный курс 6. И к вашему сведению, судя по всем полученным данным отсл
ओडिसी, ह्यूस्टन। आप यूपी टेलीकॉम ब्लॉक जा 
11, Хьюстон. На нашем мониторе изображение довольно хорошее. Цвета не очень... по крайней мере, на этом телевизоре. 
你好 Muchea，你好 Muchea Cap Com，我是 Sigma Seven。H
收到，请稍等
फ्रेडो, अगर आपको लगता है कि यह व्यावहारिक है, तो हम आपको कुछ देने के लिए तैयार हैं - हम वेंटिंग की तस्वीरें लेने के लिए कुछ कैमरा सेटिंग्स पर काम कर रहे हैं। और, अगर आपके पास कोई कैमरा तैयार है, तो हमें बता दीजिए कि वह कौन सा कैमरा है ताकि हम उस कैमरे की सेटिंग्स
了解しました。ランドマーク130プライムを追跡してください。参考までに、これでランデブーレーダートランスポンダーの位置が正確にわかります。T1は122プラス16プラス0
Houston, Apollo 8. Nous sommes en train de préparer le repas 4, jour - correction: jour
OK, Houston, Verseau. La mise sous tension est terminée et tout semble en ordre à l'étage. On 
Nein, das EKG ist ausgefallen. K
여기는 프렌
Un'altra nota interessante per gli addetti ai sistemi di bordo: dite loro che non devono preoccuparsi
这将使你获得进入大气层的配平角度、滚
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi
И, Водолей, чтобы подтолкнуть тебя к размышлениям в этом направлении, мы провели довольно тщательный анализ и выяснили, что будет дешевле оставить всё как есть и выключить инвертор и шар. Это сэкономит нам 1 ампер и немного воды, так что, похоже, мы так и сделаем. И нам придётся следить за углом наклона среднего карданного подвеса. Мы разработаем процедуру для этого, и это также будет более простой режим управления, где мы сможем использоват
Пока всё работает хорошо, Чарли. Один установлен на водяном пистолете, а другой — на кране внизу, и мы — упомянули одну проблему: они протекают в месте соединения мешка с едой и водяного фильтра. Однако, за исключением этого, они, кажется, работают довольно хорошо. Сначала у нас немного 
روجر، جيم. بريك، جاك، نرجو منك البقاء في النطاق الترددي الحالي، وسنجري تغييرًا بعد انتهاء البث التلفزيوني. كما نرجو منك التحقق من زاوية ميل وانحراف جهازك على مقياس الكسب العالي لنتمكن من مقارنتها بما نراه 
まるで岩のかけらのようで
Roger, Gemini 4. Weather for S-6. Look for any clouds in lee of the Canaries 
정장을 입고 진입하려는 이유 중 하나가 사령선 해치가 제대로 작동하지 않았다는 걸로 알고 있습니다. 하지만 다른 우주선과 크게
Why don't you go down where y
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Проверка горизонта должна была проводиться на отметке 33. 
— — Хорошо, Джо. На улице одни облака, а когда там, внизу, появи
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. هل تسمع؟ الصوت يتق
제미니 4, 휴
Friendship Se
حسنًا، ٨. نريد إجراء اختبار ميداني بسيط هنا للتأكد من قدرتنا على إرسال التسجيل الصوتي إلى هيوستن في الوقت المناسب. لذا، نخطط لإرسال تسجيلك، وسنجري اختبارًا ميدانيًا لإعادته إلى هنا والاستماع إليه. نعتقد أن لدينا تسجيلًا بالفعل، إلا إذا كنت قد سجلت فوقه بعد آخر عملية إرسال. للتأكد، نود منك أن تقول بضع كلمات، أو تُعطينا عدًا قصيرًا، أو أي شيء آخر ترغب في إضافته إلى التسجيل. سنفعل ذلك خلال الدقائق الخمس القادمة قبل مغادرتنا مدريد. هذا هو الموقع الذي نريد إجراء الاخ
Pourquoi ne pas utiliser le mode PCM, 
11, Houston. Nous vous suggérons de commencer par la première étape; nous analyserons les angles et vous fournirons de nouveaux taux de dérive après le
Мы проиграли — единственное преимущество раннего запуска заключается в том, что ес
Comment se déroulent les examens médicaux – notamment le rythme cardia
Tha
Be
Роджер. Подтвердите, пожалуйста, что переключатель посадочных под
Roger, Buzz. Es handelt sich um einen Eintrag PAD, MPL, beginnend mit Roll 05, 35 - Korrektur - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, plus 1102, minus 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, NOUN 69, alle vier Zeilen sind NA. Weiter mit D Null: 400 02 09. RET des Blackouts, 00 17 03 38 08 20. Sextantenstern, 02 0945 149. Boresight-Stern ist Scorpii Theta, das ist Scorpii Theta. Aufwärts 315, rechts 35, Liftvektor aufwärts. Und die Kommentare: Dieser PAD-Einflug geht von keinem Mittelkurs 6 aus. Zur Information: Basierend auf allen uns vorliegenden Tracking-Daten würde dieses Manöver nur etwa 0,03 Meter pro Sekunde betragen. Daher werden wir es wahrscheinlich auslassen. Wir informieren Sie später ausführlicher darüber. Okay. Ihre Horizontprüfung bei -30 Minuten, 194° 33' 03" ergibt einen Nickwinkel von 298°. Okay. Ihre Backup-Ausrichtung – die Zielsterne für den Einflug sind Deneb u
Und zwar bei etwa 3:28 Minuten 
Ich möchte es nicht hier oben haben; ich möchte nur, dass Sie – w
또한, S-5 실험 관련해서 MCC에서 승무원들에게 지상 경로를 따
알겠습니다. 제가 
D'accord. J'ai suivi une étoile brillante, et je crois qu'elle se trouve dans la constellation de l'Aigle. En fait, j'en suis presque sûr. Je pe
Roge
Дальше всё в по
- - 통신 점검 시 고이득 
Okay, Jack. Wir wollen dich nicht belästigen, aber du solltest dir Gedanken machen – oder zumindest darüber, was du denkst –, was der nächste Einsatz sein wird. Ich 
Игл, Колумбия. Сообщите мне, когда придёте на проверку огневой мощи, чтобы я мо
Okay. I know you're trying to be quiet, so I'll just read up some information t
Bien, nous virons à droite, comme vous pouvez le constater, et le virage se déroule très bien. Je dois encore corriger mon roulis. Le contrôle de l'assiette sera effectué très prochainement. Je suis très satisfait des vérifications, de jour comme
OK, Molly Brown donne son feu v
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。了解しました。アップデート
——上面有地
अच्छा। इसमें जलाने के लिए काफी ईंधन
了解。了解、ニール。バズはコロンビアに戻
Vibrator is normal and we went to
अच्छा, ठीक है। मुझे यहाँ बिल्कुल भी बोरियत नहीं हो रही है। मैं अभी थोड़ी देर पहले मिडवे के ऊपर से उड़ा था। उसे अच्छे से देख लिया। मैं अब आप सबकी तरफ आ रहा हूँ, ज़ाहिर
아, 뭐, 떨어지겠
11号，休斯顿。我们可以辨认出面板上的标记。上面写着：A系统 ASCENT FUEL，ASCENT OXIDIZER。Quad 1，Quad 4。——这小摄像头拍出来的画面
Als ic
11, Хьюстон. Хороший обзор биль
मित्रता सात, सर्जन ज़ांज़ीबार। व्यायाम से पहले आपका रक्तचाप 136/80 था। व्यायाम के दौरान हमारे पास अच्छे इलेक्ट्रोकार्डियोग्राफिक ट्रेस हैं और अब आपका रक्तचाप साम
П
У нас ск
Roger. À premièr
Okay. NOUN 46,
Pour informati
Roger. Hier oben i
휴스턴, 
Сейчас мы находимся в положении, близком к земле, так что, я думаю, наземные станции нас не слышат. Мы слышали несколько прерывающихся вызовов. Однако мы будем оставаться в этом положении еще некоторое время, чтобы держать ракету-носитель в поле зрения. Похоже, сейчас мы не слишком продвигаемся в сближении с ракетой-носителем. Кажется, она остается примерно на том же расстоянии, что и раньше. Во время ночного наблюдения, когда ракета-носитель находилась ниже нас, казалось, что небо почти полностью покрыто з
روجر. لقد انتهيت من الوجبة الأولى من اليوم الرابع. شربت ست رشفات من الماء، وسأذهب إ
큐 카드는 안 써요. 프로 선수들과 경쟁할 생각은 전혀 없어요, 정말이에요. 저희는 
Sì. Vanno sotto il computer, e più oggetti pesanti ci sono lì sotto, più aumenta la L su D. Non abbiamo s, quindi mi chiedevo quali oggetti pesanti - Probabilmente potremmo mettere delle telecamere, telecamere, cose del genere che normalmente sono piuttosto pesanti laggiù - quello, nel nostro. No, non possiamo metterle nel nostro, ma potremmo metterle in quel contenitore laggiù, il che
Bene. Ore 22:25
Управление положением
हाँ, मैंने देखा। पहले यह इससे भी कम था; असामान्य रूप से कम था। बूस्ट के 
Vorrei anche un paio di aspiri
ठीक है, बिल। मुझे लगता है कि मैं 4 के लिए ऑनबोर्ड स्टेट वेक्टर का उपयोग करने के बारे में अपनी आखिरी बात को टालना चाहता हूँ। ज़मीन पर इसका और अधिक अध्ययन करने के बाद, उन्हें 's बनाने और अपनी सभी गणनाएँ करने में जुट जाना होगा, और इसे टालने या दो बार करने के बजाय, हम उन प्रक्रियाओं के साथ आगे बढ़ेंगे जिनका हम शुरू से उपयोग करते आ रहे हैं। चंद्र कक्षा के बारे में, हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं और हमारे कई लोग - जैक श्मिट और उनकी टीम पीछे के कमरे में - यह देख रहे हैं कि आपकी खिड़कियों का क्या प्रभाव पड़ता है। और, मूल र
ठीक है। एक बार फिर निगरानी करें और मैं कैप कॉम को एक और प
ठीक है, जैक। प्लॉट के हिसाब से आप लगभग 130,000 मील दूर हैं, जो कि, अरे वाह, कुछ घंटे पहले जब मैं आया था तब आप जहाँ थे उससे लगभग 10,000 मील करीब हैं। और मुझे आपकी क्लोजर रेट पता कर लेने दीजिए
سيتم
D'accord. On va utiliser les mêmes techniques que d'habitude pour l'activation? Autrement dit, j'essaie 
ठीक ह
Ja, ich glaube, du hast recht. Man sieht das Absacken wirklich deutlich. Man sieht, wo sich alles unten in der Ecke gesammelt h
確かに、それが私にヨーを与えたのだと思います、ジャック、でもよく分かりません..
حسنًا. ننصحك بالبقاء 
收到。1，G&N：38658，减 054，加 065，078 02 0345，加 29180，加 03779，减 01325；滚转 NA，俯仰 041；两台喷气式发动机，19 秒，未对接。4：38658，减 054，加 065，084 29 5059，加 31373，加 03760，减 00
罗杰
We're all... do it at 169 hours - or 69 
... هذا مكان مناسب للبدء في حرق بعض الوقود، يا والي. أعتقد أنهم لم يرغبوا ببساطة في توجيه مستشعر الأشعة تحت الحمراء نحو ال
Oh, it's about 12 - 15 lines. It's a m
11, Houston. Buzz, come ti sembra l
- - und ic
Роджер. Подождите, я предоставлю отчет о состоянии. Я нахожусь в орбитальном положении для вашего отслеживания. Отчет о состоянии: Все предохранители номер один, кроме второго предохранителя на башне разделения. Аварийная последовательность ретрореверса, аварийный ретрореактивный двигатель и аварийный тормоз находятся в центральном положении «выкл», пиропатрон активирован. Автоматический ретрореактивный двигатель выключен. Все рычаги управления находятся в нормальном положении. Задержка ретрореверса в нормальном положении. Освещение кабины включено. Фотоподсветка все еще горит. Низкочастотная телеметрия включена. Средства спасе
Роджер. Просто к вашему сведению, на случай, если это произошло, когда вы были вне вахты, главный предохранительный выключатель по-прежнему срабатывает, и мы видим индикацию неисправности на спусковой батарее, но все параметры по-прежнему выглядят так же хорошо, как и раньше, и это просто для информации
حسنًا 
Okay,
よ
罗杰。OMNI D
ठीक है। यह काफी सीधा
And we're r
Roger. E punto successivo, la velocità di salita dell'elio supercritico è nominale, e ci avevi anche chiesto dell'attività dei tuoi propulsori durante l'ultimo REV. Credo che ora lo capiamo, dato che hai riferito che il tuo beccheggio era in COMANDO DI ACCELERAZIONE e imbardata e rollio erano in COMANDO DI VELOCITÀ. Stavi attivando i propulsori di beccheggio. Questo accoppia le velocità ai tuoi assi di imbardata e rollio, 
نعم، هذا مفهوم. يمكنك استخدامها دائمًا إذا احتجت إليها. أعتقد أنه من الصعب جدًا الحصول على بدلات عمل إضافية، أليس ك
चलिए देखते हैं। स्प्रिंगफील्ड, मिसौरी में, ब्रुकलिन डॉजर्स के दिग्गज कैचर मिकी ओवेन, जिन्होंने 1941 विश्व सीरीज में डॉजर्स पर न्यूयॉर्क यांकीज़ की जीत में तीसरा स्ट्राइक छोड़ने का रिकॉर्ड बनाया था, ने तय किया कि उन्हें सिर्फ उनके खेल रिकॉर्ड से ही नहीं, बल्कि किसी और चीज़ से भी याद किया जाएगा। उन्होंने 45 लड़के-लड़कियों को टट्टू भेंट किए। इन बच्चों से अनुरोध किया गया था कि वे पत्र लिखकर बताएं कि वे टट्टू की देखभाल कैसे करेंगे। जब ढेरों पत्र आए, तो उन्होंने अपने पहले से दिए गए 20 टट्टुओं में 5 और जोड़ दिए; और अन्य दानदाताओं ने 20 और टट्टू दान कर दिए। मिकी ओवेन ने कहा, "मुझे लगा था कि मुझे लगभग 45 पत्र मिलेंगे, लेकिन मुझे लगभग 900 पत्र मिले।" अब मुख्य पृष्ठ पर: वेलिंगटन, न्यूजीलैंड में, लगभग पचास लोग आज दक्षिणी ध
Concernant les fenêtres, Houston: les fenêtres 1 et 5 présentent un voile modéré. Suffisant pour une observation visuelle, mais probablement pas pour la photographie. Les fenêtres 2 et 4 sont claires. 
さ
نر
ह्
По данным телеметрии, ваше давление кислор
分かりました。了解しました。他に何かありますか、ジム、確認しましょう。ミッドコース2は約23フィート/秒で、ほぼ逆行しており、予定通りです。そして今、非常にしっかりと保持されて
D'accord. Nou
わかりまし
Хьюстон, вы ведь хоте
Okay. First six on the left are closed - That's through 
さて、ヒューストン、あなたはまだそれがモードよりも安
Push in the
D'accord. Ce survol est une mise à jour de celui d'hier; veuillez noter qu'il s'agit du deuxième. Ce sera un survol /; 62970, -162, +129, +00966, +00552, -02079. Roulis, tangage et lacet à zéro, novembre Alfa, altitud
В
Хорошо. Поставь мне оценку оди
D'accord, et nous enregistrons l'heure à laquelle cela a été terminé. Vous avez deux listes: l'une concerne le transfert du matériel et l'autre le transfert inverse. Veuillez rayer le dernier élément
Okay. In Schritt 5 von E-11 steht – die erste Unterüberschrift lautet „Helme und Handschuhe“. Die folgenden Punkte hängen davon ab, ob Sie einen Anzug tragen oder mit Hemdsärmeln einsteigen, müssen aber in jedem Fall erledigt werden. D
はい、いいですね。コンポーネントライトはH2O SEPは表示しません。そのすぐ下のCB(16)の「HEATER DISPLAY, CLOSE」は消してください。手順2をすべて実行し、手順4を以下の変更を加えて実行してください。パネル11のAC BUS Bの下、コピーの
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 레트로파이어를 시작하세요... 일출 시간은 10시 8분 40초입니다. 그리고 날씨 정보, 고도계 2986, 나하 구조 1호(
Roger. Die Gesichtsmaske ist geschlossen und ich habe ein Bauchn
Roger. Die Gesichtsmaske ist geschlossen und ich habe ein Bauchnabelmanöver du
हाँ, यह सही है। स्थिति: रोल 0 [डिग्री], यॉ 2 [डिग्री] दाएँ, पिच --33 [डिग्री]। सभी दरें शून्य दर्शा रही हैं। मैं वर्तमान समय में चालू हूँ। घड़ी अभी भी वापसी के समय के लिए सेट है, प्रतिगामी समय 04 + 32 + 28 है। मेरे पास बरमूडा से प्रतिगामी समय ठीक है। केबिन का दबाव 5.7 पर स्थिर है। केबिन की हवा 90 [डिग्री] है। सापेक्ष आर्द्रता 30 [प्रतिशत] है। शीतलक की मात्रा 68 [प्रतिशत] है। सूट का वातावरण 65 है। सूट का दबाव 5.8 दर्शा रहा है। सूट पर भाप का तापमान 60 [
Ich habe den Mond in die Mitte des Fensters g
Apollo 8, Houston. Pourriez-vous vous tenir près de l'un d'eux? Nous travaillons sur quelque 
分かりました。ジョー、あなたの質問にお答えすると、いいえ。キャビンは常にチェックしていました。質的に言えば、この設定に切り替えても、周波数や宇宙服のファンの音が少し減ったようには見えませんでしたが、手順
Die Masse des Rucksacks hat einen
Roger, je descends à 20 000 pieds. Prêt à déployer le tuba. La pression en
这是友谊七号。太阳，我想在太阳落山的时候在这里做个标记。现在太阳在地平线上，两侧都是湛蓝的天空。我会在最后做个标记。太阳正在缓缓落下。准备好了，标记（2:09:06）。太阳两侧都是湛蓝的天空，几乎横跨整个
Bon, James, si tu n'es pas capable de mieux prendre soin d'un vaisseau spatial, on ne t'en confiera peut-être pas un
はい。みんな聞い
はい。そうです。星がそこを通過すると、少し掩蔽されます。そし
حسنًا يا فريد. أولًا، نبدأ التحضيرات لهذا الأمر بقائمة التحقق من الطوارئ، صفحة ٢٤، ونوصي بالبدء من هذه النقطة، وسنكون سعداء بتلقي أي تعليقات لديك بخصوصها. ثانيًا: عندما تكون في وضع الاحتراق، يجب أن ترى الشمس في أعلى الشاشة. ستقسم الشمس المؤشر عندما يكون المؤشر مضبوطًا على الصفر. لكن انتبه، فقد ينزلق المؤشر بسهولة لأنه سيكون حساسًا جدًا للدوران والانعراج. اعلم أن هذا في الوضع الثاني، لأن الاحتراق غير حساس جدًا لوقت الاحتراق والوضع. بعبارة أخرى، إذا لزم الأمر، يمكننا تحريكه إذا كانت هناك أي مشكلة، والوضع ليس بالغ الأهمية. هذا يقودنا إلى النقطة التي لدينا فيها قاعدة احتراق واحدة فقط؛ وهي أنه إذا وصل معدل الدوران حول أي محور إلى ١٠ درجات في الثانية، فهذا هو الحد الأقصى لإيقاف الاحتراق. بعد الانتهاء من عم
こんにちは、ハワイ通信テック
It is most important 
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Rapport des trente minutes: les mouvements de tête ne provoquent ni nausées ni aucun malaise. Je suis surpris de pouvoir regarder le soleil d'aussi près; il brille directement sur mon visage et je n'ai qu'à me
正解です。4行目、つまりステップ4の「チェック」の部分
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 재정렬 작업은 잘 진행되었습니다. 저는 육분의로 별을 찾아 정렬하는 데는 성공했지만, 스캐닝 망원경에서 레고르나 멘켄트 같은 별을 관측할 때는 그 별을 식별할 수 없었
Okay, hier sollte 02:41:01, Herunterfahren, und - - ang
Хорошо, о DECA POWER мы поговорим позже, Фредо
好的，让我重新设置一下配置。我现在要这么做。我记得她进来的时候没有开启任何高推进器。你能再确认一下吗？为此，我给你量一
Аполлон-8, Аполлон-8. Похоже, ва
نعم، لقد انتهينا من ذلك ال
حسنًا. تصحيح المسار رقم 4: ألفا نوفمبر / 62888، ألفا نوفمبر ناقص 00012، ناقص 00011، زائد 00012 031 008 323، ألفا نوفمبر، زائد 00618 00020 011 00020 17 2965 308، ألفا قنطورس، لأعلى 073، لليسار 34. بالنسبة للنجوم، سيكون ا
夏威夷，Sigma Seven。我完全明白你的
وأنت جاهز للانطلاق. تشير تقارير هانتسفيل إلى أن لديك وسادة دفع تدوم 6 ثوانٍ، أي أطول بثلاث ثوانٍ من حالة 3 س
आप लोग बहुत अच्छा काम कर रहे हैं। तस्वीर एकदम स्थिर है। क्लैरिटी शानदार है। रंग भी बढ़िया हैं - बादल स
मैं तुम्हारे
محركات جيمبال، زاوية الميل 2
N
E
- - è stato inizializzato e si trova su ENTR
그리고 아폴로 13호, 휴스턴. 연소
알겠습니다. S-6는 세포성
オートマチックが 68 (パーセント)、マニュアルが 7
Roger
约翰，我从来没有直接看到它们朝我飞过来，但它们肯定是在远离我。我几乎随时都可以敲击胶囊，就能得到一大束光，要么是绿色的
OK, Odyssey, Houston. On est prêts 
どうぞ、大統領。こちらはヒューストンです。出て行
Правильно. Хорошо. Далее: следующая камера — Подождите 1. У меня здесь шум. Хорошо. Следующая — Следующая камера будет 16-миллиметровой, и эти фотографии считаются приоритетными 3. Хорошо. Во-первых, возьмите 16-миллиметровую камеру и блок питания из A-8. Возьмите 10-миллиметровый объектив и снимите его — снимите 10-миллиметровый объектив и возьмите 18-миллиметровый объектив из B-3 и подключите его к камере. И подключите кабель питания, установите частоту кадров 12 кадров в секунду, и та же строка данных, которую я вам дал ранее, на этот раз будет выглядеть так: /DAC/18/CEX, батарея (f:8 и 1/250). Хорошо. Теперь, глядя на 
음, 그건 불가능해요. 전자식 조
자, 휴스
كولومبيا، هيوستن. هل ضغطت على زر إعادة الضب
Sì. I transienti erano più evidenti rispetto alle accensioni precedenti, Charlie. L'ho semplicemente attribuito al fatto che avevamo un modulo di comando leggero, ma c'era una considerevole attività di rollio che si è attenuata dopo i primi 20 secondi, direi, dell'accensione; poi c'era anche un po' di attività di beccheggio e imbardata. Non credo fosse anormale, e sembrava che le bande morte fossero piuttosto nette in rollio più o meno 8 gradi da entrambi i lati della linea centrale; e dopo i primi due - oh, dopo i primi 20 secondi circa, i gimbal e
Да, подтверждаю
わかりました、フレッド。3行目のCOMMの下のDISPLAYSを開いて、その下のDIS
準備は完
ठीक है। मैं बस यह जानना चाह 
Okay. Ich habe eine Veränderung der Hintergrund
र
Apollo 11, Houston. Basierend auf unseren Beobachtungen seit der Mittellinie zeigen wir einen Gammawert von -6,57 an. Dies ist jedoch vorläufig, und wir gehen davon aus, dass sich die Position nach weiterer Beobachtung stabilisieren wird und wir sie präzise in den Korridor einfädeln können. Sie befindet sich etwa in der Mitte des Korridors; alles sieht gut aus. Wir werden Ihnen in ein paar Stunden, bevor Sie schlafen gehen, die Eintrittsinformationen (PAD) zukommen lassen. Und von unseren Kollegen aus der Öffentlichkeitsarbeit gibt es neben Ihrem Flug noch ein paar weitere Schlagzeilen. Sie dominieren weiterhin die Nachrichten. Es gibt jedoch noch einige andere interessante Dinge für Sie. Wie ich bereits erwähnt habe, wurde das All-Star-Spiel wegen Regens abgesagt. Es wird morgen stattfinden. Präsident Nixon wird es jedoch nicht wie geplant besuchen können. Wir halten Sie über die Ergebnisse auf dem Laufenden. Und auch die Wettervorhersage ist gut für Sie. Unsere Prognose sieht gut aus für das Bergungsgebiet; es sollte dort draußen sehr schön sein. Präsident Nixon, der sich auf den Flug zur Begrüßung Ihrer 
And the only other thing on this TV is that the experts tell us that - do not point - with the wide angle lens on the camera, do not point at either the earth or the moon. 
コロンビア
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। तस्वीर की स्पष्टता और बारीकियों से हम वाकई बहुत प्रभावित हैं। रंग भी बहुत अच्छे हैं। अब, हमारे मॉनि
Looking at the world of sports, let's see here. While you were busy the other day, Joe Namath and football Commissioner Pete Rozelle made the announcement that "Broadway Joe" had agreed to sell his interest in the Bachelors III restaurant and report to the New York Jets. Joe arrived at the Jets' training camp today and had his first workout. Several other Jet players who had held out along with Joe also reported. And Davy Hill, from Jackson, Michigan, won his third major golf in as many starts in the past week. He won the Philadelphia Classic. Hill has won four tournaments so far this year and is the leading money winner this year with a cool $129.000. And in baseball, the west division of the National League remains a tight race. LA and San Francisco are one game behind league leading Atlanta. The Astros have a record of 48 wins and 48 losses, and are now in fifth place, seven games out. A twin bill between the Astros and Cincinnati last night was postponed because of rain. The Chicago Cubs are still in first place in the East Division. They lead the New York Mets by four and one half games. And in the American League, Baltimore is breezing toward the Eastern Division title. They lead second place Boston by 11 games. Looking ahead, the All Star baseball game is scheduled for tomorrow. And President Nixon was scheduled to see the game and then leave immediately after the game for the Pacific splashdown area before going on his tour of Europe. And that about covers the news this day. You guys have been making most of it and I'm sure we couldn't fill you in on any of the details that you don't already know. O
没错……当时是11点3
Sì. Se vuoi, puoi ottenere una
降りてきていますが、
No, non l'ho fatto; non ne ero consapevole nel tempo t
हवाई। नहीं मिल पा रहा ह
Et, Aquarius, Houston. Nous commen
أبولو 8، هيوستن. يظهر لنا أنك أغلقت الجهاز آخر مرة منذ حوالي 4 دقائق، لذا نرجو منك الانتظار 15 دقيقة أخرى ثم محاولة إعادة تشغيله في ذلك الوقت، ثم التوج
Apollo 8, Houston. Tutti gli aggiornamenti sono arrivati; i
알겠습니다. 이제 VHF 거리 측정으로 넘어가죠
Non c'era alcun disorientamento. Sentivo che potevo guardare il terreno dall'alto in basso – mi sentivo perfettamente a mio agio a guardarlo – e potevo anche girarmi sulla schiena e guardare in alto, senza che questo mi disorientasse in alcun modo. La navicella spaziale era il mio miglior riferimento. Ogni volta che la vedevo, avevo subito un buon punto di riferi
わかりました。セカンダリー・ラド・インは70度、つまり約72度と伝えました。ラド・アウトは約30度、グリコール蒸発温度は約65度、蒸気圧は最大で、グリコール排出圧力は約9psiです。アキュムレーター（セカンダリー・アキュムレーター・スーツ）は約52度、キャビンは約58度、圧力はスーツが4.1度、キャビンが5度です。CO2分圧は1を少し超える約1.1度まで上昇しています。家の側面では、温度は72度、ヘリウムは3500度、N2 Aは2300度、N2 Bは約2450度です。燃料は約165度、燃料電池1は両方とも閉で、ジップになっています。スキン温度は405度、凝縮排気は低目盛りです。燃料セル2 - 現在、O2またはH2フローの測定値は0.13～0.14です。O2フローはフルスケールで上限値を維持していますが、スラスターの活動状況によって変動しています。また、メインバスAの電圧も約1.1Vからフルスケールまで低下しています。スキン温度は約445度、凝縮排気は17V（補正値180）です。燃料セル1の電流値は0アンペア、2の電流値は44アンペア前後
良好。41302
たぶんそうだ。今朝起きた時にパージしたんだ、バズ。水素も一緒にパー
Роджер. Мы не будем исполь
Yes. We're watching you as well, 
罗杰。10，/：45597，减 040，加 157，加 35189，减 01513，减 00346 180 007 000，十一月阿尔法星加 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253，视轴星天蝎座δ星（又名Dzuba）
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。背圧弁が
我们同意。请您将乙二醇温度入口阀的设置调回自
ただし、スーツの吸気温度は依然として 58 度を維持
هيوستن، هيوستن، أبولو 13. 
Джек, ты сейчас в тени; у нас есть небольшие помехи от твоего окна, которое очень яркое, поэтому мы не можем... Мне кажется,
Tranquility Base, this is Houston. Can you give us some idea of how you're progressing on the doffing and prepa
Ricevuto. Il DELTA sembrava funzionare correttamente. Il tempo di combustione ci è sembr
На первом из углов угол Джека с
好的。请翻到第 2 页，完成步骤 5 和步骤 6，并进行以下更改。电源/温度监控器、交流母线、逆变器 2，然后是逆变器 1。第四行 CB(
Нет. На самом деле, я уже
Pen
명암 대비가 매우 강하고, 현재
자, 이제 강조하자면, 여기 파워 앰프, 끄기; 트랜스폰더 끄기; AC 인버터 2, 끄기; 그리고 마지막으로 250번 패널의 CB BAT 베이커 전원 입력/포스트랜딩, 열기입니다. 그런 다음, 알려주신 순서를 역순으로 따라가서 다시 원래대로 돌아가면 됩니다. 예를 들어, MDC 3 UP 텔레메트리, 끄기 - 다시 끄기; 그다음 AC 인버터 - AC1 버스 1을 끄기; 그다음 AC 인버터 2, 끄기; AC 인버터 2, 메인 B를 끄기 순으로 하면 되는 거죠? 이런 순서로 되돌리기를 원하시는
11, Houston. Nous aimerions tester le fonctionnement avec l'antenne à gain élevé. Veuillez sélectionner « Réacquisition » et régler votre antenne en bande S sur « GAIN ÉLEVÉ 
请
Okay, Jack. I'm looking at your burn pad and I see that the... total gimbal... 19.3 feet per seco
Perché non lo spegni tra una cosa e l'altra, Jim?
ठीक है। संज्ञा 71: हमने 30 और 37 का उपयोग किया, चार गेंदें 1; संज्ञा 93: प्लस 00016, प्लस 00033, प्लस
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम ऑन एचएफ। क्या आप सुन रहे हैं? ओवर
La riparazione della valvola di sfiato e dell'ECS O2 è stata m
Roger, Frank. Vous voulez la portée et la vitesse à l'heure de la télév
На вашем GETRC эт
극궤도에서 직접 투하되는 이 폐기물들을 보는 것도 꽤 흥미로울 것 같네요. 충돌까지 
Okay. That's al
Уолли. Гавайская компания по управле
Roger. Bien reçu, Gemini. Sachez qu'ils prévoient d'entrer dans une zone -3. Ils s'intéressent actuellement aux zones 6 ou 7-3. Ils souhaitent q
이글, 휴스턴입니다. 알겠습니다. 신호 강도 3.8이 감지되었
可能是推
로저. 당신의 RETRB는 16+10입니다. 다른 읽기 응
We used the forward dump valve until about 2 psi, and we'r
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। अगला चरण है, अंदर की थैल
D'accord, très bien. D'accord, je vais
Roger, Frank. Fategli sapere che abbiamo confrontato i suoi ultimi dat
了解しました。正解です。それではタンク2を監視しましょう。もしタンク2の圧力が下がらない場合は、上昇供給を
Wir haben 22 Fu
제 요 레티클이 아주 잘 작동하고 있다는
Okay, Jim. Since the antenna switch is kind of annoying, we've talked them into buying only half of the data. I
Хорошо. 170° восточной долготы, GMT 17:00:00. Это 47-я ре
Sono un po'
Roger. Downlink da
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Что касается сравнения: используя векторы, мы получаем минус 1,4 на средней траектории по сравнению с вашими 2,8. Мы обработали ваши решения на нашем компьют
Cavolo, è davvero difficile descrivere l'aspetto di
Apollo 11, Houston. Données de bloc
Das ist bestätigt, Apollo 8. Wir werden das Manöver timen und dann in der normalen Vorbereitungssequenz alles durchführen. Und – wir haben hier einen Spielstand – im vierten Viertel, 31 zu 13. Und ich habe jederz
Roger. And T/M down here is saying that the Fuel Cell O2 and H2 Heater ci
Allez-y, Hous
नहीं, मुझे माफ़ करना -
В отсеке А1 магазин для 16-миллиметрового пистолета будет расположен в окне номер 4 вместо 5. Диспенсеры для салфеток; остался только один. А в отсеке U3 кронштейн для 16-миллиметрового пистолета находится в окне 4, и сумка
Хорошо. Кажется, нам удалось зафиксировать положение на протяжении последней — ну, примерно минуты. Стрелка... колебалась вверх и вниз, стрелки тангажа и рыскания тоже, но, похоже, сейчас все стабилизировалось само собой. Мы как раз заканчиваем продувку топливного элемента. Водород на третьем т
どうぞ
好
This little tape recorder has been a big benefit - has been a big benefit to us in passing some of our time away on our transit to the Moon, and it's rather odd to see it floating like this in Odyssey while it's playing the theme from "2001." And, of course, the tapes wouldn't be
Bene.
Gemelli
Ok, Charlie. Non è molto aperto. È
Q
好吧，看来我们只能这么做了。有人
わか
Роджер. 
Роджер. Мы почувствовали рыво
닐, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 사진을 찍고 있어요. 지금은 당신이 사진에 안 나오네요. 하지만
حسنًا. نود الحصول على بعض التعليقات منك قبل 
Roger. Le feu fonctionne bien. Je ne peux pas dire exactement à quelle distance il se trouve, je dirais environ 800 mètres. Le propulseur s'est mis à to
Bene. Abbiamo completato la nostra manovra. Siamo nella nostra ampia zona morta e Nunki è quasi in cima alla mia visualizzazione. Al mome
À Reno, au Nevada, faute de cheminée, un petit garçon a écrit au Père Noël par l'intermédiaire du journal local, lui suggérant d'utiliser la porte d'entrée. Il faudra peut-être donner un petit coup de pied en bas, car elle coince. À Little Rock, en Arkansas, les bébés nés à l'hôpital St. Vincent pendant la semaine précédant Noël et jusqu'au jour de Noël sont remis à leurs mères, à leu
रॉजर। हमने बैटरी A को चार्ज करना शुरू कर दिया है, और वोल्टेज मेरी उम्मीद से काफी ज़्यादा था। यह लगभग 40 के आसपास था। अब बैटरी चार्ज होल्डर में वोल्टेज थोड़ा कम होता दिख रहा है। कल जब हम बैटरी C को चार्ज कर रहे थे, तब मुझे लगा था कि शुरुआत में वोल्टेज ज़्यादा था, लेकिन फिर धीरे-धीरे
알겠습니다. 마지막으로 추가 질문은 연소 중에 공이 어떤 모습이었는지입니다. 아시다시피, 해당 설정에 대한 업데이트를 전달해 드렸는데
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다.
アポロ
Roger, Frank. Vorremmo aggiornarvi sulla vostra traiettoria. Questa rotta intermedia in arrivo risulta essere molto piccola, 0,7 piedi al secondo, e vorremmo non farlo. I nostri dati sembrano estremamente buoni e, estrapolandoli in avanti, mostrano che la rotta intermedia numero 4 a meno 8 ore sarebbe di circa 4 piedi al secondo. Nel frattempo, la traiettoria di ritorno libero sembra molto buona con un punto di spruzzo d'acqua al largo della costa africana. Quindi sembra che vi troviate proprio lungo la vecchia linea centrale, e proponiamo di non fare la prossima rotta in
Sì, lo stavo facendo. Stavo usando il cavo per tirarmi giù verso la navicella spaziale ed ero proprio sopra di essa, a dire il v
Хорошо. Это +11, /. Это 40 минус 163, плюс 129, минус 005, 99, плюс 00 00 0, плюс 47016, 177 143 000 Ноябрь Ал
좋아요.
好了，我们已经完成了
알겠습니다. 음, 그렇게 오래 진행할 수 있을지는 잘 모르겠네요. 다른 실험들, 예를 들어 입체 사진 촬영이나 다른 사진 촬영 기
여기는 VOX 녹음 전용으로 시그마 세븐입니다. 고속 추진기 작동 없이 일반 자동 모드를 복구했습니다. 현재 85%는 
Apollo 8, qui
로저. 47페이지 1단계에 따라, 우리는 유도 제어 장치를 PGNS, 모드 제어, PGNS, AUTO로 
手动比例模式，手动
了解、デルタ。全部手に入れ
Хорошо. Два выключателя — два автоматических выключателя на панели 250 — снова разомкнуты; два автоматических выключателя на панели 275 — снова разомкнуты; автоматический выключатель ввода/вывода питания, мы уже позаботились ранее; инвертор переменного тока 2, мы уже позаботились ранее; инвертор переменного тока 2 к шине переменного тока 1 — выключится; и инвертор переменного тока, шина переменного тока 1, мы уже позаботились — нет, он тоже выключится; и кнопка «Вверх», кнопка «Сброс команды»
„0,1 Fuß pro Sekunde.“ Der Grund für die Reduzierung der Brenndauer ist, dass wir aufgrund der langen Ausfallzeit des ASA-Schalters nicht sicher sind, ob unsere Ergebnisse gestochen scharf sein werden. Wir wollen daher sicherstellen, dass wir die Brenndauer genau einhalten – ohne Überbelichtung. Deshalb reduzieren wir die Brenndauer um eine Sekunde. Dadurch haben wi
LMP хотел бы выпить Sec
알겠습니
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। क्या आप कॉल कर 
رأينا عواصف رعدية كثيرة أسفلنا. يبدو أننا نتحرك بشك
네, 마지막으로 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 결정이 내려지기 전에 계속 설명드리겠습니다. 허용 가능한 데드밴드는 660~770psi입니다. 다시 말해, 이 두 값 사이의 압력을 발생시키는 상승 시간은 약 103시간 후에 임계 압력 이하로 유지됩니다. 따라서 압력이 이 범위 내에 있으면 문제가 없습니다. 만약 압력이 770~800psi 사이로 측정되면 약 59시간 후에 다시 압력을 측정해 주셔야 합니다. 자세한 절차는 잠시 후에 알려드리겠습니다. 압력이 800psi 이상이면 좀 더 자세한 절차를 진행해야 합니다. 우선 PCM 데이터를 확보하는 등의 조치를 취해야 합니다. 정확한 상승 시간을 확인하고 계기판이 딸깍 소리를 내며 올라가는 시점을 알아내려면 잠시 동안 계기판을 응시하셔야 할 수도 있습니다. 극단적인 경우에는 연소 과정을 고려해야 할 수도 있지만, 실제로 그런 일이 발생할 가능성은 낮다고 생각합니다. 자, 이제 필기할 준비가 되셨다면, -1페이지와 -2페이지 사이에 활성화 체크리스트에 추가 또는 변경
मैंने आपका संदेश पढ़ लिया। ये कौन है जो म
Хорош
Roger. Ora, per manovrare a rollio 0, beccheggio 90 e imbardata in entrata - e beccheggio in entrata qui, rollio qui. Imbardata - qualsiasi imbardata abbiamo in entrata. Okay, Vance. N
Siamo in buona forma
और हम - अनुवादित प्लस X. वह कैप्चर प्र
D'accord. Première instruction: « Vérifier en mode OPÉRATION pendant 5 minutes. » Ensuite, on passe à l'adresse 400 + 5, puis 400 + 0. Tangage et roulis en mode IMPULSION; lacet, mode CONTRÔLE. Manœuvrez en utilisant le t
Давление в камере сгорания держалось на уровне около 100. В заключительной части процесса сгорания оно начало не
西
Роджер, CSQ... и спутник был близко к солнцу. Мой малый конец начал немного смещать
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы действительно впечатлен
了解。03 47 35; 61.2; 01 プラス 22; ヨーゼロ、ピッチ21度下降; 25, 00570; 26, 00224; 27 すべてゼロ; 後方スラスタ; ポジグレード
Ну, это значит, что мне нужно
J'ai trouvé davantage de cibles pot
Ich glaube, Buzz hat wahrscheinlich recht. Tatsächlich habe ich einmal eine Markierung gesetzt, die mir etwas fehlerhaft vorkam, aber ich dachte: „Na ja, was soll’s. Ich probiere es trotzdem mal aus“, und bekam fünf Nullen. Und selbst wenn ich dachte, alles wäre abs
今なら取り上げてもいいと思います
弗雷德，这事儿
了解。宇宙船へのコマンド送信が困難です。UPテレメトリスイッチをCOMMAND RESETにしてからOFFにし、その後NORMAL
11, Хьюстон. Дов
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Кон
Понял, Джим. Мы стараемся как можно быстрее завершить разработку процедур и предоставить их вам. Они уже существуют. Сейчас ребята запускают их в CMS/LMS, интегрируют, чтобы убедиться, что подход правильный, а сроки соблюдены и всё такое. И они закончат этот запуск ещё через 
로저, 11. 이건 TLI+11
Nous pouvons vous donner l'angle de cardan en tangage sur la direction radiale si c
I miei occhi stanno diventando quadrati. È quello che abbiamo fatto per gran parte della giornata, Ken. Stai ricevendo
ديك، أخيراً فهمت الأمر. بدأت أشعر ببعض البرودة. وانخفضت درجة حرارة مدخل البدلة إلى 76
好的，杰克。我觉得你不需要把所有的断路器都重新读一遍，因为我们已经在你操作的时候记录下来了。如果你只想回
还有，11，供您参考，如
매우 
姿态控制非常好。手动燃油似乎很充足
Qu
Roger, Neil. Grazie. Sembra anche che appena a sinistra del terminatore, nell'emisfero settentrionale, ci sia una fascia nuvolosa che si muove verso nord-ovest/sud-est. Ci sembra che si trovi più o meno sopra gli
收到。我的控制模式是电传操
Ed meint, man müsse das Raumschiff bei Winkeln über 20° steuern. Gleichzeitig ist mir aufgefallen, dass du ziemlich große Drehungen durch
물론이죠, 프랭크. 두 분 중 한 분은 통신기를 계속 
Affermati
It h
了解。位相調整02 18 25
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 수치는 백분율로 표시되어 있습니다. 이제 파운드로 변환할 예정이며, 그동안 약 2분 30초 후에 지상 안테나를 교체할 것입니
Хорошо. Мне нужно выяснить, герметичен ли контейнер для конденсата, который мы собирались использовать дл
좋아
35-4 前方83、後方57。2+18。1+11
ヒューストン、こちらはア
Apollo 8,
Hey, 
The systems on the ground look fairly normal at this time. The temperatures are a little bit on the high side but there's nothing critical showing up. The latest reports show that the inverters are about 200 [degrees] and 210 [degrees]; this does not seem to be critical. They should be holding al
Roger. Control fuel is 90-100 [percent], oxygen is 75-100 [percent
نعم، يمكنك إلقاء نظرة - إذا كنت تبحث عن شيء تفعله، يمكنك فقط إلقاء نظرة على اللوحة 1 و 8 وكل ذلك والتأكد من أن ج
Roger, Michael
ブルース、降下中のあの時点で16ミリフィルムが機能していたら、着陸地点を確認できるだろうと期待しています。上昇中に着陸地点の近くに何か認識できる物体が見つかるかもしれないと思っ
روجر، ١١. بخصوص سؤالك عن شحن البطارية، نعتقد أن الأمر قد يختلف بين البطاريات الفردية؛ ويبدو أن المشكلة قد اختفت كحالة عابرة عند بدء التشغيل. من العوامل الأخرى التي قد تؤثر على ذلك درجة حرارة البطارية، وما شابه. يبدو أن شركة E
Your cuff is ful
C'est exact. Nous avons également
J'espère que tu as fait du bon t
СБРОС, ВЫКЛ и НИЗКИЙ. Хорошо. Шина освещения выключена; Н
了
トランスデューサー、グループ 1 および 2、メイン A およびメイン 
はい。ジム、参考までに、最初に聞いたかどうかは分かりませんが、2時半から1時までの区間は3回ほど走行しており、かなりタイトなので、できるだけ削ろうと努力しました。とはい
आप कंप्यूटर के किस मोड में थ
आधे रास्ते 
알겠습니다.
Аврора Севен. Muchea Cap Com. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1 команда голо
سأستخدم الآن تكبيرًا منخفضًا. تصحيح: تكبير عالٍ على المنظار، انظر كيف يبدو؟... انحرفت نحو اليمين حوالي 5 درجات. انظر كيف تتطابق مع المنظار في هذه المرحلة. لنفترض أن محاور الانحراف (المؤشر) عند 
ठीक है। हम इसे करेंगे और हम यह सुनि
حسناً. هذه 
Hier ist die Erde. Hey, ich habe von hier aus eine tolle 
我们演奏完最
了解しました。/ - これは 3 - 46427、マイナス 053、プラス 141、プラス 28960、マイナス 00456、プラス 00720 180 021 002、NA、
Sarò felice di 
10、/：45597、マイナス040、プラス157、プラス35186、マイナス01512、マイナス00520 1
알겠습니
これはすでにステップ 35 として実行されている可能性があります。UP TELEMETRY を BLOCK、
3 Minuten. Was haben wir bekommen, ungefähr ein Gramm, 
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Как вы определяете наш
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。もう一度、探査をお願いします。自動光学系に追跡を任せ、月面の「」の特定に全力を注いでください。もちろん、「」を見つけられればの話ですが。私たちは「」の痕跡を探していますが、
Roger. Wir beginnen mit den Weltnachrichten. Lob für die amerikanischen Apollo-8-Astronauten und Hoffnungen auf internationale Zusammenarbeit in der Weltraumforschung wurden mit den weltweiten Weihnachtsbotschaften verbreitet, während das kleine Raumschiff den Mond umkreiste. Selbst in der kommunistischen Welt herrschte Begeisterung für die erste bemannte Mondlandung. In Moskau erinnerte der sowjetische Wissenschaftler Anatoli Besaranow daran, dass sein Land und die Vereinigten Staaten bereits zuvor Weltraumwissen ausgetauscht hatten, und sagte voraus, dass der Apollo-8-Flug zu einer verstärkten Zusammenarbeit führen würde. In Kuba wiederholte Radio Havanna das Programm von Voice of America, um seine Hörer über die Apollo-8-Rede zu informieren. Laut Voice-of-America-Vertretern war es das erste Mal, dass ein Programm einer US-Behörde im Radio von Havanna ausgestrahlt wurde. Die Tschechoslowakei verfolgte die Mondlandung durch eine umfassende Fernsehberichterstattung; und in Budapest, Ungarn, war das Thema in Zügen und Bussen allgegenwärtig. In der nicht-kommunistischen Welt hielten Büroangestellte und Weihnachtseinkäufer den Atem an, als das Raumschiff für den Start zur Erde vorbereitet wurde. Franzosen auf der Straße lobten das amerikanische Know-how und die Weltraumleistung, und einige Fernsehzuschauer jubelten beim Betrachten der Mondbilder: „Magnifique!“. In London drängten sich Scharen von Weihnachtseinkäufern in Geschäfte und Pubs, um die Fernsehbilder der Mondkrater zu sehen. Großbritanniens führender Weltraumastronom, Bernard Lovell, der das Apollo-8-Projekt bis vor wenigen Wochen kritisiert hatte, weil Instrumente die Aufgabe hätten erledigen können, ohne das Leben der Astronauten zu gefährden, machte deutlich, dass er von der Mondlan
Bene. Vi darò un breve riassunto dei sistemi. Fondamentalmente, tutti i sistemi sono a posto. Per quanto riguarda la vostra traiettoria di ritorno, possiamo ancora raggiungere la linea del Pacifico ce
Oui. Il n'y a aucune trace d'humidité visible. Et il n'y a pas d'humidité autour du papier buvard. Malheureusement, vous avez recouvert les murs, je ne peux donc pas
收到。滚转和俯仰角与飞行计划略有偏差，11。滚转角现
You have the Computer Swit
Ricevuto. Ecco il riepilogo del pannello: gli interruttori dei fusibili sul pannello sinistro sono tutti come precedentemente riportato, senza ripeterli. Squib è armato. Il Retrojettison automatico è disattivato. La selezione della modalità è normale, automatica, il giroscopio normale. Tutte le manopole a "T" sono inserite. Il Retro Delay è normale, le luci della cabina sono entrambe accese. Ho i filtri rossi accesi, ovviamente. Il Telem a bassa frequenza è acceso. Gli aiuti di soccorso sono automatici. Tutti gli elementi del pannello di sequenza sono normali, tranne il Landing Bag in posizione centrale-off. Il carburante è al 90-100%. Le indicazioni di
روجر. لدي 20 في الم
Roger. Stella del sestante, 12 1037 211, centro della Terra in basso 063, a destra 23 più 1068 meno 16500 12505 35061 stelle del nord, rollio 068, beccheggio 097, imbardata 356, spazio vuoto nessuno, 
哦，原来如此。
好的。在你复制之前，让我先完整地读一遍，这样你就能明白我们讨论的内容了。这篇短文的标题是“电视和电影摄影相关性实验”，他们想做的是将装有长焦镜头的电视摄像机安装在支架上，置于交会窗口，分别通过红色和蓝色滤镜拍摄地球的电视图像，每个滤镜拍摄一分钟；也就是说，分别使用红色和蓝色
11, ह्यूस्टन। आप ब्लॉक पर वापस जा सकते हैं। हमने सामान पहुंचा दिया 
Vorrei solo dire che, anche se per qualche motivo dovessimo esaurire il tempo o qualcosa del genere e
了解。この時点でス
Le soleil était à environ 40° au-de
了解。もし離陸時に操縦装置がうまく機能しなくても、前方OMNIアンテナは離陸後30～60秒程度は正常に動作するようです。その後は、後方OMNIアンテナが残りの上昇中は正常に動作します。
I'm going to
روجر. تقرير متواصل
로저. 혹시나 해서 이번 TV 테스트 촬영에 달에 빨간색과 파란색 필터를 씌운 장면을 넣고 싶은 충동이 스며들지 않았는지 확인해 봤습니다. 이미 빨간색과 파란색 필터를 씌운 
Du kanns
알겠습니다. 그리고, 저기, 저희가 그걸 기록해 두겠습니다. 프로브와 드로그는 CDR이 있는 곳에 보관해 주시면 될 것 같습니다. 제가 방금 짐에게 읽어드린 장비 이송 목록에 변경 사
ウォーリー、ええ、6番目の最後のところです。あ
Хорошо, мне придётся это сд
D'accord. Il s'agit d'une manœuvre de
ठीक है। आपको अपने शरीर के केंद्र का ध्यान रखना होगा। कभी
मेरी खिड़कियों पर लगभग 30 फीट/सेकंड की गति दिखाई दे रही है। बूस्टर बहुत तेज़ी से द
当然。舱内温度 92 度。宇航
新数据点 50.40 Theta，7.9；R，92.22；Delta-V 总值，376；Delta-VI，175.1。看来控制开关
ओह, हाँ। आप नीचे
酸素は約950ポン
ह्यूस्टन, तै
スポーツでは、ヒューストン・オイラーズがカービルでのプレシーズン序盤のトレーニングに意欲を見せており、ウォーリー・レム監督は優秀な新人選手たちに感銘を受けていると語った。ナショナルリーグの昨日木曜日の試合は、セントルイス 11、フィラデルフィア 3、モントリオール 5、ピッツバーグ 4、アトランタ 12、シンシナティ 2、サンフランシスコ 14、ロサンゼルス 13。アメリカン
好的。你的二级辐射输入温度，我给你的是70到72度左右；辐射输出温度大约是30度；乙二醇蒸发温度读数大约是65度；蒸汽压力满刻度高，乙二醇排​​放压力大约是9磅/平方英寸。二级蓄能器（宇航服）显示大约52度；舱室大约58度；压力，宇航服读数4.1，舱室读数5。二氧化碳分压略高于1，大约1.1。在房屋侧面，温度是72度，氦气读数3500；氮气A读数2300；氮气B大约2450。燃料读数大约是165；燃料电池1，两个都关闭了，它们没有反应；皮肤温度405度；冷凝器排气量程较低。燃料电池 2 - 目前氧气或氢
Ну что ж, Джеймс, если ты не можешь лучше заботиться о космическ
罗杰。佩里辛托斯星加 2，最小值 / 62871，NA，NA，减 00468，加 00254，加 00181 173 101 027，NA
روجر، لق
Okay. Können wir – da Sie im ersten Teil einfach vorlesen und ich abschreiben werde und wir später eine Fragerunde habe
Хьюстон, Колумбия, использова
Gemini VI, Ha
알겠습니다. 저희 VHF 통신 상태를 확인하기 위해 잠시 다운링크를 요청드리겠습니다. 진입 인터페이스에서 약
Yes. That's about the way we have it here. Just be careful on your use of i
やあ、ヒューストン、
ठीक है। मैंने दोबारा पढ़ा: सेकेंडरी एक्यूमुलेटर की मात्रा की निगरानी करें; सेकेंडरी ग्लाइकोल रेडिएटर वाल्व को 30 सेकंड के लिए सामान्य स्थिति में रखें, फिर उसे बाईपास कर दें। यदि सेकेंडरी एक्यूमुलेटर की मात्रा में कोई कमी नहीं होती है, तो सेकेंडरी ग्लाइकोल रेडिएटर वाल्व को सामान्य स्थिति में रखें। सेकेंडरी कूलेंट लूप पंप को AC 1 या 2 पर सेट करें। 3 मिनट बाद, सेकेंडरी ग्लाइकोल डिस्चार्ज प्रेशर 39 से
Роджер. Я
Apollo
罗杰。时间 75 41 23。
Apollo 8, Houston. I am transmitting in the blind right now.
Ok
ठीक है। यह पूरी तरह से स्पष्ट नहीं है कि यह वास्तव में मैकेनिकल स्टॉप तक पहुंचा है या नहीं, और अगर पहुंचा भी है, तो बैक रूम के लोग कहते हैं कि हम बिना किसी नुकसान के अधिकतम 15 मिनट तक उस स्टॉप के पास रह सकते हैं। और हम इसे एक बार फिर से ट्रैक करना चाह
This is Friendship Seven. started out operating, it would drop into orientation mod
And, Fred, your CO2 is building up. It's at 11 on our gage, and we've got a medical buildup to 15 millimeters, at which time we'll switch over to secondar
Понял, Фредо. Теперь мы не... также при минус 30 секундах мы не наблюдаем сгорания, так что можете вычеркнуть "Кнопка ПРЕ
Я уже предлагал это некоторое время назад. Он указывал на проблему с весом. Нам нужно держать калорийность на низком 
Vediamo, queste cose sono nel modulo di comando, non è vero? Quei cavi ombelica
بما أننا لسنا كذلك - ليس واضحًا لي أننا لم نواجه توقفات ميكانيكية لفترة من الوقت في المرة السابقة. قد يفسر ذلك 10 دقائق من تلك الـ 15 دقيقة، ولا جدوى من المخاطرة. أعتقد أنه يجب علينا - إذا بدأ الاتصال بالانقطاع مرة أخرى - أن نعيده إلى الوضع اليدوي ونعيده إلى مكانه الصحيح. ما زلنا بعيدين عن المنزل، 
जेमिनी VI, ह्यूस्टन। जलने में अब स
Roger. Pour information, nous passons actuellement 
我确实从自动模式切换到了手动
罗杰。我们的想法是，我们可以从窗户里把地球或月球弄出来。我们正在努力寻找一种可以同时把两者弄出来的方法，如果
やあ、ビル。音楽が欲しかったら
ठीक है, वैंस। मैं तुम्हें दे सकता हूँ। मैंने इसे शुरू करने के तुरंत बाद पढ़ा था। BAT A का वोल्टेज 39.4 थ
Ici
好的，比尔。我们之前在E-9页第38步开头漏掉了一个更新，现在需要进行最终漂移检查。在检查完第38步到终止预热步骤之间，我们需要通过将乙二醇蒸发器水开关和
Roger. Se può esserti d'aiuto, Mike, la Terra è a più Y, circa 45 gradi, in una
Я понимаю, что днем ​​стало немного жарко, а когда вы подняли шторы, немного похолодало, но
هذا صحيح. ماذا لديك عليّ الآن؟ سأستعد
तर्जनी उंगली से 
अब हम ठंडे पानी में भिगोने की विधि अपनाना चाह
Okay, Joe. And just for confirmation, I went through the switch list you gave me. We are in exactly that configuration with one exception, and that is over on panel 382. I have not, the a - H2O ACCUMULATOR is in the OFF position so that if we n
حسنًا. الوقت 32 ساعة و00 دقيقة. التعليمات عند الانتهاء: قم بالمناورة إلى 
OK. Mise à jour de la carte pour le 5/6, lever du soleil, méridien de Greenwich, coucher du soleil; -1, heure du pa
Non riesco a capirti molto bene in questo momento. Aspetta che arriviamo di n
了解しました。ご都合がよろしければ、「承認」をお願いします。Wマトリックスを更新します。また、機会があれば、パネルについてもお聞かせください。全員出発されましたか？何かコメントは
Und, Punkt 13, wir möchten überprüfen, ob alle Brennstoffzellenpumpen 
В таком положении определенно создается иллюзия, что смотришь высоко вверх, и если горизонта нет, то это просто черное небо. Количество света в кабине довольно высокое. Конечно, после адаптации его можно уменьшить с помощью освещения салона. На данный момент я несколько не решаюсь уменьшать уровень освещения из-за проблемы с 
Ricevuto. C
확실히 그렇습니다. 우리는 햇빛 아래에 있고, 그들도 모두 그런 것처럼 보이지만, 확실히는 알 수 없습니다. 지금 상황을 재정렬해보고 어떻
Я вижу, как они сейчас снова работают над этим участком Макдоннелла. Представляю, как летит шерсть. Это будет, когда мы вернемся. Я их за это жестко отчитаю. Хочу знать, когда именно они это почистили. Помните? Им было приказ
Ich habe eine Anmerkung zu dem Punkt auf der Erde, an dem die Sonnenstrahlen zu uns zurückreflektiert werden. Im Allgemeinen ist die Farbe der Ozeane größtenteils einheitlich, hell- bis dunkelblau, außer in einem Gebiet mit etwa einem Achtel des Erdradius im 
Okay. Sarà su CB(16), Fred-o, ma è INVERTER 2 APERTO. Okay, sull'att
Sembra buono. Oh, circa 4 metri al secondo in questo momento. L'altitudine è otti
حسنًا يا جاك، لا نستطيع فعل ذلك الآن. ضوء الشمس ينعكس عن المحركات النفاثة، وما زال الحطام الذي تناثر وقت الحادث موجودًا، مما يجعل رؤية النجوم صعبة، ولماذا - ما المقصود برؤية النجوم من النافذة - فقط للتحقق من مسار نظام الملاحة،
了解。パルスコントロールは最小限しか使用しません
Okay. Die von mir angegebenen Wetterdaten zeigen Folgendes: Die 2000 Fuß (ca. 610 m) hohe, verstreute Wolkenschicht am Zielpunkt kann von einer dar
Verseau, Houston. Désolé, mais il y a trop de bruit de fond pour vous entendre.
Roger. Se potessi correlare... l'ul
13, Houston. Il est
C'est 
أبولو 8، هيوستن.
서비스 모듈 사
मैं अभी काफी दूर हूँ। यह निश्चित रूप से एक SLA पैनल है - इसमें कोई संदेह नहीं है। बिल्कुल पैनल जैसा दिखता है। यह चीज़ हमारे S-IVB से आ रही है। अरे वाह, देखो - उस एक चीज़ ने S-बैंड एंट
There is a nice interesting horizon. The sun is off to the left about - oh I'd say 40 degrees. There's a dark line of the surface of the earth, orange at the clouds - a light yellow, a light white and a blue band. A very light blue and I have the Planet Mercury in sight at this point. Before the sun has set. And it's in the proper positio
Roger. An
앞으로 이
Pendant que Fred descend son hamac et le remonte, je vais vous donner une idée de la confusion qui règne, puisqu'il n'y a ni haut ni bas. Je suis perché sur le moteur d'ascension, juste à l'entrée du
रॉजर, 3 अल्फा की कॉपी करने के 
로저
Все режимы работы работают отлично. Температура в тепловом куполе скафандра составляет около 72 градусов, на входе в скафандр — около 63 градусов, немного снижается. Определенно, это оптимальная настройка для этого летательного аппарата — примерно 7,5–8. Я увеличу её ещё на одну ступень, до 8. Я установил
Ok. A meno 4 ore e mezza, configura per SEP. Per prima cosa, BILANCIA COPPIA, ON. In secondo luogo, azzera i contatori; 404, 405, 406, più 0; leggi 470. In terzo luogo, traduci più X a 0,5 piedi al secondo. Quarto, CM/SEP. Quinto, dopo SEP, azzera 470 a 0. Sesto, CONTROLLO ASSETTO, tre, a IMPULSO. Settimo, inclina per acquisire il modulo di servizio per le foto. E una no
L'humidité relative en cabine est de 20 %. Le niveau de réfrigérant est de 66 %. La température de la combinaison est de 68 degrés, la pression indiquée est de 5,8, la température de la vapeur est de 50 degrés dans le circuit de la combinaison et est confortable. L'oxygène est entre 65 et 100 %. L'intensité est de 24, 25, 25, 25 sur le circuit principal; de 25, 25 sur le circuit de secours; de 29 sur le circuit isolé; puis de nouveau sur le circuit principal. Les venti
Stai andando all
你好，Gemini 4，Cape COM TECH。你
罗杰。初步结果 1 如下：/
روجر. يبدو الأمر جيداً، سواء من ناحية التوجيه
私がプレゼンを
好的，杰克。1号油箱的压力接近100磅/平方英寸。这个
好
روجر. كان وزنها 12 أونصة. هذا الوزن بدون الكيس، ووزن ال
这里是友谊七号，正在盲目观测。稍等片刻。友谊七号，正在盲目观测，观察外面的夜空。地平线上方似乎有一层很高的云层，比我在白天看到的任何东西都要高得多。星星似乎穿过这层云层，然后继续向下飞向真正的地平线。这层云层看起来可能有七八度宽。我可以看到云层下方的云；然后是
روجر. إليك تفاصيل لوحة التحكم: مفاتيح الصمامات على اللوحة اليسرى جميعها كما ذُكر سابقًا، دون تكرار. جهاز الإشعال مُفعّل. خاصية الإرجاع التلقائي مُعطّلة. مُحدد الوضع: عادي، تلقائي، الجيروسكوب عادي. جميع مقابض "T" في مكانها. تأخير الإرجاع طبيعي،
Eagle, Houston. Quand vous aurez un moment, vos LCG sont-ils branchés?
杰克，……现在月球上的
わかりました。次はパネル3です。トランス
كولومبيا، هذه هيوستن. هل تسمعون برنامج ترانكويليتي
Роджер, «Дружба номер семь». Слышу вас громко и чётко. Конец 
休斯顿，你读得怎么样？阿波罗8号
Роджер. Ты говорил, что у тебя есть дл
好的。它仍然在第3
그거 꽤 괜찮은 것 같네요
Et j'ai une étoile de lacet de secours pou
Сколько времени нужно, чтобы достичь
很好，减去 00050，加上全零，加上 00
Je te comprends, Gordo. Comment l
Avant de vous donner le n
페리신시온 플러스 2 - 좋아요, 페리신시온 플러스 2
Hier ist Friends
Okay. Più 3195, meno 01267, più 04716 179 008 001, non applicabile, più 00187 33552 311 33355 42 0909 25
Okay. Bezüglich der frühen Fernsehübertragung: Wir verlieren jetzt die Hochgewinnantenne, und es sieht so aus, als hätten wir die frühe Fernsehübertragung ohnehin nur über eine externe Station und deren Auswertung erreichen können. Daher verwerfen wir diese Idee und fahren mit der geplanten Fernsehübertragung fort. Die verbleibenden Kommunikationsprüfungen sind von der Hochgewinnantenne abhängig
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。如果你能在不影响其他任何部件的情况下，将偏振滤镜贴在相机前面，或许能略微
Affermativo.
Mi sento benissimo. È stato un volo
好的，万斯。我刚才听到一声轻微的闷响，听起来像是下降阶段发出
Rog
了解。フレンドシップ・セブンです。ジャイロの
TTC - Sì. Sembra che dovresti essere nei JE
We can see the umbilical connection quite well there, Buzz. We see y
Il semblerait que je sois sur la bonne voie; je pourrais peut-être apercevoir La Mecque. Elle devrait être dans les environs. Je pourrais même la traverse
हम चाहेंगे कि आप उसी स्थिति में वापस आएं, पिच 010, यॉ 045; और फिर उससे बाहर आ जाएं क्योंकि आपका लगभ
11, Houston. Ich habe mir Ihren Bravo-Stickstofftank angesehen. Er war absolut dicht – Korrektur – diesmal absolut dicht. E
ठीक है। मैंने आपके ज
Nessun problema. Controlla semplicemente l'angolazione del mio gimbal e c
Roger. Stand by about a half a second, h
Apollo 11, hier spricht Ho
Wir versuchen jetzt, etwas bergab zu fahren. Wie hoch ist unsere Ges
Oh, you can use your judgment on that, Jack. We'd like at least one, an
Nel bianco. Pronto a sparare a 6 -. Quello era un obliquo. Tiro numero 3. Farò i
罗杰。
11, this is Houston. We copy the angl
Roger, Zanzibar Com Tech, ti ho ricevuto forte e
Sehr klein, ich würde sagen, sie sind etwa 1,5 Millimeter groß oder kleiner. Sie ziehen am Fenster vorbei und ich kann sie vor dem
Хорошо. Температура в салоне около 76 градусов. Очень комф
そこまでいくと予測す
Okay. Das sieht ziemlich gut aus, F
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Wir hören Sie mi
危機の海のすぐ西にあるこの地域は眠りの
アポ
そしてアポロ1
정확히 11분.
Roger. Je pense que je vais... J'imagine que nous serons en train de recharger... au bout de 4 jours, à part ça, nous sommes en assez bonne forme 
Roger. GET B 13 25 52; ​​Delta-V, 9 pieds par seconde; temps de combustion, 0 plus 11; 0 lacet, 0 tangage; Noyau 25, 00090; No
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 90도 회전해 주세요. 짐벌 중앙 각도를 주의 깊게 살펴보세요. 짐벌 록에서 약 30도 정도 남았고, 이 동작 중간쯤
जी हाँ। हमने कंपन महसूस किया, लेकिन यह इतना तीव्र नहीं था कि हमें लगा कि कोई बड़ी दुर्घटना 
हाँ। चार्ली, पिछली बार की तुलना में ट्रांजिएंट्स ज़्यादा ध्यान देने योग्य थे। मैंने इसे हल्के कमांड मॉड्यूल की वजह से नज़रअंदाज़ कर दिया था, लेकिन रोल में काफ़ी हलचल थी जो शायद पहले 20 सेकंड के बाद कम हो गई; लेकिन फिर पिच और यॉ में भी कुछ हलचल हुई। मुझे नहीं लगता कि यह असामान्य था, और सेंटर लाइन के दोनों ओर लगभग 8 डिग्री प्लस या माइनस रोल में डेडबैंडिंग काफ़ी स्पष्ट रूप से हो रही थी; और पहले कुछ सेकंड के बाद - ओह, लगभग पहले 20 सेकंड के बाद, गिम्बल शांत हो गए, और पिच और यॉ भी अपेक्षाकृत शांत थे। उससे पहले, कुछ ऑसिलेशन था लेकिन ज़्
Hast du jetzt eine gute S-Band-Signalstärke, Houst
了解、イーグル
मेरी खिड़की का आधा हिस्सा काला है और दूसरे हिस्से पर हल्की धूप पड़ रही है। अंतरिक्ष यान के अगले हिस्से पर धूप पड़ रही है, इसलिए मुझे रोशनी वाली वस्तु को अनदेखा करके देखना पड़ रहा है। मुझे कोई तारा नहीं दिख रहा है, और मैंन
저 차 뒤쪽에 
Okay. BAT C 37, PYRO BAT A 37, PYRO BAT B 37, A 97 Prozent, B 97 Prozent, C 96 
이게 
يبدو أن الطقس كان متقلباً بعض الشيء ال
Vo
يا أهل هيوستن، نحن نستعد 
ロジャー、Rev 12 RKVでPLAとCLAの時刻を更新します。Rev 13ではカナリア諸島にCバンドの航跡が残ります。また、軌道航法チェックランも行います。姿勢制御には燃料は使用しません。これはG.E.T、つまりG.M.T.の時刻で、12時間16分00秒です。Rev 13のテープダンプはカーナボン上空で行います。カーナボン通過後は、変更が必
Вот примерно то, что мы имеем... Да, это самая удобная маленькая штучка, которую вы когда-либо видели... она вставляется прямо в шлем, не выпадает,
Я вижу, что на данный момент запись идёт не в режиме VOX. Перейду к передаче. У меня Венера, она
Gemini 4, hier spricht
오디세이, 휴스턴입니다. 통신 설정에서 기본 전력 증
Es ist sehr leicht zu erkennen. Von hier aus sieht man die gesamten Kraterränder, natürlich mit dem weißen Halbmond auf der sonnenbeschienenen Seite. Die Schatte
Fred-o，我们还有一次机会，想澄清
Ok. Noi... La vediamo solo come una porzione luminosa del disco lunare, e assomiglia molto a come la vedi dalla Terra. Molto luminosa. Non riusciamo a ve
लगभग 67, 68. सेंसर
ジム、もしコンピューターが必要ないなら、ENTE
Eagle, Columbia. Ihre maximalen Anstellwinkel sind – Korrigiert – Eagle, Houston. Ihre maximalen Anstellwinkel sind 165°
Très bien. Nous avons besoin immédiatement de la tension artérielle du pilote comm
Did you get -...? 
Хорошо. Мне показалось, ч
Roge
B
休斯顿，鹰街和哥伦比亚街交汇处。待命
저 밝은 부분은 황도를 따라 달 지름의 두 배 정도이고, 바깥쪽으로는 달 반
わかりました。今回手に
但我想要出
आपको सूचित किया जाता ह
T
Du hörst schon wieder auf zu reden. 
روجر، وأعتق
Farò un test di orientamento a questo punto, mentre sono in volo e non sono così impegnato. Cerco la maniglia manuale - e ci 
전압 39.4볼트, 
你的
حسنًا. 
Non
Roger. Êtes-vous en mode commandes de vol élec
罗杰，哥伦比亚。我们来了，11号。G&N：37200，减060，加047，098 05 2422，加41448，加03719，减02422。滚转不适用，俯仰020，其余PAD参数不适用。星形设置不适用。空载高度为两四联装——修正，两台喷气发动机持续16秒；使用Bravo和Delta。在注释中，未对接状态——修正，这是针对11号未对接的。当前机载重量为37200磅，大约相当于你方位角的50度。
了解しました。了解し
J'ai finalement baissé la mise au point à environ 2,5 mètres. Oh oui, c'est magnifique, l
Да, свет гаснет, а затем снова загорается через пару секунд — как будто произошла неиспра
好的，杰克。从上开始。好的。低温储罐；H2
क्या इसे डालते समय मुझे पहले स
Und, Vance, welcher Hack ist denn jetzt wieder an
Roger. Abbiamo provato a trasmettere, ma sembrava che il microfono fosse rimasto bloccato lì per
No, just the coast is all that's socked in. The rest of it's CAVU (clear and visibility unlimited). As long as I get som
روجر. لقد تناولت الطعام الآن. هذه الوجبة 
Okay. Und wir sind – wir haben hi
حسنًا. ليس من الواضح تمامًا ما إذا كان الجهاز قد وصل بالفعل إلى نقطة التوقف الميكانيكية، وإذا حدث ذلك، يقول فريق الدعم الفني 
Род
자, 진입합니다. 진입 좌표: 태평양 중부, 000153; 000. 다음 두 줄은 월몰 시각과 달 관측 자세입니다., 178; NOUN 61, -21.66, -; 00:28. 다음 네 줄은 해당 없음입니다. DO는 4.00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353.1, 29.9입니다. 보어사이트 별은 시그마 리브라이며, 아래쪽으로 08.8, 왼쪽으로 0.4입니다. 상승 벡터는 위쪽입니다. 진입 정렬을 위해 별 31과 23을 
Oh, capisci. Stai pensando allo st
제가 다섯 가지를 또렷하게 읽어드리고 
California Cap Com, this is Si
..
Wie geht es den Jungs der sie
अ
كيف هي درجة سطوع الصورة ا
Р
جيم، لم أفهم كل ما قلته، لكن أعتقد أنك كنت تريد معرفة متى ستكون إجراءات الدخول متاحة لك. إذا كان الأمر كذلك، فنحن نتحدث عن حوالي 12
Roger. Der Ballon schwingt in einem Bogen von etwa 100 Grad. Er verschwindet immer wieder aus dem Blickfeld. Momentan steht er fast senkrecht. Markieren Sie jetzt eine Küstenpassage – so scheint es zumindest. Was ich Ihnen sagen will: Er schwingt um 180 Grad, nach oben u
Wir benötigen für jede Bitte ein „GO“; andernfalls werden wir auf Ihre Anweisung hin 1 Stück verbre
Collegare il t
了解しました。GT-2号機とGT-3号機の地上試験でも同じ問題が発生したとの報告があり、どうやらコンピューターの温度が低すぎたことが原因のようです。ヒューストンはあなたに以下の措置を要請
Okay. Bevor Sie mit dem Kopieren beginnen: Diese Prozedur dient im Grunde nur dazu, die Druckmessung für überkritisches Helium zu aktivieren, damit Sie den Wert ablesen können. Die Sorge besteht darin, dass der Druck des überkritischen Heliums innerhalb von 103 Stunden 1800 psi erreichen könnte. Dann bestünde die Gefahr, dass die Berstscheibe beim Aktivieren der Messung platzt. Basierend auf dem Druck beim Start und einer nominalen Anstiegszeit von etwa 6,5 ​​psi pro Stunde sollte der Druck etwa 710 psi betragen. Bit
لا، كل شيء يسير على ما يرام. يبدو أنني ملتزم بستة أيام وأنا سعيد جدًا بذلك. السيارة بأكملها تعمل بشكل ممتاز. في حال لم يتمكن آل من نقل
Negative, 
Ой, черт; им придется... Давайте посмотрим, им придется отправить нам стартовую площадку для TLI, площадку для прерывания TLI и площадку для P37. Все они есть здесь, в этой м
Роджер. Мы почти всё поняли; продолжайте двигаться вправ
ठीक है। दोनों वाहनों पर रडार, ट्रैक और सटीक टेलीमेट्री डेटा उपलब्ध है। ठीक है। हम आपको GET B पर GO दिखा रहे हैं; 11 प्लस 14 प्लस 29; डेल्टा-V, 9 फीट प्रति सेकंड; बर्न टाइम, 0 प्लस 15; यॉ 00, पिच 00; कोर 25, 90090; को
はい、コンピューターの電源を切ってください。コンピューターの電
يا إلهي! أذناي
알겠습니다. 마스터 제목은 "진입, LM 준비, 6시간 전"입니다. 첫째, BAT 5 정상 급유, 켜짐. 둘째, 수정된 / 30분 활성화 체크리스트를 사용합니다. 다음은 5시간 전, 필요한 경우 7시간 전입니다. 이제 사전 진입 절차가 있습니다. 첫째, 서비스 모듈 SEP 자세로 기동합니다. 둘째, 핫파이어 설정을 합니다. 그 아래에서 데드밴드 최대화, 자세 제어, 3을 
Il y a 2 000 pieds d'altitude, avec une descente d'environ 35 pieds par se
收到。双子座4号，你着陆后看起来状
Roger. Hier eine kurze Zusammenfassung der Updates, die du erhalten wirst. Das aktuelle Update für +2 nach einem -8-Vorbeiflugmanöver ist weiterhin gültig und wird nicht aktualisiert. Das nächste Update wird 4 sein. Danach erhältst du zwei +2-Manöver, die von einem abgeschlossenen 4-Manöver ausgehen. Eines davon ist ein Minimum, das andere eine schnell
ठीक है। हमें कुछ समय पहले ऑक्सीजन प्रवाह दर में एक छोटी सी गड़बड़ी दिखाई दी थी, जो अब सामान्य हो गई है। लेकिन सबसे पहले, हम आपसे यह जानना चाहते हैं कि क्या आपने कैनिस्
Ici Sigma Seven. Je répète. La température 
Хорошо. На шаге 5 в E-11 первый подзаголовок — «Шлемы и перчатки», а пункты, следующие за ним, зависят от того, одеты вы в костюм или в рубашку с короткими рукавами, но их необходимо выполнить. И клапаны возврата воздуха в костюме должны быть ОТКРЫТЫ для входа в рубашку с короткими рукавами. И вы должны карандашом отметить, что мощность оптики должна быть ВЫКЛ. Между моментом срабатывания аварийного клапана давления в кабин
E una delle cose belle, Jack, soprattutto per un novizio come me, è la facilità di muoversi qui dent
एक ऊपर था। उ
روجر، أنا 
Okay, Vance. Wenn Sie jetzt nichts mehr sehen möchten, sch
Okay. Die Temperaturanzeige Ihre
我明白你的意
펄스. 저 별들을 사용할 거야. 주사위 굴림은 전혀 없어
Мы, вероятно, будем придерживаться плана полета. Мы собираемся – если это возможно – проверить 
Roger, einen 
As a matter of fact, Bill just mentioned
This is Fri
짐벌 상태도 좋고, 전체적인 
Is t
Время достижения температур
D'accord, je
接下来，
- - minus 0491.7, plus 0000.1,
हाँ। हमने यहाँ शुरुआती 30 घंटे बिना किसी सावधानी और चेतावनी के ही निकाल
Roger, John. Je viens de sortir de la configuration hors tension (l'onduleur était éteint). Le système a redémarré sans problème et restera allumé pour le reste du vol. L'ampérage et la tension sont corrects. L'ampérage est maintenant redescendu à environ 19 ampères, après la remise sous tension. Il était monté à 25 au départ. Je m'approche de vous en configuration inversée cette fois-ci, ce qui est une approche inhabituelle po
Roger. Nur zur Info: Der La
रॉ
はい..
شكرًا. 179
Roger. Understand you want the check on low bit rate for voi
はい、ありがとうご
Houston, Apollo 11. Sur cette étoile, la manœuvre AUTO fonctionne parfaitement. Je suis exactement au point substellaire. Tout est magnifique, sauf qu'aucune étoile n'est visible. Elle est tout si
Roger. Sono appena salito sul sestante e sto guar
सम
斯科特，你身上有地
Das ist richtig, 1
हैसलब्लैड कैमरे से पृथ्वी की तस्वीर लेना कोई बड़ी बात नह
पिछले कुछ दिनों में ऑस्ट्रेलिया के ऊपर वाकई में 
Okay. Wir warten nun darauf, dass 
Okay. Weiter mit Schritt 1; Test 1: 5 Sekunden warten. 5 Sekunden. Automatikmodus. Okay – alle Kontrollleuchten sind aus; der Bereich i
ठीक है। ज़रूर करूँगा। बज़, हम चाहेंगे कि आप ऑक्सीजन टैंक नंबर 2 में पंखा चालू कर दें। और
CSQ, Gemini 4.
Que faudrait-il faire pour utiliser… utiliser le module de commande ou quoi? Pour charger
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo su Marte entro il 2000, ma i leader de
Frank, quello che continuo a immaginare è cosa penserei della Terra a questa altitudine, se fossi un viaggia
D'accord. 4.4. Oui monsieu
रॉजर। सेक्स्टेंट तारा, 12 1037 211, पृथ्वी केंद्र नीचे 063, दाईं ओर 23 प्लस 1068 माइनस 16500 12505 350
Un cratère se forme, Buzz? Juste ici. Je ne sais pas si tu le vois. Sinon
Bonjour, Zanzibar Com Tech. Zanzibar Com Tech, Friendship Seven. Je vous reçois faiblement mais lisible
Schau bloß nicht aus Fenster 1. Wenn es so aussie
Bien reçu. Et vous rangerez les casques
쌍둥이자리 4, 저는 외과의사입니
Okay. Wir haben... einige Verbindungsprobleme und empfangen Sie zwar schwach, aber deutlich. Wir sind bereit, mit uns
روجر. كان وقت الاحتراق دقيقًا - حوالي ثانيتين؛ لدينا قيمة متبقية 4.4X. قمنا بحرقها حتى وصلت إلى 0.2. المواقف اسمية. كانت
ठीक ह
罗杰
罗杰。请你确认一下你的
MAR
سبعة، هذه
好的，你把它放
よし、SEDR（サービスエンジニアリング部門レポート）の連中がやるやり方じゃなくて、私が見た通りに読み上げよう。またあの蛍が見える。ジョンはホッとしただろう。探していたわけじゃ
Okay, Houston. D
Columbia, Houston. Empfangen. Dank
好的。将相机向右移动，屏幕上的地球就会向左移动。
र
روجر. يُرجى ال
Quantité désacti
了解。縦線がある場合、横線が小さな波を生
恐怕这将是很长一段时间
好的。让他回来。大约20秒后，你
로저, 과이마스, 잘 들립니다. 제 조종 모드는 이제 플라이 바이 와이어입니다. 자이로스코프는 작동 중이고, 저는 조종석에 있습니다. 기동은 멈췄습니다. 바로 자동 모드로 전환하겠습니다. 제 상태는 양호하고, 캡슐 상태도 양호합니다. 연료는 69~69%, 산소는 88~100%입니다. 객실 증기 배출구 온도가 플러스 10도까지 올라갔는데, 계기판 오류인 것 같습니다. 우주복 온도 조절 증기 배출구 온도는 천천히 내려가고 있으며, 현재 68도를 가리키고 있습니다. 이
Ne hai ricevuto qualcuno? Ne esce ancora qualcuno? Non hanno risposto. Credo che ce l'abbiamo fatta. Come sta anda
Роджер. Я стыковался в режиме AUTO, и, как я уже говорил, я не был уверен в моменте контакта. Я постоянно сверял показания стыковочного зонда. Я получил два сигнала, указывающих на то, что три защелки захвата — не защелки захвата, а именно три… защелки — сработали, и мы мягко пристыковались. И в тот момент ситуация выглядела очень стабильной. Поэтому я переключился в режим FREE, снова взглянул в окно, и ситуация по-прежнему выглядела стабильной; и я выстрелил из основного баллона №2. И в этот момент между двумя аппаратами началось вращение, я не уверен, из-за чего. Возможно, из-за тяги, или, возможно, оно нарастало раньше, и я этого не заметил. Но в любом случае, во время отвода зонда были отклонен
Yes. That's what it is, Joe. I've got something going on this alarm... ligh
ठीक है। प्रती
И чтобы ответить на ваш вопрос, Вэнс, довольно сложно сразу же ис
The sky is getting quite black at 01 30---elapsed. Fuel
Immagino che
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 26번 별을 사용하고 싶은데, 두 세트는 지구 지평선 근처에 위치하도록 하겠습니다. 그리고 16번 별은 지구 지평선에서 멀리 떨어져 있는 별을 사용하고, 한 세트는 그렇게 하겠습니다. 만약 26번 별을 지구 지평선 근처에 위치시
Ricevuto. Ti sto seguendo. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; meno 061, più 067 135 23 4149;, più 32020, più 06713, meno 02773 181 054 013;, HA è NA, più 00230 32833 228, DELTA VC 32625 24 
收到
기장이 잠들어 있다고 하셨는데, 혹시 체온 측정을 위해 구강 체온계를 입에
Ok. La parte che ho capito è che riesce a vedere stelle e costellazi
アポロ11号
아, 듣고 싶지 않으시군요. 시간을 좀 계산해 볼게요. 79시인데, 지금은 몇 시죠? 음... 우리가 컴퓨터 시간이라는 걸 제대로 
11番。まず、システムチェックはすべて順調でした。ただし、
Apollo 8, Houston. We don't have any objections to goi
Wally, oui, juste ici, à la fin de la sixième. Avez-vous des commentaires concernant le mouvement relatif de ces particules que v
Okay. Step 6 was "Spin up to 0.3 degrees per second in yaw"; that's about 21 p
हम कार्नार्वोन के ऊपर से व
Роджер, Дж
감사합니다. 마이크, 15초 동
好的，乔。你要明白，JETT姿态将类似于服务舱的正常抛弃，即向上并脱离平面
Ciao Jim, abbiamo delle informazioni fotografiche da darti. Ne abbiamo discusso brevemente con Fred prima. 
Il s'agit d'un déplacement d'environ 30 degrés, Charlie, à partir de la position fermée, qui correspond à la flèche pointant vers environ trois heures, trois heure
好的，弗雷德。机动目标是PC+2，到目前为止，我们要飞到MPL。079, 27, 4013，加上08144，减去00443，减去0
フレッド、わかりました。先ほどお渡しした内容について、2点だけ変更点が
مرحباً، أبولو 11. هيوستن. ق
罗杰。我理解捕获时间是 03:07；R 点时间是 248 海里；交会时间是 03:15；方位角 0 度；仰角 7 度；日出时间是 05:37:00，TPI 值可能略有偏差。另外，您有收件
好的，机动平台，目的：飞掠，/G&N；63385；正负0.97；正负0.23；正负0212.7，负负0141.7，负负0254.8；148，316，050；NA，正负0022.5；0360.9，0:53，0356.3；33，352.7，15.0；NA，NA，NA。起始纬度为-23.26，-165.00；1147.7，36172；166:54:02。备注：直线星为31，大角星；以及23，五帝座α星。直线半径288，直线俯仰角205，直线偏航角034；空隙，无；其他，烧毁部分被扣除。重量，3349
रॉजर। यह पायलट है। मैं इस अवसर पर स
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Коне
रॉजर। आपके ग्राफ में रेखा थोड़ी नीचे है क्योंकि शुरुआत में मान नी
Bene. Questo sarà l'ultimo sfiato sul serbatoio, quindi in cima alla pagina, subito dopo INVERTER 1, CHIUDI, aggiungi - Bene, dopo INVER
Jim, ab jetzt erzielst d
शटडाउन, दो वाल्व, बंद; दो, नाई
Roger. 
你是说它已经放进去了，还是你
Ed started on unstowing stuff and as soon as we got to the position where it became no longer feasible to fool with the booster, I started full-time helping him - at least holding the things and stowing them away and trying to keep them from disappearing. The faster we worked the farther behind we got. Not because we weren't putting things the way they were supposed to, it just took a lot longer than we had anticipated. It really wasn't much
로저. 다음 질문은 버즈에게 드리겠습니다. 버즈는 지구로 처음 진입했을 때, 즉 첫 번째 REV(Reverse Evaluation)에서 지구 상공에서 레이저를 목격했다고 보고했었는데, 그 레이저 빔의 색깔은 무엇이
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 최소 충격량으로 요(y
حسناً. قف بجانب واحد 
Хорошо, мы просто оставим вас в покое и продолжим
Nur zu, Ho
Хорошо. На отметке минус 4,5 часа настройте режим SEP. Во-первых, BALANCE COUPLE, ON. Во-вторых, обнулите счетчики: 404, 405, 406, плюс 0; считайте 470. В-третьих, переведите плюс X в 0,5 фута в секунду. В-четвертых, CM/SEP. В-пятых, после SEP обнулите 470 до 0. В-шестых, ATTTUD CONTROL, три, в PULSE. В-седьмых, поверните для захвата сервисного модуля для фотосъемки. И еще одно замечание: используйте ACA для управления. Наконец, у нас было - вы мне дали - минус 3 часа. Маневрируйте в режиме ATT HOLD для обзора Луны до тех пор, пока платфо
Okay. First six on the left are closed - That's through
Neil und Buzz, ich spreche mit Ihnen telefonisch aus dem Oval Office des Weißen Hauses, und dies ist mit Sicherheit das historischste Telefongespräch aller Zeiten. Ich kann Ihnen gar nicht sagen, wie stolz wir alle auf das sind, was Sie für jeden Amerikaner geleistet haben. Dies ist mit Sicherheit der stolzeste Tag unseres Lebens. Und ich bin sicher, dass auch Menschen auf der ganzen Welt mit uns Amerikanern diese immense Leistung anerkennen. Dank Ihnen ist der Himmel ein Teil der Welt der Menschen geworden. Und während Sie vom Mare Tranquillitatis zu uns sprechen, inspiriert uns das, unsere Anstrengungen für Frieden und Ruhe auf Erden zu verdoppeln. Für einen unbezahlbaren Moment in der gesamten Menschheitsgeschichte sind alle Menschen auf dieser Erde wahrhaftig eins; eins in ihrem Stolz auf Ihre Leistung und eins in unseren G
रॉजर। आपके पैंतरेबाज़ी के लिए कैच-अप में एक
O
Okay. Mike, was passiert ist – du saßest da und hast alles überwacht, und in Schritt 7 bist du zu NOUN 01 gegangen, hast die Adresse eingegeben und dann INFORMATION INFORMATION; und mit dem letzten ENTER-Klick auf 35400 ENTER, direkt danach, wurdest du wieder in Schritt 16 zurückgesetzt. Als du dann ENTER gedrückt hast, hast du die Informationen tatsächlich in die CDU eingegeben; und als du die beiden Einträge in Register 1 und 2 hattest, gab es eine sofortige Änderung in der CDU, und das System hat das überprüft und gesehen, was es da gemessen hat. Mein Gott, ich habe eine Temperaturrate von 600 Grad pro Sekunde gemessen. Und dann hat es die Düsen gezündet, um diese Rate zu reduzieren. Die von ihr verwendeten Filter zur Temperaturmessung – die tatsächliche Temperatur wird also erst erfasst, wenn sich die Temperatur bereits aufgebaut hat. Dann liest sie die Filter aus
Das ist richtig; und die Anzugsanforderungsvorschriften gelten
是的。我看到一个比
J'ai quelques quantités de modules de service si vous souha
ठीक है। हम फिलहाल पैसिव थर्मल कंट्रोल को स्थगित रखना चाहेंगे औ
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 거의 다 왔습니다. 90에 도달하는 대로 감
Roger. Copy. Thrust translation - 
Le contraste a augmenté et seul le côté ensoleillé de ces crêtes reste illuminé, tandis que les côtés sombres et l'ombre 
로저, 이글. 짧은 카
Роджер, Аврора Семь. Угол наклона м
The West Coast residents in Seattle, Washington; Portland, Oregon; Vancouver, British Columbia; and San Francisco all plan to make their areas visible to the three of you by lighting their lights between 9 pm and midnight tonight, according to the Associated Press. We do 
Роджер, мы сейчас находимся в вакууме, и правый гидрокостюм держит температуру на отметке 4, а циркуляция воздуха
C'est spectaculaire là-bas! On dira
- -... 
No. It's about in the nine or nine thirty position, a
Hello, Canton Com Tech, Canton C
Hai un guadagno elevato. Ora, Ken, da quanto ho capito, se si spegne dopo 20 secondi di accensione, non vorrai che proviamo a 
Und es wird jetzt etwas wärmer hier drin. D
«Аполлон
음, 날씨는 
Ja, die verdammte „1“ in diesem Computer, wissen Sie – Zapfenwinkel, die ist da; Delta-v, die ist da; Wink
No change in the LM's weight
はい、すでに何度
オーケー、ヒューストン。それは理解でき
Отрицательный результат, 
Bene. Vorremmo illustrarvi il nostro piano. Al momento, siamo in una situazione critica per quanto riguarda l'acqua. Quindi vorremmo usarne il
了解。P22：T
네. 저희를 부르시는 소리를 들은 것 같
Hallo, Kanton. Hallo, Kanton. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich verstehe euch laut und deut
Ну, мне бы очень не хотелось, чт
Wir konnten Südamerika, Florida und den südlichen Teil der 
気球は消
收到，弗兰克。我完全明白你的意思。关于温度，A 和 B 两组的温度都应
This is Fr
Jerry, j'aimerais aussi connaître notre portée et notre vitesse à l'heure de diffusio
Well
アポロ11号、こちらはヒューストンです。ゴール
Columbia, Houston. La temperatura di uscita dell'evaporatore (EVAP OUT) è bassa. Vi chiediamo di passare al controllo manuale della temperatura e di aumentarla. Potete consul
Roger. Inizieremo con le notizie dal mondo. Elogi per gli astronauti americani dell'Apollo 8 e speranze di cooperazione internazionale nell'esplorazione spaziale, con i messaggi della vigil
こちらフレンドシップ7号機。フライ・バイ・ワイヤによる操縦に問題はありません。ドリフトは1秒あたり約1°の速度で発生しており、他の軸では姿勢を良好に
다시 말씀해
ロジャー、トム。ロジャー、
Tranquillité, Houston. Nous avon
Oui, je suis d'accord. On a compri
Roger. Das ergibt einen Delta-V-Wert von 59,5. Wir halten Sie auf dem 
彼らがあなたの言うことを聞いているとは思えないよ、マイク..
友谊七，参考你上次的；没错，从这里来看，胶囊看起来不错。完毕
Roger. I will start your task right away
Apollo 11, Houston. Buonanotte da parte del White Team per l'ultima volta. Ci rimetteremo in sesto quando vi svegli
로저.
ठीक है। क्या आपके पास कुछ है? ह्यूस्टन? हमा
罗杰，哥伦比亚。我们还需要完成你那边的上行链路，然后我才能知道你的发射时间和
目前我确实看到飞船向右倾斜了大约5度，而且我注意到潜望镜变暗了，这意味着我们正在进入暗面。我会尝试通过潜望镜
Okay, Fred. First of all, preparations for this, starting with contingency checklist, page 24, we would recommend should start at, and we'll be happy to receive any comments you have on that, though. Second point: when you're in the burn attitude, you should see the Sun at the very top of the. It'll be splitting the cursor, when your cursor's set at zero. One thing to be aware of though, that it'll slip right out of the very easily since it'll be very sensitive to roll and yaw. Understand that's in detent 2, by the burn is very insensitive to burn time and attitude. In other words, if necessary, we can slip it if there's 
He's 
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Похоже, вы находитесь на вторичном маршруте. Мы хотели бы проехать по нему около 5
قاطع دائرة سخان 
了解です。パッドの話を始める前に、もう一つコメントがあります。以前お伝えした、太陽がコマンダーズウィンドウに
로저, 혈압 한 번 더 측정해
19 मिनट की दूरी, 48.5 मील; या तो सीरियस या अंतरिक्ष यान VII स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई दे रहा है; कुल 10
Roger. Da es hier so reibungslos läuft – die Kommunikation ist gut –, lasst uns den Pyrotechnik-Check etwa 10 Minuten früher
हाँ। मैं इसे अपनी खिड़की के एक हिस्से से देख सकता हूँ। लगता है, मैं जिस चीज़ को देख रहा था वह धागे का टुकड़ा था और वह रंग का मार्कर था। नमस्कार 
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 2, /: 46427, -053, +141, -01350, + 0, + 0
好的。现在我们可以给你们展示一下，还有一
좋아요. 3, 2, 1
D'accord. Voyons voir. Donc, on va enco
मु
Cape, comment lis-tu M
0,6 vol
S-6에서 사진 두 장을 찍었는데, 열대 수렴대 
لا، دعني أتأكد من وجودها هنا. أنزل إلى اللوحة 275، وأفتح مفتاحَيْ CB MAIN A وBAT BUS A وCB MAIN B. ثم أنزل إلى اللوحة 250، وأفصل مفتاحَيْ CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING وBAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING، ثم أصعد إلى اللوحة 5، وأفصل مفتاحَيْ SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN A وSENSOR SIGNAL MAIN B، ومفتاحَيْ BATTERY C
Gemini 4，Canary 
收到。看来我们需要执行“继续
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous allons charger la batterie B jusqu'à la période de veille. La charge sera interrompue à ce moment-là. Par ailleurs, la charge de la batterie A était prévue vers 12 h 25 du plan de vol. Cette étape a été s
لنلقِ نظرة على عا
Wir benö
알겠습니다. 연소의 높이 조정 GET을 위해 복사했습니다. 03 + 03 + 19; 델타-V, 0.8, 지속 시간, 0 + 01; 요 00, 피치 00; 코어 25, 00008; 26 및 27, 모두 0; 후방 추진기, 포지그레이드 기
ジ
Okay. I'm taking the--I've taken the big back off; going to record only, at this time. Have taken the big back off of the camera and trying to get some more MIT film at this time. The filter is in. The
I have 16° and 55 minutes.
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티입니다. 중계기가 연결되었습니다.
Роджер, Джим. Следующий маневр по рыскани
Ich sage, ich kann dies
*** Получите пано
まあ、しば
こちらフレンドシップ7号。カプセルは
R
Теперь, отвечая на вопрос 2, следует отметить, что на второй ступ
알았어, 제리. 프로그램 23은 끝났어. 네가 원한다면,
Хьюстон, Аполлон-
弗兰克，电线还挂着呢。多亏了你的离心力，它现在几乎是直
罗杰。你的钟表放在地上看起来
我们看到
Sounds
Okay. Führen Sie gemäß der Anleitung auf dem
रॉजर। लाइटें बहुत अच्छी तरह से दिख र
حسنًا. بينما أحضر
这里是阿波罗8号，正在月球上为您现场直播。现在我们切换了电视摄像机。之前我们向您展示了过去16个小时里我们一直在观测的地球景象。现在我们切换画面，向您展示过去16个小时里我们在60英里（约97公里）高空飞越的月球。比尔·安德斯、吉姆·洛弗尔和我今天在圣诞节前一天在这里进行实
了解。マイナス
Ok. Vorremmo guardarlo per un po', vedere cos
Sì.
Ok, Jim. La tua configurazione attuale presenta le seguenti caratteristiche. Abbi
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن.
Richtig. Es wird sich etwa am REV 20-Terminator befinden, daher wird es erst spät in Ihren Mondorbit-Aktivitäten möglich sein, es zu fotografier
Вот репортаж Гарри Розенталя из Associated, Хьюстон. Два Санта-Клауса украсили сочельник для двухлетнего Джеффри Ловелла. Первый постучал в его входную дверь и принес подарки. Второй проводил его папу домой с Луны. Первый был в красном костюме и с белой бородой, и его крики «Хо-хо» были слышны за кварталом. Второй представлял собой огромный двигатель, извергающий пламя за Луной, и тысячи людей ждали известия о его запуске. «Пожалуйста, примите к сведению, что Санта-Клаус существует», — такими были первые слова «Аполлона-8», когда он вышел из радиомолчания, чтобы сообщить встревоженному миру через 15 минут после того, как двигатель выполнил свой критически важный запуск. «Никто из нас никогда не ожидал получить лучший рождественский подарок, чем этот», — сказал Кен Маттингли из Центра управления 
Pour v
アポロ8号、急ぐ必要はありません。ただ、その時あなたが何をしているのか分からなかっただけです。お時間のある時にお電話ください。こち
Et n
Si tratta di una verticale
阿波罗8号
C'est exact. Tu as fait une petite pause, Jim. On va s'en occuper avec la balle, en partant de l'attitude de la brûlure. Il suffit de faire un roulis de 90 degrés dans un sens ou dans l'autre, en gardant le tangag
아니요, 그렇지 않아요. 나중에 꺼져요. 그런데
アポロ11号、ヒュースト
好的，吉姆。记住，观察结束后，我们需要你再次
Sehr gut. Hey Ed, du 
Okay, Fred, reading you loud and cle
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, Canary
11، هيوستن. هل ا
Okay, Gus, my status is good; my control mode is fly-by-wire; the gyros are still caged; maneuver is off. Fu
نعم، أعتقد أن هذا ما اتفقوا عليه
좋아요
收到。稍等。他们
He may not be back from the 
Bon, c'est ce qui s'est passé la dernière f
아주 좋습니다. 저희도 그 부분에 관심이 많
روجر. توصيتنا في هذه المرحلة هي التخطيط، بموافق
Bene. Da quanto ho capito, lo scopo di questa procedura è riportare i vettori di stato e nella sfera di influenza terrestre; è cor
…バッ
Roger. Eagle's looking real fine to us down here. We have a fairly high confidence that we know the position
रॉजर, समझ गया। रॉकेट की वज
我拍了第4张照片，也就是4a，那是美国海岸线。我
罗杰，弗兰克。我们认为近地点预测值 -03137 并没有什么问题或蹊跷之处。这是开普勒预测，精度不高。现在，我们已经从下行链路获取了你的矢量数据，并模拟了一次外部机动，得到了完全正确
ठीक ह
Gemini 4，CSQ CAP COM。请注意，如果您正在跟踪 Pegasus，请勿超过 45° 俯仰角。您有关键的磁带转储。如果您正在跟踪 Pegasus，请调整至关
Хорошо, Рон, для MIDPAC: 000, 152, 001, 194, 46 06, 267, плюс 1332, минус 16917, 064, 36194, 649, 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 0028, 154, 084, 2240, 180, 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02, 45, 0189, 277, нет доступных, поднять вектор вверх, выровнять, Вега и Денеб, крен 078, тангаж 223, рыскание 340. Использовать noneexit. минус 30, проверка горизонта 194 33 06, тангаж 298. Начальный угол крена в P67 может быт
Okay, Jim. We - We've been talking about your going to a different attitude than the pad attitude for better star field vision out the command module, and what we'd like to have you do is this. If you can predict now or sometime soon, what attitude it is that you would like to hold at that time, and go to that attitude now, we'd like to be able to compute the coarse aline gimbal angles for the, and we can do that if you g
मैंने ऑप्टिक्स फ
Ja, das haben
Хорошо. Первый пример, который я вам дам, — это маневр с плюсом 44. Я начну читать вниз по левом
Interrupteur de fonction... Il 
Roger. Freundsch
好的，杰克，我现在要给你念一下操作流程。在此之前，我想提一下弗雷德可能会感兴趣的事。我们正在监测储罐压力上升
Okay. Wir warten nun darauf, dass Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie sich sicher außerhalb des Boosterbereichs befinden, und uns das Signal zum Befehl über das Giermanöver des Bo
我们希望显示器打开；S波段天线关闭——以避免触
ل
Аполлон-8. 
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, qui è
素晴らしいですね。さらに南の内陸部に行くと、もっと光が
Roger. 91 più 30, meno 7 percento
分かりました
Ciao, Eagle. Houston. Mi ricevi? Pas
Bene. Al momento abbiamo la navicella sotto controllo. Siamo in volo di lenta deriva, ma abbiamo un leggero controllo. Abbiamo 1550 libbre (circa 700 kg) su
罗杰。使用Repre
في المرة القادمة التي تخفض فيها ضغط الأكسجين الأساسي، ا
Это Роджер. Я довольно много летал в режи
लाइटिंग के अंतर्गत
Roger, Amicizia Sette. Potresti darmi la temperatura di s
11, ह्यूस्टन। पिछले दो घंटों में हमने CO2 के आंश
Oh, die Zahlen, die ich gestern geschickt habe, sind ja ziemlich gut, und du hattest ungefähr … Nun, ich schaue mir da
ヒューストン、ハイゲインでコロンビアを
シグマセブン、シグマセブ
こちらヒュースト
잭, 말
Это Sigma Seven. У меня тут был небольшой 
ठीक है, अपो
क्या आपको गिनी की खाड़ी का कुछ भी द
알겠습니다. 현재 추적 중인 데이터를 보면, 어젯밤에 알려드린 근일점 통과 시간(69 + 10)이 여전히 정확한 것 같습니다. 현재 지구 근접 근일점 고도는 65.8피트입니다. 중간 지점 통과 시의 속도는 초당 1피트 미만일 것으
那很好。我昨晚
Bene. La nostra sostituzione fai da te della bomboletta di idrossido di litio è comp
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Джим,
Роджер, «Дружба Семь». Мы измеряем ваше артериальное давление, какой результат у вас по результатам 
هذا يدل على انحراف الكرة بمقدا
Roger... Z Cal 
肯，这里有两个因素导致宇航服热交换器的运行方式略有不同。一是我们没
هيوستن، كيف تبدو هوامش الد
Я обычно не использую 
आपसे बात करके और अपने देश की खबरें जानकर अच्छा लगा। ह्यूस्टन के ऊपर से गुजरते समय, मैं वास्तव में देख पा रहा था। जब मैं बाहर था, तो मुझे खाड़ी और गैल्वेस्टन खा
अपोलो 8. अब हम एक फ्लाईबाई पैंतरेबाज़ी पर जा रहे हैं। यह / 63087, माइनस 162, प्लस 129, प्लस 009 62, प्लस 005 68, माइनस 020 77 000 000 000, नवंबर अल्फा, प्ल
Роджер. У меня
もう一つ。この中間コースのタイミングを計るという考え方自体は、SHeタンクが排気される直前に行うという考えに基づいています。そうすれば、もし皆さんが少し揺さぶられたとしても
Хорошо. Мы почти достигли нужного угла наклона и... среднего угла подвеса
Attendez 1. Je ferai une prédiction à ce sujet. Au fait, j'espère que vous notez bien ceux que vous avez u
Housto
好的。贝克，自从你吃了那顿
Roger. Utilisation des commandes de vol électriques pour 
Errore mio
حسنًا يا جاك. الخطوة التالية هي إحضار بطاقة التوجيه واستخدامها لتشكيل قوس فوق الجزء العلوي من ال
俯仰角为零，偏航角为四
Houston, in u
Roger, te li prendo quando andiamo a prendere l
सुधार, रॉजर, रक्तचाप, 47 [डिग्री] भाप के ताप
روجر. ع
Apollo 11, Houston. D'après nos observations depuis le milieu de la trajectoire, nous affichons un gamma de -6,57. Ce chiffre est préliminaire, et nous pensons qu'après quelques suivis supplémentaires, la trajectoire devrait se stabiliser et nous pourrons l'ajuster précisément dans le couloir d'atterrissage. Nous sommes quasiment au centre du couloir; tou
لستَ مضطراً
GET 0
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。收到。我们建议您在本
Rog
आगे बढ
はい。では、こんにちは。こちらはアポロ8号のクルーです。ヒューストンさん、今の焦点はどうですか
- -... ACS wurde abgeschaltet und ein 
알겠습니다. 하지만 아직 그런 상황은 아니었습니다
Ich weiß nicht, die Tablette ist abgefallen. Ich werde die Desinfektionstablette nicht einlegen, weil ich nicht weiß, wo sie i
لا، لم أقم بذلك مؤخرًا. سأقوم بذلك الآن كجزء من هذا الفحص. لقد قمت بقياس ض
Это использование функции «нажми и говори». 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1.
Che furbo. - Il retro dell'ufficio meteorologico è finalmente uscito. Il primo scatto non vale la pena di essere usato, quindi lo cambierò. - Okay. Abbiamo tirato fuori il cursore. Filtro meteorologico inserito, se riesco a trovarlo. Questo
Bien. Lors de cette dernière vérification, nous souhaitons simplement confirmer que l'amplificateur de puissance principal a bien été 
دعونا نقرأ لكم الأضواء التي أضأناها الآن؛ مكبس التبر
ジム、それではキャリブレーションを行い、まず星番号15番を使って3セット、続いて星番号16番を使って2セット撮影した
Okay. You're co
Ciao, Acquario. Ho un paio di cambiamenti da apportare alla tua lista di con
We'd like another confirmation, when we closed the tunnel vent valve back to / DELTA-P, we were reading about 1.7 - 1.75, and it slowly went up now to about - oh, I'd say a little less than 2.2. Seems to be ho
Cre
Okay. Grazie. D
ठीक है, जिम। आपका केबिन बहुत अ
고이득 안테나가 허용 범위를 벗어난 것이 문제였
Et, Charlie, le / DELTA
Roger. Aspetta. 
로저, 프레드. 잘 읽었습니다. 자, 지구에서는, 이 정렬 작업을 해야 한다면, 지구의
好了。弗雷德，这趟行程是
シグマ・セブン、ケープ・キャップ・コムより緊急音声を送
로저, 닐. 자세한 설명 감사합니다. 사진이 좀 어둡네요. 조리개 값(f-stop
Ich nehme an, d
आखिरी वाला कचरे के थैले में है। ओह, मु
Фрэнк, я тебя прекрасно слышу. Доброе утро. Как д
Повторите, по
휴스턴, DOWN VOICE BAC
13, Houston. You can go ahead wit
Хорошо. Я могу различить очень-очень мелкие детали — внизу сельскохозяйственные угодья, пастбища. Я вижу отдельные поля, реки, озера, дороги, кажется. Я вернусь к положению при входе в атм
Эй, это довольно обширно, Джим. Ты можешь найти э
Mancano 20 secondi, mancano 2 minu
वह छोटा कप अब अवतल के बजाय उत्तल ह
روجر. ريف 27، أبولو لاندمارك 15 08 52 5
キャビン圧力は5.5で維持されています。キャビン圧
Apollo 8, Houston. Sembra che questa carica della batteria B possa richiedere altre 6 ore. A quanto pare, la velocità di carica è inferiore a quella che stiamo ottenendo sulle nostre curve al suolo, ma è comunque superiore a quella dell'Apollo 7, e sembra che ora stia procedendo in buone condizioni. E vorrei avere conferma che la tempistica che ha portato alla corre
ええ、そうだと思いま
好的。
좋아요. 이제 다음 단계는 아치형 부분 근처의 비닐봉투 한쪽 끝에 대각선으로 구멍을 뚫는 것입니다. 어느 쪽이든 상관없으니 1.5인치 또는 2인치 정도의 대각선 구멍을 뚫어 빨간색 호스를 통과시킬 수 있도록 하세
Dovrebbe 
好的，
T1 時間と T2 時間は変更されないままだと思いますが、どうでしょ
戈尔多，它只是逐渐
了解しました。視界も通信も非常に良好ですので、今は走査望遠鏡を見ずに口頭で説明させていただきます。アークトゥルスへの操作角度は非常に良好でした。走査望遠鏡の中心にアークトゥルスを配置しました。こ
गॉडार्ड कॉन्फ्रेंस (नेटवर्क कम्युनिकेशन लूप) पर बातचीत सुनने 
يا برج الدلو، من المبكر جدًا تحديد الوضع بدقة. نرغب في الحصول على المزيد من النقاط، لذا واصلوا القراءة،
Хор
Роджер. Теперь можешь отдать свой компьютер, установить обновления, и давайте пере
Okay – also, heute Morgen schauen wir mal, wie nah die Flugbahn an die Parallelität zur M-Linie herankommt. Bevor wir mit dem Markieren begannen, schien die Berechnung dieser drei Winkel etwas ungenau zu sein, und ich verbrauchte unnötig viel Treibstoff, indem ich diese drei Winkel ansteuerte und anschließend große Lageänderungen vornehmen musste, um die M-Linie parallel auszurichten. In manchen Fällen schien eine akzeptable Lage ausreichend zu sein, und Sie alle meinten, das sei nicht nötig. Daher markierte ich teilweise mit nicht paralleler M-Linie. Ich dachte, Sie hätten vielleicht einen Prozessor, der diesen Versatz berechnet und die Daten auswertet, aber meines Wissens muss die M-Linie parallel zu
我们按照CAP COM指令向
Крупных нет. Есть пара небольших возмущений. Ну, одно из них находи
ठीक है। और, वैंस, क्या आपके पास कभी कोई /AOS समय था, और क्या कोई स्टार्टअप समय था जिससे हम इस एक्टिवेशन चेकलिस्ट में शामिल हो 
أب
さ
了解。距離は11プラス14プラス29、デルタVは毎秒9.0フィート、持続時間は0プラス15、ヨー0、ピッチ0、コア25は90090、26と27はすべてゼロ、スラスタは前方
好的。我们现在又回到了腹带的问题上——让我向
Roger. Understand the general impression of being moist as it packed in the core tube. Next question: we did copy your comments prior to the of your general description of the area. We wonder if either of you would have any more lengthy description or more detaile
जिम, अगला काम जो हम करना चाहते हैं, वह है कमांड मॉड्यूल मेन बी को कुछ पावर देना ताकि हम बैटरी चार्ज करना शुरू कर सकें। मुझे लगता है कि हमें यह काम तब शुरू करना चाहिए जब कोई और आपकी मदद करने के लिए आ जाए। तो, जब आप बा
और पृष्ठ के उस आधे भाग में सबसे नीचे वाले ब्लॉक को काट दें जिसमें "पत्रिका प्रतिशत आवश्यक 12 पत्रिकाएँ, 
Okay, Wassermann. Die von Ihnen festgelegte Schutzscha
Ha! Ha! Ich habe immer noch schwarze Bremsspuren an meinen Schwimmflossen von deinem Ausflug ins Buschland. Okay, du siehst, ich bin schon wieder nach rechts gegiert. Ich muss – Korrektur, nach links gegiert. Ich muss nach rechts, der Mond steht direkt am Horizont. Ich drehe ihn nochmal richtig, nur um dir zu zeigen, wie einfach das geht. Ich scheine noch genug Treibstoff zu haben, also p
Хорошо. Понял, Джим. Хочу уточнить пару вещей, которые, кажется, ты не услышал в ответ. В
Роджер. Отличная работа радара. Ужасно жаль, что наш друг Джулиан не смог быть с нами. Хочу рассказать о режиме управления. Во-первых, ручной и электронный режимы управления на низкой высоте работают 
Très bien. Ceci est une remarque générale qui s'applique à chaque fois que vous travaillez avec des instructions `and` ou que vous passez d'une instruction `and` à une autre. Il est important de ne pas appeler de verbe étendu pendant ce temps. Cette information figure dans les notes du programme et sert simplement de rappel. Que se passe-t-il si nous utilisons un verbe étendu comme `an` ou `an`? Nous risquons de nous bloquer et de devoir parcourir à nouveau la fonction pour obtenir le résultat. Or, ces affichages ne sont généralement pa
रॉजर। आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, मैंने इसे थोड़ा सा बढ़ा दिया है। सूट और केबिन में मेरी रीडिंग अब 7 [psia] और 7 [psia] हैं। डीके, मेरे इन्वर्टर और थ्रस्टर लाइन 
네. 전압이 2.4볼트에서 3볼트 사이를 오르락내리락했습니
Quindi abbiamo qualche du
Da es Winter ist – da es sich um Winterzeit auf der Nordha
Они просят вас оставить переключатель в положении «АВТО» до тех пор, пока вы не ляжете спать сегодня вечером. Подождите. Я имею в виду, в положении «ВКЛ». Повторю еще раз. В положении «ВЫКЛ» до тех пор, пока вы не ляжете спать сегодня вечером, по причине того, что у вас 3-
حسنًا. تريد منا أن نقوم بالمناورة باستخدام الوضع التلقائي (AUTO) بد
Хорошо, Джек. Процедура в по
Nummer 27 8.4, 83.26, 149,
Okay, Fred. Das Manöverziel ist PC + 2, bis jetzt fliegen wir zum MPL. Und, 079, 27, 4013, plus 08144, minus 00443, minus 02226, Apogäum ist N/A, Perigäum ist plus 00205, 08455, 420, 268, 26
Jerry, die Temperatur bereitet mir etwas Sorgen. Es wird hier drinnen ziemlich warm, und die Verdampferaustrittstemperatur liegt bei etwa 45 Grad. Gibt es Anzeichen dafür, dass die Heizkörper weniger effizient
Der Lichtwert für dasselb
네, 알겠습니다. 잠시만 기다
Ja, meine war während
There appears to be no trouble at all in tracking the gyros. The
انتهينا للتو من توجيه مركبة أجينا بزاوية 90 درج
Yeah. It's been very comfortable since I finally got that f
This transmission is coming to you approximately halfway between the moon and the earth. We have been 31 hours and about 20 minutes into flight. We have about less than 40 hours to go to the moon. You can see that Bill has his toothbrush here. He has been brushing regularly. To demonstrate how things float around in zero g. It looks like he plays for the Astros, the way he tries to catch those things. I certainly wish that we could show you the earth. It is a beautiful, beautiful view, with predominately blue background and just huge covers of white clouds, particularly one very strong vortex up near the terminator. Very, very beautiful. Perhaps we will get some assistance from the people on the ground and be ab
さて、角を曲がって太陽が目に入るかもしれません。必要な場合に備えてパッチの準備はで
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 텔레비전 방송이 시작됩니다
Okay. Der Zweck ist ein Abbruch des Perizynthions
分かりました。ジム、2つの最新情報があります。1つは、ベネット彗星を約1000kmで探査する手順についてです。ジャックが起きてから詳細を伝えます。もう1つは、3時間早く進入することについてです。昨夜、ヴァンスがあなたにその可能性について話していたと思いますが、SHeタンクの圧力を早めに確認したいということです。ミッドコース3は行わないので、進入は55時間後に行いたいのです
了解。分かりました。これからいくつかやります
Роджер, «Дружба Семь», это представитель компании Zanzibar Cap Com. Продолжай
ठीक है, जिम। बिजली की खपत कम करने के लिए, हम चाहते हैं कि आप डाउन वॉइस बैकअप कॉमन कॉन्फ़िगरेशन का उपयोग करें, जिसका अर्थ है बिजली और 
Хорошо. Мы обязательно попробуем. Как я уже сказал, у нас есть несколько звёздочек. Они не... Они не центрированы относительно нуля вала и цапфы. Давайте быстро взглянем на шаг 105, ноль вала и цапфы и посмотрим, сможем ли мы дать вам ответ
جيميني ٤، جراح RKV. لدينا قياس ضغط دم آخر. ننتظر تقريرك عن الط
아폴로 8
حسنًا يا جيم. إذا احتجنا إليك، سنرسل تنبيهًا للط
ठीक है। अब हमारे पास कुछ अतिरिक्त निर्देश हैं, अगर यह तरीका काम न करे तो
ठीक है। कौन
Roger. These - None of these stars will be exactly centered, but, at a pitch attitude of 115, we had computed tha
Роджер. Два Бр
잠시 기다
好的。仪表显示22%。我们没有任何偏航或横滚控制，也无法重新控制偏航推进器，显然一个都失灵了。不过，俯仰推进器似乎可以正常工作。而且，我们的姿态也正在慢慢恢复到
是的，我注意到了。这似乎是最糟糕的情况
Bulbo secco tra circa 72 e 79. Poco prima erano tra 75 e 77. Bulbo umido nell'ultimo g
Yes, so did I. They were go
И это Хьюстон, Игл. Давление гелия в обоих случаях составляет 2900. Прев
Roger, Jim. We've been looking at these stars that we gave you 
Die Temperaturen der Oxidator- und Brennstoffzuleitungen liegen bei 75 Grad und bleiben konstant. Die Temperaturen des Serv
Roger. Good r
这一定是穿越了热带辐合带（I
حسنًا. الآن، هذا يدخل في مرحلة الحفاظ على محطة العمل في تحليل
Проверка посл
Vuoi la 
Okay, completion of th
Would you like us t
Houston, Apollo 8.
Oh. Our little plot shows you just touching the 180-thousand-mile line. So you're about 40 K out from th
क्या रेडियो की आव
フ
11,
حسنًا، يا برج الدل
Я спрашиваю, у вас в блоке 
Annulez d'abor
Bene. Dopo i passaggi
Если вы попросит
As a matter of fact, Bill just mentioned that the vis
收到。还剩大约2
好的。我看看我是否都理解了。首先，为了进行会合操作，我们需要将断路器 16（逆变器 2）和断路器 11（交流母线 A 母线连接逆变器 2）都闭合。然后在控制面板 14 上，确认已选择逆变器 2。同时，确认断路器 11（会合雷达 2）也闭合。接下来，拉动会合雷达释放手柄。在控制面板 3 上，我们需要将会合雷达设置为“进入”，所有输入值都加 1，寄存器 1 和 2 的值都加 28300。执行此操作。然后，我们使用 16 72 监控移动情况。当设备停稳后，断开断路器 11（会合雷达 2），然后断开断路器 16（逆变器 2）。现在，当需要对接指示灯时，CB 16、逆变器 2 关闭，CB 11 AC BUS A 指示灯关闭，对接完成后，CB 16、逆变器 2 打开，CB 11 AC BUS 
分かりました。ここで考えているのは、搭載されているカメラ用レンズのいくつかを見て、そのどれかを使って光をある程度減衰させ、このような写真を撮れるかどうかを調べることです。現在いくつかテストを行っており、その結果については後日お知
Ok. Il meteo nella tua zona di recupero è nuvoloso, con 10 nodi di vento e onde alte 1,2 metri. Non p
यह स्वीकार्य है, फ्रेड, और इस बीच, जब आप लोग कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हों, तो हमारे पास आपके 
Roger. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, minus 061, plus 066 135 23 4156, plus 32
Ja. Die Transienten waren deutlicher spürbar als bei den vorherigen Brennvorgängen, Charlie. Ich habe es einfach auf unser leichtes Kommandomodul geschoben, aber es gab erhebliche Rollbewegungen, die sich nach den ersten 20 Sekunden des Brennvorgangs, schätze ich, beruhigten; dann gab es aber auch Nick- und Gierbewegungen. Ich glaube nicht, dass das ungewöhnlich war, und die Rollbewegung schien sich recht präzise zu stabilisieren, plus/minus etwa 8 Grad beidseitig der Mittellinie; und nach den ersten paar – ach,
Хорошо. У меня вопрос. Эта проверка, которая показывает, что нам 14 лет, — это проверка одного двигателя ориентации. 
Je voudrais 
Okay. Falls sie nicht sofort im Sextanten zu sehen sind, können Sie sie auch im Teleskop suchen. Sie sollten si
Roger. Con una visibilità così buona o comunicazioni così buone, ti daremo solo una descrizione verbale senza vedere il telescopio a scansione in questo momento. I tuoi angoli di manovra per Arturo erano piuttosto buoni. Ho Arturo centrato nel telescopio a scansione. A questo angolo del sole, c'è un fascio di luce direttamente attraverso il centro del telescopio a scansione e... una banda di luce. Impedisce di vedere molte stelle intorno a noi, e anche se ho tenuto l'occhio incollato al telescopio per un po' di tempo, è molto difficile vedere qualsiasi schema stellare o altro. Non potrei riconoscerlo con Arturo a meno che... l'ottica non mi abbia semplicemente spinto lì. Ora, poiché sono vicino a zero shaft e zero trunnion, sto ottenendo un bel po' di movimento dell'asse. Ogni 
Columbia, qui Houston. Vi sentiamo a voce alta con un po' di rumore di sottofondo su 
Roger. Vers
Roger 
Ok, Jim. Il nostro consiglio per questa bruciatura è di manovrare in posizione di bruciatura, in MIN IMPULSE, poi eseguire una linea retta con l'asse del corpo
Apollo 8, Houston. Vous êtes illisible. Nous allons reporter le décollage jusqu'à ce que nous 
Хьюстон, Аполлон
Negative, Gemini 4. And be advised on the D-9 of the Apollo Landmarks. Don't have any attitude ar
Und, Tranquility, ich habe ein Update
रॉजर। ईंधन के लिहाज से कोई समस्या नहीं है। बस दिक्कत यह है कि P22 की संख्या और खोजे जा सकने वाले ग्रिड व
रॉजर। यह एक अच्छी योजना लग रही है और आप पिच
그리고 
さて、食事についてコメントさせてください。これまでオレンジジュースの袋、つまり私が水を入れた袋（オレンジジュースがどんな形であれ、パイナップルジュースでも
और अगर यह उचित लगता है, तो हम कैमरे को बीच वाली खिड़की 
발사 순간에는 
내가 어떻게 하고 있는지 봐봐. 맞아, 네 말이 맞
罗杰，比尔。另一个窗户
ケ
Roger. Ho avuto un ciclo di accensione e spegnimento dei requisiti del riscaldatore RCS. Il primo era 47, ho acceso il riscaldatore e la spia era 54. Quello era l'anello A. Anello B 05. Ci
حسنًا. والخطوة التالية، اللوحة 12: تحويل وظيفة النطاق S إلى صوت ووظيفة 
Roger, Hou
C'est exact. On l'a fait, Buzz. 
Roger. Nous apportons une petite co
روجر. تم الاستل
रॉजर। क्षेत्र 55-डेल्टा 82. 04 34 10. 9+57. क्षेत्र 55-3 स्प्लिट बर्न, 55 पिछला, 
Nous analysons de près les profils de consommation d'eau et, pour l'instant, la tendance est plutôt à laisser l'appareil allumé et à étein
حسناً. فهمنا ذلك. تقول شركة EECOMM أنه إذا اس
알겠습니다. 처리 중입니다. 수량 읽기 스위치
你好，迈克。我们准备让你切换到全向模式进入睡眠状态，高增益天线开关设置如下：手动模式，波束宽度宽，俯仰
هل هذا ما تطلبه الأمر؟ لقد تطلب 
Роджер. Ты говоришь слабо, но очень понятно. Становится лучше. Можешь подтвердить подключение радиатора к FLO
네, 5만 마일 
Va bene. 
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。如果你们
没错，目前最后一步是将电池 2 
它有编
Non. Non, cela est indépendant de to
And Jack's got - and Jack said he's completed
선형적인 전방 분리를 얻지 못했습
Okay - continuing on now
目前，我已经完成了高推进器检查。这是一份延迟报告。每
Und, Houston
네, 맞습니다. 71시간 후에 산소 연료 전지 퍼지를 해야 하고, 복사하고 싶으시면 
Ricevuto.
이글, 휴스턴
ठीक है। यह भी मज़ेद
You'll have to fix my an
روجر. أقرأ لكم خمسة أيضًا يا باز، وقد حصلنا على معدل بت عالي. الصورة رائعة عبر غولدستون. سأعدّ لكم: 1، 2، 3، 4، 5؛ 5، 4، 3، 2، 1.
前回の送信では左腕を動かしすぎました。少し後でもう
わかり
好的，没错。下一步是将电
Mit dieser Einstellung sollten 
روجر، أعتقد 
Affermativo. Una volta che avremo allineato tutto e ottenuto un time hack, le brave persone qui saranno in grado di fornirci gli atteggiamenti 8-ball per l'assetto di separazione del modulo di servizio, per l'assetto di allineamento del modulo di comando, che vi passeremo - un allineamento di tipo Luna/Sole. Avremo gli atteggiamenti 8-ball per quelli, e saremo in grado di effettuare l'uplink tramite il modulo di comando una volta che avremo il computer pronto, un assetto preferito, che sarà identico a
了解しました。マイク、少し前にあなたが をいじっていた時、デッドバンドを縮小したのですが、デッドバンドはその時の新しい姿勢を中心にしていると思い込んでいました。それ以来、ピッチとヨーの両方でその姿勢から数度ずれてしまったので、先ほどあなたに指示した手順、つまり「ACCEL COMMAND」に切り替え、「AUTO SELECT」スイッチをすべてオンにしてから「RATE COMMAND」に切り替えると、デッドバンドが縮小した時のピッチとヨーの姿勢に戻ろうとするはずです。これを防ぐには、「MANUAL ATTITUDE」スイッ
Остановка измерения артериального давления. Хорошо, мы сейчас несколько раз попробуем
Ricevuto. Forte e chiaro. Stiamo scattando foto di; la sequenza post-separazione è comp
现在看
Sì, Joe. Devo... ehi, ascolta. Non è poi così divertente; le cose so
Je ne veux pas simplement parcourir le ciel à toute vitesse et obtenir des taux élevés, car je n'ai rien pour les annuler tant que la Terre n'est pas réapparue. Et – une fois la Terre en vue, nous n'aurons plus de probl
쌍둥이자리 8호, 그들은 승천을 통해 당신에게 
حسنًا، ممتاز. بالنسبة لمصباح المكونات، لن يكون لدينا H2O SEP. حسنًا، على CB(16) أس
ठीक है, जो। पिछली बार हमने सकारात्मक संकेत तब देखा था जब फ्रेड ने लगभ
我认为你读不到电
الصداقة سبعة، موشيا كاب كوم. كيف 
УПРАВЛЕНИЕ
2 ore
روجر. عند الساعة 74:30، نرجو منك تشغيل المراوح في جميع خزانات التبريد الأربعة، وضبط السخانات في جميعها على وضع التشغيل التلقائي. نقوم بذلك مسبقًا لضمان عدم حدوث أي خلل في طبقات الوقود نت
दबाव अच्छे होते है
没错。我们显示的是-
Vous avez votre heure de fin de vie, et cela n'a pas changé, e
यह अंदर है। इसी तरह यह ट्रिगर होता है - ठीक है, जैक। मैं इसे रोकने के लिए इस प
Он, разумеется, исчезает в туннеле, как если бы он входил в лунный модуль, только задом наперё
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 카나리 캡콤입니다. 잘 들렸습니다. 이
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अब हम आपको देख रहे हैं। आपको दिए गए इन वैक्टरों को एकीकृत करने में कुछ मिनट लग सकते हैं, और यदि आप TIG तकनीक का उपयोग नहीं करते हैं, तो यह काफी असंवेदनशील है। आप इसे TIG तकनीक तक पहुंचने दें, और जब यह शून्य पर पहुंच जाए, तो आप इस पर बर्न कर सकत
아폴로 8호, 고이득을 기다리는 동안 궤적 요약을 계속하겠습니다. 13번째 지점에서 태평양 중부선으로 복귀할 수 있으며, 연소 후 138초가 지나면 귀환이 시작됩니다. 138초면 버터플라이 영역을 벗어나게 됩니다. 20초 이후에는 조기점화나 재시동을 시도하지 않는 것이 좋습니다. 20초를 넘기면 궤적이 수정 범위를 벗어나 자유 귀환으로 이어질 수 있습니다. 귀환 지역의 날씨는 양호합니다. 추적 및 미추진이 가능합니다. 연소 중에는 저장 탱크와 섬프 탱크의 연료 소모로 인해 연소실 압력과 탱크 압력에 약간의 변화가 있을 수 있습니다. 이는 연소 시작 후 2~5초 사이에 발생할 수 있습니다. 두 시스템 모두 압력 변화가 미미할 것입니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동합니다. 연소 후에는 궤적 유지를 위해 물 끓임을 방지해야 합니
Apollo 8, Houston. Par ailleurs, concernant le plan de vol, nous souhaiterions que vous procédiez à une purge d'
Houston, hier spricht Apollo 8. Wir sind uns einig. Sirius und Rigel wären zwei Sterne, die sich deutlich besser eignen als Navi und Polaris. Ich habe zwar nach meiner Eingewöhnungszeit Cassiopeia ausgerichtet, aber ich befürchte, dass der Zeitaufwa
水瓶座，进入 2
双子
Roger. Bei EEP hat Batterie A 38,95 Amperestunden, Batterie B 36,35 Amperestunden und Batterie C 38,46 Amperestunden. Die Gesamt
Эти валуны похожи на ба
In questo momento so
Roger. Understand. We'll be accomplishing the filter change shortly, the purge line heater is on ***, O2 and H2 purge shortly, and at 148 will initiate a charge on battery A until you notify us further. At 150 hours, waste water dump
Хорошо, мы попали прямо в
Que pensez-vous de cette configuration de circuit? Vanne d
Okay. I guess that window is still pretty good 
Yes. We lost the lock for a little while there, Jim. Well, good day. Could you give us battery A volta
إليكم تقريرًا من هاري روزنتال من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في هيوستن. أضفى بابا نويلان البهجة على ليلة عيد الميلاد للطفل جيفري لوفيل، البالغ من العمر عامين. طرق الأول باب منزله وجلب الهدايا، بينما قام الثاني بتشغيل محرك أبولو 8 العائد من القمر. ارتدى الأول بدلة حمراء ولحية بيضاء، وأطلق صيحة "هو هو" بصوت عالٍ سُمع في آخر الشارع. أما الثاني، فكان محركًا ضخمًا ينفث اللهب خلف القمر، وكان الآلاف ينتظرون بفارغ الصبر خبر تشغيله. "يرجى العلم أن هناك بابا نويل" كانت أولى كلمات أبولو 8 بعد أن خرجت من الصمت اللاسلكي لتُعلم العالم القلق بعد 15 دقيقة من إتمام المحرك لمهمته الحاسمة. قال كين ماتينجلي من مركز التحكم بالمهمة: "لم يتوقع أحد منا أن يحصل على هدية عيد ميلاد أفضل من هذه". وجاء الرد من العقيد فرانك بورمان، قائد المركبة الفضائية: "نشكر كل من كان على الأرض نيابةً عنا. كما تعلمون، لم نكن لننجح لولاكم". في هذه اللحظة، أضاءت شجرة عيد الميلاد أمام شاشات التحكم في مركز المهمة، وقرأ رائد الفضاء هاريسون شميدت نسخة فضائية من قصة "زيارة من القديس نيكولاس" على الطاقم. بدأت القصة قائلة: "كانت ليلة عيد الميلاد، وفي أعماق الفضاء، فاز طاقم أبولو 8 للتو بسباق القمر". كان طاقم مركز المهمة قد أرجأ الاحتفال حتى عودة والد جيفري، الكابتن جيمس لوفيل من البحرية، برفقة الرائد ويليام أ. أندرس من القوات الجوية والعقيد بورمان، سالمين إلى ديارهم. في أي ليلة عيد ميلاد أخرى، كانت عائلات رواد الفضاء ستجتمع في الكنيسة لحضور قداس عيد الميلاد، لكن هذا العام كانوا جميعًا يتابعون بشغف عبر شاشات التلفزيون. كانت المنازل القريبة من مركز المركبات الفضائية المأهولة مزينة. اصطفت فوانيس على الطراز المكسيكي على المروج المحيطة بمنزل لوفيل وفي جميع أنحاء مجتمعه في تيمبر كوف، وعندما وصل أربعة من سكان لوفيل، توقفت سيارة تحمل رجلاً طويل القامة يرتدي زي بابا نويل ويحمل كيساً كبيراً على ظهره. صعد سانتا كلوز إلى الباب وطرق بقوة. فُتح الباب، وإذا بجيفري لوفيل، الذي سيبلغ الثالثة من عمره في الرابع عشر من يناير، يقف هناك. ارتد جيفري إلى الوراء عند رؤيته. حملته والدته، فتشبث بها جيفري وهو لا يزال يرتجف. قالت شقيقته باربرا، البالغة من العمر خمسة عشر عامًا: "في العام الماضي هرب باكيًا". في وقت سابق، اضطرت للركض خلفه لمنعه من إطفاء جميع الأضواء. شاهد طفلا لوفيل الآخران، جيمس البالغ من العمر ثلاثة عشر عامًا وسوزان البالغة من العمر عشرة أعوام، المشهد بمتعة كبيرة. أخيرًا، اختفى سانتا والأطفال في الداخل؛ ووُضعت الهدايا تحت الشجرة؛ ولن تُفتح حتى ال
Родж
Apollo 11, Houston. We're still unable to pick you up on the high gain antenna. Request you go to MANUAL, and wide beamwidth.
इसकी अपनी एक अनूठी सुंदरता है। यह संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के ऊंचे
ここに置いておきま
जी हाँ। हम आपके विमान में आखिरी बार कुछ ठीक करने के लिए यह चाहत
Viel be
C'est exact. La température de la com
Roger. Ich sehe, dass sich die Dinge jetzt entwickeln. Jerry, wir werden die Blockdaten abrufen, die Ausric
Roger. On compte 
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया। क्या आपको नए निर्देशांक मिल गए है
Bene. Esatto. L'ultima modifica è CTE, entrambi aperti. Fi
如果您希望在这些业务淡季设置某种形式的沟通检查，例如每隔30分钟左右进行一次，我们
네. 그 화면의 가독성이 아주 미세하게 차이가 
28페이지의 4단계에서 경고등 상태를 다음과 같이 변경하여 4단계를 수행하십시오. 경고등에는 아마도 "ASCENT PRESSURE"와 "A 및 B REG" 표시등이 있을 것입니다. 주의 
Bonjour, Apollo 8; c’est Deke. Je voulais simplement vous souhaiter un très joyeux Noël de la part de toute l’équipe du Centre de contrôle, et j’imagine que c’est le cas pour tous ceux qui nous suivent à travers le monde. Aucun d’entre nous n’aurait pu espérer un plus bea
Хорошо. Отлично, Фрэнк. Ещё один момент — ребята в задней комнате хотели бы посмотреть, какое будет значение разницы температур на телеметрии, когда все проснутся, — если ты включишь оба вентилятора в салоне примерно на 5 минут, — они хотели бы увидеть, какая разница темп
OK. Temps restant: 32 heures et 00 minutes. Instructions à la fin de la manœuvre: adopter l’attitude suivante: roulis 101,0, tangage 090,0, lacet 000,0. Tangage maximal -23, lacet 93. Utiliser les procédures normales pour amortir les mouvements. Une fois le véhicule stabilisé et avant la mise en rotation, prend
好的，谢谢。请稍等片刻，我想记下一些东
Хорошо, Джим. Мы вам в этом поможем; это тема, которую мы хотели бы обсудить с вами. Мы рассматривали этот вопрос, и наши соображения таковы... Конечно, это ваше решение, но, учитывая все плюсы и минусы, вы точно указали на плюс. Мы проводим проверку целостности люка незадолго до истечения EI минус 1 часа, и если мы её обнаружим, вам будет трудно быстро надеть скафандры. С другой стороны, недостатки ношения скафандров заключаются в том, что они могут значительно замедлить вас, не считая времени на их надевание, и кто-то даже очень обеспокоен тем, что после определённого периода времени в скафандрах вам может стать слишком жарко, и нам, возможно, придётся включать систему вентиляции скафандров, а мы этого делать не хотим, потому что это потребляет довольно много энергии. Следовательно, мы бы рекомендовали вам не надевать костюм, поскольку у нас нет оснований полагать, что проверка на целостность покажет что-либо, кроме незначительного увеличения скорости ут
アポロ8
Apollo 8, bitte seien Sie auf einen kurzen Störgeräusch gefasst, da wir die Konfiguration am Boden ändern. Wir gehen in Test 1 über; Up- und Downlink bleiben bestehen, und wir bleiben zwei
Okay, während ich die Instrumente ablese: Der 250er Wechselrichter hat 145 Grad. Das ist der 250er. Der 150er Wechselrichter hat 105 Grad, der Standby-Wechselrichter 119 Grad und die Rückwärtstemperatur 75 Grad. Gieren rechts 100 Grad, Gieren links 90 Grad, Nicken nach unten 96 Grad, Nicken nach oben 102 Grad, Kabinenwärmetauscher 42 Grad, Rollen links manuell 98 Gr
Okay. Auf der r
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。这里的情况相当不错。看起来你们几乎已经成
알겠습니다. 가능하면 사진 몇 장 찍고 싶
ヒューストン、窓から出ているテレビ
मुझे याद नहीं है, लेकिन यह
١١، هيوستن. رصدنا في بيانات القياس عن بُعد في الوقت الفعلي ضغطًا في غرفة الاحتراق يتراوح بين ٩٥ و ٩٧ رطلًا 
로저입니다. 카나
11, Houston. Our recommendation on the gear you got in the helmet bag - correction, hatch bag, would be to remove that stuff and put it in the sleep restraint under the right couch. The reason is that the hatch bag straps are only configured for zero g, and it is a pretty difficult job getting it lashed down. With the gear in the slee
收到，友谊七号。这里是卡纳维拉尔通信
Okay. Jetzt verstehe ich dich. Ich glaube, ich habe deine letzte Übertragung verpa
Gemini 4，Canary CAP COM。请切换
It looks like it may be 11 o
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. يقول فريق الإجراءات لدينا إن الشبكة لا
Bene. Sulla quarta fila. Apri - Da sinistra, apri i primi cinque - correzione - Chiudi i primi cinque e apri CABIN FAN 1. Chiudi i tre interruttori della 
Ihr habt ja echt groß
It ta
Колумбия, Игл. 
В грязи. Хорошо, я это понял. Попросите его включить их обратно и... Хорошо, Джим, это автоматические катушки обратно на КОЛЬЦО 1, ОСНОВНОЙ А, и когда вы это сделаете, я хотел бы,
حسنًا يا جاك، سأقرأها لك، ثم سأضيف بعض التعليقات وسنتحدث عنها قليلًا. من المفترض أن يحدث هذا بعد مرور 49 ساعة. بعد إعادة التوجيه عند 49 ساعة، إذا سمح الوقت، نود من الطاقم التحقق أثناء وجودهم في الموقع لمعرفة ما إذا كانت هناك زاوية دوران تسمح برصد المذنب لالتقاط الصور. إذا وُجدت، فسجل زاوية الدوران المثلى للتصوير المحتمل، قبل إعادة التشغيل عند حوالي 40 ساعة. عندما ينتهي الطاقم من مهمته، استخدم خيار الكوكب، والمتجهات النصفية التالية لتتبع المذنب ب
D'accord. Avant de commencer la copie, cette procédure consiste simplement à activer le manomètre à hélium supercritique pour que vous puiss
И сказал Бог: «Да соберутся воды под небом в одно место, и да явится суша». И стало так. И назвал Бог сушу землей, а собрание вод назвал морями. И ув
हम इसे यहाँ धीरे-धीरे छोटा करते 
Roger, und
Okay, es 
Buzz, cos'è che stai
... 끄기,... 끄기 
جيد جداً، زائد 30627، ناقص 00625، زائد 00577 1
알겠습니다. 물 상태를 확인해
ليس لدينا أي برنامج جاهز للاستدعاء... هذه هي الطريقة الوحيدة المتاحة. من المفترض أن نستخدم الأمر VERB 66 ثم نضع الأرقام
ठीक
Ja, das hatte ich mir schon gedach
Roger, Gemini 4. Weather for S-6. Look for any clouds in lee of the Canaries and Madeira Island for oblique photographs. Location approximately 200 miles south and
アポロ8号、もし焼けに関する情報が手に入ったら、教えていただ
ठी
あの車の後ろを可愛い子た
बहुत बढ़िया। मेरा ख्याल रखने के लिए धन्यवा
نعم. إنه ينام وبا
रॉजर, बज़। हम चाहत
好的。我把相机折叠起来
शांति, ह्यूस्टन। 
Okay. Now we talked that over with, and at 12 hours out, everyone seems to think that we don't need to do it there. But in close, it doesn't seem to ha
На самом деле, проблема не в пакете с едой, а в самой капсуле. Она раскрошилась. Я боюс
Хорошо. Мой шар всё ещё включён, и сейчас я приближаюсь к отметке 270. У 
好吧，当我打开蓝色滤镜时，
好的。读完后继续往下看。“平衡耦合器”开关，“平衡耦合器关闭”。好的，往下看——这是倒数2分钟前的最
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это Занзибарский Капитолийский Комиссионный корпус. Вы меня слыши
Roger, 
If you have to bother Bill to do that, why, we can hold 
Roger. Compris. Dave Reed a-t-il pu expliquer le sujet lunaire… lors de la conférence
재진입 태도는 어떠세요? 
Aber wir haben es getan – wir haben das Gebiet um
Ti sto l
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 
हां, ऐस
रॉजर, अगर 4 या 5 घंटे पहले से इसमें कोई बदलाव नहीं हुआ है, तो मैंने कर
E ora tradurremo più X e manter
It's not bad enough n
알겠습니다. 프레드, 말씀하신 내용을 잘 읽었습니다. 저희 열역학 전문가들이 검토할 예정입니다. 중간 수정과 관련해서 논의 중인 사항 중 하나는, SHe 탱크가 터지기 전에 수정하지 않는 것이 좋다는 것입니다. 만약 탱크가 터지게 된다면, 복구 과정에서 문제
Roger, Frank. What we are doing down here is this. We'd really like the horizon calibration. We would like a total of 15 marks; you know, three sets on one star, two on the other. On the oth
네. 패널 4: 통신, 그룹 1, AC1. 다음 회로 차단기를 닫으세요: 그룹 1, 메인 B를 누르세요; 그룹 2, 메인 B를 누르세요; 온도, 메인 B; 2차 루프 변환기, 메인 B; 라디에이터 제어/히터, 메인 B; 배터리 릴레이 버스, 배터리 B; 배터리 충전기, 배터리 B, 충전 - 또는 B
Ro
아주 좋습니다, 
ठीक है। 5 चार्ली, 
はい、わかり
分かりました。いいですね。どこで、どれくらい話が逸れてしまったのか分かりません。パネル4、TELCOMM、GROUP 1、AC1に接続します。パネル5では、以下の接続を閉じます。PRESSURE GROUP 1、MAIN B; PRESSURE GROUP 2、MAIN B; TEMP、MAIN B; SECONDARY LOOP TRANSDUCER、MAIN B; RAD、CONTROL/HEATERS、MAIN B; BAT RELAY BUS、BAT B; BAT CHARGER、B
D'accord. En ce qui concerne le module 
オーケー、彼女はチャンピオンの
And, Jac
المجلة رقم 
Wenn ich den Horizont finden könnte, hätte ich es geschafft. Ich hätte den Stern im Bild und den Blaufilter aktiviert. Er hätte alles außer meinem Stern ziemlich gut ausgeblendet. Aber ich bin noch nicht
سنقوم الآن بتنفيذ أول عملية تصوير حقيقية من نوع S-
好的，阿波罗8号。看来你们现在可以关闭低温风扇了，我们会暂时离开，让你们处理一下后续工作。我们船上还有一些其他项目，比如你们列出的高增益天线检查和通信模式检查，我们会推迟到你们准备好的时候再进行。所以，一切都取决于你们的方便。在使用宽带天线进行高增益测试时，我们在36kHz频率下仍然获得了非常好的数据，这比你们之前预测的电路裕
Это Sigma Seven,
Aurora Seven，Aurora Seven，这个 Woomera
저는 지금 남쪽 방향으
달을 흑백으로 찍었습니다. 기상청 필터를 빼고 찍었죠. 사진 번
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。请您将
Se non li mangiate tutti, ri
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन, मेरे पास कुछ अतिरिक्त एंट्री डेटा है जो मैंने अभी-अभी पढ़े पैड के साथ है। इसमें पाँच आइटम हैं। जब आप कॉपी करने के लिए तैया
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ロックがうまくいきません。軌道上でオ
Ciao, Apollo
罗杰。继续播报《栗色号角》。尼克松总统在登机飞往与您会面之前，从旧金山给您的夫人打了个电话，令她们惊喜不已。她们都被您的电视讲话深深感动。简和帕特在任务控制中心观看了直播。昨
In compartment A1, the 16 millimeter magazine will be located in window number 4 instead of 5. Tissue dis
Impatto abbastanza buono.
Okay. Fred, for your information, your CO2 reading onboard is a little higher than what we're reading here on the ground, and so 
ニー
Ok. Riquadro 8: imposta PYRO ARM, due, su ARM. Ottengo il via lib
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, hier spricht Kano. Wie liest d
でも、岩って本当にいろんな種類があるんですよね？少なくとも数種類はあるんですよね？それで、どうや
Les feux de forêt les chassent vraiment, n'est-ce pa
13번, 휴스턴. TV를 고정하기 전에, 정보 제공 차원에서 최대 확대 상태였는지 알려주시면 감사
أعطني واحدة من تلك المناشف الموجودة هناك في صندوقك، من فضل
13, Hou
了解しました。皆さんの水量スイッチは、
Vorremmo sapere quali sono i tuoi piani per la riconsegna d
네, 알겠습니다. 더 이상 질
Definitely below me. I'd been tracking it below me from about Carnarvon on. Up until about Carnarvon we had it below us, and then up to the horizon, and then down below us again. It almost looked like it was in a different orbit than I was. It had a different apogee and perigee than what I did. Anyway, I attempted to close with it at daylight as soon as I could tell where it was. As I said, at that time it was a mile or two out in front of me - down below me. So, the more I tried to close, the less I really gained on it. I was firing retrograde. I was using my top thrusters to fire in such a manner as to decrease my total velocity, and then firing... at the same time. I never really closed, and it continued to pull away from me. It became obvious to me that by the time we got to Hawaii that to close on the booster in time to do the EVA with the booster would probably ta
В созвездии Водолея совсем не некомфорт
저는 어지러움을 느꼈습니다..
Sie sehen aus
ठीक है। यह सही है। और पैड का अंतिम भाग, जो कि माइनस 4.5 घंटे है, पर 0.5 फीट प्रति सेकंड की गति से धक्का दें, चार जेट, प्लस-X; SEP निष्पादित करे
Well, negative. I need another maneuver toward the terminator. It is drifting off the screen to our 11 o'clock. We appear to need a maneuver toward the terminator, Frank
Роджер. Понимаю
Итак, приготовьтесь к дальнейшему включению двиг
찰리에게 이 아기를 선물해줘서 고맙다
ठीक है। मध्य प्रशांत महासागर में उतरने वाले क्षेत्र में मौसम अच्छा है। बादल 2000 फीट (लगभग 10 किमी/घंटा) के हैं, दृश्यता 10 किमी/घंटा; हवा की गति 0.60 किमी/घंटा (लगभग 10 किमी/घंटा); लहरों की ऊँचाई 4 फीट है, और अल्टीमीटर 2986 किमी/घंटा (यद
Salut Ed, tu sais qu'on a toujours dit 
好了，阿波罗8号。你们
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on your own, that's the place we'd like to break off and let you go ahead and take over with your own alinement. However, we are giving you a procedure which will give you things we know you can see in the telescope without worrying about any reflections or anything of that nature, and it's not intended that this procedure has to be followed past the point where you know you've got good definition of star patterns in your telescope. If you need to go on, we'll maneuver, take a look at the Moon, we'll take a mark there, and then we'll maneuver with the / angl
جيم، لقد عمل الكثير من الأشخاص على إجراءات
..
罗杰。来自公共事务办公室的最新消息：阿波罗11号仍然是全球新闻的焦点。只有四个国家——共产主义中国、朝鲜、北越和阿尔巴尼亚——尚未向其公民通报您的登月飞行和登月。一位记者表示，他已经找不到合适的词语来形容您的成功。今晚，尼克松总统计划在华盛顿观看全明星棒球赛。赛后，他将前往太平洋回收区。周三晚上，他将从约翰斯顿岛乘直升机前往海军通信舰“
केबिन स्टीम वेंट 10 है; सूट स्टीम वेंट 62 है। मैं तापमान में
Хорошо. Передайте Баззу, что мне бы очень пригодилась его повязка на гл
休斯顿，请继续
正解です。では、トランスデューサー、圧力グループ1と2、メインAとメインBの回路遮断器
那件事就到此为止了
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 중간 항로 수정 2번입니다. SPS/G&N 63059, +0.97, -0.20, 점화 02644 5792, +0.0118, -0.0003, +0.017
좋아, 버즈. 목적은 근접 비행이야. SPS/G&N: 62815, +0.97, -0.20 0.70 54 5944, -0.0028, +0.0023, +0.0069 0.29 149 312, 원지점은 NA, +0.0221 0.0078 0.01 0.0034, 육분면 별 01 2385 227, 보어사이트 별은 NA NA NA. 위도는 -0.265, -16500, 11899 36228, 144 56 47. 비고: 설정 별은 데네브와 베가, 0.07 144 0.68입니다. 여유 연료 없음. 도킹 연소를 사용합니다. 응답을 기다려
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. В следующий раз, когда мы пройдем через точку нулевого крена, мы остановимся, и это даст нам тангаж
حسنًا. لمن لا يعرف، هذا هو المكان الذي نسجل فيه معظم بياناتنا لكل مناورة، ولدينا بطاقة أخرى كهذه، وهي دفتر الجدول الزمني الموضوع على الطاولة أمام لوحة مفاتيح عرض البيانات؛ وعلى هذا الجدول الزمني نُسجل جميع إجراءاتنا. ولكن من الواضح أننا نحتاج إلى تثبيت هذه البطاقات في مكانها في حالة انعدام الجاذبية، لذا نستخدم قطع الفيلكرو الموجودة على ظهرها وعلى الطاولة لتثبيتها هنا؛ ثم نقلب الصفحات عند الانتقال إلى تسلسلات جديدة في
Роджер. Насколько я понимаю, Билл, мы сейчас это обсу
Roger, 
روجر، ديك
On peut essayer 
Roger. Sie lassen weiterhin Sauerstoff aus dem Flüssigsauerstofftank 
そうだね、ロジャー。閉
اقترب الموعد من 8
了解。Rev 
हम क्षैतिज वेग पर निर्भर हैं
مرقس 
I don't know where I'm go
Okay. Tell Buzz I sure could u
좋습니다. 1816에서 게이지 상관관계 
ठीक है। मैं आपके लिए सुविधाजनक समय पर आपका डेटा रिकॉर्ड करने के लिए तैयार हूँ; कोणों के बारे में जानकारी अगले 2 मिनट म
...что-то 
Роджер. Во время первого запуска ваш двигатель израсходовал немного бо
11, Houston. Wir haben hier ein paar Dinge für Sie: Eingabepads, Verbrauchsmaterialien und so weiter. Sobald Sie sich etwa
V horizontal
Хорошо, плюс 00068, плюс 00000, плюс 46420 178 134 001, неприм
Wir
OK, Houston. On comme
13번, 휴스턴
好的。在操作步骤 BAT 5 和 6 之后，关闭电源，然后添加以下操作：断路器、配电盘 - 配电盘 11 和 16、ASCENT ECA CONTROL，均
好了，我准备好了。35587、358、139、320、302、3
ينبغي أن نرى ضوء 
क
나는 잘못된 방향을 보고 있고 연료 부족으로 기동 범위가 제한적이다. 달빛이
分かりました。これを認める必要はありません。あなたは89.2×15
..
Sei sicuro di non aver urtato il convertitore portandolo in posizione 
Roger, du bist wieder bei Eins. Und um wie vi
Nun, das hatte ich nicht angesprochen. Wir könnten – wir könnten es in Erwägung ziehe
- - u
네, 아쿠아리우스. 여기서는 재정비 작업을 진행 중이고, 여러분의 조종 모드를 점검하고, 비행 계획보
396 033, 아래 054, 왼쪽 21, +08 10 -16500 12968 36222; 같은 정렬; 시리우스와 리겔, 129 155 010, 4개의 제트기, 1
Bien reçu. Pour information, la commande de vitesse fonction
再说一遍，卡诺。
حسنًا، لنرى، التكوين القمري الطبيعي. حسنًا، إنه وضع النسخ الاحتيا
Roger. Sei s
Okay. Ganz unten steht: „10.000 Fuß HAUPTFALLSCHIRM AUSLÖSEN, HAUPTAUSLÖSUNGS-Taste drücken, innerhalb von 1 Sekunde drücken.“ Und danach fügen Sie bitte Folgendes ein: „SOR-VENTIL FÜR AUSGLEICHSTANGE, AUS; PACKUNGS-REPRESS-VENTIL, AUS; und DIREKT-
Dobbiamo... e... imparare a uscire dalla navicel
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्ट
Okay. First statement is a statement: "Verify in OPERATE for 5 minutes." Then we go to " address 400 plus 5, then 400 plus zero. PITCH and ROLL to PULSE; YAW, MODE CONTROL. Maneuver us
맞아요. 지금 저는 2~3시간 정도 잤어요. 에드는 5~6시간 정도 잘 거라서, 저는 아마 6~7시간 동안은 다시 안 잘 것 같아요
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे पास आपको भेजने के लिए एक राज्य स्तरीय दस्तावेज़ है। 
This is Friendship Seven, retu
हवाई कैप कॉम। मैं 4 सेकंड तेज़ हूँ। सिग्मा सेवन ब्लाइंड में संचारित कर रहा
Roger. Fort et clair. Commen
是的。往外看看，能不能看到牛郎星？看到天鹰座吗？那两颗……
わかりました。これは高速帰還のためのペリシントス+2です。これは/62871、マイナス161、プラス129、プラス45224、マイナス06216、マイナス18712
과이마스, 여기는 제미니 4호입니다. 이 마지막 문제를 해결하기 위해 제가 정말 최선을 다해야 할
Роджер. Четко и ясно слышно. 
Okay. Dieses Manöver bringt Sie sehr nahe an die Scangrenzen Ihrer Hochleistungsantenne. Überprüfen Sie daher während des Manövers die Kontrollleuchten. Leuchtet die Kontrollleuchte fü
アポロ8号、アンダースがカウントダウンを教
我们一直没能利用D-9进行任何操作，而D-
Gleichstrom (DC) hat immer eine Spannung von 25 Vo
Houston,
تم حجب صوتك في تلك الرسالة الأخيرة. كرره
مرحباً يا تشارلي، أستطيع أن أرى الثلج على الجبال في كاليفورنيا، ويبدو أن لوس أنجلوس لا تعاني من مشكلة تلوث الهواء ال
Ricevuto. Bec
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。アポロ8号、ヒューストン、暗闇の中。あなたに関するデータは全て失われました。良質のOMNIアンテナを選んでくだ
13, Houston. Wir möchten Sie bitten, zusätzlich die Lüfter in O2-Tank 1 einzuschalten, und wir können di
Tranquilit
إد بخير. ومتى سينام ت
Jim, would you holl
И панел
我
Хорошо, и мы записываем время, когда это было завершено. У вас там два списка: один для передачи оборудования, а второй — обратный. Просим вас вычеркнуть последний пункт из первого списка, который касается возврата использованных сумо
ه
그리고 그건 좀 어두운 구석에 있어서, 우리가 손전등으로 비춰보려고 하는 거예요. 제가 조심스럽게 놓으면, 그
D'accord. Je voulais simplement vous en informer et vous inciter à réfléchir à ses implications sur le plan de vol. Je vous présenterai ensuite une vue d'ensemble et commenterai la Lune afin de déterminer les sections les plus appropriées. Frank souhaitait que nous vérifiions l'ordre d'apparition des profils d'entrée. Le premier profil affiché est intitulé « Non-sortie n° 2 » et correspond à l'entrée rapide à courte portée. Le deuxième profil, intitulé « 3 500 milles », est également une entrée rapide, mais celle à utiliser en cas d'entrée à plus longue portée. Le troisième profil sera « Non-sortie n° 1 », suivi d'un quatrième profil de 3 500 milles. Vous avez donc quatre profils d'entrée. Les profils n° 1 et 3 correspondent aux entrées à courte portée, et les profils n° 2 et 4 aux entrées à longue portée. Concernant le refroidissement, je crois que nous avons discu
Gemini
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 전원을 꺼드릴까요? 아마 절반 정도 찼을 
ठी
D'accord. Étape 5: positionnez le contrôle de tangage et de lacet de l'antenne à gain élevé en fonction des angles d'élévation du sol prévus,
Es war wirklich schlimm, Mike. Über dem anvisierten Landegebiet war es extrem uneben, voller Krater und unzähliger Felsen, von denen einige, viele wahrsch
حسنًا. هل تريد الانتظار حتى 
Okay. Fangen wir bei minus 6,5 Stunden an. Du wirst wieder Blöcke und Blöcke bekommen, und ich weiß nicht, ob du sie abschreiben willst oder nicht. Das kann ich dir einfach vorlesen. Ende. Du musst sie nicht abschreiben, es sei denn, du w
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 달은 기본적으로 회색이고 색깔이 
No, l'abbiamo preso dal suo archivio di registrazioni; lui e Jim ne stavano 
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 그리고 후방 격벽에 묻은 물은, 양이 많지 않다면 그냥 닦아내고 스펀지는 폐기물 보관 장소에 버리시면 됩니다. 만약 양이 많다면, F10-14 페이지의 점검표에 있는 절차를 
30-1 109。2+19。13 00 13。4+52。9+40。31-1 84 後方は 42。2+20。9+54。14 34 22。3+54。9+18。32-1 84 後方は 56。2+20。1+11。16 08 16。3+05。8+53。33-1 84 後方は 68。2+20。1+27。17 42 15。2+37。8+49。29-BRAVO 84。50 後方。2+20。1+03。12 16 35。12+08。 30-ブラボー120。2+32。 13 50 19. 12+29. 34-4 120.2+32。 20 29 04. 3+33。 8+55。 31-ブラボー 95.2+
それは非推進性通気孔
한 시간 전에
好的。电压大概在2.4到3伏
Okay, Joe. Ich gebe es dir zurück und schaue, ob ich es hier habe. Nach der Übung sollen wir den Kometen Bennett mit dem Sextanten beobachten und den Rollwinkel notieren, falls er sichtbar ist. Er wäre idealerweise zwischen 45 und 75 Grad sichtbar und sollte b
指示——指示复古态度已启动。第 1、2、3 部分……全部……我们正在使用主电池。
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。新しい状態ベクトルをアップリンクします。そして、再度アップリンクします。状態ベクトルを送信すると、搭載されている状態ベクトルが
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM auf
What is your space, sp
좋습니다. 2단계: "밸런스 커플, 끔; 데드 밴드, 최소; 자세 제어: 피치
Okay. Du entscheidest. Sobald Jack aufgestanden ist, schlage ich vor, wir zerlegen diese Lithiumhydroxid
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप सुन रहे हैं, तो बता दें कि यह 000 नंबर हमारे संचार के लिए बहुत खराब है। दरअसल, आपसे संबंधित सारा डेटा खो गया है और आवाज भी सुनाई नहीं दे रही है।
잭, 우리가 CB POWER-1, MAIN A를 폐쇄한 적은 없는 
네, 프레드. 맞습니다. 다만 우리가 작업 중인 정렬 절차는 지구/태양 정렬이라는 점을 제외하면 나머지는 모두 맞습니다. 참고로, 이 TC+2 기동은 여전히 ​​초당 약 900피트의 속도로 진행될 것으로 보이며, 142시간 안에 태평양 중부 정
روجر، زنجبار كوم تك، فهمت قص
참
11 40 41，即启示录 8；东经 19.8 度；赤
Why 
제미니 4호, 여기는 옴니버스 64호입니다. 구조 헬기가 지금 목줄을 채워주러 오고 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。三个通信开关位置。首
Houston, comment interprèt
هل يُمكنني 
Вы
جاك، أعتقد أنك سألت عما إذا كان تعديل العلبة يعمل، والإجا
了解です。3-1です。6-1です
好的，VII. 36% - 更正，VI，- 剩余 3
O
نظام التحكم الإلكتروني في الهبوط ونظام التحكم ال
Roger, Neil. Danke. Es scheint, als gäbe es etwas links vom Terminator, im Norden, ein Wolkenband – eine Wolkenlücke –, das sich in nordwest-südöstlicher Richtung erstreckt. Unserer Einschätzung nach verläuft es etwa über den
Sonnenaufgang. 
알겠습니다. 전원 공급 항목 첫 번째 줄에 "AUTO SELECT, 16, to OFF"라고 되어 있는데, 이 부분은 삭제하시면 됩니다. 다섯 번째 줄에는 "Circuit breaker LOGIC POWER"라고 되어 있는데, 실제로는 "LOGIC BUS, four of them, to closed"입니다. 엔진을 과열시키는 게 아니므로 DELTA-V CG는 ​​중요하지 않습니다. "SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER"에는 "Two to AC 1"이라고 되어 있는데, 이것을 하나만 남겨두고 "SIGNAL CONDITION/DRIVER BIAS POWER, one, to AC 1"로 수정하겠습니다. 아래에서 세 번째 줄에 있는 "POWER" 항목에는 "
D'accord. L'une de nos premières priorités est de recharger la batterie afin de disposer d'énergie pour effectuer cette opération. Nous avons d'ailleurs déjà mis au point des procédures à cet effet. Concernant la rentrée atmosphérique, nous prévoyons notre dernière manœuvre de mi-parcours 5 heures avant l'interface d'entrée, si nécessaire. Nous souhaitons ensuite larguer le module de service environ 4 heures et demie avant cette interface et consacrer les 3 à 3 heures et demie suivantes à la prise de photos, à la mise en marche du système de guidage et de propulsion du module de commande, au rangement du matériel et à diverses autres tâches. Nous conserverons le module de service jusqu'à une heure avant l'interface d'entrée, puis nous le larguerons. Ces procédures seront exécutées de manière intégrée dans les systèmes de gestion de mission (CMS) et de maintenance (LMS) demain matin et, si tout va bien, nous les répéterons plus tard dans la journée avec le contrôle de mission en boucle. Une question se pose: que faisons-nous ensuite? On pense qu'il y a suffisamment d'oxygène dans le module de commande et que le module représente une source de haute pression et un problème de rangement. On envisage donc de les laisser à l'intérieur. Par ailleurs, nous pensons qu'il serait préférable d'effectuer une rentrée en combinaison, en enfilant la combinaison avant l'éjection. En effet, lorsque nous larguerons le mo
로저. 손잡이를 앞뒤로 당기면 돌아가는 기어가 두 개 있습니다. 하나는 래칫 역할을 하는 작은 원통형 기어인데, 피스톤이 들어 있고 그 뒤에 래칫과 맞물리는 돌기가 있습니다. 트렁크를 열기 전에도, 그리고 열고 나서도 이 래칫이 제대로 작동하지 않아 애를 먹었습니다. 게다가 트렁크를 잠글 수 있을 만큼 완전히 닫는 것조차 매우 어려웠습니다. 에드는 트렁크가 열리기 시작할 때까지 매번 손으로 래칫을 밀어 넣어야 했습니다. 저는 트렁크를 잡아당기다 보니 
이 자세에서는 확실히 머리 위를 올려다보는 듯한 착각이 들고, 지평선이 보이지 않으면 그냥 칠흑 같은 하늘뿐입니다. 조종실 조명은 상당히 밝습니다. 물론 적응하고 나면 객실 조명으로 줄일 수는 있겠지만, 지금은 우주복 회로 문제 때문에 조명을 낮추기가 좀 꺼려집니다. 손가락에 끼우는 손전등을 아낌없이 사용하고 있습니다. 앞으로 비행할 때는 물건들을 담아 일정 시간 동안 가둬둘 수 있는 장치가 필요할 것 같습니다. 저는 와셔와 작은 금속 조각 문제를 해결하려고 애쓰고 있습니다. 음... 드디어 그것들을 해치에 있는 작은 가방에 넣은 것 같습니다. 우주복 온도는 그럭저럭 유지되고 있습니다. 저는 덥고, 아마 설정을 낮춰야 할 것 같습니다. 우주복 회로가 왜 이렇게 반응 속도가 느린지 모르겠습니다. 객실 회로는 아주 잘 작동합니다. 이제 플라이 바이 와이어 저고도 모드로 돌아가서 역추진 자세
حسنًا، أبولو 8. ربما علينا إعادة المحاولة في المرة القادمة، وقد تم تحديد رؤية النجوم باستخدام التلسكوب الماسح في خ
罗杰，友谊七号。你的眼动测试还有一
好的，BAT C 为 37，pyro BAT A
Das stimmt.
Du hast die 
好的，乔。我测到电压了。电流是39.
알겠습니다. 몇 초 정도
Bien reçu. Je vais procéder à une vérification de la batterie d'ascension. Voulez-vous jeter un coup d'œil rapide à mes données biomédicales? Termi
1
了解、ヒューストン。ジャック、ミ
برج الدلو، هيوستن. تف
Нет, всё в порядке. Я прост
Gemini 4, 
Вторичный контур охлаждения выглядел действительно хорошо. Похоже, у вас был хорошо герметичный радиатор, и все остальное работало в соответствии с рабочими кривыми. Во время нашей проверки оба ваших основных кислородных регулятора наполнились до 104 psi. Учитывая лунную орбиту, ожидайте кипение воды со скоростью около 1 фунта в час, и это лишь приблизительная оценка; существует довольно много разных оценок относительно того, какими могут быть требования к кипению воды, от сильного кипения до полного отсутствия кипения. Следующий сброс воды состоится позже, так что вам не нужно беспокоиться об этом, пока вы не закончите. Прогнозы связи выглядят многообещающе, возможно, немного лучше, чем мы надеялись, и, похоже, мы получим высокую скорость передачи данных на всенаправленных антеннах с нашей 210-футовой антенной в Голдстоуне. Это будет работать для нас первые несколько обор
Good, John. We have a go all the way on this. I'd like to give you your 
地平线景色优美，引人入胜。太阳在左侧，大概——嗯，我猜是40度左右。可以看到地球表面有一条深色的线，云层呈
जी हाँ, जैक। ठीक है, पृष्ठ 2-5 पर। सबसे ऊपर वाली पंक्ति जहाँ "क्षितिज जाँच" लिखा था, अब वह "चंद्र अस्त जाँच" है और समय लगभग 57:37 है। और यह -02:23 है। और पुस्तक में जो कोण 177 दिया गया है, वह वास्तव में 2 मिनट का क्षितिज समय है
حسنا
أتسلل لمقابلتك يا فرانك. مباشرةً بجانبك وإلى الي
我们真正想做的是让你摆好姿势，这样当你看到地球透过窗户出现时，你就能抑制住它，并把地球留在窗户里。继续翻到第29页“
أبولو 11، هيوستن. انط
Okay. 8, /: 45701, minus 040, plus 157, plus 33195, minus 01267, plus 04716 179 008 001, NA, plus 00187 33552 311 33355 42 09090 252, Dz
الآن، يجب أن يكون وضع الانفصال ووضع المحرك ذي الدفع الأحادي متطابقين، لذا سأعتمد على الوضع المُحدّث للفصل. يختلف هذا الوضع بحوالي 7 درجات، ولكنه مُدرج في خطة ال
Oui, et ça… tout s’est passé très vite, juste une seconde
Bien reçu, Jack. Booster dit que c'est parfait. Il dit que le booster fonctionne normalement. D'accord. O
...turning around. Affirmative 
إنه
अपने फेस-प्लेट को दोबारा बंद और लॉक कर लें। हेलमेट लॉक करें, दस्ताने पहनें, इनलेट-आउटलेट "Y" आकार में रखें और ECS होज़ेस को ढीला छोड़ दें। इसके बाद मैं कमांड पायलट सूट की जाँच करूँगा, जो मैं पहले ही कर चुका हूँ... अब प्रवाह की जाँच करें। हैच लॉक खुला है। फिर आपको बाकी चीज़ें जाँचनी हैं। जब हम वास्तव में डिप्रेसराइजेशन मोड शुरू करते हैं, तो केबिन वेंट वाल्व को 2 psi पर सेट करें, फिर वेंट वाल्व को बंद कर दें। इसके बाद हम
حسنًا. لقد أخطأنا في مجموعة النسخ الاحتياطية. كانت في غير مكانها. يبدو أن البيانات الموجودة على متن الطائرة سليمة. أردنا فقط أن تتأكد من ذلك. لدينا تحديث بخصوص بطاقة نظام تحديد
Faites-
Roger, Houston. Qualche parola sul nostro sistema di tracciamento ottico. Ho usato AUTO OPTICS per i punti di controllo 1 e 2 sul retro, e hanno funzionato benissimo, hanno tracciato entrambi i bersagli per me. Sono andato al punto di controllo 3, come indicato nel nostro manuale di controllo orbitale, per vedere la latitudine e la longitudine che mi erano state fornite e ho usato AUTO OPTICS per tracciare quel particolare sistema di coordinate, ed era molto vicino al tracciato di tracciamento effettivo. Ho scelto il punto in cui ho fatto la marcatur
هذا صحيح. حسنًا، سنعود الآن إلى فتح
Continuo a pensare che ci sia qualcosa che abbiamo dimenticato, m
OK. Lace
Durant
जी हां, जिम। और यह उस दुर्लभ संभावना से बचाव के लिए है जि
手動燃料が
ジェミニ4、
좋아요, 연소 시간은 확보하셨죠. 
Это был Gemini VII, и я уверен, что они видели их с такого ра
그리고 아폴로 8호, 지금 편하신 시간에 레지스터 1이 10,000을 나타내는지 확인하는 첫 번째 단계를 진행하셔도 되지만, 지상국 설정이 완료될 때까지 데이터 전송은 잠시 기다려 주시겠습니
ठीक है। पायरो ब
了解。空母が視界に入
Роджер. Колумбия, у меня есть время для вас, этот проезд
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们目前使用低比特率。我们无法获取您的蒸汽压力；您的辐射输出为33
Ciao, Mike. Siamo pronti a farti passare alle posizioni OMNI per il tuo periodo di sonno, e vorre
Вперед
Le
ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम, गोल्डस
ええ、私たちが求めてい
حسنًا. حسنًا. أولًا، تنص الفلسفة العامة على أن هذه القواعد يجب أن تكون مشابهة لقواعد الإجهاض في الوضع الأول مع الحدود الصارمة. الآن، سأشرحها لكم واحدة تلو الأخرى لتتمكنوا من نسخها. حسنًا. يجب إيقاف التشغيل في حال حدوث أي مما يلي: قراءة ج
良好。413020 183、シャウラ、下064、左06、プラス0747、マイナス16410 12988 36301。北の星群、シリウスとリゲル、ロ
Roger, stai leggendo
了
Ro
Okay. I think Jim is holding it now and - it - Okay, it should be in about f:22, infinity, and I think the 50-millimeter. And Jim
И, Водолей, мы сейчас направляем на вас довольно точный курс. Похоже, вы 
そうだね、ジャック。その件については、君のため
خا
알았다.
Roger.
네, 저기
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Я показываю — я попытался сбросить настройки, и топливные ячейки 1 и 3 показывают с
了解。オー
... 私はそれを小さい方
Roger. Sur le cratère le plu
Хорошо. Оставайтесь на верном пути. Не переживайте по этому поводу. Мы ещё долго б
Roger. Okay. Wir notieren den Ladezustand des Akkus, sobald wir dazu kommen, und die Lage für die Optik: Roll 330,5, Nick 086,3 und Gier null. Die Lage gemäß Flugplan ist in Ordnung; ich 
...возможно, на стенках этого кратера есть какие-то слои. Мне только что пришло в 
बज़, आपने विज़
Okay, nenn es einfach nicht „den Kühlschrank“. Okay. Bei etwa minus 1
좋아요, 계속하세요. 좋아요, 저기에
روجر. نريد التحدث معك بشأن ذلك. مايك، يمكننا - حسب رغبتك - القيام بذلك بأي طريقة. إما أن ندعك تقوم بذلك في 
Roger. What sort of settings could you recommend for the 
حسنًا. أعتقد أنني قرأت أنك جاهز. نسيت... سماعات الأذن. الأمر بسيط، كل ما عليك فعله هو إخراج زوج ثانٍ من الخراطيش من وحدة التحكم، ووضع شريط لاصق رمادي اللون، مع توجيه الجانب اللاصق للخارج، حول جوانب كل خرطوشة جديدة بالقرب من الأعلى، ثم أخذ قطعة من ورق مقوى وتقطيعها إلى أربعة مربعات، طول ضلع كل منها حوالي 5 إلى 7.5 سم، وثنيها بزاوية قائمة لتشكيل دعامات الزوايا، ولصقها بالشريط اللاصق بحيث تبرز وتتداخل مع الخرطوشة القديمة، ثم وضع ال
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, Housto
13，我们
هيوستن، أب
음, 그 부분에 대해서는 제대로 된 답을 얻지 못했어
Roger. Sono un po' impreciso sul rollio, come puoi vedere. Niente sforzo. La metterò subito in rotazione quando sarò qui.
Vou
감사합니다, 
Okay. Panel 3: BATTERY CHARGE, OFF - you've already done that, Jack - next AC INVERTER, Panel 5: MAIN BUS TIE BAT B/C to BAT B/C. Huh? Yes, it's up - the up position. circuit breaker, BAT A POWER E
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Indian Cap Com. Achtung: Wir haben eine Leuchtraketenzündung. 
好的，非
ヨーは今のところほぼ0です。MARK。T。確認します。残り約4度
О, темно, вот что случилось. Оно обращено к темной земле. Закат F16 до F, хорошо; начнем с F16. На севере, двигаемся на юг. Попробуйте что-н
Okay, wir notieren den Zeitp
Roger, Frank. For 7
Houston, Eagle. Êtes-vous prêt(e) pour que nous procédions au paiement dès mainten
Also, whe
V
Roger. Suit temperature is now 70 [degr
Das kann ich beim besten Willen nicht sag
つる座の二重星が一列に並んで窓の真ん中に入ってきています。木星は、もちろんとても明るいです。アンカと…訂正します、アル・ナイールも見えます。あれはピーコックだったはずです。アル・ナイールは飛行経路の少し右側です。私は飛んでいますが、あれはピーコックで
Джим, это Хьюстон. Два момента: во-первых, у вас всё выглядит очень хорошо, и этого должно хватить на всю ночь; во-вторых, у меня есть инструкция, если вы готовы её скопировать. Мы хотим установить три бита в компьютере, и я объясню почему
Pour ceux qui n'ont pas lu la plaque, voici celle qui se trouve sur le train d'atterrissage avant. On y voit deux hémisphères, chacun représentant l'un des deux hémisphères terrestres. En dessous, on peut lire: « Ici, l'Homme de la planète Terre a posé le pied sur la Lune pour la première fois, en juillet 1969. Nous sommes venus en paix pour toute l'humanité. » Elle porte les signatures des membres d'équipage et celle du p
Хорошо. Страница обновления карты теперь у меня есть. Почему бы тебе
そして、アポロ13号、
Я провел проверку электрооборудования. У нас были проблемы со связью по пути. Но все системы работают отлично. Кислород подается без проблем.
تشغيل المكيفات - تشغي
Mike, as-tu d'autres informat
O
我当时只
حسنًا. لدي سؤال. هذا الفحص الذي يُظهر أننا ف
Columbia, this is Houston. We are through with the u
ठीक है। कोई समस्या होने की उम्मीद नहीं है, लेकिन 
네, 그런 것 같
好的。那我继续推进。三角形偏差是0.01，但在0.3倍率下有点困难。我需要使用中速未分辨模式，而且很难长时间保持星点居
로저. 손잡이를 앞뒤로 당기면 돌아가는 기어가 두 개 있습니다. 하나는 래칫 역할을 하는 작은 원통형 기어인데, 피스톤이 들어 있고 그 뒤에 래칫과 맞물리는 돌기가 있습니다. 트렁크를 열기 전에도, 그리고 열고 나서도 이 래칫이 제대로 작동하지 않아 애를 먹었습니다. 게다가 트렁크를 잠글 수 있을 만큼 완전히 닫는 것조차 매우 어려웠습니다. 에드는 트렁크가 열리기 시작할 때까지 매번 손으로 래칫을 밀어 넣어야 했습니다. 저는 트렁크를 잡아당기다 보니 잠금장치가 부러질 뻔했습니다. 
Jim, falls du v
Okay. These bite siz
J'ai désactivé les gyroscopes. Ils sont trop critiques. Je vais essaye
Pourriez-vous me donner les valeurs de pression et de température de votre source d'hélium, ainsi que celles de votre manomètre de 
रॉजर। अगला है ईएलएस बैट ए, बैट
컬럼비아,
Bonjour, Apollo 8; c’est Deke. Je voulais simplement vous souhaiter un très joyeux Noël de la part de toute l’équipe du Centre de contrôle, et j’imagine que c’est le cas pour tous ceux qui nous suivent à travers le monde. Aucun d’entre nous n’aurait pu espérer un plus beau cadeau de Noël. J’espère que vous passerez de bonnes nuits et que vous apprécierez votre repas de Noël demain. Au plaisir d
Ganz genau, Fred. Und falls du irgendwelche Fragen zur Ausrichtung hast, lass es uns bitte wissen. Wir beantworten sie dir gerne, genau wie die Ausrichtung auf der Erde, w
Okay, e sei davvero bravo. È un... È un piacere non avere tutto quel rumore. Lascia che ti dica cosa voglio fare, Jim. Come ho detto, non ti daremo procedure dettagliate, ora. Quello che ci aspettiamo di avere per te a breve sono procedure che cercheremo di farti avere nella forma seguente. Innanzitutto, avremo una timeline, una sorta di piano di volo, che conterrà gli orari di tutti gli eventi principali e qualsiasi configurazione, impostazione degli interruttori e così via che siano peculiari della nostra configurazione e che, quindi, non 
Позвоните мне, когда будете удовлетворены состоянием вторичной петли; здесь ситуация до
Boy, they rate some ro
روجر. ربما بدت لك رحلتنا إلى القمر بسيطة أو سهلة، لكنني أؤكد لك أنها لم تكن كذلك. صاروخ ساتورن 5 الذي أوصلنا إلى المدار آلة بالغة التعقيد، وقد عملت كل قطعة فيها بلا عيب. يحتوي هذا الحاسوب الموجود فوق رأسي على قاموس من 38,000 كلمة، اختيرت كل كلمة منه بعناية فائقة لتكون ذات قيمة قصوى لنا، نحن الطاقم. هذا المفتاح الذي أحمله الآن، له أكثر من 300 نظير في وحدة القيادة وحدها، بتصميمه الفريد. إضافة إلى ذلك، هناك عدد لا يحصى من قواطع الدائرة، والرافعات، والقضبان، وغيرها من أدوات التحكم المرتبطة بها. يجب أن يكون المحرك، محرك الصاروخ الكبير الموجود في مؤخرة وحدة الخدمة، قد عمل بلا عيب، وإلا لكنا عالقين في مدار القمر. يجب أن تعمل ا
收到。请注意，飞行员几个小时前
了解しました。もう一つコ
わかりました。ジャックにCM/RCS HEATERスイッチがオフになっているか確認してもらいます。オフになっていなければ、電源を切ります
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन से है। अब समय आ गया है कि हम कमांड मॉड्यूल के तापमान पर नज़र रखना शुरू करें; इसलिए जब भी आपको समय मिले, हमें अभी तापमान मापन चाहिए, और हम इसे लगभग हर 8 घंटे में दोहराने की क
알겠습니다. 우선 배터리를 충전해서 전력을 공급해야 하는데, 이를 위한 절차를 이미 마련해 두었습니다. 재진입과 관련해서는, 재진입 시점 5시간 전에 마지막 중간 궤도 수정을 할 계획입니다. 물론, 재진입이 필요한 경우에 한해서입니다. 그리고 재진입 시점 4시간 30분 전에 서비스 모듈을 분리하고, 그 후 3시간에서 3시간 30분 동안 사진 촬영, 사령선 추진 및 정지, 적재물 정리, 기타 자잘한 작업들을 진행할 예정입니다. 서비스 모듈은 재진입 시점 1시간 전까지 보유하다가 분리할 것입니다. 이러한 절차는 내일 아침 CMS와 LMS에 통합하여 실행할 예정이며, 가능하면 오늘 오후에 관제센터와 함께 다시 한번 실행할 것입니다. 한 가지 질문이 있는데, 그 후 어떻게 처리해야 할까요? 사령선에는 산소가 충분하고, 고압 산소 공급원과 보관 문제가 있다는 생각 때문에 산소통을 사령선에 남겨두는 방안을 고려하고 있습니다. 또 다른 생각은, 우주복을 입고 진입하는 것이 좋겠다는 것입니다. 우주복을 입고 우주복을 착용
11, H
И это выгодно, потому что нам больше не нужно проводить совещания,
11 pieds par seconde. L
Et le 
Quello
罗杰，阿波罗一号运行 13 54 08，位于轨道东北方向 
Okay. That sounds good. Also, while you are waiting for the vehicle to stabilize, it might be interesting to have the eyepiece on and be your burn had no a
まだ寝ていたので、アライメントを約10分スキップしていたようですね。もう一度アライメントを
Tja, das ist meine Frage. Wir sind nicht – unsere 16 20 passen nicht zu unserer Acht-Kugel. Wir haben auf s ON gestellt, aber unsere Kugeln sind noch nicht voll
D'accord, Jim. C'est un tout petit peu moins profond qu'avant, mais c'est basé sur un s
아폴로 8호, 귀하께서 여기로 가셔서 수락해 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 그리고 지금 녹음기를 가져가시면, 제가 귀하의 응답을 받아 적겠
E-9ペ
«Аполлон-1
We figure you ought to be touching down in about 2
Okay. Jack. Let me give you a thruster configuration right now. Able 1, Charlie 1,
मुझे लगता है कि मैं मजे के लिए इस पैंतरे को थोड़ा कम कर दूंगा। बज़, क्या 
Gémeaux 4, Houston CAP C
Роджер, Хьюстон. Сейчас мы уберем скафандр Фреда. Скафандр Фреда уже полчаса стоит в командирском отсеке. Поэтому мы 
ヒューストン、アポロ1
はい。4
Apollo 8, Houston. Ce test est terminé. Nous allons repasser en liaison montante complète. Dès que vous entendrez le bruit
... الكرة على تلك الوسادة -
闪电看起来像一大团光斑，而不是我们平时在地球上看到的锯齿状闪电。看起来就像一大团——几乎像防空炮弹。
نحن نستخدم OMNI D، وسمعنا - فقدنا الاتصال بعد ذلك - أن TM بالإضافة إلى 
C'est g
E sono in attesa dell'altimetro staccato. Capo, hai già letto? L'altimetro è staccato. 100 [1.000] pie
좋습니다. 슈트 전원이 꺼져 있었고, 10번 패널로 가서 전원을 
好的。我们现在可以利用《平价医疗法案
Colum
わかった。フレッド、君の弱々しい声を聴
١١، هذه هيوستن. بالإشارة إلى تقييمك الشخصي بأن الجو كان أبرد داخل المركبة الفضائية الليلة الماضية، فقد ذكرنا سابقًا أننا لاحظنا بالفعل انخفاضًا في درجة الحرارة بمقدار ٣ درجات تقريبًا مقار
Sembr
Wir gehen auch in 
No, per niente. Ti stiamo solo dando informazioni in ecce
了解しました、スキッパー。今回の変更による熱の問題は見られません。通信に問題があれば、別の方法が必要になるかもしれませんが、今のところ順調です。もし窓のそばで何か動きがあれば、数
وإغلاق واقي الشمس. لقد أخطأت في ذلك، سأضطر إلى إعادة إحكام إغلاقه. حسنًا، لقد أعدت إحكام إغلاقه. أفضل ألا أبقى في تلك المق
Le circuit de refroidissement secondaire était en excellent 
将燃气分流阀
В данный момент я использую фильтр Airglow. Визор открывается, чтобы лучше рассмотреть его. Здравствуйте
Okay, Mike. Das gilt natürlich nur für den Fall, dass die G&N-Steuerung ausfällt und du mit konstanter G-Belastung fliegen musst. Wir versuchen, den Bereich für konstante G-Belastung von 1100 auf 1500 Meilen zu erweitern. Wir haben das Verfahren im Simulator getestet, und es funktioniert einwandfrei. Ich erkläre es dir kurz – mach es einfach durch, und wenn du Fragen hast, melde dich. Es ist im Prinzip dasselbe: Auftriebsvektor nach oben bis zur maximalen G-Belas
Roger. Sento qualche risata provenire da quella direzione. E abbiamo anche un resoconto dell'ultimo minuto sugli eventi sport
好的，很好。关于组件指示灯，我们不需要 H2O SEP。好的，在 CB(16) 上，就在它正下方，“加热器显示，关闭”，你可以把它划掉。执行步骤 2 的所有
روجر. هذا تقر
يبدو أن أداء المحركات الرباعية A وC وD متطابق تقريبًا. المحرك الرباعي B يعمل بدرجة حرارة أقل قليلًا، ولكن بفارق طفيف جدًا. جميع قراءات درجة الحرارة طبيعية، مما يدل على أن النظام يعمل بكفاءة من الناحية الحرارية. أما بالنسبة لاستهلاك الوقود،
Roger, Guaymas. We still have the booster. We're out quite a ways from it now, and it's taking a little more fuel than we had anticipated. We've got 61 in the fore and aft window in the aft direction, 37 left and 36 up at the present time. We appear right now to be just about holding our own with
알았다
Okay, Fred-o. Ganz unten auf der Seite wollen wir Schritt 1. Bei der blinkenden 0406 wählen wir Option 
Хорошо. Что ж, для телепередачи, которая выйдет через пару часов, вам бы не помешало подумать, как лучше всего остановиться, если вы решитесь на это, чтобы получить наилучший ракурс с высоким коэффициентом усиления; а также было бы неплохо, если бы вы остановили нас в
你能确认逆向
不，那样做一点用都没有；是伺服电机的
Roger. 
Nein, das stimmt alles nicht. Ich sehe jetzt, dass ich wohl spiegelverkehrt war. Der Horizont wird sichtbar, u
了解。こちらは太平洋中部、357 152 359 268、プラス0813、マイナス16503 065 36221 645 12122 36301 0028。次のD0 400 02 12 0025 0
Che ne dici di spostare l'interruttore di lettura d
わかった。まあ、彼女は逆噴射で君の顔に迫ってくるだろうけど、きっとその後すぐに気が狂うだろうね
روجر. وأود أن أتجاوز تصحيح سمت
Ach, das geht schon wieder ab, denke
Okay. Ro
Hier oben herrscht L
Rog
그건 안 드릴 수 있어요... 돌아다니고 
Отлично. Сегодня в Сан-Диего состоялась торжественная церемония встречи экипажа корабля «Пуэбло». Им пришлось нелегко в корейской тюрьме. Во Вьетнаме действует рож
La 
Okay. Löschen Sie den Abschnitt, der "Nur vor dem Abdoc
Sì. Non ti abbiamo inviato un
你是不是在使用V
حسنًا. نود الحصول على تحديث لخطة رحلتك خلال الساعتين القادمتين. متى ستفكر في القيود المختلفة المحتملة والترتيب الذي تفضله لتنفيذ
分かりました。少しの間、あなたの姿勢が悪く、こちらが受信できない状態でした。ジャック、5分ほどお待ちください。この件について、他にも聞き手が来ています。この手順を考案するには多くの方々の協力が必要で、何人かがテストも行っています。ですから、残りの説明をしている間、全員の方にご待機い
네. 별거 아니에요. 음, 어디 보자. 스포츠부터 시작해 볼까요? 휴스턴 애스트로스는 8대 7로 간신히 이겼고, 애틀랜타 브레이브스는 9회에 5~6점을 냈지만 간신히 승리했어요. 그리고 오늘 중요한 경기 중 하나였던 시카고 컵스는 비 때문에 경기가 취소됐습니다. 나머지 경기 결과도 다 알고 있는데, 필요하시면 말씀해 주세요. 마닐라와 루손 섬 여러
SPS、12個が閉店です - 2、4、6、8、10、12、閉店です。よろしいですか
シグマ・セブン、シグマ・セブン、こちらは
Gemini 4，休斯顿 C
Roger, Jack. Questo completa la procedura, e la prossima cosa che ho per voi è una procedura per tornare al modulo di comando e alimentare temporaneamente i bus principali usando il BUS. Innanzitutto, vogliamo verificare con assoluta certezza che non ci siano carichi sui bus principali, che tutto sia spento e che i bus siano in buone condizioni; e la seconda cosa che vogliamo fare è alimentare il bus - i bus princ
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une de l'actualité mondiale. Seuls quat
잘 보이실지 모르겠지만, 풍요의 바다에는 윤곽만 겨우 알아볼 수 있는 아주 
제리, 제가 전에 말씀드렸듯이, 프로그램 01을 호출해서 우리가 다시 배에 오르도록 함으로써 집으로 가는 여정을 서두르려고 했지만
أودّ أن أطلعك على مسارك. يبدو أن تصحيح المسار الأول، المتوقع حتى ست ساعات، سيُحدث تغييراً بمقدار 7 أقدام في الثانية فقط. لذا، من الطبيعي أن أي مناورات أخرى ستزيد من هذا التغ
All the equipment is in good order. Coming up over for 6+50, in the night, and this time I want to go down the star charts to check this bear out. T
Okay, Houston; Aquarius, radio 
わかりました。それと、状態ベクトルは約5時間の追跡に基づいています。高度69.7マイルの周回軌道上にあり、自由帰還が可能です。進入時の飛行経路角は約マイナス14度です。通常の進
حسنًا. الصف الثالث تحت قسم الاتصالات. افتح شاشة العرض، وأغلق الصوت، وافتح جهاز إرسال واستقبال VHF A وB، وأغلق قواطع الدائرة الرئيسية لنطاق S. افتح هوائي نطاق S
मुझे लगता है कि दो कोने आपस में छू गए थे, क्योंकि जब इसे लगाया गया था, तो दोनों एक साथ नहीं निकले थे। यह थोड़ा असमान रूप से खुला, और ज़ाहिर है, जिस ज़मीन पर यह 
لي
好的，请安装
尼尔，
Toujours pas de modu
Хорошо. Когда мы переключили выключатель питания переменного тока с IGS на ACME — это не должно включать компьютер — индикатор компьютера погас. Ког
Ja, Jack. Ich habe es dir zweimal vorgelesen. Befehl „reset“, was ich bereits getan habe. Ich schalte jetzt das Gerät aus, schalte die Heizungen aus und lasse Batterie 
Вот вам, ВВОД. РЕЖИМ УПРАВЛЕНИЯ, чтобы УДЕРЖАТЬ. Те
네, 뭐라고 하셨
روجر. لدينا بعض التغييرات على قواعد المهمة، لا يُسمح لك بالهبوط، يا نيل. تغيير طفيف في بطاقة ضغط الوقود ودرجة الحرارة، وتغيير في إجراء فحص تسرب المبرد الثانوي، و
Nein. Ich muss erst 
好的。
로저. 그가 기자회견에서
그들이 돈을 낼 
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストンです。カメラで比較でき
Qu'avez-vous fait de cette liste de 
Роджер. При следующей разгермет
今ならここまで投げら
D'accord, Fred. Très bien. N
ठीक है। कैप आपसे वाहन के चारों ओर मौजूद कणों की क्रियाओं को आपके एक नियंत्रण जेट की प्रतिक्र
Roger, Jim. Nous aimerions avoir votre avis sur l'aspect de la situation. Nous ne sommes pas certains de voir ce que n
Bene. E infine, ora che avete la navicella spaziale laggiù, puntate la telecamera come necessario per includere la Terra nel campo visivo e non toccate il corpo dell'obiettivo durante la ripresa. A qu
Хорошо. И именно там я и был. КОМАНДНЫЙ МОДУЛЬ ТОПЛИВА 2, центр, включено, вверх; Обратная связь 
هذا صحيح، 
Neil, I'm going to get up here and get pitch - MANUAL ATTITUDE PITCH to ACCEL COMMAND. Those hand controllers are armed, so
罗杰。转告吉姆，接下来这些标记点，他务必记住记录DELTA-R和耳轴
罗杰，13岁。由于氧气罐2的液位传感器出现故障，他想更密切地监控低温液的液位，所以他需要你比原计划
11. Шершень. Экземпляр 1330, 1675. Есть ли 
Wir pulsieren den RCS hier ziemlich langsam, daher kontrollieren wir die Rollbewegung nicht richtig. Wir versuchen, u
罗杰
Das ist Freundschaft Sieben. Ich glaube, ich habe jetzt eine bessere Ausrichtung auf der Tagesseite, was diese Dinge und die Einstellung angeht. Ich werde die Gyros wahrschein
هذا صحيح. قبل أن أبدأ 
水瓶座さん、それが緊急時対
Roger. Und, mal sehen, das sind Spica, Menkent u
알겠습니다. BAT Baker 충전 절차는 다음과 같습니다. 패널 3: BAT CHARGE, OFF; 패널 5: MAIN BUS TIE, BAT A/C to A/C; CB BAT CHARGER, BAT A CHARGE, open; CB BAT CHARGER, BAT B CHARGE, close. 패널 250: CB BAT B POWER ENTRY and POSTLANDING, close.
मुझे तुम्हारी चेकलिस्ट मिल गई है, माइक; क्या तुम इसे वापस लेना 
Если я смогу убрать немного еды Билла отсюда — В этом месте, которое называется нижним отсеком оборудования, находится наше оптическое позиционирующее оборудование. Мы осуществляем всю навигацию здесь, ориентируясь на звезды и горизонты Луны или Земли. Именно здесь мы точно определяем свое местоположение в космосе, направление и скорость движения. А наш компьютер, как уже упоминал Фрэнк, принимает информацию и подсказывает нам, как маневрировать, чтобы безопасно вернуться домой.
Погода в районе эвакуации хорошая. Облачно, волны выс
Ricevuto. Ricevuto, Buzz. Ho apportato un paio di modifiche alla tua checklist di superficie e, in generale, quello che vorremmo che facessi è tracciare il modulo d
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。
Okay. Wir haben sie. Mach we
I can see a black fire down on the desert. You can see right down to the very source where it's coming from. I couldn't see exactly what it was, b
Ok. Il
了解。分
Gemini VIII, RKV CAP COM. У нас есть обновлени
Houston, ici Apollo 8. Nous sommes d'accord. Sirius et Rigel seraient deux étoiles bien meilleures que Navi et Polaris. J'ai cependant aligné Cassiopée après m'être adapté, mais je crains que le temps nécessaire pour
네, 저희 모두 상태가 아주 좋습니다. 짐은 점심 준비에 열중하고 있고, 빌은 지금 카메라맨 역할을 하고 있고, 저는 곧 지구 대기 측정을 시작할 겁니다. 모두 몸 상태가 괜찮습니다. 거대한 토성 탐사선 탑승은 정말 스릴 넘치는 경험이었지만, 모든 것이 완벽하게 진행되었고, 이제 저희는 모레 달에서 불과
Okay. Die vier Heizungen sind geschlossen; die Anzeigen sind offen; die S-Band-Antenne ist geschlossen; die Kamerasequenz ist offen; die Anzeige ist offen; die Gleichstrom-Bu
shows full scale pitch attitu
私がプレゼンを始めても大丈夫ですか、それ
Хорош
Jim, du wirst gegen 8:00 Uhr Ortszeit etwa 560 Meilen südöstlich von Samoa landen. Die Wettervorhersage für die Region ist gut
よし、フレッ
了解。1日目の食事Dと2日目の食事Aと
1
不对，迈克。如果你看一下图表（我们会保存下来，飞行结束后给你看），它一开始就立刻开始螺旋式上升，俯仰角大概到了20度左右，然后似乎在一个偏离90度大约20度的俯仰角点附近形成螺旋；但我们不想冒险让
Das stimm
फ़ंक्शन, बंद; म
알았어. 그들에게 말하지 마. 여기 있는 거에 손 베지 않게 조심하고, 아무렇지 
ठ
उन्हें यही जवाब चाहिए था। क्या आपके पास इंडियन ओशन शिप से डॉग, ईज़ी और गोल्फ के रेट्रोसीक
Роджер. Будем следит
Bene. Stiamo cercando di risolvere un piccolo problema che abbiamo notato un po' di tempo fa nel flusso di O2, che ora è di nuovo normale, ma quello che vorremmo che facessi è, prima di tutto, dirci se, duran
بمجرد ضبطه على الوضع التلقائي، سيبدأ العد تلقا
わかった、いいよ。2時間くらい後にまた打てるかもしれ
好的。我只是想让你们注意这一点，
V
罗杰。是的，它在向阳面。地球大约三分之二被照亮，晨昏线向下延伸到地平线附近。现在，从地球的另一侧，也就是阳光照射的那一侧，光线从大约四分之一到三分之一半径处照射下来。一般来说，它相对于一条垂直于晨昏线且
Roger. R
Roger. You're coming through loud and cle
로저, 콜럼비아. 11번 항공기가 도착했습니다. G&N: 37200, -060, +047, 098 05 2422, 
좋습니다, 짐. 오늘 아침 목소리가 좋네요. 이 별들에 대해 간단히 설명해 드리겠습니다. 비행 계획에서 보시다시피, 33번 안타레스, 34번 아트리아, 그리고 40번 알타이르를 관측하도록 예정되어 있습니다. 첫 번째 안타레스는 태양면 안에 있고, 나머지 두 별은 태양면 밖에 있습니다. 아시다시피, 우리는 태양면 안팎의 별들을 모두 관측하고 싶어합니다. 33번 안타레스는 태양에 매우 가까워서 33번 별의 측정이 어려울 것으로 예상됩
Вы имеете в виду
هناك أفق جميل ومثير للاهتمام. الشمس مائلة إلى اليسار بزاوية حوالي 40 درجة. يظهر خط داكن على سطح الأرض، برتقالي عند الغيوم، أصفر فاتح، أبيض فاتح، وشريط أزرق. أزرق فاتح جدًا، وكوكب عطارد مرئي الآن. قبل غروب الشمس. وهو في موقعه الصح
Okay. Ich gebe grünes Licht für 
알겠습니
L'aggiornamento sulla palla è stato positivo. Al momento dell'accensione
Fred-o，你关
В настоящее время я использую стандартный объектив для съемки воды и облаков на 16-мм пленку. У нас большие проблемы с кнопкой включения/выключения на этой камере. Она срабатывает только примерно после третьего или четвертого нажатия. Возможно, это объясняет, почему Джим не смог снять достаточно пленки на первую камеру во время нашей работы в о
Roger, ho perso la testa per un po' quando sono tornato all'impostazione 3, ma non ci sono rimasto a lungo. Dovrebbe essere sicuramente tra 7,5 e 8. A questo punto, sono in retroassetto automatico. A breve passerò al fly-by-wire. Ero stato in modalità giroscopio normale e la manovra era disattivata. Tutti i sistemi sono verdi. Ho interrotto circa il 2% del manuale (carburante) una volta colpendo. Era doppia autorità. Era il mio errore. Era solo un movimento di beccheggio verso il 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. واضح تمامًا. كيف حال
他のものは着ていませんで
روجر. كولومبيا، إنها +7 - تصحيح، +0.799 لخط العرض، +11.730 لخط الطول على اثنين. انته
Na gut. Dann müssen wir uns wohl keine Sorgen mehr um die Entlüf
,. Stai facendo una bella figura qui a terra. Se hai altri com
Ok, a 49.000 piedi, dovremmo essere a 65 piedi al secondo - dice la nostra vecchia cart
Ricevuto. M
अरे, यहाँ तो सब कुछ बहुत ही सुचारू रूप से चल रहा है। उसके साथ तालमेल बिठाना बिल्कुल भी मुश्किल न
هذا هو بالضبط ما يبدو عليه الأمر من هن
分かりました。ステップ6のほぼ一番下、正確にはステップ6の下から3行目に「セカンダリークーラントループエバポレーターをリセット」というセ
Roger. Vous ne nous dérangez pas, mais nos réponses font be
Bene. Poi, pannello 3: TRANSPONDER, PRIMARY; POWER AMPL, su PRIMARY, questa è una verifica; POWER 
Всё будет хорошо. Вы вообще захотите снова заряжать 
罗杰，我有一个；
Houston, Apollo 11. Looki
MTV
好的。
ठीक है। बिट रेट को LO बिट रेट पर सेट कर
Negativ. Alle benötigten Drosselklappendaten liegen vor. Sie können die niedrige Bitrate beibehalten. Fahren Sie mit dem Drosselklappentest fort, führen Sie aber keine Gimbal-Trimmung durch.
Anche i bambini al campo estivo sono finiti al centro dell'attenzione quando Mike Jr. ha risposto "sì" a qualcuno che gli aveva chiesto se suo padre sarebbe entrato nella st
Хорошо, Джо. Я готов переписать блокно
Род
了解しました。通過中にUHFチェックを実施します。念のため、燃料は最小限に
わかりました。待機してくださ
是的，休斯顿，我们确实有。LO
了解。12:20 プラットフォームの電源を切って、MSC-1 
Аполлон-8, Хь
हैसलब्लैड कैमरे से पृथ्वी की तस्वीर लेना कोई बड़ी बात नहीं है क्योंकि यह समय-समय पर पृथ्वी के ऊपर से गुजरता है। लेकिन टीवी और हैसलब्लैड दोनों को एक ही समय में पृथ्वी की ओ
Roger. Et vous, 
La nuit est tombée à 5 h 02 environ. Nous avons perdu le contact visuel avec l'Agena et j'ai immédiatement
08+40. Вот и всё. У вас 
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。
ジム、それではキャリブ
ああ、あなたの言うとおりだと思います。おそらく私たちは決
ह्यूस्टन, यह अपोलो 8 है, जो आपको हाई
You're going to have to watch your fo
روجر. نواصل مع صحيفة مارون بوغل. فاجأ الرئيس نيكسون زوجاتكم بمكالمة هاتفية من سان فرانسيسكو قبيل صعوده إلى الطائرة للقائك. وقد تأثرن جميعًا ببثك التلفزيوني. شاهدت جان وبات البث من مركز التحكم هنا. تأجل إطلاق 
حسنًا، أرى عطارد يمر عبر وهج الهواء. سنرى إن كان سيصمد. عندما قلتُ "أرى"، كانت تلك البداية. مارك، أول تغيير في اللون، وهو الآن أزرق فاتح. ولا يزال مرئيًا. مارك، أزرق داكن. مرئي مارك، يتحول إلى اللون البرتقالي المصفر لسطح الأرض. كان هذا عطارد، وهو يهبط فوق الأفق. سأتم
よし。ステップ1を実行。テスト1：5秒待つ。5秒ある。AUTOにする。よし、インジケーターライトはすべて消灯。範囲
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन CA
了解しました。Sバ
حسنً
That's affirm. The reason we're turning the logic off, Jack, is a power savings. So we'll be turning them off, and I'll be getting them back on when we go to get off of the; and then turn them back off, then we'll be turning them on prio
そうです。そして、それはすべてかなり短い時間でした。ほんの 1 秒ほど前と、そ
Okay. Wir haben endlich die richtige Skala dafür gefunden. – Ich muss kurz in die VOX-Aufzeichnung. Die Skala für das Dosimeter stimmt – und es zeigt einen Wert von etwa 0,04 an, also weniger 
На самом деле, всё идёт не очень хорошо, потому что, к сожалению, у нас нет возможности выключить радио. Поэтому, когда мы разговариваем вот так, Эд слышит нас с тобой; хотя громкость у него на меньшую величину, я уверен, что он нас сейч
没错
حسنًا. المعلومات التي تلي ذلك، بدءًا من "تكوين صور Earthshine للكاميرا" وصولًا إلى "استبدال الشرائح المظلم
جيميني 4، كاناري كاب كوم. أنظمتك تبد
वैसे, वह संचार व्यव
ホット
Eagle, Houston. Alle sind mit diesem Modus rundum zufrieden. Wir bleiben gern noch ei
Roger, Amitié Sept. Vot
现在吉姆那边是白天，我这边还能看到一些星星。看来航天器可以调整方向，让一侧处于黑暗中，另一侧则沐浴在阳光下。吉姆那边现在肯定是阳光明媚，而我这边则是黑暗中。飞行初期，我从助推器上望向窗外，看着那些闪烁的萤火虫，感叹周围一片漆
لا أعرف. لقد صعدتُ إلى الطابق الع
好的。1 号燃料电池
Перед отъездом я фотографировал весь этот мусор внутри и случайно изменил настройки камеры Reseau модуля управления постоянного тока,
حسنًا
Questa è Houston. Possiamo vedere la m
With this much sunlight
جيم، نتفق معك في استخدامك للفوهتين الصغيرتين اللتين يمكنك تحديدهما مرارًا وتكرارًا على الخريطة؛ وإذا زودتنا بخطوط العرض والطول الجديدة، فسنتمكن من حساب وقت أقرب اقترا
Roger. Sigma Seven. Guaymas Cap Com. Parfait. Il y a eu une panne de co
अपोल
ठीक है। एंट्री 1 को देखते हुए: दूसरा आइटम 12 घंटे का केल्विन कोल्ड सोक है, और यहाँ और प्रीफ्लाइट में हुई चर्चाओं में, मुझे लगता है कि इस बात पर सहमति बनी है कि हम वहाँ कोल्ड सोक नहीं करना चाहते। इसलिए हम स्टेप 2 को हटा रहे हैं। इसका मतलब यह है कि मुझे लगता है कि हम कोल्ड सोक करना चाहते हैं, और हम निश्चित रूप से एंट्री से पहले वाटर बॉयलर का परीक्षण करना चाहते हैं ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि कोई बॉयलर सूखा न रह जाए, जैसा कि पहले सूखा रह गया था। हम इसके लिए कुछ प्रक्रियाओं पर काम कर रहे हैं, और हम आपको थोड़ी देर में इसके बारे में बताएंगे, और हम कोशिश करेंगे कि बिल के लाइन पर होने पर ही ऐसा करें ताकि सभी को एक साथ जानकारी मिल सके। हम स्टेप 8 और 9 के बीच,
روجر. خطأ واحد يا 
Roger. Sulla stella numero 40 che stai seguendo ora, il piano di volo prevede solo una serie di segnali. Hai dichiarato due serie, e la scelta spetta a te. Ne serve solo una. Saremo lieti di avere i dati se ne eseguira
ठीक है। उन्हें ज़्यादा देर तक इंतज़ार मत करवाओ। मुझे जल्दी से जल्दी बचा लिया जाना चाहिए। डॉक्ट
はい、そうです。このENTERキーでダン
11、ヒューストン
Джек, звучит неплохо. Думаю, с нашей позиции мы знаем, где находятся Солнце и Луна, и это будет исключительно маневр по тангажу. Но, думаю, мы сможем сэкономить топл
로저. 페리신시안 플러스 2, 최소값 / 62871, NA, NA, 마이너스 00468, 플러스 00254, 플러스 00181 173 101 027, NA, 플러스 00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044, 하강 044
Si dà il caso che sia proprio di questo che stavamo parlando. C'è un po' di umidità attorno al bordo esterno del portello, ma in quantità davvero minima. Abbiamo un
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Хотите включи
ठीक है, फ्रेड। यह डिसेंट प्रोपेलेंट टैंक के तापमान की रीडिंग लेने की प्रक्रिया है। इसमें कोई बड़ी समस्या नहीं है, लेकिन हमारे लोग कह रहे हैं कि डिसेंट स्टेज का निचला हिस्सा शायद
このロール姿勢では、ハイゲ
Okay. I am
わ
자세 제어가 아주 잘 되고 있습니다. 수동 연료도 충분한 것 같습니다. 아직 72% 정도 남았습니다. 피치 방향으로 사이클릭 레이트를 확실히 제어하고 있습니다. 요는 상당히 안정적이고, G가 증가하고 있습니다. 캡슐은 상당히 안정적입니다. 녹색 흐름이 보이고, 가끔 주황색 줄무늬도 보입니다. 재진입도 아주 잘 되고 있습니다. 평소와 달리 느린 롤링이 이어지고 있습니다. 2G까지 올라가고 있습니다. 레이트 컨트롤에 연료가 충분히 남아 있습니다. 이제 반짝이는 것들이 보입니다. 라임에이드처럼 확실한 녹색 빛이 나고, G가 증가하고 있습니다. 진동 제어도 아주 잘
We can't help them too much. Actually it isn't bad... but...... goddamned unfortunate. In part, I get a feeling... now when I get.
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन, 's के लिए: CDR 0.07 है, CMP 0.64 है, LMP 0.80 है। ध्यान दें कि CMP में शुरुआत से कोई बदलाव नहीं हुआ है और कमांडर में भी
Роджер. Не могли бы вы сообщить нам последнюю температуру сухого и вл
Gemini 4, RKV CAP CO
मैं एच
نعم، هذا ما هو عليه
Др
Ok. Sembra ancora che tu abbia un'ottima potenza. Ti mostriamo che hai più di 30 ampere in acqua. Se ti trovi in ​​difficoltà e non riesci a risalire - sono gli ampere-ora - non risalire con Recovery, puoi sempre spegnere e puoi sempre mettere in funzione le batterie pirosta
好的。没错，这位是吉姆·洛弗尔。我们今天想带大家简单了解一下阿波罗8号内部的生活。我们已经向大家展示了月球和地球的景象，现在我们想邀请大家走进我们的“家”。正如你们在仪表盘上看到的，这里至少已经是我们生活了4天。我们在仪表盘上标记了每一天。现在已经过去4天了，我们正在进行第5天的工作。当然，我们都非常期待周五的着陆。在飞船的下部设备舱里，总统的体能顾问吉姆·洛弗尔上尉正准备进行我们每天都要进行的锻炼。你们注意到他活动自如。他刚才不小心撞到了导航光学系统。他正在使用一种锻炼设备来保持肌肉状态。现在，我们飞船的另一个非常重要的功能是计算机。我想你们可能对这里的显示屏感兴趣，它能显示我们所有关于燃烧、导航以及地球轨道任务中重返大气层和反推阶段速度的信息。你们可以看到，它是由一个类似打字机键盘的装置控制的，输入输出的数据简直令人惊叹。它为我们出色地完成了任务，吉姆·洛弗尔（Jim Lovell）的操作也非常出色。现在，无论是在太空还是在地面，吃饭都是非常重要的事情。我请比尔·安德斯（Bill Anders）向你们展示我们在飞行中是如何进食的。请原谅我们在这里移动和更换摄像机时画面可能会有些模糊。我们使用的食物都是脱水的，
Okay. Das ist bestätigt. Wi
Tranquility, Houston. First question here is how your best estimate of the yaw on the - of the as compared to the nominal preflight plan. O
روجر، بيل. سنكون سعد
Let me know when you're going over to PRELAUN
И вы хотите, что
Ok
No, c
Right. That's a real advantage in the cockpit. You're just a little bit dark. It looks like it might help to have the f-stop run down about one increment. See how i
Ты там, в Хьюстоне, 
现在我们有
C'est exact, Jack. Passons maintenant à la page 1-6. Environ au tiers de la page, on peut lire « Panneau 275 CB MAIN A, BAT C, fermé ». Nous allons supprimer cette ligne, ainsi que les deux suivantes: « MAIN A, BAT C, fe
그리고 만약 그것을 찾을 수 있다면, 꼭 추적하거나 어디
收
罗杰，11。你复制飞行计划更新项
Je commence à apercevoir le lever du soleil dans le périscope. C'est la première lumière que je vois dans le périscope pour cette orbite, à cause de la face nocturne. Il est clair que le périscope est totalement inutile en rétroposition côté nuit. La première lumière que je reçois est à une altitude pratiquement nulle. Le soleil se lève
कोलंबिया, ये ह्यूस्टन है। क्या आप सुन रहे है
هذا صحيح. الآن، لوحة القراءة رقم 8، تخبرك بـ "إغلاق جميع قواطع الدائرة باستثناء"، ولدي أربعة إضافات. الأول هو قاطع دائر
Okay. Ich wurde kurz unterbrochen. Bob Hope ist wieder mit seinen Truppen in Vietnam und leistet wie immer hervorragende Arbeit. Ein Name, der hier in den Nachrichten auftaucht, stammt von der USS New Jersey. Bob Hope scherzte gestern – oder Mittwoch – von einem riesigen Geschützturm herab, um die 1500 Mann an Bord des Schlachtschiffs New Jersey zu erfreuen, das bereits zum 20. Mal US-Truppen im Ausland zu Weihnachten unterhielt. Hope und seine 27-köpfige Truppe unterhielten die Seeleute der New Jersey, nachdem sie an der Weihnachtsmesse an Bord des Flugzeugträgers Hancock teilgenommen hatten, beide vor der
Roger. La position actuell
Всё ещё хорошо выгля
Es trifft sich gut, dass wir genau darüber gesprochen haben. Am äußeren Rand der Luke ist es etwas feucht, aber wirklich nur ganz leicht. Wir haben dort oben einen Schlauch, von dem wir hoffen, da
물병자리 여러분, 우리에게는 FORWA
Некоторые из этих небольших углублений имеют тенденцию проседать — примерно на 2 или 3 дюйма. *** Это в точности соответствует тому, что показали снимки геодезистов, когда они немного отодвинули грунт. Сила передается через в
,. Stai facendo una bella figura qui a terra. Se hai
分かりました。今、機械式CDUの番号を読み上げて
Okay. Und was euren Zeitplan
여기는 우정 7, 무체아입니다. 잘 들립니다.
D'accord, Jim. On est d'accord avec toi sur ce point; c'est un sujet qu'on voulait aborder avec toi. On y a réfléchi, et voici notre avis: bien sûr, la décisio
私も彼を捕まえま
आप यह विश्लेषण करना चा
Cosa consigli
Roger, Kano, Zwillinge 4. Ich vers
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。オーバー
Apol
وأفترض يا فانس أنه قد تم التطرق أيضاً إلى حصولنا على خرطوشتين ثانويتين إضافيتين - واحدة ف
И, Джек, можешь передать Оуэну Морр
Roger. We copy, 11. We understand that the program can give you almost an infin
رو
И — мы — мы предоставим вам информацию завтра, но в основном мы о
ऑरोरा सेवन, आपका पिछला ट्रांसक्रिप्शन अपठनीय था। आपकी आवाज़ रुक-रुक कर धुंधली हो रही है। मैं रेट्रोसीक्वेंस समय को बिना देखे पढ़ूंगा। एरिया 3 डेल्टा
Hier ist Friendship Seven. Ich bin an, aber sie läuft sehr unzuverlässig. Ich sichere sie momentan mit dem Handbuch. Ich versuche, sie so einzurichten, dass sie für Retrofire op
Хорошо. Камера заднего вида устано
알겠습니다. 이것은 플러스 11, /입니다. 이것은 40에서 마이너스 163, 플러스 129, 마이너스 005, 99, 플러스 00 00 0, 플러스 47016, 177 143 000 11월 알파, 플러스 001 97 47 020 5 51 468 18 12 12 83 257 023, 위쪽 263, 왼쪽 17, 플러스 11 95, 마이너스 165 00 126 83 356 08, 북극성; 0
Gemini 4. Flight would like to get a con
Si vous devez déranger Bill pour ça, eh bien, on peut attendre po
Than
Roger. Des paro
了解です。これはプラス11です。これは40マイナス163、プラス129、マイナス005、99、プラス00
Это более точное показание уровня топлива, если я смогу до него дотянуться пальцами, то получится 78, 78 (процентов) - до начала реверса. У меня настроено выполнение реверса - автоматическое управление - после реверса я переключусь на электронное управление и подниму нос к оси входа в атмосфер
ヒューストンのアソシエイテッド社ハリー・ローゼンタールによる特集記事です。2歳のジェフリー・ラベルくんのクリスマスイブを、2人のサンタが明るく彩ります。1人目は玄関をノックしてプレゼントを持ってきました。2人目は月からお父さんを家まで送り届けました。1人目は赤い服と白いひげを生やし、「ホー、ホー」と叫び、その声は街の向こうまで聞こえました。2人目は月の裏で巨大なエンジンが炎を吐き出し、何千人もの人々がエンジン始動の知らせを待ちわびていました。「サンタクロースがいます」。エンジンがクリティカル噴射を完了してから15分後、無線沈黙から目覚めたアポロ8号から最初に届いた言葉は、不安な世界に告げるものでした。「これ以上のクリスマスプレゼントは期待していません」とミッションコントロールのケン・マッティングリーは語りました。「地上の皆様に感謝します。皆さんがいなければ、私たちは成し遂げられませんでした」と、宇宙船の船長フランク・ボーマン大佐は返事をしました。ちょうどその時、ミッションコントロールのコンソールの前にクリスマスツリーが灯り、ハリソン・シュミット宇宙飛行士が乗組員たちに「聖ニコラスの訪問」の宇宙版を読み上げました。「クリスマス前夜、はるか宇宙の彼方で、アポロ8号の乗組員が月面レースに勝利したばかりでした」と始まります。ミッションコントロールの乗組員は、ジェフリーの父親である海軍大佐ジェームズ・ラヴェル、空軍少佐ウィリアム・A・アンダース、そしてボーマン大佐が無事に帰還するまで、祝賀会を延期していました。例年のクリスマスイブであれば、宇宙飛行士の家族は教会でクリスマス礼拝に出席していたでしょうが、今年は皆テレビに釘付けでした。有人宇宙船センター周辺の家々は皆、飾り付けで飾られていました。ラヴェル家の周りの芝生や、彼が住んでいたティンバーコーブのコミュニティ全体に、メキシコ風のランタンが飾られ、ラヴェル家の4人の乗組員が300
はい。あなたが粗い直線姿勢を指示している間、私は直接選択した姿勢を維持するよ
روجر، هل يمكنك تحديد موقع كوكب زيتا برساوس لنا بشكل أدق؟ ليس لدينا علامة عليه في خرائطنا. لدينا كوكب ميرفاك، ونعرف كوكب الغول، ولكن أيّهما هو 
Okay. 5, /: 47 correzione - 4
이건 어때요? LM에 이걸 유지해야 할 필요성
Плюс 37746, минус 03299, плюс 00844 179 346 357, неприменимо, плюс 00176 37900 336 37705 42 1279 309, неприменимо три раза, плюс 1350, минус 16500 13050 36389; Сириус, Ригель, 129 155 010, заполнение двумя струями, 20 секунд, квадраты B и D, ось X окна горизонта на горизонте на отметке минус 3, 
Roger. Der Drehmomentwinkel beträgt 00026; da
У нас есть много других видов пленки, которые нам лучше взять с с
Oh, stiamo facendo il punto su quanto abbiamo lì, magari potremmo anche pensare di razionarne una parte. Voglio dire, giusto per assicurarci di averne abbastanza per durare e di bere abbastanza acqua. Non vorrei rimanere senza acqua l
मुझे खेद है कि मैंने +4 कहा,
Hello, Roger, t
تم التأكد من ذلك. حسنًا
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 aft will be 42. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-1 84 aft will be 56. 2+20. 1+11. 16 08 16. 3+05. 8+53. 33-1 84 aft will be 68. 2+20. 1+27. 17 42 15. 2+37. 8+49. 29-BRAVO 84. 50 aft. 2+20. 
罗杰，友谊七
好的。请继续进行精细调整，陀螺仪扭矩角为 X 轴加 0.03.30，Y 轴加 0.24.80，Z 轴减 0.15.10
收到。稍等，稍后汇报状态。我已进入轨道姿态，等待您的跟踪。状态报告如下：除塔架分离器二号外，所有一号保险丝均已安装。紧急后退顺序、紧急后退抛掷和紧急减速伞均处于关闭位置，引爆器已准备就绪。自动后退抛掷已关闭。陀螺仪正常。所有“T”形手柄均处于“插入”位置。后退延迟正常。座舱灯均已开启。摄影灯仍亮着。低频遥测已开启。救援辅助系统处于自动模
रॉजर। नील, दूरी के हिसाब से तो तुम ठीक लग रहे हो। पैनोरमा पूरा करने के बाद हम तुम्हें फिर से लाइन में लगा देंगे। अभी तुम पैनोरमा स्वीप में बहुत तेज़ी 
Okay, Jim. Wir überleg
... पर्यावरण के लिए दब
わかった、ジャック。邪魔するつもりはないが、次の燃焼について、君は考えておくべきだ。あるいは、どう考えているのか。私
わかりました、ジャック。ジムです。チェックリストの変更点が本当に必要な項目かどうか、きちんと選別されているか確認したいのですが。手順を習得する際には、一度しか変更できません。土壇場で変更することはできません。できる限り最善かつ安全な方法で
We're just drifting. I don't know which way we
你现在大
Ok, e se vuoi (in effetti, vorremmo che aggiornassi tutti i tuoi permes
Je maintiens le réglage du contrôle du costume à 5,5 encor
حسن
알겠습니다. 지금 바로 확인해 볼게
What Fred is opening up - is a drink bag that we place inside of our neckring that will allow us to drink while we are on the lu
Nickwinkel... Ich sollte besser im Visier b
Roger. Wir hatten hier staubiges Wetter, und soweit wir sehen können, ist ein Großteil
प्रतिलिपि। पृष्ठ 22: T1, समय 82:37:35; T2, 82:42:50। और लक्ष्य 7 मील 
了解。OMNI Cの音声は明
عندما اقتربتم منا في نق
Gemini 4, Housto
フランク、もう既に言われてるかもしれないけど、今日のテレビ、すごく素敵だったよ。でも
जेमिनी
हमने सभी फिटिंग की जांच कर ली है और मुझे पता है कि मैं सब कुछ अपने यूसीडी से जोड़ सकता 
يقول إنه يعتقد أنه يستطيع ر
आपकी खिड़कियाँ कैस
Gemini 4, Sie können zur EVA und Dekompression fliegen. B
D'ac
로저. 여기는 
降下段付近からプラスY字型ストラットの写真を撮りました。これで熱の影響がもう少し
로저. 가능하면 고이득
了解しました。コンピ
こんばんは。私たちのミッション、アポロ11号の飛行における象徴的な側面についていくつかお話ししたいと思います。ここ2、3日、宇宙船内で起こった出来事について議論を重ねる中で、私たちは、これは単なる3人の月への旅以上のものであり、政府と産業界のチームの努力、さらには一つの国の努力をはるかに超えるものだという結論に達しました。これは、未知の世界を探求しようとする全人類の飽くなき探究心の象徴であると感じています。先日、ニール・ボルトンが初めて月面に足を踏み入れた際に述べた「これは人間にとっては小さな一歩だが、人類にとっては偉大な飛躍だ」という言葉は、まさにこの思いを的確に表していると思います。私たちは月へ行くという挑戦を受け入れました。この挑戦を受け入れることは避けられないことでした。ミッションを比較的容易に遂行できたのは、その受け入れがいかにタイムリーだったかを示すものだと私は考えています。今日、私たちは宇宙探査において、より広範な役割を担うことができると確信しています。振り返ってみると、宇宙船「コロンビア」と「イーグル」のために苦労して選んだコールサインには、皆が特に満足しています。特に、私たちの飛行のエンブレムには、アメリカの鷲が地球から、そして地球から月へと、普遍的な平和の象徴であるオリーブの枝を運んでいる様子が描かれています。このシンボルのレプリカを月に投下するという決定は、乗組員全員の決定でした。ここ数日の出来事を振り返ると、詩篇の一節が頭に浮かびます。「あなたの指の御業である天、あなたが定められた月と星を見ます。あなたはなぜ人を顧みてくださ
Vas-y, Carn
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。軌道修正番号2。SPS/G&N 63059、プラス097、マイナス020、点火装置02644 5792、プラス
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 컴 테크입니다. 컴 테크. 
Apollo 11, Houston. The S IVB is about
فهمت. تشغيل الشريط
Avanti Houst
ठीक है। हमारे पास जूस के कई पैकेट तैयार हैं, और हमने लगभग 20 मिनट पहले कमांड मॉड्यूल से पानी निकालने की कोशिश की, लेकिन पता चला कि कमांड मॉड्यूल का पीने के पानी का टैंक खाली है। इसलिए अब हमारे पास कोई पैकेट तैयार नहीं है, और हम पा
Schauen wir uns die Sportwelt an. Während Sie neulich beschäftigt waren, gaben Joe Namath und Football-Commissioner Pete Rozelle bekannt, dass „Broadway Joe“ zugestimmt hat, seine Anteile am Restaurant Bachelors III zu verkaufen und zu den New York Jets zu we
Lever du soleil. Ahhhhh! De magnifiques lucioles illuminées à cette époque. C'était lumineux
D'accord. Vous avez bien reçu « ACCEPT ». Voici le site d'atterrissage mis à jour: RESFMMAT. Nous main
Roger. Vérifiez la dérive à 
В удобное для вас время нам бы хотелось получить данные о количестве топлива в вашем служебном модуле. В этом полете
休斯顿，
了解しました、ジム。コマンドモジュールの起動開始まであと9分ほどです。ジャックのために言っておきたいのですが、バッテリーの状態は良好に見えますが、冷えていて最初は負荷のハッキングに少し苦労するかもしれません。起動手順中はメインバス電圧が24ボルト以上であることを確認し、もし下回っ
درجة حرارة صمام الماء في 
네, 알겠습니다. 작은 사고
아무래도 우리가 해야 할 일은... 지구인
Hör zu
Аврора Севен. Это Кано на УВЧ/ВЧ диапа
네, 감사합니다. 그리고 8750에 대한 질문에 답변드리자면, 그 숫자는 최소 시간 반환 옵션에 입력되는 값입니다. 이 값을 사용하면 인도양을 목표 지점으로 설정할 수 있습니다. 이 경우, 주축에 마이
Well, I better start maneuvering then; doggone it, I've been yawed out of plane somehow. Let's see, we
В данный момент я лечу в режиме с тремя ну
ठीक है। चलिए इसे दोहराते हैं। प्रतीक्षा कीजिए। कट आउट। हमारा रवैया वाकई अजीब है, इसलिए यह सीबी जी एंड एन हीटर, मेन बी
The CDR got 5 hours of fit
D'accord. C'est le sys
Хорошо. 
双子座 VI
Auf mein Zeichen hin wird G.m.t. 1
Okay. Wir haben wieder Strom. Di
Va ben
Houston, Acquario. Non posso... or
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कि मेरी एकम
Okay. I 
ठीक ह
글쎄, 우린 아직 시작도 안 했
And I don't have one yet, but I feel closer to having one now than I have had at any time. I think it's this darn 100 percent oxygen. I breathe it in and I don't think I've ever been this dry. With the worst cold I've ever had, where I can't breathe through my nose and I sound like I've got a big deep cold. I sound to myself like I'm very ... but I can now if I - I was when I was sleeping, too. But it was burning my nose, actually, when I was sleeping. I had a very h
로저, 휴
了解。こちらはフレンドシ
حسن
了解。重量、マイク：263
13, H
Roger. Kopie 4,4 für X und 2,4 für Z. Und negatives Resi
알겠습니다. E-11의 5단계에서 첫 번째 소제목은 헬멧과 장갑이고, 그 아래 항목들은 우주복 착용 여부에 따라 달라지지만 모두 완료해야 합니다
ठीक है। हम आपके अपशिष्ट जल टैंक को 25 प्रतिशत तक खाली करना चाहते हैं; ट्रैकिंग कारणों से हम इसे प्रक्रिया के मध्य से पहल
알겠습니다. 두 개를 건너뛰고, 그다음에는 연료 전지 3 메인 버스 A를 회
まだ着けていな
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 잔지바르 캡 콤입니다. 카나베랄에서 지금 시계를 바꾸라고 지시하라는 
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। इसने मास्टर अलार्म को तीन बार ट्रिगर कर दिया है। यह चौथी बार है
Роджер, 11. Принято. Рекомендую перейти сюда, предпочтительнее вариант 1, а затем перейти к настройке положения. Конец связи. Затем мы наладим связь. Когда вы перейдете к настройке положения, это будет тангаж 90, рыскание 0 на вы
燃料温度 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। अगर हम बीच 
이제 저배율로 가보겠습니다. 정정합니다. 잠망경으로 고배율 관측을 해 보겠습니다
I'm not sure the
로저. 여
حسنًا، لم أستطع حقًا وضع... لا مكان، ليس 
لا أعتقد ذلك يا جاك. هذا أمرٌ عندما تصل إلى تلك المرحلة، إذا حصلت على شيء آخر، سنكون على أهبة الاستعداد لنرى ما ستراه.
こちらフレンドシップ・セブンです。運用開始直後、ヨー方向のオリエンテーションモードに落ち込み、他の軸が外れてしまいました。しばらくこの状態が続き、ゆっくりと右にヨーイングし、20度ほど外れるまで
에드는 짐을 꺼내기 시작했고, 부스터를 더 이상 조작할 수 없는 지점에 이르자 저는 그를 전폭적으로 돕기 시작했습니다. 적어도 짐을 잡아주고, 다시 넣고, 사라지지 않도록 애썼죠. 우리가 서둘러 작업할수록 오히려 더 뒤처졌습니다. 짐을 제자리에 놓지 않아서가 아니라, 예상했던 것보다 훨씬 더 오래 걸렸기 때문입니다. 무중력 상태에서의 작업은 시뮬레이터에서보다 훨씬 더 어려웠습니다. 그렇게 우리는 빙 둘러가며 작업을 계속했습니다. 카나본에 도착했을 때쯤 저는 더 이상 갈 수 없다는 것을 깨달았지만, 조금만 더 버텨보기로 했습니다. 카나본에 도착했을 때, 아니, 출발 직전쯤에는 감압 과정을 통과할 수 없다는 것이 확실해졌습니다. 그래서 다음 궤도로 이동을 요청했습니다. 그리고 나서 우리는 약 20분 동안 숨을 고르며 조종실에 널려 있던 잡동사니들을 정리했습니다. 그다음 체크리스트를 꺼내서 급하게 하느라 빠뜨린 게 없는지 다시 한번 꼼꼼히 확인했습니다. 선외 활동을 시작했고, 카나본 상공에서 허가를 받았습니다. 모든 준비가 끝났고, 감압 시작 허가를 기다리고 있
Полагаю, это уже снизилось
وفي هذه المنطقة تحديداً، توجد فوهتان. الفوهة التي أمامي الآن وأنا أنظر من المركبة الفضائية، في موضع الساعة
Je ne crois pas qu'il y ait d'autre endroit que – ici même – où il soit question de séquences de 16 millim
J'ai ouvert la visière il y a peu pour prendre la pilule de xylose. Toute la nourriture que j'ai à bord s'est émiettée ou a fondu. Elle est inutilisable en l'état, donc je pense que la pilule de xylose sera mon dernier repas en apesanteur.
Роджер. Мы приближаемся к траектории захода на посадку. Это примерно за 13 минут до зажигания, и мы находимся примерно на 83 градусах
Roger, and could we have one more b
你可能会问……他们能否为拍摄航天器内部照片设定一些参数？我们有2
Ja, ich bin
Bien. (zone de récupération) 6-1 es
आप लोगों के सौदे वाकई बहुत बड़े ह
Les éléments dont nous avons encore besoin seront une lecture effectuée 
Sigma Seven Sigma Seven. Der Chirurg möchte wissen, ob Ihnen besonders he
Es geschah, als wir uns in der Agena-Raumschiff-Konstellation 0°, 180°, 0° befanden und dort stabilisiert waren. Die Lageregelung im Raumschiff und die Lageregelung des OAMS waren ausgeschaltet, und wir sendeten den Befehl 041 an Agena, um
Roger,
Eagle, Houston. Il nous a semblé, lors de vos manœuvr
Major Gagarin, Ihr Flug verlä
はい、今は必要あ
Ok, in fondo al controllo di ingresso, proprio lì dove siamo, la riga in basso ora dice "MODE a STANDBY". Bene, appen
Ok, vorrei mostrartelo mentre parlo. Funziona come una macchina fotografica. Ha il - Il controllo f-stop è proprio qui, e lo imposti su f:22 che, ovviamente, lascia entrare la minima quantità di luce, e questa è una precauzione di sicurezza. Ora, p
D'accord, Jack. Voici les informations: le disjoncteur limite le courant à 15 ampères. Le tube, le câble reliant les deux, est sous tension. Je peux surveiller la tension d
V
ヒューズ スイッチは、1 つのヒュー
了解。ドッキングしました。今のところ、高ゲインで捕捉できていると思いま
गस, 
D'accord, Fred. On ne l'a pas 
アポロ8
Dopo aver ridotto la velocità a un punto tale da ritenere di poterci sganciare in sicurezza, lo abbiamo fatto e ci siamo allontanati dall'Agena a diversi metri al secondo il più velocemente possibile. Avevamo visto la quantità di propellente scendere dal 50% a meno del 
Roger, sounds like a good idea. And on the ground tells us
D'accord. Nous la voyons comme une simple
मुझे डर था कि आप यही सवाल पूछेंगे। थोड़ा इंतज़ा
L'antenne est réglée sur RENTRAT
D'ac
Roger. Capire il permesso medico di tipo 1 pe
فوق أفريقيا الآن. التقطتُ للتو الصورة رقم 56 بكاميرا هاسيلبلاد. كانت معلمًا طو
وفي هذه المنطقة تحديداً، توجد فوهتان. الفوهة التي أمامي الآن وأنا أنظر من المركبة الفضائية، في موضع الساعة الحادية عشرة تقريباً، يبلغ قطرها حوالي 30 إلى 35 قدماً... وهناك العديد من الصخور والأحجار الكبيرة التي 
트랭퀼리티 기지, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 비행 계획 구성에서 16번 패널의 안정 제어 회로 차단기
了解。ワイドオートに高利得ア
Oh, Roger, Apollo 11. Nous vous avons mis en position positive et nous avons besoin de votre contribution. Cette manœuvre utilisera des propulseurs à -X à environ 60 à 90 cm par seconde, et nous avons une charge pour vous. Nous allons la transmettre dans un instant. Termin
Anch'io lo sono
알겠습니다. 프레드, 잠시 후에 질문에 답변드리겠습니다. 자, 절차는 다음과 같습니다. 1단계, 유도 제어(GUIDANCE CONTROL)에서 두 번째 
Ich sehe die beiden Sterne des Sternbilds Grus, die eine Linie bilden – genau in der M
11, 휴스턴. 이번엔 아주 분명하게
Apollo 11, Hous
ठी
Wir werden vers
Роджер. Ваш переключатель компьютера находится в 
好了，休斯顿。今天就到这里
هذا هو المفتاح الرئيسي أ
Roger. I haven't 
Apollo 8, Houston. Vous n'êtes pas obligé de partir; vous pouv
كل شيء على ما يرام. شكر
...إعا
Aurora Seven, Capitano C
좋아, 그녀는 정말 능숙하게 조종하고 있어. 연소실 압력이 100까지 서서히 올라가고 있
ب
アポロ8
阿波罗8号
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 카나본 기
Houston, Apoll
Houston, Apollo 1
ジェミニ4号、CSQ CAP COM。ペガサスを追跡中の場合は、ピッチ角を4
收到。我们对照图表检查了一遍，结果和你完全一样。看来你的解题步骤非常正确，思路也很清晰。你记得要取平均
Rog
了解。この写真がまた中心からずれていますね。もう一度修正して元に戻していただけます
Думаю, Базз, если ты переведешь регулятор усиления в ручной режим и выставишь тангаж 
حسنًا. حسنًا، لق
About as b
C'est exact, nous avons terminé. Nous vous communiquerons les données dans un instant. Nous avons réussi notre vérification d'étoile au sextant à l'at
こちらフ
حسنًا. عند بدء التشغيل، في السطر - أو الخطوة 2 - يظهر "وميض 3700، اضغط إدخال". سنستخدم هذه الخطوة يا جاك عندما تُشغّل الكمبيوتر مباشرةً، ويكون لديه متجه حالة يعود إلى ساعاتٍ مضت. لذا، نريد الضغط على زر الإدخال لإيقاف التكامل ومنعه من التوقف عن العمل. وعندما يُعطيك 
刚刚用哈苏相机拍到了第29张，记录了我们在北非和阿拉伯半岛的旅途。现在
프렌드십 세븐, 잔지바르 외과의사입니다. 운동 전 혈압은 136/80이었습니다. 운동 중 심전
Ж
E, 13, da Houston, per noi va bene se vuoi posticipare lo spurgo della cell
目标正好位于瞄准镜十字线的正上
ठीक है, जिम। आपकी किस्मत अच्छी है। ट्रैकिंग से पता चलता है कि आपका एंट्री एंगल माइनस 6.24 तक बढ़ गया है। यह मिडकोर्स से लेकर SHe टैंक के चलने तक के सभी डेटा के आधार पर है। इसलिए हम इस पर नज़र रखना जारी रखेंगे और देखेंगे कि SHe टैंक ने इस पर कोई असर डाला है या नहीं। तो डेटा 5.9 से बढ़कर म
Roger. I say again, the instructions that I just gave you should 
很好
Хорошо. Отвечая на ваш вопрос, Джо, нет. Я постоянно проверял каюту. Качественно, когда мы перешли на эту конфигурацию, не похоже, что частота или шум вентилятора скафандра ум
कोलंबिया, ये ह्यूस्टन है। हमारे पास आपके लिए एक 11 पैड है और पानी की निकासी के बारे
네, 맞습니다. 저게 바로 지도입니다. 각 접힌 부분에는 아래쪽(동쪽에서 서쪽으로 갈수록 오른쪽 위쪽) 모서리에 알파벳이 적혀 있고, 차트에는 D, E, F라고 표시되어 있습니다. 단독 비행 관련 정보는 모두 D와 E에 해당하며,
저희도 고양이 발자국 봉우리를 찾고 있었는데, 아마도 빅 V 너머, 사격 범위 아래쪽에 있을 거라고
Es ist wirklich üb
Jack, we're not certain when the best time is to implement this procedure, and what we want to do at this time is read it up to you, so you'll have it and understand i
We haven'
你想把它拿出来？
ठीक है। पेज के सबसे नीचे - ठीक है। आपके पास पहले से ही वह है
حسنًا. جهاز إرسال واستقبال التلف
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 첫 번째 통신 테스트를 시작하려고 합니다. 이번 테스트는 업링크 음성, 거리 측정, 그리고 다운링크 전체 테스트로, 기존에 탑재된 장비와 크게 다르지 않습니다. S밴드 일반 모드 음성 스위치가 음성 모드에 있는지 확인해
了解、カノ。こちらシグマ・セブン。はっき
Ok. È abbastanza facile. Vediamo che sei già stato chiamato lassù e quindi vogliamo che tu, in manovra e in ATTEGGIAMENTO, usi il. Vogliamo che, sulla palla del comandante, inclini a 267,5 e imbardi a meno 4,5. E quando lo fai
Okay. We are looking at a vacuum perigee right now of 23.6; flight path angle of minus 6.25; and if we decide we want to trim that up, we're looking at a midcourse of about 2 feet per second. Your consumables, of course, are getting better all the time; we've got 163 hours of water, 230 hours of oxygen, and 172 hours wor
صحيح تماما
Sinon, la transition d'un mode de contrôle à l'autre s'est faite s
Хорошо. На панели 250 замыкается автоматический выключатель BAT A, ВВОД/ПОСТУПАЮЩЕЕ ПИТАНИЕ; на панели 275 замыкается автоматический выключатель INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B. Далее на панели 5 находятся несколько автоматических выключателей: автоматический выключатель BAT RELAY BUS, BAT A, замыкается; автоматический выключатель SENSOR UNIT, AC BUS 2
انظر، ما هي زاوية الكاميرا التي كانت عليها تلك الكاميرا - على أرض الملعب - عندما بدأ ذ
没错，杰克。我接下来要做的是——我们会先让地球出现在指令舱的窗口里，然后我会调整飞船，让地球的亮面位于窗口顶部；也就是说，亮面会沿着飞船的Y轴（+Y轴）方向，而交会窗口的顶部，我应该正对着太阳。这意味着我会朝着太阳方向加速，
The R & R ca
Gemini VI, это Рус. Руководитель
双子座4号，CAP CO
Difficile fare s nel. Difficile fa
Apollo 8, Hous
حسنًا، لا بأس. ماذا عن 
フレッド、君はもうすぐここで寝
Cape Cap Co
Roger. Presuppone, però, che ci debba essere un 
ठीक है, डी-रिंग
अपोलो 8, जब तक हमें उच्च लाभ नहीं मिल जाता, मैं प्रक्षेप पथ का सारांश जारी रखूंगा। हम तेरहवें बिंदु से मध्य-प्रशांत रेखा पर वापस आ सकते हैं, और 138 सेकंड के बर्न के बाद आप अपने मार्ग पर होंगे। 138 सेकंड में आप बटरफ्लाई क्षेत्र से बाहर निकल जाएंगे। हम 20 सेकंड के बाद प्रीइग्निशन या रीस्टार्ट न करने की सलाह देते हैं। यदि आप 20 सेकंड से आगे जाते हैं, तो इससे प्रक्षेप पथ सुधार से परे हो सकता है - जिससे आपको बिना किसी सहायता के वापस लौटना पड़ सकता है। रिकवरी क्षेत्र में मौसम अच्छा है। हमारे पास एक फॉलोइंग है और एक विदाउट है। बर्न के दौरान, स्टोरेज टैंक में ईंधन की कमी और उसके सम्प टैंक में जाने के कारण आपको चैम्बर प्रेशर और टैंक प्रेशर में थोड़ा बदलाव दिखाई दे सकता है। यह बर्न शुरू होने के लगभग 2 से 5 सेकंड के बीच हो सकता है। दोनों सिस्टम में प्रेशर में मामूली बदलाव होगा। सिस्टम की जांच करने पर, सभी सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहे हैं। प्रक्षेप पथ के लिए, हम पान
休斯顿，哥伦比亚。请继
يا فريد، نحن نحقق نتائج أفضل قليلاً فيما يتعلق بالمياه مما كنا نتوقع. لقد صممنا حساباتنا على أساس استهلاك 3.5 رطل في ال
알겠습니다. 제 S밴드는 꺼놓을게요.
아폴로 13호,
يبدو أن المسافة أقصر بـ 11 أو 12 ميلاً يا جيم
是的，看起
Roger. Very good. And Flight also advised that they would like to have you give their reports like this to each site each 
자, 이제 제가 공
Esatto. Poi s
ロジャー、今は真空状態です。右のスーツは4度で安定していて、風通しも良好です。暑すぎるという感じではありません
حسنًا. قواعد الاحتراق. يجب إيقاف المحرك في الحالات التالية: 1- إذا كان مؤشر الدفع عند 77% أو أقل؛ 2- إذا كان ضغط الوقود أقل من 160 رطل/بوصة مربعة؛ 3- إذا كان فرق الضغط (ΔP) لمؤكسد الوقود أكبر من 25، وفي هذه الحالة يجب الاتصال بالأرض؛ 4- إذا كان خطأ الوضعية ±10 درجات باستثناء حالات بدء التشغيل العابرة. حسنًا. حدود معدل الدوران هي ±10 درجات في الثانية. يجب أن يضيء مؤشر ENGINE GIMBAL، ومؤشر ISS مع إنذار البرنامج، ومؤشر CES DC، ومؤشر العاكس، إذا كان لا يزال مضاءً بعد محاولة تبديل العواكس. إذا توقف المحرك أثناء الاحتراق عند وميض NOUN 97، فيجب علينا إجراء فحص يدوي للوقود، ثم الضغط على زر بدء التشغيل، ثم فتح أمر تجاوز محرك الهبوط. إذا لم نُجرِ مناورة PC-2، فستكون مناورتنا التالية عند PC-4 لزيادة السرعة بمقدار 24 قدمًا في الثانية. سنهبط في منتصف مسار PAC. حسنًا. سنحصل على أمر رفع احتياطي لمعدل السرعة، أو ما يُسمى بتخميد المعدل. والعودة الحرة التي نحن عليها الآن، إذا لم نُجرِ
바나나와 캥거루를 이용한 농담을 
حسنًا، يا أهل هيوستن. بناءً على 
ان
좋습니다. 태평양 한가운데 착륙 지점의
Okay – Das ist, nachdem die Position eingenommen wurde. Jim sagt: „Ich bin hier in der Mondbeobachtungsposition, ich nehme die von Ihnen vorgegebenen Winkel im Landeanflugp
Roger; 
알겠습니다. 이제 달을 떠났으니 좀 더 일상적인 일들을 이야기해 볼까요? 음식 분야에서 어떤 발전이 있었는지 간단히 살펴보겠습니다. 아마 이미 보셨겠지만, 음료수 용기도 있습니다. 잠시 후 마이크가 
Texas 
ジム、バッテリーをラインに戻す準備ができました。
フレッド、了解。LMPの赤いホースだけがキャニスターバッグに差し込まれていることを理解してください。その場合、もう一方の赤いホースをもう一方のキャニスターバッグに挿入する手順は次のとおりです。バッグの片隅に斜めの穴を開けます。もう一方のバッグを見て、どのように穴が開けられているかを確認してください。ホースを約15cmほど差し込みます。排出ノズルはできれば下向き、そうでなければ横向
حسنًا، لقد كنتَ متوترًا بعض الشيء
로저. 이해했어요. 당신은 - 
Apoll
D'accord, Mike. Prêt à partir. Maintenan
友谊七号。您的血压读数是126/90。您的生理检
ASA 64 흑백 필름의 노출값은 13입니다. 노출값을 13으로 설정하고 필터를 사용하여 7번 사진을 촬영합니다. 남미 대륙은 날씨 때문에 사진 촬영이 어렵습니다. 이 시점에서 파노라마 사진을 찍겠습니다. 거의 8시간이 걸립니다. 실제로 그럴 것입니다. MARKT, 7, 8, 9번 사진은 흑백 필름으로 촬영했습니다. 총 10장의 사진을 흑백 필름으로 촬영했습니다. 사진은 250 F5.6(1/250초, f5.6) 설정으로 무한대 초점에서 촬영했습니다. 11번 사진을 왼쪽에서 촬영합니다. 이 지점에서 남미 대륙을 가로지르고 있습니다. 큰 강이 보입니다. 카메라를 최대한 아래로 향하게 하여 사진을 찍습니다. 캡슐 창문이 아주 잘 나온 것 
Gut. 413020 183, Shaula, unten 064, links 06, plus 0747, minus 16410 12988 36301; nördliche Sternengruppe, Sirius und Rigel, Rollen 308, Nicken 209, Gieren 357. Anmerkungen: Hochgeschwindigkeitsverfahr
روجر، جهاز المسح الضوئي الخاص بك صحيح. أنا أشير إلى 36 درجة سالبة للتأكد من توافقه
Stand by on that. Aquarius, we recommend driving it around there manual
केबिन का गुंबद लगभग 57 डिग्री सेल्सियस है। केबिन का तापमान 90 डिग्री सेल्सियस है। सूट का इनलेट 
Okay. And selec
Je le crois, Ken. Cette bande est parallèle à la ligne M, et je pense que c'est lié à la conception de l'optique, notamment à l'entrée rectangulaire extérieure. À cet angle solaire précis, elle la traverse complètement. J'ai remarqué que la Terre et le Soleil produisent le même effet sur le télescope de balayage. Dans le sextant, la même bande lumineuse est présente, bien qu'elle couvre tout son champ de vision. Cependant, le grossissement permet de bien distinguer les étoiles, et il est possible de les marquer. Mais l'identification des étoiles avec le télescope de balayage est très difficile. J'ai constaté que l'optique est optimale dans les positions qui permettent d'observer les constellations du Grand Chien et d'Orion avec le télescope de balayage. Dans cette position particulière du vai
لقد كان الأمر صعباً حقاً يا مايك. فوق منطقة الهبوط المستهدفة، كانت المنطقة وعرة للغاية ومليئة بالحفر، وبها أعداد كبيرة من الصخور التي ربما كان بعضها، بل ال
로저. 플
روجر، بيل. أسمع صوتك ضعيفاً لكنه واضح. تفضل بإجر
收到。地标 ID，LM：T1，110 26 56；T2，110 
알겠습니다, 월리. 시작해 봅시다. (
Eagl
Bene, questo sarà il nostro controllo dati di base. Sarà un uplink vocale completo c
That's affirmative; and, since the gimbal was trimmed out at the big burn yesterday, we should be still through the c.g, and we'd like to make sure that Jack sits in the same place for this burn that he did yesterday. That way, we'll - you should have no trouble controlling attitude. Now I'm ready to go over to page
Tranquility Base, hier spricht Houston. Könnten wir Sie beide bitte für eine Minute vor die Kamera be
حسنًا، هل يمكنك قياس ضغط الدم مرة أخرى؟ 
Apollo 8
우리는 그들
알겠습니다. 
Bene. Eccoci qui. -2, /G&N: 63634; più 0,96, meno 0,23;; meno 0021,7, meno 0001,7, meno 0008,0; 080, 164,
Hallo Apollo 11. Hier spricht Houston. Wir zeigen Ihnen den Terminator bei 78° 53', in
了解。源圧は1950、源温度
11, this is Houston. At the time of your cyclic accumulator s
क्या आप इसे भी मे
阿波罗8
Roger. 02
简而言之，吉姆，我们预计不会有任何问
Хорошо, и никакого перекрестного 
Okay. Ich verstehe, dass du den Bu
Знаете, если вы ударите по этому контроллеру, как в симуляторе, с МИНИМАЛЬНОЙ СИЛОЙ ИМПУЛЬСА, просто ударьте, он ударится в одну сторону и в другую, и выпустит два противоположных импульса, а вы ничего не получите. В
さて、ここで一つ理解できなかった点があります。MDC 5のAでAC INVERTER、AC BUS 1、RESET、そしてセンターに切り替え、MDC 3に戻
Хорошо. Мы продолжим процедуру так, как если бы количество заряда
Nous 
Okay, 
ها
Понял. Я собираюсь увеличить значение регулятора охлаждающей жидкости на костюме до 7. Сейчас я в автоматическом режиме, гироскопы работают в обычном ре
Роджер. И, полагаю, отсюда следует, что ваш перигей сейчас тоже немного завышен; так что это вернет его — обратно вниз, то
روجر، لق
로저. 저는 지금 식사 중입니다. 셋째 날 두 번째 식사죠. 물은 여섯 모금 마셨습니다. 지난 5시간 
और साथ ही, हम अफ्रीका को भी देख सकते हैं। पश्चिम अफ्रीका बहुत सुंदर है। फ्लोरिडा को देखते हुए मुझे जिब्राल्
알았어, 잭. 잠깐만. 내가 A
Роджер, передай, пожалуйста, что мы видели огни Сиднея. Не знаю, включили они их или нет, но если включили, то счета за электричество сильно выросли. Я видел их на последнем витке. Мы пролетели пря
Die Kontrollleuchte für den Scanner leuchtet schon wiede
OK. L'échantillon de contingence
Alright. Star ID i
Я также думаю, что когда н
Apollo 8, Housto
Ниже зачеркните «Продолжить визуальные наблюдения» и «Прекратить наблюде
Также имейте в виду, что 
بالتأكيد. مثل الفتحات؟... إذا خص
了解。後部燃料計で、オー
А как насчет нескольки
Verseau, Houston. Nous avons une procédure pou
如果你准备好了，我想继续完成登记簿的
كيف تسمعني يا هيوستن
네, 맞습니다, 아폴로 8호입니다. 곧 몇 가지 더 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 현재 근접 비행을 준비 중이며, 육분의와 망원경으로 별을 관측하는 문제에 대해서도 좀 더 자세히 이야기 나눌 예정입니다. 블랙팀이 MOKR에 합류하는 대로, 두 팀이 있는 동안 여러분께서 관측하신 내용과 관측되지 않은 내용, 그리고 어떤 조건에서 관측하셨는지 다시 한번 자세히 알려주시면 좋겠습니다. 이를 통해 모든 사람이 여러분의 의견을 이해할 수 있도록 정리할 수 있을 것입니다. 또한, 추진체 발사 전에 일정이 어긋났던 점을 감안할 때, 일정을 다시 맞추
حسنًا. يمكنك البدء برفع ضغط دم الطيار، واترك مقياس الحرارة في فمك. لا 
Tutti i 12 ferm
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地から昨夜の地質学に関する質問についてコメントをいただきます。私たちは、比較的滑らかなクレーター地帯に着陸しました。そこには細長い二次クレーター、つまり円形の二次クレーターが点在しており、そのほとんどには、大きさに関わらず、隆起した縁があります。これは必ずしも全てがそうではありません。周囲には、はっきりと縁が見えない小さなクレーターもいくつかあります。この地域全体の基質は、非常に細かい砂からシルトまでです。地球上でこれに最も近いのは、粉末状の黒鉛でしょう。この基質には、丸みを帯びたものや角張ったものなど、様々な形、大きさ、質感の岩石が埋まっており、多くの岩石の硬さは様々です。先ほども申し上げたように、私は単純な玄武岩や気泡玄武岩のようなものを見ました。結晶のないものや、小さな白い斑晶が1%から5%未満含まれているものもありました。そして、岩についてですが、私たちは岩場の中にいます。ここでは岩の大きさは大体2フィート（約60cm）ほどですが、それより大きいものもいくつかあります。岩の中には地表に出ているものもあれば、部分的に露出しているもの、あるいはかろうじて露出しているものもあります。地表を横切ってスコップで作業し
아폴로 8호, 고이득을 기다리는 동안 궤적 요약을 계속하겠습니다. 13번째 지점에서 태평양 중부선으로 복귀할 수 있으며, 연소 후 138초가 지나면 귀환이 시작됩니다. 138초면 버터플라이 영역을 벗어나게 됩니다. 20초 이후에는 조기점화나 재시동을 시도하지 않는 것이 좋습니다. 20초를 넘기면 궤적이 수정 범위를 벗어나 자유 귀환으로 이어질 수 있습니다. 귀환 지역의 날씨는 양호합니다. 추적 및 미추진이 가능합니다. 연소 중에는 저장 탱크와 섬프 탱크의 연료 소모로 인해 연소실 압력과 탱크 압력에 약간의 변화가 있을 수 있습니다. 이는 연소 시작 후 2~5초 사이에 발생할 수 있습니다. 두 시스템 모두 압력 변화가 미미할 것입니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동합니다. 연소 후에는 궤적 유지를 위해 물 끓임을 방지해야 합니다. 물 배출 상
当我们把推进速率降到我们认为可以安全脱离的程度后，我们便脱离了对
Так
좋습니다. 이제 우리가 '달 점검'이라고 부르는 것을 해보겠습니다. 자세한 설
11, Housto
罗杰，你是想让我们用高氧速率建造
Okay. Unser nächster Test wird ein Test der U
여러분, 곧 이스터 에그를 공
Laggiù a destra. Credo che sia 
بصو
11번, 휴스턴. 현재 예보에 따르면 복구 지역의 기상 조건은 양호합니다. 고도 2000피트, 산발적 강풍, 풍향 70도, 풍속 13노트, 시야 10마일, 파고 약 4피트입니다. 어제 예보에서는 열대성 폭풍 클라우디아가 하와이 동쪽 500~1000마일 해상에 있다고 했습니다. 어제 오후 지구 위성 사진에서 클라우디아가 소멸하는 모습이 확인되어 이전보다 영향이 더욱 줄어든 것으로 보입니다. 현재 복구 지역은 열대 수렴대 바로 북쪽에 위치해 있으며, 창밖으로 보시면 열대 수렴대를 보실 수 있을 겁니다. 어제 서쪽으로는 열대성 폭풍 비올라가 발생했다는 보고도 있었습니다. 현재 비올라는 필리
З
ठीक है। ये छोटे-छोटे टुकड़े केबिन में 
حسناً. تم إنها
Friendship Seven, Friend
Хорошо. На панели 3: первые три шага мы выполнили: MODE, VOICE, to
ठीक है। प्रव
Okay. Wir machen ein Foto davon. Houston, wie lange könnten wir Ihrer Einschätzung nach
49-DELTA 55 avan
بقي لدينا 20 دقيقة حتى بدء المباراة. أوه، عفواً، 10 دقائق - 10 
Roger, 11 anni. Ora ti sentiamo forte e chiaro. Eravamo immersi nel rumore mentre c
Ja. Wir haben uns für einen Kanister entschieden, und Sie wissen ja, dass das flüssigkeitsgekühlte Kleidungsstück einen Beutel hat, den wir vermutlich auch verwenden können – oder zumindest wissen, dass wir ihn verwenden können. Wir haben es ausprobiert. Es ist also quasi ein Beutel im Beutel, und darin befindet sich das flüssigkeitsgekühlte Kleidungsstück. Der Beutel, der dem Kleidungsstück am nächsten ist, ist der, 
Très bien, Vance; nous avons terminé cette procédure, et ten
Roger. I
Das stimmt. Als ich das Problem zum ersten Mal hatte, funktionierte es bei niedrigem Gierwinkel nach links nicht richtig, jetzt funktioniert dieser einwandfrei, aber der
友谊七号，我是卡诺。格林尼治标准时间15:53:02。我（卡诺）没
Roger. Altitude de l'apogé
Хорошо, Джек. Шаг 2, с
يا له من منظر! يا إلهي. يمكنك رؤية السماء السوداء في الأعلى
हाँ, ब्रूस, यह बात कुछ हद तक सही है। हमारे पास ये दो हाइड्रोजन फिल्टर हैं, जो तब तक ठीक काम करते हैं जब तक आप उन्हें किसी खाने के थैले से नहीं जोड़ते। लेकिन खाने के थैले में प्रवेश द्वार से इतना बैक प्रेशर बनता है कि फिल्टर की कार्यक्षमता कम होने लगती है। कुछ बार तो मेरा मन हुआ कि मैं उन्हें सुखा दूँ, ले
Ja, das t
收到，阿
This is Sigma Seven on VOX record only. I have reestablished auto mode in normal with no high thruster action. At this point I have 85 percent auto, 90 percent manual. And I feel, now that I am on, I can do some experiments where before I was not able to. I will now pitch the capsule down on fly-by-wire low. First I will check to see - if I turn on my beacons, nobody down here can get to me on those. At - if anybody has a beacon in South America they deserve to hear it. Beacons are o
حسنًا يا جاك. ما يطلبونه منك فعله بعد 49 ساعة هو ملاحظة ت
はい。ジャック、まだ作業中です。この手順を最後までお引き受けしたいので、高ビットレートで作業を進めます。ご質問への回答ですが、万が一問題が発生した場合は、この手順をすぐに元に戻すために、124 POWERスイッチにはRESETポジションがあるので、絶対に触れないようにしてください。元に戻すには、パネル5の回路ブレーカーを2つ開けてください。最初にお読みしたブレーカーのうちの2つです。POWER-1 
로저, 저희는 에 안테나를 다시 교체할 예정입니
Гавайи, Хьюстонская сеть, конференция GOSS. Ва
R
D'accord. Je vais vous faire un bref résumé des systèmes. Globalement, tous les systèmes sont opérationnels. Concernant votre trajectoire de retour, nous pouvons encore atteindre la ligne médiane du Pacifique en attendant jusqu'au treizi
Okay. Moving your c
알겠습니다. 파워업 시간을 원하시는 거죠? 맞나요
알겠습니다. 추적은 잘 되고 있는지 궁
わか
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ちょうどアンテナの合間にいます。メッセージを5分ほどお待
No instructions from Korolyov, f
١١، هذه هيوستن. نحصل الآن على صورة جيدة لباز، لكن لا يوجد تعديل للصوت. هل يمكنك فتح فتحة عدسة الكاميرا التلفزيونية على الرقم ٢٢ م
Beh, abbiamo l'OAMS retrò di qualcuno. Non so più di chi
أشعر فعلاً أنني أبرد. درجة حرارة مدخل البدلة الآن حوالي 75 إلى 76 درجة، لذا 
Perth und Rockingham
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 그때는 아무 말도 하지 않았습니다. 지금 몇 가지 사항을 검토하고 있습니다. 앞서 수면 주기 조정에 대한 질문을 하셨는데, 저희는 그 의견에 동의합니다. 달 궤도에 진입할 때쯤에는 수면 주기 등을 고려한 비행 계획을 다시 세우고 싶습니다. 따라서 수면 주기를 가장 효율적으로 조정하고 각자 배분하는 방법을 스스로 판단해 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 누가 무엇을 할지, 계획은 어떻게 되는지 계속 알려주시기 바랍니다. 2시간 늦어진 수면 시간이 있습니다. 다른 수면 시간도 맞춰야 합니다. 만약 다른 수면 시간과 겹친다면 조정할 수 있습
حسنًا يا جو، أنا جاهز لنسخ إجراء تشغيل وحدة التحكم من الجهاز، متى ما أردتَ إعطائي إياه. متى، أظن أنك تريد
Roger。复制 Ech
わかりました。星2のトラニオンアングル、最初のものは05245、2番目は05243、その次は05241、最後の4つのトラニオンアングルは04133、041
रॉजर। मैंने आपकी बात लगभग चार ग
रॉजर। रॉजर, फ्रैंक। अ
यह सही है। हम बिजली को सामान्य स्थिति में 
Right. We're doing that to keep our power profile where we want it. And then we're going to be turning it back on sometime prior to entry. And the time to turn it on in entry, of course, isn't specified because as you turn it on, the v
D'accord, Jack. Cette procédure n'a pas été testée telle qu
Lediglich die jüngsten Merkmale sind noch einigermaßen deutlich erkennbar, und schließlich werden auch diese durch den ständigen Einschlag kleiner Meteoriten abget
Friendship Seven
Roger
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Все ваши системы работают
Ok, Gemini VI. Vuoi mettere l'interrutto
ठीक है, यह कुछ हद तक काम कर रहा है; बस दिक्कत यह है कि जब मैं इसे लेता
Es ist ziemlich schwierig hier, Jack, in der Schwerelosigkeit in eine Hängematte zu kommen. Ich bin mir nicht sicher, ob ich immer weiter 
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. إذا رأيتموها، فستكون قادمة - أو تبدو كذلك - من خلال الغيوم. أفاد ماكدونالد بوجود ثغرة في الغيوم 
Roger. 104. 2+15. GMTRC 01 Tage, 00 Stunden, 52 Minuten, 14 Sekunden. 13+48. Und es ist 
D'accord, à -19, nous revenons à la liste de 
逆順表示が表示されている
Roger, Hou
ठीक है। जैक
Sì, è acceso. Il trasmettitore è ora 
أبولو
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 무체아 콤 테크입니다. 프렌드십 세
Неплохое приобретение, пр
제미니 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다.
Roger. Tiens-toi à côté de quelqu'un, B
Roger. Wir haben eine Nachricht für Sie. Man möchte versuchen, Sie über Hawaii mithilfe der Relaisflugzeuge zu kontaktieren. Könnten Sie daher bitte vor der Erfassung von Hawaii au
우리는 다음 혁명이 일어나 수면 기간이 끝날 때까지 최대한 대화 내
ठीक है, जिम। ईंधन बचाने के लिए, हम चाहेंगे कि आप इसे न्यूनतम गति पर सेट करें, वैसे
До этого ты б
Ora ho il diaframma completamente aperto, Vance; quello che stai guardando è il 
Siamo nel processo, o come diciamo nel, siamo nel lavor
Okay, Jack. I'd like to pass you a switch configuration on the CRYO O2 TANKS and give you the reason. Right now, we'd like you to go
더 많은 기
Okay. I've been not reading any voltage at all on BAT C, and the amperage looks like about 2 amps, but that coul
Роджер, Хьюстон. Единственная проблема в том, что Солнце находится в пятом, закрытом конусе. И, похоже, оно также находится достаточно близко к шестому фиксатору, чтобы светить на 
わかった、わかった。GMT11にアメリカに来るから、天気写真を撮ってほしいらしい。北の方に雷雨がある
좋습니다, 아쿠아리우스. 이 제어 모드는 해제하겠습니다. 기체를 원래 자세로 되돌려 주시고,
了解
Roger. Ricevuto. Sem
A
Are you going to do your 
, Canary. Request you place your radiator swi
ठीक है। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। यह चीज़ ओरिएंटेशन मोड में बार-बार आ-जा रही है और इस समय ईंधन बर्बाद कर रही है। मैं इसे मैन्युअल रूप से ऑर्बिट एटीट्यूड पर 
نودّ إجراء اختبارين إضافيين، والإجماع العام هو أنه لا توجد مشكلة محددة. نودّ أن نلقي نظرة على نتائج إجراء أربعة أو خمسة اختبارات أخرى. وقبل ذلك، نودّ إجراء أحد اختبارات التحيز الصفري؛ وبما أنه لا توجد لدينا أي وسيلة
روجر. 
Columbia, Houston. Votre sympathique équipe blanche sera à l'antenne jusqu'à votre retour à la maison. Nous tenons à fél
Roger. 2 manœuvres, /: 46728, moins 053, plus 121 plus 28466 moins 00352. Je n'ai pas obtenu le 502406 pour un Z. 180 022 002, non applicable, plus 00188 28570 250 28401 42 0641 296, non
휴
Roger. We are talking over several things, you know, like putting the ten-pin valve to MANUAL or partially closing it or some of these different ideas, and something you can think about while you are laying there with no
А теперь мы ненадолго выключим наш телевизионный монитор, пока нам
Okay, du si
Okay. That's correct. On panel 5: circuit breaker BAT CHARGE, 
हाँ। मैं सहमत हूँ। लेकिन हमने यह तय किया कि अगर इसमें कोई गड़बड़ी हो जाए, तो हम इसे अच्छी हालत में ही उतारना चाहते हैं। और मै
ठीक
Gémeau
रोग,
Хорошо. Теперь мы уверены, что этот режим достаточно хорош, чтобы мы не
روجر. لقد حص
こんにちは
Très bien. Je répète: d'accord. Ce n'était pas une alarme, c'était un code. D
Okay. Ich schaue aus Freds Fenster. Ich sehe da draußen vie
알았어. 내가 굴러떨어졌는데 지금 오른쪽으로 굴러가고 있어. 내 의지대로 말이야. 저기 뭐 하나... 짐, 방한 장갑 같아 보이네
分かりました。これがレート減衰の全手順です。ただし、ステップ2だけを伝えましたが、これが全手順です。さて、29ページの印刷内容についてですが、訂正です。「姿勢制御」のリードバックに誤りが1つありました。「ピッチとロール」を「パルス」に、「ヨー」を「ダイレクト」に修正していました。続きまして、29ページの印刷された手順ですが、最初の4行は削除。ステップ3も削除。「アクティベーション」の下にステップを追加します。最初のステップは「ASA CB(16)が10分間接続されていることを確認する
Der Wiedereintritt verläuft recht gut. Die Hilfsdämpfung scheint die Schwingungen gut zu kontrollieren. Wir befinden uns jetzt bei 1
هذا صحيح. لم أتمكن حتى من ال
阿波罗8号，这里是休
يا تشارلي، علينا التقاط المزيد من الصور. هل هناك أي قيود، ع
D'accord. Voici les attitudes pour la manœuvre: lacet 060 d
那可是地势崎岖的地方
Roger, Checkliste für den Wiedereintritt abgeschlossen. Bere
Okay. Nach PC + 2 gibt es keine Trimmvorgaben mehr. Sollte es während PC + 2 zu einem Triebwerksausfall kommen, sind nachfolgende Mittelkursmanöver erforderlich – das frühestmögliche wäre PC + 4. Falls Sie kein PC + 2 dur
Nur zu, Houston, Ge
Dann wirst du – Du wirst nach dieser Schicht viel Spaß
Right. I think that the second derivative of the water boiler versus time p
روجر، سيجما 7. فهم
Roger. Weiter geht es mit dem Maroon Bugl
Goldstone est-elle la seule station à bénéficier de 
थोड़ा इंतज़ार कीजिए। मैं इसकी जाँच कर
अरे, तुम्हारा मतल
Да, мы готовы включить усилитель мощно
Roger. Non avrei potuto
Ok, di nuovo, guardando attraverso il telescopio, non sono assolutamente in grado di dire se è Nunki, ma ce l'ho nel sestante, quindi prendiamo
分かりました。74時間後
Okay. Gra
क्या इस समय आपके पा
저기, 벨크로 말인데요, 그 주변에 있는 벨크로
好的，S 波段天线 OMNI 开关拨到 Bravo 位置（你现在的位置），S 波段天线 OMNI 拨到 OMNI 位置，高增益轨道拨到 MANUAL 位置，俯仰角和偏航角为 -50，俯仰角
Okay. And in panel 3, I've got a switch f
제미니 4호, 여기는
Dennoch dasselbe: Das Ziel ist extrem hell, und es ist sehr schwierig zu erkennen, was 
ロジャー、新しい座標は
좋아요. 잭, 100% 맞습니다. 2페이지로 넘어가죠. 알파 Pc에서 Pc로, 그리고 발사체/지표에서 GPI로 시작합니다.
명령 모듈을 사용하려면 어떻게 
Хорошо. Я думала, мы получи
Affermativo. Hai interrotto la discussione per un minuto, Jim. Lo faremo sulla palla partendo dall'assetto di partenza. Vogliamo solo che tu ruoti
अच्छा, ठीक है; धन
네. 지금 화면 오른쪽에는 세 개의 크레이터가 나란히 있는데, 첫 번째와 두 번째 크레이터 사이에 작은 크레이터가 하나 있습니다. 그리고 화면 아래쪽에 있는 크레이터가 슈베르트 Y입니다. 확
Roge
यह प
ठीक है, मेरे पास 35 घंटे से अधिक का अप
嘿，老鹰。休斯顿的信号清晰响亮。哥伦比亚的信号很弱
Yes, I'm sorry, put those OFF. OAMS Power Attitude Thrusters are both good. A is reading 3000. B is reading about 2700. The temperatures are a little over 60 in each one. About 70 in 
Ich habe ein Rollprog
Хорошо, ладно. Я готов начать процедуру. Когда будете отвечать, говорите громче — говорите громче в микрофон, потому что наш канал связи довольно шумный. Первое, что мы хотим, чтобы вы сделали, и мы сделаем это на одном контейнере, а затем повторим на втором. Итак, возьмите один из контейнеров и отрежьте внешний пакет. Делайте это аккуратно и близко к шву, потому что нам может понадобиться использовать внешний пакет, если мы повредим внутренний. Т
ये चट्टानें बेसाल्ट जैसी दिखती हैं, और इनमें शायद 2 प्रतिशत सफेद खनिज, यानी सफेद क्रिस्टल मौजूद हैं। और जिस चीज़ को मैंने पहले छिद
This is Friendship Seven. Coming across the Gulf of Lower California at present time in the scope
Okay. Wir befinden uns in der von Ihnen genannten Position, daher haben wir die Drehun
حسنًا يا هيوستن، بالنسبة للأرقام: CDR هو 0.07، CMP هو 0.64، LMP هو 0.80. لاحظ أن أرقام C
嗯，我们或许需要它。不过，我想我们明天就能看到它了。我
Sie hatten den Schalter unten - innen... automatisch
Он, разумеется, исчезает в туннеле, как если бы он входи
यह नकारात्मक है। मैंने इसे नहीं खोला। जब तक मैं ये रीडिंग पूरी नहीं कर लेता, तब तक मैं इसे नहीं खोलूंगा। फेक्डा अब मध्य में 1.7 पर विलुप्त हो रहा है, धुंध की परत और पृथ्वी के बीच मध्य स्थिति में। ठीक है, वूमेरा, मेरी स्थिति बहुत अच्छी है। सूट का तापमान काफी कम हो रहा है। स्टीम वेंट का तापमान ज्यादा कम नहीं हुआ है, लेकिन सूट का वातावरण तापमान 60 डिग्री है। मैं काफी आरामदायक महसूस कर रहा हूं। केबिन का तापमान 101 डिग्री है; केबिन का तापमान 4.8 पर स्थिर है; ऑक्सीजन 75-100 प्रतिशत है, सभी डीसी पावर ठीक है, 20 एम्प्स; दोन
और, माइक, हमें लगता है कि ये बड़े
아니요, 심전도 신호가 끊겼습니다. 센서를 눌러보시면 될 것 같습니다. 네, 외과의사 선생님께서 심전도 신호가 다시 들어온다고 알려주셨습니다. 다른 
Apollo 13, Houston. Le transfert aura lieu dans une trentaine de secondes. Vous pourrie
Oben? Die Kilome
はい。飲料水タンクにはもう水が入っていないと承知しておりますが、そのタンクから水を袋に入れておられたと承知しておりまして、袋が残っているかどうかお伺いしたいのですが
是的。电池指示灯
Roger, reading you loud and clear. How are you
Capisco la tecnica, Jack. Non vediamo l'ora di avere il tempo di aumentare
Okay, you got 
Comment je fais pour contourner ça? J'
ठीक है, 13; ह्यूस्टन। 
C'est exact. Tout le monde est très satisfai
Ok, va bene. Ora probabilmente ci sono un paio di centimetri di sacchetto in eccesso che spuntano dal fondo del contenitore. Per evitare che si attacchi al filtro inferiore, ti consigliamo di tagliarlo con le forbici e, una volta fatto, di tagliare altre due strisce di nastro adesivo lunghe circa 30 cm, di tagliarle e strapparle nel senso della lunghezza per ottenere qua
I don
Роджер. К вашему сведению, лазер 
Roger. 
روجر، أفهم أنه لا يوجد دافع يمين منخف
Apollo 8, en attendant le gain maximal, je vais poursuivre le résumé de la trajectoire. Nous pouvons encore rejoindre la ligne du Pacifique central à partir du treizième point, et vous êtes en route après 138 secondes de combustion. Ces 138 secondes vous permettent de sortir de la zone de correction. Nous recommandons de ne pas tenter de pré-allumage ni de redémarrage après 20 secondes. Au-delà de 20 secondes, la trajectoire pourrait dépasser la capacité de correction pour un retour libre. Les conditions météorologiques dans la zone de récupération sont bonnes. Nous avons un suivi et un sans. Pendant la combustion, vous pourriez remarquer une légère variation de pression dans la chambre et les réservoirs en raison de l'épuisement du carburant dans le réservoir de stockage et de son transfert vers le réservoir de décantation. Cela pourrait se produire entre 2 et 5 secondes après le début de la combustion. Il s'agira d'une légère variation de pression dans les deux systèmes. Concernant les systèmes, tous sont opérationnels. Nous voulons empêcher l'ébullition de l'eau après pour des raisons de trajectoire. Votre situation de vidange d'eau semble correcte; vous devriez être en bonne voie pour plus de. Nous allons essayer de retarder la vidange d'eau jusqu'après 5 heures. Ensuite, nous aimerions remuer les cryos avant la correction. La prochaine purge des piles à combustible aura lieu vers 17 h et concernera à la fois la batterie à hydrogène A (34,9), la batterie B (39,1) et le réservoir Charlie (38,5). Nous disposons de la capacité de cryogénisation à r
分かりました。それほど心配
ठीक है। शायद इससे हमें थोड़ा और आत्मविश्वास मिलेगा कि 
Gem
मिथुन र
ठीक है, मैं फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो सेटिंग पर रात में अपना यॉ चेक करना चा
了解しました。
حسنًا، انتظر. سأضع هذا القلم جانبًا. أنا في وضعية الشمبانزي. الكبسولة تطير بشكل ممتاز. جميع المحركات تعمل بشكل جيد. مفتاح الجيروسكوب طبيعي. مفتاح المناورة مُطفأ. جميع الأنظمة تعمل بشكل سليم؛ وأراقب درجة حرارة القبة في د
Bene. E queste sono t
Итак, верн
잠시
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 첫 번째 테스트를 마쳤고, 이제 업링크 모드를 '업링크 명령 및 범위 설정(UPLINK COMMAND AND RANGING)'으로 변경하고 음성 변조는 사용하지 않겠습니다. 이 모드에서 2분 30초 동안 테스트 메시지를 전송할 예정입니다. 컴퓨터나 패널 스위치 설정에는 아무런 영향을 미치지 않습니다. 브레이크 록과 관련된 S-밴드 노이즈가 표시될 수 있지만, 전력계에는 여전히 양호한 신호가 표시될 것입니다. 이는 신호 손실이 아니라 음성 변조가 일시적으로 중단된 것이므로, 원하시면 S-밴드 볼륨을 낮추실 수 있도록 미리 표시
Okay. An der Hausseite befindet sich Verteilerkasten 16. CB-Batteriezuleitungen, zwei, offen; Batterie 1, Hochspannung, Aus/R
Aquarius, Houston. Per quanto riguarda le bombole di CO2, a proposito, la PCO2 è a 1,6 qui sotto. Prevediamo di poter ottenere altre 6 ore dalle due bombole che abbiamo lì - almeno 6 ore. Tuttavia, a 112 ore, quando avremo diverse persone in volo, ne prepareremo altre due e avremo la nuova pr
Ottimo affare. Continua a lavorare, h
Родж
रॉजर, जिम। मेरे पास एक छोटी सी प्रक्रिया है जिसे मैं आपको पढ़कर सुनाना चाहता हूँ और समझाना चाहता हूँ कि यह क्या है। आपकी W-मैट्रिक्स कुछ मेमोरी लोकेशन साझा करती है; इसलिए, आपके पास जो W-मैट्रिक्स है वह ठीक नहीं 
Oh, about how long we got before we're going to have to go to work here, Vance. Kind of lik
مر
还有
ह्यूस्टन, यह ईगल में अपोलो एलएम है - ईगल में अपोलो 11, और मुझे पूरे लैंडिंग क्षेत्र का एक सुंदर दृश्य 
D'accord. Ça y est, Columbia. On va vous occuper un peu. Dès que nous aurons reçu le vecteur d'état, nous aimerions que vous procédiez à l'option 3 pour ce passage de nuit. Ensuite, une fois de l'autre côté, nous vous donnerons des informations de suivi de points de 
了解
Roger. Je serai bientôt injoignable. Je pensais que si l'autre appel était arrivé, j'annu
저기, TD&E 연료에 대해 다시 한번 말씀해 주시겠어요? 저희가 들
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. تم 
收到。看到什么就
И, Водолей; Хьюстон. Принят
罗杰，巴兹
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。151時にマドリードからゴールドストーンへ引き継ぎます。この時点で高ゲインのロックが外れた場合は、ピッチマイナス45度、ヨー270度が必要となる可能性があります。ブ
吉姆，我们下一步要做的事情是给指挥舱主控模块B供电，这样我们就可以开始给电池充电了。我想我们应该等其他人起来帮你的时候再开始。所以，当你决定叫其他人起来或者找人帮忙的时候，告诉我们，我们就开始着手处理这件事
로저. 콜럼비아호에 거주하시는 여러분께 알려드립니다. 오늘은 콜롬비아 독립기념일입니다. 어젯밤에는 필리핀의 글로리아 디아즈가 미스 유니버스에 선정되었습니다. 그녀는 60명의 경쟁자를 제치고 세계 최고의 미인으로 등극했습니다. 디아즈는 18세이며, 검은 머리와 눈을 가지고 있고, 신체 사이즈는 34.5인치(약 87cm)에 허리 23인치(약 61cm), 엉덩이 34.5인치(약 89cm)입니다. 2위는 호주, 3위는 이스라엘, 4위는 일본이 차지했습니다. 화요일 밤에 돌아오시는 길에 워싱턴에서 아메리칸 리그와 내셔널 리그 올스타전이 열립니다. 뉴욕 양키스의 멜 스토틀마이어가 아메리칸 리그의 선발 투수로 유력합니다. 내셔널 리그 선발 투수는 아직 정해지지 않았습니다. 현재 9명의 선발 투수가 명단에 올라 있습니다. 우주 프로그램의 연구는 분명히 큰 성과를 거두었지만, 연구가 항상 결실을 맺는 것은 아닌 것 같습니다. 10억 개 이상의 나무 스프링 쥐덫을 생산해 온 애니멀 트랩 컴퍼니 오브 아메리카의 모회사인 우드스트림 코퍼레이션은 더 나은 쥐덫을 만들었지만 세상은 그 덫에 관
在1
了解。ちょうどレコーダーに録音してい
Хоро
Bien reçu. Nous avons vérifié le vaisseau spatial et le système de guidage du lanceur. Tout semble en bon état. Nous estimons à plus de 99 % la probabilité d'une coupure du guidage du lanceur; la situation semble donc très stable. Pour information, nous avons reçu environ une minute d'image TV exploitable, le
밤이 깊어질수록 다른 별들도 하나둘씩 모습을 드러내고
今のところコントロールは
Держу пари, это оно. Держу пари, это солнце в
Okay. Noch eine
Houston, we're recordin
What does it say in the Fl
Хорошо. И ещё, Джек, из этого списка нам нужно установить параметр THROTTLE у КОМАНДИРА в положен
好的，杰克。从上开始。好的。低温储罐；H2 1 和 H2 的读数都是 230。我们的 O2 低温储罐 1 看起来勉强维持在 300。低温储罐 2 的 H2 1 读数是 73，H2 2 是 74。在 O2 方面，我们读取到 O2 1 的量为 76；O2 的读数已达到满量程高位。辐射温度：主入口温度约为 55；辐射出口温度约为 30；次级出口温度为 52 度。蒸发出口温度为 45，蒸汽压力为 0.17，乙二醇排​​放压力为
Apollo 8, Houston. If you don't need the computer, we would like to have yo
엄청
fuel temperature — 68. A temperature — Gee! A temperature is 87
この中間コースを実施しないと、ペリシントスにどのよ
E Houston, potresti farci sapere se c'è la possibilità che l'orario di inizio venga posticipato ulteriormente, perché in un certo senso manterremo quell'orario di inizio. E se dovessi 
Su
Wir werden den am stärksten ausgerichteten Bahnsteig der Wel
روجر، بيل. شكرًا لكما، هل يمكنكما تزويدنا بالقراءة متى ما سنحت لكما الفرصة؟ وبالنسبة للقراءة، فهذا مناسب تمامًا للبدء. يبدو أن نجمكما
我知
视野中现在可以看到三个水平方向的陨石坑，它们就在地面轨道的正下方。最右边的那个是最大的陨石坑，名为杜比
Сейчас я переключаю
Ok. Sono stato interrotto per un minuto. Bob Hope è di nuovo in Vietnam con le sue truppe, e come al solito sta facendo un ottimo lavoro. Un piccolo nome nella notizia qui è della USS New Jersey. Bob Hope ha scherzato ieri – o mercoledì – dall'alto di un'enorme torretta per deliziare i 1500 uomini a bordo della corazzata New Jersey, in occasione del suo ventesimo Natale, intrattenendo le truppe
Очень хор
Roger. This is the Pilot. About 3 hours ago, I had Meal 2, day 2. I had about 4 or 5
أعرف ذلك. لقد أخطأ جي
Хорошо. Мы хотим, чтобы вы закрыли CB(16) ABORT STAGE. Кон
罗杰。2
ठीक है, मैं वापस जाकर 35-डेल्टा की जाँच करना चाहता हूँ। जीएमटीआरसी 21 07 34 होना चाहिए, और अगली संख्या 11+30 है। क्या आपने इसे कॉपी किया
تفضل، 1
How do y
좋습니다, 아폴로 8호. 이제 통신 점검을 시작할 준비가 됐습니다. 선택은 당신에게 달려 있습니다. 저희가 스위치를 불러서 직접 조작하시도록 할 수도 있고, 지상에서 명령을 내릴 수도 있습
What do you want in the way of a
Это – 
Аполлон-13, Хьюсто
15, 16 और 17 तारीख को होने वाले कुछ उत्तरी रोशनी जैसे प्रभाव के साथ रात के
A poppa DE
... यह प
로저, 닐. 감사합니다. 북반구의 명암 경계선 바로 왼쪽에 북서쪽/남동쪽으로 뻗어 있는 구름 띠, 즉 구
حسناً. إنها في الحقيقة حوالي 4 ساعات ي
Thr
Roger. Copy 39.
... Sterne hier draußen im Moment... zu hoch, um si
Roger. Verstanden, Buzz. Wir haben ein paar Änderungen an deiner Checkliste für die Oberfläche vorgenommen. Im Allgemeinen möchten wir, dass du das Kommandomodul für einen letzten Positionscheck verfolgst. Das wäre – mit anderen Worten – P57. Danach kannst du mit der Checkliste weitermachen. Die restlichen Punkte sind nur ein paar kleinere Änderungen. Die wichtigste ist, dass wir das Rendezvous-Radar währen
吉姆，确认无误。我们正在密切监测，你们的情况已经接近尾声了，但我们希望让他们
Tra un min
Rog, 5 
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। रॉजर। हमें आप
好了，还有5
Ok. Un'altra cosa da ricordare è che quando inizia un blackout, che si verifica intorno a 0,5 g, e puoi annotarlo nella tua ch
알겠습니다. 비행 계
أقول لكم يا أصحاب اللون "الأرجواني"، أنتم تعمل
Роджер. Вы заметили какие-нибудь слои дымк
我想稍微谈谈六分仪。在空间狭小的航天器里使用六分仪非常困难，尤其是在戴着头盔的情况下。我最终意识到，戴着头盔去调整观测目标星体所需的角度是徒劳的。所以我摘下了头盔。这让我在使用六分仪时更加灵活，但即便如此，在不操纵航天器的情况下，我的角度仍然被限制在20到23度左右。这样一来，目标星体就会被观测窗口的上半部分遮挡住。当然，通过更频繁、更灵活地操纵航天器，你可以调整它，使观测窗口的长轴位于你的跟踪平面上。但由于燃料有限，我们没有选择这种操纵方式。我们也使用了脉冲模式，并且没有进行太多的机动。那次观测选择的星体角度都比较大，因此很难观测到地平线。我们最终决定让星星更靠近地平线一些。正如你所看到的，我拍摄了几颗老人星和其他几颗星。蓝色滤镜似乎完全遮挡了地平线；使用它时，我根本看不到地平线。在月光下，我们的地平线图像可能不太清晰。不过，绿色滤镜让我看到的地平线比完全不使用滤镜时要清晰一些。我觉得使用绿色滤镜或透明滤镜进行这些测量并不困难。尽管如此，地平线仍然不太清晰，你必须进行一些标准化操作，并在与之前相同的地平线位置进行测量，才能获得某种标准测量结果。对我来说，不使用滤镜测量到气
Roger, 11. Ich habe dir von Vierradfahrzeugen vorgelesen. Wie geht es mir? End
好的。哥伦比亚，马上就要开始了。接下来我们会给你安排一些任务。一
مرحباً يا جيم، هذا شيكي، الجراح المساعد
Близнецы VIII, Гуаймас CAP C
Сейчас м
Ok, Houston, Apollo 13. Cr
……你建议……我们在CEX和CMAX上拍摄地球照片时，快门速度设置为1/250秒，曝光补偿
罗杰
نع
Roger. Das könnte etwas schwierig werden. Wir sehen uns den Tunnel jetzt mal an. Es scheint, als ob sich zwischen den Erdschichten etwas mehr Feuchtigkeit im Tunnel angesammelt hätte. Der Tunnel war natürlich nicht belüfte
Ok, Fred. Copia quei numeri e grazie mille. Immagino
حسنًا يا جيم. ما زلنا نجمع أفكارنا حول هذا الأمر، لكن بعض الاعتبارات تشير إلى أنه يمكننا إجراء هذا التصحيح حتى 118 ساعة، دون أي تأثير سلبي كبير على سرعة دلتا-في، مع توفير متابعة كافية بعد ذلك للتأكد من صحة الإجراء، ولتهيئتك لتصحيح متأخر إذا ا
电视上还有一点需要注意，专家告诉我们——不要用摄像机的广角镜头对准地球或月
Bene. Sul pannello 16, l'interruttore automatico, i COLLEGAMENTI ALIMENTAZIONE BATT
Das ist Friendship Seven. Man kann klar zurücksehen;
Okay. This is to Rod Rose and the people at St. Christopher's, actually to peop
了解。了解しま
备受瞩目的Astro Blue Bo
Ah
ठीक है, जैक। मैं अभी आपको थ्रस्टर कॉन्फ़िगरेशन बताता हूँ। एबल 1, चार्ली 1, एबल 2 बंद हैं। चार्ली 2, मेन ए, और बाकी सभी थ्रस्टर जो मैं चालू बताता हूँ, मे
Okay. Roll for the COMM situation: have S-band antenna OMNI A in Bravo, S-band antenna OMNI to OMNI, high-gain
Okay. The first two lines are okay. CB - third line, CB(11) and 
Non abbiamo... Non abbiam
Okay. We got no problem. Go ahead and use your D-9. Now, on the Apollo Landmark no. 2, we would 19. And the landmark will be 16 miles north of track, and you should be pitched down about minus 30
Привет, Аполлон-11. Хьюсто
ह
Okay. Ich habe die Werte sowohl in Prozent als auch in Pfund; ich gebe Ihnen beide Zahlen. Die Pfundangaben sind für die Darstellung in 
Questo è su
I don't believe they can hear you, Mike. Are you maneuvering now
高利得ア
Gemini VIII, hier spricht Houston. Sie erwarten vermutlich ein Update zum Phasenkorrek
Let's see, y
Ich kann wirklich nicht sagen, ob ich keine Gierbewegung hab
Хорошо, Джек. Всё верно. Перейди на страницу 1-7. ПИТАНИЕ 
Полная шкала вашего артериального да
Forte e chiaro. Stavo solo controllando
जी हाँ, जिम। हस
Хорошо, Водолей. Мы работаем над тем, что будет дальше. А пока мы хотели бы отключить некоторые мощные устро
지도 업데이트입니다
Bien, Apollo 8. Le premier test est terminé. Nous allons maintenant passer en mode liaison montante « COMMA
Roger. Notez que vous commencez votre dernière activité programmée. Le suivi initial semble indiquer que la vitesse initiale à mi-parcours pourrait être inférieure à 1,2 m/s (4 pieds/seconde) selon notre première estimation. Nous avons examiné vos données de manœuvre et tout est aussi fluide que vous l'avez dit; tous les paramètres semblent parfaitement normaux. Les systèmes sont maintenant opérationnels; l'attitude est bonne. Nous devrions pouvoir changer les antennes OMNI pour vous, si vous le souhaitez. Nous avons obtenu de bons résultats en prévoyant à l'aller où changer les antennes, et
रॉजर। मेरी स्थिति ठीक है; ईंधन 51 प्रतिश
저 위쪽은요? 곧 지구광,
它在那里，但并不在六分仪的正中间；我猜它偏离了中心——大概偏离了0.02或者其他什么奇怪的数字。好了，完成这些之后，按下
Bene. E c'era un dato di volo di cui avevamo bisogno, ma questa volta non
أبولو 8، هيوست
水瓶座，休斯
По мере того, как ночь становится всё ярче, появляются и другие звёзды. Я их вижу — думаю, сейчас я различаю их примерно до пятой звёздной величины. Всё ещё это не такое яркое зрелище, как в ясную ночь на высоте 20 000 футов из кабины самолёта. Я сильно приглушил свет, и это создаёт гораздо более впечатляющий вид. На самом деле, кажется, что звёзды становятся всё ярче по мере того, как мои глаза всё бол
로저. 다시 말씀드리지만, 상태 벡터는 아무 문제 없습니다. 여전히 정상입니다. 여기서 대기하는 이유는 정보 손실 여
Hallo, Apollo 11. Housto
ठीक है, गस।
Roger. Je vais préciser un peu ce que signifie le mode cabine. En fait, vous pouvez rester en mode cabine. Le p
Roger. Il nous reste environ 4 minutes et demie avant la fin; nous aimerions v
- -... جاك. لقد حصل على - حسن
了解。両機のレーダー、航跡、そしてテレメトリは良好です。了解。GET BはGOです。11+14+29、デルタVは毎秒9フィート、燃焼時間は0+15、ヨー00、ピッチ00、コア25は90090、コア26と27はいずれもゼロです。前方噴射スラスタ噴射、後退機動を行いま
يُطلب منا القيام بأعمال التنظيف، وتخزين الخوذات وحقائب التخزين؛ وإخراج المرآة وقائمة التحقق ومجموعة التخلص. ثم تخزين مجموعة التخزين المؤقتة، وإخراجها وتهيئتها للاستخدام مع عدسة 16 ملم، HC-EX، f/4، 500، لانهائي، 6 إطارات في الثانية. هذا كل ما هو مذكور في تلك الصفحة. هذا هو وضعنا الحالي.
로저, 산소 고용량 공급 방식을 사용해서 최대 5.4 레벨의 캐빈을 만들라는 말씀이시
Ja, sie hängen zusammen. Ich habe sie die letzte halbe Stunde gar nicht angesehen. Ich war hier
로저. 기내 압력은 5.5psi로
杰瑞，另一个识别特征：这些小型撞击坑的中心有暗点，似乎是被埋在那里，撞击了下面的
分かりました。ジャ
わかりました。私が入手した情報をそのままお伝えします。その方が簡単だと思います。11 番上の行には、AC BUS TIE ブレーカーが 4 つ (IN)、AC BUS VOLTS ブレーカーが 1 つ (IN) あります。これで完了です。2 行目には、TCA ブレーカーが 4 つ (IN) あります。FLIGHT DISPLAYS と COMMANDER の下に GASTA があります。同様に AC BUS A の下にも、GASTA と COMMANDER のブレーカーが 1 つ (IN) あります。これで完了です。3 行目には、SIGNAL CONDITIONER 1 があります。ATCA (PGNS) があります。ENGINE CONTROL ブレーカ
And, Aquarius; Houston. We've got you both on
Okay. And, Jack, will you give us that - how about the breaker? Can I pull that? We don't need that,
Перицинтион плюс 2 - Хорошо, перицинтион плюс 2, at; плюс 1633.0, минус 
アポロ1
알겠습니다. 그냥 궁금해서 여쭤본 건데, 체크리스트에 대해
Ciao, Columbia. Houston. Molto bene; forte e chi
Мы только что завершили поворот «Агены» на 090 градусов, и скорость рыскания составл
了解しました。地上に問題があり、受信状態は弱いですがクリアです。テストを開始する準備ができました。モードを変更するので、変更時にバーストノイズが聞こえる可能性があります。これはSバンドのオンロックのようなノイズです。ただし、AECリーダーがロックを解除します。これはアップリンクの変調が失わ
主電源を切って、どうなるか確認してみます。ほら、まだ…これ、後回しにしたいんです。一
Je l'entends - je garde le 
...кар
キャビンの主圧力は予定通りです。燃料も酸素も問題ありません。キャビン
Похоже, что в вашем вторичном контуре охлаждения клапан противодавления слегка приоткрыт. Я предлагаю вам перевести переключатель EVAP в
D'acc
No. Questo è il r
알겠습니
罗杰，我们已经量好你的体温了，现在正准备给你量
Roger, Jim. Sur votre ordinateur, nous aimerions effectuer une nouvelle sauvegarde mémoire effaçable, comme l'autre jour. La ra
Это не 
Apollo 8
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, 
Okay, Jack. What you're reading now the angles? We had the Moon centered, and it's pretty close to
広州
Gemini 4, qui Houston. Abbiamo saltato questo rientro così potete parlarne e tornare più tardi se avete domande. Per vostra informazione, le previsioni meteo per il 63-1 indicano 
이글, 콜
Okay. Das stimmt, Gemini. Flig
Auf Grundlage der uns bisher vorliegenden Daten beträgt Ihr Einflugwinkel 5,99°. Di
네, 하지만 잘 들어보세요... 한
Roger. Now, to maneuver to roll 0, pitch 90 and yaw in - and 
네
Okay. Sun half-unit vectors: R1 plus 45483, R2 plus 19053, R3 plus 08262; Earth half-unit R1 plus 32120
وهذا أل
ठीक है, X माइनस 00011, Y प्लस 
Ich versuche es. Wir haben es natürlich durch die Fenster und durch das Fernglas gesehen. Ich schaue mal, 
D'accord. Je vais calculer le temps restant (2 secondes) avant de vous donner le temps imparti, juste avant que je 
よかったね、フランク。今夜は黒い時計
好了，弗雷德。DELTA参数就讲完了。或许你也听说了，我们的GAMMA参数仍然是-6.03，DELTA-V将是每秒
Negativo. Abbiamo quattro Bravo e qu
ठीक है, जिम। रॉजर। हम इसे यथासंभव अधिकतम सीमा तक करने जा रहे हैं। और यह काफी हद तक संभव प्रतीत होता है। शुरुआत में, कमांड मॉड्यूल में हमें इसे धीरे-धीरे चालू करने के लिए आपको कुछ अलग-अलग सीक्वेंस भेजने होंगे। जैसे-जैसे हम प्रवेश द्वार के करीब पहुँचेंगे, हम चेकलिस्ट पर आगे बढ़ते जाएंगे। जब तक हम लगभग -45 डिग्री सेल्सियस पर पहुँचेंगे, तब तक हम पूरी तरह से चेकलिस्ट पर आ चुके
रॉजर। मैं समझ गया। बज़ के पास जेमिनी एक्स पर एक था, वह बहुत अच्छा काम करता 
فهمنا كلامك بوضوح تام، وكل شيء يبدو جيداً من
Мы обязаны это с
That would be very interest
الساعة 03:30 قادمة - من المفترض أن تكون 5.5، وهي كذلك
Roger. Lies
ठीक है, 
我要做
宝贝，我把你拍到电视上
Der Horizont ist sehr klar. Roll- und Nickbewegungen sehen sehr gut aus. Gieren sieht gut aus. Ich glaube, wir haben jetzt eine ganze Reihe von Sterne
Je te compr
Roger. He doesn't really need the charts. He's got them memorized. They'
イーグル、ヒューストン。右に10度ヨーイングすることをお勧めします。高利得信号
你睡
Poursuivr
好的，收到
पश्चिम जर्मनी ने सोमव
Eagle, Houston. K
罗杰。ΔV 为 139。格林尼治标准时间 16-belay that—15 
Roger. Ich habe im AUTO-Modus angedockt, und wie gesagt, ich war mir des genauen Kontaktzeitpunkts nicht sicher. Ich habe die Anzeigen der Andocksonde ständig überprüft. Zwei „Barber Poles
Carnarvon. 
ठीक है। आप इसे बदल सकते हैं - अनुक्रम 12 को हटाकर अनुक्रम 14 बना दें। यह इस कक्षा, कक्षा 58 पर, समय 09:40:22 पर, 
No. I wouldn't say it was necessarily material that had been uncovered. I think some of the material might have been baked or in some way caused to be more cohesive and perhaps flow togethe
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हमारे प्रारंभिक आंकड़ों से संकेत मिलता है कि प्रक्षेप पथ का कट-ऑफ अच्छा है। लगभग आधे घंटे में हम आपको
حسنًا. الآن، في تلك الصفحة التي تتضمن مناورة التحليق، أسفل مجموعة نجوم الشمال، لديّ بعض الأرقام الجديدة لك لأ
Et Boothill, Duke Island, Side
네. 이제 (알아볼 수 없는 부분)이 어디 있는지 알았으니 다음번엔 훨씬 쉬울 거예요. 처음 카이로와 알렉산드리아를 찾을 때는 (알아볼 수 없는 부분)을 찾는 데 꽤 애를 먹었어요. 비행장은 제대로
네, 맞습니다. 조, 확실히 그렇습니다. 모니터에 자세한 내용이 있나요? 제가 보기엔 약품은 조금 알아볼 수 있는데, 다른 건
And, after we go MODE to STANDBY, like for you to add "Circuit breaker, tw
ATT DEADBAND, MI
5.6 在 - 5.6 在 1/250 秒处可能是 
ハワイ通信技術局、ハワイ・キャップ通
रॉजर, यह एक बेह
ऑरोरा सेवन, कैप
Je vais les appeler. 
하지만 그게 44살인지 아닌지는 저희가 말씀드
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। जब आप अपना यॉ पैंतरा करेंगे, हम प्रतीक्षा करे
Хорошо. Это хорошая новость.
Ok. C'è una spia di ATTENZIONE e AVVERTENZA che indica che non hai chiamato: è il PREAMPLIFICATORE, suppongo perché non abbiamo ancora installato l'interruttor
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 수산화리튬 
알겠습니다. 우리는 105라는 큰 명사를 가지고 있었는데, 그 크기는 112였습니다. 그리고 우리의 
ننقل 
로저. 45-1 101. 2+08. 12 37 50. 5+36. 10+33. 46-1 114. 2+25 14 12 47. 4+05. 9+33. 47-1 전후방 추진기 발사. 08 및 120. 0+14 및 2+30. 15 46 36. 3+17. 8+37. 48-1 전후방 추진기. 24 및 120. 0+40 및 230, 수정 2+30. 17 20 19. 2+42. 8+43. 49-
わ
We're coming through the lower layer, John. You bette
I'm no
D'accord. Ma fenêtre est dégag
コ
D'accord. Je suis au dysfonctionnement 23, étape 2. Il me semble qu'il y a une faible possibilité d'ébullition, mais j'en doute. P
我无法识别最后一个在高频频段通话的电台。通话非常清晰，应该
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。如果你们还没有停止氧气吹扫，请立即停止。电视摄像人员说，
Roger, Sig
我的窗户一半是黑的，另一半透着一点阳光。阳光照在飞船的头部，所以我得透过这个发光的物体才能看到星星。我看不到星星，而且我从来没在白天看到过星星……日出时分
Okay. Achtung: Die Opti
11, ह्यूस्टन। आपके तापमान की जाँच करने पर, ऐसा प्रतीत होता ह
Роджер. Понял. Пит сказал, чтобы ты знал, что у тебя будет время на пляже в Самоа, чтобы отогреться после этого хо
Водолей, нам ну
Okay. Mit dem anderen haben wir
로저, 에드. 전해드
常にではありませ
Ужасное окно. Жаль, что нам приходится стрелять через
罗杰。0.98，你车载氧气流量计的读数是多少？完毕
मैंने आपका Z Cal देख लिया। ठीक है,
22:39 に雲の写真を撮っています... 今まさにここです.
ピッチ角ゼロ、ヨー角1度右
अ
حسنًا، ما أعرضه الآن يا جاك هو LEVVA، وقد سبق عرضه أيضًا. إنه غطاء رأس يُرتدى على سطح الأرض، وأنا - أحضر غطاء جيم هنا لأعرض بعض التعديلات. إحدى المشاكل السابقة هي عدم القدرة على تمييز الشخصيات الموجودة على سطح الأرض بشكل جيد. لذا، ليس فقط بدلة جيم بها بعض الخطوط الحمراء، بل كما ترى، غطاء LEVVA الخاص به يحتوي أيضًا على خط أحمر. والآن يمكنك رؤية تعديل آخر هنا أيضًا يا جاك، لم أره بنفسي من قبل. أعتقد أنه في الحلقة 12، علّق بيت وA1 على مشكلة ان
わかりました。それと、一つ質問させてください。ドッキングした状態では、ピッチとロールを制御するために を使わなければなりません。軌道を大きく変え
Roger. Non sono molto sicuro di cosa sia successo quella volta, Mike. Stavo segnando i punti di atterraggio, usando il codice, e continuavo a vedere un grosso perno per l'OTTICA AUTOMATICA. E vedevo che il bersaglio, o il punto di atterraggio, si stava 
太陽がここにあるスキャナーに当たらないこ
لا يهمنا إن كنا على صواب، المهم أن تكون MPAD 
Okay. That's the last thing I passed up. And while we're waiting for to decide here, let me continue. The deadband that is considered acceptable is between 660 and 770 psi. In other words, any rise time that'll give you one - a pressure between those two, will keep you below the critical pressure at 103 hours or so. So, we expect it to read in that - in that band and if it does, there will be no problem. If it reads between 770 and 800 psi, we will want you to check the pressure again at about 59 hours, and I'll get the detailed procedures in a minute. If the pressure is equal to or greater than 800 psi, we're going to have to go into some more detailed procedures; we're going to try to - to get PCM data on it, for one thing. We may have to h
Censura
아니요, 유감스럽게
Crediamo che il cratere, il grande cratere scuro tra la sonda e il Mare delle Crisi, sia il cratere Condorcet. Il Mare delle Crisi è incredibilmente liscio fino all'orizzonte e oltre questa regio
좋아요, 알겠습니다. 그럼 원격 측정 입력값을 낮음으
Bene. 12 1383 327 023 su 172 sinistra 22, più 1293, meno 16500, 12905 36180. Commenti: sulle tue stelle Sirio e Rigel, rollio 010, beccheggio 294, imbardata 320, nessun ullage. Altro: uno, ritorno veloce, uguale a 7821, per atterraggio nel Pacifico centrale per MTL; due, p
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. TV 방송 요청을 다시 한번 시도해 보겠습니다. 10분 분량의 방송이 필요합니다. 그리고 가능하시다면 외부 장면들에 대한 내레이션을 넣어주시면 좋겠습니다. 또한, 내부 장면도 넣어주시면 좋을 것 같습니다. 이
Хорошо. Следующие один, два, три — то же самое, а затем нам нужно перевести кнопку ПЕРЕДАЧИ ЛЕНТЫ В ЦЕНТРАЛЬНОЕ ПОЛОЖЕ
Отметьте это
Nun ja, das gilt nur, wenn Sie die neuen Informatio
एलएम में, कैमरे के लिए यह कवर है। ज़रा सोचिए - मैंने इसे लोड कर लिया है, और मुझे इसे बदलने की कोई ज़रूरत नहीं दिखती। अगर यह अभी काम कर रहा है - तो शायद अगर यह ईवीए पर जाने से पहले ही बंद हो जाए, 
حسنًا. يمكننا الضغط على زر الإدخال، ثم وضع R1 
ニー
Regardez tout flotter j
알겠습니다. 이해했어요. 잭, 혹시 모드 
아시다시피, 앞으로의 절차를 담당하는 여러 그룹이 있습니다
Okay. The is pressurized no
ठीक है, अब, उड़ान योजना में बताया गया है कि हमें क
Sigma Seven。Auto One。你读过 Cap Com
오, 저희도 그러길 바라요. 저희는 하셀블라드 카메라로 컬
Okay. The Earth went - just went by about - clear above the index. It was - it was, if it were extended, the number would b
Roger. Und deine Zeit bei Canary beträgt 23:37. 
अब इसमें कुछ बढ़ोतरी हुई है, माइनस 4; यान
Okay, Houston. I'm not having too much luck holding this 
हाँ। फ्रैंक, ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे तुम्हारी पीठ से एक बड़ी रस्सी लटक रही है। शायद यही
Plug that hole. We 
هل يمكنك تزوي
Ok. Sono stato interrotto per un minuto. Bob Hope è di nuovo in Vietnam con le sue truppe, e come al solito sta facendo un ottimo lavoro. Un piccolo nome nella notizia qui è della USS New Jersey. Bob Hope ha scherzato ieri – o mercoledì – dall'alto di un'enorme torretta per deliziare i 1500 uomini a bordo della corazzata New Jersey, in occasione del suo ventesimo Natale, intrattenendo le truppe statunitensi all'estero. Hope e i suoi 27 uomini hanno intrattenuto i marinai del New Jersey dopo aver partecipato a una messa di Natale a bordo della portaerei Hancock, entrambe al largo del Vietnam. "Questo dev'essere il Cris Craft più grande del mondo", ha detto Hope ai marinai. "Sembra Wake Island con un timone". "Penso che siano stati gentili a tirar fuori la nave dalla naftalina solo per salutarmi con 21 colpi di cannone", ha detto. Hope ha scherzato mentre era in piedi su una delle torrette da 16 pollici della nave. I marinai rimasero particolarmente colpiti dal gruppo di ragazze dalle gambe lunghe che si erano imbarcate con Hope, tra c
초보자 치고는 
제가 보기엔 항공편 운항 관리자들이 
Хорошо. И переключите ИНВЕРТОР 2, ШИНА ПЕРЕМЕННОГО ТОКА 2 в положение «вкл.»; и еще один переключатель, СБРОС ШИНЫ ПЕРЕМЕННОГО ТОКА 2, в положение «сброс» и «в центр»; переключите ЗАРЯДКУ АККУМУЛЯТОРА в поло
यहां तो हर तरह की
Sigma 
この時点で、確かに約 5 度の右ロールが見られます。また、潜望鏡が暗いことに気付きました。これは、ダークサイドに近づいていることを意味します。潜望鏡を通して変化がないか観察してみます。現時点では、少なくともこの姿勢では、夜間観測用の潜望鏡を通して何も見えません。レバーの位置以外、低視度になったときもわかりません。窓は曇っています。今は日光が当たっていますが、脱出タワー ロケットによって間違いなく曇っていますが、程度は大きくありません。この時点で、いわゆるホタルが劇的に漂っているのが見えます。2、3 回ノックしてみましたが、それらは確かに機体に対して相対速
كيف يبدون ل
मुझे लगता है कि मैं - तुम्हारे और कैंटन के बीच, सूट के तापमान को नियंत्रित करने का एक और प्रयास करूंगा। ह
Roger.
了解。ヨー操作を開始してよろしいですか？ヨー操作完了後も通信が途切れる場合は、パワーアンプを
Ich glaube, die Welt dreht sich wirklich. Ich kann jetzt einige meiner Landmassen sehen. Australien muss unten sein, und ich verm
Солнце
谢谢
Okay; fine. I've got two updates for you, Jim. One is a procedure for looking for Comet Bennett at about, and I'll wait till Jack gets up before passing you the details on that. The other update is concerned with going into the 3 hours early, and I think Vance mentioned to you last night that this was a possibility, that we'd like to look at the SHe tank pressure early. And si
Roger. Ti aspettiamo per farti gl
Роджер, мы подтверждаем здесь, на TM. К
Jim, we concur with your use of the two small craters which you can repeatedly mark on and find on the map; and also if you will give us 
残りの推進剤量は約3
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 만약 이 중간 기착지를 확보하지 못하더라도, 우리는 여전히 다른 곳을 시도할 것이며,
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。オ
罗杰。我们现在可
هذا صحيح. س
コロ
Das ist richtig. Jetzt kommen wir zum nächsten Schritt, und der erste Schrit
रॉजर। मैं आपकी बात सुन रहा हूँ। मैं 5,000 फीट की ऊंचाई पर मुख्य पैराशूट पर हूँ। स्थिति ठीक है। मैं किसी भी बचाव दल के संपर्क में नहीं हूँ। क्या आपके पास बचाव कार्य में लगने व
Roger RKV，你们
Wir haben einen Bermuda-Vektor für Sie. Sie befinden sich bei 87 x 140, was ein Ausweichmanöver und eine Höhenkorrektur erfor
Ok. Non abbiamo problemi. Vai avanti e usa il tuo D-9. Ora, sul punto di riferimento Apollo n. 2, saremmo a 19. E il punto di riferimento sarà 16 miglia a nord della rotta, e dovresti essere inclinato di circa -30° in quel momento. E vorremmo che lo seguissi il più vicino possibile e che scattassi alcune foto usando la fotocamera da 16 mm con obiettivi da 75 mm con un'impo
Ok. Ti darò solo - penso che sarà più facile darti quello che ho dentro. Ok, nella riga superiore, sulla 11, abbiamo i quattro interruttori AC BUS TIE INSERITI e l'interruttore AC BUS VOLTS INSERITO, e questo è tutto. Seconda riga, abbiamo i quattro interruttori TCA INSERITI. Abbiamo il GASTA sotto FLIGHT DISPLAYS e COMMANDER's. E allo stesso modo sotto AC BUS A, abbiamo un interruttore GASTA e un interruttore COMMANDER 
Ok. Potenza 6. Ok. La potenza 6 si riferisce al pannello 11. Dovresti seguire la tabella, ad eccezione degli interruttori che ho indicato. La prima riga è ok. O, diciamo, la prima riga. Seconda riga, QUAD 4, TCA, chiuso; QUAD 3, TCA, chiuso; QUAD 2, TCA, chiuso; e QUAD 1, TCA, chiuso. Il resto di quella riga è ok. Riga 3, circa a metà, ATCA (PGNS), chiuso. Ok. Il resto di quella riga è ok. Quarta riga, RISCALDATORE - stand by. Ok. Quella riga è ok, ad eccezione degli ultimi tre interruttori, Fred, sotto, che sono, STANDBY, OPERATE. Questi tre dovrebb
Amicizia Sette, Steelhead. Quello è Charlie. Pass
Ok, e infine, quattro bombolette di LiOH, quelle usate nel, e quelle possono andare nella borsa di scarico nel. Ok, un paio di note. Dopo aver carica
मुझे बेहतर यही करना होगा कि इसे दो
Steht der Mond für dich ungefähr an der richtigen Stell
Beh, te lo dirà lui. Ha u
了解しました。それで問題ありません。収納場所に置いておくことをお勧めしま
ああ、この単眼鏡を通して見ただけでこう言うのは本当に気が進まないけど、クレーターのような白い点があるんだ。このかなり古いクレーターの底にある、新しくできた小さなクレーターの下には、たくさんの白い点があるように見えるけど、その中心には、クレーターがあるのではなく、岩
जी हां, सही है। और हम पेज के नीचे दिए गए "कैमरा सेटअप करें" विकल्प को हटाना चाहते हैं। बिजली की खपत कम करने के लिए हम इसे हटा रहे हैं। यह लाइन 
Джек, я точно вижу, что мы сейчас удаляемся от Луны. Я всё это увидел в монокуляр. Сейчас мы находимся пря
브루스
로저. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 밤하늘 지평
吉姆，有两件事。我们想让你知道，这里面存在一些相当大的姿态错误，所以如果你选择自动模式
Hast d
रॉजर, मैं 20,000 फीट नीचे आ रहा हूँ। स्नोर्कल के लिए तैयार रहें। केबिन का दबाव बढ़ रहा है। स्नोर्कल चालू हो जाना चाहिए। मुझे लगत
जी हाँ। एक्वेरिय
13، هيوستن. نود منك فحص 
नहीं, उस प्रेशर रेगुलेटर पर एक स्विच है
يا له من يوم رائع حقاً يا 
...メリークリスマス、
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi, poco prima delle 5 ore circa, o verso, vi vorremo in assetto per un allineamento dell'asse corporeo, usando il terminatore terrestre come abbiamo fatto prima; E non appena lo avremo, eseguiremo -7, che ora equivale a circa 60 cm al secondo, ovvero circa 15 secondi. E mi è stato detto che ora è sceso a 35 cm, quindi è comodamente entro i limiti. Bene. Quando lo faremo, inizieremo immediatamente la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio del modulo di servizio, che sarà in piano, dato che lo sganciamo prima del solito. Non abbiamo bisogno, e non vogliamo, della componente fuori piano. Quindi sarà in piano, con il modulo di servizio puntato di nuovo verso l'esterno lungo il raggio vettore. Inizieremo quindi a preparare il modulo di comando per il SEP del modulo di servizio, incluso il controllo del modulo di comando e l'accensione a caldo, e circa 4 ore e 30 minuti prima dello sgancio, sgancieremo il modulo di servizio. Continueremo a lavorare finché non avremo il modulo di servizio... e cercheremo di scattare qualche fotografia, ma non ci impegneremo in manovre di traslazione per le foto perché non vogliamo sbagliare... rovinare l'angolo della vostra traiettoria di volo in quel momento. Okay. Questo ci dà 2 ore di tempo libero, più o meno, per finire, se siamo in ritardo, per passare alla checklist e prepararci all'accensione del modulo di comando. Inizieremo l'accensione completa del modulo di comando a meno 2 ore e 30 minuti. Metteremo il computer in linea, lo faremo partire, inizieremo a collegare i vostri vettori di stato e così via, e ad allineare la piattaforma del modulo di comando. Al massimo a circa 1 ora e 30 minuti, dandoci un'ora per completare questa parte del modulo di comando, inizieremo la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio. Poi inizierete a chiudere il... Naturalmente, non abbiamo configurato tutto il nostro stivaggio molto prima di questo. Chiuderemo il portello
Да. Мы понимаем, что в резервуаре для питьевой воды больше нет воды, но мы слышали, что вы перелили часть воды из этого резервуара в пакеты, и я хотел бы у
Ok, Jim ha ragione. Dovremmo cancellare tutto questo, con un paio di eccezioni. La valvola di scarico anteriore, chiusa, il primo passagg
एमआईटी के लोगों के लिए यह जानकारी उपयोगी हो सकती है कि तारों की अगली श्रृंखला की तस्वीरें मास्टर नेविगेटर द्वारा अंतरिक्ष हेलमेट पहने और लंबी आई रिलीफ वाले आईपीस का उपयोग करक
D'accord. Passons à la Surface 60, puis, au milieu de la page, ap
Und, Houston, es ist derzeit fraglich, ob wir die Sterne in dieser Konstellation sehen können. Die einzige Möglichkeit, eine Ausrichtung zu erreichen, wäre die Verbindung zwischen Erde und Terminator oder Mond und seinem Terminator. Ich würde Sie sehr bitten, eine
रॉग, हम आपको खो रहे हैं। हम आपको ह
11, Роджер. Мы получили сообщения о том, что все метки были в порядке — за последн
Okay
Je me
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-
夏威夷，双子座六号。我们已经获得了你们的数据点，作为交换，我们想知道我们获得了什么样的离面速度
Ciao, Columbia. Houston. 
로저,
حسنًا. سأفعل ذلك. هل كان
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on your own, that's the place we'd like to break off and let you go ahead and take over with your own alinement. However, we are giving you a procedure which will give you things we know you can see in the telescope without worrying about any reflections or anything of that nature, and it's not intended that this procedure has to be followed past the point where you know you've got good definition of star patterns in your telescope. If you ne
好的。我们一个也没有，所以
فرانك، تشير جميع الدلائل إلى عدم وجود أي م
Bene. Per il Pacifico ce
رو
नहीं। मैंने दोनों जगहों पर जाँच क
حسنًا. في نهاية رؤيا 59، خط طول ال
وفريد، هيوستن. بعد قليل، سأشرح لك إجراءً أريدك أن تدونه لاستخدامه لاحقًا. إنه إجراء لفصل ناقل وحدة التحكم الرئيسي، ونعتقد أنه سيكون مفيدًا جد
D'accord, Verseau, nous vous recommandons de passer en mode AUT
네, 통신이 주
Roger. Übrigens, ich absolviere gerade eine Einarbeitung bei diesem CAP COM-Job, während Jerry nicht im 
सेवन, कैप कॉम। त
रॉजर। चंद्रमा की हमारी यह यात्रा आपको शायद सरल या आसान लगी हो। मैं आपको आश्वस्त करना चाहता हूँ कि ऐसा बिल्कुल नहीं था। जिस सैटर्न वी रॉकेट ने हमें कक्षा में पहुँचाया, वह एक अविश्वसनीय रूप से जटिल मशीन है, जिसका हर एक पुर्जा त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता है। मेरे सिर के ऊपर स्थित इस कंप्यूटर में 38,000 शब्दों की शब्दावली है, जिनमें से प्रत्येक शब्द को हमारे, यानी चालक दल के लिए अत्यंत महत्वपूर्ण होने के लिए बहुत सावधानी से चुना गया है। मेरे हाथ में जो स्विच है, उसके कमांड मॉड्यूल में ही 300 से अधिक समकक्ष हैं, इस एक स्विच डिज़ाइन में ही। इसके अलावा, असंख्य सर्किट ब्रेकर, लीवर, रॉड और अन्य संबंधित नियंत्रण उपकरण भी हैं। हमारे सर्विस मॉड्यूल के पिछले हिस्से में स्थित हमारा विशाल रॉकेट इंजन त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता रहा होगा, अन्यथा हम चंद्र कक्षा में ही फँस जाते। मेरे सिर के ऊपर लगे पैराशूट को कल भी पूरी तरह से काम करना होगा, अन्यथा हम समुद्र में गिर जाएँगे। हमें हमेशा से विश्वास रहा है कि यह सभी उपकरण काम करेंगे, और ठीक से काम करेंगे, और हमें शेष उड़ान के दौरान भी यही विश्वास बना हुआ है। यह सब कुछ कई लोगों के खून-
レトロパッケージは、もう一度言いますが、投棄しないことをお勧めします。つまり、0.05gスイッチをオーバーライドする必要があります。こ
いいえ。もう必要あ
はい…この…ベクトルで。R1に45498を足して…はい、
Okay. Ich schildere Ihnen meine Beobachtungen zum Hauptbus B. Dort ging alles ziemlich schnell. Zuerst hörten wir den Aufprall, die Explosion oder was auch immer es verursacht hat – ich bin mir nicht sicher. Ungefähr eine Sekunde später gab es einen Hauptalarm: Unterspannung am Hauptbus B. Ich habe die Spannung überprüft, und sie war zu diesem Zeitpunkt in Ordnung. Ich vermute daher, dass es sich um eine Spannungsspitze handelte. Brennstoffzelle 3 funktionierte ebenfalls einwandfrei und hatte einen guten Durchfluss. Fred kam in diesem Moment ins Kommandomodul und nahm auf seinem P
好的，明白了。如果我想尽快脱困，我只需要打开配电盘 5 上的两个断路器，分别是 POWER-1 MAIN B 和 POWER-2 M
是的。我们的录音机电
至少，我们可以暂时忘记它们，直到
J'ai pris deux photos depuis le S-6, et je crois qu'elles ont été prises juste au niveau de la zone de convergence intertropicale. On y distingue
So
Das ist richtig. KOMPRESSOR Nummer 
Well, the earth looks 
Nous avons l'étoile 01 qui arrive, c'est peut-être 
당신은 아주 새로운 별자리표를 갖고 있군요. 당신은 분명 아주 새로운 별자리표를 갖고 있을 거예요. 그렇죠
No, questa cosa non ha, ah, pratic
ECS 산소 압력은 약 830으로, 그 
Bene. Esatto. Ora devo anche darti un paio di punti da tracciare su quella curva. La curva che hai disegnato si basa su un perigeo o periluno di 60 miglia, e ora hai un pericinto di 62 miglia; e il motivo per cui il tuo obiettivo è a 62 miglia è passare sop
In questo momento, sembra che l'otturatore della Hasselblad sia bloccato su alcune di queste foto. Questa è la seconda serie d
चार्ली, इस बारे में हम यहाँ बस 20 मिनट तक इंतज़ार कर 
13, ह्यूस्टन -
Okay. Ich ha
好的。再往下两步，把 COMMANDER
D'accord. Je vais chercher…
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはザンジバル司令部です。現
Roger, 11. J'ai deux PADS pour toi, 30 puis un 31. 30 SPS/G&N: 36691, moins 061, plus 066 135 23 4156. NOUN 81: 32 - correction, plus 32011, plus 06818, moins 02650 181 054 014. Apogée: NA, périgée: plus 00230 3286 - correction, 32836; durée de combustion: 2 28 32628 24 1511 357. Les trois lignes suivantes sont NA. NOUN 61: +1103, -17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. Les étoiles du coucher sont Deneb et Vega, 242 172 012. Nous souhaitons un dégagement de deux jets pendant 16 secondes, et l'horizon est sur la ligne des 10 degrés à TIG moins 2 minutes; et votre étoile du sextant est visible après 134 +50. Soyez prêt à 
C'est exact. Nous constatons un retard d'une seconde sur votre horloge, et ce décalage e
Хорошо. Он смотрит на тот показатель силы тока батареи, который вы нам предоставили некоторое время назад. Он хотел бы видеть его примерно на пол-ампера или на 
Ja. Nur zur Info, Jim: Ich weiß nicht, ob du das ursprünglich gehört hast, aber die Strecke von 2,5 bis 1 Zoll wurde schon dreimal gefahren, und es ist ziemlich knapp. Wir haben versucht, so viel wie möglich zu optimieren, was nicht viel ist. Aber ich denke, die andere Botschaft, die du Jack mitgeben solltest, wenn du die Plattform ausrichtest, ist: Mach es nicht zu perfekt. Es muss nicht perfekt sein. Mac
ठीक है, जैक, ये सिर्फ
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि हम सभी इस बात से सहमत हैं कि अगर हमें वास्तव में यह नहीं पता कि हम क्या देख रहे हैं, तो हमें इसक
Ça d
そこはい
मैं आपको मिशन की समाप्ति का पूर्वव्यापी समय दूंगा और मैं चाहूंगा कि आप इस समय घड़ी को इस समय पर 
알겠습니다. 앞서 말씀드린 대로 모든 Descent 배터리가 연결되어 있고 ASCENT 배터리 6이 정상 전원 공급 상태라고 가정합니다. 먼저 패널 5의 회로 차단기를 확인하십시오. POWER-2 MAIN B, 개방; POWER-1 MAIN A, 개방; SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN B 회로 차단기,
Roger, Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Ti leggo forte e chi
尼尔，你什么时候
Apollo 11, Houston. Basierend auf unseren Beobachtungen seit der Mittellinie zeigen wir einen Gammawert von -6,57 an. Dies ist jedoch vorläufig, und wir gehen davon aus, dass sich die Position nach weiterer Beobachtung stabilisieren wird und wir sie präzise in den Korridor einfädeln können. Sie befindet sich etwa in der Mitte des Korridors; alles sieht gut aus. Wir werden Ihnen in ein paar Stunden, bevor Sie schlafen gehen, die Eintrittsinformationen (PAD) zukommen lassen. Und von unseren Kollegen aus der Öffentlichkeitsarbeit gibt es neben Ihrem Flug noch ein paar weitere Schlagzeilen. Sie dominieren weiterhin die Nachrichten. Es gibt jedoch noch einige andere interessante Dinge für Sie. Wie ich bereits erwähnt habe, wurde das All-Star-Spiel wegen Regens abgesagt. Es wird morgen stattfinden. Präsident Nixon wird es jedoch nicht wie geplant besuchen können. Wir halten Sie über die Ergebnisse auf dem Laufenden. Und auch die Wettervorhersage ist gut für Sie. Unsere Prognose sieht gut aus für das Bergungsgebiet; es sollte dort draußen sehr schön sein. Präsident Nixon, der sich auf den Flug zur Begrüßung Ihrer Rückkehr vorbereitete, sagte voraus, dass die Menschheit innerhalb von 31 Jahren mindestens einen anderen Planeten mit irgendeiner Form von Leben besucht haben werde. „Im Jahr 2000 werden wir auf dieser Erde neue Welten besucht haben, auf denen es Leben geben wird“, sagte er vor 2000 ausländischen Austa
Negativo, Fred. Quella è metà del tubo blu del comandante e metà del tubo blu dell'LMP: i tubi 
حسناً، BAT C هو 37، و pyro BAT A هو 37، و pyro BAT B هو 37، و A 94 بالما
Ricevuto. Aspetta un at
Apollo 8, Houston. Sembra che questa carica della batteria B possa richiedere altre 6 ore. A quanto pare, la velocità di carica è inferiore a quella che stiamo ottenendo sulle nostre curve al suolo, ma è comunque superiore a quella dell'Apollo 7, e sembra che ora stia procedendo in buone condizioni. E vorrei avere conferma che la tempist
حسنًا يا جيم، بما أننا في وضع معدل بت منخفض الآن، لا يمكننا مراقبة تنبيهات البرنامج وما إلى ذلك، ونوصيك، لكي تتمكن من القيام بذلك على متن السف
もう一人の飛行士、マックス・コンラッドは軽飛行機で世界一周飛行をしています。彼はクリスマスを南極のプエント・アラネスで過ごし、南極点への飛行を続けられるよう天
저는 북아프리카를 아주 많이 봤습니다... 특히 주간에는요. 아주 잘 알고 있죠. 방금 D-9 아폴로 랜드마크 임무로 14번 표적을 완료했습니다. 아주 정확하게 포착했어요. 전에 그 표적을 본 적이 있어서 위치를 알고 있었거
Das ist b
Va ben
Сигма Севен, Сигма Севен. Гавайская компа
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP C
D'accord. Nous allons - ce que nous 
Hallo Jim, wir h
रॉजर। हम समझ गए। 11. हम समझते हैं कि यह प्रोग्राम आपको लगभग अनंत कोणों का संयोजन दे सकता है, और यह बहुत अनुचित नहीं है। अगर आप थोड़ा इंतज़ार करेंगे, तो
Roger. Ça ne me dérange pas de jouer, car vous avez été très gentils ces cinq derniers j
我不知道你们怎么样，但我打算去食品储
On row 2, FLIGHT DISPLAYS, open THRUST, open MISSION 
يا أهل برج الدلو
Wo z
我有多久没去过升
现在声音很清晰了，我们来看面板 5。我们需要将以下设置关闭：
Be
さて、姿勢を投棄する操作を行うと何
了解しました。了解
Oui, je sais. On aura
로저입니다. 휴스턴, 이글입니다. 저희도 저런 광학 장비가 있으면 좋겠네요. 마이크에게 얘기해
Ja, Ken. Das war es, ich habe davon
你知道，如果你像在模拟器里那样敲击这个手柄控制器，用最小脉冲，猛击它，它会弹起来再弹回来，发出
로저. 저는 자동 모드로 도킹했는데, 말씀드렸다시피 접촉 순간을 정확히 기억하지 못했습니다. 도킹 프로브 표시기를 계속 확인했죠. 세 개의 캡처 래치, 아니, 그냥 세 개의 래치가 제대로 걸렸다는 걸 나타내는 두 개의 바버폴 표시가 떴고, 소프트 도킹이 완료된 겁니다. 그때 상황은 아주 안정적으로 보였습니다. 그래서 프리 모드로 전환하고 창밖을 다시 봤는데 여전히 안정적이었고, 2번 연료통을 분사했습니다. 그런데 그 순간 두 기체 사이에 회전이 시작됐는데, 원인은 잘 모르겠습니다. 아마 추력 때문일 수도 있고, 아니면 그 전부터 진동이 있었는데 제가 미처 알아채지 못했을 수도 있습니다. 어쨌든 프로브가 후퇴하는 동안 기체가 좌우로 심하게 흔들렸습니다. 제 생각에는 약 15도 정도 흔들렸던 것 같습니다. 그래서 다시 조종간을 잡고 프리 스위치를 다시 자동 모드로 돌려서 흔들림을 줄이려고 했습니다. 닐도 마찬가지였을 겁니다. 닐의 이야기는 나중에 직접 들어보시죠. 저는 우리가 성공적으로 후퇴하고 도킹하지 못할 거라고 생각했습니다. 하지만 약 6초에서 8초 정도, 제가 듣기에는 그 후 상황이 진정되는 것이 보였고, 도킹 래치가 작동했다는 소리가 들렸습니다. 나중에 터널 안으로 들어가 보니 12
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे ऑप्टिक्स ट्रैकिंग सिस्टम के बारे में कुछ शब्द। मैंने पीछे की तरफ नियंत्रण बिंदु 1 और 2 के ल
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आप कैसे पढ
En réponse à la question numéro 4, nous avons pu examiner de près le carénage thermique après son r
알겠습니다. 저희는 고비트레이트를 유지할 계획입니다. 저희도 그게 어떤 차이를 만드는지 여쭤보려고 했는데, 마치 저희 마음을
Je ne crois pas qu'ils puissent 
OK. Panneau 8: activer le bras PYRO AR
Bon sang, ça me met en rogne. Mon Hassel
我相信这一点。我能看到隧道周围外层涂层有一些裂缝。至于隔热层，我认为这与结
Hey, that all sound
Ri
그들은 이 답을 원했습니다. 인도양 선
Farò un test di orientamento a questo punto, mentre sono in volo e non sono così impegnato. Cerco la maniglia manuale - e ci sono andato, esattamente lì. Cerco
여기는 제미니 4호입니다. 약 47시간이 경과한 시점에서 번역 2-알파, 호라이
了解、ジャック。戻ってきました。私の間違いの訂正をコピーしていただければ幸いです。H2クライオタンクについてです。タンク1のヒーター
В данный момент я не могу проводить дальнейшие исследования звёзд. Я возвращаюсь к наблюдению поверхности Земли. Лунного света довольно много, 
Ma demande concerne la durée, seconde par seconde, avant et après le d
D'accord. Très intéressant. On va essayer de déterminer où cela se situe par rapport à vous. Ils mettent régulièrement à jour les prévisions concernant l'impact de la tempête tropicale S-IV. Selon nos dernières estimations, elle se situerait à peu près à la même longitude que celle que nous vous avons indiquée, mais près de zéro degré de latitude et un peu plus tard. Vous ne pourrez toujours pas
제가 언급했던 
This is Frank Borman. We've enjoyed the television shows, and we'd like you to stay tuned in in the future because there'll be flights and rendezvou
トラッキング ライトが見えるはずです - そうです - 見えません... でも、そうで
Roger. Non
好的，
上昇に4
Roger. Along with the other FAM stuff, and it's not certain that we want to do this, it's just being talked about, so this is j
Okay, Aquarius. We're looking at your gimbal and we no
실내 공기 재순환 밸브는 위쪽으로 향해 있습니다. 바로 그
لديهم خاصية تشغيل الشريط
로저. 주소 24, 53, 54는 모두 명목상의 주소이며, 연소 과정이 
現時点で私は彼らのために 360 度ロ
यह सही है। प्लस अक
هناك أمر آخر قد ترغب في أن يلقي أحدهم 
好的，阿波罗8号。俯仰角348
Хорошо. Похоже, что обычный голос может не сработать. В криогенных баках наблюдается довольно сильная дестратификация, особенно кислорода, и это заметно во время работы вентиляторов, поэтому мы обязательно напомним вам еще раз перемешать кислород перед началом работы. Все идет как часы. G&C сообщает нам, что количество топлива выглядит хорошо. Вы используете то же количество, что и прогнозировалось для вашего и для вашей юстировки. Мы скажем вам, что вы можете использовать 30 процентов на каж
좋습니다, 패널 11 구성, 맨 위 줄: AC 버스 B, S-밴드 안테나, 열림, 열림; AC 버스 A, 테이프 레코더, 열림. 두 번째 줄, 시스템 A 아래에서 메인 SOV부터 쿼드 1 TCA까지 모두 닫힘. 비행 디스플레이 아래의 지휘관 X-포인터, 열림; 랑데부 레이더 대기 히터, 열림; 착륙 레이더 히터, 열림. 자세 제어 차단기, 닫힘; ED: 로직 전원 A, 열림; 유틸리티, 열림. 아래: 슈트 팬 1, 
ठीक है। यही अगला चरण है। अगर आप 
是的，
その件につ
ठीक ह
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait pas fonctionner correctement. La métho
Das ist bestätigt. Wir haben Sie allerdings im Schatten. Sie blicken direkt auf die Triebwerksglocke zur 
Fred, nous 
Sappiamo che ci sono molti scienziati provenienti da diversi paesi che aspettano di vedere i campioni lunari, e abbiamo pensato che vi sarebbe piaciuto vederli così come sono realmente qui. Queste due scatole sono i contenitori per la restituzione dei campioni. Sono contenitori sottovuoto
حسنًا. L2 كما هو موضح. L3 كما هو موضح؛ يوجد حوالي نصف الطعام 
알았어, 켄. 쓸 게 좀 생겼어. 그게 18시 3
이글, 컬럼비아. VHF 거리 측정 설정으
네,
Хорошо, Фред. Следующий шаг — просто перевести переключатель датчика температуры и давления топлива в положение «Спуск 1», считать показания температуры топлива и кислородной смеси, затем перевести его в поло
Ou
You know one thing I noted, Jack, when I first came across here, that starting upright in the command module and heading down in Aquarius, there's a little bit of an orientation change that, even though I'd been through it once in the water tank, it still pretty unusual. I
太好了，真是棒极了。稍等片刻，还有一些事情要做。我把电
收到。第一次点火时，您的发动机消耗的推进剂比我们预想的略
Bien. Maintenant, page 32, en haut, première ligne: rayez « ». Troisième ligne: « MODE CONTROL:, ATT HOLD ». À « Moins 6 minutes », raye
ロジャー、フランク。ここでやっているのはこれです。地平線の較正を本当に必要としているんです。合計15個のマークが必要です。1つの星に3セット、もう1つの星に2セットです。一方で、私たちはそれと「〜へ」に行く必要性のバランスを取っています。あなたがすぐに「〜へ」に行きたいと思っていることも忘れてはなりません。ですから、あと2分ほどお待ちいた
Ok. I quattro RISCALDATORI saranno chiusi; DISPLAY, aperti; ANTENNA IN BANDA S, chiusa; SEQUENZA TELECAMERA sarà aperta; DISPLAY sarà aperto; TENSIONE BUS CC sarà chiusa; INVERTER 2 aperto; ECA DI SALI
Il secondo punto è, ovviamente, che quando si interrompe il controllo termico passivo, ci si trova a circa 90 gradi rispetto alla linea di terra, quindi quando si effettua quell'imbardata a sinistra, si dovrà imbardare a sinistra finché l'angolo centrale del gimbal non si avvicinerà ai 60 gradi. Si otterranno i 30 gradi aggiuntivi tramite lo scostamento tra il punto in cui è puntata la telecamera e l'asse X positivo. Ma i due valori sommati daranno un totale di circa 90. Volevamo solo assicurarci che capiste che avreste l
Okay, Houston. Wir sind in der „Burn Attitude“-Phase. Jim überprüft die Ste
プラス35、/ 63
Eagle, Columbia sta iniziando a manovrare per a
罗杰，双子星4号。S-6阶段的天气情况。请在加那利群岛和马德拉岛的背风面寻找云层，以便拍摄倾斜照片。拍摄地点位于飞船位置以南约200英里、以北约300英
मुझे लगता है कि मुझे एंटारेस दिखा
Okay. Your Orbit Nav Runs 9 and 10 do as scheduled in the Flight Plan. Do it just as you previously planned to do it. Just for information, 9 is sc
बूस्टर से अलग होने
Roger. There are two gears that we have that go around when you pull the handle back and forth. One of them is the gear that sort of acts as a ratchet, a little cylinder with a piston in it and a spike behind it that engages the ratchet. And we were having a little trouble with that before we got it open and after we got it ope
알겠
现在用剂量
Roger. Je vais regarder. Et, au fait, pou
E abbiamo poco meno di 2 minuti. Se sei ancora
ठीक है। वही टिप्पणियाँ। मैं यहाँ फिर से ऊपर से शुरू करता हूँ। ठीक है। "बैलेंस कपल" को "ऑफ" में बदल देना चाहिए। इसके नीचे, "एलएमपी" को "जेट" में बदल देना चाहिए। माइनस 2 पर "400 प्लस 1" को हटा दें; माइनस 1 पर "मास्टर आर्म, ऑन" क
नहीं, जिम। इसका संबंध इस डब्ल्यू-मैट्रिक्स से है। आपको याद होगा कि हमने इसे चंद्र कक्षा में पुनः आरंभ किया था, और फिर आपके द्वारा पहले किए गए अवलोकनों के दौरान हमने इस पर काम किया था, और अब
罗杰，你说得对。哦，我们都很
لا 
좋습니다. 다음, 두 번째, 세 번째, 
Роджер. УПРАВЛЕНИЕ НАВЕДЕНИЕМ, РЕЖИМ УПРАВЛЕНИЯ, УДЕРЖАНИЕ НАПРАВЛЕНИЯ, ВВОД; маневрирование для достижения положения, при котором крен равен 0, тангаж – 90, а рыскание – текущее значение рыскания. Это пра
रॉजर। रक्तचाप—शुरू—अभी। मेरा बैलून—अभी—मेरे नीचे काफी स्थिर है, हिल नहीं रहा है। और जाइरोस्कोप को सामान्
是的。现在我们知道（看不清）在哪儿了，下次就容易多了。第一次找开罗——要找开罗和亚历山大，我们找了好一会儿（看不清）。我其实都没看到机场，只看到了那片区域。我当时想，只要把相机对准方向，就能拍到开罗。但这次我真的拍到了机场。亚历山大也是一样。我觉
두 탱크 모두 가압식
了解しました。はっきりと聞き取れました。減圧の状況を教えていただけ
D'accord. Jack, on nous dit pour l'instant que la vitesse est plus proche de 6, 
Ricevuto. Vi mostriamo che manca poco meno di un'ora alla correzione di metà percorso 
에드는 짐을 꺼내기 시작했고, 부스터를 더 이상 조작할 수 없는 지점에 이르자 저는 그를 전폭적으로 돕기 시작했습니다. 적어도 짐을 잡아주고, 다시 넣고, 사라지지 않도록 애썼죠. 우리가 서둘러 작업할수록 오히려 더 뒤처졌습니다. 짐을 제자리에 놓지 않아서가 아니라, 예상했던 것보다 훨씬 더 오래 걸렸기 때문입니다. 무중력 상태에서의 작업은 시뮬레이터에서보다 훨씬 더 어려웠습니다. 그렇게 우리는 빙 둘러가며 작업을 계속했습니다. 카나본에 도착했을 때쯤 저는 더 이상 갈 수 없다는 것을 깨달았지만, 조금만 더
收到。加 11。/ 63330 减 163 加 129
आगे बढ़ो, आरकेवी। जेमिनी 
Roger, VIII. B
حسنًا. R1 + 27210، R2 + 35570، R3 + 33010. العنصر الثاني، كما تعلم، بسبب المناورة باستخدام أمر PROCEED مرتين؛ وبعد وضعك، تذكير لن يعيدك إلى نطاق ميت ضيق. للعودة إلى النطاق الميت 1.40 
Хорошо. Мы будем
알겠습니다. 현재 자동 레트로 컨트롤 모드입니다. - 
11번, 휴스턴. 지금 당신이 그것을 떼어내고, 접어서, 위에 올려놓는 모습이 보입니다. 계기판이 뒤쪽으로 보
Роджер. Вы видите Землю, как и мы, из нашего левого окна, чуть больше половины Земли. Мы смотрим на восточную часть Тихого океана, и в северной половине верхней половины экрана мы видим Северную Америку, Аляску, Соединенные Штаты, К
Да, вид очень хорошо виден. Нос самолета немного опустился за горизонт, а теперь снова под
Je n'y suis pas encore. Je dirais environ 25 à 30 degrés. Je stoppe le lacet pour l'instant. Le périscope vérifie la visée avec la fenêtre et le réticule, et je vais bientôt faire un repère pour essayer de stabiliser tous les mouvements. Je suis presque en position rétr
罗杰，金丝雀
Non, je n'ai rien mangé depuis mon Carnarvon Aero-Med Pass, mais j'ai sorti la nourriture et je vais bientôt comme
D'accord. Puissance 6. D'
Okay. Das wäre erl
Super! Bon, je suis content de l'état du carburant. On a du 95 (pourcen
आप मैदान पर काफी अच्छे दिख रहे है
كانو كاب كوم، هذا سيجما سفن. على
ジャック、覚えた手順を全部読んで、ちゃんと理解しているか確認しましょう。ASCEN
Roger. L'ho 
收到，Woomera。我完全明白你的意思。我需要逆
Sigma S
Okay. Ich denke, ihr braucht zwei Lithiumhydroxid-Kanister für Kommandomodule, eine Rolle graues Klebeband, die beiden „S“, weil wir die Beutel daraus verwenden werden, und eine Pappkarte, von der ihr etwa 4 cm 
分かりました。それは良いことです。
Roger. Se mi stai leggendo ora, so
Мы пересматриваем ваши те
1 second 
ठीक
روجر. الاستعدادات تسير على ما يرام من جانبي. أشعر أنني بخير، 
نعم، كل هذا التدريب الإضافي يؤتي ثماره ف
रॉजर। धन्यवाद, ब्रूस। दूसरे मुद्दे पर एक 
罗杰，你是想
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Можете смело запускать этот 37-й, и мы тоже буд
Roger. Mir ist aufgefallen, dass die Strahlen im östlichen Bereich hinter dem Objekt dunkler erschienen. Buzz, ich verstehe, dass d
Okay. In Zeile 4 ist AUTO TRANSFER geschlossen. UPDATA LINK ist geöffnet; VHF A und B sind ge
Думаю, мы выя
Roger, reentry checkl
Roger. Latitudes
Хор
Зеленый фильтр — лучший в
了解。イーグル。同意します。ジンバル角度の調整を待機してください。それから、イーグル、司令船の直接酸素供給装置がそこに設置されている間、客室気圧が5.4～5.5程度になれば、客室
Très bien. Je pass
Sehr gut. Hier spricht Canary Surgeon, der Sie
ठीक 
- - そしてP
Na klar. Da
夕焼けはなかなか印象的だ。眺めるのに時間を無駄にする必要はないと思う。とても興味深い。もう一つ魅力的なのは、目が慣れていないと黒く見えることだ。窓に確かにコーティングが見える。この時点で VOX に戻って UHF-hi で送信する。バイザーを開けて右のマイクを拭く。舐めてしまった。バイザーを閉じる。スーツの回路が機能するようにバイザーはすぐに密閉された。またそれで汚れたくない。スーツの吸気口は約 68 度で非常にう
That's affirmative, Jim. And in row 4, under HEATERS, we want them all - Correction - we wan
짐에게 이제 좀 서투르다고 전해줘. 위험 고도를 우리가 여기서 예측하는 값
हाँ। मुझे बहुत आराम महसूस हुआ, और चलना भी बहुत आरामदायक ह
现在是了
Would you sa
È
حسنًا. R1 زائد 0.34202، R2 ناقص 0.07374، R3 زائد 0.3
But th
Roge
네, 휴스턴입니다. CMP입니다. 업데이트할 내
الوضع الرجعي تلقائي؛ سحب المنظار تلقائي؛ مفتاح المناورة مُطفأ؛ ذراع المنظار مرفوع؛ طاقة UHF عالية؛ الإرسال على UHF؛
分かりました。パネル3：バッテリー充電、オフ。ジャック、これはもうやったでしょう。次はACインバーター。パネル5：メインバス接続、BAT B/CをBAT B/Cに接続。え？はい、上です。上側です。回路ブレーカー、BAT A パワーエントリー/ポストランディング、
D
아무런 답변도 받지 
ああ、分かりました。ありがとうございます。終わりました。酸素濃度の高値チェックをするはずだったのですが、フライト
分かりまし
好的，乔
分かり
نعم. إنه جهاز معقد للغاية معلق بهذه الخراطيم الآن. وذلك المهندس المصمم... لأنه يبدو أنه يعمل ب
Об
わかりました。
नहीं, बिल्कुल नहीं (खांसी) - बिलकुल नहीं। हम लगभग 15 डिग्री प्
वे प्रेम के बारे में
पुनः प्रवेश काफी अच्छा चल रहा है। सहायक अवमंदन दोलनों को काफी हद तक नियंत्रित कर रहा है। हम अभी 1 1/2 g के बल पर हैं। एक बड़ा जलता हुआ
我们想再确认一下，当我们把隧道通风阀关回/DELTA-P时，读数大约是1.7-1.75，现在缓慢上升到大约——哦，我想说略低于2.2
ठीक है। चलिए देखते हैं कि मैंने सब कुछ सही समझा है या नहीं। सबसे पहले, हमें CB 16 INVERTER 2 को बंद करना है, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2 को भी बंद करना
Roger. Entry PAD: area is the mid Pacific, roll 000, 152
아폴로 13호, 휴
D'accord, Jack. Maintenant, tu peux range
ロジャー、宇宙船の方向を定
هيوستن. حسنًا. أريدك أن تتحقق من حساباتي للتأكد
Je tirais e
好的。既然我们已经离开月球，我想简单介绍一下食物方面的一些进展。我相信你们已经见过这种饮料容器了。
Was 
روجر، فهمت. الثورة 41. 06 01 44، D-9 وفي أي
알겠습니다. 이벤트 타
रॉजर। हम अभी केबिन प्रेशर को नियंत्रित करने पर काम कर रहे हैं, और CSM (प्रेशर इक्वलाइजेशन) के साथ डेकल पर काम कर रहे हैं। हम स्टेप 13 पर हैं, जहाँ हम केबिन प्रेशर के 5 होने का इ
Sto bene. Pronto, torno indietro. Deve trattenermi (ritardarmi). La capsula... vorrei risolvere questo problema che ovviamente hai riscontrato sul circuito della tuta. Ho avuto pochissima fortuna nell'abbassarla. Aumenterò l'impostazione a 8 in questo momen
看起来好像……向右偏
हम आपको खूब पानी पीने की सलाह देना चाहते हैं। हमें लगता है कि आप कम पानी पी रहे हैं। हमने आपके डोज़ीमीटर की रीडिंग ले ली है। इसके अलावा, हम बस यह जानना चाहते थे कि आप कैसा महसूस कर रहे हैं। हमने देखा है कि आप लगभग 15 घंटे सोते हैं - फ्रैंक और बिल लगभग 10 घंटे और जिम भी लगभग उतना ही सोते हैं। हम यह जानना चाहते थे कि आप कैसा म
Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы получили часть
Roger. Juste un petit rappel: n’oubliez pas de remettre à zéro les er
Ist alles fertig? Ich stelle es mal wi
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 제가 보여드리는 건데
Да, с
Okay
— это Атрия. Возможно, вы это 
了解。UHF-2に切り
Und Houston, Eagle. Werdet ihr den High Gain nutzen, bevor ihr euch unseren GDA-Posi
Gemini VI, Houston.
Хорошо. Отлично, Фред. Мы поня
Роджер, Колумбия.
Frank, quello che vogliamo fare è ottenere una spinta radiale verso l'alto; e finché riesci, attraverso l'ottica o q
低ビットレートでスタート。原色
روجر. نقطة الدخول: المنطقة هي وسط المحيط الهادئ، الإحداثيات 000، 152، 001، 194 46 06، 267، خط العرض + 1332، - 16917، 064، 36194، 649، المدى المتبقي 14045، 36275
素晴らしい！完璧な地平線チェックができたの初めてだ。シミュレーターで非現実的な地平線を探すのに何時間も費やした。よし、地平
मैं आपको बता दूं, क्रू सिस्टम्स के उन लड़कों
Gemelli VI
Oui. Nous pensons 
Roger. Nous ne le ferons pas. Le président est toujours en fonction, et notre objectif est de vous fa
Bene. 
Roger. Mike's having his first l
Lo chiedo. Non ero sicuro di averlo copiato cor
Zwillinge 4, Kanarischer Chirurg. Hat der ganze Schlaf v
Sì. Probabilmente non lo farò quando il sole entrerà nel mio telescopi
روجر. يبدو الوضع طبيعيًا هنا. كل شيء يبدو جيدًا. لديّ 55% من وقود الوضع التلقائي. نمرّ على ارتفاع 70,000 قدم، 65,000. الوضع مستقر جدًا. نقترب من 60 ألف قدم. نظام التحكم في معدل الهبوط يعمل بشكل ممتاز. نقترب من 50 ألف قدم. تبدو الطائرة رائعة. نقترب من 45,000 قدم. انخفضت قوة التسارع إلى حوالي 1 جي. أستعد للضغط على دواسة الوقود، عند 40، 41 ألف قدم. أضغط على دواسة الوقود، وفجأة ينطفئ المحرك. يمكنك سماعه؛ لا أستطيع رؤيته بسبب الغيوم. الوضع مستقر. ذراع التحكم اليدوي في وضع التشغيل. الوقود ينفد بسرعة كبيرة. أستطيع رؤية المحرك الآن. يبدو جيدًا جدًا. سأقوم بتفعيل نظام التخميد الإضافي أيضًا. في الواقع، لست بحاجة إليه. نظام التحكم في معدل الهبوط
휴스턴입니다. 금리가 매우 안정적인 것 같습니다. 금리 변동폭이 완전
나쁘진 않아요. 여기 좀 덥네요. 잠들려고 할 때 더 따뜻해지는 것 같아요. 
感觉当速度降到110左右的时候，你就只能一直追着他跑。你把球放进去——从一个轴上插进去，它就穿过——从另一个
Роджер. 0
阿波罗8号，休斯
Н
네, 휴스턴입니다. 잘 들립니다. 주의/경고 점검 1단계, 진행하시면 됩니다. 경고등은 ASCENT PRESS, CES AC, CES DC입니다. 히터 경고등만 켜질 수
好的，我们试试看，现在正在为您播放一
알겠
로저, 
Roger. Panelübersicht: Die Sicherungsschalter auf der linken Seite sind wie zuvor beschrieben, daher keine Wiederholung. Der Zünder ist scharfgeschaltet. Die automatische Rückwärtsauslösung ist deaktiviert. Moduswahl: Normal, Auto, Kre
That's about as 
Aurora S
روجر. عرض رائع على الرادار. يؤسفني بشدة أن صديقنا جوليان لم يتمكن من الانضمام إلينا. أود أن أقدم لكم تقريري عن وضع التحكم. بدايةً، الوضع اليدوي والوضع الإلكتروني المنخفض ممتازين؛ التخميد الإضافي يعمل بشكل ممتاز. أنا الآن في الوضع التلقائي؛ وضعية الرجوع للخلف. الوضعيات ثابتة بشكل رائع. أنا جاهز للانطلاق. درجة حرارة بذلتي ترتفع قليلاً. لقد ضبطتها على 4
今日はかなり調子が良いです。フライトプランを見直すと、休憩時間をもう少し短く、もっと頻繁にした方が良いかもしれません。そうすればうまくいくかもしれません。昨日は完全にバランスを崩
Donc nous n'avons pas perdu tout le gain de navigation q
물병자리, 휴스턴. 올바른 관측 자세에서 2단계 각도로 밖을 내다보면, 태양이 12시 방향, 즉 지도 상단과 중앙의 중간쯤에 위치해야 합니다
ننصحك بخفض صم
알겠습니다. 최종 단계 경과 시간 시작 1 + 29 + 17; GET, 5 + 16 + 54; Delta-VT, 33.0; 지속 시간, 41초; 코어 25, 00301; 26, 90135; 27, 0
A
备用氧气瓶已关闭。我的也一样。废气阀已
いい読み返しだったよ、バズ。さあ、
わかりました、ロジャー。ゲー
看起来我在水面上很稳。鞭状天线已经升起来了
我们输了——提前着陆的唯一优势是，如果我们能减速——也就是降低功率。提前着陆的唯一优势在于，你可以现在进行一次大功率点火，然后进行中途减速。否则，我们就必
जिम, सब ठीक लग रहा ह
Attivazione se
こちら側
자, 이제 뒤쪽 어댑터와 장비를 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 분리면이 보이는데, 아주 깨끗합니다. 추진기도 깨끗하고요.
11, Houston. È negativo. Tutto quello che devi fare è accenderlo. Andr
Neil, Neil, ici Houston. Je vous 
ヒュー
It should be getting 
Ост
Wenn Sie über Ascension fliegen, möchte ich versuchen, dort einen Kontrollpunkt zu finden. Die Funkverbindung zwischen 
لا أعتقد أننا ال
Колебание
好的。嗯，我们刚才传授给你的这种态度还不太符合终结者的理念，请
Okay. The time is - The event will be at; and we're to maneuver to the following attitude; roll 101.0, pitch 090.0, yaw all zips. High gain angles will be pitch minus 23, yaw 93. And we're to use normal procedures to damp the rates. And after damping the rates and before spinup, we're to put the on the sextant with the magazine G, very high-speed black and white film. Then, we
ランデブーレーダーのセルフテストが完了したら、私に知らせて
Gemini 4, RKV Su
Bon, lors de ce dernier passage, nous avons pris environ 38 photos 
네. 알겠습니다, 13번
Да. Послушайте, в конце первого дня у меня были большие проблемы со зрением. Я не был уверен, что справлюсь. Но сейчас все прошло. Думаю, наша небольшая проблема решилась благодаря теплообменнику
로저. 지금 보시는 모습은 동태평양에 있는 우주선에서 바라본 지구 중심부입니다. 하와이 제도는 아직 육안으로 포착하지 못했지만, 북미 서해안은 선
了解しました。現在OMNI D（Dog）をご利用いただいているため、高利得ロックアンテナの位相が180度ずれています。高利得ロック
Gémeaux VI
Okay. Das wäre in Ordnung, und ich werde für Sie die Zeit im 
Jack,... die Sonnen
Beau spectacle. Vous allez dans la bo
أبولو 8، هيوستن. اكتمل 
はい、
ठीक है। मुझे पता है कि आप चुप रहने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं, इसलिए मैं आपको कुछ जानकारी पढ़कर सुनाता हूँ। अभी-अभी हमें एक ऐसी जानकारी मिली है जिससे आपको शायद थोड़ा भरोसा हो जाए। अगर आपका ऑक्सीजन क्रायो टैंक खराब हो जाता है, तो आपके पास अभी 80 पाउंड बचे हैं। सिंगल टैंक ऑपरेशन में अभी सबसे बड़ी बाधा हाइड्रोजन टैंक है, जिसका मार्जिन पॉजिटिव है। अगर हम 
D'accord. C'est exact. Donc, en résumé, il va falloir allumer le système et lancer la boule de cristal, puis régler l'orientation, placer le drone dans le hublot et activer le guidage. Il faudra ensuite orienter manuellement le vaisseau spatial de façon à ce que le centre de la Terre soit aligné avec l'axe Z. Puis, effectuer une rotation autour de l'axe Z pour placer la pointe du c
了解。ディーク、操縦モードは手動、ジャイロはケージ、操縦スイッチはオフ。燃料は
रॉजर। सम
알겠
Apollo 8, Houston. If you can stick your polarizing filter in front of the camera without disturbing anything else, it might improve the quality sligh
하
Okay. R
Хорошо, Джим. Мы все еще обдумываем этот вопрос, но некоторые соображ
当它小头朝前时，可以360°旋转，但当它向
ठीक 
ठीक है। जैक, अभी हमें बताया गया है कि यह 6 के करीब है, और - लेकिन व
하와이, 제미니 6호. 저희는 데이터 포인트를 제공하지 않았습니다... 따라서 저희가 어떤 종류의 면외 속도를 가지고 있는지 알고
Man, you're looking
우리가 졌어 - 일찍 끝내는 유일한 장점은, 만약 우리가 출력을 줄일 수 있다면, 다시 줄일 수 있다는 거야. 일찍 끝내는 유일한 장점은 지금 크게 연소하
روجر، بيل. شكرًا لكما، هل يمكنكما تزويدنا بالقراءة متى ما سنحت لكما الفرصة؟ وبالنسبة للقراءة، فهذا مناسب تمامًا للبدء. يبدو أن نجمكما الأول، وهو رقم 14، سيكون جيدًا حتى حوالي...
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। कोलंबिया... ऊपर। उस समय मैंने अपनी नज़रें सेक्स्टेंट पर गड़ाए रखीं, इस उम्मीद में कि मुझे एलएम से परावर्तित प्रकाश की एक झलक मिल 
Moi aus
Et, Jim, nous avons ici une longue procédure pour mettre sous tension et allumer les instruments afin de pouvoir véri
Votre é
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы действительно впечатлены четкостью и детализацией изображения. Цвета — сейчас, когда я смотрю на него на нашем мониторе, это действительно отличное изображение, которое появляется примерно через 12 секунд после того, как телеканалы успевают его передать, из-за преобразования, которое происходит здесь, на нашем ТВ-конвертере. Мы смотрим на элементы управления на главной панели
D'accord, Houston. Nous avons besoi
로저. 페리신시안 플러스 2, 빠른 반환, / 61503, 마이너스 158, 플러스 131, 플러스 59578,
حسنًا. دعني
Kommunikationstechnike
D'accord. Si je comprends bien, si on regarde la patte du chat, c'est à peu près à son majeur, un peu à une ou deux heures de son majeur. C'es
Nun,
Columbia, Columbia, hier spricht Houston. 
روجر. آسف على هذا الأمر المتسرع، لكن كان لدينا عطل ما هنا؛ لذلك كان علينا أن نعطيك 
Roger, Jim. Comprenez bien que la lumière du soleil pénètre dans le télescope de balayage, ce qui rend toute observation impossible; vous devez don
好的，收到。这是第57版，序列号16，格林尼治标准时间08:11。偏航角12°，俯仰角30°，使用16毫米相机。
Mann, wir 
D'accord. Il nous reste à discuter des deux attitudes à adopter pour compenser la buée sur la vitre centrale. Dès que vous aurez un moment, nous aimerions connaître votre avis à ce sujet 
Okay. Bedienfeld 3: BATTERIELADUNG, AUS – das hast du schon gemacht, Jack – als nächstes der Wechselrichter. Bedienfeld 5: HAUPTBUSVERBIN
再往前一点。就让她停在那儿，别动。它总是往上滑一点；你能再往终结者方向
よし、フレッド。その前に、つまりマイナス1時間前に、機体を以下の角度に操縦しろ。ロール130°、ピッチ125°、ヨー0.12.4°。対応するジンバル角度は、ロール291°、ピッチ196°、ヨー0.45°。これでパッドだ。以上だ。コンピューターは君のものだ、アクエ
了解、ジョー。JETTの姿勢は、サービスモジュールの通常の分離時と同様に、上向きで機体から外れた状態になることを理解してほしい。左JETT姿勢への操縦が終わったら、すぐに上昇してハッチを閉じ、通気弁が開いている
तुमने मेरी कार की विंडशील्ड पर दाग लगा दिए, गंदे कुत्
C
धन्यवाद। बस अब ऊपर हमारे लिए उस परिक्रमा करने वाले अड
You've got everybody s
Clairement en dessous de moi. Je le suivais du regard depuis Carnarvon. Jusqu'à Carnarvon, il était en dessous de nous, puis il est monté jusqu'à l'horizon, avant de redescendre en dessous. On aurait presque dit qu'il était sur une orbite différente de la mienne. Son apogée et son périgée étaient différents des miens. Bref, j'ai tenté de le rattraper au lever du jour, dès que j'ai pu le localiser. Comme je l'ai dit, à ce moment-là, il se trouvait à un ou deux kilomètres devant moi, en dessous. Plus j'essayais de me rapprocher, moins je gagnais de terrain. Je tirais en rétrograde. J'utilisais mes propulseurs supérieurs de manière à réduire ma vitesse totale, et je tirais… simultanément. Je ne suis jamais vraiment parvenu à le rattraper, et il a continué à s'éloigner. Il m'est apparu évident qu'une fois arrivés à Hawaï, pour rattraper le lanceur à temps pour la sortie extravéhiculaire, nous épuiserions probablement tout le carburant embarqué. Or, le protocole aéroporté interdisait cette manœuvre. J'ai donc consulté le commandant de bord et nous avons décidé de ne pas poursuivre la partie de la mission concernant le propulseur. Je ne sais pas si je l'ai mentionné, mais lors de la séparation du propulseur, nos mouvements semblaient faibles, de l'ordre d'un demi-degré par seconde en tangage et en lacet. J'ai tenté de les atténuer. J'ai émis une impulsion dans chaque direction, puis je me suis concentré sur la séparation du propulseur. Nous nous sommes séparés, et ce, de la manière dont nous avions généré d'autres mouvements. Nous nous sommes finalement remis à l'endroit et avons 
Okay, Houston. Der CMP-Typ ist um [Uhrzeit einfügen] wach. Der LMP-Typ schläft jetzt und schläft durch bis [Uhrzeit einfügen], dann versuche ich, den Schlafrh
あなた以上に私たちのためにでき
了解。ずっとハイビットでいるつもりですか？それともすぐにロービット
了解
ठीक ह
حسنًا. سأتركه جانبًا يا باز؛ سيب
회전식 
Roger, Jim. Wir dachten, es könnte euch interessieren, dass wir nach zweieinhalb Stunden Streckenaufzeichnung seit eurer letzten Kurskorrektur und mit Blick auf die Zukunft vorhersagen, dass die Kurskorrektur weniger als 0,3 Meter pro Sekunde betragen wird. Und wenn wir das bis zum Einflug in die Kurve in z
Houston, Apoll
Okay
挿入チェックリストを確認中です。DC電圧はメインです。レトロマニュアルのヒューズスイッチはオフです。レトロマニュアルもオフです。計器類はすべて正常です。バッテリーもすべて正常です。交流電源も良好です。ところで、ブースターはどこでしょうか？ 下に美しい雲模様がありますね。ブースターは大きな雲模様の前
Sì. Ti invieremo i dati tra circa altre 
好了，
Okay. And before you go ahead with this, let's establish high bit rate and wait 1 on that. And then as we go through the procedure we want you to wait when you get power on MAIN B so we can take a look at MAIN B without any loads o
切れたライトは読み取り
I've got some other information. We shouldn't have some good dope on your trajectory for about 2 hours. Looked like to us that the burn was real good, however, and we're taking a close look at
알
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir haben noch einmal nachgefragt, und es scheint keinerlei Prob
Hous
아니요, 빌. 작업이 끝나면 다시 돌아가겠습
في الحقيقة، المقصود هو 
Well, let me see. I don't know whether to put my gloves on or not. How's everything look over there? Not bad, huh? I believe I'll try it without them. Let me s
रॉजर। मुझे यहाँ ड्रिफ्टिंग करने में बहुत मज़ा आ रहा है। इतना मज़ा आ रहा है कि मैंने अभी तक खाना नहीं ख
आपको पता है, अगर आप इस हैंड कंट्रोलर को सिम्युलेटर की तरह, न्यूनतम आवेग के साथ, ज़ोर से मारते हैं, तो यह आगे की ओर टकराएगा और वापस
收到。请稍等。在阿波罗D-9第四次试飞中，我们观测了心宿二和天蝎座。我们
窓について
Put a new tape c
Houston, Apollo 8. We're in the process of doing t
Der Kollege 
रॉजर। यहाँ स
알겠습니다. 먼저, 중간 항로 수정은 아마 104시간쯤에 이루어질 것이고, 우리가 목표로 하는 것은 델타-V가 초당 4~6피트(약 1.2~1.8미터) 정도입니다. 네, 이게 첫 번째 항목입니다. 이제 소모품에 대해 간략하게 설명드리겠습니다. 네. 현재 1498암페어시(Ah)가 남아 있습니다. 즉, 61시간 동안 평
Давайте проверим, действительно ли мы получаем рыскание. Они, как правило, поднимаются относительно меня, а не отходят назад. При таком освещении я действительно вижу иллюзию видимости из-з
Okay, Fred. Die Anleitung, die ich für dich habe, befindet sich am Ende de
أوه، نحن في وضع PULSE، ولا نصدر أوامر 
रॉजर।
حسنًا. نوصي بالتوقف عند 54 45 00، وهذا سيضعك تقريبًا عند زاوية الدوران المناسبة. الوضعية التي نوصي بها هي: دوران 263، ميل 90، انحراف 00. هذا يسمح لك برؤية الأرض من النافذة رقم 1 في وحدة القيادة، ويضع هوائي الكسب
Ok, sta per arrivare il Ree
Хорошо, на панели 250, CB BAT A POWER, ENTRY and POSTLANDING, закрыто; BAT B POWER ENTRY and POS
C'est dommage, il ne me reste qu'un peu moins d'une demi-heure pour m'amuser. Je passe en mode de pilotage automatique à basse altitude. Gyroscopes libres, je pique du nez pour observer le phare de Durban. Gyroscopes libres, pilotage automatique à basse altitude, correction, je passe en mode pr
हां, हमने एचएफ चेक के साथ प्रयोग शुरू करते समय ए
Roger. Ci stiamo avvicinando al percorso di avvicinamento all'accensione. Questo equivale a 13 minuti prima dell'a
收到。您还将在 RKV 通行期间收到 9 至 13 
سأ
Роджер. У нас тут «Интерстеллар Таймс», номер от 24 декабря. Ваша телепрограмма имела большой успех. Сегодня утром её посмотрели в большинстве стран вашей соседней планеты — Земли. Её транслировали в прямом эфире по всей Европе, включая даже Москву и Восточный Берлин, а также в Японии, всей Се
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们希望在刻录前删除
Ok, Jack. Non avevo intenzione di resettare la valvola DROP ISOL del quad Charlie. Vuoi che lo faccia io? Ok. L'abbiamo appena provata e si vedono i pali da barbiere del quad Alfa e del Charli
Anche laggiù tutto 
J'ai effectivement une couche de voi
Oui, nous n'en av
ジャック、特に私のような初心者にとって、ここの良い点の一つは、動きやすさ
良好。000 304 000、該当なし、000
Get set. 
Нет, мы это сделаем довольно скоро, но нам нужна высокая скорость передачи данных, и мы не хотим, чтобы вы нам это пр
Gemin
Ok, Jack. Parliamo di come raggiungere l'assetto e poi accendere il motore. Sto parlando delle tecniche di controllo. Per come stanno le cose ora, cercherò di fermare la navicella in imbardata con la Terra fuori dal finestrino, poi saremo in GUIDA o in CONTROLLO; saremo in imbardata e saremo in CONTROLLO MODALITÀ. Poi useremo il per controllare il beccheggio e poi il rollio. Non vedo un altro
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Can you repeat your last
Ici Friendship Seven. Je reçois des indications erratiques sur tous les axes. Lorsque je corrige l'attitude orbitale à l'aide des instruments, je suis considérablement décalé par rapport à ma position idéale. Je suis incliné d'environ 20° vers la droi
Si prega di notare che il pilota comandante st
अपोलो 8, हम उच्च लाभ प्राप्त करना चाहेंगे, और जब हमें वह मिल जाएगा, तो हम डेटा डंप करना श
Bene. E per quanto riguarda il tracciamento che abbiamo ora, sembra che il tempo che ti abbiamo dato ieri sera per il pericinzio sia ancora buono, 69 più 10 e in questo momento l'altitudine del tuo sorvolo terrestre del pericinzio è di 65,8. Sembra che il numero 3 a
D'accord. Le titre principal est « Entrée, PRÉPARATION LM, moins 6 heures ». Premièrement, ALIMENTATION NORMALE BAT 5, ON; deuxiè
मुझे कोई शिकायत नहीं मिली, लेकिन एक मिनट रुकिए; मुझे एक विस्त
ठीक है; एकदम बढ़िया। जिम की एक
非常有趣的地形照片。我拍一张地平线的照片留作纪念。当时，这张照片是A编
了解しました。もう一つコメントがあります。データ優先会議で多くの議論を呼んだように、地平線を捉えるには10度のピッチアップ姿勢が最適なようです。そうすれば、走査望遠鏡を通してランドマークを追跡することができます。それ以上ピッチダウンすると、トラニオンをフルアップして
でのあの演奏は本当に素晴らしかった。皆さんの演奏はまさに完璧で、本当に信じられません
Ok, Vance. 
C'est quoi cette pet
حسنًا. ننصحك باستخدام كل الفيلم المتاح. هذه تجربتك الأخيرة. استخدم كل الفيل
هيوستن، كولومبيا. هل تريدني أن أستس
Core 03,33649; Core 04,64690; Core 65,01059; Core 66,65460; Core 07,34726; Core 
收到。控制模式：手动；陀螺仪正常；机动开关已关闭。燃料剩余45%；氧气剩余70%，或者更正一下，氧气剩余80%至100%。宇航服温度68华氏
Роджер. Думаю, единственная проблема — это схема кос
Zanzibar Cap Com, Friendship Seven sur HF. Je vois de longs nuages ​​striés en contrebas, qui s'étendent vers ma droite pour former une sorte
J'ai remarqué à plusieurs reprises, en passant de la lumière du soleil à l'ombre, qu'au moment précis où je pénètre dans l'ombre, un reflet supplémentaire sur le *** s'ajoute à celui de mon visage sur la visière, ce qui réduit considérablement la visibilité à la transition *** entre la lumière du soleil et l'ombre. En fait, il y a te
I've seen quite a display of stars... I've seen the southern hemisphe
11, Houston. Sembra che qui 
И, Хьюстон, сейчас сомнительно, что мы сможем увидеть звезды в таком положении. Един
È vero? Ne ho scattate molte, m
Okay. Das war perfekt
تخلصت من العدسات؛ آمل أن يكونوا قد رحلوا.
알겠습니다. 돔 온도는
Хорошо. Похоже, купол немного опу
Роджер. Спасибо, Gemini 4. Возвращаемся к связи с центром управления во
阿波罗
はい、とてもいいですね。3回か4回に1回は良いものをあ
Роджер. А вы... вы бы выбрали режим "Удержание позиции"? Конец с
مكتو
Jack, deine Kabinen-REGs werden noch aufgeholt, aber du kannst die Abwasserentlüftung jetzt wieder öffnen, und wir werden die Schließzeit 
Do you have me a time
रॉजर, फ्रेड। बढ़िया रीडबैक। पैनल 16 से शुरू करते हैं। फ़्लाइट डिस्प्ले के अंतर्गत, पंक्ति 1: SE क्रॉस-पॉइंटर, खुला; सिस्टम ब्रावो - क्वाड 1 TCA, बंद; क्वाड 2, बंद; क्वाड 3, बंद; क्वाड 4, बंद। दूसरी पंक्ति, लाइटिंग के अंतर्गत: फ़्लड आपकी पसंद है। आप इन्हें लॉजिक पावर ब्रावो, खुला; सूट फ़्लो कंट्रोल, खुला, के रूप में उपयोग कर सकते हैं। तीसरी पंक्ति, डिस्प्ले, खुला; VHF A ट्रांसमीटर, खुला; VHF B रिसीवर, खुला; S-बैंड एंटीना, खुला। चौथी पंक्ति, हीटर के अंतर्गत: डिस्प्ले, खुला;
Now we're over the Mediterranean. It is very easy to recognize. I see a couple of very large ships. T
Роджер. Все остальные переключатели на правой панели работают нормально, за исключением предохранителей Retrojetison и Retromanua
哥
你说我们现在可能连另一个都没有
Давай, 8
了解。ヨーイングでどれくらい戻らなければならなかった
D'accord, Jim. Je crois que je comprends Jack maintenant. Mais ce qu'on veut, c'est qu'il nous donne une commande de réinitialisation. Et ensuite, qu'il mette le chauffage hors tension, qu'
RKV. Wir möchten die SPC-Last 
Roger. Freundschaft Sieben. 2 plus 38 plu
はい、見てみましょう。電
Хорошо, Джо. Последнее, что я получ
罗杰。所有适配器电池的电流读数均为 2 安培，电压读数均为 24 伏。RCS 环工作正常。备用氧气瓶工作正常。主电池的电流读数为 9 安培，电压读数约为 22.5 至 23 伏。控制总线（无法辨认），S2 为 26，S2 为 26
Roger, Houston. Un instant. Êtes-
Très bien. Si vous êtes prêt, donnez votre note et nous pa
알겠습니다. 다음 단계로 진행하겠습니다. 수정, 3페이지, 체크아웃. 1단계, 1단계를 수행하십시오. 경고등은 ASCENT PRESS, CES AC, CES DC입니
L'Apollo 11 sta osservando per la prima volta l'avvicinamento. Questa volta sorvoleremo il cratere Taruntius, e le immagini e le mappe riportate dagli Apollo 8 e 10 ci hanno dato un'ottima anteprima di cosa vedere qui. Assomiglia molto alle immagini, ma è come guardare una vera partita di calcio e guardarla in TV. Non c'è niente che possa
Хорошо, Джим. Полагаю, ты описал нам немоторную
Roger. Bedi
Houston, Tranquillité. J'ai utilisé Capella lors de la dernière observation, et c'est assez près du bord. Assez loin du centre du cran 4. Je me demande s'il serait judicieux d'utiliser Alpheratz, étoile numéro 1. Ce serait peut-être un peu plus près. Cependant, cela retarderait un peu les choses, car je devrai
هذه هي الصداقة السابعة. سلبي، ليس في الوقت الحالي. سأبدأ
好的。我再
لا عليك يا جاك. 
好的。我拿到了一份…
ठीक है, अगर आप तैयार हैं, तो मैं आपको आपातकालीन वॉइस चेक दूंगा। इसके ल
좋습니다. 하나 더 알
Okay, wir müssen Ihre Plattf
मेरे पास आपके लिए कुछ समय है। क्या आपन
Odyssey, Houston. Ihr macht alles richtig. 
Ну, кроме одного большого, который мы проехали, кажется, в нашем районе их не было. После установки EASEP я прогулялся обратно, и пока Базз начал распаковывать задокументированные образцы, я прошёлся к кратеру позади нас, диаметром примерно 70 или 80 футов и глубиной 15 или 20 футов, и сделал несколько фотографий. На дне были камни довольно крупных размеров, з
わかった、ジャック。これが君に渡したタイムラインのメモだ。言いたくないのだが、入国チェックリストにいくつか訂正がある。訂正というより
ابحث عن خطة الرحلة أيضًا أثناء 
Фред, я бы посоветовал тебе, когда твое окно снова окажется обращенным к Земле, сделать еще один снимок, и в то же время, тебе, вероятно, следует начать все сначала. Возможно,
D'accord, Aquarius. Nous travaillons sur la suite des opérations. En attendant, nous allons déconnecter certains éléments à forte consommation. Sur le panneau 11, ouvrez DECA POWER et DECA GIMBAL.
Bien reçu. Le roulis à portance nulle ne s'applique qu'aux manœuvres terminales. Toutes vos ma
11, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы попытаться
好的。检
我们在 OMNI D 上，我们听说——之后我们就失去了你的消息—
Nessun problema, Jim. Vai avanti e aprili, T
नहीं। पहले मुझे स्कैनर क
Bon, je suppose que je fera
Buzz, ti abbiamo visto mettere la protezio
Roger, la température de votre onduleur est de 1
مرحباً هاوا
わかった。ジャック、電
تفضل. نحن
- - dorm
好的，我这
That's right, Jack. What I'm going to do is - We'll stop with the Earth in the commander's window, the down, and then I'm going to maneuver the spacecraft so that I have the lighted portion of the Earth at the top of the window; that is, the will be along the plus-Y of the spacec
Ich lege jetzt gleich eine Ro
了解しました。ヘリウムの温度と圧力はどうですか？O
了解しました、ジャック。近いうちにお願いしたいことの一つは、O2タン
了解。月が月
Roger, Houston. A few words on our optics tracking system. I used AUTO OPTICS for control points 1 and 2 on the backside, and they worked beautifully, tracked both the targets for me. And I went to the control point 3 as designated in our orbital control book 
ゴールドストーン、ヒューストンCAP通信。
好的。接下来是指令舱的照片。从指令舱可能不太容易看到服务舱，但如果能看到的话，应该可以通过5号窗口看到，这里的人都这么认为。建议使用70毫米镜头。这些照片的优先级是2。所以这是70毫米EL镜头，上面装了80毫米镜头，所有这些都在B-3舱。取下80毫米镜头，换上250毫米镜头。250毫米镜头在U-4舱。使用A-13舱的CEX胶片。使用A-7舱的环形瞄准器，这些照片是8张，放大倍率为250。我想你们现在可能都已经配置好这些相机了，这些信息可能有点多余，但还是写在这里吧。完毕
それは肯定です、私は次
分かりました。ジャック、これは長い手順で、おそらく2、3ページかかります。これは、あなたが先ほど送られてきた公称構成、もしく
Et, 11, Houston. Pour votre information, Eagle, un voyant d'alerte de l'ISS s'est allumé vers 3 h 19 en raison d'une surchauffe d'une unité de contrôle-commande
아폴로 8호의 '리셋 명령'으
罗杰，友谊七号，
では、ジャック。次のページにある「O2フローインジケーターの増加がないことを確認」まではすべて問題
알겠습니다. 그곳
哈哈！哈哈！你上次去灌木丛里，我的脚蹼上还留着黑色的刹车痕迹呢。好了，你看，我又向右偏航了。我得往右偏——更正一下，我向左偏航了。我得往右偏航，月亮就在地平
Роджер. Слить сточные воды до 10 процентов с обратной стороны. Использовать предварительно, криогенные нагреватели включить в режим AUTO, зарядить батарею B, пока я
Er hat sie sich angesehen, aber bi
حسنًا يا بيل. لقد تم اقتراح أنهم يرغبون في أن تجرب تبديل القطبين، كما تعلم، قطب أصفر وقطب أزر
Going to 
アポロ8号。こちら
好的，阿波罗8号。我们已经查看了数据，情况良好，他们认为只要准备好了，就可以随时恢复姿态控制。如果可以的话，那就去做吧
ها! ها! ما زالت آثار الانزلاق السوداء على زعانف السباحة من رحلتك إلى الأدغال. حسنًا، كما ترى، انحرفتُ يمينًا مرة أخرى. أحتاج إلى العودة - تصحيح، انحرفتُ يسارًا. أحتاج إلى العودة يمينًا، فالقمر على الأفق. سأعيد ضبطها، فقط لأريك مدى سهولة ذلك. يبدو أنني أحافظ على الحد الأدنى من الوقود، لذا سأجربها قليل
偏
Дава
Okay, Joe. Stülpe den Beutel so über den Kanister, dass
जिम, मैंने आपकी पूरी बात नहीं समझी, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि आप यह जानना चाहते थे कि प्रवेश संबंधी प्रक्रियाएँ कब उपलब्ध होंगी और आपको कब पढ़कर सुनाई जाएँगी। अगर ऐसा है, तो इसमें लगभग 120 घंटे लगेंगे। बैटरी A को चार्ज करने की बात करें तो, जैसे ही बाकी लोग आपकी मदद के लिए पहुँचेंगे, हम इसे चार्ज कर देंगे। 
Columb
حسناً يا جاك. لقد أوقفت شحن البطارية A. اتصل بي وسأقوم بتشغيل مكيف الهواء الخاص بحافل
Готово к ко
मेरा मतलब परीक्षण पैटर्न से नहीं है। मैंने उनसे कहा था कि वे सुपरसर्कुलर को संख्या पर, स्क्रॉल के पहले स्थान पर रखें; मुझे यकीन है कि उन्होंने ऐसा किया होगा। मुझे यकीन है कि यह पहल
जी हाँ, जैक। 1-3 में बस यही बदलाव हैं। अब, 1-4 पर चलते हैं। पैनल 2 के बाकी तीन स्विचों में कोई बदलाव नहीं है। पैनल 3 में, पहला, दूसरा, तीसरा, चौथा अपरिवर्तित हैं और फिर हमें फ्यूल सेल हीटर, तीसरे को बंद करना 
मुझे इसके बारे में और कुछ नहीं पता चला है, जिम। ह
166, 3+35. 01
Roger. Zur Kryokonservierung bitten wir Sie, die Heizung und Sauerstoffflasche Nr. 1 jetzt a
로저. 짐이 이전에 언급했던 해가 뜨기 직전 하늘 가장자리의 밝기 변화에 대한 이야기가 여기에서 많은 관심을 불러일으켰습니다. 혹시 다시 한번 관찰할 기회가 있거나 기억을 더듬어 볼 수 있다면, 별들의 모습에 어떤 변화가 있었는지 여쭤보고 싶습니다. 예를 들어, 그 과정에서 별들이 반짝이는 것을 보았는지, 또는 해가 뜨기 
Ça vient de réactiver l'alarme principale. Maintenant qu'elle sonne en continu, je vais la laisser allumée. Je ne comprends pas pourquoi j'ai eu une coupur
نرغب - في الخط الرئيسي أ، نرغب في وجود تشارلي 1 و2 و3 و4. وكذلك برافو 3 
روجر، هل لديك أي ملاحظات عن النجوم أو الطقس أو المعالم 
Roger. Wir möchten Sie bitten
Apollo 8, ici H
ह्यूस्टन, शुरू करने
Хорошо. Аполлон-13, Хьюстон. У меня ес
أبولو 8، هيوستن. بدأنا نرصد بعض الفوهات بشكل خافت للغاية؛ المكان بأكمله ساطع
E i - talkback su, ho ELIO 1 ora sono tutti grigi. ELIO 2 sono tutti grigi. PROPELLENTE PRIMARIO tutto grigio. PROPELLENTE SECONDARIO, ho due pali da barbiere, e A è il palo da barbiere, B grigio, C
Hornet. Rog
Ok. Ho meno 5 ore, -7 se necessario, e ora de
Ehi, Ken, qualcuno ha una buona idea del perché quel serbatoio Quad A si surriscaldi, più degli altri di così tant
Gemini VIII, hier spricht Houston. Wir haben Delta-P-Scheinwerfer
حسنًا. نود أن نحصل على - هل ما زلت 
Alle 00:29:43, la prima volta che sono riuscito a scattare foto dell'orizzonte con la pellicola MIT. Impostata a F8 e 125°. Un'immagine a sud verso il sole, direttamente lungo la mia traiett
أورورا سفن، هذا مركز اتصالات إنديان كاب. فقدنا الاتصال ببيانات القياس عن بُعد. كيف يمكن
Aurora Seven
了解しました。キャビンの温度は92度です。インバーターを回します。スタンバイしてください。メインインバーターは、250度インバーターは約143
괜
Ok. Il buono ci dà un perigeo nel vuoto al momento attuale di 23,6 gradi con un angolo di traiettoria di volo di meno 6,25 gradi. Questo 
और हम आपको 
11号，休斯顿。我们可以辨认出面板上的标记。上面写着：A系统 ASCENT FUEL，ASCEN
حسنًا. أنت تنظر 
ハワイ、ジェミニVI。データポイントはいただきましたが、その代わりに、私たちがどのような面外速度を持っているか教えていただけませんか
这是友谊七号，线控飞行系统运行正常。漂移角约为每秒1度，其他轴向姿态保持良
D'accord. Je pense que vous aurez besoin de deux cartouches d'hydroxyde de lithium pou
أبولو 8، هيوستن. نود
Roge
D'accord. Soit j'ai mal recopié le disjoncteur, soit je n'arrive pas à le lire. Il se trouve environ au vi
إ
这里有滚动程序
Wir befinden uns momentan in einer sehr flachen Fluglage, sodass die Bodenstationen uns vermutlich nicht orten können. Wir haben zwar einige Funksprüche gehört, die immer wieder unterbrochen wurden, aber wir bleiben noch eine Weile in dieser Position, um die Boosterstufe im Blick zu behalten. Im Moment scheinen wir nicht viel näher an die Boosterstufe heranzukommen. Sie ist anscheinend immer noch ungefähr gleich weit entfernt. Als die Boosterstufe unter uns war, sah der Himmel fast sternenklar aus. So viel Treibstoff strömte aus der Boosterstufe und stieg in den Himmel. Ich habe sogar gesagt, dass es wie Sterne aussah. Wenn man die Boosterstufe zu diesem Zeitpunkt genauer betrachtete, konnte man den Treibstoff sehen – genauer gesagt die weißen Dämpfe, die aus dem Heck der Boosterstufe austraten. Ich vermute, dass diese Dämpfe die kleinen Leuchterscheinungen in der Umgebung verbreiteten. Es war so viel, dass es
了解。ヒューストン、こちらアポロ8号。今からハイゲイ
Хорошо, Джим. Роджер. Мы собираемся сделать это в максимально возможной степени. И это выглядит вполне осуществимо. Для начала нам нужно будет отправить вам отдельные последовательности команд для постепенного включения модуля управления. Чем ближе мы к точке входа, тем больше пунктов в контрольном списке. К тому моменту, когда температура опустится примерно до минус 45 градусов
罗杰：安装
맞습니다. 우리는 전원을 정상
最
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Работа завершена. Закрываем люки и убираем зо
They are, huh? How are we going to
Хьюстон, Спокойствие. Оказывается, фиксатор 4 всё равно неприменим при том угле рыскания, который у нас есть, потому что Земля 
جاهز لل
Это подтверждается, и мы добавили еще одно наблюдение звезды к тому, которое было зафик
Okay. Das erste Manöver ist eins, und zwar eins. Es beginnt mit dem Gewicht: 63295 minus 163 plus 129 plus 001 36 minus 00 045 plus 002 02 345 188 343 999 99 plus 016 85 002 48 002 001 86 23 2013 164 012 nach oben 276, links 04, November Alfa für den Rest dieser Spalte. In den Nordsternen; 068 097 356, ein Start ohne Tankfüllung und ein einzelner B
Apollo
ठीक है, जैक। हम एक बार देख लेंगे और जैसे ही स्थिति स्थिर लगेगी, आपक
रॉजर, मैं एडाप्टर पर हूँ। 1,
А вот ещё одна новость, и она была, — ещё один исследователь: Тор Хейердал был вынужден отказаться от своей попытки пересечь Атлантику на лодке из папируса. Повреждённая штормом лодка была брошена примерно в 650 милях от Бермудских о
Roger. I problemi che hai riscontrato finora sono dovuti a una fonte sconosciuta, probabilmente al caricamento della tua cella trunnion, che ora è a 91°, quindi non rappresenta realmente il tuo vero angolo di trunnion. Ora, non riteniamo che questo problema di caricamento implichi alc
..
...
Peut-être vaudrait-il mie
Nun, ich habe h
Roger. Im ersten Schritt auf Seite 47, Schritt 1, hatten wir die Steuerung im Automatikmodus und die Schutzschalter für die Triebwerke noch nicht aktiviert. Als wir dann fortfuhren – und wi
아폴로 8호, 고이득을 기다리는 동안 궤적 요약을 계속하겠습니다. 13번째 지점에서 태평양 중부선으로 복귀할 수 있으며, 연소 후 138초가 지나면 귀환이 시작됩니다. 138초면 버터플라이 영역을 벗어나게 됩니다. 20초 이후에는 조기점화나 재시동을 시도하지 않는 것이 좋습니다. 20초를 넘기면 궤적이 수정 범위를 벗어나 자유 귀환으로 이어질 수 있습니다. 귀환 지역의 날씨는 양호합니다. 추적 및 미추진이 가능합니다. 연소 중에는 저장 탱크와 섬프 탱크의 연료 소모로 인해 연소실 압력과 탱크 압력에 약간의 변화가 있을 수 있습니다. 이는 연소 시작 후 2~5초 사이에 발생할 수 있습니다. 두 시스템 모두 압력 변화가 미미할 것입니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동합니다. 연소 후에는 궤적 유지를 위해 물 끓임을 방지해야 합니다. 물 배출 상황은 양호해 보입니다. 그 이상은 괜찮을 겁니다. 5시 이후까지는 물 배출을 미루도록 하겠습니다. 그 전에 극저온 장치를 휘저어주고 싶습니다. (수정) 연료 전지의 다음 퍼지는 대략 에 이루어질 예정이며, 수소 배터리 A는 34.9, 배터리 B는 39.1, 찰리는 38.5가 될 것입니다. 저희는 단일 탱크 극저온 장치를 갖추고 있습니다. 이전 연소 성능을 보면, 정상 연소는 계산된 값보다 약 3.7초 정도 더 걸릴 것으로 예상됩니다. 엔진 성능은 정상이며 모든 매개변수가 안정적입니다. 좋아 보입니다. 컴퓨터 프로그램에 따르면 네 개의 쿼드 모두 용량이 거의 같습니다. 좋은 안내를 드리겠습니다. 몇 분 후에 후속 조치를 취하겠습니다
... 下のショットは十分です
Roger. Alles richtig vorgelesen. Ich habe n
分かりました。ちょっと話が逸れてしまいました。225番パネルに「CBフライトバス、メインB」と書いてあり
Sigma Seven. Wir
أورورا س
Хорошо. На дисплее вашего сервисного модуля Quad Bravo отображается немного заниженная температура. Похоже, примерно на 20 градус
OK Houston. Ni Neil ni Mike 
了解しました。最初に説明された通りですね。光が当たると白くなっていきます
الهدوء يا هيوستن. انتظروا قليلاً. نحن بصدد الحصول على البيانات الآن. نتحقق م
大丈夫
Non, je me suis a
D'accord. Heure 22 25 
Ok, Jack. Odyssey è p
Pas 
रॉजर, ईगल। आपके लिए PAD प्रस्तुत है: 101 36 14.07, माइनस 00758, प्लस सभी गेंदें,
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota quattro e stiamo lavorando al quinto giorno. Naturalmente, non vediamo l'ora che arrivi l'atterraggio di venerdì. Qui sotto, nella parte della navicella che chiamiamo stiva in
没错。以上内容都
... 非常に安定していましたか。つまり、ただ浮かんでいるような感じでし
रॉजर
Okay. Wenn Sie Ihre
That's affirmative; and, since the gimbal was trimmed out at the big burn yesterday, we should be still through the c.g, and we'd like to make sure that Jack sits in the same place for this burn that he did yesterday. That way, we'll - you should have no trouble controlling attitude. Now I'm ready to go over to page 32. 
Das ist richtig, Jim. Und dies dient der Absicherung gegen einen Einzelpunktfehler – eine unwahrscheinliche Möglichkeit, die Sie daran hindern würde, die Batteri
और मैं बस एक बात की पुष्टि करना चाहता हूँ, हम कर सकते हैं 
Hé, le 13, vous nous avez expliqué les angles d'alignement précis et nous les avons ajus
Roger. We just finished up - we're just finishing up our eat period. Be ready t
Das ist bestätigt. Wir hier prüfen die thermische Lage. Es sieh
Interruttore automatic
Buzz, ich habe hier 39,5 Volt eingestellt; das ist eine Erinnerung an den Batterietest – gut sichtbar an der Wand. Okay, Neil, jetzt TLI – ich schreibe es hier an die Wand – TLI – nominal ist 05 plus 47; und 6 Sekunden später sind es 05 plus 53. Und wenn du willst, dass ich dir Bescheid gebe, wenn das der Fall 
Это подтве
확신이
ドラッグ展開はOK。70%自動、90
Okay, Jack. Sono 
네. 맞아요. 제가 호주에 갈 때마다 천둥번개만 
Andare
我们还看到了另一颗卫星——我看到它的时候是凌晨2点38分，它比我之前看到的那颗要远得多。我试着
11，休斯顿。我们给你准备了一些轴杆和轴颈，或许可以稍微调整一下。轴杆长 14
Роджер. Повторюсь, ваш вектор состояния в полном порядке; он по-прежнему работает с перебоями, и причина, по которой мы здесь задерживаемся, заключается в проверке, не был
收到。请将S波段功能切换到测距模式。我们要对你进行测距。另外，我这里有一个更新后的K系数，准备好接收了
わかりました、ジャック。プライマリーとセカンダリーの蒸発水制御バルブを自動にしたいんで
That's affirm. I'm going to first of all just quickly run through the times of the major events, and then we'll go back and fill in some of the details. Okay. Entry interface is at 142 hours 40 minutes; 6-1/2 hours, roughly prior to that or at about, we'll start this whole thing going by applying HEATER POWER, by checking the CM/ temperatures and preheating the CM/ if required, and we suspect we'll probably want to do that. We'll have detailed procedures up for it later. At about 6 hours prior to or about, we will commence powering up the, powering up the, using the modified / 30-minute checklist, which you have used for the previous midcourse. Then shortly, just before 5 hours, prior to or at about, we'll want you in the attitude for a body axis alinement, using the Earth terminator like we did before; and as soon as we have that, we'll perform -7, which looks like, now, about a 2-foot-per-second burn or about 15 seconds of. And I'm told that it's down to 1-1/2 now, so it's comfortably within the margin. Okay. When we do that, we'll immediately start the maneuver to the service module jettison attitude, which will be in plane since we're jettisoning it earlier than we usually do. We don't need, and don't want, the out-of-plane component. So it'll be in plane with the service module pointed back out along the radius vector. We will then commence to get the command module ready for service module SEP, including command module checkout and hot fire, and at approximately 4 hours and 30 minutes prior to or, we'll jettison the service module. We'll pitch the up until we aquire the service module in the... and try and get some photographs, but we're not going to fool around with translation maneuvers for pictures bec
11, Хьюстон. За последние 2 часа мы наблюдаем неболькое, но устойчивое повышение парциального давления CO2. Вы уже меняли баллон с CO2 сег
Tutto sembra andare bene a terra, 
알겠습니다. 광대역 데드밴드 ATT
Sto guardando Grus ora, e le sue stelle sono piuttosto nitide, persino le piccole stelle di quarto e quinto ordine di magnitudine... A quest'ora della sera e della notte, il cielo è piuttosto nero e le stelle sono
Ok, Ja
알겠습니다. 파워 앰프는 PR
了解。了解。ハワイパスについては5～6分後
Permettez-moi de vous présenter c
روجر. شغّلت المنصة في تمام الساعة 11:50 كما هو مُ
ये फ्रेंडशिप सेवन की रिकॉर्डिंग है। रेट्रोफायर की वजह से खिड़कियों पर काफी धूल जमी है और यहाँ भी बहुत कुछ ऐसा दिख रहा है जैसे, आह, पैड से ऊपर आते समय हमने कुछ कीड़े कुचल दिए हों। खिड़की के बाहर खून के निशान दिख रहे हैं, शा
Basically, what I saw was the firefly color that John saw, which I could create at other times as white color. I'm definitely convinced it's capsule - a capsule derivative and once in a while, even no
हमारे पास आपकी मजबूत टीम है और जमीनी स्तर पर सभी व्यवस्थाएं ठीक
In ogni c
And emergency shutdown, Neil, is plus 10 seconds; 10 minus 40 on the DELTA-VC, is
噂によると。見つかりましたか
Привет, это Карнарвон. Вы можете отключить вторичный контур охлаждения и перевести испаритель в нор
Gemelli 4, Guaymas CAP CO
حسنًا يا جيم. في الصفحة 2-107، نوصيك بحذف ذلك والاكتفاء بالنهج نفسه. منصتك ممتازة
سأكون معك خلال عشر ثوانٍ يا نيل؛ أريد فقط أن أحصل على..
E lasciato 
जो मेरे पास
— пять шариков, плюс 0,0, и я называю это 0,8, какое-то время оно висело на 0,7, а потом обнулилось и пошло вниз. Я бы дал им — оно пошло на 0,1 вниз — плюс 0,1. Теперь оно 
Jack und Fred schlafen beide. Es ist irgendwie komisch: Fred schläft jetzt im Tunnel, kopfüber, den Kopf auf der Fördermaschin
Friendship
查理，我现在读到第158页了
Хорошо. И это происходит с обои
Водолей, как насчет того, чтобы 
Хорошо, Джин, сначала расскажу про костюм, чтобы все были в курсе. Температура купола костюма составляет 72 градус
إيجل، هيوستن. محا
我又拍了一张阿拉伯半岛地区的照片。看起来它沿着干涸的河床一
حسنًا، لقد فعلت ذلك - أنا مسج
Roger. You know we wouldn't
ह्यूस्टन, कुंभ राशि; आपकी 
Aquarius，删除 ABORT STAG
हमें बस BIOMED को चालू क
네, 프레드 씨. 물량이 2파운드 줄어든 것을 방금 확인했습니다. 최근에
そして最後に聞いたのは、ジョー、SUPERCRIT の測定値は約 710 p
你明白燃料和Δ
Okay. We had a handover, but that was about a half an hour ago, and I didn't call you on it. Let me check with and see i
分かりました。ジョー
Хо
Come desideri, ma non
제미니 4호, 하와이 CAP C
Gemelli 4, Houston. 
Род
Ok. Ora sto usando la luna che è alla mia sinistra, ed è un'ottima soluzione. Ora vado avanti e copro l'indicatore di assetto e potete osservare l'imbardata. Ora svuoto i giroscopi, cercando di selezionare il fly-by-wire basso. Metterò prima la luna al centro della finestra, mantenendo rollio e beccheggio, e poi rimetterò la luna al suo posto. La luna si sta avvicinando al centro della finestra a questo punto. Ok, la fermo lì e inseriamo il controllo del rollio per bilanciarlo. Ok, a questo punto, otterrò 0 rollio. Ho sorpassato la luna e sto rilevando il pianeta Mercurio, che è bello luminoso, ed è un po' troppo a destra. Ora controlliamo e vediamo quanti gradi abbiamo qui in imbardata. Circa 20, il che è sufficiente per un controllo quantitativo. Or
まだ終わってないよ。まだ10万マイルも残っている。まるで全て終わったような気分だけど、まだ道
Сейчас на небе видна дымка.
أبولو 11، هيوستن. ا
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 알겠습니다. 업링크는 끝났습니다. 컴퓨터를 사용하셔도 됩니다. BLOCK으로 이동하시면 곧 질소 관련 정보를 제공해 드리겠습니
Okay. And after those pictures,... lu
로저. 라디에이터는 유량 조절 위치에 있습니다. 운행 
コロン
هذه هي هيوستن. تبد
당신의
機材を揃える。以
自由七号，这
可以——好的。首先我们关掉11号面板的电源。
Корабль в Индийском океане. «Си
كانت دائرة التبريد الثانوية بحالة جيدة جدًا. يبدو أن لديك مشعاعًا محكمًا، وأن جميع المكونات الأخرى تعمل بكفاءة عالية. امتلأت منظمات الأكسجين الرئيسية لديك بضغط 104 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة أثناء فحصنا. بالنظر إلى مدار القمر، نتوقع غلي حوالي رطل واحد من الماء في الساعة، وهذا مجرد تقدير تقريب
... 릴리스로 이동
Ok. Aspetta con la tua ultima lista, Jack. Ho capito, niente scarichi di urina. Immagino che lavore
Roger. Per quanto 
Roger, die GMTRC für Ihre 48-1 bet
こちらフレンドシップセブ
حسنًا. هذا الموقف الذي
Roger. Sextantenstern, 12 1037 211, Erdmittelpunkt unten 063, rechts 23 plus 1068 minus 16500 12505 35061 Nordsterne, Rollen 068, Nicken 097, Gieren 356, kein Tankinhalt, Hochgeschwindigkeitsverfahren nicht
了解しました。進入PADはMIDPAC領域：359 153 001 194 46 03 267、プラス1102、マイナス17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28。DLとVLは4つとも適用されません。DOは4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380。ボアサイト星は蠍座シータ、上314、右34、揚力ベクトルは上。
Roger. We'd like you to mark right where it is now, Mike, and we'd like two sets of mark
フレッド、バッグ
13, Houston. Utilizzerai l'override dell'asse X. Sarà una manovra manuale, ma in modalità 
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है।
इसमें थो
عندما نطور وضعية للحصول على مكسب عالٍ، هل هناك أي طريقة يمكننا من خلالها الحصول على ضوء الشمس جزئيًا في إحدى النافذتين الأمامي
जब तक कि इसका संबंध उस पद से न हो, जिस पर हम पहुंचना चाहते हैं। मुझे नहीं पता
休斯顿，13。我有车载
제미니 4호, 카나본 CAP COM입니다. 역추진 절차에 대한 브리핑을 받으셨
Gemelli, qui è il Chirurgo. Abbiamo una pressione sanguign
RCS Power A и B-ACME, OAMS Pow
ठीक है, चार्ली। यह ज़्यादा खुला नहीं है। इसे दोबारा शंट किए बिना सही रीडिंग देना मुश्किल
Vermutlich nicht, wenn alles zusa
Roger. I am reading you with a lot of background noise. Can you read me clea
네, 3분이라는 시간을 너무 
حسنًا. لقد استطلعنا آراء الحضور. لا توجد لدينا معلومات كثيرة، لكن مستلزماتكم تبدو جيدة؛ قيمة جاما عند الدخول حاليًا هي -6.01. نتوقع سرعة متوسطة تبلغ 2.81 قدم في الثانية، أي
أب
मैं बस यही टिप्पणी कर रहा था - मैं यहाँ क्वाड 1 और 4 के थ्रस्टर्स को देख रहा था। बैरल के बाहरी हिस्से पर हल्का सा रंग फीका पड़ गया है। नोजल ऐसे दिखते हैं जैसे उन्हें कभी चलाया ही न गया हो, - जैसे बिल्कुल नए हों... ऊपरी नोजल के अंदरूनी हिस्से पर वे पतले-पतले 
嗯
了解。血圧も良好
Roger. Die haben wir. Wir haben eine ungefähre Vorstellung. Uns interessiert jetz
That's right, Mike, and we believe you have your quad Bravo and quad Charlie turned off in your at this time, and a 5 degree deadband. We'd prefer a 10 degree de
وأنا أيضاً لا
Ricevuto. Il sistema di scarico automatico è disattivato; l'interruttore del fusibile del sistema di scarico di emergenza è disattivato; l'
حسنً
ENTERキーです
了解。1、G&N: 38658、マイナス 054、プラス 065、078 02 0345、プラス 29180、プラス 03779、マイナス
さて、最後の通過では、サンディエゴの少し東から雲に覆われるまで、シノプティック・テレイン・フォトグラフィーで約38枚の写真を撮影しました。アメリカ南部、アラバマ州とミシシッピ州付近からフロリダ州にかけて上空を飛行し始めるとすぐに、断続的に写真を撮影しました。その地域の天候を捉えた非常に良い写真がいくつか撮れました。その後、ジャクソンビル周辺の飛行場の写真も何枚か撮りました。ケープ岬の写真も数枚撮りました。おそらく最も良い写真の一つは、後方から撮影した一枚で、フロリダからテキサスまで続く海岸線に沿った気象の地形全体を捉えました。海岸線に沿って非常に明確な気象の線が描かれています。その後、フロリダ州、キューバ周辺、島嶼部、そしてメキ
ठ
了解しました。プラス1197、マイナ
Frank, pendant que tu parles de la liste des
Okay. I think I read that you were ready. I forgot... earphones. This simply consists of getting a second pair of cartridges out of the command module, putting one band of sticky tape, that is t
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Das Netzwerk ist für den Fernseher eingerich
Nun ja – nein
Ici Friendship Seven. Je retourn
L'antenne fouet est déployée.
Роджер. Всё верно. И не м
好的。现在到旁边。
Oui, mais vous êtes tout de même contraint à une certaine position, comme si vous étiez assis dans un bus. Même si vous ne vous asseyez pas sur les fesses, vous deve
ठीक
Se
Okay, Jack. Ich dachte an einen Schalter. Lass mich überprüfen, ob es sich auch um einen Leitungsschutzschalter handelt. Ich
Okay. Thank you. We copy
Да. Запомните это
Ich werde jetzt, wo ich Zeit habe, einen Orientierungstest durchführen. Ich greife nach dem Handgriff – und treffe ihn genau. Dann greife ich nach dem Gierhebel. Ich treffe ihn bei 20 Grad, genau 20 Grad. Ich greife nach dem Notgriff. Genau getroffen, negativ, der war
الآن، أصبحتُ أتحكم في كلٍّ من الميل والانحراف - أو
نريد تأكيدًا آخر، عندما أغلقنا صمام تهوية النفق إلى / DELTA-P، كانت القراءة حوالي 1.7 - 1.75، ثم ارتفعت ببطء إلى حوالي - أوه، أقول أقل بقليل من 2.2. ويبدو أنها ثابتة عند هذا الحد - هل هناك تأخير في
روجر. قد يهمّكم يا سكان المركبة الفضائية كولومبيا أن تعلموا أن اليوم هو عيد الاستقلال في كولومبيا. تُوّجت غلوريا دياز من الفلبين بلقب ملكة جمال الكون الليلة الماضية، بعد أن تفوقت على 60 فتاة أخرى لتفوز باللقب العالمي. تبلغ الآنسة دياز من العمر 18 عامًا، بشعر وعينين سوداوين، ومقاساتها 34.5-23-34.5. أما الوصيفة الأولى فكانت ملكة جمال أستراليا، تلتها ملكة جمال إسرائيل، ثم ملكة جمال اليابان. وبينما أنتم في طريق عودتكم مساء الثلاثاء، سيلعب نجوم الدوري الأمريكي والدوري الوطني البيسبول في واشنطن. من المتوقع أن يكون ميل ستوتلمير من فريق يانكيز هو الرامي الأول في الدوري الأمريكي. لم يُعلن بعد من سيكون الرامي الأول في الدوري الوطني، إذ يضم الفريق تسعة رماة. مع أن الأبحاث قد أثمرت نتائج إيجابية في برنامج الفضاء، إلا أن نتائجها لا تكون مضمونة دائمًا، على ما يبدو. أعلنت شركة وودستريم، الشركة الأم لشركة أنيمال تراب الأمريكية التي صنعت أكثر من مليار مصيدة فئران خشبية زنبركية، أنها صنعت مصيدة فئران أفضل، لكن لم يلقَ منتجها إقبالاً يُذكر. في الواقع، اضطرت الشركة للعودة إلى المصيدة التقليدية. وقد صرحوا قائلين: "كان ينبغي علينا أن نقضي
ठीक है, और आप यहाँ हर घंटे स्टेशनों के बीच हैंडओवर की उम्मीद कर सकते हैं, और इस प्रक्रिया के दौरान थोड़ी बहुत तकनीकी खराबी आ सकती है। वापस आने पर मैं आपको कॉल करूँ
Okay. Wir schulden Ihnen noch die Bestätigung, dass Sie erwarten können
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप
Apollo 8, Hou
That's correct. We started out that way, and we turned the 
ठीक है। क्रू स्टेटस रिपोर्ट। विकिरण: सीडीआर 11020, सीएमपी 100
В результате у меня остается очень тонкая полоска кожи.
Hier spricht Sigma Seven. Auf HF. Hier spricht Sigma Seven. Auf HF. Ein kurzer Countdown läuft. Dies dient der Überprüfung der HF-Abdeckung im weltweiten Frequenzbereich. Die Übertragung soll 60 Sekunden dauern. Ich wünschte, ich wüsste, was ich sonst noch sagen könnte, um die Zeit zu überbrücken. Wenn ich tief genug atme, könnte das helfen. Die Ka
حسنًا، بعد أن فعلنا ذلك، نريد تشغيل اللوحة 8، التسلسلي
Das ist ja richtig. Ich will mich 
روجر. لقد قطعت الاتصال بعد تومي جاكوبس. أعتقد أننا
रॉजर। 123 प्लस 00 पर, कुल माइनस 7 प्रतिशत, अल्फा माइनस 12 प्रति
Retroattitudine automatica; retrazione automati
حسنًا، سأفعل. أيضًا، اسمح لي أن أسألك سؤالًا. في هذه الحالة، ونحن في وضعية الرسو، علينا استخدام نظام التحكم في الميل والدوران. وإلى أي مدى يمكننا استخدام هذا النظام دون تغ
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous vous demandons de vous immobiliser à l'angle de roulis appropri
Okay. We'd like to have Jack verify that the PYROs in LOGIC are SAFE, and we'd like to remind him to do no further powerup of
罗杰。我刚把传感器插上去的时候，
你知道它们在哪儿吗？我好像找不到它
Roger. Wir haben dort einen minimalen Ans
罗杰，你几点关掉A
Yes, I feel completely fatigued. 
Wir melden uns bei Ihnen. Sie können die Blockierung jetzt schon aufheben. Wir ru
Роджер. У вас есть расписание на три дня: для собак, для отдыха в отеле и для проживания в отеле на судне 
Хьюстон, Близнецы
, Canary. Request you
他に何をすればいい？ スキャナーはセカンダリーモードに切り替えて、ここで180°ヨーイ
ठीक है, जिम। यह एक अच्छा विचार है, और हमने इस पर विचार किया है,
저기 오래된 코로나 오스트랄리스가 멋지게 보이네요. 그리고 눈키도 있고요. 카우스 오스트랄리스도 있는데, 눈키는 비행 경로
سخان RCS مفصول. قاطع دائرة سخان الماسح الضوئي مفتوح. الكمبيوتر م
Хорошо. Вот пресс-релиз Хейни. В утренней газете написано, что вы не поедете в течение 5 дней. Этот вопрос обсуждался на вчерашней пресс-конференции, и в ответ на него Крис сказал, что, похоже, у нас ес
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。吉姆，请你点击“接受”按钮，我们会给你
Боже мой. Дай
쌍둥이자리 4, 하와이 CAP COM. 잘 읽었습니다. 저는
هذا ما هو عليه. نعم. *** لماذا 
Ich bin
حسنًا يا بيل. نحن نقترب من موعد الرصد، وهناك بعض المخاوف من أن الانتقال مباشرةً إلى وضعية المحاذاة قد يؤدي إلى ارتفاع درجة حرارة المركبة الفضائية "تشارلي". لذا نود منك الآن توجيه المحور السيني السالب نحو الشمس. لديّ بعض زوايا الجيمبال هنا. إذا قمنا بتوجيه المحور السيني السالب نحو الشمس من
はい。トランスレーショ
ठीक है, कोलंबिया। अपलिंक पूरा हो गया है; कंप्यूटर अब आपका है। आप ब्लॉक पर जा सकते हैं; हालाँकि, हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि लैंडिंग साइट 2 पार करने के बाद ही विकल्प 1 अलाइनमेंट का उपयोग करें; और हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप एक
Hast du das verstanden? D
क्य
If you'd like to set up some kind of a COMM check or specified time like every 30 minutes
13, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपसे एमडीसी 1 और 2 पर अपने डिस्प्ले का सर्वेक्षण चाहते हैं। हमें गेज रीडिंग और 
Роджер. Показания DELTA выглядели абсолютно точными. Время работы двигателя, как нам
ヒューストンです。はっきりと聞き取れました。エアフォースD-9を3回、アンタレスにアポロ4号を1回、さそり座の星の一つを1回、長距離と短距離のランを1回撮影されたと理解しています。アンタレ
Из Вашингтона: «В это Рождество мир озарён надеждой на мир. Когда он придёт, когда надежда воплотится в
ठीक है, तापमान 70 डिग्री है। मुझे समझ नहीं आ रहा कि इसे कैसे कम करूं, मेरे सूट का पानी का वाल्व निशान से आगे सेट है। इससे भी तापमान कम नहीं हो रहा, और इसे माइनस में सेट करने से भी नहीं। यह गल
Sotto, cancella "Controllo del veicolo spaziale AUTO verifica". Cancella il "" e tutto ciò che segue tra parentesi, come "Meno 00507", eccetera. E sotto, cancella "PRO per avviare la velocità di beccheggio
Je voudrais dire un mot sur le sextant. Son utilisation dans un vaisseau spatial exigu est très difficile, surtout avec le casque. J'ai finalement conclu qu'il serait inutile, avec le casque, d'essayer de prendre les angles requis pour les étoiles visées. J'ai donc retiré mon casque. Cela m'a donné un peu plus de liberté de mouvement, mais j'étais toujours limité à des angles d'environ 20 à 23° sans manœuvrer le vaisseau. L'étoile était alors masquée par la partie supérieure du hublot. En manœuvrant le vaisseau plus fréquemment et plus amplement, on pourrait aligner le grand axe du hublot avec le plan de visée. Mais, limités par le carburant, nous n'avons pas opté pour cette méthode. Nous avons également utilisé le mode pulsé, sans trop de manœuvres. Les étoiles sélectionnées pour cette campagne avaient des angles assez élevés, ce qui rendait l'horizon difficile à atteindre. Nous avons finalement décidé de les photographier un peu plus près de l'horizon. J'ai effectué quelques mesures sur Canopus et quelques autres télescopes, comme vous le remarquerez. Le filtre bleu semblait masquer complètement l'horizon; je ne voyais aucun horizon avec ce filtre. La qualité de notre image de l'horizon est probablement moins bonne en présence de lune. Le filtre vert, en revanche, m'a permis d'obtenir un horizon légèrement plus net qu'avec l'absence totale de filtre. Je n'ai rencontré aucune difficulté pour effectuer ces mesures, que ce soit avec le filtre vert ou le filtre transparent. Cependant, l'horizon reste mal défini et il est nécessaire de se standardiser et de mesurer au 
음, 지금 온도가 70도네요. 어떻게 낮춰야 할지 정말 막막합니다. 잠수복의 물 밸브가 표시선을 넘어섰는데도 온도가 내려가지 않네요. 음수로 설정해도 마찬가지고요. 아, 그건 잘못된 생각이었군요. 기체 온도가 표시선을 넘어섰습니다. 잠수복 온도는 발사
Okay, Mike, unsere
Okay. That's a lot better, and we figure your battery glitch was just that thermal switch triggered a mal - a CAUTION and WARNING, just cycled once, and triggered a MASTER ALARM again. We'll watch the batteries for you, since you don't have any CAUTION and WARN
Hey, Jim. Jim, hier ist Houston. Hey, Gemini 4, Houston
Ich sage, nachdem wir wieder im Raumschiff waren, versuchte ich, über Kurzwelle jemanden zu
了解、ニール。次の話題は、エンジンの燃焼領域から放射
了解。ASCS をすぐにチェックして、方向モードが維
Okay. The purpose is a pericynthion plus 2 hours abort.:; plus 1633.0, minus 0014.5, minus 0751.5; apogee not applicable, perigee is plus 0020.5
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। आप यह कर सकते हैं। कंप्यूटर आपका है, और फिर विकल्प 1 को प्रा
روجر. بالنظر إلى خطة الطيران، لديك موعدٌ قادمٌ في الساعة أ، وسنضطر لإجراء موعدٍ آخر في الساعة ب استعدادًا لذلك. ومن المقبول، وفقًا لإجراءات الملاحة الأرضية، تأجيل المحاذاة قليلًا، وإجراءها مرةً واحدةً فقط في الساعة ب، أو يمكنك إجراؤها في
E attualmente ti stiamo seguendo a 22.500 miglia dalla Luna, muovendoti a 4400 piedi a
是的，我们
Okay, I'm the
Roger. Notre 
He's been look
Ok. Abbiamo una visuale solida e precisa sull'Agena a 90 chilometri. La sto controllando 
Beh, il naso sembra molto in basso, ma è più o me
好的。这是哈尼的新闻稿。晨报上说你们五天内不会去。昨晚的新
아니요. 테이프를 가지러 내려갔다가 다시 올라왔는데, 아무것도 못 찾았어요. 게다가 해가 거의 90도
بالكاد أستطيع رؤية الدرابزين على الشرفة الأمامية من موقعي على النافذة 
네, 맞습니다. 그 후에는 전문가분께서 0688이라는
分かりました。パネル250の回路ブレーカーBAT A（POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING）は閉、パネル275の回路ブレーカーINVERTER POWER 2（MAIN B）は閉です。次の回路ブレーカーはパネル5にあります。回路ブレーカーBAT RELAY BUS（BAT A）は閉、回路ブレーカーSENSOR UNIT（AC BUS 2）は閉、回路ブレーカーCB SENSOR SIGNAL（AC2）は閉、回路ブレーカーCB BATTER
Sembra però che ora accenderemo la piattaforma circa 45 minuti prima del previsto dal piano di volo. Il tempo impiegato sarà di 95+19. Sarà sopra Carnarvon, su
मैंने VOX ट्रांसमिट और रिकॉर्ड मोड पर स्विच कर लिया है
Now the undock attitude and the SEP attitude ought to be the same, so I'm going 
OK, je vais allumer les batteries AS
罗杰。你觉得B电池充电够多的时候，为什么不唱
收到。如果你感兴趣，
Bien, sous BUS CA B: 
Jim, de Hous
Ci sono due pezzi sul
ジム、昨日から昨晩にかけて、機内は少し暑かったです。窓を閉めると少し涼しくなり、スーツの温度は華氏40度後半、キャビンの温度は華氏60度前半
こんにち
نعم،
Roger, Zwillinge
La pression 
COMMANDE ROTATIONNELLE, DI
Aquarius, Houston. We'd like to get a little better idea of how is going. So, what we'd like for you to do is what we did last time. That is to give us a reading on the
No, credo che la gradazione di questa sostanza appiccicosa che c'è sopra, qualunque cosa sia, sembri essere pi
Das war -3. 
マイク、あなたが得ている大きなDELTA-R（NO
테이프 레코더 - 명령 
Roger, wir warten auf ein U
两分钟结束时，从30开始倒计时，倒计时还剩30秒
Ja, d
11, Houston. Roger. Je vous reçois sans problème, et il semble que la récupération automatique se soit très bien déroulée dès votre arrivée. Nous avons quelques 
Un, deux, trois, quatre, cinq, six, sept; on 
Я вам это дам, когда
Хорошо. На шаге 5 в E-11 первый подзаголовок — «Шлемы и перчатки», а пункты, следующие за ним, зависят от того, одеты вы в костюм или в рубашку с короткими рукавами, но их необходимо выполнить. И клапаны в
11, Хьюстон
حسناً، فريدو. الآن لسنا كذلك - أيضاً عند -30 ثانية، لسنا بصدد حرق، لذا يمكنك خدش "زر الإلغاء، اضغط"، وعندما
チェックリストから外れ
Okay. Allora va bene. Se... sai, non c'è... non è un momento critico i
0.01, alright. - Shoot, I fo
イ
جميعنا بخير
、
Roger, Houston. -1 Breite - 606269, Länge über 2, - 78954, Höhe + 00152; für -2 Breite - 09638, Länge über 2, + 81691, Höhe - 00007. Ich habe versucht, -3 beim selben Anflug zu
Und das Visier schließen. Das habe ich übersehen, das muss ich neu abdichten
好的。你
아폴로 
Good grie
Roger. Das Fernsehbild ist jetzt verpixelt. Okay. Wir haben wieder ein gutes Bild. Scheinbar i
That's affirmative, Jim. In other words, we're leaving the antenna switching up to you, and after you switch antennas it's going to take 3 to 5 minutes for us to establish a lockon
分かり
Роджер. 17.02. Здесь всё выглядит от
收到。5000人分散；西北风10节；浪高3英尺；高度表读数2986；救援部队呼号为Naha RESCUE 1，格林尼治标准时间02:58；Nahe SEARCH 1，格林尼治标准时间03:44；“梅森”号驱逐舰，预计到达时间未知；航天器日出时间为10:08:40；Retrofi
Ok, in fondo al controllo di ingresso, proprio lì d
Roger, hier spricht Gemini 4. Der Pilot ist vor
Al momento, i sistemi a terra sembrano abba
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。4時半頃到着予
Hoffentlich wird alles besser und nicht sch
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। सेंटर पैनल - मैं
実際にヨー角が取れるか確認してみましょう。機体は後方に引き寄せられるのではなく、私に対して上方に移動する傾向にあります。このような照明
Excess cabin water li
알겠습니다. 1천에서 
حسنًا. يريد أن يعرف ما إذا تم تجربة الإجراء وما إذا ثبت أ
하하! 네가 덤불 속으로 들어갔을 때 내 오리발에 아직도 검은 미끄럼 자국이 남아있네. 좋아, 또 오른쪽으로 요잉했네. 바로잡아야 하는데... 아, 왼쪽으로 요잉했네. 바로잡아야 해, 달이
Bene. Sta mettendo i caschi ne
Роджер. Мы вывели вас обоих на высокий уровень усиления. Теперь звучит отлич
Und was ist mit dem S
Jim, la z
Okay. I was just - I'm getting MASTER ALARMS every few seconds and I am catching a gl
They request that you leave that switch in the AUTO position until you go to bed tonight. Stand by. I mean in the ON position. I'll repeat that again. In the OFF position until you go to bed tonight for reasons that you have a 3-percent imbalance, and they'd like to get that more even. So, just before turning in, we'll change the switch to 
حسنًا. كنت أفكر للتو. أحاول وضع أكبر قدر ممكن من الوزن في الأسفل. ليس لدينا خزانات نفايات، وخزان
D'ac
Tenete d'occhio la finestra e osservate come appare quest
Right, I've got white ones right now that are sort of drifting ar
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. Thirty-minute report continues. Cabin pressure is 5.6 and h
육분의를 통해 보이는 광경은 정말 환상적입니다. 방금 전 자동 조준 작업 중에 조준선이 지중해를 가로질
Vuoi sapere cosa sta succedendo nel mondo? Beh, gli Astros hanno battuto i Cincinnati 8 a 3. Rusty Staub ha battuto un fuoricampo. E nella tua squadra, gli Hawks hanno battuto i Falcons 3 a 2. Mike h
Allez-y, Houston.
E, beh, dove c'è il blocco al centro della pagina che dice - il piccolo blocco che dice "Foto della luce zodiacale", metti semplicemente "Facoltati
31
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 몇 분 전까지만 해도 데이터가
Bene. Ora sposteremo l'uplink sul backup UpVoice per circa 2 minuti, e potrebbero volerci un paio di secondi prima che si senta la perdita dell'UpVoice. Quindi puoi impostare il tuo 
سنفق
Houston
ठीक है। मुझे पता है कि आप चुप रहने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं, इसलिए मैं आपको कुछ जानकारी पढ़कर सुनाता हूँ। अभी-अभी हमें एक ऐसी जानकारी मिली है जिससे आपको शायद थोड़ा भरोसा हो जाए। अगर आपका ऑक्सीजन क्रायो टैंक खराब हो जाता है, तो आपके पास अभी 80 पाउंड बचे हैं। सिंगल टैंक ऑपरेशन में अभी सबसे बड़ी बाधा हाइड्रोजन टैंक है, जिसका मार्जिन पॉजिटिव है। अगर हम अपने स्टैंडर्ड प्रोफाइल के हिसाब से लगभग 143 घंटे उड़ान भर सकते हैं, तो लगता है कि आप इस मामले में काफी आगे निकल चुके हैं। ध्यान दें कि आप रेट 2 पोजीशन में उड़ान भर रहे हैं, जो ठीक
로저, 3 설정으로 돌아갔을 때 잠시 동안 제대로 작동하지 않았지만 오래 있지는 않았습니다. 확실히 7.5에서 8 정도가 적당할 것 같습니다. 현재 자동 후방 자세 제어 모드입니다. 곧 플라이 바이 와이어 모드로 전환할 예정입니다. 이전에는 자이로스코프를 정상으로 설정하고 기동 기능을 꺼두었습니다. 모든 시스템은 정상입니
Say again
Roger. Ist Ihre Gesichtsmaske ges
Apogee is 155.7 
Roger. Capisco una distanza massima di errore di 3 sigma di 70 miglia nautiche, un OAMS retro, un retrofire manuale, un rollio a portanza zero, ho ottenu
D'accord, Vance. Je demande l'autorisation de remettre la vanne de ventilation en position FERMÉE et de couper la charge de la ba
友谊七号，卡纳维拉尔通信技术中心。
L'Aigle est - 
로저. 이건
Он уже уле
Le nombre d'IVI 
Это «Дружба Семь». Солнце, я хочу поставить здесь отметку, когда солнце сядет. Сейчас солнце на горизонте, по обе стороны от него сверкает ярко-голубое небо. И я поставлю отметку в сам
Houston. Ri
Ok, configurazione pannello 11, riga superiore: AC BUS B, voglio l'ANTENNA BANDA S, APERTA, APERTA; AC BUS A, REGISTRATORE, APERTO. Seconda riga, sotto SISTEMA A, voglio SOV PRINCIPALE attraverso QUAD 1 TCA, tutti CHIUSI. 
ठीक है, एंट्री चेक के बिल्कुल नीचे, जहाँ हम अभी हैं, सबसे नीचे वाली लाइन में लिखा है, "मोड टू स्टैंडबाय।" ठीक इसके ऊपर - आपको याद दिला दूं कि एक टिप्पणी लिख दें, "रेंज को इनिशियलाइज़ न करें।" ऐसा इसलिए है क्योंकि आप एंट्री चेक में आएंगे, इन सभी चीजों से गुजरेंगे; फिर हम पावर हटा देंगे। और मैं नहीं चाहता था कि आप जल्दबाजी में एंट्री पैरामीटर इनिशि
燃料はまだ十分あります。
«Аполлон-8»
双
잠시 기다려 주세요. 제가 통제실에 제 진술이 정확한지 확인하
Okay. Als Nächstes: „Leistungsschalterfeld 16, INSTRUMENTIERUNGS-SIGNALSENSOR, GESCHLOSSEN. Dann WECHSELRICHTER 1, AUSWÄHLEN. Dann HELIUMMONITOR zu SUPERCRIT PRESS. SUPERCRIT PRESS melden 
ええと。ちょっと早口になりすぎたかもしれません。3回目はターゲット58、63、65を撃ちました。訓練撮影は完了しました。Dマガジンで撮影しました。訂正します。Eマガジ
Хорошо. Теперь у нас есть дополнительные инструкции на случай, если это не сработает. Фрэнк, там написано, что нужно целых 20 секунд, чтобы ALC правильно выполнила свою работу. Если эти процедуры, которые я вам дал, не срабо
There's
जिम, हमें असली गड़बड़ी का पता लगाने के लिए लगभग एक दिन का समय दीजिए, ताकि हम देख सकें कि क्या हम वाकई इनमें से कोई भी ओए
هيوستن، أبولو 8... مرة أخرى. كيف تقرأ
好的，哥伦比亚号。上行链路已完成；现在电脑归你用了。你可以执行BLO
离焊接开始还有20分钟。哦，不好意思，是10分钟——离焊接开始还有10分钟，不好意思。还
नंबर 8? ठीक है, नंबर 8 
좋아요. 복사 
Sì. Sembra che tu sia stato terribilmente impegnato durante le prime due orbite, sai
도움이 된다면 OMNI에서 높은 
Хьюстон CAP COM. Он покинул ме
Okay. Momentan liegen un
Bene. E inoltre, il tuo vettore di stato è ora basato su circa 5 ore di tracciame
Aquarius, Housto
Esatto. E queste
Хорошо, Уолли
了解、フランク。了解しました。それから、3セット目と2セット目、全部のセッ
Roger, 11. Would you read that quad Alfa again,
Ok, va bene. Perché non so dove - quanto lontano ti ho perso. Ok, pannello 4; TELCOMM, GRUPPO 1, ad AC1. Sul pannello 5, chiudi quanto segue: GRUPPO PRESSIONE 1, PRINCIPALE B; GRUPPO PRESSIONE 2, PRINCIPALE B; TEMP, PRINCIPALE B; TRASDUTTO
아주 좋습니다. Canary Surgeon입니
Apol
روجر. ت
Okay. All I said was Jim doesn't have his
...밖에서 볼 때는 안에서 볼 때만
了解。状態は良好です。カプセルの状態も良好です。操縦モードは自動、ジャイロは正常、機動はオフです。操縦燃料は51パーセントと69パーセント、酸素は82パーセントと100パーセントです。以上です。ただ、今のところ宇宙服の蒸気ベントの温度を70
Вы ясно и четко выразили свою мысль. Объем сброса сточных вод снизился до 10 процентов. У меня есть вопрос по этому поводу. Хотите, чтобы я сделал еще один анализ, или вся эта информация 
了解しました。それを送信します。それでは消耗品の最新情報をお伝えします。170時間経過時点で、合計はマイナス3.5%、アルファはマイナス14.5%、ブ
Роджер. Посадочный мешок уже отключен. Я первым его обнаружил и сообщил об этом. Ретро-ручной режим отключен, и всё готово. В невесомости очень комфортно. У меня только самые приятные ощущ
Beh, la zona sembra liscia, ma non sono riuscito a vederli. Ho semplicemente individuato un cratere riconoscibile ne
Okay. Genau. Das ist Jim Lovell. Wir dachten, wir zeigen Ihnen heute einfach ein bisschen was vom Leben an Bord von Apollo 8. Wir haben Ihnen bereits Bilder vom Mond und von der Erde gezeigt und möchten Sie nun in unser Zuhause einladen. Wie Sie auf dem Instrumentenbrett sehen können, ist es nun schon seit mindestens vier Tagen unser Zuhause. Wir markieren jeden Tag auf dem Instrumentenbrett. Wir haben vier Tage hinter uns und arbeiten am fünften. Natürlich freuen wir uns alle auf die Landung am Freitag. Hier unten, im unteren Geräteraum des Raumschiffs, befindet sich der Fitnessberater des Präsidenten, Captain Jim Lovell, der gerade sein tägliches Trainingsprogramm absolviert. Sie sehen, wie er sich ganz frei bewegt. Er hat sich gerade den Kopf an der Optik gestoßen, die wir zur Navigation verwenden. Er trainiert mit einem Gerät, das die Muskeln in Form hält. Eine weitere sehr wichtige Funktion unseres Raumschiffs ist der Bordcomputer. Ich dachte, Sie wären vielleicht daran interessiert, die Anzeigen hier zu sehen, die uns alle Informationen über unsere Triebwerkszündung, die Navigation und die Geschwindigkeit beim Eintritt in die Erdumlaufbahn und beim Bremsen liefern. Sie sehen, dass er über ein Tastenfeld, ähnlich einer Schreibmaschinentastatur, gesteuert wird. Die Eingaben und Ausgaben darüber sind wirklich erstaunlich. Er hat uns fantastische Dienste geleistet, und Jim Lovell hat ihn hervorragend bedient. Ein weiterer wichtiger Punkt, ob im Weltraum oder auf der Erde, ist die Ernährung. Ich
इ
Gibt es irge
Al momento, ho tre assi praticamente in retroassetto. L'imbardat
I'm... right to the top of the row. 18:3
وأنا أنتظر قراءة مقياس الارتفا
حسنًا يا جيم. نريد أيضًا درجات حرارة منخفضة للخزان. ان
好的。动词37，输入；40，输入。好的
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। उड़ान भरने में तीन मिनट; गति 96 प्ल
这里是Sigma Seven，Kano Cap C
मुख्य बस कनेक्शन 
ヒューストン、16点だ、ジャック。それと、タンク1
收到。从我现
Salve, Apollo 11. Houston. Siamo pronti a metterti a letto e darti la buonano
Rog
OK, zone de manœuvre, objectif: survol, /G&N; 63385; + 0,97, - 0,23; + 0212,7, - 0141,7, - 0254,8; 148, 316, 050; NA, + 0022,5; 0360,9, 0:53, 0356,3; 33, 352,7, 15,0; NA, NA, NA. Latitude: -2
उनका मतलब था कि अगर आप इसस
罗杰。你要知道，沿着黄道，你可以看到日冕大约在距离太阳200个太阳直径的地方，而明亮的光芒则延伸到大约月球半径的八分之一到四分之一处。完
وسنقدم لكم الأشياء غداً، ولكن بشكل أساسي نتوقع أن يكون ناق
Beautiful, beautiful
어머, 길을 잃으
Bene. A 147 più 00, totale meno 2,0%, che equiv
36651, 3
Хорошо
Я только что снял кадры 3, 4, 5, 6 и 7 над Северной Африкой... (неразборчиво) Кадры (неразборчиво)... 6... Аравийский полуостров, снято из
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। मैं आपको बता दूं कि पहला विषय क्या है। हम सभी प्रवेश प्रक्रियाओं और इस तरह की जानकारियों की समीक्षा कर रहे हैं, और हम प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट की भी समीक्षा करेंगे। ह
로저, 11. 잘 들었습니다. 12시간 동안 예정된 블록 데이터였습니다. 비행
Хорошо. Я яростно трясу головой во все стороны, с закрытыми глазами, вверх и вниз, тангаж, крен, рыскание. Ничего в животе; ничего нигде. Теперь есть… я попробую нажать кнопку «ноль», кнопку «обнуление времени». Ну, я ее пропустил. Я немного дезориентирован относительно того, где именно все находится, не совсем понимаю, чего вы хотите этим добиться, но проблем с ориентацией нет. В
जेरी, मुझे तापमान को लेकर थोड़ी चिंता है। यहाँ काफी गर
Okay, we'll get a volts and amps
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. مايك، لا داعي للانتظار. حيثما تكون الأسعار ثابتة، يمكنك المتابعة. ان
रॉजर, जेमिनी 4। यह ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है। मैं अभी आपकी रीडिंग बहुत कमजोर ले रहा हूँ। आपके सेक्स्टेंट के लिए कोई अतिरिक्त बल्ब नहीं है। केवल उंगलियों की नोक से रोशनी ड
Roger. Die Nachtseite ist hell genug; ich kann sogar den Horizont gut durch das Periskop s
네, 말씀도 
No time, we'll see them when we get
रॉजर, रेव 33, रन 4, प्रारंभ समय 19:43:00, यानी सूर्यास्त का समय। समाप्ति 0-20। म
Gemini Net, Gemin
Roger. Qui sembra tutto a posto. Cosa 
مرحباً يا جيم. هل كان جهاز الإرسال والاستقبال عالي التردد
Понял. На этот раз запусти этот трек немного медлен
알겠습니다. 짐, 이 절차
ठीक है, ज
Bene. Se non c'è diminuzione nella quantità di liquido accumulatore secondario, glicole secondario alla valvola del radiatore su NORMALE. Passaggio successivo
C'est exact, Jim. Nous n'avons pas encore d'image. Ce sera dans la partie supérieure du... Correction, dans la partie supérieure du... en haut du cran 2 et dans la partie supérieure de... et, en position, si vous êtes bien aligné avec le Soleil, le curseur devrait se diviser. 
حسنًا. عند -4 ساعات ونصف، اضبط وضع SEP. أولًا، شغّل مُوازنة الاقتران. ثانيًا، صفّر العدادات: 404، 405، 406، ثم أضف 0؛ واقرأ 470. ثالثًا، حوّل قيمة +X إلى 0.5 قدم في الثانية. رابعًا، شغّل وضع CM/SEP. خامسًا، بعد SEP، صفّر 470 إلى 0. سادسًا، شغّل وضع التحكم في الوضع، ثلاثة، إلى وضع النبض. سابعًا، اضبط الميل للحصول على وحدة الخدمة لالتقاط الصور. ملاحظة: استخدم وحدة التحكم ACA للتحكم. أخيرًا، كان لدينا - كما ذكرت - -3 ساعات. ناور في وضع تثبيت الوضع لرؤية القمر حتى تح
रॉजर। क्या 
ENTERキーです。MODE CONTROLをATT HOLDに切り替えます。それでは右ヨーを30回クリック
Правильно. Перейдите к панели 382. Первый, второй, третий, четвертый параметры остаются без изменений. Нам нужно, чтобы клапан управления подачей воды в испаритель (SEC EVAP H2O CONTROL) был выключен, а клапан управления п
روجر. النجمان الموجودان في برج العقرب هما العقرب و
Ok. Ti ho letto forte e chiaro. Volevo solo ricordarti che in caso di perdita di COMM, non vogliamo che tu bruci il 7. Il tuo attuale ingresso è valido. Aggiorneremo i tuoi punti d
이거 보니까 눈이 삐뚤
알겠습니다. 87x140 규격을 이해했습니다. 이 규격은 평면 외 조정 및 높이 
Roger. PAD: 23514 179 071 001 547 104356 35575 357 10
य
そうだ、フレッド。これは
Мой план — вернуться и снова войти в ПРОГРАММУ 52 — ну, она 
好的。面板 229
알겠습니다. 제가 사령선에 장비를 남겨두는 것에 대해 걱정되는 점은, 지구 진입 전에 사령선 소모품으로 얼마나 빨리 버텨야 하는지, 그리고 사령선에는 팬과 수산화리튬이 있다는 점입니다. 사령선 시스템을 사용해야 하거든요. 게다가 지금 사령선에는 산소와 전력
D'accord. Reprenons au milieu de la page: le bloc « CMS resume attitude control », rayez. Rayez la ligne suivante: « PRO VERB 96 ». Rayez la troisième ligne: « PROPEL
Hous
شربتُ أربع رشفات تقريبًا في مثل هذا الوقت من
はい、そうです。さて、おそらくコンピューターで「37 ENTER 06 ENTER」と表示されるでしょう。ここでやりたいのは、コンピューターをスタンバイ状態にすることです。「37 06」と表示されたら、コード62を取得するために「ENTER」を押す必要があります。「62」が表示されたら、「PROCEED」を押して画面が消えるまで続けます。この
Okay. Sind Sie damit einverstanden, dass der CO2-Leistungsschalter
Roger that, Jim. What's his amperage? Did 
CB, DIRECT ULLAGE, two of them, CLOSE
Okay, I'd like to show this to you while I'm talking. It works like a camera. It has 
Fine, fine, Jim. You are sounding good this morning. We would like to give you a little rundown on these stars. As you can see in the flight plan, we've got you scheduled for a number 33, Antares, number 34, Atria, and number 40, old Altair. Now, the first of those, Antares, is in plane; the second two are out of plane. As you know, we would like to get a mixture of the in and the out of plane. Antares, number 33, is close to the sun, and we expect that you are going to have difficulty getting these measurements on number 33. We would like very much for you to try, b
Roger. I am about 15 minutes early with the fix update and the map update. I
Ok. Innanzitutto, la correzione a metà rotta sarà probabilmente a 104 ore, e tutto ciò che cerchiamo è un DELTA-V da 4 a 6 piedi al secondo. Ok. Questo è il primo punto. Ora, vi darò un riepilogo dei materiali di consumo. Ok. Nel, ne avete 1498, ovvero 1,498 ampere-ora rimanenti. Ciò significa che in 61 ore avreste... In media, 24,5 ampere. Ci 
Роджер. 11, это Хьюстон. Понимае
Haben Sie die Ab
حسنًا، أنت رائع حقًا. من دواعي سروري عدم وجود كل هذه الضوضاء. دعني أخبرك بما أريد فعله يا جيم. كما قلت، لن نقدم لك إجراءات مفصلة الآن. ما نتوقع أن نقدمه لك قريبًا هو إجراءات سنحاول إيصالها إليك بالشكل التالي. أولًا، سيكون لدينا جدول زمني، أشبه بخطة طيران، يتضمن أوقات جميع الأحداث الرئيسية وأي إعدادات وتكوينات ومفاتيح وما إلى ذلك خاصة بتكويننا، والتي ل
D'accord. On a réussi à obtenir un verrou
알겠습니다. 연소를 위해 유도 제어(GUIDANCE CONTROL), 모드 제어(MODE CONTROL), 자세 유지(ATT HOLD), 자세 제어(ATTITUDE CONTROL) 스위치를 조작할 겁니다. 롤 펄스(ROLL PULSE), 피치 펄스(PITCH PULSE), 요 모드 제어(YAW MODE CONTROL)로 설정하겠습니다. 피치와 롤은 수동으로 제어합니다. 엔진 짐벌(ENGINE GIMBAL)은 끄고, 추력은 10%로 설정하겠습니다. 시동과 정지는 수동으로 하고, 제어 여유 공간은 플러스-X 이동(PLUS-X TRANSLATIONAL) 버튼으로 조절합니다. 추력은 그대
そして、私はあなたの 
알겠습니다. 드로그 전개 및 착수까지 걸리는 시간을 50,000으로 설정하시려는 
Roger, vorrei consigliarti di usare le
Рог. Мы теряем тебя. Мы теряем тебя 
昨天，你和三个妻子带着孩子在休斯
حسنًا. بهذا نكون قد انتهينا من أسئلة الجيولوجيين لهذا المساء، وما لم يكن لديكم أي استفسارات أخرى، 
Ton film pour le module de commande semble bien fonctionner, Charlie, vu la quantité qu'on avait. On avait l'impression d'avoir emporté tout ce qu'il 
Роджер. Я не совсем уверен, что тогда произошло, Майк. Я размечал места посадки, испо
S
Je 
Rog
はい、1～10ページはこれで終わりです。もう一度読み返し
Affermativo. Bene, ora siamo a meno 3 ore, o al prossimo evento temporale, e inizia una manovra verso quella che chiamiamo la posizione di osservazione della Luna. Questa manovra è progettata per posizionare l'ottica del modulo di comando puntata a zero zero verso la Luna, e verrà volata con l'angolazione della sfera
Хорошо. В третьем ряду, в разделе «ТОПЛИВО» — двигательная установка: будет открыт резерв
كيف حال أجهزة الرد الآلي الثمانية الرما
ठीक है। मूलतः, यह सही है। चलिए, मैं इसे संक्षेप में समझा देता हूँ, फिर मैं आपको चरण बताऊँगा। मुझे लगता है कि इससे आपको बेहतर समझ आएगा। योजना यह है कि आप कुछ ऐसे कोण पर उड़ सकते हैं जो आपके ऑप्टिक्स को चंद्रमा की ओर इंगित करेंगे। अब, किसी भी समय, किसी भी स्थिति में, यदि आप दूरबीन में देखकर तारों के पैटर्न को पर्याप्त रूप से पहचान सकते हैं और आपको लगता है कि आप स्वयं संरेखण कर सकते हैं, तो हम यहीं रुकना चाहेंगे और आपको अपना संरेखण स्वयं करने देंगे। हालाँकि, हम आपको एक ऐसी प्रक्रिया बता रहे हैं जिससे आप दूरबीन में उन चीजों को देख सकेंगे जिन्हें आप बिना किसी परावर्तन या ऐसी किसी भी चीज की चिंता किए देख सकते हैं, और यह आवश्यक नहीं है कि इस प्रक्रिया का पालन तब तक किया जाए जब तक आपको यह पता न चल जाए कि दूरबीन में तारों के पैटर्न स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई दे रहे हैं। यदि आपको आगे बढ़ना है, तो हम पैंतरेबाज़ी करेंगे, चंद्रमा पर एक नज़र डालेंगे, वहाँ एक निशान लगाएंगे, और फिर / कोणों के साथ फिर से पैंतरेबाज़ी करेंगे और सूर्य पर एक नज़र डालेंगे, और सूर्य पर एक और निशान लगाएंगे, जिससे संरेखण पूरा हो जाएगा। अब, संरेखण योजना यह है कि हम आपको कोणों का एक सेट देंगे जिसके माध्यम से आप गेंद को मोटे तौर पर संरेखित कर सकते हैं जब चंद्रमा की ओर इंगित कर रहा हो। अब, कोणों का यह सेट आपके पास मौजूद नाममात्र के
好的。现在，在飞掠机动的页面上，在你北极星下方，我有一些新的数字，因为我们把北斗七星和北极星换成了天狼星和参宿七。你还记得吧？——顺便说一下，这也是检查清单的更新，我稍后会给你——但是关于那个机动，我用天狼星和参宿
ठीक है, मैं फिलहाल ज्या
انطلق يا برج الجوزا
जेमिनी 4, सीएसक्यू कैप कॉम। क्या आ
好的。燃烧规则。如果推力监测器读数低于或等于 77%，我们应该关闭发动机；如果推进剂空腔压力低于 160 psi，我们也应该关闭发动机；如果燃料氧化剂压差大于 25，并且需要地面呼叫，我们也应该关闭发动机；如果姿态误差在正负 10 度以内（启动瞬态过程除外），我们也应该关闭发动机。好的。速率限制为每秒正负 10 度。此外，如果发动机万向节指示灯亮起，国际空间站 (ISS) 程序报警指示灯亮起，CES 直流指示灯亮起，并且逆变器指示灯在尝试切换逆变器后仍然亮着，我们也应该关闭发动机。如果在燃烧过程中，当 NOUN 97 闪烁时发动机关闭，我们应该执行 PRO 手动空腔操作，然后按下启动按钮，并打开下降发动机指令覆盖功能。如果我们
حسنًا. سأفتح الآن خيار تجاوز بدء تشغيل ا
Bene. In pratica, è corretto. Lasciate che vi spieghi tutto in modo schematico per un minuto, poi vi leggerò i passaggi. Penso che sarà più chiaro. Lo schema prevede che la palla possa volare verso una serie di angoli che punteranno l'ottica verso la Luna. Ora, in qualsiasi momento, in qualsiasi posizione ci troviamo, se riuscite a guardare nel telescopio e a riconoscere le formazioni stellari a sufficienza da credere di poter effettuare un allineamento da soli, è qui che vorremmo interromperci e lasciarvi procedere con il vostro allineamento. Tuttavia, vi stiamo fornendo una procedura che vi darà ciò che sappiamo che potete vedere nel telescopio senza preoccuparvi di riflessi o cose del genere, e non è previsto che questa procedura debba essere seguita oltre il punto in cui siete certi di avere una buona definizione delle formazioni stellari nel vostro telescopio. Se devi proseguire, manovreremo, daremo un'occhiata alla Luna
حسنً
Veuillez noter que White avait retiré son gant gauche pour le ranger. Je l'ai retiré depuis environ 15 minutes. Il s'agit de la position standard ouvert
わかりました。OMNI を切り替えるだけです。わかりました。ジョー、1 ～ 4 ページの変更点を読んでみると、燃料電池ヒーター 3 がオフで、燃料電池 1 メイン バス A の中央に下りてきて、メイン バス A をオフにします。メイン バス - 燃料電池 2 をメイン バス A にオフにします。燃料電池 3 をメイン バス A にトークバック グレーにします。メイン バス A リセットをオフにします。燃料電池 1 をメイン バス B トークバック グレーにします。燃料電池 2 をメイン バス B トークバック グレーにします。燃料電池 3 をメイン バ
مرحباً، قاعدة ال
Die einzigen weiteren benötigten Messwerte sind die auf Seite 3-13 des Flugplans: BAT C, Pyro BAT A, Pyro BAT B, A, B, C und D sowie die DC-Anzeige (Haupt- oder Hauptschalter A 
ヒュ
Das ist Friendship Seven. Ich dreh
Sigma Seven. Non ho capi
알았어, 조. 내가 제대로 받았는지 다시 한번 확인해 볼게. 그 후, 우리 동안 육분의를 이용해 베넷 혜성을 관측하고, 혜성이 보인다면 롤 각도를 기록하라는 거지? 혜성은 이상적으로는 45도에서 75도 사이에서 보일 거고, 약
A
わかりました。パネル 11 の構成、一番上の行: AC BUS B、S バンド アンテナをオープン、オープンにします。AC BUS A、テープ レコーダーをオープンにします。2 行目の SYSTEM A の下では、MAIN SOV から QUAD 1 TCA までをすべてクローズにします。FLIGHT DISPLAYS の下の COMMANDER'S X-POINTER をオープン、オープン、RENDEZVOUS RADAR STANDBY HEATER をオープン、LANDING RADAR HEATER をオープンにします。ATTITUDE DIRECT ブレーカーをクローズ、ED: LOGIC POWER A をオープン、UTILITY をオー
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous ne parvenons toujours pas
네, 짐. 저희는 그걸 요, 피치, 롤이라고 읽어드렸고, 레지스터 1, 2, 3으로 알려드렸어야 했는데 그러지 못
रॉजर, हमारे पास अब को
알겠습니다. 연소 GET 3 47 37; 델타-V, 42.9; 연소 시간, 54초; 요 0, 피치 다운 3도; 코어 25, 00429; 코어 26, 00023; 코어 27, 0; 추진
거스, 그 녀석 나왔어! 정말 멋지군. 그런데 우리 
रॉजर। अपोलो 8, आपके बैकसाइड डेटा पर, यह लगभग समझ से बाहर है। बिल, हमारा सुझाव है कि आप 
Hous
Okay. Wir sind jetzt an der Stelle, wo wir die BLOCK-Daten plus vier und plus elf Stunden aufzeichnen werden. Die plus vier Stunden, die wir Ihnen zuvor genan
ええと、今はオ
Okay. Beide Moduswahlschalter sind immer noch ausgescha
मौसम की फोटोग्राफी... पहले दिन लगभग 24:41 बजे। ज़मीन पर बादलों की एक पूरी श
予想通り、移動に支障はないようです。地上での様々なシミュレーショ
好的
罗杰，我明白了。
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. كنتم على هامش التغطية من غولدستون. لقد انتهينا للتو من التغطية في غولدستون، ونود أن ننتقل إلى هنا قريبًا ونقرأ لكم رسائل برنامج إدارة ال
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地から昨夜の地質学に関する質問についてコメントをいただきます。私たちは、比較的滑らかなクレーター地帯に着陸しました。そこには細長い二次クレーター、つまり円形の二次クレーターが点在しており、そのほとんどには、大きさに関わらず、隆起した縁があります。これは必ずしも全てがそうではありません。周囲には、はっきりと縁が見えない小さなクレーターもいくつかあります。この地域全体の基質は、非常に細かい砂からシルトまでです。地球上でこれに最も近いのは、粉末状の黒鉛でしょう。この基質には、丸みを帯びたものや角張ったものなど、様々な形、大きさ、質感の岩石が埋まっており、多くの岩石の硬さは様々です。先ほども申し上げたように、私は単純な玄武岩や気泡玄武岩のようなものを見ました。結晶のないものや、小さな白い斑晶が1%から5%未満含
И во время работы двигателя вы, конечно же, будете управлять тангажем и креном с помощью индикаторов ошибок, и это та небольшая схема, которую мы отраба
D'accord. Sur le panneau 250, fermez le disjoncteur BAT A (ALIMENTATION/ARRIVÉE). Sur le panneau 275, fermez le disjoncteur INVERTER POWER 2 (PRINCIPAL B).
Hier in Memphis, Tennessee, wurde eine junge Dame, die derzeit 3,7 Kilogramm wiegt, von ihren Eltern, Herrn und Frau Eddie Lee McGhee, „Module“ get
ي
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. До прямой видимости осталось 10 минут; увид
A che ora è avvenuto quel boost
At this point in time, which is of course just prior to sunset, we are coming up with a batch of the white particles. They show up in the blue 
حسنًا. أنت تريد الآن إضافة X للحصول على 7
로저. 번개만 보입니다. 거의 안개에 갇힌 것 같네요. 잠시 여기 있다가 곧 다시 올라오겠습니다. 바로 아래에서 번개가 치는 걸 본 것 
Aurora Seven, qui Indian Cap Com. Tutti i nostri tempi di retrosequenza sono nominali. Vuoi ch
Ro
Alright. Midcourse correction number 4: the / 62888 November Alfa November Alfa minus 00012, minus 00011, plus 00012 031 008 323 November Alfa, plus 00618 00020 011 00020 17 2965 308 Alpha-Centauri, up 073, left 34. For the stars, it will be the primary Siri
Ok, sembra una buona idea. Penso che se avessimo un po' più di tempo, vorremmo farlo per bene. Stand by
Nous vous entendons p
Eh bien, il a dit ça il y a une minute pour vous faire comprendre qu'il était apaisé après vos commentaire
TR 時間はエリア 7-3
Не слишком сильно. Я замечаю, что это отличается от того, как было, когда я засыпал. Сейчас мы находимся под большим углом к ​​терминатору Земли, поэтому, когда мы начинали движение, мы были
Okay, Buzz. Zu den Punkten in deinem Flugplan, zunächst ein paar Aktualisierungen. Wir haben den Mittelkurs 6 gestrichen. Bleib einfach auf Kurs. Ich gebe dir heute Morgen etwas mehr Zeit. Zweitens: Wir sind bereit für eine BATT-B-Ladung, wann immer du sie einsetzen möchtest. Drittens: Wir hätten diesmal eine etwas andere Idee für die Abwasserentsorgung. Wir möchten sie an unseren Markierungen vom Boden aus durchführ
Ok, 2 serbatoio 1, 75,97. Serbatoio 2, 78,
Wa
了解、マイ
पहली अंगूठी 50 की है; कॉपी करें।
Peut-être vaudrait-il
Okay. Das war die gesamte Vorgehensweise zur Dämpfung der Raten – obwohl ich Ihnen nur Schritt 2 genannt hatte, war das die gesamte Vorgehensweise. Nun weiter mit dem, was auf Seite 29 gedruckt ist: Korrektur, Sie hatten einen Fehler im Rücklesevorgang unter „LAGEKONTROLLE“. Dort stand „NICKEN und ROLLEN“ statt „PULSIEREN“ und „GIEREN“ statt „DIREKT“. Weiter auf Seite 29 mit der gedruckten Vorgehensweise: Streichen Sie die ersten vier Zeilen. Streichen Sie auch Schritt 3. Fügen Sie unter „Aktivierung“ einen Schritt hinzu. Der erste Schritt lautet: „ASA CB(16) 10 Minuten lang prüfen“. Der Rest d
Bon, si ça bout, on le saura avant; on ne tardera 
아폴로 8호입니다. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 저희는... 아닙니다. 알 수 없습니다. 꺼주셔도 됩니
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Ende
알겠습니다. 좋습니다. 연소 시간은 약 3분 9초 정도 걸
Ricevuto. Abbiamo una squa
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Если вам не нужен компьютер, пожалуйста, нажмите ENTER, чтобы мы могли переключить ан
最初の段階での騒音レベルは、まったく不快になるほどで​​はなかったと言わざるを得
حسنًا، سأبحث هناك. 
Ok. Vuoi che entrambi i
रॉजर। हमें आपका मौखिक तापमान प्राप्त हो रहा है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप पूरे राज्यों में क्वांटिटी रीड
Bien, nous vous proposons d'essayer d'observer les étoiles du côté éclairé par la Terre, hors de votre champ de vision. Oubliez le sextant; contentez-vous d'une adaptation à l'obscurité optimale du côté éclairé par la Terre et essayez de distingue
刚才看到一颗卫星，很高……就像星星一样，在地面上若隐若现。离我们非常非常远。我看到这颗卫星飞过时，我
Ricevuto. Hai OAMS s
ヒュース
Hast du die
Okay, J
D'accord. Prêt
Jack, this is Houston. We want you to keep the up and keep the lights on so you can see in there, and leave battery off - battery A off and, at the appropriate time, we'll put it on MAIN A. And we're going to keep the up so's we can get a coarse aline in t
أبولو 11
حسنًا، نحن ننظر في
로저, 목이 
حسنًا. أريدك أن تلقي نظرة لترى إن كا
レトロファイア ―
Tranquillité, Houston. Nous allons examiner ce problème et nous vous recontacterons dans quelques instants concernant l'heure de l'événement de mission… ou plutôt, le compte à rebours 
Посмотрим, что мы сможем сделать, Джек. Мы свяжемся с отделом восстановления и посмотрим, сможем ли мы отправить агента туда, в Тихий океан, когда ты вернешься. Черт возьми, посмотрим. В профессиональном баскетболе «Никс» обыграли «Милуоки Бакс» со счетом 110:102, Билли Каспер лидирует на Masters после 54 лунок с результатом 208, а весенние тренировки по американскому футболу идут по
Roger, Bill. Danke. Könntet ihr uns bei Gelegenheit die Deutung geben? Und was das angeht, ist das für den Anfang völlig in Ordnung. Euer erster Stern, Nummer 14, sollte 
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Когда у вас будет свободная минута, не могли бы вы предоставить нам бортовые показания бака N2 «Браво», пожалуйста? И мы хотели бы убедиться, что вы понимаете, что с тех пор, как вы прекратили испол
بقي شيء واحد لنفعله في الخطوات. عل
That's affirmed, if that
Okay. Abbiamo persone che stanno lavorando anch
... 眠っ
I have it 
手袋をは
罗杰。我用自动模式对接的，正如我所说，我不太确定接触的确切时刻。我一直在反复检查对接探针的指示器。我看到了两个旋转的指示灯，表明三个对接闩——不是三个，而是三个……闩——已经扣合，我们软对接成功。当时情况看起来非常稳定。
Ok. Prima di tutto, sembra impossibile ignorare il fatto che voi ragazzi sta
收到
알겠습니다. 고감도 설정은 거의 한계에 다다른 
مرحباً يا إيجل، معكم هيوستن. لدينا تشويش في وصلة ا
了解しました。了解しました。可能であれば、サーモスタットを使ってキャビンの左右の壁の温度を測ってください。また、
मैंने सेक्स्टेंट पर हरे रंग का फ़िल्टर इस्तेमाल किया, और हरे रंग का फ़िल्टर बिना किसी फ़िल्टर के मुकाबले क्षितिज को ज़्यादा साफ़ और स्पष्ट दिखाता है। क्या आप स
Okay. Let me give you my observations on main bus B. Things happened pretty fast there, and we first heard the impact or explosion or whatever caused it, I'm not sure. The next - About 1 second later, there was a MASTER ALARM which was the MAIN BUS B UNDERVOLT. I looked at the voltage, and the voltage was good at this time so I'm suspecting it was a spike. Fuel cell 3 was also good, with good flow. However, Fred, at that point, was coming into the command module and got over into his seat. At that time, we shortly had an AC BUS 2 light about the time he got into his seat. He looked at the MAIN BUS B and the MAIN BUS B was reading ZERO. It, however, - and the fuel cell flows were ZERO. I'm kind of suspecting that perhaps we do have a MAIN - a current MAIN BUS B. But that's merely a guess. I never did try to reset it. We were having other problems with the MAIN BUS A, having an UNDERVOLT and a few 
- - c
حسنًا. اقتربنا من دقيقتين؛ الأمور تسير على ما ي
अपोलो 8
Роджер
दो मिनट पूरे होने पर, जब 30 सेकंड शेष रह जाएं, तो 30 से उलटी गिनती शुरू करें। मुझ
Bereit
Roger. Das Bild ist jetzt viel besser; ich vermute, die Lichtverhältnisse
잠시 기다려주세요. 저희 거리는 약 3000피트 정도 
Roger. Capisco che il GET di acquisizione è 03:07; GET di R = 248 nm; GET del rendez-vous 03:15; azimut 0 gradi; elevazione 7 gradi; GET dell'alba 05:37 00 più o meno uno per TPI. E hai l'aggiornamento per i destinat
I'm not sure I copied that, Fred. If you asked me whether I had that powerup procedure, I don't have it fo
Bei einem Gierwinkel von 90 Grad ist es, als würde man durch ein Zugfenster schau
알겠습니다. 어차피 거기까지 보내는 데 시간이 엄청 오래 걸리잖아요. 하나 보내본다고 나
ええ、ジェリー、明るい点が見えます。あれは…太陽直下の点だと思います。南アメリカ沖にあるように見えます。周囲の青い海に比べると灰色がかった点です。直径ははっきりして
Ok. Su Power 5, spegnimento di emergenza. Punto 1
D'accord. Jack, 1-A indique 0 (échelle inférieure); 1-B indique 3,45. D'acc
لنر
Хорошо, Одиссея, Хьюстон. Мы готовы к тому, чтобы вы включили разминку, и, при прочих равных условиях, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили упражнение «Джетт» из вашего контрольного списка
로저. 여기는 정상인 것 같네요. 모든 게 좋아 보입니다. 자동 연료는 55% 남았습니다. 70,000피트를 지나 65,000피트까지 도달했습니다. 자세는 매우 안정적입니다. 60,000피트에 가까워지고 있습니다. 레이트 커맨드도 아주 잘 작동합니다. 50,000피트에 가까워지고 있습니다. 아주 좋아 보입니다. 45,000피트에 가까워지고 있습니다. G는 약 1g까지 떨어졌습니다. 40,000,000피트에서 스로틀을 당길 준비를 하고 있습니다. 스로틀을 당기니 스로틀이 빠졌습니다. 소리는 들리지만 구름 때문에 보이지는 않습니다. 자세는 잘 유지되고 있습니다. 수
好的。我们稍等片刻，
Well, that's intermittently affirmative, Bruce. We have these two hydrogen filters, which work fine as long as you don't hook them up to a food bag. But the entry way into the food bag has enough back pressure to cause the - the filte
أنا أسأل. لم أكن متأكدًا من أنني نسختها بشك
روجر، كولومبيا. هل قمت بالتحوي
पांच डि
هل أنت في وضع التدفق على الراديا
Apo
روجر.
نعم، إنه قادم. يبدو أنه يواجه بعض الصعوبة في العودة إلى المركبة
How many did you have in the other one? Two in th
Negativo. Qui tutto sta andando a gonfie vele. A quanto pare sono impegnato per sei ore e ne sono molto contento. L'impianto funziona a meraviglia. Nel caso Al non riuscisse a rimettermi il carburante. Ho l'81% di cambio automatico, l'80% di cambio manuale, - a questo punto sono in modalità automatica, controllo retroattivo
了解、アポロ8号。君に何か用
ठीक है। मुझे यहाँ एक नया पेज मिल गया है, और मैं कॉपी कर
罗
हैलो ह्यूस्टन। ज
ロジャー、ヒューストン。プラス 4。重量は同じまま、マイナス 164、プラス 129、マイナス 01594、プラスすべてのボール、プラス 52885 178 155 000 NA、プラス 00192 52909 627 52694 12 1037 211、地球の中心が下 063、右 213、
Bene, ci capovolgeremo e ci piegheremo verso il basso, quind
일몰이 정말 멋지네요. 오래 볼 필요도 없을 것 같아요. 정말 흥미롭습니다. 또 하나 신기한 건, 눈이 어둠에 적응하지 않았을 때는 모든 게 얼마나 새까맣게 보이는지입니다. 창문에 뭔가 코팅이 되어 있는 게 확실히 보이네요. 이제 다시 VOX로 돌아가서 UHF-hi 모드로 송신해야겠습니다. 바이저를 열어서 오른쪽 마이크를 닦았습니다. 핥았네요. 바이저를 닫고 바로 밀봉해서 슈트 회로가 제대로 작동하도록 했습니다. 다시는 문제가 생기지 않도록 해야죠. 슈트 공기 흡입구 온도가 68도 정도로 아주 잘 유지되고 있습니다. 그래서 돔을 다시 올려
Während Fred seine Hängematte abnimmt und wieder aufhängt, könnte ich Ihnen einen Eindruck von der Verwirrung vermitteln, die hier herrscht, da es kein Oben und Unten gibt und ich mich oben auf der Aufstiegsmaschine direkt am Tunneleingang befinde. Ich drehe die Kamera um 180 Grad und schwenke von Fred durc
地面计算机确认您设置的轴和耳轴角度指向星体。然而，该轴和耳轴角度似乎也指向了结构内部，因此虽然您能看到地球地平线，但星体却
Das ist richtig, Jim. Weiter geht's mit Seite 29. An dieser Stelle ist ein schriftlicher Eintrag erforderlich. Es sind etwa sechs oder sieben Zeilen, und ich werde versuchen, langsam vorzug
Знаете, я думаю, что Водолей — 
맞아요. 아마 독일어겠죠
我在第二次绕地球运行时，于1时58分（修正后为2时58分30秒）看到了第一颗星。地面光线
好吧，杰克。这件事我们得跟你讨价还价。与其买两袋，不如你只买一袋。这应该没
हां, मैंने किया। और हमें लगभग 20 पाउंड सा
ロジャー、ヒューストン。オプション3を試して、プラットフォームを
Roger RKV，你们分手了。我只收到了你消息的开头和结
Der zweite Punkt ist natürlich, dass Sie, wenn Sie die passive Temperaturregelung deaktivieren, einen Winkel von etwa 90 Grad zur Erdachse haben. Wenn Sie also nach links gieren, müssen Sie so lange nach links gieren, bis der m
로저. T/M을 수신하고 있지 않습
ठीक है, जैक। आपको याद होगा कि पहले सभी ने चंद्रमा अस्त होने से कुछ मिनट पहले उसे देखने की बात कही है, और जब आप वहाँ पहुँचेंगे तब तक क्षितिज शायद अँधेरा होगा; आप सुबह जल्दी प्रवेश कर रहे हैं; और पश्चिम से आने पर भी आपको अँधेरा क्षितिज ही दिखाई देगा। तो, एक बैकअप तकनीक के तौर पर, जैसे आप क्षितिज को ट्रैक करते हैं, हम आपको एक एटीट्यूड देंगे जो पैड पर होगा ताकि आप सीधे चंद्रमा को देख सकें। यह एक इनर्शियल एटीट्यूड है; यह बदलेगा नहीं, और आप 36-डिग्री विंडो लाइन को चंद्रमा पर रखेंगे, और फिर बस वहीं बैठकर उसे देखेंगे। और ठीक पहले, पृथ्वी ऊपर आएगी और उसे ढक लेगी, और तब आपको क्षितिज का अच्छा अवलोकन मिल जाएगा। मेरे पास कुछ समय हैं, जो मैं आपको बाद में बताऊँगा। और अगर आप अभी इस चीज़ को देखें, तो उस समय आप सेटिंग कर सकते हैं या जो चाहें कर सकते हैं। और आपके पास एक ज्ञात एटीट्यूड संदर
रॉजर। और मुझे कुछ और बातें पता हैं, माइक। हमें इस समय बैटरी बी का चार्ज बंद करना होगा, और साथ ही, छिटपुट गरज-चमक के कारण हमारे लक्षित लैंडिंग पॉइंट पर मौसम बहुत खराब है। हम उनमें से किसी एक में फंसना नहीं चाहते, इसलिए हम - आपका लक्ष्य बिंदु आगे की ओर ले जा रहे हैं। सुधार, यह आगे की ओर होगा, 1500 नॉटिकल मील की एंट्री के लिए, ताकि हम अपलिफ्ट कंट्रोल सुनिश्चित कर सकें। नए निर्देशांक 13 डिग्री, 19 मिनट उत्तर, 169 डिग्री,
아니요. 그건 아무 소용이 없었어요. 서보 모터 전원이 필
로저. 6-4의 그리니치 표준시와 역추
Vous vous 
好的，谢谢。收到，电压39
了解。通信状況に合わせてロールします。SバンドアンテナOMNI AをBravoに設定し、SバンドアンテナOMNIをOMN
Apollo 11 meldet sich
Je n'obtiens que des parasit
И я записываю маневр восстановления, который мне дал Чарли. Шаг 5 звучал так: «Когда скорость меньше 0,05 г
बहुत बढ़िया। क्या उन्हें मुझ
Houston, Apollo 11. Je crois que le problème vient du fait que cette position n'est pas assez proche du point substellaire. J
قل
Gémeaux 4, chirurgien RKV. C'est un bon bilan. Votre tension artériel
حسنًا. أراك غدًا. شكرًا لك على 
どれくらいが妥当
रॉजर, जैक ने मुझे बताया कि यह सब एक ही सर्किट ब्रेकर है, और
제미니 4호, 여기는 휴스
روجر. إنه يرتفع الآن. لكنه ظل مستقراً عند
Roger, 11. This is Houston. At approximately 71 hours to 72 hours, we have you down for an eat period which I imagine is probably in progress already. 71 hours: O2 fuel cell purge; 72 hours GET: CO2 filter change number 6, secondary radiator flow check. And we'll send you up a block data on a 2 hour pass, pericynthion pass, return mode abort. At 73 hours 00 minutes: stop at approximately 0 degrees roll. That is, when you're coming up on 0 degrees roll angle around 73 hours, we'd like you to stop. And perform a
Don't forget DESCENT REG 1, off; 10 seconds to g
Apollo 11, Houston. Buzz, dein EKG sieht j
Okay, wir fangen mit Filmkassetten-Packung Nr. 11 an. Wir haben gerade Nr. 9 fertiggestellt. Bei dieser Packung schien die Kontrollleuchte zu funktionieren. Wir sollten besser überprüfen, ob sich die Kontrollleuchte bei Nr. 8 irgendwie einschalten lässt. Möglicherweise ist es das Filmkassettenmagazi
Okay. Noch etwas sollten wir bedenken: Wir haben den Mond nicht gesehen – wir konnten ihn nicht vollständig sehen und
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン、3点、2点。オーバー
알겠습니다. 휴스턴, 
Ruhe bewahren, Houston. Wir hätten gerne Ihre Messwerte und haben Ihren EM-Dump nochmals überprüft. Alles scheint in Ordnung zu sei
حسنًا. لد
لا أعتقد ذلك يا فريد. إنها على بعد مئات الأميال خلفك. 700 ميل هو الرقم، كما قيل لي. وبما أن لوحة التحكم لم تُجرِ تصحيح المسا
Солнце снова прямо перед глазами... это, приблизительно, правильный угол рыскания, потому что именно там солнце буд
了解。RCS D
نعم، أنا ل
D'accord. Qu'est-ce que
Die Spitze des nächsten kle
O
Okay. So you're sure it's the service 
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。裏側にある大きなクレーターの一つです。外壁に小さな黒い点を見つけたので、単眼鏡を当ててみました。すると、直径約400メートルほどの範囲が見えるようになりました。それは真新しいような暗い色の穴で、このクレーターの壁面に見られる他の小さなクレーターや穴とは対照的です。このクレーターの周りには、このような穴が2つか3つあるようです。特に私の目を
Se... n
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы просим вас отключить низковольтные выводы, пе
حسناً. أرى ض
それは今まで誰かに言われた中で最も素敵な言葉です！どうですか
Okay. 8, /: 45701, minus 040, plus 157 , plus 33195, minus 01267, plus 04716 179 008 001, NA, plus 00187 33552 311 33355 42 09090 252, Dzuba down
ओह, हम देख रहे हैं कि हमारे पास कितना सामान है, शायद थोड़ा राशनिंग करने के बारे में सोचें। मतलब, बस यह सुनिश्चित करना कि हमारे पास पर्याप्त साम
Оди
로저. 그건 잠시 보류하겠습니다. 간단한 3단계 절차였는데, "활성화 페이지 1, 1A, 2를 반복하십시오"라고 되어 있었지만, 아무도 이해하지 못하는 단계가 하나 더 있었습니다. 그래서 기본적으로 저희가 권장하는 방법은 방금 생략했던 SUPERCRIT 압력 측정 절차를 반복하는 것입니다. 필요하
Vous voulez que l'interrupteur de mon ordinateur soit allumé et que la climatisation soi
ه
और अब मैंने आपको रेट्रो क्लॉक में सुझाया गया बदलाव भी बता दिया है। अपने रेट्रो में, आप रेट्रोफायर मोड 
Apollo 8, ici Houston
لنجرب العنوان 
Okay, Fred. Zunächst zu den Vorbereitungen, beginnend mit der Checkliste für Notfälle auf Seite 24. Wir empfehlen, dort zu beginnen, und freuen uns über Ihre Anmerkungen dazu. Zweitens: In der Brennposition sollte die Sonn
फिर से कहिए 
Das ist bestätigt, Columbia. Es ist etwa 6,5 ​​Kilometer lang. Einen Moment bitte. Wir zeigen Ihnen gleich den genauen 
目前，飞机右偏航角速度为每秒1度，俯仰角速度为每秒0度，左滚转角速度为每秒0.75度。燃料量没有变化，推进器没有动作。此时，飞机正在转
Roger. Gib uns einen Tipp für d
कोई दिक्कत नहीं है। हम अंतरिक्ष यान की डॉकिंग लाइट और
Th
あれは面白い話だったよ。ショックは感じなかったし、かなり安定していると思っていたのに。そこでリトラクト（後退）に行ったら、大混乱になったんだ。皆さんは、リト
Oui. Peut-être. Une pa
알겠습니다, 리더님. 거기서 뵙겠습니다. 방금 전 주행은 정말 좋았습니다. 이 
D'accord, Jack. Allume maintenant la bouteille d'oxygène ASCENT numéro 2, la b
Роджер. Просто чтобы убедиться, что в этом тесте телевизора не во
休斯顿水瓶座。关于二氧化碳
Okay. 2 4 legge 4,7 volt, 2 5 legge 4,8 volt, 1 2 legge 4,8 
«Атлантический
잠시
罗杰。你五
روجر، نحن الآن في فراغ، والبدلة المناسبة تحافظ على درجة حرا
एमएससी-10 के लिए अपने फ्लाइट प्लान के समय का उपयोग करें। क
Négatif. N
了解、ジム。さっき言ったことはもう変更済みだ。下の「CABIN REPRESS」を閉じ、「S&C」の下の「ASA BREAKER」が確実に閉じて
もうすぐ地平線が見えてきて、おそらく太陽が目に入るでし
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une de l'actualité mondiale. Seuls quatre pays, la Chine communiste, la Corée du Nord, le Nord-Vietnam et l'Albanie, n'ont pas encore informé leurs citoyens de votre vol et de votre alunissage. Un journaliste a même déclaré être à court de mots pour décrire votre succès. Ce soir, le président Nixon assistera au match des étoiles de baseball à Washington. Après le match, il se rendra dans la zone de récupération du Pacifique. Mercredi soir, il se rendra en hélicoptère de l'île Johnston au navire de transmissions de la Marine, l'Arlington. Jeudi matin, il reprendra l'hélicoptère pour rejoindre le Hornet à temps pour assister à votre amerrissage. Le président sera accompagné du secrétaire d'État William Rogers et de Frank Borman. Ils observeront l'amerrissage depuis la passerelle du navire de récupération en compagnie de l'amiral John Sidney McCain Jr., commandant des forces du Pacifique. Après son séjour à bord du Hornet, le président entamera sa tournée en Asie et sa visite prévue en Roumanie. On pense que Luna 15 s'est écrasée dans la mer des Crises hier après avoir effectué 52 orbites autour de la Lune. L'agence de presse soviétique TASS a rapporté que des « recherches scientifiques » avaient été menées dans l'espace proche de la Lune. Sir Bernard Lovell, de l'observatoire de Jodrell Bank, a déclaré que Luna 15 avait percuté la surface lunaire à une vitesse d'environ 480 km/h. La situation est relativement calme ces derniers temps au Vietnam. Des soldats américains en patrouille ont été aperçus avec des radios à transistors branchées sur votre vol. Le réseau de radio et de télévision des forces armées vietnamiennes a couvert l'intégralité de la mission. Des escarmouches se poursuivent entre les Égyptiens et les Israéliens le long du canal de Suez. Les observateurs de l'ONU sur place tentent de mettre fin aux hostilités. À Washington, la commission des voies et moyens de la Chambre des représentants a voté pour réduire de 27,5 % à 20 % le quota d'épuisement des réserves de pétrole. Il a plu à plusieurs reprises dans la région de Houston. Aujourd'hui, le ciel est nuageux et d'autres averses sont attendues. Côté sport, comme mentionné précédemment, le match des étoiles a lieu ce soir. Aucun match n'a eu lieu hier. Hier soir à New York, l'Association des chroniqueurs de baseball d'Amérique a désigné Babe Ruth comme le plus grand joueur de tous les temps. Joe DiMaggio a été nommé le plus grand joueur vivant. Frank Borman a fait ces annonces lors d'un dîner en l'honneur des joueurs. Joe Namath a passé une journée complète au camp d'entraînement des Jets de New York. Cinq policiers ont eu du mal à contenir environ 500 enfants qui voulaient toucher Broadway Joe. Il a déclaré se sentir bien et qu'il jouerait au match des étoiles le 1er août, si l'entraîneur Weeb Eubank le lui permet. Le camp des Oilers à Kerrville a été inondé hier, mais les entraînements ont continué. Il y a eu quelques blessures mineures, mais rien de grave. L'entraîneur Wally Lemm est satisfait des entraînements jusqu'à présent. Les Oilers attendent plus de 30 000 spectateurs pour le match de pré-saison contre Buffalo. Apparemment, l'annonce de la retraite de Don Meredith ne devrait pas freiner l'enthousia
ठीक है। समझ गया। अगर हो सके तो थर्मोस्टेट का इस्तेमाल करके केबिन की बाईं और दाईं दीवारों का तापमान पता कर लें। साथ ही, अगर कोई नमी दिखाई दे रही 
罗杰，比尔。我们丢失了你1
حسنًا، فريدو. قراءة جيدة. الآن، على الأرض، نُقدّر - إذا كان عليكما إجراء هذا المحاذاة - أن ميل الأرض سيكون حوالي درجتين. وستكون مضاءة بنسبة ثلاثة أرباع تقريبًا. الآن، لوضع علامة على الأرض، نريد منكما رسم خط وهمي بين قرني الهلال ووضع علامة في منتصف المس
Aquarius, Houston. Wir müssen d
好的，吉姆。中途在进入界面前5小
Okay, Jack; Houston. Vorremmo che tu andassi, INVIO; 06, 
罗杰，他现在正在插入口
Roger. GET B 05 13 13; GTNSR, 012538; Delta-V
Salut Ve
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, hier spricht Huntsville... Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, hier spricht Huntsville Com Tech
자, 이제 막 시야가 트이기 
Roger. Point suivant: le taux de montée en pression de l'hélium supercritique est nominal. Vous nous avez également interrogés sur l'activité de vos propulseurs lors de la dernière rotation. Nous comprenons maintenant: vous avez indiqué que le tangage était en mode ACCEL COMMAND et le lacet et le roulis en mode RATE COMMAND. Vous actionniez vos propulseurs de tangage. Cela couple les vitesses de rotati
ठीक ह
여행 
Ballon – Je manœuvrerai suffisamment pour que le ballon soit dans le sillage du véhicule 
Wir fliegen durch 82. Die G-Kräfte sind auf etwa 2 gesunken. Der Landearm ist EINgefa
Retourne-toi pou
了解しました。もし海面ラインの調整が
حسناً
Okay. Das ist in Ordn
여기는 무체아입니다. 우메라 섬에도 한번 가보시
यहां स
ت
こんにちは、アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。ホワイトチームが始動しました。エキサイティングなテレビ番組と就寝前のレポートをお楽しみに。
Ricevuto. Li ho pr
Slow up. We just got quad A plotted. They are
Хо
रॉजर। पेरिगी 86 [समुद्री मील] क
Okay. Und falls das nicht funktionieren sollte, haben wir den ursprünglichen Plan in der Hinterhand, eine Reihe von Anflugwinkeln, die
600 pieds, en bas
好的，吉姆。我们替你做决定；这是我们一直想跟你讨论的话题。我们一直在考虑这个问题，我们的想法是——当然，最终决定权在你，但就我们权衡利弊来看，你刚才提到的优点显而易见。我们在发射前一小时左右会进行舱门完整性检查，如果舱门损坏，你很难迅速钻进宇航服。另一方面，穿宇航服的缺点是，它们可能会大大降低你的速度，这还不包括
جيد جداً
分かりました。分かりました。昨日ケープ岬からあなたの打ち上げに立ち会われた西ドイツのヴィリー・ブラント首相とニクソン大統領は、本日会談を完了する予定です。ブラント首相は、東欧諸国、特に東ドイツ、ポーランド、ロシアとの協議を進めることについて大統領の確約を得るために米国を訪れたと報じられています。多くの航空管制官はまだ業務を休止していますが、徐々に業務に復帰しつつあるとの報道があります。MOCRの管制官も引き続き業務に
إنها حقا
はい、土曜日にあなたが戻ったときでも咲いてい
好的。继续，弗雷
괜찮아요. 잠시 기다려 주세요. 다시 돌아가겠습니다. 좀 지체될 거예요. 캡슐에서 발생한 문제를 해결하고 싶습니다. 우주복 회로에서 발생한 문제인 것 같은데, 해결하는 데 어려움을 겪고 있습니다. 설정을 8로 올리겠습니다. 지금
Ещё один момент. Философия выбора времени для этого промежуточного этапа отчасти основана на том
أنا متأكد من ذلك. لا يوجد شيء يخرج من المحركات
سيجما سفن، سيجما سفن، هذه شركة هانتسفيل 
여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 달에서 생중계로 전해드립니다. 방금 TV 카메라를 전환했습니다. 지난 16시간 동안 관측해 온 지구의 모습을 먼저 보여드렸습니다. 이제 지난 16시간 동안 고도 60마일(약 96km)에서 비행하며 관찰해 온 달의 모습을 보여드리겠습니다. 빌 앤더스, 짐 러벨, 그리고 저는 크리스마스 이브인 오늘, 달에서 실험과 사진 촬영, 그리고 우주선 엔진을 가동하여 기동하는 작업을 했습니다. 이제부터는 오늘 하루 종일 따라온 궤적을 따라가며 달의 일몰까지 보여드리겠습니다. 달은 우리 각자에게 다른 모습으로 다가옵니다. 오늘 본 달에 대한 인상은 저마다 다를 것입니다. 저는
好的。根据我们目前的跟踪数据，昨晚给出的近地点时间（69+10）仍然有效，目前飞掠地球近地点的高度为65.8米。看起来第三阶段的飞行速度将低于每秒1英尺。所有轨迹参数都保持良
好的。同样的说明。我从头再说一遍。好的。“平衡耦合器”应该改为“关闭”。下面，应该把“LMP”改为“喷射”。在-2秒处划掉“400+1”；在-1秒处划掉“主臂，开启”。在-10
आप केप सर जॉन को बता सकते हैं कि नाभि य
Okay, Bill. Ich möchte meine letzte Anmerkung zur Verwendung des Bordzustandsvektors für Punkt 4 zurücknehmen. Nach weiterer Prüfung vor Ort müssen die Berechnungen nun dringend durchgeführt werden. Anstatt dies zu verschieben oder doppelt durchzuführen, werden wir die bisher üblichen Verfahren anwenden. Was die Mondumlaufbahn betrifft, haben wir uns das genauer angesehen, und einige Kollegen – Jack Schmitt und seine Kollegen – untersuchen im Hintergrund die Auswirkungen der Fenster. Im Grunde genommen scheinen zwei Optionen Einfluss auf Punkt 2 zu haben. Eine Möglichkeit wäre, dass Sie und Jim die Plätze tauschen und Jim so seine SAM-Daten erhält. Die andere Möglichkeit wäre, das Raumschiff zu drehen und Jim die Optik so weit wie möglich nach vorne richten zu lassen, um seine SAM-Daten durch das Teleskop zu erfassen. Wir würden gerne Ihre Gedanken dazu hören, was Sie mit den Fenstern machen könnten. Wenn Sie Vorschläge haben, würden wir diese gerne in unsere 
是的，我们也在考虑这个问题。要我快速演示一
알겠습니다. 같은 의견입니다. 다시 처음부터 설명드리겠습니다. "BALANCE COUPLE"을 "OFF"로 변경해야 합니다. 그 아래 "L
Lequel... po
Сейчас над районом MSC нависли дождевые тучи. Дождь начался здесь примерно 10 минут назад, и, по последним данным, у нас был довольно сильный ливень. На этом новости на сегодня заканчиваются, Аполлон-11.
Слабо, но разборчиво, «Дружба Семь». На данный момент все системы, похоже, работают исправно. Показания арте
罗杰，我们已准备好
روجر، فرانك. اقترب موعد تنظيف خلايا الوقود الثلاث بالأكسجين. قد يكون هذا وقتً
潜望鏡から日の出が見え始めました
मैं इसे यहाँ नहीं रखना चाहता; मैं बस इतना चाहता हूँ कि जब आपको मौका मिले, तो आप वहाँ लिखी हुई चीज़ों को पढ़ लें और सुनिश्चित कर लें कि हमने उन्हें सही से लिख लिय
好的。我再读一遍。宇航服压缩机 1 和 2 关闭；燃料电池泵 1、2 和 3 关闭；地/空电源关闭；主母线连接线关闭；内部集成照明关闭；内部泛光照明关闭；然后向下，面板上的所有断路器都断开；面板 6，电源应关闭；宇航
J'espère que nous avons assez de carburan
حسنًا. لم ألاحظ أي قراءة للجهد على البطارية C، ويبدو أن شدة التيار حوالي 2 أمبير، لكن قد يكون ذلك مجرد ضوضاء. أطفأت جميع الأضواء الكاشفة، و.
わかった
थ्रस्टर चेक करने पर, आग की लपटें लाल रंग की धारियों में दिखाई देती हैं। यॉ थ्रस्टर्स के चलने पर क्षितिज पूरी तरह से धुंधला हो जाता है। पिच थ्रस्टर्स के बावजूद क्षितिज साफ़ दिखा
जेमिनी 4,
ठीक है। हमें समझ आ
I'm using the airglow filter at this time. Visor is coming open for a better look at that. Hello, Indian Cap 
Okay. Procedure's coming back in again. Multicopies for distribution. And Ken's back. He's a local expert on this now, so
Habe ich größtenteils vers
من المؤكد
Doesn't seem to me, for
Roger, computer. With your l
13、ヒュースト
Okay. Rigel Kentauri is one them. -- whic
यह सही है। सर्किट ब्रेकर इन्वर्टर
Christ. Donne-moi les 
Ok. La prima che ti darò è una manovra più 44. Inizierò a leggere la colonna di 
That's affirmative, Mike. We're 
그
わかりました。タイムラインに関しては、ビ
В дальнейшем мы хотели бы у
Je vous recontacte après une pause d'environ 45 minutes. Nous avons remarqué que, concernant votre antenne à gain élevé, vous pourriez l'utiliser plus efficacement en passant de l'antenne OMNI à celle-ci lorsque l'angle de lacet est de 90 degrés et l'angle de tangage de -45 degrés. Nous constatons que vous restez 10 minutes de plus en mode OMNI, ce qui est normal; cependant, vous pourriez tirer davantage profit de l
Gemini 
Stand 
收到。我们正在接收。
Nous avons obtenu une tension artérielle valide, mais la température semble
Roger. Können Sie best
双子座
Okay, at your convenience we'd like you to run a cabin temp survey and just record it in your log book fo
حسناً، لقد تأكدنا من ذلك. حسناً يا
Apollo 8, Houst
Wir hätten um 5:42 Uhr dort sein sollen. Wir waren um 5:58 Uhr d
Roger. 
Bonjour, A
Roger. Bien reçu. Age
네, 짐, 그곳에서 즐거운 크리스마
ठीक है, दूसरा चरण सर्किट में ASCENT ECA CONTROL था, बंद, उनमें से दो। इसे काट दें। अगली पंक्ति में, हमारे पास BATTERY 5 NORMAL FEED, चालू था; BATTERY 5 को काट दें और वहां BATTERY 
Roger, Gémeaux VI. Je vous prie de bien vouloir donner un coup de pied au magnétophone. Nous pensons que la bande est peut-être hors plage et qu'un coup de pied pourrait résoudre le pr
Roger. Au fait, vous avez la possibilité de reparti
As long as you're reading me okay, Frank, I'll bring you up to date on a co
Rog
Roger, Apollo 8. Com
حسناً. على أي حال، لم يمض وقت طويل منذ أن قاموا 
हाँ, मुझे हाल ही में मिले अपडेट से खुशी है, खास
上面写着：进行日常维护工作，收好头盔和收纳袋；取出
Bene. Questa - quando tirerai fuori il tuo libro di manovre - l'ul
Beh, questa è una delle tante. E vogliamo dirti una cosa che ho già detto a Jim prima, e che riguarda il contro
알겠습
حسنًا. سنبقى في هذا التكوين لمدة دقيقتين تقريبًا، وبعد ذلك سننتهي من اخت
هل ترغب في أن نختار
Roger. Esatto. Il passaggio 11 è "Disattivare le luci di servizio se le hai attivate", e il passaggio 12, che è l'u
Es ist wirklich kinderleicht, Dinge zu bewegen, nicht wahr? Diesen 8 Pfund schweren Sextanten kann man handhaben
Хорошо. В 4-й строке: в разделе НАГРЕВАТЕЛИ ваши четыре нагревателя должны быть закрыты, откройте ДИСПЛЕИ, откройте S-ДИАПАЗОННУЮ АНТЕННУ, откройте ПОСЛЕДОВАТЕЛЬНУЮ КАМЕРУ. Далее откройте ДИСПЛЕИ, закройте НАПРЯЖЕНИЕ ШИНЫ ПОСТОЯННОГО ТОКА, откройте ИНВЕРТОР 2, откройте УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ASCENT ECA и ASCENT ECA, закройте DESCENT ECA, УПРАВЛЕНИЕ DESCENT ECA, ТРАНСЛУНАРНУЮ ШИНУ, закройте ПЕРЕКРЕСТНЫЕ
D'accord. Houst
روجر. كلامك واضح جدًا عندما تتحدث. المشكلة فقط أن جهاز VOX الخاص
Finalmente abbiamo risolto il problema della temperatura del circuito della tuta. Capisco perché Scott fosse preoccupato solo p
여러분, 정말 큰 계약을 많
نحن نتحقق من طلبك يا سكوت. هل يمكنك
好的。大约在 114:10，“高度设置为 60 英里”下的所有内容都应该有注释“太阳日冕，可选”，并且在该可选内容的第
... delle stelle in
관성계 로저. 자, 2번 PAD로 가겠습니다. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, +166, -081; TIG 080 11 3603. NOUN 81: -01408, 모든 볼 -00743. 
Bien. Nous procédons à notre dernière vérification des procédures de mi-parcours et nous avons une question concernant la position actuelle d'un des interrupteurs. Il s'agit de l'interrupteur STATUS du p
バッテリーが 39.5 ボルトに
100K の
Roger, Guaymas. On a toujours le propulseur. On est assez loin maintenant, et il consomme un peu plus de carburant que prévu. On a 
11번, 휴스턴. 복
Роджер, инерциальная система. И вот мы на 2-м ПАД. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, плюс 166, минус 081; TIG 080 11 3603. СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 81: минус 01408, минус все шары, минус 00743. Все шары, 196 359 00657, плюс 00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Секстант 23 1160 138. Остальная часть ПАД недоступна. Выравнивание, Вега и Денеб 243 183 012. Заполнение, два реактивных двигателя 19 секунд. Примечания: На вашей загрузке нам нужен R1 20101 вместо значения, указанного в плане полета. Для проверки положения звезды с помощью секстанта это необходимо сделать в промежутке между 79°30'10', когда звезда поднимается над горизонтом, и 79°52'10', что соответствует вашему местному восходу солнца, поскольку эта звезда находится относительно близко к Солнцу. Ориентация вашего телескопа — вниз, ретроградное движение под углом 28 градусов относительно местной горизонтали. Расчетн
Neil and Buzz, I am talking to you by telephone from the Oval Room at the White House, and this certainly has to be the most historic telephone call ever made. I just can't tell you how proud we all are of what you *** for every American. This has to be the proudest day of our lives. And for people all
ロジャー、11。最初の起動時、つまり起動時に問題が発生したのは、必要な初期姿勢をロードできなかったことです。そのため、数時間前に起動した以前の姿勢に戻そうとしました。そのため、他の軸の速度を拾いました。この姿勢で約20分間待機し、速度を
Gemini 4，RK
कार्नरवॉन। जब पायलट से
It's - the circuit breaker goes in on the circuit breaker activation pa
11, ici Houston
Friendship Seven, qui Indian Cap Com. Siete pronti a copiare il
짐,
Nessun pro
Вот репортаж Гарри Розенталя из Associated, Хьюстон. Два Санта-Клауса украсили сочельник для двухлетнего Джеффри Ловелла. Первый постучал в его входную дверь и принес подарки. Второй проводил его папу домой с Луны. Первый был в красном костюме и с белой бородой, и его крики «Хо-хо» были слышны за кварталом. Второй представлял собой огромный двигатель, извергающий пламя за Луной, и тысячи людей ждали известия о его запуске. «Пожалуйста, примите к сведению, что Санта-Клаус существует», — такими были первые слова «Аполлона-8», когда он вышел из радиомолчания, чтобы сообщить встревоженному миру через 15 минут после того, как двигатель выполнил свой критически важный запуск. «Никто из нас никогда не ожидал получить лучший рождественский подарок, чем этот», — сказал Кен Маттингли из Центра управления полетами. «Поблагодарите всех на Земле за нас. Вы знаете, что мы бы не справились без вас», — последовал ответ полковника Фрэнка Бормана, командира космического корабля. В этот момент перед пультами в Центре управления полетами загорелась рождественская елка, и астронавт Харрисон Шмидт прочитал экипажу космическую версию «Визита Святого Николая». «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и далеко в космосе экипаж «Аполлона-8» только что выиграл лунную гонку», — начиналось чтение. Экипаж Центра управления полетами отложил празднование до тех пор, пока отец Джеффри, капитан ВМС Джеймс Ловелл, вместе с майором ВВС Уильямом А. Андерсом и полковником Борманом не отправятся домой. В любой другой сочельник семьи астронавтов были бы в церкви на рождественской службе, но в этом году все они были прикованы к своим телевизорам. Дома рядом с Центром пилотируемых космических аппаратов были украшены. Газоны вокруг дома Ловелла и по всему его поселению Тимбер-Коув были украшены мексиканскими фонариками, и четверо Ловеллов 30. Они 00, подъехала машина, в которой ехал высокий Санта-Клаус с большим мешком за спиной. Он подошёл к двери и громко постучал. Дверь открылась, и перед ним стоял Джеффри Ловелл, которому 14 января исполнится 3 года. Джеффри отшатнулся при виде этого. Мать подняла его, и Джеффри, всё ещё стесняясь, прижался к ней. «В прошлом году он убежал, плача», — сказала его 15-летняя сестра Барбара. Ранее ей приходилось бежать за ним, чтобы он не задул все фонарики. Другие дети Ловелла, 13-летний Джеймс и 10-летняя Сьюзен, наблюдали за происходящим с большим удовольствием. Наконец, Санта и дети скрылись внутри; подарки были положены под ёлку; подарки не будут открыты до сегодняшнего дня. Миссис Ловелл приготовила для гостей яичный ликер и печенье, и они посмотрели 25-минутную телевизионную экскурсию по Луне, которую провели три астронавта. Позже друзья провели для миссис Ловелл, Барбары и Джеффри экск
When you have a yaw of 9
로
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। मैंने आपकी आवाज़ सुनी। आवाज़ कुछ ज़्यादा ही अस्पष्ट है। मैंने टर्नअराउंड के दौरान अपने HF एंटेना पर ध्यान न
Roger, Jim. Wir habe
Jim, sentiamo un clipping nel
Maintenant, si nous parvenons à faire concorder nos vecteurs d'état, n
Roger. Brea
روجر. لن يكون هناك بث تلفزيوني لعملية فصل المركبة. جميع النوافذ المتاحة لديّ إما مشغولة برؤوس أو كاميرات، وأنا مشغول بأمو
是的，我们正在部署电离层。
هذه قراءة أدق لمستوى الوقود، إذا تمكنت من الوصول إليه، ستكون 78% قبل عملية التخفيض. أنا مُهيأ لتنفيذ عملية التخفيض - تحكم آلي - بعد التخفيض، سأنتقل إلى التحكم الإلكتروني وأرفع مقدمة الطائرة إلى محور العودة - تصحيح - بعد التخفيض، سأتخلص
ما زالوا يعملون يا فرا
わかりました。良い考えですね。サービスモジュールの写真を撮るためにどの
Roger. Nur um sicherzugehen, dass sich nicht die Lust eingeschlichen hat, Rot- und Blaufilteraufnahmen des Mondes in diese
Ne serve ancora un po'. È così che funziona; continua così. Ne serve ancora un po'... È così che funziona, continua così - vai ancora un po' - vai avanti - vai avanti -
أخب
双子座，这里是休斯顿。这只是对OAMS使用情况的粗略估计。等金丝雀活动结束后
يا جيم، لست مضطراً للانقلاب رأساً على عقب إذا لم ترغب بذلك. 
مرح
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Через пару минут мы начнё
ठीक है, 11. यह ह्यूस्टन है। उड़ान योजना में लगभग 22:30 बजे, आपकी पोस्ट-स्लीप चेकलिस्ट और अन्य सभी पोस्ट-स्लीप चेकलिस्ट में, हम चाहते हैं कि आप "ऑटो जेट सेलेक्ट, 16 से ऑन" वाले कथन को हटा दें। हम इस
ठीक है, आगे बढ़ते हैं। "बर्न टाइम माइनस 1 सेकंड पर शटडाउन" के बाद, हम अगली पंक्ति हटाते हैं; और हम "एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल: यॉ, टू पल्स" हटाते हैं; हम "वाई, जेड ट्रांसलेशन के माध्यम से अत्यधिक दरों को कम करें" हटाते हैं; हम "नल" त्रुटि सुई व
At 01 45 30, I have turned the cabin, or the suit-water valve all the way off and
26, 36 piedi al s
Roger. Gemini 4, we'd like for you to bring your AC Power 
안녕하세요, 시그마 세븐입니다. 혹시 눈치채셨는지 모르겠지만, 저는
क्या हम इसे यहीं छोड़ देंगे, या हम इसे स
罗杰，布鲁斯。谢谢。我们期
现在声音很清晰了，我们来看面板 5。我们需要将以下设置关闭：燃料电池泵交流 1 关闭；交流 2 关闭；燃料
Roger. Wir möchten die passive Temperaturregelung vorerst zurückstellen und in der Zwischenzeit so viele weitere Markierungen wie möglich erreichen. Wir beginnen mit dem ersten Stern und absolvieren zwei Serien mit jeweils drei Markierungen, bevor wir zum zweiten Stern übergehen, den wir Ihnen gegeben haben. Parallel dazu würden wir Bill bi
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Нам очень жаль это говорить, но мы хотели бы прекратить это и начать заново. У нас нет никакой гарантии, что мы сможем пережить период сна с этой странной конфигурацией или странным режимом. Мы просим вас немедленно прекратить это и вернуться к тангажу 090, рысканию 0 и крену — к тому значению, н
Verstanden
Okay, gut. Danke. VHF Alfa Simplex
分かりました、ジム。司令船からの星空をより良く観測するために、発射台の姿勢とは異なる姿勢を取ることについて話し合ってきましたが、皆さんにお願いしたいのは、今、あるいは近い将来、その時点でどのような姿勢を維持したいかを予測でき、その姿勢を取ることができれば、その姿勢の粗アラインジンバル角度を計算できるようになるということです。これは、選択した姿勢を取り、その姿
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हमें मूत्र निक्षेपण में कोई आपत्ति नह
Хорошо. Понял.
The view of the Moon that we've been having recently is really spectacular. It fills about three quarters of the hatch window, and of course, we can see the entire circumference, even though part of it is in complete shad
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11. हम 263 पर रु
不。把电视云台驱
Хорошо. Это первое
Ricevuto. A circa 148 ore, se non l'avete già fatto, sostituite il filtro CO2 e accendete il riscaldatore della linea di spurgo H2 20 minuti prima dello spurgo di O2 e H2. A 148 ore, vi preghiamo di avviare una carica sulla batteria Alfa invece che a 151 ore, e di lasciare la carica attiva fino a ulteriori comunicazioni. A 150 ore, scaricate le acque reflue a
了解。彼らはまさにその通
D'accord, Charlie. L'ouverture est assez faible. Difficile de vous donner une mesure précise sans la modifier à nouveau, mais la flèche est à peu près à 1 heure. Je 
罗杰。这里的云层覆盖范围是3000海
好的，没问题。我只是想确认一下。弗雷德之前写过，我们现在的角度大约是71度，我们要以每秒7
プラス00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013 上048 右37、プラス141
D'accord, Fred. Juste deux modifications, des commentaires à ce que nous venons de vous donne
わかった。もう一度行って見
Cavolo, si ottiene davvero una prospettiva diversa in questa situazione a gravità zero. In questo momento, Neil ha i piedi sul portello di prua e con le braccia può raggiungere tutti e cinque i finestrini. Può allungare la mano fino al punto in cui si trova lo scarico per il liq
Roger. Gemini VIII. Nukleare Emulsion bei Minute 
로저, 지금 재진입 중입니다. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 - 5, 4, 3, 2, 1. 듣고 계신
3번은 완전히 쓸모없고, 1번과 5번은 어떤 종류의 사진 촬
F
Houston,
Pilot, this is Sur
こ
जी हाँ। जिम, आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, मुझे नहीं पता आपने यह बात पहले सुनी थी या नहीं, लेकिन ढाई से एक बजे के बीच का समय लगभग तीन बार आ चुका है, और यह काफी सटीक है, इसलिए हमने जितना हो सका उतना कम करने की कोशिश की है, जो कि बहुत ज्यादा नहीं है। लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि जब आप उस प्लेटफॉर्म को अलाइन करने लगें,
嗯，布鲁斯，这说法时灵时不灵。我们有两个氢气过滤器，只要不接食物袋，它们就能正常工作。但是食物袋的入口处会产生足够的背压，导致过滤器效率下降。有好
Gemini V
أعتقد أ
Okay, Houston. Schau dir Register 3 in den Daten an. Diese Daten steigen auf meinen Zielwert von 315 an; und ich lasse den Handcontroller jetzt mal in Ruh
Beh, no. Stavo cercando di calcolare il tempo, 16
Sorry it wasn't something more significant. I've also got a procedure f
أنا الآن في وضعية العودة إلى الغ
فريندشيب سفن. غوايماس كاب كوم. لدينا حوالي 
Roger. Gro
Ok. Vediamo se ho capito tutto. Per il rendezvous, prima di tutto vogliamo CB 16 INVERTER 2, chiuso, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2, chiuso. Poi, sul pannello 14, verifichiamo che INVERTER 2 sia selezionato. E CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 chiuso, entrambi gli interruttori. Poi dobbiamo tirare la leva di sblocco del RENDEZVOUS RADAR. Sul pannello 3, vogliamo quindi RENDEZVOUS RADAR. A ENTER con più tutti gli zip, più 28300 nei registri 1 e 2. GO su quello. Poi monitoriamo il movimento con il 16 72. Dopo che si è parcheggiato, CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 aperto, seguito da ENTER. E CB 16 INVERTER 2 aperto. Ora, quando arriva il momento dell'allineamento per ottenere una lampada, CB 16, INVERTER 2 chi
OK, Joe. J'ai créé une nouvelle page ici, -1A, point 6: Transfert vers l'alimentation. Vérification habituelle: le projecteur est éteint et le voyant « ATTENTION AVERTISSEMENT SOUS ALIMENTATION » est allumé. Je reçois un message de Jack, que je te transmettrai. Point 7: DISJONCTEUR TRANSLUNAIRE, ALIMENTATION, panneaux 11 et 16,
هذه فريندشيب سفن. سأخر
Apollo 11, Houston. Noch fünf Minuten. Und zu Ihrer Anfrage bezüglich des Stickstoffdrucks vor dem Brennvorgang: Kurz vor dem Brennvorgang zeigten wir 2270 Pfund pro Quadratzoll auf Flasche Alfa und 2350 auf Flasche 
Роджер,
هذا صحيح. يا جاك، ما نقوم به هو أننا قمنا بتشغيل MAIN B، وقمنا بتوصيل كل هذه الأحمال المحددة به، ونحن نستعد لتأمين الطاقة، لذلك أردنا التأكد من أن الأشياء الأساسية مثل الكمبيوتر والمنصة وجميعها مزودة بمصادر طاقة مزودة ب
ठीक है। शुरुआती टीवी प्रसारण के संदर्भ में, अब हमारा हाई-गेन एंटीना काम नहीं कर रहा है, और ऐसा लगता है कि शुरुआती टीवी प्रसारण प्राप्त करने का एकमात्र तरीका इसे दूरस्थ स्थान पर भेजना और वहां इसकी जांच करना था। इसलिए हम इस विचार को छोड़ रहे हैं और निर्धारित टीवी प्रसारण से ही आगे बढ़ेंगे। बचे हुए संचार संबंधी जांच हाई-गेन पर निर्भर है
Кстати, связь просто фантастическая. Не знаю, как вы нас услышали, но, честно говоря,
Верно. Единственное, что еще приходит мне в голову, когда я смотрю на это через призму, это то, что, похоже, источник излучения находит
好的，Buzz。最后一个条目在下面，是“三轴姿态控制”这行中“三”字下方
Roger. Capisco. Giusto per informazione, forse l'hai letto a terra. Ho eseguito la nostra determinazione dell'altitudine pericinzia usando prima di tutto,. Il vettore di stato stellare con cui abbiamo navigato, abbiamo più 84,7 miglia di altitudine e p
好的，没错。现在我还要给你几个点，让你在曲线上标出来。你现在
... खैर, मुझे सच में नहीं पता - इसक
हमारे स्थानीय अवलो
罗杰。我们的想法是，我们可以从窗户
Roger. Wa
罗杰。F2-20页，Alfa栏：05，01042；07，00256；11，我再说一遍。11，00070；12，00042；13，77730。Bravo栏：03，0000
아니, 잠깐만요
Steht 
Понял. Моё состояние хорошее; режим управления — электронное; гироскопы работают в норме; маневр отключен. Топливо 45-6-70 [процентов], то есть 45-70 [процентов], кислород 84-100 [процентов]. У меня есть только одна небольшая проблема, и это моя неспособность снизить температуру пара в паровом клапа
C'est dommage, il ne me reste qu'un peu moins d'une demi-heure pour m'amuser. Je passe en mode de pilotage automatique à basse altitude. Gyroscopes libres, je pique du nez pour observer le phare de Durban. Gyroscopes libres, pilotage automatique à basse altitude, correction, je passe en mode proportionnel manuel. Je n'ai pas encore chargé de ressources, j
बहुत ही दिलचस्प भू-भाग की तस्वीरें। मैं क्षितिज की एक तस्वीर हमेशा के लिए रख लूंगा। फिलहाल, वह तस्वीर A नंबर 12 थी, जिसे रीसेट करके B कर दिया है औ
ادع
Quando tu - quando ti imbat
और, एक्वेरियस; ह्यूस्टन। मेरे पास एक सर्विस 
That's 
但更重要的是，
Aurora Seven，Aurora Seven，这里
Roger. Vous n'aurez peut-être pas besoin de tout déballer. La position que je vous ai indiquée se situe légèrement à l'ouest du Cratère Ouest. 
Der Horizont ist sehr klar. Roll- und Nickbewegungen sehen sehr gut aus. Gieren sieht gut aus. Ich glaube, wir haben jetzt eine ganze Reihe von Sternen im Bli
I just want to talk over a little
アポロ8号、ヒューストンへ。ゴー
分かりました。こ
フラン
Roger. Huntsville, ici Sigma Sept. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Avez-vous quelque chose à transmettre au Cap? Termin
جهاز إرسال إشارة
Ok. Perché non lo riporti all'atteggiamento e lo rimetti in ATTEGGIAMENTO per il tiro, e noi torneremo a rivedere il requisito? Sembra che tu abbia ottenuto più o meno gli stessi risultati, da un'analisi superficiale
了解しました。念のためお知らせしますが、もしあなたが当直を外れていた時に起こった場合、マスターコーションブレーカーはまだ引かれており、降下用バッテリーには故障表示が出ていますが、全てのパラメータはこれまでと全く同
A Reno, in Nevada, poiché non c'è un camino in casa, un bambino ha scritto a Babbo Natale sul giornale locale e gli ha suggerito: "Per favore, potresti usare la porta d'ingresso? Dovrai dare un piccolo calcio al fondo perché si appiccica". A Little Rock, in Arkansas, i bambini nati al St. Vincent Infirmary durante la settimana prima di Natale e fino al giorno di Natale vengono consegnati alle loro madri al momento delle dimissioni in enormi calze rosse natalizie. Ecco un esempio di cooperazione ecumenica. A Indio, in California, il capo della polizia è stato armato il giorno di Natale di un libro di preghiere. Il rabbino Phillip H. Weinburg ha assunto l'incarico di capo per un giorno in modo che il vero capo della polizia, Homer Hunt, metodista, potesse trascorrere le festività con la sua famiglia. Questo è il terzo Natale consecutivo che il rabbino sostituisce Hunt. Nei sei anni precedenti, il rabbino Weinburg aveva fatto
D'accord, Ken. Péricynthe plus 2, retour rapide / 62871, moins 161, plus 129, plus 45224, moins 06216, moins 18712 001 28 603 49118 112 038 296 terre en haut 010, droite 37, plus 1475, plus 06400 1323 936 913, Sirius primaire, Rigel secondaire 129 155 010, pas de marge, supposer 4 même alignement, 5 détermination GERU NC-4 0 à 10 et co
खैर, मुझे तो नहीं पता कि आप क्या सोच रहे हैं, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि मैं रसोई में जाकर कुछ छोटे-छोटे टुकड़े खा ल
Ricevuto. Capito per quanto riguarda la telecamera. Ripetimi la questione dello spurg
分かりました。手順は、ENTER、333 ENTER、そしてレジスタ1を読み出す、ということになります。次に10 000（メモリ）を入力します。コンピュータはメモリを2回ダンプし、正しく設定されていることを確認します。正しく設定されていない場合は、10 000をロ
Verifica gratuitam
好的，收到。这是第57版，序列号16，格林尼治标准时间08:11。偏航角12°，俯仰角30°，使用16毫米相机。第58版，序列号12，格林尼治标准时间09:36，偏航角3°，俯仰角30°，使用1
13, Houston. Nennzeit der Pegelerkennung; Absc
1 号
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们再试一次，这次的电视
Yes. We noticed that it had gotten warmer in the cockpit coming back than it was going out. And I remember going out when we manually positioned the ten-pin valve, b
西格玛七号，西格玛七号，这里是穆切亚。
يا جيميني 4، كان من المفترض أن يكون لديك 
आह, रॉजर, ज़ांज़ीबार कैपकॉम। फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। सभी फ़्यूज़ पहले की तरह ही हैं; मैंने उनमें से कोई भी नहीं बदला है। स्क्विब तैयार है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। सामान्य, ऑटो, जाइरो सामान्य पर है। सभी "T" हैंडल लगे हुए हैं। रेट्रो डिले सामान्य है। सीक्वेंस पैनल स
All'inizio, l'operazione con il telescopio a scansione ci ha impedito di iniziare immediatamente gli avvistamenti come avevamo programmato, a causa di un'altra manovra evasiva. Lo scarico del telescopio ha causato un'enorme quantità di pseudo-stelle nella zona, rendendo praticamente impossibile la calibrazione ottica. Il metodo che avevamo elaborato non sembrava funzionare molto bene. Il metodo che ho infine utilizzato è stato quello di andare verso Sirio, la nostra stella più luminosa, prendere l'albero e il perno di appoggio e poi far volare la navicella fino a Sirio per usarli per l'ottica, cosa che abbiamo fatto in un secondo momento. Per quanto riguarda la dispersione della luce, sembra che a quasi qualsiasi assetto durante il nostro controllo termico passivo, riceviamo dispersione della luce nel telescopio a scansione. Si presenta principalmente sotto forma di un'ampia fascia di luce proprio al centro del telescopio, a circa 10 gradi in entrambe le direzioni rispetto allo zero. È molto difficile vedere le stelle in quest'area. I riallineamenti sono stati buoni. Sono riuscito a individuare la stella con il sestante per effettuare l'allineamento, ma non sono riuscito a identificare la stella che abbiamo usato in casi come Regor o Menkent con il telescopio a scansione. La prima osservazione stellare che ho fatto della Terra mostrava un orizzonte molto indistinto. Ma sembrava esserci una linea molto, o piuttosto netta, tra quello che sembrava essere l'orizzonte terrestre e l'atmosfera. Il filtro di riferimento della linea di vista sembrava aiutare a definire questa linea di orizzonte. C'è un orizzonte molto nebuloso e indistinto tra lo spazio e la parte superiore dell'atmosfera stessa, e questo è molto difficile da usare. Come ho detto prima, a volte, guardando la Luna con il Sole nelle immediate vicinanze, l'area intorno alla Luna, lo spazio intorno alla Luna, non è scuro, ma è luminoso, appare di un azzurro chiaro. E questo è anche lo stesso caso di guardare nel sestante durante gli allineamenti con la stella, con il Sole in una certa prossimità dell'ottica. Tuttavia, non ho difficoltà a trovare queste stelle con il sestante. Non ho avuto difficoltà a individuare le stelle che ho usato, come Sirio, Procione o Canopo, sullo sfondo della Terra durante le nostre misurazioni dell'orizzonte stellare. Riesco a vedere tutte e tre queste stelle sullo sfondo della Terra. Credo che sarà molto difficile effettuare un allineamento di riserva usand
알겠습니다. 그래서 저희는 최우선
ठीक है। मैं आपको एक तरकीब बताता हूँ और केप से प्रतिगामी समय का पता लगाता हूँ। मेरे प्रक्षेपण से समय 04 प्लस 28 प्लस 45 होगा। तैयार रहें, 2, 3, 4, मार्
Sigma Seven, hier ist Hawaii, hier ist Hawaii Cap Com
そこに赤いフィルターを両方取り付けますか、それともフィルターホルダー用のフィルターを 1 
C'est une bonne façon de le décrire. Il me semble que le simple fait de s'asseoir dans le tunnel et de regarder par toutes les fenêtres changeait la donne; la
रॉजर। डॉव जोन्स इंडस्ट्रियल्स के संदर्भ में, मंगलवार 15 तारीख की दोपहर को बाजार बंद होने से लेकर आज दोपहर लगभग 1:05 बजे (ह्यूस्टन समय) तक, इसमें कुल मिलाकर गिरावट आई है; यानी औद्योगिक औसत में 6 अंक की कमी आई है। आज बाजार खुलने के बाद से अब तक, डॉव जोन्स इंडस्ट्रियल औसत में 11.05 अंकों क
Это «Дружба Семь». Она отклоняется примерно на 20° вправо, а затем получает мощный импульс, чтобы снова сместиться влево. Она смещается влево примерно на 3 г
Вы все отлично спра
Ok, 11. Qui è Houston. Abbiamo invertito le antenn
حسناً. انته
OK, Houston; Verseau. Nous avon
现在是0.15，尼尔说，
Ok, Apollo 8. Esatto. Hai un bit rate elevato e temiamo che tu possa esaurire lo spazio prima della masterizzazione, quindi vorremmo eliminarlo e restituirtelo con un carico co
Le grand panneau arrière est en train d'être installé sur la caméra. Il y a eu un moment où r
Senti, a noi non importa del serbatoio dell'acqua potabile, ma di quello delle
Эта прицельная сетка отлично подходит дл
水瓶座，你们所有的垫片将在大约3个半小时后，也就是零下6点30分升起。还
마이크, 그들이 우리에게 중간 지점이 우리의 항로에 
네, OMNI C에서 말씀하신 내용이 아주 잘 들립니다. 잠시
アポロ8号
ص
Oh, ti sei distr
Es war definitiv unter mir. Ich hatte es seit etwa Carnarvon unter mir verfolgt. Bis Carnarvon war es unter uns, dann bis zum Horizont und dann wieder unter uns. Es sah fast so aus, als befände es sich in einer anderen Umlaufbahn als ich. Es hatte einen anderen Apogäum und Perigäum als ich. Jedenfalls versuchte ich, mich ihm bei Tagesanbruch anzunähern, sobald ich seine Position bestimmen konnte. Wie gesagt, zu diesem Zeitpunkt war es ein bis zwei Meilen vor mir – unter mir. Je mehr ich versuchte, mich anzunähern, desto weniger Abstand gewann ich. Ich zündete die Triebwerke in Richtung Gegengeschwindigkeit. Ich zündete meine oberen Triebwerke so, dass ich meine Gesamtgeschwindigkeit verringerte und dann gleichzeitig zündete. Ich konnte mich nie wirklich annähern, und es entfernte sich immer weiter. Mir wurde klar, dass wir, um die Boosterstufe rechtzeitig für den Außenbordeinsatz (EVA) in Hawaii anzunähern, wahrscheinlich unseren gesamten Treibstoff verbrauchen würden. In den Bodenregeln hatten wir vereinbart, dies nicht zu tun. Ich habe mich also mit CAP COM beraten, und wir haben beschlossen, den Booster-Teil der Mission nicht durchzuführen. Ich weiß nicht, ob ich es schon erwähnt habe,
حسنًا. ونودّ - أعتقد أننا نحتاج إلى قراءة منك. وسنحتاج إلى واحدة في وقت قريب من موعد الدورة الشهرية، في مكان من
もう一度確認させてください。トンネルの通気弁を閉めてDELTA-Pに戻
Bene. Ho alcuni elementi del piano di volo per te quando sarai pronto 
Oui... nous n'avons n
罗
Роджер, Кано, г
À Reno, au Nevada, faute de cheminée, un petit garçon a écrit au Père Noël par l'intermédiaire du journal local, lui suggérant d'utiliser la porte d'entrée. Il faudra peut-être donner un petit coup de pied en bas, car elle coince. À Little Rock, en Arkansas, les bébés nés à l'hôpital St. Vincent pendant la semaine précédant Noël et jusqu'au jour de Noël sont remis à leurs mères, à leur sortie, dans d'immenses chaussettes de Noël rouges. Voici un exemple de coopération œcuménique. À Indio, en Californie, le chef de la police a reçu un livre de prières
मुझे केबिन का तापमान और अपने सूट
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نعتقد أن زوايا مسار الرحلة لا تزال جيدة، ١٩٨.٦، ١٣٠.٧، ٣٤٠.٠. تختلف قليلاً عن تلك الموجودة
罗杰。我只是想提醒你，我们还没注意到电视屏幕上的烧灼痕迹。还有，告诉你一声，昨晚，我想应该是你们都休息之后
D'accord. Merc
わかった。姿勢をきちんと整えるのに少し時間がかかった。MITフィルムであと3枚撮っておく。2枚目、3枚目は太陽に向かって撮影したもので、経過時間は00:39:42
11، هيوستن. ما نقوله هو أنه في حال فقدنا السيطرة على أحد المحاور قبل الوصول إلى بوابة الهبوط المنخفضة، فإننا نوصي بإلغاء العملية. هذا يتطلب فقدان السيطرة على طائرتين نفاثتين منفصلتين، وهو أمر غير مرجح، لكن هذا ما نوصي به. بعد بوابة الهبوط المنخفضة، سنواصل التح
Roger. Wir üb
... شيء ما ب
로저. 여기 시스템 어딘가에 잡음이 
Хорошо. Раньше было три товара п
Tr-10 リレーが作動しているはずですが、レート ジャイロが作動していること以外に手がかりはありません。スイッチが
Roger. Mike's having hi
Oui. Je ne crois pas que nous ayons réellement eu de problème avec le dégagement pour la tête. J'avais l'impression d'avoir suffisamment d'espace et je pouvais même... baisser et manipuler les chiens. Il nous a simplement semblé que la fermeture demandait un peu plus d'effort que d'habitude et..
로저. 흥미로운 점 몇 가지 말씀드리겠습니다. 방금 달을 이용한 항법 관측을 해봤는데, 태양이 너무 가려져 있네요. 안타레스에 한 세트를 겨우 맞추고 두 번째 세트를 관측하려던 참이었는데, 달의 테두리가 완전히
O
Houston, vous regardez notre DELTA-H. Ala
Ok, ora do un'occhiata all'adattatore e all'attrezzat
Okay. Ich habe eine kleine Ergänzung zur Checkliste für ihn. Diesmal befindet sie s
ठीक है, और हम इसके लिए प्रक्रियाओं पर काम कर रहे हैं। केन प्रवेश 
Roger. Dovrei regolare il flusso di ossigeno in questo aggeggio a sei decimi di libbra all'ora, ma visto che questo trasduttor
格林威治标准时间 14:53:21。GET 时间为 25:15:55。双子座
알겠습니다. 조용히 하려고 하시는 걸 알고 있으니, 제가 정보를 좀 읽어 드리겠습니다. 방금 알아낸 정보 중 하나는, 산소 극저온 탱크가 고장 나더라도 현재 80파운드(약 36kg)의 산소가 남아 있다는 점입니다. 현재 단일 탱크 운용의 제한 요소는 수소 탱크인데, 표준 프로필을 기준으로 약 143시간 동안 운용할 수 있다고 가정하면
Глядя н
はい、プラグを全部締め直して、配線も全部確認しました。すべて正常に見えました。他の連中が目を覚ましたら、思い出さ
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir möchten Sie bit
और हम यह भी ज
لا، يبدو أنه لم يفقد إشارة وجود الأرض أبدًا. يبدو أنه كان يحاول التقاط إشارة القفل أحادي الاتجاه طوال الوقت، وكنا عادةً
La temperatura di ingresso della tuta è di 22-22 °C. La t
見てみましょう。国内ニュースでは、新婚のデビッド・アイゼンハワーとジュリー・アイゼンハワー夫妻が秘密のハネムーンの隠れ家を出て、ニクソン次期大統領とその家族とクリスマスディナーを共にしました。ニューヨーク市では、世界で最も忙しい港がクリスマス当日、ほぼ完全に活動を停止しました。5日間続いた
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. I'm going on fly-by-wire so I can control more accurately. It just started as I got to Guaymas, and
أجريتُ ثلاثة اختبارات خلال عملية التسليم تلك. اثنان منها كانت نتائجهما أقل من -19.6، واثنان كانت نتائجهما أقل من -19.8، وواحد كانت 
और, 13, हम चाहेंग
我这边窗口显示的速度大约是每秒30英尺。助推器下降得很快，好像我们速度差很大似的，它很快就到了
好的。第一次重新加压后（大约 1
Der Sendemast ist weit dr
Роджер. Думаю, да, Базз. Мы попросим их разобраться и посмотреть, смогут ли
Roger. Compris. Nous sommes ravis que vous aye
네,
Okay
اختفى اللون الأزرق لحذائي تمامًا الآن، وتح
Mike, hier auf Seite 97 deiner Checkliste, wo wir die Einrichtung vornehmen, steht mit Bleistift: „20 Minuten warten, bis sich die Rate beruhigt hat. Nicht überwachen.“ Das bedeutet Folgendes: Wenn du 16
حسنًا. أردتُ فقط إطلاعكم على هذا الأمر والتفكير فيه وفي تداعياته المحتملة على خطة الطيران، وسأعيد عرض هذه الزاوية الواسعة مع التعليق على القمر لنرى أيّ الأقسام ترونها الأنسب. حسنًا. في الشاشة، طلب منا فرانك التحقق من ترتيب ظهور مسار الدخول، والمسار الأول الذي سيظهر مُسمى "مسار الدخول بدون مخرج رقم 2" وهو مسار الدخول قصير المدى وعالي السرعة. المسار الثاني الذي سيظهر بعنوان "3500 ميل" وهو أيضًا مسار دخول عالي السرعة، ولكنه المسار الذي ستستخدمونه في حال انتقلنا إلى نطاقات دخول أطول. ثم سيكون المسار الثالث "مسار الدخول بدون مخرج رقم 1"، وسيتبعه مسار رابع بطول 3500 ميل. إذن لديكم أربعة مسارات دخول. المساران 1 و3، عند الوصول إليهما، هما مسارا الدخول قصيري المدى، والمساران 2 و4 هما مسارا الدخول طويلي المدى. بخصوص مرحلة التوقف التام، أعتقد أننا ناقشنا ما سنفعله هناك، ولكن في غضون ساعة تقريبًا، سنحتاج إلى البدء في هذه المرحلة. بالتأكيد لا نريد القيام بذلك في ا
わかりました。少し前に教えていただいたバッテリーのアンペア数を確認しています。0.5アンペアから1アンペアくらい低い数値を希望しています。ジャックに、これまでに接続した回路ブレーカーとスイッチを確認して、MAIN Aに余分な負荷がかかっていないか確
जब हम इस दिशा में ऊपर की ओर देख रहे होते हैं, तो हमें अपनी बगल की खिड़कियों से सूर्य दिखाई देता है और, ज़ाहिर है, अभी हमारी एक खिड़की से पृथ्वी दिखाई दे रही
Non troppo. Noto che è diverso da quando sono andato a dormire. Ora siamo più an
Qui è Indian Ocean S
Роджер. Обычно это делается автоматически, Джим; и если бы вы выполни
ت
रोजर; 31021, प्लस 25248, प्
시그마 세븐입니다. 여기는 카나리 캡 
Je regarde les étoiles. Il fait clair, mais pas encore complètement noir. On dirait que le hublot fait office de filtre, atténuant la luminosité des étoiles de faible magnitude. Je regarde la Grande Ourse, puis Arcturus… et il me semble que je vois principalement des étoiles de deuxième et troisième ordre. Les plus pet
了解しました、ア
11, Houston. Wir haben einen vorläufigen 3
Yes. It's coming b
N
네, 13번입니다. 휴스턴. 다
해치독스(Hatch Dogs)는 지금 바
That's correct, Jack. We just about have procedures in hand detail checklist-type procedures to send to you. In other words, a time line with reference to entry checklist an
ヘイズ層の真ん中では、フェクダは光度計で測ることすらできません。フェクダは現在地平線の下、あるいは約5秒前のマークの下にありましたが
우리 시계로 재보니 그 연소
Ok. Radar, tracciamento e telemetria affidabile su entrambi i veicoli. Ok. Vi mostriamo GO qui sul GET B; 11 
네, 약간 초록빛이 도는 것 같네요. 아마 햇빛이 반사된 거겠죠. 저기 오
Хьюстон, Апол
حسنًا. لقد انتهيتُ للتو من توصيل كل شيء بنظام الاتصالات الخاص بي هنا، وأردتُ فقط التأكد من جاهزيتي. لقد رتبتُ بدل
Okay, Fred. maneuver purpose is PC plus 2, to this time, we're going to the MPL. And , 079, 27, 4013, plus 08144, minus 00443, minus 02226, apogee is N/A, perigee is plus 00205, 08455, 420, 268, 261, plus 08155, minus 00443, minus 02187, is N/A. Your GDA ought to be okay as it is from the last burn, but pitch ought to be at 5.85; in roll, it's 6.74. Your ullage will be two jets for 10 seconds. Your throttle will be 10 percent f
Schwer zu tun in der. Schwer z
좋습니다, 여
ر
Давайте посмотрим, я хочу наклониться на
Понял. Отлично. Перерыв. Прогноз погоды в ра
يمكننا أيضًا أن نعرض لك الوقت بنظامنا لحساب الوقت المنقضي 
Jerry, hast du schon entschieden, was wir im nächsten Zwischeng
Et 11, Houston. Nous avons une demande à vous faire. Concernant la vanne de pressurisation du carburant de propergol secondaire du module de service: par mesure de précaution, nous vous demandons de bien vouloir actionner brièvement les quatre interrupteurs sur la position FERMÉ, puis de les relâcher. Comme vous le savez, nous ne disposons d'aucun système de communication vocale ni de retour d'information concernant la position de ces vannes, et il est possible que l'une d'elle
私たちが何ガロンの燃料を
哥伦比亚，休斯顿
روجر، لقد انت
了解。こちらへ。BAT2が接続中です。マスター
哦！你看到那道闪光了吗？嗯
BAT Charlie, 37,0; Pyro A, 37,0; Pyro B, 37,0; Heliumdruck, 3450; und nur zum Spaß, Stickstoff A, 2300; Stickstoff B, 2400; 5 Charlie, 4,5; 5 Dog, 3,5; 6 Alfa, 4,0; 6 Baker, 4,6; 6 Charlie, 4,0; 6 Dog, 3,8; Batteriever
नहीं, काफी संख्या में थे। आपको कितन
Зарядите б
よし、フレッド。少なくとも一つは当たったんじゃないかと思ってい
И еще одно замечание по поводу этого телевизора: эксперты советуют не направлять широкоугольный объектив камеры ни на Землю, ни на Луну. Слишком высокая яркость может повредить внутренние компоненты при
了解。イーグルはドッキング解除さ
जी हां, फ्रेड। हमारे पास अभी इसके लिए कोई प्रक्रिया नहीं है, और न ही हमें भविष्य में इस पर काम करने की कोई उम्मीद है। मैं अभी आपको जो प्रक्रिया पढ़कर सुनाना चाहता हूं, वह 55 घंटे बाद सुपरक्
Gemini 4, Carn
알겠습니다
是的。它们放在电脑下面，放在那里的东西越重，升压比就越高。我们没有任何设备，所以我只是在想，哪些重物——比如我们可以把一些摄像机、电视摄像机之类的东西放在那里，这些东西通常都很重——放在我们的……不，我们不能把它们放在我们的……里，但我们可以把它们放在下面的那个容器
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Steelhead. Beachten 
Okay, Aquarius. And down here we're getting regrouped, trying to work on your
لم أجد
Es ist erledigt. DREHSTE
Nun ja, im 
Houston, Apollo 11. Welche Seite benötigen Sie in dieser Revision
В
روجر، CSQ. أنت تريد اجتياز اختب
了解しました。アダプターのバッテリーはすべ
Хорошо. Это отлично. Позвольте мне... Позвольте мне подождать, пока 
Ricorda, è sol
ロジャー、ジャック
マイク、私たちが何をしているか、少しご説明しましょう。メキシコ湾の南西海岸線とヒューストンの位置、そしてミシシッピ川の河口、バハ・カリフォルニアとその周辺地域が見えます。船に搭載
डॉक्टर साहब, मुझे इस ब्लड प्रेशर कफ से बहुत परेशानी हो रही है। यह मेरे 
알겠습니다. 1번 대기해 
로저. 롤링 재진입을 위한 절차 양식을 보내드리겠습니다. OAMS 연소에 필요한 ∆V와 ∆T, GMTRC, 그리고 0.05g의 RET 값을 알려드리겠습니다. 또한, 드로그, 주낙, 착륙 시의 RET 값도 함께 제공됩니다. 절차는 다음과 같습니다. 역추진 시 기수
Roger. MIDPAC-Einflugpunkt: 
내... 그리고 우주선에서 탈출하는 좋은... 방법을 찾아야 해. 우리에게 
알겠습니
أعتقد ذلك. أرى بعض الشقوق في الغلاف ا
वैसे, वेंस, यहाँ देखकर तो यकीन करना मुश्किल है कि यह पृथ्वी 
友谊七
That's affirm. Okay. Next page
لقد تم إيقاف تشغيله. ا
まさに
روجر. أفهم أن تسلسل التراجع الخاص بي لنهاية المهمة هو
罗杰. 027 44 5363，负 165 073 14 03
...nur von den IVI-Instrumenten... nach dem Brennvorgang bei 18 Fuß, mit eine
Je pourrais très facilement arriver d'une autre planète et avoir l'impression d'être sur le dos, et que la Terre est au-dessus de moi, mais c'est un peu la sensation qu'on a 
ठीक है, जैक, और आपकी बैटरी चार्ज समाप्ति प्रक्रिया अपरिवर्तित रहेगी, लेकिन जब
Confermato. E sotto "Imposta TI
あなたが正しいと信
We are recommending that the retropackage not, I say again, not be jettisoned. This means that you will have to override the 0.05g switch which is expected to
अगर आप मुझे इसे थोड़ा धीरे-धीरे देंगे, तो मैं इसकी 
وإيجل، هيوستن. زوايا
ما هو
حسنًا يا بيل. نأمل أن يكون الوضع كذلك. يبدو أننا سنحافظ على استقرار الوضع لفترة من الوقت، ونتوقع أن يكون الجو دافئًا بما يكفي ليغلي. لهذا السبب يُنصح بالانتظار إذا كان يغلي. أما إذا لم يكن كذلك، فقم بتشغيل الدائرة
Columbia, Houston. Nous avons commis une erreur sur ces coordonnées. Veuillez charger le drone aux coordonnées suivantes: la
Und nachdem Sie BAT 6 eingeschaltet haben, sollten Sie auch gleich einen Blick auf die BATs 1 bis 4 usw. werfen und sich vergewissern, dass es in Ordnung ist, sie aus
D'accord. Avez-v
روجر. 033 0000، يسار 17، زائد 0883، ناقص 16500 12955 36185؛ سيريوس، ريجل 129، 155 010، سعة نفاثتين، 20
Gemini VI, C
C'est exact, Jim. Une fois que vous avez trouvé l'orientation souhaitée, effectuez un 
ठीक है, फ्रेड। सबसे पहले, इसकी तैयारी, आकस्मिकता चेकलिस्ट (पृष्ठ 24) से शुरू करते हुए, हम सुझाव देंगे कि आप इसे शुरू करें, और इस पर आपके किसी भी सुझाव का हम स्वागत करेंगे। दूसरा बिंदु: जब आप बर्न एटीट्यूड में हों, तो आपको सूर्य बिल्कुल ऊपर दिखाई देगा। जब आपका कर्सर शून्य पर सेट होगा, तो यह कर्सर को विभाजित करेगा। हालांकि, एक बात का ध्यान रखें कि यह बहुत आसानी से डिटेंट से बाहर निकल जाएगा क्योंकि यह रोल और यॉ के प्रति बहुत संवेदनशील होगा। समझें कि यह डिटेंट 2 में है, लेकिन बर्न, बर्न टाइम और एटीट्यूड के प्रति बहुत कम संवेदनशील है। दूसरे शब्दों में, यदि आवश्यक हो, तो हम इसे किसी भी समस्या की स्थिति में, और एटीट्यूड बहुत महत्वपूर्ण न होने पर, स्लिप कर सकते हैं। तो इससे हम इस बिंदु पर आते हैं कि हमारे पास केवल एक ही वास्तविक बर्न नियम है; यानी, यदि किसी भी अक्ष के चारों ओर - दर 10 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड तक पहुँच जाती है, तो बर्न को रोकने
D'accord, Fred. Un instant. Nous avons évoqué la possibilité que vous le fassiez dans le cadre d'une ACS. Nous vous recommandons pour le moment de réaliser u
Glauben Sie mir, dieses 
Roger. I am reading you with a lot of background noise. 
हाँ, मैं सब कुछ से
休斯顿，静海
지금 창밖으로 별을 보고 있어요. 완전히 어둡지는 않고, 밝아요. 창문이 마치 필터처럼 작용해서 작은 별들은 잘 안 보이는 것 같아요. 지금 북두칠성부터 아르크투루스까지 쭉 보고 있는데, 주로 2차, 3차 
Il nous r
了解。コピーMAX g 6.3; R2 at
Houston, come leggi?
Roger. On a commencé à charger la batterie A, et la tension était bien plus élevée que prévu. Elle était légèrement inférieure à 40 volts. On dirait qu'elle baisse un peu maintenant, d'après le chargeur. Hier, q
لاحظنا أنك رفعت الغطاء على مرحلة الإجهاض. لا ننصح
Fred observe actuellement à tra
Ricevuto. Mi è stato detto che p
わかりました。バッテリー 5、
Карнарвон,
أعتقد أنني ربما أكون فني الصيانة الوحيد الذي شهد على الإطلاق احتراقًا من داخل المركبة ا
Базз, мы по-прежнему не получаем никаких данных с твоей ЭКГ. Похоже, единственный способ получить их — это если ты, в удобное для тебя время, сделаешь замену электродов ЭКГ, это центральные электроды, подключенные к синему
यहां क्षितिज बेहद ही भय
Roger. G
Roger. Questa è Friendship Seven. Il finestrino, le indicazioni di assetto e il periscopio sono tutti in perfetto stato. Vedo il lato oscuro emergere dal periscopio dietro di me in questo momento. La pressione in cabina è 5,5 e si mantiene. La temperatura in cabina è 95 gradi. L'umidità relativa è del 28 percento. Ho impostato la temperatura della mia tuta sulla posizione "aumento dell'acqua" per un maggiore raffreddamento. La temperatura del vapore indica attualmente 61 gradi. L'os
わかりました。まだSLEWモードなので、徐々にピッチングしていくと機体が傾い
सारी चीज़ें देखने में हल्के भूरे और धूसर रंग की लगती हैं, मतलब, उनका रंग यही है। लेकिन जब आप बिल्कुल पास जाकर उन्हें देखेंगे, तो आपको पता चलेगा कि उनका असली रंग तो बिल्कुल अलग है
...... hold t
Jerry, do you wa
Те, что я видел в задней части космического аппарата, казались значительно темнее; конечно, если смотреть с задней стороны, на них светил
अंधेरा छाने लगा - चलिए देखते हैं - सुबह 5:02 बजे। एजेना तारा दिखना बंद हो गया और मुझे तुरंत एसीक्यू लाइट मिल गई। दूरी 45 मील थी। इसे देखना बहुत मुश्किल है, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि
Ap
네. 조, 길이가 얼마나 되나요? 아주 긴 건가요, 아니면 짧은 건가요, 아니면 
好的。你们这边投了一票。
지금 보시는 것이 바로 오디세이호 기수 부분에 있는 탐사 장비입니다. 상당히 무거운 장비이지만, 무중력 상태에서는 무게감이
水瓶座，我们现在已经大致锁定了你的位置。看起来你稍微偏离了轨道。我们预计你的
알겠습니다. 서두르지 
Sembri davvero sveglio e pieno di en
E la signora Robert Goddard ha detto oggi che suo marito sarebbe stato felicissimo. "Non avrebbe urlato né niente. Sarebbe semplicemente stato raggiante." Ha aggiunto: "Quello era il suo sogno, mandare un razzo sulla Luna." Le persone in tutto il mondo avevano molti motivi per essere felici della missione Apollo 11. La polizia italiana ha riferito che domenica sera è stata la notte più libera dalla criminalità dell'anno. E a Londra, un ragazzo che ha avuto la fede di scommettere 5 dollari con un all
Dis, Fred, quand tu auras 
रॉजर। वॉली, मुझे लगता है 
Friendship Seven, это Zanzibar Cap Com. Пожалуйста, оставляйте комментарии, демонстрирующие точность и остроту зрения. Коне
حسنًا يا فانس، لقد كنت أحاول استخدام نظام التحكم في الوضعية "الحد الأدنى من الدفع" فقط للتحكم في الدوران والانعراج - أو بالأحرى الدوران والميل. ولكن، مع استخدام نظام التحكم في الوضعية فقط في هذا الإعداد، لا أستطيع التحكم في الدوران بالطريقة التي أريدها. لذلك، اضطررت إلى استخدام نظام آخر لزيادة الدوران تدريجيًا حتى يصل إلى الصفر، حيث كان يتناقص تدريجيًا حتى يصل إلى 270. لا أعرف حقًا ما هي التركيبة المطلوبة في نظام التحكم في الوضعية التي تُمكّنك من التحكم في الميل والد
네, 맞습니다. 우선 주요 이벤트 시간을 간단히 훑어보고 나서 세부 사항을 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 좋습니다. 진입 인터페이스는 142시간 40분, 즉 약 6시간 30분 전에 시작합니다. 히터 전원을 켜고, CM/ 온도를 확인하고 필요하면 CM/을 예열합니다. 아마도 예열이 필요할 것으로 예상됩니다. 자세한 절차는 나중에 안내해 드리겠습니다. 약 6시간 전에는 이전 중간 점검 때 사용했던 수정된 30분 체크리스트를 사용하여 전원을 켜기 시작합니다. 그리고 약 5시간 전에는 이전처럼 지구 종단면을 사용하여 기체 축 정렬 자세를 취해야 합니다. 그리고 그게 준비되는 대로 -7 단계를 수행할 건데, 현재로서는 초당 약 2피트(약 60cm) 정도의 연소 속도, 즉 약 15초 정도 걸릴 것 같습니다. 지금은 1.5피트(약 3.8m)까지 내려갔다고 하니, 안전 범위 내에 있는 것 같습니다. 좋습니다. 그 후, 서비스 모듈 투하 자세로 즉시 기동을 시작할 겁니다. 평소보다 일찍 투하하기 때문에 평면 내 자세를 유지할 겁니다. 평면 이탈은 필요 없고, 원하지도 않습니다. 서비스 모듈은 반경 벡터를 따라 바깥쪽으로 향하게 평면 내 자세를 유지할 겁니다. 그런 다음 사령선 점검 및 실사격을 포함하여 서비스 모듈 투하 준비를 시작하고, 약 4시간 30분 전에 서비스 모듈을 투하할 겁니다. 서비스 모듈을 확
ठीक है, जि
रॉजर। किसी कारणवश, हमारे कंप्यूटर पर अचानक PROGRAM 01 दिखाई देने लगा और कोई एट
Roger
Roger, 11. You're breaking up. Mike, please look in compartment 
我觉得我们差不多
Gemini VIII, RKV. Haben Sie schon etwas von der Agena gesehen
이글, 컬럼비아. 시간 되시면 CSI P
ठीक ह
さて、食品部門はこれで終わりにします。
Gemini 4, again. I see the same sort of curve of lights, like the northern lights except they are below us, and I saw them anot
Bene. E siamo pronti a leggervi la prima parte della checklist. Questa... Quello che leggeremo sarà una cronologia, una cronologia, e le modifiche alla checklist per conformarci a questa. E ora ho la prima parte della cro
हाँ, य
Roger. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Soyez vigilant et prê
जेमिनी 4, यह आरकेवी सर्जन बोल 
还有一件事，你可以找人看看——我不想麻烦楼上的人——我们在指挥舱里的排水软管，我想知道我们能不能找到它能不能插到……如果可以的话，我们就可以——至少以后
11, это Хьюстон. Подождите минутку, пожалуйста. У нас возникли пробл
로저. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 30분 보고를 계속합
確かにそうだよ。彼らは君
那一次——另一次
Roger, Jack. Damit ist dieser Vorgang abgeschlossen. A
R
겉포장을 열고, 안쪽 포장을 넣고
يا أهل هيوس
了解。無効です。そして、ここを見ると、燃料電池の水素と酸素が完全に一致しています。これは純粋に宇宙船の読み
오른쪽으로
Roger, Alabama. Je suis en mode automatique; rétroaction; les commutateurs du gyroscope sont normaux; la manœuvre est dé
आप इंतज़ार कीजिए, मैं 100 सेकंड के लि
Роджер. Некоторое время назад
Хорошо. Тогда DELTA-V тоже был частью этого; надеюсь, это немного припо
嗯，就偏航角而言，
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। हम यही करने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। मैं ऑप्टिक्स के लिए 15 प्राप्त करने का प्रयास कर रहा हूँ। पृथ्वी की तेज़ रोशनी के कारण ऐसा तारा ढूँढना बहुत मुश्किल हो रहा है जिसे हम सेक्स्टेंट में देख सकें। मैं ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग करके तार
Okay, Jack.
Il cuscino di atterraggio è disattivato. La retrosequenza di emergenza è disattivata. L'attivazione del d
罗杰。上升 PAD：104 39 47 00，55358 00322，加 0022，加 37130，减 70615，加 58620，加 5
좋습니다. 오늘은 절차에 따라 관측 전과 후에 트러니언 바이어스를 측정해 주시길 바랍니다. 이는 열 효과로 인해 육분의 각도 측정에 오차가 발생하는지 확인하기 위한 것입니다. 관측 전에 측정한 바이어스 값을 반영해야 합니다. 연속 두 측정값이 0.003도 이내이면 NOUN 87에 PROCEED 표시를 하십시오. 그리고 측정 사이에 트러니언을 몇 도 정도 움
Okay, Jack. Ich habe den Ladevorgang von Batterie 
了解しました。54 45 00で停止することをお勧めします。これでロール角はほぼ適切になります。推奨姿勢はロール263、ピッチ090、ヨー000です。これにより、司令船の窓1から地球が見え、テレビ視聴用の高利得アンテナが
Durante il l
Роджер. Данные нисходящего канала показывают, что на звезде 33 Джим использует да
はい。一つ訂正があります。LMPのリチウムカ
Okay. At that time I'll turn the Transmitter-Receiver HF OFF. No. 2 -- RECORD. We should state that. Now at minus 1 I'll push OAMS, ELECTRIC and ADAPT.
Ok, abbiamo 
Okay. We are s
好的。我会在8
11, Houst
네, 맞습니다. 패드의 마지막 부분은 -4.
L'étoile de visée est la Terre, en bas 037, à droite 22, plus 10 68, moins 165 00 128 56 361 18. Les étoiles d'alignement: l'étoile prin
Nous avons - 11, nous avons perd
يبدو أن هناك مساحة كبيرة في
حسنًا، فهمنا. إلى أي مدى تريد فتح صمام الأكسجين المباشر في هذه المرحلة؟ أعتقد أنك تريد ذلك - فقط اتركه مفتوحًا من تلك 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
11号，休斯顿。我们从会合点——更正一下，是头顶的窗户——视野很好。不过，我们没看到有人在盯着我们
好的。吉姆给我看的那幅图，是从他的角度看到的——部分地球，被照亮的部分位于上半部分，尖点正好落
Bene. Alfa è all'81%, Bravo al 75%. A quasi 115 ore, l'ossigeno in discesa è di 31,8 libbre o 59%; 858 ampere-ora 
J'ai quelques quantités de 
알겠습니다. 녹음기 끄겠습
さあ、
Хорошо. Мы завершили запись, и диктофон вернулся к вам. Вы можете использовать его как хотите. Возможно, нам понадобится сделать запись ещё раз, и если это произойдёт, мы будем использовать ту же информацию, если только вы не захотите добавить туда что-то ещё. Качество записи голоса — очень хорошее. Мы приближаемся к 4-му этапу средней части записи, и сейчас речь идёт о выполнении записи вовремя, и вы можете ожидать скорость записи около 3 футов в секунду. Мы
收到。我的
Я могу обеспечить вам высокую скорость передачи данных на O
Okay, Vance. This is command module to: cabin fan filter and 
Fred schaut gerade durch unser optisches Gerät. Es dient zur Ausrichtung unserer Plattform, und Fred versucht nun, ein Bild von der Außenwelt zu erhalten. Wir könnten eventuell eine Fernsehkamera verwenden, um durch unser optisches Gerät nach außen auf das Kommandomo
わかりました。OPERATE（運用）ブレーカーを引いて、姿勢が見えないようにしておきます。アンテナの切り替え方法は教えてもらえません。SQUELCH（スケルチ）をOFFにして、雑音が出始めたらアンテナを切り替えます。目安として、地球が正面にある時はFORWARD（前方）アンテナ、月が見える時はAFT（後方）アンテナを使用し
Roger. Abbiamo rilevato 50 gradi sul glicole e l'indice di comfor
Vous
मेरे पास अभी कोई इनपुट या मोड नहीं है, गोर्
रॉजर, जिम। हम उन तारों को देख रहे हैं जो हमने आपको इस बार दिए हैं। ऐसा लगता है कि दूसरे
了解しました。試したことは
Étiez-vous connecté(
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다
Friendship Seven, ici Canton. Nous n'avons aucune indication que
That's US
حسنًا. كان النجم الأخير هو نافي، ولم يكن واضحًا تمامًا. أستطيع أن أفهم سبب هذا الخطأ. أعتقد أن ريجل سيكون مناسبًا جدًا لم
حسنً
빌은 녹음기를 가지고 노는 데 지쳐서 
それを VHF 用にセットアップしていたの
Okay. That's right. That's Jim Lovell. What we thought we'd do today was just show you a little bit about life inside Apollo 8. We've shown you the scenes of the moon, the scenes of the earth, and we thought we'd invite you into our home. It's been our home at least for 4 days as you can see on the instrument panel. We mark off each day on the instrument panel. We're four down, and we're working on the fifth day. Of course, we're all looking forward to the landing on Friday. Down here in the part of the spacecraft that we call the lower equipment bay, we have the President's adviser on physical fitness, Captain Jim Lovell, about to undergo an exercise program that we do every day. You notice that he floats around very freely. He just bumped his head on the optics, used for our navigating. He's working with an exercise device that's designed to keep the muscles in shape. Now another very important function of our spacecraft is the computer, and I thought you might be interested in seeing what we have here, the displays that give us all the information about our burn, about navigating, and about the velocity that we use during entry and retrofire on earth-orbital missions. You c
好的，PDI 填充：102:33:04.36；09:50；减 0002.1；182, 287, 000；加 56919。PDI
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. B 배터리
ठीक है, पिछली बार मैंने कैन
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。当我们越过正确的滚转角时，偏航角肯定不会接近零度。你们是想让我们停下来反复尝试，直到找到你
Roger. Verstanden. Wir kümmern uns dar
*** एक दिशा में मेरा संतुलन बिगड़ने ही वाला था और संभलना काफ
좋아요. BATT C,
Roger. GE
Roger. 
好的，弗兰克
はい、素晴らしいですね。他の窓から宇宙船に入ってくる太陽光を遮断したので、今は1番窓から見ていることになります。反射光はありません。ですから、かなり良い画像になっているはず
Houston, quello che vedi al centro dello schermo ora è il cratere Schubert e Gilbert U
你的声音不是很大很清晰，但我认为问题是一样的。休斯顿，你如何解读Buzz
टीआर-10 सामान्य स्थिति में आ गया है। मैंने यह पहले भी किया है। ठीक है, सूट का दबाव सही है। इनवर्टर को फिर से देख लीजिए। 250 डिग्री पर 141 डिग्री है, 150 डिग्री पर लगभग 107 डिग्री है। इतना काफी है। स्टैंडबाय तापमान... 7 है। लगभग परिवेशी तापमान के बराबर। ऋणात्मक, यह थोड़ा... केबिन का दबाव लगभग 5.3 psi है, जो बिल्कुल सही है। सूट का डोम 72 डिग्री है। केबिन का डोम 45 डिग्
우주선에 부착된 부분입니다. 딱히 밀어낼 만한 곳이 없네요. 자, 제대로 밀어낼 수 있는지 한번 봅시다. 만약 총이 없었다면 좀 더 잘할
了解
ठीक है। अब हम आपको बेहतर ढंग से समझ पा रहे हैं। जिम मार्गदर्शन टुकड़ियों को अपना संदेश भेज सकता है। शुरू करने से पहले उनका एक सवाल है। वे जानना चाहते हैं कि उसका GERU स्तर क्
حسنًا. تخطَّ الخطوة الثانية، ثم نريد من ناقل الوقود 
Roger. Capito, la checklist pre-retro è completa. Hai un nuovo TR. Hai un
제미니 4, 여기는 
Auto beacons. 
وهيوس
オーケー、バズ。まず、着陸地点のオブリークが正しい位置にないという兆候があります。確認していただければ、中縮尺の着陸地点オブリークは月面ランドマークブックに収納されていると思います。大縮尺の着陸地点オブリークは月面地図ブックの裏に収納されて
Роджер. Мы вас слышим, Билл, теперь вс
收到。如果可转向天线在起飞时不太给力，看起来前置全向天线在起飞后大约30到60秒内还能正常工作。之后，后置全向天线就能在剩余
Roger
О, у вас есть довольно неплохие цифры, которые я вам вчера отправил, и у вас было примерно... Ну, я проверю, но вы явно переборщили с криогенной обработкой. У меня есть кое-что... У вас 33:20. Вы пролетаете служебный модуль
Kabi
Die Lenkung der Trägerrakete scheint einwandfrei zu funktionieren. Wir schätzen die Wahrscheinlichkeit eines Lenkungsabbruchs der Trägerrakete auf über 99 Prozent. Alles läuft also offenbar bestens. Zur Information: MLA empfing etwa eine Minute lang ein brauchbares Fernsehbild; das System scheint also zu funktionieren. Sie sind etwas mehr als eine Minute von der Sichtlinie (LOS) auf Canary entfernt; die Ankunftszeit a
알겠습니다. -7에 따라 롤 000, 피치 091.3, 요 0
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 이상
Just pul
Ricevuto. 07:02 Riprod
아폴로 13호, 휴스턴입니다. S밴드와 안테나 설정을 변경하고 싶습니다. 옴니 델타 방
Das ist beja
그를 깨
حسنًا، لقد شهدنا عاصفة ثلجية قوية هنا في الغرب الأوسط؛ لا أعرف إن كان بإمكانكم رؤيتها من هناك أم لا. وفي هيوستن، في الواقع، الجو بارد جدًا، حوالي 35 درجة. ونود أن نعرف من تشجعون يوم الأحد القادم، بالتيمور أم كليفلاند؟ كان دفاع بال
Roger. 10, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35189, minus 01513, minus 00346 180 007 000, November Alfa plus 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, Hauptstern Scorpii Delta (auch Dzuba gena
ジムの言う通りだ。いくつか例外を除いて、この項目はすべて削除しよう。最初のステップ「FORWARD DUMP valve, closed」は残しておこう。最後のステップ「
ऊंचाई वेग हल्का, 3-1/2 नीचे, 220 फीट; 13 आगे, 11 आगे, अच्छी तरह से नीचे आ रहा है। 2
Loud and clear, Apollo 8. And thank you for a very good show. We have a maneuver for you when yo
Real great. Listen Ed, we want to modify the Flight Plan and we would like to have the sleep period changed here and let you get some rest. We'd like to have you go for at least 4 hours right n
ATT DEADBAND, MIN
Davvero v
D'accord, Joe. Si je comprends bien, à 74 heures, nous allons effectuer un contrôle par rapport au Soleil au niveau du cran 2, ce qui nécessitera de dégager le radar de rendez-vous. Nous utiliserons la manœuvre automatique pour y parvenir, ou du moins pour calculer les angles de sortie. Si le résultat est satisfaisant à 1 degré près, vous confirmez que la plateforme est apte pour la manœuvre et qu'aucune autre ne sera nécessaire. Même si tout est en ordre, vous nous indiquerez une étoile de référence pour notre contrôle de nuit. Si ce con
نعم. نحن في وضع هبوطي تقريبًا. سنكون في وضع صعودي 
Ciò significa che tutti i sistemi di contro
جيميني 4، هيوستن CAP COM. هل استلمت تحديث 
अगर इसके लिए आपको बिल को परेशान करना ही पड़े, तो हम
로저, 3 설정으로 돌아갔을 때 잠시 동안 제대로 작동하지 않았지만 오래 있지는 않았습니다. 확
Okay, Mike. Das gilt natürlich nur für den 
제미니 4호, 하와이 CAP 
Was machst du denn mit deinen Ärmeln, Ed? Wil
प्लस 38. रॉजर। क्या केप चाहता है कि मैं इसे वर्तमान समय में घड
सूरज की 
Roger. 88 and 8.5. When yo
バッテリーが 39.5 ボルトに戻るまでには長い時間がかかるで
好了，血压测量开始。刚才在健身器上做了60个循环，持续了30
The pitch scribe mark does indicate up a little bit and as a result matches the retroattitude, 
Je voudrais dire un mot sur le sextant. Son utilisation dans un vaisseau spatial exigu est très difficile, surtout avec le casque. J'ai finalement conclu qu'il serait inutile, avec le casque, d'essayer de prendre les angles requis pour les étoiles visées. J'ai donc retiré mon casque. Cela m'a donné un peu plus de liberté de mouvement, mais j'étais toujours limité à des angles d'environ 20 à 23° sans manœuvrer le vaisseau. L'étoile était alors masquée par la partie supérieure du hublot. En manœuvrant le vaisseau plus fréquemment et plus amplement, on pourrait aligner le g
D'accord. Je sais que vous essayez de rester discret, alors je vais vous lire quelques informations. L'une des choses que nous venons de découvrir et qui pourrait vous rassurer, c'est que si vous perdez votre réservoir cryogénique d'oxygène, il vous reste 80 livres
Du musst war
我希望——我希望他
上次绕地球飞行时，我大概这个时候喝了四口水。等宇航服温度稍微稳定一些，我就打开面罩
알겠습니다. 그럴 수도 있겠네요, 찰리. 초기 표시들은 제가 항성 근접 지점을 정확하게 파악하지 못했을 수도 있어요. 시간이 지나면서 점
Roger. 
알겠습니다. 루나 15호 최신 소식입니다. 
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Ho le Pleiadi in vista da qui, molto nitide. Ora sto notando alcune di queste formazioni ste
Direi che
Ja, das zweite Mal h
ठीक है। प्रक्रिया इस 
هذا يبدو جيداً حقاً يا م
Apollo 8, this is Houston. Roger. I will read back again. The burn was o
D'accord. Nous allons effectuer un relevé de portée pendant environ 15 minutes. Veuillez donc fermer le disjoncteur de l'amplificateur de puissance et passer en 
Okay. Well, I'm just about ready to do that. Whenever you're ready to let it go free, why just tell m
حسناً. ثم في أسفل الصفحة 6، حيث ترى "DIRECT O2, OFF VERIFY"، احذف تلك ال
Apollo 8, this is Houston. Would you please go to and ACCEPT, Jim
«Аполлон-8»
ठीक है। जैक, मुझे जो समझ आया, उसके अनुसार प्रक्रिया में यह माना जाता है कि सभी अच्छी बैटरियां चालू हैं, और बैटरी नंबर 6 सामान्य रूप से काम कर रही है। अब हम पैनल नंबर 5 में जाएंगे, जह
还需要一点。就是这样；继续。还需要一点……就是这样，继续——再来一点——继续——继续——好了，停。好了，
잠시 기다려 
ठीक है। अपोलो 8। लगता है हमें कुछ ट्रैकिंग ज़रूरतों की वजह से यह संचार परीक्षण स्थगित करना पड़ेगा। अगर इससे आपके मौजूदा कार्यों में ज़्यादा बाधा नहीं आएगी, तो हम इसे लगभग एक घंटे में कर सकते हैं। इसमें शायद 15 से 20 मिनट लगेंगे, और इसमें अंतरिक्ष यान में सवार लोगों की कुछ बातचीत शामिल होगी। इसलिए, अगर इससे आपकी नींद में ख
Okay. Wir bereiten uns auf den Schichtwechsel vor, und ich wollte
Apollo 8, Houston. We don't have any objections to going ahead with the urine dump now. And for your information,
Wir wollen etwas Leistung 
내 창문 위쪽은 뻥 뚫려 있어
هيو
Bene, Mattingly mi ha assicurato che avrei avuto una velocità circolare in funzione dell'altitudine, sapete, quando m
أراهن أنني أعرف كيف يمكنني الحصول على محاذاة. سأعطيهم زاوية حلزونية للمؤشر. بدلاً من مناورة المركبة الفضائية، سأعطيهم حلزونية
Non importa quante volte metto questi oculari otti
지금 카메라 뒷면에 큰 덮개를 씌우고 있는 중입니다. 녹화 모드가 아닌 VOX 전원 끄기 모드를 사용해서 녹화가 안 된 시
على الجانب الأيمن.
Okay. Es gibt nicht viel Neues. A
हाँ। मुझे लगता है कि उस पहाड़ी के ठीक बाह
Ну вот, вы только начинаете видеть ок
Sag
Roger, Guaymas, alles klar und deutlich. Mein Steuermodus ist jetzt Fly-by-Wire; die Gyroskope sind deaktiviert, ich bin drin – Manöver sind ausgeschaltet. Ich gehe direkt in den Automatikmodus. Mein Status ist gut; der Kapselstatus ist gut. Der Treibstoffstand liegt bei 69-69 Prozent, der Sauerstoffgehalt bei 88-100 Prozent. Die Temperaturanzeige am Kabinendampfventil ist auf +10 Grad gestiegen, ich glaube, das ist ein Messfehler. Die Temperaturanzeige am Anzugsdampfventil s
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन आपको आगे बढ़ने क
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Осталось около 40 секунд, и здесь 
Роджер. У меня есть обновленная информация о плане п
سلبي.
わかりました。ちょっとやってみましょう。そろそろ他の
ठीक है, बिल। मुझे लगता है कि मैं 4 के लिए ऑनबोर्ड स्टेट वेक्टर का उपयोग करने के बारे में अपनी आखिरी बात को टालना चाहता हूँ। ज़मीन पर इसका और अधिक अध्ययन करने के बाद, उन्हें 's बनाने और अपनी सभी गणनाएँ करने में जुट जाना होगा, और इसे टालने या दो बार करने के बजाय, हम उन प्रक्रियाओं के साथ आगे बढ़ेंगे जिनका हम शुरू से उपयोग करते आ रहे हैं। चंद्र कक्षा के बारे में, हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं और हमारे कई लोग - जैक श्मिट और उनकी टीम पीछे के कमरे में - यह देख रहे हैं कि आपकी खिड़कियों का क्या प्रभाव पड़ता है। और, मूल रूप से, ऐसा लगता है कि दो विकल्प हैं जो उस 2 पर प्रभाव डालेंगे। एक विकल्प, निश्चित रूप से, यह होगा कि आप और जिम अपनी सीटें बदल लें और जिम बाहर देखकर अपना SAM प्राप्त कर ले, और दूसरा विकल्प यह होगा कि विमान को घुमाकर जिम को ऑप्टिक्स को जितना हो सके आगे की ओर इंगित करने दें और दूरबीन के माध्यम से अपना SAM प्राप्त करने दें। और मुझे लगता है कि हम यह जानना चाहेंगे कि खिड़कियों के साथ आप क्या कर सकते हैं; अगर आपके पास कोई सुझाव है, तो हम उसे ध्यान में रखकर अपनी योजनाओं को जल्द से जल्द अंतिम रूप द
Right. And in all this stuff in all these pictures using the ALC, it is important that you let the camera stabilize for at least 10 or 20 seconds, to let the ALC do its
Ok, dopo BAT 2, BASSA TENSIONE, OFF/RESET, io - poi ON, aspett
D'accord. Et vos changements d'attitude manuels se font comme vous le souhaitez. Nous allons bientôt procéder à l'éjection, ce qui revient à une sépa
Roger. Es dauert sow
ठीक है। अब जब हम चंद्रमा से वापस आ गए हैं, तो मैं आपके लिए कुछ सामान्य बातों पर प्रकाश डालना चाहूँगा - खाद्य क्षेत्र में हुए विकास। मुझे यकीन है कि आप पहले से ही पेय पदार्थ के कंटेनर के प्रकार से परिचित होंगे। थोड़ी देर बाद, माइक आपको दिखाएगा कि हाइ
Ich sollte wohl besser die 
Base Tranquility, qui Houston. La nostra telemetria mostra che l'interruttore del braccio motore è attualmente in posizione APERTO. Vi preghiamo di lasciarlo aperto finché non sarà teoricamente previsto che ven
罗杰，我们会
Итак, предварительный анализ данных показывает, что центральный двигатель S-II вибрировал с несколько большей амплитудой, чем мы наблюдали в предыдущих полетах, и это началось примерно через 160 секунд после начала работы двигателя S-II. В результате этих вибраций давление в камере сгорания двигателя снизилось до уровня, при котором два датчика тяги нижнего уровня, датчики тяги в норме, инициировали отключение центрального двигателя. Предварительная оценка данных показывает, что двигатель не получил повреждений, а причи
Houston, Columbia. Lo ripeto: non li ho visti. 
Der Schalter ist AUS. Zur Info: Ich habe den Druck auf etwa 880 reduzie
월리, 불빛을 켜
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। लगभग 1 मिनट में। हम कमांड रीसेट औ
휴스턴, 이글. VERB 83에서 범위와 범위 변화율에 대한 매우 큰 숫자를 복사하고 있는 건가요? 그리고 두 차량 중 하나가 변경
Très bien. Prêt pour la p
Gemini 4, th
Ok. Sono al malfunzionamento 23, fase 2. Mi sembra che ci sia una piccola possibilità che stiamo 
軌道レートが不安定な場合は、海岸に近づくにつれて追跡タスク用に独自
当初は、別の回避操作があったため、予定通りの観測を直ちに開始することができませんでした。この操作によって、その領域に膨大な量の疑似星が発生し、光学系の較正が事実上不可能になりました。私たちが考案した方法はあまりうまく機能していないようでした。最終的に私が採用した方法は、最も明るい恒星であるシリウスに行き、シャフトとトラニオンを回収し、その後、宇宙船をシリウスまで飛ばして光学系の較正に使用するというものでした。これは後日実施しました。光の散乱に関しては、
D'accord. Mais au mo
ठीक है। मैंने उसके लिए प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट में एक छोटा सा ब
हमने आपको कुछ समय बताया है। हमें लगता है कि हम जल्द ही आपको कुछ बेहतर समय बता पाएंगे। फिलहाल, ऐसा लगता है कि आपका पानी 154 घंटे तक ठीक रहेगा, और आपके पास 272 घंटे तक ताकुसान ऑक्सीजन है, पर्याप्त लिथियम हाइड
You've got th
私たちは努力しています。準備ができるように、17-1 逆噴射時間の最新情報を教えて
わかりました、ヒューストン。同意
انتهينا للتو من ذلك؛ نواصل
シグマ・セブン、シグマ・セブン、こちらカノ・コムテック、UHF/HFで送信中。聞こえますか？オー
هيوستن، أبولو 8. تأكد من أن
Roger. Potresti non dover dilungarti troppo. La posizione che ti ho appena indicato è leggermente a ov
Eagle, Houston. Visto che siamo in modalità "dormiente", vi farò un altro lungo conteggio. Se state leggendo in questa modalità, vi preghiamo di passa
Vous avez tout à fait raison! Je confirme. Les év
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 전송하실 데이터가 있습니다. 수락해 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 데이터는 슬롯에 들어갈 사전 상태 벡터와 사후 상태 벡터, 그리고 목표 데이터로 구성되어 있습니다. 괜
Toute la procédure pour le P22 a semblé fonctionner parfaitement. Le seul point un peu étrange concernait l'activité des propulseurs DAP. J'avais configuré le tangage en commande d'accélération, et le roulis et le lacet en commande de v
Je le cherchais, mais je ne le trouvais pas. Je ne le voyais pas. Si j'avais pu observer plus attentivement, j'aurais vu beaucou
了解。1、G&N: 62710、プラス098、マイナス019、075 49 4965、マイナス28897、マイナス03944、マイナス00686; 358 226 347; 01692、プラス00610; 29173 602 29108; 31 106.6 358。ベガとデネブを243 183 012に合わせる。アレージなし。TIG2分前にハッチ窓に地平線。76 15 29。
Ich fühle mich jetzt recht erholt, obwohl ich nicht richtig gut geschlafen habe. Ich habe zwei Mahlzeiten zu mir genommen. Das erste Frühstüc
«Дружба Се
Хорошо. Обратите внимани
Oh, es ist herrlich h
吉姆，你说
休斯顿，阿波罗8号。1号如下：/: 467
Vérifions l'horloge de secours et nous la
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait pas fonctionner correctement. La méthode que j'ai finalement utilisée consistait à entrer dans [nom de la zone manquante], à nous rendre à Sirius, notre étoile la plus brillante, à récupérer l'axe et le tourillon, puis à faire voyager le vaisseau spatial jusqu'à Sirius pour l'utiliser pour l'optique, ce que nous avons fait ultérieurement. En ce qui concerne la diffusion de la lumière, il semble que, quelle que soit l'attitude pendant notre contrôle thermique passif, nous recevions de la lumière diffusée dans le télescope de balayage. Cela se présente principalement sous la forme d'une large bande de lumière traversant le centre du télescope, à environ 10 degrés de part et d'autre de zéro. Il est très difficile de voir les étoiles dans cette zone. Les réalignements ont été bons. J'ai pu repérer l'étoile dans le sextant pour effectuer l'alignement, mais je n'ai pas pu identifier l'étoile utilisée pour des observations telles que Regor ou Menkent avec le télescope de balayage. La première observation d'étoile que j'ai effectuée depuis la Terre a révélé 
前向射击的持续时间为八到十秒，
कोलंबि
उस सूट के प्रवेश द्वार का तापमान बढ़
ठीक है। आपने मुझसे पहले भी कहा था, जो, कि मैं 400 प्लस 3 करूं, जो मैंने किया। मुझे
1
Похоже, что длина составляет примерно 8 или 9
水瓶座，休斯顿。抱歉，背景噪音太大，听不清你的声音。我想我们得等你用
はい。また話が逸れてしまいました。ヒーターの設定はこちらです。H2ヒーター1はOFF、2はAUTO。O2ヒーター
Qualcuno dietro le quinte ci accusa di essere dei
Wir sollen die Agena im Flugsteuerungsmodus 6 einstellen, und zwar von 06:15 
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. ل
Okay; right. Okay. I'm ready to start into the procedure. When you answer me back, speak up - speak up into the microphone, because our downlink is pretty noisy. The first thing we want you to do, and we'll do this on one canister, a
حسنًا، هذا يكفي تقريبًا، واللعنة، لا أريد أن
Pour reprendre mon compte-rendu concernant le propulseur, au début du vol. Après notre entrée dans l'obscurité, à environ 1200 pieds (365 mètres) de distance, j'ai tenté de maintenir ma position, mais le seul repère dont je disposais pour évaluer la distance qui me séparait du propulseur était l'écart entre les feux clignotants. De façon intermittente – et non pas intermittente, mais continue – je voyais un feu, puis deux, puis un seul, et parfois il s'écoulait un long moment avant que je n'en voie deux à nouveau, indiquant que le propulseur tournait constamment. Je n'avais aucune idée de sa direction. En me basant sur l'écart entre les feux, lorsque je pouvais les voir tous les deux, j'estimais être en bonne position par rapport au propulseur jusqu'à notre arrivée aux alentours de Carnarvon. À ce moment-là, j'avais l'impression de me rapprocher assez rapidement, même si je n'en étais pas certain. Toute la variation de vitesse (ΔV) que j'avais cumulée jusque-là avait été effectuée dans la direction du propulseur, c'est-à-dire en rétrograde. Malheureusement, ce satané propulseur se positionnait de telle sorte que pour m'en rapprocher, je devais effectuer une manœuvre positive, ce qui, au bout d'un certain temps, me faisait m'en éloigner à nouveau. Ensuite,
Okay, Apollo 8. All the systems - giving a quick look around the room - look real fine. You've got an quad update on the quantity, so you have that information. The oxidizer feed-line temperature and the fuel temperature are both at 73 degrees. The cryo profile is running Battery A - our calculations have 39.63 amp hours. Battery B, 37.94,
플라이트는 ACME의 출력에 대해 걱
Friendship Seven, ici Zanzibar Surgeon. Tension artérielle systolique à 136 après l'effort, enregistrée correctement et en baisse à un peu moins de 90 pour la diastolique. Les deux tracés sont d'excellente qualité. Votre
300 pieds en dessous, 3,5, 47 en 
It's sort of messy. I haven't been at this very long. It's sort of the same system that the Spaniards used to drink out of wineskins at bull fights, only I think this is 
Questa è Friendship Seven. Negativo, non lo so; c'è troppa nuvolosità in questa zona. Avevo le luci a Perth in buone condizioni;
فريند
Немн
أبولو 8، هيوستن. أمامنا 3 دقائ
Roger, Houston. Abbiamo quei due interruttori automatici attivat
Sì, 
마지막 별 두 개를 깎더라도 크게 실망하시는 분들은 없으시길 바라지만, 짐도 저도
Верно, Майк, и мы полагаем, чт
Say again - being interfered with there. Will you rep
阿波罗8
لا، ليس لديّ الجهاز قيد التشغيل. هل ت
Roger, tu as bien compris le système de p
네, PYRO A 시퀀스 A와 PYRO B 시퀀스 B 회로 차단기는 
انظر إليها وهي تحترق ي
Roger. Das ist bestätigt. Wir haben die Außenwirkung au
Okay, Charlie. Mi sembra solo che tu debba avere un reticolo tangente all'orizzonte nel punto in cui segni, altrimenti non sei nel punto substellare; sei spostato lateralmente e quindi stai misur
حسناً يا فريد. الخطوة التالية هي ببساطة تحويل مفتاح مراقبة ضغط درجة حرارة الوقود إلى وضع الهبوط 1
Okay. Scusate. Sono le 27
Roger, merci.
로저, 짐. 며칠 전처럼 컴퓨터에서 지울 수 있는 메모리 덤프를 다시 한번 진행하려고 합니다. 8시간 전에 하셨던 작업에서 시간을 입력하셨고, 
... that's 
Roger. La température du réservoir d'hélium de Quad Able a très légèrement baissé et nous 
هذا صح
今のところ地上に無視の兆候はありません、フレンドシップ・セブン。ハワイ。オ
C'est exact. Prochaine é
खैर, इससे आराम नहीं मिलता। इस रेडियो की
И закрепите м
Come ha funzionato l'A
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。根据我们从中途飞行以来的观测，伽马值为-6.57。不过这只是初步数据，我们认为经过进一步跟踪后，它应该会更接近目标，我们可以将其精确地调整到目标区域。它现在几乎位于目标区域的中心；一切看起来都很顺利。几个小时后，在你睡觉之前，我们会给你发送进入着陆平台的指示。除了你的飞行之外，我们公共事务部门的朋友们还带来了一些其他消息。你仍然是新闻的焦点。不过，还有一些其他的事情值得你关注。正如我之前提到的，全明星赛因雨取消了。比赛将于明天举行。然而，尼克松总统将无法像他计划的那样观看比赛。我们会随时向你通报比赛结果。另外，气象预报员也会对你很友好。我们的预报显示，回收区域的天气状况良好；那
哦，不，我们
我看到一些白色的薄片、气泡、白色
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम इस प्रक्रिया को एक बार फिर से आजमाना चाहेंगे। हम थोड़
로저, 프렌드
Ricevuto. Lo faremo tra un minut
Abbiamo ricevuto la conferma della pressione sanguigna. Siamo in atte
알겠습니다. 저는 다시 원래의 태도로 돌아
Ok. Ci ho messo un po' a riordinare le idee. Altre 
这是“友谊七号”。它刚开始运行时，偏航时会进入姿态控制模式，这会导致其他轴的姿态也出现偏差。这种情况持续了一段时间，它会缓慢地向右偏航，直到偏航角度达到约20°才会进行修正。然后它会迅速地向右偏航20°，并进行修正，之后又会回到姿
弗兰克，我们现在正在核
Ricevuto. F
Okay. Als Erstes wollen wir die Batterie laden, damit wir dort Strom haben. Die entsprechenden Prozeduren sind bereits vorbereitet. Was den Wiedereintritt angeht, planen wir
Qui è Sigma Seven. In HF. Qui è Sigma Seven. In HF. Un breve conteggio a. Questo serve per verificare la copertura HF sul World Wide Range. La durata della trasmissione è di 60 secondi. Vorrei sapere cos'altro potrei dire per perdere
了解。少し遅くなってきたので、26日から始めるのはやめました
Ce qu'il me fau
了解。そうです。では、フライ・バイ・ワイヤ、補助ダンプに切り替えます。さて、姿勢が合いません。逆行まであと5分。ライト
자, 물병자리 여러분, 시작해 
Nein, wir 
मैं पानी गिरा रहा हूँ। फ्यूज चालू कर दिया है। तैयार हूँ। रिकवरी आर्म "आर्म" स्थिति में है। मुख्य पैराशूट के लिए तैयार हूँ। सभी स्विच सही स्थिति में हैं। मैनुअल ईंधन लगभग खत्म हो गया है। यह रहा और मुख्य पैराशूट खुल गया। यह - यह बहुत सुंदर तरीके से खुल गया। चमकीला नीला आसमान। और यह डीरीफ्ड है, और एक स्वीट पाई जैसा दिखता है। ऑटो ईंधन गिर रहा है। इस समय उतरने की दर लगभग 35 फीट प्रति सेकंड है। मुझे कोई समस्या नहीं दिख रही है। मैं प्रभाव के लिए तैयार हो रहा हूँ। 
了解しました。目的は近点通過と2時間後の打ち切りです。:;
好了，刚才被打断了一会儿。鲍勃·霍普又回到越南和他的部队一起演出了，一如既往地表现出
로저: 포용성에 대한 이야기를 들었습니다. 기분은 좋습니다. 지구가 보입니다. 시야도 좋고, 
Okay, Apollo 8. All the systems - giving a quick look around the room - look real fine.
Roger. GET B 13 25 52; ​​Delta-V, 9 Fuß pro Sekunde; Brenndauer, 0 plus 11; 0 Gierwinkel, 0 Nickwinkel; Kern 25, 00090; Kern 26 und Kern 27, alle 0; Hecktrie
물 공급은 켜져 있고, 객실 온도는 2단계로 설정되어 있습
Все усилите
ये रहा पुराना कोरोना ऑस्ट्रेलिस, बहुत खूबसूरती से दिख रहा है, और हमारे पास नुनकी भी है। हमारे पास कौस ऑस्ट्रेलिस भी है, और नुनकी बिल्कुल अपने उड़ान पथ पर है। मैं 0 यॉ, 5 डिग्री बाएँ रोल, रेट्रोएटीट्यूड में पढ़ रहा हूँ। मैं सच में जानना चाहता हूँ कि यह इतना जटिल क्यों है। और ऊपर उन विमानों के ऊपर मुझे एक और चमकीला विमान दिखना चाहिए। यह ज़रूर अल्टेयर होगा। बहुत बढ़िया। इस उड़ान में आपको ऐसा महसूस नहीं होता कि आप ऑस्ट्रेलिया के ऊपर से गुज़र रहे हैं। ठीक है। अब देखते हैं, हमने उन विमानों के लिए यॉ चेक पूरा कर लिया है, कैंटन 
I'm going to stay OMNI B, if you all want to take command ba
ありがとう、ヒュー
列
GMT 시간으로 환산
रॉजर, 11. ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन के लिए मेरे पास रोल के लिए 346.5, पिच के लिए 345.0 और यॉ के लिए 007.8 है। आपकी किताब में पेन और स्याही से किए 
क्या आप (अस्पष्ट) नीचे चाहते हैं? क
Gemini 4, I'm reading you weak. I
C'est exact. J'ai le ballon. Cependant, je ne l'ai pas vu depuis un certain temps. Il dérive 
That's great. 0 on 
Ich habe dazu nur eine sehr 
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴. 산소 배출을 아직 중단하지 않으셨다면 중단해 주시길 바랍니다. TV 카메라 담당자들이 카메라 자체의 결함이라고 하더군요, 버즈. 저희
Houston, Columbia. My is reading 4.9, in X, 5
It 
好的。我现在处于自动模式。一切运行正常。机动开关已关闭。所有
냉각수 펌프 점검 보고서를 기다리고 있습
다시 
Хорошо. До начала осталось примерно 10 минут. Мы снова заберем вас в это время, и у нас будет вся информация от специалистов по телевидению наготове. В случае, если ситуация повторится, для точности наведения, если я увижу что-то похожее на терминатора или что-то подобное, я обозначу темную сторону как «12 часов» и буду использовать это как систему отсчета, и мы попробуем это. Если эт
रॉजर, सेवन। थोड़ी दिक्कत हो रही है।
Хорош
Okay, 13. Per cominciare, ho apportato una piccola modifica procedurale a Jack nel suo prossimo e
Le disjoncteur du circuit de contrôle d'assiette à l'atterrissage est ouvert. C'est le deuxième
Roger. The Delta-V is 2 feet per second, 2 plus zero
Понял. Нужно контролировать количество жидкости во вторичном аккумуляторе. Шаг 2: подача вторичного гликоля к радиаторному клапану, в обычном режиме 30 секунд, затем перевести в режим обхода. Е
Ti sento bene. I preparativi stanno procedendo bene. Va tutto
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 수락 버튼을 눌러주시겠습니까? 전달하실 업무가 있습니다. 잠시 기다려 주십시오. 이글, 4단계로 넘어갈 준비가 되었습
Jim, Houston. Nous n'avons pas d'explication quant à la raison pour laquelle le moteur inboard a été arrêté prématurément, mais les autres
Понял. Кано
रॉजर। मैं समझ गया - स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप की तुलना में सेक्स्टेंट का उपयोग करके ट्रैकिंग करना आसान है; यह आपको बेहतर नियंत्रण देता है, और इसके बाद फिर स
D'accord. Information de dernière minute: Juan Carlos a été officiellement désigné hier, mardi, pour succ
알겠습니다. 빌이 잠들기 전에 세 명의 승무원 모두에 대한 보고를
了解。Rev 57、シーケンス16、08:11、ヨー12°、ピッチ30°、16mmカメラ。Rev 58、シーケンス12、09:36、ヨー
Je distingue à peine, sur le coin gauche de la Lune, les contreforts de la formation de Fra Mauro. Nous n'avion
收到
그래, 너 정말 잘하
क्या आप मुझे उन्
Roger. Und ich habe gehört, dass Denub
Roger. You residents of the spacecraft Columbia may be interested in knowing that today is Independence Day in the country of Colombia. Gloria Diaz of the Philippines was crowned Miss Universe last night. She defeated 60 other girls for the global beauty title. Miss Diaz is 18, with black hair and eyes, and measures 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. First runner up was Miss Australia, followed by Miss Isr
Mentre ero fuori, ho notato che il finestrino di Jim aveva una patina sulla parte esterna. Una volta, quando l'ho sfiorato con la spalla o con il braccio, si è spalmato completamente, sporcando anche la parte superiore del parabrezza, impedendogli di vedere fuori. Guardando fuori da questo lato, vedo che è ricoperto da un materiale piuttosto spesso. Quando ero fuori a guardare dentro, sembrava quasi una pellicola untuosa s
まずはいくつか荷物を収納します。まだ分かりません。少
Yes. We'll be looking at the data here, and
R
Да, у меня двойная линия на 30-м номере
Roger. U
Das ist richtig, Jim. Und dies dient der Absicherung gegen einen Einzelpunktfehler – eine unwahrscheinliche Möglichkeit, die Sie daran hindern wür
Das ist richtig, Jack. Das sind die einzigen Änderungen an Schalter 1-3. Jetzt zu Schalter 1-4. An den verbleibenden drei Schaltern auf Bedienfeld 2 bleiben die Einstellungen 1-3 unverändert. Auf Bedienfeld 3 bleiben die Schalter 1-3, 2-4 und 3-4 unverändert. Anschließend schalten wi
أحد الأمور التي قد تثير اهتمام العالم هو ما تفعله بعد عملية الاحتراق لإعادة ضبط المفاتيح. لقد سمعنا أنك تراجع قائمة التحقق. لكن، أعتقد أنك الآن، على الأرجح، قد أعدت جميع المفاتيح إلى وضعها الصحيح وأنت جاهز للمتابعة. حسنًا. ماذا تقول خطة الرحلة؟ ستستخدم الملاحة القمرية. إذًا، يا جاك،
На одном из
わかりました。15000キロ地点なので、すぐにブレーキをかけ始めます。15000キロ圏内に入っているの
Go ahead, 11. Ove
Fred, der sich einmischt. Du bist sehr schwach. Falls Buzz oder Neil hier unten sind, würdest du s
了解。ク
Ic
わかりました。ジャック、今見ているのは1
D'accord. Appuyez sur ENTRÉE, 333, ENTRÉE, puis lisez le registre 1. Ce registre devrait contenir 10 000. Si ce n'est pas le cas, je peux vous indiquer la procédure pour le ramener à 10 000. S'il contient bien 10 000 comme prévu, appuyez
Roger. That's good, Fred-o. And that'll bring you to step 8, and you get a flashing 5018 when you PRO on the. Okay. At 5018, we want to do an AUTO maneuver to - to the attitude, so just do the - the PRO with the GUIDANCE CONTROL, PNGS; MODE CONTROL, PNGS, AUTO; and we'll take this attitude. Now, that's going to pu
Вот небольшая Южная Корона, которую мы решили использовать для калибровки. Она прямо
시그마
ठीक है धन्
了解。やっとOMNI Dに戻せたよ。ハイゲインに戻そうと
好的。现在请在接
और, एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। आपकी सुविधानुसार, हमें एक बार फिर वोल्ट और एम्
On a bu un peu de lait de poule chez Charlie Duke ce soir. Val Anders est passée. Elle a l'air en pleine forme. Dis à Bill qu'elle se porte à mervei
Roger, ich habe die Wechselrichterstufe von 4 auf 5 erhöht. Und ic
En général, le temps passé à l'ombre ne semble pas avoir d'effet thermique à l'intérieur de la combinaison
了解。ヒューストンがあなたの状況を尋ね、フライトプランに変更
Это подтверждается.
로저. 잔차: -0.1, -0.2, -0.7. 그리고 우리는 DELTA-VZ에 대해 9.5인 NOUN 86을 사용했는데, 당신 것은 9.1이었으니, 이것이 차이의 원인일
Apollo 8, Houston. Ihre voraussicht
No, sure 
الجوزاء 
Okay, Jack. It appears that we're going - funny diversion here, the attitude in - in pitch. I'm going to do a check now, but the last time the Moon went around, it was above - way away above the angle and I see the Earth coming around now which is going to be pretty low.
좋습니다. 델타-
Sì. La luminosità è ancora piuttosto buona. Puoi procedere aprendo il diaframma di uno o due stop. La compensazione automatica del livell
Vergessen wir 
Я определённо вижу следы рыскания в
Bene, e vorremmo farti un'altra domanda sullo sfogo. Si tratta, secondo te, di uno sfogo nuovo o di uno sfogo che non avevi mai consi
روجر. لقد توصلنا أخيرًا إلى اتفاق بشأن مشكلتنا هنا بعد أن قام 50 شخص
इससे ज्यादा आप और कुछ नहीं मांग सकते। बस इतना ध्यान 
Yes. Okay. That's on this watch, which is about a half an hour
Wir sind sehr zufrieden mit der Arbeit der Flugsicherung hier unten, Jim. Die Jungs haben hervorragende Arbeit geleistet und verdienen großes Lob. Ein fantastischer Fl
GDA 一切正常，继续推
À votre convenance, nous aimerions recevoir le
Ti ho sentito forte e 
好的，收到。这是第57版，序列号16，格林尼治标准时间08:11。偏航角12°，俯仰角30°，
Rechts
أتساءل عما إذا كان ينبغي علين
아폴로 11호,
로저. 해당 페이지로 이동하여 '승인'을 클릭해 주시면, 값을 업데이트하는 파일을
Близнецы 4, Канарский 
И вы готовы. В Хантсвилле сообщают, что у вас 6-секундная площадка для запуска, что на 3 секунды больше, чем в случае с 3-сигма-гипофизарным корпусом; так что с 
ठीक है। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। यह चीज़ ओरिएंटेशन मोड में बार-बार आ-जा रही है और इस समय ईंधन बर्बाद कर रही है। मैं इसे मैन्युअल रूप से ऑर्बिट एटीट्यूड पर रखने की कोशिश करूँगा। ओवर। या फिर फ्लाई-बाय-वायर पर। ओ
目の前の小さな海原に、はっきりとした小さな衝突クレーターが現れま
Roger, Tom. Nur zur Information: Unser T/M bestätigt dies, und wir haben eine Lösung gefunden, die vielversprechend aussieht. Könnten Sie bitte 03 wiederholen? Ich wurde unterbrochen. Ich habe Ihre Antwort nicht verstanden. Ich denke, sie war k
هيوستن، كولومبيا. أكرر: لم أرهما. وجّهت عدسات الكاميرا الآلية نحو نقطة قريبة جدًا من الإحداثيات التي أعطيتني إياها، لذا اخترتُ حفرة صغيرة في تلك المنطقة ووضعتُ علامة عليها، حتى أتمكن من الحصول على بيانات قابلة للتكرا
Хорошо. Луна про
了解しました。そこに何もないことに今
Roger. There are two gears that we have that go around when you pull the handle back and forth. One of them is the gear that sort of acts as a ratchet, a little cylinder with a piston in it and a spike behind it that engages the ratchet. And we were having a little trouble with that before we got it open and after we got it open we had difficulty getting this ratchet to work. Also, we had a great deal of difficulty getting the hatch closed far enough so that we could even start latching it. Then, Ed had to push the ratchet in with his hand on every go until we got the thing started. And I was pulling on the thing until I thought probably I was goi
ठीक है। माइनस 5 घंटे पर। चलिए, मैं एक बार देख लेता हूँ
Okay. Wir beobachten, dass der mittlere Gimbalwink
ヴ
अब, जैक, तुम इसे द
그건 꽤 큰 책인데, 안
它们大多都在下沉。
D'accord. On ne l'a pas retiré de son e
やあ、ブラ
Roge
我没办法把绘
حسناً يا هيوستن. اجتاز اختبار النجوم باستخدا
Это верно. На панели 5: автоматический выключат
नील, क्
Верно. Хорошо, теперь наземны
चार्ली, हमने अभी-अभी 261 डि
そうします - カナリア外科医があ
ロジャー：インクルージョンは聞こえた
- - N barra A nel,
नहीं, मुझे कोई आपत्ति नहीं है। मैं बस पुरानी गेंद के साथ फिर से तालमेल बिठा लेता हूँ। तो मैंने आपको फिर से दूरदर्शी बना दिया है, लेकिन आप इसे जैसे चाहें वै
D'acc
Roger. Il 
Wally, ich habe dich da dr
روجر. وتص
Джим, если тебе не нужен компьютер, позвони, пожалуйста, нажми клавишу ENTER, и мы сами позаботимся о переклю
Роджер. PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50, минус 00021, 182 287 000, плюс 56919. прерывание, менее 10 минут, 105 12 30.00. прерывание, более 10 минут, 103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00. Нет плюс 12: 102 44 27.00. плюс 01223, минус все шарики, плюс 01889 01520 плюс 00110 02250, время горения 046 000 190, плюс 01187, плюс все шарики, плюс 01911. СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 1
Say again, please, Aq
ये र
Ok, 
Okay, Jack hat sich einfach wieder beruhigt. Nachdem er die 250-V-Sicherungen für BAT A und BAT B eingeschaltet hatte, las er an den BAT-Sammelschienen Spannungen von 32,3 V an A und 37,0 V an B ab. Anschließend schaltete er die 275-V-Sicherun
Looking at the world of sports, let's see here. While you were busy the other day, Joe Namath and football Commissioner Pete Rozelle made the announcement that "Broadway Joe" had agreed to sell his interest in the Bachelors III restaurant and report to the New York Jets. Joe arrived at the Jets' training camp today and had his first workout. Several other Jet players who had held out along with Joe also reported. And Davy Hill, from Jackson, Michigan, won his third major golf in as many starts in the past week. He won the Philadelphia Classic. Hill has won four tournaments so far this year and is the leading money winner this year with a cool $129.000. And in baseball, the west division of the National League remains a tight race. LA and San Francisco are one game behind league leading Atlanta. The Astros have a record of 48 wins and 48 losses, and are now in fifth place, seven games out. A twin bill between the Astros and Cincinnati la
켄, 크리스마스 이브 당직은 어떻게 섰어?
Okay. It's a half a degree, and so we can be two Sun diameters off and still 
30英尺，向下2.5英寸。模糊的
نع
로저. 약 2초 정
罗杰。入口停机坪：区域为太平洋中部，滚轴坐标 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267，纬度加 1332, 减 16917, 064, 36194, 649，航程 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 00 28，最大升力 154, 084, 22400, 18000，D0 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02，六分仪星 45 
わかりました。2ページ目に進んでください。手順5と6を以下の変更で完了してください。「POWER/TEMP MONITOR」、「AC BUS」、「
Batteries principales – nous les avons test
Bene. Vi darò un breve riassunto dei sistemi. Fondamentalmente, tutti i sistemi sono a posto. Per quanto riguarda la vostra traiettoria di ritorno, possiamo ancora raggiungere la linea del Pacifico centrale aspettando fino al tredicesimo. Dopo 138 secondi di accensione, siete sulla via del ritorno. Le co
روجر. إيجل في وضع الصوت. كيف 
指揮パイロット、カナリー CAP C
That's right. I - I haven't entered - I gave the - I gave it back to the computer for a second. I put the mode switch from MANUAL back to while I fooled with the, and the computer drove the star off out of sight. So the delay here has been in going back to MANUAL and finding the star again, which I've finally done. And - Just a second here, I'll g
वे आपको हेलीकॉप्टर से समोआ ले जाएंगे। आप समोआ में एक रात बिताएंगे, फिर 141 नंबर की बस पकड़ेंगे और कुछ ही देर में एलिंगटन पहुंच जाएंग
Hai ricevuto questi dat
Мы считаем, что это сработает, потому что это сработало на «Аполлоне-10». Бл
Also, Bill, in der Checkliste seh
フレンドシップ・セブン、フレンドシップ・セブン、こ
コロンビア、ヒ
D'accord. Cette manœuvre va vous amener très près des limites de balayage de votre antenne à gain élevé. Pendant la manœuvre, vérifiez vos voyants. Si le voyant de limite de balayage s'allume, vous disposez encore de 15 degrés de marge. Attention: si vous perdez le signal, vous devrez revenir en arrière, le réacquérir et recommencer la manœuvre, car vous serez très proche de la limite de capacité de votre
컴퓨터 전원이 켜져 있고 고장 표시등이 켜지지 않은 상태입니다. 현재 컴
Va 
Okay. I have a time for you, where you will be nearest to the boost
Хорошо, Джек. Понял. Ты хочешь, чтобы мы направили ось X - плюс ось X на юг, используя включенный источник 
Да, я доволен последними обновлениями, которые мы получили, в том смысле, что они изменили наш вектор состоян
Jim, regarding your number 2 battery, we think that it's probably a sensor failure, a temperature sensor failure that's caused this alarm, rather than an actual overtemp of the battery; the reason b
알겠습니다. 중간 항로 수정과 관련해서, 수정은 약 25피트/초 정도의 속도로 진행될 예정입니다. 시간 지연의 이
Un viaggio molto
मैं उसस
いいえ、TLIプラス90とTLIプラス4時間です。そしてT
わかりました。UP TELEMETRY COMMAND を OFF に読み戻します。VHF AM B は中央、S-BAND SQUELCH は OFF、FUEL CELL REACS VALVES は NORMAL、TAPE RECORDER FORWARD は中央、TAPE M
알겠습니다. 8, /: 45701, -040, +157, +33195, -01267, +04716 179 008 001, NA, +00187 33552 311 33355 42 09090 252, Dzuba 아래 060, 왼쪽 4.2, +0773, -16500 12982 36256; 시리우스, 리겔, 1.29 155 010, 4사분면, 15초, 지평선
今
खैर, हम इस पर थोड़ा और काम कर रहे हैं। मुझे यकीन नहीं है कि समस्या पूरी तरह से खत्म हो गई है। ऐसा लगता है कि हमारी समस्या यह है कि हमारे लाइट मीटर द्वारा मापी गई प्रकाश की तीव्रता पृथ्वी की तुलना म
Schöne Wolkenformati
Roger. Compris. Apollo 8
إيجل، كولومبيا. انتهيت من تجهيز طائرتي P22. سأواصل هذه المناورة للوص
罗杰。请问一下，对于这么小的燃烧来说，近地点读数会是这么大的负值吗？我们现在的读数是-031
그건 참 적절하고 합리적인 설명이네요. 제 생각에는 터널 안에 앉아서 모든 창문
ああ、これは綿摘みだ、そう思っていたんだ
Wir haben Ihren Verbrennungsbeginn 
O
네. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 14번 별은 짐
الأمور تسير على ما ير
Ok, quello che ho qui fuori, Jack, è il LEVVA, che è già stato mostrato in precedenza. È un copricapo da indossare in superficie, e io... sto portando qui quello di Jim per mostrarvi un paio di MOD. Un problema precedente era che il cast dei personaggi in superficie non era ben distinto. Quindi, non solo la tuta di Jim ha delle strisce rosse, ma come potete vedere anche il suo LEVVA ha una... una striscia rossa. E ora potete vedere anche un altro MOD qui, Jack, che non avevo mai visto prima. Credo che il 12
Okay, zurück zu Seite 18. Wir machen wie bisher weiter bei 30 Sekunden, 10 Sekunden, 7 Sekunden, minus 5 Sekunden. Bei „Zündung“, keine Zündung und wir fügen hie
はい
好的。中期修正第7次，/: 31600，不适用，不适用，减去00014，加上五个
टीआईजी प्रक्रिया शुरू होने में 20 मिनट बचे हैं। ओह,
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 관측 없이 방송하고 있습니다. 해가 잠망경 뒤편으로 떠오르고 있습니다. 잠망경으로 보니 지평선에 가까워지면서 선명한 붉은색으로 빛나고 있었습니다. 그리고 제가 창밖을 다시 올려다보니, 캡슐 주변으로 수천 개의 작고 빛나는 입자들이 소용돌이치며 시속 3~5마일 정도의 속도로 제게서 멀어져 가고 있었습니다. 지금 밝은 햇빛 아래로 나오니 그 입자들은 사라진 것 같습니다. 해가 막 떠오르던 순간이었죠. 지금은 해가 지평선 위로 20도 정도 떠올랐는데도 
これは、トンネルを抜けて叫ぶこととして知られる新し
When you move into, we recommend that you use the CMC-computed angles for your AUTO maneuver and see how that works out. If it doesn't bring you up with the M-line parallel to the horizon to the substellar point, we will see if we can get you some ground-computed angles. I 
D'accord. Eh bien, avec cette approche, on cherche à brûler un peu vers le haut et un peu vers la gauche, mais nous essayons d'êt
わかり
नहीं, असल में हो ये रहा है कि हम कभी-कभी खिड़की के काफी करीब आ जाते हैं, और मुझे लगता है कि इसी वजह से ऑटोमैटिक लाइट कंट्रोल
オーケー。クリスマス前夜、宇宙のはるか遠くで、アポロ8号の乗組員たちは月面レースに勝利したばかりだった。ヘッドセットはコンソールに丁寧に掛けられ、クリス・クラフトがもうすぐそこにいるだろうと期待していた。フランク・ボーマンはベッドに心地よく潜り込み、宇宙船の夢が頭の中で踊っていた。ジム・ラヴェルはソファに、アンダースはベイにいてコンピューターのディスプレイに頭を悩ませていた。そ
حسنًا، ذلك الحبل - شكل المركبة الفضائية - أبقاني هنا طوال الوقت. كنت أخرج إلى هنا، ثم تعيدني ديناميكيات الحبل إلى هنا. وبعد ذل
休斯顿。阿波罗11号，甚高频A单工频道收到您的呼叫。您怎么
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। वीएचएफ ए सिम्प्लेक्स पर आपकी आवाज सुन
好的。我们首先要做的事情之一是给电池充电，这样我们才能获得足够的电力来完成这项工作，我们已经制定了相应的程序。关于再入大气层，我们计划在进入大气层界面前5小时进行最后一次中段飞行（如果需要的话）。然后，我们希望在进入大气层界面前大约4个半小时抛弃服务舱，并利用接下来的3到3个半小时进行拍照、启动指令舱的制导与导航系统、整理舱内物品以及其他一些零碎的工作。我们会保留指令舱直到进入大气层界面前1小时，然后再将其抛弃。这些程序将于明天早上在作战管理系统（CMS）和着陆管理系统（LMS）中集成运行，希望当天晚些时候，我们能再次与任务控制中心进行同步运行。其中一个
휴스턴, 컬럼비아. 내 수치는 4.9이고, X에서는 
Okay, Fred. Ich verstehe Sie jetzt gut. Okay. Wir bereiten gerade ein Verfahren für Sie vor: Wir führen in etwa 74 Stunden, also in etwas über 3 Stunden, einen Sonnencheck durch. Das ist eine zweite Sperre. Wir stellen Ihnen in Kürze ein detailliertes Verfahren zur Verfügung, das eine Radar-Neuzuordnung für das Rendezvous beinhaltet, um die Sperre zu umgehen, und ein Manöver zur Ausrichtung. Wir gehen davon aus, dass Ihre Plattform für den Brennvorgang ohne weitere Maßnahmen geeignet ist, wenn die Abweichung innerhalb von 1 Grad liegt. Sollte die Abweichung außerhalb dieses Bereichs liegen, erarbeiten wir ein Verfahren zur Ausrichtung der Plattform auf Erde und Sonne. Wir werden Ihnen dieses später vorstellen. Okay. Angenommen, der Sonnencheck ist erfolgreich, geben wir Ihnen einen Stern für einen Vertrauenscheck auf der Rückseite, wenn Sie sich in der Dunkelheit befinden. Wir werden Ihnen vor dem Mondflug ein aktualisiertes Brennpunktprofil zuweisen. Wir werden Sie danach erneut überprüfen und das P
수량 읽
Und Mrs. Robert Goddard sagte heute, ihr Mann wäre überglücklich gewesen. „Er hätte nicht gejubelt oder so. Er hätte einfach nur gestrahlt.“ Sie fügte hinzu: „Das war sein Traum, eine Rakete zum Mond zu schicken.“ Menschen auf der ganzen Welt hatten viele Gründe, sich über die Apollo-11-Mission zu freuen. Die italienische 
Sotto, cancella "Co
काफी ह
يبدو أن الأمطار تهطل بغزارة في واشنطن حيث كان من المقرر إقامة مباراة كل النجوم الليلة. بدأوا الم
ह्यूस्टन कैप 
... 
好的。如果你想知道的话，我这里有个消息要告诉你。PAO刚刚给了
你好，Sigma Seven，这里是Cal Cap Com，
Roger, hai capito 65° con la temperatura del carbu
Allez-y, Houston. Ap
Okay. Fred, for your information, your CO2 reading onboard is a little higher than what we're reading here on the 
了解です。計器の表示は22%です。ヨーとロールの制御ができず、ヨー
ह्यूस्टन, ईगल। हम कैमरा चेकआउट के साथ आगे बढ़ेंगे। मैं अभी भी लो टैप्स पर ह
Я думаю, что два угла соприкоснулись, поскольку при развертывании они не выдвинулись одновременно. Развернулось оно немного неровно, и, конечно, местность, на которой оно находилось, была немного — не совсем ровной, как мне бы хотелось. И я думаю, что два угла соприкоснулись примерно на 1 дюйм — нет, на три четверти или полдюйма в глубину; и, возможно, вдоль нижней част
알겠습니다, 잭. 감
새로운 정보가 있다면 그렇게 하겠습니다. 그렇지 않으면 기존 수치를 
我们现在是否认真考虑过安全抛弃所需的关键要素？没有——我认为我们没有时间去
好的。我数到了1、2、3
ロジャー。フレッドの
작업복 온도 측정이 가능
Tranquility. Roger. We copy. Stand by 1. And, break, break, Columbia. We're having
로저. 연료 압력이 167, 보조 압력이 163으로 표시되고
Roger. Tous les systèmes sont opérationnels et prêts pour un contrôle UHF nu
रॉजर, एड। हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपनी सामान्य उड़ान योजना पर वापस लौटें। इसका आधार यह है कि हमें लगता है कि आपके पास 205 फीट/सेकंड का ΔV शेष है और 63 चक्करों के बाद भी आप 81, 125.7 कक्षा में बने रहेंगे। इससे हमें OAMS
Go ahead, Housto
그들이 당신의 근일점을 추정하고 있다는 것을 이해합니다. 현재 달의 근일점은 62
好的。我们已经接通电源，看起来一切正常。我正盯着“注意”和“警告”电源指示灯，以及所有红色警示灯；我们已经接通了两个 X 型月球总线联络断路器。公用照明断路器也已接通；然后是交流母线 B 氦气 PQS 显示屏；交
أوه، 
روجر. عرضي التقدي
Navire de l'océan Indien, ici le Sigma Seven. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Comment ça, mo
鹰，这里是休斯顿。我们和哥伦比亚的通话和数据都中断了。请问他是不是在摆出
加油
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, Houston. Der Statusvektor wurde geladen; der Computer gehö
كان هذا إعادة ضبط ناقل التيار المتردد 2
ठीक है। प्लस 90: /G&N, 63825, माइनस 1.54, प्लस 1.32, माइनस 0491.7, प्लस 0000.1, प्लस 6634.0, 180, 228, 001; N/A; प्लस 0017.9, 6652.2, 7:37, 6626.5, 26, 155.4, 15.7; ज़ेटा सैजिटेरियस; ऊपर, 08.0; दाएँ 2.1; माइनस 22.81, माइनस 025.00, 1140.7, 34087, 32:14. सेट शुरू होता है: आर्कटुरस,
罗
ولا تزال قضية استئجار الملعب المغطى قائمة. ثمّة أيضاً قصة لطيفة عن كريس ومركز التحكم وفريق الطي
Роджер. Хотел бы еще раз просмотреть этот 30-минутный
샤프트와 트러니언 번호
スーツの吸気温度は72～72度（華氏）です。キャビンの温度は98～98度（華氏）です。
Non grandi. Ci sono un paio di perturbazioni p
Я вас прекрасно пони
О
I seem able to put it at zero rates. All right, I will do tha
您觉得240控制器是否正常控制乙二醇蒸发器出口温度？它在
نعم يا جيم. بمعنى آخر، سنترك لك مهمة تبد
잭, 특히 저 같은 초보자에게는 이곳의 좋은 점 중 하나는 움직이기가 매우 편하다는 것입니다. 물론, 사령선 시뮬레이터에서 일해 보셨겠지만, 무중력 환경은 정말 큰 도움이 됩니다. 1g에서는 움직이기가 상당히 제한적인데, 이곳에서는 훨씬 수월합니다. 보시다시피, 내부가 상당히 깨끗해 보입니다. 헐거워진 와셔 몇 개와 시퀀스 카메라의 작은 플라스틱 덮개가 떨어져서 ED 패널 근처에 끼어 있는 것을 발견했습니다. 자, 짐 바로 아래에 있는, 캔처럼 보이는 물체 위에 서 계신 분이 있습니다. 뒤쪽에 계신 분들을 위해 설명드리자면, 이 캔 안에는 상승 엔진이 들어 있습니다. 지금 제 손이 올려져 있는 것이 바로 달에서 이륙할 때 사용하는 엔진입니다. 엔진 덮개 바로 옆에 제가 지금 손을 얹고 있는 하얀 상자가 있는데, 이전에 보여드린 적이 있습니다. 이것은 짐의 배낭으로, 달 표면에서 산소와 냉각수를 공급하는 역할을 합니다. 이 장치는 계획된 4시간
ठीक है। एक बात, जो; मैं एक बार फिर से पुष्टि करना चाहता हूँ। जो चीज़ें सामान्यतः 57 घंटे से शुरू होती थीं, जिनमें से पहली चीज़ थी 5.7 पीसिया पर दबाव डालना, अब हम उसे बढ़ाकर 64 घंटे कर रहे हैं, यानी हमारी प्रविष्टि जो सामान्यतः 58 घ
Gemini 4, ici Houston. Nous vous transm
Erinnerst du dich? Um wie viel Uhr haben wir 
えっと、70度を指しています。どうやって下げればいいのか、本当に困っています。スーツの水バルブが基準値を超えて設定されて
你们在休
Friendship Seven, Bermuda Cap Com. Siete ancora in conta
乔，我们最后
Roger. A
11, Houston. We have a good view out of the rendezvous - correction, the overhead window of the. We don't see anybody staring back at us, thou
Oui. C'est un très 
Мы совершили подобный вход в атмосферу на «Аполлоне-8»… с Хьюстоном, старина Базз включил обогреватели командного модуля и оставил их включенными. Активаторы закричали: «Ура!» — оба бака; у нас закончилось топливо. Скорость входа была о
Ok. La pressione dell'elio è circa 37, la pressione del collettore è 182 e la quantità è 80. B ha una temperatura di circa 112, la pressione dell'elio di circa 36,5, la pressione del carburante di 180 e la quantità è circa 77. C ha una temperatura di 140 - tra l'altro, quelle altre temperature avrebbero
Voyons voir. À Springfield, dans le Missouri, Mickey Owen, l'ancien receveur des Dodgers de Brooklyn, entré dans l'histoire en laissant échapper une troisième prise qui a permis aux Yankees de New York de remporter la victoire contre les Dodgers lors des Séries mondiales de 1941, a décidé de laisser une trace indélébile dans les mémoires, au-delà de ses exploits sportifs. Quarante-cinq garçons et filles ont reçu un poney grâce à son geste généreux. Ces jeunes étaient invités à lui écrire pour lui expliquer comment ils prendraient soin d'un poney. Face à l'afflux de lettres, il a ajouté cinq poneys aux vingt qu'il avait déjà offerts; d'autres donateurs ont également contribué à en offrir vingt autres. « Je pensais recevoir une quarantaine de lettres, mais j'en ai finalement reçu près de 900 », a déclaré Mickey Owen. Passons maintenant à la une: à Wellington, en Nouvelle-Zélande, une cinquantaine d'hommes ont dégusté aujourd'hui la traditionnelle dinde et sa sauce aux canneberges au pôle Sud, mais les festivités de Noël avaient aussi une saveur orientale. Au m
是的，弗
Nous avons une seule question: la soupape de 
물병자
Bene. I successivi uno, due, tre, quatt
再说一遍
ठीक है। एक SEP पैड से 1 घंटा पहले, निम्नलिखित स्थितियों में पैंत
わかった。パイロットの血圧を測り始めて、体温計は口
حسنًا. صحيح. هذا جيم لوفيل. ما فكرنا في فعله اليوم هو أن نُطلعكم على لمحة بسيطة عن الحياة داخل أبولو 8. لقد عرضنا لكم مشاهد القمر، ومشاهد الأرض، وفكرنا في دعوتكم إلى منزلنا. لقد كان منزلنا لمدة أربعة أيام على الأقل كما ترون على لوحة العدادات. نُعلّم كل يوم على لوحة العدادات. لقد مرّت أربعة أيام، ونعمل على اليوم الخامس. بالطبع، نتطلع جميعًا إلى الهبوط يوم الجمعة. هنا في الجزء السفلي من المركبة الفضائية الذي نسميه حجرة المعدات السفلية، لدينا مستشار الرئيس لشؤون اللياقة البدنية، الكابتن جيم لوفيل، على وشك الخضوع لبرنامج تمارين نقوم به كل يوم. تلاحظون أنه يتحرك بحرية تامة. لقد اصطدم رأسه للتو بالبصريات، المستخدمة في ملاحتنا. إنه يستخ
收到。状态报告。我已发
Ok
روجر. بخصوص صمام الضغط الخلفي، نود معرفة المدة التي انقضت بعد إغلاقه للمرة الأولى
रॉजर।
ठीक है। रेडियल बर्न की आवश्यकता इसलिए है ताकि हम आपके मिडकोर्स करेक्शन को बढ़ा सकें और इसका उपयोग कर सकें। कृपया प्रतीक
Вы действительно види
Nun, das könntest du dir für Aufnahmen von der
Ecco un piccolo articolo interessante che fa piacere sentire. Sembra che ad Ann Arbor, nel Michigan, abbiano una nuova gang giovanile. Si chiama Gilnet Gang. Si aggira per le strade di Ann Arbor, agendo in segreto e a volte aggirando la legge. Si fanno chiamare Guerillas for Good. Tra le cose che hanno fatto c'è stata quella di dipingere un ponte coperto di oscenità. L'hanno dipinto una notte. Una casa inagibile – popolare tra i bambini del quartiere, ma pericolosa – è stata sbarrata con assi di legno. Le fioriere del centro, rimaste vuote a causa di un dibattito su quale gruppo fosse responsabile, tra aziende o governo, sono state riempite di fiori. Una siepe, ritenuta ostruire la visuale, a un incrocio trafficato, è stata potata e il proprietario si è infuriato. I rifiuti lungo un tratto del fiume Huron sono stati raccolti. I membri della gang sono adolescenti anonimi che non chiedono alcun riconoscimento individuale. Il loro scopo è quello di eliminare la burocrazia, di ottenere risultati – buoni risultati, a loro avviso. L'organizzazione ha una vaga connotazione religiosa. È una sorta di gruppo ecumenico, ha detto un professore associato dell'Università del Michigan che funge da cassa di risonanza informale per le idee della gang. Il nome deriva da San Pietro, la Rete del Pescatore. Ed è abbastanza remoto da non essere identificato con nessuna chiesa in particolare. C'è un filo conduttore alla Robin Hood in tutto questo, ha detto il loro insegnante, che preferisce anche lui rimanere anon
Qui
Das ist Friendship Seven, die Gierbewegung wird
ठीक है
Au bout de 2 minutes, commencez le compte à rebours à partir de 30 lorsqu'il me reste 30 secondes. Dites-moi: 30 secondes, 20 secondes, 10 se
अपोलो 11, 
रॉजर। मैंने अ
アポロ
11번, 휴스턴. 드로
और, आपको s के लिए जग
Хорошо. Время — событие состоится; и нам нужно занять следующее положение: крен 101,0, тангаж 090,0, рыскание — все углы. Углы усиления будут: тангаж -23, рыскание 93. И мы должны использовать стандартные процедуры для демпфирования скоростей. После демпфирования скоростей и перед запуском мы должны установить на секстант с магазином G, используя сверхскоростную черно-белую пленку. Затем мы должны сделать три фотографии, по одной с выдержкой 5, 20 и 60 секунд, используя аудио-автоматическую оптику. Наши значения: R1 + 34717, R2 - 08028, R3 + 35075. Затем еще три фотографии, по одной с выдержкой 5, 20 и 60 секунд, использу
わか
سفينة المحيط الهندي، سفينة ا
روجر. عندما وضعته في الجهاز، كانت القراءة صفرًا؛ ثم قمت بتغييره إلى الوضع التل
ठीक है, आपने लाइटों के बारे में क्य
Al momento, il mio livello di carburante è al 75-100%. La fine
你
Roger, Mike. Könntet ihr bitte jetzt eure Winkel notieren, dann die Eingabeaufforderung ausführen u
A quanto pare, Vance, l'interruttore del circuito di carica della 
Une surfac
أرى الآن كوكبة الجبار في
روجر، هل بدأت ع
Во-вторых, мы вернемся к стандартному расписанию с запланированным временем пробуждения 121 час
अच्छा - ठीक है - तो चलिए आज सुबह देखते हैं कि यह एम-लाइन के समानांतर होने के कितना करीब आता है। पहली बार मार्किंग शुरू करने से पहले, ऐसा लग रहा था कि उन तीन कोणों की गणना में कुछ गड़बड़ है, और उन तीन कोणों तक जाने और फिर एम-लाइन को समानांतर करने के लिए बड़े एटीट्यूड परिवर्तन करने में मेरा बहुत सारा ईंधन बर्बाद हो रहा था। कुछ मामलों में ऐसा लग रहा था कि यह एक स्वीकृत एटीट्यूड की आवश्यकता है, और आप स
Roger, 70. Mi sento benissimo, continu
Это должно быть примерно р
ضغط
Ok. Ho un paio di cose che ci servono da te. Vorrei misurare la tensione C della
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Le rapport de trente minutes se poursuit. La pression cabine est de 5,6 et se maintient. La température cabine est de 95 degrés et diminue lentement. L'humidité relative est de 20 %, la quantité de réfrigérant est de 67 %, et la température ambiante de la combinaison est de 68 degrés. La pression est de 5,8. La température de 
Les MSC-2 et -3 ont été mis hors tens
لدينا تحديث لخطة الرحلة عندما تكون مستعدًا للنسخ، 
Mike, peux-tu simplement nous dire dans quelle direction les pales s'inclinent et de combien de temps elles s'inclineront pour att
ठीक है। जाँच लें कि दबाव 45 से 46 के बीच ह
Sì. Le batterie 
Charlie, hai detto che avevi delle novità per me dal libro sulla sup
Roger. We thought you'd 
Penso che due angoli si siano toccati, dato che quando è stato dispiegato, non sono usciti entrambi contemporaneamente. Si è aperto in modo un po' irregolare e, naturalmente, il terreno su cui si trovava era un po' - non proprio livellato - come avrei voluto. E credo che due angoli si siano toccati per circa 2,5 cm - no, da tre quarti a mezzo pollice di pro
هيوستن، كولومبيا. أيضاً، جهاز تحديد المدى VHF الخاص بي لا يعمل الآن، وأود أن أعرف ما إذا كنتم تفضلون أن أستمر في وضع علامات السدس أم لا أفعل شيئاً. من المفترض أن أضع علامات VHF فقط، وذلك خلال الدقا
Apollo 8, we would like to dump your tape again, if you are not using it. And the reason we want to do this is we have some - we didn't completely get dumped before the burn. We would like to get that and get the rest of the
Wir können die Sonde jetzt sehen. Korrektur, d
يمكننا تجربة ذلك يا جاك، مع أنني لا أعرف مدى نجاحه. لقد حاولنا بالفعل - الضوء 
Хорошо. Джек сообщает сверху, что видит звезды и созвездия в оптике, но угол наклона Солнца таков, что оно отражается от отриц
ठीक है। सीबी को कॉन्फ़िगर करें। बस हो गय
嗯，让我
روجر. في أخبار أخرى من العالم، هبط طاقم طائرة بويبلو في قاعدة ميرامار الجوية أمس بعد الظهر، وسيقضون بضعة أيام هناك في مستشفى بالبوا مع عائلاتهم للاح
Gemini 4, Gemini 4,
우리가 다시 목소리
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴
1時15分くらいからずっと続
알았
Hier spr
关闭 2、3、
Родже
كولومبيا، كولومبيا، هذه هيوس
روجر. قرأتُ لك نفس الشيء. هل يمكنك إخبارنا بحالتك من فضلك؟ 
Genau... da
여기 조명
وسنواصل مراقبة درجات الحرارة، وإذا احتجنا لذلك، فسنبد
Go on test 3: far side lower light on 10 seconds; going to 
そうです、ダラスでは泣いているんです。バスケットボールのスコア：ヒューストンは今
Фактически, это происходило вне космичес
フィードするか、切断するか、それともどう
Ed Eag
Et nous allons surveiller la température de vos quadruples pour vous, et lorsque nous aurons besoin de les réchauffer un peu, nous vous dirons d'actionner ces quatre interrupteurs - sur le pannea
روجر. ابدأ رحلة
Roger. Avant que Jim ne fasse sa prochaine marque, pourrait-il appeler? On a raté le dernier
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven. Cape Com Tech, diffusion de Cape Com
네, 기본적으로는 맞습니다. 제가 간단히 설명드린 후 단계별로 안내해 드리겠습니다. 그러면 더 이해하기 쉬울 겁니다. 이 방법은 망원경으로 달을 관측할 수 있도록 특정 각도로 이동하는 것입니다. 어떤 자세에서든 망원경으로 별의 무늬를 충분히 식별하여 스스로 정렬할 수 있다고 판단되면, 그 시점에서 이 절차를 중단하고 직접 정렬을 진행하도록 하시면 됩니다. 하지만 저희는 반사나 기타 요인에 대한 걱정 없이 망원경으로 관측할 수 있는 조건을 충족하는 방법을 알려드리는 것이며, 별의 무늬가 충분히 선명하게 보인다면 그 이후에는 이 절차를 굳이 따라야 할 필요는 없습니다. 계속 진행해야 한다면, 기동을 하면서 달을 살펴보고 거기에 표시를 하겠습니다. 그런 다음 다시 각도를 조정하여 태양을 살펴보고 태양에 또 다른 표시를 하면 정렬이 완료됩니다. 정렬 방식은 다음과 같습니다. 저희가 달을 가리키는 동안 구체를 대략적으로 정렬할 수 있는 각도 세트를 제공해 드릴 것입니다. 이 각도 세트는 여러분이 공칭값으
А не могли бы вы уточнить в ФАО, где находится этот лист с исп
この時点で、確かに約 5 度の右ロールが見られます。また、潜望鏡が暗いことに気付きました。これは、ダークサイドに近づいていることを意味します。潜望鏡を通して変化が
알았어. 지금 우리 태도대로라면 짐은 곤경에 처할 거야. 태양이 저기 있잖아
Okay. Another thing is to remember when we begin blackout, which is around 05g, and you can write this in your checklist wherever
好的，拍些照
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रें
13, ह्यूस्टन का सुझाव है कि यदि आप पीक समय में हैं तो औसत का उपयोग करके देखें कि
ऐसा लगता है कि इसमें कई परतें हैं। ए
ठीक है। हमने इस बारे में बात कर ली है, और 12 घंटे पहले, सभी को लगता है कि हमें इसे अभी करने की ज़रूरत नहीं है। लेकिन नज़दीक से देखने पर, इससे प्रक्षेप पथ पर कोई असर नहीं पड़ता। और जैसा सुझाव दिया गया है, अगर आप चाहें तो हम प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट पर एक नज़र डाल सकते हैं और कंसोल पर मौजूद सभी लोगों के साथ लाइव प्रसारण के दौरान इस पर चर्चा कर सकते हैं। अभी, आपके साथ वह टीम है जो प्रव
That's correct. Okay, now. Circuit breaker TRANSDUCER, TEMP
Okay, wir bewerten nun die Stabilität der Kap
Roger. At 123 plus 00, total minus 7 percent, Alfa minus 12 percent, Bravo plus 4.5, Charlie minus 7, Delta
BATT Charlie 370，PYRO BAT
और पृष्ठ के उस आधे भाग में सबसे नीचे वाले ब्लॉक को काट दें जिसमें "पत्रिका प्रतिशत आवश्यक 12 पत्रिकाएँ, जी," इत्यादि लिखा 
حسنًا، أثناء قراءتي للعدادات، درجة حرارة المحرك 250 هي 145 درجة. هذا هو محول الطاقة 250. درجة حرارة محول الطاقة 150 هي 105 درجات، ودرجة حرارة محول الطاقة الاحتياطي هي 119 درجة، ودرجة الحرارة العكسية هي 75 درجة. الانحراف يمينًا 100 درجة، الانحر
Sì, sai che è stato un trucco intelligente 
لا، الأمر ليس سيئاً لل
제미니 4호, 휴스턴 CAP COM. 이 글을
روجر. قادم إليك. 30، SPS/G&N: 36691؛ ناقص 061، زائد 067 135 23 4149؛، زائد 32020، زائد 06713، ناقص 02773 181 054 013؛، HA غير متوفر، زائد 00230 32833 228، دلتا VC 32625 24 1510 355. الخطوط الثلاثة التالية غير متوفرة. زائد 1103، ناقص - ناقص 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. نجومك هي ذنب الدجاجة والنسر الواقع، 242 172 012. نفضل وجود نفاثتين بفجوة 16 ثانية. سيكون الأفق عند علامة 11 درجة عند TIG ناقص دقيقتين. وتعليقات أخرى: نجم 
不，不。这里是个幸福的家。有人作伴当然更好。事实上，要是能有
रॉजर। हालांकि, 
माइक, क्या ऐसा 
燃烧室压力一直稳定在 100 左右。燃烧的后半段，压力开始略有
मिथुन 4, मुझे आपका पिछला संदेश नहीं मिला। मैं फिर से कहता हूँ, अवसरों का लाभ उठाएँ
Eh b
यह दोस्ती का सातवां एपिसोड है। नकारात्मक। पूरी उड़ान के दौरान मुझे बिल्कुल सामान्य महसूस हुआ। मैं ठीक हूँ। सम
Роджер. Начнём с мировых новостей. Всеобщие поздравления американским астронавтам «Аполлона-8» и надежды на международное сотрудничество в освоении космоса сопровождались рождественскими посланиями, разосланными по всему миру, пока крошечный космический корабль вращался вокруг Луны. Даже в коммунистическом мире царил энтузиазм по поводу первого полёта человека на Луну. В Москве советский учёный Анатолий Бесаранов вспомнил, что его страна и Соединённые Штаты уже обменивались знаниями о космосе, и предсказал, что полёт «Аполлона-8» приведёт к дальнейшему сотрудничеству. На Кубе радио Гаваны ретранслировало программу «Голоса Америки», чтобы рассказать слушателям о речи «Аполлона-8». Представители «Голоса» заявили, что это был первый случай, когда программы американских агентств транслировались по радио Гаваны. Чехословакия наблюдала за полётом на Луну благодаря обширному телевизионному освещению; а в Будапеште, Венгрия, в поездах и автобусах почти ни о чём другом не говорили. В некоммунистическом мире офисные работники и покупатели рождественских подарков затаили дыхание, наблюдая за подготовкой космического корабля к старту. Французы на улицах восхваляли американские технологии и космический подвиг, а некоторые зрители, смотрящие по телевизору лунные фотографии, скандировали «Великолепно!». В Лондоне толпы покупателей, покупающих рождественские подарки, заполнили магазины и пабы, чтобы посмотреть телевизионные фотографии лунных кратеров. Ведущий британский астроном-космонавт Бернард Ловелл, который еще несколько недель назад критиковал проект «Аполлон-8» на том основании, что приборы могли бы выполнить эту работу, не подвергая опасности ж
좋습니다. 전력이 여전히 충분해 보이네요. 물 위에서 30암페어 이상을 유지하는 걸 보여드리겠습니다. 만약 문제가 생겨서 수면으로 올라오지 못하더
好的，没错。然后回到275号面板，断开主断路器B电池母线B。嘿，杰克，恐怕我漏
Okay.
Ein paar Dinge, Jim. Erstens: Die Zeit zum Schließen der Abwassertankentlüftung ist [Zeitangabe fehlt]. Wenn du vorher schlafen gehst, ist das für uns hier unten in Ordnung, wenn du sie kurz vor dem Zubettgehen schließt. Zweitens: Wir haben einige Ergebnisse zu [Daten fehlt], und falls Jack Interesse hat, könnten wir ihm die kor
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Ваш ускоритель сконфигурир
Je me demande si l'un de nos jets d'eau... fonctionne. Bon, vérif
Apollo 8, Houston. Du sie
好的，Vance……，加上 0833.
मैं ज़रूर करूँगा। और चलिए देखते हैं, हम आपको बताना चाहते थे कि इस 
わかりました。ニール、はし
I'm asking the com
是不
Jim, abbiamo ricevuto un paio di notizie. Il Presidente Nixon ha scelto un giudice del Minnesota per la carica di Giudice Associato alla Corte Suprema. Un disegno di legge che prevedeva un aumento del 
Stan
如果遇到类似的问题，不妨试试在阳光照射的背面转动辅助线圈，直到问题解决。你觉得这个方法怎么
Maintenant, il me faut un VERBE 76. Je sui
Okay, Vance. Essentially, what you wanted to use as far as the movie camera i
휴스턴, 
حسنًا. بعد إيقاف التشغيل، نتوقع أن تستهلك من الماء ما بين 2.7 و3.2 رطل - أي بمعدل استهلاك كهربائي 14 أمبير في الساعة. ملاحظة: هذا لا يشمل الماء المتوفر، لذا يُضاف الماء المقطر. الآن، ننتقل إلى هيدروكسيد الليثيوم (LiOH). باستخدام العبوات، سيكون لديك 16 عبوة، كل عبوة تكفي لمدة 12 ساعة، أي ما مجموعه 192 ساعة من هيدروكسيد الليثيوم.
那
C
Роджер. Он оче
Okay. First, turn to page 12. On the right-hand side of the page, starting from the middle of the page down, everything under "Cycle 5 frames, Replace dark side or dark slide" should be deleted until you get to the very bottom of the page where you have "Acquisition OMNI D" and that should remain in. Also, leave in "Remove window shade
D'accord, Jack. On a essayé la méthode et, grâce à cette pression, on a réussi
Джим, мы рекомендуем вам
Подтверждаю,
Abbiamo un sacco
Roger. Non
Oh, sarebbe bello. Però ho mandato Lovel
بصوت غودارد، يقرأ لكم بصوت عالٍ وواضح
Роджер. Кажется, всё
Ah, da ist es ja. Ich hatte den Horizont aus den Augen verloren. Sag bloß nicht, unsere Sekundärscanner sind jetzt ausgefallen. Das k
11, Houston. 
Подождите 2 минуты; затем мы вкл
È molto impegnato in rollio, ma si mantiene nella sua zona morta. Sembra che si mantenga invece di più o meno 5, più simile a più o meno 8. È possibile che abb
ええと、もし全部終わらせたら、頑張るつもりですが、正直言って
حسنًا. ها نحن ذا، وسنبدأ بالت
Alpha/Pc a Pc;
Роджер. Мы видим центр Земли, как он виден с космического аппарата в восточной части Тихого океана. Нам не удалось визуально различить Гавайские острова, но мы отчетливо видим западное побережье Северной Америки. Соединенные Штаты, долина Сан-Хоакин, Высокие Сьерры, Нижняя Калифорния и Мексика вплоть до Акапулько и полуострова Юкатан; и вы можете видеть дальше ч
Well, we are all in very good shape. Jim is busy working preparing lu
Там в
أين أنت الآن؟ هل أنا جاه
Ce qui pourrait intéresser le monde entier, c'est de savoir ce que vous faites après la manœuvre, notamment pour la reconfiguration des interrupteurs. Nous vous avons entendu suivre la checklist. Mais j'imagine qu'à présent, vous avez probablement remis tous les interrupteurs en place et que vous êtes prêt à continuer. D'accord. Que d
- - in cima alla pagina, c'è il passaggio 38, e subito sotto, prima del passaggio 39, vogliamo attivare il circuito primario del glicole. Quello che stiamo facendo è impostare l'interruttore dell'acqua dell'evaporatore del glicole su AUTO e la pressione del vapore dell'evaporatore del glicole su AUTO. Questo metterà in funzione la caldaia primaria dell
إنها عاصفة ثلج
Und weiter geht's. Falls das Triebwerk während des Brennvorgangs ausfällt und die Anzeige NOUN 97 blinkt, sollten Sie mit PROCEED fortfahren, dann den Leerlauf erhöhen, TRIEBWERKSSTART auf PUSH stellen und den Sinkflug mit TRIEBWERKSÜBERREGUNG EIN angehen. Okay. Nun zu den allgemeinen Informationen. Falls Sie PC-2 nicht gezündet 
알겠습니다. 이것은 LM 기동 패드, PC 플러스 2시간, 시작 시 0833.0, -0050.9, -0213.9, N/A, +0020.5, 0861.5, 4:24, 272, 081이며, 나머지는 다음과 같은 주석을 제외하고는 N/A입니다. 연료 탱크 용량, 제트 엔진 2개, 10초; 중량, 62480; 중량
Роджер. До того, как ты это сделал, у нас было около 20 точек. И к твоему сведению, причина, по которой там есть небольшое отличие, заключается 
TELCOM、GROUP 1
أخبرني عندما أكون في حالة مزاج
알았어, 잭. CB 배터리 충전기를 AC 전
ठीक है। जैक, हमने थोड़ी देर के लिए कुछ बूंदें तेजी से निकलती देखीं। अब हमें कुछ भी दिखाई 
Roger. Can you g
맞습니
这是友谊七号。刚刚平安飞过埃尔帕索。透过云层可以看到
Fort
休斯顿，如果我没记错的话，发射云台的设置，这里的 
Il y en avait d'
我现在
Это отрицательно. Думаю, тот факт, что у
Ok. Sembra davvero un gran bell'oggetto. Abbiamo notato che hai spostato la stel
Okay. Ich habe das hier minus 5 Stunden, minus 7, falls
Friendship Seven, commandement du Capitaine d'Hawaï. Nous vous recevons parf
أعتقد أنه من الأفضل تجربة المظلة. قمتُ بإنزالها يدويًا على ارتفاع 25 قدمًا 
Houston, wie liest man das Sternzeichen Wasser
Il y a des débris assez gros qui flottent. Le plan de vol est établi. Les gyroscopes seront libérés à 12 h 33 et je vais utiliser les commandes de vol électriques pour suivre le propulseur. Je vais… ce n'est pas un problème de suivi facile. Nos vitesses sont trop proche
了解、グアイマス。君の言うこ
阿波罗 8 号，休斯顿。英仙座泽塔（Persei Zeta）是一颗与埃尼夫（E
吉姆，我没抄到。不过，你
ヒュー
저거 꽤 멀리 가네. 얼마나 가는지
はい。斜線画が3枚あります。最後のは最近頼んだものです。2枚目の拡大版です。1枚目は点線で示されていて、水平線と50度のLPDを示しています。これら3枚はすべて転送簿に記載され
E si procede. Se, durante la combustione, il motore si ferma, se avete un NOUN 97 lampeggiante, dovreste PROCEDERE, quindi ULLAGE, ENGINE START su PUSH e DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE ON. Okay. Ora solo informazioni generali. Se non avete bruciato PC più 2, probabilmente P - P più 4 sarebbe il primo. effettuerà il backup solo in modalità rate-fail, che sapete. Stiamo parlando del controllo delle stelle. Dovrò ricontattarvi su questo. Se, per qualche motivo, non c'è PC-2, avete una traiettoria di ritorno libero con l'atterraggio a 152:02:00, e questo avverrebbe dopo un piccolo midcourse-5, che probabilmente sarebbe di circa 4 piedi al secondo a 93 ore. E avete
350 قدمًا، ثم انخفض إلى 4
हैलो, हवाई, हैलो, हवाई। मिथुन 4. क्या आप पढ
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Bitte sprechen Sie weite
Bien, 11. Ici Houston. À environ 22 h 30 dans le plan de vol, dans votre checklist post-sommeil et dans toutes les autres checklists post-sommeil, veuillez supprimer la mention « AUTO JET SELECT, 16 à ON ». Nous allons reprendre cette procédure dans la
Bene, adesso, dopo aver inserito quel gadget, siamo tornati a 0,35. Prima, la lettura era a livello di scala. Credo che la nostra sia relativamente corretta, almeno quando arriva il momento in 
Non ci crederesti, ma ora s
D'accord. Compris. Si cela peut vous aider à conduire, nous avons calculé que lorsque vous regardez vers la droite, à une distance X de la fenêtre ou juste à côté, votre véhicule devrait ê
ठीक है। मुझे थोड़ा समय दीजिए—मैं इसे देख लूँगा—नहीं, मैं आपका
Хьюстон, это Gemini 4. Я только что проснулся. Где мы находимся? Над какой станцией м
Nous so
Questa è l'Amicizia Sett
حسناً. يكفي هذا القدر من الحديث عن القمر يا 
इस सवाल का जवाब है हां, हम दोनों का इस्तेमाल करने की योजना बना रहे हैं। लेकिन इससे पहले कि हम वाटर बॉयलर पंप के बारे में बात करें, सीडीआर
रॉजर, हमें समझ आ गया। विकिरण 11005, 10006, 09007; कोई दवा नहीं
好吧。如果他们能在这儿撑几个小时，如果他们还有什么办法，就告诉他们我还活着，等我忙完，我一定全力以赴。我甚至可以向全世界宣布，我根本没
ठीक है, फ्रेड। आखिरी बात में तुम कुछ ज़्यादा ही कमज़ोर पड़ गए। मैं समझता हूँ कि तुम डिस्कनेक्ट कर रहे हो, औ
Freedom Seven, Cap Com, 
Yes,.
Je te recevais sans problème, Ken, mais je n'entendais la musique que pendant tes transmissions. Je me demandais si tu avais remarqué le fonctionnement de l'interrupteur de ma combinaison quand tu m'appelais. J'entends un écho maintenan
Houston, wir öffnen jetzt das DIRECT O2-Ventil 
Et, 13, dans le, nous voulons vérifier que toutes les pompes de la pile à combustible sont étein
Hey Joe, es sieht ungefähr so ​​aus, als ob man hinter einem Fahrer fährt, der eine Kondensstreifen hinterlässt, und man in seinen K
네. 슈트 전
सब कुछ छत की ओर 
Non pensavo che si potesse and
달을 흑백으로 찍었습니다. 기상청 필터를 빼고 찍었죠. 사진 번호 6번입니다. 달이 지는 동안 셔터 속도를 낮춰서 한 장 더 찍어 보겠습니다. 조심스럽게 들고 찍었습니다. 달이 질 때 찍
（レトロロケットの）1号機を手に入れた。彼女は本当にしっ
هل هذ
Роджер. Угол наклона минус 2 1/2 градуса, и вс
좋아요. 
मैंने हवाई यात्रा क
जी हाँ, बिल्
ジム、念のため、エントリーパッドは持っています。着陸地点の天気概要も持っています。コピーする必
ليس سيئاً. لقد اندهشت أيضاً من ال
Отлично. Будут ли они мной гордиться? Я с
इनमें से केवल सबसे नई आकृ
Ладно
Das ist ja klar, Frank. Wir haben die passende Einstellung g
Apollo 8, Houston. Alle 19, è previsto un altro ciclo di test sui ventilatori criogenici. Fin
Make sure Bill hangs up hi
Ich hole mir einen Bleistift. Jetzt
हमने उन्हें एक रीडिंग देते हुए सुना जो ईंधन की मात्
أوه، كما تعلم. الليلة الأولى في الف
Ja, 
Und, Jack, wenn wir Fotos von den Fenstern des Kommandomoduls machen wollen, sollten wir das lieber ziemlich schnell erledi
حسنًا، سنقوم بالانقلاب والانحناء لأسفل حتى نتمكن من النظر من النوافذ الأمامية، إلى الأسفل
Нам нужно н
Roger. Understand.
カーナボン、それを待っている間に、私
هل يبدو أنك ستتمكن من فعل ذلك دون ح
Fred, concernant ce module de commande bricolé avec une bonbonne d'hydroxyde de lithium, il va falloir en fabriquer au moins deux et les utiliser deux à la fois, une sur chaque tuyau. On connectera l'un de ces boîtiers aux raccords rouges; l'air sera aspiré à travers l'hydroxyde de lithium puis expulsé par le raccord bleu. On devra aussi, pendant l'opération, retirer la bonbonne d'hydroxyde de lithium du circuit de la combinaison, soit le circuit principal, soit le secondaire. On est en train de rédiger un tutoriel pour simplifier la fabrication de ce genre de dispositif, et il semble qu'il faudra probablement être deux. Du coup, je pense qu'il vaudrait mieux prévoir de le faire plus tard. De plus, il faut qu'on aille chercher quelques bonbonnes dans le module de co
Allez-y, Ap
收到。稍等。我这里有液氧排放的开始时间。它应该在 5 点 03 分 07 秒开始，5 点 04 分 55 秒结
了解しました。11時です。近いうちに、ご都合の良い時間に廃水ダンプを実施したいと思います。特に
좋아, DECA POWER
Roger, 
没错。
Yuri Alekseyevich, vorrei r
Quindi nessun problema. Hai superato il limite nominale per tutti i tuoi materiali di consumo. Per quanto riguarda il problema del serbatoio di H2, abbiamo una procedura che vorremmo che tu eseguissi: basta spegnere i riscaldatori del serbatoio di H2 2 in questo momento, e vogliamo veder
시그마 세
And we're go
R
Роджер. Наш полет на Луну, возможно, показался вам простым и легким. Хочу вас заверить, что это не так. Ракета «Сатурн V», которая вывела нас на орбиту, — невероятно сложная машина, каждая деталь которой работала безупречно. Этот компьютер над моей головой имеет словарный запас в 38 000 слов, каждое из которых было тщательно подобрано, чтобы иметь для нас, экипажа, максимальную ценность. Этот переключатель, который я сейчас держу в руке, имеет более 300 аналогов только в командном модуле, и это всего лишь один переключатель. Вдобавок к этому, здесь множество автомат
E la valvola di flusso EVAP, che ora è aperta, ho sganciato i tubi della mia tuta e ho aperto le valvole di flusso della tuta; quindi ora l'
ठीक है। यही वह कॉन्फ़िगरेशन है जिसमें हम आपको रखना चाहते हैं, और हम इस बारे में सोच रहे हैं। जब हमने टैंक 1 को ऑटो और टैंक 2 को बंद किया, तो हमने पाया कि हीटर साइकिल में टैंक 1 का दबाव लगभग 233 psi था, जो सावधानी और चेतावनी सीमा से काफी ऊपर है, और अगर हम सोने के लिए इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन का उपयोग करते हैं, तो हमें नींद के दौरान सावधानी और चेतावनी लाइटें नहीं जलेंगी। ठीक है। ऐसा आराम से करने के लिए, हम दिन के बाकी समय में टैंक नंबर 2 से अधिक H2 का उपयोग करना चाहते हैं, ताकि टैंक 1 के पक्ष में असंतुलन हो जाए, और नींद के चक्र के अंत में सब बराबर हो जाए। और इसीलिए हमने आपको टैंक 1 बंद और टैंक 2 ऑटो मोड में रखा है। हमें अगले 10 घंटों में लगभग 3 प्रतिशत असंतुलन की उम्मीद है; और सोने से पहले, हम आपको कॉन्फ़िगरेशन को फिर से बदलने के लिए कॉल करेंगे। अब यहाँ एकमात्र कमी यह है कि दि
И мы
Okay. Brav
باز، لقد كان عرضًا جيدًا لتجميع واقي الوجه الخاص
알겠습니다. 1번 줄 AC 버스 A에는 테이프 레코더와 데카 짐벌이 연결되어 있습니다. 나머지는 그림
حسنًا. BIOMED، مُطفأ؛ معدل بت منخفض؛ نسخ احتياطي للصوت المنخفض؛ مضخم الطاقة إلى وضع التشغيل الأساسي؛ قواطع الدائرة، اللوحة 
Je me doutais que vous poseriez la question. Rien ne s'est passé lorsque l'IVI... es
这是友谊七号，ATS。你收到了吗
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Avez-vous reçu les mêmes consignes et le même système de déverseme
Roger. Il doit avoir de l'expérience. Col
Please tell, did you use HF with one or both button
Ja. Ich denke, die grundlegende Frage ist
حسنًا، يمكنك قول ذلك. لست متأكدًا تمامًا من مقدار الميل أو الدوران الذي أمتلكه، بالإضافة إلى الانحراف. لقد رأيت الأرض تمر من نافذة المركبة الفضائية هنا، منذ وقت ليس ببعيد، بسرعة
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि बस इतना ही है, लेकिन हम यहा
Okay, crew. About the only other thing I've got for you right now is an update to your pad for lift-off plus 35. This is a change to the pad we gave you yesterday. The reason for the update is for weather avoidance in the mid-Pacific landing area at 70
Das war's im Großen und Ganzen mit den Welt- und nationalen Nachrichten und Reportagen. Auf der Sportseite wurde Hank Stram von den Kansas City Chiefs zum AFL-Trainer des Jahres gekürt. Dies ist seine zweite Auszeichnung in drei Saisons. Die Wahl erfolgte durch ein Gremium der Associated Press, bestehend aus 30 Sportjournalisten und -kommentatoren, drei aus jeder Stadt. Der ihm am nächsten stehende war Weeb Ewbank. Weitere nominierte Trainer waren Sid Gilman aus San Diego und Lou Sabin aus Denver. Was das Shriners College All-Star-Spiel gestern angeht, so besiegte der Norden den Süden mit 3:0. Dick Berlinsky von Michigan State erzielte im ersten Viertel ein Field Goal aus 23 Yards, und das reichte dem Norden, um den Süden am Mittwoch im Shriners College All-Star-Footballspiel zu schlagen. Interessant sind dabei die First Downs: Norden 19, Süden 16; Laufspiel: Norden 214, Süden 169; Das Passspiel endete mit 96:109 für Nord. 
Roger. Votre alignement est inchangé, le litre est i
Нет. Мне всё равно. Ну, если это раздражает — позвольте мне это сдела
Et CB - CB INVERTER 
Сколько времени вам потребуется, чтобы нарастить скорость вращения на четверть гра
백업
Apollo 11, Houston. I have a TLI-plus-1
没问题。一切都很顺利。看来我得待六年了，我对此非常高兴。整套设备运行完美。万一艾尔没能帮我把油量转过来，我的自动模式占比81%，手动模式占比80%，——我现在处于自动模式，但控制方式略有不同
ح
저도 마찬
And we didn't get any crew status report from you this morning. Wondered if you could
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन से। जब आप अफगानिस्तान-पाकिस्तान क्षेत्र में सेक्स्टें
さあ
Okay. Understand. I knew we had a
Ricevuto. Mi risulta che riceveremo un aggiornamento sul piano di volo sopra gli Stati Uniti. Sembra che saremo piuttosto impegnati lassù a quell'ora. Saremo in allineamento
هيوستن، بر
Roger, 11. Wir waren – ich wurde gerade zu einem anderen Monitor weit
मेरे नीचे काफी बड़ा तूफानी इ
そしてジェ
11، هيوستن. تشير التوقعات الحالية إلى ظروف جوية مناسبة في منطقة تعافيكم: رياح متفرقة على ارتفاع 2000 قدم، ورياح متفرقة عالية، قادمة من اتجاه 70 درجة، بسرعة 13 عقدة، ورؤية تصل إلى 10 أميال، وارتفاع البحر حوالي 4 أقدام. أشارت توقعات الأمس إلى وجود عاصفة استوائية، كلوديا، على بعد حوالي 500 إلى 1000 ميل شرق هاواي. أظهرت صور الأقمار الصناعية الملتقطة بعد ظهر أمس تلاشي كلوديا، مما يجعل تأثيرها أقل مما كان عليه سابقًا. يُعتقد الآن أن منطقة تعافيكم تقع شمال منطقة التقارب المداري بقليل، والتي يُمكنكم رؤيتها على الأرجح من نوافذكم. كما وردت تقارير أمس عن عاصفة استوائية، فيولا، تقع غربًا. يقع موقعها الحالي على بعد حوالي ألف ميل شرق الفلبين وتتحرك باتجاه الشمال الغربي. تشتد العاصفة الاستوائية فيولا، ومن المتوقع أن تتحول إلى إعصار خلال الـ 12 ساعة القادمة تقريبًا؛ إلا أن ذلك سيكون بعيدًا غربكم. في الواقع، لم يصل خط فاصل الشمس بعد إلى فيولا. عندما يصل إليها بعد عدة ساعات، ستتمكن على الأرجح من تمييزها بسهولة من موقعك. في الحقيقة، قد يكون من المفيد التقاط بعض الصور.
Zeigt nun 20 psi auf 
دعنا نلق
Хоро
Roger. Blutdruck – jetzt starten. Der Ballon ist jetzt ziemlich stabil unter mir
好的。阿尔法1
Oui, c'est exact. D'accord, 
Ja, genau – ich weiß, wo das Problem liegt. Es ist ein
Хорошо. На боковой стороне дома находится панель 16. Соединительные клеммы для питания CB-радиостанции, две, ра
D'accord. Parfait. L'étape suivante consiste à découper un trou en diagonale dans l'une des extrémi
こんにちは、ヒュース
La vapeur évacuée de la cabine est à 10 °C; celle de la combinaison à 62 °C. J'aimera
रॉजर। मैंने ऑटो मोड में डॉक किया, और जैसा कि मैंने कहा, मुझे संपर्क का क्षण ठीक से याद नहीं था। मैं डॉकिंग प्रोब इंडिकेटर्स को बार-बार चेक कर रहा था। मुझे दो बारबर पोल मिले, जिससे पता चला कि तीनों कैप्चर लैच - कैप्चर लैच नहीं, बल्कि तीनों... लैच - जुड़ गए थे, और हम सॉफ्ट डॉक हो गए थे। उस समय स्थिति काफी स्थिर लग रही थी। तो, मैंने फ्री मोड में जाकर खिड़की से बाहर देखा और स्थिति अभी भी स्थिर लग रही थी; और मैंने प्राइमरी 2 बॉटल फायर कर दी। उसी समय, दोनों वाहनों के बीच एक चक्कर शुरू हो गया, मुझे नहीं पता किस वजह से। शायद थ्रस्टिंग की वजह से या शायद यह पहले से ही बन रहा था, और मैंने ध्यान नहीं दिया था। खैर, प्रोब के रिट्रैक्ट के दौरान, यॉ हुआ - मेरे अनुमान से लगभग 15 डिग्री का यॉ हुआ, और मुझे वापस ऑन करना पड़ा, फ्री स्विच को ऑटो मोड में वापस करना पड़ा, और इसे कम करने की कोशिश करनी पड़ी; और मुझे लगता है कि नील भी यही कर रहा था। मैं उसे अपने अनुभव के बारे में बताने दूंगा। और मुझे लगा कि हमें सफल रिट्रै
收到。看来你需要重新调整一下雷达的位置。我们建议你从 TIG 倒计
أبولو ١١
هذا صحيح. نرغب في ربط المعلومات التي نحصل عليها بمعلوماتك، حتى نتمكن
- - मुलाकात की प्रक्रिया तय
मैं... यहां नाक की जांच क
Il y a
حسنًا. لقد كان هذا فحصًا لموقع الأرض/الشمس 
아
好的。我已经测到了穹顶温度。最高升到了大约 82 度。我已经把它调回了 81 度。宇航服进气口的温度升到了 80 度。我已经把它调回了 78 度。宇航服设置旋钮的设置又回到了接近 7.5 的位置。我现在
Möglicherweise musst du einiges davon wiederholen, James. Wir haben gerade jemanden, der sich um die High-Gain-Aufgaben k
Ok. Lasciami sottolineare, Jack, che 2 ore e mezza è il tempo minimo per iniziare con quella roba dei potenziamenti. Tutto il resto puoi farlo come faresti normalmente, ovvero arrivare il più avanti possibile nel gioco. Ma il tempo di 2 ore e mezza si basa sul risparmio di materiali di consumo del modulo di comando. E se lo fai, beh, siamo grassi; abbiamo un sacco di tempo per darti qualche ventilatore anche in acqua. Quindi questo è l'unico punto su cui non dovresti iniziare troppo presto. Ho ancora un paio di righe da ripassare nella checklist di ingresso e
La voilà partie. 6 - 5 - 4 — comment est-ce arrivé là? Mes attitudes ne
Ja, das stimmt ein bisschen, Vance. Wenn die Sonne auf die Quads scheint, beeinträchtigt das unsere Sicht; und wenn die Erde oder der Mond im Sichtf
रॉजर।
روجر. تبدو جيد
حسن
10、9、8、7、6、5、4、3、2、1、イグニッ
同じアラームが、1668 が起動しているとき
Здравствуйте, командование ВВС Гавайев. Это «Сигма Семь». Конец
405 和 404——它们怎么了？（笑声
了解しました。それから、クワッドの温度ですが、ボトルの上限は105度です。あなたはそれをはるかに下回っています。私たちはそれを監視していますが、追跡はしていますが、非常にゆっくりとしています。宇宙船を回転さ
سنبقى بجانب والي. ل
روجر. هانتسفيل، هذا سيجما سفن. أسمعك بوضوح. هل لديك أي شي
分かりました。取りに行ってきます。それでは水素
لقد انقضت الآن 6+35 دقيقة، وأقوم بإيقاف تشغيل المركبة الفضائية بالكامل. كنا قد أوقفنا تشغي
알겠습니다. 오늘 밤에는 C와 D
حسنًا. هذه هي أضواء الكشافات في اللوحة رقم 8. الآن سنأخذ اللوحة رقم 5 
حسنًا يا مايك. بالطبع، هذا في حال تعطل نظام التوجيه والتوجيه (G&N) واضطررتَ للطيران بتسارع ثابت (g). ما نحاول فعله هو زيادة نطاق التسارع الثابت من 1100 إلى 1500 ميل. لقد جربنا هذه العملية على جهاز المحاكاة، وهي تعمل بشكل جيد. سأشرحها لك الآن، ثم إذا كانت لديك أي أسئلة، يمكنك العودة. هي نفس طريقة رفع متجه الرفع حتى الوصول إلى أقصى تسارع (g)، ثم خفضه، ثم تعديله ح
Ora, dobbiamo fare qualcos'altro per configurare questo per... i
Ich s
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। ऑटो रेट्रो-जेटिसन
Jim, qui Houston. Due punti: primo, il tuo lavoro sembra molto buono e dovrebbe bastarti per tutta la notte; secondo, ho una procedura da darti, se sei pronto a copiare. Vorremmo im
夏威夷双子座4号，CAP COM。我们已经测到您的体温。您可以开始测量血压，并等待我们的
テストパターンのことではありません。テストパターンのことではありません。私たちは彼らに、巻物の最初の数字の上にスーパーサーキュラーを置くように依頼しました。彼らはそうしてくれたはずです。最初のパターンであることは間違いないのですが、
Apollo 11, Houston. You were cut
— Я смог
ストップウォッチ
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Я вас прекрасн
Pressione in cabina, altimetro in cabina in linea con l'altitudine. Ora dovrebbero essere 13.000 [piedi]. Punto 10; vedo che il paracadute principale è fuori, e ridotto, e mi sembra a posto. Il paracadute principale è fuori. Il sacco di atterraggio ora va in automatico. Il freno è sganciato. Vedo un paracadute per
...остается сравнительно низким. Мы устанавливаем разброс то
Okay, I've got my... but before that I want to tell you that my batteries all checked out over the States
Roger
11, Houston. We get some data, but it's got the same problem that we had
Ora sono in assetto di rientro. Pronto a passare alla modalità automatica. Il 
Another little of local news: the County Court House at Huntsville burned down before dawn yesterday, so it looks like they will go in the construction business there again. On the got a little bit about the waiting families. This one is by Ann James, Post reporter. "We rest on the backside of the moon," said Valerie Anders on Christmas Eve, as she and her family waited for Apollo 8 to get out of the moon orbit and head back toward home. Mrs. Anders had been 00 a.m. Tuesday, and neighbors had just collected all the youngsters so the family could get some rest while the spacecraft was behind the moon and out of communication. Colonel Frank Borman's home was decorated with four big evergreen wreaths outdoors and sprinkled with powdery snow and decorated with red bows. A tree in the den awaits his safe return, and his pretty blond wife Sue and husky sons, Frederick and Edwin, plan to stay home for the midnight blast out of moon orbit. Ordinarily, they would attend midnight services at St. Christopher's Episcopal Church. The plans were for the family 00 a.m. Since there are no young children in the Borman home, family Christmas gift giving will simply wait until Colonel Borman comes back with his fantastic holiday gift of the flight to the moon and back. Marilyn Lovell's four youngsters will have an absolutely normal Christmas as far as the kids are concerned, the busy wife of Captain Lovell reported; but talking about presents was out because two of them were sitting right there next to her. "I haven't even had time to change my clothes that I wore last night," Mrs. Lovell said. Adult-to-adult gifts, however, and the Christmas tree will still be right there when Lovell comes home. Here is a good one on the Action Line. There is a little letter to the Action editor. It says, "We intended to pay you Earthlings a surprise visit by a flying saucer last night. We got scared off by some crazy antics of a fat ma
전원을 켜겠습니다
Okay, Apollo 8. Vielleicht sollten wir das beim nächsten Mal nochmal versuchen. Die Sichtbarkeit des Suchteleskops ist im Flugplan für Stern 31 vorgesehen. Die Winkel sind: Rollen 184,7°, Nicken 23,4°, Gieren 14,3°
حسنًا، يمكنك الا
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend die Details erläutern. Okay. Der Eintritt in die Atmosphäre erfolgt um 142:40 Uhr; etwa 6,5 ​​Stunden vorher, also ungefähr, beginnen wir mit der Aktivierung der Heizleistung, indem wir die Temperaturen des Kommandomoduls überprüfen und dieses gegebenenfalls vorheizen. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies notwendig sein wird. Detaillierte Anweisungen dazu folgen später. Ungefähr 6 Stunden vorher beginnen wir mit dem Hochfahren der Heizleistung anhand der modifizierten 30-Minuten-Checkliste, die Sie bereits für den vorherigen Zwischenkurs verwendet haben. Kurz darauf, etwa 5 Stunden vorher, benötigen wir die Ausrichtung für die Körperachsenausrichtung mithilfe des Erdterminators, wie zuvor. Sobald wir das haben, führen wir -7 durch, was jetzt etwa einer Brenngeschwindigkeit von 2 Fuß pro Sekunde oder etwa 15 Sekunden entspricht. Mir wurde gesagt, dass sie jetzt bei 1,5 liegt, also deutlich innerhalb der Toleranz. Okay. Danach beginnen wir sofort mit dem Manöver zur Abwurfposition des Servicemoduls. Da wir es früher als üblich abwerfen, befindet es sich in der Flugebene. Wir benötigen und wollen keine Abweichung von der Flugebene. Das Servicemodul befindet sich also in der Flugebene und ist entlang des Radiusvektors nach außen gerichtet. Anschließend bereiten wir das Kommandomodul für den SEP des Servicemoduls vor, einschließlich der Überprüfung und des Heißlauftests. Etwa 4 Stunden und 30 Minuten vor dem geplanten Zeitpunkt werfen wir das Servicemodul ab. Wir werden die Maschine so lange hochziehen, bis wir das Servicemodul im Flug haben und versuchen, ein paar Fotos zu machen. Wir werden aber keine riskanten Manöver für Fotos durchführen, da wir den Flugbahnwinkel zu diesem Zeitpunkt nicht verändern wollen. Okay. Das gibt uns ungefähr zwei Stunden Zeit, um die Vorbereitungen abzuschließen, falls wir in Verzug geraten. D
わかりました。もう一度読み上げます。順番は…電源、オフ。数値照明、投光照明、全体照明の3つ、オフ。パネル101、尿ダンプヒーター、尿ダンプをオフ、廃水もオフ。パネル122、コンディションランプ、オフ。パネル201、フードウォーマー、オフ。パネル225、私が読んだ追加項目：Sバンド送信機、グループ1。フライトバス、メインAとメインB
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। मध्यमार्ग से हमारी निगरानी के आधार पर, हम गामा का मान -6.57 दिखा रहे हैं। हालांकि, यह प्रारंभिक अनुमान है, और हमें लगता है कि कुछ और ट्रैकिंग के बाद यह स्पष्ट हो जाएगा, और हम इसे कॉरिडोर में ठीक से समायोजित कर सकते हैं। यह लगभग कॉरिडोर के केंद्र में है; सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है। सोने से पहले हम आपको कुछ घंटों में एक एंट्री पैड भेज देंगे। और हमारे जनसंपर्क विभाग के मित्रों की ओर से, आपकी उड़ान के अलावा कुछ और सुर्खियाँ। आप अभी भी खबरों में छाए हुए हैं। हालांकि, आप
ठीक है, बिल
わかった。チャーリー、この星がはっきりと見えるようになったから、地平線を正確に数えるために
Я открою окна и посмотр
골드스톤은 지금 우리가 줄 
ठीक है। आज के लिए, हम चाहेंगे कि आप अवलोकन से पहले और बाद में भी ट्रनियन बायस का निर्धारण करें, जैसा कि प्रक्रिया में बताया गया है। हमारा उद्देश्य यह जांचना है कि क्या किसी प्रकार का थर्मल प्रभाव सेक्स्टेंट में कोणीय रीडिंग में त्रुटियां उत्पन्न कर रहा है। पहले प्राप्त बायस को शामिल किया जाना चाहिए, यानी दो लगातार माप 0.003 डिग्री के भीतर बराबर होने पर NOUN 87 पर आगे बढ़ें। और हां, मापों के बीच ट्रनियन को कुछ डिग्री स्थानांतरित करें। आज आपके दृश्य क्षेत्र में पृथ्वी काफी छोटी दिखाई देनी चाहिए। मुझे यकीन है कि आप इसके बारे में हमसे कहीं अधिक बेहतर बता सकते हैं, लेकिन यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि आपको तारे और पृथ्वी क्षितिज के बीच एक अच्छा कोण माप मिल रहा है, सेक्स्टेंट एम-लाइन, जो दो हैश चिह्नों से होकर गुजरने वाली और आर-ला
Okay, das ist gut. Die
Roger
Хорошо. Я имею в виду контрольный список для поступлен
Хорошо, спасибо. Что касается вашего вопроса о числе 8750, это число, которое используется в опционе для получения минимальной доходности за определенный период времени. Это дает вам цель для 
Хорошо. Позвольте мне еще раз показать вам всю панель 225. CB FLIGHT BUS, MAIN B, закрыть; CB CTE, MAIN B, CB BAT - B BAT CHARGE, это должно быть BAT C, Чарли, не так ли?
Roger, 11. Riceviamo. Ti consiglio di andare su questo, opzione 1 preferita, e poi passare all'assetto. Pa
Вы выб
रॉजर। आपका रेडिएटर अब चालू है। प्रतीक्षा करें। सी-बैंड बंद... अभी भी अधिकतम
Хорошо, 11. Прежде всего, проверка наших систем прошла успешно. Хочу напомнить, что завтра при активации MC&W может загореться индикатор давления при подъеме. Однако проблем быть не должно. Вы отметили, что давлени
Роджер. Всё ещё читаю ваши сообщения. Немного сбою. В 30 лет моё состояние хорошее. Топливо и кислород стабильны. В салоне 5,8 [psi
Go ahead, 
やあ、ジョー。その話をしてくれて嬉しいよ。本当に真剣
أوديسي، هيوستن. أنتَ تقوم بكل ما هو صحيح. خط سكة حديد G&N جاه
여기서 생각해 볼 수 있는 한 가지는, 만약 지하수 수압이 낮다면 물을 빼내어 역방향으로 채우는 것을 고려해 볼 수 있다는 것입니다. 만약 그것이 효과가
جيم، نحن على وشك الانتق
Д
Roger. Voici le compte rendu du panneau: les fusibles du panneau de gauche sont tous dans la position indiquée précédemment. Le propulseur d'appoint est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le sélecteur de mode est en mode normal (auto) et le gyrosc
알겠습니다. 극저온 균형 조정을 위해 지금 히터와 1번 산소 탱크를 꺼주시기
Davvero, uno degli spettacoli più belli che ho visto è stato quando ho guardato giù e ho visto la punta meridionale d
Okay. Im Prinzip stimmt das. Ich erkläre es Ihnen kurz grob, dann lese ich Ihnen die einzelnen Schritte vor. Ich denk
Roger, 11 anni. Qui H
أبولو 11، هيوس
8번, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 테이프 재생 스위치를
Non sono sicuro che stiamo ottenendo - 
こんにちは。カリフォルニ
Gem
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम। अब आप मुझे कैसे सम
这是个好问题。我认为
13، هيوستن. انطلق في الساعة 1. نعرض المقصورة وهي تخفف الضغ
Bene, or
رو
No. Non vogliamo che tu lo faccia. Leggimi
حسناً. لقد التقطت لفة صغيرة؛ سأتخلص
로저. 짐, 보통은 자동으로 처리되는 과정입니다. 예정대로 정확하게 작업
알겠습니다. 전방 사격은 초속 47피트, 명중률 1+18입니다. 후방 사격은 초속 120피트, 명중률 2+31이며, 사격 위치는 17, 42, 53입
ه
ठीक है, बस
Хорошо. Насколько я понимаю, цель этой процедуры — ве
وهناك شيء آخر يا جاك. عندما يحين وقت قيامي بالانعطاف بزاوية 90 درجة، ما كنت أخطط لفعله هو تثبيت NOUN 76 والقيام بنبضات وانعطافات متكررة حتى ي
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन. 103
Voici Friendship Seven. Il dérive d'environ 20° vers la droite, puis reçoit une forte impulsion qui le ramène vers la gauche. Il r
मित्रता सात, भारहीनता से मुझे सुखद अनुभूति के अलावा
シグマ・セブン、カントン・コム・テック。5分で読み上げました。キャップ・コムへ
Hey, that 
Jim, ci sembra che la tua batteria sia buona, che in effetti si tratti di un problema al sensore; pertanto, ti chiediamo di chiudere l'interruttore automatico CROSS TIE BAL LOAD sul pannello 16. Consiglia
我想今天也是加利福尼亚州的生日，我记得他们有200年
Apoll
यह अगली बार के लिए ही होगा। रुकिए। मैं देखता हूँ कि वे किस बारे में बात
Ну, минуту назад он сказал это, чтобы сообщить вам, что он успокоился после ваших прошлых комментариев по поводу его траектории и так д
Okay. Vuoi che dia un segno al Texas quando inizi a b
Okay. 
Roger. They feel reasonably sure, h
E ho una domanda per John. Vorrei sapere come sta andando la sua 
이제부터 테이프를 연속으로 재생할게요. 여기 하나 더 꽂아
Gemini 4, Hawai
ジェ
Хорошо. Теперь стало
11, Houston. In quel mom
Hier sollst du sowi
제미니 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 레트로파이어 이후에는 저희와 연락이 되지 않을 것입니다. 
Okay. This is a pericynthian plus 2 for a fast return. This will be / 62871, minus 161, plus 129, plus 45224, minus 06216, minus 18712 001 287 351, November Alfa plus 00187 49336 603 49118 112 03
حسناً، أنا - كما تعلم - في مكان بعيد جداً 
मिथुन 4, कानो में आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से समझ पा रहा हूँ। आपके लिए मेरे पास डी-9 से संबंधित एक 
Al momento trasmetterà solo a...
好的。现在我们可以给你们展示一下，还有一个小惊喜。我们现在把减速伞放在弗雷德位于指挥舱的沙发上。我们暂时把它收起
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 만약 2
Aquarius, Hou
알겠습니다. 보조 라디에이터 입력 온도는 70도에서 약 72도 사이이고, 라디에이터 출력 온도는 약 30도입니다. 글
好的——这是在调整好姿势之后。吉姆说，我现在处于观月姿势，我会按
जेमिनी 4, आरकेवी
حسنًا. "كانت ليلة عيد الميلاد، وفي أعماق الفضاء، فاز طاقم أبولو 8 للتو بسباق القمر؛ عُلّقت سماعات الرأس بعناية بجانب لوحات التحكم، على أمل أن يكون كريس كرافت هناك قريبًا؛ كان فرانك بورمان مسترخيًا في سرير
Roger. Verstanden. Ende der Umlaufbahn 01:28:18 und 04:32:28 für das Ende der Umlaufba
Tiens-toi à ça, Jim. Je ne sais pas; je vérif
Roger. Passez ensuite à la procédure de contrôle de lo
Это только половина дела. Большая часть у нас спрятана. Было довольно интересно работать здесь с камерами, чтобы немного потренироваться в работе с телевизором, надеюсь, это пригодится, когда мы окажемся во Фра-Мауро. Хотя 
알겠습니다. 하나 보내드릴게요. 제어 
收到。D-8 实验检查 1。从 57 开始。检查 2。从 01:30 开始。项目 4，版
Und es wirkt jetzt tatsächlich schon etwas größer. Man kann einige Merkm
Ok.
روجر. 012 080 
नील, ये ह्यूस्टन है। क्या आपको कंटिंजेंसी सै
Hell, do you need a QD... Jim. No way to get ours in there. I don
Gemini 4, en provenance de Hous
أتذكر الجزء المتعلق بـ"الرفع". يا للأسف، لم يكن كل ذلك مسج
حسنًا. نحن ندرس إجراء تعديل في منتصف المسار بعد 104 ساعات - أي بعد حوالي 20 ساعة - أو 18 ساعة، وبمعدل 7 أقدام في الثانية فقط. الخيار الآخر هو ال
スタンバイしてください。了解。メインREG Bバルブが
Voilà notre logement pour les prochaines heures et nous voulons en prend
Okay. The Earth came through the at 62 degrees that time. And the total time for the two revolutions, - I missed the Earth revolution before, but the total time for the Earth
Apollo 11, Houston.
从这里看到的景色真是太棒了。真希望电视还在播放，因为现在棕色区域更深了。我们刚刚飞越了丰饶之海，
Roger. La vanne du compartiment des déchets est en position VENTilation depuis... oh, je
ठ
ふたご座4度、カーナボン。もし読んでいるなら、血圧を上げ始めてくださ
Хорошо, Фред. Мы получили хороший набор настроек для изм
11
Ok, ho c
تم تغيير الشريط في الساعة 15:46. تم استبدال خرطوشة الشريط رقم 2 
Jack, it is very comfortable. We've run it several times now and, in fact, it's being run right now, again. And we've run it both here at Houston and at the Cape. The only place where you might find that you need to stay ahead of things is during the platform-alinement period, when you're getting ready to close out the and then once you get into the command module and jettison the, why you're back on a very comfortable time. And, of course, we'll be watching and anything we can do, like keeping track of time for you, we'll remind you of that a
روجر، تم الانتهاء من قياس درجة الحرارة عن طريق ا
네, 지
アポロ8号、ヒ
11, ह्यूस्टन। रेट्रो टीम जानना चाहती थी कि क्या आप हमें हमारे पास मौजूद किसी भी गैर-मानक
Okay. Zurück
Ricevuto. E nessuna segnalazione, nessuna segnalazione dalle cim
好的。
アポロ11号、こち
约翰，它们的颜色跟你描述的一样。你的描述非常贴切。不过
حسنًا. الأمر بسيط جدًا، حوالي عشر خطوات. حسنًا. على قاطع الدائرة
التصحيح في 
네. 녹화되었을 수도 있고 아닐 수도 있습니다. EVA를 시작한 후 44분 정도 지났을 때였던 것 같습니다. 에드가 우주선 밖으로 나왔을 때 제가 시작했던 이벤트 타이머를 보고 있었는데, 44분이 지났는데도 아직 해치를 닫지 못했습니다. 우리는 모든 것을 망치지 않도록 침착하고 냉정하게 행
Ed a commencé à ranger le matériel et, dès que nous avons atteint un point où il n'était plus possible de manipuler le propulseur, je l'ai aidé à plein temps – du moins en tenant les objets, en les rangeant et en essayant d'éviter qu'ils ne disparaissent. Plus nous travaillions vite, plus nous prenions de retard. Non pas que nous ne rangions pas les choses correctement, mais cela prenait beaucoup plus de temps que prévu. En apesanteur, ce n'était pas beaucoup plus facile que dans le simulateur, si ce n'est tout aussi facile. Nous avons donc procédé ainsi. Arrivés à Carnarvon, j'étais convaincu que nous n'y arriverions pas, mais je pensais que nous allions persévérer encore un peu. Juste avant de quitter Carnarvon, il était clair pour moi que nous ne pourrions pas effectuer la dépressurisation. J'ai demandé un changement d'orbite. Nous avons alors… repris notre souffle pendant une vingtaine 
حسنًا، أبولو 8. من المبكر بعض الشيء إعطاؤك أرقامًا دقيقة حول أداء الاتصالات. يبدو أنها تعمل كما هو متوقع، ويبدو أن كل شيء آخر يعمل بشكل أفضل، لذا قد يتحسن أداء هذه الاتصالات أيضًا، بعد أن نجري
यह दोस्ती का सातवां अनुभव है। अभी तक मुझे शून्य-गुरुत्वाकर्षण
好的
Yes. We got a MAIN BUS A UNDERVOLT now, too, sho
That's affirm. We think that will give you plenty of separation, and also will be a slow enough rate so 
«Дружба Семь», мы только что проиграли.
Х
र
Puoi scommetterci. È bello tor
ل
Вы это видит
मुझे लगता है कि मैं - तुम्हारे और 
Roger. Pas de souci, 11. On est à votre dis
Navire de l'océan Indien, ici le Sigma Seven. Je vous r
음, LM 전력으로 전환하기 전까지는 제가 할 수 있는 일이 아무것도 
Eagle, Houston. Los geht
Okay. Die nächsten Einträge auf Feld 1 bleiben unverändert. Auf Feld 2 geht man bis zu den Treibs
好的。燃烧规则。如果推力监测器读数低于或等于 77%，我们应该关闭发动机；如果推进剂空腔压力低于 160 psi，我们也应该关闭发动机；如果燃料氧化剂压差大于 25，并且需要地面呼叫，我们也应该关闭发动机；如果姿态误差在正负 10 度以内（启动瞬态过程除外），我们也应该关闭发动机。好的。速率限制为每秒正负 10 度。此外，如果发动机万向节指示灯亮起，国际空间站 (ISS) 程序报警指示灯亮起，CES 直流指示灯亮起，并且逆变器指示灯在尝试切换逆变器后仍然亮着，我们也应该关闭
5 - 5
Ich glaube, ich h
Это Карнарвон. Как вы ч
ठीक है। हम लेंस को त
알겠습니다. 정상 모드
D'accord, Jack. L'étape suivante consiste à prendre la fiche et à l'utiliser pour former un arc au-dessus du récipient; il suffit de glisser une extrémité sous un rebord du dessus et l
أعتقد أننا سنضطر على الأرجح إلى إعادة ضبط الأمور. نعم، لقد انحرفنا
Ok, al momento dell'attivazione del freno. Ho il 70% di auto e il 90% di manuale. L
まだ君の最初の
حسناً، فهمت الآن. أدخلتُ تلك الزوايا لنطاق S، ولم أتمكن من تثبيت الإشارة؛ يبدو 
没错。大
好的。这里还有另一个输入，编号为 11，表明数据可以识别为图像，但
Ja. Es sind kleine, glitzernde *** Frag
TM est en train de se dissoudre. Friendship
- 네, 조. 밖에는 온통 구름뿐이고, 육지가 보이기 시작하면 창밖으로 다시 바꿔볼게요
Roger, Friendship Seven. Ich habe den Eindruck, dass deine Fluglage nicht ganz korrekt ist. Es gibt Abweichungen von 30° Rollwinkel nach rechts, 35° Gierwinkel nach rechts und 4
指挥飞行员 VI，再给你的袖带充气；你
Molto bene. Ho cercato un po' in giro per questo. Ok, ora manterrò fermo il beccheggio. Manterrò fermo l'imbardata. Arresterò il rollio. E mi dispiace di non vedere il tuo flare. Inizierò a be
了解、フレッド。サービスモジュールのSEPパッド（姿勢記録用）を持っています。パッドシートは必要ありま
Très bien. J'ai relu: 11, G&N: 37200, moins 060, plus 047, plus 098, 05 2422, plus 41448, plus 03719, moins 02422; NA, 020; le reste du PAD NA. Capacité de stockage, deux jets pendant 16 secondes, Quads B et D. Le poids actuel non amarré est corr
No. As soon as the carrier dropped off, why, it drifted over into those angles and stayed there. Then when it came back up again, why, it hunted around for a while, but it didn't get any further off. Gradually brought it on in to the angles where it is right now; and then the signal strength would take several jumps as evidently it goes from wid
Okay, 13. We verify that we want you to close down - shut d
Sì. Attraversano appena a sud della parte inferiore del Messico, probabilmente attraverso l'America Centrale. Quella è la fascia equatoriale che supponiamo essere la zona di convergenza intertropicale. L'altra fascia,
アクエリアス、ヒューストンです。トランスミッションの一部を入手しました。かなり劣化しているとの
Джим, что касается п
أخذت قيلولة لمدة 15 دقيقة تقريبًا، لكنني كنت سعيدًا جدًا 
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы подождать несколько минут? Чарли и
ये है फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। ये सारे छोटे-छोटे कण; इनकी संख्या हजारों में है; और य
अब मैं केवल रिकॉर्डिंग मोड में जा रहा ह
Innerhalb
ठीक है, फ्
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Вы
Apollo 8, this is Houston. You are GO across the 
ठीक है। शायद हमें सफलता मिल जाए... अगर ह
ह्यूस्टन, यह अगला छोटा सा प्रदर्शन घर पर बैठे बच्चों के लिए है, बल्कि सभी बच्चों के लिए। मैं आपको चम्मच से पानी पीना सिखाने वाला था, लेकिन मुझे डर है कि मैंने चम्मच में ज़्यादा पानी भर दिया है और अगर मैंने सावधानी नहीं बरती तो पानी किनारों से छ
Nun, wenn es kocht, werden wir es vorher merken – es wird nicht lange dauern, bis wir feststellen, dass es nicht kocht. Wir können nicht viel dagegen tun, also warten wir doch einfach, b
Hier ist
حسنًا. سيكون اختبارنا التالي اختبارًا للصوت وال
지금은 그리니치 표준시로 17시 21분입니다. 정확히 어느 방향을 가리키고 있는지는
Ok. Tra poco
Понял. А теперь, Водолей, нам придётся переключить вас на другой сайт, и мы думаем, что на этот раз всё будет работать лучше, если мы 
SECS PYRO ARM
现在
لا، يبدو الأمر جيداً. لقد كنا نجمع ب
Ok, 23 metri. E sembra andare bene; giù per metà. 1,8 metri in avanti; la luce è accesa. 1,8 metri in giù, 70 metri in avanti, 5 metri in
收到，吉姆。他的电
حسنًا. جيم، سيتم تسليم المهمة في تمام الساعة، أي بعد دقيقة ونصف. في تمام الساعة، نرجو منك إيقاف تشغيل مفتاح جهاز الإرسال/الاستقبال الخاص بنطاق S، وبعد خمس دقائق، إع
In compartment A1, the 16 millimeter magazine will be located in window number 4 instead of 5. Tissue dispensers; there is only one of them left. And 
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben eine Ladung für Sie, wenn Sie sie uns geben und bestätigen. Die Ladung besteht aus einem Vorzustandsvektor, der in den entsprechenden Slot eingefügt wird, und einem Nachzustandsvektor, der ebenfalls in den S
बिल्कुल सह
알겠습니다. 배터리 충전, 꺼
LEISTUNGSVERSTÄRKER an PRIMÄRV
Guaymas, ici Gemini 4. Il va falloir trancher immédiatement: voulez-vous que je fasse un effort considérable pour régler ce dernier point ou que j
D'accord. Nous suivrons votre suggestion concernant le contrôle ASCENT ECA. Il devrait 
罗杰，我们现在给你开高
रॉजर। समझ ग
रॉजर। बज़, मैंने तुम्हारी बात सा
Roger
Okay. To continue - to continue on - the same panel, panel 5: circuit breaker, BATTERY CHARGER, AC POWER, close; circ
Mark. Ein Bild des Boosters. Sende und nehme jetz
Ja, ich gl
了解。トミー・ジェイコブスの後に切れたね。アンテナ切り替えのトラブルに巻き込まれた
双子座4号，我是RKV外科医生。请给我们输血——好了，血流出
حسنًا. حاليًا، زوايا الجيمبال لدينا هي تقريبًا - الدوران حوالي 190 درجة، والميل حوالي 320 درجة، والانعراج حوالي 340 در
胶囊稳定性，迪克，非常好。我注意到，我只需移动头部和手臂——我的头部和手臂——就能将针头的升温速率控制在每秒1度。完毕
收到。这里是友谊七号。舷窗、姿态指示器和潜望镜都运行良好。目前我可以通过潜望镜看到我身后的暗面正在升起。舱压为5.5，保持稳定。舱内温度为95华氏度。相对湿度为28%。我已经将舱内水温调节器调至水温升高模式，以增强冷却效果。蒸汽温度目前显示为61华氏
Quell
Okay, Vance. Abwärtswasserventil geschlossen; Aufwärtswasserventil geschlossen; und Wassertank auf Auf
네. 다들 우주 프로그램 하면 온갖 신기한 전자 장비들을 떠올리시죠? 물론 그렇긴 합니다. 하지만 오늘 보여드릴 몇 가지 장비가 좀 더 특별할 것 같습니다. 첫 번째는 산소통에 남은 물의 양을 아주 정확하게 측정하는 장치입니다. 지금 보여드리는 이 비닐봉지를 이용해서 산소통에 남아있는
オーケー、ペリシ
Я проверю время: 1 + 0
هذا صحيح يا أبولو 8. أنت كذل
Роджер, Джерри. Понимаю. Я заметил одно различие. Мы использовали предпочтительный вариант. С первым у нас возникли проблемы; со вторым все прошло как ожидалось. Я заметил, что в первом случае, когда появлялся вариант, это б
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Мы готовы отправить вам обновление вект
Roger. Veuillez vous
Gemini VI, wir
アポロ8
Ja, warum sagen wir nicht einfach, wenn es Probleme gibt, dass es nicht wie erwartet funktioniert, versuchen es dann noch einmal gründlich und 
Ich habe die Sprachaufzeichnung gemacht. Ich habe den Steuerknüppel gerade im Driftflug getestet, um zu se
That is affirmative. I have the balloon on. However, I haven't se
Houston, comment lisez
Are we
लोगों का रवैया
20 20 19.
了解、フレッド。読み上げは順調です。パネル16から始めましょう。フライトディスプレイの1行目：SEクロスポインター、開；システムブラボー - クアッド1 TCA、閉；クアッド2、閉；クアッド3、閉；クアッド4、閉。2行目、照明：フラッドは任意です。ロジックパワーブラボー、開；ス
좋습니다. 1번 패널의 다음 부분은 그대로 두고, 2번 패널에서는 추진제 토크백까지 쭉 내려가서 괄호 안의 "8"을 지우고 "4에서 회색까지"라고 쓴 다음, 연필로 "추진제 토크백, 4, 이발소 기둥까지"라고 한 줄을 그으세요. 
حسناً. واضح تما
CONTR
着陸姿勢制御ブレーカーが開いていることを表示してください。パネルの2番目のブレーカ
Non so se riesci a distinguere le caratteristiche lì, Vance, su
（レトロロケットの）1号機を
いい感じです
Questa è l'affermazione sbagliata: abbiamo la navicella spaziale giusta. Ti do un indizio: se co
저는 1시간 정도 자고 11시 30분에 일어났습니
Roger. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich steuere Fly-by-Wire, in der Gegenwart. Ich habe keinen Schub für die linke Gierachse
ठीक है। अभी-अभी हमें लगभग एक मिनट के लिए एकदम स्थिर स्थिति मिली है। सुई ऊपर-नीचे हो रही थी, और पिच और यॉ की सुइयाँ भी इधर-उधर हिल रही थीं, लेकिन अब ऐसा लगता है कि स्थिति अपने आप स्थिर हो गई है। हम फ्यूल सेल पर्जिंग पूरी कर रहे हैं। नंबर
好了，我准备重新开始
Ok. Abbiamo un allineamento del telescopio, se vuoi provarci. La tua stella del sestante è ancora buona, ma se hai avuto problemi, abbiamo scoperto che se guardi attraverso il telescopio, abbiamo un perno e un perno che dovr
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. أنظر الآن إلى نفس المنطقة، ويبدو أنها تعكس بعضًا من ضوء الأرض. لست متأكدًا مما إذا كان قد تم حسابها لتكون عند طور صفري تقريبًا - حسنًا، على الأقل هناك جدار واحد من الفوهة يبدو أكثر إضاءة من غيره، وهذا الجدار - إذا كنا نحاذي الأرض بشكل صحيح - يبدو أنه عند طور
Roger. Molto bene. Pausa. Le previsioni meteo per l'area di atterraggio in questo momento sono 2000 raffiche sparse, alte e sparse, 10 migli
روجر. أود أن تعلم أن هذا السعي وراء العلم قد تسبب في فقداني لبرنامج الذاكرة الخاص 
この辺りの詳しい状況については後ほど説明しますが、形、角、粒度など、ありとあらゆる岩石が集まっているように見えます。色については、ゼロ位
Va bene, Buzz. È... lo scopo è il sorvolo. SPS/G&N: 62815, più 097, meno 020 070 54 5944, meno 00028, più 00023, più 00069 029 149 312, l'apogeo è NA, più 00221 00078 001 00034, stella del sestante 01 23
D'accord. Je voulais juste vous indiquer la séquence dans laquelle vous vous trouvez. Une fois cela te
روجر. يسألك مركز عمليات هيوستن عن وضعك وما إذا كان هناك أي تغيير في خطة رحلت
जी हाँ। मुझे बता दीजिए। मुझे ठीक से याद नहीं कि मैं कब सोने गई थी। लेकिन लगभग - मैं उसके 15 मिनट बाद सो गई और लगभग 10 मिनट पहले उठी
Et, Jack, nous aimerions que vous laissiez la configuration COMM telle quelle jusqu'à ce que nous obten
Roger, il y a 15 minutes. Jim, je vais te transmettre la procédure générale de rentrée atmosphérique. Tu recevras la mise à jour 63-1 et les détails de ton prochain passage au-dessus des États-Unis de la part de Gus. Après la rétropropulsion, la procédure générale consiste à revenir en position normale, tête baissée, pour une portance maximale jusqu'à 400 K. Nous te donnerons un angle d'altitude à maintenir jusqu'à 400 K, puis tu devras effectuer une inclinaison de 15 degrés par seconde jusqu'à ce que l'altimètre descende en dessous de la butée, soit environ 100 K, puis revenir à une portance maximale jusqu'à la stab
Adesso divertiti, Gemini 4, e c
أضاء مؤشر عطل وضعية المنصة 
Theta, 11,8; Bereich 68,90; Delta-V gesamt 232; Delta-VI 101,1; Datenpunkt 05:40. Daten 12
نعم، كان جهاز الاتصال الخاص بك مشغولاً طوال الوقت ولم نتمكن 
제가 그분들께 
Roger. Non ho ricevuto i
D
समर्थन करन
टीएम अब टूट रहा है। फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, क्या आप जीएमटी टाइम
えっと、タイマーを動かして、何を入れようか？ミッションタイマー
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Per vostra informazione, l'All Star Game si è appena concluso con la vittoria della
खैर, मैं चुपके से उस जगह में घुस रहा हूँ जहाँ वह नहीं है... वैसे, इसमें हमारे X-अक्ष के चारों ओर कुछ डगमगाहट जरूर होगी क्योंकि अब चंद्रमा और प
Roger, Seven
حسنًا، أثناء قيامي باللصق، سأضع صمام تد
Roger. Unders
目の前の小さな海原に、はっきりとした小さな衝突クレーターが現れました。かなり新しいもので、もう1つ近づいてきていま
吉姆，我们准备把电池重新接通电源。请你打开16号配电盘上的“交叉连接平衡负载”断路器，然后把2号
ह्यूस्टन, आज वही लोग विजेता हैं जिन्होंने कहा था कि हम ठीक-ठीक यह नहीं बता पाएंगे कि
確認してもらいますが、今のと
5
好的。继续，
Houston, Apollo 11. Out of curiosity, on those 70 mm cameras, we figure we exposed around 300 in the and around
收到。检
Роджер. Отл
, Canary. Be advised, on your 15 second burn you achieved a 12.6 ft/sec. Did you
Und in Houston wollen wir sicherstellen, dass wir uns genügend Zeit nehmen, um die richtige Einstellung für den Brennvorgang zu erreic
Okay. Wir haben Ihr Verhalten beobachtet und ich denke, wir haben die nötigen Daten, um daran zu arbeiten. Wir werden uns eine Weile damit
네, 저희 연료에는 TCP
Apollo 8, Housto
Der Chirurg möchte wissen, 
Ci stiamo avvicinando allo Fo
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы
مرحباً، موتشيا كاب كوم، أورورا سفن. واضح تماماً. كيف حالي
Шум в пе
Okay. What I got, Jack, was the procedure assumes that all
Ok, Jack. Stavo pensando a un interrutto
Хорошо, Фред. Это процедура для получения показаний температуры топливного бака спускаемого аппарата. Это не большая проблема, но наши специалисты говорят, что нижняя часть спускаемого аппарата, вероятно, остывает, и мы просто хотим убедиться, что с топливным баком спускаемого аппарата все будет в порядке. Сейчас, похоже, он не замерзнет в течение нескольких часов после того, как опустеет, но м
Ja, hier unten ist ein Elch, den du dir nicht vorstellen kannst. Der ist der größte, den ich je gesehen habe. Mann, ist der riesig! Der ist gigantisch! So groß, dass ich ihn nicht mal durchs Fenster kriege. Willst du ihn dir ansehen? Das ist der größte Elch, den du j
Okay. That's affirmative. We need them 
All right. You can anticipate a fuel cell purge at, and we ought to be through with battery A charging somewhere after; and looks like you'll have just about a full battery there. And we 
Der sekundäre Kühlkreislauf sah wirklich gut aus. Der Radiator scheint gut abgedichtet zu sein, und alle anderen Komponenten arbeiten einwandfrei. Die Hauptsauerstoffregler wurden bei unserer Überprüfung mit 104 psi befüllt. In der Mondumlaufbahn ist mit einem Wasserverdampfungsbedarf von etwa 1 Pfund pro Stunde zu rechnen. Dies ist jedoch nur eine Schätzung; die Angaben zum Wasserverdampfungsbedarf variieren stark, von sehr viel bis gar keinem Wasserverdampfungsbedarf. Die nächste Wasserabgabe erfolgt im Anschluss, sodass Sie sich bis dahin keine Sorgen machen müssen. Die Kommunikationsprognose
罗杰。我感觉很好。上次有人告诉我温度是102华氏度（约39摄氏度）。我感觉没那么热。机舱温度是101华氏度（约38摄氏度）。我读到的温度也是101华氏度（约38摄氏
Je tiens à préciser que, même si, pour une raison ou une autre, nous manqu
Apollo 13, Houston. OMNI Alfa jetzt 
Dis, Fred, quand tu auras un peu de temps pour mâcher ce bœuf, tu pourrais nous dire quelles
ठीक है, बस एक-दो मिनट और
विश्व और राष्ट्रीय समाचारों और विशेष लेखों के संदर्भ में बस इतना ही। खेल पृष्ठ पर, कंसास सिटी चीफ्स के हैंक स्ट्रैम को एएफएल कोच ऑफ द ईयर चुना गया। तीन सीज़न में यह उनका दूसरा पुरस्कार है। मतदान एसोसिएटेड प्रेस के 30 खेल लेखकों और कमेंटेटरों के एक पैनल द्वारा किया गया, जिसमें प्रत्येक शहर से तीन-तीन सदस्य शामिल थे। उनके सबसे करीबी वोटर वीब इवबैंक को मिले। अन्य कोच जिन्हें वोट मिले उनमें सैन डिएगो के सिड गिलमैन और डेनवर के लू सबिन शामिल थे। कल के श्राइनर्स कॉलेज ऑल स्टार गेम की बात करें तो, नॉर्थ ने साउथ को 3-0 से हराया। मिशिगन स्टेट के डिक बर्लिंस्की ने पहले क्वार्टर में 23 गज का फील्ड गोल दागा और बुधवार को श्राइनर्स कॉलेज ऑल स्टार फुटबॉल गेम में साउथ को हराने के लिए नॉर्थ को बस इतना ही चाहिए था। चलिए देखते हैं, मुझे लगता है कि इस मैच की दिलचस्प बातें ये हैं कि फर्स्ट डाउन में नॉर्थ 19, साउथ 16; रशिंग में नॉर्थ 214, साउथ 169; पासिंग स्कोर उत्तर में 96 और दक
Roger. Joan n'était pas là
Относительная влажность в салоне составляет 20%. Количество хладагента — 66%. Температура в скафандре — 68 градусов, давление — 5,8, температура пара — 50 градусов в контуре
D'accord, Jack. On va instaurer des horaires réguliers de veille et de sieste. Fred est resté éveillé longtemps, alors je me suis levé un peu plus tôt pour 
«Аполлон-11»
Roger, Fred. Vorrei confermarvi che state ricevendo acqua potabile dal modulo di comando e, se potete fare una stima di quanta ne usate nel tempo e quanta ne avete già consumata, ve ne saremmo grati 
罗杰，阿波罗11号。我们准备启动一个激光装置——这是一束蓝绿色的激光，我们将以一秒亮、一秒灭的频率让它闪烁。它来自埃尔帕索附近的麦克唐纳天文台，应该就在晨昏线附近，或者说就在晨昏线
네, 알겠습니
نع
Okay, Jack. Tried the procedure an
ठीक है। प्रतीक्षा कीजिए। मुझे लगता है कि हम यहां एडाप्टर एंटीन
Okay. Schritt 6 war „Drehung um die Gierachse mit bis zu 0,3 Grad pro Sekunde“; das sind ungefähr 21 Imp
Ro
네. 문제가 해결된
Tout se passe bien ici maintenant. Jim s'est endormi… quatre heures d
Roger, Bill. Si vous avez le filtre polarisant sous la main, pourriez-vous essayer de le placer
A
Okay. Jetzt haben wir
Gemini VIII, Houston CAP COM. Si vous avez le temps, fai
1, G&N: 62710, +098, -019, allumage 075 49 4965, -28897, -03944, -00686. Roulis 358, tangage 226, 347; 01692, +00610; 29173 602 29108; étoile sextant 31 1066 358. Le reste du PAD est NA. Alignement Vega et Deneb 243 183 012. Pas de marge de manœuvre. L'horizon sera visible juste en dessous du bord supérieur de la fenêtre d'écoutille 2 minutes avant la combustion. Il ne sera pas visible dans la fenêtre de rendez-vous à gauche. à 75 heures 41 minutes 23 secondes. à 76 15 29. sans la brûlure 76 05 30. Les valeurs que vous verr
Roger
I have switched to VOX transmit and record. I am satisfied that I can see yaw through the window on without the use of the reticle 
로저. 그곳을 가로지르는 일련의 균열 또는 단층들은 남쪽으로 약 세 단계에 걸쳐 아래로 내려갑니다. 북쪽의 평행한 단층 패턴도 중앙에서 아래로 내려갑니다. 지구에 계신 여러분 모두 저희가 이 지평선이 얼마나 불길하고 어둡고 식욕을 떨어뜨리는 곳인지 이해하실 수 있기를 바랍니다. 저희는 지금 이 매끄러운 지역, 즉 '고요의 바다'라고 불리는 곳에 선정된 미래 착륙 지점 중 한 곳으로 접근하고 있습니다. 이 지역은 초기 착륙 시도 시 산을 피해야 하는 번거로움을 없애기 위해 매끄럽게 조성되었습니다. 이제 달의 일출 그림자가 길
Ok, Houston. Guarda il registro 3 sui dati. Q
Roger. Poursuivons avec le Maroon Bugle. Le président Nixon a surpris vos épouses en les appelant de San Francisco juste avant d'embarquer pour venir vous rencontrer. Elles ont toutes été très touchées par votre allocution télévisée. Jan et Pat l'ont suivie depuis le centre de contrôle des missions. Le lancement d'Intelsat depuis Cap Canaveral a été reporté pour la quatrième fois hier soir. Le problème serait dû à un dysfonctionnement du régulateur d'azote du deuxième étage de Delta. Une nouvelle tentative de lancement aura lieu ce soir. Le sous-marin de recherche Ben Franklin, qui étudie le Gulf Stream, a établi un record en dérivant pendant 24 heures entre 3 et 30 mètres au-dessus du fond marin, par 400 mètres de fond au large des côtes de Géorgie. La mission est dirigée par Jacques P
Okay. Diese mundgerechten Häppchen wurden entwickelt, um das Problem der vielen Krümel in der Kabine zu lösen. Deshalb wurde eine spezielle Größe gewählt, damit man sie alle auf einmal zum Mund führen kann. Ich denke, dank unserer Erfahrung haben wir festgestellt, dass wir uns noch deutlich weiterentwickeln und einige der Mahlzeiten, die wir auf der Erde zu uns nehmen, nachahmen könnten. Tatsächlich haben wir auf diesem Flug Brotstücke und Schinkenaufstrich dabei; und ich werde Ihnen hoffentlich zeigen, wie einfach es ist, Schinken in der S
好了，我
Rog
I've got an update for you if you're not too busy to copy either
Bien reçu. Nous notons la charge de la batterie dès que possible, ainsi que l'assiette pour l'optique CAL: roulis 330,5, tangage 086,3 et lacet à zéro. L'assiette prévue dans le plan de vol est correcte; j
Roger: 10-minute readiness announced. Helmet is closed. Everything fine, 
Everything continues to look very good here on the ground. I've got a reading here on the ground for c
哥伦比亚号，下次飞行时，我们希望你不要进行常规搜索，而是搜索我们之前给出的坐标附近区域。这些坐标是我们根据地图物理特性和飞行轨迹做出的最佳分析。此外，我们还有另一组坐标，希望你搜索其附近区域。这组坐标是基于宇航员下降过程中观察到的所有地质特征的解读而确定的。第二个搜索点的坐标是Mike 0.7和8.0。我再说一遍，Mike 0.7和8
嗯，在我们注意到PCO2
它比 Antares 和
هذا هو القمر الصناعي جيميني 7/6 في طريقه إلى هونولولو.
好的。我闭着眼睛，使劲摇头，上下、俯仰、翻滚、偏航。胃里空空如也；浑身都空空如也。现在——我试着按一下归零键，时间归零键。好吧，我没按到。
روجر، إد. نر
现在，我们想知道那个时
좋아요, 켄. 제 생각엔 곧 높은 수익률을 놓칠 것 같아요. 다음에 다시 
ठीक है। आपकी पीठ पर्स से सटी हुई है। ठीक है। अब यह ऊपर है। आगे औ
로저, 오로라 세
Хорошо, да
알겠습니다. 저는 그 작업을 하지 
ठीक है। 47 घंटे में कुल 1096 सिलेंडर, जिनमें अल्फा 270, ब्रावो 278, चार्ली 270, डेल्टा 2
Okay, Houston. Ihr seid etwas zu spät dran. Unser Manöver ha
D'accord. Donc,
5時だ、イーグル。燃
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Мы вас остановили в PTC; ваше поведение нам кажется хорошим. Майк, я хотел бы проверить связь. Последние несколько передач с космического корабля были искажены, особенно от Базза.
ポジション6、テスト完了、D-8、4回
了解しました。現在OMNI D（Dog
Ich glaube, ich hab's verstanden, Buzz. Das stimmt. Aber als er das zweite Mal – d
我已做好随时开工的准备。
Bon, j'imagine que s'ils ne voient aucun chiffre, c'est un peu u
C'est exact. Ils tournaient autour d'un autre axe
हाँ, ठीक है। पैड्स पर बात शुरू करने से पहले, एक और बात। सूर्य के कमांडर विंडो में होने और तारों के दिखने जैसी जो सामान्य जानकारी हमने आपको पहले दी थी, जिसका इस्तेमाल बर्न के लिए आपके एटीट्यूड के सामान्य संकेत के रूप में किया जा सकता था, वह सब अब मायने नहीं रखती। हम केवल पहले किए गए सूर्य के निरीक्षण के आधार पर ही आगे बढ़ रहे हैं और हमें नहीं लगता कि हमारे पास इतनी पर्याप्त जानकारी है कि हम आपको विंडो में 
Okay. Copy that, Fred. Thank you very much; 38.9 and 1.9. And is simply making as smoo
I believe so. I haven't heard anything fairly lately, and it's
Oh, es schneit. Nein, nein, nicht ganz. Die Fenster sind ziemlich mitgenommen, und ich schätze, wir werden versuchen, aus dem Fenster des Servicemoduls zu schießen, denn jedes Fenster im 
支
حسنًا. لقد أخطأنا في مجموعة النسخ الاحتياطية. كا
रॉजर। अच्छा, फ्रैंक अभी सो गया है, और बिल अभी तक नहीं उठा है। मैं आपको बताता हूँ मैं क्या करूँगा। मैं पंखे चलाऊँगा और केबिन का तापमान ब
确认
هاوسكوين - هيوستن، ترانكويليتي. هل لديك طريقة لعرض شكل قاطع دائرة ذراع المحرك؟ انتهى. السبب في سؤالي هو أن طرفه يبدو مكسورًا. أعتقد أنه يمكننا دفعه للداخل مرة أخرى. لست متأكدًا مما إذا كان بإمكاننا سحبه للخارج 
알았어, 프레드. 아주 사소한 점 하나만 
Beh, Houston, non abbiamo avuto molto tempo per parlarti della vista dal finestrino mentre ci preparavamo per l'espulsione; ma fino a quel momento avevamo l'intera parte settentrionale dell'emisfero illuminato visibile, inclusi il Nord America, il Nord Atlantico, l'Europa e il Nord Africa. Potevamo vedere che il tempo era buono ovunque, quasi ovunque. C'era una depressione ciclonica nel Canada settentrionale, nell'Athabaska, probabilmente a est della zona di Athabaska. La Groenlandia era limpida, e sembrava che stessimo vedendo solo la calotta glaciale della Groenlandia. Tutto il Nord Atlantico era piuttosto buono; e l'Europa e il Nord Africa sembravano limpidi. La maggior parte degli Stati Uniti era limpida. C'era una bassa pressione, sembrava un fronte che si estendeva dal centro del paese fino a nord dei Grandi Laghi e f
Okay. Houst
아니요. 사실, 저는 주변을 살펴보고 습기가 있는지 확인하기 위해 꽤 오랫동안 전면 패널을 열어둔 채로 작동시켜 왔습니다. 실제로, 이곳의 상대 습도가 약간 낮아졌고 우
Gemin
罗杰。您的 GMTB…更正，15 57 00。您的地面燃烧时间，01 33 00。您的燃烧速度变化量，0
자동 경광등. 경광등이
تؤكد أجهزة الكمبيوتر الأرضية لدينا أن زاوية المحور والمحور الدوار لديك تشير إلى النجم. مع ذلك، يبدو أن هذه الزاوية تشير أيضًا إلى داخل هيكل القمر الصناعي، لذا فبينما سترى أفق الأرض، س
好的。电源6。好的。电源6指的是11号配电盘。你应该按照图表操作，除了我提到的那些断路器。第一行没问题。或者说，第一排。第二排，四联断路器4，TCA，闭合；四联断路器3，TCA，闭合；四联断路器2，TCA，闭合；四联断路器1，TCA，闭合。这一排的其余部分都没问题。第三排，大约在中间位置，ATCA（PGNS），闭合。好的。这一排的其余部分都没问题。第四行，加热器 - 待机。好的。这一行除了最后三个断路器（Fred，在下方，即待机，运行）之外，其他都没问题。这三个断路器至少暂时应该闭
그건 확
Quando si muove là fuori, fa davvero oscillare la navicella spazial
Колумбия, Хьюстон
روجر. النجما
はい、しかし、これはそうなるはずでした - 向こう側でそれ
«Дружба Семь», это Canary Cap Com. Не могли бы вы начать свой репорта
Бортовая навигационная система указывает на перицинфич
I never did get an accelerometer bias to check on the platform. I was thrusting most of the time there, and unable to really settle the thing down for any length of time. We skipped a couple tape dumps I guess, because of the peculiar attitude that w
로저. 잘했어, 프레드. 이제 8단계로 넘어갈 거야. PRO 버튼을 누르면 5018이 깜빡이는 걸 볼 수 있어. 좋아. 5018이 나오면 자세를 자동(AUTO)으로 조정해야 해. PRO 버튼을 누르고 유도 제어(GUIDANCE CONTROL), PNGS, 모드 제어(MODE CONTROL), PNGS, AUTO를 누르면 돼. 그러면 이 자세를 얻게 돼. 이제 태양 관측을 위한 자세가 될 거야. 이 프로그램에서는 도킹된 상태에서 1.4도의 데드밴드를 사용하고 있어. 도움이 되도록 바늘을 확인해 보면 돼. 바늘이 0도(또는 널)를 지나 데드밴드 안에 들어오면 태양이 얼마나 가까이 있는
Roger, Friendship Seven. 
了解。20
ジェミニVIII、こちらヒューストン。君の反応は読
Vous l'avez déjà mentionné à l'infini; permettez-moi de le 
自动
موجود، لكنه ليس في منتصف السدس تمامًا؛ أظن أنه منحرف - 0.02 أو رقم غريب كهذا. حسنًا، بعد فعل ذلك، اضغط على زر الفعل 37، ثم اضغط على زر الإدخال... اضغط على زر الإدخال، وسأضبط ا
Oui. C'était 
Vérifions si nous obtenons effectivement un lacet. Ils ont tendance à m
Nu
Okay. We're about - inside 10 minutes till. We'll be picking you up again at, and we'll have all of the TV types' information standing by. In the event that the situation develops again, for pointing accuracies, if I see anything that looks like a terminator or anything of that nature, I'm going to call the dark side of it 12 o'clock, and use that as a reference system, and we'll try that. If that doesn't dope out any problems with camera pointing, why I may try - call for a plus pitch, and then I'll just
Okay. Per riportare la deadband più tardi a, NOME 01, INVIO; 3011, INVIO
Okay. Ich lese sie hier zuerst schnel
रॉजर। बज़, तुम इस अंदाज़ में बहुत अच्छे लग रहे हो। हम तुम्हें पाँच-पाँच
Sì, Jerry, vedo il punto luminoso. È... credo sia il punto subsolare. Mi sembra che sia al largo del Sud America. È una macchia grigiastra rispett
13，休
रॉजर। दुनिया भर की खबरों में, प्यूब्लो का दल कल दोपहर
Роджер. 
حسنًا، لقد حصلنا على نسخة قديمة من لعبة OAMS. لم 
حسنًا. المنطقة 27-2: 96.2+02.08 27 55.6+35.10+58. المنطقة 28-2: ΔV 111.2+20.
हाँ। मैं सहमत हूँ, जैक। जैक स्विंगर्ट और मैं थोड़ी देर पहले ऊपर गए थे और हम दोनों एक-एक कनस्तर ले आए थे। हम कुछ सामान ढूंढ रहे थे और सोच रहे थे कि इनका इस्तेमाल कैसे करें। दरअसल, यही वजह है कि जब हमने पीने का सारा पानी तैयार किया, तो हमें पेंट्री में 
可能であれば、何らかの方法で文書化できれば確かにいいだろうということには同意しますが、そうは思えません.
रॉजर। समझ गया। ह्यूस्टन सलाह देता है कि ईंधन का इस्तेमाल सावधानी से करें। इन जांचों के लिए वे लगभग 10 पाउं
Copia. 0.5. Fuo
헤어져서 정말 안타깝네요. 다시는
Ok, Jim. Quindi vogliamo che l'asse Y della navicella s
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह इंडियन कॉम टेक है एचएफ और यूएचएफ पर। कैस
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Скоро состоится передача эстафеты в Голдстоун, и качество нисходящего канала связи тогда не улучшится. Не знаю, заметите ли вы разницу в восходящем кана
マイナス0
Z кал выключ
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। हमें आपका रक्तचाप मा
سأمنحك وقتاً رجعياً لنهاية المهمة، وأود منك 
La première fois, le voyant DCS s'est allumé, mais je n'avais pas activé l'IGS. La d
了解
Roger. Iniziamo con le notizie sportive. Il lanciat
Das war Neil. Hier spricht Buzz. Ich wünschte, wir könnten herausfinden, wann mein Rasen das letzte Mal gemäht wurde. En
알았어, 잭. CAB
No
Roger. 11, /: 45597, 0 - correzione - cioè meno 040, più 157, più 36325, meno 01727, più 01428 180 003 000, November Alfa, p
Okay, die OVERRIDE-Funk
Okay, well, use tho
Roger. That's fine with us. And in that
यह तो बहुत ही मज़ेदार खेल लगता है, मैं समझ सकता हूँ कि आपको और स्कॉट को यह क्यों पसंद है। मुझे अभी एक अजीब चीज़ दिख रही है। मै
We have a violent left roll here at the pres
阿波罗8号，在我们等待高增益期间，我将继续进行轨迹概要。我们仍然可以从13号返回太平洋中线，你们将在点火138秒后开始返回。138秒足以让你们脱离蝶形区。我们建议在20秒后不要尝试预点火或重启。如果超过20秒，轨迹可能会超出修正范围——修正能力足以让飞船自由返回。回收区的天气状况良好。我们有跟踪和无跟踪两种情况。在点
حسناً، أبولو 8. يبدو أن هذا من شأنه أن ينهي عملية تنظيف خلية
Вот пара пакетов — и, думаю, содержимое каждого 
Верно. Затем вам нужно будет установить таймер миссии, и мы включили только таймер миссии на MDC. Вам, вероятно, 
Roger. Esatto, andiamo avanti e osse
0.1도 차이일 뿐입니다. 아마 GDC는 그보다
로저. 금방 끝날 
心配しないでください。3分
حسنًا يا قائد. لقد وجدنا طريقةً لتدفئتك. قررنا البدء بتشغيلك الآن، وما نريده منك هو أن تأخذ قائمة التحقق الخاصة بك وتبدأ من الأعلى حيث كُتب "تشغيل التغذية العادية للخفاش 5"، ثم تنتقل كما هو موضح إ
Nun bin ich wieder beim Kreuz des Südens mit dem h
Oh, Roger. Aspetta
لا أعتق
Хорошо, Фред. То, чт
Ja, Sir. Moment – ​​ich überprüfe kurz die Luke und die Dichtigkeit; vielleicht kann ich Ihnen dazu etwas sagen. Und ich habe eine Antwort auf Ihre Frage zur Stromversorgung der Versorgungsleitungen. Die Versorgungsleitungen werden gemäß den Vo
Warten Sie 1. V
气球已经泄气了。我看不出有什么理由不让它一
والي، نعم، هنا في نهاية الجزء السادس.
迈克，在其他人睡觉之前，我先跟你说说我的情况；睡了大约 3 个小时，又吃了一顿饭，
هذا مثير للاهتمام حقًا. السطح ناعم جدًا، لكن في بعض الأما
Frank, ce que nous voulons faire, c'est obtenir une poussée radiale ascendante; et tant que vous le pouvez, grâce aux optiques ou à un autre moyen d'observation par la fenêtre, déterminer la position de la Terre, puis utiliser les propulseurs appropriés pour une poussée radiale ascendante de 90 cm/s. C'est ce que nous recherchons pour des raisons d
Decollo 16:41:00! Decoll
Давление в салоне держится в районе 4,8–5,0, на самом низком уро
Okay. Die Systeme sehen grundsätzlich gut aus, Bill. In wenigen Minuten steht ein Kryo-Lüfterzyk
我们
这是友谊七号。太阳，我想在太阳落山的时候在这里做个标记。现在太阳在地平线上，两侧都是湛蓝的天空。我会在最后做个标记。太阳正在缓缓落下。准备好
س
Хьюсто
Roger, Houston. What we plan t
好的。我查阅了资料，关于那226个断路器，其中涉及六个断路器，它们都是——它们是配电盘最下面一排从左数起的前六个。它们在“照明”电路下。我们需要断开三个“泛光”断路器，以及三个“数字/整数”断路器——我不是说断开，我是说闭合
우리는 현재 위치와 
我不知道，但我感觉我可能要崩溃了，要拉屎
Nachdem wir uns stabilisiert hatten, überprüften wir unser gesamtes Schubregelungssystem und stellten fest, dass wir keine Gier- oder Rollsteuerung hatten – oder dass wir keine Giersteuerung der Giertriebwerke hatten, da unse
No, ma laggiù è pieno giorno, vero? St
E, 13, siamo pronti in TV quando 
D'accord. Nous en avons discuté, et à 12 heures de l'événement, il semble que tout le monde pense que ce n'est pas nécessaire. Mais à court terme, cela ne semble pas avoir d'incidence sur la trajectoire. Si vous le souhaitez, nous avons suggéré de revoir la liste de vérification d'entrée et de la passer en revue en direct avec tou
Esatto. Jack, quello che stiamo facendo è alimentare il MAIN B e tutti questi carichi specifici, e ci stiamo preparando a garantire l'aliment
Ah, il fait sombre, voilà ce qui s'est passé. Il est face à une terre sombre. C
Und, Houston, h
了解しました。こちらでは地上のアンテナに少し問題があります。今はバックグラウンドノイズが多い中で、こちら側の通信が聞こえて
Il y a de magnifiques lucioles dehors. Dis donc, il y en a une qui
わかった。よかった。本当にいい写
PUGS इधर-उधर डगमगा रहा है। ठीक है, हम इसे नियंत्रित
أبول
Non, ce n'est pas grave. Ce qui est assez intéressant, c'est que lors de votre dernier déversement d'eau, ils ont constaté un changement dans le suivi de la trajectoire. Après analyse, ils ont trouvé quelqu'un qui pensa
Роджер, Эл. Я в автоматическом режиме; ретроград; переключатели гиромотора работают нормально; маневр отключен. Капсула подготовлена ​​для ретроградного движения, но для укладки двух карт. Я уверен, что мы готовы. У меня 81 процент автоматического режима (топливо), 80 процентов
Non saprei dirlo co
ब
Я бы сказал, что мы находимся примерно на 95 градусах восточ
Roger. Mon état est bon; la température de la combinaison a considérablement baissé; les températures des évents de vapeur sont maintenant de 69 degrés dans la cabine et la combinaison, la température de la combinaison est de 6
حسناً. كلاهما 
لا، لم أفعل. نظرتُ إلى الحلقة المط
هذا صحيح، و
哥伦比亚，休
Roger. Bitte warten. Ich habe die Startzeit für die LOX-Entleerung. Sie soll bei 5 + 03 + 07 beginnen und bei 5 + 04
मेरा मतलब यही है - कई बार ऐसा लगता है कि वहा
حسنًا يا فانس. لقد اكتشفنا بعض الأشياء لتعديل الخرطوشة. أولها كيس الغبار الخاص الذي كنا سنستخدمه على حقائب الحمل، وهو سميك جدًا وغير مسامي؛ وصعدنا إلى المطبخ في الطابق العلوي وقمنا بتفريغ الماء عدة مرات أخرى، وصنعنا مجموعة كبيرة من أكياس المشروبات، مرة أخرى؛ ومن المخزن، أحضرنا علبة بلاستيكية كبيرة نوعًا ما - مغلقة - تحتوي على أكياس المشروبات، وأعتقد أنه يمكننا قصها واستخدامها كغطا
Хорошо, 6 — п
Roger. We were checking into precise start and stop times for TV, and you are GO for the n
I can turn - tu
Это по
よし、バズ。フライバイが目的だ。SPS/G&N：62815、プラス097、マイナス020 070 54 5944、マイナス00028、プラス00023、プラス00069 029 149 312、遠地点はNA、プラス00221 00078 001 00034、六分
ठीक है, जैक। मैंने प्रक्रिया आजमाई और उस दबाव से हमने 10 ड्रिं
रॉजर। चरण 5: "ज
N
Roger. Vorremmo confermare con questo TPI che hai copiato correttamente con l'elevazione a 27,4 gradi e l
아니요, 제미니 4호입니다. 그리고 아폴로 랜드마크의 D-9 구역에 대해 주의하세요. 그곳에 접근하는 것을 허용
روجر. شكراً 
その時点で Retro Power を ARM に配置することになりますが、レトロな雰囲気を表現できるように、これを先頭に移
收到。燃烧时间11秒
Roger. Tout va bie
嘿，
Sie sind jetzt im vollen Umfang 
Très bien. Concernant le récipient d'échantillons mentionné dans la documentation: à la télévision, il nous a semblé que les échantillons destinés à ce récipient étaient effectivement sélectionnés en fonction des caractéristiques des roches elles-mêmes. Pourriez-vous nous d
अब हमारे पास लगभग 4
네, AC 버스 B 아래: S-밴드 안테나, 열림; 열림. AC 버스 A 아래: 테이프 레코더, 열림. 시스템 A 아래 2번째 줄: 메인 SOV. 쿼드 TCA부터 시작해서 네 개 모두 닫힘. 크로스 - 커맨더 크로스 포인터, 열림; 열림; 열림. 3번째 줄: 랑데부 레이더 대기, 열림; 착륙 레이더, 열림. 안정/제어: 자세 직접 제어, 닫힘.
Apollo 11, Houston. I have you
我感觉我的俯仰角有点问题，但我想这都是那该死的
收到。目前，关于月球表面书籍，我们没有任何更新可以告诉您。我们正在考虑一些细节，也正在讨论，但都只是些非常小的改
हाँ, मेरी चेकलिस्ट में ऐसा कुछ नहीं है। मुझे लगता है कि यह अच्छा विचार है क्योंकि हमें अपने केबिन के पंखों पर थोड़ा संदेह है और हम उनका 
这里天气其实相当不错。我想你下次飞过时或许能看到台风。下次你过来的
और, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस, व्हाइट टीम अब जा रही है और
रॉजर, आपको बता दें कि अभी तक हमें केबिन में तैरते
좋습니다, 11. 이번 임무에서 지금까지 두 번의 연소 동안 엔진 성능은 엔진 인수 시험 때와 동일한 것으로 나타났습니다. 온보드 PC 판독값은 실제 연소실 압력과 게이지 판독값 
Ken, deux éléments modifient légèrement le fonctionnement de l'échangeur de chaleur de cette combinaison. D'une part, nous n'effectuons pas de trempage à froid, et d'autre part, nous coupons l'alimentation du circuit secondaire au préalable. Je me demande s'il est judicieux, 
Tiens, Gus, laisse-moi me
FDM — там написано ATTITUDE (отношение). Вам, наверное, нужна RATE (скорость)
フレンドシップ・セブン、HFのバミューダ・キャ
Roger. Echo in Bereich 1: 1 Stunde, 15 Minuten, 42 Sekunden. Ich wiederhole: 1 Stunde, 15 Minuten, 42 Sek
哥伦比亚，休斯
Хорош
D'accord. Je vais couper le disjoncteur de l'amplificateur de pu
Grazie, signore
То, что ты видишь, Майк, это... Хьюстон, то, что ты видишь, это Западное полушарие. Вверху — Северный полюс; в центре — чуть ниже центра — Южная Америка — вплоть до мыса Горн. Я вижу Нижнюю Калифорнию и юго-западную часть Соединенных Штатов. Там большая длинная облачная полос
Okay, ich w
ठीक है, मैं कंप्यूटर चालू करत
मैं ठीक महसूस कर रहा हूँ, उड़ान जारी रखें। मशीन स
Yuri Alekseyevich, sposteremo subito questa stazione radio nel bunker. Quindi avremo 5 minuti di silenzio sul canale. Nikolay Petrovich e Pavel Romanovich andranno nel bunker. Io resterò qui fino al momento in cui saremo pronti, ma loro tr
В районе, над которым мы сейчас находимся, есть некоторые признаки возможной вулканической активности, хотя я пока не могу точно это определить. Некоторые
احصل على البيانات - احصل على 
Roger. Okay, Jim, wir haben entschieden, dass du noch etwas Treibstoff übrig hast, mit dem wir im Flugplan ex
Actuellement, mes trois axes sont pratiquement en rétroattitude. Le lacet mesuré à travers le réticule est généralement observé comme u
ل
Yes, that's right. Okay. That's all for that page, Fred. That should add up to s
Put yourself in start position to
ठी
Okay. Stand by. Let me run that o
잭, 물론 이 모든 일의 이유는 입구 배터리 중 하나가 20암페어시(Ah) 부족해서, 당신이 집까지 무사히 도착하려면
Rog
好的。燃烧时间为 2 分 40 秒，时间为 16 分 56 秒 01。达到 40
— Давайте сфотографируем 
فريندشيب سفن، كاب كوم. هل يمكنك أن تخبرنا بالصع
ねえ、私が読んだ数字を覚えておいて。書き留めなくてもいいから。少
네, 맞습니다. 이제 컴퓨터 화면에 37 ENTER 06 ENTER라는 메시지가 나타날 겁니다. 우리가 하려는 것은 컴퓨터를 대기 모드로 전환하는 것입니다. 37 
Хорошо. Вы слышали, что говорил с вами командир воздушного судна на мысе В
わか
もう一度言いますが、私は姿勢を操作しています、そして乗組員の状況報告は必要です
Sachez que le carburant pour voiture est à 63 % et ce
Oh, EECOMM ist zufrieden. Nachdem Sie alles eingerichtet haben, haben wir hier eine kleine Anleitung von EECOMM, um den O2-Durchfluss und den O2-Durchflusssensor in Ihrer Kabinenanreicherun
はい。キャニスターを使うことにしました。ご存知の通り、液冷服の周りには袋が付いていて、これも使えると思います。というか、使えると分かっています。実際に試してみました。
네. 모르시는 분들을 위해 설명드리자면, 여기는 각 기동에 대한 대부분의 데이터를 기록하는 곳입니다. 그리고 이와 비슷한 타임라인 책자가
Non, non, 
والي، لدينا بعض بيانات رصد إيكو. هل أنت مستع
Roger. En att
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous effectuons une correction de trajectoire à mi-parcours à environ 1,5 mètre par seconde. Le suivi 
そして、スプラッシュカーテンを取り付け、ネックダムを取り付け、キャビンエアーリサーキュレーションハンドルを上げます。左のシュノーケルハンドルとキャビンベントハンドルを上げます。ハッチ
Gli operatori televisivi non hanno acce
Eagle, Houston. We recommend the initial - Well, we 
मैं उससे पूछना चाहता हूँ कि आधे घंटे में जलकर राख हो जाने वाली चीज़ से छुटकारा पाने के लिए ये सब क्यों
И, Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, что
Und, Houston, viellei
Okay. Unten, Vorwärts-Ablassventil,
O
ठीक है। अब मैं आपकी बात अच्छे से समझ गया हूँ। बस आपको याद दिलाना चाहता था कि संचार बाधित होने की स्थिति में, हम नहीं चाहते कि आ
No, it sur
정확히 짚어
Well, what we were thinking about doing was boiling a little out of the secondary evaporator to check it out, just as a component check, something we need to do; but if there's somebody down there in the way, why, we can do that 
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Мы проверили углы ориентации, указанные в плане полета, на приборах здесь, внизу, и каждый раз получаем один и тот же результат. Мы думаем, что все идет правильно, Майк, и нас интересует, не может ли несимметричный горизонт создавать проблемы. Конец с
آه، كدتُ أفوت غروب الشمس الأول وأنا أحاول ضبط إضاءة المقصورة بشكل صحيح. إنه سريع كما قيل لي. لا أستطيع، ها هو نجم السماك الرامح (أركتوروس) في مكانه الصحيح تمامًا. جميل جدًا. سأتمكن من رؤية نجم موشيا قريبًا، عند الدقيقة 50. أواجه صعوبة في قراءة الساعة عند الدقيق
حسنًا. في أسفل الصفحة - حسنًا. لديك هذا بالفعل. التحكم
好的，没问题；电脑归
六分儀の後部窓の電球が切れているようですが、ヒューストンに
OK, Ron, pour MIDPAC: 000, 152, 001, 194, 46 06, 267, plus 1332, moins 16917, 064, 3
Да. Вам нужно выровнять его как можно точнее. Там написано, что за 15 минут до это
Roger, Houston. moins 11, /: 45597, moins 040, plus 157, plus 36325, moins 01727, plus 01428 180 003 000, non applicable, plus 00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254; Scorpii Delta, descente 103, gauche 48, plus 0742, moins 16500 13005 36327; Sir
D'accord. De plus, Jack, étant don
吉姆，我可以给你大致介绍一下指令舱G&N的升空流程。这是目前提出的方案。我们可能会想出更好的方案，但这是我们目前正在考虑的。首先，我们计划像中途飞行时那样，利用地球的瞄准点进行校准。然后，我们会进行一次体轴校准，ACS（自动控制系统）的400+5度角，使球体指向000度。之后，我们会给你一个球体姿态参数，让你飞向月球，并将光学系统指向月球。如果你能看到星星，我们也可以利用它们。然后，我们会给你一组等效的CDU（控制与数据单元）角度参数，让你输入这些参数并扭转平台。
هذا صحيح، أبولو 8. وسنوافيكم ببعض المعلومات الإضافية قريبًا. نعمل حاليًا على التحليق بالقرب من المركبة. وسنتحدث معكم بتفصيل أكبر عن مشكلة رصد النجوم باستخدام السدس والتلسكوب. وما نود فعله فور وصول الفريق الأسود إلى جهاز MOKR، مع وجود فريقين هنا، هو أن نستمع إلى شرحكم لما ترونه وما لا ترونه، وتحت أي ظروف، لنرى إن كان بإمكاننا توضيح ذلك ليفهمه الجميع. وإذا كا
Родже
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven
Джим, пора снова проверить зарядку аккумулятора. Запросите нап
Роджер, 11. У нас нет такой возможности. Для получения хорошей отметки нам необходимо, чтобы линия М была параллельна горизонту. Мы считаем, что, возможно, информацию о векторе 
Houston, Apollo 11. I've been holding here in control MINIMUM DEADBAND RATE LOW wi
没错；之后，你按照说明操作，得到一个闪烁的0688，然后我们就得加载了。如果你
Friendship Seve
Roger, F
休斯
제미니 4, 제미니 4, RKV 존 경. 혈압을 수신할 수 없습니다. 
Okay, Ed, Schatz, ich fange jetzt an – verdammt, was habe ich de
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 알겠습니다. 업링크는 끝났습니다.
حسنًا يا جاك، سنساومك في هذه المسألة. بدلًا من اثنين، نتمنى لو أنك ح
로저, 제미니 4호입니
आप कह रहे हैं कि आ
Ha montato la telecamera esterna da 60 mm e sta prepara
Friendship Seven, Guaymas. Tu étais à l'antenne quand la connexion a com
Apollo 8, en attendant le gain maximal, je vais poursuivre le résumé de la trajectoire. Nous pouvons encore rejoindre la ligne du Pacifique central à partir du treizième point, et vous êtes en route après 138 secondes de combustion. Ces 138 secondes vous permettent de sortir de la zone de correction. Nous recommandons de ne pas tenter de pré-allumage ni de redémarrage après 20 secondes. Au-delà de 20 secondes, la trajectoire pourrait dépasser la capacité de correction pour un retour libre. Les conditions météorologiques dans la zone de récupération sont bonnes. Nous avons un suivi et un sans. Pendant la combustion, vous pourriez remarquer une légère variation de pression dans la chambre et les réservoirs en raison de l'épuisement du carburant dans le réservoir de stockage et de son transfert vers le réservoir de décantation. Cela pourrait se produire entre 2 et 5 secondes après le début de la combustion. Il s'agira d'une légère variation de pression dans les deux systèmes. Concernant les systèmes, tous sont opérationnels. Nous voulons empêcher l'ébullition de l'eau après pour des raisons de trajectoire. Votre situation de vidange d'eau semble correcte; vous devriez être en bonne voie pour plus de. Nous allons essayer de retarder la vidange d'eau jusqu'apr
अगर आप थके हुए हैं, तो मैं
Vorrei che trovassimo 
Friendship Seven, qui Indian Cap Com. Vi informiamo che abbiam
ठीक है। क्या आपने केप कॉम को बात करते सुना - ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम आपको एसेन्शन के ऊपर हवाई-भूमि स्थानांतरण के दौरान ब
ठीक है। समझ गई। मुझे पता था कि सुबह ऑक्सीजन और हाइड्रोजन निकालने का एक और सेशन होगा; मुझे पक्का नहीं था कि आप इसे करवाना चाहती हैं या नहीं। मैं अगले सेशन तक इं
حسناً. لا يبدو أ
D'accord. Ensuite, panneau 3: TRANSPONDEUR, PRIMAIRE; AMPLIFICATEUR DE PUISSANCE, sur PRIMAIRE (vérification); AMPL
Хорошо
روجر. أفهم 
Roger. Siamo con 
Houston, Ap
Roger. Wir haben die Diagramme überprüft und genau dasselbe Ergebnis erhalten wie du. Deine Vorgehensweise scheint sehr gut zu sein; es war wohl ein sehr guter Ansatz. Du hast daran gedacht, die Geschwindigkeit zu mitteln. Wir haben die Aufgabe auch selbst bere
عندما ن
下には何も見えません。ご存知
No. I don't believe so, I t
Ah, je comprends. Vous pensez
И, Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Эти маневры автоматической оптики, или P23, автоматические маневры, похоже, не ведут к субзвездной точке. Можете ли вы определить углы крена, тангажа и рыскания для субзвездной точки на этой звезде? Это 
?: 12 53 00. Он п
로저. 케이프는 출발 준비 완료, 저도 출발 준비 완료입니다. 
こ
आगे बढ़ो, 
अपोलो 8, 
送信中です。今は
찰리, 이제 옴니로 바꿔야겠어요. 목소리
不，我一个
그리고 물병자리 여러분, 이 작업을 진행하는 동안 여러분의 업무 및 휴식 주기에 대한 비행 계획 업데이트안을 제안해 드렸습니다.
つまり、
Roger. Nous sommes prêts. 
네, 제 카드에도 그 내용이 있고, 워터타운에서도 HF로 제게 알려줬습니다. 하지만 워터타운에서도, 당신도 제 목소리를 듣지 못했죠. 저는 당신 목소리를 아주 또렷하게 들었습니다
Je n'arrive jamais à destination avec les pieds ple
L'objectif de celui-ci est fichu... celui de l'autre est HS... Le sextant est HS. La caméra 16 mm ne fonctionne qu'une fois sur deux. Je vais peut-être 
알겠습니다. 육분의에서 어떤 전구가 나갔는지 알려주시면 감사하
Roger. Entry PAD: area is the mid Pacific, roll 000, 152, 001, 19
これ以上話さなければ、このテープレコーダーをリアルタイムで録音するのにそれほど時間はかからないでしょう。さあ、始めましょう。あなたが自分の態度を本当に気にしていないのは明らかです。いつも、本来あるべき態度に戻ろうとすることに気を取
さあ、ヒューストン
Roger, hier spricht Friendsh
Roger, Houston. Ich bin gerade au
سأقدم لكم طريقة جديدة. عند إشارت
Gyros in gabbia
Pourriez-vous nous fournir une mesure actualisée des angles de votre cardan? S'il vous plaît, lorsque votre axe X pos
सीबी,, 16, बैट फीड टाई, उनमें
Okay. Alle Geräte sind verstaut. Die Sekundärpumpe B 
Eine Sekunde zu früh. Okay. HAUPTBI
Roger. D
Хьюстон,
夏威夷，请进。双子座4
10 - 9 - 8 - 7 - 6 - 5 - 4
我这里风很大
はい。いくつか項目があります。まず、0.3度の回転速度を得るには、R1を昨夜と同様に375 - 0.375度にする必要
Roger. Stand by one, please. Do you have a relative bearing for
حسنًا، ها أنا ذا. لا. يا إ
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。了解。バッテリー充電設定をコピーしました。
Okay. Wir können sie nur sehr schlecht erkennen. Nun ja, eigentlich werden sie jetzt besser sichtbar. Es sieht aus wie kleine Punkte, die von der oberen linken Bildschirmhälfte nach rec
Je vous recontacte après une pause d'environ 45 minutes. Nous avons remarqué que, concernant votre antenne à gain élevé, vous pourriez l'utiliser plus efficacement en passant de
खैर, आप अपनी पसंद के अनुसार चुनाव करें,
Stai cavalcando 
रॉजर। अब हम बूस्टर के पास पहुँच रहे हैं, और आप देख सकते हैं कि दिन का उजाला शुरू हो रहा है। लाइटें साफ़ दिखाई दे रही हैं, और मेरा अनुमान है कि इस समय हम बूस्टर से लगभग तीन-चौथाई मील की दू
——并完成激活步骤 28 的第 2、3 和
रॉजर। जी.एम.टी. 13:14:00 बजे 
Très b
Und da wir die Checkliste so lange durchlesen müssen, sollten wir die Kommunikationsqualität verbessern. Dazu muss Feld 16: CB-Primär-S-Band-Leistungsverstärk
제가 처음 생각했던 15.2보다 14시간 비행 후 항로에 접근하기 위해 -4.8의 중간 기항 기동을 하는 것이 더 나은지 지침 그룹에 문의
अप
네. 그리고 또 한 가지 변경 사항이 있는데, 그 직후에 투하 준비를 하면서 전방 배출 밸브와 상부 배출 밸브를 모두 닫아 놓습니다. 이렇게 밸브가 잠기는 상황을 방지하기 위해, 전방 배출 
Es sieht nun so aus, als würden wir Ihre Plattform etwa 45 Minuten früher als im Flugplan vorgesehen in Betrieb
Roger
你的笑容表明你在5000英里的区
Nun, Frank, ich sehe das ganz ähnlich. Die unendliche Einsamke
Only one answer; that was the first answer of 16 pe
안녕하세요, 휴스턴. 지금 북쪽으
罗杰，弗兰克。第三阶段的
おい、イーグル。ヒューストンははっきりと聞こえた。コロンビアは弱かった。彼の声が
Friendship Seven. Guaymas Cap Com. We have about 3 minutes yet before we acquire telemetry. I'll give you, I'll give you your retrosequence times for Areas 2 Alpha, Golf, Hotel. Area 2 Al
D'accord. Tout le monde semble s'activer maintenant, donc nous devrions y ar
Rech
Используемый мной зелёный фильтр практически полностью устранил св
Мне кажетс
好的。我们已经清晰地目视
파란색 수건이네요? 제가 
G
Poss
Sì, quel maledetto "1" in questo computer, sai - l'angolo del perno, è lì; il DELTA-V, è lì
이전 차량보다 훨
네. 영국 조드렐 뱅크에서 AP 통신이 전한 소식입니다. 영국의 대형 조드렐 뱅크 전파 망원경이 오늘 오전 5시 49분(미국 동부시간)에 소련의 무인 달 탐사선 루나 15호의 신호 수신을 중단했습니다. 대변인은 루나 15호가 "달 표면을 넘어간 것으로 보인다"고 밝혔습니다. 또 다른 소식으로는, 버나드 러벨 천문대 소장의 대변인이 "착륙했다고 생각하지 않는다"고 말했다는 것입니다. 워싱턴 UPI 통신에 따르면, 스피로 T. 애그뉴 부통령은 2000년까지 화성에 사람을 보내야 한다고 주장했지만, 민주당 지도부는 지구의 필요에 우선순위를 두어야 한다고 반박했습니다. 수요일 아폴로 11호 발사 당시 정부 고위 관계자였던 애그뉴 부통령은 "내 생각에는 이번 세기 말까지 화성에 사람을 보내야 한다"고 말했는데, 이는 닉슨 행정부의 입장을 대변한 것이 아니라 개인적인 의견인 것으로 보입니다. 텍사스주 라레도, AP: 누에보 라레도 이민국은 수요일, 히피족에게 멕시코 입국 관광증을 발급하려면 목욕을 하고 머리를 잘라야 한다고 발표했습니다. 누에보 라레도 멕시코 이민국장인 우베르토 카사라스는 멕시코시티, 아카풀코 등 유명 관광지에서 히피족에 대한 불만이 접수되었다고 밝혔습니다. UPI 통신: 닉슨 대통령이 아폴로 11호 달 착륙 임무 참여를 기념하기 위해 연방 공무원들에게 월요일을 휴일로 지정한 것에 대한 초기 반응은 대부분 놀라움이었습니다. 로드니 비드너, AP 통신, 런던 AP: 유럽은 아폴로 11호 임무에 열광했습니다. 유럽 전역의 신문들은
Ah, je vois. Essayez de voir le réticule sans la lumière. D'accord. On va vérifier. Autre chose: vous pouvez maintenant mettre l'a
네. 오버헤드
Roger. Qui tutto sembra a posto. Abbiamo solide basi e conf
收到
로저. 2시 45분과 3시 21분. 그것도 제가 복사해 뒀습니
Okay. Jetzt
Bien reçu. Ensuite, mettez la vanne
了解、フランク。1と2のマニューバの準備はできました。また、2つの状態ベクトルと、アップリンクしてロードするターゲットロード
わかった。わかった。もう探すのは
Jim apprend à connaître les 
10、9
Moins - sur le terrain, 
罗杰。我的状态良好；燃油量分别为51%和69%；氧
ジェミニ4号、こちらヒュー
Non troppo. Noto che è diverso da quando sono andato a dormire. Ora siamo più angolati rispetto al terminatore della Terra, quindi quando siamo partiti eravamo quasi paralleli al te
Хорошо. Автоматические выключатели: ДОК-ЗОНД, два, РАЗОМКН
Вы открыли свой — просто из
Roger, wir haben die Pulssteuerung nur minimal eingesetzt; Ziel Nummer 12 war durch Wolken verdeckt; Zeit und Position waren ziemlich genau bestimmt. Ich hätte das Ziel verfolgen können, wenn ich es gesehen hätte, glaube ich. Ziel Nummer 13 war klar zu erkennen, und ich konnte die Stadt Alexandria ausmachen. Ich glaube, ich habe den Flughafen auch gesehen, aber ich konnte mich nicht darauf konzentrieren, ihn zu suchen. Ich hätte ihn aber sehen können. Ich habe dann die Kamera eingeschaltet und im Überflug ein paar Fotos gemacht. Die Position des Ziels anhand de
Roger. Nur zur Info: Ich treffe mich gerade mit Antares und Nunki 
RESET, AUS und NIEDRIG. Okay. 
جيميني 4، هذه كانتون. لم أفهم رسالتك الأخيرة. هل يمكنك
That's affirmative. We started getting an erratic indication on prim
Roger. Ti darò la mia configurazione. Sono in modalità di controllo automatico retroattivo; i giroscopi sono normali; l'interruttore di manovra è spento; tutti i materiali di consumo sono in verde; l'impianto elettrico funziona a dovere; la capsula sta tracciando bene. La 
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴입니다. 높은 비
C'est exact. Ce sont les seuls changements sur la version 1-13, et il n'y a aucun changement sur la vers
I hav
Il tramonto è piuttosto suggestivo, non credo di dover perdere molto tempo a guardarli. Sono molto interessanti. L'altra cosa affascinante è quanto sia buio quando gli occhi non sono abituati. Vedo sicuramente un po' di patina sul finestrino. Torno a VOX a questo punto in UHF-hi per trasmettere. Apro la visiera per pulire il microfono destro. L'ho leccato. Chiudo la visiera. La visiera è stata sigillata immediatamente per consentire al circuito della tuta di funzionare al mio posto. Non voglio rovinarmi di nuovo. L'ingresso della tuta si mantiene molto bene a circa 20 gradi. Quindi la cupola tornerà di nuovo su. Ora è a 23, 24 gradi. A quanto pare questa impostazione più alta è quella che vogliamo. Credo che aggiungerò un altro mezzo segno e potremmo averla agganciata. Finalmente si sta raffreddando un po', quindi so dove voglio arrivare con l'impostazione. Ho impostato la quantità di refrigerante per la tuta e la leva di comando a 8,5. La lettura della cupola in questo momento è di 75 gradi. L'ingresso della tuta è di 68 gradi. Molto piacevole. Sento aria fresca che mi attraversa il viso. La quantità di ossigeno sembra davvero buona, 60 e 75 psi, in centinaia. Ho tenuto d'occhio l'inverter da 250. Si s
Okay, Jack. Sag mir dann die nächste Zahl, die ich einst
Хорошо, Джек. Нам нужен ещё один из этих измерителей напряжения и силы тока, и тогда
Okay. On page 1-12, panel 325, we want both CABIN PRESSURE REL
Dein abgeschnittener Rock sah hier unten sehr g
Это основная бат
Roger. 
Хорошо, давайте 
O
Sigma Seven, это Can
알겠
Je ne pense pas pouvoir terminer les photos du MIT cette fois-ci. Dommage, je peux régler le problème. Il y
Es sieht so aus, als ob die Kabel vom Booster und nicht vom Raums
Bene. Questo presuppone che tutti i BAT di discesa si
了解。冗長コ
好的。我们正在考虑在104小时后——大约20到18小时后——进行一次中期修正，速度只有每
Хорошо. Они св
アクエリアス
알겠습니다. 저희도 그 부분에
حسنًا، ضغط المقصورة لا يزال ثابتًا عند 5.5. وهو كذلك منذ مغادرتنا. درجة حرارة المقصورة 90%، والرطوبة النسبية عادت للارتفاع إلى حوالي 36%، وكمية سائل التبريد انخفضت قليلًا أيضًا، ربما حدث تسرب صغير للماء في مكان ما نظرًا لهذا الارتفاع الكبير في ال
क्या हम वापस डा
아니요. 모든 게 순조롭게 진행되고 있어요. 6개월 동안 운전하게 된 것 같은데, 아주 만족합니다. 차 전체가 아주 잘 굴러가고 있어요. 혹
30 футов в 
فوق أفريقيا الآن. التقطتُ للتو الصورة رقم 56 بكاميرا هاسيلبلاد. كانت معلمًا طوبوغرافي
赤いライトは点灯しませ
ここでタイムハックをしてみましょ
ブースターに向かって約5フィート/秒の速度で噴射しました。分離噴射は約6～7秒でした。ブースターに向かって約5～6フィート/秒の速度で噴射し、その後、分離していく様子を見守りました。さらに約5フィート/秒の速度で噴射しました。接近し始めたように見えました。横から、高度600～700フィ
R
Manöver zur 
Hey, listen, these cabin fans - one of them sounds like it's got a bad bearing. We are going
Roger. Just for your information
سيتم إعادة ضبط
Roger. Molto bene. Pausa. Le previsioni meteo per l'area di atterraggio in questo momento sono 2000 raffiche sparse, alte e sparse, 10 miglia. Il vento è intorno agli 080 a 18 nodi. Avrete onde alte circa 90-180 cm. Il vostro Delta H è di più 3 metri. E sembra che atterrerete circa 10 minu
Нам предстоит сначала снизить танга
Houston, Eagle. Hai copiato la nostra differenza di angolo stellare e gli angoli di
那我最好开始操纵飞机；糟糕，不知怎么的，我偏离了飞行轨道。让我看看，我们现在俯仰了——我们要拉起机头——俯仰了，糟糕。加
I have got a good 
That is what you wanted, isn't it? I thought that is what it was all sq
弗兰克，我们想要实现的是径向向上推进；只要你能通过舷窗的光学设备或其他方式确定地球的位置，然后使用合适的推进器以每秒3英尺的速度径向向上推进。这
알겠습니다. 수직선이
Okay. Wir haben es nicht eilig. Das ist sogar eine sehr angenehme Einstellung. Die Sonne steht unter, scheint also nicht durch die Fen
C'est exact. Flight souhaiterait également connaître la position de
١١، هذه هيوستن. الصورة بدأت تصبح ضبابية بعض الشيء الآن. ربم
ठीक है, चल
वैसे, जिज्ञासावश ही पूछ रहा हूँ, ह्यूस्टन में बिजली की खप
11, Хьюстон. Это был хороший снимок панели 2. Теперь мы видим панель 3 с переключа
ठीक है। यह वह सं
Roger. 
يبدو أن أحد مرشحات الهيدروجين - الموجود على سخان الماء - يستمر في التدفق حتى بعد إ
了解、フランク。チェックリストには、KG-1、
Roger. Turning off. Our PQI is 98.0 percent
晚上好。我是阿波
Rog
Okay. I've got on
Houston, Apollo 8. Come legg
ओह, मुझे लगा आपने कहा था कि हमारे 
了解。オプション1、あり
क्या उसे एचएफ है
«Дружба Семь», это хирург из Занзибара. Получили ваш отчет, в котором указана хорошая точность движений.
로마에서는 교황 요한 23세를 성인으로 시성하려는 움직임이 있는 것 같습니다. 비록 100년 정도 걸릴지라도
Apollo 8, H
了解、インディアンキ
Астро. Я понимаю, вы просили — вы хотите остаться
حسنًا. ما زلتَ تتمتع بقوة كبيرة. نعرض لكَ أكثر من 30 أمبير على الماء. إذا واجهتَ مشكلةً ولم تتمكن من الصعود - وهذا يعني اس
Осталось
D'accord. Je vous en envoie un. Mode de contrôle: rétroaction automatique; gyroscopes normaux; manœuvre désactivée. Tous les systèmes sont opérationnels. Je
好的。滚转137度，俯仰角310度，偏航角34
여기는 우정 7호입니다. 식사는 아무 문제 없이 잘 먹고 있습니다. 잠망경으로 보니 제 뒤로 눈부신 푸른 지평선이 떠오르고 있네요. 곧 해가 뜰 것 
로저, 11. 잘 들었습니다. 12시간 동안 예정된 블록 데이터였습니다. 비행 계획 업데이트에서 몇 가지 사항을 다시 한번 알려드리고자 합니다. 편하신 시간에 확인하시고 일찍 주무셔도 좋습니다. 다른 일정은 없지만, 필터 교체와 산소 연료 전지 퍼지 작업을 다시 한번 안내드립니다. 그리고 델타-P를 확인하고 취침 전 점검 목록을 완료해 주시
C'est exact. Attitude: roulis 0 degrés, lacet 2 degrés à droite, tangage -33 degrés. Tous les taux indiquent zéro. Je suis en service à l'heure actuelle. L'horloge est toujours réglée sur l'heure de retour, pour un t
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. У нас будет высококачественная трансляция примерно в 155:30. В это время вы можете включить телевизор, если хотите, и продолжать вра
General Kraft ist weiterhin etwas bes
画面对比度很高，而且目前在我们的显示器上是倒置的，但我
Roger. Il semblerait qu'il nous faille un « PROCÉDEZ », Mik
In principio Dio creò il cielo e la terra. La terra era informe e deserta, e le tenebre ricoprivano l'abisso. Lo spirito d
حسنًا. سأكرر. ألفا ٢٢٥، 
날씨 사진 촬영... 첫날 24시 41분경에 
इसका पता लगाना थोड़ा मुश्किल हो सकता है। मुझे पक्का नहीं पता कि म
Bene. Il tuo consumo di O2 nelle 
Близнецы 4, Близнецы 4. Это связь с центром управления воздушным движением Хьюстона. Мы контролируем Кантон... Будем на связи. Ко
تم ضبط زاوية ميل الطائرة عند 1.5 درجة، وتتذبذب ح
D
रॉजर। कंप्यूटर सभी मोड की जाँच कर रहा है। सभी IVI में 10 फीट/सेकंड डालें, खराबी लाइट दबाएँ और स्टार्ट कंप बटन दबाएँ... कंप्यूटर को 2 सेकंड के लिए बंद करें, फिर से चालू करें और खराबी लाइट दबाएँ। यदि हमें ये संकेत मिलते ह
ヒューストン、コロンビア。投棄時のロー
네, 
双子座4号，卡那
По мере того, как ночь становится всё ярче, появляются и другие звёзды. Я их вижу — думаю, сейчас я различаю их примерно до пятой звёздной величины. Всё ещё это не такое яркое зрелище, как в ясную ночь на высоте 20 000 футов из кабины самолёта. Я сильно приглушил свет, и это создаёт го
C'est
Ok. Suggeriamo che l'LMP riposi mentre il CMP e il CDR sono svegli. L'LMP dovrebbe andare a dormire intorno alle 63, per poi risvegliarsi tr
Вы не шути
कोलंबिया, NOUN 49 पर प्रतीक्षा करें। स
何をしても、それを止めることはできない。どちらに転がっても
D'accord. Ensuite, vers 105:05, il y a un point. Il faudrait l
Canary, qual è l
Qui è 
ليس تمامًا. أعتقد أننا ندرس هذا الأمر قبل تعديل المسار في منتصف الرحلة، باعتباره الوقت المناسب لفحص سخانات المياه. تتضمن عملية التبريد السريع بعض سخانات المياه أيضًا، ولكن سيتم ذلك قبل الدخول مباشرةً عندما لا تكون هذه الأمور حساسة للغاية، وإذا ل
我
मैं आपको बता नहीं सकती कि इसे उतारने में कितना अच्
AGS présentait ces rés
Super! J
Okay, Jim. Ti stiamo dando ragio
Hast du die Kap
How's old White, Bruce? Did he ever let you go get a cup of coffee when we wer
Ich überprüfe die anderen Systeme. Sie scheinen alle recht konstant zu sein. Die Temperatur in der Anzugkuppel liegt weiterhin bei etwa 71 Grad, am Anzugeinlass bei 62 Grad, was diesmal angenehm ist. Kabinendruck, Anzugdruc
Roger. Entschuldigung für die Störung, Columbia. Zwei 
你前面有
Beh, Houston, non abbiamo avuto molto tempo per parlarti della vista dal finestrino mentre ci preparavamo per l'espulsione; ma fino a quel momento avevamo l'intera parte settentrionale dell'emisfero illuminato visibile, inclusi il Nord America, il Nord Atlantico, l'Europa e il Nord Africa. Potevamo vedere che il tempo era buono ovunque, quasi ovunque. C'era una depressione ciclonica nel Canada settentrionale, nell'Athabaska, probabilmente a est della zona di Athabaska. La Groenlandia era limpida, e sembrava che stessimo vedendo solo la calotta glaciale della Groenlandia. Tutto il Nord Atlantico era piuttosto buono; e l'Europa e il Nord Africa sembravano limpidi. La maggior parte degli Stati Uniti era limpida. C'era una bassa pressione, sembrava un fronte che si estendeva dal centro del paese fino a nord dei Grandi Laghi e fino a
감사합니다, 선생님
我们在大约179英里处锁定了目标，雷达波束指向大约在156英里处
Ok. Quan
هل سمعته
But, how is your status, and
Gemini 4, это центр управления воздушным движением Хь
रॉजर। और नीचे T/M कह रहा है कि प्रशांत महासागर के पास से गुजरते समय फ्यूल सेल O
Okay. Now pick up one of the lithium hydroxide canisters, and let me describe which end is which. It's approximately square on one - one of the vented flat ends, has the strap, and that en
로저. RKV 통
Apollo 11, this is Houston. We believe that is normal system operation. The radiators are expected to be very cold right now and apparently th
네, 하나 찾은 것 같아요.
Okay, Jack; Houston. It'
حسناً. سأحصل عليه عن
ठीक है, मैं आपको रीडिंग देता हूँ। सूट का डोम 80 डिग्री है, सूट का 
Roger. Cela nous convient parfaiteme
Sigma Seven, this is Cape Cap C
На расст
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota quattro e stiamo lavorando al quinto giorno. Naturalmente, non vediamo l'ora che arrivi l'atterraggio di venerdì. Qui sotto, nella parte della navicella che chiamiamo stiva inferiore, abbiamo il consigliere del Presidente per la forma fisica, il Capitano Jim Lovell, che sta per sottoporsi a un programma di esercizi che svolgiamo ogni giorno. Notate che fluttua molto liberamente. Ha appena sbattuto la testa contro il sistema ottico, usato per la nostra navigazione. Sta lavorando con un attrezzo progettato per mantenere i muscoli in forma. Un'altra funzione molto importante della nostra navicella spaziale è il computer, e ho pensato che potesse interessarvi vedere cosa abbiamo qui, i display che ci forniscono tutte le informazioni sulla nostra combustione, sulla navigazione e sulla velocità che utilizziamo dura
Roger, Neil. Das ist wirklich ein super Foto. Wir haben die ACA, eure ACA, das Bild des Gashebels, die 90-Grad-Halterung. Wir sehen eure Gri
看来你的态度一直很坚定。你需要用实际行动来证
ليس على أ
Houston, Eagle. Haben Sie die extrem hohen Werte für Reichweite und Reichweitenänderungsrate aus VERB 83 übernommen? Und haben Sie uns gerade einen Zus
Поэтому я и заказал э
Хорошо, Д
D'accord. Le train d'atterrissage est sorti et verrouillé, Jack, et en regardant maintenant à la page 11, no
Wir haben die guten Blutdruckwerte e
نجم المحور هو الأرض، أسفل
Roge
Und, Ruhe bewahren, Houston. Wir sparen lieb
And the Sun is going down on schedule. It's getting real dark in
И вот что я вижу: у меня теперь весь гелий 1 серый, весь гелий 2 серый, основное топливо серое, дополнительное топливо два: A – серый, B – серый, C – серый. Хорошо. На радиаторах серый. На основном индикаторе
Ja, daran h
Нет, ничего подобного. Попроб
收到。此时您的2号生物医学记录仪应
はい。テレビに合わせて姿勢を調整してください。ピッチとヨーは、ピッチマイナス1～マ
西格玛七号，我是穆切亚。我一分钟都没看到你的通讯。把你交给PCS
Everything's fine
Wei
GET RC 25 15 58; RET 400K; 20 + 15. RET RB 26 + 38, 뱅크 왼쪽 55. 이해하셨나요
没错。自从我睡了第一个4个小时后就脱掉了手套……我把袖子也脱掉
Understand; plus one-tenth and back
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन से। जब आपके पास थोड़ा समय हो, तो क्या आप हमें अपने एन2 टैंक ब्रावो का ऑनबोर
わかりました。2つ目は、ベネット彗星を観測して32時間後の画像です。探査機が打ち上げ前、最も安定した状態になった時に撮影してもらいたいと考えています。安定性の要件は非常に高いです。今回見送った内容から、ご理解いただけたか分かりません。また、写真では彗星の肉眼で見える範囲すべてを写し出せない可能性がありますので、彗星の構造について何か興味深い点があれば、スケッチしてい
N
Okay, Jack. Damals betrug der Winkel 62 Grad, und das für zwei Umdrehungen. In dieser Entfernung verfehlten wir die Erde – vorher sahen wir sie nicht. Die Zeitangabe lautete 3 Minuten und 50 
罗杰。我就
フィードするか、切断するか、それともど
Хор
收到。请
Beh, oggi la Terra ci semb
干渉を減らすために、周波数を少しずらそうとしました。これから出てくると思いますが、降下用酸素をオンにして、上昇用酸素をオフにしてください。以上です。FORWARD OMNIをリクエストしてくださ
알겠습니다. 그리고, 저기
ठीक है। कैप क
Comment vont Eddie
알겠습니다. 파워 앰프 
Roger. Amicizia Sette. L
Хорошо. Я свяжусь с вами по поводу вашего вопроса через минуту, Фред. Итак, вот процедура. Шаг 1, УПРАВЛЕНИЕ Н
E, Acquario, abbiamo
分かり
На этом, пожалуй, все мировые и национальные новости и статьи. На спортивной странице Хэнк Стрэм из «Канзас-Сити Чифс» был назван лучшим тренером года в AFL. Это уже второй раз за три сезона. Голосование проводилось группой из 30 спортивных журналистов и комментаторов Associated Press, по три человека из каждого города. Ближайшим к нему по результатам голосования был Уиб Юбэнк. Другие тренеры, получившие голоса, — Сид Гилман из Сан-Диего и Лу Сабин из Денвера. Что касается вчерашнего матча всех звезд колледжей Shriners, то Север одержал победу над Югом со счетом 3:0. Дик Берлински из Мичиганского государственного университета забил филд-гол с 23 ярдов в первой четверти, и этого было достаточно, чтобы Север победил Юг в среду в матче всех звезд колледжей Shriners по американскому футболу. Интересно, что первые дауны: Севе
Хорошо. Мы снова внутри космического корабля. Мы снова гер
और साथ ही, हम अफ्रीका को भी देख सकते हैं। पश्चिम अफ्रीका बहुत सुंदर है। फ्लोरिडा को देखते हुए मुझे जिब्राल्टर भी दिखाई दे 
I had a very deep sleep and I woke up when the... changed from two to one and then I switched it back to two and I went back to sleep again for at least 2 and 1/2 hours. I did not... Jim had to actually blow r
Roger. Nous avons une petite expérience visuelle au laser que nous aimerions vous confier. Si vous pouviez observer la Terre pa
Non. Je me posais juste la question: nous n’avions pas encore su si nous allions le faire ou non
Bene, e vorremmo farti un'altra domanda sullo sfogo. Si tratta, secondo te, di un
好的。现在，我们准
रॉजर। वॉली, हम उन मात्राओं की पुष्टि करते हैं। लगता है आप ठीक हैं। क्या आपको निर्धारित समय से पहल
Si può anche usare la gravità zero per dimostrare molte cose che abbiamo imparato a scuola. Vorrei dimostrare brevemente quanto sia facile spiegare il funzionamento del giroscopio. Se faccio ruotare questa lattina, sappiamo che, secondo le equazioni del moto, ci aspetteremmo che, una volta che le viene data una rotazione e ha un asse di rotazione in questa dir
좋습니다. 에이트볼을 작동시키세요. 히터를 켜세요
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。あと5分です。燃焼前の
Foto 1. Wasse
터널 안으로 들어가서 롤 각도를 확인해 봤는데, 찰
D'accord, Jack. Voici la configuration des propulseurs: Able 1, Charlie 1 et Able 2 sont désactivés. Charlie 2 et MAIN A sont tous activés. Baker 1 est
Ich wäre heute
좋아, 버즈. 목적은 근접 비행이야. SPS/G&N: 62815, +0.97, -0.20 0.70 54 5944, -0.0028, +0.0023, +0.0069 0.29 149 312, 원지점은 NA, +0.0221 0.0078 0.01 0.0034, 육분면 별 01 2385 227, 보어사이트 별은 NA NA NA. 위도는 -0.265, -16500, 11899 36228, 144 56 47. 비고: 설정 별은 데네브와 베가, 0.07 144 0.68입니다. 여유 연료 없음. 도킹 연소를
D'accord. No
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हम मिडकोर्स आपके साथ करने पर विचार कर रहे हैं, जब तक कि आप इसे अकेले करना
휴스턴, 현재 글리콜 증발 배출 온도가 약 44도, 라디에이터 배출 온도가 약 28도로 나타나고 있습니다. 글리콜 증
Also, Houston, Apollo 13. We'd like to move up the waste water dump and maybe the O2 fuel cell purg
자
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちら
Roger, Bill. Nous constatons que la pression de votre vapeur secondaire remonte lentement, et 
他不会让阳光刺到你的眼睛——我的意思是，在这件事上，我
今、やっと出てきました。荷物を全部出し終えたばかりで、もし必要になっ
D'accord. Parfait. Un dernier détail, Jack: les vibrations du système optique sont très simil
收到。我们正在检查。我们会批准你使用。好的，水瓶座。你的四轴
حسنًا، أعتقد أنني رأيت نجم ذنب الأسد؛ دعني ألقي نظرة عليه - وبالفعل، رأيته. و
जेमिनी 4, सीएसक
D'accord. Nous avons temporairement réduit le gain sur l'OMNI et sommes passés à un faible débit binaire. Nous nous apprêtons à rétablir le 
Fred, die Schärfe ist so gut, dass wir die Position deiner vier Kugelventile oben im Bild für den gr
Altre notizie, e ce n'era un po', riguardano un altro esploratore: Thor Heyerdahl dovette rinunciare al suo tentativo di attraversare l'Atlantico a bordo di una barca di papiro. L'imbarcazione, danneggiata dalla tempesta, fu abbandonata a circa 650 miglia dalle Bermuda. La velocità dell'imbarcazione era stata ridotta a circa 25 miglia al giorno e Heyerdahl affermò che lo scopo del 
收到。这里是友谊七号。我能清楚地看到夜空。我想月亮可能正在我身后升起。是的，我能从后面的望远镜里看到它
Ja. Ken, ich werde hier oben angefeindet, weil ich ge
了解。
روجر، منذ 15 دقيقة. جيم، سأشرح لك الإجراءات العامة للعودة إلى الغلاف الجوي. ست
Роджер. Гавайи пытались предоставить мне какую-то информацию о расходе топлива во время
마지막 샷을 할 때 제 자세는 아래쪽으로 약 90도, 위쪽으
ठीक है। वैसे, उस स्थिति में, आप कुछ ऊपर की ओर और कुछ बाईं ओर जलाना चाहते हैं, और हम इससे भी अधिक सटीक होने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। फ्रैंक
いいえ
Ok. Basta parlar
11，休斯顿。关于你头盔包（更正一下，是舱盖包）里的装备，我们建议你把它们取出来，放到右侧沙发下面的睡眠约束带里。原因是舱盖包的绑
Ok. Ti dirò dove si trovano. Sono entrambi posizionati, come dici tu, con il fo
쿼드 브라보, 맞습니다. 1차와 2차
ドームスタジアムのレンタルをめぐる論争はまだ続いていますね。それから、今朝のクロニクル紙に、クリスと管制センター、そしてフ
حسنًا، أعتقد - من خلال وضعيتنا هذه - 
Ora possiamo osservare la struttura de
제미니 4, 휴스턴 CAP
没错。姿态：横滚0度，偏航2度（右），俯仰-33度。所有速率均为零。我目前处于工作状态。时钟仍设置为返航时间，逆行时间为04+32+28。我从百慕大收到的逆行时间正确。客舱压力稳定在5.7。客舱空气温度90华氏度。相对湿度30%。冷却剂用量68%。宇航服环境温度65华氏度。宇航服压力指示为5.8。宇航服蒸汽温度60华氏度。我感觉非常舒适。但是，我暂时不想调低温度。主氧气浓度78%；备用氧气浓度102%。主总线为24。1号总线为25、25、25。备用1号总线为26；备用2号总线为25。隔离
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Je n'avais rien dit à ce moment-là. Nous sommes en train de trouver des solutions pour vous. Concernant votre question précédente sur la gestion des cycles de sommeil, nous partageons votre avis. Nous souhaitons rectifier le tir en ce qui concerne les cycles de sommeil et autres aspects du plan de vol d'ici notre arrivée en orbite lunaire. Nous vous demandons donc de bien vouloir évaluer la manière la plus efficace d'intégrer les cycles de sommeil et de les répartir entre vous. Nous aimerions que vous nous teniez informés des tâches de chacun et de vos projets. Nous avons un cycle de sommeil décalé de deux heures. Nous aimerions rattraper le retard. Nous pouvons également ajuster l'horaire du deuxième cycle si cela risque de poser problème – il y en a donc deux autres. Nous pouvons les ajuster si vous nous indique
イベント タイマーを 36 分に設定すると、約 2 分半後にカウントダウンのマークが表示さ
Vie
好的。我们遇到了一些地面信号问题，虽然信号微弱但清晰可见。我们准备开始测试。我们将
ロジャー、数量読み取りス
Can
Columbia, Houston. We'd like you to terminate d
Oka
D'accord. Je vous ai bien
다시
그건 아닙니다. 출시 당시 5.8 [psia]에서 매우 점진적으로 감소하여 현재 약 5.1 [psia]까
D'accord. Votre trajectoire de vol est maintenant calculée sur la base d'environ 5 heures de suivi. Vo
로저, 알겠습
Here we go! Noise is very decent. Everything's going well, buoyant mood, feeling great, eve
Kann ich das Plotboard nicht
Trè
Tut mir leid, Bill
Мои перспект
Ricevuto. Lo ripet
Molto piccole, direi che sono nell'ordine di 4 mm o meno. Si muovono vic
…側面から上がってくるはずだ。それなら、ジム、君は僕たち
Gemini VI, w
Le car
... لقد بدأت الأرض بالظهور بالفعل
Хорошо, Джек. В обновлении плана полета есть неск
Roger
还有，11号，休斯顿。鹰号，请注意，由于CDU
Roger, Mike. Ich möchte ein paar Anmerkungen zu den Daten machen. Das automatische Manöver war recht genau. Anscheinend haben wir während des Manövers einen substellaren Punkt getroffen; die automatische Optik hat Canopus genau an die richtige Stelle gebracht; die minimale Impulssteuerung hat wie erwartet funktioniert. In den Höhen, in denen ich mit den Beobachtungen begonnen habe, ist eine deutliche, dunstige Bandlinie zu erkennen. Der Fi
COMM sure is good all of a su
Roger. Flyby SPS/G&N: 62815, più 097, meno 020 070 54 5944, meno 00028, più 00023, più 00069, 269 149 312 NA, più 00221 00078 001 00034, 01 2185 227 NA, meno 0265, meno 16500 11899
Das ist negativ. Ich habe die Einstellungen jetzt beide auf siebe
This is Houston. Reading you loud
Columbia, qui 
Okay, and you're real good. It's a - It's a pleasure not to have all that noise. Let me tell you what I want to do, Jim. As I said
아시다시피
Il y a un problème avec notre système de brûlure. On n'obtient pas les bonnes valeurs sur la sphère et les aiguilles sont bien centrées. 
Ne serve ancora un po'. 
Potrebbe essere nel modulo di comando, eh? Hai un'altra 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. نُريك كيف تُقلل من كمية مي
アポロ8号、こちらはヒューストンです。1、/：462、訂正、46728、マイナス053、プラス121、プラス37746、マイナス03299、プラス00824
Ну
हैसलब्लैड कैमरे से पृथ्वी की तस्वीर लेना कोई बड़ी बात नहीं है क्योंकि यह समय-समय पर पृथ्वी के ऊपर से गुजरता है।
ठीक है। हमारे पास 120 फीट की स
如果你愿意，我会把它调回最高，直到快要达到最
Roger. Wir befin
Okay, Houston. We'll punch off at 
Rechtsanzug-Durchfluss
アポロ11号、
Très bien. Le CMP est maintenant opérationnel. Nous allons procéder avec l'option 52 et commencer la naviga
좋습니다. 오늘은 절차에 따라 관측 전과 후에 트러니언 바이어스를 측정해 주시길 바랍니다. 이는 열 효과로 인해 육분의 각도 측정에 오차가 발생하는지 확인하기 위한 것입니다. 관측 전에 측정한 바이어스 값을 반영해야 합니다. 연속 두 측정값이 0.003도 이내이면 NOUN 87에 PROCEED 표시를 하십시오. 그리고 측정 사이에 트러니언을 몇 도 정도 움직여 주십시오. 오늘은 지구의 시야가 평소보다 훨씬 작을 것입니다. 이 부분에 대해서는 저희보다 더 잘 아실 거라고 생각하지만, 별과 지구 지평선 사이의 각도를 정확하게 측정하려면 육분의의 M선(두 개의 눈금을 지나고 R선에 수직인 선)이 별의 직하점에서 지구 지평선과 평행해야 합니다. 그리고 나서 육분
现
好的。听
Ricevuto. Capisco 03 47 35; 61.2; 01 
Naturalmente, l'unica altra cosa di cui dovremmo preoccuparci è qu
罗杰。我读取到的宇航服温度是4.5度。你的宇航服温度是多
Wonder if Paul Haney has t
Parce que vous ne vouliez pas qu'ils soient déplacés par inadvertance, j'imagine. Peu import
बहुत बढ़िया। हम रेट्रो जे
ठीक ह
Schwach, aber 
Хо
يا فريندشيب سفن، لدينا بيانات تتبع موثوقة، وقد تأكدنا من سلامة جميع أنظمتكم. سنذكركم ببدء قائمة التحقق الخاصة بالاستعداد لله
Continuing with the report. No sequence panel lights showing. Only abnormal position. Landing bag is off. The EPI is indicating okay. Cont
로저. 저는 파일럿입니다. 이 기회를 빌어 지금 듣고 계신 모든 
켄, 이 슈트 열교환기의 작동 방식이 조금 다른 두 가지 이유가 있습니다. 하나는 콜드소크(coldsoak)를 하지 않는다는 것이고, 다른 하나는 2차 루프의 전원을 먼저 끄는 것입니다. 이런 경우 슈트 열교환기를 2차 루프에만 연결하는 것이 좋은 생각인지 궁금합니다. 게다가 우리는 기내 열교환기가 아예 없다는 점도 고려해야
Roger. Stiamo ottenendo una bella vista del Monte Marilyn e del Secchi The
제미니 VI호, 휴스턴. 주간 비행 관측을 실
OMNI を TRANSM
Okay, Aquarius. Wir arbeiten an den nächs
コロンビア、ヒューストン。了
Welchen ECS O2-Schalter müssen 
了解です。
لقد كنا... نتجول كثيراً
是的。右侧除了
알겠습니다. 제가 여기서 잠시 딴 데 정신이 팔렸네요. 225번 패널에 CB FLIGHT BUS, MAIN B, close라고 적혀 있는데, 그 이
Sehr gut. Wir haben derzeit keine Verbindung zum Cape, aber man hat mich gebeten, Ihr Problem mit der Flugsteuerung etwas genauer zu untersuchen. Zunächst möchte ich wissen, welche Werte Sie erzielen, wenn Sie das Flugzeug einf
जैक, यह बहुत आरामदायक है। हमने इसे कई बार चलाया है और वास्तव में, अभी भी इसे चलाया जा रहा है। हमने इसे ह्यूस्टन और केप दोनों जगह चलाया है। आपको बस प्लेटफॉर्म अलाइनमेंट के दौरान थोड़ा सतर्क रहने की ज़रूरत पड़ सकती है, जब आप काम पूरा करने की तैयारी कर रहे होते हैं। फिर कमांड मॉड्यूल में पहुँचने और उसे अलग करने के बाद, आप फिर से आरामदायक समय पर आ जाते 
Apollo 11, Houston. If you read, please attempt to acquire on the high 
好的。现在，13
Roger. Muchea Cap Com. Bien reçu. Dites à Jerry, Gus, Lewis et à tous les autres que j'ai travaillé avec « bonjour ». John Whittler, si vous le voyez, dites-lui de seller Butch. Fin de la session. La couverture nuageuse est-elle suffisante pour que je 
यह एक कठिन रेट्रो होगा
D'accord. Je suis à trois centièmes près. Je pense que nous pouvons maintenir ce résultat ens
로저. 맞습니다, 짐. 질문에 답하고 한 가지 정정하자면, 요(yaw)는 현재 요(frequency yaw) 값을 의미하며, 이는 롤(roll) 0, 피치(pitch) 90, 현재 요(fre
حسنًا. نحن هنا 
C'était stupide. On passe en mode commandes de vol électriques à basse vitesse. J'ai eu une double autorité et j'ai vraiment fait une erreur. Mais il vaut mieux économiser le carburant. C'
Игл, Колумбия. В удобное для вас время я хотел бы переключ
Roger. C'est une bonne confirmation. Sous cet affichage, il est indiqué qu'il est fermé. Si, fermé, vous pouvez obtenir une lecture intégrée de votre système, cela consomme beaucoup m
水瓶
ठीक है। मुझे एक मिनट के लिए रुकना पड़ा। बॉब होप अपने सैनिकों के साथ एक बार फिर वियतनाम में हैं और हमेशा की तरह शानदार काम कर रहे हैं। इस 
로저, 닐. 저희는 재생 영상을 보고 나서 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。您打电
D'accord. Après avoir vérifié la tension du BUS PRINCIPAL en connectant l'ALIMENTATION, je souhaite ouvrir le BUS DE BATTERIES PRINCIPAL B (ou 
陰
حسنًا. لم أسمع علامة زائد
わかりました。LMPのホースと同じように、コマンダーのホースの設定を始めます。それから、代わりに…というか、打ち上げチェックリストを使ってください。こ
分かりました。了解です。この耳の部分に1.5インチの穴を開けて、ホースをここに入れます。ホースの先端を下にしてキャニスターの方に向け、この辺りを
ठीक है, डेटा के प्रारंभिक विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि केंद्र में स्थित S-II इंजन पिछली उड़ानों की तुलना में कुछ अधिक तीव्रता से कंपन कर रहा था, और यह कंपन S-II बर्न के लगभग 160 सेकंड बाद शुरू हुआ। इन कंपनों के परिणामस्वरूप, इंजन चैम्बर का दबाव इतना कम हो गया कि दो निम्न-स्तरीय थ्रस्ट सेंसर, यानी थ्रस्ट-ओके सेंसर, ने केंद्र इंजन को बंद करने की प्रक्रिया शुरू कर दी। डेटा के प्रारंभिक मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि इंजन को कोई क्षति नहीं हुई है, और कंपन की तीव्रता में वृद्धि का कारण अभी भी 
そうすれば、通常の飛行計画に戻ります。以上
짐, 지금까지 딱 한 가지
House Ways and Means Committee also has agreed yesterday to tax changes affecting oil companies, also banks and utilities, which could add as much as 2 billion dollars per year to the federal revenue. The committee also voted tentatively to change the accounting procedures for telephone, electric, gas, and oil pipeline companies and to reduce tax b
짐, 저희는 당신이 원하는 대로 작업을 진행하시기를 권장하지만, VERB 49 상태를 
Okay. Ich wollte nur kurz mit Ihnen sprechen. Es sieht so aus, als ob es aufgrund von Jims Reiseplan einige Änderungen gegeben hat. Könnt
Roger. This trip of ours to the Moon may have looked, to you, simple or easy. I'd like to assure you that has not been the case. The Saturn V rocket which put us into orbit is an incredibly complicated piece of machinery, every piece of which worked flawlessly. This computer up above my head has a 38,000 word vocabulary, each word of which has been very carefully chosen to be of the utmost value to us, the crew. This switch which I have in my hand now, has over 300 counterparts in the command module alone, this one single switch design. In addition to that, there are myriads of circuit breakers, levers, rods, and other associated controls. The engine, our large rocket engine on the aft end of our service module, must have performed flawlessly, or we would have been stranded in lunar orbit. The parachutes up above my head must work perfectly tomorrow or we will plummet into the ocean. We have always had confidence that all this equipment will work, and work properly, and we continue to have confidence that it will do so for the remainder of the flight. All this is possible only through the blood, sweat, and tears of a number of people. First, the American workmen who put these pieces of machinery together in the factory. Second, the painstaking work done by the various test teams during the assembly and retest after assembly. And finally, the people at the Manned Spacecraft Center, both in management, in mission planning, in flight control, and last, but not least, in crew training. This operation is somewhat like the periscope of a submarine. All you see is the three of us, but beneath the surface are thousands and thousands of others, and to all those, I would like to say, thank you very much
わかりました。4行目の「ヒーター」の下にあるクワッドヒーター（4つ）は閉じ、「ディスプレイ」を開き、
Roger. Sigma Sept. Je 
わかりました。参加します、承
Wenn ich hier ein paar Essensreste von Bill wegräumen könnte – dieser Bereich hier unten heißt Ausrüstungsraum, und 
不，我没拍过很多。你拍过
Okay, Jim.
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। साथ ही, उड़ान योजना के अनुसार, हम चाहेंगे कि आप ईं
네, 아폴로 8호. 이제 극저온 냉각 팬을 끄셔도 될 것 같습니다. 잠시 동안은 여러분이 필요한 작업을 진행하실 수 있도록 시간을 드리겠습니다. 탑재된 장비 중 고이득 안테나 점검, 통신 모드 점검 등은 준비가 되시면 그때 진행하도록 하겠습니다. 편하신 시간에 하시면 됩니다. 광대역 안테나를 사용한 고이득 데이터 덤프 테스트에서 36kHz 대역에서도 매우 양호한 데이터를 얻을 수 있었는데, 이는 예상했던 회로 여유 범위보다 약간 더 나은 결과입니다. 곧 연소 테스트가 예정되어 있는데, 자세한 내용은 나중에 다
你想在脱离对接时把COAS显示在
私の頼れる LMP がすぐに回路図を出して、1 サイ
Sì. Al momento sembra essere inferiore a 30 cm al secondo, circa 1 metro al secondo. E poi quella prima dell'ingresso, 2 ore prima dell'interfaccia di ingresso, 
Ночь
Okay, Jack, ripeti che... per lo spegnimento, non è nelle pagine rosa, quell
Roger. Still copying. Go a
Okay. Es könnte aufgezeichnet worden sein, muss aber nicht. Es dauerte – ich glaube, wir waren 44 Minuten nach Beginn des Außenbordeinsatzes. Ich schaute auf meinen Zeitmesser, den ich gestartet hatte, als Ed das Raumschiff verließ. Nach 44 Minu
Хорошо. Для этого нажимаем ENTER, 
罗杰。44号星亮度不够。六分仪黑色区域被一层红色的光晕笼罩，那颗星就藏在里面，我看不见
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. نعم. نطلب تنظيف خلية الوقود بالهيدروجين والأكسجين. انتهى
Okay. This assumes that all the descent batteries are on l
我正
Apollo 8, Houston. Sembra che questa carica della batteria B possa richiedere altre 6 ore. A quanto pare, la velocità di carica è inferiore a quella che stiamo ottenendo sulle nostre curve al suolo, ma è comunque superiore a qu
PRIMA
Oh, più a lungo seg
Okay, Houston. On DES
잠시 기다려주세요. 지금 분리
روجر، أيها
Gemini 4, Хьюстон, CAP COM. Просим вас оставить переключатель компьютера в положении «ВКЛ», а переключатель питания пер
ニール、こちらヒューストン。始め
खैर, हमें सच में नहीं पता। केबिन में आमतौर पर दो लोग होते हैं, और यह काफी बड़ा है - यह काफी कॉम्पैक्ट लगता है, इसलिए हमें यहां उतनी ठंडक महसूस नहीं होती जितनी कमांड मॉड्
本
Роджер. 3./46427, минус 053, плюс 141, плюс 28960, минус 00456, плю
Roger. I have five remarks. Number one, assumes execution of flyby maneuver; number two, use same alignment as for flyby; number three, time of midcourse number 5 for GERU determination o
Jim, je peux te donner l'idée générale de la procédure proposée pour la mise en orbite du module de commande G&N. C'est la procédure actuellement envisagée. On pourrait en trouver une meilleure, mais voici ce qu'on étudie pour le moment. La première étape consiste à viser la Terre, comme lors de la phase intermédiaire. Ensuite, on effectuera un alignement sur l'axe du corps, à 40° + 5° sur l'ACS, pour placer la bille à 0°. On pourra alors te donner l'attitude de la bille à suivre pour pointer les opti
Роджер. Это зависит от того, в какую сторону направлен твой но
Collins has got one, but I'm not sure I b
Das gibt mir n
要想拍到航天器的照片，最好的办法就是向前
Jack, I don't think there'll be any problem, if yo
Aspetta Buzz. Sembra tutto a posto, per quanto ne so. Abbiamo... lungo la linea di convergenza tropicale, ci sono alcune nuvole sulla mappa meteorologica che sto guardando qui, ma niente di significativo. Ora... Aspetta. Vediamo, ora a metà... sì, al MPL... abbiamo 3000 nubi sparse, visibilità 10, alte
我这就给他们打电话
네, 괜찮습니다. 좋습니다. 시스템 체크리스트와 대기 1에 대한 의견 하나만 
Roger. Source pressure is 2450. Source temperature is 85°, and fuel and oxidizer regulated at 295 wit
SURGE TANK と REPRESS PACKA
D'accord. En e
Okay. I have cabin temperature of 100 (degrees), cabin dome, 40 (degrees); cabin heat exchanger is 42 (degrees); the setting on the cabin is 3 and it's holding steady for a long period of time. I'd rather not ch
जेमिनी 4
私は地球の青い部分に
알겠습니다. 비행 계획 업데이트가 있는데, 시간 되실 때 복
로저, 스콧. 지금 표류 비행 중이지만, 에어컨 버스 전원을 켰습니다. 아주 잘 연결됐습니다. 나
Roger. À -1 minute, rayez « MASTER ARM, ON ». À -35 secondes, ray
Roger, deine Einstellung ist korrekt, du befindest dich
不，不对，弗雷德。我们现在要做的是保持
لنرى. لقد انته
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。ここで、リミット サイクルをオンにした状態で、最小デッドバンド レートを低く制御しています。皆さんがそこから燃料の数値を知りたい場合は、単なる好奇心からお見せします
Right on that. Joe, you realize that when I went up to the SEP attitude, 
Roger. Die Winkel, die du im Flugplan angegeben hast, werd
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。以前お伝えしたヨーパルスの数を21としましたが、これを12に減らしたいと思います。12パルスは右にヨーイングしますが、
그리고 늘 저희에게 묻는 오래된 질문은 액체 폐기물을 어떻게 처리하느냐는 것입니다. 보시는 저 라인은 바로 바깥쪽, 저희가 선외 배수구
阿波罗8号，
La boussole est trop perturbée par les instruments d'assiette e
E Fred, Houston. Tra poco, ti farò leggere una procedura che vorrei farti copiare per un uso futuro. È una procedura per spegnere il bus principale del modulo di comando, e pensiamo che tornerà molto utile in seguito per cose come la rimozione delle batterie di ingresso del modulo di comando, e anche per preriscaldare e accendere il modulo di comando prima di sbarazzarci del modulo. Te la daremo 
アクエリ
روجر. هذه إحدى تلك المناسبات النادرة التي ترك فيها بيل مقعده وجلستُ مكانه، ولأول مرة أستطيع رؤية الأرض. أنظر من خلال منظاره الأحا
11, आपके पास काफी बड़ा दर्शक वर्ग है। यह अमेरिका में लाइव है। यह जापान, पश्चिमी यूरोप और दक्षिण अमेरिका के अधिकांश हिस्सों में भी लाइव प्रसारित हो रहा है
罗杰。65岁，圆顶70岁
753 السا
D'accord. Plus 2,1 deg
हाँ। वे कंप्यूटर के नीचे वाले डिब्बे में रखे जाते हैं, और वहाँ रखी भारी चीज़ें L/D का अनुपात बढ़ाती हैं। हमारे प
Roger. Je sais 
Бермуды, это «Дружба номер семь». Вы меня принимаете? Конец свя
휴스턴, 당신은 그 전에 이런 냉담한
D'accord. Mike, voilà ce qui s'est passé: tu étais en train de surveiller, et à l'étape 7, tu as accédé à NOUN 01, tu as saisi l'adresse, puis INFORMATION INFORMATION. Au dernier appui sur ENTER (35400 ENTER), juste après, tu es revenu à l'étape 16. Ensuite, en appuyant sur ENTER, tu as réellement entré les informations dans l'unité de contrôle de la température (CDU). Une fois les deux entrées saisies dans les registres 1 et 2, il y a eu un changement instantané dans la CDU, qui a analysé la situation. « Mon Dieu, j'ai obtenu une vitesse de 600 degrés par seconde! » Et elle a activé les jets pour tenter de réduire cette vitesse. Et les filtres de vitesse qu'il analyse… enfin, la vitesse qu'il analyse est filtrée, donc il ne détecte pas vraiment la v
Gemini 4, Housto
Okay, Jack. We don't want to bug you, but you ought to be thinking - or what your thoughts are concerning what the next burn will be. I got to figure out a watch schedul
D'accord. Avant de commencer la copie, cette procédure consiste simplement à activer le manomètre à hélium supercritique pour que vous puissiez effectuer la lecture. Le problème est que cette press
Это отрицательно. В этот момент я 
حسنًا، فهمت. سؤالي الوحيد يا جو هو أن مؤشري الدوران والانعراج لم يعودا إلى الصفر عند قيامي بمناورة تلقائية. حاولتُ ضبط الوضع يدويًا، ثم ا
रॉजर। मैं अभी आपका रक्तचाप मापने की कोश
こ
रॉजर, अफ्रीका में उस एक के बारे में चिंता मत करो क्योंकि वह
Roger
Bene. Per il Pacifico centrale, le condizioni generali sono buone. Ci si possono aspettare basi nuvolose sparse di 2000 piedi, visibilità 10 miglia, vento 070 a 12, altezza delle onde 4 piedi, alti
Esatt
Okay. And
تعمل المحركات عالية الدفع بشكل جيد، ويجب إجراء التتبع الدقيق باستخدام نظام التحكم الإلكتروني المنخفض فقط. يُعدّ تتبع الصاروخ المعزز مهمة صعبة مع المحركات عالية الدفع. تبقى الجيروسكوبات ضمن الحدود المسموح بها بشكل جيد. الوقت المنقضي هو 13:56. لقد فقدت رؤية الصاروخ المعزز في هذا الو
हवाई कैप
どう
Okay, DECA POWER wird später im Ablauf zu
Inserire tra "registr
हाँ। यह 
哥伦比亚，我们需要宽频带A
Roger, comp
Was müssen wir noch tun? Die Scanner sollten auf Sekundärbetrieb eingestell
Roger. Wir werden 
接下
Ты сгоришь в 15:34:01, сч
आईवी
Подожди, Чарли. Да, мы выедем отсюда на 263-й скорости и будем действовать в соответствии с реко
من ال
Ok, Houston, per i ": CDR è 0,07, CMP è 0,64, LMP è 0,80. Nota che i CMP non sono cambiati da quando abbiamo iniziato e quelli del comandante non sono cambiati molto. Abbiamo scambiato i "; il comandante ha LMP, il CMP ha quello del comandante 
Colombia. Ricevut
Bene. Questa è la configurazione che vogliamo per te, ed ecco cosa stiamo pensando. Quando siamo passati a serbatoio 1 AUTO, serbatoio 2 OFF, abbiamo scoperto che il ciclo di riscaldamento aveva una pressione nel serbatoio 1 di circa 233 psi, ben al di sopra del limite di attenzione e di allerta, e se passiamo a quella configurazione per la modalità sleep, eviteremo di accendere le spie di ATTENZIONE e AVVERTENZA durante il ciclo di sleep. Bene. Per farlo in modo confortevole, vogliamo trascorrere il resto della giornata utilizzando più H2 dal serbatoio numero 2, in modo da ottenere uno sbilanciamento a favore del serbatoio 1, così alla fine del ciclo di sleep tutto sarà in pareggio. Ed è per questo che ora ti abbiamo impostato su serbatoio 1 OFF, serbatoio 2 AUTO. Prevediamo di ottenere uno sbilanciamento di circa il 3% nel
300피트, 3 1/2 아래로
È molto impegnato in rollio, m
وجاك، هل ترغب في معرفة زاوية دخ
Итак, время горения состав
Ho un leggero rateo di beccheggio in questo momento, alle 0
لديك حمولة صا
« - - Lorsque DEL
Это 
Yaw and let's take a picture of the 
ハワイ通信技術局、ハワイ・キャップ通信局、こちらシグマ・セブン。
Ho inserito l'inter
अपशिष्ट जल डं
Okay, aktivieren Sie den Hauptverdampfer. Ken, wie haben wir die ganze Zeit unsere Kühlung bezogen? Ich glaube, die Kühler stehen mom
好的。MSC 实验 2 和 
好的，面板 16，顶行，飞行显示：系统工程师交叉指示器，打开；系统四联器 1 至 4 TCA，全部关闭。第二行，照明：泛光灯，我们可能会打开；逻辑电源 B，打开；飞行服流量控制，打开。通信下方：显示器，打开；VHF A 发射机，打开；VHF B 接收机，
제미
अप
こんにちは、大西洋の船です。アトラ
ठीक है। हम आपको बहुत जल्द एक और जानकारी देने वाले हैं। कृपया इसे कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार रहें। GET B 03 03 41; डेल्टा-V,
13번, 휴스
그냥 저절로 멈추게 두는
ロジャー、地図の最新版を受け取った
Роджер, «Дружба Семь». Мы довольно четко обозна
ジャック、理解し
Колумб
За окном слева виднеется относительно ровная равнина, испещренная довольно большим количеством кратеров размером от 5 до 
Eh bien, nous avons transféré - attendez - nous avons déjà transfé
Okay. Dann werde ich jetzt loslegen. Der Dreiecksunterschied beträgt 0,01, aber bei einer Geschwindigkeit von drei Zehnteln ist das etwas schwierig. Ich muss mit mittlerer Geschwindigkeit und unaufgelöster Projektion arbeiten, und es ist schwierig, den Stern lang
わかりました、ジム。まだ考えをまとめているところですが、いくつかの検討結果から、おそらく118時間後まで修正が可能で、デルタVのペナルティも大きくありません。その後も十分な追跡を行い、正しい軌道修正が行われたかを確認できるでしょう。また、必要になった場合に備えて、遅延修正の準備をしておくこともできます。ただし、おそらく必要になることはないと思います。現在の
Rog
जी हाँ। जिम, थोड़ी देर के लिए ताला खो गया था। खैर, आपका दिन शुभ हो। क्या आप हमें बैट
Ich bin wieder im G-Feld. Die Fluglage ist sehr stabil. Ich rolle direkt am Horizont entlang. Ich werde jetzt meinen Blutdruck senken und mich hier zurücklehnen, um mich
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir haben eine gute Ladung 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्ट
Подождите. Всё хорошо, Билл; 64 гр
라디에이터 출구 온도가 측정 범위를 벗어나 높게 표시되고 있으며 그리
Houston, wir 
그리고 샤
收到。非常清楚。极
L'i
Questo è il trasferim
Ha! h
로저. 50명이 넘는 사람들이 검토한 끝에 드디어 문제 해결에 대한 의견 일치가 이루어졌습니다. 5018 회의 중에, 마이크 씨가 회의를 종료하기 전에 삭제 가능한 데이터를 로드하려고
ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP COM。コンピュータのスイッチはオンのまま、AC電源はACMEに保管して
Gemini 4, this is Houston. We are not reading. Houston in the blind. Pilot be ready for Medical I say again, Medical Data Type 1 for Pilot at CSQ. 04:16.
了解しました。ど
Nous allons vérifier cela, VIII. Cela ne me semble pa
Können 
好的。我重新读了一遍：监测二次蓄压器液位；二次乙二醇散热器阀，正常模式保持30秒，然后切换至旁通模式。如果二次蓄压器液位没有下降，则将二次乙二醇散热器阀切换至正常模式。二次冷却液循环泵，AC 1 或 2。3分钟后，确认二次乙二醇排放压力在39
そうです。もし私たちがそれらを追跡すれば、明らかに、前回の中間段階で燃やしたという態度にはならない
इससे कार्यक्रम में एकदम से ब
分か
그리고 짐, 시간 나실 때
कीचड़ में। ठीक है, समझ गया। उनसे अनुरोध है कि वे उन्हें फिर से चालू कर दें और - ठीक है, जिम, ये ऑटो कॉइल रि
Roger, Friendship Seven. Je vous re
Roger. Bere
, stai leggendo 
حس
Alright, we're coming up on bus tie time; we've got a little
Ok, Jack. Te lo leggerò, poi aggiungerò qualche commento e ne parleremo un po'. Questo dovrebbe avvenire dopo... Dopo il realline a 49 ore, se il tempo lo permette, vorremmo che l'equipaggio verificasse se c'è un angolo di rollio in cui la cometa può esse
로저. 모두 준비됐습니다. 레트로젯도
Okay. Und wenn Sie bei Power 6 ankommen, sollten Sie eine Seite mit den Leistungs
Nein. Ich habe Schweißperlen auf den 
जिम, हम आपको सलाह देते हैं कि आप अपना पैंतरा आजमाएं, लेकिन VER
Alpha/Pc to Pc; LAUNCH VEHICLE INDICATOR to GPI; GIMBAL DRIVE PITCH and YAW to AUTO; EVENT TIMER RESET, up; EVENT TIMER START to STOP; EVENT TIMER MINUTES, SECONDS to center; POSTLANDING VENT valve, push; PROBE EXTEND/RELEASE to OFF; EXTEND/RELEASE talkbacks, two of them, gray; DOCK PROBE RETRACT, PRIMARY and SECONDARY, off; extend RUNNING LIGHTS/EVA LIGHTS, OFF; extend RUNNING LIGHTS - RENDEZVOUS LIGHT, OFF - got to get a - there you go - TUNNEL LIGHT, OFF; POWER LIGHT, OFF; SERVICE MODULE Helium, four, center; HELIUM 1 talkback, four, gray; UP TELEMETR
Это не настройки. Давайте я объясню. Температура к
아주 좋아요
D'accord. Attendez. Je v
了解。01344
जिम, हम यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते है
प्लस 59578, माइनस 00086, माइनस 05287, 012 080 018, लागू नहीं, प्लस 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332
ジム、周りの雑音がすごいですね。もう一度言っていただ
你们看到的是横跨史密斯海的卡斯特纳陨石坑和吉尔伯特陨石坑，而我们特别注意到，从地球上看不到的是，月球表面占主导地位
روجر. عند نقطة الشحن الكاملة (EEP)، تبلغ سعة البطارية أ 38.95 أمبير/ساعة، والبطارية ب 36.35 أمبير/ساعة، والبطارية ج 38.46 أمبير/ساعة. إجمالي سعة بطارياتك 113.76 أمبير/ساعة. عند نقطة أخرى، ستكون البطارية أ مشحونة بالكامل وستبلغ سعتها 40 أمبير/ساعة، ويمكنك إ
Ok, Jack. Ricevuto. Grazie mille. A proposito, man mano che il tuo tracciamento migliora, la dimensione di -2 si riduce sempre d
重新进入重力场。姿态看起来非常稳定。我正在地平线附近翻滚。我打算先停止测量血压——然后坐下来重新调整一下。我可以看到离子层。我现在处于
Roger. Nous avons votre température et votr
Oui, je sa
Transmission en aveugle. Nous avons une visibilité directe. Temps écoulé depuis le sol: 4 heures, 29 minutes et 30 secondes. Transmissio
はい、何かやるべきことを探しているのであれば、私のパネル 1 と 8 などを調べて、す
わかりました。半度なので、太陽の直径
Molly?Brown, correct that 400K feet. 
좋아요, 13일에는 캐너리, 
, this is Friendship Seven. Do you read? Ove
-67과 0이라고 적혀 있어요
Roger, nous sommes encore ass
Qui Sigma Seven. Su HF. Canary Cap. Com. Ti ho ricevuto. Mi hai ricevut
حسناً. فهمنا ذلك. تقول شركة EE
Я вижу там яркую звезду, должно быть, Венера. Забыл запомнить виды из окна, ко
نعم، كان كذلك. وفي الحقيقة، الآن وقد ذكرت ذلك، لم أكن موازياً للأرض. أعتقد أنني كنتُ، ربما، أشير إلى الأعلى بشكل شبه كام
双子座4号，休斯顿 CAP COM。
Aquarius, Houston. Vorremmo modificare il numero di impulsi di imbardata che vi abbiamo fornito in precedenza, portandoli a 21. Vorremmo ridurlo a 12. Dodici impulsi di imbardata a destra, e ci vorranno circa 3 secondi per ottenerli se no
您好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们注意到氧气流量指示器传感器出现了一些异常。我们怀疑传感器本身存在问题——我们原本预期在废气储存通风阀处
Et, autre chose, Jack. Quand viendra le moment d'effectuer mon lacet à 90 degrés, ce que j'avais prévu de faire, c'est de maintenir le cap (NOUN 76) et de faire plusieurs impulsions et mouvements de lac
ठीक है। ये कौन है, कॉमनवेल्थ टेक्नोलॉज
I can't see my dad's flagpol
Как т
Devo mandare i miei saluti alle persone della nostra stessa zona. Il fatto che siamo due emisferi uniti è dimostrato an
이제 시스템 현황에 대한 개요를 설명해 드릴 준비를 하고 있습니다. 모든 최종 단계를 검토하고 있으며, 향후 전망과 시스템 정보에 대해 저희가 파악한 바를 알려드리겠습니다. 그리고 조 커윈 박사께서 최신 소식을 모두 가져왔으니, 혹시 졸리지 않으시다면 조금씩
좋아요. 그럼, 우리가 어떤 것들을 받게 될지 읽어보
D'accord. Je les ai ic
حسناً، ما خططنا له هو استخدام فترة العشر إلى إحدى عشرة
罗杰，宁静基
نعم يا جيم. ستحتاج إلى تدوير المركبة 90 درجة لتوجيه محورها السيني الموجب نحو الشمس، ووضع الهلال - أي نقاط
Frank, probabilmente te l'hanno già detto, ma oggi eri in TV fantastico. Un piccolo dettaglio, però. Nella zona di El Lago sei stato messo in ombra da Babbo Natale. È arrivato su
وأمر آخر، لقد سررت لأن جيم كان يتدرب بالأثق
動詞 66
उड़ान के शुरुआती दौर में बूस्टर के बारे में जो जानकारी मैं दे रहा था, उसे जारी रखते हुए। अंधेरा छाने के बाद, लगभग 1200 फीट की दूरी पर, मैंने बूस्टर के साथ अपनी दूरी का अनुमान लगाने की कोशिश की, लेकिन उस समय बूस्टर से अपनी दूरी का अंदाज़ा लगाने के लिए मेरे पास केवल चमकती बत्तियों के बीच की दूरी ही थी। कभी-कभी - बल्कि लगातार - मुझे एक बत्ती, फिर दो बत्तियाँ, फिर एक बत्ती दिखाई देती थी, और कभी-कभी दो बत्तियाँ दिखने में काफी समय लग जाता था - जिससे पता चलता था कि बूस्टर लगातार घूम रहा था। मुझे वास्तव में यह बिल्कुल भी नहीं पता था कि वह किस दिशा में जा रहा है। बत्तियों के बीच की दूरी के आधार पर, जब मैं दोनों बत्तियाँ देख पाता था, तो मुझे लगता था कि कार्नार्वोन तक पहुँचने तक मैं बूस्टर के साथ अच्छी स्थिति में था। उस समय मुझे 
ठीक है। हमारे पास बस इतना ही केबल है। *** बाहर नहीं जा रहा
Bene. Ora, per quanto tempo ancora vuoi che aspettiam
Вы поверите, что перед вами куриное рагу? Всё, что вам нужно сделать, это залить 85 мл горячей воды и варить 5-10 минут. Затем набираем горячую воду из маленького краника с фильтром, который отфильтровывает любые газы, которые могут содержаться в питьевой воде, вставляем конец этой маленькой трубки в краник и трижды нажимаем на курок, чтобы получить 85 мл горячей воды, после чего разминаем её и отрезаем конец – и вот, г
如果
«Дружба Семь», в каком режиме управле
Roger. Are you in PREL
No, no, no, no, non è quello, è questo interruttore proprio acca
我们听到他们报出了一个
好的，阿
It's sort of messy. I
この便にはそれほど多くの便がな
حسنًا يا جاك. وهذا صحيح. لقد أخطأت في ترتيبها. هل تضع كلمة "COMPUTER, MAIN
Roger. Nur aus Interesse für Bill: Wir möchten kurz etwas zu den Heizungen der Kryotanks und den Lüftern sagen. Uns ist aufgefallen, dass die Heizungen normal funktionieren und sich ein- und ausschalten. Mit der Zeit erhöht sich diese Zyklusfrequenz, was auf eine leichte Schichtung im Tank hindeutet. Wenn wir dann alle vier Stunden für ein paar Minuten die Lüfter einschalten, wird die Mischung durcheinandergewirbelt, und die Heizungen schalten sich eine Zeit lang wieder langsamer ein und aus, bis sich erneut eine leichte Schichtung einstellt 
Sì, l'ho fatto. Vuoi rimuovere - Vuoi alimentare entrambi i bus, con gli interruttori del motore BUS TIE; prima di tutto, per verificare che non ci siano carichi sui bus, e in secondo luogo, e poi togliere l'alimentazione ai bus tirando gli interruttori automatici per garantire che gli int
Okay. And w
حسنًا. لدينا مدخل آخر هنا، وهو رقم 11، مفاده أن البيا
Soyez prêt à fournir le rapport sur la nourriture et l'eau pour vous deux via le CSQ si
D'accord. J'utilise maintenant la lune, qui est à ma gauche, et c'est un bon point de repère. Je vais masquer l'indicateur d'assiette pour que vous puissiez observer le lacet. Je passe en mode gyroscopique libre, en essayant de sélectionner le mode de commandes de vol électriques basses. Je vais d'abord centrer la lune dans le champ de vision, en contrôlant le roulis et le tangage, puis la replacer à sa position initiale. La lune se rapproche du centre du champ de vision. Je vais m'arrêter là et utiliser le contrôle de roulis pour équilibrer le tout. Voilà, le roulis est à zéro. J'ai dépassé la lune et je repère la planète Mercure, qui est bien brillante, un peu trop loin à droite. Vérifions maintenant le lacet. Environ 20 degrés, ce qui est suffisant pour une véri
حسنًا، هيوستن. اللوحة المركزية 
कार्नरवॉन, मिथुन राशि 4। अब तुम पूरी तरह टूट चुके
Итак, у меня сложилось вп
Affermativo. Una volta che avremo allineato tutto e ottenuto un time hack, le brave persone qui saranno in grado di fornirci gli atteggiamenti 8-ball per l'assetto di separazione del modulo di servizio, per l'assetto di allineamento del modulo di comando, che vi passeremo - un allin
Okay. Now we talked that over with, and at 1
휴스턴의 Associated 소속 해리 로젠탈 기자가 쓴 기사입니다. 두 명의 산타가 두 살배기 제프리 러벨의 크리스마스 이브를 더욱 특별하게 만들어 주었습니다. 첫 번째 산타는 집 문을 두드리고 선물을 가져다주었고, 두 번째 산타는 아빠를 달에서 집으로 데려다 주었습니다. 첫 번째 산타는 빨간 옷에 하얀 수염을 기르고 "호호" 하고 큰 소리로 외쳐 멀리까지 들렸습니다. 두 번째 산타는 달 뒤편에서 불꽃을 뿜어내는 거대한 엔진이었고, 수많은 사람들이 엔진이 점화되었다는 소식을 애타게 기다리고 있었습니다. "산타클로스가 있다는 것을 알려드립니다." 아폴로 8호는 엔진이 중요한 연소를 성공적으로 마친 지 15분 만에 무선 침묵을 깨고 전 세계에 이 소식을 전하며 처음으로 이렇게 말했습니다. "우리 모두 이보다 더 좋은 크리스마스 선물을 기대한 적이 없습니다." 관제센터의 켄 매팅리는 이렇게 말했습니다. "지상에 계신 모든 분들께 감사를 전합니다. 여러분 없이는 불가능했을 겁니다." 우주선 사령관 프랭크 보먼 대령이 답했습니다. 바로 그때, 관제센터 콘솔 앞에 크리스마스트리가 환하게 빛났고, 우주비행사 해리슨 슈미트는 승무원들에게 우주 버전의 "성 니콜라스의 방문"을 읽어주었다. "크리스마스 이브 밤, 우주 저 멀리에서 아폴로 8호 승무원들은 달 착륙 경쟁에서 승리했습니다."로 시작하는 이 동화는, 제프리의 아버지인 해군 대령 제임스 러벨과 공군 소령 윌리엄 A. 앤더스, 그리고 보먼 대령이 무사히 귀환할 때까지 축하 행사를 미뤄두었다. 여느 때와 같은 크리스마스 이브라면 우주비행사 가족들은 교회에서 크리스마스 예배를 드렸겠지만, 올해는 모두 텔레비전에 시선을 고정하고 있었다. 유인 우주선 센터 근처의 집들은 모두 크리스마스 장식으로 꾸며져 있었다. 러벨 가족의 집 주변과 팀버 코브 마을 곳곳에는 멕시코풍의 등불이 줄지어 설치되어 있었고, 러벨 가족 네 식구들은... 그때, 커다란 자루를 멘 키 큰 산타클로스가 탄 차가 도착했다. 그는 "호호" 하고 웃으며 문 앞에 서서 큰 소리로 노크했다. 문이 열리자 1월 14일에 세 살이 되는 제프리 러벨이 서 있었습니다. 제프리는 그 모습을 보고 움찔했습니다. 어머니가 그를 안아 올렸지만, 제프리는 여전히 겁에 질려 어머니에게 매달렸습니다. "작년에는 울면서 도망쳤어요." 15살 누나 바바라가 말했습니다. 앞서 바바라는 제프리가 전등을 모두 꺼뜨리지 못하게 하려고 뒤쫓아가야 했습니다. 다른 러벨 남매인 13살 제임스와 10살 수잔은 재미있다는 듯이 그 모습을 지켜보았습니다. 마침내 산타와 아이들은 안으로 들어갔고, 선물들은 트리 아래에 놓였습니다. 선물들은 오늘까지 열어보지 않기로 했습니다. 러벨 부인은 손님들을 위해 에그노그와 쿠키를 준비했고, 세 명의 우주비행사가 안내하는 25분짜리 달 탐사 방송을 함께 시청했습니다. 나중에 친구들은 러벨 부인, 바바라, 그리고 제프리를 데리고 크리스마스 장식으로 환하게 불을 밝힌 동네를 구경시켜 주었습니다. 맑은 하늘 위, 초승달이 밝게 빛나고 있었다. 그 누구보다 창조의 결실을 가까이
سيجما سفن، سيجما سفن، هذا مركز اتصالات واترتون على تردد HF. إذا كنت تسمع، انتقل إلى تردد UHF، انتقل إلى تردد UHF، وحاول الاتصال بطائرة
خلفك مباشرة،
は
I'd say the color of the - The local surface is very comparable to that we observed from orbit at this Sun angle, about 10 degrees Sun angle, or that nature. It's pretty much without color. It's gray, and it's a very white, chalky gray, as you look into the zero phase line; and it's considerably darker gray, more like a ash - ashen gray as you look out 90 degrees to the Sun. The - Some of the surface rock
That's affirmative; and after that, you PRO on that, and you co
Роджер. Мы возьмём их, когда будем проводить это меропри
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, क्या आप इसे दोबारा कहेंगे
了解しました。月面
알겠습니다. 저
Роджер, Аполлон-11. Большое спасибо за передачу. Она действительно длилась по
Gemini VIII, ici Houston. Inutile d
영하
... VGX minus 0.1, VGY minus 0.1, VGZ 1.1, and a burn time of 5 plus 57. S
了解。ACMEを元に戻さないといけない。HF/DFを出してみよう。正しい向きにしない
Roger. Ich 
了解。アダプタです。1、
Also, wenn wir diese hier laden – wenn ich den Film einlege und ein oder zwei Fotos mache –, dann muss ich sie wieder rausnehmen; das ist das einzige Pro
Good. 413020 183, 
13, Houston. Affermativo. Sei favorevole al braccio pirotecnico e
क्या
Хорошо. Эти небольшие кусочки были разработаны для решения проблемы скопления крошек в салоне самолета, поэтому они были созданы определенного размера, чтобы все крошки можно было сразу положить в рот. Думаю, благодаря нашему опыту мы обнаружили, что можем значительно продвинуться в освоении некоторых видов пищи, которые есть на Земле. На самом деле, в этом полете
ठीक है। चरण 7 इस प्रकार है: "सर्किट ब्रेकर पैनल 11, एसी बस बी, हीलियम पीक्यूजीएस प्रोपेलेंट डिस्प्ले, बंद। सर्किट ब्रेकर 11, एसी बस बी, न्यूमेरिक लाइटिंग, बंद। सर्किट ब्रे
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。三个通信开关位置。首先，S波段辅助磁带切换至“向下语音备份”；S波段正常模式关闭；遥测输入高电平。我再说一遍，S波段辅助磁带切换至“向下语音备份”；S波段正常模式
제 생각엔 아닌 것 같아요, 프레드. 당신보다 수백 마일 뒤쪽에 있어요. 700마일 정도라고 들었어요. 그리고 항로 조정팀이 중간에 항로를 수정하지 않았으니, 그게 원인일 수도 있겠네요
嗯，磨难是
一切正常，机器运转良好
낮은 비트 전송률로 시
बस इतना ही, जैक। और पानी लेने के बारे में एक और बात; अगर आप पर्
I generally don't 
Хорош
سأؤجل استخدام جهاز الإرسال. أعتقد أن
Je vais essayer de me débrouiller avec l'appareil photo et de prendre une photo de l
休斯顿，机组人员状态报告：5.5 7 5.
Роджер. Если бы мы могли оставить режим REACQ, если вы хотите испо
わかりました、ジャック。残りの手順は、この装置を完全稼働させるための宇宙服ループの設定だけです。作業員たちは、君が作業しているキャニスターが7.6ミリメートル水銀柱に達するま
面白いですね。全部動いて…キラキラ輝いて。そして…少なくとも、キラキラした粒子の中からたまに本物の星を見つけられるような気がしま
Это то, что на
Ich weiß, dass du es tust... hast es aber nich
Ok, Fred. Esatto, tranne per il fatto che la proced
Beh, per un po' ci sarà un po' di confusi
와, 이 무중력 상태 진짜 끝내주네. 내가 본 최고의 죽
네, 프랭크 씨, 말씀하신 내용을 잘 읽었
يبدو أن الأمطار تهطل بغزارة في واشنطن حيث كان من المقرر إقامة مباراة كل النجوم الليلة. بدأوا المباراة، على حد علمي، ثم توقفت بسبب الأمطار وتم إلغا
在这种飞行姿态下，确实会产生一种抬头仰望的错觉，如果没有地平线，那就只有一片漆黑的天空。驾驶舱内的光线非常明亮。当然，一旦适应了，就可以通过舱内照明灯来降低亮度。但目前，由于飞行服电路的问题，我不太愿意降低舱内照明。我频繁地使用指尖照明灯。有人指出，在以后的飞行中，我们必须配备一个万能装置
Хорошо, Хьюстон, Водолей. Как читать текст по
Wechseln Sie zum Kommandanten und sch
Ja, i
Roger
हमने अभी-अभी एजेना को 090 डिग्री पर घुमाया है और यॉ 
Okay. Du benötigst keine besonderen Techniken, um zwischen de
نعم، لقد التقط صورة لها باستخدام العدسة التلسكوبية ذات التكبير
是的，一个是给 18 号车用的，
알겠습니다. 이해했습니
Apollo 8, Houston. Tre posizioni dell'interruttore di comunicazione. Prima, 
मैं विश्वास करता हूँ
روجر. الأمور تسير على ما يرام. حالتي ممتازة. حالة الكبسولة ممتازة. وضع التحكم طبيعي. الجيروسكوبات التلقائية تعمل بشكل طبيعي، والمناورة معطلة. نسبة الوقود تتراوح بين 72 و100%. نسبة الأكسجين تتراوح بين 88 و100
ヒュー
좋아. 꽤 괜찮아 보
印度
好的。接下来，第一格的图保持不变，第二格的图一直画到推进剂回传信号处，在括号里划掉“八”，写上“四到灰色”，然后用铅笔画一条线“推进剂回传信号，四，到理发店招牌”
शानदार! मुझे पूरा मेक्सिक
추진 엔진에서 하얀
Vous pourriez inf
Роджер. Ваш диапазон значений для существительного 76 — кстати, 
쌍둥이자리 4세님, 혈압
Columbia, Houston. We made an error on those coordina
هيوستن، والطيار
Your blood pressur
Roger. ATTERRISSAGE - SANS ENCOMB
Roger. And got a couple of items that I would like to clean up. We will get you an budget. We've got one redline now; we are trying to get some firmer numbers for you, and we will have those in a little bit. Right now your usage is right on the flight plan line, so everything looks pretty good there. We want to get a crew status report from you. We would like to firm up the 2 flight plan idea; and sometime at your convenience, we would like to take a reading of the for the commander and CMP and then have you swap them. We are trying to isolate the - what the possible reason is for t
Роджер. У Нила са
分かりました。ジャック、念のため言っておきますが、パワーアップ作業に取り掛かれるのは2時間半が最短です。それ以外は通常通り、ゲームをできる限り有利に進めてください。ただし、この2時間半という時間は、司令船の消耗品を節約した場合の計算です。そうすれば、我々が太っている理由が分
はい。今1時間32分
الجوزاء 4
Roger, nous n'avons constaté aucune dispar
컴퓨터—발사 전 단계. 고주파는 꺼져 있
フレッド、わかったよ。理解できたと思う。君の読み上げを完全にコピーしたわけではな
Roger, mir geht es sehr gut. Ich werde g
I giroscopi sono ingabbiati. Ho un tasso di imbardata di circa 2 gradi al secondo. Tutti i giroscopi sono a zero. Ho il Corvus direttamente sopra di me.
Роджер. Gemini 4, мы хотели бы попросить вас вернуть выключатель питания переменного тока в IGS и включить компьютер, а также следить за повышением силы тока
자, 이제 됐습니다. 그런데 말이죠, 여러분께 전해드릴 온갖 정보들이 쏟아져 들어오고 있어요. 야구 경기 
Je remarque qu'à 3 h 26 min 33 s, j'observe en permanence 10 particules dans le ciel. Elles me semblent luire. Elles ressemblent à de petits morceaux de givre. Cependant, certaines paraissent très éloignées. Deux d'entre elles semblent se trouver à une centaine de mètres. Je n'ai pas utilisé le propulseur depuis un certain temps. En voici
It's not quite centered, but it's
Sind es schon 84 Stunden? Ja, das sind sie;
ठीक है। उससे तीन मिनट पहले वे चाहते हैं कि 
Roger, it's very nice up 
Okay, wir machen eine elektrische Überprüfung. Die Hauptschiene hat 24 Volt – die isolierte Schiene hat – das Klicken ist natürlich auf den Takt zurückzufü
Okay. Ich zeige hier etwas über 50 Prozent an, und wir machen weiter. Wenn es zu
Okay. That's pericynthian plus 2. / 62871 November Alfa, and stand by one. Okay. We'll pick up with a pitch trim and yaw trim of not applicable; time, minus 00468, plus 00254, plus 00181 173 101 027 November Alfa plus 00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044, down 044, left 45, plus 1100, m
Всё это 
了解。1時間ほど前に1杯飲みました。荷物を収納する直前、機内の真ん中で1杯飲んだのですが、気温は75度か78度で、湿度は62度で
أوه. إعداد
Okay. If I understand you correctly, then that gives me leeway to maneuver when we get up to activation comp
यह अंतरिक्ष यान से कहाँ जुड़ा है? धक्का देने के लिए कोई खास सहारा नहीं है। अब देखते हैं कि क्या मैं ठीक से धक्क
Wir haben eine weit
Jack, avant de commencer la procédure, nous constatons que la batterie A est complètement chargée et en excellent état. Nous allons recharger la batterie B. Laissez-la charger encore deux heures. Voici une procédure en sept 
Ti sento fort
Roger, 11. Wir würden gerne in naher Zukunft bei Ihnen zu einem passenden Zeitpunkt eine Abwasserentsorgung durchführen. Es ist kein bestimmter Zeitpunkt vorgesehen. Zum Zeitpunkt der dritten Kurskorrektur (ca. 53:55 Uhr) wird die dritte Kurskorrektur und alle zugehörigen Elemente gelöscht. Zur Information: Der berechnete Brennwert für die dritte Kurskorrektur betrug 0,8 Fuß pro Sekunde. Wenn wir uns entscheiden, die vierte Kurskorrektur durchzuführen, ergibt sic
D'accord. BATT C, PYR
我们
ちょっと早口ですね。もう一度ペ
हाँ, 
Hier spricht Sigma Seven. Ich weiß ni
Vi abbiamo ricevuto forte e chiaro. Abbiamo un nuovo TR e un nuovo Load per
Если бы я смог найти горизонт, я бы его взломал. Я наше
Хорошо. И платформа выглядит довольно неплохо. Похоже, что максимальный дрей
了解。Rev 55、No. 1、開始
Roger, Canary. Mein Status ist gut; der Kapselstatus ist gut; mein Steuermodus ist automat
Вы хотите сказать, что топливные элементы 1 и 2 пытаю
Ро
रॉजर। डी-8
माइक, यहाँ आपकी चेकलिस्ट के पृष्ठ 97 पर, जहाँ हम सेटअप कर रहे हैं, उसके बाद पेंसिल से एक नोट लिखा हुआ है, "रेट को स्थिर होने के लिए 20 मिनट प्रतीक्षा करें। निगरानी न करें।" इसका महत्व यह है कि, यदि आप 16 की निगरानी कर रहे हैं, तो जब आप चरण 7 में यहाँ पहुँचते हैं, तो दूसरी बार जब आप 'a' करते हैं, तो आपको तीन रजिस्टर लोड करने से पहले NOUN 01 को पुनः लोड करना होगा, ताकि यह
Roger. J'ai un 10-Charlie 123. 1+45. 01 
177 143 000 NA, 플러스 00197, 47020 551 46818 12 128.3 257 023, 위 263, 왼쪽 17, 플러스 1195, 마이너스 16500, 플러스 126 23 35608, 
Хорош
नहीं, जहाँ तक म
わかった。走査望遠鏡にアルデバランが見えるようになったので、
好的……我们的下一个时
我只听说机舱保
Давление 
E
Vance, we've got to realize that we've got to establish a work-rest cycle up here, so we just can't wait around here to just read procedures all the time up to the burn. We've got to get them up here, look at them, and then we've got to get the people to slee
Фантастика. Впервые нам удалось идеально проверить горизонт. Слишко
حسناً. أعتقد
Roger. Haben Sie die TR-5-Checkliste ausgefü
알겠습니다.
大丈夫で
रॉजर, समझ गया कि फ्लाई-बाय-वायर सिस्टम में लो राइट थ्र
ジェミニ4、RKV CAP
حسناً، انتهى الأمر بالنسبة لقسم الطعام. سأغ
不，没关系。我只是想确认一下。到79年10月之前，我们
كان ا
Roger, Jack; hier ist Tom. Ich wollte euch und Jim nur 
D'accord, Houston. À quoi ressemblent les GDA main
حسناً. يبدو أن الأمور وا
حسنًا، الثاني موجود أيضًا على اللوحة رقم 5. قاطع الدائرة، POWER-1، MAIN A، مفتوح؛ قاطع الدائرة SENSOR SIGNAL، MAIN B، مفتوح. حسنًا، اقرأ هذه التعليمات مرة أخرى، وسأعطيك بع
Nun ja, die Erde ist sehr, sehr hell. Da ist nichts im Objektiv, was 
짐이 어디서 자는지 궁금해
Je le sais, je le sais — 295. Température A — 87. Pression A — 3000. Température B — 82. Pression B — 2650. Ampèremètre principal — 19. N° 2 — 19,5. 1A — 4,5. 1B — 4,5. 1C — 4. 2A — 5. 2B — 4,75. 2C — 4,75. Tension continue 
Okay. -04402 -00001 +48387 178 169 359, nicht anwendbar, +00185 48587 603 48383 06 2027 250, Erdmittelpunkt 0123 - unten 123; ich wiederhole, unten 123, rechts 22 +21123 -03000 12313
Greenwich Mean Time 00. Entschuldigung,
돔(온도)은 70도로 유지되고 있습니다. 기내 돔은 50도입니다. 우주복 흡입구는 6
我想，这时你们应该能注意到我们正在清理
ठी
Apollo 8, ici Hous
Troppo vicino, cred
Anche 
ठीक है, और आपको यकीन है कि हमारे पास 
Ripetiamo 
Stiamo cercando di riprendere il nostro normale ciclo del sonno
अच्छा। 82 में से एक-दसवां। 8
«Аполлон-8»; Хьюстон – Хониса
حسناً، يمكنك رؤية نهر النيل وهو يكاد يصل إلى منبعه. البحيرة محجوبة بالغيوم، لكن يمكنك تتبع مساره
ええ、TCPが入ってないんです。TCPって何ですか？ ええ。それが問題なんです。TCPが入ってい
अगला पृष्ठ, पृष्ठ 15, बाएँ कॉलम में, या कहें कि बाईं ओर, नीचे की ओर, जहाँ "कैमरा और टेप कॉन्फ़िगर करें" लिखा है और नीचे "
Apollo 11, Houston. Siamo davvero colpiti dalla nitidezza e dal dettaglio dell'immagine. I colori sono... ora, è davvero un'immagine eccellente ora che la guardo sul nostro monitor, che impiega circa 12 secondi prima c
嗯，你的钟看起
D'accord, Bill, et nos données BIOMED semblent encore un peu instables. Pourriez-vous vérifier le conditionneur de signal bleu sur votre faisceau BIOMED? Il y a un connecteur, normalement au centre, avec un connecteur bleu. Vérifiez-le. Je ne sais pas si vous avez changé les câbles du faisceau BIOME
Следующие один, два, три, четыре — то же самое, и нам нужно, чтоб
能帮上
Es ist mein... es treibt wohl irgendwo
首先，我处于自动再入模式；陀螺
Okay, vielleicht habe ich e
Jim, i
Roger. Es dauert sowieso ewig,
了解しました。了解しました。バッテリーBを終了し、バッテリーAを始動して、O2パージを実施
已审
هل ضغط الخزانات يبدو ج
जैसे ही मैंने अभी-अभी कहा - हाँ, क्या आप कार्यभार संभालने के लिए तैयार हैं? खैर, उन्होंने अभी-अभी पूछा - कहा कि उन्हें लगा कि मुझे सोना चाहिए था। और मैंने उनसे कहा कि मैं आपका इंतज़ार 
सुरक्षा बेल्ट 
I think we ought to make a big effort to get a
Ricevuto. E per la tua calibrazione ottica, il rollio
了解、
여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. 말씀하신 내용을 읽었습니다. 그런데 좀... 알아듣기 어렵네요. 제가 HF 안테나를 점검하지 못했습니
Кен, мы собираемся сделать следующее: поместим эт
روجر. مناورة 2، /: 46728، ناقص 053، زائد 121 زائد 28466 ناقص 00352. لم أحصل على 50
Dovrei dire, Bruce, che quando sono andato al circuito secondario dell'acqua, dal separatore d'acqua al circuito secondario, non ho notato alcun cambiamento. Ma dopo circa 15 o 20 minuti, l'acqua ha smesso di uscire. Quindi forse era solo acqua già presente nel circuito che continuava a fuoriuscire, ma il separat
Die Hasselblad hat bei dem einen Schuss den Dienst versagt. Ich glaube nicht, dass es ein guter Sc
Eagle, Houston. Vorrem
モニ
ठीक है। मुझे समझ आ गया
وأبولو 13، هيوستن. نريد أومني ألف
Спасибо, и мы хотели бы, чтобы вы перешл
アポロ8号
加 44，/ 62970，减 162，加 129，加 00197，加全零，加 60701 180 133 001，加 00203，加
네, 알겠습니다. 이제 10분 정도 남았습니다. 다시 연락드리겠습니다. TV 방송 관련 정보는 모두 대기하고 있겠습니다. 만약 상황이 다시 복잡해지면, 정
रॉजर। उन पुराने गड्ढों में से दक
Ro
Passiamo 
잘 보이는 곳으
Ruhe bewahren, positive Stimmung, und wir sichern uns den Sieg. Wi
Хорошо. Это примерно максималь
了解しました。ジェミニ8号、ヒューストンです。少し時間が空いているので、通信状況の最新情報をお伝えします。あ
D'accord, Jim. E
司令船にも船内にも、破片はほとんどありませんでした。ボルト、ナット、ネジなどの緩んだ破片や糸くずなどもほとんど見つかりませんでし
목소리가 좀 작고 명확하진 않지만, 같은 문제
Думаю, изначально у них было ровно тыся
Okay. Would you believe that we have a correction now to the last camera I gave you? Correct th
E
로저, 알겠습니
좋아요. 데이터는 괜찮아 보이네
バスに乗って電源を切ると0ボル
Roger. Einen Moment bitte. Sie wollen wissen, ob Sie den Hauptbus B für das Kommandomodul für geeign
Come
待機してお
Одна из особенностей заключается в том, что
- - RKV。正しく入力されなかったSPCロードを更新したいのですが、UHFを有効にして、エンコーダをオフにしていただけます
로저. 5 SPS/G&N: 37201, -060, 
네. 지구가 이번에는 반대 방향, 즉 왼쪽에서 오른쪽으로 26도 각도로 이동했다는 말씀이시죠? 
ヴァンス、私たちはミッドコース 2 までカウントダウンしています。チェックリストでは、残
你觉得你能够到——够到挂在这里的这个钩子吗？你可以考虑用这种方
짐, 현재 우리의 계획은 이 값을 수정하지 않는 것입니다. 우리는 나오는 값을 그대로 받아들이고 살아갈 것입니다. 그리고 지구와 달의 중심을 지날 때, 지구 중심과 달 중심의 각도를 측정할 수 있다면 상황을 좀 더 잘 파
A1区画では、16ミリ弾倉は窓番号5ではなく4に配置されます。ティッシュディスペンサーは1つしか残っていません。U3区画では、16ミリブラケットは窓番号4にあります。バッグにはCMPとLCG2個を追加します。A8区画では、LCG2個を削除し、PPK1個を追加して合計4個にし、その他装備を10ポンド追加します。先日は5ポンドとお伝えしましたが、10ポ
On devrait passer la nuit ici à prendre des photos, à observer les animaux sans se focaliser sur un point précis. Le but du jeu est d'en repérer que
休斯顿，阿波罗8号。你如
आपकी बत्तियाँ जल रही ह
关闭减压
Je pense que nous essaierons de faire cela, mais je ne suis pas sûr – c'est une des choses que
プラットフォームの調整
D'accord. J'étais juste curieux. Je voyais bien la diff
阿波罗8号，你们准备好复
Wir haben Ihnen bereits einige Zeitangaben gemacht. Wir gehen davon aus, dass wir Ihn
ठीक है। वैंस, तुम अभी भी व
Okay. At 23 h
Водолей, Хьюстон. Нам нужно еще одно измерение в амперах и вольтах,
좋아요. 등을 가방에 기대세요. 잘 됐네요. 이제 가방 위에 올려놓았어요. 앞으로, 위로. 이제 괜찮아요. 제 쪽으로 조금. 아래로, 왼쪽으로 살짝. 공간 충분해요. 닐, 자세 잘 맞췄어요. 제 쪽으
ठीक है। समझ गया कि वे चाहते हैं कि हम जहाँ भी भूभाग दिखाई दे, उसके हिस्से की तस्वीरें लें, और आखिरी दिन तक इंतज़ार न करें। लेकिन आपको बता दें कि हम कुछ फिल्म बचाकर रखना चाहते हैं, ताकि कल जब हमें दक्षिण-पश्चिमी संयुक्त राज्य अम
好的，就在几秒钟前失去联系之前，我最后跟你说的是要合理使
簡単に言うと、ピッチと
Ricevuto. Ti ho ricevuto forte e chiaro. Ti invieremo un nuov
罗杰。
いいえ
Nous aimerions effectuer quelques tests supplémentaires, et le consensus général est qu'il ne semble pas y avoir de problème particulier. Nous aimerions examiner les résultats de quatre ou cinq tests supplémentaires. Auparavant, nous souhaiterions réaliser un test de biais nul. Comme nous n'avons aucun moyen de contrôler ces opérations sur la liaison descendant
Ich habe es seit Einbruch der Dunkelheit nicht gefunden. Es – es – es spinnt 
قل، هيوستن؛ بر
EM
데이터를 다시 살펴보고 그 부분을 찾아내야 
干得
没错。下一步：等待30分钟进行
Roger
Wie liest du jetz
了解しました。ス
Okay. I'll probably only be doing it maybe - part of it at six frames a second, some it at one. So I could be changing settings as it goes th
Et le site d'atterrissage es
आपको सुनना चाहिए 
Roger, Bill. Ich habe gerade ein neues Exemplar bekommen. Wenn 
ヒューストン、コロンビア。コメントをお願いします。
好的。我想大家对太空计划的印象基本都是各种奇特的电子设备，当然，其中很多确实如此。但我还是想在这里介绍几样东西。首先，你可以非常精确地测量一下水箱里剩余的水量。我们现在要用我展示的这个袋子来收集水箱里剩余的水，看看到底还剩多少水。希望在未来的任务中，能够安全地延长这些设备的运行时间。我的另一只手拿着的装置，可以用来测量袋子里到底有多少水。我觉得用“鱼秤”来形容这个装置最贴切。你看，我现
로저. 어댑터
スラスター噴射とピッチ角の関
क्या हम इसे अभी के लिए स्थगित कर सकते हैं...? अभी के लिए, और हम थोड़ा पीछे रह गए हैं... हम कार्यक्रम को ठीक क
هذا ما تنص ع
好的。“圣诞前夜，在遥远的太空，阿波罗8号的宇航员们刚刚赢得了登月竞赛；耳机被小心翼翼地挂在控制台旁，盼望着克里斯·克拉夫特很快就能赶到；弗兰克·博尔曼舒舒服服地躺在床上，脑海中浮现着登月的景象；吉姆·洛弗尔躺在沙发上，安德斯则在驾驶舱里，对着电脑屏幕绞尽脑汁；突然，太空舱里传来一阵嘈杂声，弗兰克猛地从床上跳起来，想看看发生了什么事。他像闪电一样飞奔到六分仪旁，确保飞船不会坠毁。月球崎岖地壳上的光芒，给灰色的月尘染上了一层绿色的光泽，这时，他惊奇地发现，一块缅甸剃须膏的招牌上写着：‘基尔罗伊到此一游’。”但弗兰克可不是傻瓜；他很快就明白，他们抢先一步；这一定是骗人的伎俩。他的咒骂声比火箭还快，他转向船员，骂道：“洛弗尔，安德斯，
रोटे
わかりました。こちらにはご用意がありません。丸2日もお休みいただいておりますので、何かご用があればいつでもこちらで待機し
एक सेकंड की गलती, यानी पुष्टि। आपसे अनुरोध है कि केप से पुष्टि करें कि मेरा प्रतिगामी समय 04 + 32 + 38 सही
Roger, Jim. Break, Jack, we'd like you to stay in the deadband you are now in, and we'll make a change when the TV is over. Another thing we would like you to do is check your pitch and yaw on your hi
Джерри, ты можешь делать эт
حسناً. وخلف رأسه مباشرة توجد أدوات
حسنًا. أنا آ
SPS ヘリウム バルブ (2 個)、自動、リミ
Hai i 
Хьюстон, Игл. Вы копируете довольно большие числа для дальности и скорости изменения дальности в - VERB 83? И вы - вы только что предоставили нам вектор состояния, который изменил одно из двух транспор
Il fulmine sembra una grossa macchia, piuttosto che una striscia frastagliata che siamo abituati a vedere quando siamo a terra. Sembra proprio una grossa macchia, quasi come un colpo di contraerea. Una grossa macchia di luce intensa, che poi svanisce quasi all'istante. Sembra proprio che il cielo sia coperto. A proposito, come vi arriva la mia 
はい。フライバイとペリ
Friendship Seven this is C
Just took a frame of some 
好的。我们之所以需要
Okay. We're - we're in no rush. This is a very pleasant attitude, as a matter of fact. The Sun is down in the, so it's not shining through the windows and heating the place up. We'
L'
- -... Questo è quello che... 0,5, giusto? È... Mike, hai digitato un VERBO
Aquarius, Houston. Negativ. Wir möchten alles so lassen, wie es ist, aber wir würden Ihre Beobachtungen gerne mit Simulationsarbeiten, die wir demnächst intensivieren werden, in Verbindung bringen. Wenn Sie uns also Informationen darüber geben könnten, welche Sterne Sie aus dem Fenster sehen können, könnten wir diese Korrelation
حسنًا، لنرى إن 
Вы та
Как поживает «зеленая команда» сегодня утро
बेचारा एलएम दूषित हो गया है; इस पर पेशाब के कण लगे हुए हैं; और, जिस तरह से यहाँ रोशनी पड़ रही है,
सिग्मा से
Salut Jack. On va t'expliquer la procédure 
روج
罗杰，我们明白了。约翰，我会给你倒计时，准备开始复古序列。
Inoltre, il presidente Nixon ha annunciato - o dichiarato - una giornata di partecipazione lunedì per tutti i dipendenti federali, per consentire a tutti di seguire le vostre attività in diretta. Anche molte amministrazioni statali e cittadine e aziende in tutto il paese sta
好的，杰克。我现在给你描述一下推进器配置。Able 1、Charlie 1、Able 2 关闭。Charlie 2、主推进器 A，以及我提到的所有开启的推进器都开启。Baker 1 关闭。Dog 1 开启，Baker 2 关闭，Dog 2 开启。Able 3、Charlie 3、Able 4、Charlie 4 开启。Baker 3 关闭，Dog 3 
نعم، ها هي حروف الجيم ق
वह - मा
...여러분들은... 그들을 정말 좋아하죠
Roger, Gemini 4. Nous allons bientôt passer au niveau d
Do you understand the fuel and ΔV situation? Did Ed explain it all t
Это подтверждается. Соответствуют ли ваши проявле
1차 검사 결과는 매우 좋습니다. 2차 검사는 아마 LOS 이후에 진행할 예정입
आगे बढ़िए, यह जेमिनी 
Bruce, je précise que lorsq
R
نشهد تبايناً في نقطة
Très bien. Dans le coin inférieur droit de la page 2-22, l'attitude 
Das ist bestätigt. Okay. Wir haben das Thema Kommunikation behandelt, F
그래요, 어쩌면 당
,
मैं आपकी बात अच्छे से सुन रहा हूँ। आप उड़ान के बारे में क्या बता सकते हैं? आप मुझे उड़ान के बारे में क्या बता सकते 
Вначале работа с системой не позволила нам немедленно начать наблюдения, как мы планировали, поскольку нам предстоял очередной маневр уклонения. Сброс системы вызвал огромное количество псевдозвезд в этой области, что сделало кал
Okay, Jim. Jetzt sollte es ganz gut sein. Wir haben Ihre Antwort auf Frage 
L'une des caractéristiques étonnantes de la surface est la rondeur de la plupart des cratères; la plupart d'entre eux semblent avoir l'app
Also, James, wenn d
Gemini 4, that's all from Hous
I got 4 fe
Хорошо, Джим. Ваша текущая конфигурация имеет следующ
Хьюстон, Игл. Колумбия четко слышит ваши сообщения по св
Tutta quella procedura per P22 sembrava funzionare molto bene. L'unica cosa un po' strana è che c'era un po' di attività dei propulsori DAP. Avevo beccheggio in ACCEL COMMAND, e rollio e imbardata in RATE COMMAND, e in qualche modo rollio e imbardata si sono eccitati, e il DAP h
로저, 마이크. 호흡률 그래프가 여전히 평탄하네요. 오늘 저녁 자기 전에 시간이 되시면 아랫갈비뼈 옆쪽에 붙이는 전
Хорошо, Джек. Следующий шаг — взять карточку-подсказку и
Lever de soleil sur la côte ouest. C'est plutôt décevant car le ciel est presque entièrement voilé par le brouillard et les nuages. J'ape
D'accord. Pour la manœuvre, il faudra aller dans GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, ATTITUDE CONTROL. Les commutateurs seront ROLL PULSE, PITCH PULSE et YAW MODE CONTROL. Nous uti
रॉजर, से
네. 브루스 씨, 저희는 정상 허용 범위 내라고 생각합니다. 다만 이 절차
Can you stand by just a second on that? At the present time we cannot confirm it OFF. We
Okay. And that's exactly where I was. COMMAND MODULE PROPELLANT 2, center, on, up; PROPELLANT talkbacks, two, gray; SERVICE MODULE SECONDARY FUEL PRESSURE, four, center, and CLOSED; AUTO, OFF;
それはあなた次第です。頑張ってくだ
Es tut mir leid, dass ich +4 gesagt habe, ich bin vom Retro-Wert ausgegan
알겠습니다. 하지만 그러려면 먼저 음정이 
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Via libe
Okay. Here's the big story. Your attitude really looks quite good except in roll, and we'd like you to do the following. In MIN impulse , we'd like you to trim to zero pitch, which is about where you are now; to 008 
मैंने कहा, मै
Außerdem, Bermuda, oszilliert der Ballon nicht nur kegelförmig in Nick- und Gierrichtung, sondern scheint auch auf die Kapsel zuzu- u
ठीक है। थोड़ी देर के लिए आपसे संपर्क टूट गया था क्योंकि हम आपकी बात सुन नहीं पा रहे थे। जैक, हम लगभग 5 मिनट का विराम लेना चाहेंगे। कुछ और लोग इसे सुनने के लिए आ रहे हैं, और इस प्रक्रिया को तैयार करने में कई लोगों की मेहनत लगी 
هذا صحيح يا جيم. لم نحصل على صورة له بعد. سيكون في الجزء العلوي من - تصحيح، الجزء العلوي من - أعلى نقطة تثبيت 2 والجزء العلوي من، ويجب أن يقسم المؤشر إذا كنتَ في الوضع الصحيح على الشمس، ع
沃利，我们有一些回声探测器的观测数据。
这里是Sigma Seve
……双子座 V
Roger. Certains commentaires précédents de Jim concernant la luminosité du limbe au lever du soleil ont suscité beaucoup d'intérêt. Nous a
瞧，那是我们的朋
了解しました。バズ、了解しました。地上チェックリストにいくつか変更点があります。基本的には、司令船を追跡して、最後にもう一度位置を確認することをお願いします。これはP57です。それからチェッ
D'accord. Nous avons consulté les procédures de dépannage, et le numéro 28 ne révèle rien de très alarman
D'accord. Cela semble une bonne idée si vous souhaitez aller voir le modèle 37. Et nous sommes prêts à travailler sur le module COMM dès que le ga
は
연소 시험에 가까워짐에 따라 지난번 연소 시험 때와 동일한 점검 절차를 거쳐야 합니다. 즉, 모든 장비의 전원이 켜져 있는지 확인해야 합니다. 지시에 따라 회로 차단기 하나하나를 점검해야 합니다. 그리고... 지휘 모듈에 다시 
Хорошо. Мы прямо сейчас едем на SEF и начинаем доставать всё наше фотооб
Ricevuto. Richiedi di impostare la funzione S BAND su RANGE. Faremo un po' di range su di te. Inoltre, ho un fattore K aggiornato per quando
Меркурий? Громко и ясно. Я использовал Меркурий и Луну для н
C'est une excellente affaire. Merci à tous. J'ai une rondelle ici. J'ai récupéré une rondelle
Roger, verstanden. Falls Sie noch 
حسناً. يا أهل هيوستن، راقبوا
Разница температур точки росы составляет примерно 65° по влажном
네, 알겠습니다
ロールが
정정합니다, 
Hey, there we go. Incidentally, we've been getting all kinds of bits of information to pass up to you. We've had baseball scores coming in, basketball. S
네, 짐. 확인했습니다. 현재 10.6 버전까지 지원 가능하며, 그보다 조금 더 높은 버전도 지원해 드
لا يا فريد. هذا نصف خرطوم القائد الأزرق ونصف خرطوم 
まあ、屋根がなくて
I 
罗杰。我——告诉你，我稍微提高了一点压力。现在宇航服和舱内的压力读数都是 7 psia
هذا هو جيميني 6، ب
Roger. Read you loud and clear. You're looking good here on the ground
ठीक है, हमें इस टेप के लिए एक नया ठिकाना चाहि
هذه هيوستن
Houston, Apollo 8. Entrée comme suit: milieu du Pacifique, 357 152 359 268 plus 0813 moins 
حسنًا، هذا صحيح. الآن، سأعطيك أيضًا نقطتين لتحديد موقعهما على هذا المنحنى. المنحنى الحالي الذي رسمته مبني على نقطة الحضيض القمري (القرب من الأرض) عند مسافة 60 ميلًا، ولديك الآن نقطة الحضيض القمري عند مسافة 62 ميلًا؛ والسبب في أن هدفك هو المرور فوق موقع الهبوط، لذا لدي خمس مجموعات من الإح
Tutto bene. Dopo 
ठीक है। टेक्सास में लगी भीषण आग बुझने तक इसे चालू रहने दो, फिर हम तुम्हारे रिसाव पर नज़र रखेंगे। अगर रिसाव जारी रहता है, तो हम तुम्हें केप के ऊपर इसे बंद करने के लि
Mike, hier sp
Grazie mille. Ok, leggo queste quantità. Il GMT era 17:16 quando siamo partiti. Quantità di propellente era 60. Temperatura della cabina - 92. Temperatura della tuta - 58. Pressione della cabina - 5,6. CO2 della tuta - 3/4 di millimetro. Bombola secondaria di O2 sinist
Tranquillità, Houston. Faremo delle ricerche su questo problema e vi contatteremo tra poco per l'orario dell'evento della missione. Correzion
D'accord. L'avertissement se trouve après « 400 plus zéro »: Ne sortez plus de la zone de sécurité sur ACA. Te
Voici Gemini VIII
이 함선은 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 
Quel modo di sparare era davvero singolare. Ogni volta che aumentavo il beccheggio,
Okay. Coming up. BAT 2 is on the line. We hav
Okay. Die Gewässer sind alle königsblau; die Wolken leuchten natürlich strahlend weiß; die Reflexion des Lichts von der Erde ist deutlich stärker als die des Mondes. Die Landflächen haben im Allgemeinen eine bräunliche Textur – von dunkelbraun bis hellbraun. Man kann viele Wolkenwirbel der verschiedenen Wetterzellen erkennen. Ein langes Band aus Zirruswolken erstreckt sich vom Eingang des Golfs von Mexiko quer über den Atlantik. Die Nord-Süd-Grenze verläuft derzeit durch den Atlantik. Die Südhalbkugel ist fast vollständig bewölkt, und auch in der Nähe des Nordpols gibt es einige Wolken. Im Südwesten von Texas und im Südwesten der USA ist es klar. Ich würde sagen, im Nordwesten und Nordosten gibt es einige
オ
Sarebbe interessante vedere un po' di questa detriti uscire direttamente dall'orbita polare. Chissà quanto tempo ci vorrà prima dell'
Liste de vérification après atterrissage. Déploiement du parachute. Atterrissage réussi. Arrêt du bus d'atterrissage. Casque retiré
Roger. Taureau, Aida; je répète, Taureau, Aida. Haut 162, gauche 01, le reste n'est pas applicable. Alignement Sirius, Rigel 129, 155, 010, espacement négatif, fenêtre d'horizon allumage moins 3,27 degrés, horizon gauche. À l'allumage, 18 degrés, horizon gauche; avant la lecture, configurer pour recevoir
Apollo 8, Houston. We
Houston, hai let
ठीक है। और एक्वेरियस, अब हमें आपको दूसरी वेबसाइट पर भेजना होगा, और हमें लगता है कि अगर हम इस बार एस-बैंड ट्रांसमीटर/रिसीवर को बंद कर दें
Roger. Sie können die Mengenanzeige jetzt deaktiviere
अपोलो 
ठीक है
そうだ。ミズーリ州スプリングフィールドでは、ブルックリン・ドジャースの元捕手、ミッキー・オーウェンがいた。1941年のワールドシリーズで、ニューヨーク・ヤンキースをドジャースに勝利に導いたサードストライクを落とすという記録を打ち立てた人物だ。彼はスポーツでの記録だけでなく、それ以上のことで記憶に残ることを決意した。45人の少年少女が、彼が提供したポニーの受取人となった。これらの若者たちは、ポニーをどのように世話したいかを書いた手紙を送るよう依頼された。手紙が殺到したため、彼は既に提供していた20頭にさらに5頭のポニーを追加し、他の寄付者からも20頭のポニーが届いた。ミッキー・オーウェンはこう語った。「45通くらいだろうと思っていたら、結局900通くらい届いたんだ」。さて、特集ページはこちら：ニュージーランド、ウェ
我们应该往里面放什
ठी
Hier ein Bericht von Harry Rosenthal von Associated aus Houston. Zwei Weihnachtsmänner verschönern dem zweijährigen Jeffrey Lovell den Weihnachtsabend. Der erste klopfte an seine Haustür und brachte Geschenke. Der zweite holte seinen Papa vom Mond zurück. Der erste trug einen roten Anzug und einen weißen Bart und rief laut genug, um es bis zum Ende der Straße zu hören. Der zweite war ein riesiges Triebwerk, das hinter dem Mond Flammen spuckte, und Tausende warteten gespannt auf die Nachricht, dass es gezündet hatte. „Bitte beachten Sie, dass es einen Weihnachtsmann gibt“, waren die ersten Worte von Apollo 8, als die Funkstille 15 Minuten später endete und die besorgte Welt darüber informierte, dass das Triebwerk seine kritische Zündung durchgeführt hatte. „Keiner von uns erwartet jemals ein schöneres Weihnachtsgeschenk als dieses“, sagte Ken Mattingly von der Missionskontrolle. „Vielen Dank an alle auf der Erde. Sie wissen, dass wir es ohne Sie nicht geschafft hätten“, antwortete Oberst Frank Borman, der Kommandant des Raumschiffs. In diesem Moment erstrahlte ein Weihnachtsbaum vor den Konsolen in der Missionskontrolle, und Astronaut Harrison Schmidt las der Crew eine Weltraumversion von „Ein Besuch vom Nikolaus“ vor. „Es war die Nacht vor Weihnachten, und weit draußen im Weltraum hatte die Apollo-8-Crew gerade das Rennen zum Mond gewonnen“, begann sie. Die Crew der Missionskontrolle hatte die Feier verschoben, bis Jeffreys Vater, Marinekapitän James Lovell, zusammen mit Major William A. Anders und Oberst Borman von der Luftwaffe sicher auf dem Heimweg waren. An jedem anderen Heiligabend wären die Familien der Astronauten zum Weihnachtsgottesdienst in der Kirche gewesen, aber dieses Jahr saßen sie alle gebannt vor ihren Fernsehern. Die Häuser in der Nähe des bemannten Raumfa
Okay, Hous
प्लेटफ़ॉ
Come leggi, 
Перепускной к
罗杰。我
罗杰，迈克。我想就数据做一些说明。自动机动相当准确。看起来我们在机动过程中捕捉到了一些亚恒星点；自动光学系统将老人星直接定位到它应该在的位置；最小脉冲控制也如预期那样有效。在我开始观测的高度，天空中
D'accor
这段信号是从月球和地球大约中间的位置传来的。我们已经飞行了31小时20分钟左右。距离登月还有不到40个小时。你们可以看到比尔的牙刷在这里。他一直在刷牙，为了演示在零重力环境下物体是如何漂浮的。他努力接住那些东西的样子，看起来就像是太空人队的队员。我真希望我们能让你们看到地球。那景色美极了，以蓝色为主的背景，覆盖着大片大片的白色云层，尤其是在晨昏线附近有一个非常强烈的涡旋。真是太美了。或许我们能
Der Kammerdruck l
Okay. For today, we'd like you on to make a trunnion bias determination, prior to sightings as called out in procedures, and also one afterwards. Our intent here is to check out the possibility that some sort of thermal effect may be giving you errors in the angular read-out in the sextant. The bias that you get beforehand should be incorporated, that is a PROCEED on NOUN 87 after you get two consecutive measurements equal to within 0.003 degrees. And, of course, move the trunnion off a couple of degrees between the measurements. The Earth should be a lot smaller in your field of view today. I'm, sure you're a lot more qualified to tell us about that than we are, but to ensure that you're getting a good angle measurement between the star and the Earth horizon, the sextant M-line, which is the line that runs through the two hash marks and is perpendicular to the R-line, should be parallel to the Earth horizon at the substellar point. And then the actual superimposition of the star upon the horizon can be made at
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। हम अभी पृथ्वी की तस्वीर भेज रहे हैं, इसलिए कृपया ह
프렌드십 세븐,
これがうまくいくと私たちが考える理由は、アポロ10号でうまくいったからで
Je dirais que le déflecteur des réacteurs monté sur le quad 4 semble avoir une surface plus ridée que celui du quad 1. Globalement, la partie inférieure semble avoir bien résisté. *** Prenez des photos de la partie arrière qui mettront bien mieux en évid
Да, я возьму свою губну
Хорошо. Будьте осторожны, чтобы не за
收到。日落开始时间为18+13，AOS开始时间为18+20。HF/DF为18，HF/DF为
Okay. Dies ist ein allgemeiner Hinweis, der sich auf Si
Stand by. We're not reading you good enough, so w
और, जिम, हमारी वर्तमान योजना इसे ठीक न करने की है। हमें जो भी मिलेगा, हम उसी के साथ जी लेंगे। और अगर आप पृथ्वी 
さて、これは私にとって1日目のB食で
Roger. Se può esserti d'aiuto, Mike, la Terra è a più Y, circa 45 gradi, in una posizione meno X. La vedo dal finestrino laterale, ed è una vista meravi
अरे, मुझे
A 
좋습니다. 기동 계획서를 꺼내시면, 저희가 이전에 알려드린 근접 비행 기동은 여전히 ​​유효합니다. 다만 진입 각도, 즉 감마 각도가 이상적인 각도보다 약간 가파르다는 점을 말씀드리고 싶습니다
Роджер. Вас предупреждали, чтобы вы избегали справл
レトロパッケージは、もう一度言いますが、投棄しないことをお
휴스턴, 제미니 VIII이 당신의 말을 분명하게 읽고
نعم، الوضع سيء للغاية. لاحظنا... أن البعض يستطيع الر
Хорошо, второй выключатель тоже находится на панели 5. Автоматически
罗杰。你看起来状态不错，从地面出
Ok. Poco sotto i 13. E solo per tua informazione, abbiamo persone che lavorano su diversi argomenti. Stiamo lavorando sulla rotta intermedia in arrivo per determinare il nostro sistema di controllo e come gestirlo con il sistema di controllo che selezioniamo, cosa dovremmo fare riguardo all'allineamento. Abbiamo l'LMS e un paio di equipaggi impegnati a lavorarci. E stiamo anche lavorando sul nostro ingresso, 
네, 프레드 씨. 정렬에 관해 궁금한 점이 있으면 언제든지 말씀해 주세요. 지구 정렬처럼, 이전에 설명드렸던 것처럼 기꺼이 답변해 드리겠습니다. 또한, 이번 연소 과정에서 오차와 관련하여 가장 중요한 것은 피치(기울기)라는 점을 알아두시면 좋겠습니다. 하지만 말씀드렸다시피, 피치는 아직 그
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. En at
حسنً
VERB 
Роджер. Диапазон на отметке 20 - при нашем GET 21 50 00 плюс 22,24. Диапазон 22 плюс 00 плюс 00 составил 17,63. Диапазон 22 плюс 12 плюс 00 составил 18,33. Диапазон 22 плюс 20
Ich meine die Durban-Lichter. Ich konnte sie nicht sehen. Ich sehe jetzt – etwa zur gleichen Zeit wie die Du
Quand on a un angle de lacet de 90 degrés, c'est com
Уолли, ты уже переключился на
You're unreadable, Jack. We'
La mise au point doit être sur l'infini. Il ne faut pas hési
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 다시 한번 시도해 주시기 바랍니다. 추적은 자동
И одна из приятных вещей, Джек, особенно для новичка вроде меня, это — легкость передвижения внутри. Конечно, как вы знаете из работы в симуляторе командного модуля
是的，我注意到了。这很奇妙；事实上，晚上看的时候会有点误导人。会让你感
Okay. Fahren Si
It's really co
罗杰。
روجر. لا نتلقى بيانات القياس عن بُعد منك بشكل صحيح بسبب ضعف الإشارة. ها هي تعود. أتوقع أن يستغرق الأمر من 15 دقيقة إلى نصف ساعة تقريبً
좋
Ja, wir haben die Tantiemen abgezogen, aber sie scheinen sich mit der Zeit immer weiter 
يرجى العلم بأن لديك نسخة احتياطية هامة من البيانات وتصريح بيانات طبية من النوع الأول لقائد الطائرة فوق منط
了解
Gemini
Роджер, Джим. Рад это слышать. А мы тут тут едим холодный кофе и бутерброд
Okay. That was - That was loud and clear, that one there. Now we don't have a heck of a lot going on as you know we're working on the entry procedures. I've got preliminary copies, but we're not ready to pass - to pass it up to you. Looks like you're about 125 000 miles out, starting to - starting to really pick up speed, and t
«Аполлон-8»
Plus la nuit avance, plus les autres étoiles apparaissent. Je les vois – je crois que je peux distinguer jusqu'à la magnitude 5 environ. Le spectacle n'est pas encore aussi éclatant que par une nuit claire à 6 000 mètres d'altitude, depuis la verrière d'un avion. J'ai fortement tamisé mes lumières, ce qui offre une vue bien plus spectaculaire. En fait, les étoiles semblent se révéler davantage à mesure que mes yeux s'habituent à l'obscurité. J'observe 
캘리포니
الأمر المحير يا جاك، هو أنهم طلبوا مني الانتظار حتى ظهور إشارة "GO" قبل المتابعة، وكان ذلك عند إيقاف تشغ
حسنًا. سنبدأ بمتابعة
Okay. Die nächsten drei sind identisch, und dann stellen wir „TREIFERMITTENABL
了解。キャビンの水は戻ります。今から2
... liste de vérification après la réentrée. Termi
لا، هذه أقوى رائحة شممتها على
Recheck your face-plate closed and locked. Helmet locked, gloves on, inlet-outlet "Y", and ECS hoses free. And then I'll have a Command Pilot Suit Check, which I've already done... on to check the flow. Hatch lock OPEN. Then you've got your other t
是的，少了很多，现在完全没有了。我不确定那个通风口是否会导
로저. 47페이지 1단계에 따라, 우리는 유
إليكم تقريرًا من هاري روزنتال من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في هيوستن. أضفى بابا نويلان البهجة على ليلة عيد الميلاد للطفل جيفري لوفيل، البالغ من العمر عامين. طرق الأول باب منزله وجلب الهدايا، بينما قام الثاني بتشغيل محرك أبولو 8 العائد من القمر. ارتدى الأول بدلة حمراء ولحية بيضاء، وأطلق صيحة "هو هو" بصوت عالٍ سُمع في آخر الشارع. أما الثاني، فكان محركًا ضخمًا ينفث اللهب خلف القمر، وكان الآلاف ينتظرون بفارغ الصبر خبر تشغيله. "يرجى العلم أن هناك بابا نويل" كانت أولى كلمات أبولو 8 بعد أن خرجت من الصمت اللاسلكي لتُعلم العالم القلق بعد 15 دقيقة من إتمام المحرك لمهمته الحاسمة. قال كين ماتينجلي من مركز التحكم بالمهمة: "لم يتوقع أحد منا أن يحصل على هدية عيد ميلاد أفضل من هذه". وجاء الرد من العقيد فرانك بورمان، قائد المركبة الفضائية: "نشكر كل من كان على الأرض نيابةً عنا. كما تعلمون، لم نكن لننجح لولاكم". في هذه اللحظة، أضاءت شجرة عيد الميلاد أمام شاشات التحكم في مركز المهمة، وقرأ رائد الفضاء هاريسون شميدت نسخة فضائية من قصة "زيارة من القديس نيكولاس" على الطاقم. بدأت القصة قائلة: "كانت ليلة عيد الميلاد، وفي أعماق الفضاء، فاز طاقم أبولو 8 للتو بسباق القمر". كان طاقم مركز المهمة قد أرجأ الاحتفال حتى عودة والد جيفري، الكابتن جيمس لوفيل من البحرية، برفقة الرائد ويليام أ. أندرس من القوات الجوية والعقيد بورمان، سالمين إلى ديارهم. في أي ليلة عيد ميلاد أخرى، كانت عائلات رواد الفضاء ستجتمع في الكنيسة لحضور قداس عيد الميلاد، لكن هذا العام كانوا جميعًا يتابعون بشغف عبر شاشات التلفزيون. كانت المنازل القريبة من مركز المركبات الفضائية المأهولة مزينة. اصطفت فوانيس على الطراز المكسيكي على المروج المحيطة بمنزل لوفيل وفي جميع أنحاء مجتمعه في تيمبر كوف، وعندما وصل أربعة من سكان لوفيل، توقفت سيارة تحمل رجلاً طويل القامة يرتدي زي بابا نويل ويحمل كيساً كبيراً على ظهره. صعد سانتا كلوز إلى الباب وطرق بقوة. فُتح الباب، وإذا بجيفري لوفيل، الذي سيبلغ الثالثة من عمره في الرابع عشر من يناير، يقف هناك. ارتد جيفري إلى الوراء عند رؤيته. حملته والدته، فتشبث بها جيفري وهو لا يزال يرتجف. قالت شقيقته باربرا، البالغة من العمر خمسة عش
هيوستن، ب
풍선이
네, 알겠습니다. 1초만 
Controllo e
يا أهل هيوستن، ستُقدم لكم قاعدة ترانكويليتي بعض التعليقات بخصوص سؤال الجيولوجيا الذي طُرح الليلة الماضية. لقد هبطنا في حقل فوهات بركانية ناعم نسبيًا، يتكون من فوهات ثانوية مستطيلة وأخرى دائرية، معظمها ذو حواف مرتفعة بغض النظر عن حجمها. هذا ليس صحيحًا دائمًا، فهناك بعض الفوهات الصغيرة التي لا تظهر لها حواف واضحة. تتكون الكتلة الأرضية في جميع أنحاء المنطقة من رمال ناعمة جدًا إلى طمي. أظن أن أقرب ما يكون إليها على الأرض هو مسحوق الجرافيت. تتداخل في هذه الكتلة الأرضية مجموعة واسعة من أشكال الصخور وأحجامها وقوامها، منها المستدير والزاوي، والعديد منها ذو قوام متفاوت. كما ذكرت، رأيت ما بدا أنه بازلت عادي وبازلت حويصلي. بعضها الآخر خالٍ من البلورات، وبعضها الآخر يحتوي على بلورات بيضاء صغيرة، ربما بنسبة تتراوح بين 1% وأقل من 5%. أما الصخور، فنحن في حقل صخري يتراوح حجمها عمومًا حتى قدمين، مع وجود 
你好，那霸RESCUE 1，那霸SEA
Roger. Un détail important concernant le module de service JETT: nous recommandons
इस समय ओरियन को अच्छे से देख पा रहा हूँ। बहुत ही सुंदर दृश्य है। वहाँ प्लीएड्स और अल्वाग्रिन भी हैं। मैं अल्वाग्रिन को देखूंग
हाँ, कोई
ठीक है। पहले क
Roger
Высокие двигатели работают хорошо, точное сопровождение следует осуществлять только на низком положении по принципу «fly-by-wire». Следить за ускорителем на высоких высотах — сложная задача. Гироскопы довольно хорошо держатся в пределах допустимых значений. Прошедшее время — 13:56. В данный момент я потерял ускоритель из виду. Сейчас я получу данные о ретроцентре для радара Canary. Большо
알겠습니다. 돔 온도는 이미 확인했어요. 82도까지 올라갔다가 81도로 낮췄습니
Okay. The caution is after "400 plus zero": Do 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. روج
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi, poco prima delle 5 ore circa, o verso, vi vorremo in assetto per un allineamento dell'asse corporeo, usando il terminatore terrestre come abbiamo fatto prima; E non appena lo avremo, eseguiremo -7, che ora equivale a circa 60 cm al secondo, ovvero circa 15 secondi. E mi è stato detto che ora è sceso a 35 cm, quindi è comodamente entro i limiti. Bene. Quando lo faremo, inizieremo immediatamente la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio del modulo di servizio, che sarà in piano, dato che lo sganciamo prima del solito. Non abbiamo bisogno, e non vogliamo, della componente fuori piano. Quindi sarà in piano, con il modulo di servizio puntato di nuovo verso l'esterno lungo il raggio vettore. Inizieremo quindi a preparare il modulo di comando per il SEP del modulo di servizio, incluso il controllo del modulo di comando e l'accensione a caldo, e circa 4 ore e 30 minuti prima dello sgancio, sgancieremo il modulo di servizio. Continueremo a lavorare finché non avremo il modulo di servizio... e cercheremo di scattare qualche fotografia, ma non ci impegneremo in manovre di traslazione per le foto perché non vogliamo sbagliare... rovinare l'angolo della vostra traiettoria di volo in quel momento. Okay. Questo ci dà 2 ore di tempo libero, più o meno, per finire, se siamo in ritardo, per passare alla checklist e prepararci all'accensione del modulo di comando. Inizieremo l'accensione completa del modulo di comando a meno 2 ore e 30 minuti. Metteremo il computer in linea, lo faremo partire, inizieremo a collegare i vostri vettori di stato e così via, e ad allineare la piattaforma del modulo di co
Say again the time and the - and also the numbe
Хорошо. На MSC-2 и -3 геодезическое время — 00:30:00. В это время мы буд
Non mi sembra, per il pad che abbiamo, che noi - no
잘 
11, Houston. Sulla nostra telemetria in tempo reale abbiamo rilevato una pression
Ok. Bene, per noi va bene. Anticiperemo l'ingresso a 55 ore
हवाई, यह मि
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Continueremo a caricare la batteria B fino al periodo di sospensione. A quel punto interromperemo la ricarica. Inoltre, verso le 12:25 del piano di volo, la batteria A sa
OK, Houston. L
Auf den Stichwortkarten steht eine Nummer. Wir haben keinerlei Ambitionen, uns mit den Profis zu messen, glaubt mir. Wir fühlen uns hier oben aber sehr wohl. Wir haben ein richtiges Zuhause. Es ist genug Platz für uns drei, und ich glaube, wir finden alle langsam unsere Lieblingsecke. Schwerelosigkeit ist sehr angenehm, aber nach einer Weile hat man es satt, ständig gegen Decke, Boden und Wände zu stoßen. Dann sucht man sich eine kleine Ecke, zieht die Knie an od
L'équipe de vol indique qu'elle dispose d
फ्रेड, मेरा सुझाव है कि जब आपकी खिड़की फिर से पृथ्वी की ओर घूमे, तो आप ऐसी ही एक और तस्वीर खींच लें, और साथ ही, आपको शायद फिर से शुरू करना चाहिए। हमने शायद आपको कुछ गलत जानकारी भेज दी है। "दो क्वाड को निष्क्रिय करें" केवल 
了解しました。捕捉のGETは3月7日、R = 248 nmのGET、ランデブーのGETは3月15日、方位角は0度、仰角は7度、日の出のGETは
روجر. بناءً على آخر تحليل لحالة الوقود، ي
Could you hold with it for 
Except there's such a big shadow being cast by everything - 
好的，当我们——待命 1
Okay. Blättern Sie zu Seite 25. Lassen Sie auf Seite 25 Schritt 3 aus und führen Sie Schritt 4 aus. S
Ok, Vance. Mentre aspettiamo, per tua informazione, il m
أصف الشريط الأزرق. هناك شريط أزرق داكن نسبيًا على سطح الأرض، وشريط أزرق فاتح، وشريط أزرق داكن آخر، وشريط أبيض عريض هو توهج الهواء، ثم شريط أسود قاتم يتدرج من الأزرق الرمادي إلى الأسود الداكن. يبدو الأمر كما لو كان تحت سحابة ممطرة عند الانتقال من الشريط الأزرق إلى الظلام الدامس. سأشغل أضواء أطراف أصابعي. عطارد على الأفق تمامًا. من المفترض أن يكون نجم السماك ال
Roger. Es geht um die Überwachung des Sekundärspeichervolumens. Schritt 2: Sekundäres G
로저, 중간 보고서 작성 시
ओह, हाँ। कोई न कोई 
让我们来读一下我们现在点亮的指示灯：CRYO PRESS、FUEL CE
Dès que nous aurons les données
로저. 설명 잘 이해했습니다. 그리고 다음 질문인데요, 수집하신 두 개의 코어 튜브를 수집하는 데 필요한 추진력은 어땠나요? 차이가
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Как вы теперь читаете? 
मार्क, बाजा के ऊपर से तटीय मार्ग आ रह
嘿，肯，告诉大家，如果看到有
ह्यूस्टन, कृपया ध्यान दे
Apollo 8, Housto
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम इस समय उन सभी को
Нет, не знал; я не был в 
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie können mit Ihrem Computer zu
我们建议将态
Eagle, Houst
了解。了解。デイブ・リードは記者会見で月につい
Хорошо. Верно. Это Джим Ловелл. Сегодня мы решили немного рассказать вам о жизни внутри «Аполлона-8». Мы уже показали вам виды Луны, виды Земли, и решили пригласить вас к нам домой. Это наш дом, по крайней мере, уже 4 дня, как вы можете видеть на приборной панели. Мы отмечаем каждый день на приборной панели. Мы уже отработали четыре дня и работаем над пятым. Конечно, в
Черно-белый снимок луны. С фильтром метеорологического бюро. Снимок номер 6. А когда луна будет садиться, попробуем еще один снимок с более короткой выдержкой. Стараемся держать камеру аккуратно. Это второй снимок луны в момент захода. На этом этапе задняя крышка камеры будет установлена ​​на место, а сама камера убрана на с
H
कोलंबिया, ह
Хорош
I'm supposed to 
Роджер. И я хотел бы пока воздержатьс
Ретро-разделение, и Эд говорит, что видит комплект насосов. Ха! 
Okay.
好的，乔。我正把镜头
Il s'est écoulé 6 minutes et 35 secondes, et 
Верно. Джек, мы уже подключили питание
D'accord, Ken. J
나는 잘못된 방향을 보고 있고 연료 부족으로 기동 범위가 제한적이다. 달빛이 비치는 쪽과 비치지
И одна из приятных вещей, Джек, особенно для новичка вроде меня, это — легкость передвижения внутри. Конечно, как вы знаете из работы в симуляторе командного модуля, наличие невесомости — это действительно большое преимущество. Потому что при одной перегрузке передвигать
Roger, Carnarvon. For the Plane-Change. At a GET 02 plus 42 plus 07; Delta-V, 3
ठीक है। जेटिसन एटीट्यूड तक पहुंचने के लिए पैंतरेबाज़ी चल रही है और मैं बस पैंतरेबाज़ी पर नज़र रखता हूँ और अगर जि
13
Ok. Probabilmente lo farò solo, una parte a sei fotogrammi al secondo, un'altra a uno. Quindi potrei cambiare le impostazioni man mano c
음, 좋습니다. 오늘 아침에 M선과 얼마나 평행한지 확인해 보겠습니다. 처음 마킹을 시작하기 전에, 세 각도의 계산이 다소 정확하지 않은 것 같았고, 그 세 각도를 측정한 후 M선을 평행하게 맞추기 위해 큰 자세 변경을 해야 해서 연료 낭비가 심했습니다. 어떤 경우에는 허용된 자세만 필요해 보였는데, 여러분은 그럴 필요가 없다고 하셨죠. 그래서 M선이 평행하지 않은 상태로 마킹을 해야 하는 경우도 있었습니다. 혹
حسنًا. هل هذا هو 
水泳 1. 約 1 マイル先を視認できますか
はい。10ステップくらいですが、とても簡単です。CB 16のインバータ2を閉じます。CB 11のACバスAバスタイインバータ2を閉じます。パネル14のインバータスイッチ2を確認します。CB 11のランデブーレ
안녕하세요, 아폴로 8호입니다. 음악 방송을 잠시 중단하고 심야 상황 보고
Bon, Jack, pendant que Fred range mon casque, tu regardes maintenant du côté de son poste. Comment est cette photo? Elle est 
Okay, Housto
روجر. يتبقى أقل من ساعة بقليل على عملية الحرق التصحيحية ا
Du côté du sport, voici quelques nouvelles. Pendant que vous étiez occupé l'autre jour, Joe Namath et le commissaire de la NFL, Pete Rozelle, ont annoncé que « Broadway Joe » avait accepté de vendre ses parts dans le restaurant Bachelors III et de rejoindre les Jets de New York. Joe est arrivé aujourd'hui au camp d'entraînement des Jets et a effectué sa première séance. Plusieurs autres joueurs des Jets, qui avaient fait grève avec lui, ont également rejoint l'équipe. Davy Hill, originaire de Jackson, dans le Michigan, a remporté son troisième tournoi majeur de golf en autant de participations la semaine dernière. Il a gagné le Philadelphia Classic. Hill a remporté quatre tournois cette année et est le joueur ayant accumulé le plus de gains avec la coquette somme de 129 000 $. En baseball, la division Ouest de la Ligue nationale reste très disputée. Los Angeles et San Francisco sont à un match des Astros d'Atlanta, leaders du championnat. Les Astros affichent un bilan de 48 victoires et 48 défaites et occupent actuellement la cinquième place, à sept matchs du leader. Le double match entre les Astros et Cincinnati, prévu hier soir, a été reporté en raison de la pluie. Les Cubs de Chicago sont toujours en tête de la division Est. Ils devancent les Mets de New York de quatre matchs et demi. Dans la Ligue américaine, Baltimore file tout droit vers le titre de la division Est. Ils devancent Boston, deuxième, de onze matchs. À venir: le match des étoiles de baseball est prévu demain. Le
Верно, Фред. У нас пока нет соответствующих процедур, и мы не планируем ими заниматься. Процедура, которую я хотел бы вам сейчас зачитать, — это просто шаги, необходимые для получения показаний давления сверхкритического гелия через 55 часов. Конец 
56-BRAVO split burn, 55 for
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호. 이
わかりました。それでは、推力をかけます。三角測量の差は0.01ですが、0.3/10の速度ではちょっ
肯，我是弗兰克。我想——我想确认一件事。这是我们要用来烧录的负载，对吧？这不仅仅是用于10次中止的数据，对吗
ठीक है, जिम। मुझे
フレンドシップ・セブン、フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはHFとU
सेवन, यह केप है। आप... अप-रेंज डिस्ट्रॉयर से 1 मील के दायरे में होंगे। रिकवरी के लिए मौसम बहुत अनुकूल है
フレッド、彼
بالمناسبة، ن
Apollo 8, this is Houston. Indications are that we are getting it; we are checking. You will have to
휴스턴, 아폴로
حسنًا يا جاك. هل تر
ठीक है। आपका लैंडिंग क्षेत्र, जो समोआ से लगभग 560 मील दक्षिण में है, में मौसम का पूर्वानुमान लगभग 1500 फीट ऊंची, छ
О! Ну как вам э
Okay, Joe. Verstehe, dass die JETT-Lage ähnlich wie beim normalen Abwurf des Servicemoduls sein wird, d. h. nach oben und aus der Ebene heraus. Sobald ich das Manöver in die linke JETT-Lage
Roger, auf Rev 12 
Tranquility Base,
D'ac
Okay. Haben Sie das alles verstanden? Haben Sie die Men
好的，乔。为了确认一下，我查看了你给我的开关清单。我们的配置和清单上的一模一样，只有一个例外，那就
आपने जो काम किया है उसकी सराहना करते हैं, और जैक का कहना है कि पूरे रास्ते आने-जाने में ईंधन बचाने के मामले में उनके रिकॉर्ड
Roger. 
Warum legst du es nicht einfach hier hinein? Dann wird es sich von selbst zusammenziehen. Alles
谢
我记下了时间，22:43 和 23:22。这个实验
알겠습니다, 프레드. 산소 유량 관련해서, 수요 조절기가 OFF
ठीक
D'accord. Numéro 1. Voix en mode normal en bande S 
Aurora Seven, Kano. Pour information, l'onduleur 250 est actuellement réglé sur 180 degré
在这种飞行姿态下
Le voilà
그 소리가 마음에 드네요. 마치 그곳에 다시 돌아간 것 같
Это «Сигма Семь», демонстрирующая эффект полета вверх ногами на рассвете, с рысканием на 90 градусов. Для вас это самое очевидное — направление вашего движения. К
Gemini VI, Carn
好的，
انتظر يا جيم. نعتقد أننا نتلقى كل شيء. نؤكد ذلك الآن. هذا صحيح يا جيم. ن
«Дружба Семь», это Стилхед. Понимаю, ч
根据我们的手
11日、ヒューストン。リアルタイムテレメトリーでは、チャンバー圧力が
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्
यह पृथ्वी की तस्वीर है, लेकिन दुर्भाग्य से यह टेलीफोटो लेंस नहीं है। यह तो बस एक सामान्य इ
Sigma Seven Sigma Seven, ici Z
यह अभी भी वहीं है। मैं अभी इसे देख रहा हूँ। मैं देख सकता हूँ - सूरज मेरे ठीक पीछे है, फिर ये सारी चमकीली चीज़ें दिखाई देती हैं। हाँ। ऐसा लगता है जै
كان ذلك غباءً. الآن ننتقل إلى وضع التحكم الإلكتروني المنخفض. لقد ارتكبتُ خطأً فادحًا في التحكم، وأفسدتُ الأمر تمامًا. لكن من الأفضل ترشيد استهلاك الوقود. من السهل جدًا الوقوع في خطأ التحكم المزدوج، حتى
Sa
OK. 
Ed et moi fa
Roger, Alabama. Je suis en mode automatique; rétroaction; les commutateurs du gyroscope sont normaux; la manœuvre est désactivée. La capsule est prête pour la rétroséquence, sauf pour le rangement de deux cartes. Je suis sûr que nous pouvons y aller. J'ai 81 % en mode automatique (carburant) et 80 % en mode manuel (carburant), ce qui correspond à mon rappor
Роджер. 5000 рассеянных волн; ветер северо-западный 10; высота волн 3 фута; высотомер 2986; позывной спаса
네, 알겠습니다. 잠시 후에 준비해 드리겠습니다. 그리고 마이크, 비행 계획에 대한 약간의 업데이트가 있습니다. 
مفهوم. فهمت. ضبط الطور 02 18 25؛ دلتا-في، 50.6؛ 1 زائد 08؛ 0 انحراف، 0 ميل؛ 25، 00506؛ 26 و27 جميعها أصفار؛ دافعات خلفية، وضعية ا
わかりました。つまり、この2番目の部分では、ハッセルブラッドでこれをやってみることにします。ここでも赤と青のフィルターは使わないので、これが基準
좋아, 이거 작업하는 데 8분 정도 걸릴 거야. 벌써 3개 정도 제거했으니까, 5분 정도 더 지나면 추진기를 다시 켤 수 있을 것 같아
बहुत बढ़िया काम 
ठीक है, हम फिल्म टेप पैक नंबर 11 शुरू कर रहे हैं। हमने अभी-अभी पैक नंबर 9 खत्म किया है। ऐसा लग रहा था कि उस पैक की लाइट जल गई थी। हमें देखना चाहिए कि पैक नंबर 8 
إذن، نحن نعرف بالفعل مدى الرادار وقيمة ثيتا. هل يمكنك تزويدنا بآخر المستجدات ح
Probieren wir es mal eine Weile 
Хорош
상태 표시 패널의 
Okay. Gut. Und haben Sie eine ungefähre Vorstellung davon, wie lange d
Einen Moment bitte, Charlie; wir versu
Oh, EECOMM ist zufrieden. Nachdem Sie alles eingerichtet haben, ha
로저, 카이로, 26일 오후 7시 18분 37초. 항로에서 북서쪽으로
Роджер, Майк. У тебя сейчас пять полос на высоком усилении. Мы прямо между всенаправленными антеннами, и связь по ним довольно ужасная. У тебя пять полос на высоком усилении, и мы принимаем сигнал 
Ici Friendship Seven, à l'affût pour l'enregistrement. Une grande partie de l'Afrique de l'Est est recouverte de nuages, des sortes de cirrus d'altitude, fins et vaporeux. On ne voit pas grand-chose en dessous, à part le
Stiamo... il modo in cui stiamo giran
——我想事后你们应该能看到
アポロ8号、ヒュース
This is Friendship Seven.
로저. 모든 게 괜찮아 보이
로저, 짐. 방금 생각난 건데, 리튬 수산화물 용기를 지휘선에서 최대한 빨리 꺼내는 게 좋을 것 같아. 혹시라도 안에 계속 두면 부풀어 올라 꺼내기 어려워질 수도 있거든. 프레드를 깨울
Ok. Jack, al momento ci hanno detto che è più vicina alle 6, e... Ma vorrebbero monitorarla meglio. Sembra che la tua prossima rotta intermedia sarà nell'ordine di 6
Ve
لا يزال لدي سؤال واحد يا جاك. ما زلت أعتقد - ما زلت أقول - أن - في لوحة الإضاءة رقم 16، يجب أن تكون أضو
D'accord, Fred-o. Je te lis cinq fois. La procédure que je vais te décrire est une vérification solaire pour voir si un alignement est nécessaire. Prends ton dictionnaire G&N et ouvre-le à la page 34; on commencera 
我们现在的情
네, 맞습니다. 5번 패널에서 다음 단계는 MAIN BUS TIE A/C 스위치를 
Das si
ربما من الأفضل أن نؤجل فحص الاتصالات إلى ما بعد منتصف الدورة، لأنه من الأفضل أن يتم طردنا هنا في الساعة 10 إذا أردنا أن ن
Ho scattato un'altra foto della formazione nuvolosa a 3
Stiamo facendo il conto alla rov
… ça marche très bien, mais je ne crois pas qu’il puisse lire qui que ce soit. Je vais donc devoir transmettre. Le fusil fonctionne à merveille. Il a pu manœuvrer partout: devant, derrière, et il est d
Columbia, Ho
Хьюстон, Игл со
... انتقل إلى وضع التحرير؛ مؤشر دلتا-في ناقص 100.8 
Okay. Well, that's where I
双子座六号，休斯
알겠습니다, 짐. 알겠습니다. 최대한 그렇게 하겠습니다. 그리고 꽤 실현 가능해 보입니다. 우선
Oh
알았어, 거스. 존이랑 이 얘기 좀 해야겠어. 존
और आप पिच थ्रस्टर 
Das stimmt. Ich komm
Okay. We want to check the computer in all modes. There will be three steps to this check. First put 10 ft/sec in all IVI windows. Then push the Malfunction Reset. Then press the Start Comp and watch for a Computer Running Ligh
أبولو 11، هذه هيوستن. ا
前
रॉजर, जिम। कृपया लगभग 15 सेकंड के लिए क्वांटिटी रीड
Un instant. On s'en occupe. On a juste eu un disjoncteur mal positionné. Ils s
Ça va
لا يزال ن
好的，杰克，我们有一个机动平台，一个可以自由返回的中段航线：；-0021.3，+004.1，-0031.2；高空速和高功率不适用；DELTA-VR 0038.0；031，120，298；-00213，+00041，-00312。不适用；GDA角度；俯仰角5.86，滚转角6.75；油门10%持续5秒；剩余时间以4
了解。乗組員の状
罗杰，11。关于您提到的电池充电问题
아
罗杰，我觉得
로저. 저희는 두 번의 데이터 덤프를 진행했는데, 결과가 매우 좋았습니다... 현장 보
Clairement en dessous de moi. Je le suivais du regard depuis Carnarvon. Jusqu'à Carnarvon, il était en dessous de nous, puis il est monté jusqu'à l'horizon, avant de redescendre en dessous. On aurait presque dit qu'il était sur une orbite différente de la mienne. Son apogée et son périgée étaient différents des miens. Bref, j'ai tenté de le rattraper au lever du jour, dès que j'ai pu le localiser. Comme je l'ai dit, à ce moment-là, il se trouvait à un ou deux kilomètres devant moi, en dessous. Plus j'essayais de me rapprocher, moins je gagnais de terrain. Je tirais en rétrograde. J'utilisais mes propulseurs supérieurs de manière à réduire ma vitesse totale, et je tirais… simultanément. Je ne suis jamais vraiment parvenu à le rattraper, et il a continué à s'éloigner. Il m'est apparu évident qu'une fois arrivés à Hawaï, pour rattraper le lanceur à temps pour la sortie extravéhiculaire, nous épuiserions probablement tout le carburant embarqué. Or, le protocole aéroporté interdisait cette manœuvre. J'ai donc consulté le commandant de bord et nous avons décidé de ne pas poursuivre la partie de la mission concernant le propulseur. Je ne sais pas si je l'ai mentionné, mais lors de la séparation du propulseur, nos mouvements semblaient faibles, de l'ordre d'un demi-degré par seconde en tangage et en lacet. J'ai tenté de les atténuer. J'ai émis une impulsion dans chaque direction, puis je me suis concentré sur la sé
Хорошо, Джек, всё верно. Перейдём к странице 1-8. Во второй с
Roger, Guaymas. Abbiamo ancora il booster. Siamo piuttosto lontani da esso ora, e sta co
Roger. Du bist zwar schwach, aber sehr deutlich. Es wird besser. Könntest du bitte bestätigen, d
Чарли, Аполлон-11. У меня пара вопросов по остановке. Мне кажется, самый простой способ остановить его — мы, по сути, на
こちらケープ。4
Ricevuto. 
はい
Ok. Sui 226 interruttori automatici che ho letto, sono... ci sono sei interruttori automatici coinvolti e sono tutti... sono i primi sei da sin
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。3つの荷
Also, I would like to congratulate th
わかった。ジャック、応答がなか
ええ、そうだったと思います。でも、誰も向こうには
罗杰，巴兹。这是 PAD、MPL 的入口，从第 
好的。我只是想让你们注意这一点，思考一下它可能对飞行计划产生的影响。我会把这个广角镜头和关于月亮的说明再放一遍，看看你们觉得哪些部分最合适。好的。在卷轴上，弗兰克想让我们确认他预期看到的进入剖面图的顺序。第一个出现的剖面图标记为“Nonexit Number 2”，这是短程高速进入剖面图。第二个出现的剖面图标题为“3500 Mile”，也是高速进入剖面图，但如果我们需要进行更远距离的进入，则会使用这个剖面图。然后第三个剖面图是“Nonexit Entry Number 1”，之后是第四个3500 Mile剖面图。所以你们有四个进入剖面图。编号1和3是短程剖面图，编号2和4是长程剖面图
Vediamo ora. Si tratta di un pacchetto pensato per un
I was out
O
Гуаймас, вп
После того, как мы снизили скорость вращения двигателя до уровня, при котором посчитали, что можем безопасно отстыковаться, мы это сделали и как можно быстрее отошли от «Агены» со скоростью несколько футов в секунду. Мы наблюдали, как уровень топлива снизился с 50 до менее чем 30 процентов. После отключения системы OAMS и при сохранении режима работы с регулируемым питанием и выключенными кл
R
Okay, Jack. Ich 
알겠습니다. 실시간 및 ACQ, 그리고 테이프 재생
Для анализа этих снимков мы снимаем в 4 часа. Мы сним
休斯顿，阿波罗 
बिल, जिम के काम खत्म होने के तुरंत बाद हमने आपके लिए अपशिष्ट जल निकासी, क्रायो फैन च
А я пойду спать. Мы будем двигатьс
好的。我们进行一次清
アポロ8号、こちらはヒューストンです。キャビンを暖めるには2つの方法があります。1つ目は1人でできる作業です。キャビンファン
進入する際は、CMCで計算された角度をAUTO操作に使用して、どのように機能するか確認することをお勧めします。Mラインが地平線と平行になり、恒星下点に到達しない場合は、地上で計算された角度を取得できるかどうかを確認します。ここで重要なのは、Mラインが恒星下点と平行であることを確認することだと思います。そうすることで、正確な角度測定が可能になります
نحن ندرس أنماط استهلاك المياه بدقة، ويبدو أن الوضع الحالي يميل إلى ترك الأجهزة تعمل وإيقاف تشغيل الأجهزة الأخرى، لكننا سنوافيكم بمزيد من المعلومات قريبًا. وننصحكم بترك شخص واحد يراقب أثناء النوم. كما ننصحكم بتجنب التبول قدر الإمكان، لأنه سيزيد من مشكلة المخلفات سوءًا. لدينا بعض الأغراض التي قد ترغبو
हमारे ग्राउंड कंप्यूटरों पर हमने पुष्टि की है कि आपके द्वारा निर्धारित शाफ्ट और ट्रनियन कोण तारे की ओर इंगित कर रहे हैं। हालांकि, ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि शाफ्ट और ट्रनियन कोण संरचना की ओर भी इंगित कर रहे हैं, जिससे पृथ्वी का क्षितिज तो दिखाई देगा, लेकिन तारा... संरचना के कारण अस्पष्ट हो जाएगा। हम उड़ान योजना में अंकित अभिवृत्ति के अनुसार स्वचालित रूप से उड़ान भरने
Und Houston, Apollo 11. Ich gehe davon aus, dass die drei von Ihnen genannten Kardanwinkel auch für 
今は音声があまり良くなく、誘導部隊も全部は聞き取れませんでした。2、3分ほどお待ちいただけませんか？OMNIアンテナを交換します。そうすれ
约翰，我们正穿过低层云层。你
はい。ステップ4は「姿勢制御：ヨー、モード制御」で
मेरे पास ज्यादा विकल्प नहीं हैं। मैं बस खा सकता हूँ, सो सकता हूँ और खिड़क
Der Kabinendruck liegt momentan bei etwa 5,4. Er scheint sich dort zu halten. Das war de
Итак, давайте посмотрим. Мы хотим отправиться в костюмированное ш
...credo che ce ne servano
D'accord. On 
Sigm
ロジャ
Alles klar. Die Umlaufgeschwindigkeit ist das, was mich beim Rollen stört. Ich habe sie noch nicht überprüf
Roge
Окей, Скот
Роджер. Мы зафиксировали у вас давление кислорода на уровне
Okay, Fred. 
Coelliptic M
了解。第
Roger
好的。我们有三件事要说。第一件是，你们这批星图——两张星图的成绩都已经评定好了——嘿，恭喜！看起来很棒
2
11号，
صحيح. زاوية الميل والانحراف، أربعة، لفتح الم
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। कृपया पिच गिम्बल मोटर नंबर 1 को चालू और बंद करके हमें एक मार्क दें,
Okay. I got interrupted there for a minute. Bob Hope is back out in Viet Nam again with his troops, doing a great job as usual. One little name in the news story here is from the USS New Jersey. Bob Hope joked from atop of a huge gun turret yesterday - or Wednesday - to delight the 1500 men aboard the battle ship New Jersey on its 20th Christmas entertaining US troops abroad. Hope and his 27 member troop entertained the New Jersey seamen after attending a Christmas mass aboard the carr
أبولو 8، ه
अप
Das ist Roger. Nur zur Information: Ascension hat Sie bei Ihrem letzten Besuch kopiert und steht bereit, Sie auch dieses 
罗杰。我的状态良好；燃油量分别为5
Okay, this - this thing's supposed to take about 8 minutes; we've got
حسنًا. ا
فهمت كلامك بوضوح تام. إنه من أفضل
खेल जगत की बात करें तो, चलिए देखते हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों में जब आप व्यस्त थे, तब जो नामाथ और फुटबॉल कमिश्नर पीट रोज़ेल ने घोषणा की कि "ब्रॉडवे जो" ने बैचलर्स III रेस्टोरेंट में अपनी हिस्सेदारी बेचने और न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स में शामिल होने पर सहमति जताई है। जो आज जेट्स के ट्रेनिंग कैंप में पहुंचे और उन्होंने अपना पहला अभ्यास सत्र किया। जो के साथ कई अन्य जेट्स खिलाड़ी भी शामिल हुए, जिन्होंने पहले विरोध किया था। और जैक्सन, मिशिगन के डेवी हिल ने पिछले सप्ताह अपने तीसरे मेजर गोल्फ टूर्नामेंट में जीत हासिल की। ​​उन्होंने फिलाडेल्फिया क्लासिक जीता। हिल इस साल अब तक चार टूर्नामेंट जीत चुके हैं और 129,000 डॉलर की शानदार जीत के साथ इस साल सबसे ज्यादा पुरस्कार जीतने वाले खिलाड़ी हैं। बेसबॉल की बात करें तो, नेशनल लीग 
मैंने आपकी बात साफ
C'est exact, et comme il vous reste encore une heure, je suppose qu'il serait préférable d'utiliser l'impulsion minimale ou une option similaire plutôt que la valeur par défaut, du moins jusqu'à ce que vous soyez plus 
分かりました。分かりました。では、まずRATE COMMANDでロ
روجر. عند النجمة 02: حيث طُبعت مجموعتان، نود أن نجعلها مجموعة واحدة فقط؛ ثم نود إضافة النجمة 11، الأفق البعيد
Хорошо. Теперь, в этой конфигурации, необходимы следующие показания бортового оборудования: напряжение батареи C, напряж
هذه فريندشيب سفن على تردد HF. حالتي ممتازة. كل شيء يسير وفق الخطة. وقود التحكم 90-100%، والأكسجين 72-101
我们也不打算尝试第一种；杰瑞
먼저 기체 축 정렬을 완료하면, 광학계를 달이나 특정 별을 향하도록 하기 위해 구체를 어떤 자세로 비행시켜야 하는지 알려드릴 수 있습니다. 그리고 광학계가 향하는 위치를 알게 되면, 플랫폼에 토크를 가하기 위해 입력해야 
ヒューストン氏は、船外活
알겠습니다. 이것은 9, /: 45597, -040, +157, +34188, -01353, +00780 180 008 001, November Alfa, +00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, 아래 131, 왼쪽 28, +0758, -16500 12987 36277입니다. 주성은 시리우스, 부성은 리겔, 129 155 010입니다. 4개의 쿼드, 15초, 여유 공간, 지평선은 T -3에서 1.2도 창선에 있습니다. 마이너스 마이크 알파를 사용하여 고속 절차를 사용하십시오. 이전 연소 데이터를 검토한 결과, 엔진 성능을 고려했을 때 연소 시간은 3초가 되어
我想稍微谈谈六分仪。在空间狭小的航天器里使用六分仪非常困难，尤其是在戴着头盔的情况下。我最终意识到，戴着头盔去调整观测目标星
了解。次の回転まで通常のスーツサーキットに戻るよう飛行士から指示がありました。
لا، كنت أنتظر لأرى ما
收到。请继续
I don't believe they can hear you, Mike. Are you maneuvering now to sleep attitude
ठीक है। क्या मैं यूपी टेलीमेट्री पर ब्लॉक बटन दबा सकता
Roger. Ic
D'accord. Au niveau du cran de gauche, je vois le radar de rendez-vous (AO), puis je passe 
Bene. 
Вышел из строя первичный преобразовател
收到。我再说一遍。Alfa 225，74%；Bravo 240磅，79%；Charlie 236，78%；Delta 238，19%。我想提醒各位，在高
Gémeaux 4, Houston CA
سأخبرك يا ديك، الجو باردٌ جداً في الأعلى. لا أعرف إن كنا سنتمكن من النوم هناك الليلة؛ لا بد أن درجة الحرارة حوالي 35 أو 
네, 프레드 씨. 5x 판독 중입니다. 지금부터 설명해 드릴 절차는 태양 정렬이 필요한지 여부를 확인하는 절차입니다. G&N 사전을 꺼내서 34페이지를 펴주세요. 맨 아래부터 시작하겠습니다.
你好，迈克。我们准备让你切换到全向模式进入睡眠
现在我的地平线非常清晰。天色比较亮，地平线主要由云层构成。我能看到云层——星星开始落入大气层，但云层似乎让地平线显得更明
نعم، وهذا يُخيفك، لأنه يعني أنك تسير في الاتجاه الرجعي، أليس كذل
Только что произошло изменение соотношения компонентов
정말 감
Роджер, Базз. Это запись PAD, MPL, начинающаяся с номера 05, 35 - исправление - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, плюс 1102, минус 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 69, все четыре строки - NA. Продолжаем с D ноль: 400 02 09. RET затемнения, 00 17 03 38 08 20. Звезда секстанта, 02 0945 149. Звезда на оси обзора - Скорпион тета, это Скорпион тета. Вверх 315, вправо 35, вектор подъема вверх. И комментарии: В этой записи PAD не предполагается промежуточный курс 6. И к вашему сведению, судя по всем полученным данным отслеживания, этот маневр составит всего десятую долю фута в секу
로저. 
हम पर्याप्त मात्रा में नियंत्रण विशेषताएँ चाहते हैं /कमांड मॉड्यूल की, और क्या हम सेवा मॉड्यूल की तस्वीर लेने के लिए संयोजन को संचालित करने के लिए केवल अभिवृत्ति नियंत्रण - नियंत्रक का उपयोग कर सकते ह
Buzz,
コロンビア、ヒューストン。オーバー
휴스턴, 여기는 
ठीक है, जो। मैंने यहाँ एक नया पेज बनाया है जिसका नाम है -1A, आइटम 
Roger. Nous n'avons pas reçu la confirmation concernant cette mise à jour de l
حسنًا. ناقص 00489 زائد 00000 زائد 47250 177 144 000، غير قابل للتطبيق، زائد 00197 47253 554 47050 12 1278 256 023، أعلى 265، يسار 18. هل ال
Roger, Aurora Seven. Would you care to send a greeting to the pe
Roger. Sind Sie bereit, einige Zahlen aus dem Statusbericht usw. abzusch
Mann, es ist echt schwer zu be
«Дружба семь», компания Woomera 
के
はい。アラ
わかりました。完了したと理解しました。飛行計画の次の項目は走査望遠鏡による視程試験です。これは前回の飛行計画に記載されて
Ok. Facciam
好的，杰克。我先读给你听，然后加一些注释，我们
Il faudra que je ne l'use p
Ah oui. Je regardais la mauvaise horloge, et on est à un peu moins de 10 minutes. Je te donnerai un signal à 9 min
रॉजर, कैनरी। मेरी स्थिति ठीक है; कैप्सूल की स्थिति ठीक है; मेरा नियंत्रण मोड स्वचालित है; जाइरो सामान्य हैं; पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है। ईंधन 51-68 [प्रतिशत], ऑक्सीजन 85-100 [प्रतिशत]; मेरे केबिन स्टीम वेंट का तापमान अब बढ़ रहा है और लगभग 19 डिग्री दिखा रहा है, सूट स्टीम वेंट का तापमान अभी भी 70 डिग्री दिखा रहा है। मैंने इसे शून्य पर सेट कर दिया है और इसे एक पर रीसेट कर दिया
بعد استقرار الوضع، فحصنا نظام التحكم بالدفع بالكامل، ووجدنا أنه لا يوجد لدينا تحكم في الانعراج أو الدو
... quello che fai - quello che fai, ci metti il ​​tu
Negativo. F
ここで 8 ボールに問題があります。ボールを一直線に保つことができないか、軌道速度の制御が正しく
जैसे ही हम यहां पहुंचेंगे, हम इसे यहीं रोक देंग
यह ब
Okay. Let me read it back here.... order... POWER, OFF. NUMERICS LIGHTING, FLOOD LIGHTING, and INTEGRAL LIGHTING, three of them, OFF. Panel 101, URINE DUMP
أبولو 8، هيوستن. هل التقطت بيانات الطقس بشكل 
Ro
罗杰。气球在大约100度的弧线上摆动。它经常会超出我的视线。此刻，它几乎是垂直的。此时它似乎正
그리고 찰리, 당신은 팬들이 
フランク、ちょっと待って。彼を探すから。その間、ビルは高ビットレートでも音声品質が非常に良いので、もし重要なことを録音するために限られた時間だけ高ビットレートで使い
N
ठीक है। 5/6 के लिए मानचित्र अपडेट, सूर्योदय, प्रधान मध्याह्न रेखा, सूर्यास्त; -1, लक्ष्य B-1 के सबसे निकटतम पहुँच का समय। अब आपके दो नियंत्रण बि
Okay, Fred. This is a procedure for getting a read-out of the descent propellant tank temps. It's no big problem, but our people say that the bottom of the descent stage is probably cooling off, and we just want to verify that the descent water tank will be okay. Right now, it looks as though it won't freeze until sever
Roger. Vorremmo un bit rate elevato. Abbiamo abbandonato il tuo e vorremmo continuare con un bit r
双子座 VI，双子座 VI，休斯顿 
أبولو 8، استعدوا لسماع بعض الضوضاء أثناء تغيير الإعدادات على الأرض. سنبدأ الاختبار ال
في قمرة القيادة جيميني 6
Roger Seven, ich empfehle Ihnen, sich der Wiedereintrittsposition anzunähern, dabei so wenig Treibstoff wie möglich zu verbrauchen und im Fly-by-Wire-Modus zu wart
جيميني 4، هيوستن CAP COM. فهمت أن ضغط مصدر الأكسجين لدي
네, 꽤 괜찮네요. 전혀 나쁘지 않아요. 맞아요, 당신은 그렇게 말하지 않았지만요. 우리가 있는 이곳은 정말 멋진 
네, 짐. 대략 맞습니다. 잭이 그 자세로 대략적인 정렬을 할 겁니다. 바로 그 자세로 조종하도록 당신에게 지시한 이유입니다. 대략적인 정렬을 위한 짐벌 각도를 계산해서 잭에게 전달할 거고, 잭은
Bien, nous y voilà. Zone d'entrée: Mid-Pacific, 000153; 000. Les deux lignes suivantes indiqueront le coucher de la lune et l'attitude de vérification lunaire
Это Sigma Seven, запись только в режиме VOX. Я восстановил автоматический режим в нормальном режиме без использования двигателей большой мощности. На данный момент у меня 85 процентов автоматического режима, 90 процентов ручного. И я чувствую, что теперь, когда я в строю, я могу проводить эксперименты там, где раньше не мог. Сейчас я опущу капсулу на низкой высоте с электронным управлением. Сначала я проверю, если включу маяки, никто здесь, внизу, не сможет меня догнать. Если у кого-то в Южной Америке есть маяк, он заслуживает того, чтобы его услышать. Маяки включены, выдают око
캘리포니아는 이를 금
हम कुछ समय के लिए हाई-गेन एंटीना का उपयोग क्
네, 세계 뉴스부터 시작하겠습니다. 아폴로 8호 우주비행사들에 대한 찬사와 우주 탐사 분야에서의 국제 협력에 대한 기대감이 전 세계에 퍼졌습니다. 작은 우주선이 달 궤도를 돌고 있는 동안, 전 세계는 크리스마스 이브 메시지를 통해 이러한 기대감을 전달했습니다. 공산주의 국가에서조차 인류 최초의 달 탐사에 대한 열기는 뜨거웠습니다. 모스크바에서는 소련 과학자 아나톨리 베사라노프가 미국과 이전에도 우주 관련 지식을 공유했던 것을 회상하며, 아폴로 8호 비행이 양국 간 협력 증진으로 이어질 것이라고 예측했습니다. 쿠바에서는 라디오 하바나가 미국의 소리(VOA) 프로그램을 재방송하여 청취자들에게 아폴로 8호의 연설을 전했습니다. VAA 관계자는 미국 기관의 프로그램이 하바나 라디오에서 방송된 것은 이번이 처음이라고 밝혔습니다. 체코슬로바키아는 대대적인 텔레비전 중계를 통해 달 착륙 장면을 지켜봤고, 헝가리 부다페스트에서는 기차와 버스에서 사람들이 거의 항상 아폴로 8호 이야기만 했습니다. 비공산권 국가에서는 직장인들과 크리스마스 쇼핑객들이 우주선이 지구
Roger, reentry che
Well, you're going to find a sadder one when we have to come down from this w
いいえ。
روجر
Измерьте артериальное давление. Ваша первая попытка оказалась не
Хьюстон, 
All right. Go ahead, Carnar
م
ठीक है। हम इस गिम्बल चेक को एटीट्यूड में बदलाव के एक 
Friendship Seven, ici Zanzibar Cap Com. Nous avons un contact télémétrique stable, veuillez nous communiquer votre statut. Terminé
Я не в
أجل. الآن وقد عرفنا مكان (غير مقروء)، سيكون الأمر أسهل بكثير في المرة القادمة. في المرة الأولى التي بحثنا فيها عن القاهرة - عن القاهرة والإسكندرية - وجدنا (غير مقروء) بعد فترة. لم أرَ المطار فعليًا، بل رأيت المنطقة فقط. ظننتُ أنني إذا وجهت الكاميرا بشكل صحيح، فسأحصل على صورة للقاهرة. لكن هذه المرة التقطتُ صورة للمطار بالفعل. الأمر نفسه مع الإسكندرية. أعتقد أنه إذا كنت ستلتقط صورة لشيء كهذا، فقد يكون من المفيد المرور فوقه مرة، وإلقاء نظرة فاحصة عليه، ثم التقاط الصور في الم
Роджер. Я не против поиграть в игры, потому что вы, ребята, были очень добры ко мне последние пять с половиной дней. Если хотите поиграть в игры в ближа
わ
Roger, 11. Nous souhaiterions effectuer une vidange des eaux usées à votre convenance prochainement. Aucune heure précise n'est prévue. Au moment de la correction de trajectoire n° 3, soit environ 53 h 55, nous annulons cette correction et tous les éléments qui y sont associés. Pour information, la valeur calculée de la correction de trajectoire n° 3 était de 0,8 pied par seconde (0,8 pied par seconde). Si nous décidons d'effectuer la correction de trajectoire n° 4, la correction de trajectoire n°
알겠습니다, 짐. 발사체 시스
نحن ندرس أنماط استهلاك المياه بدقة، ويبدو أن الوضع الحالي يميل إلى ترك الأجهزة تعمل وإيقاف تشغيل الأجهزة الأخرى، لكننا سنوافيكم بمزيد من المعلومات قريبًا. وننصحكم بترك شخص واحد يراقب أثناء النوم. كما ننصحكم بتجنب التبول قدر الإمكان، لأنه سيزيد من مشكلة المخلفات سوءًا. لدينا بعض الأغراض التي قد ترغبون بنقلها إلى الموقع، مثل المناشف، ومصابيح يدوية، وأكياس فضلات، وجهاز تنظيف المرحاض. هل لديكم أ
حسنًا. بالعودة إلى نجم المحور، إنه دزوبا القديم، النجم المركزي في رأس برج العقرب؛ موقعه 60 درجة للأسفل، 42 درجة لليسار، 77 درجة للأعلى، 16500 درجة للأسفل، 12982 درجة للأسفل، 36256 درجة للأسفل. نجوم الشمال هي: الشعرى اليمانية، رجل الجبار، زاوية الدوران 129 درجة، زاوية الميل 155 درجة، زاوية الانحراف 10 درجات؛ زمن التكبير 15 ثانية، الأفق على 
Bene.
In questo momento, VI si trova a circa 3 metri sopra e a sinistra di VII. Stiamo volando muso contro muso, a circa 4,5 
حسنًا. فحص الكمبيوتر لجميع الأوضاع. أدخل 10 قدم/ثانية في جميع وحدات المعلومات والترفيه داخل السيارة، واضغط على زر مؤشر العطل، ثم اضغط على زر بدء تشغيل الكمبيوتر... أي... أوقف تشغيل الكمبيوتر لمدة ثانيتين، ثم أعد تشغيله واضغط على زر مؤشر العطل. إذا ظهرت هذه العلامات... في أي وقت، فيجب علينا إيقاف ال
Voici Friendship Seven. C'est éblouissant à travers le viseur en mode clair. Ça a c
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। मैंने उस समय कुछ नहीं कहा था। हम अभी आपके लिए कुछ पहलुओं पर विचार कर रहे हैं। नींद चक्र में फेरबदल के बारे में आपके पहले के प्रश्न के संदर्भ में, हम आपकी टिप्पणी से सहमत हैं। हम चाहते हैं कि चंद्र कक्षा में पहुँचने तक नींद चक्र आदि के संबंध में उड़ान योजना पर वापस आ जाएँ। इसलिए हम चाहते हैं कि आप नींद चक्रों को समायोजित करने के सबसे कुशल तरीके के बारे में अपने विवेक का उपयोग करें और इसे आपस में बाँट लें। हम चाहते हैं कि आप हमें इस बात की जानकारी देते रहें कि कौन क्या कर रहा है और आपकी क्या योजनाएँ हैं। एक उड़ान में 2 घंटे की देरी हो गई है। हम दूसरी उड़ान को पूरा करना चाहते हैं। अगर दूसरी उड़ान में कोई समस्या आती है, तो हम उसका समय भी समायोजित कर सकते हैं - मुझे लगता है कि इसमें दो और घंटे लगेंगे। अगर आप हमें बताएँगे कि जिम कब कुछ अवलोकन करने के लिए उपलब्ध होंगे, तो हम उनका 
Roger. Abbiamo due ing
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь». Это Guaymas Cap Com. Сейчас вы немного невнятно говорите, но понятно. Что, каков ваш статус? Конец связи
아니요, 삭제했습니다. 변동률이 매우 작아서 원하지 않는 한 삭제할 필요조차 없습니
حسنًا. ستكون نقطة البيا
了解しました。了解しました。それが私たちの目
حسنًا. إذا فهمتُك بشكل صحيح، فهذا يمنحني مجالًا للمناورة عند اكتمال التفعيل، ويمكننا أن نكون
Str
Roger. On essaie juste de nous aligner. Ça n'a aucune incidence sur l'angle d
Роджер. Мы вас прекрасно сл
Okay. In the mid-Pacific landing area, the weather is good. The cloud cover is 2000, scattered; visibility, 10; winds 060 at 10; wave heights are 4 feet, and the altimeter 2986, if you care. Scattered showers less than 10 percent of the area. Recovery forces the Iwo Jima will be at the touchdown point, the aircraft call sign will be Recovery 1, on station with swimmers on board. The - we 
わかりました。8、/：45701、マイナス040、プラス157、プラス331
네, 프레드. 델타에 대한 설명은 여기까지입니다. 그리고 아마 들으셨겠지만, 감마 값은 여전히 ​​-6.03이고
确认无误。请翻到第 27 页，激活，第 16 栏。在 SYS
那扇窗户真糟糕。我们不得不透过这扇窗户射击，真是太可惜了，但是——哎呀，你知道吗，光是研究这一个陨石坑的地质情况，
D'accord, à l'étape numéro - ou page 2, nous devrions faire l'étape 5 et modifier la deuxième ligne de l'é
좋습니다. 우주선과 다시 연락하는 데 어려움은 없습니다. 특히 천천히 움직이면 모든 게 아주 부드럽습니다. 이런 경험을 할 수 있어서 정말 감사합니다. 멋지네요, 거스. 지금 저는 우주선 바로 위, 짐의 창문 바로 위에 있습니다. 짐, 제가 
알겠습니다. S-밴드 OFF 상태를 OFF로 변경하겠습니다. 이렇게 하면 정상 설정으로 돌아가는데, 몇 가지 정보를 알려주셔야 합니다. 첫째, CMP와 LMP 상태 보고
Надеюсь, вы убедили всех очень внимательно изучить этот вопрос. Нам 
Et l'unité de mesure de la température mécanique de l'arbre semble indiquer une température d'environ 4
我可以把手伸到下面去。那是我首先
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我认为我们的上行链路丢失了。我只能盲发信号。请
准备好。别忘了喝水
Roger; nous assur
Etwa auf der linken Seite, ungefähr auf halber Höhe unterhalb von ", Manöver zu TOPO-Ziel 54A", sollte der Kommentar "Ziel 54A ist optional
ओह, ये तो बढ़िया रहेगा। मैंने लवे
Okay, bene, Jim. Nella riga 2, sotto SISTEMA A: ASCENT FEED 2 e ASCENT FEED 1 dovrebbero essere aperti. MISSION TIMER dovrebbe essere aperto; GASTA, aperto;, ape
Okay. After PC plus 2, there are no trim requirements; and, if you have a shutdown during PC plus 2, subsequent midcourse maneuvers required with - Well, the earliest one would be PC plus 4. If you don't do a PC plus 2, but we still want to do one - later. At PC plus 4, the increase in DELT - in DELTA-V, or the penalty, would be about 24 feet per second, with a landing in the mid-Pacific at. Now, you should expect new pads
입장하기 전
Okay. The master title, "Entry, LM PREP, minus 6 hours." First, BAT 5 NORMAL FEED, ON; second, use modified /, 30-minute activation checklist. Next, is at minus 5 hours, -7, if required. Now, we have a preentry procedure. First, we maneuver to service module SEP attitude. Second, configure for hotfire. Under that, DEADBAND MAX, and ATTITUDE CONTROL
Roger. 
Roger, et pourrions-nous avoir une dernière mesure de tensi
और आखिरी बात जैक के लिए है। ज
フレッド
Eagle et Columbia, ici l'équipe de réserve. Tou
わかりました、ジョー。全部揃いましたが、タイムライン上のどこにいるのかとどう比較す
没错。这张卡片就完成了。其余的更新只是基于我们58小时的平台数据，仅供您参考——请查看平台数据。我们目前状态非常好。您的陀螺仪几乎没有漂移，因为上
Want to
지금은 진동 영역에서 벗어나면서 
アポロ8号、レッドストーンを通過しました。順調ですね。プライマリループとセカンダリループは両方と
ठीक है। क्योंकि मुझे 
Sì, stanno piangendo a Dallas. Risultati di basket: Houston non è andata molto bene questo fine settimana. L'Illinois ha battuto Houston 97 a 84. E la North Carolina ha vinto contro gli Owls. Il punteggio era 85 a 77. Abbiamo scritto un paio di parole sul giornale, Frank, sugli Oilers. Gli Oilers hanno votato George Webster come loro giocatore più prezioso e, sebbene Houston non abbia inserito nessuno nell'All Off
Vuoi riprovare sul primario e vedere co
了解。ここのシステムのどこかにノイズがあるようです。現在対応中です。130のランドマーク
रॉजर। मैंने आपकी बात साफ-साफ सम
さあ、ヒュースト
Roger. Pourriez-vous répéter en quelques mots 
Okay, Jim. Wir wollen dir da entgegenkommen; es ist ein Thema, das wir mit dir besprechen wollten. Wir haben darüber nachgedacht, und unsere Meinung dazu ist – natürlich liegt die Entscheidung bei dir, aber wenn wir die Vor- und Nachteile abwägen, hast du ja bereits den Vorteil genannt. Wir führen kurz vor EI minus einer Stunde eine Luken-Integritätsprüfung durch, und wenn diese beschädigt ist, hättest du große Schwierigkeiten, in die Anzüge zu schlüpfen. Andererseits könnten die Anzüge dich erheblich verlangsamen, ganz abgesehen von der Zeit zum Anziehen. Außerdem beste
是
82명 전원이 남북한을 가르는 '돌아올 수 없는 다리'를 건너는 데 약 30분이 걸렸다고 합니다. 오전 3시 30분에
Roger, Apo
コピーできませんでした、ジム。ごめん
Roger. Mettez la vanne de vidange 
We'd like you to think about this control mode, Jim, and see if you think it might work from what you know right now. We're a little skeptical, but we'd like to put it to you. So, once you get in a pretty good attitude, monitor in , go to MINIMUM IMPULSE, , as we have, 
好的。建议使用 A-1
D'accord. Nous préférerions uti
Roger. Nous co
Pourriez-vous patienter une seconde? Je suis en plein mili
سنرى ما يمكننا فعله يا جاك. سنتواصل مع فريق الاسترداد ونرى إن كان بإمكاننا إرسال الوكيل إلى المحيط الهادئ عند عودتك. حسنًا، لنرَ. في كرة السلة للمحترفين، فاز فريق نيكس على فريق ميلووكي باكس بنتيجة 110 مقابل 102، ويتصدر بيلي كاسبر بطولة الماسترز بعد 54 حفرة برصيد 208 ضربة، وتدريبات كرة القدم الربيعية جارية على قدم وساق. وهذه تقريبًا كل الأخبار التي لدينا؛ الخطة المحدثة لكم اليوم هي: الزي الرسمي سيكون عبارة عن بدلة عمل عسكرية مع سيوف وميداليات، وفيلم الليلة الذي سيُعرض في حجرة المعدات السفلية هو فيلم "رحلة أبولو 13"
Я подтверждаю, что проверка на герметичность завершена, и приступаю к открытию клапана сбр
Sì, ci credo
알겠습니다. 연소 GET 3 47 37; 델타-V, 42.9; 
罗杰。DELT
हम LOS के करीब पहुँच रहे हैं। क्या आपके पास हमारे लिए क
짐이 숨을 쉴 수 있도록 터널
Ti leggo un po' co
If I was him, I'd m
네, 
Bre
... إبر الرادار أكثر مرونة قليلاً مما ك
Sur la rangée 2, AFFICHAGES DE VOL, ouvrez POUSSÉE, ouvrez MINUTEUR DE MISSION, ouvrez PORTÉE/TAUX DE PORTÉE, ALTITUDE/TAUX D'ALTITUDE, et ouvrez le BUS AC A PORTÉE, ALTITUDE/TAUX 
Роджер. Кажется, я выставил для тебя выс
حسناً. أنت ما زلت على موقفك الحالي، أليس كذل
こんにちは、ア
ठीक है। इन्हें कॉपी कर लो। और ऑनबोर्ड रीडआउट्स, D 69 है, C 73 है, D - चलिए फिर से शुरू करते हैं। ठीक है। A 51 है और B 62 है; C 63 है औ
Mostriamo un com
Вторичный контур охлаждения выглядел действительно хорошо. Похоже, у вас был хорошо герметичный радиатор, и все остальное работало в соответствии с рабочими кривыми. Во время нашей проверки оба ваших основных кислородных регулятора наполнились до 104 psi. Учитывая лунную орбиту, ожидайте кипение воды со скоростью около 1 фунта в час, и это лишь приблизительная оценка; существует довольно много разных оценок относительно того, какими могут быть тре
روجر. سيجما سبعة. مخطط العلم. هل أنت مستقر وعل
Okay. That should keep them happy back there. We are not going to send you a load. Your TR is good. I
रॉजर
알겠습니다. 녹음기를 되감아 드리겠습니다. 90초 추가 녹음과 
نريد منك التوجه مباشرةً إلى 060 وإلغاء معدلات التصوير الخاصة بك لتصوير المذنب بينيت. وللقيام بذلك، نريد منك تفعيل الطائرات الرباعية C وD. استخدم جميع طائراتك الرباعية لإتمام المناورة. وفي غضون دقيقة واحدة بال
알겠습니다. 이번 관측에서 달은 LMP 창의 윗부분에 나타났고, 더 높이 떠 있었습니다. 짐은 
휴스턴, 아폴로 13호 
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben ab etwa 155°30' optimalen Empfang. 
Roger, 11. Nous vous montrons la fin de la charge de la batterie B à
好的，没错。我们翻到第3页，第3页第一个，TOWER 
أتراجع عن كلامي. لم أقصد قول ذلك حقاً. سماعات الرأس خفيفة الوزن - ما كنت أقصده حقاً هو أن 
Arriverai tra circa 3
Roger. Could you confirm that? I thought there was s
Aurora Seven, ici IOS Com Tech
Nous avons capté des bruits étranges sur la liaison descendante, et on aur
Roger, 11. Ich habe zwei PADS für dich, 30 und dann eine 31. 30 SPS/G&N: 36691, minus 061, plus 066 135 23 4156. NOUN 81: 32 - Korrektur, plus 32011, plus 06818, minus 02650 181 054 014. Apogäum ist NA, Perigäum plus 00230 3286 - Korrektur, 32836; Brenndauer 2 28 32628 24 1511 357. Die nächsten drei Zeilen sind NA. NOUN 61: plus 1103, minus 17237 11806 36275 195 04 5
Хорошо. Отсоединит
Roger. Votre signal est faible ma
여기는 UHF 무전으로 보고하는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 당시 수색 구역 상공을 지나갈 때 물살이 길게 이어지는 것을 볼 수
休斯顿，你如
네, 잭. 맞습니다. 1-7페이지로 가세요. 전자 장치 전원 끄기; 신호 조절기/드라이버 바이어스 1과
Ballon aufsteigen lassen. D
Jerry, hi
Roger, nous avons suivi le plan de vol. Si 
E installo la tenda paraspruzzi, installo la diga di sicurezza, la maniglia di ricircolo dell'aria in cabina in ALTO. La maniglia dello snorkel sinistro in ALTO, la maniglia dello sfiato della cabina in ALTO. Il grilletto di sblocco del portello è staccato. Verifico che la guarnizione dell'acqua sia in BASSO e chiusa. Attacco il cordino, il portello sinistro aperto. Ripongo l'equipaggiamento di sopravvivenza del pilota di comando sul lato destro dell'astronave. Tutto il circuito di recupero... lato destro dell'astronave. Quello che devi fare è spostarti sul sedile sinistro con il tuo kit di sopravvivenza. Getto l'equipaggiamento di sopravvivenza del pilota sul portello sinistro sopra il circuito di recupero. Gonfio il Mae West, assicurandoti che sia sul lato destro dell'astronave. Io rompo un pilota... dipende da te. Toglierai l'equipaggiamento di soprav
짐, 아마 육분의를 이용한 별 관측이 될 겁니다. 우리가 확보하게 될 플랫폼이 얼마나 좋은
Et, Verseau, pour votre information, en ce qui concerne notre approvisionnement en eau, y compris nos plans de rétablissement du courant,
حسناً. بعد حوالي 20 دقيقة، ابد
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。你离终点线还有一
रॉजर। कोलंबिया, मेरे पास आपके लिए यह पास है। 109 प्लस 21 प्लस 12। कोने से आ रहा है 110 
すごくいいよ、ジム。庭で手を振っている子供
Roger. Ich verstehe, Sie möchten, dass das MSC-1-Experim
... questo COAS per quanto riguarda lo sterzo e tutto il resto, è senza spera
Okay. Wir haben Ihre Zeitangabe überprüft, 16 ist korrekt. Sie erhalten zum geplanten Zeitpunkt eine aktualisierte Eingabe. Gleichzeitig aktualisieren wir Ihre Zustandsvektoren für die und. Die Kurskorrektur Nr. 7 betrug weniger als 0,7 Fuß pro Sekunde und wird daher nicht ausgeführt. Sie haben einen geplanten Termin um, der nicht erforderlich ist. Die Entscheidung liegt bei 
हे जिम, 
Non. Nous ne pouvons pas lire les données de cette incroyable mémoire effaçable si nous
И вы хотите, чтобы это проявилось на работе пря
Cabin's 5.5 psid looks good. Fu
Нуждаются ли они в
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. The window, attitude indications, and periscope all check right together in good shape. I can see the dark side coming up in the periscope back behind me at present time. Cabin pressure is 5.5 and holding. Cabin temperature is 95 [degrees]. Relative humidity is 28 [percent]. I have turned the cabin--my suit temperature onto the increased water position for more cooling. Steam temperature is presently indicating 61 [degrees]. O
Просто скажите ему, чтобы он шел дальше, куда ид
Roger. We're getting you a flight plan update. We're still computing on your next burn, and we
ठीक है। आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है। फ्लेयर टेस्ट शुरू होने वाला
Okay. Da unten ist es gar nicht so schlecht. Wir sind drin – es ist hell genug. Aber sollte ich die Spannung an Batte
Revérifiez que votre visière est bien fermée et verrouillée. Casque verrouillé, gants enfilés, raccord d'entrée/sortie en « Y » et tuyaux ECS dégagés. Ensuite, je procéderai à la vérification de la combinaison du pilote commandant, que j'ai déjà effectuée… Passons au contrôle du débit
Okay. We are taking our final look at the mid-course procedures and we have a question as to the present position of one of the switches. The switch is the STATUS switch on panel 6. We'd 
Хорошо. Это будет на CB(16), Фред-о, но ИНВЕРТОР 2 ОТКРЫТ. Хорошо, что касается активации таймера миссии. Выполните шаг 1, исправление, строки 1 и 2. Удалите "установить таймер миссии на ме
ヒューストン CAP COM、ジェミニ 4。アップデート
La responsabilité de ce vol incombe d'abord à l'histoire et aux géants de la science qui ont précédé cet effort; ensuite au peuple américain, qui a exprimé son désir par sa volonté; puis, aux quatre administrations et à leurs Congrès, pour avoir mis en œuvre cette volonté; et enfin, aux agences spatiales et aux équipes industrielles qui ont construit nos vaisseaux spatiaux, Saturn, Columbia, Eagle, et le petit EMU, la combinaison spatiale et le sac à dos qui constituaient notre petit vaisseau spatial sur la surface lunaire. Nous tenons à remercier tout particulièrement tous les Américains qui ont construit les vaisseaux spatiaux, qui ont réalisé leur construction, leur conception, leurs essais, et qui y ont mis tout leur cœur et toutes leurs compétences. À ces personnes, ce soir, nous adressons un merci tout spécial, et à tous ceux qui nous écoutent et nous regardent ce soir, que Dieu vous bénisse. Bonne nuit de la par
Una guida abbastanza fluida, sai; è solo un po' rumorosa, ma niente a che vedere con la Stafford: la H-dot è fantastica. Non scommettere che potresti 
好的。在-4.5小时时，配置SEP（服务舱分离）。首先，打开平衡耦合器。其次，将计数器清零：404、405、406，加0；读取470。第三，将+X转换为0.5英尺/秒。第四，配置CM/SEP（指令舱分离）。第五
أما بالنسبة للطع
Ich mache viele Fotos vom MIT, die Kapsel ist seit 03:38:38 Minuten in Betrieb. Das ist unsere einzige Chanc
好的，杰克。继续往下看，一切都没问题，直到下一页，你会看到“验证氧气流量指示器无增加”。我们需要删除它下面的所有内容，直到最后一步“隧道灯，关闭”。所以从“仅在脱离对接前”开始，
알겠습니다. 잔잔한 파도에 대비한 장비를 넣어두겠
جيم ماكديفيت. الآن، نحن على بعد حوالي ثلاث ساعات من نقطة الانطلاق. عندما انفصلنا عن الصاروخ المعزز في لحظة الت
그다지 좋은 건 아
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. لم أتحدث ف
Right. Okay, stand by VI. I'm go
我知道，我知道——295。A 温度——87。A 压力——3000。B 温度——82。B 压力——2650。主电流表——19。2 号——19.5。1A——4.5。
アポロ8号、こちらヒ
D'accord. Ce dernier point était per
ठीक है। हम शिफ्ट बदलने की तैयारी कर रहे हैं, और इससे पहले मैं कुछ बातों पर चर्चा करना चाहता था। अभी, ऐसा लग रहा है कि हवा की गति ज़्यादा से ज़्यादा 0.3 फुट प्रति सेकंड है, इसलिए मिडकोर्स नंबर 6 के लिए कोई बर्न नहीं होगा। मिडकोर्स नंबर 7 थोड़ा ज़्यादा है, और हम उस पर बाद में फैसला करेंगे। लैंडिंग साइट पर मौसम अभी भी अच्छा बताया जा रहा है और पूर्वानुमान के अनुसार लगभग 2000 फीट पर छिटपुट और 12000 फीट पर टूटी हुई बारिश होगी, लगभग वही संख्या जो उन्हो
Хорошо. Сейчас я в автоматическом режиме. Всё работает идеально. Переключатель маневров выключен. Все системы показывают зелёный цвет. Я практически не расходую топливо в автоматическом режиме. Единственная проблемная зона — это схема скафандра, за которой я очень внимательно сле
I'm not going to do a thing, Mike; I'm just l
Повтори
Verseau, pour le moment, nous avons décidé de laisser les appareils allumés et d'éteindre ceux
Le pilote en est actuellement à son deuxième repas du troisième jo
J'aperçois de jolies étoiles, et aussi ces petits objets blancs qui semblent provenir de la capsule et dériver au loin. Si c'est un contrôle de lacet, c'est fantastique. J
よし。12 1383 327 023 上172 左22
هيوستن، أبولو 8. هل 
알겠습니다. 크라이오 히터 4개 모두 자동 모드입니다. 
नहीं, ईकेजी काम नहीं कर रहा था। शायद आप उन सेंसरों को दबा सकते हैं। ठीक है, सर्जन ने मुझे बताया कि ईकेजी अब वापस आ रहा है। आपके दूसरे प्रश्न के संबंध में, केबिन का दबा
我们了解到您在免费模式下没有启用此功能。
Beh, ne troverete una ancora più triste quando dovremo us
Хорошо. Что касается цветов, вода вся королевского синего цвета; облака, конечно, ярко-белые; отражение от Земли кажется намного больше, чем от Луны. Суша в основном коричневатая – от темно-коричневого до светло-коричневого цвета. Видно множество вихрей облаков, образованных различными погодными ячейками. Длинная полоса – похоже, перистых облаков – простирается от входа в Мексиканский залив прямо через Атлантический океан. Терминатор, конечно, сейчас пересекает Атлантический океан, идя с севера на юг. Южное полушарие почти полностью затянуто облаками, и вблизи Северного полюса довольно много облаков. Юго-запад Техаса и юго-запад США – безоблачно. Я бы сказал, что есть
Houston, mes commentaires concernant le lever du soleil portaient sur la zone située au-dessus du relief. On pouvait observer une lumière oblique, peut-être due à la brume, ou quelque chose d'approc
هدوء، هيوستن. يرجى تفريغ الوقود والأكسجين مجدداً. انتهى. إنه يت
ठीक है, जैक। समझ ग
रॉजर। सूर्योदय के समय, अंधेरे की ओर देखने 
Roger. Y 001, NA, più
D'a
Джек, я не могу точно сказать, мы были так заняты внизу, что, наверное, как-то забыли о второй половине. Но я несколько раз поднимался наверх и раньше не замечал никакого потока воздуха у окон, поэтому — сначала я предположил, что это какая-то новая вентиляция. Н
私が見
Nous allons bientôt recevoir - 10 se
حسناً، انطفأت الأنوار - باستثناء كل تلك الأنوا
ジェミニ4、CSQ。
Roger. Copie MAX g 6,3; R2 à
Roger. Ich lese dich immer noch. Bin etwas angeschlagen. Mit 30 ist mein Zustand gut. Treibstoff und Sauerstoff 
मैं बस यही टिप्पणी कर रह
콜롬비아, NOUN 49에서 대기하세요.
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Mike
حسناً
이거 정말
क्या हम अभी भी मात्रा के मामले में कुछ ज्यादा ही आगे नहीं बढ़ रहे हैं, जिससे 
Roger. Read you the same. Could you give us your status please? And the cape would like to know if any of
D'accord, je vois Merc
简单——难度0.3，7.6，但是……就在陨石坑西南角。我想如果他们身处那种位置，应该会知道。看起来那里坡度会相当
حسنًا. يجب أن نبدأ بالت
حسناً. لقد استلمنا ذلك، ومرة ​​أخرى نود الحصول على فحص الفولت والأمبير في وحدة ا
All right. A very interesting thing - Jim's got full daylight out his window, and I have full 
네, 준비됐습니다. 진행하실 준비가 되셨다면 '수락' 
هذا ضغط دم 
Роджер, Билл. Теперь мы вас х
Вы находитесь в режиме записи и непрерывной телефонной связи 
Ricevuto
제 생각엔 어제 일어난 일 같아요. 정기적인 정렬 작업을 하고 있
Non, je préfère de loin une approche tournée vers l'avenir
جيميني 4، غوايماس CAP COM. نحن في انتظار تفري
Esatto. Fai riferimento a S/2-6. Questo - In realtà, Jack, quello di cui stiamo parlando è l'adesivo di controllo dell'integrità del portello. E penso che sarà più facile s
जब आप अगली बार अमेरिका के ऊपर से गुजरेंगे, तब हम आपको नवीनतम समाचार 
予定通り…到着…ただいま赤色で表示されてい
Хорошо. Это довольно просто. Мы видим, что вас уже вызвали, поэтому мы хотим, чтобы вы в режиме маневрирования и удержания положения использовали команду. На командирском шаре вы должны установить тангаж на 267,5 и рыскание на -4,5. И когда вы это сделаете, на вылете должны ото
이글, 휴스턴. 화물을 확인했습니다. P00을 다시 선택했습니다. 통합 작업이 다시 진행 중입니다. 컴퓨터는 이제 고객님의 것입니다. 이제 드리프트 점검을 진행하겠습니다.
こちらで写真を撮りたいですか？どうぞ
ये लोग बहुत ज्यादा आवाज करते हैं, है ना? वैसे शायद ये एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल थ्रस्टर्स की वजह से हो। शायद यही वज
Ricevuto. Le batterie dell'adattatore segnano tutte 2 ampere e 24 volt. Gli anelli RCS reggono bene. Le bombole di O2 secondarie reggono bene. Le batterie principali segnano 9 e circa 22,5-23 volt. Il bus di controllo è (illeggibile), S2 a 26, S2 è 26 e la
Impossible d'atténuer suffisamment le réticule pour une acquisition nocturne. MARQUEZ à nouveau Grus, c'est-à-dire les étoiles elles-mêmes dans le h
…on a tout ce qu’il faut, mais on veut d’abord ranger un peu. Le suivre prouve seulement qu’on est capab
こんにちは、ザンジバル。こちらシグマ・セブン
好的。地球温度
Roger. Wenn wir es im REA
네. Enter 키를 누르시고, 333 Enter 키를
Autre information locale: le palais de justice du comté de Huntsville a brûlé avant l'aube hier, et il semblerait que des travaux de construction soient à prévoir. On parle aussi des familles qui attendent. Cet article est signé Ann James, journaliste du Post. « Nous nous reposons sur la face cachée de la lune », a déclaré Valerie Anders la veille de Noël, alors qu'elle et sa famille attendaient qu'Apollo 8 quitte l'orbite lunaire et reprenne le chemin de la Terre. Mme Anders était partie mardi à minuit, et les voisins venaient de rassembler les enfants pour que la famille puis
データポイント10 4.8、126.65、156
实际上，万斯，你看到的其实是无时无刻不在喷涌而出的固体水滴。它们照亮了月亮周围的整个天空。只是它们太细小了，你肉眼无法看到。现在我觉得它们喷涌而出的颗
Jerry, noch ein Identifizierungsmerkmal: Diese kle
مقفل ومقفل بقفل مز
Roger, Jim. We -we're looking right now, tentatively, at starting this about 45 minutes
Ich benötige inn
Хорошо. Панель 3: первые три строки уже были обработаны в начале моей процедуры возврата, поэтому, начиная с MODE, VOICE, следует вернуться к VOICE. POW
Okay. Wir schlagen vor, dass sich der LMP ausruht, während CMP und CDR wach sind. Der LMP sollte gegen 63 Uhr schlafen gehen, das ist in 25 Minuten. Sie haben dann 6 Stunden Ruhezeit. Um 69 Uhr stehen Sie auf. Um 70 Uhr schlafen Kommandant und Pilot des Kommandomoduls 6 Stunden bis 76 Uhr. Um 70–76,5–77 Uhr führen wir einen 52-Sekunden-Test durch. Um 78:30 Uhr laden und richten wir die Triebwerke aus. Die Zündzeit fü
روجر. يبدو أن
बस, अभी के लिए इतना ही, फ्रैंक। हमें कुछ और खबरें मिली हैं, जिन्हें वे जल्द से जल्द आप तक पहुंचाने का वादा कर चुके हैं। उनमें से सबसे दिलचस्प खबर प्यूब्लो की रिहाई थी। मुझे लगता है कि आपको निक्सन-आइजनहावर की शादी के बारे में पहले ही बताया जा चुका है। और बस मौसम की बात करें तो, यहाँ का मौसम काफी साफ है। आसमान में घने बादल छाए हुए हैं। लेकि
Okay. Ich war wohl etwas zu schnell. Okay. Am dritten Tag haben wir die Ziele 58, 63 und 65 erreicht. Die Trainingsaufnahmen wurden gemacht, und zwar mit Magazin D, das jetzt – Korrektur, Magazin E – 95 Aufnahmen anzeigt. Magazin D ist neu. Magazin 
حسنًا. كانت تعليقاتي - تعليقاتي كانت من غولدستون - أنهم لم يروا أي بقع بيضاء كما رأينا في الصورة ال
Eintrag wie folgt: Mittelpazifik, 357 152 359 268, plus 0813, minus 165 03 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028, NA 4 Mal, mit TO 400 0207 0025 0333 0816 16 0590 312, Zeta Persei, auf 16
आउटडोर 16-मिमी रील पर। हमें उससे कुछ न कुछ मि
11, ici Houston. Correction de cap n° 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, correction de tangage et de lacet NA, TIG 150 29 5453, -00048, + toutes les billes, +00001 075 159 328; HA NA; HP +00230 00048 011 00048; étoile du sextant 03 0908 382. Bloc d'étoiles Boresite, aucun disponible. Latitude +1102, -17204 11803 36275 195 03 33, alignement, Deneb et Vega, 007 144 068, pas d
फ्रेड, 1 
好的
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。状態ベク
मेरी चेकलिस्ट में एक और "कैप्चर लैच लगे
Tranquility Base, Houston. Den Event-Timer auf Nul
Apollo 13, Houston. Ti riceviamo 
Ici Sigma Seven. Je suis en route. Sigma Seven. Commutation
Roger. Vorremmo uscire con il collare e 
यह अच्छा है
저희는 지금 바로 준비됐습니다. 저희는 작업을 진행 중이었는데
इस समस्या पर 7 घंटे
Très bien. Je vous donne les voies d'accès. Nous voulons que FLOOD,
알겠습니다. 대략적으로 말씀드
Répète, Vance, sur ce derni
C'est exact. Vous pouvez corriger votre score de golf en zone en soustrayant une seconde, et soustrayez également une seconde à votre score 
التقطتُ للتوّ اللقط
네, 알겠습니다. 정말 감사합니다. 지금 연료 전지 퍼지 과정에 계신 
That 
准备
لا أقصد نمط الاختبار. أقول، لا أقصد نمط الاختبار. طلبنا منهم
Am
Хорошо, сейчас я подключ
अरे वाह, नीचे से मिस्टर कॉलिन्स का नज़ारा बहुत अच्छा लग रहा है। आखिरकार
そちらはどう
Okay. I have cabin temperature of 100 (degrees), cabin dome, 40 (degrees); cabin heat exchanger is 42 (degrees); the setting on the cabin is 3 and i
حس
コロンビア、ヒューストン。月の裏側で、​​低ビットレートでデータをコピーし
もう一つ。この中間コースのタイミングを計るという考え方自体は、SHeタンクが排気される直前に行うという考えに基づいています。そうすれば、もし皆さんが少し揺さぶ
Roger. Sul Rev 42, longitudine 31° O
Bon, je ne peux pas me placer derrière pour voir l'écran. Je vais faire la mise au point, mais on va regarder vers le bas, au-dessus d'un des drones et d'une des antennes, presque à la vert
Okay. Wir möchten Sie bitten, Ihren Encoder auszuschalten. Anschließend möchten wir den Agena-Load senden
Хорошо. Мои комментарии были такими: Голдстоун сказал, что они не видят белых пятен, как мы видели в 10-м кадре. Похоже, автоматическая регулировка усиления работает 
Go ahead, Houston
NOME 83 lettura meno quattro palline, meno tre palline, 3 o - correzione - meno - sia il registro 1 che il registro 2 leggono meno quat
روجر، أفهم أنه لم يطرأ أي تغيي
We wou
Ok. Abbiamo estratto il paracadute principale. È sganciato; abbiamo lo sgancio a punto singolo. Interruttore dell'indicatore di assetto di atterraggio - 
Хорошо, я нашел первую звезду. — Я почти уверен, что это покрытие на моем окне расположено примерно под нулевым углом наклона. Я вижу звезду ниже… казалось бы, я должен ее видеть. Возможно, это просто особенность от
ジェミニ4号機、こちらはヒューストンCAP
Ja. Ich kann es durch einen Teil meines Fensters sehen. Anscheinend habe ich das Stück 
Houston. I still question tha
Unless you'd rathe
阿波罗8号，你们现在可以方便的时候先完成第一部分，验
That son-of-a-gun is relieving at 5.8
Sie mü
Ok, Vance. Abbiamo trovato un paio di cose per quella modifica della cartuccia. Una è la speciale busta antipolvere che avremmo usato sulle borse, che è piuttosto 
ठीक है, अगर आप अभी चाहें तो मेरे पास आपके लिए 
友谊七号，友谊七号，这里是印度资本市场
سأتوجه إلى الرصيف للحصول على تذكرة 
昔の毘翅目が美しく見えています。ヌンキも見えています。南半球の毘翅目も見えています。ヌンキは飛行経路上、まさに本来あるべき位置にありま
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Continueremo a caricare la batteria B fino al periodo di sospensione. A quel punto interromperemo la ricarica. Inoltre, verso le 12:25 del p
E hai qua
Segnalazione. Un aspetto negativo dell'avvistamento della tempesta tropical
Okay. 
H
That's right. Refer to S/2-6. This - Really what we're talking about, Jack, is the hatch integrity c
我将停止我的活动时间，因为我
Ja
Quello che sti
D'accord, Fred-o. Nous n'avons pas l'intention d'utiliser l'antenne or
As
Hello, Ap
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven. Ici I.O.S. Com Tech sur HF et UHF. Vous recevez? À vous
Twenty seconds to burn. You got that, Te
Да, во
光っているように見えるものもあるけど、実際には光ってい
روجر. توقع فقط أن يظهر نفس التحذير والتنبيه مرة أخرى. وتريد منا أن نستمر في تحذيرك من ذلك الشي
المشكلة لم تكن في ذلك فحسب، بل في إغلاق الباب الخلفي بالكامل، لم يكن الأمر يتطلب كل هذا الشد من قبل. لا بد أن المطاط قد تصلب بشدة أ
ठीक है। अब हम बैग के साथ काम शुरू कर रहे हैं, और अगला कदम है लाल सूट की नली (या तो कमांडर की या एलएमपी की, क्योंकि हम चाहेंगे कि आपके पास अंततः ये दोनों हों) को बैग के ऊपरी हिस्से में र
Farò in modo che Bill lo 
난 네가 그 장비로 VHF 거리 측정을 할 줄 알았어. 왜냐하면 우리가 VHF용으로 설정해
Roger. Stand by. Our only concern, 11, is with the stuff you got in the hatch bag. That's pretty big bulk between you and A8, and we'd like to talk about moving that over to the sle
Хорошо. Сегодня на церковных службах по всему миру в молитвах упоминается «Аполлон-11». Богослужение президента Никсона в Белом доме также посвящено этой миссии, и наш коллега-астронавт Фрэнк Борман всё ещё там, и он прочитает отрывок из Книги Бытия, который читали на борту «Аполлона-8» в прошлое Рожд
हाँ, हमने इस बारे में थोड़ी बात की थी। लेकिन हमने थोड़ी बात तो की, पर वहाँ कै
D'accord. Sur le panneau 225, nous voulons que le disjoncteur du bus de vol du transpondeur de rendez-vous soit ouvert, ainsi que celui de l'émetteur FM bande S/bus 
Okay. Aspett
알겠습니다. 제가 있던 위치가 바로 그곳입니다. 명령 모듈 추진제 2, 중앙, 켜짐, 위쪽; 추진제 통신, 2, 회색; 서비스 모듈 보조 연료 압력, 4, 중앙, 닫힘; 자동, 꺼짐; 명령 모듈/최종 분리, 2, 꺼짐; 명령 모듈/서비스 모듈 분리, 2, 아래쪽; / 분리, 꺼짐, 아래쪽, 보호됨
좋아요, 그럼 CDR과 CMP를 살펴보고 혹시 오르는 게 있는지 확인해 보세요
Roger. Die Wolkendecke hier ist 3.000 Seemeilen breit und besteht aus Stratuswolken. Wir gehen davon aus, dass Sie sie durch
जेमिन
Bl
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Вы готовы к полёту (рейтинг 2); все системы готовы. Оценка продолжается и выглядит многоо
글쎄요, 잘 모르겠어요. 저희는 지금 서쪽으로 가고 있는데, 그쪽에서는 당신이 지금 돌아오길 원
А вот данные об облучении: CDR 11012, CMP 10013, LMP 09015. Отрицательный ре
Хорошо. Что касается цветов, вода вся королевского синего цвета; облака, конечно, ярко-белые; отражение от Земли кажется намного больше, чем от Луны. Суша в основном коричневатая – от темно-коричневого до светло-коричневого цвета. Видно множество вихрей облаков, образованных различными погодными ячейками. Длинная полоса – похоже, перистых облаков – простирается от входа в Мексиканский залив прямо 
تم إغلاق اللوحة ال
Keep 
Okay. We can put off this NAV sighting. It was scheduled here at, and we can put it off, Judging from your comments about sleeping, we would
يبدو 
صحيح. لا
Penso che sia andata abbastanza bene, Houston, anche se immagino di aver usato più gas di quanto abbia usato nel simulatore. La manovra di virata: ho premuto il comando di accelerazione e beccheggio e ho iniziato a picchiare, poi quando ho riportato l'assetto manuale di beccheggio su comando di velocità, per qualche motivo, ha smesso di beccheggiare e ho dovuto tornare al coma
我同意
Okay. Jim just noticed we got a VHF breaker in on panel 
Okay. Now be advised, the optics calibration is very difficult to
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Мы выполняем маневрирование для достижения желаемого положения. Оптимальные значения: крен 8,37, тангаж 61,33 и рыскание 
Roger. 4 révisé: SPS/G&N: 38320, moins 055, plus 060 084 30 2749, plus 31380, plus 03475, moins 01032; roulis NA, tangage 034. Le reste du PA
रॉजर। जी एंड एन: 62710, प्लस 098, माइनस 019, 077 46 2248, प्लस 32148, माइनस 00455, माइ
अंतरिक्ष से मानवयुक्त मौसम पूर्वानुमानकर्ता की यह आपकी पहली अंतरिक्ष मौसम रिपोर्ट 
यह सही है। पैनल 382 पर जाएं। पहला, दूसरा, तीसरा और चौथा अपरिवर्तित हैं। हमें SEC EVAP H2O CONTROL वाल्व और PRIM EVAP H2O CONTROL वाल्व दोनों को बंद करना है। ये 
بينما نوجه المركبة نحو الأعلى في هذا الاتجاه، نرى من نوافذنا الجانبية الشمس وهي تمر، وبالطبع نرى الأرض من إحدى نوافذنا الآن. وخلف نافذتي مباشرةً، نرى الشمس، لأنها تُضيء خرائط النجوم التي نراها. يُمثل هذا الخط مستوى مسار الش
是的，还不错。这完全取决于情
Roger. Latitudes, plus 01
Okay, we don't have a percise time for the starting of that p
Roger. Sigma Seven. Guaymas Cap Com. Loud and clear. They had a power failure up the California way. We're reading your correct ret
わからな
No, ma i suoi commenti su Bill Shaffer e le relative spiegazioni sono s
2. We are right here. That swung us in, tight on, ... rig
알겠습니다. 좋은 정보네요. 앞으로도 계속해서 투구하시는 동안, 혹시라도 도움이 될 만한 상황이 생기면 주기적으로 창밖을 내다보시고 저희에게 도움이 될 만한 별들을 찾아보시면 좋겠습
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴
Okay, Jack. Joe Kerwin hat mir
罗杰。你一旦有机会——在你的位置上——查看一下，我们想知道你是否能看到星星，以便进
अच्छा, ठीक है। धन
Okay. Das ist die gewünschte Konfiguration. Folgendes haben wir uns überlegt: Als wir auf Tank 1 AUTO und Tank 2 AUS umgeschaltet haben, stellten wir fest, dass der Heizzyklus einen Druck von ca. 233 psi in Tank 1 aufwies. Dieser liegt deutlich über dem Warnbereich. Mit dieser Konfiguration für den Schlafzyklus vermeiden wir, dass die Warnleuchten aufleuchten. Um dies komfortabel zu gewährleisten, möchten wir den Rest des Tages mehr Wasserstoff aus Tank 2 verbrauchen, um ein Ungleichgewicht zugunsten von Tank 1 zu erzeugen. So gleicht sich der Wasserstand am Ende des Schlafzyklus aus. Deshalb haben wir Sie jetzt auf Tank 1 AUS und Tank 2 AUTO umgeschaltet. Wir erwa
रॉजर। उड़ान योजना में आपने जो कोण बताए हैं
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 수락 버
Jim, di
Apollo 8, Houston. Es sieht so aus, als ob die Ladung von Batterie B noch etwa sechs Stunden dauern könnte. Die Laderate ist zwar geringer als die, die wir anhand
Если, конечно, ты не предпочитаешь спать наверху, Ба
继续前进，海角
そうだね、あのポケットと財布を持って行った方がいいかな。ところで、予備のカメラが入ってい
Houston, Apollo 11 is calling you on
Siehst du – da reinzukommen wird
Роджер. Мы не 
Роджер. Минус 6 минут. Понимаю, вы вот-вот включите двигатели подвеса и всё такое. Хорошо. Теперь мы видим компьютер в верхней средней части — на панели. Кажется, мы видим чей-то контрольный с
로저. P76: 84는 -00758
네. 제가 확인해 본 226개의 회로 차단기 중에서, 관련된 회로 차단기는 총 6개입
Die Bordnavigation zeigt eine perizynthische Höhe von 38
イーグル、コロンビ
MAIN A では、Charlie 1、2、3、4 をお願いし
Roger, et nous aimerions faire cela en mode manuel, donc à la page 17, environ aux deux tiers de la 
Houston, Apollo 11. Welche Seite benötigen Sie in dies
Перегоревшая лампочка находилась в обл
是的，我相信
मुझे पुनः प्रवेश दर नहीं म
यह कोरोना बोरेलिस 
はい。両方のACバスにインバーター1が接続されましたね。ジャック、電源を切った機器の一つは、燃料電池ポンプです。燃料電池2のポンプを戻す必要がある時は、お知らせください。そちらのポンプも修理に出さ
А что касается «Аполлона-11», Хьюстон, все ваши системы выглядят очень хорошо. Будем дер
Roger. Pour information, au cas où cela se serait produit pendant votre absence, le disjoncteur principal est
А в Италии Папа Павел VI организовал специальную цветную телесеть в своей летней резиденции, чтобы следить за ва
ह्यूस्टन, यह अपोलो 8 है, जो आपको हाई गेन पर संदेश भेज रहा है। आप कैसे सुन रहे 
ठीक है। मैं बस सोच रहा था कि अग
저희는 비행 계획대로 거의 진행할 예정입니다. 다만, 미국 북서부와 캐나다 남서부 지역의 불빛을 확인해 볼 생각입니다. 북반구 상공까지 
待機、ヒュースト
Roger. Ho due aggiornamenti di Apollo Landmark per te.
ठीक है। हमने आपके व्यवहार का अवलोकन किया है, और मुझे लगता है कि हमारे पास इस पर काम करने के लिए पर्याप्त डेटा है। चलिए, इस पर थोड़ी देर काम करते हैं, और हम आपको एक-दो संशोधनों में रिपोर्ट दें
わかった。ちょっと待っ
روجر. ما نريده منك هو أن تبتعد عن دائرة اهتمامك، وأن تتحكم في مداك ونط
Роджер, Майк. Хотел бы прокомментировать данные. Автоматический маневр был довольно точным. Похоже, мы попали в какую-то субзвездную точку во время маневра; автоматическая оптика направила Канопус прямо туда, куда нужно; управление минимальным импульсом сработало как положено. На высотах, с которых я начал наблюдения, видна отчетливая полоса дымки. Фильтр придает Земле свечение, своего рода оранжевое свечение. Точно определить местонахождение звезды очень сложно, но, кажется, есть четкая линия, где, как ожидается, должен находиться горизонт, которая проходит сквозь дымку, где, как мы предполагаем, находится атмосфера. Я следовал процедуре, которую мы проводили в MIT, примерно две линии поверх слоя дымки – четкая линия для этих наблюдений. Что касает
わかりました。コピーする前に、ここで全部読んで、私たちが何を話しているのか理解してもらいましょう。この短い手紙のタイトルは「テレビと映画写真の相関実験」です。彼らがやりたいのは、望遠レンズを取り付けたテレビカメラをブラケットに取り付け、ランデブーウィンドウに設置し、赤と青のフィルターを通して地球のテレビ画像を撮影することです。フィルター1つにつき1分、つまり赤と青のフィルタ
收到。确认无
Попробуем показать вам Хьюстон, мы пос
ヒューストン、こちらアポロ8号。テレビをつけて
Im Folgenden möchten wir klären, ob Sie nur die Kontrollpunkte 1, 2 und 3 entfernen und den Pseudo-Landeplatz bearbeiten möchten oder ob Sie auch die Markierungen des Pseudo-Landeplatzes
Gemini VI, this is Russ Land Leader. Can you give us your alti
Eagle – Houston, hier spricht Eagle. Ich empfange Sie laut und deutlich über S-Band, in normaler Sti
友情セブン。ネガティブ
네. 주도권을 잡으세요.
Майк, на посадочной площадке ужасно много объектов. Это бы только подогрело сердце Джека Шмидта. Автоматическая
Roger. Nous recevrons un journal dans quelque temps; nous vous donnerons plus d'informations plus
And
就在这儿，吉姆。就是这儿。看起来是这
Roger. I've put blood pressure up on the air 
Хорошо, спасибо. Для нас это гораздо проще, если только OMNI н
프랭크 씨, 지금 보내드릴 물품을 준비하고 있어서 조금 늦어지고 있습니다. 발송 전에 빠뜨리는 부분이 없는
こち
Attitude Light Swi
RKV医療データパス1番をパイロット宛に、
了解。推奨姿勢はロール307.0、ピッチ354.0、ヨー0
Well, Fred-o is getting something to eat, and J
Привет, Джим, я сейчас смотрю в монокуляр, и, если можно так выразиться, вид просто потрясающий. Он неземной. Я вижу все остро
は
그리고, 아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴입니다. 제가 서비스 
Okay. Wir haben dazu eine Reihe interessanter Ideen erhalten, und die neueste, die ich gehört habe, ist, die Plattform mit Strom zu versorgen und sie auszurichten, und die CM-Plattform darauf auszuricht
Okay. We're pressing on with th
Roger. Plus 25, / 63087, Minus 162 plus 129, Minus 00163, Plus 00001, Plus 52759 177 137 001, nicht anwendbar, Plus 00201 52759 623 52543 14 2347 337 023 aufwärts 195 links 1,7, Plus 1145, Minus 16500 12780 35890. Nordkurs 068 097 356, kein Tankinhalt, schnelle Rückkehr von 7 - 700 und 7900 Indischer Ozean. Hohe Geschwi
Okay. Starten Sie Comp-PUSH. Platform-ORBIT RATE. Attitude-RATE COMMAND. Sie befinden sich im PULSE-M
Et, Eagle, à mon signal, nous avons 12 minutes avant le départ. Terminé
نعم، هذا يُرهقني حقاً
D'accord. Il ne nous reste plus qu'à envoyer vos vecteurs d'état et les charges cibles. Cela de
Нет. Но не так. Я вставил его до упора. Он застревал и держался вот так. Так что вот вам Y-об
نسمع الكثير من التشويش في ال
Roger. D
控制中心的各位，不妨和我们一起祝乔治·穆
Хорошо, Аполлон-8. Мы хотели бы изменить звезду 26, то есть две шестерки; мы хотели бы сделать ее околоземной (воздух-воздух) для двух наборов, двух наборов. Затем мы хотели бы взять звезду 16 (воздух-воздух) для одного набора. Если звезда 26 околоземная невозможна, то звезд
Ширина луча антенны с высоким ко
حسنًا. لديّ بع
わかりました。「GUIDANCE CONTROL
Хорошо, Джим. Для экономии топлива мы бы предпочли, чтобы вы увеличили минимальный импульс, и на самом деле рег
Roger. Besser, Mike. Wir
Роджер. Какова оценка Рода напряжения на нашей главной шин
نودّ أن ننصحك بشرب الكثير من الماء. نعتق
हे फ्रेड, मेरी आवाज़ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है। मुझे पता चला है कि तुम ऊपर घर की सफाई कर रहे हो और सामान इधर-उधर कर रहे 
Houston, Colombie. Je le répète, je ne l'ai pas vu. L'optique automatique pointait vers 
감
Bene.
好的。大概10
Okay. Jetzt verstehe ich, was du meinst. Ich spreche das nochmal mit den Leuten vom Fernsehen ab und frage nach ihrer Meinung. Sie wollten außerdem mit einer Hasselblad durch das Rendezvou
Bonjour, A
Hier dri
आपकी बा
If I don't talk much more than this, it won't be very long to real time this tape recorder. Coming up on at. Quite obvious that you don't care really what attitude you 
Roger. Bei Jims Markierungen möchten wir einen Abstand von etwa 30 Sekunden zwischen den einzelnen Markierungen. Bei den letzten Markierungen haben wir einen Abstand von ungefähr 15 Sek
Это отрицательный результат. Я его не открывал. Не открою, пока не закончу эти измерения. Фекда сейчас погасла на отметке 1,7 в средней части, в промежуточном положении между слоем дымки и Землей. Хорошо, Вумера, мое состояние очень хорошее. Температура скафандра существенно снижается. Температура пара в паровом вентиляционном отверстии сниз
...क्या आप बहुत स्थिर थे; मेरा मतलब है, आप बस तैरते हुए ऊपर आ गए या फिर बहुत ज्यादा
Хорошо. Сделаю. Джим,
わか
Voilà, c'est l'un des nombreux points à aborder. Je voulais vous rappeler quelque chose q
Und die D-9-Tests der Luftwaffe – aufgrund ihrer Struktur sind sie s
Роджер, это кома
好的。我只是想知道它们是否都已就绪——我不是质疑你的清单，只
好的。减去 00489，加上 00000，加上 47250 177 144 
Роджер. Топливо 103-100 [процентов]. Кислород 89-100 [процентов]. Энергоснабжение в норме. Состояние «Авроры-7» во всех отношениях
ठीक है। आप प्लेटफ़ॉर्म को पल्स 
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Одна просьба: переключите оптику на нулевое положение. У нас много теорий о том, почему он только что совершил маневр на скорости семь десятых, Майк, но окончательного ответа пока
نحصل ع
좋아요, 수성이 대기광을 뚫고 지나가는 게 보이네요. 잘 보일지 지켜보죠. 제가 "보인다"라고 말했을 때가 시작이었어요. 마크, 처음으로 색깔이 변했는데, 지금은 연한 파란색이에요. 아직도 잘 보이죠. 마크, 더 진한 파란색으로 변했어요. 마크, 지구 표면
잘 읽어주셨네요, 물병자리님. 바늘을 연결하려면 사령관의 전원을 켜야 합니다.
Haben Sie das Paket überprüft? Können Sie es erreichen? Überprüfen Sie das Paket
여기는 시그마 세
Okay. Das klingt gut. Sie möchten diese Konfiguration zuers
Roger,
मुझे ऐसा नहीं लगता, जो पैड हमे
네,
अब हमारे पास तारे देखने के लिए लगभग एकदम सही परिस्थितियाँ हैं, क्योंकि चंद्रमा का प्रभाव बहुत कम है। जैसा कि हम प
Okay. Jetzt sollte alles geklärt sein, C
Okay. Mike, puoi manovrare per raggiungere il tuo assetto preliminare come mostrato a pagina 398 del piano di volo, e gli angoli di guadagno elevati sono buoni come mostrato nel piano di volo, e vorremmo che tu scaricassi le acque reflue a 131 05 fino al 10 per
我
Хорошо. Зачеркните верхнюю строку справа на этой странице, где написано «включено на 4 секунды, частота кадров 50 кадров в 
로저. 화물 도착했습니다. 2
了解。私のマークのC.E.T
Okay. That's
Anything
Roger. Un peu plus tard que ça, vers 1
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Пожалуйста, оставьте телевизор включенным примерно на 10 минут, чтобы мы могли провести качественное сравнение на камере. На телевизоре вы можете делать все, что захотите: снимать интерьер, экстерьер, приближать и отдалять, все, что у
罗杰，你能给我们描述一下气球及
罗杰，双子座4号。我有一张更新的轨道图。准备好复制了
J'ai monté ton cheval ces deux derniers 
Roger. Potresti non dover dilungarti troppo. La posizione che ti ho appena indicato è leggermente a ovest del Cratere Ovest. Immagino sia circa due decimi di chilometro a ovest, e ci chiedevamo se Neil o Buzz avessero osservato altri punti di riferimento durante la discesa,
أبولو ٨، هيوستن. اكتملت عملية تفريغ البيانات؛ يمكنك استعادة جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بك. كان الهدف من تفريغ البيانات هو مواصلة التحقيق في الخلل الذي واجهته قبل حوالي أ
روجر. أعطني مواعيد انطلاق الثورة الرابعة هناك، بدايةً منه
了解しました。この時点では、流体はすべてスタンドパイプの周りに集まっています。スタンドパイプは満杯のように見えますが、スタンドパイプの外側の流体は半分ほどの高さまで達しています。かなり大きなメニスカスがあります。メニスカ
Oka
Ich weiß nicht, warum, nachdem ich das gespürt hatte. Ja, ich spürte, dass es
알겠습니다. 인버터 2, AC 버스 2 스위치를 켜짐으로 설정하고, AC 버스 2 리셋 스위치는 리셋 및 중앙으로 설정하세요. 배터리 충전 스위치는 알파로, DC 표시기 스위치는 배터리 충전
좋습니다. 아래쪽 메인 회로 상태는 여전히 매우 양호해 보이므로, 전반적으로 괜찮은 것 같습니다. 배터리 B 충전은 대략 이쯤에 완료될
大丈夫そうですね。おっしゃる通り、ちゃんと動いているようですね。そ
It's not critical. It's just a way of doing business. I had compared the night yaw checks over Muchea and Woomera, and am very satisfied with the results. With known objects it is absolutely no problem at all to acquire yaw. In addition, we can watch... down through the w
RCS Power A и B-ACME, OAMS Power OFF, OAMS Propellant - OFF. Управление космическим ап
Хорошо. Я пока останусь на позиции D. Сейчас
不行。等等。杰克，我们现在只想关闭电
ПЛАТФОРМА или КО
ठीक है। प्लस 4 घंटे ठीक है। हम जल्द ही आपके लिए प्लस 11 घंटे वाला एंटीना उपलब्ध करा देंगे, और आपके हाई-ग
귀하께서
네, 마이크. 물론, 이건 G&N 시스템이 고장 나서 일정 G로 비행해야 하는 상황을 가정한 겁니다. 우리가 하려는 건 일정 G 비행 범위를 1100마일에서 1500마
Hier ist Friendship Seven, die eine
はい、わかりま
好
こんにちは、Muchea Com Te
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很神奇，就是眼睛还没适应的时候，周围一片漆黑。我确实能看到窗户上有一些涂层。现在要回到超高频VOX模式进行发射。打开面罩擦拭右侧麦克风。我舔了一下。关上面罩。面罩立刻密封，以便宇航服电路开始工作。我可不想再被它弄脏。宇航服进气口的温度稳定在68度左右。所以穹顶又要升起来了。现在温度是76度，75度。看来这个更高的设置才是我们想要的。我想再往上加半格，应该就能锁定温度了。宇航服终于开始降温了，所以我知道该把温度调到什么程度了。我已经将宇航服和控制杆的冷
Roger. For your information, the laser from McDonald Observatory in West Texas will be up from about 181 hours and 30 minutes, on for 1 hour. You should be able to spot the earth out of the number 1 window ev
Роджер. Мы да
分か
Écoute, je ne me raserai pas. Je suis tellement bel
了解。姿勢は
... अपेक्षाकृत कम बना हुआ है। हम ओस बिंदु प्रसार लगभग 13 या 14 डिग्री का अन
휴스턴 CA
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь. Командование ВВС Гав
ठीक है
Sono passato alla trasmissione e registrazione VOX. Sono soddisfatto di poter vedere l'imbardata attraverso la finestra senza usare il reticolo, lasciando che le immagini arrivino da tutti i lati. È 
Roger. Bill hat seinen Kassettenrekorder wieder, und uns ist beim letzten Übertragen aufgefallen, dass die Aufnahmen alle in niedriger Bitrate waren. Wi
罗杰，11。我们不用再担心了。现在的飞机高度表都是标准值，29.92；但基本上它的
Ici Apollo 8, en direct de la Lune. Nous avons dû changer de caméra. Nous vous avons d'abord montré la Terre, que nous observons depuis 16 heures. Nous passons maintenant à la Lune, que nous survolons à 96 kilomètres d'altitude depuis 16 heures. Bill Anders, Jim Lovell et moi-même avons passé la veille de Noël ici à réaliser des expériences, prendre des photos et manœuvrer les mote
And, Apollo 11, Houst
11番、こちらはヒューストンです。廃棄物管理排水管からの排気の結果、O2流量センサーが故障していることが判明しました。循環式貯水タンクの排水についてご説明いただいた際に、センサーは動いており、おそらく高い流量を示していると思われますが、十分な流量を示していないように思われました。この点と現在の流量から判断すると、トランスデューサーの故障と結論付けました。車両内のO2濃度を検査に合格するレベルまで上げるため
More to the north and a little more to the east. The
ヒューストンです。金利は非常に安定しているようですね。こちらでは金利が完全に抑制されているよう
Nel modulo lunare, questa copertura per la telecamera. Pensaci un attimo: l'ho montata e non vedo alcuna necessità di cambiarla. Se funziona ora,
मेरी योजना प्रोग्राम 52 में दोबारा प्रवेश करने की है - खैर, यह कैपेला तक नहीं पहुंचा, और मैं इसे स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में पहचान नहीं पा रहा हूँ। म
알겠습니다. 작동 회로 차단기를 내리겠습니다
Go ahea
Mentre aspetto il mio turno alla pistola ad acqua, potrei fare qualche commento sull'ottica. Sembra esserc
いや、まずは君のためにもっと態度を改めないと
يا غاس، بخصوص هذا الأمر - ما هو مسجل على جهاز ا
알겠습니다. 어제도 같은 문제가 발생했어요.
ゲット・ザ・バズ
Tranquility, this is Houston. We also have a set of about 10 questi
您
ठीक है। पावरअप के नीचे, पहली पंक्ति में लिखा है "ऑटो सेलेक्ट, 16, टू ऑफ"। ठीक है। आप इस हिस्से को हटा सकते हैं। पाँचवीं पंक्ति में लिखा है "सर्किट ब्रेकर लॉजिक पावर", असल में यह "लॉजिक बस, चार, टू क्लोज्ड" है। डेल्टा-वी सीजी महत्वपूर्ण नहीं है क्योंकि हम इंजन को जला नहीं रहे हैं। "सिग्नल कंडीशनर/ड्राइवर बायस पावर" में "टू टू एसी 1" लिखा है। हम इसे केवल एक ही रखेंगे; इसे "सिग्नल कंडीशन/ड्राइवर बायस पावर, वन, टू एसी 1" कर देंगे। "पावर", जो नीचे से तीसरी पंक्ति है, उसमें लिखा है "पावर, टू, ऑन"; हम इसे केवल एक ही रखेंगे। हम नंबर 1 को लाएंगे, और हम "पावर, नंबर 1" लिखेंगे और आखिरी पंक्ति "ऑटो सेलेक्ट, 16, इनेबल" को आप हटाकर उसकी जग
Хорошо
أبولو 8، هيوستن. تبدو زوايا REACQ سالبة 45 في الميل، موجبة
Roger. Ich esse gerade. Zweite Mahlzeit am dritten Tag. Ich habe sechs Schlucke Wasser getrunken. Von den letzten fünf 
我戴
That's affirmative. Our first stick course was 007 forward, 005 left, and 007 up. The final mid-course was 004 forward, 06 right, and 003 up. This pretty much conforms with the plot. We're a little bit below the nominal line there - of the plot at that time. In the braking, we knocked up 27 feet per second Delta-V with our brakings. There's 2
R
Хорошо. Вот пресс-релиз Хейни. В утренней газете написано, что вы не поедете в течение 5 дней. Этот вопрос обсуждался на вчерашней пресс-конференции, и в ответ на него Крис сказал, что, похоже, у нас есть все необходимые расхо
لا يزال لدينا الصاروخ المعزز... كان هو 
로저, 카나본. 항공기 교체를 위해. GET 02 + 42 + 07; 델타-V, 31.7; 지속 시간, 0 + 40초; 요, 오른쪽 90도, 피치 00; 코어 25, 26,
Понял. Это «Дружба Семь». Топл
Если бы я знал об этом заранее, я бы надел пиджак и галст
휴스턴. 로저.
Eagle, Houston.
チャーリー、アポロ11号。停止についていくつか質問があります。一番簡単な方法は、ヨー角0度、ピッチ角90度まで接近しているので、ロール角約260度で停止させるだけだと思います。それから、マニュアル姿勢
了解。コピーを待機していま
Роджер, это Бли
Okay. And then finally, now t
Houston, did you
حسنًا. في الخطوة 5 من النموذج E-11، يوجد العنوان الفرعي الأول بعنوان "الخوذات والقفازات"، والبنود التي تليه تتأثر بارتداء البدلات الرسمية أو القمصان، ولكن يجب إتمامها. يجب أن تكون صمامات عودة الهواء في البدلة مفتوحة عند ارتداء قميص. ويجب أن يكون هناك خط مرسوم يدويًا لإيقاف تشغيل أجهزة الرؤية بين
Wir glauben, dass es so sein könnte, Jack. Wir vermuten, dass es 15 bis 20 Sekunden sind, und empfehlen Ihnen, die PRO-Taste gedrückt zu halten und sie für eine längere Zeit, wahrscheinlich eine halbe Minute oder länger, gedrückt zu halten, um zu sehen, ob die
तुम कमजोर पड़ रहे हो। मैंने ठीक से नकल न
오로라
रॉजर। हम उस गड्ढ
حسنًا. لدينا الآن شخص مقلوب رأسًا على عقب في الصورة. مع العلم، بالطبع، أنه في الفضاء لا يوجد وضع صحيح أو مقلوب تمامًا. ما زلنا نراه كذ
Salve, Capitan
双子座4号，你们可以进行舱外活动和减压了。除非你有几分钟时间，否则请暂时不要测量血压，如果
此时
Eagle, Houston. Si vous lisez ceci, c'es
Роджер. Я так понимаю, 
네, 방금 전에 연락이 끊기기 전에 마지막으로 말씀드리려고 했던 건 연료를 현명하게 사용하는 것에 관한 것이었습니다. 그들은 당신이 비행 계획을 모두 완료하기
Это «Дружба Семь». Со стороны Африки было много облаков. Сейчас они значительно рассеялись, и хотя я не мо
Okay. Molto bene. Bene, aspetteremo che fac
ठीक है, जैक। एक सवाल है। अगर हमें इस पावर सिस्टम को चालू करने में कोई समस्या आती है, तो इससे बाहर निकलने का सबसे तेज़ तरीका क्या है? क्या सामान्य स्थिति में वापस आने के लिए, बस LM पावर बटन को रीसेट करक
まだ効果がないので
Оно заблокирует его в
Houston, Apollo 11. Go ahead with your 
D'accord. J'ai éteint le réchauffeur du réservoir d'O2 1 et celu
Ok
ينبغي أن يك
シグマセブン、シグマセブン、こちらはムチア・キ
ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे पृथ्वी थोड़ी तिरछी हो गई है, लेकिन जितने घंटे हो चुके 
알겠습니다. 보조 라디에이터 입력 온도는 70도에서 약 72도 사이이고, 라디에이터 출력 온도는 약 30도입니다. 글리콜 증발기 온도는 약 65도이고, 증기 압력은 최대치이며, 글리콜 배출 압력은 약 9psi입니다. 보조 축압기 보호복 온도는 약 52도이고, 객실 온도는 약 58도입니다. 압력은 보호복이 4.1, 객실이 5입니다. 이산화탄소 분압은 1을 약간 넘는 약 1.1입니다. 건물 측면 온도는 72도이고, 헬륨은 3500, N2 A는 2300, N2 B는 약 2450입니다. 연료는 약 165이고, 연료 전지 1은 둘 다 닫혀 있고 압력이 0입니다. 피부 온도는 405도
Okay. I've been plotting it, an
D'accord, je vais opter pour O2 High Rate
我觉得没必要这么做。我们只是想用另一颗星来确认一下，
फ्रेड, मेरा सुझाव है कि जब आपकी खिड़की फिर से पृथ
パネル16、上段のフライトディスプレイ：システムエンジニアクロスポインター、開；システムクワッド1～4のTCA、全て閉。2段目の照明：フラッド、
알겠습니다. 이 내용을 굳이 언급하실 필요는 없습니
بالتأكيد؛ لقد كان الأمر مس
Хорошо, Кен. Мы возвращаемся к теме отношения. Хочешь, мы сейчас проведём этот тест REACQ с высоким коэффици
それについては私にはあまり何もできませ
शा
So, das war's fürs Erste, Frank. Wir haben noch ein paar Neuigkeiten, die sie uns zukommen lassen wollten, sobald sie durchgesickert sind. Das einzig wirklich Interessante war – insbesondere die Veröffentlichung in Pueblo. Ich glaube, du hast ja schon von der Hochzeit von Nixon und Eisenhower gehört. Und sonst so? Das Wetter ist hier ziemlich klar. Es ist zwar stark bewölkt, aber kalt, die Sicht ist gut, und es fühlt si
Okay. Ja
Okay. Es dauert nur noch ein oder zwei Minuten. Wir müssen noch
일몰과 일출 사이에 지평선이 어떻게 변하는지
Area 3 Delta is 04 plus
Okay, Fred. Zwei, drei Dinge. Erstens: Wir brauchen so schnell wie möglich eine Überprüfung des Andockwinkels. Zweitens: Du darfst so viel Wasser 
Apollo 8, Houston. 
Да. Хорошо, 13. На данный момент у нас нет для вас никакой инф
Внезапно мы услышали тихий щелчок, и уровень 
نعتقد أن الأمر قد يكون كذلك يا جاك. نعتقد أنه قد يستغرق من 15 إلى 20 ثانية، وننصحك بالضغط على الزر لفترة طويلة، ربما نصف دقيقة أ
罗杰，我们不希望你接受这些标记。这是因为绕过轴颈偏差检查后，这些寄存器中仍然残留着较大的数值，所以你需要在进行轴颈偏差检查之后再继续操作。这些数值稍后会变小，但
أخيرًا، حللنا مشكلة درجة حرارة دائرة البدلة. الآن أفهم سبب قلق سكوت بشأن هذا التسجيل فقط. لا يوجد صوت جانبي أيضًا. درجة حرارة البدلة الآن - مارك تي - هي 68 درجة، وأشعر بحالة ممتازة. قبة البدلة حوالي 72 درجة مرة أخرى. يبدو أنها تتقلب، ونحن ندخل الآن في الجانب الليلي. أعتقد أننا نتحكم بدائرة البدلة بشكل جيد. سأعود إلى استخدام جهاز الاتصال اللاسلكي. أنتظ
ソース圧力はまだ非常に良
さて、ご説明いたしますと、スーツの吸気口の温度は現在約 63 度で、ドームの温度は 70 度で安
アポロ 8 号、ヒューストン。追
罗杰，宁静。我们还有大约 6 分钟就到 108 了。如果您想启动您的活动计时器，我们可以在 108:00 给
للأسف، لم تصلني الأرقام هنا. إذا نظرت إلى الرسم البياني ال
Территория закрыта, и у нас нет никаких предупрежден
Ich habe es seit Einbruch der Dunkelheit nicht gefunden. Es – es – es spinnt ziemlich, Deke. Es ist nicht vollständig aufgepumpt und spannt sich nicht so straff an der Leine, wie ich erwartet hatte. Es springt auf und ab und schwingt hin und he
收到。获取 B 2 18 26；速度增量，49.3；扭矩增量，1 加 0.07；偏航角 0，俯仰角 0；核心 25，00493；核心 26 和 27
Roger. 027 44 5363, minus 165 073 14 037 44 8016, minus 165 072 46; 046 44 6141, minus 165 097 03 055 44 8209, minus 165 096 42. Bereit für Ihre Rücklesung. E
खैर, बज़ इसके साथ छेड़
Ро
VI، تم تحويل خيار قراءة الكمية 
للعلم يا فانس، قبل حوالي نصف ساعة، لم نتمكن أنا وجاك من رؤية الأبراج والنجوم في بعض وضعيات المركبة الفضائية. كنا نرى برج العقرب والقوس، ونجوماً أخرى مثل النسر الطائر والنسر النسر وألفا قنطورس والنسر الواقع، وهي نجوم من هذا القدر، وقد توقف هبوب 
È più o meno la stessa cosa. Il problema è che è puntato prop
حسنًا. هل تريد منا نقل ذلك إلى متجه
로저, 카이로,
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. لدينا لكم برنامج تلفزيوني، بال
आप कैसा महसूस कर रहे हैं? मैं ब
روجر. كنا نراقب بعض السحب في منطقتك من خلال المنظار الأحادي على طول ساحل خليج تكساس بعد ظهر اليوم، ولاحظنا أيضًا وجود سحب فوق با
حسنًا. وسأكون جاهزًا لت
Columbia, hier spricht Houston. Bit
Yuri, the guys are happy that you are alright and feel
Близнецы 4, Козёр-Канади. Хотелось 
没错。首先，我将快速回顾一下主要事件的时间，然后再补充一些细节。好的。进入界面时间是142小时40分钟；大约在此之前6个半小时左右，我们将启动整个流程，首先是启动加热器，检查指挥中心温度，并在必要时预热指挥中心，我们估计可能需要这样做。稍后我们会提供详细的操作步骤。大约在此之前6小时左右，我们将开始启动，使用您上次中途飞行时使用的修改后的30分钟检查清单。然后，在大约5小时之前，我们希望您像之前一样，使用地球晨昏线调整姿态，以便进行体轴对准；一旦我们完成上述操作，我们将执行-7，这看起来大约是每秒2英尺的燃烧，或者持续约15秒。据我所知，现在已经降到了1.5英尺，所以完全在安全范围内。好的。执行完-7后，我们将立即开始调整服务舱的抛弃姿态，由于我们比通常更早抛弃它，所以它会保持在平面内。我们不需要也不希望出现平面外的分量。因此，它会保持在平面内，服务舱会沿着半径矢量指向外侧。然后，我们将开始准备指令舱，为服务舱单引擎推进程序（SEP）做准备，包括指令舱检查和热试车，并在大约提前4小时30分钟抛弃服务舱。我们会一直调整姿态，直到我们把服务舱对准……然后尝试拍些照片，但我们不会为了拍照而进行平移机动，因为我们不想在这个时候搞砸你的飞行路径角度。好的。这样我们就有大约两个小时的空闲时间来完成这些工作，如果我们晚了，就可以去检查清单，准备启动指令舱。我们将在倒计时2小时30分钟左右启动指令舱的全功率运行。我们会连接计算机，启动指令舱，开始上传状态矢量等等，并校准指令舱平台。最迟在大约1小时30分钟时，也就是我们有一个小时的时间来完成指令舱的相关工作时，我们将开始机动到抛弃姿态。然后你将开始关闭……当然，我们不可能在此之前就完成所有存放配置。我们会关闭舱门，进行压力完整性检查，然后在倒计时1小时，也就是141小时40分钟时，我们会抛弃推进器。抛弃推进器后，你就可以开始机动到进入大气层的姿态。到达目标姿态后，进行六分仪星点检查，取下光学设备，届时我们会告诉你最终的进入平台位置。你可以初始化推进器，然后基本上就回到检查清单上了。这次的进入方式和通常的进入方式有一个小小的不同。这次的飞行时间比平时早一些，所以当你到达目标位置时，天已经黑了。不过，幸运的是，月亮的位置非常适合进行地平线检查。我们会用月亮位置代替地平线位置，你可以追踪到月落，大约在倒计时3分钟左右。以上就是简
Ripeti, VI. Hai c
Wir haben uns das auch schon angesehen. Aus irgendeinem Grund driftet die Nickachse stärker ab als die Gierachse. Ich wollte schon fast nochmal hin. Ich musste schon einmal zurück, um zu sehen, wie weit sie abdr
Roger, Frank. E il motivo è che la calibrazione dell'orizzonte richiede un certo numero di punti per fo
Apollo 8, Ho
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 5분 남았습니다. 연소 전 질소통 압력에 대한 요청과 관련하여, 연
それは肯定だ、アポロ8号。それは
Bien. Dans la zone d'amerrissage du Pacifique central, la météo est bonne. La couverture nuageuse est de 2000 pieds, avec des nuages ​​épars; la visibilité est de 10 pieds; le vent souffle à 60 nœuds à 10 nœuds; la hauteur des vagues est de 4 pieds et l'altitude est de 2986 pieds. Des averses éparses sont prévues sur moins de 10 % de la zone. Les forces de récupération de l'Iwo Jima seront au point d'amerrissage; l'indicatif d'appel de l'appareil sera « Recovery 1 », en position avec des nageurs d
मुझे नहीं पता। मैंने उसकी तस्वीर खींची, लेकिन जैसे ही मैंने उसे देखा, सूरज खिड़की के पार आ गया। मेरे पास सिर्फ... 
ठीक है। हम आपको सलाह देना चाहते हैं कि आप पूरी फिल्म का इस्तेमाल करें। यह आपका आखिरी प्रयोग है। आपके पास जितनी भी फिल्म है, उसका इस्तेमाल करें।
11，休斯顿。为了方便规划，您可以带上单筒望远镜
ठीक है। हम आपको सल
请描述一下现
D'accord. La proposition qui me semble la plus plausible est la suivante: si on laisse Jim effectuer son évaluation au télescope, vous procédez exactement de la même manière, sauf que vous pivotez de 180 degrés pour avoir la tête en l'air, et vous laissez Jim effectuer son suivi au télescope. Vous serez toujours légèrement en lacet lorsque vous irez chercher votre téléviseur, etc. Cela devrait suffire. On peut procéder ainsi, ou bien continuer comme prévu et laisser passer une partie de l'évaluation du suivi. Une autre solution serait 
Aqu
Très bien. À ce stade, cette section est déjà annotée; ce que je vous donne maintenant représente donc des DELTA sup
ジャック、いい感
세븐, 여기는 캘리포니아입니다. 지금
... चार्ल
ठीक है। जब आप अवशिष्टों पर 'गो' कहते हैं, तो आपका मतलब है कि उन्हें कम न करें। क्या यह स
Oh, è vero? Sono stato
아직 추가 소식이 있지만, 앞으로 5시간 정도는 잭
내가 해냈
ヒ
之所以花了7个小时解决这个问题，是因为我们
ठीक है, अब जल्द ही अफ्रीका पहुँचने वाला है। इसे पलटकर देखो कि बिना रोशनी के
好的。这是近辛提安加 2。/ 62871 十一月阿尔法，稍等片刻。好的。我们将从不适用的俯仰配平和偏航配平开始；时间，-00468，+00254，+00181 173 101 027 十一月阿尔法加 00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044，向下 044，向左 45，+1100
是的
ठी
P
Houston, Apollo 11. It was slightly colder in here last night than it has been on an
Oui. C'est un spectacle magnifique et sauvage que nous avons
Вот и всё, Фрэ
Qu'en pensez-vous? Est-ce suffisa
Roger. Da qui le temperature dei tuoi quadric
Ok. Questo è quello che vogliamo masterizzare. Devo cambiare questa cartuccia.
बहुत बढ़ि
Okay. We're still going through the tracking, and as you know, we're going to hold down on the water dumps and so forth during the last couple of hours in and out, sort of aid the trackin
E una delle cose belle, Jack, soprattutto per un novizio come me, è la facilità di muoversi qui dentro. È, ovviamente, come sai dal lavoro nel simulatore del modulo di comando, avere la gravità zero come aiuto è davvero una manna. Perché ti senti piuttosto limitato, a un solo g, e ti muovi molto lì dentro, ed è piuttosto facile in questo ambiente. Come puoi vedere, sembrava piuttosto pulito, ho trovato un paio di rondelle allentate e un piccolo tappo di plastica della telecamera di sequenza si era staccato e l'ho trovato incastrato vicino al pannello ED. Okay. Proprio sotto Jim, ora, è in piedi su quello che sembra un barattolo. E, per il bene di tutti quelli laggiù, all'interno di questo barattolo c'è il motore di risalita dove, spero, puoi vedere la mia mano appoggiata sopra in questo momento, il motore che usiamo per scendere dalla Luna. Immediatamente accanto al cofano motore, ho la mano su una scatola bianca, che è stata mostrata prima. Questa è quella di Jim, ovvero lo zaino che fornirà ossigeno e acqua per il raffreddamento du
Нет. Мы только что говорили об этом несколько минут назад. Влажность остается низкой, около 60-63 процентов, и заметной влажности
That's right. It looks like i
Das habe ich ja auch g
Gemini VIII. Hie
We're minimum deadband, at
Je t'ai donné
لي
OK. OK, voici une manœuvre préliminaire PC + 2. Démarrage: +0819,2, -0020,0, -0218,9; NA; +0020,9, 0848,2; 420, 274, 082; +0820,3, -0020,0, -0215,0. Com
Roger. Verstanden. 331 Achtern, Rechts 105, Unten
Хорошо. У меня для вас специальный репортаж от Хейн
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 자세 설정 스위치가 GDC(지상 통
Роджер. В 13:14 по Гри
分
جيميني 4، مرة أخرى. أرى نفس شكل منحنى الأضواء، كالشفق القطبي، إلا أنه أسفلنا. رأيته مرة أخرى، كان عبارة عن خطوط طويلة وكبيرة. يبدو أنها تمتد بالتوازي تقريبًا مع مسار رحلتنا، من أسفل التوهج الجوي في أفق 
हैलो, कैनरी, फ्रेंड सेवन। कृपया दोहराएँ। 
자, 물병자리 여러분, 
Mike, puoi dirci in che direzione si inclinano e quanto lontano si inclinano rispetto all'atteggiamento della ma
Sembra che durante la nostra fase di spegnimento (illeggibile) consumiamo ancora poco meno di 11 ampere. Ne abbiamo 10 sul n. 1 e poco meno di 11 sul n. 2. Il cavo di sicurezza, la posizione del cavo o del cordone ombelicale sul portello esterno, rendeva piuttosto difficile qualsiasi attività extraveicolare per quanto riguarda l'aerodinamica del cavo libero davanti alla navicella. Ogni volta che operavo in quell'area, il cavo, quando arrivava al termine, mi faceva tornare indietro e la reazione mi riportava verso l'alto, sopra la navicella e di nuovo verso la sezione dell'adattatore. Ecco perché continuavo a sparire dalla vista durante le mie manovre lassù sopra i finestrini, per poi tornare alla deriva verso la parte posteriore della navicella. Dovevo continuamente tirarmi per uscire nella parte anteriore della navicella. Non ero soddisfatto delle immagini che ottenevo. È stato piuttosto difficile tenere i cordini che avevo addosso... Avevo il cordino della pistola, il cordino e il cordino ombelicale che indossavo, e diversi altri cordini di vario tipo che si agitavano in giro ed era difficile tenerli lontani dalla macchina fotografica. Noterete che forse nelle foto muoverò le braccia rapidamente. Ho continuato a cercare di spostarli per poter scattare una foto. Direi che erano davanti a me circa il 50 o 60 percento del tempo; e per l'altra percentuale del tempo non ero nella posizione migliore che avrei voluto. Credo di aver scattato circa una dozzina di foto. Sembra abbastanza facile da usare, anche solo con il cordino fuori. Non ho avuto al
Ora è in fase di RANGE
Questo è certo, e stiamo tenendo conto
フレッドが開けているのは、ネックリングの中に入れるドリンクバッグです。月面で水を飲むために使います。ピートとアルはアポロ12号の時にはこのバッグを持っていなかったため、ひどく喉が渇いてしまいました。でも、自分たち専用の小さな水バッグがあれば、月面を見回したり地質学の仕事をしたりしながら、ほんの少しの手間で一口か二口飲むことができるので、そんな状況も少しは和らげられると
好的，杰克，我们有一个机动平台，一个可以自由返回的中段航线：；-0021.3，+004.1，-0031.2；高空速和高功率不适用；DELTA-VR 0038.
अब, हम यह जानना चाहते हैं कि वहां कितना स
コマンドモジ
केबिन की सापेक्ष आर्द्रता 20 प्रतिशत है। शीतलक की मात्रा 66 प्रतिशत है। सूट का तापमान 68 डिग्री है, दबाव 5.8 डिग्री है, सूट सर्किट में भाप का तापमान 50 डिग्री है और आरामदायक है। ऑक्सीजन 65-100 प्रतिशत है, मुख्य एम्पियर 24, 25, 25, 25; स्टै
はい。この時点では自動のレトロコントロール
- - minimum time return
Apol
-- 그리고 지금
Хорошо, отличная обратная связь, Фред-о. На отметке +15 секунд вычеркните «ГЛАВНЫЙ РЫЧАГ - ВЫКЛ.» и далее до «При выключении двигателя» — после «РЕЖИМ УПРАВЛЕНИЯ: УДЕРЖАНИЕ АТАКИ» нам нужна запятая, а также «Снижение чрезмерных скоростей за с
Roger, Eagle. Coming at you with a PAD: 101 36 14.07, minus 00758, plus all balls, plus 00098 plus - correction, 00572, perigee plus 00085 00764 030 000 293. NOUN 86, minus 00759, plus all balls, plus 00090. Rest of the PAD is NA. Stand by on your readback. If you are ready to
是的
حسناً
Hope you know how to r
Apollo 13, Hous
好的。我们的雷达上开始出现
收到，阿波
Вы уверены
Нет. На данный момент у нас нет обновлений для книги о лунной поверхности. Мы хотели, чтобы о
これはとても便利です。なぜなら、バンドの幅、つまり太陽があります。地平線のバンドの幅はXとまったく同じです。説
ジェミニ 4 号では、パ
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 궁
Роджер, Базз. Кажет
Non. Je ne l'ai pas activé. Voulez-vou
ठीक है। जब तक हम स्क्रॉल की स्थिति की पुष्टि कर रहे हैं - वे अभी पीछे वाले कमरे में इस बारे में बात कर रहे हैं - मैं प्रवेश के लिए आवश्यक चेकलिस्ट पर आपके साथ चर्चा क
Ro
COMMANDE MANU
ठीक है। ठीक है, यह एक प्रारंभिक पैंतरेबाज़ी पीसी प्लस 2 है। आरंभ:; प्लस 0819.2, माइनस 0020.0, माइनस 0218.9; NA; प्लस 0020.9, 0848
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Muc
12番 6.2, 121
ठीक है। समझ गया। अगर हो सके तो थर्मोस्टेट का इस्तेमाल करके केबिन की बाईं और दाईं दीवारों का तापमान पता कर लें। साथ ही, अगर कोई नमी दिखाई दे रही हो तो उसकी जानकारी दें, और क्या आपका सोख्ता कागज छूने पर गीला है? ठीक है
Okay. Soll ich das überstehende Materia
The... retrosequence now shows which means you can advance it exactly 1 
Okay. Auf welcher Seite trag
روجر. قبل أن يخلد بيل إلى النوم، نود منه أن يعطينا تقريراً عن ج
Хорошо. Рассмотрим пункт 1: второй пункт — это 12-часовая холодная выдержка по Кельвину, и в ходе обсуждений, которые я здесь проводил, и перед полетом, я думаю, было решено, что мы не хотим проводить холодную выдержку. Поэтому мы удалим этот шаг 2. Суть в том, что, я думаю, мы хотим провести холодную выдержку, и мы, безусловно, хотим проверить водонагреватели перед входом в атмосферу, чтобы убедиться, что ни один из них не высох, как это было до этого. Мы работаем над некоторыми процедурами для этого, и мы вернемся к ним чуть позже, и мы постараемся сделать это когда Билл будет на связи, чтобы все могли быть в курсе событий одновременно. Мы хотели бы добавить шаг между 8 и 9, или как часть шага 8. Все это находится на странице E-1, где мы переключаем УКВ на симплекс A на минус 4 часа 35 минут. Теперь это 
Hello, Roger, this is Friends
इसे बताने का यह एक अच्छा और तर्कसंग
Ok, Jack. Ti forniremo un pad tra qualche minuto. Stiamo ricevendo
روجر. أقوم بالنسخ بالإضافة إلى X 7.7. Y 0.1؛ والدوران، والميل، والانعراج 180، 31
了解。GERUが07990未満
बिना गियर बढ़ाए जितना मैं देख सकता हूँ,
Die Ausrüstung hat ei
حسنًا يا فريد. بما أنك استخدمتَ وعاء التكثيف، فقد أدرجنا طريقة استخدامه. لن أقرأها لك،
Это «Аполлон-8», пряма
Фрэнк, еще одна небольшая ново
Roger. Vos systèmes sont en bon état. Nous sommes prêts pour v
On aperçoit un cratère très sombre dans le matériau de remplissage de cette vallée qui s'étend devant nous. Il est assez inhabituel car, malgré ses contours nets, ses parois intérieures sont entièrem
아직 끝나지 않았네요. 음, 오늘은 실패를 겪
You're coming - you're coming up on 
Roger. Es war mein Feh
Austral
Schöne Sterne im Hintergrund im Norden
حسنًا، أبولو 8
11, qui Houston. In riferimento alla tua valutazione soggettiva secondo cui ieri ser
Bejahe
يظهر كوكب المشتري، ويظهر كوكب الحوت ف
어디 보자. 달은 어디에서도 안 보이네, 
わかりました。そうすると思
Okay. Alles klar. Noch eine Kleinigkeit, Jack: 
好的。燃烧时间可能不到一分钟。我们希望你们根据时间设置截止时间。所以我们会给你们一个燃烧时间。如果通讯中断，我这里有一份中途7号机动
Ich habe nicht aufgehört – ich habe 
確かにそうではな
Okay, 11. Es hat sich herausgestellt, dass die Triebwerksleistung bei beiden Brennvorgängen dieser Mission bisher der Leistung bei den Triebwerksabnahmetests entsprochen hat. Der Messwert des Bordcomputers ist auf einen bekannten Kalibrierungsfaktor des Manometers zurückzuführen, der zwischen dem tatsächlichen Brennraumdruck und dem angezeigten Wert liegt. Wir erwarten im Einbankenbetrieb einen Brennraumdruck von 90 psi – das heißt, 90 ps
वहाँ का नज़ारा अद्भुत है - ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे आप सीधे पहाड़ 
Gemini 4, Hawaii Surgeon. B
ジム、3つほどお願いがあるんだ。まず、コンピューターは君のものだ。2つ目、これからバーンインするまで操作は不要だから、バーンイン姿勢で待機していればいい。3つ目、今からデータリンクを更新するために行った手順を中止したい。つまり、TMビットレートをHIからLOに戻し、レンジングをOFFに、ボイスをDOW
Что я делаю? В любом случае, я не могу этого сделать. Давайте посмотрим, перекрестная т
Хорошо
Хорошо. Отличная идея. Мы много размышляли над тем, какие маневры вам разрешить выполнить для фотографирования, я имею в виду, сервисного модуля. Мы считаем это дово
D'accord. Compris; c'est le numéro 8, n'
Роджер, Хьюстон. У нас включены оба автоматических вык
你好。黑卫队正在
このデータの残り
Ok, Fred. Prima di tutto, i preparativi per questo, a partire dalla checklist di emergenza, pagina 24, che consigliamo di seguire, e saremo lieti di ricevere qualsiasi commento tu abbia in merito. Secondo punto: quando sei in assetto di accensione, dovresti vedere il Sole in cima al Sole. Dividerà il cursore, quando il cursore è impostato su zero. Una cosa da tenere presente, però, è che scivolerà fuori dall'assetto molto facilmente, poiché sarà molto sensibile a rollio e imbardata. Capisci che questo è nel punto di arresto 2, perché l
Dites à Jerry H
Близнецы VIII. Вы гот
لقد فقدت تركيزي عندما قلت جرب وضع
यह नशे की हाल
Et enfin, dernière nouvelle: les Cardinals ont finalement battu les Astros hier, 4-3. Il leur a fallu 12 manc
ठीक है। यह
Roger. 11, 
रॉजर, बिल। अगली बार जब इसे धूप में रखा जाएगा, तो हमें प्राथमिक इवे
Okay, I'd like to show this to you while I'm talking. It works like a camera. It has the - The f-
はい。それでは、メイン後のチェックリストを確認しましょ
सर्जन यह जा
روجر. مجرد فحص
يبدو أننا نختار بالتأكيد أكثر الأماكن إثارة للاهتمام على سطح القمر للهبوط فيها. أما الجانب الخلفي فيبدو ككومة رمل لعب فيها أطفالي لفترة طويلة. إنه متضرر تمامًا، بلا معالم واضحة. مجرد الكثير 
Et Mike, si tu es à l'
Roger, Apollo 8. Wir h
了解
D'accord. Retour à la température de l'eau dans la cabine. Je 
Близн
На самом деле нет. Думаю, мы рассматриваем период до корректировки курса как время, когда нам нужно проверить водонагреватели. Холодная стоянка тоже включает в себя работу водонагревателей, но это будет сделано непосредственно перед входом в гавань, когда эти вещи не очень чувствительны, и если мы не сд
Articolo successivo: richiesta
네, 맞습니다. 저분이 짐 러벨입니다. 오늘 저희는 아폴로 8호 내부의 생활에 대해 간략하게 보여드리려고 합니다. 달과 지구의 모습은 이미 보여드렸으니, 이제 저희의 보금자리로 여러분을 초대하려고 합니다. 보시다시피 계기판에서 알 수 있듯이, 저희는 최소 4일 동안 이곳에 머물렀습니다. 계기판에 매일 날짜를 표시하는데, 오늘로 4일째이고 5일째를 보내고 있습니다. 물론 저희 모두 금요일 착륙을 손꼽아 기다리고 있습니다. 여기, 우주선 하부 장비실이라고 부르는 곳에서 대통령 체력 담당 고문이신 짐 러벨 대위님께서 매일 하는 운동 프로그램을 시작하시려고 합니다. 러벨 대위님이 아주 자유롭게 떠다니는 게 보이시죠? 방금 항법에 사용되
フレンドシップ7の録画です。窓には逆噴射による汚れがかなり付着していて、他にもいろいろあります。発射台から離陸する際に、もしかしたら虫を潰してしまったのかもしれません。窓の外側には血痕のようなものが付着しているかもしれません。太陽側を周回していると、本当に観測が非
ठीक है। आपको इसे स्वीकार करने की आवश्यकता नहीं है - आप 89.2 गुणा 155 की कक्षा में हैं औ
Roger, Jim. Guten Morge
Okay. Wir beginnen mit Stern 26 und führen zwei Messreihen durch: eine mit Stern 26 in Erdnähe und eine mit Stern 16 in Erdfernsicht. Falls die Messung von Stern 26 in Erdnähe nicht möglich ist, verwenden wir für eine Mes
了解。現在の高度はど
रॉजर। लगता है कल
很好。请您方便的时候提供一下三个逆变器的温
We've got one thing left
ठीक है, कुंभ राशि; ह्यूस्टन
Say it again. The only thing I go
我
Sembra una buona idea. Scatta una foto. Da quale finestra guar
Je vais vous donner une estimation du temps à 75 heures et 37 minutes et j'essaierai un biais d'environ une seconde et demie pour 
На этом, пожалуй, все мировые и национальные новости и статьи. На спортивной странице Хэнк Стрэм из «Канзас-Сити Чифс» был назван лучшим тренером года в AFL. Это уже второй раз за три сезона. Голосование проводилось группой из 30 спортивных журналистов и комментаторов Associated Press, по три человека из каждого города. Ближайшим к нему по результатам голосования был Уиб Юбэнк. Другие тренеры, получившие голоса, — Сид Гилман из Сан-Диего и Лу Сабин из Денвера. Что касается вчерашнего матча всех звезд колледжей Shriners, то Север одержал победу над Югом со счетом 3:0. Дик Берлински из Мичиганского государственного университета забил филд-гол с 23 ярдов в первой четверти, и это
了解。大丈夫だよ。前回は…誰かが10
Roger. Understand we have a slight... blast here. Wil
Ricevuto. A circa 148 ore, se non l'avete già fatto, sostituite il filtro CO2 e accendete il riscaldatore della linea di spurgo H2 20 minuti prima dello spurgo di O2 e H2. A 148 ore, vi preghiamo di avviare una carica sulla batteria Alfa invece che a 151 ore, e di lasciare la carica attiva fino a ulteriori comunicaz
とても良い.
Stand by. It's coming
ठीक है, अगला पृष्ठ, 16. यह उसी सौर-कोरोना वाली बात का सिलसिला जारी है। पृष्ठ के दाहिनी ओर, 107:40 के ठीक ऊपर ", सौर-कोरोना स्थिति में प
패널 3: 파워
Roger. Vers
This is Apollo 8
Bonjour, 13; Houston. Nous 
Yes
ठीक है। आगे बढ़ने के लिए - उसी पैनल, पैनल 5 पर: सर्किट ब्रेकर, बैटरी चार्जर, एसी पावर, बंद; सर्किट ब्रेकर बैटरी चार्जर, 
यह सही है। आप उड़ान योजना में 57वें स्थान से शुरू कर सकते हैं; इसे 54 घंटे मान लें और सीधे आगे बढ
你好，休斯顿；这里是阿波罗8号。我们现在已经将电视
Some of these small depressions *** tend to sink - oh, maybe 2 or 3 inches. *** suggest exactly what the Surveyor pictures showed when they pushed away a little bit. You get a force transmitted through the upper surface of the soil and about 5 or 6 inches of bay breaks loose and moves as if it were caked on the surface, when in fa
Roger. You're seeing Earth, as we see it, out our left-hand window, just a little more than a half Earth. We're looking at the eastern Pacific Ocean, and the north half of the top half of the screen, we can see North America, Alaska, United States, Canada, Mexico, and Central America. South America becomes invisible just off beyond the terminator or inside the shadow. We can see the oceans with a definite blue cast, see white bands of major cloud formations across the Earth, and can see coastlines, pick out the western U.S, San Joaquin Valley, the Sierra mountain range, the peninsula of Baja California, and we can see some cloud formations over southeastern U.S. There's one definite mild storm southwest of Alaska, looks like about 500 to 1000 miles, and another very minor
추력 방향으로 발사되는 것
Эй, Джим, включи свой 
휴스턴, 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 높은 비트 전송률로 잘 나오
Roger. From the hot wires of the Public Affairs Office: Apollo 11 still dominates the news around the world. Only four nations, Communist China, North Korea, North Viet Nam, and Albania, have not yet informed their citizens of your flight and landing on the Moon. One newsman said that he has run out of ways to describe your success. Tonight, President Nixon is scheduled to watch the All Star baseball game in Washington. After the game, he will depart for the Pacific recovery area. Wednesday evening, he will fly from Johnston Island by helicopter to the Navy communications ship Arlington. Then on Thursday morning, he will reboard the helicopter and fly to the Hornet in time to witness your splashdown. Accompanying the President will be Secretary of State William Rogers and Frank Borman. They will watch the splashdown from the bridge of the recovery ship with Admiral John Sidney McCain, Jr, Commander of the Pacific Forces. Following the President's stay aboard the Hornet, he will depart for his tour of Asia and scheduled visit to Romania. Luna 15 is believed to have crashed into the Sea of Crises yesterday after orbiting the Moon 52 times. The Soviet News Agency TASS reported that "scientific" "research in near Moon space was carried out." Sir Bernard Lovell at Jodrell Bank Observatory said that Luna 15 hit the surface of the Moon at a speed of about 300 miles per hour. Things have been relatively quiet recently in Viet Nam. GI's on patrol were observed carrying transistor radios tuned into your flight. The Armed Forces radio and TV network in Viet Nam gave the mission full coverage. Skirmishes still continue between the Egyptians and Israelis along the Suez Canal. U.N. observers there are trying to halt the action. In Washington, the House Ways and Means Committee has voted to reduce the 27.5 percent oil depletion allowance to 20 percent. We've had rain several times here in the Houston area. Today it is cloudy, and more showers are expected. On the sports front, as we mentioned earlier, the All Star game is tonight. There were no games played yesterday. Last night in New York, the Baseball Writers Association of America named Babe Ruth the greatest ball player of all time. Joe DiMaggio was named the greatest living ball player. Frank Borman made the announcements at a dinner honoring the players. Joe Namath put in a full day at the New York Jets' training camp. Five policemen had a hard time restraining about 500 kids who wanted to touch Broadway Joe. He said he feels fine and will play in the All Star game August 1, if Coach Weeb Eubank lets him. The Oilers' camp at Kerrville got wet yesterday, but the workouts continued. There have been some minor injuries, but nothing too serious. Coach Wally Lemm is satisfied so far with the workouts. The Oilers are expecting attendance by over 30.000 for the preseason game with Buffalo. Apparently, Don Meredi
吉姆，关于电池问题，我们已经确定不是过电流或反向电流。我们怀疑是过热，但不能确定，所以我们会观
यह सही है। अंधेरे पक्ष के दौरान मैंने यथासंभव 0 0 0 तक जाकर गायरोस को पिंजरे में बंद और फिर पिंजरे से बाहर निकाला। मैं इस समय इसकी दोबारा जाँच कर रहा ह
... ball on th
All right
Yes, I'm sorry, put those OFF. OAMS Power Attitude Thrusters are both good. A is reading 3000. B is reading about 2700. 
Deke te conseille de bien dormir. Il dit que tu as beaucoup travaillé et que tu devrais te détendre un peu p
Okay. Couple minutes to, Jim. Everything is looking real good. Your time at Carnarvon will be, an
こちらでパスを終えるまで、これをオンのままにしておいてください。コンピ
오로라 세븐,
すぐには
Ok, Apollo 8. Se necessario, te ne daremo uno nuovo. Al momento,
Роджер, «Спокойствие». По поводу таймера миссии два предложения. Установите автоматический выключатель на панели 11; также перезагрузите его и попробуйте запустить. Девятка в первой цифре может иметь к этому какое-то от
ちょうど今頃、オリオン座がよ
Сейчас перед нами в долине, заполненной кратером, виднеется очень темный кратер. Он доволь
लॉन्च वाहन संकेतक: जीपीआई से एस-II/एस-IVB 
D'accord. Sur le panneau 5, ouvrez les disjoncteurs POWER 1 et 2. Ensuite, actionnez l'interrupteur POWER, réinitialisez-le et relâchez-le. Sur les panneaux 11 et 16, fermez les deux disjoncteurs TRANSLUNAR BUS TIE. Sur le panneau 16, fermez le disjoncteur ASCENT ECA CONTROL. Sur le panneau 16, fermez le disjoncteur DESCENT ECA CONTROL. Sur le panneau 14, mettez l'alimentation NORMAL
확인했습니다. 27페이지 활성화, 16번 패널로 이동합니다. SYSTEM Bravo 항목에서 ASCENT FEED 1, PQGS가 열려 
마이너스 00014, 모든 0을 더하고, 00001 000 304 000을 더하고, 해당 없음, 00191 00014 004 00014 45
È un po' come mangiare di nascosto, rincorrend
好的，翻到“电源 8”那一页，你会看到剩下的飞船功能。我们有低比特率™。但是，我们
いや、まだ汗をかいて
Giusto. Abbiamo appena visto il tuo test del sistema di avvertenza e di avvertimento sul lato sinistro del pannello della nostra TV. Vedi tu
Я поспал минут 15, но последние пару часов ч
我已
D'accord. On commence à osciller. La dérive l
Sonnenausric
Playing about love? That's wise, Yuri Alekseyevich, I think so
Apollo 8, kinda stand by for a burst of noise as we change configurations on the ground. We're going into test 1; You'll still have up and downl
是的，
이 기체는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 처음 운항을 시작했을 때, 요(yaw) 방향으로 자세 제어 모드에 들어가면 다른 축들이 틀어지는 문제가 있었습니다. 한동안 이런 현상이 계속되었는데, 기체가 천천히 오른쪽으로 기울어지면서 20도 정도까지 틀어질 때까지 아무런 수정도 이루어지지 않았습니다. 그러다가 갑자기 빠르게 자세를 바로잡고 20도 오른쪽 자세에서 왼쪽 자세로 돌아오는 현상이 반복되었습니다
Raus aus der So
Roger. Il reste un peu moins d'une heure avant la deuxième correction de traje
Apollo 8, Houston. Il semble qu'il faille encore 6 heures pour recharger cette batterie B. Le taux de charge est inférieur à celui mesuré au sol, mais supérieur à celui d'Apollo 7, et la recharge semble désormais se dérouler correctement. Je souhaiterais avoir la confirmation qu
OMNI Delta et vous avez été déconnectés. Je n'ai jamais reçu vos coord
Roger. Bene. Ci siamo sbagliati nel nostro... nel nostro set di backup. Li avevamo fuori posto. Sembra che i dati di bordo siano corretti. Volevamo solo che tu controllassi. Abbiamo un aggiornamento sulla carta carburante/APS che hai posizionato sul pannello. È un errore di battitura. Se tiri fuori quella piccola carta, abb
Трос всё ещё не натянут. У меня есть несколько фотографий, где трос просто колышется сза
That's Roger. At, a
Our monitor shows pretty good, clea
Хорошо, звучит неплохо, за это Майку Уошу поставим золоту
Это отрицательный резуль
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Êtes-vous en train d'acquérir des données sur la manœuvre d'incinér
了解しました。はっきりと聞こえています。3、
알겠습니다. 's를 받았습니다. 이제 읽어볼 준비가 되었고, 귀하께서 수락 버튼을 누르시면 언제든지 상태 벡
Andare av
J'observe maintenant la large bande bleue à l'hor
ठीक है। टॉमी जैकब्स के बाद, हमारे पास ह्यूस्टन की एक स्थानीय ज्योतिषी रूबी ग्राहम की ओर से एक बेहद महत्वपूर्ण खबर है। उनका कहना है कि चंद्रमा की यात्रा के लिए सभी राशियाँ अनुकूल हैं। नील चतुर है, माइक का निर्णय लेने की क्षमता अच्छी है, और बज़ जटिल समस्याओं को सुलझाने में माहिर है। उनका यह भी कहना है कि नील दुनिया को गुलाबी चश्मे से देखने की प्रवृत्ति रखता है, लेकिन वह हमेशा पीड़ित या परेशान लोगों की मदद करने के लिए तैयार रहता है। नील, आपके पास "अंतर्ज्ञान है जो आपको जीवन को भावनाओं के साथ स
ठीक है। बर्न के नियम। हमें तब इंजन बंद कर देना चाहिए जब थ्रस्ट मॉनिटर 77 प्रतिशत या उससे कम हो; नंबर 2, यदि प्रोपेलेंट उलेज प्रेशर 160 psi से कम हो; 3, यदि फ्यूल ऑक्सीडाइज़र डेल्टा-पी 25 से अधिक हो, और यह ग्राउंड कॉलआउट होगा; 4, यदि एटीट्यूड एरर प्लस या माइनस 10 डिग्री हो, सिवाय शुरुआती ट्रांजिएंट्स के। ठीक है। रेट लिमिट प्लस या माइनस 10 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड है। और एक इंजन गिम्बल लाइट, एक प्रोग्राम अलार्म के साथ एक ISS, एक CES DC, और एक इन्वर्टर लाइट, यदि इन्वर्टर बदलने के बाद भी यह चालू है। यदि बर्न के दौरान, NOUN 97 फ्लैश होने पर इंजन बंद हो जाता है, तो हमें PRO करना चाहिए, मैनुअल उलेज करना चाहिए, और स्टार्ट पुशबटन दबाना चाहिए, और डिसेंट इंजन कमांड ओवरराइड खोलना चाहिए। अगर हम PC-2 नहीं करते हैं, तो हमारा अगला बर्न PC-4 पर होगा, जिससे 24 फुट प्रति सेकंड की अतिरिक्त गति मिलेगी। हम मध्य-PAC पर उतरेंगे। ठीक है। हमारे पास बैकअप रेट कमांड या रेट डैम्पिंग के लिए अप
अच्छा, ठीक है। मुझे यहाँ बिल्कुल भी बोरियत नहीं हो रही है। मैं अभी थोड़ी देर पहले मिडवे के ऊपर से उड़ा था। उसे अच्छे से देख लिया। मैं अब आप सबकी तरफ आ रहा हूँ, ज़ाहिर है, आपके उत्तर की ओर। मैंने जीन ड्यूरेट को अपनी बीच की रिपोर्ट दे दी है - अगर 
I've noticed several times in going from the sunlight into the shadow, that just as I go in, I 
休斯顿，我们正在查看海图，现在正飞越史密斯海以东的区域。几分
أراهن على ذل
Okay, Jim. Wir überlegen noch, wie wir die Korrektur durchführen können, aber einige unserer Überlegungen lassen uns vermuten, dass wir sie bis zu 118 Stunden nach Landung ohne nennenswerte Delta-V-Einbußen vornehmen können. Wir werden den Kurs anschließend noch ausreichend überwachen, um sicherzustellen, dass wir alles richtig gemacht haben und Sie für eine spätere Landung vorbereiten können, falls nötig – was aber unwahrscheinlich ist. Wir sind mit dem aktuellen Modus zufrieden und arbeiten zwar an einem anderen Modus für die Zeit nach der Kurskorrektur, würden Sie aber gerne noch
В
Dank
Nous sommes presque prêts pour un gain élevé; nous nous demandions si vous s
حسنًا يا جاك. اللوحة 3، محول التيار المتردد
さ
ठीक है। चेकलिस्ट पढ़ने के बाद कुछ सवाल उठ रहे हैं। मेरी समझ से, प्राथमिक और द्वितीयक दोनों वॉटर बॉयलर चालू होने चाहिए, लेकिन चेकलिस्ट में कहीं भी यह नहीं लिखा है कि इन्हें चालू किया गया है। इसलिए हम इसकी पुष्टि चाहते हैं, और यह सुनिश्चित करेंगे कि चेकलिस्ट में डालने 
Roger. Du störst uns nicht, aber unsere Antworten machen viel 
いいえ、大丈夫です。ただ確認したかっただけです。79年10月
Роджер, Кантон. Хорошо, я дам вам краткий отчёт. Я нахожусь в автоматическом ре
Houston, Acqua
Ora inizio a vedere l'alba nel periscopio. La prima luce nel periscopio durante questa particolare orbita è dovuta al lato notturno. È ovvio che il periscopio non ha alcuna funzione in retroattività sul lato notturno. La prima luce che vedo è proprio ora a un'altezza di cir
Roger. Cape ist startbereit und ich bin startbereit. Die Kapsel ist in gutem Zustand. Treibstoff 103–102 Pr
Хорошо. А внизу страницы — шаг номер 1. Он будет выполнен за 19 минут до конца, и мы начнем 
阿波罗
واقي 
罗杰。请你告诉鹰，他的
أبول
好的，杰克。我们有中段5：NOUN 33,;, N/A; HA N/A; 加上 0019.8, 0007.8，燃烧时间 0.15，其余部分，N/A。在 14 秒时手动
Bill, st
네,
オーケー、マイク、スタ
मुझे ज़रा भी दिशाभ्रम नहीं हुआ। मुझे ऐसा लगा कि मैं ज़मीन की ओर देख सकता हूँ - मुझे ज़मीन की ओर देखने में पूरी तरह सहज महसूस हो रहा था - और मैं अपनी पीठ
로저. 당
Да. 
Okay, Jack, mache ich. Jim und ich konnten durch die Fenster Sternbilder beobachten, wenn gerade keine Lüftungsanlage lief. Könntest du mir bitte etwas zu den Verbrauchsmaterialien sagen? 
Roger. Und er schlägt später vor, dass man dasselbe tut, wenn sie wie
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Roger. Könnten Sie bitte DELTA-VC Prime noch einmal vor
And, Apollo 8, you can do the first part of that now at your convenience to verify that register 1 is reading 10 000, but would you hold up on the dump its
这里是沃特敦资本公司
프랭크, 저게 움직이고 있어요. 우리 TV 화면에서 3시 방향을 가리키고 있네요. 어느 방향을 가리켜야 
जब आप
断路器 - SPS 节距 1、节距 2、偏航 1、偏航 2、断
Save
I'm using less Kleenex. I miss also not being able to... during the e
Columbia, Houston. Zunächst einmal möchten wir, dass die Abwasserentsorgung auf der Rückseite auf 10 Prozent eingestellt wird. Zweitens sieht es derzeit nicht so aus, als ob ein Flugzeugwechsel nötig wäre, daher werden wir kein neues Flugzeug hochladen. Drittens: Bitte stellen Sie alle Ihre Kryoheizungen auf AUTO. Wir sind bereit für den Ladevorgang der Batterie Bravo
Roger. Under warning, we'll have ASCENT PRESSURE and; and under caution, we'll have 
Gemini VIII, G
Ja
わかりました。サービスモジ
روجر، فهمت. للعلم فقط، ربما قرأتَها على الأرض. أجريتُ حساب ارتفاع نقطة الحضيض باستخدام متجه حالة النجم الذي استخدمناه في الملاحة، وحصلنا على ارتفاع 84.7 ميلًا بحريًا. ثم استخدمنا متجه حالتك الذي حدّثته لنا في المرة السابقة، فحصلنا على
मैं VHF-A को बंद कर दूंगा और हाई गेन को भी बंद
D'accord, Aquarius. L'étape suivante consiste à prendre le sac intérieur que vous avez ouvert et à le glisser sur le haut du récipient. Ce faisant, orientez-le de façon à ce que les extrémités du sac (les coins qui dépassent du côté fermé) soient alignées avec les extrémités ouvertes de l'arche, car nous allons couper un de ces coins pour y insér
هيوست
ठीक है। आपने एलएम की स्थिति के बारे
シグマ・セブン、こんにちは。シグマ・セブン、こちらはカル・キャップ・コム、カル・キャップ・コムです。ブラインド放送です。受信機に停電が発生しました。ブラインド放送です。逆シーケンスのために時計をリセットしてください。これは前回の読み出し時の時計の誤差を考慮した値です。前回の報告では27秒に設定されていましたが、前回の確認では33秒になっているはずです。ケープは33秒にリセットするよう求めています。こち
روجر. هذا من شأنه أن
罗杰。明白吗？14秒，按时燃烧，名义态度，十分
Das ist bestätigt, Jim. Das heißt, wir überlassen Ihnen den Antennenwechsel. Nach dem Wechsel dauert es drei bis fünf Minuten, bis wir wieder eine Verbindung hergestellt haben. Anschließend
わかりました、アポロ8号。あなたがそこに到着したら、まずはこれから2、3時間の間に私たちがやろうと考えて
Okay. On step 34 under final stowage, which is a sort of catch-all area, there's a step that says secondary glycol to radiator, and it says bypass, verify. While we are down in this area, we would like to go to panel 382, the water control panel, and set up the evaporator water control valve both primary and secondary to AUTO. Now this is something we would have done had we done the cold soak at minus 12 hours, but since we weren't doing it there, we would like to go ahead and make sure we have these in AUTO, and this
わかりました。私たちもそうしたいのですが。ちょっと
Bien reçu. Veuillez nous excuser pour cette interruption. Nous sommes en train de passer en revue le résum
Right. The - At these low Sun angles, there's no trace of brown, it's n
The visibility through the telescope has been very poor. It's, I would say, even worse than the simulator is right now. It requires
フライトからCSQ経由でテープダ
इससे लगभग अनियोजित दुर्घटना होने की स
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 중간 항로 수정 2번입니다. SPS/G&N 63059, +0.97, -0.20, 점화 02644 5792, +0.0118, -0.0003, +0.0177, 롤 277 355 0.15, BLOCK은 NA, DELTA-VT 00213 0.03 0.0168, 육분면 별 30 2082 3.70. 나머지 PAD는 NA입니다. 정렬: 베가와 데네브. 롤 정렬 007 144 0.68. 여유 연료 없음. 중량:
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. TV 방송은 고이득 안테나가 다시 연결되는 대로 볼륨을 높여서 시청하실 수 있도록 하겠습니다. 제 생각에는 이 정도면 될 것 같고, 방송 수신이 되는 대로 계속 시청하겠습니다. 플러스
Ecco un articolo di Harry Rosenthal dell'Associated di Houston. Due Babbi Natale illuminano la vigilia di Natale per Jeffrey Lovell, 2 anni. Il primo ha bussato alla sua porta di casa e gli ha portato i regali. Il secondo ha accompagnato il padre a casa dalla Luna. Il primo indossava un abito rosso e una barba bianca e ha emesso un grido così forte da essere sentito fino all'isolato. Il secondo era un enorme motore che sputava fiamme dietro la Luna, e migliaia di persone attendevano la notizia dell'accensione. "Si prega di essere informati che c'è un Babbo Natale" sono state le prime parole dell'Apollo 8 mentre emergeva dal silenzio radio per informare un mondo in ansia 15 minuti dopo che il motore aveva completato la sua fase critica. "Nessuno di noi si aspetta mai un regalo di Natale migliore di questo", ha detto Ken Mattingly del Controllo Missione. "Ringraziate tutti a terra da parte nostra. Sapete che non ce l'avremmo fatta senza di voi", è stata la risposta del Colonnello Frank Borman, il comandante della navicella spaziale. A questo punto, un albero di Natale si illuminò davanti alle console del Controllo Missione e l'astronauta Harrison Schmidt lesse all'equipaggio una versione spaziale di "Una visita
روجر. بالنسبة لقيمة الاسم 42، آخر ما ذكرته، قيمة HA هي 65.6، وقيمة HP هي 54.6. عدا ذلك، فهمتُ بشكل صحيح. أنا بانتظارك 
حسنًا. تم تسجيل دخول جهازك والتحقق منه. يمكنك الانتقال إلى "حظر"، وسنبدأ العمل هنا في غضون 45 ثانية تقريبًا. سأبدأ على أي حال. قاعدة الوقت 6P 24136، الدوران 179، الميل 045، الانحراف 001، وقت الاحتراق 5 زائد 15، دلتا-VC برايم 105 196 VI 35569، الدوران 357،
Roger. Gut, Fred-o. Damit kommen wir zu Schritt 8. Beim Aktivieren von PRO blinkt 5018. Okay. Bei 5018 führen wir ein AUTO-Manöver durch, um die Fluglage anzupassen. Aktivieren Sie dazu einfach PRO mit GUIDANCE CONTROL, PNGS; MODE CONTROL, PNGS, AUTO; und wir nehmen diese Fluglage ein. Damit sind wir für die Sonnenprüfung in der richtigen Position. In dies
Ruhe bewahren, Houston. Nur zur Information: Die Schaltkr
Roger. 03 è 38549; 04 è 61388; 05 è 07513; Core 66, 65384; 07, 35999; 08, 40014; 09, 12421; Core 10, 02346; Core 11, 29217
हां, इसमें कुछ पत्थर भी हैं। आप उन्हें महसूस कर सकते 
로저. 순조롭게 진행되고 있습니다. 지금쯤 깃발을 설치하고 있는 것
D'accord. Sur le panneau 6, ignorez le premier. On veut que l'alimentation soit coupée, puis passez à l'étape suivante: l'
ابدأ عملية الحرق. إنها الساعة 16:44:01
물론이지, 나... 어이, 거스, 네가 글을 읽을 줄 아는지 모
روجر. لدينا أربعة من أصل ثمانية إش
ヒュース
L'apogeo è 155,7 - il perigeo
ठीक है, पैनल 11 कॉन्फ़िगरेशन, पहली पंक्
好
이 자세에서는 확실히 머리 위를 올려다보는 듯한 착각이 들고, 지평선이 보이지 않으면 그냥 칠흑 같은 하늘뿐입니다. 조종실
Ладно
Qui è Indian O
Роджер. Я тебя хорошо понимаю, Майк, и я тебя п
Roger. Wie lange, glaubst
Okay. I'm reading on my monitor her
Und, Jack, wir we
Okay. Zu Eintrag 1: Der zweite Punkt dort ist die 12-stündige Kaltstartphase (Kelvin). In den Diskussionen hier und vor dem Flug haben wir uns darauf geeinigt, dass wir diese Kaltstartphase nicht durchführen wollen. Daher streichen wir Schritt 2. Im Endeffekt wollen wir aber doch eine Kaltstartphase durchführen und die Wasserkessel vor dem Wiedereintritt testen, um sicherzustellen, dass keiner trocken läuft, so wie es bei einem vorherigen Fall der Fall war. Wir arbeiten an entsprechenden Verfahren und werden uns später damit bei Ihnen melden. Wir versuchen, dies zu besprechen, wenn Bill in der Leitung ist, damit alle gleichzeitig informiert sind. Wir möchten einen Schritt zwischen 8 und 9 oder als Teil von Schritt 8 hinzufügen. Das alles ist auf Seite E-1 beschrieben, wo wir das VHF-Funkgerät bei minus 4 Stunden und 35 Minuten auf Simplex A umstellen. Das liegt zwar außerhalb der Reichweite von Zweiwege-VHF, aber so stellen wir sicher, dass es eingeschaltet ist, wenn wir es empfangen. Wir konnten mit einer Downlink-Verbindung 20.000 Mei
"0.1 फुट प्रति सेकंड।" बर्न टाइम को बंद करने का कारण यह है कि, चूंकि एएसए ब्रेकर इतने लंबे समय से बंद है, इसलिए हमें पूरा भरोसा नहीं है कि ह
로저. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 자이로스코프에 현재 상당히 정확한 위치 정보가 기록된 것 같습니다. 야간 관측은 괜찮았는데, 다시 시야가 흐려지더니 꽤 빠르게 방향을 틀었습니다. 다시 확인해 보니 지금은 상당히 안정된 것 같습니다. 다
シグマ・セブン、シグマ・セブン、こちらウォータータウン通信技術局。HF。聞
Nous ne voulons pas perdre le contact 
吉姆，你只需要发射导弹，然后驾驶她飞
Хорошо. На панели 5 автоматические выключатели POWER 1 и 2 разомкнуты. Затем выключатель POWER сбросить и разомкнуть. На панелях 11 и 16, TRANSLUNAR BUS TIE, оба автоматических выключ
Роджер. Сейчас я как раз работаю над проектом Apoll
Roger, Gemini 4. Sie sehen hier am Boden gut aus. Könnten Sie mir 
Come sono i nostri otto talkback g
Stand by. Yes, go ahead 
あり
समझ गया। क्या आप प्रति रेव लगभग एक रीडिं
Alors Bu
Roger. Indian Cap Com, Aurora
ええ。あれの可読性は、どち
4도 이내 오차 범위 내에 있어, 월리. 게다가 둘
O
Роджер, и можно еще один тонометр, пожалуйста? Предыдущий я не замерил. У меня есть в
عندما انفصل الصاروخ المعزز، كان بالإمكان رؤية الوقود يتناثر من فوهة الدوران. وبينما كان الصاروخ يدور حول نفسه، في مستوى عمودي على الخط الواصل بين محور المركبة الفضائية والصاروخ، كان بالإمكان رؤية ذيله الطويل المتدفق. سأرسم رسمًا توضيحيًا قصيرًا لذلك على خطة رحلتي. كان الحطام متناثرًا في كل مكان عند انفصال المركبة الفضائية. استدرنا فرأينا أشياءً متناثرة في كل مكان. في الواقع، لم أستطع تمييز أجزاء الصاروخ المعزز إلا بعد أن ألقينا نظرة فاحصة عليه. انفصلت الأغطية الواقية عند نقطة انفصالها دون أي مشكلة. بدت أغطية الماسح الضوئي للأفق وكأنها ان
I understand; go for the next. Mike, we'd like to, if we could, time the TV to a passing over the terminator. We would like to track the terminator with the
Роджер. Всё верно. На шаге 5 выполните шаг 5. В разделе «Активация первичной гликолевой петли», шаг 1, строка 1, «CB
你好，你好，金丝雀指挥中心
ठीक है। मुझे नोट्स नहीं मिले, लेकिन मैं आपको अभी जो चरण याद हैं, उन्हें पढ़कर सुनाता हूँ। पहला चरण, बैटरी 1, 2, 3 और 4... और इस समय तक बैटरी 1, 2, 3, 4 और 6 चालू हो जा
Roger. I've got the world in my window for a change and looking at it through the monocular, it's really something. I wish I could describe it properly. The weather is very good. South America is coming around into view. I can see on the - what appears to me to be upper horizon, a point that must be just about Seattle, Washington, and from there I can see all the way down to the southern tip of Tierra del Fuego and the southern
I just wanted to g
はい、本当に素晴らしいですね。あれほど騒がしい音がなくて嬉しいです。ジム、私が何をしたいのかお話ししましょう。先ほど言ったように、今は詳細な手順はお伝えしません。まもなく、以下の形式で手順をお伝えする予定です。まず、タイムライン、いわば飛行計画のようなものを用意します。そこには、すべての主要なイベントの時刻と、構成、スイッチ設定など、私たちの構成に特有のもの（チェックリストには記載されていないもの）が記載されます。例えば、司令船の電源投入方法などがこれに該当します。次に、もちろん、チェックリストへのレッドラインも用意します。これにより、可能な場合はチェックリストを入力して機能を実行できます。タイムラインは、必要に応じてチェックリストを参照するように指示します。
We'd like to know what your plans are as far as turning in this evening. Our - in the flight plan we show you commencing a rest period at about 182 hours, and what are you planning to do on that? We're going to be watching the weather here, and we expect to have a
أورورا سفن، أنت تتل
Rog
알겠습니다. 달이 제 시야의 정중앙에 있습니다. 훌륭한 
सफेद रंग में। 6 बजे निशाना लगाने के लिए तैयार। यह तिरछा था। तीसरा शॉट। मैं चौथा शॉट लगभग सीधे नीचे की ओर लूंगा, जितना सीधा निशाना लगा सकता हूँ। सूर्यास्त के समय थोड़ी 
نجوم رائعة في الخلف باتجاه الشمال (
짐벌 상태도 
Роджер. Жителям космического корабля «Колумбия», возможно, будет интересно узнать, что сегодня в Колумбии День независимости. Вчера вечером Глория Диас из Филиппин была коронована как «Мисс Вселенная». Она обошла 60 других девушек в борьбе за титул чемпионки мира по красоте. Мисс Диас 18 лет, у нее черные волосы и глаза, параметры фигуры 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. Первой вице-мисс стала Мисс Австралия, за ней следуют Мисс Израиль и Мисс Япония. Пока вы будете возвращаться во вторник вечером, в Вашингтоне будут играть команды всех звезд Американской и Национальной лиг. Ожидается, что Мел Стоттлмайр из «Янкиз» станет первым питчером Американской лиги. Пока никто не предсказывает, кто станет первым питчером Национальной лиги. В составе команды девять питчеров. Хотя исследования в космиче
Roger. V
わかりました。回路ブレーカー16、POWER AMP回路ブレーカー、オ
E quello che volevo sottolineare, non so se è evidente, ma... per mostrare il vantaggio di fare tutti gli scarichi appena prima della combustione, stiamo osservando di nuovo la stessa scena sul quad 1, verso la Luna. E ora non si vedono più tutte quelle particelle scintillanti e congelate là fuori. Le abbiam
Hey, you want to get a few things dead ahead. You're not going to use your FDI scale, are 
ヒューストン、
Roger
Donnez-nous juste l'heure, s'il vous plaît, on veut juste savoir quand c'est. J'aimerais bien avoir le Terminator si on pouvait, et on a u
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie können mit Ihre
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. صمام التح
Solo un commento casuale. Abbiamo guardato fuori e ci è sembrato di vedere l'orizzonte. Si è scoperto che era ovviamente un chiarore atmosferico. Potevamo vedere le stelle ben al di sotto de
복사
हाँ, मुझे हाल ही में मिले अपडेट से खुशी है, खासकर हमारे स्टेट वेक्टर पर इसके प्रभाव से। फिर भी, विभिन्न प्रक्रियाओं से मैं पूरी तरह संतुष्ट नहीं हूँ। अगर हम ट्रनियन कोणों की छोटी रेंज में तारों का चयन कर सकें, जिससे तारा अपनी मर्जी से उस उपतारकीय बिंदु तक जा सके और फिर वह तारा दिखाई दे, तो मुझे लगता है कि यह 
Держу пари, фильтр для мусора сильн
No, non riesco a vederlo,
OK. Ceci est un 9, /: 45597, moins 040, plus 157, plus 34188, moins 01353, plus 00780 180 008 001, Novembre Alfa, plus 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, bas 131, gauche 28, plus 0758, moins 16500 12987 36277; étoile principale Sirius, secondaire Rigel, 129 155 010; quatre quadrangles, 15 secondes, espacement, horizons sur la ligne de fenêtre de 1,2 degré à T moins 3; utiliser la procédure à grande vitesse avec moins Mike Alfa. Après analyse des données de combustion de vos essais précédents,
روجر. تقرير متواصل. ض
-4. 좋습니다, 여기 확인해 보겠습니다. 이 정도면 괜찮은 것 같군요. 조금 더 오른쪽으로 기울였으면 좋았겠지만요. 좋습니다, 야간 요(yaw) 점검은 이쯤에서 마치겠습니다. 제 생각에는 돌아가서 조종사들에게 시간을 좀 더 드리겠습니다. 연료를 너무 많이 소모할 필
Roger. Le mie condizioni sono buone, le condizioni della capsula sono buone. Sono in volo di deriva con controllo manuale. I giroscopi sono ingabbiati. Il carburante segna il 45-42%, l'ossigeno il 79-100%. Le temperature delle prese d'aria del vapore segnano entrambe 65 gradi; la temperatura della tuta è scesa bene. Ora è 62 gradi e tutta la potenza è buona. La pressione sanguigna sta iniziando a salire. Ho appena finito di scattare
प्लेटफ़
ठीक है। मूलतः, यह सही है। चलिए, मैं इसे संक्षेप में समझा देता हूँ, फिर मैं आपको चरण बताऊँगा। मुझे लगता है कि इससे आपको बेहतर समझ आएगा। योजना यह है कि आप कुछ ऐसे कोण पर उड़ सकते हैं जो आपके ऑप्टिक्स को चंद्रमा की ओर इंगित करेंगे। अब, किसी भी समय, किसी भी स्थिति में, यदि आप दूरबीन में देखकर तारों के पैटर्न को पर्याप्त रूप से पहचान सकते हैं और आपको लगता है कि आप स्वयं संरेखण कर सकते हैं, तो हम यहीं रुकना चाहेंगे और आपको अपना संरेखण स्वयं करने देंगे। हालाँकि, हम आपको एक ऐसी प्रक्रिया बता रहे हैं जिससे आप दूरबीन में उन चीजों को देख सकेंगे जिन्हें आप बिना किसी परावर्तन या ऐसी किसी भी चीज की चिंता किए देख सकते हैं, और यह आवश्यक नहीं है कि इस प्रक्रिया का पालन तब तक किया जाए जब तक आपको यह पता न चल जाए कि दूरबीन में तारों के पैटर्न स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई दे रहे हैं। यदि आपको आगे बढ़ना है, तो हम पैंतरेबाज़ी करेंगे, चंद्रमा पर 
मेरे पास आपके लिए एक और है। आप इसे कॉपी करके मुझे रीडबैक पर पूरा लिखकर दे दीजिए। ठीक है। जब आपको सही तरीका समझ आ जाए और आप लैंप का इस्तेमाल करना चाहें, तो हमें CB 16 INVERTER 2 को बंद करना होगा; CB 11, AC 
Roger. Ça a fonctionné. 
Roger. Du lieg
罗杰。我们这里所有专家都在查阅资
ठीक है। हमने इसे एकीकृत रूप से चलाया है, इसलिए हमें लगता है कि हमन
Howdy there, Mike. We're ready to go ahead and have you switch to your OMNI positions for your sleep period, and we would like the following high gain switch positions: your high gai
Хорошо. Я использую систему управления по проводам на малой высоте, чтобы поднять нос самоле
D'accord, Jim. Pour économiser un ou deux ampères, nous vous demandons de passer en mode de secours vocal descendant (DOWN VOICE BACKUP COMM). Cela consiste à couper l'alimentation et le disjoncteur, puis à activer le mode de secours vocal descendant (DOWN VOICE BACKUP). En cas de problème de communication, il vous suffi
Apollo 8, 
Ich halte die Kapsel in Wiedereintrittsposition an. Rollbewegung nach außen. Gieren ist null; Rollen nimmt zu. Ich möchte diese Position erfassen und dann beobachten. Rollen sieht gut aus. Nicken und 
Hey, Gemini 4. Wir möchten, das
케이프, 계속하
Okay, Mike. Das gilt natürlich nur für den Fall, dass die G&N-Steuerung ausfällt und du mit konstanter G-Belastung fliegen musst. Wir versuchen, den Bereich für konstante G-Belastung von 1100 auf 1500 Meilen zu erweitern. Wir haben das Verfahren im Simulator getestet, und es funktioniert einwandfrei. Ich erkläre es dir kurz – mach es einfach durch, und wenn du Fragen hast, meld
了解、ジャック。最後の確認をします。お待ちくださ
ठीक है, चलिए इस पर एक मिनट विचार करते हैं, और मैं तुरंत आपसे संपर्क करूंग
Houston, how 
We're starting wi
收到，友谊七号。非常感谢。目前所有系统运行正常。
Negative; it 
Hören Sie, soll ich das Raumschiff in eine a
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。こちらがコピーしているようです。連絡を回復させようとしている間、光学スイッチをゼロにしてください。トラニオンで漂流していることが分かりましたので、
सैटर्न बूस्ट? यह एक 
Fred, as-tu reçu des alarmes principales il y
I tell you, I like it be
ヒューストン、アポロ
了解しました。飛行計画通りです。
Ont-ils eu u
Nous vous avons aperçu à la télévision, votre sourire nous a fait plai
Это подтверждается. Прежде чем я начну говорить о площадках, еще одно замечание. Об
396 033, 아래 054, 왼쪽 21, +08 10 -16500 12968 36222; 
حسنًا. تمام. الآن لنضع - الآ
收到。我的
حسنًا. أولًا وقبل كل شيء، سنفتح قا
Okay. Ich warte, bis du so weit bist – bis du glaubst, deine P
Я подтверждаю, что проверка на герметичность завершена, и приступаю к открыти
ठीक है। सुनो, रोलि
Роджер. Понятно, и я так понимаю, за 4 часа вы собираетесь с
Laut und deutlich. Entschuldigung für die Unterbrechung. Wir gehen gerade die Zusammenfassung der Syste
Gemini VI, we've got it just b
Apollo 13, Hou
Beau spectacle là-bas. Tout repose d
Non
좋아요, 히터 꺼졌어
عشرون ثانية للاشتع
يا 
Das war es in der Tat. Ich hatte so ein Gefü
Roger, Jack, qui Tom. Ho pensato di passare la parola a te e Jim, che oggi abbiamo dato priorità ai dati e ci riuniremo per discutere di tutte le procedure uti
حس
다시 말씀
Okay. All four retros, MANUAL
Qui Sigma Seven, che trasmette in modalità cieca su UHF-hi. Qualcuno mi legge
好的，吉姆。我们替你做决定；这是我们一直想跟你讨论的话题。我们一直在考虑这个问题，我们的想法是——当然，最终决定权在你，但就我们权衡利弊来看，你刚才提到的优点显而易见。我们在发射前一小时左右会进行舱门完整性检查，如果舱门损坏，你很难迅速钻进宇航服。另一方面，穿宇航服的缺点是，它们可能会大大降低你的速度，这还不包括穿宇航服的时间。甚至有人非常担心，穿宇航服一段时间后，你可能会感到太热，到时候我们可能不得不启动宇航服循环系统来通风，而我们并不想这样做，因为这会消耗大量的电力。因此，我们的建议是你不要穿那套防护服，因为我们没有理由相信完整性检查会显示除了略微增加的泄漏率之外的任何其他结果，而
Roger. I tuoi orologi erano
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. ٣٠ ثانية للوصول إلى خط الرؤية. المركبتان الفضائيتان تبدوان بح
Okay. Why don't you drive it back over to the attitude and put it back in ATTITUDE HOLD for the roll, and we're going back in and review the requirement. You have about the same results, it looks like, on a cursory analysis all three times. So we're going to take another
我刚才好像飞越了马绍尔群岛的部分海域。海面非常清晰，可以看到岛屿周围的环礁和其他景物。我试着拍张照片，可惜晚了一点。
हाय जॉन। मैंने आपकी बात
로저. 저희가 원하는 건 그게 전부입니다. 저희는 좁은 범위 안에 머물고 싶은데, 몇 분 전에 당신이 여기서 갑자기 연락이 끊긴 이유가 좀 궁금합니다. 혹시 아시는 게 있으
Ricevuto. Fin
रॉजर। ठीक है। हम बैटरी चार्ज नोट कर लेंगे जैसे ही हमें समय मिलेगा, और ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन के 
Roger. Wir sti
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We'd like - The rates are looking pretty good right now on the, but we'd like you to continue holding.
Okay. Now, we're ready to go to work on panel 275. And it starts with a circuit break
わか
Okay, Aquarius; Houston. Du kommst jetzt ungefähr einzeln rein. Sag mir bitte, da
Okay, 11. We have a picture. We see the Earth right in the center of the screen. Over
حسنًا. دعني أعطيك بعض القراءة... في هذه
حسنًا يا فانس...، زائد 0833.0، ناقص 0050.9، ناقص 0213.9، غير متوفر، زائد 00205، 08615، 4:24، 272، 081 والباقي غير متوفر. تعبئة فوهتين لمدة 10 ثوانٍ، وزن 62480، وزن 33452، ملف ت
D'accord. Comprenez bien: le soleil est à droite et entre par votre fenêtre numéro 1. Lorsque vous nous donnez ces angles, cela signifie-t-il que votre axe X positif est pointé vers le soleil selon ces angles? C'est bien 
كل ما علينا فعله هو تشغيل جهاز BI
자, 이제 제가 이해하지 못한 부분이 하나 있습니다. M
Nein, Frank schläft jetzt. Wir erledigen das jetzt. Ich komme jetzt rüber, um die Zapfen auszurichten, und dann machen wir we
Roger, Houston. Hier ist Buzz through Tranquility. Wie lese
روجر. من المحتمل
كنتُ أستطيع سماعك طوال الوقت يا كين، لكنني لم أكن أسمع الموسيقى إلا عندما كنتَ تحاول الإرسال. وتساءلتُ إن كنتَ لاحظتَ تشغيل وإيقاف زر الطاقة في 
روجر. محول التيار الكهربائي الخاص بك بقدرة 150 فولت أم
Ho usato il filtro verde sul sestante, e il filtro verde rende l'orizzonte più chiaro
Und Boothill, Duke Island, Sidewinder, Blick auf Maskelyne W, das i
Это отрицательный результат, Джек. Согласно 
そうですね。確認したかったのですが、以前お話した時は受信状態
Oui. Je vais lui en prendre
로저. 중량 36651, 중량 33627, 피치 트림 -0.72, 요 트림
هيوستن، يرغب جاك في معرفة ما هي الأبراج الموجودة في مجال رؤية السدس الخاص به، أو التلسكوب الماسح، عند زاوية ميل تبلغ حوالي 105 درجة، مع انعدام الدوران والانح
시스템 담당자들이 확인하고 싶
Okay. The only comment that we just made was that, in case you were thinking
Okay. Understand. I knew we had another O2 and H2 purge coming up in the morning; I wasn't sure whether you wanted to go through with this one or not. I'll wait until t
Привет, А
広州通信技術局、こちらシグマ・セブン
Ok. Il numero 1 O2 è spento, e potresti chiarire la tua affermazione precedente? Stavi ricevendo un bu
Il en est à son - Il en est à son 19e bol
حسنًا يا جيم. بما أن التوصية الأولى بشأن كيفية المناورة لم تنجح، فلدينا توصية أخرى. يمكنك تجربة هذا: اضبط زاوية الانعراج على الصفر، ثم ابدأ الد
DIRECT、
Gemini VIII, Гавайи. У меня есть примерная дата прибыти
Все почтовые индексы находятся на нашем ра
Well, we - w
わかりました。最後の4つ、最後の5つ、CLAには現時点ではリバー
روجر. اعلم أنه يمكنك رؤية الهالة الشمسية على مسافة تقارب 200 ضعف قطر
好的。我们要检查电脑在所有模式下的运行情况。这项检查分为三个步骤。首先，在所有 IVI 
और शायद - ठीक है, डेका गिम्
Ce fut 
Oui
Roger, könntest du vielleicht ausrichten, dass wir die Lichter von Sydney gesehen haben? Ich weiß nicht, ob sie eingeschaltet waren oder nicht, aber falls ja, haben sie die Stromrechnung ganz schön in die Höhe getrieben. Ich habe sie auf der letzten Umlaufbahn gesehen. Wir sind 
Répète, VI. Tu es faible et un peu 
حسنًا. هذه هي لوحة +90. /G&N، 63825، -1.54، +1.32، -0491.7، +0000.1، +6634.0، 180، 228، 001؛ HA غير متوفر؛ HP +0
로저. 이해했습니다만,... 미국 
そうだと思います。時々目を開けるんですが、ここではそういう寝方をするんです。というか、かなり邪魔される
ठीक है। उद्देश्य है और अवस्था सदिशों को पृथ्वी के क्रियामंडल 37 ENTER, 23 ENTER पर लाना। रजिस्टर 1, 2 और 3 में निम्नलिखित संख्याएँ दर्ज करें। रजिस्टर 1, 00002; रजिस्टर 2, पाँच गेंदें; रज
Gemini 4, RKV
分かりました。ジムが電話に戻ってきます。私はBIOMEDを外しますので、SPA
Più o meno è corretto, Jim. Jack si allineerà grossolanamente a quell'assetto. Questo è il motivo per cui ti faremo manovrare verso quell'assetto. Calcoleremo gli angoli di allineamento grossolano del gimbal e glieli passeremo, e la prima cosa che farà quando arriverà lì, secondo la sua lista
Okay. Wir werden die Orbit-Navigationsläufe 9 und 10 wie geplant um 3
ر
We'd like you to think about this control mode, Jim, and see if y
Okay. Jack erklärt Fred die Abläufe. Wir wollen ihn damit vertraut machen und ihm zeigen, wie er eventuelle Probleme
See, I think it takes us a little while for it to work on it. To proces
حسنًا
よし、ジャック。これでようやく未解決の問題が解決したようだ。驚いたことに、これだけの作業の中で、議場で浮かんだ疑問はたった一つだけだった。その疑問について調べてみよう。それが何だったか、君にも推測させてくれ。もし何か疑問があれば、じっくり
Итак, как вы можете видеть, мы движемся вправо, и разворот проходит очень хорошо. Мне еще нужно скорректировать свой разворот. Скоро я установлю угол рыскания. Я вполне доволен результатами как дневной, так и ночной проверки. Я очень доволен. Должен сказать, что наблюдать за тем
मेरा कहने का मतलब यह था कि हम प्राइमरी ऑक्सीजन सिस्टम में दबाव बढ़ने की समस्या का समाधान ढूंढना चाहते हैं। हम केबिन प्रेशर को बार-बार कम किए बिना इसे नियंत्रित करने का कोई तरीका खोजना चाहते हैं, इसलिए हम चाहते हैं
D'accord, je vo
На мой взгляд, все системы управ
टीवीसी 
ヒューストン、アポ
Jack, while he's doing that,
- - I don't have 
Хорошо. RN, RP, плюс 77, угол тангажа на номинальной высоте 400 футов; поправка, номинальная высота 400 тыс. футов; RET 400 тыс. футов, 22 плюс 02; начало затемнения, 24 плюс 43; конец затемнения, 30 плюс 01; тормозной парашют, 31 плюс 37; основной парашют, 32 плюс 58. И у меня есть информация о погоде в районе посадки и так далее, если вы готовы ее перехв
फ्
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。首先，我们希望后侧的废水排放量降至10%。其次，目前看来我们不需要更换飞机，所以我们不会上传新的飞机。第三，我希望你们所有的低温加热器都设置为自动模式，并且我们已经准备好给电池充电，电池是BRAVO；充电时间大约为7小时。如果你们需要休息，我们会停止电池充电，但目
Roger
罗杰。迈克，我们现在要标记的星星可真不少，他们有点担心。如果我们在一个位置
吉姆，我可以给你大致介绍一下指令舱G&N的升空流程。这是目前提出的方案。我们可能会想出更好的方案，但这是我们目前正在考虑的。首先，我们计划像中途飞行时那样，利用地球的瞄准点进行校准。然后，我们会进行一次体轴校准，ACS（自动控制系统）的400+5度角，使球体指向000度。之后，我们会给你一个球体姿态参数，让你飞向月球，并将光学系统
В компании OAMS Heaters сработал автоматический выключат
Hawaii, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Wird der Funkverk
Ja, wir sind noch da, Jack. Wir möchten Ihnen bei diesem Vorgang folgen und verwenden dafür eine hohe Bitrate. Um Ihre Frage zu beantworten: Falls Probleme auftreten, um die Prozedur schnell rückgängig zu machen, berühren Sie auf keinen Fall den Netzschalter 124, da dieser eine Reset-Position hat. Z
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। क्या बिल के सो
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Три положения переключателей
शा
Ça a l'air bien. Oh, environ 4,25 mè
不，我正在努力
Hope we're not going to get a pitch straight
ठीक है। जैक, 1-5 सही है। चलिए 1-6 पर चलते हैं। और पहली प
F
Et les températures semblent bonnes. Quand on fait
델타
Ja, ich glaube, das haben sie vergessen
Hello, Canton. Hello, Canton. This is Friendship Seven. Read you loud and clear, how me? Over
ヒューストンです。はっきりと聞き取れました。エ
Was ich nicht verstehe, ist, was das wohl sein soll? Ich dachte, es wär
Okay. Noch zwei Schritte. Schritt 6: Bleiben Sie zwei Sekunden lang im Modus mit der Antenne mit hoher Verstärkung. Wechseln Sie während dieser zwei Sekunden nicht in den Omni-Modus und behalten Sie die Konfiguration für Sprache und Daten bei. Wir gehen davon aus,
저희는 재진입을 위한 재정비 작업
Ricevuto. Meno 3 ore, manovra 
На зонде видны яркие пятна. По-видимому, солнечный луч, падающий на него, едва достаточен, чтобы мы могли его разглядеть. Коне
Okay. Jack meldet von oben
了解しました。燃料電池2のRAD OUT温度は約90度、燃料電池1と3はそれより少し低く、おそらく75度か80度になるようです。約1時間前に燃料電池の性能についてご質問があり
क्या आपको अभी रीडिं
Hey, Jim, I have about three things. First thing, the computer is yours again. The second thing, no maneuvering will be required from now until burn, so you can just sit in the burn attitude. And the third thing is we'd like to back out of this procedure we just put you into to updata link, which would mean going from TM bit rate HI back to LO, RANGING to OFF, VOIC
Roger. Bien re
알겠습니다. 확인했습니
روجر، جون. لقد انتهينا للتو من وضع إيقاف التشغيل حيث كان 
제미니
Ok. Andiamo.
روجر، فهمت. ش
Sarebbe una buona idea, Mike
Отлично. Это выпуск «Межзвездных времен» от 23 декабря в стиле Пола Хейни. Хотим сообщить, что до Рождества осталось всего два дня предновогодних покупок. Он говорит, что ваша телепередача вчера имела огромный успех. Микки Херсковиц работает в газете «Пост» вдвойне. Он написал пару колонок о вашем запуске в дополнение к своим другим спортивным колонкам, и, Джим, твоя мама, конечно же, оценила поздравление с днем ​​рождения. Вчера из тюрьмы в Новом Орлеане сбежал 21 заключенный, а президент Джонсон вчера вечером вернулся домой из военно-морского госпиталя Бетесда после перенесенного гриппа. Он передает вам особое сообщение 
Bene. Tre per CONTROLLO MODALITÀ, virgola, BANDA M
Хорошо, теперь Flight хотел бы узнать, собираетесь ли вы попробовать спать без
방금 아제나를 90도로 요잉(yawing)하는 작업을 완료했습니다. 요잉 기동 중 요잉 속도는 정확히 초당 1.5도였고, 90도 회전하는 데는 몇 초밖에 걸리
Okay. I t
بطريقة ما، لم يتوافق ذلك مع جهاز DELTA-VX ليع
로저. 중량 36651, 중량 33627, 피치 트림 -0
D'accord. Si j'ai bien compris, Joe, l
好
쌍둥이자리 4호, 여기는 휴스턴입니
Negativo. Non capisco bene nemmeno io la diminuzione 
双子座4号，金丝雀外科医生。您的血压已测得。请问
حسنًا. في اللوحة 250، أغلق قاطع الدائرة BAT A، مدخل الط
Columbia, Houston. Your friendly White Team's going to be on till we get you on the way home, and
Houston, Apollo 11. Nous avons le continent africain face à nous, et bien sûr, tout rapetisse à mesure que le temps passe. La Méditerranée est parfaitement dégagée. Le soleil semble sur le point de se coucher près de Madagascar. La bande équatoriale africaine se détache nettement. On distingue un vert foncé, presque boueux, comparé aux teintes sableuses de la pointe sud de l'Afrique et, bien sûr, du Sahara au nord du continent. Un nuage assez remarquable apparaît près de la frontière entre l'Afghanistan et le Pakistan. Il est sur le point de disparaître à l'horizon. Il projette une ombre assez importante. Il est isolé. Il ne semble pas y avoir d'autres nuages… La bande nuageuse près de la zone de convergence tropicale, en contrebas de
Ich ha
休斯顿，你们能接受的投球态度是
ヒュー
रॉजर, 11. मैंने आपके लिए उड़ान योजना में एक अपडेट भेजा है ताकि आपको नंबर 1 विंडो में पृथ्वी और नंबर 5 विंडो में चंद्रमा के लिए इष्टतम स्थिति मिल स
嘿，杰克。给我带一个
글리콜 증발기 출구 온도는 50도이고, 실내 온도는 아주 쾌적
はっきりと聞き取れまし
Roger. Le pilote vient de se réveiller, il a pris son deuxième repas du quatrième jour, bu cinq gorgées
对于一个初
सूर्यास्त के समय पेरिस्कोप की स्क्रीन बह
हमें बूस्टर दिखाई नहीं द
Roger. Je comprends, Bill. 
Принято, Базз. И перерыв. Перерыв. Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Когда вы выйдете из зоны действия высокочувствительной антенны, давайте запросим всенаправленную дельта-антенну, всенапра
好的。没问题。之前
La responsabilità di questo volo ricade innanzitutto sulla storia e sui giganti della scienza che hanno preceduto questo sforzo; poi sul popolo americano, che ha espresso il suo desiderio attraverso la propria volontà; poi, su quattro amministrazioni e sui loro Congressi, per aver attuato tale volontà; e infine, sui team delle agenzie e dell'industria che hanno costruito i nostri veicoli spaziali, il Saturn, il Columbia, l'Eagle e il piccolo EMU, la tuta spaziale e lo zaino che costituivano la nostra piccola navicella sulla superficie lunare. Vorremmo ringraziare in modo speciale tutti gli americani che hanno
Второй момент, конечно же, заключается в том, что когда вы отключаете пассивный терморегулирование, вы находитесь примерно под углом 90 градусов к линии Земли, поэтому при повороте влево вам придется поворачивать влево до тех пор, пока угол наклона среднего подвеса не приблизится к 60 градусам. 
收到。明白了。另外，Agena 号目前已配置为 TDA 北向，我们只
알
这就是我们
Che ne dici di tutt
로저. 당신이 그렇
38 मिनट का समय बीत चुका है। र
Хорошо. П
Ok, Ken. Una cosa che penso è che - non so se qualcuno - l'adesivo non tenga conto del fatto che abbiamo ancora i cavi ombelicali collegati. Quando dovrebbero essere rimoss
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, Cap Com. Cape Flight mi ha informato che noi... che si aspettavano che la cabin
Джим, если тебе не нужен компьютер, позвони, пожалуйста,
Apollo 8, this is Houston. I hadn't said anything at that time. We're digging some angles out for you now. In reference to your earlier question about the sleep cycle juggling and so we agree with your comment. We would like to get back on the flight plan as far as the sleep cycles and so forth are concerned by the time we get into lunar orbit. So we'd like for you to use your own judgment about the most efficient way to accommodate the sleep cycles and proportion it up among yourselves. We would like to have you keep us informed of who's doing what and what your plans are. We have the one that we had slipped 2 hours. We'd like to get the other one in. We can also adjust the time for the other, if it's going to conflict - I guess that's two more 's. We can adjust the time for those if you'll let us know what your forecast is for when Jim will be available to take some sightings. So the big message is that we'd like to work around whatever your desires are. If you'll let us know, we'll pick so
로저, 프렌드십
You have to 
Хорошо, Роджер. Не могли бы вы дать мне время, чтобы начать движение н
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Environ 3 minutes et demie. Tout se déroule bien. Votre heure limite prévue est parfa
We noticed on our system test battery vent pressure that when we opened the battery vent valve, we get an immediate drop-off to pressure which nulls 
最好也让嗓
Ho un cramp
ヒューストン、時計を
Und ich sehe die Strahlen, die aus dem Feuer Pickering kommen. Wir nähern uns jetzt unserem P-1-Startpunkt, den ich mir ansehen werde. Beachten Sie, dass das runde Fenster, die Luke, komplett vereist ist; wir können es nicht benutzen; 
明白了；滚转 308，俯仰 209，偏航 3
Okay. is lookin
Una cosa, quando arrivi quassù,
जिन लोगों ने पट्टिका नहीं पढ़ी है, उनके लिए हम इसे आगे के लैंडिंग गियर पर पढ़ देते हैं। सबसे पहले, इस पर दो गोलार्ध बने हैं, जिनमें से प्रत्येक पृथ्वी के दो गोलार्धों को दर्शाता है। इसके नीचे लिखा है, "यहाँ पृथ्वी ग्रह से मनुष्य ने पहली बार जुलाई 1969 ईस्वी में चंद्रमा पर कदम रखा। हम समस्
Apollo 11, Houston. Bonjo
55. 
いいえ、発音できません。きっと気に入っていただけると思います。彼らは素晴らしいチーズブランド
Okay. We're to driv
حسنًا. تمام. لنبدأ. ربما ستتضح الأمور ولن يكو
わかりました、ジャック。上から始めましょう。わかりました。クライオタンク; H2 1は230を示し、2も同様です。私たちのO2クライオタン
네, 알겠습니다.
Jack, deine Kabinen-REGs werden noch aufgeholt, aber du kannst die Abwasserentlüftung jetzt wieder öffnen, un
Wir werden einige spezielle Fotos des
रॉजर, बिल। अगली बार जब इसे धूप में रखा जाएगा, तो हमें प्राथमिक इवेपोरेटर में कोई समस्या होने की उम्मीद नहीं है। अगर यह सूखने लगे, तो हमारा मानना ​​है कि बैक प्रेशर वा
Negative on that. It's gone
わ
يذكرني قليلاً ب
روجر. لدينا أسلوب تلفزيوني مناسب لك إذا كنت مستعدًا
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन
Okay, Buzz. On your flight plan items, a few updates first of all. We've cancelled midcourse number 6. Just remain - remain in. I'll give you a little more time this morning. Second item on the flight plan is we're ready for a BATT B charge an
Roger. I've been having a cycling on and off of the requirements of the RCS heater. The first one was 47, and I put the heater on and the light was 54. That was ring A. Ring B 05. It took 5 minutes to 20,
로저, 당신은 점점 지쳐가고 있습니다. 거의 다 왔습니다. 비행팀은 8번 위치를 좀 더 평가해 보신 후 3번 위치로 이동하는 것을 고려해 주시
١١
收到，吉姆
이해하셨
Хорошо. Плюс 4 часа, /. Вес по-прежнему
地元ニュースを少しお伝えします。ハンツビルの郡庁舎が昨日未明に全焼したため、再び建設工事が行われるようです。記事では、待つ家族について少し触れています。これはポスト紙記者のアン・ジェームズによるものです。「私たちは月の裏側で休んでいます」と、ヴァレリー・アンダースさんはクリスマスイブに家族とアポロ8号が月周回軌道を外れて帰還するのを待ちながら言いました。アンダースさんは火曜日の午前0時に帰宅し、近所の人たちが子供たち全員を集めてくれたので、宇宙船が月の裏側で通信不能になっている間、家族は休むことができました。フランク・ボーマン大佐の自宅は、屋外に4つの大きな常緑樹のリースが飾られ、粉雪が舞い、赤いリボンで飾られていまし
好的。查看我们的冗余组件检查
阿波罗1
그걸
Die Temperatur der Kabinen
That's affirm. I'm going to first of all just quickly run through the times of the major events, and then we'll go back and fill in some of the details. Okay. Entry interface is at 142 hours 40 minutes; 6-1/2 hours, roughly prior to that or at about, we'll start this whole thing going by applying HEATER POWER, by checking the CM/ temperatures and preheating the CM/ if required, and we suspect we'll probably want to do that. We'll have detailed procedures up for it later. At about 6 hours prior to or about, we will commence powering up the, powering up the, using the modified / 30-minute checklist, which you have used for the previous midcourse. Then shortly, just before 5 hours, prior to or at about, we'll want you in the attitude for a body axis alinement, using the Earth terminator like we did before; and as soon as we have that, we'll perform -7, which looks like, now, about a 2-foot-per-second burn or about 15 seconds of. And I'm told that it's down to 1-1/2 now, so it's comfortably within the margin. Okay. When we do that, we'll immediately start the maneuver to the service module jettison attitude, which will be in plane since we're jettisoning it earlier than we usually do. We don't need, and don't want, the out-of-plane component. So it'll be in plane with the service module pointed back out along the radius vector. We will then commence to get the command module ready for service module SEP, including command module checkout and hot fire, and at approximately 4 hours and 30 minutes prior to or, we'll jettison the service module. We'll pitch the up until we aquire the service module in the... and try and get some photographs, but we're not going to fool around with translation maneuvers for pictures because we don't want to screw up - foul up your flight path angle at that time. Okay. That gives us 2 hours to - of more or less open time here to finish up, if we're late on that, to go on over to checklist and prepare for powering up the command module. We're going to start the command module full powerup at minus 2 hours and 30 minutes or. We'll get the computer on the line, we'll get the up, we'll start uplinking your state vectors, and so forth, and alining the command module platform. At about 1 hour and 30 minutes at the latest, giving us an hour to do this command module stuff, we will start the maneuver to the jettison attitude. You'll then start to close out the . Of course, we don't have our stowage all configured way before this. We'll close the hatch, do a pressure integrity check, and at minus 1 hour, or 141 hours and 40 minutes, we'll jettison the. As soon as we do that, you can start the maneuver to the entry attitude. When you're there, do a sextant star check, take down the optics, and at that point we'll be giving you your final entry pad. You can initialize the , and you'll essentially be right back on the checklist at that point. There's one - one little difference from your nominal entry. You're a little bit earlier in the morning, so it going - it's going to be nighttime when you get to. However, we're fortunate enough to have the Moon in a perfect position for a horizon check. We'll give you a Moon check instead of a horizon check, and you can track it right down to moonset, which is going to be at roughly minus 3 minutes. And that's it for the quick time line. Do you 
Négatif. Pas de panique pour l'instant. On suit la situation de près et on voulait ju
तो फिर हमने उन्हें इस भीषण आ
Se non hai altro da dire, ci vediamo la p
好的。第二个任务是在32小时后观测贝内特彗星——我们希望在航天器达到最佳稳定性后再进行拍摄。稳定性要求非常高。我们不确定您是否理解了我们刚才传达的信息。此外，照片可能无法展现彗星肉眼所能看到的全部细节，所以如果您发现彗星结构中任
Tout à fait. Notre objectif est de vous préparer à ralentir votre rythme et à vous arrêter. Voici la configuration qu
ر
Wir haben den US-Weltraumrekord gebrochen. Und wir O3. Ich glaube, es war über CSQ, und sie wollten... dabei sein. Ich fragte sie: „Empfangen Sie alle unsere zeitlich festgel
It looks pretty good
روجر. جيميني 8
Oui. Maintenant que nous savons où se trouve (illisible), ce sera beaucoup plus facile la prochaine fois. La première fois que nous avons cherché Le Caire – Le Caire et Alexandrie –, nous avons longtemps cherché (illisible). Je n'ai pas vraiment vu l'aérodrome. J'ai juste aperçu les environs. Je me suis dit qu'en pointant correctement l'appareil photo, j'aurais une photo du Caire. Mais cette fois, j'ai réussi à repérer l'aérodrome. Pareil pour Alexandrie. Je pense que si vous voulez photographier un endroit comme celui-ci, il serait judicieux de le survoler une première fois, de bien l'observer et de prendre les photos la foi
هل
تشير بيانات القياس عن بعد إلى أن ضغط الأكسجين 
Roger. Puisque tout se passe aussi bien ici
Neil e Buzz, qui Houston. Per chiarire la mia ultima domanda, i vostri materiali di consumo sono in buone condizioni al momento. Il riferimento di 30 minuti si riferiva alla tempist
ठीक है, वैंस। हम ये कर
Auch alle Syst
是的，肯定会冷。你根本想象不到这东西减速的时候会变得有多冷，我刚才用计时器计时了一下
早上好，休斯顿。你们怎么阅
Это касается эксперимента с
알겠습니다, 켄. 제가 생각하기에 한 가지 궁금한 점이 있는데, 다른 사람들도
Roger. And the next question from our panel is for Buzz. We recall that he reported seeing a laser upon of the Earth the first time after - the first REV after ascent, and we're wondering what color the beam was and if he could determine at the approximate
よ
알겠습니다. 그러면 뒤쪽 사람들이 만족할 거예요. 저희는 당신에게 화
네. 방금 전까지만 해도 최대 조준을
Apollo 8, Houston. Reading you lo
حسنًا. سأشرح لك ما لديّ - أعتقد أنه سيكون من الأسهل شرحه. في الصف العلوي، في الدائرة 11، لدينا أربعة قواطع ربط لحافلة التيار المتردد (AC BUS TIE PR) وقاطع فولتية حافلة التيار المتردد (AC BUS VOLTS PR)، وهذا كل شيء. ف
分かりました。登り用の水に切り替えましたが、水を飲むには下り用の水バルブをもう一度開
انطلقي يا كناري، يا جوز
好的。关于热水器：有意思的是，我居然能听到自己的声音——我本来想说，只要你们打开麦克风，我就能听到自己的声音，大概有两秒钟的延迟。关于主锅炉和副锅炉的检
حسناً، لا بأس. ما زلنا متقدمين بنسبة 42 بالمائة
자, 프레드. 페이지 맨 아래쪽에 깜빡이는 0406에서 1단계, 옵션 3을 선택하면 6으로 이동합니다. 그리고 5025에서는 ENTER
That'
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हमें लगता है कि इससे कुछ न कुछ फायदा जरूर होगा, इसलि
11, Houston. Present forecast shows acceptable conditions in your recovery area: 2000 foot scattered, high scattered, wind from 070 degrees, 13 knots, visibility 10 miles, and sea state about 4 feet. The forecast yesterday showed a tropical storm, Claudia, some 500 to 1000 miles east of Hawaii. The - the pictures from Earth satellites taken yesterday afternoon - afternoon showed Claudia dissipating, so this appears to be even less a factor than it was before. Your recovery area is now believed to be just a little ways north of the intertropical convergence zone, which you can probably see when you look out your windows there. Yesterday there was also a report of a tropical storm, Viola, further to the west. Its present location is some thousand miles east of the Phillipines and moving northwest. Tropical storm Viola has been intensifying, and should be transferred to the typhoon category within the next 12 hours or so; however, that will be far to you
Roger, könntest du vielleicht ausrichten, dass wir die Lichter von Sydney gesehen haben? Ich weiß nicht, ob sie eingeschaltet waren oder nicht, aber fall
لا، لقد تغيرنا؛ نحن الآن على الن
Oui, tout
카드에 있는 거
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8
C'est la vanne du bas, sur le panneau inférieur, en bas à gauche; celle-là, juste là. Oui, ce
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। मध्यमार्ग सुधार संख्या 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, पिच और यॉ ट्रिम अनुपलब्ध, TIG 150 29 5453, माइनस 00048, सभी गेंदों को जोड़ें, प्लस 00001 075 159 328; HA अनुपलब्ध है; HP प्लस 00230 00048 011 00048; सेक्स्टेंट तारा 03 0908 382. बोरसाइट तारा ब्लॉक, उपलब्ध नहीं। अक्
Tu as coupé après le mérid
Хорошо. D-8 06:35:00; пролет над Гавайями; Реверс 4. 
알겠습
Concern
Okay. Würde man es dann eher als horizontale Welligkeit bezeichnen,
Okay. The more mundane affairs, now that we've left the Moon, I'd like to trace through them a little bit for you *** developments that have taken place in the food department. I'm sure you've already *** type of a drink container. A little later, Mike will show you how the water gun operates with its new filter to take out the hydrogen. Essentially, this water gun is put in this end and fills up this bag with water, and the drink then dissolves in the water, and this end of the *** outfeeding. Likewise, we have other foods that are more solid nature. You can probably see this shrimp cocktail meal. *** this afternoon while the two o
Примерно такого размер
Gli assetti sono sotto controllo. Sembra esserci abbastanza carburante manuale. Sono ancora al 72%. 
分かりました。状態ベクトルを送信しますが、そのベクト
ठीक है। मै
ठीक है। अब मेरे पास आपको बताने के लिए काफी जानकारी है। हम चाहते हैं कि जो पायलट सो रहा है, वह अपना फेसप्लेट खुला रखे और दस्ताने न पहने। और जो पायलट जाग रहा है, वह अपना हेलमेट और दस्ताने उतार दे और यदि संभव हो तो संचार के लिए हल्के हेडसेट का उपयोग करे। हम चाहते हैं कि आप रेट्रोफायर से लगभग 3 घंटे पहले तक इसी तरह करते रहें। फिर, कक्षा में पहुँचने के बाद, अपनी सुविधानुसार, आप वेट और ड्राई बल्ब रीडिंग लें और किसी भी स्टेशन पर हमें इसकी रिपोर्ट दें कि यह रीडिंग किस समय
अभी यह CLOSED स्थिति में है, और VENT स्थिति में आने से पहले मैंने CLOSED स्थिति को देखा था; और जहाँ तक मुझे याद है
Oh, pa
برج الجوزاء 4، أقرأ رسائلك بوضوح تام في كانو. لديّ تحديث لك قبل
روجر. هو ليس بحاجة إلى الرسوم البيانية حقاً. لقد حفظها عن ظهر قلب. إنها
Ja, wir 
Der Kabinendr
Columbia, Houston. Hai ricevuto una copia di dati, a basso bit rate, dietro la 
لقد تم التحقق من حمولتك بشكل جي
حسنًا. لقد حصلنا عل
Хорошо.
That's 
روجر. G&N: 62710، زائد 098، ناقص 019، 077 46 2248، زائد 32
Und da wir die Checkliste so lange durchlesen müssen, sollten wir die Kommunikationsqualität verbessern. Dazu muss Feld 16: C
Einen Moment bitte, Fred. Wir fragen kurz 
Okay, Joe. Tempo di serraggio: 29 ore, 0 minuti e 30 
ठीक है, 
حسنًا. فهمت، لم
Понял. Близнецы VIII, у нас для вас медицинская информац
看起来速度差不多完美。你能明显感觉到自己在前进
わかった、ジ
Когда ускоритель отделился от нас, было видно, как топливо разбрызгивается из сопла. Когда ускоритель вращался, в основном в плоскости, перпендикулярной линии, проходящей через главную ось космического аппарата к ускорителю, можно было увидеть длинный развевающийся хвост. Я нарисую небольшую схему этого на своем плане полета. В месте отделения космического аппарата повсюду были обломки. Мы развернулись, и там все было разбросано. На самом деле, пока мы толком не рассмотрели ускоритель, я не мог понять, что к чему. Обтекатели отделились прямо у места выброса обтекателей без проблем. Обтекатели сканера горизонта, похоже, отделились целыми, но
Gus，如果你不介意的话，我试试用高流量氧气来降低
Par simple curiosité, quelle est notre conso
Eine genauere Treibstoffanzeige, wenn ich si
Roger. Good readback. Okay, continuing on. Nothing on page 6; nothing on page 7. Nothing 
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है आपने उस पैनल पर सब कुछ सही किया है। मुझे बीच वाला पैनल देखने दीजिए। ह
روجر. خاصية الإرجاع التلقائي معطلة؛ مفتاح فيوز الإرجاع الطارئ معطل؛ مفتاح فيوز الإرج
А затем мы займемс
C'est exact. Bien. Suivant. Mode - at - Une fois l'attitude stabilisée, sélectionnez MODE CONTROL AUTO. Appuyez sur Entrée pour surveiller les vitesses; si elles sont inférieures à 0,1 degré par seconde, maintenez la vitesse sur tous les axes (sur chaque axe), puis désactivez les propulseurs +X. Bien. Suivant, ENTRÉE; 1257, ENTRÉE; 252, ENTRÉE; 1, ENTRÉE; ENTRÉE; ENTRÉE; saisissez le code DAR 22110 et CONTINU
我想我们现在终于看到
حسنًا، جيد. سأعود
收到，明白了。我已经收到你的阿波罗里程碑第一次运行数据
Ce n'est pas urgent, Fred, mais si tout le monde est réveillé, vous pouvez vous en occuper. D'ailleurs, vous le savez sans doute, mais les prochaines heures seront plutôt calmes de notre côté. Nous finalisons les procédures d'entrée et devrions pouvoir vous les présenter d'ici environ 8 heures. D'ici là, il ne se passera pas grand-chose, vous pourrez donc en 
... थ्रस्ट सामान्य; डेल्टा-वी थ्रस्ट, दो, बंद; पिच और यॉ ऑटो; गिम्बल मोटर्स पिच और यॉ बंद; डेल्टा-वी/सीजी, /सीएसएम; ईएलएस लॉजिक, बंद; ईएलएस ऑटो से मैनुअल; लॉजिक बंद, नीचे; प्रणोदक डंप, ब
정말 많은 별들을 봤어요... 남반구의 별들도 봤고, 여름철 삼각형도 봤고... 베가, 북십자성도 봤네요. 이제 제가 
了解です。まず主要なイベントの時刻を簡単に確認し、その後、戻って詳細を補足します。さて、進入インターフェースは142時間40分、つまり6時間半前です。そのおよそ6時間半前に、ヒーター電源を投入し、CM/の温度をチェックして、必要に応じてCM/を予熱することで、このプロセス全体を開始します。おそらくそうすることになるでしょう。詳細な手順は後ほど説明します。約6時間前頃に、前回の中間コースで使用した修正版/30分チェックリストを使用して、電源投入を開始します。その後、少し前、5時間前頃に、前回と同様に地球ターミネーターを使用して、体軸アラインメントの姿勢をとってください。それができ次第、-7を実行します。これは、今のところ約2フィート/秒、つまり約15秒間の噴射のようです。そして、今は1.5フィートまで下がっているとのことなので、余裕でマージン内です。わかりました。それを実行すると、すぐにサービスモジュールの分離姿勢への操作を開始します。通常よりも早く分離するため、平面状態になります。平面外のコンポーネントは不要であり、望んでいません。つまり、サービスモジュールが半径ベクトルに沿って外側を向いた状態で平面状態になります。その後、コマンドモジュールのチェックアウトとホットファイアを含む、サービスモジュールSEPの準備を開始します。そして、約4時間30分前にサービスモジュールを分離します。サービスモジュールを捕捉するまで機首を上げ、写真を撮ろうとしますが、写真を撮るために移動操作はしません。飛行経路の角度を崩したくないからです。わかりました。こ
Okay, Punkt 8. Wir möchten hier vor Ort eine kleine Übung durchführen, um sicherzustellen, dass wir das Band rechtzeitig auslesen und die Sprachaufzeichnung nach Houston übermitteln können. Wir planen also, Ihr Band auszulesen und werden den Ablauf vor Ort üben, um es hierhe
Rog
D'accord, NOUN 01, ENTRÉE; 3011, ENTRÉE; 44, ENTRÉE. Voilà la procédure pour élargir la zone morte à 5 degrés. Plus tard, avant la gravure, vous ramènerez la zo
أرى ذلك المجس الموجود على دعامة Y السالبة. لقد انكسر و
यह तो बहुत ही मज़ेदार खे
No. Fred hasn't seen anything else from the descent stage. And I understand that we can expect the - 
Okay, PDI-Pad: 102:33:04.36; 09:50; minus 0002.1; 182, 287, 000; plus 56919. PDI kleiner als 10: 105:12:30.00. PDI-Abbruch größer als 10: 103:40:00.00, 107:11:30.00. Kein PDI-Abbruch plus 12: 10
了解。着陸装置は下ろしてロックしました、ジャック。11ページ
जी हाँ। जाहिर तौर पर
Okay. And those are all the chang
Aquarius，我们需
Yes, just a second. Just a second - Your MASTER is ON; your INTERCOM is ON; your VHF is ON; your PAD COMM is OFF; your S-B
أود أن أشير إلى أن مستوى الضوضاء خلال المرحلة ال
62970، ناقص 162، زائد 129، زائد 00966، زائد 00552، ناقص 02079. الثلاثة التالية كلها أصفار، غير متوفر، زائد 00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013، لأعلى 04.7، لليمين 3.9، زائد 1418، ناقص 16505، زائد 12904، زائد 36160. سيريوس، ريجل، 136 310 340، لا شيء، يتطلب إعادة توجيه إلى المفضل. نقط
我对北非的白天非常熟悉。我刚刚完成了D-9阿波罗地标任务，目标14。这次探测非常
您的指挥飞行员用餐时间为00
Roger, Jim. Rechnen Sie einfach damit, dass eine V
Хорошо. В третьем ряду, под COMM: DISPLAY, открыто; SE AUDIO, закрыто; VHF A TRANSMITTER, открыто — это изменение — VHF B RECEIVER, открыто; PRIMARY S-BAND, POWER AMPLIFIER, открыто; TRANSMITTER/RECEIFER, закрыто; S-BAND ANTENNA, открыто; PMP, закрыто; TV, открыто. Под: DISPLAYS, открыто; GLYCOL PUMP SECONDARY, открыто; LOC PUMP, открыто; CABIN FAN CONTROL, открыто; CABIN REPRESS, закрыто; и все следующие четыре также закрыты. Проч
حسنًا. قراءة أوامر القياس عن بُعد إلى وضع الإيقاف؛ VHF AM B، في المنتصف؛ كتم
Très bien. C'es
Эд, ты видишь, что происходит с твоей стороны космического корабл
Roger. And I ha
설마 이 나침반이 작동하고 있다는 건 아니겠죠? 좀 더 설명해야겠네요. 제가 지금까지 해왔던 건 표준 광원을 꺼내는 거였어요. 지금 캡슐 안에서, 그리고 제가 똑바로 위를 보고 있는 제 얼굴 쪽
ジャック、それはアクティベーション
Roger. Adresse 72, 25729; Adresse 94, 00025; Adresse 97, 00011; Adresse 52, Minus 00000; Adresse 73, 03015. A
Jim est toujours favorable aux atterrissages
Nothing.
네. 
我的意思是，它们看起来都干净了。我猜它们烧制得非常干净，以至于看起来……完全……没有颜色差异……铜色、青铜色，氧气池的颜色。我亲眼看着它们烧制完
तो चलिए,
भाई,
C
حسنًا
I'm going to go to S
Согласен. Думаю, для возвращения в атмосферу нам не нужна действительно 
أما هيوستن؟ فالوضع هنا جيد. الضغط 3.78 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة، بنسبة 63%، ولا توج
了解しました。アポロ8号、時計を更新したいと思います
Хорошо. Я яростно трясу головой во все стороны, с закрытыми глазами, вверх и вниз, тангаж, крен, рыскание. Ничего в животе; ничего нигде. Теперь есть… я попробую нажать кнопку «ноль», к
L'horizon se dess
Roger. Das machen wir, 
OK, Houston, l
The Hasselblad hung up on that one. I d
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티 기지. 아직 하지 않으셨다면, 지금 바로 연료 및 산소 배출구를 모두 닫아주십시오. 이상
حسناً، سأطلب
Род
Okay, Jim. Tha
Hawaii Cap Com, Hawaii Cap
わかりました。DESCENT QUANTITY
برج ال
حسنًا يا جاك. الفترة الزمنية بين الساعة 2:30 قبل ساعة واحدة مزدحمة للغاية، لذا عليك الإسراع، وقد قررنا حذف فحص الدخول عند الساعة 2:30 قبل ساعة واحدة. هذا سيوفر لك بعض الوقت. ما قررنا فعله هو الانتظار حتى بعد الساعة 1 
Die O
АВТОМАТИЧЕСКИЙ КОМПЛЕКТ ДЛЯ ИЗГОТОВЛЕНИЯ АВТОМАТИЧЕСКИХ ЦЕПЕЙ
Th
はい。10ステップくらいですが、とて
S
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Nous
Bon, je vais vous montrer ça pendant que je parle. Ça fonctionne comme un appareil photo. Le réglage de l'ouvertur
まだアンタレスを拾ってないんだけど、あと5分く
로
Mâcher un peu de chewing-gum
روجر، ترانكويليتي. لا داعي للقلق. سنجد حلاً - سنجد
Des nuances de Gemini retrofire, êtes-vous sûr que nous sommes - (rires) - Non, voyons voir - les moteurs pointent dans cette direction et les gaz s'échappent dans cette direction, impri
D'accord. Les quatre CHAUFFAGES seront fermés; les AFFICHAGES, ouverts; l'ANTENNE BANDE S, fermée; la SÉQUENCE CAMÉRA sera ouverte; l'AFFICHAGE sera ouvert; la VOLTIFICATION DU BUS CC sera fermée; l'ONDULEUR 2 sera ouvert; l'ECA D'ASCENSION sera fermé, mais la COMMANDE ECA D'ASC
우
फ्रेडो,
I thought we'd be close enough so that when we got out
Das heißt, CB,, ASCENT ECA CONT
그리고 비상 정지는 닐, 10초를 더한 시간이고, 델타-VC에서는 10초에서
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Слышу, что реч
로저. REPRESS PACKAGE를 포함시키셨군요. 좋습니다. 글리콜 저장소 입력 밸브는 닫힘으로, 바이패스
ह्यूस्टन, आ
حسنًا. إما أنني نسخت رقم قاطع الدائرة بشكل خاطئ، أو أنني لا أستطيع قراءته. إنه تقريبًا في الرقم 20 من الأسفل، بعد اللوحة 276، حيث كُتب "قاطع دائرة التحكم في الطاقة 3 و4، مف
罗杰。哦，对，没错，我也没吃那片吐司。那片吐司就是我
حسنًا. استخدم قائمة التحقق المعدلة / قائمة التحقق الخاصة ب
맞아요. 그런 차는 몇 안 되죠. 그런데 가운데 창문이 심하게 뿌옇
好的。2.1 英里，每秒 45 英尺
了解。演習はいつ開始されますか？23番線に出向き、これを設置します。それから続けま
مرحباً يا ووم
ОТМЕТЬТЕ! 39:30 — это ваше время TR. Ваши часы TR синхронизированы со всеми часами на Земле, и время, прошедшее с момента запуска вашего космическ
分かりました。バッテリーの状態で
了解しました。ドッキング解除のために、これらをゼロに設定します。質問ですが、404、405
C'est juste ici. Tu le v
Давление в топливном баке с жидким кислородом сост
मुझे आश्चर्य है कि क्या वह प्रयोग P1 के लिए
はい。ねえ、聞いて。私が今
كولومبيا، هيوستن. نظام تحديد المواقع التلقائي (AUTO) مُفعّل. T
罗杰。你最好开始做准备工作，我们接下来就一
휴스턴, 
Наша телеметрия показывает отрицательное значение тангажа в 
Okay. They'
了解。ヨー角を180°に保ち
В воздухе плавают довольно крупные обломки. План полета составлен. Гироскопы отключатся в 12:33, и я буду использовать систему управления по проводам, чтобы отслеживать ускоритель. Я... это не очень хорошая задача на отслеживание. Наши скорости слишком бли
了解。地平線
Vorrei fare un piccolo commento sul sestante. Il suo utilizzo in una navicella spaziale angusta è molto difficile, soprattutto con il casco. Alla fine ho deciso che sarebbe stato inutile con il casco per cercare di catturare gli angoli richiesti dalle stelle. Così mi sono tolto il casco. Questo mi ha dato un po' più di flessibilità nell'uso, ma ero comunque limitato ad angol
Und Jack, zu deiner Frage bezüglich der Plattfo
好的，吉姆
Va bene. Suggerisco il caricatore R o il caricatore S da A-13. Trasferisci tutto questo al e /DC/80/BW 5.6 al 250°
ठीक है, जब भी OAMS 120 फीट/सेकंड से 
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐
Роджер, спасибо. Рад видеть, что
알겠
알
D'accord, Aquarius. Voici ce que nous allons faire. Nous aimerions que vous orientiez l'axe X vers le nord ou le sud. Il s'agit de l'axe X positif. Il nous semble plus simple d'orienter l'axe X positif vers le sud. Faites-le avec l'appareil allumé. Ensuite, nous proposons de l'éteindre pour économiser de l'énergie. Cependant, cela signifie que nous perdrons l'utilisation de la télécommande et que nous devrons piloter le vaisseau avec la raquette de commande en mode DIRECT. Veuillez nous indiquer votre position sur ces deux 
고이득 모드로 설정해 주시면 좋겠습
没错，吉姆。我——你的态度是对的，你明白我说的在做完400加5之后，再做400加全球吗？也就是说，
हेलो, कैं
روجر. تمتد هذه
难怪地
그거 참 재밌겠네요. 당신과 스콧이 왜 좋아하는지 알겠어요. 지금 저한테 착각이 생겼어요. 미국을 보고 있는데, 표류 속도 때문에 기수가 살짝 위로 솟구치고 있네요. 그리고 달
로저. 목소리가 좀 거칠게 들리네요. 산소 유량 센서 상태가 꽤 안 좋아진 것 같습니다. 방금 전 마지막 물 축압기 작동 때 확인해 봤는데, 간신히 0.2를 조금 넘는 수준
好了，阿波罗8号。我们现在准备进行通信检查，您可以选择：我们可以喊出开关指令，让您手动操作；或者我们可以从地面控制。无论
休斯顿的朋友们，接下来我要给家里的孩子们，或者说给全世界所有的孩子们做一个小小的示范。我本来想教你们怎么用勺子喝水，但我怕勺子
... pressures are good. Busy in steering, 
Avez-vous déjà reçu votre t
Роджер. Скопировано для регулировки высоты GET: скорость вращения двигателя 03 плюс 03 плюс 19; дельта-V 0,8, длительность 0 плюс 01; рыскание 00, тангаж 00; ядро ​​25, 00008; 26 и 27, все 
Roger. In riferi
了解しました。ここまでの本の大半は確認済みです。再突入エリアに入
Roger. Bitte a
حسنًا. هذه مجموعة أدواتك الودية للصيانة الذاتية، مع إجراء مقترح في حالة نقص هيدروكسيد الليثيوم. وضعك جيد. قرأنا 1.8 مليمتر، وهذا يكفيك لبقية الرحلة. مع ذلك، ولتوخي الحذ
スポーツでは、ヒューストン・オイラーズがカービルでのプレシーズン序盤のトレーニングに意欲を見せており、ウォーリー・レム監督は優秀な新人選手たちに感銘を受けていると語った。ナショナルリーグの昨日木曜日の試合は、セントルイス 11、フィラデルフィア 3、モントリオール 5、ピッツバーグ 4、アトランタ 12、シンシナティ 2、サンフランシスコ 14、ロサンゼルス 13。アメリカンリーグは、ボルチモア 3、クリーブランド 2、デトロイト 4、ワシントン 3、ミネソタ 8、シカゴ 5。ボストン対ニューヨークの試合は雨天中止となった。そしてイギリスのコービーでは、アイルランド人のジョン・コイルが、10分間の制限時間内に
혹시 더 자세한
D'accord. On va intervenir sur la m
ठीक है। टीवी रेंडेज़वस ट्रांसपोंडर फ़्लाइट बस, खुला; पैनल 225 पर टीवी ए
Yes, you are alm
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous vous suggérons de ne pas tenir compte de la limite de 60 degrés et de laisser le lanceur s'élever au-dessus de cette
Roger. Ich denke, das wären die Neuigkeiten für heute,
Мы ожидаем, что ваш расход воды снизится, и в ближайше
了解。現在、自動操縦、再突入姿勢、ジャイロは正常、操縦
Go ahead, Canary Surgeon. Gemin
よし、ジョー。袋をキャニスターにかぶせるんだ。アーチが袋の底にくるように、耳がア
Ich weiß nicht... ich hätte es fast nicht mehr ausgehalten. Ich dachte, ich würde wirklich mitmache
حسناً، هذا هو ضغط دمك. شربت حوالي عشرين رشفة من الم
Giroscopi normali. 
좋습니다. 제 오른쪽으로는 피레네 산맥이 보이고, 지금 메시에 봉과 피커링 봉을 거의 지나고 있습니다. 우리의 첫 번째 초기 지점은 이 고도에서 쉽게 보입니다. 명암 경계선에 가까워지면서 명암 대비가 상당히 뚜렷하게 나타나고 있습니다. 시야는 좋아 보입니다. 햇빛이 눈에 반사되지 않고, 이 지점의 가시거리가 매우 좋은 것 같습니다. 첫 번째 초기 지점을 아주 쉽게 찾을 수 있고, 이 산맥 너머로는 두 번째 초기 지점인 삼
Roger. Bi
Two tenths of a percent, 
Roger, Houston. We have those two circuit break
Das ist Friendship Seven. Das stimmt. Es ist wieder abgedriftet. Damals stimmte es; jetzt ist es offenbar a
적어도 역사격이나 다른 모든 작전에 
जी हाँ, क्
どこにもそうしろと書いてあるようには見えないけど、まあいいんじゃない？最初の段階でやるべきだっ
جيم، الخطوة التالية التي نرغب في تنفيذها هي نقل بعض الطاقة إلى وحدة التحكم الرئيسية (MAIN B) حتى نتمكن من بدء شحن البطارية، وأعتقد أنه من الأفضل أن نبدأ بهذا الأمر عندما ينضم إليك شخص آخر لمساعدتك. لذا، عندما تقرر استدعاء الآخري
알았어. 알겠어. 프레드, 지금 어느
双子座 
Остаточное количество топлива при нулевых остатках на 80, 81,
Sept. H
Roger. Je vais relire 41 Delta, 41 Delta 83. 1+41. 
Okay. Okay, BAT Charlie voltage. Seems like we're having a differen
イーグル
كلامك غير واضح يا هيوستن،
로저. 달과 같은 먼 거리에서 OMNI 장비를 사용해도 저비트 전송률의 음성 통화가 가능할
Houston, Apollo 11. Siete pronti a copiare qualche numero sul rapporto sullo sta
Gemini 4
Okay. Der Hauptstromkreis hier unten sieht immer noch sehr gut aus, also scheint alles in Ordnung zu sein. Die Ladung von Batterie B sollte in etwa abgeschlossen sein, und wir r
Voglio cons
물병자리. 
Rog
罗杰。我们完全同意。在你开始操
네. 다음 페이지는 사소한 점 하나를 제외하고는 완전히 동일합니다. R1에서 참가자 체크리스트가 추가되었습니다. 그 외에는 모두 동일하며, 세 번째 페이지
Хорошо. В разделе «проверки», в четвертой строке снизу написано «РУЧНОЕ НАСТРОЙКА, три, до МИНИМАЛЬНОГО ИМПУЛЬСА». Нам придется использовать «КОМАНДУ УСКОРЕНИЯ», и причина этого, Джек, в том, что у нас нет питания, поэтому нет генератора м
好的，刚才我在楼上的时候，注意到维修模块那边好像有新的通风口。我是从1号窗户往外看的，还看到一块大约4英寸见方的金属块在地上翻滚，是银色的，看起来像是从维修模块里面掉
Ich weiß wohl nicht, wie man es einschaltet. Ich habe PCM, ANTILOG-AUFNAHME, VORWÄRTS; hohe Bit
Das sind 3,5. Befindet sich Ihr Fahrzeug i
我完
ऐसा ही होना चाहिए - आप सही कह रहे हैं, क्योंकि अब 
Okay. Die Datensicherung ist abgeschlossen, und Sie haben das Tonbandgerät zurück. Sie können es nach Belieben verwenden. Eventuell müssen wir die Datensicherung noch einmal durchführen. In diesem Fall verwenden wir dieselben Informationen, es sei denn, Sie möchten später noch etwas anderes hinzufügen. Die Sprachqualität ist sehr
それは良いことだ。十
Roger. Two-Bravo: 90
Ge
嗯，我测得温度
できた？ よかっ
Friendship Seven, wenn ihr bereit seid, könnten wir diesen
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。まだそこ
네, 일어나신 시간이 2분 정도
Aquarius, we nee
هذه ه
好的。日出时间比TI
カナリアです。どう読みます
C
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نحن جاهزون في غولدستون للبث التلفزيوني. سيتم تسجيل البث في غولدستون ثم يُعاد عرضه هنا، نيل، متى شئت تش
Roger. Stavo giusto registrando qualcosa. L'unica cosa insolita che ho notato è uno strato di foschia piuttosto alto, che sembrerebbe essere di circa 7 o 8 gradi sopra l'orizzonte sul lato notturno. Riesco a vedere le st
Wir sollten die Nacht 
बज़, हमा
Go ah
Columbia, Houston. Zunächst einmal möchten wir, dass die Abwasserentsorgung auf der Rückseite auf 10 Prozent eingestellt wird. Zweitens sieht es derzeit nicht so aus, als ob ein Flugzeugwechsel nötig wäre, daher werden wir kein neues Flugzeug hochladen. Drittens: Bitte stellen Sie alle Ihre Kryoheizungen auf AUTO. Wir sind bereit für den Ladevorgang der Batterie Bravo; sie hält etwa 7 Stunden. Sollten Sie schlafen gehen, werden wir den Ladevorgang der Batterie Bravo abbrechen. Im Moment können wir ihn jedoch bereits starten. Und noch eine letzte Sache: Für Ihre Ruhezeit konfigurieren Sie bitte Register 1 auf 11111 und Register 2 auf 01100. Ihre AUTO-Wahlsc
Roger. BLOCK, los geht
रॉजर, रेव 33, रन 4, प्रारंभ समय 19:43:00, यानी सूर्यास्त का समय। समाप्ति 0-20। मैं दोहराता हूँ 20:19:00, यानी सूर्योदय का समय। क्या आपने सुना
يا أصدقاء ا
لا، أنا آسف. كنت أراقب فقط مثبت الكاميرا الأو
क्या पृथ
Чарли, Аполлон-11. У меня пара вопросов по остановке. Мне кажется, самый простой способ остановить его — мы, по сути, находимся в положении 0 градусов рыскания и приближаемся к 90 градусам тангажа, так что это просто вопрос остановки примерно на 260 градусах крена, и — как насчет процедуры: «РУЧНОЕ УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ПОЛОЖЕНИЕМ», затем три «КОМАНДА СКОРОСТИ», а затем, поскольку наша зона нечувствительности уже спала, я включу двигатели на панели 8, после чег
好的。布鲁斯，我们即将看到蓄水池的活动情况，它一度上升到
好的。上次乔的执行时间是-4.5小时；以每秒0.5英尺的速度推进，四喷嘴空腔；然后执行SEP，接着以每秒0.5英尺的速度拉动，这是相对于某个术语而言的；
Houston, Apo
Roger. Nous observons le centre de la Terre depuis le vaisseau spatial dans l'est de l'océan Pacifique. Nous n'avons pas pu distinguer visuellement l'archipel d'Hawaï, mais nous voyons clairement la côte ouest de l'Amérique du Nord: les États-Unis, la vallée de San Joaquin, la Sierra Nevada, la Basse-Californie et le Mexique jusqu'à Acapulco, ainsi que la péninsule du Yucatán. On aperçoit également l'Amérique centrale et la côte nord de l'Amérique du Sud, le Venezuel
Ciao Jerry. Quando vuoi alzare il VHF
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है।
로저, 하와이입니다. 제 전기 상태가 어떤지 알
ठीक है, ह
Den Fahnenmast mein
حسناً. سنتوقف هنا عند تفريغ الماء، فقط للتأكد من أن فتحة تهوية البطارية - الخط نظيف كما هو موضح بضغط فتحة تهوية البطارية الذي يساوي صفرًا
On aperçoit toujours le lanceur… c'était bien le lanceur. Je vois ses lumières clignoter. Il disparaît à l'horizon. Juste avant qu'il ne disparaisse dans l'obscurité, le reflet du soleil sur le lanceur crée une image très lumineuse. C'est l'objet que j'avais vu tout à l'heure. On semble encore assez près d
血圧は正常です。司令パイロットから、食事、水分、睡眠に関する詳細な報告をお願いし
Cape Cap Com,
ヘリウムバルブ、オー
An
जिम, तुम आग लगाने के लिए तैयार हो जाओ। आग लगाने के ल
D'accord, Fred. On va essayer de ne plus t'appeler, pour
Roger. Amitié Sept. Je vais faire une prise de tension. Il me reste encore quelques particules non identifiées qui circulent de temps en temps au
We want your recorders in the position you are in righ
आपने कहा कि आप नए REFSMMAT के साथ उसी रवैये के साथ काम करवाना चा
Okay. Nach PC + 2 gibt es keine Trimmvorgaben mehr. Sollte es während PC + 2 zu einem Triebwerksausfall kommen, sind nachfolgende Mittelkursmanöver erforderlich – das frühestmögliche wäre PC + 4. Falls Sie kein PC + 2 durchführen, wir aber dennoch eines wünschen, erfolgt dies später. Bei PC + 4 beträgt die Erhöhung von DELTA-V (Delta-V) bzw. die Strafe etwa 24 Fuß pro Sekunde, mit einer Landung im mittler
Ok, vedo anche i
Puoi
علي، حسناً، أنا سعيد 
Роджер. На второй звезде, шестой отметке, мы пропустили DEL
حسنًا يا برج الدلو
よし、ジム。司令官
Roger. Pourriez-vous me donn
アク
MAIN B
जाने से पहले मैं यहाँ अ
알았다
Tutto que
收到。我明白了。我们会将这两个断路器保持打开
ठीक है। हम
Роджер, Нил. Начнём: Весь день в Белый дом непрерывно п
Mancano 13 gradi alla palla, e credo che sia più o meno la distanza giusta. Guardando l'ombra e così via, 
了解、フレンドシップ・セブン。報告を続
D'accord. Pourquoi ne pas remettre le véhicule en position d'attente et le remettre en mode maintien d'attitude pour le roulement? Nous allons ensuite réexaminer les exigences. Il semble que les résultats soient sensiblement les mêmes à chaque fois, d'après une analyse rapide. Nous allons donc vérifier à nouveau s'il es
Le scintillemen
Roge
Gemi
حسنًا. ممتاز. وبينما تتناقشون في ال
D'accord. C'est réglé... J'ai fait m
你告诉小迈克尔
अच्छा, हमारे एंटीना नीचे लटके हुए हैं और... ये ठीक नहीं ह
Roger. Wir empfehlen Ihnen daher, mit Ihrer Zustimmung heute
ठीक है। आप यूएचएफ रेंज में आ रहे हैं। संक्षिप्त रिपोर्ट जारी रख
لديك فترة تناول طعام للطيار القائد من الساعة 00:15
它大约8秒钟转一圈。它翻滚着，翻来覆去。看起来我们现在比之前更远了
Roger, Jack. The venting really seems to... I reported earlier, I also spotted the large piece g
54포인트 차이로 
حسنًا، عزم الدوران Z هو +
Jerry, une autre caractéristique d'identification: ces petits cratères d'impact présentent des taches sombres au centre, là où il s
Roger. Avevamo 2 minuti e 23 sec
Okay, 13; Houston. You're GO for SEP whenever you're ready
Eagle, Houston. Could you give us a hack on the time that you switched to power 
收到。尼尔用腰带给自己做了个很棒的吊床，他一直躺在上升发动机罩上，而
Roger. Je comprends votre message. Pourriez-vous me restituer votre rapport de gravure? Nous avons noté les résidus et la durée de la gravure, et c'est tout. Merci de me renvoyer le rap
Okay, Jack. What they'd like you to do on this at 49 hours, they've been observing a slight jitter in the optics shaft angle of about 0.2 of a degree plus or minus. Before you come out of the OPTICS ZERO position, at the start of this , they'd like you to just observe the s
罗杰。
حسناً. القراءة صحيحة، لكن دعني
如果以每秒3英尺的速度进行点火，而你在平台上偏离了10度，那么就Delta-V操作而言，我们很难观察到。所以，我们为什么不——在到达发射台时，先把它切换到SEF模式一会儿呢？嗯，就在你应该切换到轨道速率模式前5分钟。好的。我现在就把它
다시 말해봐, 마이
Sie berichteten, dass die Anzugkuppel in ein
... 
और, 13, हम
こんにちは、イーグル。ヒューストン。聞こえますか？オー
また、客室内の温度とスーツの吸気口の温度も
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप
جميع الأنظمة تعمل الآن بشكل ممتاز. أودّ أن أطلعكم على ت
Roger. And next item, the supercritical helium rise rate is nominal, and yo
C'est exact. Reportez-vous à la page S/2-6. En fait, Jack, il s'agit de l'autocollant 
わかった。チャーリー、こ
好吧。如果他们能在这儿撑几个小时
11、ヒューストン。ここで申し上げているのは、ローゲート前に1軸の制御を失った場合、着陸中止を推奨するということです。これは2機のジェット機の失速を必要としますが、可能性は低いですが、その
في عالم الرياضة، يُظهر فريق هيوستن أويلرز حماسًا كبيرًا في تدريباته التحضيرية للموسم الجديد في كيرفيل، ويُعرب المدرب والي ليم عن إعجابه بمجموعة اللاعبين الجدد المميزة. أما في مباريات دوري البيسبول الوطني يوم الخميس الماضي، فقد فاز سانت لويس على فيلادلفيا بنتيجة 11-3، ومونتريال على بيتسبرغ بنتيجة 5-4، وأتلانتا على سينسيناتي بنتيجة 12-2، وسان فرانسيسكو على لوس أنجلوس بنتيجة 14-13. وفي الدوري الأمريكي، فاز بالتيمور على كليفلاند بنتيجة 3-2، وديترويت على واشنطن ب
مر
La pression artérielle s'arrête. Bien, nous allons faire osciller 
Apol
…とてもよく動いているけど、誰か
1分钟——
Горизонт здесь очень, очень резкий. Небо кромешная тьма, а земля — или, вернее, луна, простите, — совершенно светлая; контраст между небом и луной — это яркая, темная линия. Теперь в поле зрения камеры появляются интересные старые двойные кольцевые кратеры, довольно распространенные в районе морей образования, заполненные материалом той же консистенции и цвета, что и моря. Вот три или четыре таких интересных образования. Дальше на горизонте вы видите... Горы, которые поднимаются выше, сильно изрыты многочисленными кратерами, центральные вер
Okay, if you think the platform i
OMNI Char
45 40 GET 세타, 7.5; 범위, 1000.01; 총 델타-V는 430이었고, 델타-VI는 202.1이었습니다. 각도 변화
저는 거의 수직으로 아래를 내려다보고 있
درجة حرارة مدخل البدلة 72 درجة. درجة حرار
Roger, Jim. Je garde ces documents ouverts jusqu'à ce que vous me donniez d'autres instructio
Roger. During your pass we would like to perform a UHF check. I wou
لا، ربما لاحظتُ ذلك، في نهاية الجولة السادسة أو
Roger. Je te lis aussi le
Ich habe zwar noch keinen Schnupfen, aber ich fühle mich so nah dran wie nie zuvor. Ich glaube, es liegt an diesem verdammten 100-prozentigen Sauerstoff. Ich atme ihn ein und meine Nase war noch nie so trocken. Bei der schlimmsten Erkältung meines Lebens, wo ich kaum 
D'accord, Jack; Houston. On a 
みんなも同じことを考えていると
Roger. Wir ha
로저. 글리콜 온도는 50도로 설
... तुम्हारे वाले में एक संतरा है
제 생각에 이 암석 지대는 우리가 최종 하강 시에 지나쳤던 크고 날카로운 모서리를 가진 암석 테두리 분화구에서 유래했을 가능성이 있습니다. 어제 제가 그 분화구가 축구장 크기 정도라고 말씀드렸는데, 솔직히 말해서 실제로 측정하기는 조금 어려웠습니다. 하지만 우리가 지나갈 때 아스트로돔 안에 들어갈 수 있을 것 같다고 생각했습니다. 그리고 이 암석 테두리 분화구 주변의 암석들은 이 지역의 암석들보다 훨씬 큽니다. 어떤 것은 3미터 정도 되고, 어쩌면 더 클 수도 있습니다. 이런 암석들은 분화구
ठीक है। इतने ज
그리고 작동
एक्वेरियस, हम अपने संचार को बेहतर बनाने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। क्
In effetti, Vance, trovo sempre il mio... trovo s
そこに赤いフィル
रॉ
لا أعتقد أنك تلقيت أي معلومات عن أوقات شروق الشمس وغروبها
Roger. We're reading you much better now. Jim can go ahead with his transmission to the guidance troops. They have one question before he starts. They wo
わかりました。
了解しました。ワシントンでは、上院財政委員会が所得税付加税の延長を承認しましたが、上院での採決は現時点では難しそうです。オースティンでは、ヒューストン選出のレイ・レモン州議会議員がアメリカ海洋学会の理事に指名されました。レモン氏は、テキサス州に海洋学研究所を設立する可能性について調査することを提案しています。これはメキシコ湾西部で初めての海洋学研究所となります。ミネソタ州ミネアポリスの気象局は、今日の天気を最高気温88度、最低気温72度と発表した後、「降雪：なし」と発表しました。フロリダ州セントピーターズバーグからは、ノルウェーの探検家トール・ヘイエルダールからの無線報告が届きました。ヘイエルダールのパピルス船「ラー号」の乗組員は、荒波による被害にもかかわらず、バルバドスのブリッジタウンに入港する予定であるとのことです。ただし、乗組員は護衛船で就寝する予定です。探検隊の航海士、ノーマン・ベイカー氏は、乗組員が今日「ラー」号に乗り込み、先週の嵐でマストの土台が割れた損傷の修復作業を行っていると述べた。破損したマストの一部は海に投げ出され、船はバルバドスの東725マイルの海上にいた。「ラー号で眠ることは可能だが、快適
맞아요, CAP COM, 총을 조종하는 건 정말 쉬워요. 유일한 문제는 연료가 부족하다는 거예요. 연료가 다 떨어져서 우주선 앞쪽으로 돌아서 뒤쪽으로 이동한 다음 어댑터 꼭대기까지 겨우 올라왔어요. 거의… 짐의 시야에 다시 들어왔네요. 연료가 좀 더 있었으면 좋았을 텐데. 이건 제가 겪어본 최고의 경험이에요… 정말 대단해요! 지금 저는 거꾸로 서서 아래
Canary，你手动加注燃油到 54%
모든 시스템이 정상적으로 작동하는 것 같습
Bene. Leggo di nuovo: 11, G&N: 37200, meno 060, più 047, più 098, 05 2422, più 41448, più 03719, meno 02422; 
이제 잠망경을 좀 사용해 보려고 합니다. 잠망경을 통해 보이는 광경은 꽤 특이
Roger. Hier ist das Format, das wir dir für den rollenden Wiedereintritt schicken. Wir geben dir die ∆V und ∆T für deinen OAMS-Brennvorgang. Wir geben dir die GMTRC. Wir geben dir eine Wiedereintrittsbeschleunigung (RET) von 0,05 g. Und dann bekommst du auch noch die Wiedereintrittsbeschleunigung für den Bremsfallschirm, das Haupttriebwerk und die Landung. Dein Verfahren ist: Bremsen, um vollen Auftrieb zu erreichen, Kopf nach unten. Bei der Wiederei
D'accord. On veut que vous mettiez le système sous tension. On veut q
收到。准备复制
حسنًا. +90: /G&N، 63825، -1.54
300 फीट नीचे, 3-1/2, 47 आगे। आगे 
아니요, 여분을 남
O
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Мы вас видим. Вам может потребоваться пара минут, чтобы интегрировать эти векторы, которые мы вам дали, и если вы не достигнет
아니요, 사실 그렇지 않습니다. 지난번에 그걸 치운 이후로 그 지역
And then it looked like all apparent motion had stopped and we were probably closing. So I turned the spacecraft around and made an attempt to aline the platform. In the meantime, the booster started dropping down below us at a rather obvious rate. So I gave up trying to aline the platform to line up and thrust down toward the booster, and I retrofired slightly to slow down with it. Once again, it looked like our rates were stopped. But by now we had
こちらフレンドシップセブン。陰性です。飛行中はずっと普通に感じていました。大丈夫です。オーバー
أودّ التعليق قليلاً على السدس. استخدامه في مركبة فضائية ضيقة أمرٌ بالغ الصعوبة، خاصةً مع ارتداء الخوذة. قررتُ في النهاية أنه سيكون عديم الفائدة مع ارتداء الخوذة لمحاولة تحديد الزوايا المطلوبة للنجوم. لذا خلعتُ خوذتي. منحني هذا بعض المرونة في استخدامه، لكنني بقيتُ مقيدًا بزوايا تتراوح بين 20 و23 درجة تقريبًا دون تحريك المركبة الفضائية. ما كان يحدث هو أن الجزء العلوي من النافذة كان يحجب النجم. الآن، من خلال تحريك المركبة الفضائية بشكل متكرر وأكثر مرونة، يُمكن توجيهها بحيث يكون المحور الطولي للنافذة ضمن مستوى التتبع. كنا مقيدين إلى حد ما بالوقود، ولم نختر المناورة بهذه الطريقة. استخدمنا وضع النبض أيضًا، دون الكثير من المناورات. كانت النجوم المختارة لتلك الرحلة ذات زوايا عالية نسبيًا، مما جعل الأفق صعب الرصد. قررنا أخيرًا تقريب النجوم قليلًا من الأفق. أجريتُ بعض القياسات على كوكبة كانوبوس، وبعضه
Роджер. Именно поэтому у нас самые приоритетные дела находятся в этом разделе. Мы считаем, что у вас гораз
알겠습니다, 마이크. 그리
ええ、その点についてはもう少し作業を進めています。まだすべてが失われたとは言い切れません。問題は、内蔵の露出計で感知される光強度が、地球よりもはるか
저것들이 올라가는 것처럼 보이
밴스, 첫 번째를 이해하세요. 그리고 그 누구도 생물의학 
C'est exact. Sur le pannea
어떤 걸 선택하셨어요? 60? 6
罗杰，吉姆，这是
是的，先生；我
根据
Gem
حسنًا. تأكد من وجود طاقة التيار المتردد، أي أن العاكس 2 مُفعّل وأن وصلة ربط ناقل التيار المتردد A الخاصة بالعاكس 2 مغلقة. سنكون تحت شاشات العرض، وجهاز التحك
रॉजर। ठीक है, जैक। और मैं अभी दाईं ओर देख रहा हूँ - नहीं, नंबर 4 डिटेंट, और
حسنًا. إليك التفاصيل. وضعية الطائرة جيدة جدًا باستثناء الدوران، ونود منك القيام بما يلي: في وضع الدفع الأدنى، نريدك أن تضبط زاوية الميل إلى الصفر، وهو الوضع الحالي تقريبًا؛ وزاوية الدوران إلى 0.08 درجة، أي حوالي 16 درجة من زاوية الدوران الحالية؛ وزاوية الانعراج إلى الصفر، وهو الوضع الح
И, Водолей, чтобы подтолкнуть тебя к размышлениям в этом направлении, мы провели довольно тщательный анализ и выяснили, что будет дешевле оставить вс
ठीक है। बस आर्म 
Okay. Wir haben unsere Triebwerke bereits überprüft
Im Kommandomodul und in den Raumschiffen befanden sich nur sehr wenige Trümmer. Wir fanden lediglich einige lose Teile wie Bolzen, Muttern, Schrau
Hier ist Tanan
11, Houston. Roger, Neil. 8 1/2, 7 und 8 für euren Cr
Wilc
Très bien, nous avons eu quelques frayeurs sur ce circuit de combinaison pour la prem
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया ओम्नी सी में है, चार्ली, वॉइस बैकअप बंद करो और जब आपको समय मिले, तो क्या आप मेरे लिए 130 के निर्देशांक देख सकते हैं? मेरे क्यू कार्ड और फ्
D'accord, Vance. Tu dis qu'on devrait commencer la procédure de préparation (PREP) du manuel de contingence vers [heure manquante]. J'en parle avec Jim dans une minute et on te recontacte. En position de manœuvre, on devrait voir le Soleil juste au-dessus de [distance manquante], et je suppose que c'est le cran numéro 2. Jim et moi en avons déjà parlé, et en observ
Gem
That's right. It is one of the few that is. The center window, unfortunately, is all fogged over; it looks like a coating of ice or coating of heavy f
알겠습
نعم، فتحة العدسة f/8 بسرعة 1/250 ثانية. وبعد ضبط كل شيء، تحقق من فتحة العدسة مرة أخرى لأنها تنزلق وتنفصل بسهول
Ich dachte, wir wären nah genug dran, um draußen den Rand des Gletschers zu sehen, aber das war nicht der Fall. Ich glaube aber nicht, dass wir mehr als eine halbe Meile dahinter sind
……而且目前周围有很多雷暴。闪电实际上照亮了航天
Roger, 11 anni, stai arrivando qui a passo d'uomo. Bellissimo segnale
好的。我们什么都做不了，对吗
أولها - في المرة الأولى التي ينز
Yeah. I can see it t
罗杰，你得把那句话再说一遍。你
Hier spr
무체아 캡콤, 여기는 시그마 세븐입
네. 제가 이걸 보여드리고 있는데, 화면에 보이는 내용을 읽을 수 있는지, 그리고
Roger. Votre orbite ne se dégrade pas aussi
好的，万斯。我们
Не знаю, сможешь ли ты разглядеть эти особенности на Луне, Вэнс, но похоже, что терминаторы находятся
休斯顿
Roger, Frank. We just got finished discussing that, too. We agree with your point of view on that
第20号值班
Salut Fred, c'est clair et net. Je crois compre
Хорошо. Что касается расходных материалов,
मुझे लगता है कि हमें इस 
알겠습니다. 패널 382, ​​즉 물 축압기를 제외하고는 현재 구성이 제대로 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。由于比特率较低，我们无法监测您是否已开始燃料电池吹扫。如果您尚未开始，我们可以现在就开始；如果您可以，请在吹扫过程中随时告
لا، لم أتمكن من الوصول إليه. كنت أحاول توفير
後で始めるつもり
我们会着手处理。一旦有了答案，我们会立即通知
जेमिनी 4, आरकेव
Ok, Jo
잠깐만요,
I should remark that at 3 26 33, I have.in the sky, at any
Bene. L'Apollo 11 rimane la notizia principale, con il mondo che attende il tuo atterraggio oggi, intorno alle 11:49 ora di Houston. A Washington, i riformatori fiscali della Camera hanno elaborato una disposizione che renderebbe impossibile per i ricchi evadere completamente l'imposta sul reddito attraverso investimenti esentasse o agevolazioni speciali. Secondo la proposta adottata provvisoriamente dalla Commissione Finanze della Camera, tutti pagherebbero le tasse 
Apollo 8, Houston. Et si on lançait un 
好的。现在完全明白了。只是想提醒您，如果通讯中断，我们不希望您浪费7点。您目前的记录没问题。我们会按照您原本
Oh, c'est trop pour un vieux comme moi, le vieux Shake
Roger. The moon is very bright and not too distinct in this area. I will
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। अब हो गया। ब
첫 번째 명령 로드가
برج الدلو، هيوستن. لا نسمعك إطلاقاً. نرجو منك العودة إلى وضع خفض الص
알겠습니다. 이해했습
Okay, Odyssey, Houston. Wir sind bereit für die Startaufstellung und das Warm-up. Wenn alles andere gleich ist, möchten wir, dass ihr den JETT-Check auf eurer Checkliste durchge
Rog
निशा
好的。这是初步结果，但可以给你一些参考。修正后的高度为 17 正负 4 公里，正负 4 公里的误差表明你在判断高度方面非常准确。有效高度为 10 正负 12 公里。正如我之前所说，你在选择地平线方面很稳定。星下点误差平均为 15 角分，如果你能将误差率控制在最低，可以
好吧。现在这噪音已经够大了，不能再大了
Roger. I'm reading you. I'm on the main chute at 5,000 [feet]. Status is good. I am not in contact with any recovery forces. Do you have any information on
Der alte Mann hat dich früher geweckt, als nötig gewese
Houston, Apollo 11. Die Batterieladung ist abgeschlossen. Der Statusbericht der Besatzung lautet wie folgt: Strahlung, CDR 11002, CMP 10002, LMP 09
Vous avez bien compris. Tout est en ordre ici. J'imagine que v
Давайте посмотрим на мир спорта. Пока вы были заняты на днях, Джо Намат и комиссар футбола Пит Розелл объявили, что «Бродвейский Джо» согласился продать свою долю в ресторане Bachelors III и перейти в «Нью-Йорк Джетс». Джо прибыл сегодня в тренировочный лагерь «Джетс» и провел свою первую тренировку. Несколько других игроков «Джетс», которые вместе с Джо бойкотировали тренировки, также прибыли. А Дэви Хилл из Джексона, штат Мичиган, выиграл свой третий крупный турнир по гольфу за три старта на прошлой неделе. Он выиграл Philadelphia Classic. Хилл выиграл четыре турнира в этом году и является лидером по сумме выигрыша с внушительными 129 000 долларов. А в бейсболе запад
जैक
La température et le débit d'eau en cabine sont complètement coupés et diminuent légèrement pour revenir à environ 7,
Va 
嗯，看起来情况有所好转。这个数字合理
Houston, Houston, ici A
बस इतना ही? आप इसे कहा
네. 이제 여러분께 전달해 드릴 정보가 꽤 많습니다. 잠들어 있는 조종사는 안면 보호대를 열어두고 장갑을 벗은 상태로 있어 주십시오. 깨어 있는 조종사는 헬멧과 장갑을 벗고 가능하면 경량 헤드셋을 사용하여 통신해 주십시오. 이 상태를 역추진 발사 약 3시간 전까지 유지해 주시기 바
はい
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Le réseau est configuré pour la télévision. Vous pouvez 
А теперь, команда «Базы Спокойствия», Белая команда уходит, и мы позволя
Fred observe actuellement à travers notre ap
حسنًا. الطاقة 6. حسنًا. الطاقة 6 تشير إلى اللوحة 1
Beh, no, non ho provato molte alternative. Anzi, la numero 1 non è buttare via l'urina. Immagino che abbia a che fare con questa connessione con l'UCD o qualcosa del genere. Quando provi a buttare via la tua... normale sacca per l'urina... È così maledettamente puzzolente che mi dispiace pre
وقتي الرجعي هو 04 زائد 32 زائد 38 لوقت الكبسولة، وهو ما يصحح خطأ ثانية
D'acco
休
5 बजे की रिपोर्ट के लिए तैयार। ईंधन 89-90 है। ऑक्सीजन 56-75 (psi, सैकड़े में)। स
好的。我看错钟了，现在
알겠습니다. 잠시 기다
روجر، هيوس
Okay. Press on, Fre
Houston, for informati
今は7時55分半。ハリケーン・ベイブを捉えようとコンタレックスを撃ってみたが、あまりうまくいかなかった。ハリケーン自体はそれほ
コロンビア号とトランクウィリティ号、残り20分でマークを付けます
알겠습니다
Okay. I guess everybody has pretty much envisioned the space program as being all a lot of exotic electronics, and, certainly, a lot of it is. But I thought I'd bring out a couple of items here in conjunction with the. After the first,
감사합니다
Roger. Per quanto riguarda il problema dell'acqua, non possi
Мы проходим нижний слой атмосферы, Джон. Тебе лучше приготовиться к удару. Мы на высоте 2000 футов. Неизвестно,
Unser gesamter Vorbereitung
それをそのままそこに置いたらどうですか。それだけですか？は
ठीक है। ज़रा रुकिए। 11, हमारी एकमात्र चिंता आपके हैच बैग में रखे सामान को लेकर है। आपके और A8 के बीच काफी ज़्यादा सामान है, और हम उसे स्ली
现在一切都很顺利。吉
حسنًا. اضبط معدل البت على معدل بت منخفض. مفتاح وظيفة الصوت على وضع النسخ الاحتياطي للصوت. مفتاح قاطع دائرة مضخمات الطاقة مفتو
2.7. أ
Okay, 
ヒューストン、アポロ11号です。夕方のニュー
حسنًا. تم تركيب قواطع الدائرة الكهربائية ذات الحمل المتوازن الآن يا فانس. الآن تريد منا إعادة توصي
Roger, Tranquility. T4, 106 38 02; T5, 108 36 15; T6, 110 34 30; T7, 112 32
了解、マイク。ト
Okay, the next one is 12 22 00 Apollo Yaw Orientation Night Chec
ठीक है। क्या आप एक मिनट रुक सकते
11, Houston. Der weiße Fleck auf Ihrem Monitor ist laut unseren Fernsehexperten ein Einbrenneffekt; er soll
Probabilme
- - Why don't you try 
现在是7点55分半。我放出康泰克斯相机，想拍到飓风贝贝，但不太成功。飓风本身并
Columbia, Houston. Non devi farne un altro, a meno che tu non voglia. Pausa. E inoltre, Columbia, quando puoi, richiedi BATT
はい、どうぞ写真を撮ってください。静かにしてください
روجر، ما زلت تبدو وسيماً 
وما أردتُ الإشارة إليه، لا أدري إن كان واضحًا، لكن... لإظهار فائدة إجراء جميع عمليات التفريغ قبل الاحتراق مباشرةً، ننظر مجددًا إلى المشهد نفسه فوق القمر في الربع الأول. 
On 
हाँ। उसकी किस्मत अच्छी थी। उसे मुझे एक कप कॉफी पिलाने की कोई ज़रूरत नहीं 
Хорошо. Процедура будет следующая: ENTER, 333 ENTER, затем считать регистр 1. Потом 10 000 — объем памя
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。六分儀の40番星がちょうど消えてしまいまし
Okay. Would you give me of O.05g again, pl
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आप सही हैं; यह 2 है। यह अंतिम मध्यमार्ग सुधार स
Gemini 4, Houston CAP 
حسنًا، ها هو SECO. تم تفعيل أنظمة الدفع الموجبة. أنا الآن في حا
Vorremmo esaminare un altro paio di test e il consenso generale è che non riteniamo ci siano problemi particolari. Vorremmo andare avanti e dare un'occhiata a cosa si ottiene eseguendo altri quattro o cinque test. E prima di ciò, vorremmo eseguire uno di questi test di null bias; e poiché non abbiamo 
MARK! 39:30 is your TR. Your TR clock is synched with all on the gr
네, 짐. 비행 계획에 대한 업데이트가 있습니다. 항성계 가시성 점검을 하셨는데, 현재 Navi가 항성계로 확인되고 있으며, 관련 수치는 
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन। हवाई कै
Okay. Frank, we've got a weather picture here. The forecast shows 2000 scattered and 4000 broken with a high
Roger. Was das Foto angeht, müssen Sie wahrscheinlich die Haltung wiederherstellen, und wenn es dann wieder ins F
ठीक है, फ्रेड। ज
Okay, Jack. Einverstanden. Ich denke, es funktioniert auc
了解しまし
알겠습니다. 7158
太好了。莫斯科方面问起你们的心情和近况。
了解しました、フレッド。マスターアラームのブレーカーを押し込んで、音声と映像が使えるようにすることをお勧めします。
Interruttori automatici: CONTROLLO 
صحيح، صحيح
Я сделал снимок 4, - 4a, это побережье Соединенных Штатов. Предполагаю, что скоро мне придется посмотреть на карту и определить наше местоположение. В этом месте довольно большая облачная масса. Мы снова уберем камеру. Скорость дрейфа недостаточно постоянна, чтобы просто сделать снимок и убрать камеру. К тому 
जेमिनी VI, आपका एक्सेलेरोमीटर बायस अभी भी 
好的，杰克，这是一个比较复杂的操作流程，大概
로저. 콜럼비아호에 거주하시는 여러분께 알려드립니다. 오늘은 콜롬비아 독립기념일입니다. 어젯밤에는 필리핀의 글로리아 디아즈가 미스 유니버스에 선정되었습니다. 그녀는 60명의 경쟁자를 제치고 세계 최고의 미인으로 등극했습니다. 디아즈는 18세이며, 검은 머리와 눈을 가지고 있고, 신체 사이즈는 34.5인치(약 87cm)에 허리 23인치(약 61cm), 엉덩이 34.5인치(약 89cm)입니다. 2위는 호주, 3위는 이스라엘, 4위는 일본이 차지했습니다. 화요일 밤에 돌아오시는 길에 워싱턴에서 아메리칸 리그와 내셔널 리그 올스타전이 열립니다. 뉴욕 양키스의 멜 스토틀마이어가 아메리칸 리그의 선발 투수로 유력합니다. 내셔널 리그 선발 투수는 아직 정해지지 않았습니다. 현재 9명의 선발 투수가 명단에 올라 있습니다. 우주 프로그램의 연구는 분명히 큰 성과를 거두었지만, 연구가 항상 결실을 맺는 것은 아닌 것 같습니다. 10억 개 이상의 나무 스프링 쥐덫을 생산해 온 애니멀 트랩 컴퍼니 오브 아메리카의 모회사인 우드스트림 코퍼레이션은 더 나은 쥐덫을 만들었지만 세상은 그 덫에 관심을 보이지 않았다고 보고했습니다. 사실, 회사는 결국 구식 쥐덫으로 돌아가야 했습니다. 그들은 "쥐 연구에 시간을 덜 쓰고 주부 연구에 더 많은 시간을 썼어야 했다"고 말했습니다. 그리고 "블
ن
It's very surprising, the very surprising lack of penetration of all four of the foot pads. I'd say if we were to try and determine just how far below the surface they wou
D'accord. L'attitude est la suivante: tangage 23,4°, roulis 184,7°, lacet 14,3°. Nous effectuons l'alignement dans cette attitude car la prochaine étape consiste à réaliser le test de visibilité du télescope de balayage. Ce test sera effectué avec un an
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили вариант 1 (предпочтительный) и ус
Roger, Columbia. Here we come with the 11. G&N: 37200, minus 060, plus 047, 098 05 2422, plus 41448, plus 03719, minus 02422. Roll is NA, pitch 020, the rest of the PAD is NA. Set stars are NA. The ullage is two quads - correction, two jets for 16 seconds; use
Roger. ascent PAD: TIG 124 22 00 00 00 NOUN 76 55349 00322, plus 0017; 47, plus 37104, minus 70470, plus 58604, plus 56936. Your weig
分かりました。よく見えませんね。いや、実際はよく見えています。画面の左上から右に小さな点が走っているように見えますが、これはスラス
알겠습니다. 오렌지 주스 빼고는 다 먹었는데, 오렌지 주스도 어디론가 잃어버렸어요. 어디로 갔는지
О, я знаю, в чём дело. Моё колено з
Okay. Bei 1 hatten wir Fotoziel 90 und Terminatorfotografie südlich für den nahen Terminator. Ab 2 hatten wir Ziel 12 und die Ziele 10, 14, 16, 19, 20, 21 und 23. Leider bin ich irgendwo in den Hochgeschwindigkeitsfilm geraten, und ich glaube, die 250-mm-Ziele waren auf Ho
Apollo 11, Houston. We have you stopped in the PTC; attitude looks good to us. Mike, I would like to get a COMM check. The last couple of the transmissions from t
アポロ8号。フライバイ操作を開始します。/63087、マイナス162、プラス129、プラス009 62、プラス005 68、マイナス020 77 000 000 000、11月のアルファ、プラス00202
Roger. Sin
Non stai scherzando! Sono d'accordo. Le cose che sono accadute non erano cose che non avevamo già fatto prima e cose per cui non avevamo ancora elaborato procedure. Le cose che abbiamo fatto, cre
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في جهاز المحاكاة، إن لم يكن بنفس السهولة. لذا أكملنا المهمة حتى النهاية. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفو
حسناً يا جيم. ماذا عن 61 ساعة و30 دقيقة؟
了解しました。再突入収納表
Roger, Frank. Für das Lande
11, Houston. The RETRO's were wondering if you could fill us in on any non n
... over Africa I took one pictu
يا برج الدلو، احذف الإعدادات، ثم اختبر نظام التثبيت/التحكم بالسرعة. تأكد فقط من إغلاق
حسنًا. هذا لا يزال صحيحًا. سنمنحك فرصة أخرى بعد انتظار 5 ثوانٍ، وبعد ذلك، بعد بضع خطوات فقط، وبعد فتح قواطع التحكم ASCENT ECA CONTROL في اللوحة رقم 16، عند هذه النقطة، لن يكون الكابل مزودًا بالط
좋아요, 여기 있어요 — 10 - 20 -
Apollo 8, H
مفهوم. فرانك، ما نريده في هذه العملية هو 8 أقدام في الثانية، 8 أقدام في الثانية. نريدها شع
Мне нужно собраться с мыслями... и хорошенько подумать, как выбраться из космического корабля. Нам нужен большой космический корабль с большим люком,
حسنًا، لا بأس. لديّ تحديثان لك يا جيم. 
Roger. Ready to copy. Could you give quad A, B, C, and D 
Sospetto che questo campo di massi possa avere origine in parte da questo grande cratere roccioso dai bordi affilati che abbiamo superato durante la discesa finale. Ieri ho detto che aveva più o meno le dimensioni di un campo da football, e devo ammettere che è stato un po' difficile da misurare all'inizio. Ma ho pensato che potesse en
是啊，她们在这里看起来也很漂亮。哎呀！
Roger, Tranquility. Ich gebe dir einen Zeit-Hack um 114:31:00. Das sind ungefähr 30 Sekunden.
Continuons. Si, pendant la combustion, le moteur s'arrête et que le voyant NOUN 97 clignote, vous devez poursuivre la manœuvre, puis effectuer le sullage, passer en mode PUSH (démarrage moteur) et activer le mode DESCENT ENGINE OVERRID
Jim, stiamo per effettuare un pas
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон, вы гото
アポ
That's affirmative
Roger. In questo momento sento Kano che chiede un controllo della p
Wassermann, wir haben uns vorerst entschieden, die eingeschalteten Geräte anzulassen, die anderen Geräte auszuschalten und alle nicht benötigten Geräte ebenfalls auszu
Okay. I understand you got i
컬럼비아, 휴스
Roger. Nous prenons notre temps pour adopter cette nouvelle orientation; l'observation de Navi est encore loin de l'orientation requise. J'ai une correction à apporter concernant le satellite 20: après adaptation à l'obscurité, on peut distinguer Cassiopée et Navi elle-même. Il est difficile de voir les étoiles environnantes. Nous avons encore pas mal de particules en suspension avec le vaisseau, surtout lorsque nous déplaçons l'optique et le tube. Ce
罗杰，尼尔。首先：今天一整天，来自世界各国领导人的祝贺电报源源不断地涌入白宫，祝贺阿波罗11号任务圆满成功。其中最新的包括英国首相哈罗德·威尔逊和比利时国王的电报。世界各大媒体的版面都被阿波罗11号的新闻占据。一些新闻工作者估计，今天全国各大报纸上超过60%的新闻都与你们的任务有关。《纽约时报》正如我们之前提到的，今天这期报纸的需求量极大（尽管发行量达到
Okay. is looking at that battery amperage that you gave us awhile ago. He'd like to see it about a half an amp to an amp lower. Like you to ask Jack to just
11, this is Houston. Can you discern any difference in color of the illum
Je te co
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। आपके लिए हमारे पास टीवी से जुड़ी जानकारी है और साथ ही आपके इरेज़ेबल लोड और वैकल्पिक आकस्मिकता चेकलिस्ट के बारे में भी अपडेट है, कृपया
알겠습니다, 프레드. 37페이지의 활성화는 안 되네요. 가압 작업을 진행하신 후 TCA 차단기를 작동시키고 
Повтори е
Bene. Per quanto riguarda il test di orientamento, ho toccato la leva manuale; ho toccato l'orologio, un rivetto sopra l'orologio a ci
しばらくの間、制限がかかり
インド海軍のオーロラ・セブンで
Ge
休斯顿，这里是阿波罗8号。我想确
Nei
알겠습니다. 그런데 비행기가 지나갈 때, 어디쯤
حسناً. لدينا مظلة مستقرة وجيدة. سنبدأ ب
ठीक है, आखिरी बार जब हमने सिनॉप्टिक टेरेन फोटोग्राफी का इस्तेमाल किया, तो हमने सैन डिएगो के थोड़ा पूर्व से शुरू करके बादलों के घेरे में आने तक लगभग 38 तस्वीरें लीं। जैसे ही हम संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के दक्षिणी भाग, अलबामा और मिसिसिपी के आसपास से होते 
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。今、同じ場所を見上げていますが、地球の光を反射しているように見えます。位相がほぼゼロになるように計算されたのかどうかは分かりませんが…まあ、少なくともクレーターの壁の一つは他の部分よりも明るく見えます。地球と正しく一直線になっているとすれば、その壁は位相がほぼゼロになっているように見えます。その部分は、この窓から見える他のどの部分よりも明らかに明るいです。本当に燐光を確認できたかどうかは分かりませんが
أرجوك قلها مرة أخرى يا 
Houston, Sie sehen hier eine Aufnahme der Erde unterhalb des Mondhorizonts. Wir folgen einer Bahn bis zum Terminator, wo wir das Raumschiff drehen und
Tut mir leid, Jack. Ic
罗杰，
Okay, Ken. Pericynthian plus 2, schnelle Rückkehr / 62871, minus 161, plus 129, plus 45224, minus 06216, minus 18712 001 28 603 49118 112 038 296 Erde oben 010, rechts 37, plus 1475, plus 06400 1323 936 913, primär Sirius, sekundär Rigel 129 155 010,
好的。把逆变器 2 和交流母线 2 的开关拨到“开”的位置；把另一个开关，交流母线 2 复位开关，拨到复位和居中位置；把电池充电开关拨到“Alfa”位置；把直流指示灯开关拨到“电池充电器”位置；然后，我们需要你做的是，在
- - we a
ح
夏威夷，Sigm
حسناً، كيف تقرأ الآن
了解、トランクウィリ
Hai il casco ben allacciato, nel caso non riuscissi a pressurizzare. Hai sis
Думаю, я получу свой
我看到的粒子主要每次都是在日出时
Okay. We'll call some of the paper companies and see if they can 
Хорошо. Тогда мы как можно скорее займемся подготовкой необходимых вам блокнотов, а я пока займус
Do you read me? Transmission of th
小さい方の端を前に向けると 360° 回転し
好的。也没什么特别的。嗯，我们先从体育说起吧，管它呢。太空人队以8比7险胜，勇士队在第九局得了五六分，但他们最终还是赢了；当天另一场重要的比赛，小熊队因为下雨取消了。其他比赛的比分我都有，你要哪一场可以告诉我。马尼拉和吕宋岛其他地区发生了地震。发生了三次震动，建筑物摇晃了大约半个小时，震级大约是里氏5级。好的，我们来看看。披头士乐队宣布他们将不再以乐队形式演出。据报道，这支四人乐队在短暂的音乐生涯中赚了超过5亿美
罗杰，没错。我们关机的时候它还在计数。我上次看到的时候是6.9。弗兰克刚才又把它调到自动模式，功能开关也插上了，结果它跳了0.6。然后他又试了一次，结果还是零，所以我们也不知道是怎
Tra 12 minuti saremo a Carna
इन वीडियो का विश्लेषण करने के लिए, हम इन्हें सुबह 4 बजे ले रहे हैं। ये समुद्र और बादलों की पृष्ठभूमि वाली तस्
Хорошо, Вэнс. Хорошо, я не думаю, что вы мне предоставили инструкцию по отключению зарядных устройств дл
D'accord. Je voulais simplement vous en informer et vous inciter à réfléchir à ses implications sur le plan de vol. Je vous présenterai ensuite une vue d'ensemble et commenterai la Lune afin de déterminer les sections les plus appropriées. Frank souhaitait que nous vérifiions l'ordre d'apparition des profils d'entrée. Le premier profil affiché est intitulé « Non-sortie n° 2 » et correspond à l'entrée rapide à courte portée. Le deuxième profil, intitulé « 3 500 milles », est également une entrée rapide, mais celle à utiliser en cas d'entrée à plus longue portée. Le troisième profil sera « Non-sortie n° 1 », suivi d'un quatrième profil de 3 500 milles. Vous avez donc quatre profils d'entrée. Les pro
ठीक है, जिम। हम आपसे एक संभावित समय जानना चाहेंगे। आप जो भी समय देंगे, हम उसके लिए बिना किसी शुल्क के वापसी की व्यवस्था कर सकते हैं। इसलिए, यदि आप हमें अपना पसंदीदा समय बता देंगे, तो हम एक जगह तय कर लें
알겠습
ठीक ह
左にロールすると、あまり良くありません。どうなるか見てみまし
ジェミニVIII、こちらヒューストン。T/Mスイッチをリアルタイム
로저. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 플라이 바이 와이어 방식으로 수동 조종 중인데, 조종에 전혀 문제가 없습니다. 아주 부드럽고 쉽게 조종할 수 있습니다. 조종감이 아주 좋습니다. 퓨즈는 왼쪽 패널에 그대로 있습니다. 스퀴브는 작동 준비 완료입니다. 자동 역추진은 꺼져 있습니다. 플라이 바이 와이어, 자동, 자이로스
नहीं, फ्रेड, यह सही नहीं है। हम जो करना चाहते हैं, वह यह है कि 34 पर सब कुछ जैसा है वैसा ही र
रॉजर। क्या आप मुझे रंगों के बारे में कुछ सुझाव दे सकते हैं, और क्या आप थोड़ा सा बदलाव करके देख सकते हैं? यह गायब हो रहा है। हमें इसका लगभग आधा
Mir 
休斯顿，阿波罗8号。我们
わかりました、ヴァンス。電圧と電流は39
好的。我们首先要做的事情之一是给电池充电，这样我们才能获得足够的电力来完成这项工作，我们已经制定了相应的程序。关于再入大气层，我们计划在进入大气层界面前5小时进行最后一次中段飞行（如果需要的话）。然后，我们希望在进入大气层界面前大约4个半小时抛弃服务舱，并利用接下来的3到3个半小时进行拍照、启动指令舱的制导与导航系统、整理舱内物品以及其他一些零碎的工作
好吧，反正别把这11个百分点
ロジャー、
Ich möchte den BAL LOADS-Lei
Veuillez noter que les relevés MDI confirment le bon fonctionnement de votre
好的。在面板 3 上，我这里有一个开关。
Okay. That's complete. The next step is to switch to the primary CO2 canister and remove
حسناً. لدي هذا النجم واضحاً تماماً الآن يا تشارلي، لذا قد أضع بعض العلامات عل
Okay. For the mid-Pacific, the general condition is good. You can expect cloud bases 2000 foot scattered, visibility 10 miles, wind 070 at 12, wave heights 4 feet, altimeter 2974. Sunrise 10 Zulu, and first light 16:49 Zulu. ship will be Yorktown; the aircraft will be Airboss number 1 and 2, and Recoveries 1, 2, and 3. The estimated time to a the ship is - Yorktown is on the target point, Airboss aircraft 15 minutes and will be
And, Jack, let me know if you get close to gi
Hier ist Friendship Seven. Ich kann die Plejaden von hier aus ganz klar sehen. Jetzt erkenne ich auch einige dieser Sternenkonstellationen. Die Sicht ist ka
Since this is winter - since this is winter time in the northern hemisphere, we can see all of the South Pole and the southern ice cap, and not too much of the North
Das ist richtig. Okay, jetzt erhalten Sie vom Boden ein Update bei -2 + 15. Das ist der Zeitpunkt, zu dem Sie für den Empfang von Telemetriedaten konfiguriert sein müssen. Das Update enthält einen Taktinkrement, einen Zustandsve
シグマ・セブン、シグマ・セブン、こちらウ
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप इसे पढ़ रहे हैं, तो कृपया हाई गेन पर कनेक्ट करने की कोशिश करें। हमें टीएम पर कनेक्ट होने में दिक्कत आ रही है और हम
سيجما سفن، سيجما سفن، هذه كانتون كوم تك، كانتون كوم تك، كيف يتم الاستلام؟ انت
Starting over the United States, actually Ed started unstowing things j
California Cap Com, Friendship 
嗯，
Okay, Vance. Ich kann es dir geben. Ich habe es direkt nach dem Starten abgelesen. Di
Я снова в режиме VOX. Ты меня слышишь, Дик? У меня получился красивый крен на 90 градусов влево. Вот это да, какой краси
Friendship Seven, qui Woomera Cap 
Nel fra
Quel est le réseau que 
제미니
لا، لقد تلقينا طلبًا لمراقبة هذا الأمر وسؤالك عما إذا كنت قد سمعت أي رفرفة، عند
Gemini 4, Houston CAP CO
D'accord. Je
ठीक है। क्या आप चाहते हैं कि ऐसा करते 
OK. VANNES À HÉLIUM SPS,
わかりました。一つ飛ばして、FUEL CELL 2 MAIN BUS Bのトークバック（灰色）をオンにします。次はFUEL CELL 3 MAIN BUS Bをオフにします。以上です
そして、前回のミッドコースについては、もし可能であれば、かなり早い段階で検討を始めたいと思っています。主に姿勢制御の問題です。前回は比較的楽でしたが、どれくらい続けられるかは
Roger, coming with a report on the Pilot. The last meal the Pilot had was the second day, the fourth meal. I've had 9 swallows of water, and I'm feeling great. The Command Pilot, 3 the thir
後方燃焼と前方燃
정말 감사합니다. 네, 수치를 읽어 드리겠습니다. 이륙 당시 GMT는 17시 16분이었습니다. 
이건 우정 7입니다. 부정적이네요. 음
حسنًا، يجب أن يكون لديك عضوية في النقابة، على ما أعتقد. لا يمكننا حقً
아폴로 13호, 아폴로 13호, 여기는 복구 임무입니다
D'accord. Sur la ligne 14, sous SYSTÈME DE CHAUFFAGE A/B-1: ouvrez les QUAD 1 à 4; en dessous, la seule modification est: sous POMPE À GLYCOL, fermez TRANSFERT AUTO; sous COMM, la seule modification est: ouvrez RÉCEPTEUR VHF A, ouvrez AUDIO DU COMMANDEUR; en dessous, la seule modification est: fermez et laissez fermé le disjoncteur de VEILLE, afin que les chau
Je vais simplement laisser les sacs de nourriture i
好的。首先要确认交流电已接通，也就是面板 16 上的逆变器 2 断路器已闭合。然后，在面板 11 的“飞行显示”部分，我们需要确认 GASTA 和 COMMANDER 的断路器已闭合。同样在面板 11 下，GASTA
Wir hatten die Lageregelungsleistung eingeschaltet und sind auf RATE COMMAND umgeschalt
Ну, 
حسنًا، إذا قلبت الصفحة على Power 8، ستجد وظائف المركبة الفضائية المتبقية لك. لدينا معدل بت منخفض ™. مع ذلك، ليس لدينا أي VHF. لدينا مضخات جلايكول. لدينا مراوح للبدلات. لدينا ضغط المقصورة لك، وانتظر في غرفة التحكم بالوضع هنا. حسنًا، في غرفة التحكم بالوضع، ستكون لدين
没错。这套装置现在还真挺复杂，就靠这些软管支撑着。还有那位设计工程师……因为这玩意儿看起来确
はい、はっきりと聞き取れました、フランク。態度を変える動き
好
Roger. Go ahead,
Хорошо. На шаге 5 в E-11 первый подзаголовок — «Шлемы и перчатки», а пункты, следующие за ним, зависят от того, одеты вы в костюм или в рубашку с короткими рукавами, но их необходимо выполнить. И
حسنًا. هناك ثلاثة قواطع دوائر كهربائية للفيضانات وثلاثة قواطع دوائر كهربائية رقمية، وتريد إغلاق جميع هذه ا
자, 이제 상태 벡터를 
Das stimmt, der Wert ist etwas niedrig. Ich habe den Anzug jetzt auf 6 eingestellt und werde auf 6,5 erhöhen. Ich komme nicht wirklich voran. Vor etwa 5 Minute
ठीक है, कुंभ रा
夕焼けはなかなか印象的だ。眺めるのに時間を無駄にする必要はないと思う。とても興味深い。もう一つ魅力的なのは、目が慣れ
مرحباً، أبولو 11. هيوستن. نود منك أن تبدأ 
良いアイ
Mac
फिर से कहो, अर
Я так не думаю, Джек. Если на этом этапе у вас в
好的。还有一点要提醒你，阿波罗8号；比如，在解除导航开关之前，先选择该开关，然后
프레드, 다시 한번 말씀
ア
Die Strecke vom Boden bis zum hinteren Schott des Kommandomoduls beträgt etwa 5 bis 6 Meter. Sie ist keineswegs desorientierend, aber es ist äuße
أوه، لا تفعل... إنهم لا يريدون تصريف خزان الأكسجين الخاص بنظام التحكم الإلكتروني في السفينة مباشرةً إلى البحر. ب
روجر، جون. لقد انتهينا للت
대량 샘플에서 깊이에 따른 변화를 살펴보던 지역에서는 
Understand that. Are you trying
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。パネル16では、クロスタイ
Okay. Okay, this is a preliminary maneuver PC plus 2. Starting: ; plus 0819.2, minus 0020.0, minus 0218.9; NA; plus 0020.9, 0848.2; 420, 274, 082; plus 0820.3, minus 0020.0, minus 0215.0. Comments. Ullage is two jets for 10 seconds. weight, 62480. weight 33576. And the following is the throttle profile: 5 seconds at minimum followed by 21 seconds at 40 percent, 
D'accord John, et merci beauco
حسنًا. سنكون ضمن نطاق تغطية الطائرة هنا خلال دقيقة تقريبًا. سيحاولون هذه ال
حسنًا. صمامات CB REAC وصمامات تهوية REAC مغ
アームレストを格納します。はい、肘掛けを格納、ラップベル
Negativo. Vorremmo rimanere sul guadagno el
Roger that. We've got a team working on that, and incid
자
روجر. لدى قائد الطائرة 129 مشروبًا بحجم نصف أونصة وثلاث وجبات، بينما لدى الطيار 
It got more - more brown 
ヒューストン、イーグル、LM
ठीक है। हमें खुशी है कि आपने इसकी सराहना की। फ्रेड, हम यहाँ तरह-तरह की नई प्रक्रियाओं पर काम करने में बहुत आनंद ले रहे हैं। काम चल रहा है, और हमें उम्मीद है कि शनिवार या रविवार तक आपकी प्रवेश
看看体育界，我们来看看。就在你前几天忙的时候，乔·纳马斯和橄榄球联盟主席皮特·罗泽尔宣布，“百老汇乔”已经同意出售他在“单身汉三号”餐厅的股
الأفق هنا شديد السواد. السماء حالكة السواد، والأرض - أو القمر بالأحرى، معذرةً - مضيئة للغا
我……排在最上
さあ、
了解。ジム
わかりました。パネル3：バッテリー充電をオフにします。パネル5；メインバスタイ、BAT A/CをBAT A/Cに接続します。CBバッテリーチャージャー、BAT A充電で開き、CBバッテリーチャージャー、BAT B充電で閉じます。次に、パネル250；CB BAT Bパワーエントリ/ポスランディングで閉じます。パネル5；メインバスタイ、BAT B/Cをオフにします。パネル3；バッテリー充電を
Понял. Можно вы
बस बीच वाली। मैं डॉक्टर से सही नाम पता कर लेता हूँ। इंतज़ार कीजिए। इसे स्टर्नल ईके
Eagle, qui è Columbia. Ti hanno appena da
로저입니다. 첫 통화입니다. 라디에이터를 035에 FLOW로 연결하는 것을 잊지 마세요
Gemini 4, this is Houston. You're very intermittent. If you're reading, we are going to update your 6-4 ove
Apollo 8, Apollo 8
Roger. Minus MA proced
Apollo 11, Houston. Könnten Sie den Leuten bitte 
そこと Cens
11, Хьюстон. Вы см
제가 도착하면 플랫폼을 올
알겠습니다. 
알았어, 잭. 배터리 A의 충
さて、SYSTEMS TESTメ
حسنًا. لقد شغّلتُ - أعد تشغيل مسجل الشريط من البداية. لدي
और, 13, ह्यूस्टन। का कहना है कि बिट्
データの予備分析によると、中央のS-IIエンジンは過去の飛行で観測されたよりもやや大きな振幅で振動しており、S-II燃焼開始から約160秒後に振動が始まったことが分かりました。この振動の結果、エンジン室の圧力が低下
Come probabilmente saprai, abbiamo diversi gruppi che lavorano sulle procedure da qui in poi. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sulle correzioni di metà rotta per determinare un sistema, gli assetti, come eseguirle, le tecniche di allineamento e così via. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sull'ingresso, incluso come e quando attiveremo il. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sullo stato del sistema e tra poche ore - più tardi domani, da dove lo vediamo, passeremo a una configurazione di base sul e condurremo un 
Un autre commentaire concernant l'optique. Nous sommes actuellement en vol. Nous passons le point critique; nous avons un roulis d'environ 182°, un tangage d'environ 226° et un lacet de 18°. Je peux faire pivoter l'arbre complètement à cette attitude précise, et 
The very bright features you see are the new impact craters, and the longer a crater has been on the surface of the moon, 
खैर, उन्
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 아폴로 8호, 휴
Ers
老兄，听起来你玩
로저. 11, /: 45597, 0 - 수정 - 마이너스 0.40, 플러스 1.57, 플러스 36325, 마이너스 0.1727, 플러스 0.1428 180 0.03 0.00, 노벰버 알파, 플러스 0.0186 36394 323 36186 42 0.995 254; 스코르피이 델타, 하강 103, 좌측 48, 플러스 0.742, 마이너스 16500 13005 36327; 시리우스와 리겔, 129 155 0.10, 
Okay. Auf Seite 1 benötigen wir unter Aktivierung, Schritt 2, die Option AN
Ça ne me paraît pas correct, n'e
Houston, we haven't started 23 ye
Gem
罗杰。3-1 171。3+42。18 19 03。2+23。
Roger. I would like to remind you that the Horizon Scan Thruster Check should not be commenced until you can confirm Canary's AOS. Cana
不，如果你在右侧栏里已经填写了所有这些选项，我们就不用做了。现在我还欠你一件事，就是如何撤销
로저. 좀 낮춰. 들어봐, 방금 5 1/4까지 올렸는데, 리프레스로 5 1/4를 유지하려고 하고 있어... 유지해 
أب
... so ähnlich wie das Zodiakal
Okay, NOUN 01, ENTER; 3011, ENTER; 44, ENTER. Now, that's the procedure for widening the deadband to 5 degrees wi
Das stimmt, wenn man
Bene. Ed è esattamente dove mi trovavo. MODULO DI COMANDO PROPELLENTE 2, centro, acceso, su; Interruttori PROPELLENTE, due, grigi; PRESSIONE CARBURANT
제미니
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Ваш уск
13, Houston.
よし、ヒューストン。バーンは完了した。次はパワーダウンについて話さないといけないが、どうしたらいい
ليس تمامًا. أعتقد أننا ندرس هذا الأمر قبل تعديل المسار في منتصف الرحلة، باعتباره الوقت المناسب لفحص سخانات المياه. تتضمن عملية التبريد السريع بعض سخانات المياه أيضًا، ولكن سيتم ذلك قبل الدخول مباشرةً عندما لا تكون هذه الأمور حساسة للغاية، وإذا لم نقم بذلك خلال 
Okay. Let me get a go, and I think it's time for us to go ahead and put these other canisters on. Stand 
Okay. Wir haben eine Teleskopausrichtung, falls Sie es einmal versuchen möchten. Ihr Sextant funktioniert noch, ab
هذا 
好的。关于中途航段，我想大家普遍同意，我们会像以往一样进行。至于
11, Houston. We also would appreciate - if you will note the angles that the antenna tracks through in its attempt
Houston, si vos collè
Roger. Eh bien, vous pourriez répéter cela pendant le récit télévisé, et nous aimeri
네, 두 번째 문제도 5번 패
كلما قمتُ بتفعيل خاصية كتم الصوت، أفقدك. انت
ह्यूस्टन, यहाँ शांति है। एलएमपी का रीडिंग संभवतः 09017 है
了解。もし承認してそのまま残っていただければ、トラニオンバイ
의사 선생님, 제가 지금 혈압계 때문에 애를 먹고 있다는 걸 알려드리고 싶습니다. 혈압계가 제 방호복에 제대로 고정되지
ああ、分かりました。最後の項目は項目9で、BAT 2
Oh, w
分かりました。分かりました。まず第一に、これらのルールは厳しい制限のあるモード I の中止と同様であるべきというのが基本的な考え方です。では、皆さんがコピーできるように 1 つずつ説明していきます。分かりました。以下のいずれかの事象が発生した場合は、シャットダウンする必要があります
D'accord. Il nous reste à discuter des deux attitudes à adopter pour compenser la buée
休斯顿，加油！阿波
250 entspricht 143 Grad. Die Temperatur ist in den letzten 40 Minuten um etwa 2 Grad gestiegen. Die 150 entspricht ungefähr 105 Grad. Di
Roger. Good readback. And, Buzz, did you say sextant star is visible after 1
This is Houston. We copy your percentages, and do you have a crew status report on sleep For
Négatif. Je ne comprends pas bien non plus la baisse de la fe
2, /: 46427, minus 053, plus 141 , minus 01350, plus 0000, plus 0000 000 
Okay. Also gut, ich habe es n
كان ينبغي عليك إرسال قياس ضغط 
Вы, должно быть, читали
好的。PAD：102 33 04.36，09 50，减去 00021 182 287 000，加上 56919。小于 10：105 12 30.00。大于 10：103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00。无加 12 中止：102 44 27.00，加上 01223，减去所有零，加上 01889 01520，加上 00110 02250 046 000 190，加上 01187，加上 00000，加上 019011
Хьюстон. Близнецы 4, вы меня
और अब म
Okay, J
コロンボ・クレーターとグーテンベルク・クレーターに近づいてきました。非常に鮮明な画像が見られます。長く平行な断層、あ
Let me 
आर-डॉट्स, पूरी प्रक्रिया के दौरान, काफी सामान्य दिखे और मध्य-पाठ्यक्रम के लिए मुझे जो एकमात्र बैकअप समाधान मिला, वह क्लोज्ड लू
わかった。態度に戻るよ。一
Okay. Wissen Sie was? Ich lasse Jack das konfigurieren. Er kann das dann aufschreiben, und wir besorge
Roger. Le ballon oscille sur un arc d'environ 100 degrés. Il disparaît fréquemment de notre champ de vision. En ce moment, il est presque vertical. Repérez un passage côtier à cet instant précis – il semble que… Ce que j'essaie de vous dire, c'est qu'il oscille sur 180 degrés, vers le haut puis vers le bas. Term
了解、ジム。ここの通信設備の改善に取り組んでいます。ダウンボイスバッ
唯一の問題は、ここに来てスイッチを掴み、このハン
Maintenant, je pe
제가 들은 바로는 기내 압력이 유지되고 있었다는 것뿐입니다. 그 이상은 아무것도 듣지 못했습니다. 그리고 오디세이, 저희는 당신들이 원하는 대로 대변을 데워볼 준비가 되어 있고, 달 관
Roger. Aus den Nachrichten des Pressebüros: Apollo 11 beherrscht weiterhin die Schlagzeilen weltweit. Nur vier Nationen – das kommunistische China, Nordkorea, Nordvietnam und Albanien – haben ihre Bürger noch nicht über Ihren Flug und Ihre Mondlandung informiert. Ein Journalist sagte, ihm seien die Worte ausgegangen, um Ihren Erfolg zu beschreiben. Heute Abend wird Präsident Nixon das All-Star-Baseballspiel in Washington besuchen. Im Anschluss reist er zum Bergungsgebiet im Pazifik. Am Mittwochabend fliegt er mit dem Hubschrauber von Johnston Island zum Marine-Kommunikationsschiff Arlington. Am Donnerstagmorgen steigt er wieder in den Hubschrauber und fliegt rechtzeitig zur Hornet, um Ihre Wasserung mitzuerleben. Den Präsidenten begleiten Außenminister William Rogers und Frank Borman. Sie werden die Wasserung von der Brücke des Bergungsschiffs aus zusammen mit Admiral John Sidney McCain Jr., dem Befehlshaber der Pazifikstreitkräfte, verfolgen. Nach seinem Aufenthalt an Bord der Hornet tritt der Präsident seine Asienreise und seinen geplanten Besuch in Rumänien an. Luna 15 stürzte vermutlich gestern nach 52 Mondumrundungen ins Meer. Die sowjetische Nachrichtenagentur TASS berichtete von „wissenschaftlichen“ Untersuchungen im erdnahen Weltraum. Sir Bernard Lovell vom Jodrell-Bank-Observatorium gab an, dass Luna 15 mit einer Geschwindigkeit von etwa 480 km/h auf die Mondoberfläche aufschlug. In Vietnam war es in letzter Zeit relativ ruhig. Patrouillierende US-Soldaten wurden mit Transistorradios beobachtet, die auf Ihren Flug eingestellt waren. Der vietnamesische Militärsender berichtete umfassend über die Mission. Entlang des Suezkanals dauern die Gefechte zwischen Ägyptern und Israelis weiterhin an. UN-Beobachter vor Ort versuchen, die Kämpfe zu beenden. In Washington stimmte der Finanzausschuss des Repräsentantenhauses für eine Senkung der Ölförderquote von 27,5 auf 20 Prozent. Hier in der Gegend um Houston hat es mehrmals geregnet. Heute ist es bewölkt, und es werden weitere Schauer erwartet. Sportlich gesehen findet, wie bereits erwähnt, heute Abend das All-Star-Spiel statt. Gestern wurden keine Spiele ausgetragen. Gestern Abend kürte die Baseball Writers Association of America in New York Babe Ruth zum größten Baseballspieler aller Zeiten. Joe DiMaggio wurde zum größten lebenden Baseballspieler ernannt. Frank Borman verkündete die Auszeichnungen bei einem Abendessen zu Ehren der Spieler. Joe Namath verbrachte einen vollen Tag im Trainingslager der New York Jets. Fünf Polizisten hatten Mühe, rund 500 Kinder davon abzuhalten, „Broadway Joe“ zu berühren. Er sagte, er fühle sich gut und werde am 1. August beim All-Star-Spiel spielen, sofern Trainer Weeb Eubank 
Eh bien, je ne peux pas — pouvez-vous baisser la caméra pour que je puisse voir quelque 
11号，休斯顿。我们觉得这个
좋아요,
はい、トンネル内の
दो psi. क्या आपको समझ आया,... एड? हम वेंट वाल्व बंद करेंगे और हमारे पास जो रक्तचाप के माप हैं, उनकी जाँच करेंगे। हम दो psi पर सूट में रिसाव की जाँच करेंगे। आप भी अपना सूट जाँच लें त
13号，休斯顿。你现在状态不好，但思路清晰；可能很快就会好转。我们正等着看你的
ن
Roger. Pas de
Roger, Canary. Mein Status ist gut; der Kapselstatus ist gut; mein Steuermodus ist automatisch; Gyroskope normal; Manöver deaktiviert. Treibstoff 51–68 %, Sauerstoff 85–100 %; die Temperatur an meiner Kabinendampfentlüftung steigt jetzt auf etwa 19 Grad, die Temperatur an der Anzugdampfentlüftung liegt weiterhin b
네, 짐. 잠시
Über Ha
Я вас хорошо слышу, чувствую себя отлично, оборудование работает исправно. Я вижу Землю через периск
航天器 0-90-0。好的。我们之前没做过这个。没关系。好的，我
Роджер, инерциальная система. И вот мы на 2-м ПАД. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, плюс 166, минус 081; TIG 080 11 3603. СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 81: минус 01408, минус все шары, минус 00743. Все шары, 196 359 00657, плюс 00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Секстант 23 1160 138. Остальная часть ПАД недоступна. Выравнивание, Вега и Денеб 243 183 012. Заполнение, два реактивных двигателя
Houston, Apollo 11. Vorresti un
Jim, I can give you the general idea of the proposed procedure for bringing the command module G&N up. It's the presentl
Es wird wahrscheinlich ein Sextanten-Sterne-Check sei
水瓶座，休斯顿。
Apollo 11, Houston. We're ready for you to start your waste water dump at
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. En 
Roge
알았어, 잭. 쿼드 찰리 DROP ISOL 밸브를 재설
حسنًا. نحن نوضح لك الأمور جيدًا هنا على الأرض. سنعطيك إشارة تشغيل للمبر
什么？——嗯，我想等我们
아폴로 8
That'll be fine. Are you going to want to charge A agai
ああ、月が昇ってきた。明るいオレ
조명을 최대한 낮
11, 휴스턴. 당신을 포
फ्रेड, इस जुगाड़ से बने कमांड मॉड्यूल लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड कैनिस्टर के बारे में, हमें कम से कम दो बनाने होंगे और एक साथ दो का इस्तेमाल करना होगा - हर नली के सेट पर एक। हम इन जुगाड़ से बने बॉक्स में से एक को लाल फिटिंग से जोड़ेंगे और हवा लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड से होकर अंदर खींची जाएगी और फिर नीली फिटिंग से बाहर निकल जाएगी। और ऐसा करते समय, हम लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड कैनिस्टर को सूट लूप से निकालेंगे, चाहे वह प्राइमरी हो या सेकेंडरी। हम इसे आसानी से बनाने के लिए ज़रूरी शब्द इकट्ठा कर रहे हैं, और लगता है कि इसमें शायद दो लोगों की ज़रूरत पड़ेगी, इसलिए मुझे लगता है कि हमें इसे बाद में करने की योजना बनानी चाहिए। इसके अलावा, हमें ऊपर जाकर कमांड मॉड्यूल से कुछ कैनिस्टर निकालने हैं, इसलिए शायद बेहतर होगा कि हम इसे थोड़ा टा
Roger, 11. We'd like to perform a waste-water dump at your convenience some time in the near future here. No particular time scheduled. Down air at the time for midcourse correction 3, which is about 53 55, we're deleting midcourse correction number 3 and all the items associated with it. For your information, the calculated value of the burn for midcourse number 3 was eight tenths of a foot per second, that is 0.8 feet per second. Canceling this, if we decide to burn midcourse correction 4, this would then give you a burn for midcourse correction 4 of 2.0 feet per second. At 53 hours we have an realign. We're requesting that you do this while in, an
ठीक है। हम शिफ्ट बदलने की तैयारी कर रहे हैं, और इससे पहले मैं कुछ बातों पर चर्चा करना चाहता था। अभी, ऐसा लग रहा है कि हवा की गति ज़्यादा से ज़्याद
ठीक है, वैंस। आप कह रहे हैं कि हमें आकस्मिकता पुस्त
了解しました。テレメトリ
アポロ8号、こちらヒュ
Ok, il paracadu
Bien. 12 1383 327 023 haut 172 gauche 22, plus 1293, moins 16500, 12905 36180. Commentaires: sur vos étoiles Sirius et Rigel, roulis 010, tangage 294, lacet 320, pas de marge de manœuvre. Autre: un, retour rapide, équivalent à 7821, pour un atterrissage au milieu du Pacifique pour MTL; deux, procédures à gr
收到。大约在148小时，如果您尚未更换二氧化碳过滤器，请更换一次。
좋습니다. 이제 산화제를 배출하는 것 같네요
Хорош
क्या जॉन
روجر. توقع فقط أن يظهر نفس التحذير والتنبيه مرة أخرى. وتريد
네. 시작 시간은 18시 13분입니다. 자, 그럼 오늘 20초 동안 계속 내려가 보겠습니다.
Верн
好的。面板 7 上，我们需要关闭电
还有，弗雷德，休斯顿。一会儿我要给你读一份操作流程，请你抄下来以备将来使用。这份流程是关于如何断开指令舱主总线的电源，我们认为它以后会非常有用，比如拆卸指令舱入口电池，或者在拆除入口电池之前对指令舱进
Da ist jedenfalls nichts Großes, was im W
どの ECS O2 スイッチをオ
Oui. Mike a quelques commentaires à fa
और हम क्रिया 41, संज्ञा 91, या इस तरह की कोई भी
Potresti chiamarmi ogni tanto, Jerry, solo per farmi sapere che sei ancora lì, dato che stiamo cambiando antenna, o per farmi ascoltare un po' di musica o qual
了解しました。8つのサーキットブレーカーのトークバックのうち4つが赤信号です。今のところ、サーキットブレーカーはオフの
ठीक है। प्रक्रिया इस प्रकार होगी: एंटर, 333 एंटर, और रजिस्टर 1 को पढ़ें। फिर 10,000 - मेमोरी - कंप्यूटर मेमोरी को दो बार सही कॉन्फ़िगरेशन के साथ डंप कर देगा। यदि ऐसा नहीं होता है, तो हमें 10,000 लोड करना होगा, और
Roger. Vis
11، هيوستن. لاحظنا أثناء فحصك للوحة 2 قبل قليل، أن الكرتين رقم 8 (1 و2) كانتا غير متطابق
Das möchten wir lieber nicht tun, Frank. 
Notre écran de télévision présente des bandes horizontales. Est-ce que nous vous les transmettons, ou avez-vou
ええ、一緒にいるんです。ここ30分くらい、見ていないんです。こっちの
Gemini VI, RKV. Nous vous communiquerons une mise à jour concernant la manœuvr
حسنًا. سنلقي نظرة من الخارج
Voici une petite information intéressante, plutôt encourageante. Il semblerait qu'à Ann Arbor, dans le Michigan, un nouveau gang de jeunes ait fait son apparition: le gang Gilnet. Ils sillonnent les rues d'Ann Arbor, agissant en secret et parfois en toute impuni
روجر. لدينا طلب من جيم أن يباعد بين علاماته الخمس بشكل أبطأ قليلاً. إن أمكن، نود أن تتجاوز اثنتان منها نقطة سمت الرأس. نحن نرسمها الآن بتباعد سريع، ومن وجهة نظر هندسية، سيكون من الأفضل لو
Roger. Abbiamo controllato la navicella spaziale e la guida del veicolo di lancio. Sembrano entrambe in buone c
D'accord. Environ
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 이
はい。それはスイ
मैँ इसे देखता हूँ..
روجر، فهمت. سأضطر إلى إدخال قيمة 0.05 غرام يدويًا عند حدوث ذلك، وإعادة
分かりました
रॉजर। मैंने अपने सूट कंट्रोल वाल्व को 5.5 पर सेट क
Das ist eine Möglichkeit, die wir in Betracht gezogen haben, Jim, denn - Wir haben diesen Tank erhitzt und haben keine
Джо, примерно на середине или пятой части начала твоей площадки произошел сбой сигнала, и Фред не смог ее поймать. Мы хотели бы, чтобы ты начал сначала. Не мог бы ты это
ठीक है। ह्यूस्टन, वह अब हमारी खिड़कियों के ठीक सामने से नीचे
I'm still quite a ways. That's definitely a SLA panel - there's no doubt about that. Sure looks like... panel. That s
Okay. Jack, al momento non possiamo. La luce del sole si riflette sui propulsori e qualsiasi detrito si sia staccato al momento dell'incidente è ancora con noi, tanto che le stelle sono difficili d
了解しました。おはようございます。ミッドコース7の状況
Apollo 11, Houston. Non sono sicuro che tu abbia ricevuto la mia ultima trasmissione, dato che stavamo appena sostituendo gli OMNI. Vorremmo anticipare l'ora di scarico dell'acqua di circa 5 minuti. E ti daremo un'indicazione precisa sull'ora di inizio
わかりました。
जी हां, सही है। इससे आपका कॉन्फ़िगरेशन हो जाएगा। ध्यान दें कि उस सर्किट पर सर्किट-ब्रेकर सुरक्षा उपलब्ध करंट को 15 एम्पियर तक सीमित कर देती है। हाल
ईगल, ये ह्यूस्टन है। क्या तु
Roger.
يبدو أنني قادمٌ من اليمين - ربما أستطيع رؤية مدينة مكة. من المفترض أن تكون في منطقتي. ربما أعبرها. شب
阿波
左手食指到指尖的轻型支架最终还是
Roger, Bill. The one that we updated an hour or so ago, (i.e, p
你好，休斯顿；这里是阿波罗8号。我们现在已经将电
Gemini 4
बिजली एक बड़े धब्बे जैसी दिख रही है, न कि वैसी टेढ़ी-मेढ़ी लकीर जैसी हम धरती पर आमतौर पर देखते हैं। यह किसी बड़े, लगभग विमान रोधी गोले जैसी दिखती है।
Роджер. Есть е
Credo di sì, ma fammi controllare. Aquarius, Houston. È affermativo. Puoi disfare il modulo di servizio quando sei pronto; non c'è fretta, ma puoi 
Хорошо. А вы поверите, что Север разгромил Юг со счетом 3:0, и все это благодаря полевому голу в первой ч
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 벡터 장전 완료. 목표물 탑재 작업 진행
Earthshine is about as expected, Houston. Not as much detail, of course, as in the sunlight, but you can see the large craters quite distinctly, and you can see the albedo contacts quite 
我需要的是——这个数值在0.3到0.5之间，最好接近3。我能
अच्छा
يتبع ذلك Apollo PAD. TIG 125 19 3470؛ TIG of 126 57 0000؛، 0532، بالإضافة إلى جميع الأصفار، 373 03196 275 04170؛ NOUN 86 بالإضافة إلى 0532، بالإضافة إلى 0000، بالإضافة إلى 0012. ا
If it isn't any good, we'll need another one anyway, huh? So, there isn't any point in saving 
1, 2, 3, 4, 5. Как тебе э
Roger. Q
روجر
Хорошо. Мы 
روجر. هل ستستمر في استخدام خاصية الدوران، أم ستوق
Apollo 11, Houston. Cin
로저, 콜럼비아입니다. 앞쪽에서 이 구간을 지나갈 때, 저희 눈에는 괜찮아 보였습니
Roger. Standing by. The REPRESS package valve is now in the O
Jerry, möchtest du – ich habe es im Flugplan so eingetragen, dass wir mit dem Laden unserer Batterie B beginnen. 
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Ihre Temperatur is
ठीक है। नीचे दिए गए बटन पर क्लिक करें, फिर PROCEED के बाद ENTER द
Хорошо.
Bene. Sul lato destro, dalla "manovra per 
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 방금 전 2번 패널을 살펴보실 때 1번과 2번 8번 공의 위치가 약간 어긋나 있는 
Okay, bo
Roger. Comment lis-tu main
कैनरी, मैं तुम्हें बताता हूँ, म
Oui. Bon, les quatre ou cinq premières choses que j'ai sont: panneau BAT CHARGE sur OFF sur le panneau 3; AC INVERTER 2, OFF; pan
Remettons les aiguilles à z
Et vous, Hou
もう2、3回テストを実施して、特に問題はないと考えているのが一般的な見解です。さらに4、5回テストを実施して、結果を確認したいと思います。その前に、ヌルバイアステストを1回実施したいと思います。ダウンリンクでこれらのテストを監視する方法がないため、スイッチをオンにする手順や順番などについて、各ス
不，我不知道他上什么班。不过
Roger. Voici le rapport de 30 minutes. J'ai effectué des mouvements de tête sans ressentir le moindre effet. Le test de portée s'est déroulé sans problème. Mon orientation est bonne et ma vision est nette. Le fait de suivre une cible mobile, un point lumineux que je fixe d'avant en arrière, ne provoque auc
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. أنظمتكم جميعها تعمل بشكل جيد. تلقينا ت
계속 진행하겠습니다. 연소 중에 엔진이 멈추고 NOUN 97 표시등이 깜빡이면 계속 진행하십시오. 그런 다음 연료량을 확인하고 엔진 시동을 걸어 추진하고 하강 엔진 오버라이드를 켜십시오. 좋습니다. 이제 일반적인 정보입니다. PC+2를 연소하지 못한 경우, 아마도 P-P+4가 가장 빠른 시점일 것입니
Very good. We've got 4200 on t
吉姆，告诉你一声，我这里有登记簿。我还有着陆区天气概况，你可能都
He's unstowing stuff right now so you may have to wait a 
ह्यूस्टन, स्क्रीन के मध्य में जो आप अभी देख रहे हैं, वह शुबर्ट और गिल्बर्ट यू क्रे
روجر، سأعطيك إعداداتي. أنا في وضع التحكم التلقائي، وضع التحكم الرجعي؛ الجيروسكوبات تعمل بشكل طبيعي؛ مفتاح المناورة مُطفأ؛ جميع المواد الاستهلاكية في حالة جيدة؛ النظام الكهربائي يعمل بشكل ممتاز؛ الكبسولة تتعقب المسار بدقة. القمر مرجع مثالي في هذه المرحلة، فهو يقع تمامًا على المسار المتوقع، وكذلك كوكب الزهرة، كما تعلم على ال
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Сейчас смотрю на ту же область, и кажется, что она отражает часть земного света. Не уверен, было ли это рассчитано примерно на нулевую фазу... Ну, по крайней мере, одна стенка кратера кажется освещеннее остальных, и эта — если мы правильно ориентируемся на Землю, — действительно, похоже, находится примерно на нулевой фазе. 
Роджер, Спокойствие. Перерыв. Колумбия, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы использовали REACQ с высоким коэффициентом усиления; попробуйте включить ручную бло
더 좋은 건, 소변 
저희는 북쪽으로 5분 거리, 아니, 북쪽으로 9분
こんにちは、カナリア・キャップ・コム、オーロラ・セブン。はっきりと聞こえています
هذه فريندشيب سفن. أنا أستخدم نظام ال
And the Pilot missed the sleep period starting a little 
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호.
One second error, that
ठीक है, हम 180 डिग्री पर हैं, और 
Il y en a 27 à l'arrière, 14 à
아주 좋아
ठीक है, 
ロジャー。ジム、君が起きていて、周りが落ち着いている間に、他に考えておくべきことをい
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Пожалуйста, перейдите по ссылке и ПРИМИ
وصولاً
Роджер, Фред. Принято. Там наверху немн
C'était NSR plus 39 - 39 minutes, 
जड़त्वीय पर रॉजर। और अब
今は冬です。北半球では冬なので、南極と南極の氷床は全部見えますが、北極はあまり見えません
Хорошо, если сравнивать полёт «Аполлона-13» с «Аполлоном-8», то при старте вибрация была примерно такой же, как и на «Аполлоне-8», но в начале полёта боковые колебания были меньше, чем на «Аполлоне-8». Отделение S-IC ощущалось более резким на «Аполлоне-13», чем на «Аполлоне-8», возможно, это потому, что я сидел в другом кресле, не знаю. Но было около трёх резких переходных процессов отключения и пара сильных взрывов, когда нас отбросило назад вдоль ремней безопасности, прежде чем сработал S-II. И S-II, конечно, был таким же плавным на «Аполлоне-13», как и на «Аполлоне-8», за исключением двигателя № 5. И мы не испытывали той вибрации, которую испытывали на «Аполлоне-8» к концу работы S-II. А вот на 
Apo
Affirmat
... there are 20 min
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. TV 방송 요청을 다시 한번 시도해 보겠습니다. 10분 분량의 방송이 필요합니다. 그리고 가능하시다면 외부 장면들에 대한 내
ええ、そうですね。私たちはぐっすり眠れました。昨日はみんな少なくとも7時間寝ましたし、朝食も済ませて、水もたくさん飲みました。体
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. 
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. السبب الذي دفعنا لطلب إعادة تلك الأشي
वाटर टैंक सेलेक्ट वाल्व, ए
Mi d
Хорошо. Я сейчас кратко расскажу о состоянии систем. В принципе, все системы работают исправно. Что касается вашей траектории возвращения, мы всё ещё можем достичь середины Тихого океана, подожд
Roger. Kano Cap Com. Do 
Okay. Ich habe einen hellen Stern verfolgt, und ich glaube, er befindet sich im Sternbild Adler. Ich bin mir sogar ziemlich sicher. Ich kann die beiden Zielsterne sehen. Ich habe ihn bis ganz nach oben verfolgt. Er ist fast oben. Gleich verschwindet er aus meinem 
Ora sei nel nostro campo 
哦，很好。我在这儿可不觉得无聊。我刚才飞过中途岛，好好看了看。我现在正朝你们飞来——当然，是在你们北面。我把中途报告发给了吉恩·杜雷特——如果他能用高
ハワイさん、はっきりと聞こえましたよ。調子はどうですか？確かミッドウェー島が見えたばかりだったと思います。もう少ししたらそちら方面
Ricevuto. Pressione sanguigna avviata, no. Le mie condizioni sono buone. Lo stato della capsula è buono. Furl è al 99-98%. Ossigeno, all'89-100%. La cabina tiene bene. Tutta la corrente continua è buona. Tutta la corrente alternata è buona, 22 ampere. Tutto è verde e dovresti leggere la pressione sanguigna. Pass
Wir haben fünf Minuten bis Columbia gelesen. Er ist gelande
Ed a la plupart de l'équipement sur lui pour le moment. J'a
Ich möcht
Houston, ic
在我们离开之前，你能帮我问问粮农组织（我之前没有收到相关简报），E5 以及
Роджер. На изображении показано ваше текущее положение примерно на 77-76 градусах восточной долготы, если с
थोड
I can see them working on McDonnell now on this gain. I imagine there's fur flying. It's going to be when we get back. I'm going to hit them hard on it. I want to know just when they cleaned that. Remembe
Il lui faudra une minute pour.
Gemini VIII, qui Houston CAP COM. Siamo pronti
أقوم بتصوي
Хорошо. Два выключателя — два автоматических выключателя на панели 250 — снова разомкнуты; два автоматических выключателя на панели 275 — снова раз
はい、その通りです。アームを格納しており、すべて予定通
Questo è certo. Il motivo per cui stiamo disattivando la logica, Jack, è per risparmiare energia. Quindi la disattiveremo e la ri
रॉजर। इतनी अच्छी दृश्यता और इतने अच्छे संचार के साथ, हम अभी स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप देखे बिना ही आपको मौखिक विवरण दे देंगे। आर्कटुरस तक पहुँचने के लिए आपके कोण काफी अच्छे थे। मैंने आर्कटुरस को स्कै
Хорошо. У нас для вас ничего нет. Прошло уже два полных дня, и м
아니요, 제 생각에는 당신이 하고 있는 일은 단지 당신이 올바른 별들을 찾았는
크고 또렷하게 들립니다
Sigma Seven,
Роджер. Сейчас мы вносим небольшую поправку. Ни
Houston, Gemini 4. Ich habe verstanden, dass wir den Leseschalter eine Weile eingeschaltet lassen und dann alles andere abgeschaltet wird. Können Sie das bitte wi
네, 그렇습니다. 지금 저비트 데
Хорошо. Следующие три параметра такие же, а затем нам нужно, чтобы параметр «Сброс топлива» был установ
Tranquility Base, Houston. Tutti i vostri materiali di consumo sono solidi. State andando bene sotto ogni aspetto. Vi copiamo,
Apollo 11, Houston. Il nostro consiglio è di riporlo sopra il pan
11号，休斯顿。您的节目现在正在美
समझ गया। कमांड पायलट सो रहा है। अगले 4 
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, RKV CAP 
حسنًا. الإجراء هو الضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER)، ثم 333 ثم الضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER)، وقراءة السجل رقم 1. بعد ذلك، سيتم قراءة قيمة الذاكرة 10000 مرتين إذا كانت مُهيأة بشكل صحيح. إذا لم تكن كذلك، فسيتعين علينا تحميل القيمة 10000، وذلك بالض
Roger, 11. Die Verbindu
Роджер. Все батареи адаптера показывают 2 ампера и 24 вольта. Кольца RCS хорошо держатся. Вторичные кислородные баллоны тоже хорошо держатся. Основные батареи показывают 9 ампер и око
Okay, as you know, the control mode is set up for drifting. The mode selected is normal, auto, gyros caged. I've selected reentry attitude. I'm of course in fly-by-
了解。30分レポートをお送りします。頭の動きを確認しましたが、何の影響もありませんでした。到達距離テストも実施しましたが、全く問題ありませんでした。方向感覚は良好で、視界もクリア
يا له م
L'affichage du temps écoulé depuis votre capsule indique parfois une seconde d
روجر. ٢١-٤ سيتم تقسيم فرق السرعة (ΔV) بين الأمام والخلف. ٥٦ قدمًا للأمام عند دقيقة 
ठीक है। यह कुछ-कुछ उस सिमुलेशन की तरह 
रॉजर। हम बिल्कुल 
通过望远镜观测到的景象非常糟糕。我认为，它甚至比现在的模拟器还要差。它需要长时间的暗适应，而这在大多
في الواقع، خلال الـ 12 ساعة الماضية أو أكثر، وربما حتى 24 ساعة، لم نكن حريصين للغاية على إبقاء قناع الوجه مغلقًا و... الأساور مرفوعة، لأنه من
AL
D'accord, j'ai un mi
ATTITUDE CONTROL, three of them, to P
Okay, der letzte Teil lautete also: Die „125“ durchstreichen und „1/8“ ei
Ru
Vous avez besoin d'aide p
Okay. Bedienfeld 3: BATTERIELADUNG, AUS – das hast du schon gemacht, Jack – als nächstes der Wechselrichter. Bedienfeld 5: HAUPTBUSVERBINDUNG BAT B/C. Hä? Ja, er ist oben – in der oberen Position. Schutzschalter, BAT A STROMEINTRITT/POSTLANDING, öffnen; Schutzschalter, BAT B STROMEINTRITT/POSTLANDING, öffnen. Bedienfeld 5: CB BATTERIELADEGERÄT BAT B LADEN, öffnen. Okay. Lies das bitte
로저, Rev 33, 실행 4, 시작 시간 19시 43분 00초, 일몰 시간입니
ठीक है, फ्रेड। पैंतरेबाज़ी का उद्देश्य पीसी प्लस 2 है, इस समय तक, हम एमपीएल पर जा रहे हैं। और, 079, 27, 4013, प
안
Ok. Ci sono alcuni dubbi derivanti dalla lettura della checklist. A quanto ho capito, sia la caldaia principale che quella secondaria saranno accese al momento dell'ingresso effettivo, ma non c'è un punto nella checklist in cui siano effettivamente accese. Vorremmo quindi avere conferma di ciò e ci assicu
사진을 보시겠어요,
D'accord, Jim. Nous sommes encore en train de réfléchir à la question, mais certains éléments nous indiquent que nous pouvons effectuer cette correction jusqu'à 118 heures plus tard, sans pénalité significative de DELTA-V, et avec un suivi suffisant par la suite pour nous assurer d'
알겠습
ठीक है। यह अच्छा लगता है अगर - और जब आप वांछित रोल एटीट्यूड पर पहुँच 
Roger. I did. He came in for about two or three transmissions, and then that w
«Дружба Семь», Гуаймас. Если у вас будет возможность, не могли бы вы измерить нам артериальное давление? 
रॉजर, 
Il a dû 
착륙 가방 작동 중지. 비상 역추진 시퀀스 작동 
Mentre mi guardo intorno, il contrasto, in generale, è *** generato completamente dall'ombra *** del Sole... un grigio molto chiaro, un grigio chiaro, un alone attorno alla mia ombra, attorno all'ombra del mio casco. Poi, mentre guardo verso ***, il contrasto diventa più forte in quanto il colore circostante è ancora piuttosto chiaro. Mentre guardi verso il Sole ***, una porzione maggiore di *** area in ombra è rivolta verso di noi. Il colore generale dell'*** circostante *** il contrasto non è così forte. Esaminando tutta l'area polverosa che abbiamo sollevato ***, la consistenza è considerevolmente più scura. Ora, ne ho sollevato uno, e immagino che sia *** Surveyor. Lo stesso vale quando eseguo un'indagine trasversale - lungo l'area che stiamo camminando. In generale *** al fa
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。2号機のGO、全シス
好的，肯。近藤座加2，快速返回/62871，减161，加129，加45224，减06216，减18712 001 28 603 49118 112 03
ठीक है। चार्ली, हम अंदाज़ा लगाएंगे और बराबर की रकम देने की कोशिश करेंगे। ओह, यह CDR 
Oui. Elles traversent juste au sud du sud du Mexique, probablement en passant par l'Amérique centrale. Il s'agit de la bande équatoriale que nous supposons être la zone de convergence intertropicale. L'autre bande, située à environ 30° sud, semble bien rejoindre l'équateur à l'extrême gauche, ou juste au-delà de l'h
非常に良いですね。プラス30627、マイナス00625、プラス00577 180 018 001、該当な
在
حسنًا، كما تعلم، بالنظر إلى تلك العينة فقط، أستغرب أنك لم ترَ كمية أكبر من الغبار. لقد رأيتَ غ
D'accord, Jack. Ce que je viens de te montrer concernant la procédure de retour en arrière est la seule chose qui compte vraiment. À partir de là, tu peux suivre les étapes pour lancer la procédure et revenir en arrière. Autrement dit, tu dois aller à
아폴로 8호, 다시 위로 올라가서 원격 측정 데이터 스
少し前にキシロース錠剤を食べるためにバイザーを開けていました。機内に積んでいる残りの食料は、全て崩れたり溶けてしまったりしています。このままでは使い物にならないので、キシロース錠剤が最後のゼログラム食になると思います。しか
Okay. On page 1-12, panel 325, we want bo
휴스턴의 Associated 소속 해리 로젠탈 기자가 쓴 기사입니다. 두 명의 산타가 두 살배기 제프리 러벨의 크리스마스 이브를 더욱 특별하게 만들어 주었습니다. 첫 번째 산타는 집 문을 두드리고 선물을 가져다주었고, 두 번째 산타는 아빠를 달에서 집으로 데려다 주었습니다. 첫 번째 산타는 빨간 옷에 하얀 수염을 기르고 "호호" 하고 큰 소리로 외쳐 멀리까지 들렸습니다. 두 번째 산타는 달 뒤편에서 불꽃을 뿜어내는 거대한 엔진이었고, 수많은 사람들이 엔진이 점화되었다는 소식을 애타게 기다리고 있었습니다. "산타클로스가 있다는 것을 알려드립니다." 아폴로 8호는 엔진이 중요한 연소를 성공적으로 마친 지 15분 만에 무선 침묵을 깨고 전 세계에 이 소식을 전하며 처음으로 이렇게 말했습니다. "우리 모두 이보다 더 좋은 크리스마스 선물을 기대한 적이 없습니다." 관제센터의 켄 매팅리는 이렇게 말했습니다. "지상에 계신 모든 분들께 감사를 전합니다. 여러분 없이는 불가능했을 겁니다." 우주선 사령관 프랭크 보먼 대령이 답했습니다. 바로 그때, 관제센터 콘솔 앞에 크리스마스트리가 환하게 빛났고, 우주비행사 해리슨 슈미트는 승무원들에게 우주 버전의 "성 니콜라스의 방문"을 읽어주었다. "크리스마스 이브 밤, 우주 저 멀리에서 아폴로 8호 승무원들은 달 착륙 경쟁에서 승리했습니다."로 시작하는 이 동화는, 제프리의 아버지인 해군 대령 제임스 러벨과 공군 소령 윌리엄 A. 앤더스, 그리고 보먼 대령이 무사히 귀환할 때까지 축하 행사를 미뤄두었다. 여느 때와 같은 크리스마스 이브라면 우주비행사 가족들은 교회에서 크리스마스 예배를 드렸겠지만, 올해는 모두 텔레비전에 시선을 고정하고 있었다. 유인 우주선 센터 근처의 집들은 모두 크리스마스 장식으로 꾸며져 있었다. 러벨 가족의 집 주변과 팀버 코브 마을 곳곳에는 멕시코풍의 등불이 줄지어 설치되어 있었고, 러벨 가족 네 식구들은... 그때, 커다란 자루를 멘 키 큰 산타클로스가 탄 차가 도착했다. 그는 "호호" 하고 웃으며 문 앞에 서서 큰 소리로 노크했다. 문이 열리자 1월 14일에 세 살이 되는 제프리 러벨이 서 있었습니다. 제프리는 그 모습을 보고 움찔했습니다. 어머니가 그를 안아 올렸지만, 제프리는 여전히 겁에 질려 어머니에게 매달렸습니다. "작년에는 울면서 도망쳤어요." 15살 누나 바바라가 말했습니다. 앞서 바바라는 제프리가 전등을 모두 꺼뜨리지 못하게 하려고 뒤쫓아가야 했습니다. 다른 러벨 남매인 13살 제임스와 10살 수잔은 재미있다는 듯이 그 모습을 지켜보았습니다. 마침내 산
Vedo un fuoco nero laggiù nel deserto. Si vede fino in fondo la fonte da cui proviene. Non sono riuscito a vedere esattamente cosa fosse, ma ha lasciato un segno molto, molto distinto sul terreno. Ho scattato diverse foto del terreno con l'S-5 m
أبولو 8، هيوستن. حاضر. لقد ارتكبت خطأً واحداً؛ نافذة الأفق عند درجة واحدة سالب
Роджер. Я только что подключился к секстанту и теперь смотрю на Техас, и синоптик прав, 
روجر، أعتقد أنني لم أفهم جزءًا من كلامك. مباشرةً بعد إط
تم إيقاف تشغيله. شكرًا لك
제미니 8호, 휴스턴
हमारे पास एस-6 की अच्छी खासी मात्रा है। हमें एस-5 के कुछ छिटपुट अवलोकन मिले हैं... तस्वीरें भी, लेकिन हमें कम से कम संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के ऊपर एक उड़ान की आवश्यक
ठीक है। आगे बढ़ो, मिथुन 4। पेगास
Bien, oxygène. Il vous reste 44 livres. À un taux de consommation de 0,36 livre par heure, cela vous laisse 120 heures d'oxygène. Ensuite, A et B sont à 6,2 %. Nous prévoyons que seulement 2 % seront utilisés, vous êtes donc en bonne voie. Ensuite,
Roger. Dès qu'il aura reçu les données de son système embarqué, il pourra utiliser la 
Je ne pense
Oui, la vue est vraiment bien. Le nez de l'avion est descendu un peu sous l'horiz
Roger
Apollo 11, Houston. Quand vous serez prêt à copier, j'ai un bloc-notes de 2 et u
你好，鹰。休斯顿。你读吗？
Roger, Wally, ihr habt am Ende etwas nachgelassen. Seid versi
Всё в порядке. Я ничуть не
はい、ジャック。これで本体を収納できます。つまり、内袋
How are your windows? Do you have a couple left that are
Al momento abbiamo un violento rollio a sinistra e non possiamo disattivare l'RCS, non poss
자, 허니서클, 말해봐. 어떻게 
Давайте посмотрим. В Спрингфилде, штат Миссури, Микки Оуэн, ветеран-кетчер «Бруклин Доджерс», вошедший в истор
フランクさん、おっしゃっている手続きは実際には不要で、むしろ時間の
了解しました。ジェミニ8号、ヒューストンです。少し時間が空いているので、通信状況の最新情報をお伝えします。あと2分でタナナリヴに到着します。カーナボン上空で皆さんをお迎えします。その後、1号機が到着予定です。その後、マーキュリー、ハワイ、ゴールド
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Valerie Anders am Heiligabend, während sie und ihre Familie darauf warteten, dass Apollo 8 die Mondumlaufbahn verließ und zur Erde zurückkehrte. Frau Anders war am Dienstag um Mitternacht dort gewesen, und die Nachbarn hatten gerade alle Kinder zusammengetrommelt, damit die Familie sich ausruhen konnte, während sich das Raumschiff hinter dem Mond befand und kein Kontakt mehr bestand. Das Haus von Colonel Frank Borman war draußen mit vier großen Tannenzweigen geschmückt, mit Puderschnee bestreut und mit roten Schleifen verziert. Ein Baum im Wohnzimmer wartet auf seine sichere Rückkehr, und seine hübsche blonde Frau Sue und seine kräftigen Söhne Frederick und Edwin planen, den Start von Apollo 8 um Mitternacht zu Hause mitzuerleben. Normalerweise würden sie den Mitternachtsgottesdienst in der St. Christopher's Episcopal Church besuchen. Die Familie hatte sich für Mitternacht verabredet. Da es im Hause Borman keine kleinen Kinder gibt, wird die Bescherung einfach warten, bis Colonel Borman m
Roger. Wir lassen uns Zeit, diese neue Lage einzunehmen; die Navi-Position ist noch weit von der benötigten Position entfernt. Ich habe eine Korrektur zu Punkt 20 – auf Navi nach der Dunkeladaption: Man kann Cassiopeia und Navi selbst erkennen. Es ist schwierig, die Sterne in der Umgebung zu sehen. Wir haben immer noch recht viele Partikel, die mit dem Raumschiff umhersch
Roger. That was goo
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। 
Apollo 8, Ho
Roger. Hor
Ok, eccoci qui. Blocco note: Pacifico medio, 000153; 000. Le due righe successive saranno quelle del
罗杰。02 30 59 这个号码叫什么名
نافذة الإرساء. حسناً. لقد سلمني أحدهم للتو تقرير حالة المواد الاستهلاكية الأخير، وأنت تستهلك ما بين
…白いパンツ。上
Okay. Auf Seite 1 benötigen wir unter Aktivierung, Schr
Okay. Ich erkläre es Ihnen. Ich gehe Zeile für Zeile vor und warte auf Ihre Bestä
わ
مرحباً. فوج الحرس الأسود يراقب
패널 3: 파워 앰프를 끄세요. 참고로, 제가 읽는 동안 이 내용을 메모지에 적어두시면 나중에 제가 참고할 때 오른쪽 여백에 적어둘 수 있는 첫 번째 
हाँ। बहुत कम। अब तो बिल्कुल भी नहीं। मुझे पक्का नहीं पता कि उस वेंट की वजह से 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 패널 382의 EVAP 수분 제어가 AUTO로 설정되어 있는지 확인하십시오. EVAP 출력 온도
روجر، ربما يمكنك أن تخبرني أننا رأينا أضواء سيدني. لا أعرف إن كانوا قد أضاءوها أم لا، ولكن إن كانوا قد فعلوا، فقد رفعوا فاتورة الكهرباء بشكل ك
자,
11, Houston. On the, what we are saying is that if we lose control about one axis prior to low gate, we would recommend an abort. This would require a - a loss of - of two distinct jets which is not very probable, but that is what we are recommending. After low gate we would continue on. We would recommend 
Affermativo. Ho
Well, we 
Oka
Apollo 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 25번 기지에서 인수인계를 할 예정입니다. 새 기지에 도착하면 음성 확인을 위해 연락드리겠습니다. 지상 관제실에서도 친절한 말
Okay, beim letzten Überflug haben wir etwa 38 Bilder mit der Syn
रॉ
Mentre ero fuori,
Это сверху. Ещё один вот-вот — вот прямо здесь. Ну, вот старый терминатор у Фра-Мауро. Мы приземлялись около двух часов
確かにそうです。私が見ている写真からわ
जी हां, हम तै
- - e completa i 
Warum setzt du 
Okay. Sobald – sobald der Ball richtig positioniert ist
Oh, da haben Sie uns aber kurz erschreckt. Machen Sie das nicht, Sie jagen uns hier unten noch einen Herzinfa
Roger. The problems you have run into so far are due to some unknown source, probably or the like load
Va bene. Per me non è un gran proble
Yes, it has a random drift. There is no oscillation that I can predict whatsoever. The--the line leading to the balloon somet
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。2分半後に
सिग्मा सेवन, वूमेरा कैप कॉम। आवाज़ साफ़ और 
罗杰，友谊七号。注意，我已经盯上你了，
Okay, I'm going to reverif
Roger, Neil. Nou
Apollo 8, Houston. A questo punto è consentito lo scarico e, a quanto ho capito, questa sarà l'ultima s
Nous sommes passés à la cartouche de CO2 secondaire. Fred a remplacé la cartouche principale, mais nous voulons continuer à
Хорошо, выполните инициализацию согласно контрольному списку
카
추적 데이터
好的，就别叫它冷藏箱了。好的。
この駅務作業、何も難しいことはな
比尔
Крен, тангаж и рыскание, но дрейф — это главное. Это был бы эффект блокировки кардана, если бы он не был отключен..
क्या यह बिग जॉन 
हाँ। वे कंप्यूटर के नीचे वाले डिब्बे में रखे जाते हैं, और वहाँ रखी भारी चीज़ें L/D का अनुपात बढ़ाती हैं। हमारे पास कोई सामान रखने की जगह नहीं है, इसलिए मैं सोच रहा था कि हम कुछ भारी चीज़ें, जैसे कैमरे, टेलीविजन कैमरे, या ऐसी ही भारी चीज़ें, वहाँ रख सकते हैं। नहीं, हम उन्हें अपने डिब्बे में नहीं रख सकते, लेकिन हम उन्हें उस डिब्बे में रख सकते हैं जिससे L/D का अनुपात कम हो जाएगा। अगर आपके पास कोई और सुझाव हो तो बहुत अच्छा होगा क्योंकि हमारे पास डिस्पोजेबल स्टेशन भी नह
Roger, 11 anni. E mancano circa 14 minuti. Sono le 86:30, tra un'ora. Ci chiedevamo s
Um wi
أوديسي، هيوستن. إليك بعض قواطع الدائرة. في اللوحة رقم 276، في قسم التحكم في طاقة الأجهزة، افتح قا
好的
알겠습니다. T2: 102 54 2900 103 51 5600 106 37 3500 109 10 0000, T2는 +2126입니다. T3: 104 39 4100 001 58
Va bene. Puoi darmi i dati della batteria? Se sono a posto posso darti il ​​via libera per 3-4 ore... e aspettiamo la pressione sanguign
جي
Roger. Picking up at minus 1 minute, scratch "MASTER ARM, ON." Minus 35 seconds, scratch first two lines. At minus 10 seconds, change that to "Minus 9 seconds"; so, at "Minus 9 seconds," it will be "Manual Ullage." At 2 seconds, scratch " MODE, 
D
.., lo sai
D'accord. Très bien,
Roger, and could we have one more blood pressure, please. I didn't get the last. Your (recovery area) 5-1 TORF (time of retrofire) I have. Are yo
मुझे तो यह भी नहीं पता कि मैं अपना मास्क पहनूँगी या नहीं। खैर, 
حسناً، إنه في صندوق الطعام الموجود 
이것은 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 캡슐 주변에 아직 
了解、ヒューストン。イーグル号はトランクウィリティ基地を離れ、軌道
Это «Др
Bon, on y travaille encore. Je ne suis pas sûr que tout soit perdu. Il semble que notre problème vienne du fait que l'intensité lumineuse captée par notre posemètre mesure un champ moyen beaucoup plus grand que la Terre. Du coup, il détecte une grande partie de l'environnement sombre de l'espace profond, et on soupçonne que cela ouvre l'objectif au maximum.
Ricev
حسنًا. الخيار لك. حالما ينهض جاك، أقترح أن نبدأ بتفكيك عبوات هيدروكسيد الليثيوم هذه 
Рыскание не изменил
L'incident s'est produit alors que nous étions dans la configuration Agena-vaisseau spatial à 0°, 180°, 0° et que nous étions stabilisés dans cette position. L'alimentation du système de contrôle d'attitude du vaisseau spatial et celle du système OAMS étaient coupées, et nous avons envoyé la commande 041 à Agena pour activer l'enregistreur. L'en
好的。P1 98 37 35，P2 98 42 44，位于轨道以北 4 英里处；继续你的装载工作
Okay. And if you're ready,
好
私たちが経験しているノイズは、以前局を切り替えたときに経
Okay, Jack, I'm looking out the right window now, and not too far off in t
水瓶座，
2, /: 46427, minus 053, plus 141 , minus 01350, plus 0000, plus 0000 000 175 358 00607, plus 00606 01350 009 01265 02 3112 197; Taurus, Aida, up 16.2, left 0.1, fixed read not applicable; Sirius, Rigel 129 155 010, no ullage, i
حسنًا. بعد تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بيومين، لا توجد متطلبات لضبط الطائرة؛ وإذا حدث توقف مفاجئ أثناء تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بيومين، فستكون المناورات اللاحقة في منتصف المسار مطلوبة - حسنًا، ستكون أقرب مناورة هي تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بأربعة أيام. إذا لم تقم بتجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بيومين، ولكننا ما زلنا نرغب في القيام بواحدة - فسيكون ذلك لاحقًا. عند تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بأربعة أيام، ستكون الزيادة في دلتا-في، أو العقوبة، حوالي 24 قدمًا في الثانية، مع هبوط في منتصف المحيط الهادئ. الآن، يجب أن تتوقع منصات هبوط جديدة، ومتجهات حالة، وأهدافًا لتجاوز
Houston, abbiamo rag
مفهوم. فهمت يا باز. هناك بعض التغييرات على قائمة التحقق السطحية، وبشكل عام، ما نريدك أن تفعله هو تتبع وحدة القيادة لإجراء فحص أخير لموقعك هناك. وهذا سيكون - بعبارة أخرى، P57 - ثم المتابعة في قائمة التحقق، وبقية التغييرات طفيفة. التغيير الرئيسي هو أننا لا نريد تشغي
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Valerie Anders am Heiligabend, während sie und ihre Familie darauf warteten, dass Apollo 8 die Mondumlaufbahn verließ und zur Erde zurückkehrte. Frau Anders war am Dienstag um Mitternacht dort gewesen, und die Nachbarn hatten gerade alle Kinder zusammengetrommelt, damit die Familie sich ausruhen konnte, während sich das Raumschiff hinter dem Mond befand und kein Kontakt mehr bestand. Das Haus von Colonel Frank Borman war draußen mit vier großen Tannenzweigen geschmückt, mit Puderschnee bestreut und mit roten Schleifen verziert. Ein Baum im Wohnzimmer wartet auf seine sichere Rückkehr, und seine hübsche blonde Frau Sue und seine kräftigen Söhne Frederick und Edwin planen, den Start von Apollo 8 um Mitternacht zu Hause mitzuerleben. Normalerweise würden s
انظر 
13, ह्यूस्टन। अभी भी अच्छा दिख रहा है। आपके गिम्बल अच्छे हैं; ट्
Okay. Row 3, under PROPELLANT - propulsion: the STANDBY RENDEZVOUS HEATE
Sigma Seven，您的信号现在非
Roger. And we're stirri
Okay. I got my Hasselblad surface 
わかりました。私たちの...構成はそこでどのように機能しているように
ح
알겠습니다. 여기서 OMNI를 바꿔야 했어요. 그리고 SEQUENCE A와
حسنًا. في الصفوف الثلاثة الأخيرة، لدينا قواطع دوائر الحماية من الفيضانات والمسارات، الصف الثاني مفتوح؛ وحدة الطاقة المنطقية B مفتوحة؛ وحدة تجاوز محرك الهبوط مفتوحة؛ وحدة التحكم في تدفق البدلة مفت
Oscillations are pretty good. I think ASCS has given up the ghost at this point. Emergency drogue fuse swi
좋아요. 그럼 레오 시리즈를 진행해 볼까요? 레굴루스는 
Эй, передай до
여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 달에서 생중계로 전해드립니다. 방금 TV 카메라를 전환했습니다. 지난 16시간 동안 관측해 온 지구의 모습을 먼저 보여드렸습니다. 이제 지난 16시간 동안 고도 60마일(약 96km)에서 비행하며 관찰해 온 달의 모습을 보여드리겠습니다. 빌 앤더스, 짐 러벨, 그리고 저는 크리스마스 이브인 오늘, 달에서 실험과 사진 촬영, 그리고 우주선 엔진을 가동하여 기동하는 작업을 했습니다. 이제부터는 오늘 하루 종일 따라온 궤적
Gordo
네, 알겠습니다. 수동 스로틀로 설정하고 싶으니 17페이지 아래쪽 3분의 2 지점쯤에 
Bonjou
로저. 6만 4천 달러라는 거액을 지불했는데도, 저희는 아직도 착륙 지점인 트랭퀼리티 기지의 위
Houston, ici VIII. De plus, nous n'avons pas encore de signal verrouillé. Il faudra donc attendre d'avoir un sign
Könnten Sie uns bitte 
Tout est prêt et le compte à rebours est lancé: 
Roger. Sie sind sich jedoch ziemlich sicher, dass wir, wenn wir zurückspulen und mit niedriger Bitrate beginnen, den gesamten Brennvorgang abschließen können und trotzdem noch nicht auf das stoßen, was heruntergela
And, the panorama is complete. *** and the - got the at 7 30 position at about
И панорама
Roger. Treibstoff ist kein Problem. Es scheint nur eine Begrenzung der Anzahl der P22-Flugzeuge
روجر، لقد قمنا بنسخها ونود زيادة الضغط في خزان الأك
وتغطي سحب المطر منطقة مركز عمليات الفضاء حاليًا. بدأ المطر هنا قبل حوالي عشر دقائق، وآخر تقرير أفاد بأنه كان غزيرًا جدًا. هذا كل ما لدينا من أخبار هذا اليوم، أبولو 
ठीक है, कप्तान। हमने आपके लिए गर्म रहने का एक तरीका ढूंढ लिया है। हमने अब आपको ऊर्जा देना शुरू करने का फैसला किया है, और हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपनी प्रवे
Okay. How 
А вот и история поближе к дому, в Мемфисе, штат Теннесси. Молодая девушка, которая сейчас весит 8 фунтов 2 унции, получила имя «Модуль» от своих родителей, мистера и миссис Эдди Ли Макги. «Это была не моя идея, — сказала миссис Макги, — это была идея моего мужа». Она сказала, что сначала не хотела называться Лунным Модульом Макги, потому что это звучало не очень хорошо, но, видимо, они пришли к компромиссу и назвали его просто «Модуль
好的。杰克用的是
अ
Wonder
好的
好的。我们先来看
... 
Роджер. Что касается вашего таймера миссии, мы хотели отключить автоматический выключатель и дать ему остыть в течение полутора-двух часов. Я думаю, сейчас выключатель разомкнут. Он был выключен, поэтому сбросьте автоматический выключатель таймера миссии. Переведите регулятор таймера в положение RESET и удерживайте его в этом положении 30 секунд, затем поверните его влево-вправо до нужных вам значений и переведите регулятор таймера в положение START. На эт
Хорошо. А если это не получится, то, конечно же, сделайте всё, что в ваших силах. Придётся попробовать. Возможно, это будет не
مرحباً، الجوزاء الثامن، الجوزاء
감사합니다. 이제
ممتاز. ا
Roger. Das Licht funktioniert einwandfrei. Ich kann die genaue Entfe
Es wird noch la
それはちょ
Comme le dit « Ole Leonov », je travaille (illisible
不，让我看看我这里有没有。我到275号面板，打开CB MAIN A、BAT BUS A和CB MAIN B、BAT BUS B。然后我到250号面板，拉出CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING和BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING，然后到5号面板，拉出SENSOR S
ह्यूस्टन, मैं एलएमपी हूँ। सोने से पहले, क्या आप मुझे हमारे सिस्टम के बारे में अपने दृष्टिकोण से स
Jack, as luck would have it, we just no
Ok, Houston. Ci hai raggiunti un po' tardi. La nostra manovra è già iniziata, quindi ci costerà più o meno la stessa qua
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. القيم المحسوبة من الأرض لعمودك ومحورك هي بالضبط ما يظهر لك يا مايك. يبدو لك الأفق مائلاً - يبدو أنك غير متوازن في الدوران لأن الزوايا التي أعطيناك إياها للمناورة، لمنع انعكاس الضوء من إفساد بصرياتك، تبدو - يجب ع
حسناً، ما يوصون به لك هو f:8 عند 1/250 ثانية ووضعها ليس على اللانهاية، ولكن على 7 أقدام، وهو ما يغطي كل شيء من اللانهاية إلى مسافة قصيرة جدًا للحفاظ على التركيز، و
Роджер, я тебя не слышу. Я тебя не слышу. Очень, очень слаб. Сообщи сейчас настройки управления костюмом и к
Co
わかりました、ロン。MIDPAC の場合: 000、152、001、194、46 06、267、プラス 1332、マイナス 16917、064、36194、649、14045、36275、195 03 06、0028、154、084、2240、180、400、02 13、00 17、03 51、09 02、45、0189、277、使用
Sigma Seven, Woomera hat Ihre letzte Funkübertragung empfange
Vous en avez déjà beaucoup. Bien p
Okay. Your SECONDARY RAD IN, I gave to you 70 - about 72 degrees; the RAD OUT is about 30; the GLYCOL EVAP TEMP is reading about 65; STEAM PRESSURE full scale high, GLYCOL DISCHARGE PRESSURE about 9 psi. The ACCUM - SECONDARY ACCUMULATOR SUITS showing about 52 degrees; CABIN about 58 degrees; pressures, SUIT reading 4.1, CABIN at 5. PARTIAL PRESSURE CO2 is up to little over 1, about 1.1. On the side of the house, the temperature is 72 degrees, helium's reading 3500; N2 A is reading 2300; N2 B about 2450. FUEL is reading about 165; FUEL CELL 1, both CLOSED, they're zip; SKIN TEMP 405 degrees; CONDENSE EXHAUST is lower scale. FUEL CELL 2 - right now we've got an O2 or an H2 FLOW reading of 0.13 to 0.14, and the O2 FLOW is right now pegged full scale high although it has been varying depending on thruster activity which has also given us MAIN BUS A under volts from a steady reading of about 1.1 up to full scale high. The TSKIN is about 445 and the CONDENSOR EXHAUST 17, correction, 180. Let's see if you want it on the FUEL CELL 1 is 0 amps; 2 is reading somewhere between 44 and about - oscillating 44 to
ك
38 minutes elapsed time. The night side - we have a well-definable horizon, but we have 
Oui, je ne peux pas vraiment l'affirmer avec certitude, même avec le monoculaire, mais sa position relative par rapport aux étoiles semble identique. Et il me semble que son intensité est la même, et sa distance p
Ho appena m
わかりました。では、今すぐREACQに行
Roger, John. Wir haben gerade den Modus beendet, in dem der Wechselrichter ausgeschaltet war. Er funktioniert einwandfrei und bleibt jetzt für den Rest des Fluges eingeschaltet. Ampere und Volt werden korrekt angezeigt. Die Amperezahl ist nach dem Einschalten auf etwa 19 Ampere gesunken. Anfangs lag sie bei 25 Ampere. Ich fliege diesmal im Rückenflug auf euch zu, was, zugegeb
No, it's just goin
Входная таблица следующая: Mid-PAC, 000153, 000;, 178; минус 21.66, минус 165.37; 28. Следующие четыре столбца N/A; DO 4.00, Зебра Весы или что-то подобное, Бета Весы вниз 08.8, влево 0.4; вектор подъема вверх; вход выровнен, звезды 31, 33. Крен 041, тангаж 045, рыскание 024. Неисп
再说一
فريندشيب 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴
20 20 19.2 पर; रेंज, 43.52; 85 डेल्टा-व
Je peux encore voir les particules. Elles se déplacent vers l'arrière, sel
हाय! जिम, हमने जैक द्वारा कंप्यूटर चालू करने और कोर्स अलाइनमेंट करने के समय आपकी सर्विस मॉड्यूल SEP स्थिति के आधार पर कोर्स अलाइन गिम्बल कोणों की गणना कर ली है। यानी, हम मान रहे हैं कि आपका रोल 0, पिच 091 और य
रॉजर। हमने आपके सिस्टम के प्लेबैक डेटा की जाँच की है, और सब कुछ ठ
Just
Eagle, Columbia. Je suis prê
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मैं मुख्य घटनाओं के समयों पर संक्षेप में चर्चा कर लेता हूँ, और फिर हम कुछ विवरण भरेंगे। ठीक है। प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस 142 घंटे 40 मिनट पर है; लगभग 6-1/2 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम हीटर पावर लगाकर, CM/ तापमान की जाँच करके और आवश्यकता पड़ने पर CM/ को पहले से गर्म करके इस पूरी प्रक्रिया को शुरू करेंगे, और हमें लगता है कि हमें ऐसा करना पड़ेगा। इसके लिए विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ बाद में उपलब्ध होंगी। लगभग 6 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम संशोधित / 30-मिनट की चेकलिस्ट का उपयोग करके पावर चालू करना शुरू करेंगे, जिसका उपयोग आपने पिछले मध्यक्रम के लिए किया था। फिर कुछ ही समय बाद, लगभग 5 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम चाहेंगे कि आप बॉडी एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट के लिए सही स्थिति में हों, जैसा हमने पहले किया था, अर्थ टर्मिनेटर का उपयोग करके। और जैसे ही हमें वह मिल जाएगा, हम -7 का प्रदर्शन करेंगे, जो अब लगभग 2 फुट प्रति सेकंड की बर्न दर या लगभग 15 सेकंड का प्रतीत होता है। और मुझे बताया गया है कि यह अब 1-1/2 तक कम हो गया है, इसलिए यह मार्जिन के भीतर आराम से है। ठीक है। जैसे ही हम ऐसा करेंगे, हम तुरंत सर्विस मॉड्यूल जेटिसन एटीट्यूड के लिए पैंतरेबाज़ी शुरू कर देंगे, जो प्लेन में होगा क्योंकि हम इसे सामान्य से पहले जेटिसन कर रहे हैं। हमें आउट-ऑफ-प्
Es dreht sich einmal komplett in etwa 8 Sekunden. Es überschlägt sich. Es sieht so aus, als wären wir jetzt etwas weiter draußen als vorher. Wir sind ein Stück weit abgerutscht. Ich schätze, es ist etwa anderthalb Meilen draußen, vielleicht etwas mehr. Es war wirklich ein beeindruckende
जी हाँ
La responsabilité de ce vol incombe d'abord à l'histoire et aux géants de la science qui ont précédé cet effort; ensuite au peuple américain, qui a exprimé son désir par sa volonté; puis, aux quatre administrations et à leurs Congrès, pour avoir m
D'accord. Nous allons arrêter l'entrée à un roulis de 285, et les angl
Okay. Bezüglich der Kurskorrektur möchten wir diese bis etwa [Uhrzeit einfügen] verschieben. Es handelt sich dabei um einen Brennvorgang mit ungefähr 25 Fuß pro Sekunde. Wir verzögern die Brenndauer, um aufgrund der von Ihnen vorgenommenen Reduzierung des Abstands um 7,5 Fuß pro Sekunde eine bessere Nachführung zu ermögli
Versta
はい。点滅しているボタンを離さずに、
حسنًا يا فريد، عرضٌ جيد. الخطوة 6: أدخل، بالإضافة إلى جميع الكرات، بالإضافة إلى 28300. الخطوة 7: را
Die Bewohner von Seattle (Washington), Portland (Oregon), Vancouver (Brit
रॉजर। तुम्हारा मतलब एड की बोतल में मौजूद आपातकालीन ऑक्सी
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une de l'actualité mondiale. Seuls quatre pays, la Chine communiste, la Corée du Nord, le Nord-Vietnam et l'Albanie, n'ont pas encore informé leurs citoyens de votre vol et de votre alunissage. Un journaliste a même déclaré être à court de mots pour décrire votre succès. Ce soir, le président Nixon assistera au match des étoiles de baseball à Washington. Après le match, il se rendra dans la zone de récupération du Pacifique. Mercredi soir, il se rendra en hélicoptère de l'île Johnston au navire de transmissions de la Marine, l'Arlington. Jeudi matin, il reprendra l'hélicoptère pour rejoindre le Hornet à temps pour assister à votre amerrissage. Le président sera accompagné du secrétaire d'État William Rogers et de Frank Borman. Ils observeront l'amerrissage depuis la passerelle du navire de récupération en compagnie de l'amiral John Sidney McCain Jr., commandant des forces du Pacifique. Après son séjour à bord du Hornet, le président entamera sa tournée en Asie et sa visite prévue en Roumanie. On pense que Luna 15 s'est écrasée dans la mer des Crises hier après avoir effectué 52 orbites autour de la Lune. L'agence de presse soviétique TASS a rapporté que des « recherches scientifiques » avaient été menées dans l'espace proche de la Lune. Sir Bernard Lovell, de l'observatoire de Jodrell Bank, a déclaré que Luna 15 avait percuté la surface lunaire à une vitesse d'environ 480 km/h. La situation est relativement calme ces derniers temps au Vietnam. Des soldats américains en patrouille ont été aperçus avec des radios à transistors branchées sur votre vol. Le réseau de radio et de télévision des forces armées vietnamiennes a couvert l'intégralité de la mission. Des escarmouches se poursuivent entre les Égyptiens et les Israéliens le long du canal de Suez. Les observateurs de l'ONU sur place tentent de mettre fin aux hostilités. À Washington, la commission des voies et moyens de la Chambre des représentants a voté pour réduire de 27,5 % à 20 % le quota d'épuisement des réserves de pétrole. Il a plu à plusieurs reprises dans la région de Houston. Aujourd'hui, le ciel est nuageux et d'autres averses sont attendues. Côté sport, comme mentionné précédemment, le match des étoiles a lieu ce soir. Aucun match n'a eu lieu hier. Hier soir à New York, l'Association des chroniqueu
Roger. Nous étions sur le point de vous envoyer des informations concernant l'incendie. Êtes-vous prêt
Roger. From the hot wires of the Public Affairs Office: Apollo 11 still dominates the news around the world. Only four nations, Communist China, North Korea, North Viet Nam, and Albania, have not yet informed their citizens of your flight and landing on the Moon. One newsman said that he has run out of ways to describe your success. Tonight, President Nixon is scheduled to watch the All Star baseball game in Washington. After the game, he will depart for the Pacific recovery area. Wednesday evening, he will fly from Johnston Island by helicopter to the Navy communications ship Arlington. Then on Thursday morning, he will reboard the helicopter and fly to the Hornet in time to witness your splashdown. Accompanying the President will be Secretary of State William Rogers and Frank Borman. They will watch the splashdown from the bridge of the recovery ship with Admiral John Sidney McCain, Jr, Commander of the Pacific Forces. Following the President's stay aboard the Hornet, he will depart for his tour of Asia and scheduled visit to Romania. Luna 15 is believed to have crashed into the Sea of Crises yesterday after orbiting the Moon 52 times. The Soviet News Agency TASS reported that "scientific" "research in near Moon space was carried out." Sir Bernard Lovell at Jodrell Bank Observatory said that Luna 15 hit the surface of the Moon at a speed of about 300 miles per hour. Things have been relatively quiet recently in Viet Nam. GI's on patrol were observed carrying transistor radios tuned into your flight. The Armed Forces radio and TV network in Viet Nam gave the mission full coverage. Skirmishes still continue between the Egyptians and Israelis along the Suez Canal. U.N. observers there are trying to halt the action. In Washington, the House Ways and Means Committee has voted to reduce the 27.5 percent oil depletion allowance to 20 percent. We've had rain several times here in the Houston area. Today it is cloudy, and more showers are expected. On the sports front, as we mentioned earlier, the All Star game is tonight. There were no games played yesterday. Last night in New York, the Baseball Writers Association of America named Babe Ruth the greatest ball player of all time. Joe DiMaggio was named the greatest living ball player. Frank Borman made the announcements at a dinner honoring the players. Joe Namath put in a full day at the New York Jets' training camp. Five policemen had a hard time restraining about 500 kids who wanted to touch Broadway Joe. He said he feels fine and will play in the All Star game August 1, if Coach Weeb Eubank lets him. The Oilers' camp at Kerrville got wet yesterday, but the workouts continued. There have been some minor injuries, but nothing too serious. Coach Wally Lemm is satisfied so far with the workouts. The Oilers are expecting attendance by over 30.000 for the preseason game with Buffalo. Apparently, Don Meredith's announced reti
아폴로
Houston, Apollo 11. Je comprends que vous souhaitez que les réchauffeurs 
休斯顿的鹰牌（
…でも、この100
ठीक है, मैं इन्हें वैसे ही पढ़ूंगा जैसे मुझे दिख रहा है, न कि जैसे एसईडीआर (सर्विस इंजीनियरिंग डिपार्टमेंट रिपोर्
네. 녹화되었을 수도 있고 아닐 수도 있습니다. EVA를 시작한 후 44분 정도 지났을 때였던 것 같습니다. 에드가 우주선 밖으로 나왔을 때 제가 시작했던 이벤트 타이머를 보고 있었는데, 44분이 지났는데도 아직 해치를 닫지 못했습니다. 우리는 모든 것을 망치지 않도록 침착하고 냉정하게 행동하려고 노력했습니다. 그리고 마침내 제가 해치 닫힘 장치를 최대한 세게 당기고, 에드도 최대한 아래로 당
Хорошо, Фред, у нас возникли небольшие разногласия по этому поводу, но, к
Когда я осматриваю окрестности, контраст, в целом, возникает исключительно за счет тени, падающей на Солнце... очень светло-серый цвет, ореол вокруг моей собственной тени, вокруг тени моего шлема. Затем, когда я смотрю в сторону Солнца, контраст становится наиболее сильным, поскольку окружающий цвет все еще довольно светлый. Когда вы смотрите вниз на Солнце, большая часть затененной области обращена к нам. Общий цвет окружающей области не так велик. Осматривая всю пыльную область, которую мы подняли, я вижу, что она значительно темнее по текстуре. Я поднял один слой, и я предполагаю, что это… Геодезист. То же самое верно, когда я осматриваю местность вдоль того места, где мы идем. В целом, я вижу там следы. Общая местность, где я поднимал много этого поверхностного материала, име
Th
Roger. Did
रॉजर। थोड़ी सी हाई क्यू में आ रहा है; और ख
罗杰。它现在离我们有多远
Ricevuto. Andrà... Apoll
不，我没意见。我只要重新调整好方向就行了。这样
Warum klicken Sie nicht einen Schritt nach o
Хорошо, в левой колонке по
Okay, Fred-o, wie bekomme ich den Missionstimer hoch? Ich habe den 
Хорош
D'
Roger. Compris. Ils semblent toutefois déformer les lignes vertic
Аполлон-13
फ्रेड, हमें कुछ मलबा दिखाई दिया है
네, 잠깐만요. 잠깐만요. 마스터 스위치 켜짐, 인터콤 켜짐, VHF 무전기 켜짐, 패드 통신 꺼짐, S-밴드 켜짐, 그리고 인터콤/푸시 투 토크 모드까지 모두 설정되어 있으니, 
D'accord. Tu as maintenant 1685 sous le
CONTRÔLEUR DE TRADUCTION, dan
روجر، جيم. فهمت. لقد نسخنا ذلك، ونحن فضوليون فقط، وإذا رأيتموه مرة أخرى، فهل تلاحظون أي نجوم متلألئة أو أي معلوما
«Ап
嗯，鼻子看起来
Un altro elemento relativo a una procedura di malfunzionamento. È improbabile che dobbiate preoccuparvene domani, ma nell'elenco dei malfunzionamenti, alla voce "attracco" a pagina F11 9, è presente una procedura di malfunzionamento per un flusso di O2 elevato nella parte sup
프레드, 지금 골드스톤 대형 위성 안테나에 연결됐고 통신 상태도 훨씬 좋아졌습니다. 괜찮으시다면 저기 있는 승무원 중 한 명에게 BIOMED 스위
कोलंबिया, कोलंबिया, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप ब्रावो 1 और ब्रावो 2 में थ्रस्टर्स को ऑटो सेलेक्ट मोड पर 
J'aimerais bien essayer le cran d'arrêt 2, mais j'imagine que notre platefor
Roger. Wir gehen davon aus, dass
Okay. Was ich sagen wollte, ist... um mich nicht zu verwirren, aber die 
A questo punto, ripongo la telecamera. Passo alla procedura di sgancio del giroscopio. Ora, fly-
Roger. Vuoi andare
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हम तारा संख्या 26, यानी दो-छह, का उपयोग करना चाहेंगे; हम इसे दो सेटों के लिए पृथ्वी के निकट क्षितिज के रूप में उपयोग करना चाहेंगे। फिर हम तारा संख्या 16 को पृथ्वी के दूर क्षितिज के रूप में एक सेट के लिए उपयोग करना चाहेंगे। यदि तारा संख्या 26 पृथ्वी के निकट क्षितिज के रूप
Roger. You're seeing Earth, as we see it, out our left-hand window, just a little more than a half Earth. We're looking at the eastern Pacific Ocean, and the north half of the top half of the screen, we can see North America, Alaska, United States, Canada, Mexico, and Central America. South America becomes invisible just off beyond the terminator or inside the shadow. We can see the oceans with a definite blue cast, see white bands of major cloud formations acr
١١، هيوستن. لدينا رؤية جيدة من نقطة
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। पता नहीं क्यों, ड्रिफ्ट रेट का पता लगाना बहुत मुश्किल है। मैं सटीक ड्रिफ्ट रेट प्राप्त नहीं कर पाया हूँ। मु
I'd say the color of the - The local surface is very comparable to that we observed from orbit at this Sun angle, about 10 degrees Sun angle, or that nature. It's pretty much without color. It's gray, and it's a very white, chalky gray, as you look into the zero phase line; and it's considerably darker gray, more like a ash - ashen gray as you look out 90 degrees to the Sun. The - Some of the surfac
And w
روجر. نوصي الآن بالوضع التالي: ال
Ja, Blende 8 bei 1/250 Sekunde. Und nachdem Sie alles eingestellt haben, überprüfen Sie die Blende noch einmal, da sie sich 
休斯顿，我现在要进行星象校准。我的位置很
吉姆，结果为阴性。我们没有你的任何数据。比特
ठीक है। अब, अगला चरण सर्विस मॉड्यूल का पृथक्करण होगा, और इसके कुछ चरण हैं, लेकिन ताकि आप समझ सकें कि क्या हो रहा है, मैं इन्हें आपको पढ़कर सुनाता हूँ। वे प्रति सेकंड आधा फुट की दर से प्लस-X करेंगे। फिर आप उनके निर्देश पर SEP को ऑन और अप करेंगे। जैसे ही हम सर्विस मॉड्यूल से मुक्त हो जाएंगे, वे प्रति सेकंड 0.5 फुट की दर से एक और माइनस
ट्रैंक्विलिटी, ह्यूस्टन। हमें संकेत मिले हैं कि डिसेंट 
حسنًا يا جاك. الآن، الخطوات المتبقية هي ببساطة خطوات تهيئة حلقة البدلة لتشغيل هذا الجهاز بكامل طاقته، ويريد فريقنا تأجيل ذلك حتى يصل ضغط الخزان ال
On peut maintenant apercevoir les hautes montagnes à l'horizon, devant le vaisseau spatial, au nord de notre trajectoi
わかりました。もしミッドコース3がない場合は、FAMを55時間まで延長することになると思います。その場合は、そこに行ってSHeタン
«Дружба Се
제미니 4호, 카나리 CAP COM. ACME 전원 공급
यहां हर तरह का कबाड़ इधर-उधर
Maintenant, vous savez
O
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。お願いが一つあります。光学系をゼロに切り替えてください。マイク、先ほど7/10の速度で
好的。我在 F2-22 单元格的 Lima 列中，第 6 项为 0
उनकी प्यास एक मिनट में 
This, this operation of has been very erratic. I have not been able to pin it down to any particular, one particular item. It went off one direction in yaw at one time; it went off the other the next time. I felt for a little while that pitch was drifting. It seemed to have a little stuck thrust in pitch at one time and I 
Roger, 13 anni. A causa del guasto del sensore di quantità di O2 nel serbatoio 2, vuole tenere traccia più attentamente delle quantità di crio e ti chiederà di mescolare tutti i serbatoi criogenici a intervalli leggermente più frequenti di q
Questa è la Sigma Seven, solo in registrazione VOX. Ho ristabilito la modalità automatica in modalità normale, senza l'azione dei propulsori ad alta potenza. A questo punto ho l'85% di auto e il 90% di manuale. E sento che, ora che sono in funzione, posso fare degli esperimenti dove prima non ero in grado di fare. Ora abbasso la capsula in modalità fly-by-wire. Per prima cosa controllo: se accendo i miei radiofari, nessuno qui sotto può contattarmi. Se qualcuno ha un radiofaro in Sud America, merita di sentirlo. I radiofari sono accesi, per ben 3 ampere. Apro la visiera per asciugarmi il mento e penso che berrò 
いいえ。そうではあり
通常は転送の直前ですが
D'accord, Fre
휴스턴, 컬럼비아
Roger. We could feel the chug when we threw in BANK B, not a chug, but we co
쌍둥이자리 4, 여기는 캔턴입니다. 당신은 매우, 매우 약한 상태로 들어오고
Ok. E ci rendiamo conto che non abbiamo mai scoperto cosa è successo alla Mae West. L'hai lasci
Ok. Solo qualche informazione. Stiamo elaborando una procedura da utilizzare per... 
挿入チェックリストを確認中です。DC電圧はメインです。レトロマニュアルのヒューズスイッチはオフです。レトロマニュアルもオフです。計器類はすべて正常です。バッテリーもすべて正常です。交流電源も良好です。ところで、ブースターはどこでしょうか？ 下に美しい雲模様がありますね。ブースターは大きな雲模様の前にあります。どうやら、思ったよりも地球に近づいているようです。ブースターは現在約3.2キロメートル離れて
ठीक है, जैक। आगे बढ़ते हुए, सब ठीक है ज
我们采取的是直接进攻的
لقد قمت بتشغيل محركات تصحيح الاتجاه - الوضع العادي بدلاً من الوضع المنخفض. سأقوم بالتبديل إلى 
Понял. Настройте с
हवाई, यह जेमिनी VI है। 35:40 बजे हमारे पास डेटा थीटा 6.4 डिग्री है; रेंज 115.58; डेल्टा-V कुल 523; डेल्टा-VI 24.8। डेटा प्लॉट पूरी तरह से सामान्य दिखता है। 24:32 CC - - सामान्य और रेंज 
405 和 404—
هذه ف
正解です。
好的。我已经关闭了功率放大器、下行语音备份、PCM 转 LO 比特率，并且
Friendship Seven, ici Canary Cap 
ヴァンスさん、こんにちは。私たちは月を直接見るには少し距離を置いています。ジムが窓3からカメラを構えていま
Хорошо, давайте посмо
副本。T4，106 38 07；
좋습니다, 이제 추가 추진기 분사가 있을 예정이니 기다려 주십시
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لقد أكملنا هذا الاختبار. سنعود الآن إلى وضع الإرسال الكامل. عندما تسمعون التشويش المصاحب لفقدان التضمين، يمكنكم العودة من وضع الإرس
هذا صحيح. بمجرد ضبط ذلك وتحديد الوقت المناسب، سيتمكن فريقنا هنا من تزويدنا ببيانات دقيقة لوضعية فصل وحدة الخدمة، ووضعية محاذاة وحدة ا
Zens
罗杰，尼尔。第
Hawaii, this is Gemini VI. At 35 40 we have a data Theta, 6.4 
V
Houston, nous essaierons si nous en avons l'occasion la prochaine fois - quand nous ne serons 
Sigma Seven, qui
Both busses are okay. All--let's see--number two battery is down to 22. One, is 24; three, is 24; standby one and two, are 24; isolated, is 27; main, is
Roger, ti sento forte e 
罗杰，看来氧气瓶上的压力开关坏了。你最好把氧气加热器的模式从“自动”调到“关闭”，然后手动控制
我已
好的。下一步，在面板 5 上，将 CB POWER-1 MAIN B 
Okay, Jack. Tried the procedure and out of that pressur
D'accord. Je vais relire. COMPRESSEURS DE COMBINAISON 1
Okay. Ich wurde kurz unterbrochen. Bob Hope ist wieder mit seinen Truppen in Vietnam und leistet wie immer hervorragende Arbeit. Ein Name, der hier in den Nachrichten auf
D'accord, A
你真认为它的最高温度是 125 21？25……断路器已经跳
Okay. Wir sind jetzt bei der Checkliste vor dem Schlafengehen. Was den Statusbericht der Crew und die Medikamente angeht: Wir haben keine Medikamente bekommen. Und uns allen geht es richtig gut. Ich habe
Bene. Nella terza riga, sotto COMM: DISPLAY, aperto; SE AUDIO, chiuso; TRASMETTITORE VHF A, aperto - C'è una modifica - RICEVITORE VHF B, aperto; AMPLIFICATORE DI POTENZA PRIMARIO BANDA S, aperto; TRASMETTITORE/RICEVITORE, chiuso; ANTENNA BANDA S, aperto; PMP, chiuso; TV, aperto. Sotto: DI
음, 이 분화구의 이름은 랑그레누스라는 분의 이름을 따서 지어졌을 가능성이 있습니다. 랑그레누스는 스페인 국왕의 지도 제작자였으며, 초기에 제
Lumières allumées, je me sens bien, bonne humeur. Paramètres de la cabine: pression 1, humidité 65, température 20, pression dans le compartiment 1, premier détendeur automatique 155, deuxième détendeur automatique 155, pression dans le cylindre 320 atmosphè
هيوستن، إيجل هنا. ضغط الهيليوم في كلا الطائرتين 
What we're thinking about right now, Jerry, is hitting that wedge angle, about 2 degrees their limit. When we come back, the earth looks pret
E installo la tenda paraspruzzi, installo la diga di sicurezza, la maniglia di ricircolo dell'aria in cabina in ALTO. La maniglia dello snorkel sinistro in ALTO, la maniglia dello sfiato della cabina in ALTO. Il grilletto di sblocco del portello è staccato. Verifico che la guarnizione dell'acqua sia in BASSO e chiusa. Attacco il cordino, il portello sinistro aperto. Ripongo l'equipaggiamento di sopravvivenza del pilota di comando sul lato destro dell'astronave. Tutto il circuito di recupero... lato destro dell'astronave. Quello che devi fare è spostarti sul sedile sinistro con il tuo kit di sopravvivenza. Getto l'equipaggiamento di sopravvivenza del 
रॉजर। जेमिनी 4 यहाँ। मैं कमांड पायलट हूँ। मैंने अभी-अभी लगभग साढ़े पाँच घंटे की झपकी ली है, जिसमें से आखिरी तीन घंटे बहुत अच्छी नींद आई। पहले ढाई घंटे थोड़ी बेचैनी भरी रही। मैं चौथे दिन का दूसरा भोजन कर रहा हूँ और ज
Well - Okay - Well, this morning, let's just see how close it comes to being parallel to the M-line. Before we started marking for the first time, it appeared that the computation of - of those three angles was somewhat off, and that I was wasting a lot of gas by going to those three angles and then having to make large attitude changes after that to get the M-line parallel. In some cases it appeared to be just an accepted attitude required, and you all said that it wasn't needed. So I was marking in some cases with the M-line not parallel. I thought perhaps you had some proce
はい、そうです。BAT 6だけです、ジャック。次の行にはBATTERY 1と3とありましたが、BATTERY 1、2、3、4に直してください。BAT 2と4を足すだけです。4つのBATはすべて正
Хорошо. И в Эль-
ハワイ、ジェミニ VIII、別のポイント
Roger. When you get back into your surface checklist and 
शानदार न
阿波罗8号，休斯
Quels étaient ces quatre derniers
わかりました。まず最初にやりたいことの一つは、バッテリーを充電することです。そうすれば、そちらに電力を供給できるようになります。そのための手順も
了解。
वॉली, मैंने आपकी बात 
Хьюстон, б
حسنًا. أفهم من كلامك أنه إذا لم يتمك
What do you mean by bringing - bringing CSM tra
Starke St
حسنًا. لننتقل إل
Alright. The crew status is everybody has gotten real good rest last night, and everybody is in good shape. Jim is just waking up, and Bill is starting the initial stowage, and we all feel v
هذا سيجما سفن. على تردد HF. هذا سيجما سفن. على تردد HF. سأقوم بعدّ قصير. هذا للتحقق من تغطية HF على النطاق العالمي. مدة الإرسال 60 ثانية. أتمنى لو أعرف ماذا أقول لأشغل الوقت. ربما يساعدني التنفس بعمق. الكبسولة تعمل بشكل ممتاز، وأعتقد أننا على وشك الانتهاء من 60 ثانية. نستخدم HF للإرسال والتسجيل على النطاق 
わかりました。コピーする前に、ここで全部読んで、私たちが何を話しているのか理解してもらいましょう。この短い手紙のタイトルは「テレビと映画写真の相関実験」です。彼らがやりたいのは、望遠レンズを取り付けたテレビカメラをブラケットに取り付け、ランデブーウィンドウに設置し、赤と青のフィルターを通して地球のテレビ画像を撮影することです。フィルター1つにつき1分、つまり赤と青のフィルターを個別に撮影します。次に、赤色フィルター（この場合は25アルファフィルター）と偏光フィルターを組み合わせたフィルターを通して地球のテレビ画像を撮影します。偏光フィルターを360度回転させ、これも1つの位置につき1分です。次に、偏光フィルタ
这里是休斯顿。我们照搬了你们的百分比数
알겠습니다. 일반 음성으로는 제대로 전달이 안 되는 것 같네요.
ठीक है। और आपके पास 
11, 휴스턴.
Как вам этот контрольный спис
Хочу немного прокомментировать секстант. Его использование в тесном космическом аппарате очень затруднительно, особенно с надетым шлемом. В конце концов я решил, что с надетым шлемом будет бесполезно пытаться снимать звезды под нужными углами. Поэтому я снял шлем. Это дало мне немного больше гибкости в использовании, но я все еще был ограничен углами примерно в 20-23° без маневрирования аппарата. В результате звезда оказывалась бы закрыта верхней частью окна. Более частое и свободное маневрирование аппарата позволило бы расположить длинную ось окна в плоскости слежения. Мы были несколько ограничены запасом топлива и не стали использовать такой способ маневрирования. Мы также использовали импульсный режим, без большого количества маневров. Для этого запуска были выбраны звезды, расположенные под довольно большими углами, поэтому их было очень трудно снять с горизонта. В конце концов мы решили все же снять звезды немного ближе к горизонту. Как вы заметите, я сделал несколько измерений на Канопусе и еще на нескольких других телескопах. Синий фильтр, казалось, полностью блокировал горизонт; у меня его вообще не было, когда я его использовал. Наше изображение горизонта, вероятно, не такое хорошее при лунном свете. Зеленый фильтр, однако, дал мне, как мне кажется, немного более четкий горизонт, чем без фильтра вообще. Я не испытывал трудностей при проведении этих измерений ни с зеленым, ни с прозрачным фильтром. Тем не менее, горизонт не очень четко определен, и вам приходится как
了解しまし
부정적입니다. 알파는 53
Roger, Jim. Nous avons examiné les étoiles que nous vous avons attribuées. Il semble que la deuxième étoile, la numéro 11, ait un angle de rotation proche de sa limite, environ 49,7 degrés. Nous p
次の1、2、3、4も同じです。Sバンドスケルチをオフにし、燃料電池反応物バル
オーロラセブン
Il semble que les optiques n'aient pas été affectées, mais de la glace s'est infiltrée dans certaines vitres. On observe quelques petits morceaux de glace sur la vitre numéro 1, la plus proche de la ventilation, et également, en moindre quantité, sur la vitre numéro 5; les vitres 2 et 4 restent étonnammen
로
11、ヒューストン。この航路
Er leistet hier oben seinen Be
わかりました。この時点で、このセクションはすでにマークアップされているので、これからお伝えするのは、以
Okay. Die Lage ist: Nickwinkel 23,4°, Rollwinkel 184,7°, Gierwinkel 14,3°. Wir richten das Teleskop in dieser Lage aus, weil wir als Nächstes den Sichttest mit dem Scanteleskop durchführen werden. Dafür benötigen wir 70 Grad Sichtwinkel zur Sonne un
फ्रैंक, हम अभी आपके लिए सामान तैयार कर रहे हैं; देरी का यही कारण है। हम यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि आपको भेजने से पहले हमसे कोई गलती न हो जा
分かりました。パネル3：バッテリー充電、オフ。ジャック、これはもうやったでしょう。次はACインバーター。パネル5：メインバス接続、BAT B/CをBAT B/Cに接続。え？はい、上です。上側です。回路ブレーカー、BAT A パワーエントリー/ポストランディング、オープン。回路ブレーカー、BAT B パワーエントリー/ポストランディング、オープン。パネル5：CBバッテリーチ
D'accord. Mais quand il passe près de l
क्या आपको अभी भी यह दिखाई दे रहा है
У нас действительно есть всё, Чарли. У нас полно всяких вкусностей. Здесь, в верхнем левом углу, есть кофе и различные продукты для завтрака, бекон в маленьких кусочках, напитки, например, фруктовый сок, а в центральн
D'accord. Ça me convient. Pendant que vous attendez que le véhicule se stabilise, il serait intéressant de vérifier avec l'oculaire que la combustion n'a présenté au
Oui, on dirait qu'il 
알
是的，没事。它就在我脚
Роджер. Ты меня услышал
Вперед, Хьюстон! Gemini 4 готовы к повторени
一切都很顺利。迈克，我们今天下午看的演出非常精
ああ、心配しないで。私
ठीक ह
Rép
क्या आप इनमें से किसी भी तरह के दाग-धब्बे या किसी भी तरह की
Okay. And at the bottom of the page, step number 1. That will be at minus 19 minutes, and we're off and running through a normal sequence of ev
Okay. Die Temperatur am Sekundärradiator (Einlass) beträgt ca. 70–72 Grad; die Temperatur am Radiator (Auslass) liegt bei ca. 30 Grad; die Glykol-Verdampfungstemperatur beträgt ca. 65 Grad; der Dampfdruck ist im Vollausschlag, der Glykol-Auslassdruck liegt bei ca. 9 psi. Der Sekundärakkumulator zeigt für die Anzüge ca. 52 Grad an; die Kabine ca. 58 Grad; die Drücke betragen für die Anzüge 4,1 und für die Kabine 5. Der CO₂-Partialdruck liegt bei etwas über 1, ca. 1,1. An der Hauswand beträgt die Temperatur 72 Grad, der Heliumdruck 3500; N₂ A 2300; N₂ B ca. 2450. Der Brennstoffdruck liegt bei ca. 165 Grad; Brennstoffzelle 1 ist geschlossen, sie ist funktionslos; die Oberflächentemperatur beträgt 405 Grad. Der Kondensatorabgasstrom liegt im unteren Bereich. Brennstoffzelle 2 – aktuell haben wir einen O₂- oder H₂-Durchflusswert von 0,13 bis 0,14. Der O₂-Durchfluss liegt momentan am oberen Skalenendwert, obwohl er je nach Triebwerksaktivität schwankt. Dies hat auch zu einer Unterspannung an Hauptbus A geführt, die von einem konstanten Wert von etwa 1,1 V bis zum oberen Skalenendwert reicht. Der TSKIN-Wert liegt bei etwa 445 V und der Kondensatorabgasstrom bei 17 V, Korrektur: 180 V. Wenn Sie die Anzeige aktivieren möchten: Brennstoffzelle 1 hat 0 Ampere; Brennstoffzelle 2 zeigt einen Wert zwischen 44 und etwa 48 V an – ebenfalls abhängig v
Хорошо. Рекомендую вам это проигнорирова
Хорошо. Мы купим то, что у вас есть, и хотели бы провести общую процедуру отключения питания, в ходе которой мы за
هذا سيجما سفن. فهمت رسالتك بوضوح. كي
रॉजर। संज्ञा 33 से शुरू करते हुए: 130 30 0000, प्लस 00020, प्लस सभी शून्य, प्लस सभी शून्य। रोल सभी शून्य, पिच 230, यॉ शून्य। अनुपलब्ध है। डेल्टा-वीपी 00020, बर्न टाइम 007, डेल्टा-वीसी 00020। हमारे पास है - शेष पैड अनुपलब्ध ह
Это «Дружба номер семь». Теперь я контролирую ситуацию, используя слабый толчок влево. Я не кон
Al momento non possiamo vedere alcuna luce cinerea o alcuna caratteristica superficiale nella luce cinerea, perché è 
イーグル、ヒュース
Wenn wir uns hier draußen im freien Bereich befinden, wenn wir definitiv außerhalb des Scanbereichs sind, werde ich die manuelle und automatische Zielerfassungssequenz aufrufen und auf REACQ umschalten, um zu sehen, was beim näc
네, 맞습니다. 엔터 키를 누르면 덤프가 시작됩니다. 그 직전에 10,
ठीक है। हम आरंभ समय और समाप्ति समय सुझाते हैं, और आप तैयार हो जाएंगे। हम आपसे बाएँ ओर घूमने की दर का अनुरोध कर रहे हैं, जिसे हमने देखा है कि आप प्राथमिकता दे रहे हैं, प्रति घंटे 1 चक्कर की बाएँ ओर घूमने की दर, और यह आपकी वर्तमान स्थिति में है (अर्थात, पिच 10 डिग्री, 010 डिग्री, और यॉ 45 डिग्री)। चरण 1, 150 डिग्री के रोल कोण पर रुकें; अधिग्रहण करें - यह चरण 2 है - मैन्युअल मोड में अधिग्रहण करें; तीन, ऑटो नैरो बीम पर स्विच करें; चार, सुनिश्चित करें कि ट्रैकिंग ऑटो मोड में है, फिर ऑटो रीएक्यू मोड पर स्विच करें; पाँच, उच्च-लाभ वा
맙소사,
- - 저희 분석은 모두 14암페어까지 전력을 낮춘 상태를 기준으로 했지만, 현재 측정값은
비상시 객실 압력 
Okay. PAD: 102 33 04.36, 09 50, meno 00021 182 287 000, più 56919. minore di 10: 105 12 30.00. maggiore di 10: 103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00. No più 12 abort: 102 44 27.00, più 01223, meno tutti zeri, più 01889 01520, più 00110 02250 046 000 190, più 
ठीक है। हमें कुछ मिनट दीजिए ताकि हम संभल
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地から昨夜の地質学に関する質問についてコメントをいただきます。私たちは、比較的滑らかなクレーター地帯に着陸しました。そこには細長い二次クレーター、つまり円形の二次クレーターが点在しており、そのほとんどには、大きさに関わらず、隆起した縁があります。これは必ずしも全てがそうではありません。周囲には、はっきりと縁が見えない小さなクレーターもいくつかあります。この地域全体の基質は、非常に細かい砂からシルトまでです。地球上でこれに最も近いのは、粉末状の黒鉛でしょう。この基質には、丸みを帯びたものや角張ったものなど、様々な形、大きさ、質感の岩石が埋まっており、多くの岩石の硬さは様々です。先ほども申し上げたように、私は単純な玄武岩や気泡玄武岩のようなものを見ました。結晶のないものや、小さな白い斑晶が1%から5%未満含まれているものもありました。そして、岩についてですが、私た
यह बहुत उपयोगी
यह मिथुन राशि VI है। मुझे लगभग 12 बजे की दिशा में एक रोशन लक्ष्य दिखाई दे रहा है। यह एक तारा हो सकता है
في يوم من الأيام، يمكننا إحضار نظام MOCH بأكمله، وهذا سيوفر الكثير من عمليات تبديل الهوائي
انتظر قليلاً، وسأقوم بضبط الإعدا
네
E con l'attivazione manuale del cubo LR, la piccola molla all'estremità della corda viene staccata dalla testa del plettro. Tuttavia, sono riuscito ad allungare la mano, af
로저, 11. 아마 눈치채셨겠지만, 폐수 배출, 연료 전지 퍼지, 그리고 자연적인 결합으로 인해 모드에서의 원뿔형 각도가 상당히 증가했습니다. 따라서 조금 있으면 여기서 교신을 종료해야 할 것 같습니다. 그리고 달 착륙선 내부에서 TV 신호를 계속 송출할 계획이신지 여쭤보고 싶습니다
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。もう一度、探査をお願いします。自動光学系
Okay. Die Informationen darunter, beginnend mit „Kamera-Erdschein-Fotos konfigurieren“ bis einschließlich „Dunkelheitsfilter ersetzen“, sind optio
Dove hai mess
好的。没错，这位是吉姆·洛弗尔。我们今天想带大家简单了解一下阿波罗8号内部的生活。我们已经向大家展示了月球和地球的景象，现在我们想邀请大家走进我们的“家”。正如你们在仪表盘上看到的，这里至少已经是我们生活了4天。我们在仪表盘上标记了每一天。现在已经过去4天了，我们正在进行第5天的工作。当然，我们都非常期待周五的着陆。在飞船的下部设备舱里，总统的体能顾问吉姆·洛弗尔上尉正准备进行我们每天都要进行的锻炼。你们注意到他活动自如。他刚才不小心撞到了导航光学系统。他正在使用一种锻炼设备来保持肌肉状态。现在，我们飞船的另一个非常重要的功能是计算机。我想你们可能对这里的显示屏感兴趣，它能显示我们所有关于燃烧、导航以及地球轨道任务中重返大气层和反推阶段速度的信息。你们可以看到，它是由一个类似打字机键盘的装置控制的，输入输出的数据简直令人惊叹。它为我们出色地完成了任务，吉姆·洛弗尔（Jim Lovell）的操作也非常出色。现在，无论是在太空还是在地面，吃饭都是非常重要的事情。我请比尔·安德斯（Bill Anders）向你们展示我们在飞行中是如何进食的。请原谅我们在这里移动和更换摄像机时画面可能会有些模糊。我们使用的食物都是脱水的，预先包装在真空密封袋中。你们可以看到，比尔只需要松手就能让它保持静止。除了飞船内的气流之外，
حسنًا. لم أكن أت
Je vais le 
D'accord, Jim. On est d'accord avec toi sur ce point; c'est un sujet qu'on voulait aborder avec toi. On y a réfléchi, et voici notre avis: bien sûr, la décision te revient, mais vu les avantages et les inconvénients, tu as clairement identifié l'avantage. On effectue un contrôle d'intégrité des écoutilles peu avant EI moins une heure, et si le contrôle est négatif, tu auras du mal à enfiler tes combinaisons. Par contre, l'inconvénient, c'est que les combinaisons pourraient te ralentir considérablement, sans même compter le temps pour les enfiler. De plus, quelqu'un craint qu'après un certain temps passé dans les combinais
好的。您可以切换到 O2 HI RATE 模
Roger. Es sieht nicht so aus, als ob d
Da ist es, es komm
Roger, abbiamo una scala co
Fotogramma 55 sulla Hasselblad
Всё примерно
로저. 방금 드신 내용
分かりました。ジョー、一つ
Negativo
Tatsächlich ist das ein
Rog
The Sun bounces off the structure. With the attached, that telesco
That is affirm
Not significantly
Okay. Immagino che 
11，这里是休斯顿。在我们的TM机上，我们只能看到两个寄存器
А сколько у нас времени до того, как нам пр
Okay. L'ultimo numero che ho dato era C. Gi
Ich vers
로저. 플러스 90, G&N: 63481, 마이너스 153, 플러스 132, 004 10 25 38, 마이너스 04761, 플러스 00001, 플러스 53361, 180 193 000, 해당 없음, 플러스 00203 53573 633 53349, 33 1578 122, 사용 불가, 마이너스 0252, 마이너스 02580 11887 
我告诉你，为什么不把它放在——放在你的
はい、
يا أهل هيوستن، انتبهوا لتقنية فلتر الأحمر/الأزرق هذه على التلفزيون. لا يمكنكم إزاحة الفلترين جانباً وهما مثبتان على كاميرا التلفزيون؛ لذا أقترح أن نستخدم الأحمر أولاً، ثم الأز
收到。55%。请问温度和压力是多
복
Okay. In Zeile 14, unter HEIZSYSTEM A/B-1: QUAD 1 bis 4 öffnen; darunter die einzige Änderung: Unter GLYKOLPUMPE AUTO TRANSFER schließen
알
さて、次のページ、16ページです。これは太陽コロナに関する同じ内容の続きです。ページの右側、107:40のすぐ上にある「太陽コロナ姿勢へのマヌーバ」から始まり、55の「ダークスライドの交換」のすぐ下にあります。これ
11번, 휴스턴. 12피트 케이블을 사용하면 카메라를 설치할 때 약 5~6피트의 여유 공간
… S-5… Bonjour 
एक्वेरियस, ह्यू
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कैमरे का कुछ हिस्सा जल गया है। बज़, ये तस्वीरें वाकई बहुत खूबसूरत
Roger. Ciao, ho un a
Roger, Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Je vai
जैक, मैं आपको सारे चरण पढ़कर सुना देता हू
给你一个新的
Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили поворот на 90 градусов. Внимательно следите за углом наклона центрального к
मेरे पास कुछ और जानकारी है। अगले दो घंटों तक हमें आपके मार्ग के बारे में कोई सटीक जानकारी नहीं मिल पाएगी। हमें लगता है कि दहन प्रक्रिया बहुत अच्छी रही है, इसलिए हम इसकी बारीकी से जांच कर रहे हैं और लगभग दो घंटे में 
收到。燃烧时
Il est très intéressant de noter que mon assiette est d'environ 30 degrés de cabrage, 130 degrés de roulis à droite et 20 degrés de lacet à gauche. Le ballon se déplace actuellement dans le même sens que moi, en maintenant un cap constant. On aperçoit à nouveau l'horizon, cette fois-ci du côté éclairé par la lune. Voyons voir… Avec le filtre anti
Да. Здесь всё просто замечательно. Я вчера видел обеих 
收到。即将进行信号弹测试。请稍候。标记 00 [加] 58
मेरे पास कुछ सर्विस मॉड्यूल की मात्राएँ हैं, यदि आप चाहें तो इन्हें कभी ले सकते हैं और अपन
了解しました。それについては後回しにしておきます。「アクティベーションページ1、1A、2を繰り返す」という3ステップの簡単な手順だったのですが、その中に誰も理解できないステップがもう一つありました。ですから、その場合は、SUPERCRITの圧
罗杰，查理。我想向你们汇报一下我们的氯化消毒情况。在B4隔间，我们有1、2、3、4、5、6、7个——更正一下，是8个氯和缓冲剂安瓿的隔间，其中——让我更正一下，是7个隔间，其中一个是空的，一直都是空的，还剩下6个。在另一边的B7隔间，我们还有一个容器，里面有7个隔间，所以总共有7个加6个，里面装着
Роджер. 15+26. 
रॉजर। यहाँ सब
... 
Seitlich befanden wir uns im MIN-Totbereich ATT HOLD; beim Aufsetzen gab ich Schub + X; kurz darauf ka
Ok, Jack. Questa procedura non è stata ancora sperimentata; tuttavia, i percorsi hardware attraverso cui scorre la corrente sono gli stessi che abbiamo utilizzato durante la traiettoria translunare, e non c'è alcun problema di 
استعد يا نسر. است
Auf Seite 14, rechts, unten unter „Orbital Science“, streichen Sie „Verify ON“ durch, löschen Sie außerdem „Visual target 3 on track 180 plus 19“ 
Okay, Fred. Those are good numbers, and we're not going to have to cr
रॉजर। एक दिलचस्प बात: मेरी बीच 
D'accord. Comprenez bien: le soleil est à droite et entre par vo
罗杰，杰克。
حسنًا. فهمتُ رسالتك جيدًا الآن. أردتُ فقط تذكيرك بأنه في حال انقطاع الاتصال، لا نريدك أن تُهدر 7 نقاط. بياناتك الحالية صحيحة. سنُحدّث نقاط هبوطك في نفس الوقت الذي كنت ستُهدر فيه 7 نقاط، وأودّ أن أتلقى منك تقريرًا عن 
Okay, Jim. That's a tiny hair shallower than we had you before, but it's based on solid tracking, and 
Роджер. Полагаю, мы поняли, что на глубине до 3 дюймов мы не наткнулись на твердое дно, и на этой глубине не произошло существенных изменений в составе. Следующий вопрос: второй образец был упакован довольно поспешно из-за ограниченного времени, и я хотел бы узнать, могли бы вы предоставить более подробное описание образцов, которые были включены во второй 
I just worked out an answer to move my landing longitude 6 degrees east. I just want to compare with what they've got based on the same burn time of, based on the bias impact longitude determined from the which is wr
よし。君たちは寝て、フレッド
罗杰。月球入射，MPL：359 152 001 194 46 03 267，正负 1102，负 17203 068 36194 656 11894 36275；195 03 03 0027，四个 NA，400 02 09 00 17 03 38 08 20 02 0945 149，天蝎座θ。上升 315，右转 35，上升。假设没有 6。地平线位于 -30 194 33 03，俯仰角 298。落
報告を進
이글, 휴스턴. 중단 단계 요청, 재설정,... PROP 재설정 및 모드 제어를 ATT HOLD로 변경해 주세요. 시간이 되시면요
حسناً. يكفي هذا القدر من الحديث عن القمر يا تشارلي. سنبدأ ال
관성계 로저. 자, 2번 PAD로 가겠습니다. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, +166, -081; TIG 080 11 3603. NOUN 81: -01408, 모든 볼 -00743. 모든 볼 굴리기, 196 359 00657, +00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. 육분의 별 23 1160 138. 나머지 PAD는 NA입니다. 정렬, 베가와 데네브 243 183 012. 여유 연료, 제트기 두 대 19초. 비고: 적재량에 대해 비행 계획에 표시된 값 대신 R1 20101을 적용해 주시기 바랍니다. 육분의를 이용한 별 관측은 별이 지평
روجر. هذه مركبة فريندشيب 7. حالتي: أنا قيد التشغيل، لكن الوضع ليس مستقرًا تمامًا. لقد انعكست مشكلتي في الانعراج. خلال الجزء الأول من الرحلة، عندما واجهت صعوبة فوق الساحل الغربي للولايات المتحدة، كان لديّ مشكلة في 
우정 7
Ich könnte sehr leicht von einem anderen Planeten kommen und das Gefühl haben, auf dem Rücken zu liegen und die Erde über mir zu sein, aber so ähnlich fühlt man sich, wenn man aus einer Spl
Hawaii, Houst
حسنًا. في هذه الحالة، أعتقد أنني سأستخدم بع
حسنًا، يجب أن نعالج مشكلة اللفة التي واجهتني الآن بعد أن عادت الماسحات الضوئية إلى
और विकिरण र
阿波罗8
Roger. Un dettaglio che pensavo dovessi sapere sul modulo di servizio JETT è che ti consigliamo una manovra push-pull, ovvero nell'assetto che ho descritto. Ti consigliamo di procedere a 15 cm al secondo più X, poi di sganciare il modulo di servizio, quindi di procedere a 15 cm al secondo meno X, il che richiederà
Houston, 
Да. Возможно, это правда. Это очень своеобразное взаимодействие, поскольку оно длится дольше, чем можно б
ヒューストン、こ
ヘルメットのバイザーの中に、青い先端の手袋が入っています。今から取り
阿波罗8号。我们即将进行飞掠机动。这次的坐标为/63087，-162，+129，+009 62，+005 68，-020 77 000 000 000，十一月阿尔法，+00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013，向上048，向右37，+1418，-16500 129 04 361 60。北极星
ああ、最初の日没を見逃すところだった。右側のキャビンライトを消そうとして、かなり急激に沈むと聞いていたのに。でも、
هل تريد خ
罗杰。星号 - 代码为星
Водолей, Хьюстон. Если вы давали мне эти предсказания, я их н
독수리, 대기하세요. 4
ठीक है। सब प
そうだね、あのポケットと財布を持って行った方がいいかな。ところで、予備のカメラが入っ
我始终没明白你想让我关掉哪个 ECS O2 开
不行，Buzz。情况还是不太好。好像你走动的时候，信号会断断续续的。你检查过信号调
Ok, 11. Siamo a Houston. Alle 22:30 circa del piano di volo, nella tua checklist post-sonno e in tutte le altre checklist post-sonno, 
जो, मुझे यहाँ एंटीना बदलना ह
Roger. Good readback. Okay, continuing on. Nothing on page 6; nothing on page 7. Nothing on page 8 or 9. Nothing on page 10 o
Roger. PAD. TIG of 125 19 3470; TIG of 126 57 0000;, 0532 plus 0000; NA; 373 03196; 275 04170; NOUN 86 plus 0532, plus 00
Э
Сейчас вы смотрите на наш зонд, на носовую часть «Одиссеи». Это очень тяжёлая штука, но, полагаю, в условиях невесомости она ничего не весит, и её гораздо лег
아니요, 이건 ~에 관한
जी हाँ, बिल्कुल। 71 घंटे पर ऑक्सीजन फ
我
D'ac
Да, мы это сделали. Я не смотре
I unders
네, 저도 그걸 알아챘어요. 아무리 멀리 떨어져도 소용없어 보
अपो
阿波
Yes, that hydrogen thing, it's - I'm not sure, but I think it's a backpressure problem. If the thing sees any backpressure
Roger. DELTA-H update as follows:, , ENTER 1354, ENTER all zeros, ENTER 214 50 ENTE
रॉजर, ब्रूस। धन्यवाद। हमें टीवी चाहिए। हमने सब कुछ कनेक
Okay. We'd like the S-BAND POWER AMPLIFIER to 
收
Okay. This maneuver is going to put you very close to your scan limits for the high-gain antenna, so while you are making the maneuver, check your lights. If your scan limit light comes on, you still have got 15 degrees to play with. But the only message is, should you break lock, then you are going to have to go back and reacquire and do that maneuver over again, because you are going to be very close to the edge of
Главные новости сегодня в Хьюстоне касаются «Астрос». В спортивном мире «Хьюстон Астрос» в девятом иннинге в Цинциннати одержали победу над «Редс» со счетом 7:4. Однако перед началом девятого иннинга ситуация выглядела довольно безрадостной. «Астрос» проигрывали 4:3. Затем, при одном ауте, Хесус Алоу сделал сингл в правое поле. Джон Эдвардс сделал еще один сингл вправо, а Сэнди Вальдеспино сделал дабл, сравняв счет. Ху
Roger. Abbiamo due ingranaggi che ruotano quando si tira la maniglia avanti e indietro. Uno di 
D'accord. Autre chose à retenir: dès que la coupure de courant survient vers 05 h, notez-le dans votre liste de vérifications; une fois la communication perdue, éteignez l'a
Ho copiato. Evidentemente la copertura nuvolosa è tropp
罗杰，11。这里是休斯顿。大约在71到7
Nein, der Abf
Roger. On your fuel status latest analysis looks like we're just going to have enough to complete the Flight Plan and still keep our gage in accurac
とても良いです
हाँ, बिल्कुल। मैंने इसे थोड़ी देर के लिए खुला रखा था; अब बंद कर दि
好的。还有一点需要记住，我们还没看到月亮——我们没能看到它全貌，而且返程时也很少能看到它。自从离开后，我们只看到过一次，
收到
네
버뮤다 동쪽에서 
Ok. Angoli lineari approssimativi: ROLLIO, più 298,95; BECCAGGIO
فوق أفريقيا الآن. التقطتُ للتو الصورة رقم 56 بكاميرا هاسيلبلاد. كانت م
نعم، جميع مفاتيح الصمامات لا تزال في نفس الوضع يا جوردو. لم أغير أيًا منها. جهاز الإشعال مُفعّل، ونظام الارتداد التلقائي مُعطّل. أنا أستخدم نظام 
Хорошо. Полагаю, этот бланк был отправлен вам сегодня днем. И когда вы перевернете страницу на E-8, там будет показано, что проверка ввода выполняется за час до истечения этого времени, и вы знаете, что это короткий тес
Ещё один момент, который следует учесть 
Okay. Warte kurz, Charlie. Jim schaut mal nach, ob er – er glaubt, er hat Scorpio.
D'accord. La seule chose que je ne comprends pas, c'est pourquo
우주선 우측 후방에서 촬영한 하강부 스커트 부분을 찍은 사진 한 장을 보면 표면 색깔이 상당히 어두워진 것을 볼 수 있는데, 이는 표면의 방사선 조사나 침
ठीक ह
Das ist richtig. Und das entspricht der gleichen Trägheitslage, die Sie auf der Rückseite Ihrer Einreisekarte finden, wo 
Ich muss also gute Arbeit leisten, damit w
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 창문 가리개는 승무원의 편의를 위한 것 외에는 
J'ai annulé la correction de trajectoire; charge de la batterie B et vid
알겠습니다, 빌. BIOMED 데이터가 여전히 좀 이상하네요. BIOMED 하네스의 파란색 신호 컨디셔너를 확인해 보시겠어요? 가운데 패키지에 파란색 커넥터가 하나 있을 겁니다. 그걸 확
아주 좋아. 타이밍이 딱 맞아, 월리. 내가 역연속 카운트다운을 시작할 테니, 5초에 
Gemini 4, this is Houston. You really sound great, and we'll see yo
Okay. Copy that, Fred. Was the bell deformed on the outside or just nicked
Roger. Nous avons examiné les graphiques et obtenu exactement le même résultat que vous. Votre mé
रॉजर, जिम। ब्रेक, जैक, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अभी जिस डेडबैंड में हैं, उसी में रहें, और टीवी खत्म होने के बाद हम बदलाव करेंगे। एक और चीज़ जो हम आपसे करवाना चाहते हैं, वह यह है कि आप अपने हाई गेन मीटर पर पिच और यॉ की जाँच करें ताकि हम इसकी तुलना यहाँ दिख
ロジャー、シドニーの明かりを見たって伝えてくれないか。点灯したかどうかは分からないけど、もし点灯
We've only got two of them
سننتقل م
यह सही है। प
هيا يا هيوستن. أبولو 8. صو
Bien. Nous arrivons maintenant à la vue que nous voulons vraiment vous montrer: la Terre. Si vous faites une petite paus
सदन की वेज़ एंड मीन्स कमेटी ने कल तेल कंपनियों, बैंकों और बिजली कंपनियों को प्रभावित करने वाले कर परिवर्तनों पर
分かっています、ジム。その点は重々承知しています。5分ほどで出発準備が整うはずです。私に言えるのはそれだけです。待機してくだ
Roger, Hawaï. Compris. OBTENIR B burn, 01 34 
Okay. This will - This just involves changes. Look down to the third line where it says "TUNNEL VENT valve, TUNNEL VENT for 30 seconds;" cross out "30 seconds" and cross out the two lines below that. In other words, " DELTA-P. Check DELTA-P and recycl
哥伦比亚，这里是休斯顿。纬度
روجر، مايك. لدينا تحد
Nein, das kann ich sicher nicht, aber ich glaube, es hat unsere... es hat unsere... ver
While we're pointing up in this direction, we see out our side windows the Sun going by and, of course, out one of our windows right now we've got the Earth. Now right behind my window, of course, we have the Sun, because the Sun is illuminating the star charts that we see. This line represents the ecliptic plane and these lines, vertical lines, represent our reference system that the spacecraft is using at this time. As we approach the Moon, the Moon will gradually grow larger and larger in size and eventually it will be in - it will be eclipsing the Sun as we go behind it, as we approach the lun
진흙탕에 빠졌군요. 네, 알겠습니다. 다시 켜달라고 요청하세요. 짐, 오토 코일, 링 1, 메인 A를 다시 켰습니다. 작업이 끝나
Apollo 8, stavamo ottenendo quello che ci hai mostrato con il tuo obiettivo normale, e non credo che abbiamo ottenuto nulla con il teleobiettivo. Ci stiamo lavorando ora. Uno dei problemi sembra essere che si tratta di un obiettivo per basse luci; temiamo che tu possa bruciarlo puntandolo su qualcosa di tr
ठीक है, वैंस। असल में, आप जिस मूवी कैमरे का इस्तेमाल करना चाहते थे, वह हमारा लूनर सीक्वेंस कैमरा है जो पावरपैक से जुड़ा हुआ है। हम 18 मिलीमीटर लेंस का इस्तेमाल करते हैं, 8 सेक
맞습니다, 그럼 
I confirm that that 
ジェミニ8号、こちらヒューストン。結果を
Роджер, Севен. Мы рекомендуем на третьем витке использовать гироскопы по своему усмотрению, в обычном или свободном режиме, чтобы в случае, если до начала тормозных вращений на третьем витке сканеры не будут правильно запрограммированы, вы могли использовать гироскопы в свободном положен
Wie weit sind wir draußen, Char
Roger. Ho capito che vedi la luce da Perth. Ti daremo un aggiornamento sullo stato del radiatore tra un minuto e, se puoi, indicaci il tuo orario GMT per il tuo es
確かに私の真下です。カーナボンあたりからずっと真下を追っていました。カーナボンあたりまでは真下、そして地平線まで上がり、そして再び真下まで来ました。まるで私の軌道とは違うように見えました。遠地点と近地点も私の軌道とは違っていました。とにかく、位置がわかるとすぐに、日が暮れてから接近を試みました。先ほど言ったように、その時は私の1、2マイル先、真下にいました。つまり、接近しようとすればするほど、実際には接近できなくなっていったのです。私は逆噴射していました。上部スラスターを使って総速度を落とすように噴射し、そして…同時に噴射していました。実際には接近できず、ブースターは私から遠ざかり続けました。ハワイに着く頃には、ブースターを使った船外活動に間に合うように接近するには、搭載燃
ह्यूस्टन, हाई बिट रेट के संदर्भ में, मैं यह करना चाहता हूँ - अगर आपके पास पिछला पास है - तो मैं उसे चलाना चाहता हूँ - उसे वापस चलाकर लो बिट रेट से शुरू करना चाहता हूँ और फिर ज़रूरत पड़ने पर हाई ब
참고로 케이프 측에서는 우리가 여기서 한동안 수동 조종을 유지하지 않으면 이 궤도 비행을
هناك الكثير من الضو
Apollo 8, Houston. Quando ti è comodo, sposta il tuo interruttore BIOMED sulla destra e non dovrai più rispondere; te lo passerà
Pulse에서 ACME OFF
안녕하세요, 프랭크. 1차 라디에이터 출력 온도 센서에 문제가 생
アクエ
Привет, у меня
Roger, Neil. Sotto la colonna 1, quella è la colonna Lima, riga 06. Il nu
4 للأمام، 5 لليمين، 3 ل
Roger. Vediamo il
We had a slight 
بدأتُ الآن أرى شروق الشمس في المنظار. هذا أول ضوء يظهر في المنظار خلال هذه الدورة تحديدًا نتيجةً للجانب الليلي. من الواضح أن المنظار لا يعمل إطلاقًا في وضع الرجوع للخلف على الجانب الليلي. أول ضوء أراه الآن في وضع شبه مظلم. يشرق الشمس بسرعة كبيرة عبر المنظار. لديّ الأجسام المضيئة التي ذكرها جون، ويمكنني توليد المزيد منها بإزالتها. لديّ إحساس واضح بوجود حقل منها، تتفاوت أحجامها من صغيرة إلى ساطعة. المنظار نفسه يُعمي بصري. سأضطر إلى وضع الخريطة عليه لأتمكن من الرؤية من النافذة. أنا في وضع الرجوع للخلف في أي وقت، لذا ليس لديّ ما أفعله سوى النظر من هذه النافذة. بافتراض أن دائرة البدلة تعمل بشكل جيد. تساعد تلك الخريطة كثيرًا في إخفاء ذلك المنظار اللعين. إنه حقل كبير جدًا من هذه الأجسام. من المؤكد أنه يمكنك إزالتها من الفتحة، كما قال سكوتي. وتنطلق هذه الأجسام بسرعة، وبالتأكيد لا توجد مشكلة في تقدير أنها تبتعد عن الكبسولة، بسرعة مختلفة عن سرعتك. إنها بالتأكيد أبطأ من الكبسولة نفسها. بنقرة واحدة، يمكنك رؤيتها تنزلق لل
Roger. Eintrittspunkt: Gebiet ist der mittlere Pazifik, Roll 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, Breite plus 1332, minus 16917, 064, 36194, 649, Entfernung zum Ziel 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 00 2
Vous avez réglé la cabine à 3,5. Est-ce
로버트 고다드 부인은 오늘 남편이 얼마나 기뻐했을지 이야기했습니다. "소리를 지르거나 하진 않았겠지만, 얼굴에 미소가 가득했을 거예요." 그녀는 덧붙였습니다. "달에 로켓을 보내는 게 남편의 꿈이었거든요." 전 세계 사람들은 아폴로 11호 임무에 기뻐할 이유가 많았습니다. 이탈리아 경찰은 일요일 밤이 올해 들어 범죄 발생 건수가 가장 적은 밤이었다고 발표했습니다. 그리고 런던에서는 1970년 이전에 사람이 달에 갈 거라고 믿고 5달러를 걸었던 한 소년이 2만 4천 달러를 따냈습니다. 정말 대단한 
È davvero una vista fantastica attraverso 
रॉजर। मिडपैक एंट्री पैड: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, प्लस 1102, माइनस 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 0028, डीएल और वीएल एनए, 4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380, स्कॉर्पी डेल्टा - स्कॉर्पी थीटा, ऊपर 314, दाएं 34, ऊपर। कोई मध्यमार्ग सुधार नहीं, क्षितिज, टीआई माइनस 30, 194 33 03, पिच 297, डेनेब और वेगा, 078, 233, 340। समाप्त
好的。让他告诉我们他——他都在看什么。提醒他，他看不到
마이크, 아직 우리 눈에 들어오시
La rispo
탐사선에 밝은 점들이 보입니다. 태양빛이 비추고 있어서 간신히 관측이 가능한 것 같습니다. 
هيوستن، أبولو 11. رون، هل يمكنك أن تقدم لنا تفسيراً 
Roger. Wir haben jetzt eine ganze Menge Sterne zu markieren, Mike, und es gab da ein paar Bedenken. Könntest du uns 
Sì. Sembra che 
Okay, Jack. The procedure's okay, and then we had to go back to the and do something. And the first line is okay, cross out "BAT 5 and 6 OFF," delete that. And delete the next line also, that says "Panel 11 to 16 ASCENT ECA CONTROL, open." Then we had a couple of notes which 
نعم، لقد أحكمت ربط جميع المقابس وفحصت جميع الأسلاك، وبدا كل شيء على ما يرام. وعندما يستيقظ الآخرون، إذا ذكرتني بال
Roger. Vorremmo che il tuo interruttore di lettura della quantità foss
ジェリー、9をコピーするため
Ro
分かりました。バッテリーの状態ですが、バッテリーAは39.32アンペア時間、バッテリーBは35.21アンペア時間、バッテリーCは38.46アンペア時間でし
UHF 대역에서 더 잘 읽히는 것 같
双子座4号，夏威夷 CAP 
收到。我们正在核实吉姆对他的评论；同时，我这里有你的行动方案和地图更新，方便的时候可以
Sigma Seven, this is Muchea, I did not read 
罗杰，你正在掉队。我们差不多到了。飞行队仍然
11, concordiamo sul fatto che avere, su, potrebbe aver avuto qualche effetto sulla tua iniziazione. Sembra che questo darebbe - lascia che il computer funzioni con una conoscenza degli angoli CDU effettivi. Quello che vorremmo che facessi è un CDU zero, ovvero,
ठीक है। मेरे पास पेरीसिंथियन प्
11、ヒューストン、写真が消えてしまった
Bien sûr. Et, voyons, nous voulions simplement vous informer que la batterie est bien chargée cette fois
रुकिए, वैंस; मुझे समझ नहीं आ रहा। क्या हम पेज 34 पर
تبدو رائعاً هنا. كيف ت
نحن على خط SIM
Аврора Севен, 
罗杰，这里是西格玛七号。吉恩，我完全明白你的意思。我的状态没有改变。
अपोलो 8 में हमने ह्यूस्टन के साथ कुछ ऐसा ही किया था... बज़ ने जाकर कमांड मॉड्यूल के हीटर चालू कर दिए और उन्हें चालू ही छोड़ दिया। एक्टिवेटर्स ने कहा, "शू!" दोनों टैंक; हमारे पास ईंधन नहीं बचा था। गति बहुत धीमी थी... हम कंसोल में गए और ब्रीफिंग शुरू की,
En haut, il y en av
Well, yes. We haven't completely configured the suit loop to get full flow through there
ロジャー
짐, 저희 일정에 따라 진행하는 방법은 먼저 JETT 서비스 모듈 작업을 진행하고, 그 상태를 유지하는 것입니다. 그리고 저희가 계획한 일정에 따라 플랫폼을 이륙시켜야 할
نعم سيدي. دعنا نرى - لحظة من فضلك - دعني أتحقق من هذ
11, Houston. Nous vous recommandons de désactiver Bravo et Charlie; sélectionnez les quad
Go ahead, Houst
धन्यवाद। क्या मैं अब बम्प कर रहा हूँ
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Прочитываю пункт 382: клапан регулирования подачи воды в
Nein, vielleicht habe ich 
Here are your retro times, if you are rea
さあ、ヒューストン。ジェミニ4号
حسنًا يا قائد. سنراك هناك. لقد كانت رحلة رائعة للغ
Okay. Ich schildere Ihnen meine Beobachtungen zum Hauptbus B. Dort ging alles ziemlich schnell. Zuerst hörten wir den Aufprall, die Explosion oder was auch immer es verursacht hat – ich bin mir nicht sicher. Ungefähr eine Sekunde später gab es einen Hauptalarm: Unterspannung am Hauptbus B. Ich habe die Spannung überprüft, und sie war zu diesem Zeitpunkt in Ordnung. Ich vermute daher, dass es sich um eine Spannungsspitze handelte. Brennstoffzelle 3 funktionierte ebenfalls einwandfrei und hatte einen guten Durchfluss. Fred kam in diesem Moment ins Kommandomodul und nahm auf seinem Platz Platz. Kurz darauf leuchtete die Kontrollleuchte für den Wechselstrombus 2 auf. Er überprüfte den Hauptbus B, und dieser zeigte Null an. Sowohl der Hauptbus als auch die Brennstoffzellen
ヒューストンCAP COM、ジェミニVIです。VIIがあなたに話しかけていますか？ 下の方から何か聞
Bonjour, Apollo 8; c’est Deke. Je voulais simplement vous souhaiter un très joyeux Noël de la part de toute l’équipe du
Вот репортаж Гарри Розенталя из Associated, Хьюстон. Два Санта-Клауса украсили сочельник для двухлетнего Джеффри Ловелла. Первый постучал в его входную дверь и принес подарки. Второй проводил его папу домой с Луны. Первый был в красном костюме и с белой бородой, и его крики «Хо-хо» были слышны за кварталом. Второй представлял собой огромный двигатель, извергающий пламя за Луной, и тысячи людей ждали известия о его запуске. «Пожалуйста, примите к сведению, что Санта-Клаус существует», — такими были первые слова «Аполлона-8», когда он вышел из радиомолчания, чтобы сообщить встревоженному миру через 15 минут после того, как двигатель выполнил свой критически важный запуск. «Никто из нас никогда не ожидал получить лучший рождественский подарок, чем этот», — сказал Кен Маттингли из Центра управления полетами. «Поблагодарите всех на Земле за нас. Вы знаете, что мы бы не справились без вас», — последовал ответ полковника Фрэнка Бормана, командира космического корабля. В этот момент перед пультами в Центре управления полетами загорелась рождественская елка, и астронавт Харрисон Шмидт прочитал экипажу космическую версию «Визита Святого Николая». «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и далеко в космосе экипаж «Аполлона-8» только что выиграл лунную гонку», — начиналось чтение. Экипаж Центра управления полетами отложил празднование до тех пор, пока отец Джеффри, капитан ВМС Джеймс Ловелл, вместе с майором ВВС Уильямом А. Андерсом и полковником Борманом не отправятся домой. В любой другой сочельник семьи астронавтов были бы в церкви на рождественской службе
Okay. I understand what you are saying now. I'll run that back by the TV guys and see what they have to say about that. In conjunction with the above, they wanted to take some Hasselblad pictures of the earth through the rendezvous window with the red and blue filter and black and white film, and then again through the polarizing filter, and this is all going to be used in order to try and correlate the TV and the regular film photography. So if you think it is a worthwhile thing, and you would like to give it a try
はい。ずっと稼働させていて、気温はだいたい乾球温度が72～75度、湿球温度が60～64度くらいです。相対湿度
Okay. We're observing middle gimbal angle getting a little bit high. The appears to be deadbanding okay 
حسنًا. ما زلتُ أستخدم وضع SLEW، لذا قد نخسر بعض النقاط أثناء تغيير زاوية الميل
Les propulseurs d'attaque fonctionnent bien, le suivi rapproché doit être effectué uniquement en mode de com
네. 16mm 렌즈는 바로 앞에 있을 때는 f/11이고, 그렇지 않을 때는 f/28입니다. 35mm 렌즈는 ASA 200 필
हम चंद्रमा से लगभग 20,500 मील की दूरी पर हैं। य
Houston, voici une petite démonstration pour les enfants à la maison, et pour tous les enfants du mo
Roger. Ihrem Wunsch wird entsprochen, Juri Alexeje
Did
अपोलो 8, ह
حسنًا، شكرًا لكم. هذا أحد الأسئلة الأولى التي تبادرت إلى أذهاننا. نحن
我注意到好几次，当我从阳光下进入阴影时，刚一进入阴影，除了脸上的反光之外，还会有额外的反光照射到头盔面罩上，导致从阳光下进入阴影的过渡区域能见度非常差。基本上，我的面罩上反射了大量的眩光，以至于头盔都进入了阴影区域。然后我的眼睛需要一段时间才能适应光线条件。在阴影区域内，正如我们之前所说，能见度不太好，但面罩向上翻起后
六分儀について少しコメントしたいと思います。狭い宇宙船内での使用は、特にヘルメットをかぶっていると非常に困難です。最終的に、ヘルメットをかぶったまま、要求されている星々の角度を測ろうとするのは無駄だと判断しました。そこでヘルメットを外しました。これにより、六分儀の使用範囲は多少広がりましたが、それでも宇宙船を操作せずに観測できる角度は20～23度程度に限られていました。星々が窓の上部に隠れてしまうのです。宇宙船をより頻繁に、そして自由に操作すれば、窓の長軸が追跡面に入るように操作できます。しかし、燃料の制限があったため、このような操作は選択しませんでした。パルスモードも使用しましたが、操作はあまりしま
Gemini VIII, hier spricht Houston. Stellen Sie den Kryogenik-Mengensch
Nun ja, es gibt – ich 
Хорошо. Пос
Привет, у меня есть топливный элемент - кислоро
Хорошо. Отклю
रॉजर। आपकी ओर आ रहा हूँ। 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; माइनस 061, प्लस 067 135 23 4149;, प्लस 32020, प्लस 06713, माइनस 02773 181 054 013;, HA अनुपलब्ध है, प्लस 00230 32833 228, डेल्टा VC 32625 24 1510 355। अगली तीन लाइनें अनुपलब्ध हैं। प्लस 1103, माइनस - माइनस 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52। आपके निर्धारित तारे डेनेब और वेगा हैं, 242 172 012। हमें 16 सेकंड के लिए दो जेट उलेज पसंद हैं। क्षितिज TIG माइनस 2 मि
Okay. At 1 minute, "MASTER ARM," we scratch. At 35 seconds, scratch the first two lines. "Manual Ullage" will start at 9 seconds; we're scratching the blocks at 02 seconds; and the line beneath that, at pl
Roger. Ich schätze, ein Teil der Kamera ist da unten durchgebrannt. Die Bilder sind jetzt aber wirklich wunderschön,
रॉजर। मैं फिर से दोहराता हूँ, मैंने अभी जो निर्देश दिए हैं, उनके अनुसार कैमरा ख
좋습니다, 휴스턴. 상태 벡터를 슬롯으로
Хорошо. Сделаю. Опиш
こちらフレンドシップ7号。カプセルは無事に
알겠습니다. 버즈가 제미니 X에 하나 가지고 있었는데, 아주 잘 작동했
Okay, fine. Coming over the States here at G.m.
ईगल, कोलंबिया। मेरे 
了解。AUTOになって
Okay.
ठीक है। अब उस पृष्ठ पर, जहाँ फ्लाईबाई पैंतरेबाज़ी का विवरण है, आपके उत्तर दिशा के तारामंडल के नीचे, मेरे पास आपके लिए कुछ नए आंकड़े हैं क्योंकि हमने उन तारामंडलों को नवी और पोलारिस से बदल दिया है। जैसा कि आपको याद होगा, ह
37-델타 114. 2+25.
Let me work on back. Listen, it's all the difference in the world with this gun. When that gun was working, I was maneuvering all ar
好的。电源6。好的。电源6指的是11号配电盘。你应该按照图表操作，除了我提到的那些断路器。第一行没问题。或者说，第一排。第二排，四联断路器4，TCA，闭合；四联断路器3，TCA，闭合；四联断路器2，TCA，闭合；四联断路器1，TCA，闭合。这一排的其余部分都没问题。第三排，大约在中间位置，ATCA（PGNS），闭合。好的。这一排的其余部分都没问题。第四行，加热器 - 待机。好的。这一行除了最后三个断路器（Fred，在下方，即待机，运行）之外，其他
哦，对，对。继续打开——慢慢打开喷嘴……继续努力
罗杰，你想给我们量一下这个血压吗
杰瑞
Roger. That's affirmative. And there isn't any way of tellin
그리니치 표준시는 1707시
告诉我们具体时间好吗？我们只想知道什么时候。如果可以的话，我想把终结者带过来，我们还有一条信息要传达，就
That was -3. That was the third choice, remote are
わかった。やめて。続
Okay. Die nächsten drei sind identisch, und dann stellen wir „TREIFERMITTENABLAUF“ auf „BEFE
D'accord. Pour répondre à ta question, Joe, non. J'ai vérifié la CAB
أهلاً روجر، زنجبار كابكوم. فريندشيب 7. جميع الصمامات كما هي كما أُبلغ عنها سابقاً؛
Nous prévoyons que votre consommation d'eau va diminuer et, à ce moment-là, DELTA devrait atteindre 160 à 165 heures très prochainement. Nous souhaitons également savoir où 
とても簡単に見つけられます。ここからクレーターの縁全体を見渡すことができ、もちろん、太陽が照らす向こう側には白い三日月形が見えます。影はかなり長くなっています。マスケリンB（眠りの沼地）に
我问你
잠시만 기다려 주세요. 정확한 사실을 알려드리
Ok, Jack. Capito. Solo una domanda:
Okay. Ich nehme an, wenn Jack in dieser Position nach Angabe der groben Anstellwinkel keine Sterne sehen kann, werden wir Ihnen nicht einfach unsere Kardanwinkel vorlesen und Sie bitten, einen Zielwinkel für Jack zu berechnen, son
现在，回答问题 2，当然，第二阶段出现了振动瞬态，这是由于 5 号发
नहीं, नह
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपको अंदर आते हुए देख रहे हैं। जैसे ही आप हमें स
Ricevuto. Lettura della quantità di propellente. U
D'accord. Ed, nous comprenons que vous n'avez pas votre tensiomètre sous la main. Pourriez-vous gonfler le
了解。G&N: 62710、プラス098、マイナス019、077 46 22
جيميني 8، هيوستن CAP COM. تأكد من اكتمال TR ناقص 4 16 ونحن في انتظار
Ok, Jack. Puoi procedere con la configurazione degli interruttori. Quello che stiamo discutendo è di farti attivare gli interruttori del motore MAIN BUS TIE più avanti, semplicemente per verificare che funzionino correttamente, perché le batterie probabilmente si stanno raffreddando un po'. Ma torneremo con una procedura e una dis
Включите резервный голосовой сигнал, разомкнув а
네, 짐. 대략 맞습니다. 잭이 그 자세로 대략적인 정렬을 할 겁니다. 바로 그 자세로 조종하도록 당신에게 지시한 이유입니다. 대략적인 정렬을 위한 짐벌 각도를 계산해서 잭에게 전달할 거고, 잭은 도착하면 체크리스트에 따라 제일 먼저 플랫폼의 대략적인 정렬을 할 겁니다. 그런 다음, 별이 보이지 않으면 달 관측 자세를 위한 각도를 당신에게 빠르게 전달할 거고, 잭은 달 관
稍等，我去核实
Oui. Je suppose que la question principale est de comparer les billes ici et par la fenêtre; cela ne semble pas trop aberrant. Jim dit que le lacet et le roulis sont légèrement différents de ce qu'il pourrait évaluer à vue d'
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। अपोलो 11 लगभग 130,000 मील दूर से संदेश भेज रहा है। हम अपने कैमरे को धीरे-धीरे ज़ूम करेंगे और जितना संभव हो उ
حسناً. كان اختبار الماسح الضوئي هو سبب المشكلة. وقد سارت عملية الدوران كما توقعنا. وسأعود الآن إلى ا
실시간 
Nos mesures télémétriques indiquent une attitude de tangage de 25 négative et 
يا رجل، أكره أن أقول هذا بناءً على ما رأيته من خلال هذا المنظار، ولكن هناك بقعة بيضاء تشبه الفوهة - تبدو وكأنها كبيرة جدًا تحت هذه الفوهات الصغيرة الحديثة في قاع هذه الفوهة القديمة نوعًا ما، ولكن في مركزها تمامًا، يبدو الأمر ك
حسناً. هذا صحيح... الشخص الذي يمارس ال
يقول مديرك
Aurora Seven. Hawaii Com Tech
Nur
Il s'agit de l'
저 위에 있는 커플은 아마 거기서 나
هيوستن، أب
روجر. شكرا
双子座4号，R
... pick me up..
D'accord, Houston; 13. O
रॉजर। हमें एसेन
D'accord. Et étape suivante, panneau 12: FONCTION S-BAND à VOIX et FONCTION RANGEMENT à RAN
哇，我们离月球一定很
L'équipe de vol indique qu'elle dispose d'excellentes communications 
И одна из приятных вещей, Джек, особенно для новичка вроде меня, это — легкость передвижения внутри. Конечно, как вы знаете из работы в 
حسنًا. البطارية أ 38.3، البطارية ب 36.9، البطارية ج 38.5. يبدو الوضع جيدًا. يبدو أننا أعدنا تركيب جميع الأجزاء التي أزلناها، والأمور تسير كما هو متوقع. نود منك قياس جهد البطارية ج، إذا أمكن
好的。这是LM机动平台，PC加2小时，从08:33.0开始，减去00:50.9，减去02:13.9，不适用，加上00:20.5，08:61.5，4:24，272，081，其余均为不适用，但
在这种飞行姿态下，确实会产生一种抬头仰望的错觉，如果没有地平线，那就只有一片漆黑的天空。驾驶舱内的光线非常明亮。当然，一旦适应了，就可以通过舱内照明灯来降低亮度。但目前，由于飞行服电路的问题，我不太愿意降低舱内照明。我频繁地使用指尖照明灯。有人指出，在以后的飞行中，我们必须配备一个万能装置，可以把东西塞进去，并暂时固定住。我正在努力解决垫圈和那块小金属片的问题。我……终于把它们塞进了舱门上的小袋子里。飞行服的温度勉强维持在正常水平。
是的，也许是这样。这是一种非常奇特的耦合，它的响应时间比你想象的要长，而且响应幅度也比你想象的要大。例如，我们测得的偏航率大约为每秒0.
هذا صحيح. ن
नमस्कार। रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। आ
さて、次のページ、16ページです。これは太陽コロナに関する同じ内容の続きです。ページの右側、107:40のすぐ上にある「太陽コロナ姿勢へのマヌーバ」から始まり、55の「ダークスライドの交換」のすぐ下
بالمناسبة، كان الاتصال رائعاً. لا 
Roger. Können Sie bitte bestätigen, dass der Schalter für da
Das war eine ziemlich gute Schlafgelegenheit, die ich da improvisiert hatte, Jack. Ich habe eine der Schlafgurte aus dem Kommandomodul genommen, mich darin eingeschnallt und dann den Gurt direkt oben am Reißverschluss am oberen Lukengriff befestigt. So wurde ich quasi gehalten und bin dann kopfüber im Tunnel nach obe
오늘 날씨가 좀 좋았던 것 같
Je suis stable à 70 maintenant.
रॉजर। म
Die Strecke vom Boden bis zum hint
जी हाँ, महोदय। यही नक्शा है। प्रत्येक तह के निचले या ऊपरी दाहिने कोने में अक्षर अंकित हैं (यदि आप पूर्व से पश्चिम की ओर बढ़ते हैं)। चार्ट को D, E और
يوجد الآن مستوى رطوبة أعلى في النفق مقارنةً بأي وقت مضى. لم نتمكن، من الناحية العملية، من تحديد أي تغيير في مستوى الرطوبة. ويبدو أنه لا توجد رطوبة في أي مكان آخر في المركبة الفضا
Roger, resta in attesa f
Roger. Earth is here, also; and, Jim, it is time for another one of those
オーケー、ヒュー
好的。明白你已经完成了。飞行计划上的下一个项目应该是扫描望远镜可见性测试，这和你之前在飞行计划中提到的项目一样，我们将检查太阳在70度角时是否对准大角星。之后，我们需要进行耳轴偏差检查，然后我们将进入……
Okay. Good thinking. We are - it's - There has been a lot of consideration of what kind of maneuvers to let you do to photograph the, I mean the service module. We consider it quite low priority; the feeling is that it will be real nice to get pictures of the service module, but they are not required for our troubleshooting program. As far as the - the attitude control authority, and so forth, we will get you mo
우리는 세계에서 가장 완벽하게 정렬된 플랫폼을 갖게 될 겁니다. 한 시간
أكواريوس، هيوستن. نعتقد أننا وجدنا طريقة لتوفير بعض الوقت لكم في جدول أعمالكم المزدحم للغاية. وذلك 
Sì, tutti gl
ठीक है। क्या आप म
باز، كيف حالك هناك، هل الشاشة تقدم لك
わかりました。ありがとうございます。ジャイロの最大ドリフトは、X-ジャイロで毎時0.03度です。PIPAではY-PIPAが最大で毎秒0.006フィートなので…微調整中です。ジャイロと加速度計の両方で、最大のドリフ
Roger. Jetz
Roger, quella pagina è NC-7. La rileggerò. Poi pro
Tranquility Base, Houston. Wir haben hier unten starke Störungen. Könnten Sie das bitte wie
Le coucher de soleil est vraiment saisissant, je ne pense pas avoir besoin de m'attarder à l'admirer. C'est fascinant. L'autre chose, c'est le noir absolu quand on n'est pas habitué. Je distingue nettement un revêtement sur la vitre. Je retourne en mode VOX sur UHF haute fréquence pour transmettre. J'ouvre la visière pour nettoyer le micro droit. Je l'ai léché. Je referme la visière. Elle a été immédiatement scellée pour que le circuit de ma combinaison puisse fonctionner. Je ne veux plus avoir de problème avec ça. L'entrée d'air de la combinaison se maintient bien à environ 68 degrés. Je vais donc remonter le dôme. Il est maintenant à 76, 75. Apparemment, ce réglage plus élevé est celui qu'il nous faut. Je pense que je vais encore augmenter d'un demi-cran et on aura peut-être trouvé la bonne température. Il commence enfin à faire un peu frais, je sais donc où je vais avec le réglage. J'ai réglé la quantité de liquide de refroidissement pour la combinaison et le levier de commande à 8,5. L'affichage du dôme indique actuellement 75 degrés. L'entrée d'air de la combinaison est à 68 degrés. Très agréable. Je sens l'air frais sur mon visage. La quantité d'oxygène est excellente, entre 60 et 75 psi. Je surveille l'onduleur 250. Il approche les 140 degrés, et le contraste du 150 est descendu à environ 100 degrés. La température de veille est d'environ 100 degrés, soit la température de la cabine. Troisièmement
G
Qui, sui miei finestrini, vedo una velocità di circa 30 piedi/sec. Il booster si è allontanato piuttosto rapidamente ed è passato sotto di noi, come se ci fosse una differenza considerevole tra le nostre velocità, e ho fatto fatica a non lasciarlo al
المنظر من هنا رائع. أتمنى لو كان التلفاز لا يزال يعمل لأن المنطقة البنية أصبحت أغمق. لقد مررنا للتو 
好的，听起来不错。因为我不知道我刚才讲得你一头雾水。好的，面板 4；电信，组 1，至 AC1。在面板 5 上，关闭以下线路：压力组 1，主 B；压力组 2，主 B；温度，主 B；二次回路传感器，主 B；散热器控制/加热器，主 B；电池继电器总线，电池 B；电池充电器，电池 B；逆变器控制，2；逆变器控制，1；传感器信号，AC1；传感器信号，主 B；传感器单元，AC1；废水/饮用水，主 B；仪表，
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。も
Negativo. In questo momento sono di atte
Ok. Apprezziamo il tuo apprezzamento. Ci stiamo divertendo un mondo qui a lavorare su un sacco di nuove procedure, Fred. La sessione è in corso e prevediamo di avere le tue procedure 
That's affirmative, Jim. After
Wie
我不知道为什么
了解しました。それは嬉しいです。ちょうどこの辺りで放水の話をしてたところ
Aquarius, Houston. Wir glauben, eine Möglichkeit gefunden zu haben, Ihnen in Ihrem sehr engen Zeitplan Zeit zu sparen. Wir könnten einen angedockten Kurskurs auf A-Linie fliegen, da wir jetzt wieder auf dem Wasser sind. Das würde Ihnen ein 
好的。请您关闭编码器。我们需要
E che dire della parte relativa ai sistemi, per 
Роджер, ты хочешь, чтобы мы 
阿波罗8号，你现
मुझे पूरा यकीन है कि ये हिमालय ही हैं, क्योंकि मैंने गोर्डो की खींची हुई तस्वीर देखी है। वो बहुत अच्छी तस्वीर थी। मुझे लगता है हमने... ओह, ओह, हमने सूर्यास्त की 
了解。そうしま
ठीक है। हमें आपका डेटा मिल गया है। हम आपके लिए डेटा पढ़ने को तैयार हैं, और जै
罗
オーケー、ヒューストン
Oui. Oui, allez-y, ajoutez-en encore u
बहुत बढ़िया, शानदार। आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं कि इस दर्रे पर वूमेरा में कोई फ्लेयर्स नहीं होंग
مرحباً، أبولو 11. هيوستن. نلاحظ أن زاوي
Well, right now, after we put that gadget in, we've got it back to 0.35. Before that, we were r
Im manuellen Proportionalmodus, mit gezogenem Hebel und aktiviertem 
Warten Sie kurz. Ich werde Ihnen d
حسنًا. سنتوقف الآن ونُجري مناورة للوصول إلى وضعية معايرة البصريات. في هذا الصدد، ما كنت أحاول إخباركم به بالأمس كان يدور حول هذا الأمر. خط M ليس مو
Roger. Hier ist Friendship Seven, manuell gesteuert über Fly-by-Wire, läuft problemlos. Sehr sanft und einfach; lässt sich hervorragend steuern. Die Sicherungen auf dem linken Panel sind unverändert. Der Zünder ist scharfgeschaltet. Die automatische Rückstoßzündung ist deaktiviert. Fly-by-Wire, Automatik, Gyro normal. Voller Treibstoff, alle T-Hebel sind eingezogen, Rückstoßverzögerung normal. Ich habe gerade einen wunderschönen Blick aus dem Fenster auf die Küste. Startet gerade. Kann den ganzen Weg über Florida sehen. Cape C
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. У нас нет возражений против сброса мочи. А что касается сброса сточных вод — по нашему графику, мы планируем отложить его примерно до, и это позволит вам довести уровень сточных вод в баке примерно до 90 процентов. Это немного выше обычного, но мы хотели отложить это до завершения работы двигателя; и еще кое-что, что у нас запланировано, это продувка кислородного топливного элемента; и мы уже упоминали об удалении наблюдений за звездными ориентирами. С 10 до 11 мы отложили время на подготовку к работе двигателя. И окончательный с
Ok. Ci sono alcuni dubbi derivanti dalla lettura della checklist. A quanto ho capito, sia la caldaia principale che quella secondaria saranno accese al momento dell'ingresso effettivo, ma non c'è un punto nella checklist in cui siano effettivamente accese. Vorremmo quindi avere conferma di ciò 
Подтверждаю. Хорошо. В третьем ряду, в разделе «ТОПЛИВО»: «РЕГУЛЯТОР ГЕЛИЯ СПУСКА/ВЕНТИЛЯЦИЯ» должен быть открыт. «РАДАР СЪЕМКИ В РЕЖИМЕ ОЖИДАНИЯ» — открыт; «РАДАР ПОСАДКИ» — открыт. В разделе «УПРАВЛЕНИЕ/УПРАВЛЕНИЕ»: «ATCA» — открыт. 
मुझे उम्मीद है कि आप
حسنًا، 11. هذه هيوستن. نحصل الآن على صورة رائعة لجبل
分かりました。なぜそ
حسنًا. تبدو الأنظمة جيدة بشكل عام يا بيل. سنبدأ دورة تشغيل مروح
안 돼, 마이크. 
水瓶座，
حسنًا. نقترح أن يرتاح قائد وحدة القيادة (LMP) بينما يكون قائد وحدة القيادة (CMP) وقائد الوحدة (CDR) مستي
حسنً
Ricevuto, Fred-o. Ora non lo siamo pi
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。我们随时准备进行逻辑检查。我们已做好启动逻辑系统的准
了解。ちなみに、レートコマンドも全軸で動作しています。以
ठीक है। सूट का तापमान 69 डिग्री है 
Non è male. Fa un po' caldo qui dentro. Sembra che faccia caldo quando vado a dormire. Non so perché. Dovrebbe fare freddo, ma poi sembra che si scaldi e li abbiamo ten
Jim ha appena visto un altro satellite. Non ce l'ha ancora descritto come ha fatto con l'altro. Questo era a 37. Non era corretto. Correggilo a 02:37 o
Хорошо. Теперь повернем вентиль подачи воды — ЗАКРЫТО. И я достану тв
Okay. Fe
-0.7
こちらフレンドシップセブン。左への低速突きは制御できています。右への低速突きは
रॉजर। क्या आप मेरी कम बिट दर की नकल कर रहे हैं? ओवर
Wir zeigen Ihnen jetzt den Bereich südlich - südwestlich des Kraters Jansk
罗杰。杰
Okay. Könnten Sie mir das in w
Apollo 8, Houston. Il tuo booster è configurato normalmente e non siamo preoccupati per l'elevato f
了解、アポロ11号。番組をありがとう。本当に素晴らしい30分でした。感謝します。どうもあ
अच्छा। 12 1383 327 023 ऊपर 1
ヒューストン、ここで聞くことすべてを
Ro
Roger. Stiamo lavorando alla pressurizzazione dell'abitacolo e stiamo lavorando sulla decalcomania con l'equalizzazione della pressione CSM. E siamo arrivati ​​al punto 13, dove aspettiamo che la pressione in cabina sia 5, o dovrebbe essere circa 5, prima di girare la valvola O2 del pacchetto REPRESS su FILL. Invece di 5, stiamo a
وها نحن نعود مجددا
Questa è Friendship Seven, in una tana nascosta 
而且你得到了一
阿波罗8号，我们已经完成了计算机部分。你可以返回BLOCK程序了，现在看来你的
Und zurück in Washington stimmte der Finanzausschuss des Repräsentantenhauses Steueränderungen zu, die Ölkonzerne, Banken und Energieversorger betreffen und die Bundeseinnahmen um fast zwei Milliarden Dollar pro Jahr erhöhen könnten. Außerdem kündigte die NASA heute an, 1972 eine große Orbitalstation mit einer verkleinerten Version der Saturn
ジェミニ4、ジェミ
了解。ここの地形は、ご覧の通り、はっきりしません。目標エリアを横切るために、左にロール
Ricevuto, Buzz. È un PAD di ingresso, MPL, che inizia con il rullo 05, 35 - correzione - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, più 1102, meno 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, NOME 69, tu
À Reno, au Nevad
D'accord. Vance, je crois comprendre que vous aviez dressé une liste de choses à récupérer plus tard, des éléments que nous ramènerions d'ici. J'y ai ajouté deux ou trois choses: nous avons récupéré les filtres des tuyaux d'adm
罗杰。
크고 또렷하게 들립니다,
Friendship Seven, this is Zanzibar Cap Com. We don't have word from Canaveral instructing us to instruct you to 
わかりました。
Okay, Vance. Te lo posso dare. L'ho letto subito dopo averlo acceso. La tensione della BAT A era 39,4 e l
弗雷德，我听不懂你在说什么。或许我们最好等到换天线再说，或者除非你能大声
了解しました。パネル275の回路ブレーカーMAI
この通過では
روجر. قد يهمّكم يا سكان المركبة الفضائية كولومبيا أن تعلموا أن اليوم هو عيد الاستقلال في كولومبيا. تُوّجت غلوريا دياز من الفلبين بلقب ملكة جمال الكون الليلة الماضية، بعد أن تفوقت على 60 فتاة أخرى لتفوز باللقب العالمي. تبلغ الآنسة دياز من العمر 18 عامًا، بشعر وعينين سوداوين، ومقاساتها 34.5-23-34.5. أما الوصيفة الأولى فكانت ملكة جمال أستراليا، تلتها ملكة جمال إسرائيل، ثم ملكة جمال اليابان. وبينما أنتم في طريق عودتكم مساء الثلاثاء، سيلعب نجوم الدوري الأمريكي والدوري الوطني البيسبول في واشنطن. من المتوقع أن يكون ميل ستوتلمير من فريق يانكيز هو الرامي الأول في الدوري الأمريكي. لم يُعلن بعد من سيكون الرامي الأول في الدوري الوطني، إذ يضم ا
了解、ジャック。バッテリーBの充電
अब मैं सामान्
«Аполлон-8». Хьюстон. У меня для вас результаты матча. Окончательный счет: Окленд — 41, Канзас-Сити — 6. 41:6 в пользу Окленда. Мы пытаемся подготовить для вас пресс-релизы. Подозреваю, что главной новостью дня, вероятно, станет постаново
Questa è u
Roger. Nous avons ici l'Interstellar Times, édition du 24 décembre. Votre émission a rencontré un vif succès. Elle a été regardée ce matin par la plupart des nations de votre planète voisine: la Terre. Elle a été diffusée en direct dans toute l'Europ
Ricevuto. Dopodiché ne ho dato un altro. BAT 2, ALT
짐, 이해했습니다. 저 축의 온도는 영하 4
И, Водолеи, проверьте свой автоматический выключатель A
아니요, 카나본 에어로메드 패스를 받은 이후로 아무것도 먹지 않았지만, 음식을 꺼내 놓았고 이제
Hou
V
LOS, 스콧, LOS가 있었어요. 제 말 들리세요?
没错，地面控制中心，用这门炮操控非常容易。我唯一的
아
Well, that's about it for now, Frank. We got some more news that they promised they would bring over as soon as it comes off the wire. The only thing of real interests were - particularly the Pueblo release. I think you've already been told about the - Nixon-Eisenhower wedding. A
Je pense que Jim va enlever son casque pour le reste des séances; il fait un peu suffocant à l'intérieur. Ces casques n'ont pas de visière, et on a du mal à respirer ave
Roger, Apollo 8. Esatto. Vorremmo ricontrollare un numero sui 90 minuti
00:1
Недолго. Хорошо, инвертор 2... Вот, подержи свет, Джи
درجة حرا
Super. Écoute Ed, on veut modifier le plan de vol et on aim
쌍둥이자리 4호님, 
كين، هل يمك
Roger. Verstanden. De
حسنًا، هذا صحيح. الآن نقترب من -45 دقيقة، وسنعطيك نقطة دخول ومتجه ا
67；氧化剂是 63；下降罐 1……是 64；氧化剂
Ich habe die Einstellungen der Wechselrichter nicht verändert. Hier noch einmal eine kurze Zusammenfassung: Die Wechselrichter stehen au
Bien reçu. Ensuite, mettez la vanne de vidange des eaux usées en posi
자, 어떤 게 있는지 확인해 봅시다. SPS 모니터 점검 -
Роджер. 3./46427, минус 053, плюс 141,
没错。看来——不太确定是哪个程序……运行了。我们看到你输入了动词35，我想应
नहीं, जैक; मैं इसकी पुष्टि करूँगा, लेकिन मुझे ऐसा बिल्कुल नहीं लगत
П
罗杰，11。我这里有一份飞行计划更新，可以让你以最佳姿态观测地球（在1号窗口）和月球（在5号窗
Punto n
روجر. سيجما سبعة. غوايماس كاب كوم. واضح تمامًا. انقطع التيار الكهربائي في كاليفورنيا. نقرأ وقت التسلسل العكسي الصحيح. عند إشارتي، لنرى، وقت كبسولتك المنقضي متقد
あなたのデータを記録するつもりなら、そう
Roger. On a 
Хорошо. 2 плюс 56 плюс 37, с учетом времени маневра и времени SEP, 3 плюс 0
우리가 연료를 몇 갤런이
Y
아폴로 8호, 극저온 데이터 복제할
Хорошо. У Джека есть камера с 250-миллиметровым объективом. Это стандартная EL. А у меня есть наземная камера, к
मैंने आपकी बात साफ़-साफ़ सुन ली। मुझे हैरानी है कि क्या कैनरी को सूट सिस्टम के बारे में मेरी 
आगे बढ़ो, कुंभ राशि वा
I just have a comment to make about the -- is the tape running over there? Is th
Хорошо, я получил свой... но прежде чем продолжить, хочу сказать, что
We had - Okay. As soon as possible we'll get that star data... we can get 
後ろの方に色々付いてるね。きっと…テストの…
Отчет о состоянии двигателей выглядит следующим образом: время работы двигателей, время работы двигателей 4 минуты 6,5 секунды, VGX - 1,4, ориентация номинальная, триммер не установлен, VGY равен нулю, VGZ - +0,2, C - -20,2, орби
双子座
Roger, 11. Abbiamo un aggiornamento per te sull'os
All I'm doing is waiting for - the time; everything el
نعم. أتذكر أنني بدأتُ في البداية من الجانب المقطوع من المنطقة التي كانت كاميرا التلفزيون مُصوّبة عليها، وأخذتُ عددًا من عينات الصخور على السطح، وبعضها الآخر تحت السطح مباشرةً - على بُعد حوالي 20-15 إلى 20 قدمًا شمالًا. ثم تذكرتُ أن تلك المنطقة ربما تكون قد جرفتها عوادم محرك الهبوط جيدًا، لذا عبرتُ إلى الجانب الجنوبي من المنطقة، وأخذتُ 
That was a funny one. You know, I didn't feel it shock, an
Спасибо. 179 009 001, неприменимо, плюс 00187 32870 307 32676 42 0880 253 033, вниз 121, влево 27, плюс 0790 минус 16500 129 73 36238; тот же северный курс Сириуса и Ригеля, крен 129, тангаж 155, рыскание 010, четыре квадруполя в течение 15 секунд, горизонт на отметке 2 градуса в т
알았다
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 통신이 되지 않습
네, 아쿠아리우스입니다. 휴스턴.
Ach herrje, ich bin gerade zufällig in eine kopfüber liegende Position geraten. Aus irgendeinem Grund kann man sehen, dass die Schüssel auf dem Kopf stand
Okay. That brings the Moon in. We ca
Répétez. Vous tenez un costume
Beh, è ​​stato bello parlare con te e avere tutte le notizie dal fronte interno. Mentre sorvolavamo Housto
네,
Okay. Ich verstehe, dass die Nadeln genullt 
Hai... hai un guadagno e
알겠습니다. 그리고 밴스, 혹시 AOS 시간이나 저희
자, 그럼 다른 국내 뉴스를 살펴보죠. 데이비드와 줄리 아이젠하워 신혼부부는 비밀 신혼여행지를 떠나 닉슨 대통령 당선인과 그의 가족들과 크리스마스 만찬을 함께했습니다. 뉴욕시에서는 세계에서 가장 붐비는 항구가 5일간 이어진 하역 노동자 파업과 드문 선박 운항 중단으로 크리스
Roger. Amitié Sept. Je vous reçois également, mais ma voix est un peu co
きっと成功
Вы е
Я сейчас смотрю на 2P-2, Хьюс
रॉजर, फ्रैंक, पिच और यॉ में एटीट्यूड होल्ड के साथ आप अभी 1.4 पाउंड प्रति घंटे ऊर्जा खर्च कर रहे हैं। हम यह देखना चाहते हैं कि स्पिन स्टेबिलाइज़ेशन के कारण 0.3 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड की वृद्धि से आपकी ऊर्जा खपत कम हो
자세는 아주 잘 확인됐습니다. 의심의 여지가 없습니다. 
그리고 제가 지적하고 싶
Wir befinden uns momentan in einer sehr flachen Fluglage, sodass die Bodenstationen uns vermutlich nicht orten können. Wir haben zwar einige Funksprüche gehört, die immer wieder unterbrochen wurden, aber wir bleiben noch eine Weile in dieser Position, um die Boosterstufe im Blick zu behalten. Im Moment scheinen wir nicht viel näher an die Boosterstufe heranzukommen. Sie ist anscheinend immer noch ungefähr gleich weit entfernt. Als die Boosterstufe unter uns war, sah der Himmel fast sternenklar aus. So viel Treibstoff strömte aus der Boosterstufe und stieg in den Himmel. Ich habe sogar gesagt, dass es wie Sterne aussah. Wenn man die Boosterstufe 
ジャック、とても快適です。これまで何度か試験運用を行っており、実は今も再試験運用中です。こ
好的。面板 3：将电池充电开关关闭。面板 5：将主母线电池交流连接线连接至电池交流连接线；断开电池充电器断路器（电池 A 充电）；关闭电池充电器断路器（电池 B 充电）。接下来，面板 250：关闭电池 B 电源输入/落地式断路器。面板 5：将主母线电池 B/C 连接线关闭。面板 3：将电池充电开关连接至 B。通知：请稍等。杰克，通知您我们有回滚程序，但稍后（大约 2 小时后）会向您详细说明。另外，此
Roger. And then down at the very bottom of page 6 2 where you see "D
まあ、少し回復してきてい
I never did get an accelerometer bias to check on the platform. I was thrusting most of the time there, and unable to really settle the thing down for any length of time. We skipped a couple tape dumps I guess, because of the peculiar attitude that we were in. 
حسنًا يا جيم. هناك أمر واحد قبل أن تبدأ. ما أخبرناك به سابقًا، ما زلنا نعتقد أنه صحيح تمامًا. الشيء الوحيد في ذاكرة الحاسوب الذي يتغير هو
più 35, /
Voglio entrare nel... 
D'accord. Ce sont des résultats préliminaires, mais ils vous donneront une indication. L'altitude corrigée est de 17 ± 4 k
Спускаясь на высоту десять тысяч футов, трубки дл
좋아요. 첫
네,
لا بد أننا تجاوزنا هاواي الآن. الساعة 1:28 هي
Apollo 11, Houston. 
Roger. Ç
Почему бы нам просто не испол
Apollo 8, this is Houston. is rewound, and it's yours - available for use is about 1 hour of low bit rate and 2 minutes of high bit r
オーケー。クリスマス前夜、宇宙のはるか遠くで、アポロ8号の乗組員たちは月面レースに勝利したばかりだった。ヘッドセットはコンソールに丁寧に掛けられ、クリ
Питание на ATTITUDE, укладка контроллера, импульс ориентации, комп
Роджер. Пон
イギリス、ジョドレルバンク発、AP通信経由：英国の大型ジョドレルバンク電波望遠鏡は、本日東部夏時間午後5時49分、ソ連の無人月探査機からの信号の受信を停止した。広報担当者は、ルナ15号宇宙船は「月面を越えた」ようだと述べた。また、「月面に着陸したとは考えていない」と、同天文台長のバーナード・ラベル卿の広報担当者は述べた。ワシントンUPI通信：スパイロ・T・アグニュー副大統領は、2000年までに人類を火星に送るべきだと主張したが、民主党指導部は地球上のニーズを優先すべきだと反論した。水曜日のアポロ11号打ち上げで政府高官を務めたアグニュー氏は、「私の判断では、今世紀末までに人類を火星に送るべきだ」と述べたが、これは必ずしもニクソン政権を代表した発言ではなく、自身の考えを代弁していたようだ。ラレド（テキサス州）AP通信：ヌエボラレドの入国管理当局は水曜日、ヒッピーたちは入浴と散髪をしなければメキシコ入国のための観光カードの発行を拒否されると発表した。ヌエボラレドのメキシコ入国管理局長ウベルト・カザラス氏は、メキシコシティ、アカプルコ、その他の人気観光地の当局からヒッピーに関する苦情が寄せられていると語った。ユナイテッド・プレス・インターナショナル：ニクソン大統領が月曜日、アポロ11号月着陸ミッションへの国民的参加の日として連邦政府職員に休日を与えたことに対する当初の反応は、ほとんどが驚きだった。ロドニー・ビドナー、AP通信、ロンドンAP通信：ヨーロッパはアポロ11号ミッションの衝撃を月面に受けた。ヨーロッパ大陸中の新聞は、地球と天然衛星との初のリンクを確立するために打ち上げられるサターンVロケットの写真で紙面を埋め尽くした。 「人類史上最大の冒険が始まった」とフランスの新聞「ル・フィガロ」は宣言し、ケープ・ケネディ宇宙センターからの報告とミッションの図面を4ページにわたって掲載した。タブロイド紙「パリ・ジュール」は「世界中がブラボーを叫んでいる」と称賛した。共産党系日刊紙「リュマニテ」は打ち上げの写真をトップに掲載し、カウントダウンと打ち上げ、宇宙飛行士の妻や家族、そして月面での活動の背景を描いた熱狂的な月面レポートで裏表紙全体を飾った。ニューヨーク州ヘムステッド：ジョー・ネイマスは水曜日、プロフットボール・コミッショナーのピーター・ロゼールとの意見の相違をめぐりチームメイトと非公開で会合を開いた後、ホフストラ大学で行われたニューヨーク・ジェッツのトレーニングキャンプに正式に参加した。ロンドンUPI通信：貴族院は水曜日、アメリカの小型潜水艦がネス湖の怪物に「損傷や攻撃」を与えることはないと確約された。ノメイ卿は、ネス湖で潜水艦を操縦する者は「そこに生息するいかなる生物にも損傷や攻撃を与えない」ことを確実にしたいと述べた。彼は
罗杰，双子座 4 
好吧，那么—
你
Neil, qui è Houston. Forte e chiar
Cela ne vous 
はい。最初のスティックコースは、前方007、左005、上007でした。最後の中間コースは、前方004、右06、上003でした。これはほぼプロットと一致しています。この時点でのプロットの公称ラインより少し下です。ブレーキングでは、ブレーキングによってデルタVが毎秒27フィート上昇しました。後方も毎秒27フィ
Roger, Cairo il 26° rev. G.m.t. 07 18 37. 12 miglia 
Roger. Vorremmo fare un piccolo bilanciamento del serbatoio CRYO. Quindi, se potessi posizionare l'interruttore del riscaldatore del serbatoio di ossigeno numero 1 su OFF e l'interruttore del riscaldatore del serbatoio di idrogeno numero 2 su OFF, lasciando tutti gli altri interruttori CRYO invariati, lo lasceremmo funz
Ah oui, j'ai bien vu votre phare à gain élevé; votre projecteur de poursuite e
Das ist Freundschaft Nummer sieben. Sag es nochma
C'est à peu près ce que nous avions en termes d'attitude face au pitch pour zéro auparavant, n'est-ce
Hast du viele
很好，正如你可能知道的那样，我们在第一次绕地球飞行时，这套宇航服的电路出现了相当大
رائ
Okay
Nun, ich könn
Roger. Wir verstehen dich nach wie vor l
ジム、そのコ
Gemini 4, CSQ. Вы не были в курсе первой части вашего сообщения. Я получил ответ: «Видел это над малым концом, и вы считаете, что мы были напр
Okay, Jack. Auf deiner Checkliste für den Einstieg, Seite 2-5, unten bei Schritt 9, wo 152 Grad Neigung bei 0,05 g steht, sollst du, damit Recovery dich beim Abstieg besser sehen kann, den S-Band-Leistungsverstärker auf „Hoch
هذه مركبة فريندشيب 7. نظام الإطلاق العكسي التلقائي مُعطّل. مُحدد الوضع طبيعي، وأمر التحكم في السرعة، والجيروسكوب طبيعيان. جميع مقابض "T" في وضعها الصحيح باستثناء الوضع اليدوي، وهو مُعطّل. أتحكم يدويًا حاليًا. مفتاح حقيبة الهبوط مُعطّل. لوحة التسلسل طبيعية تمامًا باستثناء ذلك. نسبة الوقود المُتحكم به تتراوح بين 60 و82%. الوضعيات الحالية ف
阿波罗11
Проверка перев
حسناً
Son clair et puissa
Trunnion mechani
Bene. E avrà 
休
वाह, यह 
ठीक है। हमने बिजली चालू कर दी है और सब ठीक लग रहा है। मुझे एक चेतावनी और चेतावनी वाली बिजली की बत्ती दिख रही है, और सारे खतरे के संकेत दिख रहे हैं; और हमने दोनों X लूनर बस टाई ब्रेकर चालू कर दिए हैं। यूटिलिटी लाइटिंग ब्रेकर चालू है; फिर एसी बस बी हीलियम पीक्यूएस डिस्प्ले; एसी बस बी न्यूमेरिक लाइटिंग, और एसी बस बी इन्वर्
로저. 
BAT Charlie、37.0; pyro A、37.0; pyro B、37.0; ヘリウム圧力、3450; そして、ちょっと面白いことに
जी हाँ, जैक। मैं अब ये करूँगा कि हम कमांडर की खिड़की से पृथ्वी को नीचे की ओर देखते हुए रुकेंगे, और फिर मैं अंतरिक्ष यान को इस तरह से घुमाऊ
여기는 프렌드십 
كولومبيا، كولومبي
Okay. Under powerup, line
アポロ11号、こちらヒュース
نعم. كل ما أردنا فعله هو إلقاء نظرة على الأ
双子
肯，我相信是这样。这条光带与M线平行，我认为这与光学系统的设计有关，也就是我们从外部进入光学系统的那个通道或矩形入口。在这个特定的太阳角度下，它正好穿过M线。我注意到，地球和太阳都会对扫描望远镜造成这种影响。在六分仪中，也存在同样的光带，尽管它覆盖了整个
Okay. Time 32 hours 00 minutes. Instructions at completion of, maneuver to following attitude: roll 101.0, pitch 090.0, yaw 000.0. High pitch minus 23, yaw 93. Use normal procedures to dampen rates. After vehicle's stable, and before spinup, take photographs of Comet Bennett. Use the on the sextant with magazine G. That is, very high-speed black-and-white film
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 지금 소변 투기를 진행하는 데에는 아무런 이의가 없습니다. 그리고 참고로 말씀드리자면, 폐수 투기는 저희 일정상 약 90% 정도까지 미룰 예정입니다. 평소보다 조금 높지만, 연소 과정이 완료된 후로 미루려고 했습니다. 앞으로 산소 연료 전지 퍼지 작업도 있고, 항성 랜드마크 관측 삭제에 대해서도 이미 말씀드렸듯이 10시부터 11시까
わかりました、ヒューストン。13. 質問 1 の回答として、ノイズ レベルの変化は主に第 1 ステージと他のステージの間で発生しました。他のステージのノイズ 
알겠습니다. LMP는 이륙 이후로 전혀 변동이 없습니다. CMP에서 측정한 값도 여전히 0.64입니다. 방금 5시간 반 정도 잤고, 지금 식사를 하고 있습니다. 물도 많이 마셨고, 몸 상태도 괜찮습니다
1 34 37 — время начала...
ठीक है। मुझे पता है कि आप चुप रहने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं, इसलिए मैं आपको कुछ जानकारी पढ़क
Roger, c'est très agréable ici, Gus. Tout se déroule à merveil
奥様のコメントもきっと興味があるでしょう。ニール、ジャンは昨日の出来事についてこう言っていました。「信じられないほど完璧な夜でした。夫、乗組員、有人宇宙船センター、アメリカ国民、そして全人類と、月面探査の幕開けという素晴らしい体験を共有できたことは、光栄であり特権です。」それから、月面着陸が人生で最高の瞬間だったかと聞かれると、「いいえ、あれは私たちが結婚した日でした」と答えました。マイク、パットはただ「本当に素晴らしかった」とだけ答えました。バズ、ジョアンは、月面着陸がまだ信じられなかったようでした。「実際に人が動くまで、現実だとは思えませんでした。月面着陸の後、嬉しくて泣いてしまいました。」と彼女は言いまし
Ok, Fred. Dato che hai usato il contenitore della condensa, abbiamo la procedura per utilizzarlo. Non te la leggerò, ma ti avverto un po' di non agitarlo troppo o di non riempirlo troppo, perché
わかりました、ヒューストンさん。水瓶座ですね。ち
روجر. نحن نقترب من الصاروخ المعزز الآن، ويمكنك أن ترى ضوء النهار يبدأ بالظهور. الأضواء واضحة تمامًا، وأُقدّر أننا على بُعد حوالي ثلاثة أرباع ميل من الصاروخ المعزز في هذه اللحظة. الأضواء سهلة الرؤية، والأفق واضح تمامًا في هذا الوقت. لقد أخرجنا جهاز كونتاكس، وكاميرا هاسيلبلاد، وعدسة 16 ملم، وجهاز قياس ضغط الدم. نلاحظ أن مساحة الفيلكرو في المركبة الفضائية ليست كافية. نشعر أننا بحاجة إلى مساحة
Apollo 11, thi
Роджер. У нас есть... У вас примерно плюс 3 секунды преимущ
Hey
Houston, Apollo 11. Les angles de serrage sont sensiblement les mêmes, et nou
Führen Sie ein Heißfeuer durch. Manövri
아폴
よし。今からSEFに行って、カメラ機材を全部出し
Хорошо. Имеет ли значение, если мы отключим... Мы уже вытащили автоматические выключатели POWER-1 и -2, так что, е
음, 당신은 원치 않겠죠. 당신은 드로그와 프로브를 
Ok. Lascia che lo legga di nuovo qui... ordine... ALIMENTAZIONE, SPENTO. ILLUMINAZIONE NUMERICA, ILLUMINAZIONE A PROFUMO e ILLUMINAZIONE INTEGRALE, tre di queste, SPENTE. Pannello 101, RISCALDATORI SCARICO URINE, SCARICO URINE su SPENTO, ACQUE REFLUE su SPENTO. Pannello 122, LAMPADE DI CONDIZIONAMENTO, SPENTE. Pannello 201, SCALDAVIVANDE, SPENTO. Pannello 225, aggiungi le aggiunte che ho letto: TRASMETTITORE A BANDA S, GRUPPO 1; BUS DI VOLO, PRINCIPALE A
AGS wies nach Abschluss der Verbrennungsarbeiten diese R
11, Houston. Wir möchten hier den Betrieb mit der Hochleistungsantenne testen. Wählen Sie dazu „Neuerfassen“ und stellen Sie Ihre S-Band-Antenne auf „Hohe Verstärkung“. Ihre Positionen sind: Nickwinkel +40 und Gierwinkel 270. Anschließend überwachen Sie
了解。
정말 좋네요. 모든 게 제대
気
Roger. Vorremmo vedere l'indirizzo 470 e darti il ​​via 
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tempo per assistere al vostro ammaraggio. Ad accompagnare il Presidente ci saranno il Segretario di Stato William Rogers e Frank Borman. Assisteranno all'ammaraggio dal ponte della nave di recupero con l'Ammiraglio John Sidney McCain, Jr., Comandante delle Forze del Pacifico. Dopo la permanenza del Presidente a bordo dell'Hornet, partirà per il suo tour in Asia e la visita programmata in Romania. Si ritiene che Luna 15 si sia schiantata ieri nel Mare delle Crisi, dopo aver orbitato attorno alla Luna 52 volte. L'agenzia di stampa sovietica TASS ha riferito che sono state condotte ricerche "scientifiche" nello spazio vicino alla Luna. Sir Bernard Lovell dell'Osservatorio di Jodrell Bank ha affermato che Luna 15 ha colpito la superficie della Luna a una velocità di circa 480 chilometri orari. La situazione è stata relativamente tranquilla di recente in Vietnam. Soldati in pattuglia sono stati osservati con radio a transistor sintonizzate sul vostro volo. Le emittenti radiotelevisive delle Forze Armate in Vietnam hanno dato piena copertura alla missione. Le schermaglie continuano tra egiziani e israeliani lungo il Canale di Suez. Gli osservatori delle Nazioni Unite stanno cercando di fermare l'azione. A Washington, la Commissione per i Modi e i Mezzi della Camera ha votato per ridurre la tolleranza al depauperamento del petrolio dal 27,5% al ​​20%. Abbiamo piovuto diverse volte qui nella zona di Houston. Oggi è nuvoloso e sono previsti altri rovesci. Sul fronte sportivo, come accennato in precedenza, stasera si gioca l'All Star Game. Ieri non si è giocata nessuna partita. Ieri sera a New York, la Baseball Writers Association of America ha nominato Babe Ruth il più grande giocatore di baseball di tutti i tempi. Joe DiMaggio è stato nominato il più grande giocatore di baseball vivente. Frank Borman ha fa
Gu
预计晚上温
Beneath that, cross out "Continue visu
Bonjour Ascensi
Eh bien, Vance, j'ai essayé d'utiliser uniquement le contrôle d'attitude à impulsion minimale pour obtenir le roulis et le lacet, enfin, le roulis et le tangag
Okay, Jack. I got two commander breakers in, AC and DC, and the two GASTA breakers in AC and DC and next you'll want the heaters all on with the - pressuriz
أبولو 13، هيوستن
E hai 6 fotogrammi al secondo, ed è a colori; hai 15 minuti di valore: 6 fotogrammi al s
روجر. هل أنت مستعد لنسخ بعض الأرقام في تقري
باز، كيف حالك هناك، هل الشاشة تقدم 
...저희는 당신들이 허락하는 한 이곳에 머무르는 것에 
네, 맞습니다. 그냥 BAT 6으로 하세요, 잭. 그리고 다음 줄에는 BATTERY 1과 3이라고 적혀 있었는데, BATTERY 1, 2, 3, 4로 바꾸세요. BAT 2와 
J'ai deman
로저. 10, /: 45597, -040, +157, +35189, -01513, -00346 180 007 000, 노벰버 알파 +00186 35223 318 35019 42 0
음, 그 내기는 받아들이지 않겠지만, 어쨌든 우리는 아주 자극적인
Roger, 11. It was in and confir
Roger. Verstanden, Neil. Nächstes Thema: Kurz nach der Landung hast du erwähnt, dass sich westlich entlang der positiven Z-A
रॉजर। फ्रेंडशिप सेवन 1 प्लस 44 चेक के लिए तैयार हो 
Я не нашёл его с наступлением темноты. Он... он... он довольно сильно блуждает, Дик. Он
Vous aviez abaissé l'interrupteur - à l'intérieur..
D'acc
Oh, je pensais que vous voudriez peut-être que j'aille prendre des photos ou quelque chose comme 
Possiamo fornirti un angolo di beccheggio del gimbal in direzione radiale, se può esserti d'aiuto. È 181 gradi; l'angolo di beccheggio del gimbal sarebbe esattamente radiale. No
Roger, Houston. The Eagle is back in orbit, having left Tranquility Base and leaving behind a - a replica from our Apollo
Giusto Al. Grazie anco
ठीक है। यह प्लस 11 है, /। यह 40 माइनस 163, प्लस 129, माइनस 005, 99, प्लस 00 00 0, प्लस 47016, 177 143 000 नवंबर अल्फा, प्लस 001 97 47 020 5 51 468 18 12 12 83 257 023, ऊपर 263,
Okay. Los. 127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 Grad/Sekunde 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-BRAVO: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-BRAVO: 93. 1+58 14 45 02. 11+04. 62-BRAVO: 85. 1+47. 
로저. 육분의로 보니 단안경보다 훨씬 선명하게 보였고, 발달 후기 단계의 단일 세포라는 것을 확실히 알 수 있었습니다. 5만 피트(약 15,000미터) 이상 높이
Хорошо. Звучит неплохо. Как прошло тв
ثم نود منك وضع الكاميرا على النافذة بحيث يكون مقدمتها خارج مجال الرؤية. بعد ذلك، نريد مجموعتين من الصور. نريدك أن تكون في وضع النبض وأن تكون المركبة الفضائية موجهة مباشرة نحو الأرض. سأعطيك الوقت لبدء التصوير. ستكون الكاميرا موجهة نحو الأرض السوداء على الجانب المظلم من السماء. ثم قم بتف
Odyssey, Houston.
Вэнс, раз уж Джек в курсе дел
Roger, 11 anni. Qui Houston. Abbiamo dovuto cambiare stazione. Non vi stavamo leggendo attraverso Goldstone. Al momento, mostriamo l'autobus PYRO A armato e l'autob
Apollo 8, Hous
Könntest du mir einen Tipp zum MDC-Mission-Timer geben? 
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Voici deux méthodes pour réchauffer la cabine. La première, réalisable par une seule personne, consiste à mettre en marche un ou les deux ventilateurs de cabine et à régler l'échangeur de chaleur à fond. Le réchauff
Oh, qu
ठीक है। क्या आप आर्म रेस्ट से बंधी रस्सी खोल द
네. 
了解しました。ワシントンでは、上院財政委員会が所得税付加税の延長を承認しましたが、上院での採決は現時点では難しそうです。オースティンでは、ヒューストン選出のレイ・レモン州議会議員がアメリカ海洋学会の理事に指名され
Va bene. Cape pensa che tu sia in buona forma, Wally, e
Oui. C'est à peu près comme ça que ça fonctionne ici. Faites juste attention à son utilisation, et nous pourrions supprimer quelques éléments du plan de vol, mais pour la 
ठीक है, हम कहाँ हैं? हम नीचे की ओर जा रहे हैं। काश हम यहीं रुककर धरती को ऊपर उठते हुए देख पाते। पता नहीं, ह
ちょっと待って。19 33 3
ऑप्टिक्स पर एक और टिप्पणी। हम अभी सही स्थिति में हैं। हम लगभग 182 के रोल प
फ्रेड, बीच में दखल दे रहा हूँ। तुम बहुत कमज़ोर हो। समझ रहे हो कि अगर बज़ या नील यहाँ नीचे हैं, तो तुम उनसे पूछना चाहोगे कि
我们可以验证
로저. 콜럼비아호에 거주하시는 여러분께 알려드립니다. 오늘은 콜롬비아 독립기념일입니다. 어젯밤에는 필리핀의 글로리아 디아즈가 미스 유니버스에 선정되었습니다. 그녀는 60명의 경쟁자를 제치고 세계 최고의 미인으로 등극했습니다. 디아즈는 18세이며, 검은 머리와 눈을 가지고 있고, 신체 사이즈는 34.5인치(약 87cm)에 허리 23인치(약 61cm), 엉덩이 34
Buzz, qui è Housto
Это сделало всё просто замечательно. Освещение отличное — сейчас справа. Мы можем разглядеть окно слева — от него есть небольшой блик, но со сторон
D'accord. Voici mes observations concernant le bus principal B. Tout s'est passé très vite. On a d'abord entendu l'impact, l'explosion, ou je ne sais pas exactement ce qui l'a provoqué. Environ une seconde plus tard, une alarme générale s'est déclenchée: sous-tension du bus principal B. J'ai vérifié la tension, et elle était correcte à ce moment-là. Je suppose donc qu'il s'agissait d'une surtension. La pile à combustible 3 fonctionnait également bien, avec un bon débit. Fred, à ce moment-là, entrait dans le module de commande et s'installait à son poste. Peu après, le voyant du bus CA 2 s'est allumé. Il a regardé le bus principal B, et la tension était à zéro. Le débit des piles à combustible était également à zéro. Je me demande si nous n'avons pas un courant sur le bus principal B. Mais ce n'est qu'une supposition. Je n'ai pas essayé de le réinitialiser. Nous avions d'autres problèmes avec le bus principal A,
아래쪽도 모든 게 꽤 괜찮아 보이네요. 수의도 아직 온전해 보
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。从60英里
Okay. Vance
Okay, CB ESSEN
이 배는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 뒤쪽이 훤히 보이네요. 저 멀리 곶 쪽으로 거대한 구름이 펼쳐져 있습니다. 정말 아름다운 광경입니
... تخلص من ه
로저. 빌
Roger. Ihr Bewohner der Raumstation Columbia interessiert vielleicht, dass heute in Kolumbien Unabhängigkeitstag ist. Gloria Diaz von den Philippinen wurde gestern Abend zur Miss Universe gekrönt. Sie setzte sich gegen 60 andere Mädchen durch und sicherte sich den Titel der Schönheitskönigin. Miss Diaz ist 18 Jahre alt, hat schwarze Haare und Augen und die Maße 88-58-88. Zweitplatzierte wurde Miss Australien, gefolgt von Miss Israel und Miss Japan. Während ihr am Dienstagabend zurückreist, spielen die Allstars der American und National League in Washington Baseball. Mel Stottlemyre von den Yankees wird voraussichtlich der erste Pitcher der American League sein. Wer der erste Pitcher der National League sein wird, ist noch unklar. Sie haben neun Pitcher im Kader. Auch wenn sich die Forschung im Raumfahrtprogramm sicherlich ausgezahlt hat, scheint Forschung nicht immer erfolgreich zu sein. Die Woodstream Corporation, Muttergesellschaft der Animal Trap Company of America, die über eine Milliarde hölzerne Federmausfallen hergestellt hat, berichtet, dass sie eine bessere Mausefalle entwickelt hat, die jedoch auf wenig Resonanz stieß. Tatsächlich musste das Unternehmen wieder auf die altbewährte Variante zurückgreifen. Man sag
잠시 기다려. 좋아 
了解しました。排気に関する情報ですが、O2の流量は廃棄物タンクまたは廃棄物コンパートメントから高く排出されるのでしょうか、それとも蒸発器のことでしょうか
Ordinarily, we let these drinks settle for 5 or 
알겠습니다. 감사합니다. 기체 정보를 알려주시겠습니
DELTA-
Bene. Esegui l'accensione seguendo la c
रॉजर। प्रतीक्षा करें, मैं स्थिति रिपोर्ट दूंगा। मैं आपकी ट्रैकिंग के लिए ऑर्बिट एटीट्यूड में हूं। स्थिति रिपोर्ट इस प्रकार है: टावर सेपरेट कैप्सूल (नंबर दो) को छोड़कर सभी फ्यूज नंबर एक पर हैं। इमरजेंसी रेट्रोसीक्वेंस, इमरजेंसी रेट्रोजेटिसन और इमरजेंसी ड्रोग सेंटर-ऑफ स्थिति में हैं, स्क्विब आर्म्ड है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। सब कुछ सामान्य है, ऑटो, जाइरो सामान्य। सभी "T" हैंडल "इन" स्थिति में हैं। रेट्रो डिले सामान्य है। केबिन लाइटें दोनों तरफ चालू हैं। फोटो लाइटें अभी भ
阿
And to answer your question about, Vance, it's rather difficult to use yaw in ze
짐, 우리가 여기 앉아있는 지 20분이 조금 넘었는데, 스러스터 작동 상태는 어떻습니까? PTC를 계속 진행할 준비가
ठीक है, कप्तान। हमें इस बदलाव के परिणामस्वरूप कोई थर्मल समस्या नहीं दिख रही है। अगर हमें संचार संबंधी कोई समस्या आती है, तो हमें कुछ अलग करना पड़ सकता है, लेकिन अभी तक सब ठीक है। और अगर आपको खिड़की से कोई जानक
25페이지 오른쪽에 "태양 코로나 및 태양 가장자리 밝기 증가 사진 촬영"이라는 제목이 있는 곳에서 "태양 가장자리 밝기 증가 사진 촬
Quelli sono bu
Es gibt einen Stern, der dort erscheint. Um welchen Stern es sich handelt, wird es eine Weile dauern, ihn zu identifizieren. Lesen Sie den Computer ab, stellen Sie ihn ein, und die Uhrzeit beträgt 55, eingestellt auf ein
Roger. O2 heaters to AUT
Vi abbiamo ricevuto forte e chiaro. Abbiamo un nuovo TR e un nuovo Load per v
फ्लाईबाई पैंतरेबाज़ी / 62954, माइनस 162, प्लस 129 953 578 - ये 00953 और प्लस 000578 हैं - माइनस 02076 000 000 000, लागू नहीं, प्लस 00202, 02356 022 
로저, 11. PADS 두 개 가져왔어요. 30번이랑 31번이에요. 30번 SPS/G&N: 36691, -061, +066 135 23 4156. NOUN 81: 32 - 수정, +32011, +06818, -02650 181 054 014. 원지점은 NA, 근지점 +00230 3286 - 수정, 32836; 연소 시간 2 28 32628 24 1511 357. 다음 세 줄은 NA입니다. 명사 61: +1103, -17237 11806
네, 감사합니다.
收到。你还有一分钟到达加那利群岛。飞船上一切正常；我们将在37分钟后在塔那那
मुझे लगता है कि हम आपको शोर में फिर से खो 
ターゲットがおかしい
私たちがしなければならないのは、BIOMED をオンにすることだけです
好的。请理
Dreißig 1, 2, 3,
GET работы двигателя 2 17 59; Дельта-V, 63,4; время работы двигателя
OK. +90: /G&N, 63825, -1,54, +1,32, -0491,7, +0000,1, +6634,0, 180, 228, 001; N/A; +0017,9, 6652,2, 7:37, 6626,5, 26, 155,4, 15,7; Zeta Sagittarius; montée, 08,0; droite 2,1; -22,81, -025,00, 1140,7, 34087, 32:14. Départs: Arcturus, D
Давайте посмотрим, мы будем подавать питание на другие шины через автоматический выключатель балансиров
Beh, 
لقد 
네, 짐, 말씀하신 대로일 가능성이 높습니다. 프레드에게서도 비슷한 보고를 받았는데, 정확히 무엇인지는 아직 파악하지 못했고, 본격적
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम। आप कैसे पढ़ते ह
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴
Джек, ты сейчас смотрел на мастерскую Фреда, и там видишь бортовой компьютер системы аварийного прекращения полета. А вон там, в подлокотнике, ле
يبدو المكان جيداً هنا يا
جاك، لا تزال لوائح المقصورة الخاصة بك قيد الإعداد، ولكن يمكنك فتح فتحة إ
Friendship Seven, qui è Zanzibar Cap Com. È tempo di emerge
Sono contento di sentirlo. Il dottore ha appena detto che voleva sape
セブン、こちらはカントン・キャップ・
Das UHF-Relais funktioniert.
Это верно. И удалите строки 23, 24 и 25. Это означает м
Roger, Sigma Seven. Understand increasing your suit set
로저, 캔턴입니다. 케이프에 제가 궤도 진입 자세를 취할 때 창과 망원경으로 기체
Те, что я видел в задне
Roger. Sono a posto. Potevo ricevere tutte le stazioni del Pacifico, ma a quanto pare non mi ricevevano. Consiglieresti loro di trasmettere in modalità
저는 플라이 바이 와이어를 타고 재진입할 준비를
Дам вам подсказку. Вы находитесь в западном полушари
ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस, यह ह्यूस्टन है। उड़ान योजना कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में, हम दिखाते हैं कि पैनल 16 पर स्थित स्टेबिलिट
В данный момент текст слабый и неразборчивый. Но я буду передавать вслепую. Пожалуйста, убедитесь, что лицевая пане
खैर - नहीं, मैंन
Okay, Joe
Роджер. Похоже, мы всё ещё находимся примерно в 80 футах от берега. У нас горит основной красный сигнал: ВЫКЛ.; основной зелёный сигнал: ВКЛ.; сигнал вооружения: ВЫКЛ.; вторичный сигнал высокой мощности: ВКЛ.; вт
Housto
わかりました。計画について簡単にご説明いたします。現在、ロケットの燃料が不足しています。そのため、燃料の使用量をできるだけ抑えたいと考えています。そのために、今から37分後の61時間後に、毎秒16フィートの自由帰還操作を行う予定です。その後、ロケットの電源を切り、79時間後にもう一度停止操作を行って、燃料を噴射します。しかし、できるだけ早く電源を切りたいと考えています。それは中間コース終了後になりますが、37分後に毎秒16フィートの噴射を行うことについて、どのようにお考えです
ヒューストン、アポロ
罗杰，13-BRAVO； 146、
روجر. 
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन से है। हमने आपके बारे में सारा डेटा खो दिया 
याद रखिए, यात्रा का सबसे महत्वपूर्ण हिस्सा दो दिन बाद शुरू होगा जब हम वापस लौटेंगे। इसलिए आप सभी को भी अच्छी तरह आरा
如果我不多说，录音机
Okay. Die nächste Korrektur wird wahrscheinlich – vielleicht etwas höher – sein. Hier ist sie; ich habe si
Read burn complet
Stiamo discutendo di due argomenti, ma al momento non li ab
تقول إن لون المحركات النفاثة يوحي بأنها لم تُشغ
Okay. We go
Yes. Okay, the first four or five things that I have is panel BAT CHARGE to OFF on panel 3; AC INVERTER 2, OFF; panel 5: MAIN BUS TIE, BAT A/C ON; panel 250: CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING, open; panel 275: INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B, open; and then, the - just to go ahead and reverse the position of the switches and circuit breakers that I started out with, and these don't have to be 
जी हां। इससे यह कार्ड पूरा हो जाता है। बाकी अपडेट सिर्फ आपकी जानकारी के लिए हैं, जो हमारे 58 घंटे के प्लेटफॉर्म पर आधारित हैं - प्लेटफॉर्म को देखें। हमारी स्थिति बहुत अच्छी है। आपके GYRO में लगभग कोई विचलन नहीं है क्योंकि - प्लॉट किए गए अपडेट में हम X का मान -2.24, Y का मान +0.87 और Z का मान -0.11 देख रहे थे। अपडेट के बाद, जो मुझे लगता है कि 52 घंटे के आधार पर था, हमने आपको X का विचलन +0.79, यॉ का +1.06 और Z का +0.02 दिया... मैं देख सकता हूं कि 52 घंटे और 57 घंटे के अलाइनमेंट में अंतर था - इससे हमें विचलन जांच पर एक सटीक या पूरी तरह से मान्य अपडेट प्राप्त करने के लिए पर्याप्त समय न
Okay
15 - 저희는 7분 거리
ヒューストンのアソシエイテッド社ハリー・ローゼンタールによる特集記事です。2歳のジェフリー・ラベルくんのクリスマスイブを、2人のサンタが明るく彩ります。1人目は玄関をノックしてプレゼントを持ってきました。2人目は月からお父さんを家まで送り届けました。1人目は赤い服と白いひげを生やし、「ホー
分かりました。分かりました。昨日ケープ岬からあなたの打ち上げに立ち会われた西ドイツのヴィリー・ブラント首相とニクソン大統領は、本日会談を完了する予定です。ブラント首相は、東欧諸国、特に東ドイツ、ポーランド、ロシアとの協議を進めることについて大統領の確約を得るために米国を訪れたと報じられています。多
わかりました。メインバスBについて私の観察をお話ししましょう。そこでは物事がかなり急速に進み、最初に衝撃音か爆発音か、あるいは原因が何だったのかは分かりませんが、その音を聞きました。次に、約1秒後に、マスターアラームが発生しました。これはメインバスBの電圧低下でした。電圧を確認したところ、この時点では電圧は良好だったので、スパイクだったのではないかと考えています。燃料電池3も良好で、流量も良好でした。しかし、その時点でフレッドは司令船に乗り込み、自分の席に着きました。彼が席に着いた頃、まもなくACバス2のランプが点灯しました。彼がメインバスBを見ると、メインバスBの指示値はゼロでした。しかし、燃料電池の流量はゼロでした。おそらくメインバスB、つまり現在のメインバスBがあるのではないかと疑っています。しかし、これは単なる推測です。リセットは試みませんでした。メインバスAにもアンダーボルトなどの問題がありました。その他にもいくつか問題がありました。そちらで
Errore mio. Era
没错。谢
罗
D'accord. Tu viens de quitter la diffusion, Charlie. On comprend que c'est parfait. On va laisser comme ça
휴스
Senti di nuovo
حسنًا. نود التحديث. سيكون ترتيب التحديث كالتالي: متجه الحالة، ثم متجه الحالة، ثم المتغير الخارجي. لذا، في أي وقت
了解です。-2、/G&N: 6363
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Siamo pront
Роджер... 43-2 101. 2+06. 09 40 59. 5+14. 10
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है मैंने पढ़ लिया था कि आप तैयार हैं। मैं भूल गया था... इयरफ़ोन। इसमें बस इतना करना है कि कमांड मॉड्यूल से कार्ट्रिज का दूसरा जोड़ा निकालें, चिपकाने वाली टेप की एक पट्टी, यानी ग्रे टेप, जिसका चिपच
로저. 이번 달 탐사가 당신 눈에는 간단하거나 쉬워 보였을지도 모르겠습니다. 하지만 결코 그렇지 않았다는 것을 말씀드리고 싶습니다. 우리를 궤도에 올려놓은 새턴 V 로켓은 엄청나게 복잡한 기계 장치이며, 모든 부품이 완벽하게 작동했습니다. 제 머리 위에 있는 이 컴퓨터는 38,000개의 단어로 이루어진 어휘집을 가지고 있는데, 각 단어는 승무원인 우리에게 최대한 중요한 의미를 갖도록 매우 신중하게 선택되었습니다. 지금 제 손에 쥐고 있는 이 스위치는 사령선에만 300개가 넘는 동일한 스위치가 있습니다. 이 스위치는 단 하나의 설계로 만들어진 것입니다. 그 외에도 수많은 회로 차단기, 레버, 막대, 그리고 기타 관련 제어 장치들이 있습니다. 우리 서비스 모듈 후미에 있는 대형 로켓 엔진은 완벽하게 작동해야만 했습니다. 그렇지 않았다면 우리는 달 궤도에 고립되었을 것입니다. 제 머리 위에 있는 낙하산도 내일 완벽하게 작동해야 합니다. 그렇지 않으면 우리는 바다에 추락할 것입니다. 우리는 이 모든 장비가 제대로 작동할 것이라는 확신을 항상 가지고 있었고, 남은 비행 기간 동안에도 계속해서 그렇게 작동할 것이라고 확신합니다. 이 모든 것은 수많은 사람들의 피땀 어린 노력 덕분에 가능했습니다. 첫째, 공장에서 이 기계들을 조립한 미국 노동자들입니다. 둘째, 조립 및 조립 후 재시험 과정에서 여러 시험팀이 기울인 세심한 노력입니다. 마지막으로, 유인 우주선 센터의 관리자, 임무 계획 담당자, 비행 관제 담당자, 그리고 가장 중요한 승무원 훈련 담당자 모두에게 감사드립니다. 이 작전은 마치 잠수함의 잠망경과 같습니다. 여러분이 보는 것은 우리 세 명뿐이지만, 수면 아래에는 수천, 수만 명의 사람들이 있습니다.
मैं अपना टाइम हैक 88 घंटे में पूरा करना च
روجر. نقطة التحكم الأولى لدينا قريبة جدًا من خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار، وبينما كانت العدسات تتعقبها، سنحت لي الفرصة لمشاهدة شروق الشمس. وقبل الشروق بدقيقتين تقريبًا، يبدأ طرف الشمس بالتوه
Okay. Firs
L'atteggiamento da bruci
Roll 177 144 00 NA plus 00197 47253 554 47050 12 1278 26, correction 256 023, up 265, left 18. Copy so 
안녕하세요, 하와이 통
روجر
حسنًا، ممتاز. ال
Houston, the cryos have been stirred, and could you also give me a quick rundown on how the line temps a
Das ist in Ordnung. Wir bleiben noch etwa zwei Seku
ロジャー、ヒューストン。コロンビア号…上空です。その時は六分儀に目を釘付けにして、LMからの反射光が少しでも見えるかと期待していました
Sounds like wi
広州通信技術局、こちらシグマ・セブン。はっきりと聞こえました。どうですか？どう
알겠습니다. 저희가 받은 정보에 따르면, 투하 자세로 전환하는 기동은 불가능합니다. 저희가 알려드린 각도가 투하
Roger. Dites-leur que je suis
알겠습니다. 롤 137, 피치 310, 요 340.
حسنًا. "تحقق من قاطع الدائرة ASA
حسن
Roger, Frank. La température du réservoir d'hélium que nous surveillons sur le quad A n'a augmenté que d'un degré pendant toute cette intervention. Nous ne considérons donc pas cela comme trop préoccupant. Dès que vous aurez terminé, plutôt que de revenir à la configuration initiale, nous vous proposons de faire piv
네, 마이크, 저는 지금 항
Ро
Хорош
Wir sind auf NARROW B
저는 지금 REACQ와 NARRO
收到。我们明白了，现在再检查一下控制模块的电压和电流。完
D'accord. Je sais que ce serait mieux avec un débit binaire élevé, do
Хорошо. Ты всё ещё с нами, Хью
Non l'ho co
Хорошо, 13. Это Хьюстон. Нам кажется, что поток кислорода через топливный элемент 3 ослабевает. Поэтому мы просим вас закрыть клапан REAC на
네, 맞습니다. 우선 주요 이벤트 시간을 간단히 훑어보고 나서 세부 사항을 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 좋습니다. 진입 인터페이스는 142시간 40분, 즉 약 6시간 30분 전에 시작합니다. 히터 전원을 켜고, CM/ 온도를 확인하고 필요하면 CM/을 예열합니다. 아마도 예열이 필요할 것으로 예상됩니다. 자세한 절차는 나중에 안내해 드리겠습니다. 약 6시간 전에는 이전 중간 점검 때 사용했던 수정된 30분 체크리스트를 사용하여 전원을 켜기 시작합니다. 그리고 약 5시간 전에는 이전처럼 지구 종단면을 사용하여 기체 축 정렬 자세를 취해야 합니다. 그리고 그게 준비되는 대로 -7 단계를 수행할 건데, 현재로서는 초당 약 2피트(약 60cm) 정도의 연소 속도, 즉 약 15초 정도 걸릴 것 같습니다. 지금은 1.5피트(약 3.8m)까지 내려갔다고 하니, 안전 범위 내에 있는 것 같습니다. 좋습니다. 그 후, 서비스 모듈 투하 자세로 즉시 기동을 시작할 겁니다. 평소보다 일찍 투하하기 때문에 평면 내 자세를 유지할 겁니다. 평면 이탈은 필요 없고, 원하지도 않습니다. 서비스 모듈은 반경 벡터를 따라 바깥쪽으로 향하게 평면 내 자세를 유지할 겁니다. 그런 다음 사령선 점검 및 실사격을 포함하여 서비스 모듈 투하 준비를 시작하고, 약 4시간 30분 전에 서비스 모듈을 투하할 겁니다. 서비스 모듈을 확보할 때까지 기체를 상승시키고 사진을 몇 장 찍겠지만, 사진 촬영을 위해 기체를 이탈시키는 기동은 하지 않겠습니다. 비행 경로 각도를 망칠 수 있기 때문입니다. 좋습니다. 이제 2시간 정도의 여유 시간이 생겼습니다. 만약 시간이 부족하더라도 체크리스트를 확인하고 사령선 모듈 전원 공급을 준비할 수 있습니다. 사령선 모듈은 2시간 30분 전에 최대 출력으로 가동할 예정입니다. 컴퓨터를 연결하고, 기체를 상승시키고, 상태 벡터를 전송하는 등의 작업을 시작하고, 사령선 모듈 플랫폼을 정렬합니다. 늦어도 1시간 30분쯤, 즉 사령선 모듈 관련 작업을 할 수 있는 1시간 정도를 확보한 후, 투하 자세로 전환하는 기동을 시작합니다. 그런 다음 마무리 작업을 시작합니다. 물론, 이 전에 모든 적재물 배치를 완료하지는 않습니다. 해치를 닫고 압력 무결성 점검을 한 후, 1시간 전, 즉 141시간 40분에 모듈을 분리할 겁니다. 모듈 분리가 완료되면 바로 재진입 자세로 진입하는 기동을 시작할 수 있습니다. 재진입 자세에 도달하면 육분의를 이용한 항성 점검을 하고 광학 장비를 분리한 후, 최종 재진입 패드를 제공해 드립니다. 모듈을 초기화하면 기본적으로 체크리스트로 돌아가게 됩니다. 일반적인 재진입과 
收到。如果第一次没有重置，请每隔
... since the qual is not so good. Ho
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। राष्ट्रपति के साथ विदेश मंत्री विलियम रॉजर और फ्रैंक बोरमैन भी होंगे। वे प्रशांत बलों के कमांडर एडमिरल जॉन सिडनी मैक्केन जूनियर के साथ राहत पोत के पुल से जलप्रपात देखेंगे। हॉर्नेट पर कुछ समय बिताने के बाद, राष्ट्रपति एशिया के अपने दौरे और रोमानिया की निर्धारित यात्रा के लिए रवाना होंगे। माना जा रहा है कि लूना 15 कल चंद्रमा के 52 चक्कर लगाने के बाद संकट सागर में गिर गया। सोवियत समाचार एजेंसी TASS ने बताया कि "चंद्रमा के निकट अंतरिक्ष में वैज्ञानिक अनुसंधान किया गया।" जोड्रेल बैंक वेधशाला के सर बर्नार्ड लवेल ने कहा कि लूना 15 लगभग 300 मील प्रति घंटे की गति से चंद्रमा की सतह से टकराया। हाल ही में वियतनाम में अपेक्षाकृत शांति रही है। गश्त पर तैनात सैनिकों को ट्रांजिस्टर रेडियो लिए हुए देखा गया, जिन पर आपकी उड़ान का प्रसारण चल रहा था। वियतनाम में सशस्त्र बलों के रेडियो और टीवी नेटवर्क ने मिशन का पूरा कवरेज किया। स्वेज नहर के किनारे मिस्र और इजरायल के बीच झड़पें अभी भी जारी हैं। वहां मौजूद संयुक्त राष्ट्र के पर्यवेक्षक कार्रवाई को रोकने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। वाशिंगटन में, हाउस वेज़ एंड मीन्स कमेटी ने 27.5 प्रतिशत तेल उपयोग भत्ते को घटाकर 20 प्रतिशत करने के लिए मतदान किया है। ह्यूस्टन क्षेत्र में कई बार बारिश हुई है। आज बादल छाए हुए हैं और और बारिश होने की संभावना है। खेल जगत की बात करें तो, जैसा कि हमने पहले बताया, ऑल स्टार गेम आज रात है। कल कोई मैच नहीं खेला गया। कल रात न्यूयॉर्क में, बेसबॉल राइटर्स एसोसिएशन ऑफ अमेरिका ने बेब रूथ को सर्वकालिक महानतम बेसबॉल खिलाड़ी घोषित किया। जो डिमैगियो को जीवित सर्वश्रेष्ठ बेसबॉल खिलाड़ी का खिताब मिला। खिलाड़ियों के सम्मान में आयोजित रात्रिभोज में फ्रैंक बोरमैन ने ये घोषणाएं कीं। जो नामथ ने न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स के प्रशिक्षण शिविर में पूरा दिन अभ्यास किया। लगभग 500 बच्चे ब्रॉडवे जो को छूना चाहते थे, उन्हें रोकने के लिए पांच पुलिसकर्मियों को काफी मशक्कत करनी पड़ी। उन्हो
Columbia, Columbia, ici Houston. Vous m
ठीक है, वैंस। फ्रेड ने अभी मुझे बताया कि उसने इसे वहाँ रखा है, और हम मुख्य स्थिति में पायरो बैटरी चयनकर्ता 
Jim, c'est négat
우리는 지금 가파른 능선을 
نفضل تأجيل إعادة فتح نظام التهوية حتى نعيد ضخ الهواء إل
बहुत 
Yes, I think you're right. Boy, 
好的，查理。我到了，轴颈角度是30.5度。再次强调，滚动时偏差很大，我认为
Apollo 11, Hous
Quella cosa... ora, potrebbe non essere
أبولو 8،
Es gibt nur einen wirklich schlimmen Fehler, den man do
C'est exact. Nos équipes évaluent actuellement la situation thermique. Il semble que vous serez hors de portée pendant un certain temps. C'est pourquoi nous vous demandons de reprendre la mission dès que vous aurez effectué ces trois observations d'étoiles. Nous continuons à travailler sur la situation thermique et l'observation des étoiles pendant enviro
友谊七号，这里是坎顿。我们这
Это Friendship Seven. Я в сети, но он работает очень нестабильно. Сейчас я делаю 
نقطة أخرى. هل تريد أن تجربها مرة أخرى أ
यह ज़ारिया
我要去……我会在 OMNI C 或 D
Роджер. Всё именно так, как и должно б
로그
روجر. 07:15 ا
Okay. I was just checking. I just wanted to know how ou
Bene. Disattiva la 
We
Okay. Also, wir schalten auf PRO und erhalten eine blinkende 5018. Hier möchten Sie ein AUTO-Manöver durchführen, anstatt die manuelle Steuerung zu verwenden. Daher wählen wir PRO mit GUIDANCE, PNGS und MODE CONTROL, AUTO. Wir haben eine Totzone von 1,4 Grad, die uns die Zeiger anzeigt, um sie z
मैंने उस हस्तांतरण के दौरान तीन परीक्षण किए। दो परीक्षण -19.6 से ऊपर थे -
好的。最后，既然航天器已经到达目的地，请按要求调整摄像机角度，确保地球包含在视野范围内，并且在拍摄过程中不要触摸镜
ジェミニ4号、ヒューストン。プラットフ
हमने मैनुअल फ्यूल टेम्पर
Très bien, Apollo 8. Tous vos systèmes sont opérationnels, et nous étions sur le point de vous 
ठीक है, 13. हमारे पास 
अब हमारे पास तारे देख
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。少し飛行計画から外れて、もう少し状況を把握してみます。ヨーがずれています。自動ヨー制御を切断します。ヨー制御は一時的に手動
Roger, Houston. plus 4. Gewicht bleibt gleich, minus 164 plus 129 minus 01594 plus alle Kugeln plus 52885 178 155 000 NA plus 00192 52909 627 52694 12 1037 211, Erdmittelpunkt unten 063, rechts 213 plus 1068 minus 16500 12505 35061, Norden, 
ठीक है। हम इसे तुरंत शुरू कर द
Nous estimons que vous devriez a
Ok. Ho già misurato la temperatura della cupola. È salita a circa 82 gradi. L'ho riportata a 81 gradi. L'ingresso della tuta è salito a 80 gradi. L'ho riportata a 78. Sono tornato all'i
रॉजर। ह
난 보통 은근한 접근 
Und Gott sprach: „Das Wasser unter dem Himmel sammle sich an einem Ort, und das Trockene werde sichtbar.“ Und es geschah so. Und Gott nannte das Trockene Erde. Und das, was sich unter dem Himmel gesammelt hatte, nannte man Meer. Und Gott sah, dass es gut war. Die Besat
Ich sehe hier auf meinen Fenstern etwa 30 Fuß/Sekunde. Der Booster fiel ziemlich schnell ab und 
ああ、なるほど。そうなる
Водолей,
Ken, can you give us a little report on how our trajectory looks and the tracking is going and things
내셔널 리그의 다른 경기에서는 뉴욕이 몬트리올을 5대 
Bene. Quello che abbiamo qui sono un paio di controlli COMM. Passeremo a cinque diverse modalità, e solo una di queste interromperà le vostre attività. In tal caso, passeremo alla voce di backup in uplink, e quella è l'unica volta in cui potreste perdere temporaneamente la COMM vocale in uplink. Avrete la COMM vocale in downlink per tutta la procedura, e dovrebbe durare, credo, dai 10 ai 15 minuti al MASSIMO,
Bene. E chiudi i collegamenti di alimentazione della batteria, il carico di bilanciamento del crosstie e apri il bus del crosstie. Chiudi i tre successivi; apri il controllo dell'ECA di salita, l'
休斯顿，这里是哥伦比亚。收到您的信号，一切正常。我们三人已全部返回舱内；舱门已安
자, 잭. 방금 제가 알려드린 백아웃 관련 내용만 순서가 중요합니다. 이제부터는 절차 시작 단계로 돌아가서 역순으로 진행하시면 됩니다. 다
13, Houston. We need
ठीक है। मेरे… मेरे गाय
Ricevuto
Roger, 11. Vorremmo effettuare uno scarico delle acque reflue a vostro piacimento nel prossimo futuro. Non è previsto un orario specifico. In basso per la co
Хорошо, Джим. Мы хотели бы получить от вас еще одну проверку температуры топливных баков, как мы дела
Okay. Wir benötigen die Eingabetaste ENTER, dann 333 ENTER und anschließend den Wert von Register 1. Wir erwarten, dass Register 1 den Wert 10.000 enthält. In diesem Fall wird der löschbare Speiche
रॉजर
D'accord. Tant mieux. Et avez-vous finalem
收到
Ok, Jim. Stiamo osservando un po' la situazione. Fred ci ha fornito qualche angolazione mentre sorvolavamo il centro della Terra e il centro d
피치 각
एक मिनट रुकिए, मैं भूल गया था। बिल एंडर्स को लगभग 5 घ
Okay. You can see that he's taking his scissors and cutting the plastic end off a little nozzle that he's going to insert the water gun into. The water gun dispenses a half-ounce burst of water per click. Here we go; Bill has it in now, and the water is going in. I hope that you all had better Christmas dinners 
ख
わかりました
...там не на что смотреть. Попытка не по
마지막 네 번(17:31, 38)
好的，收到，弗雷德。铃铛
Roger, understand. I 
كل شيء يبدو جيدًا، سأعطيك قراءة سريعة. نسبة الوقود 27-29%. ضغط المقصورة 5.5، در
ओह, हाँ। हमें सभी आवश्यक आंतरिक कनेक्शन मिल गए हैं, लेकिन मुझे यकीन नहीं
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴입니다. 어센트 탱크 O2의 산소 압력이 약간 높은 것 같습니다. 산소를 좀 사용해야겠습니다. 디
望遠レンズを
Ja, ich habe gehört, wie
지도 업데이트 소식을
好的。您能否告诉我们您第一次发现宇航服里有水是什么
इसक
Okay. Verstande
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 사이클릭 어큐뮬레이터 스트로
회전식 핸드 컨트롤러,
Je dirais que la couleur de la surface locale est très comparable à celle que nous avons observée depuis l'orbite à cet angle solaire, environ 10 degrés. Elle est pratiquement incolore. Elle est grise, d'un gris très blanc, presque crayeux, lorsqu'on regarde la ligne de phase zéro; et d'un gris nettement plus foncé, presque cendré, lorsqu'on regarde à 90 degrés du Soleil. Certaines roches de surface, tout près, fracturées ou perturbées par le panache du moteur-fusée, sont recouvertes de ce gris clair 
मैं
अच्
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. 
Следующее, ч
ر
Oui, vous ajoutez environ 4 ou 5 
Je te donnerai ça quan
まあ、いろいろあるでしょう。一緒に競馬に行ってくれま
Très bien. Voici l'édition du 23 décembre de l'Interstellar Times, façon Paul Haney. Nous tenons à vous informer qu'il ne reste que deux jours avant Noël pour faire vos achats. Il dit que votre émission télévisée a connu un franc succès hier. Mickey Herskowitz cumule les fonctions pour le Post. Il a écrit deux articles sur votre lancement, en plus de ses chroniques sportives habituelles, et, Jim, votre mère a certainement apprécié votre message d'anniversaire. Vingt-et-un détenus se sont évadés d'une prison de La Nouvelle-Orléans hier, et le président 
...أكبر من 133 ساعة... أوه، نعم، أعتقد ذلك - نعم، هو... الهبوط بعد ظهر يوم الخميس. لقد حسب أنه - للهبوط في المحيط عند... عدد الساعات - 74 ساعة، 
좋아요, 산소 고농도 공급 3분 10초 됐네요. 5분 
我刚刚给你
Davvero b
ヒュースト
그건 부정적이네요. 연료가 부족한 상황이니 자동변속 모드에서 연비가 너무 
Roger. Falls du fotografieren möchtest, empfehlen wir dir die Verwendung des Magazins Uniform mit hochempfindlichem Schwarzweißfilm, ausgeschaltetem Innenlicht und einer elektrischen Hasselblad mit 80-mm-Objektiv. Du musst uns dabei wohl etwas unterstützen. Wir empfehlen eine Blende von 2,8
13, Houston. Nous travaillons actuellement sur la grande antenne parabolique, veuillez donc désactiver
حسنًا يا فانس، الأمر ليس كذلك - نحن لا ننظر إلى الشمس - ما نحصل عليه هو انعكاس كبير من الشمس خلفنا؛ وهو - إنه يأتي على ذلك المربع 1 هناك، وهذا المربع ينعكس 
いえ、ただ見て回っ
حسنًا يا جو، كل شيء يسير على ما يرام. نحن نتقدم و
رو
터널 작업은 모두 완료됐습니다. 드로그, 프로브, 해치
停电结束，30 加 01；拖
Okay. Du machst das gut, Fred. Ich habe drei Ergänzungen zur Checkliste. Es sind nur Kleinigkeiten. Ich
Тогда мы с тобой окажемся в одинаковом 
Negativo. Immagino che vogliano solo rende
Il
Roger. 
작은 얼음 결정들이 보이네요. 지금 제 주변에 
没错。首先，我将快速回顾一下主要事件的时间，然后再补充一些细节。好的。进入界面时间是142小时40分钟；大约在此之前6个半小时左右，我们将启动整个流程，首先是启动加热器，检查指挥中心温度，并在必要时预热指挥中心，我们估计可能需要这样做。稍后我们会提供详细的操作步骤。大约在此之前6小时左右，我们将开始启动，使用您上次中途飞行时使用的修改后的30分钟检查清单。然后，在
ह
روجر. يبدو أن نيل قادمٌ من هناك، رقم 11. مايك، أراك في الخلفية. الصورة رائعة حقًا. الألوان جميلة. إنها صورة ممتازة للقائد أر
Roger
Ok. Come primo passo, ho una modifica alla configurazione di base che vi abbiamo fornito: vogliamo che si aprano 
还有，水瓶座号，休斯顿。请您确认宇航服泄压阀已关闭。完毕
Roger. La batterie adaptatrice 1 a une tension de 24,5 volts et un courant d
Температура вашего инве
Cape Com Tech. 你读吗？
最好拿张……喏，纸巾…
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कि विशेषज्ञ कहेंगे कि डेटा शायद आपके द्वारा दर्ज की 
Ed iniziò a stivare le cose e, non appena arrivammo al punto in cui non era più possibile armeggiare con il booster, iniziai ad aiutarlo a tempo pieno, almeno tenendo le cose, stivandole e cercando di evitare che sparissero. Più velocemente lavoravamo, più eravamo indietro. Non perché non stessimo sistemando le cose come dovevano essere, ma ci volle molto più tempo del previsto. In realtà non era molto più facile a gravità zero che nel simulatore, seppur altrettanto facile. Quindi lavorammo a tutto campo. Quando arrivammo a Carnarvon, avevo deciso che non ce l'avremmo fatta, ma pensavo che avremmo continuato ancora un po'. Quando arrivammo a Carnarvon, o poco prima ancora di partire, mi fu chiaro che non potevamo superare la depressurizzazione. Chiesi di passare all'orbita successiva. Poi... riprendemmo fiato per circa 20 minuti e cercammo di sistemare la roba che avevo in giro nella cabina di pilotaggio. Poi ho tirato fuori la checklist e l'abbiamo ripassata in dettaglio per assicurarci di non aver saltato nulla nella fretta. Abbiamo iniziato l'attività extraveicolare - abbiamo ricevuto il via libera su Carnarvon. Eravamo tutti pronti a partire ed era
アダプターは別売
Верно; мы постоянно потребля
حسنًا
Okay. We copy the width of the Persian Gulf, and I guess that all I can give you firsthand is a single isolated data point, and that is that it was clear here in Houston this morning. That's a pretty localized observation. As a result of your waste water dump, it looks like 
Roger, séquencez l'h
Molto interessante. È una superficie molto morbida, ma qua e là, dove inserisco il campione di emergenza, mi imbatto in una superficie molto dura, ma sembra essere un mat
Roger. In Washington hat der Finanzausschuss des Senats die Verlängerung des Einkommensteuerzuschlags genehmigt, eine Abstimmung im Senat über den Gesetzentwurf scheint jedoch der
Das Gebiet links aus dem Fenster ist eine relativ ebene Fläche mit zahlreichen Kratern von 1,5 bis 15 Metern Durchmesser und einigen kleinen, schätzungsweise 6 bis 9 Meter hohen Hügelkämmen. Darüber hinaus gibt es Tausende kleiner Krater von 30 bis 60 Zentimetern Durchmesser. Einige hundert Meter vor uns sehen wir kantige Felsblöcke mit etwa 60 Zentimetern Kanten. Direkt vor uns, etwa auf dem W
ठी
友谊七号，你上次的通讯中断了
Sembra bellissimo. Ci ent
Okay. Burn rules. We should shut down for the if we have the thrust monitor at 77 percent or below; number 2, if the propellant ullage pressure is less than 160 psi; 3, if the fuel oxidizer DELTA-P is greater than 25, and that'll be a ground callout; 4, if the attitude error is plus or minus 10 degrees except for starting transients. Okay. Rate limits are plus or minus 10 degrees per second. And an ENGINE GIMBAL light, an ISS with a PROGRAM ALARM, an, a CES DC, and an inverter light, if it's still on after we've tried switching inverters. If, during the burn, the engine shuts down when the NOUN 97 flashes, we should PRO, do manual ullage, and START pushbutton, push, and DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, open. If we don't do a PC-2, our next burn will it be at PC-4 for an added 24 foot per second. We'll land mi
Roger, Mike. It's l
Ok. Questi sono risultati preliminari, ma vi daranno qualche indicazione. L'altitudine corretta risulta essere di 17 più o meno 4 chilometri, e il fatto che sia più o meno 4 chilometri indica che siete molto coerenti nel giudicare l'altitudine. L'altitudine effettiva risulta essere di 
我们船舱的通风口位置也比较低。船舱
सुधार। यह
在107号航段中期之后
あれは馬鹿だっ
Okay. And one other question, Charlie. I'd like to know if the note you gave me about damping the rates is before t
이곳은 그 자체로 독특하고 황량하면서도 아름다운 풍경을 지니고 있습니다. 마치 미국의 고원 사막과도 같은 느낌이죠. 조금 다르긴 하지만, 정말 멋진 곳입니다. 참고로, 이곳에서 채취한 암석 샘플들, 특히 단단한 암석 샘플들의 표면에는 기포처럼 보이는 것들이
정확히
Okay, Houston. Ich habe hier einen 220-Alarm
फ्रैंक, हमें पृथ्वी का लगभग आधा हिस्सा ही मिल रहा है। ऊपरी
इसका सार यह था कि वीसी ने उस युद्धविराम से पहले ही युद्धविराम
阿波
كيف
रॉजर। ईंधन 103-100 [प्रतिशत]। ऑक्सीजन 89-100 [प्रतिशत]। सारी बिजली ठीक है। ऑरोरा सेव
了解。フライ・バイ・ワイヤで低空飛行を部分的に
Okay, very good. Y
ठीक है। समझ गया। आपके पास लाइट वाला मास्टर अलार्म ह
알겠습니다. 같은 의견입니다. 다시 처음부터 설명드리겠습니다. "BALANCE COUPLE"을 "OFF"로 변경해야 합니다. 그 아래 "LMP"를 "JET"으로 변경해야 합니다. -2초 지점의 "400 + 1"을 삭제하고, -1초 지점의 "MASTER ARM, ON"도 삭제합니다. -10초 지점에 "MANUAL ULLAGE"를 추가하고, 점화 장치를 추가합니다. "시동이 걸리지 않으면 START 버튼을 누르십시오. 그래도 시동이 걸리지 
Roge
Okay. Just some info. We're working up a procedure for you to use to - to use command module LiOH canisters to connect to your hoses - the outlet hoses in the so that, as time passes in the mission, you can 
समझें; तारा 31, रोल 184 7, पिच 23 4, यॉ 14 3, और स
네
Apollo 11, Houston. Buzz, il semblerait que 
نعم سيدي؛ لديّ بعض الرسوم البيانية في دفتر الرسوم البيانية 
जेरी, मुझे तापमान को लेकर थोड़ी चिंता है। यहाँ काफी गर्मी हो रही है, और इवेपोरेटर आउटलेट का तापमा
ठीक है, आ
了解しま
Gemini VIII, G
Gemini 4，休斯
Right. That's what I am tr
١١، هيوستن. لتحسين جودة الاتصالات هنا، نودّ أن نوصلك بهوائي عالي الكسب. نوصي بزاوية ميل ٠، وانحراف ٣٥٥ درجة - أكرر ٣٥٥ 
좋습
Рад слышать, что у вас получилось четыре из пяти, и ваш главный результат будет примерно через 2 мин
Houston, Apollo 11. Wir haben den afrikanischen Kontinent vor uns, und natürlich wird alles mit der Zeit immer kleiner. Das Mittelmeer ist völlig klar. Die Sonne scheint gleich hinter Madagaskar unterzugehen. Der äquatoriale Gürtel Afrikas ist deutlich zu erkennen. Wir sehen ein dunkles, trübes Grün, im Vergleich zu den sandfarbenen Tönen an der Südspitze Afrikas und natürlich der Sahara-Nordküste. In der Nähe der Grenze zwischen Afghanistan und Pakistan ist eine bemerkenswerte Wolke zu sehen. Sie geht gerade unter und wirft einen ziemlich 
正解です。パネル 229 では、回路ブレー
Salve, Apollo 11. Houston. Abbiamo appena deciso di eliminare
防水性を確認しました。すべて正常です。聞こえ
Bene. In cima alla pagina successiva, dove c'è scritto "Evaporatore secon
Boy, you sure get a different perspective in this thing in zero g. Right now, Neil's got his feet on the forwa
我没有扫描灯
再说
西格玛七号，这
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Do
Houston, Eagle. Stai copiando i numeri piuttosto grandi per autonomia e velocità di autonomia in - VERB 83? 
로저. 현재
알겠습니다. 다시 읽어보니, 보조 어큐뮬레이터 용량을 모니터링하고, 보조 글리콜 라디에이터 밸브를 30초 동안 정상(NORMAL)으로 유지한 후 바이패스(BYPASS)로 전환합니다. 보조 어큐뮬레이터 용량이 감소하지 않으면 보조 글리콜 라디에이터 밸브를 정상(NORMAL)으로 되돌립니다. 보조 냉각수 루프 펌프는 AC 1 또는 2로 설정합니다. 3분 후, 보조 글리콜 토출 압력이 39~51psig인지 확인합니
अगर
11，我们同意，之前的操作可能对您的启动产生了一
Sure wi
مرحباً يا غاس،
Jim, wir möchten dich bitten, diesen Steuerungsmodus zu überdenken und zu prüfen, ob er mit deinem aktuellen Wissen funktionieren könnte. Wir sind etwas skeptisch, möchten dir aber trotzdem deine Meinung dazu geben. Sobald du eine gute Position eingenommen hast, überwache die Position, gehe wie von uns beschrieben auf M
了解しました。君に渡した投光器を確認しているところです。実はジャック
了解、バズ。405と406について混乱がある
Roger, Tranquility. E questo aspetto cotto ch
لقد نسختُ
Ciao, Muchea Cap Com, Muchea Cap
Bon, on y travaille encore. Je ne suis pa
로
ठीक है, जैक। जब ज़ोरदार धमाका हुआ, तो साथ ही सिस्टम रीस्टार्ट भी हो गया। क्या तुमने सुना? क्या तुम कुछ चाहते हो, या 
Bene. La grande notizia del momento, secondo le agenzie di stampa, è che tutti gli 82
わかりました。機動ありの63-1、16 56 01。機動なしの63-
Try putting it back 
रॉजर। उड़ान भरने के बाद से एलएमपी में एक इंच भी बदलाव नहीं हुआ ह
روجر
ठीक है, जैक। सीबी बैट चार्जर को एसी पावर से कनेक्ट करें, बंद करें। तैयार रहें। ठीक है। मुझे यहाँ एक लाइट लगानी थी। सीबी बैट
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们在
Bon, Bill, il suffit de relancer l'acquisition en mode AUTO. Ça semble être une solution. Mais si vous voulez nous parler de quoi que ce soit, si vous rencontrez d'autres problèmes, ou si l'affichage ne vous convient pas, n'hésitez pas à relancer l'
Hey, Joe? Ist FAO bereit, mir die Gegenstände zu geben, die wir im So
收到。请再说一遍您的指
المظلة الرئيسية مفتوحة. المظلة في حالة جيدة، مناسبة للشعاب المرجانية على ارتفاع 10800 قدم، وهي مظلة
알겠습니다. 저희가 POWER-1과 -2 차단기를 
Roger. Nous demandons une vidang
That's correct. Now reader panel 8, it tells you to "Clos
Oh, no. I know why!... i
Earthshine is about as expected, Houston. Not as much deta
Und darunter s
سأقدم لكم طريقة جد
11번, 소
نوافذ الالتقاء جيدة. أما النوافذ الأخرى فجميعها على حالها تقريباً كما كانت في تقريرنا الأ
11, Houston. On vous voit retirer le téléphone, le plier et l
Voilà notre logemen
Ro
はいはい、はい。もう疲れないで。さ
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Обратите внимание на довольно большой угол наклона центрального карданного по
It's not quite as clear 
SERVICEMODULHEIZUNGEN, QUAD Delta, HAU
了解しました。AUTOモードでドッキングしたのですが、先ほど言ったように、接触の瞬間はよく分かりませんでした。ドッキングプローブのインジケーターを何度も確認しました。2本のバーバーポールが、3つのキャプチャラッチ ― キャプチャラッチではなく、3つの…ラッチが接触したことを示しています。そしてソフトドッキングしました。その時、状況は非
Okay. Ihre Orbit-Navigationsläufe 
وأخيراً يا جيم، نحن نفكر في استخدام القم
And we'll give you that word when we want you to do that. That's only, not to power 
حسنًا. ما نود فعله يا جيم هو أننا سنقوم بضبط المحاذاة التقريبية لزوايا المحور التي ستستخدمها، ثم سنجهز المنصة. وعندما تتصل وتستخدم برنامج PICAPAR، قد لا تكون الصورة قريبة بما يكفي لوضع النجم في السدس، ولكن إذا استطعت رؤية أي نجم ساطع في المنطقة المحيطة - وأعني بالمنطقة المحيطة درجتين إلى ثلاث درجات من مركز التلسكوب - بحيث يكون لديك فكرة عن الاتجاه، فلن يمثل تحديد النجم صعوبة كبيرة. وبمجرد وضع النجم في السدس،
...了解し
Okay. On the water boiler: it's interesting that I get my own - I was going to say anytime you have our mike keyed, I can hear myself talk with about a 2-second time delay. With respect to the primary 
Ed, hier spricht Houston CAP COM. Ich kann Sie nicht lesen – ich verstehe nicht, worüber Sie sprechen. Anscheinend kön
好的
Хорошо. Я показываю им это, и мне хотелось бы узнать, мог
11番、こちらはヒューストンです。私たちのTMでは、2つのレジスタの値しか表示されていません。レジスタ3
そして、アクエリアス、ヒューストン。アラインメントでは、細かいアラインメント、アクティベーション3
Roger. Nous vous avons vu apparaître à l'h
Hier ist eine interessante kleine Neuigkeit, die man eigentlich ganz gut hören sollte. In Ann Arbor, Michigan, gibt es anscheinend eine neue Jugendgang. Sie nennt sich Gilnet Gang. Sie zieht durch die Straßen von Ann Arbor, agiert im Verborgenen und umgeht dabei manchmal das Gesetz. Sie nennen sich selbst die „Guerillas für das Gute“. Zu ihren Aktionen gehörte unter anderem, eine mit Obszönitäten beschmierte Brücke übermalt zu haben. Sie strichen sie in einer Nacht. Ein baufälliges Haus – beliebt bei den Kindern aus der Nachbarschaft, aber gefährlich – wurde verbarrikadiert. Blumenkästen in der Innenstadt, die leer standen, weil es Streit darüber gab, wer dafür verantwortlich war – die Wirtschaft oder die Regierung –, wurden mit Blumen bepflanzt. Eine Hecke an einer vielbefahrenen Kreuzung, die die Sicht behinderte, wurde gestutzt, was den Besitzer verärgerte. Müll entlang eines Abschnitts des Huron River wurde aufgesammelt. Die Mitglieder der Gang sind anonyme Teenager, die keine persönliche Anerkennung wünschen. Ihr Ziel ist es, bürokratische Hürden zu überwinden und Dinge – in ihren Augen Gutes – zu bewirken. Die Organisation hat einen leicht religiösen Beigeschmack. „Es ist eine Art ökumenische Gruppe“, sagte ein Assistenzprofessor der Universität Michigan, der als informeller Ansprechpartner für die Ideen der Gruppe fungiert. Der Name leitet sich von St. Peter, dem Fischernetz, ab. Und er ist so weit von einer bestimmten Kirche entfernt, dass er nicht damit in Verbindung gebracht werden kann. „Es gibt da etwas von Robin Hood“, sagte ihr Lehrer, der ebenfalls anonym bleiben möchte. Viele ihrer Aktivitäten sind illegal. Wenn das System überlastet ist, helfen sie direkt, anstatt den bürokratischen Weg zu gehen. Die Gruppe besteht aus etwa 55 Highschool-Schülern, Jungen und Mädchen, und weiteren 40 bis 50, die vor ihr
Okay. 2 plus 56 plus 37, with the maneuver time and the SEP time, 3 plus 06 
حسنًا. نحن نراجعها. سنعطيك الموافقة عليها. حسنًا، يا برج الدلو. وحدات الدفع الرباعي لديك تتراوح الآن بين 120 و133،
13号，休斯顿。我们需要你执行1号燃
Хорошо. Это предварительные результаты, но они дадут вам некоторое представление. Скорректированная высота составляет 17 ± 4 километра, и тот факт, что это ± 4 километра, указывает на вашу последовательность в оценке высоты. Эффективная высота составляет 10 ± 12 километров. Замечания заключаются в том, что, как я уже говорил, вы после
Роджер. Примерно
That is
D'accord. D'accord. Ensuite,
حسناً. لدينا العناوين إذا ك
रॉजर। और हमें आपकी खिड़कियों की स्थिति नहीं पता। अगर आप - इस बर्न के दौरान, हमें अलाइनमेंट के लिए आगे वाली खिड़की से देखना होगा, इसलिए आपको कमांडर विंडो हीटर की आवश्यकता हो सकती है और आप ज़रूरत पड़ने पर उस ब्रेकर का उपयोग कर सकते हैं,
Fino in fo
आपको पता है, यह
彼は何て言っ
فيما يخص الكتب، أعتقد أننا بحاجة إلى مزيد من العناية بنوع الحلقات المستخدمة. واجهنا صعوبة في فتحها مرتين أو ثلاث مرات، كما أن 
Und dann werden wir uns mit dem Tunnelentlüftungsventil und dem
下には木々や森がある。まるで木々や森のようだ。雪と木々のようだ。素晴らしい。僕たちがどこを向いているのか、どの方向へ向かっているのか、全く見当もつかないが、とに
13，休斯顿。我们希
Bene. L'assetto è di beccheggio 23,4, rollio 184,7, imbardata 14,3. E il motivo per cui stiamo eseguendo l'allineamento in questo assetto è che la prossima cosa che faremo è il test di visibilità del telescopio a scansione e quello sarà 70 gradi del Sole e di Arturo con un albero e un perno di appoggio pari a zero. E poi possiamo procedere con il bias del perno di appoggio seguito dalle ste
Roger. Au fait, je suis en pleine formation sur ce poste chez CAP COM pendant 
Et, 11, pour information, l'amplitude de la première correction de trajectoire, si elle est effe
好的。我本来想说我们没有——我们几乎不携带维
11, Houston. Wir werden versuchen, die automatische Wiederverbindung im S-Band zu testen. Dazu sichern wir unsere Uplink-Verbindung für etwa 30 Sekunden. Anschließend schalten wir sie wieder ein und prüfen, ob die Raumfahrzeugausrüstung die Verbindung automatisch wiederfindet. Sollten Sie innerhalb von etwa 3 Minuten keinen Anruf von uns erhalten, bedeutet dies, dass die Wiederverbindung nicht erfolgreich war. Wir bitten Sie dann 
Go ahead, 11. Over
Роджер, мы сделали запи
指示推进剂用量为
आपातकालीन रेट्रो 
मेरी गलती। क्या आपने इसे कॉपी 
好的。我先快速读一遍，让你有个大概了解。发射台、服务舱JETT姿态、月球观测姿态、太阳观测姿态和JETT姿态。发射台指的是月球和太阳观测期间的大致飞行姿态角、进入大气层时
Just for information, Hous
रॉजर। कृपया ध्यान दें कि हम वर्तमान में स्टीम प्रेशर मैनुअल मोड में हैं, और H
無重力状態は、学校で習った多くのことを実演するのにも使えます。ジャイロスコープの作用を説明するのがいかに簡単か、簡単に説明したいと思いま
Flight consiglia di tornare alla prima se
حسناً. القرار هو الإبقاء على المنصة، وإيقاف تشغيل 
Джим только что увидел ещё один спутник. Он ещё не описал его нам так же, как и пре
D'accord. Panneau 3: CHARGE DE BATTERIE, ARRÊT – vous l'avez déjà fait, Jack – ensuite: ONDULEUR CA, Pa
نوافذ الالتقاء جيدة. أما النوافذ الأخرى فجميعها على حالها تقريباً كما كانت في تقريرنا الأخير. النافذتان رقم واحد وخمسة بهما ضباب خ
D'accord. Ligne 1, panneau 16, les alimentations ASCENT 1 et 2 seront ouvertes. Le PQGS sera également ou
Хорошо, и у вас всё отлично получается. Приятно, что нет всего этого шума. Позвольте мне рассказать, что я хочу сделать, Джим. Как я уже сказал,
Alle, die sich die Aufnahme anhören, wer
알겠습니다. 실제로 기계식 정지점에 도달했는지 확실하지 않지만, 만약 도달했다면 담당자들이 최대 15분 동안은 손상 없이 정지점에 고정된 상태를 유지할 수 있다고 합니다. 그리고 현재 상태 그대로 한 번 더 테스트를 진행해 보고 싶습니다. OMNI 장비는 고
Ok. Non abbiamo problemi. Vai avanti e usa il tuo D-9. Ora, sul punto di riferimento Apollo n. 2, saremmo a 19. E il punto di riferimento sarà 16 miglia a nord della rotta, e dovresti essere inclinato di circa -30° in quel momento. E vorremmo che lo seguissi il più vicino possibil
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, this is Ho
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Veu
不，弗兰克，我们不
Roger, è affermativo. La tua orbita è circa 86,8 pe
Credo che Jim lascerà il casco tolto a tutti gli altri; l'aria lì dentro è un po' anossica. Questi caschi
नहीं, म
好的，我们先去做这件事，然
Apollo 8, Houston. Il caricamen
好的。我们现在看到的真空近地点是23.6度；飞行路径角是-6
콜럼비아, 콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 고이득 안테나, 요(yaw) 180도, 피치(p
الوظيفة، إيقاف؛ الوضع، وضع الاستعداد؛ GTA، لأسفل؛ غطاء GTA، آمن؛ الوضعية،؛ المقياس، 5/5؛ تحديد، 1؛ المصدر،؛ مجموعة الوضعية،؛ أمر معدل الدوران، الميل، الانعراج، الوضعية اليدوية؛ دورة الحد، إيقاف؛ النطاق الميت، الحد الأدنى؛ المعدل، الحد الأقصى؛ طاقة THC، إيقاف؛ طاقة التحكم في الدوران العادية، اثنان، إيقاف؛ طاقة التحكم في الدوران المباشرة، اثنان، إيقاف؛ التحكم في المركبة الفضائية،؛ الوضع، حر؛ ،
さて、皆さんはちょうど今、縁を越えて来始めていますね。中央アメリカの一部が見えていて、そこは
4분 
Oui, ce serait mieux s'il était plus puissant. Bien sûr, il a tendance à bouger u
ليس تمامًا. أعتقد أننا ندرس هذا الأمر قبل تعديل المسار في منتصف الرحلة، باعتباره الوقت المناسب لفحص سخانات المياه. تتضمن عملية التبريد السريع بعض سخانات المياه أيضًا، ولكن سيتم ذلك قبل الدخول مباشرةً عندما لا تكون هذه الأمور حساسة للغاية، وإذا لم نقم بذلك خلال 12 ساعة، فلن يكون من الواضح أين تتم عملية التبريد السريع أو متى يتم تشغيل سخان المياه الثانوي. عند مراجعة قائمة التحقق الخا
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。再说一
わかりました。消耗品に関しては、ジャック、今のところ順調ですね。現在、曲線より約20ポンド多くなっていますね
Okay. And it'll be a few minutes yet, Jim. We're still cra
コリンズは、私たちがこ
分かりました、ヴァンス。ボールが上がって針が飛ぶ方がずっと楽です。そうすると58Gのドリフトになります。手動で飛ばせま
Nun wäre es inter
Viele
Roger. 01
아폴
Roger, Wally, you faded out at the last. Unders
Richtig. 183° Rollwinkel, 137° Nickwinkel und 14° G
Als sich die Boosterstufe von uns trennte, konnte man sehen, wie der Treibstoff aus der Rolldüse spritzte. Während die Boosterstufe taumelte, größtenteils in einer Ebene senkrecht zur Längsachse des Raumschiffs, war der lange, fließende Schweif zu erkennen, der von ihr abging. Ich werde eine kleine Skizze davon in meinen Flugplan einzeichnen. Nach der Trennung des Raumschiffs lagen überall Trümmerteile herum. Wir drehten uns um, und überall waren sie verstreut. Tatsächlich konnte ich erst, als wir die Boosterstufe gen
रॉजर। मैंने इसे दोबारा चालू
Direkt vor dem Raumschiff befindet sich nun ein interessanter Bachlauf, der am Rand eines kleinen Berges entlangläuft; er hat e
11，这里是休斯顿。中航程修正第5次，RCS/G&N：26025，俯仰和偏航配平NA，TIG 150 29 5453，-00048，加上所有球，加上00001 075 159 328；HA NA；HP 加上00230 00048 011 00048；六分仪星号03 0908 382。Boresite星块，无可用。纬度+1102，-17204 11803 36275 195 03 33，校准，Deneb和Vega，007 14
外にいた時、ジムの家の窓に気づきました。外側にコーティングが施されているんです。ある時、肩か腕で触れた時に、コーティングがそのまま飛び散って、ジムの家のフロントガラスの上部が汚れて、外が見えなくなってしまいました。こちら側から見ると、何かの物質でかなり厚くコーティングされているのが分かります。外に出て中を覗いた時は、まるで油っぽい膜が外側に張っているように見えました。私の家の窓
Okay. Below "
حسنًا، أبولو 8. في الصفحة 
Allez, 
Roger. Okay. L'altra cosa è il post-atterraggio. Noi continuiamo - giusto per ribadire - a non voler rimanere più di un'ora nella navicella. Toglietevi le tute, a vostra discrezione, se la navicella non presenta perdite. La parte del portello aperto è una vostra decisione. Al momento, sembra che nell'area di recupero sia adatta a questo scopo. Ricordate l'esercizio di pompaggio che abbiamo fatto al momento della visita m
Okay, Jack. I'm looking at your burn pad and I see that the... total gimbal... 19.3 feet per sec
Gemini VIII. Startschuss für die Vorber
- - बंद। और आपकी सभी घूर्णीय न
Mal sehen. Was stand sonst noch im Flugplan
هذا صحيح. وللعلم يا جيم، فقد حسبنا ال
Roger. You residents of the spacecraft Columbia may be interested in knowing that today is Independence Day in the country of Colombia. Gloria Diaz of the Philippines was crowned Miss Universe last night. She defeated 60 other girls for the global beauty title. Miss Diaz is 18, with black hair and eyes, and measures 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. First runner up was Miss Australia, followed by Miss Israel, and Miss Japan. While you're on your way back Tuesday night, the American and National League Allstars will be playing ball in Washington. Mel Stottlemyre of the Yankees is expected to be the American League's first pitcher. No one is predicting who will be first pitcher for the National League yet. They have nine on the roster. Even though research has certainly paid off in the space program, research doesn't always pay off, it seems. The Woodstream Corporation, parent company of the Animal 
Houston, Apollo 11. Beim nächsten Durchflug von Roll 0 werden wir anhalten, wodurch wir einen Anstellwinkel von 90 Grad erhalten. Ich verstehe, dass Sie für die Plattformausrichtung (Option 1) einen Anstellwinkel vo
Я всё
Ok, vediamo se ho capito. Il passo 2 è "COPPIA DI BILANCIAMENTO DISATTIVATA; BANDA MORTA, MIN; CONTROLLO ASSETTO: BECCO e IMBARDATA a IMPULSO; IMBARDATA, DIRETTA. CONTROLLO MODALITÀ sarà attivo, ATT HOLD; CONTROLLO GUIDA sarà attivo; smorzeremo i ratei; beccheggio e rollio con l'ACA, e im
ケープ。
نعم. سنقو
…指摘して
Ok. Penso che possiamo invertire la rotta e scattare qualche foto dell'ufficio meteorologico, se possibile. Inquadrare il resto, il resto di questi, solo leggermente. Questo è A 10, e 11 sta arrivando, con un banco di nuvole sulla sinistra. Ok. Rimetto la targa e salvo questo ad A. Tolgo di nuovo la
Ah, Roger, Zanzibar CapCom. Amicizia Sette. Tutti i fusibili sono rimasti invariati rispetto a quanto riportato in precedenza; non ne ho cambiato nessuno. Squib è armato. Il Retrojettison automatico è disattivato. è su normale, automatico, giroscopio normale. Tutte le maniglie a "T" sono inserite. Il Retro Delay è normale. Il pannello di sequenza è normale. Il cuscino di atterraggio è disattivato. Il carburante è al 90-98%. L'EPI indica quasi esattamente come previsto. Il mio assetto è 5 gradi a sinist
روجر. إد لم ينم سوى ساعة تقريبًا. سنضطر إلى إعادة ترتيب د
Nous allons larguer les e
أبولو 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
Ça
もう一度試してみまし
हाँ, बिल्कुल। अच्छा रहा। अब तक मैं काफी व्यस्त रही हूँ। मुझे दोपहर की छुट्टी का बेसब्री से इंतज़ार है। मैं खाना बना रही थी, झाड़ू लगा रही थी, लगभग सिल
우리는 부정적인 태도를 불태워버리려는 작전을 펼치고 있는데, 그 때문에
No, non riesco 
Okay. Was die Wasserversor
रॉजर। आप लगभग 3 सेकंड
रॉजर, बज़। यह एक प्रविष्टि PAD, MPL है, जो रोल 05, 35 से शुरू होती है - सुधार - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, प्लस 1102, माइनस 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, संज्ञा 69, सभी चार लाइनें NA हैं। D शून्य से शुरू: 400 02 09. ब्लैकआउट का RET, 00 17 03 38 08 20. सेक्स्टेंट तारा, 02 0945 149. बोरसाइट तारा स्कॉर्पी थीटा है, यानी स्कॉर्पी थीटा। ऊपर 315, दाईं ओर 35, लिफ्ट वेक्टर ऊपर। और टिप्पणियाँ: यह एंट्री PAD मिडकोर्स 6 को नहीं मानती है। और आपकी जानकारी के लिए, अभी इसे देखते हुए, हमें जो भी ट्रैकिंग मिली है, उसके आधार पर, वह पैंतरेबाज़ी केवल एक सेकंड में एक फुट का दसवां हिस्सा होगी। इसलिए, हम शायद इसे छोड़ देंगे। हम आपको इसके बारे में बाद में और जानकारी देंगे। ठीक है। माइनस 30 मिनट पर आपका क्षितिज चेक, 194 33 03, आपको 298 का ​​पिच कोण देता है। ठीक है। आपका बैकअप अलाइन - एंट्री के लिए आपके निर्धारित तारे डेनेब और वेगा हैं, 079 234 340। आपके रीडबैक के लिए प्रतीक्षा कर रहे हैं
状況を改めて整理しましょう。これ以上は何もしません。この姿勢を維持します。ロードについては既に情報を提供していただいています。PCの電源投入開始時刻と、それにプラス2秒後の時
ठीक है। यह प्लस 11 है, /। यह 40 माइनस 163, प्लस 129, माइनस 005, 99, प्लस 00 00 0, प्लस 47016, 177 143 000 नवंबर अल्फा, प्लस 001 97 47 020 5 51 468 18 12 12 83 257 023, ऊपर 263, बाएँ 17, प्लस 11 95, माइनस 165 00 126 83 356 08, उत्तर तारे; 068 097 356, कोई उलेज नहीं। तेज़ वापसी 
Ко
Bonjour, Apollo 11, Houston. Nous avons constaté des anomalies au niveau du transducteur indicateur de débit d'oxygène. Nous soupçonnons un dysfonctionnement du transducteur: nous nous attendions à une valeur élevée du débit d'oxygène lorsque la vanne de ventilation du compar
Roger. 11, /: 45597, 0 - correction - soit moins 040, plus 157, plus 36325, moins 01727, plus 01428 180 003 000, Novembre Alfa, plus 00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254; Scorpii Delta, bas 103, gauche 48, plus 0742, moins 16500 13005 36327; Sirius et Rigel, 129 155 010, quatre quads, 15 secondes; horiz
Он только встаёт. Вам
罗杰。您的 GET 燃烧 02 18 25；Delta
Okay. Possiamo... Dal momento che nella prima p
わかりました。待機して
Hello, Ap
روجر، 11. استمر. إذا كنت تعتقد أنه يبدو مستوياً بالنظ
This is Sigma Seven, at. No ya
मुख्य मार्ग तक पहुंचने म
Roger. For separation burn GET, 09 plus 44 plus 00; Delta-
了解。同じ解釈です
Roger, 11. Comme vous l'avez probablement constaté, votre angle de conicité en mode a considérablement augmenté suite à l'évacuation des eaux usées, à la purge de la pile à combustible et à un couplage naturel. Il semble donc que nous devions interrompre la transmission dan
Affermati
Questa è la Sigma Seven, solo in registrazione VOX. Ho ristabilito la modalità automatica in modalità normale, senza l'azione dei propulsori ad alta potenza. A questo punto ho l'85% di auto e il 90% di manuale. E sento che, ora che sono in funzione, posso fa
Roger. I've been reading you for some time. I've tried to contact you on HF with no success. My status is good; the capsule status is good; control mode is fly-by-wire; gyros caged; maneuver is off. The fuel reads 74-85 [percent]. Oxygen is 87-100 [percent]. The cabin temperature is a bit high at 104 [degrees]. The suit--steam vent temperature is 70 [degrees], and cabin is 80 [degrees], but I 
알겠습니다. 확인했
네, 짐. 저희가 
ठीक है। हमें कुछ समय पहले ऑक्सीजन प्रवाह दर में एक छोटी सी गड़बड़ी दिखाई दी थी, जो अब सामान्य हो गई है। लेकिन सबसे पहले, हम आपसे यह जानना चाहते हैं कि क्या आपने कैनिस्टर प्रक्रिया के दौरान ऑक्सीजन डिमांड रेग ए को केबिन के अलावा किसी अन्य स्थिति में स्थानांतरित किया थ
Dai numerosi crateri si può vedere che questo pianeta è stato bombardato nel cors
Roger. Freut mich zu hören. Wir haben uns gerade über eine Wasserentnahme hier unten unterhalten. Eine steht demnächs
Хорошо. Похоже, длина тени от этого обл
К счастью, тебе удалось собрать всего понемногу. Я имею 
On est en plein milieu de… enfin, soit de la salade de saumon, ou un truc du genre. C'e
- مدار 
フレッド、もしやらざるを得ない状況なら、うまくいくかもしれない。今、昇華器を通る水は余裕で余っている。今朝、上昇タンクへの水移送を試してみてはどうかとメンバー間で話し合ったが、結局やらないことにした。推奨もしない。上昇タンクの一つを空にするのに30時間かかると予想されるからだ。上昇タンクに水を送るには、そうする必要がある。それより下降タンクの水を使いたいし、汗をかいていないと思う。以
Да. Похоже, если мы будем
لم يتبق لدينا سوى دقيقة تقريبًا؛ هل أنت
Bene. Andiamo a pagina 1-11. Sul pannello 276, nessuna modifica; sul pannello 278, vogliamo che tutti gli in
아니요. 아폴로 11호, 저희는 그렇게 생각하지 않습니다. 이는 아마도 오차 때문일 가능성이 높으며, 충분히 만족스러운 결과라고 생각합니다. 그러니 이 결과를 받아들이셔도 됩니다. 저희 기준에 따르면, 동일한 크기로 다시
Ricevuto. TLI: 23514 179 071 001, tempo di combustione 547 104356 35575. Tirare per SEP 357 107 041, 301 287 
हमें इस बात की परवाह नहीं है कि हम सही हैं या नहीं
알겠습니다.
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। 
Главные новости сегодня в Хьюстоне касаются «Астрос». В спортивном мире «Хьюстон Астрос» в девятом иннинге в Цинциннати одержали победу над «Редс» со счетом 7:4. Однако перед началом девятого иннинга ситуация выглядела довольно безрадостной. «Астрос» проигрывали 4:3. Затем, при одном ауте, Хесус Алоу сделал сингл в пр
Apollo 11, questa è Houston. Il PYRO ARM è la scelta giu
Думаю, это будет внутренний край западно-северо-западной части, та часть, кот
И, Аполлон-8, не могли бы вы предоставить нам информацию о работе дв
Роджер. Мы собираемся провести последовательность измерений расстояния; если мы сможем на пару минут убрать голос, мы будем вам очень благо
क्या आप एक पल रुक सकते हैं? फिलहाल ह
रॉजर। संज्ञा 33 से शुरू करते हुए: 130 30 0000, प्लस 00020, प्ल
你状态极佳，听起来棒极了
소위 캥거루 홉은 효과가 있지만, 기존의 한 발씩 차례로 내딛
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。あと2分ちょっとです。地上から見ると、システムパラメータと軌道はすべて良好です。反対側の78 23 31にいま
分かりました。そう
Apollo
मिथुन 4
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。你相信吗？金牛座的艾达星就是昴宿
Très bien, c'est parfait. Toute la procédure que je vais vous expliquer concerne les réglages de l'objectif et l'observation de la Terre depuis la fenêtre de rendez-vous. Tous les angles de cardan et autres paramètres sont conçus pour pointer vers la Terre et no
हम जांच उपकरण को काफी अच्छी तरह से देख सकते हैं, और हम वहां उसके हाथों को भी काफी अच्छी तरह से देख स
حسنًا. يمكنني التأكد من أننا في هذا التكوين باستثناء اللوحة 382، وهي خزان المياه، والتي تركتها مفصولة في حال أر
Sì. Bene, ora li spengo e vedo cosa succede. Okay. La corre
Okay. Falls Sie beim nächsten Durchgang noch einmal nachsehen möchten: Wir haben einen anderen Satz Koordinate
Je ne comprends pas pourquoi notre enregistreur ne fonctionne pas
好的，汤姆。你都明白了。接下来，在进行点火之前，我们需要你这样做：移动到航天器 VII 北面 5 到 10
अभी भी मेरे सामने से खिसक
Du hattest völlig recht, Bruce. Da
That's affirm. Going on to page 27, Activation, panel 16. Under SYSTEM Bravo: ASCENT FEED 1, PQGS should be open; ASCENT HELIUM REG, ope
Roger. Die Cape-Station möchte eine medizinische Datenfreigabe für den Piloten erhalten. I
Va bene
はい。月ですね。
Dovete aver parlato mentr
D'accord, Houston, on va essayer de te récupérer grâce à cette forte a
Роджер. Читаю теб
This is Friendship Seven. I'll try to describe what I'm in here. I am in a big mass of some very small particles, that are brilliantly lit up like they're luminescent. I never saw anything like it. They round a little; they're coming by the capsule, and they look like little stars. A wh
Роджер. И ещё кое-что, Майк. Нам нужно отключить заряд батареи B, а также погода в районе нашей целевой точки посадки сильно ухудшается из-за разрозненных гроз. Мы
他们还在工作，弗兰
Well, we stopped and went through coarse align of and then we got fine align, and pick-a-pair, pick Capella, but she drove and didn't get to any place. I didn't pick Capella, and I can't recognize any o
了解。エバポレーターは正常、セカンダリーポンプAはオフ。すべ
-4. Okay, ich prüfe das hier. Sieht ungefähr richtig aus. Ich hätte noch etwas weiter rechts gehen können. Okay, das reicht für di
Хорошо. Мы завершили запись, и диктофон вернулся к вам. Вы можете использовать его как хотите. Возможно, нам понадобится сделать запись ещё раз, и если это произойдёт, мы будем использовать ту же информацию, если только вы не захотите добавить туда что-то ещё. Качество записи голоса — очень хорошее. Мы приближаемся к 4-му этапу средней части записи, и сейчас речь идёт о выполнении записи вовремя, и вы можете ожидать скорость записи около 3 футов в секунду. Мы рассматриваем и хотели бы, чтобы вы подумали о возможности записи с использованием встроенного вектора, просто обновив его в слоте, чтобы у вас был вектор на борту. Но, похоже, это не окажет существенного влияния на результаты записи, и это может оказаться интересным. Так что, если вы немного подумаете об этом, дайте нам знать, если у вас есть какие-либо предложения или мысли по этому поводу
分かりました。それから、あなたのピッチ・アラインですが、245と読
Okay, Jim. How is the COMM now? Ove
Oka
Ха! Ха! У меня до сих пор черные следы от ласт после вашей поездки в лес. Ладно, видите, я снова отклонился вправо. Мне нужно вернуться — точнее, отклонился влево. Мне нужно вернуться вправо, луна прямо на горизонте. Я снова включу полный курс, просто чтобы показать вам, как легко это сделать. Кажется, у меня хватает топлива, так что я немного поиграю с ним. Ладно, мы почти в правильном направлении по рысканию, но все еще отклоняемся по крену. Я резко включу его, и все будет хорошо. Вот крен, чтобы выровнять. Приближаемся к крену — ладно, я на этом останавливаюсь. Это лучшее, что я могу вам предложить. Небольшое отклонение по крену. Вот так. Вот что я бы вам предложил. Ладно, я вернусь к нормальному режиму гироскопов и позволю им вернуться 
Ehi. Gli Astros hanno battu
D'accord. Votre liste de vérification pré-rétro est-elle 
रॉजर,
了解。適切なタイミングでサッチし
Oui, Jim, c'est Roger. On est en tr
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Возвращение к прежнему 
Freundschaft Sie
제가 보기엔 우리가 가진 패드에는 아무거나 넣고 싶지 않
アポロ1
아니, 찰리. 난 그 정도 해상도가 안 돼. 하
Да. Мы
我明白了——我当时正试图在你读的时候把它抄下来，Vance。那些垫片分别是服务舱抛弃姿态、月球观测姿态、太阳观测姿态和抛弃姿态。
尼尔，这里是休斯顿。我们希望你们
Pensavo f
네, 잠시
Roge
Хорошо. Ваш, похоже, не задевает порог. Ваши пальцы ног вот
OK. Ça a fonctionné. On
わかりました。私が入手した情報をそのままお伝えします。その方が簡単だと思います。11 番上の行には、AC BUS TIE ブレーカーが 4 つ (IN)、AC BUS VOLTS ブレーカーが 1 つ (IN) あります。これで完了です。2 行目には、TCA ブレーカーが 4 つ (IN) あります。FLIGHT DISPLAYS と COMMANDER の下に GASTA があります。同様に AC BUS A の下にも、GASTA と COMMANDER のブレーカーが 1 つ (IN) あります。これで完了です。3 行目に
Ok, Charlie. Non è molto aperto. È difficile darti una buona lettura senza deviarla di nuovo, ma la freccia è circa a ore 1. Ora riduco il flusso e la lascio stabilizzare qui. Al momento la nostra lettura a bordo è di circa 0,4, e questo con la freccia nella valvola dell'O2 a ore 2. Preferiresti avere confronti tra le letture del flusso di O2 o tra le posizioni delle valvo
Оно находится в темном углу, поэтому у нас здесь есть фонарик, чтобы нам было легче видеть; и если я смогу осторожно отпустить его, оно само удержится на мес
Coming right up
알겠습니다. 그리고, 세트 
All right. Fair enou
다음 페이지, 대략 그쯤에서 정상적인 비행 계획을 재개하실 수 있습니다. 한 가지 추가 사항이 있습니다. 바로 폐수 배출 지점을
ठीक ह
Howdy there, Mike. We're ready to go ahead and have you switch to your OMNI positions for y
How 
Houston, A
और हम आपकी बात 
Davvero, uno degli spettacoli più belli che ho visto è stato quando ho guardato giù e ho visto la punta meridionale della Florida e l'isola di Cuba, Porto Rico e Santa Domingo. Era davvero uno spettacolo. I colori del blu e del blu che si tin
11, Хьюстон. В тот момент — мгновение назад — у нас был
حسنًا يا جاك، فهمنا ذلك. بالمنا
Columbia. Columbia, this is Ho
Nun wäre es interessant herauszufinden, ob und wie gut die 80-Millime
Хорошо. Понял,
على الأقل 
I have a Flight Plan update for you, for ground elapsed time of 19 hour
Может ли это быть связано с 
好
奥德赛，休斯顿
Ri
On your next page, in compartment B1, we estimate about 15 percent of that food is remaining. In B2 we took PPK out of there and put trash in it. I
Vous souhaitez commencer votre commentaire sur la couche de brume
- - vorremmo che aprissi il circuito dell
ロジャー、フ
Ho
سنتحدث عن شميدت قريباً، أ
أعتقد أن
Солнце садится по расписани
Gus, on this - what's on the Voice Tape Recorder - they say we were turning it on and
لم يتبق لدينا سوى 10 ثوانٍ من التوهج، ويطلب منكم كيب قياس
13, Houston. Lasst sie nur eine Sekunde oben, dann holen
Gemini VIII, RKV. Stiamo per avere la visuale diretta. Da terra, la visuale è davvero bella. Congratulazioni per il Rend
Okay. Let me take a check here and see if there is anything anybody else wants to input to yo
Friendship Seven, this is Zanzibar Cap Com, reading you loud and cle
我应该把
В салоне немного пр
프렌드십 세븐, 케이프 플라이트는 여러분
- - okay, SPINTA DELTA-V A, NORMALE; in attesa di un malfunzionamento, 
Хорошо. Подождите, я сейчас это дос
降下中にスーツのコ
Ricevuto. Ho
शुभ रात्रि। मेरी ओर से
Roger. Vos g
Ok, grazie. Un attimo, sarò con voi per le manovre. Saranno tre, una de
It'll go 360° around wh
“——当DELTA-VX等于最终DELTA-VX时”，划掉该行。划掉“姿态控制：偏航，脉冲”。添加“修正”，划掉“通过Y
私たちにとっては、まだしばらくはターミネーターを超えることになるでしょう
로저. 저
そして29
Да. Мы в основном движемся вниз. Мы будем д
In the beginning, the operation with the precluded immediate starting up of our sightings as we had scheduled since we had another evasive maneuver. The dumping of the caused a tremendous amount of - of pseudo stars in the area which made an optics calibration practically impossible. The method which we had worked out did not seem to work too well. The method which I finally used was to go into, go to Sirius, which was our brightest star, get the shaft and trunnion, and then fly the spacecraft up to Sirius to use that for the optics, which we did at a later time. With regards to light scatter, it appears that at almost any attitude during our passive thermal control, we are receiving light scattering in the scanning telescope. It takes the form mostly of a wide band of light right across the center of the scope about 10 degrees either direction of zero. It is very difficult to see stars in this area. The realignments have been good. I have been able to pick up the star in the sextant to do the alignment, but I was not 
That's right, Jim. It would be good to see what you are doing down in the o
さて、DELTA-V 
Roger, Apollo 11. Allez-y, réessayez
E poi sembrava che ogni movimento apparente si fosse fermato e che probabilmente ci stessimo avvicinando. Così ho girato la navicella e ho tentato di allineare la piattaforma. Nel frattempo, il booster ha iniziato a scendere sotto di noi a una velocità piuttosto evidente. Così ho rinunciato a cercare di allineare la piattaforma per allinearci e spingere verso il booster, e ho retroazionato leggermente per rallentare con esso. Ancora una volta, sembrava che la nostra velocità si fosse fermata. Ma ormai eravamo andati alla deriva a circa 300 metri. Poi abbiamo seguito il booster attraverso l'Africa puntandolo verso il basso per tu
Верно, и немного мин
क्या मैं इस समय उनके लिए 3
Gleich i
네. 모두가 이해해 주셨으면 하는 한 가지는, 저희는 달과 지구를 꼭 사용해야 한다고 주장하는 것은 절대 아니라는 점입니다. 좋은 별들을 찾을 수 있다면 굳이 사용할
Apollo 8, Houston. Vorremmo che eseguiste qualche manovra aggiuntiva; è solo q
Roger. Sono a posto. Potevo ricevere
आप उस दूसरी नली को 
أورورا سفن، آخر تسجيل لك كان غير قابل للقراءة. أنت تتلاشى بشكل ملحوظ، وإن كان متقطعًا. سأقرأ أوقات التسلسل العكسي دون أن أتمكن من قراءتها. المنطقة 3 دلتا، 04 12 32، 04 12 32؛ صدى 04 22 27؛ 3 صدى 04 22 27؛ 
ठीक है। हमने मुख्य पैराशूट खोल दिया है। यह ड
Roger. Nous allons commencer par l'actualité internationale. Les messa
休斯顿，阿波
11, Houston. I
알겠습니다. 보관 장소에서 꺼내지 않았습니다
Bene. Abbiamo completato il du
Хьюстон, Игл. Как читается надпись на вт
アポロ8号で
Роджер. И гироскопы показывают на данный момент
是的，现在已经
D'accord. En résumé, vous souha
Bene, per ora è tutto, Frank. Abbiamo ricevuto altre notizie che avevano promesso di riportare non appena usciranno. L'unica cosa di vero interesse era... in particolare l'uscita di Pueblo. Credo che ti abbiano già parlato del matrimonio Nixon-Eisenhower. E l'unica altra cosa è il tempo, che da queste parti 
저희가 직접 바꿔보도록 하겠습니다. 각도는 잠시 
ああ、大丈夫だよ、フランク。ここは全部順調だ
フライ・バイ・ワイヤ方式に移行します。ジャイロケージ方式
好的。当然，所有的大新闻头条仍然围绕着你的工作，特别是昨天你看到的那颗卫星
Наш 
Esatt
了解。それでは了解。アポロ8号、次の月周回軌道に向けてG
Very good. I've been searching around a little bit for t
D'accord, Fred. Deux ou trois choses. Premièrement, nous avons besoin d'une vérificati
좋아요. 여러분
Très bien. En voici un exemple: le cessez-le-feu de 72 heures initialement prévu par le Viet Cong est entré en vigu
It looked just the way I expected it to, Joe. I had her sitting there in REACQ with the numbers cranked in and soon as we got pretty much through the rotation, I
Хорошо. На 47 часах всего 1096, четыре датчика: Alfa 270, Bravo 278, Charlie 270, Delta 278 и H2 — они показали уровень H2 в процентах, 76 процентов; а уровень O2 — 81 процент. Однако показания второго кислородного бака сейчас завышены. Мы почти уверены, что это неисправность датчика. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы проверили э
Roger, Canton. Ich war hier mit Manövern beschäftigt. Ich habe Ihnen Ihren Bericht noch nicht gegeben, da ich die Beleuchtung aufgebaut und alles für den Rückzündvorgang verstaut habe. Mein Brennstoffvorrat liegt bei 45-45 Prozent, der Sauerstoffgehalt bei
La température et le débit d'eau en cabine sont complètement coupés et diminuent légèrement pour revenir à environ 7,5. La purge de vapeur de la cabi
Apollo 11, Houston. We're really impressed with the clarity and the detail that we have in the picture. The colors are - now, it's really an excellent picture now that I'm looking at it on our monitor, which is about 12 seconds before the networks can get it out due 
J'ai cassé ma plaque frontale lors de la mise en 
ジェミニ4号、こちらはヒューストンCAP
Be
روجر. بالنسبة للنوم، كل وا
Roger. Vorremmo che pass
Roger
休斯顿，你是想让我们测试一下摄像机吗？——我一直在想这个问题。我在飞行计划里看到了，但我只是想确认一下，你是想用电源测试，还是想让我们把两台16毫米摄像机都带回机舱测
Чарли, ты говорил, что у тебя есть для ме
ठीक है। चरण 1, "रवैया नियंत्रण, तीन से पल्स"; 2, "इसके साथ आगे बढ़ें... पिच 0 है और यॉ 0 है," और
見てみましょう。国内ニュースでは、新婚のデビッド・アイゼンハワーとジュリー・アイゼンハワー夫妻が秘密のハネムーンの隠れ家を出て、ニクソン次期大統領とその家族とクリスマスディナー
Okay. Überprüfen Sie, ob der STATUS-Schalter
Okay, stand by for more
Yes, indeed. They've got the flag up now and you can see the stars and str
저기, TD&E 연료에 대해 다시 한번 말씀해 주시겠어요? 저희가 들은 내용이 좀 달라서
アクエリアス、ヒューストンです。CO2ボンベについてですが、PCO2は現在1.6を示しています。現在設置している2本のボンベであと6時間、少なくとも6時間は使用できると予想しています。
वॉली, तुम्हारी आवाज़ बीच-बीच में 
もう一度言ってく
好的。把逆变器 2 和交流母线 2 的
NOUN 83 zeigt minus vier Kugeln, minus drei Kugeln, 3 oder – Korrektur – minus – sowohl Register 1 als a
और एक बार फिर, हमें थोड़ा सा नज़रिया बदलने की ज़रूरत है। हमारी पृथ्वी ऊपर और दाईं ओर गायब हो रही है। हमारी पृथ्वी और आपकी पृथ्वी। गलत दिशा, गलत दिशा। थोड़ा और। ठीक
जिम मैकडिविट। अभी लगभग T+3 घंटे का समय है। जब हमने SECO प
지평선만 찾으면 해킹은 성공할 텐데. 별도 찾았고, 파란색 필터도 씌웠더니 별 빼고는 다 잘 잘
Okay. Die erste Zusatzfrage lautet: Lassen Sie mich die Originalfrage wiederholen, da es in dieser Frage heißt: „Genauer zu Punkt 2“, und Punkt 2 lautet: „Gab es 
The TV people do n
Les fleurs sont-
- كما قلت سابقاً، هذا 
好的，很好。225号面板：闭合主断路器“飞行总线”（
L'Apollo 11 sta osservando per la prima volta l'avvicinamento. Questa volta sorvoleremo il cratere Taruntius, e le immagini e le mappe riportate dagli Apollo 8 e 10 ci hanno dato un'ottima anteprima 
双子座八号，休斯顿。再
روج
ジム、おそらく六分儀で星を確認することになるでしょう。それは、私たちが手に入れるプラットフォームの性能に大きく左右されます。そして、六分儀で星を確認するに
We could move - we could move that bag - it's no big thing, we can move the bag. Don't worry about it; we're going to leave it this way fo
알았어, 잭. 지금까지 알려준 단계를 다시 읽어줄게. 패널 250 CB BAT A, 전원 입력/포스트랜
... もっと下がってくるまで待たなけれ
존은 미국으로 돌아온 후에 가장 힘든 시기가 온다는 것을 다시 한번 상기시켜 드리고 싶
Ricevuto, Buzz. È un PAD di ingresso, MPL, che inizia con il rullo 05, 35 - correzione - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, più 1102, meno 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, NOME 69, tutte e quattro le linee sono NA. Riprendendo con D zero: 400 02 09. RET del blackout, 00 17 03 38 08 20. Stella del sestante, 02 0945 149. La stella di puntamento è Scorpii theta, cioè Scorpii theta. Su 315, a destra 35, vettore di salita su. E i commenti: Questa voce PAD non presuppone alcuna rotta intermedia 6. E per tua informazione, guardandola ora, in base a tutto il tracciamento che abbiamo ottenuto, quella manovra sarebbe solo di un decimo di piede al secondo. Quindi, probabilmente la salteremo. Ti faremo sapere di più più tardi. Okay. I
Роджер, Нил. Большое спасибо за описание. У нас тут довольно тёмная к
Хоро
马克，
Roger. Kommt auf dich zu. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; minus 061, plus 067 135 23 4149;, plus 32020, plus 06713, minus 02773 181 054 013;, HA ist NA, plus 00230 32833 228, DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355. Die n
मैं पानी गिरा रहा हूँ। फ्यूज चालू कर दिया है। तैयार हूँ। रिकवरी आर्म "आर्म" स्थिति में है। मुख्य पैराशूट के लिए तैयार हूँ। सभी स्विच सही स्थिति में हैं। मैनुअल ईंधन लगभग खत्म हो गया है। यह रहा और मुख्य पैराशूट खुल गया। यह - यह बहुत सुंदर तरीके से खुल गया। चमकीला नीला आसमान। और यह डीरीफ्ड है, और एक स्वीट पाई जैसा दिखता है। ऑटो ईंधन गिर रहा है। इस समय उतरने की दर लगभग 35 फीट प्रति सेकंड है। मुझे कोई समस्या नहीं दिख रही है। मैं प्रभाव के लिए तैयार हो रहा हूँ। ऑटो ईंधन गिर रहा है। केबिन का दबाव ठीक से बढ़ रहा है। सभी सिस्टम बिल्कुल ठीक लग रहे हैं
Houst
Ok, molto bene. Iniz
Изменения следующие (все в столбце А): номер 12, новое изменение — 77546; номер 11, новое изменени
A
Хорошо. Я их постоянно проверяю, и температура держится примерно так: сухие термометры показывают 72-75 градусов
Going back into g-field. And the attitude looks very stable. I'm rolling right around the horizon. I'm going to stop my blood pressure at this time - and sit back here and regroup. I can see the ion 
Хорошо. Мы встанем, и вы поставите отметку. Через секунду я проверю антенну. Хорошо. Похоже, мы готовы к проверке высокоэффективной антенны. И мы можем либо следова
우리는 약 180도 정도 오른쪽이
Roger. Potresti lasciare il tuo interruttore T/M in posi
हाँ। हम ऐसा कर सकते हैं। दरअसल, हम यह देखने में काफी दिलचस्पी रखते थे कि अपश
Roger, Carnarvon. Für den Flugzeugwechsel. Bei GET 02 + 42 + 07; Delta-V, 31,7; Dauer, 0 + 40 Sekund
Roger. Ce voyage sur la Lune vous a peut-être paru simple, voire facile. Je tiens à vous assurer que ce n'était pas le cas. La fusée Saturn V qui nous a placés en orbite est une machine incroyablement complexe, dont chaque composant a fonctionné à la perfection. Cet ordinateur au-dessus de ma tête possède un vocabulaire de 38 000 mots, chacun ayant été soigneusement choisi pour son importance capitale pour nous, l'équipage. Cet interrupteur que je tiens en main a plus de 300 homologues rien que dans le module de commande. À cela s'ajoutent des myriades de disjoncteurs, de leviers, de tringles et autres commandes. Le moteur, notre imposant réacteur situé à l'arrière du module de service, a dû fonctionner sans le moindre problème, sans quoi nous serions restés bloqués en orbite lunaire. Les parachutes au-dessus de ma tête doivent fonctionner parfaitement demain, sinon nous nous écraserons dans l'océan. Nous avons toujours eu la certitude que tout cet
就我而言，Canary 的所有控制系统都堪称完美。手册正如预期
И если Джон готов повторить какой-либо из этих маневров, у меня он е
Ja, das habe ich. Allerdings ist das Essen stark zerbröselt, und ich traue mich nicht mehr, die Packung zu öffnen, aus Angst, Krümel in die Kapsel zu bekommen. Ich kann bestätigen, dass das Essen i
로저. 맞습니다. 감사합니다. 나가겠
君はまだはっきりと声を出しているね、
Hai acces
画面中央に持ってくるには、もう少し
Хорошо. Понятно. Все адреса в норме, сжигание прошло вовремя, а остаточн
Думаю, да, Кен. Эта полоса параллельна линии М, и я думаю, это как-то связано с конструкцией оптики, где у нас есть этот вал или прямоугольный вход оптики снаружи. При этом конкретном угле наклона Солнца она пересекает его. Я заметил, что и Земля, и Солнце делают это со сканирующим телескопом. В секстанте та же световая полоса присутствует, хотя она покрывает все поле зрения секстанта. Однако увеличение позволяет довольно хорошо рассмотреть звезды, и на ней можно сделать пометки. Но идентификация звезд с 
Okay, Fred. The one I've got for you is at the end of
哥伦比亚和鹰。
Sie könnten Colonel Cooper mitteilen, dass wir gerade... Fotos und Videos von Gemini
Passons à la suite. Caméra TV noir et blanc: il est recommandé de la ranger au-dessus des articles A-7 et A-11 dans le sac de décontamination. Ensuite
Le relais Tr-10
ОТМЕТЬТЕ! 
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。还有两
V
Roger. Guidance looks good on the groun
5분 준비 완료. 볼륨을 최대로 설
자, 휴스
...Давайте оставим это в поко
D'accord, Jim. Comme le c
Mein Hals ist etwas trocken, und unsere Augen haben 
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Мы
ठीक है। हम इसे SPAN के लोगों को देखने देंगे, औ
Okay, 2-C è 24, 6; 2-B è 24, 5.5; 2-A è 24, 6; 1-C è 24, 12; 1-B è 24, 11; 1-A è 24, 7. Controllo è 26, 5; S-2 è 27; S-1 è 27; Prin
Finalmente ho scoperto
Да, эта водородная штука... я не уверен, но думаю, это проблема с противодавлением. Если в устройстве возникает хоть какое-то противодавление, например, когда прикреплен пакет, то скорость потока медленно снижается почти до нуля, и вы ждете, и ждете, и ждете, пока не появится последняя капля. Вы думаете, что достигли цели, снимаете пакет, а затем очень быстро видите, как оттуда вытекает к
Stand by. The commander is asleep; we'll get his when he wakes up. The L
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。现在可以看到你了。你可能需要几分钟时间来整合我
Okay. W
Пойду слушать запись VOX. Смотрю 
*** 
Okay, Vance, I was going to show you on - wonder if the folks might - down there might be interested in how we find out how far we're away from the Moon. Going to do that right now in 
了解しました。水上チェックリストに戻って、水上45ページ
Getting a real burst of light in the window. I really don't know what it is. At this point I should be coming up on the sunset. . Periscope is dark. I must be just getting a last look at the horizon; yet I'm not down on it. Here we go into night rather rapidly. Now we're into the night side. I am apparently pointed towards the surface of th
OMNI Delta，你被排除在外了。我没能收到
हमें अपनी नौकरियों की
عل
... की तुलन
收
It's not uncomfortable at all in Aquarius, but
Altri due punti, Fred. Il primo è che non ci aspettiamo quasi nessun disallineamento del tuo motore durante la combustione, quindi non ci aspettiamo alcun regime per tutta la durata della combustione, soprattutto perché avviene a spinta molto bassa. Il secondo punto, ti chiedo di verificare che il reostato della t
Ok. 
फिर भी कोई फायदा नहीं हु
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। आप
Роджер. Мы изучаем замечания Джима по его поводу; а пока, в удобное для вас время, я готов предоставить вам информац
حسنًا. دعني 
Roger. Abbiamo provato a ottenere questo riallineamento. Abbiamo bisogno di... Hai una manovra per ottenere angoli di gimbal adeguati, in modo da non bloccarlo quando otteniamo l'allineamento 
Ok, configurazione pannello 11, riga superiore: AC BUS B, voglio l'ANTENNA BANDA S, APERTA, APERTA; AC BUS A, REGISTRATORE, APERTO. Seconda riga, sotto SISTEMA A, voglio SOV PRINCIPALE attraverso QUAD 1 TCA, tutti CHIUSI. X-POINTER DEL COMANDANTE sotto DISPLAY DI VOLO, APERTO;, APERTO;, RISCALDA
자, 이글, 시작해.
Oui
Ricevuto. Capisco. Ottimo riferimento per 
Got to - Got to come in towards the center, all the way to 
جيميني 8، هيوستن CAP COM. تأكد من اكتمال TR ناقص 4 16 ونحن في انتظارك لـ SEP A
Roger. Capisco che tutto q
Les habitants de la côte ouest américaine, à Seattle (Washington), Portland (Oregon), Vancouver (Colombie-Bri
Gemini 4, Хьюстон, CAP COM. Просим вас оставить переключатель компьютера в положении «ВКЛ», а блок питания переменного тока — в пол
Ricevuto, Buzz. A quanto pare, guardando fuori dai finestrini si vede l'intera are
سأجرب فكرتك بشأن تقنية الميلان هنا للانجراف. أعتقد أن ذل
好的。最后，既然航天器已经
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。我们希望您终止
好的。我
알겠습니다. 1분 전에 "MASTER ARM, ON"을 지우세요. 35초 전에는 처음 두 줄을 지우세요. 10초 전에는 "Minus 9 seconds"로 바꾸세요. 그러면 "Minus 9 seconds"에는 "Manual Ullage"가 남게 됩니다. 2초 전에는 "MODE, FREE"와 "ACA out of detent
हमारी ऑक्सीजन की ख
Apollo 8, Hou
E Apollo 13, Houston. Consigliamo O
Это подтверждается. Причина, по которой мы отключаем логику, Джек, — экономия электроэнергии. Поэтому мы их выключим, я включу 
Nessuna obie
Friendship Seven, Frien
جيري، هل اتخذت قراراً بشأن ما سنفعله بخصوص
مرحباً يا أصدقاء سبعة، يا قائدة ووميرا. هل تسمعونني؟ انتهى
Хорошо. Джек только что сказал мне, что он закончил, и он собирается снова пройти процедуру отката, перв
रॉजर। वे आपको केबिन क्षेत
Роджер. Ну, Майк, теперь я вижу всю Землю из центрального окна. Я вижу Флориду, Кубу, Центральную Америку, всю северную половину Центральной Америки, фактически, в
わかりました、ジャック。もう一度言ってく
أبولو 8، بينما ننتظر الوصول إلى أعلى مستوى للارتفاع، سأواصل تلخيص المسار. لا يزال بإمكاننا العودة إلى خط منتصف المحيط الهادئ من النقطة الثالثة عشرة، وستكونون في طريقكم بعد 138 ثانية من بدء الاحتراق. هذه المدة (138 ثانية) تُخرجكم من منطقة الفراشة. نوصي بعدم محاولة الإشعال المسبق أو إعادة التشغيل بعد 20 ثانية. إذا تجاوزتم 20 ثانية، فقد يتجاوز المسار قدرة التصحيح، مما يؤدي إلى عودة حرة. الطقس في منطقة الاستعادة جيد. لدينا رياح خلفية ورياح خارجية. أثناء الاحتراق، قد تلاحظون تغيرًا طفيفًا في ضغط غرفة الاحتراق وضغط الخزانات نتيجةً لنفاد الوقود في خزان التخزين وانتقاله إلى خزان التجميع. قد يحدث هذا في غضون 2 إلى 5 ثوانٍ من بدء الاحتراق. سي
Pas de problème. Surveille simplement les 
L'interrupteur de l'ordinateur est
Rog
Включен ли тран
Tatsächlich ist das eine Korrektur, es ist noch nicht heruntergekommen. Es bewegt sich gerade dorthin. Ich möchte Ihnen kurz meinen Steuermodus erläutern. Ich befinde mich im Automatikmodus, der Bypass-Schalter steht auf Normalstellung, Manöver sind deaktiviert. Der Kraftstoffstand ist im grü
D'accord. Y a-t-il une attitude particulière que vous
不，
Bene, il prossimo è il controllo notturno dell'orientamento dell'imbarda
We'll have to wipe them off, Jack. They're coated with water ri
好的。您在“接受”选项中已确认。这是更新后的着陆点 RESFMMAT。我们仍然认为不需要更换
Sì..
Okay, Vance. If there is no more that you would like to see ri
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。オーバー
Привет, Хьюстон, Водолей. Ка
感觉从这里出发挺
了解。10人のクルーが報告したように、食料袋にガスが詰まって困
디크, 당신은 알아듣기 힘든 말을 하
ठीक है। ईंधन के आंकड़े ऑटोमेटिक के लिए 100 (प्रतिशत), मैनुअल के लिए 95 (प्रतिशत), ऑक्सीजन प्राथमिक के लिए 62
Да. Похоже, это произошло в тот момент, когда я увеличил тягу на "плюс X", и, видимо, она не была отцентрирована, потому ч
حسنًا، عند T
了解。お待ちください
ヒューストンのアソシエイテッド社ハリー・ローゼンタールによる特集記事です。2歳のジェフリー・ラベルくんのクリスマスイブを、2人のサンタが明るく彩ります。1人目は玄関をノックしてプレゼントを持ってきました。2人目は月からお父さんを家まで送り届けました。1人目は赤い服と白いひげを
Very good. Would you give us all three inverter 
로저. 해당 페이지로 이동하여 '승인'을 클릭해 주시면,
Хорошо. Ва
Okay, Jack. Wie lies
好的。回到远地点
Okay. Falls Sie beim nächsten Durchgang noch einmal nachsehen möchten: Wir haben einen anderen Satz Koordinaten, basierend auf der Onboard-Lösung des P57. Das sind Echo 0,3 und 
ऑरोरा सेवन, कानो। आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें क
ヒュー
नील, यहाँ जो भी खाना-पीना और सामान है, क्या तुम उसे अपने साथ ले जाओगे, पियोगे
Okay, Jac
로저, 
Ich bin überrascht, dass sie es nicht um 3 oder 4 Minuten aktualisiert haben, um, wissen Sie, DELTA-V an die gleich
أصف الشريط الأزرق. هناك شريط أزرق 
I agree
調子はどうですか
Gemini 4, Cana
Ну,
Ici Friendship
Okay, Jack. I'm going to read it to you, and then add some comments and we'll talk about it a little. This should occur sometime after . After the realine at 49 hours, if time permits we would like the crew to investigate while in if there is a roll angle in whi
I caught your Z Cal. Okay, the rates are nice and zeroing. I'm going back to normal position instead
Всё в порядке, для протокола. Интерес
Just get my pencil out. Standby.
ह्यूस्टन। आपने घोड़ी के पहाड़ी इलाके में पानी चाटने के बारे में जो टिप्पणी की, नील, क्या वह किसी ऊंचे टीले के चारों ओर से बहते लावा प्रवाह जैसा आभास देती है, या फिर वह उस बिंदु 
11, Houston. D'après vos relevés de température, il s
Хорошо, Хьюстон, Водолей. Джек о
조금 힘이 빠지시는 것 같네요
现在弗
음, 다리를 쭉 펴서 편안하게 앉을 수 있나요, 아니면 꽤 좁게
रॉजर। आपको क्या लगता है यह कितनी दूर 
조
रोजर, सीएसक्यू सर्
Compris. C'est satisfaisant et je vous rec
Potrebbe funzionare se dovessimo farlo, Fred. Al momento stiamo considerando un eccesso d'acqua confortevole attraverso il sublimatore. Stamattina stavamo discutendo tra noi di farti provare il trasferimento dell'acqua dalla bombola di risalita, ma abbiamo deciso di non farlo, di no
Gemini, Gemini VI. We have your drogue time as 29 plus 4
Gémeaux 4, ici le chirurgien. Nous avons reçu votre tension artérielle, vous pouvez commence
استعدوا. ترقبو
Meno 00014, più tutti zeri, più 00001 000 304 000, non applicabile, più 00191 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225 Shaula, su 236 000, 
Nous aimerions avoir votre avis à ce sujet, mais nous préférerions de notre côté couper la télévision. Cependant, si vous tenez à re
Ich glaube nicht, dass viele das so gesehen
Penso che anche Tom
ヒュース
La qualité de la voix est mauvaise pour le moment, et 
Sélectionnez la cartouche de CO2 s
Okay. Ich melde mich gleich bei dir zu deiner Frage, Fred. New, hier ist die Vorgehensw
نعم. لقد فهمنا ما تقول
AP通信によると、ワシントン州シアトル、オレゴン州ポートランド、ブリティッシュコロンビア州バンクーバー、そしてサンフランシスコの西海岸の住民は、今夜9時から深夜までの間、それぞれの地域でイルミネーションを点灯し、皆さんに自分たちの地域の様子を見せようと計画しています。天気は晴れと予想されていますので、クリスマスのイルミネーション、ポーチライト、お店のイルミネーションな
أب
여기 
Man sollte den Jungs die Chance geben, wieder einzuschlafen und die Dinger zu kalibri
ठीक है। आखिरी 4-आखिरी 5 के लिए, 
혹시라도 시간 부족 등의 이유로 문-썬 프로젝트를 완료하지 못하더라도, 잭은 참가작까지 이어지는 대략적인 플랫폼을 마련해 둘 것이며, 저희는 
Roger. Sur votre système, l'oxydant fonctionne à 75 degrés, le carburant à 74 degrés et la
Do you have some updates for us as far as P
Roger. Anche qui tutto bene. Mi sento benissimo
E
Okay, Mike. We'
जी हाँ, जिम। और हा
알겠습니다.
Я хочу поговорить о... отношении, Эд, и я хочу, чтобы ты сказал мне, что, по-твоему, это такое... 00 презентация отношения, 0 презентация отнош
わかりました。準備はできています。もし承認していただけるなら、そこに貼り付けてお
네, 지금 바로 그렇게 
Ripet
Мы чувствуем, что должны это использовать. В этой конфигурации усиление по тангажу и крену не слишком велико. По рысканию он будет держаться, но по тангажу и крену —
말씀하시는 내용
24 p
Нет, ЭКГ пр
जी हाँ। आप पैड से प्राप्त होने वाले कोण डालेंगे, और
Также, Хьюстон, Апо
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। मैं आपकी बात स्प
Roger. Je comprends que C valai
Se non è buono, ne servirà comunque un altro, eh? Quindi, non ha senso salvare 
Roger. Good readback. Okay, continuing on. Nothing on page 6; nothing on page 7. No
好的。从瞄准星开始，是天蝎座头部中心的那颗星——老祖巴星；它的方位角是：下060度，左42度
Roger. E, Mike, tra circa 11 minuti alle 83:44, ovvero alle 84:30, e prima di - o alle - vorremmo che tu andassi - Configura la banda S per la traccia ad alto guadagno su REACQ, il fascio ad alto guadagno su NARROW, e proviamo a 
जो, क्या उन्हें कभी इस बात का अंदाजा ह
了解。もし写真を撮りたいなら、高感度白黒フィルムを装填したユニフォームマガジンをお勧めします。室内灯は消灯し、ハッセルブラッドの電動レンズに80ミリレンズを装着してください。手持ち撮影になると思いますが。F値は2.8
地球
D'accord. RRT, 07 20, 50 000, 08 16. C'est - 07 20 est - est le temps de la pression de vapeur à partir de RRT; et 40 000, 08 30; 24 000, 09 02;
Cinque per un
Sì. Se sembra che la programmazione sia corretta e mantenga un buon assetto orbitale, lo lascerò andare e lo riporterò in modalità manuale. Altrimenti, se sembra che i giroscopi siano armati come poco fa, allora rimarrò in modalità manuale retrofire, credo, e lo lascerò 
了解。ありがとうござ
On dirait que l'enregistrement est toujours en cours et le voyant rouge ne s'allume pas. C'est vraiment inadmissible, cet emplacement pour le voyant de l'enregistreur. En fait, tout le fonctionnement de l'enregistreur est mal conçu. Il devrait pouvoir fonctionner en continu pour pouvoir communiquer par radio, notam
I'll give a readout on how I do it. Selecting fly-by-wi
Das ist Freun
मैक्स कॉनराड, जो एक और विमान चालक हैं और अपने हल्के विमान से दुनिया का चक्कर लगा रहे हैं, उन्होंने क्रिसमस का दिन अंटार्कटिका में बिताया - चिली के
罗杰。推进剂含量显
حسناً. لديّ حمولة جيدة للـ 21-4
حسنًا. بالنسبة لدرجات حرارة خزان الهيليوم: فهي غير مسجلة بجودة منخفضة، وبالنظر إلى تفريغات الشريط، فإن معظم البيانات الموجودة على ا
I
Okay. Die nächsten eins, zwei, drei, vier, fünf, sechs, sieben und acht sind gleich, und dann wollen wir FUEL CELL 2 MAIN BUS A auf OFF stellen; und, einen Schritt überspringend, wollen wir 
And proceeding on. If, during the burn, the engine stops, if you have a flashing NOUN 97, you should PROCEED, then ullage, ENGINE START to PUSH, and DESCEN
D'accord, page 1-2. À moins 2 heures, il y a une vérification du titre « Séquence logique »; et nous supprimons toute cette séquence; cela fait parti
双子座 VIII
Nun, Vance, in wenigen Minuten werden wir sehen, wie das einzige Sy
That's affirmative, Jim. After you get oriented in the attitude you want to burn in, do an aline which is - an body-axis aline which is 400 plus 5. When you get ENTER, this will bring ball up to 000, and I want to
मैं यहाँ थोड़ी सी दार्शनिक बात करना चाहता हूँ। फ्रेड ने मुझे बताया कि एक बार आप आए थे और आपने उनसे कहा था कि हमारा प्रवेश
好的，S 波段天线 OMNI 开关拨到 Bravo 位置（你现在的位置），S 波段天线 OMNI 拨到
是的。抬
Natch. Cabin temperature — 92. Suit temperature — 58. Cabin pressure is 5.6. Suit CO2 is 3/4. Left bottle is 5100. Right bottle is 5050. O2 quantity 62. Pressure is 840. Source temperature is 
D'accord. On va laisser le système de vidage automatique en 
Полаг
MAN ATT, tre, al COMANDO RATE
Columb
Это «Дружба Семь», Занзибар. Рекомендует ли Кейптаун какие-либо действия в отношении 
مرحباً يا كناري. الصداقة السابعة. أستقبلكِ بصوت عالٍ وبصوت غير واضح قليلاً. هل تستقبلي
제미니 4호, 여기는 휴스턴 CAP COM입니다. 송신 중이시라면 수신은 하지 않지만
Housto
好的，迈克，我们正在接收你的转发信号吗？我把它留在SLEW模式下。转发给
حس
مرحباً
看看体育界，我们来看看。就在你前几天忙的时候，乔·纳马斯和橄榄球联盟主席皮特·罗泽尔宣布，“百老汇乔”已经同意出售他在“单身汉三号”餐厅的股份，并加入纽约喷气机队。乔今天抵达了喷气机队的训练营，并进行了首次训练。其他几位和乔一起罢训的喷气机队球员也都报到了。来自密歇根州杰克逊的戴维·希尔在上周赢得了他参加的三场高尔夫大满贯赛事中的第三场。他赢得了费城精英赛。希尔今年至今已经赢得了四场比赛，并以12.9万美元的奖金成为今年的奖金王。棒球方面，国家联盟西区的竞争依然激烈。洛杉矶道奇队和旧金山巨人队落后联盟领头羊亚特兰大勇士队一个胜场。休斯顿太空人队目前战绩为48胜48负，排名第五，落后七场。昨晚太空人队和
Stand by. We'll
मेरा कहना है कि जब आपका रेंडेज़वस रडार सेल्फ-टेस्ट पूरा हो जा
Okay. E ho capito che vuoi che facciamo un'opzione 3 P57 e poi
Roger, sembra 
Okay, I am switching the 
حسنًا يا فريد. هذه عملية لقراءة درجة حرارة خزان وقود الهبوط. لا توجد مشكلة كبيرة، لكن فريقنا يقول إن الجزء السفلي من مرحلة الهبوط ربما يبرد، ونريد فقط التأكد من أن خزان مياه الهبوط سيكون على ما يرام. حاليًا، يبدو أنه لن يتجمد إلا بعد عدة ساعات من تفريغه، لكننا نريد منك قراءة هذه الدرجات لنرى مدى دقة توقعاتنا. الإجراء هو: على اللوحة 
Хорошо. Посл
В дальнейшем мы хотели бы уточнить, намерены ли вы удалить только контрольные точки 1, 2 и 3, а также пс
Kurz gesagt: Um Nick- und Rollbewegungen zu steuern, verwenden Sie die Steuerelemente, wie wir geübt haben; für d
いいえ。了解しました。飛行状況、つまりアラインメント（調整）がどうだったか気になります。追跡データでは追加で毎秒2フィートの速度調整が必要と表示されていたのですが、それが遅
Okay. Jim says the docking tunnel index is a 
Jack, warum h
ठीक
Roger. Bei der nächsten Druckentlastung können Sie zusätzlich zum oder anstelle des vorderen Luk
Okay. Jack is showing Fred the procedures. Want to get him familiarized with them, and how to get out of any problems before we pr
オ
Allons-
如果您愿意，我们现在就可以开始氧气清
아시다시피, 앞으로의 절차를 담당하는 여러 그룹이 있습니다. 시스템, 자세, 수행 방법, 정렬 기술 등을 결정하기 위한 중간 항로 수정 작업을 담당하는 그룹이 있고, 진입 
Ge
حسنًا. كنتُ فقط أتأكد. أردتُ
로저. 시야도 좋고 통신도 원활해서 지금은 스캐닝 망원경을 보지 않고도 말로 설명해 드리겠습니다. 아크투
Apollo 11, Houston. Buzz, es scheint, als ob du den Sonnenfilter aufsetzen und die Sonne durch den Filter betrachten 
We really have them, Charlie. We've got all kinds of good stuff. We've got coffee up here in the upper l
मैं 182 जड़त्वीय गति से गुज
Ok. Ottimo affare. Un altro dettaglio per te, Jack: ci dice che il jitter dell'OTTICA è molto simile a quello che avevamo sull'Apollo 12. Nessun problema, ma quando non usi l'OTTICA, ti consigliamo di spegnere l'interruttore OPTICS POWER per evitare un possibile degrado durante
フランク、ちょっと待って。君の態度が少しばかり険悪になってい
Okay, wir werden uns jetzt erstmal eine Minute lang unterhalten, denn ich kann 
طائرة 
रॉजर। स्टैंडपाइप तरल से भरा हुआ है। तरल स्टैंडपाइप के बाहरी हिस्से पर आधे तक फैला हुआ है—लगभग 60 डिग्री के कोण पर एक काफी 
Ok. Mi pare di aver letto che eri pronto. Ho dimenticato... gli auricolari. Consiste semplicemente nel prendere un secondo paio di cartucce dal modulo di comando, mettere una striscia di nastro adesivo, quello grigio, con il lato adesivo rivolto verso l'esterno, attorno ai lati di ogni nuovo contenitore, vicino alla parte superiore, prendere un pezzo di cartoncino e tagliarlo in quattro quadrati di circa 5 o 7,5 cm di lato, piegarli ad angolo retto per formare un supporto angolare, attaccarli al nastro adesivo in modo che sporgano e si sovrappongano al vecchio contenitore, e poi semplicemente posizionare il vecchio contenitore accanto al nuovo contenitore e fissarli bene con il nastro adesivo in modo che aderiscano. L'unica altra procedura è quella di rimuovere il tappo di carta dalle vecchie cartucce e inserirlo sul fondo de
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Примерно через 2 минуты
R
हमे
Apollo 8, Houston. Would you go to and ACCEPT, please? We want to send up th
Voyons voir. À Springfield, dans le Missouri, Mickey Owen, l'ancien receveur des Dodgers de Brooklyn, entré dans l'histoire en laissant échapper une troisième prise qui a permis aux Yankees de New York de remporter la victoire contre les Dodgers lors des Séries mondiales de 1941, a décidé de laisser une trace indélébile dans les mémoires, au-delà de ses exploits sportifs. Quarante-cinq garçons et filles ont reçu un poney grâce à son geste généreux. Ces jeunes étaient invités à lui écrire pour lui expliquer comment ils prendraient soin d'un poney. Face à l'afflux de lettres, il a ajouté cinq poneys aux vingt qu'il avait déjà offerts; d'autres donateurs ont également contribué à en offrir vingt autres. « Je pensais recevoir une quarantaine de lettres, mais j'en ai finalement reçu près de 900 », a déclaré Mickey Owen. Passons maintenant à la une: à Wellington, en Nouvelle-Zélande, une cinquantaine d'hommes ont dégusté aujourd'hui la traditionnelle dinde et sa sauce aux canneberges au pôle Sud, mais les festivités de Noël avaient aussi une saveur orientale. Au menu figurait du sukiyaki préparé par des membres d'une expédition japonaise traversant l'Antarctique et ayant fait escale pour la journée à la base polaire de l'US Navy. À San Diego, en Californie, les membres d'équipage du Pueblo, navire de renseignement capturé, ont offert leur 
استمتع الآن يا جيميني 4، وكما قلت، في أي وقت تشعر فيه بالوحدة سنكون ف
Roger. Nous y pensons aussi, et l'un des problèmes est que le câble de communication est solidement fixé au tuyau, il faut donc le débrancher d'une manière ou d'une autre pour y parvenir. Le câble de communication restera donc ic
ठीक है। रॉजर। ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स कोड और ब
收到。我们已经测量了
罗杰。我一直没能让DCS指示
Je ne vais rien faire, Mike. 
제미니 4, 제미니 4, 여기는 휴스턴 CAP COM입니
バスケットボールのビッグゲーム、アストロ・ブルー・ボネットの試合に続いて、SMUとオクラホマがアストロ・ブルー・ボネットと対戦します。両校とも、このビッグゲームに向けて気合を入れています。どちらが有利かはここでは分かりませんが、もし有利なチームがいたら後で調べてお知らせします。現在、オーストラリアではデビスカップが開催中で、アメリカが再び優勝を狙っていますが、どうやら今日はアメリカが再び覇権を握る可能性が高いよう
कॉन्टारेक्स कहाँ है? क्या 
Roger; esatto, Fred-o. E ora vorremmo fornirti una configurazione per collegare il tuo vettore 
Hey, ich habe
सच में, जैक, जब मैं अंतरिक्ष यान को पृथ्वी
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह
Okay, Jack. Wir haben einen Mittelkurs 5: NOUN 33,;, N/A; HA N/A; plus 0019,8, 0007,8, Brenndauer 0,15, der Rest des Startplatzes, N/A. Manuelle Abschaltung nach 14 Sekunden, Leerlauf durch vier Düsen für 10 Sekunden, und der gesamte Brennvorgang erfolgt m
시리우스와 리겔, 010 294 320, 여유
Okay. Das Einzige, was ich daran nicht verstehe, ist, warum es so schnell angestiegen ist. Mit welcher Geschwi
Und in Italien 
Ja, das glaube 
Близнецы 4, Канарский Козеф (C
嘿，休斯
إنها تتجه ببطء نحو الصفر، وبدأن
Questa è
Okay... How we aline the command module 
वाष्पीकरण का तापमान कम 
- - our descent 
Ken, abbiamo quasi esaurito la benzi
Roger. We have an attitude that we can get the Earth out of a window or the Moon. We're trying
I think today is also the birthday of California, and I believe they are 200 years old, and we s
Sie haben ausreichend Zeit. Nehmen Sie sich Zeit, um mit dem Fly-by-Wire-System in die Wiedereintritts
好的，弗雷德。我做了个更正。DELTA-VZ 是 -
Oui. Si la programm
休斯顿，加油！阿
Okay, Jack. Einverstanden. Ich denke, es funktioniert auch. Einen
알겠습
हम हार गए हैं - इसे जल्दी करने का एकमात्र फायदा यह है कि अगर हम पावर वापस ला सकें तो फिर नीचे आ सकते हैं। इसे जल्दी करने का एकमात्र फायदा यह है कि आप अभी एक बड़ा बर्न और मिडकोर्स कर सकते हैं और फिर प
Dì, che ne
हाँ, हम इसे देख रहे हैं। हम पृथ्वी के उस हिस्से को नहीं देख पा रहे हैं जो टर्मिनेटर की ओर है। पृथ्वी का वह अंधकारमय भाग हमें दिखाई नहीं दे रहा है। 
Я думаю, что два угла соприкоснулись, поскольку при развертывании они не выдвинулись одновременно. Развернулось оно немного неровно, и, конечно, местность, на которой оно находилось, была немного — не совсем ровной, как мне бы хотелось. И я думаю, ч
D'accord, Fred. Ensuite, je te demande de prendre du ruban adhésif gris et de recouvrir la moitié de la surface de sortie de chacune des buses bleues: celle du commandant et celle du LMP. On fait ça parce qu'on va faire passer ce circuit par l'orifice du second réservoir de LiOH, ce dernier étant retiré. On n'aura ainsi pas la restriction de débit néces
13号，休
Roger. È
نعم. يجب أن يكون هذا من مفضلاتك. بال
Beh, questa è una delle tante. E vogliamo dirti una cosa che ho già detto a Jim prima, e che riguarda il controllo. Al momento hai il controllo in hardover se ne hai bisogno, ma quando passiamo alle modalità d
好的。翻到第25页。在第25页，省略步骤3；执行步骤4。在步骤4的最后一行，划掉“CB(16): 逆变器2，关
मुझे लग रहा है कि पिच में कुछ गड़बड़ है, लेकिन शायद वो क्षितिज पर दिखने वाली हवा की चमक की वजह से है। उसकी वजह से लगता है कि पिच असल से ज़्यादा ऊँची है। फिर भी मुझे लग रहा है कि पिच मेरी ज़रूरत से लगभग 10 डिग्री नीचे है। अगर हम इतने करीब हैं,
はい、そうです。
Jetzt ganz vorne. Ohne diese Waffe habe ich
نعم. سأحاول الالتزام بالوضعية التي نختارها مباشرةً، بينما تُعطينا أنت الوضعية العامة. لسنا متأكدين تمامًا من الوضعية الأنسب. سأسأل جاك مجددًا إن كان 115
ハワイさん、はっきりと聞こえましたよ。調子はどうですか？確
Sì. Andrebbe bene. C'è qualcosa che puoi fare: puoi revisionarlo. Ed è un processo un po' noioso, ed è per questo che vogliamo solo
روجر... REP RB 26 زائد 39؛ انعطاف يسار 47 درج
نعم. حسنًا، يبدو أن الجو سيتحسن قريبًا من وجهة نظرنا. الطرف الغربي للطقس ليس بعيدًا جدًا 
Roger, Apollo 11. Allez-y, réessaye
로저. 
अब मैं थोड़ा औ
रॉजर। मुझे पता चला है
그러시는 동안, 지휘 조종사님께서 부스터에 대한 정보, 거리, 부스터 가까이 접근해서 보려면 어떻게 해야 하는지
了解。もっと良いショットを撮るために、テレビをこのブラ
Oui. Je suppose que 
罗杰。我现在
Okay, we're at 28,00
Roger. Solo alcune cose interessanti - ho appena fatto un NAV con la luna; il sole è proprio sulla mia traiettoria. Sono riuscito a ottenere un set su Antares e stavo lavorando sul secondo, quando il bordo della luna è scomparso completamente. La vista attraverso il sestante è di un bianco lattiginoso, sia che si guardi il cielo
A
Роджер, я понял. У тебя наблюдается небольшо
罗杰。休斯顿，我是尼尔。你
我们正在进行最后的准
Tr
أجل، هذا جيد حقاً. يسعدني سماع ذ
Roger. I tuoi giros
Okay. Jim sagt, der Andocktunnelindex betrage p
Roger. 28570 250 28401 42 0641 296, nicht anwendbar dreimal, plus 0920, minus 
Bene. Il portello è chiuso e 
D'accord. 17 p
友谊七号，友谊七号，这里是加州通信技术学院，加
Copie, 144
Roger. Ci stiamo prendendo il tempo necessario per adattarci a questo nuovo assetto; andare su Navi è piuttost
ジョー、今は安定したライトがついていないので、一瞬のことだったに違いありま
Oh oui. Je dirais que
रॉ
Роджер, Майк. Мы видим колебания на наших графиках. Вы подк
2:26. र
了解しました。それから、ページの一番下にちょっとしたメモを追加してください。 - 注： - これは61ページの一番下です - 注：テープメーターは使用しないでください。つまり、M
ジェミニVI
لا ينبغي أن
Okay, Odyssey, Houston. Wir sind bereit für die Startaufstellung und das Warm-up. Wenn alles andere gleich ist, möchten wir, dass ihr den JETT-Chec
Эта штука 
罗杰，非常感谢。我们查看了回放，发现启动时出现了一些问题。稍后我
好的，比尔
오, 안 돼요, 프랭크. 전 100% 한 상자당 한 마리
はい、
곧 
Хорошо. Она потянула
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к 2000 году, но лидеры демократов ответили, что приоритет должен быть отдан потребностям на Земле. Агню, высокопоставленный правительственный чиновник, присутствовавший на запуске «Аполлона-11» в среду, по-видимому, говорил от своего имени, а не обязательно от имени администрации Никсона, когда сказал: «На мой взгляд, мы должны отправить человека на Марс к концу этого столетия». Ларедо, Техас, AP: Иммиграционные власти Нуэво-Ларедо объявили в среду, что хиппи будут отказывать во въезде в Мексику по туристическим картам, если они не примут ванну и не подстригутся. Уберто Касарас, начальник мексиканской иммиграционной службы в Нуэво-Ларедо, заявил, что власти Мехико, Акапулько и других популярных туристических мест получили жалобы на хиппи. По сообщению United Press International: Первоначальная реакция на решение президента Никсона предоставить федеральным служащим выходной в понедельник, чтобы они могли отметить национальный день участия в лунной миссии «Аполлон-11», была в основном удивлением. Родни Биднер, Associated Press, Лондон, AP: Европа поражена миссией «Аполлон-11». Газеты по всему континенту заполняют свои страницы фотографиями ракеты «Сатурн V», стартующей для установления первой связи Земли с ее естественным спутником. И авторы заголовков напрягали воображение, чтобы подобрать слова, чтобы восхвалять этот подвиг. «Величайшее приключение в истории человечества началось», — заявила французская газета Le Figaro, посвятив четыре страницы репортажам с мыса Кеннеди и схемам миссии. Таблоид Paris Jour провозгласил: «Весь мир говорит им „браво“». Коммунистическая ежедневная газета L'Humanite начала с фотографии запуска и посвятила всю последнюю страницу восторженному репортажу о Луне, описывающему обратный отсчет и запуск, жен и семьи астронавтов, а также справочную информацию о лунной деятельности. Хемпстед, Нью-Йорк: Джо Намат официально прибыл в тренировочный лагерь New York Jets в Университете Хофстра в среду после закрытой встречи со своими товарищами по команде по поводу разногласий с комиссаром профессионального футбола Питером Розеллом. Лондон, UPI: Палата лордов получила в среду заверения, что американская миниатюрная подводная лодка не «повредит и не нападет» на Лох-Несское чудовище. Лорд Намат заявил, что хочет быть уверен, что любой, кто управляет подводной лодкой в ​​озере, «не подвергнет никаким существам, к
ठीक है। मुझे यह पता लगाना है कि जिस संघनन पात्र का उपयोग हम चंद्र सतह पर पानी छानने के लिए करने वाले थे, क्या वह पात्र पूरी तरह से वायु
D'accord. Quand vous aurez deux personnes dispon
로저. 들었습니다. 텔레비전에서도 그렇게 보였던 것 같습니다. 이제 마지막 질문
Ken，关于这次机动（7），你是打算——我们是不是要用掉之前得到的数据，还是会有新的机动要进行，或者
حسنًا. كل ما علينا فعله هو إرسال متجهات الحالة وحمولات الهدف، وسنحتاج إلى الانتظار بضع دقائق حتى نكون مستعدين لذلك. وإذا كنتَ جاهزًا للاستلام، يمكنني أن أعطيك لوحة المناورة لـ PC + 2، 
알겠습니다. 저희 T/M 스위치는 실시간 모드이고 ACQ는 명령
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। बढ़िया कट-ऑफ लग रहा है। यहाँ सब कुछ बहुत अच्छा दिख 
Vous pouvez maintena
Th
如果我没有，我相
Il tuo orologio è davvero bello. Siamo 
Вперёд, Хьюст
D'accord. L2 est comme indiqué. L3 est comme indiqué; 
はい。少し遠くにいるからというのもあるかもしれませんね。ただ、先ほどの「注意」警告は、これからあなたに届くはずだったということをお
मेरी योजना प्र
Eine Sache, die Sie vielleicht interessieren
D'accord. Prenez un sachet, coupez le sachet extérieur au niveau de la soudure thermique. Faites attention à ne pas abîmer le sachet intérieu
That's right, Jack, and what this - what we're planning to do in order to conserve power is we're going to run the suit compressor from an hour to this point at minus 40. And we'll be watching the PCO2; i
로저. 네, 객실 압력은 여전히 ​​5.5로 유지되고 있습니다. 출발 이후 계속 그 상태를 유지하고 있습니다. 객실 온도는 90%이고, 상대 습도는 약 
好了
D'accord. Nous avons temporairement réduit le gain sur l'OMNI et s
Mann, das Zeug verteilt
어디 보자. 미주리주 스프링필드에서, 1941년 월드시리즈에서 브루클린 다저스의 전설적인 포수이자, 삼진을 잡아내 뉴욕 양키스의 승리를 확정지은 미키 오웬은 스포츠 기록 이상의 것으로 기억되기를 바랐습니다. 그는 45명의 소년 소녀들에게 조랑말을 선물했습니다. 아이들은 그에게 조랑말을 어떻게 돌볼 것인지 편지를 보내달라는 요청을 받았습니다. 편지가 쏟아지자, 그는 이미 제공했던 20마리에 5마리를 더 추가했고, 다른 기부자들도 20마리를 더 보태주었습니다. 미키 오웬은 "45통 정도 받을 줄 알았는데, 900통이나 받았어요."라고 말했습니다. 이제 특집 기사입니다. 뉴질랜드 웰링턴에서는 오늘 남극에서 약 50명의 남성들이 전통적인 칠면조와 크랜베리 ​​소스를 곁들인 식사를 즐겼는데, 이날 크리스마스는 동양적인 분위기도 감돌았습니다. 여기에는 남극 대륙을 횡단하다 미 해군 극지 기지에 하루 동안 정박한 일본인 일행이 직접 요리한 스키야키가 포함되어 있었습니다. 캘리포니아주 샌디에이고에서는 나포된 첩보선 푸에블로호의 승무원들이 첫 급여를 샌디에이고 발보아 해군 병원 직원들에게 기부했습니다. 그들은 모두 20달러
ऑरोरा सेवन।
…ちょっと…ここにある13と20の角度です。ここ
了解。ヒューストン、アポロ
Roger, Roger. On these updates here, we didn't receive that. How about going real slow with it. Oka
حسنًا. نحن الآن بصدد تسجيل بيانات BLOCK بالإضافة إلى أربعة وأحد عشر. بيانات الأربعة التي قدمناها لكم سابقًا كافية تمامًا. لن نحتاجها، وسنقدم لكم بيانات الأحد عشر ساعة قريبًا، عند أو أثناء فحص هوائي الكسب العالي. مفهوم. في ان
— A
C'est un bon nom aussi: Sidewinder et Di
Columbia, Houston. Non cercare di inseguirlo, tieni solo qu
Ah oui, j'ai bien vu votre phare à gai
इस डॉक कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में एक दिलचस्प बात यह है कि कमांड मॉड्यूल डॉकिंग प्रोब बिल्कुल बीच में स्थित है - बल्कि डॉकिंग लाइट डिटेंट के ठीक बीच म
Eagle, Houston. You're
روجر، جيم. لديّ إجراءٌ موجزٌ أودّ أن أشرحه لكما بخصوص جهازكما. تشترك مصفوفة W الخاصة بكما في بعض مواقع الذاكرة؛ لذا، فإنّ مصفوفة W التي لديكما الآن غير مناسبة، ولا نرغب في أن تُكملا عمليات الرصد باستخدامها. الإجراء الذي سأشرحه لكما سيؤدي إلى إعادة تهيئة المصفوفة قبل دخولكما التالي. وهذا سيعيدكما إلى قيمة مصفوفة W التي قمتما بتحميلها بعد، كما تتذكران، ذلك الأمر 3303. وإذا كان لهذا أي تأثيرات أخرى على خطة الطيران، فنحن بصدد معالجة ذلك، وإذا لزم الأمر، سنرسل لكما جدول رصد مُعدَّل لاحقًا، سواءً في حالة انقطاع الاتصال أو
कोलंबिया, 
Roger. Votre RETRB est de 16+10. V
核心 03,33649；核心 04,64690；核心 65,01059；核心 66,65460；核心 07,34726；核心 08,40866；核心 09,31745；核心 10,
One definitely gets the illusion of looking way up above you at this attitude, and if there is no horizon, it's just a black sky. The amount of light in the cockpit is quite high. Once one gets adapted and it can be reduced, of course, by the cabin light. At this point, I am somewhat reluctant to reduce the light level in here, due to the problem with the suit circuit. I'm using my fingertip lights liberally. It is observed that in future flights, we
There
Roger. I was just cracking open some acorns here for breakfast. Let me put them down
कोलंबिय
いいよ
روجر. ناقص ثلاث كرا
نعم. إنها جميعها ضيقة للغاية. سأخبرك بشيء؛ سأخل
로저. 맞습니다. 5단계에서 5단계를 수행하십시오. "기본 글리콜 루프 활성화"의 1단계 1번째 줄에 "CB(16): DISPLAY - CLO
방금 남십자성, 알파 센타우리, 
... dieses Sichtfeld, es ist hauptsächlich nur Blau - ich sehe immer nur Sch
Right. We're doing that to keep our power profile where w
Хорошо. Хорошо; канцлер Западной Германии Вилли Брандт, который вч
Нет, я думаю о спуске. Вот, пожалуйста: 16 миллимет
Comm
Sigma Seven，这里是印度通信技术公司。我听得很清楚。请稍候，印度通信技术公司即将开
جيميني 4، هذا كل شيء من هيوستن. سنكون على أهبة الا
了解。これ
우리는 지금 무슨 일
Роджер. Думаю, проблема была в том, что центральный провод высох... поставлю новы
이제 시스템 현황에 대한 개요를 설명해 드릴 준비를 하고 있습니다. 모든 최종 단계를 검토하고 있으며, 향후 전망과 시스템 정보에 대해 저희가 파악한 바를 알려드리겠습니다. 그리고 조 커윈 박사께서 최신 소식
Ballon aufsteigen lassen. Der Ballon ist draußen und weg. Ich sehe ihn weit draußen, aber
Ok, vorrei procedere con il mio controllo notturno dell'imbardata
Il semblerait que l'ECM s
حسنًا. عندما يكون الجهاز
SEP、RCS/G&N、TIG 100 3
Роджер. Сп
待機。指揮官は眠
Ужасно не хочется дергать за эту штуку.
알겠습니다, 빌. 감사합니
रॉजर। लागू नहीं है, साथ ही 00202, 02356 022 02280 03 0393 310 013, ऊपर 048, दाएँ 35 - मैं दोह
Davvero una bella telecamera, non è v
Rog
알겠습니다. PYRO B 장비 준비 완료
Jim, tu amerriras à environ 900 kilomètres au sud-est des Samoa vers 8 h, heure locale. La météo est bonne: 15 h 00, mer agitée, ciel très agité, visibilité de 16 kilomètres. La mer sera agitée avec des vagues de 1,5 mètre et des vents de 15 nœuds. Tu rejoindras les Samoa en bateau et/ou en avi
Lasciamo spento il riscalda
Ce vieux cœur bat
قم بتغيير الشريط مرة أخرى فوق الرأس
11, ह्यूस्टन। वर्तमान पूर्वानुमान के अनुसार, आपके राहत क्षेत्र में मौसम अनुकूल है: 2000 फुट की ऊंचाई पर छिटपुट बादल, 70 डिग्री से 13 समुद्री मील की हवा, 10 मील की दृश्यता और समुद्र की लहरें लगभग 4 फुट ऊंची हैं। कल के पूर्वानुमान में हवाई के पूर्व में लगभग 500 से 1000 मील की दूरी पर स्थित उष्णकटिबंधीय तूफान क्लाउडिया को दिखाया गया था। कल दोपहर पृथ्वी के उपग्रहों द्वारा ली गई तस्वीरों में क्लाउडिया को कमजोर होते हुए दिखाया गया है, इसलिए अब इसका प्रभाव पहले से भी कम प्रतीत होता है। आपका राहत क्षेत्र अब अंतर-उष्णकटिबंधीय अभिसरण क्षेत्र के ठीक उत्तर में माना जा रहा है, जिसे आप शायद अपनी खिड़कियों से बाहर देखते समय देख सकते हैं। कल पश
Пока 
Хьюстон, очень интересно отметить, что когда я пинаю ногой *** здесь нет атмосферы, и есть гравитация *** они, кажется, улетают, и большинство из них имеют примерно один
好的。今天，我们需要您在按照程序进行观测之前和之后分别进行一次耳轴偏差测定。我们的目的是检查是否存在某种热效应导致六分仪角度读数出现误差。您之前测定的偏差应该被计入，也就是说，当您连续两次测量结果相差在 0.003 度以内时，请在 NOUN 87 上执行 PROCEED 操作。当然，在两次测量之间，请将耳轴移动几度。今天地球在您的视野中应该会小很多。我相信您比我们更了解这一点，但为了确保您能够准确测量恒星与地球地平线之间的角度，六分仪的 M 线（即穿过两个刻度线并垂直于 R 线
バルクサンプルエリアの特定の写真をいくつか入手するつもりですか、ニー
Roger. Je souhaiterais égale
Thank you very much. That was a very fine resume you sent in. We're right now in the process of trying to dump out the water and the UCDA's and so on and so on. S
Bene, adesso, dopo aver inserito quel gadget, siamo tornati a 0,3
Okay, After BAT 2, LOW VOLTAGE, OFF/RESET, I'll - then ON, I'll wait for 
Jetzt haben wir, mein
Non, fa
13, qui Houston. Vorremmo spegnere ancora un po', quindi
好的。我正从弗雷德的窗户往外看。我看到外面有很多粒子，但其中很多还在远离我们
ロジャー、トランクウ
好的。TM 比特率设为 LO；RANGING 设为 OFF；VOICE 设为 DOWN VOICE；主功率放大器设为关
好的，杰克。还需要几分钟
是的。这是我们
Okay. Und was Jim da jetzt in der Hand hält, ist ein Stift, den wir an einer Schnur befestigt haben – quasi ein einfacher Beschleunigungsmesser. Dieser Brennvorgang ist ziemlich kurz, und ich bin mir nicht sicher, ob der überhaupt viel aussagt. Aber wir werden 
時間相関により、コックピ
Houston, Apollo 11. Nous venons d'avoir une très bonne vue du site d'alunissage. Nous pouvons distinguer presque tous les éléments que nous avions identifié
And proceeding on. If, during the burn, the engine stops, if you have a flashing NOUN 97, you should PROCEED, then ullage, ENGINE START to PU
روجر، مايك. وتأكد من ضبط وضع المسار على الوضع التلقائي للحصول عل
Okay. Row 3, under PROPELLANT - propulsion: the STANDBY REN
حسنًا، أبولو 8. هل يمكنك إخبارنا إن كنت قد فعلت أي شيء بخصوص مياه الشرب؟ لقد لاحظنا أن قراءتنا انخفضت من 100% إلى 56% في الدقائق القليلة الماضية
わかりました。フレッド、チェックリストはこれでOKです。以上
हां।
रॉजर। 
好的。那至少
Bene. Abbiamo tre fotocamere qui, due delle quali da usare per scattare foto dalla finestra numero 5, e una da usare dalla finestra numero 5. Per p
Well, No. 2 audio to RECORD. Suit Fan No. 
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。3分半で、まだ順調ですね。打
Аврора-7, Аврора-7, Аврора-7. Это I.O.S. Com Tech 
Roger. Beautiful. We've got the load. If you'll give us and ACCEPT, we'll send you a load up. 
Sono felice 
Mer
نعم، بالتأكيد. لا تدرك مدى برودة هذا الجهاز عندما يكون في وضع التباطؤ، وقد قمتُ للتو بحساب الدورات على جهازي... والآن حوالي 11 إلى 12 دقيقة، والشمس عمودية تمامًا، لذا فهي تسطع على جرس محرك وحدة الخدمة ولا تصل إلى الم
Esatto. Lo stiamo facendo 
Роджер. До свидания, Нил. Мы скопировали до остатков. Не могли бы вы повторить остатки в корзине - и
كارنارفون، الجوزاء 4، هل توقف المطر بع
You say that you still show that the computer is 
Okay. Jack's got the one with the 250-millimeter lens on it. That's the standard EL. And I have a surface camer
Это Земля, и сегодня у нас прекрасный вид на неё. 
E si procede. Se, durante la combustione, il motore si ferma, se avete un NOUN 97 lampeggiante, dovreste P
Okay, dann legen Sie los. Wir würden den Thermomix gerne etwa 5 bis 10 Minuten laufen lassen, um die Daten d
Warten Sie, Charlie. Ja, wir werden hier mit 263 Umdrehungen pro Minute losfliegen und dann 
Joe, we had a dropout of signal there about midway or about a fifth of the start of your pad, a
Spero che ti
Gemini 4, Hou
알겠습니다. 그
待
了解しました。メンテナンスのたびに蒸気圧は0.07～0.1程度まで上昇していましたが、蒸気と水を自動に切り替えるとすぐに蒸気圧は再び下がってしまいました
はい。オーバーヘッドダンプバルブは閉じ
हम चाहेंगे कि आप उसी स्थिति में वापस आएं, पिच 010, यॉ 045; और फिर उससे बाहर आ जाए
- - 왼쪽 108:00부터 "Stop ORB rate at ORB science attitude"를 줄 바꿈합니다. - 왼쪽 열에서 "10101"과 "11111"을 줄 바꿈합니다. 10까지 내려가면서 "Stop ORB rate at track attitude"를 추가하고, 괄호 안에
В данный момент текст слабый и неразборчивый. Но я буду передавать вслепую. Пожалуйста, убедитесь, что лицевая панель закрыта и гермет
Non dirmi che questa bussola funziona? Dovrei parlare di più. Quello che ho fatto finora è stato estrarre la fonte di luce standard. A questo punto, per la capsula, per il mio viso, perché sto guardando dritto verso l'alto, la bussola sta davvero ruotand
好了，这是天津四。我将以天津四为开篇，开始一
D'acc
我很乐意在那儿
友
ठीक है। कॉपी करने से पहले, मैं इसे यहाँ पूरा पढ़कर सुना देता हूँ ताकि आपको समझ आ जाए कि हम किस बारे में बात कर रहे हैं। इस छोटे से पत्र का शीर्षक है "टीवी और फिल्म फोटोग्राफी सहसंबंध प्रयोग", और वे क्या करना चाहते हैं: टेलीफोटो लेंस वाले टीवी कैमरे को ब्रैकेट पर लगाकर, रेंडेज़वस विंडो में पृथ्वी की टीवी तस्वीर लेना, लाल और नीले फिल्टर के माध्यम से, प्रत्येक फिल्टर के लिए 1 मिनट का समय; यानी लाल और नीले फिल्टर अलग-अलग। फिर
حسنًا. يبدو الوضع جيدًا فيما يتعلق بالمواد الاستهلاكية يا جاك. أنت متقدم بحوالي 20 رطلاً عن المعدل الطبيعي حاليًا. بالنظر إلى بيانات الإنفاق والاستهلاك، فقد أنفق
Roger. This picture is drifting off center again. If you could make another correction to bring it back. I couldn't tell you which direction, but you're 
لنرى. في سبرينغفيلد، ميزوري، قرر ميكي أوين، لاعب البيسبول المخضرم لفريق بروكلين دودجرز، الذي دخل التاريخ بإسقاطه الضربة الثالثة التي قادت فريق نيويورك يانكيز للفوز على دودجرز في بطولة العالم عام 1941، أن يُخلّد اسمه بأكثر من مجرد إنجازاته الرياضية. فقد تبرع بخمسة وأربعين فتى وفتاة بمهور. طُلب من هؤلاء الصغار إرسال رسائل يخبرونه فيها كيف سيعتنون بالمهور. وعندما انهالت الرسائل، أضاف خمسة مهور إلى العشرين التي كان قد تبرع بها بالفعل؛ وتبرع آخرون بعشرين مهرًا إضافيًا. وقال ميكي أوين: "كنت أظن أنني سأتلقى حوالي 45 رسالة، لكنني انتهيت بحوالي 900 رسالة". والآن في الصفحة الرئيسية: في ويلينغتون، نيوزيلندا، جلس حوالي خمسين رجلاً لتناول الديك الرومي التقليدي مع صلصة التوت البري في القطب الجنوبي اليوم، لكن احتفالات عيد الميلاد كانت تحمل طابعًا شرق
لا. لقد ت
D'accord. C'est la révision 1
네. 저희도 그렇게 생각하고 있어요. 간단하게 보여드릴까요? 저희가 논의해 본 결과, 플랫폼을 저희 플랫폼과 정렬한 다음 전원을 끄고, 다른 플랫폼은 계속 켜둔 상태로 어떤 작업을 진행하면 될 것 같아요. 어떤 작업이든 말씀해 주시면 감사하겠습
Oui. Bon, les quatre ou cinq premières choses que j'ai sont: panneau BAT CHARGE sur OFF sur le panneau 3; AC INVERTER 2, OFF; pann
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعن
알겠습니다. 그리고 약 한 시간 후에 알려드리겠습니다. 솔로북 변경과 관련해서 준비가 되시면 언제든지 읽어보실 수 있도록 자
알겠습니다. 비행 계획 업데이트가 있는데, 시간 되실 때
Colum – Korrektur, Eagle, Houston. Wir sehen den Masterarm, Sie können drücken. Wir sehen jetzt den Press. 
REPRE
Ok, Vance. Ho messo in carica il BAT Baker; non 
Roger. Volevo solo fa
わかりました。数分以内にいただけます
Ok, grazie. Ora cambieremo un'altra bomboletta di 
هذا ما كنت أريدك أن تقوله. لقد استنفدنا زوايا التثبيت 10 و45 مع هذا، أليس كذ
फ्रेड, यह कोई बहुत ज़रूरी काम नहीं है, लेकिन अगर सब लोग अभी जाग रहे हैं, तो आप इसे कर सकते ह
好了。动起来，往
حسنًا يا جاك، سأعيد قراءة الخطوات التي أعطيتني إياها حتى ال
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 지평선이 잘 보이는 좋은 사
휴스턴 주민
D'a
자, 물병자리 여러
Visage figé, poteau de barbier. OK, sur 11, disjoncteurs DESCENT ECA et DESCENT ECA CONTROL,
Wir würden gerne wissen, ob in den letzten 24 Stunden jemand ähnliche Symptome wie Frank hatte. Wir möchten auch wissen – Sie haben uns ja neulich geraten, Marezine nach Belieben einzunehmen –, ob jemand Medikamente eingenommen hat. Anschließ
Okay. T
Roger. Les Cowboys ont été écrasés par les Browns de Cleveland hier. L'équipage de Pueblo devrait être libéré. ​​Je constate d'ailleurs que nos communications air-sol sont perturbées. Veuillez patienter; nous allons effectuer les tests de communication
D'accord. Nous recevons une connexion descendante, bien que sa qualité soit considérée c
C'est exact, Jim. C'est celui qu'on t'a donné hier soir après le gros test, et on va l'utiliser avec quelques modifications. On l'a testé dans le si
حسنًا. دعني أطرح سؤالًا. المناورات لمجموعة من زوايا رؤية القمر. حسنًا، في هذه اللحظة، سأقوم بـ، هل هذا صحيح؟
Nur zu, H
Jim, in that control mode, that sounds like the best way to go. The only thing you'll have to do is to get ATTITUDE HOLD in the, and so before you start to maneuver, you'll h
你有什么数据？……我这里
बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। ठीक है, मैं ये मात्राएँ बता देता हूँ। जब हमने शुरू किया तब GMT 1716 था। प्रणोदक की मात्रा 60 थी। केबिन का तापमान 92 डिग्री सेल्सियस था। सूट का तापमान 58 डिग्री सेल्सियस था। केबिन का दबाव 5.6 डिग्री सेल्सियस था। सूट में CO2 की मात्रा 3/4 मिलीमीटर थी। बाईं ओर की सेकेंडरी ऑक्सीजन बोतल में 5100 डिग्री सेल्सियस थी। द
极光七号，海角通信公
Dann, als ich die Flasche abfeuerte, und dann, so ziemlich alles, was danach kam … seitdem das Ganze angefangen hatte, bin ich wieder auf CMC, AUTO … zurückgegangen … und es hat mich genervt
रॉजर। सब ठीक है। आपके डी-9 प्रयोग के चौथे चरण के लिए समय बदल गया
Okay. And just a question. It would be interesting to hear from Jack to see if he thinks that main B bus is good. If he has any idea of how, if whether it's good or not, this would influence o
هذا أمر لا 
Роджер. Мы готовим для вас обновление плана полета. Мы все еще рассчитываем параметры вашего следующего включения двигателя и готовимся предоставить вам 
罗杰。听着，查理·杜克想跟你谈
Okay, Ken. Das waren die primären und sek
उन गड्ढों को एक कतार में देखो। क
罗杰。我觉得在你打电话来之前，我已经基本算清楚了。我一直在白板上画着路线图，看起来
Ok, Mike. 
了
로저. 느낌 좋아요, 전체
That's affirmative, Jim. We haven't got a picture of it yet. It's going to be in the top part of the - Correction, top part of the at the top of the - the top of detent 2 and the top part of the, and it should, in attitude, if you're right on the Sun, should split the cursor, though that roll angle is not too critical; if we're in about 10
Okay. Wechseln Sie zu FORWARD 
Roger, Amicizia Sette. Lista di controllo dell'o
हाँ, बिल्कुल; इसके बाद, आप उस पर PRO बनें, और आपको एक चमकता हुआ 0688 दिखाई देगा, और हमें लोड करना होगा। और अगर आप कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हैं, तो मेर
현재 설정으로
Oui. J'ai essayé de le lâcher au-dessus de leur station, mais sans succès. Vous pourriez peut-être leur rappeler que le ballon est touj
初步数据分析表明，中央S-II发动机的振动幅度比以往飞行中观察到的要大一些，振动大约在S-II发动机点火160秒后开始。由于这些振动，发动机燃烧室压力下降到两个低位推力传感器（即推力正常传感器）触发中央发动机关闭的水平。初步数据评估表明
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다
सत्
Bene. Sulle ultime tre file, abbiamo gli interruttori FLOOD e TRACK, riga 2, aperti; LOGIC POWER B, aperto; DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE, aperto; SUIT FLOW CONTROL, aperto. Sulla terza fila - fila, DISPLAY, aperto; 
D'accord, Apollo 8. Il est un peu tôt pour vous donner des chiffres précis sur les performances de votre système de communication. Il semble fonctionner comme prévu, et tout le reste semble aller mieux; il est donc probable que ce système fonctionne également mieux après nos prochains tests de communication. Certains autres éléments seront alors mieux opérationnels; je pourrai alors vous d
ヒューストン、今私たちの前にいる牝馬に亀裂の模様が見えますでしょ
Через несколько секунд мы переключимся с 
Okay. Looking on entry 1: the second item there is the 12-hour Kelvin cold soak, and in discussions I here and preflight, I think it is agreed that we don't want to do the cold soak there. So we are going to delete that step 2. And what it amounts to is, I think we do want to do a cold soak, and we certainly want to exercise the water boilers prior to entry in order to insure that we don't have one that is dried out, in the same manner that we had one dried out prior to. And we are working on some procedures for that, and we'll have to come back to you with those a little bit later, and we will try to do it sometime when Bill's on the line so that everybody can get in on the loop at the same time. We would like to add a step between 8 and 9, or as part of step 8. This is all on page E-1, where we turn the VHF to Simplex A at minus 4 hours and 35 minutes. Now this will be beyond two-way VHF range, but it will make sure that we do have it on at the time when we pick it up. We were able to get out to 20 000 miles with a downlink, and we are checking on the uplink signal. So if we put it on at this point, we know we have it on well in advance of any time we mi
그리고
罗杰，VIII。如果你能
네. 지금 목소리가 너무 약하게 들리네요. 산소 탱크 1 히터는 끄고, 산소 탱크 2 히터는 자동(AUTO)으로 설정하고, 산소 탱크 1과 2의 팬은 모두 끄고, 수소 탱크 1 히터는 자동(AUTO)으로 설정하고, 수소 탱크 
Roger, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Gyros einsperren und befre
Düsen, Propeller-Druckknopf zurücksetzen, Abbreche
さて、質問 2 の回答ですが、もちろん、第 2 ステージでは、5 番エ
Roger. Mike, als du vor einer 
Nous vous tiendrons informés du dernier ajustement d'altitu
了解。待機してください。5分
了解。スキップ3。SE
我换
我々が手に入れたパッドでは、我々はどん
Roger. Ces derniers jours, nous avons eu quelques orages. Il a beaucoup plu aujourd'hui, et le ciel est resté couvert. Un système orageux lent traverse la région d
Ti piacerebbe che ti suonass
11, Houston. C'est beaucoup mieux sur la carte du ciel maintenant. On di
こんにちは、カナリア、友情セ
令人困惑的是，杰克，他们告诉我等待 GO 信号后再继续操作，但实际上 BAT 2 低电压
खैर, उन्होंने कहा कि एमएससी-1 प्राप्त करने के लिए उन्हें एसीक्यू एड बीकन को 5 मिनट के लिए बंद कर
Ok, Jack. Iniziamo dall'alto. Ok. I CRYO TANKS; H2 1 segna 230 e lo stesso per 2. Il nostro CRYO TANK 1 di O2 è - sembra che si mantenga a malapena a 300. E il CRYO TANK 2 è H2 1 che segna 73, 2, 74. Sul lato O2, stiamo leggendo O2 1 alla quantità, 76; O2 fissato al massim
D'accord, Bruce. 
Roger. Die angezeigte Menge beträgt 55 Prozent, schwankt aber ständig. Ich denke, das ist mom
Eagle, qui Houston. Vediamo
Roger. Und – schick es ruhig ab. Ich – es wird dich interessieren zu hören, dass ich jetzt keinen Mond habe. Der Horizont ist von meiner jetzigen Position aus deutlich sichtbar; das ist jetzt um 00:54:44 Uhr. Ich glaube, der Horizont auf der dunklen Seite ohne Mond eignet sich sehr gut für Nick- und Rollbewegungen. Die Sterne r
C'è il rischio che
アポ
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir glauben, das Problem mit der Signalwiederansprache, das wir bei der vorherigen REV-Mission hatten, gefunden zu haben. Es scheint, als sei die Str
はい、本当に素晴らしいですね。あれほど騒がしい音がなくて嬉しいです。ジム、私が何をしたいのかお話ししましょう。先ほど言ったように、今は詳細な手順はお伝えしません。まもなく、以下の形式で手順をお伝えする予定です。まず、タイムライン、いわば飛行計画のようなものを用意します。そこには、すべての主要なイベントの時刻と、構成、スイッチ設定など、私たちの構成に特有のもの（チェックリストには記載されていないもの）が記載されます。例えば、司令船の電源投入方法などがこれに該当します。次に、もちろん、チェックリストへのレッドラインも用意します。これにより、可能な場合はチェックリストを入力して機能を実行できます。タイ
伦敦的BBC正在考虑一种特殊的无线电警报系统，以便在月球时间发生变化时
Yes. I guess it's partly because you are further out. 
يا فريد، يتزايد مستوى ثاني أكسيد الكربون لديك. إنه عند 11 على مقياسنا، ووصل إلى 15 مليمترًا، وعندها سننتقل إلى نظام الأك
Vediamo. Altrove, nell
阿波罗8号，休斯
Gemini VI, Хьюстон. Понятно. Будет ли у вас какое-либо нестандар
MAR
Хорошо, Базз. Что касается пунктов вашего плана полета, сначала несколько обновлений. Мы отменили промежуточный заход номер 6. Оставайтесь на месте. Я дам вам н
Okay, Fred. Der nächste Schritt ist ganz einfach: Stellen Sie den Schalter für di
Roger. Il LMP non si è mosso di un millimetro da quando siamo decollati. Ed è lo stesso che aveva il CMP, ancora 0,64. E ho appena dormi
حسنًا. ا
Okay. Stand by, and I'll get it out
ジェミニ4号、ジェミニ4号。こちらヒューストン。もし読めるなら、27-BRAVOの
Roger. Ich habe ein Update für deine RN minus RP für Bereich 17-1, falls du bereit bist, es
ああ、ああ、ああ。ごめ
Apollo 8, Houston. We're getting low bit
ゴダードの声、ヒューストンCOMM
C'est
没
У
OK, tout va bien, les gyrosco
. TRANSLATION CONTROL, NEUTRAL
Ро
いや、片手スナ
Ora inizio a vedere l'alba nel periscopio. La prima luce nel periscopio durante questa particolare orbita è dovuta al lato notturno. È ovvio che il periscopio non ha alcuna funzione in retroattività sul lato notturno. La prima luce che vedo è proprio ora a un'altezza di circa 100 cm. L'alba sta arrivando piuttosto rapidamente attraverso il periscopio. Ho gli oggetti illuminati che John ha menzionato, e posso crearne alcuni staccandoli. Ho decisamente la sensazione che siano un campo e che le loro dimensioni varino da piccole a luminose. Il periscopio stesso mi sta accecando. Dovrò appoggiarci la mappa, così potrò vedere fuori dal finestrino. Sono in condizioni di retroattività in qualsiasi momento, quindi non ho altro da fare che guardare fuori da questo finestrino. Supponendo che il circuito della tuta sia soddisfacente. Quella mappa è di grande aiuto per nascondere quel maledetto periscopio. Un campo piuttosto ampio di questi oggetti. È definitivamente confermato che è possibile staccarli dal portello, come ha detto Scotty. E si allontanano, non c'è sicuramente alcun problema nel giudicare che si stiano allontanando dalla capsula, a una velocità diversa dalla tua. Stanno decisamente andando più
どうぞ。ここはトランクウィ
Okay, Jack. It looks - just looking over what I ma
Nous voulons que vos enregis
B; Delta-V, 14.0; il tuo tempo di combustione, 0 più 24; imbardata 180, beccheggio 0; Nucleo 25, 001
حسناً. سيبقى هذا الجهاز قيد التشغيل لبقية الر
좋아요. 자세를 바꿔서 짐이 망원
Ну вот, у нас есть какао; должно быть хорошо. Я добавлю туда примерно 150 мл горячей воды. Это маленькие с
रॉजर, माइक। क्या आप ऑक्सीजन के प्रवाह को थोड़ा सा बढ़ाना चाहते 
Roger, we understand that. It is strictly a downlink problem and you can stay in the DOWN VOICE BACKUP mode if you want. If we get involved in conversation, I think we'll want to g
C'e
好的。我们预测，在您下一次中段飞行的预
わかってる。わかってる。でも、つ
तभी टावर गिर गया। टावर दूर से ही दिखाई दे र
아폴로 8호
Et, Fred, c'est peut-être pour ça que la communication est un peu dégradée, avec plus de bruit de fond, p
Okay. Now again down at the bottom beneath, verify tr
Okay. Kartenaktualisierung: Sonnenaufgang, Nullmeridian, Sonnenuntergang; Anmerkungen: Kontrollpunkt 1 eingenommen, Kontrollpunkt
Roger, Neil. Wir haben eine - Wenn ihr uns
了解。皆さんお時間があれば、T8からT12までのブロックデータを送ってください。以上です
로저, 마이크. 데이터에 대해 몇 가지 의견을 드리겠습니다.
Bien reçu. Un instant. Notre seule préoccupation, 11, concerne le contenu du sac de la trappe. Il y a un volume important entre vous et A8, et nou
阿波罗8号，休斯顿
Ok. È ancora affermativo. Ti faremo provare dopo aver atteso 5 sec
A Reno, in Nevada, poiché non c'è un camino in casa, un bambino ha scritto a Babbo Natale sul giornale locale e gli ha suggerito: "Per favore, potresti usare la porta d'i
Roger. Roll 002.5, pi
이 토끼 옷을 입으면 좀 더 따뜻해지는
Okay. That takes care of getting the primary water boiler enabled, 
友谊七号，友谊七号，这里是印度资本市场。你
收到。这里是友谊七号。这玩意
알았어, 잭. 혹시 물, 그러니까 비닐봉지에 든 물 남은 거 있
Vo
罗杰
ابدأ ال
Ich habe seit dem Start dasselbe Problem. Das verdammte Ding will einfach nicht in meinem Anzug bleiben. Es springt ständig raus, und dann habe ich manchmal große Schwierigkeiten, es wieder rauszubekomme
Roger. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5; 5, 4, 3, 2, 1. Wir lesen Ihnen fünfmal hintereinander vor. Sie k
Roger, Houston. E inizieremo a supera
Я знаю, Джим. Мы это прекрасно понимаем. Мы будем готовы примерно через 5 минут. Это всё
Real good, Jim. Santa Claus struck last night before I came in
Okay. That is correct. Then to reconfigure from this configuration, Jack, we wa
والي، يبدو أن كيب يعتقد أنك في حالة جيدة أيض
罗杰。好的，那我们就在第50卷
海外に目を向けると、ソウルと仁川港を結ぶ韓国初の高速道路が、貴大統領
Нет, дайте-ка я проверю, правильно ли я всё понял. Я спускаюсь к панели 275, открываю CB MAIN A, BAT BUS A и CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B. Затем спускаюсь к панели 250 и выключаю CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING и BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING, а затем на панели 5 выключаю SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN A, SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN B, BATTERY CHARGER BAT B CHARGE, BATTERY CHARGER BAT
10秒
로저. 산소 연료 전지 퍼지는 113시 30분입니다. 정상 작동 시간
Se lo si allinea a una velocità di 90 cm al secondo, con uno scarto di 10 gradi sulla piattaforma, sarebbe difficile per noi vederlo, per quanto riguarda il funzionamento Delta-V. Quindi perché non... quando arriviamo sul palco lo mettiamo in SEF per un p
Maybe you are pushing it in 
रॉजर, हम आरकेवी के ऊपर उड़ान योजना संबंधी अपडेट प्राप्त करने
जैक, ईंधन की व्यवस्था क
حسنًا. عند 147 زائ
حسناً يا فانس، أنا مستعد لنسخ التغييرات التي طر
알겠습니다. 이 점을 알려드리고 비행 계획에 어떤 영향을 미칠지 생각해 보시길 바랐습니다. 달에 대한 광각 영상과 설명을 다시 보여드리고 어떤 부분이 가장 적절할지 의견을 들어보겠습니다. 네. 프랭크는 진입 프로필이 표시되는 순서를 확인해 달라고 했습니다. 첫 번째 프로필은 "비출구 2번(Nonexit Number 2)"으로, 단거리 고속 진입 프로필입니다. 두 번째는 "3,500마일(The 3,500 Mile)"로, 역시 고속 진입 프로필이지만 장거리 진입 시 사용하게 됩니다. 세 번째 프로필은 "비출구 1번(Nonexit Entry Number 1)"이고, 그 뒤에 네 번째 3,500마일 프로필이 나옵니다. 따라서 총 네 개의 진입 프로필이 있습니다. 1번과 3번은 단거리 진입 프로필이고, 2번과 4번은 장거리 진입 프로필입니다. 콜드소크에 대해서는, 우리가 어떻게 할 건지 이야기했던 것 같은데, 대략 한 시간 안에 콜드소크 작업을 시작해야 할 것 같습니다. 12시에 바로 하고 싶지는 않
Хорошо. Думаю, сейчас са
コロンビア、こち
खैर, हम रुके और पहले मोटे तौर पर अलाइनमेंट किया, फिर बारीक अलाइनमेंट किया, औ
Che ora è 
La finitura della mappa stellare è così lucida che
هيا 
Okay. Now I've got a good star. I started it down below the air glow it kind of peters out to just about nothing, where the stars start coming out, and then they start moving into the air glow. I see a st
我们测得血压正常，但体温似乎——血压似乎维持了相当长一段时间才开始下
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। जब हम उचित रोल कोण से गुजरेंगे, तो हमारा यॉ कोण शून्य डिग्री के आसपास भी नहीं होगा। क्या आप चाहते हैं कि हम रुक जाएं और तब तक प्रयास करते रहें जब तक हम उस स्थिति में न पहु
알겠습니다. 프레드, 제 모니터를 보니 지금 달에서 16,214마일 떨어져 있고 초당 약 4,500피트의 속도로 이동하고 있
E Charlie, vorrei salutare tutti i miei compagni scout e scouter del Farragut State Park in Idaho, che questa settimana ospiteranno il National Jamboree; e l'Ap
……然后就那样
로저. 참고로, 다음 궤도 진입은 가능합니다. 케이프도 동의합니다. 4-1 역추적 시간은 끝났
ヒューストン、こちらはアポロ8号です。高利得で通信しています。聞こえま
D'accord,
Roger, Neil. Wir wollen euch nicht drängen. Wir versuchen nur, uns einen Überblick über die Wasserabflüsse und den Neusta
Cos'è quello laggiù sotto di noi
收到。它处于正常模式。自从我们
제미니 VI, 카나본 CAP C
네. 그리고 또 한 가지 변경 사항이 있는데, 그 직후에 투하 준비를 하면서 전방 배출 밸브와 상부 배출 밸브를 모두 닫아 놓습니다. 이렇게 밸브가 잠기는 상황을 방지하기 위해, 전방 배출 밸브를 닫은 후 하강 산소 밸브를 끄는 방법을 알려드리겠습니다. 이
That other aviator that's going around the world, Max Conrad with his light plane - he spent Christmas day in the Antarctics - at Puento Aranes in Chili; he's waiting for good weather so he can continue his flight down to the South Pole. He hopes to get around the world. He is going around both Poles, and he's going t
E penso che tu abbia dei dati interessanti sull'accensione dei pr
The secondary coolant loop really looked good. Looks like you had a nice tight radiator and everything else on there was working right along the performance curves. Your main oxygen regulators both filled at 104 psi during our check. Looking at the lunar orbit, expect to be doing a water boil of about 1 pound per hour, and this is just an approximation; there's quite a variety of estimates as to what the water boiling requirements may be, might go anywhere from boiling lots to not boiling at all. The next water dump will be coming up after, so you don't have to worry about any of that until you get through. Communications predictions are looking good, possibly a little bit
ありがとうございます。179 009 001、該当なし、プラス00187 32870 307 32676 42 0880 253 033、下121、左27、プラス0790 マイナス16500 129 73 36238、シリウスとリゲルを同
Die Rücksequenz wird nun angezeigt, was bedeutet, dass Sie die Zeit genau um eine Minute vorspulen können, und das
На самом деле нет,
Роджер. Хьюстон, это «Аполлон-8». Что мы делаем с отслеживанием контрольных точек — мне удалось найти точку -1 одновременно с попыткой найти точку -2 на этом обороте. Я обнаружил две ме
分かりました。了解しました。他に何かありますか、ジム、確認しましょう。ミッドコース2は約23フィート/秒で、ほぼ逆行しており、予定通りです。そして今、非常にしっかりと保持されています。参考までに、まだかなり柔らかいので、書き留める必要はありませんが、南に約8.57フィート、西に約33.9フィートの衝撃があります。これは飛行計画の値より少し西と少し南です。約77フィートプラス51フィートで、これは直前です。発射台は少し遅
-4. Хорошо, я проверю. Похоже, всё в порядке. Мог бы немного подправить. Ладно, этого мне вполне достаточно для ночных проверок рыскания, и, что касается меня, я вернусь и дам ребятам ещё немного времени. Не вижу причин расходовать слишком много топлива. А теперь я дам вам одну из этих штук за ваш
Джо, примерно на середине или пятой части начала твоей площадки произошел сбой сигнала, и Фред не смог ее поймать. 
よし、ヒューストン。少し遅れたな。我々の作戦行動は既に始まっている
Ok. Abbiamo intenzione di rimanere su un bit rate elevato. Volevamo chiederti se questo avrebbe fatto la differenza per me, e tu ci hai letto nel pensiero. Non
कुंभ राशि वालों, अभी यह कहना थोड़ा जल्दबाजी होगी कि सब कुछ कैसा चल रहा है। हम कुछ और अंक प्राप्त करना चाहेंगे, इसलिए उन्हें पढ़ते रहिए, और हम अभी भी उस सुपरक्रिट रेटिं
Ro
Bene. Puoi cambiare: elimina la Sequenza 12 e rendila Sequenza 14. Sarà su questa orbita, Orbita 58. Alle 09:40:22. Imbard
了解
E ci è stato riferito che l'uso del prope
Gut. 31816 302 
Affermativo. Assetto: rollio 0 [gradi], imbardata 2 [gradi] a destra, beccheggio --33 [gradi]. Le velocità indicano tutte zero. Sono in volo all'ora attuale. L'orologio è ancora impostato per il ritorno, per l'ora retrograda di 04 più 32 più 28. Ho l'ora retrograda corretta dalle Bermuda. La pressione in cabina si mantiene stabile a 5,7. L'aria in cabina è 90 [gradi]. L'umidità relativa è 30 [percento]. La quantità di re
Buzz, se
Ho la netta impressione, Charlie, che quella
好的，肯。近藤座加2，快速返回/62871，减161，加129，加45224，减06216，减18712 001 28 603 49118 112 038 296 地球向上010，向右37，加1475，加06400 1323 936 913，主天狼星，次参宿七129 155 010，无空隙，假设4个相同方向
알겠습니다. 지구의 모습이나 우주 공간에서의 지구의 자세는 어느 정도 파악했으니, 이제 태양이 우주 공간에서 어떻게 
Роджер. Кажется, всё в порядке. Всё выглядит хорошо. Автоматический режим заправки заполнился на 55 процентов. Пролетаю 70 000 футов, 65 000. Положение самолёта очень стабильное. Приближаюсь к 60 (тысячам). Систем
ठीक है, पायलट। मुझे लगता है कि मैं यहीं रहना पसंद करूँगा और एक छोटी नाव मेरे पास आकर, आपके कॉलर वाले तरीके से, मुझे सहारा दे और 
了解、2。分か
They're
ジェミニ4
Хорошо. Две мину
分かりました。気に入っていただいてありがとうございます。フレッド、こちらでは新しい手続きをあれこれ試していて、とても楽しいんです。現在会議中で、遅くとも土曜日か日曜日には入国手続きが完了す
ジム、あなたの話の全ては聞き取れませんでしたが、入港時の手順がいつ公開され、あなたに読み上げられるようになるのかを知りたかったのだと思います。もしそうなら、それは120時間くらいの話です。バッテリーAの充電については、他のスタッフがあなたを手伝いに来たらすぐに行いたいと思
Отлично. Четыре хороших
Hi! Jim, we - We've gone ahead and computed the coarse aline gimbal angles based on your being at the service module SEP attitude at the time that Jack cranks up the computer and - and coarse alines the. That is, we assume that you're going to be at roll, 0; pitch, 091; yaw, 0; and, if you
Quell'altro aviatore che sta facendo il giro del mondo, Max Conrad con il s
E per quanto riguarda le esposizioni, puntiamo a un ottavo di secondo, mezzo secondo. E, se pen
Может быть, вы сможете начать ра
阿波罗8号，
حسنً
好的。来自英国乔德雷尔班克天文台，美联社报道：英国乔德雷尔班克大型射电望远镜于美国东部时间今天下午5点49分停止接收来自苏联无人登月探测器“月球15号”的信号。一位发言人表示，“月球15号”飞船似乎“已经飞越月球”。另一则消息称：“我们认为它没有着陆，”天文台台长伯纳德·洛弗尔爵士的发言人说道。华盛顿合众国际社报道：副总统斯皮罗·T·阿格纽呼吁在2000年前将人类送上火星，但民主党领导人回应称，必须优先考虑地球上的需求。阿格纽是周三阿波罗11号发射时在场的最高级别政府官员，他当时说“依我之见，我们应该在本世纪末之前将人类送上火星”，显然他当时是在代表自己，而不是代表尼克松政府。德克萨斯州拉雷多，美联社报道：新拉雷多的移民官员周三宣布，除非嬉皮士洗澡理发，否则将被拒绝发放旅游签证入境墨西哥。新拉雷多墨西哥移民局局长胡贝托·卡萨拉斯表示，墨西哥城、阿卡普尔科和其他热门旅游景点的当局都收到了关于嬉皮士的投诉。合众国际社报道：尼克松总统宣布周一联邦雇员放假，以便他们能够庆祝参与阿波罗11号登月任务的全国性纪念日，这一决定最初引发了人们的惊讶。美联社伦敦记者罗德尼·比德纳报道：阿波罗11号任务让欧洲为之疯狂。整个欧洲大陆的报纸都刊登了土星五号火箭发射升空，建立地球与其天然卫星月球之间首次联系的图片。报纸的标题撰写者们绞尽脑汁，寻找合适的词语来赞美这一壮举。法国《费加罗报》宣称：“人类历史上最伟大的冒险已经开始”，该报用了四版篇幅报道了来自卡纳维拉尔角的发射消息和任务示意图。小报《巴黎日报》则宣称：“全世界都为他们喝彩！”共产党的日报《人道报》以发射照片作为头版，并在最后一版刊登了一篇热情洋溢的登
Bene. Muoviti, qui rotola a sinistra. Bene. Ora sei liber
ワシントンでは、下院歳入委員会が石油会社、銀行、公益事業に影響を与える税制改革案を承認しました。この案は連邦政府の歳入を年間約20億ドル増加させる可能性が
Я уже его загрузил. Не думаю, чт
Близнецы 4. Имейте в виду, что инструктор сейчас находится на стороне командира экипажа. Дум
Well, that's one o
罗杰。我感觉很好。上次有人告诉我温度是102华氏度（约39摄氏度）。我感觉没那么热。机舱温度是101华氏度（约38
ठीक है, बाईं ओर के हाशिये में, 105 घंटे के ठीक नीचे, "0507" और "प्लस 0500" को काट दें, और उसक
Roger. Météo: ciel couvert à 2 000 pieds, visibilité à 10 milles, mer agitée (vagues de 1 mètre). Nous n'avons pas encor
جيميني 6، هيوستن
Roger. Aspetta uno e ti procuria
Хорошо, Джек. Как я понял, LMP должен лечь спать примерно на 6 часов. В течение этого периода CDR и CMP должны попытаться перекусить. Я должен проснуться через 69 часо
あなたの時
Okay, Jack, during the TV, we were AU
Dalla finestra di destra riesco a malapena a ve
Non un caldo fastidioso, ma solo un po' caldo. Cercherò di non bere acqua finché non avrò ripreso il controllo del circ
Senden im Blindflug. Sichtverbindung. Die verstrichene Zeit am Boden beträgt laut meiner Markierung 4 Stunden, 29 Minuten und 30 Sekunden. Senden im Blindflug an Aurora Seven. Stellen Sie sicher, dass alle Tonschalter eingeschaltet sind, die Warnleuchten leuchten, die Sicherung für die manuelle Rückwärtssteuerung eingeschaltet und die Sicherung für die Rückwärtsauslösung ausgeschaltet ist. Überprüfen Sie die Frontplatte und stellen Sie sicher
يبدو الأمر حتى الآن... لكن انتظر 
좋아요
Okay. This is a 9, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 34188, minus 01353, plus 00780 180 008 001, November Alfa, plus 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, down 131, left 28, plus 0758, minus 16500 12987 36277; primary star Sirius, secondary Rigel, 129 155 010; four quads, 15 second, ullage, horizons on 1.2-degree window line at T minus 3; use high speed procedure with minus Mike Alfa. After looking at the burn information from your previous burns, it appears that the engine performance should give us a 3-second burn time, longer than what you have on the. The number should correspond with what you get out of the com
ر
R
روجر، يبدو أن قراءتك متقطعة بعض الشيء. يبدو أن مستشعر تدفق الأكسجين لدينا قد تدهورت حالته بشكل ملحوظ. لقد فحصته للتو أثناء دورة تجميع الماء الأخيرة، وبالكاد سجل قراءة - بالكاد تجاوزت 0.2. انتهى
O
저는 그렇게 생
正确的
D'accord. Il semble que le système ne puisse pas pirater la voix normale. Concernant les réservoirs cryogéniques, nous avons constaté une déstratification importante, notamment de l'oxygène, ce qui est perceptible lors des cycles de ventilation. Nous allons donc nous assurer, et nous vous le rappelons, de bien mélanger l'oxygène avant le démarrage. Le système fonctionne comme sur des roulettes. Le service G&C nous indique que les quantités sont satisfaisantes. Vous utilisez la même quantité que prévu pour votre configuration et votre alignement. Nous vous informons que vous po
嗯，我觉得最好的应该是中
자, 이제 정말 궁금한 건 80mm 필
P
네. 저게 8번 패널의 투광등입니다. 이제 5번 패널의 투광등 가변저항기를 '투광'으로 설정하고, 100번 패널의 투광등도 '고정'으로 설정하겠습니다. 이렇게 하는 이유는 A번 버스와 B
D'accord. Merci. Nous allons continuer à surveiller l'antenne à gain élevé pendan
Roger, 11. I guess in keeping th
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴
Ok. Lasciat
D'accord, Jack. Nous avons une ALARME PRINCIPALE et le voyant de la batterie clignot
Yes. It's a very beautiful and a rugged sight that w
Okay, Buzz. Zu den Punkten in deinem Flugplan, zunächst ein paar Aktualisierungen. Wir haben den Mittelkurs 6 gestrichen. Bleib einfach auf Kurs. Ich gebe dir heute Morgen etwas mehr Zeit. Zweitens: Wir sind bereit für eine BATT-B-Ladung, wann immer du sie einsetzen möchtest. Drittens: Wir hätten 
خبر محلي آخر: احترق مبنى محكمة مقاطعة هانتسفيل قبل فجر أمس، ما يشير إلى عودة أعمال البناء هناك. ثم ننتقل إلى خبر آخر عن العائلات المنتظرة. هذا التقرير بقلم آن جيمس، مراسلة صحيفة "بوست". قالت فاليري أندرس عشية عيد الميلاد، بينما كانت هي وعائلتها ينتظرون خروج أبولو 8 من مدار القمر وعودتها إلى المنزل: "نرتاح على الجانب الخلفي من القمر". كانت السيدة أندرس قد غادرت المنزل في تمام الساعة 12:00 صباحًا من يوم الثلاثاء، وقد جمع الجيران جميع الأطفال الصغار حتى تتمكن العائلة من الحصول على قسط من الراحة بينما كانت المركبة الفضائية خلف القمر ومنقطعة عن الاتصالات. زُيّن منزل العقيد فرانك بورمان بأربعة أكاليل كبيرة من أغصان دائمة الخضرة في الخارج، ورُشّ بالثلج الناعم، وزُيّن بشرائط حمراء. تنتظر شجرة في غرفة المعيشة عودته سالمًا، وتخطط زوجته الشقراء الجميلة سو وابناه فريدريك وإدوين للبقاء في المنزل لمشاهدة لحظة خروج المركبة من مدار القمر عند منتصف الليل. في العادة، يحضرون قداس منتصف الليل في كنيسة القديس كريستوفر الأسقفية. كانت الخطة للعائلة أن تبدأ في تمام الساعة 12:00 صباحًا. وبما أنه لا يوجد أطفال صغار في منزل بورمان، فإن تبادل هدايا عيد الميلاد سيؤجل ببساطة حتى عودة الكولونيل بورمان بهديته الرائعة للعطلة، وهي رحلة إلى القمر والعودة. أفادت مارلين لوفيل، الزوجة المشغولة للكابتن لوفيل، أن أطفالها الأربعة سيقضون عيد ميلاد طبيعيًا تمامًا من وجهة نظر الأطفال؛ لكن الحديث عن الهدايا كان مستحيلاً لأن اثنين منهم كانا يجلسان بجانبها. قالت السيدة لوفيل: "لم أجد حتى وقتًا لتغيير ملابسي التي ارتديتها الليلة الماضية". ومع ذلك، ستظل الهدايا بين البالغين وشجرة عيد الميلاد موجودة عندما يعود لوفيل إلى المنزل. إليكم خبرًا جيدًا على خط الأخبار. هناك رسالة قصيرة إلى محرر الأخبار. جاء في الرسالة: "كنا نعتزم مفاجأة سكان الأرض بزيارة من طبق طائر الليلة الماضية. لكننا تراجعنا بسبب تصرفات رجل سمين على زلاجة وثلاثة رجال في دلو يعمل بصاروخ يتسابقون حول القمر. هل هذه طريقة لإدارة كوكب؟" توقيع: رجال المريخ. فرانك، يبدو أن الوحيدين هنا الذين لم يُعجبوا برحلة أبولو
On dirait pre
Apollo 11, Houston. Based on our sighting since the midcourse, we're showing a gamma of minus 6.57. This is preliminary, though, and we think that after some more tracking it should come on in, and we could tweak it right on into the corridor. It's just about in the center of the corridor; everything's looking fine. We'll have you an entry PAD in a couple of hours before you go to sleep. And from our friends in public affairs, a few headlines, other than your flight. You're still dominating the news. However, there are some other things of interest for you. As I mentioned earlier, the All Star game was rained out. It's going to be played tomorrow. However, President Nixon will not be able to see it as he planned. We'll keep you posted on results. And, also, the weathermen are going to be good to you. Our forecast is, looks like it's holding good for the recovery area; it should be real
Ich werde jetzt mal das Periskop ausprobieren. Ein ziemlich ungewöhnlicher Anblick durch das Periskop. Nicht so aufregend wie durchs Fenster, das mus
अरे! एस्ट्रोस ने कल कार्ड्स को 5-2 से हरा दिया। फि
我们切换了设置——我们试图关闭我
了解しました。燃料電池のパージは予定通り行われます。その後、バッテリーAの充電もどこかで完了するはずです。バッテリーはほぼ満充電
On pouvait voir l'Amérique du Sud et l
يتأرجح PUGS. حسنًا، نح
이미 여행 중이시니 알아두시면 좋을 정보가 있습니다. 휴스턴의 점성가 루비 그레이엄은 달로 가는 여정에 모든 징후가 좋다고 말합니다. 그녀에 따르면 닐은 영리하고, 마이크는 판단력이 뛰어나며, 버즈는 복잡한 문제를 해결하는 데 능숙하다고 합니다. 또한 닐은 세상을 장밋빛으로 바라보는 경향이 있지만, 고통받거나 괴로워하는 사람들을 항상 도울 준비가
네
Hier ist Houston. Rückruf korrekt. 
オデッセイ、ヒュー
收到。我想提醒您，在您确认 Canary 的 AOS 系统正常之前，请勿
现在我要在减 5 之后立即请求 Ret
Ricevuto. Ci penso io. Lasceremo aperti quei due interruttori automatici e attiveremo il collegamento dati UP per il backup vocale; e a
全
Okay. Frank, hier ist jetzt das Licht aus. (Kein Sonnenlicht mehr.) Ich muss welches an
Correction, at 07 hours and
Roger. Amitié Sept. Acuité visuelle toujours bonne. Je peux lire les mêmes lignes q
بدأتُ الآن أرى شروق الشمس في المنظار. هذا أول ضوء يظهر في المنظار خلال هذه الدورة تحديدًا نتيجةً للجانب الليلي. من الواضح أن المنظار لا يعمل إطلاقًا في وضع الرجوع للخلف على الجانب الليلي. أول ضوء أراه الآن في وضع شبه مظلم. يشرق الشمس بسرعة كبيرة عبر المنظار. لديّ الأجسام المضيئة التي ذكرها جون، ويمكنني توليد المزيد منها بإزالتها. لديّ إحساس واضح بوجود حقل منها، تتفاوت أحجامها من صغيرة إلى ساطعة. المنظار نفسه يُعمي بصري. سأضطر إلى وضع الخريطة عليه لأتمكن من الرؤية من النافذة. أنا في وضع الرجوع للخلف في أي وقت، لذا ليس لديّ ما أفعله سوى النظر من هذه النافذة. بافتراض أن دائرة البدلة تعمل بشكل جيد. تساعد تلك الخريطة كثيرًا في إ
好的。划掉——划掉“DOWN”和“DOWN VOICE”。这样就剩下——这样就得到
Роджер. Мы тоже об этом думаем, и одна проблема в том, что COMM надежно подключен к шлангу, поэтому нам нужно как-то отсоединить кабель COMM, чтобы его подключить. Так что COMM останется здесь, внизу,
Хорошо. Я вижу, что вы только сей
Незначительно. Первые 5 сантиметров я мог забить без особых проблем, а потом, когда я забивал его изо всех сил, второй раз пришлось забивать молотком двумя руками, и я оставлял довольно заметные вмятины на верхней части удлинительного стержня, он просто не забивалс
أوه، 
알겠습
ठीक है। हमने परीक्षण का तीन-पांचवां हिस्सा पूरा कर लिया है। बाकी का हिस्सा हमें अगल
Roger. Sie erhalten während des RKV-Durchgangs auch Sprachnachrichten zu den Bergungsgebieten 9 bis 
杰克，请你检查一下25号配电盘里的两个高增益断路器。检查一下你的第二组高增益断路器和飞行总线
Roger. Danke. Die einzige Situation, die wir 
로저. 카나리아 제도까지 1분 남았습니다. 우주선 내부 상황은 모두 양호하며, 37분 후에 타나나리브 상공에서 다시 뵙겠습니다
——另一张是后面几个男孩的—
네, 짐. 지금 녹음기
Родже
ठीक है। मध्यमार्ग सुधार के संबंध में, हम इसे लगभग कुछ समय के लिए टाल
我明白这个技巧，杰克。我
알겠습니다. 아주 좋습니다. 미국 전역을 휩쓸
Roger. The only change since we went over this the last time is that 
尤里·阿列克谢耶维奇，我想提醒你，我不会说“秒”，而只会每隔大约五十秒给出一个数字，例如：50、100、
Non è vero ovunque, ma ci sono sicuramente punti in cui il mare sembra presentare una pendenza verso la riva. In altre parole, dal mare alla riva c'è una pendenza
Roger. Deke, the haze layer is very bright. I would say 8 to 10 degrees above the rea
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们还有大约4分钟。算起来是
R
أخطط لإ
了解。ここからは状況は良好で
알겠습니다. 그냥 궁금해서요. 화상에 대해 얘
로저, 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 저는 지금 180도 지점쯤에 있습니다. 제가 이동하고 있는 방향을 보고 있어요, 거스. 수신
حسنًا.
... 800
罗杰，尼尔。首先：今天一整天，来自世界各国领导人的祝贺电报源源不断地涌入白宫，祝贺阿波罗11号任务圆满成功。其中最新的包括英国首相哈罗德·威尔逊和比利时国王的电报。世界各大媒体的版面都被阿波罗11号的新闻占据。一些新闻工作者估计，今天全国各大报纸上超过60%的新闻都与你们的任务有关。《纽约时报》正如我们之前提到的，今天这期报纸的
यह तो वाकई बहुत अच्छा लग
好的，弗雷德。谢
알겠습니다. 이해
Roger. As soon as he - As soon as he gets his onboard readouts to use the powerdown procedure and shut down. I
하셀블
रॉजर आरके
然后，看起来所有明显的运动都停止了，我们可能正在接近目标。于是我调转飞船方向，试图调整平台对准
Okay. Wir haben diese Dinge schon einmal ohne Ergebnis versucht, aber ich werde sie trotzdem noch einmal durchg
Будьте готовы предоставить отч
मुझे
फ्यूल सेल पर्ज के बारे में: क्या आप ऑक्सीजन और हाइड्रोजन दोनों देखना चाहेंग
火山
まさに私が言った通りです。それはいいで
컬럼비아,
62970, -162, +129, +00966, +00552, -02079. 다음 세 개는 모두 0, NA, +00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013, 위 04.7, 오른쪽 3.9, +1418, -16505, +12904, +36160. 시리우스, 리겔, 136 310 
Okay. Er schaut sich die Batteriestromstärke an, die Sie un
ठीक है, जो, मैं अब घंटी के अंदर देख
Ok. Cercherò di fare la mia parte anch'io. Ricordi quando ho detto che non avremmo mai fatto un circui
भूविज्ञान की दृष्टि से आपको क्या लगता है, क्या यह बेस
Das hast du gu
حسنًا. صحيح. هذا جيم لوفيل. ما فكرنا في فعله اليوم هو أن نُطلعكم على لمحة بسيطة عن الحياة داخل أبولو 8. لقد عرضنا لكم مشاهد القمر، ومشاهد الأرض، وفكرنا في دعوتكم إلى منزلنا. لقد كان منزلنا لمدة أربعة أيام على الأقل كما ترون على لوحة العدادات. نُعلّم كل يوم على لوحة العدادات. لقد مرّت أربعة أيام، ونعمل على اليوم الخامس. بالطبع، نتطلع جميعًا إلى الهبوط يوم الجمعة. هنا في الجزء السفلي من المركبة الفضائية الذي نسميه حجرة المعدات السفلية، لدينا مستشار الرئيس لشؤون اللياقة البدنية، الكابتن جيم لوفيل، على وشك الخضوع لبرنامج تمارين نقوم به كل يوم. تلاحظون أنه يتحرك بحرية تامة. لقد اصطدم رأسه للتو بالبصريات، المستخدمة في ملاحتنا. إنه يستخدم جهازًا رياضيًا مصممًا للحفاظ على لياقة العضلات. من الوظائف المهمة الأخرى لمركبتنا الفضائية الحاسوب، وقد ظننت أنكم قد ترغبون في رؤية ما لدينا هنا، الشاشات التي تعرض لنا جميع المعلومات المتعلقة بعملية الاحتراق، والملاحة، وا
D'accord. Avec la lumière directe du soleil qui entre par la fenêtre, h
और फिर हम टनल वेंट वाल्व और डेल्टा-पी के बारे में बात करेंगे, जिसके बारे में पहले ही लिखा ज
알겠습니다. 찰리, 좋은 생각입니다. 해당 단
لا، لم 
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Мне интересно, использовали
ठीक है। प्रणोदक की मात्रा का माप लिया जा रहा है। बस ए
حسنًا يا جاك. يبدو أننا لا نرغب على الأرجح في تشغيل وحدة التحكم قبل ساعتين تحت الصفر. هذا لا يعني أنه لا يمكننا بدء الإجراء قبل ذلك بوقت كافٍ، لكننا لا نرغب في تشغيلها
هيوستن، ك
네. 배경 소음이 심하니 천천히 말씀해 주세요. 첫 90도 요 기동(yaw maneuver)을 완료하셨나요
아폴로 
Non
알겠습니다. 15시 44분 55초에 Guaymas 인수가 진행 중인데, 실시간 T/M을 실시간 ACQ AID 위치로 전환하라는
Das ist Friendship Seven. Meine Probleme mit der Gierbewegung scheinen sich weitgehend gebessert zu hab
뒤쪽으로. 뒤쪽으로 당
جاك، الأمر مريح للغاية. لقد أجرينا التجربة عدة مرات، وفي الواقع، يجري تشغيلها الآن مجددًا. وقد أجريناها هنا في هيوستن وفي كيب كاناف
Que veux-tu di
Хорошо, Фред. То, что я тебе расскажу, находится в конце процедуры отключения питания от соединительного кабеля командного м
收到，哥伦比亚。高增益模式下已清晰接收到您的信号。我们已启用您请求的单向中继。静海基地的机组人员正在佩戴个人联络系统（PLSS）。登陆艇驾驶员（LMP）已佩戴
- - Okay, 
La cabine se maintient 
روجر، إليوت. جيميني 6. بدأن
लगता है आपको इसे खिड़की से सटा
سكوت، أعتقد أنهم ينعكسون. سأقوم الآن، يا سكوت، بإجراء بعض اختبارات الانحراف طال
Ja, ich seh
This is Houston. R
로저. 방금 읽으신 페리신티안은 점화
र
Nein, im Ernst. Interessanterweise können wir jetzt auf der Karte sehen, dass Sie sich zwischen Guam und Hawaii und ein 
よし。チャーリー、月
好的，没错。最后几步是
ر
上
रॉजर। उस रक्त प्रयो
휴스턴 이글. 외관이 좋아 
Okay. Bezüglich der frühen Fernsehübertragung: Wir verlieren jetzt die Hochgewinnantenne, und es sieht so aus, als hätten wir die frühe Fernsehübertragung ohnehin nur über eine externe Station und deren Auswertung erreichen können. Daher verwerfen wir diese Idee und fahren mit der geplanten Fernsehübertragung fort. Die verbleibenden Kommunikationsprüfungen sind von der Hochgewinnantenne abhängig; diese verschieben w
여기는 시그마 세븐입니다.
当我从如此遥远的太空俯瞰地球时，我想我一定体会到了古代帆船上的旅行者们远航归途的心情。如今我们即将返航，我既为这段旅程感到自豪，又为能够回到家乡、回到我们的母港而感到无比欣喜。而这，就是你
Nein, ich glaube nicht, dass du es weißt; ich glaube nicht, dass du es weißt; ich
D'accord. Voici quelques détails concernant le plan de vol. Bien sûr, puisqu'il n'y a pas de -3, vous supprimerez tout ce qui concerne le palier intermédiaire 3, y compris le point mentionné à environ 54,5. Nous le reporterons à plus tard, ce que je vous indiquerai dans un instant. Ensuite, nous devons avancer la charge de la batterie de 3 heures, soit environ 54,5. Nous devons également avancer l'ouverture de la vanne de ventilation du tunnel (DELTA-P) de 3 heures. À ce moment-là, vous pouvez simplement vous rendre à l'étape 57 du plan de vol, modifier votre valeur de 57 heures à 54 heures et poursuivre à partir de là. Dans la section « Remarques », à environ 54,5, il est indiqué: « Purge de la pile à combustible O2 et vidange des eaux usées ». Si cela n'a pas été effectué plus tôt, nous vous demandons de le faire à 54 heures et 50 minutes. Le passage TV aura alors lieu à 55 heures. Vous allez passer directement à la liste de vérification d'activation. Je ne vo
EMS MODE, NORMAL
Роджер. Повторяю ещё раз, плюс 00185.
OK. POWER JETT, deux, 
Affirm. It's down to about 62
Хьюстон, Игл. Колумбия четко слышит ва
I don't thi
Роджер. Не могли бы вы дать нам время на считывание ко
フレッド、フォーカスが十分に
Впе
Nun, 25—48 ist das, was in der Ladung enthalten ist—48,3 ist das, was 
Alcune di queste piccole depressioni *** tendono ad affondare -
D'accord. L'événement aura lieu à l'heure indiquée. Nous devons manœuvrer pour adopter l'attitude suivante: roulis 101,0°, tangage 090,0°, lacet nul. Les angles de gain élevés seront le tangage -23° et le lacet 93°. Nous devons utiliser les procédures habituelles pour amortir les mouvements. Après l'amortissement et avant la mise en rotation, nous devons placer le sextant avec le magasin G, contenant un film noir et blanc très haute sensibilité. Ensuite, nous devons prendre trois photos, une à 5, 20 et 60 secondes de temps d'exposition, en utilisant l'optique automatique. Nos valeurs: R1 +34717, R2 -080
ठीक है। धन्यवाद। यह जानकर खुशी 
Das ist positiv. U
另外，通知您，您将在安提瓜岛对 Rev 34 进行 SPADA
そうですね。近づいたら、もう少し詳しくお知らせしたいと思います
OK. OK, voici une manœuvre préliminaire PC + 2. Démarrage: +0819,2, -0020,0, -0218,9; NA; +0020,9, 0848,2; 420, 274, 082; +0820,3, -0020,0, -0215,0. Commentaires. L'alimentation est de deux gicleurs pendant 10 secondes. Poids: 62 480. Poids: 33 576. V
Ладно, Джек просто... вернулся в исходное положение. И после того, как он установил а
哥伦比亚，这里是休斯顿。我们
당신의 마음을 읽을 수가 없네요. 제가 방금 당신의 섬을 지나친 것 같아
Bene. E il tuo ATTEGGIAMENTO MANUALE cambia, co
هيوستن، هل تعرضون الآن؟ - هيوستن، أبولو 8 - هل تعرضون 
روجر. بدلاً من رفع مستوى الطاقة والتحول إلى و
C'è
로저, 아폴로 8호입니
휴스턴 트랭퀼리티 기지. LOIO - LiOH 교체는 그 이
每秒
D'accord. Il ne nous reste plus qu'à envoyer vos vecteurs d'état et les charges cibles. Cela devra attendre qu
Ok. La tua 
Very goo
لديّ بعض الصور للصاروخ المعزز، ربما 17 
声音清晰响亮，阿波罗8号，我们得到
わか
Bene. Okay. Questo è tutto per il. Poi, CONTROLLO ATTEGGIAMENTO, tre, a CONTROLLO MOD
I got a RCS heater light on the dark side of
Okay. LiOH-K
네, 잭
That is affirmative, 1, /: 62844 1, correc
حسناً. واضح تماماً. 
원지점은 155.7이고 근지점은 88
Dal momento in cui inizia il ciclo primario, questo ti darà la possibilità di verificare se ha avuto la possi
Beh, è ​​stato bello parlare con te e avere tutte le notizie dal fronte 
हाशिये में, इन 
이제 시스템 현황에 대한 개요를 설명해 드릴 준비를 하고 있습니다. 모든 최종 단계를 검토하고 있으며, 향후 전망과 시스템 정보에 대해 저희가 파악한 바를 알려드리겠습니다. 그리고 조 커윈 박사께서 최신 소식을 모두 가져왔으니, 혹시 졸리지 않으시
حسناً يا جو. هل يجب أن تكون هذه العلبة قيد التشغيل الآن لأنها مثبتة بالفعل على الخ
Выглядит неплохо. 40 футов вниз, 2
فريد، أنت الآن على طبق غولدستون الكبير، وتواصلنا أفضل بكثير. هل يمكنك، إن شئت، تشغيل مفتاح B
Roger, Bill. Before you try the manual mixing, we'd like you to give it a whirl at the m
了解しました。今回の主な目的は、先ほど申し上げた通り、酸素流量トランスデューサーの点検です。しかし、キャビン
E
حسنًا، لن أتفاجأ... كل شيء يتعلق بهذه الأشياء 
Хорошо. Мы хотели бы немного понаблюд
Roger 47 [degrees
了解しました。18時から22時ですね。RKV上空のRev 12ではPLAとCLAのアップデー
D'accord. Il semble que ce soit un problème important. Nous avons remarqué que vous avez déplacé l'étoile numéro 2 à la fin de la liste, alors que nous devrions attribuer la première étoile, la 40e. Est-ce que cela a un lien avec l
Ok. Sei tu il
Ускоритель начинает маневр для позиционирования в точке. Это занимает 5 минут, поэтому он прибывает в точку, и время остается оптимальным. Ваше положение, углы 
D'accord. Je crois qu'ils ont pour in
分かりまし
Roger. For 
00:29:43，我第一次用麻省理工学院的胶片拍到了地平线照片
Прямой вытяжной кана
로저, 
Sie
9
Roger. Wir fliegen gerade, und ich habe mich schon gewunder
Le cache-œ
Loud and clear. You were coming in slightly garbled. Could you give us your fuel
Tout va bien. On a juste cassé la serrure pendant une m
Yes. We have decided to use a canister and, you know that the liquid-cooled garment has a bag around it that we think we can use, too, or that we know we can use. We've tried it. So what you have is the - a bag within a bag and inside that is the liquid-cooled garment. The bag that is closest to the li
Хорошо, Джек; Хьюстон. Опя
Okay. I don't see any loose s
Je crois que je viens de le c
ТР-5. Чт
В спорте команда «Хьюстон Ойлерз» демонстрирует большой энтузиазм на своих первых предсезонных тренировках в Керрвилле, и тренер Уолли Лемм говорит, что он впечатлен отличной группой новичков. Вчера, в четверг, в Национальной лиге бейсбола: «Сент-Луис» 11, «Филадельфия» 3; «Монреаль» 5, победа над «Питтсбургом» 4; «Атланта» 12, «Цинциннати» 2; «Сан-Франциско» 14 и «Лос-Анджелес» 13. Американская лига: «Балтимор» 3, победа над «Кливлендом» 2; «Детройт» 4 против 3 у «Вашингтона»; «Миннесота» 8 против 5 у «Чикаго». Матч «Бостон» — «Нью-Йорк» был отменен из-за дождя. А в Корби, Англия, ирландец Джон Койл выиграл чемпионат мира по поеданию овсянки, съе
Aquarius, Houston. Los g
Ma questi cappelli di Snoopy sono davvero comodi. Li abbia
أقول لكم، أنا أفضل البقاء هنا
로저. 내 생각엔 그렇게 해야 할 것 같아. 왜냐하면, 내기는 안 하겠지만, 텔레
现在，拍几张那张照片，再拍一张地球升起的照片——然后我们
... 잠금 해
わかりました。1行目の「そしてVHF-A」を消してください。2行目の「SIMPLEX動作」を消してください。3行目の「Prime」を消してください。これはPRIME POWER AMP、OFFを意味します。この「PRIME」はOFFに置き換える必要があります。これがこの行の2番目のプライムです。また、3行目の最後の「OFF」も消して「PCM」に置き換えてください。4行目は問題ありません。5行目の「VHF VOICE、ON、OFF、OFF」も消してください。次の行の「Lighting、FLOODS」は「OFF」にする必要がありますが、「またはOVERHEAD/FORWARDの場合はOFFを優先」という文言を追加してください。わかりました。ステップ2はそのままです。今のところ変更はありません。お待ちください。ステップ2はスキップしてください。実行
알겠습
双子座4号，双子座4号，RKV 约翰爵士。我们无法接收到您的血压数据。完
Oh. Die Einstellungen für das Contarex in
الوقت المخصص لـ TR هو للمنطقة 7-3، أي بعد ساعة و15 دقيقة تقريبًا من ا
Oka
حسنًا، دعني أنتظر هنا لدقيقة وأحضر...
Okay. For today, we'd like you on to make a trunnion bias determination, prior to sightings as called out in procedures, and also one afterwards. Our intent here is to check out the possibility that some sort of thermal effect may be giving you errors in the angular read-out in the sextant. The bias that you get beforehand should be incorporated, that is a PROCEED on NOUN 87 after you get two consecutive measurements equal to within 0.003 degrees. And, of course, move the trunnion off a couple of degrees between the measurements. The Earth should be a lot smaller in your field of view today. I'm, sure you're a lot more qualified to tell us about that than we are, but to ensure that you're getting a good angle measurement between the star and the Earth horizon, the sextant M-line, which is the line that runs through the two hash marks and is perpendicular to the R-line, should be parallel to the Earth horizon at the substellar point. And then the actual superimposition of the star upon the horizon can be made at any point in the field of view of the sextant: above, below, or on the M-line. We recommend the marks be made as rapidly as possible after AUTO maneuver. If you feel that the amount of time between the AUTO maneuver and the time you get ready to mark is excessive, or that you don'
Roger. Notice that you are starting on your which is the last scheduled activity. Initial tracking looks like the initial midcourse may be less than the 4 foot per second on the first guess. And we have lo
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। राष्ट्रपति के साथ विदेश मंत्री विलियम रॉजर और फ्रैंक बोरमैन भी होंगे। वे प्रशांत बलों के कमांडर एडमिरल जॉन सिडनी मैक्केन जूनियर के साथ राहत पोत के प
Stechen Sie es an, wenn es nur Luft i
13, Houston. Ti porteremo attraverso le Hawaii in 3 mi
제미니 4, 휴스턴 CAP C
Ok. Ora capisco cosa stai dicendo. Lo riferirò ai ragazzi della TV e vedrò cosa ne pensano. Oltre a quanto detto sopra, volevano scattare alcune foto della Terra con una Hasselblad attraverso la finestra di rendezvous con il filtro rosso e blu e la pellicola in bianco e nero, e poi di nuov
1A、9.5; 1B、10.0; 1-メイン、14.5; 2-メイン、8.0; 2A、4.8; 2B、5.2; メイン バスは 24.
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous commençons à distinguer très faiblement quelques cratères; l'ensemble est plutôt lumine
ठीक है। कृ
They'll have to give you AC again and you punch in your breaker -Well, let's see - I've still got HP on for the FDAIs, so you're in business now. All you need is the lamp breaker, the AC BUS A lamp breaker, tha
再说一遍
Aigle, Hous
友谊七号，这里是金丝雀CapCom
Мы подт
Tranquillità. Ricevuto. Riceviamo. Attesa 1. E, pausa, pausa, Columbia. Stiamo avendo qualche problema a far entrare la roba. Richiediamo alto guadagno, passo -20, imb
ठीक है। पंक्ति 4 के अंतर्गत: हीटर के अंतर्गत, आपके क्वाड हीटर - चारों - बंद होने चाहिए, डिस्प्ले खोलें, एस-बैंड एंटीना खोलें, सीक्वेंस कैमरा खोलें। इसके नीचे, डिस्प्ले खोलें, डीसी बस वोल्ट बंद करें, इन्वर्टर 2 खोलें, एसेन्ट ईसीए कंट्रोल और एसेन्ट ईसीए खोलें, डिसेंट ईसीए बंद करें, डिसेंट ईसीए कंट्रोल, ट्रांसलूनर बस टाई, क्रॉ
Affirmative. Votre assiette à 400 K devrait être – en pleine forme – avec un angle de 27° entre le nez et l'horizon. Et ceci serait hors de portée, ce qui sera
Wir befinden uns in der 
D'accord. Voyons si j'ai
Хорошо. Фред, я вижу 
ليس الجو
罗杰。他报告说，烟火
Х
좋아. 
D'accord. Pour une réception positive, le r
Roge
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフランク・ボーマンが同行します。彼らは太平洋軍司令官ジョン・シドニー・マケイン・ジュニア提督と共に、回収艦のブリッジから着水を見届けます。大統領はホーネット号での滞在後、アジア歴訪と予定されていたルーマニア訪問に出発します。ルナ15号は昨日、月を52周した後、「危機の海」に墜落したとみられています。ソ連の通信社TASSは、「月近傍空間における科学的」「研究」が行われたと報じました。ジョドレルバンク天文台のバーナード・ラベル卿は、ルナ15号が時速約300マイル（約480キロメートル）の速度で月面に衝突したと述べました。ベトナムでは最近、比較的静穏な状況が続いています。パトロール中の米兵が、飛行中の航空機に同調するトランジスタラジオを携帯しているのが目撃されました。ベトナムの軍のラジオ・テレビネットワークは、このミッションを全面的に報道しました。スエズ運河沿いでは、エジプトとイスラエルの間で小競り合いが依然として続いています。国連監視団は、この動きを阻止しようとしています。ワシントンでは、下院歳入委員会が、27.5%の石油枯渇許容量を20%に削減することを決議しました。ここヒューストン地域では、何度か雨が降っています。今日は曇りで、にわか雨が降る見込みです。スポーツに関しては、先ほども述べたように、オールスター ゲームが今夜開催されます。昨日は試合がありませんでした。昨夜ニューヨークで、全米野球記者協会がベーブ ルースを史上最高の野球選手に、ジョー ディマジオを現存する最高の野球選手に選びました。選手たちを称える夕食会で、フランク ボーマンが発表を行いました。ジョー ネイマス選手は、ニューヨーク ジェッツのトレーニング キャンプで丸一日を過ごしました。ブロードウェイ ジョーに触ろうとした約 500 人の子供達を 5 人の警官が制止するのに苦労しました。彼は気分は良く、ウィーブ ユーバンク コーチの許可があれば 8 月 1 日のオールスター ゲームに出場すると述べました。カービルのオイラーズのキャンプは昨日雨になりましたが、トレーニングは続行されました。軽傷者は数名いましたが、大したことはありません。ウォーリー レム コーチは、これまでのトレーニングに満足しています。オイラーズはバッファローとのプレシーズンゲームに3万人以上の観客動員を見込んでいます。ドン・メレディスの引退発表も、特にここヒューストンではファンの熱狂に水を差すことはないようです。マリオ・アンドレッティは日曜日に行われたトレントン・オートレース200マイルで優勝し、現在、全米オートクラブのポイントランキングでトップのド
Ricevuto
11번, 휴스턴. 옆 콘솔의 의료진이 보고합니다. 땃쥐는 24시간마다 자기 몸무
알
わかりました。ペルシャ湾の幅をコピーしました。直接お伝えできるのは、たった一つのデータポイントだけです。今朝、ヒューストンでは晴れてい
それで、GOです。ハンツビルからの報告によると、推進パッドの持続時間は6秒で、
네. 25-3 구역을 맞추신
बिना गियर बढ़ाए जितना मैं देख सकता हूँ, यह काफी अच्छा लग रहा है। मुझे कोई पक्का जवाब तो नहीं मिल रहा, लेकिन इसे इस तरह से ठीक करना मुश्किल है कि खिड़की से बाहर का नजारा हर समय हाथ से पकड़े बिना ज्यादा दिखाई
Questa è la Sigma Seven. Roger, per 2 Charli
Carnarvon Surgeon, is the temperatur
了
Sì. Poiché abbiamo un rollio di 270 gradi, i nostri indicatori di beccheggio e imbard
Are you 
Ok. Cap
Sì, ne abbiamo parlato molto qui. Sembra che ci stiate offrendo un ottimo c
로저, 11. 확실히 편향된 것 같습니다. 표시를 시작하기 전에 상당히 높은 임계
Avanti, o Houston, questo è Apollo 8. 3 con 2. / 45810, meno 053, più 141, più 30128, meno 00540, più 01911 180 019 001, NA più 00188 30193 255 30008 40 2742 396 033, giù 021, sinistra 18, più 088
لدي بعض البيانات الكمية لأشاركها معك. نحن على أتم الاستعداد لاستقبال إشارة التلفزيون عندما تحصل على إشارة عالية الوضوح
休斯顿，你们会复制我们的剩余收益
That's affirm. You got it, Jim, and would you turn your Quanti
Roger, et nous aimerions faire cela en mode manuel, donc à la page 17, environ aux deux tiers de la hau
Apollo 11, this is Houston. The booster has been configure
Роджер. Запасной привод запустился и работает хорошо. Я покажу т
Roger, Friendship Seven, je vérifie votre attitude de retour en orbi
ええ。ええ、もちろん、それが私たちがやろうとしていることです。そこで何が起こっているのかをきちんと把握しようとしています。もしかしたら、当初考えていたような問
Okay. That completes
Eagl
Ora imposterò i
I'm not sure that we hung around long enough to pi
Gemelli VI. 
Roger, on te passe le relais. J'ai bu une douzaine de gorgées d'eau et Jim une dizaine, je crois. On n'a encore rien mangé et on a une faim de lou
好吧。我——我今天早上有点糊
Хорошо. Кажется, я читал, что вы готовы. Я забыл... наушники. Процедура проста: нужно достать вторую пару картриджей из командного модуля, наклеить одну полоску клейкой ленты (серой) липкой стороной наружу по бокам каждого нового картриджа у верха, взять кусок картона и разрезать его на четыре квадрата размером примерно 5-7 см с каждой стороны, согнуть их под прямым углом, чтобы сформировать угловые опоры, прикрепить их к клейкой ленте так, чтобы они выступали и перекрывали старый картридж, а затем просто поставить старый картридж
D'accord, D-9. Êtes-vous prêt à c
了解。同意
Хорошо. Одно из предложений, которое звучит многообещающе, заключается в том, чтобы позволить Джиму проводить оценку через телескоп, при э
알겠습니다. BAT 5와 6 단계를 완료한 후, 3단계에서는 회로 차단기 패널 11과 16(ASCENT ECA 
Bon, on va devoir le faire à l'intéri
Roger, suit is 7.5, cabin is about 10. That'
네, 제가 그렇게 했습니다. 그리고
ठीक ह
好的——这是在调整好姿势之后。吉姆说，我现
Housquin - Houston, Tranquility. Do you have a way of showing the configuration of the engine arm circuit breaker? Over. The reason I'm asking is because the end of it appears to be broken off. I think we can push it back in again. I'm not sure we co
Хорошо. Мне просто нужно переключить OMNI. Хорошо. Читая изменения, Джо, на страницах 1-4: на
Also, I've been occasionally looking out to see if I could see stars at various sun angles, and at this particular altitude, it's very diffic
، كيب مع 1 -
Berechnungen zufolge sollten Sie den
Mes lumières au bout des doigts sont placées juste sur ma première phalange et cela me provoque une d
जैक, यह अच्छा लग रहा है। मुझे लगता है कि यहाँ से हमें सूर्य और चंद्रमा की स्थिति का पता है और यह पूरी तरह से उड़ान भरने का ही उपाय होगा। लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि हम कुछ ईंधन ब
Tentatively, midcourse correction at is zero; and i
È un cratere molto più grande e mi venga un colpo se non sembra che sia semplicemente c
हमने बहुत समय पहले उनसे पूछ
Okay, Joe. Una cosa che ho notato è che un paio di circuiti lì ora - l'impulso... - almeno il loro numero, è notevolmente diminuito, e... piuttosto male e, a quanto pare, quello sfiato aggiunt
Свет горит, хорошее настроение, бодрое. Параметры кабины: давление 1, влажность 65, температура 20, давление в отсеке 1, первый автоматич
请再说
نعم، أعتقد أن 
摄像机应该
Notre configuration actuelle est la suivante: réchauffeurs d’hydrogène: 1 en mode automatique, 2 hors tension
つまり、私たちが達成した NAV をすべて失
D'accord. Nous avons dérivé d'environ 25 degrés en tangage. Je vous demande de revenir à la position initiale et de régler l'avion à un tangage de 10 et un lacet de 45, de reprendre le contrôle et de ramener le tangage à l'impulsion minimale. Veuillez nous indiquer quand vous aurez effectué cette opération, et nous chronomé
Roger, Friendship Seven. Continue with battery volt
了解、ジェミニ4。ヒュースト
알겠습니다. 알겠습니
Хорошо. «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и в открытом космосе экипаж «Аполлона-8» только что выиграл лунную гонку; наушники были аккуратно развешаны у пультов, в надежде, что Крис Крафт скоро будет там; Фрэнк Борман уютно устроился в своей постели, а в его голове мелькали образы; Джим Ловелл на диване, а Андерс в отсеке ломали голову над экраном компьютера, когда из ниоткуда раздался такой грохот, что Фрэнк вскочил с кровати, чтобы посмотреть, что случилось. Он молниеносно полетел к секстанту, чтобы убедиться, что они не разобьются. Свет на изрезанной лунной коре придавал серой лунной пыли блеск зеленого сыра, и что же предстало его изумленным глазам? Табличка Burma Shave с надписью «Килрой был здесь». Но Фрэнк не был дураком; он довольно быстро понял, что они были первыми; это, должно быть, обман. Быстрее ракет, он обрушил на них свои проклятия, повернулся к своим морякам и обругал их. «Ловелл, Андерс, не думай, что я попадусь на старую шутку, которую ты написал на стене». Они не произнесли ни слова, но, ухмыляясь, как эльфы, смеялись над своей шуткой, несмотря ни на что. Фрэнк вскочил на свой диван, дал толчок кораблю, и все они пролетели мимо серой лунной пыли. «Счастливого Рождес
那是不可能的。我有名义
Roger. Das ist richtig, Jim. Um deine Fragen zu beantworten und einen Punkt zu korrigieren: Gierwinkel sollte dein aktueller Gierwinkel sein, egal wie hoch er ist, und das entspricht Rollwinkel 0, Nickwinkel 90 und aktuellem Gierwinkel. Außerdem hast du „deaktivieren“ gesagt und den Rest nicht gehört. Gemeint ist „
You'll have to stand by for the acceler
अच्छा। 413020 183, शाउला, नीचे 064, बाएँ 06, प्लस 0747, माइनस 16410 12988 36301; उत्तर दिशा में तारामंडल, सीरियस और रिगेल, रोल 308, पिच 209, यॉ 
Okay. „Es war die Nacht vor Weihnachten, hoch draußen im Weltraum hatte die Apollo-8-Besatzung gerade das Rennen zum Mond gewonnen. Die Headsets hingen sorgsam an den Konsolen, in der Hoffnung, dass Chris Kraft bald eintreffen würde. Frank Borman lag gemütlich in seinem Bett, während Visionen von Kilroy in seinem Kopf tanzten. Jim Lovell auf seiner Couch und Anders in der Ladebucht zerbrachen sich den Kopf über einen Computerbildschirm, als plötzlich ein solches Getöse ertönte, dass Frank aus dem Bett sprang, um nachzusehen. Blitzschnell eilte er zum Sextanten, um sicherzugehen, dass sie nicht abstürzen würden. Das Licht auf der zerklüfteten Mondoberfläche verlieh dem grauen Mondstaub einen grünen Schimmer, als seinen staunenden Augen ein Schild von Burma Shave mit der Aufschrift ‚Kilroy war hier‘ erschien.“ Doch Frank war nicht dumm; er wusste schnell, dass sie die Ersten gewesen waren; das musste ein Trick sein. Schneller als Raketen schossen seine Flüche hervor. Er wandte sich an seine Crew und beschimpfte sie. „Lovell, Anders, glaubt ja nicht, ich falle auf so einen alten Witz rein, den ihr an die Wand geschrieben habt!“ Sie sagten kein Wort, grinsten aber wie Elfen und lachten wider Willen über ihren Witz. Frank sprang auf seine Couch, gab dem Schiff e
Roger. I miei due compagni cerchera
13번, 휴스턴입니다. 지금 대형 접시 안테나 작업을 진
روجر. يبدو أنه لا توجد طريقة بطيئة لإغلاق زر الكتم على ا
Roger. Deine Stimme ist undeu
액셀을 밟으면 여기서 그 느낌을 확실히 느낄 수 있어요. 시뮬레이터보다 훨씬 
Lo leggerò quando sarai pronto a copiarlo
지금 화
Хорошо. А вот этот находится прямо перед вами, на западе. И я хочу узнать, видите ли вы угловатый камень на передн
That's exactly what he did. Tom said you had such a long day yesterday, he thought he was going to have to play some 
لقد تناولنا للتو علبة
Sì. Ne vedo uno piuttosto grande e isolato. Ce 
حسنًا يا جاك. كما قرأت، من المفترض أن ينام قائد الوحدة لمدة ست ساعات تقريبًا. خلال هذه الفترة، يجب على قائد الوحدة ومساعده محاولة تناول وجبة خفيفة. سأستيقظ في الساعة 69. ينام قائد الوحدة ومساعده في الساعة 70، ويستيقظان في الساعة 76. ويجب أن نخطط للقيام بمناوراتنا في الساعة 76 أو 78:30. في الساعة 78:30، سنقوم بتحميل الذخيرة والتوجه إلى نقطة الانطلاق. ستتم المناورة الثانية في وقت الإشعال. ثم نتناول جميعًا الطعام في ا
जिम, यह लगभग सही है। जैक उस स्थिति में कोर्स अलाइन करेगा। हम आपको इसी के लिए उस स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी करने को कह रहे हैं। हम कोर्स अलाइन गिम्बल कोणों की गणना करेंगे और उन्हें जैक को भेज देंगे, और वहाँ पहुँचने पर वह अपनी चेकलिस्ट के अनुसार सबसे पहले अपने प्लेटफ़ॉर्म को कोर्स अलाइन करेगा। फिर वह आगे बढ़ेगा, और यदि उसे तारे दिखाई नहीं देते हैं, तो हम आपको तुरंत आपके कोण भेज देंगे ताकि वह चंद्रमा-दृश्य स्थिति में आ सके, और वह चंद्रमा पर अपना काम करेगा, और फिर आपको सूर्य पर पैंतरेबाज़ी
نعم. ظننت أنك سمعت بذلك. والآن، لنعد إلى العمل؛ نحتا
ठीक है। समय यह है - कार्यक्रम इस समय होगा; और हमें निम्नलिखित स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी करनी है: रोल 101.0, पिच 090.0, यॉ पूरी तरह से शून्य। उच्च लाभ कोण पिच -23 और यॉ 93 होंगे। और हमें दरों को कम करने के लिए सामान्य प्रक्रियाओं का उपयोग करना है। दरों को कम करने के बाद और स्पिनअप से पहले, हमें मैगज़ीन G के साथ सेक्स्टेंट पर बहुत उच्च गति वाली ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म लगानी है। फिर, हमें ऑडियो-ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग करके 5, 20 और 60 सेकंड के समय एक्सपोज़र पर एक-एक करके तीन तस्वीरें लेनी हैं। हमारे मान R1 +34717, R2 -08028 और R3 +35075 हैं। इसके बाद, मैनुअल ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग करके 5, 20 और 60 सेकंड के समय एक्सपोज़र पर एक-एक करके तीन और तस्वीरें लेनी हैं। शाफ्ट 0.8 डिग्री, ट्रनियन 12.5 डिग्री। और इन तस्वीरों से पह
线控
ठीक है। हमारे पास एक प्रक्रिया तैयार है जिसे हम लगभग 2 मिनट में आपको भेज देंगे। जब आप इसे लेने के लिए पूरी तरह तैयार हों, तो हमें बता दी
Apollo 
好的。我现在用的是
阿波罗8号，休
و11، للعلم فقط، تبلغ سرعة تصحيح المسار رقم 1، في حال استخدامنا للوقود، حوالي 17 قدمًا في ا
알겠습니다. 짐, 몇 가지 말씀드리겠습니다. 첫째, 기동을 위해 를 사용할 수 있지만, 최소 추진력을 사용하면 연료를 훨씬 절약할 수 있습니다. 따라서 최소 추진력을 사용하는 것이 더 나을 것입니다. 둘째, 플러스-X 추진기를 끄기 전, 그리고 를 조작하기 전에, 그리고 모드 제어를 통해 ATT HOLD로 전환하
Roger. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, minus 061, plu
了解。二人ともハイゲインに
Роджер. И, Майк, примерно через 11 минут на 83:44 у нас будет 84:30, и перед этим — или во время, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы настроили S-диапазон для режима REACQ (сигнал с высоким коэффициентом усиления), режим NARROW (сигнал с высоким коэффициентом усиления), и давайте попробуем это, чтоб
Roger. Abbiamo recuperato con successo l'antenna ad alto guadagno. A meno che tu non abbia altro traffico con noi, credo che ti auguriamo la buonan
R
파란색 수건이네요? 제가 실수로 옮긴 건가
Yes, I
Siamo 
अभी पृथ्वी की रोशनी इतनी तेज है कि हमारी पुतलियाँ सिकुड़ रही हैं, इसलिए हम न तो कोई पृथ्वीप्रकाश द
今、サビーヌが私たちのところへ来まし
कोलंबिया, कोलंबिया, ये ह्यूस
Read you loud and clear also. We have radar track. Please rema
Хьюстон, Аполл
.
了解しまし
И, Джек, я полагаю, мы не сильно изменили свой угол обзора относительно Солнца, находящегося в 93 миллионах миль от нас, так что оно должно быть примерно в том же 
내가
わかりました、ジャック。手順は問題ありません。それから、戻って何かする必要
네, 아폴로
ह्यूस्टन, हम लैंडिंग जोन तक पहुंचने के तरीके का अध्ययन कर
Okay, Jack. Was liest du jetzt über die Winkel? Wir hatten den Mond zentriert, und das ist ziemlich genau das, was wir auf 
Wollt ihr einfach eure Radios ausschalten
Роджер. Из новостной ленты отдела по связям с общественностью: «Аполлон-11» по-прежнему доминирует в новостях по всему миру. Только четыре страны — коммунистический Китай, Северная Корея, Северный Вьетнам и Албания — еще не сообщили своим гражданам о вашем полете и высадке на Луну. Один журналист сказал, что у него закончились слова, чтобы описать ваш успех. Сегодня вечером президент Никсон планирует посмотреть бейсбольный матч всех звезд в Вашингтоне. После игры он отправится в район поиска и спасения в Тихом океане. В среду вечером он вылетит с острова Джонстон на вертолете на военно-морской корабль связи «Арлингтон». Затем в четверг утром он снова сядет в вертолет и полетит на «Хорнет» как раз вовремя, чтобы стать свидетелем вашего приводнения. Президента будут сопровождать государственный секретарь Уильям Роджерс и Фрэнк Борман. Они будут наблюдать за приводнением с мостика спасательного корабля вместе с адмиралом Джоном Сидни Маккейном-младшим, командующим Тихоокеанскими силами. После пребывания на борту «Хорнета» президент отправится в турне по Азии и запланированный визит в Румынию. Предполагается, что вчера «Луна-15» упала в Море Кризисов после 52 витков вокруг Луны. Советское информационное агентство ТАСС сообщило о проведении «научных» «исследований в окололунное пространство». Сэр Бернард Ловелл из обсерватории Джодрелл-Бэнк заявил, что «Луна-15» врезалась в поверхность Луны со скоростью около 300 миль в час. В последнее время во Вьетнаме относительно спокойно. Было замечено, что американские солдаты, патрулировавшие территорию, несли транзисторные радиоприемники, настроенные на ваш рейс. Радио- и телесеть Вооруженных сил Вьетнама обеспечила полное освещение миссии. Столкновения между египтянами и израильтянами вдоль Суэцкого канала продолжаются. Наблюдатели ООН пытаются остановить их. В Вашингтоне Комитет по бюджету и налогообложению Палаты представителей проголосовал за сокращение квоты на истощение запасов нефти с 27,5% до 20%. В районе Хьюстона несколько раз шли дожди. Сегодня облачно, ожидаются новые ливни. Что касается спорта, как мы уже упоминали, сегодня вечером состоится Матч всех звёзд. Вчера игр не было. Вчера вечером в Нью-Йорке Ассоциация бейсбольных журналистов Америки назвала Бейба Рута величайшим бейсболистом всех времён. Джо Димаджио был назван величайшим из ныне живущих бейсболистов. Фрэнк Борман сделал эти объявления на ужине в честь игроков. Джо Намат провёл полный день в тренировочном лагере «Нью-Йорк Джетс». Пяти полицейским с трудом удалось сдержать около 500 детей, которые хотели потрогать «Бродвейского Джо». Он сказал, что чувствует себя хорошо и сыграет в Матче всех звёзд 1 августа, если тренер Виб Юбэнк позволит ему. Тренировочный лагерь «Ойлерз» в Керрвилле вчера промок, но тренировки продолжались. Были незначительные травмы, но ничего слишком серьёзного. Тренер Уолли Лемм пока доволен тренировками. «Ойлерз» ожидают более 30 000 зрителей на предсезонном матче с «Баффало». По всей видимости, объявленный Доном Меред
मैं बस यह देखने आया 
Roge
Merci, Monsieur le Président. C'est un grand honneur et un privilège pour nous d'ê
Salve, Canton
わかりました。右手にピレネー山脈が見えてきて、ちょうどメシエ山とピカリング山の上空を飛んでいるところです。最初の地点は、私たちの高度から簡単に見えます。境界線に近づくにつれて、かなりコントラストが強くなってきました。視界は良好で、太陽の反射もなく、この地点の視界は良好のようです。最初の地点を見つける
Хорошо, может быть, вы и не
Schwarzweißfoto des Mondes. Mit entferntem Wetterfilter. Bild Nummer 6. Und während der Mond untergeht, versuchen wir es noch einmal mit längerer Verschlussze
A
Voici Friendship Seven. Au démarrage, il passait en mode d'orientation en lacet, ce qui désorientait les autres axes. Il a continué ainsi un certain temps, dérivant lentement vers la droite, sans correction possible jusqu'à atteindre environ 20° d'écart. Il revenait alors rapidement sur ses roues et se corrigeait de son attitude de 20° à droite, avant de repasser en mode d'orientation sur la gauche. Cela a duré un mom
알겠습니다. 프레드, 참고로 말씀드리자면, 기체 내 이산
हमें वा
了解、フランク。よし、分かった。はっきりと聞こえている。君の
Ok, abbiamo l'O
Oh ja, warum gehst du nicht – nein, du willst ja hier
Das ist richtig. Wir w
Alpha/Pc a Pc; INDICATORE VEICOLO DI LANCIO a GPI; PASSO E IMBARDATA DEL GIMBAL su AUTO; RESET TIMER EVENTO, su; AVVIO TIMER EVENTO su STOP; MINUTI E SECONDI TIMER EVENTO al centro; Valvola di VENTILAZIONE POST-ATTERRAGGIO, premere; ESTENDI/RILASCIA SONDA su OFF; Talkback ESTENDI/RILASCIA, due grigi; RETRAZIONE SONDA DI ATTRACCO, PRIMARIA e SECONDARIA, spenta; estendi LUCI DI MARCIA/LUCI EVA, spente; estendi LUCI DI MARCIA - LUCE RENDEZVOUS, spe
Roger. Il sacco di atterraggio era già spento. L'ho preso per primo e l'ho segnalato. Il retromanuale è spento e siamo a posto. È molto comodo a gravità zero. Non ho altro che ottime sensazioni. È semplicemente una sensazione molto normale 
그리고 13번, 휴스턴입니다. 마지막으로
माइक, क्या तुमने वो समय पहले ही लोड कर 
我读到的数值是12.5左右。看来是仪表出了问题……刚才主警报响了
खेल जगत की बात करें तो, चलिए देखते हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों में जब आप व्यस्त थे, तब जो नामाथ और फुटबॉल क
マイク、わかりました。もちろん、これはG&Nとクイットが一定Gで飛行しなければならない場合の話です。私たちがやろうとしているのは、一定Gの範囲を1100マイルから1500マイルに広げることです。この手順をシミュレータで実行しましたが、うまくいきました。基本的に私が手順を説明します。とにかくやってみて、何か質問があれば戻ってきてください。最大Gまでは同じ揚力ベクトルを上げ、その後揚力ベクトルを下げ、そしてgドットがゼロになるまで揚力ベクトルを調整します。わかりました。ここまでの手順は基本的に同じです。そして、V円弧の逆経過時間を通過するまでgドットをゼロに保ちます。そして、V円弧の逆経過時間を通過した後、ジンバル角を45度までロールし、その後、ドローグの逆経過時間に達するまで45度の一定バン
阿波罗 8 号，让我们回到你的最小周长加 2 上确认一下，螺距列是 101；那是第
В РЕАЛЬНОМ ВРЕ
...今ここに星が輝いてい
Okay. Ich habe hier einige Informationen für Sie. Der schlafende Pilot soll sein Visier offen lassen und die Handschuhe ausziehen. Der wache Pilot soll Helm und Handschuhe abnehmen und, wenn möglich, das leichte Headset zur Kommunikation benutzen. Bitte fahren Sie so bis etwa drei Stunden vor dem Zündvorgang fort. Sobald Sie im Orbit sind, bitten wir Sie, bei Gel
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir schlagen vor, die Fernsehübertragung zum geplanten Zeitpunkt um [Uhrzeit einfügen] zu starten und die Stoppzeit um einige Minuten zu verlängern. Der
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। अगर आपके पास एक मिनट का समय हो, तो हम आपको यहाँ सुबह की खबरें पढ़कर सुना
Eagle, Houston. La situazione è buona per i 210 in questa modalità. Passeremo la selezione dati a un'antenna parabolica da 85 piedi per vedere 
收到。大约20分钟后，开始按压故障指示灯
ये रही पानी की बंदूक। इसके सिरे पर लगा बेलनाकार हिस्सा एक फिल्टर है जिसमें कई झिल्लियां हैं: एक झिल्ली पानी को तो गुजरने देती है, लेकिन गैस को 
ठीक है,
没错。好的。下一个。模式 - 当姿态稳定后，选择“模式控制自动”。按下此键监控速率；当速率小于每秒 0.1
روجر. العودة إلى الكتلة؛ وإعادة المحاذاة: 101 36 14.07 ناقص 00758، زائد جميع الأصفار، زائد 00098 00572
حسنًا، فهمت. وأودّ إعلامك أي
Ich kann derzeit eine Rollbewegung nach rechts von etwa 5 Grad erkennen und habe bemerkt, dass das Periskop dunkel ist, was bedeutet, dass wir uns im dunklen Bereich befinden.
Kano Cap 
Affirmative. Sor
حسنًا، لا أعرف ما إذا كنا قد قطعنا 60 ميلاً أم لا، ولكن على الأقل لم نصطدم بتلك الأ
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप हमें हवा को इधर-उधर घुमाने वाली हो
And I thought I'd just take about 5 seconds here and see if I could get 000 gone, since we're fairly close
Apollo 13, da Hou
Les attitudes sont très bien contrôlées. Il semble y avoir suffisamment de carburant en commande manuelle. Je suis toujours à 72 %. Le tangage a un taux de rotation cyclique bien défini. Le lacet est assez rigide; l'accélération augmente. La capsule est très stable. Il y a un flux vert, avec des traînées orange de temps en temps. La rentrée atmosphérique se déroule très bien. Roulis lent plutôt inhabituel. L'accélération monte jusqu'à 2 g. J'ai suffisamment de carburant en commande manuelle. Je vois apparaître des étincelles. Une lueur
Jim, de Houston. Avez-vous mis de
Ok. Non abbiamo problemi. Vai avanti e usa il tuo D-9. Ora, sul punt
O
Okay. Nun, als Nächstes, bei etwa 105:05, befindet sich ein ".". Dieser sollte auf 105 verschoben werden, u
Vous pourriez nous donner l'heure du passage du 45e parallèle ouest, et nous saurons alors quand com
Ok. Sembra un'ottima idea. Inoltre, mentre aspetti che il veicolo si stabilizzi, potrebbe essere interessante t
네, 맞아요... 50도요.
Roger. Pourriez-vous demander à Buzz de vérifier si ses capteurs biomédicaux TM sont bien fixés ou desséchés? Nous obtenons un tracé électrocardiographique erratique. Il s'agirait de l'une des tro
Roger. Hear a few chuckles coming from that direction. And we do have a late report on the sports here also. The All Star game currently being played. The present score at the end of the fo
Apollo 8, Houston. We have got those numbers in a percent. We are going to switch them over to pounds, and in the meantime, we are going to be changing o
All right, Jack. One thing we'd like to have done sometime soon is to have you cycle the cryo fans in O2 tank 2 one m
罗杰，8.010 
了解。スーツの冷却水コントロールの設定を7
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, qui è Housto
Роджер, Хьюстон. +4. Вес остается тем же, минус 164 плюс 129 минус 01594 плюс все шары плюс 52885 178 155 000 NA плюс 00192 52909 627 52694 12 1037 211, центр земли вниз 063, вправо 213 плюс 1
Ricevuto. Pronti. Ho un orario di inizio per lo scarico dell'ossigeno liquido (LOX). Dovrebbe iniziare alle 5 più 03 più 07 e fermarsi alle 5 più 04 più 55. Il consumo di carburante inizia alle 5 più 37 più 47 e si ferma alle 5 più 
Trois cratères – trois cratères horizontaux que vous avez actuellement dans votre champ de vision – se trouvent immédiatement sous la trace au sol. Celui de droite est le plus
收到。这里是友谊七号。以下是三十分钟报告：头部活动没有引起任何恶心或不适感。我惊讶地发现自己可以如此近距离地看向太阳；此时阳光直射我的脸，我只需用眉毛遮挡一下即可。所有保险丝开关的状态与之前报告的左侧面板一致。模式选择正常，自动，陀螺仪正常：点火器已准备就绪，自动反推装置已关闭。除手动模式外，所有“T”型手
من الأفضل التوجه إلى هوائي إعاد
Roger. Hier sind die Zeiten für Sonnenaufgang und Sonnenuntergang. Sonnenaufgang, erste Umlaufbahn: 1 + 21 + 00. 
أيضًا، يا سبعة، ننصحك بال
Okay. There are three FLOOD circuit breakers and three NUMERIC circuit breakers and you want 
Sì, risale
D'accord. Que diriez-vous de mettre en pratique l'idée de se retourner et de laisser Jim effectuer sa polarisa
好的。把 OFF/RESET 改成
Okay; real fine. We had a good picture of Jim there for a minute. I have the lift-off plus 8 pa
I have 
Роджер. П
वे हैच बैग में हैं
Обернись, чтобы смотреть. (шепотом) Интересно, где же оно, че
辨认星星的方向有点困难
Jim, in unserem Zeitplan werden wir folgendermaßen vorgehen: Wir werden zunächst das Servicemodul JETT installieren und 
मुझे नहीं लगता कि इसमें कोई बड़ी समस्या है; ऑटो मोड में जाते ही यह अचानक से बदल जाता है। मुझे नहीं लगता कि इससे हमें प्रवेश में कोई दिक्कत होगी। मैं भी यही कर रहा हूँ; मैं अपनी प्रवेश सूची देख रहा हूँ। सबसे पहले जो चीज़ मुझे दिख रही है, वह है कोल्डसोक, और मुझे नहीं लगता कि हम आखिर
Questa è Friendship Sev
Нил, это Хьюстон
好的。23
Готовы к отчёту в 5 часов. Топливо 89-90. Кислород 56-75 (psi, в сотнях). Входное отверстие скафандра... Температура купола 70 (градусов). Температура купола кабины (настройка)... 0,8. Н
ننصحك
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Если вас это не устраивает, дай
Jack Schmitt
क
Voglio seguire la traccia... vedi quella macchia bianca lassù lun
Roger. Je faisais juste quelques enregistrements. La seule chose inhabituelle que j'ai remarquée est une couche de brume assez haute, à environ 7 ou 8 degrés au-dessus de l'horizon, côté nuit. Je peux voir les étoiles à travers, car elles descendent vers l'h
«Сигма Семь», это Мучеа. Я не ч
シグマ・セブン。こちらはハ
ロジャー、もうすぐLOSに近づきま
D'accord, Jack, il va falloir revenir en arrière si l'on veut suivre la procédur
روجر. برمودا في وضع الاستعداد. هذه فرين
روجر. لدينا حمولة SPC لإرسالها. هل يمكنك تفعي
请稍等。杰克在电话那头，他说他无
حسناً. إعدادات المحول ه
알겠습니다. 연소를 위해 유도 제어(GUIDANCE CONTROL), 모드 제어(MODE CONTROL), 자세 유지(ATT HOLD), 자세 제어(ATTITUDE CONTROL) 스위치를 조작할 겁니다. 롤 펄스(ROLL PULSE), 피치 펄스(PITCH PULSE), 요 모드 제어(YAW MODE CONTROL)로 설정하겠습니다. 피치와 롤은 수동으로 제어합니다. 엔진 짐벌(ENGINE GIMBAL)은 끄고, 추력은 10%로 설정하겠습니다. 시동과 정지는 수동으로 하고, 제어 여유 공간은 플러스-X 이동(PLUS-X TRANSLATIONAL) 버튼으로 조절합니다. 추력은 
Ti informiamo che circa un'ora fa, alle 58:10, hai superato il tempo totale di tutt
はい、食べました。ただ、食べ物がひどく崩れてしまっていて、カプセル全体にパンくずが散らばってしまうのが怖くて、もうパッケージを開けるのが嫌です。今回のフライト用にパッケージしたように、一口サイズの食べ物を食べるのは全く問題ありま
Хорошо. Хорошо. Затем из раздела "Цикл 5 кадров
لا، يبدو أنه لم يفقد إشارة وجود الأرض أبدًا. يبدو أنه كان يحاول التقاط إشارة القفل أحادي الاتجاه طوال الوقت، وكنا عادةً ما نحوم حول 2 فولت من التحكم 
О нет, у нас полно питьевой воды. Я думаю... я понят
Questa è la Terra. Ora, non so se stiamo oscillando avanti e indietro o no, Ja
Eagle, Houston
لا. في الحقيقة، لم يكن 
分かりました、ジム。まだ手順を推奨する準備が整っていないので、その件についてはお話ししたくありませんでした。アンペア数が足りないため、通常の電源チェックリストに従ってCM/に電源を入れることができません。1リングずつ予熱していただく必要があるかもしれません。現在検討中です。もう一つの可能​​性としては、その時点で電源を切って予
रॉजर। यह सही है। चरण 11 है, "यदि आपने यूटिलिटी लाइट चालू की हैं, तो उन्हें बंद कर दें," और चरण 12, जो अंतिम चरण है, है, "बिजली चालू करें, सामान्य अवलोक
Roger. Notice that you are starting on your which is the last scheduled activity. Initial tracking looks like the initial m
Ok, Houston. Qui Apollo 8. Mi correggo: William aveva 
كا
Roger. Votre orbite est modifiée aux coordonnées 87, 147. Vous êtes prêt pour un M nominal égal à 4. Il y aura un léger changement de plan. Nous vous donnerons plus d'informations ultérieurement. Nous comprenons que les te
Bene. Ecco la storia principale. Il tuo assetto sembra davvero ottimo, tranne che in rollio, e vorremmo che tu facessi quanto segue. In impulso MIN, vorremmo che tu trimmassi a zero beccheggio, che è più o meno dove ti trovi ora; a 008 gra
الآن الساعة 7:55 ونصف. أطلقتُ كاميرا كونتاكس محاولاً تصوير إعصار بيبي، لكن المحاولة لم تكن ناجحة. الإعصار نفسه ليس كث
Роджер, я понимаю, что у вас нет никаких проблем с управлением с п
Je te dis, pourqu
Now, the thing that would be nice to find out is if - h
انظر إلى 
OK. Je viens de recevoir une alarme générale et
Хорош
Roger. Wir beobachten Ihr Manöver und werden Ihnen
D'accord, Jim. Nous vous l'avons lu comme lacet, tangage et roulis, et nous aurions dû vous donner les registres 1, 2 et 3; mais nous ne l'avons pas fait. Donc, le registre 1 est à 33 000, le registre 2
Eagle - Eagle, Houston. Riceviamo. C
なあ、ガス。質問があるんだ。このD-9実験機。4番機はアポロのものか、それと
좋아요, 
コロンビア、ヒューストン。103 2
Сейчас он то переходит в режим ориентации, то выходит из него, расходуя топливо из-за рыскания. Возможно, мне придётся его повернуть, я не знаю. Хотя, похоже, сейчас он корректируется
没错。姿态：横滚0度，偏航2度（右），俯仰-33度。所有速率均为零。我目前处于工作状态。时钟仍设置为返航时间，逆行时间为04+32+28。我从百慕大收到的逆行时间正确。客舱压力稳定在5.7。客舱空气温度90华氏度。相对湿度30%。冷却剂用量68%。宇航服环境温度65华氏度。宇航服压力指示为5.8。宇航服蒸汽温度60华氏度。我感觉非常舒适。但是，我暂时不想调低温度。主氧气浓度78%；备用氧气浓度102%。主总线为2
Okay. Erstens: Der Flugplan zeigt, dass CDR abschalten sollte. Zweitens: Eine kurze Zusammenfassung Ihres Brennvorgangs. Alle Ihre Systeme scheinen in Ordnung z
收到。我正在大声朗读你的话，背景噪音很大。明白这是 OMNI Delta 还是 OMNI Bravo 吗？
आप कमान अपने हाथ में ले सकते हैं; आपको शायद इसे दोबारा इस्तेमाल करना
星が上から落ちてしまった。もう耐えられ
ठीक है। देखिए, अगर मैं अभी REACQ पर जाऊं तो कै
أعتقد أنه من الأفضل تجربة المظلة. قمتُ بإنزالها يدو
로저. 자, 이제 연소 자세가 화면에 표시될 텐데, 기본적으로 우리는 국부적인 수평 역행 연소를 찾고 있습니다. 즉, 수평선을 지구의 뿔에 맞추고 X축이 태양 방향이 되도록 돌리면 연소 자세가 됩니다. 태양이 2번 위치에 있는지 확인하면 상단 커서 바로 위에 있을 겁니다. 잠시 후 더 자세히 설명해 드리겠습니다. 준비되셨으면 3
Ok, va bene. Ora probabilmente ci sono un paio di centimetri di sacchetto in eccesso che spuntano dal fondo del contenitore. Per evitare che si attacchi al filtro inferiore, ti consigliamo di tagliarlo con le forbici e, una volta fatto, di tagliare altre due strisce di nastro adesivo lunghe circa 30 cm, di tagliarle e strapparle nel senso della lunghezza pe
Apollo 11, Houston. Das Weiße Team verabschiedet sich zum letzten Mal. Wir sind morgen früh wieder weg. Es war uns eine Freude, mit euch zusammenzuarbeiten. Eure Leistung war großartig. Vie
아니요, 제 생각에는 당신이 하고 있는 일은 단지 당신이 올바른 별들을
Bis jetzt funktioniert alles gut, Charlie. Wir haben einen an der Wasserpistole und den anderen am
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 बाद में 42 होगा. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-1 84 बाद में 56 होगा. 2+20. 1
Ricevuto. La posizione predef
Хорошо, Фред. Теперь вы здесь хорошо слышите. Хорошо. Мы готовим для вас процедуру проверки положения на Солнце примерно через 74 часа или чуть более чем через 3 часа. Это будет фиксация 2; вскоре мы подготовим подробную процедуру, которая будет включать в себя переназначение радара сближения, чтобы убрать его с пути, и маневр для изменения ориентации. Мы считаем, что если проверка пройдет в пределах 1 градуса, ваша платформа будет готова к включению двигателя без последующего включения. Если же она не пройдет в пределах 1 градуса, мы разрабатываем процедуру выравнивания по Земле и Солнцу, чтобы выровнять платформу, и мы предоставим вам ее позже. Хорошо. Предполагая, что проверка положения на Солнце пройдет успешно, мы выставим вам звездочку для проверки уверенности на обратной стороне, когда вы будете в темноте. Мы обнов
أراهن على ذلك. إذا لم يكن لديك ما تفعله، فلديّ رسمان بيانيان في جدولك أحتاج إلى تزويدك ببعض الأرقام المحد
Okay. Ich kann Sie gut und deutlich verstehen, und meine Spracheinstellungen sind auf normale Sprachqualität eingestellt. Falls Sie irgendwelche Änd
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Kano. Sobald ihr bereit seid, möchten wir euren Statusbericht. Wir haben euch gut verstanden
روجر. بطاريات المحول كلها جيدة، وتبقى عند 24، أما الب
Roger, verstanden, System grün. Danke. Sie sehen 
ロジャー、こちらはコマンドパイロットですか
Okay, now. Jack, let's go over this once more. You wanted me to try out control of the spacecraft in the PULSE mo
रॉजर, जेमिनी 4 यहाँ। CSQ, मैं आपकी बात साफ़-साफ़ सुन पा रहा हूँ। क्या आप मेरा कंप्यूटर चालू करवाना चाहते 
Bon, ce ne sont
Nave dell'Oceano Indiano, questa 
11، هيوستن. المسح الضوئي بالكاميرا يجعل الصو
Okay, Jack. We've got 14 cartridges that'll last 157 hours, plus we've got the primary cartridge with 23 hours, and we've got two cartridges with 7 hours
روجر. توقعنا ذلك. لهذا السبب طلبنا منك تشغيل المر
不，抱歉。我这边事情太多，没时间陪你
わかりました。これは本当に素晴らしい写真ですね。これまでで最高の写真です。では、この光に合わせて調整できる方法をもう少し考えてみ
Роджер. С «Иглом» у нас всё в порядке. Мы достаточно уверены в его местоположении. Однако возможно, что самолёт измени
Okay. It says maneuver in ATT HOLD for Moon view attitude un
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。收到。我有一些更新，包括5月6日的地图更新和6日的更新。您想先
نعم. عند هذه النقطة
罗杰。MIDPAC入口PAD：359 153 001 194 46 03 267，正负1102，负17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 0028，DL和VL NA，4 
Роджер.
Okay. Hearing 
Roger, Houston. A
わかりました。それでは、皆さんにお伝えしたい情報がかなりあります。眠っているパイロットは、
또한 TV 테스트와 관련해서 말씀드리자면, TV와는 별개로, 지난번 TV를 촬영했던 것과 같은 시간대 또는 비슷한 거리에서 지구의 적색, 청색, 편광 사진을 촬영하는 것만으로도 작동 방식을 상
روجر. هذه فريندشيب سفن. نظام التحكم يعمل بشكل م
D'accord. Votre radiateur secondaire est à environ 70 degrés (72 degrés); la sortie du radiateur est à environ 30 degrés; la température d'évaporation du glycol est d'environ 65 degrés; la pression de vapeur est au maximum, la pression de refoulement du glycol est d'environ 9 psi. Les combinaisons de l'accumulateur secondaire sont à environ 52 degrés; la cabine est à environ 58 degrés; les pressions sont les suivantes: combinaison à 4,1, cabine à 5. La pression partielle de CO2 est légèrement supérieure à 1, environ 1,1. Sur le côté de la maison, la température est de 72 degrés, l'hélium est à 3500; N2 A est à 2300; N2 B à environ 2450. Le carburant est à environ 165; les deux piles à combustible 1 sont fermées, elles sont à zéro; la température de la peau est de 405 degrés; les gaz d'échappement des condensats sont sur une échelle inférieure. Pile à combustible 2: actuellement, le débit d'O2 ou d'H2 est compris entre 0,13 et 0,14. Le débit d'O2 est actuellement à son maximum, bien qu'il varie en fonction de l'activité des propulseurs, ce qui a également entraîné une chute de tension sur le
Quello che potrebbe essere successo è che Jim potrebbe aver aperto la valvol
Roger. Eagle. Nous sommes d'accord. Veuillez vous tenir prêt pour les réglages d'angle de cardan. Par ailleurs, Eagle, tant que l'alimentation directe en oxygène du module de commande est a
11号，休斯顿。我
Le serrature della bandiera sono controllate. *** le serrature sono control
I definitely can see a right roll at this time of about 5 degrees, and I noticed the periscope is dark, meaning we are coming into the dark side. I will attempt to look for the changes through the periscope for any observations. At this time, I can see nothing through the periscope for night observation, at least in this attitude. I'm not even sure when I have low mag, other than the position of the lever. The window is cloudy. I have sunlight on it now and it definitely has been clouded over by the escape tower rocket, n
네, 창문 1
وأيضًا يا كين، سنقوم بتش
Roger. Die Spanne um 20 Uhr – bei unserem GET von 21:50:00 plus 22,24. Die Spanne um 22:00:00 plus 00 betrug 17,63. Die Spanne um 22:12:00 betrug 18,33. Die Spa
لا، بالتأكيد لا أستطيع، لكنني أعتقد أن الأمر قد غيّر وضعنا - لقد غيّر وضعنا. دعني
Ав
Okay, vielleicht doch nicht. Übrigens, es sind noch weniger
D'accord. 
没错。那就
Игл, Колумби
我用纸巾的量减少了。我还怀念以前不能…
Roger, Jim. Le matin de Noël était un peu calme chez vous, dit Marilyn. Elle a ajouté qu'ils étaient tous ravis que la mis
Molto bene, Jim. Babbo Natale ha colpito ieri sera prima che 
لا،... خبز محمص عادي... ه
और, कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। आपके लिए भी यही नियम लागू होता है।
私のピッチはあなたの -3 [度] に対して
لدينا بعض النتائج بخصوص نجمتك الأولى، إذا كنت ترغب في سماعها. أ
Houston, Apollo 11. Comment interprétez
١١، لديك جمهور كبير جدًا. يُبثّ مباشرةً في الولايات المتحدة، وسيُبثّ أيضًا في اليابان، وأوروبا ال
Eh bien, c'est partiellement vrai, Bruce. Nous avons ces deux filtres à hydrogène qui fonctionnent parfaitement tant qu'on ne les branche pas à un sac de nourriture. Mais l'entrée du sac génère une contre-pression suffisante pour que les filtres commencent à perdre en efficacité. À plusieurs reprises, j'ai été tenté de les sécher, mais nous avons constaté qu'en les laissant simplement reposer quelques heures,
È uscito qui. L'ho preso. Okay. Ora, se ti stai sistemando, ti d
分かりました、ジャック。それによると、LMPは約6時間睡眠をとることになっています。その間、CDRとC
我想评估一下一个
ジム、すぐに適切な姿勢をお伝えします。その姿勢に向かって機動している間は
了解。現在、与圧作業を進めており、CSMの圧力均等化装置を使ってデカールの指示に従って作業を進めています。ステップ13まで進み、キャビン圧力が5、あるいはほぼ5になるのを待ってから、REPRESSパッケージO2バルブをFILLに回します。5ではなく、
Ricevuto. Il vapore della tuta è di 69 gradi e la cabina è di +11. La temperatura è scesa mo
Полагаю, они выполнили 
好的。BAT C 37，PYRO BAT A 37，PYRO BAT B 37，A 97%，B 97%，C 96%，D 
अरे सुनो, यहाँ हमें मुफ्त में पानी तभी मिला है जब हमने उस मूत्र प्रणा
Gemini 
アポロ11号、ヒュース
Ha! Ha! Ha! What are we 
Quelles sont les valeurs de pr
ビル、了解。4.に搭載状態ベクトルを使うことについては、最後にもう一度触れておきたいと思います。地上でもう少し検討した後、彼らは「」の作成と計算に着手しなければなりません。後回しにしたり、二度やり直したりするよりも、これまでずっと使ってきた手順で進めていくつもりです。月軌道については、検討を重ねており、ジャック・シュミットをはじめとする数人が裏で作業して、窓がどのような影響を与えるかを調べています。基本的に、2.に影響を与える選択肢は2つあるようです。1つは、もちろん、あなたとジムが席を交換して、ジムが外を見てSAMを撃つようにすることです。もう1つは、機体を横転させて、ジムが光学装置をできるだけ前方に向け、SAMを望
현재 요각은 대략 0도입니다 - 마크 T. 확인해 보겠습니다 - 왼쪽으로 약 4도 정도입니다. 피치를 수정하고 있습니다. 요
Roger. Sigma Seven. Reading
Хорошо. Это касается пролёта и перицинфического периода, а также обновления данных за 2-часовой период. Мы также хотели бы получить актуальный отчёт о состоянии всех ваших окон. Мы пытаемся разработать альтернативные планы использования центрального лю
ठीक है, माइक, मैं यहाँ सही पोजीशन लेने की कोशिश करता हूँ, और फिर तुम कर लोगे
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, hier spricht PCS Com Tech, PCS Com Tech. Lesen
كين، هناك عاملان يؤثران على تدفق الحرارة في مبادل حرارة البدلة. أولهما أننا لا نستخدم التبريد المسبق، وثانيهما أننا نوقف تشغيل الدائرة الثانوية قبل ذلك.
11, Хьюстон. У нас хороший обзор из окна места встречи — точнее, из верхнего окна. Но мы не видим, чтобы кто-то смотрел на нас в от
Hey, die Temperatur in deiner Kabine ist um 10° gesunken, sei
Okay, Jack. What I just gave you now on the backout is the only thing that's order critical. From here on, you can go to the steps for initiating the procedure, and backtrack. In other words, you 
चा
わかりました。
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. مفهوم. كان احتراقك في الوقت المحدد، 11 ثانية؛ VGX كان +0.2، VGY كان -1.8، VGZ -0.2، C -9.4، الأوج
ठीक है। मूलतः, यह सही है। चलिए, मैं इसे संक्षेप में समझा देता हूँ, फिर मैं आपको चरण बताऊँगा। मुझे लगता है कि इससे आपको बेहतर समझ आएगा। योजना यह है कि आप कुछ ऐसे कोण पर उड़ सकते हैं जो आपके ऑप्टिक्स को चंद्रमा की ओर इंगित करेंगे। अब, किसी भी समय, किसी भी स्थिति में, यदि आप दूरबीन में देखकर तारों के पैटर्न को पर्याप्त रूप से पहचान सकते हैं और आपको लगता है कि आप स्वयं संरेखण कर सकते हैं, तो हम यहीं रुकना चाहेंगे और आपको अपना संरेखण स्वयं करने देंगे। हालाँकि, हम आपको एक ऐसी प्रक्रिया बता रहे हैं जिससे आप दूरबीन में उन चीजों को देख सकेंगे जिन्हें आप बिना किसी परावर्तन या ऐसी किसी भी चीज की चिंता किए देख सकते हैं, और यह आवश्यक नहीं है कि इस प्रक्रिया का पालन तब तक किया जाए जब तक आपको यह पता न चल जाए कि दूरबीन में तारों के पैटर्न स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई दे रहे हैं। यदि आपको आगे बढ़ना है, तो हम पैंतरेबाज़ी करेंगे, चंद्रमा पर एक नज़र डालेंगे, वहाँ एक निश
로저. 11, /: 45597, 0 - 수정 - 마이너스 0.40, 플러스 1.57, 플러스 36325, 마이너스 0.1727, 플러스 0.1428 180 0.03 0.00, 노벰버 알파, 플러스 0.0186 36394 323 36186 42 0.
रॉजर, सूट का तापमान 70 डि
Was Ihre Wasserversorgung angeht, Jack, werden wir hier in den nächsten Stunden einen ziemlich guten Hack durchführen, und wir gehen davon aus, dass Sie Ihre Tanks selbst befüllen können, bevor wir umziehen, sodass Sie diesbezüglich in einer recht guten Lage sein
Итак, после активаци
Это «Дружба номер семь». Я чувствую себя прекрасно; никаких последств
我收到的回复只有一句：我们准备好复制了吗？我们
Ils sont tous les deux ouve
अपोलो 8, ह्य
Roger. Nous allons
11, Houston. Invieremo il comando ON da qui sotto, ve
9番の件についてお答えします。S-IIの5番のランプが点灯した頃だったと思います。そして、通
र
Apollo 8, wir haben mit Ihrem Standardobjektiv das aufgenommen
Роджер. Хорошо вас понял, всё чётко и ясно. — У меня ещё осталось около 3 г заряда. Капсула работает очень хорошо. Команда Rate держится дов
收到。指示灯工作正常。我不太确定我离它有多远。我估计大概在半英里左右。助推器在我们离开时开始翻滚。我开始降低升力，降到了看起来每秒四分之一度左右，但
好的。这是很有用的信
, minus 29837, plus 02390, plus 00994 000 200 005 01693, plus 00600 29949 402 29782 010 689 260, Persei Zeta, runter 048, l
罗杰，弗兰克。原因是
로저입니다. 스위스 원,
Roger. Par simple curiosité pour Bill, nous pouvons dire quelques mots sur les résistances chauffantes des cuves cryogéniques, ainsi que sur les ventilateurs. Nous avons constaté que les résistances fonctionnent normalement, s'allumant et s'éteignant par cycles. Au fil du temps, la fréquence de ces cycles augmente, ce qui indique une lég
Où so
Das ist negativ. Die vierte 
了解しました。視界も通信も非常に良好ですので、今は走査望遠鏡を見ずに口頭で説明させていただきます。アークトゥルスへの操作角度は非常に良好でした。走査望遠鏡の中心にアークトゥルスを配置しました。この太陽角度では、走査望遠鏡の中心を真横切る光軸と光の帯があります。そのため、周囲の多くの星は見えません。しばらくの間望遠鏡に目を釘付けにしていましたが、星の模様などを見るのは非常に困難です。アークトゥルスでは、光学系が私をそこに導いてくれない限り、それを認識できませんでした。今
हम कैमरों को बाईं ओर वाले खाने के डिब्
Nun, jetzt hast du dafür gesorgt,
Роджер. Зона 11-DELTA ΔT ноль. GMTRC 01 день 07 48 58. RET 400 K, 15+26. Зона 12-DE
Okay. Sie haben die Bestätigung erhalten. Dies ist der ak
Okay. This is very close to ignition point for power descent. Ju
Was ist
Okay. Plus 0858, minus 16500 12960 36195; nördliches Sternenpaar Sirius und Rigel, Rollwinkel 129, Nickwinkel 155, Gierwinkel 010, Tankinhalt
حسنًا يا جاك، دعنا نتحدث عن كيفية الوصول إلى الوضعية المطلوبة ثم تنفيذ عملية الاحتراق. ما أقصده هو تقنيات التحكم. يبدو الآن أنني سأحاول إيقاف المركبة الفضائية في وضع الانعراج مع توجيه الأرض من نافذتي، ثم سنكون في وضع التوجيه أو التحكم؛ سنكون في وضع التحكم في الانعراج. بعد ذلك، سنستخدم نظام التحكم للتحكم في الميل ثم الدوران. لا أرى طريقة أخرى للتحكم في هذا المزيج دون استخدام نظام التحكم. سنستخدمه أيضًا أثناء احتراق المحرك. هل توافقون على هذه الت
Ricevuto, Deke. Sono in mo
١١، هيوستن. برنامجكم يُبث الآن إلى الولايات المتحدة. سنُجهز القمر الصناعي. سيتم بثه إلى بعض الدول الأخ
로저. 블록 및 DOI로 돌아가기: 101:36:14.07; -0075.8, 모든 0 더하기, 0009.8 더하기; 
Роджер, я вас прекрасно понимаю. Теперь я хотел бы, чтобы вы выполнили маневр "глаза вверх". Предлагаю использовать импульсный режим. Используйте минимальное количество топлива. Во время маневра выполните еще одну голосовую проверку при входе в атмос
11, Houston. On aperçoit le poteau de barbier à al
Okay. Apollo 11 remains the prime story with the world awaiting your landing today at about 11 49 a.m. Houston time. In W
我们认为可能是这样，杰克。我们认为可能是 15 到 20 秒，我
ह्यूस्टन, मैं जिम बोल रहा हूँ। फ्रेड जब से चंद्र मॉड्यूल में है
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। रॉजर। हमें समझ आ गया। और, ईगल, लगता है कि सबसे अच्छा एंटीना आगे की तरफ होगा। और,
Ici Friendship Seven. Le rou
알겠습
C'è stata una leggera correzione dell'imbar
ठीक है। यहाँ हमें कुछ संचार जाँच करनी है। हम पाँच अलग-अलग मोड में स्विच करेंगे, और उनमें से केवल एक 
Penso che abbia messo a fuoco un p
А как насчет Мин
Roger. Compris. On va d'abord essayer à Antarès. On a déjà essayé la dernière fois, mais je n'ai pu prendre qu'une seule photo avant de perdre complètement la lune dans la brume blanche. Je vais réessayer, et si ça ne marche pas
Ich glaube nicht, dass das ein großes Problem ist; es springt einfach, wenn man in den Automatikmodus geht. Ich denke nicht, dass es 
जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, वैंस, लगभग आधे घंटे पहले, जैक और मैं अंतरिक्ष यान की कुछ खास स्थितियों में तारामंडल नहीं देख पा रहे थे। हम वृश्चिक और धनु तारामंडल देख पा रहे थे, और अल्टेयर, एक्रक्स, अल्फा सेंटुरी, वेगा जैसे विशाल तारे भी देख
——但我能看到事发地点
알겠습니다. BAT Baker 충전 절차는 다음과 같습니다. 패널 3: BAT CHARGE, OFF; 패널 5: MAIN BUS TIE, BAT 
فريندشيب سفن، فريندشيب سفن، هذا قائد سفينة أتلانتيك، قسم الاتصالات التقنية. كيف تقرأ؟
C'est exact. Fermez les noirs e
Okay, Jim. We are still gathering our thoughts on the, but some of the considerations go tells us that we can do that correction probably as late as 118 hours, with no significant DELTA-V penalty, and with plenty of tracking thereafter to make sure that we've done the right thing, and to set you up for a late if we need it, which we probably wouldn't. We are happy w
حسنًا، هذا يبدو جيدًا. أعتقد أنه إذا كان لدينا المزيد من الوقت، فسنرغب في القيام بذلك على أكم
Okay
罗杰，尼尔。我们只是想要一个叙述方式，这样——当我们回放时，
كولومبيا، هذه هيوستن. نعرض 
रॉजर। बर्न 3 47 37 का गेट; डेल्टा-वी, 42.9; बर्न समय, 54 सेकंड; यॉ 0, पिच-डाउन 3 डिग्री; कोर 25, 00429; कोर 26, 00023; कोर 27, ज़ीरो; थ्रस्टर्स, पीछे की ओर; पैंतरेबाज
जैक, यह बहु
يُطلب منا القيام بأعمال التنظيف، وتخزين الخوذات وحقائب التخزين؛ وإخراج المرآة وقائمة التحقق ومجموعة التخلص. ثم تخزين مجموعة التخزين المؤقتة، وإخراجها وتهيئتها للاستخدام مع عدسة 16 ملم، HC-EX، f/4، 500، لانهائي، 6 إطارات في الثانية. هذا كل ما هو مذكور في تلك الصفحة. هذا هو وضعنا الحالي. الخطوة التالية ستكون ب
アポロ
Attends une minute. Tu
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 왼쪽 소파 밑에 누가 있습니까? 아니면 수위 조절 패
Ok. Ho ricevuto tutti i tuoi readback tranne il valore per trunni
Okay; real fine. Now there's probably a couple of inches of excess bag sticking our around the bottom of the canister. To prevent this from sucking in against the bottom screen, we'd like you to trim it off with the scissors, and when you've done that, we'd like you to cut two more strips of tape about 12 inches long or so, cut the - tear them lengthwise to get four pieces 12 inches long and 1/2-inch wide, and then use those four strips to secure the bag by passing the strips from the sides of the canister outside the bag around the bottom of th
وأنا أنتظر قراءة مقياس الارتفاع. كيب، هل تسمعني الآن؟ مقياس الارتفاع قد ارتفع. 100 قدم، م
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。首先，我们希望后侧的废水排放量降至10%。其次，目前看来我们不需要更换飞机，所以我们不会上传新的飞机。第三，我希望你们所有的低温加热器都设置为自动模式，并且我们
D'accord, c'est ça… Roger. Ça comprend à la fois les chiffres sur le programme lui-même, et les petits mots comme PROGRAMME, VERBE, NOM, ACTIVITÉ INFORMATIQUE, ce genre de 
नहीं, जैक। मैं पुनः प्रवेश के समय सामान रखने के बारे में सोच र
Wir bemerkten das altbekannte Pulsieren in den Anzügen, als wir das RECIRC-System vollständig geschlossen und die Dämpfer beider 
罗杰。我们希望您切换到适配器模式并给我们一个简短的计
Okay, TVC S
Понял. Внимательно проверьте за
We would
了
Demandez également votre vol DELTA-P, qui
Apollo 8, Houston. On a reçu une bonn
Das ist ja wohl klar! Dem stimme ich voll und ganz zu. Die Ereignisse waren nichts Neues für uns, weder in der Vergangenheit noch in der Vergangenheit, für die wir keine Abläufe entwickelt hatten. Die Maßnahmen, die wir ergriffen haben, haben sich heute meiner Meinung nach sehr ausgezahlt. Ich bin sehr dankbar für all die Schulungen, die wir absolviert haben, und für die gu
La tensione è 39,3, gli ampere
E la signora Robert Goddard ha detto oggi che suo marito sarebbe stato felicissimo. "Non avrebbe urlato né niente. Sarebbe semplicemente stato raggiante." Ha aggiunto: "Quello era il suo sogno, m
Ok, Skipper. Abbiamo trovato un modo per tenerti al caldo. Abbiamo deciso di iniziare a darti energia ora, e quello che vogliamo che tu faccia... quello che vogliamo che tu faccia è 
At 
Роджер. Система управления по про
लक्ष्य रेटिकल के ठीक पिच पर और आधा डिग्री दाईं ओर था,
О, нас только что 
Roger. Sache que j'ai une belle vue sur les îles hawa
هيا
Yes, and I sure wish
罗杰。那是阴影左侧 13 度。下一个问题与你在第一部分附近采集的散装样品的深度有关，
好的。关于中途修正，我们想把它推迟到大约……，这次的加力燃烧速度大约是每秒25英尺。之所以推迟加力燃烧，是为了让您在分离阶段增
好了，格斯。我想跟约翰谈谈这件事。他一直在等着呢。看来我们以后会经常遇到这
Non particolarmente. Mi riposo e basta, ho dormito a int
Роджер. Понимаете, мы получим обновленную информацию о плане полетов над Штатами. Похоже, в это время у нас там будет довольно 
Роджер. Хочу напомнить, что пров
Хорошо. 6
Questo è Gemelli 
Okay. Very good, 
Cristo. Dammi i numeri, 1
2. Wir sind genau hier. Das hat uns ganz nah herangeführt, genau da,... gen
Wir nähe
Да, сэр. Это карта. Каждый сгиб обозначен буквами в нижнем или верхнем правом углу, если двигаться с востока на запад, а схемы обозначены буквами D, E и F, и все сольные партии будут обозначены буквами D и E, и они меняются при смене плоскости 1. Имен
Эй, если хочешь использовать 250-й? Там есть прекрасный снимок Циолковского, который у на
और अगर आपको वह मिल जाए, तो कृपया उसका पता लगाएं 
هذا صحيح. هذا ما هو مضبوط عل
Roger. Die Batterien des Adapters sind alle in Ordnung, sie stehen bei 24 Volt. Die Hauptbatterien – einen Moment, die Batterien des Adap
아주 좋습니
Roger. La TV si sta rompendo. Bene. Siamo tornati con una buona immagine. Sembra che abbiamo troppa luce. La nostra definizione è piuttosto 
Nous lisons 90
分かりました。もう一つ、停電が始まる時間を覚えておいてください。停電は05G頃です。チェックリストの都合の良い場所に書き込んでおいてください。通信が途絶えたら、電源とPMPの電源をオフにします。これは通信
حسنًا. أعتقد أنه يمكننا تبديل الكاميرات، والتقاط بعض الصور من مكتب الأرصاد الجوية إن أمكن. التقط الصور المتبقية - هذه الصور، ولكن بحذر. هذه هي A 10، وA 11 قادمة، مع وجود سحابة 
ठीक है। बस पुष्टि कर रह
ジェミニ4、ヒューストンC
MANETTE DE TRADUCTION armée. Armez votre MANETTE ROTATIVE. La mienne est déjà armée. D'accor
ठीक है। इसमें लगभग 10 चर
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 인디언 캡 콤입니다. 신호가 끊겼다 연결됐다 하네요. 연료 위치를 다시 한번 말
...
ジ
본초 자오선을 지나서 끊었군요. 알겠는데, 완전히 이해
Collegare l'imbracatura per le spalle e la
ठीक है। कुछ मिनटों में फिर से हमसे बात
Je n'ai jamais pu mesurer le biais de l'accéléromètre sur la plateforme. J'étais constamment en mouvement, incapable de la stabiliser durablement. On a dû rater quelqu
Понял. Из-за меньшей нагрузки при выключенном радаре сбли
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。パーセントで数値を取得しました。ポンドに切り替えます。その間に
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 다음으로, 다음 카메라 - 대기 1. 여기 노이즈가 있네요. 좋습니다. 다음 카메라는 16mm 렌즈를 사용할 예정이며, 이 사진들은 우선순위 3으로 분류됩니다. 좋습니다. 먼저 A-8에서 16mm 렌즈와 배터리 팩을 가져오세요. 10mm 렌즈를 분리하고, B-3에서 18mm 렌즈를 가져와 카메라에 장착하세요. 전원 케이블을 연결하고, 프레임 속도를 초당 12프레임으로 설정하세요. 이전에 알려드렸던 데이터 라인은 이번에는 다음과 같이 입력하세요. /DAC/18/CEX, 배터리(f:8, 1/250초). 좋습니다. 이제 이 두 카메라를 보면, 처음 2분 30초 동안은 16mm 렌즈를 사용하고 그 후 70mm 
看来 B 没能完全搞定；我马上
Примерно 5,3. Сейчас перейду на O2 High Ra
シグマ・セブン、こちらはケープ・キャップ・コムです。ジョン卿へのメッセージは受け取れませんでした
Okay, down in the middle of the page on line 9, we're just going to strike out the "Ac
感觉你有点
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. Thirty-minute report follows: Head movements cause no nausea or no bad feelings at all. I am surprised that I can look as close to the sun as I can; the sun is shining directly on my face at present time, and all I have to do is to shade my eyes with my eyebrow. All fuse switches are still as previously reported on left panel. Mode Select is normal, auto, gyro normal: Squib is armed, Auto Retrojettison is off. All "T" handles are in except manual and I have it pu
好的。根据你提供的向量，地面计算出的中程速度为每秒 15.3 英尺，VEI 为 36221，伽马值为 -6.51，所以你的程序看起来相当不错。然而，将你的解应用到​​我们的向量上，我们得到的伽马值
الانحراف ج
एक्वेरियस, सेट को डिलीट करें, गिम्बल/थ्रॉटल टेस्ट करें। बस यह सुनिश्चित करें कि DECA POWER और DEC
Tranquility Base, Houston. Wir haben die Checkliste geprüft, und die einzige Änderung, die wir für den Fortschritt gefunden haben, ist, dass Sie den Lithiumhydroxid-Wechsel erst nach dem [Datum einfügen] und nicht davor durchführe
Okay. I think we got those. We wil
فوق أفريقيا الآن. التقطتُ للتو الصورة رقم 56 بكاميرا هاسيلبلاد. كانت معلمًا طوبوغرافيًا. بدا وكأنه بركان قديم في يوم من الأيام
그 사람들이 어디 있는지 아세요? 저는 
——这些螺丝或
Où as-tu mis le livre? Où as-tu mis le premier? Ici? D
罗杰。立管里充满了液体。液体已经到达立管外侧一半的高度——形成了一个相当大的弯月面，倾斜角度大约为 60 度。
Les changements ne sont pas très
D'accord. J'ai déjà relevé la température du dôme. Elle est montée à environ 82 degrés. Je l'ai ramenée à 81 degrés. La température à l'entrée de la combinaison est montée à 80 degrés. Je l'ai ramenée à 78 degrés. Je suis rev
Roger, Jack. Nous demandons 
Танк SUPERCRIT в
1, G&N: 62710, plus 098, minus 019, Zündung 075 49 4965, minus 28897, minus 03944, minus 00686. Rol
휴스턴, 컬럼비아. 다시 말씀드리지만, 그를 볼 수 없었습니다. 자동 광학 장치가 당신이 알려
好的。先提供一些信息。我们正在制定一套操作流程，以便您使用指令舱的氢氧化锂罐连接到您的软管——也就是出口软管，这样随着任务的进行，您就可以持续净化大气。这需要改装一个套件，以便您将软管连接到氢氧化锂罐上。所以，我们会在某个时候把这套操作流程发给您。第二点——第二点，
아니요. 캐리어가 떨어지자마자, 그쪽 방향으로 표류하다가 거기에 머물렀습니다. 그러다가 다시 올라왔을 때는 한동안 주변을 맴돌았지만 더 이상 벗어나
- - unser Sinkflug 2. Okay. Ic
很好。这是12月23日出版的《星际时报》，保罗·哈尼风格。我们想告诉您，距离圣诞节购物季只剩两天了。他说您昨天的电视直播非常受欢迎。米奇·赫斯科维茨在《邮报》身兼两职。除了其他体育专栏外，他还写了两篇关于您发射的文章。吉姆，你妈妈肯定很喜欢那份生日祝福。昨天，21名囚犯从新奥尔良的一所监狱越狱。约翰逊总统昨晚从贝塞斯达海军医院出院回家，此前他患了流感。他给你
我们正在密切关注用水情况，目前来看，情况似乎倾向于保持某些设备开启，而关闭其他设备，但稍后会有更多消息通知您。我们建
Und Buzz, wir erhalten immer noch keine Daten von Ihrem EKG. Es sieht so aus, als könnten wir nur dann welche erhalten, wenn Sie bei Gelegenheit Ihre EKG-Elektroden austauschen würden. Das sind die mittleren Elektroden, die mit dem blauen Pin verbunden sind; eine Er
나는 맨눈으로 호주와 중국 본토를 볼 수 있지만, 한반도를 보려면 단안경이 필요했
Roger. And then up to the left hand side, or towards the north, we can see the light waters 
مرحباً يا كيب. الصداقة
रॉजर। हम सहमत हैं। हम बस यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते थे कि आ
Okay. If we don't have a midcourse-3, then we'll probably move FAM up to 55 hours, in which case we'll g
좋아요
Aurora Seven, ici Indian Cap Com. Je n'ai pas entendu l'intégralité de votre transmission, mais la partie que j'ai écoutée étai
चलो... बस
Bene. Con il nuovo atteggiamento, gli angoli del nostro albero e del perno con cui lo avremmo superato no
Oui. Bon. Cinq membres d'équipage ont péri hier soir à la base aérienne de Walker lo
ممتاز. كلما اتجهت جنوبًا نحو الداخل، أرى المزيد من الأضواء. هناك نمطان، بل أرب
Und 11, Houston. Das Wetter i
Okay. G
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Wir haben den Kontakt über die Funkverbindung verloren, ungefähr zu dem Zeit
알겠습니다. 냉각수에 담그는 과정이 정말 필요한 건가요? 저희는 보조 EVAP 밸브를 점검하기 전에, 그리
Хорошо. Теперь, 13, прошу вас либо убрать его подальше от ярк
Roger. Pour le sommeil, nous avons chacun eu deux périodes de repos; Frank est dans sa troisième en ce moment. Bill a dormi 6 heures la dernière fois; moi, 4 heures. Pas mal pour nous deux. Frank a dormi 5 heures la dernière fois, pas mal non plus. Et Frank, bien 
알겠습니다. 제 생각엔... 네. 우리가 창문을 열고 나가는 걸 보면 우리 창문 상태가 얼마나 
여기는 프렌드십 세븐호입니다. 3시 42분입니다. 요하네스버그 상공을 거의 지나고 있는 것 같습니다. 이 고개에서는 남부 아프리
Ich glaube, das Einzige, was mir noch fehlt, ist die Einlasstemperatur
バズ、まだ心電図のデータが
حسناً. سأفعل. اختفى نجم كانوبوس للتو من على الشاشة، وربما عندما يتوفر لدينا بعض الوقت هنا، سأحاول إجراء 
11, Houston. For your information, those two entries are an update to your D
Там написано, что
제미니 
Okay. At the bottom of the 
Sono uscito - sono uscito dal seminato; torniamo indietro e lasciamo che Buzz se ne occupi. Sei solo un po' troppo avanti
Roger. Die Kontrollprüfungen sind abgeschlossen und die Checkliste für die Einfügung ist e
了解しました。消耗品の更新は46プラス00です。マイナス5.5%、マイナス6.5%、マイナス2.5%、マイナス7.5%、マイナス5.0%、水素マイナス2ポ
收到。没错。事实上，我们根本
지금은 모두 괜찮아요. 아무 문제 없어
Verdammt, das muss ein Blitz gewesen sein. Oder 
Say again 44 dash 2. Say again ∆V. Then retro command
ठीक है। हमने सभी से राय ली। हमें ज्यादा जानकारी नहीं है, लेकिन आपके उपभोग्य तत्व अच्छे दिख रहे है
lights are glowing, feeling fine, buoyant mood. Parameters of cab
Oui. Je vais probablement devoir le
Oh, attendez une minute. Ça devrait être -, patiente
我们差不多可以
Ok, Jim. Noi... Abbiamo parlato
Pendant que vous êtes au téléphone, sachez que nos calculs indiquent que vous pourriez bientôt manquer d'eau potable. De plus, il est possible que des fuites d'hydrogène se produisent au niveau de votre réservoir. J'ai une question: la prochaine fois que Jack observera le système au sextant et au télescope, nous aimerions qu'il nous montre l'optique. Avez-vous remarqué 
そして二次蒸発装
حسنًا
वैसे तो मैं उनसे घर लौटने के बारे में बहस करना चाहता हूँ, लेकिन मुझे नहीं पता कि हम यह कैसे
6.3, मैं फिर 
好的，那就太好了。下次，我们会格外仔细地检查所有参数；我们会为你准备好一切。我们会利用最后的方法对所有系统进行一次彻底
Небольшая задержка, 
Did it
Aquarius, Houston
Woomera, eine
わかりました。13. 燃料電池1と
罗杰。所有适配器电池的电流读数均为 2 
रॉजर, स्कॉट। मैं ड्रिफ्टिंग मोड में हूँ, लेकिन मैंने एयर कंडीशनिंग बस चालू कर दी है। यह बहुत अच्छे से काम कर रही है। मैं बीकन बाद में चालू करूँगा। कंट्रोल मोड फ्लाई-बाय-वायर चुना गया है, हालाँकि मैं अभी इसे नियंत्रित नहीं कर रहा हूँ। ऑटो स्विच ऑटो पर है, 
让我看看。在其他国内新闻方面，新婚夫妇大卫·艾森豪威尔和朱莉·艾森豪威尔结束了他们的秘密蜜月之旅，与候任总统尼克松及其家人共进圣诞晚餐。在纽约市，由于持续五天的码头工人罢
Beh, è ​​come ho detto prima. Non possiamo trovare con certezza la Terra. 
네. 이건 분명 당신이 가장 
On n'a aucun programme prêt à l'emploi… C'est la seule solution. Il faut faire un VERB 66, puis entrer les chif
少し遅れてる。10秒も遅れてる…その
Не могу этого
最後の5
Gemini 4, это Гавайи передают данные вслепую. Рыскание — 0°, тангаж — 60°, немного правее вас, курс вверх, 300 морских миль. Повторяю еще раз. Вслепую, Гавай
オーケー。3Gを検知しています。今回は再突入時のダンピングチェックをパスする必要があるようです。現在4Gを検知しています。再突入は順調のようです。補助ダンピングが対応しているようです。あまり揺れているようには見えま
你
Das ist bestätigt. Und di
아직 그 단계는 아닙니다. 대략 25도에서 30도 정도 된 것 같습니다. 지금 요잉(yaw)을 멈추고 있습니다. 잠망경으로 창과 조준선을 확인하고, 잠시 후 표시를 해서 모든 회전 속도를 멈추도록 하겠습니다. 이제 거의 후퇴 자세에 도달했고, 요잉은 아주 깨끗해 보입니다. 잠시 후퇴해서 확인해 보겠습니
没错。你完成了多少次运行，以及你在阿波罗D-9计
L'ultima 
좋아요. 우리가 가기 전에 왼쪽으로 10까지 돌려주세요
Okay. Certo. Vorremmo che accendessi la ventola nel serbatoio di O2 numero 2, Buzz. E, 11, hai... calibrato le o
Veillez à ce que je ne fasse p
はい。経過を観察していま
Freedom Seven, C
पैक प्राइमरी O2 
Okay, das ist richtig. Ich muss Ihnen jetzt noch ein paar Punkte geben, die Sie auf dieser Kurve einzeichnen sollen. Die
Bene. E i nostri ragazzi qui sotto stanno guardando il programma di puntamento dell'antenna ad alto guadagno, quindi ogni volta che non lo usi per altro, vorrebbero guardarlo per 
Je préférerais 
로저. 다운링크에 있는 명사 49번을 복사하셨나요? 시간이 충분하시면 다음 단계로 진행
I can't think of 
Roger
Ici Apollo 8, en direct de la Lune. Nous avons dû changer de caméra. Nous vous avons d'abord montré la Terre, que nous observons depuis 16 heures. Nous
알겠습니다. 프레드, 잘 알겠습니다. 이산화탄소 수치는 또 0.1이 나왔
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 지금 우리는 -5+05입니다. 잭, 사령선은 이 정보를 참고용으로만 사용하고 있습니다. 이것은 지구 종단면 정렬을 위한 것이며, 5+05 시점에 지구 궤도선을 분리할 것입니다. 이 과정은 체크리스트에 포함되어 있으며, 이 교신
أبولو 13، هي
حسنًا... على هذا... المتجه. حسنًا، R1 زائد 45498... حسنًا، زائد 190... زائد 08256. حسنًا، الآن نعرض الرموز البريدية... حسنًا. اضغط إدخ
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अब उसी क्षेत्र को ऊपर से देखने पर ऐसा लगता है कि यह पृथ्वी की रोशनी को प्रतिबिंबित कर रहा है। मुझे पक्का नहीं पता कि इसे लगभग शून्य कलाय पर सेट किया गया था या नहीं - खैर, कम से कम क्रेटर की एक दीवार बाकी दीवारों से ज़्यादा रोशन दिखती है, और अगर हम पृथ्वी के साथ सही दिशा में हैं, तो वह दीवार लगभग शून्य कलाय पर लगती है। वह क्षेत्र निश्चित रूप से इस खिड़की से दिखाई देने वाली किसी भी चीज़ से ज़्यादा चमकीला है। मुझे पक्का नहीं 
Загорелся
Понял. Мы рассчитываем отключить питание примерно через 2,5 часа после начала включения, то есть за 2,5 часа до этого. Это не точная цифра, и мы будем держать вас в курсе. Что касается перехода в режим JETT, это совершенно допустимо, как только у вас будет включенный командн
Родж
Okay. Was wir jetzt tun we
水尝起来没问题，一切正常。我们现在觉得睡在沙发
Roger, 11. Il problema iniziale, all'avvio, è stato che non siamo riusciti a caricare l'assetto iniziale desiderato
أورورا سبعة، أو
ここからの射程距離は抜群です。テレビがまだついていたらよかったのに。茶
مهما حاولت وضع هذه العدسات العينية البصر
Всё, что вам нужно, — это ретро-питание. 
了解しました。CB BAT A、POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDINGを続けて開き、INVERTER POWER 2、MAIN Bをオープンします。その後は、手順を入力するときに行った手順を逆に実行
Хорошо. Два выключателя — два автоматических выключателя на панели 250 — снова разомкнуты; два автоматических выключателя на панели 275 — снова разомкн
Roger. Könnten 
Rog, compris. Je
그리고 물막이 커튼 설치, 목 보호대 설치, 객실 공기 재순환 손잡이 위로 올리기. 왼쪽 스노클 손잡이 위로 올리기, 객실 환풍구 손잡이 위로 올리기. 해치 해제 트리거는 멀리 두기. 방수 씰이 아래로 내려가서 닫혔는지 확
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. Thirty-minute report continues. Cabin pressure is 5.6 and holding. Cabin temperature is 95 [degrees] and dropping slowly. The relative humidity is 20 [percent], coolant quantity is 67 [percent], and suit environment temperature is 68 [degrees], pressure is 5.8. Steam temperature is 47 [degrees], and I'm tur
حسنًا. نودّ إطلاعكم على خطتنا. نحن في 
Roger. Lesen Sie zurück 8-C. ΔV 166. 3+35. 01 02 06 51. Sagen Sie die letz
조명(LIGHTING) 항목 아래; 투광 조명(FLOOD), 열림; 트랙(TRACK), 열림. ED 로직 - 수정(ED LOGIC - Correction) 항목 아래, ED: 로직(LED: LOGIC), 열림. 하강 엔진 오버라이드(DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE), 열림. 슈트 흐름 제어(SUIT FLOW CONTROL) 항목 아래, 열림. 3번째 줄, 통신(COMM): 디스플레이(DISPLAY), 열림; VHF A 송신기(VHF A TRANSMITTER), 열림; VHF B 수신기
, Guaymas. Stand by for a
Oh, stiamo facendo il punto su quanto abbiamo lì, magari potremmo anche pensare di razionarne una parte. Voglio dire, giusto per assicurarci di averne abbastanza per durare e di bere abbastanza acqua. Non vorrei rimanere senza acqua l'ultimo giorno. Date un'occhiata a quanta ne abbiamo, riempitele e tenetele lì. Sì, e vi dico che le cose buone da mangiare ora saranno le caramelle, le creme spalmabili per panini. Forse il congelatore, quello disidratato. Se d
Хорошо. После этого, CB CTE, MAIN B, для закрытия. Далее, панель 250: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2 для закрытия; CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING для закрытия. Далее, панель 275: CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B, для закрытия; CB INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B, для закрытия. Хорошо. Кстати, все, что я вам дал до сих пор, не является критически важным в плане последовательности, но с этого момента должно быть таковым — вы должны обязательно выполнять действия в той последовательности, которую мы вам дадим. Почем
了解
로저, 하와이. 제미니
괜찮
G
हाँ, बिल्कुल। यहाँ एक लंबी प्रक्रिया है; लेकिन संक्षेप में, आपको पूरी चीज़ को प्लास्टिक से ढकना है। ऊपर की तर
收到。投球。收到，投球
好的。杰克，关于水还有一点要补充。如果你取水时没有完全释放压力，剩下的压力会在1到3小时内消失。虽然氧气含量不多，但我们最好还是保存起来。所以，如果你想彻底解决这个问题，可以把水装进水
Capit
ठीक 
罗杰。在那个古老陨石坑
Hören Sie, soll ich das Raumschiff in eine andere Position br
Esatto, è la ventesima volta che viene qui: all'estero per Natale con 
O
C'est exact. Très bi
좋아요, 5초 후에 오버라
Okay at drogue deploy. I've got 70 
अ
Ro
D'accord. Ça
Roger. Bitte warten. Ich 
Джек,
距
アポロ8号、アポロ8号、こちらヒュ
Okay. We're predicting at the nominal time of your next midcourse, which is entry interface minus 2 hours - we're predicting 1.4 foot per second burn which changes your gamma at entry interface by a tenth of a degree.
Alri
Ich glaube nicht, dass das ein großes Problem ist; es springt einfach, wenn man in den Automatikmodus geht. Ich denke nicht, dass es uns bei der Anmeldung beeinträch
そ
रॉजर, फ्रेडो। बढ़िया जवाब। अब, पृथ्वी पर, हमारा अनुमान है - यदि आपको यह संरेखण करना है, तो पृथ्वी लगभग 2 डिग्री झुकी हुई होगी। और यह लगभग तीन-चौथाई प्रकाशित होगी। अब, पृथ्वी पर निशान लगाने के लिए, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अर्धचंद्र के दो सि
Нет, нам не удалось обнаружить никакой влаги в космическом аппарате. Кажется, с ним
रॉजर, आपके पहले स
Roger. Ça ne fait qu'une quinzaine de minutes que 
OMNIに関してはマイナスですね。そこまでの
Non intendo
Il faudra beaucoup de temps avant que cette batteri
I'll put the mains to OFF and see what we've got. Look here, we've still got a … I want to put these off. I'll put them off one at a 
Позвоните и сделай
رميتي تحقق
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴
Roger. Fo
我想，就是这样了，尼
Ça fonctionne très bien. J'ai terminé: une série d'observations comprenait Sirius (trois étoiles) et 
रॉज
Roger, Jim. Nel tuo computer, vorremmo fare di nuovo un dump della memoria cancellabile, come abbiamo fatto l'altro giorno, e il motivo per cui vorremmo farlo è che, quando l'hai fatto circa 8 ore fa, e ti ricordi di aver impiegato quel te
Vediamo. Sta abbassando l'inclinazione in Orbit Rate. Scansione dell'orizzonte ora. Vediamo se si ferm
Ehi, devo riciclare. Poi d
아, 그렇군요. 저도 그랬어요. 당신
Wir möchten Sie bitten, Ihren 
阿波罗8号，请稍等片刻。我
정답은 하나뿐입니다. 
Columbia, Columbia, this is Houston. We'd like you to ENABLE the thrusters in Bravo 1 and Bravo 2, AUTO SELECT.
Роджер. Мы это понимаем. Мы сейчас тоже смотрим на Землю, и видим впечатляющую длинну
هذا أقل ما يُقال. أن
ここは140度です。そして、上昇傾向はゆっくりとしています。コールドプレートの設定は
Well,... as it goes out... while o
Bonne relecture
Хорошо. Возникали ли у вас какие-либо трудности с управлением автомобилем, и какие ме
وهناك شيء آخر يا جاك. عندما يحين وقت قيامي بالانع
Okay, Mike. We had a request that you disconnect the yellow connector from the signal conditioner and verify that it looks okay, reconnect
مرحباً جيم، أنظر الآن عبر المنظار، وبصراحة، المن
Non, il ne sera pas en ret
Unless my watch is wrong, it says it's almost 2 a.m. back 
11 يا روجر. لقد تلقينا تقارير تفيد بأن جميع العلامات كانت جيدة في المرتين الأخيرتين اللتين أجريت فيهما الاختبارات. لحظة 
Theta 59 minu
分かりました。給湯器についてですが、私も自分の給湯器をもらったのは面白いですね。マイクをONにすると、自分の声が2秒ほど遅れて聞こえるんです。一次ボイラーと二次ボイラーの点検については、入室前に両方済ませておき、再点検手順書を手元に用意しておくの
さあ準備
Okay. I understand, Vance. It's much easier if the ball is up to fly the needles; that gives me a drift of, 58g maneu
Ich schaue nach oben und stehe jetzt direkt im Schatten, um Buzz im Fenster zu beoba
حسنًا يا فانس. الخطوات التالية هي تسلسل CB BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING، مغلق. هذا هو BAT Baker. MDC 3، AC INVERTER 2، إلى MAIN B؛ AC INVERTER 2، AC1، ت
Roger. You are cutting out here. It's difficult to understand you. That's good communicatio
You get the flight plan out an
Roger. Era decisa
了解、
わかりました。4列目に入ったら、OPERATE（運用）ブレーカーを開きます。つまり、CDU（通信ユニット）を監視できなくなり、姿勢も確認できなくなります。そのため、通信に使用するアンテナの選択についてアドバイスすることはできません。対処方法としては、UPLINK SQUELCH（アップリンク・スケルチ）をオフにし、ノイズが聞こえたらアンテナを切り替えてください。アンテナの切り替えは確認できますが、切り替え後、再びロックオンを確立するまで約3～5分かかります。アンテナを切り替えるたびに、音声チェックを開始します。基本的に、窓の外に地球が見えたらFORWARD（前方）アンテナ、月が窓の上にある時はAFT（後方）アンテナを使用してください。わかり
我听得很清楚。感觉很好，飞行也很顺利。我看到了地球，飞行继续，能见度很好
Ora, il cratere che si trova al centro dello schermo è Webb. Lo osserveremmo dall'alto circa 6 mi
ठीक है, जैक, अब मेरे पास जो है वो है LEVVA, जिसे पहले भी दिखाया जा चुका है। ये सतह पर पहनने वाला एक हेडगारमेंट है, और मैं जिम का LEVVA यहाँ दिखा रहा हूँ ताकि कुछ MODs भी दिखा सकूँ। पहले एक समस्या ये थी कि सतह पर मौजूद किरदारों को ठी
好的。在切换全向模式之后，我们会关闭功率放大器，恢复到向下语音备份免费频道模式，并关
저는 
We'
Il semblerait que s'ils l'avaient fait, ils n'auraient pas dû passer en mode faisceau large avant 
Ich verstehe, dass Sie uns gut verstehen; wir hi
Roger, compris, je vous
Apollo 11, Houston. Die S IVB ist jetzt etwa 6000 Seemeilen von Ihne
Хорошо. В строке 3 под COMM. Откройте DISPLAYS, закройте SE AUDIO, откройте VHF TRANSMITTER и B RECEIVER, закройте оба основных автоматичес
Ici Friendship Seven, à Zanzibar. Cape 
Okay. Um deine Frage zu beantworten, Joe: Nein. Ich habe die Kabine ständig überprüft. Qualitativ betracht
ठीक है, केन। मुझे लगता है कि - मुझे नहीं पता किसी और ने ध्यान दिया है या नहीं - उस स्टिकर में इस बात का ध्य
جيميني
Try to touch the yaw attitude (ind
Roger. Qui è Friendship Seven. Sto controllando il fly-by-wire, tempo presente. Non ho imb
それを写真に撮ってくだ
혹시 못 보셨을까 봐 말인데... 목 댐 말이야. 
Ich mache gerade ein paar allgemeine Aufnahmen vom Wasser und den Wolken mit einem 16-mm-Objektiv. Wir haben große Probleme mit dem Ein-/Ausschalter dieser Kamera. Er funktioniert nur bei jedem dritten oder vierten Drücken. Das könnte erklären, warum Jim bei unseren EVA-Aufnahmen nicht so viel Film beli
알겠습니다. 마이
이글, 휴스턴. T
Хорошо, я понял. Но прежде чем я смогу сфотографировать звёзды, мне нужно убрать всё это за собой, иначе я ничего
هذا صحيح تقريبًا يا جيم. سيقوم جاك بمحاذاة تقريبية عند هذا الوضع. هذا هو الغرض من مناورتك للوصول إلى هذا الوضع. سنحسب زوايا المحاذاة التقريبية ونرسلها إليه، وأول ما سيفعله عند وصوله، وفقًا لقائمة التحقق الخاصة به، هو محاذاة
Temperatura di scarico 50 [gradi]. Oltr
分かりました。メモは受け
... 君はそれに遅れずについ
Итак, Джек, сейчас я покажу тебе LEVVA, которую уже демонстрировали раньше. Это головной убор для ношения на поверхности, и я... я покажу здесь головной убор Джима, чтобы продемонстрировать пару модификаций. Раньше была одна проблема: персонажей на поверхности было трудно различить. Поэтому на костюме Джима не только есть красные полосы, но, как ты видишь, на его LEVVA тоже есть красная полоса. А теперь ты можешь увидеть здесь еще одну модификацию, Джек, которую 
了解
Negativo, manca il numero 2; sto usando il num
Okay. That's out.... I
ما زلتُ غير متأكد تمامًا من تفعيل الدائرة الثانوية. ذكرتَ أنه يجب تعطيلها بعد ساعة أو خمس دقائق من بدء تشغيل المبخر الرئيسي. تشير قائمة التحقق الخاصة بي إلى أن المبخر الرئيسي لن يبدأ التشغيل على الأرجح إلا بعد تجاوز المشعا
Okay, Fred-o. Reading you 5-by. The procedure I'm going to read up to you is a Sun check for the - to see if we're going
रॉजर, वूमेरा, बिल्कुल स्पष्
了解、ジョー。JETTの姿勢は、サービスモジュールの通常の分離時と同様に、上向きで機体から
我得想办法……而且得想个好办法……才能离开这艘飞船。我们需要的是一艘大型飞船，
Хорошо. В районе посадки в центральной части Тихого океана погода хорошая. Облачность 2000, местами переменная; видимость 10; ветер 060 с шагом 10; высота волн 4 фута, показания высотомера 2986, если это имеет значение. Местами кратковременные дожди менее чем на 10 процентах территории. Спасательные силы с «Иводзимы» будут находиться в точке посадки, позывной самолета будет «Recovery 1», самолет находится на позиции, на борту пловцы. За зоной входа в атмосферу постоянно следят экипажи USS Hall, Good Liberty Ship и другие спасательные самолеты, позывные которых вы можете услышать, — эт
프렌드십 세
Okay. Ora ho questa stella ben visibile, Charlie, quindi potrei anche fare un po' di segni su questa per ottene
好的。我们是不
ええ。これで（判読不能）がどこにあるかがわかったので、次回はずっと楽になります。カイロとアレクサンドリアを初めて探した時は、（判読不能）がなかなか見つからず、飛行場は結局見えませんでした。ただ、その辺りだけが見えたんです。カメラを正しく向ければカイロの写真が撮れるだろうと思っていました。でも今回は、ちゃ
Ich habe keine Beschwerden gehört, aber eine
نعم يا جاك. وللتأكد م
खैर, मुझे लगता है कि अगर उन्हें कोई संख्या दिखाई नहीं दे
एड ने सामान खोलना शुरू किया और जैसे ही हम उस स्थिति में पहुँचे जहाँ बूस्टर के साथ छेड़छाड़ करना संभव नहीं था, मैंने पूरी तरह से उसकी मदद करना शुरू कर दिया - कम से कम सामान पकड़कर उसे सही जगह पर रखना और उसे गायब होने से बचाना। जितनी तेज़ी से हम काम करते, उतना ही हम पीछे होते चले जाते। ऐसा इसलिए नहीं था कि हम चीज़ों को सही जगह पर नहीं रख रहे थे, बल्कि इसमें हमारी उम्मीद से कहीं ज़्यादा समय लग रहा था। जीरो ग्रेविटी में यह सिम्युलेटर की तुलना में ज़्यादा आसान नहीं था, हालाँकि उतना ही आसान था। इसलिए हमने पूरा चक्कर लगाया। जब तक हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे, मैंने मन बना लिया था कि हम वहाँ नहीं पहुँच पाएँगे, लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि थोड़ी देर और कोशिश करते हैं। जब हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे - या वहाँ से निकलने से ठीक पहले - मुझे स्पष्ट हो गया था कि हम दबाव कम करने की प्रक्रिया पूरी नहीं कर पाएँगे। मैंने अगली कक्षा में जाने के लिए स्लिप का अनुरोध किया। फिर... हमने लगभग 20 मिनट तक आराम किया और कॉकपिट में पड़े फालतू सामान को व्यवस्थित करने की कोशिश की। फिर मैंने चेकलिस्ट निकाली और हमने दोबारा विस्तार से चेकलिस्ट देखी ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि जल्दबाजी में हमसे कुछ छूट तो नहीं गया। एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट शुरू किया - कार्नार्वोन के ऊपर हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। हम सब तैयार थे और दबाव कम करने की हरी झंडी का इंतजार कर रहे थे। हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। दबाव कम करने का चक्र पूरा हुआ। कार्नार्वोन से निकलते ही हमें पूर्ण एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट (EVA) के लिए मंजूरी मिल गई। हम कैंटन या हवाई पहुंचे, और उस समय हमें - मुझे लगता है कि कैंटन या हवाई से ही हमें अंतरिक्ष यान से बाहर निकलने और एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट शुरू करने की हरी झंडी मिली थी। हमने इसे अपने टेप रिकॉर्डर और VOX पोजीशन के अनुसार पूरा किया। हम आगे बढ़े और एड बाहर निकल गए और हमने तस्वीरें लेना शुरू कर दिया - जैसे हम लेते हैं... मैंने शुरू में उनके लिए अंतरिक्ष यान को स्थिर रखा। फिर जैसे ही वह बाहर निकले और ऐसा लग रहा 
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 통신이 두절될 경우를 대비해 산소 공급을 재개할 시간을 알려주시기
Un anneau d'un de nos livres s'est détaché. Ce serait vraiment problématique si tous les anneaux se détachaient, 
11番、こちらはヒュースト
Fred, nous avons suffisamment d'inf
حسنًا، لنرى، ربما يكون هناك اختلاف طفيف، فالشمس تبدو أعلى قليلًا الآن. ها هي الأرض تمر، ويبدو أنها من نفس المنظور تقريبًا. سأنتظر لأرى 
Хорошая 
그건 너무 
طبيعي. درجة حرارة المقصورة — 92. درجة حرارة البدلة — 58. ضغط المقصورة 5.6. تركيز ثاني أكسيد الكربون في البدلة 3/4. أسطوانة الأكسجين اليسرى 5100. أسطوانة الأكسجين اليمنى 5050. كمية الأكسجين 62.
Columbia, Houston. Tout d'abord, nous souhaitons une vidange des eaux usées à 10 % à l'arrière. Ensuite, il ne semble pas nécessaire de changer d'avion pour le moment, nous n'enverro
يا جيم، يمكنك القيام بـ 400 بالإضافة إلى جميع الأصفار في أي وقت تريد؛ هذا فقط يخبر الن
Depuis Washington: « En ce Noël, le monde s’illumine de l’espoir de paix. Quand elle adviendra, quand cet espoir se concrétisera et que les
프렌드십 세븐, 무체아 캡 콤, 어떻게 읽으세요? 이상
Roger. Manöver abgeschlosse
제미니 4호, 카나본 CAP COM입니다. 지상에서 보니 멋지네요. 필요한 게 있으시면 언제든 말씀하
Хорошо, Джин, сначала расскажу про костюм, чтобы все были в курсе. Температура купола костюма составляет 72 градуса. Температу
Roger, qui è Gemelli 4. Ti leggo rotto, m
Роджер. Голосовое общение в S-д
Okay. Give me 16... Apparently.... p
我也很高兴我们没有造成影响
सही
Okay. Wenn Sie Ihre Aktivitäten
Nous en reparlerons pl
罗杰。继续播报《栗色号角》。尼克松总统在登机飞往与您会面之前，从旧金山给您的夫人打了个电话，令她们惊喜不已。她们都被您的电视讲话深深感动。简和帕特在任务控制中心观看了直播。昨晚，国际通信卫星组织（Intelsat）在卡纳维拉尔角的发射第四次被推迟。据说问题出在德尔塔火箭第二级的氮气调节器故障。今晚将再次尝试发射。正在研
نعم، أعتقد أنه من الأفضل لك ذلك
ठीक है, फ्रेड। सबसे पहले, इसकी तैयारी, आकस्मिकता चेकलिस्ट (पृष्ठ 24) से शुरू करते हुए, हम सुझाव देंगे कि आप इसे शुरू करें, और इस पर आपके किसी भी सुझाव का हम स्वागत करेंगे। दूसरा बिंदु: जब आप बर्न एटीट्यूड में हों, तो आपको सूर्य बिल्कुल ऊपर दिखाई देगा। जब आपका कर्सर शून्य पर सेट होगा, तो यह कर्सर को विभाजित करेगा। हालांकि, एक बात का ध्यान रखें कि यह बहुत आसानी से डिटेंट से बाहर निकल जाएगा क्योंकि यह रोल औ
لا بد أن من اكتشف ذرات الهيدروجين والأكسجين ق
ヒューストン
До начала торможения осталось около 2 минут. Я на УВЧ-диапазоне, передаю и записываю, радиосвязь. Все предохранители находятся в правильном положении, кроме предохранителей переключателя п
네
Ehi, Neil
आप मज़ाक नहीं कर रहे! मैं आपकी बात से पूरी तरह सहमत हूँ। जो घटनाएँ घटीं, वे ऐसी नहीं थीं जो हमने पहले कभी न की हों या जिनके लिए हमने पहले से कोई प्रक्रिया न बनाई हो। मुझे लगता है कि हमने जो कुछ किया, उसका आज हमें बहुत अच्छा परिणाम मिला। मुझे मिले सभी प्रशिक्षण और हमारे साथ काम करने वाले लोगों का बहुत आभार 
Okay. Es gibt heute Morgen nicht viel Neues in den Nachrichten. Es ist ziemlich ruhig. Die wichtigste Nachricht betrifft wohl die Unfallzahlen – die Todesfälle an 
네. 6단계, "전원 전환(투광등 꺼짐), 주의 경고 전원 주의 표시등 켜짐. 11번 패널, 회로 차단기 트라에슬루나 버스 타이, 닫힘. 16번 패널, 회로 차단기 트라에슬루나 버스 타이, 닫힘. 11번 패널, 조명 설비, 닫힘. 그리고 설비등을 작동시키십시오." 이상입니다. 그리고, 13번, 휴스턴. OMNI Bravo를 
Jim, nous sommes prêts à remettre la batterie en service. Veuill
了解しました。テープレコーダーに少し問題が発生しました。再突入時のCバンドを「連続」に設定
そうだね
No. As a matter of fact, I've been running faceplate open for quite a while just to take a look around and see if we are picking up any. In fact, the relative humidity has dropped a little bit in here and we have no apparent moi
好的，我明白了。加上 51.5，再加零，最后得到 12
Okay.
Okay, Joe. We've 
هذا يعني ٢٦، كلها أصفار. تمام. ٢٧، كلها أصفار. الدفع للأم
Let me give you
Апол
هيا يا أنظمة 
それは調べるのが少し難しいかもしれません。マイ
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। तस्वीर अब थोड़ी धुंधली हो रही है। आप चाहें तो एफ स्टॉप को थोड़
... реш
...Nous arrivons tout juste dans le pièg
— И прямо сейчас я пыт
160 फीट, 6-1/2 नीचे - 5-1/2 नीचे, 9 आगे। अभी भी अच्छा लग रहा है। 120 
«Аполлон-8», пока мы ждём высокого усиления, я продолжу краткое описание траектории. Мы всё ещё можем вернуться к средней линии Тихого океана с тринадцатой позиции, и вы будете на пути после 138 секунд работы двигателя. Это 138 секунд, чтобы вывести вас из зоны «бабочки». Мы рекомендуем не пытаться использовать преждевременное зажигание или перезапуск после 20 секунд. Если вы превысите 20 секунд, это может привести к тому, что траектория выйдет за пределы возможностей коррекции и свободного возврата. Погода в районе посадки хорошая. У нас есть слежение за вами и без него. Во время работы двигателя вы можете заметить небольшое изменение давления в камере сгорания и в баках из-за истощения топлива в накопительном баке и его попадания в отстойник. Это может произойти примерно через 2-5 секунд после начала работы двигателя. Это будет небольшое изменение давления в обеих системах. Что касается систем, все они готовы к работе. После этого нам нужно остановить кипение воды для целей траектории. Ваша ситуация со сбросом воды выглядит хорошо; У вас должно быть достаточно воды, даже больше, чем ожидалось. Мы постараемся отложить сброс воды до 5. Перед этим мы хотели бы перемешать криогенные элементы — поправка. Следующая продувка топливных элементов произойдет примерно в, и это будет водородная батарея A (34,9), батарея B (39,1) и Charlie (38,5). У нас есть возможность использовать один криогенный бак: 
MAIN BUS TIES, two, ON, Fred. Okay. HELIUM VALVE, two, AUTO and checked AUTO barber pole. SERVO POWER is 1, AC1/MA
Go ahea
D'ac
私たちが何をしているのかさえ分かりま
双子座4号，夏威夷 CAP COM。你抄袭了吗？最后
Roger. Möchtest du e
Роджер. Тот перицинфян, к
क्या आप उन होज़ों के लिए सही दि
Это подтверждается. Итак, теперь у нас включены батареи 1, 2, 3, 4 и 6, и у меня есть два замечания. Во-первых, пределы защиты автоматического выключ
收到。燃油控制浓度为 90-100%，
こんにちは、ムチア・キャップ・コム、オーロラ・セブン。はっきりと聞こえます。調子はどう
어디 보자. 미주리주 스프링필드에서, 1941년 월드시리즈에서 브루클린 다저스의 전설적인 포수이자, 삼진을 잡아내 뉴욕 양키스의 승리를 확정지은 미키 오웬은 스포츠 기록 이상의 것으로 기억되기를 바랐습니다. 그는 45명의 소년 소녀들에게 조랑말을 선물했습니다. 아이들은 그에게 조랑말을 어떻게 돌볼 것인지 편지를 보내달라는 요청을 받았습니다. 편지가 쏟아지자, 그는 이미 제공했던 20마리에 5마리를 더 추가했고, 다른 기부자들도 20마리를 더 보태주었습니다. 미키 오웬은 "45통 정도 받을 줄 알았는데, 900통이나 받았어요."라고 말했습니다. 이제 특집 기사입니다. 뉴질랜드 웰링턴에서는 오늘 남극에서 약 50명의 남성들이 전통적인 칠면조와 크랜베리 ​​소스를 곁들인 식사를 즐겼는데, 이날 크리스마스는 동양적인 분위기도 감돌았습니다. 여기에는 남극 대륙을 횡
Well, we're in sleep attitude, and
... الضغط جيد. القيادة صعبة بعض
Um Bilder des Raumsch
Хорошо. Фред, я вижу на своем мониторе, что ты находишься на расстоянии 16214 миль от Луны и движешься со скорость
로저. 월리, 이제 훨씬 잘 들리는 것 같네. 아주 좋아. 연료는 
11, Houston. Present forecast shows acceptable conditions in your recovery area: 2000 foot scattered, high scattered, wind from 070 degrees, 13 knots, visibility 10 miles, and sea state about 4 feet. The forecast yesterday showed a tropical storm, Claudia, some 500 to 1000 miles east of Hawaii. The - the pictures from Earth satellites taken yesterday afternoon - afternoon showed Claudia dissipating, so this appears to be even less a factor than it was before. Your recovery area is now believed to be just a little ways north of the intertropical convergence zone, which you can probably see when you look out your windows there. Yesterday there was also a report of a tropical storm, Viola, further to the west. Its present location is some thousand miles east of the Phillipines and moving northwest. Tropical storm Viola has been intensifying, and should be transferred to the typhoon category within the next 12 hours or so; however, that will be far to your west. As a matter of fact, sunrise terminator has not yet reached Viola. When it does s
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 
تم
네, 그렇습니다. 그리고 불행히도 창밖을 내다보는 방식 때문에, 요(yaw)와 롤(roll)은 꽤 잘 맞출 수 있지만, 피치(p
Не знаю. Я ушёл наверх, сейчас я внизу, Джек. Думаю, когда Джек поднимется,
Хорошо, Джек, понял. Закройте автоматические выключатели клапана REAC в топливном элементе 2. Отключите питание инверторов. Отключите питание шины реле батареи. Соединения батареи — выключены. Питание входа и о
안녕하세요, 물병자리 여러분. 
О
ロジャー、フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはカリフォルニア・コム・テックです。UHFではっきりと聞
少しきついですね。約0.25度です。もう少しずれても大丈夫です。スタンバ
And how about the f-stop? Is 22 going to be accurat
好的。我已经关闭了氧气罐加热器
Houston, Apoll
Джо, как далеко мы уже продвинулись и как быстро сокра
أبولو 11، هيوستن. ك
범위 비율
休斯顿，哥伦比亚执行 UPTELEMETRY COMMAND, RESET，以重新获得高增
Gemini 4, G
Кроме того, Билл, твоя вторичная пет
Roger. Bie
روجر. والنقطة التالية، معدل ارتفاع الهيليوم فوق الحرج طبيعي، وقد طرحتَ علينا سؤالاً بخصوص نشاط دافعاتك خلال الدورة الأخيرة. نعتقد أننا فهمنا ذلك الآن، حيث ذكرتَ أن زاوية الميل كانت في وضع "التسارع" وزاوية الانعراج والدوران في وضع "المعدل". كنتَ تُشغّل دافعات الميل. هذا سيربط المعدلات بمحوري الانعراج والدوران، وكنتَ في
Attends Buzz. Ça a l'air plutôt bien, d'après ce que je vois. On a la ligne de convergence tropicale là-bas. Il y a quelques nuages ​​sur la carte météo que je regarde, mais rien d'important. Pour l'instant... Attends. Voyons voir, là, à mi-hauteur... oui, à MPL... on a 3000 pieds de nuages ​​épars, visibilité 10 pieds, vagues de 3 pieds, c'est la météo actuelle. Je ne pense pas qu'il y ait de prévisions importantes. Il y a quelques... FLIGHT vient de m'informer que ce que je viens de te donner était les prévisions. Il y a quelques tempêtes tropicales dans le... enfin, pas dans la zone d'atterrissage, mais dans le Pacifique. Une tempête appelée Claudia qui est au nord-est d'Hawaï. Elle se dirige vers le nord-ouest et se dissipe. Et il y en a une appelée Viola, qui est au-dessus de Guam, et elles ne repr
좋아요. 말씀
Okay. Wir sind jetzt genau an dem Punkt angelangt, an dem ihr laut dem von uns erstellten Flugplan alle mit dem Essen fertig gewesen wärt und du und Jack die Wache hättet, während Fred schlafen gegangen wäre. Dem Plan zufolge 
那是老款的南冕座星，显示得非常清晰，还有努基星。南冕座星就在它应该在的航线上。我读到的是0度偏
Es 
Apollo 11, 
حسنًا. لنحصل ع
로저, 산소 공급 압력을 930~
मुझे लगता है कि सबसे तेज़ तरीका है प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट के पहले भाग को, जहाँ नक्शा दिया गया है, पृष्ठ दर पृष्ठ देखना। L2 और L3 कंपार्टमेंट वाले पृष्ठ से 
Хорошо, я получил свой... но прежде чем продолжить, хочу сказать, что все мо
This is Friendship Seven recording. A lot of dirt 
我们希望你恢复到原来的姿态，俯仰角 010，偏航角 045；
休斯顿的朋友们请注意，视
Questo ciclo del sonno qui è... dovremo solo cronometrarlo, immagino. Dovrei dorm
Roger. Auf E-9, oben unter „
...non n
그 페이지에는 기본적인 정리 작업을 하고, 헬멧과 보관 가방을 수납하고, 거울, 체크리스트, 폐기 장치를 꺼내라고 되어 있습니다. 임시 보관 장치를 수납하고, 16mm, HC-EX, f:4, 500, 무한대, 초당 6프레임으로 설정하여 사용 준비를 하라고 되어 있습니다. 그 페이
हाँ, जिम। आपका रवैया बिल्कुल सही है, और क्या आपको समझ 
Moment – ​​
حسنًا. لقد أخطأنا في مجموعة النسخ الاحتياطية. كانت في غير مكانها. يبدو أن البيانات الموجودة على متن الطائرة سليمة. أردنا فقط أن تتأكد من ذلك. لدينا تحديث بخصوص بطاقة نظام تحديد المواقع المتقدم/الوقود التي توضع على اللوحة. إنه خط
ठीक है। आप चाहते हैं कि हम चेकल
星のチェックをしてみましたが、合格で
BATTERI
حسنًا، ان
Apollo 8, Houston. L'aggiornamento del vettore di stato è completo e ver
Roger. Tu commences à prendre un peu de lacet 
روجر، ن
Х
Canary, ich habe dein
هيوستن، بناءً على موقعنا الحالي، سنستخدم خاصية 
罗杰。10，/：45597，减 040，加 157，加 35189，减 01513，减 00346 180 007 000，十一月阿尔法星加 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253，视轴星天蝎座δ星（又名Dz
罗杰，吉姆。时机合适的时
로저. 8시
ठीक है। हम अगले दो रातों के तापमान पर चर्चा 
और, जिम, जब आपको फुर्सत मिले तो कॉपी कर लेना, मेरे पा
Хорошо. В разделе «Включение», на шаге 2 написано «Мигание 3700, ENTER». Джек, мы будем использовать это, когда вы только что включили компьютер, и в нем есть вектор состояния, который был получен много-много часов назад. Поэтому нам нужно нажать ENTER, чтобы остановить интеграцию и не дать ей просто зависнуть. И когда заземление покажет новый вектор состояния, мы сможем прод
Potresti controllare la lettura dell'imbardata in base a ciò ch
Hey, Jim. Jim, hier ist 
好的。最后 4 到最后 5 个 CL
Bien. Prenez maintenant une des cartouches d'hydroxyde de lithium et laissez-moi vous indiquer quelle extrémité correspond à quelle autre. L'une des extrémités plates et ventilées est presque carrée; elle est munie d'une san
ठीक है। समझ गई। मुझे पता था कि सुबह ऑक्सीजन और हाइड्रोजन निकालने
D'accord. Depuis Jodrell Bank, en Angleterre, via AP: le grand radiotélescope britannique de Jodrell Bank a cessé de recevoir les signaux de
انتقل إلى RATE - حسنًا، أرى لوحة 
Hallo Jack, wir haben Ihre Informationen zur Kenntnis genommen. Wir möchten uns aber noch etwas gedulden, da wir noch an dem Problem arbeiten. Wir werden Ihnen daher später weitere I
Ich frage mich, wo wir bei 1:34 sein werden. Oh, ich weiß! Es ist auf der – auf der
D'accord. Ce sera sur CB(16), Fred-o, mais c'est INVERTER 2 OUVERT. D'accord, pour l'activation du minuteur de mission. Faites l'étape 1, correction, lignes 1 et 2. Supprimez « set mission timer on mark » et insérez « set mi
Ok. Dopo il numero 1, prima riga, cancella "E VHF-A". Seconda riga, cancella "Funzionamento SIMPLEX". Terza riga, cancella "Prime". Questo si riferisce all'AMPLIFICATORE DI POTENZA PRIME, SPENTO. Quel... quel "PRIME" dovrebbe essere sostituito da SPENTO. E questo è il secondo "prime" di quella riga. Anche nella terza riga l'ultima parola "SPENTO" dovrebbe essere cancellata e sostituita da "PCM". La quarta ri
जिम, विंडो 5 के बारे में, मेरे पास यहाँ एक चित्र है; और, जब आप डॉक होते हैं, तो दोनों अंतरिक्ष यानों के Z-अक्षों के बीच लगभग 60 डिग्री का कोण होता है। ऐसा लगता है कि विंडो 5 से बाहर देखने पर, आप ऊपर स्थित रेंडेज़वस रडार को देख पाएंगे, जिससे, यदि आप पिच 
Лучше мне сделать так, чтобы перед тем, как снова запустить эту штуку в работу, они закончили работу над другим баллоном. Не знаю. Он у
Hier ist eine interessante kleine Neuigkeit, die man 
Roge
Ricevuto. Ricevuto. Traslazione della spinta - quattro getti - Coppia di bilanciamento - ON. Acceleratore - MINIMO. Acceleratore - AUTO CDR. Pulsante elica - RESET. Pulsante elica. Ok
正如我们预想的那样，行动似乎没有任何困难。甚至可能比我们在地面上进行的各种模拟中六分之一重力加速度下的模拟还要容易。实际上，四处走动完全没问题。好的。下降发动机没有留下任何大小的弹坑。它离地大约有1英尺的距
Houston, qui è tutto tranquillo. La lettura del LMP potrebbe essere 09:017. 
フライバイ / 63087、マイナス162、プラス
Haben sie etwas zur
Nein, das ist schon in Ordnung. Interessant ist allerdings, dass beim letzten Mal, als Sie das Wasser abgelassen haben, gleichzeitig eine Veränderung in der Flugbahn festgestellt wurde. Durch die Korrelationsanalyse fanden sie jemanden, der die Eigenschaften einer Düse und die abgelassene Wassermenge zu kennen glaubte. Seine Schätzunge
Ah, Roger, Zanzibar CapCom. Amicizia Sette. Tutti i fusibili sono rimasti invariati rispetto a quanto riportato in precedenza; non ne ho cambiato nessuno. Squib è armato. Il Retrojettison automatico è disattivato. è su normale, automatico, giroscopio normale. Tutte le maniglie a "T" sono inserite. Il Retro Delay è normale. Il pannel
Parfait. Le timing est impeccable, Wally.
Oh, das stimmt. Das hatte 
Слышите? Передаю следующее сообщение: 9:48 утра, полет проходит хорошо. «Затвор-1
هل تريد إنزال أحد واقيات وجهك ا
An der Optik scheint nichts passiert zu sein, aber einige Fenster sind definitiv mit Eis bedeckt. Auf Fenster 1, das dem Lüftungssch
D'accord. Mettez l'onduleur 2 (CA BUS 2) sur marche; mettez l'interrupteur de réinitialisation du CA BUS 2 sur la position centrale; sélectionnez Alfa pour la charge de la batterie; sélectionnez BATTERY CHARGE pour l'indicateur CC; puis, nous vous demandons de nous communiquer le courant et la tension du chargeur toutes les 10 minutes pendant la première demi-heure, puis toutes les 30 minutes. Nous nous en chargerons ensuite, Jack. Veuillez nous rappeler les réglages des interrupteurs que j
11, hier ist Houston. Kurskorrektur Nummer 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, Nick- und Giertrimmung NA, TIG 150 29 5453, minus 00048, plus alle Kugeln, plus 00001 075 159 328; HA ist NA; HP plus 00230 00048 011 00048; Sextantenstern 03 0908 382. Boresitsternblock, keiner verfügbar. Breite plus 1102, minus 17204 11803 36275 195 03 33, aus
알겠습니다. 다음 페이지 상단에 "보조 증발기(Secondary water EVAP)"라고 적힌 부분을 보시면, 주 증발기가 고장 나지 않는 한 보조 증발기는 사용하지 않을 계획이라는 점을 기억해 두세요. 1
حسنًا. نقرأ 3 جي، أعتقد أننا سنضطر إلى تأجيل فحص تخميد إعادة الدخول هذه المرة. نقرأ الآن 4 جي. يبدو أن إعادة الدخول تسير على ما يرام. معدلات التسارع التي يبدو أن نظام التخميد الإضافي يتعامل معها جيدة. 
わかりました。彼にもう一度宇宙船に電話をかけるように頼みます。もし彼が送信機のボタンを押さなかったら、報告
好的。GMTB 15 43 23。ΔV 为 139。燃烧持续时间 - 2 分 39 秒
Charlie, ruoteremo di circa 270 gradi all'andata, viceversa 1, o di 090 gra
Columbia, Houston. Si vous passez à REACQ avec un gain important, nous pouvon
Подтверждаю. Инструкцию мне дали 10 минут н
جيميني 4، آر كي في كاب كوم. هل است
Très bien. Sur le 
Ciao Joe. Jim mi ha riferito che c'è un leggero odore di bruciato nella zona del tunnel, come già segnalato
На 4 или 5 градусов выше; бол
Fate in modo che siano i vostri amichev
11, на этом, с точки зрения ситуации на земле, всё на сегодня заканчивается. Мы готовы лечь спать и не
好的，杰克。我们现在已经控制住了姿态。我们要尝试向上旋转
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Alle Triebwerksfunk
オーケー。3Gを検知しています。今回は再突入時のダンピングチェックをパスする必要があるようです。現在4Gを検知しています。再突入は順調のようです。補助ダンピングが対応しているようです。あまり揺れているようには見えません。後ろの空の輝きの周りを回っているようです。自動燃料は6.5Gで依然として
了解。君は5フィートだ。ニールはいるか
자, 이 글을 읽고 계시다면,
はい、チャーリー、次の瞬間まで待機してくださ
Die Kabine ist etwas kühl. Wir haben einen Kabinenlüfter an, die Heizung läuft auf Hochtouren, und die Temperatur liegt knapp unter 70 Grad. Das könnte ein Hinweis für die Konstruktio
لا أمانع -....
我同
ठीक है। और, ह्यूस्टन, यह 8 है। अगर हमारे भविष्य के NAV अवलोकन कार्यक्रम में कोई संशोधन होने वाला है, तो हम
好的。您打算如何
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 마
Ne ha
Nur zur Information, Ed: Unser Sauerstoffv
И вот что я вижу: у меня теперь весь г
- - 83시간.
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Г
ठीक है, जिम। हमने इसे आपको यॉ, पिच और रोल के र
Nous vous recevons parfaitement, Bill. Le problème ici, au-dessus de Honeysuck
Oka
... Schub auf NORMAL; DELTA-V-Schub, zwei, AUS; Nicken und Gieren auf
Sì. L'impatto è avvenuto a 74 miglia nautiche di distanza e la sism
Я думаю, что экстраполировать все, что вы получаете от этой работы с битами, на комбинацию командного модуля было бы очень сложно, потому что управление космическим аппаратом существенно меняется просто из-за изменения количества топлива, 
بفضل هذه العودة بدون رفع، سنتمكن من التنبؤ بنقطة هبوطك، وستتحرك فرق الإنقاذ إلى موقع هبوطك قبل وص
ठीक है, हम आ रहे हैं। प्रवेश पैड: मध्य प्रशांत, 000153; 000। अगली दो पंक्तियाँ चंद्र अस्त और चंद्रमा-जाँच अभिवृत्ति की होंगी;, 178; संज्ञा 61, माइनस 21.66, मा
Okay, Andocksonde, einfahren, beide
753번, 09시 - 11시 09분 - 해가 지평선 바로 위에 있네요. 하셀블라드의 사진 이벤트 표시
Sì, alla separazione della navicella spaziale. 
你好，我不知道。不过——我跟你说，有那张沙发在里面，这样的生活方式还不错——我有点——哦，是的，
吉姆，关于你的2号电池，我们认为可能是温度传感器故障导致了这次报警，而不是电池本身过热；因为我们没有在乙二醇回路中检测到任何更高的温度。我们预计大约101小时后会重新连接电池。
Wie bitte? Bi
Bene. Sembra che tu stia entrando ora nella t
Ok, se preferisci, ti preg
이글
Tutti i retro h
Roger. Nous le ferons. Restez à l'écou
Mir fiel auf, dass der Boden an den weichen Stellen, wo wir fast einen Zoll tiefe Fußabdrücke hatten, sehr kohäsiv is
Хорошо. Отлично. Это был бак с высоким давлением, и, по-видимому, пока ждали замыкания реле давления для запуска цикла нагревателя, давление в баке 1 
알겠습니다. PC+
Forza 
알겠습니다. 카운트다운 시작하겠습니다
좋아요, 한번 시도해 보죠. 에드, 한 가지 더 확인해 봐도 될까요? 에드 씨가 우주 유영 중일 때 방향 감각 상실이 전
In questo momento è giorno dalla parte di Jim, e guardando fuori dalla mia parte riesco ancora a distinguere alcune stelle. Sembra che si possa mantenere la navicella orientata in modo che un lato sia buio. Dall'altro lato, però, è alla luce del giorno. Il lato di Jim è decisamente alla luce del giorno in questo momento e il mio è al buio. Questa è una delle cose che mi ha sorpreso di più all'inizio del volo, quando guardavo tutte le piccole lucciole del booster e notavo quanto fosse 
Be
لدي ضوء تحذير الماسح الضوئي. يا إلهي، لا بد أن الكر
Ok, Fred-o, bel colpo. Nella riga 4, iniziando con: VENTILATORE TUTA 1, CHIUSO; TRASFERIMENTO AUTOMATICO POMPA GLICOLE, TRASMETTITORE VHF B, APERTO; RICEVITORE VHF A, APERTO. Sotto: VISUALIZZAZIONE INTENSITÀ SEGNALE, APERTO; AZIO
لديّ واحدة أخرى لك. ستنسخ هذا وتعطيني إياه كاملاً عند إعادة القراءة. حسناً. بمجرد أن تستوعب الأمر وتريد استخدام - تريد الحصول على المصباح، علينا أن نغلق قاطع الدائرة CB 16 INVERTER 2؛ وقاطع الدائرة CB 11 AC BUS A LAMP. بعد ذلك، يمكنك فتح قاطع الدائرة CB 16 INVERTER 2، وفتح قاطع الدائرة CB
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। हमें 
开始测量
لا، الأمر ليس سيئاً للغاية. لقد خزنّا
Okay.: 2 più 26 più 05, 179, 108, 000, 5 più 47, 1041
レトロアティチュードに近づいてきました。レトロ
We're all feeling pretty good now; no proble
Ho appena fatto un tentativo sul bersaglio 16-A. L'aeroporto di Bassora, si trova proprio sul Golfo Persico. L'ho individuato... ho individuato il Golfo Persico a circa... un angolo di circa 30°... Ho picchiato e poi ho individuato il lago... a nord-ovest del Golfo Persico. Bassora, essendo proprio sui laghi, molto vicino ai laghi, si può semplicemente seguire e individuare subito l'aeroporto. Quindi ho raggiunto l'aeroporto un bel po' prima di raggiungere il bersaglio, e poi ho iniziato a seguirlo. Ero effettivamente sul bersaglio quando ero ancora a 20° 
제미니 4, 여기는 휴스턴 캡콤입니다. 이
Questo è confermato. Okay, e poi passerà a un atteg
로저, 11. 중간 항로 수정의 크기는 참고용으로만 알려드린 것이며, 중간 항로 4는 초당 약 2.0피트 정도 하강했습니다. 다시 한번 알려드리자면, 챔버 압력에 대해 말씀드리자면, 귀하의 온보드 판독값 87psi는 저희 원격 측정값으로는 92psi에 해당하고, 귀하의 온보드 값 89는 94psi에 해
Okay. We're talking about doing that like an hour prior to; but in the
मुझे बस यह जानने की उत्सुकता थी कि मैं पृथ्व
こちらコムテック、カントンコムテックです。聞こえますか？オー
Bene. Ora vogliamo fare
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。ちなみに、打ち上げ完了後、六分儀で地球を捉えました。ここから見ると、なかな
Nein. Wir sind im Kommando. I
Et Joe, sais-tu si tu vas essayer de 
罗杰。理解完成，16
わかりました。S
了解。こちらはコマンドパイロットです。30分ほど前
アポロ8号、ヒュー
시그
了解しました。それで、2番
Vielleicht kannst du anfangen herauszufinden, was zum Teufel das sein
روجر. نحن
アポロ11号、こちらヒ
حسناً. وفقاً
재설정
Apollo 8, Hou
Nous
Okay. Go ahead with the command module proced
Roger. Pour une raison inconnue
— Мы не настолько уж зависимы от воды, чтобы регулярно пить из этого пакета. Поэтому, пожалуйста, сообщите нам, когда достанете 
收到。
हाँ, ठीक है। पैड्स पर बात 
キューカードには「ノー」と書いてある。プロと競う気は全くないんだ、信じてくれ。でも、ここはすごく快適だよ。幸せな家だよ。3人で座るには十分なスペースがあって、みんなお気に入りの小さな隅っこに座る場所を見つけようとしているんだ。無重力状態はとても快適だけど、しばらくすると、ガタガタと揺れたり、天井や床や側面にぶつかったりするのに疲れてくる。だから、どこか小さな隅っこを見つけて、膝を立て
هيوستن، كنت تريد أن تتبنى هذا المو
Roger, Jim. J'ai des i
ओह, बिलकुल, जिम। हम काफी आगे हैं। मैं बस आपको 
好的。我还有
Il 
了解、フレンドシップ・セブン。エアロメッドは、あなたがバンジーコ
Je ne faisais que manipuler ça, et avec la poignée - 
आगे बढ़ो
मैंने पहले
RKV CAP COM, 여기
Columbia, H
Fred, tra un paio di minuti ti consegneremo il Capr
А как насчет первого регулятора наклона подвеса? Можете п
了解。ASCS をすぐにチェックして
짐, 현재 상황은 우리가 약간 얕은 곳에 있고, 중간 지점에서 후퇴하면 회랑의 중심부에 더 가까워질 겁니다. 이
Esatto, George. Lascerò la m
现在它却把
यह अपोलो 8 है, जो आपको चंद्रमा से लाइव प्रसारण कर रहा है। हमें अब टीवी कैमरे बदलने पड़े हैं। हमने पहले आपको पृथ्वी का वह दृश्य दिखाया, जिसे हम पिछले 16 घंटों से देख रहे हैं। अब हम कैमरा बदल रहे हैं ताकि हम आपको चंद्रमा दिखा सकें, जिसके ऊपर हम पिछले 16 घंटों से 60 मील की ऊंचाई पर उड़ान भर रहे हैं। बिल एंडर्स, जिम लवेल और मैंने क्रिसमस से एक दिन पहले का दिन यहाँ प्रयोग करने, तस्वीरें लेने और अंतरिक्ष यान के इंजन चलाकर चारों ओर घूमने में बिताया है। अब हम उसी रास्ते पर चलेंगे जिस पर हम पूरे दिन चलते रहे हैं और आपको चंद्र सूर्यास्त तक ले जाएंगे। चंद्रमा हम सभी के लिए अलग-अलग है। मुझे लगता है कि हम सभी की आज जो कुछ भी देखा है, उसकी अपनी-अपनी छाप है।
Le vol indique être à court d
收到，弗雷德。我们还有最后一个
برمودا، فريندشيب سفن. لم أحصل على أي نتائج من فحص العين. 
Oui. On n'arrive pas à réduire la largeur du faisceau. On a essay
Roger. Eagle's looking real fine to us down here. We have a fairly high confidence that we know the position of the. However, it is possible that we may have a planes change, but the - In the worst case, it would be up to 30 feet per second. An
과이마스. 여기는 VI입니다... 이 연소에 대한 편견... 연소 직
Negative. At this time, we do not have any updates for the lunar surface book. We wanted you to have it just in case
Roger. Tranquillité. Sachez qu'il y a beaucoup de sourires dans cette pièce et partout 
هذه فريندشيب سفن. سأخرج عن خطة الط
了解しました。AC電源が供給されていることを確認してください。つまり、INVERTER 2が選択され、BUS TIE INVERTER 2 AC BUS Aが閉じていることを確認してください。FLIGHT DISPLAYS、GASTA、COMMANDER、CLOSEDの状態です。AC BUS Aでは、CB GA
Okay. Wir h
حسنًا. في هذه المراجعة 
जॉन बस आपको या
Ok, Houston. Abbiamo avuto una media 
塔那那利佛，你
我是弗兰克·博尔曼
Okay. Wir überspringen einen Schritt und wollen „Brennstoffzelle 2 Hauptbus B Talkback, grau“; und beim nächsten Schritt wollen wir „Brennstoffzelle 3 Hauptbus B aus“ 
这片区域看起
Dann, als ich die Flasche abfeuerte, und dann, so ziemlich alles, was danach kam … seitdem das Ganze angefangen hatte, bin ich wieder auf CMC, AUTO … zurückgegangen … und
यहां तक ​​पहुंचने में बहुत समय लग रहा है; हमारे पास TIG वेल्डिंग के लिए सिर
了
حسناً، سأعود الآ
Okay, Ja
아름다운 별들이 보이고, 캡슐 자체에서 나와 떠다니는 듯한 작은 흰 물체들도 보입니다. 만약 그것들이 궤도 수정용이라면 정말 멋진 일입니
Ok, Jack. Vuoi che proceda con la checklist di spegnimento? Non ho copiato gli elementi che volevi
حسنًا يا فريد، لن نزعج القبطان هناك. لن نلتقط أي صور من نافذة وحدة القيادة حتى بعد انتها
Okay. At the end of R
Roger, Bill. Danke. Verstanden; plus X 45 Grad genau in der Mitte zwischen plus Y und plus Z und leicht minu
Sigma Seven. Cap
Bene. Il misuratore indica il 22%. Non abbiamo alcun controllo di imbardata o rollio e non riusciamo a riprendere il controllo dei propulsori di imbardata, a quanto pare nessuno di loro. Li abbiamo... a quanto pare i propulsori di beccheggio sono operativi. E inoltre, stiamo lentamente tor
Близнецы 4, Карнар
جيم، ما نريده منك هو الاستمرار في استخدام خطك الدقيق الحالي وتجاهل ما سبق
D'accord, Fred. Si je comprends bien, seul le tuyau rouge du LMP est branché dans le sac du réservoir. Dans
実は、問題はフードバッグではなく、中の食べ物なんです。粉々に砕けてしまっているんです。カプセルの中に
Roger. Per Bill, la qualità della 
Okay. Ricevuto, Jack. Ricevuto. Nel 
ठीक है। हम 5 किलोमीटर पर हैं
Гавайи, Близне
Gemini 4. Si le voyant de dysfonctionnement ne se réinitialise pas du premier coup, continuez d'essa
아, 
Iwo Jima, Swim 1 a une vue à 
Se siete interessati ad altri resoconti, og
ठीक है। मुझे बस ओम्नी स्विच करना है। ठीक है। पेज 1-4 पर दिए गए बदलावों को पढ़ते हुए, जो, फ्यूल सेल हीटर तीन, बंद, फ्यूल सेल 1 मेन बस
حسنًا. الآن سنقوم بتحويل وصلة الإرسال إلى وضع النسخ الاحتياطي لـ Upvoice لمدة دقيقتين تقريبًا، وقد يستغرق الأمر بضع ثوانٍ قبل أن تسمع صوت انقطاع Upvoice. لذا يمكنك إعادة ضبط مفتاح قياس البيانات على وضع النسخ الاحتياطي لـ Up
지구 자전축의 흔들림이 점점 심해지는 것 같아요. 지금 지구는 창문 맨 위쪽까지 올라와 있어서, 보
ठीक है। उद्देश्य पेरीसिंथियन प्लस 2 घंटे का अबॉर्ट है: प्लस 1633.0, माइनस 0014.5, माइनस 0751.5; अपोजी लागू नहीं है, पेरीजी प्लस 0020.5 है; 1797.7, 8:35, 268, 264, प्लस 16410, माइनस 00145, माइनस 07338 लागू नहीं है। और मेरे पास आपके लिए दो गिम्बल ट्रिम कोण हैं जिन्हें अपडेट किया जाएगा। फिलहाल, हम चाहते हैं कि आप पिच 5.86, रोल 6.75 के साथ आगे
Oh, snowing. No - no, not quite. The windows are in pretty bad shape, and I guess the service module - we'll be trying to shoot out of the window, because every window in th
R
ジム、この制御モードについて考えて、今のあなたの知識から見てうまくいくかどうか考えてみてください。私たちは少し懐疑的ですが、あなたに提案したいと思います。それでは、姿勢がかなり良くなったら、 でモニターし、 （私たちが設定したように） MINIMUM IMPULSE （最小インパルス） に切り替え、ヨーレートを （右方向のヨーレート） に設定してください。 （R3）の中央ジンバルをモニターし、
Mir ist bewusst, dass du immer noch vers
Roger. Le panneau 9 est configuré en VHF, RÉCEPTION. Vous voulez
Здесь, на улице, образуются всевозможные инверсионны
रॉजर, बिल। धन्यवाद। और जब आपको सुविधा हो, क्या आप हमें रीडिंग दे सकते हैं? और जहाँ तक इसकी बात है, शुरुआत के लिए यह बि
Generell scheint der Aufenthalt im Schatten keine thermischen Auswirkungen zu haben. Im Inneren des Anzugs gibt es natürlich einen Unterschied in der Strahlu
Und ich installiere den Spritzschutz, den Nackenschutz, den Umlufthebel der Kabine nach oben. Den linken Schnorchelhebel nach oben, den Kabinenlüfterhebel nach oben. Den Lukenentriegelungshebel in der Luft halten. Sicherstellen, dass die Wasserabdichtung unten und geschlossen ist. Die Reißleine anbringen, linke Luke öffnen. Die Überlebensausrüstung des Kommandopiloten über der rechten Seite des Raumschiffs verstauen. Die gesamte Bergungsschlaufe... rechte Seite des Raumschiffs. Sie gehen mit Ihrem Überlebensset 
罗杰。一切正常。一切看起来都很好。自动燃油还有55%。正在飞越7
D'accord, je vous l
Have you noticed how long I've 
Gémeaux VI, Hawaï CAP
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, हवाई कैप कॉम। यूएचएफ पर आपकी आवाज साफ सुनाई दे रह
但是，我们确实确定了埃尔帕索地区，而且在我们看来，那里云层似乎出现了一个缺口，我们向那个缺口望
बज़, ये ह्यूस्टन ह
きっと今頃、音が聞こえるはずです。キャット
रॉजर। इको 0.3 और 7.6 की प्रतिलिपि बनाएँ, 
고객님의 
- - لكنني
आपने अनुमान से कम कैलोरी खर्च की है और आपको काफी आगे होना चाहिए थ
아니요. 먼저 스캐너 
友
Ci credereste che state guardando uno stufato di pollo? Tutto quello che dovete fare è... 85 ml di acqua calda per 5 o 10 minuti. Ora prendiamo l'acqua calda da un piccolo rubinetto qui sopra con un filtro che filtra eventuali gas presenti nell'acqua potabile, e basta infilare l'estremità di questo piccolo tubo nel rubinetto e premere il grilletto tre volte per ottenere 85 ml di acqua calda, poi schiacciamo il tutto e tagliamo l'estremità, ed ecco fatto, uno splendido stufat
はい、
저는 괜찮습니다. 계속 비행하세요. 기계는 안정적으로 작동하고 있습니다. 창밖으로 지구, 하늘, 지평선이 보입니다. 비행은 순조롭게 진행되고 있습니다. 제 말 들
알겠습니다. 휴스턴 대학교 농구팀이 어젯밤 홈 경기에서 3년 반 만에 처음으로 패배했다는 소식도 전해드렸습니다. 일리노이 대학교가 간신히 이겼죠. 국무부는 방금 전 푸에블
제미니 VI, 휴스턴. 저희는
현재 수치는 1.7입니
Ja, das werden wir ganz sicher
現在、
Roger. S
Je vous entends bien. Le son est bon avec 
알겠습니다, 빌. BIOMED 데이터가 여전히 좀 이상하네요. BIOMED 하네스의 파란색 신호 컨디셔너를 확인해 보시겠어요? 가운데 패키지에 파란색 커
대기하세요. 네, 버즈. 좋아 보입니다. 좋은 결과입니다. 이상
好的。回答你的问题，乔，答案是否定的。我一直都在检查舱室。从定
Boy, you just ca
Хорошо. На панели 11 вам нужно замкнуть ав
जेमिनी VI. अपना वॉइ
Gemini 4, это Гавайи передают данные вслепую. Рыскание — 0°, тангаж — 60°, немного правее вас, курс вверх, 300 морских миль. Повторяю еще раз. Вслепую, Гавайи передают данные, 01 39 00, Pegasus, Рыскание — 0°, тангаж — 
Это Sigma Seven. Я вас слышу. Сообщение довольно...
저희는 전혀 모르겠습니다. 이상입니
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। इस मोड से सब लोग बेहद खुश हैं। हम यहाँ थोड़ी देर रुकना चाहेंगे। टेलीमेट्री बहुत बढ़िया है, और आवाज भी शानदार ह
Roger. Noi... Non 
13, Houston. Wir arbeiten gerade an der 
PRESSION D'URGENCE DE LA CABINE 
Wir werden d
Хорошо. Я доделаю это до конц
Un grand merci à tous ceu
Okay, Jack, wir dachten nur, es 
I turned the auto heater back
È la mia immaginazione o hai 
روجر. ٥٠٠٠ متفرق؛ رياح شمالية غربية ١٠؛ ارتفاع الموج ٣ أقدام؛ مقياس الارتفاع ٢٩٨٦؛ نداء قوات الإن
Хорошо, Водолей. Когда ты почти настроишь её на нужный лад, и будет казаться, что ты достаточно близко подошла, мы бы хотели попробовать режим управления и посмотреть, сработает ли он; что-то вроде полу-. Мы оставим мяч включенным на это время, и если это не сработает,
收到。我们已收到。我们会做好准备，等待您发送任何内容
Non, non. J'espère que vous ne vous approchez pas trop du sol. On a un autre couloir à parcourir
좋아요. 제
태평양 사령부, 여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. 
التقطت صورة بالعدسة المق
Proprio in questa zona non credo ci siano molte zolle di *** polvere fine *** i
Точка номер 20 7.4, 101.07, 155, 216.9,
好的。5，/：47 更正 - 45701
وقد حصلت على تقييم 
飛行中に、自動光学系が選択した星の位置まで移動しないことに気づきました。例えば、一度アルフェラッツを選択したものの、そこへは移動せず、星のない場所まで移動し
Okay. Halb-Einheitsvektoren der Sonne: R1 plus 45483, R2 plus 19053, R3 plus 08262; Halb-Einheitsvektoren der Erde
Es sieht so aus, als wären wir so gut wie aus dem Taifungebiet heraus. Ich warte noch ein Stück weiter und versuche dann, eine Übersichtsaufnahme des gesamten Gebiets zu ma
Роджер. И добро
忙しいのは承知していますが、ジャックに時間ができたら、コマ
गेज सहसंबंध रिपोर्ट पूर्ण हो गई ह
11，休斯顿。收到。你的角度是45度和255度。我的理解是，载波断开后，天线角度就变成了这两个角度；还是说，上行载波恢复、天线重新捕获
Quello è Cha
Это подтверждается. Как только мы это согласуем и получим временной промежуток, наши уважаемые специалист
是的。而且由于晨昏线的
Houston, Colombie. Mon transpondeur 
عليّ أن أجلس وألصق المزيد على ذلك الشريط أ
Zw
D'ac
Ну, мы остановились и выполнили грубое выравнивание, затем
Roger. And remember we're not going to have a ball there, so that we're going to be monitoring CDUs on the, and if we get it off, it will be pretty hard to figure ou
I say, I believ
アポロ
わかったよ、ジョー。正直に言うと、ここがどこにあるのか把握しようとし
Okay. Very interesting. We'll see if we can figure out where that's relative to you. Th
感谢你所做的工作，杰克说，要打破他往返全程节省燃料的记录将会
Роджер. 1, /: 62844 минус 161, плюс 129, минус 29840, плюс 0239
जिम, सर्किट ब्रेकर को सर्किट ब्रेकर एक्टिवेशन पेज पर चालू किया 
Угол крена - 55 гр
了解。読み上げは良好です。では、続きです。6ページには何もな
لنشغل بعض الم
알겠습니다. 집 측면의 16번 패널에 CB 배터리 전원 공급 연결선 두 개가 열려 있고, 배터리 1은 고전압 차단/리셋 후 꺼짐, 배터리 2
Хорошо, а ещё у
Okay, ich manövriere zur Mond
Roger. Je sui
The high thrusters work well, close
좋습니다, 아폴로 8호. 모
ठीक है, जैक। अब चंद्
Привет, 13-летний Хьюстон. Громко и четко. 13-летний Хьюстон чита
Bien reçu. Nous vous recommandons de poursuivre votre
わかりました。これは高速帰還のためのペリシントス+2です。これは/62871、マイナス161、プラス129、プラス45224、マイナス06216、マイナス18712 001 287 351、11月のアルファ星プラス00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296、地球上010、右37、プラス1475、プラス06500 13239 36913です。主星はシリウス、副星はリゲル129 155 010、アレージなし、中間軌道修正4の実行を前提とし、同じ配置を使用します。GERU決定のための5の時間は、ゴルフエコーロミオユニフォームです。これは次のようになります。 NC-4 の手順 1 から 10 と、NC-8 の手順 3 と 4 を使用します。もう一度言いますが、November Charlie 4 の手順 1 から 10 と、November Charlie の手順 3 と 4、廊下
Rog
ठीक है, क्या 
इस समय आपको पुनः 
Хорошо. Закройте запорный клапан, оставьте выключатели TCA закрытыми, закройте 
هل لاحظت كم من الوقت ب
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP 
केप से बात करने की कोशिश कर रहा हूँ। लेकिन लगता है उन्हें पता ही नहीं कि मैं अभी भी बात कर रहा हूँ। क्विटो, मुझे उनकी आ
For
MAN ATT、3 -
D'accord, Fred. Tout d'abord, les préparatifs, en commençant par la liste de vérification des imprévus (page 24), sont recommandés. Nous serons ravis de recevoir vos commentaires à ce sujet. Deuxièmement: lorsque vous êtes en position de manœuvre, vous devriez voir le soleil tout en haut. Il séparera le curseur lorsque celui-ci est positionné à zéro. Attention cependant: la manœuvre peut se désengager très facilement, car elle est très sensible au roulis et au lacet. Sachez que la position est en cran 2, mais la manœuvre est très peu sensible à la durée et à l'
弗雷德，我提前通知你一下，备用气罐的二氧化碳浓度快要达到极限值
Except we're between - Looks like we're between two contrails, on
Роджер. Продолжаем с «Марун Бугл». Президент Никсон удивил ваших жён телефонным звонком из Сан-Франциско незадолго до того, как сел на самолёт, чтобы встретиться с вами. Все они были очень тронуты вашей телепередачей. Джен и Пэт наблюдали за происходящим из Центра управления полётами. Запуск спутника Intelsat с мыса Канаверал был отложен в четвёртый раз прошлой ночью. Причиной, как сообщается, стала неисправность регулятора азота во второй ступени ракеты Delta. Новая попытка запуска будет предпринята сегодня вечером. Исследовательская подводная лодка «Бен Франклин», изучающая Гольфстрим, установила рекорд, дрейфуя 24 часа на высоте от 3 до 30 метров над дном океана на глубине 400 метров у побережья Джорджии. Миссию возглавляет Жак Пикар. Уолли Ширра избран на пятилетний срок в попечительский совет Детройтского технологического института. Он будет работать в комитете по развитию института. Air Canada сообщает, что за последние 5 дней приняла 2300 бронирований на полёты на Луну. Следует отметить, что более 100 таких песен были написаны мужчинами для своих свекровей. И наконец, похоже, что вместо того, чтобы убить романтические песни о Луне, вы вдохновили сотни авторов песен. Нэшвилл, штат Теннесси, где, вероятно, находится крупнейшая в стране коллекция звукозаписывающих компаний и издателей песен, сообщает, что его буквально заваливают песнями о Луне. Некоторые из них добьются успеха. Песня, возглавляющая список бестселлер
Nous nous sentons tous bien; nous allons régler le problème maintenant a
Sì, non sapevo quando diavolo fossimo in volo; mi fidavo solo della sua parola. Stava tremando, sferragliando e rotolando, fi
Насколько я помню, в тот момент у вас было на 6 секунд больше номинального времени работы, которое на 3 секунды больше, чем вре
很抱歉我说的是 +
Okay, 8. We just got an answer back on the test patterns. We tho
Хорошо, пилот. Думаю, я бы предпочёл остаться внутри, чтобы
Roger, Mike. Ora siete a cinque per cento sull'alto guadagno
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴에서 카나본을 거쳐 통신하는 무선국입니다. 무전 점검 완
Okay, Charlie. T
Верно. Думаю, что вторая производная графика зависимости м
Très bien. J'y réfléchissais. J'essaie de charger le plus de poids possible dans cette soute. Nous n'avons pas d
Roger, this is Friendship Seven, u
This is Friendship Seven, ATS. Do
Columbia, Houston. Abbiamo un altro paio di vettori da inviarti. A
Roger, Buzz. Es handelt sich um einen Eintrag PAD, MPL, beginnend mit Roll 05, 35 - Kor
À noter concernant la configuration de cette station d'accueil: la sonde d'amarrage du module de commande se trouve en plein milieu de l'encoche; plus précisément, le voyant d'amarrage est situé au milieu de celle-ci. Et lorsque le sol
हां। उन्हें वह डेटा मिल गया था, और वे यह देखने में रुचि रखते थे कि जब केबिन अच्छा और गर्म होता है और तापमान संकेतक उच्च स्त
रॉजर। यह नॉर्मल मोड में है। जब से हमने वहां ताला तोड़ा है, तब से मेरे पास कमांड रीसेट है, और मुझे वापस जाकर ओम्नी को कंट्रोल करना है, तो क्यों न आप इसे डॉग को कमांड दे दें। फिर इसे वापस दे दें, और मैं दूसरे वाले को ब्र
알겠습니다. 세계 뉴스 다른 소식으로는, 푸에블로호 승무원들이 어제 오후 NAS 미라마에 도착했고, 발보아 병원에서 가족들과 함께 크리스마스를 보내며 며칠간 머물 예정입니다. 지역 소
आप आ रहे हैं - लगभग 2 मिनट बाकी ह
좋아요, 그럼
Roger. Nous allons commencer par l'actualité internationale. Les messages diffusés la veille de Noël, alors que le petit vaisseau spatial orbitait autour de la Lune, ont suscité des éloges pour les astronautes américains d'Apollo 8 et l'espoir d'une coopération internationale dans l'exploration spatiale. Même dans le monde communiste, l'enthousiasme était palpable pour le premier voyage de l'homme sur la Lune. À Moscou, le scientifique soviétique Anatoly Besaranov a rappelé que son pays et les États-Unis avaient déjà partagé des connaissances spatiales et a prédit que le vol d'Apollo 8 mènerait à une coopération accrue. À Cuba, Radio La Havane a rediffusé le programme de la Voix de l'Amérique pour informer ses auditeurs du discours d'Apollo 8. Les responsables de la Voix ont indiqué que c'était la première fois que les programmes d'une agence américaine étaient diffusés par la radio de La Havane. La Tchécoslovaquie a suivi le vol lunaire grâc
نعم، لنلتقط بعض الص
现在我们拥有了近乎完美的观星条件，月光的影响微乎其微。正如我们之前所说，根据我们的校准，以南冕座星
휴스턴
Clear blue sky; 32 seconds; 9,000 [feet], fuel and oxygen steady; cabin pressure 15.1 [psia]; and dropping. A little rough through max q, and 1 minute
はい。ハッ！ハッ！
سؤال يا جو. كان جيم يتحدث معي عن ك
ठीक है। इंजन बंद करो; एसीए
こんにちは、
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di 
Ha! Ha! J'ai encore des traces de freinage sur mes palmes à cause de ton escapade dans la brousse. Bon, tu vois, j'ai encore viré à droite. Je dois… correction, j'ai viré à gauche. Je dois aller à droite, la lune est juste à l'horizon. Je vais la remettre sur la bonne voie, juste pour te montrer comme c'est facile. Il semblerait que mon niveau de carburant soit correct, alors je vais faire quelques essais. Bon, on est presque sur la bonne voie, et encore un peu à côté en roulis. Je vais
Roger. We're doing the PRO
Колумбия, Хь
Okay. Nach Nummer 1, erste Zeile, streichen Sie „And VHF-A“. Zweite Zeile, streichen Sie „SIMPLEX operation“. Dritte Zeile, streichen Sie „Prime“. Das bezieht sich auf PRIME POWER AMP, OFF. Das heißt, „PRIME“ sollte durch OFF ersetzt werden. Und das ist das zweite Mal, dass Sie diese Zeile streichen. Auch in der dritten Z
ジム、今単眼鏡を覗いているんだけど、言葉を借りれば、この景色はただただ美しい。まるでこの世のものとは思えない。地中海の島々が全部見える。マヨルカ島、サルデーニャ島、コルシカ島といった大小さまざまな島々が。イタリア半島北部には少し霞がかかっていて、ギリシャには積雲がかかっている。東地中海には太陽が沈みかけている。イギリス諸島は、スペイン半島の島々の茶色がかった緑よりも、明ら
Roger. Concordo. Ora sto cerc
听起来不错，休
Non ho capito. Dovremo abbassare un po' il tono qu
わかった。フレッド、君の弱々しい声を聴いてるよ。さあ、
Хорошо. На какой странице нужно за
ठीक है। आपके सेकेंडरी रेडिएटर इनपुट का तापमान लगभग 72 डिग्री है; रेडिएटर आउटपुट का तापमान लगभग 30 डिग्री है; ग्लाइकोल वाष्पीकरण तापमान लगभग 65 डिग्री है; भाप का दबाव उच्च स्तर पर है, ग्लाइकोल डिस्चार्ज दबाव लगभग 9 psi है। सेकेंडरी एक्यूमुलेटर सूट का तापमान लगभग 52 डिग्री है; केबिन का तापमान लगभग 58 डिग्री है; सूट का दबाव 4.1 है, केबिन का दबाव 5 है। CO2 का आंशिक दबाव 1 से थोड़ा अधिक, लगभग 1.1 है। घर के बाहरी हिस्से का तापमान 72 डिग्री है, हीलियम का दबाव 3500 है; N2A का दबाव 2300 है; N2B का दबाव लगभग 2450 है। ईंधन का दबाव लगभग 165 डिग्री है; ईंधन सेल 1, दोनों बंद हैं, उनमें कोई गत
Роджер. Возможно,
짐, 몇 가지 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 첫째, 폐기물 저장실 환기구를 닫아야 하는 시간입니다. 그 
Die Spitze des nächsten kleinen Hügels dort. 
イー
わかりました。モニターでは非常に明るく表示されま
I also can see the light on my, on steam from the thruster when I opera
휴스턴 이글입니다. 화물이 몇 건 있
Well, let's see, we may be offsetting slightly, the Sun looks like it may be a little higher now. Here comes the Earth by and it looks about the same perspective. I'll have to wait to see the Moon on the 
ठीक है। कॉपी करने से पहले, मैं इसे यहाँ पूरा पढ़कर सुना देता हूँ ताकि आपको समझ आ जाए कि हम किस बारे में बात कर रहे हैं। इस छोटे से पत्र का शीर्षक है "टीवी और फिल्म फोटोग्राफी सहसंबंध प्रयोग", और वे क्या करना चाहते हैं: टेलीफोटो लेंस वाले टीवी कैमरे को ब्रैकेट पर लगाकर, रेंडेज़वस विंडो में पृथ्वी की टीवी तस्वीर लेना, लाल और नीले फिल्टर के माध्यम से, प्रत्येक फिल्टर के लिए 1 मिनट का समय; यानी लाल और नीले फिल्टर अलग-अलग। फिर वे लाल फिल्टर के माध्यम से पृथ्वी की टीवी तस्वीर लेना चाहते हैं, इस मामले में, 25 अल्फा फिल्टर को पोलराइजिंग फिल्टर के साथ मिलाकर। पोलराइजिंग फिल्टर को 360 डिग्री घुमाएँ, फिर से प्रत्येक स्थि
Роджер, Хьюстон... передайте информаци
..
Roger, Friendship Seven. Aeromed aimerait savoir si vous avez effectué votre exercice avec un él
Роджер. Позвольте мне дать вам лайфхак и рассчитать новое время ретроградного движения о
Roger. Understand, Bill. Y
Roger. Wir beginnen mit den Weltnachrichten. Lob für die amerikanischen Apollo-8-Astronauten und Hoffnungen auf internationale Zusammenarbeit in der Weltraumforschung wurden mit den weltweiten Weihnachtsbotschaften verbreitet, während das kleine Raumschiff den Mond umkreiste. Selbst in der kommunistischen Welt herrschte Begeisterung für die erste bemannte Mondlandung. In Moskau erinnerte der sowjetische Wissenschaftler Anatoli Besaranow daran, dass sein Land und die Vereinigten Staaten bereits zuvor Weltraumwissen ausgetauscht hatten, und sagte voraus, dass der Apollo-8-Flug zu einer verstärkten Zusammenarbeit führen würde. In Kuba wiederholte Radio Havanna das Programm von Voice of America, um seine Hörer über die Apollo-8-Rede zu informieren. Laut Voice-of-America-Vertretern war es das erste Mal, dass ein Programm einer US-Behörde im Radio von Havanna ausgestrahlt wurde. Die Tschechoslowakei verfolgte die Mondlandung durch eine umfassende Fernsehberichterstattung; und in Budapest, Ungarn, war das Thema in Zügen und Bussen allgegenwärtig. In der nicht-kommunistischen Welt hielten Büroangestellte und Weihnachtseinkäufer den Atem an, als das Raumschiff für den Start zur Erde vorbereitet wurde. Franzosen auf der Straße lobten das amerikanische Know-how und die Weltraumleistung, und einige Fernsehzuschauer jubelten beim Betrachten der Mondbilder: „Magnifique!“. In London drängten sich Scharen von Weihnachtseinkäufern in Geschäfte und Pubs, um die Fernsehbilder der Mondkrater zu sehen. Großbritanniens führender Weltraumastronom, Bernard Lovell, der das Apollo-8-Projekt bis vor wenigen Wochen kritisiert hatte, weil Instrumente die Aufgabe hätten erledigen können, ohne das Leben der Astronauten zu gefährden, machte deutlich, dass er von der Mondlandung tief beeindruckt war. Papst Paul VI. würdigte die Pioniere der Erweiterung des menschlichen Intellekts und seiner Fähigkeiten. Nur wenige Miesepeter belächelten die Weihnachtsreise. Der bekannteste war Samuel Shenton, Sekretär der Londoner Flat Earth Society, der behauptete, die Öffentlichkeit werde hinters Licht geführt. Was hältst du dav
Roger. Pa
روجر، نتفق تمامًا. وبينما أنت منهمك في ذلك، سأقرأ هذه الملاحظات. اتصل ببرنامج الإنذار المحتمل 5.6، إذا كان المدى أكبر من 400 ميل بحري، ثم استخدم كما هو موضح في 20. اختر الخيار 1 في NOUN 06، واستخدم وضع عدم التحديث. سيُثبّت رادار الا
알겠습니다. 배트 5번과 6
Esatto, Apollo 8. E tra poco avremo un altro paio di cose da raccontarvi. Stiamo lavorando a un sorvolo in questo momento. E parleremo ancora un po' del problema dell'osservazione delle stelle con il sestante e il telescopio. E quello che vorremmo fare non appena la squadra nera arriverà sul MOKR, visto che abbiamo due squadre qui, vorremmo avere un riassunto da voi su cosa vedete e cosa non vedete esattamente e in quali condizioni, e vedere se possiamo definir
11, ह्यूस्टन। आपकी जानकारी के लिए, ये दोनों प्रविष्टियाँ आपके
Apollo 8, this is Houston. If you should decide that you want to roll heads up on 2, one thing to remember, be sure yo
C'est exact. Bien, passons maintenant au panneau 5, et il s'agit du disjo
Je suis sûr que ça m'a donné le trac, Jack, mais je n'
Roger, controlla che il fly-by-wire sia semplicissimo. La nostra telemetria cont
Bene. E la nota dice che dovresti essere in grado di sentirci. Se non ti sentiamo tra un paio di minuti, dovresti chiudere l'interruttore del POWER AMP sul pannello 16, e ci aspettiamo di risparmiare un ampere o più in questo modo. Dovrebbe funzionare con l'assetto attuale. Quando passeremo al nuovo assetto di imbardata, stiamo pensando di accendere il 
그러니, 우리는 선박 오수
आपको मेरा एंटीना ठ
.
Okay. Radar, Ortung und zuverlässige Telemetrie bei beiden Fahrzeugen. Okay. Wir zeigen Ihnen hier GO auf dem GET B; 11 + 14 + 29; Delta-V, 9 Fuß pro Sekunde; Brenndauer, 0 + 15; Gierwinkel 00, Nickwinkel 00; Kern 25, 90090; Kerne 26 und 27 
Come ha funzio
Роджер. Продолжаем с «Марун Бугл». Президент Никсон удивил ваших жён телефонным звонком из Сан-Франциско незадолго до того, как сел на
好的，乔。我已经开始了。我选择了选项 3
ATTITUDE CONTROL-D
Cinq boules, plus 0,0, soit 0,8. Ça oscillait à 0,7 un moment, puis c'est revenu à zéro. Je leur aurais donné… c'étai
Üb
ठीक है, मैं आपकी बात भी साफ-साफ सु
Impossibile attenuare sufficientemente il reticolo per un'acquisi
अरे, ऐसा नहीं 
Ho capito che vuoi due set sul numero 40, vicino a
Je suis maintenant en attitude de rentrée atmosphérique. Prêt à passer en mode automatique. Les commandes de vol électriques fonctionnent parfaitement, comme lors de l'entraînement. L'utilisation du simulateur de procédures a donné des résultats très positifs. Le temps passe v
今はどうですか、ヒュ
11, Houston. Zu Ihrem Sauerstoffdurchfluss, Brennstoffzelle 3: Anscheinend war der Durchfluss während der Spülung etwas höher als bei den anderen beiden, aber die Durchflu
Va ben
마지막 말씀을 다시 한번 해주
罗杰，11。这里是休斯顿。大约在71到72小时之间，我们将安排您进行进食，我想这可能已经开始了。71小时：氧气燃料电池吹扫；72小时：更换第6个二氧化碳过滤器，检查二级散热器流量。我们将向您发送一份关于2小时飞行、近地点飞行和返航模式中止的数据块。73小时00分：在大约0度滚转角处停止。也就是说，当您在73小时左右接近0度滚转角时，我们希望您停止飞行。并执行剩余航向的选项3，进行漂移检查。73小时20分：我们将向您提供着陆点、1个状态矢量和目标载荷的最新信息。73
Ge
Bene. Il PAD di ingresso è l'area MIDPAC: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, più 1102, meno 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28; DL e VL, tutti e quattro non sono applicabili; DO, 4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380; la stella di puntamento è Scorpio Theta, in alto 314, a destra 34, vettore di risalita in alto. Commenti: i dati di ingresso presuppongono l'assenza di manovre a metà rotta. Il tu
Hallo Houston. Hallo Houston. Hie
Okay. Let me see if I'm with you. We call up and, on the flashing 0406, we PRO on 
هيوستن،
コロンビア、ヒューストン。君が望まない限り、こ
Beh, potremmo aver rotto il blocco bidirezionale, ma continuavo ad avere circa l'AGC proprio al livello di rumore, al livello di ricezione minimo
대서양 함선, 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 케이프 커내버럴로 연결해 주시면 좋겠습니다. 캡슐을 18
Хорошо. 
로저. 콜럼비아, 당신
目前胶囊处于黑猩猩模式。我主要使用了手动比例调节。现在手动模式占79%，自动模式占81%。看看情况如何。啊，81%，自动模式80%，
मैं पूछ रहा हूँ। मुझे पक्का नहीं पता थ
Okay. We have checked into your time, 16 on your entry is correct. We'll be giving you an updated entry on the scheduled time of. At the same time, we'll be giving you an update of your state vectors for the and. The midcourse correction number 7 was less than seven-tenths foot per second, and we will not execute it
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。请按错误重置键好吗？
سنذهب جميعاً إلى النوم الآن بعد أن نعزف النسخة الأخيرة من أغنية "عيوننا
Questa è Friendship Seven. Il retrogetto automatico è disattivato. Il selettore di modalità è normale, il comando di rateo di volo è normale, il giroscopio è normale. Tutte le manopole a "T" sono inserite tranne quella manuale, che è disinserita. Al momento sto controllando manualmente. L'interruttore del Landing Bag è disattivato. Il pannello di sequenza è tutto normale tranne quello. Il carburante di controllo è al 60-82 [percento]. Gli assetti al momento con controllo manuale sono rollio 5 [gradi] a
Roger. Je suppose que 
Я потерял о
Roger, Ed. Würdest du bitte
Roger. 10, /: 45597, moins 040, plus 157, plus 35189, moins 01513, moins 00346 180 007 000, Novembre Alfa pl
روجر، هل أنت... أود أن أنقل إليك وقتك في المرحل
休斯顿
That's affirma
Здравствуйте, Zanzibar Com Tech. Zanzibar Com Tech, Friendship Seven.
لا شك أن هذا الهدوء يؤثر على الكثيرين في الميدان. أعتقد
حسنًا يا هيوستن، لم نحصل على ذلك. كل ما حصلنا عليه هو حرق "
صباح الخير يا قب
Aurora Seven, Cap Com. Pourriez-vous vérifier votre boîte à gants et vous assurer qu'e
Columbia, Houst
Base Tranquillité, ici Houston. L'expérience sismique passive 
收到。那霸救援1号将在溅落时抵达现场，配备跳伞员和救生圈。梅森号驱逐舰将在溅落后约3小时抵达。另外提醒一下，在80公里到50公里之间进行检
프렌드십 세븐입니다. 여기는 인디언 캡 콤입니다. 외과
Okay. Unter Zeile 4: Unter HEIZUNGEN sollten Ihre QUAD-Heizungen – also alle vier – geschlossen sein. Öffnen Sie DISPLAYS, S-BAND-ANTENNE und SEQUENZKAMERA. Darunter: Öffnen Sie DISPLAYS, schließen Sie DC BUS VOLT, öffnen Sie INVERTER 2, AS
ATT翻译，四架喷
Ok, continueremo co
Мы по ней скучали, Фред. Давай 
Roger. Es 
네, 맞습니다. 그럼 간단히 설명드리자면, 먼저 전원을 켜고 8볼을 올린 다음, 자세를 설정하고, 앞쪽 창에 표시를 하고, 유도 제어는 당연히 작동시키겠습니다. 하지만 수동으로 우주선의 방향을 조정해서 지구 중심이 Z축 바로 위에 오도록 하세요. 그런 다음 Z축을 중심으로 회전해서 초승달 모양의 꼭짓점이 Y축에 오도록 합니다. 이렇게 하면 앞서 설명드린 대로 X축이 태양 방향을 가리키게 됩니다. 즉, 초승달 모양이 위쪽을 향하고 꼭짓점이 
Your RCS is looking 
Okay, Jim. Wir wollen dir da entgegenkommen; es ist ein Thema, das wir mit dir besprechen wollten. Wir haben darüber nachgedacht, und unsere Meinung dazu ist – natürlich liegt die Entscheidung bei dir, aber wenn wir die Vor- und Nachteile abwägen, hast du ja bereits den Vorteil genannt. Wir führen kurz vor EI minus einer Stunde eine Luken-Integritätsprüfung durch, und wenn diese beschädigt ist, hättest du große Schwierigkeiten, in die Anzüge zu schlüpfen. Andererseits könnten die Anzüge dich erheblich verlangsamen, ganz abgesehen von der Zeit zum Anziehen. Außerdem besteht die Sorge, dass dir nach einer gewissen Zeit in den Anzügen zu warm werden könnte und wir dann die Anzug-Loop-Anlage zur Belüftung der Anzüge aktivieren müssten, was wir vermeiden wollen, da es viel Energie kostet. Daher hätten wir dir empfohlen, den Anzug nicht zu tragen, da wir keinen Grund zur Annahme haben, dass die Integritätsprüfung e
Tous les systèmes sembl
Хорошо. Можете о
جيميني 8، هذه هيوستن
了解。ヒューストンから連絡がありました。準備がで
Say, Jim, 
我现在开始从潜望镜里看到日出了。这是这次轨道飞行中，由于夜侧的原因，潜望镜里出现了第一束光。很明显，在夜侧进行逆向姿态调整时，潜望镜完全不起作用。我看到的第一束光几乎就在……。日出正迅速地透过潜望镜照射进来。我确实看到了约翰提到的那些发光物体，而且我可以敲掉一些。我明显感觉到它们像一片光斑，大小不一，从小到亮都有。潜望镜本身太刺眼了。我得把海图盖在上面，这样才能看清窗外。我随时可以进行逆向姿态调整，所以除了看着窗外，我别无他事可做。前提是宇航服电路运行正常。那张海图真是帮了大忙，可以遮住那该死的潜望镜。这些物体分布范围相当大。正如斯科蒂所说，确实可以把它们从舱门上敲下来。它们正以肯定的速度远离太空舱，这一点毋庸置疑，它们的远离速度与你不同。它们的速度明显比太空舱本身慢。轻轻
곧 지평선이 보이기 시작할 거고, 아마도 햇빛이 눈을 부시게 할 겁니다. 그럴
今、つる座を眺めていますが、星々はとても鮮明で、4等星や5等星の小さな星まで…夕方から夜にかけては、空は真っ暗で星がはっきりと見えます。少なくとも5等星は見え
Poco fa avevo la visiera aperta per la pillola di xilosio. Tutto il r
Houston, l'accumulatore d'acqua è proprio sulla line
रॉजर, 11. यदि आप पृष्ठ F2-22 पर जाएँग
Ich glaube
Базз держит для в
Роджер. Согласно нашему списку оборудования, наклонная карта места посадки должна находиться в транспортировочном 
Ce qui a pu s
Ja. Das Beben ereignete sich 74 Seemeilen entfernt, und das passive seismische Messgerät registrierte erhebliche seismische Aktivität auf allen langperiodischen Ka
نعم، يمكننا ملاحظة أن الاتصال يتذبذب
そして、ジャッ
你感觉
Der Gierwinkel beträgt momentan ungefähr 0 Grad – 
Ric
هذا
Ja. Sie erinnern sich, dass ich zunächst auf der Schnittseite, auf der die Fernsehkamera war, begonnen und mehrere Gesteinsproben an der Oberfläche sowie einige knapp darunter – etwa 6 bis 6 Meter nördlich des Kraters – genommen habe. Dann fiel mir ein, dass dieses Gebiet wahrscheinlich bereits gut vom Abgas des Landetriebwerks durchströmt worden war. Also ging ich auf die Südseite und nahm dort Proben aus der Gegend um den länglichen Doppelkrater, den wir besprochen hatten, und einige weiter entfernt. Ich versuchte, in der kurzen Zeit so viele verschiedene Gesteinsarten wie möglich zu sammeln. Es gab noch einige andere Proben, die ich zuvor bei unserem Rundgang gesehen hatte und die ich gerne noch einsammeln und der dokumentierten Probe hinzufügen wollte. Leider habe ich sie nicht bekommen. Ich werde in der Nachbesprechung au
わかりました。準備
双子座
了解。
アジェナは好調のようです。TDAは外れました。
Какие результаты 
Rog
Вперед, пр
Okay, auf Seite 18, und das habe ich ber
Роджер. Серия трещин или разломов, пересекающих горизонт, спускается примерно в три этап
Wir streichen Midcourse-3 und haben den Eintritt auf 55 Stunden
إيجل، هيوست
ठीक है। समय 22:25:06; कार्नार्वोन में क्रू की स्थिति रिपोर्ट। अपडेट
Ладно, Базз, мне
Nein, Si
좋습니다, 짐. 아주 잘하고 계십니다. 시끄러운 소음이 없으니 정말 좋네요. 제가
是的，我同意。但为了以防万一出现任何故障，我们决定确保把它
네, 잠깐만요. 끝까지 잘 내려가는지 확
रॉजर, हमें आपका ग्राउंड-टू-ग्राउंड
Мне приходится 
Pour faciliter cette réunion, Jim, nous aimerions améliorer la communication, et nous avons suffisamment de puissance disponible; nous vous demandons donc
Jim, es wi
Хорошо, Джим, на четырех автоматических выключателях QUAD HEATER оставьте их замкнутыми. А включать нагреватели мы будем с помощью выключателей на панели 3
Il y a énormément de cont
रॉजर। मेरे पास अपोलो लैंडमार्क से संबंधित दो अपडेट हैं।
Il faut lancer les chronomètres depuis Carnarvon. Ensuite, réalignez la plateforme. Sortez votre manette
Roger. Frank, we'd like to know about the water chlorination. Have you - when was the last time you chlorinat
今は、振動領域から抜け出して、少し滑ら
Zwilling
ठ
收到。这意味着我的心脏还在跳动
हमें यह देखने क
ヒューストン、私たちにとって本当に大きな変化でした。おかげで再
Affermativo. A quel punto, vorremmo che controllassi le tensioni del bus BAT su entrambi i bus per assicurarti che non ci
मैं आपकी बात सुन रहा हूँ, आपका मूड अच्छा है, आप ठीक महसूस कर रहे हैं, उड़ान जारी रखें, सब कुछ ठीक चल
서지 탱크와 재압력 패키지가 켜져 있
Здравствуйте, Bermuda CapCom, это Friendship S
Звезда, на которую направлен телескоп, — Земля, вниз 037, вправо 22, плюс 10 68, минус 165 00 128 56 361 18. Звезды выравнивания: главная звезда — Сириус, вторичная — Ригель 010, 294, 320, без зазора, возврат по траектории, 8750. Это ведет к Индийскому океану и требует высокоскоростной процедуры, то есть минус Майк Альфа, и это будет указано на вашей странице контрольного списка, ноябрь Ч
حسنًا يا هيوستن. انظر إلى السجل رقم 3 في البيانات. هذه البيانا
OK, j'ai l
Gemini 4, ici Houston CAP CO
Il pallone è scomparso [dalla vista]. A quanto pare sono senza carburante manuale. Devo r
好的，水瓶座；休
아폴로 8호, 다시 위로 올라
알겠습니다. 87x140
罗杰，友谊七号
休斯顿，静海基地将就昨晚的地质问题作几点说明。我们降落在一个相对平坦的陨石坑区，这里分布着许多细长的次生陨石坑——圆形次生陨石坑，大多数陨石坑都有边缘，无论大小。当然，这并非绝对。周围也有一些较小的陨石坑没有明显的边缘。整个区域的地表物质是细沙到淤泥。我认为地球上最接近的物质是石墨粉。在这些地表物质中，分布着各种形状、大小、纹理的岩石，有圆润的，也有棱角分明的，许多岩石的质
Хорошо. R1 плюс 0,34202
Apollo 8. Houston. Ho un punteggio per voi. Oakland 41, Kansas City 6 è il punteg
エントリーブックにもう少し書き込んでおきましょ
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, ici Zanzibar Com Tech, transmission sur HF/UHF. Vous m'e
Roger. Wir verfolgen Ihren Fortschri
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 지금 OMNI Delta로 접속했습니다. 이제 더 잘 알아볼 수 있을 것 같습니다. 항공편 일정 업데이트에서 처음 세 가지 항목을 모두 확인하셨나요? 이상
أوه، هل
Хорошо. В данный момент скорость движения космического аппарата увеличивается примерно на 1 градус/сек по тангажу и рысканию и примерно на 0,5 градуса/сек
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी 
Go ahe
好的，谢谢
Apollo 8. Here we go on a flyby maneuver . This will be an / 63087, minus 162, plus 129, plus 009 62, plus 005 68, minus 020 77 000 000 000, November Alfa, plus 00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013 up 048 right 37, plus 1418, minus 16500 129 04 361 60. North stars 323 090 056, no ullage. Remarks: number one, this requires realignment to preferre
Что касается книг, я думаю, нам следует уделить больше внимания выбору колец. У нас уже два или три раза возникали трудности с их открыванием, а страницы рвутся и не держатся в книге. Нам следует подумать о каком-нибудь усилении отверстий, к которым крепятся кольца. На водяном пистолете маленький сосок, выступающий с конца для выпуска воды, зафиксирован в выдвинутом положении, как и на симуляторе, и позволяет воде вытекать после того, как вы отпустите курок. Время от времени его приходится поправлять, чтобы вода не вытекала из капсулы, когда вы достаете пистолет из упаковки с едой. Еще один момент: на поильном шланге
알았어. 지크 토마스
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप पिछले कुछ समय से ओएएमएस एल्टीट्यूड कंट्र
Okay. Ich glaube, ich habe das falsch verstanden. Ihr habt das VHF-Signal bis 20 km kopiert. Wir prüfen gerade die Downlink-Verbindung. Abe
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。准
Si c'est le cas, mon seul souci est que tout soit en ordre. Bien avant cela… Je veux que tout soit à sa place. Tout le matériel rangé, tout le… prêt à partir, sachant exactement quoi faire et… afin de pouvoir effect
Eh bien, ça a un peu dér
Находясь в том месте, где он находится -
حسناً. لقد حصلنا على أفق مضاء عند دقيقتين ونصف. أفق جم
Dimostriamo ino
分
جيميني 8، جيميني 8، اتصال 
Ok, Houston. La Luna è essenzialmente grigia, senza colore; sembra gesso di Parigi o una specie di sabbia grigiastra profonda. Possiamo vedere un bel po' di dettagli. Il Mare della Fertilità 
T
Roger, Bill. If you have the polarizing filter handy, try flipping
Bonsoir. J'aimerais aborder avec vous quelques aspects symboliques de la mission Apollo 11. En revenant sur les événements de ces deux ou trois derniers jours à bord de notre vaisseau, nous sommes arrivés à la conclusion que cette mission représente bien plus que trois hommes en route pour la Lune; bien plus encore que les efforts d'une équipe gouvernementale et industrielle; bien plus encore que les efforts d'une seule nation. Nous avons le sentiment que cette mission symbolise l'insatiable curiosité de l'humanité pour l'exploration de l'inconnu. La déclaration de Neil, l'autre jour, lors de notre premier pas sur la Lune: « C'est un petit pas pour un homme, mais un grand bond pour l'humanité », résume parfaitement ce sentiment. Nous avons relevé le défi d'aller sur la Lune; relever ce défi était inévitable. La relative facilité avec laquelle nous avons mené à bien notre mission témoigne, je crois, de la pertinence de cette décision. Aujourd'hui, je suis convaincu que nous sommes pleinement capables d'assumer des rôles plus importants dans l'exploration spatiale. Avec le recul, nous sommes tous particulièrement satisfaits des indicatifs que nous avons choisis avec soin pour nos vaisseaux spatiaux, Columbia et Eagle. Nous sommes particulièrement fiers de l'emblème de notre mission, représentant l'aigle américain apportant de la Terre, de la planète Terre à la Lune, le symbole universel de la paix: le rameau d'olivier. C'est notre équipage qui a décidé de déposer une réplique de ce symbole sur la Lune. Personnellement, en repensant aux événements de ces derniers jours, un verset des Psaumes me vient à l'esprit: « Quand je contemple les cieux, œuvre de tes doigts, la lune et les étoiles
R
好的。您使用的是 OMNI Bravo 系
ठीक है। अपोलो लैंडमार्क अपडेट की कॉपी प्राप्त करन
E 11, Houston, ho un aggiornamento su circa quattro e
휴스턴,
夏威夷首都通讯中心，大家好。这里是Sigma Seven
好的。开始时间是18:1
好的
Roger. E ricorda che 
로저. 훨씬 더 잘 알아들을 수 있겠네요. 이제 허니서클을 통해 목
OK, 13; ici Houston. Veuillez consulter votre liste de contrôle G&C, les pages roses, 1 à 
Apollo 8, Houston. Looks like we're getting pretty far off in both pitch and yaw. Showing about 50 
نعم، أعتقد ذلك. انتظر لحظة وس
どうなるか分かっていたら、ボトルであんなに遠くまで行くことはな
मुझे आश्चर्य हो रहा है। जिम,
Charlie, meintest du, du hättest Neuigke
好的。还
アポロ8号、アポロ8号、ヒュース
Хорошо. Что касается цветов, вода вся королевского синего цвета; облака, конечно, ярко-белые; отражение от Земли кажется намного больше, чем от Луны. Суша в основном коричневатая – от темно-коричневого до светло-коричневого цвета. Видно множество вихрей облаков, образованных различными погодными ячейками. Длинная полоса – похоже, перистых облаков – простирается от входа в Мексиканский залив прямо через Атлантический океан. Терминатор, конечно, сейчас пересекает Атлантический океан, идя с севера на юг. Южное полушарие почти полностью затянуто облаками, и вблизи Северного полюса довольно много облаков. Юго-запад Техаса и юго-запад США – безоблач
ニールさん、お邪魔して申し訳ない
Ладно, с меня хватит VERB 83, 
フランク、作業中です。放射状に外側に広がる範囲を具体的に計算しています。さて、地球はまだありますね。私の理解では、プ
Roger, Mike. The trace on your respiration rate is still flat. If you have time this evening before turning in, we would suggest that you try putting some fresh past
Mike ist momentan nicht erreichbar. Ich werde ihm die Nachrich
Finora funziona bene, Charlie. Ne abbiamo installato uno sulla pistola ad acqua e l'altro sul rubinetto
سأفعل ذ
ठीक है। पंक्ति संख्या 7। इसमें लिखा है "क्षितिज जाँच अभिवृत्ति के लिए पैंतरेबाज़ी।" हम इसे "चंद्रमा-जाँच अभिवृत्ति" कहेंगे और यही वह है जिसके बारे में हमने चर्चा की थी, जैक। 265 का कोण
वहाँ से अच्छ
Va bene. Mol
여러분 모두
この姿勢では、はるか上を見上げているような錯覚に陥ります。地平線がなければ、ただの黒い空です。コックピット内の光量はかなり多いです。慣れてしまえば、もちろんキャビンライトで照度を下げることができます。今のところ、スーツ回路の問題があるので、ここの照度を下げるのは少々気が進まないです。指先で光るライトを多用しています。将来の飛行では、物を詰め込んで一定時間閉じ込めておくことができる万能装置が必要になると言われています。ワッシャーと小さな圧着金属片の問題です。ようやくハッチの上の小さな袋に詰め込んだと思います。スーツの温度はなんとか持ちこたえています。暑いので、設定温度を下げる必要があるでしょう。スーツ回路の反応になぜこんなに時間がかかるのか、私には理解できません。キャビン回路は完璧に機能しています。フライ・バイ・ワイヤ低速飛行に
짐, 세 가지 말씀드릴 게 있어요. 첫째, 컴퓨터는 이제 다시 당신 거예요. 둘째, 지금부터 데이터 전송 완료 전까지는 아무런 조작도 필요 없으니, 그냥 데이터 전송 모드로 가만히 계시면 돼요. 셋째, 방금 시작했던 
हे जो, यह कुछ इस तरह दिखता है कि अगर आप किसी ऐसे व्यक्ति के पीछे रुकते हैं जो धुएं की लंबी लकीर खींच रहा है, और आप उसकी लकी
알겠습니다. 1구역 에코 신호는 1시간 15분 42초입니다. 다시 한번 말씀드립니다. 1시간 15분 42초입니
Okay, Jim. Ora pesa 59 chili. E abbiamo
好的。
이글, 컬럼비아. 시간 되시면 CSI P76 패드랑 NOUN
Okay. The four HEATERS will be closed; DISPLAYS, open; S-BAND ANTENNA, closed; CAMERA SEQUENCE will be open; DISPLAY will be open; DC BUS VOLT will be closed; INVERTER 2 
Ich sehe da draußen einen hellen Stern, das muss die Venus sein. Ich habe leider vergessen, mir John Mayers „Blick aus dem Fenster“ so gut einzuprägen, dass ich mit Sicherheit sagen kann, ob es die Venus ist oder nicht, aber sie ist auf jede
了解。ありが
आप लोग उसके साथ रहना नामुमकिन बना देंगे। वैसे भी, उसके साथ रहना 
알겠습니
Roger, 11. Nous souhaiterions effectuer une vidange des eaux usées à votre convenance prochainement. Aucune heure précise n'est prévue. Au moment de la correction de trajectoire n° 3, soit environ 53 h 55, nous annulons cette correction et tous les éléments qui y sont associés. Pour information, la valeur calculée de la correction de trajectoire n° 3 était de 0,8 pied par seconde (0,8 pied par seconde). Si nous décidons d'effectuer la correction de trajectoire n° 4, la correction de trajectoire n° 4 aura alors une vitesse de 2,0 pieds par seconde. À 53 heures, nous procédons à un réalignement. Nous v
Und Buzz, wir erhalten immer noch keine Daten von Ihrem EKG. Es sieht so aus, als könnten wir nur dann welche erhalten, wenn Sie bei Gelegenheit Ihre EKG-Elektroden austauschen würden. Das sind die mittleren Elektroden, die mit dem blauen Pin verbunden sind; eine Ersatzelektrode befindet sich im Medizinkoffer. Ende
... le sac extérieur... Je le
Bien plus de jeu que sur ma montre préc
Per quanto riguarda la fotografia d'ingresso, se intendete utilizzare un caricatore nuovo di pellicola a colori per interni, vi consigliamo le seguenti impostazioni di esposizione: f11 a 1/250, sei fotogrammi al secondo, messa a fuoco a 2,1 metri per la palla di fuoco; f2.0, 1/60 di secondo, sei fotogrammi al secondo, messa a fuoco a 15 metri quando i paracadute si aprono. Se utilizzate un caricatore, parte del q
Роджер. Может, это потому, что я стою.
로저, 콜롬비아입니다. 네 개의 탱크 모두에 크라이오 교반을 표
Ok. Te ne mando uno. Modalità di controllo: retromarcia automatica; giroscopi no
Vi aggiorneremo sulla regolazione finale dell'altezza sulle Hawaii. Inoltre, vorremmo che controllaste l'asse X... È leggermente fuori tolleranza. Quindi non premete START COMP fino a tardi per la regolazio
——
好的，休斯顿；13. 回答问题 1，噪声水平的变化主要发生在第一级和其他级之间——其他级的噪声水平大致相同，非常安静，而第一级当然在开始时会发
هيوستن، إيجل. أعتقد أنني التقطت إشارتك الآن عبر هوائي عالي الكسب وب
Хорошо. Мы по-прежнему движемся к центральной части Тихого океана, 357 152 359 267, плюс 08:13, минус 16503 066 36221 647 12166 36301 00:28, следующий блок — Ноябрь Альфа, V0 400 02:10 00:25 03:35 08:16 160590 312; Зета Персей, вверх 165, вправо 34, вверх по схеме без выхода; Сириус и Ригель, крен 308, тангаж 209, рыскание 357, никто не участвует. К
자, 물병자리 여
わかりました。AC BUS B の S-BAND ANTENNA は OPEN; 、 OPEN。AC BUS A の TAPE RECORDER は OPEN。2 行目の SYSTEM A の MAIN SOV。QUAD TCA から始めて、4 つすべてを CLOSED にします。CROSS - COMMANDER CROSS-POINTER は OPEN;、OPEN;、OPEN。3 行目の RENDEZVOUS RADAR STANDBY は OPEN、LANDING RADAR は OPEN。STAB/CONTROL の ATTITUDE DIRECT CONTROL は CLOS
All they are doing there is just making sure you get your heater circuit break
لدينا قراءة الرقم 2 وهي 3050، بينما قراءة الرقم 1 هي -3000، ثم تنخفض إلى 2990. لذا لست م
你能告诉我们双子
Il faisait un peu plus chaud ou plus étouffant quand nous sommes arrivés, mais 
分かりました。少し情報があります。コマンドモジュールのリチウム水酸化ナトリウム（LiOH）キャニスターをホース（排出ホース）に接続するための手順を作成中です。ミッションの進行に合わせて大気圏の浄化を継続できます。この手順では、キットを改造してホースを接続できるようにする必要があります。リチウム水酸化ナトリウム（LiOH）キャニスターを改造してホース
好的，第一颗星：修正后的高度角为 15 公里，误差为 4 公里；有效高度角为 12 公里，误差为 7 公里。至于星下点
حسنًا. عاد جاك للتو وقال إن المشكلة لا تزال قائمة؛ إنها تظهر فقط
- - un
Roger. I have an update for 
Roger. Ho appena inviato il tuo comando T/M, in tempo rea
आप कह रहे हैं कि आप अभी 3 डिग्री तापमान पर पिचिंग कर रह
Роджер. Мы завершили экспе
Hey, Jim, we have some photo information to pass up to you. Discussed this briefly with Fred earlier. It's instructions or suggestions for
रॉजर। और उस क्वाड तापमान के बारे में - बोतल पर इसकी ऊपरी सीमा 105 डिग्री है। आप उससे काफी नीचे 
1、G&N：62710，正负 098
روجر. قم بتثبيت الكاميرا على حامل التلفزيون القابل للتعديل وقم بتثبيت الحامل على نقطة تثبيت التلف
Rog
Scende la carenatura principale... Vedo la Terra... la
よし。就寝前のチェックリストに入りました。乗組員の状況報告ですが、薬はまだ服用していません。全員体調は良好で
Not too much. I notice that it's different than when I went to sleep. We are more at an angle now with the terminator of the Earth, so when we started out, we were just about parallel with the terminator, and now we are canted off somewhat. I haven't seen any t
, Big Box 
Jim, solo un punto su cui tu e Fred dovreste riflettere nel caso non siate stati informati, qualcosa di cui si sta parlando un po' ora. Questi conservatori vorrebbero che leggeste la pressione della bombola SHe quando entrate per la familiarizzazione a 58 or
Я подозреваю, что это поле валунов может частично образоваться из-за большого кратера с острыми краями и скалистым обрывом, над которым мы пролетели на заключительном этапе спуска. Вчера я говорил, что он примерно размером с футбольное поле, и должен признать, что измерить его было немного сложно, когда мы приближались. Но я подумал, что он вполне мог бы поместиться рядом с Астродомом, когда мы пролетали мимо него. А камни в окрестностях этого кратера со скалистым обрывом гораздо крупнее, чем эти в
Okay. Rollen 180, Nicken 228, Gieren 001; N/A; plus 0017,9, 6652,2, 7:37, 6626,5 und ich habe den Sextantenschaft verfehlt; - Zapfen - Zapfen, 15,7, Zeta Sagittarius, oben, 08,0; Rollen 2,1; minus 22,81, minus 00 - Korrektur, minus 025,00, 1140,7, 34087, 013:32:14. Startpositionen: Arcturus und Denebola; Rollen 044, Nicken 012, Gieren 025; kein Fül
Okay, gyros are caged, mane
अगर प्रेशियस यही चाहता है, तो मैं इसे यहीं इनर्शियल न्यूट्रल पर 
Oui. Je ne le ferai probablement pas quand le soleil ser
Hey, Jerry, how much water does this - the water dispenser in the lower 
Выглядит неплохо, 
Roger. Loud and clear. We think we are transmitting to y
एक्वेरियस, ह्य
11, Houston. On vous voit retirer le téléphone, le plier
알겠습니다. 비트 전송률이
D'accord. On le maintient ouvert. Cela 
जब तक जैक स्लीपिंग स्टेशन को समेट रहा है, मैंने सोचा कि 
سيبدأ انقطاع التيار الكهربائي ف
Sono circa le 05:25, stiamo passando sopra il Sud America. L
ハッ！ハッ！君が藪に入っていったせいで、僕のフィンにはまだ黒いスリップ痕が残っているよ。さて、また右にヨーイングしたのがわかるだろう。来ないと…訂正、左にヨーイングした。右に来ないと、月がちょうど地平線上にある。もう一度、正しいヨーイングに戻して、どれだけ簡単に到達できるかを見せてやろう。燃料の最小量をキープできそうだから、ここで少しいじってみる。さて、ヨーイングはほぼ完了したが、ロールはまだずれている。彼女を叩き込めばうまくいく。さあ、ロールして彼女をまっすぐにする。ロールが始まる…よし、ここでやめる。私が君に与えられるのはこれくらいだ。ここで少しロールがずれている。よし。さて、これが私が君に
جيميني 4، آر كي في، لم نتلقَ قياس ضغط دمك حتى 
Die Brenndauer beträgt etwa 2:30 Minuten. Befindest du dich im BI
本当に大丈夫
캔턴 컴 테크, 여기는 시그
はい、ここの気温は70度くらいで
R
음, 거의
Neither am I, okay. Why the hell are we maneuvering at all now? Are we st
250 - नील, मुझे अपना कैमरा दो,
Okay, Aquarius; Houston. Du kommst jetzt ungefähr einzeln rein. Sag mir bi
로저, 지도 업데이트가 있어요. 지금은 그리니치 표준시로 10시
Отлично, Дик. Это первый раз, когда у меня появилась 
11, Houston. On a une belle vue depuis le point de rendez-vous – enfin, depuis le hublot. On ne voit perso
제가 다섯 가지를 또렷하게 읽어드리고 있습니다. 그리고 당신은 이 추적 과정을 기록하기 위
Il te reste beaucoup de pellicule là-de
Nous allons couper la partie voix de notre liaison montante afin de ne pas vous déranger pendant notre échange avec Tranquility Base. Si vous avez besoin de nous, appelez-nous; nous pourrons vous répondre sous une minute à u
잠시 기다려 주세요. 아무것도 
Mancano 350.
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Negativa. Mi sono sentito perfettamente normale durante tutto il volo. Mi sento bene.
Roger. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, diesen Einlaufvorgang durchzuführen, wie Sie es beim le
알겠습니다, 밴스. 이제 환기 밸브를 다시 닫아도 되는지, 그리고 배터리 충전도 꺼도 
कुल मिलाकर, मुझे लगता है कि वे काफी अच्छा काम करते हैं, खासकर बंदूकों पर, हाइड्रोजन के बुलबुले को काफी हद तक हटा
Fin de la
Хорошо. СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 71: мы использовали 30 и 37, четыре мяча 1; СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 93: плюс 00016, плюс 00033, плюс 00152; 00 48 15; контрольная звезд
Je me demande si l'un de nos jets d'eau... fonctionne. Bon, véri
रॉजर। मेरे पास आपके लिए कुछ CLA और PLA अपडेट भी हैं। क्या आप इन्हें कॉपी करने के लिए 
Say ag
Vance, nach meinen Berechnungen haben wir etwa zehn Fotos aus dem Erdfe
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie
نتوقع الآن أن يكون الموعد قبل 5 
А теперь мы хотим задать вам вопрос о выравнивании и тому подобном. Мы хотели бы узнать, видите ли вы какие-либо звезды из окна. Мы также хотели бы узнать, можете ли вы использовать сервисный модуль, чтобы отбрасывать тень на окна, а затем смо
Roger. We are getting geared up down here to do the first of the COMM checks. We will
لا بأس
了解、11。押し続けてください。目
Кстати, мы сейчас смотрим повтор ваших передач про TD&E, и на телевизоре изображение довольно хорошее. Для некоторых из нас это была первая возможность пос
아니요. 아폴로 11호, 저희는 그렇게 생각하지 않습니다. 이는 아마도 오차 때문일 가능성이 높으며, 충분히 만족스러운 결과라고 생각합니다. 그러니 이 결과를 받아
...アフリカ上空で写真を1枚撮りました...それはハッセルブラッド誌の露出番号53だったと思いま
了解。GETの燃焼時間は02:18:25、デルタVは50.6、デルタTは1+08、ヨー角は0、ピッチ角は0、コアは25:00506、コア26と27はすべてゼロ、スラスターは後
स्कॉट, मुझे लगता है कि वे प्रतिबिंबित हो रहे हैं। स्कॉट, मैं अब आगे बढ़ता हूँ और कुछ यॉ चेक करता हूँ, बशर्ते मेरे पास देखने के लिए कुछ अच्छा भूभाग हो और कुछ सम
罗杰。请注意，CMP 刚刚
收到，约翰。我们刚刚从断电状态恢复，之前逆变器是关闭的。现在一切正常，接下来的飞行过程中都会保持开启状态。电流和电压读数都正常。通电后，电流降到了大约19安培。一开始最高达到了25安培。这次我是
Okay. Looking over the weather I gave you was - the 2000 foot scattered at the target point may have a 6000 foot broken layer above
Roger, Fred. Lecture correcte, et nous avons maintenant une b
好的。吉姆，我们现在要把S波段
Roger. Gemini VIII, nous avons des informations médicales vous concernant. Premièrement, buvez 
Roger. GET RC 01 00 16; RET 400K, 15 plus 21; RET RB, 20 plus 08; 
Ok, bene. Il passo successivo è ancorare il nastro, e il modo in cui vogliamo che tu lo faccia è tagliare circa 60 cm dal rotolo e poi strapparlo nel senso della lunghezza in modo da ottenere due strisce lunghe cir
了解
알았어, 잭. "파워업" 아래 두 번째 줄에 "POWER to BOTH"라고 되어 있는데, 이걸 "1"로 바꿀 거야. 이렇게 하는 이유는
Хорошо. Нам нужно будет добраться до той сторон
Okay, Wally, give me your cabin dome and
Gem
了解。信じられないかもしれないが、イーグルのラン
Es sind
그 오르막길
了解
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。アップリンクをアップボイス・バックアップに約2分間
Ro
Роджер. У
Должно быть, это... свет. Температура 55 плюс-ми
了解。それは私たちが見ているものと一致してます。設定を変えるために何かしましたか
はい。では、今電源を切ってどうなるか見てみましょう。はい。主電源はオフです。酸素濃度を高く設定している間、7分間電源が入っていました。さて、3時間経過で6
بينما نوجه المركبة نحو الأعلى في هذا الاتجاه، نرى من نوافذنا الجانبية الشمس وهي تمر، وبالطبع نرى الأرض من إحدى نوافذنا ال
로저. 전적으로 동의합니다. 그리고 당신이 그 작업을 시작하는 동안, 저는 이 메모를 읽어보겠습니다. 프로그램 경보 5.6, 범위가 400해리 이상일 경우, 20번 항목에 설명된 대로 진행하십시오. NOUN 06에서 옵션 1을 선택하고 업데이트 없음 모드를 사용하십시오. 랑데부 레이더는 수평선 위 약 25도 고도에서 목표물을 포착합니다. 503 경보가 발생하면 실패로 지정하십시오. 진행 버튼을 누르고 랑데부 레이더가 목표물을 검색하도록 하십시오. 그리고 거리/고도 모니터 스위치를 고도/고도 변화율 위치에 놓아 테이프 미터가 정지선까지 올라
रॉजर, हमने पल्स कंट्रोल का बहुत कम इस्तेमाल किया; नंबर 12 का लक्ष्य बादलों से ढका हुआ था; समय और स्थान का मुझे लगभग सटीक अंदाज़ा था। अगर मैं लक्ष्य देख पाता, तो मुझे लगता है कि मैं उसका पीछा कर सकता था। नंबर 13 का लक्ष्य साफ़ था, और मैं अलेक्जेंड्रिया शहर को देख पाया। हवाई अड्डा... मुझे लगता है... लेकिन मैं हवाई अड्डे को खोजने पर ध्यान नहीं दे पाया। मैं हवाई अड्डे को देख सकता था। मैंने कैमरा चालू किया और उसके ऊपर से गुज़रते हुए कुछ तस्वीरें लीं। प्राप्त डेटा के अनुसार 
Okay. Maybe we ought to - next time split that in half, and put half of it on o
حسنًا، الآن يا جاك... لقد وضعنا أجهزة منع ا
はい。
패널 27
了解しまし
로저, 15분 전입니다. 짐, 재진입 절차에 대한 일반적인 지침을 전달해 드리겠습니다. 63-1 업데이트와
Si può dire che Jim sta diventando piuttosto goffo con questo: ha ottenuto un'altitudine di periplo di tre decimi di miglio infer
حسناً. ممتا
我们想暂时切换到S波段辅助磁带，这样你可以在我们开启高增益的时候把磁带里的内容导出来。我们只
Pour le moment, nous n'avons obtenu aucun résultat satisfaisant avec les éclairages d'horlog
Oui, ils comprennen
Apollo 8, Houston. Ov
はい、できますよ。今、湾岸を越えて来てい
哦，
روجر. أ
Okay. Jack, we'll have your update to you before to
아, 우리가 얼마나 가져왔는지 확인하고, 어쩌면 일부를 아껴 써야 할지도 모르겠어요. 충분한 양이 있는지, 그리고 물도 충분히 확보해야 하니까요. 마지막 날에 물이 떨어지면 정말 곤란하잖아요. 물통을 확인하고 물을 채워서 거기에 보관해 두세요. 아, 그리고 
Хорошо. Время — событие состоится; и нам нужно занять следующее положение: крен 101,0, тангаж 090,0, рыскание — все углы. Углы усиления
حسناً، أبو
Affirm. Okay. This is minus 1 hour 45 minutes, nex
Все в поряд
حسنًا. الصورة الثانية، بعد 
Ganz gut, Jack. Sag mal, du könntest die Leute bitten, sich unsere Brennkarte anzusehen, um zu prüfen, we
उन्होंने टेप प्लेबैक को निरंतर मोड में रखा हुआ है। हम ऐसा
那可不行。恐怕我做不到，戈尔多，除非我能
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لقد وص
Yes, we ought to get
It looked like it was tumbling in an oscillatory manner. It
罗杰，你看起来真不
至于你问的Vance
嘿，你如何通过S波段的通信
はい、前回は CDR ウィンドウにも表示されませんでした。今回はしゃがめば表示され
Rog
おはよう、ケン。今朝のヒューストンはどうです
バズ、そこにアンビリカル接続部がよく見えますね。今、デカールの一つを拡大して見ていますね。「リセットするには、ハンド
Okay. Ich lese zurück: 11, G&N: 37200, minus 060, plus 047, plus 098, 05 2422, plus 41448, plus 03719, minus 02422; NA, 020; der
Хорошо, а если вы перевернёте страницу на Power 8, то увидите оставшиеся для вас функции космического аппарата. У нас есть TM с низкой скоростью передачи данных. Однако у нас нет УКВ-связи. Есть. У нас есть гликолевые насосы. У нас есть вентиляторы для скафандров. У нас есть система подавления шума в кабине, и ждите здесь в режиме управления положением. Хорошо, в режиме управления положением у нас будут 
Can't really tell here. I thi
Roger. C'est exact. À l'étape 5, effectuez l'étape 5. Sous « Activation de la boucle glycolique primaire », étape 1, ligne 1, « CB(16): AFFICHAGE - FERMER ». Il s'agit d'une option; vous pouvez l'utiliser si vous le souhaitez. Omettez
روجر. يرغب مركز كيب في الحصول على تصريح طبي رقم واحد للطيار. نو
ソース圧
Hallo, Apollo 11. Houston. Melden Sie sich in A1, Mike, und sehen Sie na
We hav
알겠습니다. 전화 주세요. 다른 일들을 진행하
Ok. Ho qualche parola di conforto per te. La memoria cancellabile è stata completamente smontata e ispezionata, e sembra che sia tutto a posto. Il tuo non ha avuto alcun effetto. L'unica cosa che potrebbe essere discutibile è che se hai usato un display, potresti 
好的。在此之前，请允
Okay, die Gyrosk
好的，吉姆，由于我们现在处于低比特率模式，无法监控程序报警等情况。我们建议您在船上执行以下操作：按下面板 11 和面板 16 上的“报警器/底座/组件”断路器。这样您就可以监控警告灯了。
네, 좋습니다. 다음으로 사령선 모듈 사진을 보여드리겠습니다. 사령선 모듈에서 서비스 모듈을 보기가 조금 어려울 수 있지만, 만약 보인다면 5번 창을 통해 보일 겁니다. 아래쪽에 계신 분들은 그렇게 생각하실 겁니다. 70mm 렌즈를 추천합니다. 이 사진들은 우선순위 2입니다. 이것은 70mm EL 렌즈이고, 여기에 80mm 렌즈가 장착되어 있습니다. 이 모든 것은 B-3에 있습니다. 80mm 렌즈를 빼고 250mm 렌즈를 장착하세요. 250mm 렌즈는
大约16:03，当我们最后一次飞越加利福尼亚湾墨西哥一侧时，飞机处于完美的小头朝前向下姿态，所以我拍摄了一系列七八张地形
また、テレビテストに関しては、テレビとは独立して、前回テレビを撮影したのと同じ時間枠内、またはほぼ同じ範囲で、地球の赤と青の
네. 보셨어요? 초록색으
حسنًا. إليك بعض التفاصيل حول خطة الرحلة. بالطبع، بما أنه لا يوجد -3، ستحذف جميع بيانات منتصف المسار 3، بما في ذلك 
Cape Cap
Sig
Hat jemand b
Roger. Je vous donne
もう一つのライトが点灯しています。確認した
私たちが持っている RCS を
Okay, I think it would be foolhardy to run any more D-9 Experiments in the daylight, bec
अच्छी तरह से कल मिलते 
А как насчет отчета о
Apollo 11, Houston. Anfordern und annehmen, und wir senden Ihnen Ihren Statusvektor und die Ladung für den Eintritt in d
好的。现在我们看到的是整个地球，包括晨昏线。当然，晨昏线以外的东西我们什么也看不到。你用双筒望远镜能看
Ora, nel controllo del dosimetro, 
Korrektur, wir stelle
ロジャー、ハワイ。ありが
Roger. Eagle's in VOICE mode. How
حسنًا، في تلك الطلعة الأخيرة، التقطنا حوالي 38 صورة باستخدام التصوير الجوي الشامل للتضاريس، بدءًا من منطقة شرق سان دييغو وحتى واجهنا الغطاء السحابي مجددًا. استأنفنا التصوير بشكل متقطع بمجرد أن بدأنا فوق الجزء الجنوبي من الولايات المتحدة، مرورًا بألاباما وميسيسيبي وصولًا إلى فلوريدا. حصلنا على صور ممتازة للطقس في تلك المنطقة، ثم التقطنا صورًا للمطارات حول جاكسونفيل. التقطنا أيضًا صورتين لرأس كيب كود. ربما كانت إحدى أفضل الصور التي التقطناها هي تلك التي التقطناها من الخلف، حيث أظهرنا تشكيلًا جويًا كاملًا على طول الساحل بدءًا من فلو
जो, मुझे यहाँ एंटीना बदलना होगा। ठीक है, जो, मैंने आपका फॉरवर्ड एंटीना
그리
好的，好的，杰克。我本来想说，真是倒霉，指令舱偏偏在这个时候又
Роджер. Понятно. Просто для информации, возможно, вы зачитали это на земле. Я провел расчет перицинфической высоты, используя, во-первых, вектор состояния звезды, с помощью которого мы осуществляли навигацию, дал нам плюс 84,7 миль высоты, а затем мы использовали ваш вектор состояния, который вы нам обновили в прошлый раз. Мы получили 64,2, а затем я провел расчет, используя наш вектор состояния, и получил 82,6
Roger,
次に、121時間12分に予定されている起床時刻で、通常のタイムラインに戻ります。準備作業中に、水酸化リチウムボンベの交換9番を少し見逃してしまいました。今すぐ交換をお願いします。睡眠時の通信は、通常の月面通信構成、つまり構成です
D'accord. Voici un petit bonus: le parachute de croisière se trouve actuellement sur le canapé de Fred, dans le module de commande. Nous l'avons rangé temporairemen
Roger
저희 이산화탄소
最后一步，步骤 7，如果出现任何问题，请将云台初始角度（俯仰角 10 度、偏航角 45 度、横
वॉ
Nous n
Houston, the came do
로저, 11. 확인했습니다. 현장에서도 확인했고
Li hai chiamati? Casco tolto e ripost
Wir sind jetzt über dem Mittelmeer. Es ist ganz leicht zu erkennen. Ich sehe ein paar sehr große Schiffe. Sie sind in Beirut gestartet. Wir sollten südlich von Beirut vorbeifahr
Ну, я пробираюсь туда, где у него нет... Кстати, здесь, должно быть, ест
아, 네, 그럴게요. 꼭 그럴게요. 그... 당신 차의 스트럿이
Sì. Ecco, prendi questo... ancora qualche minuto
Non riesci a estrarre il 
Роджер, мы получили ваши данные с земли. У меня для вас обно
Хорошо. Первый будет маневром,
Roge
음, 그건 최근 유입량이 증가한 결과입니다. 제 생각에는 감소시키기보다는 
わかりました。私たちが作成した飛行計画によると、皆さんが食事を終え、フレッドが就寝し
Roger. 4 revised: SPS/G&N: 38320, minus 055, plus 060 084 30 2749, plus 31380, plus 03475, minus 01032; rol
روجر. بعد حوالي 148 ساعة، إذا لم تكن قد فعلت ذلك بالفعل، قم بتغيير فلتر ثاني أكسيد الكربون، وشغّل سخان خط تنقية الهيدروجين لمدة 20 دقيقة قبل تنقية الأكسجين والهيدروجين. بعد 148 ساعة، نود منك بدء شحن بطارية ألفا بدلاً من 151 ساعة، واترك الشحن مستمرًا حتى نبلغك بالمزيد. بعد 150 ساعة، قم بتفريغ مياه الصرف حتى تصل إلى 10%. نخطط لإجراء عملية حرق تصحيح المسار رقم 5. ستكون عملية الحرق بسرعة حوالي
加油，休斯顿
잠
Игл, Колумбия. У меня сейчас 
C'est parti! Le niveau sonore est trè
자, 아폴로 8
なぜしばらく高利得アンテナを使わなくていい
또 다른 지역 소식입니다. 헌츠빌 카운티 법원이 어제 새벽에 화재로 전소했습니다. 따라서 그 자리에 다시 건설 사업을 해야 할 것 같습니다. 한편, 귀환을 기다리는 가족들에 대한 소식도 전해드립니다. 앤 제임스 기자가 보도한 내용입니다. "우리는 달 뒷면에서 쉬고 있어요." 발레리 앤더스는 크리스마스 이브에 가족과 함께 아폴로 8호가 달 궤도를 벗어나 지구로 귀환하기를 기다리며 이렇게 말했습니다. 앤더스 씨는 화요일 새벽 0시에 도착했고, 이웃들이 아이들을 모두 데려가 우주선이 달 뒤편에 있어 통신이 두절된 동안 가족들이 편히 쉴 수 있도록 도와주었습니다. 프랭크 보먼 대령의 집은 야외에 커다란 상록수 화환 네 개가 걸려 있고, 고운 눈이 뿌려져 있으며, 빨간 리본으로 장식되어 있었습니다. 거실에는 그의 안전한 귀환을 기다리는 크리스마스트리가 놓여 있었고, 금발의 아름다운 아내 수와 늠름한 두 아들 프레더릭과 에드윈은 자정 무렵 달 궤도를 벗어나는 순간을 집에서 지켜볼 계획이었습니다. 평소 같으면 그들은 세인트 크리스토퍼 성공회 교회에서 자정 예배에 참석했을 겁니다. 가족들은 새벽 0시에 모일 예정이었죠. 보먼 가족에는 어린아이가 없기 때문에, 크리스마스 선물 교환은 보먼 대령이 달 왕복 비행이라는 멋진 선물을 가지고 돌아올 때까지 미뤄두기로 했습니다. 마릴린 러벨의 네 아이들은 아이들 입장에서는 아주 평범한 크리스마스를 보낼 거라고 러벨 대위의 아내는 전했습니다. 하지만 선물 이야기는 꺼내기도 꺼려졌는데, 아이들 중 두 명이 바로 옆에 앉아 있었기 때문입니다. "어젯밤에 입었던 옷도 갈아입을 시간이 없었어요."라고 러벨 부인은 말했습니다. 하지만 어른들끼리의 선물 교환은 있을 거고, 크리스마스트리는 러벨이 집에 돌아올 때까지 그대로 있을 겁니다. 액션 라인에 좋은 글이 하나 실렸습니다. 액션 편집자에게 보낸 짧은 편지입니다. 거기에는 이렇게 쓰여 있습니다. "어젯밤에 비행접시로 지구인들에게 깜짝 방문을 하려고 했었는데, 뚱뚱한 남자가 썰
क्या आप मुझे बता सकते हैं कि वे O2 हाई
了解しました。分かりました
Con il sole che abbaglia così tanto, hai... 
فريندشيب سفن
هذا هو فيلم الصد
ठीक है। सबसे पहले आपको बैटरी चार्ज करने की प्रक्रिया को उलटना होगा। ऐसा करने के लिए, पैनल 3 पर, बैटरी चार्ज को बंद करें; एसी इन्वर्टर 2 को बंद करें; पैनल 5 पर, मेन बस टाई बैट अल्फा चार्ली को चालू करें; पैनल 250 पर, सर्किट ब्रेकर बैट अल्फा, पावर एंट
Ken, wir haben hier zwei Faktoren, die den Wärmefluss im Anzugswärmetauscher etwas beeinflussen. Zum einen verzicht
Apollo 11, q
حسنًا يا جاك. يبدو أننا نسير - انحراف طريف هنا، الوض
Apollo 11, this is Houston standin
夏威夷通信技术公司。Sigma Seven。
残りは手に入れまし
13、ヒュース
Вперёд, Гавайи
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। मैं सेक्स्टेंट स्टार शाफ्ट 0590 और बोरसाइट स्टार को सत्यापित करना चाहूंग
네, 그렇습니다. 잠시 열어두었다가 지금은 닫았습니다. 기내 압력은 양호한 상태입니다
分かり
好的，
RATE 
मुझे 0.05 ग्राम वाला लाइट मिल 
ر
Roger. I've been reading you for some time. I've tried to contact you on HF with no success. My status is good; the capsule status is good; control mode is fly-by-wire; gyros caged; maneuver is off. The fuel reads 74-85 [percent]. Oxygen is 87-100 [percent]. The cabin temperature is a bit high at 104 [degrees]. The suit--steam vent temperature is 70 [degrees], and cabin is 80 [degrees], but I believe 
Bene. Puoi aspettarti una pulizia delle celle a combustibile alle 19:00, e dovremmo aver terminato la ricarica della batteria A da qualche parte dopo; e sembra che lì avrai una batteria quasi completamente carica. E ti chiameremo per comunicarti l'ora esatta in cui interromperla. Vorremmo avere una conferma da te sulle procedure al cloro. Ne hai
أنا جاهز تماماً. أعتقد 
好的，杰克。我本来没打算重置那个四路查理的 DROP ISOL 阀。你想让我重置吗？好的。我们刚才
はい、で
It looks like in our power-down (illegible) we're still pulling just a little less than 11 amps. We've got 10 on no. 1 and a little less than 11 on no. 2. The tether - the location of the tether or the umbilical restraint on the outside hatch made it rather difficult to do any EVA work as far as free tether aerodynamics out in front of the spacecraft. Whenever I'd be operating out in that area, the tether would - when it would come to its end would start me back and the reaction would carry me back up towards the - over the spacecraft and back toward the adapter section. That's why I kept going out of sight during my maneuvering out there up above the windows, and then drifting back toward the back of the spacecraft. I continually had to keep pulling myself to get out in the front part of the spacecraft. I wasn't satisfied with the pictures that I was getting. It was rather difficult to keep any of the lanyards that I had on... I had the lanyard on the gun and the tether and umbilical that I was on, and several other miscellaneous type lanyards flailing around and it was difficult to keep them from in front of the camera. You'll notice that perhaps in the pictures that I'll be moving my arms rapidly. I kept trying to move them out of the way so that I could take a picture. I'd say they were in front of me probably about 50 or 60 percent of the time; and the other percent of the time I was not in as good a position as I would like to be. I think I probably took in the neighborhood of a dozen pictures. It 
好
حسناً يا هيوستن، لقد انتقلنا إلى الطاقة؛ كان
然后，当我开枪射击时，之后，几乎所有的事情都发生了……自从那件事开始以来，我又回到了CMC、AUTO……这些事情一直困扰着我。就在那
Хорошо. L2 выглядит так, как показано. L3 выглядит так, как показано; в L3 осталось примерно по
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। CO2 सिलेंडरों के संबंध में, यहाँ PCO2 का स्तर अभी 1.6 है। हमें उम्मीद है कि हमारे पास मौजूद दो सिलेंडरों से हम कम से कम 6 घंटे और काम चला सकते हैं। हालांकि, 112 घंटे पूरे होने पर, जब कई लोग काम पर पहुँच जाएँगे, तो हम दो और सिलेंडर लगाएँगे और इसके लिए हमारे पास नई सरल प्रक
جيميني 4
Vérification des autres systèmes. Ils s
ठीक है, पैंतरेबाज़ी पैड, उद्देश्य: फ्लाई-बाय, /G&N; 63385; प्लस 0.97, माइनस 0.23;; प्लस 0212.7, माइनस 0141.7, म
नहीं। बिलकुल नहीं 
ヒューストン、こちらアポロ8号です。GOとおっしゃ
No, no. Non stiamo commentando il tuo aspetto, Fred. Non int
Or 158, that's about right. 
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 3분 30초가 지났는데, 아직은 괜찮습니다. 예상 종료 시간이
好的。让我说说我对主总线B的观察。当时情况发生得很快，我们先听到了撞击声，或者爆炸声，或者其他什么原因，我不太确定。大约一秒钟后，出现了主警报，提示主总线B欠压。我查看了电压，当时电压正常，所以我怀疑是电压尖峰。燃料电池3也正常，电流正常。然而，就在这时，弗雷德进入了控制模块，坐到了他的座位上。就在他坐下前后
わかりました。飛行計画の詳細は以下の通りです。もちろん、-3はないので、ミッドコース3の項目はすべて削除してください。これには約54時間半と記載されているものも含まれます。これは後で説明します。後ほど説明します。バッテリーの充電時間を3時間増やします。トンネルベントバルブ（DELTA-P）を3時間増やします。その時点で、飛行計画の57時間目に移動し、数値を57時間から54時間に変更して、そこから始めてください。備考欄の約57時間目に「O2燃料電池パージと廃水排出」と記載されています。これより早く実施されていない場合は、54時間50分に実施してください。テレビパス
Jim, wir würden gerne mit der Kalibrierung fortfahren und dann Stern Nummer 15 verwenden und drei Datensätze aufnehmen, gefolgt von Stern Nummer
هدوء، هيوستن. تم توصيل جهاز الترحيل. تسمعون صوت جهاز كتم الصوت (VOGAA). سنحاول إزالته. انت
D'acco
越南局势已经平静下来，目前那边没什
迈
I
네. 아마 조금 물러나야 할 것 같아
That's affirm. Due to the trac
わかりました、ジョー。返して、ここに書いてあるか確認しましょう。その後、六分儀を使ってベネット彗星を観測してもらいます。もし見えるようであれば、ロール角を記録してください。45度から75度の間で見えるはずです。155度ロールで見えなくなるはずです。もし見えたら、写真に撮れるかどうか観察し、観測開始前か後かに撮影する写真の
C'est exact. L'image est affichée sur l'Eidephor. La mise au point est légèrement floue. On voit la Terre au centre de l'écran. Il y a toujours un petit point blanc en bas de l'objectif, apparemment. Et on distingue des terres émergées au centr
जेमिनी VIII, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हमारे यहाँ डेल्टा-पी लाइट्स जल रही हैं, जो GT-7 में आम बात थी, लेकिन GT-8 में नहीं जलनी चाहिए। क्या आप
Roger. Je 
D'accord, Vance. Les étapes suivantes sont séquentielles: CB BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING, fermé. C'est BAT Baker. MDC 3, AC INVERT
ठीक है, जैक, जब तक फ्रेड मेरा हेलमेट रख रहा है, 
Ricevuto. Sono 13 gradi a sinistra dell'ombra. E la prossima domanda riguarda la profondità del campionamento di massa che hai ottenuto vicino alla prima parte del grafico e qualsiasi variazione di composizione che potresti aver osservato durante l'intervallo di 
نعم. إنه جهاز مع
——关闭。所有旋转控制功能
オフです。ありがとうございま
휴
자, 다음 페이
Houston. Le ventilateur cryogénique est en marche; le réservoir d'hydrogène numéro 1 était allumé. Vous pouvez nous donner un coup de pouce quan
Да, это был я. Я использовал трос, чтобы подтянуть себя к космическому аппарату, и фактически я находился прямо над ним. В следующий раз, когда я буду использовать подобный трос, всё будет выглядеть довольно хорошо, но всё равно будет трудно зацепиться за 
我们
Lo facci
好的。仪表显示22%。我们没有任何偏航或横滚控制，也无法重新控制偏航推进器，显然一个都失灵了。不过，俯仰推进器似乎可以正常工作。而且，我们的姿态也正
了解しました。深さ3インチ（約7.6cm）まで到達し、硬い層に接触しておらず、その深さまで組成に大きな変化は見られなかったと理解しています。次の質問ですが、2つ目の質問は時間制限のため、かなり急いでまとめたので、2つ目の質問に含まれていたサンプルについて、より詳細な
Я только что увеличил давление в системе DPS... выглядит нормал
好的，吉姆，回答你的问题，压力增加是正常的，因为它只是在跟踪机舱压力的增
알겠습니다. 이것은 9, /: 45597, -040, +157, +34188, -01353, +
Я приближаюсь к Афри
हम लगभग 13 से 14 एम्पियर के आ
Diese Felsbrocken sehen au
Да, подтверждаю, 
不
好的。在出舱检查清单第6页第1
还剩80
Ok, Houston. Inizi
Questo è Sigma Seven. Vado in fly-by-wi
روجر، جي
C'est exact. Sur les trois lignes suivantes, nous n'avons que 
你好，金丝雀，友谊七号，切换到超
Voyez co
收到。我要给你发送一个双子座卫星数据包。这次请你留意一下DCS指示灯，看看是否接收到
ヒューストン、これは 8 です。両方の状態ベクトルをロードしたと理解してい
Gemini VI, we want to try another tape dump here, just one more try. Would you place your Tape Recorder Control circuit breaker on, and verify the Tape Reco
Okay. 
好的，杰
Es gab keine Probleme, den Mond zu sehen. Als ich nach der Sternenmarkierung in Sichtlinie sucht
ईगल, कोलंबिया। मैं आपके काम में सहयोग करने के लिए तैयार हूँ। बस मुझे ब
Hallo, Schiff des Pazifikkommandos, Schiff des Pazifikkom
روجر. هيوستن، كولومبيا. رح
Давайте посмотрим. В Спрингфилде, штат Миссури, Микки Оуэн, ветеран-кетчер «Бруклин Доджерс», вошедший в историю как игрок, пропустивший третий страйк и приведший «Нью-Йорк Янкиз» к победе над «Доджерс» в Мировой серии 1941 года, решил, что его запомнят не только по спортивному рекорду. Сорок пять мальчиков и девочек получили пони, которых он им предложил. Этих юных дарителей попросили
Le TR-10 est revenu à la normale. Je l'ai déjà fait. Bon, la pression de la combinaison est revenue. Jetez un œil aux onduleurs. 250 correspond à 141 degrés, 150 à environ 107 degrés. C'est suffisant. La pression de veille est de 7, soit presque la pression ambiante. Négative, même un peu... La pression cabine est d'environ 5,3 psi, ce qui est parfait. La température du dôme de la combinaison est de 72 degrés. Celle du dôme de la cabine est de 45 et la cabine est stable. La température de la c
حسنًا، هناك شيء ما يُسبب لنا انحرافًا يا جاك، سواءً في الميل أو الدوران، لذا أظن أن السبب هو ما يُسرّب الهواء من الخلف. اضطررتُ لاستخدام خاصية التوجيه المباشر لتثبيت الوضع، وبمجرد استخدامها، بدأن
Всё то же самое: цель чрезвычай
計器を読みながらですが、250は145度です。これは250のインバータです。150のインバータは105度、スタンバイインバータは119度、逆流温度は75度です。ヨー右100度、ヨー左90度、ピッチダウン96度、ピッチアップ10
Affirmatif. Supprimez ces 
Роджер. Мы здесь, внизу, готовимся к проведению первой проверки связи. 
Roger, W
66.1 대 54.4라니, 이보다 더 좋을 순
Хорошо. Сжигание проводилось в запланированное время 125 19 3470, скорость составляла 51,5 футов в секу
それはすべて理解していますが、この新しい情報に基づいて、別の場
알겠습니다. 수산화물 용기의 배열을 보여주고 싶은데, 있
로저, 제미니 8호입니다. 현재 시간은 03시 47분 35초, 델타-V는 61.2, 델타-T는 1+22, 요각은 0도, 피치는 21도 하강, 코어 25는 00시 570분, 코어 26은 00시 224분, 코
Gemini VI, Houston, abbiamo completato l'ag
Я с
Хорошо. Расск
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 지금 우주복 돔 온도는 어느 정도
Ci sono.
제미니 4호, CS
D'accord. C'est exact. L'étape 8 est: « Sur demande, effectuez l'étape 9. » Autrement dit, vous attendez que nous prenions une décision, conformément aux instructions que nous vous avons déjà fournies. L'étape 9, que je vous donne maintenant, est: « Mise hors tension du moniteur d'hélium et de l'ondul
罗杰. 42 Bravo 分裂 ΔV。 40.120.1+07。 2+
Ok. Capisco; il sole è sul
روجر. أود التأكد من حالة أنظمة التحكم لديك، نظام التحكم الإلكتروني في الانعطاف المنخفض لليمين 
Roger, coming with a report on the Pilot. The last meal the Pilot had was the second day, the fourth meal. I've had 9 swallows of water, and I'm feeling great. The Command Pilot, 3 the third day, and the no. 1 meal, he had the defecation bag and has had about 20 swallows of water. The Pilot is getting ready to eat Meal 3-1 at the presen
정말 완벽했어요! 델타-TIG 제로, 연소 시간 557, 각도 축 값, VGX -0.1, VGY -0.1, VGZ +0.1, 트림 없음, 델
Okay. Du hattest mich ja schon mal gebeten, Joe, 400 plus 3 zu gehen, was ich auch getan habe. Ich nehme an, du hast das Drehbuch wieder geänd
आगे 
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。アップデートが完了しました。コンピュータ
Мы просим вас с этого момента и до конца выхода в открытый космос перевести переключатель количества в положение «
Okay, Fred. Zunächst zu den Vorbereitungen, beginnend mit der Checkliste für Notfälle auf Seite 24. Wir empfehlen, dort zu beginnen, und freuen uns über Ihre Anmerkungen dazu. Zweitens: In der Brennposition sollte die Sonne ganz oben im Bild zu sehen sein. Sie teilt den Cursor, wenn dieser auf Null steht. Beachten Sie jedoch, dass die Brennposition leicht abrutschen kann, da sie sehr empfindlich auf Roll- und Gierbewegungen reagiert. Das gilt für die zweite Rastposition; die Brennposition selbst ist jedoch weitgehend unempfindlich gegenüber Brenndauer und Lage. Anders ausgedrückt: Bei Problemen können wir die Brennposition gegebenenfalls anpassen, und die Lage ist nicht allzu kritisch. Daher gilt für die Brennposition nur eine Regel: Wenn die Drehrate um eine beliebige Achse 10 Grad pro Sekunde erreicht, ist dies der Grenzwert, um die Brennposition zu beenden. Nächster Punkt: Nachdem Sie mit dem Brennen fertig sind und bevor Sie trimmen, lassen Sie bitte Adresse 470 noch e
Могу сказать, что сейчас мы видим круглый мешок, который находится прямо за Фредом, в котором лежит наш вакуумный шланг; а когда мы вернемся внутрь, мы отсоединим вакуумный шланг от наших скафандров, и он будет лежать или прикреплен к люку, который мы откроем, чтобы выйти на лунную поверхность и, конечно же, вернуться обратно. Люк, к котором
Похоже, это примерно р
Bon, à part le gros cratère qu'on a survolé, je crois qu'il n'y en avait pas d'autres dans le coin. Après avoir installé l'EASEP, je suis retourné faire un tour, et pendant que Buzz commençait à déballer les échantillons analysés, je suis allé voir un cratère derrière nous. Il faisait peut-être 20 à 25 mètres de diamètre et 5 à 6 mètres de profondeur, et j'en ai pris des photos. Il y avait des roches au fond, assez grosses, bien plus grosses que celles qu'on a
Giusto. Pensavamo che per te fosse 
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Il y a quelque temps, nous avons atteint les limites de balayage et désactivé le pilotage a
Il f
オーケー、ヴァンス。こちらは司令船です。キャビンファンフィルターと除染バッグを、テレビカメラ用を除く除染バ
Es ist größer als 1,5; diese Entlüft
D'accord, je comprends. Plus 51,5, des zéros
ジム、それは私にとって一番いい方法のように思えま
了解…つまり01 12 08、Rev 1、西経179度、赤経08:28:42です。次の燃焼の時
वो है 
了解。君たちをここで手続きに巻き込ませようとしているわけではない。もちろん、これは邪
로저. 닐, 조종 가능한 장치가 정상인 것 같습니다. 트랙 모드를 슬루(slew) 모드
वैसे, आसमान में ऊपर-नीचे कुछ बादल छाए हुए हैं, और कैलिफोर्निया के पश्चिमी तट से कुछ सौ मील दूर एक काफी अच्छी 
روجر، هيوستن. هل يمكنك تزويدنا بمعلومات السدس مرة أخرى، معلوما
11, Хьюстон. Роджер. Мы скопировали и пыта
حسنًا. الخطوة 2: "مُوازن الاقتران، مُ
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. L'ossigeno 
Et, Houston, Apollo 13. Une chose que j'ai manquée concernant la purge de la pile à combustible à oxygène et le rejet des 
Хорошо. Кажется, нам удалось зафиксирова
はい、その
好的。根据你提供的向量，地面计算出的中程速度为每秒 15.3 英尺，VEI 为 36221，伽马值为 -6.51，所以你的程序看起来相当不错。然而，将你的解应用到​​我们的向量上，
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, ici Texas Com Tech. Vous
Roger. Il LMP si prenderà un breve riposo qui per un po'. Mi chiedevo, potresti darmi una rapida panoramica dello stato del sistema 
Roger, 
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。了解。バズ、少しフェードアウトしましたね。VHFシンプレック
프레드, 이 임시방편으로 만든 사령선용 수산화리튬 용기에 대해 할 일은 최소 두 개를 만들어서 한 번에 두 개씩 사용하는 겁니다. 호스 세트마다 하나씩 연결하는 거죠. 이 임시 상자 하나를 빨간색 연결부에 연결하면 공기가 수산화리튬을 통해 빨려 들어가 파란색 연결부로 배출될 겁니다. 그리고 이 작업을 할 때, 우주복의 루프(주 루프든 보조 루프든)에서 수산화리튬 용기를 제거해야 합니다. 이 장치를 쉽게 만들 수 있도록 관련 자료를 모으고
또 다른 지역 소식입니다. 헌츠빌 카운티 법원이 어제 새벽에 화재로 전소했습니다. 따라서 그 자리에 다시 건설 사업을 해야 할 것 같습니다. 한편, 귀환을 기다리는 가족들에 대한 소식도 전해드립니다. 앤 제임스 기자가 보도한 내용입니다. "우리는 달 뒷면에서 쉬고 있어요." 발레리 앤더스는 크리스마스 이브에 가족과 함께 아폴로 8호가 달 궤도를 벗어나 지구로 귀환하기를 기다리며 이렇게 말했습니다. 앤더스 씨는 화요일 새벽 0시에 도착했고, 이웃들이 아이들을 모두 데려가 우주선이 달 뒤편에 있어 통신이 두절된 동안 가족들이 편히 쉴 수 있도록 도와주었습니다. 프랭크 보먼 대령의 집은 야외에 커다란 상록수 화환 네 개가 걸려 있고, 고운 눈이 뿌려져 있으며, 빨간 리본으로 장식되어 있었습니다. 거실에는 그의 안전한 귀환을 기다리는 크리스마스트리가 놓여 있었고, 금발의 아름다운 아내 수와 늠름한 두 아들 프레더릭과 에드윈은 자정 무렵 달 궤도를 벗어나는 순간을 집에서 지켜볼 계획이었습니다. 평소 같으면 그들은 세인트 크리스토퍼 성공회 교회에서 자정 예배에 참석했을 겁니다. 가족들은 새벽 0시에 모일 예정이었죠. 보먼 가족에는 어린아이가 없기 때문에, 크리스마스 선물 교환은 보먼 대령이 달 왕복 비행이라는 멋진 선물을 가지고 돌아올 때까지 미뤄두기로 했습니다. 마릴린 러벨의 네 아이들은 아이들 입장에서는 아주 평범한 크리스마스를 보낼 거라고 러벨 대위의 아내는 전했습니다. 하지만 선물 이야기는 꺼내기도 꺼려졌는데, 아이들 중 두 명이 바로 옆에 앉아 있었기 때문입니다. "어젯밤에 입었던 옷도 갈아입을 시간이 없었어요."라고 러벨 부인은 말했습니다. 하지만 어른들끼리의 선물 교환은 있을 거고, 크리스마스트리는 러벨이 집에 돌아올 때까지 그대로 있을 겁니다. 액션 라인에 좋은 글이 하나 실렸습니다. 액션 편집자에게 보낸 짧은 
오! 이
这些钟不像有些钟那样可以移动。让我试试把那个钟调到 PDI
알겠습니다. 그쪽으로 
Ca
1
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 스틸헤드, 스틸헤드입니
Charlie, ripeti ancora una volta quei tre angoli. Vorr
जी हाँ। अब हम मुख्य कार्यक्रम के बाद की च
Okay, I think we 
أورورا سفن،
Sei sicuro di non aver urtato il convertitore port
Roge
Okay. The second one, at 32 hours looking at Bennett's Comet - we want the pictures taken when the spacecraft is as stable as it's going to be before starting. The stability requirement is very high. We weren't sure if you understood that from what we passed up. In addition, the photographs might not show as much as the eye can see of the comet, so if you see anything interesting about the structure of the comet, why, sketching it is in order and
32 روجر. فهمت، 2
Beh, la zona sembra liscia, ma non sono riuscito a ve
Non ne abbiamo molti su questo volo, quindi tanto vale goderselo finché puoi
جيميني 4، جراح هاواي. نود إعلامكم بوجود خلل في نظام ا
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Abbiamo alcune novità e alcune cose di cui vorremmo parlarti, se non sei nel bel mezzo del pasto. Se ti è comodo, siamo pronti con qualche aggiornamento. Pass
Таким образом, мы опережаем распечатанный план полета примерно на 3 минуты; возможно, будет разумно попытаться вылететь примерно на 3 минуты раньше, и мы сможем предоставить им точное время вылета в любо
음, 제 생각엔 가운데 창문이 제일 좋을 것 같지
さて、少し話が逸れてしまいました。ボブ・ホープは部隊と共に再びベトナムに戻り、いつものように素晴らしい任務を遂行しています。このニュース記事に登場する小さな人物の一人は、戦艦ニュージャージーの隊員です。ボブ・ホープは昨日、いや水曜日、巨大な砲塔の上から冗談を飛ばし、戦艦ニュージャージーの乗組員1500人を楽しませました。これは、海外にいる米軍部隊を
LMP
Roger. Can you confirm then that the faceplate is closed, and
Okay. Thank you. And if you can think of it, when the time comes up, when you
Est-ce mon imagination, ou est-ce que la musique e
Roger. The LMP is going to take a little snooze here for a while. I am wo
दक्षिण अमेरिका के दक्षिणी छोर पर, नीचे 
Environ 32. Ça va commenc
Qu
روجر. هذ
D'accord. C'est parti. L'objectif est une correction de trajectoire pour un retour libre: -0021,3, +0004,1, -0031,2; HA et HP sont NA; DELTA-V 0038,0; 031, 120, 298, -00213, +00041, -00312; NA. Et vo
أنا الآن في الدقيقة 45. سأزيد مقبض ضبط البدلة قليلاً، حوالي ربع دورة. أعتقد أننا نكاد نسيطر على الوضع. لقد ضبطت 
Ro
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。
はい。明るさはまだ十分です。1～2段絞りを開けて
罗杰。
Et Boothill, Duke Island, Sidewinder, en regardant Maskelyne W, c'est le point de contrôle du lacet, et on arrive juste au terminateur. Au terminateur, le ciel est cendré et gris. Plus on s'éloigne du terminateur, plus le gris s'éclaircit, et plus on se rapproche du point subsolaire, plus on distingue des tein
是的。我认为这很好地展现了我们着陆时的横向
레
И ещё, Джим, мы... Последнее, что мы отправили, касалось толь
Roger. Si Neil a une minute, nous avons une ou deux questions concernant
はい。そう思ったのですが、念の
Gemini VIII, I have some new rescue data for you. You 
रॉजर। लॉन्च के बाद से रीडिंग 
Vous voulez encore de l'eau avan
Гро
रॉजर। डेके, धुंध की परत बहुत चमकदार है। मेरा अनुमान है कि यह वास्तविक क्षितिज से 8 से 10 डिग्री ऊपर है। और मेरा अनुमान है कि यह धुंध की परत क्षितिज से लगभग दोगुनी ऊंचाई पर है, जितनी सूर्यास्त के समय दिखने वाली चमकदार नीली पट्टी होती है; यह उससे दोगुनी मोटी है। इस धुंध की परत से गुजरते समय तारे छिप जाते हैं। 
We - we're ahead on
它高 2
روجر. أخشى أن ي
Houston, Apollo 11. Lors de notre prochain passage par le point de roulis 0, nous nous arrêterons, ce qui nous donnera une inclinaison de 90 degrés. Je comprends que vous souhaitez que nous passions d'une inc
我们正在从小规模做起，而且看起来它离我们的轨道非常接
Okay. Nun, wir waren an einem Punkt angelangt, an dem wir aussteigen mussten, und a
ठीक है। यह - यह वाला अंदर है।
我很高兴
ठीक है। हमें इस सवाल का जवाब देने में देरी के लिए खेद ह
حسنًا. 
好的，没问题。杰
휴스턴, S 밴
Apollo 11, Houston.
Ладно, Хьюстон. Мне не очень удаётся сохранять т
Здравствуй
好的。基本上，您希望我们讨论的是中央发动机在S-II阶段早期关机时的振动序列，以及我们在燃烧过程中遇到的振动情况
Hier 
Да. С тех пор, как я након
فانس، هل فكرتم جميعًا في الكاميرات التي ترغبون في استخدامها؟ حاليًا، قمنا بتجهيز كاميرا هاسلبلاد بعدسة 250، ولديّ كاميرا هاسلبلاد ر
わかりました。次の2つは変更しません。RA
Это Friendship Seven. Я в сети, но он работает очень нестабильно. Сейчас я делаю резервную копию вручную. Пытаюсь настроить его так, чтобы он был в приличном со
Gemini 4, Houst
네. 5번 패널에서 전원 1번과 2번 회로 차단기를 엽니다. 그런 다음 전원 스위치를 리셋하고 놓습니다. 11번 패널과 16번 패널에서 초월 버스 타이(TRANSLUNAR BUS TIE) 회로 차단기를 모두 닫습니다. 16번 패널에서 상승 ECA 제어 회로 차단기를 닫습니다. 16번 패널에서 하강 ECA 제어 회로 차단기도 닫습니다. 14번 패널에서 배터리 5 정상 공급선을 <binary data, 5 bytes>니다. 배터리 1, 2, 3, 4 저전압 탭을 <binary data, 5 bytes>니다.
र
Ускоритель начинает маневр для позициониро
E, Jim, lì dentro vediamo un ALLARME PROGRAMMA. Pensiamo 
了解しました。これからそ
أحضرت 
حس
स्वचालित प्रतिस्थिति; स्वचालित रूप से स्कोप पीछे खींचना; पैंतरेबाज़ी स्विच बंद; पेरिस्कोप लीवर ऊपर; यूएचएफ-हाई पावर; यूएचएफ पर संचार चालू; बीकन निरंतर; संचार और रिकॉर्डिंग 
罗杰。废气室阀门已
Если я смогу убрать немного еды Билла отсюда — В этом месте, которое называется нижним отсеком оборудования, находится наше оптическое позиционирующее оборудование. Мы осуществляем всю навигацию здесь, ор
Вы видите это в верх
هل تريد أن تفعل ذلك، أم تريد الانتظار حتى تهدأ الأمور قلي
了解しました。話が進む前に、
현재 TM
From the surface, we could not see any stars out the window; but out my overhead hatch, I'm looking at the Earth. It's big and
Да, подтверждаю. В
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 끊겼네요, 다시 말
मुझे एक ऐसी जगह मिल गई जो मेरी 
Okay. Ich hätte eine Frage an dich, Houston, fa
В городе Рено, штат Невада, из-за отсутствия камина в доме, маленький мальчик написал Санта-Клаусу в местную газету и предложил: «Пожалуйста, воспользуйтесь входной дверью. Вам придётся немного пнуть её снизу, потому что она заедает». В Литл-Роке, штат Арканзас, младенцев, родившихся в больнице Святого Винсента в течение недели перед Рождеством и до самого Рождества, выписывают матерям в огромных красных рождественских чулках. Вот ещё один прим
Oh, die geben wir einfach im Computer ein
Okay. Catch-up and we'
Che ne dici di un resoconto su cosa mangiare, bere 
休斯顿，静海基地。既然时
Bene. Sul pannel
트랭퀼리티 기지, 휴스턴. 당신의 답변이 맞습니다. 그리고 트랭퀼리티, 자이로스코프 보정은 필요 없
Ma è interessante. Il rotolamento, in realtà, come ho potuto vedere, non è ma
جيم، يبدو لنا أن بطاريتك جيدة، وأن المشكلة في الواقع تتعلق
Besser so, Jack. Zufriedenstellend. Hast du me
रॉजर, ट्रैंक्विलिटी। T8, 114 30 57; T9
はい。ヴァンス、ちょうど角を曲がった時に、地震があったと聞きました。今は位置
ठीक है; सही है। ठीक है। मैं प्रक्रिया शुरू करने के लिए तैयार हूँ। जब आप मुझे जवाब दें, तो ज़ोर से बोलें - माइक्रोफ़ोन में ज़ोर से बोलें, क्योंकि हमारा डाउनलिंक काफ़ी शोर वाला है। सबसे पहले, हम एक कैनिस्टर पर यह करेंगे, और फिर आप इसे दूसरे पर दोहरा सकते हैं। तो एक कैनिस्टर लें और उसकी बाहरी थैली काट दें। हीट सील के साथ-साथ काटें; इसे ध्यान से और हीट सील के पास से काटें, क्योंकि अगर भीतरी
收到。他们报告说，在对GT-2和GT-3航天器进行地面测试时也遇到了同样的问题，显然是由于计算机温度
جيم، نحن نوضح أن الذاكرة سليمة، لكننا نوضح نفس الشيء الذي توضحه
D'accord, Joe. Je suis prêt à recopier la procédure d'allumage du module de commande, dès que tu voudras me la donner.
——我们希望您向右滚动到 060 度，并将拍摄贝内特彗星的速率降至零。为此，请启用 C 和 D 型四轴飞行器。执行此操作时，请使用所有四轴飞行器。1 分钟
Ok
了解。UHF-2に切り替えました。1、2、3、4、5…とカウントしてください。HF
罗杰。地址 72，2
जी हां, फ्रेड। हमारे पास अभी इसके लिए कोई प्रक्रिया नहीं है, और न ही हमें भविष्य में इस पर काम करने की कोई उम्मीद है। मैं अभी आपको जो प्रक्रिया पढ़कर सुना
जेमिनी VI, जेमिनी VI, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम। मुझे आपके पीएलए अपडेट मिल गए हैं। ओव
Tieni questo... ne
アポロ11号、こちらヒュー
ヒューストン、こちらアポロ8号です。GOとおっしゃれば、今回の飛行計画を終了
أعتقد أن الأمر على ما
Apollo 8, Housto
Ja, meine
はい、はっきりと聞き取れました、フランク。態度を変
«Ап
Probieren wir 
Jo
フライ
ठीक है, जैक। आपको फ्यूल सेल 2 पर रिएक्टेंट्स वाल्व बंद करना है। अपने इनवर्टर बंद कर दें। अपने बैटरी रिले बस को बंद कर दें। बैटरी के तार बंद कर 
아니, 아직 아니야. 불이 꺼질 때까지 기다려 봐. 저게 뭘 하려고 했던 건
Добр
Ci sono un sacco di cose che stanno arrivando, propr
N
We're
Okay. If we could try the high gain and maybe we can get started on this COMM check. I'd also like to verify that you've go
ठीक है, पृष्ठ 17 पर। लोड को माइनस 4 मिनट पर सेट करें; यह CB(11), इन्वर्टर 2, क्लोज़ है, और "इन्वर्टर 1 चुनें" को हटा दें। रेट स्केल को "25 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड
حسنًا. صحيح. هذا جيم لوفيل. ما فكرنا في فعله اليوم هو أن نُطلعكم على لمحة بسيطة عن الحياة داخل أبولو 8. لقد عرضنا لكم مشاهد القمر، ومشاهد الأرض، وفكرنا في دعوتكم إلى منزلنا. لقد كان منزلنا لمدة أربعة أيام على الأقل كما ترون ع
أبو
ジム、君の最後の発言は聞き取れなかったよ。君もバックグラウンドでかなりノイズがかかっ
ठीक है, AC 2 में कुछ भी नहीं दिख रहा है। मैं इसे दोबारा कॉन्फ़िगर करने की कोशिश करूंगा,
좀 더 가까운 곳, 테네시주 멤피스에서 현재 8
Bon. Il n'y
रॉजर। आपके कहे अनुसार, मुझे लगता है कि 
はい。分かりました
ज
Je vois, à ce stade, je ne suis pas sûr d'enregistrer en mode VOX. Je vais passer à la transmission. J'ai Vénus, qui approche de l'horizon
Okay, Apollo 8. We've finished the first test, and we're now going to change the uplink mode to UPLINK COMMAND AND RANGING, and we'll be going without upvoice. We'll be in this mode for 2-1/2 minutes and will be sending a test messages. It'll have no effect on either your computer or your panel switch configuration. What you might see will be the S-band noise that's associate
Bene, 11. Questa è Houston. Ora stiamo ottenendo una bellissima immagine del Langrenus, con la sua cima centr
로저. 물 문제에 대해서는 더 이상 덧붙일 말이 없지
Okay, Fred-o, good show. On row 4, starting with : SUIT FAN 1, CLOSE; GLYCOL PUMP AUTO TRA
كولومبيا، هيوستن. نود أن نوافق على طلبك في الوقت الذي يناسبك. لدينا بعض الخيارات المتاحة لك. 
Okay, Wassermann. Folgendes machen wir: Richten Sie die X-Achse (die positive X-Achse) entweder nach Norden oder Süden aus. Es scheint uns sinnvoller, die positive X-Achse nach Süden auszurichten. Tun Sie dies bitte bei eingeschaltetem Gerät. Anschließend schlagen wir vor, das Gerät auszuschalten, um Energie 
这里是友谊七号，还在直播中。我看到下方沙漠上空扬起沙尘暴
Продувка топливных элементов через 8 минут и 8 секунд — уточнен
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Мы будем с ва
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। कृपया उच्च बिट दर का अनुरोध करे
Хьюстон, Аполлон-
Bene. Il misuratore indica il 22%. Non abbiamo alcun controllo di imbardata o rollio e non riusciamo a riprendere il co
Понял. Моё состояние хорошее; состояние капсулы хорошее; режим управления автоматический; гироскопы работают нормально; маневр отключен. Топлив
Al momento non sono in grado di effettuare altri test sulle stelle. Torno a osservare la superficie te
Un vero e proprio lampo di luce entra dalla finestra. Non so proprio cosa sia. A questo punto dovrei essere al tramonto... Il periscopio è buio. Devo aver appena dato un'ultima occhiata all'orizzonte; eppure non ci sono ancora. Qui entriamo nella no
你知道我们现在也在清除燃料电
好的。这样
Aurora Sev
既然您已经踏上旅程，或许会想知道，休斯顿的占星师露比·格雷厄姆说，所有迹象都预示着您此次月球之旅的顺利进行。她说，尼尔聪明伶俐，迈克判断力敏锐，巴兹则能解决棘手的问题。她还说，尼尔往往乐观
もう一度
Sagen Sie uns bitte einfach die Uhrzeit, wir wollen nur wissen, wann es soweit ist. Ich würde den Terminator gerne bekommen
E sei a posto. Huntsville segnala che hai una pastiglia propellente da 6 secondi, ovvero 3 secondi in più rispetto a un bossolo da 3 sigma; quindi sei a posto con i materiali di consumo. È così buono che non lo
Ici F
289度。情况不太妙。重新爬升。好的。姿态控制，PLAT；俯仰角降至0°、0
Nein,
The DELTA-VC on
والآن، ما الذي لد
روجر. 27 قدمًا في الثانية للخلف وحوالي 1
푸른 띠에 대해 설명드리겠습니다. 지표면 바로 위에는 비교적 짙은 파란색 띠가 있고, 그 아래에는 밝은 파란색 띠, 또 다른 짙은 파란색 띠, 그리고 대기광으로 인한 커다란 흰색 띠가 있습니다. 그 다음에는 짙은 검은색 띠가 있는데, 
分かりました。とりあえず、メインAの電圧を測ってみましょう…ジャッ
そして、ヒューストンは... 私たちが... いいえ！... 約
- -... यह वही है जो... 0.5, सही है? 
Roger. Nous n'utiliserons pas le téléobjectif. Je ne pense pas que nous pourrons photographier la Terre. Il faudra se concentrer sur le terminateur, la surface lunaire. 
I'll give 
حسنًا يا جاك. ارجع إلى إجراء شحن البطارية الذي شرحته لك. ولإيقاف الشحن، ما عليك سوى كتابة "فتح" أو "إيقاف" بجوار مفتاح الدائرة الذي أعطيتك إياه. في اللوحة 250، قاطع الدائرة الذي فتحته بالفعل؛ في اللوحة 275، طاقة العاكس 2 الرئيسية B، مفتوحة؛ اللوحة 5، مرحل البطارية BAT A، مفتوحة؛ وحدة الاستشعار AC BUS 2، مفتوحة، إشارة المستشعر AC2، مفتوحة؛ شاحن البطارية، الرئيسي B، مفتوح؛ طاقة التيار المتردد لشاحن البطارية، مفتوحة؛ شحن البطارية A لشاحن البطارية، مفتوح؛ وحدة التحكم في العاكس 2، مفتوحة؛ وحدة التحكم في العاكس 3، مفت
はい、ジャック。このページ 1-5 
Good readback. Turning over to page 14, step
No, non lo so. L'ho de
よし、フレッド。5インチを読み上げる。これから読む手順は、太陽のチェックだ。
Roger, Bill. Wir haben vor ein paar Stunden einen Speicherauszug erstellt. Ich glaube, das war, wäh
We would - On a final test when you get down to the end of your allotted time here, we would like you to remove all filters and let us see how it looks with all filters removed, and then we would like to get several spotmeter readings at
Roger, Bill. Abbiamo ricevuto la tua discarica 
VERB 7
Мы предоставим вам — мы предоставим вам р
الجوزاء الثامن، 
ठीक है। शुरुआती टीवी प्रसारण के संदर्भ में, अब हमारा हाई-गेन एंटीना काम नहीं कर रहा है, और ऐसा लगता है कि शुरुआती टीवी प्रसारण प्राप्त करने का एकमात्र तरीका इसे दूरस्थ स्थान पर भेजना और वहां इसकी जांच करना था। इसलिए हम इस विचार को छोड़ रहे हैं और निर्धारित टीवी प्रसारण स
겉포장을 열고, 안쪽 포장을 넣고 꽉 쥐
Bien reçu. Nous souhaiterions à nouveau vérifier la tension et l'intensité dans le module 
В этом кос
حسنًا. صحيح. هذا جيم لوفيل. ما فكرنا في فعله اليوم هو أن نُطلعكم على لمحة بسيطة عن الحياة داخل أبولو 8. لقد عرضنا لكم مشاهد القمر، ومشاهد الأرض، وفكرنا في دعوتكم إلى منزلنا. لقد كان منزلنا لمدة أربعة أيام على الأقل كما ترون على لوحة العدادات. نُعلّم كل يوم على لوحة العدادات. لقد مرّت أربعة أيام، ونعمل على اليوم الخامس. بالطبع، نتطلع جميعًا إلى الهبوط يوم الجمعة. هنا في الجزء السفلي من المركبة الفضائية الذي نسميه حجرة المعدات السفلية، لدينا مستشار الرئيس لشؤون اللياقة البدنية، الكابتن جيم لوفيل، على وشك الخضوع لبرنامج تمارين نقوم به كل يوم. تلاحظون أنه يتحرك بحرية تامة. لقد اصطدم رأسه للتو بالبصريات، المستخدمة في ملاحتنا. إنه يستخدم جهازًا رياضيًا مصممًا للحفاظ على لياقة العضلات. من الوظائف المهمة الأخرى لمركبتنا الفضائية الحاسوب، وقد ظننت أنكم قد ترغبون في رؤية ما لدينا هنا، الشاشات التي تعرض لنا جميع المعلومات المتعلقة بعملية الاحتراق، والملاحة، والسرعة التي نستخدمها أثناء الدخول والخروج من مدار الأرض. كما ترون، يتم التحكم به بواسطة لوحة مفاتيح تشبه لوحة مفاتيح الآلة الكاتبة، والبيانات التي تُدخل وتُخرج منه مذهلة حقًا. لقد قام بعمل رائع، وقد أبدع جيم لوفيل في تشغيله. الآن، هناك أمر آخر بالغ الأهمية سواء كنا في الفضاء أو على الأرض وهو الطعام، وقد طلبت من بيل أندرس أن يُريكم كيف نأكل هنا في الرحلة. اعذروا الصورة أثناء تحركنا وتغيير الكاميرات. الطعام الذي نستخدمه مجفف بالكامل، ويأتي مُعبأً مسبقًا في أكياس محكمة الإغلاق. لاحظوا أن كل ما على بيل فعله لإبقائه في مكانه هو تركه. لولا تيارات الهواء داخل المركبة، لكان ثابتًا تمامًا. يُخرج مقصه العملي ويقطع الكيس. الطعام متنوع، وجيد عمومًا. إن لم يكن هذا مدحًا مُشجعًا، فهو كذلك، لكنه مع ذلك طع
Das ist Friendship Seven. Die Kopfbewegungen haben keinerlei Empfindungen ausgelöst. Mir geht es gut. Beim Reichweitentest konnte ich jeden gewünschten Punkt direkt treffen. Ich habe keine Probleme, die Knöpfe zu erreichen, und die Anpassung an die Schwerelosigkeit fiel mir sehr leicht, viel leichter
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, बरमूडा कैप कॉम। आप 
Кен, это Фрэнк. Я сейчас сниму гарнитуру примерно на
はい。六分儀の軸の角度は2027です。以上です
好
アポロ1
نعم. الآن، ستظهر لك على الأرجح رسالة "37 ENTER 06 ENTER" على شاشة الكمبيوتر. ما نريده هو وضع الكمبيوتر في وضع الاستعداد؛ إذا ظهرت لك رسالة "37 06"، فسيتعين عليك الضغط على زر "ENTE
도
Apollo 8, Houston.
Аполлон-11,
了解しました。緯度 
D'accord.
分かりました、ジャック、そうします。ジムと私は、排気が行われていないときに窓から星座を見つけることができました。これらの消
收到。正在接收。30，SPS/G&N：36691；减 061，加 067 135 23 4149；，加 32020，加 06713，减 02773 181 054 0
चालीस, पचास फ
Roger. We are going to come up with some more tracking tasks for you, I think, and we want most of them to be d
情况不错，弗兰克。我们刚刚接收了另一批数据，正在处理中。初步看来，我们甚
Roger. Un instant. Nous
كيف يبدو الطقس
私たちはそれで何の成果
わかりました。最後の3行には、2行目のFLOODとTRACKの回路ブレーカーが開いています。ロジックパワーBも開いています。降下エンジンオーバーライドも開いています。スーツフローコントロールも開いています。3行目のDISPLAYも開いています。VHF AとVHF Aトランスミッターも開いています。VHF Bレシーバーも開いています。その下には、クルーオプションのDISPLAYがあります。そして最後のINVERTER 2も開いています
Вот Кен
로저. 이번 달 탐사가 당신 눈에는 간단하거나 쉬워 보였을지도 모르겠습니다. 하지만 결코 그렇지 않았다는 것을 말씀드리고 싶습니다. 우리를 궤도에 올려놓은 새턴 V 로켓은 엄청나게 복잡한 기계 장치이며, 모든 부품이 완벽하게 작동했습니다. 제 머리 위에 있는 이 컴퓨터는 38,000개의 단어로 이루어진 어휘집을 가지고 있는데, 각 단어는 승무원인 우리에게 최대한 중요한 의미를 갖도록 매우 신중하게 선택되었습니다. 지금 제 손에 쥐고 있는 이 스위치는 사령선에만 300개가 넘는 
Ok, sali
Accendo la registrazione VOX. Guardo la finestra illuminata dal sole. 
好的。我们收到您的泵已开启。GET B 03:19；ΔV，0.
了解しました。コアチューブに詰まった状態で湿っていたという全体的な印象は理解できました。次の質問です。この地域の概要説明の前に、ご意見をコピーさせていただきました。この地域の地質の概要について、
हमें जो शोर सुनाई दे रहा है, वह कुछ वैसा ही है जैसा कुछ देर पह
ق
Quello che vedi, Mike, è... Houston, quello che vedi è l'emisfero occidentale. Guardando... in
Your shaft and trunnions remain the same. Sirius remains on the 50-degree line just like Navi used to be. Rigel is down 1.3 degrees 
Понял. Близнецы VIII, у нас для вас медицинская информация. Пункт 1: пейте воду до и после ретроактивного запуска. Пункт 2: примите одну таблетку Меразина. Примените код Альфа перед ретроактивным запуском. Если вы покинете космический корабль, не трогайте а
روجر. لقد رفعنا مستوى تضخيم الإشارة لدي
Negative, Houston. Say ag
Apol
C'est la route US 1, je suppose, h
Voici Friendship Seven, en orbite actue
Okay. minus 04402 minus 00001 plus 48387 178 169 359, not applicable, plus 00185 48587 603 48383 06 2027 250, earth center 0123 - down 123; I say again, down 123, 
Gemini 4, Хьюстон, C
阿波罗13号，休斯顿。30秒后收到
The area out the left hand window is a relatively level plain cratered with a fairly large number of craters of the 5 to 50 fo
...Beh, dovremmo a
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Конец
हां। उन्हें वह डेटा मिल गया था, और वे यह द
Roger, understand, at hours 18 to 22. On Rev 12 over RKV I will be updated with my PLA and CLA. Rev 13 over Canary will have a C-band track. At a G.m.t. of 12 16 00, I can do some orbit nav providing it requires no fuel. On Rev 13 I will have a tape dump over Carnarvon and I'll begin a normal Flight Plan aft
Roger. Concernant votre po
Frank, riteniamo che la procedura di cui parli non sia necessaria e che sia una perdita di tempo. Dovresti comunque... una volta completata, dovremmo inviarti un nuovo modulo, e tu
……他表现非常出色，但我认为他无法看穿任何人的意图。所以我得负责转达。这把枪非常好用。他能够灵活机动——一会儿冲到前面，一
好的。我们建议着陆舱驾驶员（LMP）休息，而指挥舱驾驶员（CMP）和指挥官（CDR）保持清醒。着陆舱驾驶员应该在大约63小时后入睡，还有25分钟就起床了。你们可以休息6小时。你们在69小时起床。70小时时，指挥官和指挥舱驾驶员休息6小时，直到76小时。大约在70到76.5到77小时之间，我们会进行一次点火，然后是52小时。78:30，我们会装载燃料并连接。第二次点火的点火时间目前是，我们很快就会给你们准备垫子。我们建议你们所有人在点火结束后进食。那大概是81到82小时。让指挥舱驾驶员和指挥官在你们睡觉的时候吃东西。
Nein. Wir sitzen alle hier beim Essen. Ich hole mir nur schnell einen Happen. Dann schreibe ich die Switch-Konfiguration auf, oder ich kopier
صوت غودارد، شبكة هي
Friendship Seven, qui ATS Cap Com. Mi sentite? 
حسنًا. فهمت يا فريد. شكرًا جزيلًا؛ 38.9 و1.9. وهو ببساطة يرسم مخططًا سلسًا قدر الإمكان للتحقق من كمية الأمبيرات التي نعيدها إلى البطارية. لهذا السبب يريدها على فترات نصف ساعة. إذا بدأ هذا الجدول الزمني بالتأثير بشكل كب
طاقة التحكم الدوراني، مباشرة، اثن
Хорошо, Джек. Давайте обсудим, как я буду определять положение аппарата, а затем выполнять маневры. Я говорю о методах управления. Сейчас я пытаюсь оста
Gém
Okay. We'r
D'accord. Et j'ai aperçu quelques amis de John ici; j'ai bien peur de ne pas les avoir vus tomber, même si je l
是的，我同意，杰克。杰克·斯威格特和我之前上楼去了，各自拿了一个罐子，我们翻找着一些材料，琢磨着怎么用它们。实际上，这就是为什么我们当时要把所有饮用水都装好，因为我们需要把装罐子的塑料容器放在食品储藏室里。我
Während du die Schriftrolle durchgehst, finde 
How much wate
Roger, 11. And we'd like you to do a waste water dump at 84 hours down to 25 percent. Ov
Роджер. Для маневра NSR: скорость вращения двигателя 03 + 47 + 37; дельта-VT 42,9; длительность 54 секунды; рыскание 0, тангаж вниз 3 градуса; ядро ​​25, 00429; 26, 00023; 27, все нули; двигатель, назад; маневр, по
سنقوم بإعداد هذا على الوضع العادي لبضع دقائق حتى
Houston, Colombie. J'ai terminé m
سأ
तुम कमजोर पड़ रहे हो। मैंने ठीक से नकल
Okay, das ist richtig. Ich muss Ihnen jetzt noch ein paar Punkte geben, die Sie auf dieser Kurve einzeichnen sollen. Die bisher gezeichnete Kurve basiert auf einem Perigäum bzw. Perilun v
حسناً. هل 
Écoutez, on ne se soucie 
Attitude okay. Pitching back down to reentry attitude, correction retroattitude. No reason to stay at reentry attitude. No reason to stay at reentry attitude, when we can see so well in retroattitude. And this is truly the attitude we 
आगे बढ़ो गुआयमास
好的。我们
了解しました。ミッション終了時の逆算シーケ
지금 다
Roger. Très bien. Nous nous sommes trompés dans notre configuration de sauvegarde. Les fichiers étaient mal placés. Les données embarquées semblent corre
ठीक है, जैक। फ़्लाइट प्लान अपडेट में कुछ चीज़ें हैं, और सबसे पहले हम पेज G/9-2 पर G&C चेकलिस्ट में टेफेम वैल्यू को अपडेट करना चाहत
जी हाँ, जेम
영화 필름이 많
روجر. فهمت قصدك
Well, the 
以及国家联盟的其他比
이제 좀 나아졌군, 잭. 만족스
نعم، لنلتقط بعض ا
我会详细说明
जे
Fo
Canton Cap Com, Canton Cap Com. Sigm
收到。根据你最新
Sì,
네, 그랬습니다. 먼저 버스 타이 모터 스위치를 사용하여 두 버스 모두에 전원을 공급해야 합니다. 그래야 버스에 부하가 없는지 확인할 수 있고, 그 다음 회로 차단기를 내려 버스의 전원을 차단하여 모터
こちら、HFのフレンドシップ・セブンです。状態は良好です。すべて計画通りです。制御燃料は90～100%、酸素
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, qui Watertown Com Tech. Ho le
好
D'accord
D'
هذا صحيح. نعم
В данный момент давление в кабине держится на уровне около 5,4. Похоже, оно остается на этом уровне. Именно на таком уровне оно было при взлете. Казалось, оно держалось некоторое время, а з
1A, 9,5; 1B, 10,0; 1-Principale, 14,5; 2-Principale, 8,0; 2A, 4,8; 2B, 5,2; L'autobus principale è 24,5
- - 당신의
D'accord. J'aimerais bien avoir certains de ces chi
Доброе утро. Планируете ли вы сегодня утром провести 
ええと、レーダーの針が少し振れていましたよ、デイブ。よく分かりません。私はできる限り、振動の真
Okay, Jim. We are laying for you on that one; it is a subject that we wanted to - to bring up w
わかりました。待機しています。燃料電池のパ
ठीक 
11, Houston. Die Sanitäter an der Nachbarkonsole berichten, dass die Spitzmaus zu den Tieren gehört, die innerhalb von 24 Stunden das Sechsfache ihres eigenen Körpergewichts fressen können. Das könnte eine zufriedenstellende Grundlage fü
Non. Non, je ne crois pas, mais je voulai
حسنًا. الفكرة هي أنك واجهت خطأً طفيفًا في متجه الحالة الخاص بك في وقت بدء التشغيل، وعندما 
حسناً. والأخير هو قواطع الدائرة الكهربائية الخاصة بالقياس، أربعة من
알겠습니다.
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. سيتم تغيير القيادة إلى هانيساكل خلال دقيقتي
Roger. Und auf der Seite „Aktivierung“ führen Sie Sc
好的。禁用A、B四轴飞行器，没问题；等杰克停止乱动之后，我
ジャック、ジンバ
Sì. E non c'è umidità visibile. E non c'è umidità intorno alla carta assorbente. Purtroppo hai coperto le pareti, quindi non posso misurare la temperatura, ma la temperatura peggiore
ठीक है, 13. कृपया हम
حسنًا يا جيم. يبدو أن ما علينا ف
उन सभी का अंक 90 है सि
Okay. Als Erstes wollen wir die Batterie laden, damit wir dort Strom haben. Die entsprechenden Prozeduren sind bereits vorbereitet. Was den Wiedereintritt angeht, planen wir unseren letzten Kursanstieg 5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt in die Atmosphäre – falls wir überhaupt einen durchführen müssen. Das Servicemodul möchten wir dann etwa 4,5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt abtrennen und die nächsten 3 bis 3,5 Stunden für Fotos, die Inbetriebnahme des Kommandomoduls (G&N), die Verstauung der Ausrüstung und sonstige Kleinigkeiten nutzen. Das Servicemodul würden wir bis 1 Stunde vor dem Eintritt behalten und dann abtrennen. Diese Prozeduren werden morgen früh in CMS und LMS integriert ausgeführt, und hoffentlich können wir sie später am Tag mit der Missionskontrolle wiederholen. Eine Frage ist, was wir mit dem Servicemodul machen. Man geht davon aus, dass im Kommandomodul ausreichend Sauerstoff vorhanden ist und dass die anderen Komponenten eine Hochdruckquelle und ein Stauproblem darstellen. Daher wird erwogen, sie dort zu belassen. Außerdem halten wir es für sinnvoll, den Wiedereintritt mit Raumanzug durchzuführen und sich vor dem Abtrennen des Raumschiffs anzulegen. Denn wenn wir die anderen Komponenten abtrennen, werden wir es wie bei Apollo 10 handhaben – wir lassen sie einfach los. Ohne Raumanzug wären wir d
Houston, il est peu probable que nous puissions observer les étoiles dans cette configuration. Le seul moyen d'obtenir un al
La temperatura di scarico dell'abitacolo torna a salire fino a 19. Fin
よし。ステッ
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Pericynthion più 2 ore di volo. G&N: 62710, più 098, meno 019, accensione 077 46 2248, DELTA-VX, più 32148, meno 00455
好的。迈克，你可以按照飞行计划第398页所示的姿态进行机动，高增益角
Роджер, это.
Das ist die Erde. Nun, ich weiß nicht, ob wir uns hin 
هذه هي الطريقة التي يريدونك أن تتبعها. إنهم يري
جرّب تحديد معالم أبو
わかりました。テレビ局の人たちもこの水
التحكم في الوضعيات ممتاز. يبدو أن هناك كمية كافية من الوقود اليدوي. ما زلت عند 72%. معدل الدوران الدوري مضبوط تمامًا في هذه المرحلة. الانحراف الجانبي صلب نوعًا ما؛ 
至少我们有了反推射击和其他所有操作的姿态参考。嘿，我们
Роджер. Каков, по-видимому, предел разрешения, обеспечиваемый этим с
로저. 제 상태는 양호하고, 캡슐 상태도 양호합니다. 현재 수동 조종으로 드리프트 비행 중입니다. 자이로스코프는 안전하게 보호되고 있습니다. 연료는 45~42%, 산소는 79~100%입니다. 증기 배출구 온도는 현재 두 곳 모두 65도입니다. 우주복 온도도 많이 내려갔습니다. 현재 온도는 62도이며, 모든 전력 공급이 정상입니다. 혈압이 조금씩 오르기 시작했습니다. 방금 MIT 사진 몇
वहां आपको आंशिक दबाव CO2 के लिए क्या रीडिंग मिलत
Vous voulez dire qu'il y en a d'autres? D'accord, au 
알겠습니다, 빌. BIOMED 데이터가 여전히 좀 이상하네요. BIOMED 하네스의
J'étais en po
Роджер. Мы понимаем. Это должен быть ваш последний полет. Мы не хотим тратить слишком много топ
Bene. Questa è una buona rilettura. Conclude la proce
電気が消えたかと思ったよ。電圧が本当に下がってる
नहीं। फिलहाल यह क
Oui
Aurora Seven, hier spricht Cape Cap Com im Notfall-Sprachm
好的。请问有什么快速简便的方法可以做到这一
Роджер. Если у тебя есть минутка свободного времени, у меня есть кое-какие обновления для PAD, которые мы передали тебе вчера днем. В результате проведения второй коррекции в середине курса, требуемое значение DELTA-V для PAD +35, 44 и 53 немного изменилось. Кон
حسنًا. مفهوم. سيكون ذلك للمراجعة 57، التسلسل رقم 16، في تمام الساعة
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। ऐसा लगता है कि हम पिच और यॉ दोनों में काफी गलत दिशा में जा रहे हैं
吉姆，我们刚刚查看了你
La linea non è ancora tesa. Ho alcune foto della linea che ondeggia dietro. Direi che abbiamo un'oscillazione di circa un ciclo al minuto. Sia 
روجر. الهدف الأساسي من هذا
好的。输入端口如下
On est en plein milieu de… enfin, soit de la salade de saumon, ou un truc du genre. C'est sans doute p
Roger. Et aussi Zone 13
休息了大约45分钟后，我来跟您确认一下情况。我们注意到您的高增益天线，如果您愿意，可以在偏航角为90度、俯仰角为-45度时，从全向天线切换到高增益天线，这样可以更有效地利用天线。我们注意到您在全向天线模式下多停留了10分钟，这没问题；但如果您按照上述方法操
Purtroppo
Хорошо. В 14-й строке, в разделе СИСТЕМА НАГРЕВАТЕЛЕЙ A/B-1: откройте QUAD 1–4; ниже единственное изменение — в разделе НАСОС ГЛИКОЛЯ закройте АВТОМАТИЧЕСКИЙ ПЕРЕКЛЮЧАТЕЛЬ; в разделе СВЯЗЬ единственное изменение: откройте ПРИЕМНИК VHF A, откройте АУДИО КОМАНДИРА; ниже единственное изменение — закройте и оставьте закрытым ОЖИДАЮЩИЙ автоматический выключатель,
حسنًا. زائد 1197 ناقص 16500 12681 35608، محاذاة الشمال، انحراف النجوم، دوران 068، ميل 097، انحراف 356، لا يوجد فراغ؛ أخرى: واحد، عودة سريعة، يساوي 7900 للمحيط الهندي؛ رقم 2، إجراء السرعة العالية غير مطلوب؛ رقم 3، 
F
حسنًا. أول شيء علينا فعله حقًا هو توازي المنصة من 06:50 إلى 07:10. إنهم يزودوننا بمناورة الانعطاف المحملة بواسطة وحد
맞습니다. 이제 5번 패널로 가겠습니다. 회로 차단기 G&N HEATER, MAIN B가 닫혀 있
अच्छा लगा। ठीक है। हमने प्रवेश-पूर्व तैयारियों के लिए मॉकअप के साथ एक अभ्यास किया, और हमने देखा कि एलएमपी की चेकलिस्ट के पृष्ठ S-12 पर, जब आप रीप्रेस बोतलों को भरते हैं, तो मुझे लगता है
休斯顿。哥伦比亚一直在达
罗
休斯顿，阿波罗8号。准备录制第1和第2
Roger. Je crois que c'est aux alentours de 13 à 14 a
这里是阿波罗8号，正在月球上为您现场直播。现在我们切换了电视摄像机。之前我们向您展示了过去16个小时里我们一直在观测的地球景象。现在我们切换画面，向您展示过去16个小时里我们在60英里（约97公里）高空飞越的月球。比尔·安德斯、吉姆·洛弗尔和我今天在圣诞节前一天在这里进行实验、拍照，并启动飞船引擎进行机动。接下来，我们将沿着我们今天一直在追踪的轨迹，带您欣赏月落。月球对我们每个人来说都是不同的。我认为我们每个人——每个人都对今天所看到的景象有着
不，这是我闻过最浓的一股味道了。我们当初
Wir 
我
Roger. Sie sehen die Erde, so wie wir sie sehen, durch unser linkes Fenster – etwas mehr als die Hälfte der Erde. Wir blicken auf den östlichen Pazifik und die nördliche Hälfte des oberen Bildschirmbereichs. Dort sehen wir Nordamerika, Alaska, die Vereinigten Staaten, Kanada, Mexiko und Mittelamerika. Südamerika verschwindet knapp jenseits des Terminators oder im Schatten. Die Ozeane erscheinen deutlich blau, weiße Bänder großer Wolkenformationen ziehen über die Erde, und wir können Küstenlinien erkennen. Wir können den Westen der USA, das San Joaquin Valley, die Sierra Nevada, die Halbinsel Baja California und einige Wolkenformationen über dem Südosten der USA ausmachen. Südwestlich von Alaska zieht ein schwaches Gewitter auf, etwa 800 bis 1600 Kilometer entfernt, und ein weiteres, sehr schwaches Gewitter ist am südlichen Bildschirmrand in der Nähe des Äquators – oder weit entfernt davon, wahrscheinlich bei 45 Grad südlicher Breite – zu sehen. Die Brauntöne der Landformen sind gut erkennbar. Grüntöne sind nicht sehr gut zu erkennen. Vereinzelt sind Grüntöne entlang der nordöstlichen und nordwestlichen Küste der Vereinigten Staaten sowie der nordwest
Our status is GO. We did bring the 
Roger. Okay. Der Cape rät nun, die Anzugseinstellung an Ort und Stelle zu b
Итак. На
Хорошо. Верно. Это Джим Ловелл. Сегодня мы решили немного рассказать вам о жизни внутри «Аполлона-8». Мы уже показали вам виды Луны, виды Земли, и решили пригласить вас к нам домой. Это наш дом, по крайней мере, уже 4 дня, как вы можете видеть на приборной панели. Мы отмечаем каждый день на приборной панели. Мы уже отработали четыре дня и работаем над пятым. Конечно, все мы с нетерпением ждём посадки в пятницу. Здесь, в той части космического корабля, которую мы называем нижним отсеком оборудования, находится советник президента по физической подготовке, капитан Джим Ловелл, который собирается выполнить программу упражнений, которую мы делаем каждый день. Вы заметили, что он очень свободно перемещается внутри. Он только что ударился головой об оптику, используемую для навигации. Он работает с тренажером, предназначенным для поддержания мышц в форме. Ещё одна очень важная функция нашего космического корабля — это компьютер, и я подума
로저. 공보실의 속보입니다. 아폴로 11호는 여전히 전 세계 뉴스의 중심을 차지하고 있습니다. 중국, 북한, 북베트남, 알바니아 단 네 나라만이 아직 자국민에게 당신의 달 착륙 소식을 알리지 않았습니다. 한 기자는 당신의 성공을 어떻게 표현해야 할지 더 이상 모르겠다고 했습니다. 오늘 저녁, 닉슨 대통령은 워싱턴에서 열리는 올스타 야구 경기를 관람할 예정입니다. 경기가 끝난 후, 그는 태평양 회수 지역으로 출발합니다. 수요일 저녁, 그는 헬리콥터를 타고 존스턴 섬에서 해군 통신함 알링턴으로 이동합니다. 그리고 목요일 아침, 다시 헬리콥터를 타고 호넷으로 이동하여 당신의 착수 장면을 참관할 예정입니다. 대통령과 함께 윌리엄 로저스 국무장관과 프랭크 보먼이 동행합니다. 그들은 태평양 사령관 존 시드니 매케인 제독과 함께 회수함 함교에서 착수 장면을 지켜볼 것입니다. 호넷에서의 체류를 마친 후, 대통령은 아시아 순방에 나서 루마니아를 방문할 예정입니다. 루나 15호는 어제 달 궤도를 52바퀴 돈 후 위기의 바다에 추락한 것으로 추정됩니다. 소련 통신사 타스는 "달 근지구 공간에서 과학적 연구가 수행되었다"고 보도했습니다. 조드렐 뱅크 천문대의 버나드 러벨 경은 루나 15호가 시속 약 480km(300마일)의 속도로 달 표면에 충돌했다고 밝혔습니다. 최근 베트남은 비교적 조용했습니다. 순찰 중인 미군 병사들이 여러분의 비행 중계를 듣기 위해 트랜지스터 라디오를 소지하고 있는 모습이 목격되었습니다. 베트남 주둔 미군 라디오 및 TV 방송국은 이번 임무를 전폭적으로 보도했습니다. 수에즈 운하를 따라서는 이집트와 이스라엘 간의 소규모 충돌이 여전히 계속되고 있습니다. 유엔 감시단은 충돌을 중단시키기 위해 노력하고 있습니다. 워싱턴에서는 하원 세입위원회가 석유 고갈 할당량을 27.5%에서 20%로 줄이는 법안을 통과시켰습니다. 휴스턴 지역에는 여러 차례 비가 내렸습니다. 오늘은 흐린 날씨이며, 소나기가 더 내릴 것으로 예상됩니다. 스포츠 소식을 전해드리자면, 앞서 말씀드린 대로 오늘 밤 올스타전이 있습니다. 어제는 경기가 없었습니다. 어젯밤 뉴욕에서는 미국 야구 기자 협회가 베이브 루스를 역대 최고의 선수로 선정했습니다. 조 디마지오는 현역 최고의 선수로 선정되었습니다. 프랭크 보먼이 선수들을 기리는 만찬에서 이들을 발표했습니다. 조 네이머스는 뉴욕 제츠 훈련 캠프에서 하루 종일 훈련에 참여했습니다. '브로드웨이 조'라는 별명을 가진 네이머스를 만지려고 몰려든 500명이 넘는 아이들을 제지하느라 경찰 5명이 애를 먹었습니다. 네이머스는 몸 상태가 좋다고 말하며, 위브 유뱅크 감독이 허락한다면 8월 1일 올스타전에 출전할 것이라고 밝혔습니다. 오일러스의 커빌 훈련 캠프는 어제 비가 내렸지만 훈련은 계속되었습니다. 경미한 부상자가 몇 명 있었지만 심각한 부상은 없었습니다. 월리 렘 감독은 현재까지 훈련 상황에 만족하고 있습니다. 오일러스는 버팔로와의 프리시즌 경기에 3만 명 이상의 관중이 올 것으로 예상하고 있습니다. 돈 메러디스의 은퇴 발표에도 불구하고, 특히 휴스턴 지역에서는 열기가 식지 않을 것으로 보입니다. 마리오 안드레티가 일요일에 열린 200마일 트렌턴 자동차 경주에서 우승하며 현재 미국 자동차 클럽 포인트
Elle n'est pas deux fois plus épaisse. Elle est plus fine, mais elle se situe à une distance
Right. Okay. Next for the command module pictures, it may be a little hard to see the service module from the command module, but if you can see it, it will be through window 5, people down here think. Recommend for that the 70-millimeter. These photos have priority 2. So this is 70-millimeter EL, with - which has the 80-milli
알겠습니다. 온수 보일러에 대해 말씀드리자면, 제 마이크가 켜져 있을 때 제 목소리가 들리는데 약 2초 정도 시간차가 있다는 게 흥미롭네요. 주 보일러와 보조 보일러 점검에 대해서는, 입주 전에 두 가지 모두 점검하고 재점검 절차를 준비해 두
Well, if the systems guys have anything they want chased down, we'll be happy to
자세 제
Хорошо, маневренная площадка, цель: пролет, /G&N; 63385; плюс 0,97, минус 0,23;; плюс 0212,7, минус 0141,7, минус 0254,8; 148, 316, 050; NA, плюс 0022,5; 0360,9, 0:53, 0356,3; 33, 352,7, 15,0; NA, NA, NA. Начиная с широты, минус 23,26, минус 165,00; 1147,7, 36172; 166:54:02. Комментарии, звёзды на прямой: 31, Арктур; и 23, Денебола. Линия R 288, линия тангажа 205, линия рыскания 034; пустое пространство отсут
Хорошо. Меня беспокоит только то, как скоро нам придётся и
Nein. Ich konnte es nicht erreichen. Ich versuchte, dort noch etwas Treibstoff zu sparen, und konnte die Maschine nicht in die richtige P
伙计，我跟你说，你根本不需要任何东西来告诉你你的偏航角，对吧
روجر. ٣ - ٤ = ١٢٠. ٢ 
Думаю, всё прошло довольно хорошо, Хьюстон, хотя, вероятно, я израсходовал больше топлива, чем обычно в симуляторе. Маневр разворота — я переключился на команду тангажа и ускорения и начал поднимать нос, а затем, когда я по какой-то причине вернул команду ручного управления тангажем в положение с регулировкой скорости, — скорость тангажа остановилась, и мне пришлось снова переключиться на команду ускорения и нажать, как мне показалось, дополнительную кнопку продолжения. В ходе этого мы немного отклонились от курса, чем я ожидал. Я рассчитывал оказаться примерно в 66 футах. Думаю, я был где-то в 100 футах; поэтому, вероятно, я израсходовал немного больше топл
Je vous le dis, je vais d'abord installer mes interrupteurs 
Et, Verseau, les tests sur simulateur viennent de montrer que si vous laissez le 
わかりました。右手にピレネー山脈が見えてきて、ちょうどメシエ山とピカリング山の上空を飛んでいるところです。最初の地点は、私たちの高度から簡単に見えます。境界線に近づくにつれて、かなりコントラスト
र
Ricevuto. Riceviamo, Jim
Oka
D'accord. Les températures de contrôle de
27 20 - 31 50 — это момент, когда мы переза
रॉजर। धन्यवाद, ब्रूस। दूसरे मुद्दे पर एक और बात, हम सब... जाने से पहले... और
휴스턴, 1
Charlie, ti risponde
Das stimmt. Es war alles – alles in allem – eine tolle
好的，Aqu
Very good. We don't have any communications with the Cape at this time, but they have requested for me to run down your flight control problem a little bit. The first thi
Okay. How d
ठीक है। इसे करने के लिए हम एंटर दबाते हैं, 23 एंटर दबाते हैं; और अंत
Роджер, я на АДАПТЕРЕ. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 -
इसमें काफी कंट्रास्ट है, और
Roger, Seven. Ich habe ein kleines Problem. Beginn
そうすると、入場インターフェイスの 1 時間前など、ギリギリになってからスーツを着るなど、タイムラインが少し
구름이 절
35-دلتا 84 للأمام، 57 للخ
你对他们说了实话。感觉很好，心情愉快，准备好采取下一
And, 13, you might also ch
Roger. Siamo d'a
2, /: 46427, moins 053, plus 141, moins 01350, plus 0000, plus 0000 000 175 358 00607, plus 00606 01350 009 012
Роджер. Это хорошая обратная связь. Под этим дисплеем видно, что он закрыт. Если при закрытом состоянии вы можете получить какие-либо показания — встроенные показания вашей системы — то потребление будет намного меньше полови
मैं रुडनेव हूं, फोन पर। यूरी
Wir haben Ihnen etwa 180.000
Roger. Questa è Friendship Seven. Il carburante è al 60-55 [percento], l
맞습니다. 좋습니다. 다음으로, 모드 - 자세 설정이 완료되면, 모드 제어 자동(MODE CONTROL AUTO)을 누르십시오. 회전율을 모니터링하려면 키를 누르십시오. 초당 0.1도 미만이면 모든 축의 회전율을 모니터링하고, 플러스-X 스러스터를 비활성화하십시오. 좋습니다. 다음으로, 
سيكون سقوطك بعد ساعة من الآن، أو بعد أكثر من ساعة 
Roger, Jack. The venting really seems to... I reported earlier, I also spotted the large piece go by and prior to our... burn... The venting you see now is much greater... went into the dark mode, you could easily distinguish stars and didn't have the bright articles and bright obje
海角。通信实验期间，停电期间向您发送
좋아요. "매우"라는 말은 빼겠지만, "좋다"는 말은 
Okay. Wir gehen dieses Mal zu Nummer 2 über
Roger. Qual è il limite di risoluz
الت
It says perform housekeeping chores, stow helmets, stowage bags; unstow mirror, c
Lass es uns einmal kop
双子座 4，夏威夷 
Думаю, 296. Сколько минут у нас осталось до 
ठीक है। जैस
कॉपी कर ली ह
Columbia, this is Houston. We request that you perform another. We'd like you to let the AUTO optics t
62970，减去 162，加上 129，加上 00966，加上 00552，减去 02079。接下来的三个都是零，NA，加上 
好的。我选择辅助墨盒，然后更
Хорошо. Меня беспокоит только то, как скоро нам придётся использовать расходные материалы командного модуля перед входом, а в нём есть вентилятор и гидроксид лития... использовать систему командного модуля. Кроме того, сейчас... командный модуль... кислород и электропитание командного модуля... но я бы предпочёл вернуться..
Ich kopiere die Einstellung für die Kabinenk
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。BI
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। अगर आप टेलीफोटो लेंस का इस्तेमाल करना चाहते हैं, तो
디크. 네 말 알아들었어. 내가 어떻게
好的。吉姆，我们想这样做——我们会先粗略地调整一下云台角度，
كان بالتأكيد أسفل مني. كنت أتابعه أسفل مني منذ كارنارفون تقريبًا. حتى كارنارفون تقريبًا، كان أسفلنا، ثم ارتفع إلى الأفق، ثم عاد أسفلنا مرة أخرى. بدا وكأنه في مدار مختلف عن مداري. كان له أوج وحضيض مختلفان عن مداري. على أي حال، حاولت الاقتراب منه عند الفجر حالما تمكنت من تحديد موقعه. كما قلت، في ذلك الوقت كان على بعد ميل أو ميلين أمامي - أسفل مني. لذا، كلما حاولت الاقتراب منه، قلّت المسافة التي قطعتها. كنت أطلق الصواريخ عكسيًا. كنت أستخدم محركات الدفع العلوية لإطلاقها بطريقة تقلل من سرعتي الإجمالية، ثم أطلقها... في الوقت نفسه. لم أتمكن من الاقتراب منه أبدًا، واستمر في الابتعاد عني. أصبح من الواضح لي أنه بحلول الوقت الذي نصل فيه إلى هاواي، فإن الاقتراب من الصاروخ المعزز في الوقت المناسب للقيام بالنشاط خارج المركبة معه سيستهلك على الأرجح كل الوقود الموجود على متن المركبة. اتفقنا في القواعد الأساسية على عدم القيام بذلك. ل
حسنًا. خذ - لن يكون هذا طويلاً مثل 
Roger. Si j'ai bien compris, le niveau d'alerte a dépassé le seuil de ba
आगे बढ़ो, ह्
了解です。2晩の気温を測
I had a lot of water. I don't know how many gulps, but I probably had 20
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है
В разде
D'accord, Jim. Je vais te l'expliquer en deux parties. La première concerne le transfert des équipements du module de commande. La seconde, le transfert inverse, du module de commande vers les équipements. Ces deux parties représentent des écarts par rapport au rangement au lancement. Voici la première liste: le transfert des équipements du module de commande. Tout d'abord, je te donnerai aussi 
سيتم إعادة ضبط جهاز التسجيل على معدل ا
ロジャー 
Wenn ich deutlich meh
حسنًا. بعد تومي جاكوبس، لدينا الآن تحليل مثير من عالمة فلك محلية من هيوستن تُدعى روبي غراهام. تقول إن جميع الأبراج مناسبة لرحلتك إلى القمر. نيل ذكي، ومايك يتمتع بحكمة، وباز قادر على حل المشكلات المعقدة. كما تقول إن نيل يميل إلى رؤية العالم بنظرة متفائلة، لكنه دائمًا على استعداد لمساعدة المحتاجين أو المنكوبين. نيل، من المفت
7 मिनट में 80 डिग्री नीचे, यानी - चलिए देखते
わかりました。70:18 
Roger. Vuoi restare in attesa per la retrosequenz
是的，你们在几次
좋
रॉजर। अगर आप जाकर स्वीकार कर लें, तो हम आपको एक लोड भेजेंगे जिससे एक वैल्यू अपडेट हो जाएगी, जिसके बाद एक प्रक्रियात्मक बदला
Okay. And we'll get busy getting those pad
收到。
了解。了解しまし
« 0,1 pied par seconde ». La raison pour laquelle nous réduisons le temps de combustion est que, le disjoncteur ASA étant hors service depuis longtemps, nous ne sommes pas vraiment certains que nos réglages seront extrêmement précis. No
吉姆，关于启动时间，你提到了一个小时十五分钟。我们认为这个时间足够了。这取决于船员们的偏好，以及你们认
I know it. Okay, Aquarius; Houston. Recommend in Odyssey that he sw
Houston, Apollo 11. It looks like at this time the sextant would be quite usable for any alignment. There's actua
Roger. Ascension PAD: TI
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन से आपकी आवाज काफी कमजोर आ रही है। मैं स्टेट वेक्टर की जानकारी दोहराता हूँ। आपका स्टेट वेक्टर अब 5 घंटे से अधिक की ट्रैकिंग पर आधारित है। हम आपको 69.7 मील के पेरिसिंथियन पथ पर दिखाते हैं, जिसमें माइनस 14 डिग्री के प्रवेश पथ उड़ान कोण के साथ मुक्त वापसी की संभावना है। आपको सामान्य प्रवेश कोण पर वापस लाने के लिए चंद्र दूरी पर के
Ja. Da wir eine 270-Grad-Rollbewegung ha
괜찮은
Giusto. Questo vale per il sorvolo e il pericinto più un aggiornamento di 2 ore. Vorremmo anche ricevere un rapporto aggiornato su tutte le vostre finestre. Stiamo cercando di elaborare piani alternativi per l'utilizzo della finestra c
Stiamo indican
Что касается выдержки, нам нужна восьмая доля секунды, полсекунды. А если вы думаете, что сможет
我
रॉजर। क्या आप कृपया टर्
ईगल, ह्यू
Hey, Jim, we have some photo information to pass up to you. Discussed this briefly with F
Oh
То же сам
まだ
That's affirmative
هذا منزلنا خلال الساعتين القادمتين، ونريد أن نعتني به جيدًا. حسنًا. أنا الآن على الدرجة العلوية، ويمك
L'un des s
ええ。しか
Columbia, 
好的。我先给你讲步骤。这些步骤必须先完成，第一步是在11号和16号配电盘上，将ASCENT CA和
حسنًا. أجه
और यदि आप हमें अनुमति देते हैं और स्वीकार करते हैं, तो हम अपना नया स्टेट वेक्टर और टारगेट लोड आपको
Roger, è affermativo. L'interruttore del 
还有一点您可能需要注意：在您检查的过程中，有些人想知道您是否能观察到窗户上是否有明显的起雾现象。特别是，阳光照射是否会改变雾气的
Contingency sample is in the pocket. My oxygen is 81 percent. I have no flags, and I'm in mini
Say - S
Okay. Hört mal zu. Ich habe gerade meine eigene kleine Grafik zum ECS-O2-Verbrauch aktualisiert und konnte in den letzten Stunden keine Erhöhung der verbrauchten Menge fe
При зарядке батареи А: сейча
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। ऑटो रेट्रो-जेटिसन बंद है। मो
看看体育界，我们来看看。就在你前几天忙的时候，乔·纳马斯和橄榄球联盟主席皮特·罗泽尔宣布，“百老汇乔”已经同意出售他在“单身汉三号”餐厅的股份，并加入纽约喷气机队。乔今天抵达了喷气机队的训练营，并进行了首次训练。其他几位和乔一起罢训的喷气机队球员也都报到了。来自密歇根州杰克逊的戴维·希尔在上周赢得了他参加的三场高尔夫大满贯赛事中的第三场。他赢得了费城精英赛。希尔今年至今已经赢得了四场比赛，并以12.9万美元的奖金成为今年的奖金王。棒球方面，国家联盟西区的竞争依然激烈。洛杉矶道奇队和旧金山巨人队落后联盟领头羊亚特兰大勇士队一个胜场。休斯顿太空人队目前战绩为48胜48负，排名第五，落后七场。昨晚太空人队和辛辛那提红人队的双赛因雨延期。芝加哥小熊队仍然稳居东区榜首，领先纽约大都会队4.5个胜场。而在美联，巴尔的摩金莺队正朝着东区冠军
هناك منطقة 
没错，吉姆。我们还没拍到照片。它应该在顶部——更正一下，顶部，也就是定位销2的顶部，以及顶部，如果你正对着太阳，它应该能让光标分开，不过横滚角不是太关键；大概
휴스턴,
D'accord, les manœuvres pour adopter l'attitude d'observation 
एक्वेरियस,
حس
11, Houston. Abbiamo per voi un albero e un perno che potre
11, Houston. It lo
Es klingt so, als ob Ihre Kommentare im Wesentlichen darauf hinauslaufen, dass Sie, wenn im Kommandomodul alles so bleibt, wie es jetzt ist, es am besten so lassen würden
Momentan habe ich drei Achsen praktisch auf Rückwärtsneigung eingestellt. Die Gierbewegung durch das Fadenkreuz wird üblic
Gemini 4，休斯顿 
Хорошо. На шаге 34 в разделе «Окончательное размещение», который является своего рода общим разделом, есть шаг, где указано «вторичный гликоль в радиатор», и там написано «байпас, проверить». Пока мы находимся в этом разделе, нам бы хотелось перейти к панели 382, ​​панели управления водой, и установить для клапанов управления водой испарителя, как первичного, так и 
अभी भी वही बात है; लक्ष्य बेहद चमकीला है, और यह समझना 
Okay, again, looking through the telescope, I'm absolutely unable to tell if it's Nunki, but I have it in the sextant - so let
Нет, Хьюстон. Мы не звон
حسنًا، سأتابع ت
هيوستن، 
Gémeaux 4, ici RKV Surgeon. Vous recevez un bilan progressif de votre tension artérielle. Pourriez-vous vérifier que vos paramètres so
ل
아폴로 11호, 휴스
Roger. Just to make sure the urge to get red and blue filter shots 
Bereit zum Kopi
حسنًا يا جيم. "عندما تكون في وضعية ال
私たちは、右または左に約 180
हां, ताकि 
That's why I've been eating so much today. I haven't had anything to 
Roger. Verstanden, Buzz. Wir haben ein paar Änderungen an deiner Checkliste für die Oberfläche vorgenommen. Im Allgemeinen möcht
Да, мы все здесь активно обсуждали это. Похоже, вы предоставляете нам действительно хорошее сравнение с нашей системой
わかりました。パネル5のCB POWER 1と2を「開」にします。次にPOWERスイッチをリセットして離します。パネル11と16のX LUNAR BUS TIEブレーカーを閉じます。パネル16のASCENT ECA CONTROLとDESCENT ECA CONTROLを閉じます。パネル14のBAT 5 NORMALフィードを「オン」にし、続いてBATS 1、2、3、4のLOW VOLTAGEタップを「オン」にします。次にBAT 5 NORMALフィードを「オフ」にします
О, я бы
嘿，它
Okay, Jim. Ich denke, das war's fürs Erste. Wenn Sie keine weiteren Fragen mehr haben, konfigurieren Sie bitte die Sprachausgabe wieder für den Downvoice-Backup. Stellen Sie dazu wie gewohnt den Schalter „VOICE FUNCTION“ auf „DOWNVOICE BACKUP“. Anstatt 
No, I'm no
أعتقد أنك كنت 
Это Хьюстон. Я вас прекрасно понимаю и знаю, что вы совершили три полёта на самолётах D-9 ВВС, полёт на «Антаресе» на «Апо
了解。シグマ・セブン。5分ず
Clairement en dessous de moi. Je le suivais du regard depuis Carnarvon. Jusqu'à Carnarvon, il était en dessous de nous, puis il est monté jusqu'à l'horizon, avant de redescendre en dessous. On aurait presque dit qu'il était sur une orbite différente de la mienne. Son apogée et son périgée étaient différents des miens. Bref, j'ai tenté de le rattraper au lever du jour, dès que j'ai pu le localiser. Comme je l'ai dit, à ce moment-là, il se trouvait à un ou deux kilomètres devant moi, en dessous. Plus j'essayais de me rapprocher, moins je gagnais de terrain. Je tirais en rétrograde. J'utilisais mes propulseurs supérieurs de manière à réduire ma vitesse totale, et je tirais… simultanément. Je ne suis jamais vraiment parvenu à le rattraper, et il a continué à s'éloigner. Il m'est apparu évident qu'une fois arrivés à Hawaï, pour rattraper le lanceur à temps pour la sortie extravéhiculaire, nous épuiserions probablement tout le carburant embarqué. Or, le protocole aéroporté interdisait cette manœuvre. J'ai donc consulté le commandant de bord et nous avons décidé de ne pas poursuivre la partie de la mission concernant le propulseur. Je ne sais pas si je l'ai mentionné, mais lors de la séparation du propulseur, nos mouvements semblaient faibles, de l'ordre d'un demi-degré par seconde en tangage et en lacet. J'ai tenté de les atté
Is your E
아, 잠깐
아니요, 그게 아니에요. 그들
Альфа 3 на ГЛАВН
Ok. Per quanto riguarda la rotta intermedia, credo che sia generalmente accettato che la 
Roger. 
弗兰克，我们还有1分钟时间。你可
روجر. إذا كان لديك وقت فراغ لبضع دقائق، فلدينا إجراء هنا يسمح لنا بالتحق
Хорошо. Теперь у
Да. Я только что сдала P21, и у нас получил
Хорошо. Это будет середина Тихого океана, 357 152 359 268, плюс 0813, минус 16503 065 36221 645 
... من بين النجوم ف
حسناً. يبدو المكا
حسنًا. لا يوجد الكثير من الأخبار هذا الصباح. الأمور هادئة نوعًا ما. أعتقد أن الخبر الأبرز هو معدل الحوادث - وفيات العطلات - وهو بالتأكيد خبر غير سار، فقد بلغ عدد القتلى على مستوى البلاد 233 شخصًا، وكان 9 منهم في هيوستن عشية عيد الميلاد ويوم عيد الميلاد. أما في الأخبار العالمية، فقد تصدرت عائلات رواد الفضاء عناوين الأخبار مجددًا. فقد نشرت كوريا الشمالية هذا الأسبوع رسالة تهنئة بعيد الميلاد من عائلات طاقم أبولو 8 إلى قائد البحرية لويد بوتشر، قائد طاقم سفينة يو إس إس بويبلو. وجاء في الرسالة، الموجهة إلى القائد والسيدة بوتشر في مستشفى سان دييغو البحري: "لقد كنتم في أفكارنا وصلواتنا. لقد جلب لقاؤكم فرحة كبيرة لقلوبنا في يوم عيد الميلاد هذا. أطيب تمني
Sembra che tu stia trascinando la 
Houston, hai butt
روجر، هل حققت أي نجاح
那时你覆盖了 0.05g
ठीक है। हम यहाँ जो सोच रहे हैं, वह यह है कि हम आपके कैमरे में लगे कुछ लेंसों को देख रहे हैं, और यह पता लगाने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं कि क्या उनमें से किसी एक का उपयोग प्रकाश को कम करने के लिए किया जा सकता है ताकि आप इनमें से कोई तस्वीर ले सकें। हम अभी कुछ परीक्षण कर रहे हैं, और हम 
OK, le chauffage es
حسناً. فهم
حسنًا. دعوني أبدأ من البداية. قد يكون هناك بعض التداخل، لكن للتأكد من أننا جميعًا على دراية بالموضوع، سنبدأ بمجموعة من إجراءات الجدول الزمن
Houston, Apollo 11. Il a fait un peu plus froid ici la nuit dernière que les nuits précédentes. EECOMM 
Почему бы вам не перей
Yes, f:8 at 1/250th. And af
没错。我们第一次操纵杆的行程是：前进007，左转005，上转007。最后一次中间行程的行程是：前进004，右转06，上转003。这与图表基本吻合。当时我们略低于图表上的标称线。制动过程中，我们通过制动
Roger. Hai le sp
Freundschaft Sieben, Freundschaft Sieben, hier spricht Chirurg Zanzibar. Ihre Blutdruckmessung ist gut. Sie zeigt den systolischen und diastolischen Wert an. 
프레드, 배경 소음 때문에 더 이상 잘 안 들리네요. 잭이 통신 업링크 스퀠치에 대해 어떻게 할 건지 
Да, подтверждаю. И не могли бы вы ещё раз подсказать, как работает ваш
여전히 비교적 수평 자세를 
..
ट्रांस कंट्रोल पावर चालू है। रोट कंट्रोल पावर, सामान्य, दो, एसी/डीस
Вот и всё. Хорошо. Второй дополнительный вопрос адресован тебе, Джим, и он звучит так: «Сравн
阿
Potrebbe essere un po
तुम कमजोर पड़ रहे हो
رو
Okay, Jack. I'm going to read it to you, and then add some comments and we'll talk about it a little. This should occur sometime after . After the realine at 49 hours, if time permits we would like the crew to investigate while in 
600 фу
Роджер. У нас д
Roger. Et vos tarifs sont b
分かりました。質問です。24ページ
حسناً، تشير التحليلات الأولية للبيانات إلى أن محرك S-II المركزي اهتز بسعة أعلى قليلاً مما لاحظناه في الرحلات السابقة، وقد بدأ ذلك بعد حوالي 160 ثانية من بدء احتراق S-II. نتيجةً لهذه الاهتزازات، 
1, G&N: 62710, più 098, meno 019, accensione 075 49 4965, meno 28897, meno 03944, meno 00686. Rollio 358, beccheggio 226, 347; 01692, più 00610; 29173
여기
Роджер. Все эти процедуры сработают — будут точно отработаны, и мы согласны с тем, что размещение груза и все сопутствующие детал
알겠습니다. 확인했습니다. 좋습니다, 물병자리님. 7.6으
I can read the letters on the hatch cover. It's a boost cover release; and the big yellow arrow that points toward 
تبدو الأمور جيدة جداً يا والي
وسؤال آخر يا هيوستن. عندما تقول "إيقاف تشغيل الطاقة"، ه
Die eine Hälfte meines Fens
p
로저. 델타-V는 42.5이고, 피치다운은 현재 2도입니다. 코어 25는 00425, 26은 00011입니다. 정책
Der O2-Gehalt betr
Oui, je sais, je ne pense pas que ça donnerait une très
Okay. 
이것은 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 제어 점검은 마치 시계처럼 정확하게 진행되었고, 절차 훈련 장비에서 작동하는 방식과 거의 똑같았습니다. 아주 매끄럽게 작동했고 제가 직접 확인했습니다
ああ！スロットルを下
前にあるものを見てくだ
...говорит, что нам это больше не понадобится. Давление будет сохраняться само п
Okay. H
Хорошо, в середине страницы, в строке 9, мы просто вычеркнем «Активироват
13; Roger. VIA alla messa i
はい、その通りです。ここで私たちがやろうとしているのは、皆さんがレートを抑制してそこから抜け出せるような状
アポロ8号、少しの間待機していただけますか。地上回線を確認しましょう
Il fatto di non riuscire a separarci da quel genere di c
Okay, now here's - to accent, here's the POWER AMPL, OFF; TRANSPONDER OFF;
Ja. Das sind Buzz' zwei Sternenkarten, die er gerade als Sonnenschutz 
Хорошо. На 47 часах всего 1096, четыре датчика: Alfa 270, Bravo 278, Charlie 270, Delta 278 и H2 — они показали уровень H2 в процентах, 76 процентов; а уровень O2 — 81 процент. Однако показания второго кислородного бака сейчас завышены. Мы почти уверены, что это неисправность датчика. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы проверили это по показаниям бортового прибора
Gemini VI，休斯顿。
了解しました。もう開いていると思います。ASCENT ECA CONTROL はおそらく既に開いていると思います
Вэнс, по моим подсчетам, мы сделали около 10 снимков «земляного окна». Я не вижу здесь ничего, кроме закрытия вентиляционного отверстия для отходов через некоторое время. Я подумывал о том, чтобы в ближайшее время
Подготовка к п
로저, CSQ. 조종사에게 Aero-Med
威尔科。
阿
Хорошо. Это
Rice
Geh
До.., и я хочу получить СРЕ
彼がきちんと安全ベルトを締めているのが気に入りました。正しい位置に
, закат. Замечания: -1 для B-1, и теперь у меня есть еще четыре раз
Verify cabin fan number 1 circ
... - 13; कुंजी रिलीज़; आगे बढ़ें। 4 13 -..
إنه عميق جداً. بالكا
Hello, Guaymas. This is
Wunderbar, Jim. Siehst du di
Okay, Houston. Coming in loud and clear. I got your caution/warning checkout, step 1, do; the warning lights we'll have will be ASCENT PRESS, CES AC, CES DC. The only caution lights we may have will be a heater lig
Подумав ещё раз, поскольку это ограничит дальность действия, я думаю, нам лучше этого не делать. А учитывая дальность, которую они показывают сейчас (425 миль при уровне сигнала 2,2), похоже,
오로라 세븐, 일반적인 풍선 날리기
حسنًا. قبل أن تبدأ بالنسخ، هذه العملية - ببساطة - هي لتفعيل مقياس ضغط الهيلي
Okay, Jack. On your entry checklist, on pa
31700، غير متاح، غير متاح، ناقص 00050، زائد جميع الأصفار، زائد 00001 000 334 001، جميع الأصفار، زائد 00190 00050 014 0050 413020 183، شاولا، لأسفل 064، لليسار 06، زائد 0747، ناقص 16410 12988 
Roger. Si vous souhaitez prendre des photos, nous vous recommandons d'utiliser le magazine Uniform, chargé de pellicule noir e
Columbia, Houston. Nous avons commis une erreur sur ces coordonnées. Veuillez charger le drone aux coordonnée
另一则本地新闻：亨茨维尔县法院大楼昨天黎明前被烧毁，看来他们又要在那里开工建设了。接下来是一些关于等待返程的家庭的报道。这篇报道由《邮报》记者安·詹姆斯撰写。“我们就像在月球背面休息一样，”瓦莱丽·安德斯在圣诞夜说道，当时她和家人正在等待阿波罗8号脱离月球轨道，返回地球。安德斯太太周二凌晨0点就到了，邻居们刚刚把孩子们都接走，这样在飞船飞到月球背面、与外界失去联系期间，他们一家人就可以休息一下。弗兰克·博尔曼上校的家在户外装饰着四个巨大的常青花环，上面撒满了粉状的雪花，还系着红色的蝴蝶结。书房里的一棵圣诞树正等待着他平安归来，他漂亮的金色头发的妻子苏和两个健壮的儿子弗雷德里克和埃德温计划留在家里，等待午夜时分飞船脱离月球轨道。通常情况下，他们会去圣克里斯托弗圣公会教堂参加午夜弥撒。计划是凌晨0点开始。由于博尔曼家没有小孩，所以圣诞礼物交换只能等到博尔曼上校带着他那份神奇的节日礼物——登月往返之旅——回来之后再进行。洛弗尔上尉忙碌的妻子玛丽莲·洛弗尔说，就孩子们而言，她的四个孩子将过一个完全正常的圣诞节；但谈论礼
Колумбия, Хьюст
そして、私たちは突き進ん
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Мы тут немного занимаемся планированием полета Ап
うーん、分かりません。少なくともかなり前にLOXの排出は始まっているはずです。
हमारे पास एक गो रॉकेट है, जिसकी 7 कक्षाओं में घूमने की क्षमता
Ну, это здорово! Я не могу разорвать пакет. Очень хочется избавиться от этого запаха, а единственный способ сделать это — разорвать э
Интересно отметить, что после навигаторов данные закончились, и те
Das ist bestätigt. Okay. Unter Zeile 4, unter „Glykolpumpe Autotransfer“, schließen Sie die Option
Gemini VI, Хьюстон, обновление смещени
好的，
Ok. Ora, Joe, taglia quattro strisce, lunghe 30 cm ciascuna e con un diametro di 1,2 cm. Fissale con del nastro adesivo lungo i bordi e
Das stimmt. Meisten
... RET 40
懐中
نعم. عليك حقًا مراقبة هذين الزوجين. بالمناسبة، لدينا م
好的，弗雷德，请注意，您船上的二氧化碳读数比我们在地面上测得的略高，所以当您的读数达到 15 时，请切换到辅助模式。我们希望大约每 30 分钟了解一次您的状态——我们会打电话给您。但为了让我们知道我们仍然
Ok, rice
천천히 회
Das ist richtig. Wir versuchen hier, Sie in eine Position zu bringen, in der Sie Ihre Frequenz dämpfen und 
Roger. Flyby SPS/G&N: 62815, plus 097, minus 020 070 54 5944, minus 00028, plus 00023, plus 00069, 269 149 312 NA, plus 00221 00078 00
Das ist Freundschaft Sieben. Ich glaube nicht, dass sie von meinen Steuerdüsen stammen, nein. E
كال كاب كوم، هذا سيجما سفن. أس
Okay. Das ist ein echter Vorteil im Cockpit. Es ist nur ein bisschen dunkel. Es sieht so aus, als
कोलं
Sehr gut. Okay. Soll ich das Ganze zum
Frank, while you are talking about the entry checklist, t
阿波罗11号
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. هل لاحظتَ فرقًا في ضغط النيتروجين قبل فقدان الاشتعال؟ يبدو لي أن الضغطين لم يكونا متساويين في الخزان B، حيث كان الضغط منخفضًا قليلًا. انته
حسنًا، كا
All right
Roger. PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50, minus 00021, 182 287 000, plus 56919. abort, less than 10 minutes, 105 12 30.00. abort, greater than 10 minutes, 103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00. No plus 12: 102 44 27.00. plus 01223, minus all balls, plus 01889 01520 plus 00110 02250, burn time 046 000 190, plus 01187, plus all balls, plus 0
哦不，不，不！（千万
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8। आपकी 
Не знаю, записывали ли мы это раньше, но мы с Эдом оба упомянули, что очень благодарны за всю подготовку, которую прошли в барокамере, в самолете в условиях невесомости и на тренажере для от
روجر. لاحظ أنك
सिग्मा सेवन। मैंने आपकी बात साफ-साफ समझ ली।
E Buzz, non riceviamo ancora alcun dato dal tuo ECG. Sembra che l'unico modo per ottenerne qualcuno è che, quando vuoi, 
BATTERIE C POWER ENTRÉE et ATTE
Что ж, я мо
ठीक है, फ्रेड। सबसे पहले, इसकी तैयारी, आकस्मिकता चेकलिस्ट (पृष्ठ 24) से शुरू करते हुए, हम सुझाव देंगे कि आप इसे शुरू करें, और इस पर आपके किसी भी सुझाव का हम स्वागत करेंगे। दूसरा बिंदु: जब आप बर्न एटीट्यूड में हों, तो आपको सूर्य बिल्कुल ऊपर दिखाई देगा। जब आपका कर्सर शून्य पर सेट होगा, तो यह कर्सर को विभाजित करेगा। हालांकि, एक बात का ध्यान रखें कि यह बहुत आसानी से डिटेंट से बाहर निकल जाएगा क्योंकि यह रोल और यॉ के प्रति बहुत संवेदनशील होगा। समझें कि यह डिटेंट 2 में है, लेकिन बर्न, बर्न टाइम और एटीट्यूड के प्रति बहुत कम संवेदनशील है। दूसरे शब्दों में, यदि आवश्यक हो, तो हम 
우회합시다
كولوم
好的。加90：/G&N，63825，减1.54，加1.32，减0491.7，加0000.1，加6634.0，180，228，001；不适用；加0017.9，6652.2，7:37，6626.5，
حسنًا. في الصف الرابع: تحت قسم السخانات، يجب أن تكون سخانات QUAD الأربعة مغلقة، افتح قسم الشاشات، افتح قسم هو
Acquario,
Apollo 8, Houston. Dans une minut
6까지는 다 들렸는데 7에서 페이드아웃됐어. 7부
حسنًا، ٨. نريد إجراء اختبار ميداني بسيط هنا للتأكد من قدرتنا على إرسال التسجيل الصوتي إلى هيوستن في الوقت المناسب. لذا، نخطط لإرسال تسجيلك، وسنجري اختبارًا ميدانيًا لإعادته إلى هنا والاستماع إل
Хорошо. В районе посадки в центральной части Тихого океана погода хорошая. Облачность 2000, местами переменная; видимость 10; ветер 060 с шагом 10; высота волн 4 фута, показания высотомера 2986, если это имеет значение. Местами кратковременные дожди менее чем на 10 процентах территории. Спасательные силы с «Иводзимы» будут находиться в точке посадки, позывной самолета будет «Re
짐, 당신은 현지 시간으로 오전 8시경 사모아 남동쪽 약 560마일 지점에 도착할 예정입니다. 해당 지역의 일기 예보는 양호하며, 오후 3시경에는 간헐적 파상풍, 높은 파도, 시야 10마일로 예상됩니다. 파도는 5피트 높이에 풍속은 15노트이며, 사모아까지는 배 또는 비행기를 이용하실 수 있습니다. 사모아에서는 배 또는 사모아에서 하룻밤을 보내시고, 다음 날인 토요일 오후 2시 41분까지 엘링턴으로 
私たちも本当に楽しかったです、部隊の皆さん、本当に素晴らしい仕事をしてくれました。本当に感謝し
Сигма 
Okay, Fred. D
ठीक है। इसमें कोई खास परेशानी नहीं है। हम बस इतना ही कर रहे हैं। हम इसे जारी रखने की कोशिश करेंगे। और आप अभी तक इस रवैये से
Cela fait longtemps que le vieux Lovell n'a pa
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストンです。酸素流量計トランスデューサーにいくつか異常が見られました。トランスデューサーの不具合ではないかと疑っています。廃棄物収納ベントをVENT（通気口）にすると、酸素流量が一定になると思っていましたが、そうではありませんでした。また、廃棄物収納ベントバルブを閉めた際にも、いくつか異常な兆候が見られました。夜通し調査を続け、翌朝に問題の状況を報告します。また、廃棄物収納ベントバルブをVEN
D'accor
روجر، فريندشيب سفن. ه
Obwohl die Oilers auf dem Spielfeld nicht so gut abschnitten, waren sie an den Kinokassen ein voller Erfolg. Bud Adams, Don Klausterman und Wally Lemm waren allesamt sehr zufrieden. Sie waren übrigens am Cape, um sich das Spek
不，我还没打开。我尽
روجر. في آخر ليلة لي، نمت أربع ساعات، معظمها نوم عميق ومريح. كانت وجبتي الأخيرة عبارة عن مكعبات الفول السوداني، وعصير برتقال، وشطائر، وكوكتيل فواكه، وهذا كل شيء... شربت حوالي ست رشفات من الماء مع تلك الوجبة، وأنا الآن أستعد لتناول وجبة خفيفة من 
روجر. إليك تفاصيل لوحة التحكم: مفاتيح الصمامات على اللوحة اليسرى جميعها كما ذُكر سابقًا، دون تكرار. جهاز الإشعال مُفعّل. خاصية الإرجاع التلقائي مُعطّل
نعم، كنتُ أخطط للتجربة مع الفلاتر، فقط أثناء نومك. بعد ذلك، كنتُ سأُخرج السدس وأُجرب ال
ठीक है। मैं दोबारा पढ़ता हूँ। सूट कंप्रेसर 1 और 2, बंद; फ्यूल सेल पंप 1, 2 और 3, बंद; ग्रीन/न्यू पावर, बंद; मेन बस टाईज़, बंद; इंटीरियर इंटीग्रल लाइटिंग, बंद; इंटीरियर फ्लडलाइटिंग, बंद; फिर नीचे आते हुए, पैनल पर सभी सर्किट ब्रेकर खुले; पैनल 6, पावर बंद होनी चाहिए; सूट पावर बंद होनी चाहिए; पैनल
मैं करता हूँ। प्रतीक्षा करें। अभी करता हूँ
Хорошо. А вот этот наход
«Аполлон-8», когда у вас будет во
Хорошо, мы видим BAT 6
O
알겠습니다. 프레드, 말씀하신 내용을 잘 읽었습니다. 저희 열역학 전문가들이 검토할 예정입니다. 중간 수정과 관련해서 논의 중인 사항 중 하나는, SHe 탱크가 터지기 전에 수정하지 
Nous 
了解しました。機首を下げてブースターを追
Eagle. Roger. Ricevi
और, जो, ऐसा लगता है कि एस-बैंड
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich erhalte in allen Achsen unregelmäßige Mes
- - جميع تحليلاتنا تستند إلى خفض الطاقة إلى 14 أمبير، لكننا نقرأ عليك الآن
Ich auch. Mir geht es hervorrage
로저. 당신이 그렇게 생각하는 이유는 단지 원뿔곡선 해법
D'accord, très bien. Tout le monde voulait te demander si tu ne pouvais pas prendre un peu de temps pour te détend
ठीक है, जो। पिछली बार हम
चलिए देखते हैं। मुझे नहीं पता कि मैं अभी किस दिशा में 
罗杰。还有一点要补充：由于这个问题在数据优先级会议上引发了
ओह, यह अच्छा नहीं है, जैक; मेरा सुझाव है कि यहाँ संचार के लिए, हम पावर एम्पलीफायर सर्किट ब्रेकर को इन
Right now, we're in nose-to-the-ground type attitude, such that I don't believe the ground stations are able to read us. We have heard several calls cut in and out for us. We're going to stay in this attitude though for a while to keep the booster in sight. It doesn't appear that we're making too much progress in closing with the booster right now. It looks like it's staying out about the same distance as it was before. During the night sight when the booster was below us, it appeared that there was almost a sky full o
Просто хотел уточнить после примерно 45-минутного перерыва. Скажем так, мы заметили, что на ваш
マイクさん、中間コースで必要になるかも
除了我们勘测
ठीक है। उस पृष्ठ के दाहिनी ओर की सबसे ऊपरी पंक्ति को काट दें, जिसमें लिखा है "4 सेकंड के लिए चालू, 50 फ्रेम 
Wie hast du es dorthi
J'ai cet enregistrement
This is C
Alba. Ahhhhh! Bellissime lucciole illuminate quella volta. Era luminoso quella volta. Ma è solo, okay, loro... va bene, ho... se qualcuno legge, ho le lucciole. Sono molto luminose. Sono emanazioni della capsula. Posso colp
बज़, क्या आप हमें वह चेकलिस्ट पढ़कर सुना सकते हैं? हम मेरे पैनल चार्ट का उपयोग करेंगे। आपको कौन सी चेकलिस्ट
Roger.
नमस्कार, कोलंब
Das war eine gute Fernsehsendung, die du neulich beim Einlauf angemacht ha
分かりました。ジャイロのトルク​​角はプラス
Ah, la voilà! Je perdais l'horizon de vue. Ne me dites pas que nos scanners se
了解。T2: 102 54 2900 10
Okay. We'd like a ENTER, 333 ENTER, and then we'd like for you to
좋아요. 그럼 이제 P57
알겠습니다. "카메라 어스샤인 사진 구성"부터 "다크 슬라이드 교체"까지의 정보는 선택 사항입니다. 따라서 해당 부분에 "어스샤인 
अब मैं ड्रग लेने के मूड में आ
了解。LOSが発生し
Fred, volevo solo avvisarti in anticipo che stiamo raggiungendo il valore di CO2 limite per il contenitore secondario, e prevediamo di arrivarci tra circa mezz
روجر، نود إجراء بعض التعديلات على خزانات التبريد. لذا، إذا أمكنك إيقاف تشغيل مفتاح سخان خزان الأكسجين رقم 1 ومفتاح سخان خزان الهيدروجين رقم 2، مع ترك باقي مفاتيح التبريد على ح
Bene. Esatto. Quindi torna al pannello 275, CB MAIN B BAT BUS B per aprire. Ehi, Jack, temo che ques
Apollo 11, Houston. Die bodengestützten Berechnungen für Ihre Welle und Ihren Zapfen entsprechen genau den Werten, die Sie dort erhalten, Mike. Der Horizont erscheint Ihnen schief – es sieht so aus, als ob Sie aus der Bahn geraten wären, da die von uns angegebenen Manövrierwinkel, um 
我一直在想你到底要怎么弄到它。不过
Wir erreichen nun Smyths Meer, eine kleine Mare-Region, die von dunklem, ebenem Material bedeckt ist. Am Rand, uns zugewandt, befindet sich ein frischer, heller Einschlagkrater, und auf der anderen Seite erhebt sich eine B
Battery 3 
Roger. I would like to complete your Fli
Attendez. Je vais essayer d
आगे बढ़ो, पृथ्वी; मैं कुंभ राशि वाला हू
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, 
11, это Хьюстон. Мы завершили настройку нулевого смещения цапфы. Вы можете забрать компьютер и перейти в режим
Роджер. Также советуем оставить оба био
자이로스코프를 끄세
일어나서 걸어 다니고 싶다고 말씀하셨나요
Doin
Roger. Nächste Übertragung versta
Yes, thank you. I heard about that before -
ठीक है, जैक। चलिए, बात करते हैं कि मैं किस तरह से सही स्थिति में आऊंगा और फिर इंजन बर्न करूंगा। मैं नियंत्रण तकनीकों की बात कर रहा हूं। अभी जैसा दिख रहा है, मैं कोशिश करूंगा कि अंतरिक्ष यान को यॉ में रोकूं, जब पृथ्वी मेरी खिड़की से दिखाई दे रही हो। फिर हम गाइडेंस मोड में होंगे या कंट्रोल मोड 
Jack, attends une minute. Laisse-moi
收到，巴兹。405 和 406 号端口似乎
Okay. This coldsoak i
네, 잠깐 이야기가 딴 데로 샜네요. 밥 호프가 다시 베트남에 가서 평소처럼 멋진 공연을 펼치고 있습니다. 뉴스 기사에 나오는 이름 중 하나는 USS 뉴저지호에 관한 것입니다. 밥 호프는 어제, 아니 수요일에 뉴저지호의 거대한 함포탑 위에서 농담을 하며 해외 주둔 미군을 위한 20번째 크리스마스 공연을 기념했습니다. 호프와 그의 공연단 27명은 베트남 해역에서 항공모함 핸콕호의 크리스마스 미사에 참석한 후 뉴저지호 승조원들을 위해 공연을 펼쳤습니다. "이건 세상에서 제일 큰 크리스마스 크래프트일 거예요." 호프는 승조원들에게 말했습니다. "키 달린 웨이크 섬처럼 생겼네요." "저를 위해 21발의 예포를 쏘려고 함선을 다시 꺼내준 건 정말 고마운 일이죠." 호프는 16인치 함포탑 중 하나에 서서 농담을 했습니다. 선원들은 특히 호프와 함께 배에 오른 키 큰 여성들, 그중에는 배우 앤 마거릿과 미스 월드도 있었는데
أخرج ق
Wir informieren Sie über die finale Höhenanpassung über Hawaii. Bitte überprüfen Sie außerdem Ihre X-Achse. Sie liegt leicht außerhalb der Toleranz. Drücken Sie daher die START-KOMPATISIERUNG erst kurz vor Abschluss der Höhenanpassung. Wir arbeiten an einer be
좋습니다. 친절한 DIY 키트 COMM입니다. 수산화리튬 상황에 대한 권장 절차를 알려드리겠습니다. 상태는 양호합니다. 측정 결과 1.8mm이고, 남은 비행 시간 동안 사용하기에 
Okay. Aus Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Das große britische Radioteleskop Jodrell Bank empfing heute um 5:49 Uhr EDT keine Signale mehr von der sowjetischen Mondsonde Luna 15. Ein Sprecher sagte, es scheine, als habe die Sonde den Mond bereits hinter sich gelassen. Ein weiteres Zitat: „Wir glauben nicht, dass sie gelandet ist“, sagte ein Sprecher von Sir Bernard Lovell, dem Direktor des Observatoriums. Washington UPI: Vizepräsident Spiro T. Agnew forderte, bis zum Jahr 2000 einen Menschen auf den Mars zu schicken. Demokratische Politiker entgegneten jedoch, dass die Bedürfnisse auf der Erde Priorität haben müssten. Agnew, ranghöchster Regierungsbeamter beim Start von Apollo 11 am Mittwoch, sprach offenbar für sich selbst und nicht unbedingt für die Nixon-Regierung, als er sagte: „Meiner Meinung nach sollten wir bis zum Ende dieses Jahrhunderts einen Menschen auf den Mars schicken.“ Laredo, Texas, AP: Einwanderungsbeamte in Nuevo Laredo gaben am Mittwoch bekannt, dass Hippies keine Touristenkarten für die Einreise nach Mexiko erhalten, es sei denn, sie baden und lassen sich die Haare schneiden. Huberto Cazaras, Leiter der mexikanischen Einwanderungsbehörde in Nuevo Laredo, berichtete, dass die Behörden in Mexiko-Stadt, Acapulco und anderen beliebten Touristenorten Beschwerden über die Hippies erhalten hätten. United Press International: Die erste Reaktion auf Präsident Nixons Entscheidung, Bundesangestellten am Montag einen Feiertag zu gewähren, damit sie den nationalen Gedenktag zur Apollo-11-Mondlandung begehen konnten, war überwiegend Überraschung. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, London: Europa ist vom Apollo-11-Ereignis begeistert. Zeitungen auf dem ganzen Kontinent füllen ihre Seiten mit Bildern der Saturn-V-Rakete, die zum ersten Mal eine Verbindung der Erde zu ihrem natürlichen Satelliten herstellte. Und die Schlagzeilenmacher suchten nach den passenden Worten, um diese Leistung zu würdigen. „Das größte Abenteuer in der Geschichte der Menschheit hat begonnen“, verkündete die französische Zeitung Le Figaro, die vier Seiten Berichten vom Cape Kennedy und Diagrammen der Mission widmete. Die Boulevardzeitung Paris Jour rief: „Die ganze Welt sagt Bravo!“ Die kommunistische Tageszeitung L'Humanité veröffentlichte auf der Titelseite ein Foto des Starts und widmete die gesamte Rückseite einem enthusiastischen Bericht über die Mondlandung. Darin wurden der Countdown und der Start, die Frauen und Familien der Astronauten sowie Hintergrundinformationen zu den Mondaktivitäten beschrieben. Hempstead, New York: Joe Namath meldete sich am Mittwoch offiziell im Trainingslager der New York Jets an der Hofstra University, nachdem er sich hinter verschlossenen Türen mit seinen Teamkollegen über seine Differenzen mit dem NFL-Commissioner Peter Rozelle ausgetauscht hatte. London, UPI: Dem House of Lords wurde am Mittwoch versichert, dass ein amerikanisches Kleinst-U-Boot das Ungeheuer von Loch Ness weder beschädigen noch angreifen würde. Lord Nomay erklärte, er wolle sichergehen, dass niemand, der ein U-Boot im Loch Ness betreibe, „keiner dort möglicherweise lebenden Kreatur Schaden zufüge oder
휴스
Ecco un articolo di Harry Rosenthal dell'Associated di Houston. Due Babbi Natale illuminano la vigilia di Natale per Jeffrey Lovell, 2 anni. Il primo ha bussato alla sua porta di casa e gli ha portato i regali. Il secondo ha accompagnato il padre a casa dalla Luna. Il primo indossava un abito rosso e una barba bianca e ha emesso un grido così forte da essere sentito fino all'isolato. Il secondo era un enorme motore che sputava fiamme dietro la Luna, e migliaia di persone attendevano la notizia dell'accensione. "S
Nur mal so nebenbei, Joe. Wir essen gerade zu Mittag, und ich habe mir ein Hotdog-Sandwich mit Ketchup
Регистрационны
لاحظتُ عدة مرات عند الانتقال من ضوء الشمس إلى الظل، أنه بمجرد دخولي، ينعكس ضوء الشمس على و
Okay. I prossimi angoli di linea grossolani per l'ingresso. Okay. I prossimi, angoli di ingresso per (1) JETT, (2) osservazione della Luna, ingresso. Okay. Resterò in at
Okay. ENTER, 333 ENTER, and then read out register 1, and tha
Apollo 8, Houston
كيف ن
휴스턴, 아폴로
指示された推進剤量の32パーセント。OAMS源温度は
11. روجر. تم الاستلام
괜찮아요. 잠시 기다려 주세요.
Спокойствие, это Хьюстон. Вы скопировали мой адр
حسنًا. أولًا، انتقل إلى الصفحة 12. على الجانب الأيمن من الصفحة، بدءًا من منتصف الصفحة إلى أسفل، احذف كل ما هو موجود أسفل "Cycle 5 frames, Replace dark side or dark slide" حتى تصل إلى أس
لا. سأتحقق من الوض
रॉजर। हम आपकी बात से सहमत हैं। और ऐसा लगता है कि आपकी पिच रेट
本当にそう
鹰，休斯顿。我们不在乎是什么——我们只是想得到漂移率，看看在你抛弃
Während die anderen den Mond beobachten, möchte ich sicherstellen, dass wir einen guten Bericht erhalten. Könntest du mir diesen Be
好的。舱内温度是92华氏度，我会给你准备逆变器。请稍等。——主逆变器是250瓦的，温度大约是143华氏度。150瓦的逆变器是102
你好，休斯顿；这里是阿波罗8号。我们现在已经
حسناً يا جاك، هذه
わかりました。いいですね。パネル276の回路ブレーカー「INSTRUMENTATION POWER CONT
Okay, going through. After the "Shutdown on burn time minus 1 second," we scratch the next line; and we scratch "ATTITUDE CONTROL: YAW, to PULSE"; we scratch "Damp excessiv
ठीक है, और अगर हो सके तो इनके दाईं ओर थोड़ी जगह छोड़ दें क्योंकि जब हम बैकअप प्रक्रिया के बारे में बात करेंगे, तो हम उसी सूची का उपयोग कर सकते हैं, और मैं आपको इन सर्किट ब
Bonjour Bermudes. Friendship Seven.
アポロ8号、
Das is
A泵是否已脱离主供
Ok. Mentre Jack era in comunicazione, guardavo fuori dalla finestra di attracco e ho visto un'altra bella pioggia di particelle uscire dal modulo di servizio. E questa volta la posizione sembra essere dall'altra part
ジェミニ4のロジャー・ヒューストンです。S-6の天気予報を
答
Okay, Joe. Und während du das ma
Roger, Buzz. We noticed the same thing. It's very similar to looking at a light shining on something like a billiard ball or a bowling ball. You get this bright spot in the blue of the water, 
نعم. جيم نائم الآن، وأنا وجاك مستيقظان، وقد انتهيت للتو من النوم لمدة 5 أو 6 ساعات أخرى، لذلك لستُ راغبًا بشكل خاص في العودة 
了解しまし
알겠습니다. 어제 케이프 커내버럴에서 발사를 참관했던 빌리 브란트 서독 총리와 닉슨 대통령은 오늘 회담을 마무리할 예정입니다. 브란트 총리는 동유럽 국가들, 특히 동독, 폴란드, 러시아와의 회담을 계속 진행하겠다는 대통령의 확답을 받기 위해 미국을 방문한 것으로 알려져 있습니다. 많은 관제사들이 아직 업무에 복귀하지 못했지만, 서서히 복귀하고 있다는 보고가 있습니다. 그리고 MOCR의 관제사들도 여
Кен, я... я не понял. Нам снова пришлось менять OMNI. Можешь сказать, что при минус 40
Quella sarà la nostra casa per le prossime due ore e vogliamo prendercene cura al meglio. Okay. Sono sul gradino più alto e posso guardare giù, oltre le piattaforme del carrello di atte
Bene. Ora, quando saremo in quarta fila, apriremo l'interruttore OPERATE; questo significa che perderemo la possibilità di monitorare i vostri CDU, quindi non saremo in grado di vedere il vostro assetto. Pertanto, non saremo in grado di consigliarvi qual
双子座，
了解、11。PADS を 2 つ取得しました。30 と 31 です。30 SPS/G&N: 36691、マ
好的。我看到现在是
روجر. مفتاح T/M الخاص بنا في وضع الوقت الحقيقي، و A
ビル、切り替えを始める前に、ブラボーが完成するまで待
حسنًا. الخطوة 1: إيقاف تشغيل BIOMED؛ الخطوة 2: الانتقال إلى معدل بت منخفض؛ الخطوة 3: الانتقال إلى وضع النسخ الاحتياطي لخفض مستوى الصوت؛ الخطوة 4: تشغيل مضخم الطاقة؛ الخطوة 5: فتح قاطع دائرة مضخم الطاقة في اللوحة 16؛ الخطوة 6: إيقاف تشغيل مفتاح وظيفة النطاق. اقرأ هذه الخطوات لي، ث
Ja. Einer davon ist PNGCS. Das Problem ist, wir wissen nicht, ob wir uns an PNGCS oder an PNGCS
لا أعرف. من طريقة أدائه للرقصة لا يمكنك معرفة ذل
Хо
ठीक है। पिछली टिप्पणी का मतलब यह था कि हम इसे लगभग शुरू करने के
Hallo, Hawa
ठीक है। हमें समझ आ गया। और हम आपको सलाह देते हैं कि आप अपना परीक्षण जहाज पर ही पूरा कर लें। यदि आपको कोई समस्या आती है, तो जब आप उच्च लाभ वाले एंटीना की स्थिति में प
حسنًا، سنصعد إلى هنا يا والي. 31 
ठीक है, जैक। कृपया, अपनी बातचीत दोहराइए। आप क
Хорошо. А если резервуар с SHe лопнет в течение этого периода времени до того, как мы получим информацию о траектории, это несколько 
不。事实上，我一直打开着面板，就是为了检查一下，看看有没有检测到水汽。实际上，这里的相对湿度已经略微下降了一些，而且航天器内任何地方都没
روجر. ممتاز. ولديّ تحديثٌ بخصوص المواد الاستهلاكية، إذا كنتَ مستعدًا للنسخ أو الاس
C'è un orizzonte interessante. Il sole è spostato a sinistra di circa - oh, direi 40 gradi. C'è una linea scura sulla superficie terrestre, arancione tra le nuvole, una fascia gialla chiara, una 
Ok. Questo è facoltativo. Il modo in cui avev
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo su Marte entro il 2000, ma i leader democratici hanno risposto che la priorità deve essere data alle esigenze sulla Terra. Agnew, alto funzionario governativo al decollo dell'Apollo 11 mercoledì, apparentemente parlava a nome suo e non necessariamente dell'amministrazione Nixon quando ha affermato: "A mio giudizio, dovremmo mandare un uomo su Marte entro la fine di questo secolo". Laredo
ठीक है, मुझे नहीं लगता कि धरती के 
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。看来我们信号没传到他们那里了。他们还没完全完成。我们正在等待生物医学设备开关左转的倒计时。完毕
Хорошо. Мы
D'accord. Nous sommes maintenant
再度ロックオンされるまでお待ちく
よし、マニュアルとオート、ミディアム。これで完了。0度から-360度の間で決められないようだ。よし、
تشير علامة تحديد زاوية الميل إلى ارتفاع طفيف، وبالتالي تتطابق مع زاوية التراجع، والتي تبلغ حاليًا 30 درجة. أنا الآن منحرف إلى اليمين بمقدار 10 درجات تقريبًا، ويبدو أنن
सेंस
ロジャー、私と私の同胞からの挨
Questa è
저도 그렇게 생각합니다. 터
ليس بشكل دائم يا مايك. فقط ابقَ هنا ريثما يفحص تشارلي كيفية
Oui. Maintenant que nous savons où se trouve (illisible), ce sera beaucoup plus facile la prochaine fois. La première fois que nous avons cherché Le Caire – Le Caire et Alexandrie –, nous avons longtemps cherché (illisible). Je n'ai pas vraiment vu l'aérodrome. J'ai juste aperçu les environs. Je me suis dit qu'en pointant correctement l'app
Je suppose que vous voulez que nous repr
अब मुझे पेरिस्कोप में सूर्योदय दिखने लगा है। इस विशेष कक्षा के दौरान पेरिस्कोप में पहली रोशनी रात के समय दिखाई दे रही है। यह स्पष्ट है कि रात के समय रेट्रोएटीट्यूड में पेरिस्कोप का कोई कार्य नहीं है। मुझे जो पहली रोशनी मिल रही है, वह लगभग अभी है। सूर्योदय पेरिस्कोप से काफी तेजी से आ रहा है। मुझे वे प्रकाशमान वस्तुएं दिखाई दे रही हैं जिनका जॉन ने उल्लेख किया था, और मैं उन्हें गिराकर कुछ और बना सकता हूँ। म
Okay, Jim. We're seeing the tape recorder now, and just - by the way, how long do you expect to keep the TV on this even
Il mio piano è di tornare al PROGRAMMA 52 di rientro - beh, non è arrivato a Capella e non riesco a ric
एबल 8 की तस्वीर ली गई। एक समुद्र तट। यह टैम्पिको का तट 
好的，11. 这
ठीक है। अब जब हम चौथी पंक्ति में पहुँचेंगे, तो हम ऑपरेट सर्किट ब्रेकर को खोल देंगे; इसका मतलब यह है कि हम आपके सीडीयू को देखने की क्षमता खो देंगे, इसलिए हम आपकी स्थिति नहीं देख पाएंगे। इसलिए, हम आपको यह सलाह न
Хорошо. Всё в порядке. В настоящее время нас всё устраивает в работе связи, Фрэнк. Мы просто ст
Ich 
Мы расположились практичес
Oka
Yes, I'm sure it is
Sieht 
好的，休斯顿。你觉得你能不能稍微转动一下地球，这样我们就能得到
好的，杰克，飞机在俯仰和横滚方向上都出现了偏差，所以我怀疑可能是后面某个地方的排气出了问题。我不得不使用直接控制模式来稳定飞机，一旦
D'accord, alors prenons la colonne de nuit: 17h3
Мы подумывали немного прокипятить жидкос
I am swit
Okay. Ed hat ein paar Fotos gemacht. Ich weiß allerdings nicht, was er fot
Roger. And the weathe
收到，迈克。这真是太好了，不过如
D'acco
Okay. Good deal, Frank. The other one is - the boys in the back room would like some time when everybody is awake - if you would fire up both cabin fans for about 5 minutes, they would like to see what the DELTA temperature is on the telemetry when you get the stagnation broken down and get some flow going 
STABILIZATION CONTROL circui
ジムは残りのヘルメットは外しておくつもりだと思う。ヘルメットの中はちょっと無酸素状態になるんだ。この
好的。
حضّرنا ثلاثة أكواب من القهوة اليوم. الكوب الأخير - كما تعلم، بعد أن سخنت جميع الأنابيب، بما في ذلك جهاز التسخين الهيدروجيني - كان أدفأها
Roger. Been a real g
Voilà, c'est l'un des nombreux points à aborder. Je voulais vous rappeler quelque chose que j'ai déjà dit à Jim, concernant les commandes. Actuellement, vous pouvez reprendre le contrôle en cas de 
Его очень легко заметить. Отсюда видны все края кратеров, а также, конечно, белый полумесяц на противоположной стороне, куда падает солнце. Тени сейчас довольно длинные. От Маскелина B
Roger. Entrée PAD: zone du Pacifique central, roulis 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, latitude plus 1332, moins 169
... 1-أ يساوي 6
Columbia, Houston.
Hey, willst du das hier nicht zurückbringen? Bist du etwa auf Gewichtsersparnis beim Kommandomod
Понял. Ждите. Хорошо. Нажатие кнопки составляет примерно 5 фунтов на квадратный дюйм
I hope it stays that way. Okay, Jack, w
Okay, The second step was in the circuit ASCENT ECA CONTROL, close, two of them. Cross that out. In the next line, we had BATTERY 5 NORMAL FEED, on; cross out BATTERY 5 and put BATTERY 6 
Maybe I could slide out of he
Bene. Stiamo prevedendo che, al momento nominale del tuo prossimo percorso intermedio, ovvero all'interfaccia di ingresso meno 2 ore, prevediamo una combustione di 1,4 piedi al secondo, che modifica il tuo gamma all'interfaccia di ingresso di un decimo di grado. In questo momento, senza ulteriori manovre, il tuo gamma è di -6,39 gradi, e lo aumenteremo leggermente per raggiungere il centro della linea di destinazione, che sarà dopo la ma
... K
Хорошо. Вы говорите, что углы, которые вы мне дали для 5018, были предназначены для модели А, поэтому они не подойдут для 5018, и нам следует от 
Canary，你手动加注燃油到 54% 了吗？
حسناً. قم بإيقاف تش
हमें इस सारे पानी को यहाँ स
Here is a feature by Harry Rosenthal of Associated from Houston. Two Santas brighten th
로저. 알겠습니다. 짐, 파워 앰프 토크백 표시등이 회색으로 켜져
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir haben Sie laut und deutlich verstand
لا يزال ضغط المصدر لدينا جيد
Roger
Ok, Jack. Ti hanno mai detto che hai ottenuto una proroga di 60 giorni per la dichia
ت
Хорошо. Я загрузил ваш 33-1. У меня есть данные по резервному управлению для 33-1, когда вы будете готовы к копированию. В прошлый раз у нас возникла небольшая проблема. Примерно на двух трет
我们知道有很多来自不同国家的科学家都在翘首以盼地等待着月球样本的到来，我们也觉得你们会很想亲眼看看它们现在的样子。这两个箱子是样本返回容器。它们是真空包装的，在月球表面真空密封后，被带入指令舱，装进这些玻璃纤维袋中，拉上拉链，再从外面重新密封，最后放置在指令舱侧面的这些容器里。这就是这两
تقع مسؤولية هذه الرحلة أولاً على عاتق التاريخ ورواد العلم الذين سبقونا في هذا المسعى؛ ثم على عاتق الشعب الأمريكي الذي عبّر بإرادته عن رغبته؛ ثم على عاتق الإدارات الأربع المتعاقبة ومجالسها التشريعية لتنفيذها تلك الإرادة؛ وأخيراً على عاتق فرق الوكالة والصناعة التي بنت مركبا
هذا هو الوقت المنق
That's beau
아니요, 그 렌즈에 맞습니
Affermativo. Proprio alla mia destra vedo un grande disegno di luci, apparentemente proprio sulla costa. Vedo il profilo di una città e una luce molto brillante appen
Gib Gas, Baby, voller Hub des Gimbal
Dice di eseguire le faccende domestiche, riporre i caschi, stivare le borse; disfare lo specchio, la lista di controllo e il gruppo di smaltimento. Stivare il gruppo di stivaggio provvisorio, disfare e configurare per l'uso 16 millimetri, HC-EX, f:4, 500, infinito, 6 fotogrammi al secondo. Questo è tutto ciò che dice - su quella pagina. Ecco dove siamo ora. La prossima cosa è tra un'ora quando trasferiremo l'alimentazione al LM e attiveremo il 
그거
Aquarius, we're finished with the uplink. The computer is yours, and you can open the UPDATA LINK circuit breaker
Okay. Bei 1 hatten wir Fotoziel 90 und Terminat
Okay, Konfiguration von Panel 11, oberste Reihe: AC-Bus B, S-Band-An
Роджер. 40 2711 398 033, вниз 043, влево 23, плюс 0832 минус 16500 12956 36208; северная группа звезд остается Сириусом и Ригелем; углы крена, тангажа и рыскания остаются прежними: 129 155 010, пустое пространство остается двумя квадратами в течение 20 секунд, квадратами B и D; горизонт на линии 4 градуса на отметке минус 3 минуты. К
حسنًا. ماذا بعد يا جيمس؟ خط
了解しました
さて、見てみましょう。ここには18ミリの銃が付いていますよ
Ci stiamo avvicinando a una serie di piccoli crateri da impatto. Tra noi e loro c'è una zona scura che potrebbe essere una vecchia colata lav
Roger. Ho capito che verso poppa, verso est, i raggi apparivano più scuri. Ho capito, Buzz, che questo era l'aspetto del materiale scoperto dai raggi, che appariva più scuro per 60 o 90 centimetri, estendendosi verso l'esterno. È
حسنًا. نحن نتفقد الأضواء الكاشفة التي أعطيناها لك. في الواقع يا جاك، يمكنك استخدام الأضواء التي أعطيناها لك. لا داعي للبقاء في الظلام. من المفترض أن تكون موصولة بالتيار الرئيسي "ب"، ون
さあ。トミー・ジェイコブスに続いて、地元ヒューストンの占星術師、ルビー・グラハムさんから、とびきりホットな言葉をいただきました。彼女は、あなたの月への旅はすべての星座が順調だと言っています。ニールは賢く、マイクは判断力があり、バズは複雑な問題を解決できます。また、ニールは世界をバラ色の眼鏡で見る傾向がありますが、苦しんでいる人や困っている人をいつでも助ける用意があるとも言っています。ニール、あなたは「感情を込めて人生を解釈できる直感」を持っていると言われています。バズは優れた批判力に加えて、とても社交的で孤独に耐えられないと言われています。彼女はマイクが何時に生まれたのか知らなかったので、マイクはニールと同じ性質を持っているか、想像力の乏しい人には風変わりに見えるかもしれない
D'accord, Fred. C'est une tr
你听到我们对太空人队的评
カプセルを再突入姿勢で停止させています。ロールアウト中です。ヨーはゼロ、ロールアウトが始まっています。これを捕捉して、その後観察したいと思います。ロールは良好です。ピッチングが始まっており、ヨーも始まって​​います。速
روجر. الطقس متقلب، الرؤية 10 أميال، ارتفاع الأمواج 3 أقدام. ليس
Nein. Ich habe nicht vor, es dort wieder hinzus
«Транквилити, это Хьюстон. У нас также есть набор из примерно 10 вопросов, касающихся ваших наблюдений, того, что вы могли видеть во время миссии. Вы можете обсудить это позже сегодня вечером или позже в ход
GOが完了しました。スーツの温度は良好にコント
Да уж
알겠습니다, 짐. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 그들이 그걸 다 복사했는지 확인해 볼게
Roger. Abbiamo ricevuto la stessa risposta nel
Ehi, Jack, è al lavoro. E una cosa, confrontando la checklist di Jim con la m
روجر. لقد أرسلتُ أمر T/M الخاص بك،
了解しました。「承認」ボタンを押していただければ、値を更新するロードを送信します。その後、手順が変更されます。ジム、後ほ
Roger. Hai osservato q
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस आपको पिछली रात के भूविज्ञान संबंधी प्रश्न के बारे में कुछ जानकारी देगा। हम अपेक्षाकृत चिकने गड्ढों वाले क्षेत्र में उतरे हैं, जिनमें लंबे, वृत्ताकार द्वितीयक गड्ढे हैं। इनमें से अधिकांश गड्ढों के किनारे उभरे हुए हैं, चाहे उनका आकार कुछ भी हो। हालांकि, यह बात हर जगह लागू नहीं होती। आसपास कुछ छोटे गड्ढे ऐसे भी हैं जिनके किनारे स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई नहीं देते। पूरे क्षेत्र की मिट्टी बहुत महीन रेत से लेकर गाद तक है। पृथ्वी पर इसके सबसे करीब जो चीज होगी, वह पिसी हुई ग्रेफाइट होगी। इस मिट्टी में विभिन्न आकृतियों, आकारों और बनावटों वाली चट्टानें हैं, जो गोल और कोणीय दोनों हैं, और कई की बनावट भी अलग-अलग है। जैसा कि मैंने कहा, मैंने सादे बेसाल्ट और छिद्रयुक्त बेसाल्ट जैसी दिखने वाली चट्टानें देखी हैं। कुछ में क्रिस्टल नहीं हैं, कुछ में छोटे सफेद फेनोक्रिस्ट हैं, जिनकी मात्रा शायद 1 से 5 प्रतिशत से भी कम है। और हम एक ऐसे चट्टानी मैदान में हैं जहाँ चट्टानों का आकार आम तौर पर 2 फीट तक होता है, और कुछ इससे भी बड़ी हैं। कुछ चट्टानें सतह पर पड़ी हैं, कुछ आंशिक रूप से दिखाई
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। हम
Хорошо. И ещё одно замечание для тебя, Аполлон-8; наприме
Эй, Джим. С какой ско
조명이 환하게 켜져 있고, 기분도 좋고, 활기찬 분위기입니다. 객실 매개변수: 기압 1, 습도 65, 온도 20, 1번 구획 내부 압력, 1차 자동 155, 2차 자동 155, 실린더 내부 압력 320기압
روجر. نحن نعمل على نسخة طبق الأص
Okay. I
OK. BATTERIE 2, FAIBLE TE
D'accord. Je suis maintenant en attente. Et vous comprenez mes int
好的。休斯顿，现在应该调到高增
로저, 알겠습니다. 아폴로 랜드마크 런 원 파일을 받았습니다. 복사
क्या आप चाहते हैं कि मैं रेट कमांड से पिच
罗杰。来自公共事务办公室的最新消息：阿波罗11号仍然是全球新闻的焦点。只有四个国家——共产主义中国、朝鲜、北越和阿尔巴尼亚——尚未向其公民通报您的登月飞行和登月。一位记者表示，他已经找不到合适的词语来形容您的成功。今晚，尼克松总统计划在华盛顿观看全明星棒球赛。赛后，他将前往太平洋回收区。周三晚上，他将从约翰斯顿岛乘直升机前往海军通信舰“阿灵顿”号。周四早上，他将再次登上直升机，飞往“大黄蜂”号，以便及时观看您的溅落。陪同总统的有国务卿威廉·罗杰斯和弗兰克·博尔曼。他们将与太平洋舰队司令约翰·西德尼·麦凯恩海军上将一起在回收舰的舰桥上观看溅落。总统在“大黄蜂”号上的停留结束后，将启程前往亚洲访问，并按计划访问罗马尼亚。据信，月球15号探测器在绕月飞行52圈后，于昨日坠入危机海。苏联塔斯社报道称，探测器在近月空间进行了“科学”研究。乔德雷尔班克天文台的伯纳德·洛弗尔爵士表示，月球15号以约300英里/小时的速度撞击月球表面。越南近来局势相对平静。巡逻的美国大兵被发现携带收音机收听你们的航班。驻越美军广播电视网对此次任务进行了全程报道。埃及和以色列在苏伊士运河沿线的冲突仍在继续。联合国观察员正在努力制止冲突。在华盛顿，众议院筹款委员会投票决定将27.5%的石油枯竭补贴削减至20%。休斯顿地区已经下了好几次雨。今天多云，预计还会有阵雨。体育方面，正如我们之前提到的，全明星赛今晚举行。昨天没有比赛。昨晚在纽约，美国棒球作家协会将贝比·鲁斯评为史上最伟大的棒球运动员，乔·迪马乔则被评为在世最伟大的棒球运动员。弗兰克·博尔曼在为球员举办的晚宴上宣布了这一消息。乔·纳马斯在纽约喷气机队的训练营进行了一整天的训练。大约500名孩子想要触摸“百老汇乔”，五名警察费了好大劲才控制住他们。他说自己感觉很好，如果教练威布·尤班克允许，他将参加8月1日的全明星赛。休斯顿油人队在克尔维尔的训练营昨天下雨了，但训练仍在继续。有一些轻微的伤病，但都不算严重。教练沃利·莱姆对目前的训练情况感到满意。油人队预计将有超过3万名观众观看与布法罗队的季前赛。显然，唐·梅雷迪思宣布退役的消息并没有影响球
Солнце, кажется, не сильно меняет ситуацию; однако различное падение солнечных лучей усиливает запотевание, или, по крайней мере, из
ヒューストン、アポロ11号が
Könnten Sie uns bitte die OAMS-Treibs
フレンドシップ・セブン、ケープ飛行隊は
罗杰。我已经有了你的航班变更信息，如果你准备好了，请抄写一
そうだな、待
Bene. La procedura è la seguente:,, INVIO; 1331, INVIO; 7, INVIO; e INVIO. La spiegazione è la seguente. Durante gli anni '80, c'è stata una volta in cui è stato inserito nel computer circa 16 secondi dopo che l'interruttore OPTICS ZERO è stato spostato su ZERO. Questa è un'anomalia molto rara in quanto, se si esegue questa operazione durante un intervallo di 0,4 secondi circa 16 secondi dopo aver azzerato l'ottica, alcuni bit della modalit
यह जी एंड एन की एंट
Roger. Und d
Не думаю, Фред. Это в нескольких сотнях миль позади тебя. 700 миль — это именно то число, как мне сказали. И поскольку приборная панель не внесла корректир
서지 탱크 
ठीक है, यह खिसक गया है। चल
Lascia che te li rilegga. RN meno RP, più 77; lancio per 400K, nominale; RET 400K, 22 più 02; ETO, 24 più 43; fine blackout, 30 più 01; Drogue, 31 
Ok. E potresti cercarli nel telescopio se non sono già nel se
D'accord. Pour la manœuvre, il faudra aller dans GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, ATTITUDE CONTROL. Les com
了解しました、ジム。COMMの推奨事項を作成しました。うまくいけば、パワーアンプの電源を切ることで電力を節約できるはずです。手順を読み上げて少し考えていただきたいのですが、最初のヨ
تأكد من أن مفتاح حالة نظام التحكم الآلي (ACS) في و
好的。第一行的设置是正确的。第二行我们需要将 QUAD TCA 1 到 4 关闭。第三行我们需要将 ATCA (PGNS) 关闭。第四行我们需要将 STANDBY 和 OPERATE 全部关闭，而你说的
좋습니다. 두 단계만 더 남았습
Vous quittez la sphère d'in
——一份9.5美元和24美元，一份2美元，一份3美元，一份4美元。这些主菜真不错
Hey Jack, wir b
Friendship Seven, qui è Kano. Alle 16:33 GMT. Noi non...
マイク、入国
N
我这边窗口显示的速度大约是每秒30英尺。助推器下降得很快，好像我们速度差很大似的，它
Хорошо. Давайте посмотрим, всё ли я понял. Для нач
حسنًا. بقية تحديثك كانت 
ठीक है। असल में, इससे आपको टनल और केबिन के बीच 3 psi के डेल्टा-पी के साथ टनल प्रेशर इंटीग्रिटी या हैच प्रेशर इंटीग्रिटी की जांच करने का मौका मिलता है। फिर आप इसे बाहर निकालने की प्रक्रिया में नहीं जाते। आप इसे अलग होने तक वहीं छोड़ देते हैं। और इससे आपको शॉटगन डेल्टा-वी प्रभाव म
دقيقت
حسنًا، لنكمل. بعد عبارة "إيقاف التشغيل عند وقت الاحتراق ناقص ثانية واحدة"، نحذف السطر التالي؛ ونحذف "التحكم في الوضع
다음 페이지의 B1 칸에는 음식이 약 15% 정도 남아 있는 것으로 추정됩니다. B2 칸에서는 PPK를 꺼내고 쓰레기를 버렸습니다. B3 칸의 4번 창에는 16mm 케이블, 18mm 렌즈, 그리고 직각 거울이 있습니다. 여기까지가 현재까지의 상황
और यह ठीक वैसे ही घूम रह
قواطع الدائرة، درجة الصوت 1، الانحراف 1، درجة الصوت 2، الانحراف 2، مفتوح؟ تابع وانتقل إلى الفعل 82. ل
Der Landeanflug war ziemlich anstrengend. Als wir hinausschauten, konnten wir die beiden Zwillinge-Sterne r
没错。下一步：等待30分
――本当
C'est exact, Jim. Tu as la bonne approche, et as-tu bien compris qu'il faut faire un 400 + 5 après un 40
Roger. Sigma Seven. Flaggenplot. 
مناورة غريبة يا هيوستن
Хорошо. Наша самостоятель
Imbardata completata. Programma di rolli
Ok. Il tifone Bab
वॉली
알겠습
双子座
당신이 알려준 레트로파이
了解。ENTER
알겠습니다. 말씀하
D'accord. Je ne vois aucun 
Хорошо. Когда устройство находится в положении для набл
了解、ジョー。窓5の外、また転がる物体を拾ったので、間
Хорошо. Фред, это было хорошо в контрольном списке. На этом всё. Сейчас мы предоставим вам контрольный список для отключения питания, и мы хотели бы спросить, планируете ли вы использовать карту перезарядки. Если да, то в неё есть некоторые из
F
अच्छा लगा। ठीक है। हमने प्रवेश-पूर्व तैयारियों
Roger
네. 그는 문을 반쯤 
切
Roger. Se non intralci lo Zar mentre si lava i denti, ti preghiamo di aumentare un po' la quantità dell'accumulatore primario. Ora la quantità è al 20,6% su 
إنها تنتقل الآن من اليمين إلى 
Основные авто
Nous aimerions maintenant vous poser une question concernant l'alignement, etc. Nous voulions savoir si vous pouviez apercevoir des étoiles par la fenêtre. Nous voulions également savoir si vous pouviez utiliser le module
알겠습니다. 오늘 아침 아폴로 관련 주요 기사들 중에, 커다란 토끼를 데리고 있는 아름다운 소녀를 찾아보라는 기사가 있습니다. 고대 전설에 따르면, 창고라는 이름의 아름다운 중국 소녀가 4천 년 동안 그곳에 살았다고 합니다. 그녀는 남편에게서 불멸의 알약을 훔친 죄로 달로 추방당했다고 전해집니다. 그녀의 동반자인 커다란 중국 토끼도 찾아보시면 좋을 겁니다. 이 토끼는 계피나무 그늘 아래 뒷발로 서 있는 모
ठीक है, जैक। 49 घंटे पर वे आपसे यह करने को कह रहे हैं कि उन्होंने ऑप्टिक्स शाफ्ट कोण में लगभग 0.2 ड
प्रतीक्षा करें
أو بالأحرى، هيوستن. جيم، يبدو أننا نجحنا في تثبيت الاتصال، مما سيُحسّن تدفق البيانات لدينا هنا. لكن المشكلة الوحيدة هي أ
إن منظر القمر الذي حظينا به مؤخراً مذهل حقاً. فهو يملأ حوالي ثلاثة أرباع نافذة المركبة، وبالطبع، يمكننا رؤية محيطه بالكامل، على 
아주 좋습니다. 폴 해니 스타일의 인터스텔라 타임즈 12월 23일자입니다. 크리스마스까지 쇼핑할 수 있는 날이 이틀밖에 남지 않았다는 것을 알려드리고 싶습니다. 폴 해니는 어제 여러분의 TV 방송이 큰 인기를 끌었다고 하더군요. 미키 허스코위츠는 워싱턴 포스트에서 두 가지 일을 하고 있습니다. 기존 스포츠 칼럼 외에도 여러분의 발사에 대한 칼럼을 두 개나 썼고, 짐, 어머니께서 생신 축하 인사를 정말 좋아하셨다고 합니다. 어제 뉴올리언스 교도소에서 죄수 21명이 탈옥했고, 존슨 대통령은 독감으로 고생하다가
그들이 발포하고
Okay, Jack. On your entry checklist, on page 2-5. Down there on step 9, where it says 152 d
П
बिल अभी भी सो 
好的，杰克，我们得先退一步。如果我们要按照这里的程序操作，也就是进入模式控制；自动模式，我们就必须拔掉 TCA 断路器
Okay. Heute möchten wir, dass Sie vor den Beobachtungen, wie in den Verfa
好的。这是加11，/。这是40减163，加129，减005，99，加00000，加47016，177143000十一月阿尔法，加001974702055146818121283257023，向上263，向左17，加1195，减165001268335608，北极星；068097356，无空隙。
Roger, Jack. Questo completa
Roger, 11. Wir haben Ihre Beschreibung dazu zur Kenntnis genommen. Ich verstehe, dass Sie einen Schatten sehen können, den diese Wolke zwischen Afghanistan und Pakistan wirft. Könn
로저, 알겠습니다. 아
Columbia, H
Roger. Eagle, nous aurons les vecteurs d'état dès que nous aurons le gain maximal. Terminé. Il 
И я устанавливаю защитную шторку, устанавливаю демпфер на шее, поднимаю ручку рециркуляции воздуха в
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Исходя из решения с минус MA, я получил долготу удара -160,95. Я скорректировал его, чтобы получить широту удара - долготу 163,75. Я хотел изменить точку удара на 30 градусов к востоку и поп
هناك أفق جميل ومثير للاهتمام. الشمس مائلة إلى اليسار بزاوية حوالي 40 درجة. يظهر خط داكن على سطح الأرض، برتقالي عند الغيوم، أصفر فاتح، أبيض فاتح، وشريط أزرق. أزرق فاتح جدًا، وكوكب عطارد مرئي الآن.
Aspe
Dobbiamo... e... imparare a uscire dalla navicella spaziale. Quello che ci serve è una grande navicella spaziale con un grande portello che si apre verso l'interno, proprio 
Джим, это отрицательный результат. У нас нет никаких данных о вас. Низкая скорость передачи данны
Роджер. Ниже приведено описание работы панели: предохранители на левой панели работают так же, как и сообщалось ранее, без повторения. Пирогаситель активирован. Автоматическое реверсирование выключено. Выбор режима в обычном режиме, автоматический, гиромотор в обычном режиме. Все Т-образные рукоятки выдвинуты. Задержка реверсирования в обычном режиме, освещение кабины включено. Красные фильтры, конечно, включены. Низкочастотный телеметр включен. Система помощи при аварийном восстановлении в автоматическом режиме. Все элементы панели управления работают нормально, за исключением посадочного мешка, установленного в центральное положение «выключено». Топливо 90-100%. Показания положения в пространстве: 5 градусов вправо, 3 граду
मुझे तो ऐसा ही लगता है। हमारी प्रक्रिया संबंधी टीम इ
Apollo 
Houston, 
Ricevuto. Cap
Да. Мы п
- - I monitor RCS sono stati controllati - (Risate) Okay, ecco che arriva il bambino
Ce que je voulais dire, c'est que nous cherchons à comprendre ce qui se passe avec cette surpression dans le système d'oxygène primaire. Nous voulons trouver un moyen de la contrôler sans que vous ayez à dépressuriser la cabine toutes les quelques minutes ou toutes les quelques heure
Роджер. У 
ठीक है। अभी आप बहुत कमजोर हैं। जब आप अभ्यास पैड पर अभ्यास करने के लिए तैयार हो जाएंगे, तब म
Alpha/PC vers PC; INDICATEUR DE LANCEMENT DU VÉHICULE vers GPI; INCLINAISON et LAYAUGLEMENT DE LA CARROSSERIE sur AUTO; RÉINITIALISATION DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS, vers le haut; DÉMARRAGE DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS sur ARRÊT; MINUTES ET SECONDES DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS au centre; Valve de ventilation POST-ATTERRISSAGE, pousser; EXTENSION/RELÂCHEMENT DE LA SONDE sur ARRÊT; Messages d'extension/relâchement, deux, gris; RÉTRACTATION DE LA SONDE D'AMARRAGE, PRINCIPALE et SECONDAIRE, désactivée; étendre les FEUX DE NAVIGATION/FEUX EVA, désactivés; étendre les FEUX DE NAVIGATION - FEU DE RENDEZ-VOUS, désactivé - il faut en avoir un - voilà - FEU DE TUNNEL, désactivé; FEU D'ALIME
2Aは7
Ok, Joe. Dalla finestra 5, ho appena ripreso l'oggetto che rotolava, quindi, di s
Хорошо. Далее, фотографии командного модуля. Сервисный модуль может быть немного сложно разглядеть из командного модуля, но если вы его видите, то, как считают здесь, через окно 5. Для этого рекомендуется использовать 70-миллиметровый объектив. Эти фотографии имеют приоритет 2. Итак, это 70-миллиметровый объектив EL, к которо
Okay, und ich habe hier ein Objekt zur Sternsichtbarkeit mit einem Scanteleskop für Sie, das Sie sich
ठीक है। हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप छद्म लैंडिंग साइट पर ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग बंद कर द
弗雷德，我提前通知你一下，备用气罐的二氧化碳浓度快要达到极限值了，预计半小时左右就会达到，到时候我们会要求你切换到指令舱气罐。我已经准备好后续步骤了，只是想提前提醒你
Roger. Apollo 8. That's what we have been trying to do. Some of our problem seems to b
...
네, 알겠습니
Houston, ici Apollo 8. Nous avons quelques informations utiles si vous souhaitez en 
Роджер. Теперь 
로저. 빌이 녹음기를 돌려받았는데, 지난번에 파일을 전송할
ところで、水瓶座さん、ご参考までに、現在、近地点は136マイルです。ドップラー測
Это приемлемо, Фред, а пока, когда вы будете готовы к копированию, у нас есть для вас планшет 
そうです、今は何もしていません、ヴァンス、ただ好奇心が湧いているだけです。入国手続きを開始して、すべてを整えて、55時間後にTVが起動したら、それをTVとして使用すればいいのです。そうすれば、SHeタンクの圧力をチェックしたり、その
Хорошо. Судя по предоставленной мной информации о погоде, на высоте 2000 футов в целевой точке может быть еще один слой с разрывами на выс
罗杰. 3：/45810，减05
C'est exact. Prochaine étape sur le panneau 275: disjoncteur principal A, bus batterie A, fermé; disjoncteur principal B, bus batterie B, ferm
रॉजर। क्या बिल अपने वीएचएफ टेस्ट के लि
Du fährst rückwärts gegen das
Fred, qui è Houston. Esci da questo piccol
Houston, Apo
好了。摄像机
Je pense que je vai
この追跡作業では、世界地図とカイロ・アレクサンドリア地域の小さな地図を使って、カイロの空港を捉えることができたと思います。しかし、空港が見えたのは、おそらく10度、いや15度くらいまで近づいた頃だったと思います
Позвольте мне пробежаться по вашей колонке новостей за день и убедиться, что мы все пр
En regardant par la fenêtre, je peux voir un ce
分かりました。手順を始める準備ができました。返事をする際は、マイクに向かって大きな声で話してください。ダウンリンクはかなりノイズが多いからです。まず最初に、1つのキャニスターでこれを行い、次に2つ目のキャニスターで同じことを繰り返してください。1つのキャニスタ
Roger. I got a real weird at
D'accord. Étape 5: positionnez le contrôle de t
Houston, ce que vous voyez actuellement au centre de l'écran, c'est le c
ठीक है, मुझे एक मिनट रुकने दीजिए 
Если вы посмотрите на 
ठीक है, जैक ने खुद को वापस नीचे कर लिया। 250 वोल्ट के बैट ए और बैट बी ब्रेकर लगाने के बाद, उसने बैट बस वोल्ट ए पर 32.3 और बैट 
Roger. Les relevés de vos batteries adaptatrices s'affichent. Ils indiquent tous 24 V, de 
Okay. Als Erstes wollen wir die Batterie laden, damit wir dort Strom haben. Die entsprechenden Prozeduren sind bereits vorbereitet. Was den Wiedereintritt angeht, planen wir unseren letzten Kursanstieg 5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt in die Atmosphäre – falls wir überhaupt einen durchführen müssen. Das Servicemodul möchten wir dann etwa 4,5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt abtrennen und die nächsten 3 bis 3,5 Stunden für Fotos, die Inbetriebnahme des Kommandomoduls (G&N), die Verstauung der Ausrüstung und sonstige Kleinigkeiten nutzen. Das Servicemodul würden wir bis 1 Stunde vor dem Eintritt behal
روجر، نيل. من بين الأمور التي يجب مراعات
سيجما سفن، هل يمكنك تزويد
روجر، ١١. لديّ لك ورقتان، ٣٠ ثم ٣١. ٣٠ SPS/G&N: ٣٦٦٩١، ناقص ٠٦١، زائد ٠٦٦ ١٣٥ ٢٣ ٤١٥٦. NOUN ٨١: ٣٢ - تصحيح، زائد ٣٢٠١١، زائد ٠٦٨١٨، ناقص ٠٢٦٥٠ ١٨١ ٠٥٤ ٠١٤. الأوج غير متوفر، الحضيض زائد ٠٠٢٣٠ ٣٢٨٦ - تصحيح، ٣٢٨٣٦؛ وقت الاحتراق ٢ ٢٨ ٣٢٦٢٨ ٢٤ ١٥١١ ٣٥٧. الأسطر الثلاثة التالية غير متوفرة. الاسم 61: زائد 1103، ناقص 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. النجوم المضبوطة هي ذنب الدجاجة والنسر الواقع، 242 172 012. نريد قياسات الضغط من نفاثتين لمدة 16 ثانية، والأفق على خط 10 درجات عند TIG ناقص د
Roger, do you--I'd like to pass your 2 Alpha t
J'imagine que c'est c
Wir befinden uns 
D'accord. Vous nous avez in
ठीक है, वैंस। हम वापस ऊपर ज
Roger. Ich bin im Orbit-Modus und die Verfolgung funktion
了解、アポロ8号
Bonjour
他们
Oui. Ça doit être à l'
Ok. Ok. Innanzitutto, la filosofia generale è che queste regole dovrebbero essere simili all'interruzione in modalità I, con i limiti rigorosi. Ora, le esaminerò una per una affinché tu possa copiarle. Ok. Dovresti spegnere il motore se si verifica una delle seguenti situazioni: lettura del monitor di spinta, 77% o inferiore; pressione del serbatoio del propellente - questa è la pressione di ingresso - lettura di bordo, 160 o inferiore; carburante a OX DELTA-P, superiore a 25 psi - e questo dovrebbe essere una chiamata a terra per te - errore d
好的。纸条上说你应该能听到我们说话。如果几分钟后我们听不到你的声音，你应该关闭16号面板上的功率放大器断路器，这样我们预计可以节省至少1安培的电量。在目前的姿态下应该没问题。当我们切换到新的偏航姿态时，我们考虑启动转向系统，关闭
And in the meantime, while you're eating your breakfast t
हमारा मानना ​​है कि अंतरिक्ष यान और संकट सागर के बीच स्थित विशाल, गहरा गड्ढा कोंडोरसेट क्रेटर है। संकट सागर क्षितिज तक और अंतरिक्ष यान के सामने स्थित इस अपेक्षाकृत ऊबड़-खाबड़ पहाड़ी क्षेत्र के
Okay. Das klingt gut, Charlie. Wenn du so 
Okay. Hier ist Free
177 143 000 NA, plus 00197, 47020 551 46818 12 128.3 257 023, en haut 263, à gauche 17, plus 1195, moins 16500, plus 126 23 35608, cap au nord, roulis 68, tangage 97, lacet 356, pas de remplissage, grande vitesse, 7900 Océan Indien, et les procédures à grande vitesse pour 
Muchea Cap Com: Friendship Seven. Fort et c
收到。从我
Okay, Jack. On MDC 1, there's nothing abnormal. All the rate indicators are zero. Ball number 2 is frozen, of course; we lost MAIN B. I've got - Ball number 1 appears to be working normally. Right now I'm 
本当に楽しい時間を過ごしました。
收到。地月导航完成。我们在16号星上做了两组，
I mean, this big monstrosity out here, it 
ध
3.45, so
بينما أنظر حولي في المنطقة، يكون التباين، بشكل عام، *** ناتجًا كليًا عن الظل *** أسفل الشمس... لون رمادي فاتح جدًا، لون رمادي فاتح، هالة حول ظلي، حول ظل خوذتي. ثم، عندما أنظر عبر *** يصبح التباين أقوى حيث أن اللون المحيط لا يزال فاتحًا إلى حد ما. عندما تنظر لأسفل باتجاه الشمس ***، فإن مساحة أكبر *** من المنطقة المظللة تنظر نحونا. اللون العام *** للمنطقة المحيطة *** يكون التباين أقل وضوحًا. مسح جميع المناطق المغبرة التي أثرناها *** أغمق بكثير في الملمس. الآن، أثرت واحدة، وأتخيل أن هذا *** المساح. وينطبق الشيء نفسه عندما أمسح عبر المنطقة التي نسير فيها. بشكل عام *** بسبب وجود آثار أقدام هناك. التضاريس العامة حيث أثرت الكثير من هذه المواد السطحية تكون بشك
了解しました。状態は良好です。燃料は51パーセントと69パーセント、酸素は84パーセントと100パーセント、客室内の気圧は良好です。直流電源と交流電源はすべて正常です。飛行計画に関して報告できることは、燃料レベルが予想よりも低いことです。現在、操縦モードはASCSです。夜間飛行後に機体姿勢を調整しようとして、余分な燃料を消費してしまいました。これは飛行計画の要件が矛盾していたためだと思います。機体姿勢を調整してから、他の項目に取り組むべきでした。自動操縦モードのままにしておけば、この過剰な燃料消費を抑えることができると思います。気球は時々見えた
アポロ8号、廃棄物処理は完了しました。テープ
ジェミニ4、CSQ CAP COM。
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8। हमने अभी-अभी कै
ها هو 
Ich habe die Partikel. Ich stand bei Sonnenaufg
Ricevuto. Il bus principale è 24, l'Uno è 25, 25, 25. L'Uno di riserva è 25, 25. Isolato 29 e di nuovo il principale 24. Ventole 113, 113. Tutti i fusibili degli interruttori a destra sono accesi, tranne Retrojettison e Retromanual in posizione centrale-off. Tu
बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। ठीक है, मैं ये मात्राएँ बता देता हूँ। जब हमने शुरू किया तब GMT 1716 था। प्रणोदक की मात्रा 60 थी। केबिन का तापमान 92 डिग्री सेल्सियस था। सूट का तापमान 58 डिग्री सेल्सियस था। केबिन का दबाव 5.6 डिग्री सेल्सियस था। सूट में CO2 की मात्रा 3/4 मिलीमीटर थी। बाईं ओर की सेकेंडरी ऑक्सीजन बोतल में 5100 डिग्री सेल्सियस थी। दाईं ओर की
لا، لا أعتقد أن هذا صحيح. كان واقي وجهي مفتوحًا، وهو الآن مغلق. لا أظن أنني أشعر بهذا الحر الشديد. أشعر براحة تامة، لكنني أتعرق
Roger.
Register 3:
Roger. Ora, questo... l'assetto di combustione verrà visualizzato su un pad, ma, in pratica, stiamo cerca
بعد ضبط محور الجسم على المحور الصحيح، يمكننا تحديد الوضعية المناسبة للكرة لتوجيه الع
肯，我们今天最多
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Далее следуе
Ja, schalten Sie es aus. Vergessen Sie nicht, jetzt etwa
我这
Bene. E nel riquadro 3, ho un interrut
باقي ثلاث دقائق. تصحيح، باقي دقيقتان 
Вы записаны. Мы ведем непрерывный внутренний телефонный разговор с функцией «нажми и говори».
――見えるはずです。地形的な手がかりがあれば教えてください。AUTOの光学系は2つのクレーターの間を追っています。1つは、彼から見ると11時の方向に長く見えます。もう1つは、彼の後ろ5時の方向に短く見えます。これらは非
ジャック、以上だ。他に何か質問がな
バズ、バイザーの組み立て方をうまくデモンストレーションしてくれたね
Мы мало чем можем им помочь. На самом деле, это не так уж плохо... но... чертовски досадно. Отчасти у меня такое чувство... теперь, когда я получаю... Прямо перед тем, как... об
I
Tranquillité, Houston. Si ce n'est déjà fait, vous pouvez maintenant actionner l'interrupteur d
أبولو 11، هيوستن. المنطق سليم. أ
Ok. Lasciatemi partire dall'inizio. Potrebbe esserci qualche sovrapposizione, ma per essere sicuri che siamo tutti 
Сейчас горизонт очень четкий. Он довольно светлый, и состоит в основном из облаков. Я вижу облака, звезды, когда они начинают опускаться в основной слой атмосферного свечения, но облака, кажется, делают горизонт более светлым. Не похоже, что раньше во время полета мы видели горизонт без облаков, и он был гораздо плотнее – довольно плотный слой атмосферного свечения, и можно было видеть звезды, когда они проходили сквозь него. Однако на этом облачном горизонте звезды видны хуже; хотя я заметил, что некоторые 
GMT 13 20 00에 플랫폼 전원을 끄고 MS
Roger, bonjour Jim. Nous aimeri
22시간이 경과하면 다시 비행 계획을 검토하겠습니다. 그때 연료 소모량 곡선으로 돌아갈 것입니다.
Okay, and have at it. We - we'd like to have the TM up for about 5 or 10 minutes to look at the data from the CM; look at your temperatures, et
يبقى عمود الدوران والمحاور كما هي.
Я прохожу 182-ю инерци
Et l'un des avantages, Jack, surtout pour un novice comme moi, c'est la facilité avec laquelle on se déplace ici
روجر. المشاكل التي واجهتك حتى الآن تعود إلى مصدر غير معروف، ربما بسبب تحميل خلية المحور التي تبلغ الآن 91، لذا فهي لا تعكس زاوية المحور الحقيقية. لا نعتقد أن مشكلة التحميل هذه تؤثر على موثوقية جهازك بأي شكل من الأشكال. نعتقد أن أفضل طري
제 생각에는 저희는 9번으로 응답했던 것 같습니다. S-II에서 5번 표시등이 켜진 시점이 대략 
Droite
Водолей, Хью
«Аполлон-8», Х
ठीक है, हमने 3 मिनट का समय पहले ही पार कर लिया। थो
That's 52. 52 should be... right. 52 should be be..
Lista di controllo post-atterraggio. Paracadute spinto a getto. Atterraggio sicuro. Salvataggio del bus di atterra
さあ。トミー・ジェイコブスに続いて、地元ヒューストンの占星術師、ルビー・グラハムさんから、とびきりホットな言葉をいただきました。彼女は、あなたの月への旅はすべての星座が順調だと言っています。ニールは賢く、マイクは判断力があり、バズは複雑な問題を解決できます。また、ニールは世界をバラ色の眼鏡で見る傾向がありますが、苦しんでいる人や困っている人をいつ
حسناً، كل شيء جاه
わかりました。SECの論理が動き
そしてそれは大きいはずだ... まさ
Неплохое приобретение, пра
حسناً. أحضر ورقة طويلة. لديّ سل
Theta, 18.4; rang
Roger. Wir bekommen in Kürze eine Zeitung; wir 
Хорошо. Говорит
Okay, Mike. Of course, this is in the event the G&N and the quits and you have to fly the constant g; and what we're trying to do is extend the constant g range from 1100 to 1500 miles. We've run 
It looks real good down here Wally. Doing a good job and we are looking forward to seeing yo
Stiamo procedendo abba
هذه فريندشيب سفن. أتحقق من أوضاع التحكم المختلفة في نظام التحكم الإلكتروني. لا يوجد لدي
Nous voulons - Oui, P00 est bon - et nous 
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, 
R
في مركز التحكم، ربما ترغبون بالانضمام إل
Al
짐, 정말 유감이지만, 저 사람들 중 누구도 알아보지 못하겠
Okay. Ich sehe keine losen Sensoren, aber der obere Bereich des Brustbeins beginnt ein wenig zu reizen, aber nicht stark; und möglic
分かりました。それについてはいくつか興味深いアイデアがあり、最近聞いたのは、プラットフォームを強化して
11, Houston. Concernant l'équipement que vous avez dans le sac du casque (ou plutôt, le sac de la trappe), nous vous recommandons de le retirer et de le ranger dans le compartiment de couchage sous le siège dr
حسنًا. ظهرك ملاصق للحقيبة. ممتاز. الآن هي فوقها. للأمام وللأعلى؛ الآن أنت حر. قليلًا نحوي. مباشرةً للأسفل، قليلًا إلى يسارك. مساحة واسعة. نيل، أنت في وضعية جيدة. ق
Мы все... делаем это через 169 часов 
Шкала 
حسناً. لقد حصلنا على بيانات القياس عن بعد بشك
Die Kapsel befindet sich momentan im Automatikmodus. Ich habe die manuelle Proportionalsteuerung größtenteils genutzt. Aktuell habe ich 79 % im manuellen und 81 % im automatischen Modus. Mal 
Okay, Jack. Noch eine Frage zu Odysse
Okay. Jack had a question on how far out from the Moon ar
好的。我从头开始讲。可能有些内容会重叠，但为了确保我们理解一致，我们先从一套时间线流程开始，最终会得到一份标准的入舱检查清单。手册里会有一些检查清单的改动，但我这里主要讲的是时间线部分。流程从6小时30分钟前开始，假设我们已经给指令舱的B主电源供电。我想你们应该已经知道焊盘和指令舱焊盘的编号了；我是指我们会
吉姆，我可以给你大致介绍一下指令舱G&N的升空流程。这是目前提出的方案。我们可能会想出更好的方案，但这是我们目前正在考虑的。首先，我们计划像中途飞行时那样，利用地球的瞄准点进行校准。然后，我们会进行一次体轴校准，ACS（自动控制系统）的400+5度角，使球体指向000度。之后，我们会给你一个球体姿态参数，让你飞向月球，并将光学系统指向月球。如果你能看到星星，我们也可以利用它们。然后，我们会给你一组等效的CDU（控制与数据单元）角度参数，让你输入这些参数并扭转平台。现在，我们已经完成
Der andere Pilot, Max Conrad, der mit seinem Leichtflugzeug die Welt umrundet – er verbrachte Weihnachten in der Antarktis –, befindet sich derzeit in Puerto Aranes in Chile und wartet auf gutes Wetter, um seinen Flug zum S
Acquari
ジャック、特に私のような初心者にとって、ここの良い点の一つは、動きやすさです。司令船シミュレーターで作業した経験があれば分かると思いますが、無重力状態は確かに大きな助けになります。なぜなら、1Gの重力下では、宇宙船内で動き回るのはかなり制限されるからです。しかし、この環境では動き回るのはとても簡単です。ご覧の通り、かなりきれいに見えます。ワッシャーがいくつか緩んでいました。また、シーケンスカメラの小さなプラスチック製のキャップが外れて、EDパネルのそばに引っかかっていました。さて、ジムの真下、彼はここにある缶のようなものの上に立っています。そして、後ろにいる皆さんのために言っておきますが、この缶の中には上昇エンジンが入っています。今、私の手が上にあるのが見えるでしょうか。これは月面着陸に使うエンジンです。エンジンカバーのすぐ隣に、以前も紹介した白い箱があります。これはジムのバックパック、つまり月面での冷却用の酸素と水を供給するバックパックです。この装置は、計画では4時間、できれば5時間ほど使用したいと考えています。すぐ後ろに、私が今手にしている小さな四角い箱が2つあります。1つはここに、もう1つはすぐ下にあります。これは基本的に緊急用
... продолжает пода
Roger. 1, G&N: 62710, plus 098, minus 019, 075 49 4965, minus 28897, minus 03944, minus 00686; 358 226 347; 01692, plus 00610; 29173 602 29108; 31 106.6 358. align Vega and Deneb 243 183 012. No ullage. Horizon in the hatch window 
알겠습니다. 그럼 GMTRC를 받으셨군요. 나중에 보내드리겠습
हाँ। के
Bene. La nostra manovra è completa e, a questo assetto, la line
아폴로 13호, 휴스턴발 과이마스 경유. 이상
حسنًا، يبدو جيدًا، سنمنح مايك واش علامة تقدير على ذلك. حسنًا يا جيم، 
Sehr g
休斯顿。
ステータスはGOです。O2 High RateでECS
Gius
D'accord. Parce qu'il y a une différence notable entre l
Звучит как отличное место. Хорошо. Уверен, мы еще немного обсудим это, Билл. Но сейчас мы говорим именно о таких вещах. А что касается вы
ずっと
但我们无法告诉你它是不是 4
Okay, 13; Houston.
좋습니다. 모든 게 순조롭게 진행되는 것 같습니다. 구역 내 산소 연료 사이에 약 10파운드 정도의 차이가 있는 것을 확인
11日、ヒューストン。現在の予報では、回復エリアの気象状況は良好です。高度は散在して 2,000 フィート、高散在して、風向は 070 度、風速 13 ノット、視程 10 マイル、海面は約 4 フィートです。昨日の予報では、熱帯暴風雨「クラウディア」がハワイの東 500 ～ 1,000 マイル付近に発生するとされて
――見えるはずです。地形的な手がかりがあれば教えてください。AUT
ठीक है, बिल। मुझे लगता है कि मैं 4 के लिए ऑनबोर्ड स्टेट वेक्टर का उपयोग करने के बारे में अपनी आखिरी बात को टालना चाहता हूँ। ज़मीन पर इसका और अधिक अध्ययन करने के बाद, उन्हें 's बनाने और अपनी सभी गणनाएँ करने में जुट जाना होगा, और इसे टालने या दो बार करने के बजाय, हम उन प्रक्रियाओं के साथ आगे बढ़ेंगे जिनका हम शुरू से उपयोग करते आ रहे हैं। चंद्र कक्षा के बारे में, हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं और हमारे कई लोग - जैक श्मिट और उनकी टीम पीछे के कमरे में - यह देख रहे हैं कि आपकी खिड़कियों का क्या प्रभाव पड़ता है। और, मूल रूप से, ऐसा लगता है कि दो विकल्प हैं जो उस 2 पर प्रभाव डालेंगे। एक विकल्प, निश्चित रूप से, यह होगा कि आप और जिम अपनी सीटें बदल लें और जिम बाहर देखकर अपना SAM प्राप्त कर ले, और दूसरा विकल्प यह होगा कि विमान को घुमाकर जिम को ऑप्टिक्स को जितना हो सके आगे की ओर इंगित करने दें और दूरबीन के माध्यम से अपना SAM प्राप्त करने दें। और मुझे लगता है कि हम यह जानना चाहेंगे कि खिड़कियों के साथ आप क्या कर सकते हैं; अगर आपके पास कोई सुझाव है, तो हम उसे ध्यान में रखकर अपनी योजनाओं को जल्द से जल्द अंतिम रूप देना चाहेंगे। हम इसे ट
Je parie que les gars de Lockheed sont en train de 
Es tut mir leid, dass ich +4 g
Хорошо. Дай мне знать, 
알겠습니다. 
D'accord. Dans « Activation », effectuez l'étape 1, puis l'étape 2, ligne
Jack, c'est ce que nous voulons obtenir au final, c'est 1,5 à 2 pouces dans ce tunnel, en fonction de la lecture du manomètre, mais cela
Давай, Хьюстон. 
روجر. فهمت قصدك بو
我们将暂停LiOH的更换大约半
Stiamo riscontrando qualche difficoltà nel registrare la pressione s
Je
Zur Info: Bei meinem letzten MSC-Durc
الأرض ا
Buonasera. Vorrei discutere con voi alcuni degli aspetti più simbolici del volo della nostra missione, l'Apollo 11. Mentre discutevamo degli eventi accaduti negli ultimi 2 o 3 giorni qui a bordo della nostra navicella spaziale, siamo giunti alla conclusione che questo è stato molto più di un viaggio di tre uomini verso la Luna; più, ancora, degli sforzi di un team governativo e industriale; più, persino, degli sforzi di una sola nazione. Riteniamo che questo rappresenti un simbolo dell'insaziabile curiosità di tutta l'umanità di esplorare l'ignoto. La dichiarazione di Neil l'altro giorno, quando ha messo piede per la prima volta sulla superficie della Luna: "Questo è un piccolo passo per un uomo, ma un grande balzo per l'umanità", credo riassuma molto bene questi sentimenti. Abbiamo accettato la sfida di andare sulla Luna; l'accettazione di questa sfida era inevitabile. La relativa facilità con cui abbiamo portato a termine la nostra missione, credo, è un omaggio alla tempestività di tale accettazione. Oggi, ritengo che siamo pienamente in grado di accettare ruoli più ampi nell'esplorazione dello spazio. Col senno di poi, siamo stati tutti particolarmente soddisfatti dei nominativi di chiamata che abbiamo scelto con grande impegno per le nostre navicelle spaziali, Columbia ed Eagle. Siamo stati particolarmente soddisfatti dell'emblema del nostro volo, raffigurante l'aquila statunitense che porta il simbolo universale della pace dalla Terra, dal pianeta Terra alla Luna; quel simbolo è il ramoscello d'ulivo. È stata una scelta condivisa da tutto l'equipaggio quella di depositare una replica di questo simbolo sulla Luna. Pe
ه
Die Temperatur in der Kuppel beträgt 70 Grad. Die Kabinenkuppel hat 50 Grad. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs ist mit 62 Grad angenehm warm. Der Anzugdruck liegt konstant bei 5 psi. Auf dem Farbhintergrund ist eine sehr interessante Wol
इसके बारे में कोई संदेह नहीं 
Ist Ihr Fenster sch
Okay. Ich glaube, der Lärm hat jetzt aufgehört. Dank
わかりました。彼を戻してください。20
मुझे तो ऐसा ही लगता है। हमारी प्रक्रिया संबंधी टीम इस पर काम कर रही है, और हम थोड़
जेमि
罗杰。第二步，用胶带将滤镜支架固定在镜头上，胶带粘在镜头的顶
로저. 제 마지막 메시지 받아 적
Хорошо. Пр
了解。ニール、全部コピーして。コピーする準
好的。尼尔的大约是
Было бы здорово поиграть музыку, если это возможн
좋아요, DUMP로 가서 3.5까지 낮춘 다음 다시 AUTO로 돌아가고
W
Хорошо, а на следующей странице, 29, справа вверху, зачеркните «Фотомишень 13, север, 5.6, 250» и так далее, всю
알았어, 짐. 배경 소음 때문에 그 제안을 못 들었어. 상황이 좀 나아지면 전달해 볼
你把 TRA
네. 메인 버스 B에 대한 제 관찰 결과를 말씀드리겠습니다. 상황이 매우 빠르게 진행됐습니다. 먼저 충격이나 폭발음 같은 게 들렸
Роджер. Я не слышал никаких 
Роджер. Поймите, что у вас про
और मुझे ब्लेज़ पिकरिंग
Esatto, perché la temperatura è un po' bassa. Sulla tuta, ora sono a 6 e aumenterò a 6,5. Non sto facendo molti progressi. Sono arrivato a circa 6,25 circa 5 minuti fa e ora sto impostando i comandi della tuta a 6,5. La temperatura
ठीक है। बाईपास को खींचो; ग्ल
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। कार्नार्वोन लगभग 30 सेकंड में। हनीस
네, 맞습니다. 8단계는 "요청 시
حسنًا. سأشرح لك ما لديّ - أعتقد أنه سيك
Der Transponder wurde geprüft. Ich hoffe,
And on the exposures we're looking for an eighth of a second, a half a second. And, if you think 
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。我们能否想出一个
네, 지금 더 
그리고 13번, 휴스턴입니다. 원하시면 지구가 창문에 들어오기 약 2분 전에 알려드릴 수 있습니다. 이제 시간을 꽤 정확
أيضًا، تجربة S
Roger. Copié pour le GET d'ajustement de hauteur de combustion, 03 plus 03 plus 19; Delta-V, 0,8, durée, 0 plus 01; lacet 00, tangage 00; Noyau 25, 00008; 26 et 27, tous à zér
Gemini 4, как вы теперь читаете координаты центра 
控制燃料为 90-98 [百分比]，我再说一遍，90-98 [百分比
CO
Hey, Bill, can you tell us what angles this went through? The curve that we have plotted is apparently the RF limit rather than the mechanical limit; and discussing the function of the AUTO REACQ mode, it looks like it is supposed to shift when it hits the RF limit, which is your - should be your ENTER set of numbers as opposed to 
Je
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 스틸헤드입니다. 모든 장비는 정상적으로 작동 중입니다. 약 3분 후에 접근 가능합니다. 이상
هيا يا قائد الاتصا
हे ह्यूस
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نعتقد أننا حددنا سبب مشكلة إعادة الاتصال التي واجهناها في المهمة السابقة. يبدو أن المشكلة كانت في مصدر طاقة جهاز الاستقبال هنا على الأرض، ولم تكن هناك أي مشاكل في المركب
खैर, आपकी घड़ी तो बिल्कुल ठीक काम कर रही 
क्या अभी भी दिन की रोशनी है? मुझे बाहर कुछ भी दिखाई नहीं
Хорошо, на мгновение переведите
Okay. Ich mache das, und J
Ich verstehe, all
음, 지금 온도가 70도네요. 어떻게 낮춰야 할지 정말 막막합니다. 잠수복의 물 밸브가 표시선을 넘어섰는데도 온도가 내려가지 않네요. 음수로 설정해도 마찬가지고요. 아, 그건 잘못된 생각이었군요. 기체 온도가 표시선을 넘어섰습니다. 잠수복 온도는 
私たちの宇宙船では、パネル 16
Roger, Buzz. We noticed the same thing. It's very similar to looking at a light shining on something like a billiard ball or a bow
On ouvre le récipient extérieur, on y insère le récipie
Роджер.
Я не думаю, что это сложнее, чем на орбитальных скоростях… Просто нет никакой возможности… достичь нужной высоты и
Я вижу, как что-то происходит, но не очень четко. Вот и 0,05, зеленый индикатор. На этом этапе я уже ничего не делаю. Включаю управление скоростью, в
世界と国内のニュースと特集記事は以上です。スポーツ面では、カンザスシティ・チーフスのハンク・ストラムがAFLの年間最優秀コーチに選ばれました。彼にとっては3シーズンで2度目の受賞です。投票は、各都市から3人ずつ、合計30人のスポーツ記者とスポーツキャスターからなるAP通信の審査員団によって行われました。ストラムに最も近いのはウィーブ・ユーバンクでした。票を獲得した他のコーチは、サンディエゴのシド・ギルマンとデンバーのルー・セイビンです。昨日のシュライナーズ・カレッジ・オールスターの試合は、ノースがサウスを0対3で抑えました。ミシガン州立大学のディック・ベルリンスキーは、第1クォーターで23ヤードのフィールドゴールを決め、そ
Roger. Abbiamo bis
그리고 13번, 휴스턴입니다. 파이로 암과 도킹 프로브 확장 관련 지원이 필
Roger, Buzz. Vorremmo che posizio
Warten Sie, bis ich mein Blut hier verbraucht habe. Okay, ich bin fertig. O
好的，你已经关闭了 3、4、7 和 8 号偏航断路器，然后又重新打开，但这并
Eagle, Columbia. I am reading you loud and scratchy. Neil is not coming through too well on
Ricevuto, Buzz. È un PAD di ingresso, MPL, che inizia con il rullo 05, 35 - correzione - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, più 1102, meno 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, NOME 69, tutte e quattro le linee sono NA. Riprendendo con D zero: 400 02 09. RET del blackout, 00 17 03 38 08 20. Stella del sestante, 02 0945 149. La stella di puntamento è Scorpii theta, cioè Scorpii theta. Su 315, a destra 35, vettore di salita su. E i commenti: Questa voce PAD non presuppone alcuna rotta intermedia 6. E per tua informazione, guardandola ora, in base a tutto il tracciamento che abbiamo ottenuto, quella manovra sarebbe solo di un decimo di piede al secondo. Quindi, probabilmente la salteremo. Ti faremo sapere di più più tardi. Okay. Il tuo controll
收到。我们什么时候能收到这边的演习
सुनो, क्या तुम चाहते हो कि मैं अंतरिक्ष यान को किसी और स्थित
अब सब कुछ स्पष्ट हो गया है। मुझे समझ आ
Ora, vediamo, questa ustion
ねえ、聞いて。エドはまだ寝ていないの。もうすぐ寝るところなのに、メディカルデータパスを持つより寝た方がいいと思うの。今
Ott
Roger. Zanzibar. Excusez-moi de m'être trompé de nom. Je vais régler la vanne de refroidissement de ma combinaiso
Nu
Ok. Questa è l'ultima cosa che ho tralasciato. E mentre aspettiamo di decidere, lasciatemi continuare. La banda morta considerata accettabile è compresa tra 660 e 770 psi. In altre parole, qualsiasi tempo di salita che vi dia una pressione compresa tra queste due, vi manterrà al di sotto della pressione critica a circa 103 ore. Quindi, ci aspettiamo che la lettura sia compresa in quella banda e, se così fosse, non ci saranno problemi. Se la lettura è compresa tra 770 e 800 psi, vi chiederemo di controllare di nuovo la pressione dopo circa 59 ore e vi fornirò le procedure dettagliate tra un minuto. Se
Bene. Meno di
はい、そうしました。降りる瞬間は見ていなかったのです
OK. Batterie Bravo négative. C'est MAIN A, BAT C
समझ गया
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 플러스 2는 업데이트가 필요하지
Okay, Jack. Das sind die einzigen Änderungen
That's negative; just tank 2.
روجر. 42 برافو سبليت ∆V. 40.120.1
네, 프레드 씨. 응축수 용기를 사용하셨으니 사용 절차를 알려드리겠습니다. 자세히 읽어드리지는 않겠지만, 용기를 너무 
Okay. Jetzt sieht man ein paar Funken – kleine Partikel, die über den Bildschirm huschen. Die werden von den Triebwerken ausgestoßen. Jack steue
Я потерял ваше вниман
여기는 우정 7입니다. 저는 괜찮아요.
Роджер. На моей отметке будет.
Okay. At minus 
The light band of stars seem to - the stars right around the Southern Cross and the rather dark void are
हाँ, ठीक है। पैनल 250
हाँ। अब जब हमें पता चल गया है कि (अस्पष्ट) कहाँ है, तो अगली बार यह बहुत आसान होगा। पहली बार जब हमने काहिरा - काहिरा और अलेक्जेंड्रिया - को खोजा, तो हमें वह (अस्पष्ट) कुछ देर के लिए मिला। मैंने वास्तव में हवाई अड्डा नहीं देखा। मैंने बस वह इलाका देखा। मैंने सोचा कि अगर मैं कैमरे को सही दि
Al
Naturalmente, l'unica altra cosa di cui dovremmo preoccuparci è quale variazione di velocità questo potrebbe aver avuto e quale DELTA-V abbia comportato, e dovremo analizzare questo aspetto per un po' prima di poterlo determinare. E, se non ci sono cambiamenti significativi, beh, preferiamo lasciar
Gemini 4, ici Houston CAP COM. Nous sommes préoccupés par la pressio
자, 시작해 볼까요? PRIMARY, PRIMARY, HIGH, VOICE, (콜록) PCM, RANGE, DOWN VOICE BACKUP, AUX TAPE, OFF; TELEMETRY를 DATA로; 그리고 UP TIM COMMAND를 NORMAL로; VHF A와 B, OFF; RECEIVE only,...; PCM/ANALOG, RECORD, FORWARD, NORMAL, NORMAL - 괜찮아요, LOW - PRIMARY, REACQ, 그리고
D'accord. 5, /: 47 correction
Ich weiß im 
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी ब
ठीक है। अगर हाइड्रोक्साइड के कनस्तरों में पानी का रिसाव हुआ हो, तो हम आपको सलाह देते हैं कि अब से आप केबिन मोड में ही
Bene. Lo scopo è portare i vettori di stato e i vettori di stato alla sfera terrestre del Verbo 37 ENTER, 23 ENTER. A, a, carica nei registri 1, 2 e 3 i seguenti numeri. Registro 1, 00002; registro 2, cinque palline; registro 3, 00210. Passaggio 3: proce
Roger. Alles klar. Wir hatten uns bei unserem Backup-Set geirrt. Die Karten waren falsch platziert. Die Borddaten scheinen in Ordnung zu sein. Wir wollten Sie nur kurz darum bitten, das zu überprüfen. Wir haben ein Update zur APS-/Tankkarte, die Sie am Bedienfeld anbringen. Es handelt sich um einen Tippfehler. Wenn Sie die Karte heraushole
了解。D-9の最新情報をお伝えします。ラン番号1、レボリューション55と56です。開始時刻は5時48分45秒。チ
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストンです。もう一度言ってください。オーバ
コロンビア、ヒ
क्या खोया? 
Describing the blue band. There's a relatively dark blue band right at the surface of the earth, and a light blue band, and another dark blue band, and a large white band which is the air glow, and then a deep black one and sorta goes from a grayish blue in to a dense black. Almost looks like underneath a rain cloud as far as the transition from the blue band to the total darkness. And I'll bring up my fingertip lights. And at Mercury is right on the horizon. Arcturus should be in view, but I gues
Certes, à cette distance, les couleurs ne sont pas aussi intenses qu'à 80 000 kilomètres des côtes. Cependant, les océans conservent un bleu franc et les continents arborent généralement une teinte brunâtre, même s'ils tendent 
हमें जो आखिरी आग लगी थी, उसकी गति 96 फीट प्रति सेकंड थी और वह एक मिनट
알겠습니다. 시간이 지나면 그렇게
Okay, Jim. Te l'abbiamo letto come imbardata, beccheggio e rollio, e avremmo dovuto assegnarteli ai registri 1, 2 e 3; ma non l'abbiamo fatto. Quindi il registro 1 è 33000, il registro 2 è 35500 e 
Roger
«Дружба Семь», это Indian Cap Com. Мы видим показания 95° на ав
И ещё, Джим, мы... Последнее, что мы отправили,
ठीक है, जैक। मैं ज
私たちは再
Oh, volevo dire 
알겠습니다. 현재 자동 레트로 컨트롤 모드입니다. - 자이로스코프는 스캐너 테스트를 위해 자유롭게 사용할
روجر، في الإصدار ١٢، سيتم تحديث وقت نقطة الوصول (PLA) ونقطة الوصول (CLA) في RKV؛ أما في الإصدار ١٣، فستتوفر مسارات نطاق C فوق جزر الكناري. كما سيتم إجراء فحص للملاحة الفلكية المدارية. لن ي
Roger. Abbiamo un paio di modifiche alle regole della missione NO GO per la tua carta NO GO, Neil. Una piccola modifica alla carta APS/carburante e pressione TEMP, e abbiamo una modifica alla procedura per il controllo delle perdite
Il nous reste 13 degrés à gauche de la balle, et je pense que c'est à peu près correct. En regardant l'ombre, etc.
Ok, 13; ora stiamo ottenendo il tuo bit rate elevato e diamo un'occhiata
罗杰，11。给你两台PADS，30和31。30 SPS/G&N：36691，减去061，加上066 135 23 4156。NOUN 81：32 - 更正，加上32011，加上06818，减去02650 181 054 014。远地点不适用，近地点加上00230 3286 - 更正，32836；燃烧时间2 28 32628 24 1511 357。接下来的三行不适用。名词 61：加 1103，减 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52。落日是天津四和织女星，坐标为 242 172 012。我们需要两台喷气式飞机的空隙持续 16 秒，地平线位于 10 度线上，时间 TIG - 2 分钟；你的六分仪星在 134 加 50 秒后可见。准备好
Ich weiß nich
Oui, en quelque sorte, Vance. Si le soleil se reflète sur les q
У меня в списке браков
يبدو أنني أقع في فخ الربط المتبادل هنا. ربما عليّ فعل ذلك
حسناً. استمر في إظهار ذلك، ويمكنك أن تعطين
OK. Étape 7. Panneau de disjoncteurs 11, bus CA B, affichage hélium PQGS, fermé. Principal - Panneau de disjoncteurs 11, bus CA B, éclairage numérique, fermé. Panneau CD 11, bus CA - Est-ce le bus CA
11, we'd like you to shift to an OMNI antenna configuration at the present time. We're requesting the S band antenna OMNI switch to Bravo and the S band antenna OMNI switch to OMNI
Aquarius, Ho
罗杰。嗯，你可能需要把这段话在
Nous nous arrêton
حسنًا، برج الدلو؛ هيو
쌍둥이자리 6호, 쌍둥이자리 6호
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हमने अभी-अभी देखा कि आपके पानी की मात्रा में 2 पाउंड की कमी आई है। क्या आप लोगों ने हाल ही में कुछ पिया है या आपको पता है कि इसमें 
バズ、こちらヒューストン。はっきりと聞こえます。本
Vuoi 
As
حسنًا. منصة مناورة على: الغرض هو منتصف المسار 5،،، غير متوفر، HA غير متوفر، نقطة الحضيض، بالإضافة إلى 0.0019.8، 0.007.8، 0.15، والباقي غير متوفر. أوقف المحرك قبل ثانية واحدة من نهاية وقت الاحتراق. أوقفه
Well, yes. We haven't completely config
जेमिनी VIII, जेमिनी VIII, CSQ CAP COM यूएच
O
Wally, stai interrompendo e riattaccando la 
Ok. Stiamo osservando che l'angolo del gimbal centrale si sta alzando
هيا يا هيوستن. أبولو 8
Okay. Das ist schon viel besser. Wir gehen
알겠습니다. 터
Ja, Sir. Das ist die Karte. Jede Falte ist unten – oder oben rechts, wenn man von Osten nach Westen geht – mit einem Buchstaben versehen. Die Karten sind mit D, E und F gekennzeichnet, und die Solo-Inhalte befinden sich
吉姆，你说的大致正确。杰克会在这个姿态下进行粗略的对准。这就是我们让你操控到那个姿态的原因。我们会计算出粗略的对准云台角度并传递给他，他到达那里后的第一件事，就是按照他的检查
D'accor
Gem
好的。你
ठीक है। हम पृथ्वी 
حسنًا. الإجراء يعود مجددًا. نسخ متعددة ل
好的。目前，你们的电池电量如下：A电池39.32安时，B电池35.21安时，C电池38.46安时。你们的低温燃料剩余量与上次相同，每个燃料箱180磅氧气和11磅氢气。目前，根据计算机计算的燃料量，服务舱A四联装燃料箱的剩余量为45%，B四联装燃料箱为50%，C四联装燃料箱为58%，D四联装燃料箱为48%。我们
Non
Ok, Vance. Siamo quasi pronti a copiare le modifiche al libro in solitaria e al piano di volo, e quando i tuoi appunti saranno pronti, li prenderemo. E per quanto riguarda l'anticipo del periodo di sonno, va bene, ma noi... se non andiamo a dormire subito, lo userem
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्टन। अपोल
Ok. Scuoto la testa violentemente da tutte le parti, con gli occhi chiusi, su e giù, beccheggio, rollio, imbardata. Niente nello stomaco; niente da nessuna parte. Ora c'è... proverò a premere il pulsante zero, tempo zero. Beh, me lo sono perso. Ero un po' disorientato su dove fossero esattamente le cose, non sono sicuro di cosa s
आप जितना चाहें उतना और जो चाहें इस्तेमाल कर सकते 
कृपया प्रतीक्षा करें। फ्रेड, हम यहां सभी की राय जानने के लिए मतदान कर रहे हैं, क्या किसी के पास कोई अंतिम विचार हैं? हम जल्द ही आपसे संपर्क करे
هذا هو سيجما 7. تتبع نظام الاستدامة بسهولة ب
1, G&N: 62710, plus 098, minus 019, Zündung 075 49 4965, minus 28897, minus 03944, minus 00686. Rollen 358, Steigung 226, 347; 01692, plus 00610; 29173 602 29108; Sextantenstern 31 1066 358. Rest des PAD ist NA. Vega und Deneb ausrichten 243 183 012. Kein Tankinhalt. Der Horizont ist 2 Minuten vor dem Brennvorgang knapp unterhalb der oberen Kante des Lukenfensters sichtbar. Im Rendezvous-Fenster auf der linken Seite ist er nicht sichtbar. bei 75 Stunden 41 Minuten 23 Sekunden. Bei 76 15 29. Ohne Brennvorgang 76 05 30. Die Werte, die Sie vor dem Brennvorgang auf NOUN 42 sehen wü
Okay. You're talking about the check 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। वॉइस चेक
좋
نعم. هذه 
Okay, 
さて、動詞89を呼び出して、そ
Обращаем ваше внимание н
最初の 2 つはクリア、2 番目は...、3 番目と 4 番目もクリアで
حسناً، أبولو 8. أنت جاهز للانطلا
Повторите ещё раз
A
صوتك رائع بالنسبة لنا من خلال أغنية 
Чарли, я покажу тебе ви
Roger, 11. Wir hören wegen der Strahlung. Und wir überlegen – das sieht für uns etwas sel
Aurora Seven，Indian Cap Com。您的逆变器温度，150瓦时为183度，2
L'area visibile dal finestrino di sinistra è una pianura relativamente pianeggiante, costellata di crateri con un numero piuttosto elevato di crateri di 1,5-15 metri, e alcune creste - piccole, alte 6-9 metri, direi - e letteralmente migliaia di piccoli crateri di
على حد علمنا، فإن القمر الصناعي الوحيد الذي يمكن 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. بقي لدينا حوا
오로라 세븐, 오로라 세븐, 여기는 캘리포니아 컴 테크입니다. 캘리포니아 컴 테크
لا يوجد سو
ठीक है। बढ़िया, फ्रैंक। दूसरी बात ये है कि पीछे वाले कमरे में बैठे लड़कों को थोड़ा समय चाहिए जब सब जाग रहे हों - अगर आप दोनों केबिन के पंखे लगभग 5 मिनट के लिए चला दें, तो वे देखना चाहेंगे कि जब हवा का बहाव शुरू हो जाए और रुकावट दूर हो जाए, तो टेलीमेट्री पर 
هذا هو روجر. وإذا أردتُ توفير الوقود للمشاهدة اللاحقة، فأعتقد أن عليّ أن أ
62 30 से -
Ehi, Ed, quand
收到。我们请求将废水排放量从25%降至名义上的25%，以下是耗材更新。22小时后，总量减少了3.5%。Alfa减少了3.5%，Bravo减少了
我看到狮
我现在正望着星空。天空并不像
Аврора Семь. Ты пила воду 
Roger, Buzz. L'atteggiamento in cui ci troviamo in questo momento è comodo per iniziare. Saremo soddisfatti di questo atteggiamento. Quindi vorremmo che disattivaste i quad Charlie e Delta; aspetteremo dai 5 ai 10 minuti, p
Roger. Wir werden unsere Daten hier auswerten und Ihnen unsere Ergebnisse mitteilen. Führen Sie die Wasserabga
Oh, es ist gar nicht so schlecht
좋아
Ro
Хорошо, теперь вот — для наглядности, вот усилитель мощности, выключен; транспондер выключен; инвертор переменного тока, 2, выключен; и последний на панели 250, CB BAT Baker POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING, открыт; а затем выполните действия в обратном порядке, как вы мне дали, и вернитесь назад, например, я бы начал с MDC 3 UP TELEMETRY, OFF - к OFF; затем AC INVERTER - AC1 BUS 1 к OFF; затем AC INVERTER, 2, OFF; AC INVERTER, 2, MAIN B к OFF. Эт
로저. 당신은 여전히 ​​기력이
Die Kuppeltemperatur beträgt etwa 57 Grad. Die Kabinentemperatur liegt bei 90 Grad. Der Lufteinlass des
Roger. Ich möch
هل تقصد أن
Roger, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich
迈克，燃
Okay, Fred. Öffne in Zeile 3 unter COMM die Option DISPLAY
تم 
Roger. Ich schaue dort nach. Könntest du das bitte in deinen Rechner eingeben und mir die Koordinaten ausgeben: Breiten
弗雷德，我们已经掌握了足够的数据；建议杰克按照他的回退步骤，取下TM
ठ
गस, वो बाहर है और ये बहुत बढ़िया है। सुनो, हमारा वॉयस ओवर ठीक से काम नहीं कर रहा है, और मुझे किसी की आवाज सुनाई भी नह
Roger. We're read
Friendship Seven, ici Steelhead. Temps de récupération
네,
روجر. تم
Lässt du die Hau
제가 들은 바로는 기내 압력이 유지되고 있었다는 것뿐입니다. 그 이상은 아무것도 듣지 못
جيم، ما نريده منك هو الاستمرار في استخدام خطك الدقيق 
안
Mentre il booster si allontanava, si poteva vedere il carburante schizzare fuori dall'ugello di rollio. Mentre il booster ruotava, per lo più su un piano perpendicolare a una linea che passava per l'asse maggiore della navicella verso il booster, si poteva vedere la lunga coda fluente che ne usciva. Farò un breve disegno di questo sul mio piano di volo. C'erano detriti ovunque al momento della separazione della navicella. Ci siamo girati e c'erano cose dappertutto. In effetti, finché non abbiamo dato un'occhiata più da vicino al booster, non riuscivo proprio a capire cosa fosse. Le carenature si sono staccate proprio al punto di partenza senza problemi. Le carenature dello scanner dell'orizzonte sembravano
分かりました、ジャック。了解しました。その通りです。忘れないよ
ठीक है। यही वह कॉन्फ़िगरेशन है जिसमें हम आपको रखना चाहते हैं, और हम इस बारे में सोच रहे 
Хорошо. Это последнее, что я упустил. И пока мы ждем решения, позвольте мне продолжить. Допустимый диапазон мертвого давления составляет от 660 до 770 psi. Другими словами, любое время нарастания, которое обеспечит давление в пределах этих двух значений, позволит поддерживать давление н
Roger. Flight empfiehlt, bis zur nächsten Umdrehung wieder im normalen Anflugverfahren zu fliegen. Danach soll man wieder
Aquari
Это Friendship Seven. По какой-то причине очень сложно точно определить скорость дрифта. Мне не удаётся получить действитель
验证
Okay. Chewing
Oui, Vance… il irait bien là-dedans, mais je me demandais si on ne 
Okay, Aquarius. Here's what we're going to do. We'd like you to point the X-axis either north or south. That's the positive X-axis. It appears to us that it would be closer to orient the plus X-axis toward the south. Do that with the powered up using the
Oui, nous n'avons pas cett
最後に確認
D'accord, Jim. Le problème persiste par intermittence. Nous pensons pouvoir stabiliser l'alimentation et améliore
Roger. ΔV90. 16 52 25. 0
Ok. Stiamo iniziando a oscillare. Il farmaco l'ha rileva
أورورا 
I'm going to be unable to complete the MIT pictures on this pass, I believe. Negative, negative, I can fix the problem. Too much film was out of the canister, th
11, Houston. Roger. Ihre Winkel sind 45 und 255 Grad. Verstehe ich das ric
罗杰，加州。我已在 0
पुष्टि करें। "प्रेस" के अंतर्गत, चरण 1, पंक्ति 1, मिटा दें। पंक्ति 4, "डिसेंट हीलियम
لماذا لا تسمع صوت م
और इससे आपकी समयसीमा थोड़ी ज्यादा व्यस्त हो सकती है, क्योंकि आपको अपने सूट आखिरी मिनट में, जैसे कि प्रवेश द्वार से एक घंटे से भी कम सम
ठीक है। ठीक है, यह एक प्रारंभिक पैंतरेबाज़ी पीसी प्लस 2 है। आरंभ:; प्लस 0819.2, माइनस 0020.
Bene, va bene. L'allarme del programma è normale; entrerà in funzi
好的。接下来，二、三、四、五、六、七、八都保持不变，最后是ELS AUTO开关，我们要把它设置为M
ठीक है। पिच 224 डिग्री और यॉ 020 
I got BAT in about 33-1/3 percent on that uplink
Ok, 2 se
いやあ、それは本
Эй, Чарли, ты хочешь сказать, что на короткий промежуток времени он действительно загрузил какие-то ценные данные, помим
Roger
Apollo 8, nous obtenions bien ce que vous nous montriez avec votre objectif standard, mais je crois que nous n'avons rien capté avec le téléobjectif. Nous travaillons actuellement sur le problème. Il semble que ce soit un objectif
好的。我们之所以需要径向燃烧，是为了增加你的中途修正
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। मध्यमार्ग से हमारी निगरानी के आधार पर, हम गामा का मान -6.57 दिखा रहे हैं। हालांकि, यह प्रारंभिक अनुमान है, और हमें लगता है कि कुछ और ट्रैकिंग के बाद यह स्पष्ट हो जाएगा, और हम इसे कॉरिडोर में ठीक से समायोजित कर सकते हैं। यह लगभग कॉरिडोर के केंद्र में है; सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है। सोने से पहले हम आपको कुछ घंटों में एक एंट्री पैड भेज देंगे। और हमारे जनसंपर्क विभाग के मित्रों की ओर से, आपकी उड़ान के अलावा कुछ और सुर्खियाँ। आप अभी भी खबरों में छाए हुए हैं। हालांकि, आपके लिए कुछ और दिलचस्प बातें भी हैं। जैसा कि मैंने पहले बताया था, ऑल स्टार गेम बारिश के कारण रद्द हो गया था। यह कल खेला जाएगा। हालांकि, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन इसे अपनी योजना के अनुसार नहीं देख
はい、そうしました
Roger. 355 015, NA, 00213 003 00168 30 2082 370. Vega 
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 마지막으로 몇 가지 일반적인 업데이트 사항을 알려드립니다. 진입 시 카메
Bene. Esatto, e l'ultima frase dell'aggiornamento è che ci si può aspettare che la cometa ruoti a 45 gradi e a 155 gradi. Ora, il punto, Jack, secondo 
ठीक है। मैं ऑटो मोड में हूँ, यानी सामान्य मोड में। जायरो सामान्य हैं, पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है, सभी सिस्टम ठीक 
了解。読んでます
ア
Wir befinden uns in der Trä
Roger, die Zeitangabe auf 2 Alpha
روجر، لقد 
最初に入ったときは少し暑かったり、蒸し暑かったりしましたが、改善されつつあるようです
Хорошо. Давайте посмотрим, всё ли я понял. Для начала, чтобы произошла встреча, нам нужно замкнуть выключатель CB 16 INVERTER 2 и выключатель CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2. Затем на панели 14 убедитесь, что выбран INVERTER 2. И замкните выключатель CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2, оба выключателя. Затем нужно потянуть за рычаг RENDEZVOUS RADAR RELEASE. На панели 3 нам нужно включить RENDEZVOUS RADAR. Нажмите ENTER с плюсом для всех почтовых индексов, плюс 28300 в регистрах 1 и 2. Включаем. Затем отслеживаем движение с помощью 
That's correct, Jack. We just about have procedures in hand detail checklist-type procedures to send to you. In other words, a time line with reference to entry checklist and any changes in the entry checklist. So, if you have a few pages of scratch paper, why, I think we'll 
Yes, we can tell the COMM cycling back and 
جاك، نود منك فحص قاطعَي الدائرة الكهربائية ذوي الكسب العالي في اللوحة رقم 25. افحص مجموعة الكسب العالي رقم 2 وقاطع الكسب العالي في ناقل
Houston, Apollo 11. Einer der größeren Krater auf der Rückseite – mir fiel ein kleiner, dunkler Fleck an der Außenwand auf, 
로저. 급하게 말씀드려서 죄송합니다. 장비에 문제
你知道
Okay. Könnten Sie mir bitte am Ende ein
Okay; real fine. Now there's probably a couple of inches of excess bag sticking our around the bottom of the canister. To prevent this from sucking in against the bottom screen, we'd like you to trim it off with the scissors, and when you've done that, we'd like you to cut two more
Non a
Nein, nicht 56. Ich glaube, es waren 45 Meilen
That's 
Passez à la page 30,
Und Gott sprach: „Das Wasser unter dem Himmel sammle sich an einem Ort, und das Trockene werde sichtbar.“ Und es geschah so. Und Gott nannte das Trockene Erde. Und das, was sich unter dem Himmel gesammelt hatt
Ok
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. تم ضبط الأسعار بشكل 
ठीक है। क्या आप मुझे बैटरी की रीडिंग बता सकते हैं? अगर रीडिंग ठीक र
罗
무료로 인증하세요
好的，
रॉजर। मैं समझ गया कि आप एमएससी-1 प्रयोग के लिए एसीक्यू एड बीकन को 5 मिनट के
أنت تصطدم 
水瓶座さん、
Oh, I mean oral temp, John. C
好的。这只需要做一些修改。请看第三行，上面写着“隧道通风阀，隧道通风30秒；”，
Roger. Est-ce de la musique que j'entends en fond sonor
Roger. Poursuivons avec le Maroon Bugle. Le président Nixon a surpris vos épouses en les appelant de San Francisco juste avant d'embarquer pour venir vous rencontrer. Elles ont toutes été très touchées par votre allocution télévisée. Jan et Pat l'ont suivie depuis le centre de contrôle des missions. Le lancement d'Intelsat depuis Cap Canaveral a été reporté pour la quatrième fois hier soir. Le problème serait dû à un dysfonctionnement du régulateur d'azote du deuxième étage de Delta. Une nouvelle tentative de lancement aura lieu ce soir. Le sous-marin de recherche Ben Franklin, qui étudie le Gulf Stream, a établi un record en dérivant pendant 24 
Roger, 11; hier spricht Houston. Wir hör
是的，杰克，我们还在。我们要跟着你的步骤操作，所以我们会使用高比特率进行传输。回答你的问题，如果出现问题，为了快速撤销这个操作，请务必不要触碰124电源开关，因为它有一个复位位置。撤销操作的方法是进入控制面板5，打开两个断路器。它们就是我们之前跟你念到的。打开POWER-1主断路器B，打开POWER-2
11，休斯顿。我们有初步
ठीक है, जैक। क्या तुम 
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, क्या तुम अब एचएफ जाना चाह
وإذا لم تروا البواقي لدينا، فقد كانت 0.1 X، و0.2 على Y، و0.1 Z، وكان DELTA-V
了解しました。それでは、投棄姿勢
Es sieht so aus, als wäre ich gerade über die Marshallinseln geflogen. Sie waren sehr klar
저도 마찬가지예요. 거기도 모든 게 순조
고도는 변하지 않
Wir gehen davon aus, dass wir die Zielerfassung verlieren könnten, wenn das Radar über uns hinwegfliegt, da die maximale Abta
Du bist la
Roger, 11. Under column A on page F2-20, line 5, line 05, the new data is 01042; line 07, the new data is 00256. Skipping down to line 11, 00070; line 12 is 00042; line 13 is 77730
吉姆，我们希望你继续使用你现在的观测路
هيوستن، هذه أبولو 8. أود التأكد 
روجر، هل لديك الإحداثيات ا
Sprich langsam. D
한 번에 하나씩 해주시면 감사하겠습니다. 특별한 순서는 없으니
Okay. Dafür 
아폴로 8
뭘 가지고 있어
Gemini VI, правильно ли я понял ваше сообщение о том, что выбросы топлива из двигателей были замечены на расстоянии 40 фут
Hav
ठीक है, जैक। बैटरी बी की चार्जिंग प्रक्रिया समाप्त 
Это подтверждается. На этом проверка завершается. Остальные обновления предназначены лишь для вашей информации и основаны на данных нашей 58-часовой платформы — посмотрите на платформу. У нас всё в порядке. Ваши гироскопы практически не показывают дрейфа с момента обновления графика, где мы наблюдали дрейф по оси X -2,24... по оси Y +0,87, по оси Z -0,11. После обновления, которое, как я полагаю, основано на 52-часовом графике, мы показали дрейф по оси X +0,
1번 파일을
Хьюстон, Колумбия. Вы
Okay. Under step 6, almost at the bottom - in fact, it's three lines from the bottom of step 6 - there's a section th
Die Lageregelung funktioniert sehr gut. Es scheint genügend manueller Treibstoff vorhanden zu sein. Ich bin noch bei 72 Prozent. Die Nickrate ist definitiv vorhanden. Die Gierachse ist recht stabil; die g-Kräfte nehmen zu. Die Kapsel ist recht stabil. Es gibt einen grünen Fluss – und hin und wieder orangefarbene Streifen. Der Wiedereintritt verläuft sehr gut. Ungewöhnlich langsame Rollbewegung. Di
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。時間制限はありません。まずはワイドデッドバンドの設定をお願いします。その後、ステップ10と11を実行し
제가 이 사
Okay, Jack. I got another question on page 18. At 1 minute, I concur with MASTER ARM ON, but I wonder why I have to have the ABORT STAGE breaker in. We sur
Bene. Sulla quarta fila. Apri - Da sinistra, apri i primi cinque - correzione - Chiudi i primi cinque e apri
Actuellement, VI se trouve à environ 3 mètres au-dessus et à gauche de VII. Nous v
Okay, on comparing the flight of 13 to Apollo 8, lift-off was about the same amount of vibration as I noticed on 8, but at the beginning of the flight, there was less of the sideways mo
로저. 편하신 시간에 비행 계획 업데이트 소식을 전해드리겠습
That's a
了解。大丈
Ricevuto. E per vostra informazione, vi mostriamo la situazione 
Хорошо. Отличная идея. Мы много размышляли над тем, какие маневры вам разрешить выполнить для фотографирования, я имею в виду, сервисного модуля. Мы считаем это довольно низким приоритетом; есть ощущение, что 
Okay, Vance. Mentre aspettiamo, hai anche un messaggio da darmi per sapere cosa p
ここで考えられるのは、降下水圧が低い場合、水を汲み上げて逆方向に満たすという方法を検討してみることです。もしそ
了解、フレ
रॉजर। 5 एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 37201, माइनस 060, प
11, ह्यूस्टन। कृपया एक पल
11, Houston. Un petit message pour vous, commandant. Nous avons tous fait une petite pause pour déguster un morceau de fromage lunaire spécial. 
खैर, हम दक्षिण अमेरिका और फ्लोरिडा तथा अमेरिका के निचले हिस्से को देख सकते हैं। ऐसा लगता है कि मौस
정말이지, 이런 작은 원
Okay. Complete on the S-5 an
Фред, я просто хотел заранее предупредить тебя, что мы приближаемся к критической отметке уровня CO2 во вторичном баллоне, и ожидаем, что это произойдёт примерно через полчаса, после чего мы попросим тебя переключиться на баллоны командного модуля. Остальная часть процедуры у меня готова, и я просто хотел немного предупредить тебя заранее. Коне
All right. I was just
전원을 끄고 여기서 뭔가를 하겠다
١١، هذه هيوستن. تصحيح منتصف المسار رقم ٥، RCS/G&N: ٢٦٠٢٥، ضبط الميل والانحراف غير متوفر، TIG ١٥٠ ٢٩ ٥٤٥٣، ناقص ٠٠٠٤٨، زائد جميع الكرات، زائد ٠٠٠٠١ ٠٧٥ ١٥٩ ٣٢٨؛ HA غير متوفر؛ HP زائد ٠٠٢٣٠ ٠٠٠
جيميني 4، جيميني 4، هيوستن كاب كوم. ا
Okay. Ein
로저, 프레드. 잘 읽었습니다. 자, 지구에서는, 이 정렬 작
Okay. We're considering
罗杰。方便的话，我们希
Eseguire il D-8 
Roger. Al 68:00, totale meno 4,5%, corrisp
Canarino, 
로
了解しました。パネルの概要は以下の通りです。左パネルのヒューズスイッチはすべて前回報告通りで、重複はしていません。スクイブは作動状態です。
Мы могли бы передвинуть — мы могли бы передвинуть эту сумку — э
Die Zeitspanne vom Rückstoßzünden bis zum Erreichen des umgekehrten Querneigungswinkels beträgt 10:54. Zehn Minuten und 54 Sekun
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at 
Rog
제미니 VI호. 아직 약 154마일 남았습니다. 예상 도착 시간(GET)은 3~4시간 0분 0초입니다. 항속 거리는 154.52마일입니다. 새 테이프 레코더 카트리지를 설치했습니다. 20
Роджер. Мы изучили данные вашей системы воспроизведения, и всё выглядит хорошо. В частности, всё выглядит хорошо. Однако я хотел бы напомнить вам о запросе на выполнение этого прогона только на шаровых клапанах блока А, и вы можете начать с 2-го. Кроме того, в нашем плане полёта указано, что вы запланировали начать вход в систему завтра примерно на 96-м часу, и мы хотели бы узнать, планируете ли вы начать этот вход раньше. Если да, мы
目前我确实看到飞船向右倾斜了大约5度，而且我注意到潜望镜变暗了，这意味着我们正在进入暗面。我会尝试通过潜望镜观察是否有任何变化。目前，至少在这个姿态下，我无法通过潜望镜进行夜间观测。除了控制杆的位置之外，我甚至不确
Oh là là, nous avions oublié, mais nous aim
Хорошо, Джек. Похоже, нам, вероятно, не стоит вк
Base Tranquility, ici Houston, Roger. Bien reçu. Début de la préparation. Pause. Pause. Columbia, Colum
ऑरोरा सेवन। क्या तुम
روجر. قبل أن ينام بيل، نود أن يقوم بإجراء فحص EVAP الثانوي الآن في أي وقت يناسبه، وإذا لم نتمك
नहीं। मुझे द्वितीयक तापमान में कमी का कारण भ
Roger. Une fois 
अपोल
Командование воздушного
Да уж, этот водоотделитель работает никудышно. Может, попробуем друг
罗杰，弗兰克。北纬7度38分，西经165度的着陆区，云量显示云底高度2000英尺（约610米），云底高度12000英尺（约360米），云顶高度10英尺（约31米）；风向东，风速12节，涌浪4英尺（约1.2米），气温约82华氏
能否提供更多关于你们食物和饮用水方面的
«Аполл
是的。不过，
你好，阿波罗11号，
Roger. Potresti dirle con una pausa più lunga tra una frase e l'altra, per f
Okay. Wir werden den Eintritt bei Rollwinkel 285° stoppen, und die 
Houston, il est très intéressant de noter que lorsque je donne un coup de pied (ici, sans atmosphère, et avec cette gravité), les particules semblent partir, et la plupart ont à peu près le même angle d
Okay. Nach dem 
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。とてもよく見えます。背景に地球、アポロ11号、
Ricevuto. Primo elemento, cancellare D-8 al
अब हमारे पास 1.7 है
Verstanden, Jim. Wir arbeiten daran, die Abläufe so schnell wie möglich fertigzustellen und Ihnen zur Verfügung zu stellen. Sie sind bereits vorhanden. Aktuell werden sie von unseren Kollegen im CMS/LMS-System geprüft und integriert, um sicherzustellen, dass die Einstellungen korrekt sind und der 
वॉली, हाँ, बिल्कुल यहीं, छठे भाग के अंत में। आपने जो कण देखे, उनकी सापेक्ष गति के बारे में क्या कहना है? क्या आपने उनमें से किसी को आगे बढ़ते हुए देखा, या यदि आप उड
This is Friendship Seven, holdin
Voyez-vous, si mon réticule n'est pas parallèle à l'horizon, je ne marque pas la ligne de visée
第11集，你们的观众很多。节目在美国现场直播，同时也会直播到日本、西欧和南美大部分地区。大家都说画面色彩非常鲜艳
रॉजर. 01 49
いいえ、発音できません。きっと気に入っていただけると思います
Gémeaux 4, Chirurgien, Chirurgien CSQ. Recommenceriez-vous à man
やれやれ、このウォーターセパレーター、全然機能してないな。もう一つ試した方がいいかもしれない…水だ。
罗杰，瓜伊马斯。IVI
E questo in sostanza - questo in - Sì, questo in sostanza metterebbe il nostro asse X puntat
ठीक है। मुझे हर बार जब मैं हैच को स्ट्रोक करता था, तो उसके गेन डॉग्स को एडजस्ट करना पड़ता था, जिससे मैं पहले की तरह ज़ोर से खींच नहीं पाता था। इसलिए हमें तालमेल बिठाना पड़ा कि मैं कहाँ स्ट्रोक करूँ। जिम को मैं निर्देश देता था कि वह उस समय ज़ोर से खींचे और मुझे पता था कि वह खींच रहा है। इस तरह हम उसे स्टार्ट करने में कामयाब हो गए। एक बार जब ये डॉग्स नीचे की ओर काम करने लगे, तो मुझे गेन में कोई दिक्कत नहीं हुई, लेकिन मुझे पहले कुछ स्ट्रोक्स में गेन क
Roger. Hai co
Apollo 11, Houst
以下是休斯顿联合通讯社记者哈里·罗森塔尔的报道。对于两岁的杰弗里·洛弗尔来说，两个圣诞老人点亮了他的平安夜。第一个圣诞老人敲响了他的家门，带来了礼物。第二个圣诞老人则从月球上接回了他的爸爸。第一个圣诞老人身穿红色圣诞老人套装，留着白色胡子，发出响亮的“嚯嚯”声，整个街区都能听到。第二个圣诞老人是月球背后喷吐火焰的巨型发动机，成千上万的人都在等待着它点火成功的消息。“请知悉，圣诞老人来了！”这是阿波罗8号打破无线电静默，向焦急的全世界宣布发动机完成关键点火15分钟后发出的第一句话。“我们谁也没想到会收到比这更好的圣诞礼物，”任务控制中心的肯·马丁利说道。“感谢地面上的所有人。你们知道，没有你们，我们不可能完成这项任务，”飞船指挥官弗兰克·博尔曼上校回应道。这时，任务控制中心控制台前的圣诞树亮了起来，宇航员哈里森·施密特为机组人员朗读了太空版的《圣尼古拉斯的来访》。故事开头是这样的：“圣诞前夜，在遥远的太空，阿波罗8号的宇航员们刚刚赢得了登月竞赛。”任务控制中心的工作人员推迟了庆祝活动，直到杰弗里的父亲，海军上校詹姆斯·洛弗尔，以及空军少校威廉·A·安德斯和博尔曼上校安全返回地球。往年的平安夜，宇航员们的家人都会去教堂参加圣诞礼拜，但今年他们都守在电视机前。载人航天中心附近的房屋都装饰一新。洛弗尔家周围的草坪以及他所在的蒂姆伯湾社
ठीक है। डिस्प्ले खुला है; एसई ऑडियो बंद है; वीएचएफ ए ट्रांसमीटर खुला है; वीएचएफ बी रिसीवर खुला है; पावर एम्पलीफायर भी खुला रहेगा; ट्रांसमीटर/रिसीवर बंद है; एस-बैंड एंटीना खुला है; पीएमपी बंद है; टीवी खुला है; डिस्प्ले खुला है; अगले तीन खुले हैं; केबिन रीप्रेसर 
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。你们太弱了
जब आप कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हों, तब म
Vorrei solo dire che, anche se per qualche motivo dovessimo esaurire il tempo o qualcosa del genere e non completassimo il percorso Luna-Sole, Jack avrà una piattaforma in li
OK, PRESSION DES RÉSERVOIRS D'EAU ET DE GLYCOL et soupape de
Base Tranquility, un peu moins de 10 minutes ici. Tout semble en ordre et nous supposons que le véhicule
格斯，我是吉姆。你
鹰，休斯顿。你看起来不
C'est confirmé. Je vous maintiens en place avec le DAP, pour obtenir la zone morte. Quand vous serez prêt pour l'étalonnage AGS, je réduirai progressivement le fonc
Bonjour, Apollo
了解しました。アダプターバッテリーはすべてアンペア2、ボルト24です。RCSリングは問題なく機能しています。セカンダリO2ボトルも問題なく機能しています。メインバッテリーは9、ボルトは約22.5～23です。制御バスは（判読不能
Die Guidance Initiate muss dabei sein. Die Chancen stehen sehr schl
And we'l
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 후방은 42가 됩니다. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-
लगता है आपक
，请稍候，即将进行格林威治标准时间 (GM
Что ж, мы продолжаем над этим работать. Я не уверен, что всё уже потеряно. Похоже, наша проблема заключается в том, что интенсивность света, регистрируемая нашим экспонометром, улавливает поле, которое намного больше, чем Земля, и поэтому он регистрирует большую часть тёмной среды глубокого космоса. Мы подозреваем, что это, вероятно, приводит к максимальному открытию диафрагмы объектива, и
DELTA-R هو 00006، 00001
खैर, मैं यहा
يا أهل هيوستن، سيحاول جاك ا
أبولو 11
Роджер, я понимаю, что часы будут устанавливаться по команде, 
ठीक है, बढ़िय
كان ل
わかりました。ステップ11、「ユーティリティライトを消灯します。」12、「電源に切り替え、通常の観察事項を記録して報告します。
ガス、こち
Определенно, он был подо мной. Я следил за ним примерно с Карнарвона. До Карнарвона он был ниже нас, затем поднялся к горизонту, а потом снова опустился ниже. Казалось, что он находится на другой орбите, чем я. У него были другие апогей и перигей, чем у меня. В любом случае, я попытался сблизиться с ним на рассвете, как только смог определить его местоположение. Как я уже сказал, в тот момент он был в миле или двух передо мной — внизу. Поэтому, чем больше я пытался сблизиться, тем меньше мне удавалось его догнать. Я работал в ретроградном режиме. Я использовал верхние двигатели, чтобы уменьшить общую скорость, и одновременно... тоже. Я так и не сблизился, и он продолжал отдаляться от меня. Мне стало очевидно, что к тому времени, как мы добрались до Гавайев, чтобы сблизиться с ускорителем и совершить выход в открытый космос с его помощью, вероятно, потребуется все имеющееся на борту топливо. В правилах полета мы договорились этого не делать. Я связался с CAP COM, и мы решили отказаться от выполнения части миссии, связанной с ускорителем. Не знаю, упоминал ли я об этом, но когда мы отделили
- أنت في مرحلة ما بعد الإرساء؛ أحاول ضبط الكسب
부스터가 분리될 때, 롤 노즐에서 연료가 분사되는 모습이 보였습니다. 부스터가 회전하면서, 우주선의 장축과 부스터의 장축을 잇는 선에 수직인 평면을 따라 움직이는 동안, 길고 유려한 꼬리 부분이 뻗어 나오는 것이 보였습니다. 비행 계획서에 그 모습을 간단하게 그려 넣어야겠습니다. 우주선 분리 시점에는 사방에 파편이 흩어져 있었습니다. 우리가 방향을 바꿔 보니 온통 파편뿐이었습니다. 사실, 부스터를 제대로 보기 전까지는 무엇이 무엇인지 구별할 수 없었습니다. 페어링은 페어링 제트에서 문제없이 분리되었습니다. 수평선 스캐너 페어링은
Okay. Du meinst also, wir werden am Ende genug Wasser erzeugen, um
Bist du be
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। मैंने आपकी आवाज़ सुनी। आवाज़ कुछ ज़्यादा ही अस्पष्ट है। मैंन
Roger, ti sento ancora forte e chiaro. Pro
好的。我去PULSE是因为我想在站台上更好地
Dies ist D-9, L
Ricevuto. Tra 3 minuti sposteremo le antenne da Madrid a Goldstone. Potrebbe verificarsi un pro
速度は3軸すべてでほぼ0です。もちろん、潜望鏡にはまだ光が入っています。まっすぐ上を見ていますが、この時点では…つまり、私の姿勢は…ソファに座らせ
와!
Eagle, Houston. Ora puoi passare al punto 5. Vorremmo un bit rate basso.
わかりました。1行目の「そしてVHF-A」を消してください。2行目の「SIMPLEX動作」を消してください。3行目の「Prime」を消してください。これはPRIME POWER AMP、OFFを意味します。この「PRIME」はOF
Okay. We're considering a midcourse correction at 104 hours - about 20 hours from now - 18 hours from now, and it's only 7 feet per second. The other option is to keep up, since we may 
Beh, se bolle, lo sapremo prima: non ci vorrà molto per scoprire che non bolle. Non 
Спасиб
Roger. Compris, la liste de vérification pré-rétrograde est complète. Vous avez un nouveau TR. Vous avez une charge de commande. 
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi, poco prima delle 5 ore circa, o verso, vi vorremo in assetto per un allineamento dell'asse corporeo, usando il terminatore terrestre come abbiamo fatto prima; E non appena lo avremo, eseguiremo -7, che ora equivale a circa 60 cm al secondo, ovvero circa 15 secondi. E mi è stato detto che ora è sceso a 35 cm, quindi è comodamente entro i limiti. Bene. Quando lo faremo, inizieremo immediatamente la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio del modulo di servizio, che sarà in piano, dato che lo sganciamo prima del solito. Non abbiamo bisogno, e non vogliamo, della componente fuori piano. Quindi sarà in piano, con il modulo di servizio puntato di nuovo verso l'esterno lungo il raggio vettore. Inizieremo quindi a preparare il modulo di comando per il SEP del modulo di servizio, incluso il controllo del modulo di comando e l'accensione a caldo, e circa 4 ore e 30 minuti prima dello sgancio, sgancieremo il modulo di servizio. Continueremo a lavorare finché non avremo il modulo di servizio... e cercheremo di scattare qualche fotografia, ma non ci impegneremo in manovre di traslazione per le foto perché non vogliamo sbagliare... rovinare l'angolo della vostra traiettoria di volo in quel momento. Okay. Questo ci dà 2 ore di tempo libero, più o meno, per finire, se siamo in ritardo, per passare alla checklist e prepararci all'accensione del modulo di comando. Inizieremo l'accensione completa del modulo di comando a meno 2 ore e 30 minuti. Metteremo il computer in linea, lo faremo partire, inizieremo a collegare i vostri vettori di stato e così via, e ad allineare la piattaforma del modulo di comando. Al massimo a circa 1 ora e 30 minuti, dandoci un'ora per completare questa parte del modulo di comando, inizieremo la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio. Poi inizierete a chiudere il... Naturalmente, non abbiamo configurato tutto il nostro stivaggio molto prima di questo. Chiuderemo il portello, effettueremo un controllo dell'integrità della pressione e a meno 1 ora, ovvero 141 ore e 40 minuti, sganceremo il velivolo. Non appena lo faremo, potrete iniziare la manovra per raggiungere l'assetto di ingresso. Una volta lì, eseguite un controllo delle stelle con il sestante, smontate l'ottica e a quel punto vi daremo il vostro pad di ingresso definitivo. Potete inizializzare il velivolo e, a quel punto, sarete di nuovo sulla checklist. C'è una piccola differenza rispetto al vostro ingresso nominale. Siete un po' prima al mattino, quindi andate... sarà notte quando arriverete. Tuttavia, siamo abbastanza fortunati da avere la Luna in u
Probabilmente vi interesseranno i commenti delle vostre mogli. Neil, Jan, aveva detto delle attività di ieri: "La serata è stata incredibilmente perfetta. È un onore e un privilegio condividere con mio marito, l'equipaggio, il Manned Spacecraft Center, il pubblico americano e tutta l'um
Roger, Bill. We lost d
Apo
SEP
صحيح يا جاك. ما سأفعله هو أننا سنتوقف والأرض في نافذة القائد، ثم سأقوم بمناورة المركبة الفضائية بحيث يكون الجزء المضاء من الأرض في أعلى النافذة؛ أي أن الجزء المضاء سيكون على طول المحور Y للمركبة الفضائية، وفي أعلى نافذة الالتقاء، يجب أن أنظر إ
Das stimmt im Großen und Ganzen, Jim. Jack wird in dieser Position die Grobausrichtung einstellen. Genau dafür sollen Sie manövrieren – um diese Position zu erreichen. Wir berechnen die Winkel für die Grobausrichtung und übermitteln sie ihm. Als Erstes wird er, gemäß seiner Checkliste, seine Plattform grob ausrichten. Dann geht er in die Mond
ठीक है। हम आपको अपनी योजना के बारे में संक्षेप में बताना चाहेंगे। इस समय, हमारे पास पानी की बहुत कमी है। इसलिए हम जितना हो सके उतना कम उपयोग करना चाहेंगे। इसके लिए, हम 61 घंटे (यानी अब से 37 मिनट) पर 16 फीट प्रति सेकंड की गति से फ्री-रिटर्न पैंतरेबाज़ी करने की योजना बना रहे हैं। फिर हम इंजन बंद कर देंगे, और फिर 79 घंटे पर, हम एक और एबॉर्ट पैंतरेबाज़ी करेंगे ताकि जो ईंधन बचा है उसे निकाल सकें। लेकिन हम इसे जल्द से जल
مايك، الجو أصبح رطباً بعض الشيء - نسمع صوت تشغيل، مايك. الجو أصبح
Jim, in a moment we will have an attitude for you to go to, and recommend that you keep your FDAI up while maneuvering to that attitude. After you get there, then we will have you widen the deadband and eventually go into a about the burn attitu
Okay. Schalten Sie MAIN BUS TIE A/C ein und lesen 
11番、ヒューストン。了解。角度は45度と255度ですね。キャリアが落ちた直後にこれらの角
Jim, abbiamo ricevuto un paio di notizie. Il Presidente Nixon ha scelto un giudice del Minnesota per la carica di Giudice Associato alla Corte Suprema. Un disegno di legge che prevedeva un aumento del 6% dello stipendio per i dipendenti federali è stato appr
D'accord. Je peux voir l'affichage d'état. - Principal vert, secondaire haut, activé; secondaire bas, activé; Alimentation et 
هذه فريندشيب سفن. الآن يا مارك، في هذه اللحظة، لا تزال بعض الغيوم ظاهرة أسفل مني، كان غروب الشمس جميلاً. غاب بسرعة كبيرة. لا يزال بإمكاني رؤية شريط أزرق ساطع يمتد عبر الأفق ويكاد يغطي نا
さあ、
我完全听懂了。
Понял. Мы это сде
Okay. It looks like our reading is getting k
هذ
Хорошо. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы продолжили точную выравнивание, а углы затяжки гиромотора составляют X + 
제미니 4, 
ठीक है। यह सही है। अंतिम चरण डिसेंट बैटरियों को वापस चालू करना है। पहला चरण है बैटरि
好的
Le réglage est à -50 degrés. Les gyroscopes sont libres. Maintien à -50 degrés. En attente d'un liseré. Le roulis et le lacet sont maint
안녕하세요, 짐. OAMS에 207점이 
Stiamo entrando nella notte. La temperatura della tuta è impo
Cap Com. Se leggi, vai ava
언제든지 
In pratica, quello che ho visto era il colore della lucciola che aveva visto John, che in altri momenti avrei potuto riprodurre come bianco. Sono assolutamente convi
휴
Роджер, Джим. Мы надеялись, что вы иногда будете видеть Землю, проходящую сквозь окно; и, если это так, то мы хотели бы, чтобы вам пришлось — просто смягчить скорость, когд
Хорошо. Сейчас мы как раз подошли к тому моменту, когда, согласно составленному для вас плану полета, вы все должны были закончить есть, и вы с Джеком должны были дежурить, пока Фред ложился спать. То есть, по сути, согласно нашему плану, вы встали примерно на 3 или 4 часа раньше. И — следующий период отдыха для вас назначен на 96
D'accord, Joe. Ici
روجر. انتظر قليلاً. سنوصل لك ذلك بعد لحظا
はい、そのバルブが見つかったらスーツの回路を入手し
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Мы будем заряжать батарею B до начала периода сна. После этого зарядка будет прекращена. Также, примерно в 12:25 по плану полета, батарея A была з
もう一度、オプションと呼んでいたセクションの一番上にカメラ設定の修正があります。「ブラケットMIR 
Ok, Jack. Il passo successivo è tappare il foro di bypass, che è il foro al centro del fondo del contenitore; vogliamo tapparlo perché non vogliamo bypassare il flusso; e ho dimenticato di dirti di prendere qualcosa da infilare in quel for
Possiamo vedere gli indicatori del carbura
VGY माइनस 0.0, VGZ माइनस 0.1, DELTA-VC माइनस 5.2, ईंधन 362, OX 364, असंतुलन प्लस 5
يا جيري، بالأمس، كان جيم يقول شيئًا عن تشغيل جهاز VHF Simplex A على بعد حوا
Ok, stavo per raccontarti del passaggio di consegne che abbiamo appena fatto, ma sono arrivato un
ええ、まさにそれがやりたかったんです。皆さんにお見せできる一番面白いものになると思うんですが、レンズに問
Non lo so. Ho ancora caldo e sudo ancora, ma non mi sento poi così a disagio. Vorrei... vorrei risolvere il problema della temperatura della tuta. È... a tutti gli effetti, è inc
ATT IND - FD
잘 지내시나요? 잭이 저희가 당신
ठीक है, जिम। अब मैं इसे आपको दो भागों में समझाता हूँ। पहला भाग कमांड मॉड्यूल उपकरण स्थानांतरण से संबंधित है। दूसरा भाग इसका उल्टा होगा, कमांड मॉड्यूल से उपकरण स्थानांतरण। दोनों भाग लॉन्च स्टोरेज से डेल्
Zunächst ein paar Fragen zu Ihrem allgemeinen Befinden. Wie erho
Ho il tuo 
Apollo 8, Houston
네, 맞습니다, 짐. 지금 바로 준비
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. If you copy, all systems on the 
Okay. We're - we're in no rush. This is a ve
ठीक है।
了解しました。今、飛行計画が少し遅れています。MITフィルムを装着できていないんです。やっと装着できました。ジャイロの取り外
Ok. Ho capito bene, Jim, e segue. Questa è la piattaforma per il decollo più 60. Il motivo dell'aggiornamento è per evitare condizion
Хорошо, мы снова на UHF-диапазоне. Это определенно были те светлячки, которых вы описывали на рассвете. Я не особо наблюдал за закатами. Например, когда становится светлее, и я сейчас бью по солнцу, появляются белые кристаллы, по
了解しました。了解しました。可能であれば、サーモスタットを使ってキャビンの左右の壁の温度を測ってください。また、目に見える湿気があれば報告してください。吸取紙は濡れていますか？ 以
Ri
Dis, Fred, t
Houston
Roge
Mentre mi guardo intorno, il contrasto, in generale, è *** generato completamente dall'ombra *** del Sole... un grigio molto chiaro, un grigio chiaro, un alone attorno alla mia ombra, attorno all'ombra del mio casco. Poi, mentre guardo verso ***, il contrasto diventa più forte in quanto il colore circostante è ancora piuttosto chiaro. Mentre guardi verso il Sole ***, una porzione maggiore di *** area in ombra è rivolta verso di noi. Il colore generale dell'*** circostante *** il contrasto non è così forte. Esaminando tutta l'area polverosa che abbiamo sollevato ***, la consistenza è considerevolmente più scura. Ora, ne ho sollevato uno, e immagino che 
Хорошо. Через 23 часа общее количество составляет 1121, квадранты A — 274, Bravo — 286, Charlie — 274, Delta — 287, а криогенные резервуары заполнены следующим образом: водородный бак 1 — 83 процента; водородный бак 2 — 86 процентов; кислородный бак 1 — 87 процентов; кислородный ба
Okay. Ready to
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous aurons la ligne de visée dans 2 m
Даже дети в лагере попали в новости, когда Майк-младший ответил «да» на вопрос о том, войдет ли его папа в историю. Затем, после короткой паузы, он спросил: «Что такое история?» В Вашингтоне президент Никсон планирует использовать свою исполнительную власть дл
双子座，金丝雀 
啊，这是友谊七号。理解1 Bravo是01加50加00；2 Charlie，更正2 Bravo是，2 Charlie是02加05
Хорошо. Фрэнк, свет здесь погас. (Солнечный свет исчез.) Мне нужно кое-что включить.
Roge
Bonjour, Apollo 8; c’est Deke. Je voulais simplement vous souhaiter u
Okay. Just below 13. And just for your information, we've got people working on several subjects. We're working on the midcourse coming up to determine our control system and how to do it with the control system 
ठीक है। इस मोड में आपको हमारी आवाज़
Bene. Sotto "controlli", la quarta riga in basso dice "ATTEGGIAMENTO MANUALE, t
Okay. Wenn Sie Ihr Manöverbuch zur Hand nehmen – das letzte Manöver, das wir Ihnen für den Überflug gegeben haben, ist weiterhin gültig. Wir möchten lediglich anmerken, dass der Eintrittswinkel (Gamma) etwas steiler ist als von uns als ideal angesehen, aber er liegt innerhalb unserer derzeitigen V
रॉजर। 269 10 पर आगे पढ़ने से लगभग 67.4 मील की समानांतर दूरी का पता चलता है। मु
Нет, но ваши комментарии о Билле Шаффере и объяснения были проци
지금 화면 중앙에 보이는 분화구가 웹 분화구입니다. 우리는 탐사선이 하강하기 약 6분 전, 바로 위에서 이 분화구를 내려다보고 있었을 겁니다. 분화구 바닥은 비교적 평평하고, 서쪽 벽, 즉 카메라에 가장 가까운 벽에는 두세 개의 작은 분화구가 보입니다. 화면 아래쪽에는 바깥쪽에 움푹 들어간 분화구가 하나 있고, 화면 아래쪽 왼쪽에는 일련의 함몰 지형이 보입니다. 이렇게 서
Ве
रॉजर। मुझे खेल खेलने में कोई आपत्ति नहीं है, क्योंकि आप लोग पिछले साढ़े पाँच दिनों में बहुत 
कुंभ राशि वालों, क्या आप ह्यूस्टन पढ़ रहे
了解。カントン・キャッ
नील, यह ह्यूस्टन ह
分かりました。電源5、緊急停止です。項目1の1行目、「およびVHF-A」を消します。2行目は「SIMPLEX
번역 검토…아무
Und wieder brauchen wir eine kleine Lagekorrektur. Unsere Erde verschwindet nach oben und rechts. Unsere Erde und deine Erde. In die falsche Richtung, in die falsche Richtung. Noch ein bisschen. Okay. Das ist gut, wenn du sie so halten kannst.
Docteur, je vous informe que j'ai beaucoup de mal ave
Хорошо, Джек. Это Джим. Я просто хочу убедиться, что вы фильтруете изменения в контрольном списке, которые появляются, чтобы убедиться, что они действительно необходимы. Когда мы изучаем наши процедуры, мы можем выполнить их только один раз, и мы не можем вносить изменения в последнюю минуту. Мы хотим сделать все возможное и безопасное, но если изменения не являются действительно н
А как насчёт подо мной? В
Go ahead. 11
نعم، إنها حوالي 2 ف
روجر. بالنسبة لقيمة الاسم 42، آخر ما ذكرته، قيمة HA هي 65.6، وقيمة H
Una cosa che non so se abbiamo già registrato, ma sia io che Ed abbiamo detto che eravamo molto grati per tutto l'addestramento che avevamo fatt
わかりました。手順は次のとおりです。、、ENTER; 1331、ENTER; 7、ENTER; そして ENTER。説明は以下の通りです。 の間に、OPTICS ZEROスイッチをゼロに切り替えてから約16秒後に、 がコンピュータに入力されたことがありました。これは非常に珍しい例外で、光学系をゼロにしてから16秒後の約-0.4秒間隔でこれを行うと、一部のOPTモードビットがリセットされます。つまり、OCDUに障害が発生した場合、それが示されないことになります。したがって、この手順で行っているのは、これらの3つ
रॉजर, ये सुनकर अच्छा लगा। लगता है त
네, 연소 전에 압력이 안정된 것 같네요. 지금 다시 압력과 온도를 알
रॉजर। जब आपने अलगाव के समय क्वाड ब्रावो समस्या पर टिप्पणी की थी, तो आप थोड़े कमजोर लग रहे थे। कृपया फिर से बताइए कि टॉकबैक बार्बर पोल देखने
좋아. 좋아. 이제 수면 자세로 전환하는 기동을 시작하겠어. 롤 
هذا ما يبدو عليه الأمر؛ إلا إذا كان مجرد خط بني داكن. إنه حقاً أمر فوضوي
嗯，我不知道。我马上要尽可
खैर, हमे
Houston, it's very interesting to note that when I kick my foot *** with no atmosphere here, and this gravity *** they seem to leave, and most of them have about the same angle of departure and velocity. From where I stand, a large portion of them will impact at a c
Roger. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Es folgt ein dreißigminütiger Be
روجر، يا فريندشيب سفن. يبدو أن قراءتك غير دقيقة بعض الشيء
روجر. تقرير متواصل. ضغط المقصورة 5.5 ويستقر بشكل جيد. درجة حرارة هواء المقصورة 95 درجة فهرنهايت؛ الر
روجر. T8، 114 30 57؛ T9، 116 29 10؛ T10، 118 27 23؛ T1
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン
Und, nur mal so aus Neugier: Wir haben das Radar ziemlich elegant entfernt. E
프렌드십 세븐입니다. 여기는 캔턴 캡 콤입니다. 지상 시스템은 모두 정상 작동하는 것 같습니다. 150볼트-암페어 인버터 온도는 현재 188°입니다. 다시 말씀드리지만 188°입니다. 
Apollo 8, beim Überfliegen des Hügels sieht alles gu
This is Apollo 8, coming to you live from the moon. We've had to switch the TV cameras now. We showed you first a view of earth as we've been watching it for the past 16 hours. Now we're switching so that we can show you the moon that we've been flying ove
Эй, надеюсь, кто-нибудь понимает, что Земля вот-вот под
Permettez-
Okay, Apollo 8. We've finished the first test, and we're now going to change the uplink mode to UPLINK COMMAND AND RANGING, and we'll be going without upvoice. We'll be in this mode
Понял. Еще две проверки. Можете ли вы подтвердить, что диск с сообщениями был размещен на поверхности, как и планировалось, а т
Ты нико
يا أهل هيوستن، ستُقدم لكم قاعدة ترانكويليتي بعض التعليقات بخصوص سؤال الجيولوجيا الذي طُرح الليلة الماضية. لقد هبطنا في حقل فوهات بركانية ناعم نسبيًا، يتكون من فوهات ثانوية مستطيلة وأخرى دائرية، معظمها ذو حواف مرتفعة بغض النظر عن حجمها. هذا ليس صحيحًا دائمًا، فهناك بعض الفوهات الصغيرة التي لا تظهر لها حواف واضحة. تتكون الكتلة الأرضية في جم
Второй момент, конечно же, заключается в том, что когда вы отключаете пассивный терморегулирование, вы находитесь примерно под углом 90 градусов к линии Земли, поэтому при повороте влево вам придется поворачивать влево до тех пор, пока угол наклона среднего подвеса не приблизится к 60 градусам. Дополнительные 30 градусов вы получите за счет смещения между точкой, куда направлена ​​камера, и вашей положительной осью X. Но в сумме это составит около 90 градусов. Мы просто хотели убедиться, что вы понимаете, что будете работать с большим
收到。与其启动引擎并进入抬头模式，我们还是继续保持现在的模式
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया। मेरा पहला राउंड पूरा करने का समय नजदीक आ 
Fred schaut gerade durch unser optisches Gerät. Es dient zur Ausrichtung u
- - اقتراب TPI. يا رجل، هذا شيءٌ مذهل 
ठीक है। मेरे पास इसका एक समाधान है। 4.5 की गति से, 10 फीट प्रति सेकंड की रफ्तार से नीच
Близнецы VI, ваш базовый часовой пояс п
We'v
11, Houston. Nous allons changer de 
Ici Sigma Seven. Amorçage désactivé. Trois interrupteurs de rétrofusée activés. Arme
— Почему бы те
Well, we're
Каков ваш отчёт о состоянии космического корабля, станции и дру
好的
इसलिए हम थोड़
और, 11, ह्यूस्टन। आपकी जानकारी के लिए, ईगल, सीडीयू के ज़्यादा गरम होने
RKV之前需要多少时间？SPC Yaw
ОТМ
Okay, Houston. Hier spricht Apollo 
Theta, 11,8; Bereich 68,90; Delta-V gesamt 232; Delta-VI 101,1; Datenpunkt 05:40. Daten 12,5 Theta; Bere
Houston, Apollo 8.... again. Ho
Roger. La pression à la sour
Roger. On le voit, Jack. On a relevé une valeur de -2 degrés sur l'indice d'amarrage. On aimerait savoir si cette valeur est précise à 2,0, 2,1 ou 
Mann, in der Schwerelosigkeit hat man echt eine ganz andere Perspektive. Neil hat gerade die Füße auf d
حسنًا يا جاك، أنا على الخط الآن. على نطاق S، تريد مني إيقاف تشغيل جهاز الإرسال/الاستقبال وإيقاف تشغيل مضخم
١، G&N: ٦٢٧١٠، زائد ٠٩٨، ناقص ٠١٩، إشعال ٠٧٥ ٤٩ ٤٩٦٥، ناقص ٢٨٨٩٧، ناقص ٠٣٩٤٤، ناقص ٠٠٦٨٦. لفة ٣٥٨، ميل ٢٢٦، ٣٤٧؛ ٠١٦٩٢، زائد ٠٠٦١٠؛ ٢٩١٧٣ ٦٠٢ ٢٩١٠٨؛ نجم السدس ٣١ ١٠٦٦ ٣٥٨. باقي PAD غير متوفر. محاذاة فيغا ودينيب ٢٤٣ ١٨٣ ٠١٢. لا يوجد فراغ. سيكون الأفق مرئيًا أسفل الحافة العلوية لنافذة الفتحة مباشرةً قبل دقيقتين من الاحتراق. لن يكون مرئيًا في نافذة الالتقاء على الجانب الأيسر. عند ٧٥ ساعة ٤١ دقيقة ٢٣ ثانية. عند 76 15 29. بدون الحرق 76 05 30. القيم التي ستراها على NOUN 42 قبل الحرق هي HA زائد 431.3، HP ناق
Wir f
أظن أن فرانك سامونسكي يعلم الآن أنني مدين له ب
ठीक है। हमारा युद्धाभ्यास पूरा हो गया है, और इस स्थिति में एम-रेखा ठीक 90 डिग्री विपरीत दिशा में है। यह दाईं ओर समानांतर होने के बजाय, पृथ्वी के केंद्र की ओर 
Сейчас мы говорим о скорости ветра в середине траектории в 7 футов в секунду за 104 часа. И экстраполируем это примерно на 8 часов до входа в атмосферу. Мы дали вам ориентир для этого — это всег
... VGX -0.1, VGY -0.
その日が来るでし
C'est pour le calibrage optiqu
रॉजर, यह सिग्मा सेवन है। जीन, मैंने आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से सुन ली है। मेरी स्थिति में कोई बदलाव नहीं हुआ
Tranquility 
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。距离视线到达还有30秒。两艘飞船飞越
Je
罗杰，友谊七
Когда вы перейдете в режим автоматического маневра, мы рекомендуем использовать углы, вычисленные с помощью CMC, и посмотреть, что получится. Если линия M не будет параллельна горизонту до субзвездной точки, мы попробуем получить углы, вычи
大约32。现在它将会开
好的。还有
जैक, क्या आप बैटरी चार्जर बंद 
Non. Non. Elle est apparue juste au-dessus de l'horizon, à travers la couche de lueur atmosphérique. De la première fois où je l'ai aperçue jusqu'à ce qu'elle atteigne ce que je 
D'accord. Tu devrais l'avoir maintenant, 
«Дружба Семь», это хирург из Занзибара. Получили ваш отчет, в котором указана хорошая точность движений. Отсутствуют нарушения движений головы, хорошая острота зрения
닐에게 겨누거나 밝은 곳에 있는 누군가에게 겨
1
Ricevuto. Ricevuto, stai manovrando per l'atteggiamento JETT. È corret
체크리스트에 따르면 - 이렇게 하면 눈이 멀게 될 겁니다 -... 06 71 - 7000 확인; 06 89 확인... 320 70
D'accord, Jack. Je comprends que la FAO travaille dessus et nous aurons quelque chose pour toi
Okay. I tracked a bright star, and I believe that's out there in Aquila. In fact, I'm quite sure. I can see the two target stars. I've tracked it all the way up. It's almost to the top. It's going to go out of
D'accord. Et nous savons que nous n
飞行一切顺利。失
حسناً. فهمت. الفلسفة في منتصف المسار هي القيام بذلك قبل تفريغ خزان الهيليوم، مما يعني أننا سنقوم بذلك بعد حوالي 105 ساعا
ああ、断続的にね、ジェリー。ここはかなり騒音がひどくて、誰かが通信に反応するたびに、ああ、目が覚めてしまう
Ok. Spegni il controller. Ok. Ora di nu
これは良い取引です。なぜなら、これを実行するか、も
It's done. ROTATION CONTROL POWER, 
收到。非常清楚。极光七号正在接收海角信号。非常清楚
好的。刚才那个没
Пока что, похоже, всё работает довольно хорошо на протяжении всего полёта, Га
Nous aussi, McDivitt, on en a marre d'en
えっと…バズ、70ミリ容器には白黒の容器が1つとカラーの容器が1つしか入ってないんだけど…
Bene, negativo. Ho bisogno di un'altra manovra verso il te
سلبي. نسبة الوقود اليدوي 54%، 54%. انتهى
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston. Das ist alle
Okay. Ich wollte Sie nur darauf hinweisen und Sie bitten, darüber nachzudenken und die möglichen Auswirkungen auf den Flugplan zu bedenken. Ich lasse Ihnen dann die Weitwinkelaufnahme und die Kommentare zum Mond vorab durchgehen und sehe, welche Abschnitte am besten geeignet erscheinen. Okay. Frank bat uns, die Reihenfolge der Eintrittsprofile auf der Bildrolle zu überprüfen. Das erste Profil ist mit „Nonexit Nummer 2“ beschriftet und stellt den Kurzstrecken-Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt dar. Das zweite Profil heißt „3500 Meilen“ und ist ebenfalls ein Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt, der jedoch für längere Eintrittsstrecken verwendet wird. Das dritte Profil ist „Nonexit Eintritt Nummer 1“, gefolgt von einem vierten, ebenfalls 3500 Meilen langen Eintrittsprofil. Es gibt also vier Eintrittsprofile. Die Nummern 1 und 3 sind die Kurzstrecken, die Nummern 2 und 4 die Langstreckeneintritte. Beim Kaltstart haben wir, glaube ich, schon besprochen, wie wir da vorgehen werden. Ungefähr in einer Stunde wollen wir uns damit befassen. Auf keinen Fall um 12 Uhr. Wir haben 
Хорошо. Мы сейчас приш
Роджер. 
रॉजर, समझ गया कि घड़ियाँ आद
罗杰。请你告诉鹰，他的Y轴点是-1
Ora sto scendendo all'orizzonte e puoi sicuramente vedere i due strati di aria che brillano, quello che è piu
休斯顿，阿波罗1
무체아 캡 컴. 시그마 세븐. HF. 잘 들었습니다
A
That's - That's affirm
Роджер. -1 широта минус 06269; это широта; а для 
Nur noch eine letzte Bemerkung, Jack. Könntest du bitte Hal freigeben, damit er heute Abend nicht seine Lich
Roger. Je 
지금 화면 중앙에 보이는 분화구가 웹 분화구입니다. 우리는 탐사선이 하강하기 약 6분 전, 바로 위에서 이 분화구를 내려다보고 있었을 겁니다. 분화구 바닥은 비교적 평평하고, 서쪽 벽, 즉 카메라에 가장 가까운 벽에는 두세 개의 작은 분화구가 보입니다. 화면 아래쪽에는 바깥쪽에 움푹 들어간 분화구가 하나 있고, 화면 아래쪽 왼쪽에는 일련의 함몰 지형이 보입니다. 이렇게 서로 연결된 분화구들이 왜 이런 특정한 패턴을 이루고 있는지 알아내는 것이 우리의 가장 큰 관심사입니다. 이제 카메라를 확대해서 더 자세히 보여드리겠습니
콜럼비아, 여
15 ठीक है। मैं 15 साल का हूँ - मेरी बैकअप घड़ी में लगभग 3 सेकंड की देरी हुई थी
好的，我现在看到第28个
Роджер, А
查理，用单筒望远镜看，我能明显看出圣费尔南
ठीक है, दृष्टि क्षमता अच्छी है। मुझे चार्ट पढ़ने में कोई समस्या नहीं है, दृष्टि दोष से भी कोई परेशानी नहीं है। मुझे आसन बनाए रखने में भी कोई दिक्कत नहीं हो रही है। मैं अभी भी फ्लाई-बाय-वायर मोड पर हूं। मैं सामान्य मोड पर हूं, लेकिन फिलहाल मैनुअल मोड का भी इस्तेमाल कर रह
稳定下来后，我们检查了整个推力控制系统，发现我们无法控制偏航或滚转——或者说，我们无法控制偏航推进器的偏航，因为我们的滚转是由偏航
ठीक है, जैक, ये सिर्फ़ एहतियात के तौर पर है। अगर हम ऑप्
Roger, Tranquillité. TIG, 104 39 47 00, 55358 00322, plus 
收到。你明白了，那将是
هيا يا هيوستن. 
夕焼けはなかなか印象的だ。眺めるのに時間を無駄にする必要はないと思う。とても興味深い。もう一つ魅力的なのは、目が慣れていないと黒く見えることだ。窓に確かに
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। जब आप कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हों, तो आपक
Hallo, Zanzibar Com Tech. Zanzibar Com Tech, Freundschaft Sieben. Empfangen Sie schwach, aber lesbar. Wie geht 
はい、そうで
Roger
罗杰。截至 68 00，总
Okay, Jim, wir schätzen, dass die Hauptkassette noch 1 Stunde hält und die Nebenkass
どうやら私たちは食に関わる人々にひどい仕打ちをしてしまったよ
收到。2号区域的Delta时间为2小时38分31秒。我再说一遍，2小时38分31秒。完毕
了解。近地点86海里をコピーしました。遠地点は取得できま
Хорошо. А чт
Aquarius, Houst
, minus 29837, plus 02390, plus 00994 000 200 005 01693, plus 00600 29949 402 29782 010 689 260, Persei Zeta, down 048, left 05. The remainder not applicable. Sirius, Rigel, 129 155 010. No ullage. We'll pass
夜間捕捉のためにレチクルを十分に暗くすることができません。つる座、つまり窓の中の星々を再びマーク
आज हम काफी अच्छा महसूस कर रहे हैं। उड़ान योजना की समीक्षा करते हुए, हमे
よし、フレッド。船長に迷惑をかけるつもりはない。休憩が終わるまで司令船の窓から写真を撮るのは禁止だ
Pour reprendre mon compte-rendu concernant le propulseur, au début du vol. Après notre entrée dans l'obscurité, à environ 1200 pieds (365 mètres) de distance, j'ai tenté de maintenir ma position, mais le seul repère dont je disposais pour évaluer la distance qui me séparait du propulseur était l'écart entre les feux clignotants. De façon intermittente – et non pas intermittente, mais continue – je voyais un feu, puis deux, puis un seul, et parfois il s'écoulait un long moment avant que je n'en voie deux à nouveau, indiquant que le propulseur tournait constamment. Je n'avais aucune idée de sa direction. En me basant sur l'écart entre les feux, lorsque je pouvais les voir tous les deux, j'estimais êtr
Nous so
休斯顿，阿
わ
我们正在讨论两个项目，但目前
好的。我输入的是 NOUN 01，回车。接下来
Bene. Quello era il - Sì, il POSTLANDING VENT, cioè FLT/PL, da aprire. I successivi sono DIRECT ULLAGE, due, da 
... Sac 
Роджер. Не могли бы вы дать мне еще один совет через 14
रॉजर। बस यही हम चाहते हैं। हम यहीं रहना चाहते हैं, और हमें समझ नहीं आ रहा
Il cielo è
이 자세에서는 확실히 머리 위를 올려다보는 듯한 착각이 들고, 지평선이 보이지 않으면 그냥 칠흑 같은 하늘뿐입니다. 조종실 조명은 상당히 밝습니다. 물론 적응하고 나면 객실 조명으로 줄일 수는 있겠지만, 지금은 우주복 회로 문제 때문에 조명을 낮추기가 좀 꺼려집니다. 손가락에 끼우는 손전등을 아낌없이 사용하고 있습니다. 앞
हमारे पास 51 5 
了解。もちろん、ピッチアップです。39:41、Rev 4、東経112.
알겠습니다. 중간 항로 수정과 관련해서, 수정은 약 25피트/초 정도의 속도로 진행될 예정입니다. 시간 지연의 이유는 분리 간격을 7.5피트/초로 설정해 주신 덕분에 추적 정확도를 높이기 위함입니다. 추적 데이터를 좀 더 자세히 살펴볼 시간이 필요합니다. 수정 과정에서 발생하는 편차는 빠르게 증가하지 않을 것입니다. 이제 비행 계획에서 해당 시점
チェックリストに「キャプチャラッチが接続されているか確認する」という項目が
Roger.
Это показывает дальность - скорость изменения дальности в С, которая представляет собой угол между линией визиров
नहीं, मैंने नहीं खोला है। मैंने विज़र न खोलने की कोशिश की है। मैं सर्किट को चालू करना चाहता हूँ। मुझे लगता है कि हमें एक छोटा सा चक्कर लगाने का मौका मिल सकता है। मैं इसके लिए तैयार हो जात
我不这么认为，因为当时
ええ、別に連絡を取りたかったわけじゃ
Do you have 3 Alp
알겠습니다. 그리고 그 쿼드 온도에 대해 말씀드리자면, 그 장치의 상한선은 온도계 상한선으로 105도입니다. 현재 온도는 그보다 훨씬 낮습니다. 저희가 계속 관찰해 왔는데, 추적은 하고 있지만 매우 느리게 진행되고 있습니다. 우주선을 회전시킬 때 온도 변화가 다소 느리게 나타나는 것 같지만, 센서가 얼어붙은 것은 아닙니다. 그리고 이 부분에 대해 좀 더 말씀드리자면, 짐에게 다음에 광학 장치나 트러니언 작업을 할 때 ZERO OPTI
Can you tell me why they want to use the Repress instead of the O2 High R
外部
Très bien. Ce que nous vous devons à partir de maintenant, c'est la procédure de charge de la batterie A, puis une procédure pour tout r
هيوستن، أبولو 8. الدخول على النحو التالي: منتصف المحيط الهادئ، 357 152 359 268 بالإضافة إلى 0813 ناقص الكتلة التالية غير قابلة للت
Impossibile attenuare sufficientemente il reticolo per un'acquisizione notturna. MARK di nuovo Grus, cioè delle stelle stesse nella finestra... Thaurus sta arrivando proprio attraverso la linea centrale. Potrei imbardare a destra di circa 5 gradi, il che soddisferebbe la stima. Poi rollare a sinistra di circa 5 gradi, il che è piuttosto grafico. Per un'osservazione retrospettiva, questa sembra un'ottima configurazione. Non ci saranno problemi di assetto 
Milt affer
Okay, Joe. Ich habe noch eine Frage. Wenn wir nach dem Abtrennen des Servicemoduls etwas früher mit der vollständigen Hochfahrzeit des Kommandomoduls fertig sind, möchte ich frühzeitig in die JETT-Position wechseln und sicherstellen, dass dieser Teil abgeschlossen ist. Dann würden wir dort eine
好的，
Если это так, то меня волнует только то, чтобы всё 
ठीक है। और, जैक, कुंभ राशि को कैसे पढ़ा 
Bene. Sono felice di v
When you get around there, Buzz, I'll give you the briefing (laughter). You just s
There is a nice interesting horizon. The sun is off to the left about - oh I'd say 40 degrees. There's a dark line of the surface of the earth, orange at the clouds - a light yellow, a light white and a blue band. A very light blue and I have the Planet M
了解、ジム。テレ
You're going the wro
是你说的
Roger, Bruce. Danke. Wir erwarten Fernsehen. Alles ist angeschlossen. Eingeschaltet haben wir es noch nicht; das tun wir 
몇 가지 테스트를 더 진행해 보고 싶습니다. 전반적으로 특별한 문제는 없는 것으로 판단됩니다. 4~5가지 테스트를 더 실행해 보고 결과를 확인해 보겠습니다. 그 전에, 널 바이어스 테스트를 한 번 실행해 보겠습니다. 다운링크에서 
Хорошо. Понимаете. Просто, ка
Okay. "Era la notte prima di Natale e, nello spazio, l'equipaggio dell'Apollo 8 aveva appena vinto la corsa alla luna; le cuffie erano appese con cura alle console, nella speranza che Chris Kraft sarebbe arrivato presto; Frank Borman era rannicchiato tutto al caldo nel suo letto, mentre visioni di danzavano nella sua testa; e Jim Lovell, nel suo divano, e Anders, nella cabina, si stavano scervellando sullo schermo di un computer, quando da lì si levò un tale frastuono che Frank balzò giù dal letto per vedere cosa fosse successo. Corse al sestante come un lampo, per assicurarsi che non si schiantassero. La luce sul petto della crosta frastagliata della luna, dava una lucentezza di formaggio verde alla grigia polvere lunare, quando ai suoi occhi meravigliati non apparve altro che un cartello della Burma Shave che diceva "Kilroy è stato qui". Ma Frank non era uno stupido; capì subito che erano stati i primi; doveva essere un trucco. Più rapidi dei razzi, le sue maledizioni giunsero, si rivolse ai suoi uomini e li chiamò per nome. Ora Lovell, ora Anders, ora non pensare che crederei a una vecchia barzelletta che hai scritto sul muro. Non dissero una parola, ma sorridevano come elfi, e risero della loro barzelletta loro malgrado. Fr
بعد مرور ثلاث ساعات و48 دقيقة و51 ثانية، أحتسي رشفة ماء جيدة. إنه منعش هذه المرة. أمدد ساقيّ قليلاً. الجو مظلم تماماً. أنا في حالة تحليق انسيا
Danke 
अंतरिक्ष में इतनी दूर से पृथ्वी को देखते हुए, मुझे ऐसा महसूस हो रहा है जैसे पुराने समुद्री जहाजों में यात्रा करने वाले यात्री अपने घर से बहुत दूर एक लंबी यात्रा पर जाते थे, और अब हम वापस लौट रहे हैं। मुझे इस यात्रा पर गर्व है, लेकिन फिर भी घर और अपने बंदरगाह पर व
माइक, यह ठीक नहीं है। अगर आप प्लॉट देखेंगे, जिसे हम आपके लिए बचाकर रखेंगे और उड़ान के बाद आपको दिखाएंगे, तो यह पहले ही चक्कर में शुरू हुआ और लगभग 20 
ساعة واحدة من الاستعداد قبل الإطلاق. استمر في فحص ال
알겠습니다. 요 27100
And, Houston, Tranquility Base is going to give you a few comments with regard to the geology question of last night. We are landed in a relatively smooth crater field of elongate secondary - circular secondary craters, most of which have rims irrespective of their - raised rims irrespective of their size. That's not universally true. There are - There are a few of the smaller craters around which do not have a discernible rim. The ground mass throughout the area is a very fine sand to a silt. I'd say the thing that would be most like it on Earth is powdered graphite. Immersed in this ground mass are a wide variety of rock shapes, sizes, textures, rounded and angular, many with varying consistencies. As I said, I've seen plain - what looked to be plain basalt and vesicular basalt. Others with no
是
Ok. Volevo solo che ne foste consapevoli e che ci pensaste e che ci rifletteste sulle possibili implicazioni per il piano d
مرحبا
*** 即将失去平衡向一个方向移动，恢复起来非常自然轻松 *** 而且，杰克，
제가 여기 있
双子
罗杰。我们先来看世界新闻。随着这艘小型宇宙飞船绕月飞行，世界各地在平安夜向美国阿波罗8号宇航员致以赞扬，并寄予对太空探索领域国际合作的希望。即使在共产主义阵营，人们也对人类首次登月之旅充满热情。在莫斯科，苏联科学家阿纳托利·贝萨拉诺夫回顾了苏联和美国此前在太空领域的合作，并预
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티 기지입니다. 원하시면 30분마다 임무 시간을 
Ci metto dentro un 
حسنًا. إذًا، نستخدم وضع PRO، وينتهي بنا الأمر بظهور وميض 5018؛ ونريد هنا مناورة تلقائية بدلًا من استخدام ، لذا نستخدم وضع PRO مع التوجيه، PNGS؛ والتحكم في الوضع، تلقائي. لدينا نطاق ميت 1.4 درجة، وسيعطينا المؤشر لمحاولة ضبطها، وفي ذلك الوقت أنظر من خلال ، وإذا كان الأمر مشابهًا لفحص الشمس في أبولو 11، فكل ما 
Zwillinge 4, Zwillinge 4, RKV CAP CO
Il semblerait que je viens de survoler les î
D'accord. Vous ave
Roger. I have some
مرحباً، أبولو 11. هيوستن. نحن في انتظارك
이 관성 자세를 유지하시겠습니까? 그렇다면 그냥 REACQ에 두는 게 좋겠습니다. 아주 잘 작동하거든요
रॉजर, माइक। हमें अपने सिग्नल में उतार-चढ़ाव दिख रहे हैं। आपने कनेक्ट और डिस्कनेक्ट किया, लेकिन डॉक्टरों को अभी भी सिग्नल न
... 57-1/2 n
समर्थन करन
Gemini VIII. Нам также не
أبولو 13، هي
Sembra che sparino più a lungo di quanto pensas
Sì. È allora che dovrei essere in grado di leggere la portata sul
हाँ, बिल्कुल सही। मैं लगभग दो या तीन घंटे से सो रहा हूँ। एड लगभग पाँ
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन से। अगर आपके पास एक मिनट का समय हो, तो क्या माइक हमें डॉकिंग के समय के आसपास हुई घटनाओं के बारे में थोड
了解しました。口腔温度測定は完了しましたの
良い
मैं एडाप्टर के पीछे हूँ। मैं 
روجر. 355 015، غير متوفر، 00213 003 00168 30 2082 370. فيغا ودينيب 007 144 068. لا يوجد فراغ. الوزن: 33302. يتجه نحو الأرض.
حسناً. 22 قدماً
5C는 가격이 매우 높
That's right, Mike, and we believe you have your quad Bravo and quad Charlie turned off in your at this time, and a 5 degree deadband. We
عاد جهاز Tr-10 إلى وضعه الطبيعي. لقد فعلت ذلك سابقًا. حسنًا، حصلنا على ضغط البدلة. تفضل بإلقاء نظرة أخرى على العواكس هنا. 250 تساوي 141 درجة، و150 تساوي حوالي 107 درجات. هذا جيد. وضع الاستعداد هو... 7. قريب جدًا من درجة حرارة الجو. سلبي، بل أقل قليلًا... ضغط المقصورة حوالي 5.3 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة، وهو مثالي. درجة حرارة قبة البدلة 72 درجة. درجة حر
友谊七号。
Kontinuierliche A
حسنًا، هيوستن؛ أكواريوس. سأعيد توجيهها نحو الزوا
Ouais, au lieu qu'on me 
Okay. We will stand, and you give us a mark on that. In just a second, I will check on the antenna. Okay. It looks like we are ready to go on the high-gain antenna check. An
好的，我们收到，关于
Ci restano 10 secondi di razzo e Cape Cod richiede la temperatura della tua 
R
Ok, Frank. Per la tua ulteriore manovra di sepa
هيا يا 
잠시 
2000 फीट। 2000 फीट। 47 ड
Okay. Ich bin momentan im Minimalmodus, während wir feuern. Danach schalte ich wieder in den Normalmo
Хьюстон, Игл. Вы копируете довольно большие числа для дальности и скорости изменения дальности в - VERB 8
Du war
Dès qu'on aura supprimé le module de service, Joe, je pe
وفي الوقت نفسه، يمكننا رؤية أفريقيا. غ
Das ist di
네, 맞습니다. TR과 제미
Die Ärmel von Eds Anzug und das extra dicke Kleidungsstück an einem meiner Beine werden im Fußraum auf 
ممتاز. نراكم في غراند 
Okay. So that gives us a good platform. Now the will maneuver to the jettison attitude, and the only thing 
휴스턴, 프로그램 초반에 500 경보가 울렸습니다. 하강
没错。另外请注意，沃利·施拉（Wally Schirra）一直在尝试联系您。他的呼号是 Gemini 
यहां एक दिलचस्प खबर है जिसे सुनकर अच्छा लगा। ऐसा लगता है कि मिशिगन के एन आर्बर में ए
Ich weiß, aber ich mache mir 
저 TV 채널 뭐였지? 알았어, 13번
好的。如果我没听错的话
Oh, EECOMM ist zufrieden. Nachdem Sie alles eingerichtet h
알겠습니다. 추진제 균형 유지 측면에서 볼 때, 기동을
وبينما تقوم بذلك، دعنا نضع مفتاح التحكم في الموقف، ثلاثة، 
弗兰克，我的想法和你很相似。月球上这无垠的寂静令人敬畏，也让你更加意识到地球上拥有的一切是多么
로저, 컬럼비아. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. OMNI 찰리에서 당신의 신호를 아주 잘 듣고 있습니다. 트랭퀼리티 기지 대원들은 기지 안으로 무사히 복귀하여 기내 압력을
카메
好的
沃利，
罗杰。双
حسنًا. وبالمناسبة، كان مؤشر LPD على سطح القمر صفرًا، لذا فهو يعود للأسفل. ويبدو أننا سنكون فوق نقطة قريبة من كوكب سي
ठीक है। फ्रेड, अब तुम अच्छे से बात कर रहे हो। चेकलिस्ट में तीन छोटे-मोटे बदलाव हैं। मैं इन्हें अभी तुम्हें बताना चाहता हूँ। इनमें से एक चेकलिस्ट से संबंधित है। अगर तुम इसे उठा लोगे, तो मैं तुम्हें 
S
روجر. يمكن رصدها، لكنها لا تُغير الأمور ب
Okay. Unter Schritt 6, fast ganz unten – tatsächlich sind es drei Zeilen vom Ende von Schritt 6 – gibt es einen Abschnitt, der besagt, dass der Verdampfer des sekundären Kühlmittelkreislaufs zurückgesetzt werden muss, und es sollte ein Hinweis darauf stehen, dass dies 58 Sekunden dauert, wenn man die Taste vor dem Ausschalten der Pumpe in der RE
是的，我做了。我们大概弄到了20磅精心挑选的样品，
Ok. Lascia che ti dia qualche informazione... nel frattempo, per aiutarti con la tensione MAIN A, Jack. Ho acceso l
ह्
मुझे आपकी बात साफ-साफ सुन
حسن
أفهم أنك ما زلت في الداخل، لكن ذراع التحكم اليدوي في الداخل
There's a little noise there, Buzz. Say ag
खैर, मुझे तो नहीं पता कि आप क्या सोच रहे 
Хорошо, теперь мы перейдём к проверке подвеса/дроссельной заслонки, верно? Или вы сказ
11, qui Houston. In riferimento alla tua valutazion
È questo il primo pa
이것은 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 이제 왼쪽 저추력은 제가 제어할
了解しました。ローリング再突入のフォーマットをお送りします。OAMS（大気圏再突入）の燃焼時の∆Vと∆
Oh, das is
Ok. È ancora affermativo. Ti faremo provare dopo aver atteso 5 secondi, e poi da lì scenderemo di pochi passi, dopo aver aperto gli interruttori ASCENT ECA CONTROL sul pannello 16. A quel punto, il cavo ombelicale non è aliment
Всё идёт довольно хорошо. Сейчас у нас 
Bien. Appuyez sur ENTRÉE, puis sur 333, puis de nouveau sur ENTRÉE. Ensuite, nous vous demandons de lire le
Gemini 4, Gem
Rog
Это Friendship Seven на КВ. Моё состояние отличное. Всё идёт по плану. Уровень топлива в контрольной точке 90-100%, кислорода 72-101%, ампер 22. К
Ich verstehe; weiter geht's. Mike, wir würden, wenn mö
Loud and clear. How us
يبدو أن هناك بعض السحب غرب جبال سييرا، شمال شرق بيكرسفيلد قليلاً؛ ويبدو أن العبور إلى صحراء موهافي من بيكرسفيلد صافٍ؛ ثم كلما اتجهت جنوب شرق ذلك المكان، ستجد ب
Это «Дружба Семь». В данный момент, МАРК, подо мной еще видны облака, закат был прекрасен. Он очень быстро стих. На горизонте все еще видна яркая синяя полоса
わ
Вы сказали, что это неприменимо к; я начала записывать, н
ठीक है। अब चलिए सी
انتقلتُ للتو من وضع ما قبل التشغيل إلى وضع اللحاق بالركب. هذا ما أدى إلى إطفاء ضوء الكمبيوتر. لنرَ إن كان سي
माइक, आप जो देख रहे हैं, वह ह्यूस्टन, पश्चिमी गोलार्ध है। ऊपर की ओर उत्तरी ध्रुव है; केंद्र में - केंद्र से थोड़ा नीचे दक्षिण अमेरिका है - और यह केप हॉर्न तक फैला हुआ है। मुझे बाजा कैलिफोर्निया और संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका का दक्षिण-पश्चिमी भाग दिखाई दे रहा है। उत्तर-पूर्व की ओर बादलों का एक बड़ा और लंबा समूह है, जो मैक्सिको
ええ、地球はとても明るいですね。レンズに焼き切れそうなものはありません。カメラはまだ動いているようです。よろしければ、地球のルーメン値を今すぐ
看来得查一下桑伯恩血压计了。接下来是血压监测系统（BPMS）。吉恩，我现在对宇航服的温度非常满意，稳定在65华氏度。虽然穹顶显示的温度稳定在70华
Понял. Прошу оставить это здесь навсег
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。如果你们把机舱气压调到5.4，我们就满意了
Roger hatte es 10 Sekunden lang eingeschalt
और, ह्यूस्टन, मेरा बस एक ही सवाल है कि क्या आप चाहते हैं कि मैं सुई को मैन्युअ
और एक और बात यह है कि हम आपको याद दिलाना चाहेंगे कि यह ब्लोडाउन में होगा और दोनों आर
EECOMM公司表示他们
추가로 말씀드릴 두 가지는 첫째, 귀하의 널 바이어스 뺨을 기준으로 DELTA-VC에 -0.34피트/초
Фред, после завершения работ мы вышлем вам инструкции по отключению питания или изменения в контрольном списке. Одновременно мы хотели бы сообщить вам о состоянии расходных материалов. Сейчас я могу ска
E - noi - Vi daremo i
نسخة، أبولو 11. تبدو جيدة 
Je suis en train de déguster ma soupe, mon premier plat, et je suis censée recevoir une 
Roger, Houston – Ici Houston. Pourriez-vous couper le disjoncteur de l'amplificat
로저, 짐. 지난번 중간 코스 이후 2시간 30분 동안의 트랙 데이터를 바탕으로, 그리고 앞으로의 상황을 예측해 보면, 중간 코스 수정 속도가 초당 1피트 미만일 것으로 예상됩니다. 그리고 이 추세가 계속된다면, 진입 인터페이스까지 2시간 후에는 중간 코스 수정 속도가 초당 2피트가 될 것으로 예상됩니다
Eagle, Columbia
Верно. Это должно вам помочь. Обратите внимание, что защита от перегрузки по току на этой цепи ограничивает доступный ток до 15 ампер. Хотя мы думаем, что сможем многое с этим сделать. И кабель питания будет под напряжением, а напряжение на главной шине можно ко
Oka
لا، لا أعتقد أن هذا صحيح. كان واقي وجهي مفتوحًا، وهو الآن مغلق. لا أظن أنني أشعر بهذا الحر الشديد.
Ho appena fatto un tentativo sul bersaglio 16-A. L'aeroporto di Bassora, si trova proprio sul Golfo Persico. L'ho individuato... ho individuato il Golfo Persico a circa... un angolo di circa 30°... Ho picchiato e poi ho individuato il la
好的。我们正在排
わかりました。私たちが作成した飛行計画によると、皆さんが食事を終え、フレッドが就寝している間、あなたとジャ
Jack, questo è tutto. A meno che tu
好了
Роджер, мы их получили и хотели
Roger. Ich hätte mir keine bessere Behandlung von euch allen dor
एड ने सामान खोलना शुरू किया और जैसे ही हम उस स्थिति में पहुँचे जहाँ बूस्टर के साथ छेड़छाड़ करना संभव नहीं था, मैंने पूरी तरह से उसकी मदद करना शुरू कर दिया - कम से कम सामान पकड़कर उसे सही जगह पर रखना और उसे गायब होने से बचाना। जितनी तेज़ी से हम काम करते, उतना ही हम पीछे होते चले जाते। ऐसा इसलिए नहीं था कि हम चीज़ों को सही जगह पर नहीं रख रहे थे, बल्कि इसमें हमारी उम्मीद से कहीं ज़्यादा समय लग रहा था। जीरो ग्रेविटी में यह सिम्युलेटर की तुलना में ज़्यादा आसान नहीं था, हालाँकि उतना ही आसान था। इसलिए हमने पूरा चक्कर लगाया। जब तक हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे, मैंने मन बना लिया था कि हम वहाँ नहीं पहुँच पाएँगे, लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि थोड़ी देर और कोशिश करते हैं। जब हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे - या वहाँ से निकलने से ठीक पहले - मुझे स्पष्ट हो गया था कि हम दबाव कम करने की प्रक्रिया पूरी नहीं कर पाएँगे। मैंने अगली कक्षा में जाने के लिए स्लिप का अनुरोध किया। फिर... हमने लगभग 20 मिनट तक आराम किया और कॉकपिट में पड़े फालतू सामान को व्यवस्थित करने की कोशिश की। फिर मैंने चेकलिस्ट निकाली और हमने दोबारा विस्तार से चेकलिस्ट देखी ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि जल्दबाजी में हमसे कुछ छूट तो नहीं गया। एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट शुरू किया - कार्नार्वोन के ऊपर हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। हम सब तैयार थे और दबाव कम करने की हरी झंडी का इंतजार कर रहे थे। हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। दबाव कम करने का चक्र पूरा हुआ। कार्नार्वोन से निकलते ही हमें पूर्ण एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट (EVA) के लिए मंजूरी मिल गई। 
لا، إنه بالصوت العادي. سننتقل إلى نسخة احتي
Okay, Charlie. Ich schütte das Wasser
Gemini VI. Wir geben Ihnen grünes Licht für 17-1. Außerdem habe ich ein Update zu Ihren Manövern. Sind Sie bereit, sie zu überne
Roger. Vous avez donc 215 livres d'eau utilisables, soit 2 1/5 l
Okay. That's pericynthian plus 2. / 62871 November Alfa, and stand by one. Okay. We'll pick up with a pitch trim and yaw trim of not applicable; time, minus 00468, plus 00254, plus 00181 173 101 027 November Alfa plus 00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044, down 044, left 4
ठीक है, ये रहा आपका ब्लड प्रेशर। मैंने लगभग 20 घूंट पानी पिया। स्वाद अच
روجر. وضع 
추진체가 또 하나 포착됐습니다. 지금 수평선 바로 
Roger. I'll give you my configuration. I am in auto, retro control mode; gyros are normal; maneuver switch is off; all consumables are in the green; electrical is checking out very well; capsule is tracking well. The moon is perfect reference at this point, it is right on the predicted path as well as Venus, as you probably know f
谢谢
로저. 여기는 모든 게 괜찮아요. 평온하고 기분도 좋아요. 동료들에게
Okay. That's right. That's Jim Lovell. What we thought we'd do today was just show you a little bit about life inside Apollo 8. We've shown you the scenes of the moon, the scenes of the earth, and we thought we'd invite you into our home. It's been our home at least for 4 days as you can see on the instrument panel. We mark off each day on the instrument panel. We're four down, and we're working on the fifth day. Of course, we're all looking forward to the landing on Friday. Down here in the part of the spacecraft that we call the lower equipment bay, we have the President's adviser on physical fitness, Captain Jim Lovell, about to undergo an exercise program that we do every day. You notice that he floats around very freely. He just bumped his head on the optics, used for our navigating. He's working with an exercise device that's designed to keep the muscles in shape. Now another very important function of our spacecraft is the computer, and I thought you might be interested in seeing what we have here, the displays that give us all the information about our burn, about navigating, and about the velocity that we use during entry and retrofire on earth-orbital missions. You can see it's controlled by a , or similar to a typewriter keyboard, and the things that go in and out of that are absolutely miraculous. It's done 
روجر. لا يوجد الكثير من الأحداث في الوقت ال
Верно, Джек. Я собираюсь сделать следующее: мы остановимся, опустив Землю в окно командира, а затем я маневрирую космическим аппаратом так, чтобы освещенная часть Земли оказалась в верхней части окна; то есть, она будет располагаться вдоль оси «плюс-Y» космического аппарата, а верхняя ча
Im Moment ist der Empfang schwach und unleserlich
好的，稍
रॉजर। जब आपने इसे देखा,
جيميني 4، هذه محطة اتصالات هيوستن CAP. لا أستطيع استقبالك. سأبث آخر بندين من خطة الرحلة 15 إلى 11:15. 15 إلى 11:15. هذه محطة اتصالات هي
5
حسنًا. لدينا الآن نقطة حضيض في الفراغ تبلغ 23.6 درجة؛ وزاوية مسار طيران سالبة 6.25 درجة؛ وإذا قررنا تعديلها، فسنحصل على سرعة متوسطة تبلغ حوالي قدمين في الثانية. بالطبع، تتحسن المواد الاستهلاكية باستمرار؛ لدينا ما يكفي من الماء لمدة 163 ساعة، والأكسجين لمدة 230 س
روجر. ولديّ بعض الأمور الأخرى يا مايك. نحتاج إلى إيقاف شحن البطارية "ب" الآن، كما أن الطقس يسوء في نقطة الهبوط المستهدفة بسبب عواصف رعدية متفرقة. لا نريد أن نصطدم بإحداها، لذا سننقل نقطة التصويب إلى الأمام. تصحيح، ستكون إلى الخلف، لهدف على بُعد 1500 ميل بحري، حتى نضمن التحكم في الرفع. الإحداثيات الجديدة هي 13 درجة و19 دقيقة شمالًا، 169 درجة و10 دقائق غربًا. الطقس في تلك المنطقة ممتاز. لدينا عواصف رعدية متفرقة على بُعد 2000 ميل بحري، و8000 ميل بحري، مع رؤية 10 أميال وأمواج بارتفاع 6 أقدام، وطائرة "هورنت" في وضع ممتاز للوصول إلى الموقع الم
Now, you want me to power down the ball, and if you'l
Ora inizio a vedere l'alba nel periscopio. La prima luce nel periscopio durante questa particolare orbita è dovuta al lato notturno. È ovvio che il periscopio non ha alcuna funzione in retroattività sul lato notturno. La prima luce che vedo è proprio ora a un'altezza di circa 100 cm. L'alba sta arrivando piuttosto rapidamente attraverso il periscopio. Ho gli oggetti illuminati che John ha menzionato, e posso crearne alcuni staccandoli. Ho decisamente la sensazione che siano un campo e che le loro dimensioni varino da piccole a luminose. Il periscopio stesso mi sta accecando. Dovrò appoggiarci la mappa, così potrò vedere fuori dal finestrino. Sono in condizioni di retroattività in qualsiasi momento, quindi non ho altro da fare che guardare fuori da questo finest
CONTACT LI
ヒューストン、アポロ8号が姿勢を戻
11, Houston. With a 12-foot c
Okay. Wir empfangen m
Okay. We're right at the point now where, according to the flight plan that we had made up for you, that you would have all finished eating and you and Jack would have the duty while Fred went to sleep. So, essentially, according to the plan we've got, you got up about 3 or 4 hours early. And - The next time that we have that as a rest period for you is at 96 hours, which is 7 hours from now, and an hour before that, say at 95 h
음, 다행이네요. 아마 속도를 그만큼 
Ah, Freedom Seven, hier spricht Cape Cap Com, üb
Le luci della città e 
Okay, want to comment on our food. So far every orange juice bag, every bag that I have put water into tha
Oui,
了解しました。ケープはパイロットの医療データパス1を取得したいと
أع
下一页，大约在[此处应填写具体位置]，您可以恢复正常的飞行计划。我们想补充一点：在[此处应填写具体位置]，添加一个废水排放点。虽然当时实际上并不需要，但我们希望先把排放点设置好，
Roger. I'm glad you are ready to copy number 6. I've got one last comment for Jim before you do so. The - or correction - the we are talking about is the one that he gets after marking. There are two 's, one prior to marking and o
Merci. Nous vous pa
Manovra di sorvolo / 62954, meno 162, più 129 953 578 - questi sono 00953 e più 000578 - meno 02076 000 000 000, non applicabile, più 00202, 02356 022 02280 03 0393 310 013, su 048, destra 35, più 1418, meno 165 05 12904 36160, Sirio, Ri
حسنًا. أعتقد أن المعدات التي ستحتاجها هي عبوتان من هيدروكسيد الليثيوم لوحدة التحكم، ولفة من الشريط الرمادي، وحقيبتان صغيرتان، لأننا سنستخدم الأكياس من تلك الحقيبتين، وبطاقة تذكير واحدة - واحدة من بطاقات التذكير الكرتونية التي ستقصها حوالي ب
جيميني 4، هيوستن. هل أنت مس
分かりました。もうすぐ
Houston
休斯顿。收到。完
حسنًا. الصف الثالث تحت قسم الاتصالات. افتح شاشة العرض، وأغلق الصوت، وافتح جهاز إرسال واستقبال VHF A وB، وأغلق قواطع الدائرة الرئيسية لنطاق S. افتح هوائي نطاق S، وأغلق مشغل الوسائط، وافتح التلفزيون، وافتح جميع القواطع الأخرى تحته، باستثناء مستشعر ثاني أكسيد الكربون، فه
ठीक है। इससे आपको प्लेटफ़ॉर्म-मोड स्टे
Роджер, Хьюстон. Это
Итак, Хьюстон. Луна в основном серая, бесцветная; выглядит как гипс или какой-то сероватый глубокий песок. Мы можем разглядеть довольно много деталей. Море Плодородия здесь выделяется не так хорошо, как на Земле. Между ним и окружающими кратерами нет
रॉजर, मैं तुम्हें पढ़ नहीं पा रहा हूँ। मैं तुम्हें पढ़ नहीं पा रहा हूँ। बहुत ही कमज़ोर। क्या तुम अब सूट कंट्रोल सेटिंग की रिपोर्ट करोगे, और तुम्हें
Ja, ich befand mich in einer Rechtsdrehung und bin jetzt in einer Linksdrehung; und zwar mit einer viel höher
是的，先生，我完全明
حسناً، فهمت. اترك الكمبيوتر في وضع 
सिग्मा सेवन, यह कैल कैप कॉम है। ब्लाइंड में दोहराया जा रहा प्रसारण। केप सलाह देता है कि अपनी घ
Okay. 
一半被云层覆盖，另一半则晴朗无云。戈尔多，你能帮我把这个消息传达给瓜伊马斯的所有士兵吗
ठीक है।
非常に良いですね、エド。非常に良いです
ट्रांस -- एचएफ अब बंद है, और मेरी बात रिकॉर्ड हो 
Okay. 
Okay, Jack. This is Houston. We've got POWER, and you can cycle it for 10 minutes if you s
Aquarius, Housto
好的。在第 4 行：在“加热器”下方，您的四个四路加热器应关闭，打开“显示器”，打开“S 波段天线”，打开“序列摄像机”。在下方，打开“显示器
177 143 000 NA, plus 00197, 47020 551 46818 12 128.3 257 023, up 263, left 17, plus 1195, minus 16500, plus 126 23 35608, the north set, roll 68, pitch 97, yaw 356, no ullage, high speed, 79
लिफ्ट
В грязи. Хорошо, я это понял. По
分かりました。今のあなたのおっしゃることは理解できました。テレビ局の人たちに伝えて、彼らの意見を聞いてみます。先ほどの話と合わせて、彼らはハッセルブラッドでランデブーウィンドウを通して地球を撮影したいと考えていました。赤と青のフィル
It's not time-critical, Fred, but if you have the people awake now, you might go ahead and do it. Incidentally, you probably know this, but the next several hours are going to be pretty quiet from our point of view. We're working on the entry procedures and should be ready to read them up to you in about 8 hours; and between now and then there's not an awful lot going to be going on, so yo
أبولو 8، هيوستن. هل تصدق أن عايدة برج الثور هي الثريا؟ ان
Roger. Nach Abschluss des Brennvorgangs 
Roger, das ist bestätigt. Der Sinkflug verläuft normal und be
目前地面系统运行状况基本正常。温度略高，
Понял. «Пегас» будет на горизонте. Линия поле
Другой авиатор, Макс Конрад, совершающий кругосветное путешествие на своем легком самолете (он провел Рождество в Антарктиде), ждет хорошей погоды, чтобы продолжить свой полет к Южному полюсу. Он надеется объехать весь мир. Он собирается облететь оба полюса, пролетев от Палмера до Берд
حسنًا. هل الصورة مظلمة جدًا يا 
Perth should be coming into view and it should be - oh, what a beautiful yaw check this is, and it's approximately 10 degrees 
了解しました。念のためお知らせしますが、もしあなたが当直を外れていた時に起こった場合、マスターコーションブレーカーはまだ引かれてお
はい、その通りです。これでカードは完了です。残りの更新情報は、58時間のプラットフォームに基づ
Okay. Ich habe eine kleine Ergänzung zur Checkliste für ihn. Diesmal befindet sie sich im Be
Roger, coming with a report on the Pilot. The last meal the Pilot had was the second day, the fourth meal. I've had 9 swallows of water, and I'm feeling great. The Command Pilot, 3 the third day, and the no. 1 meal, he had the defec
रॉजर, ऑरोरा सेवन, अब सब ठीक लग रहा है। लगता 
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Не могли
إن
– – weiter zurück ging es nicht, und weiter nach vorn auch nicht – wirklich nicht. Wissen Sie, es war alles andere als einfach (Geläch
هذا صحيح. يقوم فريقنا هنا بتقييم الوضع الحراري. يبدو أنك ستكون خارج المنطقة لفترة طويلة نوعًا ما. لهذا السبب طلبنا منك إعادة المحاولة بمجرد انتهائك من رصد النجوم الثلاثة
Roger, Fred. J'ai un bloc-notes SEP pour le module de service avec les attitudes. Pas besoin de feuille spéciale; 
좋아 보이네요. 
델타-H는 -2900입니다. 지구가
Yes, when you - when you get off nominal, why you just need scratch paper, d
好的，杰克，明白了。关闭燃料电池 2 中的 REAC 阀断路器。关闭逆变器电源
Снова Близнецы 4. Я вижу такую ​​же изогнутую линию света, как северное сияние, только оно находится ниже нас, и я видел его в другой раз, это бы
Apollo
Je suis en
روجر. ولديّ بعض الأمور الأخرى يا مايك. نحتاج إلى إيقاف شحن البطارية "ب" الآن، كما أن الطقس يسوء في نقطة الهبوط المستهدفة بسبب عواصف رعدية متفرقة. لا نريد أن نصطدم بإحداها، لذا سننقل نقطة التصويب إلى الأمام. تصحيح، ستكون إلى الخلف، لهدف على بُعد 1500 ميل بحري، حتى نضمن التحكم ف
Хорошо, Джим. Мы вам в этом поможем; это тема, которую мы хотели бы обсудить с вами. Мы рассматривали этот вопрос, и наши соображения таковы... Конечно, это ваше решение, но, учитывая все плюсы и минусы, вы точно указали на плюс. Мы проводим проверку целостности люка незадолго до истечения EI минус 1 часа, и если мы её обнаружим, вам будет трудно быстро надеть скафандры. С другой стороны, недостатки ношения скафандров заключаются в том, что они могут значительно замедлить вас, не считая времени на их надевание, и кто-то даже очень обеспокоен тем, что после определённого периода времени в скафандрах вам может стать слишком жарко, и нам, возможно, придётся включать систему вентиляции скафандров, а мы этого делать не хотим, потому что это потребляет довольно много энергии. Следовательно, мы бы рекомендовали вам не надевать костюм, поскольку у нас нет оснований полагать, что проверка на целостность покажет что-либо, кроме незначительного увеличения скорости утечки, а мы, безусловно, можем эт
姿态控制——您打算使用速率指令还
नहीं,
就在他大约在零下 2 点 30 分写的那份又大又
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 방금
अगले संस्करण में टीवी के बारे में और जानकारी मिलेगी। समय में कोई बड़ा बदलाव करने की योजना नहीं है, बस इसे थोड़ा सा आगे बढ़ाना है, शायद टर्मिनेटर
D'acco
Okay. Was wir Ihnen jetzt zeigen können, ein kleiner zusätzlicher Vorteil: Wir haben den Fangtrichter gerade auf Freds Couch im Kommandomodul. Wir haben ihn vorübergehend verstaut, während wir die Aquarius untersuchen. Unter seiner Couch befinden sich die Sonden. Ein ziemlich großes und unhandliches Gerät, und wir machen gleich ein Foto
And, Houston, you, might be interested that out my left-hand window right now, I can observe the entire continent of North America, Alaska, and over the Pole, down to the Yucatan Peninsu
17 f
Apollo 8, nous souhaiterions récupérer une nouvelle copie de votre bande si vous ne l'utilisez pas. En effet, certaines données n'ont pas été entièrement extraites avant la 
D'accord
よし。ジム、僕がやりたいのは、他のレンズを取り出すことだ。4つのレンズがあれば、素晴らしい映画が撮れ
मुझे नहीं पता कि आप लोग वीएचएफ पर मेरी आवाज सुन पा रहे हैं या नहीं, लेकिन 
Roger. Have you got any answer about warming this place up a little bit
…水を入れるだ
नहीं, ऐसा नहीं है। हाँ, ह
ठीक है, वैंस, हम अभी कुछ नहीं कर रहे हैं, बस उत्सुक हैं। हम प्रवेश प्रक्रिया शुर
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11. क्या आप स्टेटस रिप
Rendre les couleurs plus
Ich sehe ein schwarzes Feuer unten in der Wüste. Man kann bis ganz nach unten sehen, wo es herkommt. Ich konnte nicht genau erkennen, was es war, aber es hat eine sehr deutliche Spur auf dem Boden hinterlassen. Ich habe mehrere Geländeaufnahmen mit der S-5 gemacht, als wir die 17 überquerten. Es scheint, als ob Magazin 
Нет, но у меня какая-то странная
ああ、5分
ورقم 13، هيوستن. إذا كان
The Oilers are going to play in the Rice Stadium instead of the Domed Stadiu
Ok. Abbiamo ancora entrambi gli interruttori di 
Ok. I siste
第一餐是在凌
Mein Ziel ist es, aus dem, was wir haben, das Beste zu machen. Wir sind mome
I'd say the color of the - The local surface is very comparable to that we observed from orbit at this Sun angle, about 10 degrees Sun
Wir werden eine zeitverzögerte Wiedergabe des Tonbandes über Carnarvon durchf
Merci, 11. Nous app
Houston, ici Apollo 8. Sachez 
Хорошо, в удобное для вас время мы хотели бы, чтобы вы провели замер температуры в салоне и записали результаты в свой бор
نظام التحكم الإلكت
نريد تأكيدًا آخر، عندما أغلقنا صمام تهوية النفق إلى / DELTA-P، كانت القراءة حوالي 1.7 - 1.75، ثم ارتفعت ببطء إلى حوالي - أوه، أقول أقل بقليل من 
जी हाँ, जैक। मैं तुम्हें फ़ोन करने ही वाला था। चौथे वर्ग के नीचे, मैंने द
Батарея 5, обычная подача - обычная подача, выключение/сброс. Понят
Croiriez-vous que vous avez sous les yeux un ragoût de poulet? Il vous suffit de faire mijoter 90 ml d'eau chaude pendant 5 à 10 minutes. On utilise un petit robinet avec filtre pour éliminer les gaz présents dans l'eau potable. On insère l'extrémité de ce petit tube dans le r
11번, 휴스턴. 이거 망
حسنًا. ما هو ارتفا
巻物をチェックしている間に、この鳥をどのエントリーパターンで
一号站位，比尔。比尔，不行。现在第二次
Okay, Joe. Da wir im Zeitplan voraus sind, kann ich weitermachen und sozusagen früher Feierabend machen, oder soll ich ge
Хьюстон, Аполлон
Джим, вот вам с Фредом на заметку, на случай, если вас об этом еще не проинформиров
Это Friendship Seven, уп
Okay, Wasse
أما الخبر الأبرز في هيوستن اليوم فيتعلق بفريق أستروس. ففي عالم الرياضة، انتفض فريق هيوستن أستروس في الشوط التاسع أمام سينسيناتي ليُلحق الهزيمة بالريدز بنتيجة 7-4. لكن مع بداية الشوط التاسع، بدت الأمور قاتمة، حيث كان الأستروس متأخرين بنتيجة 4-3. ثم مع خروج لاعب واحد، سدد خيسوس ألو ضربة فردية إلى الملعب الأيمن. وسدد جون إدواردز ضربة فردية أخرى إلى اليمين، ثم سدد ساندي فالدسبينو ضربة
Понял. Мы рассчитываем отключить питание примерно через 2,5 часа после начала включения, то есть за 2,5 часа до этого. Это не т
हाँ। फेसप्लेट बंद या
«Дружба
g è una sensazione piacevole, non è vero? 
ठीक है, अब जल्द ही अफ्रीक
Das ist 
ठीक है, फ्रेड। बढ़िया। चरण 6: एंटर करें, साथ ही सभी गेंदें, साथ ही 28300। चरण 7: गतिविधि पर नज़र रखें। चरण 8: CB 11 रेंडेज़वस रडार 2, खोलें। क्या आप मे
Roger. Mighty fine. We'll watch it as you are coming on in and let you
لم يكن هناك الكثير م
حسناً. الأبواب مفتوحة، ويبدو أنها ستبقى مفتوحة دون أي م
Тета, 11,8; диапазон 68,90; общее значение Delta-V равно 232; Delta-VI равно 101,1; точка данных: 05:40. Данные 12,5 Тета; диапазон 63,75; общее значение Delta-V равно 199; Delta-VI равно 84,2. Точка данных 40:... 13,5 Тета; диапазон 61,19; общее значение Delta-V равно 181; Delta-VI равно 74,8. 12:20: Тета равна 13,7; R, 58,63; общее значение Delta-V равно 169; Delta-VI равно 69,5; 40: Тета равна 15,5; диапазон 53,55; общее значение Delta-V ра
Roger. Bei Stern Nummer 40, den Sie gerade anfliegen, sieht der Flugplan nur einen Satz Markierungen vor. Sie haben zwei Sätze angegeben, die Entscheidung liegt bei Ihnen. Einer ist ausreichend. Wir freuen uns über die Daten, falls Sie
У тебя осталось еще 3 
Хорошо. RN, RP, плюс 77, угол тангажа на номинальной высоте 400 футов; поправка, номинальная высота 400 тыс. футов; RET 400 тыс. футов, 22 плюс 02; начало затемнения, 24 плюс 43; конец затемнения, 30 плюс 01; тормозной парашют,
درجة حرارة العاكس 205 درجة مئوية للمراوح و190 درجة
रॉजर, 11. हमने - क्या आप थोड़ा बेह
VOX를 다시 시도해 볼게요. 뭐라
Хорошо. Что мы будем делать через 30 секунд после 
Роджер. Согласен. Кажется, у меня угол наклона немного больше 10 градусов влево. Я выровняю ег
अच्छा, शायद हमें पहले
ठीक है, सर्किट ब्रेकर पैनल 11 अपडेट डेटा लिंक, बंद करें; प्राथमिक पावर एम्पलीफायर, पैनल 16, बंद करें; वॉयस फ़ंक्शन को वॉयस पर सेट करें; रेंज - रेंजिंग फ़ंक्शन को रेंजिंग पर सेट करें; टीएम बिट दर, हा
Stand by, Frank. We're talking
请再说
カントン、シグマ・セブンです。聞こえました。現在、フライ・バイ・ワイヤで低空飛行中です。機首を下げ
了解しました。星02のところが2セット印刷されているのですが、これを1セットにしたいと思います。それから、
Расстояние от дна до кормовой перегородки командного модуля составляет примерно 16-20 футов. Это совсем не дезориентирует, но очень интересно предста
روجر، فهمت. تريد الخيار 1 - P52،
01 06 10
네, 언제든
Columbia, qui Houston. Vorremmo che attivassi le ventole del serbatoio di idrogeno CRYO numero 1, e che l'orario di ques
罗杰，我们快到跑道入口了。我
Температура внутри купола скафандра сост
Sapete che nel nostro particolare veicolo spaziale, sul pannello 16 dei sistemi di riscaldamento A e B, l'interruttore del riscaldamento QUAD 1 è stato inserito e sigillato e, se mai venisse estratto, è improbabile che saremo mai in grado
ヒューストン、廃棄物タンクをどこに捨てた
Okay. Das ist b
罗杰，迈克。看来如果我们提前抛弃货物并给你一个新的载荷，就需要改变飞行姿态，但由于航道已经关闭，我们无法这样做，而且它会一直干扰我们，导致我们失去通讯。我们计划大约10分钟后分离。我们正在查看航迹，
Cette zone située juste à l'ouest de la Mer des C
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन, यह 
네, 그렇습니다. 자세: 롤 0도, 요 2도 우측, 피치 -33도. 모든 수치가 0을 나타내고 있습니다. 현재 작동 중입니다. 시계는 여전히 복귀 시간으로 설정되어 있으며, 역행 시간은 04 + 32 + 28입니다. 버뮤다에서 역행 시간 정보는 정확합니다. 객실 압력은 5.7로 안정적으로 유지되고 있습니다. 객실 온도는 90도입니다. 상대 습도는 30%입니다. 냉매량은 68%입니다. 우주복 내부 온도는 65도입니다. 우주복 압력은 5.8을 나타내고 있습니다. 우주복 증기 온도는 60도입니다. 매우 편안합니다. 하지만 아직 출력을 낮추고 싶지 않습니다. 1차 산소는 78%, 2차 산소는 102%입니다. 메인 버스는 24입니다. 1번 버스는 
A che ora è quel Texas
Roger, 11. Si vous sor
11, ह्यूस्टन। हमें डाउनलोड में समस्या आ 
엔진 정지 버튼이 초기화되었
Molto b
Nein, mir gefällt die zukunftsorientierte Einstellung viel bess
11, qui è Houston. Readha
Ricevuto, Jim. Da qui la situazione sembra davvero buona. Abbiamo individuato l'area bersaglio e definito le procedure per far arrivare le forze di r
Roger. Die Hornet befindet sich in sicherer Entfernung vom Zielpunkt, um nicht getroffen zu werden. Der Rettungshubschrauber 1 ist ebenfalls vor Ort und in Position. Die C-130-Transportflugzeuge Hawaii
로저. 40 2711 398 033, 하강 043, 좌회전 23, 플러스 0832 마이너스 16500 12956 36208; 북쪽 별자리는 시리우스와 리겔입니다. 롤, 피치, 요는 129 155 010의 동일한 각도를 유지합니다. 여유 공간은 20
जी हां,
Хорошо, звучит непло
Il semblerait que le réglage automatique soit tel qu
Shoot! I was afraid to turn it. I was sure 
알겠습니다. 아폴로 8호, 
좋
了解。了解。マイク0.7と8.0。ただ一つ問題なのは、私にとって観測に最適な道具は六分儀で、六分儀を回すなら同時に手を
Bien reçu. Un instant. Notre seule préoccupation, 11, concerne le contenu du sac de la tr
Roger. Continues CB BAT A, POWER ENTRY/ POSTLANDING, open; INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B, open; and then you reverse the steps that you had fo
I'll tell you, boy. It poses a 
قواطع الدائرة - الميل 1، الميل 2، الانحراف 1، الانحراف 2، مفتو
这是友谊七号。自动反推装置已关闭。模式选择器正常，速率指令和陀螺仪均正常。除手动控制外，所有“T”型手柄均已按下，手动控制手柄也已按下。我目前正在手动控制。着陆袋开关已关闭。除此以外，序列面板一切正
And, Aquarius, just to get you thinking in that direction, we've run a fairly thorough analysis, and we've found out that it's going to be cheaper to keep the and the up and turn 
We're stopping 3 feet per se
J
13，休斯顿
알았어, 짐.
あまり多く
Ich schätze, sie sind... zumindest so gut wie d
حسنًا. التالي هو: "لوحة قاطع الدائرة 16، مستشعر إشار
알겠습니다. 배터리 찰리, 전압은 약 
Roger, 11. Il problema iniziale, all'avvio, è stato che non siamo riusciti a caricare l'assetto iniziale desiderato; quindi abbiamo cercato di riportarlo al vecchio 
비행은 
Хорошо. Хорошо
好的。我们先来设置指挥官的软管配置，使其与LMP的软管配置相同。然后我会拿到
キャビン圧力リリーフバルブ。キャビン圧力リリーフバルブが大きな「シュー！」という音と
Захожу в тест 5: снова идеально. Хорошо. Теперь перехожу к на
了解しました。緯度 -1 から 06269 を引いた値が緯度です。経
Bene. Questa è la
Sì, 
لنجعلها 80 كيلومتراً، نظراً لوجود بعض الجوانب الدول
Exactement, CAP COM, c'est très facile de manœuvrer avec le canon. Mon seul problème, c'est que je n'ai plus assez de carburant. Je suis à court de carburant maintenant et j'ai réussi à contourner l'avant du vaisseau, puis l'arrière, et à me hisser jusqu'au sommet de l'adaptateur. Je su
Okay, es ist in den Orientierungsmodus gewechselt. Die Warnleuchte für den Kraftstoffstand leuchtet im Auto
Bene. E le temperature di controllo della reazione sono 65 in
Vogliamo DISPLAY, aperto; ANTENNA BANDA S, chiusa - per evitare un ALLARME MASTER, TELECAMERA - SEQUENZA TELECAMERA, aperta; E sotto, vogliamo DISPLAY, aperto; TENSIONE BUS CC, chiuso; INVERTER 2, aperto; ECA DI SALITA, chiuso; CONTROLLO ECA DI SALITA, aperto; ECA DI DISCESA, chiuso; CONTROLLO ECA DI DISCESA, chiuso; 
Гас, насчет этого — чт
바위들이 
Bill is looking there n
Roger. On devrait être de retour sur le plan de vol d'ici l
,. Be advised I sent TX twice. I've had spacecraft reject. I'll 
Gemini 4, j'ai raté la dernière transmission, mais vous devriez déployer votre parachute de fr
Apollo 11, Apol
قوليها مرة أخرى من فضلك يا ووميرا، ل
Now all the systems are working very well. I'd like to give you a rundown on the control systems. My fly-by-wire is excellent. Manual was slightly sluggish but
他们是怎么找到一个上夜班的老
Tranquil
आपके 150 वोल्ट क
रॉजर। ऑक्सीजन हीटर को ऑटो मोड पर रखें, या आप उन्हें चालू स्थिति में देख सकते हैं, और ऑक्सीजन पंखों को मैन्युअल रू
好的。月亮刚刚
Je vais quitter COM dans un
Верно. Они там всегд
好的，迈克，事情是这样的——你知道，你当时坐在那里监控，在步骤 7，你进入了 NOUN 01，输入了地址，然后是 INFORMATION INFORMATION；在你最后一次按下回车键（35400 ENTER）之后，它就把你带回了步骤 16。然后当你按下回车键时，你实际上是在向实际的 CDU 输入信息；当你把这两个条目输入到寄存器 1 和 2 时，实际的 CDU 发生了瞬间变化，它查看了变化，看到了它认为它接收到的信息。我的天哪，我得到了每秒 600 度的速率。然后它启动了喷气发动机来
我的靴子原本的蓝色完全消失了，现在变成了这种***颜色，除了灰可可色之外，我不知
Conferma. Sotto "PRESS", passaggio 1, riga 1, cancella. Riga 4, "DESCENT HELIUM REG 1, talkback barber pole". Sotto passaggio 2, cancella; passaggio 3, cancella; "DEPLOYMENT DEL CARRELLO DI ATTERRAGG
La Columbia
حسنًا. الآن
Das stimmt, Jim. Das ist die Version, die wir dir gestern Abend nach dem großen Brennvorgang gegeben haben, und wir verwenden sie in der von uns modifizierten Version. Wir haben das im Simulator getestet, und natürlich gab es keine Probleme mit dem Wasserschwappen oder Ähnlichem, aber es schien recht gut zu funktionieren, indem wir die Raten mithilfe der Nick- und Rollbewegungen auf Null setzten und die Gierbewegung vom ACS
了解。こちらに向かっています。30、SPS/G&N: 36691; マイナス 061、プラス 067 135 23 4149;、プラス 32020、プラス 06713、マイナス 02773 181 054 013;、HA は NA、プラス 00230 32833 228、DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355。次の3行は NA。プラス 1103、マイナス - マイ
단안경으로 안정적인 시야를 확보하는 가장 좋은 방법은 단안경을 안정적으로 잡고 눈앞에 위치했을 때 접히도록 한 다음, 
Ok. Non abbiamo visto la luce DCS. Non siamo ancora nella pos
حسنًا يا هيوستن؛ 13. في إجابة السؤال 1، حدثت التغييرا
Roger. 
Roger. Nous 
Хорошо. Я поворачиваюсь вправо. Извините, что ввел ва
Apollo 8, Houston. Controllo ra
Af
Okay, ich versuche es mit dem Teleskop; und wenn ich es damit nicht sehe, dann versuch
Роджер. Понятно,
Ja. Das sind Buzz' zwei Sternenkarten, die er gerade als Sonnenschutz über dem 
Джек, я не уверен навскидку, каков угловой р
إذا استطعتُ تنظيف بعض طعام بيل هنا وإبعاده - يُطلق على هذه المنطقة اسم حجرة المعدات السفل
ठीक है। मुझे ठीक से पता नहीं है कि वेंटिंग 
收到。明白了。我们很快就会完成过滤器更换，吹扫管路加热器已开启，氧气和氢气吹扫即将开始，148小时后将开始对A电池充电，直到您另行通知。150小时后，废水排放至10%。我
Okay. Real fine th
Apollo 8, qui 
罗杰。45-1 101。2+08。12 37 50。5+36。10+33。46-1 114。2+25 14 12 47。4+05。9+33。47-1 前后推进器。08 和 120。0+14 和 2+30。15 46 36。3+17。8+37。48-1 前后推进器。24 和 120。0+40 和 230，修正 2+30。17 20 19。2+42。8+43。49-4 111。2+21。20 06 48。4+11。9+46。 44 BRAVO 前后推进器点火 14 和 120。0+24 和 2+30。11 55 47。11+10... 5 120。2+30。13 29 13。11+42。46 BRAVO 94。1。15 08 39。11+30。47 BRAVO 85。1+48。16 42 35。10+36。
CABIN G
알겠습니다. 추진제 잔량은 
- - e completa i passaggi 2, 3 e 4 dell'attivazione 28. Dov
We'd like to hold off on the and get some more infor
روجر. نحن ننظر إلى شيء غريب نوعًا ما. لقد انحرفنا بالفعل إلى 70 درجة في الميل، ونتساءل عما إذا كان لديكم أي فتحات تهوية أو أي شيء 
Okay, Jack. Du kannst d
Jim, une fois que tu auras fini de déplacer ton matériel et que ce se
На некоторых из этих снимков кажется, что затвор на Hasselblad з
ح
जेमिनी 4, आरकेवी कैप
Wir befinden uns in einer Entfernung von etwa 20.500 Meilen vom Mond. Wie pass
Pour l'instant, la correction de trajectoire à mi-parcours est nulle; et dans environ une heu
收到，确认无误。下降速度正常，为每秒 40 
Водолей, Хьюстон. Нам нужно включить переменный ток, чтобы вы могли измерить показания. Замкните автоматическ
Roger. I'm supposed to adjust the oxygen flow in this thing to six tenths of a pound per hour, but being as how this trans
We don't think so, Bill.
इससे यह दो-दसवें हिस्से तक पहुँच
Mi riprendo. Non volevo davvero dire questo. Le cuffie leggere... quello che volevo dire in realtà era: le cuffie leggere
Okay. For the burn there will be go to GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, ATTITUDE CONTROL switches will be ROLL PULSE, PITCH PULSE, YAW MODE CONTROL. We'll use control for pitch and roll. ENGINE GIMBAL will be OFF; we'll be using 10-per
13번, 휴스
हमें दो कोर ट्यूब, सौर पवन और चट्टानों से भरा एक बड़ा नमूना बैग मिला, जिसमें से लगभग आधा हिस्सा मैंने उस क्षेत्र से
हम उन हिस्सों को मुश्किल से ही देख पा रहे ह
了解しました。コピーする準備ができたら、いくつか情報を用意し
D'accord. J'ai une question. Ce contrôle indique que nous somm
आपके पहले स्टार के बारे में हमारे पास कुछ नतीजे 
Роджер. Да, я приезжал. Он приезжал примерно на две-три коробки передач, и на это
好的，水瓶座。接下来我们要这样做。我们希望你将X轴指向北方或南方。这就是正X轴。我们认为将正X轴指向南方会更合适。请在开启电源的情况下进行操作。之后，我们建议关闭电源以节省一些电量。但是，这意味着我们将无法使用，并且必须使用手控器
分かりました。電源5、緊急停止です。項目1の1行目、「およびVHF-A」を消します。2行目は「SIMPLEX動作」です。3行目、2番目のプライムであるPOWER AMPを「OFF」に置き換えます。その行の最後の単語「OFF」を「PCM」に置き換えます。4行目は問題ありません。5行目は、行全体を消します。照明はまだフラッドが必要ないので、そのままにしておきます。屋外照明もオフです。2行目
좋아요. 82에서 1
Ich bin in 
D'accord, Vance. Fred vient de me dire qu'il l'a mis là, et nous vérifions à nouveau le s
Roger. Könnten Sie bitte Ihren Telemetrie-Schalter auf BLOCK stel
Roger Houston, Gemini 4. Read you loud an
好的。我们刚才似乎锁定了目标——大概一分
Das sieht echt gut 
귀하의 관측소 서쪽에 소용돌이치는 구름들이 많이 보입니다. 현재 촬영한 사진은 2, 3, 4, 5
Roger. Frank, pensez-vous pouvoir réaliser cette combustion radiale? Nous aimerions en augmenter l'intensité si vous la réalisez dans une 
Roger. Mike, quando stavi giocando con il qualche tempo fa e abbiamo ridotto la deadband, abbi
D'accord. Je vais faire de mon mieux. J'ai une seule référence d'attitude: je vais 
أبولو 8، بقي 10 ثوانٍ. انطلقوا بك
हेलो, गुआयमास कॉम टेक। ऑरोरा सेवन। आवाज़ साफ़ आ रही है। मैं
روجر، مايك. مرحلة TIG 103 40 0000، لأقل من 10، 10
さて、ここで一つ理解できなかった点があります。MDC 5のAでAC INVERTER、AC BUS 1、RESET、そしてセンターに切り替え、MDC 3に戻ってTELEMETRYをUP、COMMAND RESET、OF
我们又一次看到了助推器。它看起来几乎与我们水平，就在
Хорошо. Одна из первых задач, которую мы хотим выполнить, — зарядить батарею, чтобы обеспечить её питание, и у нас уже разработаны соответствующие процедуры. Что касается входа в атмосферу, мы планируем последний промежуточный этап за 5 часов до точки входа, если это потребуется. Затем мы хотели бы сбросить служебный модуль примерно за 4 с половиной часа до точки входа и потратить следующие 3–3,5 часа на фотографирование, запуск системы управления G&N командного модуля, укладку оборудования и другие мелочи. Мы будем держать его до часа до точки входа, а затем сбросим. Эти процедуры будут запущены в интегрированном режиме в CMS и LMS завтра утром, и, надеюсь, позже в течение дня мы повторим
आह! मुझ
D'accord. On devrait être de ret
أقول، ما الذي تريد
, Cape. Nos relevés au sol confirme
1分間に何回サ
Okay. Vuoi la 
로저.
We just started up the platform, it will take it about 30 minutes to come 
У вас 
Che
さ
Okay, und du machst das wirklich gut. Es ist eine Wohltat, dass es hier nicht so laut ist. Lass mich dir erklären, was ich vorhabe, Jim. Wie gesagt, wir werden dir jetzt keine detaillierten Anweisungen geben. Wir werden dir aber in Kürze Anweisungen geben, die wir dir in folgender Form zukommen lassen: Zuerst erstellen wir eine Art Zeitleiste, eine Art Flugplan, mit den Zeiten aller wichtigen Ereignisse und allen Konfigurationen, Schaltereinstellungen usw., die speziell für unsere Konfiguration sind und daher nicht in der Checkliste stehen. Das gilt beispielsweise für
Sounds like you
Okay, 11. Ich habe hier ein paar Kleinigkeiten: ein aktualisiertes Flugplan-Update und einige Info
Ok, Jack. Vediamo se ci sono riuscito. Quello che facciamo è puntare la sonda verso la Terra come abbiamo fatto per la rotta intermedia, e tracciamo un'allineamento dell'asse del corpo s
Roger. Das hatten wir erwartet. Deshalb haben wir Sie gebeten, den Ventilator einzusch
わかりました、ジャック。これを読んで、いくつかコメントを加えて、少し話し合いましょう。これは の後、いつか行う予定です。49時間後の再配置後、時間が許せば、クルーに にいる間に、彗星を写真撮影できるロール角があるかどうか調査してもらいます。もしあれば、 で再開する前に、写真撮影
ओह, हाँ - मुझे आपका हाई गेन दिख रहा है; आपकी ट्रैकिंग लाइट - पूरा वाहन दिख रहा है। मैं देख रहा हूँ कि आप मेरी तरफ़ इशारा कर रहे हैं। अब, आप थोड़ा सा मुड़ रहे हैं - बह
Ora ho sia beccheggio che imbardata, ovvero beccheggio e rollio che vanno verso i valori designati, ora superando i 23 gradi di beccheggio e sto andando oltre i 321 gradi di rollio. E sto lasciando andare quella direzione e quando arrivo a 90 gradi di beccheggio e zero di rollio, vado in AUTO e smorzo i rat
C'est exact, Fred. On a longuement débattu de cette question et on a décidé de choisir cette
Roger. We got that
Fred, nous avons suffisamment d'informations; nous recommandons à Jack de retirer le TM et de le remettre hors tension en suivant sa procédure de déconnexion. Prévenez-no
ちょうど今、3時34分です。暗闇に突入しつつあります。太陽光は宇宙船の先端を、ほぼ前方に向けて照らしています。正確には、前方か
了解しました、コロンビアさん
또 한 가지 살펴볼 게 있는데요. 위층 분들을 귀찮게 하고 싶진 않지만, 지휘실에 있는 배수 호스가 거기에 연결되는지 확인해 볼 수 있을까요? 만약 연결된다면 나중에라도 지휘실의 물을 거기에 연결해서 계속 옮
わかりました、ジム。その件については、私たちがあなたに提案したいと思っていたテーマです。私たちはそ
And you are GO for. Huntsville reports that you have a 6-second propellant pad which is 3 seconds more than a 3-sigma case; so you're good on consumables. The is 
Mann, das ist ja wir
Houston, a queste angolaz
D'accord, je m'en occupe. J'ai aussi une question à vous poser. Dans 
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。我们随时准备让你们开始排放废水。请问能否汇报一下宇航
当初は、別の回避操作があったため、予定通りの観測を直ちに開始することができませんでした。この操作によって、その領域に膨大な量の疑似星が発生し、光学系の較正が事実上不
Roger. 
ठीक है, जो। हम इसे हिलते हुए देख सकते हैं। हालांकि, इसमें से बह
I giroscopi sono ingabbiati e
ठीक है, जैसा कि आप जानते हैं, मैं आपसे काफी दक्षिण में 
روجر، تشارلي. أودّ إطلاعكما على آخر مستجدات عملية الكلورة. في الحجرة B4، لدينا 8 جيوب لأمبولات الكلور والمحلول المنظم، منها - دعني أصحح ذلك. لد
حسنًا. يبدو أ
Sembra che ci siano diversi strati. Uno strato di cirri molto alto... un po' meno cirri... scatta qualche foto di una serie di nuvole. S
弗雷德，休斯顿已经清楚地
Hallo, 11. Houston. Die Goldstone-TV-Abteilung sagte, dass bei einer scharfen vertikalen Linie im Bild, wenn die horizontalen Streifen darüber verlaufen, das Bild leicht verzerrt wirkt. Genau wie bei Ap
信号強度の表示から判断すると、高利得アンテナではサイドローブに閉じ込められている可能性があります。15秒ほど広帯域に切り替えてから、
Роджер, Нил и Базз. Давайте продолжим доставать магаз
जी हाँ। आपको याद होगा कि मैंने शुरुआत में उस तरफ से काम करना शु
Mann, das Zeug verteilt sich ja überall, nicht wahr? Viellei
C'est affirmat
ठीक है, ज़रा रुकिए। मैं ये पेंसिल रख देता हूँ। मैं चिंपैंजी मोड में हूँ। कैप्सूल बहुत बढ़िया उड़ रहा है। सभी थ्रस्टर ठीक से काम कर रहे हैं। जायरो स्विच सामान्य है। मैन्यूवर स्विच बंद है। सभी स
حسنًا. في الدائرة 275، تم إغلاق قواطع الدائرة الرئيسي
And if you can find the, then by all means, track i
Und in Houston, es sah so aus, als hätten wir damals einen Ka
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон
Non. Je comptais l'attraper dès sa sortie pour saisir l'effet étrange d'un côté au soleil et de l'autre dans la nuit. Je vais commencer à l'allumer maintenant, à 19 heures, e
سأوقف وقت الفعالية، 
Okay. Ich kann bestätigen, dass alle Heizungen ausgeschaltet sind. Jack, ich muss die
Pour ceux qui n'ont pas lu la plaque, voici celle qui se trouve sur le train d'atterrissage avant. On y voit deux hémisphères, c
Fred ora sta guardando attraverso il nostro dispositivo ottico. È uno strumento che serve ad a
सूरज की रोशनी पड़ने पर सतह पा
로저. 공보실의 속보입니다. 아폴로 11호는 여전히 전 세계 뉴스의 중심을 차지하고 있습니다. 중국, 북한, 북베트남, 알바니아 단 네 나라만
S
Bene, state appena iniziando a superare il limite. Riesco a vedere parti dell'America Centrale, e sembra che lì sia abbastanza limpido. Le isole dei Caraibi stanno iniziando 
13, we recommend that you e
Okay, Buzz, sind wir bereit, die Kamera herunterzuhol
네. 저 두 사람을 정말 주의 깊게 보셔야 해요. 참, 언제든 원하시면 비행 
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات
Хорошо, Хьюстон. У нас только что сработала главная сигнализация и загорелся индикатор. Я так понимаю, что причиной стало парциальное давле
हेलो, कैनरी कॉम टेक। मैं हाई-फायर पर हूं; आप मुझे कैसे सुन पा रहे हैं? आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ सुनाई दे 
Roger, Houston. Ausweichmanöver G&N: 63481, plus 095, minus 020 
حسناً. فهمت. كيف تبدو درجة 
对于那些还没看过铭牌的人，我们来读一下这块位于飞机前起落架上的铭牌。首先是两个半球，分别代表地球的南北半球。下方写着：“公元1969年7月，来自地球的人类首次踏上月球。我
Esatto. Ora, ho d
Это
Et, Tranquility, H
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはザンジ
حسناً. انتظر. هل 
روجر، فرانك. يمكنكما مساعدتنا إذا شرحتما موقعكما بالنسبة للمُ
حسنًا. ما زلنا نقوم ببعض 
하와이, 제미니 4호 읽어보셨나
माइक, NAV के दर्शनों के बारे में आपका नज़रिया दिलचस्प है: न्यूनतम आवेग नियंत्रक के साथ घर वापसी में पैंतरेबाज़ी करना, बाहर जाने की तुलना में कहीं अधिक कठिन है, क्योंकि अब हमारे पास ईंधन की कमी है।
皆に、私は全く大丈夫だと伝えてく
Okay. I was going to say that next. Page 3, we'll just scratch item 1. And item 2, I've already got 
スーツの
All amps PRIMAR
已
لا، ولا أنا أيضاً أستطيع. بالتأكيد لد
アポロ8
ダメです。必要
巴兹，我这里显示电压是39.5伏；这是电池检查的提示——墙上的指示很清晰。好的，尼尔，现在是
よし、バズ。フライバイが目的だ。SPS/G&N：62815、プラス097、マイナス020 070 54 5944、マイナス00028、
540 英尺，35 分
Yes, why don't we just put 
أظن أنه ليس لدينا خيار آخر. حسنًا. سنجرب نظام ACME، وإذا نجح، فسننت
هيوستن، أبولو 8. تأكد من أن رقم نجم محاذاة المحور ورقم SPA هو نفس الرقم تم
This is pretty
わかりました。あなたの動作を観察してきましたが、ここには対応に必要なデータが揃っていると思います。もう少し作業を進めて、おそらく1～2回のREVで
Canary CAP COM。我们没有别的了。我们会随时为
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к 2000 году, но лидеры демократов ответили, что приоритет должен быть отдан потребностям на Земле. Агню, высокопоставленный правительственный чиновник, присутствовавший на запуске «Аполлона-11» в среду, по-видимому, говорил от своего имени, а не обязательно от имени администрации Никсона, когда сказал: «На мой взгляд, мы должны отправить человека на Марс к концу этого столетия». Ларедо, Техас, AP: Иммиграционные власти Нуэво-Ларедо объявили в среду, что хиппи будут отказывать во въезде в Мексику по туристическим картам, если они не примут ванну и не подстригутся. Уберто Касарас, начальник мексиканской иммиграционной службы в Нуэво-Ларедо, заявил, что власти Мехико, Акапулько и других популярных туристических мест
しばらくした
Houston, il est très intéressant de noter que lorsque je donne un coup de pied (ici, sans atmosphère, et avec cette gravité), les particules semblent partir, et la plupart
ATMは大
Quello che potrebbe essere successo è che Jim potrebbe aver aperto la valvola di controllo dell'acqu
로저. 맞습니다. 현장 상황은 여
هل تق
자, 잭. 방금 제가 알려드린 백아웃 관련 내용만 순서가 중요합니다. 이제부터는 절차 시작 단계로 돌
さあ、始めましょう。アポロ11号の飛行への関心は依然として高い水準にありますが、ヒューストン地域では散水規制の緩和が大きな関心事となっています。ルイ・ウ
Stand by; guess we've got 85-f
Roger. Ich werde die Einst
तो फिर क्यों न हम अभी से शुरू 
Roger. Well, they were with you in spirit anyway, at least
दुर्भाग्यवश, वे आंकड़े यहाँ दर्ज नहीं हो पाए। अगर आप फ्रेड हाइज़ के चार्ट को देखेंगे, तो उसमें 11 बजे की स्थिति पर एक आंकड़ा है जो शोर स्तर दर्शाता है। मुझे वोल्टेज याद नह
双子座八号，这里是休斯顿。请
حسنًا. يمكن
We haven't been able to do anything with D-9 that was when we could record any data. We are going to... We... For S-6 we need one long pass over the United States to take a series of 35 pictures across the southwestern 
好的。你收到了
I don
Хорошо. Если вы найдете свой контрольный список для входа на странице E6 1, я обновлю там ваши данные по времени полета в ретроспективе для разных высот. 
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। जब यह चलना शुरू हुआ, तो यह यॉ मोड में चला जाता था और इससे बाकी अक्ष भी बिगड़ जाते थे। यह कुछ देर तक ऐसा ही करता रहा, धीरे-धीरे दाईं ओर झुकता गया और लगभग 20° तक बिगड़ने तक कोई सुधार नहीं हुआ। फिर यह तेज़ी से वापस आता और 20° दाईं ओर के झुकाव से खुद को ठीक करता, फिर 
मुझे लोड होने का समय बता
Deine Temperaturwerte sehen gut a
Bien reçu. Je suis aux commandes. J'aimerais également savoir à quelle heur
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 아프리카에서 몰려오는 구름이 많았는데, 지금은 상당히 옅어졌습니다. 바다는 확실히 보이지는 않지만, 구름에 반사되는 달빛이 많이 비
Pilote de Gemini VI, tension artérielle valide. Tension artérielle du commanda
あなたはハイゲイン
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Все эксперты сейчас изучают ваши данные. Предварительные результаты очень хорошие, заключительные слова мы сообщим 
نعم. يجب أن يكون وضعك 
알겠습니다. 돔 온도는 이미 확인했어요. 82도까지 올라갔다가 81도로 낮췄습니다. 잠수복 흡입구 온도는 80도까지 올라갔다가 78도로 낮췄고요. 잠수복 설정은 거의 7.5 정도로 맞췄습니다. 이제 8번으로 설정할 거
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Еще пара минут, и мы будем готовы к проверке связи. И, к вашему сведению, похоже, что уровень сигнала на 3-4 дБ выше, чем ожидалось, в широком диапазоне, в
केप की सलाह है कि मैं आपको 
현재 저는 실질적으로 세 축을 후방 자세로 관측하고 있습니다. 레티클을 통해 관측되는 요(yaw)는 보통 변화율로 나타나는데, 저는 지금 요(yaw) 자세 변화를 확인하려고 합니다. 그런데 구름 하나만 봐도 자세를 바로 참조할 수 있다는 것을 알게 되었습니다. 캡슐 내부에서 실제로 관측하는 것보다 훨씬 정확한 것 같습
ROT CONTROL POWER, number 2 - ROT CONTROL POWER, N
शून्य गुरुत्वाकर्षण का उपयोग करके आप उन कई चीजों को प्रदर्शित कर सकते हैं जो हम सभी ने स्कूल में सीखी हैं। मैं संक्षेप में यह दिखाना चाहूंगा कि जाइरोस्कोप की क्रिया को समझाना कितना आसान है। यदि मैं इस डिब्बे को घुमाता हूं, तो गति के समीकरणों के अनुसार, एक बार जब इसे घुमाना शुरू किया जाता है और इसका घूर्णन अक्ष इस दिशा में होता है, तो यदि हम इस पर एक विशेष बल लगाते हैं, और मैं ऐसा घुमाते समय अपन
負けだ。早くやる唯一の利点は、パワーダウンできるかどうかだ。早くやる唯一の利点
Nein, ich denke, 
D'accord. Bien reçu, Jim. Je voudrais vérifier deux ou trois choses que je ne suis pas sûre d'avoir bien entendues. La première, c'ét
ठ
और, कोलंबिया, अगर आपको ठीक लगे तो, हम चाहेंगे कि आप तब तक जागते रहें जब तक हमें हाई गेन एंटीना पर एक सफल पुनः संपर्क स्थापित न हो जाए। और
好了，你那里有问题。把……
80 war e
分かりました。LOSまであと1分ちょっとです。特にお伝えすることはありません。待機してカウントを
روجر، هذه سفينة الصداقة السابعة. أرى رأس الرجاء الصالح من هنا. يبدو المن
Это Хьюстон. Подтверж
When
D'accord, Jim. Avec ces informations, nous allons procéder à la mise hors 
ठीक है, यह कुछ हद तक काम कर रहा है; बस दिक्कत यह है कि जब मैं इसे लेता हूं तो 
ठीक है, तो
好的，弗雷德。首先，关于准备工作，我们建议从第 24 页的应急检查清单开始，当然，我们也欢迎您提出任何意见。第二点：当您处于点火姿态时，您应该看到太阳位于顶部。当您的光标设置为零时，它会分割光标。但需要注意的是，由于它对横滚和偏航非常敏感，因此很容易滑出点火状态。要知道，点火状态位于第二档，而点火对点火时间和姿态非常不敏感。换句话说，如有必要，如果出现任何问题，我们都可以滑出点火状态，而且姿态也不是特
ادعموا
Хорошо. Понял. Нам нужно отверстие диаметром 1
खैर, जिस एक बड़े गड्ढे के ऊपर से हम गुजरे, उसके अलावा हमारे इलाके में शायद ही कोई और गड्ढा था। EASEP लगाने के बाद मैं टहलने के लिए वापस आया, और जब बज़ दस्तावेजी नमूनों को खोलना शुरू कर रहा था - मैं पीछे एक गड्ढे की ओर गया जो शायद 70 या 80 फीट व्यास और 15 या 20 फीट गहरा था, और उसकी कुछ तस्वीरें लीं। उसके तल में काफी बड़े आकार के पत्थर थे, जो सतह पर मौजूद किसी भी पत्थर से काफी बड़े थे, लेकिन वहाँ - जाहिर तौर पर, हम लगभग 15 फीट की गहराई पर रेगोलिथ के नीचे नहीं पहुँचे थे। हम मूल रूप से कोई बेडरॉक नहीं दिखा रहे थे, कम से कम उस गहराई पर गड्ढे की दीवारों म
Negative. I got you 
J'ai dit à Ken hier soir, lors de la séparation, que lorsque nous nous sommes séparés
Roger. Segue un breve conteggio: 1 2 3 4 5 5 4 3 2 1. Qui è Astro. Sigma Seven. Sono molto felic
О, просто... 
Pour reprendre mon compte-rendu concernant le propulseur, au début du vol. Après notre entrée dans l'obscurité, à environ 1200 pieds (365 mètres) de distance, j'ai tenté de maintenir ma position, mais le seul repère dont je disposais pour évaluer la distance qui me séparait du propulseur était l'écart entre les feux clignotants. De façon intermittente – et non pas intermittente, mais continue – je voyais un feu, puis deux, puis un seul, et parfois il s'écoulait un long moment avant que je n'en voie deux à nouveau, indiquant que le propulseur tournait constamment. Je n'avais aucune idée de sa direction. En me basant s
Хорошо, Джим. Я не хотел об этом говорить, потому что мы пока не готовы рекомендовать какую-либо процедуру. Мы не можем включить CM/ согласно стандартному контрольному списку питания, потому что у нас недостаточно ампер. Возможно, нам потребуется, чтобы вы прогревали — проводили предварительный нагрев каждого кольца по от
Ici Friendship Seven. Je vais m'écarter du plan de vol un instant pour tenter de corriger la situation: nous dérivons en lacet. Je désactive le lacet automatique et je va
はい。コピーする準備
Zw
Его очень легко заметить. Отсюда видны все края кратеров, а также, конечно, белый полумесяц на противоположной стороне, куда падает солнце. Тени сейчас довольно длинные. От Маскелина B (Болото Сна) отбрасывается довольно много теней, но его можно узнать. Чуть западнее Маскелина B начинается линия терминатора. Терминатор на самом деле довольно четко виден над Пир
Imaginez que l'endroit se soit un peu vidé après ce rendez-vous. On peut 
ब
جيميني 4، كارنارفون CAP COM. أعطني ق
Roger. Lecture de votre carré 5. En atte
That's affirmative. We got you in the shadows, though. You are looking right down 
好的。第一颗星是26号星，我们将进行两组测量，一组是地球近地平线时使用26号星进行测量。然后我们希望用16号星（也就是16号星）进行一组测量，这组测量是在地球远地平线时进行的。如果26号星
Columbia, ici Houston. Votre ligne de visée COMM avec la base Tranq
이제 우리는 UTD와 기타 여러 가지 것들을 갖
जेमिनी 4, जेमिनी 4,
Хорошо. Как выглядит телеметрия н
分かりました。かなり分かりやすそうですね。一定Gのバックアップ手順を理解し、最大Gまでベクトルを上げ、その後ベクトルを下げる。そ
Okay
I don't know which way I was pointing when
In questo momento vedo sicuramente un rollio a destra di circa 5 gradi e ho notato che il periscopio è scuro, il che significa che stiamo entrando nel lato oscuro. Cercherò di 
Потом, когда я выстрелил из бутылки, и потом, почти все, что произошло... с тех пор, как 
D'ora in poi farò scorrere il nastro ininterrottamente.
नहीं, मुझे देखने दीजिए कि क्या यह यहाँ सही से लगा है। मैं पैनल 275 पर जाता हूँ, CB MAIN A, BAT BUS A और CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B खोलता हूँ। फिर मैं 250 पर जाता हूँ, और CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING और BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING को खींचता हूँ, और फिर पैनल 5 पर, SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN A, SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN B, BATTERY CHARGER BAT B CHARGE, BATTERY CHARGER BAT A CHARGE को खींचता हू
D'accord. Pour une réception positive, le réglage de l'antenne à g
Роджер. Я как раз записывал на диктофон. Единственное необычное, что я заметил, это довольно высокий слой дымки, примерно на 7-8 градусов выше горизонта на ночной стороне. Звезды я вижу сквозь него, когда они опускаются к настоящему горизонту, но это очень хорошо различимая одиночная полоса или сл
いいえ、今はそうする理由はありません。もう少し質問があります。パスの終わりに向けて何も
حسنًا، لا يمكنني فعل ذ
休斯顿，我觉得这次飞行还不错，虽然我估计实际用油比在模拟器里用得多。掉头的时候——我按了俯仰加速指令开始抬头，然后不知怎么的，当我把手动姿态俯仰指令改回速率
阿波罗11号，继
そうだったかな？...前に進むと、通気口が
Okay. Ich bin jetzt im Automatikmodus. Alles funktioniert einwandfrei. Der Manöverschalter ist aus.
Роджер. На этом мониторе материки выг
Questo è negativo, Mike. Se dai un'occhiata al grafico, che conserveremo per te e te lo faremo vedere dopo il volo, è partito subito al primo REV
نبض. سألحق 
Ok. Il tuo RAD IN SECONDARY, ti ho dato 70 - circa 72 gradi; il RAD OUT è circa 30; la TEMP EVAP GLI
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. جميع الأنظمة جاهزة للع
जी हाँ। आप लोगों क
أبولو 13، هيوستن
로저, 콜럼비아. 11번 항공기가 도착했습니다. G&N: 37200, -060, +047, 098 05 2422, +41448, +03719, -02422. 롤은 NA, 피치는 020, 나머지 PAD는
D'accord. L2 est comme indiqué. L3 est com
好的。接下来，第一
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地。最新の重量は分かりますか？オ
Tre, due, uno
نعمل على ذلك يا فرانك. نحاول حساب المسافة الشعاعية الخارجية بدقة. الآن، لا تزال الأرض موجودة - كما فهمت - 
好的。你现在想
这里有个挺有
Affirmative..
有人提到过如何
그 아래에 있는 "시각 관찰 계속"과 "관찰 중지"를 지우세요. 
Und wir haben eine Kontrollleuchte für den Wasserabscheider. Halten Sie sie kurz fest, ic
Okay. Dann schalte ich den HF-Sender/Empfänger aus. Nr. 2 – AUFNAHME. Das sollten wir erwähnen. Jetzt drücke ich bei -1 die Tasten OAMS, ELEKTRISCH und ADAPT. OAMS, ELEKTRISCH
ठीक है, अब हम चरम जी (g) के
Ok, come sai, la modalità di controllo è impostata per la deriva. La modalità selezionata è normale, automatica, giroscopi ingabbiati. Ho selezionato l'asset
No, I don't think we're getting an awful lot of rest out of it, but on th
자, 물병자리 여러분, 시
Non
रॉजर, स्कॉट। मैं ड्रिफ्टिंग मोड में हूँ, लेकिन मैंने एयर कंडीशनिंग बस चालू कर दी है। यह बहुत अच्छे से काम कर रही है। मैं बीकन बाद में चालू करूँगा। कंट्रोल मोड फ्लाई-बाय-वायर चुना गया है, हालाँकि मैं अभी इसे नियंत्रित नहीं कर रहा हूँ। ऑटो स्विच ऑटो पर है, जाइरो स्विच अभी भी बंद है। रीएंट्री एटीट्यूड चुना गया है, मैन्यूवर बंद है। सभी माप हरे रंग में हैं। सूट का तापमान लगभग 60 
Friendship Seven, Friends
那是尼尔。我是巴兹。我真希望我们能查到我家草坪上次修剪是
시그마 세븐, 시그마 세븐입니다. 여기는 워터타운 통신기술센터입니다. 통화가 끊긴 것 같습니다. 통화가 끊긴 것 같습니다. 
रॉजर। क्या आप लोगों ने अपने पानी की मात्रा का स्विच पीने योग्य पानी या अपशिष्ट 
?: 12 53 00。終わ
好的，我有一些最新
...et ce sera la fin de la 29e 
Okay. Diese mundgerechten Häppchen wurden entwickelt, um das Problem der vielen Krümel in der Kabine zu lösen. Deshalb wurde eine spezielle Größe gewählt, damit man sie alle auf einmal zum Mu
روجر. لدي فرق ملحوظ بين فولتية البطارية على الطرفين 5 و6؛
ジム、運は続いているようだ。追跡調査によると、進入
Roger. Tieni presente che le tue due mogli sono a Houston e quando avrai la migliore ricezione negli Stati Uniti, saranno in contatto con t
Sie interessieren sich wahrscheinlich für die Kommentare Ihrer Frauen. Neil, Jan sagte über die gestrigen Ereignisse: „Der Abend war einfach perfekt. Es ist mir eine Ehre und ein Privileg, mit meinem Mann, der Crew, dem bemannten R
Хоро
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Nous avons observé votre test de nacelle stabilisée et tout s'est bien passé.
Qui ho 140
मुझे अभी
Abbiamo una bellissima foto, Ne
Vediamo. Altrove, nelle notizie nazionali, gli sposi no
Верно, Билл
По моим оценкам, мы находимся примерно на 88 градусах восточной
了解。もしあなたが心配しているのが暑くないな
Roger. An
ええ、ジャック。ちょうど電話
Das ist sehr gut. Ich garantiere, dass ich
और, ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी। क्या आज के लिए आपने काफी टीवी देख लिय
Роджер. Хьюстон, А
अपोलो, मैंने तुम्हारी बात स्पष्ट रूप से सुन ली है
Хорошо. Я проверил заряд батареи, вентиляционный клапан, продувку топливного элемента, а затем остановимся на 55 часах, и ваш угол крена составит 285 градусов, что соответствует плану полета. Углы антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления немного отличаются: тангаж 23 градуса и рыскание 267 градусов. Телевизионный контроль, стандартная активация, за исключением некоторых специальных шагов, которые мы вам дадим, чтобы проверить давление в топливном баке, которого у меня пока нет. Возобновите работу примерно тогда или когда закончите все действия, а после этого, в удобное для вас время, мы хотели бы, 
Sigma Seven Sigma Seven Zanzibar Com Tech trasme
رو
ثم علينا فقط أن
好的，序列
瓜伊马斯
Die Bewohner von Seattle (Washington), Portland (Oregon), Vancouver (British Columbia) und San Francisco an der Westküste planen laut Associated Press, ihre Häuser und Häu
Ça a toujours l'air bien. Ça n'a pas vraiment changé grand-chose, mais globalement, vu la dista
Ça y est, ça
Вы считаете, что это закончится на 
Cape Com Tech. Sigma Seven. 超高频。完毕
听
Bon. J'ai été interrompu une minute. Bob Hope est de retour au Vietnam avec ses troupes, et comme toujours, il fait un excellent travail. Un nom q
はい。それで
Мы не будем... мы не собираемся..
Остановк
Bella domanda
Хорошо. У нас есть требование, которое заключается в том, чтобы мы выполнили операцию и сделали это в режиме минимального импульса, чтобы не вносить никаких корректировок в положение для удержания. Мы будем отслеж
Die Warnleuchte für überschüssiges Kabinenwasser leuchtet um 03:56:24 Uhr. Ich werde sie etwas dimmen – sie sollte ungefähr auf der Höhe des
Kano Cap Com은 추가 보고를 기다리고 있습니다. Sigma Seve
ठीक है। ऐसा लगता है कि हमारी रीडिंग आपकी रीड
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Non ho avuto alcun problema a mangiare, molto bene. Nel periscopio, vedo l'orizzonte 
حسناً. فهمت. اتفاق جيد. فريد،
نعم، نس
了解。ところで、もし気にな
了解。アラインメントは変更なし、アレージも
Принято. Мы получи
ठीक है। यह JETS के ल
रॉजर। स्थिति रिपोर्ट। मैंने आपको रक्त प
フレッド、あと2点あります。1つ目は、エンジンの噴射中にミスアライメントはほとんど発生しないと予想しています。そのため、特に推力が非常に低い状態なので、噴射中はエンジン回転数の変化はほとんどないと予想しています。2つ目は、スーツの温度調節器が「フル
УВЧ-релей
And, Jim, we're
在这种飞行姿态下，确实会产生一种抬头仰望的错觉，如果没有地平线，那就只有一片漆黑的天空。驾驶舱内的光线非常明亮。当然，一旦适应了，就可以通过舱内照明灯来降低亮度。但目前，由于飞行服电路的问题，我不太愿意降低舱内照明。我频繁地使用指尖照明灯。有人
J'a
好的。我刚才检查了一下，巴兹，你还能站起来吗？它甚至都没塌陷太厉害，足
Roger. REP
你好，朋友们，墨西哥的祝福，特别是瓜伊马斯的朋友们。 Desde el espacio 外部，s
روجر. أفهم أن الأشعة بدت أغمق قرب الطرف الخلفي باتجاه الشرق. أفهم يا باز أ
Die Sonnenbrille hat da nicht 
罗杰。45-1 101。2+08。12 37 50。5+36。10+33。46-1 114。2+25 14 12 47。4+05。9+33。47-1 前后推进器。08 和 120。0+14 和 2+30。15 46 36。3+17。8+37。48-1 前后推进器。24 和 120。0+40 和 230，修正 2+30。17 20 19。2+42。8+43。49-4 111。2+21。20 06 48。4+11。9+46。 44 BRAVO 前后推进器点火 14 和 120。0+24 和 2+30。11 55 47。11+10... 5 120。2+30。13 29 13。11+42。46 BRAVO 94。
Et maintenant, nous arrivons à ce que nous appelons Boot Hill; cel
Roger, Frank. Wir machen hier unten Folgendes: Wir bräuchten die Horizontkalibrierung. Insgesamt bräuchten wir 15 Markierungen; drei auf dem einen Stern, zwei auf dem anderen. Andererseits müssen wir das mit dem Wunsch, sofort dorthin zu fliegen, abwägen, und wir vergessen dabei nicht, dass Sie sofort dorthin wollen
Okay. Okay, this is a preliminary maneuver PC plus 2. Starting: ; plus 0819.2, minus 0020.0, minus 0218.9; NA; plus 0020.9, 0848.2; 420, 274, 082; plus 0820.3, minus 0020.0, minus 0215.0. Comments. Ullage is two jets
Roger. We'll be coming within range of the aircraft coverage, here, in about 1 minute. They're going to try uplinking both on S-band and on VHF this time. So if you turn your - make sure your S-band volume is turned up, we'd appre
सुप्रभात, फ्रैंक। अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन से। हम आपके बैकअप अलाइनमेंट के बारे में जानना चाहते हैं; हम इस समय उत्तरी नक्षत्र मंडल में स्थित सीरियस और रिगेल नक्षत्र मंडल के बजाय सीरियस और र
Da Sie ja bereits unterwegs sind, interessiert es Sie vielleicht, dass die 
好的，吉姆。我想我现在能听懂杰克的指令了。但我们需要他做的是给我们一个重置指令。然后关掉电源，关掉加热器，A电池保持开启状
Okay, Houston. We'd like to get a hack 
Okay, very good. Under "Final stowage," the first thing that's listed on line 36, page 1-5, is "Optics." And if you want to get started on your
Je parle des aurores boréales. Je n'ai pas pu les voir. J'aperçois des lumières au sol, au milieu de la fenêtre, juste au moment où les aurores boréales apparaissent. Elles son
我们——我们这轮进食进度领先——我们上一轮进食进度落后了，或者类似情况。我们
罗杰，你的逆变器温度，150伏逆变器为188°，250伏逆变
不，它大概在九点或九点半的位置
Okay. Apollo 8. Looks like we're going to have to put this COMM test off because of some tracking requirements. We can do it in about an hour if this will not interfere with your present operations too much. It'll take maybe 15 to 20 minutes, and it will involve some conversation on the part of the people onboard the spacecraft. So if that's going to interfere with your sleeping and all, why go ahead and we'll defer to that and we'll pick these r
Houston, ho
비행 계획이 업
Roger. Roger, Frank. Qualche piccolo pensiero su cosa ci aspetta ora. Gli avvistamenti stellari quando Jim si alzerà; sembra che ora ne abbiamo abbastanza dell'orizzonte terrestre, e tutto sembra davvero a posto; e siamo pronti per iniziare con alcuni avvistamenti dell'orizzonte lunare. Quindi, quando Jim si alzerà, gli passeremo l'aggiornamento del piano di volo per un set di stelle con la luna. Inoltre, intorno o dopo gli avvistamenti stellari, è il momento i
جيميني 4،
أنا في وضع شبه عمودي. سنلتقط
ठीक है, यह
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。如果你能在不影响其他任何部件的情况下，将偏振滤镜贴在相
That's affir
برج الجوزاء 4، هيوستن، مركز الاتصالات. أخبرني بحالتك
دقيقتان
Okay. Darüber sollten Sie vielleicht nachdenken. Sie wissen ja,
Houston, comment lisez-vous? Apo
フレッド、窓が地球を向くようになったら、もう一度同じ写真を撮って、同時にやり直した方がいいですよ。ちょっと分かりにくい情報を送ってしまったかもしれません。「2つのクワッドエンジンを無効にする」というのは、手順の前半にのみ適用されます。「すべてのジェットエンジ
Friendship Seven. Ici Canton Cap Com. Tous les systèmes au sol semblent opérationnels. La température de votre onduleur de 150 volts-ampères est actuellement de 188°. Je répète: 188
Now we're over the Mediterranean. It is very easy to recognize. I see a coupl
了解。そうするよ、ジャック。今、右側の…いや、4番のデテントを見ています。後ろで何かを排出しているんです。コマンドモジュールの向こうに粒子が動いているのが見えます。それが何なのかは分かりませ
真想知道我们那边的供水
Die Kamera wird jetzt verstaut. Die Gyrosensoren werden nun aktiviert. Fly-by-Wire-Steuerung. Die Gyrosensoren werden in den Käfig gefahren.
分かりま
ठीक है, नी
我现
好的，我
Sì. Potremmo farlo. In realtà eravamo piuttosto interessati a vedere quale sarebbe stato l'effetto dello scarico delle acque reflue. Non ricordiamo di aver mai effettuato uno scarico di acque reflue durante le 
好的，没问题。请继续使
好的，没问题。我们只
네, 아폴로 13호와 아폴로 8호를 비교해 보면, 이륙 시 진동은 8호 때와 거의 비슷했지만, 비행 초반에는 8호 때보다 좌우로 흔들리는 느낌이 덜했습니다. S-IC 분리는 8호 때보다 13호에서 더 격렬하게 느껴졌는데, 제가 다른 좌석에 앉아 있어서 그런 건지는 잘 모르겠습니다. 어쨌든 S-II가 폭발하기 전에 엔진이 분리되는 순간이 세 번 정도 날카롭게 멈췄고, 큰 폭발음과 함께 몸이 뒤로 심하게 쏠리는 느낌이 들었습니다. S-II는 5번 엔진을 제외하고는 8
Ich konnte auf der Plattform nie die Beschleunigungsmesserwerte überprüfen. Ich habe die meiste Zeit Schub gegeben und konnte das Ding nicht wirklich für längere Ze
嘿，休斯顿，最后阶段可能看起来非常漫长。自动瞄准系统把我们直接带到了一个足球场大小的陨石坑里，周围大约一到两个陨石坑直径的范围内都
Roger. En cas d'alerte, nous aurons une PRESSION D'ASCENSION et
Wir befinden uns gerade bei 3+34. Es wird dunkel. Das Sonnenlicht schien fast mit dem schmalen Ende nach vorn auf die Spitze des Raumschiffs. Tatsächlich sind wir 30° links von der Geradeausrichtung, als
Endlich haben wir das Problem mit der Anzugstemperatur gelöst. Ich verstehe jetzt, warum Scott sich nur wegen dieser Rekordp
了解しました。捕捉のGETは3月7日、
この時、太陽光線は宇宙船の先端部分で反射し、その周囲を全て消し去っています。左下には明るい星がいくつか見えます。オリオン座のベルトも見えています。つまり、シリウスは私たちの先端よりかなり下
Houston, Eagle. Gangverlängerung a
Okay. The next one, two, three, fo
أسمعك جيداً. أشعر أنني بخير، والرحلة
我刚刚在北非拍摄了第 3、4、5、6 和 7 张照片……（无法辨认）照片（无法辨认）……6……阿拉伯半岛，从……正穿过半岛中心，朝着其中一个……那里
好的，吉姆。等你把姿态调整得更陡一些之后，我们进行一次机身轴线校准，校准点在 400 加 5 的位置。如果此时球体向上，球体将移动到 000。我们稍后可以详细讨论控制模式，但我们建议你当然是在姿态保持模式下进行操作。将偏航设置为模
저기 차단기 두 개 있어요. 저기 차단기 두 개 - B
알았어, 잭. 메모 내용은 다음과 같아: 회로 차단기 보호 장치가 
Довольно неплохая маленькая телекамера, не пра
Je le crois, Ken. Cette bande est parallèle à la ligne M, et je pense que c'est lié à la conception de l'optique, notamment à l'entrée rectangulaire extérieure. À cet angle solaire précis, elle la traverse complètement. J'ai remarqué que la Terre et le Soleil produisent le même effet sur le télescope de balayage. Dans le sextant, la même bande lumineuse est présente, bien qu'elle couvre tout son champ de vision. Cependant, le grossissement permet de bien distinguer les étoiles, et il est possible de les marquer. Mais l'identification des étoiles avec le télescope de balayage est très difficile. J'ai constaté que l'optique est optimale dans les positions qui permettent d'observer les constellations du Grand Chien et d'Orion avec le télescope de balayage. Dans cette position particulière du vaisseau spatial, la bande disparaît; nous sommes dans une position où le Soleil est derrière nous, et je peux voir un bon nombre d'étoiles. Hier, après adaptation à l'obscurité, j'ai également pu distinguer plusieurs étoiles autour de la constellation de Cassiopée, ce qui était invisible au début. Mais pour l'instant, ce groupe vous empêche de voir quoi que ce soit d'autre qu'Arcturus, ce qui, bien sûr, est notre objectif ac
罗杰，明白了
حسناً. أمامك دقيقة تقري
Die blaue Farbe mei
Okay, Aquarius. We're going to dispense with this control mode. We'd like you to fly the machine back to the original attitude that you had, and we'll go ATTITUDE HOLD, and then we've got to get that ball off the line to save some power. And then, in order to keep even heating, every 15 or 30 minutes, we'll give you a call to give us 90 or 1
حسنًا. إنها تنزل. ما هذا؟ حسنًا،
13، هيوستن. نود منك فحص بعض قواطع الدائرة على اللوحة 226. سخان الأكسجين المبرد رقم 1 الرئيسي أ، وف
Ро
로저... 허리케인이나 태풍 지역 상공에서... 바로 칼라 태풍 위에 있었는데... 어떤 태풍들이었는지는 모르겠지만, 하셀블라드 카메라로 몇 장 잘 찍은 것 같아요. 위에서 보니
D'accord. Encore deux étapes. Étape 6: restez sur l'antenne à g
В отчете о полет
Ab
جيميني 6، هذا قائد روس لاند. هل يمكنك 
好的。没人服用其他药物；没人服用过马瑞津；没人生病。比尔昨晚吃了一片安眠药，速可眠片。今天早上大家都
Si je peux débarrasser un peu la nourriture de Bill par ici, et la ranger… Ici s
It's not over here. Wel
Houston, Colum
Non ci ho ancora fatto caso. Che ne dici di farmi un 
حسنًا. انتظروا لحظة، سأتصل بجراحي على تردد UH
Roger. Among the large headlines concerning Apollo this morning, there's one asking that you watch for a lovely girl with a big rabbit. An ancient legend says a beautiful Chinese girl called Chang-o has been living there
Roger. Ça fait 12 mètres. Tu as reçu le dernier que je t'
Apollo 8, okay, das können wir verschieben. Wir bräuchten wahrscheinlich eine ungefähre Angabe, wann voraussichtlich jemand dafür zur Verfügung stehen wird, und wir ermitteln gerade, wie viel Vorlaufzeit wir ben
프레드, 무슨 말인지 잘 안 들려. 안테나를 바꾸거나 좀 더 크게 말해줄
The items that we still need will be a reading as late as you can do it conveniently prior to a final stowage. And we don't have any numbers on the last crew sleep period. I'd like to verify that the secondary was activated on all four quads. And I have about five comments on the e
嗨，吉
रॉजर। माइक, मैं तुम्हारी बात ठीक से समझ पा रहा हूँ, और पिछली बार जब तुमने मुझसे यह सवाल पूछा था तब भी मैंने तुम्हारी बात समझ ली थी, तो शायद मेरी बात तुम्हें ठीक 
Se ne avrai la possibilità
Хорошо. Тип ко
Ok, quello che ho qui fuori, Jack, è il LEVVA, che è già stato mostrato in precedenza. È un copricapo da indossare in superficie, e io... sto portando qui quello di Jim pe
Roger. Nous aimerion
जाइरोस्कोप को ट्रैक करने में कोई परेशानी नहीं लग रही है। हालांकि, केबिन की दाहिनी लाइट को लाल रंग तक कम करने में मुझे काफी दिक्कत हुई। डिटी बैग की वजह स
Another little of local news: the County Court House at Huntsville burned down before dawn yesterday, so it looks like they will go in the construction business there again. On the got a little bit about the waiting families. This one is by Ann James, Post reporter. "We rest on the backside of the moon," said Valerie Anders on Christmas Eve, as she and her family waited for Apollo 8 to get out of the moon orbit and head back toward home. Mrs. Anders had been 00 a.m. Tuesday, and neighbors had just collected all the youngsters so the family could get some rest while the spacecraft was behind the moon and out of communication. Colonel Frank Borman's home was decorated with four big evergreen wreaths outdoors and sprinkled with powdery snow and decorated with red bows. A tree in the den awaits his safe return, and his pretty blond wife Sue and husky sons, Frederick and Edwin, plan to stay home for the midnight blast out of moon orbit. Ordinarily, they would attend midnight services at St. Christopher's Episcopal Church. The plans were for the family 00 a.m. Since there are no young children in the Borman home, family Christmas gift giving will simply wait until Colonel Borman comes back with his fantastic holiday gift of the flight to the moon and back. Marilyn Lovell's four youngsters will have an absolutely normal Christmas as far as the kids are concerned, the busy wife of Captain Lovell reported; but talking about presents was out because two of them were sitting right there next to her. "I haven't even had time to change my clothes that I wore last night," Mrs. Lovell said. Adult-to-adult gifts, however, and the Christmas tree will still be right there when Lovell comes home. Here is a good one on the Action Line. There is a little letter to the Action editor. It says, "We intended to pay you Earthlings a surprise visit by a flying saucer last night. We got scared off by some crazy antics of a fat man and a sleigh and three guys in a rocket-powered bucket drag racing around the moon. Is that any way to run a planet?" Signed the boys from Mars. Frank, it looks like t
Oui. Nous avons maintenant aussi une sous-tension sur le bus p
روجر، لقد حصلت على مو
네, 알겠습니다. 더 이상 질문드릴 사항은 없습니다. 혹시 의견이 있으
Okay. We're 
Roger. L'heure de la zone 
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। राष्ट्रपति के साथ विदेश मंत्री विलियम रॉजर और फ्रैंक बोरमैन भी होंगे। वे प्रशांत बलों के कमांडर एडमिरल जॉन सिडनी मैक्केन जूनियर के साथ राहत पोत के पुल से जलप्रपात देखेंगे। हॉर्नेट पर कुछ समय बिताने के बाद, राष्ट्रपति एशिया के अपने दौरे और रोमानिया की निर्धारित यात्रा के लिए रवाना होंगे। माना जा रहा है कि लूना 15 कल चंद्रमा के 52 चक्कर लगाने के बाद संकट सागर में गिर गया। सोवियत समाचार एजेंसी TASS ने बताया कि "चंद्रमा के निकट अंतरिक्ष में वैज्ञानिक अनुसंधान किया गया।" जोड्रेल बैंक वेधशाला के सर बर्नार्ड लवेल ने कहा कि लूना 15 लगभग 300 मील प्रति घंटे की गति से चंद्रमा की सतह से टकराया। हाल ही में वियतनाम में अपेक्षाकृत शांति रही है। गश्त पर तैनात सैनिकों को ट्रांजिस्टर रेडियो लिए हुए देखा गया, जिन पर आपकी उड़ान का प्रसारण चल रहा था। वियतनाम में सशस्त्र बलों के रेडियो और टीवी नेटवर्क ने मिशन का पूरा कवरेज किया। स्वेज नहर के किनारे मिस्र और इजरायल के बीच झड़पें अभी भी जारी हैं। वहां मौजूद संयुक्त राष्ट्र के पर्यवेक्षक कार्रवाई को रोकने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। वाशिंगटन में, हाउस वेज़ एंड मीन्स कमेटी ने 27.5 प्रतिशत तेल उपयोग भत्ते को घटाकर 20 प्रतिशत करने के लिए मतदान किया है। ह्यूस्टन क्षेत्र में कई बार बारिश हुई है। आज बादल छाए हुए हैं और और बारिश होने की संभावना है। खेल जगत की बात करें तो, जैसा कि हमने पहले बताया, ऑल स्टार गेम आज रात है। कल कोई मैच नहीं खेला गया। कल रात न्यूयॉर्क में, बेसबॉल राइटर्स एसोसिएशन ऑफ अमेरिका ने बेब रूथ को सर्वकालिक महानतम बेसबॉल खिलाड़ी घोषित किया। जो डिमैगियो को जीवित सर्वश्रेष्ठ बेसबॉल खिलाड़ी का खिताब मिला। खिलाड़ियों के सम्मान में आयोजित रात्रिभोज में फ्रैंक बोरमैन ने ये घोषणाएं कीं। जो नामथ ने न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स के प्र
Houston, Apollo 11. I am looking at that cloud now around Pakis
Давление нарастает... на те
और, 13, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप चाहें, तो हम आपको हर 2 मिनट में बता सकते हैं कि पृथ्वी आपके घर की खिड़की
Qui gli scanner e gli
ええ。窓から少し見えます。どうやら、私が見ていたのは紐で、あれは染料マーカーだったようです。皆さん、こん
Там наверху? Нам скоро долж
알겠습니다. 4번째 줄 아래, HEATERS 항목에서 QUAD 히터 4개는 모두 닫아주세요. DISPLAYS, S-BAND ANTENNA, SEQUENCE CAMERA는 모두 열어주세요. 그 아래에서 DISPLAYS는 열고, DC BUS VOLT는 닫고, INVERTER 2는 열고, ASCENT ECA CONTROL과 ASCENT ECA는 열고, DESCENT ECA, DESCENT ECA CONT
Roger. Unsere Mondreise mag Ihnen einfach erschienen sein. Ich kann Ihnen versichern, dass dem nicht so war. Die Saturn-V-Rakete, die uns in den Orbit befördert hat, ist eine unglaublich komplexe Maschine, deren einzelne Teile einwandfrei funktionierten. Dieser Bordcomputer über mir verfügt über einen Wortschatz von 38.000 Wörtern, von denen jedes einzelne sorgfältig ausgewählt wurde, um für uns, die Besatzung, von größtem Wert zu sein. Allein im Kommandomodul gibt es über 300 Gegenstücke zu diesem Schalter. Hinzu kommen unzählige Sicherungen, Hebel, Stangen und andere Bedienelemente. Das Triebwerk, unser großes Raketentriebwerk am Heck des Servicemoduls, musste einwandfrei funktionieren, sonst wären wir im Mondorbit gestrandet. Die Fallschirme über mir müssen morgen perfekt funktionieren, sonst stürzen wir ins Meer. Wir waren stets zuversichtlich, dass die gesamte Ausrüstung funktionieren und einwandfrei funktionieren wird, und wir sind weiterhin davon überzeugt, dass dies auch für den Rest des Fluges so bleiben wird. All dies 
收到。这是30分钟报告。我已进行头部运动测试，没有任何不适。我也进行了触及测试，一切正常。我的定向力良好，视力清晰。我来回注
Plus près de chez nous, à Memphis, dans le Tennessee
プログラム 52 を実行しているときに、プログラム アラーム 401 が発生しました。これ
जी हां, जेमिनी 4। प्रयोग MSC-1 के संबंध में, हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप अपने प्रयोग के दौरान लगभग 5 मिनट के लिए अपने ACQ एड बीकन को बंद कर दें। हमारा सुझाव है कि आप इस पास के दौरान कानो और कार्नार्वोन
Oui. Je pense que cet end
Roger, Scott. Sono in volo 
Roger. Nous allons lancer le PROGRAMME 30 apr
제
Apollo 11, Houston. D'après nos observations depuis le milieu de la trajectoire, nous affichons un gamma de -6,57. Ce chiffre est préliminaire, et nous pensons qu'après quelques suivis supplémentaires, la trajectoire devrait se stabiliser et nous pourrons l'ajuster précisément dans le couloir d'atterrissage. Nous sommes quasiment au centre du couloir; tout semble bien se passer. Nous vous enverrons un plan d'entrée dans quelques heures, avant que vous n'alliez vous coucher. Et de la part de nos amis des affaires publiques, voici quelques informations, outre votre vol. Vous êtes toujours au centre de l'actualité. Cependant, il y a d'autres choses intéressantes pour vous. Comme je l'ai mentionné précédemment, le match des étoiles a été annulé en raison de la pluie. Il aura lieu demain. Cependant, le président Nixon ne pourra pas y 
알겠습니다. 지시사항은 다음과 같습니다. 그리고 각도를 다시 말씀드릴 테니 잘 베껴 쓰세요. -7번 지시사항에 따라 다음 자세로 조종하십시오: 롤, 0°; 피치,
콜럼비아, 휴스턴. 짐을 다 실었습니다. 이제 블록으로 돌아가
Salut Jim, tu as vu cette tempête 
正解です。わかりました。次は、次のカメラです。スタンバイ 1。ノイズが入っています。わかりました。次のカメラは 16 ミリで、これらの
, have you tried your circ
안녕하세요, 아폴로 
아니요. 꼭 드러난 물질이라고는 할 수 없을 것 같습니다. 어떤 물질은 구워지거나 어떤 방식으로든 더 응집력이 생겨서 서로 섞였을 수도 있다고 생각합니다. 정확히는 모르겠습니다. 다른 지역에서는, 우리
Хорошо, Джим. Мы вам в этом поможем; это тема, которую мы хотели бы обсудить с вами. Мы рассматривали этот вопрос, и наши соображения таковы... Конечно, это ваше решение, но, учитывая все плюсы и минусы, вы точно указали на плюс. Мы проводим проверку целостности люка незадолго до истечения EI минус 1 часа, и если мы её обнаружим, вам будет трудно быстро надеть скафандры. С другой стороны, недостатки ношения скафандров заключаются в том, что они могут значительно замедлить вас, не считая времени на их надевание, и кто-то даже очень обеспокоен тем, что после определённого периода времени в скафандрах вам может стать слишком жарко, и нам, возможно, придётся включать систему вентиляции скафандров, а мы этого делать не хотим, потому что это потребляет довольно много энергии. Следовательно, мы бы рекомендовали вам не надевать костюм, поскольку у нас нет оснований полагать, 
Okay. I'll pass it on to him. Thanks a lot, an
वाह, ये तो काफी बड़ी गलती है। मुझे समझ नह
シグマ・セブン、PCS。君の弱々しい声
700، 150 فما فوق؛ جميل. 9000. يتفق نظاما PGNS وAGS في حدود قدم في الث
Diese
अनस्टोव्
D'accord. Je vais d'abord vous les lire rapidement pour que vous ayez une idée générale. Les points d'appui (pad), le module de service, l'attitude JETT, l'attitude pour l'observation de la Lune, 
ठीक है। चलिए अब वीएचए
Bene, vediamo; quando è stato, te l'ho detto, sono andato a letto ieri sera,
حسناً، أعتقد أننا تمكنا من تثب
With respect to the window, Houston: the windows 1 and 5 have moderate haze on them. Satisfactory for visual observation, but possibly not for photography. Win
로저. TV 화면이 끊기네요. 네. 이제 화면이 잘 나옵니다. 빛이 너무 많은 것 같습니다
Apollo 8, Houston. Puoi spegnere il caricabatterie. Pa
D'accord. Pour la deuxième mission, l'observation de la comète Bennett après 32 heures, nous souhaitons que les photos soient prises
حسنًا. صحيح. هذا جيم لوفيل. ما فكرنا في فعله اليوم هو أن نُطلعكم على لمحة بسيطة عن الحياة داخل أبولو 8. لقد عرضنا لكم مشاهد القمر، ومشاهد الأرض، وفكرنا في دعوتكم إلى منزلنا. لقد كان منزلنا لمدة أربعة أيام على الأقل كما ترون على لوحة العدادات. نُعلّم كل يوم على لوحة العدادات. لقد مرّت أربعة أيام، ونعمل على اليوم الخامس. بالطبع، نتطلع جميعًا إلى الهبوط يوم الجمعة. هنا في الجزء السفلي من المركبة الفضائية الذي نسميه حجرة المعدات السفلية، لدينا مستشار الرئيس لشؤون اللياقة البدنية، الكابتن جيم لوفيل، على وشك الخضوع لبرنامج تمارين نقوم به كل يوم. تلاحظون أنه يتحرك بحرية تامة. لقد اصطدم رأسه للتو بالبصريات، المستخدمة في ملاحتنا. إنه يستخدم جهازًا رياضيًا مصممًا للحفاظ على لياقة العضلات. من الوظائف المهمة الأخرى لمركبتنا الفضائية الحاسوب، وقد ظننت أنكم قد ترغبون في رؤية ما لدينا هنا، الشاشات التي تعرض لنا جميع المعلومات المتعلقة بعملية الاحتراق، والملاحة، والسرعة التي نستخدمها أثناء الدخول والخروج من مدار الأرض. كما ترون، يتم التحكم به بواسطة لوحة مفاتيح تشبه لوحة مفاتيح الآلة الكاتبة، والبيانات التي تُدخل وتُخرج منه مذهلة حقًا. لقد قام بعمل رائع، وقد أبدع جيم لوفيل في تشغيله. الآن، هناك أمر آخر بالغ الأهمية سواء كنا في الفضاء أو على الأرض وهو الطعام، وقد طلبت من بيل أندرس أن يُريكم كيف نأكل هنا في الرحلة. اعذروا الصورة أثناء تحركنا وتغيير الكاميرات. الطعام الذي نستخدمه مجفف بالكامل، ويأتي مُعبأً مسبقًا في أكياس محكمة الإغلاق. لاحظوا أن كل ما على بيل فعله لإبقائه في مكانه هو تركه. لولا تيارات الهواء داخل المركبة، لكان ثابتًا تمامًا. يُخرج مقصه العملي ويقطع الكيس. الطعام متنوع، وجيد عمومًا
Ich glaube nicht, denn ich bin damals einfach i
Hier spricht Friendship Se
Roger. Understand that's 122 15
Roger. Vérification informatique de tous les modes. Insérez 10 pieds/seconde dans tous les IVI, appuyez sur le voyant de dysfonctionne
L'allin
أستطيع أن أصل إلى مستوى 
로저. 마지막 예정된 활동을 시작하시는군요. 초기 추적 결과, 초기 중간 지점 속도가 첫 번째 예상인 초당 4피트보다 느릴 것으로 보입니다. 연소 데이터도 확인했는데, 말씀하신 대로 모든 것이 순조롭고 정상으로 보입니다. 시스템 상태도 양호하며, 자세 제어 측면에서
روجر. سأقر
Yes, it's kind of a cold winter da
이건 당신의 컴퓨터입니다. 상태 벡터가 입력되었고 검증되었습니다
Pas vraiment. J'arrivais à enfoncer les cinq premiers centimètres sans trop de difficulté, puis, en tapant de toutes mes forces (il me fallait les deux mains sur le marteau pour le deuxième), et en enfonçant la tige d'extension, je ne pouvais pas aller beaucoup plus loin. Je crois que la profondeur totale devait être d'environ 20 à 23 centimètres. Mais même là, ça ne marchait pas. Pour une raison inconnue, la tige ne tenait pas 
Was ich tun werde – ich wiederhole es noch einmal – Okay. Ich wiederhole es Ihnen noch einmal. Paketventil aus; Notdruck in der Kabine aus; Di
我现在已进入飞行状态，陀螺仪正常，
أوه، لا يمكنك رؤية أي شيء. لو 
我会在开机前做好设
D'accord. Je crois que Jim la tient maintenant et… ça… Bon, ça devrait être à f/22 environ, à l'infini, et je cro
Tranquility Base, Houston. Abbiamo esaminato la checklist e l'unica modifica che abbiamo trovato per anticipare il c
알겠습니다. SPC가 플랫폼 병렬 처리보다 우
물병자리, 휴스턴. 실내 온도를
Roger. Beh, potresti ripetere questo durante la narrazione televisiva, e vorremmo che, se possibile, tu dessi una descrizione il più dettagliata possibile dei vari colori e dimensioni di quelle cose e di come la Terra ti appare, con tutti i det
أخبرتهم الحقيقة. أشعر أنني بخير، 
D'ac
Apollo 8, Houston. Puoi andare avanti e fare quel 37 e lo 
Questa Amicizia Sette. Affermativa, 
Roger, Ja
休斯顿，鹰。你读得怎么
Здравствуйте, командир Canary Cap. Аврора Севен. Слыш
ओवरराइड क
알겠습니다. 전원을 연결했는데 괜찮아 보였습니다. 그런데 전원 경고등과 모든 위험 신호가 켜져 있고, X 루나 버스 타이 차단기 두 개가 모두 켜져 있습니다. 유틸리티 조명 차단기도 켜져 있고, AC 버스 B 헬륨 PQS 디스플레이, AC 버스 B 숫자 조명, 그리
Yes. We have decided to use a canister and, you know that the liquid-cooled garment has a bag around it that we think we can use, too, or that we know we can use. We've tried it. So what you have is the - a bag within a bag and inside that is the liquid-cooled garment. The bag that is closest to the liquid-cooled garment is the one we need, and we've got two of them. And then, of course, we've got to use some tape and, as you
لقد حصلنا على منظر جميل لجانب وحدة القيادة من 
Columbia, ici Houston. Vous m'entendez? Termin
7 に点滅しました - はい、そして 710 にちら
其中一个食物袋在连接水枪的进水盖
11, ह्यूस्टन। यहाँ संचार को थोड़ा बेहतर बनाने के लिए, हम आपको हाई गेन एंटीना पर लाने की कोशिश करेंगे। हम पिच एंगल 0, यॉ 355 (मैं फिर से कह रहा
حسناً، على لوحة التحكم الخاصة بك، VHF A، إ
Roger. Die Verbindung ist unterbr
That's correct. 
إيق
Okay.
Sieht so aus, als ob ich richtig liege – vielleicht kann ich die Stadt Mekka sehen. Sie müsste in meiner Gegend se
分かりました。これがレート減衰の全手順です。ただし、ステップ2だけを伝えましたが、これが全手順です。さて、29ページの印刷内容についてですが、訂正です。「姿勢制御」のリードバックに誤りが1つありました。「ピッチとロール」を「パルス」に、「ヨー」を「ダイレクト」に修正していました。続きまして、29ページの印刷された手順ですが、最初の4行は削除。ステップ3も削除。「アクティベーション」の下にス
여기에도 없어요, 제가 다 찾아봤
It doesn't matter, we've got 2 hours on that tape, and they don'
Warten Sie, Buzz. Soweit ich das beurteilen kann, sieht es ziemlich gut aus. Wir haben hier entlang der tropischen Konvergenzlinie ein paar Wolken auf der Wetterkarte, aber nichts Bedeutendes. Moment mal. Mal sehen, im Moment – ​​ja, am MPL – haben wir 3000 verstreute Winde, Sichtweite 10 Fuß, Wellenhöhe 3 Fuß. Das ist das aktuelle Wetter. Ich glaube nicht, 
بالنسبة لـ - بالنسبة لكولومبيا: 35
Perth dovrebbe apparire nel campo visivo e dovrebbe essere... oh, che bel controllo di imbardata, ed è a circa 10 gradi a sinistra della traiettoria. Meglio farlo a circa 12 gradi a sinistra della traiettoria. Appena sul bordo della finestra, e questo dovrebbe darci 0 gradi di imbardata. Non riesco a 
D'a
Hier ist eine interessante kleine Neuigkeit, die man eigentlich ganz gut hören sollte. In Ann Arbor, Michigan, gibt es anscheinend eine neue Jugendgang. Sie nennt sich Gilnet Gang. Sie zieht durch die Straßen von Ann Arbor, agiert im Verborgenen und umgeht dabei manchmal das Gesetz. Sie nennen sich selbst die „Guerillas für das Gute“. Zu ihren Aktionen gehörte unter anderem, eine mit Obszönitäten beschmierte Brücke übermalt zu haben. Sie strichen sie in einer Nacht. Ein baufälliges Haus – beliebt bei den Kindern aus der Nachbarschaft, aber gefährlich – wurde verbarrikadiert. Blumenkästen in der Innenstadt, die leer standen, weil es Streit darüber gab, wer dafür verantwortlich war – die Wirtschaft oder die Regierung –, wurden mit Blumen bepflanzt. Eine Hecke an einer vielbefahrenen Kreuzung, die die Sicht behinderte, wurde gestut
Oh, come on, John, 
After we got the rates down to a point where we felt we could safely undock, we did so, and maneuvered away from the Agena at several feet per second as quickly as possible. We had been watching our propellant quantity go down from 50 to below 30 percent. After turning the OAMS off and still in bias power and everythi
Okay. The first one I will give you is a plus 44 maneuver. I will start reading d
私が引っ張ると、あなたはもっと下がっていきました。私が引っ張るたびに、あなたももっと下がっていき
Negative. It's 45 degrees
11, hier ist Houston. Wir – wir hören n
저희가 몇 가지 예상 시간을 알려드리기 시작했습니다. 조만간 더 정확한 시간을 알려드릴 수 있을 것 같습니다. 현재로서는 물은 154시간, 타쿠산 산소는 272시간, 수산화리튬도 충분하고, 암페어시(Ah)는 199~200시간 정도 문제없이 사용할 수 있을 것
브루스, 제가 2차 냉각수 분리기로 이동했을 때 아무런 변화도 느끼지 못했다는 점을 말씀드려야겠네요. 그런데 15분에서 20분 정도 지나자 물이 더 이상 나
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы будем довольны, если вы п
哦，好
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストンからP
Depuis la surface, on ne voyait aucune étoile par le hu
حسنًا، أنا أنظر الآن من خلال الشبك
好的。今天早上新闻其实没什么特别的。一切都很平静。我想最大的新闻应该是事故率——也就是节假日死亡人数——这当然不是什么好消息，全国共有233人丧生，其中9人是在平安夜和圣诞节当天在休斯顿遇难的。国际新闻方面，遇难者家属再次成为新闻焦点。本周，朝鲜方面公布了阿波罗8号宇航员家属向美国海军“普韦布洛”号
Roger, 2: SPS/G&N: 38320, plus 166, minus 081 080 11 3603, minus 01408, minus all balls, minus 00743, all zeros, 196 359 00657, plus 00537, 01592 017 01531 23 1160 138. Vega, Deneb 243 183 012, two jet 19 seconds,, R1 20101. Sextant star between 79 30 10 and 79 52 10. Attitude is heads down, retrograde pitched up 28 degrees. HA a
A
That's affirmative. Okay. When that's complete, the will maneuver to the Sun-viewing angle for attitude. And when they get there, you take a mark on the Sun using the Sun filter and the telescope; and, agai
Houston, hier spricht Apollo 8, der mit hoher Verstärkung sendet. Wie 
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストンです。
Am meisten beeindruckten mich die Sonnenauf- und -untergänge des Mondes. Gerade diese
Molto meglio. Ora ti ho fatto superare la
了解。コピーして。それでは、船内の表示は、Dが69、Cが73、Dは…もう一度やり直します。Aは51、Bは6
ठीक है। 
Хорошо, Фред. Поймите, что в мешок с канистрой подключен только красный шланг от LMP. В таком случае, мы просим вас выполнить следующую процедуру для вставки другого красного шланга в другой мешок с канистрой: вырежьте диагональное отверстие в одном углу мешка. Посмотрите на другой мешок и сравните, как это сделано. Вставьте шланг примерно на 15 сантиметров. Постарайтесь опустить выходное отверстие вниз, если это возможно, или же расположить его боком, а затем просто приклейте шланг к мешку скотчем, чтобы обеспечить плотное прилег
Хорошо, Джек. Это был мой
了解。久しぶりに窓の外に世界が広がり、単眼鏡を通して眺めると、本当に素晴らしい。うまく言葉で表現できればいいのだが。天気はとても良い。南米が視界に入ってきた。地平線の上の方に
Roger, guidance initiat
J'ai bien compris, Jim. P
نعم، أنا معك حتى
Ji
अरे
مرحباً، قاعدة 
Il n'y en a pas beaucoup sur ce vol, alors profitez-en tant que vous le pou
Значение яркости для черно-белой пленки составляет 13 при чувствительности ASA 64. Устанавливаю значение яркости 13. Делаю снимок номер 7 с фильтром. Южноамериканский континент сложно фотографировать из-за погодных условий. Сейчас сделаю панораму. Начинаю примерно через 8 часов. На самом деле, так и будет. МАРКТ, 7, 8, 9 черные фотографии, черно-белая пленка. Десять фотографий, черно-белая пленка. Снимки делаются на выдержке 250 5.6 (1/250 секунды и f5.6) на бесконечность. Снимаю снимок номер 11, смотрю влево. В этот момент я пересекаю южноамериканский континент. В поле зрения большая река. Делаю снимок, направив камеру как можно ниже. Думаю, окно капсулы получилось очень удачным. Вернусь к B-1. Сделал первые 12 снимков. Нахожусь на B-1, снимаю полосы облаков. Я снял B-2, и все эти снимки черно-белые, с фильтром метеорологического бюро. Я сделаю последние фотографии из этой серии. На этом снимки метеорологического бюро заканчиваются. Думаю, мы сделали достаточно, чтобы уд
チャーリー、明日は荷物を整理して、できるだけ標準に近づけるように再構成します。標準から外れるものとしては、まずバイザーを司令船に戻しましたが、まだ置き場所が決まっていません。置き場所は後ほどお知らせします。さらに、エイブル8のコンパートメントから持ち込まれた雑多な荷物が約5ポンドあり、エイブル8からスーツバッグに移したLCGの荷物の代わりになります。雑多なゴミ袋を1枚処分しました。ほとんどは古い食品の包装紙と古い下着、そしてCMPのヘルメット保護バイザーです。これらはす
रॉजर, 12 58 00 होराइ
حسنًا، فهمت. حسنًا. بعد انتهاء العملية، سنترك 470 قيد التشغيل لفترة ونن
알았어, 로저. 고마워. 난 지금 반대편에 있어. 너무 귀찮아서 가서 가져오기엔 좀 그
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 지금 우리를 향해 보이는 것은 아프리카 대륙입니다. 물론 시간이 지남에 따라 모든 것이 점점 작아지고 있습니다. 지중해는 아주 깨끗합니다. 태양은 마다가스카르 너머로 지고 있는 것 같습니다. 아프리카의 적도 지대가 아주
R
Voilà du chocolat chaud; ça devrait être bon. J'y ajouterai environ 150 ml d'ea
शैनन का ईंधन खत्म हो जाता है,... लेकिन
L'inclinazione dovrebbe essere di circ
6.3، 
罗杰，你准备好把
من المثير للاهتمام ملاحظة أن وضعيتي - ووضعية البالون - هي تقريبًا ارتفاع 30 درجة، ودوران يمين 130 درجة، وانحراف يسار 20 درجة. يتحرك البالون في هذه اللحظة معي تمامًا، محافظًا على اتجاه ثابت طوال الوقت. ها هو شريط الأفق يظهر مجددًا، هذه المرة من الجانب المُضاء بضوء القمر. دعني أرى، مع مرشح التوهج الجوي، من الصعب جدًا القيام بذلك بسبب أضواء ساعة تزامن الوقت. سأفتح واقي الشمس الآن. من المستحيل التأقلم مع الظلام هنا، مع هذا
아니
La Germania Ovest ha dichiarato lunedì "Giorno di Apollo". In Baviera, gli studenti delle scuole hanno avuto il giorno libero. Gli impiegati delle Poste sono stati incoraggiati a portare le radio al lavoro e Francoforte sta ins
انتظر يا برج الدلو، يا 
Okay, sehr gut. Unter „Endgültige Verstauung“ steht auf Seite 1-5, Zeile 36, als erst
ठीक है, मुझे समझ आ गया। लेकिन इससे पहले कि मैं किसी तारे की तस्व
ठीक है। हमें कमांडर की गेंद को 267.5 की पिच पर, यॉ माइनस 4.5 पर मारना है। और उस समय हमारे पास 16 20, प्लस 00120, प्लस 26750, प्
كيلو 0.9 و 6.3. شكرًا لك. مربع واحد 
И функция EMS, DELTA-V, установить. Устан
Roger. E il T/M qui sotto dice che l'interruttore del riscaldatore O2 e H2 delle celle a combustibile si è aperto durante il passaggio del Pacifico e vorremmo sapere se Dave ha
Roger. Roulis 002,5, tangage
Okay, let us mull that one a minute here, 
And, 11, for you information, the magnitude of midcourse correction number 1, if we burn, looks like about 17 feet per second. We're presently considering 
I've go
备用发射器已关
Bene. E la prima cos
B
您的高度为 9413；速度为 
Что это за облако я в
好了，杰
ठीक है। बहुत बढ़िया। जब आपको फुर्सत मिले,
Apollo 8, Hous
わかりました。AC
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि आपको समझ आ गया होगा। पैनल 5: सर्किट ब्रेकर, मेन ए औ
로저, 휴스턴. 사령관. 잘 
Jim, Roger. Concernant votre utilisation du TC, et juste un rappel que lors des manœuvres, le roulis se 
11,
और
حسنًا. أعتقد أنني قرأت أنك جاهز. نسيت... سماعات الأذن. الأمر بسيط، كل ما عليك فعله هو إخرا
When you come up, I guess you're going to - once you get the powered up, you're probably going to be going - you're going to come up in a flashing 37, and if you'll just do 
Gemini 4, Ihre Blutdruckwerte sind eingegangen. Wir warten gespannt auf Ihren ers
好的。翻到下一页和最后一页，吉姆，34。页面顶部写着“通过4
Gemini 4，Gemini 4，这里是 RKV CAP CO
Ricevuto. Pronti. Vuoi tornare subito al bit rat
잭, 이건 전반적인 상황 파악을 위
Roger. Still reading you l
Okay. Mir scheint, wir werden dich jetzt raussaugen und hier rausholen. Ic
Ну что ж, хотите посмотреть ф
Eine pudrige Oberfläche, wenn die Sonne darauf sch
Canary, Gemini 4.
Джек, это общее утверждение. Похоже, температура понизилась примерно на 6-8 градусов по сравнению со вчерашним днем. Всё, кажется,
로저, 거
알겠습니다. 앞서 말씀드린 대로 모든 Descent 배터리가 연결되어 있고 ASCENT 배터리 6이 정상 전원 공급 상태라고 가정합니다. 먼저 패널 5의 회로 차단기를 확인하십시오. POWER-2 MAIN B, 개방; POWER-1 MAIN A, 개방; SENS
Хорошо, 11. Оказывается, характеристики двигат
好的，吉姆，你现在怎么理
ठीक है, जिम। हम 
ठीक है। डॉक्टर आपसे बस एक पल के लिए बात करन
Pas vraiment. Nous prévoyons de vérifier les chaudières à eau just
이봐, 잭. 저것들 중 하나 가져다
我知道你是。我很惊讶。
Jim, ti avevamo prenotato un pasto circa un'ora fa. Immagino che tu te ne sia già occupato. L'altra cosa è che vorremmo sapere per quanto tempo rimar
मुझे अभी-अभी 
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Une minute avant Carnarvon; à Honeysuckle 59 33. Term
다음 정상 연소의 ΔV는 96이
Houston, Apollo
了解しました、ジム。手続きはできるだけ早く完成させて、皆さんにお届けできるように努めています。手続きは既に完了しています。現在、CMS/LMSで実行して統合し、参加者の姿勢が適切であること、タイムラインが適切でリラックスした雰囲気であることなど、あらゆる点を万全に整えています。この作業が完了するのはまだ数時間後です。しかし、その前に全体のタイムラインと一連の流れをご案内できる予定で
Роджер, и я
Okay, Houston. Vor einigen Minuten war ich laut Datenlage noch völlig stabil, und seitdem bewege ich mich in Richtung des Radiusvektors, wobei ich direkt nach unten gerichtet bin, und das trotz einer Reihe von minimalen Nickimpulsen nac
Roger. Frank, stiamo ancora cercando di migliorare un po' la comunicazione q
E, Tranquility Bas
네, 닐, 이제 음정을 
Roger, Neil. Eine der damit verbundenen 
Для вас это станет новым дост
Роджер. 027 44 5363, минус 165 073 14 037 44 8016, минус 165 072 46; 046 44 6141, минус 165 097 03 055 44 8209, минус 165 096 4
네, 프레드. 제가 지금 알려드릴 건 사령선 연결 케이블에서 전원을 완전히 차단하는 마지막 단계입니다. 참고로, 그 모든 절차를 마치고 사령선으로 이동할 준비가 되면 케이블에서 전원이 차단되므로 연결을 해제
Хорошо. Температура на входе вторичного радиатора составляет около 70-72 градусов; на выходе радиатора около 30; температура испарения гликоля около 65; давление пара максимальное, давление на выходе гликоля около 9 psi. Температура в вторичных накопительных костюмах около 52 градусов; в кабине около 58 градусов; давление в костюме 4,1, в кабине 5. Парциальное давление CO2 чуть больше 1, около 1,1. На боковой стенке дома температура 72 градуса, гелий 3500; N2 A 2300; N2 B около 2450. Топливо около 165; топливный элемент 1, оба закрыты, давление нулевое. Температура кожи 405 градусов; показания на выходе конденсата ниже. Топливный элемент 2 — сейчас у нас показания расхода кислорода или водорода от 0,13 до 0,14, при этом расход кислорода сейчас зафиксирован на максимальном значении, хотя он менялся в зависимости от работы двигателей, что также привело к понижению напряжения на основной шине A от стабильного значения около 1,1 до максимального значения
冗談じゃない！私も同感です
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया ओम्नी चार्ली डाउनवॉइस बैकअप में है, और अगर आपको समय मिले, तो क्या आप मेरे लिए 130 के निर्देशांक ढूंढ सकते हैं? मेरे क्यू कार्ड और फ्लाइट प्लान में विरोधाभासी जानकारी है। मैं जानना चाहता हूं कि आप मुझसे कौन से निर्देशांक मानों का उपयोग करने के 
टीवी परीक्षण के संबंध में, मेरा मानना ​​है कि हम टीवी से स्वतंत्र रूप से, लेकिन उसी समयावधि या लगभग उसी सीमा में पृथ्वी की लाल और नीली तथा ध्रुवीकृत तस्वीरें लेकर इस प्रक्रिया को काफी हद तक समझ सकते हैं, जिस सीमा में हमने पिछली बार टीवी का उपयोग क
.
هل أفهم من ذلك أننا 
Juste une petite remarque en passant, Joe. On déjeune en ce moment, et je viens de me faire un hot-dog avec du ketchup. C'est délicieux et pr
Columbia, Houston. Avez-vous reçu une copie de données, faible débit, derrière la Lune? T
Hey, wir haben hier unten eine län
م
为了避免在与静谧基地通话时打扰您，我们将关闭上行链路的语音副载波部分。如果您需要我们，请
シグマ・セブン。言
J'
Ich wollte gerade sagen, ich wette, die Flugdi
इसे देखते-देखते मे
فريندشيب سفن، هذه كانتون. تشير بياناتنا هنا إلى أن كل شيء على ما يرا
し
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। इसे बंद 
ठीक है
11, Houston. I was looking at your bank Bravo nitrogen tank. It didn't leak a bit - correction -
ありがとう。マイク、15秒間で4回転のクワドジャンプを
Okay, Bill. Das kommt auf Seite 2, Strich 22 deines Flugplans. Für den Kommandomodul-Piloten – ich habe es ihm ja schon gesagt – möchten wir, dass er oben auf der Seite, ungefähr bei [Zeitangabe fehlt], eine Ausrichtung durchführt. Danach sollte die Navigation wie geplant erfolgen. Die vier Sterne sind Procyon, Regulus und Alphard. Wir wissen, dass Alphard kein optimaler Stern ist, Regulus steht etwa 3 Grad über dem Horizont und Spica hat einen Zapfenwinkel von 48 Grad. Wenn Jim also Schwierigkeiten hat, jeweils eine Navigati
那东西是从上面传来的。还有一股气流正从这边落下来。嗯，弗拉·毛罗机场那边就是老晨昏线了。我们
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ وضعية مُحاذاة محور الجسم، باستخدام خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار على الأرض كما فعلنا من قبل. وبمجرد حصولنا على ذلك، سننفذ -7، وهو ما يبدو الآن وكأنه احتراق بمعدل قدمين في الثانية أو حوالي 15 ثانية. وقد أُبلغتُ أنه انخفض إلى قدم ونصف الآن، لذا فهو ضمن الحدود الآمنة. حسنًا. عند القيام بذلك، سنبدأ فورًا المناورة للوصول إلى وضعية إطلاق وحدة الخدمة، والتي ستكون في مستوى الطائرة لأننا نُطلقها أبكر من المعتاد. لسنا بحاجة، ولا نرغب، في وجود عنصر خارج مستوى الطائرة. لذا ستكون في مستوى الطائرة مع توجيه وحدة الخدمة للخارج على طول متجه نصف القطر. سنبدأ بعد ذلك في تجهيز وحدة القيادة لوحدة الخدمة SEP، بما في ذلك فحص وحدة القيادة وإطلاق النار الساخن، وقبل حوالي 4 ساعات و30 دقيقة من الإطلاق، سنُطلق وحدة الخدمة. سنرفع الطائرة حتى نحصل على وحدة الخدمة في... ونحاول التقاط بعض الصور، لكننا لن نُجري مناورات تحويلية لالتقاط الصور لأننا لا نريد إفساد زاوية مسار الطيران في ذلك الوقت. حسنًا. هذا يُعطينا ساعتين تقريبًا من الوقت المتاح هنا للانتهاء، إذا تأخرنا في ذلك، للانتقال إلى قائمة التحقق والاستعداد لتشغيل وحدة القيادة. سنبدأ التشغيل الكامل لوحدة القيادة قبل ساعتين ونصف. سنُشغّل الكمبيوتر، ونرفع الطائرة، ونبدأ في إرسال بيانات الحالة، وما إلى ذلك، ومحاذاة منصة وحدة القيادة. بعد ساعة ونصف تقريبًا كحد أقصى، مما يُعطينا ساعة للقيام بهذه الأمور المتعلقة بوحدة القيادة، سنبدأ المناورة للوصول إلى وضعية التخلص. ثم ستبدأ في إغلاق... بالطبع، لم نُهيّئ نظام التخزين بالكامل قبل ذلك بوقت طويل. سنغلق الفتحة، ونجري فحصًا لسلا
ठीक है। पुष्टि हो गई। प्रतीक्षा कीजिए। आगे बढ़ने से पहले मैं बस यह सुनिश्चित क
11, Chris a dit qu'il pouvait vous
水瓶座号，休斯顿。我们认为我们找到
Roger. Also, set number 2, set number 2, change star number 11 to star number 
Why don't you wait just a little bi
A
Ok. Lasciatemi partire dal
彼らはジャックにコマンドモジュールの起動に関する
Bene. Dopo PC più 2, non ci sono requisiti di assetto; e, se si verifica uno spegnimento durante PC più 2, le successive manovre a metà rotta richieste con - Beh, la prima sarebbe PC più 4. Se non si esegue un PC più 2, ma vogliamo comunque farne uno - più tardi. A PC più 4, l'aumento di DELT - in DELTA-V, o 
كل شيء يبدو جيداً على الأ
برج الجوزاء 4، هيوستن، مركز الاتصالات. أعطني معلومات عن
Напомню помощнику директора по полетам, что мы не сможем считывать показания ∆V. Считыват
Okay, Ken. Ic
Well, look, if we load this one - if I put the film on this one, and take a picture or two, well, I'll have to take it back off again; that's the only trouble. I won't have to, but it doesn't stow as neatly. If you don't mind doing - powered descent with the camera in there, I think that's probably alright. Well, wait a minute, I bet I could put this one loaded where the ot
РЕЖИМ УПРАВЛЕНИЯ PGNS в авт
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। आप लेज़र पर अभ्यास समाप्त कर सकते हैं। हमारी दरें अब इत
... - 13; L
Обращаем ваше внимание, ч
بالنسبة لهذا النطاق، فأنت في وضع ج
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi, poco prima delle 5 ore circa, o verso, vi vorremo in assetto per un allineamento dell'asse corporeo, usando il terminatore terrestre come abbiamo fatto prima; E non appena lo avremo, eseguiremo -7, che ora equivale a circa 60 cm al secondo, ovvero circa 15 secondi. E mi è stato detto che ora è sceso a 35 cm, quindi è comodamente entro i limiti. Bene. Quando lo faremo, inizieremo immediatamente la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio del modulo di servizio, che sarà in piano, dato che lo sganciamo prima del solito. Non abbiamo bisogno, e non vogliamo, della componente fuori piano. Quindi sarà in piano, con il modulo di servizio puntato di nuovo verso l'esterno lungo il raggio vettore. Inizieremo quindi a preparare il modulo di comando per il SEP del modulo di servizio, incluso il controllo del modulo di comando e l'accensione a caldo, e circa 4 ore e 30 minuti prima dello sgancio, sgancieremo il modulo di servizio. Continueremo a lavorare finché non avremo il modulo di servizio... e cercheremo di scattare qualche fotografia, ma non ci impegneremo in manovre di traslazione per le foto perché non vogliamo sbagliare... rovinare l'angolo della vostra traiettoria di volo in quel momento. Okay. Questo ci dà 2 ore di tempo libero, più o meno, per finire, se siamo in ritardo, per passare alla checklist e prepararci all'accensione del modulo di comando. Inizieremo l'accensione completa del modulo di comando a meno 2 ore e 30 minuti. Metteremo il computer in linea, lo faremo partire, inizieremo a collegare i vostri vettori di stato e così via, e ad allineare la piattaforma del modulo di comando. Al massimo a circa 1 ora e 30 minuti, dandoci un'ora per completare questa parte del modulo di comando, inizieremo la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio. Poi inizierete a chiudere il... Naturalmente, non abbiamo configurato tutto il nostro stivaggio molto prima di questo. Chiuderemo il portello, effettueremo un controllo dell'integrità della pressione e a meno 1 ora, ovvero 141 ore e 40 minuti, sganceremo il velivolo. Non appena lo faremo, potrete iniziare la manovra per raggiungere l'assetto di ingresso. Una volta lì, eseguite un controllo delle stelle con il sestante, smontate l'ottica e a quel punto vi daremo il vostro pad di ingresso definitivo. Potete inizializzare il velivolo e, a quel punto, sarete di nuovo sulla checklist. C'è una piccola differenza rispetto al vostro ingresso nominale. Siete un po' prima al mattino, quindi andate... sarà notte quando arriverete. Tuttavia, siamo abbastanza fortunati da avere la Luna in una posizione perfetta per un controllo dell'orizzonte. Vi faremo un controllo della Luna invece di un
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Pas
さあ、ヒュースト
هذا هو الملف الذي أجر
Okay, and we're recording the time that that
روجر. نحن فقط نجرب شيئ
罗杰，11。中途修正的幅度仅供参考，但中途4号弹道下降了约
Роджер. Не мог
روجر. نرغب في معدل ب
Gemini 4, ti sento forte 
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्टन
Bene. Sul pannell
ジム、それはコピーしなかった。でも、君のCOMMはなかなか良いね。私たちの方はどう
Loud and clear now, Mike, and we un
Columbia, ici Houston. D
Al momento è quello che sti
Oui, tout à fait. Nous sommes prêts 
Base Tran
잠시 기다려 주세요. 
Good enough for Government 
ओह! ठीक है। आर एंड आर का डिब्बा तैरता हुआ आ रहा है
Узнайте у группы наведения, будет ли лучше выполнить маневр на среднем курсе с углом отклонения -4,8° для выхода в коридор на 14-часовом интервале, чем вариант с углом отклонения 
阿波罗11号。收
好的，我现在要在月球上做一个标记，作为偏
이해했습니다. 
Okay. OTTIENI B 9 44 00; Delta-V, 9 piedi al secondo; il tuo tempo di combustione è 0 più 15; imbardata e beccheggio sono zero; 
Roger
Roger. Los geht's – Sie können den motorisierten Sinkflug fortsetzen. Los geht's, 
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはコムテックです。UHFでもはっきりと聞こえま
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 ATS 캡콤입니다. 제 목소리가 어떻게 들리십니까? 이상입니다.
好的，好的，好的
Roger. Wir glauben, wir haben es jetzt richtig eingestellt. Wir wollten es nur noch einmal überprü
नहीं। मैं यह नहीं कहूँगा कि यह ज़रूरी नहीं कि कोई ऐसी चीज़ थी जो सामने आई हो। मुझे लगता है कि कुछ चीज़ें शायद पक गई हों या किसी तरह से ज़्यादा ठोस हो गई हों और शायद आपस में बह रही हों, मुझे नहीं पता। अब, दूसरे हिस्सों में, इससे पहले कि हम सामने की तरफ़ चलना शुरू करते, हम देख स
グアイマスさん、こちらはジェミニ4号です。この最後のものを閉じるために本当に大きな努力を払う必要があるのか​​
У вас г
Ro
Ne détaillez pas vos calculs; annoncez simplement vos adresse
…il n’y a rien à voir. Ça ne coûte rien d’essayer. 
阿波罗8号，声音清晰响
Ricevuto. A, cambia la stella nu
OAMS 電
休斯顿，我猜我们会用偏
Non, non, attendez une minute.
C'est exact. Nous souhaitons croiser les informations que nous recevons avec les vôtres afin de pouvoir, si possible, mettre à jour la plateforme. En fait, Jim, notre objectif est de déterminer si nous pouvons établir une liaison pour pouvoir mettre la plate
नमस्कार, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस, ह्यूस्टन। क्या ह्यूस्टन के आठ बजे का आ
I'm now in reentry attitude. Stand
프렌
That's negative. I did not open it. I won't open it until I get through with these readings. Phecda now extincts at 1.7 in the mid, in mid position between the haze layer and the earth. Okay, Woomera, my--my status is very good. The suit temperature is coming down substantially. Steam vent temperature is not down much, but the suit environment temperature is 60 [degree
Flashes out
Ruhe be
11, Houston. Vorremmo che tutti i riscaldatori fossero 
Apollo 8, keine Eile. Wir wussten d
罗杰，弗兰克，A区那个氦气罐——看来我们可能在这件事上不必要地打扰到你们了。据我们所知，它似乎没什么问题。我们召集了一些人讨论过，现在情况已经好转很多了。另外，我们这边有人怀疑吉姆瞄准的是22号星而不是02号星，所以他可能遇到
Roger. C'est exact. Le compteur affichait 6,9 quand on l'a éteint. La dernière fois que je l'ai vu, il indiquait 6,9. Frank vient de le remettre en mode 
Ok. Torniamo 
هل يمكننا القيام بدوران كامل بزاوية 360 درجة على هذا الممر في وايت سان
素晴らしいですね、ケン。でも、ちょっと問題があります。私たちの周りには色々な明るい物体が浮かん
아폴로 8
了解。コーパス上空での機動に必要なTRとジェミニロードを送信しました。キャッチアップ状態だったことを確認しました。オー
Hier ein Bericht von Harry Rosenthal von Associated aus Houston. Zwei Weihnachtsmänner verschönern dem zweijährigen Jeffrey Lovell den Weihnachtsabend. Der erste klopfte an seine Haustür und brachte Geschenke. Der zweite holte seinen Papa vom Mond zurück. Der erste trug einen roten Anzug und einen weißen Bart und rief laut genug, um es bis zum Ende der Straße zu hören. Der zweite war ein riesiges Triebwerk, das hinter dem Mond Flammen spuckte, und Tausende warteten gespannt auf die Nachricht, dass es gezündet hatte. „Bitte beachten Sie, dass es einen Weihnachtsmann gibt“, waren die ersten Worte von Apollo 8, als die Funkstille 15 Minuten später endete und die besorgte Welt darüber informierte, dass das Triebwerk seine kritische Zündung durchgeführt hatte. „Keiner von uns erwartet jemals ein schöneres Weihnachtsgeschenk als dieses“, sagte Ken Mattingly von der Missionskontrolle. „Vielen Dank an alle auf der Erde. Sie wissen, dass wir es ohne Sie nicht geschafft hätten“, antwortete Oberst Frank Borman, der Kommandant des Raumschiffs. In diesem Moment erstrahlte ein Weihnachtsbaum vor den Konsolen in der Missionskontrolle, und Astronaut Harrison Schmidt las der Crew eine Weltraumversion von „Ein Besuch vom Nikolaus“ vor. „Es war die Nacht vor Weihnachten, und weit draußen im Weltraum hatte die Apollo-8-Crew gerade das Rennen zum Mond gewonnen“, begann sie. Die Crew der Missionskontrolle hatte die Feier verschoben, bis Jeffreys Vater, Marinekapitän James Lovell, zusammen mit Major William A. Anders und Oberst Borman von der Luftwaffe sicher auf dem Heimweg waren. An jedem anderen Heiligabend wären die Familien der Astronauten zum Weihnachtsgottesdienst in der Kirche gewesen, aber dieses Jahr saßen sie alle gebannt vor ihren Fernsehern. Die Häuser in der Nähe des bemannten Raumfahrtzentrums waren alle festlich geschmückt. Die Rasenflächen rund um das Haus der Lovells und in seiner ganzen Gemeinde Timber Cove waren mit Lichterketten im mexikanischen Stil geschmückt, und die vier Lovells... 30. Sie... 00. Ein Auto fuhr vor, in dem ein großer Weihnachtsmann mit einem dicken Sack auf dem Rücken saß. Er klopfte lautstark an die Tür. Die Tür öffnete sich, und da stand 
Columbia, ici Houston. Pendant que je vous parle, vous ser
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал прини
Roger. Has he been
Roger. In 2 minutes, Ec
قم بتشغيل خاصية القياس عن بعد، ثم قم بإعادة ضبط الأمر إلى إعادة الضبط، ثم إلى الوضع العاد
Ok, Jack. Stavo pensando a un interruttore. Lasciami verificare
Да,
はい。Power 6 のパネル 11 の上の 3 行
알겠습니다. 이 점을 알려드리고 비행 계획에 어떤 영향을 미칠지 생각해 보시길 바랐습니다. 달에 대한 광각 영상과 설명을 다시 보여드리고 어떤 부분이 가장 적절할지 의견을 들어보겠습니다. 네. 프랭크는 진입 프로필이 표시되는 순서를 확인해 달라고 했습니다. 첫 번째 프로필은 "비출구 2번(Nonexit Number 2)"으로, 단거리 고속 진입 프로필입니다. 두 번째는 "3,500마일(The 3,500 Mile)"로, 역시 고속 진입 프로필이지만 장거리 진입 시 사용하게 됩니다. 세 번째 프로필은 "비출구 1번(Nonexit Entry Number 1)"이고, 그 뒤에 네 번째 3,500마일 프로필이 나옵니다. 따라서 총 네 개의 진입 프로필이 있습니다. 1번과 3번은 단거리 진입 프로필이고, 2번과 4번은 장거리 진입 프로필입니다. 콜드소크에 대해서는, 우리가 어떻게 할 건지 이야기했던 것 같은데, 대략 한 시간 안에 콜드소크 작업을 시작해야 할 것 같습니다. 12시에 바로 하고 싶지는 않죠. 궤적 담당자들과 물 끓이기 현상에 대해 이야기를 나눴는데, 그들이 궤적 그래프에서 물 배출과 물 끓이는 현상을 볼 수 있다는 점을 명심해야 합니다. 궤적이 심하게 교란된 것이라기보다는 그들의 계산 방식 때문에 그렇게 보이는 것 같습니다. 그래서 물 끓이기 작업을 해야 한다면, 모든 추적이 안정되고 중간 코스 수정값이 확정된 후에, 중간 코스 직전에 하는 것이 좋을 것 같습니다. 중간 코스 직전에 작업을 하면, 중간 코스 수정 후에 다시 추적을 시작할 수 있을 겁니다. 그러므로 누군가가 다음과 같이 제안한다면, 가장 중요한 순간에 데이터가 낭비되는 것이 아니라 컴퓨터 프로그램의
Roger, Gemini 4. Weather for S-6.
لا داعي للعجلة. سيتم تأجيل الأ
جيري، أنا قلق بعض الشيء بشأن درجة الحرارة. الجو هنا حار نوعًا ما، كما أن درجة حرارة مخرج المبخر مرتفعة حوالي 45 درجة. هل لاحظت أي انخفاض في كفاءة 
Okay. We have three cameras here, two of them to be used for
1 34 37. Wir wollen einen 5-Sekunden-Brennvorgang und nach vorne gerichtete Triebwerke ermöglichen uns ein
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्टन
好的，乔。我已经准备好复制那个给指令模块上电的步骤了，只要你想给我就行。你什么时候……我猜你是想把A电池从充电
असंख्य गड्ढों को देखकर यह पता चलता है कि इस ग्रह पर युगों से अनगिनत छोटे क्षुद्रग्रहों और उल्कापिंडों की बमबारी होती रही है, जिससे इ
D'accord. Suivez le point de repère 130 Prime; cela pos
Ich möchte Ihnen raten, den medizinischen Eignungst
Non, al
Das ist bestätigt. Ich halte dich mit dem DAP fest und messe die Totzone. Wenn d
Voglio solo scaldar
11, Houston. Dort ist jetzt ein wunderschöner Regenbogen zu sehen, wenn man die Kamera bewegt... Das sieht so aus, als ob
알겠습니다. 마이크, 몇 가지 더 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 지금 배터리 B 충전을 중단해야 하고, 착륙 목표 지점에 산발적인 뇌우가 몰려와 날씨가 매우 안 좋아지고 있습니다. 뇌우와 얽히고 싶지 않아서 목표 지점을 상류로 옮기겠습니다. 아니, 하류로 옮겨서 1,500해리 진입 지점으로 설정하겠습니다. 이렇게 하면 상승 기류 제어를 확실히 할 수 있습니다. 새로운 좌표는 북위 13도 19분, 서경 169도 10분입니다. 그 지역 날씨는 아주 좋습니다. 산발적 뇌우가 2,000~8,000피트 정도이고, 시야는 10마일, 파고는 6피트입니다. 호넷 전투기는 목표 지점까지 
안녕하세요, 카나리.
好了，肯。等等，我感觉你快要跟不上我的思路了。我得换个OMNI
了解しました。許容できるピッチ姿勢はどれくらいですか？ いつでもAUTOモードに切り替えることができます。ピッチは118度、ロールはほぼゼロ、ヨーは
Ques
了解です、フレッド。電源オフの準備ができました。変更
Cela représente environ 80 heures, en fait 82 heures, pour les deu
Роджер. Разделение 11 плюс 14 плюс 29
نعم، لديّ. فصل المكثف، وفي وضع التخميد الإضافي، وهو أمر ممتع للغاية. سأنتقل إلى وضع التحكم الإلك
맞습니
我
J
هذا جيم. وأواجه صعوبة بالغة في تحديد المسافة بيني وبي
Farò pressione sulla lin
Н
了解。こちらはフレンドシップ・セブンです。30分後の報告です。頭を動かしても吐き気や不快感は全くありません。太陽をできるだけ近くで見ることができるなんて驚きです。今は太陽が顔に直接当たっていて、眉毛で目を覆えばいいだけです。左パネルのヒューズスイッチはすべて、以前の報告通りです。モードセレクトは正常、自動、ジャイロは正常。スクイブは作動状態、自動逆噴射はオフ。手動以外の「T」ハンドルはすべてオンで、万が一故障した場合に備えてすぐに手動に戻せるように引いています。レスキューエイドは正常です。ランディングバッグはオフです。シーケンスパネルのその他の項目はすべて通常位置です。制御燃料は68～100パーセント、これを繰り返し、68～100パーセントです。EPIは私の
أتمنى لو كنت قد حلقت ذقني الل
프랭크
Okay. Would 
Это более точное показание уровня топлива, если я смогу до него дотянуться пальцами, то получится 78, 78 (процентов) - до начала реверса. У меня настроено выполнение реверса - автоматическое управление - после реверса я переключусь на электронное управление и подниму нос к оси входа в атмосферу - коррекция - после сброса реверса переключусь на электронное управление, подниму нос к оси входа в атмосферу и выберу кома
मैं सेक्स्टेंट के बारे में कुछ कहना चाहूंगा। तंग अंतरिक्ष यान में इसका उपयोग करना बहुत मुश्किल है, खासकर हेलमेट पहने हुए। मैंने अंततः यह निष्कर्ष निकाला कि हेलमेट पहने हुए तारों के लिए आवश्
نشكركم جميعاً من صم
ठीक है। आपको यहाँ 
22時間経過後、再びフライトプランを開始します。その時点で燃料カーブに戻ります。よろしいでしょう
That was SE
알겠습니다. 배터리 충전이 진행 중이고 폐수 처리 시설도 가동 중입니다. 3번 작업은 취소되었습니다. 원래는 초당 0.8피트였을 겁니다. 4번 작업은 현재
تم تنظيف خلية ا
Roger. Copy, Buzz. Got a couple of changes to your surface checklist here, and in general, what we're going to want you to do is, tracking the command module for one last hack on your position there. And this will be - in other words, P57,, and then to press on with the checklist, and the r
Nous avons reçu la charge, Eagle. Vous pouvez rétablir la li
वो चीज़ जिस तरह से चल रही थी, वो वाकई अजीब थी। पिच फायर करते ही मुझे हर 
잭, 우리가 9300만 마일 떨어
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 점화까지 1분도 채 남지 않았습니다
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نستقبل البث التلفزيوني في غولدستون. لم نجهز بعدُ كاملاً هنا في هيو
아폴로 13호, 휴스턴입니다. 약 30초 후에 통신이 인계될 예정입니다. 잠시 전
알겠습니다. 저도 그 방법이 좀 더 순한 방식이라 괜찮을 것 같습니다. 하지만 빨리 진행한다고 해서 그들이 얼어붙지는 않
了解
아니, 한 손으로 찰
アポ
ह्यूस्टन, जानकारी के लिए। मैं अभी स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप से देख रहा हूँ, और मुझे लाखों तारे 
Аполлон-11, Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон. Мы вас 
You can tell Chris I got bored racking around and I just decided to give 
えっと、ほら、これにフィルムを装填したら――フィルムを装填して、一枚か二枚撮ったら、また取り出さなきゃいけない。それが唯一の難点。取り出
收到。有一点需要更正。我们认为，改变姿态最经济的方法是使用最小脉冲
Нет, конечно, нет (кашляет) — конечно, нет. Мы показываем — мы показываем угол наклона около 15 градусов плюс угол тангажа и примерно 270 гр
罗杰。我们的T/M开关处于实时模式，ACQ处于命令模式
표
Ok. Potresti r
حسنًا، ليس لدينا وقت محدد لبدء هذا الإجراء بعد؛ نحن نعمل عليه بجد. لن يبدأ قبل عدة ساعات؛ وسنبلغكم به فور حصول
好的。你觉得
Roger, ich komme auf d
6, /: 45701, meno 040
Хорошо. Автоматические выключатели 16, автоматический выключатель усилителя мощности, разомкнут; COMM; автоматический выключат
好的。我刚才在想，我正努力尽可能多地往下面运东西。我们没有备用的，而且污水箱也快空了，你知道的，大概只剩40%左右了。所以我尽量让载重物（L）比载重物（D）多，如果有什么
分かりまし
Houston, Apollo 11. Ci fer
جيميني 4، مركز عمليات القيادة في هيوستن على أه
أفهم؛ لننتقل إلى التالي. مايك، نود، إن أمكن، ضبط توقيت التلفاز ليتزامن مع مروره فوق المدمر. نود تتبع المدمر باستخدام
शुभ संध्या। मैं आप सभी से अपोलो 11 मिशन की उड़ान के कुछ प्रतीकात्मक पहलुओं पर चर्चा करना चाहता हूँ। पिछले दो-तीन दिनों में अंतरिक्ष यान में घटी घटनाओं पर चर्चा करते हुए हम इस निष्कर्ष पर पहुँचे हैं कि यह केवल तीन मनुष्यों की चंद्रमा यात्रा से कहीं अधिक था; यह किसी सरकारी और औद
楽しんでますか？（V
分かりました。今後の作業については、引き続きお知らせします。最初のテス
Okay, Wassermann. Die Einstellung sieht gut aus, und du entscheidest, wann du mit dem Br
अच्छा, आपने इसे कितने समय तक रखा - क्या आपने इसे फे
That's affirmative, and we'd like you to disable quads Charlie a
حسناً، هذا صحيح. 
دائمًا متيقظ و... مهلاً، هل يوجد أي مسعفين هناك يراقبون الوضع؟ أحاول الركض في مكاني هنا، وأتساءل من باب الفضول عما 
Освободите себя, и я буду с замиранием сердца наблюдать, как мы зап
Houston, Apollo 11. Potresti spiegarmi 
우주복 물 밸브
Salve, Apollo 11. Houston. Vi informiamo che il vostro amichevole White Team è pronto per il suo primo turno e, se possiamo esservi u
برج الدلو، هيوستن. عندما تنظر من خلال نقطة التوقف الثانية في وضع الاحتراق الصحيح، يجب أن ترى الشمس عند الساعة 12، في منتصف المسافة تقريبًا بين أعلى نقطة التوقف ومركزها. ويجب أن ترى الأرض
오로라 세븐. 캔턴 상
रॉजर। बहुत बढ़िया, 
Tout est e
Okay. Brennregeln. Wir sollten den Brennvorgang abbrechen, wenn der Schubmonitor 77 % oder weniger anzeigt; 2. wenn der Treibstoffdruck unter 160 psi liegt; 3. wenn das Verhältnis von Treibstoff zu Oxidator Δp ​​größer als 25 ist (dies führt zu einer Bodenwarnung); 4. wenn der Lagefehler ± 10 Grad beträgt (außer bei Anlaufvorgängen). Okay. Die Ratenbegrenzungen liegen bei ± 10 Grad pro Sekunde. Außerdem sollten die Kontrollleuchten für die Triebwerksaufhängung, ISS mit Programmalarm, CES DC und Inverter (falls nach dem Umschalten der Inverter noch leuchten) aufleuchten. Falls das Triebwerk während des Brennvorgangs abschaltet, wenn die NOUN 97 blinkt, sollten wir PRO aktivieren, manuell Treibstoff ablassen, den Startknopf drücken und die Triebwerkssteuerung für den Abstieg aktivieren. Wenn wir keinen PC-2-Manöver durchführen, erfolgt unser nächster Schub mit PC-4 für zusätzliche 24 Fuß pro Sekunde. Wir landen dann mitten im Pazifik. Okay. Wir haben die Option für eine alternative Sinkrate bzw. Sinkratedämpfung, nehme ich an. Und der freie Rückkehrflug, auf dem wir uns gerade befinden – falls wir keinen PC-2- oder PC-4-Manöver durchführen –, landet uns um 152:02:00 Uhr im Indischen Ozean. Für diesen Schub gibt es keine Trimmvorgaben, und wir erwarten von Ihnen um 178 Stunden eine neue Uplink-Verbindung und einen neuen Anflugp
GET RC 25 15 58; RET 400K; 20 più 15.
了解しました。JETTについては、よく考えた上で、そのままお待ちいただくこ
Пере
क्या ऊंचाई अपरिवर्तित रहती है?.
사실 지난 12시간 이상, 어쩌
皆に、私は全く大丈夫だと伝えて
了解、コロ
ヘイズです。マイナスX方向に向かって流れてきており、いくつ
로저. 47페이지 1단계에 따라, 우리는 유도 제어 장치를 PGNS, 모드 제어, PGNS, AUTO로 설정했습니다. 물론, 아직 스러스터의 회로 차단기가 작동하지 않은 상태였기 때문에 DAP를 시작하고 46번 항목으로 진행했습니다. 지금 47번 항목을 보고 있는데, RCS TCA 경고등이 켜졌고, 나머지 8개의 빨간색 경고등 중 4개가 켜졌습니
Forza Houston. Qui 
Okay, Jim. Ho ricevuto il modulo di comando 356.65, 163.
稍等
Roger. Beides
ジェ
Oh, no. I didn't - I ha
好的。我查看了之前给你的天气情况——目标点附近2000英尺的散落云层上方可能存在6000英尺的破碎云层。在最大起飞高度点，情况也大致相同，而且整个靶场的高度计读数也基本一致。随着你继续
روجر. سأقوم بضبطها على الصفر عند فصل المر
Gemini VIII, Houston CAP COM. Falls Sie Zeit haben, tei
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा स
25 vorwärts, 8 links, 3 hoch, und ich werde 
Apollo 8, Houston. Je te reçois faibl
حسنًا، لا أستطيع الالتفاف لرؤية الشاشة. سأضبط التركيز، لكننا سننظر إلى أسفل متجاوزين إحدى الطائرات الرباعية وإحدى الهوائيات، بشكل شبه مباشر نحو مسار
로저, ATS입니다
इतना काफी है? बहुत बढ़िया! सब शून्य। ठीक है। चलिए इन्हें टॉर्क करते हैं। मैं इन्हें लिख लेता हूँ। माइनस 06, प्लस 64, प्लस... 7. टॉर्क... रडार सर्किट ब्रेक
杰克，你
Okay. We got Grus, and we got Jupiter in the right position. So our yaw referenc
Schutzschalter, Neigung 1, Gierwinkel 1, Neigung 2, Gier
シグマ・セブン、シグマ・セブン、こちらカノ・コム・テック。HFで送信中。聞こ
フレッド、あなたの言っていることを理解するのは困難ですが、あなたは私に何
Roger. Hai cancellato l'esercizio NA
没错，吉姆。我们只需要11号面板上的UPDATA LINK断路器闭合，然后接通ACCEPT，我们就
了解です。今、私に任せているのですか？その前にパワーアップして
友谊七号，友谊七号，这里是穆切亚通信
ジェミニVI。まだ約154マイル（約240キロメートル）離れています。GETは3～4時間0分0秒、
テキサスバ
Roger.
Roger. Sei a malapena leggibile. Ti consigliam
रॉजर
Это подтверждается. Питание нашего магнитофона включено, упр
いいえ、そ
Ça devait être quelqu'un d'autre qui essayait d'appe
Ос
जब हम हमला करे
はい。急がなく
Fred is now looking through our optical device. It's an instrument in which to aline our platform, and Fred is now looking into it just to see what kind of an outside picture he might be able to get. We might be able to use a TV camera to look through our optical instrument to the outside of the command module. A few minutes ago while we first came in, we did manage to look
Parfait. Merci. Je v
Ah, quindi. Okay, va bene. Grazie. Aggiornerò la mia lista di controllo. Non so perché aggiornarla, non so le
0.1度。GDCはおそらくそれよりもずっと
Хорошо, давайте попробуем получить точку в форме буквы Y или R на
ヒュース
ठीक है। हमें को
Хорошо. Спасибо. Мы по
Положение в порядке. Тангаж возвращается в исходное положение для входа в атмосферу, корректировка ретроградного положения. Нет причин оставаться в исходном положении для входа в атмосферу. Нет причин оставаться в исходном положении для входа в атмосферу, когда мы так хорошо видим в ретроградном положении. И это действительно то полож
Okay. In reference the early TV, we're losing the high-gain antenna now, and it looks like the only way we would have gotten the early TV pass in anyhow was to send it to remote site and look at it there. So we're going to scrub th
Roger. Zwischenkurs Nummer 7 /: 31600, nicht zutreffend, nicht z
ジョー、了解。ここから始めました。オプション3に進み、ディスプレイの
좋습니다. 시작해 보겠습니다. 목적은 자유 복귀를 위한 중간 항로 수정입니다.:; -0.021.3, +0.004.1, -0.031.2; HA와 HP는 NA입니다. DELTA-V 0.038.0; 0.031, 120, 298, -0.0213, +0.0041, -0.0312; NA. 그리고 GDA 각도를 알려드리겠습니다. 피치 5.86, 롤 6.75. 스로틀링은 10%로 5초간 유지
Ce coussin
Roger, Jim. Se avete un paio di minuti, vorrei leggervi la modifica alla procedura di ingresso che vor
ठीक है, 2 ब्रा
Roger, Bill. Falls ihr den Polarisationsfilter zur Hand habt, könntet ihr ihn bitte umdr
Roger, Jerry. Verstanden. Mir ist ein Unterschied aufgefallen. Wir haben die bevorzugte Option verwendet. Beim ersten Mal gab es Probleme; beim letzten Mal hat es wie erwartet funktioniert. Mir ist aufgefallen, dass beim ersten Mal die Option „Nominal“ angezeigt wurde, während wir 
Roger. I understand you see light from Perth. We'll have a radiator status for you in
好的
Пр
Houston, Apollo 11
여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. 다시 말씀드리지만, 제 방진복 흡입구 온도는 78
了解。さっさと変更して古いものを捨ててしま
독수리, 거꾸로 매
ठीक है। एक और बात याद रखनी है कि ब्लैकआउट कब शुरू होगा, जो लगभग 05g के आसपास होगा, और आप इसे अपनी चेकल
روجر. بيريسنثيان زائد 2، عودة سريعة، / 61503، ناقص 158، زائد 131، زائد 59578، ناقص 00086، ناقص 05
Ok. Ora vedo che la spia della batteria lampe
Oka
Roger. La combustion s'est déroulée comme prévu (environ 2 secondes); le résidu est de 4,4 X. Nous l'avons entièrement brûlé jusqu'à 0,2. Les attitudes sont nominales. Le C avant la prise en compte des résidus était de -2,4. J'ai transféré le vecteur d'état dans l'emplacemen
Ne me dites pas que cette boussole fonctionne? Je devrais en dire plus. Ce que j'ai fait, c'est utiliser une source de lumière standard. À ce s
D'accord. Bon, je ne sais pas si on peut continuer aussi longtemps, et je vais supprimer toutes les autres expériences, la stéréoscopi
好的，
음, 잭에게서 약간의 이득을 봤습니다. LMP 범위에서 높은 값으로 시작해서 CD
Хорошо, Майк. Конечно, это на случай, если G&N выйдет из строя, и вам
Qu
アポロ 8 号、ヒューストン。
Hören Sie. Ich möchte Sie b
Et, Houston, je dirais que, le long de l'écliptique, on peut observer la lumière de la couronne jusqu'à deux diamètres lunaires depuis cet endroit. La zone d'influence de cette lumière ne s
Houston, Columbia ha completato il controllo delle perdite e 
Roger. Dernières nouvelles de Luna 15: l’ag
了解です。まず主要なイベントの時刻を簡単に確認し、その後、戻って詳細を補足します。さて、進入インターフェースは142時間40分、つまり6時間半前です。そのおよそ6時間半前に、ヒーター電源を投入し、CM/の温度をチェックして、必要に応じてCM/を予熱することで、このプロセス全体を開始します。おそらくそうすることになるでしょう。詳細な手順は後ほど説明します。約6時間前頃に、前回の中間コースで使用した修正版/30分チェックリストを使用して、電源投入を開始します。その後、少し前、5時間前頃に、前回と同様に地球ターミネーターを使用して、体軸アラインメントの姿勢をとってください。それができ次第、-7を実行します。これは、今のところ約2フィート/秒、つまり約15秒間の噴射のようです。そして、今は1.5フィートまで下がっているとのことなので、余裕でマージン内です。わかりました。それを実行すると、すぐにサービスモジュールの分離姿勢への操作を開始します。通常よりも早く分離するため、平面状態になります。平面外のコンポーネントは不要であり、望んでいません。つまり、サービスモジュールが半径ベクトルに沿って外側を向いた状態で平面状態になります。その後、コマンドモジュールのチェックアウトとホットファイアを含む、サービスモジュールSEPの準備を開始します。そし
حسناً يا مايك
По
Sag es bitte noc
ب
ठीक है
Friendship Seven, qui Indian Cap Com. Qual è la tua mo
I now have both pitch and yaw - or pitch and roll going toward the designated amounts, now passing through 23 degrees in pitch, and I'm going up past 321 degrees in roll. And I am letting go that direction and when I get there, 90 i
Je ne veux pas simplement parcourir le ciel à toute vitesse et obtenir des taux élevés, car je n'ai rien pour les annuler 
Fred, abbiamo dati sufficienti; raccomandiamo a Jack di disattivare il TM e di riattivarlo, seguendo la s
— Il y a deux boulons en bas qui se sont desserrés — si je 
了解。OAMSなしで18-1、17、56、03。7+47。15+
Okay. Thank you. All right, the next little step after your water control valves is to perform the preheat. We
ヒューストン、スペースを空け
Роджер. Еще один момент: предоставленные вами данные о времени контрольных точек немного неточны, и, сравнивая эти карты, я замеча
Roger. formato, più 5: 0
Roger. Questo uccello è sempre
ठीक है। हमारे पास एक अच्छा
Okay. Than
Gemini 4, Хьюстон. Вы можете отключи
알았
Ja, und leider können wir, so wie wir aus dem Fenster schauen, durch die Sonne die Gier- und Rollbewegung recht gut ausrichten, aber es ist die Sonne, die un
Roger. Der Druck im primä
CB BAT
نعم. فندق إيريا، أربع ساعات و32 دقيقة
Roger. Nous sommes d'a
알겠습니다. 방금 몇 초마다 마스터 알람이 울리고 있었는데, 이제 희미하게 불빛이 보이네요. 일단
रॉजर। मैं ऑक्सीजन फ्यूल सेल को साफ करने की तैयारी कर रहा हूँ। क्या आपके पास इस बारे में कोई जानकारी है? और मुझे लगता है कि आप इन्
Affermativo. Ce l'hai con me adesso? Mi metto in mo
Base Tranquility, 
Okay, Gus. Ich habe nur noch eine Frage an dich, bevor du außer Reichweite bist. Wie ist das Fliegen da ob
जी हाँ। ठीक है, मैं अब इन्हें बंद कर देता हूँ औ
Roger. Nun zu Ihrem Neustart im Mondorbit: Zur Beruhigung der Computerfachleute und der M
Certo
Gémeaux 4, chirurgien RKV. Nous avons une bonne tension artérielle. Veuillez me donner une indication sur votre appareil d
I wonder. Our relative humidity i
Нет. У меня он не включен. 
네, 조지 씨. 페이스플레이트는 닫아둘게요
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 재정렬 작업은 잘 진행되었습니다. 저는 육분의로 별을 찾아 정렬하는 데는 성공했지만, 스캐닝 망원경에서 레고르나 멘켄트 같은 별을 관측할 때는 그 별을 식별할 수 없었습니다. 처음 지구를 관측했을 때는 지평선이 매우 흐릿하게 보였습니다. 하지만 지구의 지평선과 대기 사이에는 뚜렷한 선이 있는 것처럼 보였습니다. 랜드마크 시선 필터를 사용하니 지평선이 더 선명해졌습니다. 우주와 대기 상층부 사이에는 매우 흐릿하고 불분명한 지평선이 있어서 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 앞서 말씀드렸듯이, 태양이 가까이 있을 때 달을 관측하면 달 주변이 어둡지 않고 밝은 파란색으로 보입니다. 태양이 광학계 근처에 있을 때 육분의로 정렬할 때도 마찬가지입니다. 하지만 저는 육분의에서 이러한 별들을 찾는 데는 어려움이 없습니다. 별과 지평선 측정을 하는 동안 시리우스, 프로키온, 카노푸스 같은 별들을 지구를 배경으로 찾는 데는 전혀 어려움이 없었습니다. 세 별 모두 지구를 배경으로 선명하게 보였습니다. 하지만 나비는 그다
Я видел белый
Здесь, в Хьюстоне, вчера ваши три жены и дети собрались на обед в доме Базза. И, по словам Пэт, это закончилось бурной беседой. Дети плавали и прыгали в высот
Хорошо, Хьюстон, Водолей. На этом мы остано
هذه سفينة الصداقة السابعة. جزر الرأس ا
알겠습니
좋아요. 블록들을 지우고, "PRO VERB 96"도 지우고, 그다음 "PROPELLANT QUANTITY MONITOR, O
Okay. plus 90: /G&N, 63825, minus 1.54, plus 1.32,, minus 0491.7, plus 0000.1, plus 6634.0, 180, 228, 001; N/A; plus 0017.9, 6652.2, 7:37, 6626.5, 26, 155.4, 15.7; Zeta Sagittarius; up, 08.0; right 2.1; minus 22.81, minus 025.00, 1140.7, 34087, 32:14. Set starts: Arcturus, Denebola; roll 044, pitch 012, yaw 025
はい。特にあそこは、ロールロックが少し大きめ
Houston, Apollo 8
ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे हवा पेड़ों के चारों ओर तेज़ी से चल 
Roger. Aus den Nachrichten des Pressebüros: Apollo 11 beherrscht weiterhin die Schlagzeilen weltweit. Nur vier Nationen – das kommunistische China, Nordkorea, Nordvietnam und Albanien – haben ihre Bürger noch nicht über Ihren Flug und Ihre Mondlandung informiert. Ein Journalist sagte, ihm seien die Worte ausgegangen, um Ihren Erfolg zu beschreiben. Heute Abend wird Präsident Nixon das All-Star-Baseballspiel in Washington besuchen. Im Anschluss reist er zum Bergungsgebiet im Pazifik. Am Mittwochabend fliegt er mit dem Hubschrauber von Johnston Island zum Marine-Kommunikationsschiff Arlington. Am Donnerstagmorgen steigt er wieder in den Hubschrauber und fliegt rechtzeitig zur Hornet, um Ihre Wasserung mitzuerleben. Den Präsidenten begleiten Außenminister William Rogers und Frank Borman. Sie werden die Wasserung von der Brücke des Bergungsschiffs aus zusammen mit Admiral John Sidney McCain Jr., dem Befehlshaber der Pazifikstreitkräfte, verfolgen. Nach seinem Aufenthalt an Bord der Hornet tritt der Präsident seine Asienreise und seinen geplanten Besuch in Rumänien an. 
रॉजर। हम अभी केबिन प्रेशर को नियंत्रित करने पर काम कर रहे हैं, और CSM (प्रेशर इक्वलाइजेशन) के साथ डेकल पर काम कर रहे हैं। हम स्टेप 13 पर हैं, जहाँ हम केबिन प्रेशर के 5 होने का इंतज़ार कर रहे हैं, या लगभग 5 होने का इंतज़ार कर रहे हैं, इससे पह
我是罗杰。我认为我们的自动模式可能出了点问题。让我
Okay. Now, next, at about 105:05, there's a "." That should be moved up 
알겠습니다. 1A와 1B는 각각 6.5볼트, 아니, 24볼트 암페어
Хорошо. На шаге 5 в E-11 первый подзаголовок — «Шлемы и перчатки», а пункты, следующие за ним, зависят от того, одеты вы в костюм или в рубашку с короткими рукавами, но их необходимо выполнить. И клапаны возврата воздуха в костюме должны быть ОТКРЫТЫ для входа в рубашку с короткими рукавами. И вы должны
حسناً.
हां। जैसे ही हम मोड़ पर पहुंचे, वैंस, उन्हों
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 재정렬 작업은 잘 진행되었습니다. 저는 육분의로 별을 찾아 정렬하는 데는 성공했지만, 스캐닝 망원경에서 레고르나 멘켄트 같은 별을 관측할 때는 그 별을 식별할 수 없었습니다. 처음 지구를 관측했을 때는 지평선이 매우 흐릿하게 보였습니다. 하지만 지구의 지평선과 대기 사이에는 뚜렷한 선이 있는 것처럼 보였습니다. 랜드마크 시선 필터를 사용하니 지평선이 더 선명해졌습니다. 우주와 대기 상층부 사이에는 매우 흐릿하고 불분명한 지평선이 있어서 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 앞서 말씀드렸듯이, 태양이 가까이 있을 때 달을 관측하면 달 주변이 어둡지 않고 밝은 파란색으로 보입니다. 태양이 광학계 근처에 있을 때 육분의로 정렬할 때도 마찬가지입니다. 하지만 저는 육분의에서 이러한 별들을 찾는 데는 어려움이 없습니다. 별과 지평선 측정을 하는 동안 시리우스, 프로키온, 카노푸스 같은 별들을 지구를 배경으로 찾는 데는 전혀 어려움이 없었습니다. 세 별 모두 지구를 배경으로 선명하게 보였습니다. 하지만 나비는 그다지 밝지 않아서 북쪽 별을 이용한 백업 정렬
Okay. The purpose is a pericynthion plus 2 hours abort.:; plus 1633.0, minus 0014.5, minus 0751.5; apogee not applicable, perigee is plus 0020.5; 1797.7, 8:35, 268, 264, plus 16410, minus 00145, minus 07338. is NA. And I have two gimbal trim angles for you which will be updated. Right now, however, we want you to go with pitch 5.86, roll 6.75. O
रॉजर, सब ठीक से समझ आ गया। जैसा बताया गया था, वैसा ही समझ आया,
ठीक है। वह हिस्सा ठीक है, जैक। और हमारे पास कमांड मॉड्यूल के लिए लगभग 11 या 12 चरण थे। वे बिना किसी बदलाव के वैसे ही रहेंगे। और फिर हमारे पास स्टैंड
分かりました。そうします。まだ水に塩素を入れてないし、水酸化リチウムも交換していないんです。夕食の準備
Okay. Ich nehme an, das wurde Ihnen heute Nachmittag zugeschickt. Auf Seite E-8 sehen Sie, dass die Eing
स्टार्ट कॉम्प।
Okay. Sind Sie damit einverstanden, dass der CO2-Leistungsschalter beim Abwe
では、今すぐにその手順を
Apollo 8, si Anders a le tem
Es sieht ziemlich gut aus, soweit ich das ohne ausgefahrenes Fahrwerk beurteilen kann. Eine endgültige Antwort kann ich nicht finden, aber man könnte es nirgendwo so befestigen, dass man ohne ständiges Festhalten viel mehr aus dem Fenster sehen k
天哪，待在这些小型的、锥形的陨石坑里，一定
Ich habe
Alle 16:45 GMT, ho cambiato il nastro dal n. 28 al
并非如此。它从上市时的 5.8 psi
もっと良いことをしないといけないと思います。彼らはあらゆ
Davvero fantastico. N
좋아요. 9, 8, 7, 
Роджер. Купольная конструкция кабины работает оче
La zone que nous survolons actuellement présente des signes d'activité volcanique, même s'il m'est impossible de l'affirmer avec ce
휴스턴, 잭, 16점을 줄 거야. 그리고, 알았어, 1번 탱크의 산소 
確定です。パネル250の2つのブレーカーが開きます。パネル275の2つのブレーカー
Время ретрос
Roger, Friendship Seven. Veuillez indiquer la température des gaz d'échappemen
로저. 마이크, 고이득이 
ठीक है। 
罗杰。
Roger. Vitesses réduit
Okay. Ich wollte Sie nur darauf hinweisen und Sie bitten, darüber nachzudenken und die möglichen Auswirkungen auf den Flugplan zu bedenken. Ich lasse Ihnen dann die Weitwinkelaufnahme und die Kommentare zum Mond vorab durchgehen und sehe, welche Abschnitte am besten geeignet erscheinen. Okay. Frank bat uns, die Reihenfolge der Eintrittsprofile auf der Bildrolle zu überprüfen. Das erste Profil ist mit „Nonexit Nummer 2“ beschriftet und stellt den Kurzstrecken-Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt dar. Das zweite Profil heißt „3500 Meilen“ und ist ebenfalls ein Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt, der jedoch für längere Eintrittsstrecken verwendet wird. Das dritte Profil ist „Nonexit Eintritt Nummer 1“, gefolgt von einem vierten, ebenfalls 3500 Meilen langen Eintrittsprofil. Es gibt also vier Eintrittsprofile. Die Nummern 1 und 3 sind die Kurzstrecken, die Nummern 2 und 4 die Langstreckeneintritte. Beim Kaltstart haben wir, glaube ich, schon besprochen, wie wir da vorgehen werden. Ungefähr in einer Stunde wollen wir uns damit befassen. Auf keinen Fall um 12 Uhr. Wir haben mit den Trajektorienexperten gesprochen – was sie vom „Wasserkochen“ halten – und dabei ist zu beachten, dass sie die Wassereinbrüche und das „Wasserkochen“ in der Trajektoriengrafik sehen. Es scheint eher an ihrem Berechnungsverfahren zu liegen als an der starken Trajektorienstörung selbst. Wenn wir also das „Wasserkochen“ berücksichtigen, könnten wir es kurz vor de
罗杰。略低于
Il pilota coma
Okay, 05650. Dann Stern Nummer 1, M
네. 잠시 통화가 끊겼습니다. 당시 말씀하시는 태도가 좋지 않으셔서 제대로 응대를 할 수 없었습니다. 잭, 5분 정도만 기다려 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 추가로 몇 분이 더 오셔서 청취해 주실 예정이고, 이 절차를 마련하는 데 많은 분들이 참여하셨으며, 몇몇 분들이 시험 가동도 하셨기 때문에 나머지 내용을 안내해 드리는 동안 모두 함께 참여해 주
Radar e at
괜찮아요, 
- -... गति धीमी हो जाती है। सिम्युलेटर स
是的，时间很短，很快就过去
七、夏
Oui. Je ne sais pas si c'est une vibration ou quoi que ce soit, mais cela fait que les aiguilles de tangage et de lacet du numéro 1 sautent légèrement de haut en bas, là où nou
好的。第一个附加问题是，让我先把原问题拿出来，因为这个问题是“更具体地说是关于第2项”，而第2项是“在单级动力飞行期间，噪声振动水平是否有任何显著变化？”具体来说，请描述您在S-II型发动机早期关闭中心发动机期间的观察结果，以
D'accord. Nous vous devons toujours confirmer que le défilement rapide sera bien le premier motif que vous rencontrerez, et je vous tiendrai au courant dès que nous aurons une rép
罗杰
Я выдвинул/отпус
友情セブン。もうい
حسناً. حالما نجد الأرض، سن
Oka
— Et si vous pouvez effectuer cette vérification COMM
알겠습니다. 고이득 모드로 설정하도록 하겠습니다. 배경에서 들리는 소리는 아마 글리콜 펌프 소리일 겁니다. 이제 IM
好的。我想吉姆现在拿着它，然后——好的，光圈应该是 f/2
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन सीएपी कॉम है। हम पायलट के लिए 6 घंटे और 12 मिनट के अंतराल पर मेडिकल डेटा पास (टाइप 1) प्राप्त करना चाहते हैं। यह टेक्सास के ऊपर होगा। लगभग 21:28:00 Z समय पर। वह अपना मौखिक तापम
أبولو 11، هذه هيوستن. ذراع اس
마이크, 지금 A
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह यूएचएफ पर इंडियन कैप कॉम है। क्या आप सुन र
Le prochain cratère que l'on aperçoit en bas, c'est Duke Island, juste là. À gauche, le cratère Maskelyne W, le plus grand parmi 
Roger, Bill. We've got your dump, and the voice quality is very good. We we going to t
نعم، أتل
Ecco c
Сигма Семь. Подождите, мы
Джек, тебе ну
Roger. Se vuoi trattenerti ancora per 10 minuti circa, possiamo farti vedere un po' di TV con la Terra a sette ottavi. Qu
ومن الأمور الرائعة يا جاك، خاصةً بالنسبة لشخص مبتدئ مثلي، سهولة الحركة هنا. وكما تعلم من عملك في محاكي وحدة القيادة، فإن انعدام الجاذبية يُعدّ ميزةً كبيرة. لأنك تشعر بضيق المساحة عند مستوى جاذبية واحد، ما يجعل الحركة صعبةً للغاية، بينما الحركة سهلة في هذه البيئة. وكما ترى، كان المكان نظيفًا، وجدتُ بعض الحلقات المعدنية المفكوكة، وغطاءً بلاستيكيًا صغيرًا لكاميرا التسلسل كان قد انفصل ووجدته عالقًا بجوار لوحة ED. حسنًا. الآن، يقف جيم أسفل ما يبدو أنه علبة. ولتوضيح الأمر للجميع، يوجد داخل هذه العلبة محرك الصعود، حيث يمكنك رؤية يدي موضوع
Okay. The one proposal that sounds like it if we let Jim do his evaluation through the telescope, you do everything exactly the same except you turn and roll
ああ、ロジャー、アポロ11号。君たちを正行姿勢に進ませる。そして、君たちにお願いがある。今回の噴射ではマイナスXスラスターを秒速2～3フィートで使う。君たちのための燃料も
了解。Rev 55、No. 1、開
Okay, Houston. We'd 
Sobald das alles geklärt ist, Joe, werde ich wohl ins Raumfahrtzentrum fahren, mir einen ordentliche
ماذا حدث لتلك 
Okay, das waren drei Minuten und zehn Sekunden Sauerstoffzufuhr mit hoher Rate. Fünf Minuten sollten es nicht bleiben. Ich glaube, das ist zu viel für einen. Die Einlasstemperatur des Anzugs ist auf 64
Okay, Buzz. Zu den Punkten in deinem Flugplan, zunächst ein paar Aktualisierungen. Wir haben den Mittelkurs 6 gestrichen. Bleib einfach auf Kurs. Ich gebe dir heute Morgen etwas mehr Zeit. Zweitens: Wir sind bereit für eine BATT-B-Ladung, wann immer du sie einsetzen möchtest. Drittens: Wir hätten diesmal eine etwas andere Idee für die Abwasserentsorgung. Wir möchten sie an unseren Markierungen vom Boden aus durchführen. Die Flugbahn ist etwas uneben, und wir möchten die Abwasserentsorgung zu einem Zeitpunkt durchführen, an dem sie unserer Meinung nach in der richtigen Konfiguration bleibt. Es sieht so aus, als ob wir in 15 bis 20 Minuten eine günstige Gelegenheit dazu haben werden. An unserer Markierung möchten wir die Abwas
ठीक है। आगे बढ़ो, 
Хорошо. Хорошо. Прежде всего, общая философия заключается в том, что эти правила должны быть похожи на правила аварийного прекращения работы в режиме I с жесткими ограничениями. Теперь я пройдусь по ним по порядку, чтобы вы могли их переписать. Хорошо. Вам следует выключить двигатель, если произойдет что-либо из следующег
Non sono sicuro di aver capito la domanda, ma abbiamo ottenuto una buona p
أبولو 8، هيوستن. أقرأك بوضوح تام على نطاق S العادي. 
Négatif, Jack. Je réfléchis à la stratégie de rangement pour la rentrée atmosphérique. Devrions-nous – que devrions-nous laisser – sur Aquarius? Laisser les combinaisons? Laisser du matériel aussi volumineux que les caméras Hycon sur Aquarius? Term
鹰，哥伦比亚
روجر. نسخة
Apollo 11, Houston. Notiamo un aumento della velocità di rollio
Houston, hier sp
ज्यादा दूर नहीं। कार्ड वाप
Хорошо, похоже, что десятичная точка в R2 находится в крайнем правом углу, поэтому правильная нагрузка будет 06070. (Далее следует т
네. 지금 
Aurora Seven. Ici Muchea Cap Com. Comment lisez
알겠습니다. 저는 23번 오류의 2단계에 있습니다. 끓는 상태일 가
Questo è certo. Il motivo per cui stiamo disattivando la logica, Jack, è per risparmiare energia. Quindi la disattiveremo e la riattiverò quando sce
لا. لم أقرأ رواية أوديسي بعد؛ هل قام بضبط لوحة الاتصال الداخلي الخا
罗杰，给飞行员捎个信。道奇队
Роджер. Я вас прекрасно сл
أنا بخير. انتظر، سأعود. هذا الأمر يعيقني. الكبسولة - أودّ حلّ هذه المشكلة التي لاحظتها بوضوح في دائرة البدلة. لم أوفق كثيرًا في خفضها. سأرفع الإعداد إلى 8 الآن. أنا على الإعداد 8 الآن - قبة البدلة الآن حوالي 81 درج
Okay
Роджер. Я м
Roger. Mi è 
Роджер, «Дружб
Ok, ho un telescopio a scansione per la visibilità delle stelle che puoi prendere quando sei pronto a cop
Roger, je le répète. De 5 h 56 à 6 h 16, vérification de navigation orbitale, sans consommation de carburant d'atti
Under LIGHTING; FLOOD, open; TRACK, open. Under ED LOGIC - Correction, under ED: LOGIC, open. DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE, open. Under: SUIT FLOW CONTROL, open. Under row 3, COMM: DIS
Alle Einstellungen funktionieren einwandfrei. Die Temperatur im Hitzedom des Anzugs liegt bei etwa 72 Grad, die am Lufteinlass bei etwa 63 Grad und sinkt nur minimal. Definitiv
Roger. Ti ricevo forte e chiaro... con i piedi per terra. Ti consiglio di metterti in posizio
네, 맞습니다. 저희는 고객님의 의
Okay, H
Apollo 11, Houston. Based on our sighting since the midcourse, we're showing a gamma of minus 6.57. This is preliminary, though, and we think that after some more tracking it should come on in, and we could tweak it right on into the corridor. It's just about in the center of the corridor; everything's looking fine. We'll have you an entry PAD in a couple of hours before you go to sleep. And from our friends in public affairs, a few headlines, other than your flight. You're still dominating the news. However, there are some other things of interest for you. As I mentioned earlier, the All Star game was rained out. It's going to be played tomorrow. However, President Nixon will not be able to see it as he planned. We'll keep you posted on results. And, also, the weathermen are going to be good to you. Our forecast is, looks like it's holding good for the recovery area; it should be real fine out there. President Nixon, as he prepares to fly out to greet your return, predicted that within 31 years man will have visited at least one other planet bearing some form of life. "In the year 2000, we, on this Earth, will have visited new worlds where there will be
Roger, Jim. Capisco. L'abbi
我们最后一次燃烧的速度是每秒96英
And Buzz
好了，吉姆。准备好抄
أبولو 8، هيوستن. سألنا مجدداً، ويبدو أنه لا توجد أي مشكلة في تفريغ
Хорош
मैंने एक बार इधर हाथ बढ़ाया... और मुझे वह तस्वीर मिल गई जहाँ मुझे लगा कि तु
Хор
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Siete pronti per la separazione. La 
好的。我们还有一项改动，就是在那之后不久，
Im Grunde sah ich die Glühwürmchenfarbe, die Joh
Roger. Ihre Nachricht ist kaum lesbar. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, uns Ihre Schlafzeiten mitzuteilen, unabhängig davon, ob Sie das Gefühl haben, ausreichend zu schlafen. Wir werden dann 
Roger. For
Thank you, John. I guess that what I'm doing r
ええ。チャーリー、過渡現象は前回の噴射時よりも顕著でした。軽い司令船だったからだろうと片付けましたが
ジェミニ4、ジェミニ4、ヒューストン
Je dis, ce n'est pas inconfortable a
Okay. Frank, unser Vorgehen ist folgendes: Wählen Sie die gewünschte Plattform aus und gehen Sie dann zu ihr. Anschließend können Sie die Plattform ausrichten. Danach senden wir Ihnen eine Liste mit weiteren Informationen, und Sie können die Optionen auswählen. Dann können Si
Roger. Ich wiederhole es noch einmal: Die eben beschriebenen Anweisungen sollten dazu führen, dass die Kamera aus dem Fenster schaut und etwa 30 Grad nach links von der positiven X-Achse geneigt ist. Ich empfehle Ihnen daher, die Kamera frühzeitig entsprechend einzurichten. Sollten Probleme auftreten, melden Sie sich bit
À Houston, quand une st
좋아
Sì, è abbastanza semplice. Ok, vedo la Terra, quindi molto saggiamen
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, मुचेआ कैप कॉम। क्या आपक
Negativo, ma ho sic
Stai svanendo. A breve, in attesa di Canton. Qui è Woomera Cap
好的。在 276 号面板上：仪表电源控制断路器
Roger, a slant 
Molto b
يجب أن تكون
Une vive lumière pénètre par la fenêtre. Je ne sais pas ce que c'est. À cette heure-ci, le soleil devrait se coucher. Le périscope est noir. Je dois jeter un dernier coup d'œil à l'horizon, mais je ne l'ai pas encore atteint. La nuit tombe rapidement. Nous sommes maintenant du côté
Roger. Solo per tua informazione, nel caso in cui fosse successo mentre eri fuori servizio, l'interruttore generale di emergenza è ancora tirato e ora vediamo l'indicazione di malfunzionamento sulla batteria di discesa, 
Roger. Mannschaftsstatusbericht: Wasservorrat, Kommandant hat heute bisher ca. 50 Knoten; CMP 43; LMP 44. Wir haben heute bisher zwei Mahlzeiten eingenommen. Mahlzeit A und B für Tag 
Roger. Mieux, Mike. On vous entend maintenant à environ quatre secondes. Pas de son du tout tout à 
حسنًا، إليك الآن - للتأكيد - مُضخّم الطاقة، مُطفأ؛ جهاز الإرسال والاستقبال مُطفأ؛ مُحوّل التيار المتردد، 2، مُطفأ؛ والأخير في اللوحة 250، بطارية جهاز الاتصال اللاسلكي، مدخل/مخرج طاقة Baker، مفتوح؛ ثم اتبع الخطوات بترتيب عكسي لما أعطيتني إياه، ثم ارجع للخلف، مثلاً سأبدأ بـ MDC 3 UP TE
Vance, mentre Jack è al corrente, lasciami porre la domanda su come pensiamo di proce
Роджер. Мы только что закончили — мы как раз заканчиваем наш
Leave ATCA (PGNS) closed;
मेरे बूटों का नीला रंग अब पूरी तरह से गायब हो गया है और उसकी जगह यह रंग आ गया है। मुझे अभी भी ठीक से नहीं पता कि इसे राख जैसे कोको रंग के अलावा और क्या कहूँ। ऐसा लगता है कि यह बूट के हल्के हिस्से को ढक रहा है और इ
Wir sind alle wohlauf. Jim ist gerade mit den Vorbereitungen fürs Mittagessen beschäftigt. Bill filmt die Au
حسنًا. في الساعة 1، التقطنا صورة للهدف 90 وصورة لخط الفصل بين النور والظلام جنوبًا من جهة خط الفصل القريب. بدءًا من الساعة 2، التقطنا صورة للهدف 12 والأهداف 10 و14 و16 و19 و20 و21 و23. لسوء الحظ، تعطل الفيلم عالي السرعة - أعتقد أنني استخدمت فيلمًا عالي السرعة في مكان ما، وأعتقد أن تلك الأهداف ذات الب
Confermiamo con la
حسنًا. أردت فقط التأكد - كان استقبال الإشارة ضعيفًا عندما كنت أتحدث إليك سابقًا - أردت التأكد من أنك تفهم أن فحص الشمس الذي أجريته ساب
Apollo 8, Houston. Prévoyez-vous d'utiliser l
好的，完全没问题，我们估
उस चेक पर.
Okay. Weiter geht's – auf de
추가로 필요하세요? - 저희는 기름이 많이 있
Роджер. Скажем так, у нас не было никаких сомнений в том, ч
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Мы маневри
كولومبيا، هيوستن. أولًا، نود أن تصل نسبة تصريف مياه الصرف الصحي إلى 10% في الجهة الخلفية. ثانيًا، لا يبدو أننا سنحتاج إلى أي تغيير في الطائرة في الوقت الحالي، لذلك لن نقوم بربط أي بيانات جديدة. ثالثًا، أود ضبط جميع سخانات التبريد على الوضع التلقائي، ونحن جاهزون لشحن البطارية، بطارية برافو؛ ستدوم حوالي 7 ساعات. إذا قررتم النوم، فسنتوقف عن شحن هذه البطارية، ولكن في الوقت الحالي، يمكننا البدء بشحن بطارية برافو. وأخيرًا، بالنسبة لتكوينكم لفترة الراحة، سجل 1 هو 11111؛ سجل 2 هو 01100. ومفاتيح اختيار الوضع التلقائي: ألفا الرباعية، تشغيل فوهات التحكم في الميل فقط، تشغيل جميع محركات برافو الرباعية، إيقاف جميع محركات تشارلي ودلتا الربا
Non. Non. Je pense... 
Ha! Ha! Je parie que c'est le moment le plus amusant que tu aies
Bene. L'Apollo 11 rimane la notizia principale, con il mondo 
관성계 로저. 자, 2번 PAD로 가겠습니다. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, +166, -081; TIG 080 11 3603. NOUN 81: -01408, 모든 볼 -00743. 모든 볼 굴리기, 196 359 00657, +00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. 육분의 별 23 1160 138. 나머지 PAD는 NA입니다. 정렬, 베가와 데네브 243 183 012.
Выглядит лучше. Вы держите его примерно на 1 или 2 часа. Выглядит лучше. 
रॉजर। टीपी
좋습니다, 아프리카 최남단 상공에 불빛이 보이는 지역이 있는 것 같습니다. 확실히 도시가 시야에 들어왔고, 여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. 송신 시에는 음성 녹음만 했습니다. 아프리카에 있는 도시가 확실히 보입니다. 처음 나타난 건 몇 초 전입니다. 불빛이 아주 선명하게 보입니다. 현재 제 위치를 알려드리기 위해 후방 기수를 
Wir haben eine Giermanöverzeit für Sie, falls Sie bere
ありがと
Going to VOX record. Looking at the window with sun glow all over it. It definitely is a smoked pattern with streaks of light. Powdery deb
I understand, I understand your retrosequence time is. 
حسنًا، شكرًا لكم. هذا أحد الأسئلة الأولى التي تبادرت إلى أذهاننا. نحن على استعداد لتشغيل جهاز التبريد بالمروحة في أي وقت، وسنتبع إجراءاتكم المعتا
Houston, i crioconservatori sono stati at
Yes. I was thankful that we didn't have to make a ree
워싱턴에 있는 미 해병대 사령관에게 메시지를 보내주세요. 제가 이번 달 필수 비행 시간 4시간
Что ж, мы будем готовы, но не сможем, пока Джим не б
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। कृपया अप
Apollo 11, Houston. Würden Sie uns etwas geben
ASA 64 흑백 필름의 노출값은 13입니다. 노출값을 13으로 설정하고 필터를 사용하여 7번 사진을 촬영합니다. 남미 대륙은 날씨 때문에 사진 촬영이 어렵습니다. 이 시점에서 파노라마 사진을 찍겠습니다. 거의 8시간이 걸립니다. 실제로 그럴 것입니다. MARKT, 7, 8, 9번 사진은 흑백 필름으로 촬영했습니다. 총 10장의 사진을 흑백 필름으로 촬영했습니다. 사진은 250 F5.6(1/250초, f5.6) 설정으로 무한대 초점에서 촬영했습니다. 11번 사진을 왼쪽에서 촬영합니다. 이 지점에서 남미 대륙을 가로지르고 있습니다. 큰 강이 보입니다
罗杰
Sì. Jim sta arriva
Apollo 8, Houston. Mancano 4 minuti e 40 secondi. Vorrei una conferma del tuo interruttore AUX in banda S in posizion
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 아래쪽 사막에 모래폭풍이 몰아치고 있네요. 먼지가 엄청나서 어떤 곳은 땅이 안 보
जी हाँ, महोदय। यही नक्शा है। प्रत्येक तह के निचले या ऊपरी दाहिने कोने में अक्षर अंकित हैं (यदि आप पूर्व से पश्चिम की ओर बढ़ते हैं)। चा
了解。11月31日、SPS/G&N: 36691、マイナス061、プラス066 137 22 3985、プラス32838、プラス06845、マイナス02487、NA、ピッチ052。パッドの残りはNAです。リードバックの準備はできました。以上です
さて、バズ、カナリア諸島のこの品物。ロサンゼルス、23:36。飲料水ヒ
Okay. 10+55 per l'attivazione della droga e 17+10 per l'attivazio
Columbia, Houston. We've lost all data with Eagle. Please have him reacquire o
Wir haben
और 11, ह्यूस्टन। एक आखिरी बात। हम चाहेंगे कि आप अपने ओम्नी को ओम्नी, ओम्नी ए क
Puoi vedere l'indicatore di potenza del segnale del radar e leggere i
Roger. Understand you're on Charlie. Break. Verify your UP switch at COMMAND RESET is at NORMAL
Roger, vous avez largement le temps; il vous reste environ 7 minutes avant 
ジェミニ4号、ジェミニ4号、ヒューストンCAP COMオーバ
Итак, вверху
Roger. C'est très clair maintenant. Terminé. Et voilà un
جيمي
Okay. The next one, two, three, four, five
روجر، لدي فترة راحة للطيار القائد تبدأ من ا
Lascia che ti ch
Okay, ich sag's dir. Hol mir alles. Gib m
收到。这和我们看到的情
没错，他们
हाँ, ब्रूस, यह बात कुछ हद तक सही है। हमारे पास ये दो हाइड्रोजन फिल्टर हैं, जो तब तक ठीक काम करते हैं जब तक आप उन्हें किसी खाने के थैले से नहीं जोड़ते। लेकिन खाने के थैले में प्रवेश द्वार से इतना बैक प्रेशर बनता है कि
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। इसे रिवाइंड कर दिया गया है,
سيكون منتصف المسار مثيراً للاهتم
Небольшие колеб
Il va falloir qu'on trouve un moyen d'utiliser ces cart
Le contrôleur 240 semble-t-il réguler correctement la température de sortie de l'évaporateur de glycol? Il se bloque correctement à
正直に言うと
А ещё, как можно скорее, ознакомьтесь с Retro Attitude.
罗杰，格斯。我想大家都已
Okay, in the interim, Jack, I
No, non lo fa. Si spegne più tardi. Non capisco p
我怀疑它能不能装到
D'accord. Les suivants, deux, trois, quatre, cinq, six, sept et huit, so
C'était vraiment super. L'éclairage est excellent en ce moment. On distingue bien la fenêtre de gauche; il y a un léger reflet, mais du côté gauche, ave
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地。さあ、T3まであ
罗杰。副本，哥伦比亚，
जेमिनी VIII, आरक
Houston, Eagle. Are you going to need the high gai
Apollo 11, this is Houston. Two minutes to. Your on the other side is 80 33 21, and the friendly White Team will see you when you come
रॉजर। अब आपसे बेहतर संपर्क हो पा रहा है, वॉली। बहुत बढ़िया। ईंधन 62-62 प्रतिशत है, ऑक्सीजन 62-95 प्रतिशत है, एम्प्स 25 हैं। सभी सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहे हैं। कुछ समय से इंजन ठीक से काम नहीं कर रहा था। मैंने रात के समय इंजन को बंद और बंद किया, और अब यह ठीक से काम कर रहा है, हालांकि थोड़ी देर पहले रोलिंग के दौरान इंजन फिर से इधर-उधर बह रहा था। अब ब
... a
Роджер, Нил. Мы наблюдаем некоторое повышение температуры в ходе пассивного сейсмического эксперимента, которое немного превышает норму, и хотели бы узнать, можете ли вы подтвердить положе
我刚才跟你说的那些，你都可以擦掉。他们给
Ricevu
Houston, Apollo 11. No
好的。在启动设置下，第一行写着“自动选择，16，关闭”。好的，您可以删除这部分。第五行写着“断路器逻辑电源”，实际上是“逻辑总线，四个，闭合”。由于我们不会烧毁发动机，所以DELTA-V CG并不重要。“信号调节器/驱动器偏置电源”列为“两个接交流1”。我们将只保留一个，改为“信号调节器/驱动器偏置电源，一个接交流1”。倒数第三行的“电源”写着“电
ove
अरे, मैं उस कैमरे को उस डिब्बे से दोबारा बाहर नहीं निकाल पा रहा हूँ। अब तस्वीर खींचने का समय आ गया है। बेहतर होगा कि मैं इसे थोड़ी देर वहीं रहने दूँ
好
Bene. Sulla quarta
रोजर, 11. यह अंदर था और इसकी पुष्टि हो गई थी, और छोड़ने के बाद रीडिंग लगभग 0.1 से 0.2 
約45分の静かな休憩の後、ちょっと様子を見に伺います。ところで、高利得アンテナについてですが、ヨー角90度、ピッチ角マイナス45度の時にOMNIから高利得アンテナに切り替えることで、もう少し活用できるのではないかと思います。OMNIで10分長く滞
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。我们正在执行…
Okay. AUTO-Manöver, und könnten Sie mir bitte jetzt sof
أبول
Sections 1 et 2: Alimenta
Сейчас на горизонте, впереди космического аппарата,
Давай, Джек
Und, Bill
Oui. Roger. Très bien. Combien de marques avez-vous enregistrées sur l'
रॉजर, ताननारिव। क्या आपक
— Мы не настолько уж зависимы от воды, чтобы регулярно пить из этого пакета. Поэтому, пожалуйста, сообщите нам, когда достанете воду, и отметьте это на пакете, чтобы мы
O
Next item: request hydrogen tan
Potrebbe funzionare se dovessimo farlo, Fred. Al momento stiamo considerando un eccesso d'acqua confortevole attraverso il sublimatore. Stamattina stavamo discutendo tra noi di farti provare il trasferimento dell'acqua dalla bombola di risalita, ma abbiamo deciso di non farlo, di non co
我已经倒带过了
Okay. A maneuver pad on the: purpose is midcourse 5,,, is N/A, HA is N/A, perigee, plus 0019.8, 0.007.8, 0.15, the rest is N/A. 
Roger. Une dernière remarque: ce sujet ayant suscité de nombreuses controverses lors des réunions sur les priorités de données, il semble qu'une inclinaison de 10 degrés vers le haut soit optimale pour obtenir l'horizon et pouvoir suivre le point de repère à travers le télescope de balayage. Si l'inclinaison est davantage dirigée vers le bas, le tourillon 
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston, der Sender sendet
Das ist bejahend. Ich richte die Kapsel gerade neu aus und lasse die Gyroskope erst ein- und 
Aurora Seven，Aurora Seven，这里是Woomera Cap Com。读起来怎么
Ого, какой красивый 
了解しました。ダンプは完了し、テープレコーダーはあなたのものになりました。通話データの音声再生も確認しました。これでクリ
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है,
Ceux que j'ai aperçus à l'arrière du vaisseau semblaient nettement plus sombres; évidemment, vus de là, ils étaient éclairés directement par le soleil. On aurait dit que la matière avait été légèrement cuite et dispersée radialement vers l'extérieur, mais dans cette zone précise, cette 
D'accord, Jim. 
Va bene. Va bene. Al momento siamo soddisfatti della COMM, Frank. Stiamo solo cercando di essere
Roger. Kopie MAX g 6.3; R2 bei, 6.48; Reichweite bis zum Ziel,,
スーツの蒸気温度をもう一度教えて
All right. We'll be s
你好，阿波罗11号，休
Did they give Jack any more pr
Bene. Ci sono meno 15 gradi sulla Luna e sembra
没错，确实很拥挤。大部分杂物都堆在脚垫下面，我想我们重新登机的时候还得把一部分东西带在身边
في الصفحة 14، على الجانب الأيمن، بالقرب من الأسفل تحت "العلوم الم
Roger. Unser erster Kontrollpunkt liegt sehr nahe am Terminator, und während die Optik ihn verfolgte, konnte ich den Sonnenaufgang beobachten. Ungefähr zwei Minuten vor Sonnenaufgang beginnt sich de
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Votre correction de trajectoire en milieu
加油，瓜伊马
水使用量のプロファイルを綿密に検討しており、現在は の電源を入れたまま の電源を切る方向に傾いていますが、後ほど詳細をお知らせします。また、就寝時​​は1人監視員を配置することをお勧めします。尿の投棄は、ゴミ問題を悪化させる可能性があるため、できる限り行わないことをお勧めします。タオル、ペンライト
分かりました。分かりました。まず第一に、これらのルールは厳しい制限のあるモード I の中止と同様であるべきというのが基本的な考え方です。では、皆さんがコピーできるように 1 つずつ説明していきます。分かりました。以下のいずれかの事象が発生した場合は、シャットダウンする必要がありま
Ricevuto. Utilizzerai il fly-by-wire per il rientro e ti consigliamo di fare del tuo meglio per mantenere un angolo zero durante il rien
Roger. In Washington, the Senate Finance Committee has approved extension of the income tax s
这次我锁定目标了。它就在
Ricevuto, Jack. Daremo un
Pour le film noir et blanc, la valeur d'exposition est de 13 pour une sensibilité ISO 64. Réglage de la valeur d'exposition à 13. Prise de la photo numéro 7 avec filtre. Le continent sud-américain est difficile à photographier
Vous avez tout le matér
わかりました、ジム。断続的に電力が供給されています。さらに、パネル16のプライマリパワーアンプの回路
روجر، 11. هذه هيوستن. بعد حوالي 71 إلى 72 ساعة، سيتم إنزالك لفترة راحة، وأظن أنها جارية بالفعل. الساعة 71: تنظيف خلية وقود الأكسجين؛ الساعة 72: تغيير فلتر ثاني أكسيد الكربون رقم 6، فحص تدفق المبرد الثانوي. وسنرسل لك بيانات مهمة خلال ساعتين، مرورًا بنقطة الحضيض، ثم إلغاء وضع العودة. الساعة 73: توقف عند زاوية دوران 0 درجة تقريبًا. أي، عندما تقترب من زاوية دوران 0 درجة حوالي الساعة 73، نود منك التوقف. ثم قم بإجراء الخيار 3 المتبقي لفحص الانحراف. الساعة 73:20: سنزودك بتحديث لموقع الهبوط، ومتجه الحالة 1، وحمولة الهدف. الساعة 73:30: مناورة إلى 0 درجة في الدوران، والميل، والانعراج؛ ستكون زوايا هوائي الكسب العالي هي الميل 0، والانعراج 335. ثم نفّذ الخيار 1 باستخدام موقع الهبوط الجديد. استأنف خطة الطيران المعتادة بعد 74
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आपको यक
Neil, tutto questo c
好的。区域 27-2 96
了解。
We
शुभ संध्या। मैं आप सभी से अपोलो 11 मिशन की उड़ान के कुछ प्रतीकात्मक पहलुओं पर चर्चा करना चाहता हूँ। पिछले दो-तीन दिनों में अंतरिक्ष यान में घटी घटनाओं पर चर्चा करते हुए हम इस निष्कर्ष पर पहुँचे हैं कि यह केवल तीन मनुष्यों की चंद्रमा यात्रा से कहीं अधिक था; यह किसी सरकारी और औद्योगिक टीम के प्रयासों से कहीं अधिक था; यहाँ तक कि किसी एक राष्ट्र के प्रयासों से भी कहीं अधिक था। हमारा मानना ​​है कि यह अज्ञात को जानने की मानवता की अदम्य जिज्ञासा का प्रतीक है। नील ने कुछ दिन पहले चंद्रमा की सतह पर पहला कदम रखते हुए कहा था, "यह मनुष्य के लिए एक छोटा कदम है, लेकिन मानवता के लिए एक बड़ी छलांग है," मेरा मानना ​​है कि यह इन भावनाओं को बहुत अच्छे से व्यक्त करता है। हमने चंद्रमा पर जाने की चु
了解しました。会場の皆さんにアンケートを取りました。消耗品はそれほど多くありませんが、順調そうです。進入ガンマはマイナス6.01です。中間進入速度は毎秒2.81フィートと
ठीक है, फ्रेडो। यह पैंतरेबाज़ी पैड मॉनिटर पीसी प्लस 2 घंटे है; अक्षांश माइनस 21
حسنًا، ممتاز. التقطنا صورة جيدة لجيم هناك لدقيقة.
La Marine a invoqué ces mers exceptionnellement calmes pour vou
Die andere befindet sich bei 7
ここは良さそ
收到
ああ、すご
Думаете, я был настолько медлительным, что
Roger, Al. I am in auto; retro; the gyro switches are normal; maneuver is off. The capsule is prepared for retrosequence but for stowing two charts. I'm sure we're go. I have 81 percent auto, (fuel) 80 percent manual (fuel), which is the same as my intermediate report. They did not change. I have 52 (psi,
Roger, 11. Für die Optikkalibrierung habe ich 346,5 für Roll
Jerry, noch ein Identifiz
收到。Cape 
Nein, nur die Küste ist vernebelt. Der Rest ist klar und die Sicht unbegrenzt. Sobald ich Zeit habe, kann ich nachsehen. Hier unten gibt es einige Straßen, d
わかりました。ブルース、次は水分蓄積装置の活動についてです。0.85、いや、0.95くらいまで上昇してピークに達
Да. Мы это ценим,
Probably it was Doppler shift; 
ठीक है, जो। हमारी अंगूठी 1 50 
真不错。复古风基
Bene. Questo è un pericinzio più 2 per un ritorno veloce. Questo sarà / 62871, meno 161, più 129, più 45224, meno 06216, meno 18712 001 287 351, Novembre Alfa più 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, Terra in alto 010, destra 37, più 1475, più 06500 13239 36913; stella primaria Sirio, secondaria Rigel 129 155 010, nessun ullage, presuppone l'esecuzione della correzione di metà rotta 4 e utilizza lo stesso allineamento. Il tempo per 5 per la determinazione GERU - ovvero Golf Echo Romeo Uniform - que
I've taken two pictures on the S-6, and I believe they are right along the inter-tropical convergence zone. There is 
杰克，准备好进行E内存转储。我想我们大概
Wir haben bei Apol
نعرض -8 دقائق و
Роджер. У меня два замечания. Во-первых, треб
알겠습니다. 
잭, 물론 이 모든 일의 이유는 입구 배터리 중 하나가 20암페어시(Ah) 부족해서, 당신이 
Forza 
तो हमने अभी-अभ
休斯顿，阿波罗11号
好的，MARK。氧气
안녕하세요, 시그마 세븐 여러분, 안녕하세요, 시그마 세븐 여러분. 저는 칼 캡콤입니다. 지금은 방송을 내보내고 있습니다. 수신기에 전원 공급이 중단되었습니다. 지금은 방송을 내보내고 있습니다
よし、ジャック。ここで定期的に見張りと睡眠の時間を設けよう。フレッドは長時間起きていたので、交代で少し早く起きた。ジャックとフレッドはもう寝たので、
روجر، نلاحظ ضغطًا ثابتًا نسبيًا داخل مقصورة الطائرة. هل تعتقد أن
Hallo Mike. Wir können jetzt mit dem Wechsel in die OMNI-Positionen für Ihre Schlafphase beginnen. Bitte verwenden Sie folgende Einstellungen für die High-Gain-Antenne: Manuell, Strahlbreite breit, Nickwink
अरे हाँ,
حسناً. لقد قمت بتشغيل مفتاح الكمبيوتر ومفتاح الطاقة على وضع IGS. دعني أقوم بإيقاف تشغيل مفتاح الك
Хьюстон, Колумбия, находится в резерве системы оповещения OMNI Charlie, и если у вас будет возможность, не могли бы вы, пожалуйста, посмотреть для меня координаты точки 1
Sì, abbasta
温水フィルターに設置されている水素フィルターの一つは、食品用バッグを一つ取り出しても流れ続けるようです。流量はかなり
Хорошо. Управление положением космического аппарата: 0°, 
Oui, 
Gut, Jim. Du klingst heute Morgen gut. Wir möchten dir kurz die Sterne erklären. Wie du im Flugplan sehen kannst, sind die Sterne Antares (Nr. 33), Atria (Nr. 34) und Altair (Nr. 40) eingeplant. Antares liegt in der Ebene, die beiden anderen außerhalb. Wie du weißt, möchten wir e
المصباح
로저. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 밤하늘 지평선은 아주 잘 보입니다. 달이 제 뒤쪽에서 떠오르는 것 같습니다. 네
يا
الآن أستطيع رؤية
罗杰，很高兴你准备好抄写第6项了。在你抄写之前，我还有最后一句话要跟吉姆说。我们说的那个——或者更正一下——是他标记之后得到的那个。有两个“”，一个在标记之前，一个在
Н
Roger. 
로저. 30분 보고가 곧 나옵니다. 머리 움직임 테스트를 마쳤는데 아무런 영향도 없었습니다. 팔 뻗기 테스트도 했는데 전혀 문제없습니다. 방향 감각도 좋고 시야도 깨끗합니다. 움직이는 목표물을 응시하거나 빛나는 점을 앞뒤로 보는 것도 아무런 문제가 
Je suis encore un peu confus concernant l'activation du circuit secondaire. Vous avez indiqué de le désactiver 1 heure ou 5 minutes après la mise en service de l'évapora
罗杰。我的状态良好；燃油量分别为51%和69%；氧气量分别为84%和100%；舱压保持良好。
了解。こちらはフレンドシップ・セブ
L'attitude de désamarrage et l'attitude SEP devraient être identiques. Je
ヒューストン、最小インパルスで飛行しているんですが、データレートを一定に保つのがかなり難し
Okay. Really what this does for you, then, is it gives you a pressure - a tunnel pressure integrity - or a hatch pressure integary - integrity check with a DELTA-P of 3 psi between the tunnel and the cabin. And then you 
लेकिन मुझे दिखाई नहीं दे रहा... - मुझे पृथ्वी दिखाई दे रही है, लेकिन तस्वीर बहुत 
Okay. Es gibt heute Morgen nicht viel Neues in den Nachrichten. Es ist ziemlich ruhig. Di
확인했습니다. 27페이지 활성
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы действительно впечатлены четкостью и детализацией изображения. Ц
Черт, я сейча
了解。最初の軌道に間に合い
確認しました。次は、飛
Хорошо. Мы устраняем небольшую неполадку, которую обнаружили некоторое время назад в скорости потока кислорода,
알겠습니다. B 1 34 37번을 입력하세요. 델타-V는 2.9, 연소 시간은 0초 + 0.5초, 요각은 0, 피치각은 0, 주소 25는 90029, 주소 26은 모두 0, 주소 27도 모두 0, 추진기는 전진, 기동은 후퇴입니다. 들으셨
ठीक है, जिम। हम - हम इस बारे में बात कर रहे थे कि कमांड मॉड्यूल से बेहतर स्टार फील्ड विज़न के लिए आप पैड एटीट्यूड से अलग एटीट्यूड अपनाएँ, और हम 
了解しま
Batteries principales – nous les avons testées. Elles sont en bon état. Le niveau de C est très élevé, à 
You have to take your pants off and 
정장을 입고 진입하려는 이유 중 하나가 사
Quanto lontano pensi che fossimo q
Genau. Kein Problem. John Aaron meint nur, dass sie vielleicht heiß bege
ठीक है, जैक। आपको याद होगा कि पहले सभी ने चंद्रमा अस्त होने से कुछ मिनट पहले उसे देखने की बात कही है, और जब आप वहाँ पहुँचेंगे तब तक क्षितिज शायद अँधेरा होगा; आप सुबह जल्दी प्रवेश कर रहे हैं; और पश्चिम से आने पर भी आपको अँधेरा क्षितिज ही दिखाई देगा। तो, एक बैकअप तकनीक के तौर पर, जैसे आप क्षितिज को ट्रैक करते हैं, हम आपको एक एटीट्यूड देंगे जो पैड पर होगा ताकि आप सीधे चंद्रमा को देख सकें। यह एक इनर्शियल एटीट्यूड है; यह बदलेगा नहीं, और आप 36-डिग्री विंडो लाइन को चंद्रमा पर रखेंगे, और फिर बस वहीं बैठकर उसे देखेंगे। और ठीक पहले, पृथ्वी ऊपर आएगी और उसे ढक लेगी, और तब आपको क्षितिज का अच्छा अवलोकन मिल जाएगा। मेरे पास कुछ समय हैं, जो मैं आपको बाद में बताऊँगा। और अगर आप अभी इस चीज़ को देखें, तो उस समय आप सेटिंग कर सकते हैं या जो चाहें
用 F2.8 光圈和 B 门拍了几张照片。现在，照片在这里，一张是气球的。现在阳光太强了。这些小白点就是从阳光下拍的。它们是细小的白色霜粒。由此我判
还有，吉姆
Houston, Apoll
Ok, Fred-
フレッド、了解。機動目標はPCプラス2、今回はMPL（高度制限）です。そして、079、27、4013、プラス08144、マイナス00443、マイナス02226、遠地点はN/A、近地点はプラス00205、08455、420、268、261、プラス08155、マイナス00443、マイナス02187、はN/Aです。GDAは前回の燃焼からそのままで問題ありませんが、ピッチは5.85、ロール時は6.74です。アレージは10秒間2ジェット噴射です。スロットルは5秒間10%、21秒間40%、残りはフルスロットルです。ちな
Très bien, allez-y. Nous aimerions laisser le thermoplongeur allumé pendant 5 à 10 minutes pour analyser les données du contrôleur de température: les tem
Ну, именно его они и хотели, чтобы в
Jim, per quanto riguarda la finestra 5, ho un disegno qui; e, quando si è attraccati, si ha un angolo di circa 60 gradi tra gli assi Z delle due navicelle. Sembra che guardando fuori dalla finestra 5, si guardi il radar di rendezvous in cima, che, se si inclinasse, offrirebbe più o meno una visuale del modulo di servizio. Cioè, se si inclinasse, quindi - da - e credo che questo sia stato provato da parecchie persone qui; quindi, a prima vista, non riesco a vedere dove un'altra finestra sa
جيميني 8، هيوستن CAP COM. لديّ تحديث مناورة 
Jack, Houston. Fang nochma
休斯顿，这
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 배터리 A 충전에
Хорошо, я хотел бы показать вам это, пока говорю. Это работает как камера. Здесь находится регулятор диафрагмы, и вы устанавливаете его на f:22, что, конечно, пропускает минимальное количество света, и это мера пре
안녕하세요, 하와이, 쌍둥이자리 4호입
सूट के पानी के वाल्व को कम करने के 
GET is 2 plus 20 plus 00; the 
रॉजर, अब र
Fred, ich wollte dich nur vorab informieren, dass wir uns dem kritischen CO2-Wert des Sekundärbehälters nähern und diesen voraussichtlich in etwa eine
Roger. À votre convenance, nous souhaiterions vider la station d'épuration des eaux usées jusqu'à ce qu'il ne reste plus que 5 % de son niveau. Une fois celle-ci terminée, la prochaine vidange
D'accord, Jack. La pressi
D'accord. On va... On va juste patien
혹시 4번
Rog
جيد ج
Odyssey, Houston. L'ordinateur
Пр
Fred-oさん、もし実現可能だと思うなら、いくつかお教えします。排気口の写
Мы хотели бы ненадолго переключиться на S-диапазон AUX-ленты, чтобы вы могли прослушать запись, пока мы испол
ठीक है। मैंने सभी की कॉपी कर ली है
Хорошо, вот Денеб. Я начну серию 
E sei a posto. Huntsville segnala che hai una pastiglia propellente da 6 secondi, ovvero 3 secondi in più rispetto a un bossolo da 3 sigma; quindi sei a posto con i materiali di consumo. È così buono che non lo aggiorneremo. L'unica modifica che abbiamo per te è nella checklist. A 57 minuti, quando hai impostato la temperatura a 18 gradi, ti consigliamo di impostarla a 20 gradi, e ti consigliamo di cercare 8 gradi invece di 6 gradi all'accensione. La temperatura è al limite supe
Ecco qua. 6 - 5 - 4 
Roger, verstanden, Deke. Plus 80 Grad Gierwinkel, minus 80 Grad Nickwinkel
Роджер. Мы просмотрели графики и получили точно такой же ответ, как и вы. Похоже, ваша методика очень хороша; похоже, вы действительно хорошо всё продумали. Вы не забыли усреднить скорость. Мы также провели вычисления, чтобы проверить граф
Roger. Muchea Cap Com. Laut und deutlich. Sagen Sie Jerry, Gus, Lewis und allen anderen, dass ich mit „Hallo“ zusammengearbeitet habe. John W
P
Ok. Oh, sono Ke
Hous
Sigma Seven. In attesa di 
لحظة من فضلك، سأوافقك على ذلك؛ لقد نسيت. حصل بيل أندرس على حوالي 5 ساعات، وحصل جيم لوفيل على حوالي خمس ساعات
11, Хьюстон. Во время вашего запуска, запись которого воспроизводится здесь, мы заметили, что давление азота в системе Bravo немного упало сильнее, чем мы ожидали. Сейчас оно держится стабильно. Мы продолжим следить за ситуацией и будем держать вас в 
Роджер. Возмо
Звезда вылетела из ве
저게 16
روجر، سنضبط ذلك على م
Roger. Und auch Bereich 13-2 120. 2+33. 
Okay. Ora ho raggiunto un'inclinazione di circa 180 gradi, e vuoi che passi all'atteggiamento SEP per il suo 
Alpha/Pc から Pc、LAUNCH VEHICLE INDICATOR から GPI、GIMBAL DRIVE PITCH および YAW から AUTO、EVENT TIMER RESET から上、EVENT TIMER START から STOP、EVENT TIMER MINUTES, SECONDS から中央、POSTLA
أبولو 11، هيوستن. بناءً على رصدنا منذ منتصف المسار، يُظهر لنا مؤشر غاما -6.57. هذه بيانات أولية، ونعتقد أنه بعد مزيد من المتابعة، سيتحسن الوضع، وسنتمكن من توجيه المركبة بدقة إلى الممر. إنها تقريبًا في منتصف الممر؛ كل شيء يبدو على ما يرام
25페이지 오른쪽에 "태양 코로나 및 태양 가장자리 밝기 증가 사진 
Okay, ich möchte mal etwas zu unserem Essen sagen. Bisher hatte jeder Orangensaftbeutel, also jeder Beutel, in den ich Wasser gefüllt habe und der vorher Orangensaft, Ananassaft oder purer Orangensaft enthielt, ein undichtes Ventil. Ich hatte bisher nur einen anderen Beutel, der getropft ist, und wir sind schon seit über 60 Stunden im Flugzeug
Pensavamo di scaricare la CO2 nel connettore del vuoto qui nel nostro prossimo scarico de
Jedes Mal, wenn 
Vedo solo la forma rettang
Tranquility 
はい、そうしました。素晴らしい説明を受けて、この銘柄はずっと上昇傾向を続けると予想していたので、「上昇」から始めました。ところが、すぐにラインを超えてしまい、6～7%ほど下落し始めたので、まだ上昇すると予想していました。その後、「完全下落」に下げ、差を
J'ai pris une photo S-5 d'une formation nuageuse au-dessus du Pacifique, arrivant sur la région de Coastal Sentry, au Québec, à 0 h, avec une
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP
रॉजर। समझ 
А после того, к
Майк, сейчас мы видим дальний гори
好的，没问题。下一步是固定胶带。具体做法是，从胶带卷上剪下大约 2 英尺长，然后纵向撕开，这样就得到了两条大约 2 英尺长、半英寸宽的胶带条。将这两条胶带条大致垂直地缠绕在罐体上，与你之前用的胶带条垂直，使其横跨罐体的顶部和底部。缠绕顶部和底部时，注意要让胶带条位于中心孔的外侧，并尽量将其越过滤网之间的凸起，以免阻碍水流。明白
हाँ। मैं सहमत हूँ, जैक। जैक स्विंगर्ट और मैं थोड़ी देर पहले ऊपर गए थे और हम दोनों एक-एक कनस्तर ले आए थे। हम कुछ सामान ढूंढ रहे थे और सोच रहे थे कि इनका इस्तेमाल कैसे करें। दरअसल, यही वजह है कि जब हमने पीने का सारा पानी तैयार किया, तो हमें पेंट्री में रखे प्लास्टिक के डिब्बे की ज़रूरत थी। हमारे पास कुछ सामान के साथ वह डिब्बा भी तैयार था, साथ ही कुछ अतिरिक्त छिद्रयुक्त थैले भी थे जिनका इस्तेमाल हम कचरा नियंत्रण के लिए करने वाले थ
여기는 프
Давай, Хьюстон. Это «
Роджер, 13-БРАВО; 146, 03+32. 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 27 11. 56 46. 3+17, 8+36. 14-БРАВО: 04+07, 09+03. 15-БРАВО: 121, 02+34, 14 10 30, 8+35,
Я его пойма
여기는 휴스턴입니다. 수신했습니다. 참고로, 수산화리튬 용기를 포함한
여기는 프렌드
Ok, Hous
रॉजर। मैं समझता हूँ, लेकिन जब हम एटीट्यूड पर पहुँच जाएँगे, तो हम एलाइन बॉल पाने के लिए 400 प्लस 5 करेंगे, और फिर
在35号位置又拍了一张云层照片……是
了解しました。大きなブローダウンの約12分前に、小さな連続排気口が開きます。ブースターの推力は12ポンドか15ポンドであることに気付くかもしれません
Man öffnet die äußere Hülle, legt die innere hin
روجر، هذه فريندشيب سفن. أفهم أنك توصي بعمل نسخة احتي
알겠습니다. 페르시아만의 폭을 기준으로 말씀드리자면, 제가 직접 드릴 수 있는 정보는 단 하나의 국지적인 데이터뿐입니다. 바로 오늘 아침 휴스턴에서는 날씨가 맑았다는 것입니다. 이는 매우 국지적인 관측 결과입니다. 폐수 방류로 인해 기체의 균형이 다소 흐트러진 것으로 보입니다. 현재 피치 방향으로 약 20도, 요 방향으로 약 6도 정도 벗어난 상태인데,
Und Gott sprach: „Das Wasser unter dem Himmel sammle sich an einem Ort, und das Trockene werde sichtbar.“ Und es geschah so. Und Gott nannte das Trockene Erde. Und das, was sich unter dem Himmel gesammelt hatte, nannte man Meer. Und Gott sah, dass es gut w
ウォーリー、ラ
ठीक है। क्या आप विश्वास करेंगे कि मैंने आपको जो आखिरी कैमरा दि
... here... We're at 38 minutes and I noticed the thrusters are firing out the right side only. Now this may be a Platform Mode, or it could be 
रॉजर। बढ़िया र
मैंने इसे यहां वॉयस रिकॉर्ड
Entrambe le pompe del refrigerante sono accese. Le ventole della tu
Надеюсь, вы убедили всех очень внимательно изучить этот вопрос. Нам нужно идеальное состояние космического аппарата, прежде
I think we know what's going o
オーロラセブン。ハワイコムテック。読
알겠습니다. 
सदन की वेज़ एंड मीन्स कमेटी ने कल तेल कंपनियों, बैंकों और बिजली कंपनियों को प्रभावित करने वाले कर परिवर्तनों पर सहमति व्यक्त की, जिससे संघीय राजस्व में प्रति वर्ष 2 अरब डॉलर तक की वृद्धि हो सकती है। कमेटी ने टेलीफोन, बिजली, गैस और तेल पाइपलाइन कंपनियों के लिए लेखांकन प्रक
نعم، كنا ننظر إلى الخريطة، وأنت جنوب فلوريدا، لذا فأنت لست دا
You've got three more steps and then a long one
육분의에 대해 조금 말씀드리겠습니다. 좁은 우주선 안에서 육분의를 사용하는 것은 매우 어렵습니다. 특히 헬멧을 쓴 상태에서는 더욱 그렇습니다. 헬멧을 쓴 채로는 요구되는 별의 각도를 맞추는 것이 불
Хорошо. Вы смотрите на них в... У меня крен 8,47; тангаж около 0,
Это произошло, когда мы находились в комбинации «Агена-Космический аппарат» с координатами 0°, 180°, 0° и были стабилизированы в этом положении. Питание системы управления ориентацией космического аппарата и системы управления ориентацией OAMS было выключено, и мы отправили команду 041 в Агену, чтобы включить регистратор. В результате комбинация «Космический аппарат-Аге
Anche noi ti sentiamo forte e chiaro, Bill. Il p
Okay. Ich habe es nochmal gelesen: Sekundärspeichermenge überwachen; Sekundär-Glykol-Kühlerventil 30 Sekunden lang auf NORMAL stellen, dann auf BYPASS. Falls die Sekundärspeichermenge nicht abnimmt, Sekundär-Glykol-Kühlerventil auf NORMAL stellen. Sekundärkühlkreislaufpumpe auf AC 1 oder 2. Nach 3 Minuten den Sekundär-Glykol-Auslassdr
ヒューストン、グリコールの EVAP OUT TEMP が
好的，杰克。CB电池充电器至交流电源，关闭。稍等。好的。我得找个灯。CB电池充电器，电池充电，关闭；CB逆变器控制2，关闭；CB逆变器控制3，关闭；两个开关，主母线连接，电池交流，关闭；以及第二个开关，电池
좋
네, 괜찮습니다. 주문 내용에 대해 우리
Well, I'm reading 70 [degrees]. I'm really a little at a loss as to how to get it down, my suit---water valve is set now past the marks. This doesn't seem to being it down, and neither does putting it... negative. That's wrong. The cabin was past the marks. The suit temperature is at prelaunch value of about four. I'm going to go to a setting of plus 6 at this 
कॉपी करने के लिए तैय
نقطتان أخريان يا فريد. أو
알겠습니다. 제가 다 이해했는지 확인해 보겠습니다. 먼저, 랑데부(Rendezvous)를 위해 CB 16 인버터 2를 닫고, CB 11 AC 버스 A 버스 타이 인버터 2도 닫아야 합니다. 그런 다음 패널 14에서 인버터 2가 선택되었는지 확인합니다. 그리고 CB 11 랑데부 레이더 2도 닫아야 합니다. 두 차단기 모두 닫아야 합니다. 그 후 랑데부 레이더 해제 손잡이를 당깁니다. 패널 3에서 랑데부 레이더를 활성화합니다. 레지스터 1과 2에 모든 z
13号，休斯顿。我们现在看到您在自动模式下行驶。您的误差指针现在
자, 잭. 예전에 다들 달이 지는 걸 몇 분 전에 보는 게 좋다고 했었죠? 아마 도착할 때쯤엔 지평선이 어두울 거예요. 특히 이른 아침에 서쪽에서 진입하면 지평선이 아직 어두울 테니까요. 그래서 지평선을 추적하는 것처럼, 보조적인 방법으로 착륙 패드에 달을 직접 볼 수 있는 자세를 설정해 놓을 겁니다. 이건 관성 자세라서 변하지 않아요. 36도 창선을 달에 맞추고 가만히 앉아서 지켜보면 됩니다. 달이
Wir glauben, wir wissen, wo
我们有这个
フレンドシップ・セブン。了解。スイッチヒ
Forza 
- - e la guida del veicolo di lancio sembrano entrambe in buone condizioni. Sti
Hawaii. You're coming in broken. I cannot read you. I'
로저, 찰리. 저희가 OMNI D와 Delta를 교체했는데, 마지막 송신 내용이 끊겼
Affirmatif. Alimentation O2 du module de servi
Roger. Your break lock is due to the fact we switched our antennas over from Honeysuckle t
Gemini 4, командование Кейптауна в Карнарвоне. Я обновил ваш отчет о времени прибытия, они не получили действит
마스터스 대회에서 동점이 나왔습니다. 72홀 경기 후 리틀러와 캐스퍼가 동률을 
Error
D'accord, Jack. La Terre est repa
الجوزاء، الكناري. استعدوا لنسخ بي
你崩溃了。请
Я выбрал команды aux damp и rate. Окно почти полностью закрыто. В 
방송 시간에 맞춰 X축
Roger. E qual è stata la sequenza relativa nella selezione del separatore d'acqua numero 2 e d
Jack, per un po' avremo bisogno di letture dei volt della batteria e degli ampere del caricabatterie ogni 10 o 15 minuti circa, quindi c'è qua
बिल्ली का चेहरा शायद इसी तरफ होगा। ठीक 
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota quattro e stiamo lavorando al quinto giorno. Naturalmente, non vediamo l'ora che arrivi l'atterraggio di venerdì. Qui sotto, nella parte della navicella che chiamiamo stiva inferiore, abbiamo il consigliere del Presidente per la forma fisica, il Capitano Jim Lovell, che sta per sottoporsi a un programma di esercizi che svolgiamo ogni giorno. Notate che fluttua molto liberamente. Ha appena sbattuto la testa contro il sistema ottico, usato per la nostra navigazione. Sta lavorando con un attrezzo progettato per mantenere i muscoli in forma. Un'altra funzione molto importante della nostra navicella spaziale è il computer, e ho pensato che potesse interessarvi vedere cosa abbiamo qui, i display che ci forniscono tutte le informazioni sulla nostra combustione, sulla navigazione e sulla velocità che utilizziamo durante l'ingresso e il retro-fuoco nelle missioni orbitali terrestri. Potete vedere che è controllato da una tastiera, o qualcosa di simile a una macchina da scrivere, e le cose che entrano ed escono da essa sono assolutamente miracolose. Ha fatto un lavoro fantastico per noi, e Jim Lovell ha fatto un lavoro eccellente nel gestirlo. Ora un'altra cosa molto importante, sia che siate nello spazio o a terra, è mangiare, e ho chiesto a Bill Anders di mostrarvi come mangiamo qui durante il volo. Scusate la foto mentre ci spostiamo e cambiamo telecamera.
Nur mal so als interessante Anmerkung zu dieser Docking-Konfiguration: Die Dockingsonde des Kommandomoduls befindet sich genau in der Mitte – genauer gesagt, die Dockingleuchte befindet sich genau in der Mitte der Rastung. Und wenn die
今、プラスロールをいくつか
Этот вентилятор работает не так шумно, как оба предыдущих, поэтому мы оставил
그리고 저희는 내일 필요한 자료를 드리겠습니다만, 기본적으로 메인 버스 B는 정상일 것으로 예상하고 있으며, 이를 테스트
روجر، ١١. شكرًا جزيلًا. كان هذا أحد أروع العروض التي شاهدناه
ठीक है। बिल 
Okay. I was just w
ロジャー、ジム。騒音について何か対策がないか調べています。新しいサイトに問題があるのか​​もし
这个装置很好，因为它把地球放在 1 号窗口，把月亮放在 3 号窗口，把太阳放在 3 号窗口，
Es sah aus, als würde es oszillierend taumeln. Es taumelte eine Weile, und dann, als ob es rülpste oder Tre
Ro
알겠습니다. 따끈따끈한 소식입니다. 후안 카를로스가 어제(화요일) 프랑코 장군의 후계자, 즉 스페인
Houston, this is Apollo 8. We are going to terminate our program for thi
休
알겠습니다. 레트로파이어에서 어떤 태도 
Nur zur Info: Wir st
좋아, 물병자리야. 이제 배터리 충전은 
अब मुझे पेरिस्कोप में सूर्योदय दिखने लगा है। इस विशेष कक्षा के दौरान पेरिस्कोप में पहली रोशनी रात के समय दिखाई दे रही है। यह स्पष्ट है कि रात के समय रेट्रोएटीट्यूड में पेरिस्कोप का कोई कार्य नहीं है। मुझे जो पहली रोशनी मिल रही है, वह लगभग अभी है। सूर्योदय पेरिस्कोप से काफी तेजी से आ रहा है। मुझे वे प्रकाशमान वस्तुएं दिखाई दे रही हैं जिनका जॉन ने उल्लेख किया था, और मैं उन्हें गिराकर कुछ और बना सकता हूँ। मुझे निश्चित रूप से ऐसा महसूस हो रहा है कि वे एक क्षेत्र में हैं और उनका आकार छोटे से लेकर
Роджер, Аполлон-8. Несколько замечаний: мы рассмотрели ваши векторы состояния и всю предоставленную информацию. Платформа выглядит хорошо, и, похоже, вы можете обойти это ограничение, если хотите, ваша платформа останется работоспособной и при следующем проходе. Мы хотели бы получить в
कोलंबिया में सरफेस फ्लैग को रीसेट करने
Говорит
ऑटो रेट्रो-जेटिसन सक्रिय है। मुझे इसे बीच में रोकना पड़ रहा है
どうぞ
Roger. Sind Sie zufrieden damit, Ihre Einstel
Установить об
Der Manöverschalter wird jetzt deaktiviert, und ich werde 
بدّل بينهما. حسنا
Sì. Vai pure. Scusa, ho disattivato
ジェミニ4号、C
ポスト…ポスト後…PDI後…取り出せる場所
このバニースーツを着ると少し暖かく
C'est clair et net. Je me suis réveillé il y a environ 30 ou 40 minutes, et puis… en fait, je ne me suis pas vraiment réveillé tout de suite, je suis juste resté assis à me reposer. J'ai vraiment du mal à dormir ces derniers temps. J'ai bu un verre d'eau en me réveill
Ricevuto. Tensioni del
Where it says - where it says "And note," the CMP is located in the L shaped bag with the other two PGA's. The shield was jettisoned with the - Correction, the CMP's helmet shield was jettisoned with the, and his helmet and gloves, instead of
AUTO, AUT
Let's read you the lights we got on now; CRYO PRESS, FUEL CELL 1, FUEL CELL 
휴스턴, 질문 하나만 더 
了解。スーツは
弗雷德，你那天
제가 촬영할 파노라마 사진은 약 30~40피트(약 9~12미
... ये 
Au moment de partir, ils nous ont donné quelques angles REACQ que nous avons utilisés, et une fois le verrouillage rompu et le repositionnement effectué, eh bien, il est allé vers les OMNI et a attendu que nous soyons sur le point de rompre à nouveau le verrouillage, p
是的。我现
Might
Al momento sembrano u
It says perform housekeeping chore
第
रॉजर
هيوستن، أبولو 11. هل تريد إلقا
네. 최종 스코어는 콜츠 24, 
मैं सहमत हूँ। मैं र
카나본, GOSS 네트워크 컨퍼런스 음성 확인. 어떻게 읽으시
Roger. State vedendo la Terra, come la vediamo noi, dal nostro finestrino di sinistra, poco più di metà Terra. Stiamo guardando l'Oceano Pacifico orientale e la metà settentrionale della metà superiore dello schermo, dove possiamo vedere il Nord America, l'Alaska, gli Stati Uniti, il Canada, il Messico e l'America Centrale. Il Sud America diventa invisibile appena oltre il terminatore o all'interno dell'ombra. Possiamo vedere gli oceani con una netta sfumatura blu, vedere bande bianche delle principali formazioni nuvolose sulla Terra e possiamo vedere le coste, distinguere gli Stati Uniti occidentali, la valle di San Joaquin, la catena montuosa della Sierra, la penisola della Bassa California e possiamo vedere alcune formazioni nuvolose sul sud-est degli Stati Uniti. C'è una tempesta decisamente lieve a sud-ovest dell'Alaska, sembr
로저, 마이크. 데이터에 대해 몇 가지 의견을 드리겠습니다. 자동 기동은 상당히 정확했습니다. 기동 과정에서 준항성 지점을 포착한 것 같습니다. 자동 광학 장치는 카노푸스를 정확한 위치에 배치했고, 최소 임펄스 제어는 예상대로 작동했습니다. 제가 관측을 시작했던 고도에서는 희미한 띠 모양의 선이 분명하게 나타났습니다. 필터 때문에 지구는 주황색 빛으로 보였습니다. 별의 위치를 ​​정확히 파악하기는 어렵지만, 대기가 있을 것으로 예상되는 부분의 안개를 뚫고 지평선으로 추정되는 선이 보이는 것 같습니다. M
로저. 방금 3일차 A식을 마쳤어. 에드도 같은 종류의 식
We had lock-on at about 179 miles, and we got radar boresighted at something like 156; and the needles are relatively steady; they
了解。マイナス01713で、
Malheureusement, les valeurs n'ont jamais été reportées ici. Si vous regardez le tableau de Fred Haise, vous verrez une valeur à 11 heures, correspondant au niveau de bruit. Je ne me
روجر. نحن جاهزون لتشغيل سخان الماء الرئيسي
Okay, down at the bottom of the entry check right there where we are, the bottom line now reads, " MODE to STANDBY." Well, just above that - like to remind you to put a remark, "Do not initialize the range to go." This is because you're going to come into the entry check, you're going to run through all these things; then we're going to remo
इस समय कैमरे पर बड़ा बैक लगा हुआ है। बीच में एक ऐसा समय था जब कुछ भी रिकॉर्ड नहीं हुआ क्योंकि मैं रिकॉर्डिंग मोड के 
ठीक है। धन्यवाद। यह जानकर खुशी हुई कि सिस्टम ठीक चल रहा है। क्या आपके पास मेरे लिए कोई
알겠습니다. 모든 모드에서 컴퓨터를 점검해 보겠습니다. 점검은 세 단계로 진행됩니다. 먼저 모든 IVI 창
Хор
了解しました。セカンダリーアキュムレーターの量をモニターしています。ステップ2は、ラジエーターバルブへのセカンダリーグリコールを30秒間ノーマル状態に
नेवादा के रेनो में, एक छोटे लड़के के घर में चिमनी न होने के कारण, उसने स्थानीय अखबार के पते पर सांता क्लॉज़ को पत्र लिखकर कहा, "क्या आप कृपया सामने वाले दरवाजे का इस्तेमाल करेंगे? आपको नीचे से थोड़ा धक्का देना पड़ेगा क्योंकि वह अटकता है।" अर्कांसस के लिटिल रॉक में, क्रिसमस से पहले के सप्ताह और क्रिसमस के दिन तक सेंट विंसेंट इन्फर्मरी में पैदा हुए बच्चों को डिस्चार्ज के समय उनकी माताओं को बड़े-बड़े लाल क्रिसमस मोजों में सौंपा जा रहा है। यहाँ एक उदाहरण सर्
حسنًا، لم أكن أرغب في الاتصال أو أي شيء 
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 저희도 그걸 하려고 합니다. 광학계에 15개의 별을 맞추려고 하는데, 지구가 너무 밝아서 육분의에 들어갈 만한 별을 찾기가 정말 어렵습니다. 자동 광학계를 사용해서 별을 찾으려고 하고 있습니
Hanno raggiunto il limite di scansi
Okay. Brennregeln. Wir sollten den Brennvorgang abbrechen, wenn der Schubmonitor 77 % oder weniger anzeigt; 2. wenn der Treibstoffdruck unter 160 psi liegt; 3. wenn das Verhältnis von Treibstoff zu Oxidator Δp ​​größer als 25 ist (dies führt zu einer Bodenwarnung); 4. wenn der Lagefehler ± 10 Grad beträgt (außer bei Anlaufvorgängen). Okay. Die Ratenbegrenzungen liegen bei ± 10 Grad pro Sekunde. Außerdem sollten die Kontrollleuchten für die Triebwerksaufhängung, ISS mit Programmalarm, CES DC und Inverter (falls nach dem Umschalten der Inverter noch leuchten) aufleuchten. Falls das Triebwerk während des Brennvorgang
Okay, Ja
जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, वैंस, लगभग आधे घंटे पहले, जैक और मैं अंतरिक्ष यान की कुछ खास स्थितियों में तारामंडल नहीं देख पा रहे थे। हम वृश्चिक और धनु तारामंडल देख पा रहे थे, और अल्टेयर, एक्रक्स, अल्फा सेंटुरी, वेगा जैसे
休斯顿，阿波罗8号。
Хорошо. Мы копируем ширину Персидского залива, и, полагаю, всё, что я могу вам 
Покрытие на обертках имбирных пряников. На вкус оно очень восковое, и... обволакивает внутреннюю 
알겠습니다. 두 개를 건너뛰고, 그다음에는 연료 전지 3 메인 버스 A를 회색으로 토크백하고 싶습니다. 이상입니
はい。大丈夫です
알았어, 잭. 
Nous somm
П
D'accord. Très bien. Disons qu'il y a aussi une cartouche primaire 
Roger. Sie sehen die Erde, so wie wir sie sehen, durch unser linkes Fenster – etwas mehr als die Hälfte der Erde. Wir blicken auf den östlichen Pazifik und die nördliche Hälfte des oberen Bildschirmbereichs. Dort sehen wir Nordamerika, Alaska, die Vereinigten Staaten, Kanada, Mexiko und Mittelamerika. Südamerika verschwindet knapp jenseits des Terminators oder im Schatten. Die Ozeane erscheinen deutlich blau, weiße Bänder großer Wolkenformationen ziehen über die Erde, und wir können Küstenlinien erkennen. Wir können den Westen der USA, das San Joaquin Valley, die Sierra Nevada, die Halbinsel Baja California und einige Wolkenformationen über dem Südosten der USA ausmachen. Südwestlich von Alaska zieht ein schwaches Gewitter auf, etwa 800 bis 1600 Kilometer entfernt, und ein weiteres, sehr schwaches Gewitter ist am südlichen Bildschirmrand in der Nähe des Äquators – oder weit entfernt davon, wahrscheinlich bei 45 Grad südlicher Breite – zu sehen. Die Brauntöne der Landformen sind gut erkennbar. Grüntöne sind nicht sehr gut zu erkennen. Vereinzelt sind Grüntöne entlang
यह 
Роджер, понял. Согласно плану полета, ты должен был перейти в режим FBW п
Okay, Houston; 13. Zur Beantwortung von Frage 1: Die Än
Okay. As of, your batteries - you had battery A with 39.32 amp-hours, battery B had 35.21, and battery C 38.46. Your cryo quantities remaining at were the same we gave you the last time, 180 pounds of oxygen per tank and 11 pounds of hydrogen per tank. At present, the service module, using the computer values for the quantities, you have quad A with 45 percent, Bravo with 50,
Der Kollege neben Ihnen
不，我根本就没试过。我什么都没做。我还被困住
Okay, thanks. The people back in Houston would like some kind of a spare moment to try and describe on your onboard voice tape recorder everything you remember that happened on you
Noch eine Anmerkung zur Optik. Wir befinden uns gerade im Flug. Wir passieren die M-Linie – wir haben eine Rollwinkel von etwa 182°, einen Nickwinkel von etwa 226° und einen Gierwinkel von 18°. Ich kann die Welle in dieser Position komplett drehen und erhalte dabei einen Lichtstreifen etwa 10° von dieser Seite der M-Linie. Seine Intensität variiert mit der Wellenposition. Er ist jedoch in dieser Position vorhand
罗
随时向宇航员汇报恢复
Sì, è affermativo. Fai INVIO invece di PROCEDERE.
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。我已经准备好了你们的TLI+90
Теперь я понимаю, что вы имеете в виду, когда говорите, что э
Fred, non vediamo niente di strano. Per esempio, la tua SHe sembra stare bene, per quanto ne sappiamo. La cosa su cui non abbiamo dati è... il serbatoi
*** एक दिशा में मेरा संतुलन बिगड़ने ही 
了解
Apollo 11 CDR, qui Houston. Controllo radio. Pa
أنت الآن في 
Frank, tutto indica che non ci sono assolutamente problemi con la memoria del computer, a parte la matri
Forz
Нет, очень близко. Я сделал резервную копию и прове
Wir werden es ruhig angehen lassen, aber ich – und wir werden ver
Okay, im Vergleich 
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호 휴스턴입니다. 연소 과정에서
了解。メインレグを2つ
D'accord. Lorsque nous avons 
ठीक है। यह सही है। प
C4 ist aus; B3 ist aus. Der Transponder ist auf HEIZUNG eingestellt, was dass
We have not received a blood pressure or a
好的，视力很好。我看视
좋습니다. + 00068, + 00000, + 46420 178 134 001, 해당 없음, + 00202 46420 547 46211. 이해하셨나요
Okay. For today, we'd like you on to make a trunnion bias determination, prior to sightings as called out in procedures, and also one afterwards. Our intent here is to check out the possibility that some sort of thermal effect may be giving you errors in the angular read-out in the sextant. The bias that you get beforehand should be incorporated, that is a PROCEED on NOUN 87 after you get two consecutive measurements equal to within 0.003 degrees. And, of course, move the trunnion off a couple of degrees between the measurements. The Earth should be a lot smaller in your field of view today. I'm, sure you're a lot more qualified to tell us about that than we are, but to ensure that you're getting a good angle measurement between the star and the Earth horizon, the sextant M-line, which is the line that runs through the two hash marks and is perpendicular to the R-line, should be parallel to the Earth horizon at the substellar point. And then the actual superimposition of the star upon the horizon can be made at any point in
Roger. Können Sie bitte bestätigen, dass der Schalter für das Landekissen ausg
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 비행 계획에 나와 있는 자세 각도를 여기 있는 장비들을 통해 계산해 봤는데 매번 같은 결과가 나왔습니다. 마이크, 모든 게 정상적으로 진행되고 있는 것 같은데, 혹시 비대칭
Roger, Elliot. We are... first burn i
Roger, Buzz. Falls ihr – falls ihr möchte
Здравствуйте, Вумера, Вумера Кэп Ком, это Аврора Сев
알겠습니다. 다음 테스트는 업링크 음성 및 거리 측정과 다운링크 음성 및 거리 측정을 저비트 전송률에서 진행하는 테스트
UP TEL BLOCK and the computer 
حسنًا. نود - يقول فريق SPAN إن الأمر يبدو كذلك - يعتقدون أن أحدهما سيوضع على الخوذة التي ستضعها في B1، ويمكنك وضع الآخر على خو
Ok, Jack. Sembra che probabilmente non vorremo acce
रॉजर। उन्हें यह सत्यापित करने में परेशानी हो रही है कि हाई गेन ठीक से काम कर रहा है या नहीं। जैसे कि यह सत्यापित करन
Hawaii Cap Com, I will start a standard report for you. I am in auto retroattitude. I have gyros normal, maneuver off, all systems are green, and go for the
Roger. La serie di crepe o faglie che le attraversano scende di circa tre gradini verso sud. La faglia parallela a nord presenta un dislivello al centro. Spero che tutti voi laggiù sulla Terra possiate capire cosa intendiamo quando diciamo che si tratta di un orizzonte piuttosto minaccioso, un luogo piuttosto buio e dall'aspetto poco invitante. Ora stiamo sorvolando uno dei nostri futuri siti di atterraggio, selezionato in questa regione liscia, chiamata Mare della Tranquillità, liscia per facilitare i primi tentativi di atterraggio ed evitare di dover schivare le montagne. Ora potete vedere le lunghe ombre dell'alba lunare. Ci stiamo avvicinando all'alba lunare e, per tutti voi sulla Terra, l'equipaggio dell'Apollo 8 ha un me
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul p
이 자세에서는 확실히 머리 위를 올려다보는 듯한 착각이 들고, 지평선이 보이지 않으면 그냥 칠흑 같은 하늘뿐입니다. 조종실 조명은 상당히 밝습니다. 물론 적응하고 나면 객실 조명으로 줄일 수는 있겠지만, 지금은 우주복 회로 문제 때문에 조명을 낮추기가 좀 꺼려집니다. 손가락에 끼우는 손전등을 아낌없이 사용하고 있습니다. 앞으로 비행할 때는 물건들을 담아 일정 시간 동안 가둬둘 수 있는 장치가 필요할 것 같습니다. 저는 와셔와 작은 금속 조각 문제를 해결하려고 애쓰고 있습니다. 음... 드디어 그것들을 해치에 있는 작은 가방에
حسناً. تم وضع كاميرا 
夏威夷地面控制中心，我将开始向您提交一份标准报告。我已进入自
मुझे लगता है हमें कुछ बेहतर करना होगा। 
حسنًا. حسنًا، هل يمكنك التفكير في 
Roger. Das setzt allerdings voraus, dass ein ge
جاك، انتظر لحظة.
Roger. Hai ricevuto la mia ultima risposta? Houston ti 
11, Houston. Le balayage de la caméra… c'est un peu mieux maintenant. La lampe 
11，休斯顿。我们建议您禁用 Bravo 和 Charlie；选择 Alfa 和 Delta 四轴
आपको कुछ... उतार
罗杰。我的状态良好；燃油量分别为51%和69%；氧气量分别为84%和100%；舱压保持良好。所有直流和
네. 컴퓨터 
حسنًا يا فريد، نحن نتفهم ذلك، ولدينا نقطة أخرى للتوضي
ठीक है। अभी हमारे गिम्बल के कोण लगभग इस प्रकार हैं - रोल लगभ
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 5C와 5D는 최대 전압으로 설정되어 있습니다. 6A와 6D도 최대
こちらフレンドシップセブン。雲がかなりかかっていて、まだ陸地は見えません。オー
Okay. And do you have any estimate, Vance, on how 
Gemini 4, Карнарвон, CAP COM. Вы хорошо с
Roger, Houston. What we plan to do for you today is start out in the space shipper [sic] Odyssey, and take you on through from Odyssey in through the tunnel into Aquarius. And show you a little bit of the landing vehicle, and your TV operat
フレンドシップ・セブ
أعتقد أن زاويتين تلامستا، لأنه ع
알았어, 버스터. 재진입
Der Landepunkt liegt gerade noch im Dunkeln. Man sieht den oberen Teil des Kraters, der untere Teil ist völlig dunkel. Der kleine, gut erkennbare Krater ist Mol
COMANDO di telemetria
Okay. And switch INVERTER 2, AC BUS 2 to on; and another switch, AC BUS 2 RESET, to reset and center; switch BATTERY CHARGE to Alfa; switch DC INDICATOR select BAT C
9피트/초-10. 좋아요, 이제 나머지는 1초씩
هيوستن، 
로저. 연료 전지 2의 RAD OUT 온도는 약 90도 정도이고, 1번과 3번은 이보다 약간 낮은 75도나 80도 정도일 것으로
Nos ordinateurs au sol confirment que l'axe de rotation et l'angle de tourillon que vous avez indiqués pointent bien vers l'étoile. Cependant, il semble que cet axe et cet angle pointent également vers la structure du drone, de sorte que, même si vous apercevez l'horizon terrestre, l'étoile est masquée par celle-ci. Nous recomman
35 ثاني
제미니 4
रॉजर, डेके। आपकी आवाज़ साफ़-साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है, आपातकालीन
Да. Хотите посмотреть н
收到，我们明白了，A
Okay. Nun zu den alltäglicheren Dingen, jetzt, wo wir den Mond verlassen haben. Ich möchte euch kurz die Entwicklungen im Lebensmittelbereich vorstellen. Ihr kennt sich
...я 
로저, 11. 수신했습니다. 이 옵션(옵션 1 권장)으로 이동하신 후, '태도'로 이동하세요. 이상. 그
Кома
रॉजर। वॉली, मैंने आपकी बात साफ-साफ समझ ली। लगता है अगले चक्कर के लिए सब कुछ तैयार है। क्या
Wir dachten, wir könnten beim nächsten Wasserablassen das CO2 über den Vakuumanschluss abla
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。短いカウン
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。了解
Сигма Семь. Если вы ничего не делаете, 
Роджер. Ваши данные в системе T/M в поря
收到。明白了。
I've put on my gloves, everything i
了解。私は今、ユカタン半島の向こう側、この
了解。ニールが梯子を降りる写真のために取り付ける予定のこの窓用ブラケットを確認してい
أبولو 8، هيوستن. انط
Columbia, ici Houston. Sur votre carte LAM 2, nous souhaiterions confirmer la zone topographique que vous avez observée lors de vos dernières observations. Si nous a
Si je peux débarrasser un peu la nourriture de Bill par ici, et la ranger… Ici se trouve la baie d'équipement inférieure, et nous avons notre équipement de positionnement optique juste ici. Nous effectuons toute notre navigation ici en visant les étoiles et l'horizon de la Lune ou
やあ、アミーゴス、メキシコとグアイマスの特別な友人たちを祝ってください。 Desde el espacio external, su pais esta cubierto con numbes--そしてes-また--se muy bello
はい。少し距離
Ok. Hai intenzione di indossarli per un ingr
Und, Tranquility Base, das Weiße Team verabschiedet sich jetzt und übergibt an das Kastanienbraune Team. Vielen Da
La bande d'étoiles claires semble – les étoiles juste autour de la Croix du Sud et la zone assez sombre et vide, à droite – sur le signe de la Croix, et quand on revient vers Alpha et Beta Centauri, la zo
Да. Я не думаю, что у нас действительно были трудности с пространством для головы.
Und Buzz, wir erhalte
Gyros are caged. I have about a 2-degree-per-second yaw rate. All gyros are zero. I have Corvus directly above me. I'm yawing over the top. I feel that my attitude is--the line of sight is nearly--nearly
هل تريدنا أن نبدأ العمل عل
रॉजर। हम अपने वॉयस चैनल पर इस अपलिंक की जाँच करेंगे। टीवी पर जो ट्रांसमिशन था - हम गो
هل يمكنك قياس ضغط ا
حسنًا. الفكرة هي أنك واجهت خطأً طفيفًا في متجه الحالة الخاص بك في وقت بدء التشغيل، وعندما تم دمج ذلك، اعترض س
Вчера Комитет по бюджету и налогообложению Палаты представителей также согласовал изменения в налогообложении, затрагивающие нефтяные компании, а также банки и коммунальные предприятия, которые могут увеличить федеральные доходы на 2 миллиарда долларов в год. Комитет также предварительно проголо
हालांकि, आईवीआई की गिनती लगातार बढ़त
Gémeaux 4, Chirurgien, Chirurgien CSQ. Recommenceriez-v
짐, 이 제어 모드에 대해 생각해 보시고 지금 알고 있는 정보로 효과가 있을지 판단해 주시면 좋겠습니다.
E anche su questo andremo ava
Хорошо, переключите S-диапазонную антенну OMNI в положение Bravo, S-диапазонную антенну OMNI в положение 
جاك، هيوستن. الاتصالات تتحسن وتسوء تدريجياً، وآخر رسال
비행 계획서
सिग्मा सेवन। पिछला संदेश समझ नहीं आया, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि आपने पढ़ लिया होगा कि हमें UHF/DF स्विच को R/T स्थिति में रखना चाहिए। फिलहाल मेरे पास लैंडिंग रिकवरी से संबंधित कोई जानकारी नहीं है, 
倾
Et, 11, Houston. Pour votre information, Eagle, un voyant d'alerte de l'ISS s'est allumé vers 3 h 19 e
बहुत बढ़िया। मैं आपको कैप कॉम वापस भे
スポーツ界に目を向けてみましょう。先日、皆さんがお忙しい中、ジョー・ネイマスとフットボールコミッショナーのピート・ロゼールは、「ブロードウェイ・ジョー」がバチェラーズIIIレストランの株式を売却し、ニューヨーク・ジェッツに所属することに同意したことを発表しました。ジョーは本日ジェッツのトレーニングキャンプに到着し、初ワークアウトを行いました。ジョーと共に出場を辞退していた他のジェッツ選手も数名参加しました。ミシガン州ジャクソン出身のデイビー・ヒルは、先週のメジャー大会で3勝目を挙げました。フィラデルフィア・クラシックで優勝しました。ヒルは今年これまでに4つのトーナメントで優勝し、12万9000ドルという高額賞金を獲得して今シーズンの賞金王に立っています。そして野球では、ナショナルリーグ西地区は依然として接戦が続いています。ロサンゼルスとサンフランシスコは、首位のアトランタに1ゲーム差をつけています。アストロズは48勝48敗で、現在7ゲーム差の5位です。昨夜予定されていたアストロズとシンシナティのダブルブッキングは雨のため延期されました。シカゴ・カブスは依然として東地区首位をキープしています。ニューヨーク・メッツに4.5ゲーム差をつけています。アメリカンリーグでは、ボルチモア・カリブスが東地区優勝に向けて快進撃を見
حسنًا. سنبدأ بتنظيف خلية الوقود أثناء تناولنا الطعام. تغيير علب
ジェミニ 4、ジ
ناقص 00014، زائد جميع الأصفار، زائد 00001 000 304 000، غير قابل للتطبيق، زائد 00191 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225 شاولا، أعلى 236 000، زائد 0813، ناقص 16503 12202 
Roger. Wir stellen e
何のために？何をロールしたいですか
Comme je le disais, je ne vois rien... Dites-moi si vous voul
Okay, Jim. We're getting about 9 minutes from the commencement of command module powerup, and we wanted to just mention to you for Jack's benefit that, although the batteries are looking real good, in case they'
ठीक है। अगर आप कुछ तस्वीरें लेना चाहते हैं, तो हम आपको यूनिफॉर्म मैगज़ीन इस्तेमाल करने की सलाह देते हैं, जिसमें हाई-स्पीड ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म भरी हो। अंदर की लाइटें बंद हों और 80 मिलीमीटर लेंस वाला इलेक्ट्रिक हैसलब्लैड कैमरा इस्तेमाल करें। और लगता है आपको हमें हाथ पकड़कर फोटो खींचनी पड़ेगी। हम एफ स्टॉप 2.8 रखने की सलाह देते हैं, और हम टाइम एक्सपोज़र की एक सीक्वेंस ले
Роджер, Близнецы 4. Командир связи из Хьюстона готов к работе. Я прочита
Dico che il deflettore 
Et je vous appellerai – j'armerai vo
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। सबसे पहले, हम चाहते हैं कि पीछे की तरफ अपशिष्ट जल का निकास 10 प्रतिशत तक हो। दूसरा, अभी हमें विमान बदलने की आवश्यकता नहीं लग रही है, इसलिए हम कोई नया विमान अपलोड 
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। पहले
Voici un reportage d'Harry Rosenthal, de l'Associated Press de Houston. Deux Pères Noël ont illuminé la veille de Noël du petit Jeffrey Lovell, âgé de deux ans. Le premier a frappé à sa porte et lui a apporté des cadeaux. Le second a ramené son papa sur la Lune. Le premier portait un costume rouge et une barbe blanche, et son « ho, ho! » résonnait si fort qu'on l'entendait à plusieurs kilomètres. Le second était un énorme moteur crachant des flammes derrière la Lune, et des milliers de personnes attendaient la confirmation de son allumage. « Sachez qu'il y a un Père Noël », furent les premiers mots d'Apollo 8, sortant du silence radio pour annoncer au monde entier, quinze minutes après les faits, que le moteur avait réussi sa combustion critique. « Aucun d'entre nous ne s'attend à recevoir un plus beau cadeau de Noël que celui-ci », déclara Ken Mattingly, du centre de contrôle des missions. « Remerciez de notre part tous ceux qui sont restés sur Terre. Vous savez que nous n'aurions rien pu faire sans vous », répondit le colonel Frank Borman, commandant du vaisseau. À ce moment précis, un sapin de Noël s'illumina devant les consoles du centre de contrôle des missions, et l'astronaute Harrison Schmidt lut à l'équipage une version spatiale du conte « La visite de Saint Nicolas ». « C'était la veille de Noël, et très loin dans l'espace, l'équipage d'Apollo 8 venait de remporter la course vers la Lune », commençait le récit. L'équipe du centre de contrôle des missions avait retardé les festivités jusqu'à ce que le père de Jeffrey, le capitaine de la marine James Lovell, ainsi que le major de l'armée de l'air William A. Anders et le colonel Borman soient rentrés sains et saufs. N'importe quel autre 
Ok, 2 serbatoio 1, 75,97
نقترب من الخ
रॉजर। क्या आप कृपया मु
Abbiamo ottenuto una pressione sanguigna valida, ma la te
뭐라
Okay. Ein
Нужно быть осторожным и наклоняться в нужном направлении, иначе вы будете слегка пьяны. Другими словами, нужно скрестить ноги, чтобы оставаться под ц
Jim 
そうです... 11:
Роджер, Чарли. Это Базз. Как 
Roger. The Hornet is on station just far enough off the target point to keep from getting hit. Recovery 1, or the chopper, is 
D'accord. Si j'ai bien compris, Jack, la procédure suppose que toutes les batteries DESCENT sont activées et que la batterie 6 est e
الأمر فوضوي بعض الشيء. لم أمارس هذا العمل لفترة طويلة. إنه يشبه إلى حد ما النظام الذي كان الإسبان يستخدمونه للشرب من قرب النبيذ في م
你们今晚为
Ich stelle jetzt auf niedrige Vergrößerung um. Korrektur: Hohe Vergrößerung durch das Periskop – sehen Sie, wie es aussieht? … Sie hat sich um etwa 5 Grad nach rechts geneigt. Sehen Sie, wie sie jetzt mit dem Periskop übereinstimmt. Angenommen, die Gierachse (Anzeige) steht jetzt bei etwa 10 Grad, und die Wolken ziehen direkt entlang der Linie, als ob die Gierachse um bis zu 5 bis 6 Grad abweichen könnte. Das ma
Роджер. Что ж, этот расчет производится до в
E-9ページのアルファのステップ41 Bravo。E-9ページでMINIMAL IMPULSEまたはACCEL COMMANDのいずれかを使用する場合は、ステップ41 B
Хорошо. Нам кажется, что, хотя мы считываем те же данные, что и вы, используя компьютерную программу и все поправочные коэффициенты, все четыре ваших квадрокоптера очень близки. В фунтах, например, у вас 193 фунта в квадрокоптере А, 189 в В, 200 в С и 190 в Дельте. А раз
Auf dem Band sind nur etwa 5 Minuten Material, Houston
Roger, Houston. Apollo 11. Stiamo leggendo un VI di
肯定的です。姿勢: ロール 0 [度]、ヨー 2 [度] 右、ピッチ -33 [度]。レートはすべて 0 を示しています。現在オンです。時計はまだ後退時間、つまり逆行時間 04 + 32 + 28 に設定されています。バミューダからの逆行時間は正常です。キャビンの気圧は 5.7 で安定しています。キャビンの空気は 90 [度]。相対湿度は 30 [パーセント]。冷却剤の量は 68 [パーセント]。スーツの環境は 65。スーツの気圧は 5.8 を示しています。スーツ上の蒸気温度は 60 [度]。非常に快適です。ただし、まだ下げたくありませ
Итак, мы уже 
我唯一的问题是，我要过来拿个开关，然后给这个手柄控
هيوستن، أبولو 11. هيوستن،
很好。这是12月23日出版的《星际时报》，保罗·哈尼风格。我们想告诉您，距离圣诞节购物季只剩两天了。他说您昨天的电视直播非常受欢迎。米奇·赫斯科维茨在《邮报》身兼两职。除了其他体育专栏外，他还写了两篇关于您发射的文章。吉姆，你妈妈肯定很喜欢那份生日祝福。昨天，21名囚犯从新奥尔良的一所监狱越狱。约翰逊总统昨晚从贝塞斯达海军医院出院回家，此前他患了流感。他给你们带了一条特别的信息——不是教你
Apollo 8, Houston. Vorremmo prova
吉姆，你可以试试让杰克关掉 RING 1 的自动线圈，这些线圈
ठीक है, बाईं ओर के हाशिये में, 105 घंटे के ठीक नीचे, "0507" और "प्लस 0500" को काट दें, और उसके नीचे "लोड" इस प्रकार जो
Jetzt könnte Ihnen die
11号，休斯顿。如果您能配合，我们想看到
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, Houston. Wir haben Sie 
지금처럼 모든 장비를 꺼낸 상태
分かりました。私の理解が正しいか確認してみましょう。49時間後、OPTICSのゼロ位置から外れる前に、シャフトを観察し、16、91を呼び出し、シャフトとトラニオンの角度を見て、ジッターの可能性を調べてください。ゼロ位置でも、ゼロ位置から外れた位置でも、ジッターが発
OAMS はどれくらいありましたか? 70 
了解しました。時刻22:25 06、カーナボンのクルー状況報告です。これでアップデートは終了です。短い内容でした。クライオゲージのス
Okay. Unsere Kollegen hier unten schauen sich gerade ein Programm zur Ausrichtung von Hochleistungsantennen an. Wenn Sie das Gerät also gerade nicht für etwas anderes verwenden, würden sie es gerne ein paar Mal a
好的。主标题是“登月舱准备，-6 小时”。首先，电池 5 正常供电，开启；其次，使用修改后的 30 分钟激活检查清单。接下来，如果需要，在 -5 小时（-7）进行操作。现在，我们有一个登月舱前准备程序。首先，机动至服务舱单引擎姿态。其次，配置热试车。在此配
روجر، أبولو 8. لقد
Roger. 10, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35189, minus 01513, minus 00346 180 007 000, November Alfa plus 00186 35
E
Возвращение к ги
ケン、ダンプ
好的，杰克。回到我之前教你的电池充电步骤。要终止充电，你只需要在我给你的电路开关旁边写上“打开”或“关闭”。所以，在250号面板上，你已经打开了那个断路器；在275号面板上，逆变器电源-2主B，打开；在5号面板上，电池继电器总线BAT A，打开；传感器单元交流总线2，打开；传感器信号AC2，打开；电池充电器主
好的。吉姆，我现在听到你的声音了。我们的问题是，有没有办法调整飞船的方向，让服务舱位于太阳和地球之间，这样你
아니요, 여분을 남겨둘
Sigma Seven，Sigma Seven，这里是亨茨维尔……Sigma Seven，Sigma Se
距离反击还有大约
네, 조. 움직이기 시작하는 게 보이네요. 하지만 파편이나 증기가 많이 
Attenzione all'atteggiamento da schi
Roger. Si on voit les choses ainsi, il semblerait que vous ayez deux ou trois heures devant vous avant de vous y mettre
Va bene. Va bene; il Cancelliere della Germania Ovest Willy Brandt, che ha assistito ieri al vostro lancio da Cape Canaveral, e il Presidente Nixon completeranno il loro giro di colloqui oggi. A quanto pare, Brandt si è recato negli Stati Uniti per chiedere al Presidente la garanzia di proseguire i colloqui con le nazioni dell'Europa orientale, in particolare Germania dell'Est, Polonia e Russia. Molti controllori di volo sono ancora fuori servizio, ma i rapporti indicano che stanno lentamente tornando al lavoro, e sarete felici di sapere che i controllori qui al MOCR sono an
Ja, das haben Sie. Wir haben bestätigt, dass der Grenzwert ungefähr so ​​lag, wie 
好的。开始了。-2，/G&N：63634；加 0.96，减 0.23；减 0021.7，减 0001.7，减 0008.0；080，164，326；不适用，不适用；0023.2，0:03.5 - 由于燃烧时间很短，我们只给你半秒钟 - 0018.5；
يا هيوستن، يبدو ضوء الأرض كما هو متوقع. ليس بنفس دقة التفاصيل الموجودة في ضوء الشمس، بالطبع، لكن يمكنك رؤية الفوهات الكبيرة بوضوح تام، وكذلك نقاط التماس بين البياض والضوء. 
マイク、私は今、恒星下33度地点にいます。そこから太陽が正確にどこにある
Хорошо, 11. У меня тут несколько небольших пунктов: одно обновление плана полета и некоторая информация о фотос
R
... guardando laggiù... sembrava proprio convesso... Neil tornò indietro un po' più tardi ed era proprio nel me
D'
Et Mike, si tu es à l'écoute, pour étendre
روجر. نرجو منك الموا
О 
감사합니다. 179 009 001, 해당 없음, 플러스 00187 32870 307 32676 42
Nous ne sommes pas assez hydratés pour boire régulièrement de l'eau après avoir utilisé ce seul sachet. Pourriez-vous nous prévenir quand vous aurez
Cette transmission vous parvient à mi-chemin environ entre la Lune et la Terre. Nous sommes en vol depuis 31 heures et 20 minutes environ. Il nous reste moins de 40 heures pour atteindre la Lune. Vous pouvez voir que Bill a sa brosse à dents ici. Il se brosse les dents régulièrement. Pour illustrer comment les objets flottent en apesanteur. On dirait qu'il joue pour les Astros, à la façon dont il essaie d'attraper ces objets. J'aimerais tellement pouvoir vous montrer la Terre. C'est une vue magnifique, avec un fond majoritairement bleu et d'immenses nuages ​​blancs, notamment un vortex très puissant près du terminateur. Vraiment magnifique. Nous recevrons peut-être l'aide des personnes au sol po
A quel punto imposterai 
Wie wäre es, wenn w
, I co
نعم. يا كين، أنا أتعرض للسخرية هنا لأنني قلت إن
哦，
一体何が起こったのか、一連の出来事を教えていた
ठीक है। वैंस, मुझे लगता है कि मैं समझ गया था कि आप लोग कुछ चीज़ों की सूची बना रहे थे जिन्हें आप बाद में वापस ले जाने के बारे में सोच रहे थे। 
Va ben
Apollo 13, Hou
外にいた時、ジムの家の窓に気づきました。外側にコーティングが施されているんです。ある時、肩か腕で触れた時に、コーティングがそのまま飛び散って、ジムの家のフロントガラスの上部が汚れて、外が見えなくなってしまいました。こちら側から見ると、何かの物質でかなり厚くコーティングさ
Okay. Die nächste Korrektur wird wahrscheinlich – vielleicht etwas höher – sein. Hier ist sie; ich habe sie Ihnen
Joe, wie weit sind wir jetzt von der Küste entfernt und wie schnell nähern wir uns de
존, 저쪽은 안 보여. 오른쪽으로 좀 더 돌려서 우리 둘 다 볼 수 있게 할게. 아, 저기 바로 아래
O
Р
わかりました。「フォローアップ
حسنًا. بالنسبة لمنطقة وسط المحيط الهادئ، فالحالة العامة جيدة. يُتوقع أن تكون قواعد السحب متفرقة على ارتفاع 2000 قدم، والرؤية 10 أميال، والرياح 70 عقدة بسرعة 12 ميلً
Las
Roger. Crew status report as follows: water, the commander has about 50 clicks so far today; CMP 43; and the LMP is 44. We've eaten two meals so far today. Day 3 meal A and B;
D'accord, et j'ai un outil de visualisation des étoiles pour télescope 
Ok. Li leggerò velocemente prima qui così ti farai un'idea generale. pad, assetto del modulo di servizio JETT, assetto di osservazione della Luna, assetto di osservazione del Sole e assetto JETT. I pad sono angoli lineari approssimativi per gli atteggiamenti durante l'avvistamento della Luna e del Sole, angoli lineari approssimativ
الأمر يتطل
レトロアティチュードに近
ठीक है। डॉकिंग टनल इंडेक्स
Tank pressures are looking go
حسنًا يا فريد، انتظر. كنا نتحدث عن إمكانية إجراء العملية لك في مركز جراحة القلب المفتوح. نوصي حاليًا بإجراء عملية قسطرة القلب ال
阿
Roger. Bitte warten. Wir spiegeln die Sterne wider, die Sie sehen. Bitte warten
Okay. Ich habe es nochmal gelesen: Sekundärspeichermenge überwachen; Sekundär-
और, वैंस, हम आज से बिजली चालू करने की योजना बना रहे हैं।
Noch eine Anmerkung zur Optik. Wir befinden uns gerade im Flug. Wir passieren die M-Linie – wir haben eine R
Rog
罗杰。对于 NSR 机动，燃烧 GET，03 加 47 加 37；Delta-VT，4
Gemini 4, Хьюстон, CAP COM. Оставьте переключатель компьютера в положении «ВКЛ», а переключатель питания переменн
OH
ठीक है। जिम से अनुरोध है कि वे अपने पाँचों निशानों के बीच थोड़ा और अंतराल रखें। यदि संभव हो, तो हम उनमें से कुछ को शीर्ष बिंदु से आगे तक ले जाना चाहेंग
차단했습니다. 부하 균형 차단기가 닫혀
अब मुझे यह बात बिल्कुल स्पष्ट रूप से पता है। मेरे पास आपके लिए एक और जानकारी है, और इस बात की पुष्टि भी है कि बोरसाइट स्टार नंबर और पिच कोण 44 
ठीक है, जिम। हम - हम इस बारे में बात कर रहे थे कि कमांड मॉड्यूल से बेहतर स्टार फील्ड विज़न के लिए आप पैड एटीट्यूड से अलग एटीट्यूड अपनाएँ, और हम आपसे यह करवाना चाहते हैं। यदि आप अभी या कुछ समय बाद यह अनुमान लगा सकते हैं कि आप उस समय कौन सा एटीट्यूड रखना चाहेंगे, और अभी उस एटीट्यूड पर जाएँ, तो हम आपके लिए कोर्स एलाइन गिम्बल एंगल की गणना कर सकेंगे। और हम ऐसा तब कर सकते हैं जब आप चुने हुए एटीट्यूड पर जाएँ, उसे बनाए रखें, एक ऐप खोलें, और हमें अपने गिम्बल एंगल
13番、ヒューストン。
حسنًا. لننتق
Okay, Jack, during the TV, we were AUTO TRACK, NARROW BEAM WIDTH, and the PRIMARY ELECTRONICS. And we had a good lockup. Just after we started the maneuver, I was able to lock you up and get real good signal strength, and it just seemed that ri
Могу сказать, что сейчас
Всё рав
दो। शून्य,
是的
183. 3+57. 07 08 55. 09+30. Re
好的。我想我看到你已经准备好了
好的，我明白了。是的，你说得对。当我们看
Я действительно вижу этот маленький объект, похожий на снежинку, удаляющийся от капсулы. Конечно, по той же траектории полета. Определенно, он выглядел как белый кусочек, но его хорошо видно на фоне черного не
彼はUHFまたはHFで私たちに連絡しようとしているの
Х
Roger. I gue
Columbia, Houston. Wir werden Ihnen etwas später ein Update zur Lage im Bundesstaat geben. Wir sind momentan noch nicht darauf vorbereitet. Und noch etwas anderes: Von der Tranquility Base aus ist man bereit, die Operationen frühzeitig zu beginnen. Man rechnet damit, die DEPRESS-Ope
ठीक है। अब शु
收到。之后，我又试了一次。电池 2，高电压，关闭/复位，然后开启
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन 
收到。仍在接收。请继
その数行下に「DAC を約
マスターアラームが再びオンにな
Und, Aquarius, Houston. Wir machen uns Gedanken über die CO2-Ansammlung im Kommandomodul und haben daher eine Empfehlung: Nehmen Sie die Schläuche des Kommandanten und verschließen Sie den roten Rücklaufschlauch mit einer Kappe. Befestigen Sie die Schläuche so, dass sie sich im Tunnel weitestge
حسناً. فه
मैंने इस
١١، هذه هي
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous vous serions reconnaissants de bien vouloir laisser la télévision allumée pendant une dizaine de minutes afin de pouvoir comparer les images de la caméra. Vous pouvez utiliser la télévision comme bon vous se
روجر. روجر، فرانك. بعض الأفكار حول ما هو قادم. سنبدأ برصد النجوم عندما يستيقظ جيم؛ يبدو الآن أننا اكتفينا من أفق الأرض، وكل شيء يبدو رائعًا؛ ونحن مستعدون للبدء برصد أفق القمر. لذا عن
रॉजर। और मेरे इशारे पर, जमीनी स्तर पर बीता हुआ समय होगा। प्रतीक्षा करें। मार्क 
जिम, अगर तुम चाहो तो मैं इस
看到下面有很多雷暴。看起来我们好像是倒着飞，头
Отчет о состоянии двиг
Die Manschette ist in vo
I think we've d
The
알겠습
好的。太好了。我们之前还
Это «Дру
Roger. Sie sind sich jedoch ziem
Was hast du mit der 
Laisse tomber, Jack. J'en r
음, 저희는 차를 
I wish you woul
로저. 잠시만 기다려 주십시오. 11번님, 저희의 유일한 걱정은 해치백에 있는 물건들입니다. A8과 11번님
Apollo 8, Houston. We have all the experts looking at your data now. The prelimina
尼尔，如果你需要的话，我已经把飞行计划
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। हम यहाँ फिर से संगठित हो रहे हैं, आपके नियंत्रण मोड पर काम कर रहे हैं और कुछ व्यवस्था करने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। उड़ान योजना के बजाय हम उपभोग्य सामग्रियों पर नज़र डाल रहे हैं, और इसी तरह की अन्य चीज़ें भी देख रहे हैं। जैसे ही हमें सारी जानकारी मिल जाएगी, हम आपको बता देंगे। हमा
Okay. Nach der ersten Druckerhöhung nach etwa 12 bis 15 Minuten sollen Sie auf BYPASS umschalten und nach einer erneuten Druck
2 miles. 100 - 2
그건 대략 80시간, 정확히는 메인 카트리지 두 개로 82시간을 사용한 셈입니다. 두 개면 충분하죠. LC8은 44시간을 사용했으니 88시간이
Nous aimerions une autre confirmation: lorsque nous avons fermé la va
ठीक है, हम देख रहे हैं कि आप कैमरे को लें
로저, 이해했습니다. 18시부터 22시까지요. RKV 상공에서 Rev 12에 PLA와 CLA 업데이트를 받을 겁니다. Canary 상공에서 Rev 13에는 C-밴드
是的，那是指你们同时说话
حسنًا، هذا تأكيد. ستُجري عملية الانحراف، وسنتصل بك في كل مرة تُغير فيها زاوية الانحراف. بالإضاف
GET 为 2 加 20 加 00；
わかりました、アクエリアスさん。これからやることを説明します。X軸を北か南に向けます。これがX軸の正方向です。X軸の正方向を南に向ける方が近いようです。電源を入れた状態で、を使って操作してください。その後、電力を節約するために電源を切ることを提案します。ただし、これは が使えなくなるため、ハンドコントローラーを使ってダイレクトモードで宇
Джим, у меня пара замечаний. Во-первых, время закрытия вентиляционного отверстия для отходов. Если вы ляжете спать раньше этого времени, то с нашей точки зрения здесь, внизу, ничего страшного, если вы закроете его перед сном. Во-вторых, у нас есть некоторые результаты, и, если Джеку это интересно, мы могли бы сообщить ему скорректированные высоты
D'accord. On va laisser ça comme ça pendant deux tours, Ken
现在，回答问题 2，当然，第二阶段出现了振动瞬态，这是由于 5 号发动机故障造成的——该故障发生在发动机故障之前
正解です。0
휴스턴, 아
Ok, anche il secondo è sul pan
Roger. Comment me lisez-vous maintenan
Was du siehst, Mike, ist – Houston, was du siehst, ist die westliche Hemisphäre. Ganz oben ist der Nordpol; in der Mitte – etwas tiefer – Südamerika – bis hinunter zum Kap Hoorn. Ich kann Baja California und den Südwesten der Vereinigten Staaten sehen. Eine große, langgestreckte Wolkenbank zieht nach Nordosten, bedeckt weite Teile des Golfs von Mexiko und reicht bis in den Osten der Vereinigten Staaten. Da die Ostküste nun bewölkt ist, kann ich Wolken über Teilen Mexikos sehen; Teile Mittelamerikas sind klar. Und wir 
了解。そう
Gemelli 4, qui
Das stimmt. Als wir Schwierigkeiten hatten, dich zu erreichen, Charlie, habe ich die Befehlstaste RESET gedrückt, um sicherzustellen, dass ich di
네, 마이크, 저는 지금 항성 직하점 33도에 있습니다. 거기서 태양이 정확히 어디에 있는지는 모르겠지만, 대략 그 각도일 겁니다. 저희 광학 장비는 
Bien reçu. En attente, je vous ferai un compte rendu. Je suis en orbite pour votre suivi. Voici le compte rendu: tous les fusibles sont en position 1, sauf celui de la tour de largage, en position 2. La rétroséquence d'urgence, le largage d'urgence et le parachute de secours sont en position centrale d'arrêt. Le dispositif anti-retour est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le système est normal (automatique et gyroscopique). Toutes les poignées en « T » sont en position « entrée ». Le délai de rétroséquence est normal. Les deux éclairages de cabine sont allumés. Les projecteurs photo sont toujours allumés. La télémétrie basse f
أبولو 8، 
Ro
... hoch. Wir haben das Raumschiffsystem eingeschaltet, versucht, es zu stabilisieren, und dabei möglicherweise unsere un
Roger, I have gone from 4 
Привет, Мучеа, привет, Му
네, 좋습니다. 컴퓨터 작업은 끝났습니다. 이제 사용하시면 됩니다. 조작하실 때는 이 기능을 활용하시는 것을 추천
حسنًا. من أولى الأمور التي نرغب في القيام بها شحن البطارية، حتى نتمكن من توفير الطاقة اللازمة لذلك، وقد وضعنا إجراءات مُعدّة مسبقًا لهذا الغرض. فيما يتعلق بالعودة إلى الغلاف الجو
わかりました。パッケージの温度により、サービスモジュールBのジャックライトが点灯しま
네, 맞아요
D'accord. Voici la procédure de charge 
VII, यह VI है। क्या आप मेरे लिए अपनी अ
Хорошо, Гас. Что касается планирования полетов, мы мало что могли сделать с D-9, потому что не использовали топливо.
Hallo,
罗杰，八世。请稍等30
ह
… la pression est bonne. La direction est un peu sollicitée, mais ça tient bie
Ok, Apollo 8. Non abbiamo a
هذا صحيح. أقوم حاليًا بإعادة ضبط الكبسولة، وسأقوم بفك وتركيب الجيروسكوبات قبل أن أنضم 
이제 우주선을 정리하고 모든 준비를 마친 다음 잠을 자고 식사를 할 겁니다. 앞으로는
Roger. Ja, das habe ich. Er kam für etwa zwei oder drei Übertragungen vorbei, und das war's dann auch s
双子座4号，RKV外科医生。了解血压。请评
Bi
He's on his - He's on his 19th
罗杰，加州。我已在 05 中设置 - 更正，。Guaym
조, 확인했습니다. 
روجر. البالون يتأرجح في ق
بص
Joe, Jack m'a dit qu'il y a encore beaucoup de particules en suspension et qu'il n'arrive pas à distinguer de constellation pour l'instant. Mais ça d
"0.1 फुट प्रति सेकंड।" बर्न टाइम को बंद करने का कारण यह है कि, चूंकि एएसए ब्रेकर इतने लंबे समय से बंद है
Roger. Ti leggo circa tre ore fa, Buzz; c'è molto rumore in loop. Pensiamo che provenga da Columbia, ma non riusciamo a capirlo.
ठीक है। खैर, 
Хорошо. Минус 5 часов. Сейчас я посмотрю, как это ра
Good. 413020 183, Sh
AUTO, AUT
حسناً. وأنا ك
알겠습니다. 130시간 3
A1区画では、16ミリ弾倉は窓番号5ではなく4に配置されます。ティッシュディスペンサ
No. As a matter of fact, I've been running faceplate open for quite a while just to take a look around and see if we are picking up any. In fact, the relative humidity has dropped a little bit in here and we have no apparent moisture anywhere in
Роджер, Базз. Хороший ответ. Вы примерно на два 
風船が開きます。風船は飛び出しました。かなり遠くまで飛んでいるように見えますが、今はもうかなり遠くまで飛んでいて、どんどん遠ざかっているように思います。ロープ
Ro
收到。P22：T1，时间 82:37:35；T2，82:42:50。目标位于北方 7 英里处。
Ok. Rileviamo la larghezza del Golfo Persico e credo che tutto ciò che posso darvi di prima mano sia un singolo dato isolato, ovvero che stamattina qui a Houston era sereno. È un'osservazione piuttosto localizzata. A causa del vostro scarico di acque reflue, sembra che la modalità sia stata in qualche modo alterata. Al momento vi mostriamo circa 20 gradi di beccheggio e circa 6 gradi di imbardata, che è significativamente maggiore, ci
Apollo 8, Houston. Es sieht so aus, als ob die Ladung von Batterie B noch etwa sechs Stunden dauern könnte. Die Laderate ist zwar geringer als die, die
左侧窗外是一片相对平坦的平原，上面布满了数量相当多的陨石坑，大小在5到50英
Scommetto che il filtro dei de
알겠습니다. 그게 바로 데이
Roger. Und Sie werden auf einen Wert vor 0,05 g zur
제가 보기엔 항공편 운항 관리
D'acco
阿
Aufgestanden? Ich dachte, ich hätte mich ziemlich deutlich aus
혈압계 고무 펌프가 안 들어가
11, 
Roger. Nur ein paar interessante Beobachtungen – ich habe gerade eine 
Okay. Man sieht, wie er mit der Schere das Plastikende von einer kleinen Düse abschneidet
D'accord. Je faisais 
Okay, 11. It turns out that the engine performance during both of your burns so far this mission has been the same as it was on engine acceptance tests. The onboard PC reading is due to a known gage calibration factor between what you've actually got in the chamber and what you're reading out on the gage. We expect single bank operation to be 90 - that is, 90 psi on the gage with an actual chamber pressure of 95 psi. In dual bank operation, the chamber pressure is 94 psi on the gage with an actual of 99 psi. 80 psi on the gage on board correlates to 83 psi actual. And we recommend that you stick to an termination cue of 80 psi on the gage. That is, no change
好的。明白了，针头
..
إنها تخرج من النافذة رقم 1 الآن يا جاك، وهل يمكنك أن تعطيني المحركات النفاثة مرة أ
هذا صحيح. لقد توقفتَ للحظة يا جيم. سنفعل ذلك على الكرة من وضعية الاحتراق. نريدك فقط أن تدور 90 درجة في أي اتجاه، مع الحفاظ على زاوية الميل والانحراف 0. الآن، الخطوة 3: "عندما تكون في الوضعية - عندما تكون في الوضعية، أخرج ACA من وضع التوقف." الخطوة 4: "التحكم في الوضعية: الانحراف، إلى وضع التحكم في الوضع. عندما تكون المعدلات أقل من 0.05، اضبط الوضعية والانحراف
ठीक है। पै
ヒューストンのアソシエイテッド社ハリー・ローゼンタールによる特集記事です。2歳のジェフリー・ラベルくんのクリスマスイブを、2人のサンタが明るく彩ります。1人目は玄関をノックしてプレゼントを持ってきました。2人目は月からお父さんを家まで送り届けました。1人目は赤い服と白いひげを生やし、「ホー、ホー」と叫び、その声は街の向こうまで聞こえました。2人目は月の裏で巨大なエンジンが炎を吐き出し、何千人もの人々がエンジン始動の知らせを待ちわびていました。「サンタクロースがいます」。エンジンがクリティカル噴射
SE
OK. Temps restant: 32 heures et 00 minutes. Instructions à la fin de la manœuvre: adopter l’attitude suivante: roulis 101,0, tangage 090,0, lacet 000,0. Tangage maximal -23, lacet 93. Utiliser les procédures normales pour amortir les mouvements. Une fois le véhicule stabilisé et avant la mise en rotation, prendre des photos de la comète Bennett. Utiliser le sextant avec le magasin G. C’est-à-dire un film noir et blanc à très haute sensibilité, n’est-ce pas? C’est le film pour faible luminosité. Prendre trois photos, une à chaque temps d’exposition: 5, 20 et 60 secondes. Utiliser l’optique AUTO. Les valeurs sont R1 + 34717, R2 - 08028; R3 + 35075. Prendre trois photos, une à chaque temps d’exposition: 5, 20 et 60 secondes en utilisant l’optique manuelle. L’arbre sera à 000,8 degrés, le tourillon. Retirer environ 50 images; C
और, ह्यूस्टन, क्या आप हमें चढ़ाई के लिए आवश्यक ऑक्सीजन को 
君たちの「
아니요, 아직 아닙니다. 연락이 끊기면 다음 정거장에서 다시 연락드리겠습니다. 저는 지금 전자식 자동 조종 장
Роджер, я понял. Ест
13, Houston. Nous allons devoir vous faire suiv
س
रॉजर। बस इतना समझ लीजिए कि हमारे अलग होने में कोई संदेह ही नह
Et sachez, Gemin
알겠습니다, 잭. 49시간째에 그들이 당신에게 부탁하는 것은 광학축 각도에서 약 0.2도 정도의 미세한 떨림이 관찰되었다는 것입니다. 광학축 영점 위치에서 벗어나기 전에, 이 작업을 시작할 때, 축 판독값을 잠깐 확인하여 직접 판독값
Und, Houston, Nummer 13: Wir möchten überprüfen, ob Sie die Sauerstoff-Kryolen be- und entlüftet haben. Wir haben den Wasserstoff (H2) gesehen, aber nicht, dass der
حسنًا. سنتواصل مع فريق SPAN بخصوص هذه المشكلة ونُعلمك بالنتيجة صباحًا. إذا احتجتَ للاتصال بنا 
Buzz, ho messo 39,5 volt qui; 
了解。フレンドシップ・セブン。カプセル内のシステムは全て作動中だ。カプセルの
Under
そうですね、15分くらい
네, 이제 5대밖에 안 남았어요... 한 대의 선풍기로 오랫동안 버텨왔거든요. 2일차인데.
It's hard to tell at this density and pressure of gas, but comfort level is about the - about th
As I said before, everything looks very go
Нам нужно, чтобы дисплей был открыт; антенна S-диапазона закрыта — чтобы избежать срабатывания главной сигнализации, камера — последовательная камера открыта; а ниже нам нужно, чтобы дисплеи были открыты; напряжение шины постоянного тока закрыто; инвертор 2 открыт; ASCENT ECA закрыт; управление ASCENT ECA открыто; DESCENT ECA закрыто; управление DESCENT ECA закрыто; транслунная шина закрыта; нам нужно, чтобы перекрестная шина была открыта; 
That's negative. Wait. All we want to do, Jack, i
Well, let's try Reentry Rate Command. I wa
여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. 잘 들립니다. 어떻게
휴스턴의 Associated 소속 해리 로젠탈 기자가 쓴 기사입니다. 두 명의 산타가 두 살배기 제프리 러벨의 크리스마스 이브를 더욱 특별하게 만들어 주었습니다. 첫 번째 산타는 집 문을 두드리고 선물을 가져다주었고, 두 번째 산타는 아빠를 달
Okay. We're stopping now and maneuvering to our and optics CAL attitude. In regard to that, what I was trying to tell you yesterday was about that. The M-line is not anywhere parallel to the horizon at the roll, pitch, and yaw which y
Hawaii Com Tech. Sigma Seven. Loud and clear on UHF/HF. Ov
了解しました。少しお待ちください。アポロD-9第
我想快速提供一
罗杰。我们复制第21-61卷，俯仰角090，偏
... vai a RELEASE; indicatore DELTA
Das ist Sigma Seven, das die Effekte eines Rückenflugs bei Sonnenaufgang mit 90 Grad Gierwinkel simuliert. Die Flugrichtung ist für dich am deutlichsten erkennbar. Wie beim Blick aus einem Zugfenster. Du siehst die L
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。
Aquarius, H
ダメだ、ヒューストン。
Roger. On that southern of the old craters, there's a small bright crater on the southern rim. One plot would put him slightly to the west of that small br
Ricevuto. Fine dell'esperimento, fine di MSC-2 e -3, 15 minuti il ​​giorno dopo, Rev
Uno dei sacchett
يا جاك، بخصوص سؤالك عن المنصة، لا داعي للقلق الآن. لن نستخدم المنصة إلا بعد حوالي 79 ساعة،
روجر. الآن، لدينا في ظهر الصفحة 30، يا جيم، صفحة ف
Хорошо. Мы хо
मुझे यकीन है कि किसी का संदेश पढ़ना बहुत सामान्य बात है
دع
Acc
Manca
CAP COM. Puoi
हां, अंतरिक्ष यान
Continuo con il rapporto. N
11, Houston. We have the patch. Could yo
Роджер. Поймите, что вы будете использовать дозу до 0,05 г, а вспомогательная влажная доза будет использоваться в
Okay, Buzz. On your flight plan items, a few updates first of all. We've cancelled midcourse number 6. Just remain - remain in. I'll give you a little more time this morning. Second item o
이글
حسنًا. والخطوة التالية
我们删除了一条；
Come
わかりました。皆さんにはこの点について知っていただき、飛行計画にどのような影響があるか考えていただきたかったのです。広角で月についてコメントし、どのセクションが最も適切だ
حسناً. تف
Je pense que ça s'est plutôt bien passé, Houston, même si j'imagine avoir consommé plus de carburant qu'en simulateur. Lors de la manœuvre de demi-tour, j'ai utilisé la commande PITCH ACCEL COMMAND et j'ai commencé à cabrer. Puis, lorsque j'ai remis la commande MANUAL ATTITUDE PITCH en mode RATE COMMAND, pour une raison inconnue, la vitesse de tangage s'est arrêtée. J'ai donc dû repasser en mode ACCEL COMMAND et appuyer sur ce qui me semblait être une impulsion supplémentaire sur PROCEED. Pendant cette manœuvre, nous avons dérivé un peu plus que prévu. Je m'attendais à être à environ 20 mètres. J'esti
알겠습니다. 현재 배터리 용량은 A형 39.32암페어시, B형 35.21암페어시, C형 38.46암페어시입니다. 극저온 저장량은 지난번과 동일하게 산소 탱크당 180파운드, 수소 탱크당 11파운드입니다. 현재 서비스 모듈의 컴퓨터 계산값을 기준으로 보면, 쿼드 A는 45%, 브라보는 50%, 찰리는 58%, 델타는 48%가 남아 있습니다. 보조 연료 탱크는 실제 용량이 37%에 도달하면 가동할 계획이며, 통신 두절 등의 비상 상황 발생 시에는 온보드 게이지로 50%를 기준으로 보조 연료를 가동하도록 권장할 예정입니다. 하지만 현재로서는 자체 계산값을 사용할 수 있으므로, 보조 연료는 그대로 두는 
Okay, 
我
Roger. Wir haben wieder nur einen Ventilator. Ich denke, wir schalten den zweiten Ventilat
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 11 PAD 소식과 물 방류 상황에 대한 업데이트를 전해드리겠습니다. 
ठीक है। बस यही चेता
ठीक है। हमार
سأؤجل استخدام جهاز الإرسال. أعتقد أن الساعة تشير إلى حوالي الساعة التي شغّلت بها الجهاز، لذا سيكون الجهاز فعالاً 
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Далее следует 30-минутный отчет: Движения 
وهكذا اكتملت 
सिग्मा सेवन, यह कानो कैप कॉम है। हाई फारेनहाइट पर संचार
ठीक है। उपभोग्य सामग्रियों का अपडेट 46 प्लस 00 के लिए: माइनस 5.5 प्रतिशत, माइनस 6.5 प्रतिशत, माइनस 2.5 प्रतिशत, माइनस 7.5 प्रतिशत, माइनस 5.0 प्रतिशत, माइनस 2 पाउंड हाइड्रोजन, प्लस 1 पाउंड ऑक्सीजन, और कुल पर वह माइनस 5.5 प्रतिशत माइनस 66 पाउ
E non ne ho ancora uno, ma mi sento più vicino ad averlo ora che in qualsiasi altro momento. Credo sia questo maledetto ossigeno al 100%. Lo respiro e non credo di essere mai stato così asciutto. Con il peggior raffreddore che abbia mai avuto, in cui non riesco a respirare con il naso e sembro avere un raffredd
RKV之
喷气发动机，螺旋桨按钮复位，中止，中止阶段复
Come off 
Okay. Jack says you want to be sure and use the red filter and the filter holder for that One
ठीक है, क्या आप कॉपी करन
Ok
Aktuell sprechen wir von einer Strömungsgeschwindigkeit von 7 Fuß pro Sekunde in der Mitte der Bahn, etwa 104 Stunden vor dem Eintreffen. Hochgerechnet auf die 8 Stunde
ठीक है। चलिए, मैं आपको इसे फिर से समझाता हूँ। पहले चा
Aquarius, abbiamo terminato l'uplink. Il
الأمو
Les gants à bouts bleu
Gemini 4, Houston. Vou
देखिए,
أبولو 8، هيوستن
- -... 릴레이가 작동하고 TRIM
Roger. Purge de la pile à combustible à oxygène à 113 h 30. Retour au calendrier nominal à 121 heures de réveil. Changement d'hydroxyde de lithium n° 9 en cours. Configuration de veille COMM lunaire normale, je suis dedans. Au fai
罗杰。到达地区酒店还有4小时32分37秒。
Roger, Frank
わかりました、ジム、プライマリ カートリッジではあと 1 時
了解。そ
Bon, ça devrait presque suffire
Ok. Non ho fretta. S
了解です。プラス25で、/になります。63087、マイナス162、プラス129、マイナス001 63、プラス00001、プラス527 59 177 137 001、ノベンバー・アルファ、プラス00201 527 59 623 525 43 14 2347 337 023、上195、左17、プラス11 45、
Okay. Apollo 13, Houston. Alle Systeme sind in Ordnung, und die Überprüfung des hohen Saue
Привет, Калифор
— fermé un peu plus t
Хорошо. Это всё, что ты ел с т
了解。今はアンテナと同じ位置です。それに15度の傾斜がついています。いや、ちょっと待ってください。265度ではなく、275
자, 휴스턴, 시작해 보세요
네. 아주
乔：
로저. 마지막 예정된 활동을 시작하시는군요. 초기 추적 결과, 초기 중간 지점 속도가 첫 번째 예상인 초당 4피트보다 느릴 것으로 보입니다. 연소 데이터도 확인했는데, 말씀하신 대로 모든 것이 순조롭고 정상으로 보입니다. 시스템
حسنًا. بعد ذلك، قم بإغلاق قاطع الدائرة CTE، MAIN B. ثم، اللوحة 250: قم بإغلاق قاطع الدائرة BAT C BAT CHARGE/2؛ ثم قم بإغلاق قاطع الدائرة BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING. ثم، اللوحة 275: قم بإغلاق قاطع الدائرة MAIN B، BAT BUS B؛ ثم قم بإغلاق قاطع الدائرة INVERTER POWER 2، MAIN B. حسنًا. بالمناسبة، أي شيء أعطيتك إياه حتى الآن ليس تسلسليًا، ولكن من الآن فصاعدًا، يجب أن يكون كذلك - يجب أن تتأكد من القيام بذلك
मुझे लगता है मैंने समझ लिया, बज़। हाँ, बिल्कुल। लेकिन जब उसने वह दूसरा काम किया, तो संज्ञा 20 थी, इसलिए जब उसने 3175 और फिर 002 एंटर दबाया, तो उसने वास्तव में प
我
Il s'est écoulé 6 minutes et 35 secondes, et je procède à l'arrêt complet du vaisseau. Nous avions déjà coupé la plateforme et l'ordinateur après 
收到。1，G&N：38658，减054，加065，TIG 07
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ وضعية مُحاذاة محور الجسم، باستخدام خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار على الأرض كما فعلنا من قبل. وبمجرد حصولنا على ذلك، سننفذ -7، وهو ما يبدو الآن وكأنه احتراق بمعدل قدمين في الثانية أو حوالي 15 ثانية. وقد أُبلغتُ أنه انخفض إلى قدم ونصف الآن، لذا فهو ضمن الحدود الآمنة. حسنًا. عند القيام بذلك، سنبدأ فورًا المناورة للوصول إلى و
Ja. Die Helligkeit ist immer noch sehr gut. Sie können sie ruhig um ein oder zwei Stufen erhöhen. Die automat
제가 방금 말했듯이, 네, 인수인계 준비되셨나요? 음, 그분이 방금 물어보셨는데, 제가 자고 있어야 하는 줄 알았다고 하셨어요. 그래서 저는 당신이 오기를 기다리고 있다고 말씀드렸죠. 네. 그분들이 설명하실 때 당신은 인터넷에 접속하지 못하셨잖아요. 그런데, 이제 더 이상 CDU를 모니터링해서 안테나 전환 시기를 알 수 없나요? 그래서 그분들이... 안테나 전환이 확인되면, 몇 분 정도 걸릴 거예요. 그리고 
UP T
Columbia, ici Houston. Veuillez confirmer. Nous avons une charge pour vous. Pause. Eagle, nous sommes prêts à passer à l'étape 4. Veuillez sélectionner la voix de bande S pour VOIX. Terminé
Хорошо. Джим, пока мы работаем над этой процедурой, мы хотели бы узнать
रॉज
Хорошо. Я не вижу никаких болтающихся датчиков — верхний, верхний
로저. 명사 33부터 시작합니다: 130 30 0000, 더하기 00020, 더하기 모든 0, 더하기 모든 0. 모든 0을 굴리고, 피치 230, 요 0.은 NA입니다. DELTA-
O
जी हां, आपने सही कहा। हमने पुष्टि की कि कट-ऑफ समय लगभग वैसा ही था जैसा आपने देखा था, और मेरे पास इसका कोई स्पष्टी
11, Хью
और
Apollo 11, H
Roger. Un instant. Ils veulent savoir si vous pensez que le bus principal B convient au module
모든 게 아주 연한 갈색이나 회색처럼 보이죠. 그게 바로 색깔이에
Jim, zwei Anmerkungen: Im Bedienfeld möchten wir überprüfen, ob der Schalter für die Pyrolyse-Batterie in der Hauptposition steht. Und wir sind bereit, den Leistungsverstärker-Leistungsschalter an Schalttafel 16 zu ziehen, sob
我们在大约179英里处锁定了目标，雷达波束指向大约在156英里处；指针相对稳定，看起来不错。偏航指针来回摆动，大概正负1度。这里需要说明的是，我们遇到的问题是消除残差。我们把残差降到一个很小的数值，然后下一次读数它又会增加，再下一次读数它又会减少。很难判断我们何时真正达到了零残差。地面站说我们没有残差。加速度计偏差看起来没问题，但现在看来好像有什么
昨夜はフランクも私も寝る前に食事を済
Проверил температуру купола костюма, она составляет 82 градуса, а вы только
As the booster departed us, you could see the fuel spraying out of the roll nozzle. As the booster tumbled around, mostly in a plane that would be perpendicular to a line through the major axis of the spacecraft to the booster, you could see the long flowing tail that came out of it. I'm going to draw a short little picture of that on my flight plan. There was debris all over at spacecraft separation. We turned around and there were things all over the place. As a matter of fact, until we really got a good look at the booster, I really couldn't tell what was what. Fairings came off right at fairing jett with no problem. The horizon scanner fairings looked like they came off intact but I couldn't really tell because it disappeared out of sight so last. I didn't see the nose fairing come off at all
그는 방향 감각을 유지하는 데 어려움을 겪었고, 그때부터는 우주선이 어느 방향을 향하고 있는지조차 고려하지 않고 우주선에서 시선을 돌리는 것처럼 보였습니다. 실제로 그는 초당 최대 2도에 달하는 상당히 높은 각도로 방향을 바꿀 수 있었습니다. 저는 그 정도 수준 이하로 유지하려고 했습니다. 그가 우주선 안으로 다시 들어갔을 때, 우리는 해치를 여는 데 상당한 어려움을 겪었습니다. 먼저 해치의 래칫 부분을 들어 올려 고정했습니다. 그런데 고정하고 나니 해치가 충분히 닫히지 않았습니다. 결국 우리는 고정 장치를 빼내기 위해 잠금 손잡이를 아래로 잡
Wie 
حسنًا. اللوحة 3: تمّت معالجة الأسطر الثلاثة الأولى مسبقًا في بداية إجراء التراجع، لذا بدءًا من MODE، VOICE، يجب أن يعود إلى VOICE. POWER، إيقاف؛ PMP، إيقاف؛ هوائي النطاق S، متعدد الاتجاهات Bravo. اللوحة 225: CB FLIGHT BUS، M
カプセルの周りを旋回して窓の前まで来ると、みんな明るく照らされている。平均する
Нулевой тангаж, рыскание на четверть градуса и устойчивое поло
D'accord
漏
Roger, sembra una buona idea. E a terra ci dice che il volo consiste nell'accendere il riscaldatore della linea di spurgo dell'idrogeno e preparar
C
请问您的
Ok, Bill. Ci stiamo avvicinando al momento degli avvistamenti, e c'è il timore che se
Apollo 11, this is Houston. We are seeing the pitch hot firing a
正如您可能知道的，我们有几个小组正在制定接下来的程序。一个小组正在研究中途修正，以确定系统、姿态、操作方法、对准技术等等。一个小组正在研究进入阶段，包括如何以及何时激活。还有一个小组正在研究系统状态，几个小时后——或者明天晚些时候，根据我们的预测，我们将进入某种基本配置，并进行主总线B检查。现在通信信号有点弱，我听不太清楚您要说什
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Калифорнийский коммерческий технологический институт, Калифорнийский коммерческий технологический институт. Вы читаете? Кон
अभी हम बिल्कुल ज़मीन के करीब हैं, इस तरह कि मुझे नहीं लगता कि ग्राउंड स्टेशन हमें पढ़ पा रहे हैं। हमने कई बार कॉल कटते-कटते सुनी हैं। हम कुछ देर इसी स्थिति में रहेंगे ताकि बूस्टर हमारी नज़र में रहे। अभी बूस्टर के करीब आने में हमें कोई खास सफलता नहीं मिल रही है। ऐसा लग रहा है कि वो अभी भी उतनी ही दूरी पर है जितनी पहले थी। रात में जब बूस्टर हमारे नीचे था, तब ऐसा लग रहा था मानो पूरा आसमान तारों से भरा हो। बूस्टर से इतनी ज़्यादा भाप निकल रही 
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, Cape Cap Com. Be advised your landing point is long. We 
好奇心ですが、データファイルのすぐ後ろにある食料庫を開けましたか? 終
Ed, ici le c
저도 듣고 있어요. 레이더 촬영은 다 
Momentan habe ich drei Achsen praktisch auf Rückwärtsneigung eingestellt. Die Gierbewegung durch das Fadenkreuz wird üblicherweise als Rate beobachte
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Aggiornamento della ma
了解、ビル。パージしている間に、クルーの状況報告をお願いでき
走査望遠鏡で何が見えるか確認するために、急いで戻ってみました。今のところ、後ろはかなり厳しい状況です。粗いアラインメントで進めて、時間があれば、アラインメントのドッキング角度を細かく計算する必要があ
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 비행 계획 업데이트를 진행하십시
아
Ho seguito la procedura dal punto 7 fino al punto in cui ho ottenuto 27303 ENTER, e questo ha causa
Non, je ne vais pas te perdre
Va b
아폴로 11호, 휴
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们的操作人员
روجر. إليك ملخصًا موجزًا ​​للتحديثات التي ستتلقاها. التحديث الحالي الذي يمنحك نقطتين إضافيتين بعد مناورة تحليق بنقطة سالبة ثماني
Apollo 8, Houston. Abbiamo quei numeri in percentuale. Li convertiremo in libbre e, nel frattempo, cam
オーケー、アクエリアス。ジャイロのトルク​​角がいくつかあるし、オデッセイ
Хорошо, Джек. На панели 3: ЗАРЯДНОЕ УСТРОЙСТВО ДЛЯ АККУМУЛЯТОРОВ, выключено; ИНВЕРТОР ПЕРЕМЕННОГО ТОКА 2, выключено; на панели 5: ГЛАВНАЯ ШИНА СВЯЗИ Alfa Charlie, включена; панель 250: CB BAT A, ВХОД ПИТАНИЯ и ПОСАДКА П
Affermativo. Questo completa la scheda. Il resto degli aggiornamenti sono solo per vostra informazione, basati sulla nostra piattaforma a 58 ore - guardate la piattaforma. Siamo davvero in ottima forma. I vostri GYRO non hanno praticamente alcuna deriva da quando - nell'aggiornamento tracciato stavamo osservando X di a - 2,24... Y di punto più 0,87, Z di - 0,11. Dall'aggiornamento, che si basava sulle 52 ore, credo, vi abbiamo dato una deriva X di più 0,79, imbardata di più 1,06, Z di più 0,02... Vedo che la differenza tra gli allineamenti a 52 ore e a 57 ore non ci ha dato abbastanza tempo per ottenere un aggiornamento veramente buono o 
주소 25, 26, 27번이 정리되었습니다. 좋
Хорошо. Тогда нет смысла возиться с этими клапанами регулиро
जी हाँ। हम आपके द्वारा दी गई जानकारी से अपनी जानकारी का मि
عرض جيد. إذن، نحن نسير في الا
阿波罗13号，休斯顿。你们现在能听到我说
よし、ヒューストン。テレビ視聴者のために、アクエリアス号の簡単な調査はほぼ完了した。今はハッチの隙間からトンネ
Роджер, и контрольный список SECO выполнен
はい
نعم، أرسل ∆T - سيكون الأمر على ما يرام. أريده أيضاً بدون
Видишь, со мной не получится, Скотт? А теперь я измерил парциальное давление кислорода (PO2), которое при этом обну
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒュースト
Sì, posso. Hai ancora 30 seco
Unsere Radarmessungen ergaben eine Perilunhöhe
Der Kabinendruck liegt konstant bei etwa 4,8 bis 5,0, also ziemlich genau im unteren Bereich. Auch der Sauerstoffgehalt i
Apollo 8, Houston. Roger. En commençant par X: moins 29840, plus 02390, plus 01053 000 200
D'accord. Je vais
알겠습니다. 다운링크 데이터에 따르면 
了解。ジムのコメントを確認中です。その間、機動状況と地図の最新情報をお送りしますので、ご都合の良い時にご連絡くだ
You were noisy; I didn't copy
好的，我会的。另外，我还想问你一个问题。在这种对接状态下，我们需要用控制杆来控制俯仰和横滚。那么，在不改变航向的情况下，我们究竟能用多大幅度地控制这些控制杆呢
Roger. We received your last reports from Muchea and is that auto r
아폴로 
В этом шлеме у меня одни 
Чуть ниже. Я сниму его с
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। यह अपोलो 8 है। सामान्य ध
Okay. I'm within three hundredths. That's within our ability to keep 
Roger, Guaymas. Die IVI-Anzeige lautete 331 achtern, 105 rechts und 4 oben. Ge
D'accord... sur ce... vecteur. D'accord, R1 plus 45498... D'ac
オーケー。クリスマス前夜、宇宙のはるか遠くで、アポロ8号の乗組員たちは月面レースに勝利したばかりだった。ヘッドセットはコンソールに丁寧に掛けられ、クリス・クラフトがもうすぐそこにいるだろうと期待していた。フランク・ボーマンはベッドに心地よく潜り込み、宇宙船の夢が頭の中で踊っていた。ジム・ラヴェルはソファに、アンダースはベイにいてコンピューターのディスプレイに頭を悩ませていた。その時、物音が響き、フランクはベッドから飛び起き、何事かと尋ねた。彼は電光石火のごとく六分儀へと飛び、墜落しないかと確かめた。月のギザギザの地殻の胸に灯る光は、灰色の月の塵に緑のチーズのような輝きを与えていた。その時、彼の驚嘆の目に映ったのは、ビルマ・シェーブの看板で「キルロイはここにいる」と書かれていた。しかしフランクは馬鹿ではなかった。すぐに彼らが先だったと悟った。これはきっと罠に違いない。ロケットよりも速く、彼らは罵声を浴びせ、フランクは乗組員の方を向いて彼らを罵倒した。今度はラヴェル、今度はアンダース、今度はお前が壁に書いた古い冗談に私が騙されるとは思わないでくれ。彼ら
Non, c
ええ。もうすっかり慣れて、ぐっすり眠れ
캠프에 참가한 아이들조차 뉴스에 등장했는데, 마이크 주니어가 누군가 "아빠가 
Aquarius, Houston. You might pass on to Jim, he had such a long day yester
不
Houston,
ठीक है। पहली दो पंक्ति
मैं ऑटो रेट्रो
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Indian Com Tech. Как читать? К
Это Sigma Seven. 30-секундная проверка КВ, начиная с 10 секунд после этого. Эт
अगर तुमने संगीत चला रखा है, तो मुझे सुनाई
알겠습니다,
休斯顿，阿波罗8
ओह, हमें अभी-अभी श्री नील आर्मस्ट्रांग की उपस्थिति से सम्मानित होने का सौभाग्य प्राप्त हुआ है, जो इस समय सीएपी कॉम कंसोल के पास खड़े हैं, सतर
Affermativo. Hai interrotto la discussione per un minuto, Jim. Lo faremo sulla palla partendo dall'assetto di partenza. Vogliamo solo che tu ruoti di 90 gradi in entrambe le direzioni, mantieni 
गुआ
You might get it coming sideways here; stand by in case it does. What's the AOS 
それは明らかで
बिंद
31700, NA, NA,, 마이너스 00050, 플러스 모두 0, 플러스 00001 000 334 001, 모두 0, 플러스 00190 00050 014 0
Хорошо. В 4-й строке: в разделе НАГРЕВАТЕЛИ ваши четыре нагревателя должны быть закрыты, откройте ДИСПЛЕИ, откройте S-ДИАПАЗОННУЮ АНТЕННУ, откройте ПОСЛЕДОВАТЕЛЬНУЮ КАМЕРУ. Далее откройте ДИСПЛЕИ, закройте НАПРЯЖЕНИЕ ШИНЫ ПОСТОЯННОГО ТОКА, откройте ИНВЕРТОР 2, откройте УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ASCENT ECA и ASCENT ECA, закройте DESCENT ECA, УПРАВЛЕНИЕ DESCENT ECA, ТРАНСЛУНАРНУЮ ШИНУ, закройте ПЕРЕКРЕСТНЫЕ БАЛАНСИРОВОЧНЫЕ НАГРУЗКИ, о
रॉजर। हम 
بيل، ما خططنا لك له مباشرة بعد انتهاء جيم هو تفريغ مياه الصرف الصحي، ودورة مروحة التبريد، وفحص المكونات الاحتياطية، وتنظيف خلية
أبولو 8، هيوستن. كانت جودة الصوت على شريطك متوسطة إلى جيدة؛ تمكنا من مراقبة عملية ال
Хорошо, Rcal отключен. Мы рекомендуем вам пер
Nous avons un vecte
روجر. أتفهم رغبتك في ا
Roger… au-dessus de la zone de l’ouragan ou du typhon… juste au-dessus de Carla et… lesquels c’était? 
Роджер, Нил. Спасибо. Также, похоже, что чуть левее терминатора, в северном полушарии, находится полоса облаков, простирающаяся на северо-запад/юго-во
The floodlight isn't - hasn't even made t
13, Houston. suggests you try AVERAGE 
Roger, Houston. Quelques mots sur notre système de suivi optique. J'ai utilisé AUTO OPTICS pour les points de contrôle 1 et 2 à l'arrière, et cela a parfaitement fonctionné: le suivi des deux cibles a été effectué sans problème. Je me suis ensuite rendu au point de contrôle 3, tel qu'indiqué dans notre manuel de contrôle orbital, pour relever la latitude et la longitude qui m'avaient été fournies. J'ai utilisé AUTO OPTICS pour suivre ce système de coordonnées, et le résultat était très précis par rapport à la trajectoire réelle. J'ai sélectionné le repère à cet endroit pour effectuer un marquage final et j'ai enregistré la latitude et la longitude. Je m'apprête maintenant à me positionner sur le site d'atterrissage et à utiliser AUTO OPTICS avec les données d'entrée codées pour tester son fonctionnemen
حسنًا. دعني أشاركك ملاحظاتي حول ناقل التيار الرئيسي B. حدثت الأمور بسرعة كبيرة هناك، وسمعنا أولًا صوت الاصطدام أو الانفجار أو أيًا كان السبب، لست متأكدًا. بعد ذلك - حوالي ثانية واحدة - انطلق إنذار رئيسي يشير إلى انخفاض جهد ناقل التيار الرئيسي B. نظرت إلى الجهد، وكان جيدًا في ذلك الوقت، لذا أظن أنه كان ارتفاعًا مفاجئًا. كانت خلية الوقود 3 جيدة أيضًا، مع تدفق جيد. مع ذلك، في تلك ال
그게 바로 그들이 원하는 거잖아요? 그가 말한 대로 실행하세요.
ठीक है, फ्रेडो, कृपया आकस्मिक योजना सूची निकालें; प
Gemelli 4, Ho
हां, हम उस स्तर
روجر. لقد أصبح لدينا الآن رؤية جيدة يا نيل، لـ DEDA؛ وكذلك ACA الخا
——建议您目前所有电池都不会出现故
Hallo Muchea, hallo Muchea Cap Com
ロジャーです。9度以上の角度を5分間目視で確認で
로저, 물병자리시군요. 저희도 당신
حسنًا. لقد نجحت. جربناها مرة أو مرتين أثناء الخروج
Okay. Questo è un più 11, /. Questo 40 meno 163, più 129, meno 005, 99, più 00 00 0, più 47016, 177 143 000 Novembre Alfa, più 001 97 47 020 5
Si vous pensez qu'il y a un problème avec ce RCS, faites-le savoir et je vous mett
阿波罗8号，休斯
哥伦比亚号，下次飞行时，我们希望你不要进行常规搜索，而是搜索我们之前给出的坐标附近区
罗杰，飞行计划有一项更正。你将在
你现在想把其中一个遮
حسنًا. أولًا، ملاحظة. ينتهي قسم ضوء الأبراج في منتصف الصفحة، أسفل هذا الجزء مباشرةً. ثم، إذا نزلت إلى أسفل الصفحة، اشطب السطر "الهدف الضوئي 12 على المسار الصحيح"، وما إلى ذلك، 
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir zeigen Ihnen, wie Sie Ihr Abwasser bis
Und ich werde Sie mit diesen Anrufen nicht mehr bel
Roger, wir nähern uns der Sichtlinie. Mehr 
Разве вам не хочется, чтобы земля взошла на поверхность? Это займ
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, ici le chiru
ジェミニ8
Sigma Seven, hier spricht Cal Cap Com. Wiederholung der Durchsage im Blindflug. Cape empfiehlt, die Uhr auf 33 Sekunden zurückzusetzen. Ende der Durchsag
Houston. Rice
よし。16ミリと70ミリのR-13フィルムを撮影済み。さて、次はO2ホースのスクリーンキャップをO2ホ
Va bene. Okay. Vuoi qualche lettura dal misuratore di prova dei sistemi per quanto ri
13، هيوستن. نود منك محاولة إعادة توصيل خلية الوقود 1 بالخط الرئيسي A وخلية الوقود 3 بالخط الرئيسي B. ت
알겠습니다. 두 가지 더 확인이 필요합니다. 메시지가 담긴 디스크가 계획대로 수면에 투하되
جميع البطاريات تُشير إلى حوالي 23.5 فولت أو أعلى، وقراءة الأمبير ثابتة تقريبًا عند 20 أمبير. أردتُ التأكد قبل إيقاف التشغيل، والجهد 115 فولت. المراو
ワシントンでは、下院歳入委員会が石油会社、銀行、公益事業に影響を与える税制改革案を承認しました。この案は連邦政府の歳入を年間約20億ドル増加させる可能性があります。また本日、NASA
私はスモールエンドフォワード（小端を前に出す）タイプで、小端がまっすぐ上を
Non saprei dire, Jack, siamo stati così impegnati laggiù, che ci siamo un po' dimenticati dell'altra metà. Ma sono salito diverse volte al piano di sopra e non avevo notato particolari correnti d'aria dalle finestre, quindi... la mia prima ipotesi è stata che si trattasse di una nuova ventilazione. In realtà non era molto 
Ricevuto. Ti consig
Roger. Vedo che
好的。横滚 180，俯仰角 228，偏航角 001；不适用；加上 0017.9，6652.2，7:37，6626.5，我错过了六分仪轴；- 轴颈 - 轴颈，15.7，射手座ζ星，向上，08.0；横滚 2.1
روجر
जी हां। जैक, हम बिजली बचाने के लिए लॉजिक बंद कर रहे हैं। तो हम इन्हें बंद कर देंगे, और जब हम उतरने जाएंगे तो मैं इन्हें फिर से चालू कर दूंगा; फिर इन्हें बंद कर देंगे, और फिर अंदर जाने से पहले इन्हें चालू कर देंगे। ब
تفضل يا ستيلهيد. الصداقة ا
Roger. Parmi les gros titres concernant Apollon ce matin, l'un d'eux vous invite à guetter une charmante jeune fille accompagnée d'un gros lapin. Une légende ancienne raconte qu'une belle Chinoise nommée Chang'o vit là depuis 4 000 ans. Il semblerait qu'elle ait été bannie sur la Lune pour avoir volé la pilule d'immortalité à son époux. Vous pourriez également chercher son compagnon, un grand lapin chinois, facile à repérer car il se tient toujours sur ses pa
シェービングク
好的，休斯顿。阿波罗11
双子座4号，夏威夷 CAP C
分
You might be interested to know that I don't think we noti
Roger, roger, roge
Senden im Blindflug. Sichtverbindung. Die verstrichene Zeit am Boden beträgt laut meiner Markierung 4 Stunden, 29 Minuten und 30 Sekunden. Senden im Blindflug an Aurora Seven. Stellen Sie sicher, dass alle Tonschalter eingeschaltet sind, die Warnleuchten leuchten, die Sicherung für die manuelle Rückwärtssteuerung eingeschaltet und die Sicherung für 
Температура
Хорошо. Сейчас я вам перечислю открытые участки. Нам
Okay. What you are saying is, if you look at the cat's
Man kann den Nil fast bis zu seiner Quelle sehen. Der See ist zwar von Wolken verhüllt, aber
로저. 수동 모드는 8
ठीक है, जैक। मैं अभी आपको थ्रस्टर कॉन्फ़िगरेशन बताता हूँ। एबल 1, चार्ली 1, एबल 2 बंद हैं। चार्ली 2, मेन ए, और बाकी सभी थ्रस्टर जो मैं चालू बताता हूँ, मेन ए पर हैं। बेकर 1 बंद है। डॉग 1 चालू है, बेकर 2 बंद है, डॉग 2 चालू है। एबल 3, चार्ली 3, एबल 4, चा
이것
罗杰。如果你希望我们在你……之前撤回这里，请给我们
كل شيء
了解。プラス90、G&N: 63481、マイナス153、プラス132、004 10 25 38、マイナス047
रॉजर। हम सहमत हैं। हम बस यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते थे कि आपके साथ ह
यहां जमीन पर सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा ह
この岩塊は、最終降下時に通過した、この大きくて鋭い縁を持つ岩のリムクレーターに起源を持つのではないかと考えています。昨日、私はそれがフットボール競技場ほどの大きさだと言いましたが、実際、近づくにつれて測るのが少し難しくなりました。しかし、私たちが通り過ぎた時には、アストロドームにちょうど収まるだろうと思いました。そして、この岩のリムクレーター付近の岩は、この地域の岩よりもはるかに大きく、中には10フィートほど、あ
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。残り約8分です。発射は135秒34秒05、発射なしは135秒44です。
Okay. Gig us again in a few minutes. We're breaking out some fo
روجر. أبلغ قائد الط
吉姆，给你一点信息，如果你因
デルタHはマイナス2900
好的。9、8、7、6、5、
جيد ج
ジョー、了解。ジャックの方にカメラを向けているんだけど、窓の外に地球が見えてかなり明
Ok. POWER JETT, due, OFF. E poi dirò solo ATTENZIONE e AVVERTENZA NORMALE per RICONOSCERE; ATTENZIONE e AVVERTENZA - ATTENZIONE e AVVERTENZA a C
Ok. Non c'è molto da dire stamattina. La situazione è piuttosto tranquilla. Credo che la notizia più importante sia il tasso di incidenti - le morti durante le festività - che non è certo una notizia piacevole, ma abbiamo avuto 233 vittime a livello nazionale, e 9 di loro a Houston la vigilia di Natale, e a Natale. Nei notiziari mondiali, le famiglie sono tornate a far notizia. Questo è "Le famiglie dell'equipaggio dell'Apollo 8 hanno inviato un messaggio di Natale al Comandante della Marina Lloyd Bucher, Capitano dell'equipaggio della USS Pueblo, diffuso questa settimana dalla Corea del Nord. Il messaggio, indirizzato al Comandante e alla signora Bucher, presso 
Attendez. D
Je faisais ça; à chaque fois que je descendais 
目前舱体运行良好。250（逆变器）温度为132度，150（逆变器）温度为……5。备用（逆变器）温度为120度……推进器……向右，向左超过100度。俯仰角（推进器）为105度。俯仰角（推进器）为100度。舱内热交换器（设置）为4.0。手动左滚（推进器）为79度。自动右滚（推进器）为110度，自动左
罗杰。桑给巴尔。我完全是个
로저. 비행 계획이 완전히 예정대로 진행되고 있다고는 확신할 수 없습니다. 
«Дружба Семь», это Кант
أبولو 8، أبولو 8،
MANŒUVRE et ATTI
Roger, I have to ru
11、こちらはヒューストンです。中間軌道修正番号5、RCS/G&N: 26025、ピッチとヨーのトリムはNA、TIG 150 29 5453、マイナス00048、全てのボールはプラス、プラス00001 075 159 328。HAはNA、HPはプラス00230 00048 011 00048。六分儀星は03 0908 382。ボアサイト星ブロックは入手不可。緯度プラス1102、マイナス17204 118
これはシグマ・セブンのVOX録音のみです。ハイスラスターを作動させず、通常の自動モードに戻しました。この時点で、85%が自動、90%が手動です。これで、以前はできなかった実験がいくつかできる気がします。これからフライ・バイ・ワイヤでカプセ
Questa è Friendship Seven. Ora 
रात में अवलोकन के लिए रेटिकल को पर्याप्त रूप से मंद नहीं किया जा सकता। खिड़की में तारों को फिर से चिह्नित करें, यानी ग्रस को... थॉरस ठीक केंद्र रेखा से नीचे आ रहा है। लगभग 5 डिग्री दाईं ओर घूम सकते हैं, जिससे डेड रेकनिंग के लिए पर्याप्त होगा। फिर लगभग 5 डिग्री बाईं ओर घूमें, जो काफी स्पष्ट होगा। रेट्रो के लिए, यह एक बहुत अच्छा सेटअप लगता है। चंद्रमा की तेज रोशनी में, जो भोर की रोशनी होगी, यहाँ उड़ान भरने में कोई समस्या नहीं होगी। कभी-कभी आप एक जमीनी रोशनी देख सकते हैं
罗杰，那是停止按钮。停
Nous confirmons, Jim, vous êtes bien configu
मुझे लगता है कि आप नहीं चाहते थे कि वे अनजाने में हिल जाएँ। जिम, इससे कोई फर्क नहीं पड़ता, 
«Аполлон-11» впервые наблюдает за заходом на посадку. На этот раз мы пролетаем над кратером Тарунтиус, и фотографии и карты, привезенные 
좋아요. 방금 
好的，11号断路器显示
That's a Roger, Jim. What happens is, of course, we set - when you go out of detent, you reset the error needles and you - and you lose your attitude reference. You establish a new attitude reference, and it might not be the burn attitude since, at this point, we're controlling attitude with the. Now, picking up with the ", ENTER," scratch. Scrat
ठीक है, जिम। ईंधन बचाने के लिए, हम चाहेंगे कि आप इसे न्यूनतम गति पर सेट करें, वैसे तो इसमें बहुत कम सेटिंग की आवश्यकता होती है; तो आप ऐसा कर सकते हैं। हम अपेक्षित ईंधन खपत पर चल रहे हैं, लेकिन हम
الفوهة التالية التي تظهر في الأسفل هي جزيرة ديوك، وإلى اليسار، الفوهة الأكبر قرب مركز الصورة حاليًا هي
Jetzt können S
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Wir bitten Sie, den Ladevorgang von Batterie B zu beenden, den Ladevorgang von Batterie A zu starten und anschließend eine Sauerstoffspülung
Okay. Ich denke, wir werde
那是我。
알리, 맞아. 
D'accord. Bien reçu, Fred. Merci beaucoup; 38,9 et 1,9. Il trace simplement un graphique aussi régulier que possible pour vérifier l'ampérage réinjecté dans la batterie. C'est pourquoi il souhaite des relevés toutes les demi-heures. Si ce rythme perturbe sérieusement votre cycle de repos
Hey, kannst du da nicht noch mehr klauen? Ja.
我
ठीक है। बस आप लोगों को बताना चाहता था कि आप लोग तय समय से डेढ़ घंटा ज़्यादा समय ले चुके हैं और हम सब कल छुट्टी पर हैं, इसलिए हम अब जा रहे हैं। फि
Le MESA n'est pas en panne, n'es
おそらく、私が OMNI をどれだけ速く切り替えなけ
Roger. Rather than power-up and go to heads-up 
C'est exact, et nous serions également intéressés par tout commentaire concer
Да. Полагаю, вам п
又
Roger. We've been looking at your consumables, and you're in good shape. Subject to your concurrence, we'd like to extend the duration of the 15 minutes from nominal. We will still give Buzz a hack at 10 minutes for heading in. Your 
Подождите, Фред, шаг 1. Мы сей
مرحباً يا تكساس. ال
À cet instant, les rayons du soleil se réfléchissent sur le nez du vaisseau, l'obscurcissant complètement. Quelques étoiles brillantes sont visibles à gauche et en dessous. Je distingue maintenant la ceinture d'Orion. Sirius se trouve donc bien en dessous de 
عند تشغيل المركبة، قمتُ أخيرًا بضبط الجيروسكوبا
That's affirmative. That completes that card. The rest of the updates are just really for your information based on our 58 hour platform - look at the p
ジェミニ4号、こちらはヒューストン外科医です
Auto One，这里是S
Non ci sono cambiamenti e si parte per l'EVA. Abbiamo le... telecamere, la pistola, tutta l'attrezzatura assemblata, stiamo completando
١٣، هذه هيوستن. نود منك إجراء مسح لشاشات العرض الخاصة بك على MDCs ١ و ٢. زودنا بقراءات العدادات وردود الفعل
The temperature is about 111, the heli
Okay. Ich wollte Sie nur darauf hinweisen und Sie bitten, darüber nachzudenken und die möglichen Auswirkungen auf den Flugplan zu bedenken. Ich lasse Ihnen dann die Weitwinkelaufnahme und die Kommentare zum Mond vorab durchgehen und sehe, welche Abschnitte am besten geeignet erscheinen. Okay. Frank bat uns, die Reihenfolge der Eintrittsprofile auf der Bildrolle zu überprüfen. Das erste Profil ist mit „Nonexit Nummer 2“ beschriftet und stellt den Kurzstrecken-Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt dar. Das zweite Profil heißt „3500 Meilen“ und ist ebenfalls ein Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt, der jedoch für längere Eintrittsstrecken verwendet wird. Das dritte Profil ist „Nonexit Eintritt Nummer 1“, gefolgt von einem vierten, ebenfalls 3500 Meilen langen Eintrittsprofil. Es gibt also vier Eintrittsprofile. Die Nummern 1 und 3 sind die Kurzstrecken, die Nummern 2 und 4 die Langstreckeneintritte. B
Friendship Seven. Ici Canton Cap Com. Tous les systèmes au sol semblent opérationnels. La température de votre onduleur de 150 volts-ampères est actuellement de 188°. J
Well, you and Heidi are running neck and neck in the tel
Okay, Fred. Damit wären die DELTAs abgeschlossen. Und vielleicht hast du schon gehört, dass unsere GAMMAs immer noch bei minus 6,03 liegen und unser DELTA-V eine Brenngeschwindigkeit von 2,8 Fuß pro Sekunde habe
M
2000フィート
Gut, minus 00050, plus lau
Ich brauch
Oui, c'est ex
わかりました。マスタータイトルは「進入、LM準備、マイナス6時間」です。まず、BAT 5 NORMAL FEEDをONにします。次に、修正版/、30分起動チェックリストを使用します。次に、マイナス5時間、必要であれば-7です。さて、進入前の手順です。まず、サービスモジュールSEP姿勢に移動します。次に、ホットファイアを設定します。その下で、デッドバンドを最大にし、ATTITUDE CONTROLを3、PULSEに設定します。3、ホットファイアを実行します。4、ATTITUDE CONTROLをPITCHとROLLからPULSE、ATTITUDE CONTROL、YAWからMODE CONTROLに設定し、SEP姿勢に戻りま
알겠습니다. 조용히 하려고 하시는 걸 알고 있으니, 제가 정보를 좀 읽어 드리겠습니다. 방금 알아낸 정보 중 하나는, 산소 극저온 탱크가 고장 나더라도 현재 80파운드(약 36kg)의 산소가 남아 있다는 점입니다. 현재 단일 탱크 운용의 제한 요소는 수소 탱크인데, 표준 프로필을 기준으로 약 143시간 동안 운용할 수 있다고 가정하면 수소 탱크에는 여유분이 있습니다. 따라서 산소 탱크는 이미 한계를 넘어선 것 같습니다. 현재 2번 레이트 포지션으로 비행하고 계신 것은 괜찮습니다. 다만, 자세를 유지하고 
Vous voulez e
好的。两个s，如果你还
Roger, 41 Delta (Over.) 83. 
血圧測定は停止しました。さて、温度の問題をリセットするために、R cal を数
रॉजर। प्रतीक्षा करें, मैं स्थिति रिपोर्ट दूंगा। मैं आपकी ट्रैकिंग के लिए ऑर्बिट एटीट्यूड मे
Хорошо. Я проверил заряд батареи, вентиляционный клапан, продувку топливного элемента, а затем остановимся на 55 часах, и ваш угол крена составит 285 градусов, что соответствует плану полета. Углы антенны
Roger. Ho mangiato tutto tr
Roger, 11. We'd like to perform a waste-water dump at your convenience some time in the near future here. No particular time scheduled. Down air at the time for midcourse correction 3, which is about 53 55, we're deleting midcourse correction number 3 and all the items associated with it. For your information, the calculated value of the burn for midcourse number 3 was eight tenths of a foot per second, that is 0.8 feet per second. Canceling this, if we decide to burn midcourse correction 4, this would then give you a burn for midcourse correction 4 of 2.0 feet per se
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Один из больших кратеров на задней стороне — я заметил небольшую темную точку на внешней стенке и навел на нее монокуляр. Мне удалось увидеть — ну, область диаметром примерно в четверть мили. Это была действительно свежая, темная яма, и это, кажется, контрастирует со все
अपोलो 8, ऐसा लगता है कि हमन
Roger. J'ai amarré en mode AUTO, et comme je l'ai dit, je n'étais pas vraiment sûr du moment du contact. Je vérifiais constamment les indicateurs de la sonde d'amarrage. J'ai obtenu deux barres de barbier indiquant que les trois verrous de capture – enfin, pas les verrous de capture, mais les trois… verrous – s'étaient encl
네, 알겠습니다. 아마 오늘 오후에 그 서류를 보내드렸을 겁니
О, ладно. Мне здесь наверху не скучно. Я только что пролетел над Мидуэем. Хорошо его рассмотрел. 
Have we looked seriously now at just the essential things required to make a safe jettison? We're not - I don't think we have the time to really do any engineering data that people might want
Negativo. Non mi sembra di vederne da queste parti. Ne ho viste alcune, solo alcune, subit
روجر. شكراً لك. المقص
Roger, Mike. While we are waiting for the spacecraft to maneuver to the moon, I might note that as we get closer to the moon, the light from the sun comes right into the
네, 맞습니다. 저분이 짐 러벨입니다. 오늘 저희는 아폴로 8호 내부의 생활에 대해 간략하게 보여드리려고 합니다. 달과 지구의 모습은 이미 보여드렸으니, 이제 저희의 보금자리로 여러분을 초대하려고 합니다. 보시다시피 계기판에서 알 수 있듯이, 저희는 최소 4일 동안 이곳에 머물렀습니다. 계기판에 매일 날짜를 표시하는데, 오늘로 4일째이고 5일째를 보내고 있습니다. 물론 저희 모두 금요일 착륙을 손꼽아 기다리고 있습니다. 여기, 우주선 하부 장비실이라고 부르는 곳에서 대통령 체력 담당 고문이신 짐 러벨 대위님께서 매일 하는 운동 프로그램을 시작하시려고 합니다. 러벨 대위님이 아주 자유롭게 떠다니는 게 보이시죠? 방금 항법에 사용되는 광학 장치에 머리를 부딪히셨네요. 근육을 단련하기 위해 고안된 운동 기구를 사용하고 계십니다. 우리 우주선의 또 다른 매우 중요한 기능은 컴퓨터입니다. 여러분께서 흥미로워하실 것 같아 여기에 있는 디스플레이를 보여드리겠습니다. 이 디스플레이는 연소 과정, 항법, 그리고 지구 궤도 진입 및 역추진 시 사용하는 속도에 대한 모든 정보를 제공합니다. 보시다시피 타자기 키보드와 비슷한 장치로 조작되는데, 입력되는 정보의 양은 정말 놀랍습니다. 이 장치는 우리에게 환상적인 역할을 해냈고, 짐 러벨은 이를 훌륭하게 조작해 왔습니다. 우주에 있든 지상에 있든 또 다른 매우 중요한 것은 식사입니다. 빌 앤더스에게 비행 중 우리가 어떻게 식사를 하는지 보여달라고 부탁했습니다. 카메라를 교체하는 동안 사진이 조금 흐려질 수 있으니 양해 부탁드립니다. 우리가 사용하는 음식은 모두 건조된 것으로, 진공 포장된 봉지에 담겨 있습니다. 빌이 음식을 한 곳에 고정하기 위해 할 일은 그냥 손을 놓는 것뿐입니다. 우주선 내부의 기류만 없다면 음식은 완벽하게 정지해 있을 것입니다. 그는 멋진 가위를 꺼내 봉지를 자릅니다. 음식은 다양하고 대체로 꽤 맛있습니다. 이 말이 그다지 훌륭한 칭찬처럼 들리지 않을 수도 있지만, 어쨌든 꽤 괜찮은 
Canton arriva in anticipo. Anzi, arriva 
阿波罗8号，这里是
Gemini 4
はい。フライバイとペリシンシアン、そして2時間ブロックのアップデート
カ
罗杰。我用自动模式对接的，正如我所说，我不太确定接触的确切时刻。我一直在反复检查对接探针的指示器。我看到了两个旋转的指示灯，表明三个对接闩——不是三个，而是三个……闩——已经扣合，我们软对接成功。当时情况看起来非常稳定。于是，我切换到自由模式，回头看了一眼窗外，情况依然稳定；然后我启动了2号主气瓶。就在这时，两艘飞船之间开始出现摆
Sigma Seven,
わかりました。チェックリストの「全てのジェット」が消されていて、「全ての
R
Qui la situazione è davvero bella, Wally. Stai facendo un ot
阿波罗8号
了解
Tha
闪电看起来像一大团光斑，而不是我们平时在地球上看到的锯齿状闪电。看起来就像一大团——几乎像防空炮弹。一大团明亮的光，然后几乎瞬间就消失了。你们那里看起
Okay. Zunächst einmal, wie sieht es hier aus? Das sinkt. Das ist besser. Das steigt. Genau. Okay. Dann schalten wir das Radar mal ab. Wie lange dauer
Я о
Verseau, pourriez-vous nous fournir des DONNÉES s'il vous pla
Apollo 8, this is Houston. It looks like we ha
Base Tranquility, Houston. L
罗杰，休斯顿。请
Plötzlich fällt ein heller Lichtstrahl durchs Fenster. Ich habe keine Ahnung, was das ist. Eigentlich müsste jetzt der Sonnenuntergang bevorstehen. Das Periskop ist dunkel. Ich muss wohl nur noch einen 
Понял. И вы можете в
Gemini 4, Houst
D'accord. Sous « mise sous tension », la ligne 2 indique « 3700 clignotant, appuyez sur ENTRÉE ». Nous utiliserons cette fonction,
Okay. Mid-PAC, 000152, 000;, 178; and you recall that's moonset and Moon-check attitude. NOUN 61, minus 21.66, minus 165.37; 30; the next four are N/A; DO is 4.00, 02:20; 19, 03:38, 07:59. The rest of the pad is N/A for this one. You are lift vector up at the very bottom. And the remarks all remain the same; if you want me to copy them, let me know
そうですね。
बहुत बढ़िया। सुनो एड, हम उड़ा
यदि आप इन शांत अवधियों के दौरान हर 30 मिनट या उससे कुछ अधिक समय पर संचार की जाँच करना चाहें, तो 
わか
你的考试考
I don't know. The sun really gets in your eyes, Gus. I don't think we'll try that. Ed has tried sleeping with his helmet up and then down and right now he just slipped it up. He's having a tough time with the sun. 
أفهم أنك ستقوم بتحديث متجه الحالة، ومتجه الحالة، وا
ジェリー、レン
ठीक है। बिल, सिस्टम मूल रूप से ठीक लग रहा है। कुछ ही मिनटों में क्रायो फैन साइकिल का समय शुरू होने वाला है, और आप तैयार होने पर इसे 
E 
Roger. Hai ricevuto un bel VIA da parte nostra. È
好的。这次有点不一样。当我读ΔV时，前两个数字代表前方，后两个数字代表后方。ΔT也是一样，第一组数
Voici Sigma Seven, qui illustre les effets d'un vol inversé au lever du soleil, avec un lacet de 90 degrés. Votre trajectoire est immédiatement perceptible. C'est comme regarder par la fenêtre d'un train. Le terrain défile sous vos yeux. Des nuages ​​de toutes sortes se succèdent. Je les vois passer à toute vitesse, juste derrière le plan à 90 degrés – à 90 degrés de l'axe longitudinal du véhicule. Une représentation très, très parlante du lacet. Alors que je pivote, l'avant de mon appareil commence à prendre l'attitude de lacet correcte, malgré le fait que je sois inversé. J'aperçois une petite île. Et la luminosité est de nouveau bonne dans le cockpit. Nous avons de la lumière à ce passage. Voilà, nous sommes 
알겠습니다, 모니터 P
了解。しばらく前から連絡を取っています。HFで連絡を取ろうとしまし
わかりました。次の項目は飛ばしてください。NUMERICS LIGHTINGをOFF、FLOOD LIGHTSをOFF、INTEGRAL LIGHTS
Ладно, вот что я тебе скажу. Собери все вещи. Отдай мне все вещи прямо сейчас. Джек, о
Хорошо. Скажи е
Я это себе 
Роджер, Нил. Начнём: Весь день в Белый дом непрерывно поступают поздравительные сообщения от мировых лидеров по поводу миссии «Аполлон-11». Среди последних — телеграммы от премьер-министра Великобритании Гарольда Уилсона и короля Бельгии. Мировая пресса была полностью посвящена новостям об «Аполлоне-11». По оценкам некоторых журналистов, более 60 процентов новостей, опубликованных сегодня в газетах по всей стране, касались вашей миссии. «Нью-Йорк Таймс», которая, как мы уже упоминали, столкнулась с таким высоким спросом на свой сегодняшний выпуск
알겠습니다. 1번 창과 5번 창은 흐릿하
알겠습니다. 메인 버스 침
罗盘受其后方姿态仪和陀螺仪的影响太大，所以我不能把它拿得太近。我把它放在仪表板和我脸部中间的位置，参照物是手套箱和行李舱中间的一条线。此时，它正指向前舱盖的固定销。看来这是舱
That's correct. Okay, then we'll finish going back to the tunnel vent, and verify the /CM DELTA-P and make sure it's been holding pressure. And we'll come back again and rehash all of the hatch integrity check and tunnel vent procedures with you. The next thing I want to read off is the min
了解。光学キャリブレーションは、ロール346.5、ピッチ345.0、ヨー
Вода включена, температура в каюте — настройка номер 2. Настройка температуры в купальном костюме пр
또 한 가지 살펴볼 게 있는데요. 위층 분들을 귀찮게 하고 싶진 않지만, 지휘실에 있는 배수 호스가 거기에 연결되는지 확인해 볼 수 있을까요? 만약 연결된다면 나중
Sì. Ma non so perché stiamo ottenendo quella vel
了解しました。ヒューストン、こちらはアポロ8号です。コントロールポイントの追跡作業ですが、今回の回転で-2を試みているのと同時に、-1を探すことができました。与えられたものと同じくらい小さいですが、より認識しやすい2つのマークを見つけました。次の回転でも同じ手順を繰り返して、同じ小さなポイントを見つけられると確信しています。これで、記録されているコントロール
这意味着其中大约有 2 分钟的音频比特率较
いい子に
Отказ от прямых иностранных инвестиций в создание платформы для повторного 
आपको क्या लगता है, क्या हम इसके लिए तैयार हैं? समय क्या
それで、ジャック、あなたたち全員、今そこで良いデータを手に入れま
Я имею в виду не тестовый шаблон. Я говорю, я имею в виду не тестовый шаблон. Мы попросили их поставить суперкруг над цифрой, на первом месте в свитке; я уверен, что они это сдела
제 생각엔 지금 아이작 뉴턴
बहुत बढ
罗杰。星号 25 和 
潜望鏡から日の出が見え始めました。夜側の軌道のおかげで、この特定の軌道では潜望鏡に初光が入りました。夜側では、潜望鏡は逆行姿勢では全く機能しないのは明らかです。今、私が見ている初光は、ほぼ の です。日の出は潜望鏡を通してかなり速い速度で入ってきました。ジョンが言っていた光る物体は確かに持っていて、叩き落とせばいくつか作ることができます。確かに、それらはフィールドのようで、小さいものから明るいものまで大きさが様々に変化しているように感じます。潜望鏡自体が眩しいです。窓の外が見えるように、チャートを潜望鏡に貼らなければなりません。いつでも逆行姿勢にできる状態なので、この窓の外を見る以外に何もすることがありません。スーツの回路が正常であればの話ですが。あのチャートは、あの忌々しい潜望鏡を隠すのに大いに役立ちます。これらの物体のフィールドはかなり広大です。スコッティが言ったように、ハッチから叩き落とせることは間違いありません。そして、それらは流れ去っていきます。確かに、カプセルから遠ざかっていると判断できます。速度はあなたとは違うはずです。速度は明らかにカプセル自体よりも遅いです。一度叩くだけで、後方に滑り落ちていくの
रॉजर। पेरिसिंथियन प्लस 2, त्वरित वापसी, / 61503, म
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。了解。水素と酸素燃料電池のパージを要求します。以上
13, 휴스턴. 저희는 귀하의 정보를
Roger. Parfait. Pause. Les prévisions météo pour la zone 
Quando s
Houston, tieni presente questa tecnica del filtro rosso/blu sulla TV. Non puoi far scorrere i due filtri mentre sono attaccati alla telecamer
L'interruttore della luce d
いいえ、まだです - 十分小さいです -
حسنًا، لا بأس. لديّ تحديثان لك يا جيم. الأول يتعلق بإجراءات البحث عن المذنب بينيت في حوالي الساعة 10:00 صباحًا، وسأنتظر حتى يستيقظ جاك قبل أن أُطلعك على التفاصيل. أما التحديث الثاني فيتعلق بالدخول قبل ثلاث
جيم، لم أفهم كل ما قلته، لكن أعتقد أنك كنت تريد معرفة متى ستكون إجراءات الدخول متاحة لك. إذا كان الأمر كذلك، فنحن ن
फ्रेड, कुछ मिनटों के बाद, जब भी आपको सुविधा हो, अगर आपके 
روجر، رأيناك مستيقظًا تتحرك، فظننا أنك تتناول فطورك هناك. عمومًا، سنبدأ على الأرجح بتحديد موقع وصلة الإرسال لمتجهات الحالة وأحمال الهدف وما إلى
Questa è la
Salut les Verts! Votre capitaine de l'équipe Blanche vous accueillera à votre sortie de derrière la Lune. Je crois que
D'accord, nous sommes prêts à intervenir ici, sur le ter
ठीक है। मुझे पता है कि आप चुप रहने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं, इसलिए मैं आपको कुछ जानकारी पढ़कर सुनाता हूँ। अभी-अभी हमें एक ऐसी जानकारी मिली है जिससे आपको शायद थोड़ा भरोसा हो जाए। अगर आपका ऑक्सीजन क्रायो टैंक खराब हो जाता है, तो आपके पास अभी 80 पाउंड बचे हैं। सिंगल टैंक ऑपरेशन में अभी सबसे बड़ी बाधा हाइड्रोजन टैंक है, जिसका मार्जिन पॉजिटिव है। अगर हम अपने स्ट
Водолей, Хьюстон. Нет. Мы хотим остаться в том же состоянии, что и сейчас, но хотели бы иметь возможность сопоставить вашу раб
Minus 1 
沃利，你看
Хоро
Roger. Ich lese dich immer noch. Bin etwas angeschlagen. Mit 30 ist mein Zustand gut. Treibstoff und Sauerstoff sind stabil. Der Kabinendruck beträgt 5,8 psi. Die Stromvers
روجر. هذا ال
네, 사실 그렇습
13, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, einige Sicherungsautomaten auf dem Verteilerkasten 226 zu überprüfen. CRYO O2 HEATER Nummer 1 MAIN A, und überprüfen Sie di
わかった。どうぞ。取り
ロジャー、はっ
D'accord. Nous allons arrêter l'
わかりました、ジム。断続的に電力が供給されています。さらに、パネル16のプライマリパワーアンプの回路ブレーカーを開けていただければ、電力供給が安定し、回路のマージンを改善できると思います。次
Aquarius, supprimez le test de nacelle/manette des gaz. Assurez-vous simple
スミス海に近づいてきました。ここは暗く平坦な物質で覆われた小
哦，下雪了。不，
Хорошо. Продолжаем с T 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225, Шаула, вверх 236 000, плюс 0813 минус 16503 12202 36301; северная группа звезд, Сириус и 
Я так не думаю. Пока всё держится дово
O
Bene. Ora ci siamo spostati di circa 25 gradi di beccheggio. Vorrei che riportassi l'aereo a 10 gradi di beccheggio e 45 gradi di imbardata, lo controllassi e riportas
没错，杰克。现在我们来看第 1-6 页。大约在页面三分之一处，显示“面板 275 CB MAIN A，BAT C，关闭”，我们要划掉这一行，以及接下来的两行，然后划掉“MAIN A，BAT C，关闭；MAIN B，BAT C，关闭
ヒュース
好的。如果你想去
了解。血圧を送っている間に、時系列を少し教えてあげる。軌道終了は1時28分18秒。ミッション終了は4時32分
Ok, Jim. Sembra che quello che dobbiamo fare è: per mantenere un riscaldamen
쌍둥이자리 6세님, GMT 기준 최저시점은 13시 3
روجر فريدوم سفن، فهمت أنك على ارتفاع 7000 قدم، ومظلتك الرئيسية مفتوحة، و... بخ
Роджер. Копия. Колумбия. Большое спасибо
Sur 1, le tourillon 
没错。把它添加到页面顶部。我们真正要做的是——把它放在“激活”之前。页面顶部的
11番、こちらヒ
Okay. Es sieht so aus, als ob sich Ihre Werte vor dem Ve
चलिए देखते हैं, मुझे लगता है कि हम VOIC
Roger. Vous, habitants de la navette Columbia, serez peut-être intéressés d'apprendre qu'aujourd'hui, la Colombie célèbre
Columbia, Houston. You can undock at your convenience, correction, jettison at your convenien
ठीक है। म
콜럼비아, 잘 들립니다. 휴스턴, 저는 어떻게 지내나
حسنًا، شكرًا لكم. هذا أحد الأس
ठीक है। अपोलो 8। लगता है हमें कुछ ट्रैकिंग ज़रूरतों की वजह से यह संचार परीक्षण स्थगित करना पड़ेगा। अगर इससे आपके मौजूदा कार्यों में ज़्यादा बाधा नहीं आएगी, तो हम इसे लगभग एक घंटे में कर सकते हैं। इसमें शायद 15 से 20 मिनट लगेंगे, और इसमें अंतरिक्ष यान में सवार लोगों की कुछ बातचीत शामिल होगी। इसलिए, अगर इससे आपकी नींद में खलल पड़ेगा, तो हम इसे स्थगित कर देते हैं और इन ज़रूरत
その話のついでに、ジム、ジャックに一つだけ伝えたいことがあります。先ほども言ったように、今回お勧めするアライメント手順は月/太陽で、太陽フィルターも
로저. 자, 이제 롤 0, 피치 90, 요우 인으로 기동하려면, 피치 인은 여기, 롤은 여기, 요우는 현재 요우 값대로 하면
そうですね、そうだと思います。これは一種のパススルーORBレートのようなものになると思います。というのも、もし急いでホイップをすると、なぜピッチを80度下げるか、ピッチを止めるか、ORBレート分を除いてほぼ全てを止める
아폴로 8호. 휴스턴. 뱅가드 활주로에서 1분
Bie
Мы отплатили свой долг обществу; 
Ricevuto. C
John, controlliamo quasi esattamente il pulsante con i tuoi 
알았어, 밴
Voici Sigma Seven, qui illustre les effets d'un vol inversé au lever du soleil, avec un lacet de 90 degrés. Votre trajectoire est immédiatement perceptible. C'est comme regarder par la fenêtre d'un train. Le terrain défile sous vos yeux. Des nuages ​​de toutes sortes se succèdent. Je les vois passer à toute vitesse, juste derrière le plan à 90 degrés – à 90 degrés de l'axe longitudinal du véhicule. Une représentation très, très parlante du lacet. Alors que je pivote, l'avant de mon appareil commence à prendre l'attitude de lacet correcte, malgré le fait que je sois inversé. J'aperçois une petite île. Et la luminosité est de nouveau bonne dans le cockpit. Nous avons de la lumière à ce passage. Voilà, nous sommes presque en 
네, 잭 씨. 저희는 아직 여기 있습니다. 이 과정을 끝까지 진행해 드리기 위해 고화질 영상으로 연결하겠습니다. 질문하신 내용에 대한 답변입니다. 문제가 발생할 경우 이 절차를 신속하게 되돌리려면 124번 전원 스위치를 절대 건드리지 마십시오. 이 스위치에는 리셋(RESET) 위치가 있습니다. 되돌리는 방법은 5번 패널로 가서 회로 차단기 두 개를 여는 
Роджер. К
Ricevuto. 
罗
알겠습니다. 델타 V에서 양쪽 모두에 참여하기로 좋은 합의가
Хорошо. 413020 183, Шаула, вниз 064, влево 06, плюс 0747, минус 16410 12988 36301; северная группа звезд, Сириус и Ригель, крен 308, тангаж 209, рыскание 357. 
罗杰。第三个是65
分かりました。
- - अगर किसी को थो
로저, 프랭크. 지금 여기서 하려는 작업은 이렇습니다. 수평선 보정을 해야 하는데, 총 15개의 표시가 필요합니다. 한 별에 3세트, 다른 별에 2세트씩 말이죠. 하지만, 바로 다음 단계로 넘어가야 한다는 점도 고려해야 합니다. 그래서 
Oh, you can't 
Theta，18.4；
Dépêch
好的。接下来几个小时，我们需
알겠습니다. 가능하면 염소 처리는 그쯤
No, non l'ho
杰克，你想知道
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。迈克，你的阻抗呼吸仪读数仍然很平坦
Non, nous avons un interrupteur sur ce régulateur de pression... interrupteur... interrupteur de coupure... donc le n° 
रॉजर। फ्रैंक, क्या आपको लगता है कि आप इसे गोलाकार रूप से जला पाएंगे? अगर आप इसे किसी और दिशा में जलाते 
Роджер. Отчет о состоянии экипажа: воды у
Quella che avevo allestito era una stazione di sonno davvero buona, Jack. H
了解。ライトは正常に点灯しています。正確にどれくらい上空
收到。谢谢。无需回
Très bien. Je pense que vous avez 
حسنًا. من جودريل بانك، إنجلترا، عبر وكالة أسوشيتد برس: توقف تلسكوب جودريل بانك الراديوي البريطاني الضخم عن استقبال الإشارات من مركبة لونا 15 الفضائية السوفيتية غير المأهولة التي أُرسلت إلى القمر، وذلك في تمام الساعة 5:49 صباحًا بتوقيت شرق الولايات المتحدة اليوم. وقال متحدث باسم المرصد إن المركبة الفضائ
Attendez l
ठीक है, जिम। हमें कुछ मिनटों में आपको बताना ह
Poursuivre
いいえ、ピンポイントです。地平線のずっと下
Хорошо, Джек. Давление в баке 1 приближается к 100 psi. Каки
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن، إشارتك ضعيفة نوعًا ما. سأعيد معلومات اتجاه المركبة. يعتمد اتجاه مركبتك الآن على أكثر من خمس ساعات من التتبع. نعرض لك نقطة الحضيض القمري عند 69.7 ميلًا، مع عودة حرة بزاوية دخول سالبة 14 درجة. ستحتاج فقط إلى بضعة أقدام في الثانية عند المسافة القمرية للعودة إلى زاوية الدخول الاسمية. انته
J'ai annulé la correction de trajectoire; charge de la batterie B et vidange d'
알겠습니다. 그걸 손에 넣으
Is recording continuo
Apollo 11, Houston. Le tariffe sembrano coerenti. Potete proc
로저. 불이 들어왔어. 지난번엔 불이 꺼져 있어서 못 
Roger. Je crois que j'étais mo
Roger. Expérience D-8, vérification n° 1. Début à 57. Vérification n° 2. Début à 01:30. Élément n° 4, rév. 50, nœud ascendant 102° 26. Élément n° 5: si possible, photos S-6 de la tempête tropica
我一切顺利。12个对接锁扣我已经扣上了8个，所有
Sind Sie der Meinung, dass Ihnen diese Einstellungen jetzt eine ausreichende Kü
هيوستن، 13. نحن مستعدون للتقلي
Да посмо
हो सकता है कि हम उसे आज फिर से प्रोग्राम 01 
로저, 짐. 지난번 중간 코스 이후 2시간
Ces images montrent de petits groupes de nuages ​​très serrés au sud des Canaries, troisième orbit
Manual retr
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। मेरे पास कुछ जाइरो 
Hello, Tranquility Base. Houston. 
s never guarantee any
نعم. أرى أنه يُقدّر ذلك. يبدو مرتاحاً إلى حدٍ 
Roger, Mike. Abbiamo notato delle variazioni nelle nostre tracce. Vi siete connessi e disconnessi, ma i medici 
Il Columbia s
TR
To g
Roger. I think I'll... I imagine we're powering ... at the end of 4 days, besides
我们
سيسيل ب. دي ألدرين ينتظر الت
Nous savons que de nombreux scientifiques de différents pays attendent avec impatience de voir les échantillons lunaires, et nous pensions que vous seriez intéressés de
Super. Hör mal, Ed, wir möchten den Flugplan anpassen und die Schlafenszeit hier verschieben, damit du dich etwas ausruhen kannst. Du solltest jetzt minde
Okay. 
ASCS looks good, all fly-by-wire thrusters appear to 
Eagle, H
Je suis d'acc
D'accord, Houston. Vous surveillez m
さて、180度になりましたが、ここで一旦
हम अभी यहीं पर हैं,... हाँ, यह अब तक की सबसे
Ap
حسناً. يبدو جيداً
D'accord, pour répondre à votre question, Jim, cette augmentat
11, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आपने इस पर मोनोक्युल
Roger. Alle Systeme sind in Ordnung. Wir haben eine Wechse
Due cose, Jim. Vogliamo che tu sappia che ci sono degli errori di assetto piuttosto grandi, quindi se passi in AUTO, il computer cercherà di farti cambiare direzione, e l'altra cosa è non bere
Какой вектор состояния находится в слоте LM? В само
D'accord, Fred. L'instruction que j'ai pour toi se trouve à la fin de la procédure de coupure d'alimentation du câble ombilical du module de commande. Pour information, une fois cette procédure terminée et au moment où tu seras prêt à passer au module de commande, l'alimentation sera coupée du câble ombilical et tu pourras le débr
……把那东西拿
Und, Mike, wenn du unser Ziel DELTA V haben willst, gebe ich es d
ACS는 정말 잘
Хорошо, Джек. Теперь включи кислор
ठीक है, जो। मैं इसे आपको वापस देता हूँ और देखता हूँ कि यह मेरे पास है या नहीं। इसके बाद, हमारे अवलो
Roger. La lecture à 269 10 indique un pa
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. للعلم، انتهت للتو مباراة كل النجوم بفوز الدوري الوطني على الدوري الأمريكي بنتيجة ٩-
Ok, Joe. 
درجة حرارة الهواء الجاف تتراوح بين 72 و79 درجة. وقبل ذلك بقليل، ت
Роджер. Зона 11-DELTA ΔT ноль. GMTRC 01 день 07 48 58. RET 400 K, 15+26. Зона 12-DELTA: ΔV 96. ΔT
好的，杰克。MDC 1一切正常。所有速率指示器都
Roger. Wi
我们随时准备参加 STA
Eh bien, non. Il me faut une autre manœuvre pour
랜드마크 추적 결과도 검토했습니다. 모든 표시가 매우 정확했던 것 같습니다. 여러 지점의 고도와 관련된 데이터가 담긴 페이지도 있는데, 자세히 읽어드리지는 않겠지만 표시
Роджер, Майк. Хотел бы прокомментировать данные. Автоматический маневр был довольно точным. Похоже, мы попали в какую-то
, мы
로저입니다. 옴니 델타
좋아요, 한번 시도해 보
这里还是这里？天哪，
حسنًا. وهناك تغيير آخر لدينا، وهو أنه بعد ذلك بقليل، عند تهيئة النظام للتخلص من الوقود، أغلقنا صمام التف
Roger. We know you're busy 
Хорошо. И, Джек, можем ли мы включить автоматические выключатели, чтобы с удовольствием посмотреть, сработает ли эффе
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。酸素燃料電池のパージを削除するこ
是的。我们无法将其调整到窄光束模式。我们尝试切换到自动跟踪或 REACQ 模式，但偏航角会在 270 度到 0 度之间来回变化，俯仰角也会从大约 6 度变化到 
わかりました、ジム。今、もう一つのキャニスターに切り替えるかどうかについては、数分後にまた連絡します。2点目ですが、まずはロールに集中して、それを軌道に乗せると、セットアップがうまくいくかもしれません。そして、ロールが確立したらピッ
Le lacet est actuellement à environ 0° - MARK. T. Je vais vérifier - environ 4 degrés à gauche. Correction en tangage, le lacet est correct, je vais reto
알겠습니다. 이제 약 2분 동안 업링크를 업보이스 백업으로 전환하겠습니다. 업보이스 연결 끊김 소리가 들리는 데 몇 초 정도 걸릴
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. Control systems cheek was perfect. Control sy
Fly-by-wire-Tiefflug und Anflug in Wiedereintrittsposition. Gehe jetzt in den Fly-by-wire-Tie
アクエリアスさん、その方向で考えていただくために、かなり徹底的な分析を行いました。その結果、との電源を入れたまま、インバーターとボールをオフにした方がコストが安くなることがわかりました。1アンペアの電力と水の節約にもなりますので、この方法を採用することにしました。また、中間ジンバルの角度を監視す
Roger, Jim. Understand. We copied
收到。然后
알겠습니다. 밴스, 말씀하신 대로 
حسنًا يا بيل. نعتقد أنه سيكون من المفيد للغاية معرفة كيفية عمله في وضع الاستجابة التلقائية، ونقترح إجراء اختبار عليه في ه
Ricevuto.
मैं F 2.8 और बल्ब मोड प
OK, Ken. Attends un peu. Je suis sur le point de te perdre. Juste… je dois change
Gemini 4, Хирург. У нас оба аппарата установле
... उस गड्ढे की दीवार पर कुछ परतें हो सकती हैं। अभी-अभी मेरे दिमाग में आया कि - यह किसी न किसी तरह की चीज का नतीजा ह
जैक, मेरा अब भी एक सवाल है। मुझे अब भी लगता है - मैं अब भी कहता हूँ कि हमारे पैनल 16 में लाइटिंग के लिए फ्लड लाइट्स और ट्रैक लाइट्स खुली होनी चाहिए। हम उन
Okay. You can take some time figuring out the best attitude, and then you won't have 
D'accord, Joe. Je me suis penché sur le sujet.
연료에서 30psi, 산화제에서 30psi의 압력을 나
यह फ
Nous traversons Houston au niveau du brasier; c'
Roger, Watertown. Ich verstehe Sie deutlich. Bitte senden Sie mir Ihre Nachrichten blind, falls ich ni
حسنًا يا قائد. لقد وجدنا طريقةً لتدفئتك. قررنا البدء بتشغيلك الآن، وما نريده منك هو أن تأخذ قائمة التحقق الخاصة بك وتبد
يبدو أنك تقترب من الحل. حسنًا. أعتقد أننا شطبنا السطرين الأولين في الصفحة 2-2. الآن، أسفل ذلك مباشرةً، مكتوب "قائمة التحقق من الفص
जेरी, मैं फ्रैंक बोल रहा हूँ। क्या आपको हमारी प्रगति और चार्जिंग की स्थिति के बारे में को
こんにちは、バ
여기서 뭐 좀 먹고
Roger. Die Kontrollp
Роджер Джемини 4, это хирург RKV. У вас по-прежнему не получается измерить артериальное давление, но прежде чем попробовать в следующий раз, проверьте конец фитинга и убедит
Неужели этот компас работает? Мне бы следовало говорить побольше. Я использовал стандартный источник света. Сейчас, когда я смотрю прямо на компас, капсула вращается в плоскости оси вращения, а на меня направлен север. Компас опреде
Roger, readouts before the burn were all zeros. After the burn was 10 ft/
没错。就用电池 6，杰克。下一行写的是电池 1 和 3，改成电池 1、2、3 和 4。加上电池 2 和 4。四个电池都对。然后接下来两行写的要等 30 分钟，划掉。再下一行写的是电池 2 和 4 关闭/重置，也划掉
Außerdem, Bermuda, oszilliert der Ballon nicht 
D'accord. J'ai suivi une étoile brillante, et je crois qu'elle se trouve dans la constellation de l'Aigle. En fait, j'en suis presque sûr. Je peux voir les deux étoiles cibles. Je l'ai suivie jusqu'au sommet. Elle est presque arrivée. Elle va disparaître de mon champ de vision maintenant. Je l'ai suivie depuis le bas, et il lui a fallu 3 minutes et 23 secondes
अरे, आप कुछ चीज़ें पहले से ही साफ़ करना चाहते हैं। आप अपने एफडीआई स्केल का इस्तेमाल तो नहीं करन
俯仰角 224，偏航角 0
アポロ
Okay. Unter 4 Minuten
Bene. Guardando la voce 1: il secondo elemento riguarda la fase di cold soak Kelvin di 12 ore, e nelle discussioni che ho avuto qui e prima del volo, credo che si sia concordato che non vogliamo effettuare la fase di cold soak. Quindi elimineremo il passaggio 2. In pratica, credo che vogliamo effettuare la fase di cold soak, e certamente vogliamo testare i boiler ad acqua prima dell'inserimento per assicurarci di non averne uno asciutto, nello stesso modo in cui ne avevamo uno asciutto prima. Stiamo lavorando su alcune procedure per questo, e dovremo tornare da voi con quelle un po' più tardi, e cercheremo di farlo quando Bill è in l
We have lost a multiplexer and we are unable to read out several temperatures here on the ground. Like to advise you of that. These are cabin temperature, left suit tap, right suit tap, and log range r
كنا س
حسنًا. أردتُ فقط إطلاعكم على هذا الأمر والتفكير فيه وفي تداعياته المحتملة على خطة الطيران، وسأعيد عرض هذه الزاوية الواسعة مع التعليق على القمر لنرى أيّ الأقسام ترونها الأنسب. حسنًا. في الشاشة، طلب منا فرانك التحقق من ترتيب ظهور مسار الدخول، والمسار الأول الذي سيظهر مُسمى "مسار الدخول بدون مخرج رقم 2" وهو مسار الدخول قصير المدى وعالي السرعة. المسار الثاني الذي سيظهر بعنوان "3500 ميل" وهو أيضًا مسار دخول عالي السرعة، ولكنه المسار الذي ستستخدمونه في حال انتقلنا إلى نطاقات دخول أطول. ثم سيكون المسار الثالث "مسار الدخول بدون مخرج رقم 1"، وسيتبعه مسار رابع بطول 3500 ميل. إذن لديكم أربعة مسارات دخول. المساران 1 و3، عند الوصول إليهما، هما مسارا الدخول قصيري المدى، والمساران 2 و4 هما مسارا الدخول طويلي المدى. بخصوص مرحلة التوقف التام، أعتقد أننا ناقشنا ما سنفعله هناك، ولكن في غضون ساعة تقريبًا، سنحتاج إلى البدء في هذه المرحلة. بالتأكيد لا نريد القيام بذلك في الساعة 12. بالحديث مع فريق تحليل المسار - ما رأيهم في عملية "غليان الماء"؟ - من ال
Okay. Riesci a distinguere la fot
我觉得我可能已经把他屏蔽
了解しました。まず、飛行計画ではCDRが寝返りを打つ必要があることになっています。次に、燃焼の概要です。すべてのシ
मुझे लगता है कि हमें यहां कोई समस
मैंने भी बिल्कुल यही कहा था। यह अच्छी बात है
क्या 
查理，OM
Einer der Wasserstofffilter – der, den wir am Warmwasserbereiter haben – scheint weiterzulaufen, wenn man einen der Lebensmittelbeutel herausnimmt. Die Durchflussrate ist recht gering,
Okay, Vance. A couple of items we uncovered for that cartridge MOD. One is the special dust covering bag that we were going to use on the tote bags, that is pretty thick and nonporous; and we went up to the upstairs kitchen and drained water a coupl
罗杰。请您点击“接受”按钮，我们将向您发送一个加载项，该加载项将更新一个数值，随后会进行程序更改。吉姆，我们稍后会通知您；自动光学
Хорошо. Давайте еще раз все объясним. Первые четыре будут закрыты. Следующие семь-восемь будут открыты, а следующие девять — от LOGIC POWER
Natürlich. Kabinentemperatur – 92. Anzugtemperatur – 58. Kabinendruck 5,6. CO₂-Füllung des Anzugs 3/4. Linke Flasche: 5100. Rechte Flasche: 5050. O₂-Menge 62. Druck: 840. Quellente
आरंभ में, परमेश्वर ने आकाश और पृथ्वी की रचना की। पृथ्वी निराकार और खाली थी, और गहरे जल के ऊपर अंधकार छाया हुआ था। परमेश्वर की आत्मा जल के ऊपर प्रकट हुई, और परमेश्वर ने कहा, "प्रकाश हो।" और प
بالنسبة ل
알겠습니다
حسناً، لدينا بعض الأشياء التي نريدك أن تفع
REGs A und B werden 
로저. 서비스 모듈 JETT에 대해 알아두셔야 할 중요한 사항이 있습니다. 제가 설명드린 자세에서 푸시-풀 기동을 권장할 예정입니다. 먼저 초당 0.5피트(약 15cm
罗杰，吉姆。我这里有个简短的流程想跟你讲一下，并解释一下它的作用。你的W矩阵和之前的数据共享了一些内存位置；因此，你现在使用的W矩阵并不理想，我们不希望你继续使用这个矩阵进行观测。所以我接下来要讲的流程是，在你下次进入系统之前，让矩阵重新初始化。这样就能恢复到你上次加载W矩阵时的值，你还记得3303事件之后的情况吗？如果这会对飞行计划产生任何进一步的影响，我们正在处理，如有必要，我们会稍后给你发送一份修改后的观测计划，包括
罗杰。我们这次用什么进行两次燃烧
Roger. Amicizia Sett
Хорошо. Надеюсь, вы получил
Das ist nur die Hälfte. Den Großteil haben wir versteckt. Es war ziemlich interessant, die ganze Kameraarbeit hier zu erledigen, um etwas zusätzliche Übung im Umgang mit dem Fe
Le circuit de refroidissement secondaire était en excellent état. Le radiateur semblait bien étanche et tous les autres composants fonctionnaient parfaitement. Vos régulateurs d'oxygène principaux se sont remplis à 104 psi lors de notre vérification. Compte tenu de l'orbite lunaire, prévoyez une ébullition d'environ 450 grammes d'eau par heure, ce qui n'est qu'une approximation; les estimations des besoins en eau pour l'ébullition sont très variables, allant d'une ébullition importante à une ébullition nulle. La prochaine vidange d'eau aura lieu ensuite, vous n'avez donc pas à vous en soucier pour le moment. Les prévisions de communication sont bonnes, peut-être même un peu meilleures que prévu, et nous devrions obtenir un débit binaire élevé sur les antennes OMNI avec notre antenne de 64 mètres à Goldstone. Cela fonctionnera pour les premières rotations, puis nous changerons de site et nous utiliserons à nouveau les antennes OMNI pour un débit binaire élevé. La qualité vocale est bonne. Vos piles à combustible ont fonctionné au-dessus de leur capacité nominale pendant tout le vol et semblent bien stables. Il y a eu une l
How's it g
알겠습니다. 프레드, 말씀하신 내용을 잘 읽었습니다. 저희 열역학 전문가들이 검토할 예정입니다. 중간 수정과 관련해서 논의 중인 사항 중 하나는, SHe 탱크가 터지기 전에 수정하지 않는 것이 
날이 어두워지네. 어디 보자. 나중에 연락하자. 아, 저 햇빛
收到。向右偏航60°并保持
القراءة عند قيمة إضاءة 13-½، و... 
わかりました。始めましょう。127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 deg/sec 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-BRAVO: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-BRAVO: 93. 1+58 14 45 02. 11+04. 62-BRAVO:
了解、バズ。良い読み
هل يمكنك أن تطلب من شخص ما ضبط زوايا الكاميرا لك
حسنًا. 10، /: 45597، ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 35186، ناقص 01512، ناقص 00520 180 007 000، نوفمبر ألفا، زائد 00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253؛ العقرب دلتا، لأسفل 069، لليسار 45، زائد 0748، ناقص 16500 12994 36300؛ النجم الرئيسي الشعرى اليمانية، النجم الثانوي رجل الجبار، 129 155 010؛ أربع رباعيات، 15 ثانية، مسح
了解。血圧を送っている間に、時系列を少し教えてあげる。軌道終了は1時28分18秒。ミッ
That's ri
ठीक है। क्या आप मुझे बैटरी की रीडिंग बता सकते हैं? अगर रीडिंग ठीक रही तो मैं आपको 3-4 मिनट के लिए उड़ान भरने की अनुमति दे सकता हूँ।...और हम पायलट से रक्त
And, Houston, you, might be interested that out my left-hand window right now, I can observe the entire continent of North America, Alaska, and over the Pole, down to the Yucatan Peninsula, Cuba, no
제미니 8호, RKV입니다. 곧 가시선 확보가 될 것 같습니다. 지상에서 보니 정말 멋지네요. 랑데부 및 도킹 성
Sigma Seven Sigma Seven, hier spricht Canton Com Tech, Canton Com Tech auf HF
알
ट्रैंक्विलिटी, ह्यूस्टन। 
Roge
معدلاتي الآن تقارب الصفر على المحاور الثلاثة. لا يزال لدي ضوء في المنظار، بالطبع. أنظر للأعلى مباشرةً، ومع ذلك، في هذه اللحظة تحديدًا، وضعي أشبه بال
आखिरकार हमने सूट सर्किट के तापमान की समस्या हल कर ली है। अब समझ में आ रहा है कि स्कॉट को इस रिकॉर्ड स्थिति की ही चिंता क्यों थी। कोई साइड टोन भी नहीं है। इस समय सूट का तापमान - मार्क टी - 68 डिग्री है और मैं बहुत अच्छा महसूस कर रहा हूँ। सूट का गुंबद लगभग 72 डिग्री है। जाहिर है, इसमें उतार-चढ़ाव होता रहता है, और अब रात होने वाली है। मुझे लगता है कि हमने सूट सर्किट को अच्छी तरह से नियंत्रित कर लिया 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। सामान्य एस-बैंड पर आपकी आवाज़ सा
Ok, Fred-o, ti chiediamo di prendere la lista di controllo delle emergenze; ​​vai a
Hast du seit dein
Mensch, ich bin echt enttäuscht von der Optik; das Teleskop ist ja furchtbar. Vielleicht wird es mit etwas Übung besser – oder durch Gewöhnung
Le TR-10 est revenu à la normale. Je l'ai déjà fait. Bon, la pression de la combinaison est revenue. 
Wir nähern uns nun dem Schaumigen Meer, wo ich einen Krater meiner Wahl markieren werde; der Name des Kra
حسنًا. إما أنني نسخت رقم قاطع الدائرة بشكل خاطئ، أو أنني لا أستطيع قراءته. إنه تقريبًا في الرقم 20 من الأسفل، بعد اللوحة 276، حيث كُتب "قاطع دائرة التحك
시그마 세븐, 여기는 캔턴 통신기술센터입니다
حسناً. شكراً جزيلاً لك
Я расскажу, как я это делаю. Выбираю режим управления по проводам. Перехожу к уп
我们现在来到了史密斯海，这是
Roger, Deke. I'm on push-to-talk at 
يا رجل، من الأفضل أن تج
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. لقد راجعنا عملية الاحتراق الثانية. تبدو جيدة جداً. جميع 
Сигма Семь. Не буду упоминать это
ठीक है
알겠습니다
أقوم بتركيب ستارة الرذاذ، وحاجز الرقبة، ومقبض إعادة تدوير هواء المقصورة لأعلى. مقبض أنبوب التنفس الأيسر لأعلى، ومقبض تهوية المقصورة لأعلى. أترك زناد فتح الفتحة بعيدًا. أتأكد من أن مانع التسرب المائي مغلق. أربط الحبل، وأترك ​​الفتحة اليسرى مفتوحة. أضع معدات نجاة قائد المركبة على ال
حسناً، تفضل. سأطلب منك الاتصال بي عندما تنتهي،
Да, звук громкий и отчетливый. Дов
내 잘못이야. 그거 복사했
9, /: 45597, meno 040, più 157, più 34188, meno 01353, più 00780 180 008 001, NA, più 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, giù 131, sinistra 28, più 0758, meno 16500 12987, più - o 36277; e questi sono Sirius e Rigel 129 155 010, quattro getti, 15 secondi, 1,2 gradi sulla finestra a T meno 3, alta velocità meno MA, motor
ठ
D'accord. Je ne mesure aucune tension sur la batterie C, et l'ampérage semble être d'environ 2 ampères, mais cela pourrait être dû au bruit. J'ai éteint tous les projecteurs et je… Auriez-vous une idée de ce qui pourrait 
Adesso, r
Roger. Nous n'utiliserons pas le téléobjectif. Je ne pense pas que nous pourrons photographier la Terre. Il faudra se concentrer sur le terminateur, la surface lunaire. Je regarde
Okay. Real fine. Now the next step is to cut a diagonal hole in one ear of the - of the plastic bag near the arch. You can pick either one and cut about, a 1-1/2 or 2 inch diagonal hole, big enough to slip the re
Nella American Le
सभी सेटिंग्स बहुत अच्छे से काम कर रही हैं। सूट का हीट डोम लगभग 72 डिग्री है, सूट का इनलेट लगभग 63 डिग्री है, जो थोड़ा कम हो रहा है। निश्च
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben die LOI-2-Brennung analysiert. Sieht sehr gut aus. Alle Systeme funktionierten einwandfrei. Wir erreichten mit den begrenzten Tracking-Daten eine Umlaufbahn mit einer Abweichung von 65,4 m/
حسنًا. سأبدأ العمل عليه الآن، ثم أعود وأنتظر لنسخ الباقي - حسنًا، أنا - ليس الباقي - كل شيء
Esatto. Hai capito bene. Okay, Jack. Un'altra cosa. Poco prima delle
La réponse est oui, nous prévoyons d'utiliser les deux. Av
عملية العودة تسير على ما يرام. يبدو أن نظام التخميد المساعد يحافظ على التذبذبات بشكل جيد. نحن الآن عند قوة جاذبية مقدارها 1.5 جي. كانت هناك قطعة كبيرة مشتعلة ت
А в Италии Папа Павел VI ор
हमें ल्यूमेन की रीडिंग लगभग 1 से 1.
ठीक है। यह अ
我们现在的心态够好吗？我希望如此。宝贝，我们已经从这扇窗户出去了，但还没从那扇窗户出去
Okay, Apollo 8. That's - that's correct. You're on high 
어머! 이게 무슨 일이야. 이제 자동 재진입 모드에 들어갔
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। शुरू करने से पहले हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप अपने ज़ीरो ऑप्टिक्स स्
左侧窗外是一片相对平坦的平原，上面布满了数量相当多的陨石坑，大小在5到50英尺之间。此外还有一些小山脊，我估计大约20到30英尺高。周围还有成千上万个
好的。电压为 39.4 伏，电流为 1.25 
Lo prenderai a pugn
Un po' più in basso. Lo tolgo dal
Vogliamo dav
ビルが寝る前に必ず靴下を掛けておくようにしてください
هاواي كو
ठीक है। और उसे बहुत सारे कागज़
好了，我们又回到超高频高频
Roger. Co
Okay. On page 6 1 of the entry out checklist down toward the bottom after "MAIN DEPLOY pushbutton," we have three additional steps we'd like you to accomplish. The intent of this is to reduce the oxygen pressure in your manifold and to elim
Roger. Flight advises it may take several orbits for your computer to come on line. Would like for you to leave the computer at the Prelaunch 
Ich denke schon. Wir werden es als Brennmonitor verwenden. Die Brennvorgänge werden manuell durchgeführt, also manuell gest
Okay. Ich schließe jetzt – die Anzeige/Engine, Übers
Хорошо. Мы 
في البداية، حالت العملية دون بدء عمليات الرصد فورًا كما خططنا، نظرًا لوجود مناورة مراوغة أخرى. تسبب تفريغ الحمولة في ظهور كمية هائلة من النجوم الزائفة في المنطقة، مما جعل معايرة البصريات شبه مستحيلة. لم تكن الطريقة التي ابتكرناها فعالة. أما الطريقة التي استخدمتها في النهاية، فكانت التوجه إلى نجم الشعرى اليمانية (سيريوس)، وهو ألمع نجومنا، والحصول على العمود
ठीक है, अपोलो 13 की उड़ान की तुलना अपोलो 8 से करने पर, टेक-ऑफ के दौरान लगभग उतना ही कंपन हुआ जितना मैंने अपोलो 8 में महसूस किया था, लेकिन उड़ान की शुरुआत में, अपोलो 8 की तु
ठीक है। आरएन
Джим, и просто к твоему сведению, у меня есть 
D'accord.
حسن
Хорошо, спасибо. Мы сообщим вам, если что-то будет не так. Я уверена, что сейчас вс
ठीक ह
了解
D'accord. Si je me souviens bien, il suffit de serrer au couple sans plus attendre. On leur indique le temps de serrage. Dès que vous avez noté les valeurs, prévenez-moi et je continue
하하. 어쩌면 "떠돌아다니며 꿈꾸기"라는 옛 노래가 지금 상황에 어울릴지도 모르겠지만, 지금 난 꿈꿀 겨를이 없어. 지금 이 순간을 너
11, 휴스턴. 이제 별자리 지도에서 훨씬
Roger. Me revoilà en mode rétro. Je repasse à la configuration chimpanzé. Les
C'est exact. C'est 02. Avez-vous une estimation du temps avant que vous soyez prêt à démarrer la cabine DEPRESS? Ter
È affermativo. Qui stiamo valutando la situazione termica. Sembra che rimarrai fuori per un periodo di tempo piut
再び
Okay. Scoprirai che l'area attorno alla scala è completamente in ombra, quindi avremo qualch
ついでにお知らせしておきますが、計算によると、もうすぐ飲料水がなくなる可能性があります。また、水素タンクからガスが漏れ始める可能性もあ
Вы даже не представляете, сколько всего было скорректиров
Роджер. Сейчас мы выравниваем платформу, она проходит ниже нашего нижнего левого угла, и через мгновение мы поедем
Houston, Apollo 11. It was slightly colder in here last night than it has been on any previous 
١١، هيوستن. في مفاتيح الاختيار التلقائي لديك، يظهر أن وحدة Bravo 
... दबाव बढ़ 
مرحباً! لقد لاحظتُ أنهم كانوا يسيرون في الاتجاه المعاكس في الليلة 
로저, 다행이네요. 금성 대신 지구를 만들려는 것 같군요, 그
لا، يا برج الجوزاء 4. وكن حذرًا بشأن اليوم ا
In run
分かりました。もし正しく理解しているなら、起動完了時に機動性に余裕が生まれ、燃焼位置に着く
D'accord. On commence à osciller. La dé
«Аполлон-8», Хьюсто
Roger. Nous sommes d'acco
Gem
그리고 밴스, 우리는 2차 코스 중간까지
Ah, Ah,
Friends
私のピッチはあなたの -3 [度] に対して -7 [
11, это Хьюстон. В момент срабатывания вашего циклического аккумулятор
Wir haben sogar eine zwölfsaitige Gitarre für di
是的
Über Hawaii hatten wir Sichtkontakt, als Sie uns Ihre Schalterstellungen durchgaben. Wir haben die Meldung bis zu Ihrem Befehl 041 „RECORDER ON“ empfangen, und zu diesem Zeitpunkt begann das Raumschiff zu rol
13, Houston. Wie lesen S
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Le son est parasité par un bruit de fond importa
继续我之前对助推器飞行初期情况的汇报。进入黑暗区域后，大约在1200英尺（约366米）的距离，我尝试与助推器保持位置，但当时我唯一能判断与助推器距
Inoltre, esperimen
كان ذلك يوماً قصيراً 
フレッド、あと2点あります。1つ目は、エンジンの噴射中にミスアライメントはほとんど発生しないと予想しています。そのため、特に推力が非常に低い状態なので、噴射中はエンジン回転数の変化はほとんどないと予想しています。2つ目は、ス
我原本没打算这次过山车。我这就把相机
حسنًا. راقب كمية المُجم
罗杰
Понял
好的。读完后继续往下看。“平衡耦合器”开关，“平衡耦合器关闭”。好的，往下看——这是倒数2分钟前的最后一行——“指挥官油门，最小；LMP 至喷射”。倒数2分钟时，划掉“400 加 1”。倒数1分钟时，划掉“主臂，开启”。倒数10秒时，添加“手动空隙”。加数5秒时，划掉“下降发动机指令超控，开启；”并添加“，40%”。好的，“点火时，如果无法启动，按下手动启动按钮；如果仍然无法启动，则开启下降发动机指令超控”。同样的说明也适用于手动启动时的
«Дружба Семь», это Кантонская командная с
Okay. From Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Britain's big Jodrell Bank radio telescope stopped receiving signals from the Soviet Union's unmanned Moon shot at 5:49 EDT today. A spokesman said that it appeared the Luna 15 space ship "had gone beyond the Moon." Another Quote: "We don't think it has landed," said a spokesman for Sir Bernard Lovell, Director of the Observatory. Washington UPI: 
好的。没错，Gemini。Fl
지금은 패널의 버튼으로 조작하고 있습니다. 이제 조절 노브의 버튼으로도 해봤습니다. 이제 두 버튼 모
잠시만 기다려 주세요. 프레드, 지금 참석자분들의 의견을
罗杰。完毕
I don't think so, F
ठीक है। यह प्रार्थना रॉड रोज़ और सेंट क्रिस्टोफर चर्च के लोगों के लिए है, वास्तव में यह प्रार्थना सभी मनुष्यों के लिए है। हे ईश्वर, हमें वह दृष्टि प्रदान कीजिए जिससे हम मनुष्य की असफलताओं के बावजूद संसार में तेरा प्रेम देख सकें। हमें वह विश्वास दीजिए जिससे हम अपनी अज्ञानता और कमजोरी के बावजूद अच्छाई पर भरोसा कर सकें। हमें वह ज
Wie 
やあ。まだCATCH-U
休斯顿，鹰。大约四乘四
Gemini 4，Guay
Roger. Unsere sequenziellen Schutzschalter sind installiert und unsere beiden sequenziellen Logikschalter sind ei
Did you--could you
私は適切な態度を取らなければなり
Apollo 13, Houston - or rather, 
它比我们之前
アポロ13号、
오전 10시 50분에 전원을 공급하기 시작할 
好的，换个话题。我想插一句，请您重新初
フレンドシップ・セブン、
마이크, 지금 보고 계신 것은 서반구입니다. 위쪽에는 북극이 있고, 가운데 바로 아래쪽에는 남아메리카가 있으며, 아래쪽으로는 혼 곶까지 보입니다. 바하 캘리포니아와 미국 남서부 지역도 보입니다.
Я не предполагал, что дело может зайти слишком дале
روجر. كان وقت الاحتراق دقيقًا - حوالي ثانيتين؛ لدينا قيمة متبقية 4.4X. قمنا بحرقها حتى وصلت إلى 0.2. المواقف اسم
Roger, 11. Pourriez-vous reporter la purge de la pile à combustible? EECOMM indique que nous n’aurons peut-être p
मुझे दिखाई नहीं दे रहा, गस। बाहर देखते-देखते 
AFT O
Eh bien, on dirait qu'el
Friendship Seven, ici Steelhead. Tout l'équipement fonctionne normalement. Prévoyez d'être à proximité dans environ 3 minutes. Te
O
Pour votre information, nous allons commencer à vous appeler Vénus. Nous vous avons aperçue visuellement lors du dernier p
Gol darn it. Just as you started talking,
你为什么不回去
好的，杰克。我们的S波段信号强度一直在波动。在自动跟踪模式下，信号看起来一
हे जैक। यह चेकलिस्ट सिर्फ जिम को जानकारी देने के लिए है। इससे उसे बस इतना पता चलेगा कि आप कमांड मॉड्यूल पावर पर वापस जा रहे हैं। आपकी चेकलिस्ट सही है। समाप्
シグマ・セブン、
Me revoilà près de la Croix du Sud, avec cette zone tachetée de lumi
Okay. E il passaggio 8 è "Spegnimento secondo la checklist di emergenza Power 5", e immagino che sia stato rivisto considerando la nostra sit
Avete indicato un'azione di propulsione ad alta intensità a Bermuda e Muchea durante il passaggio dal fly-by-wi
待機してください、
Roger. Plus 25, / 63087, Minus 162 plus 129, Minus 00163, Plus 00001, Plus 52759 177 137 001, nicht anwendbar, Plus 00201 52759 623 52543 14 2347 337 023 aufwärts 195 links 1,7, Plus 1145, Minus 16500 12780 35890. Nordkurs 068 097 356, kein Tankinhalt, schnelle Rückkehr von 7 - 700 und 7900 Indischer Ozean. Hohe Geschwindigkeit
알겠
रॉजर। यह पायलट 
让我们来读一下我们现在点亮的指示灯：CRYO PRESS、FUEL CELL 1、FUEL CELL 3、MAIN 
네, 마지막 촬영에서 샌디에이고 동쪽에서 시작해서 구름이 다시 짙어질 때까지 약 38장의 사진을 광역 지형 사진 촬영 장비로 찍었습니다. 미국 남부, 앨라배마와 미시시피를 지나 플로리다까지 이동하면서부터는 간헐적으로 사진을 찍기 시작했습니다. 그 지역의 날씨를 아주 잘 담은 사진들을 몇 장 건졌고, 잭슨빌 주변 비행장 사진도 몇 장 찍었습니다. 케이프 코드 사진도 몇 장 찍었고요. 아마도 가장 잘 나온 사
Verlangsamen
That's a good name, too: Sidewinder and Diamondback. It looks like a couple of snak
Sì, guarda quell
Ok, Jim. Questi sono i termini di compensazione del giroscopio. Sono già stati caricati e stiamo aggiornando le tue carte di bordo. Nella colonna A, numero 11, cambia da 77646 a 00114; numero 12, cambia da 77332 a 77546; numero 1
جيميني، CSQ. ق
Très bien. Voici l'édition du 23 décembre de l'Interstellar Times, façon Paul Haney. Nous tenons à vous informer qu'il ne reste que deux jours avant Noël pour faire vos achats. Il dit
Aurora Seven. Ici Cap Com. Je vous prie de rétablir le fonctionnement normal des gyroscopes et de vérifier si l'affichage de votre fenêtre correspond à
उस पंक्ति में बस इतना ही है। चौथी पंक्ति, दाहिनी ओर, बंद करन
حسنًا. احذف مهمتي أبولو لاند مارك رقم 2 و3. تلك المنطقة غائمة، ولمساعدتك في رحل
D'accord. Sous « manœuvre définie par l'équipage », les indications clignotantes 0622 corresponde
Roger. Sono contento di sentirlo. Stavamo proprio parlando di uno scarico d'acqua qui sotto. Ne abbiamo uno in arrivo, e sembr
デ
Отлично, Джек. Кстати, т
バズ、こちらヒュース
Roger, Jim. According to 
Ricevuto. Temperatura della tuta 62 gradi e temperatura della cabina 101 gradi. La pressione sanguigna sta salendo, e sappi che stai seguendo i valori indicati sul manuale. Sappi anche che stai 
2番は3050、1番は-3000で、2990まで下がりました。だから、本当に動かなかったということを示しているのかどうかは
我们
휴스턴, 콜럼비아, 고이득
我想这件事发生在昨天。当时我们正在进行常规的星体校准。我们首先选择了恒星阿尔法星，但它并没有指向阿尔法星；我重新运行程序并
로저, 세븐. 네 말을 읽어보니, 좀 어눌하고 알아듣기 힘든 것
रॉजर। मैं फिर से कहता हूँ, आपका स्टेट वेक्टर बिल्कुल ठीक है; यह अभी भी थोड़ा-बहुत गड़बड़ है, और हम यहाँ इसलिए रुके हैं क्योंकि हम यह जाँच रहे हैं कि कहीं कोई जानकारी खो तो नहीं गई। यह पहला कारण है, और दूसरा कारण यह है कि आपका W-मैट्रिक्स कुछ कंप्यूटर मेमोरी सेल्स सा
Ciel partiellement nuageux. Visibilité de 32 k
Roger. Wir würden gerne wissen, wie viel Farbfilm noch übrig i
मैनुअल प्रोपोर्शनल मोड में, मैनुअल लीवर को बाहर खींचकर और रेट कमांड का चयन करके, मैं धीरे-धीरे लेकिन निश्चित रूप से रेट्रोएटीट्यूड में आ रहा हूँ। सभी अक्ष बहुत अच्छे से काम कर
Хорошо, Вэнс. Я только что услышал небольшой стук, похоже, 
로저. 저는 자동
Roger. Je vais déplacer la télé pour avoir une m
D'accord. Nous avons passé en revue la maj
في
Navire de l'océan Indien, navire de l'océan Indien. Ici Sigma Seve
Négatif. Je n'en vois pas par ici. J'en ai aperçu quelques-uns, juste après avoir quitté Canaveral et fait demi-tour. Ils se dirigeaient vers moi à ce moment-
كانتون كاب كوم، هذا سي
Ok, in alto, lo scopo è mon
كل شيء يبدو جيدًا، سأعطيك قراءة سريعة. نسبة الوقود 27-29%. ضغط المقصورة 5.5، درجة حرارة هواء المقصورة
아니요... 그 모든 일
네, 프레드. 2.5암페어가 측정
हमारे पास एक विस्तृत प्रक्रिया है जिसे हम आपके तैयार होने पर कभी भी आपको पढ़क
حسنًا. سنقدم لكم طريقة الحصول على الوقت في تم
네. 통합 버전으로 테스트를 진행했으니, 발생할 수 있는 사소한 문제들은 모두 해결된 것 같습니
रॉजर। धन्यवाद
Nun, gut. Ich denke, wir ha
分かりました。パネル250の回路ブレーカーBAT A（POWER ENTRY/POS
أصف الشريط الأزرق. هناك شريط أ
No, sto bene. Come mai hai perso quei dat
Apollo 11
दरअसल, हम अभी सीधे केप की ओर देख रहे हैं। आप नीचे प्रक्षेपण परिसर देख सकते हैं। दृश्य ब
罗杰。
Q
Nous allons faire le pari sans aucun contact avec les stations 
酸素は約950ポンド（約450kg）と表示されています。Repressをオンにして、Primary Oxygenを少し減らしていただけますか
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Пожалуйста, оставьте телевизор включенным примерно на 10 минут, чтобы мы могли провести качественное сравнение на камере. На телевизоре вы можете делать все, что захотите: снимать интерьер, экстерьер, приближ
알겠습니다. 델타 2번과
ह्यूस्टन, अ
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्
You know not to leav
Und ich habe zwei Dinge, die Jack im Steuermodul erledigen soll, um die Last auf MAIN A zu reduzieren. Erstens soll er den CM/RCS-HEIZUNGSSCHALTER überprüfen oder ausschalten. Das haben wir bereits erledigt, und obwohl die Sicherungen gezogen sind, kön
Man, I sure hate to say it based on looking through this monocular, but there's a white spot that's just like a crater - looks like an awful lot under these small fresh ones in the bottom of this rather old crater, but right in the center of it, it looks like instead of there b
Bene. E lo fa
ああ、ジャック・シュミットもこれに取り組んでいま
Ap
D'accord, et mes ocul
Ok. A meno 5 ore. Ora diamo un'occhiata e vediamo come
よし、いいぞ。パネル225：サーキットブレーカーFLIGHT B
Deuxiè
Hello, Ap
He
Roger. E ricorda che non ci divertiremo lì, quindi monitoreremo i CDU e, se dovessimo staccarli, sarà piuttosto difficile capire dove tornare; e, beh
Bene. E l'ultim
It's very interesting to remark that my attitude--and the--is roughly pitchup plus 30 [degrees], roll right 130 [degrees], and yaw left 20 [degrees]. The balloon at this time is moving right along with me. It's keeping a constant bearing at all times. There is the horizon band again; this time from the moonlit side. Let me see, with the airglow filter, it's very difficult to do this because of the lights from that time correlation clock. Visor coming open now. It's impossible to get dark-adapted in here, with that light the way it is
Хорошо. Этот пролёт — обновление того, что мы вам предоставили вчера, поэтому обратите внимание, что это второй пролёт. И это будет пролёт /; 62970, минус 162, плюс 129, плюс 00966, плюс 00552, минус 02079. Крен, тангаж и рыскание равны нулю, ноябрьская Альфа, высота перигея плюс 00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013, вверх 047, вправо 39, плюс 1418 минус 16505 12904 36160, главная звезда Сириус, вторичная Ригель, 136 310 340, нет пустого пространства, требуется перенастройка на предпочтительное положение. Этот импульс подни
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Es sieht so aus, als ob wir die Verbindung bekommen
水瓶座，上行链路连接已完成。电脑
Okay. They're all stowed. Connect w
2، /: 46427، ناقص 053، زائد 141، ناقص 01350، زائد 0000، زائد 0000 000 175 358 00607، زائد 00606 01350 009 01265 02 3112 197؛ برج الثور، عايدة، لأعلى 16.2، لليسار 0.1، القراءة الثابتة غير قابلة للتطبيق؛ سيريوس، ريجل 129 155 010، لا يوجد ف
Сообщается, что всем 82 м
Va bene. La prossima volta probabilmente
روجر، بخ
好的。加4小时没问题。我们很快会给您加11小时的。另外，为了检查您的高增益天线，请您参考我们前几天的谈话，将开关保持在“宽波束”模
イーグル、P64ま
休斯顿，你或许会感兴趣，我现在从我的左侧窗户可以看到整个北美洲大陆、阿拉斯加，越过北极，一直到尤
Dies ist Sigma Seven, nur VOX-Aufnahme. Ich habe den Au
好的。哎呀——我现在是凌晨1点19分
And, Houston, Tranquility Base is going to give you a few comments with regard to the geology question of last night. We are landed in a relatively smooth crater field of elongate secondary - circular secondary craters, most of which have rims irrespective of their - raised rims irrespective of their size. That's not universally true. There are - There are a few of the smaller craters around which do not have a discernible rim. The ground mass throughout the area is a very fine sand to a silt. I'd say the thing that would be most like it on Earth is powdered graphite. Immersed in this ground mass are a wide variety of rock shapes, sizes, textures, rounded and angular, many with varying consistencies. As I said, I've seen plain - what looked to be plain basalt and vesicular basalt. Others with no crystals, some with small white phenocrysts, maybe one to less than 5 percent. And the bould - we are in a boulder field where the boulders range generally up to 2 feet with a few larger than that. Now, some of the boulders are lying on top of the surface, some are partially exposed, and some are just barely exposed. And in our traverse around on the surface and particularly working with the scoop, we've run into boulders below the surface 
الجوزاء 4، ال
毎回試してみても、あのくそ
لقد حصلت للتو على جريدة يا فرانك. سأقرأها 
Il mio è acceso.
请注意，怀特为了存放手套
Da ist nicht mehr viel Au
Bon, il 
Come on! Go to sleep! Listen, you'll
Подтверждаем. Мы решили, что это 
Я вас не читал. Пожалуйста, выкл
जी हाँ। आप पैड से प्राप्त होने वाले कोण डालेंगे, और यह चंद्रमा-दर्शन की स्थिति में मोटे संरे
За
Gemini 4, Houst
좋습니다. 카메라 오른쪽이 역방향으로 향하고 있습니다. 지금 휴스턴 분화
我们认为这应该没什么问题。我们希望您打开“流量读取开关”，并保持开启几个小时，以便我们了解情况。即使按照过去几个小时的使用频率，也不会有问题，但我们希望找到一种控制方法，既能方便使用，又不会给您带来麻烦。这就是我们想观察一段时间的原因。我们不希望您每隔几分钟就得手动调节压力。您明白我的意思
Je parie q
وأخيراً اكتشفت مكان القمر، ووضعك الحالي - إذا صادف أن نظرت من النافذة الصحيحة أث
Хорошо, Фред, мы не будем беспокоить капитана наверху. 
Rog
Это подтверждается. Воздушный шар у меня на борту. Однако я его давно не видел. Он довольно часто перемещается, и сейчас я его не вижу. Я думаю, что сейчас его можно было бы увидет
One of them, I hope, is a foolproof alinement proce
好的。这样吧，我让杰克去配置一下。他可以把那些东西抄下来，然后我们
Roger, 11. Copy those, and we've checked them here on the ground, also. One correction to my last
روجر. إيجل، سنحصل على متجهات الحالة و... بمجرد أن نصل إلى الكسب العالي. انتهى. سيستغرق الأمر حوالي 10 دقائق أخرى قبل أن نتجاوز... وعندما ننتقل إ
Sì, è eccez
Tatsächlich kann ich von hier oben bis ganz nach unten sehen, alle Inseln der gesamten Kette erkennen,... Ich
V
Exactement, CAP COM, c'est très facile de manœuvre
了解。5分前に読み上げました。85回線を通して音声は
حسنًا، فهمت. تريد إشارة بدء قبل أن... أنا... بالطبع، لقد قمتُ للتو بـ 76، وجهاز
Джим, что касается окна 5, у меня есть чертеж; и, когда вы состыкованы, угол между осями Z двух космических аппаратов составляет приблизительно 60 градусов. Похоже, что, глядя в окно 5, вы будете видеть радар сближения, расположенный сверху, который, если вы измените угол наклона, более или менее дас
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。今すぐ酸
わかりました。3行目のCOMMの下のDISPLAY（ディ
База «Транквилити», это Хьюстон. Пассивный сейсм
...밖에서 볼 때는 안에서 볼 때만큼 이상해
Да, отправьте ∆T — всё будет в порядке. Мне также нужно, чтобы это 
जे
E, Houston, la Tranquility Base vi darà qualche commento riguardo alla questione geologica di ieri sera. Siamo atterrati in un campo di crateri relativamente liscio, di crateri secondari allungati - crateri secondari circolari, la maggior parte dei quali ha bordi indipendentemente dalle loro dimensioni. Questo non è universalmente vero. Ci sono - Ci sono alcuni dei crat
يب
روجر. إذا كنت ترغب في الربط بين... المجموعة الأخير
네, 
Ха! Ха! У меня до сих пор черные следы от ласт после вашей поездки в лес. Ладно, видите, я снова отклонился вправо. Мне нужно вер
حسنًا. الوقت هو - سيكون الحدث في؛ وعلينا المناورة للوصول إلى الوضعية التالية: دوران 101.0، ميل 90.0، انحراف صفري. ستكون زوايا الكسب العالي هي ميل ناقص 23، انحراف 93. وعلينا استخدام الإجراءات العادية لتخميد المعدلات. وبعد تخميد المعدلات وقبل بدء الدوران، علينا وضع السدس على جهاز السدس مع مخزن G، فيلم أبيض وأسود عالي السرعة جدًا. ثم، علينا التقاط ثلاث صور، واحدة لكل من أوقات التعريض 5 و20 و60 ثانية باستخدام البصريات الصوتية - التلقائية. قيمنا R1 زائد 34717، R2 ناقص 08028، R3 زائد 35075. ثم، ثلاث صور أخرى، واحدة لكل من أوقات التعريض 5 و20 
알겠습니다. 그리고 밴스, 혹시 AOS 
जेरी, इन दृश्यों को बनाते समय हम लगभग हर समय अफ्रीका के ऊपर ही थे। कम 
好的。在我看来，这种冷浸法的前提是你的车厢里有热交
Okay. Die D
अ
这里有一个
यह चारों क्वाड पर सक्रिय हो गया था; बिल्कुल सही। हमारा अंतिम भंडारण पूरा हो गया है
알겠습니다. 잭에게 LOGIC에 있는 PYRO가 안전한
حسنًا. قواطع د
好吧，
さあ。トミー・ジェイコブスに続いて、地元ヒューストンの占星術師、ルビー・グラハムさんから、とびきりホットな言葉をいただきました。彼女は、あなたの月への旅はすべての星座が順調だと言っています。ニールは賢く、マイクは判断力があり、バズは複雑な問題を解決できます。また、ニールは世界をバラ色の眼鏡で見る傾向がありますが、苦しんでいる人や困っている人をいつでも助ける用意があるとも言っています。ニール、あなたは「感情を込めて人生を解釈できる直感」を持っていると言われています。バズは優れた批判力に
Il va falloir qu'
أعتقد أن توم يجب أن يلقي نظرة فاحصة ع
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben Neuigkeiten und möchten mit Ihnen über einige Dinge sprechen, falls Sie gerade nicht beim Essen sind. Wenn es Ihnen passt, stehen wir Ihnen gerne für Neuigkeiten zur Verfügung. Ende
わかりました。パネル8で、開回路にするブレーカーの数を読み上げます。まず、CBパネル8をすべて閉じた状態から始めます。ただし、CM/ヒーターとフロートバッグの2つは開回路のままにしておきます。そして、以下の設定を追加します。1つずつ読み上げますので、了解してください。ロジックバス、
조종사가 1종 의료 증명서를 발급받으려는지 알아볼
Siamo ancora nella banda larga o in quel
Gemi
स्थानीय समाचारों में एक और छोटी सी खबर: हंट्सविले स्थित काउंटी कोर्ट हाउस कल सुबह भोर से पहले जलकर राख हो गया, इसलिए लगता है कि अब वहां निर्माण कार्य फिर से शुरू करना पड़ेगा। प्रतीक्षा कर रहे परिवारों के बारे में एक छोटी सी जानकारी। यह पोस्ट रिपोर्टर ऐन जेम्स द्वारा है। क्रिसमस की पूर्व स
Okay, Jack. Go back to the battery charge procedure I gave you. And, in order to terminate charge, just - You'll just have to write "Open" or "Off" next to the circuit switch that I gave you. So on panel 250, that circuit breaker you've already opened; on panel 275, INVERTER POWER-2 MAIN B, open; panel 5, BAT RELAY BUS BAT A, open; SENSOR UNIT AC BUS 2, open, SENSOR SIGNAL AC2, open; BATTERY CHARGER, MAIN B, open; BATTERY CHARGER AC POWER, open; BATTERY CHARGER, BAT A CHARGE, open; INVERTER CONTROL 2, open; INVERTER CONTROL 3, open; you've already done the MAIN BUS TIE; and then BAT CHARGE switch to AC 1. Over on panel 3, you have already set the AC INVERTER 2 to OFF and then INVERTER 2 AC BUS 2, OFF; AC BUS 2 RESET to OFF. You have already put the BATTERY 
Yes. Listen, I had a lot of trouble with my eyes at the end of the first day. I wasn't sure I was going to be able to hack it. But they have cleared up now. I think ou
Aurora Seven, Cape C
알겠습니다. 다시 말씀드리지만, 위도 +0920, -16500 12953 36175입니다. 이해하셨
Is it the one Jack wrote them all in? The big long readout? He also 
Okay, wir haben n
收到。这里是阿波罗8号，通过备用语
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. واضح تمامًا. ك
アーム
Ja.
了解、オーロラ・セブン。ピッチマイ
Okay. Under " turn-on," add in steps 1 and 2 again, which are 
But, we did - but we did identify the El Paso area and it appeared to 
ええと、彼らは私が見た粒子がそこから
RKV Surgeon, Gemini 4
我看不见。哦
Ken, c'est Frank. Je veux… je veux être sûr d'une chose: c'est bien la charge que nous allons utiliser pour 
Well, stand by one. Listen, you might advise Flight by way of land lines that we're running late on 
Giusto. Non vorrei vederne u
로저. 현재 고도는 97,413피트이고
Roger. Copy, Buzz. Got a couple of changes to your surface checklist here, and in general, what we're going to want you to do is, tracking the command mo
Ещё немного местных новостей: здание окружного суда в Хантсвилле сгорело вчера до рассвета, так что, похоже, там снова займутся строительством. Немного о семьях, ожидающих возвращения. Вот что написала Энн Джеймс, репортер газеты Post. «Мы отдыхаем на обратной стороне Луны», — сказала Валери Андерс в канун Рождества, ожидая, когда «Аполлон-8» покинет лунную орбиту и направится домой. Миссис Андерс была дома во вторник в 00 утра, и соседи только что собрали всех детей, чтобы семья могла отдохнуть, пока космический корабль находился за Луной и был вне зоны связи. Дом полковника Фрэнка Бормана был украшен четырьмя большими венками из вечнозеленых деревьев на улице, посыпан пушистым снегом и украшен красными бантами. Дерево в гостиной ждёт его благополучного возвращения, а его красивая светловолосая жена Сью и крепкие сыновья Фредерик и Эдвин планируют остаться дома до полуночного старта с лунной орбиты. Обычно они посещали полуночные службы в епископальной церкви Святого Христофора. Планировалось, что семья отправится туда в полночь. Поскольку в доме Борманов нет маленьких детей, дарение рождественских подарков просто отложится до возвращения полковника Бормана с его фантастическим праздничным подарком — полетом на Луну и обратно. Четверо детей Мэрилин Ловелл проведут совершенно обычное Рождество, как сообщила занятая жена капитана Ловелла; но говорить о подарках было невозможно, потому что двое из них сидели прямо рядом с ней. «У меня даже не было времени переодеться, в чем я была вчера вечером», — сказала миссис Ловелл. Однако подарки будут переданы взрослым, и рождественская елка останется на месте, когда Ловелл вернется домой. Вот еще одна интересная новость на «Линии действий». Небольшое письмо редактору «Линии действий». Там написано: «Мы собирались нанести вам, землянам, неожиданный визит на летающей тарелке прошлой ночью. Нас отпугнули безумные выходки толстяка, саней и трёх парней, гоняющихся на ракетодвигателе вокруг Луны. Разве так можно управлять планетой?» Подпись: парни с Марса. Фрэнк, похоже, единственные, кто здесь не впечатлён «Аполлоном
Houston, Apollo 11. Ho mantenuto qui il controllo MINIMO DEADBAND RATE BASSO con il ciclo limite attivato, solo per curiosità, se volete qualche dato sul carb
Okay, I am rolled left about 7 degrees. Yaw right 2 d
そ
حسنًا. فيما يخصّ ذلك، لدينا ما يكفي من الأكسجين في المركبة الفضائية... لنتمكن من المرور. ليس لديّ... وحدة قيادة... حلقة بدلة الفضاء قبل الدخول. كنت أبحث عن...
Tu vois, tu ne peux pas me berner, hein Scott? J'ai mai
Gemi
Это отрицательный результат, «Аполлон-8». Сначала мы хотели бы обновить информацию, и мы предоставим вам векто
Хорошо. Теперь, когда мы займем четвертый ряд, мы откроем автоматический выключатель «ВКЛЮЧИТЬ»; это означает, что мы потеряем возможность наблюдать за вашими блоками управления, поэтому мы не сможем видеть ваше положение в пространстве. Следовательно, мы не сможем посоветовать вам, какую антенну выбрать для связи. Мы просим вас отключить шу
لا، الأمر ليس سيئاً للغاية. لقد خزنّا معظم الأغراض الإضافية تحت أرجلنا خلف كعوبنا
どの絞り
Okay. Bedienfeld 3: BATTERIELADUNG, AUS – das hast du schon gemacht, Jack – als nächstes der Wechselrichter. Bedienfeld 5: HAUPTBUSVERBINDUNG BAT B/C. Hä? Ja, er ist oben – in der oberen Position. Schutzschalter, BAT A STROMEINTRITT/POSTLANDING, öffnen; Schutzschalter, B
Okay. 
Понял. Далее, остановите пас
罗杰，弗兰克。我们需要一些没能抄下来的数字。稍等一下。弗兰克，你第一次抄表
Der Sonnenuntergang ist wirklich beeindruckend, ich glaube nicht, dass ich viel Zeit damit verschwenden muss, ihn anzusehen. Er ist sehr interessant. Faszinierend ist auch, wie schwarz es ist, wenn sich die Augen nicht daran gewöhnt haben. Ich kann definitiv eine Beschichtung auf dem Fenster erkennen. Ich schalte jetzt wieder auf VOX im UHF-Hi-Modus, um zu senden. Ich öffne das Visier, um das rechte Mikrofon abzuwischen. Ich habe es abgeleckt. Visier zu. Das Visier wurde sofort abgedichtet, damit die Anzugselektronik ihre Arbeit aufnehmen konnte. Ich will damit nicht noch einmal Probleme haben. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hält die Temperatur
时间已过去38分钟。夜侧——我们有清晰的地平线
यह ह्यूस्टन ह
Okay. Es ist durchgehend nicht verfügbar. Ihre geografische Breite beträgt -21
Roger sur l'inertie. Et c'est parti pour le PAD 2. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, +166, -081; TIG 080 11 3603. NOUN 81: -01408, moins toutes les billes, -00743. Lancer toutes les billes, 196 359 00657, +00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Étoile du sextant 23 1160 138. Le reste du PAD est
إننا نحصل ع
This TV cable is getti
温度可能稍微降了一点。现在大概零度左右；我是说现在大概70度。之前稍微高一点。面罩关上了，我开始感觉
بينما أنت مشغول بذلك، عليّ أن
好吧，它们
هذا هو جيميني 4، ه
The lights
Ecco, è proprio quello che voglio dire. Possiamo 
RKV CAP COM，这里是双子座4号。你如何解读
罗杰。来自公共事务办公室的最新消息：阿波罗11号仍然是全球新闻的焦点。只有四个国家——共产主义中国、朝鲜、北越和阿尔巴尼亚——尚未向其公民通报您的登月飞行和登月。一位记者表示，他已经找不到合适的词语来形容您的成功。今晚，尼克松总统计划在华盛顿观看全明星棒球赛。赛后，他将前往太平洋回收区。周三晚上，他将从约翰斯顿岛乘直升机前往海军通信舰“阿灵顿”号。周四早上，他将再次登上直升机，飞往“大黄蜂”号，以便及时观看您的溅落。陪同总统的有国务卿威廉·罗杰斯和弗兰克·博尔曼。他们将与太平洋舰队司令约翰·西德尼·麦凯恩海军上将一起在回收舰的舰桥上观看溅落。总统在“大黄蜂”号上的停留结束后，将启程前往亚洲访问，并按计划访问罗马尼亚。据信，月球15号探测器在绕月飞行52圈后，于昨日坠入危机海。苏联塔斯社报道称，探测器在近月空间进行了“科学”研究。乔德雷尔班克天文台的伯纳德·洛弗尔爵士表示，月球15号以约300英里/小时的速度撞击月球表面。越南近来局势相对平静。巡逻的美国大兵被发现携带收音机收听你们的航班。驻越美军广播电视网对此次任务进行了全程报道。埃及和以色列在苏伊士运河沿线的冲突仍在继续。联合国观察员正在努力制止冲突。在华盛顿，众议院筹款委员会投票决定将27.5%的石油枯竭补贴削减至20%。休斯顿地区已经下了好几次雨。今天多云，预计还会有阵雨。体育方面，正如我们之前提到的，全明星赛今晚举行。昨天没有比赛。昨晚在纽约，美国棒球作家协会将贝比·鲁斯评为史上最伟大的棒球运动员，乔·迪马乔则被评为在世最伟大的棒球运动员。弗兰克·博尔曼在为球员举办的晚宴上宣布了这一消息。乔·纳马斯在纽约喷气机队的训练营进行了一整天的训练。大约500名孩子想要触摸“百老汇乔”，五名警察费了好大劲才控制住他们。他说自己感觉很好，如果教练威布·尤班克允许，他将参加8月1日的全明星赛。休斯顿油人
Du hast deinen Helm festgeschnallt, falls der Druckaufbau ausfallen sollte. De
Great. We
双
로저. MDIU 코어 몇 개
Wa
Here is an interesting little feature item that is kind of good to hear. It seems that up in Ann Arbor, Michigan, they have a new youth gang. It's called the Gilnet Gang. It roams the streets of Ann Arbor, acting in secret, and sometimes bypassing the law. They call themselves the Guerillas for Good. Some of the things they have done is, painted a bridge that was covered with obscenities. They painted it one night. A condemned house with - it's popular with neighborhood children, but dangerous, was boarded up. Downtown planters unfilled because of a debate over which group was responsible, business or government, were filled with flowers. A hedge, thought to be hampering vision, at busy intersection was trimmed, and the owner was angered. Trash along
现在休斯顿的情况不错，光学器件没有
नहीं, मैंने नहीं देखा। मैंने ओ-रिंग को देखा और मुझे नहीं लगता कि यह ओ-रिंग की समस्या है। मुझे लगता है कि यह मेरी... मैंने देखा कि लॉन्च से ठीक पहले, पिछली सुबह जब मेरी जाँच हुई थी, तब उन्हें इसमें थोड़ी दिक्कत आ रही थी। मेरा... रक्तचाप ऊपर-नीचे होता रहता है। लगता है मेरे सूट में कोई समस्या है
私たちは、クアッド ブラボー 1 のプライマリおよびセカンダリ推進剤トークバックを、分離時のバーバー ポールにコピーしま
네. 제가 직접 선택한 태도를 유지하려고 노력하는 동안, 당신은 대략적인 태도를 보여주세요. 어떤 태도가 가장 좋은지 아직 잘 모르겠습
Friendship Seven, Muchea Cap Com. Avez-vous toujours les deux propulseurs à commande électrique 
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. حاضر. على خط المحاذاة، يجب أن يكون ٢٣٣، ٢٣٣ في ال
알겠습니다. 지금 우리는 움푹 패인 분화구를 관찰하고 있습니다. 궤도선 사진에서 볼 수
Очень хорош
ठीक है। जैक ऊपर से रिपोर्ट कर रहा है कि उसे ऑप्टिक्स से तारे और तारामंडल दिखाई दे रहे हैं, लेकिन सूर्य का कोण ऐसा है कि वह क्वाड के - भाग और अन्य थ्रस्टर से परावर्तित हो रहा है... अभी... 
그러시는 동안, 지휘 조종사님께서 부스터에 대한 정보, 거리, 부스터 가까이 
옴니 차량이
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。你
알겠습니다. 그건 좀... 너무
阿波罗11号，这
私が最初に行った測定では、実際にはそうではありませんでした。空気の輝きは下の方から始まっていると思います
이것은 제미니 4호입니
迈克，你在干什么？你在拍什么
Roger. So che abbiamo intenzione di usare quella telec
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 수정일: 200
哥伦比亚现在清楚
हमें नहीं लगता कि इसमें कोई समस्या है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप क्वांटिटी रीड स्विच को चालू कर दें और अगले कुछ घंटों तक इसे चालू ही रहने दें ताकि हम स्थिति का जायजा ले सकें। पिछले कुछ घंटों में जिस दर से इसका उपयोग हुआ है, उससे भी कोई समस्या नहीं होगी, लेकिन हम इसे बिना किसी परेशानी के नियंत्रित करने का कोई तरीका ढूंढना चाहते हैं ताकि आपको इससे
这
응, 나도 알아. 넌 마치 엄마 뱃속에 있는 것 같았
روجر، باز. يبدو أن هناك بعض الالتباس بخصوص الرقمين 405 و406. نرجو منك تصفيرهما قبل فصل المركبة، وبعد الفصل يمكنك ذلك - لكن
Hanno anche esaminato i risultati del tuo tracciamento dei punti di riferimento. A quanto pare, i punti erano tutti molto buoni, e abbiamo qui una pagina intera di dati relativi alle altitudini dei vari siti, che non ti legger
Там напи
D'accord. Nous comptons rester en haut débit. Nous allions vous demander si cela faisait une différence
Roger, ti leggo cinque quadrati in HF. Proviamo in 
Le Bermuda mostrano 
रॉजर। अल, मैंने सब कुछ तैयार कर लिया है, सिवाय स्क्विब स्विच के, जिसकी जिम्मेदारी तुम पर है
Roger. Wir möchten bitte, dass Ihre Mengenlesefunktion aktiviert ist und dass die Massenmengenan
Bon. J'ai été interrompu une minute. Bob Hope est de retour au Vietnam avec ses troupes, et comme toujours, il fait un excellent trav
Apollo 11, Houston. D'après nos observations depuis le milieu de la trajectoire, nous affichons un gamma de -6,57. Ce chiffre est préliminaire, et nous pensons qu'après quelques suivis supplémentaires, la trajectoire devrait se stabiliser et nous pourrons l'ajuster précisément dans le couloir d'atterrissage. Nous sommes quasiment au centre du couloir; tout semble bien se passer. Nous vous enverrons un plan d'entrée dans quelques heures, avant que vous n'alliez vous coucher. Et de la part de nos amis des affaires publiques, voici quelques informations, outre votre vol. Vous êtes toujours au centre de l'actualité. Cependant, il y a d'autres choses intéressantes pour vous. Comme je l'ai mentionné précédemment, le match des étoiles a été annulé en raison de la pluie. Il aura lieu demain. Cependant, le président Nixon ne pourra pas y assister comme prévu. Nous vous tiendrons informés des résultats. De plus, la météo sera clémente. Nos prévisions indiquent qu'elle se maintient pour la zone de récupération; il devrait faire très beau. Alors qu'il s'apprêtait à s'envoler pour vous accueillir à votre retour, le président Nixon a prédit que d'ici 31 ans, l'humanité aurait visité au moins une autre planète abritant une forme de vie. « En l'an 2000, nous, sur Terre, aurons visité de nouveaux mondes où existera une forme de vie », a-t-il déclaré à 2 000 étudiants étrangers en échange universitaire à la Maison-Blanche. Avant son départ pour ce voyage d'une semaine, le président a transmis au Congrès sa proposition de réorganisation de la Commission du commerce interétatique. À son retour du Vietnam, il s'est également entretenu avec le chef d'état-major des armées, Earl Wheeler. Le lancement d'Intelstat a été annulé et reprogrammé pour mercredi à 22 h, heure avancée de l'Est. Le système de so
Ça s'améliore. Vous le tenez à environ 13h ou 14h. C'est mieux. Donnez-nous un peu plus d
Roger, Zanzibar, I read you lou
حسنًا يا فريد. نحن في منطقة اتصال صاخبة هنا؛ لديّ معلومات عن حا
That's affirm. I'm going to first of all just quickly run through the times of the major events, and then we'll go back and fill in some of the details. Okay. Entry interface is at 142 hours 40 minutes; 6-1/2 hours, roughly prior to that or at about, we'll start this whole thing going by applying HEATER POWER, by checking the CM/ temperatures and preheating the CM/ if required, and we suspect we'll probably want to do that. We'll have detailed procedures up for it later. At about 6 hours prior to or about, we will commence powering up the, powering up the, using the modified / 30-minute checklist, which you have used for the previous midcourse. Then shortly, just before 5 hours, prior to or at about, we'll want you in the attitude for a body axis alinement, using the Earth terminator like we did before; and as soon as we have that, we'll perform -7, which looks like, now, about a 2-foot-per-second burn or about 15 seconds of. And I'm told that it's down to 1-1/2 now, so it's comfortably within the margin. Okay. When we do that, we'll immediately start the maneuver to the service module jettison attitude, which will be in plane since we're jettisoning it earlier than we usually do. We don't need, and don't want, the out-of-plane component. So it'll be in plane with the service module pointed back ou
Un paio di cose varie per te: vorremmo che interrompessi la ricarica della batteria B in questo momento; vorremmo anche che tu effettuassi una crioagitazione, 2 minuti su tutti e quattro; e il tuo interruttore TELEMETRIA
It takes a prett
잭, 무중력 상태에서 해먹에 누우니 좀 어렵네. 내가 자꾸 해먹에서 멀어지는
Je pouvais le faire à cette époque, de Carnarvon jusqu'a
Houston, Tranquility. We're not sure that we got number 2 tank to fire. I
알겠습니다, 밴스. 카트리지 개조에 필요한 몇 가지 물품을 찾았습니다. 하나는 토트백에 사용하려고 했던 특수 먼지 방지 백인데, 꽤 두껍고
У нас есть для вас Бермудский вектор. Ваши размеры 87 на 140, что требует выполнения маневра вне плоскости и корректи
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्ट
Zur Information: Cape teilt mit, dass wir diesen Orbit wahrscheinlich beenden müsse
我们不能在IVI中插入任
一切就绪。亨茨维尔方面报告称，您的推进剂垫持续时间为 6 秒，比 3σ 情况多 3 秒；因此，您的耗材充足。情况如此之好，我们无需更新。我们唯一需要修改的是检查清单。在 5
हाँ, वह था। और सच कहूँ तो, अब जब आपने इसका ज़िक्र किया है, तो मैं ज़मीन के समा
Jack, wir müssen dich vielleicht bitten, diese CO2-Anlage, von 
Apol
了解。GET B 02 45 50。デルタV 26.2。燃焼時間 0 
알겠습니다. 전달해
稍等。稍
Apollo 8, hier ist Houston. Ich habe die Signale 1 und 2. Wir haben noch keine Telemetriedaten; 
Houston, Gemini VI. Tous le
Okay. Or
제미니 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다.
可能发生的情况是，吉姆可能在我们完全关闭止回阀之前就把水控制阀拆
わかりました。コマンダーのボールをピッチ角267.5、ヨー角マイナス4.5まで動かします。その時の値は16 20、プラス00120、
Alpha/Pc a Pc; INDICATORE VEICOLO DI LANCIO a GPI; PASSO E IMBARDATA DEL GIMBAL su AUTO; RESET TIMER EVENTO, su; AVVIO TIMER EVENTO su STOP; MINUTI E SECONDI TIMER EVENTO al centro; Valvola di VENTILAZIONE POST-ATTERRAGGIO, premere; ESTENDI/RILASCIA SONDA su OFF; Talkback ESTENDI/RILASCIA, due grigi; RETRAZIONE SONDA DI ATTRACCO, PRIMARIA e SECONDARIA, spenta; estendi LUCI DI MARCIA/LUCI EVA, spente; estendi LUCI DI MARCIA - LUCE RENDEZVOUS, spenta - devi prendere un - ecco fatto - LUCE TUNNEL, spenta; SPIA DI ALIMENTAZIONE, spenta; MODULO DI SERVIZIO Elio, quattro, al centro; talkback ELIO 1, quattro
抱歉，13号。你没抄。你被分配到火焰喷射
All
हमें अ
क्या आपको कोई परावर्तन या ऐसी कोई च
هذا صحيح يا جيم. لم نحصل على صورة
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们将暂时保持
Aquarius，对比我们最初对用水量和用电量的估计，我们发现用水量估计得非常准确，而用电量比我们最初在第一次分析中预期的要少一些，所以在这方面，我
База Спокойствия, Хьюстон. М
Tranquility
Roger. Wir haben einen Kraftstoffdruck v
ロジャ
Ok, Jack. Vediamo se ci sono riuscito. Quello che facciamo è puntare la sonda verso la Terra come abbiamo fatto per la rotta intermedia, e tracciamo un'allineamento dell'asse del corpo sulla... Poi ci dai un assetto della palla per volare verso... la..., e poi noi... puntiamo... la Luna. Poi aggiorneresti la... ci daresti delle unità di misura per un allineamento grossolano... fine... sulle stelle o sulla Luna o sulla Terra. Aspetta. Okay. Abbiamo avuto un altro ALLARME PRINCIPALE, Jack. Non vedo luci laggiù, 
当我们把推进速率降到我们认为可以安全脱离的程度后，我们便脱离了对接，并以每秒几英尺的速度尽快远离了阿金纳空间站。我们一直密切关注着推进剂的剩余量，它从50%下降到了30%以下。在关
Adesso 
एड ने सामान खोलना शुरू किया और जैसे ही हम उस स्थिति में पहुँचे जहाँ बूस्टर के साथ छेड़छाड़ करना संभव नहीं था, मैंने पूरी तरह से उसकी मदद करना शुरू कर दिया - कम से कम सामान पकड़कर उसे सही जगह पर रखना और उसे गायब होने से बचाना। जितनी तेज़ी से हम काम करते, उतना ही हम पीछे होते चले जाते। ऐसा इसलिए नहीं था कि हम चीज़ों को सही जगह पर नहीं रख रहे थे, बल्कि इसमें हमारी उम्मीद से कहीं ज़्यादा समय लग रहा था। जीरो ग्रेविटी में यह सिम्युलेटर की तुलना में ज़्यादा आसान नहीं था, हालाँकि उतना ही आसान था। इसलिए हमने पूरा चक्कर लगाया। जब तक हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे, मैंने मन बना लिया था कि हम वहाँ नहीं पहुँच पाएँगे, लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि थोड़ी देर और कोशिश करते हैं। जब हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे - या वहाँ से निकलने से ठीक पहले - मुझे स्पष्ट हो गया था कि हम दबाव कम करने की प्रक्रिया पूरी नहीं कर पाएँगे। मैंने अगली कक्षा में जाने के लिए स्लिप का अनुरोध किया। फिर... हमने लगभग 20 मिनट तक आराम किया और कॉकपिट में पड़े फालतू सामान को व्यवस्थित करने की कोशिश की। फिर मैंने चेकलिस्ट निकाली और हमने दोबारा विस्तार से चेकलिस्ट 
ठीक है। एक बहुत ही दिलचस्प बात - जिम की खिड़की से पूरी रोशनी आ रही है, और मेरी खिड़की से 
كان ذلك نيل. ك
حسنًا. تمام. لنبدأ. ربما ست
好的，,..
Подождите. На линии Джек, и он говорит, что не может перевести компьютер в спя
情况依然不错。虽然这并没有造成太大的变化，但考虑到你们距离很远，总体
Roger. Be advised that about 50 - I am hearing these echos quite a bit of the
Ja
방금 편광 필터를 통해 본 사진에 대해 말씀하셨는데, 그게 바로 편광 필터를 통해 본 TV 화
Bill, potresti ripeterci tutto? Non ti stia
ये है दोस्ती सात। साफ़ स्कोप से देखने पर ये बहुत तेज़ दिख रही है। ये ठीक उसी समय शुरू हुई जब मैंने तुम्हें वो इशारा दिया था; मैं अब डार्क
Roger. Just want to let you guys know that since you're an hour and a half over your time
Роджер, это «Д
Ich stimme 
Roger. Okay, Jim, we decided that you've got a little bit of fuel left that we can play with here in the Flight Plan. We would like for you to go to the Horizon Scan Mode for the next 8 hours. That's a
Okay. Wir setzen mitten auf der Seite fort, dieser Block „CMS resume attitude control“, durchstreichen. Die nächste Zeile durchstreichen: „PRO VERB 96“. Die dritte Zeile
حسنًا. ما يمكننا عرضه لكم الآن، وهو ميزة إضافية، هو وجود جهاز الرصد على أريكة فريد في وحدة القيا
Die Gyroskope scheine
Please don't sn
Roger. Je relis les instructions de décollage TIG: 124 22 pair, 125 19 3470, 126 57 pair, les LM pour 53,2 DELTA 
हवाई पू
Ein Ziel – welches Objektiv? Ein 18-mm-Ob
Роджер. 8, /: 45701, минус 040, плюс 157. Вы меня понимаете? Ко
Yes, I'm sorry, put those O
Korrektur, wir stellen auf Fly-by-Wire um. En
روجر. لق
अपोलो 8, जब तक हमें उच्च लाभ नहीं मिल जाता, मैं प्रक्षेप पथ का सारांश जारी रखूंगा। हम तेरहवें बिंदु से मध्य-प्रशांत रेखा पर वापस आ सकते हैं, और 138 सेकंड के बर्न के बाद आप अपने मार्ग पर होंगे। 138 सेकंड में आप बटरफ्लाई क्षेत्र से बाहर निकल जाएंगे। हम 20 सेकंड के बाद प्रीइग्निशन या रीस्टार्ट न करने की सलाह देते हैं। यदि आप 20 सेकंड से आगे जाते हैं, तो इससे प्रक्षेप पथ सुधार से परे हो सकता है - जिससे आपको बिना किसी सहायता के वापस लौटना पड़ सकता है। रिकवरी क्षेत्र में मौसम अच्छा है। हमारे पास एक फॉलोइंग है और एक विदाउट है। बर्न के दौरान, स्टोरेज टैंक में ईंधन की कमी और उसके सम्प टैंक में जाने के कारण आपको चैम्बर प्रेशर और टैंक प्रेशर में थोड़ा बदलाव दिखाई दे सकता है। यह बर्न शुरू होने के लगभग 2 से 5 सेकंड के बीच हो सकता है। दोनों सिस्टम में प्रेशर में मामूली बदलाव होगा। सिस्टम की जांच करने पर, सभी सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहे है
Und für alle, die sich fragen, wo Jim schläft: Es ist etwas schwierig, seine Hängematte jetzt bei geöffneter Luk
Ora sono in assetto di rientro. Pronto a passare alla modalità automatica. Il fly-by-wire segue i movimenti in modo impeccabile, proprio come nel simulatore. Risultati molto positivi dall'utilizzo del simulatore di procedure. Non c'è dubbio, il tempo passa piuttosto velocemente. Torno in modalità automatica. Ho ricevuto il segnale di pitch down, solo un legge
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, ici
Okay. Wir sind bereit, Ihnen die Vorgehensweise zu
Al momento è su CLOSED, e io ero allineato con CLOSED prima di essere su VENT; e per quanto ricordo, era allineato con precisione con VENT. Vuoi che torni su VENT tra un attimo e veda dove si
Okay. Während wir die Scrollpositio
This is 
OK. Bien reçu, Fred. Et tu mesures à nouveau 0,1 pour le CO2. Au fait, est-ce que vous arrivez à évacuer l'eau du modul
जी हां। इससे यह कार्ड पूरा हो जाता है। बाकी अपडेट सिर्फ आपकी जानकारी के लिए हैं, जो हमारे 58 घंटे के प्लेटफॉर्म पर आधारित हैं - प्लेटफॉर्म को देखें। हमारी स्थिति बहुत अच्छी है। आपके GYRO में लगभग कोई विचलन नहीं है क्योंकि - प्लॉट किए गए अपडेट में हम X का मान -2.24, Y का मान +0.87 और Z का मान -0.11 देख रहे थे। अपडेट के बाद, जो मुझे लगता है कि 52 घंटे के आधार पर था, हमने आपको X का विचलन +0.79, यॉ का +1.06 और Z का +0.02 दिया... मैं देख सकता हूं कि 52 घंटे और 57 घंटे के अलाइनमेंट में अंतर था - इससे हमें विचलन जांच पर एक सटीक या पूरी तरह से मान्य
Gemini 4, это RKV. Подтверждаю. Если командир экипажа не проснулся, мы возьме
Okay. Which book a
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Сейчас мы начнём с телевизора: вы сможете увеличить громкость, как только мы снова под
Roger. Unsere Mondreise mag Ihnen einfach erschienen sein. Ich kann Ihnen versichern, dass dem nicht so war. Die Saturn-V-Rakete, die uns in den Orbit befördert hat, ist eine unglaublich komplexe Maschine, deren einzelne Teile einwandfrei funktionierten. Dieser Bordcomputer über mir verfügt über einen Wortschatz von 38.000 Wörtern, von denen jedes einzelne sorgfältig ausgewählt wurde, um für uns, die Besatzung, von größtem Wert zu sein. Allein im Kommandomodul gibt es über 300 Gegenstücke zu diesem Schalter. Hinzu kommen unzählige Sicherungen, Hebel, Stangen und andere Bedienelemente. Das Triebwerk, unser großes Raketentriebwerk am Heck des Servicemoduls, musste einwandfrei funktionieren, sonst wären wir im Mondorbit gestrandet. Die Fallschirme über mir müssen morgen perfekt funktionieren, sonst stürzen wir ins Meer. Wir waren stets zuversichtlich, dass die gesamte Ausrüstung funktionieren und einwandfrei funktionieren wird, und wir sind weiterhin davon überzeugt, dass dies auch für den Rest des Fluges so bleiben wird. All dies ist nur durch den unermüdlichen Einsatz vieler Menschen möglich. Zunächst den amerikanischen Fachkräften, die diese Maschinenteile im Werk montiert haben. Zweitens den verschiedenen Testteams, die während der Montage und der anschließenden Tests akribisc
حسنً
Мы можем спуститься 
Хорошо. Перелив от
Das war's f
Gemini VII
他很难保持方向感，而且在我看来，从那时起，他似乎完全不顾飞船的指向，随意地调整方​​向。他甚至能以相当高的速率调整方向，高达每秒2度。我打算把调整速率控制在这个范围内。当他回到飞船里时，我们费了好大劲才打开舱门。我们先抬起舱门的棘轮部分进行啮合。
Okay. 
हम पानी के उपयोग के पैटर्न का बारीकी से विश्लेषण कर रहे हैं, और फिलहाल हमारा रुख यही है कि एक को चालू रखा जाए और दूसरे को बंद कर दिया जाए, लेकिन हम आपको जल्द ही और जानकारी देंगे। सोते समय हम आपको सलाह देते हैं कि एक व्यक्ति को निगरानी के लिए तैनात कर दें। यदि संभव हो तो कृपया पेशाब न करें, क्योंकि इससे कचरे की समस्या और भी बदतर हो जाएगी। हमा
是的，我想我们失去信号了。我们
روجر. 21-4 56. 
네
Le terrain est en baisse, donc nous regardons vers
휴스턴, 콜롬비아입니다. 이제 곧 첫 번째 착륙선 관측 시간이 다가오는데, 혹시 지형적인 단서가 될 만한 정보가 있을까요? 현재 자동 광학 장치가 두 개의 
Sie können es zu BLOCK zurückbringen, und zu Bills Information: Die neueste Schätzung 
Роджер, Том. Роджер, Уо
Roger, Aqu
D'accord. Et quand vous aurez un peu de temps pour copier, j'aurai une liste de chargement à vous fournir, précisant quel é
Роджер. Мы приближаемся к траектории захода на посадку. Это примерно за 13 минут до зажигания, и мы находимся примерно на 83 градусах, я думаю — 83 градусах восточно
알겠습니다. 지구의 모습이나 우주 공간에서의 지구의 자세는 어느 정도 파악했으니,
È vero. L'ho guardato e, quando ho premuto l'interruttore, è diventato un palo da barbiere
Il est sans doute assez difficile de pe
알겠습니다. 
جيميني 4، جراح RKV. هل يمكنك رفع مستوى ال
잭, 그들은 지금 당장은 정확한 수치를 밝히기를 꺼려하는데, 탱크가 나중에 따뜻해지면 체감 소
阿
Ok, Jack. Vogliamo impostare le valvole di CONTROLLO DE
알겠습니다. 방향 테스트에서 - 수동 레버를 만졌고, 시계도 만졌습니다. 시계판 바로 위, 시계판과 요(yaw) 표시기 사이 10시 30분쯤에 있는 리벳을 만졌습니다. 비상
Jim, potresti darci il bit ra
알겠습니다. 이번 근접 비행은 어제 드린 근접 비행의 업데이트 버전이므로
우리가 이쪽 방향을 바라보고 있는 동안, 측면 창문으로 태양이 지나가는 것을 볼 수 있고, 물론 
Fred, je voulais juste vous prévenir que le niveau de CO2 de la cartouche secondaire approche de la limite critique et que nous devrions l'atteindre d'ici une demi-heure environ. À ce moment-là, nous vous demanderons de passer aux cartouches du 
2번 수치는 3050이고 1번 수치는 -3000에서 2990까지 떨어졌습니다. 그래서 실제로 오버
Oui, c'es
はい。酸素圧は92
我已经
弗雷德，那可能是数据上的一个小插曲。现在比率已经恢复正
हां, इसमें कु
Friendship Seven, this is Indian Cap Com. We read 95° on auto fuel temp, 95° on manual fuel temp. S
D'accord, Jack. On vous reprend, et j'espère que vous avez bien noté ma correction. Je parle des réservoirs cryogéniques H2. On souhaite que le chauffage du réservoir 1 soit éteint et celui du réservoir 2 en mo
À chaque fois qu'il fait ça, on a le cœur qui bat la chamade. Et Jack, s
روجر. هل يمكنك التأكد من أن مفتاح مسار النطاق S في وضع REACQ؟ لقد فقدنا الاتصال 
Wir haben bereits mit 
D'accord. C'était parfait
了解。
저기 어댑터, 그러니까 레트로 어댑터가 나가
아폴로 8호, 현재 데
알겠습니다. 1분 전에 "MASTER ARM, ON"을 지우세요. 35초 전에는 처음 두 줄을 지우세요. 10초 전에는 "Minus 9 seconds"로 바꾸세요. 그러면 "Minus 9
巴兹，你的口袋
Хорошо. Первый пример, который я вам дам, — это манев
Roger, Neil. Under col
حسنًا يا جيم. بما أن تغيير الهوائي 
13, nous avons encore quelque chose pour vous, quand vous aurez un moment. Nous aimerions que vous remuiez vos réservoirs cryogéniques. De plus, j'ai un arbre
Нам нужны только показания, указанные на странице 3-13 плана полета: показания бат
前进
水瓶座，
حسنًا، الموعد النهائي الاسمي هو الساعة 06:02؛ نتوقع أن يكون الموعد النهائي حوالي
자, 잭. 다음 단계는 바이패스 구멍을 막는 겁니다. 이 구멍은 용기 바닥 중앙에 있는 구멍이에요. 바이패스를 막는 이유는 공기가 새어 나가지 않도록 하기 위해서입니다. 그
Предлагаю пока вы этим занимаетесь, сделать вот это; пусть всё автоматически
Ich
收到。继续报告。舱压5.5，保持良好。舱内空气温度95华氏度；相对湿度20%；冷却剂用量67%；宇航服温度67华氏度；压力5.8；蒸汽温度50华氏度，正在缓慢下降。氧气浓度70-100%；电流22安培。除了故障之外，目前唯一异常的情况是太空舱周围
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। यदि आप जाकर स्वीक
जीरो जी सेंटा का एहसास अद्भुत है। यह पहली बार है जब मैंने
飛行計画の最新情報をお知らせします。地上経過時間は 19 時間から 22 時間
I caught about a 15-minute nap b
... finita. Okay. 5000, 100 piedi al secondo vanno bene, e ora
Хорошо, Фред. Мы рекомендуем вам включить главный автоматический выключатель сигнализации, чтобы у вас была звуковая и в
Hey, Mike, you transmitt
亨茨
Roger, vorrei darti il ​​tuo tem
هذا غير صحيح يا مايك. إذا نظرت إلى الرسم البياني، الذي سنحتفظ به لك لتطلع عليه بعد الرحلة، ستجد أنه بدأ فورًا مع أول دورة، ثم امتد بشكل حلزوني إلى حوالي 20 درجة في زاوية الميل، وبعدها بدا وكأنه يُهيئ مسارًا حلزونيًا حول نقطة انحراف في زاوية الميل حوالي 20 درجة عن 90 درجة؛ لكننا لم نرد المخاطرة باحتمالية استقراره عند تلك النقطة. ظننا أنه قد ينحرف، لذا اتصلنا بك وبدأنا من ج
Ok
Sie verstehen, dass Ihre Kapsel-Zeit im Vergleich zu GET et
रॉजर। फ्रैंक, मुझे यहाँ कोई शिकायत नहीं मि
收到。那霸救援1号将在溅落时抵达现场，配备跳伞员和救生圈。梅森号驱逐舰将在溅落后约3小时抵达。另外
Okay, Jack. 
好的，乔。我理解，74小时后我们要在2号定位点进行太阳检查，这需要将交会雷达移开。我们会使用自动机动到达那里，或者至少使用自动机动的角度。如果这次检查的误差在1度以内，就说明平台可以进行这次机动，不需要后续检查。但即使没问题，你也会给我们一个星点，供我们在黑暗中进行检
Profitez-en pour consulter le plan de vol
Très bien. J'ai remarqué que le réticule de lacet fonctionne très bien. Je l'ai utilisé pour traverser les 
О
ठीक है। यह 9, /: 45597, माइनस 040, प्लस 157, प्लस 34188, माइनस 01353, प्लस 00780 180 008 001, नवंबर अल्फ़ा, प्लस 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, नीचे 131, बाएँ 28, प्लस 0758, माइनस 16500 12987 36277; प्राथमिक तारा सीरियस, द्वितीयक रिगेल, 129 155 010; चार क्वाड, 15 सेकंड, उलेज, क्षितिज 1.2-डिग्री विंडो लाइन पर T माइनस 3 पर; माइनस माइक अल्फ़ा के साथ उच्च गति प्रक्रिया का उपयोग करें। आपके पिछले बर्न से बर्न जानकारी देखने के बाद, ऐसा लगता है कि इंजन का प्रदर्शन हमें 3 सेकंड का बर्न समय देगा, जो आपके पास मौजूद समय से अधिक है। यह संख्या कंप्यूटर से प्राप्त होने व
로저. 페리신시안 플러스 2, 빠른 반환, / 61503, 마이너스 15
जी हां, मुझे माफ करना, इन्हें बंद कर दीजिए। OAMS पावर एटीट्यूड थ्रस्टर्स दोनों ठीक हैं। A का रीडिंग 3000 है। B का रीडिंग लगभग 2700 है। दोनों में तापम
अरे वाह, हम तो चांद के काफी करीब प
わかりました。ご都合の良い時にいつでもデータを記録できるよう待機しています。角度については2分後にお知らせします
トムもチェ
I am definitely canted over pretty far, but there seems to be no water 
翻
好的。在确认主总线电压连接电源后，我想断开主总线
13, Houston. Dovremo farti spiegare la procedura di spegnimento della cella a combustibile 1. La pressione dell'O2 sta diminuendo, come hai notato, e la temperatura lo conferma. Hai ricevuto
알겠습니다. 전원을 차단하겠습니다.
Apollo 11, Houston. Je relisais justement quelques transcriptions de la session d'aujourd'hui concernant cette tentative.
Okay.
«Аполлон-8», Хьюс
Думаю, да, Кен. Эта полоса параллельна линии М, и я думаю, это как-то связано с конструкцией оптики, где у нас есть этот вал или прямоугольный вход оптики снаружи. При этом конкретном угле наклона Солнца она пересекает его. Я заметил, что и Земля, и Солнце делают это со сканирующим телескопом. В секстанте та же световая полоса присутствует, хотя она покрывает все поле зрения секстанта. Однако увеличение позволяет довольно хорошо рассмотреть звезды, и на ней можно сделать пометки. Но идентификация звезд с помощью сканирующего телескопа очень сложна. Я обнаружил, что оптика лучше всего работает в положениях, которые позволяют увидеть созвездия Большой Пёс и Орион в сканирующем телескопе. В этом конкретном положении космического аппарата полоса исчезает; мы находимся в положении, когда Солнце позади нас, и я вижу довольно много звезд. Вчера, после адаптации к темноте, я смог увидеть довольно много звёзд вокруг созвездия Кассиопеи, чего поначалу не мог. Но сейчас эта полоса не позволяет увидеть ничего, кроме Арктура, 
Aspetta. Dovrò provare a prendergli in prestito il
Roger. Eh bien, ils étaient avec 
كان لونه أبيض في الغالب، وربما مسحة صفراء خفيفة؛ وبدا لي - كما أتذكر - أن خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار كان باتجاه الأفق، ويبدو أنه يقع على مسافة تتراوح بين ربع وثلث المسافة من الأفق المقابل. أي ما يعادل ثلث إلى ربع نصف قطر الأرض. انتهى
Да, все предохранители по-прежнему находятся в том же положении, Гордо. Я ничего из этого не менял. Пиротехнический взвод активирован, автоматическое реверсивное управление выключено. У меня включено электронное управление, автоматический режим и нормальный режим работы гироскопа. Все Т-образные рукоятки выдвинуты. Панель управления работает нормально, за исключением посадочного мешка, который находится в выключенном положении. Индикаторы положения в пространстве ведут себя довольно нестабильно, иногда они очень быстро смещаются. Особенно когда я выполняю маневр, а затем возвращаюсь 
Le coucher de soleil est vraiment saisissant, je ne pense pas avoir besoin de m'attarder à l'admirer. C'est fascinant. L'autre chose, c'est le noir absolu quand on n'est pas habitué. Je distingue nettement un revêtement sur la vitre. Je retourne en mode VOX sur UHF haute fréquence pour transmettre. J'ouvre la visière pour nettoyer le micro droit. Je l'ai léché. Je referme la visière. Elle a été immédiatement scellée pour que le circuit de ma combinaison puisse fonctionner. Je ne veux plus avoir de problème avec ça. L'entrée d'air de la combinaison se maintient bien à environ 68 degrés. Je vais donc remonter le dôme. Il est maintenant à 76, 75. Apparemment, ce réglage plus élevé est celui qu'il nous faut. Je pense que je vais encore augmenter d'un demi-cran et on aura peut-être trouvé la bonne température. Il commence en
Roger, Friendship Se
Oui. Hé, écoute. Peux-tu me dir
Ja, und ich wünschte wirklich
You've don
لا بأ
はい、マイク。予定通りの時間ですね。もう少しREVを上げることも考えましたが、バーンしてしまったのでこの
Von mir aus gern;
I'm opening the viso
Keep looking through the periscope, t
伙计，你绝对不能错过那些检查点——那些响
コピーす
Хорошо, 13. Мы хотим, чтоб
Je disais simplement que nous avons pris une superbe p
是的。它们是一
Хорошо, Джек. Давайте обсудим, как я буду определять положение аппарата, а затем выполнять маневры. Я говорю о методах управления. Сейчас я пытаюсь остановить космический аппарат по рысканию, когда Земля находится за окном, затем мы переходим в режим наведения или управления; мы будем находиться в режиме управления по рысканию. Затем мы будем использовать его для управления тангажом
I thought it went pretty well, Houston, although I expect I used more gas than I've been using in the simulator. The turnaround maneuver - I went PITCH ACCEL COMMAND and started to pitch up, and then when I put MANUAL ATTITUDE PITCH back to RATE COMMAND for some reason it - it stopped its pitch rate, and I had to go back to ACCEL COMMAND and hit what I
Okay, at your convenience we'd like you to run a cabin temp survey and just record it in your log book for post-flight. We'd like the cabin's ambie
还有一件事，你可以找人看
ठीक है। और इसका मतलब है कि सुरंग में निरपेक्ष दबाव 1.5 
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हम एएफटी ओम्नी से संपर्क करना चाहते हैं, और ट्रैक
Roger. Il sistema di controllo fly-by-wire è
Oops! The
알겠습니다. 다시 듣기 내용은 맞지만, 다시
Roger. Understand for my retrosequence for end-of-
また、時々太陽の角度を変えて星が見えるかどうか見
That's right, Jim. It would be good to see what you are doing down in the or the far corner of the spacecraft where the optics are. Might be interesting to
Pulse
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다
روجر. لاحظتُ تذبذبًا في متطلبات تشغيل وإيقاف سخان RCS. كانت القراءة الأولى 47، وشغّلتُ السخان، فأصبحت درجة حرارة الضوء 54. كان ذلك في الحلقة
अपोलो 11 को हाई ग
알았어, 마이크. 나
ठीक है। बाईस डिग्री, और ऐसा लगता है कि हमने आगामी आग लग
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. يؤسفنا قول ذلك، لكننا نرغب في إنهاء هذه العملية والبدء من جديد. ليس لدينا أي ضمانات بأننا سنتمكن م
这是
Sto lavorando con il pulsante sul pannello, adesso. Ora con il pulsante sulla
알겠습니다. 그럼 서비스 모듈의 산소 공급
Okay. Ich nehme an, Sie h
Ancora in assetto relativament
では、設定に
ピート、とても遅い
休斯顿的朋友们，大家好，这里是双子座六号，为您带来水、食物和睡眠报告
يا إلهي، الأمور تسير على نحو أفضل بكثير مما تو
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. На этой звезде автоматический режим работает отли
Здравствуйте, Техас, это «Дружба 
罗杰，11。能不能暂缓燃料电池的清洗
알겠습니다. 라디에이터는 운행 내내 FLOW 모드였습니다. UHF 무전기는 운행 내내 2번 모드였습니다. 이상입
Okay. Die Gewässer sind alle königsblau; die Wolken leuchten natürlich strahlend weiß; die Reflexion des Lichts von der Erde ist deutlich stärker als die des Mondes. Die Landflächen haben im Allgemeinen eine bräunliche Textur – von dunkelbraun bis hellbraun. Man kann viele Wolkenwirbel der verschiedenen Wetterzellen erkennen. Ein langes Band aus Zirruswolken erstreckt sich vom Eingang des Golfs von Mexiko quer über den Atlantik. Die Nord-Süd-Grenze verläuft derzeit durch den Atlantik. Die Südhalbkugel ist fast vollständig bewölkt, und auch in der
خمس كرات، بالإضافة إلى 0.0، وأسميها 0.8، كانت عالقة عند 0.7 لفترة، ثم أصبحت صفرًا وانخفضت. كنت سأعطيها - كانت منخفضة بمقدار 0.1 - بالإضافة إلى 0.1. الآن هي عند الصفر، يا إلهي. لا أستطيع قراءة تلك القيم المتبقية؛ إنها تت
Первы
十
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Нам бы хотелось получить приблизительное описание вашего маневра для использования в данных отслеживания эфеме
休斯顿
Non, ne 
That's affirmative, if you'll take out your contingency boo
ईगल, कोलंबिया। आपके उ
好的。我们从2点56分37秒开始进行单引擎姿态机动。4分钟后，单引擎姿态
Okay. Riceviamo quanto scritto e ti dobbiamo una risposta alla tua ultima dom
了解。コピーして。それでは、船内の表示は、Dが69、Cが73、Dは…もう一度やり直
Roger, 11 ans. Nous avons une nouvelle perspective sur l'observation concernant la 
Семь
Affermativo, Jim. Dopo esserti orientato nell'assetto che vuoi raggiungere, traccia una linea che è... una linea che parte dall'asse del corpo e che è 400 più 5. Quando premi ENTER, questo 
Roger. Understand in COMMAND position. Also would like to know wh
روجر، هيوستن. -11، /: 45597، -040، +157، +36325، -01727، +01428 180 003 000، غير قابل للتطبيق، +00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254؛ دلتا العقرب،
아폴로 11
Sigma Seven Sigma Seven, this is Watertown Cap Com on HF. If you read, go to UHF, go to UHF, 
네. 30페이지 왼쪽 여백에 있는 시간 부분, 그러니까 왼쪽 여백에 있는 "127:1
로저, 잭, 저는 톰입니다. 오늘 데이터 관련 우선순위 작업이 좀 있어서 회의를 할 예정인데, 나중에 유용한 절차들을 알려드리려고 
ठीक है, चार्ली। क्रू स्टेटस 
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。もし2番線でヘッドアップをする
Это «Дружба Семь». Она ослепительно светит в прицел на чистом изображении. Она начала подниматься как раз в тот момент, когда я показал вам эту отметку; я собираюсь использова
«Апо
Ok. Ora sto usando la luna che è alla mia sinistra, ed è un'ottima soluzione. Ora vado avanti e copro l'indicatore di assetto e potete osservare l'imbardata. Ora svuoto i giroscopi, cercando di selezionare il fly-by-wire basso. Metterò prima la luna al centro della finestra, mantenendo rollio e beccheggio, e poi rimetterò la luna al suo posto. La luna si sta avvicinando al centro della finestra a questo punto. Ok, la fermo lì e inseriamo il controllo del rollio per bilanciarlo. Ok, a questo punto, otterrò 0 rollio. Ho sorpassato la luna e sto rilevando il pianeta Mercurio, che è bello luminoso, ed è un po' troppo a destra. Ora controlliamo e vediamo quanti gradi abbiamo qui in imbardata. Circa 20, il che è sufficiente per un controllo quantit
ما زلتُ غير متأكد تمامًا من تفعيل الدائرة الثانوية. ذكرتَ أنه يجب تعطيلها بعد ساعة أو خمس دقائق من بدء تشغيل المبخر الرئيسي. تشير قائمة التحقق الخاصة بي إلى أن المبخر الرئيسي لن يبدأ التشغيل على
D'accord, surtout ne l'appelez pas le frigo. D'accord. Aux alentours de -19 °C, on revient à la liste de contrôle d'entrée standard à la page 2-2, où 
Tu as tou
Хор
Роджер. Из новостной ленты отдела по связям с общественностью: «Аполлон-11» по-прежнему доминирует в новостях по всему миру. Только четыре страны — коммунистический Китай, Северная Корея, Северный Вьетнам и Албания — еще не сообщили своим гражданам о вашем полете и высадке на Луну. Один журналист сказал, что у него закончились слова, чтобы описать ваш успех. Сегодня вечером президент Никсон планирует посмотреть бейсбольный матч всех звезд в Вашингтоне. После игры он отправится в район поиска и спасения в Тихом океане. В среду вечером он вылетит с острова Джонстон на вертолете на военно-морской корабль связи «Арлингтон». Затем в четверг утром он снова сядет в вертолет и полетит на «Хорнет» как раз вовремя, чтобы стать свидетелем вашего приводнения. Президента будут сопровождать государственный секретарь Уильям Роджерс и Фрэнк Борман. Они будут наблюдать за приводнением с мостика спасательного корабля вместе с адмиралом Джоном Сидни Маккейном-младшим, командующим Тихоокеанскими силами. После пребывания на борту «Хорнета» президент отправится в турне по Азии и запланированный визит в Румынию. Предполагается, что вчера «Луна-15» упала в Море Кризисов после 52 витков вокруг Луны. Советское информационное агентство ТАСС сообщило о проведении «научных» «исследований в окололунное пространство». Сэр Бернард Ловелл из обсерватории Джодрелл-Бэнк заявил, что «Луна-15» врезалась в поверхность Луны со скоростью около 300 миль в час. В последнее время во Вьетнаме относительно спокойно. Было замечено, что американские солдаты, патрулировавшие территорию, несли транзисторные радиоприемники, настроенные на ваш рейс. Радио- и телесеть Вооруженных сил Вьетнама обеспечила полное освещение миссии. Столкновения между египтянами и израильтянами вдоль Суэцкого канала продолжаются. Наблюдатели ООН пытаются остановить их. В Вашингтоне Комитет по бюджету и налогообложению Палаты представителей проголосовал за сокращение квоты на истощение запасов нефти с 27,5% до 20%. В районе Хьюстона несколько раз шли дожди. Сегодня облачно, ожидаются новые ливни. Что касается спорта, как мы уже упоминали, сегодня вечером состоится Матч всех звёзд. Вчера игр не было. Вчера вечером в Нью-Йорке Ассоциация бейсбольных журналистов Америки назвала Бейба Рута величайшим бейсболистом всех времён. Джо Димаджио был назван величайшим из ныне живущих бейсболистов. Фрэнк Борман сделал эти объявления на ужине в честь игроков. Джо Намат провёл полный день в тренировочном лагере «Нью-Йорк Джетс». Пяти полицейским с трудом удалось сдержать около 500 детей, которые хотели потрогать «Бродвейского Джо». Он сказал, что чувствует себя хорошо и сыграет в Матче всех зв
تستمر الرحلة، ويزداد الازدحام، وتدور الطائرات ببطء، وكل شيء يبدو على ما يرام. من خلال المنظار أستطيع رؤية الأر
और, ह्यूस्टन, कार्यक्रम की 
Хорошо, Том. Ты всё понял, и вот что мы хотели бы, чтобы ты сделал 
Roger. Für Bill: Die Sprachqualität auf der Rückseite ist extrem schlecht. Wir halten sie für unbrauchbar und empfehlen, alle relevanten Kommentare handschriftlich aufzunehmen, damit sie nicht verloren gehen. Wir sollten nicht damit rechnen, das Band mit 
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。コンピューターが不要であれば、地上からB-Dアンテナの切り替えができる
Хорошо, Джо. Я начал примерно так. Мы загрузили векторы планеты — или кометы Беннета — в опцию «планета» и о
The attitude of the sun was about 40° above the nose. 
الهدوء. حسناً. هذا مناسب لنا، ونفترض أن الأسطوانة الرئيسية لا تزال على متن السفي
حس
हाँ। बस इतना
私は今、地平線に降りてきています。空気の輝きがはっきりと 2 つの層に分かれているのが見えます。1 つは上部がかなり厚く、そこを星
Si
حسنًا. أولًا، تشير خطة الطيران إلى أن CDR يجب أن ينام. ثانيًا، ملخص لرحلة الهبوط. جميع أنظمتك تعمل بشكل سليم. يُظهر المسار أن لديك نقطة اقتراب قريبة (CPA) عند مسافة 69.67 ميلًا، ووقت الحضيض هو 11. لديك نقطة عودة حرة جيدة. من المبكر بعض الشيء تقييم المسار بشكل كامل للتحكم في الممر. لن يكون لديك أي تحديث لبيانات الكتلة +11. بعد مراجعة المنحنيات، يبدو أن ضغط تهوية البطاري
자
الجوزاء السادس، قائد الأراضي 
नहीं। मुझे किसी बात की परवाह नहीं है - खैर, अगर यह परेशान करने वाला है तो मुझे लेने दो - अगर ऐसा है तो मैं इसे ले सकता हूँ... स्टार चेक... मुझे पर
جيميني 4، هيوستن. هل يمكنك إخبارنا إن ك
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. We have your temperature. You can start your blood pressure and stand by for our Surgeo
罗杰，查理。我想向你们汇报一下我们的氯化消毒情况。在B4隔间，我
حسنًا يا فريدو. في الصفحة ١٢، نريد التحديثات. لدينا بعض المتجهات ولوحة تحكم. وعندما تصل إلى تلك المرحلة، سنخبرك متى نريد إرسال الإشارة. حسنًا. ضمن "التفعيل والاختبار الذاتي"، نفّذ الإجراء بالكامل. في الصفحة ١٣، ضمن "محاذاة نظام
Qui è Friendship Seven. Ti ho sentito bene, Indian Com Tech. Qui è Friendship Seven. Al momento sono in modalità manuale. Ho 
سبعة، هذه كيب. الطقس في منطقة التعافي ممتاز، أمو
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 중앙 패널의 A 표시기를 보고 있습니다. 패키지 온도는 약 180도이고, 헬륨 압력은 3900입니다. 연료 압력은 약 180이고, 연료 잔량은 약 85% 정도입니다. B 표시기도 거의 비슷하지만, 패키지 압력은 190도입니다. C 쿼드도 패
Хор
Apollo 13, Houston. J'ai le Plus 90 et les supports Lift-Off Plus 8 quand v
सेवन, यह कैलिफोर्निया है। अब हम आपको खो रहे हैं। केप के लिए त
Roger, Jim. We're trying to improve our 
Okay. Weiter geht es mit den Bildern des Kommandomoduls. Das Servicemodu
阿波罗8号，
بدأت السماء تُظلم تمامًا عند الساعة 01:30. مستو
حسنًا. بعد الرقم 1، في السطر الأول، اشطب "وVHF-A". في السطر الثاني، اشطب "تشغيل SIMPLEX". في السطر الثالث،
ليس الأمر بالغ الأهمية، إنها مجرد طريقة عمل. لقد قارنتُ عمليات فحص الانحراف الليلي فوق موتشيا ووميرا، وأنا راض
هذا تغيير 
Negativo, mi hai appena becca
Houston, ici Apollo… à bord de l’Eagle – Apollo 11 à bord de l’Eagle. J’ai… notre 
Я нигд
ロジャー、フランク。地図更新：1/2、変更なし。2/3は次の通り。コメ
Ich hatte auf dieser Uplink-Verbindung einen Akkustand
Okay, Jim. Wir haben es geklärt, und es stimmt so, wie wir es dir beim ersten Mal gegeben haben. Also, R1 27100, u
Ich würde all diese nützlichen Informationen gerne gegen die genauen Mengenangaben eintauschen. Geben Sie uns eine Minute, Mike, dann tragen wir sie gleic
夕焼けはなかなか印象的だ。眺めるのに時間を無駄にする必要はないと思う。とても興味深い。もう一つ魅力的なのは、目が慣れていないと黒く見えることだ。窓に確かにコーティングが見える。この時点で VOX に戻って UHF-hi で送信する。バイザーを開けて右のマイクを拭く。舐めてしまった。バイザーを閉じる。スーツの回路が機能するようにバイザーはすぐに密閉された。またそれで汚れたくない。スーツの吸気口
क्या बिल को अपने टेप रिकॉर्डर से खेलने के अलावा
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम
Ok, vedo Mercurio attraversare il bagliore dell'aria. Vedremo se regge. Quando ho detto "Vedo", è stato l'inizio. MARK,T il primo cambia
Roger. From the hot wires of the Public Affairs Office: Apollo 11 still dominates the news around the world. Only four nations, Communist China, North Korea, North Viet Nam, and Albania, have not yet informed their citizens of your flight and landing on the Moon. One newsman said that he has run out of ways to describe your success. Tonight, President Nixon is scheduled to watch the All Star baseball game in Washington. After the game, he will depart for the Pacific recovery area. Wednesday evening, he will fly from Johnston Island by helicopter to the Navy communications ship Arlington. Then on Thursday morning, he will reboard the helicopter and fly to the Hornet in time to witness your splashdown. Accompanying the President will be Secretary of State William Rogers and Frank Borman. They will watch the splashdown from the bridge of the recovery ship with Admiral John Sidney McCain, Jr, Commander of the Pacific Forces. Following the President's stay aboard the Hornet, he will depart for his tour of Asia and scheduled visit to Romania. Luna 15 is believed to have crashed into the Sea of Crises yesterday after orbiting the Moon 52 times. The Soviet News Agency TASS reported that "scientific" "research in near Moon space was carried out." Sir Bernard Lovell at Jodrell Bank Observatory said that Luna 15 hit the surface of the Moon at a speed of about 300 miles per hour. Things have been relatively quiet recently in Viet Nam. GI's on patrol were observed carrying transistor rad
Sì, grazie. Se ti è
好的，杰克。他们
फिर
Примерно в 
Okay. Wir führen hier einige Kommunikationsprüfungen durc
了解。アポロ11
好的，比尔。我想就上次关于使用机载状态向量进行第 4 步操作的说法做个补充说明。经过地面进一步观察，他们必须开始进行相关计算，与其拖延或重复工作，
Роджер, 11. У тебя тут небольшие помехи, Нил. Твои сигналы громкие, но иногда прерываются. С земли твой космический аппарат выглядит нормально. Мы заметили, что ты шевелишься в кабине, и р
बहुत बढ़िया। जैसा कि आप जानते होंगे, मैं हाई-हाई और डाइप
- - अपडेट लिंक, डीयूए ब्रेक
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
인코더를 다
Ich glaube, Buzz hat wahrscheinlich recht. Tatsächlich habe ich einmal eine Markierung gesetzt, die mir etwas fehlerhaft vorkam, aber ich dachte: „Na ja, was soll’s. Ich probiere es trotzdem mal aus“, und bekam fünf Nullen. Und 
Okay. We 
Хорошо. Первой звездой будет 26, и мы проведем два набора измерений: на ближнем горизонте Земли, используя звезду 26. Затем мы хотели бы провести еще один набор измерений на звезде 16, используя дальний горизонт Земли. Если окажется, что измерения на ближнем горизонте Земли на звезде 26 невозможны, то мы хотели бы провести один набор измерений на дальнем горизонте Земли на звезде 16, а друг
Roger, 11. Ti consigliamo di accendere manualmente le ventole 
حسنًا. لا داعي للعجلة في ذلك. كنت
هل كل شيء جاهز؟ سأعيده إلى هن
रॉजर। जी हाँ, बिल्कुल। स
Ok. Vuoi a
ठीक है। क्या आप 275 पर वापस जाने
... But I think becaus
روجر
गुआयमास, जेमिनी 4. सभी स्विच और सर्किट ब्रेकर चालू हैं। आपको यह मिल जाना च
Роджер. Время ввода в эксплуата
了解。
D'accord
D'accord, 
Roger, Jack. The latitude 
조종사는 휴식 시간이 예정되어 있습니다. 당신은 언제 주무실 계획인가요
هذا صحيح يا جاك. لدينا الآن إجراءات مفصلة على شكل قائمة مرا
حسنًا. شكرًا لك. نأمل أن نتمكن، عند تشغيل وحدة التحكم غ
Okay, Jack. Wir werden jetzt einen festen Wach- und Schlafrhythmus einführen. Fred war lange wach, deshalb bin ich etwas früher aufgestanden, um ihn abzulösen. Jack und Fred schlafen jetzt, also lasse ich sie so lange schlafen, wie sie können. Danach essen wir etwas, und dann gehe ich noch mal kurz ins Bett. So teilen wir 
Houston, Columbia. Commento. Ha funzionato benissimo. Il cratere che ho segnato è un piccolo cratere all'interno del crat
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। आपकी व्ह
알겠습니다. 숫자 2가 보이네요. 만약 그렇다면, 왜 피치가 175인지 이
RCS 전원 A 및 B-ACME
嗯，我在想过去十个小时发生的事。我们的宇航服压
わかりました。パネル2で、「UP TELEMETRY,,」を押して
我刚拍了一张照片。这是康泰克斯相机（Contarex）拍摄的第14张照片，用的还是我们舱外活动时用的那套胶卷。照片里
... मैंने इसे छोटे सिरे के ऊपर देखा, जो मुझे लगता 
Nein, das tu
Roger. You're beautiful in this mode, Buzz. We're reading you five by. Coming with a short count and we'd like one back from you. 1, 2, 3
友谊七号，友谊七号，这里是德州通信技术大学。你
Okay
هي
आपको बोलते समय बटन दबाना होगा और फि
D'accord. La dernière partie de l'étape 7 
Oui, absolument, Bill. Ils peuvent vous fournir n'impor
这里的地平线非常非常清晰。天空漆黑一片，地球——或者更确切地说，是月亮——显得格外明亮；天月之间的对比鲜明，形成一条清晰的暗线。现在，镜头中出现了一些有趣的古老双环陨石坑，这些有趣的地貌在月海区域很常见，它们都被与月海物质成分和颜色相同的物质填充。这里展示了其中三四个有趣的地貌。再往远处看，地平线上……眼前的山脉布满了无数的陨石坑，在许多较大的陨石坑中，
Здесь указано значение 1/200 и f
ロジャー、ブルース。あり
Roger. For the Height-Adjust that's, ; Delta-V, 14.0; duration, 0 plus 24; yaw 180 degrees, pitch 0; Core 25
それはすごい
Oh, great sport. Understand some suds are on 
रॉजर। यकीन मानिए या
罗杰。我们希望你去睡觉。至少睡
Valvole 
我估计是12个小时。差不多
Gemini
Nous avons un chronomètre pour la manœuvre de lacet, si vous ê
네. 설치 완료, 잠금 설정 완료, 그리고 완전히 
Die Oberfläche ist fein und pudrig. Ich kann sie mit dem Zeh locker aufnehmen. Sie haftet in feinen Schichten wie Holzkohlepulver an Sohle und Seiten meiner Stiefel. Ich gehe nur ein klei
좋아요. 이제
風速は毎秒22
कैस
रॉजर। हमें बत्ती मिल गई। पिछली बार यह बुझी हुई थी; शायद इसीलिए
好的，杰克。我本来没打算重置那个四路查理的 DROP ISOL 阀。你想让我重置吗？好的。我们刚才试了一下，四路阿尔法和
मुझे अभी-अभी दक्षिणी क्रॉस, अल्फा और बीटा सेंटौर
그래, 이 컴퓨터에 있는 그 빌어먹을 "1" 말이야. 트러니언 각도, 거기 있어. 델타-V, 거기 있고, 각도, 거기 있어. 아마 여기에도 뭔가 있을 텐데, 무슨 용도인지는 모르겠지만, 어쨌든 여기, 여기, 여기, 그리
हिंद महासागर का जहाज, ह
休斯顿静谧基地。我们已经收集
是的，我同意，查
收到。我们已收到
Roger, Buzz. Dans la c
Роджер. В Вашингтоне финансовый комитет Сената одобрил продление действия дополнительного подоходного налога, но голосование в Сенате по этому законопроекту пока кажется маловероятным. В Остине представитель штата Рэй Леммон из Хьюстона был выдвинут на должность национального директора Американского общества океанографии. Леммон предложил изучить возможность создания института океанографии в Техасе. Это был бы первый подобный институт в западной части Мексиканского залива. В Миннеаполисе, штат Миннесота, метеорологическое бюро, после подведения итогов сегодняшней погоды, показав максимальную температуру 88 градусов и минимальную 72, отметило: «снегопада нет». Из Сент-Петербурга, штат Флорида, поступило радиосообщение от норвежского исследователя Тора Хейердала, который сообщил, что экипаж его папирусного судна «Ра» прибудет в Бриджтаун, Барбадос, несмотря на повреждения от сильного шторма. Однако экипаж будет ночевать на борту сопровождающего судна. Норман Бейкер, штурман экспедиции, сообщил, что сегод
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 통신 잡음이 이제 잠잠해진 ​​것 같네요. 아마 새 안테나가 시
Le batterie principali indicano 9
好的，阿波罗8号。我们已经检查了你们所有的系统。一切正常。我们想在你们到达另一端后立即做的一件事是：a. 我们正在检查你们的氦气压力。我们将对比同一位置的最近一次和前一次的
로저
收到。面板 16，第 2 行，STAB 控制 ATCA，也就是 A 
Houston, Apollo 8. We are now charging batt
OK. Attitude de brûlage pour la télévision, votre tangage et 
校准断路器，断开。录音机控
D'accord. Votre consommation d'oxygène au cours des dernière
자, 짐. 기체의 자세를 좀 더 가파르게 조정한 후, 400+
We're putting together a load for you now, Frank; that's the reason for the delay. We just want to make sure we don't overlook anythi
Игл, это Хьюстон. Мы потеряли всю связь и передачу данных с Columbia. Не могли бы вы проверить, не пытается ли он заснуть? Ко
166 - und mal seh
Vo
我安装了防溅帘和颈部挡板，舱内空气循环手柄向上。左侧呼吸管手柄向上，舱内通风手柄向上。舱门释放扳机处于关闭状态。确认水封已向下并关闭。系好安全绳，打开左侧舱门。将指挥官飞行员的救生装备收纳到飞船右侧。整个回收环……都在飞船右侧。你要
I was looking for it but I couldn't pick it out. I didn't see it. Say, if I could have spe
아침 식사는 언제나처럼 훌륭했어요. 복숭아 슬라이스, 소시지 패티, 커피 두
لا أعرف. من طر
I definitely can see a right roll at 
Roger, understand, at hours 18 to 22. On Rev 12 over RKV I will be updated with my PLA and CLA. Rev 13 over Canary will have a C-band t
Et, Aquarius, Houston. Nous commençons à nous préoccuper de l'accumulation de CO2 dans le module de commande. Nous avons donc une recommandation: il vous est conseillé de boucher le tuyau de retour
알겠습니다. 10페이지에 있는 유일한 항목은 착륙 장치
아쿠아리
मुझे नहीं लगता कि वे तुम्हें सुन सकते हैं, माइक,
अपोलो 8, ह्
Ещё одна просьба: просим вас проверить вашу конфигурацию с высок
はい、すべてプラス9
Sì, certo. Tuttavia, il cibo si è sbriciolato parecchio; e non voglio più aprire la confezione per paura di ritrovarmi con le briciole sparse ovunque nella capsula. Posso confermare che mangiare cibo in formato bocconcino, come quello che abbiamo preparato per questo volo, non è affatto un 
रॉजर। डॉव जोन्स इंडस्ट्रियल्स के संदर्भ में, मंगलवार 15 तारीख की दोपहर को बाजार बंद होने से लेकर आज दोपहर लगभग 1:05 बजे (ह्यूस्टन समय) तक, इसमें कुल मिलाकर गिरावट आई है; यानी औद्योगिक औसत में 6 अंक की कमी आई है। आज बाजार खुलने के बाद से अब तक, डॉव जोन्स इंडस्ट्रियल औसत में 11.05 अंकों की गिरावट आई है, जबकि खुलने के तुरंत बाद इसमें 1.2 अंक
Okay. Ich g
Okay. Well, that takes care of the questions from our geologists for tonight, a
We're lookin
아니요, 그건 틀렸어요, 프레드. 우리가 하려
Ti abbiamo ricevuto con un va
Okay, Jim. Ihre Werte sind wieder gut, also können wir mit dem Rest des Vorgangs fortfahren. Bitte dr
हाँ, है। लेकिन यह आपके सूट से नहीं टकरा रहा है। इसे एक
И теперь оно действит
यह सही है। पृष्ठ 1-9 पर जाएं और पैनल 100 पर, पहले चार को छोड
キャンプに参加していた子供たちでさえ、マイク・ジュニアが「お父さんは歴史に名を残すことになる
Wir haben uns das auch schon angesehen. Aus irgendeinem Grund driftet die Nickachse stärker ab als die Gierachse. Ich wollte schon fast nochmal hin. Ich musste schon einmal zurü
ठीक है। जब तक आपको वर्तमान एम्पीयर से 10 एम्पीयर कम न मिल जाए,
휴스턴 트랭퀼리티 기지. 생각해 봤습니다. 지원하겠습니다. 그때 시작
優しい衝撃だった。
好的。在最终存放
わかりました。プライマリーグ
我们现在准
Vance，你可能会感兴趣——我们是这样安排的：我们把一个头盔连接到连接软管的通信线路上，值班人
Джек, не могли бы вы предоставить нам данные по батарее B и то
Okay. This is your friendly do-it-yourself-kit COMM with a suggested procedure in the lithium hydroxide situation. You're looking good. We read 1.8 millimeters, and you do have sufficient... to last you the rest of the flight. However, being on the conservative side, we would like to use one more set of 
好的，Gemini VI。请将“数量读取”开关拨到“ECS O2”位置好吗
रॉजर
Хорошо. У меня хороший радар; я просто т
Ora inizio a vedere l'alba nel periscopio. La prima luce nel periscopio durante questa particolare orbita è dovuta al lato notturno. È ovvio che il periscopio non ha alcuna funzione in retroattività sul lato notturno. La prima luce che vedo è proprio ora a un'altezza di circa 100 cm. L'alba sta arrivando piuttosto rapidamente attraverso il periscopio. Ho gli oggetti illuminati che John ha menzionato, e posso crearne alcuni staccandoli. Ho decisamente la sensazione che siano un campo e che le loro dimensioni varino da piccole a luminose. Il periscopio stesso mi sta accecando. Dovrò appoggiarci la mappa, così potrò vedere fuori dal finestrino. Sono in condizioni di retroattività in qualsiasi momento, quindi non ho altro da fare che guardare fuori da questo finestrino. Supponendo che il circuito della
Nein, im Ernst. Interessanterweise können wir jetzt auf der Karte sehen, dass Sie sich zwischen Guam und Hawaii und ein wenig nördlich befinden, 
我真是迫不及待地想去海角。看来我们只能眼睁睁地看
わかりました、ジャック。スイッチの設定を進めてください。今お話しているのは、バッテリーが少し冷えてきているので、MAIN BUS TIEモータースイッチを少し後で
Roger. DELT
Здравствуйте, база «Транквилити», Хьюстон. Что касается вентиля
Ho delle belle stelle in vista, e anche dei piccoli oggetti bianchi che sembrano provenire dalla capsula stessa e allontanarsi. Se fossero un controllo di imbardata, sarebbe fantastico. Sospetto che la stella che vedo sia Arturo. Sarebbe molto interessante: non è né l'una né l'altra. È uno degli oggetti bianchi... due stelle che rimangono immobili. L'oggetto
わかりました。太陽の半単位ベクトルは、R1 プラス 45483、R2 プラス 19053、R3 プラス 08262 
هذه سيجما 7. سأقوم بالطيران على ارتفاع منخفض باستخدام نظام التحكم ال
了解しました。さて、その点についてですが、燃焼姿勢はパッド上に表示されますが、基本的には局所的な水平逆行燃焼を目指しています。つまり、水平線を地球の角に合わせ、X軸を太陽の方向に向けるように
Роджер. Мы хотели бы отложить пассивный термоконтроль до тех пор, пока не получим как можно больше отметок, начиная с первой звезды и сделав два набора по три отметки в каждом, а затем перейдя ко второй звезде, которую
مرحباً، م
चल दर
Mettiamoci in fila qu
Copie T1: 122 16 05. T2: 122 21 11, 6 miles au
समझो। सूट सेटिंग में तुम नंबर 8 पर 
알겠습니다. 베이커 식사를 드신 이후로 그게 전부였
Auror
Aquarius, Houston. Sie dürfen den Leistungsverstärker-Leistungsschalter öffnen und auf NIEDRIGE BITRATE umschalten, während der Leistungs
D'accord. Je n'y arrive pas, c'est ça? Je n'arrive pas à lire
Хорошо, Джо. Я начал примерно так. Мы загрузили векторы планеты — или кометы Беннета — в опцию «планета» и отслеживали её на протяжении всего пути, за исключением того, что она постоянно была заслонена, и теперь уго
Roger, Guaymas. Wir haben den Booster noch. Wir sind jetzt ziemlich weit davon entfernt, und er verbraucht etwas mehr Treibstoff als erwartet. Aktuell haben wir 61 Einheiten im vorderen und hinteren Bereich in Richtung Heck, 37 links und 36 oben. Im Moment schein
Okay. Wir werden e
ありがとうございます。ニュ
- - Ja. Ich habe meinen Pentel-Stift benutzt und die weißen schwar
ニール、こちらヒューストン。映像を撮っています。あなたは今写っていません。でも、バズがバッグを移動させているのが見えま
ठीक है। प्रतीक्षा करें। मेरे पास आपके लिए LOX डंप शुरू होने का समय है। यह 5 + 03 + 07 पर शुरू होकर 5 + 04 + 55 पर समाप्त
Roger, es sieht so aus, als ob der D
... तारे अभी यहाँ इतने ऊपर हैं कि उन्हें बिना देखे प
Roger. 4 überarbeitet: SPS/G&N: 38320, minus 055, plus 060 084 30 2749, plus 31380, plus 03475, minus 01032; Rollen NA, Nicken 034. Rest des PAD ist NA. Treibstoffmenge zwei Jets 16 Sekunden, nicht a
ठीक है, हम आ रहे हैं। प्रवेश पैड: मध्य प्रशांत, 000153; 000। अगली दो पंक्तियाँ चंद्र अस्त और चंद्रमा-जाँच अभिवृत्ति की होंगी;, 178; संज्ञा 61, माइनस 21.66, माइनस; 00:28। अगली चार उपलब्ध नहीं हैं; DO 4.00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14
Okay. Under the powerup, the first line says "AUTO SELECT, 16, to OFF." Okay. You can just delete that part. On the fifth line, it says "Circuit breaker LOGIC POWER," that's really "LOGIC BUS, four of them, to closed." The DELTA-V CG is not important since we are not burning the engine. The "SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER B
버즈, 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 제가 보기엔 상황이 꽤 좋아 보입니다. 저기 열대 수렴선 부근에 구름이 조금 보이긴 하지만, 제가 보고 있는 기상도에는 특별히 우려할 만한 것은 없습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 지금 MPL(해상도)에서는 구름
휴스턴, 절차를 복사하기 위해 
تما
알겠습니다
- - ثم ضع "اختياري، الهالة الشمسية". حس
Und Sie können loslegen. Huntsville meldet ein
Roger. Kraftstoffgemisch: 90–100 %, Sauerstoff: 75–100 %, Stromstärke: 22 A
Das ist ja wohl klar! Dem stimme ich voll und ganz zu. Die Ereignisse waren nichts Neues für uns, weder in der Vergangenheit noch in der Vergangenheit, für die wir keine Abläufe entwickelt hatten. Die Maßnahmen, die wir ergriffen haben, haben sich heute meiner Meinung nach sehr ausgezahlt. Ich bin sehr dankbar für all die Schulungen, die wir absolviert haben, und für die gute Zusamme
Roger, Friendshi
Okay. Wir möchten den Computer in allen Modi überprüfen. Diese Überprüfung besteht aus drei Schritten. Stellen Sie zunächst in allen IVI-Fenstern 10 ft/sec ein. Drücken Sie dann die Taste „Fehlerbehebung zurücksetzen“. Drücken Sie anschließend die Taste „Computer starten“ und achten Sie auf die Anzeige „Computer läuft“. Führen Sie diesen Test in allen Modi durch. Sollten Sie – ich wiederhole – keine Anzeige erhalten, dass der Com
Роджер. Примерно 62 градуса
休斯顿，宁静
로저. 4, / 62888 NA, NA, 마이너스 00012, 마이너스 0
لا، لم أفعل ذلك بعد. أريد ضبط المحاذاة فور عودتي إلى ضوء النهار، وسأفعل ذلك بالضبط. أعتقد أن الماسحات الضوئية الخاصة بي ربما لا تعمل بشكل صحيح. 
收到。还在接收你的信息。有点小故障。我目前状态良好，燃料和氧气供应稳定。舱内压力为5.8磅/平方英寸（psia）。电力
燃料はゴー、2.5g、キャビン5.
罗杰，你
Eagle, Houst
Хорошо. Мы рассматриваем некоторые из имеющихся у вас на
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमने आपको पीटीसी में रोक लिया है; स्थिति हमें ठीक लग रही है। माइक, मुझे संचार जांच चाहिए। अंतरिक्ष यान से पिछले कुछ प्रसारण अस्पष्ट रहे हैं, खासकर बज़ से। क्या 
他说：
로저, 제 상태는 괜찮습니다. 캡슐은 괜찮아 보이나요?
Affirmative. Downvoic
休斯顿，舱门通过了完整性检查。我现在要去隧道通风口，然后
Раз уж вы заговорили об этом, имейте в виду, что, согласно нашим расчетам, у вас довольно скоро может закончиться питьевая вода. Также, возможно, у вас начнется 
Che stupidaggine. Ora passiamo al fly-by-wire basso. Ho avuto un caso di doppia autorità e ho davvero fatto un pasticcio. Ma è meglio risparmiare carburante. È fin troppo facile entrare in do
हाँ। चार्ली, मैंने कुछ ऐसा ही अनुमान लगाया 
Roger. 02 + 08 + 52. Je serai droit devant, à une altitude de +80°, à 190 milles. Ce sera juste av
Columbia. Qui è Houston. Per il tuo carico in R2, richiediamo uno 0 e quattro 1, ovvero 0111
जेमिनी V
没错。不过我们已
추진 엔진에서 하얀 가스가 끊임없이 뿜어져 나오고 있습니다. 지금 AS
रेट्रो पावर पर आपको जो कुछ भी चाहिए, सब कुछ मिलेगा। है ना
是的，我觉得我们没有。基本上，埃德的面罩在过去12个小时里都没合上过，而我只有睡觉的时候才合上
Freedom Seven, Cap Com, HF는 어떻게 
Houston, ici Apollo 8. Nous allons essayer de maintenir la conversation à ce niveau pend
Capisco che non è bl
罗杰，S
我听到他了。当我们终于停止VOX通话时，我听
わかりました。以下では、最初のステップ「FORWARD DUMP valve, close」とステップ10「O
Du f
Roger. We are watching y
Через 3 минуты. Уровень т
Отрицательный рез
À présent… une cib
いいえ、あなたは私を口いっぱいに捕まえたばかり
ربم
Nous passerons à la solution B quand vous serez p
Oh, there it is. I was losing the horizon. Don't tell me our secondary scanne
... s'enfuit. Feu d'amarrage
Ich
Okay. While Jack was on COMM, I was looking out the docking window here, and I could see another good shower of particles coming out of the service module. And the position this time appears to be on the other side. Before, we'd always seen them out of window 1, and where I'm looking at it from here, it looks like it'd be down below 
बस हमें समय बता दीजिए, क्योंकि हम बस यह जानना चाहते हैं कि यह कब होगा। अगर हो सके तो हम टर्मिनेटर को पकड़ना चा
スタンバイ
753 à 09h09 - 11h09 - Soleil à l'horizon. L'indicate
Хорошо, а как насчет того, чтобы использовать служебный м
Cette transmission vous parvient à mi-chemin environ entre la Lune et la Terre. Nous sommes en vol depuis 31 heures et 20 minutes environ. Il nous reste moin
Ok, Jack. Ce l'abbi
Роджер. Отчет о состоянии. Я отправил вам кровь. Все системы работают исправно, кроме схемы скафандра, над которой я тщательно работаю. Я нахожусь в ретроградном положении; гироскопы в н
حسنًا. وهيوستن، هل لديك نصيحة بشأن الموقف الذي 
فريندشيب سفن، برمودا كاب كوم. هل ما زلت على اتصا
Roger. E poi vogliamo arrivare alla parte della palla
Roger. Gemini 8, Houston. Wir möchten Sie über die aktuelle Kommunikationssituation informieren, während wir hier etwas Ruhe haben. Wir erreichen Tanana in zwei Minuten; wir nehmen Sie dann über Carnarvon wieder auf; anschli
ठीक है। मैंने डोम का तापमान माप लिया है। यह लगभग 82 डिग्री तक पहुँच गया था। मैंने इसे वापस 81 डिग्री पर ला दिया है। सूट का इनलेट तापमान 80
Bien, nous virons à droite, comme vous pouvez le constater, et le virage se déro
Roger. Nous savons que vous êtes occupé, nous ne vous dérangerons donc pas. Nous suivons votre progression. Tout semble bien se dérouler; tous vos systèmes fonctionnent correctement et nous sommes à votre disposition pour toute manœuvre, à votre
Roger. I am in auto at this time; in reen
يبدو أنه أثناء إيقاف التشغيل (غير واضح)، ما زلنا نسحب أقل بقليل من 11 أمبير. لدينا 10 أمبير على المنفذ رقم 1 وأقل بقليل من 11 أمبير على المنفذ رقم 2. كان موقع الحبل - أو بالأحرى نقطة تثبيت الحبل السري على الفتحة الخارجية - يجعل القيام بأي نشاط خارج المركبة أمرًا صعبًا للغاية، نظرًا لديناميكية الهواء الناتجة عن الحبل الحر أمام المركبة الفضائية. كلما كنت أعمل في تلك المنطقة، كان الحبل - عند وصوله إلى نهايته - يدفعني للخلف، وتدفعني قوة رد الفعل لأعلى باتجاه المركبة الفضائية، ثم عائدًا نحو قسم المحول. لهذا السبب كنت أختفي عن الأنظار أثناء مناوراتي هناك فوق النوافذ، ثم أنجرف عائدًا نحو الجزء الخلفي من المركبة الفضائية. كان عليّ باستمرار أن أسحب نفسي للخروج إلى الجزء الأمامي من المركبة الفضائية. لم أكن راضيًا عن الصور التي كنت أحصل عليها. كان من الصعب نوعًا ما تثبيت أي من الحبال التي كنت أرتديها... كان لدي حبل على المسدس، وحبل توصيل وحبل سري، بالإضافة إلى عدة حبال أخرى متفرقة تتدلى بشكل عشوائي، وكان من الصعب إبعادها عن الكاميرا. ستلاحظون ربما في الصور أنني أحرك ذراعي بسرعة. كنت أحاول باستمرار إبعادها عن طريقي لأتمكن من التقاط الصور. أظن أنها كانت أمامي لحوالي 50 أو 60 بالمئة من الوقت؛ وفي النصف الآخر من الوقت، لم أكن في الوضعية المناسبة. أعتقد أنني التقطت حوالي اثنتي عشرة صورة. يبدو تشغيلها 
Bon. J'imagine que tout le monde se représente le programme spatial comme un concentré d'é
حسنًا. لنُعطِ جاك آخر شيء وسأحتفظ بكل شيء. اتفقنا؟ النظام أ. تم إدخاله. أجهزة التحكم
П
सिग्मा सेवन, वूमेरा ने आपका आखिरी संदे
हाँ, बिल्कुल। जिम, आप थोड़ी देर के लिए रुके थे। हम इसे बर्न एटीट्यूड से बॉल पर करेंगे। हम बस चाहते हैं कि आप 90 डिग्री तक किसी भी दिशा में रोल करें, पिच 0 और यॉ 0 रखें। अब, चरण 3; "जब एटीट्यूड पर हों, तो ACA डिटेंट से बाहर।" चरण 4; "एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल: यॉ, मोड कंट्रोल पर। जब दरें 0.05 से कम हों, तो एटीट्यूड यॉ, पल्स पर
Nein. Keine der Maßnahmen hat geholfen
Хорошо. Отлично, Д
Roger. When you get - get it out, we would like to have the number of the magazine and the letter of the magazine rel
罗杰。尼尔，这
了解。PAD入力：エリアは太平洋中部、ロール000、152、001、194 46 06、267、緯度プラス1332、マイナス16917、064、36194、649、移動距離14045、36275、195 03 06、00 28、最大下降点154、084、22400、18000、下降点0 400、02 13、00 17、03 51、09 02、六分儀星45 0189、277、照準星なし、上昇ベクトル上。コメント：ベガとデネブを合わせ、ロール078、
Das ist bestätigt, Jack, und alle anderen Schalter sind offen. Okay. Schalttafel 227, keine Änderung, und Schalttafel 229, ein zusätzlicher Leistungss
아시잖아요... 플랫폼 말이에요.
Actuellement, nous volons à très basse altitude, si bien que je ne pense pas que les stations au sol puissent nous localiser. Nous avons entendu plusieurs communications intermittentes. Nous allons toutefois maintenir cette position un moment afin de garder le lanceur en vue. Il ne semble pas que nous progressions beaucoup vers lui pour le moment. Il semble rester à peu près à la même distance qu'auparavant. Lors de l'observation nocturne, lorsque le lanceur était en dessous de nous, le ciel paraissait presque entièrement étoilé. Les émanations du lanceur étaie
जिम, अभी जो तुम्हारे पास है उससे बेहतर या उसके बराबर का कुछ पाने का एकमात्र तरीका जो हमें पता है, वो है जी एंड एन की आवाज़ बढ़ाना, और हम ऐसा नहीं करना चाहते। इसलिए हमारी योजना यही है कि अभी जो भी मिले, उसे ले लें, और ब
أستخد
Ok, lo faremo s
لا، كل شيء يسير على ما يرام. يبدو أنني ملتزم بستة أيام وأنا سعيد جدًا بذلك. السيارة بأكملها تعمل بشكل ممتاز. في حال لم يتمكن آل من نقل معلومات الوقود، 
ठीक है। क्या इनमें से कोई च
알겠습니다. 음, 여기 수소 퍼지 라인이 하나 있고, 산소-수
Роджер. По имеющейся у нас информации, вы не можете выполнить маневр сброса груза, потому что это углы, которые мы вам указали, они не
Roger. GET B 05 13 13; GTNSR, 012538; Del
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。アフガニスタン・パキスタン地域上空の単一細胞雲の形成を六分儀で説明していた頃、通信回線のノイズ
They're kind of interesting. They're all moving ... and sparkling there. And I can... - at least I think I can what will occasionally give you a real star from the bunch of sparklies, but it really does break up the capability to pick out a 
わかり
好了，休斯顿。我们没听懂。我们只听到了“GET”的嘲讽。请再
और, केन, अगर आपका साथी ओम्नी-स्विच गेम खेलना चाहता है, तो हम इस समय डॉग-ब्रावो पर हैं, असल में ब्रावो पर तो हैं लेकिन डी के लिए भी कॉन्फ़िगर किए गए हैं - सुधार, हम डी पर हैं और ब्रावो के लिए भी कॉन्फ़िगर किए गए हैं। अगर आप स
わかりました、ヴァンス。おっしゃる通りです。カメラはほぼあなたのおっしゃる通りの構成になっています。司令船には、250mmレンズ、CEXフィルム、f=8、250mmのELカメラが最適だとお考えですか？そして、5番目の窓か
了解。重要なのは、ボイラー（温水ボイラー）が空になっていないことを確認する方法を考え出し
弗雷德，这事儿不着急，不过既然现在大家都醒着，你不妨就去做吧。顺便说一句，你可能也知道，接下来的几个小时对我们来说会很清静。我们正在准备入境流程，大概八小时后就能跟你讲解一遍；从现在到那时也不会发生太多事，所以你们可以补
Видимость через т
Rog, und was S-5 und S-6 betrifft, gibt es auf dieser Rev noch etwas Wetter über den Kanarischen Inseln und beim Überflug über Afrika. Sieht gut aus f
Wir
यह सही है; सभी मात्राएँ 
ジェミニ4号機、カーナボンCAP COM。
Put that away and get some sta
Эт
Hörst du m
Номер 43
11, ह्यूस्
Gemelli 4, ti sento forte e
Fine, fine, Jim. You are sounding good this morning. We would like to give you a little r
了解。トラニオン以外はすべて分かり
वै
أكواريوس، هيوستن. بخصوص أسطوانات ثاني أكسيد الكربون، بالمناسبة، قراءة ضغط ثاني أكسيد الكربون هنا الآن هي 1.6. نتوقع أن تدوم الأسطوا
ठीक है, चार्ली। अगर तारा संख्या 45 पर तुमने जो रवैया दिखाया था - रेटिकल में गड़बड़ी
En fait, Vance, je trouve Fred l
Ich hab's kapiert, gut gemacht! Deine Kommunikation ist g
Roger. Mein schmales Ende war über dem Horizont, deshalb konnte ich den Horizont nicht sehen. Als es sich der Sonn
ジョー、それは G&C チェックリストの
Roger, Tranquility. Abbiamo capito. Dev'essere uno spettacolo 
去吧，金丝
ر
Ricevuto. Ora passo
Gémeaux 4, votre tension artérielle est prise. Commencez l'exercice à v
收到。我们展示逻辑臂，你就可以操作火焰
아폴로 8호, 
Allez-y, Ho
حسنًا. أنا الآن في الساعة 01:19:02. لقد شعرتُ بالضياع التام عدة مرات. ها هي كوكبة ذات ال
Okay. Dies setzt voraus, dass alle Abstiegsbatterien angeschlossen sind und die Aufstiegsbatterie 6, wie bereits erwähnt, auf Normalbetrieb ei
Die Ein
صوتك واضح 
Gemi
ठीक है। पंक्ति 1 में, एसी 
Wally, wir haben 
알겠습니다, 밴스. 기다리는 동안 참고로 말씀드리자면, 명령 모듈은 하셀블라드 카메
मैं इसे इ
पहले मेरे शुरू करन
这将是
Sotto ILLUMINAZIONE; FLOOD, aperto; TRACK, aperto. Sotto ED LOGIC - Correzione, sotto ED: LOGIC, aperto. DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE, aperto. Sotto: SUIT FLOW CONTROL, aper
Oh, die Zahlen, die ich gestern geschickt habe, sind ja ziemlich gut, und du hattest ungefähr … Nun, ich schaue mir das mal an, aber du war
حسنًا. سنقوم الآن بتفعيل مناورة المقل
Tranquility Base, qui Houston. Forte
로저, 8. 010 689 260 페르세이 제타, 아래쪽 048, 왼쪽 
你们正在阅读。加油，休斯顿
तुम्हार
Okay. Der Ladevorgang der Batterie A
로저.
अरे माइक, वो मैच सिनसिनाटी में था, और हमें लगता है कि वे अभी भी वहाँ क्रॉस्बी फ
저는
11、ヒューストン。AUTO SELECTスイッチを見ると、クアッド・ブラボーは無効になっていますが、クアッド・チャーリーは部分的にしか無効になっていません。チャー
D'accord. Nous pouvons reporter cette observation NAV. Elle était prévue à cette heure-ci, et nous pouvons la reporter. Vu vos commentaires concernant le sommeil, nous aimerions l'effectuer dès que possible, et pour l'instant, nous prévoyons de la décaler de deux heures. Nous la reporterons à la même heure, puisqu'elle est liée à l
Roger. We confirm your flow and understand you're seeing particles now
休斯顿，阿波罗 8 号。我们正
أبولو ٨، هيوستن. نستقبلك بوضوح تام. نستقبلك بوضوح تام أيضًا على نطاق S العادي. كيف 
Warte eine Minute, Jack, bevor du da reingehst. F
Ha
ठीक है। माइक, आप उड़ान योजना के पृष्
Roger, I did observe haze layers but not the ones that were separated from the horizon that we expected, and that John reported. I'll keep a sharp lookout next time and try to see them after sunset. On the light side there is nothing more than the bright, iridescent blue layer, which separates the actual horizon from the deep b
Okay, Jim. 
让我想想。不，那是偏航
सभी स्थितियाँ बहुत अच्छी तरह से जाँची जा रही हैं। हेड और सोफा स्क्राइब लाइन के साथ काम कर रहे हैं। मेरा रेटिकल इस पर है, जल्दी से इसकी जाँ
حسنًا. سأعيد القراءة. ضاغطا البدلة 1 و2، مطفأان؛ مضخات خلايا الوقود 1 و2 و3، مطفأة؛ طاقة النظام العام، مطفأة؛ وصلات ناقل الطاقة الرئيسي، مطفأة؛ الإضاءة ا
هذا صحيح. لقد توقفتَ للحظة يا جيم. سنفعل ذلك على الكرة من وضعية الاحتراق. نريدك فقط أن تدور 90 درجة في أي اتجاه، مع الحفاظ على زاوية الميل والانحراف 0. الآن، الخطوة 3: "عندما تكون في الوضعية - عندما تكون في الوضعية، أخرج ACA من وضع التوقف." الخطوة 4: "التحكم في الوضعية: الانحراف، إلى وضع التحكم في الوضع. عندما تكون المعدلات أقل من 0.05، اضبط الوضعية والانحراف، إلى وضع النبض
Affirmative. Are you prepared to copy your 18-1 back-up flight 
分かりました。コンピュータをすべてのモードでチェックします。このチェックには 3 つの手順があります。まず、すべての IVI ウィンドウで 10 フィート/秒を入力します。次に、誤動作リセットを押します。次に、Start Comp を押して、Computer Running Light の表示を確認します。これをすべてのモードで実行します。繰り返しますが、コンピュータが動作しているという表示が得
Bonjour Hawaï, bonjour Hawaii Com Tech, Aurora Seven. Faible mais lisible. Alle
रॉजर, यह काहिरा है, 26वें संशोधन में। जीएमटी 07:18:37। 12 मील
好的，杰克
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 잔지바르 콤 테크입니다. HF UHF 신호를
……那个陨石坑的壁上可能有一些层状结构。我突然想到——
अंतरिक्ष यान के दाहिने पिछले हिस्से से ली गई एक तस्वीर में, अवरोहण चरण के निचले भाग को देख
روجر. 10، /: 45597، ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 35189، ناقص 01513، ناقص 00346 180 007 000، نوفمبر ألفا زائد 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253، نجم المحور البصري العقرب دلتا (اسم آخر له هو دزوبا) لأسفل 071، يسار 45، زائد 0748 ناقص 16500 12995 36300؛ النجم الرئيسي الشعرى اليمانية، النجم الثانوي رجل الجبار، 129 155 010؛ أربع رباعيات، 15 ثانية، مسح؛ الأفق على خط ناف
Хорошо. Фред, ты отлично справляешься. У меня есть три изменения в контрольном списке. Это незначительные корректировки. Я хотел бы передать их тебе сейчас. Одно из них касается контрольного списка. Так что, если ты его возьмешь, я тебе его 
Okay. The reason we were looking into it in the flight plan is, if you do want to try rolling over and flying heads up or something of that nature, we can help Bill get a little more out of his photography by giving him some new film settings and that type of thing. We'll have something like that avai
Bene. Mentre verifichiamo la posizione dello scorrimento (ne stanno parlando nella stanza sul retro), vorrei procedere e scorrere con voi l
هذه زاوية كبيرة جد
रॉजर, अच्
Apollo 8, qui Hous
Es war definitiv unter mir. Ich hatte es seit etwa Carnarvon unter mir verfolgt. Bis Carnarvon war es unter uns, dann bis zum Horizont und dann wieder unter uns. Es sah fast so aus, als befände es sich in einer anderen Umlaufbahn als ich. Es hatte einen anderen Apogäum und Perigäum als ich. Jedenfalls versuchte ich, mich ihm bei Tagesanbruch anzunähern, sobald ich seine Position bestimmen konnte. Wie gesagt, zu diesem Zeitpunkt war es ein bis zwei Meilen vor mir – unter mir. Je mehr ich versuchte, mich anzunähern, desto weniger Abstand gewann ich. Ich zündete die Triebwerke in Richtung Gegengeschwindigkeit. Ich zündete meine oberen Triebwerke so, dass ich meine Gesamtgeschwindigkeit verringerte und dann gleichzeitig zündete. Ich konnte mich nie wirklich annähern, und es entfernte sich immer weiter. Mir wurde klar, dass wir, um die Boosterstufe rechtzeitig für den Außenbordeinsatz (EVA) in Hawaii anzunähern, wahrscheinlich unseren gesamten Treibstoff verbrauchen würden. In den Bodenregeln hatten wir vereinbart, dies nicht zu tun. Ich habe mich also mit CAP COM beraten, und wir haben beschlossen, den Booster-Teil der Mission nicht durchzuführen. Ich weiß nicht, ob ich es schon erwähnt habe, aber als wir uns vom Booster trennten, schienen unsere Rotationsgeschwindigkeiten relativ gering zu sein, etwa ein halbes Grad pro Sekunde in Nick- und Gierrichtung. Ich versuchte, diese zu reduzieren. Ich feuerte je einen Impuls in jede Richtung ab und konzentrierte mich dann auf die Trennung vom Booster. Die Trennung verlief erfolgrei
Ich glaube, das, was ich gerade mache, sollte ich auch mit den Papiertüchern machen
Roger. Nous allons terminer cette série d'étoiles pour vou
好的。在第一行“飞行显示器”下方，“系统工程师交叉指示器”，打开。在 B - 
你想用这个
حسناً.
यह टेक्सास कैप कॉम, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। हम आपको सला
Charlie,
Ricevuto, Jim. Pensi
阴谋。我们身处
ठीक है। हम 39.3 और 1.20 कॉपी कर लेते हैं। और, जिम, मेरे पास आपके लिए एक और जानकारी है। लगभग 45 मिनट में, आपको डिसेंट टैंक पर H2O मात्रा चेतावनी लाइट दिखाई देगी। हमें इसकी उम्मीद है। यह 16 प्रतिशत पर होता है। और इसमें कोई समस्या नहीं है, क्योंकि हम अभ्यास के लिए टैंक को पूरी तरह से खाली करने का इरादा रखते हैं। लाइट को रीस
Guten Abend. Ich möchte mit Ihnen einige der symbolträchtigeren Aspekte unserer Apollo-11-Mission besprechen. In den Gesprächen der letzten zwei, drei Tage an Bord unseres Raumschiffs sind wir zu dem Schluss gekommen, dass dies weit mehr war als die Reise dreier Männer zum Mond; mehr als die Anstrengungen eines Regierungs- und Industrieteams; mehr sogar als die einer einzelnen Nation. Wir sehen darin ein Symbol für 
了解しました。では、5、/ 45701、マイナス043、プラス116、プラス31171、マイナス00767、マイナス00214 180 017 001、NA、プラス00188 31181 259 31003 40 2711 398 033、下043、左23、プラス0832、マイナス16500、プラス12956 36208です。セットされた星は同じです。アレージは - 希望します - 4つのクワッドを15秒間使用することに異議はありま
Ich habe 
Roger, 
Gemini 4, mi sono perso l'ult
了解
Okay, Jack. Ho un'altra domanda a pagina 18. Al minuto 1, sono d'accordo con MASTER ARM ON, ma mi chiedo perché devo ten
Roger, you're coming in weak and int
D'accord, 8. Nous venons de recevoir les résultats concernant les motifs de test. Nous avions 25 motifs de test destinés aux essais au sol, et ce sont ceux que nous avons examinés. Il y en a cinq autres destinés aux essais en vol, et la seule différence est que les motifs de vol comportent des instructions écrites. Donc, si nous examinons le motif de test n° 8, cela signifie que nous travaillons toujours su
Roger. Abbiamo ricevuto 
OMNI
أعتقد أننا نجيب على السؤال رقم 9. في حوالي ذلك الوقت، أضاء ضوء المؤشر رقم 5 في محرك S-II، وحدث اهتزاز واضح كان أقوى من مجرد اهتزاز عالي التردد كما هو الحال في عملية الاحتراق العادية لمحرك S-IV، ثم أضاء الضوء. اتصلتُ ونظرتُ إلى الساعة، فأدركتُ أنها كانت مبكرة. وبعد فترة وجيزة من إضاءة الضوء، توقف الاهتزاز، وأصبح المحرك أو المعزز يعمل بسلاسة. ومن
好了。休斯顿，我刚测了一下地球亮度，
Nun, Vance,
네. 첫 번째 지시 사항은 "OPERATE 모드에서 5분 동안 확인하십시오."입니다. 그다음 "주소 400+5, 그
没错。这些就是所有的航班变更——航班计划的变更。肯现在会过来，稍后等我们安排妥当后他还会过来
OK, 25 pieds/seconde vers l'avant, 41 secondes à 120 pieds vers l'arrière, 2+32. À 23+16+
잠시 기다려 주십시오. 네, 알겠습니다. 나가셔도 됩니다
Ich habe gerade Fot
因为今天是个特殊的日子，休斯顿。
로저. 상황 보고입니다. 혈액 샘플을 보내드렸습니다. 모든 시스템은 정상
Ok. Ora capisco cosa stai dicendo. Lo riferirò ai ragazzi della TV e vedrò cosa ne pensano. Oltre a quanto detto sopra, volevano scattare alcune foto della Terra con una Hasselblad attraverso la finestra di rendezvous con il filtro rosso e blu e la pellicola in bianco e nero, e poi di nuovo attraverso il filtro polarizzatore, e tutto questo verrà utilizzato per cercare di correlare la fotografia televisiva con quella tradizionale su pellicola. Quindi, se pensi che valga la pena e vuoi provarci, ne parlerò con Jack e i ragazzi della TV e vedr
这些小凹陷处有些会下沉——大概两三英寸吧。这和测量员用力推
Okay. Now when it gets back to the mark routines, we wa
45 40 GET Theta, 7,5; intervallo, 1000,01; Delta-V totale era 430; Delta-VI è 202,1; la variazione angolare è diminuita notevolmente a circa - a un GET di 450,0 secondi o 
जे
ええ、それはいくつかあるうちの一つです。先ほどジムにお話ししたように、制御に関することをお伝えしたいと思います。今は、必要に応じてハードオーバーで制御できますが、クワッドヒーターをオフにした通常の制御モードに移行すると、姿勢制御の要求は1
Apollo 8, Houston. No
Хорошо, Джим. Маневровая площадка: цель - средний курс -7. Н/Д. HA Н/Д. HP + 0,020,5. DELTA-V R 0,019,3. Время работы двигателя 0:39; 0,08, 0,00; о
それは肯定です、1、/: 62844 1、訂正、マイナス 161、プラス 129、マイナス 29840、プラス 02390、プラ
好了，我想我看到五兄弟了；让我看看——果然，看
分かり
Bene, Vance, ho cercato di usare solo il controllo d'assetto a IMPULSO MINIMO per ottenere rollio e imbardata, o meglio, rollio e beccheggio. Ma, con il controllo d'assetto in questa configurazione, non riesco a comandare il rollio come voglio. Quindi, ho dovuto usare il controllo d'assetto per far sì che il rollio aumentasse verso lo zero, mentre stava diminuendo verso i 270. Non so davvero quale sia la combinazione nel controllo d'assetto per ottenere il controllo di beccheggio e rollio come vuoi. Devi usare il controllo d'as
Fred schaut gerade durch unser optisches Gerät. Es dient
Okay. Genau. Das ist Jim Lovell. Wir dachten, wir zeigen Ihnen heute einfach ein bisschen was vom Leben an Bord von Apollo 8. Wir haben Ihnen bereits Bilder vom Mond und von der Erde gezeigt und möchten Sie nun in unser Zuhause einladen. Wie Sie auf dem Instrumentenbrett sehen können, ist es nun schon seit mindestens vier Tagen unser Zuhause. Wir markieren jeden Tag auf dem Instrumentenbrett. Wir haben vier Tage hinter uns und arbeiten am fünften. Natürlich freuen wir uns alle auf die Landung am Freitag. Hier unten, im unteren Geräteraum des Raumschiffs, befindet sich der Fitnessberater des Präsidenten, Captain Jim Lovell, der gerade sein tägliches Trainingsprogramm absolviert. Sie sehen, wie er sich ganz frei bewegt. Er hat sich gerade den Kopf an der Optik gestoßen, die wir zur Navigation verwenden. Er trainiert mit einem Gerät, das die Muskeln in Form hält. Eine weitere sehr wichtige Funktion unseres Raumschiffs ist der Bordcomputer. Ich dachte, Sie wären vielleicht daran interessiert, die Anzeigen hier zu sehen, die uns alle Informationen über unsere Triebwerkszündung, die Navigation und die Geschwindigkeit beim Eintritt in die Erdumlaufbahn und beim Bremsen liefern. Sie sehen, dass er über ein Tastenfeld, ähnlich einer Schreibmaschinentastatur, gesteuert wird. Die Eingaben und Ausgaben darüber sin
罗杰，11岁。我们正在复制辐射信号。而且，我们正在考虑——这看起来有点奇怪，所以我们正在考虑停止并重新开始，几分钟后我们
Пол
Okay. That takes care of getting the primary water boiler enabled, and it's my understanding that we were going to make the actual entry with both the primary and t
D'accord. À -4 h 30, configurez pour la séparation. Premièrement, activez le couplage d'équilibrage. Deuxièmement, remettez les compteurs à zéro: 404, 405, 406, +0; lisez 470. Troisièmement, convertissez +X en 0,5 pied par seconde. Quatrièmement, CM/séparation. Cinquièmement, après la séparation, remettez 470 à zéro. Sixièmement, contrôle d'attitude, passez en mode impulsion. Septièmement, inclinez-vous pour acquérir le module de service pour les photos. Remarque: utilisez l'ACA pour le contrôle. Enfin, nous avions -3 heures, comme vous me l'avez indiqué. Manœuv
ठीक है। बंद कर रहा हूँ। हमारा PQI 98.0 प्रत
Ricevu
你想让我
내가 왼쪽에 있는 도시가 포트 엘리자베스라는
추진 엔진에서 하얀 가스가 끊임없이 뿜어져 
وقد حصل جاك - وقال ج
حسنًا. لقد راجعنا وقتك، والرقم 16 في إدخالك صحيح. سنزودك بإدخال مُحدّث في الوقت المُجدول. في الوقت نفسه، سنزودك بتحديث لمتجهات حالتك. كان تصحيح المسار رقم 7 أقل من سبعة أعشار قدم في 
죄송하지만 
네, 맞습니다. 아폴로 
我
Хорошо, Джек. Спасибо. И, Водолей, твои выч
Ich habe während de
Ok, Jack. Non vogliamo che tu chiuda gli ultimi due. Sono modifiche alla tua configurazione di base e per ora vogliamo l
11，这里是
そうですね
Хорошо. Теперь у меня есть довольно много информации, которую я хочу вам передать. Мы хотели бы, чтобы пилот, который спит, оставил лицевую панель открытой и снял перчатки. А пилот, который бодрствует, хотел бы снять шлем и перчатки и, если возможно, использовать легкую гарнитуру для связи. И мы хотели бы, чтобы вы продолжали в таком же поря
लगभग 179 मील पर हमारा लॉक-ऑन हो गया था, और रडार बोरसाइटेड लगभग 156 मील पर हो गया; और सुइयाँ अपेक्षाकृत स्थिर हैं; वे ठीक दिख रही हैं। यॉ सुई आगे-पीछे हिल रही है, शायद प्लस या माइनस 1 डिग्री। और यहाँ एक बात ध्यान देने वाली है कि हमें अवशिष्टों को खत्म करने में परेशानी हो रही है। हम अवशिष्टों को कम संख्
趁你现在在，13号同学，
好的。我查阅了资料，关于那226个断路器，其中涉及六个断路器，它们都是——它们是配电盘最下面一排从左数起的前六个。它们在“照明”电路下。我们需要断开三个“泛光”断路器，以及三个
Roger. Ti abbiamo registrato circa 30 secondi prima della separazione e tutto
Gemini VI, Houston, das Update für die Beschleunigung
C'était à B-2. Prochaine étape: B-3. Piqué à environ 10 degrés. L'erreur de roulis apparue pendant la période où les scanners étaient éteints a disparu. Je vais maintenant augmenter légèrement le débit de la com
ठीक है। अब मुझे आप
Roger, Colombie. Il nous reste à finaliser votre liaison montante, et j'aurai e
また
Und wir zeigen jetzt etwa 10 Minuten und 30 Sekunden. Ich möchte Sie daran erinnern, die BD
फ्रेड, दो और बातें हैं। पहली बात तो यह है कि बर्न के दौ
Roger. We believe we have the load in and we would like to have you ENABLE the SPC's and let the Agena start co
Мы этого делать не будем; мы будем придерживаться плана полета и сделаем все возможное, что
هل يمكنك أن تقوم لي بتعديل الوقت مرة أخرى على ت
Stand by. I'll gi
当前时间（02
ठीक है। जब आप अपनी गतिविधियाँ शुरू करें, तो मेरा एक पसंदीदा संरेखण है जिसमें मैं चाहता हूँ कि आप उन्हें पूरा करें, और मुझे आप
हालांकि, ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि जायरो सही ढंग से सं
Okay, Fred, we had a little static on that one, but I think you said that 80 ounces of water has be
لا، أنا متعبة جداً - أشعر بالنعاس والتعب الشديدين، وأعتقد أن إد كذلك
好的。我会一次读三四条，有些内容相同，有些内容有所更改，你可以每走几步就读一遍。功能设置为“关闭
好的。24号端子读数为4.7伏，25号端子读数为4.8伏，12号端子读数为4.8伏，14号端子读数为4.8伏，16号端子读数为4.5伏，21
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben schon wieder die Antennen vertauscht. Ich wiederhole: Wir haben derzeit keine Neuigkeiten zur Mondoberfläche oder sonstige Aktualisierungen. Wir erwägen einige kleinere Änderungen, diskutieren diese aber
Ich habe das Gefühl, dass die Neigung nicht stimmt, aber ich glaube, es liegt an dieser verdammten Horizontlinie. Man denkt dadurch, sie sei höher, als sie tatsächlich ist. Ich habe aber immer noch das Gefühl, dass ich etwa 10 Grad tiefer liege, als ich möchte. Wenn wir so nah dran sind, lassen wir den Scanner das Probl
收到。与其启动引擎并进入抬头模式，我们还是继续
5秒後にAB
Okay. I got interrupted there for a minute. Bob Hope is back out in Viet Nam again with his troops, doing a great job as usual. One little name in the news story here is from the USS New Jersey. Bob Hope joked from atop of a huge gun turret yesterday - or Wednesday - to delight the 1500 men aboard the battle ship New Jersey on its 20th Christmas entertaining US troops abroad. Hope and his 27 member troop entertained the New Jersey seamen after attending a Christmas mass aboard the carrier Hancock, both off Viet Nam. "This must be the biggest Cris Craft in the world," Hope told the seamen. "It looks like Wake 
这就是友谊七号。这
좋습니다. 첫 번째는 S-밴드 일반 모드 음성, 끄기; 두 번째는 S-밴드 일반 모드, 끄기; 세 번째는 S-밴드 일반 모드 레인징 스위치를 레인징으로 설정; 네 번째는 S-보드 AUX
Ed a commencé à ranger le matériel et, dès que nous avons atteint un point où il n'était plus possible de manipuler le propulseur, je l'ai aidé à plein temps – du moins en tenant les objets, en les rangeant et en essayant d'éviter qu'ils ne disparaissent. Plus nous travaillions vite, plus nous prenions de retard. Non pas que nous ne rangions pas les choses correctement, mais cela prenait beaucoup plus de temps que prévu. En apesanteur, ce n'était pas beaucoup plus facile que dans le simulateur, si ce n'est tout aussi facile. Nous avons donc procédé ainsi. Arrivés à Carnarvon, j'étais convaincu que nous n'y arriverions pas, mais je pensais que nous allions persévérer encore un peu. Juste avant de quitter Carnarvon, il était clair pour moi que nous ne pourrions pas effectuer la dépressurisation. J'ai demandé un changement d'orbite. Nous avons alors… repris notre souffle pendant une vingtaine de minutes et essayé de ranger le bric-à-brac qui traînait dans le cockpit. J'ai ensuite ressorti la checklist et nous l'avons passée en revue une nouvelle fois en détail pour nous assurer de n'avoir rien oublié dans la précipitation. Nous avons commencé la sortie extravéhiculaire et reçu le feu vert au-dessus de Carnarvon. Tout était prêt et nous attendions le signal de dépressurisation. Nous l'avons reçu. Le cycle de dépressurisation s'est déroulé sans encombre. Au départ de Carnarvon, nous avons été autorisés à effectuer la sortie extravéhiculaire complète. Arrivés à Canton ou à Hawaï, nous avons reçu – je crois que c'était Canton ou Hawaï – le feu vert pour sortir du vaisseau et commencer les manœuvres extravéhiculaires. Nous avons procédé comme indiqué sur notre enregistreur et sur le signal VOX. Ed est sorti et nous avons commencé à prendre des photos… comme d'habitude… Au début, je tenais le v
今回は自動振替で移管していただくのでしょう
Dort, wo es am Rau
收到。之前出现了一些波动，但现在似乎已经逐渐
罗杰，我们现在大部分时间都处于最低限度的断电状态，所以无论你打电话给
알겠습니다. 그럼 50
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。陰性です。現状維持を考えていますが、これから稼働させるシミュレーターの作業と、あなたの作業内容を相
Just tell h
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 다음 테스트는 어제와 마찬가지로 업링크 모드를 음성 통신 없이 명령 및 범위 설정 모드로 변경하는 것입니다. 이 모드에서 약 2분 30초 동안 두 개의 테스트 메시지를 전송하겠습니다. 이 시간 동안에는 업링크가 작동하지 않습니다. 특정 시간에 이 모드로 전환
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь». Это Guaymas Com Tech, Guaym
Mike, there are an awful lot of objects down on the landing site. It would just warm up Jack Schmidt's heart. The AUTO OPTICS are tracking perfectly on the target, and the two high peaks stand out beautifully. I have a beautifu
짐, 그곳에서 많은 도움을 받았어요
Хорошо. +4 часа — это нормально. Вскоре мы предоставим вам +11 часов, а что касается проверки вашей высокоэффективной антенны, 
Très bien. Ensuite, à la section « moins 1 heure et 45 minutes »… Non, corrigez cela. Correction: « moins 1 heure e
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。大约在你用六分仪描述阿富汗-巴基斯坦地区上空的单体云团时，我们通
मैं आपको बताता हूँ - हम सभी को इसे करने में बहुत मज़ा आ
Des récl
로저. X에 대해 4.4, Z에 대해 2.4를 복사하세요. 그리고 트리밍 전 Y의 잔차가 음수입니다. 이
제미니 4호, 하와이 외과
了解。027 44 5363、マイナス165 073 14、037 44 8016、マイナス165 072 46
ठीक है, जिम। मैं इस बारे में बात नहीं करना चाहता था क्योंकि हम अभी कोई प्रक्रिया सुझाने के लिए तैयार नहीं हैं। हम सीएम को सामान्य चेकलिस्ट के अनुसार चालू नहीं कर सकते क्योंकि हमारे पास पर्याप्त एम्प्स नहीं हैं।
Подтверждаю. У вас будут права на управ
Роджер. Ты меня поддержишь, и ты готов к следующему лу
11, Houston. We're over on OMNI Delta now. 
Roger. Was den Dow Jones Industrial 
ठीक है। हमें 4 मिनट तक हैकिंग करनी
좋습니다. 네 번째 중간 수정
Also, ich lese 70 Grad ab. Ich bin echt etwas ratlos, wie ich die Temperatur senken soll. Mein Anzug – das Wasserventil ist jetzt über die Markierungen hinaus eingestellt. Das scheint nicht zu helfen, und auch eine negat
嘿，吉姆，我们还得在这儿陪他待四天，你可得注意点
早
Mike ist momentan nicht erreichba
왜 객실 환풍기가 켜져 있지 않
حس
わかりました。燃料が今より大幅に不足しない限り、常に4
ヒューストン。その状態ベクトルは転送しません
Esatto. Sappi anche che Wa
아폴로 8호, 고이득을 기다리는 동안 궤적 요약을 계속하겠습니다. 13번째 지점에서 태평양 중부선으로 복귀할 수 있으며, 연소 후 138초가 지나면 귀환이 시작됩니다. 138초면 버터플라이 영역을 벗어나게 됩니다. 20초 이후에는 조기점화나 재시동을 시도하지 않는 것이 좋습니다. 20초를 넘기면 궤적이 수정 범위를 벗어나 자유 귀환으로 이어질 수 있습니다. 귀환 지역의 날씨는 양호합니다. 추적 및 미추진이 가능합니다. 연소 중에는 저장 탱크와 섬프 탱크의 연료 소모로 인해 연소실 압력과 탱크 압력에 약간의 변화가 있을 수 있습니다. 이는 연소 시작 후 2~5초 사이에 발생할 수 있습니다. 두 시스템 모두 압력 변화가 미미할 것입니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동합니다. 연
Roger, Bill. Et nou
Ok. Ora il mio ago del pitch è leggermente alzato. Potrei provare a togl
そうです。もう一つの作業は、EPCのディスプレイブレーカーを下げたことです。ただし、「注意」と「警告」はオンのままにしておきます。そのため、「
حسنًا. لقد كنت أتابعها باستمرار، ودرجات الحرارة لدينا تتراوح بين 72 و75 درجة فهرنهايت (درجة حرارة الهواء الجاف) و60 و64 درجة فهرنهايت (درجة
방금 16-A 표적을 촬영했습니다. 바스라 비행장은 페르시아만 바로 옆에 있습니다. 페르시아만을 약 30도 각도로 포착한
ये वही कार्यक्रम है जि
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. تشير بيان
Хорошо, Джим. Мы видим магнитофон, и, кстати, 
6.50도입니다. 그리고 짐, 휴스턴 씨. 마지막
М
Oui, le bras de rétro-éjection en premier. Rétro-éjection. Signalez les rétro-éjections à Guaymas. Rétro-alim
Vielen Dank. Okay, ich lese die Werte mal vor. Es war 17:16 Uhr GMT, als wir starteten. Treibstoffmenge: 60. Kabinentemperatur: 92 °C. Anzugtemperatur: 58 °C. Kabinendruck: 5,6 bar. CO₂-Gehalt im Anzug: 0,75 mmHg. Sauerstofffüllung der linken Sekundärflasche: 5100 l. Sauerstofffüllung der rechten Sekundärflasche: 5050 l. Saue
Okay.
Но он отдаёт его мне в неактивном состоянии. Конечно, я отдаю ему и свой ком
Das ist Friendship Seven. Mehrmals hatte ich das Gefühl, dass mein Triebwerk teilweise blockiert war oder nur teilweise in Nicklage nach unten arbeitete. Dann plötzlich wieder eine Nickrate nach oben, und im selben Moment spürte ich einen Schub nach unten, und das Flugzeug kippte nach unte
ठीक है, फ्रेड। और जब आप प्राइमरी कार्ट्रिज को बदलते हैं, तो प्राइमरी को दोबारा न चुनें। सेकेंडरी कार्ट्रिज के
Oh, you had us shook up for a minute. Don't do t
로저, 캔턴입니다. 프렌드십 세븐이 반복
자, 짐벌 드라이브입니다. 위
قل مرة أخرى، 1
جيد جداً. سنبدأ بتخ
Okay. Gi
PGNS保有
Roger. J
रॉजर। ब्
알겠습니다. 두 히터 모두 정상 작동 확
罗杰。355 015，NA，00213 003 00168 30 2082 370。织女星
روج
Wassermann, du sahst schon nach zwei Minuten gut aus. Siehst i
Apollo 8, Houston.
रॉजर
Roger. Ich empfange d
हिंद महासागर का जहाज, ह
حسنًا يا جو، لقد بدأت من هنا. لقد انتقلت إلى الخيار 3، وعلى شاشة العرض - 1520 - 1525، استدعيت 1691. سأتركك تراقب وترى زاوية العمود بينما لا تزال البصريات عند ا
Близнецы 4, Близнецы 4, это связь с центром упра
... wenn ich es auf ACME
Apollo 8, this is Houston. R
제가 가
阿波罗13号
Anscheinend darf man es nicht ans Fenster halten, weil es son
好了，杰克。这是本页最后添加的内容。回到常规检查清单，找到自动选择开关。我们需要所有16个开关都打
حسنًا. نستعيد السيطرة على المركبة الفضائية ببط
Das war's. Okay. Die zweite Zusatzfrage ist für Sie, Jim, und lautet: „Gab es im Vergleich zu Ihrem Flug mit Apollo 8 irgendwelche signifi
Roger. Format, plus 5: 00744 6485, minus 165, 02506. 
好的。在面板 122 
Нет. Пересадки не было, а скорость вращения двигателя составляла 2,3 фута в секу
Тогда, полагаю, вам стоит обратиться к ва
左側の108:00から「ORB科学姿勢におけるORB停止速度」を
حسنًا، للعلم فقط، السحابة تبلغ خم
알겠습니다. (
Give me a cal
Oui, c'est fai
我个人很高兴看到这种情况
그 
أبول
Ну, я думаю, они, вероятно, предположили, что эти частицы, которые я видел, могли произойти оттуда, но это тысячи таких частиц, и они распространяются на многие мили в каждом направлении от мен
पानी की बंदूक चलाने की बारी का इंतज़ार करते हुए, मैं ऑप्टिक्स पर कुछ टिप्पणी कर सकता हूँ। ऐसा लगता है कि सूर्य के आस-पास कहीं भी स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप पर प्रकाश की एक चौड़ी पट्टी फैली हुई है। अभी कुछ देर पहले हम ऐसी स्थिति में थे जहाँ से मैं स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में चंद्रमा को देख पा रहा था। फिर मैंने उसे स
Хижина REPRE
और वैंस, आपके सवाल का जवाब यह है कि यॉ को तुरंत शून्य
자, 찰리
네, 5만
Prêt pour la vérification du bi
Roger. Je comprends bien que, près de l'extrémité arrière, à l'est, les rayons paraissaient plus sombres. Si je comprends bien, Buzz, il
好的。等我们开始的时
Et notre séparateur d'eau ne semble pas fonctionner correctement. Beaucoup d'eau s'infiltre par le passant de la combinaison, et même après 
Wenn überhaupt,
Questo è davvero ottimo per il livello di sottofondo, Ken. Fo
حسناً. هل تريد ب
Et nous pou
Another little of local news: the County Court House at Huntsville burned down before dawn yesterday, so it looks like they will go in the construction business there again. On the got a little bit about the waiting families. This one is by Ann James, Post reporter. "We rest on the backside of the moon," said Valerie Anders on Christmas Eve, as she and her family waited for Apollo 8 to get out of the moon orbit and head back toward home. Mrs. Anders had been 00 a.m. Tuesday, and neighbors had just collected all the youngsters so the family could get some rest while the spacecraft was behind the moon and out of communication. Colonel Frank Borman's home was decorated with four big evergreen wreaths outdoors and sprinkled with powdery snow and decorated with red bows. A tree in the den awaits his safe return, and his pretty blond wife Sue and husky sons, Frederick and Edwin, plan to stay home for the midnight blast out of moon orbit. Ordinarily, they would attend midnight services at St. Christopher's Episcopal Church. The plans were for the family 00 a.m. Since there are no young children in the Borman home, family Christmas gift giving will simply wait until Colonel Borman comes back with his fantastic holiday gift of the flight to the moon and back. Marilyn Lovell's four youngsters will have an absolutely normal Christmas as far as the kids are concerned, the busy wife of Captain Lovell reported; but talking about presents 
Roger, Houston. Qualche parola sul nostro sistema di tracciamento ottico. Ho usato AUTO OPTICS per i punti di controllo 1 e 2 sul retro, e hanno funzionato benissimo, hanno tracciato entrambi i bersagli per me. Sono andato al punto di controllo 3, come indicato nel nostro manuale di controllo orbitale, per vedere la latitudine e la longitudine che mi erano state fornite e ho usato AUTO OPTICS per tracciare quel particolare sistema di coordinate, ed era molto vicino al tracciato di tracciamento effettivo. Ho sc
Wonderful. We also have a request from the Cape. On your next pass over California, between and, they are going to pass your voice to live TV. Ove
In Ord
收
Sigma Se
Ricevuto. Attraverso 
Et ce 130 prime est le même q
Ciao, Canary Cap Com. Aurora Seven. Forte e
무엇
D'accord. Ces petites bouchées ont été conçues pour éviter que des miettes ne se baladent dans la cabine. Leur taille a donc été spécialement étudiée pour p
飛行序盤にブースターについてデブリーフィングしていた内容の続きです。暗闇に
吉姆，我是休斯顿人。有两件事：第一，你的程序看起来很不错，应该能让你撑过
حسنًا. لنرى إن كنت قد فهمت كل شيء. للالتقاء، أولًا، نريد أن يكون قاطع الدائرة 16 (INVERTER 2) مغلقًا، وكذلك قاطع الدائرة 11 (AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2). ثم على اللوحة 14، تأكد من تحديد INVERTER 2. وقاطعي الدائرة 11 (RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2) مغلقين. بعد ذلك، نسحب مقبض تحرير رادار الالتقاء. على اللوحة 3، نريد تشغيل رادار الالتقاء. اضغط على زر الإدخال (ENTER) مع جميع الرموز البريدية، بالإضافة إلى 28300 في السجلين 1 و2. ثم اضغط على زر المتابعة (GO). بعد ذلك، نراقب الحركة باستخدام 16 72. بعد أن يتوقف، افتح قاطع الدائرة 11 (RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2)، ثم اضغط 
わかりました。もしジャックに大まかな等高線角度を伝えた後、こ
C'est exact. Sur les trois l
では、強調しておきますが、パワーアンプをオフにします。トランスポンダーをオフにします。ACインバーター2をオフにします。そして、パネル250の最後のCB BAT BakerのPOWER ENTRY/POSTLANDINGをオンにします。そして、指示された手順を逆の順序で実行して、元に戻
Ok. Ho capito ch
好的，PDI 填充：102:33:04.36；09:50；减 0002.1；182, 287, 000；加 56919。PDI 小于 10：105:12:30.00。PDI 大于 10 时中止：103:40:00.00，107:11:30.00。无 PDI 加 12 中止：102:44:37.00；加 0122.3，减去所有零，加 0188.9；0152.0，加 0011.0，0225.0，0:46；000，190；加 0118.7，加 0000.0，加 0191.1； 103:31:07.00；105:12:30
Yes. We're far enough out now that the - I think 
わかりました。チェックリストG/8-2のステップ5に「隣接する
分かりました。それで、
Роджер, Скотт. Я нахожусь в режиме дрейфа, но включил питание шины управления двигателем. Он очень хорошо вышел на старт. Позже вкл
Roger, Fred. L
As I look around the area, the contrast, in general, is *** comes about completely by virtue of the shadow *** down Sun... very light colored gray, light gray color,
好的，我们就此作罢。
별거 아
Okay, Joe. Tempo di serra
안녕하세요, 트랭퀼리티 기지, 휴스턴입니다. 휴스턴 시간으로 8시라는 시간은 해치를 여는 시간인가요, 아니면 준비 작업을 시작하는 시간인가요? 이상입니다
稍等。收到。我们希望使用宽屏模式，您可以现在
ロジャ
了解。11月31日、SPS/G&N: 36691、マイナス061、プラス066 137 22 3985、プラス328
收到。阿波罗地标号最近接近轨道器第28次，格林尼治标准时间10:
... Hai ripulito tutta la cabina di pilotaggio in modo che ci sia
여러 층으로 이루어진 것 같네요. 아주 높은 권운층이 있고… 권운이 조금 덜한
No, no, n
Я периодически включал и выключ
नील, ये ह्यूस्टन है। क्या आपको क
Roger, vérifier les commandes de vol électriques est très simple. Notre système de télémétrie vérifie que tous vos systèm
Je vais vous dire. Demandons à Houston de nous fournir le chronomètre de la mission, l'heure système. Ils peuvent nous le transmettre. D'a
حسنًا. تم تسجيل دخول جهازك والتحقق منه. يمكنك الانتقال إلى "حظر"، وسنبدأ العمل هنا في غضون 45 ثانية تقريبًا. سأبدأ على أي حال. قاعدة الوقت 6P 24136، الدوران 179، الميل 045، الانحراف 001، وقت الاحتراق 5 زائد 15، دلتا-VC برايم 105 196 VI 35569، الدوران 357، الميل 091؛ زائد 10 د
Kano, ici Sigma Sept. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Com
我们正在采取一种态度上的策略，这
Какая погода ожидается в южной части западного полушария или на
알겠습니다. 연료 전지 퍼지 작업이 진행될 예정이고, 그 후 배터리 A 충전이 완료될 것 같습니다. 그러면 배터리가 거의 완전히 충
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। अक्षांश/देशांतर 
W
«Сигма Семь», это команда связи «Канари». Слышу вас отчетливо. У нас есть действующие данные радиолокационного слежени
...ты не знаешь,
حسنً
روجر. أثن
打开右侧副氧传感器，关闭左侧
맞습니다. CB G&N, POWER, AC1, 
네, 맞습니다. 이로써 해당 카드는 완료되었습니다. 나머지 업데이트는 58시간 플랫폼을 기반으로 한 참고 정보일 뿐입니다. 플랫폼을 확인해 보세요. 현재 상태는 매우 좋습니다. 자이로스코프는 거의 드리프트가 없습니다. 이전에는 X축이 -2.24, Y축이 +0.87, Z축이 -0.11로 측정되었습니다. 52시간 업데이트를 기준으로 했을 때, X축 드리프트는 +0.79, 요축은 +1.06, Z축은 +0.02로 측정되었습니다. 52시간과 57시간 정렬의 차이는 드리프트 점검에 대한 정확하고 완전한 업데이트를 얻기에 충분한 시간이 부족했음을 보여줍니다. 따라서 자이로스코프 상태에 매우 만족합니다. PIPA도 
In realtà nelle ultime 12 ore o più, forse anche 24, non siamo stati molto attenti a tenere la mascherina chiusa e le fascette alzate p
你的发射
휴스턴, 컬럼비아는 OMNI C 모드입니다. 찰리, 음성 백업 좀 해 주세요. 그리고 시간 되시면 130번 좌표 좀 찾아주시겠어요? 큐 카드랑 비행 계획표에 정보가 서로 달라서요. 어떤 좌표를 사용해야 할지 알
알겠습니다... 알겠습니다. 이 숫자들을 
Roger. We would like for you to switch to ADAPTER and give us 
यह देखना बहुत दिलचस्प है कि मेरी स्थिति लगभग पिचअप प्लस 30 डिग्री, रोल राइट 130 डिग्री और यॉ लेफ्ट 20 डिग्री है। इस समय गुब्बारा मेरे साथ-साथ चल रहा है। यह हर समय एक स्थिर दिशा बनाए रखता है। क्षितिज पट्टी फिर से द
자, 이제 정말 궁금한 건 
Questo è confermato. Andiamo a pagina 27, Attivazion
Qui il tempo è bel
よし、ジャック。226は正しく設定されている。REACSブレーカー
Ciao Houston.
Soll ich es jetzt noch e
حسنًا. بالنظر إلى اليمين، ستجد أن الوضعية، أو بالأحرى الوضعية، غير صحيحة، لذا يمكنك شطبها. وتحت صورة القمر،
Да, ты прямо мои мысли произнес, Фрэнк, и мы хотели бы также
Ricevuto. Abbiamo intenzione di interrompere la ricarica della batteria B tra circa 5 minuti. S
जिम, मैं आपको कमांड मॉड्यूल G&N को ऊपर लाने की प्रस्तावित प्रक्रिया का सामान्य विवरण दे सकता हूँ। यह वर्तमान में प्रस्तावित प्रक्रिया है। हम इससे बेहतर प्रक्रिया भी सोच सकते हैं, लेकिन अभी हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं। सबसे पहले, हम पृथ्वी पर दृष्टि का उपयोग करेंगे, ठीक वैसे ही जैसे हमने मध्य मार्ग में किया था। फिर हम बॉडी-एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट करेंगे, ACS पर 400 प्लस 5, ताकि बॉल 000 पर
Columbia, Hous
2つ目はパネル5にあります。サーキットブレーカー、POWER-1、MAIN Aがオープン、
Фред, у тебя накапливается CO2. На нашем манометре 11, а уровень CO2, необходим
Forza
Goldstone, Houston CAP COMM. Potresti mettere al corrente il tizio d
J'ai le magazine Ha
Apollo 8, Houston. 
Jim, hast du den Lebensmittelschrank scho
روجر... 43-2 101. 2+06. 09 40 59. 5+14. 10+36. 44-2 114. 2+22
Okay. I'm sorry, 1 - Yes, 78 hours. It only seems like it's be
알겠습니다. 우선 배터리를 충전해서 전력을 공급해야 하는데, 이를 위한 절차를 이미 마련해 두었습니다. 재진입과 관련해서는, 재진입 시점 5시간 전에 마지막 중간 궤도 수정을 할 계획입니다. 물론, 재진입이 필요한 경우에 한해서입니다. 그리고 재진입 시점 4시간 30분 전에 서비스 모듈을 분리하고, 그 후 3시간에서 3시간 30분 동안 사진 촬영, 사령선 추진 및 정지, 적재물 정리, 기타 자잘한 작업들을 진행할 예정입니다. 서비스 모듈은 재진입 시점 1시간 전까지 보유하다가 분리할 것입니다. 이러한 절차는 내일 아침 CMS와 LMS에 통합하여 실행할 예정이며, 가능하면 오늘 오후에 관제센터와 함께 다시 한번 실행할 것입니다. 한 가지 질문이 있는데, 그 후 어떻게 처리해야 할까요? 사령선에는 산소가 충분하고, 고압 산소 공급원과 보관 문제가 있다는 생각 때문에 산소통을 사령선에 남겨두는 방안을 고려하고 있습니다. 또 다른 생각은, 우주복을 입고 진입하는 것이 좋겠다는 것입니다. 우주복을 입고 우주
是的……演出。
Acqua accesa, la 
我准备好了
Tranquillità. Ricevuto. Riceviamo. Attesa 1. E, pausa, pa
La mise à jour concernant la balle était positive. Au mo
Ich glaube schon. Ich habe in letzter Zeit nichts mehr ge
收到。295，68。请再次报出推进剂用量，指挥飞行员
База Спокойствия, это Хьюстон. Мы не будем читать ни одного из ваших сообщений, 
Il chirurgo
Roger, Neil. Per iniziare: messaggi di congratulazioni per la missione Apollo 11 sono arrivati ​​alla Casa Bianca a fiumi per tutto il giorno dai leader mondiali. Tra gli ultimi, i telegrammi del Primo Ministro Harold Wilson di Gran Bretagna e del Re del Belgio. La stampa mondiale è stata dominata dalle notizie sull'Apollo 11. Alcuni giornalisti stimano che oltre il 60% delle notizi
Roger. Compris. Zone 7-3 GET RC, 10 04 47; RET 400K, 22 plus 02; RET RB, 28 
كيف حال الأنظمة هناك يا هيوستن
アポロ8号、ヒ
R
オーケー、オデッセイ、ヒューストン。安定した高ビットレートでロックしました。もう一度ENTERを押してください。オーバー。それを1分間遅らせて、その
分かりました。マイク、何が起こったかというと…ご存知の通り、あなたはそこに座
لقد جرب مسؤولو التخزين فكرة وضع كاميرا التلفزيون بالأبيض والأسود في المخزن B-6، ويقولون إنه حتى مع إزالة العدسة، لا يمكنهم إدخالها. لذا، ما زلت أوصي بتخزينها في المكان الذي حد
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Die 
켄, 이 슈트 열교환기의 
Хорошо. Панель 5; ПРОЖЕКТОРЫ; вам нужен реостат. Панель 100, ПРОЖЕКТОРЫ; вам нужен ПОСТ
मुख्य 
روجر،
Хорош
J'ai remis le chauffage automatique 
제미
Roger, Mike. How are our temperatures looking acros
罗杰，七号。我们建议您在第三次轨道飞行时，根据需要使用陀螺仪，无论是正常模式还是自由模式。这样，万一在第三次轨道飞行进行反推之前，扫描仪未能正确编程，您可以使用自由模
حسنًا. ١
わかりました。ステップBAT 5
我们将逐一进行测试
Roger. Si cela peut t'aider, Mike, la Terre est in
Roger. Je vais relire l'int
こんばんは。私たち
Хорошо.
Я только что
Roger. Ho bisogno di una posizione molto precisa perché riesco a scansionare decentemente solo uno di quei quadrati della griglia alla volta. L'area che abbiamo esplorato ne copre decine, venti e tren
L'Hasselblad ha resistito. Non credo che fosse una buona macch
好的，吉姆。我们替你做决定；这是我们一直想跟你讨论的话题。我们一直在考虑这个问题，我们的想法是——当然，最终决定权在你，但就我们权衡利弊来看，你刚才提到的优点显而易见。我们在发射前一小时左右会进行舱门完整性检查，如果舱门损坏，你很难迅速钻进宇航服。另一方面，穿宇航服的缺点是，它们可能会大大降低你的速度，这还不包括穿宇航服的时间。甚至有人非常担心，穿宇航服一段时间后，你可能会感到太热，到时候我们可能不得不启动宇航服循环系统来通风，而我们并不想这样做，因为这会消耗大量的电力。因此，我们的建议是你不要穿那套防护服，因为我们没有理由相信完整性检查会显示除了略微增加的泄漏率之外的任何其他
Oka
초속 26~36피트 상승. 피치오버 현상에 주의하세요. 매우 부드럽습니다.
Roger. Sono tornato in - retroatt
Роджер. Зона 27-БРАВО. Раздельное торможение. Передняя часть 76. Задняя часть 94. 2
찰리, 2차 누출 점검은 네가 원하는 대로 그대로 읽어 줘. 그러면 내가 체크리스트를 건드리지
Verseau, Houston. Nous sommes prêts à recevoir votre chargement
रॉजर। क्या आपके पास
Roger, Aquarius. We are reading you about 
ومن الأمور الرائعة يا جاك، خاصةً بالنسبة لشخص مبتدئ مثلي، سهولة الحركة هنا. وكما تعلم من عملك في محاكي وحدة القيادة، فإن انعدام الجاذبية يُعدّ ميزةً كبيرة. لأنك تشعر بضيق المساحة عند مستوى جاذبية واحد، ما يجعل الحركة صعبةً للغاية، بينما الحركة سهلة في هذه البيئة. وكما ترى، كان المكان نظيفًا، وجدتُ بعض الحلقات المعدنية المفكوكة، وغطاءً بلاستيكيًا صغيرًا لكاميرا التسلسل كان قد انفصل ووجدته عالقًا بجوار لوحة ED. حسنًا. الآن، يقف جيم أسفل ما يبدو أنه علبة. ولتوضيح الأمر للجميع، يوجد داخل هذه العلبة محرك الصعود، حيث يمكنك رؤية يدي موضوعةً فوقه الآن، وهو المحرك الذي نستخدمه للانطلاق من القمر. بجوار غطاء المحرك مباشرةً، أضع يدي الآن على صندوق أبيض سبق عرضه. هذا الصندوق هو حقيبة جيم، أو حقيبة الظهر التي ستزودنا بالأكسجين 
حسناً يا هيوستن. لقد وصل
Roger. Merci beaucoup. Nous avons visionné l'enregistrement et nous avons remarqué des choses qui se sont produites dès l
わかりまし
مساء الخير. أودّ أن أناقش معكم بعض الجوانب الرمزية لرحلة مهمتنا، أبولو 11. فبينما كنا نناقش الأحداث التي جرت خلال اليومين أو الثلاثة الماضية على متن مركبتنا الفضائية، توصلنا إلى استنتاج مفاده أن هذه الرحلة كانت أكثر بكثير من مجرد رحلة ثلاثة رجال إلى القمر؛ بل وأكثر من جهود فريق حكومي وصناعي؛ وأكثر حتى من جهود دولة واحدة. نشعر أن هذه الرحلة تُجسّد فضول البشرية جمعاء الذي لا يشبع لاستكشاف المجهول. وأعتقد أن مقولة نيل قبل أيام، عند وطء قدمه سطح القمر لأول مرة: "هذه خطوة صغيرة لرجل، لكنها قفزة عظيمة للبشرية"، تُلخّص هذه المشاعر خير تلخيص. لقد قبلنا تحدي الذهاب إلى القمر؛ وكان قبول هذا التحدي أمرًا لا مفر منه. وأعتقد أن السهولة النسبية التي أنجزنا بها مهمتنا تُعدّ دليلاً على توقيت هذا القبول. أشعر اليوم أننا قادرون تمامًا على قبول أدوار موسعة في استكشاف الفضاء. وبالنظر إلى الماضي، فقد سررنا جميعًا بشكل خاص بالأسماء التي اخترناها بعناية فائقة لمركبتينا الفضائيتين، كولومبيا وإيجل. كما سررنا بشعار رحلتنا، الذي يصور النسر الأمريكي وهو يحمل رمز السلام العالمي من الأرض إلى القمر؛ ذلك الرمز هو غصن الزيتون. وكان قرارنا الجماعي هو وضع نسخة طبق الأصل من هذا الرمز على سطح القمر. شخصيًا، وأنا أتأمل أحداث الأيام القليلة الماضية، يتبادر إلى ذهني آية من المزامير: "إذا تأملت السماوات، صنعة أصاب
نعم، للأسف يبدو أنه منخفض 
좋아요, 프레드, 한번 
了解
मुझे लगता है यह ठीक है। अब इस ज
Sind Sie im AUTO-M
يذه
उसने बिलकुल वै
Jim, when you get finished moving your stowage around and it's convenient, we'd like to terminate the battery charge for a little while to bring up 
Я понимаю, о чём вы говорите. Я немного поспал сег
好的。我们刚才似乎锁
你好，Canton Com Tech，Canton Com Tech
E grazie per avermi messo in contatto, Houston. Mi stavo perdendo
ロジャー、ヒューストン。オプション3を試して、プラットフォームを微
ماذا قلت يا ب
Р
ساعتان
Sì. Voglio essere sic
Jim, ce que je t'ai dit à propos de ta mémoire est inexact. Nou
Нет.
Gemini 4, Хью
Apollo 11, this is Houston. Affirmative. We request hydrogen and an oxygen fuel cell purge. O
और तैय
هذا صحيح يا جاك، والباقي مف
The only thing we can try to do
Аполлон-11, Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон, вещание вслепую. Запросите OMNI Bravo, если вы нас чит
제미니 4, 과이마스 CA
휴스턴 이글입니다. 210MHz 대역에서 수신 상태가 양호합니다. 85피트 접시 안테나로 데이터 선택을 변경하여 어떤 신호가
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。戈德斯通一切就绪
아니요. 그들은 현재 
Gemini 4，休斯
Здесь хо
Roger, nous allons ras
Nun ja, es gibt einige Wolken darüber und darunter, und ein ziemlich gutes Zirkulationssystem befindet sich ein paar hundert Meilen vor der Westküste Kal
OK, c
わかりました。まずコメントです。ページの真ん中あたりで黄道光に関する説明が終わり
D'accord, Jim a raison. Il faut supprimer tout ça, à quelques exceptions près. La vanne de vidange avant, fermée (première étape), doit être conservée. Toutes les autres éta
Добрый вечер. Я хотел бы обсудить с вами несколько наиболее символичных аспектов полета нашей миссии, «Аполлона-11». В ходе обсуждения событий последних двух-трех дней на борту нашего космического корабля мы пришли к выводу, что это было гораздо больше, чем просто полет трех человек на Луну; больше, чем усилия правительственной и промышленной команды; больше, чем усилия одной нации. Мы считаем, что это символизирует ненасытное любопытство всего человечества к исследованию неизведанного. Заявление Нила, сделанное им на днях, когда он впервые ступил на поверхность Луны: «Это маленький шаг для человека, но огромный скачок для человечества», — я думаю, очень хорошо отражает эти чувства. Мы приня
هذا هو الثامن. هيا يا هيو
Wir müssen das System unt
ठीक है। चलि
了解です。カメラの右側は逆行を向いています。現在
जी हाँ, महोदय। हम चाहते हैं - अगर हमें मैन्युअल ऑन - मतलब, ऑटो ऑन नहीं मिलता है, तो हम इग्निशन प्लस 1 सेकंड पर डिसेंट-इंजन कमांड ओवरराइड में अबॉर्ट स्टेज का उपयोग करके बैकअप लेंगे। पृष्ठ 17 पर, माइनस 
حسنًا، الأكسجين. لديك 44 رطلاً متبقية. بمعدل استهلاك 0.36 رطل في الساعة، يتبقى لديك 120 ساعة من الأكسجين. حسنًا. بعد ذلك، نسبة الأكسجين في A هي 6.2% وفي B هي 6.
Il semble que la
थोड़ी देर
フレンドシップ・セブン、ttawaii Co
로저. 알겠습니다. 참고로 말씀드리자면, 혹시 현장에서 직접 확인해 보셨나요? 저희가 항법에 사용한 항성 상태 벡터를 기준으로 고도를 계산해 보니 84.7마일이 나왔고, 그 다음에는 지난번에 업데이트해 주신 항성 상태 벡터를 사
알겠습니다. 지금 TV 위치를 조정하고 있어요. 빌이 프랭크
アクエリアス、ヒュース
Хорошо. Отсюда у вас есть сигнал к началу второго витка, и, если вы подождете, я вышлю вам 2-1 TR и данные о спу
Хо
مساء الخير. معكم قائد أبولو ١١. قبل مئة عام، كتب جول فيرن رواية عن رحلة إلى القمر. انطلقت مركبته الفضائية، كولومبيا، من فلوريدا وهبطت في المحيط الهادئ بعد إتمام رحلتها إلى القمر. يبدو من المناسب أن نشارككم بعضًا من تأملات الطاقم بينما تُكمل كولومبيا الحديثة رحلتها إلى كوكب الأرض والمحيط ال
Ok. E vorremmo... credo che ci serva una tua lettura. E ne avremo bisogno verso l'ora del punto, da qualche parte quando sarà di nuovo comodo lì 
オーケ
플러스 59578, 마이너스 00086, 마이너스 05287, 012 080 018, 해당 없음, 플러스 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, 지구 상승 005, 오른쪽 27, 플러스 0398, 플러스 06500 13215 36961; 시리우스 리겔 137 311 339, 여유 공간 없음, 근접 비행 기동 실행 가정, 근접 비행 시 안정 정렬 사용; GERU 결정 시간 5분; NC-4 1~10단계, NC-8 3~4단계 사용. 회랑 제어 차트 3653
ठीक है, अब मैं सर्किट ब्र
Ok, e se giri pagina su Power 8, abbiamo le funzioni rimanenti della navicella spaziale per te. Abbiamo una TM a basso bit rate. Tuttavia, non abbiamo VHF. Ce l'abbiamo. Abbiamo POMPE A
体温は…全然悪くない。スーツの温度も…そう、スーツの温度も下がった
D'accord. Je suis à votre dispositi
ठीक ह
我们实现了最小死区，保持姿态
ह्यूस्टन, ईगल। क्या आपने हमारे स्टार एंगल डिफरें
はい
Roger. Did you delete the cislu
À Houston, dans notre position actuelle, nous allons verrouiller la nacelle. Je compte essay
좋습니다. 첫 번째 별은 26번입니다. 26번 별을 이용해 지구 근지평선에서 두 세트의 측정을 하겠습니다. 그런 다음 16번 별을 이용해 지구 원지평
DELTA-V THRUST, NORMAL, A, is ON
نعم. 
Vous pouvez supprime
大丈夫だよ、デイク。去年の12月以来、初めてゆっくりできるんだ。筋肉を鍛えるために少し運動もしている。歩き回るほどではないけど
Andare 
好的。请注意，您电脑显示的负载为 18-1，包含机动负载。您的训练记录时间为 21-4
Sì, credo che tu abbia ragione. Cavolo, si vede davvero il cedimento. La maggior parte del... Si vede dove si è accumulato tutto in fondo, nell'angolo; sai, sul bordo... dove molta della roba bianca è colata giù... ed evidentemente dopo un po' si ricopre con uno strato più scuro. C'è sempre una certa quantità di roba bianca proprio sui bordi. Abbasta
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿，通过卡那封转接。弗兰克，你刚才是不是打过
Activation 11, omit step
Хорошо, отлично. Теперь, вероятно, пара сантиметров лишнего пакета торчит вокруг дна контейнера. Чтобы он не прижимался к сетке, мы просим вас обрезать его ножницами, а затем отрезать еще две полоски скотча дли
11, Houston. Pourriez-vous décrire, de votre point de vue, la calotte polaire?
غطاء الوجه مغلق. فتحته للحظات فقط لأمسح أنفي وأحاول تنظيف العدسة، وهو ما لم أستطع فعله. تم اختيار وضع إعادة الدخول. الكاميرا مخزنة. سأقوم الآن بإطفاء
حسناً.
Хорошо. Хьюстон, это «Аполлон-8». Сейчас я включу режим высокого усилен
कोई बात नहीं, जिम।
よし。ジョー、これを持ってるか確認してみよう。BAT（バッテリーB）の充電を
Well, 
Ok, ti ​​stai di nuovo
इसे बताने का यह एक अच्छा और तर्कसंगत तरीका है। मुझे ऐसा लगता है कि सुरंग में बैठकर सभी खिड़कियों को निहारने से फर्क पड़ता है; फर्क इस बात से पड़ता है कि आप किस खिड़की से बाहर देख रहे हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, कैमरा अभी नंबर 5 वाली
わかりました。皆さんにはこの点について知っていただき、飛行計画にどのような影響があるか考えていただきたかったのです。広角で月についてコメントし、どのセクションが最も適切だと思うか確認します。さて、フランクはスクロールで、進入プロファイルが表示される順番を確認してほしいと言っていました。最初に表示されるプロファイルは「非退出番号2」と表示されており、これは短距離高速進入です。2番目に表示されるのは「3500マイル」と表示されており、これも高速進入ですが、長距離進入を行う場合に使用します。3番目のプロファイルは「非退出番号1」で、その後ろに3500マイルのプロファイルが続きます。つまり、4つの進入プロファイルがあります。1番と3番は短距離、2番と4番は長距離のスクロールです。コールドソークについては、そこ
Роджер, Колумбия. Нам нужно криогенное перемешивание во всех четырех резервуарах в течени
ठीक है। अगर 
好的，乔。我把它还给你，看看我这里有没有。之后，在我们的观测过程中，你希望我们用六分仪观测贝内特彗星；如果能看到它，请记录它的横滚角。理想情况下，它应该在45度到75度之间可见，横滚角大约155度时就会消失。如果我们看
ठीक है। यह 
わかった。69
كانت قيمة DELTA
Sì, ora abbiamo finito
Si je comprends bien, vous souhaitez deux séries sur le numéro 40, lun
알겠습니
Bene. In pratica, è corretto. Lasciate che vi spieghi tutto in modo schematico per un minuto, poi vi leggerò i passaggi. Penso che sarà più chiaro. Lo schema prevede che la palla possa volare verso una serie di angoli che punteranno l'ottica verso la Luna. Ora, in qualsi
Columbia, Houston. Nous avons perdu les données avec Eagle. Pourriez-vous lui demander de sélectionner l'arrière OMNI? À v
ジムさん、ここには興味深い温度データがいくつかありますので、コピーする準備ができている場合はご覧ください
Хорошо. У нас есть требование, которое заключается в
Хорошо, Джим. Мы это учли. Во-первых, вам нужно пройти пошаговую процедуру включения питания для каждой цепи, и мы над этим работаем. Во-вторых, вам нужна процедура повторного включения питания командного модуля, когда вам ну
Hier spricht Frank Borman. Wir haben die Fernsehsendungen genossen und würden uns freuen, wenn Sie auch in Zukunft einschalten, denn es wird Flüge, Rendezvous-Manöver und Erdu
रॉजर। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। मुझे रात के क्षितिज को देखने में कोई परेशानी नहीं हो रही है। मुझे लगता है कि चंद्रमा शायद 
ठीक है। और हमें लगता है कि हमें आपसे कुछ पढ़ने की ज़रूरत होगी। और हमें लगभग उसी समय, जब वहा
Хорошо. Да. И точно; красный шлан
좋습니다, 짐. 오늘 아침 목소리가 좋네요. 이 별들에 대해 간단히 설명해 드리겠습니다. 비행 계획에서 보시다시피, 33번 안타레스, 34번 아트리아, 그리고 40번 알타이르를 관측하도록 예정되어 있습니다. 첫 번째 안타레스는 태양면
收到，信息如下：燃油控制90-100%，氧气73-100%，电流22安培，舱压5.5，保持稳定
알았어, 조. 그리고 네가 그걸 하는 동안, 명령 모듈 체크리스트에 
Хорошо. Загрузка завершена и проверена, 
Roger. We have that. At this point, we've... and getting intermittent noise....
로저, 찰리. 염소 소독 현황에 대해 알려드리겠습니다. B4 칸에는 염소 및 완충액 앰플을 넣는 칸이 8개 있는데, 그중 7개 중 1개는 비어 있고 항상 비어 있었습니다. 따라서 6개가 남아 있습니다. 반대편 B7 칸에도 칸이 7개 있는 용기가 하나 더 있습니다. 따라서 총 7개에 염소 앰플 6개와 완충액 앰플 7개가 들어 있습니다. 저는 매일 염소 앰플과 완충액 앰플을 하나씩 사용하고 있는데, 지금 염소 소독을 하기 전에는 염소 앰플 1개와 완충액 앰
11, Ho
Al momento ne abbiamo 203 e sembra che ci sia bisogno di lavoro, possiamo approvarl
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Die Astros besieg
Ok. Fase 1, BIOMED spento; fase 2, vai su LOW BIT RATE; fase 3, vai su DOWNVOICE BACKUP; fase 4, POWER AMP su PRIME; fase 5, pannello 16, POWER AMP CIRCUIT BREAKER aperto; fase 6, interruttore RANGE FUNCTION spento. Rileggi
那是双子星7号，我确信他们看到了那么
टीआर-5. 
Roger
Roger. Vorremmo chiederti di interrompere l'uso dell'AUTO OPTICS sul sito di pseudo-atterraggio. È necessario che ti man
好的。我们想知道您更喜欢哪种姿态控制模式——您在 Retrofire 更喜欢哪
忙しいのは
Yes, we have to build up pressur
Da
Фотографии, сделан
Roger. Zur Erinnerung: Die Korona ist entlang der Ekliptik etwa 200 Sonnendurchmesser weit sichtbar, 
Эй, Хьюстон — точнее, Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы довольны нашим нынешним положением дел. Мы не хотим, чтобы вы больше тратили бензин, пытаясь это сделать, и имейте
I'm looking out at the stars now. it's not as - it's light, not fully dark. It appears that the window gives you a filter that cuts down the smaller magnitude stars. I'm looking out right now at the Big Dipper and right on down to Arcturus and... and it appears to me that what I'm seeing right now are primarily the second and down to third order stars. The smaller ones are cut pretty well out of the picture at the present time. As you get deeper into night, I think more of them will come out, but you definitely d
Houston, qui 
好的。目前舱内温度约为7
मुझे बिल्कुल पता है; यह तो हमेशा से चल रहा है 
Columbia, Columbia, qui è Houston. 
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。手動で操作できます。必要
ロジャー、ビ
ほら、彼女はそうする。それはよかった
سأطلب منهم التأك
Prévoyez-vous 
और वायु सेना के डी-9 विमान का संचालन - जिस तरह से इसे डिज़ाइन किया गया है, वह मुश्किल है। फिर भी हमने कुछ संचालन किए, अलग-अलग क्रम में, और डी-9 से संबंधित वह जानकारी हासिल कर
أوديسي، هيوستن. لقد حصلنا ل
로저, 11. 두 정장 모두에 물 자국이 있었나요, 아니면 닐 
Хорошо. 400 тыс. — это T
Roger,
로저. 그건 요즘 많은 관심을 받고 있는 주제인데요, 현재 그
That's beau
Ok. Jack dice che dovresti assicurarti di usare il filtro rosso e il portafiltro per quello. Ci vuole un 
Хорошо, давайте пр
On the thruster check, the fire is red in streaks. When the yaw thrusters fire it definitely wipes out the horizon. Can see the horizon all right through the pitch thruste
罗杰。我需要非常精确的位置信息，因为我一次只能扫描大约一个网格方格
Ehi, senti, queste ventole della cab
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस
همم! همم!... قواط
मैंने सुबह 6 बजे एक नया टेप कार्ट्रिज डाला। मैंने अभी-अभी एक और S-6 तस्वीर ली है। यह रेगिस्तानी इलाके की तस्वीर है जिसमें रेत में बनी लंबी अनुदैर्ध्य रेखाएँ दिखाई दे र
Das ist bestätigt. Die Überprüfung des Sekundärkühlers auf Leckagen ist im Flugplan bei 71°20' angegeben. Die entsp
روجر، مايك. T1، 104 32 18؛ T2، 104 37 28. وهذا على بعد 4 أميال جنوبًا. هذا بناءً على موق
आपका मतलब है कि आप...
خلاصة الأمر هي أن الفيت كونغ 
Sì, Jerry, vedo il punto luminoso. È... credo sia il punto subsolare. Mi sembra che sia al largo del Sud America. È una macchia grigiastra rispetto alle acque blu che la circondano. Ha un diametro indefinito
क्या हमें इस पर किसी तरह की छूट म
Ja. Ich glaube – haben Sie während des Sinkflugs irgendwelche 
ح
そうです。今、2、3時間くらい寝ています。エドは
Der Krater in der Bildmitte ist jetzt der Webb-Krater. Wir blicken etwa sechs Minuten vor dem Triebwerksausstieg senkrecht darauf. Er hat einen relativ flachen Boden, und man kann zwei oder drei weitere Krater im unteren Bereich an der Westwand erkennen, also an der Wand, die der Kamera am nächsten ist. Nahe dem unteren Bildrand ist ein kleiner, tiefer liegender Krater zu sehen. Weiter links unten im Bild sieht man eine Reihe von Verti
204. Das ist ja wunderschön, Gus!
Houston, il est très intéressant de noter que lorsque je donne un coup de pied (ici, sans atmosphère, et avec cette gravité), les particules semblent partir, et la plupart o
الجوزاء 4، CSQ. ليس لدينا أي شيء آخر؛ ابقوا ع
Hello Houston. Gemini 
كيف هو م
そうなら
Определенно, он был подо мной. Я следил за ним примерно с Карнарвона. До Карнарвона он был ниже нас, затем поднялся к горизонту, а потом снова опустился ниже. Казалось, что он находится на другой орбите, чем я. У него были другие апогей и перигей, чем у меня. В любом случае, я попытался сблизиться с ним на рассвете, как только смог определить его местоположение. Как я уже сказал, в тот момент он был в миле или двух передо мной — внизу. Поэ
Ok. Quando dici di andare avanti con i residui, int
Хорошо. Плюс 1197 минус 16500 12681 35608, выровнять север, установить звезды, крен 068, тангаж 097, рыскание 356, зазор отсутствует; другое: один, быстрое возвращение, равно 79
अगर ओवरबर्न हो जाता, तो हम उसे ठीक करने
Neil e Buzz, vi parlo al telefono dalla Sala Ovale della Casa Bianca, e questa è sicuramente la telefonata più storica mai fatta. Non riesco proprio a descrivervi quanto siamo tutti orgogliosi di ciò che fate per ogni americano. Questo deve essere il giorno di cui siamo più orgogliosi della nostra vita. E sono sicuro che anche le persone di tutto il mondo si uniscano agli americani nel riconoscere l'immensa impresa che questa è. Grazie a ciò che avete fatto, i cieli sono diventati parte del mondo dell'uomo. E mentre ci parlate dal Mare della Tranquillità, ci ispirate a raddoppiare i nostri sforzi per portare pace e tranquillità sulla Terra. Per un momento inestimabile nell'intera storia dell'uomo, tutte le persone su questa Terra sono veramente una cosa sola; una nell'orgoglio per ciò che avete fatto, e una nelle nostre preghiere 
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। तुम बहुत भा
Звучит отличн
Vas-y, F
그걸 얻으려면 약간
Джим, когда закончишь переставлять вещи и будет удобно, м
Роджер. 06:15, Командир эки
А на карточке «Запрещено» из правил выполнения мисс
Роджер, 11. Возможно, 3 градуса в секунду — это не такая
WHO
لقد قمنا للتو بتركيب ال
さあ、ヒューストン。アポ
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。ロール0度で停止すると、ピッチ角約90度、ヨー角0度、ロール角0度になります。その姿勢から、最初のオプション3を実行してください。その後、0度への移動前か移動中に新しいオプションをアップリンクします。その後、プラットフォームを回転させて2番目のオプション
C'est confirmé. Les deux disjoncteurs du tableau 250 vont s'ouvrir; les deux disjoncteurs du tableau 275 vont s'ouvrir également. Bien, les disjoncteurs du tableau 250 sont déjà réglés. L'onduleur AC 2 est réglé. L'onduleur AC 2 et le bus AC 1 devraient maintenant être hors tension. Les deux derniers 
حسناً يا فريد. على حد 
في الدقيقة 02:30 من اليوم السابق، أثناء فصل الطاقة عن الكابل، أول ما نقوم به هو خطوتان: فتح قاطع الدائرة الرئيسي B، وقاطع دائرة الطاقة الرئيسي B، ثم هناك خطوة ثالثة تقول 
हा
わかりました。コピーする前に、ここで全部読んで、私たちが何を話しているのか理解してもらいましょう。この短い手紙のタイトルは「テレビと映
تم تسليح سلاح
双子座4号，双子座4号，休斯顿 CAP COM。结
好的。RN，RP，加77，400英尺标称高度俯仰角；修正值，400K英尺标称高度；RET 400K英尺，22加02；断电开始，24加43；断电结束，30加01；减速伞，31加37；
罗杰，15分钟前。吉姆，我将向
Beh, preferirei f
Roger.
अब फ्लड लाइटें जल रही हैं, है ना? नहीं, मुझे तो नहीं लगता कि इनकी ज़रूरत है, आपको क्या लगता 
جيم، لقد راجعنا للتو علاماتك فيما يتعلق بالدقة، وتبين أنها قريبة جدًا من القيمة المثلى النظرية، بفارق لا يتجاوز بضعة أجزاء من الألف من الدرجة. ويبدو أن جهاز التكامل يؤكد 
Columbia, this is Houston. Would you please give us in ACCEPT. We've got a load for you. Break. Eagle, 
Non. Je l'ai vu hier, mais no
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Мы снова потеряли их из виду на в
好了，别说了，我继续。谁在呼叫双子座4
Apollo 11, Houston. Ich frage mich, ob Sie die Genauigkeit Ihrer Zustandsvektoren mit derjenigen de
Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили поворот на 9
ठीक है। हम ज़रूर कोशिश
Roger. Sie sehen die Erde, so wie wir sie sehen, durch unser linkes Fenster – etwas mehr als die Hälfte der Erde. Wir blicken auf den östlichen Pazifik und die nördliche Hälfte des oberen Bildschirmbereichs. Dort sehen wir Nordamerika, Alaska, die Vereinigten Staaten, Kanada, Mexiko und Mittelamerika. Südamerika verschwindet knapp jenseits des Terminators oder im Schatten. Die Ozeane erscheinen deutlich blau, weiße Bänder großer Wolkenformationen ziehen über die Erde, und wir können Küstenlinie
Понял. Нам нужны показания положения ваших переключателей и OAMS, а также бортовые пока
好的，水
Abbiamo perso
أبلغوا غوايماس عن أعداد عمليات الإرجاع، وقراءات نظام معلومات السلامة على متن المركبة، والتقديرات - 
I am going to switch to UHF at this time. Yo
いや、正確にはヒューストン。ジム、ロックオンに成功したようで
Little bumpy along about her
Apollo 11, this is Houston. We're going to hand over from Madrid to Goldstone at 151 hours even. If you should 
Exact
Ro
――ここにあります。今は10.
私たちが知る限り、ここで
罗杰。033 0000，左转 17，加 0883，减 16500 12955 36185；天狼星，参宿七 129，155 010，两台喷气发动机空载，20 秒，Bravo 和 Delta 四联装发动机。点火时 24 度线上的地平线，
Wir werden das S
吉姆，A电池已经充满电了。你想什么时候断开连接都没
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir holen Sie jetzt über Bermuda ab. Ich habe Ihre Rüc
11, ह्य
Non, ça va, Vance. Avant de nous en préoccuper, il nous reste encore une primaire et trois secondair
هذا الشيء غير مت
Roger. Copia il timer della tua missione, ora è statico. - 
I did
Definitely below me. I'd been tracking it below me from about Carnarvon on. Up until about Carnarvon we had it below us, and then up to the horizon, and then down below us again. It almost looked like it was in a different orbit than I was. It had a different apogee and perigee than what I did. Anyway, I attempted to close with it at daylight as soon as I could tell where it was. A
انت
Da draußen sind zwei Schalter; da draußen sind zwei Schalter – B
حسنًا. نحن نراه كجزء ساطع من قر
RESET, AUS und NIEDRIG. Okay. Beleuchtungssammelschiene aus; Außenbeleuchtung aus. Okay. Willst du die Sicherungen holen, Jim? Wir sollten wohl wieder auf die breite Totzone zurü
로저, 알겠습
حسنًا. من جودريل بانك، إنجلترا، عبر وكالة أسوشيتد برس: توقف تلسكوب جودريل بانك الراديوي البريطاني الضخم عن استقبال الإشارات من مركبة لونا 15 الفضائية السوفيتية غير المأهولة التي أُرسلت إلى القمر، وذلك في تمام الساعة 5:49 صباحًا بتوقيت شرق الولايات المتحدة اليوم. وقال متحدث باسم المرصد إن المركبة الفضائية لونا 15 بدت وكأنها "تجاوزت القمر". وفي تصريح آخر، قال متحدث باسم السير برنارد لوفيل، مدير المرصد: "لا نعتقد أنها هبطت". واشنطن، وكالة يونايتد برس إنترناشونال: دعا نائب الرئيس سبيرو تي. أغنيو إلى إرسال إنسان إلى المريخ بحلول عام 2000، لكن قادة الحزب الديمقراطي ردوا بأن الأولوية يجب أن تُعطى للاحتياجات على الأرض. ويبدو أن أغنيو، المسؤول الحكومي الرفيع الذي حضر إطلاق أبولو 11 يوم الأربعاء، كان يتحدث باسمه وليس بالضرورة باسم إدارة نيكسون عندما قال: "في رأيي، يجب أن نرسل إنسانًا إلى المريخ بحلول نهاية هذا القرن". لاريدو، تكساس، وكالة أسوشيتد برس: أعلن مسؤولو الهجرة في نويفو لاريدو يوم الأربعاء أنه سيتم رفض منح بطاقات سياحية لدخول المكسيك للهيبيين ما لم يستحموا ويقصوا شعرهم. قال هوبيرتو كازاراس، رئيس إدارة الهجرة المكسيكية في نويفو لاريدو، إن السلطات في مكسيكو سيتي وأكابولكو وغيرها من المواقع السياحية الشهيرة قد تلقت شكاوى بشأن مجموعة من الهيبيين. وذكرت وكالة يونايتد برس إنترناشونال أن رد الفعل الأولي على قرار الرئيس نيكسون بمنح يوم الاثنين عطلة رسمية للموظفين الفيدراليين للاحتفال بيوم وطني لإحياء ذكرى مهمة أبولو 11 للهبوط على سطح القمر، كان في معظمه دهشة. وكتب رودني بيدنر، من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في لندن: "أوروبا مفتونة بمهمة أبولو 11. فقد ملأت الصحف في جميع أنحاء القارة صفحاتها بصور صاروخ ساتورن 5 وهو ينطلق ليُنشئ أول اتصال بين الأرض وقمرها الطبيعي. وقد بذل كتّاب العناوين جهدًا كبيرًا في ابتكار كلمات تُشيد بهذا الإنجاز. فقد أعلنت صحيفة لو فيغارو الفرنسية، التي خصصت أربع صفحات لتقارير من كيب كانافيرال ورسومات توضيحية للمهمة
Okay. He is on his wa
开始燃烧
All right. I read bac
Хорошо, и у вас всё отлично получается. Приятно, что нет всего этого шума. Позвольте мне рассказать, что я хочу сделать, Джим. Как я уже сказал, мы не будем сейчас давать вам подробные инструкции. Вскоре мы предоставим вам инструкции в следующей форме. Во-первых, у нас будет временная шкала, своего рода план полета, на которой будут указаны время всех основных событий, а также любые конфигурации, настройки переключателей и так далее, которые являются специфическими для нашей конфигурации и которые, следовательно, вы не найдете в контрольном списке. Это, например, будет касаться способа включения питания командного модуля; и, во-вторых, конечно, у нас будут все пометки в контрольном списке, чтобы вы могли вводить данные в контрольный список, где это возможн
Ja, ich habe zwei Sterne 
Gut, Jim. Du klingst heute Morgen gut. Wir möchten dir kurz die Sterne erklären. Wie du im Flugplan sehen kannst, sind die Sterne Antares 
Fred, wegen dieser improvisierten Lithiumhydroxid-Kanister für das Kommandomodul: Wir müssen mindestens zwei davon bauen und jeweils zwei gleichzeitig verwenden – einen an jedem Schlauchsatz. Wir verbinden einen dieser improvisierten Kästen mit den roten Anschlüssen, dann wird Luft
Okay, Jack. Starting at the top. Okay. The CRYO TANKS; H2 1 is reading 230 and the same for 2. Our O2 CRYO TANK 1 is - looks like it's barely holding its own at 300. And, CRYO TANK 2 is H2 1 is reading 73, 2, 74. On the O2 side, we're reading O2 1 at quantity, 76; O2 pegged to full scale high. RAD TEMPs PRIMARY INLET, we're reading about 55; RAD OUT is reading about 30, and the SECONDARY OUTLET is reading - reading 52 degrees. And the EVAP OUT TEMP is 45, STEAM PRESSURE 0.17, and GLYCOL DISCHARGE 48. SUIT COMPRESSOR is reading zip. The ACCUM is reading 30; H2O WASTE is reading about 34; POTABLE's reading about 98; SECONDARY RAD INLET is reading about 71; and the RAD OUT is about 30; GLYCOL EVAP TEMP is reading 65, STEAM PRESSURE pegged full scale high; DIS
Houston, come leggi ad
Это «Дружба Семь». Я на мгновение отойду от плана полета и попробую разобраться получше: мы дрейфуем по рысканию. Я отключаю ав
روجر، ال
分かりました。今入って診察しま
キャプテン・コマンダーからのメッセージ
Te voilà encore embourbé, 
Хорошо. Вот, 
Apollo 11, Houston. Hai un puntino
Wassermann, Hous
3.3 on the DELTA
わかりました。パネル4：TELCOMM、グループ1、AC1へ。次の回路ブレーカーを閉じます：、グループ1を押してメインB；、グループ2を押してメインB；、TEMP、メインB；、セカンダリーループトランスデューサー、メインB；RAD、コントロール/ヒーター、メインB；BATリレーバス、BAT B；BATチャージャー、BAT B、チャージ - またはBへ、チャージ；インバーターコントロール、2；インバーターコントロール、1；センサー信号、AC1；センサー信号メインB；センサーユニット、ACバス1；廃水/飲用水、メインB；計器、ESS、メインB；それは必須、メインB。分かっていますか
حسنًا. لقد حصلت على قيم مضخمات الطاقة الآن، مع إضافة ساعتين إلى وقت التشغيل؛ 38.030، بالإضافة إلى 08330، ناقص 00509، ناقص 02139، غير متوفر، بالإضافة إلى 00205، 08615، 4:24،
Okay, Jim. We copied that. First of all, you want to go through the circuit by circuit breaker caref
这已经是我能调到的最接近零的数值了。现在是凌晨 2 点 17 分 49 秒，我的呼吸频率为零，姿态也为零，或者说零度、零
Хорошо. Те же комментарии. Начну сначала. Хорошо. "БАЛАНСИРУЮЩАЯ ПАРА" следует изменить на "ВЫКЛ". Ниже, "LMP" на "JET". Убрать "
هيوستن، قاعدة الهدوء. بما أن لدين
10 secondi. 5, 4, 3, 2, 
حسنًا يا فانس، الأمر ليس كذلك - نحن لا ننظر إلى الشمس - ما نحصل عليه هو انعكاس كبير من الشمس خلفنا
«Аполлон-8», 
Apollo 11, Houston. Mancano tr
जब आप फोन पर बात कर रहे हों, तो कृपया ध्यान दें कि हमारी गणना के अनुसार आपके यहाँ पीने का पानी जल्द ही खत्म हो सकता है। साथ ही, आपके हाइड्रोजन टैंक स
Plus 59578, minus 00086, minus 05287, 012 080 018, not applicable, plus 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, earth up 005, right 27, plus 0398, plus 06500 13215 36961; Sirius Rigel 137 311 339, no ullage, assume execution of flyby maneuver, uses stable alignment as the flyby; time of 5 for GERU determination
D'accord, vous avez réduit la pression à 1,7, et à quelle vale
잠시만 
फोकस अनंत पर है। आपको इसे अनंत पर ही छोड़ देना चाहिए; इसमें कोई शक नहीं। अब ज़ूम की बात करें तो, हो सकता है वे आपको क्षितिज, ज़मीन या 
"태양 코로나 및 태양 가장자리 밝아짐 사진"이라고 적힌 블록에서 "그리고 태양 가장자리 밝아짐 사진"을 지우고 "태양 코로나, 선택
Il faudra prolong
Wie geht es Ihnen – werd
ठीक है, जिम। पृष्ठ 2-107 पर, हम आपको वह वाक्य हट
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们对画面的清晰度和细节非常满意。色彩——现在，我在显示器上看到的画面真是太棒了，由于电视转换器的转换，这比电视台播出要慢大约12秒。我们正在查看主显示控制台上的控制按钮。可以看到面板上
في هذه المرحلة، لدي بالتأكيد شعور بالطيران مع انحراف بزاوية 90 درجة، وميلان ي
Sono passato alla trasmissione e registrazione VOX. Sono soddisfatto di poter vedere l'imbardata attraverso la finestra senza usare il reticolo, lasciando che le immagini arrivino da tutti i lati. È solo questione di poco tempo prima che gli oggetti mo
Р
बस किसी त
Okay. Kleben Sie den Rotfilter auf das Teleobjektiv. Dieser Rotfilter ist der 25A-Rotfilter, nicht der, der sich im Rot- und Blaufilterhalter
地面所有系
أبولو 8، هيوستن. إذا استطعت وضع مرشح الاستقطاب أمام الكاميرا دون التأثير على أي شيء آخر، فقد يحسن ذ
フレッド、その話はもうほぼできています。今、確認中です。この質問は後回しにしたいと思います。基本的には、現状維持で、現状の状況をそのまま受け入れるつもりです。そして、フリーリターンに戻るには、燃焼中のどの地点でも最大毎秒約5フィートのミッドコース速度が必要です。これが、基本的にこの燃焼のミッションルールです。後ほど、18ページ、残り1分のところで「マ
3分経過。燃料と酸素は
11，这里是休斯顿。中航程修正第5次，RCS/G&N：26025，俯仰和偏航配平NA，TIG 150 29 5453，-00048，加上所有球，加上00001 075 159 328；HA NA；HP 加上00230 00048 011 00048；六分仪星号03 0908 382。Bore
У нас на борту один основной баллон и один дополнительный. Другой основной баллон находится перед площадкой Z. Кон
Es gibt einen Stern, der dort erscheint. Um welchen Stern es sich
わかり
네. 색깔을 보면, 바다는 전체적으로 진한 파란색이고, 구름은 당연히 밝은 흰색입니다. 지표면에 반사된 빛은 달빛보다 훨씬 더 크게 보입니다. 육지는 대체로 갈색을 
روجر
ロジャー、ヒューストン。マイナス 11、/: 45597、
わかっています、わかっています — 2
Roger. Procediamo con l'acceleratore... controlla se non hai il controllo del giunto c
Looks like you've got som
Водолей, Хью
Okay. Genug vom Mond, Charlie. Wir bereiten jetzt einige Innenaufnah
Ok, NOUN 01, INVIO; 3011, I
एक और बात जो खराबी की प्रक्रिया से संबंधित है। कल शायद आपको इसकी चिंता न करनी पड़े, लेकिन पृष्ठ F119 पर डॉकिंग के अंतर्गत खराबी सूची में, टनल के नीचे उच्च O2 
Okay. Understand. I knew we had another O2 and H2 purge coming up in the morning; I wasn't sure whether you wanted to go through with this o
أبولو 8. سنبدأ عملية ال
ओके एनएसआर 03 47 34; 61.6; 01 प्लस 22; यॉ शून्य, प
Vorrei fare un piccolo commento sul sestante. Il suo utilizzo in una navicella spaziale angusta è molto difficile, soprattutto con il casco. Alla fine ho deciso che sarebbe stato inutile con il casco per cercare di catturare gli angoli richiesti dalle stelle. Così mi sono tolto il casco. Questo mi ha dato un po' più di flessibilità nell'uso, ma ero comunque limitato ad angoli di circa 20-23° senza manovrare la navicella. Quello che succedeva era che la stella veniva tagliata fuori dalla parte superiore della finestra. Ora, con manovre più frequenti e libere della navicella, si poteva manovrarla in modo da avere l'asse longitudinale della finestra nel piano di inseguimento. Eravamo in qualche modo limitati dal carburante e non abbiamo scelto di manovrare in questo modo. Abbiamo usato anche la modalità a impulsi, senza molte manovre. Le stelle selezionate per quella prova avevano angoli piuttosto elevati rispetto all'orizzonte e, quindi, erano molto difficili da ottenere. Alla fine abbiamo deciso di procedere e di avvicinare le stelle un po' di più all'orizzonte. Ne ho eseguiti un paio con Canopus e un paio con altri, come noterete. Il filtro blu sembrava bloccare completamente l'orizzonte; non avevo orizzonte quando l'ho usato. La nostra immagine dell'orizzonte probabilmente non è altrettanto buona quando c'è la luce della luna. Il filtro verde, invece, mi ha dato quello che considererei un orizzonte un po' più nitido rispetto a quello che avevo senza filtro. Ho pensato che non ci fossero difficoltà nell'effettuare queste misurazioni né con il filtro verde né con quello trasparente. Tuttavia, l'orizzonte non è molto ben definito e bisogna in un certo senso standardizzarsi e misurare sulla stessa parte dell'orizzonte che si era usata prima per ottenere una misurazione standard. Per me è stato più facile misurare senza filtro fino alla sommità dell'airg
روجر، 
收到。请你从飞行数据文件、地面检查清单、任务规则
了解。テレビ撮影のために地球の方角に向ける時間を十分に取って
好的。再往前大约10英尺，还有一块更大的、非常圆润的石头。离你最近的
罗杰，弗兰克。北纬7度38分，西经165度的着陆区，云量显示云底高度2000英尺（约610米），云底高度12000英尺（约360米），云顶高度10英尺（约31米）；风向东，风速12节，涌浪4英尺（约1.2米），气温约82华氏度（约28摄氏度）。该区域约10%至30%的范围内会有阵雨，云底高度约2000英尺（约610米）。如果该区域出现雷暴，云底高度可能在500英尺（约
ज़मीनी स्तर पर सिस्टम फिलहाल सामान्य दिख रहे हैं। तापमान थोड़ा ज़्यादा है, लेकिन कोई गंभीर समस्या नहीं दिख रही
Даже мистер Крафт и
Роджер. Мы не получаем от вас телеметрические данные из-за слабого сигнала. Вот они снова появятся. Я думаю, нам потребуется от 15 минут до получаса, чтобы увидеть увеличение потока кислорода из-за размеров кабины и, конечно же, небольшого размера сливного отверстия. Конец
아
Роджер. Хорошо вас понял, всё чётко и ясно. — У меня ещё осталось около 3 г заряда. Капсула работает очень хорошо. Команда Ra
我们只有 45-1 和 16-1
Okay, verstanden? Sie möchten, dass wir den Ladevorgang der Batterie für ein
你为什么不试着爬到
Good. I copy 0.04, 0.64, 0.25. T
Это «Дружба Семь». Автоматический реверсивный сброс выключен. Селектор режимов работает нормально, управление скоростью, гироскоп в норме. Все Т-образные рукоятки в
Roger, nous comprenons. Il s'agit uniquement d'un pro
Houston, Apollo 11. Avez-vous besoin d'aide pour que les missiles 
अब म
Okay, Gene, ich erkläre dir zuerst die Sache mit dem Anzug, damit alle a
Hawai
Das stimmt,
ठीक है। अ
悄悄靠近你，弗兰克。正对着你，偏左
레트로 스타일, 아주 부드
Odyssey, Houston. Sie kö
オー
数秒後にハワイからゴールドストーンへ引き継ぎます。一時的に通信が途絶
Возможно, это как-то связано
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 높은 수익을 되찾고 싶으신가요
Куда бы вы ни отправились, всегда приятно вернуться 
फ्रैंक, ज़रा रुकिए; हम उसे ढूंढेंगे। इस बीच, बिल के लिए हाई बिट रेट पर आवाज़ की क्वालिटी बहुत अच्छी है, इसलिए अगर वह ज़रूरी बातें रिकॉर्ड करने के लिए सीमित समय के लिए हाई बिट रेट का इस्तेमाल करना चाहता है, तो हम उसे ऐसा करने की सलाह देते हैं। हम चाहेंगे कि वह इसे चालू करने के बाद बोलने से पहले 
فريد، ملاحظة واحدة بخصوص الطلبات: بعد ساعة أو أقل م
Pour le contrôle d'attit
ठीक है, जिम। जब आप ओरिएंटेशन को थोड़ा और तेज़ी से नीचे ला सकें, तो हम बॉडी-एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट करेंगे जो 400 प्लस 5 पर है। अगर इस समय बॉल ऊपर
嗯，这是其中之一。我们想跟你们说说我之前跟吉姆说过的关于控制的事
それがロジャーです
أخبرني. هل قم
أبولو 8، هيوستن. انته
D'accord. Je comprends mieux. Je vais en parler à l'équipe télé et voir ce qu'ils en pensent. En complément, ils souhaitaient prendre des photos de la Terre avec un Hasselblad, à travers la fenêtre de rendez-vous, avec les filtres rouge et bleu et un film noir et blanc, puis à nouveau avec un filtre polarisant. Le but est d'établir une corrélation entre les images télévisuelles et les photos argentiques classiques. Si vous pensez que c'est une bonne idée et que vous souhaitez tenter l'expérience, je vais en parler à Jack et à l'équipe télé pour voir s'ils seraient intéressés par l'utilisation du grand angle. On pourra en dis
Je désactive l'enregistreur biomédical n° 1 pour le moment. Ceci diffère du
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, इन निर्देशों में हमने चंद्रमा की तस्वीरें लेने के लिए कोई व्यवस्था नहीं की है। अगर आप कार्यक्रम समाप्त होन
Right. Well, we are seeing the entire earth now including the terminator. Course we can't see anything past the terminator at all. Are you able with your binoculars to see the dark horizon? Anything past the terminato
حسنًا، إذا لم أف
저희는
Хороший показатель поражения наземных ц
了解。パワーアップしてヘッズアップの姿勢になるよりは、今まで通りのやり方で続けた方がいいと思う。ハワイ上空でダンプを
好的，没问题。吉姆，我有两点要跟你汇报。第一点是关于寻找贝内特彗星的程序，具体细节我得等杰克起床后再告诉你。第二点是关于提前3小时进入大气层，我想范斯昨晚跟你提过这有可能，我
هل ترانا في الأفق
Ascolta, non mi raderò più. Sono così carina che non piacerò più a nessuno
Давайте посмотрим. В Спрингфилде, штат Миссури, Микки Оуэн, ветеран-кетчер «Бруклин Доджерс», вошедший в историю как игрок, пропустивший третий страйк и приведший «Нью-Йорк Янкиз» к победе над «Доджерс» в Мировой серии 1941 года, решил, что его запомнят не только по спортивному рекорду. Сорок пять мальчиков и девочек получили пони, которых он им предложил. Этих юных дарителей попросили прислать письма, в которых они бы рассказали, как бы они ухаживали за пони. Когда письма посыпались, он добавил пять пони к уже предложенным 20; и другие дарители добавили еще 20. И Микки Оуэн сказал: «Я думал, что получу около 45 писем, но в итоге их оказалось около 900». А теперь на главной странице: В Веллингтоне, Новая Зеландия, около пятидесяти мужчин сегодня за столом отведали традиционную индейку с клюквенным соусом на Южном полюсе, но Рождество также имело восточный колорит. В меню были сукияки, приготовленные членами японской экспедиции, пересекающей Антарктический континент и остановившейся на день на полярной базе ВМС США. В Сан-Диего, штат Калифорния, члены экипажа захваченного разведывательного судна «Пуэбло» пожертвовал
コロン
Na gut. Mir ist hier oben nicht langweilig. Ich bin vorhin über Midway geflogen. Habe mir das gut angesehen. Ich bin jetzt auf euch zu – natürlich nördlich von euch. Ich habe Gene Duret meinen Zwischenbericht gegeben – falls er mich auf Kurzwelle empfangen kann. Eigentlich 
야, 그거 좋은 생각이야
Roger. Je suis prêt. Tous les systèmes sont opérationnels. Je suis en mode automatique; la manœuvre est désactivée. Mon bypass TR-10 est réglé sur normal. Les indicateurs de carburant et d'oxygène sont au vert. Tout est au vert.
ما سنحاول القيام به هو العودة إلى دورة النوم إلى فترات النوم السا
ATCA (PGNS) は閉じたままにしてください。3列目の4つのブレーカーは閉じる必要があります。ヒーター、信号コンディショナー1、そしてATCA 
罗杰，11。我们希望你在84小时
Je le crois, Ken. Cette bande est parallèle à la ligne M, et je pense que c'est lié à la conception de l'optique, notamment à l'entrée rectangulaire extérieure. À cet angle solaire précis, elle la traverse complètement. J'ai remarqué que la Terre et le Soleil produisent le même effet sur le télescope de balayage. Dans le sextant, la même bande lumineuse est présente, bien qu'elle couvre tout son champ de vision. Cependant, le grossissement permet de bien distinguer les étoiles, et il est possible de les marquer. Mais l'identification des étoil
أستخدم مقياس الضوء الآن لأ
Roger. Gemini 8, Houston. Vorremmo aggiornarvi sulla situazione COMM mentre abbiamo un po' di tempo libero. Saremo a Tananarive tra altri 2 minuti; vi verremo a prendere su Carnarvon a Carnarvon; po
알겠습니다. 방금 설명드린 단계가 다소 복잡하다고 하더군요. 제가 방금 알려드린 지침을 따라 카메라를 미리 설치해 두시는 게 좋을 것 같습니다. 제대로 설치되면
Êt
O
로저, 프렌드십 세븐, 세 축 모두 자동 제어 모드이고 수동 조작으로 백업 중이라는 것
전화하셨나요? 헬멧은 벗어서 보관했고... 팔 보호대도 보관했고, 안전벨트도 풀고 보관했습니다. 어깨 보
Roger. ATTITUDE, pas de changement; échelle, 5/5, pas de changement; 
로저, 월리, 전국에서 생방송으로 시청하고 있는 모든 분들께 하실 말씀 있으신
Хорошо. Тридцать секунд. Автоматичес
我们进展顺利
はい、2 つの星が見えました。戻ってきて
Okay. Over to my right are the Pyrenees Mountains coming up, and we're just about over Messier and Pickering right now. Our first initial point is easily seen from our altitude. We're getting quite a bit of contrast as we appear - as we approach the terminator. The view appears to be good, no reflection of the sun back to our eyes; it appears that visibility at this particular spot is excellent. It's very easy to pick out our first initial point; and over this 
Okay. That's correct except for the second circuit breaker on panel 250, which is CB BA
फ्रेड, हमारी स्क्रीन का लगभग एक चौथाई हिस्सा रोशन है और अभी यह पता लगाना असंभव है कि आप क्या देख रहे हैं। शायद आप हमें थोड़ा मौखिक विवरण दे
Columbia, Houston. The coordinate
Okay. You can see that he's taking his scissors and cutting the plastic end off a little nozzle that he
«Дружба Семь», это Muchea Com Tech. Как
هل تعلم ما الذي من
Bene. L'Apollo 11 rimane la notizia principale, con il mondo che attende il tuo atterraggio oggi, intorno alle 11:49 ora di Houston. A Washington, i riformatori fiscal
Je vous entends
それは液体のフロンかネオンか、あるいは冷赤外線
تتراو
चलिए देखते हैं, हम क्रॉस टाई
ज़्यादा फ़र्क़ नहीं पड़ा। मैं पहले 2 इंच तक तो आसानी से ठोक पाया, लेकिन फिर जैसे-जैसे मैं उसे पूरी ताकत से ठोकता गया, और दूसरे वाले को ठोकने के लिए मुझे हथौड़े पर दोनों हाथ रखने पड़े, और एक्सटेंशन रॉड के ऊपरी हिस्से में काफ़ी गहरे निशान पड़ गए, फिर भी वो ज़्यादा अंदर नहीं जा पाया। मुझे लगता है कि कुल गहराई लगभग 8 या 9 इंच ही रही होगी। लेकिन वहाँ भी, पता नहीं क्यों, वो सीधा खड़ा नहीं हो पा रहा था। दूसरे शब्दों में, मैं उसे ठोकता रहता और वो किसी तरह का गड्ढा तो खोद लेता, लेकिन वो इतना अंदर तक नहीं जाता कि उसे 
Хорошо. Отлично, Фрэнк. Ещё один момент — ребята в задней комнате хотели бы посмотреть, какое будет значение разницы температур на телеметрии, когда все проснутся, — если ты включишь оба вентилятора в салоне примерно на 5 минут, — они хотели бы увидеть, какая разница температур будет на телеметрии, когда спадет застой и поя
Okay
알겠습니다. 1번 항목을 보면 두 번째 항목으로 12시간 켈빈 저온 유지(콜드 소크)가 있는데, 여기 논의와 비행 전 점검에서 저온 유지는 하지 않는 것이 좋겠다는 데 의견이 일치했습니다. 따라서 2단계는 삭제하겠습니다. 요컨대, 저온 유지는 해야 하고, 특히 이전에 보일러 하나가 말라버린 적이 있었기 때문에 입항 전에 보일러를 점검하여 건조 상태를 확인하는 것이 중요하다고 생각합니다. 이를 위한 절차를 마련 중이며, 추후에 다시 알려드리겠습니다. 빌이 통화 중일 때 모두가 동시에 정보를 공유할 수 있도록 하겠습니다. 8단계와 9
내 창문은 더 이상 빛이 들어오지 않는데도 별이 보이지 않아요. 만약 세상에 낮과 지평선에서 동시에 별을 볼 수 있
哥伦比亚，休
أظن أنني شر
アクエリアス、ヒュー
Jim, concernant la fenêtre 5, j'ai un schéma ici; et, une fois amarrés, l'angle entre les axes Z des deux vaisseaux est d'environ 60 degrés. Il semble qu'en regardant pa
Buonasera. Vorrei discutere con voi alcuni degli aspetti più simbolici del volo della nostra missione, l'Apollo 11. Mentre discutevamo degli eventi accaduti negli ultimi 2 o 3 giorni qui a bordo della nostra navicella spaziale, siamo giunti alla conclusione che questo è stato molto più di un viaggio di tre uomini verso la Luna; più, ancora, degli sforzi di un team governativo e industriale; più, persino, degli sforzi di una sola nazione. Riteniamo che questo rappresenti un simbolo dell'insaziabile curiosità di tutta l'umanità di esplorare l'ignoto. La dichiarazione di Neil l'altro giorno, quando ha messo piede per la prima volta sulla superficie della Luna: "Questo è un piccolo passo per un uomo, ma un grande balzo per l'umanità", credo riassuma molto bene questi sentimenti. Abbiamo accettato la sfida di andare sulla Luna; l'accettazione di questa sfida era inevitabile. La relativa facilità con cui abbiamo portato a termine la nostra missione, cred
Ja, ich bezweifle, dass sie selbst am Samstag, wenn 
Роджер. Кажется, мы включили высокое усиление; теперь автоматическое отслежива
推進剤の量は60
तो कोई समस्या नहीं है। आपके सभी उपभोग्य सामग्रियों का उपयोग निर्ध
जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, वैंस, लगभग आधे घंटे पहले, जैक औ
是的
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。GOです。オーバ
罗杰。DELTA-H 更新如下：，，
아
オイラーズからはウェ
11
Roger. Guardando il piano di volo, hai un atterraggio previsto alle ore 10:00, e dovremo farne un altro alle 10:00 in preparazio
Tu dois... à
Okay, Apollo 8. That's - that's correct. You're on high bit rate, and we're afraid you may run out before the burn, so we'd like to dump it, and give it back to you with a full load 
روجر. وأعتقد أن هذا يتبع، لكن نقطة الحضيض لديك مرتفعة قليلاً الآن أيضاً؛ لذلك سيؤدي ذلك إلى إعادتها - إلى الأ
네, T/M은 괜찮습니다. 잠깐만 기다려 주세요. 플라이트 
نعم. أعتقد أنني لم أفهم ما هو الحرف والرقم الموجودان خلف بعض أهداف التصوي
지금 화물을 보내드리고 있습니다
아폴로 8호, 휴스
罗杰。哦，对，没错，我也没吃那片吐司。那片吐司就是我们
罗杰。9号面板已配置为甚高频接收。您为什么想让我用高频发射？为什么您想让我处于收发模
Vorremmo che tu riflettessi su questa modalità di controllo, Jim, e vedessi se pensi che possa funzionare in base a quello che sai al momento. Siamo un po' scettici, ma vorremmo sottoporti a questa domanda. Quindi, una volta che hai raggiunto un assetto abbastanza buono, monitora, vai su IMPULSO MINIMO, come abbiamo fatto noi, e imposta una v
没问题，吉姆。打开它们吧
Das war ein 
That's what the met
好的。我们观察到云台中间角度有点高。虽然看起来姿态控制正常，但还是想让您知道我们会密切
I just saw a falling star trail
Buonasera. Vorrei discutere con voi alcuni degli aspetti più simbolici del volo della nostra missione, l'Apollo 11. Mentre discutevamo degli eventi accaduti negli ultimi 2 o 3 giorni qui a bordo della nostra navicella spaziale, siamo giunti alla conclusione che questo è stato molto più di un viaggio di tre uomini verso la Luna; più, ancora, degli sforzi di un team governativo e industriale; più, persino, degli sforzi di una sola nazione. Riteniamo che questo rappresenti un simbolo dell'insaziabile curiosità di tutta l'umanità di esplorare l'ignoto. La dichiarazione di Neil l'altro giorno, quando ha messo piede per la prima volta sulla superfi
C'est exact, Jack. Bien, page 2-5. La première ligne, où il y avait « Vérification de l'horizon », s'appelle maintenant « Vérification du coucher de lune » et 
All'inizio, l'operazione con il telescopio a scansione ci ha impedito di iniziare immediatamente gli avvistamenti come avevamo programmato, a causa di un'altra manovra evasiva. Lo scarico del telescopio ha causato un'enorme quantità di pseudo-stelle nella zona, rendendo praticamente impossibile la calibrazione ottica. Il metodo che avevamo elaborato non sembrava funzionare molto bene. Il metodo che ho infine utilizzato è stato quello di andare verso Sirio, la nostra stella più luminosa, prendere l'albero e il perno di appoggio e poi far volare la navicella fino a Sirio per usarli per l'ottica, cosa che abbiamo fatto in un secondo momento. Per quanto riguarda la dispersione della luce, sembra che a quasi qualsiasi assetto durante il nostro controllo termico passivo, riceviamo dispersione della luce nel telescopio a s
Gemin
Ciao Kano. Sono Sigma Seven. State arrivando entrambi distrutti ma lucidi
Apollo 8, H
Хорошо. Всё верно. Клапан управления основным испарительным
That's affirmative. What we want
ニールとバズ、私はホワイトハウスのオーバルルームから電話であなたたちに話してい
حسنًا. نحن بصدد مراجعة إجراءات منتصف الدورة، ولدينا استفسار بخصوص الوضع الحالي لأحد المفاتيح. هذا المفتاح هو مفتاح الحالة (STATUS) الموجود على اللوحة رقم 6
Insérez entre « enregistreur à bande » et « ENREGISTREMENT AVANT », insérez « RÉINITIALISAT
Friendship Seven, qui è il chirurgo di Zanzibar. Pressione sanguigna 136 sistolica dopo l'esercizio, buona, in calo a poco meno di 90 per la diastolica. Entram
네. 예전에는 3개 사면 1개 무료였는데, 무슨 일이 있었나요
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अब रंग बेहतर दिख रहा है। यह स्पष्ट हो रहा है।
Gémeaux 4, Gémeaux 4, Carnarvon. Je vous reçoi
11, Houston. Vous pouvez commencer la purge de la pile à combustible à oxygène dès maintenant si vous le souhai
好的，接下来是云台驱动。上，下，归零。上，下
Das ist bestätigt. Wir möchten die von uns erhaltenen Informationen mit Ihren abgleichen, um die Plattform gegebenenfalls zu aktualisieren. Jim, wir versuchen eigentlich herauszufin
Io - Personalmente sono
Roger, Gemini 4. Meteo per S-6. Cercare eventuali nuvole sottovento alle Canarie e all'isola di Madeira per fotografie oblique. Posizi
Roger. Lo faremo la prossima volta che 
这里有个挺有意思的小新闻，听起来挺不错的。密歇根州安娜堡市出现了一个新的青少年帮派，名叫吉尔内特帮（Gilnet Gang）。他们秘密地在安娜堡的街头游荡，有时甚至会绕过法律。他们自称“行善游击队”（Guerillas for Good）。他们做过的一些事包括：在一个晚上，他们把一座被污言秽语涂满的
Das ist Sigma Seven, das die Effekte eines Rückenflugs bei Sonnenaufgang mit 90 Grad Gierwinkel simuliert. Die Flugrichtung ist für dich am deutlichsten erkennbar. Wie beim Blick aus einem Zugfenster. Du siehst die Landschaft an dir vorbeiziehen. Es gibt Wolken 
イーグル、ヒューストン。待機してください。確認します。それから、イーグル、ヒューストン。火災の状況を報告し
わかりました、
حسنًا. ما زلنا مدينين لك بالتأكيد على أنه يمكنك توقع أن يكون التمرير عالي السرعة هو النمط الأول الذي ستصادفه، وسأخبرك بمجر
Хорошо. В разделе «Включение питания» первая строка гласит: «АВТО ВЫБОР, 16, ВЫКЛ.». Хорошо. Можете просто удалить эту часть. В пятой строке написано «ПИТАНИЕ ЛОГИЧЕСКОГО АВТОМАТИЧЕСКОГО ВЫКЛЮЧАТЕЛЯ», на самом деле это «ЛОГИЧЕСКАЯ ШИНА, четыре из них, замкнута». DELTA-V CG не ва
Giusto. Ora abbiamo alcune istruzioni aggiuntive nel caso in cui questo non funzioni. Dicono 20 secondi pieni, Frank, su quell'ALC. Ci vogliono 20 secondi pieni senza interruzioni affinché l'ALC funzioni correttamente. Ora, se queste procedure che 
Игл, Хьюстон. Можете продолжать в соот
ヒューストン、こちらアポロ8号です。通常のSバンドで放送しています。1、2、3、4、5、5、4、3、2、1。聞こえますか？オーバー
È uno spettacolo fantastico, Bill. Sembra... una picco
Roger, Buzz. The attitude that we're in right now is a convenient one to start in. We'd be satisfied with this attitude. So we'd like you to disable quads Charlie and Delta; and we'll wait about 5 to 10 minutes, and than we'll establis
罗杰。或许在你看来，我们这次登月之旅看似简单轻松。但我可以向你保证，事实并非如此。将我们送入轨道的土星五号火箭是一台极其复杂的机器，每一个部件都运转得完美无瑕。我头顶上的这台计算机拥有38000个词汇，每个词汇都经过精心挑选，对我们宇航员来说至关重要。我手中的这个开
Ich glaube nich
Roger, ho ricevuto.
Ho un'altra voce nella mia checklist: "Verifica che i fermi di cattura siano attivati". Ho già precaricato la sonda; è un po' ridicolo, ma è una tua scelta se vuoi verifica
分かりました。プラス00.692、プラス1
انتقل إلى الصف
Wie weit müssen
Roger. Die Kapsel drehte gerade,
Non è la navicella spaziale; non è la navicella spaziale a essere difficile da puntare, è la telecamera. La staffa ha un'inclinazione tale da far uscire la telecamera dal campo visivo quando è configurata attraverso il finestrino. E ci sono voluti molti microaggiustamenti e un sacco di allenamento da terra per far entrare la telecamera, ed è stato un l
صحيح. أعتقد أننا نريد تشغيله بعد دقيقتين - هل تريد
نعم، هم على نفس الحال تقريبً
जेमिनी 4, कैनरी कैप
حسنًا. لدينا واحدة جاهزة للاستخدام، ويبدو أننا نستطيع إنجاز المهمة بشكل جيد باستخد
Aurora Seven, reduzieren Sie Ihren Wasserverbrauch 
That's correct. Okay. T
Я снова в
Okay, läuft gut, Gyros norm
هذه لعبة فريندشيب سفن. 
बहुत बढ़िया। फिलहाल हमारा केप से कोई सं
La température de la combinaison est de 74 [degrés]; l
D'accord. Apollo 8. Il semble que nous devions reporter ce test de communication en raison d'exigences de suivi. Nous pouvons le faire dans environ une heure si cela ne perturbe pas trop vos opérations actuelles. Cela prendra peut-être 15 à 20 minutes et nécessite
좋아요
Roger, Carnarvon. For the Plane-Change. At a GET 02 plus 42 plus 07; Delta-V, 31.7; duration, 0 plus 40 seconds; yaw, right 90 degrees, pitch 00; Core 25, 26, 0
Roger. Concernant la température du quadruple capteur, la limite supérieure est de 1
Et Houston, on remet les compteurs à zéro et on va bientôt terminer le burn-out... Je vous donne une petite astuce, il re
سنحاول تحسين الاتصال والقياس عن بُعد من خلال قطع الاتصال مؤقتًا وإعادة الاتصال. قد تسمع بعض التشويش 
Apollo 11, Houston. Würden Sie bitte die Ta
Okay. Area 27-2 96. 2+02. 08 27 55. 6+35. 10+58. Area 28-2: ΔV 111. 2+20. 10 02 54. 4+50. 9+39. 
Roger. Nous avons demandé une
Другой авиатор, Макс Конрад, совершающий кругосветное путешествие на своем легком самолете (он провел Рождество в Антарктиде), ждет хорошей погоды, чтобы продолжить свой полет к Южному полюсу. Он надеется объехать весь мир. Он собирается облететь оба полюса, пролете
Right. 
هذا صحيح. قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية SENSOR SIG
Houston, Apol
In what fashion did you want us to disable those plus-X thrusters? Just pulling those appropriate TCA breakers, or did you want to actually go
찰리, 제가 머리 위 창문에서 보이는 풍경을 보여드리겠습니다. 
Ein bisschen zu weit rechts. Könnten Sie es um etwa
イーグルさん、コ
로저. 산소 공급원의 압력을 모니터링하고, 산소 공급량을 높여 압력을 930~960ps
हाँ, इसकी पुष्टि हो गई है। हम सं
نعم، جميع مفاتيح الصمامات لا تزال في نفس الوضع يا جوردو. لم أغير أيًا منها. جهاز الإشعال مُفعّل، ونظام الارتداد التلقائي مُعطّل. أنا أستخدم نظام التحكم الإلكتروني، والوضع التلقائي، ونظام الجيروسكوب في الوضع الطبيعي. جميع مقابض "T" في مكانها. لوحة التحكم تعمل بشكل
जिम, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपनी मौजूदा फ़ाइन अलाइन का ही इस्तेमाल करें और बाकी बातों को नज़रअंदाज़ करें। हम कुछ एलएमएस सिमुलेशन चलाकर यह देखने की कोशिश कर रहे ह
Пох
好的。电池B，37.0；排气温度A，37.0；排气温度B，37.0；氦气压力，3400；氮气A和B——只是为了好玩，分别设为2200和2400；喷油器温度——稍等——太阳下山了。好的。喷油器温度，5号查理，3.9；5号狗，3.2；6号阿尔法，3.6；6号
Это примерно верно, Джим. Джек выровняется в этом положении. Именно для этого мы и просим тебя выполнить маневр — для достижения этого положения. Мы рассчитаем приблизительные углы карданного подвеса и передадим их ему, и первое, что он сделает, когда прибудет туда, согласно своему контрольному списку, — это приблизительно выровняет сво
Хорошо. Это просто для того, чтобы вы не нае
Roger. We checked on stars 6 and 15, and th
जेमिनी 4, कार्नार्वोन सीएपी कॉम। यदि आप इसे पढ़ रहे हैं, तो कमांड पायलट कृपया अपने मुंह में ओरल टेम्परेचर प्रोब ड
अपोल
입자들이 여전
好的。RN，RP，加77，400英尺标称高度俯仰角；修正值，400K英尺标称高度；RET 400K英尺，22加02；断电开始，24加43；断电结束，
물병자리, 휴스턴. 올바른 관측 
Roger, Jim. Ci abbiamo dato un'occhiata.
네, 프레드. 우선, 이 작업을 위한 준비는 24페이지의 비상 점검 목록부터 시작하는 것이 좋
Сеть Близнецов, Сеть Близнецов. 
Houston
You're coming in weak. I didn't quite c
好的
你可以
제 생각에는 그런 것들이 조금씩 모호해지기 시작하는 것 같
As we are looking at it through the scanning telescope, it would be about a - oh, maybe a third of an
はい、排水バルブは正常に戻りました
Roger. We'll look at our data here and let you know what we see. Are you goi
أفضل بكثير. لقد وصلت بك إلى مر
Понял. Внимательно проверьте забрало
Хорошо, звучит неплохо. Потому что я не знаю, где я — как далеко я тебя потерял. Хорошо, панель 4; ТЕЛЕКОММУНИКАЦИЯ, ГРУППА 1, к AC1. На панели 5 замкните следующие контакты: ГРУППА ДАВЛЕНИЯ 1, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ГРУППА ДАВЛЕНИЯ 2, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ТЕМПЕРАТУРА, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ПРЕОБ
17-BRAVO 
Immagino che il mondo gir
D'accord, ma seule question concerne la toute première partie, celle où l'on me demande d'allumer la batterie BAT 6, puis d'éteindre toutes les autres batteries DESCENT. Vous me li
अपोलो 8. ह्यूस्टन
네, 이 제품은 데드밴드에서 좀 불안정한 면이 있지만
这里是友谊七号。我正在尽可能地调整到接近轨道姿态，目前我身处地球背面
알겠습니다. 달이 제 시야의 정중앙에 있습니다. 훌륭한 요(yaw)
D'accord, nous sommes en P00, maintenant qui ve
È questo che chiamano uno sfiato n
아무것도 아니
Roger. And, let's 
이
Roger. Je comprends qu'ils souhaitent que nous photographions le terrain partout où il est visible, sans attendre le dernier jour. Sachez toutefois que nous aimerions économiser de la pell
Roger, Jim. Wir würden gerne erneut einen Speicherauszug Ihres Computers erstellen, wie wir es neulich schon getan haben. Der Grund dafür ist folgender: Sie haben das vor etwa acht Stunden gemacht, und Sie erinnern sich sicher an die Zeitangabe und das Ergebnis. Wir gehen davon aus, dass alles in Ordnung ist. Wir denken, dass mit dem Computer alles bestens funktioniert, möchten aber trotzdem wie neulich einen Speicherauszug erstelle
로저, 3 설정으로 돌아갔을 때 잠시 동안 제대로 작동하지 않았지만 오래 있지는 않았습니다. 확실히 7.5에서 8 정도가 적당할 것 같습니다. 현재 자동 후방 자세 제어 모드입니다. 곧 플라이 바이 와이어 모드로 전환할 예정입니다. 이전에는 자이로스코프를 정상으로 설정하고 기동 기능을 꺼두었습니다. 모든 시스템은 정상입니다. 한 번 실수로 수동(연료) 제어를 약 
Houston, hier spricht Apollo 8. Ich glaube, wir haben jetzt die Freigabe; wir sind mit unseren Tests etwas im Verzug, aber ich schlage vor,
Canaveral Com Tech. Come si copia? 
الصورة رائعة حقاً هنا، 
토요일
Noch kein K
रॉजर। हम पिछली रात और उससे पिछली
Je n'y suis pas encore. Je dirais environ 25 à 30 degrés. Je stoppe le lacet pour l'instant. Le périscope vérifie la visée avec la fenêtre et le réticule, et je vais bientôt faire un repère pour essayer de stabiliser tous les mouvements. Je suis presque en position rétrograde, et le lacet semble très net. Je vais m'éloigner un peu pour vérifier. Il y a environ 1 degré de lacet à droite – MARK.T. OK, je suis satisfait de ce contrôle de lacet de jour. Il a été effectué en position rétrograde. J'avais une très bonne couche nuageuse, c'est ce qui m'a donné le 
好的，很好。225号面板：闭合主断路器“飞行总线”（FLIGHT BUS, MAIN B）；
Понял. Предлагаем вам подождать. Мы хоти
로저입니다. 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 혈압을 측정하겠습니다. 캡슐 주변에서 가끔 정체를 알
Нам нужна ещё одна небольшая поправка, чтобы вывести изображение на центральный экран. Если вы сможете переместиться в сторону терминатора, то это именно та часть, которой нам не хватает. Мы видим подсвеченную час
Le glaçage des emballages de pain d'épice. Il a un goût très cireux et tapisse l'intérieur de ma bouche. C'est comparable à ce qu'on trouve sur les sandwichs. J'en ai mis un dans ma bouche après en avoir mangé un peu… on a l'impression d'
好的。现在，我们要你用胶带剪出两段大约3英尺长（或一臂长）的胶带，然后用它们在罐子两侧各缠一圈，一圈靠近顶部，一圈靠近底部，
友
I must affirm a
Okay. About 47. About 40 minute
Perth müsste jetzt in Sicht ko
Votre orbi
अपोलो 8. बंद करने से पहले हम जो चीजें देखना चाहेंगे उनमें से एक यह भी है कि हम पॉइंट
Okay. That's correct. Now, that gets you back to the place where you can back out of the - the big battery charging procedure, which you have. And I - I think you ha
أبولو 8، بينما ننتظر الوصول إلى أعلى مستوى للارتفاع، سأواصل تلخيص المسار. لا يزال بإمكاننا العودة إلى خط منتصف المحيط الهادئ من النقطة الثالثة عشرة، وستكونون في طريقكم بعد 138 ثانية من بدء الاحتراق. هذه المدة (138 ثانية) تُخرجكم من منطقة الفراشة. نوصي بعدم محاولة الإشعال المسبق أو إعادة التشغيل بعد 20 ثانية. إذا تجاوزتم 20 ثانية، فقد يتجاوز المسار قدرة التصحيح، مما يؤدي إلى عودة حرة. الطقس في منطقة الاستعادة جيد. لدينا رياح خلفية ورياح خارجية. أثناء الاحتراق، قد تلاحظون تغيرًا طفيفًا في ضغط غرفة الاحتراق وضغط الخزانات نتيجةً لنفاد الوقود في خزان التخزين وانتقاله إلى خز
알겠습니다. 저희는 최소 충격 모드로 비행해야 하는 작업이 있는데, 이 모드에서는 자세 유지 수정을 전혀 하지 않습니다. 자세 변화를 추적할 건데, 이 작업을 약 6시간 동안 
Sì signore, ti sento forte
D'accord. Nous effectuerons les
Я вам всё подробно р
Fred-o, mancano circa 2 minuti all'interruttore OMNI. Puoi andare avanti e spegnere il RANGING e il DOWN VOICE BACKUP, e ti chiamerem
Ok. Sembra abbastanza semplice. Capire la procedura di backup a g costante, sollevare il vettore fino al massimo g e poi abbassarlo; quindi modulare fino all'angolo di inclinazione finché il punto g non è uguale a zero. Mantenere il punto g uguale a zero fino a subcircolare, quindi ruotare di 45 gradi e mantenere la 
Okay. I am going to give you a quick summary of systems. Basically, all systems are good. In respect to your return trajectory, we can still get to the mid-Pacific line at by waiting as late as the thirteenth. After 138 seconds of the burn,
この便にはそれほど多くの便がないので、今のうちに楽しんでおいた方がいいですよ。バズ、調子はど
रॉजर। लगता है अब हमें अ
ح
Ricevuto. 
... Давайте посм
रॉ
Frank, nous pensons que la procédure dont
收到。我有一些
好的，很好。关于组件指示灯，我们
不，我没有；说吧，迈
A proposito, le finestre sono arrivate in ottime condizioni. La finestra 5 sembra davvero pulita, quindi spero che i prodotti Hycon siano piut
네, 알겠습니다. 지금 설정해 놓은 구성이 바로 그겁니다. 저희가 생각하는 바는 이렇습니다. 탱크 1을 자동(AUTO)으로, 탱크 2를 끄고 설정했을 때, 히터 작동 중 탱크 1의 압력이 약 233psi까지 올라가는 것을 확인했습니다. 이는 주의 및 경고 한계를 훨씬 초과하는 수치입니다. 따라서 수면 
わか
双子座六号，休斯顿。返航准备工
Ricevuto. È ora di gu
Non credo che fosse questo l'intento, Bill. Quello che avevano in mente era che avevamo lo scambiatore di calore
おそらく、この0psiはテストメーターで約
好的。我要回卧室了，万斯。你怎么看
好的。在面
حسناً يا جيم. تذكر، إذا كنت تستخدم مر
حسنًا. ممتاز إذًا. وفي المرة القادمة، سنُلقي نظرةً مُعمّقةً على جميع المعايير؛ سنُقدّمها لكم. وسنستخدمها
Пока всё работает хорошо, Чарли. Один установлен на водяном пистолете, а другой — на кране внизу, и мы — упомянули одну проблему: они протекают в месте соединения мешка с едой и водяного фильтра. Однако, за исключением этого, они, кажется, работают довольно хорошо. Сначала у нас немного газа проходило, и я думаю, это было просто для продувки системы; а в последней тюбике, которую мы залили, почти не было пузырьков. Конец
好的。
ठीक
물론 지구는 매우 밝고, 검은 하늘은 칠흑같이 검기보다는 약간 장밋빛을 띠고 있습니다. 별은 아주 밝은 별이 아니라면 그 빛 속에 묻혀 보이지 않을 겁니다. 별이 지평선 아래의 밝음에 가려지지 않도록 조준선을 지평선 위로 상당히 옮겨 보았습니다. 하지만 조준선을 지평선 위로 충분
燃烧残差为 80，全部为零。81
はい、そうです。パネル5に戻りましょう。回路ブ
L'assiette est impeccable, bien rigid
Roger. 88.1. 148.7
Roge
일몰은 정말 장관입니다. 해가 지고 나면 지구는 검게 변합니다. 지구는 검은색
わかりました。ありがとうございます。機内では、クアッドエンジンのアルファ75%、ブラボー78%、チャーリー78
11, Houston. The definition is pretty good on our monitor here. The color is not too.., at l
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Falls Sie sich entscheiden, auf Bahn 2 mit den Köpfen nach oben zu rollen, denken Sie bitte daran, die Maschine um 45 Grad nach rechts zu drehen, um die Verbindung zu Ihrer Hochleistungsantenne aufre
Quando saremo qui nella zona libera, quando saremo decisamente fuori dal limite di scansione, beh, andrò avanti e passerò alla sequenza di aggancio MANUALE e AUTOMATICO e passerò a REAC
알겠습니다. CB BAT A, 전원 입력/포스트랜딩, 열림;
저는 거
次の「」をやってみて、何が得られるか見てみましょう。実質的にゼロの中間コースとは
Okay. Beginnen Sie mit de
لكننا نعتق
제미니 4, 휴
Okay. Wir erhalten Daten von Ihnen, Jack, das sieht also gut aus. Bitten Sie auf Feld 5 um Bestätigung, dass der Leistungsschalter für das Sensorsignal auf Hauptschalter B ei
それは肯
不。天哪，你还记
Hey Houston, die letzte Phase mag sich endlos angefühlt haben. Die automatische Zielerfas
Retrofire – Re
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, qui è RKV CAP 
Да, мне нужно получить контрольный список для запуска. И мы собираемся рассмотреть начальную настройку коммутатора. И получить
처음 측정했을 
जो। ठीक है, मुझे 37 की चमकती हुई लाइट दिख रही है, मैं प्रोग्राम 06 में हूँ। स्टैंडबाय लाइट नहीं जल रही है, लेकिन जब मैं एंटर दबाता हूँ, तो मुझे तीन गेंदें 62 दिखाई नहीं देतीं, जैसा कि दिखना चाहिए
收到。很好。请记住此
罗杰，我
信
关于夏威夷的那次更新，启示录
अगर मैं बीच में ही रुक जाऊं तो कैस
Es ist sehr leicht zu erkennen. Von hier aus sieht man die gesamten Kraterränder, natürlich mit dem weißen Halbmond auf der sonnenbeschienenen Seite. Die Schatten sind jetzt ziemlich lang. Maskelyne B (Sumpf des Schlafes) wirft viele Schatten, ist aber dennoch erkennbar. Westlich
Bien, nous y voilà. Zone d'entrée: Mid-Pacific, 000153; 000. Les deux lignes suivantes indiqueront le coucher de la lune et l
Вначале работа с системой не позволила нам немедленно начать наблюдения, как мы планировали, поскольку нам предстоял очере
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。距离塔那那利佛发射线还有1
We'll be losing you in about 2 minutes here. Hawaii will get your OAMS burn, and Guaymas will count you down to ret
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, this is Zanzibar Com T
On your, quads A, C, and D seem to be just about identical. Quad B is running slig
Bene. Ora, quando saremo in quarta fila, apriremo l'interruttore OPERATE; questo significa che perderemo la possibilità di monitorare i vostri CDU, quindi non saremo in grado di vedere il vostro 
Что ж, 
ठीक है, जेर
事情并非如此
नहीं। मैं चाहूंगा कि 
आ
アポロ8号、ヒュース
Roger. Mi dispiace disturbarti, Columbia. Due cose: ti chiediamo di selezionare una zona morta di 10 gradi nella tua checklist, in conformità con le 
好的，将两倍于最大功率点火提前角（MPL）的参数设置为：079、27、4013，加上 08144，减去 00443，减去 00226，不适用，加上 00205、08455、4
了解。ジェミニ8号、こちらヒューストン。
제미니 8호입니다
Chissà dove sia
알겠습니다. 33-1 탑재량 정보 확인했습니다. 수
Да, сначала Retro Jettison ARM. Jettison Retro. Сообщайте о случаях сброса ретро-оружия в Гуай
The one time - the other time I tried to use it, I got a pretty good measure on it the next time. The ... using no filter, I used the top 
サステイナーエンジンから白ガスが一定の勢いで噴出しています。ただいまAS
휴스턴, 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 6가지 고장 중 첫 번째 고장이 발생
أجل. الآن وقد عرفنا مكان (غير مقروء)، سيكون الأمر أسهل بكثير في المرة القادمة. في المرة الأولى التي بحثنا فيها عن القاهرة - عن القاهرة والإسكندرية - وجدنا (غير مقروء) بعد فترة. لم أرَ المطار فعليًا، بل رأيت المنطقة فقط. ظننتُ أنني إذا وجهت الكاميرا بشكل صحيح، فسأحصل على صورة للقاهرة. لكن هذه المرة التقطتُ صورة للمطار بالفعل. الأمر نفسه مع الإسكندرية. أعتقد أنه إذا كنت ستلتقط ص
هذه فريندشيب سفن. تناولتُ أنبوب طعا
Ich habe das und im Ko
D'accord. Maintenant, je vais sortir et voir combien... si j'ai assez de harn
यह सही है। और यह उसी जड़त्वीय स्थिति से मेल खाता है 
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie dürfen jetzt Ihre Toilette aufsuchen, und ich habe geh
فريندشيب سفن، فريندشيب سفن. ما هو تقرير حالة مركبتك الفضائية؟ انته
Bene. Questo è tutto, e questo è l'aggiornamento completo del piano di volo. Ora ho u
オキーチョビーが見えます。アンドロス島を特定してください
حسنًا. ويمكنك البحث عنهما في 
Oh, sì. Molto meglio. Hai ricevuto il mio rapporto sui vari tipi di pers
FPS - DÉSACTIVÉ
好的。现在，在8号配电盘上，我需要读出一些需要断开的断路器。首先，8号配电盘上的
Pourriez-vous transmettre à Houston que l'ampoule du sextant à l'arrière semble grillée, et leur demander s'
ATT 1/RATE 2
Okay. Wir haben eine Reihe von Filterexperten, die Ihn
Fantastico. Asc
Roger, nous avons utilisé le contrôle d'impulsion au minimum; la cible numéro 12 était masquée par les nuages; j'avais bien noté l'heure et la position. J'aurais pu la suivre si je l'avais vue, je pense. La cible numéro 13 était dégagée et j'ai pu distinguer la ville d'Alexandrie. Quant à l'aéroport, je crois… mais je n'ai pas pu me concentrer sur sa recherche. J'aurais pu le repérer. J
حسنًا. لقد فقدنا الاتصال هناك. قمنا بتغيير أجهزة الإرسال والاستقبال. فقط لأجل ترتيب أفكاري، أود أن أعرف نوع الدخول 
T
私たちは彼を解放するつもりだが、彼はまだチケットの値
Теперь перейдём к шагу 1
ジ
We're damp
Роджер. Имейте в виду, что примерно в 50 лет я довольно часто слышу эти эхо, и если вы пы
और 12.5 वाइड एंगल है। मुझे बस यही बात उलझन में डाल रही है कि इसमें लिखा है कि वाहन से वाहन के लिए हमें 12.5 पर ज़ूम करना है। शायद वे बस यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि आपको दूसरा वाहन दिखाई दे रहा है।
أوه، بصوت عا
로저. 저희도 그 부분을 생각하고 있는데, 한 가지 문제는 통신 모듈이 호스에 단단히 연결되어 있어서 통신 케이블을 어떻게든 분리해야 한다는 겁니다. 그러면 통신 모듈은 아래쪽에 그대로 있고 호스는 위쪽에 연결
On va... on va se reposer, mais... on va essayer de dormir, mais il fait un froid 
ジム、もう一つのことは、ヨーを制御するためにその姿勢に向かっているときに、その姿勢
حسنًا. الآن دعني
Колумбия, Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Кон
D'ac
제미니 VI, 식량 및 물 보고
哦。我们的示意图显示你刚刚触
了解。ビル、彼
ठीक है। अभी भी सकारात्मक है। 5 सेकंड प
Inoltre, Houston, Apollo 13. Vorremmo anticipare un po' la discarica delle acque reflue e magari anche lo spurgo delle cell
अब जब हमारे पास समय है, तो आप ऐसा क
Aquarius
Roger, était-ce qu'il 
Roger. 189 più 00: totale meno 1 percento; Alfa meno 11; Bravo più 10; Charlie meno 1; Delta meno 1; totale H2 meno 0,76 libbre; totale ossigeno più
Going to; 
Wir hören Sie nur sehr schwach – es gibt viele Hintergrundgeräusche. Willkommen z
13，休
Roger, this is Gemini 4. Pilot got up about 20 minutes ago and had about 3 and a 1/2 hours of rest. It wasn't deep sleep. It was an on-and-off type sleeping, but there was some sleep associated with it. I had for breakfast, small cereal, orange juice, bacon and egg bites, and calcified... bits. I've had 12 m
구름이 부분적으로 끼어 있습니다. 시야는 20마일입니다. 풍속은 2
О, я вижу там неболь
جيميني 6. لم نتمكن من العثور على بيانات الشريط. نرجو منك إيقاف تشغيل قاطع دائ
我还有一个问题。你把这个抄下来，然后复述一遍给我。好的。一旦你掌握了方法，想要
Roger. Non ricev
O
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Ihr Kursk
За
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Вы скопировали? Орёл — это G
और अब यह थोड़ा बड़ा दिखने लगा है। इसकी कुछ विशेषत
알겠습니다, 밴스. 비상 계획서에 있는 준비 단계를 대략 이쯤에서 시작해야 한다는 말씀이시죠? 짐과 잠시 상의해보고 다시 알려드리겠습니다. 연소 자세에서는 태양이 바로 맨 위쪽에 보여야 하는데, 아마 2번 디텐트일 겁니다. 짐과 저는 이미 그 부분에 대해 이야기했고, 지구의 명암 경계선을 육안으로 봤을 때 태양이 약 70도에서 65도 정도의 각도로 보인다고 예상했으니, 딱 그쯤에 있을 겁니다. 연소 규칙 중 하나는 각도 변화가 초당 10도 이상이면 엔진을 정지해야 한다는 겁니다. 그리
طعم الماء جيد، لا توجد مشاكل. ونجد أنه من الأفضل النوم تحت الأريكة الآن. كنت هنا مع فرانك، وكنت أغفو بين الحين والآخر خلال الساعات القليلة الماضية. فرانك الآن في الأسفل، و
Bill ha appena chiuso l'i
यह और दूर जा रहा 
Ok, Jim. Credo
ठीक है। ये तो सिस्टम खुद ही क
好的。稍
Okay. Die erste Zusatzfrage lautet: Lassen Sie mich die Originalfrage wiederholen, da es in dieser Frage heißt: „Genauer zu Punkt 2“, und Punkt 2 lautet: „Gab es signifikante Änderungen des Geräusch- und Vibrationspegels während der einstufigen Triebwerksabschaltung?“ Beschreiben Sie bitte Ihre Beobachtungen während der frühen Phase des Abschaltens des mittleren Triebwerks de
我正在尝试重置它。它已
Ok, e nella pagina successiva, la 29, a destra, vicino all
حسنًا يا هيوستن،
好的。您可以切换到 
パワーダウンの状態は、12アン
Да, подтверждаю. А вы скопировали новые углы с высоким 
여기는 시그마 
ठीक है। हम बस कुछ करने का इंतज़ार कर रहे हैं। हमें एक स्टेट वेक्टर, a, और the पर एक रीडिंग चाहिए। और हमें 
D'accord, Fred. Voici la procédu
Ro
ジェミニ4
And, Aquarius; Houston. Roger that. And we're standing by for your body-axis aline an
مرحب
尼尔
我估计我
이 비행의 책임은 우선 역사와 이 노력에 앞서 나간 위대한 과학자들에게 있습니다. 다음으로는 의지를 표명해 주신 미국 국민들에게, 그리고 그 의지를 실행에 옮긴 네 개의 행정부와 의회에, 마지막으로 새턴, 컬럼비아, 이글, 그리고 달 표면에서 우리의 작은 우주선 역할을 했던 우주복과 배낭인 EMU를 제작한 기관과 산업체 팀들에게 있습니다. 특히 우주선을 제작하고 설계하고 시험하며 온 마음과 모든 능력을 쏟아부은 모든 미국인들에게 특별한 감사를 전하고 싶습니다. 오늘 밤, 그분들께 특별히 감사를 드리며, 오늘 밤 방송을 듣고 시청하시는 모든 분들께도 신의 축복이 있기를
没错
قاعدة ترانكويليتي، هيوستن. لقد جمعنا الآن جميع بيانات تحديد المدى التي يمكننا استخدامها، ويمكنك العودة إلى وضع الت
ठ
Хорошо.
Хорошо. Позвольте мне дать вам немного информации для чтения... пока вы разбираетесь с напряжением ГЛАВНОЙ А, Джек. У меня включен переменны
Мы подтверждаем отключе
ठीक है। फ्रेड, मैंने इसे कॉपी कर लिया है। और हमारे थर्मल विशेषज्ञ इसकी जांच करेंगे। मध्यमार्ग सुधार के संबंध में हम जिन बातों पर चर्चा कर रहे हैं, उनमें से एक यह है कि हम इसे SHe टैंक के फटने से पहले नहीं करना चाहते, अगर यह फटने वाला है, ताकि हमें पुनः स्थापित करने में कोई समस्या न हो। और अभी हमारे विशेषज्ञों का मानना ​​है कि बर्स्ट डिस्क लग
حسنًا. أولًا، ملاحظة. ينتهي قسم ضوء الأبراج في منتصف الصفحة، أسفل هذا الجزء مباشرةً. ثم، إ
了解。こちらが日の出と日の入りの時刻です。日の出軌道1：1プラス21プラス00。日の出軌道2
阿波罗 8 号。这是休斯顿，进行了一次飞掠，以及一次持续 2 小时的
Okay. We've got yo
حسنًا، ولكن 
Roger, Gemelli 4. Procedi con il tuo 
Sette, questa 
Gemini 4，休斯顿 CAP C
अपोलो 8, अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन अंधेरे में।
Okay, Jack. Das kostet 120 Amperestunden, was 10 Stunden entspricht. Damit haben wir wieder 193 Stund
是的
التقطنا صورًا مشتركة باستخدام كاميرتي S-5 و S-6 أثناء صعودنا فوق جبال الهيمالاي
알겠습니다, 밴스. 솔로 비행 계획 변경 사항과 비행 일정 변경 사항을 복사할 준비가 거의 다 됐고, 패드가 준비되면 바로 사용하겠습니다. 
Un altro inconveniente rispetto al piano è che non sono riuscito a sganciare il pallone. Il pallone è ancora attaccato, qui
ヒューストン、アポロ13号。以上
Roger. Ich fliege im Fly-by-
Alright, let's - Okay
Wenn die Sonne
حسنًا يا جيم. يتميز تكوينك الحالي بالخصائص التالية. لدينا توصيلات كهربائية متقاطعة عبر قواطع دائرة الحمل المتوازن، ولدينا خاصية إعادة كبت الكابينة التلقائية. أحد الأمور التي نود القيام بها الآن هو تزويدك بوصلة صاعدة، لذا علين
Okay, Jack. The switches all remain in their present position, which is center, but we - Because we have no power on the bus, the bottom row of talkbacks will be spring loaded to the barber pole positio
휴스턴에서 제가 간격을 조정하는 동안 오른쪽 태양광 패널은 자동으로 펼쳐졌습니다. 왼쪽 패널
F2.8、バルブでいくつか写真を撮っています。今の写真、ここに気球の写真があります。太陽が明るすぎるので、そこから出てきた
Alles, was Sie jetzt schon sagen könne
Zwillinge 4, Kanarische
11日、ヒューストンです。音声アップリンクを別
了解しました。D-9実験がどのような成果を上げたの
Роджер. 2 Delta и 2 Echo по-прежнему числятся в реестре. Area Golf — 03 00 29, 03 00 29
D'accord. Nous suggérons que le pilote du module de commande (LMP) se repose pendant que le commandant et le commandant de bord (CDR) sont éveillés. Le LMP devrait se coucher vers 63 heures, et se réveiller dans 25 minutes. Vous aurez ensuite 6 heures de repos. Vous vous réveillerez à 69 heures. À 70 heures, 
在我们离开之前，你能帮我
Это подтверждается. Сейчас 
حسنًا. قم بتشغيل الجهاز وفقًا 
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы готовы к показу по телевизору
알
Nous avons vraiment beaucoup apprécié, les gars, et vous avez fait un super boulo
로저. 복사본 0.64, 0.0
Ok. So che stai cercando di stare zitto, quindi ti leggerò un po' di informazioni. Una delle cose che abbiamo appena scoperto e che potrebbe darti un po' di sicurezza è che se perdi la bombola di ossigeno criogenico, ti restano 36 kg a /. Il fattore limitante per il funzionamento con una sola bombola al momento è la bomb
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। लगता है अब आप अपने क्रायो फैन बंद कर सकते हैं, और हम आपको कुछ देर के लिए अकेला छोड़ रहे हैं ताकि आप अपना काम पूरा कर सकें। हाई-गेन 
Roger. salita PAD: 1
알겠습니다. 이제 네 번째 줄에 도달하면 작동 회로 차단기를 열겠습니다. 즉
نعود إلى خطة الرحلة. لقد بدأنا اليوم فق
そしてもう一つ、ジムが筋肉を鍛えるためにダンベルを少し使ってトレーニングしていたのが嬉
Gemini 4，CSQ
تُجري أبولو 11 أولى تجاربها للهبوط. هذه المرة، نمر فوق فوهة تارونتيوس، وقد منحتنا الصور والخرائط التي أحضرتها أبولو 8 و10 لمحةً رائعةً عمّا سنراه هنا. يبدو المشهد مطابقًا للصور إلى 
출발 준비 완
了解しました。他のリードバックは
सेवन, ये केप है। राष्ट्रपति आपसे बात करेंगे और जब वो बात कर रहे होंगे,
Um auf meine Nachbesprechung zum Booster vom Anfang des Fluges zurückzukommen: Nachdem wir in die Dunkelheit eingetreten waren, in einer geschätzten Entfernung von 1200 Fuß, versuchte ich, die Position des Boosters zu halten. Zu diesem Zeitpunkt konnte ich meine En
إن ما يقلقني هو قفل جيمبال 
Environ 3 mètre
रॉजर। हमें कोई आपत्ति नहीं है, नील। जब चाहो तब आगे बढ़ो। स
ठीक है, माइक। बेशक, यह उस स्थिति के लिए है जब G&N काम करना बंद कर दे और आपको लगातार g पर उड़ान भरनी पड़े; और हम जो करने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं वह है लगातार g की रेंज को 1100 से 1500 मील तक बढ़ाना। हमने इस प्रक्रिया को सिम्युलेटर में चलाया है, और यह ठीक काम करती है। मूल रूप से, मैं इसे समझा देता हूँ - बस इसे समझा दें, और फिर यदि आपके कोई प्रश्न हों तो वापस पूछें। लेकिन अधिकतम g तक लिफ्ट वेक्टर ऊपर की ओर समान रहता है, फिर लिफ्ट वेक्टर नीचे की ओर आता है, और फिर लिफ्ट वेक्टर को तब तक समायोजित किया जाता है जब तक कि g डॉट शून्य न हो जाए। ठीक है। यह प्रक्रिया अब तक लगभग समान है। और फिर V सर्कुलर के रेट्रो बीता हुआ समय पार करने तक g डॉट को शून्य पर रखें; और फिर V सर्कुलर के इस रेट्रो बीता हुआ समय को पार करने के बाद, 45 डिग्री के गिम्बल कोण पर रोल करें, और फिर ड्रोग्स के रेट्रो बीता 
Okay, Jack. The 
주실 압력은 예정대로 유지되고 있습니다
Ce l'a
Right. The cabin is just sitting here fat, dumb, and happy, I haven't had to do a thing to it. Now, have you been watching my 250 invert
Amici
سطوع الشبكة... لا أعرف شيئاً عن ذلك... عدسات ستو البصرية، حسناً، هذا قيد ا
わかりました。今日の午後に送付
Хорошо. Что касается этого, у нас в космическом корабле достаточно кислорода... чтобы пройти через него. У меня нет... командного модуля... петли скафандра перед входом. Я рассматривал...источники кислорода... также в - в передней части петли скафанд
Okay. Bruce, wir kommen jetzt zur Aktivität des Wasserspeichers. Sie steigt auf 0,85, oh, ungefäh
好的，12:22
收到。明白了。获取燃烧 02 45 50；
Tr-10 вернулся в норму. Я уже делал это раньше. Хорошо, мы получили – получили давление в скафандре. Давайте еще раз посмотрим на инверторы. 250 — это 141 (градус), 150 — около 107 (градусов). Ну, этого достаточно. В режиме ожидания... 7. Почти как окружающая среда. Даже немного отрицательно... Давлен
내 말 들
Roger. Merci pour le bulletin météo. On ne voit pas très loin. Il semble que le ciel se soit dégagé, d'après ce que dise
Хорошо, это... на это должно уйти около 8 минут; у нас уже вышло примерно 3 минуты, так что примерно через 5 минут я смо
Eagle, Hou
Bene,
रॉजर, मैंने आपकी बात साफ़-साफ़ समझ ली। मेरे पास आपके लिए कई अपडेट हैं। जब आप कॉपी कर
यह विकल्प 1 के रूप में किया जाएगा। कंप्यूटर के अंदर दूस
好的，我现在能接收到你的信
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। मैंने उस समय कुछ नहीं कहा था। हम अभी आपके लिए कुछ पहलुओं पर विचार कर रहे हैं। नींद चक्र में फेरबदल के बारे में आपके पहले के प्रश्न के संदर्भ में, हम आपकी टिप्पणी से सहमत हैं। हम चाहते हैं कि चंद्र कक्षा में पहुँचने तक नींद चक्र आदि के संबंध में उड़ान योजना पर वापस आ जाएँ। इसलिए हम चाहते हैं कि आप नींद चक्रों को समायोजित करने के सबसे कुशल तरीके के बारे में अपने विवेक का उपयोग करें और इसे आपस में बाँट लें। हम चाहते हैं कि आप हमें इस बात की जानकारी देते रहें कि कौन क्या कर रहा है और आपकी क्या योजनाएँ हैं। एक उड़ान में 2 घंटे की देरी हो गई है। हम दूसरी उड़ान को पूरा करना चाहते हैं। अगर दूसरी उड़ान में कोई समस्या आती है, तो हम उसका समय भी समायोजित कर सकते हैं - मुझे लगता है कि इसमें दो और घंटे लगेंगे। अगर आप हमें बताएँगे कि जिम कब कुछ अवलोकन करने के लिए उपलब्ध होंगे, तो हम उनका समय समायोजित कर सकते हैं। संक्षेप में, हम आपकी हर इच्छा के अनुसार काम करना चाहते हैं। अगर आप हमें बता देंगे, तो हम 
रॉजर ने इसे 10 सेकंड के लिए चालू किया
そして、その態度にはパッドが付
我正在使
ठीक है, 8. हम यहाँ ज़मीन पर एक छोटा सा अभ्यास करना चाहते हैं ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि हम टेप को डंप कर सकें और आवाज़ वाले हिस्से को समय पर ह्यूस्टन वापस ला सकें। तो हम आपका टेप डंप करने की योजना बना रहे हैं, और इसे यहाँ वापस लाने और सुनने के लिए हम ज़मीन पर प्रक्रिया का अभ्यास करेंगे। हमारा मानना ​​है कि टेप में पहले से ही कुछ है, जब तक कि आपने पिछले डंप के बाद उस पर कुछ रिकॉर्ड न किया हो। बस यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए, हम चाहेंगे 
Okay. This is going to be for one last vent on the tank there, so at the top of the page just after INVERTER 1, CLOSE, add - Okay, after INVERTER
مرح
Колум
我本来想
N
Houston, Apollo 11
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Se avete un minuto libero, mi chiedo se potremmo chiedere a Mike di darci qualche chiarimento su cosa è successo più o meno al momento d
Для миссии «Аполлон-8» нам бы пр
こちらシグマ・セブン。放送局を読み上げましたが、非常に乱れていま
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。了解です、フランク。消去可能なダンプの作成を依頼する準備をしています。今準備を進めており、コピーの準備が整い次第ご連絡いたします
Okay, Fred. Ich verstehe Sie jetzt gut. Okay. Wir bereiten gerade ein Verfahren für Sie vor: Wir führen in etwa 74 Stunden, also in etwas über 3 Stunden, einen Sonnencheck durch. Das ist eine zweite Sperre. Wir stellen Ihnen in Kürze ein detailliertes Verfahren zur Verfügung, das eine Radar-Neuzuordnung für das Rendezvous beinhaltet, um die Sperre zu umgehen,
好的，在烧毁卡上，第三行应 STAB/CONTROL
Okay. 
Tout à fait, Apollo 8. Nous aurons d'autres informations à vous communiquer sous peu. Nous travaillons actuellement sur un survol. Nous allons également vous parler plus longuement des difficultés rencontrées lors de l'observation des étoiles au sextant et au télescope. Dès que l'équipe noire arrivera sur le MOKR (nous aurons deux équipes ici), nous aimerions recueillir un compte rendu détaillé de vos observations: ce que vous voyez, ce que vous ne voyez pas et dans quelles conditions. L'objectif est de clarifier les choses afin que chacun comprenne vos observations. Si vous avez des commentaires concernant le calendrier, sachant que nous avons pris du retard avant la manœuvre d'allumage, et notamment sur la méthode pour 
Хорошо. Мы не наблюдали уменьшения количества отходов, и, похоже, температура сопла указывала на то, что что-то происходит, и мы пытались выяснить, что и
Il semble que lors de la coupure de courant (illisible), nous consommions encore un peu moins de 11 ampères. Nous avions 10 ampères sur le connecteur n° 1 et un peu moins de 11 sur le n° 2. Le câble d'alimentation, ou plutôt son point de fixation sur l'écoutille extérieure, rendait les sorties extravéhiculaires (EVA) assez difficiles, notamment à cause de l'aérodynamisme du câble libre à l'avant du vaisseau. Lorsque j'opérais dans cette zone, le câble, lorsqu'il arrivait à son extrémité, me propulsait en arrière et la réaction me ramenait vers le haut, au-dessus du vaisseau, vers la section d'adaptation. C'est pourquoi je disparaissais constamment de la vue pendant mes manœuvres au-dessus des hublots, puis dérivais vers l'arrière du vaisseau. Je devais sans cesse me hisser à l'avant du vaisseau. Je n'étais pas satisfait des photos que je prenais. Il était assez difficile de maîtriser toutes les dragonnes que je portais… J’avais celle de l’arme, le câble et le cordon ombilical auxquels j’étais relié, et plusieurs autres dragonnes diverses qui flottaient dans tous les sens, et il était compliqué de les empêcher de gêner l’objectif. Vous remarquerez peut-être sur les photos que je bouge beaucoup les bras. J’essayais constamment de les dégager pour pouvoir prendre une photo. Je dirais qu’ils étaient devant moi environ 50 à 60 % du temps; et le reste du temps, je n’étais pas aussi bien positionné que je l’aurais souhaité. Je pense avoir pris une douzaine de photos. L’appareil semble assez facile à utiliser, même avec le simple câble. Je n’ai pas eu l’impression de risquer de heurter le vaisseau spatial. J’ai pu m’approcher du vaisseau spatial depuis pratiquement n’importe quelle position – et parfois même en m’approchan
ああ、ダイヤモンドバックとサイドワインダーのチェ
맞습니다. 1-13번 트랙에는 그 부분만 변경되었고, 1-14번 트랙에는 변경 사항이 없습니다. 잭, 전부 이해하셨네요. 이상입
好的，沃利，告诉我你的舱顶温度和舱内温度
D'accord. Les déchets qui ne rentrent pas dans le bac à aliments de droite iront soit dans le bac à aliments de gauche, soit dans les bacs latérau
Roger. 
Je suis prêt à recevoir l'altimètre. Cap, vous m'entendez? L'altimètre est sorti. 100 pieds, la vitesse de descente diminue, la pression cabine est correcte. On perd encore un peu de vapeurs d'essence. Non, ce sont des ondes de choc. De la fumée s'échappe derrière. Préparation du pa
Fuel remaining is 74
하지만 나중에, 만약 그것이 움직이지 않
いい
عند تشغيل المركبة، قمتُ أخيرًا بضبط الجيروسكوبات على الوضع الطبيعي بعد ضبطها على ثلاثة أصفار تقريبًا مع إيقاف المناورة. لم يحدث انتقال إلى وضع الدفع العالي. ثم، عندما قمتُ بالضبط على ثلاثة أصفار، حدث انتقال إلى وضع الدفع العالي في وضعية اختيار العودة إلى ا
没错。在第 4 幅图中：初
プラットフォームを整合させる
네, 그렇습니다. 휴스턴입니다. 만약 방금 통화가 OMNI 교환기를 통한 것이었다면, 지금 착신 전환 
9、/：45597、マイナス040、プラス157、プラス34188、マイナス01353、プラス00780 180 008 001、NA、プラス00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033、下131、左28、プラス0758、マイナス16500 12987、プラス-または36277、シリウスとリゲル129 155 010、4つのジェット、15秒、
Aurora Seven, commandant du capitaine d'Hawaï. Vous me
Ragazzi, per un po' ho pensato che alcuni di quelli potessero diventare un po'... -... Avrei reimp
Ok. Apollo 8. Sembra che dovremo rimandare questo test COMM a causa di alcune esigenze di tracciamento. Possiamo farlo in circ
Der andere Pilot, Max Conrad, der mit seinem Leichtflugzeug die Welt umrundet – er verbrachte Weihnachten in der Antarktis –, befindet sich derzeit in Puerto Aranes in Chile und wartet auf gutes Wetter, um seinen Flug zum Südpol fortzusetzen. Er hofft, die Welt zu umrunden. Er umfliegt beide Pole und wird von Palmer nach Byrd, von Byrd zum Südpol und dann über 
わかりました。どうもありが
好的，第二个故障也在面板 5 上。断路器 POWER-1，主 A 断路器，断开；断路器 SENSOR SIGNAL
أح
Okay, Jack. Mich interessiert, wie stark unsere Einstellung schwankt. Mir fällt auf, dass wir die Kontrolle verlieren, und ich frage mich, wie weit wir das noch gehen lassen k
Ge
阿波罗8号，
Je ne
Retros en septembre, et Ed di
D'accord - 
了解、バズ。いい読み返しだ。君はすごく弱
MARKIEREN
Les deux premiers étaie
D'accord. La prochaine fois, on devrait peut-être diviser ça en deux et en mettre la moitié d'un côté et l'autre moitié de l'autre,
Роджер, инерциальная система. И вот мы на 2-м ПАД. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, плюс 166, минус 081; TIG 080 11 3603. СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 81: минус 01408, минус все шары, минус 00743. Все шары, 196 359 00657, плюс 00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Секстант 2
로저, 마이크. 지금 고이득 안테나로 5비트 신호를 수신했습니다. 저희는 무지향성 안테나 사이에 있고, 무지향성 안테나의 통신 상태
Я говорю, на этот раз я не вижу в сторону Австралии — она ориентирована вверх, к зве
我们完成了推进式火力扫描仪检查，扫描仪没有出现任
Roger. 28570 250 28401 42 0641 296
好的，阿波罗8号。这是个不错的流程
ええと、ほんの少し前に2階にいた時、サービスモジュールの下の方から何か新しい通気口のようなものが見えました。窓1の外から見て、金属片も見えました。10センチ四方くらいの金属片が転がっていて、銀色で、サービスモジュールの下のどこかから出てきたように見
Okay, we got a 18-1 load and 
로저. 한 가지 더 말씀드리자면, 데이터 우선순위 회의에서 많은 논란이 있었던 부분인데, 수평선을 확보하고 스캐닝 망원경을 통해 기준점을 따라 내려가려면 기체를 10도 정도 위로 기울이는 것이 가장 좋은 자세인 것 같습니다. 기체를 더 아래로 기울이면 트러니언을 완전히 
Верно, «Аполлон-8». И вскоре у нас будет для вас еще пара моментов. Сейчас мы работаем над пролётом мимо звёзд. И мы собираемся ещё немного поговорить с вами о проблеме наблюдения за звёздами с помощью секстанта и телескопа. И как только чёрная команда прибудет на MOKR (пока здесь две команды), мы хотели бы получить от вас краткий обзор того, что вы видите, а что нет, и при каких условиях, и попытаться определить это так, чтобы все здесь понимали, о чём вы нам говорили. И если у вас есть какие-либо замечания относительно сроков — зная, что мы отклонились от графика до включения двигателей — если у вас есть какие-либо замечания по поводу метода возвращения к расписанию, мы хотели бы услышать и и
यह रॉजर है। और आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें कि एसेन्शन ने आपके पिछले प्रयास में आपकी कॉपी बना ली थी और व
Columbia, ici Houston. Position estimée: latitude +
收到。如果可转向天线在起
로저, 당신은 수평선 제어에 전혀 문제가 없다는 것을
يبدو
That's y
La lettura del valore di luce, per la pellicola in bianco e nero, è 13 per ASA 64. Imposto il valore di luce a 13. Scatto la foto numero 7 con filtro. Il continente sudamericano è difficile da fotografare a causa 
I could that t
我猜大概在我注意到这件事
حسناً. كلمة واحدة هي أن - بطريقة مثالية هناك، فإن المرور بعملية التنشيط التي تستغرق ساعتين يستغرق عادةً ما بين ساعة و15 دقيقة إلى ساعة و20 دق
Roger. Poursuivons avec le Maroon Bugle. Le président Nixon a surpris vos épouses en les appelant de San Francisco juste avant d'embarquer pour venir vous rencontrer. Elles ont toutes été très touchées par votre allocution télévisée. Jan et Pat l'ont suivie depuis le centre de contrôle des missions. Le lancement d'Intelsat depuis Cap Canaveral a été reporté pour la quatrième fois hier soir. Le problème serait dû à un dysfonctionnement du régulateur d'azote du deuxième étage de Delta. Une nouvelle tentative de lancement aura lieu ce soir. Le sous-marin de recherche Ben Franklin, qui étudie le Gulf Stream, a établi un record en dérivant pendant 24 heures entre 3 et 30 mètres au-dessus du fond marin, par 400 mètres de fond au large des côtes de Géorgie. La mission est dirigée par Jacques Picard. Wally Schirra a été élu pour un mandat de cinq ans au conseil d'administration du Detroit Institute of Technology. Il siégera au comité de développement de l'Institut. Air Canada annonce avoir enregistré 2 300 réservations pour des vols vers la Lune ces cinq derniers jours. Il est à noter que plus d'une centaine de ces chansons ont été écrites par des hommes pour leurs belles-mères. Enfin, il semblerait qu'au lieu de faire taire les chansons romantiques sur la Lune, vous ayez inspiré des centaines d'auteurs-compositeurs. Nashville, dans le Tennessee, qui abrite probablement la plus grande concentration de m
Arresto d
Negativo. Ti chiedevo se ne eri soddisfatto. Per quanto ne so, è soddisfacente. E anche il flusso EVAP primario è attivato al numero 1 a 
D
إد، 
여기는 제미니 4호입니다. 약 47시간이 경과한 시점에서 번역 2-알파, 호라이즌 스
了解。エリア3デルタ、エリア3デルタは4時間12分32秒
Хорошо, я вам сейчас всё покажу. Температура купола скафандра 80, температура воздуха 
ठीक है; सही है। ठीक है। मैं प्रक्रिया शुरू करने के लिए तैयार हूँ। जब आप मुझे जवाब दें, तो ज़ोर से बोलें - माइक्रोफ़ोन में ज़ोर से बोलें, क्योंकि हमारा डाउनलिंक काफ़ी शोर वाला है। सबसे पहले, हम एक कैनिस्टर पर यह करेंगे, और फिर आप इसे दूसरे पर दोहरा सकते हैं। तो एक कैनिस्टर लें और उसकी बाहरी थैली काट दें। हीट सील के साथ-साथ काटें; इसे ध्यान से और हीट सील के पास से काटें, क्योंकि अगर भीतरी थैली क्षतिग्रस्त हो जाती है तो हमें बाहरी थैली का उपयोग करना पड़ सकता है। तो इसे काट लें, और फिर 
Да, я знаю; эти цифры ничего не значат. Когда мы обернулись, их было около 99; не спрашивайте п
روجر. أريد حذف هذه 
今見ているのは、フレッドのすぐ後ろにある丸いバッグです。真空ホースが入っているんです。宇宙船に戻ったら、真空ホースを宇宙服から外しま
Okay. We got no problem. Go ahead and use your D-9. Now, on the Apo
Да, для инъ
10、9、8
로저. 이번 롤 절차 동안 VII을 관찰하시고 VII에서 물이
Überwachen Sie derzei
Okay, Jack, bist du bereit, mit mir an Seite 1 des 2-Stunden-Aktivierungs-
We'd like you to go back to. 
我们别无选择。只要我们能完成中途航程
ठीक है। शुरुआती टीवी प्रस
ジム、すぐに適切な姿勢をお伝えします。その姿勢に向かって機動している間は、FD
로저, 말씀하신 내용을 잘 들었습니다. 제미니 4호, 연료를 최소한으로 
Sì. Qu
Scott, ich denke, wir sind für mindestens eine weitere Erdumrundung in sehr gu
好的。在确认主总线电压连接电源后，我想断开主总线 B 到电
자, 이제 250번 패널로 돌아가서, CB BAT Bravo POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING을 닫으세요. 다음으로, MDC 3에서 AC INVERTER 2를 MAIN 
Bon, Jack est avec moi main
了解しました。私たちがもっと知りたい
Bien reçu. Lors de la première combusti
Here is an interesting little feature item that is kind of good to hear. It seems that up in Ann Arbor, Michigan, they have a new youth gang. It's called the Gilnet Gang. It roams the streets of Ann Arbor, acting in secret, and sometimes bypassing the law. They call themselves the Guerillas for Good. Some of the things they have done is, painted a bridge that was covered with obscenities. They painted it one night. A condemned house with - it's popular with neighborhood children, but dangerous, was boarded up. Downtown planters unfilled because of a debate over which group was responsible, business or government, were filled with flowers. A hedge, thought to be hampering vision, at busy intersection was trimmed, and the owner was angered. Trash along a portion of the Huron River was picked up. Members of the gang are anonymous teenagers who ask for no individual recognition. Their aim is to slice red tape, to get things - good things in their opinion - done. The organization has a faint religious overtone. It's sort of an ecumenical group, said an assistant professor at the University of Michigan who acts as an informal sounding board for the gang's ideas. The name is from St. Peter, the Fisherman's Net. And it is remote enough not to b
好了。起落架已经放下并锁定，杰克，现在翻到第11
في الوقت الحالي، يمكنني المناورة بشكل أفض
I can see very clearly the five crater star formation w
Okay
에드, 저는 '태도'라는 주제에 대
Hawaii Cap Com, ici Sigma Seven. Je vous ai bien reçu
विदेशों की बात करें तो, दक्षिण कोरिया का पहला सुपर हाईवे, जो सियोल को इंचियोन बंदरगाह से जोड़ता है, आपकी यात्रा की याद में अपोलो हाईवे नाम दिया गया है। मुझे लगता है कि हमने कल रात जिक्र किया था कि राष्ट्रपति निक्सन ने अपनी विश्व यात्रा शुरू कर दी है और आज वे सैन फ्रांसिस्को में अपने पहले पड़ाव पर हैं, जहाँ से वे यूएसएस हॉर्नेट पर जाकर आपके अंतरिक्ष यान की वापसी देखेंगे। इस यात्रा के दौरान वे रोमानिया सहित सात देशों का दौरा 
Когда будете готовы, 11, у меня ес
11, ici Houston. Au moment du déclenchement de votre accumulateur cyclique, nous étions en mode de transmission de données à faible débit et, par conséquent, nous ne recevions pas le paramètre de débit d'O2. Nous pensons que ce que vous observez est probablement normal. Autrement dit, c'est probablement ce à quoi on pourrait s'attendre d'un tr
Okay. Jetzt sieht man ein paar Funken – kleine Partikel, die über den Bildschirm huschen. Die werden von den Trie
13、ヒュース
我保证，如果我停止呼吸，我
姿态正常。正在俯仰回到再入姿态，修正反向姿态。没有理由保持再入姿态。既然反向姿
Que diriez-vous de passer une semaine sur
किसी एक का स
ठीक है। चलिए, आपका एंटीना लेत
Das bedeutet
Ich verstehe – ic
罗杰。9-C 是 04 36 18。7+59。15+26。10-查理 123。1+45。05 13 47。13+37。11 DELTA 08
Ok. Credo
Кажется, Земля немного наклонилась, но, учитывая, сколько часов прошло... думаю, это 
रॉजर, मिथुन राशि 4। क्या आपका रक्तच
好了，现在我回头看看后面的适配器和设备。我可以看到分离面，它
That's affirm, Jack. Request to - Before you terminate it, get the usual readout on voltage and c
Roge
Roger. Power down until you get an amperage of 10 amps less than what you g
Roger. Roger, Frank. Qualche piccolo pensiero su cosa ci aspetta ora. Gli avvistamenti stellari quando Jim si alzerà; sembra che ora ne abbiamo abbastanza dell'orizzonte terrestre, e tutto sembra davvero a posto; e siamo pronti per iniziare con alcuni avvistamenti dell'orizzonte lunare. Quindi, quando Jim si alzerà, gli pass
Хьюстон, ребята, которые говорили, что мы не сможем точно определить, где находимся, сегодня в выигрыше. Мы были немного заняты беспокойством по поводу сигналов тревоги и тому подобного на том участке спуска, где обычно выбираем место посадки; и, помимо хорошего обзора нес
Roger. Capisco che il GET di acquisizione è 03:07; GET di R = 248 nm; GET del rendez-vous 03:15; azimut 0 gradi; elevazione 7 gradi; GET dell'alba 05:37 00 p
等等，万斯，我不
Roger. Einen Moment bitte. 
Now we're over the Mediterranean. It is very easy to recognize. I see a couple of very large ships. They start off from Beirut. We should be passing just s
... 47+00の
Okay. I'll tell you. I'll go line at a time and wait for your verifica
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tempo per assistere al vostro ammaraggio. Ad accompagnare il Presidente ci saranno il Segretario di Stato William Rogers e Frank Borman. Assisteranno all'ammaraggio dal ponte della nave di recupero con l'Ammiraglio John Sidney McCain, Jr., Comandante delle Forze del Pacifico. Dopo la permanenza del Presidente a bordo dell'Hornet, partirà per il suo tour in Asia e la visita programmata in Romania. Si ritiene che Luna 15 si sia schiantata ieri nel Mare delle Crisi, dopo aver orbitato attorno alla Luna 52 volte. L'agenzia di stampa sovietica TASS ha riferito che sono state condotte ricerche "scientifiche" nello spazio vicino alla Luna. Sir Bernard Lovell dell'Osservatorio di Jodrell Bank ha affermato che Luna 15 ha colpito la superficie della Luna a una velocità di circa 480 chilometri orari. La situazione è stata relativamente tranquilla di recente in Vietnam. Soldati in pattuglia sono stati osservati con radio a transistor sintonizzate sul vostro volo. Le emittenti radiotelevisive delle Forze Armate in Vietnam hanno dato piena copertura alla missione. Le schermaglie continuano tra egiziani e israeliani lungo il Canale di Suez. Gli osservatori delle Nazioni Unite stanno cercando di fermare l'azione. A Washington, la Commissione per i Modi e i Mezzi della Camera ha votato per ridurre la tolleranza al depauperamento del petrolio dal 27,5% al ​​20%. Abbiamo piovuto diverse volte qui nella zona di Houston. Oggi è nuvoloso e sono previsti altri rovesci. Sul fronte sportivo, come accennato in precedenza, stasera si gioca l'All Star Game. Ieri non si è giocata nessuna partita. Ieri sera a New York, la Baseball Writers Association of America ha nominato Babe Ruth il più grande giocatore di baseball di tutti i tempi. Joe DiMaggio è stato nominato il più grande giocatore di baseball vivente. Frank Borman ha fatto gli annunci durante una cena in onore dei giocatori. Joe Namath ha trascorso un'intera giornata al training camp dei New York Jets. Cinque poliziotti hanno avuto difficoltà a trattenere circa 500 bambini che volevano toccare Broadway Joe. Ha detto di sentirsi bene e che giocherà l'All Star Game del 1° agosto, se Coach Weeb Eubank glielo permetterà. Il training camp degli Oilers a Kerrville si è bagnato ieri, ma gli allenamenti sono continuati. Ci sono stati alcuni infortuni minori, ma niente di troppo grave. Coach Wally Lemm è soddisfatto finora degli allenamenti. Gli Oilers prevedono oltre 30.000 spettatori per la partita di preseason con Buffalo. A quanto pare, l'annunciato ritiro di Don Meredith non dovrebbe smorzare l'entusiasmo, soprattutto qui a Houston. Mario Andretti ha vinto domenica la Tre
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。飛行計画の最新情報とブロックデータがあります。コピーしていただけます
Roger. Nous allons lancer le PROGRAMME 30 après que vous nous ayez donné la charge cible, et je ne pensais pas qu'il y aurait un changement aussi important pour une combu
Roger, Frank. Es ist bald Zeit für eine Sauerstoffspülung aller drei Brennstoffzellen.
Роджер. П
D
Gemini VI, Карнарвон. Похоже, у вас та же проблема с магнитофоном, что и на VII. Если можете до него дотянуться, попробуйте постучать. Возможно, это поможет нам почувствовать движение 
좋아요. 리겔 켄타우리(Rigel Kentauri)도 그중 하나입니다. -- 리겔 켄타우리는 누구인가
روجر. +90، G&N: 63481، -153، +132؛ 004 10 25 38؛
Apollo 8, Houston. How about a COMM che
Хорошо. Теперь следующим этапом будет отделение с
Okay. Good deal, Frank. The other one is - the boys in the bac
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston. Du klingst wirklich toll, wir sehen 
نعم، يمكنك رؤية المنظر بوضوح. انخفض مقدمة الطائرة قليلاً تحت الأفق، ثم عادت للا
ठीक है। ये वही हैं जो आपके फ्लाइट प्लान के पेज 2-86 पर छपे हैं। हम चाहते हैं कि वह इन्हें पूरा करें, जैसा कि मैंने कहा, जब भी वह अपनी वर्तमान सीरीज पूरी कर लें। पहले वाले को हम दो सेट में बढ़ाना चाहते हैं; दूसरे वाले को भी हम दो सेट में बढ़ाना चाह
ठीक है, अब आप थोड़े
Roger. Tranquility, ici Houston. On vous reçoit. Passez la FM. On a raté la fréquence 108. Voulez-vous qu'on essaie de v
ジェミニ4、
Yes, they are hanging together. I haven't even looked at them for the last half hour. I have bee
로
Bien. Dans cette configuration, les relevés embarqués suivants sont nécessaires: tension de la batterie C, tension de la batterie pyrotechnique A, tension de la batterie pyrotechnique B, pression d'hélium, températures des injecteurs (positions 5 Charlie, 5 Delta, 6 Alfa, 6 Bravo, 6 Charlie, 6 Delta) et pression du collecteur de batterie (position 4 Alfa). Le système es
こんにちは、太平洋司令艦です。
Das ist in Ordnung mit den Kardanaufhängungen, Fred. Sonst nichts auf Seite 14. Weiter auf Seite 15. Unter „PRÜFUNG“ möchten wir die Formulierung streichen und stattdessen schreiben: „Überprüfen Sie die folgenden Schalter: FÜHRUNGSSTEUERUNG;“ Schritt 3 – Korrektur – es ist Zeile 3. Ändern Sie „ANSICHTSSTEUERUNG (3)“ in „MODUSSTEUERUNG;“ und „MODUSSTEUERUNG (BEIDE)“ in „AUTO“. Überprüfen Sie ACA PROP, LMP AKTIVIERT; ACA/4 JET, LMP AKTIVIERT; /TRANSLATION, LMP AKTIVIERT. Das ist alles auf Seite 15. E
罗杰。信不信由你，我们在“鹰”号的会合雷达上看到了一
It is not twice 
Roger. Hai ricevuto la mia ultima risposta? Ho
Nur zu
It looks like I just passed over some of the Marshall Islands down there. They were quite clear and you can see the atolls 
Roger, Apollo 8. Couple of notes for you: on the you are coming up to on this, we've looked at your state vectors and
이유는 모
我々は東経95度くらいで、スミス海に近づい
아주 좋습
Okay. I still have my ball powered up and I'm coming around past 270 right n
Okay, Joe. Wenn ich das richtig verstehe, führen wir nach 74 Stunden bei Position 2 einen Sonnencheck durch. Dafür muss das Rendezvous-Radar außer Betrieb genommen werden. Wir nutzen das AUTO-Manöver, um dorthin zu gelangen, oder zumindest die Winkelberechnung. Wenn die Abweichung unter 1 Grad liegt, ist die Plattform für das Manöver geeignet und wir benötigen keinen weiteren Check. Selbst wenn alles in Ordnung ist, geben Sie uns einen Stern, den wir für unseren Check in der Dunkelheit verwenden können. Sollte dieser Check fehlschlagen, leiten Sie uns zum Erd-Mond-Linienverfahren we
Roger, Friendship Seven. Reading you loud and clea
Andare a mangiare gyros in gabbia. I gyros sono in gabb
ジェミニ4、グアイ
軌道レートが不安定な場合は、海岸に近づくにつれて追跡タスク用に独自のモード
私もはっきりと聞き取れました。CAPCOMをお
至于你问的Vance的问题，要立
Clairement en dessous de moi. Je le suivais du regard depuis Carnarvon. Jusqu'à Carnarvon, il était en dessous de nous, puis il est monté jusqu'à l'horizon, avant de redescendre en dessous. On aurait presque dit qu'il était sur une orbite différente de la mienne. Son apogée et son périgée étaien
罗杰。高度调整参数为：ΔV，14.0；持续时间，0 加 24；偏航 180 度，俯仰 0；核心 25，
나는 제정신
D'accord. Je tiens
أُفعّل خاصية "التشغيل المجاني" بشكل منتظم في جميع الدورات التدريبية. بعد ضبط انحراف الطائرة، تأكد من تشغيل ضوء الت
11, qui Houston. In riferimento alla tua valutazione soggettiva secondo cui ieri sera la temperatura all'interno della navicella era più bassa, in precedenza abbiamo riferito di aver effettivamente registrato un calo di circa 3 gradi rispetto alla notte precedente. Ripensandoci, sembra che l'equipaggio dell'Apollo 10 abbia riportato sensazioni simili durante le fasi translunare e transterrestre della costa. Ci chiedevamo se potessi darci qualche indicazione sulle quantità relative di acqua libera o condensata nella cabin
Houston, wir überfliegen gerade ein Gebiet östlich der Smyth-See, wie wir in unseren Seekarten gesehen haben. Die Smyth-See erreichen wir in wen
Ok. Stai andando molto debolmente. Consigliamo di spegnere il riscaldatore del serbatoio O2 1, di impostare il riscaldatore del serbatoio O2 2 su AUTO, di impostare le ventole dei s
Okay. Burn rules. We should shut down for the if we have the thrust monitor at 77 percent or below; number 2, if the propellant ullage pressure is le
타나나리브, 제미니 VI. GET
了解。25はマイナス0480、26と27は全部ゼロ
जेमिनी VI, कुछ मिनटों के लिए VII पर जा रहे हैं। हम जल्द
Panneau 3: Amplificateur de puissance sur
我想往这边走，远离那里—
Sì, lo abbiamo f
Hallo,
...169시간에 하
На Гавайях сейчас температура воды в нашем гидрокостюм
मुझे आपकी बात साफ-साफ स
そして今、画面の右側の部分には、明るい色の光線が一方向に流れているメシエ アルファとメ
Ricevuto. Segue il rapporto sull
Это не ночник, или это эксперимент
好的。就颜色而言，水体都呈现出一种皇家蓝；云朵当然是亮白色；地球的反射——看起来比月亮的反射要强烈得多。陆地通常呈棕褐色——质地介于深棕到浅棕之间。可以看到许多不同天气系统的云旋。一条长长的卷云带从墨西哥湾入口一直延伸到大西洋上空。当然，晨昏线现在正横穿大西洋，自北向南延伸。南半球几乎完全
Vous pouvez laisser votre ordinateur allumé, vous s
こんにちは、プライマリーO2圧力を800まで下げ
Hopefully, you'll see the - or we'll see th
That's affirm. I'm going to first of all just quickly run through the times of the major events, and then we'll go back and fill in some of the details. Okay. Entry interface is at 142 hours 40 minutes; 6-1/2 hours, roughly prior to that or at about, we'll start this whole thing going by applying HEATER POWER, by checking the CM/ temperatures and preheating the CM/ if required, and we suspect we'll probably want to do that. We'll have detailed procedures up for it later. At about 6 hours prior to or about, we will commence powering up the, powering up the, using the modified / 30-minute checklist, which you have used for the previous midcourse. Then shortly, just before 5 hours, prior to or at about, we'll want you in the attitude for a body axis alinement, using the Earth terminator like we did before; and as soon as we have that, we'll perform -7, which looks like, now, about a 2-foot-per-second burn or about 15 seconds of. And I'm told that it's down to 1-1/2 now,
Хорошо, Фред. В строке 3 под COMM откройте DISPLAYS, а з
こんにちは
حسنًا. وقبل المتابعة، دعنا نضبط معدل نقل البيانات على مستوى عالٍ وننتظر ثانية واحدة. ثم أثناء تنفيذ الإجراء، نريدك
Affermativo. Ora probabilmente digiterai 37 ENTER 06 ENTER sul computer. Quello che vogliamo fare è mettere il computer in standby; se digiti 37 06, dovrai premere INVIO per ottenere il codice 62. Se il codice è 62, puoi premere PROCEED finché non 
了解、ジャック。これで手順は完了です。次に、コマンドモジュールに戻り、バスを使ってメインバスを一時的に起動する手順を説明します。まず、メインバスに負荷がかかっていないこと、すべての電源がオフになっていること、バスの状態が良好であることを必ず確認します。次に、バス（メインバス）にバス・タイ・モーター・スイッチで電源を投入します。その後、回路ブレーカーを抜いて電源を切ります。メインバス・タイ・スイッチはオンのままにしておきます
Je suis au plus bas, Jo
Okay, der nächste ist 12 22 00 Apollo Yaw Orientation Night Chec
आप सही कह रहे हैं। यह प्राइम
Roger, Neil. Nous observons des hausses de température légèrement supérieures à la normale lors de l'expérience sismique passive et nous nous demandions si vous pouviez vérifier la position de déploiement. Nous avons cru comprendre qu'elle se situe
Ihr wollt wissen, was 
分かりました、ジム。ランデブーレーダーのア
Roger. My small end was up above the horizon so I couldn't see the horizon. As it came around toward the sun I saw the - this other satellite, but then as the sun came in through the window I lost it because the sun was so br
Мы только что потеряли связ
بالإضافة إلى
了解。了解、フランク。これからの予定について少し考えがあります。ジムが起きたら星空観測です。地球の地平線はもう十分見たようです。すべて順調に見えます。それでは月の地平線観測を始める準備が整いました。ジムが起きたら、月と星空の様子を撮影す
Il cavo elettrico, Frank, è appeso. A giudicare dalla tua forza centrifuga, ora è praticamente dritto. Sembra lungo circa 3 metri... f
И мы сейчас внесем - ™ в поле ПРИН
真是愚蠢。现在我们切换到电传操纵低空飞行。我​​犯了
That's correct
SPOT 测压仪在左边的小食物盒里。你
Okay,... Questo è un altro grande... amico. Se dobbiamo iniziare a bere acqua 
確認しました。1つを約2分間
Non, certainement pas (tousse) - certainement pas. Nous affichons - nous affichons environ 15 degrés d'
こんにちは、カナリ
Aquarius, Houston. Nel riquadro 16, vorrem
おはようございます、フランク。プライマリラジエーター出力温度のトランスデューサーが故障したようです。スケール外の
좋습
알겠습니다. 모드 1의 새로운 자세, 롤 - 모드 1, 5시간, 롤 1.38, 피치 7.89, 요 357.37; 모드 1, 15분, 롤 1
The visibility through the telescope has been very poor. I
Мы слышали от них одно показание, котор
好的。在
收到
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम आपके ट्रांसड्यूसर में O2 प्रवाह को आपके द्वारा खोले गए प्रवाह वाल्व से सहसंबंधित करने का प्रयास करना चाहेंगे। आप
そうです。私たちは一つ
حسنًا. هذا صحيح، والجملة الأخيرة في التحديث هي أنه يمكنك توقع رؤية المذنب بزاوية دوران 45 درجة و155 درجة. الآن، يا جاك، وفقًا للرسوم البيانية التي عرضوها عليّ، يبدو أن المذنب يبعد حوالي 10 درجات عن الشمس، وبسبب هندسة حجب الشمس، يبدو أنه سيكون بإمكانك رؤية المذنب من خلال السدس دون حدوث انحراف ضوئي بسبب الشمس بين زاويتي دوران 45 درجة و75 درجة تقريبًا. يبدو أنه كلما زادت زاوية دوران التلسكوب عن 75 درجة، ورغم أن المذنب لا يزال ضمن مجال الرؤية، فإن الشم
I muri sembrano davvero butterati. E infatti
Roger. Chiamaci pure. Stiamo lavorando ad altre co
Roger. Glaubst du, es liegt an der 
روجر، لا تقلق بشأن ذلك الموجود في أفريقيا لأنه يبعد حو
Seems like when yo
ठीक है। क्या वे G&N सिस्टम लगाने की योजना बना रहे हैं या कोई दूसरा सिस्टम इस्तेमाल करेंगे
Roulis, lacet, roul
Okay. We'll - 
そうです。電力プロファイルを望ましい状態に保つためにそうしています
Roger, 11. This is Houston. At approximately 71 hours to 72 hours, we have you down for an eat period which I imagine is probably in progress already. 71 hours: O2 fuel cell purge; 72 hours GET: CO2 filter change number 6, secondary radiator flow check. And we'll send you up a block data on a 2 hour pass, pericynthion pass, re
Oh, it's the summation of the opinions of all our experts down her
Houston, Eagle. Wir machen mit dem Kameracheck weiter. Ich h
Okay. Aufgrund von Störgeräuschen in der Ausrichtung ist Ihre Verbindung unterbrochen. Wenn Sie den Leistungsverstärker-Schutzschalter a
أبو
That's affirmative. The folks here are evaluating the thermal situation. Looks like you will be out of rather at an extended period of time. That's the reason we have you initiating again there around as soon as you finish those three star sightings. We are still working on the - about the next 10 hours after. We are looking a
ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP COM。コンピュータのスイッチはオン、AC電源スイッチはACMEにし
Sigma Seven, mi ca
Oui, je l'ai déjà fait plusie
Noch ein Punkt. Die Philosophie hinter diesem Zwischenschritt ist, ihn kurz vor der geplanten Entlüftung des Dampftanks durchzuführen. So hoffen wir, dass wir – 
それは、電圧を読み取
Ich habe ein paar Fotos mit Blende 2.8 und Blitzlicht gemacht. Hier ist eins vom Ballon. Die Sonne ist jetzt zu hell. Daher kommen die kleinen weißen Frostpartikel. Ich schließe daraus, dass die gesamte Kapselwand m
好的。来自英国乔德雷尔班克天文台，美联社报道：英国乔德雷尔班克大型射电望远镜于美国东部时间今天下午5点49分停止接收来自苏联无人登月探测器“月球15号”的信号。一位发言人表示，“月球15号”飞船似乎“已经飞越月球”。另一则消息称：“我们认为它没有着陆，”天文台台长伯纳德·洛弗尔爵士的发言人说道。华盛顿合众国际社报道：副总统斯皮罗·T·阿格纽呼吁在2000年前将人类送上火星，但民主党领导人回应称，必须优先考虑地球上的需求。阿格纽是周三阿波罗11号发射时在场的最高级别政府官员，他当时说“依我之见，我们应该在本世纪末之前将人类送上火星”，显然他当时是在代表自己，而不是代表尼克松政府。德克萨斯州拉雷多，美联社报道：新拉雷多的移民官员周三宣布，除非嬉皮士洗澡理发，否则将被拒绝发放旅游签证入境墨西哥。新拉雷多墨西哥移民局局长胡贝托·卡萨拉斯表示，墨西
わかりました。最後のジョーは、マイナス4時間半の で実行されました。0.5フィート/秒のプッシュ、4ジ
حسنًا. سيأتي PYRO B مُجهزًا. أعتز
Attends Buzz. Ça a l'air plutôt bien, d'après ce que je vois. On a la ligne de convergence tropicale là-bas. Il y a quelques nuages ​​sur la carte météo que je regarde, mais rien d'important. Pour l'instant... Attends. Voyons voir, là, à mi-hauteur... oui, à MPL... on a 3000 pieds de nuages ​​épars, visibilité 10 pieds, vagues de 3 pieds, c'est la météo actuelle. Je ne pense pas qu'il y ait de prévisions importantes. Il y a quelques... FLIGHT vient de m'informer que ce que je viens de te donner était les prévisions. Il y a quelques tempêtes tropicales dans le... enfin, pas dans
Okay. Alles klar, bei 115 Grad Steigung, Altair, Welle 274,
Joe, tu pourrais peut-être dire à nos amis de Crew Systems que les bottes lunaires font d'excellents chauffe-pie
如果
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Uns sind einige Auffälligkeiten am Sauerstoffdurchflussmesser aufgefallen. Wir vermuten, dass der Messwertaufnehmer fehlerhaft ist. Wir hätten erwartet, dass der Sauerstoffdurchfluss bei auf „VENT“ gestellter Abfallbehälterentlüftung maximal ansteigt. Dies war jedoch nicht der Fall. Auch beim Schließen des Abfallbehälterentlüftungsventils traten ungewöhnliche Anzeigen auf. Wir werden dies über Nacht weiter beobachten und uns morgen früh mit einer Einschätzung des Problems bei Ihnen melden. Eine konkrete Frage: Stimmt die Arretierung – Korrektur: Richtet sich der Pfeil auf die Arretierung aus –, wenn Sie das Abf
Okay, dann legen Sie l
Хорошо. Топливо 1,0; окислитель 0,25; дисбаланс оксида кислорода уменьшается, что мало что значит, и, думаю, это не слишком большая нагрузка, Вэнс. Я не заметил, чтобы акселером
了解です。
ठीक 
Roger, ich habe dich verstanden. Ich habe ein Update zum Flugplan
حسنًا. جاك يُري فريد الإجراءات. أريد أن أجعله مُل
Ok. Volevo solo che ne foste consapevoli e che ci pensaste e che ci rifletteste sulle possibili implicazioni per il piano di volo. Poi vi mostrerò questo grandangolo e il commento sulla Luna e vedrò quali sezioni ritengono più appropriate. Ok. Sulla pergamena, Frank voleva che verificassimo l'ordine in cui poteva aspettarsi di vedere il profilo di ingresso, e il primo profilo che appare è etichettato "Nonexit Numero 2" e si tratta dell'ingresso a corto raggio e ad alta velocità. Il secondo profilo che apparirà è intitolato "The 3500 Mile
로저. 레이더 관측 잘했습니다. 줄리안이 함께하지 못해서 정말 아쉽습니다. 제어 모드에 대한 보고를 드리겠습니다. 우선 수동 모드와 플라이 바이 와이어 저고도 모드는 아주 훌륭합니다. 보조 감쇠 장치도 완벽하게 작동합니다. 지금은 자동 모드, 후방 자세 제어 모드입니다. 자세가 아주 잘 유지되고 있습니다. 출발합니다. 제 우주복 온도가 약간 올라가고 있습니다
……80 00 04
よし、ヴァンス。カートリッジMODのためにいくつかアイテムを発見した。一つは、トートバッグに使う予定だった特殊な防塵カバーバッグ。かなり厚くて通気性のないものだ。それから、2階のキッチンに行って何度か水を抜いて、また大量のドリンクバッグを作った。それから、パントリーから、ドリンクバッグが入っているプラ​​スチック製のかなり大きな密閉容器を取り出してきた。
Hello
Uns interessiert der Kammerdruck nicht,... Vorsicht - mach dich 
네. 제가 확인해 본 226개의 회로 차단기 중에서, 관련된 회로 차단기는 총 6개입니다. 패널 맨 아래 줄 왼쪽에서 두 번째부터 여섯 번째까지의 회로 차단기들이죠. 조명(LIGHTING) 항목 아래에 있습니다. 우리는 투광등(FLOOD) 회로 차단기 3개와 숫자/정수형 회로 차단기 3개를 모두 닫아야 합니다. (물론 완전히 닫는
Хорошо. Сейчас углы наклона подвеса составляют примерно 190 градусов по крену, 320 по тангажу и 340 по рысканию. Мы, безусловно, можем выполнить полет в таком положении. Это будет норма
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हमारे पास अभी
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Le rapport de trente minutes se poursuit. La pression cabine est de 5,6 et se maintient. La température cabine est de 95 degrés et diminue lentement. L'humidité relative est de 20 %, la quantité de réfrigérant est de 67 %, et la température ambiante de la combinaison est de 68 degrés. La pression est de 5,8. La température de la vapeur est de 47 degrés, et je la réduis encore un peu. Le taux d'oxygène est de 68 à 100 %; l'intensité est de 22 ampères; les tensions: principale 24, 25, 25, 25; de secours 1, 25, 25. Le voyant d'excès 
不，不，等一下。上面写的是“对接探针，伸出/释放，关闭”，嗯
Roger, Fred. Verstanden.
はい、約10cmほどかかります。いや、ちょっと待っ
네, 정말 흥
يقول با
Gemini VI, RKV. We have a Posigrade Maneuver update for you as soon as we finish with Gemini 
그러시는 동안, 지휘 조종사님께서 부스터에 대한 정보, 거리, 부스터 가까이 접근해서 보려면 어떻게 해야 하는지, 그리고 조명은 어떻게 작동하는지 등을 간
我们有一
نعم. لقد قررنا استخدام علبة، وكما تعلم، فإنّ الملابس المبردة بالسوائل مزودة بكيس نعتقد أنه يمكننا استخدامه أيضًا، أو على الأقل نعرف أنه يمكننا استخدامه. لقد جربناه. إذن، ما لديك هو كيس داخل كيس، وداخله الملابس المبردة بالسوائل. الكيس الأقرب إلى الملابس المبردة بالسوائل هو الذي نحتاجه، ولدينا اثنان منه. وبالطبع، علينا استخدام بعض الشريط اللاصق، وكما ذكرت، أحد أغلفة كتيب بيانات الرحلة أو ما شابه، وباستخدام هذه المواد فقط، يمكننا صنع علبة مؤقتة. إذن، الكيس الذي نبحث عنه هو الكيس المجاور للملابس المبردة بالسوائل، وإذا كنا حذرين جدًا عند قصه، يمكننا صنع علبة 
ジェリー、もう少ししたら、マイナスMAに基づいたちょっとした演習を試してみたいと思います。一つだけ試してみて、地上から解を得て、比
はい。が月見の
Хорошо. У меня температура в салоне 100 градусов, температура купола салона 40 градусов; температура теплообменника в са
로
أشعر أنني على وشك... البقاء على قيد الحياة في الق
Ok. Abbiamo capito. Ti stiamo inviando 
Allez-y Houston, Gemini 
ロジャー、ヒ
Fred, Houston. We'll have to stand by for 1 minute. We are 
No, I mean why can't you null 
Okay. Du solltest jetzt in den rechten Bereich hineinseh
좋습니다. 아래쪽 메인 회로 상태는 여전히 매우 양호해 보이므로, 전반적으로 괜찮은 것 같습니다. 배터리 B 충전은 대략 이쯤에 완료될 것으로 예상되며, 배터리 A는 
Roger. Bien reçu. C'était m
العودة إلى الماسح الضوئي الأساسي بعد 34 دقيقة. وقت التسخين حوالي 30 ثانية. سننتظر دقيقتين للحصول على فرصة 
...당신이 제안하는 것은... 우리는 지반 조사에 CEX와 CMAX에서 1/250을 11로 사용하고 있습니다. 확인해 주시겠습니까? 이상
753 at 09 - 11:09 - Sun right on the horizon. We haven't had much success with the photo-event indicator on the Hasselblad. We have it. Puts the shutters in the - what do they call that thing? The shutter doesn't fall
Our medical monitor says that we are reading your respiration. I believe this is almost the first time it's come acr
Roger. Im Bericht zu Essen und Trinken steht, dass beide Piloten zwei Mahlzeiten zu sich genommen haben. Wir rechnen
Да. Переходные процессы были более заметны, чем во время предыдущих включений двигателя, Чарли. Я просто списал это на то, что у нас был лёгкий командный модуль, но наблюдалась значительная активность крена, которая, как мне кажется, затихла после первых 20 секунд включения двигателя; но затем появилась также некоторая активность тангажа и рыскания. Я не думаю, что это было чем-то ненормальным, и, похоже, наблюдалась довольно чё
Negative. I have a beautiful sunrise through the window. I
罗杰，请问您能否帮忙查询一
로저. 우리
...работают очень хорошо, но я не думаю, что он кого-либо умеет читать. Поэтому мне придется передать информацию. Оружие работает отлично. Он смог маневрировать повсюду — в
ठीक है। खैर, म
기분은 꽤 
알겠습니다. 정상 모드입니다. 잠금 해제 후부터 명령 재설정을 해 놨는데, 제가 돌아가서 옴니 시스템을 제어해야 하니, 가서 도그 모드로 전환해 주세요. 그러고 나서 다시 돌려주시면 제가 다른 하나를
ठीक है। हमने सभी से राय ली। हमें ज्यादा जानकारी नहीं है, लेकिन 
We ha
जी हां। यहां के लोग थर्मल स्थिति का आकलन कर रहे हैं। ऐसा लगता है कि आपको काफी लंबे समय तक संपर्क से बाहर रहना पड़ेगा। इसीलिए हमने आपको तीन तारा अवलोकन पूरा करने के तुरंत बाद फिर से संपर्क शुरू करने के लिए कहा है। हम अगले लगभग 10 घंटों तक इस पर काम कर रहे हैं। हम थर्मल स्थिति और तारा अवलोकन की स्थिति का जायजा ले रहे हैं और आप
没错。就在我右边，我看到一大片灯光，显然就在海岸线上。我能看到一座城镇的轮廓
ما نحاول فعله حقًا هو وضعك في وضعية تسمح لك، عندما ترى الأرض 
로저,
Roger. I'll give you my configuration. I am in auto, retro control mode; gyros are normal; maneuver switch is off; all consumables are in the green; electrical is checking out very well; capsule is tracking well. The moon is perfect reference at this point, it is right on the predicted path as well as Venus, as you probably
Oui, ça a l'air bien.
ويبدو يا جو أن الكثير من الحطام يتدلى من 
حسنًا يا جاك. لقد قمت بت
こんにちは、マイク。準備ができました。睡眠時間中にオムニポジションに切り替えてください。高ゲインスイッチの位置は、高ゲインアンテナをマニュアル、ビーム幅をワイド、ピッチをマイナス50度、ヨーをプラス270度に設定してください。残りの通信設定はフライトプランに従ってください
Columbia, Houston. Richiedi in ACCEPT e ti forniremo un buon vettore GO.
फिर से 
Und
Roger. 7 /: 45701, moins 040, plus 157, plus 32346, moi
هذا صحيح. حسنًا، الآن سننتقل إلى اللوحة رقم 5، وهي قاطع الدائرة G&N، كمبيوتر، رئيس
Ci stiamo pensando propri
そうです。それを見ていて他に思いつくの
E potresti tenere d'occhio in modo particolare il serbatoio di spurgo e il serbatoio di
Ему было трудно сохранять ориентацию, и мне показалось, что с этого момента он ориентировался вне космического корабля, не обращая внимания на то, в каком направлении тот направлен. Он мог передавать ему довольно высокую скорость, до 2° в секунду. Я намеревался держать их ниже этого уровня. Когда он вернулся в космический корабль, у нас возникли значительные трудности с люком. Сначала мы подняли храповую часть люка, чтобы зафиксировать его. После того, как мы это сделали, мы не могли закрыть люк достаточно плотно. На самом деле, мы начали тянуть вниз за фиксирующие ручки, чтобы вытащить защелки. Так что у
आप ह्यूस्टन से पूछ 
Questa cosa è un po' bassa qui. Prendo l'altr
알겠습니다. 40분 10초쯤에 S-3
Apollo 11, this is H
光线极佳
De quelle manière vouliez-v
Bene. Guardando la voce 1: il secondo elemento riguarda la fase di cold soak Kelvin di 12 ore, e nelle discussioni che ho avuto qui e prima del volo, credo che si sia concordato che non vogliamo effettuare la fase di cold soak. Quindi elimineremo il passaggio 2. In pratica, credo che vogliamo effettuare la fase di cold soak, e certamente vogliamo testare i boiler ad acqua prima dell'inserimento per assicurarci di non averne uno asciutto, nello stesso modo in cui 
友谊七号，这里是印度首都通讯中心。请注意，我们已启动火炬点火
D'accord. Avant d
बेशक, यहाँ से
Okay, Fred. Mir ist klar, dass nur der rote Schlauch des LMP tatsächlich an den Kanisterbeutel angeschlossen ist. In diesem Fall bitten wir dich, die Vorgehensweise zum Einführen des anderen roten Schlauchs in den anderen Kanisterbeutel wie folgt zu befolgen: Schneide ein diagonales Loch in eine Ecke des Beutels. Schau dir den anderen Beutel an und schau, wie es dort gemacht wurde. Stecke den Sch
Roger. Parmi les gros titres concernant Apollon ce matin, l'un d'eux vous invite à guetter une charmante jeune fille accompagnée d'un gros lapin. Une légende ancienne raconte qu'une belle Chinoise nommée Chang'o vit là depuis 4 000 ans. Il semblerait qu'elle ait été bannie sur la Lune pour avoir volé la pilule d'immortalité à son époux. Vous pourriez également chercher son compagnon, un grand l
Row are the 
روجر. أنت في وضعية الدفع الخماسي يا مايك. نريد إعدادات نظام OMNI كما يلي: وضع OMNI Alfa في وضع Bravo، وOMNI إلى OMNI، ومسار الكسب العالي إلى الو
حسن
Ro
حسنًا، الآن نصف ما أراه مضاء والنصف الآ
Roger. Diesmal hat es nicht geklappt. Als ich den Einflugpunkt 27303 ENTER erreichte, rollte die Maschine mit einer hohen Geschwindigk
حسنًا. هناك ملاحظة هنا تنص على استخدام وصلة التعشيق العلوية للكاميرا، بدلًا من وصلة التعشيق الجانبية. استخدم وصلة التعشيق العلوية للكاميرا لتثبيتها على الحامل، وضع
Et une fois de plus, il nous faut corriger légèrement l'orientation. Notre Terre disparaît vers le haut et la droite. Notre Terre et votre Terre. Mauvaise direction, mauvaise direction. Encore un peu. D'accord. C'est bon si vous arrivez à la maintenir ainsi. Oups! Elle glisse à nouveau. D'accord. Continuez encore un peu, encore un peu. D'accord. 90 degrés dans cette direction; c'est le mauvais 90, dans l'autre sens. Voilà. Encore un peu. Non, m
아마 아내분들이 어떤 말씀을 하셨는지 궁금하실 거예요. 닐, 제니는 어제 있었던 일에 대해 이렇게 말했어요. "저녁은 믿을 수 없을 만큼 완벽했어요. 남편, 승무원, 유인 우주선 센터, 미국 국민, 그리고 모든 인류와 함께 달 탐사의 시작이라는 장엄한 경험을 나눌 수 있어서 영광이고 특권입니다." 그러자 제니에게 달 착륙이 인생에서 가장 위대한 순간이었는지 물었더니, "아니요, 그건 우리가 결혼한 날이었어요."라고 답했죠. 마이크, 팻은 간단히 "정말 환상적이고 멋진 일이었어요."라고 말했고요. 버즈, 조앤은 달에 있다는 사실을 믿기 어려워하는 것 같았어요. "사람들이 실제로 움직이기 전까지는 
Roger. Und Fred wird jetzt abgelös
我
هل يعلمون أنني بخير؟ أظن ذلك، فقد سمعتهم يطرقون ع
Okay. If n
Хорошо. Теперь мы закрыли сливно
And it looks as though - I guess what's giving it that three dimensional effect is the earthshine. I can see Tycho fairly clearly - at least if I'm right side up, I believe it's Tycho, in moonshine - I mean, in earthshine. And, of course, I can see the sky 
Schleudersitzsicherheit auf... - Carnarvon GO - und Schultergurt wurde gelös
Und ein Manöver 
D'accord. Jack signale depuis l'étage qu'il peut voir des étoiles et des constellations à travers les optiques, mais que l'angle du soleil est tel qu'il se reflète sur la 
了解。ターミナルフェーズの経過時間、開始1プラス29プラス17、GET、5プラス16プラス54、デルタVT、33.0、継続時間、41秒、コア、25、00301、26、90135、27、00016。待機してください。残
Хорошо. Поставьте отметку, и я ещё р
Роджер. 
Bene. Al momento, Houston, la tensione è... sembra buona. E abbiamo sentito un botto piuttosto forte associato alle avvertenze di ATTENZIONE e AVVERTENZA. E, se non ricordo male, la PRINCIPALE B era quella che aveva avuto un picco di corr
フレンドシップ・セブン、フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはムチェア・コム・テック。HFとUHFで呼び
D'accord, merci. Nous allons maintenan
과이마스 캡 콤입니다. 월리 씨, 기분이 어떤지 간단히 알려주시
كما أن نتيجتك أسرع بثانيتين. التسلسل الرجعي لمنطقة التعافي في حال
Bene. E un'altra cosa che abbia
아폴로 8호,
Ich habe gerade ein Foto mit der S-5 gemacht. Ich komme gerade über die Sahara. Es ist wirklich ein wunderschöner Anblick. Ich mache noch ein pa
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Мы хотим убедит
听起来是个好消息
Ricevuto. Un errore, Columbia, sul TIG per DOI; secondi 1407. Fi
好的……
了
في مرورك القادم يا كولومبيا، بدلاً من القيام بعملية مسح، نود منك البحث في محيط الإحداثيات التي زودناك بها، وهي أفضل تحليل لدينا بناءً على فيزياء الخريطة والمسار. لدينا أيضاً مجموعة أخرى من الإحداثيات نود منك البحث في محيطها. هذه الأخيرة مبنية على جميع تفسيرات 
Bonjour, Apollo 11, Houston. Votre équipe blanche est à votre disposit
रॉजर। आपके एडाप्टर बैटरी के रीडिंग आ रहे हैं। वोल्टेज के हिसाब से सभी में 1-A से 1-C तक 24 रीडिंग आ रही है। एम्पीयर रीडिंग 1-A पर 6, 1-B पर 10, 1-C पर 11, 2-A पर 6, 2-B पर 5 और
Okay. Wir haben einen davon fertig, und es sieht so aus, als könnten wir mit den Klebestreifen ein recht gutes Ergebnis erzielen. Zuerst die Streifen zusammenkleben und dann mit einem Stück Papier und dem Beutel... eine ziemlich gute Versiegelung hinbekommen
Wir haben jetzt auch viele Hintergrundgeräusche. Wenn Sie noch eine Minute warten, bis wir etwas weiter drin sind, wird 
Hello, Ap
आपक
Gemelli 4, qui Houston CAP
Im Fach A1 befindet sich das 16-mm-Magazin in Fenster 4 statt 5. Taschentuchspender: Es ist nur noch eine
Это довольно неплохо. Это резервная копия голосового сигнала, и вы подтвердите, что находитесь в режиме узкого луча с высоким коэффи
نعم، أوديسي. وأغلق أيضاً مجموعة الأجهزة الإلكترونية وا
Ricevuto. Il tempo di combustione è 2+40. Il GMTRC è 16:56:01. 400
قراءتي الآن هي 2.8
ठीक है। इसमें लगभग साढ़े छह मिनट
フレッド、了解。可動アンテ
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Die Kurse sehen momentan recht gut aus, aber wir würden Sie bitten, Ihre Position weiterhin zu hal
Да, в
Rog
Понял. Электронное управление проверено; все двигатели исправ
Gemini 4，这里是
ठीक है। मेरी समझ से, इस डिवाइस की स्कैन चेतावनी सीमा ट्रैकिंग को रोक देती ह
... コントローラーの
ठीक है। नीचे आने के लिए आपको अपनी पीठ को थोड़ा स
Okay
Ok. Volevo solo che ne foste consapevoli e che ci pensaste e che ci rifletteste sulle possibili implica
Deux choses, Jim. Nous voulons que tu saches qu'il 
Gémeaux 4, votre tension artérielle a bien été reçue. Nous attendons votre premier rapport sur votre hy
Хорошо. После этого, CB CTE, MAIN B, для закрытия. Далее, панель 250: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2 для закрытия; CB BAT C POWE
У меня есть светляч
D'accord, Aquarius. Ici, on se regroupe, on travaille sur tes modes de contrôle et on essaie de mettre au point quelque chose, notamment en examinant les consommables plutôt que le plan de vol, etc. Dès qu'on aura toutes ces informations, on te les transmettra. Les 14 membres d'équipage de réserve sont aussi sur les simulateurs pour s'entraîner 
Roger. Ora, per quanto riguarda il tuo riavvio avvenuto in orbita lunare, per la tranquillità degli informatici e del MIT, abbiamo una domanda. È stato il tasto ENTER a cau
I just made a run on Target 16-A. The air field at Basra, it's right at the Persian Gulf. I picked it up -- I picked the Persian Gulf up about... an angle of about 30°... I pitched down then picked up the lake.... northwest of the Persian Gulf. Basra being right on the lakes, very near the lak
Roger. Stanno benissimo e, per quanto ne sappiamo, da qui in poi tutto va bene.
그리고 13, 당신이 준비되면 저희도 TV에서 기
रॉजर, 2 अल्फा का समय 01 36 13 है, और जीएमटी 14 2
Хорошо. И верхний ряд указан верно. Во втором ряду нам нужно, чтобы были закрыты QUAD TCA с 1 по 4. В третьем ряду нам нужно, чтобы был закрыт ATCA (PGNS). В четвертом ряду нам нужно, чт
برج الدلو، هيوست
ठीक है, हमने 26 प
扫
Jim, wir würden gerne mit der Kalibrierung fortfahren und dann Stern Nummer 15 verwenden und drei Datensätze aufnehmen, gef
Роджеру 11 лет. Продолжай. 
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。我们认为这些读数在正常误差范围内。我们只是想在进一步粘贴这些贴纸
Там, где написано — там, где написано «И обратите внимание», — CMP находится в L-образной сумке вместе с двумя другими PGA. Защитный щиток был сброшен вместе с — Поправка, защитный щиток шлема CMP был сброшен вместе, а его шлем и перчатки, вместо того чтобы находиться в спально
Quando avrai qualche minuto, vorremmo riceve
罗杰。你地面上的状态看起来非
रॉजर. टू-ब्रावो: 90 ΔV. 16 52 25. बीता हुआ समय 02 28
هيوستن
अग
우리는 안타레스를 두 
그곳은 잘 지내고 있나요
Roger. Voilà Collins pour t
... ceci... Propulseurs à tir avant, combustion rétrograde
R
Non mi riferisco al modello di prova. Dico, non mi riferisco al modello di prova. Abbiamo chiesto loro di mettere il supercircolare sul numero, il primo posto sulla pergamena; 
Roger, got that
알겠습니다. 내림차순으로 8, 9,
They think I'm at Co
G.m.t. 해킹 15 10 4
Роджер. Майк, можешь смело набирать как можно больше меток 
أفضّل عدم الخوض في هذا الموضوع أصلاً. أخيراً تمكنت من إخراج مقياس الجرعات، وسأضطر لوضعه على الفتحة، ولكن دعني أضع علامة، لحظة، لا أستطيع 
Atlantic Ship, This is Friendship Seven. Wish you would pass to Cape. I let the capsule drift around to the 180° position and I am having to reorient at present time. When Iain all lined with the horizon and the periscope, my attitude indications now are way off. My roll indicates 30° right; my yaw indicates 35 [degrees] right; and pitch indicates plus 40 [degrees]; I repeat plus 40 [degrees] when 
Gemini 4. Flight хотел бы
Bien reçu. Le Hornet est en position, suffisamment éloigné du
Ого, посмотрите на этот... кратер. Наверное, вы м
Apollo 8, Houston.
맞아. 난 이 낙하산에서 전혀 구르지 않을 거야. 좋아, 그 빌어먹을 바이저 호스를 빼냈고, 벨크로 스트랩도 느슨하게 했어. 바이저 실링도 버렸고. 헬멧에서 배출 호스를 빼내서 공구함에
... pour toi, 
스캐너가 있는데 표시등을 무시하
Не навсегда, Майк. Просто подожди немного, пока Чарли проверит, как пользоваться этим специальным инструментом на камере. Команда
불을 켜셨
Хорошо. «Аполлон-11» остается главной новостью, и весь мир ждет вашей высадки сегодня примерно в 11:49 утра по хьюстонскому времени. В Вашингтоне реформаторы налоговой системы Палаты представителей разработали положе
버즈, 너 
好的。这是近西那日加 2 秒，以便快速返回。这将是 / 62871，减 161，加 129，加 45224，
Affermativo sui gimbal, Fred. Nient'altro a pagina 14. Procedi a pagina 15 e, alla voce "CHECKOUT", vorremmo cancellare quella dicitura e scrive
Мы уже вывели тормозной п
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। समाप
ترانكويليتي، هيوستن. روجر. أفاد المسعفون أن قراءتك الأخ
Okay, Joe. E mentre lo fai, ho una domanda sulla checklist del modulo di c
D'accord, Jack. Je n'
Le chiffre est maintenant d
La bussola è troppo influenzata dagli strumenti di assetto e dai giroscopi retrostanti. Ecco perché non ries
إليكم خبرًا طريفًا ومثيرًا للاهتمام. يبدو أن هناك عصابة شبابية جديدة في آن أربور، ميشيغان، تُدعى "عصابة جيلنت". تجوب هذه العصابة شوارع آن أربور، وتعمل سرًا، وتتجاوز القانون أحيانًا. يُطلقون على أنفسهم اسم "مقاتلو الخير". من بين أعمالهم: طلاء جسر كان مُغطى بعبارات بذيئة في إحدى الليالي. كما قاموا بإغلاق منزل مُهدم - كان يحظى بشعبية بين أطفال الحي، ولكنه خطير - بألواح خشبية. وملؤوا أحواض الزهور الفارغة في وسط المد
Tutt
जॉन, हमने आपके दृष्टि
LRキューブを手動で展開する場合、弦の先端
Das ist Friendship Seven, Flor-, ich kann
Roger. There will be another Height-Adjust Maneuver which will take place over the States on this next pass. You will b
아쿠아리우스님, 글리콜 온도가 상당히 올
Very good. We hear you loud and cle
आगे बढ़ो। ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस,
…オン
Hallo Kano. 
Es sieht so aus, als würde das Band noch laufen, und die rote Kontrollleuchte leuchtet noch nicht. Das ist wirklic
네, 왜요
D'accord. La purge est terminée. Merci. Concernant votre système cryogénique, il semble que nous aurons 82 kg dans chaque réservoir d'oxygène et 
罗杰。我们有30，SPS/G&N：36691，减去061，加上067 135 23 4149；加上32020，加上06713，减去02773 181 054 013；NA，加上00230，加上32833 228 326
11, Houston. Vous pouvez dès maintenant sélectionner O
Okay. It looks like an awful big one. We noticed that you'd moved star number 2 to the tail end of the listing, and we should b
حسنًا. ما زلنا متجهين إلى منتصف المحيط الهادئ، 357 152 359 267، بالإضافة إلى 0813، والناقص 16503 
Indian Cap Com, vi faccio un resoconto. Sono a 7.000 piedi, il paracadute principale è in buone condizioni, il sacco di atterraggio è sul verd
Okay. Es si
Forza Houston. Apoll
Perché non volevi che venissero spostati inavvertitamente, immagino. Non importa, Jim, possono ess
Houston, Apollo 11. We've got the continent of Africa... facing toward us right now, and of course, everything's getting smaller and smaller as time goes on. The Mediterranean is completely clear. The Sun looks like it's about to set around Madagascar. 
否。这在你的检查
لا يزال الأمر
Eh bien, zéro sera
ジェミニVII、VI。データポイントのプロットを見ると、まさにそ
Роджер. GET B 05 13 13; GTNSR, 012538; Delta-V, 32.6; вперед, 32.0; вверх, 1.7; влево, 5
ओह, मैं समझ गया। देखिए, क्या बिना लाइट जलाए रेटिकल दिख सकता है? ठीक है। हम जाँच करेंगे। और एक बात और, आप उस रेंडेज़वस 
On vous demande de laisser l'interrupteur sur AUTO jusqu'à ce soir, avant 
روجر، يا صديقي السابع. لقد سمع
11, Houston. Ich habe mi
At last we have solved the suit circuit temperature problem. I can see why Scott was concerned about this record position only. There is no side tone as well. The suit temperature at this time is - MARK.T - is 68 degrees and I'm feeling marvelous. The suit dome is about 72 degrees again. Appa
Хорошо, Джерри. С 
Fred, bitte wiederholen Sie es noch einmal. Ich kann Sie nicht verstehen. Es gibt zu viele Hintergr
Mike, c'est Frank. Est-ce que cette ém
D'accord. Vous avez OMNI Bravo et nous aimerions que vous vérifiiez que l'enregistreur est
わかりました。それでは、そちらでまとめておきます。ちょうど冗長コンポーネントのチェックについて話していたところですが、皆さんが寝静まるまで延期するつもりでした。左側のソファに行かないように
Роджер. Подтверждаю. И нет никакой возможности проверить, совпадает ли это. Я мешаю; может, 
نشعر ببعض الاهتزازات أثناء عملية الح
Okay. „Es war die Nacht vor Weihnachten, hoch draußen im Weltraum hatte die Apollo-8-Besatzung ger
Cavolo, sei debole, ma ti capisco. Sei leggibile. 
माइक, दोबारा बोलो। ओवर
Roger. Muchea Cap Com. Bien reçu. Dites à Jerry, Gus, Lewis et à tous les autres que j'ai travaillé avec « bonjour ». John Whittler, si vous le voyez, dites-lui de se
はい、時々窒息してし
双子座4号，这里是RKV。你听得
أبولو ٨، هيوستن. اكتملت عملية تفريغ البيانات؛ يمكنك استعادة جهاز الكمبيو
请稍等片刻
双子座4号，夏威夷CAP COM，U
قيمة الإضاءة للفيلم الأبيض والأسود هي 13 لحساسية ASA 64. ضبط قيمة الإضاءة على 13. التقاط الصورة رقم 7 باستخدام الفلتر. يصعب تصوير قارة أمريكا الجنوبية بسبب تقلبات الطقس. سألتقط صورة بانورامية الآن. سأبدأ بعد حوالي 8 ساعات. في الواقع، ستكون كذلك. MARKT، 7، 8، 9 صور بالأبيض والأسود. عشر صور بالأبيض والأسود. يتم التقاط الصور بسرعة غالق 250 مم وفتحة عدسة f/5.6 (1/250 ثانية وفتحة عدسة f/5.6) على مسافة لا نهائية. التقاط الصورة رقم 11، بالنظر إلى اليسار. أعبر قارة أمريكا الجنوبية عند هذه النقطة. أرى نهرًا كبيرًا. التقاط صورة، مع توجيه الكاميرا لأسفل قدر الإمكان. أعتقد أنني التقطت نافذة الكبسولة بشكل جيد جدًا ه
알겠습니다. 이 점을 알려드리고 비행 계획에 어떤 영향을 미칠지 생각해 보시길 바랐습니다. 달에 대한 광각 영상과 설명을 다시 보여드리고 어떤 부분이 가장 적절할지 의견을 들어보겠습니다. 네. 프랭크는 진입 프로필이 표시되는 순서를 확인해 달라고 했습니다. 첫 번째 프로필은 "비출구 2번(Nonexit Number 2)"으로, 단거리 고속 진입 프로필입니다. 두 번째는 "3,500마일(The 3,500 Mile)"로, 역시 고속 진입 프로필이지만 장거리 진입 시 사용하게 됩니다. 세 번째 프로필은 "비출구 1번(Nonexit Entry Number 1)"이고, 그 뒤에 네 번째 3,500마일 프로필이 나옵니다. 따라서 총 네 개의 진입 프로필이 있습니다. 1번과 3번은 단거리 진입 프로필이고, 2번과 4번은 장거리 진입 프로필입니다. 콜드소크에 대해서는, 우리가 어떻게 할 건지 이야기했던 것 같은데, 대략 한 시간 안에 콜드소크 작업을 시작해야 할 것 같습니다. 12시에 바로 하고 싶지는 않죠. 궤적 담당자들과 물 끓이기 현상에 대해 이야기를 나눴는데, 그들이 궤적 
Ну, смотрите, если мы зарядим этот — если я поставлю пленку на этот и сделаю пару снимков, — ну, мне придется его снова снимать; в этом-то и проблема. Мне не придется, но он не будет так аккуратно храниться. Если вас не смущает спуск с мотором, не с
أبولو 8، هيوستن في وضع الرؤية الع
Okay, what I have out now, Jack, is LEVVA, which has also been shown before. It's a head garment for wearing out on the surface, and I - I'm bringing Jim's out here to show a couple of MODs. One problem before is that the cast of characters down on the surface haven't been able to be distinguished apart very well. So, not only Jim's suit has some red stripes on it, but as you can see his LEVVA also has a - a red stripe. And now you can see one other
Roger. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. 30-Minuten-Bericht: Ein wichtiges Problem besteht weiterhin. Ich fliege derzeit mit Fly-by-Wire. Ich habe keinen Schub nach rechts über Fly-b
C'est exact, Jack, et cela complète l
Ok. Su Power 5, spegnimento di emergenza. Punto 1, prima riga, cancello "E VHF-A". Seconda riga "Funzionamento SIMPLEX". Terza riga, sostituisco il secondo apice, che è POWER AMP, con "OFF", e l'ultima parola di quella riga è "OFF",
收到。一切进展顺利。我的状态非常好。太空舱状态也非常好。控制模式正常。自动陀螺仪正常，机动功能已关闭。燃料量为72-100%。氧气量为88-100%。一切都正常，除了——我的飞行
روجر، لو سمحت، لو سمحت، أفسدت جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بن
La capsule est actuellement en configuration « chimpanzé ». J'ai beaucoup utilisé le mode proportionnel manuel.
I didn't think you were. I let you overshoot 15 minutes worth. I was doing D-8, and there wasn't an
Roger. D'accord. L'autre point concerne l'après-atterrissage. Nous le réaffirmons: vous ne devez pas rester plus d'une heure dans le vaisseau. Vous pouvez retirer vos combinaisons, à votre discrétion, si le vaisseau est étanche. L'ouverture de l'écoutille est entièrement à votre discrétion.
Роджер. Угол крена 00 градусов; RN 
Хорошо, Хьюстон, это CMP. Я так понимаю, у вас есть для меня кое-какие 
Roger. Il LMP si prenderà un breve riposo qui per un po'. Mi chiedevo, potresti darmi una rapida panoramica dello stato del sistema prima che io parta e, inoltre, darmi un'idea di quando è prevista la prossima agitazio
मेरे पास जो स्टार कंप्यूटर डिवाइस है, वह सितारों की पुष्टि करने में काफी मदद करता है, लेकिन शुरुआत में उन्
你开着它吗？那
그건 확인
You bet. On the sports page, not too much activity. UCLA is tops in both basketball polls. If you got any particular one you want to ask about, let me know, and I'll tell you if they are in the top ten on either poll. As far as the North - the college All Star game that is going to be played tomorrow is concerned, the North is a slight favorite over the South. Ara Parseghian is the coach of the North team, and he's got six of the Notre D
11, ह्यूस्टन। उस टीवी पर, हमारी कमेंट्री - जिस मॉनिटर पर मैं देख रहा था, वह लगभग 12 सेकंड, 12 से 15 सेकंड देरी से चल रहा था क्योंकि वह हमारे कलर कन्वर्टर से गुजर 
分かりました。ジムに伝えておきます。120アンペア時間になりますので、残りは203時間から
是的。好的，我前面四五项是：面板 3 上的 BAT CHARGE 开关关闭；AC INVERTER 2 关闭；面板 5：MAIN BUS TIE，BAT A/C 打开；面板 250：CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING 断开；面板 275：INVER
好的，明白了。我知道明天早上还要再进行一次氧气和氢气吹扫；我不确定你是否想进行这次吹扫。我会等
मुझे
진동기는 정상이었고 53분에 START CO
阿波罗8号。我们即将进行飞掠机动。这次的坐标为/63087，-162，+129，+009 62，+005 68，-020 77 000 000 000，十一月阿尔法，+00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013，向上048，向
Roger. No
Roger, j'ai une correction à apporter au plan de vol. Le largage de la bande magnétique au-dessus des îles Canaries aura lieu le 13e tour et celui pour Carnarv
हाँ, 
Хорошо, Водолей; Хьюс
Comincia
알겠습니다. 유도 시스템 
13번, 휴스턴. A와 C의 추진 밸브에 전력을 공급하려고 해도 소용없으니
Нет, я не видела площадку для подготовки. Было слишком туманно, но мы все равно видели ее на 
了解。この時間、曇り空の下に確かに白い雲が見えています。きっとブリスベンのような主要都市のどこかだと思いますが、よく分かりませ
가압을 시작할 때 워터씰 밸
알겠습니다. Y는 +024.80으로 읽었습니다. 플랫폼을 미세 조정하기 위해 활성화 40을
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 UHF와
Okay, Jack. Weiter geht's. Alles ist in Ordnung
Хорошо, 11. Отлично. Теперь, что касается упомянутого контейнера для образцов: по телевизору нам показалось, что образцы для этого контейнера отбирались, ис
Вперед — или Хьюстон, это Аполлон-8. 3 с 2. / 45810, минус 053, плюс 141, плюс 30128, минус 00540, плюс 01911 180 019 001, NA плюс 00188 30193 255 30008 40 2742 396 033, вниз 021, влево 18, плюс 0888, минус 16500 12955 36185; без изменений, без изменени
——这就是 
分かりました。地球は画面のほぼ中央、少し低い位置に映っていますが、同時に画面を横切る物体がいくつか
अ
روجر. هذا تقرير مدته 30 دقيقة. أجريتُ اختبار تحريك الرأس ولم ألاحظ أي تأثير. أجريتُ اختبار مدى الوصول ولم أواجه أي مشكلة على الإطلاق. اتجاهي جيد، ورؤيتي واضحة. لا يُسبب تحريك هدفي، أي النظر إلى بقعة ضوء ذهابًا وإيابًا، أي آثار سلبية. أجري اختبار الضوء حاليًا، وجميع الأضواء في الك
Хорошо. Как я уже понял, мы берём серую ленту и складываем её так, чтобы задняя сторона приклеивалась к внешней стороне контейнеров
D'accord, je comprends. Il faudra véri
سنومضها 
收到。我们向航天器发送指令时遇到困难。请您将“向上遥测”开关拨到“
5分間のライトを点灯しました。これは30秒間のライトです。5、4、3、
FORWARD OMNI로 전환하세요
База Сп
جيميني 8، جيميني 
了
阿波罗8号，请问你们现在正透过哪个窗口向外看？照片右上角有一个很大的陨石坑，看起来像是凸出
1 34 37. Wir wollen einen 5-Sekunden-Brennvorgang und nach vorne gerichtete 
ああ、本当にこれが必要なんだ...、バズ。本当に
Well, right now, after we put that gadget in, we've got it back to 0.35. Before that, we were reading on scale level. I think ours is relatively correct, at least when time comes for the water accumulator to kick in at 10 seconds, it goes on up to about 0.75, 0.8, so
알겠습니다. DCS 표시등이 켜지지 않았네요. 아직 기체가 바로 세워지지 않았어요
Ora siamo in modalità attesa di Jim e ho notato che dalla mia finestra riesco a vedere Orione molto chiaramente, anche se il sole splende dall'altr
Sigma Seven
这里是友谊七号。马克，此时此刻，我下方还能看到一些云，日落很美。它下落得很快。一道耀眼的蓝色光带仍然横跨地平线，几乎遮住了我的整
Here's the water gun. This cylindrical thing on the end of it is a filter with several membranes: one allows water to pass, but not any gas; the other allows gas to pass, but not any water. So, by routing the gaseous water which comes from our tank through this filter, we're enabled to drink purified water without the gas in it, filtered water. And, of course, all we do 
Okay, Jack. The next step is to place the command module canisters with the hoses attached in a suitable location to permit the bottom of th
等等。我们现在为什么需要任务计时器？我的意思是，如果情况真的那么糟糕
Danke, Jim. Wir haben Ihre Arbeit dort kopiert, und für uns si
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 마지막으로 몇 가지 일반적인 업데
好的。休斯顿，水瓶座。我
روجر. تعليق أخير: نظرًا للجدل الكبير الذي أثير في اجتماعات تحديد أولويات البيانات، يبدو أن زاوية ميل 10 درجات للأعلى هي الأنسب للحصول على الأفق، ما يسمح بتتبع المعلم عبر التلسكوب الماسح. إذا انخفضت الزاوية أكثر من ذلك، فلن يظهر الأفق عند رفع المحور
好的。仍然在E-9页，在烟火电路
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはケープ・コム・テッ
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Мы в стабильном состоянии; вы можете начать. К
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 船尾将是 42. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-1 84 船尾将是 56. 2+20. 1+11. 16 08 16. 3+05. 8+53. 33-1 84 船尾将是 6
रॉजर। 
Tranquilit
Ricevuto. PAD di ingresso: l'area è il Pacifico centrale, rollio 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, latitudine più 1332, meno 16917, 064, 36194, 649, distanza da per
わかりません。ショルダーハーネ
जैक, मैंने सोने के लिए बढ़िया जुगाड़ किया था। मैंने कमांड मॉड्यूल से एक स्लीप रिस्ट्रेंट निकाला, उसे ज़िप से बंद किया और फिर ज़िप के ठीक ऊपर वाले हि
Roger, Houston. Base Tranquility. Nous sommes en train d'utiliser toute la pellicu
Post-landing checklist. Helmet - off and stow. I don't think we ought to do tha
نحن فوق بح
وهل يمكنك 
Columbia, Columbia, hier spricht Houston. Wir bitten Sie, die Schubdüsen in Bravo 1 und Bra
Okay, panel 11 configuration, top row: AC BUS B, I want the S-BAND ANTENNA, OPEN,, OPEN; AC BUS A, TAPE RECORDER, OPEN. Second row, under SYSTEM A, I want MAIN SOV through QUAD 1 TCA, all CLOSED. COMMANDER'S X-POINTER under FLIGHT DISPLAYS, OPEN;, OPEN;, RENDEZVOUS RADAR STANDBY HEATER, OPEN; LANDING RADAR HEATER, OPEN. ATTITUDE DIRECT breaker, CLOSED; ED: LOGIC POWER A, OPEN; UTILITY, OPEN.
Роджер. 
यह 
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это Уотертаунский Капитолийский комитет
알겠습니다. 161° 서경과 16 1
Oh, excusez-moi. C'est sur le plan de vol, 
Und der Andocktunnelindex, Jack, b
Com
حسنًا. ينظر إلى شدة التيار الكهربائي للبطارية التي زودتنا بها سابقًا. يرغب في أن تكون أقل بنصف أمبير إلى أمبير واحد. نرجو منك أن تطل
逆变器温度为
로저. 기내 압
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, h
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Dopo la combustione, vorremmo che regolassi X 
네. 겉포장에서 속포장을 꺼내고, 속포장의 한
こんにちは、ハワイ・
Wir haben einen 
こちらヒ
Okay, at 49 000 feet, we're supposed to be 65 feet per second - our little old chart says. And our LOS rate's supposed to be abou
罗杰。+90，G&N：63481，-153，+132；004 10 25 38；，-04761，+00001，+53361；卷轴180 193 000；HA NA；+00203 53573 633 53349，六分仪星33 1578 122。视轴星不可用。纬度-0252，-02580 11887 34345 016 03 50。对准织女星和天津四。卷轴071 291 341。无空隙，未对接。我已收到您的信息5小时。完毕
Roger, Bill. We lost data on you for 15 minutes and voice COMM for about 45 and were beginning to get
結局、ECMは床に置き、ケーブルはエドの膝の上に置くことになりそうです。銃は元あった中央のフードボックスに収納します。
宁静基地，到这里不到10分钟。一切看起来
您可以告知库珀上校，我们刚刚……拍
明白了。
Думаю, наша высокоскоростная пленка сможет довольно хорошо запечатлет
D'accord. C'est parti. L'objectif est une correctio
罗
Il fait toujours 120
罗杰。4-4 134
That's negative; just tank 2
Die Kabinentemperatur ist unter Kontrolle
我不得不关掉S波段收音机才能听到他的声音——S波段开关在音
D'accord, Aquarius. Voici ce que nous allons faire. Nous aimerions que vous orientiez l'axe X vers le nord ou le sud. Il s'agit de l'axe X positif. Il nous semble plus simple d'orienter l'axe X positif vers le sud. Faites-le avec l'appareil allumé. Ensuite, nous proposons de l'éteindre pour économiser de l'énergie. Cependant, cela signifie que nous perdrons l'utilisation de la télécommande et que nous devrons piloter le vaisseau avec la raquette de commande en mo
네. 이제 좀 더 입체적인 
Хорошо. Мы тоже хотели бы это
نعم، هذا صحيح. عندما واجهتُ المشكلة لأول مرة، كان هناك خلل في خاصية الانعطاف المنخفض لليسار، والآن تعمل هذه الخاصية بشكل
마크 30. 좋아. 연료도 괜찮고, 산소도
Roger. We
Gemini 4, Гавайи,
Apollo 8, wir haben mit Ihrem Standardobjektiv das aufgenommen, was Sie uns gezeigt haben, aber ich glaube, mit dem Teleobjektiv haben wir gar nichts bekommen. Wir arbeiten gerade daran. Ein Problem scheint zu sein, dass es ein Objektiv für schwaches Licht ist; wir befü
罗杰，埃迪·怀特所在的道奇队
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। ऐसा लगता है कि उस समय सेक्स्टेंट
Roger. This is 30-minute report 
11, Hou
حسنًا يا جاك، قلقي الوحيد الآخر الآن هو ارتفاع نسبة ثاني أكسيد الكربون في المركبة الفضائية.
这里是友谊七号，使用超高频无线电。当时我飞
Roger. Remplacez Polaris par Rigel et Navi par Sirius. L'arbre et le tourillon resten
Der Kühler befindet sich in Durchflussposition. 
了
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन।
Just keep your head down close. Now start arching your back. That's 
बस, अभी के लिए इतना ही, फ्रैंक। हमें कुछ और खबरें मिली हैं
Roger. D'accord, Jim, nous avons décidé qu'il vous reste un peu de carburant, ce qui nous permet de l'utiliser dans le plan de vol. Nous vous demandons de passer en mode de balayage de l'horizon pour les 8 prochaines heures. Cela correspond à 30, et nous voulons que vous ut
네, 기본적으로는 맞습니다. 제가 간단히 설명드린 후 단계별로 안내해 드리겠습니다. 그러면 더 이해하기 쉬울 겁니다. 이 방법은 망원경으로 달을 관측할 수 있도록 특정 각도로 이동하는 것입니다. 어떤 자세에서든 망원경으로 별의 무늬를 충분히 식별하여 스스로 정렬할 수 있다고 판단되면, 그 시점에서 이 절차를 중단하고 직접 정렬을 진행하도록 하시면 됩니다. 하지만 저희는 반사나 기타 요인에 대한 걱정 없이 망원경으로 관측할 수 있는 조건을 충족하는 방법을 알려드리는 
Привет, Карнарвон, привет, Карнарвон, Близн
我们得到了——不，没那么多。那是个奇怪的量规
OK, état de la combustion: DELTA-TIG était à zéro, durée de combus
Ok. Potrei ripassarlo con te, Jack, perché questa checklist è stata scritta due o tre volte sulle nostre varie procedure. Riga superiore, le
好的。我们现
Okay. Dopodiché, CB CTE, MAIN B, per chiudere. Poi, pannello 250: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2 per chiudere; CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING per chiudere. Poi, pannello
다른 정보도 좀 있습니다. 궤적에 대한 정확한 정보는 약 2시간 후에나 얻을 수 있을 것 같습니다. 연소는 매우 양호해 보였지만, 현재 면밀히 관찰 중이며 2시간 후에 다시 연락드리겠습니다. 또 하나 예상되는 것은 초홀로오스 탱크가 파열 한계에 도달할 것이라는 점입니다. 가장 빠른 예상 시점은 107시간 2
아니요, 저도 
روجر. سنقوم بإعادة ضبط وضعية النجمة في السدس من أجل تحسين تغطية الهوائي عال
جي
روجر. نسبة الوقود اليدوي 5
Они очень медленные, Пит. В
Questa è Friendship Seven. La capsula 
Да. У нас есть фотограф
Apollo 8, Houston. Plus 2 n'a pas besoin de mise à jour. Nous aurons vos informations 1 et 2 dans un
53-3 55 前场，71 后场。1+31。
Okay. Ich glaube, ich habe gelesen, dass du bereit bist. Ach ja, Kopfhörer. Du brauchst dafür nur ein zweites Paar Kartuschen aus dem Kommandomodul. Dann klebst du an den Seiten jeder neuen Kartusche, nahe dem oberen Rand, einen Streifen Klebeband (das graue Klebeband mit der Klebeseite nach außen). Anschließend schneidest du ein Stück Pappe in vier Quadrate (ca. 5–7,5 cm Seitenlänge), biegst diese im rechten Winkel, um die Ecken zu stützen, und befestigst sie am Klebeband, sodass sie überstehen und die alte Kartusche überlappen. Zum Schluss legst du die alte Kartusche neben die neue und klebst sie gut fest. Außerdem
알아요, 알아요 — 295. A 온도 — 87. A 압력 — 3000. B 온도 — 82. B 압력 — 2650. 주 전류계 — 19. 2번 — 19.5. 1A — 4.5. 1B — 4.5. 
Я запер гироскопы в клетке. Они слишком критичны. Попробую перемещаться по тёмной стороне без гироскопо
It's rewound; are you ready to du
네, 알겠습니다. 감사합니
ठीक है। जैक ने मेन ए पर मौजूद रिंग 1 को बंद कर दिया है, और फिर भी उसे 30.2 वोल्ट का रीडिंग म
E sto copiando la manovra d
You're probably interested in the comments your wives have made. Neil, Jan had said about yesterday's activities, "The evening was unbelievably perfect. It is an honor and a privilege to share with my husband, the crew, the Manned Spacecraft Center, the American public, and all mankind; the magnificent experience of the beginning of lunar exploration." She was then asked if she considered the Moon la
Siamo scesi a 2400. 
好的。电池充电，关闭；交流逆变器 2 关闭；主母线连接，电池 B/C 开启（向上）。面板 250：电池 A，电源输入和落地后，断开；断路器，电池 B，电源输入和落地后，断开。面板 5：断路器电池充电器，
D'a
GDC s'est réaligné, d
Roger. Ho scommesso con tua moglie che arriverete entro 8 chilometri.
Роджер, Фредо. Хорошая обратная связь. Теперь, если вам нужно выполнить это выравнивание, то, по нашим оценкам, на Земле будет примерно 2 градуса. И она будет освещена приблизительно на три четверти. Теперь, чтобы сделать отметку на Земле, мы просим вас провести воображае
That's correct, Jack. Okay, on page 2-5. The top line where we had "Horizon chec
연료 전지 퍼지 과정에서 산소와 수소를 모두
اضطررتُ لإيقاف تشغيل راديو S-band الخاص بي حتى أت
Bene. 
자,
نعم، في المرة الماضية لم يكن مرئيًا حتى في نافذة سجل بيانات القرص المضغوط؛ هذه المرة كان مرئيًا إذا جلست القرفصاء، ولكنه كان مرتفعًا جدًا بحيث لا يمكن الح
Come va il sonno lass
Да, у меня он был включен
Nous avons une panne de multiplexeur et nous ne pouvons donc pas effectuer de relevés de température ici au sol. Je tenais à vous en informer. Il s'agit de la température cabine, de la température au niveau du robinet de la combinaison gauche, de la température au niveau du robinet de la combinaison droite et du débit
أشعر أ
罗杰。将废水排至背面 10%。使用之前的程序，将低温加热器设置为自动模式，电池 B 充电直到我睡觉。是 11111，01100。
Roger. Plutôt que de passer en mode puissance maximale et en mode pilotage automatique, nous préférons continuer comme nous l'avons fait. J'ai opté pour la configuration puissance maximale et le pilotage automatique au-dessus d'Hawaï p
حسناً، بالنظر إلى أنه أعزب وليس لديه هذا الخصم لي
如果它不好
近すぎますか、ヴァンス、
قبل الحريق كانت النسبة 66 بالمائة، والآ
And, Aquarius, for your information, as far as our water supply is concerned, including our plans for powerup, we h
Ricevuto. Pront
Bien reçu. Nous allons vous d
Ну, связь — это
로저. 빌에게 보내는 메시지입니다. 뒷면의 음질이 매우 좋지 않습니다. 저희는 이 음질을 사용할 수 없다
روجر. يمكنك إيقاف تشغيل خاصية قراءة الكمية الآن. ابحث عن السحب الدوامية حول جزر الكناري وماديرا. الموقع على بعد 
我们能在白沙导弹靶场的这
روجر، أبولو 8. أبول
La nostra piattaforma è la seguente: sorvolo, /G&N; 63385; più 0,97, meno 0,23;; più 0212,7, meno 0141,7, meno 0254,8; 148, 316, 050; NA, più 0022,5; 0360,9, 0:53, 0356,3; 33, 352,7, 15,0; NA, NA, NA; meno 23,26, 
Ich wollte einfach mal von di
11, Houston. Ihre Angaben sehen hier am Boden gut aus, und wir schätzen nun, dass die Wasserableitung entlang der Strecke 171 + 40 erfolgen wird; wir möchten, dass Sie bi
네. 만약 그것을 보게 된다면 육분의를 꺼내도 되지만, 보기 전에 꺼내는 것은 권장하지 않습니다. 왜냐하면 당신은 그것에서 상당히 멀리 떨어져 있을 것 같기
Houston, Columbia en forte pr
Laut und deutlich,
ठीक है;
Hous
और,
그리고 아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 
Wh
D'accord, Vance, ce n'est pas ça - nous ne regardons pas le Soleil - ce que nous obtenons est une grande
रॉजर। आपकी ओर आ रहा हूँ। 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; माइनस 061, प्लस 067 135 23 4149;, प्लस 32020, प्लस 06713, माइनस 02773 181 
Roger, Columbia. Did you shift into manual control, or did th
Je dormirai volontiers là-bas, d'accord? Je ne pense pas que ça changera quoi que ce soit; je préfère dormir, je préfère dormir avec la sonde et le dispositif de freinage plutôt que
We're g
收到。我完全明白你的意思。我不确定我是否都听懂了。我听到了S波段全向B、全向、跟踪设
Roger, Housto
Roger。实验结
Ja, wir scheinen hier oben e
天线选择“再入”，它已经处于“再入”状态。推进剂计量表RCS-B，我已经将其设置为B。数量，关闭。数量已关闭。指示反推姿态，我会……不过，我想你那边得有什么东西在运行我才能执行
रॉजर। समझ गया। ह्यूस्टन आपको ग्वायमास के ऊपर अंतरिक्ष यान से बाहर नि
مرحباً يا ووميرا، قائدة وومير
Bene, un minuto fa, ha detto questo per dirti che 
Non mi sembra, per il pad che abbiamo, che noi - noi vogliamo caricare in quals
11, qui Houston. In riferimento alla tua valutazione soggettiva secondo cui ieri sera la temperatura all'interno della navicella era più bassa, in precedenza abbiamo riferito di aver effettivamente registrato un calo di circa 3 gr
Roger. Come stai, Gordo? Qui stiam
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。根据我们从中途飞行以来的观测，伽马值为-6.57。不过这只是初步数据，我们认为经过进一步跟踪后，它应该会更接近目标，我们可以将其精确地调整到目标区域。它现在几乎位于目标区域的中心；一切看起来都很顺利。几个小时后，在你睡觉之前，我们会给你发送进入着陆平台的指示。除了你的飞行之外，我们公共事务部门的朋友们还带来了一些其他消息。你仍然是新闻的焦点。不过，还有一些其他的事情值得你关注。正如我之前提到的，全明星赛因雨取消了。比赛将于明天举行。然而，尼克松总统将无法像他计划的那样观看比赛。我们会随时向你通报比赛结果。另外，气象预报员也会对你很友好。我们的预报显示，回收区域的天气状况良好；那里应该会非常晴朗。尼克松总统在准备飞往迎接你们归来之际预测，31年内人类将至少造访过一颗存在某种生命形式的星球。“到2000年，我们地球上的人类将造访过存在生命形式的新世界，”他在白宫对2000名外国交换生说道。在他启程进行为期一周的访问之前，总统向国会提交了关于重组州际商务委员会的提案。他还与参谋长联席会议主席厄尔·惠勒就越南之行进行了磋商。由于第二级燃料地面支持系统出现污
11. 알겠습니다. 확인했습
Roger, Colum
Vous voulez vérifier si l'ordinat
At this time the rays of the sun are bouncing off the nose of the spacecraft, eliminating every area of it. Some bright stars
ठीक है, जैक। अब बचे हुए चरण बस सूट-लूप कॉन्फ़िगरेशन के चरण हैं ताकि इसे पूरी तरह से चालू किया जा सके, और हमारे लोग इसे तब तक रोक कर रखना चाहत
حسنًا. أقل بقليل من 13. وللعلم فقط، لدينا فريق يعمل على عدة مواضيع. نعمل حاليًا على المرحلة المتوسطة القادمة لتحديد نظام التحكم وكيفية استخدامه مع النظام الذي نختاره، وماذا نفعل بشأن المحاذاة. لدينا نظام إدارة القمر (LMS) وفريقا
برج الدلو، نحتاج إلى تشغيل جهاز التسامي الخاص بك، صفحة التفعيل 20 وصفحة التفعيل 2
Du hast keine Chec
Хорошо. Мы хотим, чтобы вы знали, что у нас есть для вас несколько углов
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हमें आपका एमईडी डेटा मिल रहा है; 
Okay, we're going to proceed now with the set, gimbal/throttle test, is that correct
휴스턴과 나머지 두 명의 우주 에이스가 이제 타석에
了解。
कह
Roger. I've alr
Okay, want to comment on our food. So far every orange juice bag, every bag that I have put water into that has had orange juice in it in any form, or pineapple, or straight orange juice, has had a leaky water valve. Now, I've had only one other drippy bag so far, and we're already about 60 something hours into the the flight. But every s
والمؤشرات الصوتية على... لديّ الآن هيليوم 1 رمادي بالكامل. هيليوم 2 رمادي بالكامل. الوقود الأساسي رمادي بالكامل. الوقود الثانوي، لديّ عمودان، A هو عمود، B رمادي، C عم
分かりました。回路ブレーカーを間違えてコピーしたか、それとも読めないのか。パ
Apollo 8, Houston. Richiesta di commutazione da modalità NORMALE a banda 
روجر. قد يهمك أن تعرف أن النافذة الوسطى مغطاة بالضباب بشكل كبير، لكن النوافذ الأربع الأخرى تبدو في حالة جيدة
休斯顿，加油！双子座4
是的，我们一定会的，弗兰克。请稍等
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。現在、高利得アンテナのスキャン限界に達しています。ビーム幅は狭く設定されているかもしれませんが
Hey, wir haben hier unten eine längere Diskussion über eure Beobachtungen des Kometen, und diese Reflexion ist
1
Dovete aver parlato mentre usci
D'accord. D'après votre vecteur, le sol calcule une vitesse de 15,3 pieds par seconde sur la trajectoire médiane, un VEI de 36221 et un gamma de -6,51. Votre programme semble donc plutôt bon. En appliquant votre solution à notre vecteur, on obtient cependant un gamma de -10,32. Nous prévoyons que ces deux solutions con
कुछ अच्छी तस
Okay. Che ne dici di provare l'idea di girarci e far fare a Jim la sua polarizzazione attraverso il telescopio, perché se dobbiamo cambiare atteggiamento
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 외부 모습과 내부 모습이 조금 섞여 보이는 것 같
ロジャー、チャーリー。塩素処理の状況をお知らせします。コンパートメントB4には、塩素アンプルと緩衝液アンプル用のポケットが1、2、3、4、5、6、7…訂正します。8つのポケットがあり、そのうち1つは常に空で、残りは6つです。反対側のB7には、7つのポケットが付いた別の容器があります。つまり、合計7つと6つです。そこには塩素6種類と緩衝液7種類が入っています。さて、私は1日に塩素1種類と緩衝液1種類を使っています。つまり、これから行う塩素処理の前に、塩素1種類と緩衝液2種類が残っているということです。塩素が1種類足りないようです。それでは、最後の容器を使った塩素処理を、
Friendship Seven, qui Canary CapCom.
May I use the ex
ठीक है, जैक। पैनल 3 पर, बैटरी चार्जर, बंद, एसी इन्वर्टर 2, बंद; पैनल 5 पर, मेन बस टाई अल्फा चार्ली, चाल
Хорошо, Водолей. Мы смотрим на ваш подвес и замечаем, что у нас загружен четырехструйный воздуховод, а на площадке у ва
好的，水瓶座。接下来我们要这样做。我们希望你将X轴指向北方或南方。这就是正X轴。我们认为将正X轴指向南方会更合适。请在开启电源的情况下进行操作。之后，我们建议关闭电源以节省一些电量。但是，这意味着我们将无法使用，并且必须使用手控器在直接模式下控制飞船。
컴피티션을 시작하세
아직 아
روجر. لقد تلقينا للتو خبراً من هيوستن. نحن على استعداد لخروجك متى ما كنت
Apollo 11. Dreißig Sekunden. Das ergibt 94 p
روجر. سأقوم بإعادة ضبط الأمر، ثم سأقوم بتشغيل م
ह्यूस्टन, कुंभ राशि। पृथ्वी 10 डिग्री के कोण से
地上での血圧測定は少々困難ですが、データはヒューストンにリモー
Они просят вас оставить переключатель в положении «АВТО» до тех пор, пока вы не ляжете спать сегодня вечером. Подождите. Я имею в виду, в положении «ВКЛ». Повторю еще раз. В положении «ВЫКЛ» до тех пор, пока вы н
OK. La vanne de ventilation de la cabine est ouverte…
ठीक है, जैक, हमें लगा कि अब आपके लिए चेकआउट का
यह विकल्प 1 के रूप में किया जाएगा। कंप्यूटर के 
Okay. Ich möchte nur eine Sache bezüglich des SEP-Pads 
Хорошо. Мы получили «Г
Comme je l'ai dit, tout semble parfait. Le chirurgien est là po
OK, on ​​déverse les bandes sur Canary le 1
알
休斯顿，这里是宁静港。你们希望我们
Siehs
... 100 hours o
Ah bon? Je ne me souvie
Хорошо. Тогда мы посмотрим. Если ничего из записанного ранее в низкобитном формате не было, то мы вернемся и, возможн
收到。11，/: 45597，0 - 更正 - 即 -040，+157，+36325，-01727，+01428 180 003 000，十一月阿尔法星，+00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254；天蝎座δ星，下103，左48，+0742，-16500 13005 36327；天狼星和参宿七，129 155 010，四组四边形，15秒；地平线位于2.9度线上，T-2；高速程序，与减去Mike A
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。还有大约40秒，地
Хорошо. Мы это слышим, Дж
Nous avons comparé l'effet de la surface libre du liquide sur le ce
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Не могли бы вы подтвердить, что двигатель подвеса тангажа номер 1 выключился? Мы только что выключили все четыре, и получили сомнительные показания на двигателе танга
日
ヒー
Okay. Now, Fred, that was good in the checklist. That's all. We'll have the powerdown checklist for you momentarily, and we'd like to ask you if you plan to use the bu
Ok. Ho un aggiornamento per te sul D-9. È la corsa numero 1, Revolution 55 e 56. Ora di inizio 05:
أجل... في الواقع، أنا أنظر شمال بحيرة سالتون بسبب تأثير الانحراف الذي لا بد أنه موجود هنا. هناك انحراف طفيف إلى يسار الكبسولة، ربما ربع درجة في الثانية. يكفي هذا الانحراف ليجعلني أتجه نحو الولايات المتحدة الأ
Roger. Neben den anderen FAM-Sachen – und es ist noch nicht sicher, ob wir das wirklich mache
わかった、君より
Р
Ok. Ho qui uno speciale di Haney per te. L'ultima e
- - 우리는 시야가 확보됐습니다
友谊七号，这是百慕大首都公司。我们
41分。Horizo​​n Scanでプライマリ
收到。如果你想走那条路，就把引擎开到最大，然
रॉजर। कुछ दिलचस्प बातें - मैंने अभी-अभ
了解。
Okay. Third row, open up the next five - correction - Open up the first five on the left, close HEATER, close
Мы не смогли вас сфотогра
とても簡単に見つけられます。ここからクレーターの縁全体を見渡すことができ、もちろん、太陽が照らす向こう側には白い三日月形が見えます。影はかなり長くなっています。マスケ
로저. 10, /: 45597, -040, +157, +35189, -01513, -00346 180 007 000, 노벰버 알파 +00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, 보어사이트 별 스콜피이 델타(다른 이름은 주바) 아래 071, 왼쪽 45, +0748 -16500 12995 36300; 주성 시리우스, 부성 리겔, 129 155 010; 4개의 쿼드, 15초, 울리지; 지평선은 T -3에서 2.9 윈도우 라인에 있음; 마이너스 마이크 알파를 사용하
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 좋은 질문입니다. 저도 알았으면 좋겠네요. 이 오류는 비행 내내 간헐적으로 발생했습니다. 자이로스코프를 케이지에 넣었다 뺐다 해봤습니다
알겠습니다. GET of the burn 2 18 00; De
알겠습니다. 감사합니다. 곧 정렬 작업이 진행될
Très bien. Ligne numéro 7. Il est écrit « Manœuvrer pour vérifier l'assiette à l'horizon ». Nous allons appeler cela « vérification de l'assiette par rapport à la lune », et c'est celle do
ठीक है। आपके ऊपर चा
З
R
Okay, Joe. Der Bogen is
알겠습니다. 뭐라고 
Eh bien, vous savez, en regardant cet échantillon, je suis surpris qu'il n'y ait pas eu beaucoup plus de poussière. Vous en avez vu pendant la descente, je crois, à envir
Gemini 4, CSQ. Vous n'avez pas compris la première partie de votre transmission. J'ai reçu: « Vu au-dessus du petit côté et vous pens
以上就是世界和国内新闻以及专题报道方面的内容。体育版块，堪萨斯城酋长队的汉克·斯特拉姆被评为AFL年度最佳教练。这是他三个赛季以来第二次获此殊荣。投票由美联社30名体育记者和播音员组成的评审团进行，每个城市各三人。与他票数最接近的是韦布·尤班克。其他获得选票的教练还有圣地亚哥的西德·吉尔曼和丹佛的卢·萨宾。至于昨天的Shriners大学全明星赛，北方队以3比0战胜南方队。密歇根州立大学的迪克·伯林斯基在第一节踢进一记23码的任意球，北方队凭借这记任意球赢得了周三的Shriners大学全明星橄榄球赛。嗯，我想这场比赛有趣的地方在于首攻次数，北方队19次，南方队16次；冲球码数，北方队214码，南方队169码；传球得分北区96分，南区109分。总的来说，双方实力相当。看来帕尔塞吉
Celu
좋아요. 여기 편리하게 Hasselblad Su
Dopo 3 ore, 48 minuti e 51 secondi, bevo un bel sorso d'acqua. Questa volta fa p
Roger. Bene. Ci siamo sbagliati nel nostro... nel nostro set di backup. Li avevamo fuori posto. Sembra che i dati di bordo siano corretti. Volevamo solo che tu controllassi. Abbiamo un aggiornamento sulla carta carburante/APS che h
حسناً. أنت الآن
分かりました。ありがと
正解です。わかりました。次は、次のカメラです。スタンバイ 1。ノイズが入っています。わかりました。次のカメラは 16 ミリで、これらの写真は優先度 3 と見なされます。わかりました。まず、A-8 から 16 ミリとパワーパックを入手します。10 ミリレンズを入手して取り外します。10 ミリレンズを取り外し、B-3 から 18 ミリレンズを取り出してカメラに取り付けます。電源ケーブルをカメラに接続し、フレーム レートを 12 フレーム/秒に設定します。先ほど示したのと同じデータ ラインが、今回はこのように表示されます。/DAC/18/CEX、バッテリー (f:8、1/250)。わかりまし
D'accord. À droite, de « manœuvre pour l'attitude face à l
Roger, Jim. Al momento, stiamo valutando, provvisoriamente, di iniziare circa 45 minuti prima dell'ustione e la nostra sensibilità non è poi così male. Possiamo continuare per 30 minuti in entrambi i cas
हैलो कार्नार्वोन, हैलो 
ありが
네. 방금 전까지만 해도 안정적으로 추적되고 있었는데, 약 1분 정도 걸렸네요. 바늘이 위아래로 흔들리고, 피치와 요우 바늘도 이리저리 움직였지만, 이제 안정적으로 다시 추적되고 있는 것
Роджер. Сигма Семь. Связь с капсулой Гуаймас. Громко и ясно. У них в Калифорнии произошло отключение электроэнергии. Мы считываем ваше правильное время ретросеквенции. На старт, давайте посмотрим, 
알겠습니다. 다음으로 넘어가시죠. 마이크, 가능하면 TV 방송 시간을 터미네이터 통과 시각에 맞춰 조정하고 싶습니다. TV로 터미네이터를 추적해 보고 싶은데, 지금까지 본 것 중 가장 인상적
Роджер. Gemini 4, мы хотели бы попросить вас вернуть выключатель питания переменного тока в IGS и включить компьютер, а также следить за повышением силы тока, чтобы убедиться, что он включится
交流电开
ヒュースト
Okay, wir wollen eine 10. Los geht's 
ヒュースト
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。中途修正2号。SPS/G&N 63059，正负0.97，点火时间0.2644 5.792，正负0.118，正负0.0003，正负0.177，滚转2.77°355′0.15″，BLOCK NA，DELTA-VT 0.213°0.3′0.168″，六分仪星30°2082′3.70″。PAD其余部分NA。对
罗杰。吉姆，据说他们想确保
Forza Apollo 8
좋아, 아주 좋아. 짐의 멋진
I
자, 휴스턴. 
好的。读完后继续往下看。“平衡耦合器”开关，“平衡耦合器关闭”。好的，往下看——这是倒数2分钟前的最后一行——“指挥官油门，最小；LMP 至喷射”。倒数2分钟时，划掉“400 加 1”。倒数1分钟时，划掉“主臂，开启”。倒数10秒时，添加“手动空隙”。加数5秒时，划掉“下降发动
...태도 제어 플랫폼(ATTITUDE CON
オーケー、ヒューストン、アクエリ
알겠습니다. 조용히 하려고 하시는 걸 알고 있으니, 제가 정보를 좀 읽어 드리겠습니다. 방금 알아낸 정보 중 하나는, 산소 극저온 탱크가 고장 나더라도 현재 80파운드(약 36kg)의 산소가 남아 있다는 점입
في الواقع، خلال الـ 12 ساعة الماضية أو أكثر، وربما حتى 24 ساعة، لم نكن حريصين للغاية على إبقاء قناع الوجه مغلقًا و... الأساور مرفوعة، 
Theta, 11.8; range 68.90; Delta-V 
D'accord. Je me prépare pou
D'accord
Ricevuto. Aspetta. Ci occuperemo della sit
E sul tuo HA, imba
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们希望你们进行一些额外
휴스턴, 이 수치를 측정기로 
Присоеди
Voici une petite information intéressante, plutôt encourageante. Il semblerait qu'à Ann Arbor, dans le Michigan, un nouveau gang de jeunes ait fait son apparition: le gang Gilnet. Ils sillonnent les rues d'Ann Arbor, agissant en secret et parfois en toute impunité. Ils se font appeler les Guérillas du Bien. Parmi leurs actions, on peut citer le fait d'avoir repeint un pont couvert d'obscénités en une seule nuit. Une maison insalubre, prisée des enfants du quartier mais dangereuse, a été condamnée. Des jardinières du centre-ville, restées vides suite à un débat sur la responsabilité (entreprises ou administration), ont été fleuries. Une haie, jugée gênant la visibilité à un carrefour très fréquenté, a été taillée, provoquant la colère du propriétaire. Des déchets ont été ramassés le long d'une portion de la rivière Huron. Les membres du gang sont des adolescents anonymes qui ne recherchent aucune reconnaissance personnelle. Leur objectif est de contourner la bureaucratie et d'obtenir des résultats concrets, des choses qu'ils estiment importantes. L'organisation a une légère connotation religieuse. « C'est une sorte de groupe œcuménique », explique un professeur adjoint de l'Université du Michigan, qui sert de conseiller informel aux membres. « Leur nom vient de Saint Pierre, le Pêcheur. Et leur indépendance les empêche d'être rattachés à une église en particulier. Il y a un côté Robin des Bois dans tout ça », ajoute leur professeur, qui préfère lui aussi rester anonyme. « Beaucoup de leurs activités sont illégales. Quand le système est engorgé, ils agissent directement pour le bien, sans passer par les
Roger. Pouvez-vous confirmer que l'interrupteur du sac d
D'accord. Sur la droite de l'écran, on voit actuellement un triple cratère, avec un petit cratère entre le premier et le deuxième. Celui en bas de l'écran est le cratèr
हमने आ
Вперед, п
Houston CAP COM, Gemini 4. Ich verstehe Sie laut und deutlich
كما تعلم، لا تُستخدم هذه المحركات النفاثة كثي
ठीक है ह्यूस
Okay. Das Bedienfeld 16... MOTOR... 
과이마스,
Roger. Non eravamo ancora arr
Das ist Roger. Ich bin ziemlich viel im Dunkeln über Woomera und Canton geflogen.
Roger. This picture is drifting off center again. If you could make another correction to bring it back. I couldn't tell you which direction, but you're going the right way, you're going the right way. A little bit more; a little bit more. Whoa, stop right there. That's the best centeri
D'accord. Il s'agit d'un péricyntien plus 2 pour un retour rapide. Ce sera / 62871, moins 161, plus 129, plus 45224, moins 06216, moins 18712 001 287 351, Novembre Alfa plus 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, Terre en haut 010, à droite 37, plus 1475, plus 06500 13239 36913; étoile principale Sirius, étoile secondaire Rigel 129 155 010, pas de marge, suppose l'exécution de la correction de mi-parcours 4 et utilise le même alignement. Le temps pour 5 pour la détermination GERU - c'est Golf Echo Romeo Uniform - sera de; Utilisez NC-4, étapes 1 à 10 et NC-8, étapes 3
हमारे पास अभी 203 हैं और ऐसा लगता है कि इसमें काम करने की जरूरत है, क्या हम इसे प
نعم. سيتم ذلك بالطريقة التالي
ठीक है। इसमें कोई खास परेशान
Und vielleicht sollten Sie dort nachsehen, Houston, um zu sehen, welche Schutzschalter nicht erforderlich sind, wie zum Beispiel der
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。您还有4分40秒到达。请再次确认您的S波段AUX开关是否处于“向下语音备份”位
Vot
रॉजर। वापस जा रहा हूँ। यॉ चेक ठीक है। स्कोप में यॉ को ठीक से देख पा रहा हूँ। डिस्प्ले थोड़ा अलग है जैसा मैंने सोचा था, लेकिन चेक ठीक ह
これは以前私たちが抱えていた問題に関係しています。つまり
صحيح. أنا - لم أدخل - أعطيتُ - أعدتُ الجهاز للحظة. أعدتُ مفتاح الوضع من يدوي إلى وضع آخر بينما كنتُ أُحاول ضبطه، لكن الجهاز أخفى النجم عن الأنظار. لذا، كان 
Okay. Very good. Well, we shut out the Sun coming in from the other windows into the spacecraft, so it's looking through a - the number 1 window, and there isn't any reflected 
Хоро
好的。我们什么时候
アポロ11号、
D'accord. On est en train d'étudier la question, Jack. Ce n'est rien de bien important, juste quelque ch
अच्छा, बढ़िया। मुझे लगता है कि शायद हमने उतनी ही
알겠습니다. 수신했습니다. 새로운 궤도 종료 시간, 임무 종료 시간, 그리고 1 브라보 시간
Hier unten sie
جيد جداً. م
알겠습니다. 저희 계획에 대해 간략히 설명드리겠습니다. 현재 저희는 물이 매우 부족한 상황입니다. 따라서 가능한 한 물을 적게 사용하고 싶습니다. 이를 위해 61시간 후, 즉 37분 후에 초속 16피트의 속도로 자유 귀환 기동을 할 계획입니다. 그런 다음 엔진 출력을 낮추고, 79시간 후에 남은 연료를 사용하기
罗杰。我想我把你的一部分信息屏蔽掉了。反推之后，我们立刻
Bene. Ci sembra che, sebbene stiamo leggendo la stessa cosa che stai leggendo tu sulla quantità del quad, usando il programma del computer e tutti i fattori di correzione che ci sono dentro, sembra che tutti e quattro i tuoi quad siano molto vicini. In libbre, sembra che tu abbia, ad esempio, 193 libbre 
Carnarvon, 
Roger, Houston. minus 11, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 3
Хорошо. Теперь на странице 32, вверху страницы, в первой строке, зачеркните "." Третья строка: "УПРАВЛЕНИЕ РЕЖИМОМ:, УДЕРЖАНИЕ ПЫТКИ." В строке "Минус 6 минут" зачеркните строки 1, 2, а в строке "Burn Attitude" зачеркните "." Зачеркните строки 2, 3 и 4. Теперь в строке "Burn Attitude" мы хотим, чтобы вы сделали "
아라
Il tuo... pe
Das ist gut. Links von Ihnen ist v
Io rimarrò OMNI B, se tutti voi volete ripr
Okay. Zunächst eine Anmerkung. In der Mitte der Seite en
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हम यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि हमें यह ग
Okay. Wir sind immer noch auf Seite E-9, Schritt 39 unten bei der Überprüfung des Pyrotechnik-Schaltkreises. Dort steht, dass bei Panel 8 alle Sicherungsautomaten GESCHLOSSEN sind, außer… Dann wer
わかりました。「チェック」の下4行目に「手動姿勢、3、最小インパルス
알겠습니다. 그 부분은 저희가 함께 살펴보겠습니다. 빛에 민감한 렌즈는 방금 사용하셨던 렌즈입니다. 밝은 물체를 향해 그 렌즈를 조준
Okay. You want us to co
谢
Of course, the only other thing that we'd be concerned about is what change i
ジョージ、その通りだ。フェイスプレートは閉じたままにしておくよ。機内食を一口食べたんだけど、ひどく
Roger. This trip of ours to the Moon may have looked, to you, simple or easy. I'd like to assure you that has not been the case. The Saturn V rocket which put us into orbit is an incredibly complicated piece of machinery, every piece of which worked flawlessly. This computer up above my head has a 38,000 word vocabulary, each word of which has been very carefully chosen to be of the utmost value to us, the crew. This switch which I have in my hand now, has over 300 counterparts in the command module alone, this one single switch design. In addition to that, there are myriads of circuit breakers, levers, rods, and other associated controls. The engine, our large rocket engine on the aft end of our service module, must have performed flawlessly, or we would have been stranded in lunar orbit. The parachutes up above my head must work perfectly tomorrow or we will plummet into the ocean. We have always had confidence that all this equipment will work, and work properly, and we continue to have confidence that it will do so for the remainder of the flight. All this is possible only through the blood, sweat, and tears of a number of people. First, the American workmen who put these pieces of machinery toget
Roger. Wir sind a
Apollo
Okay. I have nulled the null - roll needle and the pitch needle now and I'm yawed - rolled left now. I'm ro
罗杰。这里的云层覆盖范围是3000海里
아직 시간이 전혀 없
로저. 귀하
حسنً
H
Привет, Хьюстон; 
Non è un problema di tempo, Fred, ma se hai già sveglio la gente, potresti farlo. A proposito, probabilmente lo sai, ma le prossime ore saranno piuttosto tranquille dal nostro pun
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। कृपया प्रतीक्षा करें। हम आपको
D'accord. Utilisez NOUN 26; étoiles 26 et 33. La différence d'angle entre les étoiles était de toutes les boules: moins 0,67, moins toutes les boules, plus 0,162. 
En mode VOX, j'ai testé le manche en vol stationnaire pour voir si des 
Хорошо, Джек. Заметил, что ты это учёл, и это, по крайней мере, было нашей рекомендацией. Мы попросим ребят в подсобке посмотреть и попытаться подобрать более точные значения, исходя из угла конуса, через который ты проходишь, и узнать, есть ли какие-либо углы крена, которые тебе д
당신이 원하는 것
是的，这可以理解。如果需要的话，你随时都可以用。我猜想弄到额外的防护服确实挺难的，对吧
قلتُ إن القيصر ينظف أسنانه، ل
Apollo 8, A
Ja. Ja,
Roger. We're reading you much better now. Jim can go ahead with his transmission to the guidance troops. They have one question before he starts. They would like to know
了解。フランク、この燃焼を放射状に行うつもりですか？もし別の方向に行うなら、その強度を増したいですね。以
Хорошо. Это исключено... Я свою часть р
Très bien. L'assiette sera de 242 d
Gemini VI. We have no joy on your tape dump. We'd like you to place the Tape Recorder Power circuit breaker off and leave the Contr
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. بصوت عالٍ وواضح. كيف حالي؟ انته
그러니까, 그러니까 전체적인, 그러니까 연료 소모량이 제가 예상했던 것보다 훨씬 많았을 거라는
たぶん、小端を前にして並べたほうがいいんじゃない
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Если вы согласитесь, мы подготов
Potrebbe essere interessante notare che dopo gli avvistamenti NAV, siamo rimasti senza e ora otteni
Okay. This happened yesterday, too. I'm trying to load the you gave us in the maneuver plus 44 in, but I keep getting an ope
Die Glasur der Lebkuchenpapiere schmeckte sehr wachsartig u
Houston, 
아폴
わかりました。では、引き続き
Apollo 8, while we are waiting for the high gain, I will continue the trajectory summary. We can still get back to the mid-Pacific line in from the thirteenth, and you are on your way after 138 seconds of the burn. That's 138 seconds, gets you clear of the butterfly region. We recommend not trying preignitions or restarts after 20 seconds. If you go beyond 20 seconds, this may get the trajectory beyond the correction - correction capability to a free return. The weather in recovery area is good. We have an following of and an without of. During the burn, you may notice a slight change in chamber pressure and tank pressures due to the fuel exhaustion in the storage tank and going to the sump tank. This may occur somewhere around 2 to 5 seconds into the burn. It'll be a small change in pressures in both systems. Going down the systems, all systems are GO. In, we want to stop water boiling after for trajectory purposes. Your water dump situation looks good; you should be good to greater than. We'll try to hold off the water dump until after 5. In the, we'd like to stir the cryos prior to - correction. The next purge on the fuel cells will occur at approximately , and that will be both hydrogen battery A 34.9, battery B 39.1, and Charlie 38.5. We have the single tank cryo capability.: looking at the performance on the previous burns, you can anticipate a normal burn taking approximately 3.7 seconds in excess of the computed values
We just got it out 
J'ai remarqué à plusieurs reprises, en passant de la lumière du soleil à l'ombre, qu'au moment précis où je pénètre dans l'ombre, un reflet supplémentair
Подождите минутку, [...] сохраняя положе
로저. 설명 잘 이해했
बस, अभी के लिए इतना ही, फ्रैंक। हमें कुछ और खबरें मिली हैं, जिन्हें वे जल्द से जल्द आप तक पहुंचाने का वादा कर चुके हैं। उनमें से सबसे दिलचस्प खबर प्यूब्लो की रिहाई थी। मुझे लगता है कि आपको निक्सन-आइजनहावर की शादी के बार
16:0
حسنًا. سنحا
3/4: Sonnenaufgang, Nullmeridian, Sonnenuntergang; Subsola
ठीक है, पृष्ठ 17 पर। लोड को माइनस 4 मिनट पर सेट करें; यह CB(11), इन्वर्टर 2, क्लोज़ है, और "इन्वर्टर 1 चुनें" को हटा दें। रेट स्केल को "25 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड" में बदल दिया गया है। "बैलेंस कपल" को हम "बंद" कर देंगे; और, संयोगवश, डैम्पन रेट्स वाले बिंदु पर, चार्ली, टेकओवर के बारे में हमारी पिछली चर्चा याद आ जाती है। आप इस बारे में चर्चा कर सकते हैं कि अगर हमें नियंत्रण में कोई समस्या आती है, तो उसे बंद करने और मैन्युअल रूप से फिर से चालू करने के लिए 30 मिनट का समय लगने पर डेल्टा-वी के
알겠습니다. 아래에서 첫 번째 단계인 '전방 덤프 밸브 닫힘'과 10번째 단계인 '오버헤드 덤프 밸브 닫힘'을 제외한 모든 항목을 
ठीक है। अब हम आपको वह प्रक्रिया बताने जा रहे हैं जिससे आपकी पावर काफी कम हो जाएगी, और इसके बाद हम आपको और जानकारी दे सकते हैं। क्या आप इसे कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हैं? पेज के बीच
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies ein normaler Systembetrieb ist. Die Kühler dürften momentan s
Apollo 11, this is Houston. If you're not busy now, I can re
Jack, ils ne veulent pas donner de chiffre 
«Аполлон-8», 
Roger. Capisco che il GET di acquisizione è 03:07; GET di R = 248 nm; GET del rendez-vous 03:15; azimut 0 gradi; elevazione 7 gradi; GET dell'alba 05:37 00 più o meno uno
حسنًا يا فان
ये है फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। मुझे लगता है, मैं देख सकता हूँ कि मेरे पिच डाउन मैनुअल थ्रस्टर से कभी-कभी अंधेरे आसमान मे
Хорошо. Следующая страница, питание 7, панель 16. В первом ряду замкните четыре автоматических выключателя QUAD TCA, то есть QUAD 1, TCA; QUAD 2, QUAD 3 и QUAD 4 TCA. Хорошо. Ряды 2, 3 и 4 в пор
ठीक 
Хорошо, Вэнс. Дай мне проверить, есть ли у меня это здесь. Для этого нужно использовать 70-миллиметровый объектив Hasselblad DC 80-миллиметровый объектив в режиме A-13, используя черно-белую пленку MAG R или S 3400. Приготовьтесь взять камеру с собой, а настройки будут следующими
Okay. We're seeing a good picture of the probe there, Jim, and looks like the characters shaved before the sho
और, 13, आप अपनी लॉन्च चेकलिस्ट में उन पृष्ठों की भी जाँच कर सकते हैं। वे आपातकालीन पृष्ठ हैं; गुलाबी पृष्ठ, 1-
Okay. Semb
समझना
Ok. Capisco, il blocco no-COMM non è più valido a causa del midcourse
Possiamo vedere gli indicatori del carburante, dell'ossidante e dell'idrogeno/ossigeno nella parte superiore dell'immagine,
Abbi
是的。11号配电盘上的断路器已闭合
Roger. Sag mir nochmal deine Einstellung zum Pitch, Wally. Damit sind wir nicht einvers
Roger, je n'ai pour le moment que 
हम CO2 का आंशिक दबाव 4.2 मिलीमीटर माप रहे हैं। जब तक यह 15 मिलीमीटर तक नहीं 
Roger, nous vous prions de ne pas accepter ces marques. En effet, en contournant le contrôle de polarisation du tourillon, des valeurs importantes subsistent dans ces registres. Veuillez donc poursuivre après avoir effectué ce co
계속하세
जी हाँ। हम आपको पैड दे देंगे, ट्रैकिंग स्थिर होने के बाद हम लगभग दो घंटे में यहाँ आ जाएँगे। इसका कारण यह है कि - यदि आप कुछ और चरणों को कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हैं, तो मैं आपको समझाऊँगा कि हम इस बर्न टाइम को 1 सेकंड कम क
تناولنا أنا وفرانك وجبة قبل النوم الليلة الماضية، وأعتقد أننا شربنا حوالي عشرين نقرة من الماء، ونمنا نوماً هانئاً. استي
Roger. Frank, ich wü
Roger. Zu Ihrer Anflugrichtung: Wir bitten Sie, Rollwinkel 096, Nickwinkel 356 und Gierwinkel 018 zu verwenden. Das ergibt einen Sextantenster
代わりに、Arcturus を使用してい
ठीक है। 8, /: 45701, माइनस 040, प्लस 157, प्लस 33195, माइनस 01267, प्लस 04716 179 008 001, NA, प्लस 00187 33552 311 33355 42 09090 252, ज़ुबा नीचे 060, बाएँ 4.2, प्लस 0773, माइनस 16500 12982 36256; सीरियस, रिगेल, 1.29 155 010, चार-क्वाड, 15 सेकंड, क्षितिज 4 डिग्
没错。在使用ALC拍摄所有这些照片时，重要的是要让相机稳定至少10到2
-
نحن على وشك أن نخسرها يا هيوستن
حسنًا. كانت تعليقاتي - تعليقاتي كانت من غولدستون - أنهم لم يروا أي بقع بيضاء كما رأينا في الصورة العا
指挥飞行员还在睡觉。他大概会在30到40分钟后
In realtà, Mike, è così facile farlo con la palla otto entro un limite ragionevole che non vale la pena di arrampicarsi sul sedile per guardare fuori, e c'è abbastanza luce nella cabina di pilotaggio perché la stella non sia proprio facile da vedere. Quindi sono un po' propenso a usare la tecnica IFR, dove si può vedere il resto del p
ニール、このチェックリ
Roger, Gemini VIII. Heure: 03 47 35. Delta-V: 61,2; Delta-T: 1 + 22; lacet: 0 degré; tangage: 21 degrés vers le bas; Core 25: 00570; Core 26
Just in 4 SPS/G&N: 38320, minus 055, plus 060 084 30 2749, plus 31380, pl
Here a
Ge
...У вас возникли небольшие проб
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。オーバ
إنه 
Okay. We might get.
OK. -2, /G&N: 63634; plus 0,96, moins 0,23; moins 0021,7, moins 0001,7, moins 0008,0; 080, 164, 326; N/A, N/A; 0023,2, temps de combustion 0:03,5, 0018,5; 44, 
私たちがうっとりするような何かがあるのでし
Okay. Let's repeat it. Stand by. Cut out. We've really got a strange att
Sie be
Please don
حسنًا. اللوحة 3: أوقف شحن البطارية. اللوحة 5: اربط ناقل التيار المتردد الرئيسي بالبطارية A/C؛ افتح شاحن بطارية قاطع الدائرة، شحن البطارية A؛ أغلق شاحن بطارية قاطع الدائرة، شحن البطارية B. بعد ذلك، اللوحة 250: أغلق مدخل/مخرج طاقة البطارية B لقاطع الدائرة. اللوحة 5: أوقف ربط ناقل التيار الرئيسي، البطارية B/C. اللوحة 3: اضبط شحن البطارية على B. حسنًا، انتظر. جاك، أخبرنا أن لدينا إجراءً احتياطيًا لهذا، لكننا سنشرحه لك لاحقًا، خلال ساعتين ت
こんにちは、カントン・コム・テック。フレンドシッ
收到，穆切亚。清
جيميني 4، 
ऐसा लगता है कि पावर डाउन होने पर भी हम लगभग 11 एम्पियर से थोड़ा कम करंट खींच रहे हैं। नंबर 1 पर 10 और नंबर 2 पर 11 से थोड़ा कम करंट है। बाहरी हैच पर टेदर या अम्बिलिकल रिस्ट्रेंट की स्थिति के कारण अंतरिक्ष यान के आगे मुक्त टेदर एरोडायनामिक्स के लिहाज से EVA का काम करना काफी मुश्किल हो गया था। जब भी मैं उस क्षेत्र में काम कर रहा होता, टेदर जब खत्म होने वाला होता तो मुझे पीछे की ओर धकेल देता और प्रतिक्रिया के कारण मैं वापस अंतरिक्ष यान के ऊपर से होते हुए एडाप्टर सेक्शन की ओर चला जाता। इसीलिए खिड़कियों के ऊपर पैंतरेबाज़ी करते समय मैं बार-बार नज़र से ओझल हो जाता और फिर अंतरिक्ष यान के पिछले हिस्से की ओर बह जाता। मुझे लगातार खुद को खींचक
Okay. Either I copied 
حسنًا يا فانس، أنا 
Okay, Ken. I think we are going to lose the high gain he
حسنًا. قم بتنفيذ الخطوة 39
CSQ, Gem
Гавайский Капитолийский ком
Entrambe le pompe del refrigerante sono accese. Le ventole della tuta sono entrambe accese. I ricevitori trasmittenti HF sono in modalità Rientro. La nuova mod
안녕하세요, 친구 여러분, 멕시코의 친구와 특히 과이마스의 친구를 기쁘게 생각합니다. Desde el espacio external, su pais esta cubierto con numbes--그리고 es-- also--se muy bello. Aqui el Tiempo esta muy bueno. Buena suerte desde 
了解。S-6は細胞状の雲の形
非
ठीक है। आज सुबह खबरों में ज़्यादा कुछ नहीं है। माहौल शांत है। मुझे लगता है कि सबसे बड़ी खबर दुर्घटना दर है - छुट्टियों के दौरान हुई मौतें - जो निश्चित रूप से कोई अच्छी खबर नहीं है, लेकिन देश भर में 233 लोग मारे गए, जिनमें से 9 ह्यूस्टन में क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या और क्रिसमस पर मारे गए। विश्व समाचारों में, परिवारों ने फिर से सुर्
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить чел
Aurora Seven,
Et 
Apollo 8, qui Houston. I vostri sistemi sono tutti a posto. Ho ricevuto un aggiornamento del piano di volo alle 96, potete cancellarlo. I vostri tassi
了解しました。視界も通信も非常に良好ですので、今は走査望遠鏡を見ずに口頭で説明させていただきます。アークトゥルスへの操作角度は非常に良好でした。走査望遠鏡の中心にアークトゥルスを配置しました。この太陽角度では、走査望遠鏡の中心を真横切る光軸と光の帯があります。そのため、周囲の多くの星は見えません。しばらくの間望遠鏡に目を釘付けにしていましたが、星の模様などを見るのは非常に困難です。アークトゥルスでは、光学系が私をそこに導いてくれない限り、それを認識できませんでした。今、私はゼロ軸とゼロ軸に近づいているので、かなり大きな軸の動きを感じています。軸が動くたびに、光学系からより多くの粒子が放出され、それらは周囲の星と同じくらい明るくなります。そして、それらは星々の中で混ざり合い、星の模様や星座は判別できません。この特別な姿勢では、光の柱によって星座や個々の星を識別することは
المنصة ذات الطرف الحاد للأمام. هل أنت مت
ओह, ईईकॉम खुश है, और सेटअप पूरा होने के बाद, ईईकॉम की ओर से आपके केबिन एनरिचमेंट में ऑक्सीजन प्र
彼女を
Я хотел бы дать вам некоторое представление 
Die Lageregelung funktioniert sehr gut. Es scheint genügend manueller Treibstoff vorhanden zu sein. Ich bin noch bei 72 Prozent. Die Nickrate ist definitiv vorhanden. Die Gierachse ist recht stabil; die g-Kräfte nehmen zu. Die Kapsel ist recht
런던의 B
Apollo 13, Houston. 
D'accord. Ceci suppose que toutes les batteries de descente sont en ligne et que la batterie ASCENT 6 est alimentée normalement, com
Roger. Du siehst hier 
LMのカメラカバー。ちょっと考えてみてください。ちゃんと装着できたので、もう交換する必要はないと思います
아쿠
حسنًا. سننتظر إذًا. لدينا حل جيد. سننتظر حتى تُدخل بياناتك،
...это отличное место, чтобы начать сжигать деньги, Уолли. Думаю, они просто не хотели, чтобы ИК
네바다주 리노에 사는 한 어린 소년은 집에 벽난로가 없어서 지역 신문사에 산타클로스에게 편지를 써서 "앞문을 이용해 주시면 안 될까요? 문이 좀 뻑뻑해서 아래쪽을 살짝 차셔야 할 거예요."라고 제안했습니다. 아칸소주 리틀록에서는 크리스마스 전 주부터 크리스마스 당일까지 세인트 빈센트 병원에서 태어난 아기들을 퇴원시킬 때 커다란 빨간 크리스마스 양말에 넣어 어머니에게 전달합니다. 이는 종교 간 협력의 좋은 예입니다. 캘리포니아주 인디오에서는 경찰서장이 크리스마스 당일 기도서를 들고 있었습니다. 필립 H. 웨인버그 랍비가 실제 경찰서장인 호머 헌트(감리교 신자)가 가족과 함께 휴일을 보낼 수 있도록 하루 동안 서
रॉज
收到。我们刚刚进入飞船黑暗状态。在那之前，我们什么也看不见。但现
로저, 멋져 보
分かりました。いいですね。どこで、どれくらい話が逸れてしまったのか分かりません。パネル4、TELCOMM、GROUP 1、AC1に接続します。パネル5では、以下の接続を閉じます。PRESSURE GROUP 1、MAIN B; PRESSURE GROUP 2、MAIN B; TEMP、MAIN B; SECONDARY LOOP TRANSDUCER、MAIN B; RAD、CONTROL/HEATERS、MAIN B; BAT RELAY BUS、BAT B; BAT CH
La mia richiesta è di sapere a c
是的，这地方真不错。一点也不差。你说得对，你没说。我们现在就像在一个——非常——非常
Three is totally unusable; 1 and 5 are unusable for any kind of p
Das ist negativ. Ich fürchte, i
了解しました。1行目の訂正、1行目のAC TAPE RECORDERの下の「DECA GIMBAL」は開いてください。その他
La température de ma combinaison est actuellement de 68 degrés. Je ne 
Roger. L'attitude de poussée sera affichée sur une tablette, mais en gros, nous recherchons une poussée rétrograde horizontale locale. Cela signifie que si vous placez la ligne horizontale sur les cornes de la Terre, puis que vous orientez l'axe X vers le Soleil, nous serons en attitude de poussée. Vous pouvez le vérifier grâce au Soleil, qui se trouve dans le repère 2. Il devrait être aligné avec le curseur en haut. Nous vous donnerons plus de détails dans un instant. Passons maintenant à la page 31 si vous êtes pr
极光七号，极光七号
Indian Ocean Ship, Indian Ocean Ship. This is Sigma Seven. I read you. How do you read me? Ov
음, 끓으면 우리가 미리 알게 될 거예요. 끓지 않을 거라는 걸 알아내는 데는 오래 걸리지 않을 겁니다. 우리가 할 수 있는
네, 아주 선명하게 잘 들립니다.
Gemini 4，Canary CAP C
Roger. Jim, que fais-tu ici? Jim prépare le dessert. Il fait une compote de pudding au chocolat. On la voit arriver. Bill remonte du compartiment à matériel inférieur. C'est dommage que ce téléobjectif ne fonctionne pas. Montre-leur l'objectif défectueux, Jim. Cet objectif semble ne pas fonctionner; je ne comprends pas pourquoi… peut-être un probl
Okay. Jack is sho
Ok
يساعدني 
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯
11, Houston. I RETRO volevano sapere se potevate darci informazioni su eventuali bagagli non nomi
フレッド、了解
Roger. That's correct. Step 11 is, "Deactivate the utility lights if you activated them," and step 12 which is the last one 
They wanted this answer. Do you have your retrosequence times 2 Dog, Easy, and Golf from Indian O
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। सबसे पहले, हम चाहते हैं कि पीछे की तरफ अपशिष्ट जल का 
Wir glauben, du hast Recht, Vance. Es sieh
Potresti darci di nuovo il numero di pagina? La pagina 5 
То, что ты видишь, Майк, это... Хьюстон, то, что ты видишь, это Западное полушарие. Вверху — Северный полюс; в центре — чуть ниже ц
D'accord. Je 
로저, 이해했습니다. 18시부터 22시까지요. RKV 상공에서 Rev 12에 PLA와 CLA 업데이트를 받을 겁니다. Canary 상공에서 Rev 13에는 C-밴드 트랙을 받을 거고요. GMT 12시 16분에 연료 소모가 없는 궤도 항법을 할 수 있습니다. Rev 13에는 Carnarvon 상공에서 테이프 덤프를 받고, 그 이후에 일반 비행 계획을 시작할 
Хорош
D'accord. L'une de nos premières priorités est de recharger la batterie afin de disposer d'énergie pour effectuer cette opération. Nous avons d'ailleurs déjà mis au point des procédures à cet effet. Concernant la rentrée atmosphérique, nous prévoyons notre dernière manœuvre de mi-parcours 5 heures avant l'interface d'entrée, si nécessaire. Nous souhaitons ensuite larguer le module de service environ 4 heures et demie avant cette interface et consacrer les 3 à 3 heures et demie suivantes à la prise de photos, à la mise en marche du système de guidage et de propulsion du module de commande, au rangement du matériel et à diverses autres tâches. Nous conserverons le module de service jusqu'à une heure avant l'interface d'entrée, puis nous le larguerons. Ces procédures seront exécutées de manière intégrée dans les systèmes de gestion de mission (CMS) et de maintenance (LMS) demain matin et, si tout va bien, nous les répéterons plus tard dans la journée avec le contrôle de mission en boucle. Une question se pose: que faisons-nous ensuite? On pense qu'il y a suffisamment d'oxygène dans le module de commande et que le module représente une source de haute pression et un problème de rangement. On envisage donc de les laisser à l'intérieur. Par ailleurs, nous pensons qu'il serait préférable d'effectuer une rentrée en
Oh, Mi
... वास्तव 
Вы видите Кастора
ハワイ。君は壊れているようだ。君の声
Im manuellen Proportionalmodus, mit gezogenem Hebel und aktiviertem Ratenbefehl, nähere ich mich langsam aber sicher der Retroattitude. Alle Achsen funktionieren einwandfr
نعم. للعلم يا جيم، لا أعرف إن كنت قد سمعت هذا من قبل، لكن تلك الفترة الزمنية من 2.5 إلى 1 بوصة قد تم تكرارها حوالي ثلاث مرات، وهي ضيقة جدًا، لذا حاولنا استبعاد ما است
Roger. I am still operating on prelaunch time of 04 plus 32 
了解、ビル。オニール山がよ
Bene, in quell'ultimo passaggio abbiamo scattato circa 38 foto con il Synoptic Terrain Photography, partendo un po' a est di San Diego e fino a quando non abbiamo incontrato di nuovo la copertura nuvolosa. Abbiamo ripreso con immagini intermittenti non appena abbiamo iniziato a sorvolare la parte meridionale degli Stati Uniti, passando per l'Alabama e il Mississippi, fino ad arrivare in F
알겠습니다. 45번 서쪽 도로를 시속 77,04,100초, 즉 약 40초 후에 건너실 겁니다.
Oui. Cela conc
... poussée à NORMAL; poussée DELTA-V, deux, OFF; PITCH et YAW à AUTO; MOTEURS DE GIMBALE PITCH et YAW OFF; DELTA-V/CG, /CSM; LOGI
좋아요. 1분에 "MASTER ARM"이라고 적습니다. 35초에는 첫 두 줄을 적고, 
حسناً. لقد اكتملت عملية الحرق، والباقي ل
D'accord.
排气阀和ECS O2的修复非常巧妙，解决了约翰抱怨的排气口会从水垢中漏气的问题。当然，现在排气口又会漏到水垢里，正如大
ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म के लिए लाइट वैल्यू रीडिंग ASA ​​64 के लिए 13 है। लाइट वैल्यू 13 सेट कर रहा हूँ। फ़िल्टर के साथ सातवीं तस्वीर ले रहा हूँ। दक्षिण अमेरिका महाद्वीप में मौसम की वजह से फ़ोटो खींचना मुश्किल है। इस समय मैं एक पैनोरमा फ़ोटो खींचूँगा। लगभग 8 घंटे बाद शुरू कर रहा हूँ। दरअसल, ऐसा ही होगा। MARKT, 7, 8, 9 ब्लैक फ़ोटो, ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म। दस फ़ोटो, ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म। ये शॉट 250 × 5.6 (1/250 सेकंड और f5.6) पर अनंत कोण पर लिए जा रहे हैं। 11वीं तस्वीर ले रहा हूँ, बाईं ओर देख रहा हूँ। इस समय मैं दक्षिण अमेरिकी महाद्वीप के पास पहुँच रहा हूँ। मुझे एक बड़ी नदी दिखाई दे रही है। तस्वीर खींच रहा हूँ, कैमरा जितना हो सके नीचे की ओर करके। मुझे लगता है कि मैंने कैप्सूल की खिड़की को बहुत 
बीच रास्ते में अपनाई जाने वाली पुर
Et je crois que vous avez des données intéressantes sur le fonctionnement des propulseurs en fonction de l'angle de tangage. Il 
好的。我们把它打开着。显示压力大约为24磅/平方英
그리고 페이지 절반의 맨 아래 줄에 있는 "114
11号，这里是休斯顿。由于我们通过废水处理排水管进行了排气，我们得出结论，您的氧​​气流量传感器确实存在故障。您之前向我们讲解循环蓄水器排放时，我提到过，虽然它一直在移动，可能表明流量较高，但似乎流量不够高；基于此以及我们目前测得的流量，我们得出结论，传感器存在故障。我们希望继续输送氧气约一小时，在大约31小时后关闭，以使车辆内的氧气浓度达到可接受的检查标准。完
То есть, включите 
Хорошо. После первой процедуры повышения давления, примерно через 12-15 минут, мы хотим, чтобы вы перешли в режим BYPASS, а после
它们何时进行泄压
फ्रेड, अनुरोधों के संबंध में एक बात यह है कि
디스플레이는 열림, S-밴드
Определенно, он был подо мной. Я следил за ним примерно с Карнарвона. До Карнарвона он был ниже нас, затем поднялся к горизонту, а потом снова опустился ниже. Казалось, что он находится на другой орбите, чем я. У него были другие апогей и перигей, чем у меня. В любом случае, я попытался сблизиться с ним на рассвете, как только смог определить его местоположение. Как я уже сказал, в тот момент он был в миле или двух передо мной — внизу. Поэтому, чем больше я пытался сблизиться, тем меньше мне удавалось его догнать. Я работал в ретроградном режиме. Я использовал верхние двигатели, чтобы уменьшить общую скорость, и одновременно... тоже. Я так и не сблизился, и он продолжал отдаляться от меня. Мне стало очевидно, что к тому времени, как мы добрались до Гавайев, чтобы сблизиться с ускорителем и совершить выход в открытый космос с его помощью, вероятно, потребуется все имеющееся на борту топливо. В правилах полета мы договорились этого не делать. Я связался с CAP COM, и мы решили отказаться от выполнения части миссии, связанной с ускорителем. Не знаю, упоминал ли я об этом, но когда мы отделились от ускорителя, казалось, что наши показатели тангажа и рыскания были низкими, порядка половины градуса в секунду. Я попытался их сгладить. Я выпустил по одному импульсу в каждом направлении, а затем сосредоточился на отделении от ускорителя. Мы отделились, и отделились так же, как и при других показателях. В конце концов, мы выровнялись и развернулись. Вероятно, это заняло около полутора или двух минут. Похоже, главная проблема заключалась во вре
로저. 
Well, we're working on that some more. I'm not sure that the whole thing is lost yet. It appears that o
一番印象に残ったのは、月の日の出と日の入りです。特に、この風景は地形の荒涼とした自然を際立たせ、長い影は、今私たちが見ているこの非常に明るい地表では見えにくい、この地表
이미 35단계에서 이 내
अब हम छोटे-छोटे उल्कापिंडों स
Rice
नीचे पेड़ और जंगल हैं; ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे पेड़ और जंगल हो। बर्फ और पेड़ दिख रहे हैं। शानदार। मुझे बिलकुल भी नहीं पता कि हम किस दिशा में ज
로저. 롤링 재진입을 위한 절차 양식을 보내드리겠습니다. OAMS 연소에 필요한 ∆V와 ∆T, GMTRC, 그리고 0
يبلغ ضغط الأكسجين في المقصورة حاليًا حوالي 3.9 إلى 4.0 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة. وتبلغ درجة حرارة مبادل حرارة المقصورة حوالي 50 درجة مئوية. وتشهد درجة حرارة ال
저는 날씨 사진을 거의 세로로 촬영하고 있습니다. 광량은 13.5 정도입니다. 대략 셔터 속도 250초, 조리개 값 5.6(1/250초, f5.6)이 나옵니다. 초점 거리
فهمتُك جيدًا. أتساءل إن كانت كا
わかりました。いいえ、
Ici Friendship Seven, en transmissio
네, 짐, 4개의 쿼드 히터 차단기는 모두 닫아 두세요. 그리고 3번 패널의 스위치로 히터를 작동시키겠습니다
ピッチするジンバル角度 - ピッチダウン 70 の場合 - なぜ、226 から 70、つ
알겠습니다. 모두 건강해 보이고, 저희가 여기서 보기에
6910 هناك، يا سيد المسطرة 
Sappiamo che ci sono molti scienziati provenienti da diversi paesi che aspettano di vedere i campioni lunari, e abbiamo pensato che vi sarebbe piaciuto vederli così come sono realmente qui. Queste due scatole sono i contenitori per la restituzione dei campioni. Sono contenitori sottovuoto che sono stati chiusi sulla superficie lunare, sigillati e poi portati dentro e inseriti in questi sacchetti in fibra di
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。酸素燃料電池のパージを削除すること
파푸아뉴기니
फ्रें
罗杰。我
Ich denke, am schnellsten geht es, wenn wir Seit
네, 새로운 소식은 위치에 대한 추가
Roger. Supprimez la p
खैर, मुझे नहीं पता। मैं अभी एक मिनट में यहाँ
S
Okay, ich gebe Ihnen die Messwerte. Anzugkuppel: 80, Anzugeinlasstemperatur: 75 (Grad), Kabinenkuppel: 41 (Grad), Kabinentemperatur: 97 (Grad), Kühlmitteleinstellung Anzug: 8, Kabine: 3. Ich folge
Wie
ठीक है। जैक, सबसे बुनियादी बात यह है 
好的，
نعم، دعونا نحافظ
Вы проверяли количество устройств MDIU при включенном компь
Roger. Compris. Ajustement de phase à 02 18 26 49,3; 1 plus 07; lacet 0, tangag
रॉजर, कैनरी, जेमिनी। हम अपने नियमित उड़ान योजना पर वापस आ गए हैं, लेकिन फिलहाल हमारी योजना में सटीक समय का विवरण नहीं है। क्या आप ह्यूस्टन को बता सकते हैं कि हम अपनी उड़ान योजना को समय-समय पर सटीक समय के साथ अपडेट करवाना चाहते हैं ताकि हमें अपने प्रयोग शुरू करने में मदद मिल सके
Ro
そこを引きずっているよう
The Flight Surgeon would like to know if either one of you had any trouble with dryin
يا فريندشيب سفن، لدينا بيانات تتبع موثوقة، وقد تأكدنا من سلامة جميع أنظمتكم. سنذكركم ببدء قائمة ال
Roger, Jim; et je copie enviro
双子座 VI，双子座 VI，休斯顿 CAP CO
Ok. Controllo assetto, comando velocità. Controllore di manovra, acc
罗杰。10，/：45597，减 040，加 157，加 35189，减 01513，减 00346 180 007 000，十一月阿尔法星加 00186 35223 
Ok. Ora l'unica cosa... l'unico problema qui è che è quasi impossibile puntare quella telecamera; il campo visivo è così stretto che ci sono voluti tre uomini e un ragazzo quassù per puntarla ne
大约2分30秒后开始倾倒。
Okay. Ich habe gerade die Erdhelligkeit gemessen, Houston. Sie beträgt 320 Lumen. Die Erde zeigt jetzt 320 Lumen an. Wenn du Jim Lovell mal aus der Nähe fotografieren könntest, Bill, könntest du all
S-baud のオフ状態がオフになっているためです。おそ
알겠습니다. 가는
Look, we don't care about the potable tank, but we do about the waste tank, so just in case there is a problem somewhere, I'm going to shut the potable tan
Oui, les ré
حسنًا. نحن نبقيه مفتوحًا. يشير إلى حوالي 24 ر
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン、ブラインド放送中。ちょっと待っ
아니요, 괜찮습니다. 그런데 흥미로운 점은 지난번 물 투하 작업 때 궤적 추적에 변화가 있었는데, 그 시점에 상관관계를 분석해 보니 노즐 특성과 투하
Да, думаю, так и есть. Это будет что-то вроде сквозного регулирования скорости вращения, потому что, если я буду делать это в спешке, мне придётся уменьшить высоту тангажа на 80 градусов, остановить вращение или остановить почти 
로저. 
Roger. Mi sento bene. L'ultima volta... qualcuno mi ha detto che c'erano 39 gradi. Non mi sento, sai, come se avessi così caldo. La temperatura in cabina è di 39 gradi. Leggo 39 gradi, e la temperatur
Tout semb
Ok, ora do un'occhiata all'adattatore e all'attr
休斯顿，加
Stai descrivendo... non si tratta di colore, Bill. Descrivi alcune delle caratteristiche fisiche di ciò che stai mostrando alle perso
Okay. Joe. On the news, Jim would like to hold off a lit
로저, 에드. 
はい、とて
Indovina! Vuoi dire che gli "stanno indovinando
우리는 그 당시 약속 장소의 창문으로 마이크를 잠깐 볼 수 
حسنًا، سأكمل هذه المناورة إذًا لأدور بزاوية 82 درجة، وأميل بزاوية 218 درجة، وأدور بزاوية صفر، إذا كان ذلك مناسبً
Und ich installiere den Spritzschutz, den Nackensch
约克城，Rec 3。此时，指
Okay. Now we are coming up on the view that we really want you
Хорошо. Температура вашего блока с четырьмя двигателями колеблется от 85 до 44 градусов. Температура форсунок — от 44 до 21 градуса; а теплозащитный экран во всех местах значительно превышает свои нижние пределы. Температура, похоже, меняется в зависимости от угла падения солнечных лучей, и это не проблема. Все показатели выглядят очень хорошо
Okay. Y
아폴로 13호, 휴스턴
No, nemme
Seite 2,
अ
Wenn wir diesen Mittelteil nicht schaff
Род
よし、ターンアラウンドは停止した。機首を下げている。月は窓の中央に、ブースターは少し右に寄っている
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Si vous recevez, tous les systèmes au sol semblent fonctionner correctement
是的。你那样做的时候，
और एक औ
友谊七号，友谊七号，这里是金丝雀指挥
작업이 꽤 잘 진
Frank n'est pas encore en ligne; il le sera 
罗杰，11号。这里是休斯
Righto. And we're looking at your pi
E per quanto riguarda le esposizioni, puntiamo a un ottavo di secondo, mezzo secondo. E, se pensate di poter stabilizzar
Roger. Continuing with the Maroon Bugle. President Nixon surprised your wives with a phone call from San Francisco just before he boarded a plane to fly out to meet you. All of them were very touched by your television broadcast. Jan and Pat watched from Mission Control here.
मुझे नहीं पता। आपका 
Es gibt ja auch noch die COAS-Staubschutzhülle, die meiner Meinung nach in dieselbe Kategorie fällt, oder? Das Tei
D'accord, Jack. Je comprends que la batterie est chargée. Maintenant, si tu es prêt à copier, Jack, je vais te donner les deux modifications à 
Irgendwann werde ich dieses Manöver wohl einfach mal spaßeshalber etwas anpassen. Wäre jetzt, Buzz, acht Minuten vorher ein guter Zeitpunkt dafür? Ist dir der Ze
Okay, Jack. Wenn ich das richtig verstehe, soll der LMP etwa 6 Stunden schlafen. Währenddessen sollten der CDR und der CMP etwas essen. Ich soll um 69 Uhr aufwachen. CDR und CMP schlafen um 70 Uhr und sollen um 76 Uhr aufwachen. Wir sollten unsere Übung um 76 Uhr planen. Um 78:30 
프랭크, 그곳에서 할 만한 것을 
Capisco, anch'
هيوستن، تشاهدون الآن منظراً للأرض من أسفل أفق القمر. سنتبع مساراً حتى
- -... एसीएस को बंद 
1분 - 닐이 알아냈어. 우리도 알
休斯
No. There was no plane
هل هذه مناشف زرقاء تخص أحداً؟ هل أزحتها عن طريق الخطأ أم كانت ل
फ्लाइट की सलाह है कि यदि आप बहुत व्यस्
Roger. Die Cape-Station möchte eine medizinische Datenfreigabe für den Piloten erhalten. Ich empfehle, dass er jetzt die orale Temperatur misst, damit wir in der Ca
ज़ान्ज़ीबार, य
了解。アポロ8号。それが我々がずっとやろうとしていたことです。問
Roger. Ich glaube nicht – wir können einen plötzlichen Rückgang des Wasserspie
В 00:34:28 я увеличиваю температуру н
好的，阿波罗8号。我们想更改一下，我们想使用26号星，也就是26；我们想让它作为近地地平线星
حسنًا. في اللوحة رقم ١١، نريدك أن تغلق قاطع الدائرة. ثم نريدك أن تنتقل إلى التفعيل رقم ٢٥؛ وأن تقوم بالخطوات ١ و٢ و٣. ثم انتقل إلى التفعيل رقم ٣٠، وهذا سيعطينا خطًا تقري
ठीक है। और अभी तो ऐसा लग रहा है... अभी तो ऐसा लग रहा है कि कमांड मॉड्यूल से हवा बाहर नहीं निकल रही
Affermativo, Jim. Dovrai
Завершение отключения электроэнергии: 30 плюс 01; режим тормозного 
알겠습니다. GET B 05 13 13; GTNSR, 012538; 델타-
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Le rapport de trente minutes se poursuit. La pression cabine est de 5,6 et se maintient. La température cabine est de 95 d
2 ～ 3 歩、あるいは 4 歩ほどゆっくり進むと、ほぼスムーズに停止できます。*** 方向を変えるには、
روج
今のところ、運転のほとんどはアイザック・ニュートンが
Il est presque complètement hors service à ce st
Запись разговора, сделанная во время пролета над Тананаривом в этот период, в настоящее время недоступна. Технический специалист связи Тананарива сообщил в Хьюстоне в 77:54:27, что он связался с Gemini 4, и экипаж перевел переключатель воспроизв
Gemini 4, Canary Surgeon. Your cuff is full. Have you completed your ex
Roger. Hier sprich
ठीक
Prêt à le
حس
Okay, hast du die Handschu
はい。振動なのか何なのか分かりませんが、1番のピッチとヨーレートの針が、私
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया। मै
Hier spricht Friendship Se
現時点でお伝えできる限りでは、残りの燃料でフライトプランのほぼすべてを達成できると思います。リアルタイムで状況
罗杰，我
Да, мы находились довольно
Zei
罗杰。起飞的时候一切正常。现在它开始漂移，出现了一种我们以前飞
Buzz, I put 39.5 
正在等待复古喷射器启动。我的复古喷射器已经启动，指示灯是绿色的
Хорошо, Джек. На графике показано расстояние примерно в 130 000 миль, что примерно на 10 000 миль ближе, чем было, когда я подключался пару часов на
제 생각에는 연료 탑재량 변화만으로도 우주선의 조종 특성이
ठीक है। आप 
روجر. لدينا بيانات رائعة هنا يا إيجل. نحن - جميع هؤلاء الأشخاص - خبراء الأنظمة يراجعونها. سنخبرك بعد قليل 
Roger RKV：谢
了解
Lors de votre prochain passage, Columbia, au lieu d'effectuer une recherche comme celle-ci, nous vous demandons de chercher aux alentours des coordonnées que nous vous 
Ok, Jack. Stiamo per contrattare con te su questo. Invece d
로저. SPS/G&N 근접 비행: 62815, +0.97, -0.20 0.70 54 5944, -0.0028, +0.0023, +0.0069, 2
حسنًا يا بيل. نحن نقترب من موعد الرصد، وهناك بعض المخاوف من أن الانتقال مباشرةً إلى وضعية المحاذاة قد يؤدي إلى ارتفاع درجة حرارة المركبة الفضائية "تشارلي". لذا نود منك الآن توجيه المحور السيني السالب نحو الشمس. لديّ بعض زوايا الجيمبال هنا. إذا قمنا بتوجيه المحور السيني السالب نحو الشمس من الآن وحتى موعد بدء المحاذاة، فسوف نبرد المركبة "تشارلي"، وبالتالي سنتمكن من إتمام العمليات دون القلق بشأ
Okay. We've got abou
好的。我们还要对之前向您介绍的流程进行一些小小的补充，这涉及到从
Yes. 
罗杰。哥伦比亚，是+7——修正值，纬
روجر، فهمت. أضواء ا
いや、そうでもない。テレビモニターを
रॉजर। क्या आप 
On dirait bie
Roger. Stavo giusto registrando qualcosa. L'unica cosa insolita che ho notato è uno strato di foschia piuttosto alto, che sembrerebbe essere di circa 7 o 8 gradi sopra l'orizzonte
نعم، فعلت. تريد إزالة - تريد تشغيل كلا الناقلين، باستخدام مفاتيح ربط الناقل؛ أولاً، للتأكد من عدم وجود أحمال على الناقلين، وثانياً، ثم فصل الطاقة عن الناقلين عن طريق سحب قواطع الدائرة لضمان عدم بقاء مفاتيح ربط الناقل قي
ओह, आपने कल जो आंकड़े भेजे थे, वे काफी अच्छे हैं, और आपके पास लगभग... ठीक है, मैं इसकी जाँच करूँगा, लेकिन आप क्रायो में मोटे थे। मेरे पास कुछ है... आपके पास 33:20 है। आप सर्विस मॉड्यूल को इसके माध्यम से उड़ाते हैं। आपके पास 14
C'est confirmé. Je vais tout d'abord passer rapidement en revue les horaires des événements principaux, puis nous reviendrons sur les détails. Bien. L'interface d'entrée est prévue à 142 heures et 40 minutes; environ 6 heures et demie avant, nous commencerons la procédure en appliquant la puissance de chauffage, en vérifiant les températures du module de commande et en le préchauffant si nécessaire. Nous pensons d'ailleurs que nous devrons probablement le faire. Nous vous fournirons des procédures détaillées ultérieurement. Environ 6 heures avant, nous commencerons la mise sous tension en utilisant la liste de contrôle modifiée de 30 minutes que vous avez utilisée pour la précédente inspection à mi-parcours. Puis, peu de temps avant, environ 5 heures avant, nous vous demanderons d'adopter l'attitude pour 
A couple of items, Jim. The first is, the time for closing the waste stowage vent is. If you turn in before that time, why it's okay as far as we're concerned down here to close it before that time just before you go to bed. The second point, we have some results on the s, and, if Jack'
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। मुझे न
关于电视测试，我认为我们或许可以通过拍摄地球的红
लगभग बाईं ओर, "टोपो लक्ष्य 54ए के लिए पैंतरे
Apollo 8, Houston. Il ne nous reste plus que 25 % de votre déch
سيجما 
روجر، رأيناك مستيقظًا تتحرك، فظننا أنك تتناول فطورك هناك.
Мы принимаем ва
アポロ8号、
حسناً
... Potenza di controllo, VELOCITÀ ORBITALE della piattaforma e stabili; Pressione RCS, Controllo d'assetto di nuovo attivo, BEF della piattaforma. Il tempo BIT è di 
لم أفكر في الأمر من قبل
Sì, sta arrivando. Sembra che stia avendo qualche problema a rient
僕は5点良い点を取ったよ。君はNO
ठीक है। हम इस NAV अवलोकन को स्थगित कर सकते हैं। यह यहाँ निर्धारित था, और हम इसे स्थगित कर सकते हैं। आपकी नींद संबंधी टिप्पणियों को देखते हुए, हम इसे जल्द से जल्द प्राप्त करना चाहेंगे, और फिलहाल हमारी योजना इसे 2 घंटे आगे बढ़ाने की है। हम इसे उसी समय पर 
D'accord. Tr
Voyons voir. À Springfield, dans le Missouri, Mickey Owen, l'ancien receveur des Dodgers de Brooklyn, entré dans l'histoire en laissant échapper une troisième prise qui a permis aux Yankees de New York de remporter la victoire contre les Dodgers lors des Séries mondiales de 1941, a décidé de laisser une trace indélébile dans les mémoires, au-delà de ses exploits sportifs. Quarante-cinq garçons et filles ont reçu un poney grâce à son geste généreux. Ces jeunes étaient invités à lui écrire pour lui expliquer comment ils prendraient soin d'un poney. Face à l'afflux de lettres, il a ajouté cinq poneys aux vingt qu'il avait déjà offerts; d'autres donateurs ont également contribué à en offrir vingt autres. « Je pensais recevoir une quarantaine de lettres, mais j'en ai finalement reçu près de 900 », a déclaré Mickey Owen. Passons maintenant à la une: à Wellington, en Nouvelle-Zélande, une cinquantaine d'hommes ont dégusté aujourd'hui la traditionnelle dinde 
Ok. È successo anche ieri. Sto cercando di caricare la manovra che ci hai indicato più 44 pollici, ma co
No
كين، ما هي النجوم التي أردت استخدامها؟ 
روجر، تبدو
Potresti riferire a Houston che eravamo fuori... ma siamo riusciti a vedere la costa del Texas abbastanza chiaramente e in realtà abbiamo captato... fuori si poteva vedere molto di più... la costa del Texas fino alla Louisiana... scendendo sulla parte meridionale della Florida, potevo vedere l'intero stato della Florida, e siamo andati... e più o meno
Okay. We'd like to brief you on what our plan is. We're, at this time, water cr
Doesn't have to be really... over that the only thing we're... we can just take the scissors and cut off the edge here. The only thing this does, 
I took an S-5 picture of a cloud formation over the Pacific coming on the Coastal Sentry Quebec area at 00 using f/11 at 150. It was frame no. 28. I'm taking several pictures for S
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Canary 
ठीक है। लगता है अब ह
另一则本地新闻：亨茨维尔县法院大楼昨天黎明前被烧毁，看来他们又要在那里开工建设了。接下来是一些关于等待返程的家庭的报道。这篇报道由《邮报》记者安·詹姆斯撰写。“我们就像在月球背面休息一样，”瓦莱丽·安德斯在圣诞夜说道，当时她和家人正在等待阿波罗8号脱离月球轨道，返回地球。安德斯太太周二凌晨0点就到了，邻居们刚刚把孩子们都接走，这样在飞船飞到月球背面、与外界失去联系期间，他们一家人就可以休息一下。弗兰克·博尔曼上校的家在户外装饰着四个巨大的常青花环，上面撒满了粉状的雪花，还系着红色的蝴蝶结。书房里的一棵圣诞树正等待着他平安归来，他漂亮的金色头发的妻子苏和两个健壮的儿子弗雷德里克和埃德温计划留在家里，等待午夜时分飞船脱离月球轨道。通常情况下，他们会去圣克里斯托弗圣公会教堂参加午夜弥撒。计划是凌晨0点开始。由于博尔曼家没有小孩，所以圣诞礼物交换只能等到博尔曼上校带着他那份神奇
G
Bonjour, technicien de Guaymas Com, technicien de Guaymas Com. I
Friendship Seven, ici Ste
POTENZA DI CONTROLLO DELLA ROTAZIONE, DIRETTA, due di esse
プレローンチからキャッチアップに移行したところです。これでCompのランプが消えました。今度は点灯するかどうか確認してみましょう。よし、点灯しまし
시그마 세븐입니다. 여
Nun, das sollten
Ok, confrontando il volo del 13 con quello dell'Apollo 8, il decollo ha avuto più o meno la stessa quantità di vibrazioni che ho notato sull'Apollo 8, ma all'inizio del volo c'era meno movimento laterale rispetto all'Apollo 8. La separazione dell'S-IC è stata più violenta sull'Apollo 13 che sull'Apollo 8, forse perché ero seduto in un posto diverso, non lo so. Ma ci sono stati circa tre bruschi transitori del cut-off e un paio di grandi scoppi in cui siamo stati sbalzati all'indietro longitudinalmente sulle nostre cinghie prima che l'S-II si spegnesse. E l'S-II era, ovviamente, altrettanto fluido sull'Apollo 13 che sull'Apollo 8, tranne che per il mo
13、内側から外
Роджер. Далее следует подтверждение
休斯顿，
Okay. You've got
네, 프
Bon, ça fait trois minutes et dix secondes d'oxygénothérapie à haut débit. Je ne veux pas que ça dure cinq minutes. Je pense que c'est trop pour un homme. La température à l'ent
Ok. Ora esco e vedo quanto... se ho 
जो, क्या वह जी एंड
Roger, Buzz. Beginnen wir mit T2, T2 TIG: 102 54 2900 103 51 5600 106 37 3500 109 10 0000. Anmerkung: T2
Well, we didn't have much time, Houston, to talk to you about our views out the window when we were preparing for ejection; but up to that time, we had the entire northern part of the lighted hemisphere visible including North America, North Atlantic, and Europe and Northern Africa. We could see that the weather was good all - just about everywhere. There was one cyclonic depression in Northern Canada, in the Athabaska - probably east of Athabaska area. Greenland was clear, and it appeared to be we were seeing just the icecap in Greenland. All North Atlantic was pre
Fred, Houston. We'd like to try going to AVER
Houston, Apollo 11. Wou
Va be
と
Roger. We have it below us right now, exactly below us at ab
En fait, Mike, c'est tellement facile de le faire avec la boule noire, dans une certaine mesure, qu'il n'est pas vraiment utile de se contorsionner pour regarder dehors. De plus, la luminosité dans
알겠습니다. 스러스터 B3와 C4의 안전장치를 작동시켰
この時、太陽光線は宇宙船の先端部分で反射し、その周囲を全て消し去っています。左下には明
आगे बढ़ो ह्यूस्टन, जे
ニール、ここからの景色は
حسنًا. حسنًا
Роджер, «Дружба номер семь
Okay, Vance. I can give it to you. I read it right after I started it. BAT A voltage was 39.4 and the
구름
D'accord. En consultant les prévisions 
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Мы так заняты, что нам трудно аккуратно вести учет. Я постараюсь делать это на плане полета; и если я сделаю какие-либо визуальные наблюдения, мы их запишем, а я по
休斯顿，水瓶座。你刚才说
네, 맞습니다. 이제 제가 여러분이 그 곡선에 표시해야 할 몇 가지 지점을 알려드리겠습니다. 현재 여러분이 그린 곡선은 근지점 또는 근일점을 60마일로 기준으로 하고 있는데, 지금은 근일점을 62마일로 설정하셨습니다. 목표 지점이 62마일인 이유는 착륙 지점을 지나도록 하기 위함입니다. 제가 다섯 세트의 좌표를 알려
أوه! أنت تعرف شيئاً واحداً - انظر، لم أ
Va bene. Va bene. Penso... che dovremmo tornare alle procedure originali che 
Au moment de partir, ils nous ont donné quelques angles REACQ q
Apollo 8, Houston. C
지금은 7시 55분 30초입니다. 콘타렉스 망원경으로 허리케인 베이브를 찍어보
哦。驾驶舱内 Contarex 的设置——我已经记下来了，
阿波
Charlie, wir melden uns in wenigen Minuten wegen dieser anderen Änderung
查理，我们这
好了，这里有一些可可粉，应该不错
Роджер. Спаси
أبولو 11، هيوستن. بناءً على رصدنا منذ منتصف المسار، يُظهر لنا مؤشر غاما -6.57. هذه بيانات أولية، ونعتقد أنه بعد مزيد من المتابعة، سيتحسن الوضع، وسنتمكن من توجيه المركبة بدقة إلى الممر. إنها تقريبًا في منتصف الممر؛ كل شيء يبدو على ما يرام. سنرسل لكم بيانات الدخول خلال ساعتين قبل نومكم. ومن زملائنا في الشؤون العامة، إليكم بعض العناوين الرئيسية، بخلاف رحلتكم. ما زلتم تتصدرون الأخبار. ومع ذلك، هناك بعض الأمور الأخرى التي تهمكم. كما ذكرت سابقًا، تم إلغاء مباراة كل النجوم بسبب المطر. ستُقام غدًا. لكن الرئيس نيكسون لن يتمكن من مشاهدتها كما كان مُخططًا له. سنُطلعكم على النتائج. كما أن توقعات الأرصاد الجوية ستكون في صالحكم. يبدو أن توقعاتنا جيدة لمنطقة الاستعادة؛ من المتوقع أن يكون الطقس رائعًا هناك. توقع الرئيس نيكسون، وهو يستعد للسفر لاستقبالكم عند عودتكم، أن يزور الإنسان خلال 31 عامًا كوكبًا واحدًا على الأقل يحوي شكلًا من أشكال الحياة. وقال لـ 2000 طالب تبادل أجنبي في البيت الأبيض: "في عام 2000، سنكون على هذه الأرض قد زرنا عوالم جديدة حيث توجد أشكال من الحياة". وقبل مغادرته في رحلته التي تستغرق أسبوعًا، أرسل الرئيس إلى الكونغرس مقترحه لإعادة تنظيم لجنة التجارة بين الولايات. كما تشاور مع رئيس هيئة الأركان المشتركة، إيرل ويلر، عند عودته من فيتنام، وتم تأجيل إطلاق صا
Хорошо. 7 м
ठीक है। इंग्लैंड के जोड्रेल बैंक से, एपी के माध्यम से: ब्रिटेन की विशाल जोड्रेल बैंक रेडियो दूरबीन ने आज सुबह 5:49 पूर्वी मानक समय (ईएसटी) पर सोवियत संघ के मानवरहित चंद्र प्रक्षेपण से संकेत प्राप्त करना बंद कर दिया। एक प्रवक्ता ने कहा कि ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि लूना 15 अंतरिक्ष यान "चंद्रमा से आगे निकल गया है।" एक अन्य बयान: वेधशाला के निदेशक सर बर्नार्ड लवेल के प्रवक्ता ने कहा, "हमें नहीं लगता कि यह उतरा है।" वाशिंगटन यूपीआई: उपराष्ट्रपति स्पिरो टी. एग्न्यू ने वर्ष 2000 तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेजने का आह्वान किया है, लेकिन डेमोक्रेटिक नेताओं ने जवाब दिया कि पृथ्वी पर जरूरतों को प्राथमिकता दी जानी चाहिए। बुधवार को अपोलो 11 के प्रक्षेपण के समय उपस्थित वरिष्ठ सरकारी अधिकारी एग्न्यू ने स्पष्ट रूप से अपने लिए बोलते हुए कहा था, न कि निक्सन प्रशासन के लिए, "मेरे विचार में, हमें इस सदी के अंत तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेज देना चाहिए।" लैरेडो, टेक्सास, एपी: नुएवो लैरेडो में आव्रजन अधिकारियों ने बुधवार को घोषणा की कि हिप्पियों को मेक्सिको में प्रवेश के लिए पर्यटक कार्ड नहीं दिए जाएंगे, जब तक कि वे स्नान न कर लें और बाल न कटवा लें। नुएवो लारेडो में मैक्सिकन आव्रजन प्रमुख ह्यूबर्टो काज़ारास ने कहा कि मैक्सिको सिटी, अकापुल्को और अन्य लोकप्रिय पर्यटन स्थलों के अधिकारियों ने हिप्पियों के बारे में शिकायतें दर्ज की हैं। यूनाइटेड प्रेस इंटरनेशनल के अनुसार: राष्ट्रपति निक्सन द्वारा संघीय कर्मचारियों को सोमवार को छुट्टी देने पर शुरुआती प्रतिक्रिया, ताकि वे अपोलो 11 चंद्रमा लैंडिंग मिशन में भागीदारी के राष्ट्रीय दिवस का पालन कर सकें, ज्यादातर आश्चर्य की थी। रॉडनी बिडनर, एसोसिएटेड प्रेस, लंदन एपी: यूरोप अपोलो 11 मिशन से मंत्रमुग्ध है। पूरे महाद्वीप के समाचार पत्रों ने अपने पन्ने सैटर्न वी रॉकेट के पृथ्वी के प्राकृतिक उपग्रह से पहला संपर्क स्थापित करने के लिए उड़ान भरने की तस्वीरों से भर दिए हैं। और शीर्षक लेखकों ने इस उपलब्धि की प्रशंसा करने के लिए शब्दों की भरमार कर दी। फ्रांसीसी समाचार पत्र ले फिगारो ने घोषणा की, "मानव इतिहास का सबसे बड़ा साहसिक कार्य शुरू हो गया है," जिसने केप कैनेडी की रिपोर्टों और मिशन के आरेखों के लिए चार पृष्ठ समर्पित किए। टैब्लॉइड पेरिस जूर ने घोषणा की, "पूरी दुनिया उन्हें वाहवाही दे रही है।" कम्युनिस्ट दैनिक 'ल'हुमनाइट' ने प्रक्षेपण की तस्वीर को प्रमुखता दी और अपने पूरे पिछले पृष्ठ को चंद्रमा पर उत्साहपूर्ण रिपोर्ट के लिए समर्पित किया, जिसमें उलटी गिनती और प्रक्षेपण, 
はい。フライ
अब, हमारे पास और क
أبولو ١١، 
Cabin temperature, cabin water flow is all the way off and reducing back to about 7.5 now, a little bit less. At this t
..
Jim, se stai cercan
네, 그
主砲はすべて9口径と22.5口径
了解、こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。燃料は90～98パーセント。酸素は78～100パーセント。機内気圧は現在5.6を維持しています。カプセル内に
ジェミニ4、カナリア外
네. 이제 잘 읽었습니다. 오
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في جهاز المحاكاة، إن لم يكن بنفس السهولة. لذا أكملنا المهمة حتى النهاية. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون، كنت قد قررت أننا لن نتمكن من الوصول، لكنني فكرت في الاستمرار قليلًا. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون - أو قبل مغادرتنا لها بقليل - كان واضحًا لي أننا لن نتمكن من تخفيض الضغط. طلبتُ الانتقال إلى المدار التالي. ثم... استعدنا أنفاسنا لمدة 20 دقيقة تقريبًا وحاولنا ترت
Oh, du m
По
Roger, compris. Êtes-vous satisfait des systèmes de commandes de vol électriques et proportionnelles manuell
अच्छा, देखो, अगर हम इसमें फिल्म लगा दें - अगर मैं इसमें फिल्म लगा दूं और एक-दो फोटो खींच लूं, तो मुझे इसे फिर से निकालना पड़ेगा; बस यही एक दिक्कत है। मुझे निकालना तो नहीं पड़ेगा, लेकिन यह इतनी आसानी से पैक नहीं होती। अगर आपको कैमरे के साथ ही पावर्ड डिसेंट करने में कोई परेशानी न हो, तो मुझे लगता है कि यह ठीक रहेगा। अच्छा, एक मिनट रुको, मुझे लगता है कि मैं इस भरी हुई फिल्म को वहीं रख सकता हूं जहां दूसरी व
Apollo 8, Houston. Planen
كيف تس
Roger. Für Bill: Die Sprachqualität auf der Rückseite ist extrem schlecht. Wir halten sie für unbrauchbar und empfehlen, alle relevanten Kommentare handschriftlich aufzunehmen, damit sie nicht verloren gehen. Wir sollten nicht damit rechnen, das Band mit ni
本に関しては、使用するリングの種類にもう少し注意を払う必要があると思います。これまでに2、3回、開けるのに苦労しましたし、ページが破れて本から外れてしまうこともあります。リングを取り付ける穴の補強を検討する必要があります。水鉄砲は、水を出すために先端から突き出ている小さな乳首が、シミュレーターと同じように「OUT」の位置で固定されていて、トリガーを離しても水が流れ出てしまいます。実際には、食品パッケージから水鉄砲を引き抜いた際にカプセルから水が流れ出ないように、
Nun, es erstreckt sich über die gesamte Länge des Sextanten. Tatsächlich konnte ich uns schon kommen sehen, als wir uns näherten, denn der Lichtstreifen im Sucherfernrohr verlief genau dort, wo sich der Mond befand, und er bewegte sich in diesem Bereich. Ich vermute, das liegt an der
ヒューストン、アポロ11号
무슨 말씀인지 알겠어요. 아까 잠깐 눈을 붙여서 푹 쉬었고, 프랭크도 들어오기 전에 여기서 푹 자게 해주고 싶어요. 이참
Aquarius, Hou
Continuons. Si, pendant la combustion, le moteur s'arrête et que le voyant NOUN 97 clignote, vous devez poursuivre la manœuvre, puis effectuer le sullage, passer en mode PUSH (dém
Installation du rideau anti-éclaboussures, du déflecteur d'air, poignée de recirculation d'air cabine vers le haut. Poignée du tuba gauche vers le haut, poignée de ventilation cabine vers le haut. Gâchette d'ouverture de la trappe relâchée. Vérifier que le joint d'étanchéité est abaissé et fermé. Attacher la dragonne, trappe gauche ouverte. Ranger l'équipement de survie du pilote commandant sur le côté droit du vaisseau. Boucle de récupération complète... côté droit du vaisseau. Vous vous déplacez vers le siège gauche avec votre kit de survie. Jetez l'équipement de survie du pilote sur l
Circuito s
로저. 확인 결과 이상 없습니다. 제 것은 
Le batterie saranno 
Ja. Es
Roger. Ich weiß, dass wir unter anderem diese Kamera
わかりました。BAT FEED TIESとCROSSTIE BAL LOADを閉じ、CROSS TIE BUSを開
Ro
알겠습니다. 그럼 보내주세요. 제가 지금 달이 없다는 걸 알려드리면 흥미로우실 겁니다. 현재 위치에서 지평선이 선명하게 보입니다. 지금 시각은 00시 54분 44초입니다. 달이 없는 어두운 면의 지평선은 피치와 롤 조정에 아주 좋을 것 같습니다. 별들은 요우 조
좋아. "크리스마스 이브 밤, 우주 저 멀리 아폴로 8호 승무원들은 달 착륙 경쟁에서 막 승리했지. 헤드셋은 콘솔에 조심스럽게 걸려 있었고, 크리스 크래프트가 곧 도착하길 바랐어. 프랭크 보먼은 침대에 포근하게 누워 '킬로이가
Роджер, Хьюстон. Запись следующая: середина Тихого океана, 357 152 359 267, плюс 0813, минус 16503
好的。我们看得不太清楚。嗯，实际上，现在清楚多了。看起来像是从屏幕左上角到右边的一些小点，我知道那是推进器发出
11, Хьюстон. Текущий прогноз показывает приемлемые условия в вашем районе восстановления: местами 2000 футов, местами высокие ветры, ветер с 70 градусов, 13 узлов, видимость 10 миль, волнение моря около 4 футов. Вчерашний прогноз указывал на тропический шторм Клаудия, находящийся примерно в 500-1000 милях к востоку от Гавайев. На снимках со спутников, сделанных вчера днем, Клаудия рассеялась, поэтому, похоже, она представляет собой еще меньшую угрозу, чем раньше. Считается, что ваш район восстановления сейчас находится немного севернее межтропической зоны конвергенции, которую вы, вероятно, можете увидеть, выглянув в окно. Вчера также сообщалось о тропическом шторме Виола, расположенном западнее. В настоящее время он находится примерно в тысяче миль к востоку от Филиппин и движется на северо-запад. Тропический шторм Виола усиливается и должен перейти в категори
알겠습니다. 위도는 0.691도, 즉 +0.691도이고, 경도는 2도이므로 +
Apollo 8, Houston. Apollo 8, Houston in the blind. We've lost all data on you and reques
Просто небольшое замечание. Мы выглянули и нам показалось, что мы видим горизонт. Оказалось, это было п
रॉजर। क्या आप यह सुनिश्चित करेंगे कि आपका रेट्रोडिले स्विच साम
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अब से लेकर जब तक हम इस स्थिति में बदलाव नहीं लाते, तब तक के लिए एक अच्छा संचार दृष्टिकोण विकसित करने क
Okay. Die Temperaturanzeige ist noch nicht aus. Soll ich das Gerät einschalten, während die 
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。LOI前の窒素（N2）圧力の違いに気づきましたか？ 2つのタンクの圧力が等しくなかったように思います…Bタンクの
Stiamo esaminando attentamente i profili di consumo d'acqua e al momento le cose stanno andando verso il lasciare acceso e spegnere l'acqua, ma vi daremo maggiori informazioni a breve. E vi consigliamo di lasciare una persona di guardia per dormire. Vi consigliamo di non fare scarichi di urina se potete, perché peggiorerebbe il problema dei detriti di quanto non sia ora. E abbiamo alcuni oggetti che potreste voler trasferire nell'acqua, alcuni asciugamani, alcune torce el
It seems very strange for me to look out Jim's side and see daylight and look out my side and it's j
ها! 
Salut Scott, je suis en vol stationnaire, mais j'ai activé le bus de climatisation. Il s'est parfaitement mis en marche. J'activerai les balises plus tard. Le mode de pilotage sélectionné est le pilotage électrique, même si je ne l'utilise pas. Le commutateur automatique est en position automatique, le commutateur des gyroscopes est toujours verrouillé. L'attitude de rentrée atmosphérique est sélectionnée, les manœuvres sont désactivées. Tous les indicateurs sont au vert. La température de ma combinaison est d'environ 60 degrés. Je suis assez à l'aise. Les indicateurs électriques et de climati
Yes
Roger, il semble y avoir un débit un peu plus important, et même un cou
Je ne pen
ジェミニ4号、戻って来
Выгод
好的。现在我——如果我没记错的
फ्रेड, ह्यूस
Das ist bestätigt. Du h
Roger. ERRO
حاضر. أنا بانتظ
飞掠机动 / 62954，减 162，加 12
收到。我们正在处理。自从上次与您通话后，静海基地就一直没有发出任何信号。如果没有高增益天线，我们无法为您提供完整的S波段中继。我们正在为您
Хорошо, похоже, над южной оконечностью Африки видны освещенные участки. Я точно вижу город, и это «Сигма Семь». В режиме передачи я использовал только запись VOX. Я точно вижу город в Африке. Он впервые появился на секундах. Огни видны очень четко. В этот момент я нахожусь в ретроградном положении, чтобы об
コロ
Roger. Weiter geht's. Gierprüfung okay. Ich kann die Gierbewegung im Sucher recht gut erkennen. Die Anzeige ist etwas anders als erwartet, aber die Prüfung funktioni
有多热
Hawaii, Gemin
スキャナーライトは持っ
了解。了解。目標
سننتقل من هاواي إلى غولدستون خلال ثوانٍ معدودة. قد تواجهون انقطاع
Да, это хоро
Apollo 8, Houston. We'd like a cryo fan cycle when you c
알겠습니다. LM의 위치에 대한 정보를 업데이트하셨고, 이것이 LM이 현재 어디에 있는지에 대한 가장 정확한 추정치라고 하셨
收到。没错。在步骤 5 中，执行步骤 5。在“主乙二醇环活化”下，步骤 1，第 1 行，“CB(16): 显示 - 关闭”。这是一个可选步骤；您可以选择启用它。省略步骤 1 和步骤 2 的其余部分。执行步骤 3。
En fait, nous vous avons r
ちょっと待って。ちょっと待って。ちょっと待って、またケ
TMは解散します。フ
双子座4号，CRO
Gemelli 4, Housto
حسنًا. بالانتقال إلى الأسفل، إلى زر المتابعة، أدخل مفتاح الإد
あれを引っ張らないで。まず…をください。戻ってきます。この4つは閉じて、開いて、開い
Как ощущается невесомость? У кого-нибудь стр
П
꽤 흥미롭네요. 모두 움직이고... 반짝거리고... 저는... 적어도 반짝이는 별들 사이에서 진짜 별을 가끔씩 찾아낼 수 있을 것 같아요. 하지만 별 모양을
Okay. Den Busarm in die Andockposition bring
Roger. La co
D'accord. Mike, voilà ce qui s'est passé: tu étais en train de surveiller, et à l'étape 7, tu as accédé à NOUN 01, tu as saisi l'adresse, puis INFORMATION INFORMATION. Au dernier appui sur ENTER (35400 ENTER), juste après, tu es revenu à l'étape 16.
حسنًا. الصف الثالث تحت قسم الاتصالات. افتح شاشة العرض، وأغلق الصوت، وافتح جهاز إرسال واستقبال VHF A وB، وأغلق قواطع الدائرة الرئيسية لنطاق S. افتح هوائي نطاق S، وأغلق مشغل الوسائط، وافتح التلفزيون، وافتح جميع القواطع الأخرى تحته، باستثناء مستشع
ماذا عليك أن تفعل يا ن
11番、ヒューストン。了解。角度は45度と255度ですね。キャ
Eagle, Houston. Während des Ladevorgangs mussten wir die Integration abbrechen. Wir beginnen diesen Ladevorgang von v
अरे बाप रे! आजकल तो बहुत 
Manche dieser kleinen Vertiefungen neigen dazu, abzusinken – vielleicht um 5 bis 7,5 cm. Das entspricht genau dem, was die Bilder des Vermessers zeigten, als sie etwas weggeschoben wurden. Dabei wird eine Kraft durch die oberste Bodenschicht übertragen, und etwa 12 bis 15 cm Erdreich lösen sich und bewegen sich, als 
素晴らしいですね。こちらはポール・ヘイニー流のインターステラー・タイムズ、12月23日号です。クリスマスまであと
Columbia
댓글에서 그런
Okay. Ich habe die Batterieladung, das Entlüftungsventil und die Treibstoffzellenspülung durchgeführt und den Vorgang bei 55 Stunden gestoppt. Ihre Rollneigung beträgt dann 285 Grad, wie im Flugplan vorgesehen. Die Winkel der Hochleistungsantenne sind
D'accord. Et un
了解。そして光学系のキャリブレーション姿勢：ロール330.5、ピッチ086.3、ヨー000.0。ペンとインクで記入された公称姿勢はまだ良好です。作業完了後、お
... 
... probably hear, 
नहीं। मैंने अभी तक वह काम नहीं किया 
Роджер, Фрэнк, вы сейчас тратите 1,4 фунта топлива в час, удерживая самолет в режимах тангажа и рыскания. Нам интересно посмотреть, снизит
육분의를 통해 보이는 광경은 정말 환상적입니다. 방금 전 자동 조준 작업 중에 조준선이 지중해를 가로질렀는데, 북아프리카 전체가 선명하
Roger. And next item, the supercritical helium rise rate is nominal, and you also had that question for us about your thruster activity during the on the last REV. Believe we understand that now, as you reported that your pitch was in ACCEL COMMAND and your yaw and roll were in RATE COMMAND. You were firing your pitch thrusters. This will couple rates 
حسنًا. على يميني تلوح جبال البرانس في الأفق، ونحن الآن فوق ميسييه وبيكرينغ تقريبًا. نقطة انطلاقنا الأولى واضحة تمامًا من ارتفاعن
そ
Also, wenn wir diese hier laden – wenn ich den Film einlege und ein oder zwei Fotos mache –, dann muss ich sie wieder rausnehmen; das ist das einzige Problem. Ich müsste es nicht, aber sie lässt 
翻訳制御電源、オ
Roger, Hawa
रॉजर। आज दोपहर हम टेक्सास खाड़ी तट के किनारे आपके क्षेत्र में एक दूरबीन से कुछ बादल देख रहे थे, और हमने यह भी देखा कि ब
Okay, Fred-o. Per il Sol
Roger. This is Friendship Seven, and now that the sunrise is starting, I have all these 
Roger. Grazie,
了解。六分儀の星から出発します。06 2007 25
Et 11, Houston. Nous avons une demande à vous faire. Concernant la vanne de pressurisation du carburant de propergol secondaire du module de service: par mesure de précaution, nous vous demandons de bien vouloir actionner brièvement les quatre interrupteurs sur la position FERMÉ, puis de les relâcher. Comme vous le savez, nous ne disposons d'aucun système de communica
لا أعرف، يبدو الأم
收到。一切顺利，机器准备工作进展稳定，一
这次我真的能看到那个像雪花一样的小物体，它正远离太空舱。当然，它和太空舱的飞行轨迹是一样的。它看起来确实像一片白色，但在我眼前这
Аполлон-8. Начинаем маневр пролета. Это будет / 63087, минус 162, плюс 129, плюс 009 62, плюс 005 68, минус 020 77 000 000 000, Ноябрь Альфа, плюс 00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013 вверх 048 вправо 37, плюс 1418, минус 16500 129 04 361 60. Полярные звезды 323 090 056, без зазора. Примечания: во-первых, это треб
哦，好的
Sa
배경 
Okay. Sembra un po'... un po' esagerato
알
Да. 
This is Friendship Seven. Sun, I want to make a mark here when the sun goes down. Sun is on the horizon at the present time, a brilliant blue out from each side of it. And I'll give a mark at the last. The sun
Roger, ich habe den Zeit-Hack bekommen und warte g
알겠습니다. 찰리, 저희가 한번 맞춰보고 비슷한 값을 제시해 보겠습니다. 아, CDR 3, LMP 
Roger. On dirait
C'è qualche m
了解しました。T/MスイッチをREA
Хорошо. Эта одна шестая g 
حسنًا، هيوستن. قبل عدة دقائق كنت ثابتًا تمامًا في ا
روجر، يا فريندشيب سفن. الجزء الأول من ناقل الحركة الخاص ب
Roger, Frank. Quello che stiamo facendo qui sotto è questo. Vorremmo davvero la calibrazione dell'orizzonte. Vor
Jim, il est temps de reprendre les mesures de charge de la batterie. Veuillez indiquer la ten
わかりました。大きなバックを外しました
很容易辨认。从这里
罗杰
روجر. ما نريده 
Хорошо. Нужно убедиться, что у нас есть кондиционер, то есть панель 16, инвертор 2, замкнута. Ав
Sì, ha una deriva casuale. Non c'è alcuna oscillazione che io possa prevedere. La... la linea che porta al palloncino a volte è tesa; a volte è lenta... abbastan
En général, je trouve qu'ils font du très bon travail, notamment sur les canons, en éliminant une grande partie des bulle
我说低温
好
Regarde ça, tu veux bi
Okay, Vance. You'r
알겠습니다. 제 설정 정보를 알려드
روجر، هيوستن. 6، /: 45701، ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 31776، ناقص 00823، ناقص 01365 180 016 001، غير متوفر، زائد 00188 318
Disjoncteu
알겠습니다. 코롤료프에게서 아무런 지시도 받지 못했습니다. 항공
भंडारण विभाग ने इस ब्लैक-एंड-व्हाइट टीवी कैमरे को बी-6 में रखने का प्रयास किया और उनका कहना है कि लेंस हटाकर भी इसे अंदर नहीं रखा जा सकता। इसलिए, मैं अभी भी यही सलाह देता हूं कि इसे वहीं रखा जाए जहां हमने इसे सूची में रख
هذا سيجما سفن. سأبدأ الآن بفحص الانحراف النهاري
バイブレーターは正常で、53分にST
मैं यहाँ तक पहुँच सकता 
Это верно, Джим. Я... Ты правильно понял, и ты понял, что значит "400 плюс все шары" после "400 плюс 5"? То есть, "400 плюс 5" и "400
Pouvez-vous imaginer des phénomènes de ventilation normaux qui pourraient se produire, comme par exemple un réservoir d'hydrogène surp
Roger. 
Roger, Houston. L'Eagle è tornata in orbita, dopo aver lasciato la Base Tranquility e aver lasciato dietro di sé una replica del nostro 
Хорошо. Мы хотим, чтобы вы провели вентиляцию — туннельную вентиляцию до тех пор, пока не будет достигнуто знач
أين أخفيت 
好的。站台已对齐。它对齐了，对吧
Oh, c'est trop pour un vieux comme
水使用量のプロファイルを綿密に検討しており、現在は の電源を入れたまま の電源を切る方向に傾いていますが、後ほど詳細をお知らせします。また、就寝時​​は1人監視員を配置することをお勧めします。尿の投棄は、ゴミ問題を悪
У нас всё хорош
오늘 휴스턴의 가장 큰 뉴스는 바로 휴스턴 애스트로스에 관한 것입니다. 스포츠계 소식으로는, 휴스턴 애스트로스가 신시내티 레즈와의 경기에서 9회말 극적인 역전승을 거두며 7-4로 승리했습니다. 하지만 9회초까지만 해도 상황은 매우 암울했습니다. 애스트로스는 4-3으로 뒤지고 있었습니다. 그러던 중 1아웃 상황에서 헤수스 알루가 우익수 방면으로 안타를 쳤습니다. 이어 존 에드워즈가 우익수 방면으로 안타를, 샌디 발데스피노가 2루타를 터뜨려 동점 주자를 홈으로 불러들였습니다. 훌리오 고타이가 볼넷으로 출루했고, 조 모건이 결승 번트
Ok. Grazie. Prima faremo
ह्यूस्टन, अ
Ой-ой, вот 
حسنًا. اعلم أنه عندما وصلنا إلى شركة ACME... لفترة وجيزة جدًا، كان الضوء خافتًا للغاية. ثم انط
Roger. Apollo 8, eure Daten von der Rü
Roger. Got the
Roger. Quel
Сегодня вечером мы немного 
ठीक है। उन्हें प्रतीक्षा करने के लिए कहो। समय और समय की जानक
..
正解です。パ
Stand by, Jim. We think we are getting it all. We are confirming now. That 
Und nur zur Information: Wir werden Tranquility Base bitten, beim nächsten Mal, wenn Sie vorbeikommen, ebenfalls eine Veranstaltung durchzuführen; und ich habe die Informationen, falls Sie sie kopieren 
روجر. فهمنا.
ऑरोरा सेवन, आप तेज़ी से क्षीण हो रहे हैं। आप क्षीण हो रहे हैं। एमसीसी [पारा नियंत्रण केंद्र] आपकी कार के ईंधन और मैनुअल ईंधन खपत को लेकर चिंतित है। वे आपको ईंधन बचाने की सलाह
ただし、時間を選ぶ場合は、何かがおかしくなった場合に、残りの部
Roger. Copy. Sounds 
Gemini 4, RKV CAP COM. RKV è pronto. Se riesci a completare il tuo esperimento D-9 in tempo, chiamami. Abbiamo anco
Понял. Обратите внимание, что мы не блокируем ваш высокоскоростной канал связи, 
حسنًا. مفهوم. أسمع صوت الصرير هنا أيضًا. دلتا-في سي ١٠٤٣٥٦
Wir haben gera
Attends Buzz. Ça a l'air plutôt bien, d'après ce que je vois. On a la ligne de convergence tropicale là-bas. Il y a quelques nuages ​​sur la carte météo que je regarde, mais rien d'important. Pour l'instant... Attends. Voyons voir, là, à
Сейчас мы — SEF VII и BEF, и мы находимся — ну, я бы сказал, на расстоянии — 10 футов др
罗杰。我其实没太关注这个问题。不过我注意到一点，就是你打开风扇的时候，风量显示会出现波动，这可能跟交流电的波动有关。下次我们或许可以检查一下交流电压，看看是什么情
Ok. Il p
Roger. Go ahead with status report. Ove
Okay, ich habe Sie über AC INVER
हमने सभी फिटिंग की जांच कर ली है और मुझे पता है कि मैं सब कुछ अपने यूसीडी से जोड़ सकता हूँ। इसल
उन्हें यही जवाब चाहिए था। क्या आपके पास इंडियन ओशन शिप 
मैं
Rimani nella capsula a meno che t
Хо
Ну, я не знаю. Через минуту я хочу начать выравнивание как можно тщательнее и посмотреть, смогут ли сканеры это обнаружить и скорректировать,
よし、ジェリー。プログラム23はこれで終了だ。君が望むなら、クワ
Frank, restez près de nous; nous allons le chercher. Pendant ce temps, pour Bill, la qua
Jetzt verstehe i
존, 고마워요. 제가 지
इस समय सूर्य की किरणें अंतरिक्ष यान के अगले हिस्से से टकराकर वापस लौट रही हैं, जिससे उसका हर हिस्सा धुंधला हो रहा है। बाईं ओर और नीचे कुछ च
Ich nehme an, dass – i
मुझे एक एलपीडी 
…銃は持っていな
Это Мучеа — рекомендую вам съез
よし、もうすぐアフリカに到着するはずだ。ひっくり返して
Now in that cabin cold soak, we won't have any 
はい
꽤 많
Bon, où va bien pouvoi
11、ヒューストン。あなたの視点から、極雲冠について説明
В 02:30 (минута - минус 2:30) во время отключения питания от кабеля первым делом мы выполняем два шага. Мы размыкаем главный выключатель B, выключатель питания главного выключателя B, а затем следует третий шаг, который гласит: «
क्लिफ अभी ड्यूटी पर नहीं हैं। जीन क्रान्ज़ ने क
Roger. Je co
ठीक है, एमएससी-1 10:50 पर चालू हो जाएगा और मुझे उस समय प्लेटफॉर्म को चालू करके संरेखि
알겠습니다. 
불쌍한 LM은 오염됐어. 온통 소변 입자
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Мы потеряли все данные о вас. Последние имею
31700, NA, NA,, माइनस 00050, प्लस सभी शून्य, प्लस 00001 000 334 001, सभी शू
제 발밑에 꽤 큰 폭풍대가 형성되어 있네요. 번개가 오른쪽 지평선 저 멀리까지 번쩍이는 걸 보니, 그 범위가 상당히 넓은 것 같습니다. 바로 제 발밑에서도 번개가 치고 있고요. 밤에는 어두운 쪽에서 번개가 아주
Хотите озн
Хорошо. Если хотите, можете посмотреть еще раз на следующем проходе. У нас другой набор координат, основанный на бортовом решении P57. Это Echo 0.3 и 4.8. Повторяю, Echo 0.3, 4.8, 
روجر، جيم. مستعد ل
Nous les maintenons 
حسنًا. أستطيع تمييز أجزاء صغيرة جدًا - أراضٍ زراعية، وأراضٍ رعوية في الأسفل. أرى حقول
收到。您需要在自动选择开关上启用 Alfa 和 Bravo 四轴飞行器。禁用 Charl
Plus 59578, moins 00086, moins 05287, 012 080 018, non applicable, plus 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, terre vers le haut 005, droite 27, plus 0398, plus 06500 13215 36961; Sirius Rigel 137 311 339, pas de marge, supposer l'exécution d'une manœuvre de survol, uti
Apollo 13, Houston. Forward OMNI 
You are riding the best bird we can find. Ove
حسنًا يا جاك، سأفعل. تمكنت أنا وجيم من رصد الأبراج من النوافذ عندما لا يكون هناك تهوية. هل يمكنك إخباري ببعض الوقت عن هذه المواد الاستهلاكية، وما هي استخداماتها المتوقعة؟ أعتقد أنك بدأتَ بذكر
카나본의 인수
Роджер. 18-1 без OAMS 17 56 03. 7+47.
안녕하세요, 과이마스캡컴,
了解。最後の…えっと、約1分ほど、しっかりとロックできたようです。針は上
بينما أنظر حولي في المنطقة، يكون التباين، بشكل عام، *** ناتجًا كليًا عن الظل *** أسفل الشمس... لون رمادي فاتح جدًا، لون رمادي فاتح، هالة حول ظلي، حول ظل خوذتي. ثم، عندما أنظر عبر *** يصبح التباين أقوى حيث أن اللون المحيط لا يزال فاتحًا إلى حد ما. عندما تنظر لأسفل باتجاه الشمس ***، فإن مساحة أكبر *** من المنطقة المظللة تنظر نحونا. اللون العام *** للمنطقة المحيطة *** يكون التباين أقل وضوحًا. مسح جميع المناطق المغبرة التي أثرناها *** أغمق بكثير في الملمس. 
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 좀 더 나은 OMNI를 제공해 
Ich denke, an diesem Punkt konnte man bemerken, dass wir das Cockpit aufräumten, weil wir uns Sorgen um die Temperatur der Anzüge machten. Jetzt haben wir das Problem endlich im Griff und sind überzeugt, dass
Хорошо. Теперь возьмите скотч и отрежьте два куска длиной примерно 90 см, или на длину вытянутой руки, и сделайте из них два ремня вокруг боковых сторон баллона: один ремень ближе к верху, а другой — ближе к низу, липкой стороной на
Ich sti
- - e la guida del veicolo di lancio sembrano entrambe in buone condizioni. Stimiamo che ci sia una probabil
حس
Роджер, Том. Ядро 07
OK. Ceci est un 9, /: 45597, moins 040, plus 157, plus 34188, moins 01353, plus 00780 180 008 001, Novembre Alfa, plus 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0
좋습니다, 잠시 기다려 주
알겠습니다. 배 당번도 좀 
네. 교대 시간이 다가오고 있어서 몇 가지 사항을 먼저 말씀드리고 싶습니다. 현재 풍속은 최대 초당 0.3피트 정도로 예상되므로 6번 중간 코스에서는 연료 분사가 없을 것입니다. 7번 중간 코스는 풍속이 조금 더 높아서 추후에 결정하겠습니다. 착륙 지점의 날씨는 여전히 양호한 것으로 보고되었으며, 예보에 따르면 2000피트 상공에는 산발적 강우, 12000피트 상공에는 부분적 강우가 예상됩니다. 이는 앞서 프랭크에게 알려준 수치와 거의 같습니다. 시야는 약 10마일, 파고는 약 4피트입니다. 소나기가 산발적으로 내릴 가능성이 5% 미만으로 예상되며, 2000피트 
मैं कहता हूं, मुझे व
로저, 내일 
断路器 - SPS 节距 1、节距 2、偏航 1、偏航
ठीक है। हमारे पास तापम
Tranquility Base, Houston. Ci abbiamo pensato e la s
ठ
Чёрт, тебе что, нужен быстросъёмный адаптер... Джим? Наш туда никак не вставишь. По-м
11번, 휴스턴. 우리는 약속 장소, 아니, 비행기 천장 창문에서 좋은 경치를 보고 있습니다. 하지만 아무도 우리를 쳐다보고 있는 것 같지는 않네
Ok, Jim. Noi... Abbiamo parlato del fatto che tu debba adottare un assetto diverso da quello del pad per una migliore visione del campo stellare dal modulo di comando, e quello che vorremmo che facessi è questo. Se riesci a prevedere ora o a breve quale assetto vorresti mante
हाँ। उसकी किस्मत अच्छी थी। उसे मुझे एक कप कॉफी पिलाने की कोई ज
Bon... C'est un autre gros problème... Si on doit commencer à boire de l'eau du robinet.
Gemini 4, это Houston CAP 
Я сделал снимок S-5 облачного образования над Тихим океаном, приближающегося к району Coastal Sentry в Квебеке, в 00, используя диафрагму f/11 и фокусное расстояние 150. Это был кадр № 28. Я делаю несколько снимков для S-5. Я нахожусь прямо в районе тропического шторма Карла. Сейчас очень сильная облачность. Я сделаю несколько снимков облачных образований. У них есть очень интересные переплетения на вершин
Roger. Nous avons essayé d'obtenir ce réalignement. Nous avons besoin de... Auriez-vous une manœuvre pour nous permettre d'obtenir certai
Je le crois, Ken. Cette bande est parallèle à la ligne M, et je pense que c'est lié à la conception de l'optique, notamment à l'entrée rectangulaire extérieure. À cet angle solaire précis, elle la traverse complètement. J'ai remarqué que la Terre et le Soleil produisent le même effet sur le télescope de balayage. Dans le sextant, la même bande lumineuse est présente, bien qu'elle couvre tout son champ de vision. Cependant, le grossissement permet de bien distinguer les étoiles, et il
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, केप फ्लाइ
응, 나도 알아. 넌 마치 엄
休斯顿，水瓶
Ho appena elaborato una soluzione per spostare la longitudine di atterraggio di 6 gradi a est. Voglio solo confrontarla con quella che hanno calcolato sulla base dello stesso tempo di combustione, in base alla longitudine di impatto di polarizzazione determinata da, che è sbagliata. Ho indicato che ho bisogno di 600 piedi al secondo di combustione C in più, e la mia 
로저. 지구는 24시 방향입니다. 이산
Это 
OK. Attends un peu, Jack. J
Роджер, Гуаймас, громко и четко. Мой режим управления теперь — электронное; гироскопы закрыты, я внутри — маневрирование отключено. Я сразу перейду в автоматический режим. Мое состоя
حسنًا، إذا لم أعد بحاجة إلى هذا
Roger. We h
Позвольте мне проверить
نقوم الآن بتجهيز شحنة لك يا فرانك، وهذا هو سبب التأخير. نريد فقط 
Роджер. Ваши системы работают исправно. Мы готовы к вашему первому авиамедицинскому рейсу. Встречайте мое
Роджер. Мы стабилизировали температуру
Л
11、ヒューストン。ここで高利得アレイを使った運用を試してみたいと思います。再捕捉を選択し、Sバンドアンテナを
Здравствуйте, Апол
With all this other procedures you've been working on there, I thought I was going to have a new one for you. How to get fou
Okay. In the, on panel 5, we want CB POWER 1 and 2, OPEN. Then the POWER switch to reset, release. In the, panels 11 and 16, X LUNAR BUS TIE breakers closed. On panel
Gemini VI，休斯顿外科医生。您服用Actyfed后感
네. 안테나는 요각이 약 330도에서 270도 사이였고, 피치각은 
Roger. Mike, quando stavi giocando con il qualche tempo fa e abbiamo ridotto la deadband, abbiamo dato per scontato che fosse centrata sul nuovo assetto che avevamo in quel momento. Da allora, ci siamo spostati di un paio di gradi sia in beccheggio
그리고 마이크, 저희는 당신이 얻고 있는 이 
ن
Houston, wir haben ein Proble
Sigma Seven auf HF. Ich verstehe dich lau
रॉजर। अब समझ गया। मैंने एस-बैंड के लि
네, 그랬습
Je peux lire les lettres 
吉姆，既然说到这个话题，我想跟杰克提一件事。正如我刚才所说，我
当然，地球本身非常明亮，黑色的夜空并非漆黑一片，而是泛着一层淡淡的玫瑰色光晕。除非是颗非常明亮的星星，否则它很可能就淹没在这片光晕之中，根本看不见。我特意将十字线调整到地平线以上相当高的位置，确保星星不会被地平线以下的亮度所掩盖。然而，即使我将十字线调整到如此高的位置，让星星在黑色背景下清晰可见，它仍然不见
Нет. Сейчас всё в порядке. Мы следим за ситуацией и просто хотели сообщить вам, что мы изучаем этот вопрос. Если мы окажемся в ситуации, когда нам потребуется что-то изменить, мы вернёмся к пр
अब हम भूमध्य सागर के ऊपर हैं। इसे पहचानना बहुत आसान है। मुझे कुछ बहुत बड़े जहाज दिखाई दे रहे हैं। ये बेरूत से रवाना ह
Насколько нам известно, нет. По голосовой ленте мы получили сообщение о том, что им удалось 
はい。では、オープンしているものをお伝えします。FLOOD、MAIN A、MAIN B、そしてFLIGHT/POSTLANDINGはクローズ
Okay, Owen. I want to thank you and the whole Purple/Maroon group 
Rog
Roger, Frank. Wir haben das gerade auch besprochen. Wir stimmen eurer 
Ja, alle haben sich gefragt, ob du dich daran erinner
ठीक है, प्लस 15 पर "मास्टर आर्म - ऑफ" और "मोड कंट्रोल: - एटीटी होल्ड" के बाद "इंजन कटऑफ पर" को हटा दें, हमें "एंटर" और "वाई, जेड अनुवाद के माध्यम से अत्यधिक दर कम करें" चाहिए। और प्रणोदक की मात्रा के बारे में एक प्रश्न, हम उम्मीद करते हैं कि इस बर्न में यह 37 प्रतिशत से नीचे आ जाएगी। क्या यह बर्न टाइम से मेल खाता ह
Bon. Voilà pour
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Dans un peu plus de deux minutes. Tous vos systèmes et votre orbite sont corrects depuis le sol. Nous
D'accord. Sur la page concernant la manœuvre de survol, sous les étoiles du nord, j'ai de nouvelles valeurs pour vous car nous avons remplacé Navi et Polaris par Sirius et Rigel. D'ailleurs, cela correspond également à la mise à jour de la liste de vérification que je vous communiquerai plus tard. Pour cette manœuvre, j'ai trois nouveaux angles à vous indiquer en utilisant Sirius et Rigel lor
Apollo 11, Houston. We'd like to terminate the TV. We don't - We think we got a really - a good 
А что касается CDR: мне достался чужой, но мой теперь показывает 2
P22 के लिए सारी प्रक्रिया बहुत अच्छे से काम करती हुई प्रतीत हुई। बस एक चीज़ जो थोड़ी अजीब थी, वह यह कि DAP थ्रस्टर में कुछ हलचल हुई। मैंने ACCEL COMMAND में पिच और RATE CO
Это подтверждает правильность наших действий. Наш первый курс был 007 вперед, 005 влево и 007 вверх. Финальный промежуточный курс был 004 вперед, 06 вправо и 003 вверх. Это в значительной степени соотве
ネガテ
D'accord, Frank, voici les prévisions météo. Elles annoncent des averses éparses à 2000 pieds et des averses fragmentées à 4000 pieds, avec un ciel très couvert. Vous pourriez le constater en d
Mike, hier auf Seite 97 deiner Checkliste, wo wir die Einrichtung vornehmen, steht mit Bleistift: „20 Minuten warten, bis sich die R
Roger. Wir arbeiten daran. Seit unserem letzten Gespräch gab es keine Übertragungen von der Tranquility Base. Wir k
أنا أقرأ ما تكتبه يا فر
아니요, 제가 가지고 있습니다. 그들은 제게 클록 델타, 상태 벡터, 두 개의 s, 그리
Сейчас заберу рулон 
This is Friendship Seven. Auto R
Okay. Wir gehören
よし、マイナス30秒でスクイブを作動させて、マ
イーグル、ヒューストン。モニターへ燃料2を降下しま
알
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。稍后我们会为您带来州级疫情的最新情况。目前我们还没有准备好；另外，来自静海
Pré
好的。我接下来要进行隧道泄漏检
こんにちは、フラ
हम सुझाव दे रहे हैं कि रेट्रोपैकेज को, मैं फिर से दोहरा रहा हूँ, फेंका न जाए। इसका मतलब है कि आप
Джек, нам понадоб
Хорошо. Непосредственно за 2 часа и 15 минут, я так понимаю, это до того, как
Canary, this is
了解しました。フラ
嗯，还有个COAS防尘罩，我
대서
Hawaii Com Tech, Hawaii Cap C
한 가지 확실한 건, 에드가 밖
737100. Roge
Ich glaube, es regnet 
1차 검사 결
Roger. Stiamo copiando i tuoi progressi. Ti informiamo che sembra che tu stia completando la 
Продувка топливных эле
알겠습니다. 6
Roger. Gra
Houston, i miei commenti sull'alba erano quelli che avevo letto sopra il terreno. Appariva quella che potremmo definire una luce diagonale o una luce dovuta alla foschia o qualcosa del genere. Qu
オーケー、ヴァンス。姿勢制御ができたら、クワッドレーダーを無効にして昨夜と同じようにします。そして、下にいる皆さん
了解しました。コンピューターを事前起動モードのままにして
Houston, Tranquility. We're ready to start with the electrical checkout. We're going to S band modulate
We got
ठीक है, 8. हमें अभी-अभी टेस्ट पैटर्न के बारे में जवाब मिला है। हमें लगा था कि हमारे पास 25 टेस्ट पैटर्न हैं जो ग्राउंड टेस्ट के लिए आवंटित हैं, और हम इन्हीं पर काम कर रहे हैं। फिर पाँच और पैटर्न हैं जो फ़्लाइट टेस्ट के लिए आवंटित हैं, और इन पैटर्नों में बस इतना ही अंतर है कि फ़्लाइट टेस्ट पैटर्नों पर निर्देश लिखे होते हैं; इसलिए अगर हम टेस्ट पैटर्न 8 देख रहे हैं, तो इसका मतलब है कि हम अभी भी ग्राउंड टेस्ट के लिए आवंटित पैटर्नों पर काम कर रहे हैं, तो इसमें कोई समस्या नहीं है। और मैं आपको बता दूँगा कि हम
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。君は切り離された。もう一度言っ
Ecco un articolo di Harry Rosenthal dell'Associated di Houston. Due Babbi Natale illuminano la vigilia di Natale per Jeffrey Lovell, 2 anni. Il primo ha bussato alla sua porta di casa e gli ha portato i regali. Il secondo ha accompagnato il padre a casa dalla Luna. Il primo indossava un abito rosso e una barba bianca e ha emesso un grido così forte da essere sentito fino all'isolato. Il secondo era un enorme motore che sputava fiamme dietro la Luna, e migliaia di persone attendevano la notizia dell'accensione. "Si prega di essere informati che c'è un Babbo Natale" sono state le prime parole dell'Apollo 8 mentre emergeva dal silenzio radio per informare un mondo in ansia 15 minuti dopo che il motore aveva completato la sua fase critica. "Nessuno di noi si aspetta mai un regalo di Natale migliore di questo", ha detto Ken Mattingly del Controllo Missione. "Ringraziate tutti a terra da parte nostra. Sapete che non ce l'avremmo fatta senza di voi", è stata la risposta del Colonnello Frank Borman, il comandante della navicella spaziale. A questo punto, un albero di Natale si illuminò davanti alle console del Controllo Missione e l'astronauta Harrison Schmidt lesse all'equipaggio una versione spaziale di "Una visita di San Nicola". "Era la notte prima di Natale, e nello spazio, l'equipaggio dell'Apollo 8 aveva appena vinto la corsa alla Luna", iniziava. L'equipaggio del Controllo Missione aveva rimandato i festeggiamenti finché il padre di Jeffrey, il Capitano di Marina James Lovell, insieme al Maggiore dell'Aeronautica William A. Anders e al Colonnello Borman non fossero tornati a casa sani e salvi. In qualsiasi altra vigilia di Natale, le famiglie degli astronauti sarebbero state in chiesa per le funzioni natalizie, ma quest'anno erano tutti incollati ai loro televisori. Le case vicino al Manned Spacecraft Center erano decorate. I prati intorno alla casa di Lovell e in tutta la sua comunità di Timber Cove erano fiancheggiati da luminari in stile messicano, e i quattro Lovel
Ok. È affermativo. Quindi, in termini generali, quello che dovremo fare è accendere il e far apparire la palla otto, quindi impostare l'assetto, posizi
Хоро
收到。我明白了。我输入了S波段的那些角度，但没能锁
Stiamo valutando di lasciare le sacche d'acqua nella scatola di poppa destra e di non spostarle in q
계
嘿，查理，你是说在很短的时间内，他实际上加载
Posizione 6, completa per il t
Oh, this cottonpic
Eagle, Houston. We are through with the computer. You can go, back to
Jim, per quanto riguarda l'orario di inizio dell'accensione, hai parlato di un'ora e 15 minuti. Pensiamo che sia adeguato. Questa è
Хорошо. На отметке 1 мы сделали фотосъемку мишени 90 и терминаторной съемки на юге для ближнего терминатора. Начиная со отметки 2, у нас мишень 12 и мишени 10, 14, 16, 19, 20, 21 и 23. К сожалению, мы попали в зону высокой скорости — я где-то попал в зону высокоскоростной пл
يا 
Das ist negativ.
2, /: 46427, 마이너스 053, 플러스 141, 마이너스 01350, 플러스 0000, 플러스 0000 000 175 358 00607, 플러스 00606 01350 009 01265 02 3112 197; Taurus, Aida, 위 16.2, 왼쪽 0.1, 고정 판독값 적용 불가; Sirius, Rigel 129 155 010, 여유량 없음, 점화 
Esatto. Non sto 
Certamente; siamo alla luce del sole, e sembra che lo siano tutti, ma non 
هل تصدق أنك تنظر إلى يخنة دجاج؟ كل ما عليك فعله هو سكب 90 مل من الماء الساخن لمدة 5 إلى 10 دقائق. الآن، نأخذ الماء الساخن من صنبور صغير هنا مزود بفلتر لتنقية الماء من أي غازات قد تكون موجو
了解。ジムが次の攻撃をする
Se riesco a raccogliere un po' d
Aquarius, wir sehen, dass deine Glykoltemperatur recht hoch ist. Wenn du sie etwas erhöhen möch
Гавайи. Относительная влажность здесь составляет около 61 проце
你好
يجب أن
ठीक है। हम
Ok. Ci sono alcuni dubbi derivanti dalla lettura della checklist. A quanto ho capito, sia la caldaia principale che quella secondaria saranno accese al momento dell'ingresso effettivo, ma non c'è un punto nella checklist in cui siano effettivamente accese. Vorremmo quindi avere conferma di 
Okay. P
आ
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. На отметке 3 с половиной минуты вы всё ещё хорошо выглядите. Ваш прогн
ठीक है। हमें लगता है कि हमने सारा सामान लोड कर लिया है और हम चाहते हैं कि आप SPC को चालू कर दें और एजेना को आगे बढ़ने दें। अगर कोई समस्
मैं उस गड्ढे के ठीक बाईं ओर से घूमकर जाऊँगा। क्या वह जगह
...твоя оч
そう
Okay, we're just abou
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 이제 회로 차단기 트랜스듀서, 온도 감지용, 메
Gemini VI, Houst
友谊七
Depuis que j'ai baissé le débit d'eau de la combinaison, la température de la vapeur évacuée a légèrement augmenté; je passe de 1 à 2 pour le moment. Cela devrait la faire baisse
أخبرني ع
啊，罗杰，友谊七号。你现在处于哪种控
有了电脑，我们在音乐方面有点落后于预
Прокладки. У тебя есть с
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
روجر. التل الصغير الواقع خلف الظل مباشرةً عبارة عن فوهتين بركانيتين مستطيلتين، يبلغ طولهما معًا حوالي 40 قدمًا وعرضهما 20 قدمًا، وعمقهما حوالي 6 أقدام. سنجري المزيد من العم
Das ist bestätigt. Wir möchten die von uns erhaltenen Informationen mit Ihren abgleichen, um die Plattform gegebenenfalls zu aktualisieren. Jim, wir versuchen eigentlich herauszufinden, ob wir eine Lösung finden
그건 자동 레
Ja, und Sie haben auch einen. Wie wäre es, wenn Sie mal vorbeikommen und mich begutachten
The cabin's running slightly cold. We do have one cabin fan ON, and we're in full heat, and it's running just sl
罗杰。将废水排至背面 10%。使用
헬륨 밸브,
Ok, Vance. Per prima cosa ti mostreremo 
D'accord
Vous pourriez demander à Houston s'ils seraient intéressés par une prise en charge... Je fais quelques exercices pour garder la for
Gleich ist
Roger. PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50, minus 00021, 182 287 000, plus 56919. Abbruch, weniger als 10 Minuten, 105 12 30.00. Abbruch, mehr als 10 Minuten, 103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00. Kein Plus 12: 102 44 27.00. plus 01223, minus alle Kugeln, plus 01889 01520 plus 00110 02250, Brenndauer 0
結果
Hai la rispo
बीएमएजी मोड, तीन, दर 2 
Okay. Als Nächstes die CB, Felder 11 und 16, Querträger-Ausgleichslasten zum
D'accord, Buzz. Concernant votre plan de vol, quelques mises à jour tout d'abord. Nous avons annulé la manœuvre de mi-parcours numéro 6. Restez simplement en vol. Je vous accorde un peu plus de temps ce matin. Deuxième point du plan de vol: nous sommes prêts pour une recharge de la batterie B à tout moment. Troisième point: nous souhaiterions effectuer le déversement des eaux usées différemment cette fois-ci. Nous aimerions le faire à nos marques au sol. Le terrain est un peu acci
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Stiamo ricevendo il vostro downlink F
すべて順調です。キャビンの圧力が抜けて、ハッチを開けるのに十分な圧力が吹き出るのを待っているところです。ゲージの目盛りは0.1く
Хорошо, Джек. Хочешь, я продолжу по конт
Да, подтвержд
Ottimo. Completata la combustione del 
Houston, la Base Tranquillité va vous donner quelques précisions concernant la question géologique d'hier soir. Nous avons atterri dans un champ de cratères relativement lisse, composé de cratères secondaires allongés et circulaires, dont la plupart présentent des rebords, quelle que soit leur taille. Ce n'est toutefois pas toujours le cas. Quelques petits cratères alentour n'ont pas de rebord visible. Le sol de toute la zone est composé de sable très fin, voire de limon. Sur Terre, on pourrait le comparer à de la poudre de graphite. Dans ce sol se trouvent une grande variété de roches de formes, de tailles et de textures diverses, arrondies ou anguleuses, et de consistances variées
Ed started on unstowing stuff and as soon as we got to the position where it became no longer feasible to fool with the booster, I started full-time helping him - at least holding the things and stowing them away and trying to keep them from disappearing. The faster we worked the farther behind we got. Not because we weren't putting things 
Voyons voir, il y a peut-être un léger décalage; le Soleil semble u
D'accord, en haut de la page 1-4; là où il est écrit « 1 heure et 15 minutes » à côté de la ligne 32, nous allons changer cela en « Moins 2 heures et 30 minutes
Ok, Apollo 8. Abbiamo terminato il primo test e ora cambieremo la modalità uplink in UPLINK C
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。テープレコーダーのダンプで待機してください。蒸気圧を確認してください。一次蒸発器が乾燥している可能性があります。蒸気圧が目盛りから外れて低い場合は、背圧弁を閉じて蒸発器を再点検してください
이 자세에서는 확실히 머리 위를 올려다보는 듯한 착각이 들고, 지평선이 보이지 않으면 그냥 칠흑 같은 하늘뿐입니다. 조종실 조
बहुत बढ़िया। दक्षिण की ओर और अंदर की तरफ, मुझे और भी रोशनी दिखाई दे रही हैं। वास्तव में उस क्षेत्र में दो, बल्कि चार रोशनी के पैटर्न हैं। और अब खिड़की से एक और पैटर्न दिखाई दे रहा है जो लगभग मेरे 
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। रॉजर। सभी स्विच फ्यूज अभी भी उसी स्थिति में हैं। स्क्विब सक्रिय है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। मोड सेलेक्टर सामान्य है, रेट कमांड, जाइरो, सामान्य हैं। मैनुअल फ्यूल हैंडल खींचा हुआ है। स्वचालित ईंधन अभी भी चालू है। रेट्रो-डिले, सामान्य है, लैंडिंग बैग बंद है। सीक्वेंस पैनल पर बाकी सब कुछ सामान्य है। ई
杰
नेटवर्क, कार्नार्वोन। आपकी बात कमजोर है लेकिन स्पष्
حسنًا. انت
يا هيوستن، ما هو المو
Okay. We're reading 3 g's, think we'll have to let the reentry damping check go thi
जड़त्वीय पर रॉजर। और अब हम 2 पैड पर चलते हैं। 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, प्लस 166, माइनस 081; TIG 080 11 3603. संज्ञा 81: माइनस 01408, सभी गेंदों को घटाकर, माइनस 00743. सभी गेंदों को रोल करें, 196 359 00657, प्लस 00537. डेल्टा-VT 01592 017 01531. सेक्स्टेंट तारा 23 1160 138. पैड का शेष भाग अनुपलब्ध है। संरेखित करें, वेगा और डेनेब 243 183 012. उलेज, दो जेट 19 सेकंड। टिप्पणी: आपके लोड पर, हम उड़ान योजना में दिखाई देने वाले मान के बजाय R1 20101 चाहते हैं। सेक्स्टेंट स्टार चेक करते समय, यह 79:30:10 के बीच किया जाना चाहिए, जिस समय तारा क्षितिज के ऊपर आता है, और 79:52:10 के बीच,
रॉजर। क
ترانكويليتي، هيوستن. نود الاطلاع على قراءاتك، وقد راج
はい、ファンはそれぞれ 2 
了
로저, 우정 7. 당신은 정말
Il controllo della man
جيد جداً يا جاك. قل، ربما يمكن
अपोलो 8, 
रॉजर। जेमिनी VI,
好的。大约在中间位置。当推进剂含量达到 
J'ai trouvé la suite
よし、ジムに読んでもらいたい手順がある。それは、地球の勢力圏に状態ベク
我
Nun, das müssen wir ihnen erzählen. Ich weiß nicht, wann es ausgegangen ist, denn ich habe kein Li
Okay. For those of you that don't know, this is where we log most of our data for each of the maneuvers, and we ha
And, Jim; Houston. In particul
روجر، هيوستن. نسر مع العد. 1، 2، 3، 4، 5؛ 5، 
Nein, ganz sicher nicht (hust) – ganz sicher nicht. Wir zeigen – 
Funktioniert der Monit
ठीक है। मैं आपको मुख्य बस बी के बारे में अपने अवलोकन बताता हूँ। वहाँ सब कुछ बहुत तेज़ी से हुआ, और हमने सबसे पहले टक्कर या विस्फोट या जो भी कारण था, उसकी आवाज़ सुनी, मुझे पक्का नहीं पता। इसके लगभग 1 सेकंड बाद, एक मास्टर अलार्म बजा, जो मुख्य बस बी के अंडरवोल्टेज का संकेत था। मैं
Проверяю остальные системы. Все они, кажется, работают довольно стабильно. Температура в куполе скафандра по-прежнему около 71 градуса
Я вижу мигание двигателей. На вторичном сканере отображается вырав
Go ahead, Vance, we're ready to co
Вперед, продолжат
Die Kabinentemperatur steigt. Auch die Temperatur im Anzug scheint zu steigen. Ich lasse es bis 02:25:00 Uhr draußen, um zu sehen, ob die Temperatur dadurch etwas sin
Roger. 1A und 1B sin
ठीक है। समझ गया। आपके पास लाइट वाला मास्टर अलार्म है। अब हम आपको कमांड मॉड्यूल के कनस्तरों तक ले जाने के लिए तैयार हैं। और पहले चरण के रूप में, मैं यह जानन
हां। अभी; ह
One thing that I don't know if we got on tape before, but both Ed and I mentioned that we were quite thankful for all the training that we'd done in th
تم تأكيد 
Okay. After the last step then, I'm free t
يا 
Отлично. Как вы, воз
أحاول الآن التقا
Gemini 4
Jack, in reference to your ques
Bien. M'avez-v
إيجل، كولومبيا. انتهيت من ت
C'est aff
ये है दोस्ती सातवीं। मैं
ठीक है, जो। बाहर सिर्फ बादल ही बादल हैं, और जब नीचे ज़मीन दिखाई देने लगेगी, तो मैं खिड़की खोल दूँगा। मैंने सोचा कि मैं तुम्हें जिम से मिलवा लूँ, ताकि यह पक्का हो जाए कि वह अ
روجر. لن نفعل ذ
そして、今日のヒューストンのビッグニュースはアストロズに関するものです。スポーツ界では、ヒューストン・アストロズがシンシナティ・レッズ相手に9回裏に反撃し、7対4で勝利しました。しかし、9回に入ると状況はかなり厳しいものでした。アストロズは4対3でリードされていました。ところが、1アウトでヘスス・アルーがライトへシングルヒット。ジョン・エドワーズがライトへシングルヒット、サンディ・バルデスピノが二塁打を放ち同点打を放ちます。フリオ・ゴタイが四球で出塁し、ジョー・モーガンがバントを落として決勝点を挙げます。しかし、本塁
अपो
أخيرًا، حللنا مشكلة درجة حرارة دائرة البدلة. الآن أفهم سبب قلق سكوت بشأن هذا التسجيل فقط. لا يوجد صوت جانبي أيضًا. درجة حرارة البدلة الآن - مارك تي 
Okay. That's verified. POWER AMPL breaker
Roger, Bill. Lors de la prochaine exposition au soleil, nous ne prévoyons aucun problème avec
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 아닙니다. 마드리드 기지의 명령 컴퓨터에 문제가 생겨서 일시적으로 어센션 기지로 전환해야 했습니다. 이제 마드리드 기지
Roger, Jim. Christmas morning around your house was kinda quiet, says Marilyn. She said that they are all thankful the mission has gone so great. They missed having you around the tree this morning, but they wanted to reassure you that your presents are wait
वैंस, ऐसा लग
D'accord, je vois Mercure traverser la lueur atmosphérique. On verra si elle reste visible. Quand j'ai dit « Je vois », c'était le début. Remarquez le premier changement de couleur, qui est maintenant bleu clair. Et elle est encore visible. Remarquez un bleu plus foncé. Visible dans le jaune orangé de la surface de la Terre. C'était Mercure qui disparaissait à l'horizon. Je devrais bientôt apercevoir la Lune et V
我正在将返回舱停在再入姿态。开始滚转。偏航角为零；滚转角正在减小。我想捕捉到这个轨迹，然后观察。滚
双子座六号。我们距离目标还有大约 154 英里。预计到达时间为 3-4 小时 0 分 0 秒；我们的距离为 154.52 英里；已安装新的磁带录音机盒；20；θ 角，5 度；R，31.23；ΔR 为 2.59；ΔΔR 
了解しました、ジム。サービスモジュールSEP姿勢でこれを実行することを検討しており、光学系は太陽とは反対方向に向けられま
Go a
Okay. In der Golfwelt hat Tommy Jacobs, der in den letzten Jahren nur noch selten an Turnieren teilgenomm
ठीक है। एसी इन्वर्टर 1 को एसी बस 1 
A quanto pare, Vance, l'interruttore del circuito di carica della batteria che sembrava essere inserito non lo era. Fred lo ha tirato fuori e lo ha ripristinato, e poi
أستطيع الآن رؤية الجسم الصغير الذي يشبه ندفة الثلج، وهو يبتعد عن الكبسولة. يسير في نفس مسار الرحلة، بالطبع. بدا كقطعة بيضاء، لكنه واضح تمامًا على خلفية السماء السوداء التي أراها الآن... النجوم التي تبتعد عنا. من الواضح أن سرعته تختلف عن سرعة الكبس
نعم. لا أستطيع الحصول على تلك المقابض الكبيرة
了解、ジャック。了解。燃料電池2のREA​​Cバルブ回路ブレーカーを閉じてください。インバーターの電源を切ってください。BATリレーバスの電源を切ってください。BAT TIESをオフに
Very good. This is the 23rd of December edition of the Interstellar Times a la Paul Haney. We would like to let you know that there are only 2 more shopp
了解。UHF-2
Okay, I want to go to DUMP and
是的，那样没问题。您可以采取一些措施，比如重新维护。但这确实比较繁琐，所以我们才想密切关注，以便在进入之前大致了解情况，看看是能有两个循环回路还是只有一个。这引出了我们正在努力解决的另一个问题，实际上是两个问题。第一，我们想
11, Houston. We do have a few items for you here, entry PAD's, consumabl
أوه، بالمناسبة، لقد تحققت من ذلك 
ठीक है। आरसीएस हीटर - इन्हें चालू कर
अब, बज़, कैनरीज़ में यह आइटम। लॉस एंजिल्स
10分の1、今度はマイナス10分の1でゼロに戻ります。いえ、まだゼロではありません。ちょっと待ってくだ
이글, 휴스턴, 블라인드 테스트 중입니다. 낮은 비트 전송률을 시도해
좋습니다, 아폴로 8호. 방을 빠르게 둘러보니 모든 
分かりました。もちろんです。バズ、O2タンク2番のファンをオンにしてください。それから、11番、光学機器のキャリブレーションですが、プログラムを続行しましたか、それとも呼び出しましたか
Al controllo dei propulsori, il fuoco è rosso a strisce. Quando i propulsori di imbardata si attivano, cancellano definitivamente l'orizzonte. Riesco a vedere l'orizzonte attravers
ऐसा लगता है कि आप OMNI Alfa का इस्तेमाल कर रहे 
- - Hai capito tutto, okay. Okay, quan
Okay
Je ne connaissais pas… la radio… Je n’ai jamais vu de radio. Tout ce que je peux dire, c’est:
حسنًا، لا أعرف م
听得很清
다음 달이었으면 좋았을 텐데. 필요한 서류는 이미 다
Roger. ST
Roger. Midcourse correction number 2. SPS/G&N: 63059, plus 097, minus 020 02644 5792, plus 00118, minus 0
Хьюстон, база «Транквили
يا إيجل، هذه هيوستن. نرى زر ضبط التصويب يعمل. قبل أن تلتقط بعض الأهداف، لا تنسَ إيقاف تشغيله ثم تشغيله مرة أخرى، ثم تشغيله. ان
MARK. 50 sec
모르겠어요, 약이 떨
Okay. Just some info. We're working up a procedure for you to use to - t
そんな風に言わ
Bien. Dans la zone d'amerrissage du Pacifique central, la météo est bonne. La couverture nuageuse est de 2000 pieds, avec des nuages ​​épars; la visibilité est de 10 pieds; le vent souffle à 60 nœuds à 10 nœuds; la hauteur des vagues est de 4 pieds et l'altitude est de 2986 pieds. Des averses éparses sont prévues sur moins de 10 % de la zone. Les forces de récupération de l'Iwo Jima seront au point d'amerrissage; l'indicatif d'appel de l'appareil sera « Recovery 1 », en position avec des nageurs de sauvetage à bord. La zone de rentrée atmosphérique de secours, soumise à des facteurs de charge constants, est couverte par l'USS Hall, le Good Liberty Ship et les autres appareils de récupération, don
好的，吉姆。飞行计划有更新。你做了星体可见性检查，目前看来，Navi 仍然是我们的目标星体，相关的数值是：横滚 102.6，俯仰 328.9，偏航 346.3。这得出轴和耳轴为零。如果你觉得可以——如果你觉得你能用这个数据做点什么，我们想试一试，看
अब हमारी अच्छी तैयारी हो ग
نعم، يبدو ذلك محتملاً يا جيم. هذا هو نفس التقرير الذي تلقيناه من فريد، لكننا لم نتمكن من تحديد ماهيتها، وربما لن نتمكن من ذلك ح
रॉजर। यहाँ सब कुछ सामान्य लग रहा है। सब ठीक दिख रहा है। ऑटो फ्यूल 55 प्रतिशत है। 70,000 फीट, 65,000 फीट से गुजर रहा हूँ। स्थिति बहुत स्थिर है। 60 (हजार) फीट के करीब पहुँच रहा हूँ। रेट कमांड बहुत अच्छा काम कर रहा है। 50 (हजार) फीट के करीब पहुँच रहा हूँ। सब कुछ बढ़िया लग रहा है। 45,000 फीट के करीब पहुँच रहा हूँ। दबाव लगभग 1 जी पर आ गया है। 40, 41 (हजार) फीट पर स्पीड बढ़ाने की तैयारी कर रहा हूँ। स्पीड बढ़ा रहा हूँ, और स्पीड निकल गई है। आप इसे सुन सकते हैं; बादलों के कारण मैं इसे देख नहीं सकता। स्थिति अच्छी बनी हुई है। मैनुअल लीवर लगा हुआ है। ईंधन काफी तेजी से खत्म हो रहा है। अब मैं स्पीड देख सकता हूँ। सब कुछ बढ़िया दिख रहा है। मैं ऑक्सिलरी डैम्पिंग चालू करने जा रहा हूँ। वैसे इसकी जरूरत न
ATT
这个鸟比我们预想的要远得多。他试图拍张照片
Nous le confirmons ici et la température le confirme égalem
Sie scheinen sich im OMNI Alfa-Modus zu befinden. Können Sie bestätigen, da
阿波罗11号，这
ठीक है। यह सही है, और हम टैंक 2 पर नज़र रखेंगे। अगर टैंक 2 का स
Okay, want to comment on our food. So far every orange juice bag, every bag that I have put water into that has had orange juice in it in any form, or pineapple, or straight orange juice, has had a leaky water valve. 
... die Lebensm
लिफ्ट-ऑफ के समय मेरा जीएमटी क
Roger, siamo al Cairo, 26° riv. G.m.t. 07:18:37. 12 miglia 
Joe, wir haben nicht alles davon erhalten. Wir haben nur: „Führen Sie die Schritte 2, 3 und 4 der Aktivier
回到华盛
Х
لا أعرف في أي اتجاه كنت أشير عندما رأيت الصاروخ المعزز. لا أستطيع رؤية الأرض ف
Пон
Spurgo delle 
Bill, ora puoi accendere il riscaldatore della linea d
我这里温度是140度。
Okay. Fangen wir bei minus 6,5 Stunden an. Du wirst wieder Blöcke und Blöcke bekom
I hope that 
لدينا كمية وقود
А что, если мы воспользуемся телеобъективом? Сфокусироваться будет немного сложнее, но, возможно, снимок получит
Хорошо. Обратите внимание, что нагрузка в вашем компьютере составляет 18-1, включая нагрузку при маневрировании. Ваше время TR составляет 21-4, включая время маневриров
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 분리 준비 완료. 시스템 권고 사항은 두 개의 PYRO 버스
わかりました。パネル11で、回路ブレーカーを閉じてください。次にアクティベーション25に進み、手順1、2、3を実行してください。その後アク
范斯，你们都想好要用哪些相机了吗？目前，我们已经配置好了一台哈苏250mm镜头，我还有一台哈苏月球表面1号相机，以及一台月球表面序列相机，都已准备就绪
こちら
- - 83 ساعة. هل أنت
Well, let's get going here. PRIMARY, PRIMARY, HIGH, VOICE, (cough) PCM, RANGE, DOWN VOICE BACKUP, A
Ich schaue mir den Sicherungsautomaten fü
알겠습니다. SPAN 전문가들이 이 내용을 검토한
Non lo s
Роджер, Кантон. Вы читали, что я был в режиме ретро? Вы читали, что мой маневр был неко
And on the side, we were in MIN deadband ATT HOLD; and at contact, I thrusted plus X; and shortly after that we had a sizable attitude oscilla
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। क्या आप अपने कंटिंजेंसी एरिया 1 डेल्टा रेट्रोसीक्वेंस टाइम को कॉपी करने के 
Ripeti
127 03 3082, plus 22.7, plus 1.7, minus 10.6. Ov
Да. Мне приходилось каждый раз вручную регулировать зубцы механизма запуска, так что 
Quatr
켄, 저도 그렇게 생각합니다. 이 띠는 M선과 평행한데, 외부에서 광학 장치로 들어오는 직사각형 입구, 즉 광학 장치 설계와 관련이 있는 것 같습니다. 이 특정 태양 각도에서는 띠가 정확히 가로지릅니다. 지구와 태양 모두 스캐닝 망원경에 이런 현상을 일으킨다는 것을 알게 되었습니다. 육분의에서도 같은 빛 띠가 나타나는데, 육분의 시야 전체를 가리지만 확대율 덕분에 별이 아주 잘 보이고 표시도 가능합니다. 하지만 스캐닝 망원경으로는 별을 식별하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 제가 발견한 광학 장치의 최적 관측 자세는 스캐닝 망원경으로 큰개자리와 오리온자리를 볼 수 있는 자세입니다. 지금처럼 우주선이 특정 각도에
Roger. I got your mark. I am 
这里好像有点堵车，仅
You got a crater coming up, Buzz? Right through here. I don't know if you can see it or not. If not, let me get a picture of it because it's really - got big... on the bottom of it. It don't look
ठीक 
먼저
نحن نفهمك جيداً 
Nicht wirklich, Jim. Es hat mit dieser W-Matrix zu tun. Du erinnerst dich, dass wir sie im Mondorbit neu initialisiert haben und dann daran gearbeitet haben, als du bei deinen vorherigen Sichtungen zurückkamst. Jetzt haben wir sie erneut neu initialisiert. Und wir möchten sie in ihre ursprüngliche Größe und Form zurückvers
Игл, Хьюстон
ठीक है। धन्यवाद, चार्ली। अब बिना किसी और कार्रवाई के बत्ती
당신은 파이브 스퀘어를 통과하고 있고, 정말 훌륭하게 연주하고 있어요. 우리를 구해내는 것 외에
ओवेन, प्लेटफ़ॉर्म अलाइनमेंट में एक अजीब बात यह है कि जब
Дружба Семь, Дружба Семь, Дружба Семь, это Canary Cap Com. Как читать? Конец 
嗯，Vance，我一直尝试只用最小脉冲姿态控制来控制我的横滚和偏航——更准确地说是横滚和俯仰。但是，在这种配置下，我无法按照我的意愿控
أفضّل عدم الخوض في هذا الموضوع أصلاً. أخيراً تمكنت من إخراج مقياس الجرعات، وسأضطر لوضعه على الفتحة، ولكن دعني أضع 
Роджер, Гуаймас. У нас всё ещё есть ускоритель. Сейчас мы довольно далеко от него, и он потребляет немного больше топлива, чем мы ожидали. В данный момент у нас 61 градус в продольном направлении, 37 слева и 36 вверху. Кажется, сейчас мы едва держимся наравне с 
Понял. Батареи готовы, и — готовы
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن
Хь
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। लगभग 
Okay. Mike, was passiert ist – du saßest da und hast alles überwacht, und in Schritt 7 bist du zu NOUN 01 gegangen, hast die Adresse eingegeben und dann INFORMATION INFORMATION; und mit dem letzten ENTER-Klick auf 35400 ENTER, direkt 
罗
Houston, wenn ich mich recht erinnere, sind die Starteinstellungen der Kardanringe nicht korrekt, und woher bekommen wir die Einstellungen für den Br
Да, подтверждаю. Теперь у вас есть на меня какие-то данные? Я лучше включусь, чем на
Bo
Je te 
Okay. Es sieht so aus, als ob sich Ihre Werte vor dem Verbrennungsvorgang stabilisiert hätten. Könnten Sie uns bitte jetzt noch einmal den Quelldruck und die Te
Roger. Deke, die Dunstschicht ist sehr hell. Ich würde sagen, sie liegt 8 bis 10 Grad über dem Horizont. Und ich würde sagen, sie ist etwa doppelt so hoch über dem Horizont wie das helle blaue Band bei Sonnenuntergang; sie ist doppelt so dick. Sterne werden verdeckt, wenn wir durch diese Dunstschicht fliegen. Ich habe 
They'll get quenc
Не могли бы вы запустить программу PRELAUNCH на своем компьют
, come sta
在我看
Roger, Apollo 8. We copied th
收到。地面所有系统运行正常。除非还有其他情
Okay. La telecamera ha os
रॉजर, मैंने आपकी बात स
罗杰。哥伦比亚号飞船上的各位居民或许会感兴趣，今天是哥伦比亚的独立日。菲律宾的格洛丽亚·迪亚兹昨晚荣膺环球小姐桂冠。她击败了其他60位佳丽，摘得全球选美桂冠。迪亚兹小姐今年18岁，黑发黑眸，三围是34.5-23-34.5。亚军是澳大利亚小姐，以色列小姐和日本小姐分列第三和第四。周二晚上你们返回地球的时候，美国联盟和国家联盟的全明星队将在华盛顿进行比赛。预计洋基队的梅尔·斯托特尔迈尔将担任美国联盟的首
Roger. Nous serons ravis de vous voir sur le port
यार, ये तो पेट्रोल की बर्बादी है। जैसे ही मैं यहाँ पहुँचूँगा, इसे चालू कर दूँग
頑張ってください。もうすぐ終わりますよ
Waouh, cette charge sur notre vai
Аполлон-1
好的。看来可能无法破解正常的语音提示。低温储罐出现了相当严重的分层现象，尤其是在氧气层，您会在风扇循环期间注意到这一点，所以我们要确保，
वाह! अच्छा
자, 휴스턴, 시작해 보세
هل يبدو
これからはすべて
لا، ليس كذل
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في جهاز المحاكاة، إن لم يكن بنفس السهولة. لذا أكملنا المهمة حتى النهاية. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون، كنت قد قررت أننا لن نتمكن من الوصول، لكنني فكرت في الاستمرار قليلًا. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون - أو قبل مغادرتنا لها بقليل - كان واضحًا لي أننا لن نتمكن من تخفيض الضغط. طلبتُ الانتقال إلى المدار التالي. ثم... استعدنا أنفاسنا لمدة 20 دقيقة تقريبًا وحاولنا ترتيب الخردة المتناثرة في قمرة القيادة. ثم أخرجتُ قائمة التحقق، وراجعناها بتفصيلٍ دقيق للتأكد من عدم إغفال أي شيء في عجلة من أمرنا. بدأنا عملية السير خارج المركبة، وحصلنا على إشارة البدء فوق كارنارفون. كنا على أتم الاستعداد، وكنا ننتظر إشارة البدء لبدء عملية تخفيف الضغط. وقد حصلنا عليها. أكملنا دورة تخفيف الضغط. عند مغادرتنا كارنارفون، حصلنا على تصريح السير الكامل خارج المركبة. وصلنا إلى كانتون أو هاواي، وفي ذلك الوقت، أعتقد أن كانتون أو هاواي هي التي أعطتنا إشارة البدء للخروج من المركبة الفضائية وبدء مناورات السير خارج المركبة. أنجزنا ذلك كما هو موضح في مسجل الصوت الذي سجلناه مسبقًا، وكذلك في موقع جهاز الاتصال الصوتي. انطلقنا، وخرج إد، وبدأنا بالتقاط الصور كما نفعل عادةً... في البداية، ثبتُّ المركبة الفضائية له. ثم عندما خرج، وبدا وكأنه يطفو بطري
쌍둥이자리 4호, 하와이 외
Хорошо. Понял. Это для версии 57. Последовательность № 16, по Гринвичу 8 часов 11 минут. Рыскание 12°, тангаж 
En général
You know that light on the command 
Ja, d
Was wir suchen, Charlie, ist die Zeit, die bis T2 gezählt wird und 60 Minuten beträgt – oder T3, die bis T3 
حسنًا. لقد أغل
好的，阿波罗8号。看来你们现在可以关闭低温风扇了，我们会暂时离开，让你们处理一下后续工作。我们船上还有一些其他项目，比如你们列出的高增益天线检查和通信模式检查，我们会推迟到你们准备好的时候再进行。所以，一切都取决于你们的方便。在使用宽带天线进行高增益测试时，我们在36kHz频率下仍然获得了非常好的数据，这比你们之前预测的电路裕量略高一
네, 짐. 문제를 해결했고, 처음 알려드린 대로 정확합니다. R1 
好的。我觉得建议的插
S'il y avait u
Cet interrupteur
Wir schalten die Sprachunterstützung unserer Uplink-Verbindung zu Ihnen ab, um Sie während des Gesprächs mit Tranquility Base nicht zu stören. Falls Sie uns brauchen, rufen Sie uns einfach 
Okay, Apollo 8. I'd like to run one more null bias and looks like we 
J'arrive, Roger. Roger. Roge
Roger. 37,1 cubes. S
Houston, Apo
2
Верно. Единственное, что еще приходит мне в голову, когда я смотрю на это через призму, это то, что, похоже, источник излучения нахо
А, Джо, Джек только что передал мне данные о температуре форсунок, если хочешь, можешь п
Okay. Kartenaktualisierung für den 6. Mai, Sonnenaufgang, Nullmeridian, Sonnenuntergang; -1,
嘿，吉姆，请你再按一下你的外部
إيجابي. MSC-2 و-3. طرف صغير للأمام 49. النهاية عند 00:15. مراجعة 5
分かりました。その部分は大丈夫です、ジャック。司令船には11～12段階の手
Au-dessus d'Hawaï, nous avions une ligne de visée directe lorsque vous nous
روجر. جهد س
네. 시작 시간은 18시 13분입니다. 자, 그럼 오늘 20초 동안 계속 내려가 보겠습니다. 그
Sì. Sappiamo che non ce n'è più nel serbatoio dell'acqua potabile, ma abbiamo capito che hai messo un po' d'acq
13号，休斯顿。你现在状态不好，但思路清晰；可能很快就会好转。我们正等着看你
ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म के लिए लाइट वैल्यू रीडिंग ASA ​​64 के लिए 13 है। लाइट वैल्यू 13 सेट कर रहा हूँ। फ़िल्टर के साथ सातवीं तस्वीर ले रहा हूँ। दक्षिण अमेरिका महाद्वीप में मौसम की वजह से फ़ोटो खींचना मुश्किल है। इस समय मैं एक पैनोरमा फ़ोटो खींचूँगा। लगभग 8 घंटे बाद शुरू कर रहा हूँ। दरअसल, ऐसा ही होगा। MARKT, 7, 8, 9 ब्लैक फ़ोटो, ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म। दस फ़ोटो, ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म। ये शॉट 250 × 5.6 (1/250 सेकंड और f5.6) पर अनंत कोण पर लिए जा रहे हैं। 11वीं तस्वीर ले रहा हूँ, बाईं ओर देख रहा हूँ। इस समय मैं दक्षिण अमेरिकी महाद्वीप के पास पहुँच रहा हूँ। मुझे एक बड़ी नदी दिखाई दे रही है। तस्वीर खींच रहा हूँ, कैमरा जितना हो सके नीचे की ओर करके। मुझे लगता है कि मैंने कैप्सूल की ख
एड, अगर तुम और ज्यादा खाओगे तो कुछ और कर ही नहीं पाओगे। क्या यह स
了解。ジャイロをケ
네, 짐. 지휘 모듈 전원 공급 시작 후 약 9분이 지났는데, 잭을 위해 한 가지 알려드리고 싶은 점이 있습니다. 배터리 상태는 매우 양호해 보이지만, 혹시라도 배터리가 차가워서 초기에 부하를 연결하는 데 어려움을 겪을 수 있으니, 전원 공급 과정 동안 메인 버스 전압이 24볼트 
이건 프렌드십 세븐이에요. 제가 수동으로 제어할 수 있어요. 필요하면 수동으로 백업하고 다시 제어권을 가져올게
我说低温风扇已关
네,
Okay. That's mainly for J
The target right on the pitch 
.
Хор
Nun, w
E la signora Robert Goddard ha detto oggi che suo marito sarebbe stato felicissimo. "Non avrebbe urlato né niente. Sarebbe semplicemente stato raggiante." Ha aggiunto: "Quello era il suo sogno, mandare un razzo sulla Luna." Le persone in tutto il mondo avevano molti motivi per essere felici della missione Apollo 11. La polizia italiana ha riferito che domenica sera è stata la notte più libera dalla criminalità dell'anno. E a Londra, un ragazzo che ha avuto la fede di scommettere 5 dollari con un allibratore che u
और मैं जो बात बताना चाहता था, मुझे नहीं पता कि यह स्पष्ट है या नहीं, लेकिन... बर्न से ठीक पहले सभी डंप करने का फायदा दिखाने के लिए, हम क्वाड 1 पर चंद्रमा के उसी दृश्य को फिर से देख रहे हैं। और अब आपको बाहर वे सभी चमकीले जमे हुए कण दिखाई नही
I am in.I have completed yaw checks with the window, I am going to try some yaw 
正如我们预想的那样，行动似乎没有任何困难。甚至可能比我们在地面上进行的各种模拟中六分之一重力加速度下的模拟还要容易。实际上，四处走动完全没问题。
Apollo 11, this is Houston. When you stop at 0 roll, you will be in approximately 90 pitch, 0 yaw, and 0 roll. We'd like you to run the first, that is, the option 3, from that attitude. Then we'll uplink 
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यू
- - N slash A dans le, et vous m'avez donné des angles GDA 
Das ist ein guter Gedanke. Lass uns das mal ein bisschen weiter disk
En réalité, ce nombre n'existe pas. J'ai simplement prolongé la ligne au-delà de zéro, ce qui, pour un taux négatif, correspond à sa valeur
Если я 
रॉजर। पृथक्करण बर्न के लिए GET,
Roger, technicien en télécommunications de
Okay. Löschen Sie „AUTO SELECT, 16, OFF“. Ändern Sie „CB LOGIC POWER“ in „LOGIC THRUST POWER - CBS CS LOGIC THRUST, four, to closed“. Löschen Sie „DELTA-V CG“. Weiter unten steht „SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER, one, AC 1; POWER, 1, to ON“. Stel
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston CAP COM. Bitte stellen S
Ecco gli angoli del 
ठीक है, चलिए इन्हें करते 
ジンバルについてはOKです、フレッド。14ページには他に何も記載がありません。15ページに進み、「CHECKOUT」の文言を削除し、「以下のスイッチを確認してください：GUIDANCE CONTROL、」とします。ステップ3、訂正です。3行目の「ATTITUDE CONTROL (3)」を「MODE
अरे, देखो तो सही, आराम करने वाला डिब्बा एक
了解。操縦モードは手動、ジャイロは正常、操縦スイッチはオフ。燃料は45
Роджер. Понятно. Не могли бы вы подтвердить, что используете вторичн
Ok. Il buono ci dà un perigeo 
Roger. Endlich habe ich die ganze Welt vor dem Fenster, und durch das Monokular zu schauen, ist wirklich 
Базз, я поставил сюда 39,5 вольт; это напоминание о проверке батареи — на стене всё хорошо. Хорошо, Нил, теперь TLI — я напишу здесь н
ちょっと待って。そもそも、なぜ今ミッシ
हमने इसे उड़ान के दौरान पहले भी चलाया था। क्या उन्होंने तब इसकी जाँच क
Roger. Understand the general impression of being moist as it pa
Roger, Aurora Seven. Ora state per iniziare la 
这
알겠습니다. 그런 일이 일어날 수도 있다고 했는데, 그 말이 맞
حسنًا يا جيم. نود أن نقترح عليك موعدًا. يمكننا إيجاد طريقة للعودة مجانًا في أي وقت تريده، لذا إذا حددت لن
了解、オーロラセブン。0.8を通
どうぞ、Canary 
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Как чи
さて、質問 2 の回答ですが、もち
На самом деле, всё идёт не очень хорошо, потому что, к сожалению, у нас нет возможности выключить радио. Поэтому, когда мы разговариваем вот так, Эд слышит нас с тобой; хотя громкость у него на меньшую величину, я уверен, что он нас сейчас слышит. И там ужас
Le finestre di rendezvous sono buone. Le altre sono tutte più o meno uguali a quelle dell'ultima volta che abbiamo riferito
오디세이, 휴스턴. 방금 JETT에 대한 공식 승인(GO)을 받았습니다. 편하신 시간에 방문해 
11, Хьюстон. Посл
حسنًا. لدينا بعض الفوط الصحية لن
체크리스트 작성에 도움이 필
좋아요.
아니요. 거기에 다시 놓을 생각은 전혀 없
نعم. كان جيد
罗杰。电池电压：主电池 24V，一号电池 25V，二号电池 25V，三号电池 25V。备
«Аполлон-13», Хьюстон. Примерно через минут
Little bumpy along about h
Roger. Merci, et c'est très bien centré. On obtient une très légère amélioration, mais da
No, I'm going to use in on LOW for rate for the OAMS re
好了，我把它放上去；
11, Houston. We observe the to be fairly well established here, and we'll keep you posted on how it's going, and your frien
C
Mike, this i
你好，C
穹顶体育场的租赁争议仍在继续。另外，今天早上《纪事报》上有一篇
ठीक है। जिम, बस कुछ ही मिनट बचे हैं। सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है। कार्नार्वोन में आपका समय ठीक रहेगा, औ
Ci lavo
روجر، برج الجوزاء 4. 
١١، هذه هيوستن. بقي لدينا حوالي ٦ دقائق، ولكي نتمكن من ضبط خطوطنا الأرضية، نود أن نعرف ما 
好的，对比阿波罗13号和阿波罗8号的飞行，起飞时的震动程度和阿波罗8号差不多
罗杰。好的，那我继续这个机动，滚转角82度，俯仰角
حسنًا يا كين، أعتقد أنها جيدة جدًا
Роджер. Луна очень я
罗杰。难得有机会能看到整个世界，用单筒望远镜观察，真是令人叹为观止。我真希望自己能准确地描述出来。天气非常好。南美洲渐渐映入眼帘。在地平线上方，我能看到一个点，大概就是华盛顿州的西雅图附近，从那里，我可以一直看到火地岛南
位置について。待機して
B
네. 또 하나, 입대 전에 살펴볼 부분이 있는데, 바로 일반적인 입대 시험 패턴입니다. 현재 체크리스트에 약 1시간 정도 소요되
Сейчас я начинаю видеть восход солнца в перископе. Первый свет в перископе за этот конкретный виток благодаря ночной стороне. Очевидно, что перископ совершенно бесполезен в ретроградном движении на ночной стороне. Первы
D'accord. AUTO, que des zér
Sounds like you've got you
알겠습니다. Enter 키를 누르고, 23 Enter 키를 누릅니다. 그러면 레지스터 1에 공 4개(2), 레지스터 2에 모든 공, 레지
Yes. And it looks like we're just about to get the Sun coming into the lens, so we'll have to move the came
You're probably interested in the comments your wives have made. Neil, Jan had said about yesterday's activities, "The evening was unbelievably perfect. It is an honor and a privilege to share with my 
请告
休斯顿，哥伦比亚。我即将迎来第一次飞越的时间，届时我或许能看到登月舱。您能否提供一些地形线索，帮助我确定登月舱的位置？目前自动
フランク、医者によるとビルはまだ何も分かっていないらしい。どう
Treibstoff vorhanden (2,5 g), Kabinenkapazität (5,5 g), Sauerstoffversorgung vorhanden, Haupt
Это пр
ケープ。最初の軌道の実
Here's the water gun. This cylindrical thing on the end of it is a filter with several membranes: one allow
D'accord. Parfait, Frank. L'autre chose, c'est que les gars de l'arrière aimeraient bien, quand tout le monde est réveillé, que tu mettes en marche les deux ventilateurs de cabine pendant environ 5 minutes. Ils aimeraient voir la température DELTA sur la télémétrie une fois la stagnation de l'air dissipée et le flux d'air rétabli. Si tu as la possib
D'accord, Jerry. On a terminé le PROGR
Джим,
حسن
Jack, tu es inaudible. On a
짐, 침실
Хорошо. Сейчас я нахожусь в автомати
了解。急ぎで申し訳ないのですが、こちらで何か不具合が発生してしまい、急いであなたに焼き
Essayons cette antenne stu
Okay. Jetzt müssen wir den Gürtel hier richtig straff spa
로저, 제미니 6호입니다. 녹음기를 발로 차 주세요. 테이프가 허용 범위를 벗어난 것 같아서 발로 차면 제대로 작
好的。输入：太平洋中部区域，357 152 359 268，加上 0813，减去
روجر. فهمت. مجلة M كما في م
双子座4号，双子座4号，这里是休斯顿首都通讯中心。
맞습니다. 이전 형식과의 유일한 차이점은 400,000의 RET 대신 롤 시작 시 0.05g의 RET를 지
हमें लगता है कि यह 45 मी
Okay. I am going to give you a 
로저. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 더 정확한 조종을 위해 플라이 바이 와이어 시스템으로 전환했습니다. 과이마스에 도착했을 때부터 이런 현상이 나타나기 시작했는데, 기체가 요(yaw) 방향으로 초당 약 1도씩 오른쪽으로 기울어지는 것 같습니다. 약 20도까지 기울어진 후 그 각도를 유지하다가, 20도 지점에 도달하면 자세 유지 모
Роджер, Чарли. Хочу проинформировать вас о текущем состоянии хлорирования. В
D'accor
D'accord. Ce sont des résultats préliminaires, mais ils vous donneront une indication. L'altitude corrigée
Buzz, qui Houston. Hai circa 3 minuti prima di dover iniziar
À Reno, au Nevada, faute de cheminée, un petit garçon a écrit au Père Noël par l'intermédiaire du journal local, lui suggérant d'utiliser la porte d'entrée. Il faudra peut-être donner un petit coup de pied en bas, car elle coince. À Little Rock, en Arkansas, les bébés nés à l'hôpital St. Vincent pendant la semaine précédant Noël et jusqu'au jour de Noël sont remis à leurs mères, à leur sortie, dans d'immenses chaussettes de Noël rouges. Voici un exemple de coopération œcuménique. À Indio, en Californie, le chef de la police a reçu un livre de prières le jour de Noël. Le rabbin Phillip H. Weinburg a pris la relève pour une journée afin que le véritable chef de police, Homer Hunt, un mé
Хорошо. Основной заголовок: «Вход, подготовка лунного модуля, минус 6 часов». Во-первых, BAT 5 NORMAL FEED, ON; во-вторых, используйте модифицированный /, контрольный список актив
Apollo 11, Houston. Empfehlenswert ist die Antenne Bravo oder zumindest eine bessere. E
네. 알겠습니다. 이 
Houston, Aquarius. Ich kann im Moment nicht..
I believe so. I haven't heard anything fairly lately, and it'
यह तो नकारात्मक है। मुझे डर है कि मैं सफल नहीं हो पाऊंगा, गोर्डो, जब तक कि मैं उनके रवैये को 
حسن
Roger. Ottimo spettacolo sul radar. Mi dispiace molto che il nostro amico Julian non sia potuto essere con noi. Vorrei darti il ​​mio ra
Hawaii Cap Com, Hawaii Cap Com. Sigm
वहाँ पर अभी 60 बचे हैं। इतनी ऊंचाई पर उड़ान भरना मुश्किल ह
En
收到。收到，还有，把戒指装到
ठीक है, दृष्टि क
这是友谊七号。自动反推装置已关闭。模式选择器正常，速率指令和陀螺仪均正常。除手动控制外，所有“T”型手柄均已按下，手动控制手柄也已按下。我目前正在手动控制。着陆袋开关已关闭。除此以外，序列面板一切正常。控制燃料为60-82%。目前手动控制下的姿态为：右滚转5度，右偏航15度，俯仰角-34度，处于轨道姿态。从发射到现在的时间是2+33+60，注意！更正一
C'est exact. On va l'allumer dans 2 minutes, je
ロジャー、ヒューストンからカーナボン経由。アポロ11号。はっきりと聞こ
收到。明
알겠습니다. 마이크에게 잠시 시간이 있다면, 간단한 문제 해결을 위해 몇 가지 질문을 드리고 싶습니다. 마이크가 가슴이 평평하거나 다른 문제가 있는 것 같은데, BIOMED 원격 측정 장치에서 호흡률 데이터가 
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. مايك، لا داعي للانتظار. حيثما تكون الأسعار ثابتة، يمكنك المتابعة. انت
Okay. Sie haben die Bestätigung erhalten. Dies ist der aktualisierte Landeplatz RESFMMAT. Wir sind weiterhin der Ansicht, dass ke
حسنًا يا جو. بخصوص الأخبار، يرغب جيم في تأجيل ذلك قليلًا، وأريد أن أطلب من منظمة الأغذية والزراعة، إذا كان بإمكان
BANDE MO
11, avete un pubblico piuttosto numeroso. È in diretta negli Stati U
आवाज़ साफ़ आ र
حسنًا. إذا سمعتُ
La température en cabine n'est que de 55 degrés. Les combinaisons so
了解しました。それでは割合をお伝えします。アルファ82、ブラボー84、ココア85、デルタ87。
Très bien. La prochaine fois, nous examinerons attentivement tous les paramètres; nous vous fournirons toutes les informations nécessaires. Nous utilise
Roger
13, Houston. schlägt vor, dass Sie AVERAGE ausprobieren, wenn Sie sich in der PEAK-Phase bef
ジンボ、私はあなたの視点にいます
في مكان أقرب قليلاً هنا، في ممفيس، تينيسي، أطلق والدا فتاة صغيرة، السيد والسيدة إيدي لي ماكجي، عليها اسم "موديل" (وحدة). وقالت السيدة ماكجي: "لم تكن فكرتي، بل كانت فكرة زوجي". وأضافت أنها ترددت في البداية بشأن اسم "لونار موديول ماكجي" (وحدة قمرية ماكجي)، لأن
좋아요. 저희의 수산화리튬 자가 교체 작업이 완료되었습니다. 조, 달라진 점은 이 판지에 만든 아치가 빨간색 호스의 입구를 아래로 향하게 놓을 만큼 크지 않아서 입구가 옆으로 눕혀져 있다는 것뿐이지만, 그래도 작동은 잘 
La bande d'étoiles claires semble – les étoiles juste autour de la Croix du
D'accord, Bill. Je crois que je veux revenir sur mon dernier point concernant l'utilisation du vecteur d'état em
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कि उत्तरी
Roger. Co
Roger, Friendship Seven. Wir haben Ihr
收到，七号，我们一切就绪。看来你状态
Vous savez, une chose que vous pouvez transmettre au bureau du programme – quelque chose
Роджер. Имейте в виду, что сейчас я встречаюсь с Антаресом и Нунки, и
В 
Houston, what do yo
Думаю
Houston und di
إيجل وكول
रॉजर। अरे जिम, जब तुम जाग रहे हो और सब कुछ शांत है, तो मैं तुम्हें कुछ और बातें सोचने के लिए देता हूँ। एक बात खास तौर पर। मुझे पता है कि तुममें से कोई भी ठीक से सो नहीं पा रहा है क्योंकि इतनी ठंड है, और तुम शाय
了解
Okay. Now I'm going to
Roger. Bitte 
Très bien, Jac
Солнце отражается от конструкции. С прикрепленным телескопом он практически бесполезен. Думаю, предоставленные MPAD звездные карты были бы наибо
Apollo 8, Houston. Questa dovrebbe essere un'OPZIONE 1 come
Charlie, bei der Üb
B1 lässt sich mit der Hülle nicht hacken, Cha
Bien. Aujourd'hui, nous vous demandons de déterminer le biais 
마이크, 아주 좋아 보이네요. 신호 강
인도양 선박 회사 소속 오로라 세븐호입니다. 혈압이 상당히 높으시네요. 가능하면 인도양 선박에서 혈압을 측정해 주셔
OK, PDI pad: 102:33:04.36; 09:50; moins 0002.1; 182, 287, 000; plus 56919. PDI inférieur à 10: 105:12:30.00. PDI abort supérieur à 10: 103:40:00.00, 107:11:30.00. Pas de PDI plus 12 abort: 102:44:37.00; plus 0122.3, moins tous les zéros, plus 0188.9; 0152.0, plus 0011.0, 02
Okay. Ich habe das verstan
اسألهم عن كمية الوقود التي استهلكناها، هل ست
روجر. أو يمكنني استخدام نظام AUTO OPTICS بدون أي علامات مم
Exactement, CAP COM, c'est très facile de manœuvrer avec le canon. Mon seul problème, c'est que je n'ai plus assez de carburant. Je suis à court de carburant maintenant et j'ai réussi à contourner l'avant du vaisseau, puis l'arrière, et à me hisser jusqu'au sommet de l'adaptateur. Je suis presque… réapparu dans le champ de vision de Jim. J'aimerais tellement en avoir plus. C'est une expérience incroyable… c'est tout simplement extraordinaire! Là, je suis la tête en bas, je regarde vers le bas et on dirait qu'on approche des côtes californiennes. Je fais une lente rotation vers la droite. Je ne suis
아니요. 아폴로 2호, 17시 19분. 항로에서 북쪽으로 16마일 떨어진 지점. 당시에는
Понял, Фредо. У нас осталась ещё одна процедура, и мы можем её завершить, а именно — подготовить иглы для этого манёвра. Этот 5018 может привести к блокировке карданного подвеса, и мы считаем, что было бы неплохо включить питание командирско
好的，你有时间进行燃烧；名词 81 加 0.1，加 1.2，加
Fred, that may be a funny in the data. The rate's gone back to normal; and we'll keep an eye o
Den Nervenkitzel, den wir hier oben haben, könnt ihr dort unten nich
11, Houston. Ora la mappa stellare è molto più chiara. Possiamo distinguere il pia
जेमिन
我想我们可能得重新调整一下。是的，杰克，
هذا صحيح. يقوم فريقنا هنا بتقييم الوض
ジェミニ VI、ハワイ C
Neil, qui è Houston. Ti ho sentito forte e chi
Je n'en ai pas la moindre idée
हमारे सामने यहाँ एक बड़ी हाउसकीपिंग समस्या है, क्योंकि जहाज पर इतना सारा उपकरण मौजूद है जिसे हम हटाने की उ
用肉眼还能清楚地看到吗？还是必须透过玻璃才能
... 長
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿
Ich glaube, das ist etwas knapp bemessen; das sind etwa 0,25 
Right over Gulf, huh? 
Bene. Per il Pacifico centrale, le condizioni generali sono buone. Ci si possono aspettare basi nuvolose sparse di 2000 piedi, visibilità 10 miglia, vento 070 a 12, altezza delle onde 4 piedi, altimetro 2974. Alba 10 Zulu e prima luce 16:49 Zulu. La nave sarà Y
सभी खिड़कियाँ साफ़ हैं। और सूट सर्किट 42 - 43 है। और मुझे एसेंट प्रेशर लाइट, एक वीएफ लाइट और एक लाइट मि
하와이 상공에서 저희는 귀하께서 스위치 위치를 알려주실 당시 가시선(LOS)을 확보하고 있었습니다. 귀하께서 명령 041 RECORDER ON을 보내신 부분까지 수신했고, 그 시점에 우주선이 이륙하기 시작했습니다. 그 이후 상황을 계속 설명해 주시겠습니까? 특히, 탑재
Positiv. Anscheinend werden alle Sonnenaufgänge auf Toms Seite sein, aber daran lässt sich nichts änder
15 Minuten Vorbereitungszeit. Zur Erinnerung: Han
और जैसे-जैसे चं
في الوقت الح
另外，我还要祝贺美国创造了
インテルサットは63カ国からな
Neil und Buzz, hier ist Houston. Wir möchten euch, Buzz, daran erinnern, die Zeitschrift für Nahaufnahmekameras durchzulesen, bev
了解。レーダーの位置を調整する必要があるようです。TIG-45分から始める
Energieversorgung für ATTITUDE, Steuerung verstauen, Lageimpuls, Computer für WI
34分钟后返回主扫描仪。预热时间约30秒。我们再等2分钟，以确保成
सूर्यास्त का नज़ारा काफ़ी मनमोहक है, मुझे नहीं लगता कि मुझे इसे देखने में ज़्यादा समय बर्बाद करने की ज़रूरत है। यह बहुत दिलचस्प है। दूसरी बात, यह देखना भी दिलचस्प है कि जब आँखें इसके अनुकूल नहीं होतीं तो यह कितना काला दिखता है। मुझे खिड़की पर कुछ परत साफ़ दिखाई दे रही है। इस समय मैं UHF-hi में VOX पर वापस जा रहा हूँ ताकि ट्रांसमिट कर सकूँ। दाहिने माइक्रोफ़ोन को पोंछने के लिए विज़र खोल रहा हूँ। मैंने इसे चाट लिया था। विज़र बंद कर रहा हूँ। सूट सर्किट को काम करने के लिए विज़र को तुरंत सील कर दिया गया। मैं इसे दोबारा गंदा नहीं करना चाहता। सूट का इनलेट लगभग 68 डिग्री पर बहुत अच्छे से स्थिर है। इसलिए डोम को फिर से ऊपर उठाना पड़ेगा। यह अभी 76, 75 पर है। ज़ाहिर है, यही ऊँची सेटिंग हमें चाहिए। मुझे लगता है कि मैं अब इसमें आधा अंक और बढ़ा दूँगा और शायद हम इसे लॉक कर पाएँगे। यह आख़िरकार थोड़ा ठंडा हो रहा है, इसलिए मुझे पता है कि मुझे सेटिंग कहाँ रखनी है। मैंने सूट और कंट्रोल लीवर के लिए कूलेंट की मात्रा 8.5 पर सेट कर दी है। इस समय डोम का तापमान 75 डिग्री है। सूट का इनलेट 68 डिग्री है। बहुत अच्छा लग रहा है। मुझे ठंडी हवा अपने चेहरे पर महसूस हो रही है। ऑक्सीजन का स्तर भी ठीक है, 60 और 75 psi (सैकड़ों में)। मैं 250 इन्वर्टर पर नज़र रख रहा हूँ। यह 140 डिग्री के करीब पहुँच रहा है, और 150 का तापमान लगभग 100 डिग्री तक गिर गया है। स्टैंडबाय मोड में तापमान लगभग 100 डिग्री है, जो केबिन का तापमान है। तीसरा, 250 - वह थोड़ा परेशान है, और मैं उस पर नज़र रखूँगा। केबिन हीट एक्सचेंजर का तापमान 40 डिग्री पर स्थिर हो रहा है, और इसने मुझे परेशान कर दिया है क्योंकि मुझे फ्रैंक सैमोंस्की को 50 सेंट देने ह
حسن
此时宇航
Нет. Кажется, я их здесь, на этой стороне, не вижу. Я видел нес
Wir werden unsere Triebwerke zünden, sobald wir auf AUTO schalten, da die Triebwerke über die Triebwerksschutzschalter verfügen. Sollen wir das tun und dann stop
I don't want to just go blasting around the sky and get high rates, because I don't have anything to null the rates on until 
Bon, maintenant, il y a un point que je n'ai pas compris. Vous avez dit d'aller sur MDC 5 et A - AC INVERTER, AC BUS 1, 
네, 밴스 
रॉजर। मैं अभी रिकॉर्डर पर कुछ रिकॉर्ड कर रहा था। मुझे बस एक ही असामान्य चीज़ नज़र आई है, वो है क्षितिज से लगभग 7 या 8 डिग्री ऊपर रात के समय एक धुंधली सी परत। तारे क्षितिज की ओर नीचे जाते हुए मुझे इसके आर-पार दिखाई दे रहे हैं, लेकिन यह एक स्पष्ट पट्टी या परत है जो सामान्य क्षितिज 
好的。接下来的1、2、3、4、5、6、7、8都一样，
Роджер. Довольно долгое время мы работали на вторичном ск
D'accord, Houston; 13. En répons
Okay. Sound
Zwillinge 4, hier
안녕하세요, 13번님. 여기는 휴스턴
The ol
음,... 한번 시
Va bene, Fred, e 
Charlie, we just STABED to 261 degrees roll, and it looks like whoever figured i
Ricevuto. E vi mostriamo la quota a più di 1 minuto dal terminatore in questo mome
알겠습니다. 패널 3: AC 인버터 
Je
Vediamo. A Springfield, Missouri, Mickey Owen, il ricevitore storico dei Brooklyn Dodgers che è entrato nel libro dei record segnando un terzo strike che ha portato i New York Yankees alla vittoria sui Dodgers nelle World Series del '41, ha deciso che sarebbe stato ricordato per qualcosa di più del suo record sportivo. Quarantacinque ragazzi e ragazze hanno ricevuto i pony da lui offerti. A questi ragazzi è stato chiesto di inviargli delle lettere in cui spiegavano come si sarebbero presi cura di un pony. Quando le lettere sono arrivate a fiumi, ha aggiunto cinque pony ai 20 già offerti; e altri donatori ne hanno aggiunti altri 20. E Mickey Owen ha detto: "Pensavo di ricevere circa 45 lettere, ma alla fine ne ho avute circa 900". Ora, nella pagina principale: Wellington, Nuova Zelanda, circa cinquanta uomini si sono seduti oggi al Polo Sud per gustare il tradizionale t
저기 일렬로 늘어선 분화구들을 보세요. 보이시죠? 바
No, I think when the sun gets on them, it'll -... them. Yes, the one on your side i
자, 제가 제대로 이해했는지 확인해 보겠습니다. 2단계는 "밸런스 커플 끄기; 데드 밴드 최소; 자세 제어: 피치와 요는 펄스로 설정; 요는 직
Roger. Reduzieren Sie die Stromstärke, bis Si
Базз, вид через твоё — справа — левое плечо настолько хорош, что мы можем разглядеть крышку двигателя, липучку на ней, 
تفضل يا جو
로저, 11시. 가까운 시일 내에 편하신 시간에 폐수 배출을 진행하고자 합니다. 특정 시간은 정해져 있지 않습니다. 중간 항로 수정 3(약 53시 55분) 시점에 하강 기류를 사용하여 중간 항로 수정 3과 관련된 모든 항목을 삭제합니다. 참고로, 중간 항로 수정 3의 연소 값은 초당 0.8피트, 즉 0.8피트였습니다. 이를 취소하고 중간 항로 수정 4를 진행하기로 결정하면 중간 항로 수정 4의 연소 값은 초당 2.0피트가 됩니다. 53시 방향에 재정렬이 있습니다. 이 작업을 진행하는 동안 자리를 비우지 마시고, 하루 종일 계속 
了解、CSQ…衛星は太陽の近くにありました。私の小さな端がゆっくりとこちら
Ich bezweifle, dass es in B1 auf den Helm passt. Das andere vielleicht – es könnte in die Schlafhalterung passen. Wir haben sie in unseren Helmtaschen, und ich denke, wir werden die Helme in den Helmtaschen und die LEVVA-Geräte
Ja, Joe, es sinkt. Ich habe jetzt ungefähr 45 Grad und es sinkt 
ठीक है, जैक। हम नहीं चाहते कि आप उन आखिरी दो को बंद करें। वे आपकी मूल कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में बदलाव हैं, और हम 
Ho appena fatto un tentativo sul bersaglio 16-A. L'aeroporto di Bassora, si trova proprio sul Golfo Persico. L'ho individuato... ho individuato il Golfo Persico a circa... un angolo di circa 30°... Ho picchiato e poi ho individuato il lago... a nord-ovest del Golfo Persico. Ba
好的。就颜色而言，水体都呈现出一种皇家蓝；云朵当然是亮白色；地球的反射——看起来比月亮的反射要强烈得多。陆地通常呈棕褐
Immagino che l'unica cosa che 
जैक, मेरा अब भी एक सवाल है। मुझे अब भी लगता है - मैं 
Roge
Ciao, Jack. Ti spiegheremo la procedura di ripristino
罗杰。我们这里有两个齿轮，拉动把手来回转动时它们会跟着转。其中一个齿轮有点像棘轮，它是个带活塞的小圆筒，后面有个尖头，用来啮合棘轮。在打开舱门之前，我们遇到了一些麻烦，打开之后，这个棘轮也很难运转。而且，我们费了好大劲才把舱门关到足够近的位置，以便开始锁上。然后，埃德不得不每次都用手按压棘轮，直到我们把它启
Roger. Nous avons ici, au sol, une indication que l'ordinateur est en mode de pré-lancement. Nous avons également une indication de 
بدت جميع الإجراءات ناجحة للغاية. الأمر الوحيد الغريب بعض الشيء هو وجود نشاط زائد في الدوافع. كنت
Если вы наведете его на скорость вращения 3 фута в секунду, и отклонитесь на 10 градусов от платформы, нам будет трудно это увидеть, учитывая особенности рабо
ठीक है।
알겠습니다. 복사를 시작하기 전에, 이 절차는 기본적으로 초임계 헬륨 압력 측정 장치를 작동시켜 압력을 읽을 수 있도록 하는 것입니다. 여기서 우려되는 점은 초임계 헬륨 압력이 103시간 이내에 1800psi에 도달하지 않는 것입니다. 만약 압력이 1800psi에 도달하면, 파열판을 작동시킬 때 파열될 가능성이 있습니다. 발사 당시의 압력과, 발사 시점부터 현재까지 시간당 약 6.5psi의 압력 상승률을 고려하면, 압력은 약 710psi가 되어야 합니다. 
待機していてください。100秒間ヌルバイアスをかけます。AUTOMA
알겠습니다. 6단계 맨 아래쪽, 정확히는 6단계 맨 
よく聞こえます。脈拍64、呼吸24。すべ
Neil, qui è Houston. Il campo visivo è a posto. Vorremmo che puntassi un po' più a des
Gonna SEP... tor
And, 13, Houston. If Jack is up, I'd like to talk to him
我
Roger. Ich hab's di
D'accord, Buzz. Concernant votre plan de vol, quelques mises à jour tout d'abord. Nous avons annulé la manœuvre de mi-parcours numéro 6. Restez simplement en vol. Je vous accorde un peu plus de temps ce matin. Deuxième point du plan de vol: nous sommes prêts pour une recharge de la batterie B à tout moment. Troisième point: nous souhaiterions effectuer le déversement des eaux usées différemment cette fois-ci. Nous aimeri
ヒューストン、アポロ11号です。夕方のニュースの要
C'est confirmé. Avant de parler des coussins de poussée, une autre remarque. Les indications générales que nous vous avons données précédemment concernant la présence du Soleil dans le viseur du commandant et des étoiles, qui pouvaient servir d'indication générale pour l'assiette lors de la manœ
Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Вы меня с
TM сейчас распадает
È tutto molto silenzioso. Siamo qui seduti ad aspetta
아폴로 8호, 
では、設定に戻りましょう。そろそろ始めます。彼
双子星4号，这里是休斯顿。我们想了解D-9阶段的进展情况
찰리, 미안해. 자꾸 끊기잖아. "넌 뭐든지 할 수 있어"라는 말까지는 들렸는데 그 이후로는 아무 소리도 안 들렸어. 어쨌든 우린 그럴 수 없으니까 그건 잘못된 거라고 생각했지. 그럼 우리가 어
わかりました。(-) 30
Jack, je me suis tellement habitué à cette posture de vol avec le... que j
حسنًا. روجر، كولومبيا. T1 104 32 24، 104 37 33، على بعد ميلين جنوبًا. وق
हम पर्याप्त मात्रा में नियंत्रण विशेषताएँ चाहते हैं /कमांड मॉड्यूल की, और क्य
Okay. I think I'll go back 
A1隔间，16毫米弹匣将放置在4号窗口，而不是5号窗口。纸巾盒只剩一个了。U3隔间，16毫米弹匣支架在4号窗口，袋子——加上CMP弹匣，再加两个LCG弹匣。A8隔间，移除两个LCG弹匣，加一个PPK手枪，总共四个，再加10磅杂项装备。我们前几天说的是五个，现在觉得十磅可能
は
रॉजर, मैंने आपकी बात सुन ली। अब हम रक्तच
Nur zu, Houston.
لا، أعتقد أن الأمر انتهى للتو. لا يمكننا رؤية النجوم في وضح النهار، ولا يمكننا مواصلة العمل خلال النهار. سننتظر
И, Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы убедились, что предохранительный клапан ко
जी हां। ठीक है। जब यह पूरा हो जाएगा, तो वे सूर्य को देखने के लिए उपयुक्त कोण पर आ जाएंगे। और जब वे वहां पहुंच जाएंगे, 
बाईं ओर की खिड़की से दिखाई देने वाला क्षेत्र अपेक्षाकृत समतल मैदान है, जिस पर 5 से 50 फुट के आकार के कई गड्ढे हैं, और कुछ छोटी-छोटी पहाड़िय
Houston. Ricevuto. Fuori
There is quite a bit of cloud cover down in this area. I can, right on track, I can only see certain areas
DIREKT? HAUPTANLAGE A/HAUPTANL
ठीक है, जिम, हमारा अनुमान है कि प्राथमिक कारतूस पर हमारे पास 1 घंटा और है, और द्वितीयक कारतूस
로저.
ठी
Okay. Unsere einzige Anmerkung war, dass Sie, falls Sie ans Aufhören gedacht h
そして、例えば 
حسناً. تفض
Roger, Frank. Vorremmo che tornaste indietro. La temperatura del vostro serbatoio di 
いえ、
Finora sono state scattate solo foto a colori, niente bianco e nero. Proverò a scattare un'altra foto di una struttura 
Comprenez bien la partie inférieure située sous le schéma, car le cardan est verrou
Roger, Amicizia Sette. I vostri propuls
ठीक है। मैंने दोबारा पढ़ा: सेकेंडरी एक्यूमुलेटर की मात्रा की निगरा
Hallo, hier ist Shakey
Ich hole gerade
알겠습니다. 원하시면 전해드릴 소식이 하나 있습니다. 공보실에서 방금 보도자료를 하나 줬는데, 전해드리라
Très bien. Nous allons maintenant ef
Роджер, я думаю, мы решили
Roger. Abbiamo appena ricevuto notizie da Houston. Siamo pronti a farti uscire q
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अब उसी क्षेत्र को ऊपर से देखने पर ऐसा लगता है कि यह पृथ्वी की रोशनी को प्रतिबिंबित कर रहा है। मुझे पक्का नहीं पता कि इसे लगभग शून्य कलाय पर सेट किया गया था या नहीं - खैर, क
了解。
Roger. Credo di aver capito tutto abbastanza bene prima che tu chiamassi. Ho disegnato il risult
11. Вы закончили работу с компьюте
좋아요. 우리가 달에 
- -
سنقوم - هيوستن - بمناورات مستقبلية في وضعية منخفضة وبطيئة من وضعية المناورة الآلية. بمعنى آخر، سنقوم بتحميل الطائ
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हमने आपको पहले जो यॉ पल्स की संख्या 21 दी थी, उसे हम घटाकर 12 करना चाहते हैं। 12 पल्स से यॉ राइट होता है, और अगर आप इन्हें गिनना नहीं चाहते हैं, तो इसमे
Sigma Seven. Per non par
Oka
Подождите 1 минуту. Да, поймали меня; я неправильно сказ
Gemini 4, RKV 
좋습니다. 이제 몇 
ये रहा पुराना कोरोना 
フレッド、背景の雑音でもう聞こえない。確かジャックが通信についてどうするつもりか話していたと思う。アップリンク・スケルチ、オフ。君の姿勢は見えないから、アンテナは君が管理してくれ。上昇したら音声チェックをする。上昇には3～5分かかる。宇宙飛行士が見落としないように、地球が見えたら前方のアンテナを、月が見えたら後方
好的。我们会把垫子给你，大概几个小时后，等我们的跟踪稳定下来，就会过来。原因是——如果
ठीक है। पावर 6 पर, पैनल 
当时我们透过会合窗口瞥见了
Wir würden gerne, wenn es Ihnen passt, die Treibstoffmengen 
ولم أستلم وض
Are you two ready
Sì. Sembra che sia successo nel momento in cui ho dato la spinta più X, e a quanto pare non era centrato, perché in un modo o nell'altro sono uscito accidentalmente in assetto e poi il sistema di mantenimento dell'assetto ha iniziato a fun
太阳光会从这个结构上反射。加上这个装置，那台望远镜几乎没用了。我觉得，如果我们必须用望远镜观测，MPAD提供的那些星图会很有用。我们可以用它们作为参考，比如，“嗯，那边那个亮光点肯定是那颗星，因为那就是我们所在的位置。” 但到目前为止
わかりました。待機してくだ
分かりました。
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. My status: I am on, it is not holding all th
If you aline it in a 3-feet-per-second burn, if you are 10 degrees 
Ok. Quando abbiamo collegato l'interruttore di alimentazione CA da IGS ad ACME (che non dovrebbe alimentare il computer), la spia del computer si è spenta. Quando si è accesa la spia di malfunzionamento, la spia del computer si è riaccesa e la spia di malfunzionamento è rimasta accesa. Ben presto entrambe le spie si sono affievolite... Dopo 3 o 4 minuti, dopo essere passati all'alim
罗杰，鹰。你五岁了。这S级
아니, 정말이에요. 아주 흥미롭게도, 지금 지도를 보면 당신은 괌과 하와이 사이, 약간 북쪽에 있고, 거의 6만 마일을 벗어난
روجر، فرانك، أنتما تستهلكان حالي
这里是友谊七号，即将进行超高频低频
로
Affermat
Yes, that's a good i
31700, NA, NA,, минус 00050, плюс все нули, плюс 00001 000 334 001, все нули, плюс 00190 00050 014 005
了解。その後、もう一つ。BAT2、HI VOLT、O
ヒュースト
卡那封。如果飞行员有机会，医务人员想了解一下食物评估结
Базз считает, что нам следует встроить программу в компьютер. И он 
大丈
Roger. Aus den Nachrichten des Pressebüros: Apollo 11 beherrscht weiterhin die Schlagzeilen we
了解しました。コマンドモジュールの角度は、ロール角29
You want the 
Roger.
了解。この
Vor uns im Little Mare befindet sich ein kleiner, gut erkennbarer Einschlagkrater, der recht neu ist; ein weiterer nähert sich. Das Raumschiff ist nach Norden ausgerichtet. Von u
VOXです。そうです。HFでプッシュ・トゥ・
من الأفضل أن يكون
Okay, now you ought to be able to see som
Apollo 8, Houston. Il semble qu'il faille encore 6 heures pour recharger cett
我有个（看不清）复古电源。记得我
A
Bene. Per prima cos
Questa 
Роджер. Итак, начнём: 5, / 45701, минус 043, плюс 
في مباراة "أسترو بلو بونيت" الكبرى، التي تلتها مباراة كرة السلة الكلاسيكية بين فريقي إس إم يو وأوكلاهوما، وصل الفريقان. يستعدان بحماسٍ شديدٍ لهذه المباراة الحاسمة. لم يُذكر هنا الفريق المرشح للفوز، سأتحقق من ذلك وأخبركم لاحقًا إن كان أحدهما مرشحًا للفوز. انطلقت بطولة 
Настройка -50 градусов. Гироскопы свободны. Удерживаюсь на -50 градусах. Готовлюсь к блику. Крен и рыскание удерживаются. Я вижу блик слева, что, как мне кажется, немного неправильно. Кажется, я видел вспышку молнии. Вероятно, это молния, а не блик. Я вижу больше молний. Будет сложно определить, молния это или бли
Und Mrs. Robert Goddard sagte heute, 
نعم، هذا
わかりました。次の3つは同じです。それから、PROPELLANT DUMPをCOMMANDに、ENGINE OUTをOFFに、LAUNCH VEHICLE RATESをOFFにしま
11, Houston. Sie haben richtig angefangen, und die Zahlen, die Sie dann vorgel
We're going to run our first real S-6 now, rather S-5, which will be a series of 35 photographs on the 32nd Rev, coming over the Western part of the United States. They will be don
Хорошо. Прежде чем продолжить, давайте устано
好的。杰克，请
Okay. I guess everybody has pretty much envisioned the space program as being all a lot of exotic electronics, and, certainly, a lot of it is. But I thought I'd bring out a couple of items here in conjunction with the. After the first, you get a very accurate measurement of the amount of water that's left in the s. We're going to make use of this bag I'm showing now to collect the remaining water out of the and see just how much we really did have left, and hopefully, on future missions, to be able to extend safely the allowable time on these uni
Très bien, je comprends que vous soyez un peu fatigué et somnole
还有一点，我想这个问题是问杰克的。我们知道为什么之前他一开始读不出主总线B的电压，后来又读出来了，我们当时也读
好的，收到。我们要在这个耳朵的位置开一个 1.5 英寸的孔，把软管从这里插进去，末端
Et, pendant que je vous ai sous la main, 13, à votre convenance, nous aimerions avoir les résultats des tests de biais
ठीक है। सुनिए। मैं आपको बता दूं कि मैं अभी-अभी अपने ECS O2 के छोटे से निजी प्लॉट का हिसाब रख रहा था, और पिछले कुछ घंटों में इस्तेमाल की गई मात्रा में मुझे कोई वृद्धि नहीं दिख रही है। ऐसा लगता ह
Подождите. У нас тут небол
그냥 지금 가진 그대로를 불러주세요, 지금 만
Zanzibar, Sigma Seven. 
Okay. Macht es einen Unterschied, ob wir die – Wir haben die Leistungsschal
알겠습니다. 우리는 여전히 태평양 중부로 향하고 있습니다. 357 152 359 267, 플러스 0813, 마이너스 16503 066 36221 647 12166 36301 0028, 다음 블록은 노벰버 알파, V0 400 02
खैर, फोन कॉल के मामले में आप और ह
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। आप अपनी सुविधानुसार डॉक से बाहर निकल सकते हैं, सुधार, अपनी सुविधानुसार जहाज़ को अलग कर सकते हैं। हम चाहते हैं कि आप ईगल को अलग कर दें और स्ट
기내 압력과 기내 고도계가 고도를 정확
ये रही पानी की बंदूक। इसके सिरे पर लगा बेलनाकार हिस्सा एक फिल्टर है जिसमें कई झिल्लियां हैं: एक झिल्ली पानी को तो गुजरने देती है, लेकिन गैस को नहीं; दूसरी झिल्ली गैस को तो गुजरने देती है, लेकिन 
Probab
बज़, कृपया प्रतीक्षा करें। जहाँ तक मुझे पता है, मौसम काफी अच्छा दिख रहा है। उष्णकटिबंधीय अभिसरण रेखा के साथ, मौसम मानचित्र पर कुछ बादल दिखाई दे रहे हैं, लेकिन कुछ खास नहीं। अभी - प्रतीक्षा करें। चलिए देखते हैं, अभी मध्य में - हाँ, एमपीएल पर - 3000 बिखरे बादल हैं, दृश्यता 10, लहरों की ऊँचाई 3 फीट है, यह वर्तमान मौसम है। मुझे नहीं लगता कि कोई खास पूर्वानुमान है। कुछ - फ्लाइट ने अभी मुझे सूचित किया है क
그리고 이 130 프라임은 하강하기 전에 추적했던
Хорошо. Отметьте Лу
Yes. We think it's within normal tolerances, Bruce. We just wanted to get your concurrence before we press on with this pr
J'avais pris quatre gorgées à peu près à la même heure lors de ma dernière orbite. Dès que la t
Der Kraftstoffstand 
Okay. How about exercising the idea of rolling over and having Jim do his polarization through the telescope because if we have to change attitudes we'd like to go ahead and start thinking about what effects that'll have on such 
Роджер. Что ж, возможно, вам стоит повторить это во время телевизионного повествования, и мы хотели бы, чтобы вы, поэты, как можно подробнее описали различные цвета и размеры этих вещей, а также то, как 
Esatto. Okay. Avanti. Modalità - a - Quando sei in assetto, CONTROLLO MODALITÀ AUTO. Digita per monitorare le velocità; quando sono inferiori a 0,1 gradi al secondo, accelera su tutti gli assi, quindi disattiva i propulsori plus-X. Okay. Avanti,, INVIO; 1257, INVIO; 252, INVIO; 1, INVIO;, INVIO;, INVIO; inserisci il DAR 22110 e PROCEDI;, INVIO; quindi,; e monitora le velocità. Con velocità inferiori a 0,01 gradi al secondo in tutti gli assi, INVIO; CONTROLLO MODALITÀ, ATT HOLD; quindi 30 clic di imbardata a destra
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호, 무전 점검 
Bien reçu. Vous êtes da
ईगल, ह्यूस्
Capisco. E stai manovrando per farlo. Va be
VOX रिकॉर्डिंग में। मैंने अभी-अभी ड्रिफ्टिंग के दौरान स्टिक की जाँच की - यह 
好的。进入第一步；测试 1：等待 5 秒。还有 5 秒钟。进入自动模式。好的——所有指示灯都熄灭了；量程为零，零。现在我要把测量线扫
Ed, qui è Houston CAP COM. Non riesco a sentirti, 
了
हम 
حسن
روجر. من شركة ووترتاون كوم تك، هذا سيجما سفن. فهمت
Tu commences à rompre; il semble y avoir un
D'accord. Avec une petite modification, votre période sera d'environ 77 heures, ce qui correspond à la durée de la nuit. Le commandant et le chef de quart devraient manger entre la 68e et
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。オ
알겠습니다. IVI 정보를 드리겠습니다. 공격 11명, 오른쪽 2명,
No. We got about another 8 minut
حسنًا. سأعود إلى غرفة النوم. سنختار أفضل جهاز OMNI ونست
Это
제 신호에 맞춰 GMT는 18시 14분 40초가
好了。现在我们可以继续工作了。下一步我
11, Хьюстон. В целях планирования в
Hallo Kano. 
T
ओह, बर्फ़बारी हो रही है। नहीं - नहीं, ऐसा नहीं है। खिड़कियाँ बहुत बुरी हालत में हैं,
わかった。88時間後にハックするよ。あと
わかりました。まず最初にやりたいことの一つは、バッテリーを充電することです。そうすれば、そちらに電力を供給できるようになります。そのための手順も準備されています。再突入に関しては、最終中間コースを大気圏再突入インターフェースの5時間前に行う予定です。もし再突入をしなければならないとしたらの話ですが。そして、大気圏再突入インターフェースのおよそ4時間半前にサービスモジュールを投棄し、その後3時間から3時間半かけて写真撮影、司令船の地上・地上監視システムの起動、収納作業、その他雑用を行います。そして、大気圏再突入インターフェースの1時間前まで保持し、その後投棄します。これらの手順は、明日の朝、CMSとLMSに統合されて実行されます。そして、できればその日のうちに、ミッションコントロールセンターに連絡を取りながら再度実行する予定です。いくつか質問があります。それは、大気圏再突入をどうするかということです。司令船には十分な酸素があり、高圧源と
Роджер. Зона 27-БРАВО. Раздельное торможение. Передн
자, 휴스턴
Roger, Frank. La raison en est que l'étalonnage de l'horizon nécessit
Хорошо, Джим. Вот что мы видим: батарея №3 потребляет всего около ампера, и мы думаем, что пора её отключать; батарея №3
इसके अलावा, सामान
Seule la partie la plus récente est nettement visible à leurs yeux, et elles fin
我
Майк, мы сейчас что-нибудь перекусим; пр
روجر. سأذهب إلى - أي نوع من أنواع OMNI تريد ا
アポロ
Ja, das war e
Columbia, Ho
Roger. Aurora Seven, hier spricht
روجر. تنظيف خلية وقود الأكسجين الساعة 11:30. العودة إلى الجدول الزمني المعتاد عند الاستيقاظ الساعة 12:1. تغيير هيدروكسيد الليثيوم رقم 9 الآن. إعدادات السكون القمرية العادية، أنا في هذه ا
알겠습니다. 저희는 망원경을 가지고 들어갈까 생각 중입니다. 유용할 것 
罗杰，我再说一遍，42 
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Цвета стали лучше. Изображение приближается. Мы могли бы попытаться немного лучше сфокусироваться. Вот, фокус стал намного лучше. Мы видим
그리고 저희가 주시하고 있는 몇 가지 온도가 있습니다. 히터는 꺼져 있고요. 저희는 S, ASA, 쿼드 온도, 그리고 추진제(추진제 제외)를 포함한 여러 온도들을 살
Ca
J'ai reçu le mien. C'est un stylo à bille, ou 
Roger,
No, far as I know it's all up t
了解。ヒューストン、アポロ11号
さて、今朝はMラインとどれだけ平行になるか見てみましょう。初めてマーキングを始める前は、3つの角度の計算がやや​​ずれていたようで、3つの角度を計算した後、Mラインを平行にするために大きな姿勢変更をしなければならず、かなりのガスを無駄にしていました。場合によっては、姿勢変更が必要なだけのように思われましたが、皆さんは不要だと言いました。そのため、場合によってはMラインが平行でない状態でマーキングしていました。オフセットを計算してデータを処理するプロセッサがあるのではないかと考えていましたが、私の知る限り、Mラインは地平線と
ठीक है, और - अरे, हम इसे रिकॉर्ड कर लेंगे, और मान लीजिए कि आप प्रोब और ड्रोग को उस जगह रख देंगे जहाँ सीडीआर रखा है। हमारे पास इस उपकरण स्थाना
Jim, potresti chiamare Jack in camera da letto e d
Я знаю, что вы заняты, но когда у Джека появится возможность, нам бы хотелось узн
If I could find the horizon, I got it hacked. I got the star, and I got the blue filter on. It cut everything out except my s
Так, вот Риттер. Видишь его, вот он, прямо 
わかりました。最後の4つ、最後の5つ、CLAに
मैं किसी तरह इस गंदी चीज को 
هيوستن، ك
好的。我们要
Готово
제가 말씀드리건대, 우리는 이제부터 생각해 봐야 할 것들이 있습니다
イーグル、ヒューストン。
ठीक है। अगर - चलिए देखते हैं, अगर हम - मुझे आपकी आखिरी टिप्पणी समझ नहीं आई। अगर हमें कोई समस्या आती है, तो क्या आप चाहते हैं कि हम 150 डिग्री रो
Mentre fai questo, il pilota di comando può darmi qualche informazione sul booster, la distanza, cosa bisogna fa
Alle Rückwärtsgänge wurden automatisch ausgelöst. Sie scheinen eine Minute – eine Sekunde – vor dem Countdown zu erfolgen. Die Einstellung lag wahrscheinlich innerhalb eines bestimmten
Verdammt, ich
Questa, questa operazione è stata molto irregolare. Non sono riuscito a ricondurla a un elemento specifico. Una volta ha deviato in una direzione di imbardata; la volta successiva ha deviato nell'altra. Per un po' ho avuto la sensazione che il beccheggio stesse andando alla deriva. A un certo punto sembrava che avesse una piccola spinta bloccata nel beccheggio e dovevo continuare a correggerla, ma si è cor
分かりました。本当は、もっと詳しい手順をお
37.8 और 2.3। और यह आधे घंटे के लिए हमारा आखिरी होगा। धन्यवाद। और मैं यहाँ अपना पाँचवाँ सामान्य आदेश प्रयोग करने जा रहा हूँ, और इसे जो को सौंपने जा रहा हूँ
ビル、了解。4.に搭載状態ベクトルを使うことについては、最後にもう一度触れておきたいと思います。地上でもう少し検討した後、彼らは「」の作成と計算に着手しなければなりません。後回しにしたり、二度やり直したりするよりも、これまでずっと使ってきた手順で進めていくつもりです。月軌道については、検討を重ねてお
确认 A
Я имею в в
Copia. È una foto bellissima. 
नहीं, बिलकुल सटीक नहीं। लेकिन मेरे पास इसकी 
Okay. Mike, what happened is - you know, you were sitting there monitoring,, and at step 7 you went into, NOUN 01, and keyed in the address and then INFORMATION INFORMATION; and on the final ENTER of that 35400 ENTER, right after that, it - that then put you back into the 16,. Then when you did the, ENTER, you were really entering the information in the actual CDU; and when you got the two entries in, in register 1 and 2, it was an - it was an instantaneous change in the actual CDU, and the looked at that and saw - saw what it thought it had. My - my gosh, I got a 600 degree per second rate. And it turns on the jets to try to take that rate out. And the rate filters that it's looking at - it - well, the rate it's looking at is filtered, so it doesn't rea
ठीक है। हम आपका टेप रिकॉर्डर रिवाइंड करने जा रहे हैं, और आपकी सुविधा के लिए हमारे पास प्लस 90 औ
Roger. Quando siamo partiti, ci sembrava tutto a posto. Ora si sta allontanando con uno strano andamento che non avevamo mai visto prima su un volo. E stiamo solo cercando 
ठीक है, जो। मैंने आपकी बात साफ़-साफ़ सुन ली है। हम यहाँ टाइम बेस 6 
Мы останавливаемся на расстоянии 3 футов в секунду от финиша, чтобы сгореть
了解しました。視界も通信も非常に良好ですので、今は走査望遠鏡を見ずに口頭で説明させていただきます。アークトゥルスへの操作角度は非常に良好でした。走査望遠鏡の中心にアークトゥルスを配置しました。この太陽角度では、走査望遠鏡の中心を真横切る光軸と光の帯があります。そのため、周囲の多くの星は見えません。しばらくの間望遠鏡に目を釘付けにしていましたが、星の模様などを見るのは非常に困難です。アークトゥルスでは、光学系が私をそこに導いてくれない限り、それを認識できませんでした。今、私はゼロ軸とゼロ軸に近づいているので、かなり大きな軸の動きを感じていま
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. بانتظار قرا
Roger. Ti leggo da un po'. Ho provato a contattarti in HF senza successo. Il mio stato è buono; lo stato della capsula è buono; la modalità di controllo è fly-by-wire; i giroscopi sono ingabbiati; la manovra è disattivata. Il carburante segna il 74-85%. L'ossigeno è tra l'87 e il 100%. La temperatura della cabina è un po' alta, 104 gradi. La temperatura dello sfiato del vapore della tuta è
Nein. Ich habe 134 10 aufgeschrieben. Ich war mir da nicht ganz 
حسنًا. سأبدأ من جديد - دعني أبدأ من جديد بإعاد
Roger. Le ballon oscille sur un arc d'environ 100 degrés. Il disparaît fréquemment de notre champ de vision. En ce moment, il est presque vertical. Repérez u
알겠습니다. 승무원 현황 보고입니
Ci sono due interruttori 
15 Se
Roger. Abbiamo due ingranaggi che ruotano quando si tira la maniglia avanti e indietro. Uno di questi è l'ingranaggio che funge da cricchetto, un piccolo cilindro con un pistone e una punta dietro che innesta il cricchetto. E abbiamo avuto qualche problema con quello prima di aprirlo e dopo averlo aperto abbiamo avuto difficoltà a far funzionare il cricchetto. Inoltre, abbiamo avuto molta difficoltà a chiudere il portello abbastanza da poterlo anche solo agganciare. Poi, Ed ha dovuto spingere il cric
And, Fred, on this 
Ok, ho delle istruzioni per te. Ok, puoi accendere il computer. Vorrei accendere il computer, accendere il radar e metterlo in standby; dopo
Bien reçu
켄, 짐벌 각도가 짐벌 락에 가까워지거나 하는 문제가 생기면 꼭 전화해 줘. 아직 좀 졸려서 그래. 또다시 제대로 된 자세를 못 잡게 되는 건 싫거든. 한 번으로 
Роджер. Отлично, Гас. Здесь прекрасный парашют. Я хочу дать хорошее описание, прежде чем мы упадем в воду. Я готовлюсь к удару, отсоединяя шланг визо
مرحباً يا غاس، نحن نقترب من إل باسو
Habe ich kopiert, 
I've noticed several times in going from the sunlight into the shadow, that just as I go in, I catch an additional reflection off the *** along with the reflection off my face onto the visor, makes visibility very poor just at the transition *** sunlight into the shad
아주 좋습니다. 시간 되실 때 인버터 세 가지 모두의 온
Yes. It's looking to be less than 1 foot per second, about four-tenths of a foot per second right now. And t
Il
ऐसा लगता है कि शून्य psi संभवतः
Ok. ALIMENTAZIONE ELETTRONICA, SPENTA; ALIMENTAZIONE BIAS CONDIZIONATORE/DRIVER, SPENTA; ALIMENTAZIONE, due di loro SPENTA; O2 DIRETTO per chiud
Roger, Bill. La prossima volta che ci siamo rimessi al sole, non prevediamo alcun problema con l'evaporatore primario. Se dovesse iniziare ad asciugarsi, pensiamo che sia meglio chiudere la val
23
Guaymas Cap Com，正在接收您的3x3信息。Wally
D'accord. Je vais donc procéder à la poussée. La différence triangulaire est de 0,01, mais
收到。仍在接收。请继续。阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。我已收到您关于
ठीक है। और जिम के हाथ में जो है, वो एक पेन है जिस
ठीक है, देखते हैं कि मुझे समझ आया या नहीं। चरण 2 है: "बैलेंस कपल बंद; डेड बैंड, न्यूनतम; एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल: पिच और यॉ पल्स पर; यॉ, डायरेक्ट। मोड कंट्रोल चालू रहेगा, एटीट्यूड होल्ड; गाइडेंस कंट्रोल चालू रहेगा; हम दरों को कम करेंगे; पिच और
好的，阿波罗8号。我们接下来要做的就是，等我们重新连接到高增益天线后，就把电视信号调大。我估计信号强度大概是……我们就用这个信号，只要信号覆盖到就行。我这里有个关于+35的更新。现在我们需要对它进行几次修正。所以，当你把
रॉजर। और चलिए देखते हैं, ये स्पिका, मेनकेंट और कौन-
Neil, I haven't been looking out - My eyes aren't very well
알겠습니다. -2,
Okay, los geht's. Eintrittspunkt: Mittelpazifik, 000153; 000. Die nächsten beiden Zeilen geben die Monduntergangs- und die Mondcheck-Lage an;, 178; NOUN 61, minus 21,66, minus; 00:28. Die nächsten vier sind nicht verfüg
我认为，这片区域的表面颜色与我们从轨道上以大约10度太阳角度观测到的情况非常相似。它几乎没有颜色。它是灰色的，而且是
Okay. Ich denke, wir sollten mit einem kleinen Gespräch über Schlaf
好的。建议您在 R1 中输入以下数值：03
نعم يا جاك. هل دوّنت معلومات ع
Houston, the guys that said that we wouldn't be able to tell precisely where we are are the winners today. We were a little busy worrying about program alarms and things like that in the part of the descent where we would normally be picking out our landing spot; and aside from a good look at several of the craters we came over in the final descent, I haven't been able to pick out the 
لقد تم إيقاف تشغي
로저. 달에 아주 가까이 접근할 때, 특히 달 근처에서의 추적에 있어서 온보드 추적의 가치가 궁금해졌습니다. 온보드 항법 시스템은 달에 매우 근접한 영역에서는 정확도가 떨어질 것 같고, 추적 시스템보다는 조금 더 나을 수도 있을 것 
روجر. لسبب ما، ظهر لنا فجأة رمز 
Alle Einstellungen funktionieren einwandfrei. Die Temperatur im Hitzedom des Anzugs liegt bei etwa 72 Grad, die am Lufteinlass bei etwa 63 Grad und sinkt nu
就四行。转到激活
We copied your transmission over Muchea. Understand you still have the balloon on. Is that an affir
是的。10
제미니 4호, 카나
حسناً ي
Housto
C'est e
Gemini VI, это... вы у меня на радаре? Я отслеживаю вас
ठीक है। अगर आप चाहें तो लगभग 10 मिनट के लिए रुक सकते हैं, हम आपको सात-आठवे
هذا صحيح يا جاك. هذا فقط لزيادة أمان الحقيبة. عندما ت
Nein
Eagle, Houston. Abbiamo esaminato i vostr
Go ahead
Guarda lì! Ehi, ecco il pacco pomp
로저. 033 0000, 왼쪽 17, +0883, -16500 12955 36185; 시리우스, 리겔 129, 155 010, 연료 탱크 2개 제트, 20초, 쿼드 
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Роджер. Мы приняли. И, Игл, похоже, лучше всего использовать антенну, направленную вперед. И, перерыв. Игл, мы пропустили вашу проверку на загрузку TIG и 
罗
Хорошо. Давление гелия около 37, давление в коллекторе 182, а показания прибора — 80. У прибора B температура около 112, давление гелия около 36,5, давление топлива 180, а показания прибора — около 77. У прибора C температура 140 — кстати, остальные температ
Aquar
Manca
...более лёгкие задания будут в су
Aquarius, Houst
حسنا
لست متأكدًا من أنني أفهم هذا السؤال، لكننا حصلنا على جزء كبير من كتلة الأرض ف
Hoppla! Zu früh ge
... ball on that pad
Колумбия, Хьюстон. У нас есть еще пара векторов, которые мы вам вышлем. Они скоро появятся, а затем вы сможете выпо
Ok, Vance. Ok. Abbiamo appena cambiato gli OMNI qui. Dico, se stai ricevendo dati da noi, questa è la cosa important
わかりました。1つ待機していただければ、すぐにコピーの
Forza Housto
Но его форма такова, что он разлетается горизонтально и не 
Questo atteggiamento non è proprio il massimo quando si tratta di fotografare la Ter
わかりました。ここにもう一つ入力があります。11は、データが画像として認識可能だったということですが、画像の品質につい
ضغط المقصورة ثابت عند 5.5. درجة الحرارة داخل المقصورة 100 درجة. رطوبة المقصورة 25%، ونسبة سائل التبريد 67%. درجة حرارة بدلة الطيران 62 درجة. ضغط المدخل... درجة حرارة المدخل... الضغط على البدلة 5.8
好
Hey,
Принято
收到。接下来，使用高增益天
좋습니다, 휴
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。了解。1/、628
わかりました。電力6。わかりました。電力6はパネル11を指します。私が呼び出したブレーカーを除いて、チャートのとおりに進んでください。1行目は問題ありません。つまり、1行目です。2行目、QUAD 4、TCA、閉。QUAD 3、TCA、閉。QUAD 2、TCA、閉。QUAD 1、TCA、閉。その行の残りの部分は問題ありません。行3、ちょうど半分くらいのところ、ATCA（PGNS）が閉。わかりました。その行の残りの部分は問題ありません。4行目、HEATER - スタンバイ。わかりました。その行は、最後の3つの回路ブレーカー、Fred、つまりSTAND
水瓶座，休斯顿。我们收到了您部分传输的信息。我们了解到信号已经严重受损，您想
حسنًا. سنقدم لكم طريقة الحصول على الوقت في تمام السا
M
D'accord. Très bien. On
Jim McDivitt. Al momento sono circa T+3 ore. Quando siamo usciti dal boost
Ich werde eine kleine Korrektur vorne
Okay, Bill. Wir nähern uns dem Zeitpunkt der Sichtungen, und es besteht die Sorge, dass Quadrocopter Charlie überhitzen könnte, wenn wir direkt zur Ausrichtung übergehen. Daher bitten wir dich, di
アクエリアス、ヒュ
अब मैं लो मैग्नीफिकेशन पर जा रहा हूँ। करेक्शन: पेरिस्कोप पर हाई मैग्नीफिकेशन पर
はい。そ
Apollo 13,
Understand. You've
... Übe
早上好，或者下午好，或者随便什么
Да, я положу пакеты с едой в свою боковую сумку. О, дайте мне
好的。杰克按下了250安培的BAT A和BAT B入口断路器。他读取到电池母线电压，A端为32.3伏，B端为37.0伏。然后他按下了275安培的断路器，将BAT连接到主母线上。在这种配置下，主母线A电压为3
Роджер. Я их все скопир
Es ist flüssiges Freon oder Neon o
はい。横です。CB 11、パネル11
尼尔，这里是休斯顿。我们正在拍照。你现在不在画面里。不
알겠습니다. 현재 우주
Близнецы 4, это Хирург. Не могли бы вы предоставить информацию о вашем потреблени
Apollo 
Roger. Et nous copions votre apogée et votre péri
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。三个通信开关位置。首先，S波段辅助磁带切换至“向下语音备份”；S波段正常模式关闭；遥测输入高电平。我再说一遍，S波段辅助磁带切换至“向下语音备份”；S波段正常模式关闭；遥测输
Okay. Und akzeptiere
And tell Glenn 
Apollo 8, what we would like to do with these angles is to set it in AUTO REACQ over on panel 2, and it is under the t
Après avoir fait demi-tour, nous nous sommes retrouvés à environ 90 ou 120 mètres du propulseur. C'éta
И я оставляю выключатель управления поток
's 3/4:، شروق الشمس، خط الزوال الرئيسي، غروب الشمس؛ نقطة تحت الشمس، -1 اكتساب، -2 اكتساب. بالن
ठीक है। दाईं ओर देखने पर, स्थिति या बल्कि स्थिति गलत होगी, इसलिए आप इसे काट सकते हैं। और चंद्रमा के चित्र के नीचे, कोष्ठक में दिए गए -, "108.19" और "0 23
Pourrions-nous procéder à une vérification de la tension artérielle? Appuyez sur le bouton, puis faites travailler 
좋아요, 수성이 대기광을 뚫고 지나가는 게 보이네요. 잘 보일지 지켜보죠. 제가 "보인다"라고 말했을 때가 시작이었어요. 마크
नहीं, सब कुछ ठीक-ठाक लग रहा है। मुझे स्कैनर देने का कोई मत
さ
बेशक, एकमात्र दूसरी चीज़ जिसके बारे में हम चिंतित होंगे, वह यह है कि इससे आपके वेग में क्या परिवर्तन आया होगा और इससे कितना डेल्टा-वी उत्पन्न हुआ होगा, और इ
Хорошо, Джек. Панель 3, инвертор переменного тока 2, главный B; инвертор 2, шина переменного тока 2, включен; кнопка сброса шины переменного тока 2, чтобы сбросить и установить в центральное положение; зарядное устройство для аккумуляторов к A, индикатор переменного тока, выберите зарядное устройство для аккумуляторов. Сообщайте показания силы ток
Okay, ich verstehe Sie tr
好的。还有大约十分钟。我们会再次接您，所有电视转播所需的信息都会准备好。如果情况再次出现，为了
सेक्स्टेंट के माध्यम से देखें कि क्या यह ठीक दिख रहा है और देखें कि क्या यह संकेत नही
ブラウンズは昨日、ダラスを31対20で圧倒しました。ところで、皆さんは今日、ボルチ
Na ja, unsere Antennen sind unten und *** nicht gerade gu
Okay. Möchtest du etwas davon? Das sind
रॉजर। हमने स्थिति को यथावत रखा है। हमने इसे जैसा था वैसा ही छोड़ दिया है, और य
लीजिए, हो गया। बढ़िया काम; शानदार प्रदर्श
Хорошо. Небольшая информация. Мы разрабатываем для вас процедуру, позволяющую использовать баллоны с LiOH из ком
Allez-y, Chirurgien des
了解。7​​.5をコピ
よし。上の方は順調
Okay. Die erste Zusatzfrage lautet: Lassen Sie mich die Originalfrage wiederholen, da es
आगे बढ़
حسنًا. سيكون ذلك جيدًا
मुझे लगता है हमें करना ही पड़ेगा - खैर, हम इस
Frank, ce que je n'arrêt
请告诉我你
, Carnar
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 이젝터 온도 기록할
حسنًا، 
이 자세에서는 확실히 머리 위를 올려다보는 듯한 착각이 들고, 지평선이 보이지 않으면 그냥 칠흑 같은 하늘뿐입니다. 조종실 조명은 상당히 밝습니다. 물론 적응하고 나면 객실 조명으로 줄일 수는 있겠지만, 지금은 우주복 회로 문제 때문에 조명을 낮추기가 좀 꺼려집니다. 손가락에 끼우는 손전등을 아낌없이 사용하고 있습니다. 앞으로 비행할 때는 물건들을 담아 일정 시간 동안 가둬둘 수 있는 장치가 필요할 것 같습니다. 저는 와셔와 작은 금속 조각 문제를 해결하려고 애쓰고 있습니다. 음... 드디어 그것들을 해치에 있는 작은 가방에 넣은 것 같습니다. 우주복 온도는 그럭저럭 유지되고 있습니다. 저는 덥고, 아마 설정을 낮춰야 할 것 같습니다. 우주복 회로가 왜 이렇게 반응 속도가 느린지 모르겠습니다. 객실 회로는 아주 잘 작동합니
هذا تأكيد. وبصياغة أفضل، كان من الممكن اس
روجر، جو. شكراً جزيلاً لكما
13, Houston. Vorremmo ch
Votre tension artérielle a été enregistrée. Nous attendons votre rapport concernant l'alimentation et l'hydratation. Nous avons reçu votre ra
Хорошо. Большое спасибо. Наш наибольший дрейф на гироскопах составляет 0,03 градуса в час, а на X-гироскопе — -. На PIPA
Okay, Jim. Um hier ein oder zwei Ampere Strom zu sparen, bitten wir Sie, auf die Konfiguration „Sprache abwärts, Kommunikationssicherung abwärts“ umzuschalten. Dazu ziehen Sie die Strom- und Leitungsschutzschalter und schalten auf „Sprache abw
지금으로서는 말씀드릴
Für die Hasselblad is
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。バズ、もし聞き取れなかったら、PADの読み上げは素晴らしかったです。時計の最新情報をサイトに配信でき次第、お知らせします。ハニーサックルに引き
O
Houston, tu veux bien me donner un coup de main pour vérifier l'heure,
जी हाँ, जिम। होता ये है कि जब आप डिटेंट से बाहर जाते हैं, तो हम एरर नीडल्स को रीसेट कर देते हैं और आपका एटीट्यूड रेफ
ठीक है। सबसे पहले हम बैटरी को चार्ज करना चाहते हैं, त
알겠습니
Außerdem beschlagen hier in Houston die Fenster, ne
Apollo 8, Ho
Le nom est 
Oh, okay. That was right on. Now what
Apollo 11, Houston. Would you give us and ACC
Houston, Apollo 11. Avez-vous constaté une différence de pre
ठीक है। यही वह कॉन्फ़िगरेशन है जिसमें हम आपको रखना चाहते हैं, और हम इस बारे में सोच रहे हैं। जब हमने टैंक 1 को ऑटो और टैंक 2 को बंद किया, तो हमने पाया कि हीटर साइकिल में टैंक 1 का दबाव लगभग 233 psi था, जो सावधानी और चेतावनी सीमा से काफी ऊपर है, और अगर हम सोने के लिए इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन का उपयोग करते हैं, तो हमें नींद के दौरान सावधानी और चेतावनी लाइटें नहीं जलेंगी। ठीक है। ऐसा आराम से करने के लिए, हम दिन के बाकी समय में टैंक नंबर 2 से अधिक H2 का उपयोग करना चाहते हैं, ताकि टैंक 1 के पक्ष में असंतुलन हो जाए, और नींद के चक्र के अंत में सब बराबर हो जाए। और इसीलिए हमने आपको टैंक 1 बंद और टैंक 2 ऑटो मोड में रखा है। हमें अगले 10 घंटों में लगभग 3 प्रतिशत असंतुलन की उम्मीद है; और सोने से पहले, हम आपको कॉन्फ़िगरेशन को फिर से बदलने के लिए कॉल करेंगे। अब यहाँ एकमात्र कमी यह है कि दिन के
I am all 
Я думаю, что взрыв, насколько я мог видеть, Джо, ос
了解しました。ジム、燃料が少し残っているので、フライトプランで調整することにしました。これから8時間はホライゾン・スキャン・モードに切り替えてください。高度は30フィートです。プライマリー・スキャナーを使用してください。ヨー方向の操縦は禁止です。また、スキャナーがロックアウトした場合、ロール方向やピッチ方向の操縦も禁止です。ロ
確認しました。27ページ、起動、パネル16に進みます。SYSTEM Bravoの「ASCENT FEED 1」の「PQGS」は開、
شركة COAS للطاقة، مت
Расстояние от дна до кормовой перегородки командного модуля составляет примерно 16-20 футов. Это совсем не дезориентирует, но очень интересно представить, как, о
Hello, Ha
We used the forward dump valve until about 2 psi, and we're using the overhead no
好的。我刚戴上耳机；我这就去
Roger. Ci è sembrato un po' stridulo, Neil. O questo, opp
Das stimmt, der Wert ist etwas niedrig. Ich habe den Anzug jetzt auf 6 eingestellt und werde auf 6,5 erhöhen. Ich komme nicht wirklich voran. Vor etwa 5 Minuten war ich bei 6,25 und stelle die Anzugsteuerung jetzt auf 6,5 
Апол
كما ت
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们建议您忽略60度的限制，让它继续上升到60度以上。无需
11, qui Houston. In riferimento alla tua valutazione soggettiva secondo cui ieri sera la temperatura all'interno della navicella era più bassa, in pr
로저. 
... spinta su NORMALE; spinta DELTA-V, due, OFF; PITCH e YAW su AUTO; MOTORI cardanici PITCH e YAW OFF; DELTA-V/CG, /CSM; LOGICA ELS, OFF; ELS AUTO su MANUA
짐
罗杰。我们正在逐步调整到这种新的姿态；从Navi姿态到我们需要的姿态还有相当一段距离。关于20号星图，我需要更正一下——在Navi姿态下，经过暗适应后，你可以看到仙后座，也可以看到Navi本身。很难看清周围的恒星
حسنًا. المحولات الأربعة لهذا نا
برج الدلو، لديّ فكرة لإدارة هوائيات OMNI. قد يُسهّل الأمر على الجميع لو عطّلنا خاصية كتم ص
Die Kabine scheint bei etwa 5,3 zu entlüft
Ehi, Frank, potrebbe interessart
This 
Roger. We think w
ठीक है। ब्रूस, हम जल संचयक गतिविधि के करीब पहुँच रहे हैं, और यह 
阿波罗8号，阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿，休斯顿。
لا، لكن لديّ مجموعة مفاتيح غريبة. لقد شغّلت مفتاح الطاقة ACME، وشغّلت الكمبيوتر، وانطفأ ضوء الك
روجر، 
حسنًا. قراءة 2
यहां एक दिलचस्प खबर है जिसे सुनकर अच्छा लगा। ऐसा लगता है कि मिशिगन के एन आर्बर में एक नया युवा गिरोह पनपा है। इसका नाम गिलनेट गिरोह है। यह गिरोह एन आर्बर की गलियों में छुपकर घूमता है और कभी-कभी कानून को भी दरकिनार कर देता है। वे खुद को 'गुरिल्ला फॉर गुड' कहते हैं। उन्होंने कुछ कारनामे किए हैं, जैसे कि एक पुल पर अश्लील बातें लिखी हुई थीं, जिसे उन्होंने एक ही रात में रंग दिया। एक जर्जर मकान, जो आस-पड़ोस के बच्चों के बीच लोकप्रिय तो था, लेकिन खतरनाक भी था, उसे बंद कर दिया गया। शहर के बीचोंबीच स्थित गमले, जो इस बात पर बहस के कारण खाली पड़े थे कि इसके लिए कौन जिम्मेदार है (व्यापार या सरकार), फूलों से भर दिए गए। एक व्यस्त चौराहे पर लगी झाड़ी, जिसे दृष्टि बाधित करने वाला माना जा रहा था, उसे काट दिया गया, जिससे मालिक नाराज हो ग
Как мне это обойти? У меня 58g, и мне нужно рыскание 231, верно? Кажется, они с
अपोलो 11, अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन से ब्लाइंड ब्रॉडकास्टिंग है। अगर आप हमें सुन रहे हैं, तो ओम्नी एंटेना पर हमसे जुड़न
حسنًا يا فريد، هذا صحيح، باستثناء إجراء المحاذاة الذي نعمل عليه وهو محاذاة بين الأرض والشمس، وبخلاف ذلك، فالأمر صحيح. بالمناسبة، يبدو أن مناو
Houston, Apollo 11. Stiamo iniziando la nost
네. 저희 쪽에서 보면 곧 날씨가 개일 것 같습니다. 날씨의 서쪽 가장자리가 당신 쪽에서 그리 멀지 않은 서쪽에 있
西格玛七号，西格玛七号，这里是沃特敦通信技术学院。我逐个读出你们的信
Il nous reste un peu moins de deux minutes. Si vous êtes encore éveillé, le prochain numér
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven. Hawaii Com Tech. Su HF/UHF. Come si legge? Pas
हाँ। अब जब हमें पता चल गया है कि (अस्पष्ट) कहाँ है, तो अगली बार यह बहुत आसान होगा। पहली बार जब हमने काहिरा - काहिरा और अलेक्जेंड्रिया - को खोजा, तो हमें वह (अस्पष्ट) कुछ देर के लिए मिला। मैंने वास्तव में हवाई अड्डा नहीं देखा। मैंने बस वह इलाका देखा। मैंने सोचा कि अगर मैं कैमरे को सही दिशा में घुमाऊँ, तो मुझे काहिरा की तस्वीर मिल जाएगी। लेकिन इस बार मैंने हवाई अड्डे को साफ़ देख लिया। अलेक्जेंड्रिया के साथ भी ऐसा ही हुआ। मुझे लगता है कि अगर आप ऐसी किसी चीज़ की तस्वीर लेने जा रहे हैं, तो बे
收到。关于“月球15号”的最新消息——塔斯社今早报道，该探测器已进入近月轨道，目前一切运行正
Roger. Da qui i tuoi sistemi sembrano a posto. Pronti. Vogliamo che tu svegli il pilota. Eseguiremo un Aero-Med Pass One 
彼らがやろうとしているのは...アクエリアスをパワーアップするこ
是的。我想部分原因是因为你的位置比较偏远。我们只是想提前告知你，你会收到刚才看到
Neil, this is Houston. We're estimating about 10 minutes for the documen
Roger. Under
インディアン・キャップ・コム。地平線と夜空の間にあるすべての色を見てください。フ
لقد وضع
좀 나아지고 있네요. 1시나 2시 방향으로 들고 계시네요. 좋아 보입니다. 같은 방향으로 조금 더 움직여 주세요. 지금 3시 방향이네요. 저희는 당신이 보는 것의 절반 정도만 보입니다. 너무 많아요. 5시 방향에서 사라지고 있네요. 이제 다시 나타납니다. 2시 방향에서 화
الخطوة 41 برافو في الصفحة E-9 ألفا. إذا قررت استخدام إما MINIMAL IMP
面板 275：CB 航班/着陆后，主 A
Okay. At, delete the sig
さっさとこ
Vance, nach meinen Berechnungen haben wir etwa zehn Fotos aus dem Erdfenster gemacht. I
١١، هذه هيوستن. نتيجةً لتفريغنا عبر مصرف إدارة النفايات، استنتجنا أن مستشعر معدل تدفق الأكسجين لديك معطل. ذك
C'est toujours là. Je le regarde en ce moment même. Je peux voir… le Soleil est juste derrière moi, et puis toutes ces petites étoiles apparaissent. Oui. On dirait que je suis en plein cœur de la Voie lactée. Il y a des milliers de petites étoiles à différentes dista
알겠
فرانك، لدينا حوالي دقيقتين ونصف للتشغيل، وما زلنا نعرض بعض مفاتيحك غير مضبوطة وفقًا لقائمة التحقق؛ على وجه التحديد، معدل منخفض، نطاق مي
팀버 코
네. 만약 프로그램이 잘 진행되고 궤도 자세를 잘 유지하는 것 같으면 그대로 두고 수동으로 제어하겠습니다. 
そうですね。これがうまくいかなかった場合の
휴스턴 이글입니다
لدينا علبة رئيسية واحدة على متن المركبة وأخرى ثانوية. العلبة الرئيسية الأخرى مو
रॉजर, जेमिनी 4. एक मिनट रुकिए। हम केप से बात करके पता लगाएंगे कि उन्हें यहाँ क्
아니요. 아니요, 이것은 
我确实看到了一颗星星。它似乎在我视线范围内的物体左侧，向下倾斜10度左右。看起来像是另一颗明亮
好的。Alfa 舱段氧气消耗量为 81%
Okay. 
Roger. M
Bene, adesso, dopo aver inserito quel gadget, siamo tornati a 0,35. Prima, la lettura era a livello di scala. Credo che la
Moment mal. Moment mal. Moment mal, du hast das Kabel schon wie
这是 Gemini 4 号。现在故障指示灯亮着，而且
Gemini VIII, ici Houston. Si vous passez en mode PRÉLANCEMENT, nous vérifierons le biais de votre
こちらフレンドシップ7です。自動逆噴射はオフ。モードセレクターは正常、レートコマンド、ジャイロも正常。「T」ハンドルは手動以外はすべてイン、手動はアウト。現在、手動で操縦しています。ランディングバッグスイッチはオフ。シーケンスパネルはそれ以外はすべて正常。操縦燃料は60～82パーセント。現在、手動操縦時の姿勢は、ロール右5度、ヨー右15度、ピッチ-34度（軌道姿勢）。打ち上げからの時間は2プラス33プラス60、マーク！
心配しないでください。私はそうし
Было ли это?.., или нет?... вы с нетерпением ждёте это
没错。好的，现在距离下一个时间点
Jim, ammarerai a circa 900 km a sud-est di Samoa, verso le 8:00 ora locale. Le previsioni meteo per la zona sono buone: 1500, mare sparso, mare mosso, visibilità di 16 km. Il mare avrà onde alte 1,5 metri, 15 nodi di velocità, e raggiungerai Samoa
Come si presenta q
जेमिनी 4, ह्
Се
في الوحل. حسنًا، فهمت ذلك. اطلب منه إعادة تش
How about if I leave the VHF A and B 
हाई-गेन एंटीना ट्रैक, ऑ
Apollo 8, Houst
Okay, Joe. Ich habe hier eine neue Seite namens -1A erstellt. Punkt 6: Umschalten auf Stromversorgung. Ich habe wie üblich überprüft, ob der Flutlichtstrahler aus ist und die Warnleuchte „Vorsicht, Stromausfall
नहीं। कमान हमारे हाथ में ह
Apollo
मैं कह रहा हूँ कि वे सब फिर से साफ़ दिख रहे हैं। मुझे लगता है कि उन्हें इतनी सफा
E ora, mentre Fred smonta e rimette a posto la sua amaca, potrei darvi un'idea di che tipo di confusione ci sia, visto che non
알겠습니다. 배터리 A를 충전하는 데 얼마나 더 걸릴
아, 잠깐
Nennen Sie mich einfach das, was Sie haben, nicht das, was 
Stand by. He has an update. What kind of update do you have, 
Attendez-vous à une coupure de courant à tout moment. Je continuerai à tr
1時間寝て、11時半に
D'accord. 
알겠습니다, 빌. 저희도 당신이 돌아오시면 정말 기쁠 겁
Apollo 8, Houston. Te
아, 그렇군요. 저는 이제 막 깨어났을 거라고 생각했어요. 그런데 저
रॉजर। मरून बगुल के साथ जारी। राष्ट्रपति निक्सन ने आपसे मिलने के लिए विमान में सवार होने से ठीक पहले सैन फ्रांसिस्को से फोन करके आपकी पत्नियों को चौंका दिया। वे सभी आपके टेलीविजन प्रसारण से बहुत प्रभावित हुईं। जेन और पैट ने यहां मिशन कंट्रोल से इसे देखा। कल रात केप से इंटेलसैट का प्रक्षेपण चौथी बार स्थगित कर दिया गया। बताया गया कि समस्या डेल्टा के दूसरे चरण में नाइट्रोजन रेगुलेटर की खराबी थी। आज रात इसे लॉन्च करने का एक नया प्रयास किया जाएगा। गल्फ स्ट्रीम का अध्ययन कर रही 
जी हां, जिम। यही वो है जो हमने आपको कल रात बड़े परीक्षण के बाद दिया था, और हम इसे अपने द्वारा संशोधित करके इस्तेमाल करेंगे। हमने इसे सिम्युलेटर में आजमाया था, और ज़ाहिर है, कोई गड़बड़ नहीं हुई, लेकिन पिच और रोल में दरों को शून्य करके और ACS को यॉ में ऐसा करने देकर यह काफी अच्छा काम करता हुआ प्रतीत हुआ। आप त्रुटि सुइयों को देखकर दरों को श
腕を何本か折った
Roger, we will get all that together for you in j
ロ
휴스턴, 다음에 기회가 되면 한번 시도해 보겠습니다. 점심 식
コロンビア、ヒューストン。イーグルと話したって聞いたよ。今はイーグルと通信
И мы хотели бы получить от вас подтверждение. У нас есть канал связи с вектором состояния. После этого мы хотел
जेमिनी 4, कैनरी कैप 
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Diese hohen Verstärkungswinkel entsprechen einer Neigung von minus 70 Grad und eine
نيل، ه
ठीक है। "क्रिसमस से एक रात पहले, अंतरिक्ष में बहुत दूर, अपोलो 8 के दल ने चंद्रमा की दौड़ जीत ली थी; हेडसेट कंसोल पर सावधानी से लटक
У вас есть данные
Ici, toutes le
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। मध्यमार्ग सुधार संख्या 2। SPS/G&N 63059, प्लस 097, माइनस 020, इग्निशन 02644 5792, प्लस 00118, माइनस 00003, प्लस 00177, रोल 277 355 015, ब्लॉक अनुपलब्ध है, डेल्टा-VT 00213 003 00168, सेक्स्टेंट तारा 30 2082 370। शेष पैड अनुपलब्ध है। संरेखण: वेगा और डेनेब। रोल संरेखण 007 144 068। कोई उलेज नहीं। वजन: 33302। आपकी जानकारी
阿波罗11号，这里是休
아,
Going over the insertion checklist now. D-c volts is main. Retromanual fuse switch is off. Retromanual is off. All instruments are. All batteries okay. The a-c power is good. The, let's see, wher
もちろんです。フランクに何
एटीट्यूड लाइट स्विच ब्रेकर चालू है
Hawaii, did you get an answer on
Roger. Parfait, Gus. Le toboggan est magnifique. Je 
Apollo 8
अपोलो 8, आवाज़ एक
Ich werde I
Мы ориентируемся на горизонтальну
알겠습니다. 음성으로 업링크를 확인해 보겠습니다. TV 방송 내용은 골드스
I don't h
好
자, 잠시 기다려 주세요. 타이머를 설정하는 동안 잠시 기다려 주시면 됩니다. 2분
La rentrée atmosphérique se déroule plutôt bien. L'amortissement auxiliaire semble bien contrôler les oscillat
ええ、そうですね。スポーツ面は、あまり動きがありません。UCLAは両方のバスケットボールの投票でトップです。もし何か特定のチームについて聞きたいことがあれば、教えてください。どちらの投票でもトップ10に入っているかどうかお教えします。明日行われる大学オールスターゲーム、ノースチームに関しては、
أبولو 8، هذه هيوست
Ken, just recap a little explanation here on your maneuver, something which I'm 
我有个问题想问一下
그리고 버즈, AOS에서의 S 밴드 
D'accord. Faites pivoter le vaisseau 
Not at the
رو
了解。宇宙船とのテストランデブーは午前5時、ヨー角0、ピッチ角5.
Ho detto che Jim ha rovesciato inavvertitamente un po' di quel cloro e per un po' qui
好的。我想我还
ر
11، يقول خبير الجيولوجيا الودود إن المشكلة تكمن في عطل الكاميرا - عفواً، في كاميرا الـ 1
C'est ce que ça semble être; à moins que ce ne soit qu'une traînée brun fo
로저. 첫 번째 기준점은 명암 경계선 바로 근처에 있는데, 관측 장비가 그 지점을 추적하는 동안 해가 뜨는 모습을 볼 수 있었습니다. 일출 약 2분 전쯤에 해의 가장자리가 마치 하얀 안개처럼 밝아지기 시작하는데, 가장자리 바로 뒤쪽 공간 전체에 걸쳐 옅은 빛이 감도는 것을 
Okay, dank
روجر. مجرد تذكير، نريد التأكد من إب
На то, чтобы оно поднялось, потребовалось 49 с половиной секунд. Посмотрим, смогу ли
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 몇 분 전까지만 해도 데이터가 정확했는데, 그 이후로 반경 벡터 방향으로 계속 아래쪽으로 이동하고 있습니다. 여러 차례 하강 최
Понял. 
好的。我会在88小时后给你一个破解方法。那还需要
روجر، أبولو ١١. لدينا ليزر سنقوم بتشغيله وإطفائه - إنه ليزر أزرق مخضر - بتردد ن
,. You are looking good here on the ground. If you have any further c
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। पुष्टि करें कि बैटरी बी का प्रदर्शन थोड़ा कम है, और इसका कारण उस पर मौजूद परजीवी भार 
Брюс, я должен упомянуть, что когда я переключился с вторичного водоотделителя на вторичный, я не заметил никаких изменений. Но примерно через 15 или 20 минут вода перестала вытека
알겠습니다, 빌. 
잭, 제가 제대로 
了解。ブロック内です。新しい状態ベクトルと2つのターゲットロードはテレビの合間に用意してもらえまし
Roger.
أود أن أشير إلى أنه في الساعة 3:26:33، رأيت في السماء، في أي وقت، 10 جسيمات. لا شك أنها تبدو متوهجة. بدت لي كقطع صغيرة من الصقيع. مع ذلك، يبدو أن بعضها بعيد جدًا. هناك جسيمان يبدوان على بعد حوالي 100 ياردة. لم أشغل المحرك النفاث منذ فترة. ها هما اثنان أقرب. الآن قراءة مقياس الكثا
彼が起
Okay.
Ok. La temperatura del tuo modulo di servizio Quad Bravo è leggermente bassa. Sembra circa 20 gradi in meno, inferiore a quella del resto dei quad. Puoi confermare che l'interruttore del riscaldamento del
了解しました、ジム。彼のアンペア数は？読み上げてくれた
Похоже, в ка
मुझे उम्मीद है कि आप देख रहे होंगे कि मुझे इसे जमीन में कितनी 
Roger, 11. Les corrections de trajectoire en milieu de vol sont données à titre indicatif, mais la correction 4 en milieu de vol a diminué d'environ 0,6 mètre par seconde. De même, concernant la pression dans la chambre, il semble que vo
Que pensez-vous de cette configuration de circuit? Vanne de dérivation du réservoir d
Роджер, раз
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。このテレビ番組のリクエストについては、もう一度試して
你好，印度通信技术公司，Aurora Seven。声
화재 전에는 66%였는데, 지금은
Das ist bestätigt. Wir sind jetzt wie
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Moins d'une minute ava
Okay. So
陰性です。この燃焼では37%に達していないので、その手順は不要だと思います。確認させていただきます。了解
阿波罗11
أبولو 11، هيوستن. انتهى
ठी
좋아요
そして、ヒューストン、今のところ、十
MAIN A では、Charlie 1、2、3、4 をお願いします。また、Bravo 3 と 4 も MAIN A にお願いします
Нет, конечно. Я пытался зафиксировать время, 16:65,
Okay. Ich mache noch ein gutes Foto von dem, was 
Il Delta-V è 42,5; durata 53 secondi; imbardata - correzione - beccheggi
ジェミニ4、ハワ
Apollo 8, this is Houston. What we're doing right now is collecting baseline data, and we'll be in this mode for another couple of minutes and then we'll be moving out to the second
ठीक है। क्या आपको वाहन को नियंत्रित करने में कोई परेशानी हुई, और आपने इसके लिए कौन सी तकनीकें अप
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Die Kapsel scheint intakt zu sein, aber ich glaube, wir sind in Gierrichtung abgedrifte
D'accord. Essayons-en une autre, un peu mieux centrée. En fait, la seul
Роджер, Фрэнк. Ваше обновление данных о блоках за 51 час будет пропущено. Имеющиеся у вас данные о блоках удовлетворительны. Конец
음, 그 일에 대해서는 그들에게 말해야겠네요. 언제 정전됐는지 모르겠어요. 저는 불빛을 전혀 
了解。フレンドシップ・セブン。血圧を測ります。カプセ
D'accord. Si nous avons abordé ce point dans le plan de vol, c'est parce que, si vous souhaitez tenter un vol en piqué ou quelque chose de similaire, nous pouvons aider Bill à optimiser ses prises de vue en lui fournissant de nouveaux réglages de film, par exemple. Nous aurons ce type de ressources à disposition; au cas où vous effectueriez un vol en pi
33초였네
Good readback, Aquarius. We'll - To get those needles on the, we got to power up the commander's. We'll have that procedure for you short
フレンドシップ・セブン、フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはザンジバル・コム・テック。HF UHFを送信中。弱くて
はい、まずはRetro Jettison ARMです。Jettison Retroです。Jettison RetroはGuaymasに報告してください
こちらに戻ります。P 窓の前。P 計器盤の前。P 床に降ります。C もし必要な実験があれば… P D-8は現在オフです。今回の
هل
Это подтверждается. Повторюсь, мы скопировали плюс X
罗杰。今天早上关于阿波罗计划的新闻头条中，有一条提醒大家留意一位带着大兔子的美丽少女。古老的传说中，一位名叫嫦娥的美丽中国少女已经在月球上生活了4000年。据说她因为偷了丈夫的长生不老药而被流放到月球。你也可以留意一下她的伙伴——一只体型硕大的中国兔子，它很容易辨认，因为它总是站在
Bien reçu, Gemin
Housto
Oh, nevica. No, no, non proprio. Le finestre sono in pessime condizioni, e immagino che il modulo di serviz
حسنًا. الأمر الآخر هو ما بعد الهبوط. نؤكد مجددًا على ضرورة ألا تتجاوز مدة وجودك في المركبة الفضائية ساعة واحدة. يمكنك خلع بدلاتك الفضائية متى شئت، بشرط عدم
Okay. Looking on entry 1: the second item there is the 12-hour Kelvin cold soak, and in discussions I here and preflight, I think it is agreed that we don't want to do the cold soak there. So we are going to delete that step 2. And what it amounts
C'è parecchia nuvolosità in questa zona. Riesco a vedere, come previsto, solo alcune zone. Riesco a vedere parecchio vers
Non, attendez une 
هناك غطاء سحابي كث
This is Friendship Seven. Auto Retro-jettison is off. mode selector is normal, rate command, gyro normal. All "T" handles are in except manual, and it is out. I am controlling manually at present time. Landing Bag switch is 
Die Steuerung funktioniert bisher hervorragend. Sehr gut, bisher keinerlei Probleme mit der Steueru
당신의 TR은 아주 훌륭합니다
It's the "Verify that the heaters have been in AUTO for 15 minutes." Back on the first page of this procedure, you put the heaters in AUTO and you pushed the breakers in, and we'd like for them to warm up the quads fo
Apollo 8, this is Houston. I hadn't said anything at that time. We're digging some angles out for you now. In reference to your earlier question about the sleep cycle juggling and so we agree with your comment. We would like to get back on the flight plan as far as the sleep cycles and so forth are concerned by the time we get into lunar orbit. So we'd like for you to use your own judgment about the most efficient way to accommodate the sleep cycles and proportion it up among yourselves. We would like to have you keep us informed of who's doing what and what your plans are. We have the one that we had slipped 2 hours. We'd like to get the other one in. We ca
रॉजर। थोड़ी देर में 
रॉजर, यह
... - 13؛ تحرير المفتاح؛ المتابعة. 4 13 -... كان ينب
Okay, 
Roger. Merci, Bruce. Un dernier point concernant le de
Roger, Fr
روجر. أعد التشغيل وسيضيء م
Хорошо. На панели 16 автоматический выключатель: два контакта питания батареи разомкнуты; теперь вам нужно очень внимательно прислушаться к высокому и низкому напряже
ROT CONTROL POWER, NORMAL, n
Apollo 8, Apollo 8. N
सुप्रभात, जिम। सुबह के लगभग 6:30 बज रहे
D'accord. Attendez, je v
さて、これをやった後、パネル 8、SEQUENTIAL、PY
Nicht viel, aber
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。收到。我再念一遍。点火按时完成，耗时4分6
Comment est
문제될 건 없다고 생각합니다. 수량 측정 스위치를 켜두시고 앞으로 몇 시간 동안 켜진 상태로 두시면 상황을 파악하는 데 도움이 될 것 같습니다. 지난 몇 시간 동안 사용하신 속도로도 문제없겠지만, 사용에 불편함이 없도록 제어 방법을 찾고 싶습니다. 그래서
ठीक है। ऐसा लगता है कि उसने इस समय कैमरा हिला
Да. Это будет переключатель, не та
オーケー。3Gを検知しています。今回は再突入時のダンピングチ
Okay, Jack, ich bin wieder am Apparat. Auf dem S-Band soll ich Sender/Empfänger und di
Je vais démarrer le chronomètre GMT selon votre m
我可以像使用M-3训练器那样使用这个
Okay. Ich habe den Anstellwinkel jetzt auf etwa 180 Grad erhöht. Soll ich für die Ausrichtung di
알겠습니다. 제가 가지고 있는 것만 알려드리는 게 더 쉬울 것 같네요. 11번 라인의 맨 위 줄에는 AC 버스 타이 브레이커 4개와 AC 버스 전압 브레이커가 있습니다. 두 번째 줄에는 TCA 브레이커 4개가 있고, 비행 디스플레이와 커맨더 아래에 GASTA가 있습니다. 마찬가지로 AC 버스 A 아래에도 GASTA와 커맨더 브레이커가 있습니다. 이게 전부입니다. 세 번째 줄에는 신호 조절기 1, ATCA(PGNS), 엔진 제어 브레이커, 자세 직접 제어 
情况好多了。你现在大概在1点或2点钟方向。好多了。再往那个方向移动一点。你现在在3点钟方向了。我们看到的大概是你看到的一半。太多了。它
अगर आप इसे अंदर ले जा सकते हैं तो 
— По всей видимости, наблюдается тенденци
Ricev
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houst
यूरी अलेक्सेयेविच, हम अभी इस रेडियो स्टेशन को बंकर में ले जा रहे हैं। इसलिए चैनल पर 5 मिनट का मौन रहेगा। निकोले पेट्रोविच और पावेल रोमानोविच बंकर में जा रहे हैं। मै
Несколько дополнительных замечаний: пожалуйста, прекратите зарядку батареи B на данный момент; также просим вас перемешать все четыре батареи в криогенной камере в течение 2 минут; и переведите переключатель телеметрии U
네, 모든 게 정말 마음에 들어요. 모든 걸 멈추고 그 슈트 회로를 구했는데, 그게 문제를
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。レベルセンサーアームは8度プラス17度、アウトボードカットオフは
Houston, quello che vedi al centro dello schermo ora è il cratere Schubert e Gilbert U, che si trova al centro in questo momento; e questo avviene circa - poco più di 12 minuti prima della discesa di potenza. Invec
他们给了我们一个新
Хорошо, 13; Хьюстон. Исправление. Вы можете прибыть в сентябре в указанное в
Okay, Housto
Wir sollten in Kürze wieder im Tageslicht stehen. Ist dann a
알겠습니다. 6페이지는 지우고 7페이지
रॉजर, स्कॉट। मैं ड्रिफ्टिंग मोड में हूँ, लेकिन मैंने एयर कंडीशनिंग बस चालू कर दी है। यह बहुत अच्छे से काम कर रही है। मैं बीकन बाद में चालू करूँगा। कंट्रोल मोड फ्लाई-बाय-वायर चुना गया है, हालाँकि मैं अभी इसे नियंत्रित नहीं कर रहा हूँ। ऑटो स्विच ऑटो पर है, जाइरो स्विच अभी भी बंद है। रीएंट्री एटीट्यूड चुना गया है, मैन्यूवर बंद है। सभी माप हरे रंग में हैं। सूट का तापमान लगभग 60 डिग्री है। मुझ
Wie bitte? – Hat er es etwa falsch herum ei
Die Lukenschlösser sind offen
请保持 UP 数据链路畅通。我们需要您连
That's affirm. On t
ठीक है। अब बारी है, कोलंबिया की। हम आपको थोड़ा व्यस्त रखेंगे। जैसे ही हमें राज्य का वेक्टर मिल जाएगा, हम चाहेंगे कि आप इस नाइट पास पर ऑप्शन 3 का इस्तेमाल करें, और फिर जब आप दूसरी तरफ से घूमकर आएंगे, तो हम आपको प्राइम 130 पर कुछ लैंडमार्क ट्रैकिंग जानक
Может быть, вам стоит просто
Okay. Die Brenndauer wird voraussichtlich unter einer Minute liegen. Wir möchten, dass Sie die Abschaltung zeitbasiert v
Affermati
Hai detto che ti piacerebbe alzarti e cammin
Nous avons reçu des félic
我敢肯定查尔斯沃思脸上带
はい。それをテープ
好
Jim, Charlie e altri hanno provato questo nel simulatore, e quello che consigliano è di azzerare le tariffe sugl
你现
了解。ハイゲインに
Fragen Sie doch mal, wie viele Gallonen Treibstoff wir verbraucht habe
Roger. Hier sieht al
Interesting
Хорошо. Подождите. Кажется, мы здесь тоже используе
我刚刚完成了对16-A目标的飞行。巴士拉机场就在波斯湾边上。我先发现了波斯湾，大概以30°的角度发现了它……然后我俯冲下去，接着发现了波斯湾西北方向的湖泊。巴士拉就在湖边，离湖很近，所以可以直接飞过去，很快就能发现机场。因此，我在到达目标之前就已经发现了机场，然后开始跟踪
al
Хорошо. плюс 25, и это будет /. 63087, минус
हां, क्यों न हम सीधे-सीधे कह दें कि अगर हमें कोई समस्या आती है, जैसे कि जब इसे समस्या का पता लगाना चाहिए तब यह उसे नहीं पकड़ता, तो हम एक बार कोशिश करके देखेंगे, और फिर आपको ओम्नी के माध्यम से कॉल करेंगे या अपनी स्थिति स
على حد علمي الآن، س
وهيوستن، أعتقد أننا سنفعل هذا في وضع الانحراف، وهل تريد إ
Apollo 8, Houston. The dump is complete; you can have your computer back. The reason for the dump was to investigate further the anomaly you had about 4 hours ago. We will try to have so
रॉजर। मील डी को पूरी तरह समझ लो, फिर तुम अ
フレ
我
Okay. You want t
マイナス Z ストラットに戻りました。*** 実際に与えた
マイク、NAVの観測結果について興味深い見解があります。帰還時に最小インパルス制御器で操縦するのは、燃料が不足しているため、出発時よりもずっと困難です。小さなパルス一つ一つが、宇宙船を実際に動かしてしま
저게 어떻게 저기에 들어갔는지 상상도 안 가네. 할
... Blick
Так что проблем нет. У вас все расходные материалы в норме. Что касается проблемы с водородным баком, у нас есть процедура, которую мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили: просто в
Canton Com Tech, Aurora
We
알겠습
इंटेलसैट 63 देशों का एक अंतरराष्ट्रीय संचार संघ है; यह पहले वैश्विक संचार नेटवर्क का चार्ट प्रदान करता है। नए उपग्रह की पू
यह बेहतर है। चलिए, हम आपको बताते हैं कि हमारे पास क्या है। हमारे पास वही है जो उनके पास उड़ान योजना में था, और यदि उस
La pressione del serbatoio sembra corretta
네, 8. 저희는 여기서 간단한 현장 테스트를 진행하여 테이프를 전송하고 음성 부분을 제때 휴스턴으로 가져올 수 있는지 확인하려고 합니다. 테이프를 전송한 후, 현장에서 전송 절차를 테스트하여 음성을 들어보겠습니다. 마지막 전송 이후에 덮어쓰기 녹음을 하지 않으셨다면, 테이프에 이미 내용이 녹음되어 있을 것으로 예상합니다. 확실히 하기 위해 간단히 몇 마디 말씀해 주시거나, 짧은 카운트다운을 해 주시거나, 그 외에 녹음하고 싶은 내용이 있으면 말씀해 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 마드리드를 떠나기 전 5분 안에 이 테스트를 진행할 예정입니다. 마드리드가 저희가 테스트
كنتُ أُعلّق فقط - لقد كنتُ أُلقي نظرةً على مُحركات الدفع في الروبوتين الرباعيين 1 و4. لدينا تغيّر طفيف في لون الجزء الخارجي من الأسطوانة. تبدو الفوهات وكأنها لم تُستخدم قط، وكأنها جديدة تمامًا... مثل تل
ロジ
好的。在 250 号面板上：断路器 BA
Roger. Il tuo radiatore ora è in FLUSSO. In attesa. Banda C 
11
Loud and clear. I woke up about 30 or 40 minutes ago and then - actually I didn't wake up right then - just sort of sitting there resting. I really haven't been having much luck sleeping. I had a drink of water when I first woke up, about 5 gulps. Then I had another one ther
罗杰。休斯顿，哥伦比亚。正常；无需换乘。一切都很顺利，
そして、アポロ13号。デッドバンドを5度まで広げ
روجر، كانتون. حسنًا، سأقدم لك تقريرًا موجزًا. أنا في وضع الرجوع ال
Okay, Houston, we're going to do the pressurization an
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, this is Zanzibar Com Tech transmitti
يا هيوستن، يبدو ضوء الأرض كما هو متوقع. ليس بنفس دقة التفاصيل الموجود
Ed dormait. Je n'avais personne à qui parler et c'était plutôt ca
후방 오염과 전방 오염에 대해 사람들이 알게 될 때까지 기다려 보세
Это подтверждается, и после завершения верните
You have a valid 48-1 
Era Gemini VII, e sono sicuro che li abbiano visti da quella distanza
J'ai un horizon très dégagé maintenant. Il fait assez clair et l'horizon est principalement composé de nuages. Je peux voir les étoiles qui commencent à disparaître dans la lueur atmosphérique, mais les nuages ​​donnent à l'horizon un aspect plus clair. Il me semble que ce n'est pas le cas. Plus tôt dans le vol, nous avons vu un horizon sans nuages, beaucoup plus clair: c'était une épaisse couche de brume qui laissait apparaître les étoiles lorsqu'elles disparaissaient. Avec cet horizon nuageux, les étoiles sont plus difficiles à distinguer; je remarque cependant que certaine
En suivant la voie tra
Р
Si
जेमिनी VIII
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们在戈德斯通已经准备好电视转播了。节目会在戈德斯通录制，然后在这里重播，尼尔，你想什么时候打开电
ちょっと待って。ビ
Grazie, e l'o
Jim, la zone morte est 
好的。接下来，第二、三、四、五、六项都一样，然后
そうだね、ジャック。その件に
Okay. Ich gebe Ihnen einfach, was ich habe. In der obersten Reihe 11 befinden sich die vier AC-BUS-TIE-Leistungsschalter und der AC-BUS-VOLTS-Leistungsschalter. Das war's. In der zweiten Reihe befinden sich die vier TCA-Leistungsschalter. Unter FLIGHT DISPLAYS und COMMANDER befindet sich GASTA. Unter AC BUS A befinden sich ebenfalls GASTA und COMMANDER. Das war's. In der dritten Reihe befindet sich SIGNAL CONDITIONER 1. Außerdem ist ATCA (PGNS) angeschlossen. Weiterhin befinden sich der ENGINE CONTROL-Leistungsschalter, der ATTITUDE DIRECT CONTROL-Leistungsschalter und der unter LIGHTING der ANUN/DOCK/COMPONENT-Leistungsschalter. Zusätzlich ist ED LOG
好的，我们
It'
현재 유량은 0
Ricevu
فريد، قد يكون هذا خللاً في البيانات. لقد عاد المعدل إلى طبيعته؛ وسنراقبه عن كثب، لكننا لا نعتقد أنه يجب عليك القلق بشأنه 
프레드, 파편이 좀 보이네요. 부스터 자체가 좀
Тот самый парень, котор
I am faced the wrong way and limited in maneuverability I have left because of my fuel state. I can see the terminator between moonlit side, and unmoonlit side. O
AR에서 모드 선택을 확인
Okay. Das gilt für den Vorbeiflug und das Perizynthium-Update (2-Stunden-Block). Wir benötigen außerdem einen aktuellen Bericht über den Zustand aller Ihrer Fenster. Wir arbeiten an alternativen Plänen für die Nutzung des mittleren Lukenfensters im Mondorbit und möchten
How about that! Did you read that area, Elliot? Atti
ヒューストン、コロンビア。最初の通過が近づいてきています。その時は月着陸船が見えるかもしれません。地形的なヒントがあれば教えてください。自動光学
Houston, Apollo 1
And mine's about 5800
ठी
わかりました、ヴァンス。基本的に、映画撮影用のカメラとして使いたいのは、パワーパックに取り付けられた月面シーケンスカメラです。18ミリレンズ、8秒、250分の1秒で
حسنًا. لم تستقر الأمور تمامًا بعد. انزل إلى اليمين قليلًا.
실례합니다
Nur zu, W
아, 로저, 잔지바르 캡콤입니다. 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 모든 퓨즈는 이전에 보고된 대로 그대로입니다. 아무것도 변경하지 않았습니다. 스퀴브는 작동 준비 완료입니다. 자동 역추진은 꺼져 있습니다. 모든 "T" 핸들은 정상입니다. 역추진 지연
Housquin - Housto
ठीक है, जैसा कि आप जानते हैं, कंट्रोल मोड ड्रिफ्टिंग के लिए सेट किया गया है। चुना गया मोड नॉर्मल, ऑटो, जायरो केज्ड है। मैंने
好的，杰克。看来我们已经把所有细节都解决了。
Хорошо, Водолей. Следующий шаг — возьмите внутренний пакет, который вы разрезали, и наденьте его
Houston, Columbia è in OMNI C, Charlie, VOCE DI RITORNO GIÙ e, quando puoi, potresti cercarmi le coordinate del 130, per favore? Ho informazioni contrastanti tra la mia scheda di smistamento e il mio piano di vo
Роджер. Читаю тебя пятью куска
Apollo 8, Houston. We've got you about a minute away
... ce l'abbiamo per te, ma vogliamo darci una sistemata qui dentro; rintracciarlo dimostra solo che siamo in grado di incontrarci, e lo abbiamo fatto. Vorremmo stivare la cabina di pilotaggio 
تم
Roger, schal
Non 
Apollo 
좋습니다. 이제 이 부분은 이미 표시해 두셨으니, 제가 지금 드리는 내용은 이전에 표시해 두신 체크리스트에 추가되는 변경 사항(DELTA)을 나타냅니
Roger. Controlleremo questo uplink sulla nostra voce. Quella trasmissione sulla TV era... Vorremmo avere circa 10 minuti di segnale a Goldstone, così da poter vedere la qualità della telecamera qui a Houston per circa 10 minuti quando ce la ricollegano. Quello che stavamo dicendo 
この時点で、確かに約 5 度の右ロールが見られます。また、潜望鏡が暗いことに気付きました。これは、ダークサイドに近づいていることを意味します。潜望鏡を通して変化がないか観察してみます。現時点では、少なくともこの姿勢では、夜間観測用の潜望鏡を通して何も見えません。レバーの位置以外、低視度になったときもわかりません。
रॉजर, माइक। आपकी श्वसन दर का ग्राफ अभी भी स्थिर है। अगर आज शाम सोने से पहले आपके पास समय हो, तो हम सुझाव देंगे कि आप अपनी निचली पसलियो
좋아요, 켄. 다시 본론으로 돌아가서, 첫 번째 롤에서 고이득 REACQ 테스트를 바로 진행해 볼까요
هذا صحيح. سنجري فحصًا سريعًا للاتصالات بعد انتهائك لن
了解。フラ
Хорошо, Джим, на этом наша процедура отключения питания зав
Ok. Dicono che questo passaggio che ti ho appena spiegato sia un po' complicato. 
ヒューストン、ジェミニVI
أبولو 8، هيوستن. أطفئ جهازك، وسننتقل إلى مع
Questo è un
Хорошо. П
Продолжая свой рассказ о начале полета, после того как мы вошли в темноту, на высоте, которую я считаю 1200 футов, я попытался удерживать позицию относительно ракеты-носителя, но единственным критерием, по которому я мог судить в тот момент, было расстояние между мигающими огнями. Время от времени они появлялись – не время от времени, а постоянно, – я видел один огонь, потом два, потом снова один, а иногда проходило много времени, прежде чем я видел два огня, что указывало на постоянное вращение ракеты-носителя. Я действительно не 
Ich habe keine Ahnung, wo wir den Fehler gefunden haben, Vance. Ich habe doch gerade gesagt, dass wir die Prozedur genau wie beschrieben dur
Can you verify that you got the state vectors transferre
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन। आप विमानवाह
سيجما سفن. لم أفهم الرسالة الأخيرة، لكنني أفترض أنك قرأت أنه يجب أن يكون مفتاح UHF/DF في وضع R/T. ليس لدي أي معلومات عن استعادة الطائرة بعد الهبوط حاليًا، لكنني سأبلغك
Okay, Aquarius. The last pad I had for yo
E giusto per ricordarlo, non dimenticate il nostro problema di stivaggio. Dobbiam
了解しました。55パーセントです。温度と圧力を教えていただけますか
好的。时间32小时00分钟。完成操作后，进行以下姿态机动：滚转101.0，俯仰90.0，偏航000.0。高俯仰-23，偏航93。使用常规程序降低速率。飞行器稳定后，在螺旋桨启动前，拍摄贝内特彗星的照片。使用六分仪上的G型胶片盒。也就是说，使用高速黑白胶片，对吧？这是弱光胶片。拍摄三张照片，曝光时间分别为5秒、20秒和60秒。使用自动模式。参数值为：R1+34717，R2-08028；R3+35075。使用
О, да, Чарли. Теперь я вижу это через секстант, и я вижу, что береговая линия свободна. Эти облака находятся всего в нескольких милях от побереж
迈克，你现在看到的是——休斯顿，你现在看到的是西半球。往上看——最上方是北极；中间——稍微靠下一点是南美洲——一直延伸到合恩角。我能看到下加利福尼亚半岛和美国西南部。有一大片云带向东北方向延伸，覆盖了墨西哥湾的大部分地区，一直延伸到美国
Okay. Jedes Mal, wenn du sendest, Jack, nimmt die AGC ab und das
D'accord. L'étape suivante est le RETOUR DES GAZ
Okay, beim letzten Überflug haben wir etwa 38 Bilder mit der Synoptic Terrain Photography aufgenommen. Wir starteten etwas östlich von San Diego und flogen bis zur nächsten Wolkendecke. Sobald wir den südlichen Teil der USA überflogen, machten wir wieder sporadisch Aufnahmen, genauer gesagt die Gegend um Alabama und Missis
それ
Vance, si mes calculs sont bons, nous avons pris une dizaine de photos depuis la fenêtre terrestre. Je ne prévois rien d'autre à signaler que de fermer la
Roger, Bill. Danke. Könntet ihr uns bei Gelegenheit die Deutung geben? Und was das angeht, i
这里的人都笑逐颜开，就连战壕里的人也一样
Этот COMM был настольк
ठीक है, आप उन्हें बता सकते हैं कि, अगर उन्होंने इसके बारे में नहीं सोचा था, तो हमारे प
사실, 방금 그건 정정입니다. 아직 내려오지 않았어요. 그냥 그쪽으로 가고 있는 중입니다. 제 제어 모드에 대해 간략하게 설명드리겠습니다. 자동 모드이고, 바이패스 스위치는 정상이며, 기동은 꺼
Роджер. Понял. Полагаю, сейчас самое время перекусить
Фотоподсветка выключена. В этот момент свет в салоне загорится красным. О, боже, какой широкий, прекрасный, прекрасный красный свет, как на фотографиях Джона. Переключимся на
Okay, Jim. So we want to get t
Хьюстон, Колумбия. С
Ok. Abbiamo provato entrambe le cose. Se l'interruttore è inserito quando resetto il dispositivo, metto il dispositivo in RESET e ottengo 902 04 40. Quando lo rilascio, ottengo 902 04 49. Farò ripartire l'
जेमिनी VI, हवाई कैप कॉम। जा
Gemini 
D'a
我不想只
Roger. Parfait. Et comment se passe le repos là-haut? As-tu eu l'occasion de te lover sur le pot d'échappement
ठीक है, जिम। हम इस विषय पर आपसे बात करना चाहते थे। हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं, और हमारा मानना ​​है कि - बेशक, यह आप पर निर्भर करता है, लेकिन इसके फायदे और नुकसान को देखते हुए, आपने फायदे पर ध्यान दिया है। हम EI माइनस 1 घंटे से ठीक पहले हैच की अखंडता की जांच करते हैं, और अगर यह खराब हो जाता है, तो आपको सूट पहनने में काफी मुश्किल होगी। द
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. لم أُعانِ من أي آثار جانبية حتى الآن من انعدام الجاذبية. بل على العكس، إنه شعورٌ مريحٌ للغاية. حدة البصر لا تزال ممتازة. لا توجد أي آثار لانحراف العين. لم تُسبب حركات الرأس أي غثيان أو انزعاج على الإ
C'est exact. C
Sì. Vorremmo poterti inviare un kit, sarebbe un po' come assemblare un modellino di aero
Term
Okay, Apollo 8. That is f
「-- DELTA-VXが最終DELTA-VXに等しい場合」という行を削除。「姿勢制御：ヨー、パルス」も削除。「Y、Z変換による過度な速度の減衰」を訂正し、その時点で「Null」エラー針
र
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie sind noch 4 Minuten und 40 Sekunden entfernt. Ich möchte
هناك أمر آخر قد ترغب في أن يلقي أحدهم نظرة عليه - لا أريد إزعاج الرجال في الطابق العلوي - خرطوم التصريف الموجود في وحدة التحكم، أتساءل عما إذا كان بإمكاننا مع
और
Ja. Dann sollten wir es den EECOMMs sage
هذا 
Das ist richtig. Und der Schutzschalter VORSIC
アポロ11号、ヒュー
Roger, Houston. That's what we're trying to do. I'm trying to get 15 for an optics. It's been very difficult with the bright earth to find a star that we can get into the sextant. I'm trying to use
わかりました。燃焼状態: DELTA-TIG はゼロ、燃焼時間は 2 + 30 でした。PAD 角度: トリム後の DELTA VGX は 0.1、VG
当然。体育版上没什么特别的。加州大学洛
휴스턴과 교신이 닿자마자 S-5 사진을 찍었는데, 로그를 남길 수
——五个球
Восход солнца над западным побережьем. Довольно разочаровывающе, потому что небо почти полностью затянуто облаками и смогом. По мере приближения к береговой линии я вижу просветы. Когда-нибудь мне удастся перел
अगला पृष्ठ, पृष्ठ 15, बाएँ कॉलम में, या कहें कि बाईं ओर, नीचे की ओर, जहाँ "कैमरा और टेप कॉन्फ़िगर करें" लिखा है और नीचे "डार्क स्लाइड बदलें" तक जाता है। बस वहाँ यह टिप्पणी लिख दें, "सौ
Jim, you 
ألا تعلم؟ يبدو أنك في جنوب شرق طرف فلوريدا تقريبًا
罗杰
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous vous demandons de choisir l'option 1 et de vous positionner comme indiqué dans le plan de vol à 12 heures. Mike, veuillez c
अगर मैं सही-सही बता सकूँ तो ईंधन
分かりました。ステップ7。ブレーカーパネル11、ACバスB、ヘリウムガス圧力表示、閉。メイン - ブレー
알겠습니다. 39.3과 1.20을 복사합니다. 그리고 짐, 알려드릴 정보가 하나 더 있습니다. 약 45분 후에 하강 탱크에 H2O 수량 경고등이 켜질 겁니다. 이는 예상되는 현상이며, 16%에서 발생합니다. 탱크를 완전히 비울 때까지 훈련을 진행할 예정이므로 문제될 것은 없습니다. 경고등을 리셋하려면 2번 패널의 O2 H2O 수량 모니터를 주의/경고 리셋 위치로 설정하면 됩니다. 그러면 경고등이 
好吧，我会按我自己的理解来读，而不是按服务工程部报告（SEDR）那帮家伙的方式。我又开始看到那些熟悉的“萤火虫”了。约翰大概松了口气吧。
Roger. T2: 102 54 2900 
Сейчас здесь, наверху, всё идёт довольно хорошо. Джим уснул... поспал четыре часа. Я тоже хорошо отдохнул и готовлюсь к ужину из ростбифа и кукурузы
ह्यूस्टन, यह 8 है। मैं स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप के माध्यम से
Purging fuel cell
Columbia,
Итак, вы видите, что из окна 1 выходит вентиляционное отверстие, и вы заметили кусок металла размером 4 на 4 дюйма, серебристого цвета, и... Вы все еще видите вентиляционное отверстие или 
Okay, I have some instructions for you. Okay, you can power up. I would like to bring your computer up, and bring you up to power, and bring your radar up to standby; after 5 minutes turn radar on and copy radar readings every 10 minutes, bet
و
حسنًا، ما هي الأرقام التي نستخ
알았어, 
Ich habe alles außer dem Startcompute
Alright. We w
فهم؛ النجمة 31، الدوران 184 7، الميل 23 4، الانحراف 14 3، وعمود النجمة 
아니요, 
好的。这次有点不一样。当我读ΔV时，前两个数字代表前方，后两个数字代表后方。ΔT也是一样，
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. أسمعك بوضوح تام. تأكد من أن مفتاح لوحة التحكم 
알겠습니다. 지상 카메라를 1/250초, 조리개 값 4, 5.6, 8로 설정해서 촬영해 보세요. 저는 5.6과 8 사이에서 꽤 많은 촬영을 해왔고, 11에서도 몇 번 촬영했으니 
不，现在没必要那样
هيا يا
ठीक है। कल रात प्राइमरी में 15 तक गए थे, इससे पहले कि मैं
Гава
La capsule fonctionne parfaitement pour le moment. 250 (onduleur) correspond à 132 degrés, 150 (onduleur) à 5. En veille (onduleur), la températur
わかりました。テレメトリコマンドを通常に
Okay. The - I need to find out if the condensate container that we were going to use to strain some water
Определенно, он был подо мной. Я следил за ним примерно с Карнарвона. До Карнарвона он был ниже нас, затем поднялся к горизонту, а потом снова опустился ниже. Казалось, что он находится на другой орбите, чем я. У него были другие апогей и перигей, чем у меня. В любом случае, я попытался сблизиться с ним на рассвете, как только смог определить его местоположение. Как я уже сказал, в тот момент он был в миле или двух передо мной — внизу. Поэтому, чем больше я пытался сблизиться, тем меньше мне удавалось его догнать. Я работал в ретроградном режиме. Я использовал верхние двигатели, чтобы уменьшить общую скорость, и одновременно... тоже. Я так и не сблизился, и он продолжал отдаляться от меня. Мне стало очевидно, что к тому времени, как мы добрались до Гавайев, чтобы сблизиться с ускорителем и совершить выход в открытый космос с его помощью, вероятно, потребуется все имеющееся на борту топливо. В правилах полета мы договорились этого не делать. Я связался с CAP COM, и мы решили отказаться от выполнения части миссии, связанной с ускорителем. Не знаю, упоминал ли я об этом, но когда мы отделились от ускорителя, казалось, что наши показатели тангажа и рыскания были низкими, порядка половины градуса в секунду. Я попытался их сгладить. Я выпустил по одному импульсу в каждом направлении, а затем сосредоточился на отделении от ускорителя. Мы отделились, и отделились так же, как и при других показателях. В конце конц
رو
أكره أن أخبرك يا جيم، لكنني لا أستطيع الت
حسناً، تفضل
Мы – то, как мы здесь разворачиваемся в сторону, Джек – у нас бывают моменты, когда 
Спа
हाँ
... stowing the
Okay. Also, Jack, since we have four-jet ullage versus two, do you want - still want 10 seconds ullage or
Friendship Seven, Frien
हाँ, मैंने सोचा था कि जब तुम सो रहे होगे तो मैं फ़िल्टरों के साथ खूब खेलूंगा। इसके बाद मैं सेक्स्टेंट निकालूंगा और फ़
..
Tu es brisé(e). Combien de gorgées d'eau, s'il te 
ठीक है। उद्देश्य पेरीसिंथियन प्लस 2 घंटे का अबॉर्ट है: प्लस 1633.0, माइनस 0014.5, माइनस 0751.5; अपोजी लागू नहीं है, पेरीजी प्लस 0020.5 है; 1797.7, 8:35, 268, 264, प्लस 16410, माइनस 00145, माइनस 07338 लागू नहीं है। और मेरे पास आपके लिए दो गिम्बल ट्रिम कोण हैं जिन्हें अपडेट किया जाएगा। फिलहाल, हम चाहते
Tut mir leid,
Roger, Gemin
哥伦比亚，
ठीक है, जैक। मैंने क्वाड चार्ली ड्रॉप आइसोलेशन वाल्व को रीसेट करने की योजना नहीं बनाई थी। क्या आप चाहते हैं कि मैं ऐसा करूँ? ठीक है। हमने अभी इसे आज़माया और क्वाड अ
Certains flottent presque à mes côtés. La plupart semblen
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। जब यह चलना शुरू हुआ, तो यह यॉ मोड में चला जाता था और इससे बाकी अक्ष भी बिगड़ जाते थे। यह कुछ देर तक ऐसा ही करता रहा, धीरे-धीरे दाईं ओर झुकता गया और लगभग 20° तक बिगड़ने तक कोई सुधार नहीं हुआ। फिर यह तेज़ी से व
Hey, es schien ziemlich gut zu halten, wenn man es so hinstellte, dass die Linse leicht nach außen zeigte. Dort drüben
जी हां, ह्यूस्टन, बिल्क
Viel
Sigma Seven. Cape Com Tech. Do y
Beh, ne abbiamo discusso a lungo. Abbiamo pensato di prenderci cura della nostra barba domani e di farne un
읽고 
Роджер. В 40 лет: C-Reentry в режим COMMAN
Pression à la source: 1500 bars, température à la source: 60-50 °C. Les deux anneaux RCS sont allumés. Antenne OK. En pha
ह्यूस्टन, क्या
Apollo 11, Hou
そうです、フレッド。アラインメントに関して何かご質問がありましたら、ぜひお知らせください。先ほど説明した地球でのアラインメントと同様に、喜んでお答えいたします。また、このバーンにおいてエラーに関しては、ピッチが最も重要な要素であることはご承知おきください。しかし、先ほども申し上げたように、ピッチはそれほど敏感ではありません
Wir müssen schneller werden. Es steigt schneller an, als wir es 
3時26分33秒に、空に10個の粒子が見えることに気付きました。それらは間違いなく私には輝いて見えます。小さな霜のかけらのように見えました。しかし、中
A
هاواي، هذا هو برج الجوزاء السادس. عن
Okay, non dovremmo scattare altre f
क्वाड ब्रावो, हाँ; प्राथम
Ты отлично выглядишь, Уолли. Мы не видим здесь ни
좋아요, 잘 읽었어요
わかったよ、ジョ
Okay, Houston. Hier 
저기 60개 남았네요. 저 정도면 
ジム、了解。ジャックの言っていることが理解できたと思う。彼にやってほしいのは、コマンド「リセット」を出すことだ。それから電源を切って、ヒーターもオフにして、バッテリーAはオンのままにしておく。以上
حسنًا. لديّ تحديث
حسنًا يا جاك، سنجهز لك لوحة بيانات خلال دقائق. نحن بصدد جمع البيانات الآن، ورغم أننا نتوقع أن تكون التغييرات عن لوحة البيانات الأولية طفيفة جدًا، إلا أننا ننصحك بالانتظار قبل تهيئة
औ
That's affirm. Before I start on the pads, another comment. The general indications that we gave you before about the Sun being in the commander's window and about stars in the, such as that might be used as general indication for your attitude for the burn, that's all out the window. We are just going on the Sun check that we made earlier and we don'
Voyons voir, de c
Roger, Hou
그리고 지금 짐벌 락이 거의 걸린 상태라서, 잠깐 5초 정도 시간을 내
Bene. Questo presuppone che tutti i BAT di discesa siano in linea e che i BAT di 
Roger. Fahren Sie dann mit der Längengradkontrolle für das Verfahren ohn
그 부분은 괜찮은 
Affermativo, Jim. A quanto pare, dopo il passaggio di consegne vo
तो, हम यह जानना चाहेंगे कि पिछले 24 घंटों में क्या किसी को फ्रैंक जैसे लक्षण महसूस हुए हैं? हम यह 
자, 잭. 예전에 다들 달이 지는 걸 몇 분 전에 보는 게 좋다고 했었죠? 아마 도착할 때쯤엔 지평선이 어두울 거예요. 특히 이른 아침에 서쪽에서 진입하면 지평선이 아직 어두울 테니까요. 그래서 지평선을 추적하는 것처럼, 보조적인 방법으로 착륙 패드에 달을 직접 볼 수 있는 자세를 설정해 놓을 겁니다. 이건 관성 자세라서 변하지 않아요. 36도 창선을 달에 맞추고 가만히 앉아서 지켜보면 됩니다. 달이 지기 직전에 지구가 떠오르면서 달을 가릴 
Да, подтверждаю. Не меняйте эти данные;
好的。建议使用 A-13 的 R 弹匣或 S 弹匣。将
Это телеканал Friendship Seven, ведущий передачу вслепую телеканалу Mercury Network из района, расположенного недалеко от восточного побережья над центральной частью Атлантического океана. Проверка з
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on your own, that's the place we'd like to break off and let you go ahead and take over with your own alinement. However, we are giving you a procedure which
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है। मैं फिर से दोहराता हूँ, 05:56 से 06:16 तक। बिना एटीट्यूड फ्
Я только что нашел решение, как сместить долготу посадки на 6 градусов к востоку. Я просто хочу сравнить это с тем, что у них получилось при том же времени работы двигателя,
Roger. And the last addi
Jim, während wir darauf warten, ob weitere Fragen auftauchen, möchte ich dir die vorläufige Analyse der Befürworter zum S-II-Grenzwer
罗杰。我们向您展示一下，手动
Roger. Une dernière remarque: ce sujet ayant suscité de nombreuses controverses lors des réunions sur les priorités de données, il semble qu'une inclinaison de 10 degrés vers le haut soit optimale pour obtenir l'horizon et pouvoir suivre le point de repère à travers le télescop
Ricevuto. Lascialo acceso fino a dopo la combustione del Texas, e poi controlleremo la perdita. Se continua a perdere, ti faremo chiudere l'impianto una v
Okay, Houston. Zur Information der Fernsehzuschauer: Wir haben u
Roger. Taurus, Aida; ich wiederhole, Taurus, Aida. 162 hoch, 1 links, der Rest ist nicht anwendbar. Sirius ausrichten, Rigel 129, 155, 010, negativer Füllstand, Horizontfenster Zündung minus 3 27 Grad, Horizont links. Bei Zündung 18 Grad, Horiz
Roger. Sag es nochmal. Das ist das durchschnittliche G, wie 
待機する
मुझे लगता है कि सबसे तेज़ तरीका है प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट के पहले भाग को, जहाँ नक्शा दिया गया है, पृष्ठ दर पृष्ठ देखन
Okay, Jim. Hier ist ein Update zum Flugplan. Wir haben die Sichtprüfung durchgeführt, und es sieht so aus, als ob Navi immer noch unser Stern ist. D
La temperatura dell'inverter da 250 volt-ampe
背中をやらせてくれ。いいか、この銃があれば
Nur zu, 
Vi abbiamo ascoltato e il problema è concr
Ok. Ho capito che hai visto un tonfo nella fase di discesa e qualche fiocco di neve. Diamo un'occhiata qui sotto
ठीक है, दूसर
Хорошо. Думаю, все представляют космическую программу как сплошную экзотическую электронику, и, конечно, многое из этого так и есть. Но я подумал, что стоит показать здесь пару приборов. После первого прибора вы получите очень точное измерение количества оставшейся воды в контейнере. Мы собираемся использовать этот мешок, который я сейчас показываю, чтобы собрать оставшуюся воду и посмотреть, сколько её у нас действительно осталось, и, надеюсь, в будущих миссиях мы сможем безопасно увеличить допустимое время работы этих устройств ещё немного. А с другой стороны, у меня есть механизм, с помощью которого мы определяем, скольк
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। मुझे लगता है क
РЕЖИМ, ЧАСТОТА 
良好。413020 183，绍拉，向下 064，向左 06，正北 0747，负北 16410 12988 36301；北侧星群，天狼星和参宿七，横滚 308，俯仰 209，偏航 357。备注：使用高速
确认无误。接下来是
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。如果这还不能让您满意，请告知我们。完毕
11, 
Let
فريندشيب سفن، غوايماس كاب كوم، نقرأك بوضوح ت
Roger. That's affirmative... The exerciser is over on the Command Pilot's side and he's 
Hie
Это «Дружба Семь». Автоматический реверсивный сброс выключен. Селектор режимов работает нормально, управление скоростью, гироскоп в норме. Все Т-образные рукоятки включены, кроме ручного управления, которое вык
यह वूमेरा कैप कॉम, सेवन है। सर्जन की रि
Roger. Hier spricht A
고도 조절 연소 직후에 우리 뒤를 따라오는 붉은 물체가 있었습니다. 뒤쪽으로 표류하는 것 같았습니다. 확실히 붉은색입니다.
المركبة الفضائية 0-90-0. حسنًا. لم نفعل ذلك من قبل. لا مشكلة. تمام، لقد أنجزنا
On distingue à peine c
यह अच्छी बात है। कल रात जब 
ठीक है, जैक। 1 बजे
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 
テー
罗杰。听
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили дополнительный маневр; вопрос лишь в том, насколько и в каком направ
11, sa
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 이것은
안녕하세요, 
ماذا ستفعل بأكمامك يا إد؟ هل ما زلت تريد خلع
Apollo 8, Houston. L'aggiornamento del vettore di stato è completo e verificato. Puoi riavere il co
Roger. Wir beantragen eine Abwasserentsorgung von 25:30 auf nominal 25 Prozent. Hier nun das Update zum Verbrauchsmaterial. Nach 22 Stunden beträgt der Gesamtverbrauch minus 3,5 Prozent. Alfa minus 3,5 Prozent, Bravo minus 1,5 Pro
إنها تحاو
ठीक
11, Хьюстон, Мы только что потеряли
Roger
Houston, you're seeing a view of the earth taken below the lunar horizon. We're going to follow a track until the terminator, where we will turn the spacecraft and give you a view of the long shadowed terrain at the terminator, w
자,
मैं वापस अ
Roger. Tout semble fonctionner correctement sur le terrain. C'est tout ce 
Sì, è piuttosto bello. N
Roger. Das ist richtig. Könnten Sie bitt
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston
아폴로 8
अप
双子座 4. 你
في الحقيقة، كان من أجمل المناظر التي رأيتها عندما نظرت إلى الأسفل ورأيت الطرف الجنوبي ل
Vuoi che ti legga le s
Roger, siamo nel bel mezzo dell'Esperiment
Чт
Gémeaux 4, Houston 
알겠습니다. Y는 +024.80으로 읽었
ああ、あった。地平線を見失いかけていた。まさか、セカンダリースキャナーがもう出ているなんて言わないでくれ。それはおかしい。どうなるか見てみよう。このボールは大きく外れている。お
コロンビア号とトランクウィリティ号、残り20
Vorremmo passare bre
Yuri Alekseyevich, we have a problem: after closing the hatch one of the contacts hasn't connected well. Because of that we will unmount 
Roger. On est en train d'aligner la plateforme, elle passe juste en dessous de notre gauche, et on va la suivre dans un insta
わかりました。
I think
जी हां, हम जरूर करें
روجر. إليك النموذج الذي سنرسله إليك لعملية إعادة الدخول التدريجي. سنزودك بقيم ∆V و∆T لحرق نظام OAMS. سنزودك بقيم GMTRC. سنزو
Ich kann derzeit eine Rollbewegung nach rechts von etwa 5 Grad erkennen und habe 
रॉजर। अपनी पिछली नींद में मुझे चार घंटे का आराम मिला, जिसमें से ज़्यादातर समय मुझे गहरी और अच्छी नींद आई। मेरे आखिरी भोजन में मूंगफली के टुकड़े, संतरे का रस, सैंडविच और फ्रूट कॉकटेल थे... मैंने उस भोजन के साथ लगभग छह घूंट पानी पिया, और अभी मैं आ
«Аполлон-8», Хью
Roger. Ci stiamo prendendo il tempo necessario per adattarci a questo nuovo assetto; andare su Navi è piuttosto lontano dall'assetto di cui abbiamo bisogno. Ho una correzione da fare sul 20: su Navi, dopo esserci adattati al buio, si riesce a distinguere Cassiopea e si riesce a distinguere la stessa Navi. È difficile vedere quali stelle ci siano intorno. Abbiamo ancora parecchie particelle che fluttuano con la sonda, soprattutto quando spostiamo l
...メリ
罗杰。迈克，我不太清楚那次发生了什么。我当
좋습니다. 다음 페이지와 마지막 페이지, 짐, 34번으로 넘어가세요. 페이지 맨 위에 "470을 통해 DELTA-VX 모니터링"이라고 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 편하실 때 BIOMED 스위치를 오른쪽으로 옮겨주세요. 전화를 받으실 필요 없이 그냥 건
、現在、順
حسنًا، إنه ليس مريحًا على الإطلاق. هذا الراديو يُرسل إشاراته إلى الخوذة الأخرى، ويمكنه سما
了解しました。そのパッケージの温度は38度くらいで、火傷には問題ないとのことですね。現在、この火傷の詳細な手順を調整中で、十分な時間があれば、本当にきれいな状態をお届けできると思
하셀블라드 카메라의 셔터가 내려가는 데 약간의 지연이 있는 것 같습니다. 사진이 망
Похоже, Вэнс, что автоматический выключат
Mal sehen – schalten wir das Radar ein; vielleicht bek
いくら
Roger. Amicizia Sette. Anche io ti rice
This is Friendship Seven. Exercise completed, re
أنت تنظر الآن إلى مسبارنا، الموجود في مقدمة مركبة أوديسي. إنه ثقيل جدًا، لكنني أعتقد أنه في انعدام الجاذبية يصبح عديم الوزن، ويسهل تحريكه كثيرًا. في الواقع، علّق كل من فريد وجاك، كما فعل الكثيرون سابقًا، على مدى ضخامة المركبة الفضائية في رحلتها الفعلية، نظرًا لسهولة تحريكها مقارنةً بجهاز المحاكاة الذي يجعل التدريب صعبًا
Roger... und uns geht es
Wie wäre es, wenn du sie anrufst un
罗杰。
ठीक है, जैक। अब तुम कोणों को कैसे देख रहे हो? हमने चंद्रमा को केंद्र
Aber wir haben es getan – wir haben das Gebiet um El Paso ausfindig gemacht, und es schien uns, als gäbe es dort eine Wolkenlücke. Wir schau
Okay, we'll look at service module RCS 
好的。您预计电池A的充电还需要多久
잠시만 기다려 주세요.
Wie 
알겠습니다. 연료 전지 1번, 잭, 지금 바로 생산 라인에서 빼내고 싶었던
Houston. Riguardo al tuo commento sulla cavalla che lambisce il terreno - un terreno montuoso - è un'impressione simile a quella di una colata lavica che si riversa attorno 
Hal
로저. 항목 2 MSC-2 및 -3. SEF 통과 시작 시간 49 Zulu. 종료 시간 00:15. 개정 52. 복사하셨
Et l'un des avantages, Jack, surtout pour un novice comme moi, c'est la facilité avec laquelle on se déplace ici. Comme tu le sais pour avoir travaillé dans le simulateur du module de commande, l'apesanteur est un atout considérable. À 1 g, on se sent vraiment à l'étroit, et c'est beaucoup plus facile dans cet environnement. Comme tu peux le voir, c'était plutôt propre. J'ai trouvé quelques rondelles qui se décollaient et un petit capuchon en plastique de la caméra de séquence qui s'était détaché et que j'ai retrouvé coincé près du panneau ED. Bon. Juste en dessous de Jim, il se tient sur ce qui ressemble à un conteneur. Et, pour que tout le monde soit bien placé, à l'intérieur de ce conteneur se trouve le moteur de remontée. J'espère que tu peux voir ma main posée dessus, le moteur qui nous permettra de quitter la Lune. Juste à côté du capot du moteur, j'ai la main sur un boîtier blanc, que l'on a déjà vu. Il s'agit du sac à dos de Jim, qui fournira l'oxygène et l'eau nécessaires à son refroidissement sur la surface lunaire. Nous espérons l'utiliser pendant 4 he
알겠습니다. 방
Базз, я поставил сюда 39,5 вольт; это напоминание о проверке батареи — н
정말 지구가 어떻게 생겼는지 설명하기는 어렵네요. 제 가운데 창문, 그러니까 둥근 창문 밖을 보고 있는데, 창문 자체가 지금 지구보다 훨씬 커요. 명암 경계선이 선명하게 보이고, 남아메리카 대륙 대부분과 중앙아메리카, 
回転制御電源、直接、2 つ、MAIN A/MAIN
ヒュースト
Ok, Skipper. Abbiamo trovato un modo per tenerti al caldo. Abbiamo deciso di iniziare a darti energia ora, e quello che vogliamo che tu faccia... quello che vogliamo che tu f
अच्छ
Wir haben bei unserem Systemtest des Bat
了解。最初に気づいた時に私たちに電話したのですか、それとも少し
Dopo aver ridotto la velocità a un punto tale da ritenere di poterci sganciare in sicurezza, lo abbiamo fatto e ci siamo allontanati dall'Agena a diversi metri al secondo il più velocemente possibile. Avevamo visto la quantità di propellente scendere dal 50% a meno del 30%. Dopo aver disattivato l'OAMS e ancora in potenza di polarizzazione e t
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। चंद्रमा मूल रूप से धूसर है, रंगहीन; प्लास्टर ऑफ पेरिस या गहरे भूरे रंग की रेत जैसा दिखता है। हम काफी बारीकियाँ देख सकते हैं। उर्वरता सागर यहाँ उतना स्पष्ट नहीं दिखता जितना पृथ्वी पर दिखता है। इसके और आसपास के गड्ढों क
11, यह एक है, विकल्प 1 को प्राथमिकता दी गई
And I splash curtain install, neck dam install, Cabin Air Recirc handle UP. Left Snorkel handle UP, Cabin Vent handle UP. Hatch Release trigger aloof. Verify the Water Seal is DOWN and closed. Attach the lanyard, left hatch open. Stow Command Pilot survival gear over right side of spaceship. Whole recovery loop... right side of t
罗杰。看起来不错
정말 놀랍네요. 네 발바닥 패드 모두 땅속으로 거의 파고들지 않았다는 게 정말 놀랍습니
لا، دعني أتأكد من وجودها هنا. أنزل إلى اللوحة 275، وأفتح مفتاحَيْ CB MAIN A وBAT BUS A وCB MAIN B. ثم أنزل إلى اللوحة 250، وأفصل مفتاحَيْ CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING وBAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING، ثم أصعد إلى اللوحة 5، وأفصل مفتاحَيْ SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN A وSENSOR SIGNAL MAIN B، ومفتاحَ
Houston, Columbia auf OMNI D Delta. En
Хорошо, давайте получим эти данные
Yes, I t
あまり長く放置してはいけ
आपको नाइट रेट्रो के बारे म
طالما أنك تقرأني جيدًا يا فرانك، سأطلعك على بعض الأمور. سنرسل لك تحديثًا لحالة النظام إلى الفتحة، ونود - كما هو مخطط - نقله إلى الفتحة بالضغط على زر الإدخال (Enter). نود تذكيرك فقط بأنه قبل الضغط
好的。步骤 7 如下：“断路器面板 11，交流母线 B，氦气 PQGS 推进剂显示器，闭合。断路器 11，交流母线 B，数字照明，闭合。断路器 11，交流母线 B，母线联络逆变器 1
Ce qui a pu se passer, c'est que Jim a peut-être retiré la vanne 
2
रॉजर. एसेंट पैड: टीआईजी 124 22 00 00 00 संज्ञा 76 55349 00322, प्लस 0017; 47, प्लस 37104, माइनस 70470, प्लस 58604, प्लस 56936. आपका वजन 
Так
はい。現在、マイナス2度プラス30度です。サーキットブ
13号，休斯顿。
Okay. Wenn Sie bei den Tantiemen „GO“ sagen, meinen Sie, dass man sie nicht kürzen soll? Stimm
قل الكلمة الأخيرة 
Roger. Notieren Sie sich das. Und d
Tranquility Ba
نعم، هذا صحيح. بدأنا نتلقى إشارة غير منتظمة على الجهاز الأساسي، فانتقلنا إلى الجهاز الثانوي، وكانت الإشارة غير منتظمة أيضاً، فظننتُ أنها قد تكون من حساس. لكنها استقرت الآن، ونحن
好
हमने यह कर लिया है। हम पूरी तरह से गर्म स्थिति में हैं
How is our O2 consumption? I've been plotting it and it lo
Roger. We're coming up on the booster now, and you can see the daylight starting to break. The lights are quite visible, and I estimate that we're probably in the vicinity of three-quarters of a mile from the booster at the time now. The lights are very easy to see, and the horizon is quite easily defined at t
Хорошо. На странице E-7 контрольного списка и в шаге 34, если у вас открыта панель 382, ​​это удобный момент, чтобы установить регуляторы воды в испарителе, как первичном, так и вторичном, в положение AUTO, а теплообменник костюма для вторичного гликоля — в положение 
نعم. أتذكر أنني بدأتُ في البداية من الجانب المقطوع من المنطقة التي كانت كاميرا التلفزيون مُصوّبة عليها، وأخذتُ عددًا من عينات الصخور على السطح، وبعضها الآخر تحت السطح مباشرةً - على بُعد حوالي 20-15 إلى 20 قدمًا شمالًا. ثم تذكرتُ أن تلك المنطقة ربما تكون قد جرفتها عوادم محرك الهبوط جيدًا، 
Oui
إيقاف التشغي
はい、2-C は 24、6、2-B は 24、5.5、2-A は 24、6、1-C は 24、12、1-B は 24、11、1-A は 24、7 です。コントロールは 26、5、S-2 は 27、S-1 は 27、メインは 
イーグル、ヒューストン。ミドルジンバル
Rog
Gemini VIII, Hawai
Das ist richtig. Okay, dann gehen wir zurück zur Tunnelentlüftung und überprüfen den Druckunterschied (ΔP) in cm³, um sicherzustellen, dass der Druck gehalten wird. Anschließend wiederhole
Es ist 
D'accord. Nous aimerions avoir…
ربما تكون قد قمت بالفعل بهذا كخطوة 35. تقول UP TELEMETRY to BL
D'accord. Tu as bonne mine ici, par terre. Comme
Right out in front now. I d
아니요. 아니요. 제 생각엔 
Mir schien es nicht so, als gäbe es ein eindeutiges Signal; es besteht kein Zweifel daran, dass du dich bewegt hast, aber um genau zu sagen, wann du dich zu bewegen begonnen hast, würde ich sagen, dass es dann geschah, als das Ding
Roger. Résidus: -0,1, -0,2, -0,7. Nous avons utilisé le NOUN 86 pour DELTA-VZ, qui était de 9,5, contre 9,1 pour vous. Je pense que cela explique la différence. Apogée 57,2, périlune 9,1, contrôle du soleil à trois repères: -0,19, +0,16, +0,
أبولو 8، هيوستن. اكتملت عملية التفريغ، وهو الآن جهاز الكمبيوتر 
Хорошо. Мы это обсудили, и за 12 часов до вылета все, кажется, считают, что нам не нужно этого делать. Но в ближайшей перспективе это, похоже, никак не повлияет на траекторию полета, и, если хотите, мы можем повторить контрольный список для входа и просто пройтись по нему в прямом эфире со всеми, кто работает за пультом.
Und ich installiere den Spritzschutz, den Nackenschutz, den Umlufthebel der Kabine nach oben. Den linken Schnorchelhebel nach oben, den Kabinenlüfterhebel nach oben. Den Lukenentriegelungshebel in der Luft halten. Sicherstellen, dass die Wasserabdichtung unten und geschlossen ist. Die Reißleine anbringen, linke Luke öffnen. Die Überlebensausrüstung des Kommandopiloten über der rechten Seite des Raumschiffs verstauen. Die gesamte Bergungsschlaufe... rechte Seite des Raumschiffs. Sie gehen mit Ihrem Überlebensset auf den linken Sitz. Werfen Sie die Überlebensausrüstung des Piloten über die Bergungsschlaufe auf die linke Luke. Blasen Sie die Mae West auf und achten Sie darauf, dass sie sich auf der rechten Seite des Raumschiffs befindet. Ob ich einen Piloten ausschalte... liegt ganz bei Ihnen. Sie nehmen Ihre Überlebensausrüstung aus der linken Luke und schließen und verriegeln die Luke. Und Sie befestige
Und, Houston, Jack wird jetzt selbst versuchen, s
Je n'arrive 
Роджер. А как далеко тебе пришлось вернуться назад по 
और, ह्यूस्टन, एक्वेरियस। 
حسنًا. هيوستن، محطة DE
我明白了，谢谢
ठीक है। यह पावर डिसेंट के इग्निशन पॉइंट के बहुत करीब है। अभी-अभी माउंट मैरिलिन
그들은… 제정신이 아니야. 투구를 멈출 수가 
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो
Roger. Alles klar. Wir hatten uns bei unserem Backup-Set geirrt. Die Karten waren falsch platziert. Die Borddaten schei
Das ist richtig. Nächster Schritt, Feld 250:
Okay, Houston; 13. We're a little bit ahead
حسن
Никакой дезориентации не было. Я чувствовал, что могу смотреть вниз на землю — и мне было совершенно комфортно смотреть вниз — и могу переворачиваться на спину и смотреть вверх, и это нисколько меня не дезориентировало. Космический корабль был моим лучшим ориентиром. Всякий раз, когда я его видел, у меня сразу же появлялась хорошая точка отсчета, и, фактически, ближе к концу я использовал свой трос и даже ходил взад и вперед по поверхности космического корабл
Gemini VIII, Houston. Nach Retrofire besteht kein Kontakt meh
Sigma 
了解、バズ。SバンドアンテナのOMNI Aスイッチをブラボーの
我们无法判断
肯
Ну, прямо сейчас, Билл, в контрольном списке мы видим, что активация произошла примерно за час до истечения этого срока. Позвольте мне уточнить, есть ли у них еще какие-либо
And just beyo
没错，弗雷德。我们目前还
Ro
Всё выглядит отличн
Houston, Apollo 11 est à
또 다른 지역 소식입니다. 헌츠빌 카운티 법원이 어제 새벽에 화재로 전소했습니다. 따라서 그 자리에 다시 건설 사업을 해야 할 것 같습니다. 한편, 귀환을 기다리는 가족들에 대한 소식도 전해드립니다. 앤 제임스 기자가 보도한 내용입니다. "우리는 달 뒷면에서 쉬고 있어요." 발레리 앤더스는 크리스마스 이브에 가족과 함께 아폴로 8호가 달 궤도를 벗어나 지구로 귀환하기를 기다리며 이렇게 말했습니다. 앤더스 씨는 화요일 새벽 0시에 도착했고, 이웃들이 아이들을 모두 데려가 우주선이 달 뒤편에 있어 통신이 두절된 동안 가족들이 편히 쉴 수 있도록 도와주었습니다. 프랭크 보먼 대령의 집은 야외에 커다란 상록수 화환 네 개가 걸려 있고, 고운 눈이 뿌려져 있으며, 빨간 리본으로 장식되어 있었습니다. 거실에는 그의 안전한 귀환을 기다리는 크리스마스트리가 놓여 있었고, 금발의 아름다운 아내 수와 늠름한 두 아들 프레더릭과 에드윈은 자정 무렵 달 궤도를 벗어나는 순간을 집에서 지켜볼 계획이었습니다. 평소 같으면 그들은 세인트 크리스토퍼 성공회 교회에서 자정 예배에 참석했을 겁니다. 가족들은 새벽 0시에 모일 예정이었죠. 보먼 가족에는 어린아이가 없기 때문에, 크리스마스 선물 교환은 보먼 대령이 달 왕복 비행이라는 멋진 선물을 가지고 돌아올 때까지 미뤄두기로 했습니다. 마릴린 러벨의 네 아이들은 아이들 입장에서는 아주 평범한 크리스마스를 보낼 거라고 러벨 대위의 아내는 전했습니다. 하지만 선물 이야기는 꺼내기도 꺼려졌는데, 아이들 중 두 명이 바로 옆에 앉아 있었기 때문입니다. "어젯밤에 입었던 옷도 갈아입을 시간이 없었어요."라고 러벨 부인은 말했습니다. 하지만 어른들끼리의 선물 교환은 있을 거고, 크리스마스트리는 러벨이 집에 돌아올 때까지 그대로 있을 겁니다. 액션 라인에 좋은 글이 하나 실렸습니다. 액션 편집자에게 보낸 짧은 편지입니다. 거기에는 이렇게 쓰여 있습니다. "어젯밤에 비행접시로 지구인들에게 깜짝 방문을 하려고 했었는데, 뚱뚱한 남자가 썰매를 끌고 다니고, 로켓 추진 버킷에 탄 세 남자가 달 주위를 질주하는 미친 짓 때문에 겁을 먹고 도망쳤습니다. 행성을 그런 식으로 운영하는 게 말이 됩니까?" 화
Well, the earth is very, very bright. There is nothing in the lens you can burn
了解しました。燃料電池2
カメラの自動調光スイッチ（ALCスイッチ）がIN位置になっていることを確認してください
좋아요. 이발소 간
Okay. Ich denke, wir werden Folgendes tun: Wenn ich sehe, dass die hohe Verstärkung die Scan-Grenze deutlich überschreitet, be
ठीक है। अब बात स्
阿波罗11号，
2回目の
Okay. We need a - Sorry (laughter). W
Okay, für den Gimbal-Antrieb. Hoch, runter, Null. Hoch, runter, Nul
Je pense qu'ils sont e
电池 C 37.1，PYRO 电池 A 和 B 均为 37.1。Alfa 82，Bravo
67; ऑक्सीकारक 63 है; अवरोहण टैंक 1... 64 है; ऑक्सीकारक... क्या आपने कॉपी किय
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Судя по нашим наблюдениям с середины траектории, гамма составляет минус 6,57. Это предварительные данные, и мы думаем, что после дальнейшего отслеживания мы сможем скорректировать траекторию и точно направить её в коридор. Сейчас она находится примерно в центре коридора; всё выглядит хорошо. Мы вышлем вам PAD (план входа) через пару часов, перед тем как вы ляжете спать. И ещё от наших друзей из отдела по связям с общественностью несколько заголовков, помимо вашего полёта. Вы по-прежнему в центре внимания. Однако есть ещё кое-что интересное для вас. Как я уже упоминал, Матч всех звёзд был отменён из-за дождя. Он состоится завтра. Однако президент Никсон не сможет его посмотреть, как планировал. Мы будем держать вас в курсе результатов. И ещё, синоптики будут к вам благосклонны. Наш прогноз, похоже, благоприятен для зоны посадки; там должно быть очень хорошо. Президент Никсон, готовясь вылететь, чтобы встретить ваше возвращение, предсказал, что в течение 31 года человек посетит по крайней мере еще одну планету, на которой будет существовать какая-либо форма жизни.
حسنًا يا فريد. اعلم أن الخرطوم الأحمر الخاص بجهاز LM
Ok. Potenza 6. Ok. La potenza 6 si riferisce al pannello 11. Dovresti s
Это «Дружба Семь». Земля
Хьюстон, Роджер. 
ضغط المصدر ١٥٠٠، ودرجة حرارة المصدر ٦٠-٥٠. ودائرة التحكم في رد الفعل تعمل. الهوائي سليم. في وضع إعادة الد
कृपया प्रतीक्ष
了解しました。二次水EVAP制御バルブはオフになっていますが、蒸発器の
カプセルを再突入姿勢で停止させています。ロールアウト中です。ヨーはゼロ、ロールアウトが始まっていま
Okay, AC 2 zeigt keine Reaktion
カーナボン以降はリアルタイムテレ
알겠습니다. 알겠습니다. 지금 모두 꺼져 있습니다. 16개의 자동 스위치가 모두 꺼져 있어
A1隔间，16毫米弹匣将放置在4号窗口，而不是5号窗
All right. That should go down with no twists at all. Put the bag up this way, that's even. Ne
E Houston, Apollo 13. Una cosa
알겠습니다. 우선 배터리를 충전해서 전력을 공급해야 하는데, 이를 위한 절차를 이미 마련해 두었습니다. 재진입과 관련해서는, 재진입 시점 5시간 전에 마지막 중간 궤도 수정을 할 계획입니다. 물론, 재진입이 필요한 경우에 한해서입니다. 그리고 재진입 시점 4시간 30분 전에 서비스 모듈을 분리하고, 그 후 3시간에서 3시간 30분 동안 사진 촬영, 사령선 추진 및 정지, 적재물 정리, 기타 자잘한 작업들을 진행할 예정입니다. 서비스 모듈은 재진입 시점 1시간 전까지 보유하다가 분리할 것입니다. 이러한 절차는 내일 아침 CMS와 LMS에 통합하여 실행할 예정이며, 가능하면 오늘 오후에 관제센터와 함께 다시 한번 실행할 것입니다. 한 가지 질문이 있는데, 그 후 어떻게 처리해야 할까요? 사령선에는 산소가 충분하고, 고압 산소 공급원과 보관 문제가 있다는 생각 때문에 산소통을 사령선에 남겨두는 방안을 고려하고 있습니다. 또 다른 생각은, 우주복을 입고 진입하는 것이 좋겠다는 것입니다. 우주복을 입고 우주복을 착용한 상태로 우주복을 분리할 예정인데, 아폴로 10호처럼 우주복을 그냥 버릴 것이기 때문입니다. 만약 우주복을 입지 않았다면, 우주복의 밀
Roger. Sei circa quattro per pollice, con un leggero 
जी हां, मैं समझ गया। रॉन मुझे एक पीएडी देने वाला था औ
계
我认为态度上的差异不到1
У меня такое ощущение, что я ошибся с тангажом, но думаю, дело в этой прокл
你好，卡纳文，双子座4
أوه، آسف. لقد 
Apollo
Okay. Nun zu den alltäglicheren Dingen, jetzt, wo wir den Mond verlassen haben. Ich möchte euch kurz die Entwicklungen im Lebensmittelbereich vorstellen. Ihr kennt sicher schon die v
Здравствуйте, командование связи Хьюстона. Теперь мы в
And we ha
नह
Okay, Van
訂正です。オーロラセブン、訂正1。ブラボー。16
روجر. لقد ذهبتُ للتو إلى ذلك المكان المجاني. قف على أهبة ال
Okay, Joe. Wenn ich das richtig verstehe, führen wir nach 74 Stunden bei Position 2 einen Sonnencheck durch. Dafür muss das Rendezvous-Radar außer Betrieb genommen werden. Wir nutzen das AUTO-Manöver, um dorthin zu gelangen, oder zumindest die Winkelberechnung. Wenn die Abweichung unter 1 Grad liegt, ist die Plattform für das Manöver geeignet und wir benötigen keinen weiteren Check. Selbst wenn alles in Ordnung ist, geben Sie uns einen Stern, den wir für unseren Check in der Dunkelheit verwende
Roger, we understand. Shift t
Okay, they want you to wake him up to help you with MSC-1 when you need t
ロジャー、ヒューストン。4/45695、マイナス053、プラス141、プラス30627、マイナス00625、プラス00577 180 018 001、NA、プラス00188 30639 256 30452 40 2730 396 033、下030、左19、プラス08
रॉजर, व्हाइट काफ
Jack, wir würden gerne bei Gelegenheit noch einmal die Volt- un
据塔斯社报道，莫斯科航天工程师阿纳托利·科里茨基表示，“月球15号”探测器能够完成此前所有“月球”系列探测器所完成的任务。媒体据此推断，“月球15号”可以探测月球引力场、拍摄月球照片，并降落到月球表面采集样本进
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Réception correcte. Goldstone signale avoir reçu environ une minute
Okay. Go ahead, Ken. What else do you want to
مايك، لديّ قائمة التحقق من الدخول الآن. هل تريد أن تُطلعني
— — Что прилипло к космическому аппарату, думаю, вы
로저, 캘리포니아.
Ich verstehe, dass sich der Bremsfallschirm direkt über Ihnen befinde
是的，稍等一下
Adesso divertiti, Gemini 4, e come ho detto, ogni volta che ti sentirai solo, noi saremo lì ad
Okay, Fred. I have a few words for you on some things we want to do in the next few hours, and in order to get good COMM for that and also in order to give a few minutes of ranging, I want to have you put the POWER AMPLIFIER circuit breaker 
Actually, it's commander transfer to
Intendi prop
지금은 안 됩니다. 나중에 기회
Roger, 11. Come avrai probabilmente notato, il tuo angolo di conicità in modalità è aumentato notevolmente a causa dello scarico delle acque reflu
哦，
روجر. ال
Al tuo prossimo passaggio, Columbia, invece di eseguire un'operazione vera e propria, vorremmo che guardassi nelle vicinanze delle coordinate che ti abbiamo fornito, che rappresentano la nostra migliore analisi basata sulla fisica della mappa e sulla traiettoria, e abbiamo anche un altro set di coordinate che vorremmo che cercassi nelle vicinanze. Quest'ultimo si basa su tutte le interpretazioni delle caratteristiche geologiche che sono state viste dall'equipaggio durante la 
Okay, that's correct, Jack. Okay, at minus 1 hour, we're goin
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। हम सेट, गिम्बल/थ्
알겠습니다. 대기하세
Roger, ich habe dich verstanden. Ich habe ein Update zum Flugplan, und falls du keine Ze
好了，万斯。我们准备开始——
아니요, 급할 거 없어요. 어서, 모든 옷 정리해서 넣어주세요. 옷 몇 벌을 꺼내놓는 건 싫거든요. 혹시 환기시키
Oui, joyeux Noël là-haut, Jim. J'ai une procédure à suivre qua
ओडिसी, ह्यूस्टन। हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप अपने संचार कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में, प्राथमिक पावर एम्प बंद करें, कम बिट दर चुनें और वॉयस बैकअप बंद 
D'accord. Plus 4 heures. Le poids est toujours de 63531 comme indiqu
Когда этот пере
أشعر براحة تامة. أشعر ببعض الدفء، خاصة من أشعة الشمس، ولكن بخلاف ذلك أشعر أنن
L'un des plus beaux spectacles que j'aie vus, c'était lorsque j'ai aperçu la pointe sud de la Floride, l'île de Cuba, Porto Rico et Saint-Domingue. C'était vraiment magnifique. Les nuances de bleu, à mesure que l'eau s'approfondissait, avec les î
로저. 접지 문제라고 생
로저. 참고로 말씀드리자면, 압력을 아주 약간 높였습니다. 현재 슈트와 객실 압력 측
Il reste 10 secon
Canary, Friendship
रॉजर, फ्रेड। मैं समझ गया कि आप जलने से 17 मिनट पहले का निशान चाहते हैं। क्य
好的。我正在查看故障代码 28，它会跳转到代码框 6
Ich habe schon sehr viel Nordafrika gesehen … bei Tageslicht – kenne ich ziemlich gut. Ich habe gerade den D-9 Apollo Landmark-Anflug auf Ziel 14 abgeschlossen. Ich hatte eine sehr gute Zielerfassung. Ich hatte das Ziel schon einmal gesehen; ich wus
حسناً. لقد فهمنا. سنرسل إليك متجه حالة، ونود منك عدم نقل هذا المتجه إلى 
这是友谊七号，它自动进行偏航，我会手动控制；它总是忽远忽近地偏
RECIRCを完
रॉजर। मिडपैक एंट्री पैड: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, प्लस 1102, माइनस 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 0028, डीएल और वीएल एनए, 4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380,
At
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi, poco prima delle 5 ore circa, o verso, vi vorremo in assetto per un allineamento dell'asse corporeo, usando il terminatore terrestre come abbiamo fatto prima; E non appena lo avremo, eseguiremo -7, che ora equivale a circa 60 cm al secondo, ovvero circa 15 secondi. E mi è stato detto che ora è sceso a 35 cm, quindi è comodamente entro i limiti. Bene. Quando lo faremo, inizieremo immediatamente la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio del modulo di servizio, che sarà in piano, dato che lo sganciamo prima del solito. Non abbiamo bisogno, e non vogliamo, della componente fuori piano. Quindi sarà in piano, con il modulo di servizio puntato di nuovo verso l'esterno lungo il raggio vettore. Inizieremo quindi a preparare il modulo di comando per il SEP del modulo di servizio, incluso il controllo del modulo di comando e l'accensione a caldo, e circa 4 ore e 30 minuti prima dello sgancio, sgancieremo il modulo di servizio. Continueremo a lavorare finché non avremo il modulo di servizio... e cercheremo di scattare qualche fotografia, ma non ci impegneremo in manovre di traslazione per le foto perché non vogliamo sbagliare... rovinare l'angolo della vostra traiettoria di volo in quel momento. Okay. Questo ci dà 2 ore di tempo libero, più o meno, per finire, se siamo in ritardo, per passare alla checklist e prepararci all'accensione del modulo di comando. Inizieremo l'accensione completa del modulo di comando a meno 2 ore e 30 minuti. Metteremo il computer in linea, lo faremo partire, inizieremo a collegare i vostri vettori di stato e così via, e ad allineare la piattaforma del modulo di comando. Al massimo a circa 1 ora e 30 minuti, dandoci un'ora per completare questa parte del modulo di comando, inizieremo la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio. Poi inizierete a chiudere il... Naturalmente, non abbiamo configurato tutto il nostro stivaggio molto prima di questo. Chiuderemo il portello, effettuere
روجر. فهمت قصدك جيدًا، وبصوت عالٍ وواضح. - لا يزال لديّ حوالي 3 غرامات. أداء الكبسولة ممتاز. معدل الاستجابة ثابت بشكل جيد. مقياس الارتفاع مضبوط. وضعيات الطائرة ثابتة بش
好的。我们建议您参加 JETT 活动，因为我们已经考虑周
संक्षेप में कहें तो, जिम, हमें
Well, it's not quite as useful; it never seems to be. Depending on the position of the Sun, it's got that band that seems to go across the center. I don't think it's because of the waste water particles that it would lack its 
Davvero un'ottima 
Roger, Neil. Imbardata 0, beccheggio meno 20, angoli di guadagno
Gemelli 
콜럼비아, 다음번 탐사에서는 기존 방식대로 수색하는 대신, 저희가 알려드린 좌표 주변을 수색해 주시길 바랍니다. 이 좌표는 지도상의 물리적 특성과 궤적을 바탕으로 저희가 가장 정확하게 분석한 결과입니다. 또한, 탐사팀이 하강 중에 관찰한 지질학적 특징들을 종합적으로 해석하여 선정한 또 다른 좌
Okay, Fred. Als Nächstes sollst du bitte noch etwas graues Klebeband nehmen und die Hälfte der Auslassfläche jeder der blauen Düsen – der Kommandantendüse und der LMP-Düse – abkleben. Der Grund dafür ist, dass wir diesen Kreislauf durch die Öffnung des sekundären LiOH-Kanisters führen werden, wenn der Kanister 
Est-ce qu'il neig
Jack, prima di iniziare a leggere la procedura, vorremmo... Abbiamo scoperto che la batteria BAT A è carica e in ottime condizioni. Vorremmo cambiare batteria e ricaricare ulteriormente la
Gemini 4, это Хьюстон CAP COM. Пожалуйста, переведите переключатель воспроизведения ленты в положение RES
알겠습니다. 복사했습
不，垃圾会——我们
好的。当我们把交流电源开关从IGS切换到ACME时——这不应该给电脑供电——电脑指示灯熄灭了。故障指示灯亮起后，电脑指示灯又亮了起来，故障指示灯一直亮着。很快，两个指示灯都变
Forza, Acquari
收到。当时是西经3度，
Nous en sommes toujours à la version 0.2. Nous avons appuyé par inadvertance sur le bouton de réappui rapide, ce qui a provoqué un léger dysfonctio
Okay. Stand by one until
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota quattro e stiamo lavorando al quinto giorno. Naturalmente, non vediamo l'ora che arrivi l'atterraggio di venerdì. Qui sotto, nella parte della navicella che chiamiamo stiva inferiore, abbiamo il consigliere del Presidente per la forma fisica, il Capitano Jim Lovell, che sta per sottoporsi a un programma di esercizi che svolgiamo ogni giorno. Notate che fluttua molto liberamente. Ha appena sbattuto la testa contro il sistema ottico, usato per la nostra navigazione. Sta lavorando con un attrezzo progettato per mantenere i muscoli in forma. Un'altra funzione molt
ठीक है। जी हाँ, जिम। अगर आप क्यू कार्ड को काट दें, जो कि सही आकार का मोटा कागज़ का एक सुविधाजनक टुकड़ा है, तो उसे छल्लों से लगभग डेढ़ इंच काट दें। यानी, छल्लों के छेदों 
Okay. Verstanden, Jim. Sieht gut aus. Weißt du, ob Jack Fotos aus Fenster 5 
Roger. Je comp
Ja, das ist „affirm“, Joe. Kannst du da oben irgendwelche Details erkennen? Auf dem Monitor kann i
Apollo
그건 참 적절하고 합리적인 설명이네요. 제 생각에는 터널 안에 앉아서 모든 창문을 바라
Above? They d
Ja, Jack. Ich wollte dich gerade anrufen. Unterhalb von Quad 4 habe ich bemerkt, dass viele Glitzerpartikel erlosc
Аврора Семь, Кано. Мы всё е
좋습니다. 다음, 두 번째, 세 번째, 네 번째, 다섯 번째, 여섯 번째, 일곱 번째도 동일하고, 그 다음에는 CAUTION/WARNING 
Hallo Columbia, Houston. Ich verstehe, dass Sie Tranquility nicht sehen konnten. Was haben Sie mark
انتظر
Okay, now back to panel 250. CB BAT Bravo POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING, close. Next, MDC 3, AC INVERTER 2 to MAIN B. AC INVERTER 2, AC BUS 1, on up. Next, panel 5: AC INVERTER AC BUS 1 to UP TLM to COMMAND RESET then OFF. Then select best 
Ich habe das all
Chiedi al gruppo di guida se 
Hallo, Canton Com Tech, Aurora Seven. Laut und deutlich. Wie geht es
알겠습니다. 같은 의견입니다. 다시 처음부터 설명드리겠습니다. "BALANCE COUPLE"을 "OFF"로 변경해야 합니다. 그 아래 "LMP"를 "JET"으로 변경해야 합니다. -2초 지점의 "400 + 1"을 삭제하고, -1초 지점의 "MASTER ARM, ON"도 삭제합니다. -10초
Roger. Wir hatten in den letzten Ta
هل تحتاج إلى إيصال شيء ما إلى 
了解。123+00、アルファ78%（PQMD78%）、ブラボー76%（PQMD76%）、降下時の酸素濃度は62%（P
로저. Rev 2
로저. 17-1 경사각 00도, RN 마이너스
よし。31816 302 31624 40 2699 396 033、下054、左21、プラス0810、操縦桿マイナス16500 12968 36222。位置はそのまま。シリウスとリゲル、ロール129、ピッチ155、ヨー010、15秒間4つの四角
Хорошо, ВВОД, когда Луна - это означает, что они
Gemini 4, we have a good blood pressure. Stand
حسنًا. التحكم في المو
了解しました。排気に関する情報ですが、O2の流量は廃棄物タンクまたは廃棄物コンパートメントから高く排出されるのでしょうか
RATE に移動しました
L'eau est-elle à 
우리는 천천히 그 
Roger, Jack. Since we've got the up, we plan to use that information to give the a dock coarse aline, and then we're in the service module jettison attitude, we'll wait until it comes time to power up the, and we'll get the a dock coarse aline, and we'll pick some good stars to give you a fine aline with, and it looks like we can pick some stars that are looking away from the 
Et l'un des avantages, Jack, surtout pour un novice comme moi, c'est la facilité avec laquelle on se déplace ici. Comme tu le sais pour avoir travaillé dans le simulateur du module de commande, l'apesanteur est un atout considérable. À 1 g, on se sent vraiment à l'étroit, et c'est beaucoup plus facile dans cet environnement. Comme tu peux le voir, c'était plutôt propre. J'ai trouvé quelques rondelles qui se décollaient et un petit capuchon en plastique de la caméra de séquence qui s'était détaché et que j'ai retrouvé coincé près du panneau ED. Bon. Juste en dessous de Jim, il se tient sur ce qui ressemble à un conteneur. Et, pour que tout le monde soit bien placé, à l'intérieur de ce conteneur se trouve le moteur de remontée. J'espère que tu peux voir ma main posée dessus, le moteur qui nous permettra de quitter la Lune. Juste à côté du capot du moteur, j'ai la main sur un boîtier blanc, que l'on a déjà vu. Il s'agit du sac à dos de Jim, qui fournira l'oxygène et l'eau nécessaires à son refroidissement sur la surface lunaire. Nous espérons l'utiliser pendant 4 heures, voire 5 heures. Juste derrière, deux petits paquets carrés que je tiens en main, l'un
*** Warnleuchte und Wasserabscheiderleuchte leuchten. De
D'accord. Reprenons depuis le début. Il pourrait y avoir quelques recoupements, mais pour être sûrs que nous sommes tous sur la même longueur d'onde, nous allons commencer par une série de procédures chr
Es ist jetzt vorbei, Bruce, aber ich habe die Gegend, von der du sprichst
约翰
Roger, Aurora Seven, je vous 
Bene. Nel mondo del golf, Tommy Jacobs, un partecipan
«Аполлон-8», пока мы ждём высокого усиления, я продолжу краткое описание траектории. Мы всё ещё можем вернуться к средней линии Тихого океана с тринадцатой позиции, и вы будете на пути после 138 секунд работы двигателя. Это 138 секунд, чтобы вывести вас из зоны «бабочки». Мы рекомендуем не пытаться использовать преждевременное зажигание или перезапуск после 20 секунд. Если вы превысите 20 секунд, это может привести к тому, что траектория выйдет за пределы возможностей коррекции и свободного возврата. Погода в районе посадки хорошая. У нас есть слежение за вами и без него. Во время работы двигателя вы можете заметить небольшое изменение давления в камере сгорания и в баках из-за истощения т
400K sind 22 plu
Bene. La procedura sarà INVIO, 333 INVIO e leggerà il registro 1. Poi 10.000 - la memoria - il computer scaricherà la memoria due volte, come correttamente configurato. In caso contrario, dobbiamo caricare 10.000, e lo facciamo premendo INVIO, 333 INVIO, 10.000 INVIO e INVIO. Ora, se 
Salut Ed, tu sais qu'on a toujours dit qu'on allait faire une rentrée en boucle ouverte. Je suis bien plus content que ce soit l'ordina
バズはそれを保持でき、モ
روجر. ابتعد قليلاً عن المدمر الآن، قليلاً إلى اليسار مع الكاميرا، وابتعد قليلاً عن ا
حسنًا
Roger. La prochaine fois que je regarderai, je verrai ce que je... nous sommes en train de manœuvrer vers la lune. Nous verrons si nous pouvons voir
Bien. 12 1383 327 023 haut 172 gauche 22, plus 1293, moins 16500, 12905 36180. Commentaires: sur vos étoiles Sirius et Rigel, roulis 010, tangage 294, lacet 320, pas de marge de manœuvre. Autre: un, retour rapide, équivalent
In questo momento, non sarebbe pratico per noi girarci o muoverci in qualsiasi direzione per evitare la luce del sole, dove a
Bien, 11. Il s'avère que les performances du moteur lors de vos deux allumages effectués jusqu'à présent dans cette
Hai riposato di più nell'ultimo passaggio o gi
没错，查理。有时候
Что мне скажет
Roger. Merci. Le seul problème que nous rencontrons ici concerne le débit d'oxygène: il 
你可能对你妻子们的评论很感兴趣。
万斯，我们必须意识到，我们需要在这里建立起工作-休息
انطلق - أو هيوستن، هذه أبولو 8. 3 مع 2. / 45810، ناقص 053، زائد 141، زائد 30128، ناقص 00540، زائد 
Va bene
好的。燃烧按计划时间 1
알겠습니다. 마이크, 몇 가지 더 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 지금 배터리 B 충전을 중단해야 하고, 착륙 목표 지점에 산발적인 뇌우가 몰려와 날씨가 매우 안 좋아지고 있습니다. 뇌우와 얽히고 싶지 않아서 목표 지점을 상류로 옮기겠습니다. 아니, 하류로 옮겨서 1,500해리 진입 지점으로 설정하겠습니다. 이렇게 하면 상승 기류 제어를 확실히 할 수 있습니다. 새로운 좌표는 북위 13도 19분, 서경 169도 10분입니다. 그 지역 날씨는 아주 좋습니
and 
제
你好，Com Tech，友谊七
Abbiamo un aggiorn
Right now that's what we're looking at. Stand by. We might have you roll so we can keep the
Р
حسنًا. الصورة الثانية، 
I
Ok. Pronti. Sie
Yes, we sure are. We're ready to copy and comment. Isn'
Хорошо, Джек. Оно поступает, и оно прямо в центре нашего эк
ठीक है। अगले एक, दो, तीन, चार अपरिवर्तित हैं। और फिर हम ट्रांसलेशन कंट्रोलर पावर को बंद करना चाहते हैं, रोटेशन कंट्रोल पावर नॉर्मल, दो, को बंद करना चाहते हैं; और रोटेशन कंट्रोल पा
我已经检查过电路了。我们途中遇
Sì. Immagino che non ci fosse biso
Schauen wir uns die Sportwelt an. Während Sie neulich beschäftigt waren, gaben Joe Namath und Football-Commissioner Pete Rozelle bekannt, dass „Broadway Joe“ zugestimmt hat, seine Anteile am Restaurant Bachelors III zu verkaufen und zu den New York Jets zu wechseln. Joe traf heute im Trainingslager der Jets ein und absolvierte sein erstes Training. Auch einige andere Jets-Spieler, die zusammen mit Joe gestreikt hatten, meldeten sich. Davy Hill aus Jackson, Michigan, gewann in der vergangenen Woche sein drittes Major-Golfturnier im dritten Start. Er gewann die Philadelphia Classic. Hill hat in diesem Jahr bereits vier Turniere gewonnen und ist mit satten 129.000 Dollar der führende Preisgeldgewinner. Im Baseball bleibt das Rennen in der West Division der National League eng. Die Los Angeles Dodgers und die San Francisco Giants liegen ein Spiel hinter dem Tabellenführer Atlanta. Die Astros haben eine Bilanz von 48 Siegen und 48 Niederlagen und belegen derzeit den fünften Platz mit sieben Spielen Rückstand. Ein Doppelspiel zwischen den Astros und den Cincinnati Reds gestern Abend wurde wegen Regens verschoben. Die Chicago Cubs führen weiterhin die East Division an. Sie führen die Tabelle mit viereinhalb Spielen Vorsprung vor den New York Mets an. Und in der American League steuert Baltimore dem Titel der Eastern Division souverän entgegen. Sie liegen elf Spiele vor dem Zweitplatzierten Boston. Morgen findet das All-Star-Baseballspiel statt. Präsident Nixon sollte sich das Spiel ansehen und anschließend direkt zum Pazifik aufbrechen, bevor er seine Europareise antritt. Das waren die wichtigsten Neuigkeiten für heute. Ihr habt ja schon den Großteil mitbekommen, und ich bin sicher, wir könnten euch kein
Roger, Columbia. Ti leggo forte e chiaro riguardo all'alto guadagno. Abbiamo attivato il relè unidirezional
Ich glaube, ich versuche es mal mit dem Bremsfallschirm. Bremsfallschirm manuell auf 25 Fuß (1000 Fuß) ausgeworfen. Er hält, und das gerade noch rechtzeitig. Hauptsicherungsschalter ist jetzt eingeschaltet, angezeigte Höhe: 
Ok, bene. Il passo successivo è ancorare il nastro, e il modo in cui vogliamo che tu lo faccia è tagliare circa 60 cm dal rotolo e poi strapparlo nel senso della lunghezza in modo da ottenere due strisce lunghe circa 60 cm e larghe circa mezzo pollice. E le avvolgerai attorno al contenitore ad angolo retto, più o meno, rispetto al nastro che h
よし、ガス。状態は良好だ。操縦モードはフライ・バイ・ワイヤ、ジャイロはケージド、マニューバはオフ。燃料は62%と68%。燃料消費量は少し進んでいる。燃料量警告灯が点灯し、キャビン水量
C
Ils ont également examiné les résultats de votre suivi des points de repère. Apparemment, tous les points de repère étaient excellents, et nous disposons d'une page complète de données relatives aux altitudes des différents sites. Je ne vous les lirai pas, mais je tenais à vous informer que les marquages ​​se sont très bien déroulés. J'ai également vos budgets de consommables, notamment vos quantités de propergol. Ce sont les écarts par rapport aux valeurs nominales, si vous le souhaitez. Votre point de repère le plus problématique est le point Charlie, qui est inférieur de 9
يبدو أنك أصبت بطفح جل
١٣، هيوستن. نود من
Bene. Passaggio 6, "Trasferimento alla corrente (fari spenti), ATTENZIONE AVVERTENZA ALIMENTAZIONE ATTENZIONE spia ACCESA. Segnalare a. Pannello 11, INTERRUTTORE AUTOMATICO CONGIUNZIONE BUS TRAESLUNAR, CHIUSO. Pannello interruttore automatico 16, CONGIUNZIONE BUS TRANSLUNAR, CHIUSO. Pannello interruttore automatico 11, ILLUMINAZIONE, CHIUSO. E attivare le luci di servizio." Passo. E, 13, Houston. Selezionare 
Beta AR
プラットフォームの先端が鈍角で前向き。
罗杰。开始了：5，/ 45701，减 043，加 116，加 31171，减 00767，减 00214 180 017 001，NA，加 00188 31181 259 
Roger. Wir verste
C'est exact. Nous a
Es kommt aus dieser Öffnung hinten in meinem Nacken, nicht wahr? Dor
자, 프레드, 비상
Tu pourrais m'appeler de temps en temps, Jerry, juste pour me dire que tu es toujours là, pendant qu'on 
روجر. المدى عند 20 - عند وقتنا 
बिना गियर बढ़ाए जितना मैं
Ro
جيد
हाँ, आपको इसे प्राप्त कर लेना चा
晴空万里；32秒；9000英尺（约2744米）
Das stimmt; basierend auf dem aktuellen Wert wird das so prognostiziert, und Sie können das Wass
روجر. واضح تمامًا. تم تسليم المهمة إلى مدريد في نفس الوقت تقريبًا الذي كنت فيه - أعتقد 
Oui. Comme nous avons subi un roulis de 270 degrés, nos aiguilles de tangage et de la
Ti s
الأم
Va bene, ho capito bene 0,6 volt. Gli angoli che hai chiesto per l'antenna a
What we tried to do was to get the frequency shifted off a little bit so 
— ça — Nous ne voulons tout simplement pas nous endormir ici et oublier l’augm
Хорошо, Джим. У нас есть четыре шага, которые мы вам предоставим, чтобы вы могли запросить резервное копирование голоса (DOWN VOICE BACKUP). Если вы
Okay. Aspetta un attimo e sarò pronto a c
好的。没错，这位是吉姆·洛弗尔。我们今天想带大家简单了解一下阿波罗8号内部的生活。我们已经向大家展示了月球和地球的景象，现在我们想邀请大家走进我们的“家”。正如你们在仪表盘上看到的，这里至少已经是我们生活了4天。我们在仪表盘上标记了每一天。现在已经过去4天了，我们正在进行第5天的工作。当然，我们都非常期待周五的着陆。在飞船的下部设备舱里，总统的体能顾问吉姆·洛弗尔上尉正准备进行我们每天都要进行的锻炼。你们注意到他活动自如。他刚才不小心撞到了导航光学系统。他正在使用一种锻炼设备来保持肌肉状态。现在，我们飞船的另一个非常重要的功能是计算机。我想你们可能对这里的显示屏感兴趣，它能显示我们所有关于燃烧、导航以及地球轨道任务中重返大气层和反推阶段速度的信息。你们可以看到，它是由一个类似打字机键盘的装置控制的，输入输出的数据简直令人惊叹。它为我们出色地完成了任务，吉姆·洛弗尔（Jim Lovell）的操作也非常出色。现在，无论是在太空还是在地面，吃饭都是非常重要的事情。我请比尔·安德斯（Bill Anders）向你们展示我们在飞行中是如何进食的。请原谅我们在这里移动和更换摄像机时画面可能会有些模糊。我们使用的食物都是脱水的，预先包装在真空密封袋中。你们可以看到，比尔只需要松手就能让它保持静止。除了飞船内的气流之外，它会保持完全静止。他拿出那把得心应手的剪刀，剪开了袋子。食物种类繁
अच्छा लगा। उस समय के आसपास, बिल पानी उबाल रहा होगा
D'accord. Sur le panneau 250, fermez le disjoncteur BAT A (ALIMENTATION/ARRIVÉE). Sur le panneau 275, fermez le disjoncteur INVERTER POWER 2 (PRINCIPAL B). Les disjoncteurs suivants se trouvent sur le panneau 5: fermez le disjoncteur BAT RELAY BUS (BAT A), fermez le dis
はい、わかりました。ありがとうございます。
حسنًا. لقد قاطعني أحدهم للحظة. عاد بوب هوب إلى فيتنام مع قواته، ويؤدي عمله على أكمل وجه كعادته. أحد الأسماء المذكورة في هذا الخبر هو اسم حاملة الطائرات الأمريكية "نيو جيرسي". مازح بوب هوب من أعلى برج مدفع ضخم يوم أمس - أو الأربعاء - لإسعاد 1500 رجل على متن البارجة "نيو جيرسي" في عيد الميلاد العشرين الذي قضته في الترفيه عن القوات الأمريكية في الخارج. قام هوب وفرقته المكونة من 27 فردًا بتسلية بحارة "نيو جيرسي" بعد حضورهم قداس عيد الميلاد على متن حاملة الطائرات "هانكوك"، وكلاهما قبالة سواحل فيتنام. قال هوب للبحارة: "لا بد أن هذه أكبر سفينة حربية من طراز كريس كرافت في العالم. إنها تشبه جزيرة ويك مع دفة". وأضاف مازحًا: "أعتقد أنه كان من اللطيف منهم إخراج السفينة من التخزين فقط ليطلقوا عليّ 21 طلقة تحية". مازح هوب وهو يقف على أحد أبراج مدافع السفينة عيار 16 بوصة. أُعجب البحارة بشكل خاص بمجموعة من الفتيات طويلات القامة اللوات
Ciao Roger, qui è Friendship Seven. Forte e chiaro anche a te. Siamo ancora in partenza dal Centro di Controllo? P
Voilà, c'est fait. Il ne reste plus qu'à éteindre les lumières
In Carnarvon heißt es, es habe dort wahnsinnig viel geregnet. Könnte das Ihrer Meinung nach der Grund für Ihre Beschwerden
它就在他们所说的位置
Fre
أعتقد أن نوع البرامج التي يقدمونها لنا غير مناسب. أعتقد أننا سنحقق نت
ठीक है। हमने नहीं किया है। हमने इसे पूरा नहीं किया है। हम शुरू 
تقول إنك تعتقد أنه ربما يكون قد أعطاك بعض الدوران إلى
是杰克把所有内容都写下来的
D'accord. Nous vous recommandons de reste
わかりました。噴射時間はおそらく1分未満です。時間に基づいてカットオフを設定していただきたいので、噴射時間をお伝えします。通信が途絶
Okay. Ja, wir werden es auf jeden Fal
جيم، في وقت سابق من المساء، أبلغ فريدو عن وجود تسريب من النافذة رقم 1 في وحدة القيادة. كما أبلغ عن قطعة معدنية فضية اللون، مربعة الشكل تقريبًا، طول ضلعها حوالي 10 سم، تطفو في الهواء. كنا نحا
11, Houston. Wir haben ei
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。クリアスコープで見ると眩しいほどだ。ちょうど私がマークした瞬間に動き出した。ダークフィルターをかけて、これから上昇する様
마이너스 00014, 모든 0을 더하고, 00001 000 304 000을 더하고, 해당 없음, 00191 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225 Shaula를 더하고, 236 000을 더하고, 0813을 더하고, 16503
Une fois l'axe du corps aligné, nous pouvons vous indiquer l'attitude à adopter sur la sphère pour pointer les optiques vers la Lune ou une étoile. Connaissant ensuite la direction des optiques, nous pouvons vous fournir les angles CDU équival
Oui, une pour la 18 et une pour la 75; je pense que ta
Yes, I did. You want to remove - You want to power up both buses, with the BUS TIE motor switches; first of all, to see tha
在我等待玩水枪的间隙，我想谈谈光学方面的问题。在太阳附近的任何位置，似乎都有一条很宽的光带横跨整个扫描望远镜。就在不久前，我们所在的位置让我能够用扫描望远镜观测到月亮。然后我用六分仪和天空观察了一下——月亮周围的空间呈现出非常浅的蓝色，几乎和地球上的天空一样浅。而且它不是黑色的——这是太阳
Ok. Pe
罗杰，我们没有其他问题
ठीक है, फ्रेडो, बढ़िया। पंक्ति 4 पर, शुरुआत करते हुए: सूट फैन 1, बंद; ग्लाइकोल पंप ऑटो ट्रांसफर, वीएचएफ बी ट्रांसमीटर, खुला; वीएचएफ ए रिसीवर, खुला। इसके नीचे: सिग्न
ジム、
제미니 4호, 하와
روجر. T2: 102 54 2900 103 51 5600 106 37 3500 109 10 0000، T2 زائد 2126. T3: 104 39 4100 001 58 1500
로저. 45-1 101. 2+08. 12 37 50. 5+36. 10+33. 46-1 114. 2+25 14 12 47. 4+05. 9+33. 47-1 전후방 추진기 발사. 08 및 120. 0+14 및 2+30. 15 46 36. 3
ヒューストン、非常に興味深いことに、***大気がなく、この重力下で***足を蹴ると、粒子が飛び去っていくように見えますが、ほとんどの粒子はほぼ同じ角度と速度で飛び去っていきます。私の立っている場所から見ると、粒子
Apollo 8, Houston.
ジム、おおよそその通りです。ジャックがその姿勢で粗調整を行います。そのために、君にはその姿勢まで操縦してもらっているんです。粗調整用のジンバル角度を計算して彼に渡します。彼がそこに到着したら、まずチェックリストに従ってプラットフォームの粗調整を行います。それから彼は月面に入り、もし星が見えない場合は、すぐに君に角度を伝えて月面姿勢にします。彼は月面で調整
حسنًا يا فانس، أنا هنا، ولديك شيء ما في قائمة التح
So far we're..
Die eine Hälfte meines Fensters ist schwarz, auf die andere scheint ein wenig Sonne. Die Sonne scheint auf die Spitze des Raumschiffs, deshalb muss ich an einem beleuchteten Objekt vorbeisehen. Ich sehe keinen Stern,
That's affirm.
ヒューストン、了解。イーグル号はトランクウィリティ基地を出発し
That's affir
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们这里有一档电视节目要播出，还有关于你们可擦除载荷和备用应急清单的更新，如果你们也能把清单拿出
Роджер. Дик, слой дымки очень яркий. Я бы сказал, на 8-10 градусов выше реального горизонта. И я бы сказал, что слой дымки находится примерно в два раза выше горизонта, чем — яркая синяя полоса на закате; он в два раза толще. Звезды
Нет, я имел в вид
네, 휴스턴입니다. 이륙 후 15분: 015:00, 5622, -165, 047:0
Он пройдёт через Мадрид, а за
और 11, ह्यूस्टन। आपसे एक अनुरोध है। सर्विस मॉड्यूल सेकेंडर
사전 점검 목록이 완료되었
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आपकी जानकारी के लिए, हम उम्मीद करते हैं कि पृथक्करण अभिव
こんにちは、
Warten Sie etwa ei
자, 휴스턴, 
और ऐसा लगता है 
알겠습니다. N
제미니 4호, 카나본 CAP C
حسنًا. مفهوم. ابدأ Retrofire،... شروق الشمس 10:08:40. ومفهوم، انسخ حالة الطقس، ومقياس الارتفاع 2986، واستعادة ناها RESCUE 1 في توقيت غرينتش 02:58؛ وناها SEARCH 1 في توقيت غرينتش 03:44؛ والمدمرة ماسون، لا يو
Das würde nur Treibstoff ve
Люди, слушающие музыку с высокой скоростью передачи данных, говорят, что это как сидеть в гостиной и с
आप VOX पर हैं। हम आपको साफ-साफ सुन पा रहे हैं और 
Thank you. Earth
Джим, мы только что проверили ваши результаты на точность, и, по их оценкам, они отличаются от теоретического оптимума всего на пару тыся
ठीक है। हमने ट्रैक के लिए अपना रोल गलत तरफ लगा दिया है। हम तब तक रोल
了解しました。18時から22時ですね。RKV上空のRev 12ではPLAとCLAのアップデートを行います。カナリア上
ह्यूस्टन, यह अपोलो 8 है। क्या आपको हाई बि
ジェミ
वॉली, जाने से पहले एक बार और ब्
그리고 연소 과정 동안에는 물론 오차 조절 바늘을 통해 피치와 롤을 제어하게 될 텐데
और, आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें, अगर हम पहले चरण में ईंधन भरते हैं, तो मध्यमार्ग सुधार संख्या 1 की तीव्रता लगभग 17 फीट प्रति सेकंड होगी। फिलहाल हम ईंधन न भरने पर विचार कर रहे है
Bene. Ora andiamo avanti e torniamo al piano 
Роджер. Kano Cap Com. Вы меня слышите
Yeah, not bad, is it? See, the O2 pressure is coming down now. Okay, the mains coming on the 
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. ها هي قارة أفريقيا... تواجهنا الآن، وبالطبع، كل شيء يصغر شيئًا فشيئًا مع مرور الوقت. البحر الأبيض المتوسط ​​صافٍ تمامًا. تبدو الشمس وكأنها على وشك الغروب فوق مدغشقر. يبرز الحزام الاستوائي لأفريقيا بوضوح تام. نرى اللون الأخضر الداكن أو الأخضر الموحل، مقارنةً بالألوان الرملية في الطرف الجنوبي لأفريقيا، وبالطبع، الساحل الشمالي لأفريقيا 
Toutes les batt
रॉजर, और 
أنا آسف. هذا قائد الطائرة. لقد... كانت خمس ساعات ونصف، وأظن أن أربع ساعات منها على الأقل كانت نوماً ه
Magnifique! Fa
We're passing over the Himalayas, I believe. Very close to the pictures that Gordo took
Roger,
روجر. ظ
Gemini 4,
是啊，我想我最好把那个口袋——还有钱包——都拿走。这样吧，不
Wir befinden uns im Ruhemodu
D'a
Abbiamo caricato il tuo NAV e quello esterno, in quest
알겠습니다. 마이크, 오늘 뉴스는 여기까지
Nun ja, so nützlich ist es nicht mehr; das scheint es eigentlich nie zu sein.
حسنًا، وفي الصفحة التالية، رقم 29، على الجانب الأيمن
D'accord. Je vous do
D'accord. Ensuite, panneau 3: TRANSPONDEUR, PRIMAIRE; AMPLIFICATEUR DE PUISSANCE,
Роджер, Gemini VIII. Время на нем 
シュノーケルをオーバーラ
Хорошо, Вэнс. Я поставил BAT Baker на зарядку; мне кажется, он еще не совсем стабилизировался. Когда я оставил его там
ट्रै
Gemini VIII, RKV CAP COM. Wir werden von h
लेकिन वह मुझे इसे निष्क्रिय अवस्था में दे रहा है। बेशक, मैं भी उसे अपना कमांड मॉड्यूल दे रहा हूँ, जो इस समय 
ठीक है। वही पुरानी समस्या फिर से आ गई है। मुझे स
Right.
Très bien, Jack. C'est l'unité de capte
يا أهل هيوستن، ستُقدم لكم قاعدة ترانكويليتي بعض التعليقات بخصوص سؤال الجيولوجيا الذي طُرح الليلة الماضية. لقد هبطنا في حقل فوهات بركانية ناعم نسبيًا، يتكون من فوهات ثانوية مستطيلة وأخرى دائرية، معظمها ذو حواف مرتفعة بغض النظر عن حجمها. هذا ليس صحيحًا دائمًا، فهناك بعض الفوهات الصغيرة التي لا تظهر لها حواف واضحة. تتكون الكتلة الأرضية في جميع أنحاء المنطقة من رمال ناعمة جدًا إلى طمي. أظن أن أقرب ما يكون إليها 
Roger. Veuille
Ok, Mike, il nostro tempo CDH è
Okay. Stand by. Let me run tha
Верно. И клапан аварийного давления в кабине подключ
Не могу сказать наверняка, но пилот, скорее всего, будет спать
Ripe
Роджер. Всё верно, Джим. Чтобы ответить на ваши вопросы и исправить один момент, рыскание должно соответствовать вашему текущему рысканию, каким бы оно ни было, и это вверх при крене 0, тангаже 90, текущем рыскании. Ещё один момент: вы сказали «отключить», и вы не расслышали оста
Stiamo ripulendo tutto. Io resterò sveglio e cercherò di tenere la navicella in posizione verticale e di scattare qualche foto automatica, ma vog
제가 "미국 전
ठीक है, अब शुरू कीजिए। हम टी
了解です。BATチャージ、オフ。ACインバータ2、オフ。メインバスタイ、BAT B/C、オン、アップ。パネル250：BAT A、パワーエント
شكراً
جيمي
如果您近期有使用
罗杰，查理。我想向你们汇报一下我们的氯化消毒情况。在B4隔间，我们有1、2、3、4、5、6、7个——更正一下，是8个氯和缓冲剂安瓿的隔间，其中——让我更正一下，是7个隔间，其中一个是空的，一直都是空的，还剩下6个。在另一边的B7隔间，我们还有一个容器，里面有7个隔间，所以总共有7个加6个，里面装着6瓶氯和7瓶缓冲剂。现在，我每天使用1瓶氯和1瓶缓冲剂，所以
Roger. À chaque fois que je l'ai remise en service, la pression de vapeur est montée jusqu'à environ 0,07 à 0,1; ​​mais dès que la vapeur et l'eau étaient réglées sur AUTO, 
Sigma Seven this is Indian Com Tech. I read you loud and clear. Standby for Indian 
そうですね、すべての部分を楽しみにしていま
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend die Details erläutern. Okay. Der Eintritt in die Atmosphäre erfolgt um 142:40 Uhr; etwa 6,5 ​​Stunden vorher, also ungefähr, beginnen wir mit der Aktivierung der Heizleistung, indem wir die Temperaturen des Kommandomoduls überprüfen und dieses gegebenenfalls vorheizen. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies notwendig sein wird. Detaillierte Anweisungen dazu folgen später. Ungefähr 6 Stunden vorher beginnen wir mit dem Hochfahren der Heizleistung anhand der modifizierten 30-Minuten-Checkliste, die Sie bereits für den vorherigen Zwischenkurs verwendet haben. Kurz darauf, etwa 5 Stunden vorher, benötigen wir die Ausrichtung für die Körperachsenausrichtung mithilfe des Erdterminators, wie zuvor. Sobald wir das haben, führen wir -7 durch, was jetzt etwa einer Brenngeschwindigkeit von 2 Fuß pro Sekunde oder etwa 15 Sekunden entspricht. Mir wurde gesagt, dass sie jetzt bei 1,5 liegt, also deutlich innerhalb der Toleranz. Okay. Danach beginnen wir sofort mit dem Manöver zur Abwurfposition des Servicemoduls. Da wir es früher als üblich abwerfen, befindet es sich in der Flugebene. Wir benötigen und wollen keine Abweichung von der Flugebene. Das Servicemodul befindet sich also in der Flugebene und ist entlang des Radiusvektors nach außen gerichtet. Anschließend bereiten wir das Kommandomodul für den SEP des Servicemoduls vor, einschließlich der Überprüfung und des Heißlauftests. Etwa 4 Stunden und 30 Minuten vor dem geplanten Zeitpunkt werfen wir das Servicemodul ab. Wir werden die Maschine so lange hochziehen, bis wir das Servicemodul im Flug haben und versuchen, ein paar Fotos zu machen. Wir werden aber keine riskanten Manöver für Fotos durchführen, da wir den Flugbahnwinkel zu diesem Zeitpunkt nicht verändern wollen. Okay. Das gibt uns ungefähr zwei Stunden Zeit, um die Vorbereitungen abzuschließen, falls wir in Verzug geraten. Dann können wir die Checkliste durchgehen und das Hochfahren des Kommandomoduls vorbereiten. Wir werden das Kommandomodul etwa zweieinhalb Minuten vor dem Start vollständig hochfahren. Wir werden den Computer zuschalten, die Maschine hochziehen, die Statusvektoren übertragen und die Plattform des Kommandomoduls ausrichten. Spätestens nach etwa anderthalb Stunden, also mit einer Stunde Zeit für die Vorbereitungen am Kommandomodul, werden wir das Manöver zur Abwurflage einleiten. Anschließend beginnen wir mit dem Schließen der Abwurfzone. Natürlich ist unsere Lagerung noch nicht vollständig konfiguriert. Wir schließen die Luke, führen eine Druckdichtigkeitsprüfung durch und trennen die Landekapsel bei -1 Stunde bzw. 141 Stunden und 40 Minuten ab. Sobald das geschehen ist, können Sie das Manöver zur Eintrittsposition einleiten. Dort angekommen, führen Sie eine Sextanten-Sternprüfung durch, demontieren die Optik 
बहुत बढ़िया, बहुत बढ़िया। और 
ह्यूस्टन, हमारे चार्ट देखने के अनुसार, हम अभी स्माइथ सागर के ठीक पूर
Oui. Eh bien, c'est précisément ce que nous essayons de faire. Nous cherchons à comprendre ce qui se passe. Peut-être 
Che stupidaggine. Ora passiamo al fly-by-wire basso. Ho avuto un caso di doppia autorità e ho davvero fatto un pasticcio. Ma è meglio risparmiare carburante. È fin troppo facile entrare in
アポロ13号、ヒュース
オーウェン、プラットフォームの位置合わせで奇妙なのは、時間をかけて、本当にゆっくり、慎重に、正確にマーキングすると、DTCで急いで、トラッキングが比較的悪い状態で作業するのとほぼ同じ星の角度差が出てくることです。星の角度差は鈍感のようです。六分儀のど
Mainten
Я пр
Okay. We're predicting at the nominal time of your next midcourse, which is entry interface minus 2 hours - we're predicting 1.4 foot per second burn which changes your gamma at entry interface by a tenth of a degree. Right now with no further maneuvers, your gamma is minus 6.39 degrees, and we're going to
D'accord, Houston. Nous avons besoin de votre appel pour 
Ich bin nur
嘿，我想我明
روجر. وفقًا للصفحة 47، الخطوة 1، كان لدينا نظام التحكم في التوجيه في وضع PGNS وMODE CONTROL، PGNS، AUTO؛ وبالطبع، لم يتم تفعيل قواطع الدائرة في المحركات 
可以。我们可以关掉
음
よし、フレッド、よくやった。4行目から：スーツファン1「閉」、グリコールポンプ自動変速機、VHF B送信機「開」、VHF A受信機「開」。その下：信号強度表示「開」、操作「閉」。その下、5行
我们刚刚完成了阿金纳号的偏航操作，偏航角达到 09
このエリアでは太陽の反射が強いため、地表に見える特徴を判別するのは難しく、テレビではさらに難しいと思いますが、境界線に近づき、影が長くなるにつれて、顕著な
分かりました。それほど心配している
우리는 53373, 초당 32
Ti lasciamo u
那是在B-2着陆点。接下来是B-3着陆点。此时俯仰角大约下降10度。之前关闭扫描仪时出现的滚转误差已经消失了。现在，我打算稍微增加宇航服的气流，以增强再入大气层
Roger, Friendship Seven. Ich habe den Eindruck, dass deine Fluglage nicht ganz korrekt ist. Es gibt Abweichu
فحص التواصل. 1، 2، 3، 4، 5، 6، 7، 8، 9
Ricevuto. Ha superato il limite di attenzione, arrivando al limite di scansione o RF, a quanto ho capito. E 
تمام
When
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地から昨夜の地質学に関する質問についてコメントをいただきます。私たちは、比較的滑らかなクレーター地帯に着陸しました。そこ
Roger. Kopie. 6 plus
रॉजर। हवाई कैप कॉम, यह सिग्मा सेवन ह
알겠습니다, 빌. 4번 항목에 온보드 상태 벡터를 사용하는 것에 대한 제 의견은 이제 마무리 짓겠습니다. 현장에서 좀 더 살펴본 결과, 's'를 만들고 모든 계산을 진행해야 하는데, 미루거나 두 번 하는 것보다는 지금까지 사용해 온 절차대로 진행하는 것이 좋겠습니다. 달 궤도 관련해서는, 잭 슈미트를 비롯한 몇몇 사람들이 창문이 미치는 영향을 검토하고 있습니다. 기본적으로 2번 항목에 영향을 줄 수 있는 두 가지 옵션이 있는 것 같습니다. 하나는 물론 당신과 짐이 자리를 바꿔서 짐이 밖을 내다보고 SAM을 조준하는 것이고, 다른 하나는 기체를 돌려서 짐이 광학계를 최대한 앞으로 향하게 하고 망원경으로 SAM을 조준하는 것입니다. 창문을 어떻게 활용할 수 있을지 여러분의 의견을 듣고 싶습니다. 혹시 의견이 있으시면 저희가 고려해서 최대한 빨리 계획을 확정하고 싶습니다. 나중에 미루다 보면 중간에
...попробовал использовать ACME, индикатор неисправности комп
낮춰서 말하는 백업이나 그런 것에 대
حسنًا، جاك. بهذا نكون قد أتممنا الإجراء، والآن سأشرح لكم كيفية العودة إلى وحدة التحكم وتزويد الحافلات الرئيسية بالطاقة مؤقتًا باستخدام مفتاح BUS. أولًا، نريد التأكد تمامًا من عدم وجود أي أح
We don't have a main yet. Passing through 
Okay. This may be a stupid question, but do you have any idea 
هيوستن. أبو
روجر.
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। आपके टेलीविज़न
نعم. لقد استنتجتُ ذلك نوعًا ما يا تشارلي. الصفحة 16، "الاحتر
助推器脱离我们时，可以看到燃料从滚转喷嘴喷出。助推器翻滚着，大部分时间都在一个垂直于航天器主轴的平面内运动，可以看到它拖着长长的尾焰。我会在飞行计划上画个简图。航天器分离时，到处都是碎片。我们转身一看，到处都是东西。事实上，直到我们仔细观察助推器，我才真正分
了解。レーダーの調子は良好でした。友人のジュリアンが同席できず、大変残念です。操縦モードについてご報告します。まず、手動操縦とフライ・バイ・ワイヤの低速操縦は良好で、補助ダンピングも良好です。現在は自動操縦モード、つまり逆姿勢です。姿勢は良好に保たれています。よし、ゴー。スーツの温
Okay, Jack. What 
참고로 말씀드리자면, 휴스턴, 달 궤도를 돌기 직전에 우리 주변에 떠다니는 많은 파편들을 관측했는데, 그중에는 어떤 줄의 포장지처럼 보이는 꽤 큰 조각도 있었고, 그 파편은 아직도 우리 주
Vorrei che ricor
It's up in a bag behind my shou
Это «Дружба Семь». Хороший вопрос. Я бы тоже хотел знать ответ. Эти ошибки возникали периодически на протяжении всего полета. Я то включал, то выключал гироскопы. Сейчас я снова на орбите, но это не так, индикаторы положения показывают орбиту, но это не так. Глядя на горизонт, я вижу, что крен примерно на 20° вправо, а тангаж — на 20° больше нормы. По визуальным наблюдениям, тангаж примерно на 55° вниз, а крен — примерно на 20° вправо. Рыскани
H
ح
نعم. انظر حولك، هل ترى النسر الطائر (ألتير) من جانبك؟ هل ترى النسر العقابي (
很好。
로저. 알겠습니다. 하지만 태도에 도달한 후에는 400에 5를 더해서 A라인 
وف
हा
好的。还有一点需要记住，断电开始时（大约在 05g 左右，您可以将其记录在方便的地方）一旦通信中断，我们就需要关闭电源和 PMP 电源。我们只需要在通信中断后执行此操作即可，通信中断大约会在 05g 左右出现。之后，请务必确保 PMP 和电源的安全
우리는 소형 기체를 앞쪽으로 향하게 하여 이동하고 있으며, 궤도에 매우 
Buzz, how's it going there,
Понял, Уолли, громко и четко. П
... REIC
Okay, and you're real good. It's a - It's a pleasure not to have all that noise. Let me tell you what I want to do, Jim. As I said, we're not going to give you detailed procedures, now. What we expect to have for you shortly are procedures which we'll try and get up to you in the following form. First, we'll have a time line, sort of a flight plan thing, which will have the times of all the major events and any configurations, switch settings, and so forth which are peculiar to our configuration and which, therefore, you won't find in the checklist. This, for instance, will be true of the way we power up the command module; and second, of course, we'll have any redlines to the checkli
Roger. Je crois que le seul problème que
Roger. We're maneuvering to position now for the TV. Bill's got it set up in Frank's left rendezvous window, and I'm over in Bill's
... wie auc
حسنًا. انتظر. قلقنا الوحيد، يا رقم ١١، هو بشأن الأغراض التي وضعتها في حقيبة الباب الخلفي. إنها كبيرة الحجم نسبيًا بينك وبين A٨، 
Обе шины в порядке. Все... давайте посмотрим... батарея номер два разряжена до 22. Первая — 24; третья — 24; резервные первая и втора
Okay.
这是坏消息。我认为，鉴于我车里油量不足，只要自动挡的油耗不是太高，我
هذا صحيح يا جاك. والآن لننتقل إلى الصفحة 1-6. عند ثلث المسافة تقريبًا، يظهر النص التالي: "Panel 275 CB MAIN A, BAT C, closed". نريد شطب هذا السطر، والسطرين التاليين، وسنشطب أيضًا: "MAIN A, BAT C, closed; MAIN B, BAT C, cl
जी हाँ, यहाँ से तो हमे
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。時間制限はありません。まずはワイドデッドバンドの設定をお願いします
우리는 지금 가파른 능선을 지나고 있습니다. 이곳은 아폴로 10호가 촬영했던 오래된 분화구 가장자리입니다. 아폴로 10호 승무원들은 약 5만 피트 상공에서 이 능선을 넘었을 때 그 가파른 경사에
Fort
روجر، الصدا
——再次尝试
他に必要な情報は、フライトプランの3-13ページに記載されているものだけです
D'accord. Bien reçu, Fred. La cloche ét
了解し
रॉजर, चार्ल
Okay, you try getting i
Ready whenever you a
Okay. Ich lese es nochmal durch. Anzugkompressor 1 und 2, AUS; Brennstoffzellenpumpen 1, 2 und 3, AUS; Erdung/Neutralstrom, AUS; Hauptbusverbindungen, AUS; Innenbeleuchtung, AUS; Innenraumbeleuchtung, AUS; dann weiter unten: Alle Sicherungen im Verteilerkasten geöffnet;
저도
11, Houston. Einige unserer Leute kamen gerade von draußen und sagten, dass es hier im Zentrum 
わかりました。そんな
मुझ
АВТО, 
Hai chiuso l'interruttore d
好的
ठीक है, चंद्रमा को देखने की स्थिति में लाने के लिए किए जाने वाले युद्धाभ्यास, जिससे चंद्रमा कमांड मॉड्यूल के प्रकाशिक
わかりました。2 + 56 + 37、操縦時間と
D'accord. Ça y 
روج
Houston, Wassermann. Wie liest du
Grazi
نعم يا جاك. وللتأكد من عدم وجود أي لبس في الإجراء، يتم إيقاف تشغيل اللوحة 3، ومضخم الطاقة، وجهاز الإرسال والاستقبال، ومحول التيار المتردد 2، ثم يتم الانتقال إلى اللوحة 250، وهكذ
D'accord. Il semble que le système ne puisse pas pirater la voix normale. Concernant les réservoirs cryogéniques, nous avons constaté une déstratification importante, notamment de l'oxygène, ce qui est perceptible lors des cycles de ventilation. Nous allons donc nous assurer, et nous vous le rappelons, de bien mélanger l'oxygène avant le démarrage. Le système fonctionne comme sur des roulettes
अब मेरे पास पिच और यॉ दोनों हैं - या पिच और रोल दोनों निर्धारित मात्राओं की ओर बढ़ रहे हैं, पिच में 23 डिग्री से गुजर रहे हैं, और रोल में 321 डिग्री से ऊपर जा रहे हैं। और मैं उस दिशा म
Хьюстон, А
J'en suis presque certain, car je l'
Roger. Copy, Gemini, and be advised they're pl
حسنًا. هناك أمران أريد التأكد منهما. أود التأكد من إمكانية إزالة جهاز منع التسرب 
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। 6, /: 45701, माइनस 040, प्लस 157, प्लस 31776, माइनस 00823, माइनस 01
双子座4号，卡那封。我听得清清楚楚。我怎么了？完
روجر. نحن نراقب
«Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это Мучеа. На УВ
Cela prendra un certain temps. Nous traversons une longue période de sécheresse. Nous allons donc essayer de vous laisser tranquille et de vous permettre de vous reposer. Vous avez une mise à jour J-8. L'opération J-8 aura lieu. L'heure prévue e
Was? Ich weiß. Ich habe versucht, so eine Messung
……你建议
收到。我们希望您方便的时候，在这个航程中搅动一下低温冷
阿波罗8号，休斯顿
Houston, qui Apollo 
Questo è tutto per quanto riguarda le notizie mondiali e nazionali e gli approfondimenti. Nella pagina sportiva, Hank Stram dei Kansas City Chiefs è stato nominato allenatore dell'anno della AFL. Questa è la seconda volta in tre stagioni. La votazione è stata ef
Buzz, hier 
روجر. أرى ض
Je ne suis pas sûr de comprendre cette question, mais nous a
روجر. في نظامك، يعمل المؤكسد عند 75 درجة، والوقود عند 74 درجة، والص
Roger. Ich habe eine 10-Charlie 123. 1+45. 01 Tage 05 13 47. 13+37. 11 DE
Houston, Columbia is unable to read Eagle on either antenna or on VHF duplex Bravo. You got any suggestion
좋아요. 환영합
Хорошо. Отли
Хорошо. Оста
我们现在的位置差不多适合高增益；我们想知道您是否想先试运行一下，看看效果如何。还是您想等到正式播出时
イーグル、ヒュースト
حسنًا. سأفعل. أنا الآن عند درجة
收到。我正在低空进行部分电传操纵控制。等我进入后退姿态后再进行控制
没错。自从我睡了第一个4个小时后就脱掉了手套……我把
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। ओम्नी
罗杰。我刚才在录音机上录了些东西。我唯一注意到的异常之处是，夜侧地平线上方大约7到8度处有一层相当高的、看起来像是薄雾的东西。我能透过它看到
Что ж, мне не хотелось бы говорить, что меня это не интересовало, но мне сейчас 
جيم، لقد نسخت 63 و 64، والتي أعتقد أنها كانت درجات الحرارة المنخفضة 1
如果我们有一个事件计时
Bene
ठीक है। यह पूरी तरह से स्पष्ट नहीं है कि यह वास्तव में मैकेनिकल स्टॉप तक पहुंचा है या नहीं, और अगर पहुंचा भी है, तो बैक रूम के लोग कहते हैं कि हम बिना किसी नुकसान के अधिकतम 15 मिनट तक उस स्टॉप के 
Okay. Machst du da etwa ein Foto von dir, J
Wir verschwenden sicherlich
罗杰。你估计恢复时间是多
我觉得这不算什么大问题；只是切换到自动模式时它会跳一下。我不认为这会影响我们参
Roger. Good signal through KB
Roger, my suit inlet is 78 (degrees)
रॉजर। पूर्वी प्रशांत महासागर में स्थित अंतरिक्ष यान से हमें पृथ्वी का केंद्र दिखाई दे रहा है। हम हवाई द्वीप समूह को स्पष्ट रूप से नहीं देख पा रहे हैं, लेकिन उत्तरी अमेरिका का पश्चिमी तट साफ 
Das bedeutet, wachs
Molto bene. Vuoi in
Sigma Seven，这里
好的。在太平洋中部着陆区，天气状况良好。云量2000
Roger. Understand the general impression of being moist as it packed in the core tube. Next question: we did copy your comments prior to the of your general description of the area. We wonder if either of you would have any more lengthy description or more detailed descriptio
阿波罗8号
OAMS はどれくらいありましたか?
الأمر 
आपके पहले स्टार के बारे में हमारे पास कुछ नतीजे हैं, अगर आप सुनना चाहें तो सुन सकते हैं। बाकी स्टार्स के नतीजे हम आपको कुछ घंटों 
On ne peut pas faire grand-chose pour e
Houston, Apollo 11. Der Sextant scheint zu diesem Zeitpunkt
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, ici Steelhead,
わかりました。これは高速帰還のためのペリシントス+2です。これは/62871、マイナス161、プラス129、プラス45224、マイナス06216、マイナス18712 001 287 351、11月のアルファ星プラス00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296、地球上010、右37、プラス1475、プラス06500 132
わかりました。ここでOMNIを切り替える必要がありま
روجر، هيوستن. -11، /: 45597، -040، +157، +36325، -01727، +01428 180 003 000، غير قابل للتطبيق، +00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254؛ دلتا العقرب، لأسفل 103، لليسار 48، +0742، -16500 13005 36327؛ سيريوس، ريجل، 129 155 010؛ أربع رباعيات، 15 ثانية، علامة ن
D'accord. Bruce, nous abordons l'activité de l'accumulateur d'eau, et elle monte jusqu'à 0,85, oh, environ 0,95, elle a atteint un pi
Das ist
罗杰。我们就知
Самое непонятное, Джек, то, что мне сказали подождать команды GO перед продолжением, это было сначала выключение/сброс низкого напряжения бата
Ну, нам придётся им об этом рассказать. Я не знаю, когда — когда оно погасло, пот
रॉजर
Two other points, Fred. One is that we don't expect hardly any misalineme
Jetzt nehmen wir es einfach und zerlegen es. Fangen an, die... Sachen hier hineinz
지금 지평선 아래로 내려오고 있는데, 대기광이 확실히 두 층으로 나뉘어 있는 게 보이시
Housto
Wir haben allerdings 
Apollo 11, Houston. Based on our sighting since the midcourse, we're showing a gamma of minus 6.57. This is preliminary, though, and we think that after some more tracking it should come on in, and we could tweak it right on into the corridor. It's just about in the center of the corridor; everything's looking fine. We'll have you an entry PAD in a couple of hours before you go to sleep. And from our friends in public affairs, a few headlines, other than your flight. You're still dominating the news. However, there are some other things of interest for you. As I mentioned earlier, the All Star game was rained out. It's going to be played tomorrow. However, President Nixon will not be able to see it as he planned. We'll keep you posted on results. And, also, the weathermen are going to be good to you. Our forecast is, looks like it's holding good for the recovery area; it should be real fine out there. President Nixon, as he prepares to fly out to greet your return, predicted that within 31 years man will have visited at least one other planet bearing some form of life. "In the year 2000, we, on this Earth, will have visited new worlds where there will be a form of life," he told 2000 foreign exchange students at the White House. Before he left for his week long trip, the President sent Congress his proposal for organizing - reorganizing the Interstate Commerce Commission. He also conf
O2 フローに関する何
Die R-Punkte sahen durchweg recht normal aus, und die einzige Backup-Lösung, die ich für die Zwischenmessung verwendet habe, lag sehr na
Roger. Verstanden. I
— Salut Vance. J'avais une question à te poser: sur la liste de rangement, tu nous demandes de placer la caméra de télévision noir et blanc sur le dessus de l'appareil A-7 dans un sac de décontamination A… Je me demandais s'il serait possible, ou s'il y aurait un problème, d
SIGNAL DU CAPTEU
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 캔턴입니다. 여기 원격 측정 데
Roger. Nous allons vous indiquer une position à adopter dans un instant. Veuillez garder votre FDAI activé pour cela. 
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Мы предполагаем, что батарея B зарядится примерно за 2-3 часа. Все ваши системы выглядят исправными; на данный момент использовано около 60 ф
ठीक है। और अब हम आपको चेकलिस्ट की पहली किस्त पढ़
Gemini 4, Gemini 4. Это Хьюстон. Я дам вам обновленную информацию о 27-BRAVO, если вы умеете читать. Это раздельное торможение. Вперед 76. В корму 94. 2+07. 1+58. 09 12 06
रॉजर, स्ट
네, 프레드. 우선, 이 작업을 위한 준비는 24페이지의 비상 점검 목록부터 시작하는 것이 좋습니다. 이에 대한 의견이 있으시면 언제든지 말씀해 주세요. 두 번째로, 연소 자세에 들어가면 태양이 커서 맨 위에 보일 겁니다. 커서가 0에 설정되어 있을 때 태양이 커서를 가르는 것처럼 보일 거예요. 하지만 롤과 요에 매우 민감하기 때문에 연소 자세에서 쉽게 벗어날 수 있다는 점에 유의해야 합니다. 연소 자세 자체는 연소 시간과 자세에 매우 둔감하지만, 필요하다면 문제가 발생하더라도 자세가 크게 중요하지 않은 경우 연소 자세를 해제할 수 있습니다. 따라서 연소 규칙은 단 하나뿐
Роджер, а следующий матч закончил
Okay. Now we talked that over with, and at 12 hours out, everyone seems to think that we don't need to do it there. But in close, it doesn't seem to have any effect on the trajectory, and what's been suggested if you'd like - we can do over the entry checklist and just kind of walk through it on the air with all the people on the console. Right now, you have the team that will be performing the entry session with you so we can go over
これまでのところ、飛行全体に
Роджер, Колумбия. Идентификатор ориентира: лунный модуль — 
It's 34 right now. Hasn't changed
रॉजर। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है, फ्लाई-बाय-वायर सिस्टम पर मैन्युअल रूप से नियंत्रित हो रही है, नियंत्रण में कोई परेशानी नहीं है। बहुत सहज और आसान; नियंत्रण बहुत बढ़िया है। बाएँ पैनल पर फ्यूज अभी भी वही हैं। स्क्विब चालू है, स्क्विब सक्रिय है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। फ्लाई-बाय-वायर सिस्टम स्वच
Ah
네, 저
C'est clair et net, passons au panneau 5. Nous voulons: POMPE À PILES À COMBUSTIBLE CA 1, ARRÊT; CA 2, ARRÊT; et c'est la POMPE À PILES À COMBUSTIBLE 1, CA 1, ARRÊT; POMPES À 
好的。复述
Выглядит неплохо. О, прим
Inoltre, Jerry, vorrei sapere qual
지금 카메라를 수납합니다. 지금 자이로스코프 
इसे गर्
Ja. Wir wünschten, wir könnten Ihnen einen Bausatz schicken, so ähnlich wie beim Zusammenbau eines Modellflugzeugs. Tat
了
わかりました。完了したと理解しました。飛行計画の次の項目は走査望遠鏡による視程試験です。これは前回の飛行計画に記載されていたものと同じです。アークトゥルスの太陽が70度であることを確認します。その後、トラニオンバイアスチェックを行い、その後、…に進みます。前回読ん
अपोलो 8 की ट्रैकिंग अभी भी जारी है और परिणामों के बारे में 
Gémeaux 4, votre tension artérielle est bonne. Nous attendons votre rapport sur votre alimentati
了解。途中訂正その2。SPS/G&N: 63059、プラス097、マイナス020、02644、5792、プラス00118、マイナス00003、
알겠습니다. 확인했
Sieht so aus, als hättest du sie gut im Griff
C'est exact. Ensuite, à -1 + 10, nous effectuerons la mise en marc
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. لدينا بيانات جيدة عن ج
了解しました。ダンプは完了し、テープレコーダーはあなたのものになりました。通話デー
Okay, thank yo
Roger. Le Foxtrot d'Area dure une heure, 28 minutes et 50 secondes. Je répète: une heure, 28 minu
Ok. Mentre Jack era in comunicazione, guardavo fuori dalla finestra di attracco e ho visto un'altra bella pioggia di particelle uscire dal modulo di servizio. E questa volta la posizione sembra essere dall'altra parte. Prima le avevamo sempre viste dalla finestra 1, e da dove le sto guardando, sembra che siano sotto la finestra 6, da qualche parte nel modulo di servizio. Jack sta sale
И продолжаем. Если во время работы двигателя он остановится, и у вас будет мигать NOUN 97, вам следует ПРОДОЛЖИТЬ, затем заполнить бак, ЗАПУСТИТЬ ДВИГАТЕЛЬ, чтобы СТУПИТЬ, и ВКЛЮЧИТЬ ПЕРЕКЛЮЧЕНИЕ ДВИГАТЕЛЯ СНИЖЕНИЯ. Хорошо. Теперь общая информация. Если вы не использовали PC+2, то, вероятно, P - P+4 будет самым ранним. Он будет возвращаться в режиме отказа скорости, о чем вы знаете. Мы говорим о проверке звездной траектории. Мне нужно будет уточнить это позж
Bei Ihrem nächsten Anflug, Columbia, möchten wir Sie bitten, anstatt eines solchen einen Anflug durchzuführen, die Umgebung der von uns angegebenen Koordinaten abzusuchen. Diese
Let's check and see if we actually do get yaw out of these. They are tending to go up in relation to me, rather than tending to draw away aft. With this kind of lighting I can really see the illusion of visibility, due to the external problem of having smoke on the outer panel. Definitely is not on inner panels. It is quite e
Gemini VI, Houston. Nous sommes prêt
ジム、この説明をしている間、通信をより良くしたいので、電力を確保しておきたいと思います
Хорошо. Вопрос только в том, насколько
Sie können einfach in Ihrer jetzigen Konfiguratio
好的，在我进行录音的时候，我会暂时把
31700, NA, NA,, минус 00050, плюс все нули, плюс 00001 000 334 001, все нули, плюс 00190 00050 014 0050 413020 183, Шаула, вниз 064, влево 06, плюс 0747, минус 16410 12988 36301; Сириус, Ригель, 308 209 357; использовать высокоскорост
Okay. Real fine. And while you guys are 
了解。11-BRAVOに戻ります。11-BRAVO ΔVゼロ、ΔTゼロ。GMTRC 01日、07
That's correct. Okay, then we'll finish going back to the tunnel vent, and verify the /CM DELTA-P and make sure it's been holding pressure. And we'll come back again and rehash all of the hatch integrity check and tunnel vent p
Je vais écouter l'enregistrement VOX. Je regarde la vitre baignée de lumière. On distingue nettement un motif fu
Oui. D'ac
Ja. 
Friendship
Roger. We'll make any sacrifice as long as they keep an eye on the sys
알았어. 짐은 지금 BIOMED 장비를 착용하고 있지 않
Cette opération a été très erratique. Je n'ai pas pu en identifier la cause précise. L'appareil a dévié dans un sens en lacet, puis dans l'autre. J'ai eu l'impression, pendant un court instant, que le tangage dérivait. Il semblait y avoir un léger blocage de la pouss
No, quello è il VERBO 66... 
Das ist richtig. Sie können im Flugplan bei 57 beginnen; nenn
È... buono. Non è gassoso come quello del 
Там они просто следят за тем, чтобы автоматические выключатели цепи обогревателя были замкнуты. Следующий пример находи
Gemini VI transmitting data point at 49 minutes
मुझे क्लिक की आ
Roger. Nous indiquons que la température de sortie du radiateur (RAD OUT) de la pile à combustible n° 2 serait d'environ 90 degrés, et légèrement inférieure pour les piles n° 1 et 3, peut-être 75 ou 80 degrés. Il y a environ une heure, vous vous interrogiez sur les performances des piles à combustible; il semble que les piles n° 1 et 2 soient moins performan
嗯，我想我们大概是想退
地元ニュースを少しお伝えします。ハンツビルの郡庁舎が昨日未明に全焼したため、再び建設工事が行われるようです。記事では、待つ家族について少し触れています。これはポスト紙記者のアン・ジェームズによるものです。「私たちは月の裏側で休んでいます」と、ヴァレリー・アンダースさんはクリスマスイブに家族とアポロ8号が月周回軌道を外れて帰還するのを待ちながら言いました。アンダースさんは火曜日の午前0時に帰宅し、近所の人たちが子供たち全員を集めてくれたので、宇宙船が月の裏側で通信不能になっている間、家族は休むことができました。フランク・ボーマン大佐の自宅は、屋外に4つの大きな常緑樹のリースが飾られ、粉雪が舞い、赤いリボンで飾られていました。書斎の木が彼の無事の帰還を待っています。ブロンドの愛らしい妻スーとたくましい息子たち、フレデリックとエドウィンは、真夜中に月周回軌道から離脱するまで家にいる予定です。普段はセント・クリストファーズ・エピスコパル教会の真夜中の礼拝に出席するのが恒例です。予定では午前0時に家族で集まります。ボーマン家には小さな子供がいないので、クリスマスプレゼントの贈呈はボーマン大佐が月往復飛行という素晴らしいホリデーギフトを持って戻ってくるまで待つことにします。マリリン・ラヴェル大佐の4人の子供たちは、子供たちに関しては全く普通のクリスマスを過ごす予定だと、忙しいラヴェル大佐の妻は言います。しかし、プレゼントの話はできませんでした。なぜなら、そのうち2人がすぐ隣に座っていたからです。「昨晩着ていた服をまだ着替えていないんです」とラヴェル夫人は言います。しかし、大人から大人への贈り物は、ラヴェルが帰宅するまでずっとそこにある
أعتقد أنكم جميعًا قد فكرتم 
جاك، هذا بيان عام. يبدو أن درجات الحرارة قد انخفضت بمقدار يتراوح بين 6 و8 درجات مئوية عما كانت عليه بالأمس. يبدو أن كل شيء لا يزال ضمن الحدود المسموح بها، لكننا
— J'ai pu identifier la patte de chat et la paire de cratères tout au bout, mais je n'ai pas vraiment distingué le V inversé ni les trois petits cratères incurvés sur u
Okay. Die Kabinentemperatur beträgt 92 Grad. Ich gebe Ihnen die Wechselrichter. Bitte warten. – Der Hauptwechselrichter (250 W) hat eine Temperatur von ca. 143 W. Der 150-W-Wechselrichter hat eine Temperatur von 102 Grad. Der Standby-Wechselrichter hat eine Tem
Roger. Mike, as-tu bien reçu notre recommandation concernant la suite
あ
一
मैं तब तक इंतजार करना चाहता ह
Roger. We're just sitting around waiting for something to do. We need a state vector, a REFSMMAT before we can proceed on with the AGS, and we need you to watch our DAP da
ठीक है, वैंस। मैं देखता हूँ कि मेरे पास यह है या नहीं। मैं A-13 फॉर्मेट में 70 मिलीमीटर DC हैसलब्लैड 80 मिलीमीटर लेंस का उपयोग करना
Très petites, je dirais de l'ordre de 1,5 mm, voire moins. Elles dérivent devant la fenêtre et je les distingue sur le ciel sombre. Au 
Could you - mayb
알겠습니다. CB POWER-2, M
Suona bene
Ricevuto. Tem
هذا صحيح يا جاك، ثم إذا عدت إلى بقية قواطع ال
Penso che tu abbia fatto una cosa inte
ठीक है, अपोलो 13 की उड़ान की तुलना अपोलो 8 से करने पर, टेक-ऑफ के दौरान लगभग उतना ही कंपन हुआ जितना मैंने अपोलो 8 में महसूस किया था, लेकिन 
جا
こちらフレンドシップセブン。はっきりと聞こえます。どう
रॉजर, 11. अब हम आपकी आव
ああ、だめだ、だめだ！（ドックのライトを消さないでくださ
好的
Entreremo nei dettagli di ciò che c'è qui intorno, ma sembra un insieme di quasi ogni var
Ora mi sento abbastanza riposato, anche se non sono riuscito a dormire bene. Ho fatto due pasti. 
Houston CAP COM, Gemini VI. We read you loud and clear through all tho
Давление
알겠습니다. 현재 자이로스코프는 4도 차이만 나타내고 있으며, 그 차이는 줄어들고 있습니다
Он спустилс
好
Хьюстон, вы видите вид Земли, снятый ниже лунного горизонта. Мы будем следовать по траектории до терминатора, где развернём космический аппарат и покажем вам вид на затенённую область на терминаторе, который должен хорошо отображатьс
Roger. You're very clear when you come through. It's jus
حسنًا، هذا واحد من عدة أمور. ونود إخباركم بشيء أخبرتُ به جيم سابقًا، وهو يتعلق بالتحكم. لديكم الآن تحكم كامل في وضع التشغيل الكامل إذا احتجتم إ
Bene. Guardando la voce 1: il secondo elemento riguarda la fase di cold soak Kelvin di 12 ore, e nelle discussioni che ho avuto qui e prima del volo, credo che si sia con
Roger. Bitte wiederholen. Für Bereich 17-1, Querneigung 00 Grad, ergibt die Differenz zwischen RN und RP +107. Zwei
روجر. من باب الفضول يا بيل، يمكننا أن نتحدث قليلاً عن سخانات خزانات التبريد، وكذلك عن المراوح. لاحظنا أن السخانات تعمل بشكل طبيعي، حيث تتناوب بين التشغيل والإيقاف؛ ومع مرور الوقت، يزداد معدل هذه الدورة، مما يشير إلى وجود بعض التطبق الحراري في الخزانات. وعندما نقوم بتشغيل المراوح كل 4 ساعات لبضع دقائق، فإن ذلك يُحرك السوائل، فتبدأ السخانات بالعمل والإيقاف مرة أخرى بوتيرة أبطأ لفترة، حتى يحدث التطبق الحراري مجدداً، فتصبح الدورة أسرع قليلاً. هذا أمر طبيعي بالطبع؛ نشير إليه فقط من ب
Schön, dass ihr alle in
П
Хорошо. Что касается средней дистанции, я думаю, все согласны с тем,
«Аполлон-8», вы бы 
わかった
아폴로 
You planning on using our com
حسنًا. انخفض مستوى التحكم التلقائي في الكسب (AGC) إلى ما أسميه مس
D'ac
그리고, 잭, 전기가 들어왔어
Ricevuto. Ottima le
收到。所
ठीक है। अगर आप अभी मुझे सुन रहे हैं, तो मैं ह
Roger, Bill. Falls ihr den Polarisationsfilter zur Hand habt, könntet ihr ihn bitte umdrehen und vorne anbringe
Just my kind of weath
At, light value reading, for the black and white film, is 13 for ASA 64. Setting light value of 13. Taking picture number 7 with filter. The continent of South America is difficult to photograph because of all the weather. I will take a panorama at this time. Starting at almost 8 hours. In fact, it will be. MARKT, 7, 8, 9 black photographs, black and white film. Ten photographs, black and white film. The shots are being taken at 250 5.6 (1/250 secon
Yo
У меня всё в порядке на 23:18 — восходящий узел находился на 82 
مرحباً،
أبولو 8، 
D'accord. C'est parti. L'objectif est une correction de trajectoire pour un retour libre: -0021,3, +0004,1, -0031,2; HA et HP sont NA; DELTA-V 0038,0; 031, 120, 298, -00213, +00041, -00312; NA. Et voici vos angles GDA. Tangage 5,86, roulis 6,75. Votre poussée: 5 secondes à 10 %, puis le reste à 40 %. Votre remplissage sera d
好的，吉姆。收到。我们会尽最大可能完成这件事。看起来相当可行。首先，在指令舱里，我们需要给你发送一些单独的启动序列，每次启动一点点。越接近进入舱门，检查清单上的步骤就越多。到大约零下45度的时候，我们就完
Время при
Wir zeigen eine Reichweite von etwa 104.80
Beh, come preferisci. Abbiamo pensato
حسنًا. إذًا، نستخدم وضع PRO، وينتهي بنا الأمر بظهور وميض 5018؛ ونريد هنا مناورة تلقائية بدلًا من استخدام ، لذا نستخدم وضع PRO مع التوجيه، PNGS؛ والتحكم في الوضع، تلقائي. لدينا نطاق ميت 1.4 درجة، وسيعطينا المؤشر لمحاولة ضبطها، وفي ذلك الوقت أنظر من خلال ، وإذا كان الأمر مشابهًا لفحص الشمس في أبولو 11، فكل ما
让我们看看DSKY的评价
Я думаю о размещении вещей.
حسنًا. العنوان الرئيسي هو "الدخول، التحضير لوحدة الهبوط القمرية، قبل 6 ساعات". أولًا، تشغيل التغذية العادية للبطارية 5؛ ثانيًا، استخدام قائمة التحقق المعدلة للتفعيل لمدة 30 دقيقة. بعد ذلك، يكون الوقت قبل 5 ساعات، أو 7 ساعات إذا لزم الأمر. الآن، لدينا إجراء ما قبل الدخول. أولًا، ننتقل إلى وضعية وحدة الخدمة SEP. ثانيًا، نضبط الإعدادات لإطلاق النار السريع. ضمن ذلك، نضبط DEADBAND MAX، وATTITUDE CONTROL، ثم نضبط PULSE. ثالثًا، ننفذ إطلاق النار السريع. رابعًا، نعود إلى وضعية SEP، مع ضبط ATTITUDE CON
Sigma Seven, Cap Com, 1 м
혈압이 오르고 있습니다
...; о
11号，休斯顿。指挥官
Oh
1.5より大きいで
Es ist interessant festzustellen, dass meine Fluglage ungefähr 30 Grad Steigung, 130 Grad Rollen nach rechts und 20 Grad Gieren nach links beträgt. Der Ballon bew
Per te è tutto a posto? Guardo fuo
كيف حال 
ठीक है। और, ह्यूस्टन
Roger. Ich habe hier unten keine Beschwerden gehört, Frank. Wir werden dich über das Essen informieren, wenn du zurüc
是的，肯定会冷。你根本想象不到这东西减速的时候会变得有多冷，我刚才用计时器计时了一下……现在大概过
好的。根据我们目前的跟踪数据，昨晚给出的近地点时间（69+10
रॉजर। समझ गया। और मेरा नज़
سأخبرك يا فتى. إنها تشكل مشكلة خطيرة فيما يتعل
Il y a beaucoup moi
كارنا
That midcours
Roger, Fred. Ich verstehe
مرحباً هاواي، هل وصل
Questo è affermativo. Bene. Ora ci stiamo preparando per iniziare la sequenza di allineamento. Hai familiarità con la sequenza generale degli eventi che useremo, J
Va
Unable to dim reticle sufficiently for a night acquisition.
20ページの「アクティベーション」ってこと？ わかった、ジャック。電源を切らなきゃ。全く制御できない。16個のジェット機を全部オフにする。他に何か
كين،
Хорошо. Это без то
Je ne sais pas, la pastille est tombée. Je ne vais pas remettre la pastille germicide, car 
هذا هو تسجيل سيجما 7 على وضع VOX فقط. لقد أعدت تفعيل الوضع التلقائي في الوضع العادي بدون استخدام كامل للمحركات. الآن، لدي 85% تلقائي و90% يدوي. وأشعر، الآن وقد استعدت الوضع، أنني أستطيع إجراء بعض التجارب التي لم أكن أس
Du
好的。第一个指令是：“在操作
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। ठीक
Roger. Vous avez une charge dans le C
Okay. Make sure track
Ruhe bewahren, Houston. Wir möc
지금부터 우주 유영(EVA)이 끝날 때까지 수량 스위
Юрий, все постоянно посылают тебе наилучшие пожелания, просят сказать «все
Ok, bene, ok. La prossima cosa che faremo è inizializzare il file, che si trova nella check
你
わかりました。チャンネル - 18 ページ、そのすぐ下には、「点火」の後まですべてが保持されます。「点火がない場合は、スタート プッシュボタンを押します。それでも点火が
लेजर रिफ्लेक्टर लग
मुझे लगता है कि इस चट्टानी मैदान की उत्पत्ति शायद उस बड़े, नुकीले किनारों वाले चट्टानी किनारे वाले गड्ढे से हुई होगी, जिसके ऊपर से हम अंतिम उतरते समय गुज़रे थे। कल मैंने कहा था कि वह लगभग एक फुटबॉल मैदान के आकार का था, और मुझे मानना ​​पड़ेगा कि आते समय उसका माप लेना थोड़ा मुश्किल था। लेकिन जब हम उसके पास से गुज़रे तो मुझे लगा कि वह एस्ट्रोडोम में समा सकता है। और इस चट्टानी किनारे वाले गड्ढे के आसपास की चट्टानें इस क्षेत्र की चट्टानों से कहीं बड़ी हैं। कुछ लगभग 10 फीट या उससे भी बड़ी हैं, और गड्ढे के किनारे से लगभग एक व्यास तक वे बहुत घनी आबादी में फैली हुई हैं। उसके आगे, चट्टानों की संख्या कम होती जाती है, और इस क्षेत्र में भी चट्टानें अनियमित पैटर्न वाली पंक्तियों में फैली हुई प्रतीत होती हैं, और फिर उनके बीच
Okay, Jack. Das sind also die Notizen zum Zeitplan, die ich für dich hatte. Ich muss dir leider sagen, dass ich noch ein paar Korrektu
마크. V/VR =.08, 제
알았
10，/: 45597，减 040，加 157，加 35186，减 01512，减 00520 180 007 000，不适用，加 00186 35223 318 35018 42 0
У
了解、フレンドシッ
री
わかった。テレ
Fred-o，如果你觉得可行，我们很乐意提供一些设置——我们正在研究一些用于拍摄通风口照片
Dovrebbero darsi da fare per sistemare in qualche modo queste finestre. Le tre finestre, il finestrino del portello e i due finestrini laterali, è davvero un peccato che siano quasi del tutto inutiliz
Да уж, сейчас вс
アポロ 8 号。こちらはヒューストンです。フライバイと、周回軌道の 2 時間の操作の後、コピーの準備が整いまし
오늘 휴스턴의 가장 큰 뉴스는 바로 휴스턴 애스트로스에 관한 것입니다. 스포츠계 소식으로는, 휴스턴 애스트로스가 신시내티 레즈와의 경기에서 9회말 극적인 역전승을 거두며 7-4로 승리했습니다. 하지만 9회초까지만 해도 상황은 매우 암울했습니다. 애스트로스는 4-3으로 뒤지고 있었습니다. 그러던 중 1아웃 상황에서 헤수스 알루가 우익수 방면으로 안타를 쳤습니다. 이어 존 에드워즈가 우익수 방면으로 안타를, 샌디 발데스피노가 2루타를 터뜨려 동점 주자를 홈으
Eh bien, nous devrions donc passer à
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir sind in Goldstone bereit für die Fernsehübertragung. Die Aufzeichnung findet in Goldstone statt und wird 
روجر. نسبة الوقود ١٠٣-١٠٠%. نسبة الأكسجين ٨٩-١٠٠%. الطاقة جيدة. حالة أورورا ٧ ممتازة 
로저, 아폴로 11호. 괜찮습니다. 나중에
Bien, 11. Tout d'abord, nos vérifications système se sont déroulées sans problème. Je tiens toutefois à vous rappeler que demain, il est possible que le voyant de pression d'ascension s'allume lors de l'activ
—...точно. Во скольк
트랭퀼리티 베이스, 여기는 
곧 도착합니다... 예정대로 진행 중입니다. 현재 빨간색으로 표시되고 있습니다.
हम यह हिसाब लगाने की कोशिश क
好的。我刚才说的是……为了避免误解，墨西哥湾沿岸地区目前断网
ठीक है। शायद इससे हमें थोड़ा और आत्मविश्वास मिलेगा कि अगर हमें घर लौटते समय कुछ मुश्किलों का सामना करना पड़ा, तो हम पह
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। दूसरे प्रयास में आपका इंजन अच्छा 
알겠습니다. 롤 180, 피치 228, 요 001; 해당 없음; + 0017.9, 6652.2, 7:37, 6626.5, 그리고 육분의 축을 놓쳤습니다. - 트러니언 - 트러니언, 15.7, 제타 궁수자리, 위쪽, 08.0; 롤 2.1; -22.81, -00 - 수정, -025.00, 1140.7, 34087, 013:32:14. 시작 위치: 아르크투루스와 
좋아요. 의사 선생님께서
Me revoilà près de la Croix du Sud, avec cette zone tachetée de lumière… je suppose qu'il y a beaucoup d'étoiles très brillantes. Je ne me souviens pas avoir vu exactement le même spectacle au planétarium. Alpha Centauri et Beta sont très nettes. Il est encore temps – la lumière commence à se faire plus claire et je peux encore distinguer pas mal 
Gemini 4, RKV 
호크스-펠리컨스 
Affermativo. Okay. Se sei pronto a ricevere, ho questa procedur
And I'll call for you -- arming
Roger, 11. Comme vous l'avez probablement constaté, votre angle de conicité en mode a considérablement augmenté suite à l'évacuation des eaux usées, à la purge de la pile à combustible et à un couplage naturel. Il semble donc que nous devions interrompre la transmission dans quelques instants.
Okay, Jack. 
Ok, Ken. Credo che tra poco perderemo l'elevato guadagno. Perché 
알겠습니다. 패널 
Aquarius, Houston. When you look out a detent 2 in the proper burn attitude, what you ought to see is the Sun at 12 o'clock, about halfway between the top of the and the center of the pipper. And you ought to se
Unter mir zieht ein ziemlich großes Gewittergebiet auf. Es muss sich weit erstrecken, denn ich sehe Blitze bis weit rechts am Horizo
Okay. Die Startzeit ist – klingt gut. Das gibt uns genügend Zeit, uns vorzubereiten, falls wir Probleme bei
Мы проиграли — единственное преимущество раннего запуска заключается в том, что если мы сможем снова включить двигатель, то сможем его выключить. Единственное преимущество раннего запуска в том, что можно сейчас сделать мощный маневр, пролететь посередине траектории, а зат
Roger. J'imagine qu'il va rétrécir
Roger. Ich verstehe dich, Wally. Sieht so aus, als ob alles für die nächste Umlaufb
Roger. Nous avons un 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, moins 061, plus 067 135 23 4149; plus 32020, plus 0
During the che
01 06 106 को---1 मिनट पर, 1 घंटा और 7 मिनट बीत चुके हैं
إليكم تقريرًا من هاري روزنتال من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في هيوستن. أضفى بابا نويلان البهجة على ليلة عيد الميلاد للطفل جيفري لوفيل، البالغ من العمر عامين. طرق الأول باب منزله وجلب الهدايا، بينما قام الثاني بتشغيل محرك أبولو 8 العائد من القمر. ارتدى الأول بدلة حمراء ولحية بيضاء، وأطلق صيحة "هو هو" بصوت عالٍ سُمع في آخر الشارع. أما الثاني، فكان محركًا ضخمًا ينفث اللهب خلف القمر، وكان الآلاف ينتظرون بفارغ الصبر خبر تشغيله. "يرجى العلم أن هناك بابا نويل" كانت أولى كلمات أبولو 8 بعد أن خرجت من الصمت اللاسلكي لتُعلم العالم القلق بعد 15 دقيقة من إتمام المحرك لمهمته الحاسمة. قال كين ماتينجلي من مركز التحكم بالمهمة: "لم يتوقع أحد منا أن يحصل على هدية عيد ميلاد أفضل من هذه". وجاء الرد من العقيد فرانك بورمان، قائد المركبة الفضائية: "نشكر كل من كان على الأرض نيابةً عنا. كما تعلمون، لم نكن لننجح لولاكم". في هذه اللحظة، أضاءت شجرة عيد الميلاد أمام شاشات التحكم في مركز المهمة، وقرأ رائد الفضاء هاريسون شميدت نسخة فضائية من قصة "زيارة من القديس 
Vous pouvez le ramener à BLOCK, et pour information à Bill, dernière estimation de la t
大丈夫で
Gemini
로저. 블록 안에 있어요. 텔레비전 방송 사이에 새로운 상태 벡터랑
रॉजर। हम रियल-टाइम और ACQ-AID पर हैं। ऐसा लग रहा है कि मैं अभी लगभग सीधे सूरज की ओर देख रहा हूँ। मैं थोड़ा घूमूँगा ताकि क्षितिज देख
Gemini 4, CSQ. Vous pouvez éteindre votre or
Soll ich die Nick- un
Ro
OK, le chargement est prêt, vous avez le nouvel horaire TR. On attend la tension du pilote. Êtes-vous prêt à copier votre
أورورا سفن، أورورا 
네. 별거 아니에요. 음, 어디 보자. 스포츠부터 시작해 볼까요? 휴스턴 애스트로스는 8대 7로 간신히 이겼고, 애틀랜타 브레이브스는 9회에 5~6점을 냈지만 간신히 승리했어요. 그리고 오늘 중요한 경기 중 
好的。下午好。这里是阿波罗8号宇航
حسناً. أستطيع أن أقو
The temperature is about 111, the helium pressure - Do you just want the quantity, or do you want th
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Nos données préliminaires indiquent une bonne trajectoire de
2 Meilen. 100 - 206. Könnte et
Ricevuto. Le batterie dell'adattatore sono tutte a posto
Ils m'ont dit qu'ils me voulaient à l'endroi
C'est confirmé. Les deux disjoncteurs du tableau 250 vont s'ouvrir; les deux disjoncteurs du tableau 275 vont s'ouvrir également. Bien, les disjoncteurs du tableau 250 sont déjà réglés. L'onduleur AC 2 est réglé. L'onduleur AC 2 et le bus AC 1 devraient maintenant être hors tension. Les deux derniers interrupteurs du tableau 3 sont réglés. Le paramètre « Sé
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。排水のために特定の姿勢に操縦しますか
Ожидание (зона 
ठीक है, जिम। "जब स्थिति सही हो, तो एसीए डिटेंट से शून्य 
Vas-y, Steelhead. L'am
Houston, konnten Sie di
알겠습니다. 그렇게 하
Roger. Ve
روجر. سنبدأ بأخبار العالم. شهدت ليلة عيد الميلاد إشادة واسعة برواد فضاء أبولو 8 الأمريكيين، وتعبيرًا عن الآمال في تعاون دولي في استكشاف الفضاء، وذلك مع بث رسائل التهنئة العالمية بينما كانت المركبة الفضائية الصغيرة تدور حول القمر. حتى في العالم الشيوعي، كان هناك حماس كبير لأول رحلة بشرية إلى القمر. في موسكو، استذكر العالم السوفيتي أناتولي بيسارانوف كيف تبادلت بلاده
好的，CTE，二
네. 별거 아니에요. 음, 어디 보자. 스포츠부터 시작해 볼까요? 휴스턴 애스트로스는 8대 7로 간신히 이겼고, 애틀랜타 브레이브스는 9회에 5~6점을 냈지만 간신히 승리했어요. 그리고 오늘 중요한 경기 중 하나였던 시카고 컵스는 비 때문에 경기가 취소됐습니다. 나머지 경기 결과도 다 알고 있는데, 필요하시면 말씀해 주세요. 마닐라와 루손 섬 여러 곳에서 지진이 발생했어요. 세 차례 진동이 있었고, 건물들이 약 30분 동안 흔들렸는데, 리히터 규모 5 정도였습니다. 자, 그럼. 비틀즈가 더 이상
ठीक है। मैं आपको इसे 14:45:00 बजे दे दूंगा। लगभ
换能器
버튼을 누르겠습니다. 아직 0.8초밖에 안 되니까, 누적되는 걸 원치 않아요. 03초에 누르면 19
जी हाँ। चार्ली, जब हमें आपसे संपर्क करने में दिक्कत हो रही थी, तो मैंने हाई गेन पर पूरा नियंत्र
Well, 
Хорошо. следующим образом: /: 45597, минус 040, плюс 157, плюс 35189, минус 01513, минус 00346 180 007 000, неприменимо, плюс 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, Дельта Скорпиона (Дзуба), вниз 071, влево 45, плюс 0748 минус 16500 12995 36300; Сириус, Ригель, 129 155
In questo momento, siamo in un assetto di tipo "muso a terra", tanto che non credo che le stazioni di terra siano in grado di captarci. Abbiamo sentito diverse chiamate interrompersi e interrompersi per noi. Resteremo in 
わかった。そしてその時は月は見え
分かりました。クワッドの数値については、コンピュータープログラムとそこに入っている補正係数を使って、あなたと同じ値を読み取っているように見えますが、4つのクワッドはすべて非常に近いように見えます。例えば、ポ
Ro
Roger. Dacci un trucco per il tim
Как вы и сказали, вам, пожалуй,
Bien reçu. Et les gyroscopes n'indiquent, pour le moment, qu'une 
400
सिग्मा स
C'est exact. Bien, le sol va maintenant vous envoyer une mise à jour à -2 +15. C'est l'heure à laquelle vous devez être configuré pour recevoir la télémétrie. Cette mise à jour comprendra un incrément d'horloge, un vecteur d'état, deux valeurs (une valeur réelle et une valeur préférée) et la charge cible d'entrée. Si vous le souhaitez, je
روجر. سأذهب إلى - أي نوع من أنواع OMNI تريد 
いいえ、46 は与えません
Хорошо. Можете переключиться на высокочастотны
أقوم بالبث الآن على وضع OMNI A، لكنني على وشك الحصول على زوايا استقبال جديدة عالية الكسب؛ ثانية واحدة فقط. حسناً،
Роджер. 07:15 Командир экипажа просыпается. 07:02 За
Avez-vous commencé S-3
Bene. So
好的，燃烧
Roger. Et si possible, nous aimerions que vous mettiez le gant EVA dans un sac en plastique et que vous le fermiez du mieux
Ro
Oh, that's a b
I should mention, Bruce, that when I went to water secondary - water separator to secondary there, I didn't notice any change. But about after 15
わかりました。これでバッグの準備が整いました。次は赤いスーツホース（指揮官用かLMP用かどちらか）をバッグの上部に入れる準備をします。いずれは両方とも作ってもらうことになるからです。そのためには、まず赤いホースと青いホースが分離していることを確認する必要があります。既に分離されているかどうかは分かりませんが、もし分離していない場合は、外側のベータクロスシースをホースの全
ヒューストン、あなたの がさら
سلم لنا على هوارد تيندال، حسناً؟ يبدو أن إجراءه كان
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호. 
何持ってるの？バッテリーAはどれくらい残っ
Okay, Br
Apoll
Je voudrais dire un mot sur le sextant. Son utilisation dans un vaisseau spatial exigu est très difficile, surtout avec le casque. J'ai finalement conclu qu'il serait inutile, avec le casque, d'essayer de prendre les angles requis pour les étoiles visées. J'ai donc retiré mon casque. Cela m'a donné un peu plus de liberté de mouvement, mais j'étais toujours limité à des angles d'environ 20 à 23° sans manœuvrer le vaisseau. L'étoile était alors masquée par la partie supérieure du hublot. En manœuvrant le vaisseau plus fréquemment et plus amplement, on pourrait aligner le grand axe du hublot avec le plan de visée. Mais, limités par le carburant, nous n'avons pas opté pour cette méthode. Nous avons également utilisé le mode pulsé, sans trop de manœuvres. Les étoiles sélectionnées pour cette campagne avaient des angles assez élevés, ce qui rendait l'horizon difficile à atteindre. Nous avons finalement décidé de les photographier un peu plus près de l'horizon. J'ai effectué quelques mesures sur Canopus et quelques autres télescopes, comme vous le remarquerez. Le filtre bleu semblait masquer complètement l'horizon; je ne voyais aucun horizon avec ce filtre. La qualité de notre image de l'horizon est probablement moins bonne en présence de lune. Le filtre vert, en revanche, m'a permis d'obtenir un horizon légèrement pl
روجر. نحن
حسناً، BAT C هو 37، و pyro BAT A هو 37، و pyro BAT B هو 37، و A 94 بالمائة، و B 95 بالمائة، و C
阿波罗11号，阿波
Gemini 4, Hawaii
هذا صحيح يا جاك. هذا فقط لزيادة أمان الحقيبة. عندما تنتهي من تركيبها، سيكون لديك شريطان في اتجا
了解。ビーコンの電源を切り
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, hier spricht Housto
Roger. Il tuo inverter da 150 VA è a 180°. Sembra che funzioni piuttosto ben
لدي مشكلة في نظام التحكم الآلي للطوارئ (ASCS). أعتقد أن النظام لا يعمل بشكل صحيح. دعني... تم تفعيل نظام الرجوع للخلف في حالات الطوارئ، وتم تفعيل نظام الرجوع اليدوي. عليّ تقييم هذه المش
Roger. J'ai vérifié le Command Pilot. Un comprimé d'Actyfed 
Ich freue mich schon seh
Wo befindet sich 
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. إذًا، بشكل عام، ما علينا فعله هو تشغيل الجهاز وتفعيل مؤشر الاتجاه، ثم ضبط وضعية المركبة، ووضع المؤشر في النافذة الأمامية، وسيكون نظام التوجيه مُفعّلًا بالطبع. ولكن يجب توجيه المركبة يدويًا بحيث
태도가 아주 좋아 보이
حسنًا يا جيم، أعتقد أن هذا كل ما لدينا لك الآن. عندما تشعر أنه ليس لديك أي أسئلة أخرى في الوقت الحالي، نود منك إعادة ضبط إعدادات النسخ الاحتياطي للصوت، وذلك بنقل مفتاح وظيفة الصو
ジ
BAT Charlie，37.0；烟火 A，37.0；烟火 B，37.0；氦气压力，3450；顺便一提，氮气 A，2300；氮气 B，2400；5 Charlie，4.5；5 Dog，3.5；6 Alfa，4.0；6 Baker，4.6；6 Char
알겠습니다. 입력하신 시간을 확인해 보니 16분이 맞습니다. 예정된 시간에 맞춰 업데이트된 정보를 제공해 드리겠습니다. 동시에, 해당 항로의 상태 벡터도 업데이트해 드리겠습니다. 중간 항로 수정 7번은 초당 0.7피트 미만이므로 실행하지 않겠습니다. 예정된 수정 사항이 하
Okay, Ken. Capisco. Se
Roger.
Ok. Su Power 5, spegnimento di emergenza. Punto 1, prima riga, cancello "E VHF-A". Seconda riga "Funzionamento SIMPLEX". Terza riga, sostituisco il secondo apice
네, 맞습니다. 회로 차단기 센서 신호, 메인 A 
This is Canton. Loud and clear, Aurora Seven. Can you begin with t
알겠습니다. 아주 흥미롭네요. 그게 당신과 비교해서 어디쯤에 위치하는지 알아볼게요. S-IV가 우리에게 
Roger. La temperatura in cabina è scesa a 15°C e qui
Canary, Friendship Seven. Roger. Kontrollcheck abgeschlossen. Kapsel drin und hält. Ich ha
ممتاز. اسمع يا إد، نريد تعديل خطة الرحلة، ونرغب بتغيير فترة النوم هنا لنمنحك بعض الراحة. نريدك أن تنام لمدة أربع ساعات على الأقل الآن، ويوافق كريس تمامًا على أن ينام جيم جزءًا من هذه ال
11, this is Houston. We're getting a good picture of Buzz now, but no voice modulation. And would you op
Roger, Scott. I am in drifting flight, but I have powered up the a-c bus. It has come on the line very well. I will power up the beacons later. The control mode selected is fly-by-wire although I'm not cont
Ciao, Muchea Com Tech, Friends
Finiremo prim
Well, okay, that's good. All this procedure that I am going to give to you here is relative to what we hope are fixes to the lens and for looking out your rendezvous window at the earth, and all the gimbal angles and all that good s
... da gibt es für mich keine Möglichkeit... Sonde und Fang
了解。バッテリーブラボー
Замечательно. У нас также есть просьба с мыса. Во время вашего следующего пролета над 
收到。我只看到
아마도 0psi는
.
Nein. Das möchte ich erst tun
好的。这是哈尼的新闻稿。晨报上说你们五天内不会去。昨晚的新闻发布会上也提到了这件事，克里斯在回答这个问题时说，看起来我们有
Your attit
Genau das ist es. Ja. *** Warum beugst du dich ni
Roger, Frank. La température du réservoir d'hélium que nous surveillons sur le quad A n'a augmenté que d'un degré pendant toute cette intervention. Nous ne considérons donc pas cela comme trop p
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। दरें एकदम ठीक लग रही हैं। आप आगे बढ़ सकते हैं और प्रक्रिया शुरू क
Хорошо. Я воо
Gemini 4, this is Houston. We passed up this reentry so you two could talk it over and come back later on if you have any questions. For your information, the 63-1 weather forecast looks like a
I got it. I thought it was an island - turned out i
Примерно две минуты поддерживался высокий уровень кисло
Okay. Durante la discesa, però, avevamo il radar di
콜럼비아, 여기
Хорошо, Джим. Понял; сервисный модуль в
तो चलिए इसे यहीं समाप्
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Valerie Anders am Heiligabend, während sie und ihre Familie darauf warteten, dass Apollo 8 die Mondumlaufbahn verließ und zur Erde zurückkehrte. Frau Anders war am Dienstag um Mitternacht dort gewesen, und die Nachbarn hatten gerade alle Kinder zusammengetrommelt, damit die Familie sich ausruhen konnte, während sich das Raumschiff hinter dem Mond befand und kein Kontakt mehr bestand. Das Haus von Colonel Frank Borman war draußen mit vier großen Tannenzweigen geschmückt, mit Puderschnee bestreut und mit roten Schleifen verziert. Ein Baum im Wohnzimmer wartet auf seine sichere Rückkehr, und seine hübsche blonde Frau Sue und seine kräftigen Söhne Frederick und Edwin planen, den Start von Apollo 8 um Mitternacht zu Hause mitzuerleben. Normalerweise würden sie den Mitternachtsgottesdienst in der St. Christopher's Episcopal Church besuchen. Die Familie hatte sich für Mitternacht verabredet. Da es im Hause Borman keine kleinen Kinder gibt, wird die Bescherung einfach warten, bis Colonel Borman mit seinem fantastischen Weihnachtsgeschenk – dem Flug zum Mond und zurück – zurückkommt. Marilyn Lovells vier Kinder werden, was die Kinder betrifft, ein ganz normales Weihnachtsfest erleben, berichtete die vielbeschäftigte Ehefrau von Captain Lovell; aber an Geschenke war nicht zu denken, da zwei von ihnen direkt neben ihr saßen. „Ich hatte noch nicht einmal Zeit, mich umzuziehen“, sagte Mrs. Lovell. Geschenke unter Erwachsenen gibt es aber, und der Weihnachtsbaum wird auch noch da stehen, wenn Lovell nach Hause kommt. Hier ist noch ein interessanter Artikel in der Rubrik „Action Line“. Es gibt einen kleinen Leserbrief an die Redaktion. Da steht: „Wir wollten euch Erdenbewohnern gestern Abend einen Überraschungsbesuch mit einer fliegenden Untertasse abstatten. Wir wurden aber von den verrückten Aktionen eines dicken Mannes mit einem Schlitten und drei Typen in einem raketengetriebenen Eimer, die um den Mond rasten, verjagt. Ist das etwa die Art, wie man einen Planeten regiert?“ Gezeichnet: D
ヒューストンさん、情報提供をお願いします。今、走査型望遠鏡を覗いていますが、何百万もの星が見
双子座六号，金丝雀。你在UHF 1频道上看
Okay. Knapp unter 13. Nur zur Info: Wir haben Leute, die an verschiedenen Themen arbeiten. Wir arbeiten an der bevorstehenden Mittellinie, um unser Steuerungssystem festzulegen und die Ausrichtung zu optimieren. Das LMS und mehrere Teams arbeiten intensiv daran. Wir arbeiten auch an unserem Wiedereintritt, wie und wann wir
로
좋습니다. 이제 짐벌/스로틀 테스트를 해볼까요? 1단계와 2단계를 진행하면 짐
लगता है यह ठीक चल रहा है। थोड़ी देर बाद शायद मुझे इसकी मात्रा बढ़ानी पड़ेगी। मैं इसे थोड़ी देर के लिए 
と
Sept de l'Amitié. Ce Capitaine Indien. Pouvez-vous voi
Dis donc, regarde-moi cette grosse bête qui arrive là-haut! On dirait qu'on fonce droit sur… l'hor
你的舱
구름이 절반을 덮었고, 나머지 절반은 맑습
好的，2-C 是 24, 6；2-B 是 24, 5.5；2-A 是 24, 6；1-C 是 24, 12；1-B 是 24, 11；1-A 是 24, 7。控制是 26, 5；S-2 是 27；S-1 是 27；主
ジェミニ VIII、ハワイ CAP C
روجر. إذا كنت ترغب في التقاط بعض الصور، فننصحك باستخدام مجلة Uniform المحملة بفيلم 
11،
ऐसा नहीं है, लेकिन मैं इसे 
11، هيوستن. إنه عرض تو
روجر، كناري، جيميني. لقد عدنا إلى خطة طيراننا المعتادة، ولكنها حاليًا لا تتضمن تفاصيل كافية فيما يتعلق بالأوقات المحددة. هل يمكنك إبلاغ مركز عمليات هيوستن برغبتنا في تحديث خطة طيراننا بأوقات دقيقة وواضحة أثناء سيرنا في التجارب، وذلك لتسهيل بدء تجاربنا؟ لديهم نفس خطة الطيران 
Ok. Aspetta un att
جيد
रॉजर. 2+40. 16
계속
좋습니다. 이제 정렬 절차, 파워업 절차 등에 대해 좀 더 자세히 이야기해 볼 준비가 되었지만, 먼저 지금까지 들으신 내용을 소화할
13, Hous
Gli interruttori automatici di CONT
Ich glaube nicht
Also get a movie camera 16-mm setting for inside the spacecraft. We have a large bug eye, and we
オデッセイ、ヒューストン
프렌드십 세븐, 버뮤다. 당신은 아직도 책을
わかった。
Forza Housto
Roger. La distance péricynthienne que vous avez annoncée correspond à l'allumage. Nous l'avons mesurée à 75 miles; votre distance pér
アポロ
好的。接下来我们要进行几项通信检查。我们会切换到五种不同的模式，其中只有一种会中断您的操作。在这种情况下，我们会切换到上行备份语音模式，您可能会暂时失去上行语音通信。整个过程中您的下行语音通信将始终保持畅通，整个过程最多需要 10 到 1
Right now it's daylight ov
Roger, Houston. Allez-vous ut
Я провел три теста во время этой передачи дел. Два из них показали результат выше минус 19,6, два — 
Apollo 8, Houston. Los geht's
Rice
Roger. I--am a litt
不，不多。按照G&C检查清单G
Перед нами какой-то объект. Он не мига
Okay. Ich bin immer noch im SLEW-Modus, daher könnten wir beim allmählichen Neigen die 
네, 알겠습니
11, Houston. È ora di cambiare turno. La squadra bianca vi augura la buonanotte; ci vediamo domani
Vorrei fare un piccolo commento sul sestante. Il suo utilizzo in una navicella spaziale angusta è molto difficile, soprattutto con il casco. Alla fine ho deciso che sarebbe stato inutile con il casco per cercare di catturare gli angoli richiesti dalle stelle. Così mi sono tolto il casco. Questo mi ha dato un po' più di flessibilità nell'uso, ma ero comunque limitato ad angoli di circa 20-23° senza manovrare la navicella. Quello che succedeva era che la stella veniva tagliata fuori dalla parte superiore della finestra. Ora, con manovre più frequenti e libere della navicella, si poteva manovrarla in modo da avere l'asse longitudinale della finestra nel piano di inseguimento. Eravamo in qualche modo limitati dal carburante e non abbiamo scelto di manovrare in questo modo. Abbiamo usato anche la modalità a impulsi, senza molte manovre. Le stelle selezionate per quella prova avevano angoli piuttosto elevati rispetto all'orizzonte e, quindi, erano molto difficili da ottenere. Alla fine abbiamo deciso di procedere e di avvicinare le stelle un po' di più all'orizzonte. Ne ho eseguiti un paio con Canopus e un paio con altri, come noterete. Il filtro blu sembrava bloccare completamente l'orizzonte; non avevo orizzonte quando l'ho usato. La nostra immagine dell'orizzonte probabilmente non è altrettanto buona quando c'è la luce della luna. Il filtro verde, invece, mi ha dato quello che considererei un orizzonte un po' più nitido rispetto a quello che avevo senza filtro. Ho pensato che non ci fossero difficoltà nell'effettuare queste misurazioni né con il filtro verde né con quello trasparente. Tuttav
ويا برج الدلو، يا هيوستن، نود منك، فيما يخصّ محاذاة برجك، أن تتابع مباشرةً عبر التفعيل الدقيق رقم 31؟ تاب
アポロ8号、
Okay. Ich werde jetzt gleich etwas genauer hinschauen, denn wir sind bei Kilometer 15. Wir 
शुरुआत में, एक और बचाव पैंतरेबाज़ी के कारण, निर्धारित समय पर हमारी अवलोकन प्रक्रिया तुरंत शुरू नहीं हो सकी। इस प्रक्रिया के कारण क्षेत्र में बड़ी मात्रा में नकली तारे बन गए, जिससे ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन लगभग असंभव हो गया। हमने जो तरीका विकसित किया था, वह भी कारगर नहीं रहा। अंततः मैंने जो तरीका अपनाया, वह था सीरियस तारे तक जाना, जो हमारा सबसे चमकीला तारा था, वहाँ से शाफ्ट और ट्रनियन प्राप्त करना, और फिर अंतरिक्ष यान को सीरियस तक ले जाना ताकि उसका उपयोग ऑप्टिक्स के लिए किया जा सके, जो हमने बाद में किया। प्रकाश प्रकीर्णन के संबंध में, ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि हमारे निष्क्रिय तापीय नियंत्रण के दौरान लगभग किसी भी स्थिति में, स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में प्रकाश प्रकीर्णन हो रहा है। यह मुख्य रूप से स्कोप के केंद्र के ठीक पार शून्य से लगभग 10 डिग्री दोनों दिशाओं में प्रकाश की एक चौड़ी पट्टी के रूप में दिखाई देता है। इस क्षेत्र में तारों को देखना बहुत मुश्किल है। पुनः संरेखण सफल रहे हैं। मैंने सेक्स्टेंट में तारे को देखकर संरेखण तो कर लिया, लेकिन स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में रेगोर या मेनकेंट जैसे मामलों में उपयोग किए जाने वाले तारे की पहचान नहीं कर प
الأمور تبدو جيدة يا فرانك. لقد استلمنا للتو دفعة أخرى من البيانات، ونقوم بمعالجتها. يبدو مبدئياً أننا لن نحتاج حتى إ
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde nachfragen
रॉजर। उन्हें हार्दिक शुभकामनाएं। मैं उतेसोव सुन रहा हूँ। आत्मा को
Bene, un minuto 
روجر. روجر، فرانك. بعض الأفكار حول ما هو قادم. سنبدأ برصد النجوم عندما يستيقظ جيم؛ يبدو الآن أننا اكتفينا من أفق الأرض، وكل شيء
了解。今から約40秒後、770410で45号線西を渡ります。
جيم، نحن على وشك الانتقال بين المواقع. قد تفق
Apollo 11, ici Houston. 1 minute avant l'atterrissage à Tananar
알겠습니다. 그건
Okay, meine Ausweichlösung ist 2 Fuß pro Sekunde nach oben und 23 Fuß pro Sekunde nac
الاستعداد خلال 10 دقائق. هل خوذتك مغلقة؟ أغلق ا
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。吉姆，请你点击
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्ट
إذا قمتَ بمحاذاة المنصة بسرعة احتراق تبلغ 3 أقدام في الثانية، وكان هناك انحراف بمقدار 10 درجات، فسيكون من الصعب علينا رؤية ذلك، نظرًا لدقة عملية تغيير السرعة دلتا-في. لذا، لمَ لا - عندما نقترب من المنصة - نضعها في وضع SEF لفترة وجيزة. حسنًا، قبل 5 دقائق من الموعد المح
分
روجر. في الوقت الذي يناسبك، نود أن نصل إلى نسبة 5% المتبقية من مياه ا
حسنًا، هذا جيد يا فريدو. سيقودك هذا إلى الخطوة 8، وستظهر لك رسالة 5018 وامضة عند تشغيل PRO. حسنًا. عند ظهور 5018، نريد القيام بمناورة تلقائية لضبط الوضع، لذا قم بتشغيل PRO مع GUIDANCE CONTROL، PNGS؛ MODE CONTROL، PNGS، AUTO؛ وسنضبط هذا الوضع. الآن، سيضعنا هذا في وضع فحص الشمس. لدينا نطاق ميت 1.4 درجة في هذا البرنامج في وضعية الإرساء؛ لذا، لمساعدتك، يمكنك استدعاء المؤشر - وعندما يمر المؤشر بالصفر أو يخرج من النطاق الميت - انظر إلى مدى قرب الشمس. نريد أن يكون ضمن ±1 درجة.
Apollo 8, Hou
Roger. Inizierò con la temperatura e poi misurerò la pressione sangui
ठीक है। एजीसी का वोल्टेज स्तर घटकर उस स्तर पर आ गया जिसे 
好的，没问题。我已进入状态；姿态已调整；陀螺仪正常；机动开关
네, 세계 뉴스부터 시작하겠습니다. 아폴로 8호 우주비행사들에 대한 찬사와 우주 탐사 분야에서의 국제 협력에 대한 기대감이 전 세계에 퍼졌습니다. 작은 우주선이 달 궤도를 돌고 있는 동안, 전 세계는 크리스마스 이브 메시지를 통해 이러한 기대감을 전달했습니다. 공산주의 국가에서조차 인류 최초의 달 탐사에 대한 열기는 뜨거웠습니다. 모스크바에서는 소련 과학자 아나톨리 베사라노프가 미국과 이전에도 우주 관련 지식을 공유했던 것을 회상하며, 아폴로 8호 비행이 양국 간 협력 증진으로 이어질 것이라고 예측했습니다. 쿠바에서는 라디오 하바나가 미국의 소리(VOA) 프로그램을 재방송하여 청취자들에게 아폴로 8호의 연설을 전했습니다. VAA 관계자는 미국 기관의 프로그램이 하바나 라디오에서 방송된 것은 이번이 처음이라고 밝혔습니다. 체코슬로바키아는 대대적인 텔레비전 중계를 통해 달 착륙 장면을 지켜봤고, 헝가리 부다페스트에서는 기차와 버스에서 사람들이 거의 항상 아폴로 8호 이야기만 했습니다. 비공산권 국가에서는 직장인들과 크리스마스 쇼핑객들이 우주선이 지구로 향하는 발사 준비를 하는 동안 숨죽이며 지켜봤습니다. 거리의 프랑스인들은 미국의 기술력과 우주 탐사 업적을 칭찬했고,
おはようございます、フランク。約18分間追跡しており、軌道は61×61.5
रॉजर। मुझे खुशी है कि आप क्रमांक 6 की प्रतिलिपि बनाने के लिए तैयार हैं। ऐसा करने से पहले जिम के लिए मेरे पास एक आखिरी टिप्पणी है। हम जिस '' की बात कर रहे हैं, वह वह है जो उसे अंकन के बाद मिलता है। दो '' हैं, एक अंकन से पहले और एक बाद में
Fortfah
Roger. Ho una piccola modifica da ap
以下是休斯顿联合通讯社记者哈里·罗森塔尔的报道。对于两岁的杰弗里·洛弗尔来说，两个圣诞老人点亮了他的平安夜。第一个圣诞老人敲响了他的家门，带来了礼物。第二个圣诞老人则从月球上接回了他的爸爸。第一个圣诞老人身穿红色圣诞老人套装，留着白色胡子，发出响亮的“嚯嚯”声，整个街区都能听到。第二个圣诞老人是月球背后喷吐火焰的巨型发动机，成千上万的人都在等待着它点火成功的消息。“请知悉，圣诞老人来了！”这是阿波罗8号打破无线电静默，向焦急的全世界宣布发动机完成关键点火15分钟后发出的第一句话。“我们谁也没想到会收到比这更好的圣诞礼物，”任务控制中心的肯·马丁利说道。“感谢地面上的所有人。你们知道，没有你们，我们不可能完成这项任务，”飞船指挥官弗兰克·博尔曼上校回应道。这时，任务控制中心控制台前的圣诞树亮了起来，宇航员哈里森·施密特为机组人员朗读了太空版的《圣尼古拉斯的来访》。故事开头是这样的：“圣诞前夜，在遥远的太空，阿波
Roger, auf Rev 12 aktualisiert RKV Ihre PLA- und CLA
Нам придётся подождать, пока мы с
अरे यार, इस धरती का नज़ारा बयान करना सचमुच मुश्किल है। मैं अपनी गोल खिड़की से बाहर देख रहा हूँ, जो धरती से भी बड़ी है। मुझे टर्मिनेटर साफ़ दिखाई दे रहा है। मुझे दक्षिण अमेरिका का ज़्यादातर हिस्सा, मध्य अमेरि
Вначале работа с системой не позволила нам немедленно начать наблюдения, как мы планировали, поскольку нам предстоял очередной маневр уклонения. Сброс системы вызвал огромное количество псевдозвезд в этой области, что сделало калибровку оптики практически невозможной. Разработанный нами метод, похоже, работал не очень хорошо. В итоге я использовал метод, заключавшийся в том, чтобы спуститься в систему, добраться до Сириуса, нашей самой яркой звезды, взять вал и цапфу, а затем поднять космический аппарат к Сириусу, чтобы использовать их для оптики, что мы и сделали позже. Что касается рассеяния света, то, похоже, почти в любом положении во время пассивного терморегулирования мы получаем рассеяние света в сканирующем телескопе. Оно принимает форму широкой полосы света прямо по центру телескопа, примерно на 10 градусов в каждом направлении от нуля. В этой области очень трудно увидеть звезды. Перенастройки прошли успешно. Мне удалось обнаружить звезду в секстанте для юстировки, но я не смог идентифицировать звезду, которую мы использовали в таких случаях, как Регор или Менкен, в сканирующем телескопе. Первое наблюдение звезды над Землей показало очень нечеткий горизонт. Но, казалось, существовала очень — или довольно — рез
Okay, Houston; 13. Zur Beantwortung von Frage 1: Die Änderungen des Geräuschpegels traten hauptsächlich zwischen der ersten Stufe und den anderen Stufen auf – die anderen Stufen hatten einen ungefähr gleichen Geräuschpegel, waren sehr
休斯顿。
Ok, Joe. Ho iniziato da qui. Ho proceduto con l'opzione 3 e sul display 1520-1525 ho richiamato 1691. Ti farò osservare e vedere mentre... l'
素晴らしいですね。E-9ページで、司令船の位置へ移行する準備をしている際に、姿勢修正によるエンジンの点火を避けたい場合は、手動姿勢スイッチをACCEL COMMANDまたはMINIMAL IMPULSEに切り替えることをお勧めします。また、E-9 Alfaのステップ41 Bravoで姿勢保持に戻したい場合は、手動姿勢スイッチをRATEに戻
كل الأشياء تبدو 
로저. 우리가 지금까지 제공해 온 테이프 덤프의 품질이 어떤지 알고 싶
Roger. J'ai noté quelques chiffres ici qui, je l'espèr
了解。ガス、もう止めた方がい
J'ai rattrapé mon
초보자 치고는 꽤
रॉजर। मैं इस बात की पुष्टि नहीं कर सकता कि उड़ान योजना पूरी तरह से समय पर है। सूर्यास्त के समय मुझे क्षितिज से उतनी ही ऊँचाई पर धुंध की कोई अलग परत दिखाई नहीं दी, जितनी जॉन ने बताई थी। मैं सूर्योदय के समय ध्यान से देखूं
حسنًا. الدخول المناسب من شأنه أن... الانطلاق لمدة ساعة ذهابً
YAW 1،
О, EECOMM доволен, и после того, как вы всё настроите, у нас есть небольшая инструкция от EECOMM по проверке потока кислорода и датчика потока кислорода в системе обог
Joe, Jack tells me he is still having trouble looking through the optics. I'm just going to pitch up a little
Okay, Aquarius. And down here we're getting regrouped, trying to work on your control modes and trying to set up something for and taking a look at consumables as opposed to flight plan, and so forth, and as soon as we get all that information, we'll pass it up to you. We also have the 14 backup crew over in the simulators looking at dock burns and also trying to see what kind of alinement procedures they can come
Похоже, что примерно через 7,8 секунды и примерно через 15 сек
Grazie, si
杰克，我们把
わかりました。いい
لماذا تقلق بشأن ذلك؟ لماذ
D'
Роджер. Проблемы, с которыми вы столкнулись, вызваны каким-то неизвестным источником, вероятно, нагрузкой на вашу цапфовую ячейку, угол наклона которой сейчас составляет 91°, что не соответствует вашему истинному углу наклона. Однако мы считаем, что эта проблема с нагрузкой никак не влияет на надежность вашей оптики. Мы полагаем, что лучший способ обойти эту проблему — сначала перевести переключатель OPTICS ZERO в положение ВЫКЛ, а затем в положение ВКЛ перед использованием оптики. Думаю, 
حسنًا. علينا الانتظار. يبدو أنك تتخلى عن أسلوب استخدام التضخيم العالي. سنلاحظ ذلك في المرة 
Okay. They don't in our monitor, and that leads us to make some corr
मेरे पास स्पष्ट दृश्य नह
わかりました。
P?:... Très bien... sur 
로저. 짐에게 앞으로 나올 마크에서 델타-R과 트러니언
جاك
Okay, Jack. We'll have to go over what a
وربما يكون الجمع بين الدقة والسرعة
Ricevu
Okay. I have cabin temperature of 100 (degrees), cabin dome, 40 (degrees); cabin heat exchanger is 42 (degrees); the setting on the cabin is 3 and it's holdi
温度大约是 65，压力大约是
اكتبها 
ठीक है। मुझे दे द
Роджер. У меня подходящее настроение для этого — в секстанте у меня последняя звезда,
아니요, 보조 스위치를 켜놓지 않았어요. 작동하는
روجر، جيميني 4. سنكون عل
He was having difficulty maintaining his orientation, and it looked to me from then on he oriented off the spacecraft without regard to which direction it was pointing. He could actually impart quite high rates to it, as high as 2° per second. I intended to keep them below that level. As he 
Hast du den Flugplan griff
Roger. Für deinen bevorstehenden Lauf rechne mit einer 7er-Zeit in der Streckenmitte. Nur kurz zur Info: Die Flugbahn
D'accord, Jim. À la page 2-107, nous vous recommandons de supprimer ce passage et de rester concentré sur votre objectif. Votre plateforme est excellente et nous ne pensons pas que cet alignement soit nécessaire. Il y e
Roger. Fin de la zone orbitale. Golf: 3 heures + 00 minutes + 39 secondes
ज़्यादा फर
حسنًا. في اللوحة 3: جهاز الإرسال والاستقبال إلى الوضع الأساسي؛ مضخم الطاقة إلى الوضع الأساسي؛ مضخم الطاقة، عالي؛ الوضع، الصوت، إلى إيقاف التشغيل؛ الطاقة، إلى الوضع العادي؛ مشغل الوسائط المحمول إلى الوضع العادي؛ هوائي النطاق S، متعدد 
Oh, i
يا رجل، أقول لك إنني معج
Now the crater that's in the center of the screen now is Webb. We'd be looking straight down on it at about 6 minutes before power descent. It has a relatively flat bottom to the crater, and you can see maybe two 
أتريد مني أن أكرر ذلك مرة أخرى يا 
Roger. This is the pilot. I'd like to take this opportunity to ask every person listening in, whoever and wherever they may be, to pause for a moment and contemplate the events of the past few hours and to give thanks in his or 
C'est exact. Mon panneau de commande est fermé. Par a
Ok, Charlie. Grazie. Restiamo qui, nel progr
夕焼けはなかなか印象的だ。眺めるのに時間を無駄にする必要はないと思う。とても興味深い。もう一つ魅力的なのは、目が慣れていないと黒く見えることだ。窓に確かにコーティングが見える。この時点で VOX に戻って UHF-hi で送信する。バイザーを開けて右のマイクを拭く。舐めてしまった。バイザーを閉じる。スーツの回路が機能するようにバイザーはすぐに密閉された。またそれで汚れたくない。スーツの吸気口は約 68 度で非常にうまく保たれている。そこでドームを再び上げる。今は 7
分かりました。これは私たちのモニターの
はい、こ
Нам показалось, что м
Al momento ti abbiamo fatto registrare un guadagno elevato. Vu
Roger. Könnten Sie bitte Ihren T/M-Schalter bis zum Abschluss des Rendezvous in der Position „Echtz
わかりました。いくつか良いお知らせがあります。消去可能メモリは完全に分解して確認しましたが、問題ないようです。あなたの影響はありません。一つ気になるのは、ディスプレイにたどり着いた時に「」を使った場合、その表
Très bien. Ken, nous aimerions que tout soit bien clair. Peux-tu nous dire quelques mo
Roger. I'm not too sure what happened that time, Mike. I was marking on the landing sites, using the code, and I kept getting a large trunnion for AUTO OPTICS. And I could see the target, or landing site was coming up, so I just went manually and marked and got the 
잭, 특히 저 같은 초보자에게는 이곳의 좋은 점 중 하나는 움직이기가 매우 편하다는 것입니다. 물론, 사령선 시뮬레이터에서 일해 보셨겠지만, 무중력 환경은 정말 큰 도움이 됩니다. 1g에서는 움직이기가 상당히 제한적인데, 이곳에서는 훨씬 수월합니다. 보시다시피, 내부가 상당히 깨끗해 보입니다. 헐거워진 와셔 몇 개와 시퀀스 카메라의 작은 플라스틱 덮개가 떨어져서 ED 패널 근처에 끼어 있는 것을 발견했습니다. 자, 짐 바로 아래에 있는, 캔처럼 보이는 물체 위에 서 계신 분이 있습니다. 뒤쪽에 계신 분들을 위해 설명드리자면, 이 캔 안에는 상승 엔진이 들어 있습니다. 지금 제 손이 올려져 있는 것이 바로 달에서 이륙할 때 사용하는 엔진입니다. 엔진 덮개 바로 옆에 제가 지금 손을 얹고 있는 하얀 상자가 있는데, 이전에 보여드린 적이 있습니다. 이것은 짐의 배낭으로, 달 표면에서 산소와 냉각수를 공급하는 역할을 합니다. 이 장치는 계획된 4시간 동안, 길게는 5시간까지 사용할 수 있을 것으로 예상됩니다. 바로 뒤에, 제가 지금 손을 얹고 있는 작은 사각형 상자 두 개가 있는데, 하나는 여기, 다른 하나는 바로 아래에
很好。看来你们那边现在有
Roger. They're on about page Surface 27 in the
- - そして、それが妥当と思われる場合は、カメラを中央の窓から出しま
罗杰。
로저. 하셀블라드 필름은 
Il vous faudra main
Noch ein Hinweis zum Störungsmanagement. Es ist unwahrscheinlich, dass Sie sich morgen darum kümmern müssen, aber in Ihrer Störungsliste unter „Andocken“ auf Seite F11 9 finden Sie oben unter „Tunnel“ auf Seite 11 9 ein Störungsmanagement für einen hohen Sauerstoffdurchfluss. Wir bitten Sie, dieses Verfahren nicht anzuwenden, falls Sie auf
Хорошо. Маневровая площадка: цель — средний участок траектории 5,,, — Н/Д, HA — Н/Д, пе
Итак, свежие новости: вчера, во вторник, Хуан Карлос был официально назначен преемником генерала Франко — главой государства Испании и будущим королем. Сегодня Хуан Карлос
Vous voye
Okay, I've go
Beh, ti dico, mi sono diverti
D'accord, très bien. Vous pourrez lui dire, le moment venu, que nous avons des étoiles avec les angles d'axe et de tourillon correspondants
च
...저는 그렇게 믿습니
रॉजर, तैयार 
При таком количестве солнечного света я совсем не вижу звёзд. Солнце слева от меня, и я приближаюсь к закату, примерно в 49 часов по расписанию. Это почти точно. Я приближаюсь к 49 часам, и свет в кабине горит белым. Я переключу свет в кабине на красный. И
Ok, Jack. Sembra che stiamo andando... una strana d
Roger. Nous avons un 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, moins 061, plus 067 135 23 4149; plus 32020, plus 06713, moins 02773 181 054 013; NA, plus 00230, plus 32833 228 32625, 24 1510 355; NA trois fois, plus 1103, moins 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. Deneb et Vega 242 172 012, deux je
11, Houston. Die RETRO-Leute wollten 
حسنًا، أثناء قراءتي للعدادات، درجة حرارة المحرك 250 هي 145 درجة. هذا هو محول الطاقة 250. درجة حرارة محول الطاقة 150 هي 105 درجات، ودرجة حرارة محول الطاقة الاحتياطي هي 119 درجة، ودرجة الحرارة العكسية هي 75 درجة. الانحراف يمينًا 100 درجة، الانحراف يسارًا 90 درجة، زاوية ميل الطائرة للأسفل 96 درجة، زاوية ميل
Okay, dovremo usare il. Rog
Just about an hour and a quarter looks to us like, 
Non, pas encore. 
Okay, we shouldn't take any more pictures on this roll unt
제가 이해한 건, 밴스 씨가 읽으시
Роджер. Кажется, всё в порядке. Всё выглядит хорошо. Автоматический режим заправки заполнился на 55 процентов. Пролетаю 70 000 футов, 65 000. Положение самолёта очень стабильное. Приближаюсь к 60 (тысячам). Система управления скоростью работает отлично. Приближаюсь к 50 (тысячам). Выглядит отлично. Приближаюсь к 45 000. Перегрузка упала примерно до 1 g. Готовлюсь к резкому ускорению на 40, 41 (тысяче). Я ускоряюсь, и самолёт вылетает. Слышно, но я не вижу из-за облаков. Положение самолёта хорошее. Ручной рычаг включен. Топливо расходуется довольно бы
ठीक है, जैक। मैं जिम बोल रहा हूँ। 
نعم
रॉजर। मैंने ऑटो मोड में डॉक किया, और जैसा कि मैंने कहा, मुझे संपर्क का क्षण ठीक से याद नहीं था। मैं डॉकिंग प्रोब इंडिकेटर्स को बार-बार चेक कर रहा था। मुझे दो बारबर पोल मिले, जिससे पता चला कि तीनों कैप्चर लैच - कैप्चर लैच नहीं, बल्कि तीनों... लैच - जुड़ गए थे, और हम सॉफ्ट डॉक हो गए थे। उस समय स्थिति काफी स्थिर लग रही थी। तो, मैंने फ्री मोड में जाकर खिड़की से बाहर देखा और स्थिति अभी भी स्थिर लग रही थी; और मैंने प्राइमरी 2 बॉटल फायर कर दी। उसी समय, दोनों वाहनों के बीच एक चक्कर शुरू हो गया, मुझे नहीं पता किस वजह से। शायद थ्रस्टिंग की वजह से या शायद यह पहले से ही बन रहा था, और मैंने ध्यान नहीं दिया था। खैर, प्रोब के रिट्रैक्ट के दौरान, यॉ हुआ - मेरे अनुमान से लगभग 15 डिग्री का यॉ हुआ, और मुझे वापस ऑन करना पड़ा, फ्री स्विच को ऑटो मोड में वापस करना पड़ा, और इसे कम करने की कोशिश करनी पड़ी; और मुझे लगता है कि नील भी यही कर रहा था। मैं उसे अपने अनुभव के बारे में बताने दूंगा। और मुझे 
Итак, экипаж. Пожалуй, единственное, что я могу вам сейчас сообщить, это обновление информации о в
Мы настроены на рискованные маневры, и это приведет к потере потенциаль
Apollo 8, H
Fr
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir waren neugier
Okay, Gus. I only have one
Roger. Par
Roger. Beh, stai facendo un ottimo lavoro. Abbiamo avuto una buona visuale del puntatore a croce, lì. Avevamo una buona visuale 
Okay, Hawaii, wir können Apollo 8 hören. Würden Sie antworten und ihnen mitteilen, dass wir den Funkspruch empfangen
Bene, in che stato d'animo eri quando hai ricevuto 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
Roger. Du könntest nach einem tropischen Sturm über der Westküste Mexikos Ausschau halten. Du solltest dich genau über dem 43. Breitengrad Süd befinden, wa
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tempo per assistere al vostro ammaraggio. Ad accompagnare il Presidente ci saranno il Segretario di Stato William Rogers e Frank Borman. Assisteranno all'ammaraggio dal ponte della nave di recupero con l'Ammiraglio John Sidney McCain, Jr., Comandante delle Forze del Pacifico. Dopo la permanenza del Presidente a bordo dell'Hornet, partirà per il suo tour in Asia e la visita programmata in Romania. Si ritiene che Luna 15 si sia schiantata ieri nel Mare delle Crisi, dopo aver orbitato attorno alla Luna 52 volte. L'agenzia di stampa sovietica TASS ha riferito che sono state condotte ricerche "scientifiche" nello spazio vicino alla Luna. Sir Bernard Lovell dell'Osservatorio di Jodrell Bank ha affermato che Luna 15 ha colp
.
指挥飞行员的手套摘下来了
حسنًا. الأ
はい、S バンド アンテナ OMNI A を現在お持ちの Bravo に切り替え、S バンド アンテナ OMNI を OMNI 位置に、高ゲイン トラックを MANUAL 位置にすると、ピッチとヨーの角度はマイナス 50
Хорошо. И, Джек, можем ли мы включить автоматические выключат
D'accord, Jim. Je n'ai pas bien entendu cette suggestion à cause du bruit de fond; on p
알겠습니다. 2페이지로 넘어가서 다음 변경 사항을 적용하여 5단
सूर्योदय 
風船が開きます。風船は飛び出しました。かなり遠くまで飛んでいるように見えますが、今はもうかなり遠くまで飛んでいて、
Роджер. Вы готовы скопировать
Okay, Wassermann. Nur zu
MARKI
При проверке двигателей пламя образует красные полосы. Когда включаются двигатели рыскания, горизонт полностью исчезает. Горизонт хорошо виден сквозь двигатели тангаж
Ok, ora Jack è con me e voi tutti... la procedura per realizzare questi dispositivi a
Rog
Roger, Bi
……检查清单。完
रॉजर, जॉर्ज। मेरा कंट्रोल 
水上で安定しているようです。ホイップアンテナが上がっています。見えます。ホイップア
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। हमने देखा कि आप गिम्बल लॉक के बहुत करी
Navire de l'Atlantique, ici Friendship Seven. J'espère que vous passerez par le cap. J'ai laissé la capsule dériver jusqu'à la position 180° et je dois me réorienter. Lorsque je suis aligné avec l'horizon et le périscope, mes indications d'attitude sont maintenant très erronées. Mon roulis indique 30° à droite; mon 
알겠습니다, 밴스. 카트리지 개조에 필요한 몇 가지 물품을 찾았습니다. 하나는 토트백에 사용하려고 했던 특수 먼지 방지 백인데, 꽤 두껍고 구멍이 없는 재질입니다. 그리
Una cosa che potrebbe interessare al mondo è cosa fai dopo la masterizzazione, ovvero come riconfigurare gli interruttori. Noi... Ti abbiamo sentito controllare la checklist. Ma, immagino che ora, in pratica, tu abbia riposizionato tutti gli interruttori e sia pronto per continuare... Okay. Cosa dice 
爸
Ja. Wir gehen davon aus, d
Apollo 8, Houston. Das sind ungefähr 2 Minuten mit Ihrer ersten
На снимке, сделанном в Хьюстоне, земное свечение примерно соответствует ожиданиям. Конечно, деталей не так много, как при солнечном свете, но крупные крате
짐벌 모
Хорошо. Эт
よし、ジョー。袋をキャニスターにかぶせるんだ。アーチが袋の底に
ठीक है। चूंकि हमारे पास
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。了解。もう
هذا صحيح. حسنًا. الصف الثالث، تحت قسم الوقود: يجب أن يكون صمام/منظم تدفق الهيليوم للهبوط مفتوحًا. رادار الالتقاء الاحتياطي، مفتوح؛ رادار الهبوط، مفتوح. تحت قسم التحكم/الثبات: يجب أن يكون نظام مراقبة الحركة الجوية مفتوحًا. تحت قسمي الطوارئ والإضاءة: يجب أن تكون جميعها ال
네. 아마 37 06 코드가 이미 표시될 거라고 생각합니다. 만약 그렇다면, 엔터 키를 누르세요. 그러면 대기 요청 코드인 00062가 표시될 겁니다. 그 코드가 나오면, 빈칸
19:04。
Ну, вокруг много фонового шума, иногда он сильнее, и
Всё в порядке, для протокола. Инт
Ok. Lasciate che vi dia le mie osservazioni sul bus principale B. Lì le cose sono successe piuttosto velocemente, e per prima cosa abbiamo sentito l'impatto o l'esplosione o qualunque cosa l'abbia causata, non ne sono sicuro. Il secondo dopo, circa 1 secondo, c'è stato un ALLARME PRINCIPALE, che era la SOTTOTENSIONE del BUS PRINCIPALE B. Ho controllato la tensione, ed era
Voici une petite information intéressante, plutôt encourageante. Il semblerait qu'à Ann Arbor, dans le Michigan, un nouveau gang de jeunes ait fait son apparition: le gang Gilnet. Ils sillonnent les rues d'Ann Arbor, agissant en secret et parfois en toute impunité. Ils se font appeler les Guérillas du Bien. Parmi leurs actions, on peut citer le fait d'avoir repeint un pont couvert d'obscénités en une seule nuit. Une maison insalubre, prisée des enfants du quartier mais dangereuse, a été condamnée. Des jardinières du centre-ville, restées vides suite à un débat sur la responsabilité (entreprises ou administration), ont été fleuries. Une haie, jugée gênant la visibilité à un carrefour très fréquenté, a été taillée, provoquant la colère du propriétaire. Des déchets ont été ramassés le long d'une portion de la rivière Huron. Les membres du gang sont des adolescents anonymes qui ne recherchent aucune reconnaissance personnelle. Leur objectif est de contourner la bureaucratie et d'obtenir des résultats concrets, des choses qu'ils estiment importantes. L'organisation a une légère connotation religieuse. « C'est une sorte de groupe œcuménique », explique un professeur adjoint de l'Université du Michigan, qui sert de conseiller informel aux membres. « Leur nom vient de Saint Pierre, le Pêcheur. Et leur indépendance les empêche d'être rattachés à une église en particulier. Il y a un côté Robin des Bois dans t
Houston, Gemini VIII 
Cap
收到。很好。休息一下。目前着陆区的天气预报是：2000英尺处有零星高空云，云层散布，云底高度10英里。风向约080度，
알겠습니다. 
极光七号，极光七号。这里是广州通信技术中心，广州通信技
ठीक है, बिल। मुझे लगता है कि मैं 4 के लिए ऑनबोर्ड स्टेट वेक्टर का उपयोग करने के बारे में अपनी आखिरी बात को टालना चाहता हूँ। ज़मीन पर इसका और अधिक अध्ययन करने के बाद, उन्हें 's बनाने और अपनी सभी गणनाएँ करने में जुट जाना होगा, और इसे टालने या दो बार करने के बजाय, हम उन प्रक्रियाओं के साथ आगे बढ़ेंगे जिनका हम शुरू से उपयोग करते आ रहे हैं। चंद्र कक्षा के बारे में, हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं और हमारे कई लोग - जैक श्मिट और उनकी टीम पीछे के कमरे में - यह देख रहे हैं कि आपकी खिड़कियों का क्या प्रभाव पड़ता है। और, मूल रूप से, ऐसा लगता है कि दो विकल्प हैं जो उस 2 पर प्रभाव डालेंगे। एक विकल्प, निश्चित रूप से, यह होगा कि आप और जिम अपनी सीटें बदल लें और जिम बाहर देखकर अपना SAM प्राप्त कर ले, और दूसरा विकल्प यह होगा कि विमान को घुमाकर जिम को ऑप्टिक्स को जितना हो सके आगे की ओर इंगित करने दें और दूरबीन के माध्यम से अपना SAM प्राप्त करने दें। और मुझे लगता है कि हम यह जानना चाहेंगे कि खिड
Stand-by
Amicizia Sette, Amicizi
62970, -162, +129, +00966, +00552, -02079. 다음 세 개는 모두 0, NA, +00202 0235
هذا صحيح. في اللوحة رقم 5: قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية لنظام التحكم البيئي؛ سخان تصريف مياه ا
أبو
Roger. Il est temps de procéder à un cycle de refroidissement cryogénique des quatre ventilateurs, Frank, une courte impulsion pour chacun d'eux comme tu l'as fait 
ロジャー・ジェミニ4、こちらはRKV外科医です。まだ血圧がうまく測れていないようですが、次回試す前にフィッティングの端を点検し、Oリングの中
月が見えています。金星も見えます。月の軌道は美しいです。ヨー、ピッチ、ロール、すべて正確です。三軸すべてがとても美し
Voyons voir. À Springfield, dans le Missouri, Mickey Owen, l'ancien receveur des Dodgers de Brooklyn, entré dans l'histoire en laissant échapper une troisième prise qui a permis aux Yankees de New York de remporter la victoire contre les Dodgers lors des Séries mondiales de 1941, a décidé de laisser une trace indélébile dans les mémoires, au-delà de ses exploits sportifs. Quarante-cinq garçons et filles ont reçu un poney grâce à son geste généreux. Ces jeunes étaient invités à lui écrire pour lui expliquer comment ils prendraient soin d'un poney. Face à l'afflux de lettres, il a ajouté cinq poneys aux vingt qu'il avait déjà offerts; d'autres donateurs ont également contribué à en offrir vingt autres. « Je pensais recevoi
Negative... all that stuff was don
كنت أعلم أنني لن أتمكن من تخزين هذه الدبابيس حتى نصل إلى كان
Gemini 4, Ho
로저. 잭의
Apollo 8, Houston. Abbiamo letto il cambio di antenna. Ci stai
ठीक है। जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, फ्रेड कल 
D'a
Siamo s
50-DELTA 55 avant, 85 arrière
ठीक है। हम एक न
I'll tell you, why don't you put - under your restraining cable; just stow it under your restraining cable there. And that will keep, then, until we're 
11, Хьюстон. Мы только что были готовы переключиться с OMNI Delta на вашу антенну с высоким коэффициентом усиления. Мо
O
... ه
알겠습니다. 방금 헤드셋을 꼈어요. 연필이랑 종이 좀 가져와서 옮겨 
Houston. Okay. Ich m
Main
Wie wäre es 
Se semb
进行德
حسنًا. الخطوة 7. لوحة قاطع 
रॉजर। प्लस 100 से प्लस 101.5 तक कॉपी करें, और यह पिछले वाले से काफी हद तक मेल खाता है, जैसा
जी ह
D'accord. Et nous savons que nous n'avons jamais su ce qui est
Ciao Fred. 
D'accor
Роджер. Есть ли у вас какая-либо информация, которой вы могли бы поделиться с нами по итогам поэтапных ма
... एक-दूसरे को घूरना और बातें करना। क्या
Хорошо. На боковой ст
Jack, ici Verseau. Je ne sais pas trop combien de temps ni avec quelle intensité ces
Sì. Il nostro tabellone mostra un numero 
, Canary. I have y
И мы попробуем подвинуть её так, чтобы она смотрела вверх, в э
سأعطيك واحدة فقط، وسأترك RKV يمرر الباقي، وسأم
Близнецы VI, мы готовы предоставить ва
アクエリアス、ヒュ
Das ist korrekt. Jetzt sind also BAT 1, 2, 3, 4 und 6 eingeschaltet, und ich habe zwei Anmerkungen. Erstens: Die Schutzschaltung Ihres Leitungsschutzschalters begrenzt die Spannung. Die Verbindung zwischen dem Leitungsschutzschalter und dem Ste
Мы постараемся дать вам бо
Хорошо. И ещё одно замечание дл
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven. Hier
इस स्थिति में, ऊपर आसमान की ओर देखने का भ्रम ज़रूर होता है, और अगर क्षितिज न हो, तो बस काला आसमान ही दिखाई देता है। कॉकपिट में रोशनी काफी तेज़ है। एक बार अभ्यस्त हो जाने पर, केबिन लाइट से इसे कम किया जा सकता है। फिलहाल, सूट सर्किट की समस्या के कारण मैं रोशनी कम करने में थोड़ा हिचकिचा रहा हूँ। मैं अपनी उंगलियों की रोशनी का भरपूर इस्तेमाल कर रहा हूँ। ऐसा लगता है कि भविष्य की उड़ानों में, हमारे पास कोई ऐसा उपकरण होना चाहिए जिसमें हम वस्तुओं को भर सकें और उन्हें कुछ समय के लिए वह
Ok. Poco sotto i 13. E solo per tua informazione, abbiamo persone che lavorano su diversi argomenti. Stiamo lavorando sulla rotta intermedia in arrivo per determinare il nostro sistema di controllo e come gestirlo con il sistema di co
현재 비행 계획보
मुझे नहीं पता। मैं इन्हें उतारक
يسهل رصده للغاية. يمكنك رؤية حواف الفوهات بأكملها من هنا، وبالطبع الهلال الأبيض على الجانب البعيد حيث تسطع عليه الشمس. الظلال طويلة نوعًا ما الآن. ماسكلين ب (مستنقع النوم) له ظلال كثيرة، لكن يمكن تمييزه. غرب ماسكلين ب مباشرةً، نبدأ بالتوجه نحو خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار. خط الفصل واضح جدًا فوق جبال البرانس، ولا أستطيع رؤية أي شيء في ضوء الأرض في الوقت الحالي. يقول بيل إنه 
뭐 그런 거, 연어 샐러
سيجما سبعة. إذا لم تكن تفعل أي شيء، فهل يمكن
알겠습니다. 전에 드렸던 것과 같은 측정값을 다시 
ठीक है। मुझे एक मिनट के लिए रुकना पड़ा। बॉब होप अपने सैनिकों के साथ एक बार फिर वियतनाम में हैं और हमेशा की तरह शानदार काम कर रहे हैं। इस खबर में एक छोटा सा नाम यूएसएस न्यू जर्सी से जुड़ा है। बॉब होप ने कल - या बुधवार को - युद्धपोत न्यू जर्सी पर सवार 1500 सैनिकों को हंसाने के लिए एक विशाल तोप बुर्ज के ऊपर से मज़ाक किया। न्यू जर्सी अपने 20वें क्रिसमस पर विदेशों में तैनात अमेरिकी सैनिकों का मनोरंजन कर रही थी। होप और उनके 27 सदस्यीय दल ने वियतनाम के तट पर स्थित विमानवाहक पोत हैनकॉक पर क्रिसमस की प्रार्थना सभा में शामिल होने के बाद न्यू जर्सी के नाविकों का मनोरंजन किया। होप ने नाविकों से कहा, "यह दुनिया का सबसे बड़ा क्रिसमस क्राफ्ट होगा। यह पतवार के साथ वेक आइलैंड जैसा दिखता है।" उन्होंने कहा, "मुझे लगता है कि उन्होंने मुझे 21 तोपों की सलामी देने के लिए जहाज को फिर से इस्ते
这里是 Sigma Seven，C
收到
And we just went on to the secondary CO2 canister. Fred swapped out the primary, but we want
Anche questo è un bel n
ठीक है। और अब कृपया अपना ईंधन और ऑक
Apollo 11, Houston. You are looking good for separation. You
罗杰，友谊七号。我们已收到TM通讯，我们已收到TM通讯。请
D'a
ठीक है। हमने तापमान को लगभग 53 डिग्र
肯，我们或许永远不会失
わかりました。フィルムをすべて使い切ることをお勧めします。これが最後の実験です。お持ちのフィルムをすべて使い切ってください。ジムがここにいるので、この再突入について少しお話ししたいと思います。ジム、もう一つお知らせがあります。後部スラスターの寿命を131フィート/秒に延長しまし
Ok. Neil, potresti met
Gemini, qui Houston. Questa è solo una stima approssimativa dell'utilizzo dell'OAMS. Ne avremo una valutazione più precisa dopo i Canaries. Stai ancora fac
سنبدأ
Apollo 11, q
У нас есть старые методы измерения углов с высоким коэффициентом усиления, по
少しだけ…はい、スポーツファンの皆さん、こんにちは。少しだけ私も映っています。それと、ニールが中央のソファに座っていて、バズがカメ
收到。我们观察到您的操作，几分钟后会向您发送
पूर्व योजना बनाने से 
Ho trasmesso la voce in uplink alla navicella spaziale; il downlink è troppo basso 
Хорошо, Джек. Земл
حسنًا.
٨٨. حسنًا
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Nous avons perdu toutes les données vous concernant. Les dernières données en notre possession indiquaient un angle de c
Роджер. Проблемы, с которыми вы столкнулись, вызваны каким-то неизвестным источником, вероятно, нагрузкой на вашу цапфовую ячейку, угол наклона которой сейчас составляет 91°, что не соответствует вашему истинному углу наклона. Однако мы считаем, что эта проблема с нагрузкой никак не влияет на над
了解しました。左手の窓から地球が見えています。地球の半分強です。東太平洋と画面上部の北半分には、北米、アラスカ、アメリカ合衆国、カナダ、メキシコ、中央アメリカが見えます。南米は境界線のすぐ先、つまり影の中に隠れています。海ははっきりと青く染まっており、地球全体に白い帯状の大きな雲が見えます。海岸線も見えます。アメリカ合衆国西部、サンホアキン渓谷、シエラ山脈、バハ・カリフォルニア半島、そしてアメリカ合衆国南東部にも雲が見えます。アラスカ南西には、500マイルから1000マイルほど離れたところに、はっきりとした穏やかな嵐が1つあります。そして、画面の南端、赤道付近、あるいはかなり離れた南緯45度かそれ以上のところに、非常に小さな嵐がもう1つ見えています。地形の茶色はかなりよく見えます。緑色はあまりよく見えません。アメリカの北東部から北西部の海
로저. 저희도 동의합니다. 짐이 광학 장비를 사용해서, 또는 당신이 지구의 위치를 ​​어느 정도 파악할 수 있지 않을까 생각
أكرر، أنا بصدد تغيير الوضع، 
Aquarius, Houston. Okay. Go
好的。燃烧时间可能不到一分钟。我们希望你们根据
حسناً يا جاك. لقد وصلتُ إلى المر
Роджер, Севен. Я не расслышал показания вашего ручного счетчика топлива. Вы немного сб
Im Sport zeigen die Houston Oilers in ihren frühen Vorbereitungstrainings in Kerrville viel Enthusiasmus,
حسناً. سنق
Roger, Houston. Sono Apollo. Come l
Sigma Seven 
How ab
Okay. Dovrai restare lì mentre lo convertiamo
Ich mache gerade ein paar Fotos von den Wol
Roger, 
了解。あなたのアティチュー
확실히는 모르
了解。アポロ8号、バックサイドデータはほとんど聞き取れません。ビル、バックサイドパスのマイクの位置をもう一度確認して、もう少し大きな声で、はっきりと話してみてください。最後に聞いたものはほとんど聞き取れませんでした。以上です
Roger. Five minutes of high bit rat
오, 밴스, 우리가 본격적인 작전을 시작하기 전에 일정 시간 동안 이 태도를 유지하고
The responsibility for this flight lies first with history and with the giants of science who have preceded this effort; next with the American people, who have through their will, indicated their desire; next, to four administrations, and their Congresses, for implementing that will; and then, to the agency and industry teams that built our spacecraft, the Saturn, the Columbia, the Eagle, and the little EMU, the space suit and backpack that was our small spacecraft out on the lunar surface. We would like to give a special thanks to all those Americans who built the spacecraft, who did the construction, design, the tests, and put their - their hearts and all their abilities into those crafts. To those people, tonight, we give a special thank you, and to all the other people that are listening and watching tonight, God bless you
Vous allez effectuer ces vérifications Horizon Scan dans un petit mo
Gemini 4, CSQ. Обратите внимание, чт
Négatif. Tout se passe à merveille. Apparemment, je suis engagé pour six mois et j'en suis ravi. L'ensemble du convoi 
현재 몇몇 사진에서 하셀블라드 셔터가 제대로 작동하지 않는 것 같습니다. 이 사진들은 대서양 상공에서 촬영한 S-6 카메라의 두 번째 시리즈입니다. 필름 이송 장치에 문제가
Всё в 
ठीक ह
Думаю, всё прошло довольно хорошо, Хьюстон, хотя, вероятно, я израсходовал больше топлива, чем обычно в симуляторе. Маневр разворота — я переключился на команду тангажа и ускорения и начал поднимать нос, а затем, когда я по какой-то причине вернул команду ручного управления тангажем в положение с регулировкой скорости, — скорость тангажа остановилась, и мне пришлось снова переключиться на команду ускорения и нажать, как мне показалось, дополнительную кнопку продолжения. В ходе этого мы немного отклонились от курса, че
Продолжайте движение. Подождите. 09. Должн
جو.
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。一切顺利；主环和
قاعدة ترانكويليتي، هيوستن. لقد جمعنا الآن جميع بيانات تحديد المدى التي يم
没错。好的。下一个。模式 - 当姿态稳定后，选择“模式控制自动”。按下此键监控速率；当速率小于每秒 0.1 度时，调整所有轴的速率，然后禁用 X 轴推进器。好的。下一个，按回车键；输入 1257，按回车键；输入 252，按回车键；输入 1，按回车键；按回车键；输入 DAR 22110 并继续；按
오, 이 포도
알겠습니다, 빌. 몇 시간 전에
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. TV 방송은 고이득 안테나가 다시 연결되는 대로 볼륨을 높여서 시청하실 수 있도록 
Oui, nous sommes toujours là, Jack. Nous allons vous accompagner tout au long de cette procédure, et pour cela, nous allons utiliser une connexion haut débit. Pour répondre à votre question, afin d'annuler rapidement cette procédure en cas de problème, veillez à ne pas toucher à l'interrupteur POWER 124, car il possède une position RESET. Pour annul
Je ne pense pas que ce soit nécessaire pour l'instant, Jack, mais nous 
阿波
일등석을 타는 
Oui, Joe, ça baisse. Il fait environ 45 degrés maintenant 
Мне бы хотелось узнать, как 
ليس لدينا أي نظام إنذار مب
حسنًا. إليكم الخبر العاجل: تم تعيين خوان كارلوس رسميًا أمس - الثلاثاء - خليفةً للجنرال فرانكو، رئيسًا للدولة في إسبانيا وملكًا في نهاية المطاف. سيؤدي خوان كارلوس اليمين الدستورية اليوم بصفته خليفته المُعيّ
D'accord. Mon seul souci concernant le fait de laisser le et/ou le dans le module de commande est de savoir combien de temps nous devrons utiliser le
フレッド、コピーできたか自信ないな。パワーアップ手順を教えてもら
حسنًا يا جاك، لا أعتقد أنك بحاجة إلى قراءة جميع قواطع الدائرة لأننا نسخناها أثناء عملك. إذا كنت ترغب فقط 
In questo momento riesco a vedere 
わかりました、ジャック。49時間後の状況ですが、光学シャフトの角度に約0.2度程度のわずかなジッターが観測されています。OPTICS ZERO位置から出る前に、この作業の開始時にシャフトの読み取り値を観察し、直接読み取り値にジッターが発生していないか確認してほしいとのことです。また、シャフトとトラニオンの角
ジャッ
Хорошо. Я про
Родж
ठीक है, और हम उस समय को रिकॉर्ड कर रहे हैं जब यह काम पूरा हुआ। आपके पास दो सूचियाँ हैं, एक उपकरण स्थानांतरण के लिए और दूसरी इसके विपरीत। आपसे अनु
11号，这里是休斯顿。我们目前无法接收到您的信号。您的信号强
نعم. الوضع: دوران 0 درجة، انحراف 2 درجة إلى اليمين، ميل -33 درجة. جميع المعدلات تشير إلى الصفر. أنا في وضع التشغيل حاليًا. لا تزال الساعة مضبوطة على وقت الرجوع، لوقت الرجوع 04 + 32 + 28. لديّ أوقات الرجوع جيدة من برمودا. ضغط المقصورة ثابت عند 5.7. درجة حرارة هواء المقصورة 90 درجة. الرطوبة النسبية 30%. كمية سائل التبريد 68%. درجة حرارة بيئة البدلة 65. ضغط البدلة يشير إلى 5.8. درجة حرارة البخار على البدلة 60 درجة. أشعر براحة كبيرة. مع ذلك، لا أريد خفضها الآن. نسبة الأكسجين الأساسي 78%؛ الثانوي 102%. الحافلة الرئيسية 24. رقم واحد 25، 25، 25. الاحتياطي الأول 26؛ الاحتياطي الثاني 25؛ معزول، ٢٩، ثم عاد إلى التيار الرئيسي. يشير مقياس التيار إلى ٢٣. الت
Il est en train de se lever. Vous vouliez un certifi
在哪
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 이제 메모를 천천히 읽어보겠습니다. 달과 태양 관측 시 자세에 대한 대략적인 정렬 각도입
11号，休斯顿。刚才拍到了面板
吉姆
रॉजर। बर्न 3
لا يزال ضوء الماسح الضوئي مضاءً. ها هو ذا. 
Понял. Телевизор сейчас глючит. Ладно. Теперь изображение хо
确实把他们震坏了。我记得吉恩说过，他们的压力表一点都没下降——你还记得吗——加压的时候？我觉得他们的压力
Ok. Siamo quasi arrivati ​​al punto di beccheggio e... all'angol
फि
उस सेक्स्टेंट से नज़ारा वाकई अद्भुत है। अभी एक मिनट पहले, ऑटो मोड में जाने के दौरान, ज़ूम लेंस ने भूमध्य सागर को स्कैन किया। उत्तरी अफ्रीका का पूरा इलाका एकदम साफ़ दिखाई दे रहा था; पुर्तगाल, स्पेन, दक्षिणी फ्रांस, इटली का पू
Ok, Gus, quanto tempo manca al pia
That's 
Das ist bestätigt. Verstanden. Ich 
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Arrivée prévue vers 16h30. Tous vos systèmes fonctionnent parfaitement. Eagle tourne comme une horloge après une heure et demie sans refroidissement. Le système 
我们从39岁开始，到59
네. 모르시는 분들을 위해 설명드리자면, 여기는 각 기동에 대한 대부분의 데이터를 기
음, 
هذا لا يبدو 
Bon, maintenant, le plan de vol indique où nous voulons nous arrêter... c'est écrit
좋은 아침이
ठीक है। मुझे बस ओम्नी स्विच करना है। ठीक है। पेज 1-4 पर दिए गए बदलावों को पढ़ते हुए, जो, फ्यूल सेल हीटर तीन, बंद, फ्यूल सेल 1 मेन बस ए सेंटर तक - मेन बस ए बंद; मेन बस - फ्यूल सेल 2 मेन बस ए तक, बंद; फ्यूल सेल 3 मेन बस ए तक, टॉकबैक, ग्रे; मेन बस ए रीसेट बंद; फ्
जी हां, हमने इसे पूरा कर लिया है। हम आपको कुछ ही देर में इसका डेटा दे देंगे। हमने प्रवेश बिंदु पर सेक्स्टेंट स्टार
ロジャー
TR-10 恢复正常。我之前已经试过了。好的，宇航服压力正常。再看一下逆变器。250 是 141 度，150 大约是 107 度。单独来看就足够了。备用压力是……7。差不多是环境压力。负值，甚至还有点……舱内压力大约是 5.3 psi，非常理想。宇航服顶盖温度是 72 度。舱内顶盖温度是 45 度，舱内保持稳定。宇航服温度大约是 64 度，我很满意。氧气压力是 60 psi（单位是百）。舱内氧气压力是 5.3 
हम आपकी 30 मिनट की रिपोर्ट के दौर
Roger. Suivant. Le LMP devrait être t
ठीक है, फ्रेड। ये नंबर कॉपी कर लो और बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। मुझ
Roger. Können Sie bestätigen, dass die Checkli
好的，杰克。明白了。你想让我们用通电的装置将X轴指向南
11, Houston. We got some shaft and trunnion for you that might tweak it up a little bit. S
それをうまく解決できれば、それは良い計画のように
로저. 알겠습니다. 그리고 태도에 대한 절차도
أورورا سفن، أورورا سفن، لا أستط
こちらはシグマ・セブン。日の出の中、90度のヨー角で逆さまに飛行しているような映像です。自分の進路方向が最もはっきりと分かります。まるで列車の窓から外を眺めているようです。目の前を通り過ぎる地形が見えます。さまざまな種類の雲があります。機体の縦軸に対して-90度の90度平面で、雲が私のそばを流れていくのが見えます。ヨー角が非常に鮮明に映し出
わかりました。フレッドさん、参考までに、機内
Roger. Und ich würde die Chlorierung gerne um diese Zeit durchf
جيم
声音洪
Is that what it shows d
ठीक है, जिम। हम चाहेंगे कि आप पृष्ठ 24 खोलें, जो "30-म
حسنًا. نريدك أن تدخل عندما تستطيع وتتحقق من الصمامات التالية وتتركها كما هو موضح هنا. صمام حزمة الضغط، مغلق؛ ضغط مقصورة الطوارئ، مغلق؛ الأكسجين المباشر، مغلق؛ منظم الطلب، مغلق؛ كلا مُجمّعي الماء، مغلقان؛ المنظم الرئيسي A وB، مفتوحان؛ ماء الجليكول - تصحيح - مدخل ومخرج خز
Richtig. Bei diesem flachen Sonnenstand ist von Braun keine Spur mehr zu sehen, es hat jetzt wieder ein sehr graues Aussehen und, wie die Crew von Station 8 sagt, sieht 
حسنًا
रॉजर।
물병자리입니다. 
Okay. Wir wissen, dass Sie gestern Abend bei der Primärversion auf 15 umg
Роджер. Имейте в виду, что сейчас из моего окна открывается хороший вид на Гавайские острова. Примерно через 30 секунд я буду пролетать над ними. Облака местами разорваны, выглядит довольно хорошо. На самом деле, если я не ошибаюсь, сейчас кажется, что я смотрю вниз
네, 알겠습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 전압과 전류를 알려드리겠
Alles funktioniert einwandfrei,
D'accord. Est-il bien clair que vous avez besoin du trempage à froid? Nous avions prévu de le faire avant la mise en marche du système EVAP seconda
روجر. إذا كان هذا سيفيدك يا ​​مايك، فإن الأرض تقع بزاوية 45 درجة تقريبًا في اتجاه موجب Y في اتجاه سالب X. أستطيع رؤيتها من نافذتي الجانبية، وهو منظر جميل مع العديد من الدوامات ا
Хорошо, как вы знаете, режим управления настроен на дрифт. Выбран режим: обычный, автоматический, гироскопы в замкнутом корпусе. Я выбрал положение при входе в атмосферу. Конечно, я нахожусь в режиме управления по проводам на малой высоте. Переключатель маневров выключен. Я сообщу вам количество топлива и кислорода. Просто 
E siamo a circa 7 minuti di dis
Retroattitudine automatica; retraz
알겠습니다, 그리고 레트로팩
Giusto, Jack. È abbastanza
はい、そうです。タイムハックをお願い
Роджер. Как выгл
मुझे बस इतना पता है कि यह एक तरफ से अंदर नहीं जाता, लेकिन दूसरी तरफ से अं
알겠습니
Eagle, Houston. Giunto cardanico cen
Répète, 
Eagle, Houston. Wir haben dich g
アポロ8号のヒューストン号でも同じような再突入を経験しました。バズが司令
夏威夷，双子座 VI。新数据点 6.4 度，110.41 海里；总速度增
Öffnen Sie den BA
... 0317; 후방 추진기;
Ricevuto. E poi metti la valvola di scarico fuoribordo per la gestione dei rifiuti in posizione SCAR
알았어. 디크,
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8। हम उन कोणों पर पैंतरेबा
यह चालू 
아폴로 
खैर, मैंने रिकॉर्ड बना लिया है—और अब मैं सही दिशा में आगे बढ़ रहा हू
Okay, Jack. Hat dir eigentlich schon mal jemand gesagt, dass du eine 60-tägige Fristverlängerung für deine Einkommens
음, 지금 
Okay. s, you got three, RATE 2? Okay, we'll proceed for final tr
रॉजर. पैड: टीआईजी 102 33 04.36 09 50, माइनस 00021, 182 287 000, प्लस 56919. रद्द करें, 10 मिनट से कम, 105 12 30.00. रद्द करें, 10 मिनट से अधिक, 103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00. कोई प्लस 12 नहीं: 102 44 27.00. प्लस 01223, सभी गेंदों को घटाएं, प्लस 
コロンビア、ヒューストンは視界不良。
로저. 녹음기를 꺼주시기 바랍니다. 비콘을 재설정하고 테이프 덤프를 받을
Je vai
Se sei stanco,
روجر. انته
了解。ロール180、ピッチ228、ヨー0.01。該当なし。プラス0.017.9、6652.2、7:37、6626.5。六分儀軸を見逃しました。トラニオン、トラニオン、15.7、いて座ζ星、上、0.08。ロール2.1。マイナス22.81、マイナス0.00、補正、マイナス0.025.00、1140.7、34087、13:32:14。開
Okay. Wir beheben gerade eine kleine Störung, die wir vor einiger Zeit bei der O2-Durchflussrate festgestellt haben. Diese ist jetzt wieder normal. Wir möchten Sie bitten, uns zunächst mitzuteilen, ob Sie während des Kanisterwechsels den Regler O2 DEMAND REG A auf eine andere Position als CABIN gestellt haben. Stellen Sie ihn dann 
…Nous avons un b
Jack, that's what we want to end up with ultimately is 1-1/2 to 2 there in that tunnel and depending on the gage re
Ok. Riceviamo. E l'ultima cosa: vorremmo inviarti un aggiornamento IRIG, quindi, se
그러다가 겉보기에는 모든 움직임이 멈춘 것 같았고, 아마도 가까워지고 있는 것 같았습니
アポロ13号、ヒューストン。フォワー
ठीक है, अभी थोड़ी देर पहले जब मैं ऊपर था, तो मैंने देखा कि सर्विस मॉड्यूल के नीचे से कुछ नया रिस
لا. أستطيع أن أقول إنها تتقلب؛ أعتقد أن الجانب المسطح ليس فقط مواجهًا لي، وليس فقط أكثر إشراقًا، بل إنه يكب
Je n'ai pas eu beaucoup de temps pour me préparer à la descente, enfin, pas cette fois-ci. Désolé 
听起来不错。他们
روجر. آخر تحديثات متجه الحالة التي أرسلناها إليك يا جيم كانت إلى الفتحات، وسيتعين عليك نقلها إلى
ठीक है। सरफेस कैमरा को 1/250, 4, 5.6 और 8 के अपर्चर पर इस्तेमा
Ich verstehe dich nicht. Ich wechs
روجر، س
로저. 2번 별, 즉 여섯 번째 지점에서
Мы пришв
حسنًا يا برج الدلو، إليك ما سنفعله. نريدك أن تُوجّه المحور السيني إما شمالًا أو جنوبًا. هذا هو المحور السيني الموجب. يبدو لنا أنه من الأنسب توجيه المحور السيني الموجب نحو الجنوب. افعل ذلك مع تشغيل الجهاز باستخدام... بعد ذلك، نقترح إي
I mean the - I mean the whole - I mean the gas consumption would be a lot more than I would have guessed, you know? I thought I could about equal the simulator in... and I didn't - I bet you I used - I hate to quote a number, but I've been down around 30-s
ح
일몰이 정말 멋지네요. 오래 볼 필요도 없을 것 같아요. 정말 흥미롭습니다. 또 하나 신기한 건, 눈이 어둠에 적응하지 않았을 때는 모든 게 얼마나 새까맣게 보이는지입니다. 창문에 뭔가 코팅이 되어 있는 게 확실히 보이네요. 이제 다시 VOX로 돌아가서 UHF-hi 모드로 송신해야겠습니다. 바이저를 열어서 오른쪽 마이크를 닦았습니다. 핥았네요. 바이저를 닫고 바로 밀봉해서 슈트 회로가 제대로 작동하도록 했습니다. 다시는 문제가 생기지 않도록 해야죠. 슈트 공기 흡입구 온도가 68도 정도로 아주 잘 유지되고 있습니다. 그래서 돔을 다시 올려야겠네요. 지금은 76~75도 정도입니다. 이 높은 설정이 우리가 원하는 온도인 것 같습니다. 0.5도 정도 더 올려놓으면 딱 맞을 것 같네요. 드디어 좀 시원해졌으니 이제 설정을 어디까지 해야 할지 알겠습니다. 우주복 냉각수 양과 조절 레버를 8.5로 설정했습니다. 현재 돔의 온도는 75도입니다. 우주복 흡입구는 68도입니다. 아주 쾌적합니다. 시원한 바람이 얼굴을 스치는 것을 느낄 수 있습니다. 산소량은 60~75psi(100psi 단위)로 양호합니다. 250 인버터를 계속 지켜보고 있는데, 온도가 140도에 가까워지고 있고, 150 콘트라스트는 약 100도까지 떨어졌습니다. 대기 온도는 약 100도로, 객실 온도와 같습니다. 세 번째로, 250 인버터는 상태가 좋지 않아 계속 주시해야 합니다. 객실 열교환기는 확실히 40도에 안착하고 있는데, 프랭크 사몬스키에게 50센트를 빚진 것 같아 마음이 불편합니다. 그래도 예상보다 나아져서 기쁩니다. 객실 연료량도 약간 높게 나옵니다. 다시 확인해 보니 5.5psi
充电费用占
Certaines semblent br
यह एक बड़ा और फैला हुआ ग
Хорошо. минус 00489 плюс 00000 плюс 47250 177 144 000, неприменимо, плюс 00197 47253 554 47050 12
Tranquility Base, this is Houston. We'd like to verify your steerable antenna in track mode slew. We'
ولن أزعجك بتلك المكالمات بعد الآن، إلا إذا كنت 
로저. 저공비행을 가정하지 않는 기동 플러스 2
乗り心地はかなりスムーズです。ほんの少しガタガタしますが、スタッフォードのH-dotほどではありません。H-dotは見た目も素晴らしいです。
30 دقيقة...
صباح الخير يا فرانك. يبدو أننا فقدنا مستشعر درجة حرارة مخرج المبرد الرئيسي. نعرض قراءة مرتفعة خارج النطاق. مع ذلك، تبدو بقية الدائرة سليمة تمامًا. عندما يتسنى لك الوقت، هل يمكنك إلقاء نظرة عليها والتأكد من أنك 
हमें सुनाई दे रहा है, आपका एंटीना छत को खरोंच रहा है। ठीक ह
Main cabin pressure is remaining on schedule. Fu
Verseau, Housto
Ricevuto. Area 11-DELTA ΔT zero. GMTRC 01 giorni 07 48 58. RET 400 K, 15+26. Area 12-DELTA: ΔV 96. Δ
Quando partiamo da Carna
Roger. Riceviamo, 11. Sappiamo che il programma può fornirti una combinazione quasi infinita di angoli, e non è poi così irragionevole. Se vuoi aspettare, daremo u
Beh, potresti dirlo. Non sono molto sicuro di c
Okay. Sometime when you get two guys avai
아, 우리가 얼마나 가져왔는지 확인하고, 어쩌면 일부를 아껴 써야 할지도 모르겠어요. 충분한 양이 있는지, 그리고 물도 충분히 확보해야 하니까요. 마지막 날에 물이 떨어지면 정말 곤란하잖아요. 물통을 확인하고 물을 채워서 거기에 보관해 두세요. 아, 그리고 지금 먹기 좋은 건 사탕이나 샌드위치 스프레드 같은 거예요. 냉동식품이나 건조식품도 괜찮을 것 같아요. 다시 물에 불려야 한다면 좀 번거로울 테니까요. 젖은 팩
Roger. Wir haben Sie eben auf Kurz
Yes. We're in good shape for stow
Well, we saw Australia for the first time in the daylight. First passed up Basra then across the islands of India. On across India to Malaysia and on across to Australia... we certainly -- only passed about ha
D'accord. Si j'obtiens de
D'accord, Vance. On est légèrement décalés par rapport à la Lune. Jim tient la caméra par la fenêtre 3. Le Soleil arrive à environ 40 degrés sur notre gauche, et dans une minute, on va vous montrer une trentaine de secondes du déversemen
Вперёд, Хьюс
我
My - top thruster over here has got a lot of brown holes in i
Хорошо. Понял. Я тоже слышу визг. DELTA-VC 104356
わかりました。それではCBページへ行きましょ
—9½ and 24 on one and 9½ and 24 on two, and 9½ and 24 on three. 9½ and 24 on 
좋습니다. 나머지 
わかりました。OAMSの噴射時間が短い場合
Stiamo lanciando un
Okay. Das ist richtig. Um von dieser Konfiguration aus umzukonfigurieren, Jack, lassen Sie bitte die MAIN BUS TIE-Schalter in der Position „Ein“ und ziehen Sie die Le
La qualité de la voix est mauvaise pour le moment, et les équipes de guidage n'ont pas tout reçu. Pourriez-vous patienter deux ou trois
ちょっと懐中電灯を借
सेवन, ये केप है। क्या आपने 
我想应该是甚高频（VHF）发出的声音。那是一种呜
좋습니다. EMS 기능, 끄
Preferirei di no adesso. Il
Fri
Okay, kling
Roger. Friendship Se
了解、フレンドシップ・セブン。排気温度をお願いしま
네, 짐. 편하신 시
私はあ
Rog. Coming in v
Gemini VI, adattatore per COM
قلها مرة أخرى
Okay. Wir w
हाँ। उन्होंने यही कहा था ना कि यह ऐसा ही करेगा? ठीक है, 10 सेकंड बचे हैं, और मैं पिछले एक मिनट से मैनुअल हीटर स्विच को दबाए हुए हूँ। इससे प
حسنًا. شكرًا لك. نأمل أن نتمكن، عند تشغيل وحدة التحكم غدًا أو لاحقًا اليوم، من تحديد مصدر هذا الصوت بدقة أكبر. لكن فريق التوجيه يقول إنهم لم يلحظوا أي آثار لتسر
Ok
그 페이지에는 기본적인 정리 작업을 하고, 헬멧과 보관 가방을 수납하고, 거울, 체크리스트, 폐기 장치를 꺼내라고 되어 있습니다. 임시 보관 장치를 수납하고, 16mm, HC-EX, f:4, 500, 무한대, 초당 6프레임으로 설정하여 사용 준비를 하라고 되어 있습니다. 그 페이지에는 그게 전부입니다. 지금 우리는 그 단계에 있습니다. 다음 단
阿波罗11号
Водолей, запр
Weitere Informationen zum Fernseher folgen in der nächsten Version. Wir planen keine großen Änderungen an der Zeit, sondern wollen sie lediglich 
Fred, wir haben dich jetzt auf der großen Goldstone-Antenne, und unsere Kommunikation ist viel besser. Könntest du bi
Roger. Questo concorda con i nostri dati
Okay. Ich bin jetzt dabei, Vance, 
Кабина полностью готова, я больше не хочу опускать купол. Всё было очень хорошо. Проверяю время: 18 минут. Всё в порядке с часами. Подруливающие устройства: крен влево (автоматический) — 119 град
罗杰，我没完全听懂你的问题。我醒来后立刻喝了大约5口水，午睡时又醒了一次，也喝了大
Eh bien, ne le cherchez pas s'il est
Roger. I am back in - retroatti
Verseau, Houston. Une autre façon de réchauffer rapidement l'intérieur est d'allumer les radiateurs de fenêtre lo
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们现在正在百慕大上空接应你们。我没有复制DELTA-VC之后的
Ok. Pronto, Jack. Vado a prendere il mio ope
きっとそうだったと思います。だって、私ならすぐに気付いていたはず
Apollo 11, ic
Roger. P76: 84 is minus 00758, all balls, plus 00098, at 101 36 1400; plus 01223, minus all balls, plus 01889, 102 44 2700; burn time 46 and 30 seconds
Bien, nous vous proposons d'essayer d'observer les étoiles du c
Seriously, Jack, when I stop the spacecraft looking at - at the Earth, I'm going to have 
Looking at the world of sports, let's see here. While you were busy the other day, Joe Namath and football Commissioner Pete Rozelle made the announcement that "Broadway Joe" had agreed to sell his interest in the Bachelors III restaurant and report to the New York Jets. Joe arrived at the Jets' training camp today and had his first workout. Several other Jet players who had held out along with Joe also reported. And Davy Hill, from Jackson, Michigan, won his third major golf in as many starts in the past week. He won the Philadelphia Classic. Hill has won four tournaments so far this year and is the leading money winner this year with a cool $129.000. And in baseball, the west division of the National League remains a tight race. LA and San Francisco are one game behind league leading Atlanta. The Astros have a record of 48 wins and 48 losses, and are now in fifth place, seven games out. A twin bill between the Astros and Cincinnati last night was postponed because of rain. The Chicago Cubs are still in first place in th
فريندشيب سفن، فريندشيب سفن. ما هو تقرير حالة مرك
जेमिनी 8
了解しました。パッシブサーマル制御は、それまでの間、できるだけ多くのマークを取得するまで保留にしたいと思っています。まず最初の星から始めて、それぞれ3つのマークを2セット取得し、その後、先ほどお伝えした2番目の星に進みます。それと並行して、可能であれば、
いや、ちょうど終わりに近づいたところだと思う。日中は星が見えないので、日中の
另一个位于 7 - 另一个位于 7.2，在
다시 
Il timer della missione viene visualizzato come un verde brillante nella parte in alto a sinistra dell'immagine
Roge
Forza 
И я
ठीक है। हम
Wir erarbeiten gerade ein Verfahren für dich, Jim
Charlie, abbiamo appena fatto un rollio di 261 gradi, e sembra che chiunque l'abbia capito abbia fatto un buon lavoro. È proprio lì, proprio al cen
Esatto. And
알겠습니다. 4번째 줄 아래, HEATERS 항목에서 QUAD 히터 4개는 모두 닫아주세요. DISPLAYS, S-BAND ANTENNA, SEQUENCE CAMERA는 모두 열어주세요. 그 아래에서 DISPLAYS는 열고, DC BUS VOLT는 닫고, INVE
Gemini 
Okay. Alles klar, Jim, und so geht's weiter
了解。受信状態はだいぶ良くなりました、ウォーリー。非常に良好です。燃料は62～62パーセント、酸素は62～95パーセント、アンペアは25です。すべてのシステムは正常に動作しています。少し不安定な動作がありました。夜側でケージを掛けたり外したりしてみましたが、少し前にロール
ニールとバズ、こちらヒューストンです。お
Mal sehen, ob wir diese Jungs
هيوستن، سننتقل بعد قليل من النافذة الجانبية إلى نافذة السقف، وسنحاول التقاط بعض المع
D'accord. Et la même chose pour les en-têtes de module de service, QUAD Delta, 
समझ ग
Sure,
Хорошо. Ретро-петарды
Давление в ба
Oh, da kannst du nach deinem Ermessen vorgehen, Jack. Wir hätte
أفق رؤيتي واضح جدًا الآن. إنه فاتح نوعًا ما، ويتكون معظمه من غيوم. أستطيع رؤية الغيوم - النجوم وهي تبدأ بالغروب في وهج الهواء الرئيسي، لكن الغيوم تُضفي على الأفق مزيدًا من الإشراق. لا يبدو الأمر كذلك - ففي وقت سابق من الرحلة، رأينا أفقًا خاليًا من الغيوم وكان أكثر وضوحًا - كانت طبقة سميكة من وهج الهواء، وكان بالإمكان رؤية النجوم وهي تغيب من خلالها. أما في هذا الأفق الغائم، فالنجوم أكثر صعوبة في الرؤية؛ مع أنني ألاحظ أن بعض النجوم الأكثر سطوعًا تظهر من خلاله وهي تغر
Die anderen beiden sind ziemlich müde.
好的
Va bene. An
हमने संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका का अंतरिक्ष रिकॉर्ड तोड़ दिया। और हम 03 थे। मुझे लगता है कि यह CSQ के ऊपर था, और वे इसके लिए तैयार थे। मैंने उनसे पूछा - मैंने कहा, "क्या आपको हमारी सारी टाइमिंग वाली रिकॉर्डिंग मिल रही है?" उन्होंने कहा, "बिल्कुल।" 
D
ح
Ja, das habe ich. Allerdings ist das Essen stark zerbröselt
حسنًا يا بروس. ليلة سعيدة. شكرًا 
من الأفضل أن نأمل
分かりました。何かあった場合に備えて考えていたんです。司令船にどうやって乗り込むかという
Roger. Ich möchte Ihre Flugplanaktualisierung abs
Roger. No rush. Just let us k
All right. On the secondary loop check when we went to FLOW on the secondary radiators, the quantity dropped
Ah oui. C'est vrai, j'avais oublié. Bon. Je lui dirai
Роджер. плюс 90, G&N: 63481, минус 153, плюс 132; 004 10 25 38;, минус 04761, плюс 00001, плюс 53361; рулон 180 193 000; HA — NA; плюс 00203 53573 633 53349, звезда секстанта 33 1578 122. Звезда для прицеливания недоступна. Широта минус 0252, минус 02580 11887 34345 016 03 50. Выровнять Вегу и Денеб. Рулон 071 291 341. Нет свободного места, не пришвартован. У
ठीक है, गस। आपके जाने से पहले मेरा आपसे सिर्फ एक सवाल है। ऊपर उड़ान कैस
L'étoile 37 conviendra parfaitement pour l'étalonnage optique. Et nous n'avons rien remarqué d'anormal pour le moment après notre liaison montante v
13, Houston. You're loud and clear now. tells me he's having a lit
Quel
Okay. And after you power down, we expect that you will be using water at the rate of 3.2 to 2.7 pounds - That's at 14 amps per hour electrical usage rate. One note, this does not - When we speak here of water available, this does not include water and water, so that's add on. Okay, next, LiOH. Using the cans, you will have 16 cans at 12 hours per can to give you 1 9 2, or 192 hours, of LiOH. And, in the , using its cans, you hav
好的。我明白你的意思，但你得在这里
クライオプレッシャーライトが点灯しています。H2
Gemini 4，Canary
Houston, cette tec
روجر. إنها تقع غرباً - عند فوهة البركان الغربية، جولييت 0.5،
جيم، لقد راجعنا للتو علاماتك فيما يتعلق بالدقة،
ऐसा लगता है कि पावर डाउन होने पर भी हम लगभग 11 एम्पियर से थोड़ा कम करंट खींच रहे हैं। नंबर 1 पर 10 और नंबर 2 पर 11 से थोड़ा कम करंट है। बाहरी हैच पर टेदर या अम्बिलिकल रिस्ट्रेंट की स्थिति के कारण अंतरिक्ष यान के आगे मुक्त टेदर एरोडायनामिक्स के लिहाज से EVA का काम करना काफी मुश्किल हो गया था। जब भी मैं उस क्षेत्र में काम कर रहा होता, टेदर जब खत्म होने वाला होता तो मुझे पीछे की ओर धकेल देता और प्रतिक्रिया के कारण मैं वापस अंतरिक्ष यान के ऊपर से होते हुए एडाप्टर सेक्शन की ओर चला जाता। इसीलिए खिड़कियों के ऊपर पैंतरेबाज़ी करते समय मैं बार-बार नज़र से ओझल हो जाता और फिर अंतरिक्ष यान के पिछले हिस्से की ओर बह जाता। मुझे लगातार खुद को खींचकर अंत
Roger, Columbia. Laut und deutlich jetzt. Hier
ठ
Non è servito a nie
Suo
D'accord. Êtes-vous convaincu que le disjoncteur 
Roger. We'll have the FIDO's work that one up for you momen
Хорошо, Джек. Мы... М
こんにちは、トランクウ
إذا كان لديك وقت، ف
Bon, si ça bout, on le saura avant; on ne tardera pas à se r
Ich nehme das zurück. Das wollte ich wirklich nicht sagen. Was ich eigentlich sagen wollt
D'accord. Sous « PRESSION », nous allons effacer la première ligne et nous aurons « RÉGULATEUR
Tout à fait, Apollo 8. Nous aurons d'autres informations à vous communiquer sous peu. Nous travaillons actuellement sur un survol. Nous allons également vous parler plus longuement des difficultés rencontrées lors de l'observation des étoiles au sextant et au télescope. Dès que l'équipe noire arrivera sur le MOKR (nou
नील, दर बहुत अधिक ह
비행 초반 부스터에 대한 브리핑을 이어가겠습니다. 어둠 속으로 들어간 후, 제가 생각하기에 약 1200피트(약 366미터) 거리에서 부스터와의 위치 유지를 시도했지만, 당시 부스터와의 거리를 가늠할 수 있는 유일한 방법은 깜빡이는 불빛 사이의 거리뿐이었습니다. 불빛이 간헐적으로, 아니 간헐적으로가 아니라 계속해서 하나, 두 개, 다시 하나로 바뀌고, 때로는 두 개의 불빛이 보이기까지 오랜 시간이 걸리기도 했습니다. 이는 부스터가 계속 회전하고 있음을 나타내는 것이었습니다. 부스터가 어느 방향으로 회전하는지는 확실히 알 수 없었습니다. 불빛 두 개가 모두 보일 때는 카나본(Carnarvon) 부근까지 부스터와 좋은 위치를 유지하고 있다고 생각했습니다. 그때쯤에는 꽤 빠르게 접근하고 있는 것 같았지만, 확실히는 알 수 없었습니다. 그때까지 제가 계산한 모든 ΔV는 부스터의 방향, 즉 역추진 방향이었습니다. 불행히도, 그 망할 부스터 때문에 접근하려면 포지그레이드(posigrade) 기동을 해야 했고, 그러면 일정 시간이 지난 후 다시 부스터에서 멀어지게 되는 문제가 발생했습니다. 게다가 45분에서 40분 동안의 어둠 속에서 저는 제가 어디에 있는지 파악하기가 정말 어려웠습니다. 어둠이 깨지고 나니 부스터는 제 아래쪽에 있었
Roger. Je crois comprendre que vous ne nous avez pas copié
Ok, qual era la domanda? Non ci sento mo
रॉजर। एसीए के डिटेंट से बाहर निकलन
着陆气囊已关闭。紧急逆向启动已关闭。
برج الدلو، هيوستن
حسنًا، ذلك الحبل - شكل المركبة الفضائية 
अरे जैक, यह काम चल रहा है। और एक बात, जिम की चेकलिस्ट की तुलना अपनी चेकलिस्ट से करने पर मुझे -2:30 पर एक अंतर मिला। उसकी चेकलि
Aquarius, Houston. Wi
Et tout le monde va bien à la maison
好的，阿波罗8号。我们接下来要做的就是，等我们重新连接到高增益天线后，就把电视信号调大。我估计信号强度大概是……我们就用这个信号，只要信号覆盖到就行。我这里有个关于+35
جيميني 4، هذا الجراح. 
जेमिनी 
Roger. Could you confirm that? I thought there was some question after we got into the command module as to whe
いいえ。あなたのダンプは
We're just at 3+34 right now. Just going into dar
千万别让安德斯碰电脑
Roger. Le centre de contrôle aérien indique que la mise en service de votre ordinateur peut prendre plusieurs orbites. Veuillez le laisser en mode pré-lancement; le centre au sol vous contactera ultéri
Джо, они когда-нибудь догадывались, что это за топливо — TD и E
Wir haben einen Multiplexer verloren und können da
Okay. Se... ve
好的。8，/：45701，减 040，加 157，加 33195，减 01267，加 04716 179 008 001，NA，加 00187 33552 311 33355 42 09090 252，Dzuba 下 060，左 4.2，加
NO
Hey, Houston. I'm looking north up toward Aristarchus now, and I can't really tell at that distance wh
Si p
Takes a wee bit of time for that t
Cal Cap Com，这里是Sigm
こんにちは、ヒューストン。イーグルです。聞こえます
17-BRAVO 87, 01+51. 01 17 26 03. 10+03. 18-1 04+14. 18 0
Роджер, «Апол
Roger. Unders
短いものになるかな？ できるだけたくさん眠れるよ
Roger. Wir hätten gerne eine hohe Bitrate. Wir haben Ihren Vertrag g
D'accord,
Roger, 63 (Gra
कोलंबिया, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपको हाई गेन एंटीना स्कैन लिमिट्स के करीब पहुँचते हुए दिखा रहे हैं। जब आप हमसे लॉक खो देते हैं, तो हम ओम्नी डेल्टा का अनुरोध करते हैं। लॉक खोने पर ओम्नी डेल्टा
안녕하세요, 마이크. 저희 회사에 약간의 인력 변동이 있었습
OK, zone de manœuvre, objectif: survol, /G&N; 63385
네. 짐, 참고로 말씀
... Dies ist Airborne 2... End
Ok, Bill. Questo sarà a pagina 2, trattino 22 del tuo piano di volo. Per il pilota del modulo di comando - gliel'ho già detto - ma in cima alla pagina, circa, in realtà, vorremmo che facesse un allineamento, e poi dovrebbe essere fatto come da programma. Quelle quattro stelle, Procione, Regolo, Alphard, e ci rendiamo conto che Alphard potrebbe non essere una stella molto buona, Regolo è a circa 3 gradi sopra l'orizzonte e Spica ha un angolo di perno di 48 gradi; quindi immagino che quello che stiamo dicendo è che se Jim ha difficoltà a fare un set su ciascuna di quelle quattro stelle, gli suggeriamo di omettere quella con 
아폴로 
Roger; esatto, Fred-o. E ora vorremmo fornirti una configurazione per collegare il tuo vettore di stato al carico target. Quind
La traietto
Перт должен п
Roger, Sigma Seven, ici Canary Cap Com, je vous reçois parfaitement. Nous souhaiterions obtenir vos r
Houst
吉姆，今天傍晚早些时候，弗雷德报告说指令舱1号窗口有气体排出。他还报告说看到一块大约4英寸见方的银色金属碎片漂浮着。我们正在努力确定这究竟是新的排气口，还是之前问题的残留排气。你还有什么要补充的吗？另外，弗雷德当时正在拍照，我们授权他使用1号月球表面相机拍摄一些机会目标，快门速度设置为1/250秒。由于不确定应该使用哪
ठीक है, आपक
Роджер. Среднее значение V 400K для контрольной карты коридора состав
Gemini 4, this is Houston CAP COM. I'm not receivin
好的，
Я бы о
你没有看
That is what you wanted, isn't it? I thought that is what it
Bien, voici quelques instructions. Vous pouvez allumer le système. Je 
范斯，看来电池充电断路器之前看起来好像已经插上了，但实际上并没有。弗雷德把它拔下来重新插好后，
4段目には、QUAD HEATERのブレーカー
Roger. Verstehe 16
收到。另外，请注意在任务剩余时间内保持两个生物医
그리고 저희가 주시하고 있는 몇 가지 온도가 있습니다. 히터는 꺼져 있고요. 저희는 S, ASA, 쿼드 온도, 그리고 추진제(추진제 제외)를 포함한 여러 
Roger. Je suis content qu
حسنًا، لا بأس. الجميع أراد أن يسألك إن كنت ستح
アポロ13号、ヒューストン ― いや、正確にはアクエリ
जी हां, फ्रेड। और अगर अलाइनमेंट के बारे में आपके कोई भी 
오로라 세븐. 
107 でのこの中間コースの後に設定する私たちの行動方針は何でしょう
アポロ8号、ヒュース
はい、
هل يعلمون أنني بخير؟ أظن ذلك، فقد س
Wir wissen, dass zahlreiche Wissenschaftler aus verschiedenen Ländern die Mondproben begutachten, und wir dachten, Sie wären daran interessiert, sie hier in natura zu sehen. Diese beiden Kisten sind die Probenrückführungsbehälter. Es handelt sich um vakuumverpackte Behälter, die auf der Mondoberfläche unter Vakuum verschlossen, versiegelt und anschließend in Glasfaserbeutel verpackt, mit Reißverschlüssen versehen und wieder verschlossen wurden. Diese Beutel wurden dann in die dafür vorgesehenen Behälter an der Seite des Kommandomoduls eingesetzt. Das sind die beiden Kisten. Sobald wir an Bord des Raumschiffs sind, werden diese Kisten sicherlich umgehend zum Mondempfangslabor gebracht. Die Kisten enthalten Proben verschiedener Gesteinsarten, der Grundmasse des Mondbodens, Sand und Schluff, den Partikelkollektor für das Sonnenw
حسنًا. انخفض مستوى التحكم التلقائي في الكسب (AGC) إلى ما أسميه مستوى الضوضاء، وهو مستوى الجهد المقاس على جهاز التحكم التلقائي في الكسب (AGC) 
Roger. Verstanden. Und wir sehen das Blinken mit einem 651. Tatsächlich können wir die Register
أبولو 8، هي
알겠습니다, 켄. 페리신시안 플러스 2, 빠른 복귀 / 62871, 마이너스 161, 플러스 129, 플러스 45224, 마이너스 06216, 마이너스 18712 001 28 6
罗杰。我们的舱室目前还算正常。对此我们似乎也无能为力。氧气罐压力上升，事情大概就是这样。
हमारा पहला स्टार 01 आने वाला है, शायद यही वजह रही हो
네, 잘 들었습니다. 카나리가 제 슈트 시스템의 마지막 설정을 제대로 파
哥伦比亚，这里是休
روجر. كان سبب استخدام جهاز Repress هو تجنب إطفاء المراوح وتقليل مستوى الضوضاء في المقصو
Es könnte etwas mit MASS
فريند
알겠습니다. 저희 모니
好了。准备好迎接震
我们的医疗监护仪显示我们正在监测
रॉजर। कैमरे के बारे में समझ गया। ऑक्सीजन पर्ज के बारे में फिर 
Non abbiamo ancora una rete princip
गिम्बल मोटर्स, पिच 2 और यॉ 2
Gemelli 4, abbiamo ricevuto la tua pressione sanguigna. Siamo in attesa del tuo primo rapporto su acqua e so
Okay. Und Sie möchten wissen, ob
1A, 9.5; 1B, 10.0; 1-Main, 14.5;
Was hast du mit der
नियंत्रण बहुत अच्छा है। लगता है मैनुअल ईंधन पर्याप्त है। मैं अभी भी 72 प्रतिशत पर हूँ। इस समय पिच में चक्रीय दर बिल्कुल सही है। यॉ काफी स्थिर है; गुरुत्वाकर्षण बढ़ रहा है। कैप्सूल काफी स्थिर है। एक हरा प्रवाह है - और बीच-बीच में नारंगी धारियाँ दिखाई देती हैं। पुनः प्रवेश बहुत अच्छा हो रहा है। असामान्य रूप से धीमी गति से रोल हो रहा है। गुरुत्वाकर्षण 2 तक पहुँच रहा है। दर नियंत्रण में मेरे पास पर्याप्त ईंधन है। अब चिंगारियाँ दिखाई दे रही हैं। एक स्पष्ट हरी चमक, ज
제미니 4, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 지금은 교신하지 않습니다. 휴스턴, 통신 두절. 조종사, 다시 한번
Do you 
11, ह्यूस्टन। समझ गया। और एक अन्य विषय पर, आपसे अन
Хорошо, ваш вентиль подачи
Negative, Joe. It's just too cold in there. I got Fred stashe
Houston, we had a momentary O2 high flow, but we think it's due to all the 
ア
알겠습니다. F2-22 셀의 리마(Lima) 열에 6번째 항목 00001과 7번째 항목 021
Фрэнка пока нет на связи; он с
Sospetto che questo campo di massi possa avere origine in parte da questo grande cratere roccioso dai bordi affilati che abbiamo superato durante la discesa finale. Ieri ho detto che aveva più o meno le dimensioni di un campo da football, e devo ammettere che è stato un po' difficile da misurare all'inizio. Ma ho pensato che potesse entrare nell'Astrodome mentre lo superavamo. E le rocce nelle vicinanze del cratere roccioso sono molto più grandi di quelle in questa zona. Alcune sono alte circa 3 metri e forse più grandi,
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы поискать нам боле
잠깐만요. 방금 그 기동은 달 관측을 위
はい、05650。それから星番号1、マ
هل تريد الانتقال إلى منطق PRIMARY ACME وقوة PRIMARY BIAS وكل ت
さあ、始めましょう。プライマリ、プライマリ、高、ボイ
E, 11, questa è Houston. Qualche informazione in più sulla base della nostra analisi della tua ultima combustione
لقد قمت بالفعل بإعداد فحص محول تدفق الأ
لقد خسرنا 
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Una richiesta: l'ottica commuta a zero. E
了解、ジャック。了解。燃料電池2のRE
Хорошо, 13; это Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы обратились к своему контрольному списку G&C, розовым страницам, пункты 1-5. Выключ
了解、フランク。近地点の予測が
ठीक है। तो चलिए सीधे काम की बात करते हैं, मैं आपको आपकी बैटरियों 
유효한 혈압 측정값이 있습니다. 
Ecco il tuo CONTROLLO MODALITÀ, INVIO, su ATT HOLD. Ora vuoi che faccia 30 
MSC-1 is OFF now. MSC-2 and -3 - I just turned those OFF. I'm going to switch Biomedical recorders. I think a
罗杰，吉姆。请你们打开“数量读取”开关约15秒钟，我这里有一份地图更新，如
好的。我这就给
11番、こちらはヒューストンです。巡回蓄電器のストロークの時点では、低ビットレートのデータを使用していたため、酸素流量パラメータを受信できませんでした。ご覧になっている値はおそらく正常値だと思います。つまり、おそらくこのような形で故障しているトランスデューサーから予想される値であり、このまま悪化し続けるでしょう。心配する必要はありません。地上で
Nous avons besoin 
Хорошо, имейте в виду, что передача управления между станциями будет происходить каждый час, и во время этого процесса могут возникнуть 
Gemini 4, CSQ. Vous n'avez pas compris la première partie de votre transmission. J'ai reçu: « Vu 
Aquar
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Did you receive 
«Аполлон-
さあ、行きます。進入パッ
Фотосъемка погоды... примерно в 24:41 первого дня. Целая серия... облаков, образующих очень необычный узор на земле. Освещение было не очень хорош
Salut Jim, j'ai trois choses à te dire. Premièrement, l'ordinateur est de nouveau à toi. Deuxièmement, aucune manipulation ne
모두를 창문에 억지로 끼워 넣으려
... meine sind... 
何度か.
Gemini VIII, Housto
Понял, давай, стреляй изо всех сил и следи за целью вблизи. Испол
Ottim
알겠습니다. 드로그 배치에 10+55, 스플래시
नहीं। हमने कुछ थैले खाली किए हैं। हमने कुछ और बार पेशाब के थैले खाली किए
E possiamo appena distinguere alcune caratteristiche sulla superficie, forse grazie 
Ich lese – ich lese Houston laut und deutlic
やあ、ヒューストン。こちらはジェミニ4号。ただいま…
さて、もう一度確認します...。ええと、見てみましょう。今回は古い PUGS から何も得られませんでした。まだ 0.2 
Вперед, пр
D'accord, Jim. Je suppose que le point important est que vou
Okay. Ich bin immer noch im SLEW-Modus, daher könnten w
روجر. 027 44 5363، ناقص 165 073 14 037 44 
Jim, in precedenza, Fred-o ha segnalato una fuoriuscita di aria dalla finestra numero 1 del modulo di comando. Ha anche segnalato un pezzo di metallo argentato di circa 10 cm quadrati, che galleggiava lì vicino, e una cosa che stavamo cercando di stabilire è se si trattasse di una nuova fuoriuscita di aria o se facesse parte della fuoriuscita residua del nostro problema originale. Hai altre parole o commenti? E ​​una cosa che stava facendo era scattare alcune fotografie e noi abbiamo autorizzato le fotografie, obiettivi di opportunità, usando la fotocamera lunare numero 1, con l'impostazione di 1/250 di secondo, e non sapendo esattamente quale diaframma
Gemini 4, CSQ CAP COM. Hinweis: Wenn Sie Pegasus aufnehmen, überschreiten Sie nicht den Neigungswinkel von 45°. Es liegt ein kritischer Bandabsturz vor. Falls Sie Pegasus aufnehmen, b
Mesure des tensions continues. Bus principal: 24 V, bus isolé: 27,5 V, bus 1: 25 V, bus 2: 25 V, bus 3: 25 V. Bus de secours 1: 25 V, bus d
Хорошо. Я вижу вал диаметром 0,2
阿波
Roger. I'm doing partial control on fly-by-wire low. Will acquir
/。
نعم، هذا هو..
いいえ、私たちの爆
卡纳文。双子座VIII，如果你准备好进行加速度计偏差检查，我们就
Хорошо. Перехо
У меня всё идёт довольно хорошо. Ваш 41-D был написан с ошиб
좋습니다. 잘 됐네요. 잭, 한 가
نعم يا جيم. سنبقي كرتك مشحونة ونضبطها على وضع "مباشر" في وحدة ا
イギリス、ジョドレルバンク発、AP通信経由：英国の大型ジョドレルバンク電波望遠鏡は、本日東部夏時間午後5時49分、ソ連の無人月探査機からの信号の受信を停止した。広報担当者は、ルナ15号宇宙船は「月面を越えた」ようだと述べた。また、「月面に着陸したとは考えていない」と、同天文台長のバーナード・ラベル卿の広報担当者は述べた。ワシントンUPI通信：スパイロ・T・アグニュー副大統領は、2000年までに人類を火星に送るべきだと主張したが、民主党指導部は地球上のニーズを優先すべきだと反論した。水曜日のアポロ11号打ち上げで政府高官を務めたアグニュー氏は、「私の判断では、今世紀末までに人類を火星に送るべきだ」と述べたが、これは必ずしもニクソン政権を代表した発言ではなく、自身の考えを代弁していたようだ。ラレド（テキサス州）AP通信：ヌエボラレドの入国管理当局は水曜日、ヒッピーたちは入浴と散髪をしなければメキシコ入国のための観光カードの発行を拒否されると発表した。ヌエボラレドのメキシコ入国管理局長ウベルト・カザラス氏は、メキシコシティ、アカプルコ、その他の人気観光地の当局からヒッピーに関する苦情が寄せられていると語った。ユナイテッド・プレス・インターナショナル：ニクソン大統領が月曜日、アポロ11号月着陸ミッションへの国民的参加の日として連邦政府職員に休日を与えたことに対する当
Подождите, Базз. Насколько я могу судить, всё выглядит довольно хорошо. У нас есть — вдоль линии тропической конвергенции, на карте погоды, которую я сейчас смотрю, показано несколько облаков, но ничего существенного. Прямо сейчас — Подождите. Давайте посмотрим, прямо сейчас в середине — да, в MPL — у нас 3000 рассеянных облаков, видимость 10, высота волн 3 фута, это текущая погода. Я не думаю, что прогнозируется что-то существенное. Есть пара — FLIGHT только что сообщил мне, что то, что я т
روجر. دخول القمر، MPL: 359 152 001 194 46 03 267، زائد 1102، ناقص 17203 068 36194 656 11894 36275؛ 195 03 03 0027، أربعة NA، 400 02 09 00 17 03 38 08 20 02 0945 149، ثيتا العقرب. أعلى 315، يمين 35، أعلى. يفترض عدم وجود 6. الأفق عند -30 194 33 03، والميل 298. غروب نجمي ذنب الدجاجة
Ok. Inizia a meno 6 ore e mezza. Dovrai ricomprare assorbenti e assorbenti, e non so se vuoi copiar
Kann ich ihnen zu diesem Zeitpunkt eine 360-Grad
Roger. Stan
حسنًا، هيوستن؛ برج الدلو. لقد وضعنا الشرائط الأربعة في 
로저. 저는 자동 모드로 도킹했는데, 말씀드렸다시피 접촉 순간을 정확히 기억하지 못했습니다. 도킹 프로브 표시기를 계속 확인했죠. 세 개의 캡처 래치, 아니, 그냥 세 개의 래치가 제대로 걸렸다는 걸 나타내는 두 개의 바버폴 표시가 떴고, 소프트 도킹이 완료된 겁니다. 그때 상황은 아주 안정적으로 보였습니다. 그래서 프리 모드로 전환하고 창밖을 다시 봤는데 여전히 안정적이었고, 2번 연료통을 분사했습니다. 그런데 그 순간 두 기체 사이에 회전이 시작됐는데, 원인은 잘 모르겠습니다. 아마 추력 때문일 수도 있고, 아니면 그 전부터 진동이 있었는데 제가 미처 알아채지 못했을 수도 있습니다. 어쨌든 프로브가 후퇴하는 동안 기체가 좌우로 심하게 흔들렸습니다. 제 생각에는 약 15도 정도 흔들렸던 것 같습니다. 그래서 다시 조종간을 잡고 프리 스위치를 다시 자동 모드로 돌려서 흔들림을 줄이려고 했습니다. 닐도 마찬가지였을 겁니다. 닐의 이야기는 나중에 직접 들어보시죠. 저는 우리가 성공적으로 후퇴하고 도킹하지 못할 거라고 생각했습니다. 하지만 약 6초에서 8초 정도, 제가 듣기에는 그 후 상황이 진정되는 것이 보였고,
هذا كل ما يتعلق بالأخبار العالمية والمحلية والتقارير الخاصة. في صفحة الرياضة، فاز هانك سترام، مدرب فريق كانساس سيتي تشيفز، بجائزة أفضل مدرب في دوري كرة القدم الأمريكية (AFL) لهذا العام. وهذه هي المرة الثانية التي يحصل فيها على هذه الجائزة خلال ثلاثة مواسم. تم التصويت من قبل لجنة تابعة لوكالة أسوشيتد برس تضم 30 كاتبًا ومعلقًا رياضيًا، ثلاثة من كل مدينة. وكان أقرب منافسيه هو ويب إيوبانك. ومن بين المدربين الآخرين الذين حصلوا على أصوات سيد جيلمان من سان دييغو، ولو سابين من دنفر. أما بالنسبة لمباراة نجوم كليات شراينرز التي أقيمت أمس، فقد تغلب فريق الشمال على فريق الجنوب بنتيجة 3-0. سجل ديك بيرلينسكي، لاعب فريق جامعة ولاية ميشيغان، هدفًا ميدانيًا من مسافة 23 ياردة في الربع الأول، وكان هذا كل ما يحتاجه فريق الشمال للفوز على فريق الجنوب يوم الأربعاء، في مباراة نجوم كليات شراينرز لكرة القدم. دعونا نرى، أعتقد أن الأمور المثيرة للاهتمام في هذه المباراة هي: عدد المحاولات الناجحة: الشمال 19، الجنوب 16؛ والركض: الشمال 214، الج
और दूसरी तरफ, हम MIN डेडबैंड ATT होल्ड मोड में थे; और संपर्क के समय, मैंने प्लस X थ्रस्ट लगाया; और उसके तुरंत बाद हमें एक
روجر، جيم. بخصوص المبخر، نعتقد أنه إذا واجهت مشكلة مماثلة في المرة القادمة على الجانب الخلفي المعرض لأشعة الشمس، فتحقق من درجة حرارة مخرج المبخر، وإذا تجاوزت 60 درجة، فنوافق على أنه من ال
Хорошо, командир космического корабля, это компания 
وسرعت
حسنًا. اللوحة 3: شحن البطارية، مُطفأ - لقد فعلت ذلك بالفعل يا جاك - التالي: مُحوّل التيار المتردد، اللوحة 5: توصيل ناقل التيار الرئيسي بين البطارية B/C والبطارية B/C. ها؟ نعم، إنه في الوضع العلوي. قاطع الدائرة، مدخل/موصل الطاقة للبطارية A، مفتوح؛ قاطع الدائرة، مدخل/موصل الطاقة للبطارية B، مفتوح، اللوحة 5: قاطع الدائرة، 
Роджер. Есл
1
نعم س
我从下降段附近拍到了一张Y型支柱的照片，我想我们应该能更清楚地看到热效应。看起来影响非常小
네, 짐. 29페이지로 넘어가죠. 여기서는 직접 답을 써야 하는 부분이 있습니다. 6~7줄 정도 되는 짧은 문장인데, 제가
好的，我会的。我会把重量单位（磅）和百分比都告诉你。A组231磅，占76
Alles klar. Ich nehme an, das haben Sie verstanden. Schalttafel 5: Leistungsschalter, Hauptschalter A und Hauptschalter B, ges
Il n'y a aucun doute sur le bon 
We'd like you to resume the attitude, pitch 010, yaw 045; and then come out of it agai
Well, let me see. I don't know whethe
宁静基
Okay. We've complete
알겠습니다. 그래서 저희는 최우선 순위 물품을 그곳에 보관하고 있습니다. 그곳에서 처리될 가능성이 훨씬 높다고 판단
了解しました。待機しており
Du côté du sport, voici quelques nouvelles. Pendant que vous étiez occupé l'autre jour, Joe Namath et le commissaire de la NFL, Pete Rozelle, ont annoncé que « Broadway Joe » avait accepté de vendre ses parts dans le restaurant Bachelors III et de rejoindre les Jets de New York. Joe est arrivé aujourd'hui au camp d'entraînement des Jets et a effectué sa première séance. Plusieurs autres joueurs des Jets, qui avaient fait grève avec lui, ont également rejoint l'équipe. Davy Hill, originaire de Jackson, dans le Michigan, a remporté son troisième tournoi majeur de golf en autant de participations la semaine dernière. Il a gagné le Philadelphia Classic. Hill a remporté quatre tournois cette année et est le joueur ayant accumulé le plus de gains avec la coquette somme de 129 000 $. En baseball, la division Ouest de la Ligue nationale reste très disputée. Los Angeles et San Francisco sont à un match des Astros d'Atlant
La pressione alla sorgente è 1500, la
ठीक है... इस... वेक्टर पर। ठीक है, R1 प्लस 45498
आप चाहते हैं कि वह हाई गेन, यॉ, शून्य पर जाए
لم ي
Sì. Lo mostro circa un terzo del diamet
We'll worry about
Der Sonnenuntergang ist wirklich beeindruckend, ich glaube nicht, dass ich viel Zeit damit verschwenden muss, ihn anzusehen. Er ist sehr interessant. Faszinierend ist auch, wie schwarz es ist, wenn sich die Augen nicht daran gewöhnt haben. Ich kann definitiv eine Beschichtung auf dem Fenster erkennen. Ich schalte jetzt wieder auf VOX im UHF-Hi-Modus, um zu senden. Ich öffne das Visier, um das rechte Mikrofon abzuwischen. Ich habe es abgeleckt. Visier zu. Das Visier wurde sofort abgedichtet, damit die Anzugselektronik ihre Arbeit aufnehmen konnte. Ich will damit nicht noch einmal Probleme haben. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hält die Temperatur sehr gut bei etwa 68 Grad. Also wird die Kuppel wieder hochgefahren. Sie steht jetzt bei 76, 75 Grad. Anscheinend ist diese höhere Einstellung die richtige. Ich denke, ich drehe sie jetzt noch eine halbe Markierung hoch, dann haben wir sie vielleicht fixiert. Sie kühlt endlich etwas ab, also weiß ich, in welche Richtung ich die Einstellung ändern muss. Ich habe die Kühlmittelmenge für den Anzug und den Steuerhebel auf 8,5 eingestellt. Die Anzeige in der Kuppel zeigt aktuell 75 Grad an. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hat 68 Grad. Sehr angenehm. Ich spüre die kühle Luft auf meinem Gesicht. Der Sauerstoffgehalt sieht sehr gut aus, 60 und 75 psi. Ich habe den Inverter 250 im Auge behalten. Er nähert sich 140 Grad, während der Contrast 150 auf etwa 100 Grad gesunken ist. Im Standby-Modus liegt die Temperatur bei etwa 100 Grad, was der Kabinentemperatur entspricht. Drittens, der 250er – der macht Probleme, und ich werde ihn im Auge behalten. Der Wärmetauscher der Kabine pendelt sich definitiv bei 40 Grad ein, und das bereitet mir Schwierigkeiten, da ich Frank Samonski offensichtlich 50 Cent schulde. Ich bin angenehm überrascht. Auch der Kabinentreibstoffwert ist etwas hoch. Mal sehen, wir haben 5,5 psi an Bord. Der Luftdruck liegt bei etwa 5, Korrektur, 5,3, das ist nicht zu hoch für diese Kabine. Es
I will - Can
Okay. Die Kabinentemperatur beträgt 92 Grad. Ich gebe Ihnen die Wechselrichter. Bitte warten. – Der Hauptwechselrichter (250 W) hat eine Temperatur von ca. 143 W. Der 150-W-Wechselrichter hat eine Temperatur von 102 Grad. Der Standby
ठीक है, जैक। क्या आप हमारे पास मौजूद एम्पलीफायर से संतुष्ट हैं
نعم، فعلت. تريد إزالة - تريد تشغيل كلا ا
是的。我们决定用一个罐子，你知道，液冷服外面有个袋子，我们觉得也能用，或者说我们知道肯定能用。我们试过了。所以，你看，这是个套着袋子的袋子，里面装着液冷
알겠습니다. 명사 61: 위도, 마이너스 21.67, 마이너스 165.37, 1163.1, 36292. 다시 
Водолей, Хьюстон. Прошу проигнорировать только что пер
11号，
ठीक है, प्रतीक्षा करें। रोटेशनल कंट्रोल पावर सा
機体軸のアラインメントができたら、光学装置を月か星に向けるために、ボール上でどのような姿勢で飛行すればよいかを教えることができます。そして、光学装置がどこを向いているかがわかれば、プラットフォームにトルクを与えるために必要なCDU角度を算出でき
Oka
Roger, Apollo Run One 13 54 08, au nord-est de la piste, 92 miles, et.
了解。分かりました。ああ、コピーする準備ができたら、もう一つ楽譜を用意しました。コピーする
Okay, X minus 00011, Y plus 0002, Z min
まあ、暑くなったり汗をかいたりしない限り、これが妥当なと
我想我们已经
Das ist bestätigt. Damit ist diese Karte fertig. Die restlichen Aktualisierungen dienen lediglich Ihrer Information und basieren auf unserer 58-Stunden-Plattform – sehen Sie sich die Plattform an. Wir sind in einer sehr guten Position. Ihre Gyroskope weisen seit der letzten Aktualisierung nahezu keine Drift mehr auf. Bei der letzten Aktualisierung hatten wir einen X-Wert von -2,24, einen Y-Wert von +0,87 und einen Z-Wert von -0,11. Seit der Aktualisierung, die meines Wissens auf der 52-Stunden-Plattform basierte, haben wir Ihnen einen X-Drift von +0,79, einen Gierwert von +1,06 und einen Z-Wert von +0,02 angezeigt. Ich sehe den Unterschied zwischen den Ausrichtungen nach 52 und 57 Stunden – die 57-Stunden-Ausrichtungen haben uns nicht genügend Zeit gelassen, um eine wirklich gute oder vollständig valide Aktualisierung der Driftprüfung durchzuf
Ich werde... 
ठीक है। हम ज़रूर कोशिश करेंगे। जैसा कि मैंने कहा, हमारे पास कुछ तारे हैं। वे शाफ़्ट और ट्रनियन के शून्य बिंदु के साथ केंद्रित नहीं हैं। चलिए, 1
Roger. Hawaii Com Tech. Aurora Seven ti sento forte
Okay. Nun ja
Roger. Parcours intermédiaire numéro 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, tangage et lacet NA, 150 29 5453, moins 00048, plus tous les zéros, plus 00001 075 159 328, NA, plus 00230 00048 011 00048 03 0908 382, ​​NA trois fois, plus 1102, moins 17204 11803 36275 195 03 33,
피트, 레
休斯顿，鹰。哥伦比亚已经通
わかっ
It looks like in our power-down (illegible) we're still pulling just a little less than 11 amps. We've got 10 on no. 1 and a little less than 11 on no. 2. The tether - the location of the tether or the umbilical restraint on the outside hatch made it rather difficult to do any EVA work as far as free tether aerodynamics out in front of the spacecraft. Whenever I'd be operating out in that area, the tether would - when it would come to its end would start me back and the reaction would carry me back up towards the - over the spacecraft and back toward the adapter section. That's why I kept going out of sight during my maneuvering out there up above the windows, and then drifting back toward the back of the spacecraft. I continually had to keep pulling myself to get out in the front part of the spacecraft. I wasn't satisfied with the pictures that I was getting. It was rather difficult to keep any of the lanyards that I had on... I had the lanyard on the gun and the tether and umbilical that I was on, and several other miscellaneous type lanyards flailing around and it was difficult to keep them from in front of the camera. You'll notice that perhaps in the pictures that I'll be moving my arms rapidly. I kept trying to move them out of the way so that I could take a picture. I'd say they were in front of me probably about 50 or 60 percent of the time; and the other percent of the time I was not in as good a position as I would like to be. I think I probably took in the neighborhood of a dozen pictures. It does seem quite easy to operate, even just with the tether
了解。はっきりと聞こえました
Это Эд
사실 이 지역을 가장 잘 묘사하자면, 색깔이라고는 전혀 없는, 흑백의 광활한 공간이라고 할 
Charlie, je suis désolé; la communication se coupe sans arrêt. On a entendu jusqu'à « vous pouvez tout faire », et après, plus rien. On savait bien que ce n'était pas normal, parce qu'on ne peut pas. Mais que voulez-v
Хорошо. Вращательная мощно
收到。Cape 系统已准备就绪，我也准备
Roger. Quatre des huit témoins de disjoncteur sont au rouge. Les disjoncteu
Da
Esatto. Noi abbiamo notato la vibrazione, ma non era tale da farci pensare che stesse per succedere qualcosa di
了解しました。も
프렌드십 세븐, 여기
Tu as l'air un peu dérangé, mais je te comprends. Sache que nous 
Роджер. Вы изменили это в отношении 
水星？はっきり聞こえる。夜間のヨー角のチェックには水星と月を使ったんだ
所有自动功能，标称速度为每秒 1 英尺
Roger. Tout se
吉姆，你
Houston, i ragazzi che dicevano che non saremmo stati in grado di dire con precisione dove ci trovavamo sono i vincitori oggi. Eravamo un po' impegnati a preoccuparci degli allarmi del programma e cose del genere nella parte della discesa in cui normalmente avremmo scelto il punto di atterraggio; e a part
Apollo 8, Houston. Non possiam
接下来几天
Да. У нас есть фотография
好的。开始了。-2，/G&N：63634；加 0.96，减 0.23；减 0021.7，减 0001.7，减 0008.0；080，164，326；不适用，不适用；0023.2，0:03.5 - 由于燃烧时间很短，我们只给你半秒钟 - 0018.5；44，135.9，28.1；其余为不适用。设置星号 31 和 23；横滚角 28
收到。我们觉
Хью
Род
Columbia, Houston. Eagle est de nouveau hors jeu. Essayez 
Apollo 11, hier ist Houston. Startfreigab
現時点で何
了解、フレンドシップ・セブン。エアロメッドは、あなたがバンジーコードを使って運動を行ったかどう
Я дважды нажал не
Apo
Ricevu
روجر. شكراً ل
Affermativo, Jim. E non ci sono 
क्या आप मेरे द्वारा पावर डाउन करने के लिए त
好的，吉姆，没问题。你只要把提示卡裁开就行了，提示卡是一张大小合适的硬纸片，离环口大约一英寸半。也就是说，把环口剪掉，你就会得到一张大约11英寸长、6英寸宽的卡片，差不多就是
D'accord. Déplacer la caméra vers la droite déplace la Terre vers la gauche sur notre écran. Sur notre écran, le terminateur est presque
ठीक है। मैं आपको थोड़ी-बहुत पृष्ठभूमि की आवाज़ के साथ ज़ोर से 
Го
크고 또
١١، هيوستن. هذا روجر. فهمت. ١١، هذا جهاز ا
알겠습니다, 짐. 원격 측정 데이터를 보여드리겠습니다. 새로운 자세가 안정적으로 보입니다. 참고로, 최신 추적 데이터에 따르면 페리신시온은 136마
好的。我们现在从屏幕上的
埃德开始拆卸东西，当我们到达无法再操作助推器的位置时，我便全心全意地帮他——至少帮忙拿着东西，把它们收好，尽量不让它们丢失。我们干得越快，进度就越落后。倒不是因为我们没按规矩来，只是比我们预想的要花更多时间。在零重力环境下操作其实并不比在模拟器里容易多少，甚至可能差不多。所以我们只能绕着轨道转一圈。到了卡那封轨道时，我已经认定我们无法完成任务，但我还是想再坚持一下。当我们到达卡那封轨道——或者说就在我们离开卡那封轨道之前——我清楚地意识到我们无法完成减压。我请求跳到下一个轨道。然后……我们喘了大约20分钟，试图整理我散落在驾驶舱里的杂物。然后我拿出检查清单，我们又仔细地核对了一遍，确保匆忙中没有遗漏任何步骤。舱外活动开始——在卡那封上空收到了启动指令。一切准备就绪，我们等待着开始减压的指令。指令到位了。我们完成了减压循环。离开卡那封时，我们获准进行完整的舱外活动。我们到达坎顿或夏威夷，当时——我记得是坎顿或夏威夷——收到了正式的舱外活动指令，可以离开飞船并开始舱外活动。我们按照之前录音机和语音通讯设备记录的指示完成了这些操作。我们继续前进，埃德出来了，我们开始拍照——就像我们通常那样……一开始我帮他固定住了飞船。后来他出来后，飞船似乎在空中漂浮，我无法追踪他的位置——起初
Apollo 8, Houston. Looks like a good time. One hour before -
시그마 세븐
We'd like to know what your p
네. 사실 더 느리거나 더 빠르거나, 둘 중 하나겠죠. 음, 네, 더 느려요. 그런 일이 일어나는 건 정말 드
00시 43분 02초에 제 자이로스코프가 제대로 정렬된 것 같습니
알겠습니다. 한 시간 반 전에 통신
Roger. Il sistema di ritenuta dell'amaca sta iniziando a farsi vedere sotto il 
Roger
Apollo 11, Houston. Le S IVB se trouve à environ 6 000 milles nautiques
이것은 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 일몰을 보기 위해 좌회전하려고 잠시 요(yaw) 방
Il y a un fort contraste, et l
11，休斯顿。为了方便规划，您可以
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。バズ、もし聞き取れなかったら、PADの読み上げは素晴らしかったです。時計の最新情報をサイトに配信でき次第、お知らせします。ハニーサックルに引き継ぐ作業を進めています。数分で完
Sì. Pensiamo che troverai già un 37 06. In tal caso, premi INVIO e dovresti arrivare al codice 00062, che è la richiesta di standby. E quando lo ottieni, premi PROCEDI fino agli spazi vuoti. Se ti viene in mente qualcos'altro, è lì che vogliamo arrivare comunque. In entrambi i casi, quando ti viene mostr
Très bien. C'est Jack
Да. Могу себе 
Спасибо
Okay, Fred. Nur eine Kleinigkeit, die uns gerade aufgefallen ist.
ईगल, आपके पास P64 के
Roger, Ha
D'accord, Jack. L'étape sui
Ruhe bewahren, Houston. Roger. Ihre Rückmeldung war korrekt.
Roger. Quelles sont les dernières nouvelles concer
Nous sommes passés de l'autre côté maintenant, 
ठीक है। कृपया मुझे अपनी मात्रा स्विच को 15 सेकंड के लिए पढ़ने की स्थित
위치 6, 테스트 완료, D-8, 4번째
Oka
Nur zu, Hawaii. Zwillin
इस समय
Beh, questo è... - Mi sembra che tu sia a posto. Ricorda solo che dovrai abbassare il diaframma probabilmente a 22, forse no: la messa a fuoco rimane all'infinito e lo zoom mi batte. Puoi scegliere, puoi zoomare con que
حسنًا. أسفل "التحكم في التوجيه"، يجب تغيير الخطوة الثالثة إلى "التح
Х
Wir suchten auch nach dem Katzenpfotenkrater, da wir annahmen, uns jenseits des Großen V im Zielgebiet zu befinden. Ich denke aber, dass es sich wahrscheinlich um den We
Roger, 11. The problem on that initially - starting up the was we 
Ладно. Я только что увидел кое-что ещё здесь, рядом со мной, но как раз когда я подошёл достаточно близко, чтобы сделать
Roger, Gemini VIII. Orario: 03:47:35 Delta-V, 61,2; Delta-T, 1 più 22; imbardata, 
印度洋船。西格玛七号。
E Eagle, Houston. Avete già dispiegato il carrello di atterraggio? 
Est-ce que ça te poursuit encore? On dirait que ça se r
收到。与航天器进行测试交
I
このドームの温度の逆流が起これ
درجة حرارة خط الوقود في سيارتك الأوتوماتيكية هي 70 درجة، ود
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы понимаем, что вы нас перехватываете. Пока мы пытаемся восстановить с вами связь, не могли бы вы установить
알겠습니다. 알겠습니다. 다음 댓글은 E-13페이지에 
أنا آسف لأنني ل
收到。请您切换到全向三角天线，我们已向您展示了高增益天线
你说你在那
روجر. تم نسخ 41 نسخ
好的。请注意，由于周围有很多小星星，光学校准非常困难。
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। आपके राज्य का वेक्टर अपडेट पूरा हो गया है और सत्यापित हो चुका है। आप कंप्यूटर क
जैक और फ्रेड दोनों सोने जा रहे हैं
Подтвержд
खैर, एक छोटा सा धमाका हुआ – फिर हम आगे बढ़ने लगे; फिर 
手動姿勢切り替えは RATE COMMAND で行
Okay. Ich brauche einen Mes
わかりました。コマンダーのボールをピッチ角26
And, Houston, while you're thinking
저희는 당신이 원래의 자세, 피치 010, 요 045로 돌아가신 후, 약 1시간 10분 후에 다시 원래 자세로 돌아오시기를 바랍니
不，自从我通过卡那封航空医疗通
알겠습니다. 얼마죠? 2만
アポロ11号、ヒューストンで
D'accord. À l'étape 5 du formulaire E-11, le premier sous-titre est « Casques et gants ». Les éléments suivants dépendent du fait que vous portiez une combinaison ou une chemise, mais ils doivent tous être complétés. Les valves de retour d'air de la combinaison doivent être OUVERTES si vous entre
Jim, as-tu réussi à allu
समर्थन क
Incidentally, we're looking at a replay of your TD&E stuff here and the TV loo
Giusto per informazione, avete dovuto usar
في أعلى الصفحة، ستجد الخطوة 38، وأسفلها مباشرةً، قبل الخطوة 39، نريد تفعيل 
好的。杰
Apollo 8, ici Houston. J'ai une nouvelle perspective pour vous à la fin de votre mission. Elle vous permettra d'admirer la Terre sous un meilleur
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया। मैं फिर से कहता हूँ: मैंने उन्हें नहीं देखा। ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स ने आपके द्वारा दिए गए निर्देशांकों के बहुत करीब एक स्थान की ओर इश
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। हमें इससे कोई फर्क नहीं पड़ता - हम बस बहाव दर पता करने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं और यह देखना चाहते हैं कि आपके द्वारा वस्तु को गिराने के बा
जेमिनी 4, CSQ CAP COM। कृपया ध्यान द
Okay, Jack. Könntest du bitte noch ei
好的，阿波罗8号。通信测试完成。感谢你们的配合。导航观测方面，我这
पीनट बटर और
Nous affichons 0,2 sur nos appareils de mesure du CO2, et nous en somm
姿勢は正常です。再突入姿勢までピッチを下げ、逆姿勢を修正します。再突入姿勢に留まる理由はありません。逆姿勢では視界が良好であるにもかかわらず、再突入姿勢に留まる理由はありません。そして、これこそがまさに飛行に必要な姿勢です。逆姿勢に近づいています。ロールは正常。ヨーも正常。再突入姿勢はセレクト状態です。まもなくピッチを
نعم
降りてきていますが、それは -
Bon, on n'a pas gaspillé d'essence en faisant ce qu'on a fait, mais on en a gaspillé avec cette satanée 
Pront
आपके पास कुछ ऐसा होना चाहिए
Nous allons probablement suivre le plan de vol dans l'ensemble. Nous allons, si possible, 
Okay. Mal sehen, ob ich alles verstanden habe. Für das Rendezvous-System muss zunächst CB 16 INVERTER 2 geschlossen und CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2 ebenfalls geschlossen sein. Anschließend muss auf Bedienfeld 14 überprüft werden, ob INVERTER 2 ausgewählt ist. Außerdem muss CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 geschlossen sein (beide Leistungsschalter). Danach muss der RENDEZVOUS RADAR-Auslösegriff gezogen werden. Auf Bedienfeld 3 muss RENDEZVOUS RADAR auf A ENTER mit Plus aller ZIP-Werte und Plus 28300 in den Registern 1 und 2 eingestellt werden. Ans
Non preoccuparti. Arrivo io d
As we approach the burn, you want to go through the same check that we did for the last burn. That is, we want to make sure we have everything powered up... circuit breaker by circuit breaker in conjunction with your direction. And for... we ought to have a procedure for powering up the command module again when we have to go b
ठीक है। ज
알겠습니다
Sigma Se
62970, meno 162, più 129, più 00966, più 00552, meno 02079. I tre successivi sono tutti zeri, NA, più 00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013, su 04.7, destra 3.9, più 1418, meno 16505, 
Jack, of course, the reason for all of this is that we see we're 20 a
Ici Houston.
Tout ce que j'ai entendu, c'est que la cabine était sous pression. Je n'ai rien entendu de plus. Odyssey, nous sommes prêts à ce que vous réchauffiez les moteurs numéro 2 à votre guise et nous nous demandons si
Bene. In questo momento è separato dalla 
我离得还挺远的。那肯定是SLA面板——这一点毋庸置疑。看起来确实像……面板。那东西是从我们这边
Roger. If you wou
ヴァンスさん、パワーアップはいつから始める予定です
Roger. Je 
模式 
Sigma Seven, hier spricht Kano Com Tech, gesendet auf UHF/
جيم، يمكنني أن أعطيك فكرة عامة عن الإجراء المقترح لرفع وحدة القيادة والتوجيه والملاحة. هذا هو الإجراء المقترح حاليًا. قد نتوصل إلى إجراء أفضل، لكن هذا ما ندرسه الآن. أول ما نخطط للقيام به هو استخدام المنظار على الأرض كما فعلنا في منتصف المسار. ثم سنقوم بمحاذاة
Houston, the guys that said that we wouldn't be ab
حسنًا يا أهل هيوستن، الصوت واضح تمامًا. لقد استلمتُ تنبيهاتكم، الخطوة الأولى هي: أضواء التحذير التي ستظهر هي: ASCENT PRESS، CE
Okay. Unter „Powerup“ steht in der ersten Zeile „AUTO SELECT, 16, to OFF“. Okay. Diesen Teil können Sie einfach löschen. In der fünften Zeile steht „Circuit breaker LOGIC POWER“, das ist eigentlich „LOGIC BUS, four of them, to closed“. Der DELTA-V CG ist irrelevant, da wir den Motor nicht überlasten. Unter „SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER“ steht „Two to AC 1“. Wir ändern das in „SIGNAL CONDITION/DRIVER BIAS POWER, one, to AC 1“. Die dritte Zeile von unten unter „POWER“ lautet „POWER, two, ON“. Auch hier ändern wir das in „POWER, number 1“. Die letzte Zeile „AUTO SELECT, 16, enable“ können Sie streichen und durch „MODE, three of them, to RATE 1“ ersetzen. Möchtest du versuchen, das n
Roge
Ich
Controllo della connessione completato. Mi senti? La posizione degli interruttori sul pannello è impostata sui valori predefiniti. Globo in posizione, latitudine nord 63°, longitudine est 97°, numero di correzione 710, tempo di divisione 9 ore 18 min. 07 sec.; indice mobile impostato sulla posizione pred
11番、ヒューストン。パネルのマークが見えます。「システムA 上昇燃料、上昇酸化剤」と表示されています。クワッド1、クワッド4。あの小さなカメラから見えるこの鮮明さ
Apollo 11, Houston. 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们无法很好地锁定目标。我想知道我们是否可以尝试确保轨道
はい、大丈夫です。了解です。システムチェックリストに関して、もう
你想看看电脑是
आपका क्या मतलब है? हम चंद्रमा और सूर्य पर संरेखण करने जा रहे हैं; इसके अलावा मुझे क
Roger. S
ジム、鳥が飛んでいるときは、アヒルの隠れ家はいつも
分かりました。降下
どのウィンドウから操作すれば、モニターをどのように
そして、表面は細かく粉状になっています。つま先で軽く拾うことができます。まるで炭粉のように、ブーツの底と側面に
ここは真昼間で
Je crois qu'ils ont tous commencé avec des numéros pairs de plusieurs milliers. Ils les avaient tous différents pour pouv
分かりました、ジャック。確認させてください。中間コースの時と同じように、地球に向けます。そして、機体軸のアライメントを行います。それから、飛行姿勢を指示してもらい、それから…​​月に向けます。それから、CDUを更新して、星や月、地球への粗アライメント、微アライメントを行います。待機してください。了解。ジャック、またマスターアラームが発生しました。バッテリーのラン
نعم، كنا ننظر إلى الخريطة، وأنت جنوب فلوريدا، لذا فأنت لست داخل البلاد الآن. لكننا نتساءل عن لوحات سيارتك. هل قمت بتج
من المفترض أن نقوم بإعداد جهاز أجينا في وضع التحكم في ال
反射だよ。窓に映
रॉजर, मुझे आपकी उड़ान योज
D'accord. Panneau 4: TÉLÉCOMM, GROUPE 1, sera mis hors t
Roger. Les piles de l'adaptateur sont toutes en bon état, à 24 V. Les piles principales sont… attendez, les piles de l'adaptateur… les piles de l'adaptateur sont à 24 V, entre 2 et 2,5 V. Les piles principales sont à 9 et 22,5
Roger. Nous allons modifier l'orientation de l'étoile du sextant afin d'améliorer la couverture de l'antenne à gain élevé, et nou
こんばんは。アポロ11号の船長です。100年前、ジュール・ヴェルヌは月への旅を描いた小説を執筆しました。彼の宇宙船コロンビア号はフロリダを離陸し、月への旅を終
La risposta è af
Dovremmo recuperare abbastanza bene nei prossimi giorni
We are reading 0.
11, Houston. Potresti confermare che abbiamo acquisito automaticamente quando sei arrivato al ramo per questo passaggio
Okay, Joe. Da wir im Zeitplan voraus sind, kann ich weitermachen und sozusagen früher Feierabend machen, oder soll ich genau nach einer Stunde Feierabend m
तीन को रेटिंग 2
In
11, Houston. Siamo pronti
Okay, Jack. It'll be a few minutes yet. We want to get it right up to
حسنًا. بين عملية إعادة الضغط الأولى والثانية، خلال فترة الانتظار تل
Apollo 8, Houston. Looks like we're getting pretty far off in b
11، هيوستن. روجر، نيل. 8 1/2، 7، و8 لحالة طا
Проверка коммуникации. 1, 2, 3
Roger. Je comprends que vous êtes en ligne avec Charlie. Pause. Vérifiez que v
쌍둥이자리 4, 당신의 상태가 약하게 느껴지네요. OAMS 업데이트 없이 새로운 6-4를 보내드립니다. 1일, 00 09 30, 8+18, 16+10입니다. 
正解です。パネル5に戻ってくださ
Roger. Houston, Columbia. Nominale; nessun cambio di aereo. Tutto procede alla grande, e sembra che.
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous vous demandons de choisir l'option 1 et de vous positionner comme indiqué dans le plan de vol à 12 heures. Mike, veuillez commence
자, 엘리엇, 계속해 봐
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. افتقدنا لحام دلتا-تي
Roger, Friendship Seven. Rollwinke
Okay. Understand. It's not our monitor. It must be the transmitter or the sys
Hallo, Ca
We'll switch to your 
테이프가 아직 돌아가고 있는 것 같은데 빨간불이 아직 안 켜졌네요. 테이프 레코더 표시등 위치가 정말 마음에 안 들어요. 테이프 레코
Roger. We're getting near - we're going to need to dump some urine overbo
Да, мы об 
Da
روجر. مايك، أعتقد أننا نستطيع شرح معدل السبعة أعشار. في المرة الأولى، كما تعلم، لم نتمكن من المرور عبر النظام، لذا كان لدينا خطأ كبير بين وحدة التحكم الفعلية ووحدة التحكم المطلوبة 
Okay. What I got, Jack, was the procedure assumes that all DESCENT BATTERIES are ON, and BAT 6 is on NORMAL FEED. Now we're going into the and on panel 5
Aber klar, sehr gerne. Ich kann das 
オレンジ色の光が見えた。今は停電
Apollo 8, Houston. S-Band-Aus-Status wird auf AUS gesetzt. Dadurch sollte die normal
كولومبيا تسمعك بوضوح تا
यहां एक दिलचस्प खबर है जिसे सुनकर अच्छा लगा। ऐसा लगता है कि मिशिगन के एन आर्बर में एक नया युवा गिरोह पनपा है। इसका नाम गिलनेट गिरोह है। यह गिरोह एन आर्बर की गलियों में छुपकर घूमता है और कभी-कभी कानून को भी दरकिनार कर देता है। वे खुद को 'गुरिल्ला फॉर गुड' कहते हैं। उन्होंने कुछ कारनामे किए हैं, जैसे कि एक पुल पर अश्लील बातें लिखी हुई थीं, जिसे उन्होंने एक ही रात में रंग दिया। एक जर्जर मकान, जो आस-पड़ोस के बच्चों के बीच लोकप्रिय तो था, लेकिन खतरनाक भी था, उसे बंद कर दिया गया। शहर के बीचोंबीच स्थित गमले, जो इस बात पर बहस के कारण खाली पड़े थे कि इसके लिए कौन जिम्मेदार है (व्यापार या सरकार), फूलों से भर दिए गए। एक व्यस्त चौराहे पर लगी झाड़ी, जिसे दृष्टि बाधित करने वाला माना जा रहा था, उसे काट दिया गया, जिससे मालिक नाराज हो गया। ह्यूरन नदी के किनारे पड़ा कचरा भी उठा लिया गया। गिरोह के सदस्य गुमनाम किशोर हैं जो किसी भी तरह की पहचान नहीं चाहते। उनका मकसद लालफीताशाही को खत्म करना और अपने हिसाब से अच्छे काम करवाना है। इस संगठन में धार्मिक भावना की झलक भी मिलती है। मिशिगन विश्वविद्यालय के एक सहायक प्रोफेसर, जो इस गिरोह के विचारों के लिए अनौपचारिक सलाहकार की भूमिका निभाते हैं, ने कहा, "यह एक तरह का सर्वधर्म समूह है।" इसका नाम सेंट पीटर, यानी मछुआरे के जाल से लिया गया है। और यह इतना दूरस्थ है कि इसे किसी विशेष चर्च से नहीं जोड़ा ज
ジェミニ8世を呼び出しているステーション、もう一度言ってく
Roger. Was this noticing the wate
あの稲妻を見て！ここには本当にたくさん稲
بيريسنثيون زائد 2 - حسنًا، بيريسنثيون زائد 2، عند؛ زائد 1633.0، ناقص 0014.5، ناقص
Roger. We don't have hi
Houston, hier spricht Gemini VI.
Okay. I guess everybody has pretty much envisioned the space program as being all a lot of exotic electronics, and, certainly, a lot of it is. But I thought I'd bring out a couple of items here in conjunction with the. After the first, you get a very accurate measurement of the amount of water that's left in the s. We're going to make use of this bag I'm showing now to collect the remaining water out of the and see just how much we really did have left, and hopefully, on future missio
Voic
Und zuletz
جيميني 4، هذا الجراح. لقد قمنا بقياس درجة حرارتك، والآن لدينا قراءة كاملة على جهاز قياس ا
روجر، إد. نريد منك استئناف خطة طيرانك المعتادة. نستند في ذلك إلى تقديرنا بأن لديك 205 قدم/ثانية من فرق السرعة (ΔV) المتبقية، وبعد 63 دورة، ستظل في مدار بزاوية 81 درجة، 125.7 درجة. هذا سيوفر لنا ما يكفي لعكس اتجاه حركة المركبة (OAMS)، والذي نعتقد أنه سيكون 113 قدم/ث
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Как насчет проверки связи, и удалось ли вам продуть топливные элементы — точне
Apo
فريندشيب سفن، فريندشيب سفن. هذه قناة إنديان كوم تك على نطاق ا
ठीक है। चंद्रमा का केंद्र लगभग माइनस 2 डिग्री 
继续，阿波罗8号。声
Ici Friendship Seven. Je retourne la combinaison pour augmenter sa position. La température de la vapeur est toujours d'environ 60 degrés
Okay. Als Nächstes setzen wir MAIN BUS A RESET auf OFF; dann überspringen wir einen Schritt und set
B; Delta-V, 13,5. Ajustement d'altitude; Delta-V, 59,5. Ajustement de phase:; Delta
रॉजर केप।
罗杰，阿尔。我目前处于自动模式；逆向飞行模式；陀螺仪开关正常；机动模式已关闭。太空舱已准备好进行逆向飞行，但需要存放两张航图。我确信一切就绪。我的自动模式（燃料）完成度为 81%，手动模式（燃料）完成度为 80%，这与我的中期报告一致。这些参数没有变化。主氧气压力为 52 psi（单位：
This i
Okay, Houston; Ac
ऐसा लगता है कि पावर डाउन होने पर भी हम लगभग 11 एम्पियर से थोड़ा कम करंट खींच रहे हैं। नंबर 1 पर 10 और नंबर 2 पर 11 से थोड़ा कम करंट है। बाहरी हैच पर टेदर या अम्बिलिकल रिस्ट्रेंट की स्थिति के कारण अंतरिक्ष यान के आगे मुक्त टेदर एरोडायनामिक्स के लिहाज से EVA का काम करना काफी मुश्किल हो गया था। जब भी मैं उस क्षेत्र में काम कर रहा होता, टेदर जब खत्म होने वाला होता तो मुझे पीछे की ओर धकेल देता और प्रतिक्रिया के कारण मैं वापस अंतरिक्ष यान के ऊपर से होते हुए एडाप्टर सेक्शन की ओर चला जाता। इसीलिए खिड़कियों के ऊपर पैंतरेबाज़ी करते समय मैं बार-बार नज़र से ओझल हो जाता और फिर अंतरिक्ष यान के पिछले हिस्से की ओर बह जाता। मुझे लगातार खुद को खींचकर अंतरिक्ष यान के आगे वाले हिस्से में जाना पड़ता था। मुझे जो तस्वीरें मिल रही थीं उनसे मैं संतुष्ट नहीं था। मेरे पास जितने भी डोरी थे, उन्हें संभाल कर रखना काफी मुश्किल था... बंदूक पर डोरी थी, मेरे ऊपर लगा हुआ टेदर और अम्बिलिकल था, और कई तरह के दूसरे डोरी इधर-उधर लहरा रहे थे, और उन्हें कैमरे के सामने 
Il vous reste 4 minutes
Обтекатель доставили, всё в поряд
30 se
시간 확인하셨어요? 97시 14분 20
Д
Das ist bestätigt. Damit ist diese Karte fertig. Die restlichen Aktualisierungen dienen lediglich Ihrer Information und basieren auf unserer 58-Stunden-Plattform – sehen Sie sich die Plattform an. Wir sind in einer seh
Gemini 4, ici Houston. Avez-vous réussi à suivre Pegasus B lors
那是罗
«Джемини», это Хирург. Могу
ジェミニ
加油，
Хорошо. Джим, пока мы работаем над этой процедурой, мы хотели бы узнать, выбрали 
Roger. Bill vorrebbe chiedere al medico
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। अफ्रीका से आते समय आसमान में घने बादल छाए हुए थे। अब बादल काफी छंट गए हैं और ह
حسناً، جيميني 8. لدينا اتصال قوي بين الأرض والمسار. وضعك جيد على ال
好的。我们现在的想法是，我们正在查看您机载相机上的一些镜头，看看能否用其中一个来减弱部分光线，以便您能够拍摄这些照片。我们正在进行一些测试，稍后会
Okay. A SEP pad prior to, minus 1 hour, maneuver to following attitudes: roll, 130; pitch, 125; yaw, 012.4. The co
ジェミニ4号、いくつか時間があります。コピーしますか？
罗杰，稍等。你8分钟的时候看起
そうです。現在の水位からすると、そう予測されてい
Okay, Aquarius. We're ready. So we want some high bit rate. To do that, go over to panel 16 u
جيميني 4، جيميني 4، هذا هو اتصال RK
Odyssey, Houston. Voici deux disjoncteurs à ouvrir. Sur le panneau 276, dans la section « Instrumentation et
哎呀，真是倒霉！（笑声）我们这是在倒退啊。唉
收到，休斯顿。阿波罗11号，
好的。这次飞掠是昨天那次飞掠的更新，请注意这是第二次。飞
मैंने कई बार धूप से छाया में जाते समय देखा है कि जैसे ही मैं अंदर जाता हूँ, मेरे चेहरे के प्रतिबिंब के साथ-साथ विज़र पर भी एक अतिरिक्त प्रतिबिंब पड़ता है, जिससे धूप से छाया में जाने के संक्रमण के दौरान दृश्यता बहुत खराब हो जाती है। मेरे विज़र पर इतनी चकाचौंध होती है कि हेलमेट पर छाया पड़ जाती है। फिर मेरी आँखों को प्रकाश की स्थिति के अनुकूल होने में थोड़ा समय लगता है। छाया क्षेत्र के अंदर, 
Dalla superficie, non vedevamo stelle fuori dal finestrino; ma dal mio portello in alto, guardavo la Terra. 
حسناً، فريدو. الآن لسنا كذلك - أيضاً عند -30 ثانية، لسنا بصدد حرق، لذا يمكنك 
روجر، النتيجة في المباراة التي فاز
Роджер. Отчет о состоянии. 
우리는 미국 우주 기록을 깼습니다
Роджер. Пон
لا أعتقد أن ذ
了解しました。了
네.
好的，您的饮用水供应阀已打开
Okay. Ich mache noch ein gutes Foto von dem, was da so kommt. Na ja, ich denke, wir könnten genauso gut die andere Kamera anschließen und sicherstellen, dass sie auch funk
And also request your / DELTA-P which was on the 
Okay. Können Sie uns den Ze
夜幕
AP通信によると、アメリカではイタリアで教皇パウロ6世がクリスマスミサを執り行う様子を視聴し、ヨーロッパでは、史上最強の通信衛星を経由してアポロ8号から送られたクリスマスの挨拶を視聴した。火曜日の夜に伝えられた教皇パウロ6世とアポロ8号の乗組員に関するニュースは、先週水曜日にケープ・ケネディから打ち上げられた
…そこに何かあ
Роджер, Фрэнк. Мы что-то видим по телевизору. П
D'accord. Sur la quatrième rangée. Ouvrez
Un flusso costante di gas, gas bianco, fuoriesce dal motore di soste
높은 비트 전송률을
네, 맞습니다. 그럼 카운트다운 시간에 대한 다른 팁을 하나 더 주
जी हाँ, बस ए
Верно. И вы введете данные об ориентации, полученные с одной из площадок, это будут приблизительные углы линейного движения, когда спутник находится в положении, подходящем для наб
Now, the only thing we had trouble with so far is the suit c
Come ti sembra ora l
Affirmative. Frank, déplace ta
Roger. Wir verst
Jack, aspetta un attimo. Lascia che ti copio un 
Вперед
好的。按照 G&C 
Ein Blick ins Ausland zeigt, dass Südkoreas erste Autobahn, die Seoul mit dem Hafen von Incheon verbindet, zu Ehren Ihrer Reise den Namen Apollo Highway trägt. Ich glaube, wir haben gestern Abend bereits erwähnt, dass Präsident Nixon seine Weltreise angetreten hat und heute in San Francisco seinen ersten Halt macht. Von dort aus wird er die USS Hornet besuchen und die Rückkehr Ihres Raumschiffs verfolgen. Er plant, im Rahmen dieser Reise sieben Länder, darunter Rumänien,
नहीं, अभी नहीं। मैं 40,000 का इंतजार क
알겠습니다. 나하 구조 1호는 낙하산 강하 요원과 부력 장치를 갖추고 착수 지점에 대기할 예정입니다. USS 메이슨함은 착수 후 약 3시간 후에 현장에 도착할 것입니다. 그리고 80~50,000km 구간에서 좌표를 확인하실 때 코어 86은 위도, 87은 경도를 나타낸다는 점을 다시 한번 알려드립니
로저, 휴스턴. 컬럼비아가 당신의 메시지를 읽고 있습니다
저도 마찬가지예요. 그리고
Okay. Heut
이렇게 저 먼 우주에서 지구를 내려다보니, 옛날 범선을 타고 먼 곳을 항해하던 여행자들이 느꼈던 감정이 떠오릅니다. 이제 우리는 고향으로 돌아가고 있고, 저는 그 여정에 대한
分かりました。ありが
是的，我的电脑
Звезда 01, прямо у горизонта. Код 1
... أشعر بخجل شديد من الاعتراف بفقدانهم كاميرا هاسيلبلاد. يب
لا يزال الوضع كما هو. ما زلنا نتأخر قليلاً يا غوردو، لكن الأمر ليس سيئاً. أستطيع تثبيته باستخدام 
로저. 믿기 어려우시겠지만, 저희는 이글호의 집결지 레
看来我们已经基本脱离台风区域了。我再往外走一点，争取拍一张能
是的，确实有一些随机的动静——有些甚至看起来像是在向前飞。外面就有一个。就像一粒轻盈的雪花被卷入涡流中。它们此刻并没有
Okay. I'll read these in bunches of three or four at a time, some of them are the same, some of them are changed, and you can read them back every few steps. FUNCTION to OFF; MODE to STANDBY, no change;
And, I guess we answered number 5. I don't th
罗杰，卡纳里。在我收到这些照片之前信号就会中断。我想拍几张照片。让穆切亚（或者更正一下，让卡诺）按以下顺序发给我：日落、日
Gemini 4, RKV CAP C
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 우선, 모든 진입 절차와 관련 정보를 검토하고 있으며, 진입 체크리스트도 꼼꼼히 살펴볼 예정입니다. 또한, 소거 가능 메모리 검증 작업을 진행 중인 인원들이 있고, 문제점을 파악하고 있으며, 사륜구동 온도에 대해서도 논의하고 있습니다. 새로운 정보가 나오는 대로 알려드리겠습니다. 현재는 전반적인 진행 상황을 점검하고 
Gemini 4, Carna
알겠습니다, 잭. 지금 우리가 처한 특이한 상황은 해치가 설치된 상태이고, 탐사선과 드로그는 여전히 지휘선 내부에 있다는 겁니다. 그리고 당신이 탐사선과 드로그
Apollo 8, en attendant le gain maximal, je vais poursuivre le résumé de la trajectoire. Nous pouvons encore rejoindre la ligne du Pacifique central à partir du treizième point, et vous êtes en route après 138 secondes de combustion. Ces 138 secondes vous permettent de sortir de la zone de correction. Nous recommandons de ne pas tenter de pré-allumage ni de redémarrage après 20 secondes. Au-delà de 20 secondes, la trajectoire pourrait dépasser la capacité de correction pour un retour libre. Les conditions météorologiques dans la zone de récupération sont bonnes. Nous avons un suivi et un sans. Pendant la combustion, vous pourriez remarquer une légère variation de pression dans la chambre et les réservoirs en raison de l'épuisement du carburant dans le réservoir de stockage et de son transfert vers le réservoir de décantation. Cela pourrait se produire entre 2 et 5 secondes après le début de la combustion. Il s'agira d'une légère variation de p
Stand by 1 on that, Jim. Okay, Jim, as far as we can tell right now, the looks as good as any we've ever seen in
Nun ja, es gibt einige Wolken darüber und
ओह, अनदेखा करो
D'accord.
Я не менял настройки инверторов. Я напомню вам, что 
云层稀疏，能
Apollo 8, bitte bestätigen Sie Ih
Roger. Di' loro che sono preoccupato anch'io. Cercherò di risp
جيميني 6، كارنارفون. يمكنك تحويل مفتاح 
제미니 
माइक, मुझे बस थोड़ी जिज्ञासा है; मुझे लगा था कि यह काम हमारे ल
나는 
روجر.
我会在这里等你提出下
Хорошо. Кажется, я читал, что вы готовы. Я забыл... наушники. Процедура проста: нужно достать вторую пару картриджей из командного модуля, наклеить одну полоску клейкой ленты (серой) липкой стороной наружу по бокам каждого нового картриджа у верха, взять кусок картона и разрезать его на четыре квадрата размером примерно 5-7 см с каждой стороны, согнуть их под прямым углом, чтобы сформировать угловые опоры, прикрепить их к клейкой ленте 
N'avons-nous pas e
好的，你先去做吧。做完后我会让你给我打电话，我也会把其他信息转告给你
Ciao, Kano. A
Wir möch
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 고이득 구간에서 다시 신호를 놓쳤습니다. 다시 한번 확인해 주시겠습
Ap
Houston, Apollo 11. Einer der größeren Krater auf der Rückseite – mir fiel ein kleiner, dunkler Fleck an der Außenwand auf, und ich richtete mein Monokular darauf. Ich konnte sehen – oh, ein Gebiet von vielleicht einer Viertelmeile Durchmesser. Es war 
Nous sommes
正解です。それでは、最初のステップである接続/アンビリカルケーブルの接続に進みます。
OK. Allez-y. 127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 deg/sec 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10
Под
روجر. في واشنطن، وافقت لجنة المالية في مجلس الشيوخ على تمديد الضريبة الإضافية على الدخل، لكن يبدو أن تصويت مجلس الشيوخ على مشروع القانون مستبعد حاليًا. في أوستن، رُشِّح عضو مجلس النواب عن ولاية تكساس، راي ليمون، من هيوستن، لمنصب المدير الوطني للجمعية الأمريكية لعلوم المحيطات. وقد اقترح ليمون دراسة إمكانية إنشاء معهد لعلوم المحيطات في تكساس، ليكون أول معهد من نوعه في غرب خليج المكسيك. في مينيابوليس، مينيسوتا، أشار مكتب الأرصاد الجوية، بعد استعراضه لأحوال الطقس اليوم التي تُظهر درجة حرارة عظمى تبلغ 88 درجة فهرنهايت وصغرى تبلغ 72 درجة فهرنهايت، إلى "انعدام تساقط الثلوج". من سانت بطرسبرغ، فلوريدا، ورد تقرير إذاعي من المستكشف النرويجي، ثور هايردال، يفيد بأن طاقم سفينته المصنوعة من ورق البردي، "را"، سيبحر إلى
Alto guadag
Ça a l'air d'un super sport, je comprends pourquoi vous et Scott aimez ça. Je fais une petite démonstration. Je regarde les États-Unis et je commence à cabrer légèrement avec cette vitesse de dérive. Et je vois la lune, que personne aux États-Unis ne peut voir au
La lumière cendrée est conforme
... indossando quella grande e in
Sì. Attraversano appena a sud della parte inferiore del Messico, probabilmente attraverso l'America Centrale. Quella è la fascia equatoriale che supponiamo essere la zona di convergenza intertropicale. L'altra fascia, che si trova circa 30 gradi a sud, sembra correttamente unirsi all'equatore all'estrema sinistra, o appena oltre l'orizzon
Hai pers
Roger
这里是友谊七号电台。
イ
Okay. Taifun Babe ist noch vor Formosa. 06. Der Wetterbericht me
यहां एक दिलचस्प खबर है जिसे सुनकर अच्छा लगा। ऐसा लगता है कि मिशिगन के एन आर्बर में एक नया युवा गिरोह पनपा है। इसका नाम गिलनेट गिरोह है। यह गिरोह एन आर्बर की गलियों में छुपकर घूमता है और कभी-कभी कानून को भी दरकिनार कर देता है। वे खुद को 'गुरिल्ला फॉर गुड' कहते हैं। उन्होंने कुछ कारनामे किए हैं, जैसे कि एक पुल पर अश्लील बातें लिखी हुई थीं, जिसे उन्होंने एक ही रात में रंग दिया। एक जर्जर मकान, जो आस-पड़ोस के बच्चों के बीच लोकप्रिय तो था, लेकिन खतरनाक भी था, उसे बंद कर दिया गया। शहर के बीचोंबीच स्थित गमले, जो इस बात पर बहस के कारण खाली पड़े थे कि इसके लिए कौन जिम्मेदार है (व्यापार या सरकार), फूलों से भर दिए गए। एक व्यस्त चौराहे पर लगी झाड़ी, जिसे दृष्टि बाधित करने वाला माना जा रहा था, उसे काट दिया गया, जिससे मालिक नाराज हो गया। ह्यूरन नदी के किनारे पड़ा कचरा भी उठा लिया गया। गिरोह के सदस्य गुमनाम किशोर हैं जो किसी भी तरह की प
연료 잔량은 74
Aquarius, Houston. Di
Ok, Charlie. Non è molto aperto. È difficile darti una buona lettura senza deviarla di nuovo, ma la freccia è circa a ore 1. Ora riduco il flusso e la lascio stabilizzare qui. Al momento la nostra lettura a bordo è di circa 0,4, e questo con la freccia nella valvola dell'O2 a ore 2. Preferiresti avere confronti tra le lettu
एसोसिएटेड प्रेस के अनुसार, सिएटल (वाशिंगटन), पोर्टलैंड (ओरेगन), वैंकूवर (ब्रिटिश कोलंबिया) और सैन फ्रांसिस्को के पश्चिमी तट निवासी आज रात 9 बजे से आधी रात के बीच अपने-अपने इलाकों में रोशनी जलाकर आप तीनों को अपने-अपने क्षेत्र दिखाने की योजना बना रहे हैं। वहां मौसम साफ रहने का अनुमान है, इसलिए आप क्रिसमस की रोशनी, बरामदे की रोशनी, दुकानों की र
З
收到。记住，我们不会在那里玩得太开心，所以我们要监控CDU，如果我们把它弄丢了，就很难确定飞回哪里；而且，此外，我们还得在监控的同
हाँ, मुझे लगता है कि बर्निंग हो जाने के बाद, इसे रिचार्ज स्टेशन के ऊपर रखने के बजाय इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल के ऊपर रखना शायद सबसे अच्छा रहेगा। क्या आप इस बारे में कुछ कहना चाहें
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, ici Houston. Nous procédons
Ich sehe
好的
أبولو 11، هيوستن. وحدة القيادة تبدو سليمة بالنسبة
コロンビア、ヒューストン。コピーの準備ができたら、S
Okay. Ho letto VE
Bon, je vais devoi
テレメト
D'accord, Fred. Voici la procédure pour relever la température du réservoir de propergol de descente. Ce n'est pas un problème majeur, mais nos équipes indiquent que le bas de l'étage de descente est probablement en train de refroidir, et nous voulons simplement vérifier que le réservoir d'eau de descente ne ris
Bene. Abbiamo DISPLAY aperto; SE AUDIO chiuso; TRASMETTITORE VHF A aperto; RICEVITORE VHF B aperto; AMPLIFICATORE DI POTENZA a
은퇴까지 얼
I'm looking out now at Grus, and its stars are quite clear, even the small fourth and fifth order magnitude stars in the... This time of 
Roger, Frank. Bisher ist die Temperatur noch nicht wieder gesunken. Wir gehen aber davon aus, d
بصوت عال
Whang, whang, whang. - Oka
Apollo 8, hier s
Je dois allumer les
프레드, 화재 진압이 끝나면 전원 차단 지침이나 체크리스트 변경 사항을 알려드리겠습니다. 동시에 소모품 현황도 알려드리고 싶습니다. 지금으
Et, V
Cal Cap Com, Sigma 
我很乐意在那
هذه
حسنًا يا فريدو. سأقرأ لك خمسة أجزاء. الإجراء الذي سأقرأه لك هو فحص الشمس لمعرفة ما إذا كنا سنح
Das ist bestätigt, Jim. D
收到。请你复述一下我刚才告诉你的宇航服穹顶和进气口的温
Roger. H
로저. 프렌드
Je dormirai volon
إنها على ارتفاع حوالي 30 درجة. بدأت تظهر للتو. ساطعة وثابتة. لا أستطيع رؤيتها - أستطيع رؤية بعض النجوم الأخرى أسفل كوكب الزهرة. سأعود إلى بيانات نظام الإحداثيات ال
Roger, Gemini 4. Nous allons b
Das klingt nach einem wirklich guten Ort. Okay. Ich bin sicher, wir werden das noch et
Okay. Etwas anderes, das wir uns – vor dem Betreten des Gebäudes – ansehen werden, ist das normale Eingangstestmuster. Es ist derzeit in der Checkliste als etwas auf
Ce 
Bien reçu. En attente, je vous ferai un compte rendu. Je suis en orbite pour votre suivi. Voici le compte rendu: tous les fusibles sont en position 1, sauf celui de la tour de largage, en position 2. La rétroséquence d'urgence, le largage d'urgence et le parachute de secours sont en position centrale d'arrêt. Le dispositif anti-retour est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le système est normal (automatique et gyroscopique). Toutes les poignées en « T » sont en position « entrée ». Le délai de rétroséquence est normal. Les deux éclairages de cabine sont allumés. Les projecteurs photo sont toujours allumés. La télémétrie basse fréquence est activée. Les aides au sauvetage sont en mode automatique. Les lumières de la t
不，那根电线真的把我的手硌得生疼。我在想——如果我把它
OK. Préparez-vous à une expl
والي، أعطني قراءة عن مواق
Okay. Das war der letzte Punkt, den ich ausgelassen habe. Während wir hier auf die
水瓶座，休斯顿。收到。我们这边也很吵，请
Gemini VII, hier spricht Gemini VI. Wir haben ein Objekt, sieht aus wie ein Satellit, der von Norden nach Süden fliegt, wahrscheinlich in einer polaren Umlaufbahn. Er bewegt sich auf einer sehr flachen Flugbahn von Norden nach Süden und hat eine sehr hohe Stei
好的。我们的显示器之前出现了一些问题，我想现在已经解决了，但如果再次出现超出限制的情况，您可能需要
하지만 난 볼 수 없
CICL
D'accord, Vance. Et une autre petite différence que nous avons notée, c'est que le flux
分かりました。もう1点、詳細をお知らせします。先ほどもお伝えしたように、上昇時のSEP姿勢は平面内でしたが、JETT姿勢は通常のサービスモジュールSEP姿勢
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. У нас есть
人们总是问我们一个由来已久的问题，那就是如何处理液态废物。你现在看到的这条管线，我想你现在应该能看到了，它就通到我们打开舷外排水排放口的地方，我们所有的废物，液态废物，都通过这条管线排出到海
हमारे पास एस-6 की अच्छी खासी मात्रा है। हमें एस-5 के कुछ छिटपुट अवलोकन मिले हैं... तस्वीरें भी, लेकिन हमें कम से कम संयुक्त राज्य 
Nous avons payé
收到。你可能不用打开它。我刚才告诉你的位置在西陨石坑西边一点。我估计大概在它西边0.2公里左右，我们想知道尼尔或巴兹在下降、
Ok, di nuovo, guardando attraverso il telescopio, 
好了，我们来了。进场点：中太平洋，000153；000。接下来的两行是月落时间和月相检查姿态；，178；NOUN 61，减去 21.66，减去；00:28。接下来的四行不适用；DO 为 4.00，02:04；00:17，03:22，08:14；33，353.1，29.9。视轴星为天秤座 σ，向下 08.8，向左 0.4；升力矢量向上。进场对准星为 31 和 23。横
Oh, non pr
Okay. CBS - 
Negative. Frien
Okay. At, delete the sightings you're shoving there; and at 45 minutes - correction,, add one addition
Die Lagereg
Ho
Roger. Sag mir Bescheid, wenn du zum Kopieren bereit bis
आगे 
Понял. Подождите. Вам гораздо лучше использовать нисходящий канал 
了解しました、ジェミニ4号。
没错。吉姆，另外，我们大致估算了一下飞行时间，大约是67+40分钟，也就是大约2小时。我们会尽快给你一份修改后的
Gut. 
わかった、よかった。なあ、カナリア諸島を越え
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티입니다. 판독 결
289도. 상황이 별로 좋아 보이
And lastly, we would like to know if your stowage configuration for entry is going to conform to the nominal. The RETRO's down here are anxious to get an accurate e.g. computed for you, and in particular, w
我们清楚地收到了你关于高增益的指示，从我们的角度来看，你的
好的。在入口检查清单 E-7 页的第 34 步中，只要面板 382 打开，就可以方便地将蒸发器水控制（包括主蒸发器和副蒸发器）设置为 AU
ठीक है। अब हम बैग के साथ काम शुरू कर रहे हैं, और अगला कदम है लाल सूट की नली (या तो कमांडर की या एलएमपी की, क्योंकि हम चाहेंगे कि आपके पास अंततः ये दोनों हों) को बैग के ऊपरी हिस्से में रखना। इसके लिए, सबसे पहले आपको यह सुनिश्चित करना होगा कि लाल नली नीली नली से अलग हो। मुझे नहीं पता कि यह पहले से किया गया है या नहीं, लेकिन अगर नहीं किया गया है, तो आपको नली की बाहरी बीटा-कपड़े की
好的，比尔，我们的BIOMED数据看起来还是有点问题。你检查一下BIOMED线束上的蓝色
로저, 아폴로 8
حسنًا. لقد أكملنا عملية التفريغ، وجهاز التسجيل الصوتي أصبح ملكك، واستمعنا إلى تشغيل الصوت لبيانات المكالمة، وقد 
M
روجر. مايك، يمكنك المضي قدماً والحصول عل
分かりました。話
此时舱内氧分压约为 3.9 至 4
Je me dis
...звезд в... 178, это довольно неп
Apollo 11, Houston. Basierend auf unseren Beobachtungen seit der Mittellinie zeigen wir einen Gammawert von -6,57 an. Dies ist jedoch vorläufig, und wir gehen davon aus, dass sich die Position nach weiterer Beobachtung stabilisieren wird und wir sie präzise in den Korridor einfädeln können. Sie befindet sich etwa in der Mitte des Korridors; alles sieht gut aus. Wir werden Ihnen in ein paar Stunden, bevor Sie schlafen gehen, die Eintrittsinformationen (PAD) zukommen lassen. Und von unseren Kollegen aus der Öffentlichkeitsarbeit gibt es neben Ihrem Flug noch ein paar weitere Schlagzeilen. Sie dominieren weiterhin die Nachrichten. Es gibt jedoch noch einige andere interessante Dinge für Sie. Wie ich bereits erwähnt habe, wurde das All-Star-Spiel wegen Regens abgesagt. Es wird morgen stattfinden. Präsident Nixon wird es jedoch nicht wie geplant besuchen können. Wir halten Sie über die Ergebnisse auf dem Laufenden. Und auch die Wettervorhersage ist gut für Sie. Unsere Prognose sieht gut aus für das Bergungsgebiet; es sollte dort draußen sehr schön sein. Präsident Nixon, der sich auf den Flug zur Begrüßung Ihrer Rück
Gemini 4. Если индикатор неисправности не сбрасывается с первого
阿
Good. They're both conked out; how about just filling me in on some news, and I'll keep quiet just to give me some words 
よし、ヒューストン、先に行け。飛行機が到着
是的，没错。好的，弗雷
罗杰。我检查了胸前中间那三颗螺丝钉，看起来都挺紧的。我再把
好的，考虑得很周全。我们一直在仔细考虑允许您进行哪些操作来拍摄维修舱。我们目前认为这项工作优先级较低；虽
Да. Примерно так. Резкого изменения силы сопротивления не было. А ещё я заметил, когда снял кусочек, что материал был довольно пл
Good morning, Frank. Apollo 8, this is Houston. We're wondering about your backup align; we'd like your opinion on the 
अरे, अगर आप 250 का इस्तेमाल करना चाहते हैं? उसमें त्सिओलकोव्स्की की 
Okay. We're ready to give you the procedure which will power you down a good bit, and after the is going, maybe we can give you further information, are you ready to copy? Starting at the middle 
Houston, Apollo 11. We'
I've got some times for you. Got a pencil and
コロンビア、次回の通過では、そのよう
And,
Bella fot
روجر، لدينا رسالة واحدة لك. ير
ناقص 00014، زائد جميع الأصفار، زائد 00001 000 304 000، غير قابل للتطبيق، زائد 00191 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225 شاولا، أعلى 236 000، زائد 0813، ناقص 16503 12202 36301، سيريوس، ريجل، 308 209 357، و22.2
In Zeile 2, FLIGHT DISPLAYS, öffnen Sie THRUST, öff
ア
D'accord. Si vous avez t
休斯顿，阿波罗1
Апо
杰瑞，顺便提一下，有很多看起来很小的新陨石坑，它们都散发出一些白色
«Аполлон-8», мы хотели бы еще раз скопировать данные с вашей ленты, если вы ею не пользуетесь. Причина в том, что у нас остались не полностью скопированные данные перед записью. Мы хотели бы получить 
Roge
Панель 3: ВЫКЛЮЧИТЕ УСИЛИТЕЛЬ МОЩНОСТ
アポロ PAD が続きます。TIG 125 19 3470、TIG 126 57 0000、0532、すべて
Вот он. Мы его
ठीक है। "
For
わかりました。最初の星は26番星です。2セットの測定を行います。地球の地平線に近い位置で、26番星を使って測定します。次に、地球の地平線に近い位置で、
现在，如果我们能让我们的状态向量达成
جيميني 4، هيوستن CAP COM. شغّل مفتاح قراءة الكمية واتركه مُشغّلاً حتى أقول لك. انتهى
Okay, Jim. Wir haben eine Empfehlung für die Kommunikationsabteilung, die hoffentlich Energie spart, indem sie den Leistungsverstärker abschaltet – vorausgesetzt, sie funktioniert. Ich möchte Ihnen die einzelnen Schritte kurz vorlesen und Sie bitten, kurz darüber nachzudenken. Wir empfehlen, dies vor dem ersten Giermanöver auszuprobieren
Dans quelle direction ça bouge, vous pouvez le
Роджер. Понятно. Возможно, вам придётся подождать ещё несколько минут, прежде чем это вступит в силу. Вы на шестом
Je va
Улыбнит
Je me sen
And it appears t
Gemini 4, это связь с диспетчерской вышкой Хьюстона. Я вас не принимаю. Я передам п
준비되셨군요. 9번 구역-브라보. GET RC, 13:19:36; 400K는 20 + 25; 리버스 뱅크는 26 + 13; 모든 업데이트의 뱅크 각도는 모두 90도입니다: GET RC, 14:17:05; 400K, 20 + 32; 리버스 뱅크, 25 + 54. 11-2: GET RC, 52:02; 400K, 20 + 11; 리버스 뱅크, 25 + 40. 12-2 GET RC, 17:25:40; 400K, 20 + 03; 리버스 뱅크, 25 + 35; 13-2 구역: GET RC, 
रॉजर। क्या आप अपने ओम्स बर्न के
Роджер. Мое состояние хорошее; уровень топлива 51% и 69%; кислород 84% и 100%; давление в кабине держится хорошо. Все системы постоянного и переменного тока работают исправно. Единственное, что я хотел бы сообщить относительно плана полета, это то, что уровень топлива ниже ожидаемого. Сейчас я использую режим автоматического управления (ASCS). Я потратил дополнительное топливо, пытаясь сориентироваться после ночной стороны. Думаю, это из-за противоречивых требований плана полета. Мне
여기 있는 사람들도 모두 
わかりました。電力6。わかりました。電力6はパネル11を指します。私が呼び出したブレーカーを除いて、チャートのとおりに進んでください。1行目は問題ありません。つまり、1行目です。2行目、QUAD 4、TCA、閉。QUAD 3、TCA、閉。QUAD 2、TCA、閉。QUAD 1、TCA、閉。その行の残りの部分は問題ありません。行3、ちょうど半分くらいのところ、ATCA（PGNS）が閉。わかりました。その行の残りの部分は問題ありません。4行目、HEATER - スタンバイ。わかりました。その行は、最後の3つの回路ブレーカー、Fred、つまりSTANDBY、OPERATEを除いてすべて問題ありません。これら3つは、少なくとも当分の間は閉じている必要があります。最後に、5行目は、このままで問題ありません。これについ
Роджер, я всё понял. Я всё это записал. Не могли бы вы измерить нам да
ه
एक्वेरियस, ओम्नी एंटेना को प्रबंधित करने के लिए एक सुझाव। अगर हम अपलिंक स्क्वेल्च को बंद क
Ok, Charlie. Non è molto aperto. È difficile darti una buona lettura senza deviarla di nuovo, ma la freccia è circa a ore 1. Ora riduco il flusso e la lascio stabilizzare qui. Al momento la nostra lettura a bordo è di circa 0,4, e questo con la freccia nella valvola dell'O2 a ore 2. Preferiresti avere confronti tra le letture del flusso di O2 o tra le posizioni dell
बर्न 2 17 59 का GET; डेल्टा-V,
Me revoilà près de la Croix du Sud, avec cette zone tachetée de lumière… je suppose qu'il y a beaucoup d'étoiles très brillantes. Je ne me souviens pas avoir vu exactement le même spectacle au planétarium. Alpha Centauri et Beta sont très nettes. Il est encore temps – la lumière commence à se faire plus claire et je peux encore distingue
رو
ところで、それで質問なんですが、プローブとドローグはどこに収納する予定なんですか？ 一つの可能​​性として、LMPが通常取り付けられている場所、IS-erの下あたりに収納するというのを思いつきました。もっといいアイデ
ठीक है। हमें समझ आ गया
Чарли, это примерно 30 градусов поворота от закрытого положения, то есть когда стрелка указывает примерно на три-три тридцать, ч
بمجرد أن أضبط رمية النرد، لا أعتقد أن الأمر سيكون 
Apollo 8, Houston. Bereit für die Übergabe von Carnarvon nac
Ricevuto. Br
Nein, das habe ich nicht. Es klang, als ob du ein Echo hör
Ricevuto. È in lavor
还有，Aquarius，休斯顿。方便的话
은퇴까지 얼마나 걸리나
ロジャー、13-BRAVO。 146、03+32。 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 27 11. 56 46. 3+17, 8+36. 14-ブラボー: 04+07、09+03。 15-ブラボー: 121、02+34、14 10 30、8+35、16-ブラボー: 096、02+03、15 50 26. 11+28。 158、3+48、16 28 28、2+39、08+22。 17-ブラボー: 087、01+
11号，休斯顿。目前的天气预报显示，您的灾后重建区域天气状况良好：2000英尺高度有零星云层，高空有零星云层，风向070度，风速13节，能见度10英里，海况约4英尺。昨天的预报显示，热带风暴克劳迪娅位于夏威夷以东约500至1000英里处。昨天下午地球卫星拍摄的图像显示，克劳迪娅正在消散，因此它的影响似乎比之前更小了。目前，您的灾后重建区域被认为位于热带辐合带以北不远处，您从窗户往外看应该就能看到。昨天还有报道称，更西边的地方出现了热带风暴维奥拉。它目前位于菲律宾以东约1000英里处，正向西北方向移动。热带风暴维奥拉一直在增强，预计将在未来12小时左右升级为台风；但是，届时它将位于您西部很远的地方。事实上，日出晨昏线尚未到达维奥拉。几个小时后，当它到达时，您应该能从您的视角轻松辨认出来。或许您可以拍些照片。几个小时后，当您有机会看到维奥拉时，请发表您的评
フ
Va bene. "Finché / DEL
यह "5" पर प्रसारित होने वाले ज़ोडियाकल लाइट एक्सपेरिमेंट से संबंधित है, और वे यह पता लगाना चाहते हैं कि क्या एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल थ्रस्टर्स से फिल्म पर कोई धुंध छाएगी। हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपने 35-mm कॉन्टारेक्स कैमरे का उपयोग करें, और आप ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट या कलर फिल्म का उपयोग कर सकते हैं। कृपया अपर्चर को f/18 पर वाइड अपर्चर पर
Okay. Für den mittleren Pazifik sind die Bedingungen im Allgemeinen gut. Sie können mit einer Wolkenuntergrenze von 2000 Fuß (aufgelockert), einer Sichtweite von 10 Meilen, Wind aus 070° mit 12 Knoten, Wellenhöhen von 4 Fuß und einem Höhenmesser von 2974 rechnen. Sonnenaufgang ist um 10:00 Uhr UTC, erste Dämmerung um 16:49 Uhr UTC. Das Raumschiff ist die Yorktown; die Flugzeuge sind Airboss 1 und 2 sowie Recoveries 1, 2 und 3. Die geschätzte Zeit bis zum Eintreffen des Raumschiffs beträgt 15 Minuten. Die Yorktown befindet sich am Zielpunkt, die Airboss-Flugzeuge sind vor Ort. Die Recoveries 1, 2 und 3 sind SH3 Alfas und begleiten die Yorktown, befinden sich also ebenfalls am Zielpunkt. Alle haben Rettungsschwimmer an Bord. Falls die Bergungsflugzeuge keinen Kontakt zum Raumschiff herstellen können; Sie werden die Schwimmer ins Wasser lassen, und wenn Sie in guter Verfassung sind und sie anrufen, dann werden sie mit dem Absetzen der Sc
ठीक है, जैक, लिथियम
目前还没有
好的……再往上一
Хорошо. Понял. Мой единственный вопрос, Джо, заключается в том, что стрелки крена и рыскания не обнулились при выпо
أ
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। सामान्य एस-बैंड पर आपकी आवाज साफ सु
双子座 VI，卡那封 C
نعم، من فضلك. إذا كان
Отлично. Вы готовы к ретроспективному анализу 3C (времени) в рамках зоны восстановления после ч
Wir können den Booster nicht seh
Roger. Vérifie rapidement ASCS pour voir si le m
يا إلهي، يا جاك. أنت - أنت لا تستخدم جهازًا جيدًا... فقط إذا كنت ستذهب... إلى مرجع وضعك لـ... وجهاز قياس التسارع الاحتياطي. لأنه، في الحقيقة، يمكنك تقريبًا...
Близнецы, это Хирург. Мы получили точные из
Aurora Seven. Qui è Ca
Okay. Don't let them wait too long. I want to get rescued in a hurry. Te
Roger. Jim, man sagt, dass sie die richtige O2-Konzentration sicherstellen wollen, wenn man die Oberfläche erreicht, und dies ist eine Methode, um das zu erreichen, indem zusätzlicher Sticks
Press
わかりました。これらの数値は妥当なようですので、引き続き確認していきます。当社のRAD OUTは約0.43ですが、あなたの酸素値は0.48です。引き続き曲線
Хорошо. Я сейчас пер
Du machst das gut
Сканер Gemin
不。上面提到的免费步骤是命令模块
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi, poco prima delle 5 ore circa, o verso, vi vorremo in assetto per un allineamento dell'asse corporeo, usando il terminatore terrestre come abbiamo fatto prima; E non appena lo avremo, eseguiremo -7, che ora equivale a circa 60 cm al secondo, ovvero circa 15 secondi. E mi è stato detto che ora è sceso a 35 cm, quindi è comodamente entro i limiti. Bene. Quando lo faremo, inizieremo immediatamente la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio del modulo di servizio, che sarà in piano, dato che lo sganciamo prima del solito. Non abbiamo bisogno, e non vogliamo, della componente fuori piano. Quindi sarà in piano, con il modulo di servizio puntato di nuovo verso l'esterno lungo il raggio vettore. Inizieremo quindi a preparare il modulo di comando per il SEP del modulo di servizio, in
Ich sehe nirgends ein ge
Houston, Apollo 11. Abbiamo completato la nostra manovra per osservare l'
깃발 잠금장치는 종합 점검을 마쳤습니다. *** 잠금장치
Пр
아폴로 8호, 현재 데이터가 끊겼습
И 11, Хьюстон. У нас к вам просьба. Что касается клапан
Bracciale a 
Also, James, wenn du nicht besser auf ein Raumschiff aufpassen kannst, bekomms
D'accord. Housto
Nein, ich glaube nicht, dass das stimmt. Mein Visier war offen; jetzt ist es geschlossen. Ich kann mir nicht vorstellen,
Roger. Com
This is Frank Borman. We've enjoyed the television shows, and we'd like you to stay tuned in in the future because there'll be flights and rendezvous and earth orbit, and then, of course, there'll be television from the lunar surface itself in the not too far distant future. So, until then, I g
好的。还有一个问题。如果能听听杰克的意见，看看他觉得主B总线是否正常，那就太好了。如果他知道主B总线是否正常，这将对我们未来的步骤产生影响；例如，我们可能需要测试一下主B总线是否真的正常，这样我们才能知
好的。我们现在在第 12、13 页，步骤 4，验证下降的反馈 - 灰色，它们是理发店的
Roger. A brev
罗杰。R1 现在是 0538，我们有一笔货要运给你
Roger,
D'accord. Je vais
你
الآن، لا تخرج م
How did all our systems look on
ठीक है। फ्रेड, 
ठीक है। और अब आप हमारे रवैये पर चर्चा करने के लिए लग
Houston, Eagle. Are you copying the fairly large numbers for range and r
フレッド、そこに戻ったら、REPRESS パッケ
收到，鹰队。这里是休斯顿。我们收到您的呼叫。
예, 알겠습니다. 이 비행기 정말 마음에 듭니다. 자동 모드, 후방 기수, 자이로스코프 정상, 기동 해제, 모든 시스템 정상 작동 중입니다. 아시다시피 우주복 회로도 완벽하게 제어하고 있고, 존 글렌에게 보고할 만한 훌륭한 결과도 얻었습니다. 반
В
Odyssey, H
네. 좋
아폴로
Okay. I'm on panel 9. Ready to receive. You want me to transmit for some reason w
جميع الأوضاع تعمل بشكل ممتاز. درجة حرارة قبة بدلة الطيران حوالي 72 درجة، ودرجة حرارة مدخل البدلة حوالي 63 درجة، وهي تنخفض قليلاً. بالتأكيد هذا هو الإعداد الأمثل للطيران لهذه 
Хорошо. Вы хотите, чтобы время срабатывания тормозного устройства и
उन्होंने फिर से पानी में
프
Nous allons placer le sextant dans l
Roger, 11. Zu Ihrer Frage bezüglich d
Давай, Хьюстон. Апол
페리신
OK. +35 PAD: le DELTA-VT devrait être 7992 au lieu de 8016. +44: il devrait être 6112 au lieu de 6141. Et +53:
حسنًا. لقد درسنا جميع الاحتمالات الممكنة هنا. أسوأ سيناريو توصلنا إليه هو خطأ مسافة الخطأ 3 سيجما - أي 70 ميلًا بحريًا. هذا صحيح.
Voyons voir. À Springfield, dans le Missouri, Mickey Owen, l'ancien receveur des Dodgers de Brooklyn, entré dans l'histoire en laissant échapper une troisième prise qui a permis aux Yankees de New York de remporter la victoire contre les Dodgers lors des Séries mondiales de 1941, a décidé de laisser une trace indélébile dans les mémoires, au-delà de ses exploits sportifs. Quarante-cinq garçons et filles ont reçu un poney grâce à son geste généreux. Ces jeunes étaient invités à lui écrire pour lui expliquer comment ils prendraient soin d'un poney. Face à l'afflux de lettres, il a ajouté cinq poneys aux vingt qu'il avait déjà offerts; d'autres donateurs ont également contribué à en offrir vingt autres. « Je pensais recevoir une quarantaine de lettres, mais j'en ai finalement reçu près de 900 », a déclaré Mickey Owen. Passons maintenant à la une: à Wellington, en Nouvelle-Zélande, une cinquantaine d'hommes ont dégusté aujourd'hui
罗杰。燃烧按时完成，我们已经
阿姆斯特朗说那是舱口——如果我们把探测器和减速伞留在那里，明天就能节省一些时间；我不知道在那儿睡觉是否舒适。我想之前的宇航员们一直在做的，是把那些乱七八糟的东西重新
Andiamo verso il fly-by-wire
Хорошо. У вас три, оцените 2? Хорошо, приступим к финаль
روجر. حالتي جيدة؛ حالة الكبسولة جيدة؛ وضع التحكم تلقائي؛ الجيروسكوبات طبيعية؛ المناورة معطلة. وقود التحكم ٥١٪ و٦٩٪؛ الأكسجين ٨٢٪ و١٠٠٪. هذا كل شيء تقريبًا، إلا أنني لم أتمكن حتى الآن من خفض درجة حرارة فتحة بخار البدلة إلى أقل من ٧٠ درجة. صمام التحكم في البخار، أو صمام التحكم في الماء، مضبوط حاليًا على ٤ عند علامة ما قبل الإطلاق. قد تكون درجة الحرارة مرتفعة جدًا. سأقوم بإيقافه الآن وأضبطه على ٣
わかりました。025:00、5119、マイナス165、071:08、035:00、7733、マイナス165、070:36、045:00
...지금은 외출 중입니다
好的，杰克。我们得再复习一遍。我们会把地球放在窗前；我们会把地球放在中心，嗯，地球的中心现在与X轴平行，而X轴又大致与我
Apollo 11, this is Houston. That's affirmative on the downvoice backup. We'd like you to confirm your 
Bonjour Zanzibar, ici Sigma Seven. Comment 
Ap
로저. 수평선 너머로 당신이 나타나는 것을 봤는데, 레
로저, 알. 저는 자동 모드, 역추진 모드입니다. 자이로 스위치는 정상이고, 기동 모드는 꺼져 있습니다. 캡슐은 두
Roger. Ja, es war auf der hellen Seite. Die Erde war etwa zu zwei Dritteln beleuchtet, wobei der Terminator Richtung Horizont zeigte. Und nun kam das Sonnenlicht vom gegenüberliegenden Erdrand, dem Sonnenrand, etwa ein Viertel b
Êtes-vous prêt pour le passage des
Roger. Your orbit is changed to 87, 147. You're GO for a nominal M equals 4. Ther
注意してください、私の O2 圧力は 960 を少し超えたところで維持されています。コマンド パ
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है, मैं वापस जाकर नंबर 2 रोल 
バズ、こちらヒュースト
我们显示您的自动挡还剩大约 68% 的
OAMS 연소 시간이 완전히
Roger. Ho alcune informazioni per te su questo argomento che approfondiremo subito dopo il prossimo esercizio. Vorremmo che que
ジェミニ8号機、こちらヒューストン。デルタPランプが点灯しています。GT-7では珍しくありませんでしたが、GT-8では点灯しないはずです。クロスオーバーは点灯して
Okay. That's the first clear word we heard from you, Jack. Do you think it could be my
Roger. Das klingt nach einem guten Pl
سيتم إيقاف تشغيل MSC-2 و MSC-3 في الساعة 04:19:40. أخشى أنني كنت أر
At least, we can forget them until the d
Roger, c'est exact, Fred-o. Nous allons maintenant vous configurer pour la transmi
Roger. Und das Wetter im Erholungsgebiet sie
Roger. 
Roger. Continuing with the Maroon Bugle. President Nixon surprised your wives with a phone call from San Francisco just before he boarded a plane to fly out to meet you. All of them were very touched by your television broadcast. Jan and Pat watched from Mission Control here. The launch of Intelsat from the Cape was postponed for the fourth time last night. The problem was said to be a malfunctioning nitrogen regulator in the second stage of Delta. A new attempt will be made to launch it tonight. The research submarine Ben Franklin, which is studying the Gulf Stream, set a record by drifting 24 hours from 10 to 100 feet above the ocean floor in 1300 feet of water off the Georgia coast. The mission is led by Jacques Picard. Wally Schirra has been elected to a 5 year term on the board of trustees of the Detroit Institute of Technology. He will serve on the Institute's development committee. Air Canada says it has accepted 2300 reservations for flights to the Moon in the past 5 days. It might be noted that more than 100 have been made by men for their mothers in law. And finally, it appears that rather than 
Wir haben da ein paar ziemlich aufregende Moment
Хорошо.
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे ट्रां
Roger. And got a couple of items that I would like to clean up. We will get you an budget. We've got one redline now; we are trying to get some firmer numbers for you, and we will have those in a little bit. Right now your usage is right on the flight plan line, so everything looks pretty good there. We want to get a crew status report from you. We would like to firm up the 2 flight plan idea; and sometime at your convenience, we would like to take a reading of the for the commander and CMP and then have you swap them. We are trying to isolate the - what the possib
Roger. J'imagine que vous avez probablement environ neuf CAP COMMS et onze directeurs de vol sans possibilité de 
حسنًا، ونحن نسجل وقت إتمام ذلك. لديك قائمتان، الأولى لنقل المعدات والثانية عكس ذلك. نرجو منك 
爱德华，你别代表我说话。好了，我现在快要达到平飞状态了。1、2、3、4
Ja. Ihre Fluglage in 400 km Höhe sollte – optimal – 27° Nasenwinkel über dem Horizont betragen. U
Okay. While we are verifying that scroll position - they are talking it over in the back room about that now - I would like to go ahead and run down the chec
대기하세요. 휴스턴 이글입니다. 불길이 
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نرجو منكم الآ
لديّ ماكينة لحام TIG إذا أردتم 
D'accord, Fred. On vous reçoit parfaitement. Bien. On prépare 
Bon, le déversement de LOX devrait avoir lieu vers - je suppose que ça fera environ 1h
Okay.
알겠습니다. 7단계. 회로 차단기 패널 11, AC 버스 B
Ok, ci stiamo lavorando, Acquario. Siamo pronti a pro
تريد منه أن ينت
Controllo dei volt CC in questo momento. Bus principale 24, bus isolato 27½ (volt), uno è 25 (volt). Due è 25 (volt). Tre è 25 (volt). Il primo di riserva è 25 (volt), il secondo di riserva è 25, l'isolato è 28 (volt). Torniamo al principale. Sia le ventole che 
Ripeti
يا إلهي، لو أخذت إجازة 120
حسنًا، فهمتُ أنهم جميعًا مش
Ce vieux cœur
그런 다음 체크
알겠습니다. 입력 패드는 다음과 같습니다: Mid-PAC, 000152, 000;, 178; 
Roger, ça va se produire
Нам нужно
मेरी खिड़की पर लगभग 3
Das ist richtig. Ich h
Okay. I've got a couple of things we need from you. I would like to get a battery C voltage. I would
Okay. Auf Panel 5 sollen die Leistungsschalter 1 und 2 (CB POWER 1 und
かな
Je crois que nous y so
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。少し前にクライオの圧力が低下したようです。クライオ
Приве
بدأ الظلام يخيّم. دعني أرى. تواصل مع موشيا في وقت ما. أوه، انظر إلى تلك الشمس
S
你好，加州通信技术学
Retro Power, SICURO. OAMS Power, 
Columbia. This is Houston. Grid coordinates: K
ठीक है। इंग्लैंड के जोड्रेल बैंक से, एपी के माध्यम से: ब्रिटेन की विशाल जोड्रेल बैंक रेडियो दूरबीन ने आज सुबह 5:49 पूर्वी मानक समय (ईएसटी) पर सोवियत संघ के मानवरहित चंद्र प्रक्षेपण से संकेत प्राप्त करना बंद कर दिया। एक प्रवक्ता ने कहा कि ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि लूना 15 अंतरिक्ष यान "चंद्रमा से आगे निकल गया है।" एक अन्य बयान: वेधशाला के निदेशक सर बर्नार्ड लवेल के प्रवक्ता ने कहा, "हमें नहीं लगता कि यह उतरा है।" वाशिंगटन यूपीआई: उपराष्ट्रपति स्पिरो टी. एग्न्यू ने वर्ष 2000 तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेजने का आह्वान किया है, लेकिन डेमोक्रेटिक नेताओं ने जवाब दिया कि पृथ्वी पर जरूरतों को प्राथमिकता दी जानी चाहिए। बुधवार को अपोलो 11 
Roger, lo 
솔직히 말
看起来云层有好几层。一层很高的卷云……一层稍低的卷云……拍几张不同高度的云的照片。看起来我们这里有一层很高的卷云，下
了解。まだ約80フィート（約24メー
Ho scattato una foto S-5 di una formazione nuvolosa sul Pacifico che si stava avvicinando all'area di Coastal Sentry Q
- - 2 ist im Bahn
Okay. On step 34 under final stowage, which is a sort of catch-all area, there's a step that says secondary glycol to radiato
Ich sag's euch, mit diesen neuen Knöpfen lässt sich das Ding ganz einfach
로저. 상황 보고입니다. 혈액 샘플을 보내드렸습니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동하지만
そうです。コックピットでは本当に有利ですね。ちょっと暗いですね。絞りを1段階下げると良いかもしれません
Билл, не могли бы вы повторить это еще раз? Мы не будем читать вам вслух, и не могли бы вы еще 
好的。没问题。之前是高水位水箱的情况，显然在等待压力开关闭合启动加热循环的过程中，1号水箱的压力又
Мне по
了
حس
Alle
هناك أنو
حسنًا يا هيوستن. لدينا علامات الشمس وسأبدأ الآن بالصعود إلى مستوى ال
Quando saremo qui nella zona libera, quando saremo decisam
Okay. Mit einer kleinen Änderung wären es dann etwa 77 Stunden, und das ist die Dunkelphase. Der Kommandant und der CMP sollten gegen 68 bis 69
Okay. While we are verifying that scroll position - they are talking it over in the back room about that now - I would like to go ahead and run down the checklist with you 
Sto scattando le fotografie dell'S-6 
そして、アポロ13号、ヒューストン。Sバンドとアンテ
Хорошо. Джек включил автоматические выключатели 250 для батарей A и B. Он замерил напряжение на шине батарей: 32,3 В на A и 37,0 В на B. Затем он включил выключатели 275, соединяющие батареи с основными шинами. В этой конфигурации напряжение на 
ロジャー、イーグル。ショート
रॉजर। यहाँ सब ठीक लग रहा है। हमारे पा
Kano
हमने इसकी जाँच शुरू
로저. 가운데 짐벌을 보고 있습니다. 롤은 27
飛行計画の変更。今革命期、カーナボンにてコマンドパイロッ
عفواً! قائم
電話
Notre écran offre une image très nette et de bonne qualité sous cet angle. J'ai déjà trouvé le
And have you got some plan in vectors for us, Jac
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. TV 방송 요청을 다시 한번 시도해
حسنًا. اللوحة 3: شحن البطارية، مُطفأ - لقد فعلت ذلك بالفعل يا جاك - التالي: مُحوّل التيار المتردد، اللوحة 5: توصيل ناقل التيار الرئيسي بين البطارية B/C والبطارية B/C. ها؟ نعم، إنه في الوضع 
Bene, quello che stavamo pensando di fare era far bollire un po' l'evaporatore secondario per controllarlo, solo per controllare i componen
Роджер, содержание первичного кислорода составляет 62 [процента], втор
Ich fliege einfach los, und wenn wir bei 30 angekommen sind, gibst du mir eine Markierung, wenn wir 30 Minu
That's right, Jack. What I'm going to do is - We'll stop with the Earth in the commander's window, the down, and then I'm going to maneuver the spacecraft so that I have the lighted portion o
Sì. Sembra che sia successo nel momento in cui ho dato la spinta più X, e a quanto pare non era centrato, perché in un modo o nell'altro sono uscito accidentalmente in assetto e poi il sistema di mantenimento dell'assetto ha iniziato a funziona
いいえ、私たちはここで少し転がります - ええと、ブート ヒルがここに近づいてく
रॉजर। क्या आपके पास उड़ान योजना के पृष
रॉजर। क्या तुमने मेरा पिछला संदेश पढ़ा? ह्यूस्टन तुम्हें गुआयमास के ऊपर अंतरिक्ष यान से बाहर निकलने के लिए
제미니 4호입니다. 우리는 
- - ち
——这是肯定的。——对于平台发布前的月球视角
Roger. Now concerning your restart that happened in lunar orbit, for the peace of mind of the computer people and the MIT folks, we have a qu
Ok. Devo solo cambiare gli OMNI. Ok. Leggendo le modifiche, Joe, alle pagine 1-4, RISCALDATORI A CELLE A COMBUSTIBILE tre, SPENTO, in discesa verso FUEL CELL 1 BUS PRINCIPALE A centro - BUS PRINCIPALE A su SPENTO; BUS PRINCIPALE - FUEL CELL 2 su BUS PRINCIPALE A, SPENTO; FUEL CELL 3 su BUS PRINCIPALE A, talkback, grigio; RESET BUS PRINCIPALE A su SPENTO; FUEL CELL, 1 su BUS PRINCIPALE B talkback, grigio;
GOSS 
0,01, d'accord. - Zut, 
好的，但我觉得只要我们回去就行了。好的——平台——速
रॉजर, 11. हम भी यही समझ रहे हैं। 
Okay. And, Jack, find out about using to maneuver 
هذ
ロジャー、再突入 C バンド ビーコンを CON
Er wird bei dir
还有 J
嘿，查理，我能看到加州山上的积雪，看来洛杉矶
Se
Nous 
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on your own, that's the place we'd like to break off and let you go ahe
Okay. Verstanden. D
That other aviator that's going around the world, Max Conrad with his light plane - he spent Christmas day in the Antarctics - at Puento Aranes in Chili; he's waiting for good weather so he can continue his flight down to the South Pole. He hopes to get around the world. He is going around both Poles, and he's going to fly from Palmer to Byrd, from Byrd to the South Pole, and th
متى سيخبرون
素晴らしい！さ
双子座VIII，休斯顿CAP COM。如果您有时间，请告诉我们您的
روجر. هيوستن، أبولو 8. أسمعك بوضوح. الخطة 24136 179 045 001 515 105196 35569 357 091 001؛ بالإضافة إلى 10، إلغاء الموقف
هذا آر كي ف
こちらシグマ・セブン。HFで。こちらシグマ・セブン。HFで。で短くカウントしています。これは、世界規模のHF通信範囲を確認するためです。送信時間は60秒間です。他に何を言えば時間をつぶせるか知りたいところですが。もっと激しく呼吸すれば、もっと効果があるかもしれません。カプセルは順調に動作しており、もうすぐ60秒が経過すると思います
Ещё одна проблема — Джек, сейчас я смотрю в правое окно, и там довольно темно, но здесь около тысячи ложных звёзд, оставшихся от обломков. Трудно отличить, что реально
I don't want to blind you, Wally, on this t
Das ist bestätigt. Oka
哥伦比亚，这里是休斯顿。纬度方面，加上 0.692，四
Scommetto che il filtro dei d
هذا هو تسجيل سيجما 7 على وضع VOX فقط. لقد أعدت تفعيل الوضع التلقائي في الوضع العادي بدون استخدام كامل للمحركات. الآن، لدي 85% تلقائي و90% يدوي. وأشعر، الآن وقد استعدت الوضع، أنني أستطيع إجراء بعض التجارب التي لم أكن أستطيع القيام بها من قبل. سأقوم الآن بخفض زاوية ميل الكبسولة باستخدام نظام التحكم الإلكت
Merci, monsieur
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। यहाँ
Роджер. Хорошо, Джим, мы решили, что у тебя осталось немного топлива, и мы можем поэксперимент
Роджер. Ваш режим работы двигателя GET: 02 18 25; Дельта-V, 50,6; Дельта-T, 1 плюс 08; рыскание 0, тангаж 0; Ядро 25, 00506; Ядра 26 и 27, все нули; двигатели в кормо
Роджер. Я стыковался в режиме AUTO, и, как я уже говорил, я не был уверен в моменте контакта. Я постоянно сверял показания стыковочного зонда. Я получил два сигнала, указывающих на то, что три защелки захвата — не защелки захвата, а именно три… защелки — сработали, и мы мягко пристыковались. И в тот момент ситуация выглядела очень стабильной. Поэтому я переключился в режим FREE, снова взглянул в окно, и ситуация по-прежнему выглядела стабильной; и я выстрелил из основного баллона №2. И в этот момент между двумя аппаратами началось вращение, я не уверен, из-за чего. Возможно, из-за тяги, или, возможно, оно нарастало раньше, и я этого не заметил. Но в любом случае, во время отвода зонда были отклонения по рысканию — мои отклонения по рысканию, я думаю, около 15 градусов, и мне
Роджер. Мы здесь, внизу, готовимся к проведению первой проверки связи. Мы будем проводить проверку OMNI COMM, кото
Okay. Step 7 follows: "Circuit breaker panel 11, AC BUS B, HELIUM PQGS PROPELLANT DISPLAY, CLOSED. Circuit breaker 11, AC BUS B, NUMERIC LIGHTING, CLOSED. Circuit breaker 11, AC BUS B, BUS TIE INVERTER 1, CLOSED. Circuit breaker panel 11, INVERTER 1, CLOSED. Circuit break
Va b
자, 아폴로
로저.
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Мы вас остановили в PTC; ваше поведение нам кажется хорошим. Майк, я хотел бы проверить связ
Роджер. Извините за спешку, но у нас тут произошла какая-то поломка, поэтому нам пришлось срочно сделать вам п
Okay. Mike, was passiert ist – du saßest da und hast alles überwacht, und in Schritt 7 bist du zu NOUN 01 gegangen, hast die Adresse eingegeben und dann INFORMATION INFORMATION; und mit dem letzten ENTER-Klick auf 35400 ENTER, direkt danach, wurdest du wieder in Schritt 16 zurückgesetzt. Als du dann ENTER gedrückt hast, hast du die Informationen tatsächlich in die CDU eingegeben; und als du die beiden Einträge in Register 1 und 2 hattest, gab es eine sofortige Änderung in der CDU, und das System hat das überprüft und gesehen, was es da gemessen hat. M
はい。それでは待機します。パワーアンプのスイ
Si vous êtes fatigué(e), je v
Roger. Merc
네, 휴스턴 여러분, 저희에게
프레드가 지금 광학 장치를 통해 살펴보고 있습니다. 이 장치는 우리 플랫폼의 정렬을 위한 장비인데, 프레드가 지금 이 장치를 통해 외부 모습을 어떻게 볼 수 있을지 확인하고 있는 
Roger. J'ai mangé… Je suis en train de manger. Deuxième repas du troisième jour. J'ai bu six gorgées d'eau. J'ai bien dormi quatre heures sur les cinq dernières heures, pendant mon cycle de so
D'a
Apollo 8, Houston. Jim, tu as complètement disparu. J'ai entendu Frank, mais o
좋아요. 이제 다시 돌아가서 가능하면 기상청 사진 몇 장 찍어 볼게요. 나머지 사진들은 가볍게 찍어 주세요. 저건 A 10이고, 11이 올라오고 있는데 왼쪽에 구름이 좀 있네요. 좋아요. 다시 플레이트를 끼우고 A에서 저장할게요. 플레이트를 다시 빼고, 찰칵. 좋아요
13, Houston. Ich habe es gerade korrigiert. Tatsächlich wird die Erde
Roger. Wir erreichen in etwa einer Minute die Reichweite des Flugzeugs. Diesmal versuchen sie, sowohl über S-Band als auch über VHF eine Verbindung herzustellen. Bitte stellen Sie daher sicher, dass die Lautstärke Ihres S-Band-Empfängers erhöht 
現時点ではすべてのシ
Roger. Abbiamo due ingranaggi che ruotano quando si tira la maniglia avanti e indietro. Uno di questi è l'ingranaggio che funge da cricchetto, un piccolo cilindro con un pistone e una punta dietro che innesta il cricchetto. E abbiamo avuto qualche problema con quello prima di aprirlo e dopo averlo aperto abbiamo avuto difficoltà a far funzionare il cricchetto. Inoltre, abbiamo avuto molta difficoltà a chiudere il portello abbastanza da poterlo anche solo agganciare. Poi, Ed ha dovuto spingere il cricchetto con la mano a ogni tentativo finché non siamo riusciti a farlo partire. E io continuavo a tirare finché non ho pensato che probabilmente avrei rotto un perno del portello. E finalmente ci siamo riusciti, e finalmente è venuto in avanti. Quindi non credo che dovremmo pi
Giusto. Okay. Poi, per le foto del modulo di comando, potrebbe essere un po' difficile vedere il modulo di servizio dal modulo di comando, ma se riuscite a vederlo, sarà attraverso la finestra 5, pensano quelli qui sotto. Consiglio il 70 millimetri. Queste foto hanno priorità 2. Quindi questo è un EL da 70 millimetri, con - a cui è collegato l'80 millimetri, e tutto questo è in B-3. Togliete l'obiettivo da 80 millimetri e coll
Okay. It sounds straightforward enough. Understand 
रॉजर। मैं आपको बताना चाहता था कि हम अभी भी फोन पर संपर्क में हैं, और आपके लिए सुबह की खबरें
Roger.
역화재까지 약 2분 남았습니다. UHF-hi 모드에서 송신 및 녹음 중입니다. 착륙 스위치 퓨즈를 제외한 모든 퓨즈 스위치
No, sta dormendo pr
नहीं, सिर्फ़ तटवर्ती इलाका ही धुंध से घिरा है। बाकी सब जगह मौसम साफ़ है (कैव यू) और दृश्यता असीमित है। अगर मुझे थोड़ा
不。我也不太明白二次发酵程度下降的原因，
مرحباً يا كناري. الصداقة السابعة. أستقبلكِ بصوت ع
— Nous sommes presque à court de pellicule couleur, donc nous pas
Sigma 
Um 01:45:30 Uhr habe ich das Kabinenwasserventil bzw. das Anzugwasserven
알았어, 잭. 내가 알려준 배터리 충전 절차로 돌아가. 충전을 종료하려면, 내가 알려준 회로 스위치 옆에 "열림" 또는 "꺼짐"이라고 적기만 하면 돼. 그러니까 250번 패널의 회로 차단기는 이미 열었고, 275번 패널의 인버터 전원-2 메인 B는 열림, 5번 패널의 배터리 릴레이 버스 배터리 A는 열림, 센서 유닛 AC 버스 2는 열림, 센서 신호 AC2는 열림, 배터리 충전기 메인 B는 열림, 배터리 충전기 AC 전원은 열림, 배터리 충전기 배터리 A 충전은 열림, 인버터 제어 2는 열림, 인버터 제어 3은 열림. 메인 버스 연결은 이미 했지. 그리고 BAT CHARGE 스위치를 AC 1
حسناً يا جو. افهم أن وضعية JETT ستكون مشابهة لوضعية التخلص العادي من وحدة الخدمة، والتي ستكون مرتفعة وخارج مستوى الطائرة، وبمجرد أن أنتهي من المناورة إلى وضعية JETT اليسرى، سأصعد بسرعة وأغلق الفتحة، مع التأكد من أن صمام التهوية مفتوح، ثم سنقوم بتهوية النف
Roger. Wir bekommen in Kürze eine Zeitung; wir werden Ihnen später weitere Neuigkeiten mitte
휴스턴
了解しました。今回の月への旅は、あなたにとっては単純で楽なものに見えたかもしれません。しかし、決してそうではありません。私たちを軌道に乗せたサターンVロケットは、信じられないほど複雑な機械であり、そのすべての部品が完璧に機能しました。私の頭上にあるこのコンピューターには3万8000語の語彙があり、その一つ一つが私たち乗組員にとって最も価値のあるものになるよう、非常に慎重に選ばれています。今私が手にしているこのスイッチは、司令船だけで300以上の機能を持っています。このスイッチはたった一つの設計です。それに加えて、無数の回路ブレーカー、レバー、ロッド、その他の関連制御装置があります。エンジン、つまりサービスモジュール後端にある大型ロケットエンジンは、完璧に機能しなければ、月周回軌道上に取り残されていたでしょう。私の頭上にあるパラシュートは、明日完璧に機能しなければ、海に墜落してしまうでしょう。私たちは、これらの機器がすべて正常に作動することを常に確信してきましたし、今後も飛行の残りの期間もその確信を持ち続けます。これ
नहीं, मैं तो बिल्कुल नहीं कर सकता, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि इसने हमारे - हमार
Интересно, где мы будем на 1:34. О, я знаю! Мы буд
- - all of our analysis is based on powerdown to 14 amps, but we're reading on you right now 12.3 and so we're better o
Roger, 10 16
Ещё 35 секунд, и мы выйдем из второго режи
Я нашла место, ко
Roger. Et prévenez-moi quand vous voudrez que je l'é
好的。16号断路器，功
D'accord. Nous allons donc accéder au module de service SEP attitude, puis effectuer un alignement grossier à quai,
حسنًا. هذا هو سيجما سفن، وهذا هو
Tranquility, Houston. Abbiamo ricevuto indicazioni che lo scambiatore di calore dell'elio del carburante di discesa si è congelato e che c'è del carburante intrappol
Roger. On a eu un petit incident. Ji
عرض جي
로저. 호라이즌 스캔 스러스터 점검은 카나
Eagle, Hou
- - À partir de 108:00 à gauche, tracez « Arrêter le taux ORB à l'attitude scientifique ORB ». À - Tracez dans la colonne de gauche la charge de « 10
Okay. Wir hatten einige Pro
— Toute notre analyse est basée sur une réduction de puissance à 14 ampères, mais nous 
로저. 검은색 필기 표시까
11, ह्यूस्टन। रेट्रो टीम जानना चाहती थी कि क्या आप हमें हमारे पास मौजूद किसी भी गैर-मानक सामान के बारे में जानकारी दे सकते हैं। उन्हे
روجر
حسناً. قم بتوجيه المركبة الفضائية إلى اليسار للحصول على رؤية جيدة للأرض ونافذة الالتقاء رقم 2. قد تحتاج إلى إمالة طفيفة أيضاً، ولكن في الأس
Fred, il y a peut-être une anomalie dans les données. Le taux est revenu 
В данный мо
피도,
좋아요, 10도를 복사했어요. 저게 지구예요, 아니면 달이
第11集，你们的观众很多。节目在美国现场直播，同时也会直播到日本、西欧和南美大部分地区。大家都说画面色彩非常鲜艳。感谢你们精彩的节
Bien. Un dernier point à préciser. Comme indiqué, l'attitude du SEP lors de la montée était dans le plan et l'attitude du JETT sera plus similaire à celle d'un module de service standard: vers 
Roger, Mike. Je vous rejoins avec le 130, P1 est 98 37 35, P2 98 42 44, à 6,4 km au 
但是，我们确实确定了埃尔帕索地区，而且在我们看来，那里云层似乎出
Roger. That was a very short burn. Request you give us a sweep across the panel when yo
Здравствуйте, Ca
弗雷德，关于相机设置，黑白3400胶卷的设置是5.6，快门速度1
まあ、必要になるかもしれないけど。明日は見て
Это подтверждается. Итак, на Surface 50, внизу страницы, ср
はい。あと3分です。点数をつけましょう
جيميني 6. ترقبوا تحديثًا على جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بكم لإصدار قديم. هل
11, Хью
Nous
你有点力不从心了。你刚才说你想确认一下
हाँ, ब
تبدو الأمور جيدة جداً يا والي. ملخص 
Potresti dirci se ti senti a 
Roger. Ich 
好的。在第 2 行，我们将打开 SYSTEM A
로저. 남은 시간은 2분 30초이고, 
아니, 짐. W-매트릭스와 관련된 문제야. 기억하시겠지만, 우리가 달 궤도에서 그걸 
वैंस, वह क्या था फि
Ok. Pensavo che stessi chiamando, ma credo che laggiù ci sia stato un problem
알겠습니다. 어댑터에서 간단히 카운트다운해 드리겠습니다. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 - 이제 안테나 선택, 재진입(REENTRY)으로 가
はい。半分くらいまで降りました。推進剤の量が30%、いや37%になった時に、この線を「残り時間が10秒になった時」と変更します。もちろん、
Houston, Apollo 11. Einer der größeren Krater auf der Rückseite – mir fiel ein kleiner, dunkler Fleck an der Außenwand auf, und ich richtete mein Monokular darauf. Ich konnte sehen – oh, ein Gebiet von vielleicht einer Viertelmeile Durchmesser. Es war eine wirklich frisch aussehende, dunkle Grube, die im Kontrast zu all den anderen frischen kleinen Kratern oder Löchern steht, die man an den Wänden dieser Krater erkennen kann. Um diesen speziellen K
Okay. Strom 5, Notabschaltung. Punkt 1, erste Zeile: Ich streiche „And V
Хорошо. И последний
Roger. Pouvez-vous donc confirm
노드 업데이트 20 4
Roger. Understand, pre-retro checklist is complete. You've got a new TR. You've got a command load. Your clocks are synched down here on the ground and I have about 2 minutes and 15 secon
ところで
Gemi
Понял. Похоже, нет никакого медленного
Ich verstehe dich laut und deutlich. Ich bin w
خاضع
D'accord, Fred. Voici la procédure pour relever la température du réservoir de propergol de descente. Ce n'est pas un problème majeur, mais nos équipes indiquent que le bas de l'étage de descente est probablement en train de refroidir, et nous voul
这是Sigma Seven。进行30秒高频检查，检查从10秒后开始。这是一次持续30秒的测试，我正在穿越下加利福尼亚半岛海岸，前往南美洲。所有系统运行正常。还有5秒的检查时间。测试结束。Sigma
비행 초반 부스터에 대한 브리핑을 이어가겠습니다. 어둠 속으로 들어간 후, 제가 생각하기에 약 1200피트(약 366미터) 거리에서 부스터와의 위치 유지를 시도했지만,
E a lato, eravamo in ATT HOLD nella banda morta MIN; e al contatto, ho spinto più X; e poco dopo abbiamo avuto una notevole oscillazione di assetto e l'accensione dei propulsori, quindi abbiamo aperto la banda morta al MASSIMO e abbiamo pilotato manualmente il veicolo in assetto stabile durante la retra
아
Il nous reste 10 secondes de fusée éclairante, et Cape demande la température d
Roger. Continuing with the Maroon Bugle. President Nixon surprised your wives with a phone call from San Francisco just before he boarded a plane to fly out to meet you. All of them were very touched by your television broadcast. Jan and Pat watched from Mission Control here. The launch of Intelsat from the Cape was postponed for the fourth time last night.
Eh bien, je ne peux pas dire que cette semaine n'ait pas été ple
よし、ウォーリー。キャビンのドームとキャビンの温度を教えてほしい。それと、キャビンのフローコントロールの設
Andare avanti
Roger, Roger. You're coming in lo
收到。做好心理准备，同样的警告和提示还会再次出现。你还
Jim
Tieniti pronto. Sembra tut
Bene, ecco il PITCH 
ゴ
मेरा काम रखरखा
Okay, Joe
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, это Kano Com Tec
01:30---経過時点で空はすっかり暗くなってきています。燃料と酸素は安定しており、客室
जेमिनी VIII, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हमारे यहाँ डेल्टा-पी लाइट्स जल रही हैं, जो GT-7 में आम बात थी, लेकिन GT-8 में नहीं जलनी चा
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। 7 डिग्री, 38 मिनट उत्तर, 165 पश्चिम लैंडिंग क्षेत्र के लिए, हम 2000 फीट छिटपुट, 12000 फीट टूटी हुई लहरें दिखा रहे हैं; अधिकतम ऊंचाई
小于0.1
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 제어 시스템 작동에 대한 관찰 사항입니다. 수동 
罗杰。燃料电池看
Dieser Boos
Ok, Jack. Il passo successivo è tappare il foro di bypass, che è il foro al centro del fondo del contenitore; vogliamo tapparlo perché non vog
Sì, stanno piangendo a Dallas. Risultati di basket: Houston non è andata molto bene questo fine settimana. L'Illinois ha battuto Houston 97 a 84. E la North Carolina ha vinto contro gli Owls. Il punteggio era 85 a 77. Abbiamo scritto un paio di parole sul giornale, Frank, sugli Oilers. Gli Oilers hanno votato George Webster come loro giocatore più prezioso e, sebbene Houston non abbia inserito ness
يا إلهي، لق
네, 배터리 충전을 잠시 중단하고 CM TM을 작동시켜 온도를 측정해야 한다는 것을 이해했습니다. 그리고 잭의 체크리스트에
Хорошо. У меня отключен усилитель мощности, отключено резервное копирование г
分
D'accord. Ensuite, nous voulons que MAIN BUS A RESET soit désactivé; passons à l'étape suivante, et nous voulons que le signal de retour d'information FUEL CELL 1 MAIN BUS B 
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota quattro e stiamo lavorando al quinto giorno. Naturalmente, non vediamo l'ora che arrivi l'atterraggio di venerdì. Qui sotto, nella parte della navicella che chiamiamo stiva inferiore, abbiamo il consigliere del Presidente per la forma fisica, il Capitano Jim Lovell, che sta per sottoporsi a un programma di esercizi che svolgiamo ogni giorno. Notate che fluttua molto liberamente. Ha appena sbattuto la testa contro il sistema ottico, usato per la nostra navigazione. Sta lavorando con un attrezzo progettato per mantenere i muscoli in forma. Un'altra funzione molto importante della nostra navicella spaziale è il computer, e ho pensato che potesse interessarvi vedere cosa abbiamo qui, i display che ci forniscono tutte le informazio
是哪一
好，我试试用我备用的时钟调到格林威治标准时间。随时都可以
Okay. 
收到。我听说他当时就在下面，而且非常享受观看
我们目前在距离月球 22500 英里处追踪到你，并以每
了解しました。雑音がかなり入ってきました。目の前の地平線上に「危
Stop right there. O
ठीक है। हम गाइडेंस कंट्रोल में बर्न करेंगे। और मोड कंट्रोल को एटीट्यूड होल्ड पर सेट करेंगे। आपके एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल स्विच रोल को पल्स पर, पिच को पल्स पर और यॉ को मोड कंट्रोल पर सेट करेंगे। तो यह आपके यॉ को नियंत्रित करेगा और आप पिच और रोल को नियंत्रित करने के लिए इसका उपयोग करेंगे। इंजन गिम्बल बंद; 10 प्रतिशत थ्रस्ट। स्टार्ट और स्टॉप मैनुअल। उलेज के लिए, प
حسنًا. لدى بعض الأشخاص الذين يتابعون أخبار صناعة التلفزيون أفكارٌ حول ما يرغبون في تجربته مع الفلاتر. وأودّ أن أقرأ لكم ما لديهم هنا لأترك لكم حرية التفكير فيه؛ وخلال الساع
Okay, ich verstehe Sie jetzt. Ich habe eine aktualisierte Bordkarte für Sie. Der aufsteigende Knotenpunkt liegt bei 132° Ost. Die GMT-Zeit des 
Tranq
로저. 
Хорошо. Понял, Фред. Спасибо. Нам бы хотелось, чтобы вы выключили ав
Houston, 11. Nous avons un rapport sur l'état de l'équipag
よし、待機。約4.2ps
Nun, es klingt, als ob es dir da oben r
Yes, I did. You want to remove - You want to power up both buses, with the BUS TIE motor switche
Roger. Jetzt ist alles
Ich habe noch weitere Informationen. Wir sollten in etwa zwei Stunden keine genauen Daten zu Ihrer Flugbahn haben. Der Brennvorgang schien uns jedoch seh
Okay. meno 04402 meno 00001 più 48387 178 169 359, non applicabile, più 00185 48587 603 48383 06 2027 250, centro della Terra 0123 - giù 123; ripeto, giù 123, destra 22 più 21123 meno 03000 12313 34494, stelle del nord, rollio 068, becche
没错。我们会留一个人带着通讯设备
收到。现在切换到手动模
Это по
Va bene, 
Wir würden uns freuen. Auf all unseren Monitoren hier ist es ziemlich d
Range r
Okay, Jack. Understand. You want us to point the X - plus X-axis to the south using the with the powered up. Then, by powering down the, we'll lose a. I wasn't too successfu
هذا صحيح. حسنًا، نحن الآن عند -5 + 05. وبالنسبة لك يا جاك، فإن وحدة القيادة تستخدم هذه ا
هذا مركز عمليات هاواي. جاهزون. كل شيء يبدو ع
ह्यूस्टन में, जैक ने कहा कि उसने इसे शुरू कर दिया है, और उसने 
Ok. Vuoi che legga su MDC 3: tensione BAT B, tensione PYRO 
这是
حسن
Надеюсь, всё нал
이 범위에서는 상당히 양호한 
Ok. Houston, abbiamo tre set su 33; ora andiamo su 34, orizzonte lunare lontano
Okay. Before you start copying, this procedure is - is basically simply to activate the supercritical helium pressure gaging so that you can read it. And the concern here is lest this supercritical helium pressure reach 1800 psi by 103 hours, at which point we'd be within a possibility of rupturing the burst disk when you acti
दरअसल, अगर आप इसे लगातार दो या तीन बार घुमा सकें, तो हम यह अनुमान लगा सकते हैं कि यह कहाँ जा रहा है और शायद जरूरत प
حسنًا. في قائمة التحقق G/8-2، ضمن الخطوة 5، توجد عبارة "تعطيل جميع المحركات النفاثة في طائرتين رباعيتين متجاورتين"، وهذا ما كنا نشير إليه عندما قلنا "تعطيل الطائرتين الرباعيتين A وB". هذا صحيح؛ ولكن، بالانتقال الآن إلى الخطوة 7 حيث تقول "تفعيل جميع المحركات النفاثة"، نأمل ألا تكون قد ظننت أننا نقصد ترك الطائرتين A وB معطلتين.
Okay, my backup solution is 2 feet per second
Да. Я спросил: «У вас есть какие-нибудь ин
Roger. 37 Volt, okay. Die prognostizierten Kryomengen sind: Sauerstof
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 다음 테스트는 어제와 마찬가지로 업링크 모드를 음성 통신 없
Oui, mais vous êtes tout de même contraint à une certaine position, comme si vous étiez assis dans un bus. Même si vous ne vous asseyez pas sur les fesses, vous de
هذه هي فريندشي
收到。
لا بد أن ذلك كان من أجل المرة القا
Sembra bu
收到。区域 36-4 4 40 和 120；1+06。2+31。23 小时，38:08。2+48。8+44。36-
Imaginez que l'endroit se soit un peu vidé après ce rendez-vous. On peut presque trouver une place pour s'
Roger, Houston. Genau das versuchen wir. Ich versuche, eine optische Position von 15 zu erreichen. Es war sehr schwierig, aufgrund der hellen Erde einen Stern zu finden, den wir mit dem Sextanten anvisieren können. Ich versuche, die automatische Optik zu nutzen, um den Stern zu finden. Das haben wir jetzt; wir versuchen, das Raum
We're going to sta
Just about to be cut off by the LM. Boy, does that ever look beautiful in the sex
ठीक है। हमें कमांडर की गेंद को 267.5
روجر. كنت أتساءل فقط عن درجة حرارة خزان الوقود الربا
سيجما سبعة، سيجما س
फ्रेडो, मुझे आपका आखिरी संदेश नहीं मिला। हम चाहते हैं कि आप यह सत्यापित करें कि आपके पावर एम्पलीफायर का सर्किट ब्रेकर खु
L'interruttore SET. Aspetta un attim
10 piedi al secondo di distanza dal punt
और बिल ने सुझाव दिया कि अगर हम प्राइमरी लूप पर वॉटर बॉयलर च
没错。我们做到了，巴兹。完
Columbia, Houston. Tout d'abord, nous souhaitons une vidange des eaux usées à 10 % à l'arrière. Ensuite, il ne semble pas nécessaire de changer d'avion pour le moment, nous n'enverrons donc pas de nouvelle connexion. Troisièmement, je souhaite que tous vos réchauffeurs cryogéniques soient en mode AUTO. Nous sommes prêts pour 
Джим, мы хотим, чтобы ты следовал своей текущей тонкой линии и игнорировал её. М
Wir haben verstanden, dass alles in Ordn
Halt! Das ist noch schlimmer, Bill. Geh zurück an deine Ausgangsposition. Du hast es auf unsere 3-Uhr-Position verschwinden lassen. Jetzt kommt es wieder. Okay. Halt! Jetzt bist du wieder da, wo du warst, und wir brauchen eine Bewegung, die ungefähr 90 Grad zu der le
Вибратор работает нормально, и мы п
네, 잃어버리세요. 물이 든 
オーロラ
휴스턴, 다운보이스 
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous vous demandons d'interrompre la purge d'oxygène si ce n'est déjà fai
ア
...잠시만 기다려
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। माइनस MA सॉल्यूशन के आधार पर, मुझे इम्पैक्ट लोंगिट्यूड माइनस 160.95 मिला। मैंने इसे बायस करके इम्पैक्ट लैटीट्यूड-लोंगिट्यूड 163.75 प्राप्त किया। मैं अपने इम्पैक्ट पॉइंट को 30 डिग्री पूर्व की ओर बदलना चाहता था, और मैंने यह निर्धारित करने का प्रयास किया कि इसके लिए मेरे बर्न पैरामीटर क्या होंगे, और मुझे X बर्न माइनस 11.6 और C प्लस 600, Y शून्य मिला। अब इससे मेरा पिछला X बर्न माइनस 50.2 से बदल गया है। मै
Tranquillità, Houston. La prima domanda è: qual è la tua migliore sti
Gemini VI, Gemini VI, Ho
La ris
よし。4回目の更新は / 4569
Je soupçonne que ce champ de blocs rocheux tire en partie son origine de ce grand cratère rocheux aux arêtes vives que nous avons longé lors de notre descente finale. Hier, j'ai dit qu'il avait à peu près la taille d'un terrain de football, et je dois admettre qu'il était un peu difficile à mesurer à l'arrivée. Mais je 
罗杰。捕获闩锁在探针上或已啮合在减速伞上。您想从您这边设置一
Знаете, что они сделали? Они перевернули изображение
Tranquility, Houston. For your information, the circuitry looks real fine on tha
Noch e
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نعتقد أننا حددنا سبب مشكلة إعادة الاتصال التي واجهناها في المهمة السابقة. يبدو أن المشكلة كانت في مصدر طاقة ج
마
Я знаю это, я знаю это — 295. Температура A — 87. Давление A — 3000. Температура B — 82. Давление B — 2650. Главный амперметр — 19. № 2 — 19,5. 1A — 4,5. 1B — 4,5. 1C — 4. 2A — 5. 2B — 4 3/4. 2C — 4 3/4. Напряжение постоянного тока 23,5. S1 — 29. S2 — 29. 
네. 저를 무료(FREE)
Wie hoch war meine GMT beim S
है
Houston, Apollo 11. Wir habe
Cab
Хьюстон, Аполло
D'accord. Je vais vérifier le cockpit pour être sûr qu'on ne cause pas d'ennuis aux garçons. Tout a l'air en parfait état, Gus. C'est un
Roger. When we star
11, Houston. Roger. Ich verstehe Sie gut, und es sieht so aus, als ob die automatische
음, 저희
Хорошо. Сегодня мы хотели бы, чтобы вы определили смещение цапфы до наблюдений, как указано в процедурах, а также после них. Наша цель — проверить возможность того, что какой-либо тепловой эффект может вызывать ошибки в угловых показаниях секстанта. Полученное ранее смещение следует учесть, то есть ПЕРЕЙТИ к пункту 87 после получения двух последовательных измерений, равных с точностью до 0,003 градуса. И, конечно же, сместите цапфу на пару градусов между измерениями. Земля сегодня должна быть намного меньше в вашем поле зрения. Я уверен, что вы гораздо лучше нас в этом разбираетесь, но чтобы убедиться, что вы получаете правильное измерение угла между звездой и горизо
Okay, Apollo 8. The first I have is
アクエリアス、パワーアンプはそのままにしておいてください。送信機と受信機の電源を
حسنًا. لأننا في وضع الاستعداد. نر
Apollo 8, this is Hou
Okay, Jack. Moment bit
Dank
Всё ясно и недвусмыс
حسنًا. سيعود المفتاحان - قاطعا الدائرة الكهربائية في اللوحة 250 - إلى وضع الفتح؛ وكذلك قاطعا الدائرة الكهربائية في اللوحة 275؛ وقاطع دائ
罗杰。理解 03 47 35；61.2；01 加 22；偏航零度，俯仰向下 21 度；25，00570；26，00224；27 全部为
没错。——在这种低角度的阳光下，棕色完全消失了，取而代之的是一片灰蒙蒙的，就像8号机组人员说的那
Ho le particelle. Ero rivolto dalla parte opposta al sole all'alba e non ho visto le particelle, solo... solo che si muovevano di 180 gradi, sono riuscito a captare... a questo punto... Aspetta, credo di v
هذا صحيح. قبل أن أبدأ بالحديث عن منصات الهبوط، لديّ ملاحظة أخرى. المعلومات العامة التي قدمناها لكم سابقًا حول وجود الشمس في نافذة القائد، وحول النجوم فيها، مثل إمكانية استخدامها كمؤشر عام لوضعية المركبة أثناء الاحتراق، لم تعد ذات صلة. نحن نعتمد فقط على فحص ال
高いビットレートが欲しいので、時間がかかるとのことでした。高いビットレートは出
休斯顿，他要给16分，杰克。好了，我已经把1号罐的氧气加热器和风
रॉजर, अपोलो 8। आपके लिए कुछ बातें: इस विषय पर, हमने आपके स्टेट वेक्टर्स और आपकी सभी जानकारी देख ली है। प्लेटफ़ॉर्म ठीक लग रहा है, और ऐसा लगता है कि यदि आप इसे बायपास करना चाहें तो यह आपका विकल्प है, अगले पास में भी आपका प्लेटफ़ॉर्म ठीक रहेगा। और हमें आपकी प्रतिक्रिया चाहिए, और मुझे लगता है कि हम स्लीप समरी से पीछे चल
Das ist bestätigt,
Ok. Questi oggetti a misura di boccone sono stati progettati per eliminare il problema di avere così tante briciole che fluttua
रॉजर। सब कॉपी कर लिया है; मुझे लगता है सब ठीक है। मुझे ठीक से पता नहीं है कि इस समय एएससीएस की 
Хорошо. Время
11, Houston. Veuillez lire attentivement et, si les angles obtenus sont de même ordre de grandeur, veui
收到。我
Роджер, проверить систему управления по проводам очень просто. Наша телеметрия проверяет все в
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 8번 패널에는 EMS, MAIN A, 
Roger, Al. I am in auto; retro; the gyro switches are normal; maneuver is off. The capsule is prepared for retrosequence but for stowing two charts. I'm sure we're go. I have 81 percent auto, (fuel) 80 percent manual (fuel), which is the same as my intermediate report.
Ok, Jim ha ragione. Dovremmo cancellare tutto questo, con un paio di eccezioni. La valvola di scarico anteriore, chiusa, il primo passaggio, dovrebbe rimanere. Tutti gli altri passaggi dovrebbero essere cancellati, tranne l'ultimo, ch
D'accord
确认。服务模块氧气供应已关闭，杰
わかった、ウォーリー、そ
جيميني 4، هذه هيوستن. هل فهمت ذلك 16+10
Comment je fais pour contourner ça? J'ai 58 g et je veux un lacet de 
alimentation vers ATT
और मेरे पास रेट्रोफायर से 4 मिनट पहले का
좋습니다. 시작해 보겠습니다. 목적은 자유 복귀를 위한 중간 항로 수정입니다.:; -0.021.3, +0.004.1, -0.031.2; HA와 HP는 NA입니다. DELTA-V 0.038.0; 0.031, 120, 298, -0.0213, +0.0041, -0.0312; NA. 그리고 GDA 각도를 알려드리겠습니다. 피치 5.86, 롤 6.75. 스로
This is Texas Cap Com, Friendship Seven. We are recommending that you leave the retropackage on through the entire reentry. This means that you will have to override 
Hallo Deke, ich
Roger. Got the back on watch again. We want to make sure we don't overdo the star sight
Понял. Это переключатель нагревателя датчика кислорода ECS. Переключатель 
- - RCS 모니터 확인 완료 - (웃음
프랭크와 저는 어젯밤 자기 전에 식사를 했고, 물도 20잔 정도 마신 것 같아요. 그리고 푹 잤습니다. 방금 일어났어
And, Jim, earlier in the evening, we thought there was a misunderstanding about the amount of potable water you can drink, but we want to advise you that you can drink as much wate
Roger, j'ai bien reçu la révision 41. 06 01 44 D-9. Et 
अच्छा, मुझे लगत
구름층이 알래스카 최남단보다 
Wally, è bello vedere le luci accese per la
تمام 
Vous êtes enregistré. Nous sommes en communication interphone continue – appuyez pour parler. Toujour
Roger. Soweit ich das verstanden habe, wurde die Warnsch
अपोलो 8. इसमें आपको काफी ब
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。それと、後部隔壁についた水ですが… 多すぎなければ、吸い取ってスポンジは廃棄物置き場に捨てることをお勧めします。多すぎる場合は、F10-14ページのチェックリストの手順に
Apollo 8, si vous vous connectez et que vous accept
좋아. 아주 잘했어, 조... 해당 패널에
In manual proportional, with manual lever pulled out, and 
ठीक है। मैं कर देता हूँ। ठीक है। अब उन्हें यहाँ चारों 
Und wir werden den - wir werde
로저. 다음 질문은 버즈에게 드리겠습니다. 버즈는 지구로 처음 진입했을 때, 즉 첫 번째 REV(Reverse Evaluation)에서 지구 상공에서 레이저를 목격했다고 보고했었는데, 
आगे ब
Alles, was du willst, findest du bei RETRO POWER
Comb
रॉजर, समझ गया। फ्लाइट प्लान के अनुसार, आपको अभी FBW जाना था, और वह कह र
AS 58, мы хотим, чтобы тяга DELTA-V A стала но
Beneath that, scratch out "Spacecraft control dash AUTO verify." Scratch out the "" and all in parentheses after that, like the "Minus 00507," et cetera. And 
هذا صحيح. بذلك تكتمل هذه البطاقة. أما التحديثات الأخرى فهي للعلم فقط، وتستند إلى بيانات منصتنا التي تم جمعها خلال 58 ساعة - انظر إلى المنصة. وضعنا ممتاز. لم تشهد أجهزة الجيروسكوب أي انحراف تقريبًا منذ التحديث الذي رصدناه - حيث كانت قيمة X سالبة 2.24، وقيمة Y موجبة 0.87، وقيمة Z سالبة 0.11. منذ التحديث، الذي استند إلى بيانات 52 ساعة على ما أعتقد، سجلنا انحرافًا في X موجب 0.79، وانحرافًا في Y موجب 1.06، وانحرافًا في Z موجب 0.02... أستطي
Выключите автоматический выключатель системы управления
أب
रॉजर। ठीक है। हम आपके स
어떻게 된 거야? 거꾸로 뒤집어 놓은 건가? 완전
Okay. We're 
Apollo 8, I cut you out there. What did you say on the last 
로저, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 이제 곧 
Обратите внимание, как вы мо
Houston, Apollo 11. J'observe actuellement ce nuage autour du Pakistan au sextant, et il semble s'agir d'une seule cellule en phase finale de développement. Il y en a une autre, p
Roger. Ti avevo detto che il bulbo della pressione sanguigna non entra più nel foro.
ठीक है, 11. यह ह्यूस्टन है। उड़ान योजना में लगभग 22:30 बजे, आपकी पोस्ट-स्लीप चेकलिस्ट और 
D'accord. Si je comprends bien, si on regarde la patte du chat, c'est à peu près à son majeur, un peu à une ou deu
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। क्या आप अपने कंटिंजेंसी एरिया 1 डेल्टा रेट्रोसीक्वेंस टाइम को कॉपी करने के ल
Okay. E hai una stima, Vance
هيوستن، أبولو 11؛ أبولو 11، إي
오, 별로 좋지 않네요, 잭. 여기서는 통신을 위해 전력 증폭기 회로 차단기 입력단자로 가서 기능 스위치를 음성으로 설정하는 게 좋겠습
आप शायद अपनी पत्नियों की टिप्पणियों में रुचि रखते होंगे। नील, जेन ने कल की गतिविधियों के बारे में कहा, "शाम अविश्वसनीय रूप से शानदार थी। अपने पति, क्रू, मानवयुक्त अंतरिक्ष यान केंद्र, अमेरिकी जनता और समस्त मानव जाति के साथ चंद्र अन्वेषण की शुरुआत के इस शानदार अनुभव को साझा करना मेरे लिए सम्मान और सौभाग्य की बात है।" फिर उनसे पूछा गया कि क्या वह चंद्रमा पर उतरने को अपने जीवन का सबसे महान क्षण मानती हैं। उन्होंने कहा, "नहीं, वह तो हमारी शादी का दिन था।" और माइक, पैट ने बस इतना कहा, "यह अद्भुत था।" बज़, जोन - जाहिर तौर पर चंद्रमा पर होने पर पूरी तरह विश्वास नहीं कर प
ठीक है; थोड़ा इंतज़ार कीजिए। देखते हैं फ्रैंक इस बारे में क्या कहत
休斯顿宁静号。收到。09017 是您的读数更新
Sì. Questa sarà la pagina -3, ma è mol
D'accord. En descendant, barrez « 114:29:16, ON, SR
यह सही है। ठीक है। चौथी पंक्ति जैसी है वैसी ही ठीक
ジム、あなたは参加して構いません。ただし、テレビの時間は依然とし
Bonjour Kano. Ici Sigma Seven. Vous arrivez tous les deux en état de choc,
Чарли, повтори еще раз эти три угла. Я хотел бы п
جيم، في وقت سابق من المساء، أبلغ فريدو عن وجود تسريب من النافذة رقم 1 في وحدة القيادة. كما أبلغ عن قطعة معدنية فضية اللون، مربعة الشكل تقريبًا، طول ضلعها حوالي 10 سم، تطفو في الهواء. كنا نحاول تحديد ما إذا كان هذا تسريبًا جديدًا أم أنه جزء من التسريب المتبقي من مشكلتنا الأصلية. هل لديك أي تعليقات أخرى؟ كان فريدو يلتقط بعض الصور، وقد سمحنا له بالتقاط صور عشوائية باستخدا
Et, 11, pour information, l'amplitude de la première correction de trajectoire, si elle est effectuée, serait d'environ 17 pieds par seconde. Nous envisageons actuel
..,
네, 잘 들렸습니다. 지금 Ascent 배터리 점검을 할 예정입니다. 제 BIOMED도 잠깐 확인해 보시겠어요? 이
That's okay. I... in the p
쌍둥이자리 역추진 로켓의 느낌이네요. 정말 그런가요? (웃음) 아니, 좀 더 자세히 보자면, 엔진이 이쪽을 향하고 가스가 저쪽으로 빠져나가니까 그
Roger. Receiving you much better now, Wally. Very good. Fuel is 62-62 [percent], oxygen 62-95 [percent], amps are 25. All syste
あなたが発見したとき、私たちは +5 (度) のロールを行いま
ठी
D'accord. Le circuit de la pile 
Roger, Houston. Genau das versuchen wir. Ich versuche, eine optische Position von 15 zu erreichen. 
ジャック、ご都合の良いときにもう
收到。如果你
Roger. We'd like to dump your waste water tank down to 25 percent; we'd like to do it before the midcour
ठीक है। 
凍った小さな水滴が動き回る様子を見るのは、本当に素晴らしい。まるで四方八方と動いているように見えるけれど、ある一定の距離を過ぎると落ち着き、全て同じ方向へ進んでいるように見える
네, 잭, 이건 예방 차원입니다. 광학 장치를 샤프트 각도 90도로 세워 놓으면 슬릿이 일렬로 정렬되어 방열판 해당 부분에 최적의 공기 흐름을 만들어 과열 지점을 방지
Понял. Мой режим управления — ручной; гироскопы заблокированы; маневр отключен. Готов
로저. 저희에게는 약 3분 30초 정도의 시간이 있습니다. 이제 모든 권한을 귀하께 넘겨드리겠습니다. 폐수 탱크 방류와 관련해서는, 대략 3분 30초 후에 방류가 있을 것으로
Aurora Seven... 95. Il tuo punto di atterraggio è a 200 miglia di distanza. Ti faremo
Водолей, Хьюстон
지
네. 쿼드콥터의 노즐은 보이지만 어두워서 
Yuri ar
... tatsächlich noch
わかりました、ジ
Pas a
Tranquility, Houston. After you get through this P57, we'd like 
Roger. Understand that was C was minus 0.2. I copied Z; ZULU 
ठीक है। हम इसे -1A, चरण 6, "पावर में स्थानांतरण" 
روجر. أعد التشغيل وسيضيء مؤشر. إع
Okay, Wally, è lì che vorrebbero
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. لم أُعانِ من أي آثار جانبية حتى الآن من انعدام الجاذبية. بل على العكس، إنه شعورٌ مريحٌ للغاية. حدة البصر لا تزال ممتازة
रॉजर। अब हमारा लॉक-ऑन हो गया है,... 21:50 बजे हमारी रेंज 22.24 नॉटिकल मील थी... 22:00 बजे हमारी रेंज 17.63 नॉटिकल मील थी और अभी भी हमारा लॉक-ऑन पॉजिटिव है। 51 बजे हमारी रे
Salve, Apollo 11. Houston. Abbiamo puntato di nuovo le antenne su di te. Potresti fornirci la lettura 
Sembra che st
外面有闪电
Ici Friendship Seven. Je suis actuellement en HF. Je passerai en
Roger. You got
Non ho inserito tutte quelle modifiche alle configurazioni di controllo nella checklist, ma è esattamente quello che abbiamo fatto: a
알겠습니
不，不会。它过一会儿就会关掉。不过我也不明白我们为什么要让
Gemini 4,
أبولو 8، أبولو 8،
I turned my S-BAND VOLUME down to get rid of that background noise; now don't forget for us to turn it back up on the oth
ठीक है। कृपया इसे REACQ मोड में डालें और मॉनिटर करें। लगभग 2 मिनट में हम हाई गेन पर पहुँच जाएँगे। क्या आप REACQ को मॉनिटर करेंगे? अगर यह काम नहीं करता है, तो मैन्युअल रूप से ए
了解、ジム。良い復唱だ。通信が途絶えた場合は、私が指示した手順に従うこと。明日までに手順が多少変更される可能性もあるので、現状の手順で進め、より
Okay. Picking u
Okay, Wassermann. Wir empfehlen, den Test von Ei
ठीक है। आगे, ऐसा माना जा रहा है कि शुरुआत में आपके स्टेट वेक्टर में थोड़ी सी त्रुटि थी, और जब उसे एकीकृत किया ग
It took 49 1/2 seconds to come up through. Let's see if I can duplicate th
ペグの圧力を解放するために、約 2 分間 O2 高レートを使用しました。現在は 9
يبدو أن غالق كاميرا هاسلبلاد عالق في بعض هذه الصور. هذه هي المجموعة الثانية من صور S-6 فوق المحيط ا
Roger, I
射程圏内での位置確認による
रॉजर। क्षेत्र 55-डेल्टा 82. 04 34 10. 9+57. क्षेत्र 
分かりました。BLOCK には
J'ai reçu un échantillon
Okay. This will - This just involves chan
はい。わかりました。次は司令船の写真です。司令船からサービスモジュールを見るのは少し難しいかもしれませんが、もし見えるとしたら5番窓からだろうと、ここにいる人たちは考えています。そのためには70ミリレンズをお勧めします。これらの写真は優先度2です。これは70ミリELで、80ミリレンズを取り付けた状態で、すべてB-3にあります。80ミリレンズを取り外し、250ミリレンズを取り付けます。250ミリレンズはU-4にあります。CEXフィルムはA-13から使用してください。リングサイトはA-7から、そしてこれらの写真
好的
他说，为了让MSC-1恢复运行，他们需要关闭ACQ辅助信标
مانع لتس
ठीक है। हमने बिजली चालू कर दी है और सब ठीक लग रहा है। मुझे एक चेतावनी और चेतावनी वाली बिजली की बत्ती दिख रही है, और सारे खतरे के संकेत दिख रहे हैं; और हमने दोनों X लूनर बस टाई ब्रेकर चालू कर दिए हैं। यूटिलिटी लाइटिंग ब्रेकर चालू है; फिर एसी बस बी हीलियम पीक्यूएस डिस्प्ले; एसी बस बी न्यूमेरिक लाइटिंग, और एसी बस बी इन्वर्टर 1 - बस टाई बंद है। फिर मैंने इन्वर्टर 1 ब्रेकर बंद कर दिया, और मैंने पैनल 16 पर सिग्नल कंसेंसर ब्रेकर चालू कर दिया है; मैंने इन्वर्टर 1 को चुना है और हीलियम मॉनिटर स्विच को सुपरक्रिट पर सेट कर दिया है, लेकिन कोई बत्ती नहीं जल
好的。我再次强调，在我之前说过顺序并不关键的区域，即使你退出，顺序仍然不关键。现在我继续。好的，面板 4：电信，组 1，AC1，它不会是 AC1，而是会变成“关闭”。面板 5：该面板上所有已定位的断路器现在
روجر. المراجعة 55، ورقم 1، وقت البدء 05 48 55 وقل الج
Okay, Fred. Prior to, which is minus 1 hour, maneuver the to the following angles: r
ठीक है। हाँ। बिल्कुल सही; कमांडर की लाल नली को कनस्तर की थ
还有阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们已经准备好接收你们的飞越信
You should have sent your blood pressur
阿波罗8
カプセルの周りを旋回
Okay. Ich werde Jack bitten zu überprüfen, ob der CM/RCS HEATER-Schalter ausgeschaltet ist, und falls nicht, schalten wir 
本当に大丈夫。本当に
そうだ、私が心配しているのは、このクソ
ジェミニ4号です。また同じ曲線状の光が見えました。オーロラのような感じですが、私たちの真下にあります。以前も見ましたが、とても長くて長い線でした。私たちの飛行経路とほぼ平行に走っているようで、地平線の大気光のすぐ下から、大気光の頂点を少し越
... derzeit nicht verfügba
Отличная сделка. Я использую Луну, а затем Юпитер, чтобы выстроить в ряд другие звезды. Слишком тусклая, чтобы в
Roger
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 1
Penso che questa cosa potrebbe aver bisogno di una stabili
アポロ11号、アポロ11
Pour l'instant, le seul problème qui nous a posé souci concerne le circuit des costume
分かりました。例えば115番のアルタイルのシャフトとトラニオンをください。私がそこに行って、彼
Aspetta un attimo. Cercheremo di c
هيوستن، تقرير حالة الطاقم. الإشعاع: CDR 11017، CMP 10019، LMP 09020. لا يتناول أي أدوية
मिथुन राशि
والآن، أحاول أن أختار بصرياً النقطة الأولى
Das ist bestätigt, Jim. 50
Фред, Хьюстон. Через некоторо
Roger. 18-1 senza OA
कोलंबिया। व्यवस्था
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴
わかりました、ジャ
それは肯定です。私たちもそれを知って
저기 오래된 코로나 오스트랄리스가 멋지게 보이네요. 그리고 눈키도 있고요. 카우스 
Docteur, je vo
Riesci a vedere la barba 
And on the next page, at about, you can resume the normal flight plan. We would like to make one addition; at, add a waste water dump. Even though one is not really required at that time, we would like to get the dump out of the way so we can track you unint
Houston, Apollo 11 ha VHF A Simplex attivo ogni volta che si desidera effettuare un controllo CO
Roger. If you don't get in the way of the Czar while he's brushing his teeth, we'd like you to bring up the primary accumulator quantity a little bit. We're showing the quantity now at 20.6 percent on TM. Seems to have gone down a bit since you've gone into the
हा! हा! झाड़ियों में तुम्हारी यात्रा से मेरे स्विम फिन्स पर अभी भी काले निशान हैं। ठीक है, तुम देख सकते हो कि मैं फिर से दाईं ओर मुड़ गया हूँ। मुझे आना है - सुधार, बाईं ओर मुड़ गया। मुझे दाईं ओर आना है, चाँद क्षितिज पर बिल्कुल सही है। मैं इसे फिर से सही जगह पर लाता हूँ, बस तुम्हें दिखाने के लिए कि इसे प्राप्त करना कितना आसान है। लगता है मेरा ईंधन न्यूनतम सीमा पर है, इसलिए मैं यहाँ थोड़ा इसके साथ खेलता हूँ। ठीक है, हम यॉ में लगभग सही जगह पर हैं, और रोल में अभी भी सही जगह पर नहीं हैं। मैं इसे ज़ोर से घुमाता हूँ और काम हो जाएगा। इसे सीधा करने के लिए रोल आ रहा है। रोल के करीब आ रहा है - ठीक है, मैं यहीं छोड़ रहा हूँ। इससे बेहतर मैं तुम्हें कभी नहीं दे पाऊँगा। रोल में 
Ricevuto. La combustio
罗杰。
3/4：日の出、本初子午線、日没、太陽面下、-1捕捉、-2捕捉。-1と2の場合、これらの捕捉時間はシャフトとトラニオンの角度がゼ
I'm now starting to see the sunrise in the periscope. First light in the periscope during this particular orbit as a result of the night side. It is obvious that the periscope has no function whatsoever in retroattitude on the night side. First light that I get is right now at a of practically. The sunrise is comi
Non abbiamo ancora finito. Ci aspettano ancora 160.000 chilometri. Sai, ci sentiamo come se fosse tutto finito, ma
좋아요. 그
Ok. Mancano un paio di minuti, Jim. Tutto sembra andare per il meglio. Il tuo tempo a Carnarvon sarà lungo, e non abbiamo la minima idea del perché l'entrobordo si sia spento pri
لنتابع. إذا توقف المحرك أثناء الاحتراق، وظهر لك 
N
네, 
罗杰。巴兹，琼现在不在家，不过珍妮丝说草长得挺高了，我估计等你
아니요, 그런 
D-9です。実行2です。スケジュールされたフィルタ設定を使用します。コピーし
チャーリー、どうやら、大きな衝撃を与えずに REPRESS を AUTO にするゆっくりと
没错。就是这样。是海角要求的。沃利，
了解。問題は中央のリード線が乾燥していたことだったと思う…新しいのを取り
Хорошо. Проверяем: команда телеметрии — выключена; УКВ AM B — центр; шумоподавление в S-диапазоне — выключено; клапаны топливных элементов — в нормальное положение; магнитофон — вперед, центр; движение ленты — рычаг; питание — центр; питание P
舱内相对湿度显示为 20%。冷却液量为 66%。宇航服温度为 68 华氏度，压力显示为 5.8，蒸汽温度为 50 华氏度，宇航服回路温度舒适。氧气供应量为 65-100%，主电源电流分别为 24、25、25、25 安培；备用电源电流分别为 25、25 安培；隔离电源电流为 29 安培；已切换回主电源
Gemini VI, we're interested in Delta-V's on the terminal phase initiation and the braking, and also several million pe
Хорошо, Базз. Что касается пунктов вашего плана полета, сначала несколько обновлений. Мы отменили промежуточный заход номер 6. Оставайтесь на месте. Я дам вам немного больше времени сегодня утром. Второй пункт плана полета: мы готовы зарядить батарею B в любой момент, когда вы захотите это сделать; и третий пункт: на этот раз мы хотели бы сбросить сточные воды немного по-другому. Мы хотели бы сделать это на наших метках с земли. Трасса немного неровная, и мы хотели бы сбросить воду в такое время, когда, как 
Roger. Schritt 6: „Drehe dich mit bis zu 0,3 Grad pro Sekunde um die Gierachse“, das erfordert etwa 21 Impulse. Schr
Р
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Si vous avez un instant, pourriez-vous nous communiquer les données de votre système de bord concernant le réservoir d'azote Bravo? Nous tenons à préci
Okay. This is preliminary results, but it will give you some indication. Corrected altitude is turning out to be 17 plus or minus 4 kilometers, and the fact that it's plus or minus 4 kilometers indicates that you're being very con
لا، 
了解。信じられないかもしれないが、イ
أوه، فهمت. حاول أن ترى الشبكة بدون تشغيل الضوء. حسنًا. سنتحقق من ذلك. وأمر آخر، يمكنك تحريك هوائي رادار الالتقاء إلى وضع الركن في أي وقت الآن.
कृपया एक के पास प्रतीक्षा करें
Roger. Für die Höhenverstellung gilt: Delta-V, 14,0; Dauer, 0 plus 24; Gierwinkel 180 Grad, Nickwinkel 0; Kern 25, 00140; 26 und 27,
Roger, Guaymas. Read you loud a
좋습니다. 처음부터 다시 설명드리겠습니다. 내용이 겹치는 부분이 있을 수 있지만, 모두 같은 내용을 이해하고 있는지 확인하기 위해 말씀드리겠습니다. 먼저 일련의 시간 순서 절차부터 시작해서 일반적인 진입 체크리스트를 만들겠습니다. 책에는 체크리스트에 대한 몇 가지 변경 사항이 있겠지만, 제가 여러분께 드릴 주요 내용은 시간 순서에 관한 것입니다. 시작 시간은 출발 6시간 30분 전이며, 지휘 모듈의
ठीक है। जब हमने एसी पावर स्विच को आईजीए
Danke, dass Sie uns zur Ehrlichkei
Das ist Freundschaft Sieben. Ich habe
네, 시작하세요. 저희는 CM에서 전송되는 데이터를 확인하기
Eine M
Apollo 11, Houston
天
Okay. That's pericynthian plus 2. / 62871 November Alfa, and stand by one. Okay. We'll pick up with a pitch trim and yaw trim of not applicable; time, minus 00468, plus 00254, plus 00181
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。オーバ
Okay. One CAUTION AND WARNING light here showing that you didn't call out - it's the P
알겠습니다. 1분 전에 "MASTER ARM, ON"을 지우세요. 35초 전에는 처음 두 줄을 지우세요. 10초 전에는 "Minus 9 seconds"로 바꾸세요. 그러면 "Minus 9 seconds"에는 "Manual Ullag
हमारे ग्राउंड कंप्यूटरों पर हमने पुष्टि की है कि आपके द्वारा निर्धारित शाफ्ट और ट्रनियन कोण तारे की ओर इंगित कर रहे हैं। हाला
안녕하세요, 캘리포니아 캡콤, 
OK. FON
Non sono riuscito a identificare l'ultima stazione che ha parlato in HF. Il segnale è arrivato molto chiaro e dovrebbe essere stato registrato a bordo della capsula a circa 43 minuti e 10 secondi di distanza
안녕하세요,
罗杰。当时没有任何标记。我确实看到一个非常小的白色物
Gemini 4, RKV. We'
Abbiamo visto dei detriti, Fred. Il booster stess
Restez à l'écoute, Verseau, Odyssey. Nous vous demandons de passer directement à l'action et de mettre de côté votre attitude actuelle jusqu'à la mise en service. Allez
ランディ
好的。这是近辛提安加 2。/ 62871 十一月阿尔法，稍等片刻。好的。我们将从不适用的俯仰配平和偏航配平开始；时间，-00468，+00254，+00181 173 101 027 十一月阿尔法加 00187 00563 515 00563 01
ह
वैंस, ऐसा लगता है कि बैटरी चार्ज सर्किट ब्रेकर, जो लगा हुआ प्रतीत हो र
Voilà notre logement pour les prochaines heures et nous voulons en prendre grand soin. Bon. Je suis sur la dernière marche et je peux voir les patins du train d'atterrissage. Descendre d'une marche à l
... द
E sul t
أبولو 13،
Roger. Ich werde die Werte für das Abdocken auf Null setzen. Meine Frage: Soll
Ok, Fred. Questa è una procedura per ottenere una lettura delle temperature del serbatoio del propellente di discesa. Non è un grosso problema, ma i nostri addetti dicono che la parte inferiore dello stadio di discesa si sta probabilmente raffreddando e vogliamo solo verificare che il serbatoio dell'acqua di discesa sia a posto. Al momento, sembra che non si congelerà prima di diverse ore dopo essere stato svuotato, ma vogliamo che tu ci legga queste temp
Per quanto riguarda la finestra, Houston: le finestre 1 e 5 presentano una foschia moderata. Soddisfacente per l'osservazione visiva, ma forse non per la fotografia. Le finestre 2 e 4 sono trasparen
了解しました。テレメトリーの2O流量トランスデューサーの値は、船上で読み取った値とほぼ一致しています。EECOMMもこの周期に気づいていますが、それでも表示される流量は予想よりも低いようです
Bene. Passaggio 6, "Trasferimento alla corrente (fari spenti), ATTENZIONE AVVERTENZA ALIMENTAZIONE ATTENZIONE spia ACCESA. Segnalare a. Pannello 11, INTERRUTTORE AUTOMATICO CONGIUNZIONE BUS TRAESLUNAR, CHIUSO. Pannello interruttore automatico 16, CONGIUNZIONE BUS TRANSLUNAR,
すごく元気そうで
La cabina è pronta, non voglio più abbassare la cupola. È andata molto bene. Controllo in tempo: 18 minuti. Bene sull'orologio. Propulsori: il rollio a sinistra automatico è 119 (gradi). Il rollio a destra automatico è 115 (gradi). Il rollio a sinistra manuale è 100 (gradi). Lo scambiatore di calore della cabina è 43 (gradi). Il pitch up automatico è 95 (gradi). Il pitch down automatico è 95 (gradi). L'imbardata a sinistra automatica è 80 (gradi). L'imbardata a destra automatica è 100 (gradi). Inverter a 250, oh che bello, meno di 160 (gradi). L'inverter a 150 è 110 (gradi). Lo st
Beste Laune, Flug geht weiter, ich bin jetzt über den Vereinigten Staat
يبدو
Роджер... REP RB 26 плюс 39; повернуть налево на 47 градусов, повернуть направо на 47; на
Я всё испортил
Можете ли вы приблизительно оцен
روجر، يا فريندشيب سفن. يبدو أن قراءتك غير دقيقة بعض الشيء. لديك اختلافات في زوايا الميل بمقدار 30 
彼らに電話
That's
Ok, Jim. Lo riceviamo a intermittenza. Pensiamo di poterlo stabilizzare e migliorare i margini del circuito se, inoltre, sul pannello 16, aprissi l'interruttore dell'AMPLIFICATO
Aqua
원하는 만큼 무엇이든
Okay. Aus Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Das große britische Radioteleskop Jodrell Bank empfing heute um 5:49 Uhr EDT keine Signale mehr von der sowjetischen Mondsonde Luna 15. Ein Sprecher sagte, es scheine, als habe die Sonde den Mond bereits hinter sich gelassen. Ein weiteres Zitat: „Wir glauben nicht, dass sie gelandet ist“, sagte ein Sprecher von Sir Bernard Lovell, dem Direktor des Observatoriums. Washington UPI: Vizepräsident Spiro T. Agnew forderte, bis zum Jahr 2000 einen Menschen auf den Mars zu schicken. Demokratische Politiker entgegneten jedoch, dass die Bedürfnisse auf der Erde Priorität haben müssten. Agnew, ranghöchster Regierungsbeamter beim Start von Apollo 11 am Mittwoch, sprach offenbar für sich selbst und nicht unbedingt für die Nixon-Regierung, als er sagte: „Meiner Meinung nach sollten wir bis zum Ende dieses Jahrhunderts einen Menschen auf den Mars schicken.“ Laredo, Texas, AP: Einwanderungsbeamte in Nuevo Laredo gaben am Mittwoch bekannt, dass Hippies keine Touristenkarten für die Einreise nach Mexiko erhalten, es sei denn, sie baden und lassen sich die Haare schneiden. Huberto Cazaras, Leiter der mexikanischen Einwanderungsbehörde in Nuevo Laredo, berichtete, dass die Behörden in Mexiko-Stadt, Acapulco und anderen beliebten Touristenorten Beschwerden über die Hippies erhalten hätten. United Press International: Die erste Reaktion auf Präsident Nixons Entscheidung, Bundesangestellten am Montag einen Feiertag zu gewähren, damit sie den nationalen Gedenktag zur Apollo-11-Mondlandung begehen konnten, war überwiegend Überraschung. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, London: Europa ist vom Apollo-11-Ereignis begeistert. Zeitungen auf dem ganzen Kontinent füllen ihre Seiten mit Bildern der Saturn-V-Rakete, die zum ersten Mal eine Verbindung der Erde zu ihrem natürlichen Satelliten herstellte. Und die Schlagzeilenmacher suchten nach den passenden Worten, um diese Leistung zu würdigen. „Das größte Abenteuer in der Geschichte der Menschheit hat begonnen“, verkündete die französische Zeitung Le Figaro, die vier Seiten Berichten vom Cape Kennedy und Diagrammen der Mission widmete. Die Boulevardzeitung Paris Jour rief: „Die ganze Welt sagt Bravo!“ Die kommunistische Tageszeitung L'Humanité veröffentlichte auf der Titelseite ein Foto des Starts und widmete die gesamte Rückseite einem enthusiastischen Bericht über die Mondlandung. Darin wurden der Countdown und der Start, die Frauen und Familien der Astronauten sowie Hintergrundinformationen zu den Mondakt
Tenente col
حسناً. تم توصيل المحول. سأتصل بك
سيظهر الأفق قريباً، وربما ستعيقنا الشمس. في حال حدوث ذلك، سأضطر إلى رفع سطوع الأجهزة إل
是的，我的数值在0.
好的。接下来是指令舱的照片。从指令舱可能不太容易看到服务舱，但如果能看到的话，应该可以通过5号窗口看到，这里的人都这么认为。建议使用7
引っ張ってるよ
好的。我们会配合你的，但希望你务必确保装载的货物数
로저. 잠시 후 은행
Ok, Jack. Puoi procedere con la configurazione degli interruttori. Quello che stiamo discutendo è di farti attivare gli interruttori del motore MAIN BUS TIE più avanti, semplicemente per verificare che funzionino correttamente, perché le batterie prob
حسناً يا جيم. لقد سمعتك تقول 
收到。我们现在正等着干点什么。我们需要一个状态向量，一个读数。还需要你观察负
Итак, время перехода на питание составило 57 часов 11 минут. К вашему сведению, у нас, похоже, достаточно энергии. На самом деле, мы рассматриваем процедуру, которую, возможно, порекомендуем вам позже, после завершения процесса зарядки и так далее, — включение питания одной из главных шин ком
मुझे लगता है कि आप संद
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Je n'avais rien dit à ce moment-là. Nous sommes en train de trouver des solutions pour vous. Concernant votre question précédente sur la gestion des cycles de sommeil, nous partageons votre avis. Nous souhaitons rectifier le tir en ce qui concerne les cycles de sommeil et autres aspects du plan de vol d'ici notre arrivée en orbite lunaire. Nous vous demandons donc de bien vouloir évaluer la manière la plus efficace d'intégrer les cycles de sommeil et de les répartir entre vous. Nous aimerions que vous nous teniez informés des tâches de chacun et de vos projets. Nous avons un cycle de sommeil décalé de deux heures. Nous aimeri
Oui, nous étions sur ceux-là... de sorte que no
حسنًا، وظيفة EM
Roger. Go ahead
حسناً يا جيم. أعتق
No, this is Chuck Lewis. Charlie Duke is out with Flight getting a weathe
There's only 
良
Aspetta, 
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 이글과
Könnten Sie bitte ein besonderes Auge auf den Spültank und den Kryo-O2-Tank 1 haben, da unser Durchflussmesser Vollausschlag anzeigt und wir keine Warnung vor einem hohen O2-Durchfluss erh
Tranquillité, ici Houston. 
Stand 
Freundschaft Sieben. Ist jetzt alles in Ordn
よし。DIYの水酸化リチウムボンベの交換は完了だ。ジョー、一つだけ違うのは、この段ボールのアーチが小さすぎて赤いホースの入口を下にして置けないことと、赤いホースの入口（つまり入口）が横向きになっていることだけど、それで
Хорошо, Джек. Следующий шаг — разместить контейнеры командного модуля с прикрепленными шлангами в подходящем месте так, чтобы нижняя часть контейнера имела
Роджер. Всё верно. Хочу уточнить, что D
अरे, आप कुछ चीज़ें पहले से ही साफ़ करना चाहते 
Roger, verste
Roger. Verstanden,
알겠습니다. ISOL 밸브를 닫고, TCA 차단기는 닫힌 상태로 유지하고, 크로스피드를 닫고, 다음 두 개의 디스플레이를 여세요. 세 개의 차단기가 모두 열려 있
嘿，弗雷德，听
Houst
您希望我的电脑开关打开，空调电源开关设置为 ACME
Okay. After that, CB CTE, MAIN B, to close. Next, panel 250: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2 to close; CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING to close. Next, panel 275: CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B, to close; CB INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B, to close. Okay. Incidentally, a
रॉजर। क्या आप
Ok. Abbiamo perso il controllo lì. Abbiamo cambiato OMNI. Solo per me, per m
Roger. Ver
好的，那就太好了。下次，
Vance, nach meinen Berechnungen haben wir etwa zehn Foto
了解。いい話だ。ジャック、もう一つだけ教えてほしいことがある。OPTICSのジッターはアポロ12号の時と非常に似ているということだ。問題ないが、
Okay. 8, /: 45701, minus 040, plus 157 , plus 33195, minus 01267, plus 04716 179 008 001, NA, plus 00187 33552 311 33355 42 09090 252, Dzuba down 060, left 4.2, plus 0773, minus 16500 12982 36256; Sirius, 
चूंकि आप पहले से ही यात्रा पर हैं, इसलिए आपको यह जानकर शायद दिलचस्पी हो कि ह्यूस्टन की ज्योतिषी रूबी ग्राहम का कहना है कि चंद्रमा की आपकी यात्रा के लिए सभी संकेत अनुकूल हैं। उनका कहना है कि नील चतुर है, माइक में अच्छी समझ है और बज़ जटिल समस्याओं को सुलझाने में माहिर है। उनका यह भी कहना है कि नील दुनिया को गुलाबी चश्मे से देखने की प्रवृत्ति रखता ह
Мы ещё вернёмся к подробностям о том, что здесь находится, но, похоже, здесь собрано практически всё разнообразие форм, угловатости, зернистости, все виды горных пород, какие только можно найти. Цвета — н
Okay. At 23 hours the total is 1121, quad A is 274, quad Bravo is 286, quad Charlie i
안녕하세요, 머큐리 복구팀 여러분. 오로라 세
ठीक है, फ्रेड। मुझे बैकग्रा
Да. Что ж, я сейчас их выключу и посмотрю, что будет. Хорошо. Основное питание выключено. Оно работало семь минут, пока мы были на высокой скорости подачи кислорода. Хорошо, через три часа уровень кислорода упал до 62 процентов. Это на два процента м
ठीक है। हमने अंतरिक्ष यान और प्रक्षेपण यान के मार्गदर्शन की जाँच कर ली है। दोनों ठीक लग रहे हैं। हमारा अनुमान है कि प्रक्षेपण यान में मार्गदर्शन में रुकावट आने की संभावना 99 प्रतिशत से अधिक है, इसलिए सब कुछ ठीक चल रहा है। आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें, हमें लगभग 1 मिनट तक टीवी पर दिखाई देने वाली तस्वीर मिली, इसलिए सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहा है। आ
रॉजर। क्या आप सूट फ्लो कंट्रोल खोलना चाह
Oh, das wäre schön. Ich habe Lovell aber unter die Couch geschickt. Hi
好的。我
でも、マイク、いい
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। नियंत्रण प्रणाली के संचालन पर एक अवलोकन: ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि जब भी मैं मैन्युअल या फ्लाई-बाय-वायर मोड पर लंबे समय तक पैंतरेबाज़ी करता हूँ, तो किसी न किसी तरह जाइरो
おはようございます、アポロ8号。デイクです。管制センターの全員、そしてきっと世界中の皆さんを代表して、メリークリス
रॉजर। अगर आप सम्राट के ब्रश करते समय उन्हें परेशान न करें, तो कृपया प्राथमिक संचायक की मात्रा थोड़ी बढ़ा दें। टीएम पर अभी यह मात्रा 20.6 प्रतिशत दिखा रही है। आपके गायब होने के बाद से यह थोड़
Non molto bagliore: solo un po'. Lettura 0,5 g. L'Aux Damp sembra funzionare bene. Spero che il carburante regg
Cinq minutes et quinze secondes se sont écoulées depuis le
그리고 마이크에게 전할 메시지가 여기 있어요. "진딧물이
そう
It looks like in our power-down (illegible) we're still pulling just a little less than 11 amps. We've got 10 on no. 1 and a little less than 11 on no. 2. The tether - the location of the tether or the umbilical restraint on the outside hatch made it rather difficult to do any EVA work as far as free tether aerodynamics out in front of the spacecraft. Whenever I'd be operating out in that area, the tether would - when it would come to its end would start me back and the reaction would carry me back up towards the - over the spacecraft and back toward the 
COMMANDE DE MODE - AUTO. DÉSACTIVATION DE LA COMMA
ヒューストン、わかりました。中央のパネル、インジケーターAを見ています。パッケージ温度は約180度です。ヘリウム圧力は3900度です。燃料圧力は約180度で、パーセンテージは約85%
Mann, das stand do
稍等。杰克，
Houston, Apollo 11. Come si l
没错，这
Stavo giusto dando un'occ
रॉजर। धन्यवाद, ब्रूस। दूसरे मुद्दे पर एक और बात, हम सब... जाने से प
看来接下来
Das ist bestätigt. Okay. Wenn Sie bereit sind, es zu verstehen, h
Guaymas, Gémeaux 4. Sachez que j'ai enlevé mon casque et que je
제미니 
رو
...और हम 
로저. 마이크, 당신은 5륜 구동입니다. OMNI 설정은
Водоле
Понял. Я собираюсь увеличить значение регулятора охлаждающей жидкости на костюме до 7. Сейчас я в автоматическом режиме, гироскопы
سيكون النجم 37 مناسبًا لمعايرة البصريات. ولم نلاحظ أي شيء حتى الآن بعد وصلة الإرسال المتجهة الخاصة بنا.
Ist das für Sie in Ord
Аполлон-8, 
저
रॉजर। "एक्टिवेशन" के अंतर्गत, मैंने एएसए स
네. 조종석에서는 정말 큰 장점
اترك مفتاح التحكم في الموقف (ATCA (PGNS)) مغلقًا؛ يجب إغلاق أربعة قواطع في الصف الثالث. السخان، ومكيف الإشارة 1، ومفتاح التحكم في الموقف (ATCA (PGNS))، والتحكم المباشر في الموقف
Как чи
よし、ヴァンス。カートリッジMODのためにいくつかアイテムを発見した。一つは、トートバッグに使う予定だった特殊な防塵カバーバッグ。かなり厚くて通気性のないものだ。それから、2階のキッチンに行って何度か水を抜いて、また大量のドリンクバッグを作った。それから、パントリーから、ドリンクバッグが入っているプラ​​スチック製のかなり大きな密閉容器を取り出してきた。ハサミで切って、テープ
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। फिलहाल सभी सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहे हैं। अब हाई-फायर 
안녕하세요, 
D'accord.
روجر، درجة حرارة البدلة 70. در
おい、1番待
你的太空舱读数偶尔会快 1 秒，然后
Apollo 8, Hou
لا، الأمر يتعلق
Okay. Apollo 8. Looks like we're going to have to put this COMM test off because of some tracking requirements. We can do it in about an hour if this will not interfere with your present operations too much. It'll take maybe 15 to 20 minutes, and it will involve some conversation on the part of the people onboard the spacecraft. So if that's going to interfere with your sleeping and all, why go ahead and we'll defer to that and we'll pick these requirements up at another time. And, 
ジム、次回都合が良ければ、コマンドモジュールの REPRESS パッケージの読み出し情報
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。没反应。马德里站的一台指令计算机出了故障。我们不得不暂时切换到阿
Okay. Verstanden. Sie haben den Hauptalarm mit der Kontrollleuchte. Wir können jetzt mit der Verbindung zu den Kanistern des Kommandomoduls beginnen. Als Erstes möchte ich wissen, ob Sie den roten Schlauch des Kommandanten an den zweiten Kanisterbeutel angeschlossen hab
不，我当时正在尝试记录时间，16 65，但不知怎么的，在我输入 VERB 32 ENTER 之前，它就跳到了 6
Roger, Eagle. You're five by
Хорошо. Это примерно максимальный объем звонков, который мы можем принять здесь; поэт
好的，迈克。我们接到通知，请你断开信号调节器上的黄色连接器，确认其外观正常后再重新连接。然后，如果你方便的话
One thing about it, when E
아주 좋습니다. 제가 이걸 찾느라 좀 애썼습니다. 자, 이제 피치를 고정하겠습니다. 요도 고정하고, 롤도 멈추겠습니다. 죄송하지만 플레어는 보이지 
罗杰，巴兹。望远镜怎么样了
はい
O
Forza Housto
Okay. One hour is fine. It's j
C'est
알겠습니다. 복사했습니다. 짐, 
了解。待
별자리 지도 컴퓨터에서 1시
好的，13号。这里是休斯顿。我们观察到燃料电池3的氧气流量似乎不足。所以，请您关闭燃料电池3上的反应阀。看
안 돼, 브
하와이 상공에서 저희는 귀하께서 스위치 위치를 알려주실
Hello, Roger, this is Friendship Seven. Loud and clear with you also. Are we still go from Control Cen
Roger, Canton. You did read that I was in retro? You did read that I had my maneuver off? You did read my gyros were normal? I
Хорошо. Да, это так, но мне придётся ослабить кре
..
... Ich ha
わかった、ジャック。クワッドチャーリーのDROP ISOLバルブをリセットするつもりはなかったん
Pour information, la couverture nuageuse est de cinq dixièmes et se situe à seulement un huitième au nord de Port Moresby; donc si vous apercevez des lumières dan
Roger. Noch sechs Minuten. Ich glaube, du bist gleich bereit, die Gimbal-Motoren und so weiter einzuschalten. Okay. Wir sehen de
Ora guardo fuori dalla finestra, Jack, e la Terra sta arri
はい、待機しておきます
Rice
Roger, turn OFF th
네, 
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы сейчас попробуем скопировать вашу ленту. Запас прочности цепи в нашей нынешней конфигурации не оче
Okay. Really what this does for you, then, is it gives you a pressure - a tunnel pressure integrity - or a hatch pressure integary - integrity check with a DELTA-P of 3 psi between the
Salut Jim. Jim, ici Houston. Salut Gemini 
알겠습니다, 짐. 원격 측정 데이터를 보여드리겠습니다. 새로운 자세가 안정적으로 보입니다. 참고로, 최신 추적 데이터에 따르면 페리신시온은 136마일 이상에서 유지되고
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Зарядка батарей завершена, и отчет о состоянии экипажа выглядит следующим образом: радиация, CDR 11002, CMP 10002, 
Roger. Wir prüfen das. Wir geben dann grüne
Okay. Die Erde zog – sie zog gerade eben – deutlich über
確かに、この距離では5万マイル（約8万キロメートル）離れたところで楽しんだような色の深みはありません。しかし、海は依然とし
- 
The Flight Surgeon would like to know if either one of you had any trouble with drying around th
Хорошо. Мы попробовали оба варианта. Если автоматический выключатель находится в положении RESET, когда я его сбрасываю, я получаю 902 04 40. Когда я его сейчас отпускаю, я получаю 902 04 49. 
Судя по всему, в Вашингтоне, где сегодня вечером должен был состояться Матч всех звёзд, идёт сильны
روجر، هذه فريندشيب 7. الوقود: 90-98%. 
ठीक है। प्लस 90: /G&N, 63825, माइनस 1.54, प्लस 1.32, माइनस 0491.7, प्लस 0000.1, प
Qui s'y connaît en objectifs zoom? Celui-ci va de 12,5 à 75 mm; j'imagine que c'es
روجر. الخطوة 9 هي أ. الخطوة 10: قاطع الدائرة 16، العاكس 2، مفتوح. انتهى
没错，13。我记得飞行计划上说，热狗上应该放芥末而不是番茄酱，不过
友情セブン。早すぎた
स्थानीय समाचारों में एक और छोटी सी खबर: हंट्सविले स्थित काउंटी कोर्ट हाउस कल सुबह भोर से पहले जलकर राख हो गया, इसलिए लगता है कि अब वहां निर्माण कार्य फिर से शुरू करना पड़ेगा। प्रतीक्षा कर रहे परिवारों के बारे में एक छोटी सी जानकारी। यह पोस्ट रिपोर्टर ऐन जेम्स द्वारा है। क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या पर वैलेरी एंडर्स ने कहा, "हम चंद्रमा के पिछले हिस्से पर आराम कर रहे हैं," जब वह और उनका परिवार अपोलो 8 के चंद्रमा की कक्षा से बाहर निकलने और घर की ओर लौटने का इंतजार कर रहे थे। श्रीमती एंडर्स मंगलवार की सुबह 12 बजे से घर पर थीं, और पड़ोसियों ने सभी बच्चों को इकट्ठा कर लिया था ताकि परिवार को कुछ आराम मिल सके जब तक कि अंतरिक्ष यान चंद्रमा के पीछे है और संचार से बाहर है। कर्नल फ्रैंक बोरमैन के घर को बाहर चार बड़े सदाबहार फूलों की मालाओं से सजाया गया था और उस पर हल्की बर्फ गिरी हुई थी और लाल धनुषों से सजाया गया था। बैठक में एक पेड़ उनके सुरक्षित लौटने की प्रतीक्षा कर रहा है, और उनकी सुंदर गोरी पत्नी सू और हट्टे-कट्टे बेटे फ्रेडरिक और एडविन, चंद्रमा की कक्षा से आधी रात को होने वाले विस्फोट के लिए घर पर रहने की योजना बना रहे हैं। आमतौर पर, वे सेंट क्रिस्टोफर एपिस्कोपल चर्च में आधी रात की प्रार्थना सभा में शामिल होते हैं। योजना रात 12 बजे परिवार के लौटने की थी। बोरमैन परिवार में छोटे बच्चे नहीं हैं, इसलिए क्रिसमस के तोहफे देने का सिलसिला कर्नल बोरमैन के चांद पर जाकर वापस आने के शानदार तोहफे के आने तक टल गया। कैप्टन लवेल की व्यस्त पत्नी ने बताया कि उनके चार बच्चों का क्रिसमस बिल्कुल सामान्य रहेगा; लेकिन तोहफों की बात करना मुमकिन नहीं था क्योंकि उनमें से दो उनके बगल में ही बैठे थे। श्रीमती लवेल ने कहा, "मुझे तो कल रात पहने हुए कपड़े बदलने का भी समय नहीं मिला।" हालांकि, बड़ों के बीच तोहफे बांटे जाएंगे और लवेल के घर लौटने पर क्रिसमस ट्री वहीं लगा होगा। एक्शन लाइन पर एक मजेदार खबर है। एक्शन के संपादक को एक छोटा सा पत्
こちらもはっきりと聞こえました。レーダー追
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。急いで部屋を暖めるもう一つの方法
Ç
يسهل رصده للغاية. يمكنك رؤية حواف الفوهات بأكملها من هنا، وبالطبع الهلال الأبيض على الجانب البعيد حيث
알겠
Зд
Je ne pense pas pouvoir terminer les photos du MIT cette fois-ci.
ठीक है। आरएन, आरपी, प्लस 77, 400 फुट नाममात्र पर पिच कोण; सुधार, 400,000 फुट नाममात्र; आरईटी 400,000 फुट, 22 प्लस 02; ब्लैकआउट
Да, то шумно, то нет, Джерри. Здесь было довольно шумно, а всякий раз, когда кто-то отвечает на сообщение, это обычно будит. Но в целом, это
Okay, bei minus 30 Sekunden werden die Zünder scharfgeschaltet 
マイク、ちょっと湿ってきたぞ。マイク、再生音が聞こえるぞ。車内がちょっと湿ってきたぞ。車内の湿気を少しでも取り
좋습니다. 기동
حسنًا. تشير البيانات إلى أن نقطة الحضيض في الفراغ تبلغ حاليًا 23.6 درجة، بزاوية مسار طيران سالبة قدرها 6.25 درجة. هذا بدون مناورة منتصف المسار. وهو يفكر ف
我们已清楚地收到您的信息，并将随时准备接受您的
是的。所有挂在我身上的绳子都会
好的。我想你需要准备的设备有：两个指令舱的氢氧化锂罐、一卷灰色胶带、两个S形容器（因为我们要用到S形容器里的袋子），还有一张提示卡——就是那种纸板提示卡，你要从圆环边缘剪掉大约一英寸半。我想这就是我们需要
Roger, Houston
Apollo 8, Houston. Lo abbiamo chiesto di nuovo e sembra che non ci siano problemi a pro
Oui, 
是
了解、右ヨーは無し、推力は低め。オーバー
حسنًا. كما ترون، هو يأخذ مقصه ويقص الطرف البلاستيكي لفوهة صغيرة سيضع فيها مسدس الماء. يُطلق مسدس الماء 
مرّت من جهتي. كانت الشمس 
はい、はい。さて、残り時間はマイナス3時間、つまり次のタイムイベントまで残りわずかです。そこで、いわゆる「ムーンビュー姿勢」への操作を開始します。この操作は、司令船の光学系を月に向けて0度になるように
Gemini 4, Gemini 4. Это RKV CA
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ゴールドストーンへの引き継ぎが近づいていますが、その時もダウンリンクは改善
휴스
حسناً يا جو، لقد ظهر ضوء تحذي
D'
罗杰。弗雷德现在被换班了。他回去休息了。这位是洛弗尔，他接替他的工作
Хорошо. Давайте я перечитаю это здесь... порядок... ПИТАНИЕ, ВЫКЛ. Цифровое освещение, прожекторы и встроенное освещение, три из них, ВЫКЛ. Панель 101, нагреватели для слива мочи, слив мочи — ВЫКЛ, слив сточных вод — ВЫКЛ. Панель 122, лампы кондиционирования, ВЫКЛ. Панель 201, подогреватель пищи, ВЫКЛ. Панель 225, добавить дополн
オーロラセブン、カ
ठीक है। यह बैट बेकर को चार्ज करने की प्रक्रिया है। पैनल 3; बैट चार्ज, बंद; पैनल 5; मेन बस टाई, बैट एसी से एसी; सीबी बैट चार्जर, बैट ए चार्ज, खुला; सीबी बैट चार्जर, बैट बी चार्ज, बंद। पैनल 2
... 
لقد لطخت زجاج سيارت
معدلك حتى بمعدلك الحالي - لديك 5 أو 
Сейчас мы приближаемся к ряду небо
好的，正如你所看到的，我们正在向
جيميني 8، آر كي في كاب كوم.
Nous supprimons l'étape intermédiaire 3 et nous avons avancé l'entrée à 55 heures. Nous suivrons donc simplement toutes les procédures menant à l'entrée
ところで、ジャック、あなたはどうやっ
حسنًا. أعلم أنك تحاول التزام الهدوء، لذا سأقرأ لك بعض المعلومات. من بين الأمور التي توصلنا إليها مؤخرًا والتي قد تمنحك بعض الاطمئنان، أنه في حال فقدان خزان الأكسجين المبرد، يتبقى لديك 80 رطلاً عند /. العامل المحدد لتشغيل الطائرة بخزان واحد حاليًا هو خزان الهيدروجين الذي يتمتع بهامش أمان عن
Oh, ich weiß es nicht. Ich schätze, es lag ungefähr anderthalb oder zwei 
Roger. We've been looking at your systems data on playback, and everything i
Vance，我不知道我们是从哪里中断的。我刚才说了，我们完全按照你说的步骤操作的。现在到了SEP的关键部分，也就是我说“选择最佳OMNI”的地方。但是，我们
Рог. Я не уверен, в чем была проблема, когда мы спустились так близко, но скажу т
L'inclinazione del campo da baseball è di cir
Das is
그리
मेरे क्वांटिटी गेज पर दिखाई देने वाले ईंधन की मात्रा और यहां मौजूद रेट्रोफायर की मात्रा के बीच कुछ ऐसा 
两辆巴士都正常
Okay. REPRESS, SERVICE MODULE O2 SU
好的。关于定向测试——我触摸了手动操纵杆；我触摸了时钟，以及时钟上方大约10
好的，吉姆。差不多该你方便的时候再测一下指令模块的电压和电流了。告诉你
D'accord, Owen. Je tiens à te remer
네, 맞습니다. 다시 말씀드리지만, X 7.7, Y
حسناً، كل شيء يسي
Roger. Stand 68:00 Uhr: Gesamt minus 4,5 Prozent, entsprechend etwa minus 53 Pfund. Alpha minus 6,0 Prozent, minus 1,0 Prozent, minus 7,0 Prozent, minus 3,0 Prozent; H₂ gesamt mi
Роджер. Мы видим, что температура на выходе радиатора топливного элемента 2 составляет около 90 градусов, а на элементах 1 и 3 она немного ниже — может быть, 75 или 80 градусов. Примерно час назад вы спрашивали о
Sì, stiamo emettendo
روجر. سأفعل ذلك على أي حال، ويسعدني أن أسم
잭, 이건 전반적인 상황 파악을 위한 말씀입니다. 어제보다 기온이 6~8도 정도 낮아진 것 같습니다. 모든
Apollo 8, while we are waiting for the high gain, I will continue the trajectory summary. We can still get back to the mid-Pacific line in from the thirteenth, and you are on your way after 138 seconds of the burn. That's 138 seconds, gets you clear of the butterfly region. We recommend not trying preignitions or restarts after 20 seconds. If you go beyond 20 seconds, this may get the trajectory beyond the correction - correction capability to a free return. The weather in recovery area is good. We have an fol
Новые данные: 50,40 Тета, 7,9; R, 92,22; общее изменение с
حسناً. مفهوم
Ok, Fred-o. Ok. Questa è "Entrata, PREPARAZIONE". Inizia meno 6 ore. A quel punto, accendi l'ACS. Credo che ti
Okay, Jim. Verstanden. Zuerst sollten Sie für den nächsten Brennvorgang die einzelnen Sicherungen des Stromkreises sorgfältig prüfen und die Stromversorgung einschalten. Daran arbeiten wir bereits. Zweitens benötigen Sie eine Anleitung zum erneuten Einschalten des Steuermoduls, falls Sie es er
Salut Ed, tu sais qu'on a toujours dit qu'on allait faire une rentrée en boucle ouverte. Je suis bien plus content que ce soit l'ordinateur qui ait lâché 
짐, 방
روجر، فرانك. كيف تبدو
Хорошо, Джим. Это хорошая обратная связь, и в случае потери связи используйте процедуры, которые я вам дал. Возможно, до завтра эти процедуры немного изменятся, поэтому мы
わかりました。トム、ちょっと読
收到。我们尝试发送信号，但听起来你那边的麦克风好像卡
大约16:03，当我们最后一次飞越加利福尼亚湾墨西哥一侧时，飞
What we'll do Charlie, tomorrow, is go through and reconfigure our stowage as closely as possible to nominal. Some things that will not be nominal are as follows: the visors were brought back into the command module, and we have not yet found a home for them. We'll let you know where they go. In addition, there's about 5 pounds of miscellaneous weight from the in 
Oh là là, ça va ê
حسنًا. الاسم 61؛ ناقص 21.67، ناقص 165
Houston, Aquari
로저. 자, 시작합니다: 5, / 45701, -0.43, +116, +31171, -0.0767, -0.0214 180 017 0.01, NA, +0.0188 31181 259 31003 40 2711 398 0.33, 아래 0.43, 왼쪽 23, +0.832, -16500, +12956 36208. 설정된 별들은 동일합니다. 여유 공간 - 15초 동안 쿼드 
Перейти только к запи
स
アポロ8号、こちらヒュース
Ehi, Ken, se vedi qualcosa avvicinarsi al blocco cardanico, di' alla gente di stare attenti e di 
休斯顿
ヒューストン、水瓶座。ジャックにとっては、ドッキングした粗い海底索の方が早いように思え
Roger. Ho alcune informazioni per te su questo argomento che approfondiremo subito dopo il prossimo esercizio. Vorremmo che questa volta provassi l'assetto muso nord, ovvero un beccheggio di 180° e un'imbardata di 315°, e vorremmo anche dare un'altra occhiata a questa modalità libera e pensiamo che forse otterremo un po' di s
저는 외과의입니다. 이 과정에서 어떤 이유로든 보조 산소 공급 
D'accord. Avez-vous entendu le CAP COM du Cap parler - le CAP COM de Houston vous c
Роджер. Поскольку вы сейчас находитесь на OMNI D (Dog), фаза для высокоэффективных антенн с синхронизацией сигнала смещена примерно на 180 градусов. Как только мы см
रॉजर। फ्लेयर टेस्ट शुरू होने वाला है। तैयार रहें। मार्क 00 [प्लस] 58 प्लस 30। चारों फ
收到。
Et c'est tout ce que j'ai de Ho
Zur Information: Die letzten beiden Sterne, 34 und 40, wurden an der äußersten Spitze des beleuchteten Randes aufgenommen. Man muss sich den Rand quasi vorstellen, der sich über die Stelle hinaus, an der e
روجر
시그마 세븐, 시그마 세븐입니다. 여기는 무체아 캡 컴
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. 
Abbiamo ottenuto 5337,3 e 32,8 piedi al
Фрэнк, судя по всему, с памятью компьютера, кроме W-матр
好的，11. 这里是休斯顿。在飞行计划中大约 22:30 的位置，在您的睡眠后检查清单以及所有其他睡
روجر، انتظر. ع
Хорошо. Просто для уточнения. Начинается все с панели 3, переключатель ЗАРЯДКИ АККУМУЛЯТОРА, ВЫКЛ; ИНВЕРТОР ПЕРЕМЕННОГО ТОКА 2, ВЫКЛ; панель 5, ГЛАВНАЯ ШИНА, АККУМУЛЯТОР ПЕРЕМЕННОГО ТОКА, ВКЛ, вверх 
알겠습니다. 좋
Я, наверное, останусь на
相机安装在支架上，我把它存放在副支柱上
ジャック、了解です。お願いです。終了する前に、電圧と電流の通常の測定値を
速度增量为 42.5；持续时间 53 秒；偏航角修正
Roger. Wir hatten 2 Minuten und 23 Sekunden. Unser – Moment. Kor
نحن على أهبة الاستعداد لنسخ قراءات لوحة عرض 
Be
アポロ11号、アポロ11号、こちらはヒューストン。ブラインド放送中。もし聞こ
रॉजर। मुझे समझ आ रहा है कि आपने इसे दो बार ठीक करने की कोशिश की, दोनों बार भाप का दबाव शून्
يستقر ضبط زاوية الميل عند قيمة تزيد قليلاً عن 2، ويتذبذب بين 2 و2.
Si vous l'alignez avec une poussée de 90 cm/s, et que vous êtes décalé de 10 degrés sur la plateforme, i
Roger. Mon état est bon, celui de la capsule aussi. Je suis en vol dérivant en pilotage manuel. Les gyroscopes sont en sécurité. Le niveau de carburant est de 45 à 42 %, et celui d'oxygène de 79 à 100 %. La température des évents de vapeur est de 65 degrés; la température de la combinaison a bien baissé. Elle est maintenant de 62 degrés, et toute l'alimentation électrique est bonne. Ma tension artérielle commence à remonter. Je viens de prendre
Ho
Это «Интрепид». Похоже, вы приземлитесь в 5 
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. تصحيح المسار رقم ٢. SPS/G&N ٦٣٠٥٩، زائد ٠٩٧، ناقص ٠٢٠، الإشعال ٠٢٦٤٤ ٥٧٩٢، زائد ٠٠١١٨، ناقص ٠٠٠٠٣، زائد ٠٠١٧٧، لفة ٢٧٧ ٣٥٥ ٠١٥، الكتلة غير متوفرة، دلتا-VT ٠٠٢١٣ ٠٠٣ ٠٠١٦٨، نجم السدس ٣٠ ٢٠٨٢ ٣٧٠. باقي لوحة القيادة غير متوفرة. المحاذاة: فيغا ودينيب. محاذاة اللفة ٠٠٧ 
Je pensais que ce s
Beh, certo, la Terra è piuttosto luminosa, e il cielo nero, invece di essere nero, ha una sorta di bagliore rosato. La stella, a meno che non sia molto luminosa, probabilmente si perde da qualche parte in quel bagliore, 
自分がどの方向を向いているのかは分からな
Il rasoio
Близнецы VI, CSQ. Вы говорите о воде — замерзшая вода появляется за водон
Ce l'abbiamo
11, Хьюстон. Сканирование на камере делает изображение немного лучше. Фонарик, кажется, мерцает из-за сканирования на телевизоре. Мы не видим орла. Теп
了解。中央の山
Avremmo dovu
收到。我发送 18-1 TR 时间时，
Вторичный контур охлаждения выглядел действительно хорошо. Похоже, у вас был хорошо герметичный радиатор, и все остальное работало в соответствии с рабочими кривыми. Во время нашей проверки оба ваших основных кислородных регулятора наполнились до 104 psi. Учитывая лунную орбиту, ожидайте кипение воды со скоростью около 1 фунта в час, и это лишь приблизительная оценка; существует довольно много разных оценок относительно того, какими могут быть требования к кипению воды, от сильного кипения до полного отсутствия кипения. Следующий сброс воды состоится позже, так что вам не нужно беспокоиться об этом, пока вы не закончите. Прогнозы связи выглядят многообещающе, возможно, немного лучше, чем мы надеялись, и, похо
好的，乔，
は
روجر، أكرر. من الساعة 5:56 إلى 
ジェミニ4号です。また同じ曲線状の光が見えました。オーロラのような感じですが、私たちの真下
Хорошо. Это ваш дружелюбный самодельный комплект для связи с модулем управле
わかりました、チャーリー。まだあまり開いていません。もう一度シャントさせないと正確な数値を出すのは難しいですが、矢印は1時の方向
سيكون الوقود 
On f
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。我将继续宣读点火状态
आप इसे बहुत ज
Roger. Hawaii Cap Com, hier spricht Sigma Seven. Wie les
Salve, Nave Comando del Pacifico, Nave Comando del Pacifi
はい。キャニスターを使うことにしました。
平移手控器已准备就绪。请准备旋转手控器。我的已经准备就绪了。好的，弗雷德。录音机，高比特率，录音，快进，指令复位。等待59
I generally don't use the subtle approach. You can tell we're feeling pretty good, Va
Хорошо. Думаю, я вернусь и попробую устранить там застой. У вас есть что-ниб
Apollo 8, Houston. Die Q
로저, 아폴로 8호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 이제 목소리가 잘 들립니다. 방금 전까지 배경 
Alcuni di questi crateri sembrano picconi che colpiscono il cemen
रॉजर, अपोलो 8. ह्यूस्टन। अब आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है। कुछ मिनटों तक बैकग्राउ
是的，我感觉非常
D'accord. Jack, 1-A indique 0 (échelle inférieure); 1-B indique 3,45. D'accord. Vous ne vous intéressez qu'aux piles à combustible 1 et 3. D'accord. Ignorez la lecture de 1-B. 1-C in
R
Questo è Sigma Seven. Vado in fly-by-wire basso e sposto il pitch fino all'assetto di rientro. Seleziono il rient
好的，弗雷德。我们刚刚注意到你的饮水量减少了2磅。你们最近喝水了吗？或者你知
ठीक है। हमारे पास आपके लिए और कुछ नहीं 
अपोलो 
Bien. Nous allons effectuer quelques vérifications de communication. Nous allons passer par cinq modes différents, et un seul d'entre eux interrompra vos activités. Dans ce cas précis, nous activerons la liaison vocale
Là où il est indiqué « Et notez », le CMP se trouve dans le sac en forme de L avec les de
ち
Okay. Danke. Wir werden unser Bestes geben, aber es ist gar nicht so einfach. Ma
了解。エリア3デルタ、エリア3
Das ist richtig. Okay, jetzt erhalten Sie vom Boden ein Update bei -2 + 15. Das ist der Z
네. 제가 아는 한, 저희 중 누구도 약을 복용하지 않았고, 지금 휴식에 관해서는 평소 이런 상황에서보다 더 피곤한 것 같지는 않아요.
Роджер, 11. Здесь довольно хорошая я
11, आपके मित्र भूविज्ञानी का कहना है कि अग
الطبق
了解、フレッド。あと一つ手順がある。これで終了だ。針
वे अपना ब्लोडाउन पैंतरा 
Bien, et nous aim
Si
好的。首先要确认交流电已接通，也就是面板 16 上的逆变器 2 断路器已闭合。然后，在面板 11 的“飞行显示”部分，我们需要确认 GASTA 和 COMMANDER 的断路器已闭合。同样在面板
حسنًا، كنتُ سأخبركم للتو عن عملية التسليم التي أجرينا
好
Я не видел никаких огней, значит, они не видели сигнала, так что всё выглядит хорошо. Вклю
मुझे लगता है अब मुझे स्टोरेज बैग में यूटिलिटी लाइट दिख रही है। वाह, क्या शानदार तस्वीर है! हम आपको अंदर देख रहे हैं। लगता है ये नील और माइक हैं। वैसे, उम्मीद तो यही ह
Sì, l'ho fatto; solo un sec
Ja, einen Moment. E
Роджер. Подтверждаю. У меня во рту оральный термометр. Хотите, чтобы я подержал его закрытым несколько минут, чтобы вы могли измерить темпера
حسنًا. كان ذلك النجمين 20 و27، وفرق زاوية النجم هو خمس كرا
Okay, Joe. Can
Lì si limitano ad assicurarsi che tu chiuda gli interruttori automatici del riscaldamento. Il prossimo è a pagina E
Хорошо. Всё верно, Джек. А теперь перейдём к процедуре вк
Attendez un peu, Bill. Bill, négatif. La cor
Джек, прежде чем мы начнем читать инструкцию, мы хотели бы... Мы обнаружили, что батарея А полностью заряжена и находится в отличном состоянии. Хотели бы переключиться на батарею В и подзарядить ее еще немного. Дайте ей зарядиться еще 2 часа. У нас есть инструкция из семи-восьми шагов, если вы хотите ее по
روجر. لديك 215 رطلاً من الماء الصالح للاستخدام. وهذا يعني أن متوسط ​​استهلاك الماء المتاح على مدار 61 ساعة سيكون 3.5 رطلاً
イーグル、コロンビア。高ゲイン角は - 修正 - イーグル、ヒ
أعطني مفتاح القراءة الخاص بك في وضع التشغيل - تصحيح، مفتاح الكمية الخاص بك في وضع القراءة لمدة 1
Roger. Laissez-moi y réfléchir, et j
Roger. That wa
Mi sentite? Hanno iniziato a chiudere il p
Майк, ты доволен результатом на данный мом
ضغط المقصورة وم
Va bene. Puoi continuare
ठीक है, जैक। बस जिज्ञासावश पूछ रहा हूँ, क्या आपके पास इस बारे में कोई जानकारी है कि उस हीलियम टैंक के रिसाव ने हमारी यात्रा
Roger. Nous so
मिथु
ठीक है। मुझे
Хорошо
Roger. Wir haben die Daten empfangen und überprüft; du kannst auf deinem Computer zu BLOCK zurückkehren. Und George Low sagt, er arbeitet an dem Fensterproblem bei 6, oder Raumschiff 104. Du hast zufä
Gyros are caged, and the VOX is off. I'm going to select ree
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 지금 시간은 16시 32분 26초입니다. 저희는 당신의 
好的，确认无误。下一步是将主总线连接开关 B/C 拨到“开”的位置，并按上述步骤读取主总线 B 
Okay. That last Joe was execute at the at which is minus 4-1/2 hours; execute a push of 0.5 feet per second, four-jet ullage; then execute SEP followed by a pull of 0.5 feet per second, with respect to a nomenclature on the ; I think we really need an up of 0.5 and then a 
Okay, Aquarius. We're looking at your gimbal and we notice that we got a four-jet ullage loaded in the and we gave you two jets on the pad. But, let's 
Ok. Potresti darme
オーケー、アクエリアス。彼女の姿勢がほぼ整い、必要な距離まで来たら、コントロールモードを試してみて、うまくいくかどうか見てみよう。ちょっと試してみよう。ボールはパワーオン
꽤 큰 파편들이 떠다니고 있네요. 비행 계획은 이제 나왔습니다. 자이로 센서는 12시 33분에 작동을 멈추고, 플라이 바이 와이어 방식으로 부스터를 추적할 겁니다. 음... 추적하기가 쉽지 않네요. 속도가 너무 비슷해서요. 
ジェミニ4、
Okay, Jim. Ich denke, das war's fürs Erste. Wenn Sie keine weiteren Fragen mehr haben, konfigurieren Sie bitte die Sprachausgabe wieder für den Downvoice-Backup. Stellen Sie dazu wie gewohnt den Schalter „VOICE FUNCTION“ auf „DOWNVOICE BACK
И мы рады сообщить, что Зе
ف
3 più 47. È una stima appros
Bene. Per quanto riguarda la prima TV, stiamo perdendo l'antenna ad alto guadagno, e sembra che l'unico modo per ottenere il pass per la prima TV fosse inviarlo a un sito remoto e analizzarlo lì. Quindi accantoneremo l'idea e riprenderemo con la TV programmata. I controlli COMM rimanenti sono del tipo dipendente dall'alto guadagno, e li rimanderemo al completamento della 
SLEWに残しておきます。こちらに中継してください。相手が私を捕まえたかどうか確認してくだ
迈克，你现在看到的是——休斯顿，你现在看到的是西半球。往上看——最上
روجر. وأنا كذلك يا باز. ورقم 11، الزوايا بالنسبة لك هي 1978 للدور
마이너스 2.
Okay. Ci vediamo dall'altra
इसे सुनने के लिए आपक
रॉजर, 11. यह ओरिजिनल कैप कॉम है। शानदार काम के लिए बधाई। आप लोगों ने वाकई बहुत बढ़िया प्रदर्शन किया। मुझे लगता है कि अब आपको थोड़ा आराम कर लेना चाहिए। आज का दिन बहुत लंबा रहा है। उम्मीद है वापसी में आप सभी को अच्छी नींद आएगी। वापस आने पर आपसे मिलने का इं
Ok
روجر، جيم. عندما فقدنا هوائينا هنا، انقطع تسجيل الشريط الخاص بك، لذلك نحن بصدد إعادة لف بعض التسجيلات واستكمال عملية التسجيل، في حال كان بيل يتساءل عما يحدث مع مسجل 
Роджер. Это Friendship Seven на 
Okay. Joe. On the news, Jim would like to hold off a little bit on that, and I want to make a request to FAO, if h
الصداقة سبعة، هذه موشيا كاب كوم. كيف حال
Базз, это Хьюстон. Нам нужно, чтобы вы выключили автоматический выключатель DELTA P вентилятора
Das stimmt, und dazu noch Seite 9. VHF können wir vergessen. Die T
D'accord, Vance. Je viens d'entendre un petit bruit sourd, comme si 
41 минута. Мы переходим к основному сканеру на горизонте, и существенной разницы в работе основного или вторичного сканера нет; пере
Si ha l'illusione di essere su un treno o su un altro veicolo, a causa del ronzio, e si ha la sensazione di essere su un binario di qualche tipo e di stare guidando. Un po' come il rumore di una nave quando si è in
Roger. Ich habe dazu einige Informationen
Nous allons vous enregistrer pour 
حسنًا. سيكون هذا منتصف المحيط الهادئ، 357 152 359 268، زائد 081
알겠습니다. 맞
Roger, Jack. Damit ist dieser Vorgang abgeschlossen. Als Nächstes zeige ich Ihnen, wie Sie über das Kommandomodul die Hauptbusse vorübergehend mit Strom versorgen. Zunächst müssen wir sicherstellen, dass keine Lasten an den Hauptbussen anliegen, alles ausgeschaltet ist und die Busse in Ordnung sind. Anschließend schalten wir die Hauptbusse über die BUS TIE-Motorschalter ein und schalten sie dann durch Ziehen der Sicherungen wieder aus. Die MAIN BUS TIE-Schalter bleiben dabe
11, Houston. We seem to be picking up a few more dust particles now. We see them quite clearly in the scree
Okay, Jim. Just as kind of a lead-in to this procedure that we're going to use for the mid-course to use and it's going to be a manual burn. The attitude will be controlled manually; the start/stop on the engine will be controlled manually. So we have a pretty good vector on you now, and it turns out you're coming in a little bit too shallow. So what that means is we're going to make our bu
分かりました。これらの一口サイズの物体は、機内に大量のパンくずが舞い上がるのを防ぐために設計されました。そのため、一度に口に運べる大きさになっています。これまでの経験から、地球で食べられるような食事よりもずっと進歩できると分かりました。実は、今回の飛行ではパンを持参していて、パンと一緒にハムスプレッドも塗っています。無重力状態でハムを塗るのがいかに簡単か、お見
罗杰
了解、コロンビア。了解しました。結構です。イーグルがセカンダリーループを選択した頃のTEPの読み出しをお願いします
Доброе утро, Хьюстон. Как в
Pannello 3: POWER AMPL su OFF. A proposito, copialo su un pezzo di carta mentre lo leggo, e poi più tardi farò riferimento al tuo primo elenco dove puoi scrivere le cose nel margi
Quello che stiamo cercando, Charlie, è il tempo che conta fino a T2 che sarà uguale a 60 minuti, oppure T3, che sarà 
是的，我们俩都感觉很好
It may be
Okay. The crew is complaining of some
双子
Gemini VIII，CSQ。现在可以重新
ठीक है। मैं अभी 
मुझे लगता है मैंने समझ लिया, बज़। हाँ, बिल्कुल। लेकिन जब उसने वह दूसरा काम किया, तो संज्ञा 20 थी, इसलिए जब उसने 3175 और फिर 002 एंटर दबाया, तो उसने वास्तव में पहले दो वास्तविक सीडीयू स्थानों को लोड किया, और कंप्यूटर ने इसे वास्तविक सीडीयू में तात्कालिक परिवर्तन के रूप में देखा। अपनी टिप्पणियों पर प्रतीक्ष
罗杰。如果你有空的话，我这里有一些关于昨天下午发给你的PAD（飞行参数表）的更新。由于进行了第二次中途修正，+35、+44和+53 PAD所需的DELTA-V略
ヒューストン、こちらはアポロ8号
水は大丈夫。問題ない
Friendship Seven, this is Canton. Our telemetr
هيوستن، كولومبيا. أسمعك بوضوح. كيف حالي
حسنًا. الآن أستخدم القمر الموجود على يساري، وهو حلٌّ ممتاز. سأقوم بتغطية مؤشر الوضعية، ويمكنك مراقبة الانحراف. سأترك الجيروسكوبات حرة، محاولًا اختيار وضع التحكم الإلكتروني المنخفض. سأضع القمر في منتصف النافذة أولًا، مع تثبيت التحكم في الميل والدوران، ثم سأعيد القمر إلى مكانه الصحيح. يقترب القمر م
यहां जमीनी स्तर पर सब कुछ ठीक है। हमें 
Als
好的，
11, Houston. We request that you read, and if the angles come out the same ma
Ok. Abbiamo capito. Ti stiamo inviando un vet
还有阿波罗13号，休斯顿。完毕
Ok, al minuto 70:18 da
네, 잭. 그리고 연료 전지 2의 반응물
ठीक है। मै
D'a
Houston, Eagle. Stai copiando i numeri piuttosto grandi per autonomia e velocità di autonomia in - VERB 83? E ci hai appena fornito u
わかりました。両方試しました。回路ブレーカーが入った状態でリセットすると、902 04 40 が表示されます。今ブレーカーを離すと、902 04
알겠습니다, 짐. 무슨 일이냐면, 고정점을 벗어나면 오차 바늘을 재설정하고 자세 기준을 잃게 됩니다. 새로운 자세 기준을 설정해야 하는데, 이 시점에서는 자세를 제어하고 있기 때문에 원래 자세 기준이 아닐 수도 있습니다. 자, "ENTER"를 누르고, "404 + 0"까지 모두 지워주세요. 404부터 470까지 각 단계를 순
ア
في هيوستن، ع
हम वीएचएफ अल्फा सिंपलेक्स पर सु
لماذا لا تطلب من ميلت أن يمنحك إجازة لمدة 5 دقائق وتتناول هم
Okay. Ich denke, wir werden Folgendes tun: Wenn ich sehe, dass die hohe Verstärkung die Scan-Grenze deutlich überschreitet, bevor die mechanische Grenze erreicht ist, werde ich fragen – Sie könnten fragen, ob die 
Okay. I think it would be better if you got your checklist out on 97, and we could walk you through it, and that way I could probably get the story straight. O
Roger. Stavamo controlla
Okay. Da das direkte Sonnenlicht durch das Fenster derzeit außerhalb des Sichtfelds der Fernsehkamera liegt, möchten wir Si
11
Neil, questa è Houston. Dopo i tubi del nucleo e l'eolico solare, qualsiasi altra
好的，杰克。我们来讨论一下如何调整姿态，然后进行点火。我指的是控制技术。现在看来，我会尝试让飞船在偏航状态下停止，地球就在我的窗口外，然后我们会进入制导模式或控制模式；偏航时，我们会进入模式控制。然后我们会使用……来控制俯仰，再控制滚转。我想不出除了使用……之外，我们
Il naso 
Apoll
我刚才
收到。关于食物和饮水报告，两位飞行员都已食用两餐。稍后我们会统计饮水量。客舱温度为 84 度。飞
9, 8, 7, 6, 5, 중단 단계, 엔진 암 상승, 진
Возвращаемся к основно
알겠습니다. 14번째 줄, HEATERS SYSTEM A/B-1 항목에서 QUA
いいえ、まだです - 十分小さいです - DELTA
Apollo 11, Houston. D'après nos observations depuis le milieu de la trajectoire, nous affichons un gamma de -6,57. Ce chiffre est préliminaire, et nous pensons qu'après quelques suivis supplémentaires, la trajectoire devrait se stabiliser et nous pourrons l'ajuster précisément dans le couloir d'atterrissage. Nous sommes quasiment au centre du couloir; tout semble bien se passer. Nous vous enverrons un plan d'entrée dans quelques heures, avant que vous n'alliez vous coucher. Et de la part de nos amis des affaires publiques, voici quelques informations, outre votre vol. Vous êtes toujours au centre de l'actualité. Cependant, il y a d'autres choses intéressantes pour vous. Comme je l'ai mentionné précédemment, le match des étoiles a été annulé en raison de la pluie. Il aura lieu demain. Cependant, le président Nixon ne pourra pas y assister comme prévu. Nous vous tiendrons informés des résultats. De plus, la météo sera clémente. Nos prévisions indique
35 degrees. 35 degrees. 750. Coming down to
Okay, Jack. CB-Batterieladegerät an Netzstrom anschließen, schließen. Warten. Okay. Ich musste hier eine Lampe besorgen. CB-B
好的，汤姆。你都明白了。接下来
로저, 마지막 부분은 잘 못 들었어요. 통신 상태가 좀 나
わかりました。準備はできています。もし承認していただける
어휴, 당신은 약하군요. 하지만 당신을 읽을 수 있어요. 당신은
روجر. ا
ठीक है, वॉली, मुझे अपने केबि
알겠습니다. 목적은 근지점 + 2시간 후 중단입니다.:; +1633.0, -0014.5
Dort, wo „Und beachten Sie“ steht, befindet sich der Helm des CMP zusammen mit den be
こちらフレンドシップ7号、無人機で放送しています。日の出が潜望鏡の向こうから昇ってきました。潜望鏡の中では、日の出は鮮やかでした。地平線に近づき、昇ってくるにつれて、鮮やかな赤色に輝いていました。そして、私が窓の外を見上げた時、文字通り何千もの小さな発光粒子がカプセルの
और एक बार फिर, हमें थोड़ा सा नज़रिया बदलने की ज़रूरत है। हमारी पृथ्वी ऊपर और दाईं ओर गायब हो रही है। हमारी पृथ्वी और आपकी पृथ्वी। गलत दिशा, गलत दिशा। थोड़ा और। ठीक है। अगर आप इसे वहीं रोक सकते ह
صحيح، هكذا قر
ح
Le système de guidage du lanceur semble fonctionner correctement. Nous estimons à plus de 99 % la probabilité d'une coupure du guidage du lanceur. Tout semble donc se dérouler sans encombre. Pour information, MLA a reçu environ une minute d'image TV exploitable; le système fonctionne donc apparemment. Vous êtes à un peu plus d'une minute de la ligne de visée à Canary; le point d'impact à Tananarive est à 2 heures,
罗杰。请于 08:23 
لقد قمتُ بالتبديل إلى وضع الإرسال والتسجيل الصوتي (VOX). أنا راضٍ عن إمكانية رؤية الانحراف عبر النافذة دون استخدام الشبكة، وذل
罗杰，11。更正一下我上次说的。73:20 时，我们把新系统上线给你。73:30 时，请你把
Apollo 8, Houston. Tre posizioni dell'interruttore. 
Роджер, Хьюстон. Несколько слов о нашей системе оптического слежения. Я использовал функцию AUTO OPTICS для контрольных точек 1 и 2 на задней стороне, и она сработала превосходно, отслеживая обе цели. Затем я перешел к контрольной точке 3, указанной в нашей книге орбитального управления, чтобы посмотреть заданные мне широту и долготу, и использовал AUTO OPTICS для отслеживания в этой конкретной системе координат, и она оказалась очень близка к фактической траектории слежения. Я выбрал там метку, где сделал окончательную разметку и записал широту и долготу. Сейчас я собираюсь подня
Ricevuto. Ti ho ricevuto forte e chi
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。了解。
Ok, Apollo 8. Siamo pronti per il controllo delle comunicazioni, e la scelta è tua. Possiamo chiamare gli interruttori e lasciarteli posizionare, oppure possiamo comandarli da terra. In entrambi i casi, ci saranno un paio di interruttori che dovrai az
11, du hast ein ziemlich großes Publikum. Die Sendung wird live in den
はい、バーン カードの 3 行目では、STAB/CONTROL CB がすべて CLOSED になっている必要がありますが、CB(11) は OPEN、ABORT STAGE は OPEN、AELD は OPEN、CB (16) A
Хорошо. Четыре нагревателя будут закрыты; дисплеи — открыты; S-диапазонная антенна — закрыта; последовательность камер — 
저희
Ich glaube, die Welt dreht sich wirklich. Ich kann jetzt einige meiner Landmassen sehen. Australien muss unten sein, und ich vermute
Roger. Give me your fuel, ple
D'accord, Bill. Nous approchons des observations, et nous craignons qu'en passant directement à l'orientation, le drone Charlie ne surchauffe. Nous aimerions donc que vous manœuvriez pour orienter l'axe X négatif vers le soleil. Voici quelques angles de cardan. Si nous le positionnons ainsi et pointons l'axe X négatif vers le soleil d'ic
Roger, okay. We'll do tha
想知道世界上发生了什么事吗？嗯，太空人队以 8 比 3 击败了辛辛那提队。拉斯蒂·斯陶布击出了一支本垒打。还有，在你儿子的球队里，老鹰队以 3 比 2 战胜了猎鹰队。迈克两次保送上垒，一次被留在垒上，另一次被强制出局——被迫上
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다
Хорошо, ладно. Следующий шаг — закрепить ленту. Для этого отрежьте от рулона примерно 60 см (2 фута) и разорвите его вдоль, чтобы у вас получилось дв
Apollo 8, Hou
روجر. اثنان بسعر و
Okay. Ich lasse es aus – ausgeschaltet im Vorstartmodus, während die Computer-LED leuchtet. Eigentlich ist der Compu
Okay. Bitrate: Niedrig; Sprachfunktion: Abwärts-Sprachsicherung; S-Band-Endstufe: Offen; Bereichsfunktion: Bereich; das ist eine Überprüfung. 
Водолей
अरे! हम 
结果是阴性。我没打开它。在完成这些读数之前，我不会打开它。Phecda 现在在中间位置，也就是雾霾层和地面之间的中间位置，数值为 1.7，已经消失。好的，Woomera，我的——我的状态非常好。宇航服温度正在大幅下降。蒸汽排放口的温度下降不多，但宇
N
了解しました。それは予想していました。だからファンをオンにしてもらったんです。注意と警告の限界にかなり近づい
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストンです
حسنًا، فانس. الإجراء: التحكم في التوجيه، ؛ التحكم في الوضع، تثبيت الوضع، ، إدخال؛ المناورة إلى الوضع؛ الدوران 0، الميل 90، الانعراج 0؛ كرتي الآن، بالطبع، معطلة، لذا سأضطر إلى تشغيلها. الرقم 5 هو التحكم في الوضع، تلقائي؛ 6:،، مراقبة المعدلات؛ المعدلات الأقل من درجة واحدة في الثانية في كل محور، تعطيل، ولم أسمع
ハンツビル通信技術部。こち
Roger. Immagino che Ho
Scanner sp
Elf Mi
Хьюстон, это «Аполлон-8» передает вам сигнал с высоким к
Okay. Vorab: Diese Anleitung enthält keine Hinweise zum Fotografieren des Mondes. Sollten Ihnen nach der Veranstaltung durch einen Blick aus einem anderen Fenster oder durch ein kleines Manöver Aufnahmen vom Mond gelingen, würden wir uns natürlich freuen, diese zu erhalten. Die geplante Veranstaltung beschränkt sich jedoch auf Aufnahmen der Erde aus 
罗杰。在步骤 5 中，我们将保持逆变器 
ठीक है, जैक। टैंक 1 में दबाव 100 psi के करीब पहुंच रह
أبولو 8، هيوستن. سنقوم بتغيير الهوائيات خلال 3 دقائ
Die Kabine ist bereit, ich möchte die Kuppel nicht mehr absenken. Es lief alles bestens. Zeitcheck: 18 Minuten. Alles in Ordnung. Schubdüsen: Rollen links (automatisch): 1
ठीक है। मैं इंडिकेट रेट्रो एटीट्यूड, सेक्शन 1 प्लेटफॉर्म-ऑर्बिट रेट, एफडीआर-प्लेटफॉर्म, एफडीएम-रेट, एफडीआई स्केल-हाई पर क्लिक करूँगा। रेट जायरोस-प्राइमरी 
روجر. 9-C كانت 04 36 18. 7+59. 15+26. 10
关于光学系统还有一点需要说明。我们现在处于最佳状态。我们正经过——
飞行员的RKV医疗数据通行证1号，格林尼治标准时间0
알았어, 잭. 내가 읽어보니, LMP는 약 6시간 동안 잠을 자야 해. 그 시간 동안 CDR과 CMP는 간단
おはよう
Oh, das ist die Zusammenfassung der Meinungen all unserer Experten hier unten. Ich habe es von
Abbiamo appena avviato la
Roger, Frank. Wir hätten da eine Frage zum Flugplan für die nächsten Stunden. Wir tendieren dazu, Jim vorsorglich schlafen zu lassen und die Zeitverschiebung, die um [Uhrzeit einfügen] stattfindet, zu verschieben. Andererseits wäre es wohl ratsam, wenn er wieder me
いいえ、ここには空きがありま
查理，你不是说你有
嗯，跟周边
700, 150 и выше, прекрасно.
Columbia, affirmativement. Et à l'heure T1, mettez le commutateur de votre transpondeur radar de ren
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티 기지에서 어젯밤 지질학 질문에 대해 몇 가지 답변을 드리겠습니다. 우리는 길쭉한 원형의 2차 분화구들이 흩어져 있는 비교적 평평한 분화구 지대에 착륙했습니다. 대부분의 분화구는 크기에 상관없이 융기된 테두리를 가지고 있습니다. 하지만 모든 분화구가 그런 것은 아닙니다. 작은 분화구 중에는 테두리가 뚜렷하게 보이지 않는 것도 몇 개 있습니다. 이 지역의 지표면은 매우 고운 모래에서 실트에 이르는 입자로 이루어져 있습니다. 지구에서 이와 가장 유사한 것을 꼽자면 분말 형태의 흑연이라고 할 수 있겠습니다. 이 지표면에는 모양, 크기, 질감이 매우 다양한 암석들이 흩어져 있는데, 둥근 모양과 각진 모양, 그리고 다양한 경도를 가진 암석들이 있습니다. 말씀드렸듯이, 결정이 없는 현무암과 기포가 있는 현무암도 보았습니다. 결정이 전혀 없는 암석도 있고, 작은 흰색 반정이 
У меня написано - 1101
Ich 
Они это не исправили. Мне казалось, кто-то об этом уже упомин
Roger, 
A
Our Agena looks in fine shape. The TDA is out. It's 
コロンビア、ヒュースト
Aquarius, Houston. We'll have to get some
好的，Vance。DEL
Roger. J'ai relancé l'appareil, réglé le débit d'eau sur AUTO, et la pression de vapeur est retombée à zéro. J'ai donc essayé une deuxième fois pendant une minute, sans succès. Je suis en train de fermer manuell
Gemini VI，请问您能否将适配器的 
Roger. C'est exact
Okay, Jack. I got another question on page 18. At 1 minute, I concur with
好了，我已经……现在，向右滚
Très bien. Nous somm
أبولو 11، هذه هيوس
Sunrise. Ahhhhh! Beautiful lighted fireflies that time. It was luminous that time. But it's only, okay, they--all right, I have--if anybody reads, I have the fireflies. They are very bright. They are capsule emanating. I can rap the hatch and stir off hundreds of them. Rap the side of the capsule; huge streams come out.
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 몇 가지 주요 뉴스와 스포츠 소
짐보, 당신을 위해 
Gemini VI. Нам не удалось получи
Okay. We can put off this NAV sighting. It was scheduled here at, and we ca
À l'envers; retournez la ca
Это 3,5. Вы 
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. هل يمكنك الانتظار لبضع دقائق فقط؟ تشارلي وفريق الطيران في الخارج يتلقيان إحاطة جوية. سيعودان بعد
ठीक है। हम विश्व समाचारों से शुरुआत करेंगे। जब छोटा सा अंतरिक्ष यान चंद्रमा की परिक्रमा कर रहा था, तब क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या पर दुनिया भर में अमेरिकी अपोलो 8 अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों की प्रशंसा और अंतरिक्ष अन्वेषण में अंतर्राष्ट्रीय सहयोग की आशाओं के संदेश प्रसारित हुए। यहां तक ​​कि कम्युनिस्ट देशों में भी चंद्रमा की पहली यात्रा को लेकर उत्साह था। मॉस्को में, सोवियत वैज्ञानिक अनातोली बेसरानोव ने याद दिलाया कि उनके देश और संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका ने पहले भी अंतरिक्ष संबंधी ज्ञान साझा किया था
好的。还有一点细节需要补充说明。正如我们之前所说，上升段单引擎推进器（SEP）的姿态是平面内的，而喷气推进器（JETT）的姿态将更接近于正常服务舱SEP的姿态，即向上，沿半径矢量向外偏转45度，偏离平面向南。我们建议在进行JETT之前，将顶部舱门关闭，通风阀
روجر
Anche per quanto riguarda il t
Ich habe dic
Sospetto che questo campo di massi possa avere origine in parte da questo grande cratere roccioso dai bordi affilati che abbiamo superato durante la discesa finale. Ieri ho detto che aveva più o meno le dimensioni di un camp
Bene, iniziamo con "Manovra per la fotografia del campo di contaminazione" e cancelliamo tutto fino a includere "Abilita propulsori A3, C
Мы участвуе
أجل، يا تشارلي. أستطيع رؤيتها الآن من خل
يمكنك أيضًا استخدام انعدام الجاذبية لتوضيح العديد من الأمور التي تعلمناها جميعًا في المدرسة. أود أن أوضح بإيجاز مدى سهولة شرح آلية عمل الجيروسكوب. إذا قمت بتدوير هذه العلبة، فنحن نعلم
ロジャー、彼女はここでは元気
ये तो 
Okay. Jetzt haben wir jemanden auf dem Foto, der auf dem Kopf steht. Natürlich ist uns klar, dass es im Weltraum kei
Alright. This is a ge
حسنًا. ثلاثة إلى وضع التحكم، فاصلة، النطاق الميت إلى ال
分かりました。結局私の推測は当たっていましたが、ありがとうございま
Gar nichts. Wir haben uns Ihren Zustandsvektor angesehen, und er ist in Ordnu
ठीक है, जैक। 226 को ठीक से कॉन्फ़िगर किया गया है। मैंने तीन REACS ब्रेकर और तीन RAD ब्रेकर
Карнарвон. У нас здесь на земле сигнал к началу, и у меня остал
रॉजर, मैं आ
ポジション4。P ポジシ
Ho appena scattato una foto. Fotogramma n. 14 sulla Contar
Roger. À,
好的。我们就把
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Ес
О, да. Меня это не беспокоит. Я просто хотел
Хорошо, Джо. Я создал здесь новую страницу под названием -1A, пункт 6, Переключение 
प्रत्यावर्ती धारा दिष्ट
Nur zu. Du bist laut un
好的。稍等片刻。我往
Friendship Seven, hier spri
Ed hat den Großteil der Ausrüstung dabei. Ich habe die Pistole, die Kamera und den Lukenverschluss, also das Verbindungsstück für die beiden 
हाँ 
了解しました。よろしいでしょうか。SPANの担当者にその問題を確認して、明日
小精灵想知道你们
안
حسنًا. ما زلنا نُجري عملية التتبع، وكما تعلم، سنُقلل من عمليات ضخ المياه وما شابهها خلال الساعتين الأخيرتين، وذلك لدعم إجراءات التتبع. كل شيء يسير على ما يُرام الآن. هل لديك أي أسئلة أخرى م
알겠습니다. 그리고 저희는 
आपने इसे छुपाया तो
11, Хьюстон.
Подсказки на карточках — нет. Поверьте, мы не собираемся соревноваться с профессионалами. Хотя
今、星を眺めています。まだ明るいですが、完全に暗いわけではありません。窓にフィルターがかかっていて、小さな等級の星をカットしているようです。北斗七星からアークトゥルスまで見渡しています。今見ているのは主に2等星から3等星くらいです。小さな星は今のとこ
友情七号，
Bene. Ot
Affermat
Roger, Apollo 13. Hier ist
Je vais couper le courant et voir ce qu'il en est. Regardez, il reste encore… Je veux les couper. Je vais les couper 
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston, ein Blin
로저.
Принято. Снято
# "comment
罗杰
ठीक 
Roger. E il T/M qui sotto dice che l'interruttore del riscaldatore O2 e H2 delle celle a combustibile si è aperto durante il passaggio del Pacifico e vorremmo sapere se Dave ha trovato quell'inte
マイク、どれくらい離れたところにいる
Glaubst du, du kannst
Wie w
정정합니다. 
Снова Близнецы 4. Я вижу такую ​​же изогнутую линию света, как северное сияние, только оно находится ниже нас, и я видел его в другой раз, это были огромные длинные линии. Похоже, они идут примерно параллельно направлению нашего полета и простираются от 
रॉजर। 40 2711 398 033, नीचे 043, बाएँ 23, प्लस 0832 माइनस 16500 12956 36208; उत्तर
检查一下你的针头。吉姆，你出局
了解。GETタイムハックはどうです
روجر، هل أكملت قائمة التحقق الخاصة بك قبل تطبيق 
그건 맞는 말이에요.
Eh bien, c'est ce que nous voulions faire. Il semble que ce serait la chose la p
حسنًا. 9، 8، 7، 6، 5، 4، 3، -
Wir werden später auf die Details der Umgebung eingehen, aber es sieht aus wie eine Ansammlung von Gesteinen in nahezu allen Formen, Kanten und Körnungen – also fast allen Gesteinsarten, die man finden kann. Die Farben – nun ja, sie variieren stark, je nachdem, wie man relativ zum Nullpunkt des Phasenverschiebungspunkts blickt. Eine einheitliche Grundfarbe scheint es nicht zu geben. Allerdings scheinen einige der Steine ​​und Felsbrocken, von denen es in der Nähe recht viele g
هيوستن،
11+18. RET 400 K.
11시, 복사할 기분이 들면 
अच्छा, ये मेरे लिए पहले दिन का मील बी
D'accord. Je comprends, Vance. C'est beaucoup plus facile de faire voler les aiguilles si la balle est en l'air; cela me donne une 
Okay, Jack, I will do. Jim and I were able to spot constellations from the windows of the when there's no venting taking place. Could you give me some time on these consumables, what you're predicting they're good for? I think you started to give them times, didn't you, or was I just hearin
ماذا علينا 
Roger, Understand. Are we still experiencing this intermittent con
Это «Дружба Сем
本当に、ここ
はい。わかりました。次は司令船の写真です。司令船からサー
了解。軌道
Apollo 8, l'objectif était de ne pas retarder l'allumage au-delà de 20 seco
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Bitte warten. Ich hole etwas Aus
Okay. Meine Pitchnadel steht jetzt nur noch minimal nach oben. Ich 
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في جهاز المحاكاة، إن لم يكن بنفس السهولة. لذا أكملنا المهمة حتى النهاية. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون، كنت قد قررت أننا لن نتمكن من الوصول، لكنني فكرت في الاستمرار قليلًا. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون - أو قبل مغادرتنا لها بقليل - كان واضحًا لي أننا لن نتمكن من تخفيض الضغط. طلبتُ الانتقال إلى المدار التالي. ثم... استعدنا أنفاسنا لمدة 20 دقيقة تقريبًا وحاولنا ترتيب الخردة المتناثرة في قمرة القيادة. ثم أخرجتُ قائمة التحقق، وراجعناها بتفصيلٍ دقيق للتأكد من عدم إغفال أي شيء في عجلة من أمرنا. بدأنا عملية السير خارج المركبة، وحصلنا على إشارة البدء فوق كارنارفون. كنا على أتم الاستعداد، وكنا ننتظر إشارة البدء لبدء عملية تخفيف الضغط. وقد حصلنا عليها. أكملنا دورة تخفيف الضغط. عند مغادرتنا كارنارفون، حصلنا على تصريح السير الكامل خارج المركبة. وصلنا إلى كانتون أو هاواي، وفي ذلك الوقت، أعتقد أن كانتون أو هاواي هي التي أعطتنا إشارة البدء للخروج من المركبة الفضائية وبدء مناورات السير خارج المركبة. أنجزنا ذلك كما هو موضح في مسجل الصوت الذي سجلناه مسبقًا، وكذلك في موقع جهاز الاتصال الصوتي. انطلقنا، وخ
Роджер, Гавайи. Близнецы 
ठीक है, फ्रेड। सबसे पहले, इसकी तैयारी, आकस्मिकता चेकलिस्ट (पृष्ठ 24) से शुरू करते हुए, हम सुझाव देंगे कि आप इसे शुरू करें, और इस पर आपके किसी भी सुझाव का हम स्वागत करेंगे। दूसरा बिंदु: जब आप बर्न एटीट्यूड में हों, तो आपको सूर्य बिल्कुल ऊपर दिखा
どうすればいいですか？58Gで、ヨー角231に
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. لم 
E Houston, ho notato attraverso la fine
Roger. Certains commentaires précédents de Jim concernant la luminosité du limbe au lever du soleil ont suscité beaucoup d'intérêt. Nous aimerions lui demander, s'il a l'occasion d'observer à nouveau ou s'il s'en souvient, s'il a constaté des changements dans l'apparence des étoiles. Par exemple, a-t-i
ठीक है। मैं अभी वहीं जा
J'ai poussé vers le propulseur à environ 1,5 m/s. La manœuvre de séparation a duré environ 6 ou 7 secondes. J'ai continué à pousser vers le propulseur pendant environ
Хорошо. Ваши полеты по орбитальной навигации 9 и 10 должны быть выполнены в соответствии с планом полета. Делайте все так, как вы планировали ранее. Для информации, полеты 9 запланированы 
제리, 온도가 좀 걱정되네요. 
はい。できる限りのもの
Давление в камере оказалось немного
Columbia, hier
D'accord. Et le voyant TEMP n'est pas encore éteint. Voulez-vous que je l'allume to
Roger
Апол
Roger. Weiter geht es mit dem Maroon Bugle. Präsident Nixon überraschte Ihre Frauen mit einem Anruf aus San Francisco, kurz bevor er ins Flugzeug stieg, um Sie zu treffen. Alle waren sehr gerührt von Ihrer Fernsehansprache. Jan und Pat verfolgten sie hier in der Missionskontrolle. Der Start von Intelsat vom Cape wurde gestern Abend zum vierten Mal verschoben. Das Problem soll ein defekter Stickstoffregler in der zweiten Stufe der Delta-Rakete gewesen sein. Heute Abend wird ein neue
Ok. Ti darò solo - penso che sarà più facile darti quello che ho dentro. Ok, nella riga superiore, sulla 11, abbiamo i quattro interruttori AC BUS TIE INSERITI e l'interruttore AC BUS VOLTS INSERITO, e questo è tutto. Seconda riga, abbiamo i quattro interruttori TCA INSERITI. Abbiamo il GASTA sotto FLIGHT DISPLAYS e COMMANDER's. E allo stesso modo sotto AC BUS A, abbiamo un interruttore GASTA e un interruttore COMMANDER INSERITI. Questo è tutto. Nella riga 3, abbiamo un CONDIZIONATORE DI SEGNALE 1. Abbiamo l'ATCA (PGNS). Abbiamo l'interruttore ENGINE CONTROL, l'interruttore ATTITUDE DIRECT CONTROL e - sotto LIGHTING, l'interruttore ANUN/DOCK/COMPONENT INSERITO. E un altro, E
Capisco che sei pronto. Area 9-Bravo. Questo è GET RC, 13:19:36; 400K è 20 più 25; l'inclinazione inversa è 26 più 13; tutti questi angoli di inclinazione, per tutti questi aggiornamenti, saranno di 90 gradi: GET RC, 14:17:05; 400K, 20 più 32; 
わかりました。
ह्यूस्टन - ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस यहाँ है। ईगल उतर चुका ह
Roger, Jim. C'est la manœuvre de milieu
可惜的是，这些数据一直没录入到这里。如果你看一下弗雷德·海斯的那张图表，你会发现11点钟位置有一个数值，代表
Roger, si je comprends bien, les horloges seront réglées sur commande, c'est bien cela, o
ठीक है। मैं करूँगा। कैनोपस अभी-अ
了解。14時45分
Ok. Ho qui uno speciale di Haney per te. L'ultima edizione dell'Interstellar Times afferma che il volo verso la Luna sta occupando un posto di rilievo sia sulla carta stampata che in televisione; è LA notizia. Il titolo del Post recita "Luna, stanno arrivando". Sappiamo che Bill Anders sarà in conversazione privata o in comunicazione oggi con un anziano che indossa un abito
マイクはドッキ
휴스턴, 컬럼비아는 고이득에서 재수신하기 위해 UPTELEMETRY COMM
मैं पूरी तरह से आराम में हूँ। सूट का तापमान अब 72 डिग्री है, केबिन का तापमान लगभग 98 डिग्री है। बस इतना ही। मैं बहुत आरामदायक महसूस कर रह
वैंस, मैं रोल और यॉ को नियंत्रित करने के लिए केवल न्यूनतम आवेग (मिनिमम इम्पल्स) वाले एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल का उपयोग करने की कोशिश कर रहा हूँ - बल्कि रोल और पिच को नियंत्रित करने की। लेकिन, इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में केवल एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल के साथ, मैं रोल को अपनी इच्छानुसा
रॉजर। समझ गया कि C का मान -0.2 था। मैंने Z
로저. 지금 
了解。飛行計画で得た角度は、到着したら大丈夫だと思います
Gemini 4, G
당신은 그곳에서 초속
Bill, tu peux l'é
Роджер. Понятно, что время получения сигнала (GET) — 03.07; GET R = 248 морских миль; GET точки сближения — 03.15; азимут — 0 градусов; угол места — 7 градусов; 
Roger, Canton. Ero impegnato con le manovr
Okay, Jack ist jetzt bei mir und ihr alle... Verfahren zur Herstellung dieser Lithiumhydroxid-Geräte, und sobald er seinen Helm aufgesetzt hat, wird er bereit sein, es nachzumachen, und dan
Vorresti resetta
Кнопка "Остановка дв
ठीक है, जब हम - 1 पर प्रतीक्षा करें
わかりました。ジムが今これを持っていると思います。絞りはf:22、無限遠、50ミリだと思います。ジムは今、写真の中でバハに当たったと
没错。在完成中段7后，飞机将机动至分离
Roger. Tranquility, this is Houston. 
好的。将相机向右移动，屏幕上的地
좋습니다. 31816 302 31624 40 2699 396 033, 하강 054, 좌측 21, 플러스 0810 제어 마이너스 16500 12968 36222; 정렬은 동일하게 유지됩니다. 시리우스와 리겔, 롤 129, 피치 15
Okay. Nach Tommy Jacobs haben wir jetzt die neuesten Infos von der lokalen Astrologin Ruby Graham aus Houston. Sie sagt, alle Sternzeichen stehen günstig für deine Reise zum Mond. Neil ist clever, Mike hat ein gutes Urteilsvermögen und Buzz kann knifflige Probleme lösen. Neil sieht die Welt zwar oft durch eine rosarote Brille, ist aber immer bereit, Leidenden und Notleidenden zu helfen. Neil soll außerdem „Intuition besitzen, die es dir ermöglicht, das Leben mit Gefühl zu interpretieren“. Buzz ist sehr gesellig und kann es nicht ertragen, allein zu sein, und besitzt zudem ein ausgezeichnetes 
波が高く
你好
맞습니다. 이전 형식과의 유일한 차이점은 400,000
MODALITÀ BMAG, tre, per TAR
Ora è attivo l'override dello snorkel. Portata di emergenza attiva. Inte
And, occasionally, you know, a little piece of something hits the - what do you call that - covering? The whole LM quivers every so 
알겠습니다. 다시 ENTER로
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 달 착륙하신 분들께 몇 가지 질문이 있습니다. 시간 되시면 답변 
好的。我们现在差不多要记录BLOCK数据了，包括+4和+11小时的数据。之前给你的+4小时的数据完全没问题，我们不需要
Привет, Астро, это Swiss One. Мы тебя осмотрели. Отсюда ты выглядишь отлично, особенно с уче
D'accord, Jim. « En position d'attitude, sortez l'ACA de sa butée jusqu'à ce que l'aiguille d'erreur soit à zéro. Ensuite, activez le minuteur d'événement. » Un compte à reb
ويا برج الدلو، يا هيوستن، لديّ بعض قواطع الدائرة الكهربائية التي يمكنك فتحها لإيقاف تشغيل الشاش
점검
西格玛七号，我是穆切亚。我一分钟都没
Okay. Okay, Tom. It's - I thought the - an ATT HOLD would have been sufficient for this, when we first t
알겠습니다. 나가
ヒューストン、それを実行しました。酸素は流れていると思いますが、ゲージは「FULL SCAL
Roger. Bei Jims Markierungen möchten wir einen Abstand von etwa 30 Sekunden zwischen 
Bon, on n'a pas gaspillé d'essence en faisant ce qu'on a
Роджер. Это «Дружба номер 
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota quattro e stiamo lavorando al quinto giorno. Naturalmente, non vediamo l'ora che arrivi l'atterraggio di venerdì. Qui sotto, nella parte della navicella che chiamiamo stiva inferiore, abbiamo il consigliere
배터리 잔량을 알려드리기 전에, 전원을 켜둔 상태로 유지할까요,
और, 13, ह्यूस्टन। हम यह पुष्टि करना चाहेंगे कि आपने
روجر، الجوزاء 
ठ
Roger. Verstanden. Sie scheinen
네, 저희가 몇 가지 문제에 부
Roger. Per 64.000 dollari, stiamo ancora cercando di individuare la posizione del vostro sito di atterraggio, Tranquility
ر
コロンビア、
Джек, я не уверен навскидку, каков угловой размер Луны. Если вы сможете определить его с помощью секстант
おい、はっきり言ってくれ、フレッド。春の大掃除で、上の階の荷物を移動
...소음 관련해서는 압력 게이지를
Роджер
We're trying to calculate how much spaghetti and me
Проверьте управление и убедитесь, что у нас не возникнет блокировка ка
A
Okay, Fred, und schließ den 
धन्यवाद। 11
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे पास आपको भेजने के लिए एक राज्य
Okay, ich bin jetzt bei Siche
On 
أوه، نظام EECOMM سعيد، وبعد إتمام الإعداد، لدينا إجراء بسيط من 
रॉजर। इस समय मैं उड़ान योजना पर नज़र रख रहा हूँ। सच कहूँ तो मुझे लगता है कि ग्रहों की स्थिति का सटीक आकलन करने के लिए और अधिक तारामंडल संबंधी जानकारी की आवश्यकता है - या 
好的。我们将在 09:01:00 给你 GET 时间破
Roger. Sextantenstern, 12 1037 211, Erdmittelpunkt unten 063, rechts 23 plus 1068 minus 16500 12505 35061 Nordsterne, Rol
坎顿通信技术中心，这里是Sigma Se
Charlie, Apollo 11. Ich habe ein paar Fragen zum Anha
أبولو 8، هيوستن. سنقوم بتحويل وصلة الإرسال إلى نظام Upvoice الاحتياطي لمدة دقيقتين تقريبًا، وقد يستغرق الأمر بضع ثوانٍ لإتمام 
はい。それ
Yes. I think so. I - I thought maybe that was one of those that you could never load from the, and that still maybe. Maybe it was loaded just for the short period of time, and then when the counters read the - the gimbal ang
+11 
聞こえは良好です。体調
ठीक है, जो। हम इसे हिलते हुए देख सकते हैं। हालांकि, इसमें से बहुत अधिक मलबा या वाष्
حسن
ठीक है। हम विश्व समाचारों से शुरुआत करेंगे। जब छोटा सा अंतरिक्ष यान चंद्रमा की परिक्रमा कर रहा था, तब क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या पर दुनिया भर में अमेरिकी अपोलो 8 अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों की प्रशंसा और अंतरिक्ष अन्वेषण में अंतर्राष्ट्रीय सहयोग की आशाओं के संदेश प्रसारित हुए। यहां तक ​​कि कम्युनिस्ट देशों में भी चंद्रमा की पहली यात्रा को लेकर उत्साह था। मॉस्को में, सोवियत वैज्ञानिक अनातोली बेसरानोव ने याद दिलाया कि उनके देश और संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका ने पहले भी अंतरिक्ष संबंधी ज्ञान साझा किया था और भविष्यवाणी की कि अपोलो 8 की उड़ान से और अधिक सहयोग को बढ़ावा मिलेगा। क्यूबा में, रेडियो हवाना ने अपने श्रोताओं को अपोलो 8 के भाषण के बारे में बताने के लिए वॉयस ऑफ अमेरिका कार्यक्रम का पुनः प्रसारण किया। वॉयस के अधिकारियों ने कहा कि यह पहली बार था कि किसी अमेरिकी एजेंसी का कार्यक्रम हवाना रेडियो पर प्रसारित किया गया था। चेकोस्लोवाकिया में व्यापक टेलीविजन कवरेज के माध्यम से चंद्रमा की उड़ान देखी गई; और हंगरी के बुडापेस्ट में, ट्रेनों और बसों में लोग इसी विषय पर चर्चा कर रहे थे। गैर-कम्यु
好的。这就是我们希望您使用的配置，我们是这样考虑的。当我们把1号水箱设置为自动，2号水箱设置为关闭时，我们发现加热循环中1号水箱的压力约为233 psi，远高于警示和警告限值。如果我们在睡眠模式下使用这种配置，就能避免睡眠循环期间出现警示和警告灯。好的。为了确保睡眠舒适，我们希望在白天剩余时间里更多地使用2号水箱的氢气，从而使1号水箱的压力略高于1号水箱，这样在睡眠循环结束时，两个水箱的压力就能达到平衡。这就是为什么我们现在把您的设置设为1号水箱关闭，2号水箱自动。我们预计在接下来的10小时内，压力会略微超过1号水箱3%；在睡眠前，我们会打电话给您，请您再次将配置反转。唯一的缺点是，白天你可能会收到一些“注意”和“警告”，我们觉得最好现在就告诉你，而不是等
E sul tuo HA, imbarda 
जिम, क्या तुम बेडरूम में चिल्लाकर जैक को बता दोगे कि जब उसे अपने सिस्टम की रीडिंग मिल जाए, तो हम चाहते हैं कि वह वापस जाए - बैकआउट प्रक्रिया का उपयोग करे और फिर से बंद कर दे - उस प्रक्रिया के अनुसार जो हम
わかりました。ENTER、333 ENTERと押してください。そしてレジスタ1を読み取ってください。レジスタ1は10000になるはずです。もしレジスタ1がそれに等しければ、コンピュータは消去可能なメモリを2回ダンプすることになります。つまり、消去可能なメモリダンプの数値は10000の2倍です。もし10000でない場合は、ENTER、333 ENTER、10000 ENTERと押すことで、10000を読み取ってください。そうすると、ダンプの動詞はENTERになり、これにより消去可能なメモリ全体が自動的に2回ダンプされ、正しい設
OK, 
حس
もう一人の飛行士、マックス
पेरिस्कोप को फिर से ढक दिया गया है। जॉन का 
ي
私たちの航路の北側、宇宙船の前方の地平
وفي خبر آخر، وإن كان طفيفًا، اضطر مستكشف آخر، ثور هايردال، إلى التخلي عن محاولته الإبحار بقارب مصنوع من ورق البردي عبر المحيط الأطلسي. تم التخلي عن القارب المتضرر من العاصفة على بعد حوالي 650 ميلًا من برمودا. انخفضت سرعة القارب إلى حوالي 25 ميلًا في اليوم، وقال هايردال
Roger. In reference to your question on usage: it looks like you are about 18, maybe 20 pounds below nominal
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 은신 상태에서 방송하고 있습니다. 잠시만요. 프렌드십 세븐, 은신 상태에서 방송하며 밤하늘을 관측하고 있습니다. 지평선 훨씬 위에 높은 층이 있는 것 같습니다. 낮에 봤던 것보다 훨씬 높습니다. 별들이 그 층을 통과해서 진짜 지평선 쪽으로 내려가는 것처럼 보입니다. 폭은 7~8도 정도 되는 것 같습니다. 그 아래로는 구름이 보이고, 어두운 띠가 있고, 그 아래로는 별들이 지평선으로 내려오면서 밝게 빛나는 밝은 띠가 보입
Yes, I see a little bit of a green in that - I guess that it's just the sun reflecting. Now here they come.
好的。流程又回来了。多
あなたは... を準備
و يا فريدو، يتم حساب محصلة DELTA-VR 
Есл
짐, 내 생각엔 지금쯤 제대로 된 식사를 하도록
Das
Ça me paraît bien. D'accord. Nous avons effectué un exercice avec
Держу пари... тебе
ह्यूस्टन, मैं आपकी बात साफ-साफ समझ पा रहा हूँ। आप कैसे 
わかった…それはまた大きな…、おい。もし外の水を飲まなきゃならなくなったら…1日に1ガロン近く飲む
Das ist bestätigt. Bevor ich mit den Pads beginne, noch eine Anmerkung. Die allgemeinen Hinweise, die wir Ihnen zuvor bezüglich 
了解しました。ヒューストン、コロンビア。定常便、乗り換えなし。す
र
Roger. I
好的。船员们昨晚都休息得很好，状态也不错。吉姆刚起床，比尔
ठीक है, और 1:15 बजे आपको समुद्री अर्चि
حسناً، أعتقد أنني 
حسنًا. أعتقد أن الضوضاء قد توقفت الآن. شكرًا
科德角那边的人建议我，你可以把螺旋桨开关
ठीक है। मुझे आपके उपभोग्य सामग्रियों का अपडेट मिल गया है, अगर आप इसे कॉपी करने के 
बेचारा एलएम दूषित हो गया है; इस पर पेशाब के कण लगे हुए हैं; और, जिस तरह से यहाँ रोशनी पड़ 
— — Будьте внимат
حسنًا. هذا خاص بالتحليق القريب والحضيض، بالإضافة إلى تحديث لمدة ساعتين. نود أيضًا الحصول على تقرير محدّث عن جميع نوافذك. نحاول وضع خطط بديلة لاستخدام نافذة الفتحة المرك
模式 3 云台角度如下：横滚 180.87，俯仰 42.31，偏
...タ
正解です。ヒーターBメインAが開いています
好的。我恢复
Roger, Guaymas. Real smooth. Stand by. I'll get 
了解しました。2-22ページの右下隅にあるパッシブ熱制御姿勢は「
Роджер. Не 
1分。チャンバー圧力は100を維持して
حسن
अब... - यह इधर-उधर लुढ़क रहा है, इस
That's correct. That should configure you. Note that circuit-breaker protection on that circuit limits the available current to 15 amps. We think we can do quite a bit with it though. And the / umbilical will b
J
11, Houston. Les prévisions actuelles indiquent des conditions acceptables dans votre zone de récupération: nuages ​​épars à 600 mètres d'altitude, vent du 070° à 13 nœuds, visibilité de 16 kilomètres et mer agitée (vagues d'environ 1,2 mètre). Les prévisions d'hier signalaient une tempête tropicale, Claudia, à environ 800 à 1 600 kilomètres à l'est d'Hawaï. Les images satellites prises hier après-midi montraient que Claudia se dissipait, ce qui semb
네, 알겠습니다
看来我们可以再用这根高增益天线进行一次通信测试
Eh bien, Frank, je partage ton avis. L'immensité et la solitude de la Lune sont impressionnantes, et elles nous font prendre conscience de la chance que nous avons sur Terre. Vue d'ici, la Terre est 
Actuellement, nous volons à très basse altitude, si bien que je ne pense pas que les stations au sol puissent nous localiser. Nous avons entendu plusieurs communications intermittentes. Nous allons toutefois maintenir cette position un moment afin de garder le lanceur en vue. Il ne semble pas que nous progressions beaucoup vers lui pour le moment. Il semble rester à peu près à la même distance qu'auparavant. Lors de l'observation nocturne, lorsque le lanceur était en dessous de nous, le ciel paraissait presque entièrement étoilé. Les émanations du lanceur étaient si nombreuses qu'elles projetaient des traînées lumineuses dans le ciel. J'ai d'ailleurs fait remarquer que ces émanations ressemblaient à des étoiles. En observant attentivement le lanceur à ce moment-là, on pouvait voir le carburant – plus précisément les vapeurs blanches qui s'échappaient de son
Okay. Du weißt ja
완료됐
물병자리님, 전력 증폭기는
Okay. Das wird etwas anders sein. Wenn ich Ihnen ΔV vorlese, stehen die ersten beiden Zahlen für die Vorwärtsrichtung, die zweiten beiden für die Rückwärtsrichtung. Dasselbe gilt für ΔT. Die erste Gruppe steht für die Vorwärtsrichtung, die zweite für die Rückwärtsrichtung. Hab
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Valerie Anders am Heiligabend, während sie und ihre Familie darauf warteten, dass Apollo 8 die Mondumlaufbahn verließ und zur Erde zurückkehrte. Frau Anders war am Dienstag um Mitternacht dort gewesen, und die Nachbarn hatten gerade alle Kinder zusammengetrommelt, damit die Familie sich ausruhen konnte, während sich das Raumschiff hinter dem Mond befand und kein Kontakt mehr bestand. Das Haus von Colonel Frank Borman war draußen mit vier großen Tannenzweigen geschmückt, mit Puderschnee bestreut und mit roten Schleifen verziert. Ein Baum im Wohnzimmer wartet auf seine sichere Rückkehr, und seine hübsche blonde Frau Sue und seine kräftigen Söhne Frederick und Edwin planen, den Start von Apollo 8 um Mitternacht zu Hause mitzuerleben. Normalerweise würden sie den Mitternachtsgottesdienst in der St. Christopher's Episcopal Church besuchen. Die Familie hatte sich für Mitternacht verabredet. Da es im Hause Borman keine kleinen Kinder gibt, wird die Bescherung einfach warten, bis Colonel Borman mit seinem fantastischen Weihnachtsgeschenk – dem Flug zum Mond und zurück – zurückkommt. Marilyn Lovells vier Kinder werden, was die Kinder betrifft, ein ganz normales Weihnachtsfest erleben, berichtete die vielbeschäftigte Ehefrau von Captain Lovell; aber an Geschenke war nicht zu denken, da zwei von ihnen direkt neben ihr saßen. „Ich hatte noch nicht einmal Zeit, mich umzuziehen“, sagte Mrs. Lovell. Geschenke unter Erwachsenen gibt es aber, und der Weihnachtsbaum wird auch noch da stehen, wenn Lovell nach Hause kommt. Hier ist noch ein interessanter Artikel in der Rubrik „Action Line“. Es gibt einen kleinen Leserbrief an die Redaktion. Da steht: „Wir wollten euch Erdenbewohnern gestern Abend einen Überraschungsbesuch mit
روجر، هل يمكنك فحص قاطع دائرة اختبار ضوء المؤشر وإيق
Finora non abbiamo avuto alcun piacere con le luci dell
It happened when we were in Agena-Spacecraft combination of 0°, 180°, 0° and we were stabilized there. We had the Attitude Control Power off in the Spacecraft, OAMS Attitude Control Power off and we sent 041 Command to Agena to turn the recorder on. The Spacecraft-Agena combination start
Ici Friendship Seven. Observation concernant le fonctionnement du système de commandes: il semble que chaque fois que je passe en mode manuel (commandes électriques) et que je manœuvre pendant une période prolongée, nous introduisons des erreurs considérables dans le système gyroscopique. Je me retrouve avec toutes sortes d'attitudes. Par exemple, cette fois-ci, lorsque j'ai effectué un lacet d'environ 180°, que
Роджер. Наш 
好的。如下：/: 45597，减 040，加 157，加 35
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لقد عدتم تح
Forza Houston. Eagle è pro
Р
Und wenn Sie sich nun auf den Rückweg vorbereiten, wieder in den Vorsichts- und Warnmodus wechseln und die Funktion AKTIVIEREN, möchten wir Ihnen im Namen aller hier in Houston und eigentlich aller Menschen in allen Ländern und auf der ganzen Welt sagen
Ho ancora una domanda, Jack. Continuo a pensare che - co
RKV, Gé
了解。それはいい計画だね、ジム。それを実行してみてはどうだろ
Okay, Vance. Hast du – wie weit bist du gekommen – hast du 
هذا صحيح. في اللوحة رقم 5: قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية، مرحل البطارية،
Merci
حسنًا. قام جاك بتوصيل قواطع الدائرة الكهربائية 250 BAT A وBAT B. وقرأ جهد ناقل البطارية، فكان 32.3 فولت على A و37.0 فولت على B. ثم قام بتوصيل قواطع الدائرة الكهربائية 275 لربط البطاريات بناقلات الطاقة الرئيسية. في هذا التك
Roger. Vous, habitants de la navette Columbia, serez peut-être intére
11, Houston. Il nostro consiglio per l'attrezzatura che hai nella borsa portacasco - correzione, borsa portaoggetti - è di rimuoverla e metterla nella cintura d
好的，第 3 组 
是的，休斯顿，看来比赛也到终场哨响了
Affermativo. Bene, ora andiamo al pannello 5
Bonjour Columbia. Houston. Je comprends que vous n'avez pas pu voir Tranquility. Que
罗杰。正如你所见，我的翻滚控制有点松懈。没关系。我一上去就让她进入再入状态。好的。就翻滚而言，她已经进入再入状态了。好的。瞄准镜正在接收信号。我正在使用陀螺仪
Die Abkoppl
Хорошо, Джек. Каков твой статус,
Bon, Bill, il suffit de relancer l'acquisition en mode AUTO. Ça semble être une solution. 
..
جيد جداً. سنريك هنا على الأرض، وليس لدي أي شيء لك يا جيميني 
हां, वह अभी उसे ढूंढ रहा ह
내 어깨 뒤에 있는 가방 안에 있어
Что ж, на этом всё. Осталось только выключи
로저. 당신 부
Roger. Tranqu
맙
Okay. We're suggesting that the LMP rest while the CMP and CDR are awake. LMP ought to hit the sack at about 63 hours, coming up in 25 minutes. And you get to rest for 6 hours. You get up at 69 hours. At 70 hours, the commander and the command module pilot sleep for 6 hours until 76 hours. Around 70 - 76-1/2 to 77 hours, we'll do a and a 52. At 78:30, we'll load and aline to. Our ignition time
Die Manschette ist voll, sie sinkt, lässt sie ab. Okay, wir haben einen gültigen Blutdruckwert
Hey Ed, du weißt doch, wir haben immer gesagt, dass wir einen Wiedereintritt in die offene Schleife durchführen würden. Ich bi
は
Das habe ich nicht ganz verstanden, Jack. Sag es bit
休斯顿，机组人员状态报告：5.5 7 5.5
Ich muss draußen gewesen sein – ich kam sofort raus, als wir das Startsignal bekamen. Tatsächlich war ich schon vor Hawaii draußen … ich folgte der Kamera und legte die Nabelschnur an. Es war etwas müh
कॉपी करने के लिए
はい。パワーアンプのスイッチをプライマリー（OFF）のままにして、レ
Okay. I was
Во-первых, я в режиме автоматического входа в атмосферу; я в автоматическом режиме; гироскопы работают в обычном режиме; маневр отключен;
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP 
いいえ、
A quanto pare, Vance, l'interruttore del circuito di carica della batteria che sembrava essere inserito non lo era. Fred lo ha tirato fuori e lo ha ripristina
好的，我们将在 07:40 启
We're coming out 
罗杰，请
Okay. alle, alle. Tramonto alle, alba 
Roger. We would like an evaluation of the voice comment
En 
برج ال
我想我们已经回答
Tenete presente che abbiamo riscontra
イーグル、ヒューストン。CDRからBIO
D'a
Pas trop longtemps. OK, ONDULEUR 2... Tiens, Jim, tie
11, Houston. Vorremmo provare a correlare il flusso di O2 nel trasduttore con la val
Roger
That's affirmative, Jim. We haven't got a picture of it yet. It's going to be in the top part of the - Correction, top part of the at the top of the - the top of detent 2 and the top part of the, and it should, in attitude, if you're right on the Sun, should split the cursor, though that roll angle is not too critical; if we're in about 10 degrees, we'll be okay. We - but I think - we think you should be able to get it better than that. On page 31, 
D'accord, Joe, environ 76 heures, et je crois que tu as mal compris. Ma question était: à l'époqu
13番、
Aquarius, Houston. After 
Roger. Um 74:30 Uhr bitten wir Sie, die Lüfter i
Хо
Nous avons effectué le verrouillage radar à environ 288 km et l'alignement radar a été réalisé à environ 251 km. Les aiguilles sont relativement stables et semblent correctes. L'aiguille de lacet oscille légèrement, d'environ ±1 degré. Il est à noter que notre problème réside dans l'élimination des résidus. Nous parvenons à réduire les résidus à une valeur faible, mais lors de la mesure suivante, ils augmentent, puis diminuent. Il est difficile de déterminer précisément quand nous atteignons un résidu nul. Le poste au sol indiquait l'absence de résidus. Le biais de l'accéléromètre semblait correct, mais il semble qu'un prob
روجر. أتمنى لو أستطيع أن 
Wir hatten in etwa 179 Meilen Entfernung ein Radarsignal und die Radarausrichtung lag bei etwa 156 Meilen. Die Zeiger bewegen sich rel
Roger. Es dauert etwas länger als ich dach
Roger. Bank angle 00 degrees; RN minus RP, plus 107; bank angle 4
Okay. Das waren die Sterne 20 und 27, der Sternwinkelunterschied beträgt fün
11, Houston. Present forecast shows acceptable conditions in your recovery area: 2000 foot scattered, high scattered, wind from 070 degrees, 13 knots, visibility 10 miles, and sea state about 4 feet. The forecast yesterday showed a tropical storm, Claudia, some 500 to 1000 miles east of Hawaii. The - the pictures from Earth satellites taken yesterday afternoon - afternoon showed Claudia dissipating, so this appears to be even less a factor than it was before. Your recovery area is now believed to be just a little ways north of the intertropical convergence zone, which you can probably see when you look out your windows there. Ye
D'accord. Cela fait apparaître la Lune. On peut voir le terminateur au sommet du disque 
Подтверждаю. Это будет сделано следующим об
Attends Buzz. Ça a l'air plutôt bien, d'après ce que je vois. On a la ligne de convergence tropicale là-bas. Il y a quelques nuages ​​sur la carte météo que je regarde, mais rien d'important. Pour l'instant... Attends. Voyons voir, là, à mi-hauteur... oui, à MPL... on a 3000 pieds de nuages ​​épars, visibilité 10 pieds, vagues de 3 pieds, c'est la météo actuelle. Je ne pense pas qu'il y ait de prévisions importantes. Il y a quelques... FLIGHT vient de m'informer que ce que je viens de te donner était les prévisions. Il y a quelques tempêtes tropicales dans le... enfin, pas dans la zone d'atterrissage, mais dans le Pacifique. Une tempête appelée Claudia qui est au nord-est d'Hawaï. Elle se dirige vers le nord-ouest et se dissipe. Et il y en a une appelée Viola, qui est au-dessus de Guam, et elles ne représentent aucun facteur. Ça a l'a
Sobald Sie bereit sind, senden wir I
Roger, Eagle. We gave you a state vector. We have not c
Я кое
다시 말씀해 
अपोलो 8
로저. 위상 조정 작업과 관련해서 보고할 만한 정보가 있습
ठीक है, MSFN के बारे में
روجر. قد يهمّكم يا سكان المركبة الفضائية كولومبيا أن تعلموا أن اليوم هو عيد الاستقلال في كولومبيا. تُوّجت غلوريا دياز من الفلبين بلقب ملكة جمال الكون الليلة الماضية، بعد أن تفوقت على 60 فتاة أخرى لتفوز باللقب العالمي. تبلغ الآنسة دياز من العمر 18 عامًا، بشعر وعينين سوداوين، ومقاساتها 34.5-23-34.5. أما الوصيفة الأولى فكانت ملكة ج
마지막 샷을 할 때 제 자세는 아래쪽으로 약 90도, 위쪽으로는 약 30~40도 정도였습니다..
哇，
Roger, there, and I'll polish up the gra
ठीक है, मैं इन्हें वैसे ही पढ़ूंगा जैसे मुझे दिख रहा है, न कि जैसे एसईडीआर (सर्विस इंजीनियरिंग डिपार्टमेंट रिपोर्ट) वाले पढ़ते हैं। मुझे फिर से वही पुरानी यादें सताने लगी हैं। लगता है जॉन को राहत मिली होगी। मैं उन्हें ढूंढ नहीं रहा था
Хорошо, Вэнс. Как читать д
Okay. Good readback. Proceeding on down the page. "BALANCE COUPLE" switch, "BALANCE COUPLE OFF." Okay, down to the - it's the last line before minus 2 minutes - " COMMANDER THROTTLE, MINIMUM; LMP to JETS." At minus 2 minutes, scratch "400 plus 1." At minus 1 minute, scratch "MASTER ARM, ON." At minus 10 seconds, add "MANUAL ULLAGE." At plus 5 seconds, scratch "DESCENT ENGINE COM
Roger. Nous avons l
أعود إلى مجال الجاذبية. ويبدو الوضع مستقرًا للغاية. أدور ح
حسنًا يا فريد. درجة حرارة غلاف ASA ت
C'est exact. On a commencé à avoir une indication erratique sur le signa
Tran
Right by the - Look out there, w
Tuttavia, gli IVI
了解。まだ答えは得られてい
シグマ
Die Bremsfallschi
我
Okay. I can verify that we are in that configuration with the exception of panel 382, the water accumulator, which I've left off in case we wanted to get some more drinking water out of the command module, and I'll put those in the prop
不知何故
네, 잘 들었습니다. 덮개를 씌우는 작
هذه هي الأرض، لكنها 
Right. If yo
Роджер. Вы хотите, чтобы я продолжал пользоваться
Okay. Um deine Frage zu beantworten, Joe: Nein. Ich hab
Roger. Le
덧붙여 말씀드리자면, 통신은 정말 환상적이었습니다. 어떻게 저희 목소리를 들으셨는지는 모르겠지만, 정말 멀리 떨어져 있는데도
알았어, 잭. 마지막 확인 중이야. 잠
Roger. Nous restons 
杰克，没错。你
Напряжение всех батарей около 23,5 вольт или выше, амперме
Ich wärme die Gyros auf, obwohl sie eigentlich sowieso einen Bypass haben soll
Bonjour, Texas. Amitié Sept. Ter
Sì. Ricordate che inizialmente ho iniziato dal lato tagliato del cratere inquadrato dalla telecamera, e ho prelevato diversi campioni di rocce in superficie, e diversi che si trovavano appena sotto la superficie, circa 6-4,5-6 metri a nord del cratere. Poi mi sono ricord
À 01:06:106 (1 minute, 1 heure et 7 minutes se sont écoulées), je dépasse l'échelle à environ 8 pour la cabine et le cos
अरे, इससे एक सवाल उठता है। हम जानना चाहते थे कि आप लोग प्रोब और ड्रोग को कहाँ रखने की योजना बना रहे हैं? हमें एक संभावना यह सूझी कि इसे एलएमपी के ठीक नीचे, आईएस के नीचे रखा जाए - शायद आपके पास को
네, 잭. 배터리 충전 확보를 완료하신 걸로 알고 있습니다. 이제 복사할 준비가 되셨다면, 잭, 절차상 전원 켜기 과정에 필요한 두 가지 변경 사항
아폴로 8호, 점화까지 20초
请注意，所有低
是的，实际上并没有这个数字。我只是把这条线延伸到了零以外，对于负
That 
わかりま
無料で見られるものばかりです。大きなものも小さなものも見えます。
好的，PDI 填充：102:33:04.36；09:50；减 0002.1；1
Tienilo stretto, perché
そうですね。これがうまくいかなかった場合のために、いくつか追加の指示があります。フランク、ALCは20秒間そのままにしておく必要があるそうです。ALCが正常に機能するには、20秒間そのままにしておく必要があります。さて、私がお伝えした手順がうまくいかなかった場合は、他のフィルターやそれらの様々
Роджер. LMP сейчас немного посидит без дела. Не могли бы вы, прежде чем я уйду, вкратце рассказать о состоянии системы и примерно сообщить, когда потреб
Я слышу тебя 
Хорошо. Я се
Мы находимся в процессе п
Roger. Roger, Frank. Quelques précisions sur la suite. L'observation des étoiles aura lieu quand Jim se lèvera; pour l'instant, nous avons suffisamment observé l'horizon terrestre, tout semble parfait, et nous sommes prêts à commencer l'observation de l'horizon lunaire. Dès que Jim sera levé, nous lui transmettrons la mise à jour du plan de vol pour une observation des étoiles avec la lune. Par ailleurs, juste après l'observatio
تم إغلاق صمام الضغط ا
قد يكون ذلك
このエリアでは太陽の反射が強いため、地表に見える特徴を判別するのは難しく、テレビ
罗杰。这些
We've still got a update, but we strongly recommend that you and Jack work as hard as you can sleeping for about 
Yes. I believe - Did you hear an
À Houston, quand une star s'installe ici, c'est indéniable. Un ins
Roger. I have five remarks. Number one, assumes execution of flyby maneuver; number two, use same alignment
روجر. المركبة الفضائية في حالة ممتازة من وجهة نظرنا يا جيم. نشعر بملل شديد هنا. لدينا بعض الأمور البسيطة لك، مثل تحديث وتحديث
了解
- - Niemand, der bei Verstand ist, wür
D'accord, je v
Pilote de Gemini VI, tension artérie
Ok. Il tuo RAD IN SECONDARY, ti ho dato 70 - circa 72 gradi; il RAD OUT è circa 30; la TEMP EVAP GLICOLE è circa 65; la PRESSIONE VAPORE a fondo scala alta, la PRESSIONE DI SCARICO GLICOLE circa 9 psi. L'ACCUMULATORE SECONDARIO TUTE mostra circa 52 gradi; CABINA circa 58 gradi; pressioni, TUTA lettura 4.1, CABINA a 5. LA PRESSIONE PARZIALE CO2 è salita a poco più di 1, circa 1.1. Sul lato della casa, la temperatura è 72 gradi, la lettura dell'elio 3500; N2 A lettura 2300; N2 B circa 2450. IL COMBUSTIBILE è circa 165; CELLA A COMBUSTIBILE 1, entrambe CHIUSE, sono zip; TEMP. INTERNA 405 gradi; LO SCARICO CONDENSA è a scala inferiore. CELLA A COMBUSTIBILE 2 - al momento abbiamo una lettura del FLUSSO di O2 o H2 compresa tra 0,13 e 0,14,
रॉजर। टॉरस, आइडा; मैं दोहराता हूँ, टॉरस, आइडा। ऊपर 162, बाएँ 01, शेष लागू नहीं। सीरियस, रि
Roger. We'll be coming within range of the aircraft coverage, here, in about 1 minute. They're going to try uplinking both on S-band and on VHF this time. So if you turn your - make sure your S-band volume is turned up, we'd appreciate it. And we believe that we'll have continuous coverage from now on through the burn.
Roger, Neil. Il prossimo argomento riguarda i raggi che emanano dalla zona di combustione del motore.
Roger. There will be no television of the undocking. I have all available windows either full of heads or 
阿波罗13号，休
알았어, 프레드. 위에 계신 
罗杰。我的
早上好，阿波罗8号！我是迪克。我谨代表控制中心的全体人员，以及
맞춰봐! 그러니까 '들이 추측하
Roger. Roger, Frank. Qualche piccolo pensiero su cosa ci aspetta ora. Gli avvistamenti stellari quando Jim si alzerà; sembra che ora ne abbiamo abbastanza dell'orizzonte terrestre, e tutto sembra davvero a posto; e siamo pronti per iniziare con alcuni avvistamenti dell'orizzonte lunare. Quindi, quando Jim si alzerà, gli passeremo l'aggiornamento del piano di volo per un set di stelle con la luna. Inoltre, intorno o dopo gli avvistamenti stellari, è il momento in cui vorremmo vedere il tuo prossimo scarico d'acqua. Quindi, se puoi, ti 
Сигма Семь. По моей команде будет указано время прохождения времени. Готовност
मुझे तुम्हारी आ
O
알겠습니다. 음, 그렇게 오래 진행할 수 있을지는 잘 모르겠네요. 다른 실험들, 예를 들어 입체 사진 촬영이나 다른 사진 촬영 기법 같은 건 다 취소
好的，我们来做个电气检查。主
Devi far partire 
Non, ce n'est pas exact, Fred. Ce que nous allons faire, c'est laisser tout tel quel sur la page 34 et ajouter ce
ジャックは…そのまま降りていきました。そして、250BAT AとBAT Bのブレーカーを入れた後、BATバスの電圧を読み取りました
ワシントン発：「このクリスマス、世界は平和への希望で明るく輝いています。希望が現実となり、再び銃声が静まる時、それは皆さんが勇気と技量をもって平和を追い求めてきたからこそ実現す
Okay. Are 
Tha
罗杰
Okay, I'm starting my 5-m
حسنًا. لقد تم تخزينه. تمام، استعدوا لـ
أوه، لا أعرف. إنها ه
D'accord. Quand vous aurez deux personnes disponibles et capables de construire un de ces systèmes à hydroxyde de lithium, j'aimerais que vous réunissiez 
로저. 공보실의 속보입니다. 아폴로 11호는 여전히 전 세계 뉴스의 중심을 차지하고 있습니다. 중국, 북한, 북베트남, 알바니아 단 네 나라만이 아직 자국민에게 당신의 달 착륙 소식을 알리지 않았습니다. 한 기자는 당신의 성공을 어떻게 표현해야 할지 더 이상 모르겠다고 했습니다. 오늘 저녁, 닉슨 대통령은 워싱턴에서 열리는 올스타 야구 경기를 관람할 예정입니다. 경기가 끝난 후, 그는 태평양 회수 지역으로 출발합니다. 수요일 저녁, 그는 헬리콥터를 타고 존스턴 섬에서 해군 통신함 알링턴으로 이동합니다. 그리고 목요일 아침, 다시 헬리콥터를 타고 호넷으로 이동하여 당신의 착수 장면을 참관할 예정입니다. 대통령과 함께 윌리엄 로저스 국무장관과 프랭크 보먼이 동행합니다. 그들은 태평양 사령관 존 시드니 매케인 제독과 함께 회수함 함교에서 착수 장면을 지켜볼 것입니다. 호넷에서의 체류를 마친 후, 대통령은 아시아 순방에 나서 루마니아를 방문할 예정입니다. 루나 15호는 어제 달 궤도를 52바퀴 돈 후 위기의 바다에 추락한 것으로 추정됩니다. 소련 통신사 타스는 "달 근지구 공간에서 과학적 연구가 수행되었다"고 보도했습니다. 조드렐 뱅크 천문대의 버나드 러벨 경은 루나 15호가 시속 약 480km(300마일)의 속도로 달 표면에 충돌했다고 밝혔습니다. 최근 베트남은 비교적 조용했습니다. 순찰 중인 미군 병사들이 여러분의 비행 중계를 듣기 위해 트랜지스터 라디오를 소지하고 있는 모습이 목격되었습니다. 베트남 주둔 미군 라디오 및 TV 방송국은 이번 임무를 전폭적으로 보도했습니다. 수에즈 운하를 따라서는 이집트와 이스라엘 간의 소규모 충돌이 여전히 계속되고 있습니다. 유엔 감시단은 충돌을 중단시키기 위해 노력하고 있습니다. 워싱턴에서는 하원 세입위원회가 석유 고갈 할당량을 27.5%에서 20%로 줄이는 법안을 통과시켰습니다. 휴스턴 지역에는 여러 차례 비가 내렸습니다. 오늘은 흐린 날씨이며, 소나기가 더 내릴 것으로 예상됩니다. 스포츠 소식을 전해드리자면, 앞서 말씀드린 대로 오늘 밤 올스타전이 있습니다. 어제는 경기가 없었습니다. 어젯밤 뉴욕에서는 미국 야구 기자 협회가 베이브 루스를 역대 최고의 
Исправьте время вашего звонка 
Что ж, многие из нас здесь, внизу, с удовольствием бы присоедини
On your, quads A, C, and D seem to be just about identical. Quad B is running slightly cooler, but only very slightly so. The temperature readouts in all respects are normal, so apparently the is working well from a thermal viewpoint. A
Следует отметить, что в 3:26:33 я наблюдаю в не
네, 저도
यदि इस समय सुविधा हो तो सर्जन रक्तचाप की जांच कराने का अनुरोध करते हैं
Nous pointons droit ve
分かりました。次に変わるのは3つ下です。「M
Roger. On dirait que l'attitude 
Al
Okay. We got it. We're sending you a state vector, and we wou
Rog
好的。我已切换到 Bravo Dog 开关配置，现在可以播放音乐了。上
双子座4号，金丝雀外科医生。你上次
Roger.
Ricevuto. Capisco. A breve sostituiremo il filtro, il riscaldatore della linea di spurgo è acceso ***, tra poco verranno spurgati O2 e H2 e a 148 ore avvieremo una carica su
Для т
双子座4号
Единственная проблема, Чарли, в том, что эти 
Sì, lascia che Buzz faccia la sua cosa ad alto guadagno, e io mi preparo a sco
FDR. اتركه على المنصة. اتركه على المعدل. الاستثمار الأجنبي المباشر منخفض. هل تريده منخفضًا أم مرتفعًا 
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. صمام التحكم الرئيسي في تبخير 
قل مرة أ
是的，这只是个粗
Хорошо. Большое спасибо. Наш наибольший дрейф на гироскопах составляет 0,03 градуса в час, а на X-гироскопе
روجر
रॉजर। सूर्यास्त के समय ये परतें सूर्य
好的。我们想要方案一，你已经有了太阳和月亮的球体角度。现在，吉姆已经把太
11, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अभी OMNI एंटीना कॉन्फ़िगरेशन पर स्विच करें। हम S बैंड एंटीना OMNI को Bravo में और S बैंड एंटीना OMNI को OMNI में स्विच करने का अ
Ricevuto. Alle 74:30, vorremmo che attivaste le ventole in tutti e quattro i serbatoi CRYO e posizionaste i riscaldatori in tutti e quattro i serbatoi CRYO in posizione AUTO. Lo faremo in anticipo per assicurarci che non si verifichi alcuna destratificazione a seguito della combustione, che potrebbe comportare l'emissione di un avviso di attenzione e di avvertimento durante la combustione. Pa
로저, 불이
出るときに、彼らは私たちにいくつかの REACQ 角度を与えてくれたので、それを使用したのですが、ロックが解除されて位置が
Ich würde sagen, die 
Okay. Thank y
トランクウィリティ基地との通信中は、ご迷惑をおかけしないよう、アップリンクの
حسنًا، عند TIG ناقص 17، احذف CB (11). ناقل التيار المتردد A، رادار الالتقاء، إغلاق، انتظر 30 ثانية؛ احذف PGNS: 
كما أعلن الرئيس نيكس
Ok. Lasciami sottolineare, Jack, che 2 ore e mezza è il tempo minimo per iniziare con quella roba dei potenziamenti. Tutto il resto puoi farlo come faresti normalmente, ovv
हाँ। मैं सहमत हूँ, जैक। जैक स्विंगर्ट और मैं थोड़ी देर पहले ऊपर गए थे और हम दोनों एक-एक कनस्तर ले आए थे। हम कुछ सामान ढूंढ रहे थे और सोच रहे थे कि इनका इस्तेमाल कैसे करें। दरअसल, यही वजह है कि जब हमने पीने का सारा पानी तैयार किया, तो हमें पेंट्री में रखे प्लास्टिक के डिब्बे की ज़रूरत थी। हमारे पास कुछ सामान के साथ वह डिब्बा भी तैयार था, साथ ही कुछ अतिरिक्त छिद्रयुक्त थैले भी थे जिनका इस्तेमाल हम कचरा नियंत्रण के लिए करने वाले थे, जिन्हें हम काटकर इस्तेमाल क
好的。我们将在滚转角 285 度停止进入，高增益角度为俯仰角 23 度，偏
روجر. نحن ننق
ठीक है। आपका कंप्यूटर कनेक्ट हो गया है और सत्यापित हो
Ok, Vance. Questo è il modulo di comando per: filtro e sacchetto della ventola della cabina; sacchetti di decontaminazione, tranne quelli che usiamo per la telecamera, nel; due nel; quattro bombolette di LOiH [sic] nel sacchetto JETT; e fisseremo il sul lato
Roger. Einverstanden. Ich habe nach der Leuchtrakete gesucht. Bist du j
Okay. 
Roger. 1A and 1B are 6 and 1/2 volts, rather that's amps, and 24 
While I was outside I noticed on Jim's window - he's got a coating on the outside of it. One time when I brushed up against it with with either my shoulder or my arm it actually smeared right over on it, and it smeared the upper part of his windshield so that he couldn't see out. When I look out from this side, I can see that it is rather heavily coated with some type of mater
Und, Aquarius, wir haben jetzt einen ziemlich guten Kurs für Sie festgelegt. Es sieht so aus, als ob Sie sich etwas außerhalb des Korridors befinden. Wir rechnen um 104 Uhr mit einer Geschwindigkeit von 7 Fuß pro Sekunde in der Mit
If you aline it in a 3-feet-per-second burn, if you are 10 degrees off on the Platform, it'd be hard for us to see it, as far as the Delta-V operation is. So why don't we - as we c
В нашем контрольном списке указана низкая скорость передачи данных, Хьюстон. Если вам 
Просто держите голову близко к
아쿠아리우스
Roger, ich verstehe, dass Sie mit der Kontrolle des Horizonts überhaupt kein Problem 
И 
Roger. Conformément à la page 47, étape 1, le guidage était en mode PGNS et le mode de contrôle en PGNS AUTO. Les disjoncteurs des propulseurs n'étaient pas encore activés. Lorsque nous avons commencé la procédure DAP et poursuivi avec le numéro 46 (nous sommes maintenant sur le numéro 47), le voyant RCS TCA s'est allumé, ainsi que quatre des huit autres voyants rouges. Cela s'explique probablem
在第 14 页右侧底部“轨
И, Водолей; Хьюстон. У меня есть несколько автоматических выключателей, которые можно 
هدوء، هيوستن. يرجى تفريغ الوقود والأكسجين مجددا
나는 그의 눈을 피해 왼
コロンビアはハイゲインにロックされ
Seven, Hawaii Com Tech, ich em
Eagle, Houston. Roger. We copy. The whole world is proud of y
ساعتا
Хорошо. У нас есть три момента. Во-первых, все ваши результаты — две оценки — были проведены, и… — Поздравляем! Выглядит отлично; они очень довольны. У вас осталось всего 4 угловые минуты по субз
Ricevuto. La temperatura della tuta è ora di 70 [gradi]. La temperatura della tuta è di 70 [grad
Credo che la cosa che mi abbia colpito di più siano state le albe e i tramonti lunari. In particolare, questi ultimi mettono in risalto la natura austera del territorio, e le lunghe ombre mettono davvero in risalto il rilievo che si nota qui
是的，但应该是48。我不
吉姆，今晚你要求禁用C和D组组件
Вод
네, 맞습니다.
روجر. هذا مركز اتصالات RKV CAP. ستتلقى رسالة
حسنًا. دعني - أولًا، دعني أرى كيف تسير الأمور هنا
रॉज
ठीक है, जैक। अब तुम कोणों को कैसे देख रहे हो? हमने चंद्रमा को केंद्र में रखा था, और यह 8 बॉ
Сейчас я уберу фотоаппарат, чтобы проверить освещение в Дурбане. Н
Mike must have done a smooth j
ロジャー、ヒューストンCAP COM。ジェミニ4、はっきりと聞こえました
Bene. E i nostri ragazzi qui sotto stanno guardando il programma di puntamento dell'antenna ad alto guadagno, quindi ogni volta che non lo usi per altro, vorrebbero guardarlo per un paio di cicli,
投球
Okay, dieses Licht ist aus – ich weiß jetzt 
네. 13 바로 아래입니다. 참고로 말씀드리자면, 저희는 여러 가지 작업을 동시에 진행하고 있습니다. 곧 다가올 중간 단계에서 제어 시스템을 결정하고, 선택한 제어 시스템으로 어떻게 비행할
双子座 4，夏威夷 CAP CO
Gemini VIII, RKV. Вы сломали переклю
Haben Sie eine Schätzung Ihres TPI-
..
روج
乔，就我
...하지만 당신은 내 육분의와 내 육군참모총장
Okay. Ich nehme an, wenn Jack in dieser P
好的，比尔。我们之前在E-9页第38步开头漏掉了一个更新，现在
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。迈克，我们想
Ok. Ottimo affare, Frank. L'altra cosa è che i ragazzi nella stanza sul retro vorrebbero un po' d
알겠습니다. 좋은 생각입니다. 탱크 수위가 너무 높았는데, 압력 스위치가 닫혀 히터 작동을 시작
Jim, bezüglich Ihrer zweiten Batterie vermuten wir, dass der Alarm eher durch einen Sensorausfall – genauer gesagt durch einen Defekt des Temperatursensors – ausgelöst wurde als durch eine tatsächliche Überhitzung der Batterie. Der Grund dafür ist, dass wir im Glykolkreislauf keine höheren Temperaturen festgestellt 
D'accord. moins 00489 plus 00000 plus 47250 177 144 000, non applicable, plus 00197 47253 554 47050 12 1278 256 02
了解。了解。マイク0.7と8.0。ただ一つ問題なのは、私にとって観測に最適な道
ヒュースト
حسناً. كان هناك 30 نقرة
よし、フレッド。その前
如果你没有，我可以随时给
Ok, Jack, durante la trasmissione televisiva eravamo in modalit
Roger. 
Роджер. Шаг 6: «Развернуться на 0,3 градуса в секунду по рыска
Roger. Status report. I have sent you a blood. All systems are green, but for suit circuit, which I am working on carefully. I am in retroattitude; gyros normal; maneuver off. I am working on the suit circuit. I am still holding set
Eagle, Houston. Könnten Sie bitte bestätigen, da
Cette zone située juste à l'ouest de la Mer des Crises s'appelle le Marai
了解。ノーマルモードだ。ロックを破ってからコマンドリセットは使えるようになった。戻ってオムニを操作しないといけないから、ドッグにコマンドを
حسناً. لديّ حل هنا. عند 4.5، بسرعة 10 أقدام في ال
了解。GET B 1 34 37; デルタV 2.9; 燃焼時間 0 + 05; ヨー 0, ピッチ 0; アドレス 25 90029; アドレス 26 すべてゼロ; アドレス 27 すべてゼロ; スラスター前進; 機動
D'accord, Joe. Je te comprends
Bene. Abbiamo messo il cloro e
11、ヒューストン。星図がだいぶ良くなりました。黄道面と惑星、そして太陽と月が黄道面上の様々な場所を移動している様子が
Хорошо. Послушайте, Хьюстон уже уведомили о том, чт
Okay, alles klar
ठीक है। मध्यमार्ग के संदर्भ में, मुझे लगता है कि इस बात पर आम सहमति है कि हम इसे वैसे ही करे
ठीक है, फ्रेड। जो मैंने आपको दिया है, वह कमांड मॉड्यूल की अम्बिलिकल से बिजली हटाने के अंत में है। और आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, इस पूरी प्रक्रिया के बाद और जब आप कमांड मॉड्यूल में ट्रांसफर करने के लिए तैयार हों, उस समय अम्बिलिकल से बिजली हटा दी जाएगी, और इसे डिस्कनेक्ट करना ठीक है। यानी, स्विच चालू करने के बाद। 
Роджер. Занзибар. Извините, что ошибся с звонком. Я собираюсь у
姿勢制御 -- レート コマンドまたは再突入レート コマンドを
Nein, wir haben die Ventilatoren nicht an, aber wir haben 
Топливный элемент с разо
Хорошо. Просто для уточнения. Начинается все с панели 3, переключатель ЗАРЯДКИ АККУМУЛЯТОРА, ВЫКЛ; ИНВЕРТОР ПЕРЕМЕННОГО ТОКА 2, ВЫКЛ; п
ठीक है। जब तक हम लोडिंग पूरी नहीं कर लेते, तब तक आप अपनी पैंतरेबाज़ी रोक कर रखें। लोडिंग अभी पू
こんにちは、大西洋の船です。アトランティック・
네. 별거 아니에요. 음, 어디 보자. 스포츠부터 시작해 볼까요? 휴스턴 애스트로스는 8대 7로 간신히 이겼고, 애틀랜타 브레이브스는 9회에 5~6점을 냈지만 간신히 승리했어요. 그리고 오늘 중요한 경기 중 하나였던 시카고 컵스는 비 때문에 경기가 취소됐습니다. 나머지 경기 결과도 다 알고 있는데, 필요하시면 말씀해 주세요. 마닐라와 루손 섬 여러 곳에서 지진이 발생했어요. 세 차례 진동이 있었고, 건물들이 약 30분 동안 흔들렸는데, 리히터 규모 5 정도였습니다. 자, 그럼. 비틀즈가 더 이상 그룹 활동을 하지 않겠다고 발표했습니다. 이 4인조 그룹은 짧은 음악 활동 기간 동안 5억 달러가 넘는 돈을 벌었다고 합니다. 
ठीक है, एसी बस बी के अंतर्गत: एस-बैंड एंटीना, खुला; खुला। एसी बस ए के अंतर्गत: टेप रिकॉर्डर, खुला। सिस्टम ए के अंतर्गत पंक्ति 2: मुख्य सोव। क्वाड टीसीए से शुरू करते हुए; चारों बंद। क्रॉस-कमांडर क्रॉस-पॉइंटर क
Батарея А, да
로저. GMTRC 16 28 28. 02+39. 
Alle AUTO und... 1 Fuß pro Sekunde nomi
Roger, Jim. J'ai une courte procédure à vous expliquer. Votre matrice W partage des emplacements mémoire; par conséquent, la matrice W actuelle n'est pas valide et nous vous déconseillons de poursuivre vos observations avec celle-ci. La procédure que je vais vous donner va réinitialiser la matrice avant votre prochaine session. Vous retrouverez ainsi la valeur de la matrice W chargée après l'incident 3303. Si cela a des répercussions sur le plan de vol, nous sommes en train 
Aquarius, Houston. We'd like to have AFT OMN
ह्यूस्टन, यह 8 है। मैं स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप के माध्यम से देख रहा हूं और उस एलओएक्स डंप ने पूरे स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप को पूरी तरह से ब्लैंक कर दिय
Aurora Seven. Muchea Cap Com. 1, 2
روجر. لقد جهّز ن
सूट का तापमान अब भी थोड़ा बढ़ रहा है, लगभग 72 डिग्री है। मैं सूट नंबर 5 पर बैठा हूँ और इसे थोड़ा ठंडा होने के लिए कु
네
Das ist bestätigt. Wir versuchen, den Panzer mit Strom zu versorgen. Bit
ओवेन, प्लेटफ़ॉर्म अलाइनमेंट में 
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. سنشحن البطارية "ب" حتى فترة السكون. سنتوقف عن الشحن حينها. أيضاً، في حوالي الساعة ١٢:٢٥ من خطة الرحلة، لدينا
水
Nous
아폴로 8호입니다. 85피트 접시 안테나로 복귀하기까지 약 30분 정도 더 기다려야 하므로,
حسناً يا جي
휴스턴, 이제 슬슬 헤어지기 시작하는 것 같네... 휴스턴, 쌍둥이자리 4장 
Фрэнк, наша цель — добиться радиального восходящего импульса; и, если это возможно, с помощью оптики или каким-либо другим способом через окно определить местоположение Земли, затем использовать соответствующие двигатели для радиального тягового движения вверх со скоростью 3 фута в секунду. Именно это нам и нужно для обесп
我的意思是，
Oui, j'
Ich weiß nur, dass sie sich an einem Ende nicht einstecken lässt, am ande
Подо
Who knows a
로저. 휴스
네, 맞습니다. 모두 지구 지평선 작업에 매우 만족하고 있습니다. 저희 생각에는 그 작업은 생략하고, 달 지평선 별 각각에 한
我右侧的头皮都磨疼了，因为我每次想在头盔里转头看向远处的车窗时，
Roger. Verstanden. Nur zur Information, vielleicht lesen Sie es ja am Boden vor. Ich habe zunächst unsere Perizynth-Höhenbestimmung durchgeführt. Mit dem Sternvektor, mit dem wir navigiert haben, ergab sich eine Höhe von 84,7 Seemeilen. Anschließend haben wir Ihren Vektor verwendet, den Sie uns beim letzt
أفهم أن الجو أصبح دافئًا بعض الشيء خلال النهار، ثم انخفضت حرارته قليلًا عند رفع الستائر، لكن لا يزال الجو دافئًا بعض الشيء. هل لاحظت أي تكثف للرطوبة أو ما شابه 
Roger, Tranquility
——提
是
如果你能检
Yes, and we used 
わかりました。地球とランデブーウィン
Okay. Auf meiner zuverlässigen Uhr hatte ich eine Länge von etwa 3-3/4 Sek
我们正在完成重新存储工作。目前重新存储工作基本完成。实际上，它将与发射配置相同，
OK. La température dans la combinaison est de 70 degrés. Celle dans la cabine est de 45 degrés. Ce satané échangeur de chaleur est à 40 degrés. L'air à l'entrée de la combinaison 
Beh, Houston, non abbiamo avuto molto tempo per parlarti della vista dal finestrino mentre ci preparavamo per l'espulsione; ma fino a quel momento avevamo l'intera parte settentrionale dell'emisfero illuminato visibile, inclusi il Nord America, il Nord Atlantico, l'Europa e il Nord Africa. Potevamo vedere che il tempo era buono ovunque, quasi ovunque. C'era una depressione ciclonica nel Can
Yes. They got that data, and they were kind of intereste
Houston, Apollo 
我决
Nur dass alles einen so großen Scha
Теперь мы видим планету. Роджер. Юпитер. Я вижу цепочку звёзд для «Грузового луча», и старый добрый Формальгаут — там, в верхнем
He's not making many points at home with that comment
로저. 여기는 정상인 것 같네요. 모든 게 좋아 보입니다. 자동 연료는 55% 남았습니다. 70,000피트를 지나 65,000피트까지 도달했습니다. 자세는 매우 안정적입니다. 60,000피트에 가까워지고 있습니다. 레이트 커맨드도 아주 잘 작동합니다. 50,000피트에 가까워지고 있습니다. 아주 좋아 보입니다. 45,000피트에 가까워지고 있습니다. G는 약 1g까지 떨어졌습니다. 40,000,000피트에서 스로틀을 당길 준비를 하고 있습니다. 스로틀을 당기니 스로틀이 빠졌습니다. 소리는 들리지만 구름 때
In sports, the Houston Oilers are showing plenty of enthusiasm in their early preseason workouts at Kerrville, and Coach Wally Lemm says he is impressed with the fine group of rookies. National League baseball yesterday, Thursday: St. Louis 11, Philadelphia 3; Montreal 5, over Pittsburg 4; Atlanta 12, Cincinnati 2; San Fransciso 14, and Los Angeles 13. American League: we have Baltimore 3, over Cleveland 2; Detroit 4 to Washington's 3; Minnesota 8 to Chicago 5. Boston at New York was rained out. And in Corby, England, an Irishman, Jo
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। 
Nein, ich habe keinen Blitz geseh
고다드 목소리, 휴
フランク、読んでくれているならいいかな？いくつか最新情報をお伝えするよ。これから送るのはスロット
肯，如果你的同事想玩全向切换游戏，我
알겠습니다. 그리고 한 가지 더 발견한 점이 있습니다. 압력을 가했을 때 상승 탱크의 압력이 상승했는데, 상승 급수 밸브가 닫혀 있는지 확인해 주시기 바랍니다. 이를 위해 11번 패널에서 상승 급수 밸브 1번과 2번 회로 차단기를 닫고 
지금 제게는 12시 30분 시간이
厚さは2倍ではあり
On a dû passer Hawaï maintenant. 01:
Roger on the inertial. And here we go on the 2 PAD. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, plus 166, minus 081; TIG 080 11 3603. NOUN 81: minus 01408, minus all balls, minus 00743. Roll all balls, 196 359 00657, plus 00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Sextant star 23 1160 138. The rest of the PAD is NA. align, Vega and Deneb 243 183 012. Ullage, two jets 19 seconds. Remarks: On your load, we would like an R1 20101 vice the value which appears in the flight plan. In making the sextant star check this must be done between of 79 30 10, at which time the star comes above the horizon, and 79 52 10, which is your local sunrise due to the fact that this star's relatively close to the Sun. Your burn orientation is heads down, retrograde
حسناً. استمر يا جاك، وسأعود إلى 
D'accord. Prochaine étape: sur le panneau 5, les bornes CB POWER-1 MAIN B et POWER-2 MAIN B sont 
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. هل ي
حسنًا. أنا أشير 
Apollo 8, Houst
أفهم. لقد أنجزتَ ما أرادته القوات الجوية.
अपोलो 11, जब हमारा एस-बैंड कनेक्शन बंद हो जाएगा, तो हम आपसे ओम्नी चार्ली लेना चाहेंगे। और मेरे पिछले संदेश को अपडेट कर दें, कि 77 04 वह समय था जब एरिस्टार्चस आपके क्षितिज पर दिखाई देना चाहिए था। 77 12 इसके दक्षिण में सबसे नज़दीकी पहुँच का बिंदु ह
Questa è Friendship Seven, che trasmette nella capsula. L'alba è spuntata dietro il periscopio. Era brillante nel mirino, di un rosso brillante mentre si avvicinava all'orizzonte e sorgeva; e proprio mentre... mentre guardavo di nuovo fuori dal finestrino, ho visto letteralmente migliaia di piccole particelle luminose che turbinavano intorno alla capsula e 
हां, जब आप सामान्य कामकाज से बाहर निकलते हैं, 
로저. 제가 재점검할 때마
Okay, Jim. Um hier ein oder zwei Ampere Strom zu sparen, bitten wir Sie, auf die Konfiguration „Sprache abwärts, Kommunikationssicherung abwärts“ umzuschalten. Dazu ziehen Sie die Strom- und Leitungsschutzs
- 
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. الآن، الخطوة الثامنة هي: "بناءً على طلبكم، نفّذوا الخطوة التاسعة". بمعنى آخر، عليكم الانتظار حتى نقرر ما يجب فعله، وذلك وفقًا للإرشادات التي قدمناها لكم مسبقًا. أما الخطوة التاسعة، فسأوضحها لكم الآن، فهي: "إيقاف تشغيل جهاز مراقبة الهيليوم، وإيقاف تشغي
네, 저희가 준비해 드리겠습니다. 방금 중복 구성 요소 검사에 대해 이야기했는데, 모두가 잠을 좀 자고 난 후에 하려고 했었습니다. 왼
Apollo 8, this is Houston. You are GO for 2; all systems are GO. evaluation is s
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。我有两种方法可以帮你们给舱内升温。第一种方法一个人就能搞定——最好的办法是打开一个或两个舱内风扇，并将舱内热交换器开到最大功率。升温过程会比较慢，而且不会很热。第
حسناً، تفضل. يمكنن
罗
Ро
अपोलो 11, जब हमारा एस-बैंड कनेक्शन बंद हो जाएगा, तो हम आपसे ओम्नी चार्ली लेना चाहेंगे। और मेरे पिछले संदेश को अपडेट कर दें, कि 77
D'accord. Voici la procédure de charge de la batterie Baker. Panneau 3: BAT CHARGE, OFF; panneau 5: MAIN BUS TIE, BAT A/C vers A/C; CB
太好了。他们会为我感到骄傲吗？我现在正在
أراهن على ذلك. أراهن أنك ستتحدث إلى نفسك تقريبًا هناك
Это совершенно верно. Я уже забыл, сколько 
Apollo 8, Ho
收到。他们正
제가 다시 읽어드리겠습니다. RN에서 RP를 뺀 값에 77을 더한 값; 400K의 피치(공칭); RET 400K, 22 + 02; ETO, 24 + 43; 최종 정전, 30 + 01; 드로그, 31 + 37; 메인, 32 
了解、フレ
分かりました
Roger. We're seeing the center of the Earth as viewed from the spacecraft in the eastern Pacific Ocean. We have not been able to visually p
はい、ちょっと待ってください。ちょっと待ってください。マスターはオン、インターコムはオン、VHFはオン、パッド通信はオフ、Sバンドはオン、インターコム/プッシュ・トゥ・トークモードになっています。音量ダイ
Very good. Fo
了解。近地点86海里をコピーしました。遠地点は取得できませ
로저. 우정
Roger. Va b
Cosa hai per...?... Ho percorso 6,8 e 9 miglia,... f
Sì, certo. Non ti rendi conto di quanto diventi fredda questa cosa quando è in modalità rallentamento, e ho appena cronometrato i cicli sul mio.
Bene. Se non c'è diminuzione nella quantità di liquido accumulatore secondario, glicole secondario alla valvola del radiatore su NORMALE. Passaggio successivo, pompa del circuito di raffreddamento secondario, AC 1 o AC 2. Dopo 3 minuti, verificare che la pressione secondaria di scarico del glicole sia compresa tra 39 e 51 psig. Verificare inoltre che la temperatura di uscita EVAP secondaria sia cambiata. Passaggio successivo, pompa del circuito di raffreddamento secondario, OFF. Glico
لا، سنفعل ذلك قريباً جداً، لكننا نريد معدل بت عالي، ولا نريدك أن تع
माइक, यह अच्छा है 
绳索仍然没有绷紧。我拍了一些照片
هذا صحيح يا جاك. 
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。少しお待ちいただけますか？チャーリーとフライトは気象情報収集のため
Что-то не так с количеством топлива, которое показывает мой счетчик, и с количеством встречного
Okay. Wenn Sie Ihr Manöverbuch zur Hand nehmen – das letzte Manöver, das wir Ihnen für den Überflug gegeben haben, ist weiterhin gültig. Wir möchten lediglich anmerken, dass der Eintrittswinkel (Gamma) etwas steiler ist als von uns als ideal angesehen, aber er liegt innerhalb unserer derzeitigen Vorhersagegenauigkeit. Das Überflugmanöver bleibt also gültig. En
О, старая добра
それほどではありません。最初の2インチくらいまでは特に問題なく打ち込めました。それから、できるだけ力一杯打ち込んでいくと、2回目は両手でハンマーを握り、延長ロッドの上部にかなり大きなへこみをつけてしまいました。それで、それ以上は…全体の深さはおそらく8インチか9インチくらいだったと思います。しかし、そこでも…どういうわけか、まっすぐに立たないように見えました。つまり、打ち込み続けると、何らかの穴を掘るのですが、倒れないように支えるような形で突き刺さる、という感じでした。もし意味が通じるならですが。私
रॉजर। हमें वो सारी जानकारी मिल गई है और हमने उसकी पुष्टि भी कर ली है; आप अपने कंप्यूटर पर जाकर देख सकते हैं। जॉर्ज लो का कहना है कि वो 6 नंबर या अंतरिक्ष यान 10
阿波罗8号，
Forza Houst
了解。飛行計画についていくつか検討すべき点があります。まず1つ目は、目撃情報の前に機体調整を少し入れる必要が
Um die Rollkorrektur für eine hohe Verstärkung zu optimieren, führen wir derzeit Rollbewegungen durch, 
روجر. بناءً على آخر تحليل لحالة الوقود، يبدو أن لدينا ما يكفي لإتمام خطة الطيران مع الحفاظ على 
سنجربه
ジム、バッテリーの問題ですが、過電流や逆
C'es
चलिए एक बार फिर पता 81 को आजमाते हैं और देखते हैं कि यह 
حسنً
Merci beaucoup. Et nous allons procéder aux marques, 
Roger. La raison du retard, Charlie, est que – il est difficile de trouver deux ét
Plus 59578, minus 00086, minus 05287, 012 080 018, not applicable, plus 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, earth up 005, right 27, plus 0398, plus 06500 13215 36961; Sirius Rigel 137 311 339, no ullage, assume executio
Bene. E ora... mi rompi i coglioni quando superi i 50 gradi di imbardata, quindi probabilmente terrò d'occhio quel numero molto attentamente. Vorremmo ch
Houston, Tranquility Base is ready to go through the powerdown and terminate the simul
Bene. E noi siamo - siamo LOS qui per un po' comunque, 1
База Спокойствия, прошло чуть меньше 10 минут. Всё выглядит хорошо, и мы предполагаем, что управляемый транспорт находится в автоматическом режиме движения по трас
Хорошо, Джо. Как я понял, через 74 часа мы проведем проверку положения Солнца на отметке 2, для чего потребуется убрать радар сближения. Мы используем автоматический маневр, чтобы достичь этой точки, или, по крайней мере, углы, и если они пройдут в пределах 1 градуса, вы говорите, что платформа подходит для маневра, и нам не понадобится последующий. Но даже если все будет в порядке, вы укажете нам звезду, которую мы сможем использовать для проверки в темноте. Если эта проверка провалится, вы передадите нам дальнейшую процедуру выравни
Roger, Zwillinge 4. Wir haben jetzt den Blutdruck gemesse
マイナス、非常に近い。バックアップし
Bene, Houston, lo scarico delle acque reflue e lo spurgo delle celle 
Aquarius, how about cycling the power temp monito
Roger. Mike, tu es en mode cinq par cinq. Nous souhaiterions la configuration OMNI suivante: OMNI Alfa en Br
ヒューストン、アポロ 8 号。進入は次のとおり: 太平洋中部、357 152 359 268 プラス 0813 マイナス次のブロックは適用不可、400 0212 0025 0334 0814 16059 312、ペルセウス座ゼータ星
Te lo re
और चंद्रमा का केंद्र ल
Хорошо. В вашем компьютере установлена ​​действительная версия 36-4. Можете выключить комп
好了，万斯。准备复制
Roger
Roger. Vorremmo chiederti di interrompere l'uso dell'AUTO OPTICS sul sito di pseudo-atterraggio. È necessario che ti mandiamo un messa
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अब उसी क्षेत्र को ऊपर से देखने पर ऐसा लगता है कि यह पृथ्वी की रोशनी को प्रतिबिंबित कर रहा है। मुझे पक्का नहीं पता कि इसे लगभग शून्य कलाय पर सेट किया गया था या नहीं - खैर, कम से कम क्रेटर की एक दीवार बाकी दीवारों से ज़्यादा रोशन दिखती है, और अगर हम पृथ्वी के साथ सही दिशा में हैं, तो वह दीवार लगभग शून्य कलाय पर लगती है। वह क्षेत्र निश्चित रूप से इस खिड़की से दिखाई देने वाली किसी भी चीज़ से ज़्यादा चमकीला है। मुझे पक्का नहीं पता कि मैं कोई फॉस्फोरेसेंस देख पा रहा हूँ, ले
هذا صحيح. 
Gli assetti sono sotto controllo. Sembra esserci abbastanza carburante manuale. Sono ancora al 72%. A questo punto, il rateo ciclico è decisamente in beccheggio. L'imbardata è piuttosto rigida; i g stanno aumentando. La capsula è piuttosto stabile. C'è un flusso verde e ogni tanto sembrano strisce arancioni. Sta andando molto bene durante il rientro. Un rollio lento piuttosto insolito. Aumenta fino a 2 g. Ho abbastanza carburante nel rateo di comando. Vedo arrivare delle scintille. Un chiaro bagliore verde, come una limonata; i g stanno aumentando. Le oscillazio
いいえ。ケープからアメリカ
سبعة، تُظهر بيانات قياسنا عن
好吧，随你怎么想。我们只是觉得你可能会感兴趣
명암 대비가 증가하여 능선의 햇빛을 받는 면만 밝게 빛나고,
카나리아 여러분, 아직도 책 읽으
Roger. E la prossima domanda del nostro panel è per Buzz. Ricordiamo che ha riferito di aver visto un laser sulla Terra la prima volta dopo la prima REV dopo l'ascesa, e ci chiediamo di che colore fosse il raggio e se 
11，收到
11,
Sai, è davvero un peccato che i finestrini laterali siano appannati, perché non vediamo mai il sole attraverso i fine
That is right. I have reporte
吉姆，这大概需要用六分仪进行星象校准。这主要取决于我们最终拿
ふたご座
Non capirò mai perché non si sentano i motori di questi 3 razzi da 3500 li
D'accord, j'ai encore les disjoncteurs PYRO A séquence A et PYRO B séquence B en place
मुझे लगता है कि यह आवाज़ और एंटीना दोनों का मिलाजुला असर है। शा
ジェミニ VI、加速度計のバ
好
比尔，说得很
わかりました、ジャック。姿勢制御とエンジン
1.7ミリメー
Да, вы едете без проблем. Если возник
«Ап
FUNCTION switch... There's still a lot of backgr
좋습니다. 페리신시온 + 2를 MPL에 넣고, 079, 27, 4013, + 08144, - 00443, - 00226, N/A, + 00205, 08455, 4 + 20, 268, 261, + 08155, - 00443, - 021, 2187, N/A. GDA는 이대로 괜찮을 것 같고, 피치는 5.85, 요는 6.74가 될 겁니다. 10초 동안 두 개의 제트 엔진으로 연료를 채우고, 스로틀은 5초 동안 10%, 21초 동안 40%, 나머지 연소 시간 동안 100%로 유지합니다. 이렇게 하면 142 + 
オーロラ・セブン、オーロラ・セブン、オーロラ・セブン。こちらはHFとUHFのI.O.S.コムテックで
Довольно сильный удар. Ладно. Сбрасы
هيوستن
休斯顿，这里是鹰报。你们
뭔가 떨어져 나가는 게 보이긴 하는데, 아주 선명하게는 안 보이네요. 0.05g로 들어가니 녹색으로 바뀌었습니다. 이 시점에서는 손을 떼겠습니다. 레이트 커맨드와 
目前地面系统运行状况基本正常。温度略高，但未发
ロジャー。フレッド、よかった。これでステップ8に進み、PROすると5018が点滅します。5018で自動操縦を行い、姿勢を制御したいので、GUIDANCE CONTROL、PNGS、MODE CONTROL、PNGS、AUTOのPROを実行してください。これでこの姿勢になります。これで太陽チェックの姿勢になります。ドッキング構成では、このプログラムで1.4度のデッドバンドを設定しています。参考までに、指針を取得するには、そのデッドバンド内で指針がゼロまたはヌルを通過するときに、そのデッドバンドで太陽が
यह उन समस्याओं से संबंधित है जिनका सामना हमें पहले करना पड़ा था; यह देखने की कोशिश करना कि यहाँ हमें जो सॉफ़्टवेयर रीडिंग मिल रही हैं, वे मैकेनिकल रीडिंग से मेल खाती हैं या नहीं। जहाँ तक हमें पता है, यह वर्तमान म
よし、11番
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on your own, that's the place we'd like to break off and let you go ahead and take over with your own alinement. However, we are giving you a procedure which will give you things we know you can see in the telescope without worrying about any reflections or anything of that nature, and it's not intended that this procedure has to be followed past the point where you know you've got good definition of star patterns in your telescope. If you need to go on, we'll maneuver, take a look at the Moon, we'll take a mark there, and then we'll maneuver with the / angles again and take a look at the Sun, and get yourself another mark on the Sun and that will complete the alinement. Now, the alinement scheme is that we are going to give you a set of angles that you can coarse aline the ball through when the is pointing you at the Moon. Now, this s
Хорошо, СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 81, 
10 ثوانٍ. 5، 4، 
E Apollo 11,
روجر. تقرير الحالة. لقد أرسلت لك عينة دم. جميع الأنظمة تعمل بشكل سليم، باستثناء دائرة البدلة، والتي أعمل عليها ب
ケン、今度
يبدو أن أفضل طريقة للحصول على رؤية ثابتة من خلال المنظار الأحادي هي تثبيته وتركه يغلق عندما يكون أمام عينك، ثم تحريكه قليلاً بجانبك بحيث لا تلمسه إطلاقاً. يتحرك
Р
रोग। सर्वाइवल लैंयार्ड। तुम्हारा जुड़ा हुआ है। मेरा जुड़ा हुआ है। ठीक है, फिर। मेरा हार्नेस औ
D'accord. Angles alignes grossiers: ROULAGE, plus 298,95; TANGAGE, plus 271,30; LATELABILITÉ, 
Yeah, instead of getting asked for it, I'm gotta aske
Ich sehe jetzt den Sonnenaufgang im Periskop. Das erste Licht im Periskop während dieser Umlaufbahn, verursacht durch die Nachtseite. Offensichtlich hat das Periskop auf der Nachtseite keinerlei Funktion bei der Rückwärtsbewegung. Das erste Licht, das ich erhalte, ist praktisch sofort da. Der Sonnenaufgang kommt ziemlich schnell durch das Periskop. Ich sehe die beleuchteten Objekte, die John erwähnt hat, und ich kann welche erzeugen, indem ich sie abschieße. Ich habe definitiv das Gefühl, dass es ein Feld ist, dessen Größe von klein bis hell variiert. Das Periskop selbst blendet m
Дж
Sì, abbiamo notato lo 
Und weil es zu spät sein wird, noch viel an der Integritätsprüfung der Luke zu ändern, falls diese fehlschlägt, wollen Sie, dass wir während dieses Ze
Роджер. Хорошая обратная связь. Хорошо, продо
私たちは...そのように
Джерри, меня немного беспокоит температура. У нас тут довольно жарко, и температура на выходе из испарителя поднялась примерно до 45 градусов. Вы зам
알겠습니다. 알겠습니다. VOX 버튼 대신 마이크 버튼을 한 번 사용해 보시겠어요?
لا يوجد على ا
Родж
Gemini 4, Хьюстон, CA
Ok. Scuoto la testa violentemente da tutte le parti, con gli occhi chiusi, su e giù, beccheggio, rollio, imbardata. Niente nello stomaco; niente da nessuna parte. Ora c'è... proverò a premere il pulsante zero, tempo zero. Beh, me lo sono perso. Ero un po' disorientato su dove fossero esattamente le cose, non sono sicuro di cosa si voglia ottenere con questo, ma non
Vous leur répondriez: « Buenas días », ou quelque chose de similair
これらの無菌のものを入
Apo
I believe so, Ken. This band is parallel to the M-line, and I think it has something to do with the design of the optics where we have that shaft or the rectangular entrance of the optics from the outside. At this particular sun angle, it cuts right across. Now I noticed that both the earth and the sun do this to the scanning telescope. In the sextant, the same light band is there, although it covers the entire sextant's field of view. However, the magnification brings out the stars quite well, and it is possible to mark on it. But the identification of the stars with the scanning telescope makes it very difficult. Now the attitude that I found the optics are best at are the attitudes which give the constellations Canis Major and Orion in the scanning telescope. At this, this particular attitude of the spacecraft, the band is gone; we're at a position whereby the sun is behind us, and I can see quite a few stars. Now yesterday I cou
Okay, Aquarius. We're going to dispense with this control mode. We'd like you to fly the machine back to the original attitude that you had, and we'll go ATTITUDE HOLD, and then we've got to get that ball off the line to save some power. And then, in order to keep even heatin
Wally, 
了解。了解
ألا تعتقد أنه لو استطعنا الحصول على... لكان بإ
我刚才看到一颗流星拖着长长的尾巴，在我们前方不远处落下，然后在我们下方很远的地方熄灭了。它的尾巴很
Roger, Apollo 8. C'est exact. Nous aimerions revérifier un chiffre concernant les 90 minutes supp
...dans ce champ de vision, il n'y a presque que du bleu - je vois surtout du noir et
ठीक है
नहीं, नहीं। यहाँ तो बहुत ही खुशनुमा माहौल है। साथ में कुछ लोग हों तो अच्छा लगेगा। दरअसल, अगर यहाँ कुछ कर
了解しました。該当なし。プラス00188 30193 255 300
Sto scattando foto del meteo quasi in verticale. Il valore di luce è 13-½. Il risultato è c
Fred, volevo solo avvisarti in anticipo che stiamo raggiungendo il valore di CO2 limite per il contenitore secondario, e prevediamo di arrivarci tra circa mezz'ora, dopo
わかりました。コピーする前に、ここで全部読んで、私たちが何を話しているのか理解してもらいましょう。この短い手紙のタイトルは「テレビと映画写真の相関実験」です。彼らがやりたいのは、望遠レンズを取り付けたテレビカメラをブラケットに取り付け、ランデブーウィンドウに設置し、赤と青のフィルターを通して地球のテレビ画像を撮影することです。フィルター1つにつき1分、つまり赤と青のフィルターを個別に撮影します。次に、赤色フィルター（この場合は25アルファフィルター）と偏光フィルターを組み合わせたフィルターを通して地球のテレビ画像を撮影します。偏光フィルターを360度回
जी हां। अब यह ईडेफोर पर दिख रहा है। फोकस थोड़ा सा गड़बड़ है। स्क्रीन के बीच में पृथ्वी दिख रही है। कैमरे के नीचे अभी भी एक छोटा सा सफेद बिंदु दिख रहा है। और बीच में कुछ भूभाग भी दिख रहे हैं, कम से कम मुझे 
好的。接下来，CB，面板 11 和 1
Vorrei fare un piccolo commento sul sestante. Il suo utilizzo in una navicella spaziale angusta è molto difficile, soprattutto con il casco. Alla fine ho deciso che sarebbe stato inutile con il casco per cercare di catturare gli angoli richiesti dalle stelle. Così mi sono tolto il casco. Questo mi ha dato un po' più di flessibilità nell'uso, ma ero comunque limitato ad angoli di circa 20-23° senza manovrare la navicella. Quello che succedeva era che la stella veniva tagliata fuori dalla parte 
알겠습니다. 중간 항로 수정과 관련해서, 수정은 약 25피트/초 정도의 속도로 진행될 예정입니다. 시간 지연의 이유는 분리 간격을 7.5피트/초로 설정해 
私がやることは…もう一度言います…わかりました。もう一度繰り返します。パッケージバルブを押し下げてオフ、緊急キャビン圧力をオフ
Wie ich gerade – Ja, sind Sie bereit zu übernehmen? Nun, er hat gerade gefragt – er meinte, ich würde schlafen. Und ich sagte ihm, dass ich auf Sie warte – Okay. Sie waren offline, als sie die – Aber können sie nicht – Können wir unsere CDUs 
आप कैसा महसूस कर रहे हैं? मैं बहुत
हमें और भी कई तरह की फिल्म
ジム、バッテリーをラインに戻す準備ができました。パネル16のCROSS TIE BAL LOAD回路ブレーカーを開けて、BAT 2をラ
Ensuite, nous aimerions que vous placiez la caméra contre la vitre, en la tenant de façon à ce que le nez du vaisseau ne soit pas dans le champ de vision. Nous souhaitons ensuite deux séries de photos. Vous devez être en mode Pulse et pointer le vaisseau directement vers la Terre. Je vous laisse le temps de démarrer. La prise de vue se fera en direction de la Terre, côté nuit. Effectuez une première impulsion vers le haut (
Going to VOX reco
Beautiful burn; SPS,
Okay, Jim. Jetzt steht auf unserer Checkliste der Punkt, wie man ein Kabinenbad einleitet. Dabei geht es um Verdunstung, und ich glaube nicht,
D'accord. Je voulais simplement vous en informer et vous inciter à réfléchir à ses implications sur le plan de vol. Je vous présenterai ensuite une vue d'ensemble et commenterai la Lune afin de déterminer les sections les plus appropriées. Frank souhaitait que nous vérifiions l'ordre d'apparition des profils d'entrée. Le premier profil affiché est intitulé « Non-sortie n° 2 » et correspond à l'entrée rapide à courte portée. Le deuxième profil, intitulé « 3 500 milles », est également une entrée rapide, mais celle à utiliser en cas d'entrée à plus longue portée. Le troisième profil sera « Non-sortie n° 1 », suivi
ジェミニ8号機、こちらヒューストン。プラットフォームの調整は順調で
Нет, Джим, дело в том, что твой люк ничем не хуже любого другого, но
Verseau, Houston. Comment
रॉजर। यहाँ सब कुछ बहुत अच्छा लग 
किताबों के बारे में, मुझे लगता है कि हमें इस्तेमाल होने वाले छल्लों पर थोड़ा और ध्यान देना चाहिए। हमें इन्हें खोलने में दो-तीन बार दिक्कत आ चुकी है, और पन्ने भी फट रहे हैं जिससे वे किताब में टिक नहीं पा रहे हैं। हमें छल्लों को जोड़ने वाले छेदों को मज़बूत करने के लिए कुछ इंतज़ाम करने चाहिए। पानी की बंदूक में, पानी निकालने के लिए जो छोटा सा निप्पल बाहर निकला होता है, वह सिम्युलेटर की तरह ही बाहर की ओर अटक जाता है, और ट्रिगर छोड़ने के बाद भी पानी निकलता रहता 
你确定你看的是正确
저희가 시도한 것은 간섭을 줄이기 위해 주파수를 약간 조정하는 것이었습니다. 아마 곧 신호가 나올 겁니다. 이제 하강용 산소 공급 장치를 켜고 상승용 산소 공급 장치를 꺼주시기 바
另一则本地新闻：亨茨维尔县法院大楼昨天黎明前被烧毁，看来他们又要在那里开工建设了。接下来是一些关于等待返程的家庭的报道。这篇报道由《邮报》记者安·詹姆斯撰写。“我们就像在月球背面休息一样，”瓦莱丽·安德斯在圣诞夜说道，当时她和家人正在等待阿波罗8号脱离月球轨道，返回地球。安德斯太太周二凌晨0点就到了，邻居们刚刚把孩子们都接走，这样在飞船飞到月球背面、与外界失去联系期间，他们一家人就可以休息一下。弗兰克·博尔曼上校的家在户外装饰着四个巨大的常青花环，上面撒满了粉状的
또 다른 지역 소식입니다. 헌츠빌 카운티 법원이 어제 새벽에 화재로 전소했습니다. 따라서 그 자리에 다시 건설 사업을 해야 할 것 같습니다. 한편, 귀환을 기다리는 가족들에 대한 소식도 전해드립니다. 앤 제임스 기자가 보도한 내용입니다. "우리는 달 뒷면에서 쉬고 있어요." 발레리 앤더스는 크리스마스 이브에 가족과 함께 아폴로 8호가 달 궤도를 벗어나 지구로 귀환하기를 기다리며 이렇게 말했습니다. 앤더스 씨는 화요일 새벽 0시에 도착했고, 이웃들이 아이들을 모두 데려가 우주선이 달 뒤편에 있어 통신이 두절된 동안 가족들이 편히 쉴 수 있도록 도와주었습니다. 프랭크 보먼 대령의 집은 야외에 커다란 상록수 화환 네 개가 걸려 있고, 고운 눈이 뿌려져 있으며, 빨간 리본으로 장식되어 있었습니다. 거실에는 그의 안전한 귀환을 기다리는 크리스마스트리가 놓여 있었고, 금발의 아름다운 아내 수와 늠름한 두 아들 프레더릭과 에드윈은 자정 무렵 달 궤도를 벗어나는 순간을 집에서 지켜볼 계획이었습니다. 평소 같으면 그들은 세인트 크리스토퍼 성공회 교회에서 자정 예배에 참석했을 겁니다. 가족들은 새벽 0시에 모일 예정이었죠. 보먼 가족에는 어린아이가 없기 때문에, 크리스마스 선물 교환은 보먼 대령이 달 왕복 비행이라는 멋진 선물을 가지고 돌아올 때까지 미뤄두기로 했습니다. 마릴린 러벨의 네 아이들은 아이들 입장에서는 아주 평범한 크리스마스를 보낼 거라고 러벨 대위의 아내는 전했습니다. 하지만 선물 이야기는 꺼내기도 꺼려졌는데, 아이들 중 두 명이 바로 옆에 앉아 있었기 때문입니다. "어젯밤에 입었던 옷도 갈아입을 시간이 없었어요."라고 러벨 부인은 말했습니다. 하지만 어른들끼리의 선물 교환은 있을 거고, 크리스마스트리는 러벨이 집에 돌아올 때까지 그대로 있을 겁니다. 액션 라인에 좋은 글이 하나 실렸습니다. 액션 편집자에게 보낸 짧은 편지입니다. 거기에는 이렇게 쓰여 있습니다. "어젯밤에 비행접시로 지구인들에게 깜짝 방문을 하려고 했었는데, 뚱뚱한 남자가 썰매를 끌고 다니고, 로켓 추진 버킷에 탄 세 남자가 달 주위를 질주하는
好的。中
잭, 내가 지금 하고 있는 건, 
दिलचस्प बात यह है कि, जैसा कि मैं देख सक
로저. 재시작 및 표시등. 재설정, 재설
Roger. Nur um sicherzugehen, dass sich nicht die Lust eingeschlichen hat, R
皆さんが見ているのは、スミス海の向こうにあるカストナー・クレーターとギルバート・クレーターです。そして、地球からは見えない、月の表面を占める小さくて明るい衝突
好的。血压测量开始。由于您体温
Хорошо, Джек. Мы хотим, что
ठीक है। अब मैं अपने बाईं ओर स्थित चंद्रमा का उपयोग कर रहा हूँ, और यह इसके लिए एक अच्छा समाधान है। मैं एटीट्यूड इंडिकेटर को ढक देता हूँ और आप यॉ देख सकते हैं। मैं जायरो को फ्री कर रहा हूँ, इस समय फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड चुनने की कोशिश कर रहा हूँ। मैं पहले चंद्रमा को विंडो के केंद्र में रखूँगा - और रोल और पिच को दबाए रखूँगा और फिर चंद्रमा को उसकी सही जगह पर वापस रख दूँगा। इस समय चंद्रमा विंडो के केंद्र के पास आ रहा है। ठीक है
D'accord. Nous vous conseillons d'utiliser toute la pellicule. C'est votre dernière expérience. Utilisez toutes les pellicules dont vous disposez. Jim
Okay. Bitt
Die Kamera funktioniert nic
Роджер. Что это за кратер взрыва
알겠습니다. 수락 버튼을 눌러주시면, 상태 
D'accord, Jack. Je pensais à u
11, hier spricht Houston. Zum Zeitpunkt des zyklischen Auslösens Ihres Akkumulators liefen wir mit niedriger Datenrate und konnten daher den O₂-Durchflussparameter nicht empfangen. Wir gehen davon aus, dass die angezeigten Werte normal sind. Das heißt, sie entsprechen wahrscheinlich dem Verhalten eines defekten Messwandlers, und die Situation wird sich voraussichtlich we
Buzz, la visuale attraverso la tua spalla destra/sinistra è così buona che possiamo vedere la copertura del motore di risalita, il velcro su di essa, ed è tutto ciò che riusciam
حسنًا. حالتي جيدة؛ وضع التحكم هو التحكم الإلكتروني؛ الجيروسكوبات تعمل بشكل طبيعي؛ المناورة معطلة. نسبة الوقود 45-70%، والأكسجين 84-100%. لديّ م
Très bien. C'est tout pour le moment. Ensuite, le CONTRÔ
Roger, Jack, me dit que tout cela ne concerne qu'un seul disjoncteur, et que le suivant est ÉCLAIRAGE: NUMÉRIQUES/INTÉGRAUX, AC2, LMDC-AC1 et RMDC-AC1 à
よし。通気口はクリアだ。エンジンカバーからLEVAを取り外し、E
알겠습니다. GET of the burn 2 18 00; Delt
了解。
Игл, Хьюстон. Не могли бы
Ja. Okay, die ersten vier oder fünf Dinge, die ich habe, sind: BAT CHARGE auf OFF an Panel 3; AC INVERTER 2, OFF; Panel 5: MAIN BUS TIE, BAT A/C ON; Panel 250: 
FONCTION, ARRÊTÉE; MODE, VEILLE; GTA, bas; Couvercle GTA, sécurisé; ATTITUDE,; échelle, 5/5; SÉLECTION, 1; SOURCE,; RÉ
А теперь, "Аполлон-8", вы можете выполнить первую часть проверки в удобное для вас время, чтоб
罗杰。哥伦比亚，鹰。你们差不多
Роджер. Зона 3 Дельта, Зона
Хорошо, спасибо. Ваш голос слышен отч
Vo
Roger. Well, we'll just stop on the 50 roll, then,
Hawaii Cap Com, qui Sigma Seven, vi ri
了解。こちらフレンドシップセブンです。窓、姿勢指示器、潜望鏡はすべて正常に作動しています。現在、後方の潜望鏡からダークサイドが上昇しているのが見えます。客室気圧は5.5で安定しています。客室温度は95度（華氏）、相対湿度は28パーセント（パーセント）。冷却効果を高めるため、客室（スーツの温度）を加
هذا جيد جداً. هذا دعم صوتي ممتاز، هل يمكنك التأكد من أنك تستخدم وضع "الشعاع الضيق" مع ضبط مستوى الصوت على "ك
لا، لم أفعل ذلك - لم أنم منذ كل ما حدث في الليلة السابقة، وذهبت للنوم لمدة أربع
現時点では、104時間後の中間地点で秒速7フィート（約2メートル）の風速を想定しています。これを進入8時間前まで外挿すると、約19フィート（約5メ
Apollo 11, qui Houston. A 1 minuto, la traiettoria e la guida sembrano buone, e anche la piattaforma è a posto. Pa
로저, Rev 12에서 RKV가 PLA와 CLA 시간을 업데이트할 겁니다. Rev 13에서는 카나리아 제도에 C-밴드 트랙이 제공될 예정입니다. 또한 천체궤도 항법 점검 비행도 있을 겁니다. 자세 제어에는 추진제를 사용하지 않습니다. 이 시간은 GET(Global Event Time) 기준 12시간 16분 00초입니다. Rev 13 테이프 덤프는 카나본 상공에서 진행됩니다. 카나본 통과 후에는 변경 사항
Ora sono a circa 450 metri. Il paracadute principale sembra ancora in buone con
手动燃油温度显
حسناً
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। रॉजर। हमें समझ आ गया। और, ईगल, लगता है कि सबसे अच्छा ए
रॉजर। कृपया अपने 
Да. Вот, 
Okay. I'll scratch page 6 and on page 7, we're not going to activate the - or rather we had the S-band activated, Activation I have all done. And, at the bottom of the page, the 
Ça ne nécessite pas vra
휴스턴, 컬럼비아. 
3時間48分51秒が経過し、水をグイッと飲んでいる。今回はかなり冷えている。少し足を伸ばしてみる。
Roger, Bill. Vous connaissez la chaudière secondaire; en fait, les deux procédures de révision sont disponibles dans un manuel de dépannage, et le problème lorsqu’on vérifie la chaudière primaire est de trouver un moyen de la faire bouilli
Ti chiedono di lasciare l'interruttore in posizione AUTO fino a quando non vai a letto stasera. In attesa. Voglio dire in posizione ON. Lo ripeto. In posizione OFF fino a quando non vai a letto stasera, perché hai uno squi
Wir bekommen jetzt ein wunderschönes Bild von dort unten, 11. Die Farben kommen ganz klar zur Geltung, und wir können den Horizont und die rel
네, 짐. 확인했습니다. 현재 10.6 버전까지 지원 가능하며, 그보다 조금 더 높은 버전도 지원해 드릴 수 있습니다. 추가 카트리지가 있고, 명령 모듈 카트리지를 제작하는 절차도 
Хорошо. Мы попали в ловушку во
Buzz, vergiss, dass ich irgendetwas auf der Checkli
Jim, 
Jim, pour l'instant, nous n'avons manqué qu'un 
Хорошо. Сл
로저. 한동안 당신의 메시지를 읽어왔습니다. HF 무전으로 연락을 시도했지만 실패했습니다. 제 상태는 양호하고, 캡슐 상태도 양호합니다. 제어 모드는 플라이 바이 와이어 방식이고, 자이로스코프는 고정되어 있으며, 기동은 꺼져 있습니다. 
रॉजर। तुम्हें ये सब बार-बार कहन
В точке между ним и Цензорином — FPA 8 и — точке, расположенной посеред
أخبرني عندما أكو
روجر، الصداقة السا
素晴らしいスポーツですね。レートは
Apollo 8. this is Houston. We - negative.
Bien reçu. En raison de la charge réduite avec le radar de rendez-vous désactivé, nous souhaiteri
Температура в куполе кабины составляет 55 градусов, и, судя по вс
아니요, 오늘 밤에 쓸 건 하나 남
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, पृष्ठ 12 खोलें। पृष्ठ के दाहिनी ओर, पृष्ठ के मध्य से नीचे की ओर, "Cycle 5 frames, Replace dark side or dark slide" के नीचे लिखे सभी विकल्पों को हटा दें, जब तक कि आप पृष्ठ के बिल्कुल नीचे "Acquisition OMNI D" तक न पहुँच जाएँ, जिसे आपको वैसे ही रहने देना है। साथ ही, "Remove window shades" 
罗杰。下一个问题，超临界氦气上升速率正常，您之前也问过我们关于上次回转期间推进器活动的问题
Jack – hier spricht Aquarius. Ich bin mir nicht ganz sicher, wie lange diese Entladung anhalten wird und wie stark sie unsere Flugbahn beeinflussen wird. Du solltest das aber vielleicht im Auge behalten. Möglicherweise dauert
Сейчас прошло 45 минут. Я собираюсь немного увеличить настройку скафандра, примерно на четверть оборота. Думаю, мы почти взяли ситуацию под контроль. Я установил регулятор скафандра на 6,25. Температура купо
Sigma Seven, hier spricht Guaymas Com Tech. Lesen Sie? E
ठीक है। लैंडमार्क 130 प्राइम का उपयोग करके ट्रैक करें, और जानकारी के लिए, यह आपके रेंडेज़वस रडार ट्रांसपोंडर को सही स्थिति में लाएगा। T1 122 प्लस 16 प्लस 
It's gettin
الوضع جيد الآن يا هيوستن، فيما يتعلق بعدم وجود وهج على العدسا
Хорошо. Теперь мы уверены, что этот режим достаточно хорош
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 후방은 42가 됩니다. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-1 84 후방은 56이 됩니다. 2+20. 1+11. 16 08 16. 3+05. 8+53. 33-1 84 후방은 68이 됩니다. 2+20. 1+27. 17 42 15. 2+37. 8+49. 29-BRAVO 84. 50 후방. 2+20. 1+03. 12 16 35. 12+08. 30-브라보 120. 2+32. 13 50 19. 12
네
فري
你好，德州，这
On commence à avoir un peu de lumière qui sort par
Хорошо. На пятом уровне питания, аварийное отключение. Пункт 1, первая строка, я вычеркиваю "И VHF-A". Вторая строка "SIMPLEX operation". Третья строка, я заменяю второе кавычное слово, обозначающее усилитель мощности, на "OFF", а последнее слово в этой строке - "OFF", заменяю его на "PCM". Четвертая строка в порядке. Пятая строка, я вычеркиваю всю строку. Освещение, нам пока не понадобились прожекторы, поэтому мы просто оставим их выключенными, наружное освещение тоже выключено. Вычеркиваю строку 2, и теперь я на шестом 
Salut Scott, je suis en vol stationnaire, mais j'ai activé le bus de climatisation. Il s'est parfaitement mis en marche. J'activerai les balises plus tard. Le mode de pilotage sélectionné est le pilotage électrique, même si je ne l'utilise pas. Le commutateur automatique est en position automatique, le commutateur des gyroscopes est toujours verrouillé. L'attitude de rentrée atmosphérique est sélectionnée, les manœuvres sont désactivées. Tous les indicateurs sont au vert. La température de ma combinaison est d'environ 60 degrés. Je suis 
わかりました。いくつか良いお知らせがあります。消去可能メモリは完全に分解して確認しましたが、問題ないようです。あなたの影響はありません。一つ気になるのは、ディスプレイにたどり着いた時に「」を使った場合、その表示が信頼できない可能性があります。そこで表示されるのは…Wマトリックスのエラー表示です。おそらく二度と使わないでしょうし
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। ऑटो रेट्रो-जेटिसन बंद है। मोड सेलेक्टर 
Eine Sache, v
コピ
Pouvez-vous 
Roger. Wir arbeiten daran. Seit unserem letzten Gespräch gab es keine Übertragungen von der Tranquility Base. Wir können Ihnen keine vollständige S-Band-Verbindung bereitstellen, solange wir keine Hochleistungsant
Jim, when you get finished moving your stowage around and it's convenient, we'd like to terminate the battery charge for a little while to bring up the TM so we can take a look at the temperatures again, like we did yesterday. Advise that right now on your batteries, you have 111 amp-hours; and, eventually, we hope to have them up - peaked up to about 116. One other point, we - we can either
Apollo 8, stavamo ottenendo quello che ci hai mostrato con il tuo obiettivo normale, e non credo che abbiamo ottenuto nulla con il teleobiettivo. Ci stiamo lavorando ora. Uno dei problemi sembra essere che si tratta di un obiettivo per basse luci; t
こんにちは、アトランティック・キ
Yes. The 
ह्यूस्टन। ठीक है। मैं चाहता ह
ठीक
罗杰。这可能有点困难。我们现在就去看看隧道
केन, हमें यहाँ
11, c'est une option, la 1 est préférée. T
はい。この設定で約2分間
نعم. عندها يجب أن أتمكن من قراء
我
Ils ont également examiné les résultats de votre suivi des points de repère. Apparemment, tous les points de repère étaient excellents, et nous disposons
На самом деле нет.
了解。10、/: 45597、マイナス 040、プラス 157、プラス 35189、マイナス 01513、マイナス 00
또 다른 지역 소식입니다. 헌츠빌 카운티 법원이 어제 새벽에 화재로 전소했습니다. 따라서 그 자리에 다시 건설 사업을 해야 할 것 같습니다. 한편, 귀환을 기다리는 가족들에 대한 소식도 전해드립니다. 앤 제임스 기자가 보도한 내용입니다. "우리는 달 뒷면에서 쉬고 있어요." 발레리 앤더스는 크리스마스 이브에 가족과 함께 아폴로 8호가 달 궤도를 벗어나 지구로 귀환하기를 기다리며 이렇게 말했습니다. 앤더스 씨는 화요일 새벽 0시에 도착했고, 이웃들이 아이들을 모두 데려가 우주선이 달 뒤편에 있어 통신이 두절된 동안 가족들이 편히 쉴 수 있도록 도와주었습니다. 프랭크 보먼 대령의 집은 야외에 커다란 상록수 화환 네 개가 걸려 있고, 고운 눈이 뿌려져 있으며, 빨간 리본으로 장식되어 있었습니다. 거실에는 그의 안전한 귀환을 기다리는 크리스마스트리가 놓여 있었고, 금발의 아름다운 아내 수와 늠름한 두 아들 프레더릭과 에드윈은 자정 무렵 달 궤도를 벗어나는 순간을 집에서 지켜볼 계획이었습니다. 평소 같으면 그들은 세인트 크리스토퍼 성공회 교회에서 자정 예배에 참석했을 겁니다. 가족들은 새벽 0시에 모일 예정이었죠. 보먼 가족에는 어린아이가 없기 때문에, 크리스마스 선물 교환은 보먼 대령이 달 왕복 비행이라는 멋진 선물을 가지고 돌아올 때까지 미뤄두기로 했습니다. 마릴린 러벨의 네 아이들은 아이들 입장에서는 아주 평범한 크리스마스를 보낼 거라고 러벨 대위의 아내는 전했습니다. 하지만 선물 이야기는 꺼내기도 꺼려졌는데, 아이들 중 두 명이 바로 옆에 앉아 있었기 때문입니다. "어젯밤에 입었던 옷도 갈아입을 시간이 없었어요."라고 러벨 부인은 말했습니다. 하지만 어른들끼리의 선물 교환은 있을 거고, 크리스마스트리는 러벨이 집에 돌아올 때까지 그대로 있을 겁니다. 액션 라인에 좋은 글이 하나 실렸습니다. 액션 편집자에게 보낸 짧은 편지입니다. 거기
Roger. Wally, ich glaube, wir verlieren dic
Gute Rückmeldung. Machen wir mit der 
रॉजर। पिछली बार जब हमने इस पर चर्चा की थी, तब से केवल एक ही बदलाव आ
Apollo 8,
حسنًا يا فريد. هذه عملية لقراءة درجة حرارة خزان وقود الهبوط. لا توج
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。我们认为这是正常的系统运行。散热器现在温度应该很低，您看到的温度下降显然是由于冷却液
Das ist ja klar, Frank. Wir habe
Wir haben auf unserem Monitor eine leichte horizontale Bildverzerrung durch Str
रॉजर, ईगल। आपके लिए PAD प्रस्तुत है: 101 36 14.07, माइनस 00758, प्लस सभी गेंदें, प्लस 00098 प्लस - सुधार, 00572, पेरिगी प्लस 00085 00764 030 000 293. संज्ञा 86, माइ
Aurora Sette, la tua ultima trascrizione era illeggibile. Stai svanendo molto, anche se a intermittenza. Leggerò i tempi di retrosequenza alla ciec
Okay. And 
... at this distance -
Jack, we're going to need readings on the BAT volt and charger amps about eve
Go ahead - keep 
Роджер.
Nun, dann sehen wir
Roger. They're continuing with the nonpropulsion vent from the liquid oxygen tank. It would be
罗杰。他会向前移
Oui, je l'a
روجر. يبدو أنك ستحتاج إلى إعادة ضبط الرادار هنا. نقترح عليك البدء في لحام TIG قبل 45 دقيقة - أي عند النقطة المح
マイクさん、ピッチがどの方向に、
さて、パネル 3 
ठीक है। अगले पृष्ठ के शीर्ष पर जहाँ "सेकेंडरी वॉटर इवैपोरेटर" लिखा है, ध्यान रखें कि हम सेकेंडरी इवैपोरेटर का उपयोग तभी क
It's a NO-GO - GO/NO-GO - the one one I'm looking for. Hey, that's beautifu
Ricevuto. GET B 1 34 37; Delta-V, 2.9; tempo di combustione, 0 più 05; imbardata 0, beccheggio 0; Indirizzo 25, 90029; Indirizzo 26, tutti zeri; Indirizzo 27, tutti zeri; propulsori in avan
हे ह्यूस्टन। मैं अभी उत्तर दिशा में अरिस्टार्कस की ओर देख रहा हूँ, और इतनी दूरी से यह ठीक से पता नहीं चल पा रहा है कि मैं वास्तव में अरिस्टार्कस को ही देख रहा हूँ या नहीं, लेकिन एक ऐसा क्षेत्र है जो आसपास के क्षेत्र की तुलना में काफी अधिक प्रकाशित है। ऐसा लगता है ज
Fred, concernant ce module de commande bricolé avec une bonbonne d'hydroxyde de lithium, il va falloir en fabriquer au moins deux et les utiliser deux à la fois, une sur chaque tuyau. On connectera l'un de ces boîtiers aux raccords rouges; l'air sera aspiré à travers l'hydroxyde de lithium puis 
Хорошо. П
わかりました。彼は現在、ハワイで宇宙船か
Хорошо, и наконец, четыре баллончика LiOH, те, что использовались ранее, и их можно положить в мешок для сброса. Хорошо, пара замечаний. После загрузки рекомендуе
罗杰，巴兹。这是 PAD、MPL 的入口，从第 05 行开始，35 - 修正 - 359 152 001。194 46 03 267，加上 1102，减去 17203，068，，36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027，NOUN 69，所有四行均为 NA。从 D 零开始：400 02 09。黑屏的 RET，00 17 03 38 08 20。六分仪星，02 0945 149。视轴星是天蝎座θ星，就是天蝎座θ星。向上 315，向右 35，升力矢量向上。备注：本次进场程序假设没有中途6号轨道机动。另外，根据我们目前掌握的所有跟踪数
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Все функции уск
Roger, and John suggests you try to look back, towards the darkne
RA
Sì, ci vog
收到。非常清楚。我们正在拍摄照片；分离后序列已完成，而且我们似乎获得了很
Okay. Burn rules. We should shut down for the if we have the thrust monitor at 77 percent or below; number 2, if the propellant ullage pressure is less than 160 psi; 3, if the fuel oxidizer DELTA-P is greater than 25, and that'll be a ground callout; 4, if the attitude error is plus or minus 10 degrees except for starting transients. Okay. Rate limits are plus or minus 10 degrees per second. And an ENGINE GIMBAL light, an ISS with a PROGRAM ALARM, an, a CES DC, and an inverter light, if it's still on after we've tried switching inverters. If, during the burn, the engine shuts down when the NOUN 97 flashes, we should PRO, do manual ullage, and START pushbutton, push, and DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, open. If we don't do a PC-2, our next burn will it be at PC-4 for an added 24 foot per second. We'll land mid-PAC at. Okay. We'll have the up for backup rate command, or rate damping, I guess. And the free return that we're on, if we don't - that we're on now, if we don't do PC-2 or 4, lands 
ठीक है। अब, इस बिंदु पर, आपने इस अनुभाग को पहले ही चिह्नित कर लिया है, इसलिए अब मैं आपको जो जानकारी दे रहा हूँ वह आपकी पहले से च
Roger, ho anche un'area 7-DELTA per te quando sarai pro
Fred-o, if you think it's practical, we're ready to give you some - we're working on some camera settings fo
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 
Vous avez votre harnais d'épaule 
Roger。实验结束——MSC-2 和 -3 结束，第二天 15 分
نعم سيدي. لا يمكن أن ي
Pour analyser ces images, nous les prenons à 4 heures du matin. Nous photographions l'océan et les nuages ​​en arrière-plan. On dirait qu'il s'agit de cumulus avec les cirrus caractéristiques au-dessus. J'en prends beaucoup pendan
주변을 둘러보니, 
A
알겠습니다. TVC 서보 전원 1을 A
Роджер
D'accord. Les piles à combustible sont toutes aussi solides qu
Роджер прибыл вовремя, и вам нужно включить/выключить вентилятор в вод
Roge
而且，表面细腻如粉。我可以用脚趾轻轻地把它挑
Roger. Wir haben verstanden, und Sie sind mit uns im
حسنًا. هذا جيد. وهذا طاقم أبولو 13 يتمنى للجميع أمسية سعيدة، ونحن على وشك إنهاء فحصنا 
Jim, I'm sorry. W
È ancora lì. Lo sto guard
Houston, Apollo 11. Par curiosité, sur ces caméras 70 mm, nous estimons avoir
はい、11番です。こちらはヒューストンです。フライトプラン、就寝後チェックリスト、そしてその他すべての就寝後チェックリスト
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。收到。
로저, 표류 비행은 어
Roger. Ottimo spettacolo sul radar. Mi dispiace molto che il nostro amico Julian no
캡콤. 케이프콤 테크 읽어보셨나
Что ж, мы продолжаем над этим работать. Я не уверен, что всё уже потеряно. Похоже, наша проблема заключается в том, что интенсивность света, регистрируемая нашим экспонометром, улавливает поле, которое намного больше, чем Земля, и поэтому он регистрирует большую часть тёмной среды глубокого космоса. Мы подозреваем, что это, вероятно, приводит к максимальному открытию диафрагмы объектива, и тогда, когда вы направляете камеру на Землю, Земля занимает всего около 3 градусов конуса, в то время как объектив охватывает 9. Так что, похоже, происходит перенасыщение трубки. Сей
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हमने अभी-अभी देखा कि आपके पानी की मात्रा 
Watertown. Sigma
Vielleicht 
Disjoncteurs - PITCH 1, PITCH 2, YAW 1, YAW 2, OUVERT
Cape Cap Com, это S
روجر، هل فهمت؟ في الساعات من 18 إلى 22. في المراجعة 12 فوق RKV، سأتلقى تحديثًا ببيانات PLA وCLA. في المراجع
하와이 통신사입니다. UHF 무전기로 들리십니까? 알겠습니다. HF로 전환하겠습
了解です、ジム。もちろん、デテントから外れるとエラー針がリセットされ、姿勢基準が失われます。新しい姿勢基準を確立しますが、この時点では姿勢制御をしているので、必ずしもバーン姿勢とは限りません。さて、「ENTER」キーでスクラッチを始めましょう。「404プラスゼロ」まで全てスクラッチしてください。404
双子座4号，卡那封CAP COM。如果您读到此信息，请指令长将口腔温度探头放入口
मैं फ्लाईबाई एंगल की नकल करन
रॉजर, अल। मैं ऑटो मोड में हूँ; रेट्रो; जाइरो स्विच सामान्य हैं; पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है। कैप्सूल रेट्रोसीक्वेंस के लिए तैयार है, ले
我
제가 마지막으로 찍은 사진은... 
حسناً، كان الأمر كذلك يا تشارلي، ولكن عند الانتقال
45 40 GET Theta, 7,5; Bereich, 1000,01; Delta-V gesamt war 430; Delta-VI ist 202,1; die Winkelvariation nahm deutlich ab bei unge
그리고 켄, 당신 남편분이 OMNI-Switch 게임을 하고 싶어 하신다면, 저희는 지금 Dog - Bravo 채널에 있습니다. 정확히는 Bravo 채널이지만 D 채널로도 설정되어
Oui, c'est possible. Ce couplage est très particulier: le délai est plus long qu'on ne le pense et la réaction est plus importante. Nous avons obtenu des vitesses de lacet d'environ quatre dixiè
查理，显
Да, наконец-т
D'accord, Fred. Voici la procédure pour relever la température du réservoir de propergol de descente. Ce n'est pas un problème majeur, mais nos équipes indiquent que le bas de l'étage de descente est probablement en train de refroidir, et nous voulons simplement vérifier que le réservoir d'eau de descente ne risque pas de geler. Pour l'instant, il semble qu'il ne gèlera pas 
Ja. Ich kann den Booster 
أقول، الأمر ليس مزعجاً مع كل تلك القفازات والملابس. لا أعرف. ربما 
Ap
Ok. Suggeriamo che l'LMP riposi mentre il CMP e il CDR sono svegli. L'LMP dovrebbe andare a dormire intorno alle 63, per poi risvegliarsi tra 25 minuti. E voi potrete riposare per 6 ore. Vi sveglierete alle 69. Alle 70, il comandante e il pilota del modulo di comando dormono per 6 ore fino alle 76. Intorno alle 70, 76,5-77, faremo un e un 52. Alle 78:30, caricheremo e ci allineeremo. Il nostro orario di accensione per una seconda accensione sarà, tra poco, e avremo un tappetino per voi a breve. Vi sug
はい、わかりました。すぐにお渡しします。それと、フ
Dovrò fare in modo che non si co
مايك، أتساءل 
Okay. Nun, ich weiß nicht, ob wir das so lange durchhalten können, und ich werde alle anderen Experimente, die konvergierende Stereofotografie oder andere Aufnahmen, abbrechen, und w
Roger, 11. Ihre TV-Ausrichtung ist: Rollen 261°, Nicken 090°, Gieren 000°. B
L'avez-vous
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Качество звука на свалке очень хо
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, ce Woomera Cap C
好的。我们
休斯顿，静海基地将就昨晚的地质问题作几点说明。我们降落在一个相对平坦的陨石坑区，这里分布着许多细长的次生陨石坑——圆形次生陨石坑，大多数陨石坑都有边缘，无论大小。当然，这并非绝对。周围也有一些较小的陨石坑没有明显的边缘。整个区域的地表物质是细沙到淤泥。我认为地球上最接近的物质是石墨粉。在这些地表物质中，分布着各种形状、大小、纹理的岩石，有圆润的，也有棱角分明的，许多岩石的质地也各不相同。正如我所说，我看到了看似普通的玄武岩和多孔玄武岩。还有一些岩石没有晶体，一些岩石则含有少
वाह, अब क्षितिज कितना सुंदर दिख रहा है। चंद्रमा अस्त हो रहा है और वायु की चम
Je pense que notre film haute vitesse sera capable de 
Vo
Roger. Nou
وفي الصفحة التالية، عند النقطة "حوالي"، يمكنك استئناف خطة الطيران المعتادة. نود إضافة نقطة واحدة؛ وهي إضافة مكب نفايات. مع أن وجوده غير ضروري في ذلك الوقت، إلا
Vogliamo provare a realizzare il parallelismo della piattaforma...
Eagle, H
Если вы можете переключиться там, внизу, без пр
Хорошо. Я знаю, вы стараетесь молчать, поэтому я просто зачитаю вам кое-какую информацию. Одна из вещей, которую мы только что обнаружили и которая может придать вам уверенности: если вы потеряете кислородный криогенный бак, у вас останется 80 фунтов на /. Ограничивающим фактором при работе с одним баком сейчас является водородный бак, у которого положительный запас на /, если предположить, что наш ста
スタンバイ1。予想してみます。ところで、使ったものと使わなかったものを
저기 가
ठीक है
It's going to be a few minutes before I'm ready to read it up
Хорошо, отлично. Теперь, вероятно, пара сантиметров лишнего пакета торчит вокруг дна контейнера. Чтобы он не прижимался к сетке, мы просим вас обрезать его ножницами, а затем отрезать еще две полоски скотча длиной около 30 см, разорвать их вдоль на четыре куска длиной 30 см и шириной 1,2 см, а затем использовать эти четыре полоски, чтобы закрепить пакет, пропустив полоски с боков контейнера наружу, вокруг дна контейнера и обратно вверх по другой стороне, и при этом, как и сверху, п
Roger. Ver
Il
Und, Jack, ich habe S
Ont-ils enfin trouvé 
Jack,... die Sonn
رو
Roger. I don't think I coul
नमस्कार, ह्यू
11, Houston. Some of our guys just came in from outside and said it's pretty clear ove
Fred, ton taux de CO2 augmente. Il est à 11 sur notre manomètre, et on a une accumulation médicale jusqu'à 15 millimètres, 
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Read you loud and clear. What is your status on decompressio
哥伦比
Здравствуйте, Much
괜찮아요, 저희는 어젯밤에 푹 잤어요. 모두 어제 최소 7시간은 잤고, 방금 아침도 먹고 물도 많이 마셨어요. 컨디션도 아주 좋은
好的。
分かりました。それについてはいくつかメモがあります。もし可能であれば、第33回レヴで、第5回レヴでアメリ
双子座 4、双子座 4
了解しました。最後の追加質問ですが、その間のボールの様子はどうでしたか？ご存知の通り、設定のアップデートをお伝えしましたが、バーン中にボールがゼロラインを走っ
是的，我觉得你说得对。哎呀，确实能看出塌陷了。大部分——你可以看到它们都聚集在底部角落里；你知道，在边缘——很多白色的东西都滴了下来——显然过一段时间
मैंने आपकी वह बात नहीं पढ़ी
杰克，你们那边现在
알겠습니다. +1197 - 16500 = 12681 = 35608, 북쪽 정렬, 항성 설정, 롤 0.68, 피치 0.97, 요 3.56, 여유량 없음; 기타: 1번, 빠른 복귀, 인도양의 경우 79
Jim, la batterie A est maintenant chargée. Tu peux 
收到。根据各州的数据，你的行程预
Hey, Charlie, I can see th
좋아, 프레드
Sie können Cape Sir John ausrichten, dass 
حسنًا يا جاك. كما قرأت، من الم
И я не знаю, передал ли вам Джек эту информацию, но мы с Джеком только 
Columbia, Houston. À deux minutes. Tu as l'air superbe en passant la colline. C'est fait
好的。我可以确认所有加热器都已关闭。杰克，在我
Это утвер
Okay. That concludes the powerdown of displays. And I h
حسنًا. تحت "تشغيل"، أضف الخطوتين 1 و2 مرة أخرى، وهما: إيقاف تشغيل ضوء NO 
ENTE
地球が地平線から昇ってくるのを見ることはでき
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。到着しました。私たちが渡したベクトルを積分するのに数分かかるかもしれません。TIGを作らないと、あまり反
네, 출시 체크리스트를 가져와야 합니다. 그리고 초기 스위치 구성에 대해서도 살펴볼 
我想稍微谈谈一些理念。弗雷德告诉我，你之前跟他说过，我们的进场角度有点陡，而现在我们的燃烧过程会让我们——让我们获得一个更陡的角度。我只是
Bit
R Cal est désacti
Pouvez-vous m'expliquer un 
了解しました。ロケットのせいで窓が曇っているよう
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们已经回放了第二次着陆轨道点火。看起来非常好。所有系统运行正常。在有限的跟踪数据下，我们以65.4°的角速度，在53.9°
Oui. Je vais vous donner le pourcentage. J'ai utilisé les propulseurs supérieurs vers le bas pendant environ 10 ou 15 secondes, je crois. J'ai utilisé les propulseurs arrière presque tout le temps, 
자, 
以上就是世界和国内新闻以及专题报道方面的内容。体育版块，堪萨斯城酋长队的汉克·斯特拉姆被评为AFL年度最佳教练。这是他三个赛季以来第二次获此殊荣。投票由美联社30名体育记者和播音员组成的评审团进行，每个城市各三人。与他票数最接近的是韦布·尤班克。其他获得选票的教练还有圣地亚哥的西德·吉尔曼和丹佛的卢·萨宾。至于昨天的Shriners大学全明星赛，北方队以3比0战胜南方队。密歇根州立大学的迪克·伯林斯基在第一节踢进一记23码的任意球，北方队凭借这记任意球赢得了周三的S
Keep burning. Hold it. That's got
わかりました。15ページの「CHECKOUT」という見出しを「Verify following switches（以下のスイッチを確認してください）」に変更します。これらのスイッチは「GUIDANCE CONTROL」、3行目の「ATTITUDE CONTROL (3)」を「MODE CONTROL」に変更し、「MODE CONTROL (BOTH)」を「AUTO」、ACA PROP, LMP ENABLE、ACA/4 JET, LMP ENABLE、そして
لا، أنا أستخدم الوضع اليدوي حاليًا. انخفض مستوى الوقو
Юрий Алексеевич, хочу напомнить, что я не буду указывать слово «секунды», а только число, приблизительно совпадающее с каждые пятьдесят секунд, наприм
Oui. Nous avons décidé d'utiliser un conteneur. Vous savez que le vêtement refroi
Rog
ランデブーレーダーのセルフテストが完了したら、私に知らせてください。トラ
Ja. Wir haben den Fehler gemacht, die Jalousien hochzuziehen, was wir nicht wieder tun werden; und in diesem Energiesparmo
Apollo 11 under high gain. How do y
मैं तुम्हें पढ़ नहीं
Sì. Ora abbiamo anche un MAIN BUS A UNDERVOLT in evidenz
アクティベーション11、ステップ1を省略して残りの手順を実行します。これで正しいです
아주 좋습니다. 귀하의 컴
한 분 옆
罗杰。在华盛顿，参议院财政委员会已批准延长所得税附加税，但目前看来参议院对该法案进行投票的可能性不大。在奥斯汀，休斯顿州众议员雷·莱蒙被提名为美国海洋学会国家主任。莱蒙提议研究在德克萨斯州建立海洋研究所的可能性。这将是墨西哥湾西部首个此类研究所。在明尼苏达州明尼阿波利斯，气象局在回顾今日天气后指出，最高气温为88华氏度，最低气温为72华氏度，并标注“无降雪”。来自佛罗里达州圣彼
Хорошо, Джек. Я могу подтвердить
Хорош
Ro
Okay. Gut, Jim. Denk daran, dass du nach den Sichtungen wieder in den Beobachtung
Une fois la vitesse de rotation suffisamment basse pour nous permettre de nous désamarrer en toute sécurité, nous avons procédé à la manœuvre et nous sommes éloignés de l'Agena à une vitesse de
You won't be able to see it
Roger, Canary. My status is good; the capsule status is good; my control mode 
Так. А сейчас у Джима в руке ручка, которую мы прикрепили к веревке, в качестве своего рода примитивного акселерометра. Этот след довольно короткий, и я не уверен,
ठीक है। हम देख रहे हैं कि मिडिल गिम्बल एंगल थोड़ा ज़्यादा हो रहा है। ऐसा लगता है कि डेडबैंडिंग अपनी सामान्य स्थिति में ठीक है, लेकिन हम आपको बताना चाहते हैं कि हम इस पर नज़र रख रहे हैं और अगर यह बहुत ज़्यादा हो जाता है, तो हम आपको समय
Roger, Ed. Ho una piccola informazi
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. На 1-й минуте траектория и наведение выглядят хорошо, и ступе
I caught about a 15-minute nap but have been pretty h
わかりました。POWERをMAIN BUSに接続する電圧を確認した後、MAIN BをBAT BUS Bに接続するか、MAIN BをBAT BUS 
了解。ガイダ
Ce qu'ils vont fai
Я вижу, как двойные звёзды созвездия Грюнберга выстраиваются в линию, сходясь прямо в центре окна. Юпитер, конечно же, очень яркий. Я вижу Анкаа и — поправка — Аль Наир, и это, должно быть, Пикок. Аль Наир находится немного правее траектории полёта. Я лечу, но это, должно быть, она. Юпитер виден в углу окна. Правильное 
11, Houston. Während Ihres Brennvorgangs, der hier unten aufgezeichnet wurde, haben wir beobachtet, dass der Druck im Stickstofftank Br
わかりました。ピッチが約25度ずれてしまいました。機体を戻して
阿波罗8号，休
Роджер. Подождите, я предоставлю отчет о состоянии. Я нахожусь в орбитальном положении для вашего отслеживания. Отчет о состоянии: Все предохранители номер один, кроме второго предохранителя на башне разделения. Аварийная последовательность ретрореверса, аварийный ретрореактивный двигатель и аварийный тормоз находятся в центральном положении «выкл», пиропатрон активирован. Автоматический ретрореактивный двигатель выключен. Все рычаги управления находятся в нормальном положении. Задержка ретрореверса в нормальном положении. Освещение кабины включено. Фотоподсветка все еще горит. Низкочастотная телеметрия включена. Средства спасения в
알겠습니다. 정상 모
R
दुनिया को शायद यह जानने में दिलचस्पी होगी कि बर्न
Vous savez, je viens de passer un peti
Джо. Хорошо, у меня мигает 37, я в программе 06. Индикатор ожидания не горит, но когда я вхожу, не отображается три шарика 62, 
Gem
Roger. À votre disposition. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; moins 061, plus 067 135 23 4149; plus 32020, plus 06713, moins 02773 181 054 013; HA est NA, plus 00230 32833 228, DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355. Les trois lignes suivantes sont NA. plus 1103, moins - moins 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. Vos étoiles fixes sont Deneb et Vega, 242 172 012. Nous prévoyons un intervalle de deux jets de 16 secondes. L'horizon sera à 11 degrés à TIG moins 2 minutes. Autres commentaires: votre étoile de sextant est visible après 134 h 50. Prêt pour votre r
ठीक है, बढ़िया। 
Перепускной клапан
... Okay..
هاواي، جيمين
Plus 59578, minus 00086, minu
روجر، كولو
是的，你可以看看——如果你想找点事做，你可以看看我的面板 1 和 8 以及所有这些东
Répétez, s'il vous 
जिम, मुझे तो यही सबसे अच्छा लग रहा है। मैं यहाँ बाकी लोगों से बात कर लेता हूँ, फिर हम तु
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्टन। अपोलो 
रॉजर, जिम। जब हमारा एंटीना यहाँ नीचे खराब हो गया, तो आपकी टेप रिकॉर्डिंग बीच में ही रुक गई, इसलिए हम रिकॉर्डिंग को रिवाइंड करके आगे 
Looks like you've got it slowed dow
Hallo, Muchea Com Tech, Muchea Com Tech. Roger. Friendship Seven. Laut und deutlich.
로저, 휴스턴. 오늘 저희가 준비한 것은 우주선 오디세이호에서 시작해서 터널을 통해 아쿠아리우스호로 이
Allora vorrei chiederti una cosa. Vuoi fare un bagno freddo per un'ora prima della correzione di metà percorso? È q
Tranquility, Houston. We'd like your readout, and we have double checked your EM dump. It all looks
Rog
Bene. Al momento abbiamo la navicella sotto controllo. Siamo in volo di lenta deriva, ma abbiamo un leggero controllo. Abbiamo 1550 libbre 
Хорошо, Кен. Перицинфян плюс 2, быстрое возвращение / 62871, минус 161, плюс 129, плюс 45224, минус 06216, минус 18712 001 28 603 49118 112 038 296 Земля вверх 010, справа 37, плюс 1475, плюс 06400 1323 936 913, первичный Сириус, вторичный Ригель 129 155 010, нет пустого пространства, предположим, что 4 имеют одинаковое выравнивание, 5 Определение GERU NC-4 от 0 до 10 и скопи
Einen Moment bitte. Okay. Jetzt etwas näher heran. Angenommen, ich wollte kurz den Vorwärtsschub zünden und dir Bescheid geben, dass ich das jetzt mache, dann warte ich kurz, du sagst
Quello che faremo, Charlie, domani, è rivedere e riconfigurare il nostro stivaggio il più possibile secondo le specifiche. Alcune cose che non saranno secondo le specifiche sono le seguenti: le visiere sono state riportate nel modulo di comando e non abbiamo ancora trovato una sistemazione per loro. Ti faremo sapere dove andranno. Inoltre, ci sono circa 2,2 kg di peso vario dal compartimento interno Able 8, che stanno prendendo il posto delle LCG che abbiamo spostato da A8 nella sacca delle tute. Ci siamo sbarazzati di un sacco della spazzatura vario, per lo più vecchi involucri di cibo, vecchia biancheria intima e quella visiera protettiva del casco del CMP. Abbiamo lasciato tutto questo con Eagle. 
Apoll
ठीक है। सबसे पहले हम बैटरी को चार्ज करना चाहते हैं, ताकि हमें वहां कुछ पावर मिल सके और हम ऐसा कर सकें। इसके लिए हमने प्रक्रियाएँ तैयार कर ली हैं। पुनः प्रवेश के संबंध में, हम प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस से 5 घंटे पहले अपना अंतिम मध्यमार्ग लेने की योजना बना रहे हैं, और यदि आवश्यक हुआ तो। फिर हम प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस से लगभग साढ़े चार घंटे पहले सर्विस मॉड्यूल को अलग करना चाहेंगे, और अगले 3 से 3-1/2 घंटे तस्वीरें लेने, कमांड मॉड्यूल G&N को चालू करने, भंडारण और अन्य छोटे-मोटे काम निपटाने में बिताएंगे। हम प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस से 1 घंटे पहले तक इसे अपने पास रखेंगे, और फिर इसे अलग कर देंगे। ये प्रक्रियाएँ कल सुबह CMS और LMS में एकीकृत रूप से चलाई जाएंगी, और उम्मीद है कि दिन में बाद में हम मिशन कंट्रोल के साथ मिलकर इसे फिर से चलाएंगे। एक सवाल यह है कि हम इसके साथ क्या करेंगे? ऐसा माना जा रहा है कि कमांड मॉड्यूल में पर्याप्त ऑक्सीजन है और यह उच्च दबाव का स्रोत होने के साथ-साथ भंडारण की समस्या भी पैदा कर सकता है, इसलिए लोग इसे वहीं छोड़ने के बारे में सोच रहे हैं। दूसरी बात यह है कि हमें लगता है कि आप इसे उपयुक्त तरीके से प्रवेश कराना चाहेंगे, यानी इसे छोड़ने से पहले उपयुक्त सूट पहनना चाहेंगे, क्योंकि हम इसे उसी तरह छोड़ेंगे जैसे हमने अपोलो 10 में किया था - बस इसे जाने देंगे, और अगर हम उपयुक्त सूट में नहीं होते, तो हम हैच सील पर ही निर्भर होते कि वह हमारी रक्षा क
आराम से रहो। अगर इस बार नहीं कर पाए तो अगली बार ज
哦
正解です。日中側でロールを確認したいのですが、ピッ
네. 저희는 그 작업이 
Apollo 8, Houston. Stiamo mostrando che la quadrangolare A è un po' più calda delle altre. Se ricordate, ho detto prima che stavamo entrando in un periodo in cui avremmo trascorso molto tempo senza volare. Vorremmo che provaste a preferire la quadrangolare A, se possibile all'ombra, e a fare tutto il possibile per evitare che 
Roger, Alabama. Je suis en mode automatique; rétroaction; les commutateurs du gyroscope sont normaux; la manœuvre est désactivée. La capsule est prête pour la rétroséquence, sauf pour le rangement de deux cartes. Je suis sûr que nous pouvons y aller. J'ai 81 % en mode automatique (carburant) et 80 % en mode manuel
Надеюсь, я правильно раз
تبدو كاليفورنيا جميلة. يظهر وادي سان جواكين كبقعة داكنة محاطة بلون بني فاتح من الجانبين. لا يمكن
那是两个月球直径——沿着黄道在明亮的部分，右边；向外延伸四分之一到八分之一月球半径，并且垂直于南极的黄道线
分かりました。ジャイロのトルク​​角はプラス0.03.30、Yはプラス0.23です。Yの数字は4つしかありません。もう一度教
To
这里是友谊七号。陀螺仪已恢复正常，正在返回
सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है, मैं आपको यहाँ संक्षिप्त जानकारी दे देता हूँ। ईंधन 29-27 प्रतिशत है। केबिन का दबाव 5.5 पर स्थिर है, केबिन की हवा का तापमान 88 डिग्री है, सापेक्ष आर्द्रता 33 प्रतिशत है; शीतलक की मात्रा 58 प्रतिशत है, तापमान 71 डिग्री है, सूट का तापमान 71 डिग्री है, सूट का दबाव 5.8 है, सूट में भाप का तापमान 53 डिग्री है, ऑक्सीजन प्राथमिक स्तर पर 60 प्रतिशत और द्वितीयक स्तर पर 8
هذا صحيح. حسنًا. الصف الثالث، تحت قسم الوق
好的，
Apollo 11, Houston. Vous pouvez régler l'attitude et le couple à votre co
Cut i
ジム、チャーリーたちもシミュレーターで試したんだけど、彼らが推奨しているのは、エラー針のレートをゼロにして全く動きがなくなるまで調整し、それからさら
ठीक है। हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप छद्म लैंडिंग साइट पर ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग बंद कर दें। कंप्यूटर में संग्रहीत मानों को अपडेट करने के लिए हमें आपको
你能转告休斯顿我们当时在……但是我们能够非常清楚地看到德克萨斯州的海岸线，
قلها مرة أخرى يا فر
Okay. Bis später. Und sag Jim, 
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نرجو منكم إبقاء التلفاز مفتوحاً لمدة عشر دقائق تقريباً، لنتمكن من الحصول على صورة واضحة للكاميرا. يمكنكم فعل ما تش
휴스턴, 서비스 모듈이 지나가고 있습니다. 약간 높고 오른쪽으로 약간 치우
You never
Lui era ma -
ठीक है। चलिए, मैं शुरू से बताता हूँ। हो सकता है कुछ बातें मिलती-जुलती हों, लेकिन यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि हम सब एक ही बात समझ रहे हैं, हम समय-सीमा प्रक्रियाओं के एक सेट से शुरू कर रहे हैं जो हमें सामान्य प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट तक ले जाएगा। चेकलिस्ट में कुछ बदलाव होंगे, लेकिन मुख्य रूप से समय-सीमा से संबंधित जानकारी है। यह 6 घंटे 30 मिनट पहले से शुरू होता है और यह मानकर चलता है कि कमांड मॉड्यूल में मेन बी को बिजली मिल रही है। मुझे लगता है कि आपके पास पैड और कमांड मॉड्यूल पैड के नंबर पहले से ही हैं; मेरा मतलब है कि हम आपको किस प्रकार के पैड देंगे। और अगर आपको इस बारे में कोई सवाल है कि वे क्या करेंगे या किस लिए हैं, तो मै
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8. प्रवेश इस प्रकार है: मध्य प्रशांत, 357 152 359 268 प्लस 0813 माइनस अगला ब्लॉक
Подождите. Нам придё
Okay, Houston. Das mittlere Bedienfeld – ich schaue mir die Anzeige A an. Die Gehäusetemperatur liegt bei etwa 180 °C. Der Heliumdruck beträgt 3900 psi. Der Brennstoffdruck liegt bei etwa 180 psi und der Füllstand bei etwa 85 Prozent. Bei B ist es ähnlich, nur dass der Gehäusedruck dort 190 psi beträgt. Bei Quad C sehen wir ähnlich aus, nur dass die Gehäusetemperatur 100 °C beträgt. Bei Quad D liegt die Gehäusetemperatur bei 160 °C. Alle andere
友谊七号。任何与控制系统检查
아폴로 8호, 어느 창문을 통해 밖을 보고 계신지 말씀해 주시겠습니까? 그리고 사진 오른쪽 상단에 솟아오른 것처럼 보이
Wir haben Sie momentan auf Hochverstärkung eingeste
Мы можем сделать это любым 
Роджер. В Вашингтоне финансовый комитет Сената одобрил продление действия дополнительного подоходного налога, но голосование в Сенате по этому законопроекту пока кажется маловероятным. В Остине представитель штата Рэй Леммон из Хьюстона был выдвинут на должность национального директора Американского общества океанографии. Леммон предложил изучить возможность создания института океанографии в Техасе. Это был бы первый подобный институт в западной части Мексиканского залива. В Миннеаполисе, штат Миннесота, метеорологическое бюро, после подведения итогов сегодняшней погоды, показав максимальную температуру 88 градусов и минимальную 72, отметило: «снегопада нет». Из Сент-Петербурга, штат Флорида, поступило радиосообщение от норвежского исследователя Тора Хейердала, который сообщил, что экипаж его папирусного судна «Ра» прибудет в Бриджтаун, Барбадос, несмотря на повреждения от сильного шторма. Однако экипаж будет ночевать на борту сопровождающего судна. Норман Бейкер, штурман экспедиции, сообщил, что сегодня экипаж находился на борту «Ра», ремонтируя повреждения, полученные во время штормов на прошлой неделе, из-за которых треснуло основание мачты. Часть сломанной мачты была выброшена за борт, и судно находилось в 725 милях к востоку от Барбадоса. «Спать на борту «Ра» возможно, но неудобно», — сказал Бейкер в радиосообщении. «Но цель нашего путешествия — не проверка силы или выносливости». Именно поэтому экипаж проводил ночи на борту эскортного судна «Шенандоа», которое во вторник
जी हां, जिम। यही
وقد حص
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। पीछे तक साफ दिखाई दे रहा है; दूर तक केप की 
Houston, son
... एसेन्शन सी-बैंड ट्रैक, 05:56 से 06:16 तक। यद
سنعمل لمدة 6 دقائق. تشغيل محركات التثبي
ウォーリー、圧力を教えて.
로저. 짐, 맞습니다
窓の半分は真っ暗で
Es sind ungefähr – ich würde sagen 15 bis 20 Schritte, Jack. Eini
Okay. Jim ha appena notato che abbiamo un interruttore VHF sul pannello 11, ma credo che probabilmente dovrebbe essere a
You are now seeing the Sea of Crises comin
Roger. Und ich würde die Chlorierung gerne um diese Zeit durchführen, w
Ken, bei diesem Manöver 7, werden wir die Daten, die wir vor einiger Zeit gesammelt haben, verwerfen, oder steht ein neues Manöver an, oder was ist
Bene. Leggere le tensioni del bus 
Водолей, Хьюстон. Нам нужно включить переменный ток, чтобы вы могли измерить показания. Замкните автоматические выключатели инвертора шины, все четыре на панели 11. Замкните автоматический 
من ناحية أخرى، قد يكون من الأسه
रॉजर, हवाई। समझ गया। GET B बर्न, 01 34 37; डेल्टा-V, 2.9; अवधि, 0 प्लस 05; यॉ 0, पिच 0; पता 25
Hier ist Freedom Seven. Treibstoff ist bereit, 1,2 g Kabinen
11号，休斯顿。我们可以辨认出面板上的标记。上面写着：A
... वो बड़ा भारी सूट पहनकर जो आपको गिरते तारों से
- -... Jac
Bon, je vais regarder encore une fois, Jack, mais dans cette position, le soleil se reflète sur le quadrant 4 avec une telle i
Odyssey, Houston. Richied
Это подтверждается. Два автоматических выключателя на панели 
Columbia is coming u
Roger. Stiamo tornando a una configurazione semi-normale. 
لقد شغّلت جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بي. 
دعونا نقرأ لكم الأضواء التي أضأناها الآن؛
حسنًا. تم الاستلام يا فريد. وسيقوم فريقنا المختص بالحرارة بمراجعة الأمر. من بين الأمور التي نناقشها بخصوص تصحيح المسار في منتصف الرحلة، أننا نفضل عدم القيام بذلك قبل انفجار خزان الهيليوم-3، إن كان سينفجر، حتى لا يسبب لنا ذلك أي مشكلة في إعادة الاستقرار. 
Jim, de Houston. Qu'il nous 
宁静。收到。
로저. 그거
Bon, on n'a aucun problème ici, en ce
プラットフォームコンピュータへの外国直接投資はゼロ、
……
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Ваш двигатель хорошо показал себя на втором срабаты
我们的 REPRESS
रॉजर। मैंने ऑटो मोड में डॉक किया, और जैसा कि मैंने कहा, मुझे संपर्क का क्षण ठीक से याद नहीं था। मैं डॉकिंग प्रोब इंडिकेटर्स को बार-बार चेक कर रहा था। मुझे दो बारबर पोल मिले, जिससे पता चला कि तीनों कैप्चर लैच - कैप्चर लैच नहीं, बल्कि तीनों... लैच - जुड़ गए थे, और हम सॉफ्ट डॉक हो गए थे। उस समय स्थिति काफी स्थिर लग रही थी। तो, मैंने फ्री मोड में जाकर खिड़की से बाहर देखा और स्थिति अभी भी स्थिर लग रही थी; और मैंने प्राइमरी 2 बॉटल फायर कर दी। उसी समय, दोनों वाहनों के बीच एक चक्कर शुरू हो गया, मुझे नहीं पता किस वजह से। शायद थ्रस्टिंग की वजह से या शायद यह पहले से ही बन रहा था, और मैंने ध्यान नहीं दिया
Houston, Apollo 8. Conferma che la stella di puntamento e la SPA sono esattamente lo stesso numero e non un e
우리는 그림을 수신하고 있지만, 지구의 모습을 
了解。オリエンテーションテストについてですが、手動レバーに触れました。時計に触れました。時計の文字盤とヨーインジケータの間の、10時30分頃の時計の上のリベットに触れました。緊急速度レバーでは、ボタ
حسناً. 
روجر، لقد وصلتني تحديثات الإصلاح وتحد
Можете, мы хорошо выспались. Все вчера спали как минимум 7 часов, мы только что позавтракали, выпили много воды, и я думаю, что мы в очень хорошей форме; только что позан
Roger, Gemelli 4. Mi sono appena alzato da un lungo... pisolino. Ho dormito 4 ore e mezz
Ja. Sie verlaufen knapp südlich des südlichen Mexikos, vermutlich durch Mittelamerika. Das ist das äquatoriale Band, das 
Roger, Frank. Für das Landegebiet bei 7 Grad 38 Minuten Nord und 165 Grad West zeigen die Wetterbedingungen folgende Werte: 2000 Fuß vereinzelt, 12.000 Fuß aufgelockert, Höchststand 10 Fuß; Wind aus Ost mit 12 Knoten, 4 Fuß hohe Dünung, Temperatur ca. 82 Grad. In etwa 10 bis 30 Prozent des Gebiets kann es zu Regenschauern mit einer Wolkenuntergrenze um 2000 Fuß ko
Roger. Wir haben Ihre Systemdaten zur Wiedergabe geprüft, und alles sieht gut aus. Insbesondere die Daten sehen gut aus. Ich möchte Sie jedoch an die Anweisung erinnern, diesen Brennvorgang nur an den Kugelventilen der Bank A durchzuführen, und Sie haben grünes Licht für 2. Außerdem ist in Ihrem Flugp
Gra
Давайте посмотрим. В Спрингфилде, штат Миссури, Микки Оуэн, ветеран-кетчер «Бруклин Доджерс», вошедший в историю как игрок, пропустивший третий страйк и приведший «Нью-Йорк Янкиз»
Тепе
This is Friendship Seven. I still have some of these very small particles coming around the
Ok, nuovo argomento. Vorrei interromperti pe
Houston, Apollo 8. Termin
यह 40 मिनट, 10 सेकं
ロジャー、1
ठीक है, ऐसा लग रहा है कि हमें अफ्रीका के दक्षिणी सिरे पर कुछ रोशन इलाके दिखाई दे रहे हैं। मुझे साफ़ तौर पर एक शहर दिखाई दे रहा है, और - यह
Roger. Mein Zustand ist gut, der Zustand der Kapsel ist gut. Ich befinde mich im Driftflug mit manueller Steuerung. Die Gyroskope sind deaktiviert. Der Treibstoffstand liegt bei 45–42 Prozent, der Sauerstoffgehalt bei 79–100 Prozent. Die Temperaturen an den Dampfventilen betragen jetzt 65 Grad; die Anzugtemperatur ist erfreulich gesunken. Es sind jetzt 62 Grad, und die Energieversorgung ist in Ordnung. Der Blutd
Et Mike, si tu es à l'écoute, pour étendre la portée et la rentrée atmosphérique constante, voici une petite procédure, si tu veux bien l'é
좋습니다. 오늘은 절차에 따라 관측 전과 후에 트러니언 바이어스를 측정해 주시길 바랍니다. 이는 열 효과로 인해 육분의 각도 측정에 오차가 발생하는지 확인하기 위한 것입니다. 관측 전에 측정한 바이어스 값을 반영해야 합니다. 연속 두 측정값이 0.003도 이내이면 NOUN 87에 PROCEED 표시를 하십시오. 그리고 측정 사이에 트러니언을 몇 도 정도 움직여 주십시오. 오늘은 지구의 시야가 평소보다 훨씬 작을 것입니다. 이 부분에 대해서는 저희보다 더 잘 아실 거라고 생각하지만, 별과 지구 지평선 사이의 각도를 정확하게 측정하려면 육분의의 M선(
Roger. I'll read back the entire remarks now just to make sure we got it straight. Use NC-4, steps 1 through 11; then proceed to longitude control for no COMM procedure on page NC-7; average Victor 400K for corridor control chart is 36253; Minus M
好的，Fred-o。在页面底部，我们需要执行步骤 1，在闪烁的 0406 上，选择选项 3，这将引导我们进入步骤 6
如果真
잭, 화상 부위가
Роджер, Скотт. Понимаю. Извините. Только что закончил есть говядину с овощами. У меня здесь все хорошо. Я поддерживаю свя
コピー中
Ro
Роджер. Батарея адаптера 1 имеет напряжение 24
Watertown. Sigm
Abbiamo appena completato l'imbardata dell'Agena a 090° e l'imbardata era esattamente a 1,5 gradi al secondo durante la manovra di imbardata, e ci sono voluti... secondi per raggiungere i
광학 장치에는 별다른 손상이 없는 것 같지만, 창문에는 확실히 얼음이 꼈습니다. 환풍구와 가장 가까운 1번 창문에 작은 
Хорошо. На странице 1-12, панель 325, нам нужно перевести оба предохранительных клапана салона в положение «НОРМАЛЬНОЕ
Roger, Jack. Puisque nous avons les données, nous prévoyons de les utiliser pour effectuer un alignement grossier vers l'amarrage. Ensuite, en position de largage du module de service, nous attendrons le moment de la mise sous tension pour effectuer cet alignement grossier et choisir des étoiles pertinentes afin d'obtenir un alignement précis. Il semble que nous puissions sélectionner des étoiles orientées à l'opposé du Soleil, que vous pourrez repérer dans cette 
And, Columbia, if it's agre
好的，很好
General Kraft ist weiterhin etwas besorgt über den Kraftstoffverbrauch. Verwenden Sie möglichst wenig Autokraftstoff; verzichten
我把它放在那儿的一个洞里了。它在哪个洞里？那个洞……简直就像在黑暗中射击。啊！洞在那儿
네, 맞습니다, 제미니 4호. UHF 송신이 없을 때 ACQ 지원 비콘을 끄고 약 
Родж
알겠
Ehi, abbiamo del
فريندشيب سفن. هذه محطة اتصالات كانتون كاب. جميع الأنظمة على الأرض تعمل بشكل سليم. درجة حرارة 
Puoi darci una lettura aggiornata degli angoli del tuo gimbal? Quando il tuo asse X positivo è puntato verso il boost
好吧，我——我去找找，巴兹。让我拿一下这些——光学瞄具把手。我刚才
حصلنا على علامة 
11号，休斯顿。指挥官，给你汇报一点情况。我们都暂时放下手头的工作，享受一下特别的——确切地说，是品尝一下特别的月亮奶酪——据我所知，这是从
Ich ha
And, Houston, when do you want me to turn that S-BAND
로저, 프랭크, 쿼드 A에 있는 헬륨 탱크 말인데요, 저희가 괜히 폐를 끼친 것 같네요. 저희가 보기엔 별 문제는 없는 것 같습니다. 몇몇 사람들이 모여서 논의해 본 결과, 출력이 상당히 낮아졌습니다. 그리고 저기 아래쪽에서 모니터링하는 사람들이 짐이 02번 별이 아니라 22번 별을 
Columbia, Columbia, qui è Houston. Pas
罗杰。好的。我们差不多可以开
जेमिनी VI
حسنًا. المنطقة 27-2: 96.2+02.08 27 55.6+35.10+58. المنطقة 28-2: ΔV 111.2+20.10 02 54.4+50.9+39. المنطقة 29-2: حسنًا، هذا ΔV مُجزأ. للأمام 66. للخلف 61.1+48.1+17. GMTRC 11 37 05.3+43.08+59. المنطقة 24-DELTA: ΔV 89.1+53.03 45 30.11+03. المنطقة 25-DELTA: 86.1+49.05 19 09.09+51. المنطقة 26-برافو: فرق السرعة المنفصل. 66 للأمام، 104 للخلف. 1+48. 2+10. 07 40 28. 8+54. المنطقة 27-دلتا: 98. 2+29. 08 27 54. 6+44. المنطقة 28، المنطقة 28-برافو: فرق السرعة المنفصل. 66 للأمام. 82 للخلف. 1+48. 1+
Is
Okay, meine Ausweichlösung ist 2 Fuß pro Sekunde nach oben und 23 Fu
좋아요, 물병자리님. 말씀해
قولوا يا رفاق،... هل هناك أي شيء ت
Как здесь температура в костю
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。你可以继续运行37号程序，我们也会在地
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। जिज्ञासावश बता दें, हमारा O2 फ्लो म
Dry bulb between about 72 and 79. A little bit before that they ran between 75 and 77. Wet bulb last group was between 57 and 
C
Хорошо. То
आगे 
收到。您的请求将会得到满足，尤里·阿列克谢耶
Roger. Understand. They do seem to distort vertical
ジェミニ4号、こちらはヒューストンCAP COMです。テープ再生スイッチをリセットして
D'accord, Aquarius. Quand tu auras réussi à la mettre dans le bon état d'esprit, et on dirait que tu e
إنه يختفي داخل النفق، 
Roger. C'est en cour
D'accord. Vous avez maintenant la possibilité de rogner ou de conto
जाँच करें कि 
That's affirm. The two circuit breakers on panel 250 will go open; the two circuit breakers, panel 275, will go open. Okay, the circuit breakers on panel 250, we took c
네
了解しました、フレッド。司令船から飲料水が供給されているか確認させてください。もし、時間の経過とともにどれくらいの量を
Sie müssen m
そこに暗い線は見えません。今は遠すぎるだけ
Okay, er schläft gerade, 
Ici Friendship Seven. Nous avons effectué un lacet de 165 de
Роджер. Интересно, заметили ли вы какие-либо изменения в доходах от BIOMED? 
Felt tha
Ja, das st
Af
सबसे पहले, मैं ऑटोमेटिक रीएंट्री मोड में हूँ; जायरो सामान्य हैं; पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है; सभी कॉन्फ़िगरेशन रीएंट्री मोड में हैं; रेट जायरो के लिए बाईपास स्विच सामान्य स्थिति में है। आपको ईंधन की जानकारी दे रहा हूँ, ऑटोमेटिक टैंक 90% भरा है, मैनुअल मोड में भी लगभग 90% भरा है। अब आपको सूट की स्थिति बता रहा हूँ, जो अब तक बहुत आरामदायक रहा है। सूट का तापम
حسنًا. الآن قم بتطبيق ذلك - أعتقد أن الشيء الذي يجب فعله هنا هو محاذا
Solo 180 chili. Dovre
रोजर, ह्यूस्टन। प्लस 4. वजन वही रहता है, माइनस 164 प्लस 129 माइनस 01594 प्लस सभी गेंदें प्लस 52885 178 155 000 एनए प्लस 00192 52909 627 52694 12 1037 211, पृथ्वी केंद्र नीचे 063, दाएँ 213 प्लस 1068 माइनस 16500 12505 3
D'accord. Votre radiateur secondaire est à environ 70 degrés (72 degrés); la sortie du radiateur est à environ 30 degrés; la température d'évaporation du glycol est d'environ 65 degrés; la pression de vapeur est au maximum, la pression de refoulement du glycol est d'environ 9 psi. Les combinaisons de l'accumulateur secondaire sont à environ 52 degrés; la cabine est à environ 58 degrés; les pressions sont les suivantes: com
Okay. Dieses Manöver bringt Sie sehr nahe an die Scangrenzen Ihrer Hochleistungsantenne. Überprüfen Sie daher während des Manövers die Kontrollleuchten. Leuchtet die Kontrollleuchte für die Scangrenze auf, haben Sie noch 15 Grad Spielraum. Wichtig ist jedoch: Sollten Sie die Zielerfassung verlieren, müssen Sie zurückfliegen, die Zielerfassung wiederholen und das Manöver erneut durchführen, d
Roger. Here is the format
天气凉快了，谢谢。我们装上了遮阳帘，这真的很有帮
Ja, lasst uns zuers
حسن
Хорошо. Мы просим вас, по возможности, проверить следующие клапаны и оставить их в том состоянии, в котором мы их описали. Клапан системы сброса давления — выключен; аварийное давление в кабине — выключено; прямой кислородный клапан — выключен; регулятор потребности — выключен; оба водонагревателя — выключены; основные регуляторы A и B — открыты; водный гликоль — поправка — вода, а затем вход и выход гликолевого бака — оба. Теперь
收到。我们需要一些高比特率数据，
好的，杰
रॉजर। फ्रेड, हम उस बदलाव पर चर्चा 
That's affirmative, Jim, with the followin
ठीक है। जी हाँ, बिल्कुल सही। तो हमें नीले और लाल दोनों कमांडर होज़ के आधे हिस्से प
Roger. Bitte warten. Unsere einzige Sorge, 11, betrifft die Gegenstände in der Gepäcktasche. Das ist ziemlich viel Platz zwischen Ihnen und A8, und wir würden gerne darüber sprechen, ob wir das in die Schlafkabi
구하셨어요?
Okay. We've got a telescope alignment if you'd like to give it a try. Your sextant star is still good, but if you had problems with that, folks have worked out that if you look through the telescope at, we have a shaft and trunnion that should point you at the center of the earth, if you would like to give 
Bene. Quello che abbiamo qu
Fortf
好的。入学前准备程序的时
Nachdem ich mit dem Ausri
ヒューストン、あちらの状況はどうです
Хорошо. Мы рассмотрели все возможные варианты. Наихудший сценарий, который мы смогли придумать, — это расстояние ошибки 3 сигма — в худшем случае 70 морских миль. Это 70. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили маневр реверсирования OAMS; затем, конечно, будет ручное реверсирование без компьютера. Нам нужен вход в атмосферу с нулевой подъемной силой и вращением. Причина выбора вращения вместо крена 90-90 заключается в м
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 트랭퀼리티 기지입니다. 현재 필름을 거의 다 소진했고, 이제 막 메인 필름통을 교체할 준비를 하고 있습니
मैं बटन दबाऊंगा। चूंकि 
알겠습니다. 지금과 같은 태도를 유지
Roger. Es
Да. В 7 часов утра
Apollo 11, Houston. Basierend auf unseren Beobachtungen seit der Mittellinie zeigen wir einen Gammawert von -6,57 an. Dies ist jedoch vorläufig, und wir gehen davon aus, dass sich die Position nach weiterer Beobachtung stabilisieren wird und wir sie präzise in den Korridor einfädeln können. Sie befindet sich etwa in der Mitte des Korridors; alles sieht gut aus. Wir werden Ihnen in ein paar Stunden, bevor Sie schlafen gehen, die Eintrittsinformationen (PAD) zukommen lassen. Und von unseren Kollegen aus der Öffentlichkeitsarbeit gibt es neben Ihrem Flug noch ein paar weitere Schlagzeilen. Sie dominieren weiterhin die Nachrichten. Es gibt jedoch noch einige andere interessante Dinge für Sie. Wie ich bereits erwähnt habe, wurde das All-Star-Spiel wegen Regens abgesagt. Es wird morgen stattfinden. Präsident Nixon wird es jedoch nicht wie geplant besuchen können. Wir halten Sie über die Ergebnisse auf dem Laufenden. Und auch die Wettervorhersage ist gut für Sie. Unsere Prognose sieht gut aus für das Bergungsgebiet; es sollte dort draußen sehr schön sein. Präsident Nixon, der sich auf den Flug zur Begrüßung Ihrer Rückkehr vorbereitete, sagte voraus, dass die Menschheit innerhalb von 31 Jahren mindestens einen anderen Planeten mit irgendeiner Form von Leben besucht haben werde. „Im Jahr 2000 werden wir auf dieser Erde neue Welten besucht haben, auf denen es Leben geben wird“, sagte er vor 2000 ausländischen Austauschstudenten im Weißen Haus. Vor seiner einwöchigen Reise übermittelte der Präsident dem Kongress seinen Vorschlag zur Reorganisation der Interstate Commerce Commission. Nach seiner Rückkehr aus Vietnam beriet er sich außerdem mit dem Vorsitzenden der Vereinigten Stabschefs, Earl Wheeler. Der Start von Intelstat wurde 
알아요. 좋아요, 아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 오디세이에서 파워 앰프를 낮음으로 설정하라고 추천
روجر. يم
ह्यूस्ट
Мы проиграли — единственное преимущество раннего запуска заключается в том, что если мы сможем снова включить двигатель, то сможем его выключить. Единственное преимущество раннего запуска в том, что можно сейчас сделать мощный маневр, пролететь п
Хорошо, Билл. Мы пропустили обновление некоторое время назад, на странице E-9, шаг 38, в самом начале, и у вас есть окончательная проверка на дрей
继续
Très bien, Jack. Continuons. Tout se passe bien jusqu'à la page s
ああ、ロジャー。打ち上げで時計が動き出
Genau da hast du auch einen. Der i
Es ist schwer zu sagen, was ein vernünftiges Tempo wäre. Ich denke, es ist das, das ich jetzt anwende – nac
友谊七号，这里是
はい、
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. نرجو منك يا مايك أن ترفض محتوى NOUN 49 المعروض حال
看起来不
네,
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴. 산소 배출을 아직 중단하지 않으셨다면 중단해 주시길 바랍니다. TV 카메라 담당자들이 카메라 자체의 결함이라고 하더군요, 버즈. 저희도 예상
ठीक है। हमें अंतरिक्ष यान से निकलते हुए कोई
そして、ジャック、今はビット レー
क्या
Und die Klammer - Klammer
Voici Friendship Seven. Le test de contrôle s'est déroulé sans accroc, et le processus s'est déroulé exactement comme avec le simulateur de
سيكون ذلك بعد إعادة الضغط الأ
Nei
好的。您的
카나
Sembra che siano circa 1500 onde sparse, alte e sparse. E sono comunque onde alt
Ok
روجر. واضح تمامًا. واجهنا مشكلة في جهاز الإرسال خلال رحلتك السابقة. ت
अंतरिक्ष से मानवयुक्त मौसम पूर्वानुमानकर्ता की यह आपकी पहली अंतरिक्ष मौसम रिपोर्
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, 
자, 휴스턴 여러분. 온수 보일러 문제에 대해 이야기할 준비
Apollo 13,
Okay. On page 6 1 of the entry out checklist down toward the bottom after "MAIN DEPLOY pushbutton," we have three additional steps we'd like you to accomplish. The intent of this is to reduce the oxygen pressure in your manifold and to elimi
What would that take to use... use th
分かりました。全員一致であなたの意見が正しいですね。ベネット彗星の件は、帰り道で全部やめて、その後は状況が良くなることを期待しま
それを受
アポロ13号、ヒューストン。
Хорошо. Тут особо нечего рассказывать. Ну, давайте начнём со спорта, какого черта. «Астрос» выстояли со счётом 8:7, «Брейвс» набрали пять или шесть очков в девятом иннинге, но им это удалось; а в другой важной игре дня матч «Кабс» был отменён из-за дождя. У меня есть все остальные результаты, можете сказать, если хотите. В Маниле и других районах острова Лусон произошли землетрясения. Было три толчка, и здания тряслись около получаса, магнитуда была примерно 5 по шкале Рихтера. Хорошо, давайте посмотрим. «Битлз» объявили, что боль
Sì. Perché
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。現在、高利得アンテナのスキャン限
はい、了解です。パッドをお渡しします。追跡が安定したら、数時間後にこちらに来る予定です。理由は…あと2、
Roger. Verstanden. Wieder
了解、ヒューストン。これからやるのは、フレッドのスーツを処分することだ。フレッドのスーツはここ30分ほど、司令官のスロットにそのまま置いてあっ
Компьютер находится на этапе ПРЕДЗАПУСКА. Мы
Roger. Ho capito che il nostro dump di memoria E era buono. Il d
罗杰。这里的云层覆盖范
准备复
D'accord. Vous voulez un gai
로저. 목표 장전량을 알려주시면 프로그램 30으로 진행할 예정인데, 이렇게 작은 연소에 큰 변
That's fine. I'
अपोलो 8, अगर आप अपनी टेप का इस्तेमाल नहीं कर रहे हैं, तो हम उसे दोबारा डंप करना चाहेंगे। इसका कारण यह है कि बर्निंग से पहले हमने कुछ टेप पूरी तरह से डंप नहीं की थी। हम व
Pronti, Bi
很好。看看能不能把那一端稍微掰下来一点。把那一端向上提一点
Car
Okay. Das war's im Großen und Ganzen mit den Neuigkeiten. Houston, w
حسنًا يا هيوستن. نحن في وضع النسخ ا
Родже
Je suppose que le plus important concernant le rangement, c'est de s'assurer qu'il soit adapté aux forces g que nous allons subir pendant le TEI, et nous pourrons tout régler au re
네. 여기 카메라가 세 대 있는데, 두 대는 사진 촬영용이고, 한 대는 5번 창문에서 사용할 
What do you estimate the temper
ど
Oka
Это «Дружба номер семь». Пока что я не испытывал никаких негативных посл
嗯，范斯，你看这里，很
ठीक है। हम इसे कॉपी क
좋습니다. 네 번째 중간 수
― オーケー、ジョー。外は雲ばかりだ。陸地が見えてきたら窓に戻る。ジムがまだここにいるか確認するために、こ
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Коне
B
انتظر من فض
Nous
这是 4/5 的地图更新：日出、本初子午线、日落；备注：-1，CP2 的获取时间为 -1，目标 B-1 的最近接近
Вы бы снова с
わかりました。噴射時間はおそらく1分未満です。時間に基づいてカットオフを設定していただき
ठीक है। अब अगला चरण है टेप को पक्का करना। इसके लिए आपको टेप के रोल से लगभग 2 फुट लंबा टुकड़ा काटना है और उसे लंबाई में फाड़ना है, जिससे आपके पास लगभग 2 फुट लंबे और लगभग आधा इंच चौड़े दो टुकड़े हो जाएं। इन टुकड़ों को कैनिस्टर के चारों ओर लगभग समकोण पर लपेटें, ताकि यह ऊपर और नीचे दोनों तरफ से गुजरे। जब यह ऊपर और नीचे दोनों तरफ से गुजर जाए, तो इसे बीच वाले छेद के बाहर की ओर रखें और इसे स्क्रीन के बीच की किसी एक उभार के ऊपर से निकालने की कोशिश क
Well, let's get going here. PRIMARY, PRIMARY, HIGH, VOICE, (cough) PCM, RANGE, DOWN VOICE BACKUP, AUX TAPE, OFF; TELEMETRY to DATA; and UP TIM COMMAND to NORMAL; VHF
15 ثانية لعرض القراءة ثم 4 دق
Roger, Amicizia Sette. Muchea Cap Com. Come 
Roger. Sobald
D'accord, Jack. C'est le panneau 
جيميني 4، هل يمكنك محاولة إعادة ضبط جهاز الكمب
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप चाहें तो ही दूसरा कॉल करें। ब्रेक। और हां, कोलंबिया, जब मौका मिले तो BATT C औ
Хорошо. Я просто хотел, чтобы вы были в курсе этого, подумали об этом и о том, какие последствия это может иметь для плана полета. Я покажу вам этот широкоугольный снимок и прокомментирую луну, чтобы посмотреть, какие участки, по их мнению, будут наиболее подходящими. Хорошо. На свитке Фрэнк хотел, чтобы мы проверили порядок, в котором он может ожидать увидеть профили входа в атмосферу. Первый профиль, который появляется, обозначен как «Nonexit Number 2», это короткий высокоскоростной вход. Второй профиль, который появится, называется «3500 Mile», это тоже высокоскоростной вход, но его следует использовать, если мы перейдем к более длинным дистанциям входа. Затем третий профиль буде
ठीक है। यह सही है। अब हम -1 +30 पर हैं। और इस समय, 
Immagino che te ne abbia parlato circa 20 minuti dopo a
تحقق من وحدة التحكم، وتأكد من أننا لا نصل إلى حالة قفل المحور،
Nous analysons de près les profils de consommation d'eau et, pour l'instant, la tendance est plutôt à laisser l'appareil allumé et à éte
फ्लाइट बस, मेन ए, और फ्लाइट बस, मेन बी, ये दोनों बसें खु
Хорошо. На панели 225 показания будут такими же, за исключением того, что нам нужно разомкнуть еще три автоматических выключателя, и я буду проверя
Ok, Jack. Ecco, queste sono le note cronologiche che avevo per te. Mi dispiace dirtelo, ma ho anche un paio di correzioni da apportare alla checklist di ingresso. Non sono correzioni, sono solo parti della checklist di ingresso che corrisponderanno a ciò che ho scritto, che ti ho già letto.
Je ne le pensais pas. Je t'ai laissé dépasser de 15 minutes. Je travaillais sur le J-8, et il n'y avait aucune
罗杰，明白了。你掌控
Okay, Apollo 8. That's correct with one exception: in the format unde
BAT Чарли, 37.0; пиротехника A, 37.0; пи
يبقى عمود الدوران والمحاور كما هي. يبقى سيريوس على خط 50 درجة تما
Okay
Вы всё это ч
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Во-первых, нам бы хотелось, чтобы уровень сточных вод на задней части самолета составлял 10 процентов. Во-вторых, похоже, что на данный момент нам не потребуется менять самолет, поэтому мы не будем связываться с новым оператором. В-третьих, я бы хотел, чтобы все ваши криогенные обогреватели были в автоматическом режиме, и мы готовы к зарядке аккумулятора, аккумулятор BRAVO; его хватит примерно на 7 часов. Если вы ляжете спать, мы прекратим зарядку аккумулятора, но на данный момент мы можем начать зарядку аккумулятора на аккумуляторе Bravo. И последнее, что касается вашей конфигурации на период отдыха: регистр 1 — 11111; регистр 2 — 01100. И ваши переключатели автоматического режима: квадрокоптер Alfa, только реактивные двигатели тангажа, квадрокоптер Br
Il pross
Bitte warten.
로저, 11. 지난번 내용에 대한 정정입니다. 73시 20분에 새로운 정보를 업링크해 드리겠습니다. 그리고 73시 30분에 기존 기체에서 롤, 피치, 요를 모두 0으로 조정해 주십시오. 그런 다음 토크를 이용하여 새로운 기체로 전환하고 동일한 관성 자세
我会给你一个时间调整，时间是 75 小时 37 分钟，我会尝试将偏差值设为大约
C'est exact. Bien. Une fois cette étape terminée, l'appare
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस
Bene. Houston, ce l'hai fatt
रॉजर। टीआईजी का क्रम इस प्रकार है: फेज़िंग 103 40, 10 से कम, 105 12 30, 10 से अधिक, 107
네. 오늘 전 세계 교회 예배에서 아폴로 11호를 기리는 기도를 드리고 있습니다. 닉슨 대통령의 백악관 예배도 아폴로 11호 임무를 기념하는 예배로 진행되며, 동료 우주비행사 프랭크 보먼은 여전히 ​​그곳에 남아 작년 크리스마스에 아폴로 8호에서 낭독했던 창세기 구절을 다시 낭독할 예정입니다. 내각과 의원들, 특히 상원과 하원 우주위원회 위원들을 비롯한 여러 귀빈들이 초청되었습니다. 버즈, 당신의 아들 앤디는 어제 MSC를 견학했습니다. 삼촌 밥 문도 동행했는데, LRL(
जेरी, मैं
حسنًا، في تلك الطلعة الأخيرة، التقطنا حوالي 38 صورة باستخدام التصوير الجوي الشامل للتضاريس، بدءًا من منطقة شرق سان دييغو وحتى واجهنا الغطاء السحابي مجددًا. استأنفنا التصوير بشكل متقطع بمجرد أن بدأنا فوق الجزء الجنوبي من الولايات المتحدة، مرورًا بألاباما وميسيسيبي وصولًا إلى فلوريدا. حصلنا على صور ممتازة للطقس في تلك المنطقة، ثم ا
Хорошо, у меня есть площадки, нужно удлинить зонд и прове
Il Sole rimbalza sulla struttura. Con il telescopio attaccato, è praticamente inutile. Credo che le mappe stellari fornite dall'MPAD sarebbero molto utili se dovessimo usare il telescopio... se per qualche motivo dovessimo segnare qualcosa. Potremmo usarle come guida per ciò che stiamo osservando e dir
D'accord. C'est péricyntien plus 2. / 62871 novembre Alfa, et attendez un. D'accord. Nous allons reprendre avec un trim de tangage et un trim de lacet non applicable; tem
Einen Moment bitte, Frank; wir suchen ihn. Währenddessen möchten wir Bi
好吧…
11,
所有主电池的读数均为 9 安培和 23 伏，飞行员的血
روجر. أتفهم رغبتك في التقاط صورة ل
جيميني 6، هيوستن. نقترب من مرحلة احتراق NSR. مارك، دقيقة واح
杰克向外望去，发现粒子数
Roger. Sachez que le pilote s'est endormi ou a essayé de s'endormir il y a quelques heures. Il se lèver
Okay. Und beim letzten Manöver hieß es: „ATT HOLD für die Mondsicht-Halteposition bis zum Plattformausstieg“. Ich glaube, das haben Sie gelesen. Okay. Bereit weiterzuma
روجر. خمسة يا نيل. لقد نسخنا حتى القيم المتبقية. هل يمكنك من 
아니요,
Aurora Seven,
अरे नहीं, नही
But when I first saw it, at the other sun angl
Très bien. En voici un exemple: le cessez-le-feu de 72 heures init
अब मैं डरबन लाइट की जांच के लिए कैमरा रख रहा हूँ। क्योंकि फ्लेयर के स
Хорошо. У на
Okay, Jack. Just for curiosity's sake, does have any information as to whether that helium - that helium tank dum
Okay. Ich mache das, und 
أسترو. هذا هو الطيار السويسري. حاملة الطائرات على بعد حوالي ثلاثة أرباع ميل - تقترب
Okay, Jack. Du erinnerst dich sicher, dass alle in der Vergangenheit berichtet haben, den Monduntergang nur wenige Minuten vor dem Eintreffen gesehen zu haben. Dein Horizont wird wahrscheinlich dunkel sein, wenn du dort ankommst; du landest früh morgens; und wenn du von Westen kommst, wirst du noch auf einen dunklen Horizont blicken. Als zusätzliche Methode, ähnlich wie beim Verfolgen des Horizonts, geben wir dir eine Ausrichtung auf der Landeplattform, sodass du direkt auf den Mond schauen kannst. Dies ist eine Trägheitsausrichtung; sie ändert sich nicht. Du richtest die 36-Grad-Fensterlinie auf den Mond aus und beobachtest ihn dann einfach. Kurz zuvor wird die Erde aufgehen und den Mond bedecken, und du kannst dann den Horizont gut überprüfen. Ich habe einige Zeiten, die ich dir später mitteilen werde.
罗杰。目前陀螺仪显示的偏差只有4度，而且
알겠습니다. 안테나 전환을 위해 AUX 테이프 스위치를 끄고, 테이프 전진 스위치도 끄도록 하겠습니다. 그리고 OMNI의 Bravo와
ठीक है। यदि सेकेंडरी एक्यूमुलेटर की मात्रा में कोई कमी नहीं होती है, तो रेडिएटर वाल्व में सेकेंडरी ग्लाइकोल को सामान्य स्थिति म
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们现在不反对进行尿液排放。
Ricevuto. La separazione è 11 più 14 più 29; Delta-V, 9,0 piedi al secondo; durata, 
تقول، هل تع
Gémeaux 4, chirurgien RKV. 
Роджер. Это 05 плюс 39 плюс 41; Откр. 4; 112,
추진기 작동 중에 관찰했던 체적 변화율 같은 걸 기억하시나요? 0.4 정도라고 말씀하셨던 것 같은데… 혹시 SCS에 문제가 생겼을 
Освободите 
हम यहाँ की चीज़ों के बारे में विस्तार से बात करेंगे, लेकिन फिलहाल ऐसा लगता है कि यहाँ हर तरह के आकार, कोणीयता, कणिकता और हर प्रकार की चट्टानें मौजूद हैं। रंगों की बात करें तो, ये शून्य-चरण बिंदु 
6
Forse vedi la cerniera dell'amaca in questo momento. Sono le linee nere su quell'oggetto b
Нуждаются ли 
Переключилось на RATE - Хорошо, я вижу, что панель 
맨눈으로도 선명하게 볼 수 있나요, 아니면 
Roger. Muchea Cap Com. Loud and clear. Tell Jerry and Gus and Lewis and--
Хьюстон, если я правильно помню, в стартовом наборе стабилизато
Okey doke. Hot off the press here: We find Juan Carlos was formally designated yes
Retro set, ed
Columbia, Houston. Wenn Sie bei REACQ eine
Apollo 8, Houston. Basta con la cell
好的，收到。主警报器亮着。我们准备让你连接到指挥舱罐体上。第一步，我想知道你是否已经将指挥官的红
Роджер. плюс 90, G&N: 63481, минус 153, плюс 132, 004 10 25 38, минус 04761, плюс 00001, плюс 53361, 180 193 000, неприменимо, плюс 00203 5357
네, 확인했습니다. 짐, 참고로 말씀드리자면, 예상 소요 시간은 67+40으로 약 2시간입니다. 곧 수정된 비행 계획을 보내드
제 생각에도 그럴 것 같아요. 정규 시즌 관중 수는 그 절반
알겠습니다. 그럼 제
好吧，
ठीक है। समझ गया। दूसरा सवाल: जब हम -7 पूरा कर लेंगे, तो JETT एटीट्यूड के लिए वह पैंतरेबाज़ी हमें एलाइन बॉल का उपयोग करके, आपके द्वारा दिए गए कोणों प
N
なんてこった
Оно вышло здесь. Я это
Хорошо. Еще пара минут, Джим. Все выглядит очень хорошо. Ваше время в Карнарвоне будет в порядке, и мы пока не совсем понимаем, почему внутренний двигатель преждевременно отключился, за ис
Transmission des données médicales RKV n° 1 à 02:17:43 GMT pour le pilote. Veuillez demander au pilote de placer la sonde de température dans sa bouche 3 minutes avant l'acquisition. Veuillez également effectuer la mise à jour vocale pour les zones de récupération 9-3 à 13-2 et 8-Charli
Yes, there's a moose down here you just wouldn't believe. There's the biggest one yet. God, it's huge! It is enormous! It's so
Cl
Sì, manca circa un secon
我还有一个问题。你把这个抄下来，然后复述一遍给我。好的。一旦你掌握了方法，想要使用——想要点亮指示灯，我们需要关闭 CB 16 INVERTER 2；关闭 CB 11 AC BUS A LAMP。之后，你可以打开 CB 16 INVERTER 2，以及 CB 11 AC BUS A LAMP 和 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVE
没错。翻到第1-9页，在第100个面板上，跳过前四
38-3 83 前场，
Вот небольшая Южная Корона, которую мы решили испол
Go ahead, Houston. Apo
알겠습니다. 지금 저는 ATT 대기 상태입니다. 제 각도를 
いい
フレッド、了解。LMPの
م
로저. 네, 맞습니다. 그리고 그게 제대로 정렬되었
D'ac
Hast 
你好，Muchea。友谊七。我完全明
ठीक है। ठीक है। फिर "5 फ्रेम साइकिल करें, डार्क स्लाइड बदलें" से, नीचे की
了解。電源を切
روجر. نعم. كل شيء يبد
Guidance Initiate mu
Tout ce que j'ai entendu, c'est que la cabine était sous pression. Je n'ai rien entendu de plus. Odyssey, nous sommes prêts à ce que vous réchauffiez les moteurs numéro 2 à votre guise et nous nous 
House Ways and Means Committee also has agreed yesterday to tax changes affecting oil companies, also banks and utilities, which could add as much as 2 billion dollars per year to the federal revenue. The committee also voted tentatively to change the accou
D'accord, Jim. Nous aimerions connaître le temps que vous nous indiquerez. Nous pouvons calculer une manœuvre de retour libre pour n'importe quel temps
Roger. Verstanden, wir haben AKZEPTIEREN. Du bist ungefähr drei von - auf der Stimme,
यहां थ्रॉटल दबाने
Roger. Okay. At 74 hours when you start this m
唯一的问题是，那些该死的东西背后也耗费了大量的工程技术。
Okay. I just got a re
Как теперь
ええ、そうですね。スポーツ面は、あまり動きがありません。UCLAは両方のバスケットボールの投票でトップです。もし何か特定のチームについて聞きたいことがあれば、教えてください。どちらの投票でもトップ10に入っているかどうかお教えします。明日行われる大学オールスターゲーム、ノースチームに関しては、ノースがサウスチームをわずかに上回っています。ノースチームのコーチはアラ・パーセギアンで、ノートルダム大学の選手6名が彼の下にいるため、かなり手強いはずです。サウスチームのコーチはクレムソン大学のフランク・ハワードです。彼は、ノートルダム大学と対戦するために4日間でチームを作るのは簡単ではないと冗談を言います。スポーツ面でもう一つ興味深いニュースがあります。オハイオ州立大学のウッ
مرحباً جيم، لديّ ثلاث نقاط. أولاً، الكمبيوتر أصبح ملكك مجدداً. ثانياً، لن تحتاج إلى أي مناورة من الآن وحتى بدء عملية النسخ، لذا يمكنك البقاء في وضع النسخ. ثالثاً، نود الخروج من هذه العملية التي أدخلناك في
休斯顿对我们来说真是个巨大的改变。现在我们又能看到星星了，而且在这次旅行中第一次认出了星座。天空繁星
Tranqu
أنت تنظر الآن إلى مسبارنا، الموجود في مقدمة مركبة أوديسي. إنه ثقيل جدًا، لكنني أعتقد أنه في انعدام الجاذبية يصبح عديم الوزن، ويسهل تحريكه كثيرًا. في الواقع، علّق كل من فريد وجاك، كما فعل الكثيرون سا
Houston, quando una stella si stabilisce qui, non c'è dubbio. Un istante è lì,
了解。ジム、ここで何をして
조금 늦으실 것 같아요. 펀치를 좀 늦게 날리신
Roger. Point suivant: le taux de montée en pression de l'hélium supercritique est nominal. Vous nous avez également interrogés sur l'activité de vos propulseurs lors de la dernière rotation. Nous comprenons maintenant: vous avez indiqué que le tangage était en mode ACCEL COMMAND et le lacet et le roulis en mode RATE COMMAND. Vous actionniez vos propulseurs d
Roger. We show you as a little less than an hour to the midcourse correction number 2 burn. We recommend that you terminate the activities 
チャーリー、窓のブラ
ठीक है। बहुत बढ़िया। अच्छा, हम तब तक इंतजार करेंगे जब तक वह य
روجر، جيم. فهمت. لقد نسخنا ذلك
好的，TTC
Gemini VIII, RKV CAP COM. Veuillez éteindre 
بعض الأمور المتفرقة لك: نود منك التوقف عن شحن البطارية B في هذا الوقت؛ ونود أيضًا إجراء تقليب تبريد لمدة دقيقتين على جميع البطاريات الأربع؛ ومفتاح القياس عن بعد العلوي، ضعه على وضع الإيقاف، من فضلك، وستكون جاهزًا للانطلاق في المدار
Okay, wir versuchen das mal, und wir schalten je
Houston CAP COM, hier spricht Gemini 4. Scheint, als
At about 16:03, as we came across on this last pass, a
Houston, Columbia ha completato il controllo delle perdite e sta procedendo con l'
ठीक है। आप अपनी क्वांटिटी रीड बंद कर स
साथ ही, जब आप प्लस 96 डिग्री हेडिंग पर होंगे, तो एजेना 30 सेकंड के लिए फ्लाइट कंट्रोल मोड 7 में चला जा
Хорошо, Фред. Во-первых, подготовку к этому, начиная с контрольного списка действий в чрезвычайных ситуациях, страница 24, мы рекомендуем начать именно с этого, и мы будем рады любым вашим комментариям по этому поводу. Во-вторых: когда вы находитесь в режиме управления двигателем, вы должны видеть Солнце в самой верхней точке. Оно будет разделять курсор, когда курсор установлен на нуле. Однако следует помнить, что оно очень легко выйдет из этого режима, поскольку будет очень чувствительно к крену и рысканию. Поймите, что это в положении 2, а режим управления двигателе
حسنًا. وقبل المتابعة، دعنا ن
क्या आप कृपया हमें अपने OAMS प्
حسنًا. ابدأ من ست ساعات ونصف تحت الصفر. ستحتاج إلى الكثير من الأوراق، ولا أعرف إن كنت ترغب في نس
はい。数分間、両方のアンテナで通信が途
Acquario, 
スーツの電源とオーディオをオフにしてもらえま
네바다주 리노에 사는 한 어린 소년은 집에 벽난로가 없어서 지역 신문사에 산타클로스에게 편지를 써서 "앞문을 이용해 주시면 안 될까요? 문이 좀 뻑뻑해서 아래쪽을 살짝 차셔야 할 거예요."라고 제안했습니다. 아칸소주 리틀록에서는 크리스마스 전 주부터 크리스마스 당일까지 세인트 빈센트 병원에서 태어난 아기들을 퇴원시킬 때 커다란 빨간 크리스마스 양말에 넣어 어머니에게 전달합니다. 이는 종교 간 협력의 좋은 예입니다. 캘리포니아주 인디오에서는 경찰서장이 크리스마스 당일 기도서를 들고 있었습니다. 필립 H. 웨인버그 랍비가 실제 경찰서장인 호머 헌트(감리교 신자)가 가족과 함께 휴일을 보낼 수 있도록 하루 동안 서장 직무를 대행한 것입니다. 웨인버그 랍비가 헌트 서장을 대신해 크리스마스 직무를 수행한 것은 이번이 세 번째입니다. 지난 6년 동
حسنًا. هل سيحدث أي فرق إذا قمنا بفصل - لقد قمنا بفصل قواطع الدائرة الكهربائية POWER-1 و -2، لذلك إذا اخترنا فصل هذه الكابلات، فلا ضرر في ذلك
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. كيف تقرأ
好的。我们想向您简要介绍一下我们的计划。目前，水资源非常紧张。所以我们希望尽可能少用水。为此，我们计划在61小时（也就是37分钟后）进行一次16英尺/秒的自由返回机动。然后我们会关闭发动机，并在
जी हाँ, मैंने देखा है। यह काफी दिलचस्प है; दरअसल, शाम के समय यह भ्रामक लगता है। ऐसा लगता है मानो आप काफी नीचे की ओर झुके हुए
حسنًا. وجاك، هل يمكنك أن تعطينا ذلك - ماذا عن قاطع الدا
了
Okay. Ich habe den Leistungsverstärker ausgeschaltet, die Sprachausgabe deaktiviert, die PCM-Bitrate auf niedrig eingestellt und den UPDATA LINK-Schutzschalter auf 1
Уолли, приятно ли видеть включенные огни на заключительном этапе захода на по
Sigma Seven, per favore, potresti darci la temperatura dello scambiatore di calore della cabina? Pass
At this roll attitude, what should our highgain angles be? Maybe that would help us locate you. We don't see 
了解。時間は32時間00分。完了時の指示：姿勢をロール101.0、ピッチ090.0、ヨー000.0にしてください。ハイピッチマイナス23、ヨー93。通常の手順で減速してください。機体が安定し、スピンアップする前に、ベネット彗星の写真を撮影してください。六分儀とマガジンGを使用してください。つまり、超高感度の白黒フィルムですね？薄暗い場所で撮影するフィルムです。5秒、20秒、60秒の露出時間で1枚ずつ、合計3枚の写真を撮影してください。自動光学系を使用してください。R1は34717、R2は08028、R3は35075です。手動光学系を使用して、5秒、20秒、60秒の露出時間で1枚ずつ、合計3枚の写真を撮
はい。海軍にはそれを表す用語が
नहीं, मैंने नहीं देखा। मैंने ओ-रिंग को देखा और मुझे नहीं लगता कि यह ओ-रिंग की समस्या है। मुझे लगता ह
イーグル、ヒューストン。待機してください。確認します。それから、イーグル
罗杰，友
Ricevuto. F
È uscito a 15 metri dalle mie IVI. Ora mi farai un segno sulla m
Acquario, eri in forma per 2 
하지만
とても良い
D'accord, Houston. La Lune est essentiellement grise, sans couleur; elle ressemble à du plâtre ou à une sorte de sable grisâtre et profond. On distingue assez bien les détails. La Mer de la Fertilité est moins visible ici que sur Terre. Le contraste avec les cratères environnants est moins marqué. Ces cratèr
رحلة هيو
了解しました。さあ、コンピューターを渡してアップデートを
هل تريد معرفة ما يجري في العالم؟ حسناً، فاز فريق أستروس على سينسينات
Roger, la sequenza
Go ahead
Хорошо. На пятом уровне питания, аварийное отключение. Пункт 1, первая строка, я вычеркиваю "И VHF-A". Вторая строка "SIMPLEX operation". Третья строка, я заменяю второе кавычное слово, обозначающее усилитель мощности, на "OFF", а последнее слово в этой строке - "OFF", заменяю его на "PCM". Четвертая строка в порядке. Пятая строка, я вычеркиваю всю строку. Освещение, нам пока не понадобились прожекторы, поэтому мы просто оставим их выключенными, наружное освещение тоже выключено. Вычеркиваю строку 2, и теперь я на ше
E si procede. Se, durante la combustione, il motore si ferma, se avete un NOUN 97 lampeggiante, dovreste PROCEDERE, quindi ULLAGE, ENGINE START su PUSH e DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE ON. Okay. Ora solo informazioni generali. Se non avete bruciato PC più 2, probabilmente P - P più 4 sarebbe il primo. effettuerà il backup solo in modalità rate-fail, che sapete. Stiamo parlando del controllo delle stelle. Dovrò ricontattarvi su questo. Se, per qualche motivo, non c'è PC-2, avete una traiettoria di ritorno libero con 
罗杰。燃烧参数为 13 加 25 加 52；ΔV，09 英尺每秒；00 加 11 秒
收
Oui. On dirait que tu as une grosse corde qui pend derrière, Frank. C'est probablement la sangle dont tu par
ه
Привет, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Мы просмотрели запись второго включения двигателя. Нам кажется, всё выглядит очень хорошо. Все системы работали исправно. Мы вышли на орбиту с ограниченным слеже
안녕하세요,
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。大约两分钟后，我们将把上行链路交给戈德斯通
जी हां, सही है। और हम पेज के नीचे दिए गए "कैमरा से
Roger. Capito. Un secondo veloce e sembr
Okay. Wir werden diese Frage
रॉजर। यह तो वाकई बहुत शानद
Ecco di nuovo quella paro
حسنًا. 10، /: 45597، ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 35186، ناقص 01512، ناقص 00520 180 007 000، نوفمبر ألفا، زائد 00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253؛ العقرب دلتا، لأسفل 069، لليسار 45، زائد 0748، ناقص 16500 12994 36300؛ النجم الرئيسي الشعرى اليمانية، النجم الثانوي رجل الجبار، 129 155 010؛ أربع رباعيات، 15 ثانية، مسح؛ الأفق على خط نافذة 3.2 درجة عند T ناقص 3؛ 
Okay. Das war zwar richtig, aber ich möchte die a
Roger, Bill. Nous avons ici un tas de cassettes de vos morceaux pré
حسنًا يا باستر. وضعية العودة إلى الغلاف الجوي، تحويل نظام التحكم في وضعية الدخول إلى الوضع ال
알겠습니다. 전원 공급 항목 첫 번째 줄에 "AUTO SELECT, 16, to OFF"라고 되어 있는데, 이 부분은 삭제하시면 됩니다. 다섯 번째 줄에는 "Circuit breaker LOGIC POWER"라고 되어 있는데, 실제로는 "LOGIC BUS, four of them, to closed"입니다. 엔진을 과열시키는 게 아니므로 DELTA-V CG는 ​​중요하지 않습니다. "SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS
没错，13。我记得飞行计划上说，热
로저
21455. Спасибо. Просто к вашему сведению: вашему голосу требуется около 1,6 секунды, чтобы дойти до 
Pretty big throttle you got the
Non, nous l'avons supprimé. Vos taux de dérive sont si faibles que vous n'en avez même pas besoin, 
Roger. Es war mein Fehler: Ich muss 3701 anstelle von 3723 und 5
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अब उसी क्षेत्र को ऊपर से देखने पर ऐसा लगता है कि यह पृथ्वी की रोशनी को प्रतिबिंबित कर रहा है। मुझे पक्का नहीं पता कि इसे लगभग शून्य कलाय पर सेट किया गया था या नहीं - खैर, कम से कम क्रेटर की एक दीवार 
मुख्य बैटरियां - हमने उनकी जांच की। वे ठीक निकली
Ой, Кейп,
Recevoir sur le télé
मैंने कहा, इस बार म
Ho visto un sacco di Nord Africa... di giorno, lo so bene. Ho appena completato la missione D-9 Apollo Landmark sul Target
Роджер. И я полагаю, связь была в поряд
Роджер. Просто из любопытства к Биллу, мы можем сказать несколько слов о нагревателях для криогенных резервуаров, а также о вентиляторах. Мы заметили, что нагреватели работают нормально, включаясь и выключаясь; и со временем частота этих циклов увеличивается, что указывает на небольшое расслоение в резервуарах. А затем, когда мы включаем вентиляторы каждые 4 часа на пару минут, это перемешивает воду, и нагреватели снова начинают включаться и выключаться медленнее некоторое время, пока снова не произойдет небо
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 색감
Roger. Thank you. And our preliminary tracking data for the first few m
Nous vous avons bi
Capisco. Stiamo controllando. Al momento il t
Okay. Reading back UP TELEMETRY COMMAND to OFF; VHF AM B, center; S-BAND SQUELCH to OFF; FUEL CELL REACS VALVES to NORMAL; TAPE RECORDER FORWARD, center; TAPE MOTION, ba
ठीक है, और आप वाकई बहुत अच्छे हैं। यह - यह सब शोर न होना वाकई सुखद है। जिम, मैं आपको बताता हूँ कि मैं क्या करना चाहता हूँ। जैसा कि मैंने कहा, हम अभी आपको विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ नहीं देंगे। हम आपको जल्द ही प्रक्रियाएँ उपलब्ध कराने की कोशिश करेंगे, जो निम्नलिखित रूप में होंगी। सबसे पहले, हमारे पास ए
ど
Dort, wo „Und beachten Sie“ steht, befindet sich der Helm des CMP zusammen mit den beiden anderen PGA-Helmen in der L-fö
这里是高频电台的Sigma Seven。
حسناً. إنها في نفس موضع الهوائي الآن؛ بالإضافة إلى زاوية ميل 15 درجة، و... لا، لحظة من فضلك. لقد فهمت الأمر - فهمت الآ
안녕하세요. 오늘 저는 아폴로 11호 임무의 상징적인 측면 몇 가지를 여러분과 나누고자 합니다. 지난 2~3일 동안 우주선 안에서 일어난 일들을 논의해 본 결과, 이번 임무는 단순히 세 사람이 달에 간 것 이상의 의미를 지닌다는 결론에 도달했습니다
D'accord. Ceci est une transmission simultanée VHF et bande S:
네. 메인 버스 B에 대한 제 관찰 결과를 말씀드리겠습니다. 상황이 매우 빠르게 진행됐습니다. 먼저 충격이나 폭발음 같은 게 들렸는데, 정확한 원인은 잘
Das ist rich
Хорошо. Мы потеряли там контроль. Мы сменили OMNI. Просто для с
Роджер. Что касается вашего вопроса об использовании: похоже, в настоящее время ваш вес п
ठीक है। आखिरी तीन पंक्तियों में, हमारे पास फ्लड और ट्रैक सर्किट ब्रेकर हैं, पंक्ति 2, खुली हुई; लॉजिक पावर बी, खुली हुई; डिसेंट इंजन ओवरराइड, खुली हुई; सूट फ्लो कंट्रोल, खुली हुई। तीसरी पंक्ति में - डिस्प्ले, खुली हुई; वीएचएफ ए और वीएचएफ - वीएचएफ ए ट्रांसमीटर, खुली हुई; वीएचएफ बी रिसीवर, खुली हुई। और नीचे: क्रू विकल्प पर डिस्प्ले, खुली हुई है। और 
روجر
حسنًا، هذا يبدو جيدًا
Au commencement, Dieu créa le ciel et la terre. La terre était informe et vide; les ténèbres couvraient l’abîme. L’Esprit de Dieu planait au-dessus des eaux, et Dieu dit: « Que la lumière soit! » Et la lumière fut. Dieu vit que la lumière était bonne, et il sépara la lumière des
わかりました。COMMの下の3行目です。DISPLAYSを開き、SE AUDIOを閉じ、VHF A TRANSMITTERとB RECEIVERを開き、PRIMARY S-BANDの回路ブレーカーを両方閉じます。S-BAND ANTENNAを開き、PMPを閉じ、TVを
Okay. And, Jack, can we turn on the circuit breakers so we could have a ball to see if we go to gi
10, 9, 8, 7, 6
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Wir haben keine Veränderung im EKG des letzten Menstruationszyklus festgestellt. Sobald er etwas Zeit hat, bitten wir ihn, dies erneut zu
يبدو أن المقصورة
Do you still want our - have us command as much as we can on the ground, or would you like
Roger, ne t'inquiète pas pour celui en Afrique, il est à environ 30 kilomètres d'ici et tu n'es qu'à 183 kilomètres d
Kano, Cap C
Salut. Je ne sui
Es war definitiv unter mir. Ich hatte es seit etwa Carnarvon unter mir verfolgt. Bis Carnarvon war es unter uns, dann bis zum Horizont und dann wieder unter uns. Es sah fast so aus, als befände es sich in einer anderen Umlaufbahn als ich. Es hatte einen anderen Apogäum und Perigäum als ich. Jedenfalls versuchte ich, mich ihm bei Tagesanbruch anzunähern, sobald ich seine Position bestimmen konnte. Wie gesagt, zu diesem Zeitpunkt war es ein bis zwei Meilen vor mir – unter mir. Je mehr ich versuchte, mich anzunähern, desto weniger Abstand gewann ich. Ich zündete die Triebwerke in Richtung Gegengeschwindigkeit. Ich zündete meine oberen Triebwerke so, dass ich meine Gesamtgeschwindigkeit verringerte und dann gleichzeitig zündete. Ich konnte mich nie wirklich annähern, und es entfernte sich immer weiter. Mir wurde klar, dass wir, um die Boosterstufe rechtzeitig für den Außenbordeinsatz (EVA) in Hawaii anzunähern, wahrscheinlich unseren gesamten Treibstoff verbrauchen würden. In den Bodenregeln hatten wir vereinbart, dies nicht zu tun. Ich habe mich also mit CAP COM beraten, und wir haben beschlossen, den Booster-Teil der Mission nicht durchzuführen. Ich weiß nicht, ob ich es schon erwähnt habe, aber als wir uns vom Booster trennten, schienen unsere Rotationsgeschwindigkeiten relativ gering zu sein, etwa ein halbes Grad pro Sekunde in Nick- und Gierrichtung. Ich versuchte, diese zu reduzieren. Ich feuerte je einen Impuls in jede Richtung ab und konzentrierte mich dann auf die Trennung vom Booster. Die Trennung verlief erfolgreich, und zwar so, dass wir andere Rotationsgeschwindigkeiten erreichten. Schließlich richteten wir uns auf und drehten uns um. Das Ganze dauerte wohl etwa anderthalb bis zwei Minuten. Das Hauptproblem schien die Zeit zu sein, die ich für die Ausrichtung der Plattform benötigte, bevor wir in die dunkle Seite eintraten. Wir waren wahrscheinlich 
ठीक है। बस यही चेतावनी और सावधानी फिर से स
यह दोस्ती का सातवां अध्याय है। नकारात्मक, मुझे अभी तक कोई समस्या
जी हाँ। हमने एक कनस्तर का उपयोग करने का निर्णय लिया है, और जैसा कि आप जानते हैं, तरल-शीतित वस्त्र के चारों ओर एक थैली होती है जिसका उपयोग हम कर सकते हैं, या हमें पता है कि हम इसका उपयोग कर सकते हैं। हमने इसे आजमाया है। तो आपके पास एक थैली के अंदर एक और थैली है, और उसके अंदर तरल-शीतित वस्त्र है। जो थैली तरल-शीतित वस्त्र के सबसे करीब है, वही हमें चाहिए, और हमारे पास ऐसी दो थैलियाँ हैं। और फिर, ज़ाहिर है, हमें कुछ टेप का उपयोग करना होगा, और जैसा कि आपने कहा, उड़ान डेटा फ़ाइल टाइमलाइन बुक या इसी तरह की किसी चीज़ के पीछे का भाग, और बस इन सामग्रियों का उपयोग करके, हम यह जुगाड़ वाला कनस्तर बना सकते हैं। तो, जिस थैली की हमें तलाश है, वह तरल-शीतित वस्त्र के ठीक बगल वाली थैली है, और अगर हम इसे काटने में बहुत सावधा
Они сно
네, 방금 말씀드렸듯이 달이 여전
我是
حسنًا. خطوتان أخيرتان. الخطوة السادسة: ابقَ على هوائي عالي الكسب في هذا الوضع لمدة دقيقتين. لا تُبدّل إلى وضع OMNI خلال هاتين الدقيقتين، وحافظ على إعدادات وضع الصوت 
い
现在俯仰角和偏航角（或者说俯仰角和横滚角）都朝着指定角度移动，俯仰角已经超
لسوء الحظ، لا يتفق الرسم البياني مع ذلك، لأن معدل النطاق عند 36 دقيقة كان خ
मैं इसे चालू करने जा रहा हू
Okay. Real fine, At 115 degrees o
Okay. Roger. Ich empfange das Quietschen hier auch. DELTA-VC 104356
至少我们现在醒了，欧
ठीक है। हम आपको यहाँ ज़मीन पर अच्छे से दिखा रहे हैं। हम आपके रेडिएटर को चालू करने की अनुम
水瓶座，这里是休斯顿。我们对你们的解读……充满了杂音。你们又是如何解
حسنًا. هناك ثلاثة قواطع دوائر كهربائية
Okay. You have a GO from down here for the second orbit, and, if you'll stand b
알겠습니다. 시계는
अरे, मुझे 
Yes. I can
로저. 지침 측면에서도, 소비 측면에서도 모두 좋아 보입니다. 모든 게
好的。还
Roger. Plus 3.3 auf der. Un
اسأله إن كنت تبقيها في وضع 
SONDE D'AMARRAGE, DÉPLOIEMENT/RELÂCHEMENT, position ARRÊT, c'est fait. SONDE D'AMARRAGE, RÉTRACTATION, positio
11단계가 완
I have selected aux damp and rate command at this. The window is almost completely 
ह्यूस्टन स्थित एसोसिएटेड न्यूज़ एजेंसी के हैरी रोसेन्थल की एक रिपोर्ट यहाँ प्रस्तुत है। दो सांता क्लॉज़ ने 2 वर्षीय जेफ़री लवेल के लिए क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या को रोशन कर दिया। पहले सांता ने उसके घर का दरवाज़ा खटखटाया और उपहार लाए। दूसरे सांता ने उसके पापा को चाँद से घर भेजा। पहले सांता ने लाल सूट और सफ़ेद दाढ़ी पहनी थी और इतनी ज़ोर से 'हो-हो' की आवाज़ निकाली कि पूरे मोहल्ले में सुनाई दी। दूसरा सांता एक विशाल इंजन था जो चाँद के पीछे से आग उगल रहा था, और हज़ारों लोग इसके चालू होने की खबर का इंतज़ार कर रहे थे। "कृपया सूचित किया जाए कि सांता क्लॉज़ आ गए हैं," अपोलो 8 के पहले शब्द थे जब उसने रेडियो साइलेंस से बाहर आकर 15 मिनट बाद उत्सुक दुनिया को सूचित किया कि इंजन ने अपना महत्वपूर्ण बर्न पूरा कर लिया है। मिशन कंट्रोल के केन मैटिंगली ने कहा, "हममें से किसी ने भी इससे बेहतर क्रिसमस उपहार की उम्मीद नहीं की थी।" अंतरिक्ष यान के कमांडर कर्नल फ्रैंक बोरमैन ने जवाब दिया, "ज़मीन पर मौजूद सभी लोगों को हमारी ओर से धन्यवाद दें। आप जानते हैं कि हम आपके बिना यह नहीं कर सकते थे।" इसी समय, मिशन कंट्रोल के कंसोल के सामने एक क्रिसमस ट्री जगमगा उठा, और अंतरिक्ष यात्री हैरिसन श्मिट ने दल को "संत निकोलस की यात्रा" का अंतरिक्ष संस्करण पढ़कर सुनाया। "क्रिसमस की रात से ठीक पहले, अंतरिक्ष में, अपोलो 8 के दल ने चंद्रमा की दौड़ जीत ली थी," यह शुरू हुआ। मिशन कंट्रोल दल ने उत्सव को तब तक के लिए स्थगित कर दिया था जब तक कि जेफरी के पिता, नौसेना कप्तान जेम्स लवेल, वायु सेना के मेजर विलियम ए. एंडर्स और कर्नल बोरमैन सुरक्षित रूप से घर नहीं लौट आए। किसी भी अन्य क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या पर, अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों के परिवार क्रिसमस की प्रार्थना के लिए चर्च में होते, लेकिन इस साल वे सभी अपने टेलीविजन सेटों से चिपके हुए थे। मानवयुक्त अंतरिक्ष यान केंद्र के पास के सभी घर सजाए गए थे। लवेल के घर के आसपास और उनके टिम्बर कोव समुदाय में लॉन मैक्सिकन शैली के ल्यूमिनारियो से सजे हुए थे, और चारों लवेल 30. वे 00, एक कार आई जिसमें एक लंबा सांता क्लॉस अपनी पीठ पर एक बड़ा बोरा लिए बैठा था। वह दरवाजे तक आया और जोर से दस्तक दी। दरवाजा खुला और सामने जेफरी लवेल खड़ा था, जो 14 जनवरी को 3 साल का हो जाएगा। उसे देखकर जेफरी सहम गया। उसकी माँ ने उसे गोद में उठा लिया और जेफरी उनसे लिपट गया, फिर भी शरमाता रहा। उसकी 15 साल की बहन बारबरा ने कहा, "पिछले साल तो वह रोते हुए भाग गया था।" इससे पहले, उसे सारे लैंप बुझाने से रोकने के लिए उसके पीछे भागना पड़ा था। लवेल परिवार के दूसरे बच्चे, 13 साल का जेम्स और 10 साल की सुसान, बड़े मज़े से देख रहे थे। आखिर में, सांता और बच्चे अंदर चले गए; तोहफे पेड़ के नीचे रख दिए गए; ये तोहफे आज तक नहीं खोले जाने थे। श्रीमती लवेल ने मेहमानों के लिए एग नोग और कुकीज़ तैयार कीं और उन्होंने तीन अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों द्वारा आयोजित चंद्रमा की 25 मिनट की टीवी यात्रा देखी। बाद में, दोस्तों ने श्रीमती लवेल, बारबरा औ
Passiamo ora all'attacc
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. في المرة القادمة التي نمر فيها بالمنعطف صفر، سنتوقف، وهذ
好的。我们还没
로저. 다시 읽어보겠습니다. 20-4
オーケー、ドーク。速報です。昨日（火曜日）、フアン・カルロスがフランコ将軍の後継者、スペイン国家元首、そして最終的には国王に正式に指名されました。フアン・カルロスは本日、法とスペイン唯一の合法的な政治組織である国民運動への忠誠の誓いを立てた後、後継者として宣誓を行います。彼は「スペ
休斯顿，静海基
Wir haben's. Das e
अगर मेरी आवाज साफ नहीं आ रही है, तो इसका कारण यह है कि मैंने अपने दांतों के बीच टॉर
Houston, Apollo 11. Quale pagina vuoi in quella revisio
J'utilise le photomètre maintenant… pour essayer d'obtenir une mesure. J'ai vu un… non, c'est le ballon que je vois, dérivant toujo
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Zanzibar Cap Com, ich höre 
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie befinden sich anscheinend auf der Nebenschleife. Wir würden diese gerne für etwa 5 M
はい、ライトテスト中です。確認
لا، لا بأس يا فانس. قبل أن نضطر للقلق بشأن ذلك، أعتقد أن لدينا انتخابات تمهي
我们获得批
え？分かってるよ。そういう風に測ってみたんだけど、あんまりうまくいかないんだよね
हे, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपना प्राथमिक ऑक्
C'est exact. Nos équipes évaluent actuellement la situation thermique. Il semble que vous serez hors de portée pendant un certain temps. C'est pourquoi nous vous demandons de reprendre la mission dès que vous aurez effectué ces trois observations d'étoiles. Nous continuons à travailler sur la situation thermique et l'obser
У вас новая, новая карта звездного неба. У вас, должно быть, но
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نرجو منكم إبقاء التلفاز مفتوحاً لمدة عشر دقائق تقريباً، لنتمكن من الحصول على صورة واضحة للكاميرا. يمكنكم فعل ما تشاؤون على التلفاز: تصوير داخلي، 
Im Allgemeinen finde ich, dass sie eine recht gute Arbeit leisten, insbeso
Okay, Jim. I didn't catch that suggestion on account of the background noise; maybe we can pass it on when it gets more favorable
好的。划掉该页右侧最上面一行“持续4秒，50帧速率，遮盖
ठीक है। अगर आप वहां हैं तो हम भी यहां हैं
Roger. Kommt auf dich zu. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; minus 061, plus 067 135 23 4149;, plus 32020, plus 06713, minus 02773 181 054 013;, HA ist NA, plus 00230 32833 228, DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355. Die nächsten drei Zeilen sind NA. plus 1103, min
يبدو هذا مكانًا جيدًا حقًا. حسنًا. أنا متأكد من أننا سنناقش هذا الأمر بتفصيل أكبر يا بيل. لكن في الوقت الحالي، هذه هي الأمور التي نتحدث عنها. أما بالنسبة للربح العالي، فلا يزال هناك نقاش واسع حول ما رأيناه بالضبط وماذا
روجر. كان ذلك حرقًا قصيرًا جدًا. أرجو منك أن تُلقي نظرة سريعة على اللوحة عندما تس
確かに私の真下です。カーナボンあたりからずっと真下を追っていました。カーナボンあたりまでは真下、そし
روجر. ماذ
Mit einem St
로저, 트랭퀼리티. 114 31 00에 시간 해킹을 해드리겠
Gemelli 4, cont
أظن أن جيم قال إن الأمر أصبح رس
هذا صحيح يا جيم. وبعد ذلك سنطلب منك الخضوع لإجراء إيقاف 
I guess it's a combination of the volume and the antenna. May have been just the volume that was way up too high. Why don't you try stowing it again; see if that makes any di
Ne stiamo discutendo ora, Jim, e sembra che dovremo aspettare il tracking. Per il momento, visto che sei nel corridoio, beh, non c'è b
سيكون الدوران هنا، لكن 
Bien reçu. Un instant. Notre seule préoc
ठीक है। पृष्ठ के मध्य से शुरू करते हुए, वह ब्लॉक "सीएमएस रिज्यूम एटीट्यूड 
좋습니다, 아쿠
ठीक है। बैटरी A का वोल्टेज 38.3, बैटरी B का 36.9, बैटरी C का 38.5 है। यह काफी अच्छा लग रहा है। ऐसा लगता है कि हमने जो भी चीज़ें निकाली थीं, उन्हें वापस लगा दिया है, और हम अनुमान के 
收到。下降推进剂燃料排气口，打开；下降推进剂
नहीं। मैं यह न
了解しま
Хорошо. Плюс 1197 минус 16500 12681 35608, выровнять север, установить звезды, крен 068, тангаж 097, рыскание 356, зазор отсутствует; другое: один, быстрое возвращение, равно 7900 для Индийского океана; номер 2, высокоскоростная процедура не требуется; номер 3, предполагается отсутствие коррекции на среднем курсе номер 1. Кон
收到。我觉得我遇到的唯一问题就是电路部分。我会
로저. 전적으로 동의합니다. 그리고 당신이 그 작업을 시작하는 동안, 저는 이 메모를 읽어보겠습니다. 프로그램 경보 5.6, 범위가 400해리 이상일 경우, 20번 항목에 설명된 대로 진행하
Lui era Neil. Lui è Buzz. Vorrei tanto sapere quando è stata l'ultima volta 
そしてヒューストン、
Now we've got what I would consider darn near perfect star-seeing conditions with the moon effect as small as it is. As we were saying before, the magnitude of the stars - it looks like we can go right down to seventh order or maybe just a hair below, using our calibration, the Corona Au
Ah, cavolo, mi è capitato di ritrovarmi in posizione invertita. Per un motivo o per l'altro, si capisce che la ciotola era capov
好的，收到。我们要在
罗杰。
أوه، أرى وميضاً خفيفاً 
Ça
Roger. Nous venons de constater son absence et, oui, nous aimerions bien l'ajouter. Vous comprenez bien que nous n
Grazie. È in B
Okay. War das alles, 
حسناً. تمام. تمام. لح
D'accord. On va donc patienter. On a une bonne base. On attendra q
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы готовы к трансляции по телевидению в Голдстоуне. Трансляция будет записана здесь, в Голдстоуне, а затем показана зде
地上では引き続き状況は良好です。機内気圧の測定値を確認しました。参考までに、4.8 [psia] です。これは、これまでの傾向をかなり反映しています。スーツ内圧は4.9 [psia
À quelle
Ricevuto. Aspetta che finiamo la manovra e 
알
好的。在启动步骤中，第 2 行（或步骤 2）显示“正
13, Houston. Ti vediamo vicino al blocco cardanico. Vorremmo che tu attivassi tutti i quad C sul MAIN A, i quad C-1, C-2, C-3, C-4 sul MAIN A, e anche 
У вас 6 кадров в секунду, и это
Ça a l'air d'un très bon endroit. D'accord. 
Houston, nella nostra posizione attuale, entreremo in modalità gimbal lock. Proverò 
In quel momento
Bene. Vorremmo che seguissi la
REACQ는 광고대로 작동하지 않았습니다. 스캔 한계를 넘어서 기계적 한계까지 들어간 것처럼 보였고, 광각 빔으로 주변을 살피면서 따라다니다가
알겠습니다. 메인 밸브는
حسنًا. كيف هي د
了解。
Tranquility Base, Houston. On my Mark
Il semblerait que ces zéros soient légèrement en retard
好的。
D'
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tempo per assistere al vostro ammaraggio. Ad accompagnare il Presidente ci saranno il Segretario di Stato William Rogers e Frank Borman. Assisteranno all'ammaraggio dal ponte della nave di recupero con l'Ammiraglio John Sidney McCain, Jr., Comandante delle Forze del Pacifico. Dopo la permanenza del Presidente a bordo dell'Hornet, partirà per il suo tour in Asia e la visita programmata in Romania. Si ritiene che Luna 15 si sia schiantata ieri nel Mare delle Crisi, dopo aver orbitato attorno alla Luna 52 volte. L'agenzia di stampa sovietica TASS ha riferito che sono state condotte ricerche "scientifiche" nello spazio vicino alla Luna. Sir Bernard Lovell dell'Osservatorio di Jodrell Bank ha affermato che Luna 15 ha colpito la superficie della Luna a una velocità di circa 480 chilometri orari. La situazione è stata relativamente tranquilla di recente in Vietnam. Soldati in pattuglia sono stati osservati con radio a transistor sintonizzate sul vostro volo. Le emittenti radiotelevisive delle Forze Armate in Vietnam hanno dato piena copertura alla missione. Le schermaglie continuano tra egiziani e israeliani lungo il Canale di Suez. Gli osservatori delle Nazioni Unite stanno cercando di fermare l'azione. A Washington, la Commissione per i Modi e i Mezzi della Camera ha votato per ridurre la tolleranza al depauperamento del petrolio dal 27,5% al ​​20%. Abbiamo piovuto diverse volte qui nella zona di Houston. Oggi è nuvoloso e sono previsti altri rovesci. Sul fronte sportivo, come accennato in precedenza, stasera si gioca l'All Star Game. Ieri non si è giocata nessuna partita. Ieri sera a New York, la Baseball Writers Association of America ha nominato Babe Ruth il più grande giocatore di baseball di tutti i tempi. Joe DiMaggio è stato nominato il più grande giocatore di baseball vivente. Frank Borman ha fatto gli annunci durante una cena in onore dei giocatori. Joe Namath ha trascorso un'intera giornata al training camp dei New York Jets. Cinque poliziotti hanno avuto difficoltà a trattenere circa 500 bambini che volevano toccare Broadway Joe. Ha detto di sentirsi bene e che giocherà l'All Star Game del 1° agosto, se Coach Weeb Eubank glielo permetterà. Il training camp degli Oilers a Kerrville si è bagnato ieri, ma gli allenamenti sono continuati. Ci sono stati alcuni infortuni minori, ma niente di troppo grave. Coach Wally Lemm è sod
아니요, 저는 아무런
जेमिनी 4, 
ठीक है। इंग्लैंड के जोड्रेल बैंक से, एपी के माध्यम से: ब्रिटेन की विशाल जोड्रेल बैंक रेडियो दूरबीन ने आज सुबह 5:49 पूर्वी मानक समय (ईएसटी) पर सोवियत संघ के मानवरहित चंद्र प्रक्षेपण से संकेत प्राप्त करना बंद कर दिया। एक प्रवक्ता ने कहा कि ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि लूना 15 अंतरिक्ष यान "चंद्रमा से आगे निकल गया है।" एक अन्य बयान: वेधशाला के निदेशक सर बर्नार्ड लवेल के प्रवक्ता ने कहा, "हमें नहीं लगता कि यह उतरा है।" वाशिंगटन यूपीआई: उपराष्ट्रपति स्पिरो टी. एग्न्यू ने वर्ष 2000 तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेजने का आह्वान किया है, लेकिन डेमोक्रेटिक नेताओं ने जवाब दिया कि पृथ्वी पर जरूरतों को प्राथमिकता दी जानी चाहिए। बुधवार को अपोलो 11 के प्रक्षेपण के समय उपस्थित वरिष्ठ सरकारी अधिकारी एग्न्यू ने स्पष्ट रूप से अपने लिए बोलते हुए कहा था, न कि निक्सन प्रशासन के लिए, "मेरे विचार में, हमें इस सदी के अंत तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेज देना चाहिए।" लैरेडो, टेक्सास, एपी: नुएवो लैरेडो में आव्रजन अधिकारियों ने बुधवार को घोषणा की कि हिप्पियों को मेक्सिको में प्रवेश के लिए पर्यटक कार्ड नहीं दिए जाएंगे, जब तक कि वे स्नान न कर लें और बाल न कटवा लें। नुएवो लारेडो में मैक्सिकन आव्रजन प्रमुख ह्यूबर्टो काज़ारास ने कहा कि मैक्सिको सिटी, अक
And have you got some 
Хорошо, ладно. Можете сказать ему, когда мы дойдём 
Ripeti, per favore. Avanti. Siamo 130
로저, 저희는 지난번 TM 확인 결과에서 당신이 여전히 요(ya
好的，谢谢。如果你方便的话，在有空的时候，在你不用发泄
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Nous recevons votre liaison FM. Nous att
Роджер. Понял, 68 [г
罗杰。没错，吉姆。为了回答你的问题并纠正一点，偏航角应该是你当
加
Roger. Ungefähr 12 Minuten vor dem großen Schub gibt es eine kleine, kontinuierliche Entlüftungsöffnung, die sich bei einem bestimmten Druck öffnet. Sie werden möglic
Ricevuto. Il peso era di 350 g. Questo senza la sacca, e il p
Хорошо. Теперь я понимаю, что вы имеете в виду. Я передам это ребятам из телевизионной команды и посмотрю, что они скажут по этому поводу. В дополнение к вышесказанному, они хотели сделать несколько снимков Земли на Hasselblad через окно встречного наб
了解しました。コマ
Roger. And next item, the supercritical helium rise rate is nominal, and you also had that question for us about your thruster activity during 
كلا الحافلتين تعملان بشكل جيد.
Roger. Earth at 24. And it looks like you're getting up to about 15 on the CO2, so we want you to select SECONDAR
Хорошо, 8. Мы хотим провести небольшую т
これが地球です。今日は地球をとてもよく見
好的。现在，在这种配置下，需要读取以下车载数据：电池 C 电压、电池 A 测温电压、电池 B 测温电压、氦气压力。喷油器温度，对应位置分别为 5 Charlie、
Понял. Мы видим, как на него надевают фильтр. Аполлон-8, это Хьюстон. Похоже, света слишком много. Поляриз
Roger. Sehr gut. Flight teilte außerdem mit, d
看看那东西。我不知
收到。以下是您将收到的更新的简要概述。您目前收到的关于完成-8飞掠机动后+2的更新仍然有效，不会再更新。您收到的下一个更新是4。之后，您将收到两个+2机动的更新，假设4已完成。一个是最小机动，另一个是快速返
Gemelli 
Хорошо. А как 
ठीक है। "जब दरें 0.05 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड
予想通り、移動に支障はないようです。地上での様々なシミュレーションで行った6分の1Gのシミュレーションよりも、もしかしたら楽かもしれません。実際に歩き回るのに支障はありません。わかりました。降下エン
А чтобы сделат
يعود هذا إلى بعض المشاكل التي واجهناها سابقًا؛ محاولة معرفة ما إذا كانت قراءات البرنامج التي نحصل عليها هن
Ich dachte, wir könnten einfach meine – Ak
Ро
Ja, ich bin mit den letzten Aktualisierungen zufrieden, insbesondere was die Auswirkungen auf unseren Zustandsvektor betrifft. Mit den verschiedenen Verfahren bin ich allerdings noch nicht ganz zufrieden. Wenn wir Sterne innerhalb eines kleineren Bereichs von Zapfenwinkeln
उस समय 
看起来很漂亮。你是从这里
J'
좋아요. 이제 다시
收到。你收到我刚才说
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। हम आपके गिम्बल को देख रहे हैं और हमने पाया 
Понял. Это «Друж
CB,, 16, 배트 피드 타
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 알겠습니다. 지상에서 통신하겠습니다
جيميني 4، هيوستن كاب كوم. انت
他们也查看了你的地标追踪结果。所有标记点似乎都非常准确，我们这里有一整页关于各个站点海拔高度的数据，我就不一一念给你看了，但我想告诉你，标记工作显然非常顺利。我还拿到了你的消耗品预算，特别是推进剂用量。如果你需要的话，这是实际用量与标称值的偏差值。你最糟糕的是查理四象限，
Nous vous montrons actuellement la zone située au sud-
ठीक है। अच
Ok, Fred. Solo... So
Fred ora sta guardando attraverso il nostro dispositivo ottico. È uno strumento che serve ad allineare la nostra piattaforma, e Fred ora lo sta guardando solo per vedere che tipo di immagine esterna potrebbe ottenere. Potremmo riuscire a usare una telecamera per guardare attraverso il nostro strum
Роджер. Начнём с мировых новостей. Всеобщие поздравления американским астронавтам «Аполлона-8» и надежды на международное сотрудничество в освоении космоса сопровождались рождественскими посланиями, разосланными по всему миру, пока крошечный космический корабль вращался вокруг Луны. Даже в коммунистическом мире царил энтузиазм по поводу первого полёта человека на Луну. В Москве советский учёный Анатолий Бесаранов вспомнил, что его страна и Соединённые Штаты уже обменивались знаниями о космосе, и предсказал, что полёт «Аполлона-8» приведёт к дальнейшему сотрудничеству. На Кубе радио Гаваны ретранслировало программу «Голоса Америки», чтобы рассказать слушателям о речи «Аполлона-8». Представители «Голоса» заявили, что это был первый случай, когда программы американских агентств транслировались по радио Гаваны. Чехословакия наблюдала за полётом на Луну благодаря обширному телевизионному освещению; а в Будапеште, Венгрия, в поездах и автобусах почти ни о чём другом не говорили. В некоммунистическом мире офисные работники и покупатели рождественских подарков затаили дыхание, наблюдая за подготовкой космического корабля к старту. Французы на улицах восхваляли американские технологии и космический подвиг, а некоторые зрители, смотрящие по телевизору лунные фотографии, скандировали «Великолепно!». В Лондоне толпы покупателей, покупающих рождественские подарки, заполнили магазины и пабы, чтобы посмотреть телевизионные фотографии лунных кратеров. Ведущий британский астроном-космонавт Бернард Ловелл, который еще несколько недель назад критиковал проект «Аполлон-8» на том основании, что приборы могли бы выполнить эту работу, не подвергая опасности жизни астронавтов, ясно дал понять, что он был глубоко впечатлен полетом на Луну. Папа Павел VI отдал дань уважения этим пионерам расширения интеллекта и деятельности человека. Однако лишь немногие скряги «отмахнулись» от рождественского путешествия. Самым известным был Сэмюэл Шентон, секретарь лондонск
Мы даже можем уви
Okay. L'unica osservazione che abbiamo appena fatto è che, nel caso in cui stessi pens
Хьюстон, как ты читае
Okay. Richte
자
好的。看起来，虽然我们和您在四象限读数上读出的数值相同，但使用计算机程序和所有预设的修正系数后，您的四个四象限读数似乎非常接近。例如，以磅为单位，A象限为193磅
Verstrichene Zeit der Endphase: 1 + 29 + 17; Brenndauer: 5 + 16 + 54; Delta-V: 33,0; Dauer: 41 Sekunden; Kern 25: 00301; Kern 26: 90135; Kern 27: 00016; Delta-V: 32,9, 1,5, 1,5; Brenndauer: 40 vorwärts, 4 abwärts, 4 links; Gierwinkel: 0°, Nickwinke
是的，它们都紧得不能再紧了。这样吧，我把它们脱下来再重新戴上，看看会不会有
짐
रॉजर। मैंने आपकी बात साफ़-साफ़ समझ ली है। मैं आपके टीआर को अपडेट कर रहा हूँ औ
没错。在面板 5 上：环境
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, vor Beginn den ZERO OPTICS-Schalter zu betätig
他果然这么做了。汤姆说你昨天累了一整天，他想得弹点
ح
Apollo 8, Houston. Si vous parvenez à placer votre filtre polarisant devant la caméra sans gêner quoi que ce soit d'autre, cela pourrait légèrement amél
*** एक दिशा में मेरा संतुलन बिगड़ने ही वाला था और 
مرحباً سيجما سفن، مرحباً سيجما سفن، معكم كال كاب كو
Roger. Nous avons bien com
Роджер. Мы бы подождали достаточно долго, чтобы сориентироваться по отно
Tutto bene, Fra
好的，很好。我们已经挡住了从其他窗口
……那
你好，Cape Cap Com，Au
出了什么问
Okay. Now we are coming up on the view that we really want you to see. That's the vie
Род
心情愉悦
알겠습니다. 짐이 도킹 터널 
声音清晰响亮。我们在VOX上。看来你们没在VOX上
알겠습니다. 이제 다시 맨 아래쪽
حسنًا، 36-
휴스턴, 아폴로 1
이렇게 햇빛이 강해서 별이
알겠습니다. "AUTO SELECT, 16, OFF"를 삭제하세요. "CB LOGIC POWER"를 "LOGIC THRUST POWER - CBS CS LOGIC THRUST, four, to closed"로 변경하세요. "DELTA-V CG"를 삭제하고, 아래쪽에 있는 "SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER, one, AC 1; POWER, 1, to ON"을 삭제하세요. 여기서 숫자 1이 중요합니다.
Ich sehe noch einige der weiße
E,
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 골드스톤이 말하길, TV 화면은 정말 훌륭하다고 합니다. 저희는 그렇지 않지만요. AGC는 잘 작동하는 것 같습니다. 조리개 값(f:22)도 좋고, 흰 반점도 거의 없습니다. 모두들 아주 만족스러워합니다
Nein, habe
حسنًا. لديّ خبرٌ خاصٌّ من هاني. تقول أحدث طبعةٍ من صحيفة "إنترستيلر تايمز" إنّ رحلة القمر تحتلّ مكانةً بارزةً في الصحف والتلفزيون؛ إنّها الخبر الأبرز. تقول عناوين صحيفة "الواشنطن بوست": "القمر، ها هم قادمون". علمنا أنّ بيل أندرس سيجري محادثةً أو اتصالًا خاصًّا اليوم مع رجلٍ مسنٍّ يرتدي بدلةً حمراء ويعيش في القطب الشمالي. أُلقي القبض على مشتبهٍ به في قضية اختطاف ميامي في وقتٍ متأخرٍ من يوم أمس، وأُطلق سراح الجنود الأمريكي
Нет, конечно, не могу, но думаю, это изменило наши взгляды 
मैं इस समय प्रशांत महासागर के ऊपर दक्षिण दिशा 
Ok, davvero bene. Volevamo 
Okay. Il tempo per la procedura di pre-ingresso è appena terminato il percorso a metà: 7 o 5 ore
分かりました。地球は、ちょうど指数よりかなり上を通過しました。もしこれを延長すると、
جيم، سنحدد لك وضعية معينة ب
Roger. I see things coming up now. Jerry, we're going to get the block data around, and we'll do alignment around and then we'll go into cislunar nav
Andrò alle scuole secon
De l'eau potable, n'est-c
喉が少し乾いていて、初日の終わり頃に
Ye
Non pensiamo che sia un problema. Vorremmo che accendessi l'interruttore di lettura della quantità e lo lasciassi acceso per le prossime ore, così possi
الجوزاء 4
D'acc
Выглядит неплох
That's right. Now, I've been asleep for about 2 or 3 hours. Ed's going to sleep for about 5 o
سيجما سفن، هذا مركز اتصالات ووترتاون. أسمع صوتك ضعيف
그리고 밴
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben Sie
Scollegare i tubi di ingresso e di uscita dell'ECS. Ri
मुझे यकीन नहीं है कि मैं वह प्रश्न समझ पाया हूं, 
Okay, yaw plus 27100, pitch plus 35500, roll plus 33000. And do you think it's ch
D'accord, c'est confirmé. Vous effectuerez les mouvements de lacet, et nous vous appellerons à chaque changement d'orientation. Par ailleurs, veuillez désactiver le faible débit binaire, puis la fonction de seco
حسنًا يا جاك. ارجع إلى إجراء شحن البطارية الذي شرحته لك. ولإيقاف الشحن، ما عليك سوى كتابة "فتح" أو "إيقاف" بجوار مفتاح الدائرة الذي أعطيتك إياه. في اللوحة 250، قاطع الدائرة الذي فتحته بالفعل؛ في اللوحة 275، طاقة العاكس 2 الرئيسية B، مفتوحة؛ اللوحة 5، مرحل البطارية BAT A، مفتوحة؛ وحدة الاستشعار AC BUS 2، مفتوحة، إشارة المستشعر AC2، مفتوحة؛ شاحن البطارية، الرئيسي B، مفتوح؛ طاقة التيار المتردد لشاحن البطارية، مفتوحة؛ شحن البطارية 
56-BRAVO Split-Burn, 55 vorn, 106 achtern. 1+31. 2+15. 06 57 55. 6+42. Bereich 57-BRAVO Split-B
ठीक है। एक प्रस्ताव जो मुझे सही लग रहा है, वह यह है कि अगर हम जिम को टेलीस्कोप के ज़रिए अपना मूल्यांकन करने दें, तो आप सब कुछ बिल्कुल वैसे ही करें, बस 180 डिग्री घूमकर अपना सिर ऊपर कर लें, और जिम को टेलीस्कोप के ज़रिए ट्रैकिंग करने दें। फिर भी, जब आप अपना टीवी उठाएंगे, तो आपका यॉ दाईं ओर रहेगा। ऐसा लगता है कि इससे सब कुछ कवर हो जाएगा। हम ऐसा कर सकते हैं, या फिर हम जैसा है वैसा ही चलने दें और ट्रैकिंग मूल्यांकन के कुछ हिस्से को छोड़ दें। एक और विकल्प यह होगा कि जिम दाईं ओर की रेंडेज़वस विंडो से देखे, और आपको वहां भी 
수소 탱크의 과압이 창문을 통해 배출
了解。あと3分でアンテナをマドリードからゴールドストーンに切り替えます。通信に不具合が生じる可能性があ
Хорошо. Первое, что нужно учесть, это то, что план полета показывает, что CDR должен быть готов к посадке. Второе, краткое описание вашего управления. Все ваши системы выглядят исправными. Траектория показывает, что у вас есть CPA с режимом 69,67 миль, а время перис
Roger. State vedendo la Terra, come la vediamo noi, dal nostro finestrino di sinistra, poco più di metà Terra. Stiamo guardando l'Oceano Pacifico orientale e la metà settentrionale della metà superiore dello schermo, dove possiamo vedere il Nord America, l'Alaska, gli Stati Uniti, il Canada, il Messico e l'America Centrale. Il Sud America diventa invisibile appena oltre il terminatore o all'interno dell'ombra. Possiamo vedere gli oceani con una netta sfumatura blu, vedere bande bianche delle principali formazioni nuvolose sulla Terra e possiamo vedere le coste, distinguere gli Stati Uniti occidentali, la valle di San Joaquin, la catena montuosa della Sierra, la penisola della Bassa California e possiamo vedere alcune formazioni nuvolose sul sud-est degli Stati Uniti. C'è una tempesta decisamente lieve a sud-ovest dell'Alaska, sembra a circa 800-1600 chilometri di distanza, e un'altra tempesta molto minore che mostra l'estremità meridionale dello schermo vicino all'equatore o molto lontano da esso, probabilmente a 45 gradi o più di latitudine sud. Riesco a distinguere abbastanza bene le tonalità marroni nelle forme del terreno. Le tonalità verdi non si vedono molto bene. A
さあ、アクエ
冗談じゃない！私も同感です。起こったことは、私たちが以前に経験したことのないことではなく、事前に手順を練っていなかったことでもあります。私たちが行ったことは、今日非常に大きな成果をもたらしたと思います。私たちが受けたすべての訓練と、共に働いてくれた人
Nous avons battu le record spatial des États-Unis. Et nous étions en 2003. Je crois que c'était au-dessus de CSQ, et ils étaient… prêts à relever le défi. Je leur ai demandé: « Vous recevez bien toutes nos données enregistrées? » Ils ont répondu: « Parfaitement. » J'ai dit: « Pourquoi ne pas simplement
Na komm schon, Buzz, nenn sie nicht einfach „große Mütter“, sondern gib ihnen eine
روجر. أفهم يا بيل. لقد وعدتني بأنك ستنتظر 3 أيام قبل 
D'accord. Une première question: comptez-vous nous montrer des images de l
Ne tirez pas dessus. Donnez-moi d'abord le... On y revi
Хорошо. Отлично. Тепе
我检查
好的。收到，弗雷德。非常感谢；38.9 和 1.9。他只是在尽可能地绘制一条平滑的曲线，以验证我们向电池补充的安培
حسنًا. دعنا نتأكد من فهمي الصحيح. عند الساعة 49، قبل الخروج من وضع الصفر في نظام البصريات، راقب العمود، ثم استدعِ الإحداثيات 16 و91، وانظر إلى زوايا العمود والمحور لملاحظة أي اهتزاز محتمل. تحقق مم
Hey Jim, ich hätte da drei Dinge zu klären. Erstens: Der Computer gehört wieder dir. Zweitens: Bis zum Brennvorgang sind keine Manöver mehr nötig, du kannst also einfach in Brennposition bleiben. Und drittens: Wir würden gerne die gerade gestartete Prozedur zur Aktualisierung der Datenverbindung abbrechen. Das bedeutet: TM-Bitrate von HI auf LO, RANGING auf OFF, VOICE auf DOWN VOICE und PRIMARY POWE
Понял. Теперь мы рекомендуем следующее положение: крен 307,0, тангаж 354,0, рыскание 019,5, и сброс LOX уже включен, поэтому мы больше не можем его отклад
Okay, read you with background noise. Understand that you want to inquire of Houston if they want a
了解、ヒューストン。イーグルが
프레드, 높은 비트
Ok, Apollo 8. Tutti i sistemi - dando una rapida occhiata alla stanza - sembrano a posto. Hai un aggiornamento quadruplo sulla quantità, quindi hai queste informazioni. La temperatura della linea di alimentazione dell'ossidante 
Let me get a pencil. B
ヒ
자, 시작해 봅시다. 전자 장치 전원 끄기... 8번 패널. 16개 스위치 모두 끄기. 실내 숫자 조명 끄기
Хорошо. Ваша посадка — погода в районе поса
Okay, Fred. Ich möchte dir kurz ein paar Dinge erklären, die wir in den nächsten Stunden erledigen wollen. Um eine gute Kommunikation zu gewährleisten und dir ein paar Minuten Zeit für die Entfernungsmessung zu geben, bitte ich dich, den Leistungsver
로저. 대기하세요. 비상 전력 6. 이 책 좀 가져오세요. 비상 전
네, 프레드. ASA 패키지 온도는 괜찮아 보입니다
Roger. And we want you t
Oh, questa sì che è
了解。スーツ内の蒸気は69度、キャビンはプラス11度です。キャビン水位警告灯が点灯した瞬間に急激に下がりました。スーツの水量を増やしてみようと思います。もう一度、スーツの水量を増やしてみます。それでもダメなら
حسنًا. أولًا، تشير خطة الطيران إلى أن CDR يجب أن ينام. ثانيًا، ملخص لرحلة الهبوط. جميع أنظمتك تعمل بشكل سليم. يُظهر المسار أن لديك نقطة اقتراب قريبة (CPA) عند مسافة 69.67 ميلًا، ووقت الحضيض هو 11. لديك نقطة عودة حرة جيدة. من المبكر بعض الشيء تقييم المسار بشكل كامل للتحكم في الممر. لن يكون لديك أي تحديث لبيانات الكتلة +11. ب
حسنًا يا فريدو. 
كيف يبدو كل شيء هن
ムチェア・キャップ・コム、ムチェア・キャップ・コム。シグ
已核实。DELTA-P值为
C
你得把
好吧。我不是……你。我可以监控寄存器 3。我大概可以防止它……——进入万向节锁死状
Wir werden auch nicht Nummer 1 versuchen;
로저, 마이크. 지금 고이득 안테나로 5비트 신호를 수신했습니다. 저희는 무지향성 안테나 사이에 있고, 무지향성 안테나의 통신 상태는 상당히 좋지 않습니다. 고이득 안테나로 5비트 신호를
Ok. Possiamo rimandare questo avvistamento NAV. Era programmato qui alle, e possiamo rimandarlo. A giudicare dai tuoi commenti sul dormire, vorremmo farlo il prima possibile, e al momento, i nostri piani sono di posticiparlo di 2 ore. Lo faremo spostandolo di nuovo allo stesso orario, dato che è associato al. Quindi, se è un momento conveniente
了解。こちらは何もかも順調だ。穏やかで気分も最高だ。みんなに挨拶するよ。いつもみんなの支えを感じている。いつも
そし
ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP COM。
Да. Здесь они тоже выглядели пре
Ricevuto. Verificato a t
حسناً. لقد رأيت شيئاً آخر هنا معي، ولكن
Sigma Seven. Non ho capito l'ultima trasmissione, ma immagino tu 
Roger. Je suppose que oui, Buzz. On va leur demander d'examiner la 
好的。我已经播放过了—
Es sieht so aus, als ob es u
روجر. 
Gémeaux 4, Hous
알겠
Fred, sie sagten, sie
Posso arrivare
حسناً. 
Roger. Votre char
11, ici Houston. 5 SPS/G&N: 37201, -060, +047; TIG 086 09 3666. NOUN 81: +33521, +03441, -01458; roulis NA, tangage 032. Le r
아폴로 8호 때도 휴스턴 관제탑에서 비슷한 상황이 있었죠. 버즈는 사령
एड, ये ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है। मैं आपकी बात नहीं समझ पा रहा/रही हूँ - मुझे कुछ समझ नहीं आ रहा कि आप क्या कह रहे हैं। लगता 
Roger, Friendship Seven. Der Chi
Houston, qui Apollo 8. Ho risposto alla tua chiamata in VHF. Ha
If we think it we need the recorder, we'll ask you on that
Хоро
就四行。转到激活步骤 1，执行步骤 3。转到激活步骤 11，跳过步骤 1。执行激活步骤 12，然后转到激活步骤 13 并执行步骤 
Go ahead, A
Роджер, Нил. Один из важных моментов здесь — глубина, с которой был взят образец. Вам удалось опуститься на несколько дюймов или бл
ठीक है। अब पिच नीचे जा रही है; रोल लगभग शून्य है और यॉ भी लगभग शून्य ह
इस समय मुझे थोड़ा पानी पीने की इच्छा हो रही है, लेकिन मैं सिस्टम को ठंडा रखने के लिए
Gemini 4, se 
Okay. Apollo 11 bleibt das wichtigste Thema, und die Welt wartet gespannt auf Ihre Landung heute gegen 11:49 Uhr Houston-Zeit. In Washington haben Steuerreformer im Repräsentantenhaus eine Bestimmung ausgearbeitet, die es vermögenden Privatpersonen unmöglich m
了解
ठीक है। जैक, मैं इस बात पर ज़ोर देना चाहता हूँ कि पावरअप से जुड़ी चीज़ों पर काम शुरू करने का सबसे कम समय ढाई घंटे है। बाकी सब कुछ आप सामान्य तरीके से कर सकते हैं, यानी जितना हो सके उतना आगे बढ़ सकते हैं। लेकिन ढाई घंटे का समय कमांड मॉड्यूल के उपभोग्य सामग्रियों को बचाने के लिए है। और अगर आप ऐसा करते हैं, तो हमारे पास काफी समय होगा; हम आपको पानी पर कुछ पंखे भी दे सकते हैं। इसलिए, इस एक चीज़ पर आपको जल्दी काम शुरू नहीं कर
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Wir haben Sie schon einmal gelesen, machen Sie weiter
로저. 여기는 모두 괜
Понял. 
Okay. Ich zeige es ihnen und möchte wissen, ob sie lesen können, was darauf angezeigt wird, und ob sie au
Roger, commandant du capitaine indien. 
罗杰，救援区域的天气情况是：云量0.
恭喜！连续飞行24
D'accord. Nous envisageons une correction de trajectoire à mi-parcours dans 104 heures, soit environ 20 à 18 heures, pour une correction de seulement 2,1 mètres par seconde. L'autre option serait de maintenir la trajectoire, car il est possible que nous ne puissions pas revenir dans la zone, et de la retarder. C'est le genre de chose à laquelle nous réfléchissons, mais je voulais simplement vous informer que vous êtes actuellement quasiment au milieu du fairway et que notre suivi actuel, sans correction de trajectoire, vous donne un gamma de 7,11, au lieu de 6,51. Vous ête
Franch
ヒューストン、あなたの がさらにサポートを必要とする
Si tratta semplicemente di un potenziamento, così possiamo dare un'occhiata alla telemetria e vedere quanto è freddo il veic
さて、ヒューストン、あなたはまだそれが
了解。久しぶり
Gemini VI, Gem
هذا هو سيجما سفن يبث على ترددات HF. ديك، كيف
음, 방금 전에 그는 당신이 그의 행보 등에 대해
Non è gi
Спокойствие, Хьюстон. Пожалуйста, снова выпустите топливо и кислород. Конец связи. Всё н
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। अगर यह संतोषजनक नहीं है, तो ह
जी हाँ, जिम। होता ये है कि जब आप डिटेंट से बाहर जाते हैं, तो हम एरर नीडल्स को रीसेट कर देते हैं और आपका एटीट्यूड रेफरेंस खत्म हो जाता है। आप एक नया एटीट्यूड रेफरेंस सेट करते हैं, और हो सकता है कि वो बर्न एटीट्यूड न हो, क्योंकि इस समय हम एटीट्यूड को कंट्रोल कर रहे हैं। अब, "एंटर" से शुरू करते हैं, स्क्रैच करते हैं। "404 प्लस ज़ीरो" तक सब कुछ स्क्रैच कर दें, और हम चाहते 
好的。回到
좋습니다. 지구와 두 번째 도킹 창을 잘 볼 수 있도록 우주선을 왼쪽으로 회전시키세요. 기수도 약간 조정해야 할 
أقول، هل تبقى أوقات T1 و T
Roger, Houston. Inserimento come segue: Pacifico centrale, 357 152 359 267, più 0813, meno 16503 06
D'accord, Charlie. Il me semble simplement que le réticule doit être tangent à l'horizon au point où vous marquez, sinon vous n'êtes pa
好的。我这里有一些关于飞行计划的细节，如下所示。当然，由于没有-3，你需要删除所有中途3阶段的内
あれ
Atlantic Ship, This is Friendship Seven. Wish you would pass to Cape. I 
Apollo 11, Houston. I'm not certain you copied my last transmission, as we were just in the process of switching OMNI's. We'd like to advance the time on that water dump until about 5 minutes from now. And we'll give you a precise mark on the time to start the dump, and we are standing by for a readout on you
Sì, quel maledetto "1" in questo computer, sai - l'angolo del perno, è lì; il DELTA-V, è lì; gli angoli, sono lì. Probabilmente è qui per qualcosa, anche se non ricordo cosa, ma lì, lì, lì e lì, ovviamente - ci sono quattro
Roger. Lorsque vous reviendrez à votre liste de vérification de surface et que vous arriverez à la reconfiguration COMM à la page Surface 45, nous vous demandons d'activer la fonction de télémétrie sur votre bande S. Autrement dit, lorsque vous accéderez à la configuration de la bande S, au lieu de CAUTION et WARNING ELECTRONICS, ENABLE TV, veuillez sélectionner RANGE et le laisser ainsi aussi longtemps que possible, jusqu'à ce que vous soyez prêt à commencer votre période de repos; nous es
알겠습니다. 오늘 
Roger, got 43 Bravo, but did not ge
Роджер. Но это тот самый символ, который ты использовал, чтобы дать нам +11? 
यह बिल्कुल सही है। मुझे ठीक से याद नहीं है कि कितने दिन बारिश नहीं हुई, बज़, लेकिन लगभग 30 दिन बिना 
Anche la pressione della camera a bordo era p
分かりまし
Ro
جيد ج
هل فعلت ذلك؟ لقد تحققت منها منذ 
Ok. Innanzitutto, la correzione a metà rotta sarà probabilmente a 104 ore, e tutto ciò che cerchiamo è un DELTA-V da 4 a 6 piedi al secondo. Ok. Questo è il primo punto. Ora, vi darò un riepilogo dei materiali di consumo. Ok. Nel, ne avete 1498, ovvero 1,498 ampere-ora rimanenti. Ciò significa che in 61 ore avreste... In media, 24,5 ampere. Ci aspettiamo che, dopo lo spegnimento, utilizziate 1,4 o 14 ampere all'ora, e questo lascerebb
Вод
ठीक है
罗
稍等一下。是的，减去—
其实，我们原本打算让你多睡一会儿，因为我们觉
Roger. Understand the general impression of being moist as it packed in the core tube. Next question: we did copy your comments prior to the of your general description of the area. We wonder if either of you would have any more lengthy description or more detailed description of the gen
Apollo 8, Houst
イーグル、ヒューストン。タイムラインに表示されている通り、ドッ
好的。没问题。我们开始进行进入睡眠姿态的机动。
BOOST INSERT CONTROL 1 and 2 cir
그리고 3D는 1.95로 측정
启动过程中，我最终将陀螺仪设置为正常模式，此前我已将机动姿态关闭，并将陀螺仪读数设置为大约三个零。此时没有出现高推力切换。然后，
はい、アポロ8号です。コンピュータ
아폴로 8호,
아쿠아리우스, 휴스
大丈夫
わかりました。もう一つの変更は経過時間です。最初の星の変更を1セットから2セットに増や
Wir haben keinen anderen Platz für den Sauerstoff als in der Kabine. Wir haben die Sauerstoffzufuhr mit
Stand by for the - a - sta
C'était à ce moment-là que je balayais légèrement
Das wird noch eine Weile dauern. Wir haben hier eine längere Durststrecke. Wir lassen Sie in Ruhe, damit Sie sich ausru
وصلنا إلى واحد الآن
ASA 64 흑백 필름의 노출값은 13입니다. 노출값을 13으로 설정하고 필터를 사용하여 7번 사진을 촬영합니다. 남미 대륙은 날씨 때문에 사진 촬영이 어렵습니다. 이 시점에서 파노라마 사진을 찍겠습니다. 거의 8시간이 걸립니다. 실제로 그럴 것입니다. MARKT, 7, 8, 9번 사진은 흑백 필름으로 촬영했습니다. 총 10장의 사진을 흑백 필름으로 촬영했습니다. 사진은 250 F5.6(1/250초, f5.6) 설정으로 무한대 초점에서 촬영했습니다. 11번 사진을 왼쪽에서 촬
Okay. Let's leave them on (Two pumps). S
حسنًا. أسمعك جيدًا
Houston, what's an acceptable pitch attitude, that you'l
Oui, c'est ça. On n'a pas encore complètement réglé le circuit de la combinaison pour un débit maximal, et c
J'ai oublié de rend
まあ、おそらくそこでは星を手に入れることはできない
Yes. That jolt must have rocked the sensor on - see now - O2 QUANTITY 2. It - was oscillating down around 20 to 60 percent. Now it's fullscale
Roger. We're reading you five by. We've got the voice good through the 85; the telemetry is in and out through the 85. Stand 
Roger. Le panneau 9 est configuré en VHF, RÉCEPTION
嘿，休斯顿——更正一下——是水瓶座，休斯顿。我们对目前的安排很满意。我们不想让你们再浪费时间做这件事了，还有，如果你们还没听说的话，
Хорошо
मैं वापस अंदर आऊंगा, ताकि ह
... come on, you want t
Okay. We're - We see it just as a bright portion of 
11, qui Houston. Stiamo ricevendo un segnale nero da voi in ques
로저. 화물 입고 및 검증 완료했습니다. 컴퓨터에서 BLOC
मुझे तो यह अ
हाँ, यह सही है। स्थिति: रोल 0 [डिग्री], यॉ 2 [डिग्री] दाएँ, पिच --33 [डिग्री]। सभी दरें शून्य दर्शा रही हैं। मैं वर्तमान समय में चालू हूँ। घड़ी अभी भी वापसी के समय के लिए सेट है, प्रतिगामी समय 04 + 32 + 28 है। मेरे पास बरमूडा से प्रतिगामी समय ठीक है। केबिन का दबाव 5.7 पर स्थिर है। केबिन की हवा 90 [डिग्री] है। सापेक्ष आर्द्रता 30 [प्रतिशत] है। शीतलक की मात्रा 68 [प्रतिशत] है। सूट का वातावरण 65 है। सूट का दबाव 5.8 दर्शा रहा है। सूट पर भाप का तापमान 60 [डिग्री] है। मैं बहुत आरामदायक महसू
لقد لاحظتُ بالتأكيد بعض الضباب على النا
रॉजर। यहाँ सब कुछ सामान्य लग रहा है। सब ठीक दिख रहा है। ऑटो फ्यूल 55 प्रतिशत है। 70,000 फीट, 65,000 फीट से गुजर रहा हूँ। स्थिति बहुत स्थिर है। 60 (हजार) फीट के करीब पहुँच रहा हूँ। रेट कमांड बहुत अच्छा काम कर रहा है। 50 (हजार) फीट के करीब पहुँच रहा हूँ। सब कुछ बढ़िया लग रहा है। 45,000 फीट के करीब पहुँच रहा हूँ। दबाव लगभग 1 जी पर आ गया है। 40, 41 (हजार) फीट पर स्पीड बढ़ाने की तैयारी कर रहा हूँ। स्पीड बढ़ा रहा हूँ, और स्पीड निकल गई है। आप इसे सुन सकते हैं; बादलों के कारण मैं इसे देख नहीं सकता। स्थिति अच्छी बनी हुई है। मैनुअल लीवर लगा हुआ है। ईंधन काफी तेजी से खत्म हो रहा है। अब मैं स्पीड देख सकता हूँ। सब कुछ बढ़िया दिख रहा है। म
Et si vous pouvez maintenant profiter de votre pause 
알겠습니다. 1번째 줄 1번째 행의 AC TAPE RECORDER 항목은 '열림'으로, DECA GIMBAL 항목은 '열림'으로 수정하겠습니다. 나머지 항
자, 이제 제가 이해하지 못한 부분이 하나 있습니다. MDC 5로 가서 A 입력 - AC 인버터, AC 버스 1, 리셋, 그리고 중앙으로 이동한
是的，我得
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフランク・ボーマンが同行します。彼らは太平洋軍司令官ジョン・シドニー・マケイン・ジュニア提督と共に、回収艦のブリッジから着水を見届けます。大統領はホーネット号での滞在後、アジア歴訪と予定されていたルーマニア訪問に出発します。ルナ15号は昨日、月を52周した後、「危機の海」に墜落したとみられています。ソ連の通信社TASS
Gemini 4，休斯顿 CAP COM
了解しました。それについては後回しにしておきます。「アクティベーションページ1、1A、2を繰り返す」という3ステップの簡単
जी हां, रीडिंग थोड़ी कम आ रही है। सूट पर, मैं अभी 6 पर हूं और इसे 6.5 तक बढ़ाने जा रहा हूं। ज्यादा प्रगति नहीं हो रही है। लगभग 5 मिनट पहले मैं 6.25 पर पहुंचा था और अब सूट कंट्रोल को 6.5 पर सेट कर रहा हूं। डोम 82 डिग्री दिखा रहा ह
Eagle, Houston. If you read, you're GO for
네. 저희가 그 부분에 대해 논의했는데, 12시간 전에는 굳이 그럴 필요는 없다고 생각하는 분들이 많습니다. 하지만 임박해서 보면 궤적에 큰 영향을 미치지 않을 것 같고, 원하신다면 진입 체크리스트를 다시 한번 검토하면서 콘솔에 있는 모든 분들과
Laissez l'ATCA (PGNS) fermé; le
يمكننا أيضًا أن نعرض لك الوقت بنظامنا لحساب الوقت المنقضي للمهمة. الوقت المن
所有系统看起来都运
Хорошо. Примерно на 114:10,
아니요, 네, 하지만 저희는 그걸 못 맞췄어요. 지금 쌍둥이자리가 나오네요. 아, 그건 쌍둥이자리가 아니라 남십자
Ciao, Muc
Do
روجر، ١١. كانت قيم تصحيحات منتصف المسار للعلم فقط، لكن منتصف المسار ٤ انخفض بمقدار قدمين في الثانية تقريبًا. وللعلم أيضًا، بالنسبة لضغط غرفة الاحتراق، يبدو أن قراءة جهازك البالغة ٨٧ رطلًا لكل ب
That's about the position we'll be putting the camera in after the initial descent on the ladder, and it'll be
好的，就在我们现在看到的入口检查底部，最下面一行显示“MODE to STANDBY”（模式设置为待机）。就在它上面——我想提醒您添加一条备注：“不要初始化范围”。这是因为您
कंपास पर पीछे लगे एटीट्यूड इंस्ट्रूमेंट्स और जाइरो का बहुत ज़्यादा असर पड़ता है। इसीलिए मैं इसे उनके पास नहीं ला सकता। मैं इसे इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल और अपने चेहरे के बीचोंबीच, ग्लव बॉक्स और पैक के बीच की रेखा के संदर्भ में पकड़े हुए हूँ। CE के समय, यह सीधे आगे के हैच क्लैंप लाइन की ओर इशारा कर रहा है। ऐसा लगता है कि यह हैच के लिए लगा हुआ रिस्ट्रैनिं
Friendsh
Роджер.
没错。现在，关于——关于这个星象检查——更正，太阳检查，弗雷德，在——关于5018，如果你准备好复制，
ठीक है। आ
不完全是。我认为我们是在
Es sieht so aus, als wäre ich gerade über die Marshallinseln geflogen. Sie waren sehr klar zu sehen, man konnte die Atolle und die Umgebung der Inseln gut erkennen. Ich habe versucht, sie zu fotografieren, aber leider war ich etwas zu spät dran. Sie waren sehr deutlic
休斯顿，加油
Хорошо. Можете отдать это 
Die relative Luftfeuchtigkeit in der Kabine beträgt 20 %. Der Kühlmittelstand liegt bei 66 %. Der Anzug hat eine Temperatur von 68 °C, der angezeigte Druck beträgt 5,8 bar, die Dampftemperatur im Anzugkreislauf liegt bei 50 °C und ist angenehm. Der Sauerstoffgehalt liegt zwischen 65 % und 100 %. Die Stromstärke beträgt am Hauptanschluss 24, 25, 25, 25 Ampere; am Standby-Anschluss 25, 25 Ampere; isoliert 29 Ampere; und ist wieder am Hau
जब हमने गति को उस स्तर तक कम कर लिया जहाँ हमें लगा कि हम सुरक्षित रूप से डॉक से अलग हो सकते हैं
Ok, per il GIMBAL DRIVE. Su, giù, zero. Su, giù, zero. Ok,
分かりました。それで、一つ質問があります。メインBバスが良好かどうか、ジャックさんにご意見を伺えたら嬉しいです。もしジャックさんが、それが良好かどうか、あるいはそうでないかどうかについて何かご意見をお持ちでしたら、今後の私たちの取り組みにどのような影響を与えるでしょうか。例えば、メインBバスが実際に良好かどうかをテストして確認し、エントリ用のスイッチの設定方法を確認するなど、検討してみるのも良いかもし
Хорошо. Фред, это было хорошо в контрольном списке. На этом всё. Сейчас мы предоставим вам контрольный список для отключения питания, и мы хотели бы спросить, планируете ли вы использовать карту перезарядки. Если да, то в неё есть не
Вилко, а Джиму можешь сказать, что наш RTCC находи
Roger. Okay, cabin pressure is still holding at 5.5. It's been there ever since we left. 90 [percent] on cabin temp, relative humidity is back up again now to about 36 [percent], coolant quantity is down a little bit too, we may have had a small water leak some place since we have that much increase in humidity, cause it was down around 20 [percent]. Our coolant quantity, though, is down around 62 [percent
Eh bien, nous n'arrivions 
C'est tout sauf l'oxygène à haut 
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Роджер. Понятно. 5C и 5D заряжены до высокого уровня; 6A и 6D заряжены до высо
프렌드십 세븐입니다. 플라이 바이 와이어 제어 시스템으로 문제없이 
Roger Aurora Sev
그
Optische Stromversorgung ausgesc
... दबा
Roger. Si vous pouviez accepter, nous vous enverrions une charge qui mettra à jour une valeur, suivie d'une modification de procédure. Jim, nous vous donnerons plus
Tu comprends, Jim? Ça fait 4/100 en
気持ちを整理中です。すべ
Roger. S
مايك، ما رأيك بهذا ال
نعم، لقد حصلت عليها مرة أخرى مع صمام إعادة ضغط المقصورة يا جا
Si vous voulez, je peux remettre le 
Nous analysons de près les profils de consommation d'eau et, pour l'instant, la tendance est plutôt à laisser l'appareil allumé et à éteindre l'autre. Nous vous donnerons plus d'informations prochainement. Nous vous recommandons de laisser une personne de garde pendant la nuit. Nous vous conseillons d'éviter de déverser de l'urine, si possible, car cela aggr
Très bien. En voici un exemp
Quel Delta-D
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니
روج
Mike, ich glaube, ich kann es ohne W
Je ne sais pas où je va
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 في المؤخرة ستكون 42. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-1 84 في المؤخرة ستكون 56. 2+20. 1+11. 16 08 16. 3+05. 8+53. 33-1 84 في المؤخرة ستكون 68. 2+20. 1+27. 17 42 15. 2+37. 8+49. 29-BRAVO 84. 50 في المؤخرة. 2+20.
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。如果您有空，能否请迈克稍微解释一下对接前后发生的事情？我们收到他
Роджер. Мы хотели бы узнать, пробовали ли вы выполнить процедуру, которую вам предоставили через CSQ, на своем
ロジャー、20,000フィート
우리가 졌어 - 일찍 끝내는 유일한 장점은, 만약 우리가 출력을 줄일 수 있다면, 다시
अभी, उस उपकरण को लगाने के बाद, हमने इसे वापस 0.35 पर सेट कर लिया है। इससे पहले, हम स्केल लेवल प
私たちの看板の下には「私の名前はハルです」と
Bene. Seconda fila, chiudi i primi sei a sinistra attraverso la VALVOLA ISOLANTE e apri tutti 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। प्रतिक्रिया कोण पिच में माइनस 45, यॉ में प्लस 90 और समय के लिए प्रतीत होते हैं
Apollo 8, this is Houston. Roger. I will read back again. The burn was on time, 4 minutes and 6-1/2 seconds, VGX minus 
Roger, 11. Correction de mon message précédent. À 73°20', nous vous transmettons la nouvelle configuration. À 73°30', nous vous demandons de manœuvrer pour obtenir une position neutre (roulis, tangage et lacet nuls) avec l'ancienne configuration. Ensuite, effectuez un changement de direction vers la nouvelle configuration et exéc
D'accord. Nous apprécions votre appréciation. Nous nous amusons beaucoup ici à travailler sur toutes sortes de nouvelles procédures, Fred. La réunion est en cours et nous prévoyons que vos procédures d'entrée seront disponibl
별이 좀 
Хьюстон, Аполлон-
好的。如果我们可以试试高增益模
Okay, Jack. Sono d'accordo. Penso che funzionerà anche così. C'è un passaggio che ho omesso, che ora puo
Eccoci qui! Il rumore è molto buono. Tutto procede bene, l'umore è alto, mi sento benissimo, tu
月の球体 - あなたはその影響下にありま
नहीं, हम ऐसा न करने के बारे में बिल्कुल दृढ़ 
Okay. Wenn sie hier ein paar Stunden warten könnten, und falls sie überhaupt etwas haben, sagt ihnen einfach, dass ich noch le
D'accord. Je secoue la tête frénétiquement dans tous les sens, les yeux fermés, de haut en bas, en tangage, en roulis, en lacet. Rien dans l'estomac; rien nulle part. Il y a maintenant… Je vais essayer d'appuyer sur le bouton zéro, le bouton zéro du temps. Bon, raté. J'étais un peu désorienté, je ne savais pas trop où se trouvaient les choses. Je ne suis pas sû
嗯，不错……我们是不是该换个姿势，我是说
로저. 일기 예보 감사합니다. 저희는 멀리까지 볼 수가 없네요. 들어오시는 분들 말씀으로는 지금은 바깥이 개었다고
Eagle
Negativo, negativo. Sono molto lenti; non si allontanano da me più di 5 o 6 chilometri orari. Vanno più o meno alla mia stessa velocità. Sono solo leggermente al di sotto della mia.
In the CO
좋습니다.
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 스틸헤드입니다
Okay. I thought you called, Jack. We're maneu
로저. 손잡이를 앞뒤로 당기면 돌아가는 기어가 두 개 있습니다. 하나는 래칫 역할을 하는 작은 원통형 기어인데, 피스톤이 들어 있고 그 뒤에 래칫과 맞물리는 돌기가 있습니다. 트렁크를 열기 전에도, 그리고 열고 나서도 이 래칫이 제대로 작동하지 않아 애를 먹었습니다. 게다가 트렁크를 잠글
Ora mi sento abbastanza riposato, anche se non sono riuscito a dormire bene. Ho fatto due pasti. Ho fatto colazione subito dopo aver terminato l'esercitazione E
你觉得你能接受里面有那么
Хорошо. Вот в чем суть. Ваше положение в пространстве выглядит довольно неплохо, за исключением крена, и мы хотели бы, чтобы вы сделали следующее. В режиме MIN impulse мы хотели бы, чтобы вы установили триммер на нулевой тангаж, что примерно соответствует вашему текущему положению; на 0,08 градуса по крену, что примерно на 16 градусов отличается от вашего текущего положения по крену; и на нулевой рыскание, что примерно соответствует вашему текущему положению. Затем мы хотел
MARKIE
Canary님, 제가 보기에는 모든 제어 시스템이 완벽합니다.
アダプターは…入手しまし
收到。我们会把数据发送上去，我现在给你更新一下耗材情况。运行170小时后，你的总耗材消耗量减少了3
没错。断路器 INVER
रॉजर। आप पृथ्वी को देख रहे हैं, जैसा कि हम इसे अपनी बाईं खिड़की से देख रहे हैं, पृथ्वी का लगभग आधा हिस्सा। हम पूर्वी प्रशांत महासागर को देख रहे हैं, और स्क्रीन के ऊपरी आधे हिस्से के उत्तरी भाग में, हम उत्तरी अमेरिका, अलास्का, संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका, कनाडा, मैक्सिको और मध्य अमेरिका को देख सकते हैं। दक्षिण अमेरिका टर्मिनेटर के ठीक बाहर या छाया के अंदर अदृश्य हो जाता है। हम महासागरों को स्पष्ट नीले रंग में देख सकते हैं, पृथ्वी पर फैले प्रमुख बादल संरचनाओं की सफेद पट्टियाँ देख सकते हैं, और तटरेखाओं को देख सकते हैं, पश्चिमी अमेरिका, सैन जोकिन घाटी, सिएरा पर्वत श्रृंखला, बाजा कैलिफोर्निया प्रायद्वीप को पहचान सकते हैं, और हम दक्षिणपूर्वी अमेरिका के ऊपर कुछ बादल संरचनाओं को देख सकते हैं। अलास्का के दक्षिण-पश्चिम में एक स्पष्ट हल्का तूफान है, जो लगभग 500 से 1000 मील की दूरी पर प्रतीत होता है, और एक और बहुत छोटा तूफान स्क्रीन के दक्षिणी छोर पर भूमध्य रेखा के पास या उससे काफी दूर, संभवतः 45 डिग्री या उससे अधिक दक्षिणी अक्षांश पर दिखाई दे रहा है। भू-आकृतियों में भूरे रंग को अच्छी तरह से पहचाना जा सकता है। हरे रंग बहुत अच्छी तरह से दिखा
إليكم خبرًا طريفًا ومثيرًا للاهتمام. يبدو أن هناك عصابة شبابية جديدة في آن أربور، ميشيغان، تُدعى "عصابة جيلنت". تجوب هذه العصابة شوارع آن أربور، وتعمل سرًا، وتتجاوز القانون أحيانًا. يُطلقون على أنفسهم اسم "مقاتلو الخير". من بين أعمالهم: طلاء جسر كان مُغطى بعبارات بذيئة في إحدى الليالي. كما قاموا بإغلاق منزل مُهدم - كان يحظى بشعبية بين أطفال الحي، ولكنه خطير - بألواح خشبية. وملؤوا أحواض الزهور الفارغة في وسط المدينة، بسبب جدل حول الجهة المسؤولة، هل هي الشركات أم الحكومة. وقاموا بتقليم سياج نباتي، كان يُعتقد أنه يُعيق الرؤية، عند تقاطع مزدحم، مما أثار غضب صاحبه. كما قاموا بجمع القمامة على طول جزء من نهر هورون. أعضاء العصابة مراهقون مجهولون لا يسعون إلى الشهرة. هدفهم هو تبسيط الإجراءات، وإنجاز الأمور - الأمور الجيدة في نظرهم. وللمنظمة طابع ديني خفيف. إنها أشبه بجماعة مسكونية، كما قال أستاذ مساعد في جامعة ميشيغان، والذي يُعدّ بمثابة مستشار غير رسمي لأفكار المجموعة. اسمها مستوحى من القديس بطرس، وشبكة الصياد. وهي بعيدة بما يكفي لعدم ربطها بأي كنيسة بعينها. وأضاف أستاذهم، الذي فضّل أيضاً عدم الكشف عن هويته، أن هنا
Columbia, Houston. Il tuo punto di riferimento ottico AUTO - AUTO è attivo. T1, 106 più 30 più 31; T2, 106 più 35 più 41, 2 miglia nautiche a s
रॉजर-डॉजर। अपोलो लैंडमार्क रन 6 08 
Ces attitudes semblent on ne peut plu
Подтверждаю. Хорошо. Панель 5: автоматический выключатель ЦЕНТРАЛЬНОГО ПИТАНИЯ КОНТРОЛЬНЫХ ПРИБОРОВ, ОСНОВНОЙ B, закр
لا. دع
OK. J'
Пока сделаны только цветные снимки, черно-белых нет. Я собираюсь попробоват
इसके अलावा, बरमूडा, गुब्बारा न केवल पिच और यॉ में शंकु के आकार में दोलन करता है, बल्कि 
Okay, Fred. It's just beginning to cut off at the 
Roger. Très bonne restitution, Buzz. Pour votre communication ce soir, nous souhaitons une connexion OM
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
間違
Вы собираетесь немного поспать, или вы со
Und wenn Sie um 9
This is Houston. That plan sounds fine with us, Neil
Il nostro flusso 
रॉजर, बात पक्की है। क्या तुम चाहते हो कि मैं कैनावेरल के ऊपर से गुजरते सम
Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон. Коррекция на среднем участке траектории номер 2. SPS/G&N 63059, плюс 097, минус 020, зажигание 0264
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。您可以随时终
네. 에어리어 3 에코, 에어리어 3 에코는
이글, 휴스턴
فتحتُ واقي الوجه قبل قليل لتناول حبة الزيلوز. أما باقي الطعام الذي أحمله فقد 
ठीक है। 2 4 का वोल्टेज 4.7 वोल्ट है, 2 5 का वोल्टेज 4.8 वोल्ट है, 1 2 का वोल्टेज 4.8 वोल्ट है, 1 4 का वोल्टेज 4.8 है, 1 6 का 4.5 है 
Halfway through 
Ricevuto. Fu
Да. Да, Джек, я отвечу ему на твой вопрос через минуту, но сделай так, чтобы первое впечатление Джека было таким: интенсивность боли уже не та, что была сразу после нашей аварии. И я должен с этим согласиться. Я бы сказал, он сказал, что она уменьшилась вдвое, а я сказал, что, возможно, до трети. И Хьюстон хотел бы узнать, есть ли у тебя какие-либо впечатления относительно того, является ли это всё ещё остаточным явлением после той а
방금 전 통화에서 연결이 끊겼습
और, अपोल
オーケー、ヒュースト
네. 
Понял. Теперь мы рекомендуем следующее положение: крен 307,0, тангаж 354,0, рыскание 019,5, и сброс LOX
加油，
로저. 전위 및 도킹 과정이 어떻게 진행되었
Майк, теб
Наши проверки местоположения в зоне действия показывают, что мы немного отклонились от курса. Си
Yes, I'
좋은
إنه م
いい写真ですね、フレ
알겠습니다. 제가 가지고 있는 것만 알려드리는 게 더 쉬울 것 같네요. 11번 라인의 맨 위 줄에는 AC 버스 타이 브레이커 4개와 AC 버스 전압 브레이커가 있습니다. 두 번째 줄에는 TCA 브레이커 4개가 있고, 비행 디스플레이와 커맨더 아래에 GASTA가 있습니다. 마찬가지로 AC 버스 A 아래에도 GASTA와 커맨더 브레이커가 있습니다. 이게 전부입니다. 세 번째 줄에는 신호 조절기 1, ATCA(PGNS), 엔진 제
D'accord. En descendant, barrez « 114:29:1
Ну что ж, давайте начнём. ОСНОВНОЙ, ОСНОВНОЙ, ВЫСОКИЙ, ГОЛОС, (кашель) PCM, ДИАПАЗОН, ВНИЗ, ГОЛОСОВОЕ РЕЗЕРВНОЕ КОПИРОВАНИЕ, AUX TAPE, ВЫКЛ; ТЕЛЕМЕТРИЯ в ДАННЫЕ; и ВВЕРХ, КОМАНДА ВРЕМЕНИ в НОРМАЛЬНЫЙ; VHF A и B, ВЫКЛ
उस सेक्स्टेंट से नज़ारा वाकई अद्भुत है। अभी एक मिनट पहले, ऑटो मोड में जाने के दौरान, ज़ूम लेंस ने भूमध्य सागर को स्कैन किया। उत्तरी अ
رو
了解。ロール137、ピッ
Un'altra domanda, Houston. Quando dici "spegnere il" o "spegnere il", intendi "scoll
Roger, understand. I've got your Apollo Landmark Run One. Ready t
グリニッジ標準時00。すみません、02 30 0
알겠습니다. 대기하세요
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, हवाई कैप कॉम। क्या आप प्राप्त हो रही बहाव दरों का अन
这是友谊七号，重回正轨。完
Roger. Quel est l'état de vos batteries princ
Amicizia Sette, Amicizia Sett
ジ
로저. 주의 및 경고 기능을 테스
Roger. Non so
確かに私の真下です。カーナボンあたりからずっと真下を追っていました。カーナボンあたりまでは真下、そして地平線まで上がり、そして再び真下まで来ました。まるで私の軌道とは違うように見えました。遠地点と近地点も私の軌道とは違っていました。とにかく、位置がわかるとすぐに、日が暮れてから接近を試みました。先ほど言ったように、その時は私の1、2マイル先、真下にいました。つまり、接近しようとすればするほど、実際には接近できなくなっていったのです。私は逆噴射していました。上部スラスターを使って総速度を落とすように噴射し、そして…同時に噴射していました。実際には接近できず、ブースターは私から遠ざかり続けました。ハワイに着く頃には、ブースターを使った船外活動に間に合うように接近するには、搭載燃料をすべて使い果た
Der Kabinendruck liegt konstant bei etwa 4,8 bis 5,0, also ziemlich genau im unteren Bereich. Auch der Sauerstoffgehalt im linken Seku
Lo lascio in SLEW. Rispondi a noi. Vediamo se mi hanno preso
Appelez-moi
はい。フランク、あと2時間ほどでデ
D'accord, Joe. La dernière fois qu'on a vu le signal positif, c'était quand Fred a vu une évacuation de gaz, environ 5 heures après le début du vol. On pense l'avoir détecté plus tard. On a aperçu une particule ou quelque chose du genre qui tour
D'accord. Une heure, c'est parf
分かりました。一つ提案があります。ジムに望遠鏡を通して評価をさせるというものです。あなたは全く同じことをしますが、180度回転して頭を上げます。そしてジムに望遠鏡を通して追跡をさせます。テレビを拾おうとした時などは、まだヨーが残っています。これで全てカバーできそうです。そうするか、そのままにして追跡評価の一部は見送るという方法もあります。もう一つの方法は、ジムに右側のランデブー窓から外を見てもらい、そこでも
Das stimmt, und auf dem Bild,
E 11, Houston. Tra poco andrai oltre la collina. Ci sembri davvero in gr
ロジャー、フランク。フライトプランの今後数時間についてお伺いしたいのですが。ジムには先に寝かせて、午後11時頃に起きる時間をずらしてもいいと思っています。一方で、通常の睡眠・休息サイクルに戻した方が良いのではないかと考えています。もしあなたが彼を予定通りに起きさせて仕事をさせれば、おそらく予定通り午後11時頃には再び寝られるようになるでし
分かりました。回路ブレーカーを間違えてコピーしたか、それとも読めないのか。パネル276の「CB INSTRUMENTATION P
ठीक है। हम
Vuoi che ti legga le notizi
I'm looking out window 5 at what I think is 
ठीक है। अच्छी जानकारी के अनुसार, वर्तमान समय में निर्वात पेरिगी 23.6 ह
好的，吉姆
이글, 휴스턴. 알겠습니다. 
11，休斯顿。使用 12 英尺长的电缆，我们估计将摄像头放入后，您应该有大约 5 到 6 英尺的余量。结
... su. Abbiamo acceso il sistema della navi
Okay. Jack meldet von oben, dass er durch die Optik Sterne und Sternbilder sehen kann, aber der Sonnenwinkel ist so, dass das Licht vom negative
설정은 -50도입니다. 자이로는 자
Very g
휴스턴, 컬럼비
了解。回復の
罗盘受其后方姿态仪和陀螺仪的影响太大，所以我不能把它拿得太近。我把它放在仪表板和我脸部中间的位置，参照物是手套箱和行李舱中间的一条线。此时，它正指向前舱盖的固定销。看来这是舱盖的限位销连接件。
Roger. Votre coupure était excellente, John. Votre vitesse était inférieure de 8 pieds par seconde à la valeur cible. V sur VR, 1,0002. Pouve
ハリケーンですか、そ
Siamo appena a 3+34 in questo momento. Stiamo entrando nel buio. La luce del sole ha colpito il muso della navicella con la parte inferiore del razzo in avanti, più o meno. In realtà, siamo a 30° dalla traiettoria retti
고르도, 
Apollo 11, Houston. We hate to say it, but we'd like to terminate this and start over again. We have no assurance that we're goin
Roge
In generale, il tempo trascorso all'ombra non sembra avere effetti termici all'interno della tuta. C'è una differenza, ovviamente, tra... le radiazioni e il casco. Quindi penso che ci sia la tendenza
रॉजर। आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से समझ आ रही है। हमारी इं
Хорошо. Это предварительные результаты, но они дадут вам некоторое представление. Скорректированная высота составляет 17 ± 4 километра, и тот факт, что это ± 4 километра, указывает на вашу последовательность в оценке высоты. Эффективная высота составляет 10 ± 12 километров. Замечания заключаются в том, что, как я уже говорил, вы последовательны в выборе горизонт
とにかく、私はほとんどの場合、それらをオ
Wirst du jetzt dei
Apollo 13, Hous
Вы становитесь слишком уж 
罗杰，成功了
Je pense que si j'ai perdu les communications HF, c'est en partie parce que je n'arrête pas de passer du dipôle au bicône. Vous c
मुझे लगता है कि इस चट्टानी मैदान की उत्पत्ति शायद उस बड़े, नुकीले किनारों वाले चट्टानी किनारे वाले गड्ढे से हुई होगी, जिसके ऊपर से हम अंतिम उतरते समय गुज़रे थे। कल मैंने कहा था कि वह लगभग एक फुटबॉल मैदान के आकार का था, और मुझे मानना ​​पड़ेगा 
ठीक है। उन्होंने बताया है कि अंतरिक्ष यान GT-2 और GT-3 पर किए गए जमीनी परीक्षण में यही समस्या सामने आई थी और ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि इसका कारण कंप्यूटर का अत्यधिक ठंडा होना था। ह्यूस्टन आपसे निम्नलिखित कार्रवाई करने का अनुरोध करता 
Gemini 4, Ca
روجر، باز. يبدو أن هناك بعض الا
우주선 바로 앞에는 작은 산자락을 따라 구불구불하게 흐르는 흥미로
روجر، فهمت رسالتك بوضوح. لديّ تحديث لخطة ال
네, 맞습니다. 제가 그 부분을 지적했었죠. 
Right. We thought maybe it was morni
Roger.
11番。今回のミッションにおけるこれまでの2回の燃焼におけるエンジン性能は、エンジン受入試験時と同じでした。搭載PCの測定値は、チャンバー内の実際の圧力とゲージの測定値との間の既知のゲージ較正係数によるものです。シングルバンク運転では90、つまりゲージの測定値が90psiで、実際のチャンバー圧力が95psiになると予想されます。デュアルバンク運転では、チャンバー圧力はゲージで94psi、実際の圧力が99psiになります。搭載ゲージの80psiは、実際の圧力が83psiに相当し
现在我要
Roger. Abbiamo avuto un piccolo incidente qui. Jim Lovel
حسنًا. الخطوة 6، "نقل الطاقة (أضواء الكشافات مطفأة)، تحذير: ضوء تحذير الطاقة مضاء. توجه إلى اللوحة 11، قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية، ربط ناقل الطاقة، مغلق. لوحة قاطع الدا
Bill 要求的 VA 和 VR 读数为 0.
那真是个有趣的
Okay, Jim. We're looking at doing thi
了解。もう一度ターミネーターに向かって操縦
Yes. Ron's get
Roger. Jim, les dernières mises 
了解。0.98ですね。機内ゲージの酸素流量は
Anfangs verhinderte die Operation mit dem Treibstoffablass den geplanten sofortigen Beginn unserer Beobachtungen, da wir ein weiteres Ausweichmanöver durchführen mussten. Der Ablass des Treibstoffs verursachte eine enorme Menge an Pseudosternen in dem Gebiet, was eine optische Kalibrierung praktisch unmöglich machte. Die von uns entwickelte Methode erwies sich als wenig effektiv. Schließlich verwendete ich die Methode, in den Weltraum einzudringen, Sirius, unseren hellsten Stern, anzusteuern, die Achse und den Zapfen zu bergen und das Raumschiff dann zu Sirius zu fliegen, um diese für die optische Kalibrierung zu verwenden, was wir später auch taten. Bezüglich der Lichtstreuung scheint es, dass wir in fast jeder Lage während unserer passiven Temperaturregelung Lichtstreuung im Scannenden Teleskop messen. Sie äußert sich hauptsächlich in Form eines breiten Lichtbandes quer durch die Mitte des Teleskops, etwa 10 Grad in beide Richtungen von Null. Es ist sehr schwierig, Sterne in diesem Bereich zu sehen. Die Neuausrichtungen verliefen erfolgreich. Ich konnte den Stern im Sextanten für die Ausrichtung anvisieren, aber ich konnte den Stern, den wir beispielsweise in Fällen wie Regor oder Menkent im Sucherfernrohr verwendeten, nicht identifizieren. Die erste Sternbeobachtung der Erde zeigte einen sehr undeutlichen Horizont. Es schien jedoch eine recht scharfe Linie zwischen dem vermeintlichen Erdhorizont und der Atmosphäre zu geben. Der Landmarken-Sichtlinienfilter schien die Horizontbestimmung zu erleichtern. Der Horizont zwischen dem Weltraum und der Obergrenze der Atmosphäre ist sehr verschwommen und undeutlich, und er ist nur schwer zu nutzen. Wie bereits erwähnt, erscheint der Raum um den Mond bei naher Sonne manchmal nicht dunkel, sondern hellblau. Dasselbe gilt für die Ausrichtung mit dem Sextanten, wenn si
Роджер, 11. Если вы достанете свой запасной и резервный контрольный список, то
Roger Seven, je vous recommande de vous rapprocher de l'attitude d
إيجل، هيوستن
Roger. PAD. TIG di 125 19 3470; TIG di 126 57 0000;, 0532 più 0000; 
Bien reçu. Une équipe travaille dessus
Не обращайте на это внимания. Мы
मुझे उम्मीद है कि हमारे पास पर्याप्त ईंधन होगा
Okay. I think Jim is holding it now and - it - Ok
음, 좋습니다. 오늘 아침에 M선과 얼마나 평행한지 확인해 보겠습니다. 처음 마킹을 시작하기 전에, 세 각도의 계산이 다소 정확하지 않은 것 같았고, 그 세 각도를 측정한 후 M선을 평행하게 맞추기 위해 큰 자세 변경을 해야 해서 연료 낭비가 심했습니다. 어떤 경우에는 허용된 자세만 필요해 보였는데, 여러분은 그럴 필요가 없다고 하셨죠. 그래서 M선이 평행하지 않은 상태로 마킹을 해야 하는 경우도 있었습니다. 혹시 그 오프셋을 계산하고 데이터를 해석하는 프로세
नील, मेरी गति बेहद खर
なぜワイドデッドバンドがオンになっているのですか？待機してください。
Okay. From Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Britain's big Jodrell Bank radio telescope stopped receiving signals from the Soviet Union's unmanned Moon shot at 5:49 EDT today. A spokesman said that it appeared the Luna 15 space ship "had gone beyond the Moon." Another Quote: "We don't think it has landed," said a spokesman for Sir Bernard Lovell, Director of the Observatory. Washington UPI: Vice President Spiro T. Agnew has called for putting a man on Mars by the year 2000, but Democratic leaders replied that priority must go to needs on Earth. Agnew, ranking government official at the Apollo 11 blastoff Wednesday, apparently was speaking for himself and not necessarily for the Nixon administration when he said, "We should, in my judgment, put a man on Mars by the end of this century." Laredo, Texas, AP: Immigration officials in Nuevo Laredo announced Wednesday that hippies will be refused tourist cards to enter Mexico unless they take a bath and get haircuts. Huberto Cazaras, Chief of Mexican Immigration in Nuevo Laredo, said authorities in Mexico City, Acapulco, and other popular tourist spots have registered complaints about the hippies. By United Press International: Initial reaction to President Nixon's granting of a holiday Monday to Federal employees so they can observe a national day of participation in the Apollo 11 Moon landing mission mostly was one of surprise. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, London AP: Europe is Moon struck by the Apollo 11 mission. Newspapers throughout the continent fill their pages with pictures of the Saturn V rocket blasting off to forge Earth's first link with its natural satellite. And the headline writers taxed their imagination for words to hail the feat. "The greatest adventure in the history of humanity has started," declared the French newspaper Le Figaro, which devoted four pages to reports from Cape Kennedy and diagrams of the mission. The tabloid Paris Jour proclaimed, "The whole word tells them bravo." The Communists daily L'Humanite led with the launch picture and devoted its entire back page to an enthusiastic Moon report describing the countdown and launch, the astronauts' wives and families, and backgrounding lunar activities. Hempstead, New York: Joe Namath officially reported to the New York Jets training camp at Hofstra University Wednesday following a closed door meeting with his teammates over his differences with pro football Commissioner Peter Rozelle. London UPI: The House of Lords was assured Wednesday that a midget American submarine would not "damage or assault" the Loch Ness monster. Lord Nomay said he wanted to be sure anyone operating a submarine in the Loch "would not subject any creatures that might inhabit it to damage or assault." He asked that the submarine's plan to take a t
Да. Вы помните, я сначала начал с той стороны, где
로저. 지금 기온이 약 104도 정도 되는데, 어떻게 
रॉजर। 91 प्लस 30, माइनस 7 प्रतिशत; अल्फा माइनस 8, ब्रावो माइनस 2.5, चार्ली माइनस 10, डेल्टा माइनस 6.5। H2 कुल, माइनस 2 पाउंड; ऑक्सीजन
11, Хьюстон. Мы можем разглядеть маркировку на панели. Мы читаем: СИСТЕМА А, ТОПЛИВО ASCENT, ОКИСЛИТЕЛЬ ASCENT. Квадрат 1, квадрат 4. — Это просто невероятно, какая четкость изображения получается с этой маленькой камеры. Конец 
Oui. Je ne sais pas quel était le problème. Il s'est mis à oscil
それは肯定です
روجر. تبدأ رحلة MSC-2 و-3 ذات الدفع الأمامي الصغير عند الساعة 23 و49
Il n'y a absolument aucune t
加油，水
休斯顿，这里是哥伦比亚。收到您的信号，一切正常。我们三人已全部返回舱内；
Okay. Ich füge es jetzt gleich zur
Okay. In der Golfwelt hat Tommy Jac
では、今すぐにその手順を進めて、それでもまともな水を飲んで
नीचे हाई गेन के बारे में आपको अच्छी तरह से समझ आ
ファンについ
ピ
이글, 휴스턴. S 밴드를 조작하는 동안 고이득이 정지되는 것처럼 보였습니다. S 밴드 
Friendship Seven, Cap Com. Potresti raccontarci le diffi
BAT Charlie、37.0; pyro A、37.0; pyro B、37.0; ヘリウム圧力、3450; そして、ちょっと面白いことに、窒素A、2300; 窒素B、2400; 5 Charlie、4.5; 5 Dog、3.5; 
了解、フレ
Итак, на отметке 2:50 содержание топ
Eagle, Columbia. Ti sento forte e gracchiante. Neil non riesce a rispondere molto b
마지막 단계인 7단계에서 문제가 발생하면 초기 짐벌 각도인 피치 10도, 요 45도, 롤 150도로 돌아가서 다시 초점을
Al momento non possiamo vedere alcuna luce cinerea o alcuna caratteristica superficiale nella luce cinerea, perché è molto luminosa e sta causando la contrazione delle nostre pupille. È una vista fantastic
好的，11. 事实证明，到目前为止，本次任务中两次点火的发动机性能与发动机验收测试时的性能相同。机载电脑的读数是由于您实际燃烧室内的压
알겠습니다. BAT Baker 충전 절차는 다음과 같습니다. 패널 3: BAT CHARG
Roger, Seven. I did not catch your manual fuel reading. You bro
알
저희 패드 정보는 다음과 같습니다: 플라이바이, /G&N; 63385; +0.97, -0.23;; +
Ora inizio a vedere l'alba nel periscopio. La prima luce nel periscopio durante questa particolare orbita è dovuta al lato notturno. È ovvio che il periscopio non ha alcun
ठीक है। ये मेरे पास हैं
2분이 다 되어가고 있고, 연료는 102~101%, 산소는
자, 잭, 지금처럼 기체가 기울어진 상태에서는 별을 볼 수가 없어요. 전혀 보이지 않아요. 회전이나 롤링 같은 방향으로 기체를 움직여서 별을 볼 수 있을지도 모르지만, 지금은 전혀 볼 수가 없어요. 망원경이 무용지물이에요. 사령선 구조물이 너무 많
Je crois que ce truc compte un peu tôt, Jim
没错。就用电池 6，杰克。下一行写的是电池 1 和 3，改成电池 1、2、3 和 4。加上电池 2 和 4。四个电池都对。然后接下来两行写的要等 30 分钟，划掉
جيميني 4، ك
ह्यूस्टन में खिड़कियों के संबंध में: खिड़की संख्या 1 और 5 पर हल्की धुंध छाई हुई है। दृश्य अवलोकन के लिए तो ठीक है, लेकिन फोटोग्राफी के लिए श
Roger. I tuoi sistemi ri
了解。位相調整02 18
Houston. Were you able to g
Roger. Eravamo più curiosi di sapere la quantità relativa di umidità tra, diciamo, la notte scorsa e quella prima, entrambe con la mancanz
أبولو 8، هيوستن. ليس لدينا
ठीक है। अब हम आपको बैटरी A क
Что ж, я хочу попробовать. Думаю, мне не стоит использ
غسالة واحدة قيد 
Roger; verstanden. Ich verstehe, dass Sie die Sterne recht gut sehen können. Waren Sie zu diesem Z
青い帯についてご説明します。地球の表面に比較的濃い青い帯があり、次に明るい青い帯、そしてもう一つ濃い青い帯、そして大気の輝きである大きな白い帯があります。そして濃い黒の帯があり、灰色がかった青から濃い黒へと変化しています。青い帯から真っ暗闇へと移り変わる
Roger. Abbiamo
로저, 우정
Es geschah, als wir uns in der Agena-Raumschiff-Konstellation 0°, 180°, 0° befanden und dort stabilisiert ware
ठीक है, पृष्ठ के शीर्ष से शुरू करते हुए, पहली पाँच पंक्तियों को काट दें, जो हैं "संदूषण और फोटोग्राफी के लिए
Affirmative. And that's all the changes on page 1-
Roger, Sigma S
حسناً يا جيم. أعتقد أن النقطة المهمة هنا هي أنك لم تلاحظ الاهتزاز قبل أن ترى ضوء ا
아폴로 8호, 
Роджер. Я так понимаю, что се
هذا كل ما يتعلق بالأخبار العالمية والمحلية والتقارير الخاصة. في صفحة الرياضة، فاز هانك سترام، مدرب فريق كانساس سيتي تشيفز، بجائزة أفضل مدرب في دوري كرة القدم الأمريكية (AFL) لهذا العام. وهذه هي المرة الثانية التي يحصل فيها على هذه الجائزة خلال ثلاثة مواسم. تم التصويت من قبل لجنة تابعة لوكالة أسوشيتد برس تضم 30 كاتبًا ومعلقًا رياضيًا، ثلاثة من كل مدينة. وكان أقرب منافسيه هو ويب إيوبانك. ومن بين المدربين الآخرين الذين حصلوا على أصوات سيد جيلمان من سان دييغو، ولو سابين من دنفر. أما بالنسبة لمباراة نجوم كليات شراينرز التي أقيمت أمس، فقد تغلب فريق الشمال على فريق الجنوب بنتيجة 3-0. سجل ديك بيرلينسكي، لاعب فريق جامعة ولاية ميشيغان، هدفًا ميدانيًا من مسافة 23 يار
There are no ignore indications on the ground as of now, Friendship Seven
Roger. Y 001, NA, plus 00202 46420 547 46211 12 1383 327 023 en haut 172 à gauche 22, plus 1293, moins 16500, plus 12905, plus 36180, Sirius, 010 294 320, pas de kilomé
또 다른 가능성이 떠오르네요. 이제 그 모든 걸 봉투와 응축수통에 
Ist das nach oben od
Pronto per la c
Okay. The Earth came through the at 62 degrees that time. And the total time for the two revolutions, - I missed the Earth revolution befo
ठी
Okay.
Roger, Frank. Good mornin
Okay. I've been not reading any vol
Indian Cap Com. 
Exactement. Joe, tu te rends compte que lorsque j'ai adopté l'attitude SEP, j'ai dû m'y prendr
53-3 前方55、後方71。1+31。1+30。
D'accord. Pour satisfaire tout le monde, nous pouvons utiliser une estimation du nombre d'heures de sommeil de
罗杰。我们已经开始给A电池充电了，电压一开始比我预想的要高得多，接近40伏。现在看起来电压正在下降一些，电池充电器显示的是这个电
好的，Fred-o。好的。这是“录入，准备”。从倒计时6小时开始。
Vous pouvez, nous avons bien dormi. Tout le monde a dormi au moins 7 heures hier soir, et nous venons de prendre le petit-déjeuner, de boire beaucoup d'eau, 
他の連中が月を眺めている間に、ちゃんとした報告をしておきたいんだ。都合がついたら報告して
रॉजर, 11. हमें समझ आ गया। हमारा सुझाव है कि आप इस विकल्प पर जाएं, पहला विकल्प बेहतर रहेगा, और फिर
10, 9, 8, 7, 6, 5, 4
分かり
好的。我注意到有个
ठीक है। और यह सर्वो इलेक्ट्रॉनिक पावर के दोनों सेटों पर काम कर
わかりました。RRT、7月20日、50000、8月16日です。7月20日はRRTからの蒸気圧力がペグされた時間です。40000は8月30日、24000は9月2日、1
6-1 هو. اقرأ كليهما مرة أخ
Roger. Amicizia
BAT
حسنًا. ستكون السخانات الأربعة مغلقة؛ والشاشات مفتوحة؛ وهوائي النطاق S مغلق؛ وتسلسل الكاميرا مفتوح؛ والشاشة مفتوحة؛ وفولت ناقل التيار المستمر مغلق؛ والعاكس 2 مفتوح؛ ووحدة التحكم الإلكترونية للصعود مغلقة، ولكن وحدة التحكم الإلكترونية للصعود مفتوحة؛ ووحدة التحكم الإلكترونية للهبوط مغلقة؛ ووحدة التحكم الإلكترونية للهبوط مغلقة؛ وربط ناقل التيار العابر للقمر مغلق؛ وناقل الربط العرضي مفتوح؛ وأحمال التوازن مغلقة؛ وروابط تغذية البطاريات مغلقة. لدي سؤال واحد يا جاك. على اللوحة - في السطر الثاني هناك تحت الإضاءة، لماذا نبقي: الأضواء الكاشفة والمسار مغلقين؟ أم سيتم فتح
둘 다 
Okay. Wir haben hier drei Kameras. Zwei davon sind für Aufnahmen durch das Sichtfenster Nr. 5 gedacht, die dritte für Aufnahmen durch das Sichtfenster Nr. 5. Zuerst schalte ich die Kameras ein. Die Kamera
ठीक है। अंत
Aurora Sev
Roger. Understand that near the aft end out to the east that the rays did appear darker. I understand, Buzz, that these were - this was the appearance of the material which had been uncovered by the rays that appeared darker for 2 
はい。次のページは、細かい点を除け
좋아요, 아주 잘 됐네요. 이제 용기 바닥 쪽으로 비닐봉투가 몇 센티미터 정도 튀어나와 있을 거예요. 이 부분이 바닥 스크린에 닿아 빨려 들어가는 것을 방지하기 위해 가위로 잘라내 주세요. 그런 다음, 테이프를 약 30cm 길이로 두 개 더 잘라주세요. 그리고 세로로 찢어서 30cm 길이, 1.2cm
جيميني 8، هيوستن CAP COM. لديّ تحديث مناورة تعديل الطور الخاص بك إذا كنت مستعدًا لل
11, qui Houston. Goldstone riferisce di aver ricevuto un'immagine televisiva da parte vostra, un po' nevosa, ma una bella immagine televisiva. Passo
روجر. فهمت أنك ستجري فحصًا للخانق. 
友谊七号。太阳又要落
फिर नॉर्मल पर जाएं। क्या किसी को पता है कि ऊपर VER
分かりました。分かりました。で
А споры вокруг аренды крытого стадиона всё ещё продолжаются. Кроме того, сегодня утром в Chronicle вышла интересн
Okay. Capisco, Vance. È molto più fa
Okay. Now you can see a few of the spark - sparkling particles going across t
네, AC 버스 B 아래: S-밴드 안테나, 열림; 열림. AC 버스 A 아래: 테이프 레코더, 열림. 시스템 A 아래 2번째 줄: 메인 SOV. 쿼드 TCA부터 시작해서 네 개 모두 닫힘. 크로스 - 커맨더 크로스 포인터, 열림; 열림; 열림. 3번째 줄: 랑데
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。マイク、インピーダンス・ニューモグラフの波形はまだ平坦です。今晩寝る前に、センサーに新しいペーストを塗ってみてはいかがでしょうか。それでもダメなら、医療班は諦めることにしました。以上で
Игл, Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы подтв
ठीक है। एक बहुत ही दिलचस्प बात - जिम की खिड़
Stai scarican
了解。了解。事前チェックリストは完了です。新しいTRとコマンドロードも完了し
稍等片刻
En réalité, ce nombre n'existe pas. J'ai simplement prolongé la ligne au-delà de zéro, ce qui, pour un taux négati
سأضبط التركيز على ما لا نهاية، وفتحة العدس
Полагаю, у нас будет прямая видимость. Пусть Гавайи дадут ва
はい。今はどう読めます
Roger. Ich glaube, wir haben die hohe Verstärkung jetzt eingestellt; die automatische Nachführu
로저
حسنًا. هناك أمر آخر يجب تذكره، وهو أنه عند ب
Fre
Affermativo. Una volta che avremo allineato tutto e ottenuto un time hack, le brave persone qui saranno in grado di fornirci gli atteggiamenti 8-ball per l'assetto di separazione del modulo di servizio, per l'assetto di allineamento del modulo di comando, che vi passeremo - un allineamento di tipo Luna/Sole. Avremo gli atteggiamenti 8-ball per quelli, e saremo in grado di effettuare l'uplink tramite il modulo di comando una volta che avre
...バッグを持っているので
정전되는 줄 알았어. 전압이 
Ok. ALIMENTAZIONE ELETTRONICA, SPENTA; ALIMENTAZIONE BIAS CONDIZIONATORE/DRIVER, SPENTA; ALIMENTAZIO
जी हाँ, अपोलो 8। और जब आपको समय मिले, अगर
रॉजर। स्रोत का दबाव 2450 है। स्रोत का तापमान 85° 
حسنًا. اجعل ذلك الرقم 5 في قائم
अरे यार, इस धरती का नज़ारा बयान करना सचमुच मुश्किल है। मैं अपनी गोल खिड़की से बाहर देख रहा हूँ, जो धरती से भी बड़ी है। मुझे टर्मिनेटर साफ़ दिखाई दे रहा है
Affermativo. Proprio alla mia destra vedo un grande disegno di luci, apparentemente proprio sulla costa. Vedo il 
11番、こちらヒューストン。了解。アップリンクはこれで完了です。コンピューターはあなたのものです。BLOCKにアクセスしていただければ、すぐに窒素に関する情報を
Roger. Tu sais qu
迈克，如果你正在循环播放
जी हाँ। क्या आप अपनी 18-1 बैक-अप उड़ान मात्राओं की प्रतिलिपि बनाने के लिए तैयार
Okay. Der letzte Stern war Navi, und er war nicht besonders gut zu erkennen. Ich verstehe, woher dieser Fehler kommen könnte. Ich denke, für die Ausrichtung der Schwerkraft mit einem Stern ist Rigel recht gut
휴스턴, 아폴로 
حسنًا. لقد أضفتُ إضافةً بسيطةً إلى قا
Ok, Apollo 8. Abbiamo terminato il primo test e ora cambieremo la modalità uplink in UPLINK COMMAND AND RANGING, senza upvoice. Resteremo in questa modalità per 2 minuti e mezzo e invieremo un messaggio di prova. Non avrà alcun effetto né sul computer né sulla configurazione del pannello di controllo. Quello che potresti vedere sarà il rumore in banda S associato al blocco di interruzione. Tuttavia, dovresti comunque avere un buon segnale sul tuo misuratore di potenza. Questa non è una perdita di segnale, ma piuttosto una perdita di modulazione vocale, e ti farò un segno appena prima di farlo in modo che tu 
حسنًا. للإجابة على سؤالك يا جو، فالجواب هو لا. لقد كنت أتحقق من المقصورة باستمرار. من الناحية النوعية، عندما 
좋습니다. 처음부터 다시 설명드리겠습니다. 내용이 겹치는 부분이 있을 수 있지만, 모두 같은 내용을 이해하고 있는지 확인하기 위해 말씀드리겠습니다. 먼저 일련의 시간 순서 절차부터 시작해서 일반적인 진입 체크리스트를 만들겠습니다. 책에는 체크리스트에 대한 몇 가지 변경 사항이 있겠지만, 제가 여러분께 드릴 주요 내용은 시간 순서에 관한 것입니다. 시작 시간은 출발 6시간 30분 전이며, 지휘 모듈의 메인 B에 전원이 공급되는 시점을 기준으로 합니다. 여러분은 이미 패드 번호와 지휘 모듈 패드 종류를 알고 계실 거라고 생각
Ruhe bewahren, hier spricht Ho
Ok, Houston. La sonda di attracco è stata estesa e tutte le indicazioni sono nominali. Ora siamo al PYRO ARM e c
얼마 전까지
मैंने कई बार धूप से छाया में जाते समय देखा है कि
다시 한번, 자세를 조금 바로잡아야겠네요. 우리 지구가 오른쪽 위로 사라지고 있어요. 우리 지구와 여러분의 지구 모두요. 잘못된 방향이에요, 잘못된 방향. 조금만 더. 좋아요. 그 위치에 고정해 놓으면 괜찮아요. 어머
Sì, il - e sfortunatamente, dal modo in cui guardiamo fuori dal fine
Хорошо. Нам нужно от вас кое-что узнать. Я хотел бы измерить напряжение батареи типа С. Также мне нужно проверить давление в коллекторе батареи. Ваш источник 
我要用手动
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Вы можете отстыковаться в удобное для вас время, поправка, сбросить корабль в удобное для вас время. 
I'm gonn
Отличное ш
哦，是啊。轴承都磨损了。（
ह्यूस
シグマ・セブン、こちらザンジバル
الوضع يتحسن. أنت تمسكه عند الساعة الواحدة أو الثانية تقريبًا. الوضع يتحسن. وجّهه قليلًا في نفس الاتجاه. أنت الآن عند الساعة الثالثة. نرى نصف ما تراه تقريبًا. كثير جدًا. يختفي 
वे आपसे रेट्रो दृष्टिकोण बनाए रखने और सामान्य रूप से रेट्रो 
لا. قم بذلك يدويًا 
Früher war es so, dass man bei LOI 2 keine Kontrolle erlangen konnte; dass jede Art von Verbrennung, jede 
Roger, ich versuche, das zu
حسنًا. قبل أن تبدأ بالنسخ، هذه العملية - ببساطة - هي لتفعيل مقياس ضغط الهيليوم فوق الحرج حتى تتمكن من قراءته. والمشكلة هنا هي ألا يصل ضغط الهيليوم فوق الحرج إلى 1800 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة بحلول الساعة 103، وع
Che bella vista quella che abbiamo laggiù oggi. Poco più di mezza Terra. Sembra che si vedano l'Africa e il Mar Rosso; non ne siamo del tut
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们
D'accord. Je raye la page 6 et, à la page 7, nous n'allons pas activer la bande S (ou plutôt, nous
और उन्होंने यह भी बताया है कि ऐसा लगता है कि आपने कैमरे का फोकस अब किसी दूसर
Hallo, Pazifikkommandoschiff. PCS, hier spricht Sigm
罗杰，休斯顿。-11，/: 45597，-040，+157，+36325，-01727，+01428 180 003 000，不适用，+00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254；天蝎座δ星，下103，左48，+0742，-16500 13005 36327；天狼星，参宿七
Tr-10が正常に戻りました。先ほど確認しました。さて、スーツの圧力を確認しました。もう一度インバーターを見てみましょう。250は141度、150は約107度です。これで十分です。スタンバイは…7度。ほぼ常温です。マイナス、少し…です。キャビンの圧力は約5.3psiで、完璧です。スーツドームは72度です。キャビンドームは45度で
모드
Roger. Il primo er
صحيح. كان يبحث عن مدخنة في الطريق 103 هنا، لكنه لم يرَ 
哦，我们当然希望如此。我们用哈苏相机拍了大约……四卷彩色
そして、13番、ヒューストン。ご希望であれば、地球が窓に映る2分前にお知らせすることもできます。もうかなり正確に位置を把握できている
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 저희가 변경 작업을 진행 중입니다. 음성 업링크를 다른 사이트로 변경하는 것을 고려하고 있습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주시면 통화 품질을 개선
Non hai consumato la quantità prevista e dovresti essere 
اثنان
了解。あと1分
Vous pourriez en laisser un peu ici. Oh, vous v
In questo momento, la pressione in cabina è di circa 4,8 psi. La tuta apparentemente è di circa 4 psi e il manometro della tuta seg
Va ben
Gémeaux VII
Хорошо. Джек показывает Фреду
Хорошо. На картинке, которую мне показал Джим, изображена часть Земли, освещенная часть расположена в верхней половине, а пик находится прямо на линии Y-Y. Таким образом, вся темная часть Земли находится в нижней части, за исключением очень тонкого полумесяца темной части, простирающегося до линии — линии над линией Y-
Okay. Das mag eine dumme Frage sein, aber haben Si
첫
D'accord. J'ai compris. Bon. Je vais répéter. Prenez une fiche, formez un arc de cercle par-dessus et rabattez-le sous le c
Gemini 4, ici. Nous sommes à l'endroit. Deux points sur le parachute, et tout va bi
روجر، ١١. كما لاحظت على الأرجح، فقد زادت زاوية المخروط في وضع التشغيل بشكل ملحوظ نتيجةً لتفريغ مياه الصرف الصحي، وتنظيف خلية الوقود، والاقتران الطبيعي، لذا يبدو أننا سنضطر إلى إن
Okay, Fred. Das Manöverziel ist PC + 2, bis jetzt fliegen wir zum MPL. Und, 079, 27, 4013, plus 08144, minus 00443, minus 02226, Apogäum ist N/A, Perigäum ist plus 00205, 08455, 420, 268, 261, plus 08155, minus 00443, minus 02187, ist N/A. Dein GDA sollte so wie beim letzten Brennvorgang in Ordnung sein, aber der Pitch sollte bei 5,85 liegen; in der Rollposition sind es 6,74. Dein Gasvolumen beträgt zwei Düsen für 10 Sekunden. Dein Schub beträgt 10 Prozent für 5 Sekunden, 40 Prozent für 21 Sekunden und den Rest der Zeit Vollgas. Und nur zur Informa
Джим, мы видим там ошибку программы. Думаем, это связано с тем, что сработал автоматический выключатель канала передачи данных — слишком быстрое срабатыв
Джим, единственный известный нам способ получить такой же или даже лучший результат, чем у тебя сейчас, — это включить G&N на полную мощность, а мы этого делать не хотим. Поэтому наш план — просто взять 
알겠습니다. 방금 꺼놨
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend
そのス
روجر. بعد حوالي 148 ساعة، إذ
Aquarius, pourrais-tu ob
这里是友谊七号。我试着描述一下
あれが何なのか分かります。そこに投げ出された残骸かもしれません
Ther
1 分以上の分をダ
Bene. Stiamo dando un'ultima occhiata alle procedure di metà percorso e abbiamo una domanda sulla posizione attuale di uno degli interruttori. L'interruttore è l'interru
Ro
Роджер. 
मुझे ऐसा ही लगता है, केन। यह बैंड एम-लाइन के समानांतर है, और मुझे लगता है कि इसका संबंध ऑप्टिक्स के डिज़ाइन से है, जहाँ बाहर से ऑप्टिक्स का वह शाफ्ट या आयताकार प्रवेश द्वार है। सूर्य के इस विशेष कोण पर, यह ठीक बीच से गुजरता है। मैंने देखा कि पृथ्वी और सूर्य दोनों ही स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप के साथ ऐसा ही करते हैं। सेक्स्टेंट में भी वही प्रकाश बैंड दिखाई देता है, हालाँकि यह सेक्स्टेंट के पूरे दृश्य क्षेत्र को कवर करता है। फिर भी, आवर्धन से तारे काफी अच्छे से दिखाई देते हैं, और उन पर निशान लगाना संभव है। लेकिन स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप से तारों की पहचान करना बहुत मुश्किल है। अब, मैंने पाया कि ऑप्टिक्स सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन उन स्थितियों में करते हैं जिनसे स्कै
Sigma Seven, questa è Hawai
Okay, on that last pass we took about 38 pictures on the Synoptic Terrain Photography, starting a little bit east of San Diego and until we ran into the cloud coverage again. We picked up with intermittent pictures as soon as we started over th
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11. आप ह
Хорошо, Фред. Мы это понимаем, и еще один момент для уточнения по поводу воды. Мы не знаем, каков ваш объем потребления питьевой воды. Это была лишь приб
Okay, Apollo 13; Houston. The Moon has b
ठीक है
That is affirmative, Gemini 4. Also concerning Experiment MSC-1, we would like you to turn your ACQ Aid Beacon OFF for a period of about 5 minutes during th
और, क्या आप इस बार पीठ के बल सोने की योजना बना
Нет, не загорелся. Индикатор неисправности загорелся, когда я переключил питани
Роджер. С
На самом деле, последние 12 часов, а может и больше, а может, и 24, мы не слишком внимательно следили за тем, чтобы лицевая панель была закрыта, 
罗杰，乔治。我的控
네. 주도권을 잡으세
Das i
了解
あ
All batteries 25 or above, on main. Going through orbit checklis
Roger. Du bist etwas unzuverläs
如果我不多说，
好的，杰克。我们先把水留着，现在没必要倾倒污
١٣، هيوستن. بالمناسبة، نود معرفة كيف عمل نظام قفل الهوائي عالي الكسب. قوة إشارتنا أقل قليلاً مم
황제께서 양치질 중이
Roger. Ihr Bewohner der Raumstation Columbia interessiert vielleicht, dass heute in Kolumbien Unabhängigkeitstag ist.
Подождите немного. Мы св
Nun ja, das wissen wir wirklich nicht. Normalerweise befinden sich zwei Personen in der Kabine,
Вам нужен план 
Ciò
أبولو 8، هيوس
わかりました。今、あなたの声を読み上げ
Je constate clairement une inclinaison à droite d'environ 5 degrés et j'ai remarqué que le périscope est noir, ce qui signifie que nous entrons dans la zone d'obscurité. Je vais essayer de repérer les changements à travers le périscope pour faire des observations. Pour l'instant, je ne vois rien
انخفض إلى
Bene. Innanzitutto, in queste istruzioni non abbiamo previsto nulla che preveda la possibilità di scattare foto della Luna. Se riuscite a scattare qualche foto della Luna dopo la fine del servizio, guardando fuori da una finestra diversa o facendo qualche piccola manovra, ovviamente saremo lieti di avervele, ma lo spettacolo, come da programma, è solo fuori dalla finestra, sulla Ter
짐, G&N 사령선을 발진시키는 절차에 대한 전반적인 내용을 설명해 드리겠습니다. 현재 제안된 절차인데, 더 나은 방법이 나올 수도 있지만 지금은 이대로 진행하려고 합니다. 먼저, 중간 단계에서 했던 것처럼 지구를 조준합니다. 그런 다음 ACS에서 400+5를 적용하여 궤도를 000으로 맞춥니다. 그 후, 달을 향해 광학계를 조준할 수 있도록 
D'accord. Après les derniers « 400 plus zéro », « 
D'accord. Panneau 229: MINUTERIE CB, PRIN
Okay, that's - Roger. That's both the numbers on the itself, and the little words like PROGRAM and VERB, NOUN, COMPUTER ACTIVITY,
알겠습니다. 비행 계획에 대한 자세한 내용을 알려드리겠습니다. 물론 -3이 없으므로 중간 코스 3 관련 내용을 모두 삭제해야 합니다. 특히 54시간 30분경에 언급된 부분은 나중에 다시 진행할 예정인데, 자세한 내용은 잠시 후에 알려드리겠습니다. 좋습니다. 이제 배터리 충전 시간을 약 3시간 앞당기겠습니다. 터널 벤트 밸브(DELTA-P) 위치도 3시간 앞당기겠습니다. 그런 다음 비행 계획의 57시간 지점으로 이동하여 숫자를 57시간에서 54시간으로 변경하고 진행하시면 됩니다. 비고란에는 "O2 연료 전지 퍼지 및 폐수 배출"이라고 되어 있습니다. 이전에 수행하지 않았다면 54시간 50분에 수행해 주십시오. 그러면 TV 통과는 55시
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Нам очень жаль это говорить, но мы хотели бы прекратить это и начать заново. У нас нет никакой гарантии, что мы сможем
حسنًا يا فريد، نحن نتفهم ذلك، ولدينا نقطة أخرى للتوضيح بخصوص المياه. لا نعرف تحديدًا كمية استهلاكك للمياه الصالحة للشرب. كان ذلك مجرد تقدير بافترا
एफडीएआई स्केल
ह्यूस्टन, अगर आपके परिवार को और किसी मद
जो, यह बिल्कुल वैसा ही दिख रहा था जैसा मैंने उम्मीद की थी। मैंने उसे REACQ मोड में रखा था और सारे नंबर सेट कर दिए थे। जैसे ही रोटेशन लगभग पूरा हुआ, मैंने उसे हाई गेन पर सेट कर दिया और ऐसा लगा जैसे वह 
ن
D'accord, Fred. Tu n'a
HF에서는
네, 짐, 저희는 주 카트리지에 1시간 정도, 보조 카트리지에 6~7시간 정도 더 걸릴 것으로 예상합니
Roger. W
حسناً يا جيم. هذا هو الذي حذرناك منه منذ فترة
バッテリー5、オフ/
Ich werde nicht hingehen. Ach, übrigens, wie wäre es, wenn du dir mal meine Hochleistungstriebwerke ansiehst? Hast du scho
Sembra che durante la nostra fase di spegnimento (illeggibile) consumiamo ancora poco meno di 11 ampere. Ne abbiamo 10 sul n. 1 e poco meno di 11 sul n. 2. Il cavo di sicurezza, la posizione del cavo o del cordone ombelicale sul portello esterno, rendeva piuttosto difficile qualsiasi attività extraveicolare per quanto riguarda l'aerodinamica del cavo libero davanti alla navicella. Ogni volta che operavo in quell'area, il cavo, quando arrivava al termine, mi faceva tornare indietro e la reazione mi riportava verso l'alto, sopra la navicella e di nuovo verso la sezione dell'adattatore. Ecco perché continuavo a sparire dalla vista durante le mie manovre lassù sopra i finestrini, per poi tornare alla deriva verso la parte posteriore della navicella. Dovevo continuamente tirarmi per uscire nella parte anteriore della navicella. Non ero soddisfatto delle immagini che ottenevo. È stato piuttosto difficile tenere i cordini che avevo addosso... Avevo il cordino della pistola, il cordino e il cordino ombelicale che indossavo, e diversi altri cordini di vario tipo che si agitavano in giro ed era difficile tenerli lontani dalla macchina fotografica. Noterete che forse nelle foto muoverò le braccia rapidamente. Ho continuato a cercare di spostarli per poter scattare una foto. Direi ch
ア
Hawaii Cap Com, Hawaii Cap Com.
最新情報をありがとうございま
En fait, je pense que je vais le dire à Ch
Kühl
Die näc
Der Bandrekorder wird mit der Befehls-Reset-Funktion auf
Roger,
Il cratere successivo che si staglia sul fondo è D
罗杰，11。给你两台PADS，30和31。30 SPS/G&N：36691，减去061，加上066 135 23 4156。NOUN 81：32 - 更正，加上32011，加上06818，减去02650 181 054 014。远地点不适用，近地点加上00230 3286 - 
Und, Houston, hier ist Eagle. Beide
Okay, Jack. Ich
التسجيل الصوتي من مرور المركبة في تاناناريف خلال هذه الفترة غير متوفر حاليًا. أفاد فني الاتصالات في تاناناريف إلى مركز اتصالات هيوستن على الرقم 77 54 27 بأنه تواصل مع جيميني 4 وأن الطاقم قام بضبط مفتاح تش
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوست
जैक, अभी हम इसके लिए पूरी तरह से तैयार नहीं हैं, लेकिन जल्द ही तैय
Non, si, mais on n
Хорошо. Двигайся, перекатись влево. Ладно. Теперь ты свободен. Ты выровнялся на платформе. Поставь левую ногу немного вправо. Хорошо. Отлично. Перекатись влево. Хорошо
चार्ली, कल हम अपने सामान को यथासंभव सामान्य स्थिति में व्यवस्थित करेंगे। कुछ चीज़ें जो सामान्य स्थिति में नहीं होंगी, वे इस प्रकार हैं: विज़र को कमांड मॉड्यूल में वापस लाया गया है, और अभी तक हमने उनके लिए कोई जगह नहीं ढूंढी है। हम आपको बता देंगे कि वे कहाँ जाएंगे। इसके अलावा, एबल 8 कंपार्टमेंट से लगभग 5 पाउं
さて、地球ではそろ
E Apollo 13, un altro elemento: qualcosa
Apollo 8, Houston. È possibile ripristinare lo stesso assetto, 224 e 20
好的。从“配置
로저. 여기서 보기엔 시스템이 정상입니다. 잠시 기다려 주십시오. 조종사를 깨워주세요. 이번 비행에서 에어
Поймите, по 2 минуты на кажды
Real fine. Thank y
Хорошо. На странице 14 значение параметра «загрузка» изменилось на 31021. Я предполагаю, что вы предоставите нам обновленные значения веса, если они нам понадобятся, и посл
Il vaudrait 
स
아니, 카나본에 도착할 때까지 기다리
こちらヒュース
Tranquillité, H
とても良いですね。5時間の休憩時間のうち4時間は
Want to tak
하지만 지금으로서는 비행 계획보다 약 45분 일찍 플랫폼에 전원을 공급할 예정입니다. 총 소요 시간은 95+19분이 될 것입니다. 이는 61일 회전 비행 중 카나본 상공에 해당합
Penso che la c
म
罗
Jim, la façon dont nous allons procéder dans notre calendrier est de commencer par le module de service JETT, puis nous resterons dans cette attitude et, le moment venu, comme nous l'avons indiqué, de mettre la pla
도시의 불빛이 보이고, 저 멀리 지평선에는 깜빡이는 불빛들이... 거꾸로... 똑바로.
Roger. Ora sono configurato a... p
재진입하는 동안
Nein, nein. Sie sind sehr langsam; sie entfernen sich nicht mehr als vielleicht 5 oder 6 Kilometer pro Stunde von mir. Sie fahren ungefähr so ​​schnell wie ich. Sie sind nur minimal langsamer. E
好的。T1：122 加 16 加 05。Tango 2 是 122 加 21 加 11，位于轨道以北 6 英里处。您需要 N
रॉजर, जिम। हम आपको टेलीमेट्री पर दिखा रहे हैं। नई स्थिति में स्थिति ठीक लग रही है। वैसे, नवीनतम ट्र
Хорошо. На странице 14 значение параметра «загрузка» изменилось на 31021. Я п
Roger, Houston. Ein paar Worte zu unserem optischen Trackingsystem. Ich habe AUTO OPTICS für die Kontrollpunkte 1 und 2 auf der Rückseite verwendet, und es hat einwandfrei funktioniert; beide Ziele wurden automatisch verfolgt. Anschließend bin ich zum Kontrollpunkt 3 geflogen, wie in unserem Orbitalkontrollbuch angegeben, um die mir mitgeteilten Längen- und Breitengrade abzulese
Хорошо. Мы на некоторое время снизили усиление на OMNI и перешли на низкую скорость передачи данных, и сейчас готовимся снова установить высокую скорость. Хотите, чтобы мы сообщали вам о каждом изменении скорости лен
好的。粗略估计一下，你现在大概在 120 英里或 130 英里处——
Okay. Mir fällt gerade wieder ein, dass der Eintrag alles ist, was du hast
窓の半分は真っ暗で、もう半分は少しだけ太陽の光が差し込んでいます。太陽が宇宙
See that? (
네. 배터리 충전, 벤트 밸브, 연료 전지
D'accord, Bill, et nos données BIOMED semblent encore un peu instables. Pourriez-vous vérifier le conditionneur de signal bleu sur votre faisceau BIOMED? Il y a un connecteur, normalement au centre, avec un connecteur bleu. Vérifiez-le. Je
ठीक है, ओवेन। मैं अपोलो 11 की मदद करने के लिए आपको और वहां मौजूद पूरे पर्पल/मरून समूह को धन्यवाद देना चाहता हू
Okay. You are GO to commence the yaw maneuver. If we don't have COMM after 
أنت على المسار الص
В ответ на вопрос № 6, по сути, ответ отрицательный. Мы не обнаружили никаких признаков утечки или признаков 
ठीक है। यह आपका आसान DIY (डू-इट-योरसेल्फ) कमांड मॉड्यूल कमांड मॉड्यूल है, जिसमें लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड की स्थिति में एक सुझाया गया तरीका 
حسنًا، في أسفل نافذة فحص الإدخال، حيث نحن الآن، يظهر في السطر الأخير: "من وضع الاستعداد". وفوق ذلك مباشرةً، أود تذكيرك بكتابة ملاحظة: "لا تقم بتهيئة النطاق المطلوب". وذلك لأنك ستدخل إلى نافذة فحص الإدخال، وستقوم بتنفيذ كل هذه الخطوات؛ ثم سنقوم بفصل الطاقة عن الجهاز. ول
どうだ！速くなってるのか
Alright. Thank
Okay, Sie sehen also, wie aus Fenster 1 etwas Dampf austritt, und Sie haben ein etwa 10 cm großes, 4 cm großes Stück loses, silbernes Metall gesehen – sehen Sie den Dampfaustritt noch o
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。我们显示您的蒸发排放口温度
Ok. Ti dico una cosa: farò configurare Jack. Lu
Роджер. Мы закончили с подсчетом количества прочитанны
Х
هذا هو كوكب الص
Je vais terminer deux ou trois choses dans le regis
हमारी स
यह ह्यूस्टन है। मैं आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से स
Это 
Хорошо. Замена заве
Unsere Agena ist in einem guten Zustand. Die TDA ist ausgebaut und 
Roger, Gemini VIII. Heure: 03 47 35. Delta-V: 61,2; Delta-T: 1 + 22; lacet: 0 degré; tangage: 21 degrés vers le bas; Core 25: 00570; Core 26: 00224; Core 27: zéro; p
Bene. Questo è un 9, /: 45597, meno 040, più 157, più 34188, meno 01353, più 00780 180 008 001, November Alfa, più 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, giù 131, sinistra 28, più 0758, meno 16500 12987 36277; stella primaria Sirio, secondaria Rigel, 129 155 010; quattro quadranti, 15 secondi, ullage, orizzonti sulla linea della finestra di 1,2 gradi a T meno 3; usare la procedura ad alta velocità con meno Mike Alfa. Dopo aver esaminato i dati di combustione delle tue precedenti accensioni, sembra che le prestazioni del motore dovrebbero darci un tempo di combustione di 3 secondi, più lungo di quello che hai sul tuo computer. Il numero dovrebbe corrispondere a quello che ottieni dal computer. Quindi no
- - J'ai déjà rayé "CB(16) ABORT STAGE - CLOSE" pou
حسناً. لقد قمت بتوصيل أحد الجانبين بالص
ठीक है, जिम। एक बार फिर मुझे तुम्हारी आवाज़ पीछे सुनाई दे रही है, लेकिन मैं कुछ ही शब्द समझ पा र
On HF. What are th
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। मैं आपसे वॉइस चेक करना चाहत
休斯顿 Odyss
Bien, nous vous proposons d'essayer d'observer les étoiles du côté éclairé par la Terre, hors de v
分かりました。そういう風に計画しました。ジャックに3つやってもらって、
好的。没错，这位是吉姆·洛弗尔。我们今天想带大家简单了解一下阿波罗8号内部的生活。我们已经向大家展示了月球和地球的景象，现在我们想邀请大家走进我们的“家”。正如你们在仪表盘上看到的，这里至少已经是我们生活了4天。我们在仪表盘上标记了每一天。现在已经过去4天了，我们正在进行第5天的工作。当然，我们都非常期待周五的着陆。在飞船的下部设备舱里，总统的体能顾问吉姆·洛弗尔上尉正准备进行我们每天都要进行的锻炼。你们注意到他活动自如。他刚才不小心撞到了导航光学系统。他正在使用一种锻炼设备来保持肌肉状态。现在，我们飞船的另一个非常重要的功能是计算机。我想你们可能对这里的显示屏感兴趣，它能显示我们所有关于燃烧、导航以及地球轨道任务中重返大气层和反推阶段速度的信息。你们可以看到，它是由一个类似打字机键盘的装置控制的，输入输出的数据简直令人惊叹。它为我们出色地完成了任务，吉姆·洛弗尔（Jim Lovell）的操作也非常出色。现在，无论是在太空还是在地面，吃饭都是非常重要的事情。我请比尔·安德斯（Bill Anders）向你们展示我们在飞行中是如何进食的。请原谅我们在这里移动和更换摄像机时画面可能会有些模糊。我们使用的食物都是脱水的，预先包装在真空密封袋中。你们可以看到，比尔只需要松手就能让它保持静止。除了飞船内的气流之外，它会保
Was the pyro separation enough that the - you felt a sensable 
कोलंबिया, अगली बार जब आप वहां से गुजरें, तो सीधे तौर पर कोई कार्रवाई करने के बजाय, हम चाहेंगे कि आप उन निर्देशांकों के आस-पास देखें जो हमने आपको दिए हैं। ये निर्देशांक मानचित्र भौतिकी और प्रक्षेप पथ के आधार पर हमारा सर्वोत्तम विश्लेषण है। इसके अलावा, हमारे पास निर्देशांकों का एक और समूह भी है जिसके आस-पास हम चाहेंगे कि आप खोज करें। यह दूसरा समूह उन सभी भूवैज्ञानिक विशेषताओं की व्याख्या पर आधारित है जो चालक दल न
See you soon my dear frien
And they were your color, John. T
Roger, Frank. The helium tank temperature th
ठीक है। हम स्थिति पर कड़ी नजर रखेंगे और
I'm not sure that we hung arou
Columbia, Houston. Je vous suggère de placer la batterie A sur votre bus relais de batteries. Te
罗杰，11。更正一下我上次说的
로저, 카나본입
Gemini 4, RKV
Ok, serbatoio O2 1, 
Gemini 4, continuez à parler. Ça fonction
That's correct. Now reader panel 8, it tell
حسنًا. هل أنت مستعد للتحويل إلى وضع الكسب ال
Register 1, plus 11202, plus 20741, plus 00211. Over
ここの地面でも元気そうですね。水についてもう一度言
好的。先提供一些信息。我们正在制定一套操作流程，以便您使用指令舱的氢氧化锂罐连接到您的软管——也就是出口软管，这样随着任务的进行，您就可以持续净化大气。这需要改装一个套件，以便您将软管连接到氢氧化锂罐上。所以，我们会在某个时候把
吉姆
Gemini VIII, hier spricht 
Ok. Stiamo per... perdere. Al momento le tempe
Jim, plus tôt dans la soirée, nous pensions qu'il y avait eu un malentendu concernant la quantité d'eau potable que vous pouvez boire, mais nous tenons à vous préciser que vous pouvez boire autant d'eau que vous le souhaitez. Le réservoir contient 17 kg d'eau potable, ce qui est largement suffisant. Les médecins vous conseillent également de boire autant d
Merci beaucoup. Votre CV était excellent. Nous sommes en train de finalise
알겠습니다. 음, 아마 역사격할 
짐, 잠시 후 특정 자세로 전환하는 방법을 알려드리겠습니다. 그 자세로 전환하는 동안 FDAI 값을 높게 유지하는 것이 좋습니다. 해당 자세에 도달하면 데드밴드를 넓히고 최종적으로는 번(burn)에 가까
D'accord. Bien reçu, Fred. Concernant le débit d'oxygène, nous avons clairement vu le régulateur de deman
了解、11. ページ F2-20 の A 列、5 行目の 05 行目の新しいデータは 01042、7 行目の新しいデータは 00256 です。11 行目にスキップすると、00070 です。12 行目は 00042、13 行目は 77730 です。Bravo 列の 3、4、5 行目は空白ですが、3 行目はすべてゼロ、
Questa è la luc
Hier ist Houston. Wir übernehmen Ihre Prozentangaben. Haben Sie einen
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 잔지바르 캡 콤입니다. 안정적인 원격 측정 신호가 포착되었습니다. 현재 상황을 보고해 주십시오. 이
西格玛七号，这
O
Нагревате
Хорошо. 80 — это 
Roger. Bitte w
Ricevuto. I Cowboys sono stati distrutti ieri dai Cleveland Browns. L'equipaggio del Pueblo dovrebbe essere rilasciato. 
Aurora Seven, Muchea Cap Com auf UH
Etwas mehr in Richtung Terminator und in dieselbe Richtung, in 
At this time, I have three axes
No, we roll over right here at 
了解しました。読み上げは正解です。あと2つ短いコメントがあるのですが、皆さん
Nicht in dieser Höhe, und das ist seltsam. Ich dachte,
D'accord, à votre convenanc
Покрытие звездной карты на
ロジャー。 3. /
लॉवेल पहले 
트랜스폰더, 꺼짐. AC 인버터, 2, 꺼짐으로 설정. 좋습니다. 다음으로, 패널 250: C
ठीक है। जैक
ジム、あなたの話の全ては聞き取れませんでしたが、入港時の手順がいつ公開され、あなたに読み上げられるようになるのかを知りたかったのだと思います。もしそうなら、それは120時間くらいの話です。バッテリーAの充電については、他のスタッフがあな
Now we are indicating retroatti
...ただいま読んで
Okay. Als Erstes wollen wir die Batterie laden, damit wir dort Strom haben. Die entsprechenden Prozeduren sind bereits vorbereitet. Was den Wiedereintritt angeht, planen wir unseren letzten Kursanstieg 5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt in die Atmosphäre – falls wir überhaupt einen durchführen müssen. Das Servicemodul möchten wir dann etwa 4,5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt abtrennen und die nächsten 3 bis 3,5 Stunden für Fotos, die Inbetriebnahme des Kommandomoduls (G&N), die Verstauung der Ausrüstung und sonstige Kleinigkeiten nutzen. Das Servicemodul würden wir bis 1 Stunde vor dem Eintritt behalten und dann abtrennen. Diese Prozeduren werden morgen früh in CMS und LMS integriert ausgeführt, und hoffentlich können wir sie später am Tag mit der Missionskontrolle wiederholen. Eine Frage ist, was wir mit dem Servicemodul machen. Man geht davon aus, dass im Kommandomodul ausreichend Sauerstoff vorhanden ist und dass die anderen Komponenten eine Hochdruckquelle und ein Stauproblem darstellen. Daher wird erwogen, sie dort zu belass
了解。マイナス1分で「マスターアーム、オン」を消します。マイナス35秒で最初の2行を消します。マイナス10秒で「マイナス9秒」に変更します。つまり、「マイナス9秒」の時点では「手動アレージ」になります。2秒で「モード、フリー」を消して、「ACA デテント解除」を消します。「イグニッション」の後
Com Te
わかりました。CBS - CB センサー ユニット、AC 1 お
MAIN Aの負荷を軽減するために、ジャックにコマンドモジュールで2つの作業をしてもらいたいです。1つはCM/RCS HEATERスイッチを確認するか、オフにすることです。これは既に完了しています。回路ブレーカーは引き下げられていますが、スイッチには多少の電流が流れている可能性があります。2つ目は、LOGIC POWER 2/3をオ
Ok, Gemini VII
هل تقصد، أسفل الرقم 4، ا
Bien reçu. Le suivant concerne le bus de l'aviation, les prises MAIN A et MAIN B, et il s'agit de deux disjo
Ich wünschte nur, du würdest dich beeilen u
はい、結構です。「最終積載」の1-5ページ
حسناً. أعده إلى الداخل. ستتمكن من 
그러면 아주 작은 
لا، لم أفعل ذلك - لم أنم منذ 
닐과 버즈, 저는 지금 백악관 집무실에서 전화 통화를 하고 있는데, 이 통화는 분명 역사상 가장 역사적인 통화일 것입니다. 여러분이 모든 미국인을 위해 해낸 일에 대해 우리 모두가 얼마나 자랑스러워하는지 말로 다 표현할 수 없습니다. 오늘은 우리 인생에서 가장 자랑스러운 날입니다. 그리고 전 
Боже, как же сложно описать, как выглядит Земля. Я смотрю в своё круглое окно, и сейчас оно больше, чем Земля. Я отчётливо вижу терминатор. Я вижу большую часть Южной Америки, вплоть до Центральной Америки, Юкатана и полуострова Флорида. У восточного побережья наблюдается сильное вихрев
ह्यूस्टन, एक्वे
わかりました、ジャック。49時間後の状況ですが、光学シャフトの角度に約0.2度程度のわずかなジッターが観測されています。OPTICS ZERO位置から出る前に、この作業の開始時にシャフトの読み取り値を観察し、直接読み取り値にジッターが発生していないか確認してほしいとのことです。
Apollo 
Hello, 11. Houston. The Goldstone TV said that when you get a sharp vertical line on the picture, when the horizontal banding goes across, it does appear to bend it slightly. The same as Apollo 10, they said. Looks okay to t
Perché non possiamo usare l'antenna ad alto guadagno per un po'? Ottenere un bit rate elevato sulle OMNI. Ok, diciamo loro che non ci preoccuper
C'est exact. Je vois Nunki en posi
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。如果可以的
E giusto per ricordarlo, non dimenticate il nostro problem
她现在开
حسنًا. عندما قمنا بتوصيل مفتاح الطاقة من IGS إلى ACME - مع العلم أن هذا ليس مخصصًا لتشغيل الكمبيوتر - انطفأ ضو
Okay. 48-1 
रॉजर। हम अभी भी आपकी टेप्स को प्रोसेस कर रहे हैं। हाई बिट पर आवाज़ की क्वालिटी शानदार आ रही है, और आप अगले संशोधन के लिए तैयार हैं। और हम
Die Sonne ist dort in der Nähe. Die
من الواضح أنه ليس في 
ठीक है, मैंने उसे पकड़
Хорошо, оба клапана регулирования потребности в кислороде выключены, а обратный клапан
Frank, I may have to add some names to my c
Roger, Apollo 11. Wir haben einen Laser, den wir – einen blaugrünen Laser – im Sekundentakt ein- und ausschalten werden. Er kommt vom McDonald-Observatorium bei El Paso, das sich – genau an oder 
रॉजर। दिलचस्प लॉन्च जैसा कु
«Дружба Семь», это Zanzibar Cap Com. У нас надежная телеметрическая связь, сообщите о своем состоянии. Конец с
Роджер... 43-2 101. 2+06. 09 40
لا، كنت أتساءل فقط - لم نسمع ما إذا كنا سنفعل ذلك
ジムの側を見ると日光が見えるのに、自分
Продолжение отчета. Индикаторы на панели управления не горят. Только ненормальное положение. Посадочный мешок выключен. EPI показывает, что все в порядке. Топл
Hier spricht Houston. Ich empfange eine
Ici Frank Borman. Nous avons beaucoup apprécié les émissions télévisées et nous vous invitons à rester à l'écoute pour suivre les prochains vols, les rendez-vous spatial et l'orbite terrestre, puis, bien sûr, les retransmissions en direct de la surface lunaire dans un avenir proche. En att
Хорошо. Думаю, я смогу контролировать угл
Roger, Fred-o. Gut gelesen. Nun, auf der Erde schätzen wir – falls Sie diese Ausrichtung vornehmen müssen –, dass die Erde etwa 2 Grad geneigt sein wird. 
Roger. A Washington, la Commissione Finanze del Senato ha approvato l'estensione della sovrattassa sull'imposta sul reddito, ma un voto del Senato sul disegno di legge sembrava al momento remoto. Ad Austin, il deputato statale Ray Lemmon di Houston è stato nominato Direttore Nazionale dell'American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon ha proposto uno studio sulla possibilità di istituire un istituto di oceanografia in Texas. Sarebbe il primo istituto del genere nella parte occidentale del Golfo del Messico. A Minneapolis, Minnesota, l'ufficio meteorologico, dopo aver riepilogato le previsioni meteo odierne con una massim
Roger, technicien des communications indiennes. Aurora Seven vous lit faiblement mais
روجر، نود أن نعرف متى بدأت عملية محاذاة المنصة
카노 캡콤
Ich bin mir ziemli
O
Okay, Vance. Dies ist das Befehlsmodul für: Kabinenlüfterfilter und -beutel in den; Dekontaminationsbeutel, außer denen, die wir für die TV-Kamera ve
휴스턴 이글입니다. 모든 게 순조롭게
T
Va b
还有11号
Très bien. Pourriez-vous nous communiq
نعم،
...그리고 주 추진제와 보조 추진제 
Sì, alla separazione della navicella spaziale. Mi sembra che siamo partiti con delle velocità, la cui di
Vous avez une
没问题，看起来一切都很干净。看来给我扫描仪没什么意
Roger. I'd like to have a cabin temperature and a cabin dome temp
D'accord. Depuis Jodrell Bank, en Angleterre, via AP: le grand radiotélescope britannique de Jodrell Bank a cessé de recevoir les signaux de la sonde lunaire soviétique Luna 15 à 5h49 EDT aujourd'hui. Un porte-parole a déclaré qu'il semblait que le vaisseau spatial Luna 15 « ait dépassé la Lune ». Autre citation: « Nous ne pensons pas qu'il ait atterri », a déclaré un porte-parole de Sir Bernard Lovell, directeur de l'observatoire. Washington UPI: le vice-président Spiro T. Agnew a appelé à envoyer un homme sur Mars d'ici l'an 2000, mais les dirigeants démocrates ont répondu que la priorité devait être donnée aux besoins terrestres. Agnew, haut responsable gouvernemental lors du décollage d'Apollo 11 mercredi, parlait apparemment en son nom propre et pas nécessairement au nom de l'administration Nixon lorsqu'il a déclaré: « À mon avis, nous devrions envoyer un homme sur Mars d'ici la fin de ce siècle. » Laredo, Texas, AP: les services d'immigration de Nuevo Laredo ont annoncé mercredi que les hippies se verraient refuser des cartes de tourisme pour entrer au Mexique à moins de prendre un bain et de se faire couper les cheveux. Huberto Cazaras, chef de l'immigration mexicaine à Nuevo Laredo, a déclaré que les autorités de Mexico, d'Acapulco et d'autres lieux touristiques populaires avaient reçu des plaintes concernant les hippies. Selon United Press International: La réaction initiale à la décision du président Nixon d'accorder un jour férié lundi aux fonctionnaires fédéraux pour célébrer la journée nationale de participation à la mission Apollo 11, qui a permis l'alunissage, fut surtout la surprise. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, Londres: L'Europe est fascinée par la mission Apollo 11. Les journaux du continent publient des photos de la fusée Saturn V décollant pour établir le premier lien entre la Terre et son satellite naturel. Les rédacteurs de titres rivalisent d'imagination pour trouver les mots justes pour saluer cet exploit. « La plus grande aventure de l'histoire de l'humanité a commencé », titrait le Figaro, qui consacrait quatre pages aux reportages de Cap Kennedy et aux schémas de la mission. Le tabloïd Paris Jour proclamait: « Le monde entier leur dit bravo! » Le quotidien communiste L'Humanité a fait sa une avec la photo du lancement et a consacré toute sa dernière page à un reportage enthousiaste sur la Lune, décrivant le compte à rebours et le lancement, les épouses et les familles des astronautes
Хорош
밴스, 조가 영하 2도에서 영상 30도 사
حسنًا يا مايك، أنا الآن عند النقطة شبه النجمية
D'ac
Esatto, ce l'ho sulla mia scheda, anche Watertow
No, I'll have t
没错。稍等一下；我们现在看到的
네, 맞습니다. 저보다 앞서 나가셨네요. 좋습니다. 1-3페이지 29번째 줄에 55를 입력하세요. 그건 저희가 조준경 점
Everything looks pretty good down in the, too. The shroud still loo
こちらアポロ8号です。Sバンド
Гавайи. Ваши показатели на
Ricevuto. Le batterie dell'adattatore segnano tutte 2 ampere e 24 volt. Gli anelli RCS reggono be
Ok. Alcune persone sedute a guardare il mondo della TV hanno qualche idea su cosa vorrebbero vedere sperimentato con i filtri. E vorrei leggervi quello che hanno qui e lasciarvi riflettere; e nelle pros
حسنًا. سننتظر إذًا. لدينا حل جيد. سننتظر حتى تُدخ
Роджер. GET B 13 25 52; ​​Дельта-V, 9 футов в секунду; время работы двигат
ठीक है। हम अभी भी मध्य प्रशांत की ओर जा रहे हैं, 357 152 359 267, प्लस 0813, माइनस 16503 0
Houston, Apollo 11. Wir manövrieren in die gewünschte Fluglage. Die aktuelle Lage ist: Rollen 8,37°, Nicken 61,33° 
That's correct. And we want to delete this "Set up camera" that's listed on the bottom of the page. We're
하와이 상공에서 최종 고도 조정 상황을 알려드리겠습니다. 또한, X축이 허용 오차 범위를 약간 벗어난 것 같으니, 고도 조정이 완료될 때까지 "START COMP" 버튼을 누르지 마시기 바랍니다. 미국 상공에서 
ठीक है। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। 30 मिनट की रिपोर्ट: मुख्य समस्या अभी भी ठीक से काम नहीं कर रही है। मैं इस समय फ्लाई-बाय-वायर मोड पर हूँ
D'accord. Votre ordinateur est connecté et vérifié. Vous pouvez passer en mode BLOCAGE. Nous serons opérationnels dans environ 45 secondes. Je commence tout de mêm
Ricevuto. Capisco che n
自
Okay. Das klingt gut, Jim. FAO hier würd
Хорош
收到。从我这边看，你们的系统运行
Ich habe zwar noch keinen Schnupfen, aber ich fühle mich so nah dran wie nie zuvor. Ich glaube, es liegt an diesem verdammten 100-prozentigen Sauerstoff. Ich atme ihn ein und meine Nase war noch nie so trocken. Bei der schlimmsten Erkältung meines Lebens, wo ich kaum durch die Nase atmen kann und mich anhöre, als hätte ich eine richtig heftige Erkältung. Ich klinge für mich selbst sehr... aber jetzt kann ich – ich war es auch im Schlaf. Aber es hat mir tatsächlich in der Nase gebrannt, als ich geschlaf
Примерно в таком положении мы установим камеру после
Я не прикасался к пульту упр
앞으로 이틀 안에 밀린 일들을 꽤 많이 따라잡을 수 있을 것 같아요
ठीक है। कार्य के दौरान और कक्षा में स्विच की डिफ़ॉल्ट स्थिति टेली
Ecco cosa avrei voluto 
Хорошо. Имейте в виду, что калибровка оптики очень сложна из-за множества других маленьких звёздочек, плавающих здесь. Я со
Ricevuto. Capito. Lo stato del test di Woomera è buono. Li accenderanno, ma ci sono nubi sparse e pioggia
Yes, things occasionally come scooting o
ह्य
بصوت 
Oui. C'est exact. En
지금 확실히 오른쪽으로 약 5도 정도 기울어진 것이 보이고, 잠망경이 어두워진 것을 보니 야간 관측을 위해 암흑면으로 진입하고 있는 것 같습니다. 잠망경을 통해 변화를 관찰해 보겠습니다. 현재로서는 이 자세에서는 야간 관측을 위한 잠망경으로는 아무것도 볼 수 없습니다. 레버 위치 외에는 저배율이 언제인지도 잘 모르겠습니다. 창문이 흐려져 있습니다. 지금은 햇빛이 비치고 있는데, 탈출탑
了解。こち
Roger. Have you ta
Ja, natürlich. Wir sind bereit, zu kopieren und zu kommentieren. Ist e
Хорошо. Перейдите к панели 380, клапан регулирования потребнос
Les noms d'appel des porte-avions dans la zone sont Sinclair et ceux des
そこに赤いフ
주변을 둘러보니, 전반적인 명암 대비는 햇빛에 드리워진 그림자 때문에 완전히 나타납니다. 아주 밝은 회색, 옅은 회색, 제 그림자와 헬멧 그림자 주변에 후광처럼 드리워진 색입니다. 그러다가 저 멀리 시야를 넓히면 주변 색이
Okay, Fred. Stand by. We've been talking about possibly having you do it in ACS. We rec
Хорошо. Сегодня мы хотели бы, чтобы вы определили смещение цапфы до наблюдений, как указано в процедурах, а также после них. Наша цель — проверить возможность того, что какой-либо тепловой эффект может вызывать ошибки в угловых показаниях секстанта. Полученное ранее смещение следует учесть, то есть ПЕРЕЙТИ к пункту 87 после получения двух последовательных измерений, равных с точностью до 0,003 градуса. И, конечно же, сместите цапфу н
아
Роджер, Хьюстон. 
١
बहुत बढ़िया। यह पॉल हैनी के अंदाज़ में छपा इंटरस्टेलर टाइम्स का 23 दिसंबर का अंक है। हम आपको बताना चाहते हैं कि क्रिसमस आने में खरीदारी के लिए सिर्फ़ दो दिन बचे हैं। उनका कहना है कि कल आपका टीवी प्रसारण ब
Okay, 13. We'd like to have yo
알겠습니다, 빌. 현재 조종 자세에 대해 말씀드리자면, 피치 각도를 0도로 유지해 달라고 요청드렸는데, 지금은 약 27도에서
알겠습니다. 제 설정 정보를 알려드리겠습니다. 자동 역추진 모드이고, 자이로스코프는 정상입니다. 기동 스위치는 꺼져 있고, 모든 소모품은 양호한 상태입니다. 전기 장치도 아주 잘 작동하고 있고, 캡슐도 추적이 잘 되고 있습니다. 현재 달은 완벽한 기준점이 되고 있으며, 예상 경로에 정확히 맞춰져 있습니다. 금성도 마찬가지인데, 
D'accord. En fait, je pense que nous devrions vous donner une procédu
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी। क्या आप सभी को मिशन टाइमर की समस्या के लिए कोई और समाधान सूझा है जि
लगता है आप सही रास्ते पर हैं। ठीक है। मुझे लगता है हमने 2-2 की पहली दो लाइनें काट
Okay. We're still tracking you. We don't have any firm solutions, yet
제 생각엔 모두 처음에는 수천 개씩 있었던 것 같아요. 각각 다르게 만들어서 어떤 게 어떤 건지 
いやあ、あの窓はひどいな。ウォリー、君の窓をよく見たよ。すごくコ
Das zeigt eine Abweichung von 30° auf der
네. 제가 확인해 본 226개의 회로 차단기 중에서, 관련된 회로 차단기는 총 6개입니다. 패널 맨 아래 줄 왼쪽에서 두 번째부터 여섯 번째까지의 회
Ok, Jim. Noi... Abbiamo parlato del fatto che tu debba adottare un assetto diverso da quello del pad per una migliore visione del campo stellare dal modulo di comando, e quello che vorremmo che facessi è questo. Se riesci a prevedere ora o a breve quale assetto vorresti mantenere in quel momento, e a raggiungerlo ora, vorremmo essere in grado di calcol
Хорошо, 13. Ты снова говоришь четко 
Apollo 11, Houston. Would you key ERROR RESET
上面写着：进行日常维护工作，收好头盔和收纳袋；取出后视镜、检查清单和处置组件。收好临时收纳组件，取出并配置好16毫米镜头、HC-EX镜头、f/4光圈、500mm焦距、无限远对焦、每秒6帧的拍摄参数。页面上就写了这些。我们现在就在这里。接下来，一个小时后我们将切换到LM电源并启动通信系
Sì, è vero. Ti abbia
Houston, Apollo 11. J'ai maintenu ici le taux de bande morte minimum bas avec le cycle limite activé, par simple curiosité, si vous vouliez des chiffres de consommation de car
Мы только что установили компрессор 2 на конд
Our telemetry shows pitch attitude of 25 negative and
حسناً. لإرضاء الجميع، يمكننا استخدام تقدير لعدد ساعات النوم الت
告诉在科德角的格伦
Free
سيفعل بعض الناس أي شيء لتحقيق رقم قي
Bene. L'Apollo 11 rimane la notizia principale, con il mondo che attende il tuo atterraggio oggi, intorno alle 11:49 ora di Houston. A Washington, i riformatori fiscali della Camera hanno elaborato una disposizione che re
Il n'est pas
Cape Cap Com. We recommend that he remain in the capsule unless 
No, we can leave those two here. No, I don't want e
지금 창밖으로 별을 보고 있어요. 완전히 어둡지는
Okay, Houston. Né Neil né Mike riescono a vederlo. A proposito, quegli alberi e quei pe
はい。今の睡眠時間で十分休めた
Vedremo cosa possiamo fare, Jack. Ci metteremo in contatto con Recovery e vedremo se riusciremo a mandare l'agente nel Pacifico quando tornerai. Perbacco, vediamo. Nel basket professionistico, i Nicks hanno battuto i Milwaukee Bucks
Friendship Seven, this is Indi
रॉजर, ये फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। खिड़की से बाहर ज़मीन पर
네,
जी हाँ। जी हाँ, महोदय। गहरी 
こちらフレンドシップ7号。状態は良好です。現
로저, 11시. 가까운 시일 내에 편하신 시간에 폐수 배출을 진행하고자 합니다. 특정 시간은 정해져 있지 않습니다. 중간 항로 수정 
Роджер. На данный момент мы рекомендуем с вашего согласия начать встречу примерно в восемь часов вечера по хьюстонскому времени. Это 
正解です。G&CチェックリストのG/7-1ページの手順3と4に従って、ドリフトフラグを
Ok. Ricevuto, Fred. Per quanto riguarda il flusso di O2, abbiam
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. إذًا، بشكل عام، ما علينا فعله هو تشغيل الجهاز وتفعيل مؤشر الاتجاه، ثم ضبط وضعية المركبة، ووضع المؤشر في النافذة الأمامية، وسيكون نظام التوجيه مُفعّلًا بالطبع. ولكن يجب توجيه المركبة يدويًا بحيث يكون مركز الأرض مُباشرةً على المحور Z. ثم تدويرها حول المحور Z لوضع رأس الهلال على المحور Y. وهذا سيجعل المحور X الموجب في اتجاه الشمس كما ناقشنا سابقًا. لذا سيكون الهلال للأع
Verseau, Houston; allez-y
روجر. ما زلت أعمل وفقًا لتوقيت ما
मुझे रेगिस्तान में नीचे एक काली आग दिखाई दे रही है। आग के स्रोत तक साफ़-साफ़ देखा जा सकता है। मैं ठीक से देख तो नहीं पाया कि वह क्या थी, लेकिन उसने ज़मीन पर एक 
È CO2
11, ici Houston. Goldstone signale qu'ils peuvent lire les chiffres su
لا يا سيدي؛ كل 
Привет, Близнецы 4. Нам нужно, чтобы ваш переключатель считывания количества 
روجر. جيم، هذه أخبار جيدة. ما رأيك في وضع 
좋아요, 그리고 다음 페이지 29쪽 오른쪽 상단 부근에 있는 "Photo target 13, north at 5.6, 250" 등의 내용을 전부 지우세요. 그리고 그 아래에 
Je viens de terminer la 29e prise de vue avec mo
프랭크, 또
Who is substituting for you now, 
Vas-y, réinitialise,
继续，Cap C
قلها
Ok. Solo per verificare. Inizia dal pannello 3, 
Bene. Siamo arrivati ​​al punto in cui, secondo il piano di volo che avevamo predisposto per voi, avreste finito di mangiare e voi e Jack sareste stati di turno mentr
Ok, Jack. Vediamo se ci sono riuscito. Quello che facciamo è puntare la sonda verso la Terra come abbiamo fatto per la rotta intermedia, e tracciamo un'allineamento dell'asse del corpo sulla... Poi ci dai un assetto della palla per volare verso... la..., e poi noi... puntiamo... la Luna.
嘿，我
, moins 29837, plus 02390, plus 00994 000 200 005 01693, plus 00600 29949 402 29782 010 689 260, Persei Zeta, descente 048, gauche 05. Le reste n'est pas applicable. Sirius, Rigel, 129 155 010.
Guaymas, this is Gemini 4. We're going to have to get a reso
Вам придётся 
七、坎顿通信技术公司，你们如
And, Houston, Tranquility Base is going to give you a few comments with regard to the geology question of last night. We are landed in a relatively smooth crater field of elongate secondary - circular secondary craters, most of which have rims irrespective of their - raised rims irrespective of their size. That's not universally true. There are - There are a few of the smaller craters around which do not have a discernible rim. The ground mass throughout the area is a very fine sand to a silt. I'd say the thing that would be most like it on Earth is powdered graphite. Immersed in this ground mass are a wide variety of rock shapes, sizes, textures, rounded and angular, many with varying consistencies. As I said, I've seen plain - what looked to be plain basalt and vesicular basalt. Others with no crystals, some with small white phenocrysts, maybe one to less than 5 percent. And the bould - we are in a boulder field where the boulders range generally up to 2 feet with a few larger than that. Now, some of the boulders are lying on top of the surface, some are partially exposed, and some are just barely exposed. And in our traverse around on the surface and particularly working with the scoop, we've run into boulders below the surface - it was probably buried under
Laisse-moi te lire toutes les étapes telles que je les ai notées, Jack, et vérifier qu'on les a bien comprises… ASCENT ECA, deux, fermé. L'étape 2 ser
Хорошо. Что мы будем делать,
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo su Marte entro il 2000, ma i leader democratici hanno risposto che la priorità deve essere data alle esigenze sulla Terra. Agnew, alto funzionario governativo al decollo dell'Apollo 11 mercoledì, apparentemente parlava a nome suo e non necessariamente dell'amministrazione Nixon quando ha affermato: "A mio giudizio, dovremmo mandare un uomo su Marte entro la fine di questo secolo". Laredo, Texas, AP: I funzionari dell'immigrazione di Nuevo Laredo hanno annunciato mercoledì che agli hippy verrà negata la carta turistica per entrare in Messico, a meno che non facciano il bagno e si taglino i capelli. Huberto Cazaras, capo dell'immigrazione messicana a Nuevo Laredo, ha affermato che le autorità di Città del Messico, Acapulco e altre famose località turistiche hanno ricevuto lamentele nei confronti degli hippy. Di United Press International: La reazione iniziale alla concessione di un lunedì di vacanza da parte del presidente Nixon ai dipendenti federali, in modo che potessero celebrare una giornata nazionale di partecipazione alla missione di allunaggio dell'Apollo 11, è stata per lo più di sorpresa. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, Londra AP: L'Europa è stata colpita dalla missione Apollo 11 sulla Luna. I giornali di tutto il continente riempiono le loro pagine di immagini del razzo Saturn V in decollo per stabilire il primo collegamento della Terra con il suo satellite naturale. E i
ठीक है, 11. यह ह्यूस्टन है। अब हमें लैंग्रेनस की एक सुंदर तस
로저. 방금 일어난 이후로 물을 10번 정도 마셨어... 잠들기 전
Это утвердитель
알겠습니다. 이제 약 2분 동안 업링크를 업보이스 백업으로 전환하겠습니다. 업보이스 연결 끊김 소리가 들리는 데 몇 초 정도 걸릴 수 있습니다. 업 텔레메트리 스위치를 업보이스 백업으로 
حسناً. وخلف رأسه مباشرة توجد أدواتنا البصرية، السدس والتلسكو
Gemini 4, chirurgien RKV. La man
알겠습니다.
そうで
はい、これが最後に見送った点です。ここで決定を待っている間に、続けましょう。許容範囲とされるデッドバンドは660～770psiです。言い換えれば、この2つの圧力の間の圧力になる立ち上がり時間であれば、103時間後あたりで臨界圧力を下回ることができます。ですから、その範囲内に収まると予想しており、もしそうであれば問題ありません。もし770～800psiの範囲であれば、59時間後に再度圧力を確認してください。詳細な手順は後ほど説明します。もし圧力が800psi以上の場合は、より詳細な手順を検討
Ici, 
حسنًا، الموعد النهائي الاسمي هو الساعة 06:02؛ نتوقع أن يكون الموعد النهائي حوالي 6 دقائق حتى في ذلك الوقت، أل
We
Хорошо, конфигурация панели 11, верхний ряд: Шина переменного тока B, я хочу, чтобы S-диапазонная антенна была открыта; Шина переменного тока A, магнитофон, открыт. Второй ряд, под СИСТЕМОЙ A, я хочу, чтобы основной коммутатор через QUAD 1 TCA был закрыт. Указатель командира X под ПОЛЕТНЫМИ ДИСПЛЕЯМИ, открыт; открыт; Резервный обогреватель радара спуска, открыт; Обогреватель радара посадки, открыт. Выключатель ATTITUDE DIRECT, закрыт; ED: LOGIC POWER A, открыт; UTILITY, открыт. Под: ВЕНТИЛЯТОР КОМПЛЕКТАЦИИ 1, закрыт; АВТОМАТИЧЕСКАЯ ПЕРЕКЛЮЧЕНИЕ, закрыт. Под КОММУНИКАЦИЕЙ: ПЕРЕДАТЧИК VHF B, открыт; ПРИЕМНИК VHF A, открыт. Внизу: индикатор уровня сигнала, открыт
Nein, Bruce. Gib mir einfach deine Breiten- und Längenkoordinaten (gerundet durch zwei), die Höhe und die Gitterkoordinaten. Verg
Salve, Apollo 11. Hou
我们这
Bene. Per il Pacifico centrale, le condizioni generali sono buone. Ci si possono aspettare basi nuvolose sparse di 2000 piedi, visibilità 10 miglia, vento 070 a 12, altezza delle onde 4 piedi, altimetro 2974. Alba 10 Zulu e prima luce 16:49 Zulu. La nave sarà Yorktown; gli aerei saranno Airboss numero 1 e 2 e i Recuperi 1, 2 e 3. Il tempo stimato per raggiungere la nave è di 15 minuti: la Yorktown è su
روجر. فهمت كلامك بشكل أفضل بكثير. لقد سمعنا الصوت قادماً من خ
About - on the left-hand side about almost halfway down beneath the ", maneuver to TOPO target 54A," mak
रॉजर। कॉपी, बज़। आपकी सरफेस चेकलिस्ट में कुछ बदलाव हैं, और सामान्य तौर पर, हम चाहते हैं कि आप कमांड मॉड्यूल को ट्रैक करें ताकि आप वहां अपनी स्थिति का अंतिम बार जायजा ले सकें। यानी, P57, और फिर चेकलिस्ट के अनुसार आगे बढ़ें। बाकी चेकलिस्ट में कुछ छोटे-मोटे बदलाव हैं। मुख्य बदलाव यह है कि हम चढ़ाई के दौरान रेंडेज़वस रडार को चालू नहीं रखना चाहते, और हमें लगता है कि इस
Хорошо. Что мы будем делать? Мы будем использовать VOX до конца обратного отсчета до начала и перед началом т
ال
Ich konnte die Höhe durch das Fenster überhaupt nicht einschät
برج الجوزاء 4، هذا هو جراح الكناري. اترك المسبار الفموي في مكانه، 
了解しました。SEP姿勢への機動は2+56+37から開始します。4分。SEP時刻は3+06+
肯定是在外面——我们一接到出发通知我就出来了。实际上，在去夏威夷之前，我就出来了……跟着摄像机，把脐带接上。接上脐带
Acquario, r
Apollo 8, i nostri dati sono inattivi in ​​questo momento; ti ringrazio per aver acceso il registrat
Хорошо. Мы завершили запись, и диктофон ваш, мы прослушали аудиозапись р
分かりました。アセンション島上空での地上移動中に、ケープ・ケープ・コマンダーとヒューストン・ケープ・コマンダーがあな
أبولو 8، هيوستن.
Roger. Non sono molto sicuro di cosa sia successo quella volta, Mike. Stavo segnando i punti di atterraggio, usando il codice, e continuavo a
That is affirmative. I am realigning the capsule at present time and wilt cage and uncage the gyros before I go on the dark 
E siamo passati alla bomboletta di CO2 secondaria. Fred ha sostituito quella primaria, ma vogliamo continuare a usare que
こちらシグマ
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингто
ठीक है। पहले चरण के रूप में, मैंने आपको जो मूल कॉन्फ़िगरेशन दिया था, उसमें एक बदलाव किया है, और वह यह है कि हमें दो और सर्किट ब्रेकर खोलने हैं। पै
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम अब कचरा फेंकने की तैयारी कर रहे हैं। कचरा फेंकना शुरू होने के बाद लग
C'è troppa luce rossa nella
Что вы имеете в виду? Мы собираемся выровнять положение относительно Луны и Солнца; кроме этого — я ничего не понял — меня не было в наушниках, когда передавалась общая информация, поэтому
Hello, Apollo 11, Houston. We've got a load for you, if you give us and ACCEPT. The load consists of a pre state vector that's going in the slot, and a post- state vector that'll go into the slot, if that's okay; and also a target load. Any comments? Ov
Roger, 13 anni. A causa del guasto del sensore di quantità di O2 nel serbatoio 2, vuole tenere traccia più attentamente delle quantità di crio e ti chiederà di mescolare tutti i serbatoi criogenici a intervalli leggermente più frequenti di quanto pianificato. La prima volta è adesso e ti chiameremo probabilmente ogni 5 o 6 ore, tranne durante le ore di sonno e i periodi di intensa attività. Vorr
Ich möchte euch alle in Australien grü
Хорошо. Мы бы хотели, чтобы он их выполнил, как я уже говорил, когда закончит
Beau 
罗杰，加 28466，减 00350，加 02406 
Освободите себя, и я буду с замиранием сердца наблюда
अरे, अगर आप इसे सीधा खड़ा करके लेंस को थोड़ा बाहर की ओर रखते हैं, तो यह अच्छे से चिपक जाता है। वहाँ वेल्क्रो के दो 
Хорошо. Мы остановимся для входа в систему при крене 285, а углы с высоким коэффициентом усиления составят 23 по 
켄, 녹음
ठीक है।
देखने में तो ऐसा ही लग रहा है; कहीं ऐसा तो नहीं कि वो सिर्फ गहरे भूरे रंग 
Roger; verstanden.
L'interrupteur de l'ordinateur est allumé et l'interrupteur d'alimen
Roger. Wann möcht
Unter unserem Eingang hängt ein Schild mit der Aufschrift 
فعلنا ذلك. أغلقنا صمام تهوية إدارة النفايات، هنا
罗杰，尼尔。非常感
Twelve clicks right
Wir haben hier oben noch etwas zu tun, Charlie. Wir werden sicherstellen, dass alles umgeladen 
こんにちは、ジム。約2分後にフライトハンドオーバーがあり、一時的に通信が途
아, 그렇군요. 조명을 끄고 조준선이 보이는지 확인해 보시겠어요? 네, 확인해 보겠습니다. 그리고 한 가지 더, 언
D'ac
Роджер. Зона 57-2 86. 1+49. 07 42 52. 7+12. 11+52. 58-2 94. 1+59. 09 16 42. 5+49. 10+41. Зона 58-BRAVO, раздельное торможение, 55 вперед, 51 назад. 1+31. 1+54. 10 00 10. 9+03. Зона 55-2 104. 2+12. 10 50 54. 4+26. 9+45. Вы мен
휴스턴, 승무원 현황 보고. 방사선량: CDR 1
Ihr Blendenwert von 
Kilo 0,9 et 6,3. Merci. Une seule de ces cases de la grille correspond à peu près à la surface maximale que vous pouvez
好的。也没什么特别的。嗯，我们先从体育说起吧，管它呢。太空人队以8比7险胜，勇士队在第九局得了五六分，但他们最终还是赢了；当天另一场重要的比赛，小熊队因为下雨取消了。其他比赛的比分我都有，你要哪一场可以告诉我。马尼拉和吕宋岛其他地区发生了地震。发生了三次震动，建筑物摇晃了大约半个小时，震级大约是里氏5级。好的，我们来看看。披头士乐队宣
Bene. In "Attivazione", esegui il passaggio 1 ed esegui il passa
では、設定に戻りましょ
On the way out, they gave us some REACQ angles which we used, and once it broke lock and re-positioned itself, why, it went over to the OMNI's an
روجر، فرانك. نحن جاهزون للمناورة رقم 1 و2. لدينا أيضًا متجهان للحالة وحمل مستهدف للرفع والتحميل إذا
Io dico, credo che tu abbia l'Area
Roger. Wir müssen hier in Kürze mehr Urin abladen. Wird da
ठीक है, और अंत में, चार LiOH के डिब्बे, जिनका उपयोग इसमें किया गया है, और इन्हें जेटिसन बैग में रखा जा सकता है। ठीक है, कुछ बातें। इसे लोड क
ठीक है। बढ़िया। समझ गय
This is Friendship Seven. Affirmative. I have Orion right in the middle of the window at
Che cos '
حسنً
알겠습니다. 104시간 후, 즉 지금으로부터 약 20시간에서 18시간 후에 중간 경로 수정을 고려하고 있는데, 속도는 초당 7피트밖에 되지 않습니다. 다른 옵션은 현재 속도를 유지하는 것입니다. 다시 진입하지 못할 수도 있기 때문입니다. 그래서 저희는 여러 가지 방안을 검토하고 있습니다. 그런데 현재로서는 거의 페어웨이 한가운데에 위치해 있다는 것을 알려드리고 싶었습니다. 중간 경로 수정 없이 현재 추적 결과 감마 값이 7.11로, 기존 값인 6.51보다 높습니다. 이미 목표 지점에 도달한 상태이며, 중심과 외곽 경계선 사이에서 단 0.5도 차이밖에 나지 않습니다.
Ok. Volevo solo che ne foste consapevoli e che ci pensaste e che ci rifletteste sulle possibili implicazioni per il piano di volo. Poi vi mostrerò questo grandangolo e il commento sulla Luna e vedrò quali sezioni ritengono più appropriate. Ok. Sulla pergamena, Frank voleva che verificassimo l'ordine in cui poteva aspettarsi di vedere il profilo di ingresso, e il primo profilo che appare è etichettato "Nonexit Numero 2" e si tratta dell'ingresso a corto raggio e ad alta velocità. Il secondo profilo che apparirà è intitolato "The 3500 Mile" che è anche un ingresso ad alta velocità, ma è quello che usereste nel caso in cui dovessimo raggiungere distanze di ingresso più lunghe. Poi il terzo profilo sarà "Nonexit Entry Numero 1", seguito da un quarto da 3500 miglia. Quindi avete quattro profili di ingresso. I numeri 1 e 3, man mano che li incontrate, sono i brevi raggi, mentre i numeri 2 e 4 sono i raggi a lungo raggio. Per quanto riguarda il coldsoak, credo che abbiamo parlato di cosa faremo lì, ma da qualche parte entro un'ora circa, vorremo entrare nel vivo della questione. Di certo non vogliamo farlo a mezzanotte. Parlando con gli addetti alla traiettoria - cosa ne pensano dell'ebollizione dell'acqua - una cosa da tenere a mente è il fatto che vedono i tuoi scarichi d'acqua e l'acqua che bolle sul tuo grafico della traiettoria. Sembra che sia una funzione del loro schema di calcolo piuttosto che una funzione del fatto che la traiettoria venga perturbata così tanto. Quindi sembra che una volta che prenderemo in considerazione, se faremo parte di qu
The responsibility for this flight lies first with history and with the giants of science who have preceded this effort; next with the American people, who have through their will, indicated their desire; next, to four administrations, and their Congresses, for implementing that will; and then, to the agency and industry teams that built our spacecraft, the Sat
Ok, stiamo registrando l'ora in cui è stato completato. Hai due liste lì, una per il tras
أبولو 11، هيو
Roger. Jetzt laut und deutli
Хорошо, ладно. Следующий шаг — закрепить ленту. Для этого отрежьте от рулона примерно 60 см (2 фута) и разорвите его вдоль, чтобы у вас получилось две полоски длиной около 60 см (2 фута) и шириной примерно 1,2 см (полдюйма). Оберните их вокруг контейнера под прямым углом к ​​основной ленте так, чтобы она проходила сверху и снизу; расположите её так, чтобы она выступала за центральное отвер
حسنًا يا فريد. قبل ذلك، أي قبل ساعة واحدة، قم بتوجيه الطائرة إلى الزوايا التالية: الدوران 130 درجة، والميل 125 درجة، والانعراج 12.4 درجة. ستكون زوايا المحور المقابلة هي
Okay; stand by. Let me see what Frank's got to say about tha
Okay, Ken. One thing I think that - I don't know whether anybody - the decal don't take into acc
O
Давай. Гром
了解。了解。デイブ・リードは
켄, 우리가 이 작업복에 대해 할 일 중 하나는, 노스 아메리칸이 제안한 방식대로 각 좌석 아래에 하
Okay. „Es war die Nacht vor Weihnachten, hoch draußen im Weltraum hatte die Apollo-8-Besatzung gerade das Rennen zum Mond gewonnen. Die Headsets hingen sorgsam an den Konsolen, in der Hoffnung, dass Chris Kraft bald eintreffen würde. Frank Borman lag gemütlich in seinem Bett, während Visionen von Kilroy in seinem Kopf tanzten. Jim Lovell auf seiner Couch und Anders in der Ladebucht zerbrachen sich den Kopf über einen Computerbildschirm, als plötzlich ein solches Getöse ertönte, dass Frank aus dem Bett sprang, um nachzusehen. Blitzschnell eilte er zum Sextanten, um sicherzugehen, dass sie nicht abstürzen würden. Das Licht auf der zerklüfteten Mondoberfläche verlieh dem grauen Mondstaub einen grünen Schimmer, als seinen staunenden Augen ein Schild von Burma Shave mit der Aufschrift ‚Kilroy war hier‘ erschien.“ Doch Frank war nicht dumm; er wusste schnell, dass sie die Ersten gewesen waren; das musste ein Trick
The Moon went by the at 6 degrees
好的，我有一些事情
Columbia, qui Houston. N
请慢
Итак, «Аполлон-8». Позвольте мне рассказать вам о главном: во-первых, мы проводим обзор всех процедур входа в атмосферу и подобной информации, и мы собираемся подробно изучить ко
روجر، بيل.
अब हमारे पास सही रक्तचाप का डेटा है। कृपया कमांड पायलट से खान-पान, पेय पदार्थ और नींद से संबंधित वि
ठीक है, पायलट। मुझे लगता है कि मैं यहीं रहना पसंद करूँगा औ
Dobbiamo fare un -
تم إيقاف تشغيل الصوت الاحتياطي مع فتح قاطع دائرة مكبر الصوت الآن
还有，13号，休斯顿。通风时间与飞行计划中的预期时间基本一致，误差在几秒
네, 저도 그걸 알아챘어요. 아무리 멀리 떨어져도 소용없어 보이네요
Роджер. Теперь ты должен понять, хор
Хорошо. На странице 14 значение параметра «загрузка» измени
是的，我们可以按时完成。我
... A
双子座4号，双子座4号，任何时候你的OAMS点火速度超过120英尺/秒，我们都会进行分段点火，前推进器输出84英尺，剩余部分
Роджер. Поскольку вы сейчас находитесь на OMNI D (Dog), фаза для высокоэффективных антенн с синхронизацией сигнала смещена
Okay. That's right. That's Jim Lovell. What we thought we'd do today was just show you a little bit about life inside Apollo 8. We've shown you the scenes of the moon, the scenes of the earth, and we thought we'd invite you into our home. It's been our home at least for 4 days as you can see on the instrument panel. We mark off each day on the instrument panel. We're four down, and we're working on the fifth day. Of course, we're all looking forward to the landing on Friday. Down here in the part of the spacecraft that we call the lower equipment bay, we have the President's adviser on physical fitness, Captain Jim Lovell, about to undergo an exercise program that we do every day. You notice that he floats around very freely. He just bumped his head on the optics, used for our navigating. He's working with an exercise device that's designed to keep the muscles in shape. Now another very important function of our spacecraft is the computer, and I thought you might be interested in seeing what we have here, the displays that give us all the information about our burn, about navigating, and about the velocity that we use during entry and retrofire on earth-orbital missions. You can see it's controlled by a , or similar to a typewriter keyboard, and the things that go in and out of that are absolutely miraculous. It's done a fantastic job for us, and Jim Lovell has done an excellent job operating it. Now another very important thing whether you're in space or the ground is eating, and I've asked Bill Anders to show you how we eat up here in the flight. Pardon the picture while we move around here and change cameras. The food that we use is all dehydrated; it comes prepackaged in vacuum-sealed bags. You notice that all Bill has to do to keep it in one place is let go of it. Except for the air currents in the spacecraft, it would stay perfectly still. He gets out his handy, dandy scissors and cuts the bag. The food is varied, generally pretty good. If that doesn't sound like a rousing endorsement, it isn't, but nevertheless, it's pretty good food. You can see that Bill is very clever. He does things swiftly. Actually, those food bags are stuck together because the
Gut. 413020 183, Shaula, unten 064, links 06,
Apollo 13, Houston. Veuillez réduire le débit binaire. Termi
Veuillez patienter u
روجر. أنا في حالة مزاجية جيدة للقيام بذلك - لدي في الس
是的
休斯顿水瓶座。请按照断路器检查清单中第 11 
Мы хотели бы ненадолго переключиться на S-диапазон AUX-ленты, чтобы вы могли прослушать запись, пока мы используем высокий у
ما زلتُ غير متأكد تمامًا من تفعيل الدائرة الثانوية. ذكرتَ أنه يجب تعطيلها بعد ساعة أو خمس دقائق من بدء تشغيل المبخر الرئيسي. تشير قائمة التحقق الخاصة بي إلى أن المبخر الرئيسي لن يبدأ التشغيل على الأرجح إلا بعد تجاوز ا
Well, I'm reading 70 [degrees]. I'm really a little at a loss as to how to get it down
Tranquillité, Houston. Nous vous demandons de rappeler P57 et de procéder une dernière fois à l'alig
네
Gemini VI, hier spricht der Chirurg der Kommandostaffel. Ich w
Хорошо, Джи
D'accord. 
了解しました。了解しました。最後に、IRIGの最新情報をお送りしたいので
제미니 4, 휴스턴
37.8 e 2.3. E questo sarà il nostro ultimo per mezz'ora. Grazie. E sto per impartire il mio qui
D'accord, Jack. J'ai la procédure sous les yeux. Elle
Oui, c'est allumé. L'émetteur est mai
Roger. La Terre est à 24. Et il semble que votre consommation de CO2 atteigne environ 15, nous vous demandons donc de sélectionner le mode SECONDAIRE et de remplacer la cartouche
分かりました。あなたから電話があったと思ったのですが、どうやら地上の
ق
Хорошо. Готовьтесь к взрыву. Перв
罗杰。3-4是120。2+36。19
이글, 콜럼비아. 제 P22가 완성되었습니다. AGS 
少し前にキシロース錠剤を食べるためにバイザーを開けていました。機内に積んでいる残りの食料は、全て崩れたり溶けてしまったりしています。このままでは使い物にならないので、キシロース錠剤が最後のゼログラム食になると思います。しかし、錠剤が崩れる前の最初の食事は、とても楽でした。この一口サイズの食べ物は、無重力状態でも問題なく食べられます。その時、水も少し飲みましたが、問題ありませ
연료 제어율은 90~98%입니다
Ricevuto. Sono 13 gradi a sinistra dell'ombra. E la prossima domanda riguarda la profondità del campionamento di massa che hai ottenuto vicino alla prima parte del grafico e qualsiasi variazione di composizione che potresti aver osservato durante l'intervallo di campionamento di
Okay, stand by. ROTATIONAL CONTROL POWER is NORMAL, number 2, 
我要关闭总线了。我要拆掉那些家伙想要的冷却液阀门，它们都得调到0。我已经听到辅助警示灯的声音了
حسنًا، في منتصف الصفحة في السطر 9، سنقوم بشطب عبارة "تفعيل VHF لفحوصات الاتصال"،
Un drink molto piccolo, ma ho intenzione di bere un po' d'acqua con il
Beh, in un certo sen
حس
क्या आप थ्री चार्ली के रेट्रो समय क
यह अभी भी वहीं है। मैं अभी इसे देख रहा हूँ। मैं देख सकता हूँ - सूरज मेरे ठीक पीछे है, फिर ये सारी चमकीली चीज़ें दिखाई देती हैं। हाँ। ऐसा लगता है जैसे मैं आकाशगं
Jim, I didn't catch all of what you said, but I think you wanted to know when the procedures [on]
Roger, Tranquility. Je te donne un signal horaire à 114 
Хьюстон
Mitten in der Dunstschicht ist Phecda nicht zu sehen – ich kann sie nicht einmal mit d
- - this 
Prêt pour un ou deux moteurs de carda
問題ではありません。どれも
Roger, Canton. J'étais occupé à manœuvrer. Je ne vous ai pas encore transmis votre rapport; je préparais l'éclairage et rangeais tout le matériel pour la manœuvre de rétro-allumage. J'ai 45 % de carburant, 60 à 90
还有，休斯顿的宁静酒店。我们觉得账单看起来
알겠습니다. 찰리, 당신은 저를 어떻게 이해하
They request that you leave that switch in the AUTO position until you go to bed tonight. Stand by. I mean in the ON position. I'll repeat that again. In the OFF position until you go to bed tonight for reasons that you have a 3-percent imbalance, and they'd like to get tha
روجر، بيل. نلاحظ أن ضغط البخار الثانوي لديك يعود ببطء، ونود أن نجلس ونراقبه لبعض الوق
Те
さて、レトロクロックの推奨変更についてお伝えしました。レトロクロックでは、高トルクスラスターを逆噴射モード
هاو
了解。君は弱い。もしこれを読んでいる
Также сообщаю, что управление с помощью пушки было... очень хорошим по рысканию, очень хорошим по тангажу. Управление креном было не таким хорошим, но когда у меня была пушка, я мог выбрать точку на космическом корабле и вернуться к ней. Я мог маневрировать как в поступательном, так и в вертикаль
Д
D'accord. Je dois juste changer les OMNIs. D'accord. En lisant les modifications, Joe, aux pages 1 à 4:
Okay, warum bleiben wir nicht noch 
Ich habe TX zweimal gesendet. Die Raumsonde hat die
Ok, pilota. Credo che preferirei restare a bord
好的。我们将按照蓄能器容量没有减少的情况
这里有个挺有意思的小新闻，听起来挺不错的。密歇根州安娜堡市出现了一个新的青少年帮派，名叫吉尔内特帮（Gilnet Gang）。他们秘密地在安娜堡的街头游荡，有时甚至会绕过法律。他们自称“行善游击队”（Guerillas for Good）。他们做过的一些事包括：在一个晚上，他们把一座被污言秽语涂满的桥重新粉刷了一遍；把一栋被判定为危房的房子——虽然很受附近孩子欢迎，但其实很危险——用木板封了起来；把市中心那些因为争论是商家还是政府负责而空着的花坛重新种满了鲜花；修剪了繁忙路口的一丛被认为遮挡视线的树篱，这让树篱的主人很生气；清理了休伦河沿岸一段的垃圾。帮派成员都是匿名青少年，他们不求任何个人荣誉。他们的目标是打破官僚主义，把他们认为的好事办成。这个组织带有一丝宗教色彩。一位密歇根大学的助理教授说，这有点像一个跨教派的团体，他非正式地为这个团伙提供咨询。他们的名字来源于圣彼得和渔网。而且，由于地处偏远，他们与任何特定的教会都没有关联。他们的老师（同样不愿透露姓名）说，这个团体里贯穿着罗宾汉式的精神。他们的很多活动都游走在法律边缘。当正规机构运转不畅时，他们会直接行善，而不是走繁琐的官僚程序。这个团伙由大约55名高中生组成，男女都有，还有40到50名学生在毕业前就加入了这个团伙。这个团伙的构想源于一次底特律贫民窟之旅。当时，一个教会青年团体注意到了街
D'accord. La pression de l'hélium est d'environ 37, la pression d'admission est de 182 et la quantité est de 80. En B, la température est d'environ 112, la pression de l'hélium d'environ 36,5, la pression du carburan
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Читаю вас вслух на фоне какого-то ш
Okay. Dies ist ein allgemeiner Hinweis, der sich auf Situationen bezieht, in denen Sie zwischen verschiedenen Befehlen wechseln. Vermeiden Sie es, währenddessen einen erweiterten Befehl (z. B. `and`) aufzurufen. Dieser Hinweis steht auch in den Programmhinweisen und dient lediglich als Erinnerung. Was passiert, wenn wir in einen erweiterten Befehl wie `and` oder `and` gelangen? Wir könnten in `and` hängen bleiben und den Vorgang wiederholen müssen, um die Ausgabe 63 zu erhalten. Beide Anzeig
Okay. 
ब
高度計が作動するまで待機しています。ケープ、聞こえますか？高度計が作動しました。高度100フィート（約1,000フィート）、降下率は低下傾向、客室気圧は…客室気圧は正常です。まだ少し流れが残っています。いや、あれは衝撃波です。後方から煙が噴き出しています。高度45フィー
Roger. Deke, lo strato di foschia è molto luminoso. Direi dagli 8 ai 10 
Je n'ai jamais eu l'occasion de les voi
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们显示您上次关闭此设备大约是在4分钟前，因此请您再等待15分钟，然后再次尝试操作，之后请切换到自
Das ist bestätigt. Nächster Schritt auf Panel 5: Wir schalten den Schalter MAIN BUS TIE A/C auf BAT A/C, prüfen die korrekte Spannung an MAIN BUS A und messen 
メインバスタイAがオンになります。TVCジンバルドライブのピッチとヨーは「自動」にな
아니, 프레드. 그건 지휘관용 파란색 호스 절반이랑 LMP용 파
गॉर्डो, यह ध
Apollo 8, Houston. Gleichzeitiger VHF- und S-Ba
Auf Jims Seite ist es gerade hell, und von meiner Seite aus kann ich noch einige Sterne erkennen. Anscheinend kann man das Raumschiff so ausrichten, dass eine Seite dunkel ist, die andere aber hell. Jims Seite ist definitiv im Hellen, meine im Dunkeln. Das war eines der Dinge, die mich zu Beginn des Fluges am meisten überrascht haben, als ich die kleinen Leuch
罗杰，11。给你两台PADS，30和31。30 SPS/G&N：36691，减去061，加上066 135 23 4156。NOUN 81：32 - 更正，加上32011，加上06818，减去02650 181 054 014。远地点不适用，近地点加上00230 3286 - 更正，32836；燃烧时间2 28 32628 24 1511 357。接下来的三行不适用。名词 61：加 1103，减 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52。落日是天津四和织女星，坐标为 242 172 012。我们需要两台喷气式飞机的空隙持续 16 秒，地平线位于 10 
저건 위에서 오는 소리야. 또 다른 하나가 바로 이쪽으로 내려오고 있네. 저기 프라 마우로에 있는 터미네이터 말이야. 우리가 한 2시간 전에 착륙했었지, 그렇
أبولو
Aber geh doch rüber auf deine Seite. Mein erstes Manöver habe ich aber drüben auf dieser Seite durchgeführt. H
Roger. Thank you very much, 11. That was a good demonstration and a good show. We appre
1 hour and 10
わかった。大丈夫だよ。違う色のペンを持ってる
그들에게 
Хорошо. Что касается коррекции на среднем участке траектории, мы хотели бы отложить её примерно до 25 футов в секунду. Причина задержки заключается в том, чтобы обеспечить лучшее отслеживание благодаря скорости 7,5 футов в секунду, которую вы задали для эшелонирования. Мы хотели бы уделить немного больше времени анализу данных отслеживани
わかりました。彼を戻してください。
Das ist bestätigt, wenn Sie das wünschen. Wir haben e
Non, il n'y a rien dedans. C'est de l'air. Je suis censé le ranger dans le coffre à provis
잭, 휴스턴입니다. 통신 상태가 좋아졌다 나빠졌다 하는데, 마지막으로 복사한 내용은 '센터로 전송'이었어
RATE COMM
Ha
D'accor
ऐसा लगता है कि पावर डाउन होने पर भी हम लगभग 11 एम्पियर से थोड़ा कम करंट खींच रहे हैं। नंबर 1 पर 10 और नंबर 2 पर 11 से थोड़ा कम करंट है। बाहरी हैच पर टेदर या अम्बिलिकल रिस्ट्रेंट की स्थिति के कारण अंतरिक्ष यान
네, 
아폴로 8호, 
रॉजर। मुझे ठीक से याद नहीं कि उस समय क्या हुआ था, माइक। मैं कोड का इस्तेमाल करके लैंडिंग साइट्स को चिह्नित क
Ok. Ti consiglio di inserire in R1 quanto segue: 03750, e dovresti ottenere esattamente una veloci
دعنا نرى، أنت تريد التراجع عن هذه الأ
Okay. I think it's finally coming through to us here, what you said just a little
干球温度大约在 72 到 79 之间。在此之前不久，温度在 75 到 77 之间。上一组的湿球温度在 57 到 61 之间
Und was ich eigentlich zeigen wollte – i
신호기는 좀 미뤄두겠습니다. 전원을 켰을 때 시계가 대략 몇 시쯤 됐는지 기억이 가물가물한데, 아마 지금쯤이면 괜찮을 겁니다. 소모품은 더 이상 
SPOTメーターは左側
さ
はい。これでロックさ
오로라 세븐, 당신의 상태가 급격히 악화되고 있습니다. MCC(머큐리 컨트롤 센터)에서는 당신의 차량 연료 소모량과 수동 연료 소모량을 우려하고 있습니다. 
هل يمكنك الانتظار ثانية واحدة فقط؟
Friendship Seven, thi
有些看起来好像在发光，但我认为它们其实并没有；那只是阳光照射的结果。我试着拍
روجر، كلامك غير واضح. سأتصل بك قريباً بخصوص الترددات ا
أبولو 8، هي
संक्षेप में, पिच और रोल को नियंत्रित करने के लिए, जैसा कि हमने अभ्यास किया है, का उपयोग करें; य
Roger. Je pense que le prob
ठीक है। समझ गया। अगर इससे आपको ड्राइविंग में मदद मिले, तो हमने गणना की है कि जब आप खिड़की से बाहर या ठीक बाहर X की दूरी पर देखते हैं, तो सही स्थिति में आपका निशाना सीधे एक्रक्स की ओर होना चाहिए। हमें नहीं पता कि इससे आपको मदद 
わかりました、ジャック。上から始めましょう。わかりました。クライオタンク; H2 1は230を示し、2も同様です。私たちのO2クライオタンク1は- 300でかろうじて持ちこたえているようです。そして、クライオタンク2は、H2 1は73、2、74を示しています。O2側では、O2 1の量は76で、O2は最大スケールの上限に固定されています。ラジアン温度は、プライマリ入口は約55を示し、ラジアン出口は約30を示し、セカンダリ出口は52度を示しています。そして蒸発器出口温度は45、蒸気圧力は0.17、グリコール排出は48です。スーツコンプレッサーはゼロを示しています。アキュムレータは30を示しています。 H2O WASTE は約 34 を示しています。POTABLE は約 98 を示しています。SECONDARY RAD INLET は約 71 を示しています。RAD OUT は約 30 を示しています
50-DELTA 55 forward, 85 aft. 1+31. 1+48. 20 46 06. 10+
No. Non direi che si trattasse necessariamente di materiale scoperto. Credo che parte del 
理解できませんでした、VI、も
여기는 휴스턴입니다. 계속하세요. 당신의 글을 약하게 읽고
Okay. Wir haben
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, Хьюстон CAP COM. 
네. 대기권 재진입은 지구의 뒷면을 통해서 이루어지는데, 진입 각도가 얕기 때문에 태양 쪽으로 더 강하게 
Ok, Vance. Quello che faremo è, quando saremo in assetto, disattivaremo i quadricipiti e faremo come abbiamo fatto ieri sera; lasceremo che siate voi laggiù a dirci quando pensate che siamo abbastanza stabili; poi faremo tutto questo lavoro con il sestante, prima; e poi, quando avremo finito, torneremo indietro e rime
I am now going to low mag. Correction high mag on the periscope see how it looks?... yawed right about 5 degrees. See how she matches up with the periscope at this point. Say, we have the yaw axes (indicator) at about 10 degrees right, at this time, and clouds are tracking right up the line, as if the yaw axes might be off by as much as 5 to 6 degrees. Now this may be a m
Okay. Nächste Seite, Stromkreis 7, Schalttafel 16.
收到。我们现在下降到海拔8万英尺。我的指针显示我们距离目的地还有大约25英
बहुत अ
रॉजर। क्या आप अप
아
Ici Friendship Seven. Je ne vous ai toujours pas reçu. Veuillez réessayer
찰리, 여
为什么我们不能暂时不用高增益天线呢？这样全向天线就能获得高比特率。好吧，那就告诉他们我
نعم، يمكنك رؤية المنظر
알
CSQ、あなたの送信は5回に1回くらいしか受信で
حسنًا، تكوين اللوحة 11، الصف العلوي: ناقل التيار المتردد B، أريد هوائي النطاق S، مفتوح، مفتوح؛ ناقل التيار المتردد A، مسجل الشريط، مفتوح. الصف الثاني، تحت النظام A، أريد أن يكون كل من MAIN SOV إلى QUAD 1 TCA مغلقًا. مؤشر X الخاص بالقائد ت
Pas de souci. En fait, j'essaie d'o
Yes. That's about it. It wasn't a rapid change in resistive force. And al
76 मील की दूरी पर हमें एजेना तारामंडल जैसा कुछ दिखाई दे रहा
रॉजर। वे तरल ऑक्सीजन टैंक से गैर-प्रणोदन वेंटिलेशन जारी रख रहे हैं। तो यह त्रिज्या के विपरीत दिशा में होगा। और बूस्टर मुझे बता रहे हैं कि यह निरंतर वेंटिलेशन प्रणाली है। वे इस समय थोड़ी मात्रा में ईंधन भी निकाल रहे हैं। जलने में लगभग 23-
Roger. Das Landekissen war schon abmontiert. Ich hab's zuerst bemerkt und gemeldet. Das Retromanual ist auch aus, und wir sind startklar. Es ist sehr komfortabel in der Schwerelosigkeit. 
Apollo 8, looks like
アクエリアス、ヒュースト
अब कुछ ही
一般
ユーリ、みんないつも君に幸運を祈ってるよ。「幸運を祈ってるよ」とか、ありとあらゆる挨拶を言ってるよ。想像できる限りのことを言ってるよ。聞こえてる？みんな、君の幸運と幸せを祈ってる
S
Eagle, Houston. Nessuna voce. Vuoi verificare l'invio di OMNI? Pa
おい、
Roger, Mike. Ich möchte ein paar Anmerkungen zu den Daten machen. Das automatische Manöver war recht genau. Anscheinend haben wir während des Manövers einen substellaren Punkt getroffen; die automatische Optik hat Canopus genau an die richtige Stelle gebracht; die minimale Impulssteuerung hat wie erwartet funktioniert. In den Höhen, in denen ich mit den Beobachtungen begonnen habe, ist eine deutliche, dunstige Bandlinie zu erkennen. Der Filter verleiht der Erde einen orangefarbenen Schimmer. Es ist sehr schwer zu bestimmen, wo genau der Stern zu finden ist, aber es scheint eine klare Linie zu geben, wo man den Horizont vermuten würde. Diese Linie erscheint durch den Dunst hindurch, dort, wo wir die Atmosphäre vermuten. Ich bin dem Verfahren
Je parle des aurore
Wir haben verloren – der einzige Vorteil eines frühen Manövers wäre, w
فهمت كلامك جيداً.
أعتقد أنني سأتحقق من جهاز سانبورن بخصوص ذلك. سأنتقل الآن إلى نظام مراقبة ضغط الدم. جين، أنا 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. نلاحظ أن حرارة المقصورة A أعلى قليلاً من باقي المقصورات. كما ذكرتُ سابقاً، سنقضي فترة طويلة دون حركة. لذا نرجو منكم استخدام المقصورة A قدر الإمكان في الظل، وبذ
연소 시험에 가까워짐에 따라 지난번 연소 시험 때와 동일한 점검 절차를 거쳐야 합니다. 즉, 모든 장비의 전원이 켜져 있는지 확인해야
Плюс 37746, минус 03299, плюс 00844 179 346 357, неприменимо, плюс 00176 37900 336 37705 42 1279 309, неприменимо три раза,
حسنًا. ستكون هذه عملية احتراق OAMS مع عد تنازلي تلقائي عند TR، مع دعم بإطلاق نار يد
好的。继续，思路是你在开始时状态向量
좋아요, 18페이지에 있는데, 제가 이미
Ok, ho i cuscinetti, devo e
わかりました。13番、ヒューストンですね。訂正します。SEPは定刻かそれ以降にGOです。早すぎるのはご遠慮く
Non possiamo fargli fare 1
Well, Frank, my thoughts are very similar. The vast loneliness up here of the moon is awe inspiring, and it makes you realize just 
펄스. 
收到。终端阶段经过时间启动 1 加 29 加 17；GET，5 加 16 加 54；Delta-VT，33.0；持
Amicizia Sette, qui Cap Com. Non ho 
Хорошо, Джо. Мы пом
حسنًا. الآن في الصفحة 32، أعلى الصفحة، 
खैर, हम रुके और पहले मोटे तौर पर अलाइनम
... und dazu noch ein paar Gläser Wasser, seit ich dich das letzte Mal gesehen habe. Ich habe ungefähr vier Stunden geschlafen, und das war der beste Schlaf, den ich bisher hatt
If 
それともバッテリー2のことですか
هناك بعض القطع الكبيرة تطفو في الهواء. خطة الطيران جاهزة الآن. ستُفصل الجيروسكوبات عند الساعة 12:33، وسأستخدم نظام التحكم الإلكتروني لتتبع الصاروخ المعزز. سأفعل ذلك - هذه ليست مشكلة تتبع جيدة. سرعاتنا متقاربة جدًا. سأضعه في منتصف النافذة اليمنى، بالإضافة إلى ذلك. لقد وضعته في المنت
Сейчас все системы работают отлично. Я хотел бы рассказать вам о системах управления. Моя электронная система управления работает превосходно. Ручное управление было немного вялым, но в целом очень хорошим. Капсула сейчас находится в автоматическом режиме, маневрирование отключено, гироскопы работают в об
제 말은 전부 다시 깨끗해 보인다는 거예요. 너무 깨끗하게 연소되어서 색깔이 전혀 다른 것처럼 보이지 않아요. 구리, 청동, 산소 전지의 색깔 같은 것들이요. 제가
मैं एमआईटी की कई तस्वीरें ले रहा हूँ, कैप्सूल का समय 3:38:38 ह
Роджер, Кано. Это «Дру
Okay. Wir überprüfen gerade die Flutlichter, die wir Ihnen gegeben haben. Jack, Sie können die Lichter eigentlich schon benutzen. Es gibt keinen Grund, im Dunk
R
روجر. إلى جانب أمور FAM الأخرى، وليس من المؤكد أننا نريد القيام بذلك، إنما هو مجرد موضوع للنقاش، لذا فهذه 
Are you copying any attitudes down there, rates, et cetera
Okay. Ich habe Sie gelesen, bis ich BAT 6 ausgeschaltet habe – Korrektur: Schalten Sie nur BAT 6
Roger. Questa è Friendship Seven. Sto usando il fly-by-wire per poter contr
在这种飞行姿态下，确实会产生一种抬头仰望的错觉，如果没有地平线，那就只有一片漆黑的天空。驾驶舱内的光线非常明亮。当然，一旦适应了，就可以通过舱内照明灯来降低亮度。但目前，由于飞行服电路的问题，我不太愿意降低舱内照明。我频繁地使用指尖照明灯。有人指出，在以后的飞行中，我们必须配备一个万能装置，可以把东西塞进去，并暂时固定住。我正在努力解决垫圈和那块小金属片的问题。我……终于把它们塞进了舱门上的小袋子里。飞行服的温度勉强维持在正常水平。我感觉有点热，可能得调低一些
Konntest du das Kuppelsta
Die Vorflugkontr
로저입니다. 저희 객실 온
로저, 여기 아래쪽에서는 당신 목소리가 좀 건조하게 들리
Rog
Ok, stiamo procedendo verso destra, come forse puoi vedere, e stiamo girando molto bene. Devo ancora correggere il rollio. Tra poco avrò un assetto di imbardata. Sono abbastanza soddisfatto dei controlli sia diurni che notturni. Sono davvero contento. Devo dire che 
Com'è il tempo
Okay. Things looking nominal up here. How abo
休斯顿，这里是 Gemini VIII，正在使用你们的 UHF 2 号频道
Intendo le luci di Durban. Non sono riuscito a vederle. Vedo delle luci a terra, 
알겠습니다. 지금 헬멧 바이
रॉजर। मित्रता सात। मुझे 
好的。那我问个问题。调整到一组观测月球的角度。好的，现在我要做的
Okay. Die Brenndauer wird voraussichtlich unter einer Minute liegen. Wir möchten, dass Sie die Abschalt
Roger. Plus 0888, moins 16500 12955 36185, alignement inchangé, litre inchangé,
分かりました。ここで追いつきます。12ページでは、最新情報、いくつかのベクトル、そして「アクティベーションとセルフテス
Bonjour, Apol
Um vorübergehend die
Roger, Houston. È quello che stiamo cercando di fare. Sto cercando di ottenere 15 per un'ottica. È stato molto difficile, con la Terra luminosa, trovare una stella che potessimo inquadrare con il sestante. Sto cercando di usare l'ottica automatica per inquadrare la stella. Ora ce l'abbiamo; stiamo cercando di manovrare la navicella spaziale per portare il perno a zero in modo da ottenere la linea di vista del punto di ri
Roger. Hör
当初は、別の回避操作があったため、予定通りの観測を直ちに開始することができませんでした。この操作によって、その領域に膨大な量の疑似星が発生し、光学系の較正が事実上不可能になりました。私たちが考案した方法はあまりうまく機能していないようでした。最終的に私が採用した方法は、最も明るい恒星であるシリウスに行き、シャフトとトラニオンを回収し、その後、宇宙船をシリウスまで飛ばして光学系の較正に使用するというものでした。これは後日実施しました。光の散乱に関しては、受動熱制御中のほぼどの姿勢でも、走査望遠鏡で光の散乱を受けているようです。これは主に、望遠鏡の中心を横切る幅広い光の帯として現れ、零点を中心に両方向に約10度の範囲に広がります。この領
Houston, Eagle. Zurück auf PRIMARY, und ich bin bereit, mit
了解。まずは機動、1、これは/で、重量から始まる。63295 - 163 + 129 + 001 36 - 00 045 + 002 02 345 188 343 999 99 + 016 85 002 48 002 001 86 23 2013 164 0
Demain, Charlie, nous allons réorganiser notre rangement au plus près de la configuration nominale. Voici quelques éléments qui ne seront pas conformes: les visières ont été remises dans le module de commandement, mais nous n'avons pas encore trouvé leur emplacement. Nous vous indiquerons où elles seront rangées. De plus, environ 2,5 kg de matériel divers provenant du compartiment Able 8 remplacent les LCG que nous avons déplacés de A 8 dans le sac à combinaison. Nous
Il centro di recupero è stato informato del tuo stato. Stai bene. Vedono l'an
Это «Аполлон-8», прямая трансляция с Луны. Нам пришлось переключить телекамеры. Сначала мы показали вам вид Земли, который мы наблюдали последние 16 часов. Теперь мы переключаемся, чтобы показать вам Луну, над которой мы пролетали на высоте 60 миль последние 16 часов. Билл Андерс, Джим Ловелл и я провели здесь день перед Рождеством, проводя эксперименты, фотографируя и запуская двигатели наших космических аппаратов для маневрирования. Теперь мы проследуем по следу, по которому шли весь день, и проведем вас к лунному закату. Луна для каждого из нас — это что-то своё. Я думаю, что у каждого из нас — у каждого — своё впечатление от увиденного сегодня. Моё собственное впечатление — это огромное, одинокое, неприступное пространство, или пустота, похожая на облака и облака 
Roger. Wir bestätigen, dass der Zielfernrohreinzug aktiviert i
Хорошо, вычеркните "MASTER ARM - OFF" на отметке +15, а после "MODE CONTROL: - ATT HOLD" в поле "At Engine Cutoff" нужно нажать "ENTER" и "Damp Excessive rates Via Y, Z translation". И вопрос по поводу количества топлива: мы ожидаем, что оно снизится ниже 37 процентов при этом режиме работы. Соответст
제가 이렇게 묻는 이유는, 지휘 모듈에서 물을 빼내기 위해 서지 탱크에 압력을 가할 때마다 서지 탱크의 
Toutes les batteries affichent environ 23,5 volts ou plus, l'ampèremètre est stable à 20 ampères. Je voulais vérifier avant de couper le moteur: la tension est de 115 volts. Les ventilateurs sont à environ 115 volts, en veille à 0 volt. Bon, le cockpit est propre. C'est clair que cette satanée antenne est vraiment mal installée. Je viens de rétabli
لسنا بحاج
Questa è una buona rilettura, Fred. Vorrei verificare, tuttavia, in VY, sono più
Nein, ich glaube, 
सूर्योदय। आह्ह्ह्ह! उस समय कितने सुंदर जुगनू चमक रहे थे! उस समय सब कुछ बहुत ही चमकदार था। लेकिन ठीक है, वे—ठीक है, मेरे पास—अगर कोई प
Eagle, Houston. Hai ragione. Le luci e le bandiere sono lì perché non abbiamo ancora chius
Mon plan es
Roger, Friendship Seven. Ich habe den Eindruck, dass deine Fluglage nicht ganz korrekt ist. Es gibt Abweichungen von 30° Rollwinkel nach rechts, 35° Gierwinkel nach rechts und 40° Nickwinkel nach rechts. Bitte be
알겠습니다. 이해했
Когда н
Okay. Moment mal, Jack. Ich wollte Jack zurückrufen
जिम, इस ब्रीफिंग के दौरान, हम चाहते हैं कि संचार व्यवस्था बेहतर हो, और बिजली की भी पर्याप्त व्यवस्था है; इसलिए पैनल 16 पर आप पावर एम्पलीफाय
Близнецы
वह गंभीरता से कहता है, ऐसा लग रहा है कि अब आपके पास और कुछ नही
Отправьте ва
ビルがテープレコーダーを手に入れました。ダンプを評価中です。デ
क्या वहां पानी उपलब्
ठीक है। और आप जानना च
자, 휴스턴, 시작해 보세
مرحباً يا جيم، حبي
はい、あなたも同じものを持っていま
Хорошо, думаю, нам удалось заблокиро
Un peu plus vers 
أتمنى أن يكون لد
Tranquillità. Ricevuto. Riceviamo. Attesa 1. E, pausa, pausa, Columbia. Stiamo avendo qualche problema a far entrare la roba. Richiediamo alto guadagno, passo -20, imbardata +150. 
是的，我们可
«Аполл
해안선을 따라 오고 있는 게 보이네요. 아직 잠망경은 많이 사용하지 않
Ok. Prima di copiare, lascia che te lo legga tutto dall'inizio alla fine, così capirai di cosa stiamo parlando. Il titolo di questa piccola epistola è "Esperimento di correlazione tra fotografia televisiva e cinematografica" e quello che vogliono fare è montare la telecamera con il teleobiettivo su una staffa nella finestra di rendezvous e scattare una foto televisiva della Terra attraverso i filtri rosso e blu, 1 minuto per filtro; questo significa filtri rosso e blu individualmente. Poi vorrebbero scattare una foto televisiva della Terra attraverso il filtro rosso, in questo caso il filtro Al
프랭크, 우리가 하려는 건 방사형 상승 추진입니다. 창밖으로 보이는 광학 장치나 다른 방법을 통해 지구의 위치를 ​​파악한 다음, 적절한 추진기를 사용하여 초당 3피트의 속도로 방사형 상승 추진력을 얻는 겁니다. 궤
送信中のSPCロードにはAgenaクロックのリセットが含まれて
아직 필요한 항목들은 최종 적재 직전, 가능한 한 빨리 확인해 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 그리고 마지막 승무원 수면 시간에 대한 정보는
わかりました。パネル8で、開回路にするブレーカーの数を
Okay. Wir haben die Breite des Persischen Golfs übernommen, und ich kann Ihnen aus erster Hand wohl nur einen einzigen Datenpunkt liefern: Hier in Houston war es heute Morgen klar. Das ist eine ziemlich lokale Beobachtung. Aufgrund Ihrer Abwassereinleitung scheint die Lage etwas gestört zu sein
请继续，卡纳文。双子座
Quel Main Chute era in un certo
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。所有系统运行正常。我们正在评估你们的点火曲线图，稍后会向你们提供结果
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह बरमूडा कैप कॉम है। हम
ويفيدون أيضاً بأنك قمت بتحريك 
結局、ECMは床に置き、ケーブルはエドの膝の上に置くことになりそうです。銃は元あった中央のフードボックスに収納します。フィルム
外側の袋を開けて、内側の袋を入れて、握ると袋が破れます。それから袋を取り出して、
휴스턴, 어떻게 읽으세요? 아폴로 8
Okay. Jetzt verstehe ich, was du meinst. Ich spreche das nochmal mit den Leuten vom Fernsehen ab und frage nach ihre
罗
En fait, Bill vient de dire que la visibilité semble excellente jusqu'au terminateur. Je ne m'y attendais pas. Je pensais
Okay. E puoi anche dimenticare il "Follow-up". Okay, a pagina 17, esegui tutti gli inserimenti e a 4 minuti, abbiamo una modifica. Prima riga, CB(16) INVERTER 3, CHIUDI; riga 2, cancella "Seleziona INVERTER 1". A - proseguendo nella pagina, dopo "MONITORAGGIO ATTEGGIAMENTO", vorremmo che impostassi la SCALA DELLA VELOCITÀ su "25 gradi al secondo". Okay, proseguendo per altre quattro righe fino a "COPPIA DI BILANCIAMENTO", vorremmo disattivare "COPPIA DI BILANCIAMENTO". Questo serve a tenere i getti di accensione verso l'alto lontani dal, nel caso in cui dovessimo smorzare qualche velocit
Entrambi gli autobus sono a posto. Vediamo... la batteria numero due è scesa a 22. La prima è a 24; la terza è a 24; la batteria di riserva uno e due sono a 24; la batteria isol
Canton Com Tech, Canton Com Te
Роджер. Жителям космического корабля «Колумбия», возможно, будет интересно узнать, что сегодня в Колумбии День независимости. Вчера вечером Глория Диас из Филиппин была коронована как «Мисс Вселенная». Она обошла 60 других девушек в борьбе за титул чемпионки мира по красоте. Мисс Диас 18 лет, у нее черные волосы и глаза, параметры фигуры 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. Первой вице-мисс стала Мисс Австралия, за ней следуют Мисс Израиль и Мисс Япония. Пока вы будете возвращаться во вторник вечером, в Вашингтоне будут играть команды всех звезд Американской и Национальной лиг. Ожидается, что Мел Стоттлмайр из «Янкиз» станет первым питчером Американской лиги. Пока никто не предсказывает, 
C
Roger, 11. Und wir haben noch etwa 14 Minuten bis 86:30 Uhr, also in einer Stunde. Wir fragen uns, ob Sie planen, dass 
D'accord. Gardez un d
궤도 속도에서보다 더 어렵다고 생각하지는 않습니다... 고도나 크기를 고려했을 때
계
ठीक है। इस समय मैं ऑटो, रेट्रो क
Хорошо, Вэнс. Мы немного отклонились от прямого взгляда на Луну. Джим держит камеру через окно №3. Солнце светит примерно под углом 40 градусов слева от нас, и то, что мы вам покажем через минуту, — это примерно 30 секунд сброса сточных вод, и мы просто покажем вам, как это выглядит. Это
初步数据分析表明，中央S
Okay. We'
Okay, and I assume in amon
एमएससी-2 और
罗杰。我们可以接受的俯
روجر، هيوستن. بالنسبة لتعديل الارتفاع، فإن GET الآن هو 2 
रॉजर, 11. जैसा कि आपने शायद देखा होगा, अपशिष्ट जल के निकास, ईंधन सेल की सफाई और प्राकृतिक युग्मन के कारण मोड में आपका कोनिंग कोण काफी बढ़ गया है, इसलिए लगता है कि हमें थ
Canary, Friendship Seven. Roger. Kontrollcheck abgeschlossen. Kapsel drin und
Perché vuoi usare l'attrezzo ginn
K
À l'arrière. D'accord, je vais vous dire combi
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 다음 테스트는 어제와 마찬가지로 업링크 모드를 음성 통신 없이 명령 및 범위 설정 모드로 변경하는 것입니다. 이 모드에서 약 2분 30초 동안 두 개의 테스트 메시지를 전송하겠습니다. 이 시간 동안에는 업링크가 작동하지 않습니다. 
На 2-й минуте включается А – ДВИ
D'acco
收到。你明白了，那将是最后一个排气口，它会继续排气。跳到 TIG -17 
روجر. أنبوب التصريف ممتلئ بالسائل. وصل السائل إلى منتصف الجزء الخارجي م
Eh bien, nous avons transféré - attendez - nous avons déjà transféré le vecteur d'état avant d'effectuer un 52. Donc nous allons effectuer l
Okay. We're 
حسناً. هذا صحيح
Einen Moment bitte. Ich werde dazu eine Vorhersage treff
Понял. Принято. Отлично, «Спокойствие». Мы позволим вам продолжить симуляц
Gyroscopes n
はい、そうしました。バスタイのモータースイッチを使って両方のバスの電源を入れ、バスタイのモータースイッチを外したいということですね。まず、バスに負荷がかかっていないことを確認し、次に回路ブレーカーを引いてバスの電源を切ります。モータースイッチがオンにならないようにするためです。バスタイがオンのままで、必要
네, 에드 씨, 지금 혈압 측정기를 꺼내지 
الآن، يسطع ضوء النهار على جانب جيم، ومن جانبي ما زلت أستطيع تمييز بعض النجوم. يبدو أنه بالإمكان توجيه المركبة الفضائية بحيث يكون أحد جانبيها مظلمًا، بينما الجانب الآخر مضاء بنور النهار. جانب جيم مضاء بنور النهار تمامًا الآن، بينما جانبي في الظلام. هذا من أكثر الأمور التي أدهشتني في بداية الرحلة، عندما كنت أنظر إلى اليراعات الصغيرة من الصاروخ، وألاحظ مدى الظلام وكيف يبدو المنظر. نظرت إلى جيم، فوجدته ينظ
你想让我
罗杰。
这是一个面积很大、分布很广的陨石坑；它有两个撞击坑，一
Roger. Non ho capito bene la domanda. Appena sveglio ho bevuto circa 5 sorsi d'acqua, e mi sono sveg
好的。在启动设置下，
ठीक है। 7:15 से 11:15 तक पायलट सोएगा। 8:35 बजे RKV आपको PLA और CLA की जानकारी और RKV टेप डंप भेजेगा। मेरे पास आपके लिए कक्षीय नेविगेशन अपडेट
そして、時間ベースの修正指示を時間どおり
制御をチェッ
ها ها. عرض رائع. انتظر، سأتصل بكيب. لأرى إن
أنا أعتمد على التحكم الإلكتروني في ا
Ich meine, der gesamte Benzinverbrauch wäre viel höher gewesen, als ich gedacht hätte, wissen Sie? Ich dachte, ich könnte die Simulation ungefähr erreichen... und 
रॉजर। मौसम का पूर्वानुमान है: 0.5 बादल छाए हुए, दृश्यता 10 मील, हवा की 
Deke, this is Sigma Seven. Just passing over the Yucatan pe
아니요, 그렇지 않았습니다. IGS에서 ACME로 AC 전원을 전환했을 때 경고등이 켜졌
ठीक है। मुझे सोचने दीजिए, फिर मै
等你们的火烧好了，就
サングラスをかけようと思いま
Okay. Apollo 13, Houston. I have one more little update for you, and it's another up
네, 맞습니다, 프랭크. 투구각 10도
Okay, Joe. Ich bin bereit, die Anleitung zum Einschalten des Kommandomoduls zu kopieren, wann immer du sie mir gibst. Wann wolltest du denn, ich nehme an, du wolltest Batterie
Apollo 8, Houston. State in attesa di uno dei registratori. Vorremmo che controllaste la pressione del vapore. Riteniamo che l'evaporatore primario possa essersi asciugato e, se la pressione del vapore indica un valore fuori scala, potreste chiudere la valvola di contropressione e rev
Я тоже. Я промахнулся. 
Ah, Roger, Zanzibar CapCom. Friendship Seven. Tous les fusibles sont inchangés; je n'en ai changé aucun. Le propulseur est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le système est en mode normal, automatique, gyroscopique normal. Toutes les poignées en « T » sont rentrées. Le délai de rétrogradation est normal. Le panneau de séquence est normal. Le sac d'atterrissage est désactivé. Le niveau de carburant est de 90 à 98 %. L'EPI indique un vol quasiment conforme au programme. Mon assiette est de 5 degrés à gauche, 3 degrés à d
روج
Хорошо. Панель 5: Обогреватель CB G&N, ос
Not really, Jim. It has to do with
روجر. ويقول تي/إم هنا أن قا
Roger. Solo alcune cose interessanti - ho appena fatto un NAV con la luna; il sole è proprio sulla mia traiettoria. Sono riuscito a ottenere un set su Antares e stavo lavorando sul second
Hai qualche domanda su qua
ロジャー、私と私の同胞か
Ja, ich weiß; diese Zahlen bedeuten gar nichts. Sie waren bei 99-irgendwas, als wir uns umgedreht haben; frag mich nicht, warum
الآن،... ربما يمكنك التحقق
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM trasmette in
ठी
Roger. Und was die Temperatur des Quadrocopt
रॉजर, माइक। और हाई गेन क
D
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 궤적 및 유도 상태는 양
罗杰。我有两点意见。第一，需要重新调整至首选方案；第二，将近
मैं वापस वहाँ गया और स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में देखने की कोशिश की कि मुझे क्या दिखाई देता है। वहाँ का नज़ारा अभी काफ़ी निराशाजनक लग रहा है। हो सकता है कि हमें मोटे अलाइन का इस्तेमाल करना पड़े, और अगर समय मिला तो कुछ बारीक अलाइन डॉकिंग कोणों की ग
Ich kann derzeit eine Rollbewegung nach rechts von etwa 5 Grad erkennen und habe bemerkt, dass das Periskop dunkel ist, was bedeutet, dass wir uns im dunklen Bereich befinden. Ich werde versuchen, die Ve
ठीक है। यह प्लस 11 है, /। यह 40 माइनस 163, प्लस 129, माइनस 005, 99, प्लस 00 00 0, प्लस 47016, 177 143 000 नवंबर अल्फा, प्लस 001 97 47 020 5 51 468 18 12 12 83 257 023, ऊपर 263, बाएँ 17, प्लस 11 95, माइनस 165 00 126 83 356 08, उत्तर तारे; 068 097 356, कोई उलेज नहीं। तेज़ वापसी के
ヨー角は1秒あたり約
Let me see 
アポロ8号、ヒ
Columbia, Houston im Blindflug. Hohe Vers
Okay. Mi sono dis
좋
Okay. We've tried both of those. If the circuit breaker is in when I reset the - put it in RESET, I 
Roger, Bruce. Grazie. Aspettiamo la TV. Abbiamo già
了解。更新時間と血圧をコピー
Sigma Seven, hier spricht Cape Cap Com. Sende HF, 
알겠습니다. 현재 전압은 -2 + 30이고, 회로 차단기 ESSENTIAL INSTRUMENTATION, MAIN A가
... Voglio
"عندما تكون قيمة DELTA-VX مساوي
यदि कमांड पायलट ज
Хорошо. Два выключателя — два автоматических в
Okay. B
I due commenti aggiuntivi erano semplicemente: innanzitutto, hanno distorto il DELTA-VC 
阿波罗8号，夏威夷。休斯顿
Okay, Jack. The time line between minus 02:30 and 1 hour is real crowded, so you're really go
أعتقد أن هذه مدينة كوربوس كريستي قادمة من هنا. هناك، قد تتمكن من رؤية مهبط طائرات في ا
حسنًا. بالنسبة لدرجات حرارة خزان الهيليوم: فهي غير مسجلة بجودة منخفضة، وبالنظر إلى تفريغات الشريط، فإن معظم البيانات الموجودة على الجهة الخلفية مسجلة بجودة منخفضة. لذا لن نتمكن من إعطائكم رقمًا دقيقًا، ولكن بالنظر إلى ما نحصل عليه في كل مرة نبتعد فيها عن الأنظار ونعود عبر التلة، يبدو أنه يمكنكم توقع درجة
Роджер. Что касается вашего P57, мы нем
Gemini 4, again. I see the same sort
了解。だいぶ聞き取りやすくなりました。ジムは誘導部隊への通信を続けてください。始める前に一つ質問があります。
私は今、態度照
A
Negativo. Immag
अपोलो 8, टेप रिकॉर्डर आपका है। हम
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。ロール0度で停止すると、ピッチ角約90度、ヨー角0度、ロール角0度になります。その姿勢から、最初のオプション3を実行してください。その後、0度への移動前か移動中に新しいオプションをアップリンクします。その後、プラットフォー
Mi ch
روجر، هل تريد أن تخبرنا بضغط دمك في هذه ال
了解。カナリアズまであと1分です。宇宙船の状況は良好
Roger. Puoi accendere il tuo wobulator or
Roger. Je vous reçois parfaitement. La trajectoire de vol semble bonn
Actuellement, nous volons à très basse altitude, si bien que je ne pense pas que les stations au sol puissent nous localiser. Nous avons entendu plusieurs communications intermittentes. Nous allons toutefois maintenir cette position un moment afin de garder le lanceur en vue. Il ne semble pas que nous progressions beaucoup vers lui pour le moment. Il semble rester à peu près à la même distance qu'auparavant. Lors de l'observation nocturne, lorsque le lanceur était en dessous de nous, le ciel paraissait presque entièrement étoilé. Les émanations du lanceur étaient si nombreuses qu'elles projetaient des traînées lumineuses dans le ciel. J'ai d'ailleurs fait remarquer que ces émanations ressemblaient à des étoiles. En observant attentivement le lanceur à ce moment-là, on pouvait voir le carburant – plus précisément les vapeurs blanches qui s'échappaient de son extrémité arrière – et je suppose que c'est ce qui dispersait ces petites lucioles tout autour. C'était tellement intense que cela recou
Doing just fine. The - Stand by, I'll give you the DELTA-P reading - 3.0; I need 3.5 before I can turn my thrusters b
로저. 감사합니다
... so ähnlich wie das Zodiakallicht. Es wird immer weiter entfernt. Wir werden später noch genauer dar
All right. A very interesting thing - Jim's got full daylight out his window, and I have full night out of mine. We're gradually yawing around to blunt-end-forward, and it looks like the reflection of the sun on these fireflies causes them to glow very brightly. That was the type of stars that we saw on our first dark si
Bene. E l'ultimo passaggio è selezionare la bomboletta di CO2 secondaria. La lasciamo s
Okay. "When rates are less than 0.05 degr
Okay, very good. Under "Final stowage," the 
로저. 1, G&N: 38658, -0.54, +0.65, 0.78 02 0.345, +29180, +0.3779, -0.1325; 롤 NA, 피치 0.41; 제트기 2대, 19초, 도킹 해제. 4: 38658, -0.54, +0.65, 0.84 29 5.059, +31
도중에 차단되었습
Apollo 13, Houston. Your preliminary orbit down here is 102.5 times 100.3, and every
Хорошо. Джек сообщает сверху, что видит звезды и созвездия в опт
好的。Vance，我以为你们都在列一个清单，上面写着之后要从对面搬回来的东西。清单上还有几样东西要补充，我们偷了进气软管的滤网，现在把它们
Роджер, Близн
알겠습니다. 자세 제어
पानी चालू है, केबिन का तापमान सेटिंग नंबर 2 पर है। सूट का तापमान 1.7 से ऊपर है। मैं दोहराता हूँ, 1.7 से ऊपर, जो
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह ज़ांज़ीबार कैप कॉम है। टेलीमेट्री से पता चलता है कि सभी सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहे हैं। मेड
콜럼비아, 다음번 탐사에서는 기존 방식대로 수색하는 대신, 저희가 알려드린 좌표 주변을 수색해 주시길 바랍니다. 이 좌표는 지도상의 물리적 특성과 궤적을 바탕으로 저희가 가장 정확하게 분석한 결과입니다. 또한, 탐사팀이 하강 중에 관찰한 지질학적 특징들을 종합적으로 해석하여 선정한 또 다른 좌표 주변도 수색해 주시기 바랍니다. 두 번째 좌표는 마이크 0.7과 8.0입니다. 다시 한번 말씀드립니다. 마이
हाँ। काफी अच्छा। यह सब इस बात पर 
AUTO 광
Джим, через мгновение мы предложим вам оптимальный угол наклона и порекомендуем по
Ok. Ho una domanda. Questo controllo ci dice che siamo a 14, il che equivale a un controll
Okay, Fred. Die Temperatur des ASA-Pakets sieht gut aus. Sie liegt bei etwa 98 Grad, und w
सुप्रभात, 13। तुम जल्द
로저, 빌. 상태 벡터 업데이트를 수락
こんにちは。サイトゲージを見ると…ああ、プランジャーの白いマークが、赤から緑に向
现在屏幕中央的陨石坑就
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。迈克，我们想进行一次废水排放。
Roger, Frank. We are more interested in the tank temperatures than the quad temp
Здравствуйте, Zanzibar Com Tech. Zanzibar Com Tech, Friends
ジェミ
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. نحن
— Хорошо, тяга DEL
그만... 나한테
Roger, Neil. Una delle implicazioni qui è la profondità 
سيجما سبعة. أرجو منك ال
Хьюстон, это «Аполлон-8». Я принял сообщение. У меня есть сомнени
Капитан
Die Kabine ist bereit, ich möchte die Kuppel nicht mehr absenken. Es lief alles bestens. Zeitcheck: 18 Minuten. Alles in Ordnung. Schubdüsen: Rollen links (automatisch): 119 Grad. Rollen rechts (automatisch): 115 Grad. Rollen links (manuell): 100 Grad. Kabinenwärmetauscher: 43 Grad. Nicken (automatisch): 95 Grad. Nicken (automatisch): 95 Grad. Gie
Hey, Charlie, I can see the snow on the
범위/
Ok, Jack. Vediamo se ci sono riuscito. Quello che facciamo è puntare la sonda verso la Terra come abbiamo fatto per la rotta intermedia, e tracciamo un'allineamento dell'asse del corpo sulla... Poi ci dai un assetto della palla per volare verso... la..., e poi noi... puntiamo... la Luna. Poi aggiorneresti la... ci daresti delle unità di
아주 잘됐네요. 제가 숨 쉬고 있다는 건 
D'accord. Nous pouvons reporter cette observation NAV. Elle était prévue à cette heure-ci, et nous pouvons la reporter. Vu vos commentaires concernant le sommeil, nous aimerions l'effectuer dès que possible, e
좋아, 덤프하러 가자. 
그럼 지금부터 1
よし。重さは45701、マイナス040、プラス157、プラス32346、マイナス01168、プラス05730。ここまでは分か
Ce sera probablement un test d'observation 
Это Гавайский Капитолийский корпус, э
You're still looking good and 
По
あれは、私
حسناً، إنها 
«Аврора Севен», сократите потребление воды в своей каю
Roger, Guaymas, alles klar und deutlich. Mein Steuermodus ist jetzt Fly-by-Wire; die Gyroskope sind deaktiviert, ich bin drin – Manöver sind ausgeschaltet. Ich gehe direkt in den Automatikmodus. Mein Status ist gut; der Kapselstatus ist gut. Der Treibstoffstand liegt bei 69-69 Prozent, der Sauerstoffgehalt bei 88-100 Prozent. Die Temperaturanzeige a
私が「はい、交代する準備はできましたか？」と尋ねたところ、彼はただ「私が寝ていると思っていた」とだけ言い
さあ、ヒューストン。アポ
I don't think so. I think he came 
Okay. Das ist richtig. Auf Seite 2
D'accord. C'est exact. L
حسنًا. أقولها مرة أخرى - حسنًا. ل
한 분
Vuoi che PROCEDI ancora una vol
Вы видите эт
Ok
こん
ヒューストン、もう一つ質問があります。本当にASAブ
Nous avons un bon nombre de S-6. Nous avons eu quelques observations éparses de S-5... des photos, mais nous avons besoin d'au moins un survol des États-Unis, et nous aimerions un autre au-dessus de l'Afrique du Nord si nous pouvons
看起来态度很端正，看看
Hello, Houston. How do you read
我们得尽快把卷筒
Роджер. Мы про
알겠습니다, 짐. 이제 두 부분으로 나눠서 설명해 드리겠습니다. 첫 번째는 사령선 모듈 장비 이송이고, 두 번째는 그 반대로 사령선 모듈에서 장비로의 이송입니다. 두 부분 모두 발사 시 적재
ठीक है। अगर मैं आपको सही समझ रहा हूँ, तो इससे मुझे सक्रियण पूर्ण होने पर आगे ब
카나리아,
Roger. Sto usando il controllo parziale in modalità fly-by-wire a bassa velocità. Acquisirò il controllo quando 
Columbia, Houston. On those P76's, a friendly reminder from your FIDO: add half the burn 
Хорошо, Майк. Мы попросили вас отсоединить желтый разъем от преобразователя сигнала и убедиться, что он в порядке, затем снова
Roger. Die Adressen 24, 53 und 54 sind alle n
네, 프레드. 잠시 기다려 주세요. ACS에서 시술을 진행하는 것에 대해 논의해 왔습니다. 현재로서는 ACS
ジェミニ4号、こちらヒューストンCAP COMです。オーバー
Okay. Vance, ich glaube, ich habe verstanden, dass ihr eine Liste mit Dingen zusammengestellt habt, die wir später wieder mitnehmen wollten. Ich möchte noch ein paar Punkte hinzufügen: Wir haben die Ansaugschlauchsiebe au
Roger. Ich habe gehört, dass du bald 3 
Aquarius, delete the set, gimbal/throttle test. Just ensure that the DECA POWER and the DECA GIMBAL
حسناً. كلمة واحدة هي أن - بطريقة مثالية هناك، فإن المرور بعمل
好
Хорошо. Первым делом, после того как вы подготовитесь к выполнению этого контрольного списка, нужно установить баллоны с гидроксидом лития и убрать их. На панели 8 нам нужно перевести ПРОЖЕКТОРЫ в пол
أنت قادم 
我们只有 4
좋습니다. 기록을 위해 말씀드리자면, 흥미롭네요. 이 안개층이 대기광 필터를 통해 매우 밝게 보입니다. 정말 
Ну, я подумал о... затворе или чем-то подобном, а потом решил, что он может понадобиться нам позже дл
ठीक है, जैक। आपको याद होगा कि पहले सभी ने चंद्रमा अस्त होने से कुछ मिनट पहले उसे देखने की बात कही है, और जब आप वहाँ पहुँचेंगे तब तक क्षितिज शायद अँधेरा होगा; आप सुबह जल्दी प्रवेश कर रहे हैं; और पश्चिम से आने पर भी आपको अँधेरा क्षितिज ही दिखाई देगा। तो, एक बैकअप तकनीक के तौर पर, जैसे आप क्षितिज को ट्रैक करते हैं, हम आपको एक एटीट्यूड देंगे जो पैड पर होगा ताकि आप सीधे चंद्रमा को देख सकें। यह एक इनर्शियल एटीट्यूड है; यह बदलेगा नहीं, और आप 36-डिग्री विंडो लाइन को चंद्रमा पर रखेंगे, और फिर बस वहीं बैठकर उसे देखेंगे। और ठीक पहले, पृथ्वी ऊपर आएगी और उसे ढक लेगी, और तब आपको क्षितिज का अच्छ
了解しました。今朝のアポロに関する大きなニュースの中に、大きなウサギを連れた愛らしい少女に注目してほしいというものがあります。古代の伝説によると、チャンオという名の美しい中国の少女が
Прошёл все 6, на 7 вы выбыли. Повтор
收到，七号，我听到你声音微弱
चलो, जैक, अगर हो सके तो एक घंटे तक शूटिंग क
Roger, Bill. Nous avons ici un tas de cassettes de vos
いいえ、チャーリー。
Сегодня миссис Роберт Годдард сказала, что ее муж был бы так счастлив. «Он бы не кричал и ничего такого. Он бы просто сиял». Она добавила: «Это была его мечта —
알겠습니다. 이 점을 알려드리고 비행 계획에 어떤 영향을 미칠지 생각해 보시길 바랐습니다. 달에 대한 광각
Okay, Bill. I guess I want to belay my last about using the onboard state vector for 4. After looking at it some more on the ground, they've got to get going on making the 's and doing all their computations, and rather than put it off or do it twice, we're going to go ahead and go with the procedures we've been using all along. On the lunar orbit stuff, we've been looking it over and we got several guys - Jack Schmitt and company in the back room - looking at what effect your windows have. And, basically, it looks like there's two options that will make an impact on that 2. One of the options, of course, will be just to have you and Jim change seats and let Jim look out and get his SAM that way, and another option will be to roll the bird over and let Jim point the optics as far forward as he can get them and take his SAM through the telescope. And I guess we'd like to have any thoughts that you folks have on what you think you can do with the windows; if you have anything, we'd like to factor it into our thinking and go ahead and firm up our plans as early as we c
確認。「押
Ok, allora voglio
Bene. Questa è la configurazione che vogliamo per te, ed ecco cosa stiamo pensando. Quando sia
That's affirm. I'm going to first of all just quickly run through the times of the major events, and then we'll go back and fill in some of the details. Okay. Entry interface is at 142 hours 40 minutes; 6-1/2 hours, roughly prior to that or at about, we'll start this whole thing going by applying HEATER POWER, by checking the CM/ temperatures and preheating the CM/ if required, and we suspect we'll probably want to do that. We'll have detailed procedures up for it later. At about 6 hours prior to or about, we will commence powering up the, powering up the, using the modified / 30-minute checklist, which you have used for the previous midcourse. Then shortly, just before 5 hours, prior to or at about, we'll want you in the attitude for a body axis alinement, using the Earth terminator like we did before; and as soon as we have that, we'll perform -7, which looks like, now, about a 2-foot-per-second burn or about 15 seconds of. And I'm told that it's down to 1-1/2 now, so it's comfortably within the margin. Okay. When we do that, we'll immediately start the maneuver to the service module jettison attitude, which will be in plane since we're jettisoning it earlier than we usually do. We don't need, and don't want, the out-of-plane component. So it'll be in plane with the service module pointed back out along the radius vector. We will then commence to get the command module ready for service module SEP, including command module checkout and hot fire, and at approximately 4 hours and 30 minutes prior to or, we'll jettison the service module. We'll pitch the up until we aquire the service module in the... and try and get some photographs, but we're not going to fool around with translation maneuvers for pictures because we don't want to screw up - foul up your flight path angle at that time. Okay. That gives us 2 hours to - of more or less open time here to finish up, if we're late on that, to go on over to checklist and prepare for powering up the command module. We're going to start the command module full powerup at minus 2 hours and 30 minutes or. We'll get the computer on the line, we'll get the up, we'll start uplinking your state vectors, and so forth, and alining the command module platform. At about 1 hour and 30 minutes at the latest, giving us an hour to do this command module stuff, we will start the maneuver to the jettison attitude. You'll then start to close out the . Of course, we don't have our stowage all configured way before this. We'll close the hatch, do a pressure integrity check, and at minus 1 hour, or 141 hours and 40 minutes, we'll jettison the. As soon as we do that, you can start the maneuver to the entry attitude. When you're there, do a sextant star check, take down the optics, and at that point we'll be giving you your final entry pad. You can initialize the , and you'll essentially be right back on the checklist at that point. There's one - one little difference from your nominal entry. You're a little bit earlier in the morning, so it going - it's going to be nighttime when you get to. However, we're fortunate enough to h
Comment faire la différence entre l
Bien. Bien. Le chancelier ouest-allemand Willy B
Roger. All syst
रॉजर। जिम, सामान्यतः यह स्वचालित रूप से होता है; और यदि आपने निर्धारित समय पर ही कार्य किया होता, तो यह हो जाता, लेकिन कुछ संदेह के कारण इसे संक्रमण बिंदु से लगभग 7 मिनट पहले रोक दिया गया था और पूरी तरह स
Ядро 03,33649; Ядро 04,64690; Ядро 65,01059; Ядро 66,65460; Ядро 07,34726; Ядро 08,40866; Ядро 09,31745; 
이글과 컬럼비아, 컬럼비아에서 약 1분 거리입니다. 약 51.5
11, Houston. Die Sanitäter an der Nachbarkonsole berichten, dass die Spitzmaus zu den Tieren gehört, die innerhalb von 24 Stunden das Sechsfache ihres 
Сейчас мы считываем 60 единиц в секунду впе
Ширина луча антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления
أعتق
Apollo 11, qui Houston. S
收到。LMP读数为0
और आपकी जानकारी के लिए, कोलंबिया, आप ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस के साथ वीएचएफ लाइन ऑफ स
Roger. A propo
휴스턴, 컬럼비아, OMNI D, 델타
المفتاح مطفأ. يرجى العلم أنني خفضت ا
Roger, io e te abbiamo trasmesso un carico TR e Gemini per la tua manovra su Corpus. 
आगे बढ़ो, आरकेवी।
好的。我去PULSE是因为我想在站台上更
Роджер. Они проплывают мимо тебя или парят вместе
Bien reçu. Vous avez OAMS sur la plateforme Aline. Est-ce b
250 是 143 度。过去 40 分钟里大概升了 2 度。150 大概是 105 度。待机温度大概是，哈哈，110 度吧
روجر، هيوستن. +
Die Hochleistungstriebwerke funktionieren gut, die genaue Nachf
المدفأة مطفأة. لم نقم بفحص المدفأة. لا بأس. لم نكن بحاجة إليه على أي حال. كانت درجة الحرارة 
Sì. L'impatto è avvenuto a 74 miglia nautiche di distanza e la sismica passiva ha rilevato una forte attività sismica su tutti i canali a lung
我们会切换到你的实验模式，然后我们会四
نحن الآن عند 3+34. ندخل في الظلام. تسطع أشعة
Роджер, командир аэропорта Кантон.
Это «Сигма Семь». Я чувствую себя великолепно и наконе
11, Houston. Could 
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。同じ
Нет, ещё нет — подожди, пока погаснет свет. Эта штука хотела… Эй, я не знал, что она может так делат
这是Sigma Seven。我现在处于自动模式，反向姿态。手动比例控制
了解。そして0時40分頃、C再突入からCOMMAND
好的。我们还
11番、ロジャー。ここ数回の計測では、全てのマークが良好だったとい
Roger. Still 
حضّرنا ثلاثة أكواب من القهوة اليوم. الكوب الأخير - كما تعلم، بعد أن سخنت جميع الأنابيب، بما في ذلك جهاز التسخين الهيدروجيني - كان أدفأها. لا أعرف من شربه - نيل، هل شربته أنت؟ كيف كانت قهوت
Und in Italien hat Papst Paul VI. in seiner Sommerresidenz eine spezielle Farbfernseh
Gemini 4, RKV
検閲済み -
अपोलो 8, यहाँ काम शुरू करने से पहले, हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप ऑप्टिक्स को रीज़ीरो करें और हमें मैकेनिकल सीडीयू पढ़कर स
Ecco un piccolo articolo interessante che fa piacere sentire. Sembra che ad Ann Arbor, nel Michigan, abbiano una nuova gang giovanile. Si chiama Gilnet Gang. Si aggira per le strade di Ann Arbor, agendo in segreto e a volte aggirando la legge. Si fanno chiamare Guerillas for Good. Tra le cose che hanno fatto c'è stata quella di dipingere un ponte coperto di oscenità. L'hanno dipinto una notte. Una casa inagibile – popolare tra i bambini del quartiere, ma pericolosa – è stata sbarrata con assi di legno. Le fioriere del centro, rimaste vuote a causa di un dibattito su quale gruppo fosse responsabile, tra aziende o governo, sono state riempite di fiori. Una siepe, ritenuta ostruire la visuale, a un incrocio trafficato, è stata potata e il proprietario si è infuriato. I rifiuti lungo un tratto del fiume Huron sono stati raccolti. I membri della gang sono adolescenti anonimi che non chiedono alcun riconoscimento individuale. Il loro scopo è quello di eliminare la burocrazia, di otte
Хорошо. Как я уже понял, мы берём серую ленту и складываем её так, чтобы задняя сторона приклеивалась к внешней стороне контейнеров, затем прикрепляем к ней четыре стороны наших... карточек, как наши...
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Когда будете готов
Хорошо. Я просто постараюсь все это время 
Да, это так, но вы все равно ограничены определенной п
Okay. Und im Moment sieht es so aus, als ob... im Moment sieht es so aus, als ob das Kommandomodul nicht 
... si è allontanato pa
약 2분 동안 산소 공급량을 높여 압력을 정상 범위로 낮췄습니다. 현재 압력은 985이고, 기내 압력은 5.6으로 유지되고 있
Apollo. 8, this is Hou
砂漠の真下に黒い炎が見えます。どこから出ているのか、その源まではっきりと見えます。そ
सब कुछ 
Wunderbar. Das Wette
你想什么时候做……请告
Nous avons un débit binaire élevé; nous som
هل حصلت على أي بيانات الآن يا هيوستن؟ أعتقد ذلك. حسنًا. أرى أنك أوقفت التسجيل إذ
Okay, I want to go to DUMP an
Roger. J'essaie de
साफ-साफ सुनो। मैं एसेन्ट बैटरी की जांच करने जा रहा हूँ। क्या आप मेरे बायोमेड की भी थोड़
Могу сказать, что сейчас мы видим круглый мешок, который находится прямо за Фредом, в котором лежит наш вакуумный шланг; а когда мы вернемся внутрь, мы отсоединим вакуу
11, это Хьюстон. 5 SPS/G&N: 37201, минус 060, плюс 
حسنًا يا فريد. وعندما تختار - عند استبدال الخرطوشة الأساسية، لا تعيد اختيار "أساسي". ابقَ على "ثانوي" حتى نستخدم
ロジャー、チャーリー。塩素処理の状況をお知らせします。コンパートメントB4には、塩素アンプルと緩衝液アンプル用のポケットが1、2、3、4、5、6、7…訂正します。8つのポケットがあり、そのうち1つは常に空で、残りは6つです。反対側のB7には、7つのポケットが付いた別の容器があります。つまり、合計7つと6つです。そこには塩素6種類と緩衝液7種類が入っています。さて、私は1日に塩素1種類と緩衝液1種類を使っています。つまり、これから行う塩素処理の前に、塩素1種類と緩衝液2種類が残っているということです。塩素が1種類足りないようです。それでは、最後の容器を使った塩素処理を、例えば明日など、後日延期してはどうでしょうか
君たち
Resterò in atte
हाँ। हम बस इतना चाहते थे कि प्लस-एक्स थ्रस्टर्स को निष्क्रिय करने से पहले और अंत में मिन इम्पल्स पर जाने से पहले, हम
Très bie
لا. لا، هذا مستقل 
ठीक है, जेमिनी VIII। ज़मीन से देखने पर यह ठीक लग रहा है। हम कोन रिजिड मोड दिखा 
Хорошо. И еще одно изменение: вскоре после этого, при настройке на сброс, мы закрыли как передний, так и верхний сливной клапаны. Мы не хотим оказаться в таком заблокированном положении, поэтому один из способов обойти это — после закрытия переднего сливного клапана перекрыть клапан 
Affermativo. Ora probabilmente digiterai 37 ENTER 06 ENTER sul computer. Quello che vogliamo fare è mettere il computer in standby; se
Утвердительный нас
杰瑞，过一会儿我想尝试一下基于负移动平均线的小练习。
روجر، التوقيت في ألفا هو 01:36:13، مع توقيت غرينتش 14:21:30. و
ヒュー
क्या कप्तान अब बिस्
アポロ11号、Sバンドが途切れたら、OMNIチャーリーをお願いします。前回の報告を更新します。77 04はアリスタルコスが地平線上に現れるはずの時刻です。77 12はその南
Ça a l'air d'un très bon endroit. D'accord. Je suis sûr qu'on en reparlera, Bill. Mais pour l'instant, ce sont les
C'est exact.
Bien. Nous allons effectuer quelques vérifications de communication. Nous allons passer par cinq modes différents, et un seul d'entre eux interrompra vos activités. Dans ce cas précis
收到。复述得很详细。好的，继续。第6页什么都没有；第7页什么都没有。第8页和第9页什么都没有。第10页和第11页什么都没有。在第12
짐, 말씀하신 내용을 잘 들었습니다. EVA 시 자세는 원래 계획하셨던 
休斯顿，
Die Temperaturen der Oxidator- und Brennstoffzuleitungen liegen bei 75 Grad und bleiben konstant. Die Temperaturen des Servicemodul-Quad-Packages schwanken zwischen 120 und 140 Grad, und es sieht so aus, als ob die Heizung normal funktioniert. Wir planen, Sie nach 2 Minuten in eine 60-Meilen-Kreisbahn zu b
حسناً. وقد تم تحديد موعد لنوم ا
R
अपने सूट, अपने पैक और अपनी रस्सी की दोबार
我
في منتصف الطريق، يبدو أن لدي... درجات في اللفة، هذ
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous vous demandons de choisir l'option 1 et de vous positionner comme indiqué
약 15시간 정도 걸릴
Quindi nessun problema. Hai superato il limite nominale per tutti i tuoi materiali di consumo. Per quanto riguarda il problema del serbatoio di H2, abbiamo una procedura che vorremmo che tu eseguissi: basta spegnere i riscaldatori del serbatoio di H2 2 in questo momento, e vogliamo vedere se questo non risolverà il 
أعرف ذلك، أعرف ذلك — 295. درجة حرارة A — 87. ضغط A — 3000. درجة حرارة B — 82. ضغط B — 2650. الأميتر الرئيسي — 19. رقم 2 — 19.5. 1A —
わかりました。「ドッキン
左手の窓の外は比較的平坦な平原で、直径5～50フィート（約1.5～15メートル）のクレーターがかなり多く、尾根もいくつかある。高さは20～30フィート（約6～9メートル）と推測される小さなもので、その周囲には文字通り1～2フィート（約4～6メートル）の小さなクレーターが何千個も点在している。数百フィート先には、おそらく60センチほどの大きさで、縁が角張った角
——门
Apollo 8, ici Houston. La batterie 
シグマ・セブン、
Ok. Capito. Ora conside
فريندشيب سفن، برمودا كاب كوم. كيف تقر
Oui, c'est sûr - la façon dont ça fonctionnait - la façon dont ça fonctionnait et restait verrouillé jusqu'au bout - Wa
Okay. Thank you
Bene. Abbiamo completato il dump e il registratore è tuo, abbiamo ascoltato la riproduzione vocale dei dati della chiamata e ti è stato dato il via libera per il tuo primo t
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir haben noch etwa eine Minute bis Carnarvon, und alles sieht gut aus mit de
रॉजर। चंद्रमा की हमारी यह यात्रा आपको शायद सरल या आसान लगी हो। मैं आपको आश्वस्त करना चाहता हूँ कि ऐसा बिल्कुल नहीं
Roger. Nous allons commencer par 
Gemini 4
At. Bit of in a rolled over attitude with the nose fairly high.... the light value (setting) was
了解。シグマ・セブン。グアイマス・キャップ通信。はっきりと聞こえます。カリフォルニア方面で停電が発生しました。あなたの逆シーケンス時間は正しく読み取れています。さあ、確認しましょう。あなたの
और अभी इसमें काफी स
Bon, je suis toujours en mode SLEW, donc on risque de perdre de l'altitude en cabrant progressiv
सही
血圧が上昇中で
Roger. Ho capito che ve
Sind die Ster
俯仰配平值
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह कैंटन 
我真是迫不及待地想去海角。看来我
La vue à travers ce sextant est fantastique. Je peux voir l'Alaska juste au large, et je pointe actuellement le réti
Yes. It impacted 74 nautical miles from the and the passive seismic detected major seismic activity on all long per
로저. 당
Ici Friendship Seven, en direct de nuit. Un instant. Friendship Seven, en direct de nuit, effectue des observations nocturnes. Il semble y avoir une couche nuageuse très élevée au-dessus de l'horizon, bien plus haute que tout ce que j'ai pu observer de jour. Les étoiles semblent la traverser avant de redescendre vers l'horizon. Elle paraît avoir une largeur d'environ 7 ou 8 degrés.
Roger. 033 0000, links 17, plus 0883, minus 16500 12955 36185; Sirius, Rigel 129, 155 010, Gasfüllung zwei Düsen, 20 Sekunden, Vierergruppen 
रॉजर, ह्यूस
Roger. At your conve
ي
हम
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストンです。その時は何も言っていませんでした。現在、いくつかの角度から検討を進めています。先ほど睡眠サイクルの調整についてご質問がありましたが、その点についてはご指摘の通りです。月周回軌道に入るま
Следует отметить, что в 3:26:33 я наблюдаю в небе одновременно 10 частиц. Они, несомненно, кажутся мне светящимися. Они выглядят как маленькие кусочки инея. Однако некоторые из них находятся очень-очень далеко. Две из них выглядят так, будто находятся на расстоянии около 100 ярдов. Я давно не включал двигатель. Вот две частицы ближе. Теперь показания денсиметра для этих части
रॉजर। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। तीस मिनट की रिपोर्ट जारी है। केबिन का दबाव 5.6 है और स्थिर है
Хорошо, Водолей; Хьюстон. 
あり
That's affirmative. Once we get that alined and get a time hack on it, the good people down here will be able to give us -, 8-ball attitudes for the service module separation attitude, for the command module alinement attitude, which we are going to pass you up the - a Moon/Sun -type alinement. We'll have 8-ball attitudes for 
Сейчас прямо перед космическим аппаратом виднеется интересная ручейка, тян
水瓶座
Et toi, Houston, l'ordinateur est à toi, tu peux aller su
Du bist immer noch laut und deutlich zu hören auf D, Fred. Bit
कार्नरवॉन, नेटवर्क GOSS कॉन्फ्रेंस वॉइस चेक। आप कैसे पढ़ते ह
मिश्रण अनुपात में बदल
فهمت كلامك بوضوح تام. إنه
E Houston, 13. La pressione del serbatoio di O2 numero 1 è ora inferiore a 30
That's a negative, Jack. According to the latest update, we've got ampere-hours out 
D'accord, Jack. La plage horaire entre -2:30 et 1 he
Affermativo. Il controllo delle perdite del radiatore secondario è previsto nel piano di volo alle 71:20. La procedura è elencata nel vostro manuale delle operazioni di lancio a pagina 29, L29. Vorremmo modi
ठीक है। आज के लिए, हम चाहेंगे कि आप अवलोकन से पहले और बाद में भी ट्रनियन बायस का निर्धारण क
عاد جهاز Tr-10 إلى وضعه الطبيعي. لقد فعلت ذلك سابقًا. حسنًا، حصلنا على ضغط البدلة. تفضل بإلقاء نظرة أخرى على العواكس هنا. 250 تساوي 141 درجة، و150 تساوي حوالي 107 درجات. هذا جيد. وضع الاستعداد هو... 7. قريب جدًا من درجة حرارة الجو. سلبي، بل أقل قليلًا... ضغط المقصورة حوالي 5.3 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة، وهو مثالي. درجة حرارة قبة البدلة 72 درجة. درجة حرارة قبة المقصورة 45 والمقصورة مستقرة. درجة حرارة الب
Ich weiß es nicht. Hast du deinen
All right. My--I am at 01 19 02. Have been several times completely disoriented. There, I have Cassiopeia d
रॉजर। एसीए के डिटेंट से बाहर निकलने से काम नहीं बना क्योंकि मोड कंट्रोल स्विच बंद
This is Friendship Seven. Yaw drifted out of limits about 20 degrees to the right. I'm bringing it b
哎呀，那些窗户真
روجر. عند 123 زائد 00،
はい、そうです。
रॉजर। मौसम का पूर्वानुमान है: 0.5 बादल छाए हुए, दृश्यता 10 मील, हवा की गति 3 नॉट और उत्तर दिशा से
Хорошо; мы только что в последний раз
Ro
了解。フレンドシップ・セブンです。ジャ
Oh, ça a l'ai
Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон. Рычаг датчика уровня находится на отметке 8 п
Sì, va bene. Okay. E abbiamo un altro commento riguardo alla checklist dei sistemi, e resta in attesa 1, e questo è tutto per noi. Oh, è arrivato un nuovo elemento, Jac
हैलो, कानो। हैलो, कानो कैप कॉम। ऑरोरा सेवन यूएचएफ लो। आप कैसे 
حسناً. جيد جد
कैंटन जल्दी आ र
알겠습니다. 수산
تطهير خلايا الوقود في 8 دقائق و8 ثوانٍ - تصحيح، هذ
हां, हां। धिक्कार है, वहां सब कुछ - मानो चिं
Боже, я очень разочарован этой оп
And you are GO for. Huntsville reports that you ha
حسنًا، ما هو الوضع الذي تستخدمه على جهاز ال
रॉजर। और मुझे कुछ और बातें पता हैं, माइक। हमें इस समय बैटरी बी का चार्ज बंद करना होगा, और साथ ही, छिटपुट गरज-चमक के कारण हमारे लक्षित लैंडिंग पॉइंट पर मौसम बहुत खरा
Yes. Okay, the first four or five thin
好的。我划掉第6
Gemelli 4, Chirurgo Canarino
로저, 프랭크, 메인 루프 온도 측정값은 모두 정상입니다.
… Roger, Houston
좋습니다. 31816 302 31624 40 2699 396 033, 하강 054, 좌측 21, 플러스 0810 제어 마이너스 16500 12968 36222; 정렬은 동일하게 유지됩니다. 
То, что находи
Okay, MARK. Four minutes on
ठीक है, फ्रेड। दो-तीन बातें। पहली बात, हमें डॉकिंग एंगल चेक चाहिए, जितनी जल्दी हो सके, जब भी आपको सुविधा हो। दूसरी बात, अगर आपक
...en regardant en 
Bene. In basso, dopo "Pulsante PRINCIPALE DI DISTRIBUZIONE, PREMERE; SERBATOIO DI SOVRALIMENTAZIONE O2, OFF; e RIPRENDI 
Roger. Mon état e
네, 그런 것 같아요. ORB 레이트가 그대로 전달되는 방식일 것 같은데, 예를 들어 급하게 급선회하면 기수를 80도 아래로 내리거나, 기수를 완전히 멈추거
Roger. Nos disjoncteurs à bras séquentiels et nos deux circuits logiques séq
Последние пару дней ездил верхом на ва
D'accord. L'étape suiv
حسنًا، قبل أن أخلد إلى النوم يا جو، أريد فقط أن
ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP COM。
Хорошо. Этот пролёт — обновление того, что мы вам предоставили вчера, поэтому обратите внимание, что это второй пролёт. И это будет пролёт /; 62970, минус 162, плюс 129, плюс 00966, плюс 00552, минус 02079. Крен, тангаж и рыскание равны нулю, ноябрьская Альфа, высота перигея плюс 00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013, вверх 047, вправо 39, плюс 1418 минус 16505 12904 36160, главная звезда Сириус, вторичная Ригель, 136 310 340, нет пустого пространства, требуется перенастройка на предпочтительное
يا
알겠습니다. 비행 계획에 그런 것들이 포함되어 있나요? 예
罗杰，Rev 33，运行 4，开始时间 19
La moitié de mon hublot est noire, l'autre moitié est légèrement éclairée par le soleil. Le soleil brille sur le nez du vaisseau spatial, je dois donc regarder par-dessus cet objet lumineux. Je ne vois aucune étoile, et je n'en ai jamais vu en plein jour… c'est bien mieux au lever du soleil, quand la moiti
这里是卡纳维拉尔
そうだと思います。トンネル周辺の外装にひび割れが見られます。遮熱カバ
高いゲインを得ようと努力しているとき、2 つの正面の窓のうちの 1 つに部分的に太陽光を
네, 플러그를 전부 꽉 조이고 전선도 다 확인했는데, 이상 없어 보입니다. 다른 사람들이 깨어나면, 왜 깨어나는지 알려주시면, 더 꼼꼼하게
좋아요. 제가 한번 해볼게요. 이
D'accord. Êtes
떠나기 전에 FAO에 여쭤보시겠어요? 제가 브리핑받지 못한 내용인데, 거기에 적힌 E5와 그 문자, 숫자
Wir empfehlen Ihnen, das Anzugventil auf Position 3 zu stellen un
52-دلتا 115. 2+25. 23 5
伟大
Okay, Jim. That's a good readback, and in the event of lost COMM, use the procedures that I gave you. It may be that between now and tomorrow these procedures will change a little bit, so we'll go w
I hear you well. Please talk a little bit lower. Do you read me
Yes. Those Astros have really been catching those flies since they put a roof on 
七号，你的信号正在迅速减弱。这次我将以盲播的方式为1区查理进行广
わか
ビルは
分かりました。ステップ7。ブレーカーパネル11、ACバスB、ヘリウムガス圧力表示、閉。メイン - ブレ
حسنًا. أن
了解。
Roger, j'ai eu un petit moment de flottement en repassant au réglage 3, mais je n'y 
Wenn Sie das nächste Mal den primären Sauerstoffdruck reduzieren, senken Sie ihn bitte vollständig auf etwa 800 psi ab. Wir können leider nicht viel mehr tun. Reduzieren Sie den Druck einfach weiter, um einen g
I t
Okay. Und dann, etwa drei Meter weiter, liegt ein noch größerer, sehr runder Felsen. Der Felsen, der Ihnen am nächsten ist, ragt etwa 30 Zentimeter aus dem Sand. Er ist u
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们将持续为B电池充电，直到进入休眠期。届时我们将停止充电。另外，飞行计划中大约12点25分的位置原本计划为A电池
Okay. Um das Freizeichen später zurückzugeben,, NOUN 01, ENTER; 3011, EN
Roger. E quanto lontano riesci a vedere l'estensione della 
हम अ
... sopra l'Africa ho scattato una f
रॉजर। हमारी भंडारण सूची के अनुसार, लैंडिंग साइट ऑब्लिक ट्रांसफर बैग में होनी चाहिए। लेकिन बैकअप डेटा सेट में, इंटरमीडिएट स्केल ऑब्लिक चंद्र लैंडमार्क बुक में है, और लार्ज स्केल ऑब्लिक चंद्र सतह मानचित्र बुक के पीछे है; और यही कारण है कि हमें लगता है कि वे शायद
D'accord, à votre convenance, nous vous demandons de bien vouloir effectuer un relevé de température cabine et de le consigner dans votre carnet de vol après le vol. Nous
Houston, per t
रॉजर। समझ गया। मैं - हम पहले एंटारेस जाएंगे और कोशिश करेंगे। आपको पता है, हमने
O2 partial pressure is fluctuatin
Nur zu
Have you tried your c
Well, there's such a great tende
... 나는 그것이 작은 쪽 끝 너머로 보이는 것을 보았는데, 그쪽
존, 기억이 안 나네. 양력 벡터가 위쪽으로 향하는 건지 아니면 머리
Okay, wir gehen jetzt zu O2 High Rate über. Ich
Снимать там с этим оборудованием было сложно... но в целом всё было нормально. Мы пытались сделать несколько снимков... но мне так и не удалось получить удовлетворительные результаты 
你是打算先从这个流程开始，还是先从这30分钟的流
Lo farò.
حسنًا. الوقت هو - سيكون الحدث في؛ وعلينا المناورة للوصول إلى الوضعية التالية: دوران 101.0، ميل 90.0، انحراف صفري. ستكون زوايا الكسب العالي هي ميل ناقص 23، انحراف 93. وعلينا استخدام الإجراءات العادية لتخميد المعدلات. وبعد تخميد المعدلات وقبل بدء الدوران، علينا و
La risposta è affermativa e abbiamo aggiunto gli avvistamenti di stelle extra a quello 
我们
80、
我拍了两张照片——4
正解です。これで設定は完了です。この回路のブレーカー保護により、利用可能な電流は15アンペアに制限されます。とはいえ、これでかなり使えると思います。また、アンビリカルケーブルは高温になりますので、ゲージでMAIN Bを選
ديك، أخيراً فهمت الأمر. بدأت أشعر ببعض البرودة. وانخفضت درجة حرا
Hey, Neil, you see any need for keeping t
रॉजर, बज़। यह एक प्रविष्टि PAD, MPL है, जो रोल 05, 35 से शुरू होती है - सुधार - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, प्लस 1102, माइनस 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, संज्ञा 69, सभी चार लाइनें NA हैं। D शून्य से शुरू: 400 02 09. ब्लैकआउट का RET, 00 17 03 38 08 20. सेक्स्टेंट तारा, 02 0945 149. बोरसाइट तारा स्कॉर्पी थीटा है, यानी स्कॉर्पी थीटा। ऊपर 315, दाईं ओर 35, लिफ्ट वेक्टर ऊपर। और टिप्पणियाँ: यह एंट्री PAD मिडकोर्स 6 को नहीं मानती है। और आपकी जानकारी के लिए, अभी इसे देखते हुए, हमें जो भी ट्रैकिंग मिली है, उसके आधार पर, वह पैंतरेबाज़ी केवल एक सेकंड में एक फुट का दसवां हिस्सा होगी। इसलिए, हम शायद इसे छोड़ देंगे। हम आपको इसके बारे में बाद में और जानकारी देंगे। ठीक है। माइनस 30 मिनट 
Speriamo
はい
Roger. Thank you. He'll take a minute right
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, ici Watertown Com
11, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप अपने दृष्टिकोण से 
Я всё ещё немного запутался в этом вопросе — в активации вторичного контура. Вы указали, что его нужно отключить через 1 час или 5 минут после подключен
حسنًا، في القناة - في الصفحة 18، ​​مباشرةً بعد ذلك، كل شيء يبقى على حاله حتى بعد "الإشعال"؛ "إذا لم يكن هناك إشعال، اضغط على زر التشغيل - اضغط؛ إذا لم يكن هناك إشعال، فقم بتشغيل مفتاح تجاوز أمر محر
Ok. Per qualche motivo vuoi un fascio lumin
Роджер. И следующий пункт: скорость подъема сверхкритического гелия номинальная, и вы также задавали нам вопрос о работе ваших двигателей во время последнего запуска. Полагаю, теперь мы это понимаем, поскольку вы сообщили, что ваш тангаж был в режиме ускорения, а рыскание и крен — в режиме скорости. Вы включали двигатели тангажа. Это совместит скорости с осями рыскания и крена, и в тот момент вы удерживали мертвую зону всего в полградуса, а совм
我可以
Das ist richtig. Jack, wir haben die Stromversorgung über MAIN B sichergestellt, und all diese speziellen Verbraucher waren daran angeschlossen. Da wir uns nun darauf vorbereiten, die Stromversorgung zu sichern, wollten wir sicherstellen, dass wichtige Komponenten wie der Computer, die Plat
حسنًا، نريدك أن تحاول رؤية النجوم على الجانب المضيء 
Roger. Les calculs embarqués indiquent que nous ne sommes pas à 64 200 miles au-dessus de la Terre. Ce calcul a 
Okay. I've been not reading any voltage at all on BAT C, and the amperage looks like about 2 amps, but that could be ki
अपोलो 11, यह
这样就达到十分之二了。我觉得目前来说足够了。再降低一点
わかりました。次はパネル3です。トランスポンダをプライマリに、パワーアンプをプライマリに、これは確認です。パワーアンプを高に、モードを音声に、オフに、パ
टीटीसी - हाँ। ऐसा लगता है कि आपको
버뮤다행 항공편. 어
11, Hornet. Copie 1330,
Нет. Кейп сообщает, что вы будете вести прямую трансляцию из США. Может быть, вы хоте
着陆——安全
Аврора С
ठीक है। और हम सोच रहे हैं कि हम इसे 12 फ्रेम प्रति सेकंड की दर पर चलाना चाहेंगे। और मुझे लगता है कि हम 0.5 - 0.5 ग्रा
Roger. They report that in ground testing on spacecraft GT-2 and GT-3 this same problem was encountered and it apparently was c
ما
र
D'accord. On voulait le sortir avant la portée MAX, vous ne croyez pas? Ça vous donne une idée de 
Okay, then jump down to just about 159:28. Cross out "Maneuver to contamination field photography attitude," and all other lines below that thro
Bene. In cima alla pagina successiva, dove c'è scritto "Evaporatore secondario ad acqua", tenete presente che non prevediamo di utili
알겠습니다. 제가 다시 읽어보니 +00692, +11713, -00144가 
Gemini 4, Houston. How do you rea
ठीक है। हमारे पास जूस के कई पैकेट तैयार हैं, और हमने लगभग 20 मिनट पहले कमांड मॉड्यूल से पान
Oh, well, l
로저. 그건 잠시 보류하겠습니다. 간단한 3단계 절차였는데, "활성화 페이지 1, 1A, 2를 반복하십시오"라고 되어 있었지만, 
Tranquility Base, this is Houston. Our telemetry shows the engine arm circuit breaker in the OPEN position at the present time. We want you to leave it open until it is nomi
大约3分
27번 8.4, 83
Ok. Ho collegato un lato alla s
مرحباً، كانتون كوم تك، كانتون كوم تك، أورورا سفن. واضح تم
रॉजर। 91 प्लस 30, माइनस 7 प्रतिशत; अल्फा माइनस 8, ब्रावो माइनस 2.5, चार्ली माइनस 10, डेल्टा माइनस 6.5। H2 कुल, माइनस 2 पाउंड; ऑक्सी
了解しました。数字ははっきり読めます。少し雪が降っている
D'après les indications de puissance du signal, il semblerait que nous soyons bloqués sur un lobe secondaire avec une antenne à gain élevé. Veuillez passe
好了，我已经全部复制好
알겠습니다. 제
أوه، إنه مايكل كولين
Le sac d'atterrissage d'urgence est 
Dan
宁静，没错，我们
ठीक है, मुझे लगता है कि वे ठीक रहे, अल। मुझे लगता है कि वे अच्छे थे। मैं आप
Понял. Мы пойд
Okay. Wenn ich das richtig verstehe, Houston, müssen wir die Maschine um die eigene Achse drehen, und du gibst mir die Werte in Schritten von 9
Okay. Bene. Proviamoci
Роджер. 2 маневр, /: 46728, минус 053, плюс 121 плюс 28466 минус 00352. Я не получил 502406 для Z. 180 022 002, неприменимо, плюс 00188 28570 250 28401 42 0641 296, неприменимо три раза, плюс 0920 минус 16500 12953 36175. Нет изменений в выравнивании звезд, нет изменений в заполненности, подъем на линии минус P-градусов на отметке мин
In diesem Moment habe ich definitiv das Gefühl, mit um 90 Grad gedrehtem Flugzeug, 30 Grad nach rechts gerollt und fast direkt auf den 
Jim, damit wir während dieser Besprechung die Kommunikation verbessern können und genügend Strom zur Verfügung steht, bitten
Coming down at you in about
क्या आप लोगों ने अ
ヒューストン、アポロ8号
로저. 기분 좋고, 활력이 넘치고, 출발 준비 완료
Plan d'entrée: Mid-PAC, 000153, 000;, 178; -21,66, -165,37; 28. Les quatre colonnes suivantes sont N/A; DO = 4,00, Zebra Libra (ou similaire), Beta Libra = -8,8, g
Хорошо. Отсоедините обводной шланг; гликолевый насос отклю
Apollo 8, Houston. Stiamo per passa
Ich bin mir sicher, dass das Abhören einer Funkübertragun
ठीक है। समझ गया, हमें अमेरिका के ऊपर उड़ान 
هيوستن، كيف تقرأ أ
مرحبا
Wally，
Nein, – ja, aber wir haben es nicht bekommen
네. 제 생각에 기본적인 질문은 여기 있는 공과 창밖으로 보이는 공을 비교해 보면 그다지 이상해 보이지 
Хорошо. Мы так и сделаем. Мы еще не хлорир
Houston, hier spricht Apollo 8. Ich habe Ihren Anruf 
Apollo 13, Houston. In etwa einer Minute verlieren wir die Daten von Carnarvon. Die Spra
罗杰。由于能见度和通讯状况都很好，我们现在不用看扫描望远镜，直接用口头描述一下情况。你调整到大角星的角度非常精准。我已经把大角星对准了扫描望远镜的中心。在这
Вы видели указания? Фл
Apollo 8, attraverso il Redstone. Tutto 
Roger, Friendship S
好的，吉姆。这里是休斯顿。我们需
알겠습니다. 그럼 델타-V 프로젝트도 그 일부였죠. 그 프로젝트가 그쪽 관점을 조금이라도 높이는 데 도움이 되었으면 좋
ठीक है। हमें कमांडर की गेंद को 267.5 की पिच पर, यॉ माइनस 4.5 पर मारना है। और उस समय हमारे पास 16 20, प्लस 00120, प्लस 26750, प्लस 00
Va
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। अच्छा दिख रहा है; प्
트랭퀼리티, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 관찰하신 내용, 즉 이번 임무
好了。看来我们不用再担心排放ECS氧气的问题了，对吧？
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। मध्यमार्ग से हमारी निगरानी के आधार पर, हम गामा का मान -6.57 दिखा रहे हैं। हालांकि, यह प्रारंभिक अनुमान है, और हमें लगता है कि कुछ और ट्रैकिंग के बाद यह स्पष्ट हो जाएगा, और हम इसे कॉरिडोर में ठीक से समायोजित कर सकते हैं। यह लगभग कॉरिडोर के केंद्र में है; सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है। सोने से पहले हम आपको कुछ घंटों में एक एंट्री पैड भेज देंगे। और हमारे जनसंपर्क विभाग के मित्रों की ओर से, आपकी उड़ान के अलावा कुछ और सुर्खियाँ। आप अभी भी खबरों में छाए हुए हैं। हालांकि, आपके लिए कुछ और दिलचस्प बातें भी हैं। जैसा कि मैंने पहले बताया था, ऑल स्टार गेम बारिश के कारण रद्द हो गया था। यह कल खेला जाएगा। हालांकि, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन इसे अपनी योजना के अनुसार नहीं देख पाएंगे। हम आपको परिणामों की जानकारी देते रहेंगे। और, मौसम विभाग आपके लिए अनुकूल रहेगा। हमारा पूर्वानुमान है कि रिकवरी क्षेत्र के लिए मौसम अच्छा रहने की उम्मीद है; वहाँ मौसम बिल्कुल साफ रहेगा। राष्ट्रपति निक्सन, आपके आगमन पर स्वागत करने के लिए उड़ान भरने की तैयारी करते हुए, भविष्यवाणी करते हैं कि 31 वर्षों के भीतर मनुष्य कम से कम एक ऐसे ग्रह का दौरा कर चुका होगा जहाँ किसी न किसी रूप में जीवन मौजूद होगा। उन्होंने व्हाइट हाउस में 2000 विदेशी छात्रों को संबोधित करते हुए कहा, "वर्ष 2000 में, हम, इस पृथ्वी पर, ऐसे नए ग्रहों का दौरा कर चुके होंगे जहाँ जीवन का कोई न कोई रूप मौजूद होगा।" अपनी एक सप्ताह की यात्रा पर जाने से पहले, राष्ट्रपति ने अंतरराज्यीय वाणिज्य आयोग के पुनर्गठन के लिए अपना प्रस्ताव कांग्रेस को भेजा। उन्होंने वियतनाम से लौटने पर संयुक्त चीफ ऑफ स्टाफ के अध्यक्ष अर्ल व्हीलर से भी परामर्श किया, और इंटेलस्टेट का प्रक्षेपण रद्द कर दिया गया और इसे बुधवार को प
Okay. We're finished with the computer, it's yours, and we recommend using th
Wir haben die Agena gerade auf 090 Grad gedreht, wobei die Drehgeschwindigkeit beim Giermanöver exakt 1,5 Grad pro Sekunde betrug. Die Drehung um 90 Grad dauerte nur wenige Sekunden. Die Gemini-Plattform hat 
好的。接下来，他们将升空拍摄月球——抱歉，他们将升空拍摄服务舱并拍照，之后他们将使用ACA进行旋
알겠습니다. 수치는 55%로 표시되지
제가 이 정도만 말하면 이 녹음기가 실시간으로 작동하는 데 그리 오래 걸리지 않을 겁니다. 곧 시작될 거예요. 당신은 지금 어떤 태도를 취하고 있든 전혀 신경 쓰지 않는 게 분명하네요. 항상 원래의 태도로 돌아가려고 애쓰는 
비행 계획서를 확인해 보세요. 거기에 (
11, Houston. Present forecast shows acceptable conditions in your recovery area: 2000 foot scattered, high scattered, wind from 070 degrees, 13 knots, visibility 10 miles, and sea state about 4 feet. The forecast yesterday showed a tropical storm, Claudia, some 500 to 1000 miles east of Hawaii. The - the pictures from Earth satellites taken yesterday afternoon - afternoon showed Claudia dissipating, so this appears to be even less a factor than it was before. Your recovery area is now believed to be just a little ways north of the intertropical convergence zone, which you can probably see when you look out your windows there. Yesterday there was also a report of a tropical storm, Viola, further to the west. Its present location is some thousand miles east of the Phillipines and moving northwest. Tropical storm Viola has been intensifying, and should be transferred to the typhoon category within the next 12 hours or so; however, that will be far to your west. As a matter of fact, sunrise terminator has not yet reached Viola. When it does several hours from now, you can probably distinguish it from your viewpoint quite readily. As a matter of fact it should be of interest to per
查理
No, we haven't been able to detect any moisture anyplace in the spa
吉姆，为了方便我们进行这次简报，我们希望通信信号更好一些，而且我们完全可以腾出电力；所以请你到16
Jim, Fred-o meldete heute Abend, dass aus Fenster 1 des Kommandomoduls Gas austritt. Er berichtete außerdem von einem etwa 10 cm großen, silbernen Metallteil, das vorbeischwebte. Wir versuchen herauszufinden, ob es sich um einen neuen Gasaustritt handelt oder ob er noch von unserem ursprünglichen Problem herrührt. Hast du dazu noch etwas zu sagen? Fred-o hat außerdem Fotos gemacht, die wir ihm genehmigt haben. Er nutzte dafür die Mondoberflächenkamera 1 und stellte die Belichtungszeit au
No, va bene. Una cosa interessante, però, è che l'ultima volta che hai scaricato l'acqua, hanno notato un cambiamento nel tracciamento della traiettoria nello stesso momento e, dopo averli correlati, hanno 
Карнарво
В к
우리는 안전한 투하에 필요한 필수적인 사항들을 진지하게 검토해 봤습니까? 그렇지 않습니다. 대기권으로 진입하는 과정에서 사람들이 필요로 할 만한 공학적 데이터를 분석할 시간은 없다고 생각합
はい。パネル3にスイッチがあります。ACインバーター2をメインB
रॉजर। डॉ
Apollo 8, nous vous recevons parf
Roger. Wir haben Ihre Systemdaten zur Wiedergabe geprüft, und alles sieht gut aus. Insbesondere die Daten sehen gut aus. Ich möchte Sie jedoch
Roger, la température du dôme est actuellement d'environ 63 degrés et se maintient assez stable. Je 
Apollo 8, Houston. Wenn wir sagen, wir schalten den Sekundärkreislauf ein, meinen wir, dass wir nur den Verdampfer im Sekundärkreislauf einschalten
-- 그리고 분리의 충격, 즉
Gemini 4，Ca
Roger. Bei Stern 02: Wo zwei Sätze abgedruckt si
أعتقد أنه من الأفضل تجربة المظلة. قمتُ بإنزالها يدويًا على ارتفاع 25 قدمًا (1000 قدم). وهي ثابتة، وقد تم إنزالها
ماذا تريد أن تفعل؟ 
好的，水瓶座，我们将使用自
روجر. لا بأس. سنقول لك
Yes. That is right. We are requesting the lunar near horizon as per th
Я продолжу с 9
ठ
你好，阿
من المتوقع أن ترتفع إلى مستوى أعلى بكثير في 
المجل
好的。您希望我们使用 AUTO 模式而不是 
Roger, Buzz. Abbiamo notato la stessa cosa. È molto simile a guardare una luce che illumina qualcosa come una palla da biliardo o da bowling. Si vede questo punto luminoso nel blu dell'acqua, che assume una tonalità grigia
先に進み、現在作業中の残りの部分を削除し、姿勢に戻り、フライト プランに指定されている場所から再開してください。
わからない。まだ暑くて汗もかいてるけど、それほど不快じゃない。このスー
11, Houston. Nous avons quelques articles pour vous: des tablettes d'entrée, des consommabl
Я тянул, и ты опускалась всё ниж
了解しました。CB BAT A、POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDINGを続けて開き、INVERTE
네. 제
O
了解です、オデッセイ。それから、電子機
マイク、ちょっと気になったんだけど、これはもう済んでると
And we would like to send you a TX as s
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。你们一切正常，2号任务完
알겠습니다. 이
Okay. Understand. If it'll be any help to you in
Roger. Affermat
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Vous étiez tout juste en bordure de la zone de couverture de Goldstone. Nous
Should give you very goo
Okay – weiter geht’s – okay,… 32,9; Brenndauer: 40 Sekunden vorwärts, 1,5; 04 Sekunden
Aprire l'i
Roger, you can also advise him that his wife received the flowers and she forgot to tell him that today when she was on air-
알겠습니다. 고이득 모드를 사용하고 싶으실 때 REACQ 모드로 설정해 주시면, 매번 저희가 깨는 것을 방지할 수 있을 것 같습니다
Okay. Jack. Let me give you a thruster configuration right now. Able 1, Charlie 1, Able 2 are off. Charlie 2, MAIN A, all the thrusters that I call that are on are on MAIN A. Baker 1 off. Dog 1 on, Baker 2 off, Dog 2 on. Able 3, Charlie 3, Able 4, Cha
وصل
ليست المركبة الفضائية هي التي يصعب توجيهها، بل الكاميرا. يوجد انحناء 
알겠습니다. CB(16), Fred-o에 있을 텐데, 인버터 2가 열려 있습니다. 좋습니다. 미션 타이머 활성화에 대해. 1단계 수정, 1행과 2행을 수행합니다. "set mission timer on mar
Alcuni di loro q
了解。レーダーの調子は良好でした。友人のジュリアンが同席できず、大変残念です。操縦モードについてご報告します。まず、手動操
了解です。まず主要なイベントの時刻を簡単に確認し、その後、戻って詳細を補足します。さて、進入インターフェースは142時間40分、つまり6時間半前です。そのおよそ6時間半前に、ヒーター電源を投入し、CM/の温度をチェックして、必要に応じてCM/を予熱することで、このプロセス全体を開始します。おそらくそうすることになるでしょう。詳細な手順は後ほど説明します。約6時間前頃に、前回の中間コースで使用した修正版/30分チェックリストを使用して、電源投入を開始します。その後、少し前、5時間前頃に、前回と同様に地球ターミネーターを使用して、体軸アラインメントの姿勢をとってください。それができ次第、-7を実行します。これは、今のところ約2フィート/秒、つまり約15秒間の噴射のようです。そして、今は1.5フィートまで下がっているとのことなので、余裕でマージン内です。わかりました。それを実行すると、すぐにサービスモジュールの分離姿勢への操作を開始します。通常よりも早く分離するため、平面状態になります。平面外のコンポーネントは不要であり、望んでいません。つまり、サービスモジュールが半径ベクトルに沿って外側を向いた状態で平面状態になります。その後、コマンドモジュールのチェックアウトとホットファイアを含む、サービスモジュールSEPの準備を開始します。そして、約4時間30分前にサービスモジュールを分離します。サービスモジュールを捕捉するまで機首を上げ、写真を撮ろうとしますが、写真を撮るために移動操作はしません。飛行経路の角度を崩したくないからです。わかりました。これで2時間ほどの余裕ができます。もし遅れてしまった場合は、チェックリストを確認してコマンドモジュールの起動準備を終えることができます。コマンドモジュールの完全起動は、マイナス2時間30分後に開始します。コンピューターを接続し、機首を上げ、状態ベクトルのアップリンクなどを開始し、コマンドモジュールプラットフォームの位置合わせを行います。遅くとも1時間30分後には、コマンドモジュール関連の作業に1時間かけ、分離姿勢への操作を開始します。その後、機首を閉じ始めます。もちろん、それよりずっと前に収納の準備がすべて完了しているわけではありません。ハッチを閉じ、圧力整合性チェックを行い、マイナス1時間、つまり141時間40分後に を投棄します。それが完了次第、突入姿勢へのマヌーバを開始できます。突入したら、六分儀による恒星チェックを行い、光学機器を取り外します。その時点で、最
こちら
CB-SENSOR-SIGNAL, HAUPT-B zu öffne
우리가 지상전에서 잘하는 것처럼 보이나요
नहीं, - हाँ, लेकिन हमें वो नहीं मिला। अब मेरा जेमिनी आने वाला है। नहीं, वो जेमिनी नहीं है, वो सदर्न क्रॉस का हिस्सा है
Gemi
Okay. Wir sind in etwa 10 Minuten wieder da. Wir me
रॉजर, बिल। हमें आपकी रिकॉर्डिंग मिल गई है, और आवाज़ की गुणवत्ता बहुत अच्छी है
Key to start! Purge in prog
Okay. Real good. We weren't real sure that's
Roger. Wir haben Sie etwa 30 Sekunden vor der Trennung, und alles
OAMS はどれくらいあり
Итак, «Аполлон-8». Мы завершили первый тест, и теперь переключимс
ヴァンス、君は興
D'accord. Attendez
はい、11番です。こちらはヒューストンです。フライトプラン、就寝後チェックリスト
Sono Frank Borman. Abbiamo apprezzato i programmi televisivi e vorremmo che rimaneste sintonizzati anche in futuro, 
Quel 
发
알겠습니다. 4-2
收到。鹰号。我们同意。请稍等，调整万向节角度。还有，鹰号，虽然我们已经给指令舱接上了直接氧气，但如果舱压升到5.4或5.5左右，你的舱内泄压阀可能会
好的。在启动步骤中，第 2 行（或步骤 2）显示“正在闪烁 3700，按回车键”。杰克，我们要用到这个功能的时候，是
هل درجة الحرارة مناس
Roger. Apollo 8, i dati del tuo backside sono praticamente incomprensibili. Ti suggeriamo, Bill, di ricontrollare la posizione del microfono per il backside pass e di provare a parlare un po' più forte e in modo p
Bene. Ora 4:06 dopo il retrofire sono 400K, e 11 minuti dopo il retrofire è 
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन; मैं 13 साल का हूँ। आपक
This is Friendship Seven. Sun, I want to make a mark here when the sun goes down. Sun is on the horizon at the present time, a brilliant blue out from each side of it. And I'll give a mark at the last. The sun is going out of sighs. Ready now, MARK (2:09:06). There's a brilliant blue out on each side of the sun, horiz
حسنًا. بناءً على كلامك، علينا أن نكون متشككين بعض الشيء في هذه الطريقة، لكننا نود أن تجربها وتقيّمها. يمكنك مراقبة المحور المركزي على زر R3. قبل إيقاف تشغيل الكرة، نريد رأيك. الخيار ا
انتظر لحظ
और क्या आप हमारे लिए पर्ज टैंक और क्रायो O2 टैंक 1 पर विशेष ध्यान रखेंगे, क्योंकि हमारा फ्लोमीटर पूरी तरह से भर गया है, हमें O2 के उच्च प्र
هل يمكنك أن تعطيني عدًا ت
ところで、ヴァンスさん。軌道につい
아니, 한 손으로 찰칵... 이제
لا أست
Tiens, Altaïr est là-haut. Voyons vo
네. 이제 취침 전 점검 사항입니다. 승무원 현황 보고를 드리자면, 투약은 없었고 모두 컨디션도 아주 좋습니다. 기내 장비 정보는 이미 드렸습니다. 짐이 지금 식수 소독 작업
わかりました。画面に火花が散っているのが見えます。きらめく粒子がいくつか飛んでいます。これはスラスタから放出さ
«Дружба Семь». Это связист Кантонского командования. Все системы на земле, похоже, работают. Температура вашего инвертора на 150 вольт-ампе
C'est exact. Ils tourn
Allez-y Houston, Gemin
キャ
فريندشيب سفن، فريندشيب سفن، معكم موتشيا كوم تك، نناديكم عبر نطاقي HF وUHF. فريندشيب سفن، مع
右
Я управляю 
Этот страховочный трос — форма космического аппарата — просто удерживал меня здесь
하하! 네가 덤불 속으로 들어갔을 때 내 오리발에 아직도 검은 미끄럼 자국이 남아있네. 좋아, 또 오른쪽으로 요잉했네. 바로잡아야 하는데... 아, 왼쪽으로 요잉했네. 바로잡아야 해, 달이 지평선에 딱 있잖아. 다시 바로잡을게, 얼마나 쉽게 맞추는지 보여주려고. 연료 최소량에 거의 근접한 것 같으니 조금 더 조정해 볼게. 좋아, 요잉은 거의 맞는데 롤은 아직 약간 어긋나 있네. 바로잡으면 될 거야. 롤을 조절해서 기체를 바로잡자. 롤이 맞춰지고 있어... 좋아, 여기서 그만둘게. 이 정도가 내가 줄 수 있는 최선이야. 롤이
음, 제 생각에는 탐침과 드로그를 여기에 하룻밤 동안 그대
Voilà, c'est l'un des nombreux points à aborder. Je voulais vous rappeler quelque chose que j'ai déjà dit à Jim, concernant les commandes. Actuellement, vous pouvez reprendre le contrôle en c
Die Kryo-Fans sind AUS und haben ihre Fahrräder abgestellt,
हे फ्रेड, मेरी आवाज़ साफ़ सुन
D'accord. Autre chose à vérifier avant l'entrée: le test d'entrée standard, prévu environ une heure après le début de la procédure. Nous allons l'examiner. Pouvez-vous lire le numéro affiché sur le panneau? Cela nous permettra de suivre notre progression dans le test. Nous envisageons d'en analyser un avant la fin de la procédure afin d'avoir plus de temps pour réfléchir à une éventu
روجر. هذا هو الرقم 8. تم النسخ. سنزيد العدد 34 إلى ثلاثة، ومجموعة الأعداد 40 إلى اثنين إذا لم نتمكن من الحصول على 
और, एक्वेरियस, आपको इस दिशा में सोचने के लिए प्रेरित करने के लिए, हमने एक विस्तृत विश्लेषण किया है, और हमने पाया है कि इन्वर्टर और बॉल को बंद
罗杰，第 12 版 RKV 将更新您的 PLA 和 CLA 时间；第 13 版加那利群岛将提供 C 波段航迹。此外，还将进行天文轨道导航检查运行。姿态控制无需使用推进剂。这是格林尼
ठीक है। हम इसे अधिकतम सीमा से पहले ही जार
Gemini 
Ti cons
حسناً، فهمت. أضف 51.5،
双子座4号，这里是休斯顿指挥中心。我没收到你的信号。我会再次盲读11-BRAVO。18
わかり
우정 7입니다. 부정적이네요. 몇 가지 문제
ठीक है। 1 मिनट पर, "मास्टर आर्म" लिखकर हम स्क्रैच करेंगे। 35 सेकंड पर, पहली दो लाइनें स्क्
好了。你们可以看到他正拿着剪
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 수동 혼합을 계속 진행하십시오. 증발가스 제어 장치(EVAP)의 출력은 약 55도로
Bien, et enfin, quatre canettes de LiOH, celles utilisées dans le, peuvent être placées dans le sac largable. Quelques remarques: après le chargement, il est recommandé de fixer le sac au
Ich habe ein Update für Sie, f
هذا يبدو شهياً للغاية. 
Oh, yes, yes. Keep opening 
非常感谢，双子
Ricevuto. Spegni il c
— Заход по с
休斯顿。收到。完
我怀疑这片巨
- - इसलिए यह किसी भी प्रकार का करंट नहीं 
分かりました。ジャック、今は無理です。太陽光がスラスタに反射して
Roger. Potresti non dover dilungarti troppo. La posizione che ti ho appena indicato è leggermente a ovest del Cratere Ovest. Immagino sia circa due decimi di chilometro a ovest, e ci chiedevamo se Neil o Buzz avessero osservato altri punti di riferimento durante la discesa, la permanenza sulla Luna o l'ascesa che potessero confermare o smentire questa ipotesi. Una cosa che ci chiediamo è se, se ti fossi trovato in questa posizione, avresti visto la Zampa di Gatto durante l'
Понял. У
Vance, ça pourrait t'intéresser: la façon dont on a organisé ça, c'est qu'on a un casque relié aux lignes de commun
Hey, 
자, 휴스
Bene, siamo tutti in ottima forma. Jim è impegnato a preparar
जेमिनी 4, हवाई कैप क
디스플레이는 열림, S-밴드 안테나는 닫힘(마스터 알람 방지), 카메라 - 시퀀스 카메라는 열림으로 설정해야 합니다. 그 아래에는 디스플레이는 열림, DC 버스 전압은 닫힘, 인버터 2는 열림, 상승 ECA는 닫힘, 상승 EC
你知道，在这里你的嗓子
Roger. Flight advises it may take
私もです。サン
Хорошо. Теперь я использую Луну, которая находится слева от меня, и это очень удачное решение. Я просто закрою индикатор положения в пространстве, и вы сможете наблюдать за рысканием. Я отключу гироскопы, пытаясь выбрать режим полета по проводам на малой высоте. Сначала я помещу Луну в центр окна, удерживая крен и тангаж, а затем верну Луну на место. В этот момент Луна приближается к центру окна. Хорошо, я остановлю ее там, и мы включим управление креном, чтобы сбалансировать положение. Хорошо, в этот момент у меня будет нулевой крен. Я промахнулся мимо Луны и вижу планету Меркурий, которая яркая и находится немно
네, 감사합니다
...
هيا! نم! اسمع، ستستيقظ بعد ساعة.
了
أقرأ كلامك بوضوح تام يا فرانك. صباح
Jim, Houston. Verstanden. Man kann dich trotz des Lärms gut verstehen. Wie geht es
Хорошо. Не могли бы вы проверить положение — отверстие, которое 
마치 불타고 있는 
水瓶座，休
मुझे यहाँ समुद्र तट दिखाई दे रहा है। हालाँकि मैंने अ
Roger. Nous préférerions reporter la mise 
रॉजर। मेरा छोटा सा सिरा क्षितिज से ऊपर था, इसलिए मैं क्षितिज नहीं देख पा रहा था। जैसे ही वह सूर्य की ओर आया, मैंने उस दूसरे उपग्रह
ठीक है। समझ गया, फ्रेड। बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद; 38.9 और 1.9। और वह बस बैटरी में वापस डाले जा रहे एम्पियर की मात्रा को सत्यापित करने के लिए यथासंभव सुचारू ग्राफ बना रहा है। इसीलिए वह इसे आधे घंटे के अंतराल पर चाहता है। यदि यह शेड्यूल आपके आराम
I gimbal sembrano buoni; l'assetto generale è buono. I tassi sono 
아, 그렇군요. 30분 늦었네요. 괜찮아
P?:... Très bien... sur l
रॉजर। आपका एटीट्यूड रोल 12 डिग्री, पिच 270 डिग्री, यॉ 0 डिग्री होगा। हाई गेन एं
Sto fermando la capsula in assetto di rientro. Sto effettuando il roll out
ऑटो मोड पर एकद
هذه أبولو 8، ننقل لكم البث المباشر من القمر. اضطررنا لتغيير كاميرات التلفزيون ا
알겠습니다. 그럼 배터리와 충전기의 상태
Хорошо, Джек. Повтори, пожалуйста, список устройств, которые ты хотел, чтобы я вы
Roger, das ist richtig, Fred-o. Wir möchten Sie nun so konfigurieren, dass Sie Ihren Zustandsvektor und Ihre Ziellast verbinden kön
로저. 아주 좋습니다.
La risposta è affermativa e saremmo anche interessati a qualsiasi commento su cosa queste varie discaric
हेलो ह्यूस्टन, हेलो ह्यूस्टन
Ja. Wir bekommen es nicht schmaler. Wir haben versucht, auf AUTO Track oder REACQ umzuschalten, aber die Gierachse schwankt zwischen 270 und 0 Grad. Und 
알겠습니다. 8시 35
تم
Apollo 8, q
好的。杰克，请稍等片刻，看看你后面的清单。我知道不能倾倒尿液。我想我们会处理好尿液
لنرى - D-9 
फ्रैंक, सभी संकेतों से यही स्पष्ट 
При фиксации заднего положения радар 
Roger, 13. Da der Sauerstoffmengensensor von Tank 2 ausgefallen ist, möchte er die Kryokonservenmengen genauer im Auge behalten und bittet dich daher, die Kryokonserventanks etwas häufiger als geplant umzurühren. Das erste Mal ist jetzt. Wir rufen dich voraussichtlich alle 5 bis 6 Stunden an, außer 
로저. 그에게 주
귀하의 관측소 서쪽에 소용돌이치는 구름들이 많이 보입니다. 현재 촬영한 사진은 2, 3, 4, 5번입니다.
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। निर्देशांकों में हमसे गलती हो गई है। कृपया उड़ान योजना में दर्शाए गए अक्षांश (89 प्लस 01 243), देशांतर (2 प
Très bien. Toujours à la page E-9, à l'étape 39 en bas du contrôle du circuit pyrotech
روجر. هل لديك وقت المنطقة 2 دلتا، المنطقة 2
Привет, Вознесение, привет, Вознесение, это Сигма Сем
D'accord, Jack. Je vais te le lire, puis ajouter quelques commentaires et nous en discuterons un peu. Cela devrait se produire peu après. Après la remise en service à 49 heures, si le temps le permet, 
Roger. State vedendo la Terra, come la vediamo noi, dal nostro finestrino di sinistra, poco più di metà Terra. Stiamo guardando l'Oceano Pacifico orientale e la metà settentrionale della metà superiore dello schermo, dove possiamo vedere il Nord America, l'Alaska, gli Stati Uniti, il Canada, il Messico e l'America Centrale. Il Sud America diventa i
하원 세입위원회는 어제 석유 회사, 은행, 공공사업체에 영향을 미치는 세제 개편안에 동의했는데, 이는 연방 정부 수입을 연간 최대 20억 달러까지 
पुनः प्रवेश काफी अच्छा चल रहा है। सहायक अवमंदन दोलनों को काफी ह
Roger. On les examine. On vous donnera le feu v
Ok, ho indicat
ヒューストン
CB
了解。推進剤のバランスの観点から、操縦開始時にはクワッドエンジンのアルファとブラボーを使用することをお勧めします
好的，Aquarius。我们建议省略设置、云台/油门测试——只需确保云台、DECA POWER 和 DECA GIMBAL 的断
好的。宇航服电源已关闭；音频已关闭。
好的。我们正在考虑在104小时后——大约20到18小时后——进行一次中期修正，速度只有每秒7英尺。另一个选择是保持目前的飞行速度，因为我们可能无法再次回到预定轨道，所以只能推迟飞行。这就是我们正在考虑的情况，不过——我只是想告诉你，你现在几乎正好在球道的正
Ricevuto. La batteria è carica; puoi in
是啊。你偶尔真的会产生一种错觉，觉得自己已
Они дейс
Roger. Ci è rimasto un caricatore di pellicola Hasselblad e
罗杰。来自公共事务办公室的最新消息：阿波罗11号仍然是全球新闻的焦点。只有四个国家——共产主义中国、朝鲜、北越和阿尔巴尼亚——尚未向其公民通报您的登月飞行和登月。一位记者表示，他已经找不到合适的词语来形容您的成功。今晚，尼克松总统计划在华盛顿观看全明星棒球赛。赛后，他将前往太平洋回收区。周三晚上，他将从约翰斯顿岛乘直升机前往海军通信舰“阿灵顿”号。周四早上，他将再次登上直升机，飞往“大黄蜂”号，以便及时观看您的溅落。陪同总统的有国务卿威廉·罗杰斯和弗兰克·博尔曼。他们将与太平洋舰队司令约翰·西德尼·麦凯恩海军上将一起在回收舰的舰桥上观看溅落。总统在“大黄蜂”号上的停留结束后，将启程前往亚洲访问，并按计划访问罗
Роджер. Время окончания орбиты: 01:28:17
روجر. فهمتُ أن تهوية وحدة الخدمة قد توقفت مؤقتًا. ماذا عن مرحلة الهبوط؟ هل 
Roger. Understand; TELE
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. شعرتُ عدة مرات أن أحد محركات الدفع عالق جزئيًا، أو أنه يعمل جزئيًا في وضعية الانحناء للأسفل، ثم فجأةً، مع ارتفاع معدل الانحناء، شعرتُ بدفعة هبوطية، فانخفضت المركبة نحوي. وتكرر 
Molto bene. Ho notato che il reticolo di imbardata fun
从这里看好像不太平坦，但我也不确
로
Ok. Fai attenzione a non far scattare qualche interruttore. T
월리, 에코 목격 데이터가
双子座。双子座4号。最后一个距
Aquarius, Houston. Negativ. Wir möchten alles so lassen, wie es ist, aber wir würden Ihre Beobachtungen gern
Oh là là! C'était le pl
Roger, Jim. We'll get the
Je fer
コロ
罗杰，加上 0095
Okay. Wie wäre es mit – Sind Sie bereit für weitere Messwerte,
Je crois, mais je vais vérifier. Aquarius, Houston. C'est exact. Vous pouvez vous déb
好的，杰
好的，休斯顿。我们现在处于燃烧状态。吉姆正在检查六分仪星象
阿波罗8号，
Gémeaux VI, Hawaï CAP COM
是的，
Roger. Nota che stai iniziando con la tua, che è l'ultima attività programmata. Il tracciamento iniziale sembra indicare che la velo
Rollio, beccheggio e imbardata, ma la deriva è 
حسنًا يا فانس. نحن نوجه الكاميرا بعيدًا قليلً
저는 지금 기록만 남기는 입장입니다. 자동운동에 대한 가장 좋은
우리가 졌어 - 일찍 끝내는 유일한 장점은, 만약 우리가 출력을 줄일 수 있다면, 다시 줄일 수 있다는 거야. 일찍 끝내는 유일한 장점은 지금 크게 연소하고 중간 궤도를 돈 다음 출력을 줄일 수 있다는 거지. 그렇지 않으면, 달 주위를 돌 때까지 계속 출력을 높여둬야 해. 게다가 연소할 때는 실내에 있어야 하고. 제발 
안면 보호대가 닫히고 잠겼는
روجر. التاليون 
好的。今天，我们需要您在按照程序进行观测之前和之后分别进行一次耳轴偏差测定。我们的目的是检查是否存在某种热效应导致六分仪角度读数出现误差。您之前测定的偏差应该被计入，也就是说，当您连续两次测量结果相差在 0.003 度以内时，请在 NOUN 87 上执行 PROCEED 操作。当然，在两次测量之间，请将耳轴移动几度。今天地球在
No, signore. Non abbiamo ancora attivato quella fu
星図の光沢のある仕上げを忘れないでください。と
안녕하세요, 프렌드십 세븐, 우메라 캡 컴퍼니입니다. 150볼트 인버터 온도는 195도, 250볼트 인버
Теперь мы можем у
एक बार जब मैंने इसे इस्तेमाल करने की कोशिश की, तो अगली बार मुझे इसका काफी अच्छा माप मिल गया। बिना किसी फ़िल्टर के, मैंने हवा की मोटी परत की चमक के ऊपरी हिस्से का इस्तेमाल किया। यह काफी धुंधला होता है - आपको अपनी आँखों को थोड़ा एडजस्ट करना पड़ता है और हर बार उसे एक ही जगह पर रखने की कोशिश करनी पड़ती है... इन मापों को करने के लिए सटीक दृष्टि नियंत्रण की आवश्यकता होती है। आप बिना ईंधन का उपयोग किए इन मापों की उम्मीद नहीं कर सकते। यह इतना छोटा दायरा है कि आपको अपने तारे को चुनना होता ह
Роджер, Игл. Мы предоставили вам вектор состояния. Однако мы 
रॉजर। हम रोल 21 - 61, पिच 090, यॉ 0
Houston, warum schätzt du nicht, dass der CMP noch ein paar
يا نسر، هل أنت مستعد 
오브 레이트, 호라이즌 스캔을 진행 중
Okay. meno 04402 meno 00001 più 48387 178 169 359, non applicabile, più 00185 48587 603 48383 06 2027 250, centro della Terra 0123 - giù 
잭, 지금 프레드의 작업실을 보고 계시죠? 비상 탈출 유도 컴퓨
यूरी अलेक्सेयेविच, मैं आपको याद दिलाना चाहता हूँ कि मैं "सेकंड" शब्द का प्रयोग नहीं करूँगा, बल्कि लग
Unfortunately, the numbers never got on here. If you will look on that chart that Fred Hai
रॉजर। जब GERU 07990 से क
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम। सम
क्
わかりました、ロン。MIDPAC の場合: 000、152、001、194、46 06、267、プラス 1332、マイナス 16917、064、36194、649、14045、36275、195 03 06、0028、154、084、2240、180、400、02 13、00 17、03 51、09 02、45、0189、277、使用可能なものなし、ベクトルを上に持ち上げて、位置合わせ、ベガとデネブ、ロール 078
Roger. Okay. The other thing is the post-landing. We still - just to reaffirm - you would like no more than that 1 hour in the spacecraft. Get your suits off, at your discretion, if the spacecraft has no leak. The open
बहुत बढ़िया। ठीक है। क्या आप चाहते हैं कि मैं कम से कम इस हिस्से क
ठीक है। आप इसे वापस एटीट्यूड मोड में ले जाकर रोल के लिए एटीट्यूड होल्ड मोड में डाल दें, और हम वापस जाकर आवश्यकता की समीक्षा करेंगे। सरसरी तौर पर देखने पर तीनों बार लगभग एक जैसे ही परिणाम मिले हैं। इसलिए हम एक बार फिर देखेंगे कि क्या इसे दोबारा करने की कोई आवश्यकता है। यदि ऐसा हुआ, तो हम आपको बुला लेंगे। आप इसे अभी
Jim, la batteria A è carica. Quando vorrai sganciarla, per noi andrà be
ठीक है। हम आपको बत
سنقوم - هيوستن - بمناورات مستقبلية في وضعية منخفضة وبط
リカバリー3号は着水時間が51秒と50秒だ
제가 점수를 매겨주
Ça me fait un peu penser à une Thunderbird. Ha,
気分はどうで
로저. 우주복 온도에 대한 보고입니다. 발사 이후 10도씩 두 번이나 온도를 올렸습니다. 지금은 발사 당시보다 약 15도 정도 높습니다. 증기 배출구 온도는 69도와 80도를 나타내고 있습니다. 유량을 늘려서 온도를 조절해 보려고 한 번 더 시도해 보겠습니다. 그래도 안 되면 배출구를 끄고 낮은 온도부터 다시 시작하겠습
Roger. We will start out with the world news. praise for America's Apollo 8 astronauts and hopes for international cooperation in space exploration with the worldwide Christmas Eve messages as the tiny spaceship orbited the moon. Even in the Communist world, there was enthusiasm for man's first voyage to the moon. In Moscow, Soviet scientist Anatoly Besaranov recalled his country and the United States had shared space knowledge before and predicted the Apollo 8 flight would lead to more cooperation. In Cuba, Radio Havana rebroadcast the Voice of America program to tell its listeners of the Apollo 8 speech. Voice officials said it was the first time that any of the U.S. agencies' programs had been carried by Havana radio. Czechoslovakia saw the moon flight through extensive television coverage; and in Budapest, Hungary, people talk of little else on the trains and buses. In the non-Communist world, office workers and Christmas shoppers held their breath as the spacecraft was readied for the blast toward earth. Frenchmen in the street praised American knowhow and the space feat, and some viewers watch television lunar photos cheer "Magnifique!". In London, swarms of Christmas shoppers crowded into shops and pubs to watch television photographs of the moon's craters. Britain's foremost space astronomer, Bernard Lovell, who until a few weeks ago criticized the Apollo 8 project on the grounds that instruments could do the job without risking the astronauts' lives, made it clear that he was deeply impressed by the moon flight. Pope Paul VI said hon
Хорошо. Битрейт, низкий; функция голоса, пониженная, резервное копирование голоса; S-диапазон усилителя мощности, открыт; и функция диапазона в положение «Диапазон»; и это проверка. И у меня здесь по
わかりました。では、見てみましょう。あな
Esatto. Ora, ho dormito per circa 2 o 3 ore. Ed dormirà per circa 5 o 6 ore, quindi probabilmente no
자, 잠시 기다려 주세요. 연필을 정리할게요. 저는 지금 침팬지 모드입니다. 캡슐은 아주 잘 비
了解しました、ケープ。燃料スイッチはオンのままにして、テキサス・バーンを実施してください。その後、アメリカ全土で燃料の使用状況を監視させていただきます。も
好
यह पुष्टि है। बेहतर शब्दों में कहें तो, यह चंद्रमा के दृश्य आदि के लिए पैंतरेबाजी करना और स्थिति 
ठीक है। आरएन, आरपी, प्लस 77, 400 फ
रॉजर। मार्गदर्शन और
Незначительно. Первые 5 сантиметров я мог забить без особых проблем, а потом, когда я забивал его изо всех сил, второй раз пришлось забив
Мы хотели бы узнать, какие у вас планы на вечер. В нашем плане полета указано, что период отдыха наступает примерно в 182 часа, и что вы планируете делать в это время? Мы будем следить за погодой и ожидаем получить обн
Schalten Sie meinen Computer ein. Ja, M
नमस्कार, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। फ्रें
了解しました、ジェミニ4号機です。こちらはヒューストンCAP COMです。フライトプラ
Va bene
Ok. Abbiamo... abbiamo alcuni problemi a terra e vi sentiamo deboli ma chiari. Siamo pronti per iniziare il test. Cambieremo le modalità, quindi probabilmente sentirete un impulso di rumore mentre effettuiamo il cambio. Sarà un rumore simile a un blocco in banda
彼は自分の向きを維持するのに苦労していました。そして、それ以降、宇宙船がどの方向を向いているかに関係なく、宇宙船から離れて向きを変えているように見えました。彼は実際には宇宙船に非常に高い回転速度、毎秒2度もの速度を与えることができました。私はその速度以下に抑えるつもりでした。彼が宇宙船に戻ったとき、ハッチの開閉にかなり苦労しました。まず、ハッチのラチェット部分を持ち上げてかみ合わせました。かみ合わせた後、ハッチを十分閉めることができませんでした。実際には、ドッグを外に出すためにロックハンドルを引き下げ始めました。それ
Ri
닐과 버즈, 저는 지금 백악관 집무실에서 전화 통화를 하고 있는데, 이 통화는 분명 역사상 가장 역사적인 통화일 것입니다. 여러분이 모든 미국인을 위해 해낸 일에 대해 우리 모두가 얼마나 자랑스러워하는지 말로 다 표현할 수 없습니다. 오늘은 
अब 
Roger, vorrei consigliarti di usare le pellicole MSC-10 che ti sono rimaste come obiettivi opportuni, a tu
मैंने सुबह 6 बजे एक नया टेप कार्ट्रिज डाला। मैंने अभी-अभी एक और S
ठीक ठी
ठीक है। बढ़िया। यह सबसे ऊँचा टैंक था और ऐसा लगता है कि प्रेशर स्विच के बंद होने और हीटर साइकिल शुरू होने का इंतज़ार करते समय, टैंक 1 का प्रेशर थोड़ा और कम हो रहा था, जिससे सावधानी और चेतावनी का सिग्न
휴스턴 CAP COM, 제미니 4. 업데이트를 진행
A e B sono nominali e vorrei darti un'idea del GMT e vedere c
Хорошо. Перей
多分、言いたいことが多すぎたんだ。君たちは
Roger, Gemini 4. Qui Houston CAP COM. La ricevo molto, molto debolmente. Non c'è una lampadina di riserva per il sestante. Suggerisco di usare solo l'illuminazione co
Okay. B
Je ressens une accélér
Okay, Jack, say again that -... for the powerdown; it's not in the pink pages, the 1-
कुछ ही सेकंडों में आपको ओरियन, कैनोपस औ
60개 남았어요, 알겠죠
Voici un reportage d'Harry Rosenthal, de l'Associated Press de Houston. Deux Pères Noël ont illuminé la veille de Noël du petit Jeffrey Lovell, âgé de deux ans. Le premier a frappé à sa porte et lui a apporté des cadeaux. Le second a ramené son papa sur la Lune. Le premier portait un costume rouge et une barbe blanche, et son « ho, ho! » résonnait si fort qu'on l'entendait à plusieurs kilomètres. Le second était un énorme moteur crachant des flammes derrière la Lune, et des milliers de personnes attendaient la confirmation de son allumage. « Sachez qu'il y a un Père Noël », furent les premiers mots d'Apollo 8, sortant du silence radio pour annoncer au monde entier, quinze minutes après les faits, que le moteur avait réussi sa combustion critique. « Aucun d'entre nous ne s'attend à recevoir un plus beau cadeau de Noël que celui-ci », déclara Ken Mattingly, du centre de contrôle des missions. « Remerciez de notre part tous ceux qui sont restés sur Terre. Vous savez que nous n'aurions rien pu faire sans vous », répondit le colonel Frank Borman, commandant du vaisseau. À ce moment précis, un sapin de Noël s'illumina devant les consoles du centre de contrôle des missions, et l'astronaute Harrison Schmidt lut à l'équipage une version spatiale du conte « La visite de Saint Nicolas ». « C'était la veille de Noël, et très loin dans l'espace, l'équipage d'Apollo 8 venait de remporter la course vers la Lune », commençait le récit. L'équipe du cen
Wir st
روجر. س
Sto scaricando H2O2. Accendere il fusibile. Pronto. Il braccio di recupero è "arm". Pronto per il paracadute principale. Tutti gli interruttori sono nella posizione corretta. Il carburante manuale è quasi tutto esaurito. Ecco, il principale è fuori. È... è fuori, bellissimo. Cielo azzurro brillante. Ed è sbarrato, e sembra una torta di caramelle. Il carburante automatico sta scaricando. La velocità di discesa è di circa 35 (fps) in questo momento. Non vedo alcun problema. Mi preparerò all'impatto. Il carburante auto
Как у т
알았어, 켄. 저건 CB G&N, 컴퓨터, 메인 A,
क्या हो सकता था, हो सकता 
No, no, non c'è. Non c'è più quel
Stiamo indicando un'autonomia di 158 miglia e un'elevazione di cir
로저, 휴스턴. -1은 위도 -606269, 경도 2/2 -78954, 고도 +00152이고, -2는 위도 -09638, 경도 2/2 +81691, 고도 -00007입니다.
저희는 "With Our Eyes on the Stars"의 마지막 연주를 마치고 이제 모두 잠자리
Okay. E adesso, sembra che... adesso,
내가 지금 뭘 하고 있는 거지? 어쨌든 난 그렇게 할 수 없어. 어디 보자, 크로스 피드? 아니네. 자
好
알았어. 녹음기
Хорошо. Члены съемочной группы жа
Roger. J'ai déjà consacré 2 minutes à H2 1 et 2 et à O2 1, et je viens de
ليس كذلك، لكنن
알겠습니다. 제가 
Итак, всё готово. Хотите перейти в режим «РАБОТА» на радаре и посмотреть, что у на
Roger 
Это хорошая обратная связь. Будем наблюдать з
休斯顿，静海基地将就昨晚的地质问题作几点说明。我们降落在一个相对平坦的陨石坑区，这里分布着许多细长的次生陨石坑——圆形次生陨石坑，大多数陨石坑都有边缘，无论大小。当然，这并非绝对。周围也有一些较小的陨石坑没有明显的边缘。整个区域的地表物质是细沙到淤泥。我认为地球上最接近的物质是石墨粉。在这些地表物质中，分布着各种形状、大小、纹理的岩石，有圆润的，也有棱角分明的，许多岩石的质地也各不相同。正如我所说，我看到了看似普通的玄武岩和多孔玄武岩。还有一些岩石没有晶体，一些岩石则含有少量白色斑晶，含量
روجر، أتابع رسائلك منذ فترة. حاولت التواصل معك عبر الترددات العالية دون جدوى. حالتي جيدة، وحالة الكبسولة جيدة، ونظام التحكم يعمل إلكترونيًا، والجيروسكوبات مثبتة، والمناورة معطلة. نسبة الوقود تتراوح بين 74 و85%. نسبة الأكسجين تتراوح بين 87 و100%. درجة حرارة المقصورة مرتفعة قليلًا عند 104 درجة. درجة حرارة فتحة البخار في البدلة 70 درجة، ودرجة حرارة المقصورة 80 درجة، لكنني أ
حسناً
Houston advises you can use any attitude you want for the Extravehicular Activity
주낙하산이 녹색으로 접혀 있습니다. 낙하산은 펼쳐져 있으며, 10,800피트 고도에서 리프 형태로 변형되어 아름다운 모습을 보여주고 있습니다. 낙하산 상태는 양호해 보입니다. 산소 비상 장치를 작동
나는 그가 잠잘 때 더 잘 지
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。復唱は正確です。参考までに、ゴール
Friendsh
Okay, Jim. We copied that.
然后，请您将相机贴在窗户上，并确保相机镜头不进入视野。接下来，我们需要两组照片。请您将相机设置为脉冲模式，并将相机镜头垂直向下对准地球。我会给您一些时间启动相机。相机镜头会对
حسنًا. أعتقد أن الجميع تقريبًا يتصورون برنامج الفضاء على أنه مليء بالإلكترونيات المتطورة، وبالتأكيد، هذا صحيح إلى حد كبير. لكنني فكرت في عرض بعض الأدوات هنا بالت
Friendship Seven, ici Zanzibar Cap Com. La télémétrie indiqu
ठीक है, जो। जैसा कि मैंने पढ़ा, 74 घंटे बाद हम डिटेंट 2 पर सूर्य की जाँच करेंगे, जिसके लिए रेंडेज़वस रडार को रास्ते से हटाना होगा। और हम वहाँ पहुँचने के लिए ऑटो मैन्यूवर का उपयोग करेंगे, या कम से कम उसके कोणों को पार करने के लिए। यदि यह 1 डिग्री के भीतर पास हो जाता है, तो आप कह रहे हैं कि प्लेटफ़ॉर्म मैन्यूवर के लिए ठीक है, और हमें आगे की जाँच की आवश्यकता नहीं होगी। लेकिन अगर यह ठीक भी है, तो आप हमें एक तारा देंगे जिसका उपयोग हम अंधेरे में अपनी जाँच के लिए कर सकते हैं। यदि यह जाँच विफल हो जाती है, तो आप हमें आगे पृथ्वी/चंद्रमा संर
Stavo solo commentando: ho guardato i propulsori dei quad 1 e 4. Abbiamo una leggera scoloritura all'esterno della canna. Gli ugelli sembrano non essere mai stati sparati, come se fossero nuovi di zecca... o quelle piccole cose all'interno dell'ugello 
Fred-o, mancano circa 2 minuti all'interruttore OMNI. Puoi andare avanti e spegnere il RANGING e il DOWN VOICE BACKUP, e ti chiameremo sull'inter
Would you like to have us play you some guitar music t
ठीक है। मैं उन्हें देखने की कोशिश करने के लिए पूरी तरह तैयार हूं
Wassermann, bitte FORWARD
ओह, हाँ। बिल्कुल सह
Ok, Jim. Qui è Houston. Vogliamo 
La pression dans
Роджер. Я прошёл вниз, минус X, минус Y и минус Z. Ты это скопировал? Коне
हां। कोलंबिया 
حسنًا. أستطيع فعل ذلك. لست متأكدًا تمامًا مما إذا كان بإمكاني التحكم في الدوران أو 
Apollo 
Внезапно мы услышали тихий щелчок, и уровень сигнала начал резко пад
И они должны быть на связи. Это правил
حسنًا. سي
Negative, but I've sure got a funny c
Jack, prima di iniziare a leggere la procedura, vorremmo... Abbiamo scoperto che la batteria BAT A è carica e in ottime condizioni. Vorremmo cambiare batteria e ricaricare ulteriormente la batteria BAT B. Lasciarla in carica per altre 2 ore. Abbiamo una procedura di circa sette o ott
जेमिनी 4, सीएसक्यू। क्या आप अपनी मुख्य बैटरियों की जाँच करके हमें बताएँगे कि
و CB - CB INVERTER 1، اللوحة 11، مغلق. CB اللوحة 16، مستشعر إشارة ال
Roger. You may not have to unpack it. The position which I just gave you is slightly west of West Crater. I guess it's about two tenths of a kilometer west of it, and we were wondering if Neil or Buzz had ob
Okay, Jack just... himself back down. And after he put on the 250 BAT A,
Okay. Brennregeln. Wir sollten den Brennvorgang abbrechen, wenn der Schubmonitor 77 % oder weniger anzeigt; 2. wenn der Treibstoffdruck unter 160 psi liegt; 3. wenn das Verhältnis von Treibstoff zu Oxidator Δp ​​größer als 25 ist (dies führt zu einer Bodenwarnung); 4. wenn der Lagefehler ± 10 Grad beträgt (außer bei Anlaufvorgängen). Okay. Die Ratenbegrenzungen liegen bei ± 10 Grad pro Sekunde. Außerdem sollten die Kontrollleuchten für die Triebwerksaufhängung, ISS mit Programmalarm, CES DC und Inverter (falls nach dem Umschalten der Inverter noch leuchten) aufleuchten. Falls das Triebwerk während des Brennvorgangs abschaltet, wenn die NOUN 97 blinkt, sollten wir PRO aktivieren, manuell Treibstoff ablassen, den Startknopf drücken und die Triebwerkssteuerung für den Abstieg aktivieren. Wenn wir keinen PC-2-Manöver durchführen, erfolgt unser nächster Schub mit PC-4 für zusätzliche 24 Fuß p
हाँ, अंदर से हल्की सी आवाज़ आ रही है। शायद कुछ अटक गया है; कॉकपिट से
Все еще в относительно горизонтальном положении. Управление скоростью работает хорошо. Рад, что она держится. Все идет очень хорошо. Приближается к 5½ (g). Управление скоростью все еще держится, топлива по-прежнему 70 (%), кажется, мало. Приближается к 6½ (g), 7g. Приближается к 8g. Управление скоростью держится. Довольно сильное рыскание. Не так у
Okay. That - t
Schließen Sie den O2-Schlauch an den rechten blauen Anschluss 
ह्यूस्टन, हम विकल्प 1 को विकल्प 3 की तरह ही कर रहे हैं। हमें लगातार 401 अलार्म मिल रहा है, जिसमें लिखा है कि वांछित RCT
Guten Abend. Ich möchte mit Ihnen einige der symbolträchtigeren Aspekte unserer
И к ваше
Apollo 8, th
R
Хорошо. Джек, ты хочешь, ч
I'm taping now the fuel quantity warning lights in preparation for the dark side. I think also excess cabin water I'll tape. It'
Affermativo, Jim, con i seguenti DELTA a
Sapevi che ora stiamo anche eliminando l'O
ठी
حسنًا، ليس 
Как вам это? И
استعدوا لزي
संक्षेप में। क
Va bene. Grazie. E questo ci ha lasciato co
लगता है टेप अभी भी चल रहा है और मुझे अभी तक लाल बत्ती नहीं दिखी है। यह तो वाकई निराशाजनक है - टेप रिकॉर्डर की बत्ती की जगह। पूरा टेप रि
Oui. Les 
Das Oberflächenmaterial ist pulverig. *** Wie gut Ihr Objektiv ist, aber wenn Sie *** Flecken erkennen können... es ähnelt sehr feinem Kohlenstoffpulver, sieht aber sehr hübsch a
わかりました。ここでやることは、高ゲインが機械的な限界に達する前にスキャン限界を確実に超えていることがわかったら、先に進んで確認します。REACQ機能が動作していないかどうか確認することもできます。そのままシャットダウンして
Je pense que notre film haute vitesse ser
D'accord, Mike, s'il y a des sacs de données qui traînent par là - j'en ai peut-être un ou deux 
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы готовы к тому, чтобы вы начали сброс сточных вод. Конец св
Хорошо. Вы говорите, что углы, которые вы мне дали для 5018, были предназначены для модели А, поэтому они не под
Roger. We have a 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, minus 061, plus 067 135 23 4149; plus 3
Und, Aquarius, nur zu Ihrer Information: Was unsere Wasserversorgung betrifft, einschließlich unserer 
Roger, 11. Sous la colonne A, page F2-20, ligne 5, la nouvelle donnée est 01042; ligne 7, la
No, we haven't been able to detect any moisture anyp
अब अनडॉक एटीट्यूड और एसईपी एटीट्यूड एक समान होने चाहिए, इसलिए मैं अपडेटेड सेपरेशन-बर्न एटीट्यूड के लिए दिए गए निर्देश का उपयोग करूंगा। यह लगभग 7 डिग्री का अंतर है, लेकिन यह अनडॉक एटीट्यूड 
Che co
Rog
いいえ。現時点ではコマンドモジュールに
好的，杰克。明白了，你已经准备好进行交换机配置检查了。我面前有一份起飞配置表，L
Okay. Damit ist das Herunterfa
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। पैनल 16 पर, कृपया क्रॉस टाई बैलेंस लोड ब्रेकर को ब
J'aimerais votre évaluation de votre brûlure posit
Хо
Los geht's; seht nur, wie das Zeug überall
Nous voulons que vos enregistreurs restent dans la position o
Il semblerait que toute l
着陆后检查清单。降落伞已用推进器撑开。安全着陆
كارن
यह दिलचस्प हो सकता है कि कल रात जब हम सोने गए थे, उसके ठीक बाद एक ज़ोरदार अलार्म बजा और हम सब बहुत डर गए। और हम सब कॉकपिट में इधर-उधर भागने लगे, जैसे को
Okay, at the top, purpose is mon
わかりました。次のステップは、テープを固定することです。やり方は、ロールから約
Start after the rains in Houst
맞습니다. 이전 형식과
로저, 닐. 먼저 말씀드리겠습니다. 아폴로 11호 임무에 대한 축하 메시지가 오늘 하루 종일 세계 각국 정상들로부터 백악관으로 끊임없이 쏟아져 들어왔습니다. 가장 최근에는 해럴드 윌슨 영국 총리와 벨기에 국왕의 축하 전보가 도착했습니다. 전 세계 언론은 아폴로 11호 소식으로 도배되었습니다. 일부 언론에서는 오늘 전국 신문에 실린 기사의 60% 이상이 두 분의 임무와 관련된 내용이라고 추산하고 있습니다. 앞서 말씀드린 것처럼, 오늘자 신문이 (95만 부나 발행되었음에도 불구하고) 엄청난 인기를 끌자 뉴욕 타임스는 기념판으로 목요일에 전체 내용을 재인쇄할 예정이라고 밝혔습니다. 알렉세이 코시긴 총리는 현재 러시아를 방문 중인 험프리 전 부통령을 통해 두 분과 닉슨 대통령께 축하 인사를 전했습니다. 우주비
وما أردتُ الإشارة إليه، لا أدري إن كان واضحًا، لكن... لإظهار فائدة إجراء جميع عمليات التفريغ قبل الاحتراق مباشرةً، ننظر مجددًا إلى المشهد نفسه فوق القمر في الرب
Roger. Steht bei euch der Wassermengenregler jetzt auf Trinkwasser oder auf Abwasserta
आपको ईमानदार बनाए
Direi che il colore della - La superficie locale è molto simile a quella che abbiamo osservato dall'orbita a questo angolo con il Sole, circa 10 gradi di angolo con il Sole, o quella natura. È praticamente incolore. È grigia, ed è di un grigio molto bianco, gessoso, se si guarda nella linea di fase zero; ed è considerevolmente più grigio scuro, più simile a un grigio cenere se si guarda a 90 gradi verso il Sole. - Alcune delle rocce superficiali qui vicino che sono state fratturate o disturbate dal pennacchio del motore del razzo sono ricoperte di questo grigio chiaro all'esterno; ma dove sono state rotte, mostrano un interno grigio scuro, molto scuro; e sembr
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们现在不反对进行尿液排放。另外，关于废水排放——我们计划推
알겠습니다. 분리 거리는 11 + 14 + 29입니다. 델타-V는 초당 9.0피트입니다. 지속 시간은 0 + 15입니
Roger, Tranquility. Abbiamo visto la vostra attrezzatura sganciarsi in TV e l'espe
D'accord, Jack. Je suis assez curieux de voir à quel point notre attitude évolue. Je remarque que nous nous éloignons de no
रॉजर। आपको भी यही खबर मिल रही है। ह
로저. 로저, 프랭크. 앞으로 있을 일들에 대해 몇 가지 말씀드리겠습니다. 짐이 일어나면 별자리 관측을 할 예정인데, 지금으로서는 지구 지평선 관측은 충분히 한 것
로저, 
Deke, ich glaube, es sind ungefähr 5
لديّ أمران نرغب أن يقوم بهما جاك في وحدة التحكم
Très bien, Vance. Si vous n'av
此时，我进行了
Concernant les photos d'entrée en scène, si vous utilisez une cartouche neuve de film couleur d'intérieur, nous recommandons les réglages d'exposition suivants: f/11 à 1/250 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 2,1 m pour la boule de feu; f/2,0, 1/60 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 15 m lors de l'ouverture des parachutes. Si vous utilisez une cartouche dont une partie a déjà servi pour des prises de vue d'intérieur, nous recommandons: f/16 à 1/500 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 2,1 m pour la boule de feu; f/2,8, 1/60 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 15 m
Это верно. Также имейте в виду, что Уолли Ширра пытался с вами связа
알겠습니다. 몇 가지 정리하고 싶은 사항이 있습니다. 예산을 알려드리겠습니다. 현재 수
랜딩 백이 초록색
Es ist vielleicht interessant, dass wir gestern Abend kurz nach dem Einschlafen einen Generalalarm hatten, der uns ganz schön erschreckt hat. Wi
아니요, 시간이 좀 걸리는 과정이에요. 저는 인공호흡기를 사용하고 있지만, 회복하는 데는 시간이 좀 걸릴 것 같아
罗杰，我们正在再次切换天线。预计会出现短暂的断路锁定，另外，我们想向您汇报一下被动热控的最新情况。我们预计会保
Roger. Ihre Systeme sehen gut aus. Wir sind bereit für Ihren Aero-Med Pass 1. 
أعتقد أن ه
फि
아주
Das ist richtig. Nach Abschluss des siebten Mittelkurses wird das Flugzeug in eine Trennungsposition manövriert. Diese Position wird dann auf eines der Landepads, die Sie vor Beginn der eigentlichen Sequenz erreichen, übertragen. Anschließend wird das Flugzeug auf die Ballposition auf dies
收到，哥伦比亚。这里是休斯顿。通过OMNI Charlie系统，我已清晰接收到您的
Роджер. Фрэнк, все показания температуры в основном контуре в норме. Темпе
塔纳纳里夫，
من الصعب تحديد ذلك عند هذه الكثافة والضغط للغاز، لكن مستوى الراحة هو نفسه تقريبًا - تقريبًا نفس مستوى وحدة ال
रॉजर, माइक। मुझे लगता है कि स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप की तुलना में सेक्स्टेंट का उपयोग करके ट्रैकिंग करना कहीं अधिक आसान है। इसमें बेहतर नियंत्रण होता है, और इन कक्षीय ग
يا أهل هيوستن، نعرض درجة حرارة تبخر الجليكول الخارجة حوالي 44، ودرجة حرارة الإشعاع الخارجة حوال
Okay, Molly Brown's GO for stagi
ठीक है। प्लस 90: /G&N, 63825, माइनस 1.54, प्लस 1.32, माइनस
네. 더 이상 드릴 말씀이 없습니다. 말씀하실 것이 있
ع
STR
TR sieht gu
天狼星和参宿七，010 294 320，无空隙，路径返回 8750，印度洋
Attends Buzz. Ça a l'air plutôt bien, d'après ce que je vois. On a la ligne de convergence tropicale là-bas. Il y a quelques nuages ​​sur la carte météo que je regarde, mais rien d'important. Pour l'instant... Attends. Voyons voir, là, à mi-hauteur... oui, à MPL... on a 3000 pieds de nuages ​​épars, visibilité 10 pieds, vagues de 3 pieds, c'est la météo actuelle. Je ne pense pas qu'il y ait de prévisions importantes. Il y a quelques... FLIGHT vient de m'informer que ce que je viens de te donner était les prévisions. Il y a quelques tempêtes tropicales dans le... enfin, pas dans la zone d'atterrissage, mais dans le Pacifique. Une tempête appelée Claudia qui est au nord-est d'Hawaï. Elle se dirige vers le nord-ouest et se dissipe. Et il y en a une appelée
Роджер. Повторюсь, согласно приведенным мною инструкциям, камера должна быть направлена ​​в окно и повернута примерно на 30 градусов влево относительно вашей положительной оси X, по
روجر، توم. للعلم، قام فريق الدعم الفني لدينا بتأكيد ذلك، وق
शुरुआत में, एक और बचाव पैंतरेबाज़ी के कारण, निर्धारित समय पर हमारी अवलोकन प्रक्रिया तुरंत शुरू नहीं हो सकी। इस प्रक्रिया के कारण क्षेत्र में बड़ी मात्रा में नकली तारे बन गए, जिससे ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन लगभग असंभव हो गया। हमने जो तरीका विकसित किया था, वह भी कारगर नहीं रहा। अंततः मैंने जो तरीका अपनाया, वह था सीरियस तारे तक जाना, जो हमारा सबसे चमकीला तारा था, वहाँ से शाफ्ट और ट्रनियन प्राप्त करना, और फिर अंतरिक्ष यान को सीरियस तक ले जाना ताकि उसका उपयोग ऑप्टिक्स के लिए किया जा सके, जो हमने बाद में किया। प्रकाश प्रकीर्णन के संबंध में, ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि हमारे निष्क्रिय तापीय नियंत्रण के दौरान लगभग किसी भी स्थिति में, स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में प्रकाश प्रकीर्णन हो रहा है। यह मुख्य रूप से स्कोप के केंद्र के ठीक पार शून्य से लगभग 10 डिग्री दोनों दिशाओं में प्रकाश की एक चौड़ी पट्टी के रूप में दिखाई देता है। इस क्षेत्र में तारों को देखना बहुत मुश्किल है। पुनः संरेखण सफल रहे हैं। मैंने सेक्स्टेंट में तारे को देखकर संरेखण तो कर लिया, लेकिन स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में रेगोर या मेनकेंट जैसे मामलों में उपयोग कि
*** Конец, фанат номер 1, пере
卡纳文，我们最终的PQ
昔の毘翅目が美しく見えています。ヌンキも見えています。南半球の毘翅目も見えています。ヌンキは飛行経路上、まさに本来あるべき位置にあります。ヨーは0度、左ロールは5度、後退姿勢です。なぜこんなに複雑なのか、ぜひ知りたいですね。そして、あの人たちの上空にもう一つ明るい星が見えています。きっとアルタイルでしょう。素晴らしい。この飛行では、オーストラリア上空を飛んでいるとは思えないほど
范斯，看来电池充电断路器之前看起来好像已经插上了，但实际上并没有。弗雷德把它拔下来重新插好后，就开始读取数据
わかりました。1に
罗杰，弗兰克。原因是地平线校准需要多个点才能为即将启动
फ्लाइट विभाग का कहना है कि उन्हें CSQ पर टेप डंप की आवश्यकता है, इसलिए कृपया उचित स्थिति में आ जाएं। यह 3 घंटे 3 मिनट के GMT पर होगा। क्या आपको समझ आ
ठीक है, जिम। ये काफी हद तक मिलते-जुलते हैं - मुझे लगता है कि आपको बस इन्हे
好的。在页面顶部，步骤
よく聞こえたか、ビル。
تفضل 
Хорошо. Два выключателя — два автоматических выключателя на панели 250 — снов
This is Friendship Seven. An observation on control system operation: It appears that whenever I go off on manual, or fly-by-wire and maneuver for any lengthy period of time, that somehow we induce considerably, considerable errors into the gyro system. I come up with all kinds of attitudes. That time for instance, when I yawed around 180°, and held for a little
ठीक है। हम ज़रूर कोशिश करेंगे। जैसा कि मैंने कहा, हमारे पास
弗兰克，我们现在拍到照片了。它在抽
That's a more accurate reading on fuel if I can get my fingers up to it would be 78, 78 (percent) - prior to retro. I am set up to have retro performed - automatic control - subsequent to retro - I will switch to fly-by-wire and pitch up to re
Ricevuto. Ci fermiamo qui sullo scarico dell'acqua, però, solo per verificare che lo sfiato del
Okay, Jim. We're going to have to get back with you in a couple of minutes on whether or not we switch over at this time to your other canister. Second point, it might help in setting up this if you concentrate on roll first, and get that going;
ठीक है। और एक और बात जो हमने देखी। जब आपने दबाव डाला, तो एसेंट टैंकों में दबाव बढ़ गया, इसलिए हम चाहते हैं कि आप यह सत्यापित करें कि एसेंट फीड बंद हैं। ऐसा करने के लिए, पैनल 11 पर, एसेंट फीड 1 और 2 के सर्किट ब्रेकर बंद करें और पार्कर वाल्व 
Jim, concernant la con
E passere
자, 지구 여러분
ハワイとカリフォルニアの間の3分の1は
Вперед, пр
Manœuvre de survol / 62954, moins 162, plus 129 953 578 - ce sont 00953 et plus 000578 - moins 02076 000 000 000, non applicable, plus 00202, 02356 022 02280 03 0393 310 013, vers le haut 048, à droite 35, plus 1418, moins 165 0
मुझे नहीं पता कि मैंने अपना ट्रांसपोंड
感謝しま
حسنًا. L2 كما هو موضح. L3 كما هو موضح؛ يوجد حوالي 
Я имею в виду... я имею в виду весь... я имею в виду, расход топлива оказался намного больше, чем я предполагал, понимаете? Я думал, что смогу примерно сравняться с симулятором по... а я не смог... Держу пари, я использовал... не хочу называть цифры, но в симуляторе я терял около 30
オーロラ・セブン、オーロラ・セブン、こちらはザンジバル通信技術です。HF/UHFで送
Das ist bestätigt. Der Grund, warum wir die Logik abschalten, Jack, ist die Energieeinsparung. W
Sagen wir, immer wenn ich Jack verließ, kam Fred dazu, wir aßen ungefähr eine Stunde lang, und dann ging ich ins Bett. Also, wie lange das auch immer ged
看来用单筒望远镜获得稳定视野的最佳方法是，先稳住望远镜，让它在眼前慢慢合拢，然后你轻轻地靠近它，注意不要碰到它。它的移动非常缓慢，这样就
حسنًا. وعندما تنتهي من ذلك، لتثبيت القوس في مكانه، 
Джим, я не знаю, насколько детально вы можете рассмотреть объект, но ваша точка нахождения в космическом пространстве находится посреди Тихого океана, примерно на полпути между Австралией и Южно
Requesting your suit inlet temper
不完全
そうは思わない。彼はここに
Roger. Did you say you had som
Хорошо, Майк. Это 
甚高频信号很好
你没在 DIRECT 模式下做这件
こちらアポロ8号、月から生中継でお送りしています。テレビカメラを切り替える必要がありました。まずは、過去16時間にわたって地球の様子をお伝えしました。次は、高度60マイル（約97キロメート
알았어, 시간 좀 나면
ジェミニ4号、RKV。指揮官パイロットのタイプ1は
Okay, Jack. CB BAT CHARGER to AC P
모든 상태가 아주 좋습니다. 슈트의 열 돔 온도는 약 72도, 흡입구 온도는 약 63도로 
Non posso dire molto sulla visibilità qui senza la visiera alzata. È buio. Sembra che ci sia una *** superficie di *** roccia frantumata *** E tra l'altro, queste rocce *** hanno una s
了解。プラス25、/63087、マイナス162、プラス129、マイナス00163、プラス00001、プラス52759 177 137 001、該当なし、プラス00201 52759 623 52543 14 2347 337 023、上195、左1.7、プラス1145、マイナス16500 12780 35890。
Хорошо. Итак, мы используем режим PRO, и в итоге получаем мигающий 5018; а здесь нужен режим AUTO, а не использование, поэтому мы используем режим PRO с наведением, PNGS; режим управления, AUTO. У нас есть мертвая зона в 1,4 градуса, которая позволит нам навести стрелки на цель, и в этот момент я смот
All right, Jack. That's CB SENSOR UNIT, DC, that's Delt
Okay. come segue: /: 45597, meno 040, più 157, più 35189, meno 01513, meno 00346 180 007 000, non applicabile, più 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, Scorpii Delta (Dzuba), 
Okay. Das ist richtig. Um von dieser Konfiguration aus umzukonfigurieren, Jack, lassen Sie bitte die MAIN BUS TIE-Schalter in der Pos
Fred, wir haben die Story schon für dich, die ist ziemlich gut. Wir gehen sie gerade durch. Und ich würde die Frage gern auf später verschieben. Im Grunde schalten wir jetzt ab und nehmen die Ergebnisse. Wir haben einen Mittelkurs von maximal 1,5 Metern pro Sekunde, egal wo im Brennvorgang, um wieder in den freien Rückkehrmodus zu gelangen. Das ist im Prinzip die Story. Wir geben dir gleich die Missi
حسنًا. هذا مسار بيريسنثيان زائد 2 لعودة سريعة. سيكون هذا / 62871، ناقص 161، زائد 129، زائد 45224، ناقص 06216، ناقص 18712 001 287 351، ألفا نوفمبر زائد 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296، الأرض لأعلى 010، يمين 
Роджер. 295 на стр. 68. Повторите ещ
Ok, Jack. Ti hanno mai dett
أبولو 8، هيوستن
嗯，我要等到 12:5
في البداية، حالت العملية دون بدء عمليات الرصد فورًا كما خططنا، نظرًا لوجود مناورة مراوغة أخرى. تسبب تفريغ الحمولة في ظهور كمية هائلة من النجوم الزائفة في المنطقة، مما جعل معايرة البصريات شبه مستحيلة. لم تكن الطريقة التي ابتكرناها فعالة. أما الطريقة التي استخدمتها في النهاية، فكانت التوجه إلى نجم الشعرى اليمانية (سيريوس)، وهو ألمع نجومنا، والحصول على العمود والمحور، ثم توجيه المركبة الفضائية إلى سيريوس لاستخدامهما في البصريات، وهو ما فعلناه لاحقًا. فيما يتعلق بتشتت الضوء، يبدو أننا نتلقى تشتتًا ضوئيًا في التلسكوب الماسح الضوئي في أي وضع تقريبًا أثناء التحكم الحراري السلبي. يتخذ هذا التشتت شكل شريط ضوئي عريض يمتد عبر مركز التلسكوب بزاوية 10 درجات تقريبًا في كلا الاتجاهين من الصفر. من الصعب جدًا رؤية النجوم في هذه المنطقة. وقد كانت عمليات إعادة المحاذاة جيدة. تمكنتُ من تحديد النجم في السدس لإجراء المحاذاة، لكنني لم أستطع التعرف على النجم الذي استخدمناه في حالات مثل ريغور أو مينكنت في التلسكوب الماسح. أظهرت أول رؤية نجمية التقطتها للأرض أفقًا غير واضح المعالم. لكن بدا أن هناك خطًا واضحًا إلى حد ما بين ما بدا أنه أفق الأرض والغلاف الجوي. بدا أن مرشح خط الرؤية المرجعي قد ساعد في تحديد هذا الأفق. يوجد أفق ضبابي وغير واضح للغاية بين الفضاء وأعلى الغلاف الجوي نفسه، وهذا يصعب استخدامه. كما ذكرت سابقًا، في بعض الأحيان، عند النظر إلى القمر مع وجود الشمس في الجوار، لا تكون المنطقة المحيطة بالقمر مظلمة، بل فاتحة - تظهر كلون أزرق فاتح. وينطبق الأمر نفسه عند النظر في السدس أثناء المحاذاة مع النجم - مع وجود الشم
Jack, wir geben dir drei grobe Anstellwinkel, und dann kannst du 
يا أهل هيوستن، انتبهوا 
Ok.
انتظر قليلاً. سأتحقق من ذلك. وبالمناسبة، أهلاً بك في
ठीक है। मैंने आपको जो मौसम की जानकारी दी थी, उसके अनुसार लक्ष्य बिंदु पर 2000 फीट की दूरी पर बिखरी हुई धुंध के ऊपर 6000 फीट की दूरी पर एक और धुंध की परत हो सकती है। अधिकतम लिफ्ट बिंदु पर भी लगभग यही स्थिति होगी, और अल्टीमीटर की रीडिंग भी पूरी रेंज में एक जैसी ही रहेगी। जैसे-जैसे आप पूर्व की ओर बढ़ेंगे, मौसम में थोड़ा सुधार होना चाहिए; आपके रिकवरी क्षेत्
Ok.
Bonjour Carnarvon, bonjour Carnarvon
بينما يقوم ب
रॉजर, अभी हम निर्वात में हैं
Wir haben bei Messpunkt 2 einen Wert von 3050 und bei Messpunkt 1 einen Wert von -3000, der dann auf 2990 abfällt. Daher bin ich mir nicht sicher, ob das wirklich darauf hindeutet, dass es nicht vo
主母线连接，两个，开启，Fred。好的。氦气阀，两个，自动，并已检查自动理发柱。伺服电源为：1，AC1/主电源A；2，AC2
Хорошо. Извините, что мы 
알겠습니다. 다음 단계는 12번 패널입니다. S-밴드 기능을 음성으로, 범위 기능을
Вызов станции... Слушаю вас. Повторите. Коне
Houston, Columbia kann Eagle weder über Antennen noch über VHF-Duplex Bravo empfangen. Haben Sie irgendwelche
Я определённо вижу следы рыскания в окне, в перископе, в прицельной сетке. Само окно работает удовлетворительно при угле обзора (-) 34 градуса, я закрыл 
... ox
— Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы сразу перешли к 060 и обнулили свои настройки для фотосъемки кометы Беннета. Для этого нам нужно включить квадрокоптеры C и D. Для выполнения маневра используйте все свои квадрокоптеры. И ровно через 1 минуту мы хотели бы, чтобы вы разрядили батарею B. Еще одна пр
Bene. Sul pannello 326, vogliamo che le valvole REPRESS PACKAGE siano su OFF; le valvole O2 SUPPLY su OFF; la valvola SU
Roger, Canary. Ich werde wahrscheinlich keinen 
Oui, c'es
알겠습니다. 1단계, "자세 제어, 3에서 펄스까지"; 2단계, "피치와 요가 0이 되도록 롤링", 그러면 
Okay. Here we go. The interest in the Flight of Apollo 11 continues at a high level but a competing interest in the Houston area is the easing of watering rules. Mayor Louie Welch promises a lifting of lawn-watering restrictions if the rains continue. Friday is 
Oh, no, we've got plenty of drinking water. I
ОМНИ Чарли, пожалуйста,
로저. 모든 
Bene. Abbiamo appena ricevuto un avviso di batteria scarica, ALL
Roger. Neil ha il battito cardiaco più veloce mai visto su un volo spaziale con equipaggio, e abbiamo appena ridotto il bit r
谢谢
Vance, potrebbe interessarti: per come sia
Roger. Vorremmo che entrambi foste nel campo visivo della telecamera
Bene, vediamo: la prossima volta che supereremo la collina, credo che dovremmo averli sul guadagno elev
地平線はオレンジ色の帯のように見えます。太陽が沈み、両側に大きく広が
Хорошо. Сейчас написано: «Чтобы выйти из G&N», затем есть изменение, сделанное ручкой и чернилами, на: «АВТО ВЫБОР, 12 ОСНОВНЫЕ A и B». И вы доходите до шага 1, напечатанного на бумаге. Мы хотели бы переместить «АВТО ВЫБОР, 12 ОСНОВНЫЕ A и B» на второй шаг, так что процедура 
نعم. لقد قمنا بقياس ضغط الدم. أعطنا علامة عندما تكون مستعدًا
了
لا،
알겠습니다, 버즈. 첫 번째로, 착륙 지점 경사 지도가 제 위치에 있지 않은 것
حسناً. فهمت. سأضبط الدو
좋습니다, 짐. 선실 상태가 아주 좋아 보입니다. 이제 슈트 압축기를 끄시는
Roger. Wie steht es um unsere Triebwerkszündungen? Wir sind fast bereit,
好的。今天，我们需要您在按照程序进行观测之前和之后分别进行一次耳轴偏差测定。我们的目的是检查是否存在某种热效应导致六分仪角度读数出现误差。您之前测定的偏差应该被计入，也就是说，当您连续两次测量结果相差在 0.003 度以内时，请在 NOUN 87 上执行 PROCEED 操作。当然，在两次测量之间，请将耳轴移动几度。今天地球在您的视野中应该会小很多。我相信您比我们更了解这一点，但为了确保您能够准确测量恒星与地球地平线之间的角度，六分仪的 M 线（即穿过两个刻度线并垂直于 R 线的线）在
收到。我完全明
Houston, est-ce que vous com
أوقاتك في اختبار ثري-ألف
OAMS हीटर्स का सर्किट ब्रेकर 
Okay. Jack, ich möchte noch einmal betonen, dass wir frühestens nach 2,5 Stunden mit den Energie-Vorbereitungen beginnen können. Alles andere kannst du wie gewohnt erledigen und dich so weit wie möglich vorbereiten
Roger. Apollo 8, eure Daten von der Rückseite sind so 
Bonjour, Muchea Com Tech, Muchea Com Tech. Roger. Friendship Seven. Bien r
休斯顿，阿波
ربما كان لدي الكثير لأقوله. ماذا لديكم أن
Eagle, Houston. You can go ahead and turn your updata link sw
肯，我是弗兰克。我
연소 상
Give 
Roger, Understand. Sounds very good. Z cal off; R cal coming on.
J'ai vérifié la température du dôme de la combinaison: elle est de 82 degrés et vous venez de la régler sur 6,5. Avez-v
حسنًا. تصحيح المسار رقم 4: ألفا نوفمبر / 62888، ألفا نوفمبر ناقص 00012، ناقص 00011، زائد 00012 031 008 323، ألفا نوفمبر، زائد 00618 00020 011 00020 17 2965 308، ألفا قنطورس، لأعلى 073، لليسار 34. بالنسبة للنجوم، سيكون النجم ال
И к вашему сведению, мы также организуем встречу в Tranquil
了解しました、
ठीक है। एक बात, जो; मैं एक बार फिर से पुष्टि करना चाहता हूँ। जो चीज़ें सामान्यतः 57 घंटे से शुरू होती थीं, जिनमें से पहली चीज़
지평선이 멋지고 흥미롭네요.
Oh, golly, let me have that
1
分かりました。ヴァンスさん、皆さんが後で考えていた物のリストをいくつか集めていたと理解しました。それを向こう側から向こう側へ持ち帰る予定でした。そのリストにいくつか追
Ok, Mike. Ovviamente, questo vale nel caso in cui il G&N e il gimbal si fermino e tu debba volare a g costante; e quello che stiamo cercando di fare è estendere l'autonomia a g costante da 1100 a 1500 miglia. Abbiamo eseguito questa procedura nel simulatore e funziona bene. In pratica, la spiegherò - la spiegherò e poi, se hai domande, torna a trovarci. Ma è lo stesso vettore di portanza fino al massimo g, poi il vettore di portanza scende, e poi moduli il vettore di portanza finché il punto g non va a zero. Ok. Questa procedura è essenzialmente la stessa finora. E poi mantieni il punto g a zero finché non superi il tempo trascorso RETRO della V circolare; e poi, dopo aver superato questo tempo trascorso RETRO della V circolare, rolla fino a un angolo di gimbal di 45 gradi, e poi mantieni questo angolo di inclinazione costante di 45 gradi finché n
Sie sind im Computer
Columbia, Houston. Richiedi in ACCEPT e ti forniremo un buo
好的。如果我把俯仰角保持在115度左右而不是
Подожди один час,
关于启动辅助
Информация 
收到，我是阿波罗8号，休斯顿。现在信号很清晰。刚才几分钟背景噪音比
Роджер. Судя по плану полета, у вас запланировано выравнивание в точке А, и нам придется сделать еще одно выравнивание в точке А в рамках подготовки к следующему этапу. В соответствии с наземными процедурами, допустимо, если вы захотите отложить выравнивание и сделать его только один раз в точке А, или вы можете сделать это там же, в месте, указанном в плане полета. Если вы
حسناً يا جو. هل يجب أن تكون هذه العلبة قيد التشغيل الآن لأنها مثبتة بالفعل
好的。请您读一下主氧气压力
イーグル、ヒュースト
Pu
フレッド、先日
Roger. J'ai une mi
How much time do
いいえ、レンズのことは
ठीक है। अपोलो 8, हम आपकी घड़ी को अपडेट करना चाहते हैं। यह वर्तमान त्रुटियों को ठीक करने के लिए नहीं है, बल्
11, ह्यूस्टन। लगता है हमें इसे फिर से शुरू करना होगा - इसे फिर से शुरू करना
好的。你是想
Да, сэр. Это карта. Каждый сгиб обозначен буквами в нижнем или верхнем правом углу, если двигаться с востока на запад, а схемы обозначены буквами D, E и F, и все сольные партии будут обозначены буквами D и E, и
Bien. Aujourd'hui, nous vous demandons de déterminer le biais du tourillon avant et après les observations, comme indiqué dans la p
대량 샘플에서 깊이에 따른 변화를 살펴보던 지역에서는 최대 3인치까지 파낼 수 있었습니다. 실제로 큰 차이는 없었고, 단단한 층은 발견되지 않았습니다. 그런데 나중에, 또는 다
Okay. As the first step, I have one change to the basic configuration that we gave you, and it's two more circuit breakers that
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Примерно 3,5 минуты. Вы всё е
وكانت بلونك يا جون. كان وصفًا دقيقًا جدًا. مع ذلك، في الجانب المشرق، إذا نقرت عليها، فإنها تبدو بيضاء تمامًا. أما عند شروق الشمس، فتظهر بلون اليراعات ا
ロジャー、ア
Houston, per informazione. Sto guardando attraverso il telescopio a scansione ora e ved
Хорошо. Прежде чем продолжить, давайте установим высокую скорость передачи данных и подождем 1 секунду. Затем, по мере выполнения процедуры, мы просим вас подождать, пока включится пит
哦，绿队状态不错。绿队队员已经在这里待了好几个小时了。我们在
By the way, the windows came through in real good shape. Window 5 looks real clean, so I am kind of hopeful that 
لدي بعض التحديثات المبهجة لك عندما تكو
Ja. Wir haben
روجر، الأ
射程速率为每秒 1
그건
And, 13, from Houston
이해했습
Ta
はい。今、君が
11番、こちらヒューストンです。通信が一部しか聞こえ
Non ci interessa la pressione della camera,... fai attenzione, preparati, in 
... دعونا نتر
사용하시는 빈
Близнецы 4, Близнецы 4. Это связь с центром управления воздушным движением Хьюстона.
Questo
Anche qui, in un certo senso, succe
ठीक है। अब जब हम चौथी पंक्ति में पहुँचेंगे, तो हम ऑपरेट सर्किट ब्रेकर को खोल देंगे; इसका मतलब यह है कि हम आपके सीडीयू को देखने की क्षमता खो देंगे, 
コマンドモジュールのドッキングライ
हमें बस इतना करना है कि... यहाँ टेप लगा दें... 
Ja. Es lief wirklich super, bis auf wenige Ausnahmen, 
Jim, would you give us PCM to HI bit rate. We think maybe we might be
हम सभी को कुछ न कु
휴스턴 이글, 멋지
Jack, tu es dans l'ombre en ce moment; nous avons un peu d'interférences à cause de ta fenêtre, qui est très lumineuse, donc nous ne pouvons pas - je crois que tu souris, mais c'est un peu diff
你好，加州首都公关部，友谊七号。完
わかった。わかった。もう探す
このソース圧力は 2050 です。ソース温度は 56 
以下是休斯顿联合通讯社记者哈里·罗森塔尔的报道。对于两岁的杰弗里·洛弗尔来说，两个圣诞老人点亮了他的平安夜。第一个圣诞老人敲响了他的家门，带来了礼物。第二个圣诞老人则从月球上接回了他的爸爸。第一个圣诞老人身穿红色圣诞老人套装，留着白色胡子，发出响亮的“嚯嚯”声，整个街区都能听到。第二个圣诞老人是月球背后喷吐火焰的巨型发动机，成千上万的人都在等待着它点火成功的消息。“请知悉，圣诞老人来了！”这是阿波罗8号打破无线电静默，向焦急的全世界宣布发动机完成关键点火15分钟后发出的第一句话。“我们谁也没想到会收到比这更好的圣诞礼物，”任务控制中心的肯·马丁利说道。“感谢地面上的所有人。你们知道，没有你们，我们不可能完成这项任务，”飞船指挥官弗兰克·博尔曼上校回应道。这时，任务控制中心控制台前的圣诞树亮了起来，宇航员哈里森·施密特为机组人员朗读了太空版的《圣尼古拉斯的来访》。故事开头是这样的：“圣诞前夜，在遥远的太空，阿波罗8号的宇航员们刚刚赢得了登月竞赛。”任务控制中心的工作人员推迟了庆祝活动，直到杰弗里的父亲，海军上校詹姆斯·洛弗尔，以及空军少校威廉·A·安德斯和博尔曼上校安全返回地球。往年的平安夜，宇航员们的家人都会去教堂参加圣诞礼拜，但今年他们都守在电视机前。载人航天中心附近的房屋都装饰一新。洛弗尔家周围的草坪以及他所在的蒂姆伯湾社区都挂满了墨西哥风格的灯笼。就在这时，一辆车开了过来，车上载着一个高大的圣诞老人，背着一个大麻袋。他“呵呵呵”地走到门口，用力敲了敲门。门开了，杰弗里·洛弗尔站在门口，他将于1月14日满3岁。杰弗里看到
Apollo 11, Houston. Wenn Sie es sehen, sollte es auftauchen – es scheint, als käme es durch die Wolken. McDona
Anch'io. C
그 모든 유용한 정보를 실제 수치와 맞바꾸겠습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주시면, 마이
3時26分33秒に、空に10個の粒子が見えることに気付きました。それらは間違いなく私には輝いて見えます。小さな霜のかけらのように見えました。
ジェミニVIII、ヒューストンCAP COM。TRマイナス4 
Roger.
Friendship Seven, this is Indian Cap Com. We read 95° on aut
127:11까지 내려가서 "Verify ON"을 지우세요. 그 바로 아래에서 "127:14:20, st
एक्वेरियस, ह्
Okay, I re
Что ж, если у специалистов по системам возникнут какие-либо вопросы, мы с удовольствием предоставим вам любые д
Sta
네, 맞습니다. 착륙장을 드리겠습니
Roger. Understand you want the check on low bit rat
Jim, potresti chiamare Jack in camera da letto e dirgli che quando avrà le letture di bordo, vorremmo che tornasse indietro, usasse la 
روجر. التوجيهات تبدو 
알
分かりました。全部理解できたか確認しましょう。ランデブーのために、まずCB 16 インバータ2を閉じ、CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE インバータ2も閉じます。次にパネル14でインバータ2が選択されていることを確認します。そしてCB 11 ランデブーレーダー2が閉じ、両方のブレーカーが閉じていることを確認します。次にランデブーレーダー解放ハンドルを引きます。パネル3で、ランデブーレーダーをA ENTERですべてのジップをプラスし、レジスタ1と2に28300をプラスします。GOを押します。次に16 72で動きを監視します。車両が駐車したら、CB 11 ランデブーレーダー2を開き、続いてENTERを押します。そしてCB 16 インバータ2を開きます。さて、アラインメントにランプが点灯するときが来たら、CB 16、INVERTER 2 が閉じ、CB 11 AC BUS A LAMP が閉じ、アラインメントが完了すると CB 16、INVERTER 2 が開き、CB 
Roger. I unde
T
Hallo, Bermuda Cap
Хорошо. Первая строка: «УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ПОЗИЦИЕЙ, три до PULSE»; вторая строка: «Кренитесь, пока не достигнете крена плюс-
好的。我想我已经掌握了地球在宇宙中的
はい、すべ
OK. La mise sous tension a été effectuée et tout semblait correct. Je suis face à un voyant d'avertissement et de coupure de courant allumé, ainsi qu'à tous les voyants rouges. Les deux disjoncteurs X LUNAR BUS TIE sont enclenchés. Le disjoncteur d'éclairage utilitaire est enclenché; puis l'affichage AC BUS B HELIUM PQS; l'éclairage numérique AC BUS B et l'onduleur 1 AC BUS B sont allumés – le BUS TIE est fermé. J'ai ensuite fermé le disjoncteur de l'onduleur 1 et, sur le panneau 16, le disjoncteur du capteur de signal est enclenché; j'ai sélectionné l'onduleur 1 et mis le commutateur du moniteur d'hélium sur SUPERCRIT, mais aucun 
सी-1 बंद ह
Quelli che ho visto a poppa della navicella sembravano un bel po' più scuri; ovviamente, visti da poppa, avevano il Sole che splendeva direttamente su di loro. Sembrava che il materiale fosse stato un po' cott
Роджер, я только что его включил, буквально
음, 어쨌든 뭔가 해야 할 게 있잖아... 게다가, 그걸 없애버리면 되
Okay, Apollo 8. Das ist – das ist richtig. Sie verwenden eine hohe Bitrate, und wir befürchten, dass der Speicherplatz vor dem Brennvorgang erschöpft sein könnte. Daher möchten wir die Daten löschen und Ihnen das System vor 
收到。
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。你们都起床了吗？
Columbia, Houston. Ho u
好的。目前我们已经控制住了
Im DIRECT-Modus fun
Roger. Kopiert für die Höhenanpassung GET des Brennvorgangs, 03 plus 03 plus 19; Delta-V, 0,8, Dauer, 0 plus 01; Gierwinkel 00
Ok
रॉजर। मुझे खुशी है कि आप क्रमांक 6 की प्रतिलिपि बनाने के लिए तैयार हैं। ऐसा करने से पह
Ha smesso di piovere, anche se è un po' umido
कैलिफ़ोर्निया कैप कॉम, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यूएचएफ। क्या आप अभी सिग्नल प्राप्त कर रहे हैं? समाप
罗杰，坎顿。我刚才忙着在这里操作。还没来得及
«Аполлон-11», Хь
Ok. Ditemi semplicemente con che tipo 
We haven't picked up A
Roger. On v
Another t
صحيح يا قائد الاتصالات، من السهل جدًا المناورة بالمدفع. مشكلتي الوحيدة هي نفاد الوقود. لقد نفد الوقود الآن، وتمكنت من المناورة حول مقدمة المركبة الفضائية، ثم خلفها، والوصول إلى أعلى المحول. كدتُ أعود إلى مجال رؤية جيم. أتمنى لو كان لدي المزيد. هذه أروع تجربة مررت بها... إنها مذهلة! الآن أنا واقف على رأسي، وأنظر إلى الأسفل مباشرة، ويبدو أننا نقترب من ساحل كاليفورنيا. أدور ببطء نحو اليمين. لا أشعر بأي ارتباك على الإطل
У вас есть место, где
Roger. Verstanden. 
حسنًا. وإذا لم تتمكن من تحقيق ذلك، فبالتأكيد، اب
짐이 보고한 내용과 관련하여 어떤 문제가 발생했을 경우, 신속하게 해결할 수 있는 간단한 방법 한 
Go ahead, C
罗杰，吉姆。我们希望你偶尔能透过前视窗口看到地球；如果真是
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿
こちらフレンドシップ7号機。フライ・バイ・ワイヤによる操縦に問題はありません。ドリフトは1秒あたり約1°の速度で発生しており、他の軸では姿勢を良好
Roger s
Roger. Sono Gemini 4. Sono il Pilota di Comando. Ho appena finito un pisolino di circa 5 ore e mezza, di cui le ultime 3 ore di sonno sono state piuttosto buone. Le prime 2 e mezza sono state piuttosto agitate. Sto consumando il secondo pasto del quarto giorno e non ho bevuto che circa 5 sorsi d'acqua da quando mi sono svegliato, ma ho intenzione di berne altri 10 o 15 
Роджер. Это 40 футов. Ты получил последний,
——在页面顶部，您会看到步骤 38
好的。耗材更新：46 加 00：减去 5.5%，减去 6.5%，减去 2.5%，减去 7.5%，减去 5.0%，减去 2 磅氢气，加上 1 磅氧气，总计减去 5.5% 
还
ここの窓はきれいなので、あまり
Apollo 8, préparez-vous à quelques bruits parasites pendant le changement de configuration au sol. Nous allons procéder au test 1; les liaisons montantes
Okay. What I said is... to keep me straight but the Gulf Coast is off-l
Hier spricht Friendship Seven auf UHF. Als ich damals über das Bergungsgebiet flog, sah ic
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। मुझे लगता है कि इसका कारण बाद की 
Ventilatori Cryo spenti 
Amicizia Sette, Amicizia Sette, q
D'accord. Pour revenir à l'apogée, sans objet; au périgée, plus 00191. Et vous n'avez pas rêvé
Сейчас у нас ещё и много фонового шума. Если вы подождёте минуту-другую, пока мы немного продвинем
알았어... 전화
もう一
Va bene. È maggiore di 1,8 ma minore di 65 e maggiore di 150 per maggiore 
حسنًا، ما أعرضه الآن يا جاك هو LEVVA، وقد سبق عرضه أيضًا. إنه غطاء رأس يُرتدى على سطح الأرض، وأنا - أحضر غطاء جيم هنا لأعرض بعض التعديلات. إحدى المشاكل السابقة هي عدم القدرة على تمييز الشخصيات الموجودة على سطح الأرض بشكل جيد. لذا، ليس فقط بدلة جيم بها بعض الخطوط الحمراء، بل كما ترى، غطاء LEVVA الخاص به يحتوي أيضًا على خط أحمر. والآن يمكنك رؤية تعديل آخر هنا أيضًا يا جاك، لم أره بنفسي من قبل. أعتقد أنه في الحلقة 12، علّق بي
Okay, Jack. CB-Batterieladegerät an Netzstrom anschließen, schließen. Warten. Okay. Ich musste hier eine Lampe besorgen. CB-Batterieladegerät, Batterieladung, schließen; CB-Wechselrichtersteuerung 2, schließen; CB-Wechselrichtersteuerung 3, schließen; die beiden Schalter
Okay. Als Nächstes: Entlastungsschalte
यह मात्रा के हिसाब से
Gius
Apollo 8, while we are waiting for the high gain, I will continue the trajectory summary. We can still get back to the mid-Pacific line in from the thirteenth, and you are on your way after 138 seconds of the burn. That's 138 seconds, gets you clear of the butterfly region. We recommend not trying preignitions or restarts after 20 seconds. If you go beyond 20 seconds, this may get the trajectory beyond the correction - correction capability to a free return. The weather in recovery area is good. We have an following of and an without of. During the burn, you may notice a slight change in chamber pressure and tank pressures due to the fuel exhaustion in the storage tank and going to the sump tank. This may occur somewhere around 2 to 5 seconds into the burn. It'll be a small change in pressures in both systems. Going down the systems, all systems are GO. In, we want to stop water boiling after for trajectory purposes. Your water dump situation looks good; you should be good to greater than. We'll try to hold off the water dump until after 5. In the, we'd lik
ठीक है। सबसे पहले हम बैटरी को चार्ज करना चाहते हैं, ताकि हमें वहां कुछ पावर मिल सके और हम ऐसा कर सकें। इसके लिए हमने प्रक्रियाएँ तैयार कर ली हैं। पुनः प्रवेश के संबंध में, हम प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस से 5 घंटे पहले अपना अंतिम मध्यमार्ग लेने की योजना बना रहे हैं, और यदि आवश्यक हुआ तो। फिर हम प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस से लगभग साढ़े चार घंटे पहले सर्विस मॉड्यूल को अलग करना चाहेंगे, और अगले 3 से 3-1/2 घंटे तस्वीरें लेने, कमांड मॉड्यूल G&N को चालू करने, भंडारण और अन्य छोटे-मोटे काम निपटाने में बिताएंगे। हम प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस से 1 घंटे पहले तक इसे अपने पास रखेंगे, और फिर इसे अलग कर देंगे। ये प्रक्रियाएँ कल सुबह CMS और LMS में एकीकृत रूप से चलाई जाएंगी, और उम्मीद है कि दिन में बाद में हम मिशन कंट्रोल के साथ मिलकर इसे फिर से चलाएंगे। एक सवाल यह है कि हम इसके साथ क्या करेंगे? ऐसा माना जा रहा है कि कमांड मॉड्यूल में पर्याप्त ऑक्सीजन है और यह उच्च दबाव का स्रोत होने के साथ-साथ भंडारण की समस्या भी पैदा कर सकता है, इसलिए लोग इसे वहीं छोड़ने के बारे में सोच रहे हैं। दूसरी बात यह है कि हमें लगता है कि आप इसे उपयुक्त तरीके से प्रवेश कराना चाहेंगे, यानी इसे छोड़ने से पहले उपयुक्त सूट पहनन
Sì, stanno piangendo a Dallas. Risultati di basket: Houston non è andata molto bene ques
हे ह्यूस्टन; कुंभ राशि। डाउन वॉइ
D'accord. Nous som
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह इंडियन कैप कॉम है। सर्जन आपसे बात क
Ich weiß es nicht. Mir ist immer noch warm und ich schwitze, aber es ist nicht wirklich unangenehm. Ich würde dieses Problem mit der Anzugtempe
Ciao Sigma Seven, ciao Sigma Seven, sono Cal Cap Com, Cal Cap Com. Trasmetto in modalità nascosta. Abbiamo avuto un'interruzione di corrente al nostro ricevitore. Sto trasmettendo in modalità nascosta. Reimposta il tuo orologio per la retrosequenza alle ore 19:00. Questo tiene conto dell'errore del tuo orologio all'ultima lettura. L'ultimo rapporto era impostato su 27 secondi. Questo dovrebbe essere 33 secondo l'ultimo controllo che abbiamo avuto con te. Cape vuole che tu reimposti quel valo
了解。アポロ13号、ヒューストン。全システム作動確認済
あれ
よし、スキッパー。君を暖かくする方法が分かった。今からパワーアップを始めることにした。君にはやってほしいことがある。入隊準備チェックリストの一番上にある「BAT 5 NORMAL FEED 
伦敦的BBC正在考虑一种特殊的无线电警报系统，以
أتعرف، أنا سعيد نوعًا ما لأنني ارتديت واقي الوجه... من أجل العمل ال
アポロ8号、高ゲインを待っている間に軌道の概要を続けます。13日から太平洋中部線に戻ることはまだ可能です。138秒後には進路に着きます。138秒でバタフライ領域を抜けられます。20秒後にはプレイグニッションや再始動を試みないことをお勧めします。20秒を超えると、軌道が修正範囲（自由帰還への修正能力）を超えてしまう可能性があります。回復エリアの天候は良好です。次の状態と次の状態があります。燃焼中、貯蔵タンク内の燃料が枯渇してサンプタンクに流れ込むため、チャンバー圧力とタンク圧力にわずかな変化が見られる場合があります。これは燃焼開始から2～5秒後に発生する可能性があります。両システムとも圧力のわずかな変化です。システム全体を見てみると、すべてGOです。軌道を維持するために、その後は水の沸騰を止めたいと考えています。排水状況は良好です。 より大きい値でも問題ないはずです。 排水は 5 以降まで延期します。
Sigma Seve
Роджер. Это было связано
Nein, wenn in der rechten Spalte für all diese Punkte etwas steht, brauchen wir das nicht mehr zu tun. Und jetzt noch eine Sache, die ich Ihnen schulde: Wie man die
Ho un po' 
Roger, Friendship Seven. This is Canary CapCom. Repeat blood pressure check, repeat blood pressure ch
マルチプレクサが故障し、地上で複数の温度を読み取ることができません。お知らせいたします。キャビン温度、左スーツタップ、右スーツタ
И вот мы приближаемся к кратерам Коломбо и Гутенберг. Видны очень хорошие детали. Мы можем в
Vous voulez que je fasse un virement automatique cette fois-ci
रॉजर। अब हम निम्नलिखित दृष्टिकोण की अनुशंसा करते हैं: रोल 307.0, पिच 354.0, यॉ 019.5, और एलओएक्स डंप पहले ही सक्षम कर दिया गया 
Roger. La temperatura in cabina è scesa a 15°C 
That's right. You think they will share a win
Okay, DOCKING PROBE, RETRACT, two of them,
And we're
Die Auslasstemperatur des Glykolverdampfers beträgt 50 Grad und der Komfor
本当にがっかり
Houston, er wird eine 16 geben, Jack. Und okay, ich habe die Sauerstoffheizung und die Lüfter in Tank 1 ausge
Да, в прошлый раз это даже не было видно в окне CDR; на этот раз это было видно, если присесть, но слишком высоко, чтобы получить показания
سنقدم المزيد من الم
了解。賛成です。ただし
रॉजर
جيميني 4، 
아폴로 11호, 여
تم الاستلام، 
Negativo. Non lo è stato. Mi è capitato un caso in cui sono entrato in assetto di rientro dopo - correzione, prima - Canton, ma questo era per controllare le stelle di notte dopo Woomera. E ho avuto un sussulto, che credo
Bo
Ядро двигателя откроется, и, я полагаю, ASA т
ジョン、下層を通過
Okay. Wir müssen noch die beiden Vorgehensweisen besprechen, die wir anwenden werden, um das Problem der be
روجر، ١١. في العمود أ، الصفحة F2-20، السطر ٥، البيانات الج
了解。Rev 57、シーケンス16、08:11、ヨー12°、ピッチ30°、16mmカメラ。Rev 58、シーケンス12、09
खैर, मुझे हैच पर पूरा भरोसा है, बशर्ते वह आसानी से लग जाए और लॉक हो जाए; मुझे नहीं लगता कि हमें सूट की ज़रूरत है, और हम अपने खाली समय में जो एक काम करेंगे, वह है उस हैच को लगाने का अभ्यास करना, य
네, 괜찮습니다. 할 수 있는 일이 있습니다. 재점검을 하는 것이죠. 하지만 그 과정이 다소 번거롭습니다. 그래서 저희는 진입 전에 두 개의 루프를 사용할 수 있을지
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। क्वाड ए पर हम जिस हीलियम टैंक 
好的。你的出发时间是——听起来不错。这样我们就有充足的时间来准备应对措施，以防万一我们在停车和到达目的地时遇到任何问题—
Esatto, Jack. Queste sono le uniche modifiche ai punti 1-3. Ora passiamo ai punti 1-4. Nessuna modifica ai restanti tre interruttori del pannello 2. Sul pannello 3, i primi uno, due, t
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。映像の鮮明さとディテールには本当に感銘を受け
Houston, Tranquility Base. Dato che abbiamo ancora un sa
هل قر
सेंसर किया गया..
D'accord. « C'était la veille de Noël et, loin dans l'espace, l'équipage d'Apollo 8 venait de remporter la course vers la Lune; les casques étaient soigneusement accrochés aux consoles, dans l'espoir que Chris Kraft les rejoigne bientôt; Frank Borman était bien au chaud dans son lit, tandis que des visions de lune dansaient dans sa tête; et Jim 
مرحباً يا موشيا كوم تك. أنا فر
Bon, on s'est arrêtés pour un premier alignement, puis un alignement précis, et on a choisi une paire. On a choisi Capella, mais elle a roulé et on n'est arrivés nulle part. Je n'ai pas choisi Capella, et je n'en reconnais aucune pour l'instant. Est-ce que je peux recycler ici et revenir e
Tutti coloro che stanno ascoltando la registrazione sono pr
هيوستن، أبولو 11. سنبدأ مناورتنا للوص
Roger. Ho attraccato in modalità AUTO e, come ho detto, non ero molto sicuro del momento del contatto. Ho continuato a controllare gli indicatori della sonda di attracco. Ho visto due pali di barbiere che indicavano che i tre fermi di cattura - non fermi di cattura, ma i tre...
आप इन्हें इस गहरे रंग की स्लाइड के साथ ही लगाते हैं, है न
물론이죠. 그리고, 이번에는 배터리 충전 상태가
Это «Дружба Семь». Автоматический реверсивный сброс выключен. Селектор режимов работает нормально, управление скоростью, гироскоп в норме. Все Т-образные рукоятки включены, кроме ручного управления, которое выключено. В данный момент я управляю вручную. Переключ
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地。LOIO-LiOHの変更は、その後まで延期したいと思います。キャニスターを投棄する
よし、ジェリー。プログラム23はこれで終了だ。
कृपया थोड
أجل. لقد بدوا رائعين هنا أيضاً. يا إلهي! إنها كبسول
D'acco
收到。关于您的任务计时
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。1
Естественно. Температура в кабине — 92. Темпер
रॉजर। ध्यान दें कि आप अपनी निर्धारित गतिविधि की शुरुआत कर रहे हैं। प्रारंभिक ट्रैकिंग से ऐसा लगता है कि शुरुआती मध्यमार्ग में गति पहले अनुमान के अनुसार 4 फुट प्रति सेकंड से कम हो सकती है। हमने आपके बर्न डेटा को देखा है, और यह बिल्कुल वैसा ही सुचारू है जैसा आपने कहा था; सब कुछ सामान्य दिख रहा था। सिस्टम अब ठीक लग रहे हैं; ऐसा लगता है कि स्थिति के अनुसार, यदि आप चाहें तो हम आपके लिए ओम्नी को स्विच कर सकते हैं। हम जाते समय एंटेना को स्विच करने की स्थिति का अनुमान लगाने में सफल रहे हैं, और यदि इससे आपको कोई मदद मिलेगी
ジェミニVI、ヒューストン。テー
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Arrivo previsto per le 4:30. Tutti i sistemi funzionano alla grande. L'Eagle sta funzionando a meraviglia dopo un'o
D'accord. Nous nous préparons à la relève, et je voulais aborder quelques points avant. Pour l'instant, la vitesse du vent semble être d'au maximum 0,3 pied par seconde, il n'y aura donc pas de manœuvre de correction de trajectoire pour le segment 6. Le segment 7 est un peu plus important, et nous prendrons une décision à ce sujet plus tard. La météo sur le site d'atterrissage est toujours signalée comme bonne, avec des prévisions d'environ 2 000 pieds d'orages épars et 12 000 pieds d'orages fragmentés, soit à peu près les mêmes chiffres que ceux communiqués à Frank précédemment. La visibilité sera d'environ 10 milles, la hauteur des vagues d'environ 4 pieds. Il y a également 
わかりました。こちらにはご用意がありません。丸2日もお休みいただいておりますので、何かご用があればいつでもこちらで待機して
Когда у вас будет несколько минут, мы хотели бы услышать от вас подробный отчет о со
罗杰，我明白了。我已经吃完第二顿饭了。我大概喝了六口水。我也好好地用了排便袋，一切
Und Sie haben 6 Bilder pro Sekun
로저. 네, 맞습니다... 훈련 담당자는 기장석 쪽에 있고, 기장님은 주무시고 계신 걸로 알고 있습
D'accord. Ensuite, CB CTE, MAIN B, à fermer. Puis, panneau 250: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2 à fermer; CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING à fermer. Ensuite, panneau 275: CB MAI
로저. 우리 눈에는 당신이 아주 좋아 보여요. 콜럼비아 사람들이 
روجر. لم أفهم كل ما جاء في السؤال. بمجرد أن استيقظت شربت حوالي خمس رشفات من الماء، واستيقظت في منتصف ق
分かりました。ちょっと待ってください。確認します。それでは、星の観察に戻ってもいいで
罗
Хорошо. Май
- - è SPEN
双子座
わかりました。アポロ11号は依然として最大の話題であり、世界は今日、ヒューストン時間午前11時49分頃の着陸を待ち望んでいます。ワシントンでは、下院の税制改革派が、富裕層が非課税投資や特別控除によって所得税を完全に逃れることを不可能にする条項を策定しました。下院
ठीक है। अब जो मैंने लिया है वो मेरे इस पाइप के
Okay. 8,
حسناً. فهمت. السؤال الثاني: عندما ننتهي من -7، ستكون تلك المناورة لوضعية JETT عبارة عن زوايا تُعطى لنا من قِبلك باستخدام الكرة ا
우리는 간신히 버틸 수 있었지만, 요금이 너무 높아서 도킹 해제를 할 수 없었기 때문에 ACS OFF-cy
रॉजर। पैनल का संक्षिप्त विवरण इस प्रकार है: बाएँ पैनल पर फ़्यूज़ स्विच पहले बताए अनुसार ही हैं, इन्हें दोबारा नहीं बताया जा रहा है। स्क्विब सक्रिय है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। मोड सेलेक्ट सामान्य, ऑटो, जाइरो सामान्य है। सभी "T" हैंडल लगे हुए हैं। रेट्रो डिले सामान्य है, के
قد
Ok. Ottimo affare. Jack, lascia che ti dica qualcosa sul controllo di integrità del portello. Devi sfiatare il tunnel finché non ottieni un DELTA-P di 3 psi. Dovrebbero volerci 9 o 10 minuti, e siamo fermamente convinti che non sia necessario aspettare altri 10 minuti per un controllo delle perdite.
Ok, Houston. Abbiamo il bersaglio in vista
Find out where that - o
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। हम अभी बैटरी ए को च
والآن، ننتقل إلى بحر الخصوبة، وهما الصديقان ال
I think I bette
Аполлон-
네. +
Le letture dal pannello di visualizzazione de
Я всего лишь работал с этим, и с ручкой — я возился с ручк
التحكم م
Tatsächlich
Aquarius、セットを削除してジンバル/スロットルテストを実施してください。DE
Das ist richtig. Okay. Weiter: die nächste Kamera – Moment 1. Hier gibt es Rauschen. Okay. Die nächste Kamera ist die 16-mm-Kamera, und diese Fotos haben Priorität 3. Okay. Nehmen Sie die 16-mm-Kamera und den Akku von A-8. Nehmen Sie das 10-mm-Objektiv und entfernen Sie es. Nehmen Sie das 18-mm-Objektiv von B-3 und setzen Sie es an die Kamera. Schließen Sie das Stromkabel an, stellen Sie die Bil
क्या आपने उस समय हुई
Roger, Frank. Le segment intermédiaire n° 3 semble dépasser légèrement 30 cm par seconde, nous vous le déconseillons donc. Cela nous amène au segment intermédiaire n° 4, actuellement à environ 90 cm par seconde. Votre trajectoire est excellente. V
सुनो, क्या तुम चाहते हो कि मैं अंतरिक्ष यान को किसी और स्थिति
Ici Friendship Seven. Fort et clair. Comment ça va? 
Je l'ai d
로저, 잭. 투구
みんなLO
ああ、フレッド、スタンバイ1。あの姿勢制御、3、モード制御の位置を、フリーのすぐ下に変更したいのですが。都
Хорошо. Время 32 часа 00 минут. Инструкции по завершении маневр
سنح
我们在加那利群岛也收
还有，吉姆，我们——我们上
Jack, s'agissait-il uniquement de l'activation 1, étape 3, ou de l'activation 1 da
Eh bien, tout d'abord, il s'agit de la manœuvre de lacet 
Roger. Wenn eine vertikale Linie vorhanden ist, neigen diese horizontalen Bänder dazu, kleine Wellen darin zu erzeug
Okay. Wir messen 3 g, ich denke, wir können die Überprüfung der Wiedereintrittsdämpfung dieses Mal aussetzen. Jetzt messen wir 4 g. Der Wiedereintritt scheint gut zu verlaufen. Die Raten, die die Hilfsdämpfung anscheinend bewältigt, schein
Понял. Вы проверили режим управления скоростью входа в 
실험하는 재미도 톡톡히 
نحن عل
Je le crois, Ken. Cette bande est parallèle à la ligne M, et je pense que c'est lié à la conception de l'optique, notamment à l'entrée rectangulaire extérieure. À cet angle solaire précis, elle la traverse complètement. J'ai remarqué que la Terre et le Soleil produisent le même effet sur le télescope de balayage. Dans le sextant, la même bande lumineuse est présente, bien qu'elle couvre tout son champ de vision. Cependant, le grossissement permet de bien distinguer les étoiles, et il est possible de les marquer. Mais l'identification des étoiles avec le télescope de balayage est très difficile. J'ai constaté que l'optique est optimale dans les positions qui permettent d'observer les constellations du Grand Chien et d'Orion avec le télescope de balayage. Dans cette position particulière du vaisseau spatial, la bande disparaît; nous sommes dans une position où le Soleil est derrière nous, et je peux voir un bon nombre d'étoiles. Hier, après adaptation à l'obscurité, j
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。ホワイトチームから最後のおやすみなさい。朝起
좋습니다, MTVC를 확인해
عند 30 40 كانت قيمة Theta 5.4؛ المدى، 123.42؛ Delta-Del
Ok, Jim. Buongiorno. Mi pare che tu abbia sostituito il turno di guardia, e il resto è un po' confuso. Ave
Roger, 
Die Dru
حسناً، سيت
Ça a l'air bi
क्या आप कह रहे हैं कि फ्यूल सेल 1 और 2 - 1 और 2 तो ठीक से काम कर रहे हैं, लेकिन फ्यूल सेल 3 से ऑक्सीजन लीक हो रही है? और आप चाहते हैं कि मैं फ्यूल सेल 3 का REAC वाल्व बंद कर दूं? क्
أنت تفهم... المنصة. يمكنك أن ترى من النافذة أنها - لا، إنها بزاوية 
D'accord. Le typhon Babe est toujours au large de Formose. Vous serez à 6 h. Météo annonce une nouvelle vague à 13 h GMT. Si possible, nous aimerions avoir des photos. Aucune consommati
Allez-y - ou Houston, c'est Apollo 8. 3 avec 2. / 45810, moins 053, plus 141, plus 30128, moins 00540, plus 01911 180 019 001, NA plus 00188 30193 255 30008 40 2742 396 033, en bas 021, à gauche 18, plus 0888, moins 16500 12955
ठीक है। दो विकल्प छोड़ दें, और फिर हमें आंतरिक एकीकृत प्रकाश व्यवस्था बंद करनी है; और आंतरिक फ्लडलाइट भी बंद कर
没错，尼尔又在耍花招了。他想让我
D'accord. Il examine l'ampérage de la batterie que vous nous avez communiqué il y a quelque temps. Il souhaiterait qu'il soit inférieur d'environ un demi-ampère à un ampère. Je vous prie de demander à Jack de vérifier les disjoncteurs et les interrupteurs qu'il a déjà installés et de s'assurer qu'il n'y a pas de charges supplémentaires sur le circuit principal A; en parti
你能伸手把扳手递给我
Va bene. L'avvertiment
로저, 프랭크. 현재 진행 상황에 대해 알려드리겠
- - moins 0491,7, plus 0000,
Bene. INGRESSO ALIMENTA
Okay, Jim. We've come up with a COMM recommendation which we hope will save some power by powering down the power amplifier, if it works. And I'd like to read up the steps to you 
Роджер. Поймите
了解しました。再突入率コマンドについての評価はいかがですか
हम अभी भी आपके ईंधन की स्थिति से काफी संतुष्ट हैं। कृपया ईंधन की मात्रा को 40 प्रतिशत से नीचे न जाने दें—हम चाहते हैं
Quatre dixièmes de 
Bene. Sul pannello 7 vogliamo POWER, OFF. SERVO POWER 1 
Apollo 11, qui Houston. L
Стальноголовый ло
Bene. Eccoci qui. -2, /G&N: 63634; più 0,96, meno 0,23;; meno 0021,7, meno 0001,7, meno 0008,0; 080, 164, 326; N/D, N/D; 0023,2, 0:03,5 - Vi diamo mezzo secondo sul tempo di combustione perché è così breve - 0018,5; 44, 135,9, 28,1; e il resto è N/D. Imposta stelle 31 e 23; linea di rollio 288, be
कल रात सोने से पहले मैंने और फ्रैंक दोनों ने खाना खाया था, और मुझे लगता है कि हमने लगभग 20 क
Roger. We've got 
아이
ヒュ
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 마이크, 지상에서 계산한 축과 트러니언 값은 지금 당신이 보고 있는 값과 정확히 일치합니다. 수평선이 약간 기
Roger. Je crois com
Okay. All equipment
आप एक कार्ड ले लीजिए, और मैं ब
Friendship Seven, we have telemetry solid and check all your sy
ठीक है। यहाँ 3,000 समुद्री मील के दायरे में घने बादल छाए हुए हैं, और हमें लगता है कि आप उन्हें बादलों के बीच से देख पाएंगे। वूमेरा में आसमान सा
フランクさん、そちらではお忙しいとは存じております。いつでも、お望みであればいつでも、毎日のニュースをお聞きいただけ
알겠습니
GET هو 2 زائد 20 زائد 00؛ دلتا-V هو 60.8؛... المدة هي 1 زائد 17؛ النواة 25 ه
यह - यह ऊपर है - ठीक है। क्या आप जानते हैं कि माइनस 4 आसमान के बीचोंबीच 
友谊七号，这里是钢头鱼。全部停车，我再说一
Ricevuto. Ricevuto. Traslazione della spinta - quattro getti - Coppia di bilanciamento - ON. Acceleratore - MINIMO. Acceleratore - AUTO CDR. Pulsante elica - RESET. Pulsante elica. Okay. ABORT/ABORT STAGE - RESET. CONTROLLO ATT - tre di loro s
吉姆，那
好的。我这里有一些关于天气和救援力量的最
- - and the launch - vehicle guidance are both looking to be in good shape. We estimate you have better than a 99-percent probability of a guidance cut-off on the launch vehicle. So, things are apparently holding in very well. For your information, MLA received approximately 1 minute of a usable TV picture; so, apparently the system is working. 
네, 물론이
弗
Roger. Votre vitesse de combustion au Texas sera de 48 pieds/
D'accord. C'est une procédure en une dizaine d'étapes, mais très simple. D'accord. Sur le dis
Jim, in precedenza, Fred-o ha segnalato una fuoriuscita di aria dalla finestra numero 1 del modulo di comando. Ha anche segnalato un pezzo di metallo argentato di circa 10 cm quadrati, che galleggiava lì vicino, e una cosa che stavamo cercando di stabilire è se si trattasse di una nuova fuoriuscita di aria o se facesse parte della fuoriuscita residua del nostro problema originale. Hai altre parole o commenti? E ​​una cosa che stava facendo era scattare alcune fotografie e noi abbiamo autorizzato le fotografie, obiettivi di opportunità, usando la fotocamera lunare numero 
أوه، أرى تلك التيارات - التيارات... انخفضت على خلايا الوقود
水はオン、キャビン温度は設定2です。スーツ温度の設定は1.7
了解、ジェミニVI。
Okay. I'll go over it again. I'm on descent 1, now and fuel is about 64, and oxidizer is 65, and I'll g
Roger, John. Sono appena uscito dalla configurazione di spegnimento, in cui avevamo l'inverter spento. È tornato in buone condizioni e rimarrà acceso per il resto del volo. Gli ampere e i volt sono corretti. Gli ampere sono scesi a circa 19 ampere, dopo l'accensione. All'inizio erano a 25. Questa volta sto venendo verso di v
그리고 13, 당신이 준비되면 저희도 TV에서
Хорошо. Мы рекомендуем остановиться на 54°45'00", это должно обеспечить вам почти правильный угол крена. Рекомендуемое положение: крен 263°, тангаж 090°, рыскан
ठीक है। पिछले कुछ घंटों
Roger. You're seeing Earth, as we see it, out our left-hand window, just a little more than a half Earth. We're looking at the eastern Pacific Ocean, and the north half of the top half of the screen, we can see North America, Alaska, United States, Canada, Mexico, and Central America. South America becomes invisible just off beyond the 
コンラッド
好的。不如你一分钟后给我打个
この時点で、ハイスラスターの点検は完了しました。遅ればせながらの報告です。各軸は完璧に動作しました。現在、自動（燃料）75%、手動（燃料
Roger. Jim, si dice che vogliano garantire la giusta conc
Inbo
吉姆，你说的大致正确。杰克会在这个姿态下进行粗略的对准。这就是我们让你操控到那个姿态的原因。我们会计算出粗略的对准云台角度并传递给他，他到达那里后的第一件事，就是按照他的检查清单，对平台进行粗略对准。然后他会进入观测模式，如果他看不到星星，我们会迅速将角度传
Roger. I was getting curious of the value of onboard tracking in the course close to t
كيف يحدث ه
Ciò avvenne nell'assetto 009°. 10 piedi/s
닐, 보조 지지대에 
Я имею в виду... я имею в виду весь... я имею в виду, расход топлива оказался намного больше, чем я предполагал, понимаете? Я думал, что смогу примерно сравняться с симулятором по... а я не смог... Держу пари, я использовал... не хочу называть цифры, но в симуляторе я терял около 30 фунтов, а здесь, думаю, 50, 60 фунтов, что-то ок
- - at the top of the page, you have step 38, and right underneath that, prior to step 39, we want to have a primary glycol loop activation. What we are doing is to get the glycol evaporator water switch to AUTO and the glycol evaporator steam pressure switched to
Roger. I don't think - we can't account for any sudden drop in 
13, Housto
D'accord. 2 4 affiche 4,7 volts, 2 5 affiche 4,8 volts, 1 2 affiche 4,8 v
Si tratta di "Verificare che i riscaldatori siano stati in modalità AUTO per 15 minuti". Tornan
Combien de temps nous rest
好了。现在唯一的问题——唯一的难题就是这台电视摄像机几乎不可能对准；它的视野太窄了，我们三个大男人加一个小男孩才把它对准正确的方向。我们试过用口香糖做瞄准器，也试过其他各种方法，但我得告诉你，能把那玩意儿对准地面的
ठीक है। यह एक सामान्य टिप्पणी है जो किसी भी समय जब आप काम कर रहे हों या जब आप 'और' के बीच में हों, तब लागू होती है, और आपको इस दौरान विस्तारित क्रिया का उपयोग न करने का ध्यान रखना चाहिए। यह प्रोग्राम नोट्स में दिया गया है, और यह केवल एक अनुस्मारक है। यदि हम किसी विस्तारित क्रिया जैसे 'और' में चले जाते हैं तो क्या होगा? हम 'और' में अटक सकते हैं और 63 प्राप्त करने के लिए हमें इसे फिर से शुरू
Je n'ai pas encore ré
Хорошо. Кажется, нам удалось зафиксировать положение на протяжении последней минуты — примерно минуты, стрелки TUNE FOR MAX колебались вверх и вниз, стрелки тангажа и рыскания тоже, но, похоже, сейчас все стабилизировалось само собой. Мы как раз заканчиваем заправку — п
Ricevuto. Ora consigliamo il seguente assetto:
Итак, 
Très bien. Le commut
Ich glaube, wir müssen uns etwas Besseres 
Okay. 10, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35186, minus 01512, minus 00520 180 007 000, November Alfa, plus 00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253; Scorpii Delta, unten 069, links 45, plus 0748, minus 16500 12994 36300; Hauptstern Sirius, Begleitstern Rigel, 129 155 010; vier Quads, 15 Sekunden, Füllstand; Horizont auf der 3,2-Grad-Fensterlini
Как там всё выглядит, Майк, все наши системы и всё остальное? Видишь какие-нибудь переключатели 
그 바이저를 쓰면 시야가 별로 안 좋
Okay, die Haw
We're real pleased with the way the Control Center is working down here, Jim. The guys have done a great job and deserve a lot of credit. A
头脑清醒
और मैं अल्टीमीटर के चालू होने का इंतज़ार कर रहा हूँ। केप, क्या तुम सुन पा रहे हो?
Roger Houston, Gemini
Ganz oben auf der Seite finden Sie Schritt 38. Direkt darunter, vor Schritt 39, soll der primäre Glykolkreislauf aktiviert werden. Dazu schalten wir den Wasserschalter und den Dampfdruckschalter des Glykolverdampfers auf AUTO. Dadurch wird der primäre Wasserkessel vor 
The West Coast residents in Seattle, Washington; Portland, Oregon; Vancouver, British Columbia; and San Francisco all plan to make their areas visible to the three of you by lighting their lights between 9 pm and midnight tonight, according to the Associated Press. We do have clear weather predicted there, so you may be able to see Christmas lights, porch lights, store lights, and whatever may be turned 
分かりました、ジム。司令船からの星空をより良く観測するために、発射台の姿勢とは異なる姿勢を取ることについて話し合ってきましたが、
하와이,
L'un de ces deux points positifs sera sans aucun dout
هيوستن، إيجل. تم تثبيت الإشارة بشكل 
새로운 데이터 포인트, 하와이. 세타,
さあ、ヒュー
로저. 차트를 검토해 보니 당신과 똑같은 답이 나왔습니다. 당신의 절차가 아주 훌륭해 보입니다. 속도 평균값을 고려한 것도 잊지 않으셨네요
मैंने आपकी बात भी साफ-साफ पढ़ ली। आपकी क्य
はい、はい。さて、今はマイナス5プラス5です。ジャック、司令船はこれを情報提供のみに使用しています。これは地球と地球を結ぶ線状の軌道調整で、5プラス5の時点でボールを放出する予定です。これはチェックリストに記載されており、この後にアップリンクされます。マイナ
好的
Ed, qui è Houston CAP COM. Non riesco a sentirti, non capisco di c
Okay. Also, wir – natürlich möchte man in dieser 
अब स्क्रीन के केंद्र में जो क्रेटर दिख रहा है, वह वेब क्
حسنًا. لقد تتبعت نجمًا ساطعًا، وأعتقد أنه موجود في كوكبة العقاب. في الواقع، أنا متأكد تمامًا. أستطيع رؤية النجمين المستهدفين. لقد تتبعته حتى وصل إلى قمته. إنه يكاد يصل إلى القمة. سيختفي عن نظري الآن. لقد تتبعته من أسفل الكوكب، واستغرق الأمر 3 دقائق و23 ثانية للوصول إلى القمة.
For use in connection with the prime meridian crossing, you
저희는 가지고 있지 않습니다..
D'accord, Joe. Je me suis penché sur le sujet. Nous avons chargé les vecteurs de la planète (ou de la comète Bennett) dans l'option plan
ブースターが私たちから離れた時、ロール ノズルから燃料が噴き出すのが見えました。ブースターが回転するにつれ、宇宙船の主軸からブースターまでを結ぶ線に垂直な面を回転しながら回転し、そこから長く流れるような尾が出てくるのが見えました。飛行計画書にその様子を短く描いておこうと思います。宇宙船の分離時には、そこらじゅうに破片がありました。向きを変えると、そこらじゅうに物が散乱していました。実際のところ、ブースターをよく見るまで、何が何だか全く分かりませんでし
روجر. ما نوع الهوا
Gemini 4, Hawa
रॉजर, कैंटन कैप कॉम। मेरी रिपोर्ट इस प्रकार है: ईंधन 90-100 [प्रतिशत], ऑक्सीजन 73-100 [प्रतिशत], एम्प्स 22, केबिन का दबाव 5.5 ओव
불 좀 켜셨어요
콜럼비아, 이
자동변속기 차량의 연료 라인 온도는 70°이고, 수동변속기 차량의 연료 라인 온도는 100°입니다
レンジレートはどこで入手した
यहां एक दिलचस्प खबर है जिसे सुनकर अच्छा लगा। ऐसा लगता है कि मिशिगन के एन आर्बर में एक नया युवा गिरोह पनपा है। इसका नाम गिलनेट गिरोह है। यह गिरोह एन आर्बर की गलियों में छुपकर घूमता है और कभी-कभी कानून को भी दरकिनार कर देता है। वे खुद को 'गुरिल्ला फॉर गुड' कहते हैं। उन्होंने कुछ कारनामे किए हैं, जैसे कि एक पुल पर अश्लील बातें लिखी हुई थीं, जिसे उन्होंने एक ही रात में रंग दिया। एक जर्जर मकान, जो आस-पड़ोस के बच्चों के बीच लोकप्रिय तो था, लेकिन खतरनाक भी था, उसे बंद कर दिया गया। शहर के बीचोंबीच स्थित गमले, जो इस बात पर बहस के कारण खाली पड़े थे कि इसके लिए कौन
Wir befinden uns gerade bei 3+34. Es wird dunkel. Das Sonnenlicht schien fast mit dem schmalen Ende nach vorn auf die Spitze des Raumschiffs. Tatsächlich sind wir 30° links von der
حسن
Houston, Eagle. Excellente réception! Vous devriez recevoir BIOMED 
我正在
Roger. Laut TM-Anzeige befinden S
Эй, Чарли, ты хочешь сказать, что на ко
Houston, Apollo 11
11, Хьюстон. Теперь вы можете выбрать OMNI Bravo на б
لا، لا م
Понял. Принято. Отлично, «Спокойствие». 
Майк, можешь просто сказать, в какую сторону и насколько сильно он будет наклоняться для выполнения
了解
फ्रैंक, मुझे आपकी बात कमजोर लग रही है लेकिन स्पष्ट समझ आ 
حسنًا، ١١. هذه هيوستن. قمنا بتغيير هوائيات OMNI الخاصة 
Хорошо. Мне придётся вытащить его в окно, Вэнс. Со
Aren't the
Bene. Abbiamo completato il dump e il registratore è tornato a te. Puoi usarlo come preferisci. Potremmo volerlo scaricare di nuovo, e in tal caso andremo avanti e useremo le stesse informazioni, a meno che tu non abbia qualcos'altro che desideri specificamente aggiungere in seguito. Ascoltando la qualità della voce, sembra davvero buona. Stiamo arriva
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我这里
곧 시작되니, 이 시간에 중간 보고서를
Okay. Batterieladung: Aus; Wechselrichter 2: Aus; Hauptbusverbindung: Batterie B/C ein. Bedienfeld 250: Batterie A, Stromeingang und Nachlandung: Offen; Sicherung: Batterie B, Stromeingang und Nachlandung: Offen. Bedienfeld 5: Sicherung: Batterieladegerät, Batterie B geladen: Off
I'll bet it is. What do you mean, Ji
Très bien. Je vous comprends mieux maintenant. Avez-vous bien reçu notre demande concernant les bandes S OMNI et OMNI B? Term
알겠습니다. 로저. Rev 57용입니다. 시퀀스 번호 16, 지상 표준시 8시 11분, 요 12°, 피치 30°, 16mm 카메라 사용. 
On your secondary coolant loop, looks like your back-pressure valve might be slightly open. I suggest you go to secondary coolant loop EVAP switch to the RESET position
パネル 250、CB BAT A POWER、ENTRY および POSTLANDING がクローズ、BAT B POWER ENTRY および POSTLANDING 
Roger. Pour la manœuvre NSR GET de combustion, 03 plus 47 plus 37; Delta-VT, 42,9; durée, 54 secondes;
نشكر كل من ساهم في دعمنا على أرض الواقع. من الواضح أننا ما كنا لنصل إلى أي مكان لولا 
Хьюстон, Хьюстон, 
A
Никаких изменений, и мы готовы к выходу в открытый космос. У нас ес
双子座八号的平
ये 
Хорошо. Если хочешь посмотреть, как выглядит луна, можешь открыть пакет и посмотреть. Только 
Okay, Jack. I have the procedure in front of me. It's about 18 steps, and the reason it's so long is because we're starting from this basic configura
لا، أعتقد أنهم 
자, 
再保管作業は完了し
Роджер. Обратите внимание, что вы начинаете свою последнюю запланированную операцию. Первоначальное отслеживание показывает, что начальная скорость на среднем участке траектории может быть меньше 4 футов в секунду, как предполагалось изначально. Мы также просмотрели ваши данные о работе двигателя, и всё так же плавно, как вы
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Вы примерно в часе езды,
Das ist Friendship Seven. Anfangs lief sie, geriet aber in den Orientierungsmodus, was die anderen Achsen aus dem Gleichgewicht brachte. Das ging eine Weile so. Sie driftete langsam nach rechts, ohne Korrektur, bis sie etwa 20° nach rechts abdriftete. Dann korrigierte sie sich schnell und ging wieder in den Orientierungsmodus über, um nach links abzudriften. Das ging eine Weile so weiter. Ich übernahm die 
프레드, 다
그리고 물막이 커튼 설치, 목 보호대 설치
هذا 
Roger, Frank. Si vous avez un moment, pourriez-vous nous communiquer votre numéro d'étalonnage de tourillon? Nous l'avons manqué lors de la transmission, et nous avons des nouvelles concernant l'assiette de votre système de contrôle thermiq
कोलंबिया, यह ह्यूस्टन है। क्या आपको पता है कि ईगल लगभ
では、ページの上から順に、最初の 5 行、「汚染と写真撮影用にカメラを設置する、ベテルギウス、CM4/EL/80」など、「MAG T」など、「窓のブラインドを設置す
Ed started on unstowing stuff and as soon as we got to the position where it became no longer feasible to fool with the booster, I started full-time helping him - at least holding the things and stowing them away and trying to keep them from disappearing. The faster we worked the farther behind we got. Not because we weren't putting things the way they were supposed to, it just took a lot longer than we had anticipated. It really wasn't much easier at zero g than it was in the simulator, if as easy. So we worked all the way around. By the time we got to Carnarvon, I had made up my mind that we couldn't make it, but I thought we'd forge on a little longer. By the time we got to - or just before we even left Carnarvon it was clear to me that we could not make the depressurization. I called for a slip to the next orbit. We then... caught our breath for about 20 minutes and tried to sort out the junk I had laying around in the cockpit. Then I got the checklist out and we went through the checklist again in detail to make sure that we hadn't skipped anything in the rush. Started the extravehicular - g
إنه يختفي داخل النفق، بالطبع، كما لو كان سيدخل ال
روجر. وهل لديك أي مشكلة على الإطلا
デッドバンド、最小。ATT コントロールからモード コントロールへ、モード コントロール、自動、両方
... we got it a great big on
Hous
好的。你收到高
Anche qui tutto bene. Mi sento bene, sono di buon 
एक्
Mark Mode 1 Bravo, Apol
11、上昇したことがあなたの開始に何らかの影響を与えた可能性について
C'est exact. Deuxième rangée: tous les disjoncteur
好的，杰克。步骤没问题，然后我们得回去做点什么。第一行没问题，把“BAT 5 和 6 关闭”划掉，删除它。下一行也删掉，上面写着“面板
Хорошо,
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь. Автоматическая система управления капиталом. Если вы читаете, дайте короткий отсч
أراهنكم بأي 
والأمور تسير على ما يرام. لديّ الآن مدخل هواء بدرجة حرارة حوالي 62 درجة على البدل
Gemini 4, это связь с диспетчерской вышкой Хьюстона. Я вас не принимаю. Я передам последние два сообщения рейса с 15 до 11:15. С 15 до 11:15. Это связь с диспетчерской вы
ليس بشكل ملحوظ. استطعتُ الوص
حسنًا يا هيوستن. أستطيع
That's affirmative. We got your TR and Gemini load in. Your clocks lo
Es war definitiv unter mir. Ich hatte es seit etwa Carnarvon unter mir verfolgt. Bis Carnarvon war es unter uns, dann bis zum Horizont und dann wieder unter uns. Es sah fast so aus, als befände es sich in einer anderen Umlaufbahn als ich. Es hatte einen anderen Apogäum und Perigäum als ich. Jedenfalls versuchte ich, mich ihm bei Tagesanbruch anzunähern, sobald ich seine Position bestimmen konnte. Wie gesagt, zu diesem Zeitpunkt war es ein bis zwei Meilen vor mir – unter mir. Je mehr ich versuchte, mich anzunähern, desto weniger Abstand gewann ich. Ich zündete die Triebwerke in Richtung Gegengeschwindigkeit. Ich zündete meine oberen Triebwerke so, dass ich meine Gesamtgeschwindigkeit verringerte und dann gleichzeitig zündete. Ich konnte mich nie wirklich annähern, und es entfernte sich immer weiter. Mir wurde klar, dass wir, um die Boosterstufe rechtzeitig für den Außenbordeinsatz (E
Roger. Wir beginnen mit den Sportnachrichten. Sandy Koufax, Pitcher der Los Angeles Dodgers, und Ann Widmark, die 23-jährige Tochter des Schauspielers Richard Widmark, planen, in naher Zukunft
Et puis, autre chose, j'étais content que Jim ait un
Okay, da hab ich's. Nein. Mann, ich k
Okay. Molto be
Zut! Comment vais-je bien pouvoir r
ヴァンス、フレッドは君がそれについてもっと情報を持っていて、それを確立するための別の方法か何かを
了解。O2燃料電池
D'accord, activez l'évaporateur principal. Ken, comment avons-nous obtenu notre refroidissement pendant tout ce temps? Je crois que les radiateu
ジェミニ4号、CSQ。ヒューストンは、衛星を視認した際の相対方位を知りたい
Ich sehe einige schöne Sterne und auch diese kleinen weißen Objekte, die scheinbar aus der Kapsel selbst kommen und davontreiben. Wenn es sich um eine Gierwinkelmessung handelt, ist das fantastisch. Ich vermute, dass der Stern, den ich sehe, Arktur ist. Das wäre sehr interessant – aber es ist keines von beiden. Es ist eines der weißen Ob
Хорошо, Гас, мой статус в порядке; режим управления — электронное; гироскопы по-прежнему в защитной решетке; маневр отключен. Топливо 62 и 68 [процентов]. Небольшо
7月
نعم، لقد أكملنا المهمة. سنزودكم بالبيانات بعد لحظات. اجتزنا فحص النجوم باستخدام السدس عند زاوية 
ये रही पानी की बंदूक। इसके सिरे पर लगा बेलनाकार हिस
Хоро
Roger, Amic
نعم، نحن نحاول فقط إيجاد ط
إنهم
Наверное, в этот раз 
好
알겠습니다. 이 점을 알려드리고 비행 계획에 어떤 영향을 미칠지 생각해 보시길 바랐습니다. 달에 대한 광각 영상과 설명을 다시 보여드리고 어떤 부분이 가장 적절할지 의견을 들어보겠습니다. 네. 프랭크는 진입 프로필이 표시되는 순서를 확인해 달라고 했습니다. 첫 번째 프로필은 "비출구 2번(Nonexit Number 2)"으로, 단거리 고속 진입 프로필입니다. 두 번째는 "3,500마일(The 3,500 Mile)"로, 역시 고속 진입 프로필이지만 장거리 진입 시 사용
روجر، فحص نظام التحكم الإلكتروني سهل للغاية. نظام القياس عن بُعد لدينا يفحص جميع أنظم
ठीक है, बढ़िया। मैं अंदर हूँ; रेट्रोएटीट्यूड; जायरो सामान्य हैं; पैंतरेबाज़ी स्विच बंद है। मैं रेट जायरो के लिए टीआर-10 बाईपास को वार्म अप कर रहा हूँ। मैंने अभी भी फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड चुना हुआ है। सभी मात्राएँ और सिस्टम हरे है
Фрэнк, еще одна небольшая новость, которая, как мне кажется, может быть интересной, 
Roger. The suit inlet is 78 - 7
로저, 마이크. 데이터에 대해 몇 가지 의견을 드리겠습니다. 자동 기동은 상당히 정확했습니다. 기동 과정에서 준항성 지점을 포착한 것 같습니다. 자동 광학 장치는 카노푸스를 정확한 위치에 배치했고, 최소 임
Okay. You want me to trim the excess material that's sticking off here; trim it at the edge 
D'accord. Donc, vous êtes sûr qu'il s'agit du module de service?
好的，杰克。我们需要你做的是关闭燃料电池2的反应物阀。关
وضع الاستعداد يتم في 
罗杰。我
Nous avons vérifié tous les raccords et je sais que je peux tout brancher à nos UCD. Donc, s'il n'y a pas de fuite, nous pou
罗杰
좋아, 잭. 질문 하나만 할게. 이렇게 전력을 전송하면, 남아있는 전력량이 부족
わかりました。飛行計画の詳細は以下の通りです。もちろん、-3はないので、ミッドコース3の項目はすべて削除してください。これには約54時間半と記載されているものも含まれます。これは後で説明します。後ほど説明します。バッテリーの充電時間を3時間増やします。トンネルベントバルブ（DELTA-P）を3時間増やします。その時点で、飛行計画の57時間目に移動し、数値を57時間から54時間に変更して、そこから始めてください。備考欄の約57時間目に「O2燃料電池パージと廃水排出」と記載されています。これより早く実施されていない場合は、54時間50分に実施してください。テレビパスは55時間からになります。アクティベーションのチェックリストをすぐに実行しま
好的。我这里有D
D'accord, Houston. Vous arrivez un peu tard
Nous nous préparons à réaliser l'expérience D-9, et nous n'au
Я проверил наличие звезды, и про
Très bien, vous pourriez me confirmer 
OK. Passons à l'étape 3. Nous voulons SECs LOGIC, deux OFF, vers le bas,
जैक, आपकी सुविधानुसार हमें एक बार फिर वोल्ट और एम्पियर की रीडि
Bene. Ora, quando saremo in quarta fila, apriremo l'interruttore OPERATE; questo significa che perderemo la possibilità di monitorare i vostri CDU, quindi non saremo in grado di vedere il vostro assetto. Pertanto, non saremo in grado di consigliarvi quale antenna scegliere per le comunicazioni. Il modo in cui vogliamo che gestiate la situazione è disattivare lo SQUELCH UPLINK e, quando sentite il rumore, cambiare antenna. Saremo in grado di vedervi cambiare antenna e ci vorranno dai 3 ai 5 minuti per ristabilire l'aggancio dopo il cambio. Dopo ogni cambio antenna, avvieremo un controllo vocale. E in pratica, qua
こんばんは。私たちのミッション、アポロ11号の飛行における象徴的な側面についていくつかお話ししたいと思います。ここ2、3日、宇宙船内で起こった出来事について議論を重ねる中で、私たちは、これは単なる3人の月への旅以上のものであり、政府と産業界のチームの努力、さらには一つの国の努力をはるかに超えるものだという結論に達しました。これは、未知の世界を探求しようとする全人類の飽くなき探究心の象徴であると感じています。先日、ニール・ボルトンが初めて月面に足を踏み入れた際に述べた「これは人間にとっては小さな一歩だが、人類にとっては偉大な飛躍だ」という言葉は、まさにこの思いを的確に表していると思います。私たちは月へ行くという挑戦を受け入れました。この挑戦を受け入れることは避けられないことでした。ミッションを比較的容易に遂行できたのは、その受け入れがいかにタイムリーだったかを示すものだと私は考えています。今日、私たちは宇宙探査にお
حسناً. 
La capsula funziona molto bene a questo punto. 250 (inverter) è 132 (gradi), 150 (inverter) è... 5. Standby (inverter) è 120... propulsori... a destra, oltre 100 (gradi) a sinistra. Pitch down (propulsore) è 105 (gradi). Pitch up (propulsore) è 100 (gradi). Scambiatore di calore della cabina (i
किसी ए
Роджер, всё в порядк
La rispo
Okay. Wir werde
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 재정렬 작업은 잘 진행되었습니다. 저는 육분의로 별을 찾아 정렬하는 데는 성공했지만, 스캐닝 망원경에서 레고르나 멘켄트 같은 별을 관측할 때는 그 별을 식별할 수 없었습니다. 처음 지구를 관측했을 때는 지평선이 매우 흐릿하게 보였습니다. 하지만 지구의 지평선과 대기 사이에는 뚜렷한 선이 있는 것처럼 보였습니다. 랜드마크 시선 필터를 사용하니 지평선이 더 선명해졌습니다. 우주와 대기 상층부 사이에는 매우 
Nimm einen
ロジャー、RKV 
..
了解。こちらに向かっています。30、SPS/G&N: 36691; マイナス 061、プラス 067 135 23 4149;、プラス 32020、プラス 06713、マイナス 02773 181 054 013;、HA は NA、プラス 00230 32833 228、DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355。次の3行は NA。プラス 1103、マイナス - マイナス 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52。設定した星は
هل أنت على و
The last station that talked on HF I could not identify. It came in very clear and should be recorded a
ठीक है। क्रमानुसार आर्म बैटरी ए और बैटरी बी में जा रहे
This is with the 
알겠습니다. 현재 배터리 용량은 A형 39.32암페어시, B형 35.21암페어시, C형 38.46암페어시입니다. 극저온 저장량은 지난번과 동일하게 산소 탱크당 180파운드, 수소 탱크당 11파운드입니다. 현재 서비스 모듈의 컴퓨터 계산값을 기준으로 보면, 쿼드 A는 45%, 브라보는 50%, 찰리는 58%, 델타는 48%가 남아 있습니다. 보조 연료 탱크는 실제 용량이 37%에 도달하면 가동할 계획이며, 통신 두절 등의 비상 상황 발생 시에는 온보드 게이지로 50%를 기준으로 
TVC伺服电源，1号
Okay. Und ganz unten auf der Seite, Schritt Nummer 1. Das ist bei minus 19 Minuten, und dann geht es los mit
अपोलो 8. ह
Хорошо. Хорошо, Джек. В тот раз было 62 градуса, и это за два оборота вокруг своей оси. Находясь на таком расстоянии, мы не увидели Землю — в предыдущий раз мы её не видели. И тогда было 3 минуты и 50 секун
It seems funny to be sitti
Чтобы вы имели представление, Майк, я 
Dove dobbiamo andare per prendere un fa
Io ero un attacca
Ti informiamo che circa un'ora fa, alle 58:10, hai superato il tempo to
Да. Всё было действительно здорово, за
حسنًا يا فانس. لقد اكتشفنا بعض الأش
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。軌道修正番号2。SPS/G&N 63059、プラス097、マイナス020、点火装置02644 5792、プラス00118、マイナス00003、プラス00177、ロール277 355 015、ブロックはNA、デルタ-VT 00213 003 00168、六分儀星30 2082 370。PADの残りはNA。位置合わせ：ベガとデネブ。ロール位置合わせ007 144 068。アレージなし。重量：33302。参考までに、この噴射中は頭はほ
D'accord, Bill. Ceci se trouvera à la page 2, point 22 de votre plan de vol. Pour le pilote du module de commande – je lui en ai déjà parlé – mais en haut de la page, vers [heure manquante], nous aimerions qu'il effectue un alignement, puis [instruction manquante], comme prévu. Ces quatre étoiles sont Procyon, Regulus et Alphard. Nous savons qu'Alphard n'est peut-être pas l'étoile la plus facile à observer, 
罗杰。难得有机会能看到整个世界，用单筒望远镜观察，真是令人叹为观止。我真希望自己能准确地描述出来。天气非常好。南美洲渐渐映入眼帘。在地平线上方，我能看到一个点，大概就是华盛顿州的西雅图附近，从那里，我可以一直看到火地岛
وأخيراً تمكنا من رؤ
... we leave 
지금 탯줄을 
Гироскулер
Пожалуйста, подтвердите, что ваш прицел полностью убран и дверца закрыта. Выглядит ли изо
そちらでは盛り上がっているのはご存じだと思いますが、こちらは本当に静かです。みんな笑顔で、サンタさんは世界中のほとんどの人
네, 맞습
Exactement.
Now 
Ciao, Muchea Com Tech, Frien
알겠습니다. 지상 사령
気温120度、
自動燃料は9
罗杰，弗兰克。我们有一些
Je suggère qu'on en profite pour faire ceci; on laisse le système faire un calcul automatique et on ajuste ensuite. Jim a dû utiliser Rigel et Sir
好的。基本上，你说得对。我先简单概括一下，然后再把步骤念给你听。我觉得这样更容易理解。方案是这样的：飞到一组球形角度，让你的望远镜指向月球。现在，无论我们处于什么姿态，只要你能通过望远镜观察到足够清晰的星图，并且相信自己可以独立完成校准，我们就应该停止讲解，让你自己进行校准。不过，我们给你的是一个步骤，它能让你看到望远镜里清晰可见的星图，而不用担心任何反射或其他类似因素的影响。这个步骤并非要求你在望远镜里已经能清晰看到星图之后还要继续执行。如果需要继续，我们会进行机动，观察月亮，在那里做一个标记，然后再次调整角度，观察太阳，在太阳上做另一个标记，这样就完成了对准。对准方案是，我们会提供一组角度，当指针指向月亮时，你可以用这些角度粗略地对准球。这组角度将与你输入的标称值一致。你可以用它进行粗略对准，设置漂移旗和REFSMMAT旗，这样你就能获得一个良好的平台，并且对准误差在几度之内。如果需要，我们可以在这一点上中断并进行入场；但是，为了获得一个良好的平台，我们将让你执行方案1，你会在方案1的槽位中找到入场点。你会得出这些数值，我们打算先粗略地将球对准入场姿势，然后按照正常的顺序进行评分。这就是我们要使用的总体方案。如果你觉得已经掌握了，我接
Roger, 11. As you've probably noticed, your coning angle in mode is increased substantially as a result of the waste water dump, the fuel cell purge, and a natural coupling, so it looks like we are going to have to terminate here in a little while. And we'd like to get your feeling as to whether you're still anticipating trying to send back TV signals from inside the LM; and if so, we'll 
لقد رأيناك للتو عبر التلفاز، وقد أسعدتنا نظرتك المشرقة. هل تسمعني
알겠습니다. 잭, 그동
هيوستن، أبولو 8. للعلم فقط، بعد إتمام ا
알겠습니다. 이제 약 2분 동안 
كولومبيا، هيوستن. لقد تم تحميل الشحنة. يمكنك 
すみません。電源
Roger. Passez ensuite à la procédure de contrôle de 
13、ヒュース
네, 맞습니다. 이제 컴퓨터 화면에 37 ENTER 06 ENTER라는 메시지가 나타날 겁니다. 우리가 하려는 것은 컴퓨터를 대기 모드로 전환하는 것입니다. 37 06이 나타나면 ENTER 키를 눌러 코드 62를 확인해야 합니다. 코드 62가 표시되면 화면이 꺼질 때까지 PROCEED 키를 누르세요.
ジャック、おそらく…おそらく、チェックリストを全部お渡しするのが一番でしょう。そこにはこのような項目も含まれています。もしよろしければ、その
まだ気分は良くなりまし
分かりました。今は「G&Nを終了するには」と書かれていますが、ペンとインクで「自動選択、12 MAIN AとB
Te
روجر. لدي فرق ملحوظ بين فولتية البطارية 
Roger. Ottima risposta. Ora, abbiamo un'altra procedura per te; e, al momento, abbiamo il radar di rendezvous riposto e non saremo in grado di vedere nulla al di fuori del fermo 2, quindi vorremmo che posizionassi il radar su 0283; e abbiamo una procedura per questo. E vorremmo che lo facessi subito prima di assumere l'assetto. Pass
好的，比分是4-2
わかりました。排気口を閉じたので、酸素が
알겠습니다. 그를 위한 입대 체크리스트에 약간의 추가 사항이 있습니다. 이번에는 - 
حسناً يا جاك. هذا سيستهلك
了解しました、カナリア。ジェミニ。通常
알았다
好的，弗雷德。没错，只是我们正在研究的航线程序是地日航线，除此之外，你说的都对。顺便一提，这次TC+2机动看起来仍然会是每秒9
Ich sollte eigentlich den Horizon Scanner Check durchführen, aber ich habe keine Zeit d
Jim, I can give you the general idea of the proposed procedure for bringing the command module G&N up. It's the presently proposed one. We may come up with a better one, but here's what we're looking at right now. First thing we plan to do is to - using the, sight on the Earth with the just as we did in th
아폴로 11호, 다시 
了解
Roger. E abbiamo un
Gemini 4, хирург RKV. Манжета выполнена в натуральную ве
無重力状態は、学校で習った多くのことを実演するのにも使えます。ジャイロスコープの作用を説明するのがいかに簡単か、簡単に説明したいと思います。この缶を回転させると、運動方程式によれば、ある一定のトルクを与え
Ok, Jack, durante la trasmissione televisiva eravamo in modalità AUTO TRACK, NARROW BEAM WIDTH e PRIMARY ELECTRONICS. E abbiamo avuto un buon aggancio. Subito dopo aver iniziato la manovra, sono riuscito ad agganciarti e a ottenere un segnale davvero buono, e sembrava proprio che 
आपने जो पढ़ा होगा, उससे शायद यह दसवां ह
Das ist Frien
Stand 
Хорошо. Т
ठ
わかりました。通信が失われたら、電源
好的。
Roger,
Roger. I cannot confirm that the flight plan is completely on schedule. At sunset I was unable to see a separate haze 
حسنًا. يمكننا الضغط على زر الإدخال، ثم وضع R1 ناقص 00088، وR2 ناقص 00059، وR3 ناقص 0
Роджер. К вашему сведению, я немного увеличил показания. Сейчас мои
I mean the - I mean the whole - I mean the gas consumption would be a lot more than I would have guessed
Sinon, la transition d'un mode de contrôle à l'autre 
Ich fi
हेलो माइकल, हमारा लॉक टूट गया था और बिल ने लॉक को वापस चालू करने के लिए क
Non potremmo discutere con te. Q
そうです。ドームの温度は現在約77度です。5番の温度で少なくとも10
당신이 볼 수 
眼前这片小月海里有一个轮廓清晰的小撞击坑，看起来很新，而且另一个撞击坑正在靠近。探测器朝北。从我们
Je descends à l'horizon maintenant, et on peut nettement distinguer les deux couches de la lueur atmosphérique, celle qui est assez épaisse en haut, et on peut voir les étoile
Roger. 
Хорошо. Джим, у нас будет передача управления ровно в начале часа, через полторы минуты. В начале часа, пожалуйста, пе
Roger, Charlie. Buzz
سطوع الشبكة، هل تريد زيادة سطو
Водолеи, это Хьюстон. Вперед
हाँ, डलास में लोग रो रहे हैं। बास्केटबॉल के नतीजे: ह्यूस्टन का प्रदर्शन इस सप्ताहांत अच्छा नहीं रहा। इलिनोइस ने ह्यूस्टन को 97-84 से हराया। और नॉर्थ कैरोलिना ने ओवल्स को 85-77 के स्कोर से मात दी। फ्
Да. Переходные процессы были более заметны, чем во время предыдущих включений двигателя, Чарли. Я просто списал это на то, что у нас был лёгкий командный модуль, но наблюдалась значительная активность крена, которая, как мне кажется, затихла после первых 20 секунд включения двигателя; но затем появилась также некоторая активность тангажа и рыскания. Я не думаю, что это было чем-то ненормальным, и, похоже, наблюдалась довольно чёткая регулировка крена в пределах плюс-минус 8 градусов в обе стороны от центральной линии; и после первых нескольких — ну, после первых 20 секунд или около того, карданные подвесы затихли, а тангаж и рыскание стали относительно спокойными.
ठीक है। इन्हें ऐसे ही रहने देते हैं (दो बार पंप करें)। वैसे, अगर आपको मौका मिले तो हमें
Okay. I have cabin temperature of 100 (degrees), cabin dome, 40 (degrees); cabin heat exchanger is 42 (degrees); the setting on the cabin is 3 and it's holding steady for a long period of tim
로저, 지금 저희는 D-9 실험을 진행 중입니다. 잠시 기다려 
Vous avez 6 images par se
谢谢，比尔，你还准备
はっきりと
Okay. Auf Seite 32, oben, erste Zeile, streichen Sie ein ".". Dritte Zeile: "MODE CONTROL:, ATT HOLD." Bei "Minus 6 Minuten" streichen Sie die Zeilen 1 und 2 dur
또 다른 지역 소식입니다. 헌츠빌 카운티 법원이 어제 새벽에 화재로 전소했습니다. 따라서 그 자리에 다시 건설 사업을 해야 할 것 같습니다. 한편, 귀환을 기다리는 가족들에 대한 소식도 전해드립니다. 앤 제임스 기자가 보도한 내용입니다. "우리는 달 뒷면에서 쉬고 있어요." 발레리 앤더스는 크리스마스 이브에 가족과 함께 아폴로 8호가 달 궤도를 벗어나 지구로 귀환하기를 기다리며 이렇게 말했습니다. 앤더스 씨는 화요일 새벽 0시에 도착했고, 이웃들이 아이들을 모두 데려가 우주선이 달 뒤편에 있어 통신이 두절된 동안 가족들이 편히 쉴 수 있도록 도와주었습니다. 프랭크 보먼 대령의 집은 야외에 커다란 상록수 화환 네 개가 걸려 있고, 고운 눈이 뿌려져 있으며, 빨간 리본으로 장식되어 있었습니다. 거실에는 그의 안전한 귀환을 기다리는 크리스마스트리가 놓여 있었고, 금발의 아름다운 아내 수와 늠름한 두 아들 프레더릭과 에드윈은 자정 무렵 달 궤도를 벗어나는 순간을 집에서 지켜볼 계획이었습니다. 평소 같으면 그들은 세인트 크리스토퍼 성공회 교회에서 자정 예배에 참석했을 겁니다. 가족들은 새벽 0시에 모일 예정이었죠. 보먼 가족에는 어린아이가 없기 때문에, 크리스마스 
Гас, ты проверял 
약 179마일 지점에서 목표물을 포착했고, 약 156마일에서 레이더 조준을 맞췄습니다. 바늘은 비교적 안정적이며, 상태가 좋아 보입니다. 요(yaw) 바늘은 좌우로 약간씩
- - sei in post-attracco; sto c
Retirer l
짐, 회로 차단기는 회로 차단기
لا، لا أراها هنا في هذا الجانب. رأيتُ القليل منها فقط بعد مغادرتي قاعدة كانافيرال مباشرةً واستدارتي للأمام. كانت تقترب مني حينها. كنتُ 
ठीक है। समझ गया। रेट्रोफायर शुरू करें,... सूर्योदय 10:08:40 बजे। और मौसम की जानकारी कॉपी करें, अल्टीमीटर 2986, रिकवरी नाहा रेस्क्यू 1 जीएमटी 02:58 बजे; नाहा सर्च 1 जीएमटी 
了解しました。わ
Hi, Jim. We've got a flight handover in about 2 minutes, and we'll have a temporary loss of COMM. You don'
罗杰。今天早上关于阿波罗计划的新闻头条中，有一条提醒大家留意一位带着大兔子的美丽少女。古老的传说中，一位名叫嫦娥的美丽中国少女已经在月球上生活了4000年。据说她因为偷了丈夫的长生不老药而被流放到月球。你也可以留意一下她的伙伴——一只体型硕大的中国兔子，它很容易辨认，因为它总是站在一棵肉桂树的树荫下，用后腿
Ja. Zieml
收
今見ているのは、フレッドのすぐ後ろにある丸いバッグです。真空ホースが入っているんです。宇宙船に戻ったら、真空ホースを宇宙服から外します。このバッグは、月面に出るときに開くハッチに取り付けられています。そしてもちろん、月面に戻ってくるときにも開きます。私たちが今いるハッチは丸いハッチで、オデッセイ号とアクエリアス号をドッ
로저. 마이크, 얼마 전에 데드밴드를 다시 조정했을 때, 우리는 데드밴드가 당시 우리가 있던 새로운 자세를 중심으로 설정되어 있다고 가정했습니다. 그 이후로 피치와 요 모두 그 자세에서 몇 도 정도 벗어났습니다. 그래서 우리가 당신에게 알려드린 절차대로 가속 명령(ACCEL COMMAND)을 
알겠습니다.
We can wait if you want us 
로저. 
और
Не нужно торопиться с отправкой. Просто, прежде чем вы приступите к самостоятельной сборке, мы хотели
टेक्सास आपको यही संदेश देग
わかりました。チェックリストG/8-2のステップ5に「隣接する2つのクワッドのすべてのジェッ
Roger. Deke, la mia modalità di controllo è manuale; i giroscopi sono bloccati; l'interruttore di manovra è spento. Il livello del carburante è 45 e 42 [percento]; l'ossigeno è 76 e 100 [percento]; le temperature dello sfiato del vapore sulla tuta sono 68 [gradi] e ho appena ricevuto una spia luminosa per l'acqua in eccesso in cabina; l'ago è sceso a 20. Reimposta l'acqua in cabina a circa 6 e in questa capsula sembra che l
حسنًا. الوقت المت
Роджер. Если вы не будете мешать Царю чистить зубы, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы немного увеличили основной объем накопительного счета. Сейчас он составляет 20,6
조, 혹시 감시하고 계신다면, 저희는 모두 원래
Okay. U
Aurora Seven di India
جي
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une de l'actualité mondiale. Seuls quatre pays, la Chine communiste, la Corée du Nord, le Nord-Vietnam et l'
Roger. Je souhaite confirmer l'état de vos systèmes de commande; le système de comman
وهيوستن، أعتقد أننا سنفعل هذا في 
没错，乔治。我会把面板
Nessun PDI più 1
Ok. Controllo assetto, comando velocità. Controllore di manov
Roger. Zur Erinnerung: Die Korona ist entlang der Ekliptik etwa 200 Sonnendurchmesser weit sichtbar, und das helle Licht erstreckt sich etw
RCSヒーターが外れています。スキャンヒーターのブレーカーが開いています。コンピュータの電源はオフです。プラッ
제미니 8
ठीक है। धन्यवाद। कृपया मेरी ओर से 
Хорошо. Я
分かりました。Aに関しては同じような
Roger. Votre orbite est modifiée aux coordonnées 87, 147. Vous êtes prêt pour un M nominal égal à 4. Il y aura un léger changement de plan. Nous vous donnerons plus d'informations ultérieurement. Nous comprenons que les températures étaient plus élevées que la normale et nous vous rappelons d'activer la poignée d'unité n°
And, 13, Houston. We'll be commanding the evasive
Et tu as raison, Jim. Nous avons une autre
…plus de 133 heures… Ah oui, je suppose… Oui, il… la descente est prévue jeudi après-midi. Il avait calculé que – pour un amerrissage à… nombre d’heur
We should spend the night side here doing, just taking pictures -- taking sightings without a particular attitude. The object of the game is to nail a couple of ones right 
ठीक है, जैक, ये सिर्फ़ एहतियात के तौर पर है। अगर हम ऑप्टिक्स को 90 डिग्री के शाफ़्ट एंगल पर पार्क करते हैं, तो स्लिट्स इस तरह से संरेखित हो जाएँगे कि हीट शील्ड के उस हिस्से पर हवा का प्रवाह सबसे अच्छा रहेगा और कोई गर्म स्थ
Jim, the only w
Sembra che la calotta nuvolosa scenda 
阿
コピーする準備ができまし
Répétez
11, это Хьюстон. Что касается вашей субъективной оценки того, что прошлой ночью внутри космического корабля было прохладнее, мы ранее сообщали, что действительно наблюдали снижение температуры примерно на 3 градуса по сравнению с предыдущей ночью. Оглядываясь назад, кажется, что экипаж «Аполлона-10» сообщал о подобных ощущениях во время транслунального и трансземного этапов полета. Мы хотели бы узнать, могли бы вы указать относительное количество свободной или сконденсированной воды в к
حسناً. انخفضت درجة 
Я делаю снимки с самолета S-6 
Okay. Wir haben Ihre Zeitangabe überprüft, 16 ist korrekt. Sie erhalten zum geplanten Zeitpunkt eine aktualisierte Eingabe. Gleichzeitig aktualisieren wir Ihre Zustandsvektoren für die und. Die Kurskorrektur Nr. 7 betrug weniger als 0,7 Fuß pro Sekunde und wird daher nicht ausgeführt. Sie haben einen geplanten Termin um, der nicht erforderlich ist. Die Entscheidung liegt bei Ihnen. Sollten Sie sich jedoch entscheiden, die zu löschen, sind der Selbsttest und der Zustandslichttest w
В воздухе плавают довольно крупные обломки. План полета составлен. Гироскопы отключатся в 12:33, и я буду использовать систему управления по проводам, чтобы отслеживать
하와이, 지금 우리 슈트
Хорошо, Джим, я это понял
그 정도면 터치앤고 두 번 하고 완전히 정지하기엔 충
क्या यह अभी भी पीछा कर रह
好的，杰克。我们会处理的。汤姆·斯
Yes. Yes, sir. Purring across the deep. Okay. Look 
Allez Neil, p
Хьюстон, это 8. Я смотрю в сканирующий телескоп, и этот выброс ЛОС полностью вы
The capsule at this point is, at, it is under chimp configuration. I've used manual proportional to a great degree. I now have 79 (percent) in manual and 81 (percent) auto. Let
Роджер. От 1
那是33秒—
알겠습니다, 마이크. 감
Ещё один момент, который вы могли бы попросить кого-нибудь проверить — я не хочу беспокоить ребят наверху
Хорошо, Фред-о. Это монитор маневренной площадки ПК плюс 2 часа; все данные недоступны до тех пор, пока вы не д
非常感谢。迈克·柯林斯很少会主动帮忙
Roger. Il tem
Roger. Flight indi
हा! हा!
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티 기지. 복사 준비 완료
I guess we could open the window here, just as
Roger, sei stato fo
Oh ja
Stai dicendo che le celle a combustibile 1 e 2 - 1 e 2 stanno cercando di resistere, ma stiamo perdendo
저는 당신이 사령관의 전적인 허
Хорошо. Мы ненадолго потеряли вас из виду
كما
١١، هيوستن. 
Columbia, Houston. We made an error on those coordinates. 
알겠습니다. 첫 번째로 비행 계획을 보니 CDR은 이제 잠자리에 들어야 할 것 같습니다. 두 번째로, 연소 과정 요약입니다. 모든 시스템이 정상적으로 작동하는 것 같습니다. 궤적을 보니 69.67마일의 모드와 근일점 통과 시간으로 CPA가 설정되어 있습니다. 자유 귀환 경로도 양호
मुझे लगता है कि आप बिना किसी विरोध के अपनी पसंद की कोई भी बात
Exactement. C'est un vrai avantage dans le cockpit. Tu es juste un peu sombre. Il semblerait qu'une ouverture plus petite d'un cran puisse aider. On 
は
Still don't have tha
Molto bene. Al momento non 
और केबिन
罗杰。我需要这三份报告，以及LMP的最
是的，视野很好。机头刚才稍微低于地平线了，现在又升
好的，在页面中间的第 9 行，我们要划掉“激活 VHF 进行通信检查”，以及第 10 行的“验证”。我们要把“关闭”选项保留，这样可以节省电量，就像
フレッド、数分後にハニーサックルを引
잭, 
嗯，
This is Friendship Seven. T
جهاز الإرسال والاستقبال، إيقاف. محول التيار المتردد، 2، إيقاف. حسنًا. التالي، اللوحة 
Возможно, вы сможете уви
자, 시작해 볼까요? 아폴로 11호 비행에 대한 관심은 여전히 ​​높지만, 휴스턴 지역에서는 또 다른 관심사가 물 사용 규제 완화입니다. 루이
收到，杰克。这个步骤完成了。接下来我要讲的是返回控制模块，临时给主总线供电的步骤。首先，我们要确保主总线上没有任何负载，所有设备都已关闭，并且总线状态良好；其次，我们要用总线连接电机开关给主总线供电，然后通过拉下断路器断开电源，但要保持主总线连接开关处于开启状态，以确保无论电池温度如何，在我们需要的时候
Нем
Gemini VI, Houston. Have your NSR update if you're ready to c
可能であれば、
チャーリーが教えてく
Oh, ok
الجوزاء الساد
حسنًا. الأرقام المتعلقة بالوقود هي 100 (نسبة مئوية) للسيارات الأوتوماتيكية، و95 (نسبة مئوية) للسيارات اليدوية، والأكسجين هو 62 أساسي، و72 (رطل لك
オート燃料は80パーセント、マニュアル燃料は100パーセント、メインO2は69パーセント、セカンダリO2は100パーセントです。以上です
버즈, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 통신 상태가 아주 좋습니다. 목소리가
好的，乔。我已经开始了。我选择了选项 3，在显示屏上（1520 - 1525），我调出了 1
Ok. Una delle prime cose che vogliamo fare è caricare la batteria, così da poter avere un po' di energia laggiù, e abbiamo predisposto delle procedure per farlo. Per quanto riguarda il rientro, stiamo pianificando il nostro ultimo rientro a metà rotta a 5 ore prima dell'interfaccia di ingresso, e, se dovremo farne uno, ovviamente. Poi vorremmo sganciare il modulo di servizio a circa 4 ore e mezza prima dell'interfaccia di ingresso, e dedicare le suc
Wally, you got a p
Фред, у тебя накапливается CO2. На нашем манометре 11, а уровень CO2, необходимый для медицинских целей, достигает 15 миллиметров, после чего мы переключимся на вторичное обеззараживание. Похоже,
Это подтверждается. Два автоматических выключателя на панели 250 разомкнутся; два автоматических выключателя на панели 275 также разомкнутся. Хорошо, с автоматическими выключателями на панели 250 мы уже позаботились. С инвертором переменного тока 2 мы позаботились. Теперь инвертор переменного тока 2, шина переменного тока 1 должны отключиться. И с оставшимися двумя выклю
They - 
ठीक है। हम इसे टेप से हटा देंग
안녕하세요, 짐. 약 2분 후에 비행 인계가 있을 예정이고
ああ、この単眼鏡を通して見ただけでこう言うのは本当に気が進まないけど、クレーターのような白い点があるんだ。このかなり古いクレーターの底にある、新しくできた小さなクレーターの下には、たくさんの白い点があるように見えるけど、その中心には、クレーターがあるのではなく、岩があるように見える…。私の目は騙され
حسن
罗杰。迈克，你之前摆弄那个装置，我们把死区缩小的时候，你假设死区是以我们当时所处的新姿态为中心的。从那以后，我们的俯仰角和偏航角都偏离了那个姿态几度，所以如果我们按照之前跟你说的步骤操作，按下加速指令，打开所有自动选择开关，然后再按下速率指令，它就会试图飞回死区缩小时的俯仰角和偏航角。我
And - we'll - We'll give you the stuff tomorrow, but basically we expect that main bus B is go
Perché vuoi usare l
Okay. We'd
D'accord. Concernant la correction de trajectoire, nous allons la reporter à environ [heure manquante]. Il s'agira d'une combustion d'environ 7,6 m/s (25 pieds/seconde). Ce report permet un meilleur suivi grâce à la correction de séparation de 2,3 m/s (7,5 pieds/seconde). Nous souhaitons prendre le t
음, 정확히 어떻게 됐는지는 잘 모르겠
Eagle, Houston. Wir möchten Sie bitten, zur OMNI-Ant
Non credo che sia un grosso problema; salta solo quando si passa in A
Rog
Bon,
はい。それでは待機します。パワーアンプのスイッチをオフにして、ダウンボ
Penso che probabilmente tu voglia una
ठीक है। यह टैंक पर आखिरी वेंट के लिए 
हमें कल हीटर चालू
Oui, monsieur. Voilà la carte. Chaque pli est indiqué par une lettre dans le coin inférieur droit (ou supérieur droit si vous vous déplacez d'est en ouest). Les cartes sont étiquetées D, E et F, et les informations concernant les vols en solo correspondent aux cartes D et E. Elles changent lors du premier changement d'avion, c'est-à-dire à ce moment-là que les deux cartes 
우리는 당신과 함께합니다
Impulsion. Je vais utiliser ces étoiles. Il
Je ne sais pas… J’ai failli craquer. J’ai vraiment voulu jouer le jeu… et j’ai mis de la pommade – te
Okay. Die nächste Seite ist bis auf eine Kleinigkeit identisch: Anstelle von R1 befindet sich dort d
هذه هي سفينة الصداقة السابعة. وهي تعبر خليج كاليفورنيا ا
That's correct. All right. Line 4 or step 4, where it shows " check." That occur
रॉजर। क्या आप दोनों में से किसी ने मल संग्रह उपकरणों का उपयोग कि
Я могу прочитать - я могу прочитать напряжен
Roger, 11. Das Bild ist hier recht klar. Wir haben – könnten Sie uns sagen – es scheint uns, dass es zwei deutlich voneinander abgegrenzte Wolkenformationen gibt, die sich in Ost-West-Richtung erstrecken, eine ungefähr entlang des Äquators und eine um den 30. südlichen Breitengrad. Könnten Sie uns genau sagen, wo
Qu
Роджер. Иду к вам. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; минус 061, плюс 067 135 23 4149;, плюс 32020, плюс 06713, минус 02773 181 054 013;, HA - NA, плюс 00230 32833 228, DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355. Следующие три строки - NA. плюс 1103, минус - минус 17237 11806 3627
حسنًا. في أعلى الصفحة التالية، حيث كُتب "مُبخر الماء الثانوي"، تذكر أننا لا نخطط لاس
Non s
I think Jack hauled off the piece of paper with that - 
Okay. Schalte
Esatto, Buzz; e l'ultimo punto qui, ti chiediamo di fare una correzione, anche se non stiamo effettuando una correzione a metà percorso; e ti suggeriamo di far
Я до с
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Laissez l'inter
一切正常，我来快速汇报一下。燃油量为29-27%。舱压为5.5，舱
Understand you still have the balloon with yo
क्या आप हमें अपनी रात्रिकालीन तैनाती पर एक रिपोर्ट दे
Oh, its' dark, that's what happened. It's facing a dark earth. Sunset F16 to F, okay; we'll start with F
روجر. المبخر يعمل
ठीक है, एक तरफ रुकिए। सुनिए, आप फ्लाइट को लैंडलाइन के ज़रिए बता सकते हैं कि हम इस काम में देरी कर रहे हैं। बहुत सारा काम है और हमें इन सब
Roger, torno a 11-BRAVO, 11-
Alors, Gus, que 
حس
11, ह्यूस्टन। अब हम आपको हाई गेन पर वापस ले
Okay. Was müssen wir sonst
وفريد، هيوستن. بعد قل
20 Fuß, ein halbes Stück t
Okay. Take the - I'm going to want to separate the red hose from the blue hose by cutting this Beta-clot
J'ai effectué trois tests pendant cette transition. Deux affichaient des valeurs supérieures à -19,6, deux autres étaient à -19,8 et le dernier à -19,
गति लगभग 
안녕하세요, 친구 여러분, 멕시코의 친구와 특히 과이마스의 친구를 기쁘게 생각합니다. Desde el espacio external, su pais esta cubierto con numbes--그리고 es-- also--se muy bello. Aqui el Tiempo esta
Okay. We will stand, and you give us a mark on that. In just a second, I will check on the antenna
こんにちは、カントンコムテック、カントンコムテック、オーロラセブン。はっきりと聞こえます。調子
Хорошо. Два выключателя — два автоматических выключателя на панели 250 — снова разомкнуты; два автоматических выключателя на панели 275 — снова разомкнуты; автоматический выключатель ввода/вывода питания, мы уже позаботились ранее; инвертор переменного тока 2, мы уже позаботились ранее; инвертор переменного тока 2 к шине 
I got the ear
جيميني 4، هذه غرفة ع
Ich habe keine Lichter gesehen, also haben sie auch
И, Хьюстон. Компьютер в
Siamo d'
Хорошо. Собираюсь нажать «ПРИНЯТЬ», и тут у меня возникла необъяснимая активность креновых двигателей. Возможно, я случайно задел пульт управ
Mike, qui a pagina 9-7 della tua checklist, dove stiamo impostando, c'è una nota scritta a matita dopo: "Aspetta 20 minuti affinché la velocità si smorzi. Non monitorare". A quanto pare, il significato di ciò è che, se stai monitorando 16, quando ar
ठीक है। पैनल 11 पर, हम चाहते हैं कि आप सर्किट ब्रेकर को बंद कर दें। फिर हम चाहते हैं कि आप एक्टिवेशन 25 पर जाएं; चरण 1, 2 और
Und Gott sprach: „Das Wasser unter dem Himmel sammle sich an einem Ort, und das Trockene werde sichtbar.“ Und es geschah so. Und Gott nannte das Trockene Erde. Und das, was sich unter dem Himmel gesammelt hatte, nannte man Meer. Und Gott sah, dass es gut war. Die Besatzung von Apollo 8 wünscht Ihnen eine gute Nacht, viel Glück, ein frohes We
Wha
Закат довольно впечатляющий, думаю, не стоит тратить много времени на его созерцание. Он очень интересный. Ещё меня поражает, насколько темно, когда глаза не адаптированы. Я определённо вижу какое-то покрытие на окне. Возвращаюсь к VOX в диапазоне UHF-hi для передачи. Открываю визор, чтобы протереть правый микрофон. Я его лизнул. Закрываю визор. Визор сразу же загерметизировался, чтобы схема скафандра могла начать работать. Не хочу снова с ней возиться. Вентиляционное отверстие скафандра держится очень хорошо, около 68 градусов. Так что купол снова поднимется. Сейчас он поднят на 76, 75. По-видимому, это более высокое значение — то, что нам нужно. Думаю, добавлю ещё полбалла, и, возможно, мы её зафиксируем. Наконец-то становится прохладнее, так что я знаю, какое значение выбрать. Я установил количество охлаждающей жидкости для скафандра и рычага управления на 8,5. Показания на дисплее купола в данный момент составляют 75 градусов. На входе в скафандр — 68 градусов. Очень приятно. Я чувствую, как прохладный воздух обдувает мое лицо. Показатель кислорода выгляди
Bien. Nous voyons maintenant la Terre entière, y compris le terminateur. Évidemment, nous ne pouvons r
Wir haben einen Bermuda-Vektor für Sie. Sie befinden sich bei 87 x 140, was ein Ausweichmanöver und eine Höhe
पानी की बंदूक चलाने की बारी का इंतज़ार करते हुए, मैं ऑप्टिक्स पर कुछ टिप्पणी कर सकता हूँ। ऐसा लगता है कि सूर्य के आस-पास कहीं भी स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप पर प्रकाश की एक चौड़ी पट्टी फैली हुई है। अभी कुछ देर पहले हम ऐसी स्थिति में थे जहाँ से मैं स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में चंद्रमा को देख पा रहा था। फिर मैंने उसे सेक्स्टेंट और आकाश में देखा - चंद्रमा के चारों ओर का आकाश बहुत हल्का नी
Tranquility, Houston. Go ah
Okay. As the first step, I have one change to the basic configuration that we gave you, and it's two more circuit breakers that we want open. On panel 225 - Are you ready to write that down? Ov
分かりました。今読
我看到机载指
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन
Houston -
Verstanden. Sie haben für die Parallelitätsprüfung eine Drehung um 180 Grad du
لست متأكدًا م
Et, 13, Houston. Nous sommes prêts à prendre en charge l'ex
Tu t'en es tr
Questo è più o meno tutto. Stai 
我是休斯顿双子座 
К
ठीक है। हम शिफ्ट बदलने की तैयारी कर रहे हैं, और इससे पहले मैं कुछ बातों
我们现
حسنًا. R1 + 27210، R2 + 35570، R3 + 33010. العنصر الثاني، كما تعلم، بسبب المناورة باستخدام أمر PROCEED مرتين
हाँ, बिल्कुल। क्या आप नकल करने के लिए तैयार हैं? उस समय सभी सिस्टम पर्यावरण के अनुकूल थे। ईंधन की खपत 89 प्रतिशत (ऑटोमैटिक) और 90 प्रतिशत (मैन्युअल) थी। ऑक्सीजन का प्राथमिक स्तर 56 psi (सैकड़ों में) और द
了解しました、ジェミニ4号。はっきりと聞こえました。第25革命の地図アップデートは届きましたか
Und ich habe einen alternativen G
완전히는 아니지만
يبدو تصحيح المسار الأوسط رقم 6 الآن وكأنه صفر، وتصحيح المسار الأو
Хорошо, звучит неплохо. Потому что я не знаю, где я — как далеко я тебя потерял. Хорошо, панель 4; ТЕЛЕКОММУНИКАЦИЯ, ГРУППА 1, к AC1. На панели 5 замкните следующие контакты: ГРУППА ДАВЛЕНИЯ 1, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ГРУППА ДАВЛЕНИЯ 2, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ТЕМПЕРАТУРА, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ПРЕОБРАЗОВАТЕЛЬ ВТОРИЧНОЙ ПЕТЛИ, ОСНОВНОЙ B; РАДИАТОР УПРА
Jim, renseigne
好的，很好，你的意思表达清楚了。现在
Roger, qui è Friendship Seven. Ingabbiare e libe
Bene, adesso, dopo aver inserito quel ga
قاعدة ترانكويليتي، هيوستن. قراءتك صحيحة.
Bene. Houston, Ac
Apollo 11, Houston. I nostri consigli sulle attività da svolgere nella prossima ora circa, per quanto riguarda il piano di volo, sono: continuare la familiarizzazione come desiderato 
Хорошо. Он поправляетс
حسنًا، لدي بعض التعليمات لك. حسنًا، يمكنك تشغيل الجهاز. أريد تشغيل جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بك، وتوصيلك بمصدر الطاقة، ووضع جهاز الرادار في وضع الاستعداد؛ بعد 5 دقائق، قم بتشغيل الرادار وانسخ قراءات الرادار كل
Ok. Per informazione, Fred era in comunicazione ieri sera; era seduto sul sedile di sinistra, e se volete i nostri valori di radiazioni, abbiamo semplicemente sbagliato. Li abbiamo lasciati tutti nelle tute, che ora sono ben nascoste. Comunque t
ठीक है। एक और बात, जिसके बारे में हम आपको थोड़ी और जानकारी देना चाहते हैं। जैसा कि हमने आपको बताया, एसेन्ट एसईपी एटीट्यूड समतल में था और जेट्ट एटीट्यूड एक सामान्य सर्विस मॉड्यूल एसईपी एटीट्यूड के समान होगा, यानी यह ऊपर की ओर, त्रिज्या वेक्टर से बाहर और 45 डिग्री दाईं ओर,
로저. 여전히
«Аполлон-13», Хьюстон. Передача эстафеты с
Ja. Uns fiel auf, dass es im Cockpit auf dem Rückweg wärmer war als auf dem Hinflug. Ich erinnere mich, dass wir beim Hinflug das Zehn-Stift-Ventil manuell positioniert hatten, aber wir hatten die Glykolverdampfer-Austrittstemperatur
ठीक है। जैसा कि मैंने पढ
Хорошо. И я хочу напомнить вам, чт
Роджер. Наверное, ты всю ночь не
O2 High RateではなくRepressを使う理由を教
मैंने कहा कि जिम ने अनजाने में थोड़ा क्लोरीन गिरा दिया था, और थोड़ी देर के लिए यहाँ क्लोरॉक्स की बाल्टी जैसी बदबू आ रही 
نيل وباز، أتحدث إليكما عبر الهاتف من الغرفة البيضاوية في البيت الأبيض، ولا شك أن هذه المكالمة الهاتفية هي الأهم في التاريخ. لا أستطيع وصف مدى فخرنا بما قدمتموه لكل أمريكي
您好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。关于您的低温设备，请您将所有四个低温加热器设置为自动模式，并关闭所有四个低温风扇
نعم، نحن نقدر ذلك يا فانس. الأمر فقط أنن
우리는 언제 봐도 멋져
अच्छा। 31816 302 31624 40 2699 396 033, नीचे 054, बाएँ 21, प्लस 0810 नियंत्रण माइनस 16500 12968 36222; संरेखण वही रहता है
Understand. Why don't you give us a call on these landmark sig
ご存知のとおり、今後の手順については複
Хорошо, 8. Мы только что получили ответ по тестовым схемам. Мы 
В таком положении определенно создается иллюзия, что смотришь высоко вверх, и если горизонта нет, то это просто черное небо. Количество света в кабине довольно высокое. Конечно, после адаптации его можно уменьшить с помощью освещения салона. На данный момент я несколько не ре
믿을 수가 
Roger. J'ai des informations à te communiquer à ce sujet, que nous aborderons juste après le prochain exerci
अरे, डॉक्टर को
11, hier spricht Houston. Auf unserem Terminal sehen wir hier nur Werte in zw
알겠
Гуаймас, это «Близнецы 4». Нам нужно немедленно найти р
Okay. Die nächsten eins, zwei, drei, vier, fünf, sechs und sieben sind gleic
パックプライマリO2が
罗杰。我明白，在船尾靠近东侧的地方，光线看起来颜色较深。巴兹，我理解，那是光线照射下来的物质呈现出的颜色，向外延伸两三英尺，颜色较深。是这样吗
알겠습니다. 마지막 세 줄에는 각각 FLOOD 및 TRACK 회로 차단기(2번째 줄)가 열려 있고, LOGIC POWER B, DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE, SUIT FLOW CONTROL이 열려 있습니다. 세 번째 줄에는 DISPLAY가 열려 있고, VHF A 및 VHF A 송신기, VHF B 수신기가 열려 있습니다. 그 아래
Gee, I'm really disappointed over those optics
मुझे उम्मीद है क
Ok, Houston. L'incendio è completo. Ora dobbiamo parlare dello spegnimento, e
好的。在 Rev 59 结束时，升交点经
انتظروا. أر
いい
我现在开始从潜望镜里看到日出了。这是这次轨道飞行中，由于夜侧的原因，潜望镜里出现了第一束光。很明显，在夜侧进行逆向姿态调整时，潜望镜完全不起作用。我看到的第一束光几乎就在……。日出正迅速地透过潜望镜照射进来。我确实看到了约翰提到的那些发光物体，而且我可以敲掉一些。我明显感觉到它们像一片光斑，大小不一，从小到亮都有。潜望镜本身太刺眼了。我得把海图盖在上面，这样才能看清窗外。我随时可以进行逆向姿态调整，所以除了看着窗外，我别无他事可做。前提是宇航服
हम इस बात से सहमत हैं। किसी भी हालत 
Die Heizung ist aus. Wir haben die Heizungsprüfung nicht dur
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。你的轨迹
Nous avons obtenu 53373, 
Oui. Je suppose que la question principale est de comparer les billes ici et par la fenêtre; cela ne semble pas trop aberrant. Jim dit que le lacet et le roulis sont légèrement différents de ce qu'il pourrait évaluer à vue d'œil; pourta
Okay. Mir fällt gerade wieder ein, dass der Eintrag alles ist, was du hast. Er init
알겠습니다. 아마 1분쯤
Possiamo abbassare il pitch -... immagine -
रॉजर। मुझे अभी भी एक P76 पैड चाहिए, और आपकी सुविधानुसार कभी भी एक 1 प्लस 12 P76
我还有一些其他信息。大约两个小时后，我们才能掌握你飞行轨迹的准确数据。不过，从燃烧情况来看
断路器，俯仰角 1，偏航角 1，俯仰角 2，偏航
Roger. Vous souhaitez maintenant vérifier également l'évaporateur princi
Roger. Houston, Apollo 8. Ti leggo forte e chiaro. piano 24136 179 045 001 515 10519
Ok. Ok. Innanzitutto, la filosofia generale è che queste regole dovrebbero essere simili all'interruzione in modalità I, con i limiti rigorosi. Ora, le esaminerò una per una affinché tu possa copiarle. Ok. Dovresti spegnere il motore se si verifica una delle seguenti situazioni: lettura del monitor di spinta, 77% o inferiore; pressione del serbatoio del propellente - questa è la pressione di ingresso - lettura di bordo, 160 o inferiore; carburante a OX DELTA-P, superiore a 25 psi - e questo dovrebbe essere una chiamata a terra per te - errore di assetto più o meno 10 gradi, ad eccezione del transitorio 
Okay. We'd like to brief you on what our plan is. We're, at this time, water critical in the . So we'd like to use as little as possible. To do this, we're going to plan to make a free-return maneuver of 16 feet per second at 61 hours, which is 37 minutes from now. Then we're going to power down the, and then we'll - at 79 hours, we'll go ahead and make another abort maneuver to kick what we got. But we'd like
좋아요. 저기 리터가 있네요. 저기, 바로
بينما كان جاك يُجهّز مكان النوم، أردتُ أن أُريكَ زاويةً مثيرةً للاهتمام. لدينا هنا حقيبة تخزين مؤقتة، نضع فيها جميع أوراقنا المُستعملة وكل ما نحتاجه بعد كل وجبة. إنها في 
这是友谊七号。问得好。我也想知道。这些误差在整个飞行过程中断断续续地出现。我反复地锁定和解除陀螺仪的锁定。现在我回到了轨道姿态，但实际上并没有，姿态指示器显示是轨道姿态，但实际上不是。通过观察地平线，我感觉滚转偏右约20°，俯仰偏下约20°。目测俯仰角大约下降55°，滚
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seve
वह दूसरा चालक
Houston, Apo
Хорошо. Имеет ли значение, если мы отключим... Мы уже вытащили автоматические выключатели POWER-1 и -2, так что, если мы решим отключить эти кабели, ничего страшного не произойд
他说，为了让MSC-1恢复运行，他们需要关闭ACQ辅助信标5分钟。你知道，你本来打算离开——去进行一些EC
Это продолжается примерно с 1 плюс 15. Конец. Сразу после того, как я упомянул закат, я снов
फिलहाल, मेरी यॉ दर ½ डिग्री प्रति सेकंड दाईं ओर, पिच दर ½ डिग्री प्रति सेकंड ऊपर 
别担心，我会去找
和往常一样，我们都有点累了。比尔现在正在睡觉，等我
屋外用の16mmカメラにはマジックテープが付いてい
حسنًا. وسأقوم بإغل
哥伦比亚，这
روجر، أود أن أسألك سؤالاً بخصوص مناورة +11 التي قمنا بنسخها. في الملاحظات، كتبتَ 7900. هل هذا هو 
我听
Okay. Die Startzeit ist – klingt gut. Das gibt uns genügend Zeit, uns vorzubereiten, 
ジェミニ 4、ヒューストン CAP COM
Ja, ich seh
जी
खैर, जिस एक बड़े गड्ढे के ऊपर से हम गुजरे, उसके अलावा हमारे इलाके में शायद ही कोई और गड्ढा था। EASEP लगाने के बाद मैं टहलने के लिए वापस आया, और जब बज़ दस्तावेजी नमूनों को खोलना शुरू कर रहा था - मैं पीछे एक गड्ढे की ओर गया जो शायद 70 या 80 फीट व्यास और 15 या 20 फीट गहरा था, और उसकी कुछ तस्वीरें लीं। उसके तल में काफी बड़े आकार के पत्थर थे, जो सतह पर मौजूद किसी भी पत्थर से काफी बड़े थे, लेकिन वहाँ - जाहिर तौर पर,
알겠습니다. 다섯 가지 말씀드리겠습니다. 첫째, 저공비행 기동
Okay. Die ersten beiden Zeilen sind in Ordnung. CB – dritte Zeile, CB(11) und (16): STAB/KONTROLLE, alle GESCHLOSSEN außer CB(11), GEÖFFNET; STUF
Allez-y
I
Roger.
2時間8
Le cratère qui se trouve au centre de l'écran est le cratère Webb. Nous l'observons à la verticale environ six minutes avant la descente. Son fond est relativement plat et l'on distingue deux ou trois autres cratères sur sa paroi ouest, la plus proche de la caméra. En bas de l'écran, on aperçoit un cratère en forme de fossette, juste à l'extérie
……现
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Nous essaierons de vous appeler 20 minutes avant chaque… Term
比
ジャック、特に私のような初心者にとって、ここの良い点の一つは、動きやすさです。司令船シミュレーターで作業した経験があれば分かると思いますが、無重力状態は確かに大きな助けになります。なぜなら、1Gの重力下では、宇宙船内で動き回るのはかなり制限されるからです。しかし、この環境では動き回るのはとても簡単です。ご覧の通り、かなりきれいに見えます。ワッシャーがいくつか緩んでいました。また、シーケンスカメラの小さなプラスチック製のキャップが外れて、EDパネルのそばに引っかかっていました。さて、ジムの真下、彼はここにある缶のようなものの上に立っています。そして、後ろにいる皆さんのために言っておきますが、この缶の中に
Хорошо, Базз. Цель — пролёт. SPS/G&N: 62815, плюс 097, минус 020 070 54 5944, минус 00028, плюс 00023, плюс 00069 029 149 312, 
Okay. Nein, ich hatte 31 und 33, und jetzt habe ich Sigma Libra, und es werden 31 un
جيميني 6، جيميني 6، هيوستن كاب كوم
Роджер.
جو، يبدو أن أفضل وضعية ممكنة لوضع النجوم هي إما رقم 2 أو
Gemini VI, come 
B1 헬멧에 맞을지는 잘 모르겠네요. 다른 하나는 맞을지도 모르겠어요. 수면용 구속 장치에 들어갈 것 같아요. 헬멧 가방에 넣
좋아요, 밴스, 제가 보여드리려고 했던 게 있는데요, 저기 계신 분들이 우리가 달과 얼마나 떨어져 있는지 어떻게 알아내는지 궁금해하실 것 같아서요. 지금 바로 
Ap
네. 또 하나, 입대 전에 살펴볼 부분이 있는데, 바로 일반적인 입대 시험 패턴입니다. 현재 체크리스트에 약 1시간 정도 소요되는 절차로 명시되어 있습니다. 지금 위에
좋습니다. 그리고 
우리는 뒤쪽으
了解
Интересно. У нас в норме относительная влажност
よし、そうだな。CDRとCMPを見て、少しで
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호입니다. 당
تأكد من عدم 
That's a good blood pressure, give your exercise
Looking at the world of sports, let's see here. While you were busy the other day, Joe Namath and football Commissioner Pete Rozelle made the announcement that "Broadway Joe" had agreed to sell his interest in the Bachelors III restaurant and report to the New York Jets. Joe arrived at the Jets' training camp today and had his first workout. Several other Jet players who had held out along with Joe also reported. And Davy Hill, from Jackson, Michigan, won his third major golf in as many starts in the past week. He won the Philadelphia Classic. Hill has won four tournaments so far this year and is the leading money winner this year with a cool $129.000. And in baseball, the west division of the National League remains a tight race. LA and San Francisco are one game behind league leading Atlanta. The Astros have a record of 48 wins and 48 losses, and are now in fifth place, seven games out. A twin bill between the Astros and Cincinnati last night was postponed because of rain. The Chicago Cubs are still in first place in the East Division. They lead the New York Mets by four and one half games. And in the American League, Baltimore is breezing toward the Eastern Division title. They lead second place Boston by 11 games. Looking ahead, the All Star baseball game is scheduled for tomorrow. And President Nixon was scheduled to see the game and then leave immediately after the game for the Pacific splashdown area before going on his tour of Europe. And that about covers the news this day. You guys have been making most of it and I'm sure we couldn't fill you in on any of the details that you d
روجر. 0.98، وماذا قرأت عن تدفق الأكسجين على مقياسك الموجود في السيار
रॉज
Immagino che tu s
जिम, इसे खोलने की जरूरत नहीं 
11, Housto
Du warst nah ge
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Entschuldigung für die Störung, aber wir würden Sie bitten, uns
So, ihr kommt jetzt alle langsam über den Rand des Sichtfelds. Ich kann Teile Mittelamerikas sehen, und dort scheint es recht klar zu sein. Die Karibikinseln kommen langsam ins Bild, zusammen mit einigen wenigen Wolkenbändern. Es sieht so aus, als gäbe es ein Tiefdruckgebiet vor Grönland, mit einigen großen Wolkenbändern, die sich bis nach Südwesten erstrecken. Die Ostküste der USA wird jetzt gerade sichtbar, und soweit ich das beurteilen kann, sieht es dort gar nicht so schlecht aus. Vielleicht haben wir später am Nachmittag noch ein paar r
Quarante-six deg
2 minu
네, 맞습니다. 아직 자동 제어 방식입니다. 
Принято. Вы
2 Baker dit 0,6
Gemini VI, we've got it just backwards here. It's range 32.69 and range rate
Итак, на 11-м положении у нас DECA POWER, DECA GIMBAL, OPEN. На 16-м положении у нас ATC
Apollo 11, Houston. Vorre
На с
That's right. You think they will share a window? No soap. Yo
عاد جهاز Tr-10 إلى وضعه الطبيعي. لقد فعلت ذلك سابقًا. حسنًا، حصلنا على ضغط البدلة. تفضل بإلقاء نظرة أخرى على العواكس هنا. 250 تساوي 141 درجة، و150 تساوي حوالي 107 درجات. هذا جيد. وضع الاستعداد هو... 7. قريب جدًا من درجة حرارة الجو. سلبي، بل أقل قليلًا... ضغط المقصورة حوالي 5.3 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة، وهو مثالي. درجة حرارة قبة البدلة 72 درجة. درجة حرارة ق
Okay. Let me 
好的。在他脑袋正后方是我们的光学
它进去了。就是这样触发的——好了，杰克。我要按压这
ठीक है। जिम निचले उपकरण कक्ष स
حسنًا. لقد سمعتك تقول شيئًا عن استخدام كاميرا Hycon في ب
حسنًا. في الصف 14، تحت نظام التدفئة A/B-1: افتح الدائرة الرباعية من 1 إلى 4؛ تحت مضخة الجليكول، التغيير الوحيد هو: أغلق التحويل التلقائي؛ تحت الاتصالات، التغيير الوحيد هو: افتح مستقبل VHF A، افتح صوت القائد؛ تحت، التغيير الوحيد هو: أ
罗杰，11。这里是休斯顿。大约在71到72小时之间，我们将安排您进行进食，我想这可能已经开始了。71小时：氧气燃料电池吹扫；72小时：更换第6个二氧化碳过滤器，检查二级散热器流量。我们将向您发送一份关于2小时飞行、近地点飞行和返航模
Понятно. У вас есть OAMS 
Okay. And 
Je me sens plutôt bien. J'ai un peu chaud, su
Роджер. Панель 16, ряд 2, управление STAB ATCA, то есть A T C A, и она должна быть открыта в данный момент. Конец
मैंने ह्यूस्टन से संपर्क होते ही एस-5 से तस
Non ce la 
रॉजर। क्या आप मुझे
Roger. Y
Хорошо, Водолей. Мы работаем над тем, что будет дальше. А пока мы хотели бы отключить некоторые мощные устройства, поэтому на пане
Ok,
罗杰。189 加 00：总计减 1%；阿尔法减 11；布拉沃加 10；查理减 1；德尔塔减 1；氢气总量减 0
Die Wettervorhersage für Ihr Landegebiet ist 
حسنًا. سأبدأ من جديد - دع
ちなみに、ヒューストンさん、窓 5 に太陽が当たっているときはかな
好的，我会的。我会把重量单位（磅）和百分
Roger. Vous voy
処理中
Wir haben das Gefühl, wir müssen das verwenden. Die Verstärkung in Nick- und Rollrichtung ist in dieser Konfiguration nicht besonders gut. Es hält das Flugzeug in der 
Хорошо. Мы бы хотели сейчас включить FM, чтобы 
로저. 내일 오후에 자세히 살펴보실 수 있을 거라고
로저, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 통신 내용이 약간 불분명합니다. 
アポロ1
진동에 대해 더 원하시는 말씀
不。没有更换飞机，起飞速度是每秒2.3英尺。我们之前起飞速度是每秒2.9英尺，所
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, Gemi
Okay. We could see you zoom in on the 
Oh, Moment mal. Es müsste heiße
Хорошо. Следующие один, два, три — то же самое, а затем нам нужно перевести кнопку ПЕРЕДАЧИ ЛЕНТЫ В ЦЕНТРАЛЬНОЕ ПОЛОЖЕНИЕ; кнопку ОБРАЩЕНИЯ МЕХАНИЗМА ЛЕ
はい。よろしくお願
Подождите, мы закрыв
Ricevuto. Abbiamo caricato quei carichi e li abbiamo verificati; puoi tornare al tuo computer. E George Low dice che sta lavorando a quel problema della finestra alle 6, o alla navicella spaziale 104. Hai solo la navi
わかりました。ご都合の良い時に客室温度調査を実施し、飛行後のログブックに記録していただけますでしょうか。客室の周囲温度（乾球温度と湿球温度）、スーツインレットの乾球温度と湿球温度を計測してください。青いノズルを取り外し、酸素流量を直接確認してください。可能であれば、ハッチ表面温度
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, qui è
حسنًا. يرغب جنودنا في أن تذهب إلى جهاز اختبار الأنظمة وتقرأ لنا درجات حرارة الح
ROTATION CONTROL POWER, DIRECT, t
嘿，格斯，我有个问题。这个D-9实验，4号是阿波罗号，还是空军的另一架4
نافذة الإرساء. حسناً.
Roger. D'accord, Jim. Quels modes de contrôle vas-tu utiliser pour la rentrée atmo
दोनो
是的，我也这
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы попросить вас выполнить захв
当我们朝这个方向仰望时，透过侧窗可以看到太阳掠过，当然，现在透过其中一个窗户还能看到地球。现在，就
Okay. Let's - give the last thing to Jack and I'll keep it all out. Okay? SYSTEM A. That's in. TCA
روجر. زائد 0888، ناقص 16500 12955 36185، لا تغيير في المحاذاة، لا تغيير في مستوى السائل، الأفق درجة واحدة عند الاشتعال ناقص ثلاثة. يفترض 2. انت
조, 잭이 아직도 조준경으로 보는 데 어려움
और, 13, ह्यूस्टन। अगर जैक जाग रहा है, तो मैं 
Ruhe, Houston. Hörst du
아니요, 오른쪽 열에 그 모든 항목에 대한 내용이 있다면 저희는 굳이 그렇게 할 필요가 없습니다. 그리고 제가 마지막으로 알려드려
Oups! La
好了。起落架已经放下并
रॉजर, मैं समझता हूँ। आप इ
ちょっと面白い、ちょっと嬉しいニュースがあります。ミシガン州アナーバーに、新しい若者ギャングが誕生したそうです。ギルネット・ギャングという名前で、アナーバーの街を徘徊し、秘密裏に活動し、時には法の網をかいくぐっています。彼らは自らを「善のためのゲリラ」と名乗っています。彼らの活動の一つに、卑猥な言葉で埋め尽くされた橋をペンキ
अपोलो 8, हमें आपके सामान्य लेंस से वही मिल रहा था जो आप हमें दिखा रहे थे, लेकिन टेलीफ़ोटो लेंस से कुछ भी नहीं मिला। हम इस पर काम कर रहे हैं। एक समस्या यह लग रही ह
Très bien. J'ai une autre ex
Bill's going to ta
Apollo 8, Houston. Te
Bien reçu. Mode de pilotage manuel, gyroscopes normaux, manœuvres désactivées. Carburant: 45-50 
コロンビア、ヒューストン。救助用のPADがありますので、コピーしてご利用くだ
Хорошо. У нас есть: дисплей открыт; а
जी हां।
Apollo 11, Houston. We'd li
ما أبحث عنه الآن يا جاك، هو قطعة جديدة أخرى من المعدات التي نأخذها معنا هذه المرة نتيجة لبعض التعليقات التي أدلي بها على متن رحلة أبول
왼손 검지 손가락 끝 부분의 라이트가 결국 고장났습니다. 우리가 원하는 만큼 오래
Gemini 4, 
Okay. Wir hatten einige Probleme mit unseren Displays, und ich denke, die sind jetzt behoben, abe
버즈, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. F/2 조
Roger. Répétez. Pour la zone 17-1, angle d'inclinaison de 00 degrés: RN moins RP sera de +107; deuxième lecture: angle d'inclinaison de 44 degrés; RN et RP seront de 0; troisième lecture: angle d'inclinaison de 90 degrés, RN 
Lors de notre prochain passage, j'appréciera
Et Dieu dit: « Que les eaux qui sont sous le ciel se rassemblent en un seul lieu, et que la terre ferme paraisse. » Et cela fut ainsi. Dieu appela la terre ferme Terre, et l'amas des eaux, les mers. Et Dieu vit que cela était bon. De la part de l'équipage d'Apollo 8, nous vous souhaitons une bonne nuit, bonne chance, un joyeux Noël et que Dieu vous béni
Apollo 8, 
Оуэн, странная вещь
C'est affirmatif, et ce sera pour lui quand il arr
क्या आपने उन्हें फोन किया? हेलमेट उतार
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston CAP COM. Sind Sie bereit, das CLA-Upda
हे जिम, मेरे पास तीन बातें
好的。关闭隔离阀，保持TCA断路器关闭，关闭交叉馈电阀，打开接下来的两个显示屏。如果主SO
Roger, Tranquility. Ti do 
沃利，从我们目视的距离来看，
Ti sto leggendo forte e chiaro, e tu stai copiando i nostr
Roger. Compris. Si tu as besoin
Аполлон-8, Аполлон-8. Можеш
Sie möchten Ihren Kommentar jetzt zur Dunstschicht beginnen – es gab den... Tonhöhenunterschied – und gleichzeitig bestätigen, dass der Flugplan im Zei
Bene. Abbiamo tre fotocamere qui, due delle quali da usare per scattare foto dalla finestra numero 5, e una da usare dalla finestra numero 5. Per prima cosa, parlerò delle fotocamere. E questa fotocam
No
乔，我们确认一下。2号氧气罐的压力表读数现在
저기, 마지막 별의 값을 변경하셨는지 확인하고 싶습니다. 변경되
Das ist richtig. Okay, dann gehen wir zurück zur Tunnelentlüftung und überprüfen den Druckunterschied (ΔP) in cm³, u
ええ。ええ、もちろん、それが私たちがやろうとしていることです。そこで何が起こっているのかをき
はい、状態ベクトルへの効果に関しては、前回のアップデートには満足しています。ただ、様
Roger, Hous
Roger. Je reçois sur 17-1 angle de roulis 00 degrés; RN moins RP, plus 107; angle de roulis de 44 degrés; RN moins RP, 0; angle de roulis de 90 degrés; RN, RP, mo
١١، هذه هيوستن. نخطط الآن لتنفيذ عملية الحرق الثانية باستخدام البنك (أ)
收到。待命。减压阀现在处于
はい、その通りです。軌道調整とタイムハックが完了すれば、こちらにいる優秀なスタッフ
नहीं। मैं इसे अभी बद
Ok, Jack. Cosa stai leggendo ora, gli angoli? Avevamo la Luna centrata, ed è abbastanza vicina a quella che a
Roger. Come procede l'attività di accensione dei propulsori? Siamo quasi pr
ठीक ह
حسنًا يا بيل. أعتقد أنني أريد أن أتراجع عن كلامي الأخير بخصوص استخدام متجه الحالة المدمج للرقم 
عندما تشرق الشمس، يا له م
D
알겠습니다, 밴스. R1에서 고도는 10마일 단위로 55,
D'accord, Jack. On ne veut pas te déranger, m
Roger, Frank. Nous ne pensons pas qu'il y ait de problème ou d'anomalie dans cette prédiction du périgée à -03137. C'est une prédiction képlérienne, et elle n'est pas très précise. Nous av
우리는 저 수산화리튬 용기를
EINSTELLUNG oder KOMPATIBILI
إنه - إنه 
Der Sonnenuntergang ist wirklich beeindruckend, ich glaube nicht, dass ich viel Zeit damit verschwenden muss, ihn anzusehen. Er ist sehr interessant. Faszinierend ist auch, wie schwarz es ist, wenn sich die Augen nicht daran gewöhnt haben. Ich kann definitiv eine Beschichtung auf dem Fenster erkennen. Ich schalte jetzt wieder auf VOX im UHF-Hi-Modus, um zu senden. Ich öffne das Visier, um das rechte Mikrofon abzuwischen. Ich habe es abgeleckt. Visier zu. Das Visier wurde sofort abgedichtet, damit die Anzugselektronik ihre Arbeit aufnehmen konnte. Ich will damit nicht noch einmal Probleme haben. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hält die Temperatur sehr gut bei etwa 68 Grad. Also wird die Kuppel wieder hochgefahren. Sie steht jetzt bei 76, 75 Grad. Anscheinend ist diese höhere Einstellung die richtige. Ich denke, ich drehe sie jetzt noch eine halbe Markierung hoch, dann haben wir sie vielleicht fixiert. Sie kühlt endlich etwas ab, also weiß ich, in welche Richtung ich die Einstellung ändern muss. Ich habe die Kühlmittelmenge für den Anzug und den Steuerhebel auf 8,5 eingestellt. Die Anzeige in der Kuppel zeigt aktuell 75 Grad an. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hat 68 Grad. Sehr angenehm. Ich spüre die kühle Luft auf meinem Gesicht. Der Sauerstoffgehalt sieht sehr
ジェミニ8号星、こちらヒューストン。加速度計のバイアスは正確で、非常に良好です
Bene. Procediamo con la p
Al
Oui,
好的。我读取到的陀螺仪扭矩角是+0.03.30，Y轴是+0.023，Y轴只有四个数值；你需要再给我一次，Z轴是-0.0
यह टैंगो के लिए दो लेता 
増加したのであれば、今後も増加し続ける
Rog
مدارك الآن هو 86.3 × 141.6، وأنت في وضع جيد لل
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन; एक्वेरियस। मैं इसे वापस उसी दिशा 
रॉजर। सिग्मा सेवन। फ्लैग प्लॉट। क्या
Roger. Apparently, he
네, 그런 것 같아요. ORB 레이트가 그대로 전달되는 방식일
«Дружба Сем
...
Standin
わ
네. 225번 패널에서 랑데부 트랜스폰더 플라이트 버스 회로 차단기와 S-밴드 
Это «Дружба Семь». Подтверждаю. Она снова отклонилась.
Va bene. 10 435.6
존, 도저히 생각이
了解
压力
로저. 방금 일어난 이후로 물을 
That's affirmative. This attitude put both win
我们正在启动阿波罗计划的首次运行。我们有D-9，Ru（无法辨
The big back is going on the camera at this time. There was a period there when nothing was recorded because I was in VOX power off, instea
Decisamente sotto di me. L'avevo seguito sotto di me da Carnarvon in poi. Fino a Carnarvon l'avevamo tenuto sotto di noi, poi fino all'orizzonte, e poi di nuovo sotto di noi. Sembrava quasi che fosse in un'orbita diversa dalla mia. Aveva un apogeo e un perigeo diversi dai miei. Comunque, ho tentato di avvicinarmi all'alba non appena ho potuto capire dove si trovava. Come ho detto, in quel momento era a un miglio o due davanti a me, sotto di me. Quindi, più cercavo di avvicinarmi, meno guadagnavo terreno. Stavo sparando retrogrado. Stavo usando i miei propulsori superiori per sparare in modo da ridurre la mia velocità totale, e poi sparavo... contemporaneamente. Non ho mai veramente avvicinato, e continuava ad allontanarsi da me. Mi è diventato ovvio che quando siamo arrivati ​​alle Hawaii, avvicinarmi al booster in tempo per fare l'EVA con il booster avrebbe probabilmente consumato tutto il carburante che avevamo a bordo. Come regola generale avevamo concordato di non farlo. Così ho contattato il CAP COM e abbiamo deciso di non procedere con la parte della missione con il booster. Non so se l'ho detto, ma quando ci siamo staccati dal booster, sembrava che le nostre velocità di lancio fossero basse, nell'ordine di mezzo grado al secondo in beccheggio e imbardata. Ho cercato di smorza
更
Je ne veux pas te voiler la face, Wally, s
友情七号，信号微弱但可辨认。目前所有系统运行正常。血压读数为125/90。大约2分30秒后将进行心力衰竭检查，大约7分钟后
罗杰。高度调整参数为：ΔV，
Aurora Seven, comment vous sentez-vous? Votre température corporelle a légèrement augment
Apollo 8, Houston. We are about to have a handover to Goldstone, and our downlink isn't
ठीक
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 저도 동의합니다. 제가 보고 있는 
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston. Ich sage, es ist 16+10. Haben Sie mich verstan
Jim, on
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это Уотертаунский коммуникационный технический колледж. Я читаю вам три раза по три. Подождите, я передам вас в коммуникационн
حسنًا يا بيل. سيكون هذا في الصفحة 2، القسم 22 من خطة رحلتك. بالنسبة لقائد وحدة القيادة - لقد ذكرت ذلك له بالفعل - ولكن في أعلى الصفحة، في الواقع، نود منه أن يقوم بمحاذاة النجوم الأربعة، بروكيون، ريجولوس، ألفارد، وندرك أن ألفارد قد لا يكون نجمًا جيدًا، وريجولوس على ارتفاع 3 درجات تقريبًا فوق الأفق، وسبيكا بزاوية دوران 48 درجة؛ لذلك أعتقد أن ما نقوله هو أنه إذا واجه جيم صعوبة في إجراء مجموعة واحدة على كل من هذه النجوم الأربعة، ن
ليس لد
Okay, Jim. Ti stiamo dando ragione su questo; è un argomento che volevamo sollevare con te. Ci abbiamo pensato e la nostra opinione è questa
Это «Дружба номер семь». Готов
了解。CSIで報告します。NOUN 11、105 35 3700、107 11
روجر. إذا كن
Salut Jim. Ici Tom. On évoque ça uniquement pour avoir un autre système de référence afin de contrôler le système quand tu largueras l'engin
Und in Zeile 4, unter SYSTEME A/B-2, QUAD-HEIZUNGEN, sehen Sie, dass wir diese Schutzschalter gesch
아폴로 8호, 휴
Вам ведь наверняка будет весе
Il est 96 heures pile. 96 heures pile et bientôt 40 secondes
——我这里没有常亮的灯，乔，所以那一定
好的，氧气。你还剩44磅氧气。
はい、始めましょう。-2、/G&N: 63634、プラス0.96、マイナス0.23、マイナス0021.7、マイナス0001.7、マイナス0008.0、080、164、326、N/A、
I definitely can see a right roll at this time of about 5 degrees, and I noticed the periscope is dark, meaning we are coming into the dark side. I will attempt to look for the changes through th
私たちはあなたのメッセージを読んでいます。少しでも眠れる
- - 1. ご存
Okay. Ich weiß, du willst leise sein, deshalb lese ich dir kurz ein paar Informationen vor. Eine Sache, die wir gerade herausgefunden haben und die dir vielleicht etwas Siche
मैंने बूस्टर की ओर लगभग 5 फीट/सेकंड की गति से धक्का दिया। मेरा पृथक्करण बर्न लगभग 6 या 7 सेकंड का था। मैंने बूस्टर पर लगभग 5 या 6 फीट/सेकंड की गति से धक्का दिया और फिर उससे अलग होते हुए उसे देखा। मैंने लगभग 5 फीट/सेकंड की गति से फिर से धक्का दिया। ऐसा लगा जैसे हम करीब आने लगे थे - हम किनारे से करीब आने लगे थे और लगभग 600 से 700 फीट की दूरी पर थे, मेरा अ
Vous les avez
जैक, मैं बस इतन
트랭퀼리티 베이스, 계속 
很好。看看能不能把那一端稍微
Man, I've been all eyeballs and elbow
状態ベクトル、状態ベク
جيميني 4، هيوس
... und es ist mir sehr peinlich zuzugeben, dass sie eine Hasselblad v
Ich sehe jetzt die Triebwerkssignale. Plattformausrichtung auf dem
Molto
रॉजर। बज़, जोन अभी घर पर नहीं है, लेकिन जेनिस ने बताया है कि घास काफी ऊंची हो गई है, और मेरा अनुमान है कि जब तक तुम क्वारंटाइन से बाहर आओगे, तब तक यह तुम्हारे घुटनों तक पहुं
はい。既に3
罗杰。您现在看到的是我们的DELTA-R DELTA-V。看起来DELTA-R的体积相当大。我们想在将其
次に下に見えてくるクレーターはデューク島です。そして左側のクレーターは、現在写真の中央付近にあ
Хорошо. Позвольте мне... Прежде всего, давайте посмотрим, как у нас здесь де
Roger, Houston. Dies ist ein Plus 90, und zwar wie folgt: minus - das Gewicht wird plus 63531 minus 164 plus 129 0041 74265 minus 04402 minus 0001 plus 4
Well, we
Au beau milieu de la brume, Phecda est invisible; impossible de la mesurer avec le photomètre. Elle est maintenant sous l'horizon, ou plutôt sous le repère d'il y a environ 5 secondes, et vient d'émerger de la partie la plus brillante de la brume. Elle est maintenan
Okay. Another thing is to remember when we begin blackout, which is around 05g, and you can write this in your checklist wherever it's convenient; once we've lost COMM, we're going to go ahead and power down the POWER OFF and the PMP POWER OFF. And we just want to do that after you lose COMM, which comes up around. Any time after that, go ahead and secure the PMP and the p
Okay, Jack, und die seltsame Konfiguration, in der wir uns jetzt befinden, ist folgende: Wir haben die Luke installiert, Sonde und Fangtrichter befinden sich noch im Kommandomodul, und wir werden in dieser Situation bleiben, bis du uns sozusagen d
हाँ, मुझे लगता है कि बर्निंग हो जाने के बाद, इसे रिचार्ज स्टेशन के ऊपर रखने के बजाय इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल के ऊपर 
わかりま
Wir befinden uns jetzt in der Abfalltank-P
让我来跟他们说说电视的事…
好的。翻到第25页。在第25页，省
Ok, dovrebbe bastare. Siamo pas
حسنًا يا جاك، هيوستن. نريدك أن تذهب، اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ 06، اضغط على
Pas vraiment. Nous prévoyons de vérifier les chaudières à eau juste avant la correction de trajectoire. Le trempage à froid implique également l'utilisation des chaudières, mais il sera effectué juste avant la rentrée atmosphérique, lorsque ces éléments sont moins sensibles. Si nous ne le faisons pas dans les 12 heures, il n'est pas clair exactement où se déroule le trempage à froid ni quand activer la
Time is based on tracking da
أنت لا تُقهر يا كريس. لقد فصلتُه 
우리는 기기에 표시된 글리콜 압력, 양, PCO
حسناً. فكرة جيدة. ي
قد يكون من المثير للاهتمام أنه بعد أن خلدنا إلى النوم الليلة الماضية مباشرة، انطلق جرس الإنذار الرئيسي، وقد أرعبنا ذلك ب
네,
Wir denken dabei nicht nur an das Abwasser, sondern auch an e
Okay. Kabinendruck sinkt gegen Null. Anzugkreislauf 36 bis 43 prüfen. Bestätigt. FIPGA-Druck über 4,5. Okay. 4,7, sinkt. Lu
Columbia, Houston. Ihr müsst keine weitere Messung durchführen, es sei denn, ihr wollt. Pause. Und Columbia, wenn ihr die Gelegenheit dazu habt, fordert bitte die Messwerte von BATT C und PYRO an. E
わか
Ma
Okay, Jack. Im nächsten Schritt platzierst du die Steuermodulbehälter mit den angeschlossenen Schläuchen an einem geeigneten Ort, sodass die Unterseite der Behälter frei belüftet wir
Houston, wir haben gerade ein PROGRAM 21 durchgeführt und zeigen eine Pe
좋아요. 피치와 짐벌 각도는
빌이 남긴 음식물을 좀 치우고 나면, 이쪽은 하부 장비실이라고 불리는 곳인데, 바로 여기에 광학 위치 측정 장비가 있습니다. 우리는 여기서 별과 달 또는 지구의 지평선을 관측하여 항법을 합니다. 바로 여기서 우리가 우주에서 정확히 어디에 있는지, 어느 방향으로 가고 있는지, 그리고 얼마나 빠르게 이동하고 있는지를 알아냅니다. 프랭크가 언급했듯이, 우리 컴퓨터는 이러한 정보를 바탕으로 안전하게 지구로 귀환하기 위한 기
よし。ジム、僕がやり
حسنا
ヒューストンさん、高ビットレートについてですが、最後のパスを受け取ったら、それを再生して、低ビットレートから始めて、必要に応じて高ビットレートに切り替えると
Сейчас 17:21 по Гринвичу, и я точно не знаю, куда именно указываю, но видно множество лучей, все они тянутся от земли к небу. Похоже, это восход солнца. Лучи торчат вертикально, и я делаю два снимка с помощью Contarex. Очень п
好的。我们已经审阅了大部分内容，接下来我们需要提出一个方案，以便在进入重新进入区
네, 알겠습
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. 30-minute report: is major item, still not 
Ricevuto. Okay. Il Capo ora consiglia di tenere la tuta ferma dove si trovava, visto c
现在，你可以扔
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait pas fonctionner correctement. La méthode que j'ai finalement utilisée consistait à entrer dans [nom de la zone manquante], à nous rendre à Sirius, notre étoile la plus brillante, à récupérer l'axe et le tourillon, puis à faire voyager le vaisseau spatial jusqu'à Sirius pour l'utiliser pour l'optique, ce que nous avons fait ultérieurement. En ce qui concerne la diffusion de la lumière, il semble que, quelle que soit l'attitude pendant notre contrôle thermique passif, nous recevions de la lumière diffusée dans le télescope de balayage. Cela se présente principalement sous la forme d'une large bande de lumière traversant le centre du télescope, à environ 10 degrés de part et d'autre de zéro. Il est très difficile de voir les étoiles dans cette zone. Les réalignements ont été bons. J'ai pu repérer l'étoile dans le sextant pour effectuer l'alignement, mais je n'ai pas pu identifier l'étoile utilisée pour des observations telles que Regor ou Menkent avec le télescope de balayage. La première observation d'étoile que j'ai effectuée depuis la Terre a révélé un horizon très indistinct. Cependant, une ligne assez nette semblait se dessiner entre ce qui paraissait être l'horizon terrestre et l'atmosphère. Le filtre de visée à repères a semblé améliorer la définition de cet horizon. L'horizon entre l'espace et la haute atmosphère est très flou et indistinct, ce qui le rend difficile à utiliser. Comme je l'ai mentionné précédemment, il arrive que, lorsque le Soleil est proche, la zone autour de la Lune ne soit pas sombre, mais plutôt claire, apparaissant bleu clair. C'est également le cas lors de l'alignement avec une étoile dans le sextant, lorsque le Soleil est relativement proche de l'optique. Néanmoins, je n'ai aucune difficulté à trouver ces étoiles dans le sextant. Je n'ai eu aucune difficulté à repérer les étoiles utilisées, com
좋아요, 일단 이 주변을 좀 둘러보고 어떻게 보이는
Chiedici quanti galloni di carbu
Okay. Wir waren gestern Abend beim Prim
在高处的时候，也
Vorresti anche dirmi che stiamo ritardando il D-9, come previsto dal nostro piano di volo, perché riteniamo che dovremmo essere entrambi all'altezza. Richiede c
حسنًا. فهمت. إذا كان هذا سيساعد
دخلنا الغلاف الجوي بنفس الطريقة في أبولو 8 مع هيوستن، حيث قام باز بتشغيل سخانات وحدة القيادة وتركها 
क्या आपने पैनल 11 पर S और C इंजन कंट्रोल ब्रेकर बंद कर दिया? क्य
닐과 버즈, 저는 지금 백악관 집무실에서 전화 통화를 하고 있는
ठीक है, अब हम बी डेटा पर चलते हैं
D'accord. Ci-dessous, nous avons une étape: BAT 2, BASSE TENSION, OFF/RESET, puis ON. Ensuite, nous avons une étape: BAT 2, HAUTE TENSION, OFF/RESET, puis ON. Nous vous demandons d'attendre entre ces deux étapes afin que nous puis
今はフライ・バイ・ワイヤ状態で
はっきりと5を読み上げます。これらの追
Это верно, и, кроме того, на этой странице, в нашем последнем упражнении на сложение, есть раз
Houston, A
Хорошо. Да, я сделаю не
Houston, qui Apollo 8. Siamo al malfunzionam
Okay. Bene, s
알겠습니다. 이번 근접 비행은 어제 드린 근접 비행의 업데이트 버
क
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कि उत्तरी अफ्रीका-भूमध्यसागरीय क्षेत्र
友谊七号，这里是桑给巴尔首都通讯站。请评论一下你的触及准确
我们现在正
GPI revient à zéro,
جيميني 4، هذه هيوستن. اتصالك متقطع للغاية. إذا كنت تقرأ هذا، فسنقوم بتحديث نظام 6-4 الخاص بك فوق تكساس. اترك جهاز الكمبيوتر قيد التشغيل. بعد انتهاء خط الرؤية في تكس
Friendship Seven, qui Indian Com Tech. La vostra rispos
Okay. Hold on a minute, Jack. I meant to call Jack back d
D'accord, Jim. Co
Wurde
アポロ8
...ここの箱の裏側にあるはずで
Okay. Will do. I don't see any constraint here, Charlie. I was just checking to make sure, because last time, I went from 8 to 9 to 10 to 11 a little bit 
Muchea, hier spricht Sigma Seven. Ich verstehe Sie laut und deutlich. Wi
接下来，翻到第15页，左栏（或者更准确地说是左侧），靠近底部的位置，那里写着“配置摄像机和磁带”，一直到“更换暗盒”。在那里添加注释：“日冕是可选的。”完
Roger，03 00 3
حسنًا. يبدو الأمر بسيطًا بما فيه الكفاية. افهم إجراء النسخ الاحتياطي عند قيمة g ثابتة، ارفع المتجه لأعلى حتى أقصى قيمة g ثم اخ
Роджер. Эти параметры остаются неизменными: тангаж 224 градуса, рыс
Okay. I've got some details on the flight plan for you as follows. Of course, since there's no -3 you'll be deleting all the midcourse 3 stuff including the - the, which is 
Roger, te li prendo quando andiamo a prendere le B
यूरी अलेक्सेयेविच, हमें एक समस्या है: हैच बंद करने के बाद एक संप
Roger. Il y a quelque temps, nous avons constaté des signes d
わかりました、ジム。今、もう一つのキャニスターに切り替えるかどうかについては、数分後にまた連
45 40 GET Theta، 7.5؛ المدى، 1000.01؛ كان إجمالي Delta-V
Пока вы это делаете, мы не уверены, раскрылась ли ваша посадочная сумка. Мы считаем, что вход в атмосферу возможен 
了解。これでO2パージを終了で
罗杰。迈克，大概三点钟
Роджер, мне п
Yes, and that - it was all pretty - pretty short in span - just a second o
Eh bien, nous avons un... quelle est notr
Houston, C
음... 한... 아마 1초 
Gemini 4, hier spricht Ho
काफी अच्छा समय बीतेगा। वे आपके ठीक
알겠습니다. EEP 시점에서 배터리 A는 38.95암페어시, 배터리 B는 36.35암페어시, 배터리 C는 38.46암페어시입니다. 총 용량은 113.76암페어시입니다. EEP 시점에서 배터리 A는 완전히 충전되어 40암페어시가 되며, 이때 충전을 종료하셔도
एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल पल्स -- जी हाँ। सीधा और स्प
Go ahea
了解。おめでとうございます！素晴らしい
Roger. Quelle e
روجر. رؤيا ٣٣. ب
हाँ। मुझे लगता है कि इसका एक कारण यह भी है कि आप थोड़ी दूर हैं। हम बस आपको यह बताना चाहते थे कि आपको वह चेताव
당신은
ठीक है। हमारे पास आपको देने के लिए कुछ पैड हैं और हम तैयार हैं
Роджер, передай, пожалуйста, что мы видели огни Сиднея. Не знаю, включили они их или нет, но если включили, то счета за электричество сильно выросли. Я видел их на последнем витке. Мы пролетели прямо над городом Сидней, и они были очень яркими и о
- - N slash A in the, and 
11，休斯顿。我们仍然可以看到热带辐合带的带状结构。我猜现在最主要的带状结构位于赤
Okay. Wir schalten jetzt für etwa zwei Minuten auf die Upvoice-Backup-Verbindung um. Es kann ein paar Sekunden dauern, bis Sie hören, dass die Upvoice-Verbindung unterbrochen ist. Stellen Sie Ihren Up-Telemetrie-Schalter also auf Upvoice-Backup. Falls das alles nicht so gut funktioniert – ich lese
지난번 궤
Roger. La combustion s'est déro
13, ह्यूस्टन। लेवल सेंस आर्म टाइम नॉम
جيم، لقد راجعنا للتو علاماتك فيما يتعلق بالدقة، وتبين أنها قريبة
Все в
我想这就是从清单中删减
Se lo riterrete opportuno, vorremmo fornirvi la lettura de
आगे बढ
قبل أن نغادر، هل يمكنك أن تسأل منظمة الأغذ
Questa è la Sigma Seven, solo in registrazione VOX. Ho ristabilito la modalità automatica in modalità normale, senza l'azione dei propulsori ad alta potenza. A questo punto ho l'85% di auto e il 90% di manuale. E sento che, ora che sono in funzione, posso fare degli esperimenti dove prima non ero in grado 
了解しました。中部太平洋の状況は概ね良好です。雲底は2,000フィート（約600メートル）、視程は10マイル（約16キロメートル）、風速は0.70
Voilà du chocolat chaud; ça devrait être bon. J'y ajouterai environ 150 ml d'eau chaude. Il y a aussi de
Ok.
マイクさん、私の理解が正しいか確認させてください。0689をフラッシュして緯度経度情報が表示されると、先に進めず、終了するのですが、これで合
حسنًا، باستثناء تلك الحفرة الكبيرة التي مررنا بها، أعتقد أنه لم تكن هناك حفر أخرى في منطقتنا. تجولتُ عائدًا بعد نصب جهاز EASEP، وبينما كان باز يُفرغ العينات الموثقة، توجهتُ إلى فوهة بركانية خلفنا، قطرها حوالي 70 أو 80 قدمًا وعمقها حوالي 15 أو 20 قدمًا، والتقطتُ لها بعض الصور. كان قاعها يحتوي على صخور كبيرة الحجم، أكبر بكثير من أي صخور على السطح، ولكن لم يكن هناك شيء - على ما يبدو، لم نكن قد وصلنا إلى ما دون طب
ロジャー、
Roger. ΔV139. 15 55 47. 01 31 47. Rollio a sinistra 55°. GMTRB 16 05 31
We'l
是的，我们已经完成了。稍后我们会提供相关数据。我们在进入姿态时通过了六分仪星点检查，现在我们正在机动到第一
了解しました、ジム。ありがとうございます。でも、まだ理解できません。5から0まで普通にカウントダウンして、その後0までマイナス方向にカウントダウンを続け
Une erreur d'une seconde, c'est confirmé. Veuillez confirmer auprès du Cap que j'ai bien 04 + 32 + 38 comme 
分かりました。もし正しく理解しているなら、起動完了時に機動性に余裕が生まれ、燃焼
ठी
Ok, Vance. Siamo puntati a poca distanza dalla Luna. Jim sta tenendo la telecamera attraverso la finestra 3. Il Sole arriva a circa 40 gradi alla nostra sinistra, e quello che vi mostreremo tra un minuto sono circa 30 secondi di scarico di acque reflue e vi mostreremo esattamente
휴스턴 이글입니다. 고비트 전송률 관련 시스템을 점검했습니다. 모든 것이 완벽해 보입니다. 이제 시작할 준비가 되었습니다.
はい。正解です。最後の手順は降下用バッテリーの裏側を装着することです。まずはバッテリー1
زمن المرحلة النهائية المنقضي: 1 + 29 + 17؛ زمن بدء الاحتراق: 5 + 16 + 54؛ دلتا-في: 33.0؛ المدة: 41 ثانية؛ النواة 25: 00301؛ النواة 26: 90135؛ النواة 27: 00016؛ دلتا-في: 32.9، 1.5، 1.5؛ زمن الاحتراق: 40 للأمام، 04 للأسفل، 04 لليسار؛ الانحراف: صفر، الميل: 26.8؛ المد
13番、こちらヒューストンです。MDC1と2のディスプレイの調査
죄송하지만, 그럼 
好的。弗兰克，对
Roger. Wir gehen davon aus, dass wir bei 63 Umdrehungen 81,125 Fuß 
Apollo 13, Houston. Wir verstehen Sie nur schwach. Fah
Roger. Ottimo spettacolo sul radar. Mi dispiace molto che il nostro amico Julian non sia potuto essere con noi. Vorrei darti il ​​mio rapporto sulla modalità di controllo. Innanzitutto, manuale e fly-by-wire low sono eccellenti; l'aux damp funziona alla grande. Ora sono in modalità automatica; retroassetto. L'assetto si mantiene benissimo. Vado. La temperatura della mia tuta sta salendo u
Давайте посмотрим на мир спорта. Пока вы были заняты на днях, Джо Намат и комиссар футбола Пит Розелл объявили, что «Бродвейский Джо» согласился продать свою долю в ресторане Bachelors III и перейти в «Нью-Йорк Джетс». Джо прибыл сегодня в тренировочный лагерь «Джетс» и провел свою первую тренировку. Несколько других игроков «Джетс», которые вместе с Джо бойкотировали тренировки, также прибыли. А Дэви Хилл из Джексона, штат Мичиган, выиграл свой третий крупный турнир по гольфу за три старта на прошлой неделе. Он выиграл Philadelphia Classic. Хилл выиграл четыре турнира в этом году и является лидером по сумме выигрыша с внушительными 129 000 долларов. А в бейсболе западный дивизион Национальной лиги остается напряженной борьбой. Лос-Анджелес и Сан-Франциско отстают от лидера лиги, «Атланты», на одну игру. У «Астрос» 48 побед и 48 поражений, и сейчас они занимают пятое место, отставая на семь игр. Вчерашний матч между «Астрос» и «Цинциннати», в котором должны были сыграть два аута, был отложен из-за дождя. «Чикаго Кабс» по-прежнему занимают первое место в Восточном дивизионе. Они опережают «Нью-Йорк Метс» на четыре с половиной игры. А в Американской лиге «Балтимор» уверенно движется к титулу чемпиона Восточного дивизиона. Они опережают идущий на втором месте «Бостон» на 11 игр. Что касается предстоящего матча, то завтра запланирована игра всех звёзд бейсбола. Президент Никсон должен был посетить иг
ठीक है। अगले वाले, पैनल 1 पर अपरिवर्तित हैं, और पैनल 2 पर, प्रोपेलेंट टॉकबैक तक नीचे जाएं, और कोष्ठक में "आठ" को काट दें, 
हम फिलहाल इस पर रोक लगाना च
Gemini VI，你的 400K 时间很
У меня есть ещё кое-что для тебя. Ты скопируешь это и перескажешь мне всё в ответ. Хорошо. Как только ты поймёшь, как нужно, и захочешь использовать лампу, нам нужно включить CB 16 INVERTER 2, закрыть; CB 11, AC BUS A LAMP, закрыть. После этого
この軌道の漂流周期について、あなたのテクニックを試してみます。きっと面白いと思いま
La responsabilità di questo volo ricade innanzitutto sulla storia e sui giganti del
我的时间都
没错
了解。まだ約80フィート（約24メートル）ほど離れているようです。メインレッドはオフ、メイングリーンはオン、アームドはオ
알겠습니다. 88과 8.5입니다. 준비되시면 비행 계획에 대한 간단한 
Roger. Wir haben
Хорошо, Джек, нам придётся вернуться назад, если мы хотим следовать этой процедуре, которая предполагает переход в режим управления «Авто», нам придётся отключить выключатели TCA, чтобы предотв
Хорошо, я это про
Apollo 11, Houston. I'm not certain you copied my last transmission, as we were just in the process of switching OMNI's. We'd like to advance the time on that water dump until about 5 minutes from 
दक्षिण अमेरिका क
アポロ8号。フライバイ操作を開始します。/63087、マイナス162、プラス
처음 두 개는 명확했고, 두 번째는.
Gemini 4, at a g.e.t, of 47+00 minutes insert Experiment D-9, Run 1. At G.m.t. of 14 14 00 with OAMS. I say again, with OAM
The first one is - the first time somebody is down in the equipment bay, we would like to get another reading on your temperatures - those six temp m
D'accord. Radiographie CDR 11005, CMP 1000
了解、11. ページ F2-20 の
Negativ. Nur zur Info: Mein Zustand ist weiterhin g
우주선 시스템을 점검한 결과, 8번 추진기가 현재 열린 상태로 고장난 것으로 보이며, 이는 사고 당시에도 마찬가지였을 가능성이 있지만, 현재로서는 이를 확인할
खेल जगत की बात करें तो, चलिए देखते हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों में जब आप व्यस्त थे, तब जो नामाथ और फुटबॉल कमिश्नर पीट रोज़ेल ने घोषणा की कि "ब्रॉडवे जो" ने बैचलर्स III रेस्टोरेंट में अपनी हिस्सेदारी बेचने और न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स में शामिल होने पर सहमति जताई है। जो आज जेट्स के ट्रेनिंग कैंप में पहुंचे और उन्होंने अपना पहला अभ्यास सत्र किया। जो के साथ कई अन्य जेट्स खिलाड़ी भी शामिल हुए, जिन्होंने पहले विरोध किया था। और जैक्सन, मिशिगन के डेवी हिल ने पिछले सप्ताह अपने तीसरे मेजर गोल्फ टूर्नामेंट में जीत हासिल की। ​​उन्होंने फिलाडेल्फिया क्लासिक जीता। हिल इस साल अब तक चार टूर्नामेंट जीत चुके हैं और 129,000 डॉलर की शानदार जीत के साथ इस साल सबसे ज्यादा पुरस्कार जीतने वाले खिलाड़ी हैं। बेसबॉल की बात करें तो, नेशनल लीग के पश्चिमी डिवीजन में कड़ी टक्कर जारी है। लॉस एंजिल्स और सैन फ्रांसिस्को लीग में शीर्ष पर चल रही अटलांटा से एक गेम पीछे हैं। एस्ट्रोस का रिकॉर्ड 48 जीत और 48 हार का है और वे अब पांचवें स्थान पर हैं, सात गेम पीछे। कल रात एस्ट्रोस और सिनसिनाटी के बीच होने वाला मैच बारिश के कारण स्थगित कर दिया गया था। शिक
Roger. Boresight star is right
Decisamente sotto di me. L'avevo seguito sotto di me da Carnarvon in poi. Fino a Carnarvon l'avevamo tenuto sotto di noi, poi fino all'orizzonte, e poi di nuovo sotto di noi. Sembrava quasi che fosse in un'orbita diversa dalla mia. Aveva un apogeo e un perigeo diversi dai miei. Comunque, ho tentato di avvicinarmi all'alba non appena ho potuto capire dove si trovava. Come ho detto, in quel momento era a un miglio o due davanti a me, sotto di me. Quindi, più cercavo di avvicinarmi, meno guadagnavo terreno. Stavo
Хорошо. Давайте проверим, правильно ли я всё понял. Через 49 часов, перед тем как выйти за пределы нулевого положения на оптике, понаблюдайте за валом, а также выберите 16, 91 и посмотрите на углы вала и цапфы, чтобы заметить возможное дрожание. Посмотрите, происходит ли оно в нулевом поло
... A-8; and used fecal 
太陽が再び視界の真ん中にきました... これが日没時の太陽の位置なので、おおよそこれが適切なヨー
Oui, c'est fait. Suite à votre excellent exposé, je m'attendais à ce que la tendance reste à la hausse, nous avons donc commencé par une hausse. J'ai constaté que nous avons rapidement franchi le seuil et accusé un retard d'environ 6 ou 7 %. Je m'attendais donc toujours à une hausse, et je suis passé à une bai
अच्छा, मैं इसे इस तरह कर सकता हूँ, ओवेन। लगभग सभी खंभे बराबर से समतल हैं, और ज़मीन से पहले पायदान तक की ऊँचाई लगभग 3 फीट या शायद 3 और 1/2 फीट ह
Non, ça me va. Je me remets simplement sur la bonne voie. Je vous ai donc de nouveau préd
D'accord. Mes commentaires, provenant de Goldstone, indiquaient qu'ils ne constataient aucune tache blanche, contrairement à ce que nous avions observé sur le modèle 10. Le contrôle automa
Okay. Thank you. And if you can think of it
Würdest du deine 
Yes. Stand by while I give you that time aga
أبلغ فاليري والأطفال تحياتي بمناسبة عيد الميلاد المجيد يا 
Jetzt haben wir, meiner Meinung nach, nahezu perfekte Bedingungen zur Sternenbeobachtung, da der Einfluss des Mondes so gering ist. Wie bereits erwähnt, können wir mit unserer Kalibrierung, der Corona Australis, bis zur siebt
D'accord. Com
Да, я с тобой согласен,
알겠습니다. 왼쪽 회로 차
시그마 세븐입니다. 여기는 카노 콤 테크입니다. UHF/HF 대역에서 송신 중입니다.
Roger. 3-1 171. 3+
أنا أستخدم الطرف الصغير للأمام مع توجيه الطرف الصغير للأعلى 
请稍等。杰克在电话那头，他说他无法让电脑进入待机状
Верно, потому что показания немного занижены. Сейчас на скафандре у меня 6, и я собираюсь увеличить до 6,5. Прогресса нет. Примерно 5 минут назад я установил значение около 6,25, а сейчас устанавливаю регулят
除非这和我们想要
ロジャー、ニール。ありがとうございます。また、北半球の上空、境界線のすぐ左側に、北西から南東方向に伸びる雲帯、つまり雲の切れ目があるようです。これ
は
Friendship Seven, Canton Com Tech. Ti leggo forte e chia
Du mus
我们的两套西装都没有血压袖
Здесь, на месте, всё выглядит очень хорошо. Мы 
Хорош
Вы действительно пытались вставить этот кабель обра
Okay. Der Vorschlag, der vielversprechend klingt, ist folgender: Wenn Jim seine Auswertung durch das Teleskop durchführt, machen Sie alles genau gleich, nur dass Sie sich um 180 Grad drehen, sodass Ihr Kopf oben ist. Jim führt dann die Nachführung durch das Teleskop durch, und Sie befinden sich immer noch in der Gierposition, wenn Sie Ihren Fernseher aufheben usw. Das sollte alles abdecken. Wir können das so machen oder es einfach so lassen und die Auswertung der Nachführung gegebenenfalls auslassen. Eine weitere Alternative wäre, 
로저. 마이크, 얼마 전에 데드밴드를 
Okay. That takes care of getting the primary water boiler enabled, and i
9, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157 , plus 34188, minus 01353, plus 00780 180 008 001, NA, plus 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, down 131, left 28, plus 0758, minus 16500 12987, plus - or 36277; and that's Sirius
Отключение электроэнергии закончится 
Vediamo. Altrove, nelle notizie nazionali, gli sposi novelli, David e Julie Eisenhower, lasciarono il loro rifugio segreto per la luna di miele per cenare a Natale con il presidente eletto Nixon e la famiglia. A New York, il porto più trafficato del mondo era quasi completamente inattivo il giorno di Natale, a causa di uno sciopero degli scaricatori portuali durato 5 giorni e di una rara interruzione del programma di navigazione. Nessuna nave arrivò o partì dal porto. I traghetti, in
En fait, ce qu'on pensait vraiment faire, c'était v
太陽は構造物に反射します。望遠鏡が取り付けられていると、ほとんど役に立ちません。MPADが提供してくれた星図は、もし何らかの理由で望遠鏡を通して目印をつけなければならない場合に最も役立つと思います。星
알겠습니다. 다음으로, 4시간 30분을 빼고 CM/SEP에 맞게 구성합니
はい、そうで
روجر. 
حسنًا. لدينا الآن بعض التعليمات الإضافية في حال لم تنجح هذه الطريقة. يقولون، يا فرانك، يجب ترك وحدة التحكم التلقائي في مستوى الإضاءة (ALC) لمدة 20 ثانية كاملة دون أي تدخل. إذا لم تنجح هذه الإجراءات التي شرحتها لك، فسنقدم لك المزيد، وهي تتعلق 
Apollo 8, Houston. A, leggiamo 84 gradi, e a 80. Daremo un'occhiata
자, 이
रॉजर. एसेंट पैड: 104
الآن نشير إلى التراجع. نحن قريبون جدًا من ذلك. لذا، فإن الماس
Ça a l'air de tenir. Je de
Die Manschett
This is Friendship Seven. I'm on straight manual control at present time. This was,
Nun, vor einer Minute sagte er das, 
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। जब आप 0 रोल पर रुकेंगे, तो आप लगभग 90 पिच, 0 यॉ और 0 रोल की स्थिति में होंगे। हम चाहते हैं कि आप इस स्थिति से पहला विकल्प, यानी विकल्प 3, चलाएँ। फिर हम आपको एक नया लिंक भेजेंगे, या तो 000 पर पैंतरेबाज़ी करने से पहले या उसके दौरान, और फिर आप प्लेटफ़ॉर्म को घुम
جيميني 6. ما زلنا على بعد حوالي 154 ميلاً. وقت الوصول المتوقع هو 3-4 ساعات و0 دقائق و0 ثوانٍ؛ المدى 154.52؛ تم تركيب خرطوشة مسجل 
Пока вы это делаете, мы не уверены, раскрылась ли ваша посадочная сумка. Мы считаем, что вход в ат
On va le faire cli
좋아요, 알겠습니다. 다음으로 바뀌는 부분은 세 번째 줄에 있는 "MAN 
好了，我要
روجر، أفهم أنك
Ich habe Jupiter rechts, in der rechten Eck
Nur mal kurz hallo. An der Schauglaslehre steht ungefähr – oh, es sieht so aus, als ob die weiße Markierung im Kolben etwa 6 bis 9 
Di 
罗杰。我们检查了第 6 颗星和第 15 颗星，误差为 +00001
D'accord. Très bien; m
Хорошо. Далее, фотографии командного модуля. Сервисный модуль может быть немного сложно разглядеть из командного модуля, но если вы его видите, то, как считают здесь, через окно 5. Для этого рекомендуется использовать 70-миллиметровый объектив. Эти фотографии имеют приоритет 2. Итак, это 70-миллиметровый объектив EL, к которому прикреплен 80-миллиметровый объектив, и все это в B-3. Снимите 80-миллиметровый объектив и установите 250-миллиметровый. 250-миллиметровый объекти
Super. Écoute Ed, on veut modifier le plan de vol et on aimerait changer l
And Apollo 13, another item: something that we have observed and you might be seeing is a slight TCE fluctuation on fuel cell 3. This fluctuation has been going from about 152 to 160 over a 37-second period. It has been seen on other flights in the past. No one is worried about it, but the usual 
Die Temperatur in der Kuppel beträgt 70 Grad. Die Kabinenkuppel hat 50 Grad. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs ist mit 62 Grad angenehm warm. Der Anzugdruck liegt konstant bei 5 psi. Auf dem Farbhintergrund ist eine sehr interessante Wolkenformation zu sehen (Bild 6b). Ein
Four minutes. Aurora Seven is Go. Fuel and oxygen steady; cabin holding, 25 amps; power
Loud and 
Sì. Abbiamo deciso di usare un contenitore e, come sapete, l'indumento raffreddato a liquido è circondato da una sacca che pensiamo di poter usare anche noi, o che sappiamo di poter usare. Ci abbiamo provato. Quindi quello che abbiamo è una sacca dentro un'altra sacca e al suo interno c'è l'indumento raffreddato a liquido. La sacca più vicina all'indumento raffreddato a liquido è quella che ci serve, e ne ab
روجر. لاحظ أنك بدأتَ نشاطك الأخير المُجدول. يبدو من التتبع الأولي أن سرعة المسار المتوسطة الأولية قد تكون أقل من 4 أقدام في الثانية وفقًا للتقدير الأولي. وقد راجعنا بيانات الاحتراق، وكل شيء يسير بسلاسة كما ذكرتَ؛ كل شيء يبدو طبيعيًا تمامًا. الأنظمة الآن في حالة جيدة؛ يبدو أنه في وضعية الطيران، يُمكننا تبديل هوائيات OMNI لك، إذا رغبتَ ف
좋아요, 마크. 산소 고용량 점검은 4분 동안 진행했습니다
おい、ジャック。このチェ
खैर, हम बिना स्विच किए ऐसा नहीं कर 
J
रॉजर। 027 44 5363, माइनस 165 073 1
Eagle, Houston. La réception est bonne sur la bande 210. Nous allons sélectionner une antenne parabolique de 26 mètres pour vérifier la puis
좋아요, 레지스터 1에 27218을 더하고, 레지스터 2에 35570을 더하고, 레지스터 3에 33010을 더하고, 좁은 데드밴드를 다시 얻으려면, NOUN 01, ENTER, 3011, ENTER, 200 ENTER를 입력해야 합
Nein. Ich würde nicht sagen, dass es sich unbedingt um freigelegtes Material handelte. Ich denke, ein Teil des Materials könnte gebrannt oder auf irgendeine Weise verfestigt worden sein und sich vielleicht irgendwie verbunden haben, ich weiß es nicht. Nun, in anderen Bereichen, bevor wir anfingen, draußen herumzutrampeln, konnten wir sehen, dass eine leichte Erosion radial nach außen stattgefunden hatte, die aber außer der Abtragung keine nennenswerten Spuren auf der Oberflä
روجر، 1
Loud and clear. I woke up about 30 or 40 minutes ago and then - actually I didn't wake up right then - just sort of sitting there resting. I really haven't been havin
네. 짐벌 중앙 각도가 약간 높아지는 것을 확인했습니다. 데드밴딩은 현재 자세에서 정상적으로 작동하는 것 같지만, 계속 주시하고 있으며 각도가 너무 높아지면 조기에 촬영을 종료
Du brauchst dir darüber jetzt keine Sorgen
Where it says - where it says "And note," the CMP is located in the L shaped bag with the other two PG
Roger. I miei due compagni cercheranno di dormire un po' qui, quindi tenete d'occhio i sistemi. Io mi sposto dall'altra part
好的。
That's 
로저. 당신에게 다가가고 있습니다. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; -061, +067 135 23 
Roger. Bereich 11-DELTA ΔT Null. GMTRC 01 Tage 07 48 58. RET 400 K, 15+26. Bereich 12-DELTA: ΔV 96. ΔT 2+05. GMTRC 01 Tage, 08 Stunden, 46 Min
جاك، هيوستن. 
نعم. حسناً، فعلت
No instructions f
Ich möchte hier kurz etwas zur Philosophie ansprechen. Fred erzählte mir
और वह पुराना सवाल जो हमसे हमेशा पूछा जाता है कि हम तरल अपशिष्ट से कैसे छुटकारा पाते हैं और वह लाइन जो आप देख रहे हैं, मुझे लगता है कि अब आप इसे देख सकते हैं, यह ठीक बाहर जाती है जहां हम ओवरबोर्ड ड्रेन ड
F
로저. 여
Хорошо, на шаге номер - или на странице 2, мы должны выполнить шаг 5 и изменить вторую строку шага 6 так, что
Ricevuto. Abbiamo sentito il colpo quando ab
R
Das ist bestätigt. Nächster Schritt auf Panel 5: Wir schalten den Schalter MAIN BUS TIE 
听起来不错
음, 그게 제 질문이에요. 저희 16 20은 여기 있는 8번 공과 맞지 않아요. 저희는 전원을 켰는데, 공에 전력이 완전히 공급되지 않았어요. 
Non è un problema di tempo, Fred, ma se hai già sveglio la gente, potresti farlo. A proposito, p
Roger, Charlie. Nous avons échangé notre OMNI D - Delta, et j'ai perdu la dernière transmission. Pourriez-vous répéter, s'il vous plaît? Ce qui m'intrigue, c'est que vous avez dit précédemment que cela correspondrait à -X propulseurs, alors que le PAD indique +X. Voulez-vous que je ramène c
Say again, please, Woomera, did not under
Roger. Nous recopions la bobine 21 - 61, tangage 090, lacet 000, tangage à gain élevé +28, lacet 271. Et nous allons utiliser ceci avec le DELTA-V que nous
حسنًا. دعنا نرى إن كان لديّ بعض
Jim, abbiamo ricevuto un paio di notizie. Il Presidente Nixon ha scelto un giudice del Minnesota per la carica di Giudice Associato alla Corte Suprema. Un disegno di legge che prevedeva un aumento del 6% dello stipendio per i dipendenti federali è stato approvato dalla Camer
좋아, 잭. 이 페이지에 추가할 내용은 이게 마지막이야. 원래 체크리스트로 돌아가서 자동 선택 스위치를 확인해. 16개 모두
हाँ। ऐसा लगता है कि 470 पर हमें -0.2 का पूर्वाग्रह था। हम जल रहे है
온수기에 연결된 수소 필터 중 하나에서 음식물 봉투를 꺼내도 수소가 계
了解です。まず主要なイベントの時刻を簡単に確認し、その後、戻って詳細を補足します。さて、進入インターフェースは142時間40分、つまり6時間半前です。そのおよそ6時間半前に、ヒーター電源を投入し、CM/の温度をチェックして、必要に応じてCM/を予熱することで、このプロセス全体を開始します。おそらくそうすることになるでしょう。詳細な手順は後ほど説明します。約6時間前頃に、前回の中間コースで使用した修正版/30分チェックリストを使用して、電源投入を開始します。その後、少し前、5時間前頃に、前回と同様に地球ターミネーターを使用して、体軸アラインメントの姿勢をとってください。それができ次第、-7を実行します。これは、今のところ約2フィート/秒、つまり約15秒間の噴射のようです。そして、今は1.5フィートまで下がっているとのことなので、余裕でマージン内です。わかりました。それを実行すると、すぐにサービスモジュールの分離姿勢への操作を開始します。通常よりも早く分離するため、平面状態になります。平面外のコンポーネントは不要であり、望んでいません。つまり、サービスモジュールが半径ベクトル
روجر. ف
E io sto guardando lì, Jack, e il Sole è propr
Attend
双子座4号，格林尼治标准时间47+00分钟，插入实验D-9
알겠습니다. 그냥 궁금해서요. 화상에 대해 얘기할 때는 차이점을 알
يا إله
Roger. The torquing angle's 00026
Wie haben die es bloß geschafft, einen alten Instandhaltungsoffizier in die Nachtschicht zu bekomm
Roge
حسنًا. لقد وصلتَ تقريبًا إلى أقصى حدٍّ ممكن مع أعل
Roger. I'm in a good attitude here to do - I have in the sextant this last star, star 37. Is that all right for the optics calibration t
حسنًا. الخطوة 7. لوحة قاطع الدائرة 11، ناقل التيار المتردد B، 
배경 설
네, 짐. 어젯밤 대규모 연소 작업 후에 드린 바로 그 설정입니다. 저희가 수정한 대로 그 설정을 사용하겠습니다. 시뮬레이터에서 시험해 봤는데, 물론 슬로싱 같은 건 없었지만, 피치와 롤 방향으로는 레이트를 0으로 맞추고 요 방향으로는 ACS가 처리하도록 하니 꽤 잘 작동하는 것 같았습니다. 레이트를 0으로 맞추는 방법은 오차 바늘을 관찰하는 겁니다. 바늘이 움직이지 않을 때, 즉 멈추는 시점이 바로 저희가 원하는 범위
Tranquility, Houston.
Jim, se non hai bisog
... сегодня тебя
スタンバイテレメトリトランスミッターはオンになっていて、テープダン
Und in Houston wollen wir sicherstellen, dass wir uns genügend Zeit nehmen, um die richtige Einstellung für den Brennvorgang zu erreichen, damit wir die richtige Einstellung herstellen können und den Brennvorg
Oui. Les verrous en rouleau sont un peu grands, surtout à cet endroi
रॉजर। जैसा कि मैंने बताया, इसका मुख्य उद्देश्य आपके ऑक्सीजन प्रवाह ट्रांसड्यूसर की जाँच करना है। हालाँकि, हमें अभी भी लगभग 2 घंटे के लिए केबिन में ऑक्सीजन की आपूर्ति बनाए रखनी है, इसलिए हम इस उद्देश्य के लिए जो वेंट लगाने जा रहे हैं उसे चालू रखना चाहेंगे। ठीक है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप केबिन वेंट क्विक डिस्कनेक्ट को स्थापित करें, जो आपको कंपार्टमेंट R-6, यानी रोमियो 6 में मिलेगा, पैनल 251 पर मूत्र कनेक्टर 
ठीक है, जैक। क्या आपके पास व
Ora, vediamo, questa ustione... è sulla schiena, suppongo. Sper
ठीक है। थोड़ी देर में मैं आपको उपभोग्य सामग्रियों के 
لقد وضعتها أيضاً على مسجل الصوت هنا، حتى نتمكن من العودة وا
Okay. Ich habe lediglich gesagt, dass Jim sein BIOMED-System momentan nicht eingerichtet hat, also
Okay. While we are verifying that scroll position - they are talking it over in the back room about that n
هل فقدت أثري يا
I am switching - My cabin is working okay. The suit is okay. I'm going to go down for the yaw check. Correction, for the flare check now. I'm pitching
रॉजर। मात्रा 55 प्रतिशत दिखा रही है, लेकिन 
Чарли, по этому поводу мы просто ждём 20 минут, пока вся активность двигателей не стихнет. Можешь сообщить нам, как продвигается этот
حسناً. تم الاستلام. إن أمكن، قِس درجة حرارة جداري المقصورة الأيمن والأيسر باستخدام منظم ال
Okay, Sauerstoff. Sie haben noch 44 Pfund Sauerstoff. Bei einem Verbrauch von 0,36 Pfund pro Stunde 
روجر. كنا نراقب بعض السحب في منطقتك من خلال المنظار الأحادي على طول ساحل خليج تكساس بعد ظهر اليوم، ولاحظنا أيضًا وجود 
我看到远处有一颗明亮的星星，一定是金星。我忘了把约翰·梅尔的《窗外风景》这首歌
Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Лучшее, что мы можем посоветовать относительно топографических особенностей, это посмотреть к западу от кратера неправильно
هيا يا باز، لا تسمّهم بالأمهات الكبيرات؛ أعطهم ا
Okay. Ich denke, es wäre besser, wenn Sie
That's correct. Okay, now the ground is going to give you a update, at minus 2 plus 15. That's a - that's a time that you need to be configured to accept up telemetry. And what they're going to give you on a update will by a clock increment, a state vector; they'll give you a; they'll give you two s, there'll be an actual and a preferred; and the entry target load. Now, if you'd like. to copy those, I can take
Roger. Wir haben die Hochleistungsantenne erfolgreich wiederhergest
ضغط المقصورة ومقياس الارتفاع فيها متطابقان. من المفترض أن يكون الارتفاع الآن 13000 قدم. العلامة 10؛ أرى أن المظلة الرئيسية ممدودة ومُخفّضة، ويبدو الوضع جيدًا. المظلة الرئيسية ممدودة. كيس الهبوط يعمل تلقائ
Roger. We're going to rework the attitude in the sextant star for you in or
コロンビア、次回の通過では、そのような作業を行うのではなく、私たちが提供した座標付近を調べてほしい。これは地図の物理法則と軌道に基づいた最善の分析であり、さらに、その付近で探査してほしい座標がもう1つある。この最後の座標は、降下中に乗組員が
嗯，我们
مرحباً، أبو
Roger. Das Ablassv
Et, je suppose que pour cette dernière manœuvre à
هذا
It is now 17:21 G.m.t. and I don't know exactly which way I'm pointing, but there's a bunch of rays, all extending up from the earth
Unser Berater meinte, man könne die ACDUs, also die eigentlichen CDU
ジェミニ VI、ハワイ CAP COM.
Der andere Pilot, Max Conrad, der mit seinem Leichtflugzeug die Welt umrundet – er verbrac
吉
Okay. Thank you. And on board, 
Roger. Et bonjour Jerry, o
I saved
At last we have solved the suit circuit temperature problem. I can see why Scott was concerned about this record position only. There is no side tone as well. The suit temperature at this time is - MA
Фантаст
Roger. I'm in a good attitude here to do - I have in the sextant this last star, star 37. Is that all right for the optics calibration to save some gas, or do you want to go over to 
收到。上升起飞时间：124 22 0000。您的TIG，再说一遍TIG：125 19 3470。您的TPI TIG：126 
저 동그란 잡 좀
حسناً يا جاك. انتقل إلى 
The walls actually look pockmarked. Sur
是
Bene. Vogliamo che tu vada quando puoi e verifichi le seguenti valvole e le lasci come descritto qui. Valvola REPRESS PACKAGE, chiusa; PRESSIONE CABINA DI EMERGENZA, chiusa; O2 DIRETTO, chiuso; REGOLATORE A RICHIESTA, chiuso; entrambi gli ACCUMULATORI D'ACQUA, chiusi; REGOLATORE PRINCIPALE A e B, aperti; ACQUA E GLICOLE - correzione - ACQUA e poi INGRESSO e USCITA SERBATOIO GLICOLE, entrambi. Ora, se vuoi prendere un po' d'acqua, ti consigliamo di aprire moment
ヒューストン。アポロ11号。窓から差し込む地球の光は、本を読めるほ
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。このテレビ番組のリクエストについては、もう一度試してみます。10分間の番組をお願いします。また、もしよろしければ、外観
没
Roger, ici Friendship Seven. Je vous donne mon temps: 04 + 31 + 35 secondes après le décollage de ma capsule. 2, 3, 4, MARQUE. Pouvez-vous transmettre immédiatement cette information au
ऐसा प्रतीत होता है क
केबिन पूरी तरह से तैयार है, मुझे अब डोम को और नीचे नहीं करना है। यह बहुत अच्छा रहा है। समय की जाँच 18 मिनट। घड़ी ठीक है। थ्रस्टर
Le rouge sort de cette distance, et le vert de plus loin. L'ensemble mesure à peu près cette longueur. Il doit être dans l
Roger. Your impact point is within 1 
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。你们会
Il est indiqué d'effectuer les tâches de rangement, de ranger les casques et les sacs de rangement; de sortir le miroir, la liste de contrôle et le kit de mise au rebut. Ranger le kit de rangement provisoire, le sortir et le configurer pour une utilisation en 16 millimètres, HC-EX, f/4, 500, infini, 6 images par seconde. C'est tout ce qui est indiqué sur cette page. Nous en sommes là pour le moment. La prochaine étape aura lieu dans une heure, lorsque nous passerons à l'alimentation LM et act
Roger. Still reading you. Broken a little bit. At 30, m
روجر. هل يمكنك التأكد من أن مفتاح حقيبة الهبوط في وضع الإيقا
영
Finché mi stai leggendo bene, Frank, ti ​​aggiornerò su un paio di cose. Quello che ti invieremo è un aggiornamento del vettore di stato che va allo slot, e vorre
另一则本地新闻：亨茨维尔县法院大楼昨天黎明前被烧毁，看来他们又要在那里开工建设了。接下来是一些关于等待返程的家庭的报道。这篇报道由《邮报》记者安·詹姆斯撰写。“我们就像在月球背面休息一样，”瓦莱丽·安德斯在圣诞夜说道，当时她和家人正在等待阿波罗8号脱离月球轨道，返回地球。安德斯太太周二凌晨0点就到了，邻居们刚刚把孩子们都接走，这样在飞船飞到月球背面、与外界失去联系期间，他们一家人就可以休息一下。弗兰克·博尔曼上校的家在户外装饰着四个巨大的常青花环，上面撒满了粉状的雪花，还系着红色的蝴蝶结。书房里的一棵圣诞树正等待着他平安归来，他漂亮的金色头发的妻子苏和两个健壮的儿子弗雷德里克和埃德温计划留在家里，等待午夜时分飞船脱离月球轨道。通常情况下，他们会去圣克里斯托弗圣公会教堂参加午夜弥撒。计划是凌晨0点开始。由于博尔曼家没有小孩，所以圣诞礼物交换只能等到博尔曼上校带着他那份神奇的节日礼物——登月往返之旅——回来之后再进行。洛弗尔上尉忙碌的妻子玛丽莲·洛弗尔说，就孩子们而言，她的四个孩子将过一个完全正常的圣诞节；但谈论礼物的事就没戏了，因为其中两个孩子就坐在她旁
알겠습니다. 집 측면의 16번 패널에 CB 배터리 전원 공급 연결선 두 개가 열려 있고, 배터리 1은 고전압 차단/리셋 후 꺼짐, 배터리 2는 저전압 차단/리셋 후 켜짐, 배터리 2는 고전압 차단/리셋 후 켜짐, 배터리 1은 고전압 차단 후 켜짐으로 설정되어 있습니다. 16번 패널의 CB 배터리 전원 공급 연결선 두 개는 닫혀 
The Sun bounces off the structure. With the attached, that telescope is just about useless. Those star charts that MPAD provided us, I think, would be most useful if we had to use the - if for some reason we had to mark through the telescope. We could use those as a guide for what we're looking at and say, "Well, that bright blob over there has got to be that sta
Et, Mike, si tu veux notre object
11号，休斯顿。一切看起来都很好。最低温度是40度
我们随时准备复制你们拥
Okay. Einstellung 11 – und wir können wieder hinunter zum Saltonsee blicken – in die U
Это «Си
Roger, Fred-o. Il nous reste une dernière procédure, et nous pourrons tout arrêter. Il s'agit de récupérer les aiguilles et le matériel nécessaires à cette manœuvre. Le 5018 pourrait vous amener au verrouillage de cardan, et nous pensons qu'il est judicieux d'alimenter la boule de commande. Nous avons un système à quatre étapes, si vous êtes prêt à pre
Gem
Tutto quello 
好的。没错，这位是吉姆·洛弗尔。我们今天想带大家简单了解一下阿波罗8号内部的生活。我们已经向大家展示了月球和地球的景象，现在我们想邀请大家走进我们的“家”。正如你们在仪表盘上看到的，这里至少已经是我们生活了4天。我们在仪表盘上标记了每一天。现在已经过去4天了，我们正在进行第5天的工作。当然，我们都非常期待周五的着陆。在飞船的下部设备舱里，总统的体能顾问吉姆·洛弗尔上尉正准备进行我们每天都要进行的锻炼。你们注意到他活动自如。他刚才不小心撞到了导航光学系统。他正在使用一种锻炼设备来保持肌肉状态。现在，我们飞船的另一个非常重要的功能是计算机。我想你们可能对这里的显示屏感兴趣，它能显示我们所有关于燃烧、导航以及地球轨道任务中重返大气层和反推阶段速度的信息。你们可以看到，它是由一个类似打字机键盘的装置控制的，输入输出的数据简直令人惊叹。它为我们出色地完成了任务，吉姆·洛弗尔（Jim Lovell）的操作也非常出色。现在，无论是在太空还是在地面，吃饭都是非常重要的事情。我请比尔·安德斯（Bill Anders）向你们展示我们在飞行中是如何进食的。请原谅我们在这里移动和更换摄像机时画面可能会有些模糊。我们使用的食物都是脱水的，预先包装在真空密封袋中。你们可以看到，比尔只需要松手就能让它保持静止。除了飞
ठीक है। केबिन तो बस ऐसे ही पड़ा है, मोटा-सा, बेवकूफ और खुश, मुझे इसमें कुछ भी नहीं करना पड़ा। अब, क्या तुम मेरे 250 इन्व
로저. 한 시간 전쯤에 여기 엄청 큰 천둥번개가 쳤어요. 이 지역 주변에도 폭풍우가 몇 차례 있었어요
Mir geht es gut, Flug fortsetzen. Maschine läuft stabil. Ich sehe die Erde im Fenster, den Himmel, den Horizont. Der Flug verläuft einwandfrei. Verstehst du mich
Okay. wie folgt: /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35189, minus 01513, minus 00346 180 007 000, nicht anwendbar, plus 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, Scorpii Delta (Dzuba), unten 071, links 45, pl
De
さあ、ヒュ
Okay. Complete on the S-5 
Roger. Burn on time, angles nominal, burn time about 12 seconds, 0.2 feet per second after the C, 0 in VGX. We have transferred t
Ну, тогда, пожалуй, мы это сделаем. Кто-нибудь, 
공군 달리기 행사입
はい、でも嫌なんですが…
E sei a posto. Huntsville segnala che hai una pastiglia propellente da 6 secondi, ovvero 3 secondi in più rispetto a un bossolo da 3 sigma; quindi sei a posto con i materiali di consumo. È così buono che non lo aggiorneremo. L'unica modifica che abbiamo per te è nella checklist. 
Mir geht es gut. Jim ist wieder eingeschlafen. Bill un
هذا صحيح، هل يمكنك وضع مفتاح ECS O2 ع
사실, 저는 이
मुझ
好的，吉姆。你的运气不错。跟踪数据显示，你的入射角已经上升到-6.24度。这是基于我们从中
Канари. Имейте в виду, что за 15 секунд работы в
Ok, siamo operativi - 59:59
هيوستن، أبولو 1
Ne hai tantis
はい、ジャック。これで本体を収納できます。つまり、内袋から取り出して外袋に入
Уолли, да, прямо здесь, в конце шестого. У тебя есть какие-нибудь комментарии относительно
The items that we still need will be a reading as late as you can do 
わかりました。フレッドさん、参考までに、機内でのCO2濃度の測定値は地上で測定している値より少し高いので、メーターが15
Das klingt gut, und Sie sind sicher, dass wir dafür genü
Okay. Peso 33627, peso 36651, trim di beccheggio 00470, trim di roll
Roger. Pilot. We have a good temperature for you. We're ready for your blood press
Okay. Ken, abbiamo inserito qualche commento sull'ultima parte del nastro dopo averti sentito, e ora lo stiamo riavvolgendo, così potrai averlo non appena saremo tornat
Wir haben Ihnen das zurückgegeben. Könnten Sie vielleicht die Flug
Хорошо. Процесс перехода к такому отно
هيوستن، إي
Eh bien, Hal se trompe peut-
Это максимально близко к нулю, насколько я могу приблизиться. В 02:17:49 мои показатели равны нулю, а положение тела — нулю плюс, или нулю, минус 3, минус 48. Дайте им немного отдохнуть, и я посмотрю, что мы сможем сделать с температурой ска
Hier spricht Houston. Wir haben gehört. Und zu Ihrer Information: Das neue Gewicht nach dem Abwerf
Okay, das gilt für
Ok, Fred, non riesco più a sentirti a causa del rumore di fondo. Immagino che... credo di aver sentito Jack dirti cosa faremo riguardo alle COMUNICAZIONI. UPLINK SQUELCH, spento. Tu ti occuperai delle antenne perché non possiamo vedere il tuo assetto. Ti faremo un controllo vocale quando s
...... and... alineme
और, आपकी किस्मत को देखते हुए,
Und, Houston, ich würde behaupten, dass wir entlang der Ekliptik von diesem Standort aus das Koronalicht bis zu zwei Monddurchmessern weit sehen können. Das helle Licht erstreckt sich jedoch nur
Okay. Bitte warten Sie bei VI. Ich gehe jetzt zu VII 
分かりました。パネル250の回路ブレーカーBAT A（POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING）は閉、パネル275の回路ブレーカーINVERTER POWER 2（MAIN B）は閉です。次の回路ブレーカ
Was? – Nun, ich denke, wenn wir die Flugarbeiten abgeschlossen 
هيوستن، هل لاحظتم زيادة 
好的。下面情况还
Pour information, nous avons de nouveau surveillé le taux de PCO2. Avez-vous 
はい、わかりました。早めに点検していただければ、
Qui Sigma Seven, vi sento forte e chia
Я только что сделал снимок. Кадр № 14 на пленке Contarex, той 
Con ques
Okay, Jim. Wir wollen dir da entgegenkommen; es ist ein Thema, das wir mit dir besprechen wollten. Wir haben darüber nachgedacht, und unsere Meinung dazu ist – natürlich liegt die Entscheidung bei dir, aber wenn wir die Vor- und Nachteile abwägen, hast du ja bereits den Vorteil genannt. Wir führen kurz vor EI minus einer Stunde eine Luken-Integritätsprüfung durch, und wenn diese beschädigt ist, hättest du große Schwierigkeiten, in die Anzüge zu schlüpfen. Andererseits könnten die Anzüge dich erheblich verlangsamen, ganz abgesehen von der Zeit zum Anziehen. Außerdem besteht die Sorge, dass dir nach einer gewissen Zeit in den Anzügen zu warm werden könnte und wir dann die Anzug-Loop-Anlage zur Belüftung der Anzüge aktivieren müssten, was wir vermeiden wollen, da es viel Energie kostet. Daher hätten wir dir empfohlen, den Anzug nicht zu tragen, da wir keinen Grund zur Annahme haben, dass die Integritätsprüfung etwas anderes als eine leicht erhöhte Leckrate aufzeigen
我戴上了手套
Gem
हमने अभी-अभी प्लेटफॉर्म को चालू किया है, इसे पूरी तरह से चालू होने में लगभग 30 मि
D'accord. Le 16 mm ouvre à f/11 s'il est face à vous, et à f/28 dans le cas contraire. Le 35 mm, avec une pellicule de 200 ISO (dont nous avon
ठीक है। मेरे पास आपके लिए उड़ान योजना के कुछ विवरण हैं, जो इस प्रकार हैं। बेशक, चूंकि -3 नहीं है, इसलिए आप मध्यमार्ग 3 से संबंधित सभी चीज़ें हटा देंगे, जिसमें - भी शामिल है, जिसका उल्लेख लगभग 54-1/2 पर किया गया है, और हम इसे बाद के लिए टाल देंगे, जिसके बारे में मैं आपको एक मिनट में बताऊंगा। ठीक है। फिर हम बैटरी चार्ज को लगभग 3 घंटे आगे बढ़ाना चाहते हैं। और हम टनल वेंट वाल्व को / डेल्टा-पी पर 3 घंटे आगे बढ़ाना चाहते हैं, और उस समय आप उड़ान योजना म
حسنًا. يبدو أنه ل
Ge
Okay. Mike, what happened is - you know, you were sitting there monitoring,, and at step 7 you went into, NOUN 01, and keyed in the address and then INFORMATION INFORMATION; and on the final ENTER of that 35400 ENTER, right after that, it - that then put you back into the 16,. Then when you did the, ENTER, you were really entering the information in the actual CDU; and when you got the two entries in, in register 1 and 2, it was an - it was an instantaneous change in the actual CDU, and the looked at that and saw - saw what it thought it had. My - my gosh, I got a 600 degree per second rate. And it turns on the jets to try to take that rate out. And the rate filters that it's looking at - it - well, the rate it's looking at is filtered, so it doesn't really sense the actual rate until the thing is already built up, and then 
रॉजर। क्या आपने बचे हुए ईंधन और ऑक्सीडाइज़र की मात
रॉजर, आपको बता दें कि अभी तक हमें केबिन में तैरते हुए पानी से पूरी तरह बचना पड़ा है। मुझे लगता है कि हम अभी जिस स्थिति में हैं, उसमें काफी अच्छा कर रहे ह
Va b
في هذه اللحظة، أقوم بتغيير إعدادات جهاز التسجيل الطبي من وضع الإيقاف (1 OFF) إلى وضع التشغيل (1 ON) ثم وضع الإيقاف (2 OFF). حان وقت نو
روجر. خطأ و
إليكم تقريرًا من هاري روزنتال من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في هيوستن. أضفى بابا نويلان البهجة على ليلة عيد الميلاد للطفل جيفري لوفيل، البالغ من العمر عامين. طرق الأول باب منزله وجلب الهدايا، بينما قام الثاني بتشغيل محرك أبولو 8 العائد من القمر. ارتدى الأول بدلة حمراء ولحية بيضاء، وأطلق صيحة "هو هو" بصوت عالٍ سُمع في آخر الشارع. أما الثاني، فكان محركًا ضخمًا ينفث اللهب خلف القمر، وكان الآلاف ينتظرون بفارغ الصبر خبر تشغيله. "يرجى العلم أن هناك بابا نويل" كانت أولى كلمات أبولو 8 بعد أن خرجت من الصمت اللاسلكي لتُعلم العالم القلق بعد 15 دقيقة من إتمام المحرك لمهمته الحاسمة. قال كين ماتينجلي من مركز التحكم بالمهمة: "لم يتوقع أحد منا أن يحصل على هدية عيد ميلاد أفضل من هذه". وجاء الرد من العقيد فرانك بورمان، قائد المركبة الفضائية: "نشكر كل من كان على الأرض 
알겠습니다. BMAG 모드, 3, ATT 1/RAT
やあ、
Aquarius, Houston. Wir müssen die Klimaanlage einschalten, damit Sie eine Kugelmessung durchführen können. Schließen Sie alle vier BUS TIE INVERTER-Leistungsschalter auf Feld 11. 
Apoll
현재 저희는 달에서 22,500마일 떨어진 곳에서 초당 4,400피트
Understand; 5 feet per sec
Роджер, Бермудские острова. Я вас тоже
好的。
알겠습니다. 아래로 내려가서 "At burn attitude"와 그 바로 위에 있는 
Ragazzi, ques
D'accord. Et ACCEPTEZ. 
罗杰·自由七号，我了解到你目
好的。我们对此有很多有趣的想法，我听到的最新想法是启动平台并使其对齐，然
はい。パイロットにRKV医療データパス番号1を02 17 43に発行しました。聞こえま
Апо
오로라 세븐. 카노 캡 콤이 
Forza Houston, Geme
جون، لقد تحققنا بدقة مت
La vecchia tecnica di volo a metà percorso se
Okay,
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे प्
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。你准备好以230度的坡度进行这次小调整滑翔
Okay. Wir beheben gerade eine kleine Störung, die wir vor einiger Zeit bei der O2-Durchflussrate festgestellt haben. Diese ist jetzt wieder normal. Wir möchten Sie bitten, uns zunächst mitzuteilen, ob Sie wä
Thank you. Am I
Apollo 8, Houston. Fine
Ecco un articolo di Harry Rosenthal dell'Associated di Houston. Due Babbi Natale illuminano la vigilia di Natale per Jeffrey Lovell, 2 anni. Il primo ha bussato alla sua porta di casa e gli ha portato i regali. Il secondo ha accompagnato il padre a casa dalla Luna. Il primo indossava un abito rosso e una barba bianca e ha emesso un grido così forte da essere sentito fino all'isolato. Il secondo era un enorme motore che sputava fiamme dietro la Luna, e migliaia di persone attendevano la notizia dell'accensione. "Si prega di essere informati che c'è un Babbo Natale" sono state le prime parole dell'Apollo 8 mentre emergeva dal silenzio radio per informare un mondo in ansia 15 minuti dopo che il motore aveva completato la sua fase critica. "Nessuno di noi si aspetta mai un regalo di Natale migliore di questo", ha de
ठीक है। सीबी आरईएसीएस औ
Хорошо. +4 часа — это нормально. Вскоре мы предоставим вам +11 часов, а что касается проверки вашей высокоэффективной антенны, мы хотели бы попросить вас оставить переключатель в положе
Roger, nous avons bien reçu votre couverture. J'ai une mise à jour de la carte pour vo
Что они собираются сде
لقد قمت بتنظي
Housto
Wa
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯
你好，印度海
Danke s
In the beginning, the operation with the precluded immediate starting up of our sightings as we had scheduled since we had another evasive maneuver. The dumping of the caused a tremendous amount of - of pseudo stars in the area which made an optics calibration practically impossible. The method which we had worked out did not seem to work too well. The method which I finally used was to go into, go to Sirius, which was our brightest star, get the shaft and trunnion, and then fly the spacecraft up to Sirius to use that for the optics, which we did at a later time. With regards to light scatter, it appears that at almost any attitude during our passive thermal control, we are receiving light scattering in the scanning telescope. It takes the form mostly of a wide band of light right across the center of the scope about 10 degrees either direction of zero. It is very difficult to see stars in this area. The realignments have been good. I have been able to pick up the star in the sextant to do the alignment, but I was not able to identify the star which we used in such cases as Regor or Menkent in the scanning telescope. The first star sighting which I took of the earth showed a very indistinct horizon. But there did appear to be a very - or somewhat sharp line between what appeared to be the earth's horizon and the atmosphere. The landmark
Roger. Lecture 62-74 
Alpha/Pc から Pc、LAUNCH VEHICLE INDICATOR から GPI、GIMBAL DRIVE PITCH および YAW から AUTO、EVENT TIMER RESET から上、EVENT TIMER START から STOP、EVENT TIMER MINUTES, SECONDS から中央、POSTLANDING VENT バルブ、押す、PROBE EXTEND/RELEASE から OFF、EXTEND/RE
ゴム - エク
حسن
ठीक है। यह काफी अच्छा लग
收到
好的，11。很好。现在，关于记录在案的样品容器：从电视上看，似乎容器里的样品是根据岩石本身的特性，经过某种考量或考虑后挑选出来的。我们想知道您是否能凭记忆提供更多关于这些样品的信息，以及它们所取自的岩石材质或地表情况。完毕
Да, я очень доволен всем. Я всё бросил, чтобы раздобыть с
Ricevuto. Il radar si
Okay, Jim. Just as kind of a lead-in to this procedure that we're going to use for the mid-course to use and it's going to be a manual burn. The attitude will be controlled manually; the start/stop on the engine will be controlled manually. So we have a pretty good vector on you now, and it turns out you're coming in a little bit too shallow. So what that means is we're going to make our burn to come in a little more steeply, and we're going to be coming in around the dark side of the Earth. Therefore, to come in more steep, our thrust should be in the direction of the Sun. Does th
इसमें लिखा है कि घर के काम निपटाएं, हेलमेट और सामान रखने वाले बैग रखें; दर्पण, चेकलिस्ट और डिस्पोजल असेंबली को निकालें। अंतरिम सामान रखने वाली असेंबली को रखें, निकालें और 1
لا توجد بطاقات تذكير. صدقوني، ليس لدينا أي نية لمنافسة المحترفين. مع ذلك، نشعر براحة كبيرة هنا. منزلنا سعيد. هناك متسع كبير لنا نحن الثلاثة، وأعتقد أننا جميعًا نتعلم إيجاد ركننا المفضل للجلوس فيه. انعدام الجاذبية مريح للغاية، ولكن بعد فترة، تصل إلى مرحلة تشعر فيها بالتعب من الاهتزاز والارتطام بالسقف والأرضية وال
नहीं, ऐसा नहीं है। मुझे टर्मिनेटर की ओर एक और चाल चलनी होगी। यह स्क्रीन से बाहर निकलकर हमा
De retour à Washington, la commission des voies et moyens de la Chambre des représentants a approuvé des modifications fiscales concernant les compagnies pétrolières, les banques et les services publics, susceptibles d'engranger près de 2 milliards de dollars de recettes fédérales supplémentaires par an. Par ailleurs, la NASA a annoncé aujourd'hui le lancement, en 1972, d'un important atelier orbital, équipé d'une version allégée de la fusée Saturn V. Enfin, vos images télévisées ont suscité un vif intérêt. Diffusées en direct dans le monde entier, elles nous ont valu des centaines d'appels de mères du monde entier, se plaignant que leurs enfants essaient de boire du lait à l
다음 페이지, 대략 그쯤에서 정상적인 비행 계획을 재
روجر. حوالي الساعة الواحدة أو الثانية من الإصبع الأوسط إذا كنت تستخدم الساعة الثانية عشرة باتجاه 
I don't know which way I was pointing when I saw the booster. Can't see the ground at the p
로저. 말씀하신 내용을 잘 들었습니다. 원격지에서 연락을 취해달라는 요청도 잘 이해했습니다. 현재 원격지와의 연결에 어려움이 있었
बज़, ये 16 मिलीमीटर का कैमरा, 18 मिलीमीटर के लेंस 
حسنًا يا جيم. نحن ندرس القيام بذلك في وضعية وحدة الخدمة SEP
Apollo 8, while we are waiting for the high gain, I will continue the trajectory summary. We can still get back to the mid-Pacific line in from the thirteenth, and you are on your way after 138 seconds of the burn. That's 138 seconds, gets you clear of the butterfly region. We recommend not trying preignitions or restarts after 20 seconds. If you go beyond 20 seconds, this may get the trajectory beyond the correction - correction capability to a free return. The weather in recovery area is good. We have an following of and an without of. During the burn, you may notice a slight change in chamber pressure and tank pressures due to the fuel exhaustion in the storage tank and going to the sump tank. This may occur somewhere around 2 to 5 seconds into the burn. It'll be a small change in pressures in both systems. Going down the systems, all systems are GO. In, we want to stop water boiling after for trajectory purposes. Your water dump situation looks good; you should be good to greater than. We'll try to hold off the water dump un
Sto bene. Pronto, torno indietro. Deve trattenermi (ritardarmi). La capsula... vorrei risolvere questo problema che ovviamente hai riscontrato sul circuito della tuta. Ho avuto pochissima fortuna nell'abbassarla. Aumenterò l'impostazione a 8 in questo momento. Sono a 8 ora - la cupola della tuta ora è a circa 81 (gradi). È scesa di circa
هيوستن، كولومبيا. 
Bene. La procedura è la seguente:,, INVIO; 1331, INVIO; 7, INVIO; e INVIO. La spiegazione è la seguente. Durante gli anni '80, c'è stata una volta in cui è stato inserito nel computer circa 16 secondi dopo che l'interruttore OPTICS ZERO è stato spostato su ZERO. Questa è un'anomalia molto rara in quanto, se si esegue questa operazione durante un intervallo di 0,4 secondi circa 16 secondi dopo aver azzerato l'ottica, alcuni bit della modalità OPT vengono azzerati; e questo significherebbe che, in caso di errore dell'OCDU, non verrebbe segnalato; quindi tutto ciò che questa procedura fa è riportare questi tre bit dove dovrebbero ess
Передача 
로저. 손잡이를 앞뒤로 당기면 돌아가는 기어가 두 개 있습니다. 하나는 래칫 역할을 하는 작은 원통형 기어인데, 피스톤이 들어 있고 그 뒤에 래칫과 맞물리는 돌기가 있습니다. 트렁크를 열기 전에도, 그리고 열고 나서도 이 래칫이 제대로 작동하지 않아 애를 먹었습니다. 게다가 트렁크를 잠글 수 있을 만큼 완전히 닫는 것조차 매우 어려웠습니다. 에드는 트렁크가 열리기 시작할 
Понял, Фредо. Теперь мы не... также при минус 30 секундах мы не наблюдаем сгорани
Хорошо. Мы получили «Грузовержца», и Юпитер находится в правильном положении. Так что наша точка отсчета по рысканию абсолютно верна. С этим проблем нет. Когда я сильно наклоняюсь вниз, я могу навести Юп
ठीक है। फ्रेड, समझ गया। और CO2 का मान फिर से 0.1 आ रहा है। वैसे, क्या आप लोग क
好的，杰克。从上开始。好的。低温储罐；H2 1 和 H2 的读数都是 230。我们的 O2 低温储罐 1 看起来勉强维持在 300。低温储罐 2 的 H2 1 读数是 73，H2 2 是 74。在 O2 方面，我们读取到 O2 1 的量为 76；O2 的读数已达到满量程高位。辐射温度：主入口温度约为 55；辐射出口温度约为 30；次级出口温度为 52 度。蒸发出口温度为 45，蒸汽压力为 0.17，乙二醇排​​放压力为 48。宇航服压缩机读数为零。蓄压器读数为 30。 H2O 废液温度约为 34；饮用水温度约为 98；二次辐射入口温度约为 71；辐射出口温度约为 30；乙二
106년 6월 1일, 즉 1
Okay. Good deal. One other detail for you, Jack; tells us that the OPTICS jitter is very similar to what we had o
روجر. PAD. TIG of 125 19 3470; TIG of 126 57 0000;, 0532 plus 0000; NA; 373 03196; 275 
OK, enregistreur étei
굳이 그
Okay, Fred. Wir haben ein
로저. 마릴린 산과 세키 세
क्या आपने पैनल 11 पर S और C इंजन कंट्रोल ब्रेकर बंद कर दिया? क्योंकि हमने पेज 3 पर स्टेप 1 वहीं पर किया 
물병자리, 휴스턴.
Apollo 8, während wir auf den maximalen Gewinn warten, setze ich die Zusammenfassung der Flugbahn fort. Wir können immer noch von der Dreizehnten aus die Mittelpazifiklinie erreichen, und Sie sind nach 138 Sekunden Brenndauer auf dem Weg. Das sind 138 Sekunden, damit Sie die Butterfly-Region verlassen. Wir empfehlen, nach 20 Sekunden keine Vorzündungen oder Neustarts mehr durchzuführen. Wenn Sie 20 Sekunden überschreiten, kann dies die Flugbahn außerhalb des Korrekturbereichs bringen – Korrekturmöglichkeiten bis hin zu einer freien Rückkehr. Das Wetter im Bergungsgebiet ist gut. Wir haben eine Folge von und eine ohne. Während der Brenndauer können Sie eine leichte Änderung des Kammer- und Tankdrucks aufgrund des Treibstoffverbrauchs im Vorratstank und des Umfüllens in den Sumpftank bemerken. Dies kann etwa 2 bis 5 Sekunden nach Brennbeginn auftreten. Es wird sich um eine geringe Druckänderung in beiden Systemen handeln. Alle Systeme sind betriebsbereit. Wir wollen verhindern, dass das Wasser nach dem Brennvorgang kocht, um die Flugbahn 
11，休斯顿。我们想尝试将您传感器中的氧气流量与您打开的流量阀关联起来。您认为“抑制氧气
이글
La pre
Okay. Jim meint, er habe beim Laden etwa
Хорошо. Спасибо. Итак, теперь панель 275: автоматический выключатель
0.1度。GDCはおそらくそれよりも
Roger. We copy. No transients at staging of any signific
ठीक है। और ओम्नी और हाई गेन ए
Хорошо. Последний Джо должен был вып
Okay. The purpose is to bring the and the state vectors to earth's sphere of Verb 37 ENTER, 23 ENTER. At, at, load in register 1, 2, and 3 the following numbers. Register 1, 00002; register 2, five balls; register 3, 00210. Step 3: proceed on, . Step 4: proceed on, 25. do not proceed on. Wait for 30 seco
戻ってきました。これからどうするつもりですか
13
روجر. سلسلة الشقوق أو الصدوع الممتدة عبرها تنحدر على ثلاث مراحل تقريبًا باتج
ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP COMオーバ
Roger, Mike. Ich möchte ein paar Anmerkungen zu den Daten machen. Das automatische Manöver war recht genau. Anscheinend haben wir während des Manövers einen substellaren Punkt getroffen; die automatische Optik hat Canopus gen
好的，S 波段天线 OMNI 开关拨到 Bravo 位置（你现在的位置），S 波段天线 OMNI 
D'accord. Les suivants, sur la case 1, restent inchangés, et sur la case 2, descendez jusqu'aux signaux de retour du propergol, et entre parenthèses, rayez « huit », et écrivez « quatre à gris », puis tracez au crayon « signaux de retour du propergol, quatre, à poteau de
좋습니다. 카메라 오른쪽이 역방향으로
罗杰。你的灯罩应该选1045或者18315。我们推荐18315。
그게 당신이 입력한 
ああ、了解、ザンジバル艦長。フレンドシップ・セブン。ヒューズは全て前回報告通りで、一つも交換していません。スクイブは作動中。自動逆噴射はオフ。通常、自動、ジャイロは正常。Tハンドルは全て格納。逆噴射遅延は正常。シーケンスパネルも正常。着陸バッグはオフ。燃料は90～98%。EPIはほぼ予定通りです。姿勢は左5度、右3度、ピッ
روجر
Ken, ci sono due cose che rendono il flusso dello scambiatore di calore della tuta un po' diverso. Una è che non stiamo eseguendo un coldsoak, e l
فوق هاواي، كنا على اتصال مباشر بالشبكة عندما أرسلت لنا إعدادات مفاتيح التحكم. قمنا بنسخ البيانات حتى وصلت إلى الأمر الذي أرسلته "تشغيل المسجل 041"، وعندها بدأت المركبة الفضائية بالتحرك. هل يمكنك المتابعة من تلك النقطة، وتحديدًا ما هي إعدادات مفاتيح التحكم الموجودة على 
了解。レボリューション4のスタート時刻を教えてくださ
알겠습니다. 원지점 고도는 143해리입니다. 근지점은 86해리입니다. 들으
了解。ビルに飛
17-BRAVO 87, 01+51. 01 17 26 03. 10+03. 18-1 04+14. 18 02 42. 02+44
شكراً لك يا كي
알겠습니다. 말씀하신 대로 진행하겠습니다. 그럼 저희가 알려드리겠습니다. 다른 플
稳定下来后，我们检查了整个推力控制系统，发现我们无法控制偏航或滚转——或者说，我们无法控制偏航推进器的偏航，因为我们的滚转是由偏航喷气发动机控制的，之后
アポロ8号、ヒュース
Houston, Gemini 4. I got the part where we leave the Read Switch 
Okay. Quello era... quello era forte e chiaro, quello lì. Ora, non abbiamo un granché da fare, perché sai che stiamo lavorando alle procedure di iscrizione. Ho delle copie preliminari, ma non siamo ancora pronti a passartele. Sembra che tu sia a circa 200.000 chilometri di distanza, che tu stia iniziando a... a prendere velo
Хорошо. Я вошел в с
Ricevuto. 
Très bien. Nous sommes prêts à vous lire la première partie de la liste de contrôle. Il s'agit d'une chronologie, et des modifications à apporter à la liste de contrôle pour s'y conformer. La première partie de la chronologie est pr
네, 저도 그렇게 생각해요, 에드. 제가 말했듯이
Okay.
確かその時、私は宇宙船の上に立っていたと思います。いや、そうではありませんでした。私は宇宙船の外にいました。キューバが見えたのはその
Роджер, Кантон. Пожалуйста, сообщите Кейп-Коудс, что я указываю крен 10° вправо, рыскание 10° вправо и тангаж +15 [градусов] при нахождении на орбите на экране и осциллографе. Конец связи
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Подтверждение правильное. Обновление расхо
Ich
로저, 이글. PAD 데이터를 보내드립니다: 101 36 14.07, -00758, 모든 공 더하기, +00098, - 수정, 00572, 근지점 +00085 00764 030 000 293. 명사 86, -00759, 모든 공 더하기, +00090. 나머지 PAD는 NA입니다. 응답을 기다려 주십시오. 데이터를 복사할 준비가 되셨다면, 제가 보내드리겠습니다
알겠습니다. 그리고 6페이지 2의 맨 아래쪽에 있는 "DIRECT O2, OFF VERIFY" 부분을 완전
Hallo, Canton Com Tech. Aurora Seven empfängt Sie laut und de
さて、アラインメントなどについ
CB G&N、POWER、AC1、AC2、クロ
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。ご迷惑をお
14 45 00，各就各位
Das stimmt. Wir haben ein gutes Bild von de
Wie konnte ich das vergess
Das ist eine gute und treffende Beschreibung. Mir scheint, es macht einen Unterschied, einfach im Tunnel zu sitzen und alle Fenster zu betrachten; es ist wichtig, aus welchem ​​Fenster man schaut. Die Kamera filmt zum Beispiel gerade aus Fenster Nummer 5, und das Licht wirkt dadurch deutlich rosiger oder gebrä
سنخبرك ع
알겠습니다
Роджер. Всё в
We are working on it, Frank. We are trying to compute what radially outward will be in close terms. Now, you still have the earth - as I understand plus Y and plus Z quadrant. In other words, it's down below you on your right and slightly to your rear? Is th
Beh, pensavamo che probabilmente non saresti 
أبولو 8، هذه هيوس
Roger. Je suis désolé, j'essayais de
罗杰。我以为我
Roger, sounds like a good idea. And on the ground tells us that the flying is to go ahead and put his hydrogen purge line heater on, and we'll get ready for a fuel ce
Всё
ヒューストン、コロンビア。目標達成。前回の
ننتقل إلى الأ
आपके सूट में कम्फर्ट कंट्रोल वाल्व की सेटिंग
Ciao, Columbia, Houston. Vi daremo una piccola occhiata tra le 13:30 e le 14:30, così possiamo separa
로저. 1번
그리고 11번 패널에 있는 ASCENT ECA 차단기는 어때요? 짐이 저기에 설치해 놨는
G
Я считаю, что все системы работают безупре
Here is an interesting little feature item that is kind of good to hear. It seems that up in Ann Arbor, Michigan, they have a new youth g
FONCTION EM
이봐, 마이크, 우리 레이더
好的。我们有三件事要说。
...アセ
इस स्थिति में, ऊपर आसमान की ओर देखने का भ्रम ज़रूर होता है, और अगर क्षितिज न हो, तो बस काला आसमान ही दिखाई देता है। कॉकपिट में रोशनी काफी तेज़ है। एक बार अभ्यस्त हो जाने पर, केबिन लाइट से इसे कम किया जा सकता है। फिलहाल, सूट सर्किट की समस्या के कारण मैं रोशनी कम करने में थोड़ा हिचकिचा रहा हूँ। मैं अपनी उंगलियों की रोशनी का भरपूर इस्तेमाल कर रहा हूँ। ऐसा लगता है कि भविष्य की उड़ानों में, हमारे पास कोई ऐसा उपकरण होना चाहिए जिसमें हम वस्तुओं को भर सकें और उन्हें कुछ समय के लिए वहीं फंसाए रख सकें। मैं वॉशर और धातु के छोटे से मुड़े हुए टुकड़े की समस्या पर काम कर रहा हूँ। मुझे लगता है कि मैंने आखिरकार उन्हें हैच पर लगे छोटे से बैग में डाल दिया है। सूट का तापमान ठीक-ठाक है। मुझे गर्मी लग रही है, और शायद मुझे तापमान कम करना पड़ेगा। मुझे समझ नहीं आ रहा कि सूट सर्किट को प्रतिक्रिया देने में इतना समय क्यो
ठीक है, बज़। आपके फ़्लाइट प्लान के बारे में, सबसे पहले कुछ अपडेट। हमने मिडकोर्स फ़्लाइट नंबर 6 रद्द कर दी है। बस यहीं बने रहें। मैं आपको आज सुबह थोड़ा और समय दूंगा। फ़्लाइट प्लान का दूसरा आइटम यह है कि हम BATT B चार्ज के लिए तैयार हैं, जब भी आप चाहें। और तीसरा आइटम, हम इस बार 
- - そして、その
Bon, Jack s'est simplement... remis en place. Après avoir installé les disjoncteurs 250 BAT A et BAT B, il a mesuré la tension du bus BAT: 32,3 V sur A et 37,0 V sur B. Il a ensuite installé les disjoncteurs 275 BAT, qui ont relié les batteries aux bus, et a alors
Roger. Vérification de la piste par scanner Hor
Spero che il sole non colpisca proprio quello
Okay. Mi avvicino e ti guardo di nuovo, Fra
ジェミニ4は姿勢にありま
Роджер. Похоже, вам придётся перенастроить радар. Мы предлагаем начать отсчёт времени TIG минус 45 минут — этот п
حسناً. هل تعتقد أننا سنتمكن من توليد كمية كافية من الم
И Колумбия, Хьюстон. Мы ожидаем, что вы потеряете высокий прирост мощности
Роджер. При такой хорошей видимости и такой хорошей связи мы просто дадим вам словесное описание, не видя сейчас сканирующий телескоп. Ваши углы маневрирования для наблюдения Арктура были довольно удачными. Я центрировал Арктур ​​в сканирующем телескопе. При таком угле наклона Солнца луч света проходит прямо через центр сканирующего телескопа и — полоса света. Это исключает возможность наблюдения множества звезд вокруг нас, и хотя я уже некоторое время не отрывал глаз от телескопа, очень трудно увидеть какие-либо звездные узоры или что-либо еще. Я не смог бы распознать это на Арктуре, если бы — оптика просто не привела меня туда. Теперь, поскольку я нахожусь почти в нуле относительно оси и цапфы, я наблюдаю довольно значительное движение оси. Каждый раз, когда ось движется, все больше частиц покидают оптику, и они такие же яркие, как и окружающие звезды. И они смешиваются со звездами, и вы не можете различить звездные узоры или созвездия. При таком положении луч света исключает возможнос
Roger. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Je recherche
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ブローダウン時には、局
This is Friendship Seven. At this, MARK, at this present time, I still have some clouds visible below me, the sunset was beautiful. It went down very rapidly. I still have a brilliant blue band clear across the horizon almost covering my whole window. The redness of
روجر. ت
और एक और बात, मुझे खुशी थी कि जिम ने अपनी म
जेरी, मै
Tentatively, midcourse correction at is zero; and in about an hour and a half, we'll have some track 
Wir haben einen mehr, als wir haben sol
Okay. Und wir haben eine kleine Ergänzung zu dem Verfahren, das Ihnen vorhin vorgeles
好的，谢谢。这是我们首先想到的问题之一。我们随时准备进行低温风扇循环，并会按照您通
ICS, 
نعم. لقد استنتجتُ ذلك نوعًا ما يا تشارلي. الصفحة 16، "الاحتراق عند الرسو (صفحات
Roger, understand no low
Playing
Forte e chiaro. Mi sono svegliato circa 30 o 40 minuti fa e poi - in realtà non mi sono svegliato subito - sono rimasto lì seduto a riposare. Non ho avuto molta fortuna a dormire. Ho bevuto un sorso d'acqua appena sveglio, 
Yes. Okay. Let's g
로저, 닐. 저희는 재생 영상을 보고 나서 저희가 보고 
Okay, Jim. Vorremmo anche le temperature 
जेमि
Роджер. Понимаешь, ближе к кормовой части, с восточной стороны, лучи казались темнее? Я так понимаю,
I'm in Free mode now, and it looks like it is working all
Судя по уровню сигнала, похоже, что мы попали в зону бокового лепестк
Roger. Anzugtemperatur 62 Grad, Kabinentemperatur 101 Grad. Dein Blutdruck steigt – und den
Хоро
Hier sind wir ungefähr... Ja, das ist das praktischste kleine Ding, das Sie je gesehen haben... Es kommt direkt in die H
Хорошо, Водолей. У меня есть несколько углов поворота гирокомпаса, и «Оди
نيل وباز، هذه هيوستن. للتوضيح، مستلزماتكم في حالة جيدة ح
Roger. Mannschaftsstatusbericht: Wasservorrat, Kom
こちら側は太
휴스턴, 다음에 기회가 되면 한번 시도해 보겠습니다. 점심 식사 중이 아니거나 망원경을 찾느라 시간을 허비하지 않을 때 말이죠
- - 상태 확인
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Valerie Anders am Heiligabend, während sie und ihre Familie darauf warteten, dass Apoll
Роджер, Базз. Хороший ответ. Вы 
यह दोस्ती का सातवां अध्याय है। मैंने आप
फ्रैंक का कहना है कि यहाँ सब कुछ सामान्य लग रहा है। आप केबिन के तापमान को नियंत्रित करने वाले हीट
Ici Friendship Seven. J
Vuoi iniziare il report di 30 m
روجر. أردنا فقط التأكد من أنك قد 
شكرًا 
سأبدأ الآن في تجهيز نسخ التقرير المرحلي. لن أضع الكاميرا بالكامل داخل الحقيبة
Y
알겠습니다. 그리고 시간이 좀 남으시면 관측해 보실 수 있는 게 하나 있습니다. 아리스타르코스 근처에서 달의 일시적
ठीक है, ह्
जैसा हमने अनुमान लगाया था, चलने-फिरने में कोई कठिनाई नहीं दिख रही है। यह शायद ज़मीन पर किए गए विभिन्न सिमुलेशन में एक-छठे गुरुत्व
それはどのような種類のトランスミッションチェ
Der nächste Krater unten ist Duke Island, und links davon befindet sich der größte Krater in der Bildmitte – Maskelyne W. Dies ist eine Positionsprüfung während des Sinkflugs bei etwa 3 Minuten und 39 Sekunden. Wir überprüfen unsere Position in und quer zur Landebahn, bevor wir uns zum Landeradar drehen. Danach können wir die Oberfläche unter uns erst wieder sehen,
Lista di controllo post-atterraggio. Paracadute spinto a getto.
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। फ
D'accord. On se rattrape et on 
ठीक है। जैक, हमने थोड़ी देर के लिए कुछ बूंदें त
짐, 여기가 바로 지금 우리가 마주하고 있는 지역 같군. 저기 빅벤드가 보이네. 이제 빅벤
Der Sender Steelhead ist Cape, wir können Ihre Nachricht aber nicht lesen. Bitte wiederholen Sie Ihre Nachrich
你要明白你仍然带着气球。如果你回到部署位置再返
Hallo Hawaii, hallo Hawaii. Zwillinge 4. Kannst du le
아프리카에 막 진입했을 때 찍은
روجر. تم إنجاز الملاحة القمر
Bene. Al primo passag
Хорошо. Еще один момент, который мы хотим вам немного уточнить. Как мы уже говорили, положение SEP при подъеме было в плоскости, а положение JETT будет больше похоже на обычное положение SEP сервисного модуля, то есть оно будет направлено вверх, за пределы радиус-вектора и на 45 градусов вправо, вне плоскости, к югу. Мы рекомендуем перед JETT использовать конфигурацию с закрытым верхним люком и открытым вентиляционным клапаном, а JETT будет пр
Sì. Sì, anche lì scattiamo circa un migliaio d
Okay, los geht's. Eintrittspunkt: Mittelpazifik, 000153; 000. Die nächsten beiden Zeilen geben die Monduntergangs- und die Mondcheck-Lage an;, 178; NOUN 61, minus 21,66, minus; 00:28. Die nächsten vier sind nicht verfügbar; DO ist 4,00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353,1, 29,9. Der Hauptzielstern ist Sigma Libra, unten 08,8, links 0,4; Auftriebsvektor nach oben. Für die Eintrittsausrichtung die Sterne 31 und 23 verwenden. Rollachse 041, Nickachse 245, Gierachse 024, Nichtaustrittsmuster verwenden. Mondcheck-Lage bis Monduntergang beibeha
Роджер. Начнём с мировых новостей. Всеобщие поздравления американским астронавтам «Аполлона-8» и надежды на международное сотрудничество в освоении космоса сопровождались рождественскими посланиями, разосланными по всему миру, пока крошечный космический корабль вращался вокруг Луны. Даже в коммунистическом мире царил энтузиазм по поводу первого полёта человека на Луну. В Москве советский учёный Анатолий Бесаранов вспомнил, что его страна и Соединённые Штаты уже обменивались знаниями о космосе, и предсказал, что полёт «Аполлона-8» приведёт к дальнейшему сотрудничеству. На Кубе радио Гаваны ретранслировало программу «Голоса Америки», чтобы рассказать слушателям о речи «Аполлона-8». Представители «Голоса» заявили, что это был первый случай, когда программы американских агентств транслировались по радио Гаваны. Чехословакия наблюдала за полётом на Луну благодаря обширному телевизионному освещению; а в Будапеште, Венгрия, в поездах и автобусах почти ни о чём другом не говорили. В некоммунистическом мире офисные работники и покупатели рождественских подарков затаили дыхание, наблюдая за подготовкой космического корабля к старту. Французы на улицах восхваляли американские технологии и космический подвиг, а некоторые зрители, смотрящие по телевизору лунные фотографии, скандировали «Великолепно!». В Лондоне толпы покупателей, покупающих рождественские подарки, заполнили магазины и пабы, чтобы посмотреть телевизионные фотографии лунных кратеров. Ведущий британский астроном-космонавт Бернард Ловелл, который еще несколько недель назад критиковал проект «Аполлон-8» 
Hallo, Apollo 11, Houston. Wir emp
ठीक है। आपको
Мы слышали от них одно показание, которое показало содержание топлива в 16 процентах, и это было последнее, что мы 
Bien. Voilà pour le survol et le passage au pér
Okay. Ich möchte aber auf keinen Fall, dass wir der Zahl 10 allzu o
Напомню помощнику директора по полет
Still in a relatively horiz
Répète
Va bene, h
Это неплохо, но не так хорошо, как старый добрый калифорнийский апельси
Seven here. Fuel is go, 4g, 5.5 cabin, oxygen go, all systems
Und wie sieht es mit der Blende aus? Ist
Ну, она удерживается в пред
ठीक है। आपके सेकेंडरी रेडिएटर इनपुट का तापमान लगभग 72 डिग्री है; रेडिएटर आउटपुट का तापमान लगभग 30 डिग्री है; ग्लाइकोल वाष्पीकरण तापमान लगभग 65 डिग्री है; भाप का दबाव उच्च स्तर पर है, ग्लाइकोल डिस्चार्ज दबाव लगभग 9 psi है। सेकेंडरी एक्यूमुलेटर सूट का तापमान लगभग 52 डिग्री है; केबिन का तापमान लगभग 58 डिग्
Das macht nichts, wir haben zwei Stunden auf dem Band, und es ist ihnen egal, wenn es zu Ende ist. Solange die Bit
Roger. P76: 84 ist minus 00758, alle Kugeln, p
Okay
Э
Roger. I have that. We'll leave those two circuit breakers open, and have the UP DATA LINK to VOICE BACKUP; and we'll make the appropriate changes on the following circuit
Guaymas CAP COM. Tieni presente che al momento non riesco a far accendere
Das rote Licht ragt so weit heraus, das grüne noch weiter. Das
Роджер. В этом вопросе мне нужно уточнить у в
يا إلهي، هذا الفاصل المائي لا يعمل بتاتاً. ربما علينا تجربة الآخر... الماء. يا إلهي، هذا الشيء يُخرج الماء بشكلٍ
सुई का अनुसरण करो
わかりました。Sバンド送受信機の電源を切って、5分後に再起動してほしいとのことです
Okay. You'
Roger. Roger. S
On the, the oxidizer and fuel feed line temperatures are 75 and holding steady. The service module quad package temps are cycling and holding between 120 and 140, and looks like we're getting good normal heater operations. We plan to have you i
... dort unte
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप सुन रहे हैं, तो बता दें कि यह 000 नंबर हमारे संचार के लिए बहुत खराब है। दरअसल, आपसे संबंधित 
좋습니다. 이
Houston
もう一度言ってください、
Du bist ganz gut dabei; deine Gimbals ar
قد تسأل سكان هيوستن عما إذا كانوا يرغبون في خدمة التوصيل... ل
我把它夹在那儿——夹在陆军参谋长旁边
TR-2
ビルさん、BIOMEDデータはまだ少しおかしいようですね。BIOMEDハーネスの青い信号コンディショナーを確認してみてはどうでしょうか。コネクタが1つあります。センターパッケージのはずですが、そこに青いコネクタが付いて
시간은 2분입니다. 170은 아
Pit
金丝雀，双子座4号。请注意，没有足够的时间在那里找到合适的
Рог, понял. Я сообщу тебе время ретроспективного анализа, пока ты будешь измерять артериальное давление. Конец орбиты — 01:28:18. Конец мис
Привет, на 13-м уроке вы уже прочитали нам про то
H2O2を排出中です。スイッチヒューズをオンにしました。待機しています。リカバリーアームは「ア
... अच
Roger. Ti leggo anche io, Buzz, e abbiamo il bitrate alto. È bellissimo con Goldstone. Ti do un conteggio: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5; 5, 4, 3, 2, 1
Apollo 13
P?:...とても良いで
Roger
Ciao Houston CAP COM, Gemell
Okay. I now have Aldebaran in the scan
알겠습니다. 짐, 저희가 마지막으로 보내드린 상태 벡터 업데이트는 슬롯에 대한 것이었으니, 엔터 키를 눌러 해당 정보를 슬롯으로 전송하셔야 합니다
터널 환기 밸브를 /DELTA-P로 다시 닫았을 때 약 1.7~1.75 정도의 수치가 나왔는데, 지금은 천천히 상승해서 약 2.2보다 약간 낮은 수치가 나오고 있습니다. 이 수치가 유지되고 있는 것 같은데, 계측 시스템에 지연이 있는 건가
حسنًا. سأفتح الآن خيار تجاوز بدء تشغيل المحرك. وقد تمّت معالج
Хорош
روجر. ويقول تي/إم هنا أن قاطع دائرة سخان الأكسجين والهيدروجين لخلايا الوقود
Okay. Öffnen Sie
Du hast meine Windschutzscheibe ver
네. 아주 밝은 분화구네요. 크기는 크지 않지만 엄청나게 밝습니다. 아주 최
ヒューストン、イーグル。高利得アンテナで高ビットレ
Okay. Ich wollte Sie nur darauf hinweisen und Sie bitten, darüber nachzudenken und die möglichen Auswirkungen auf den Flugplan zu bedenken. Ich lasse Ihnen dann die Weitwinkelaufnahme und die Kommentare zum Mond vorab durchgehen und sehe, welche Abschnitte am besten geeignet erscheinen. Okay. Frank bat uns, die Reihenfolge der Eintrittsprofile auf der Bildrolle zu überprüfen. Das erste Profil ist mit „Nonexit Nummer 2“ beschriftet und stellt den Kurzstrecken-Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt dar. Das zweite Profil heißt „3500 Meilen“ und ist ebenfalls ein Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt, der jedoch für längere Eintrittsstrecken verwendet wird. Das dritte Profil ist „Nonexit Eintritt Nummer 1“, gefolgt von ein
Roger. Verstanden. Frank, wir wollen 
Ok. Il numero 1 O2 è spento, e potres
Roger, Buzz. Bitte stellen Sie den Schalter der S-Band-Antenne OMNI A auf Bravo. Stellen Sie den Schalter der S-Band-Antenne OMNI a
Roger. 1201 alarm. We're GO. Same type. We're G
Houston, Apollo 11. Abbiamo il continente africano... rivolto verso di noi in questo momento, e ovviamente, tutto diventa sempre più piccolo con il passare del tempo. Il Mediterraneo è completamente limpido. Il Sole sembra sul punto di tramontare intorno al Madagascar. La fascia equatoriale dell'Africa si distingue chiaramente. Stiamo vedendo un verde scuro o un verde fangoso, rispetto ai colori più sabbiosi della punta meridionale dell'Africa e, naturalmente, della costa settentrionale del Sahara. C'è una nuvola piuttosto notevole che appare in prossimità del confine tra Afghanistan e Pakistan. Sta per tramonta
Roger, Buzz. Ça me paraît une bonne idée pour vos relevés topographiques à l'i
わかりました。今日、世界中の教会が祈りの中でアポロ11号に言及しています。ニクソン大統領のホワイトハウスでの礼拝もこのミッションに捧げられており、私たちの仲間の宇宙飛行士、フランク・ボーマンもまだ準備中で、昨年のクリスマスにアポロ8号で朗読された創世記の一節を朗読する予定です。閣僚と議会議員、特に上院と下院の宇宙委員会の議員、そして多くのゲストが招待されています。バズ、あなたの息子のアンディは昨日、宇宙ステーション（MSC）を見学しました。叔父のボブ・ムーンも同行し、LRLも見学しました。
好的。刚才那个声音很响亮也很清晰。现在我们没什么大事发生，你也知道，我们正在处理入境手续。我这里有一些初步的副本，但还没准备好交给你。看起来你离目的
Gemini 4, ic
Ja
ルドネフより。モスクワの同志たちがあなたの健康状態を
舱内温度略低。我们开着一台舱内风扇，暖气也开到最大
ما هي
I'm afraid this one was way too far away to show any deta
제미니 
La Terre paraît vraiment plus grosse ici et, bien sûr,
Вначале работа с системой не позволила нам немедленно начать наблюдения, как мы планировали, поскольку нам предстоял очередной маневр уклонения. Сброс системы вызвал огромное количество псевдозвезд в этой области, что сделало калибровку оптики практически невозможной. Разработанный нами метод, похоже, работал не очень хорошо. В итоге я использовал метод, заключавшийся в том, чтобы спуститься в систему, добраться до Сириуса, нашей самой яркой звезды, взять вал и цапфу, а затем поднять космический аппарат к Сириусу, чтобы использовать их для оптики, что мы и сделали позже. Что касается рассеяния света, то, похоже, почти в любом положении во время пассивного терморегулирования мы получаем рассеяние света в сканирующем телескопе. Оно принимает форму шир
أجل، أعتقد أ
فهمت أنها تلقت تعليمات بإحضاري أنا والكبسولة معًا على متن الطا
Quindi, conc
Ich hatte nie die Gelegenheit, sie direkt auf mich zukommen zu sehen, John, aber sie entfernten sich definitiv von mir. Ich konnte fast jederzeit eine ganze Menge davon auslösen, entweder grüne Glühwürmchen oder weiße Eiskristalle, indem i
13, Houston. Abbiamo un'immagine televis
روجر. الكبسولة تدور، وأستطيع رؤية الصاروخ المعزز أثناء الدوران على بعد بضع مئات من الأم
नील, यह ह्यूस्टन ह
Джим, мы рекомендуем вам выполнить свой маневр, но оставайтесь в положении VERB 49 и пока не сужайте зону нечувствительности. А когда вы окажетесь в таком положении, тогда, конечно, вы сможете выполнит
로저. 플러스 90, G&N: 63481, 마이너스 153, 플러스 132, 004 10 25 38, 마이너스 04761, 플러스 00001, 플러스 53361, 180 193 000, 해당 없음, 플러스
Bon, jusqu
D'accord. On va probablement avoir besoin d'un é
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴
Pour le grand match des Astro Blue Bonnet, le classique du basket-ball suivi de la rencontre entre les Astro Blue Bonnet de SMU
Ещё немного местных новостей: здание окружного суда в Хантсвилле сгорело вчера до рассвета, так что, похоже, там снова займутся строительством. Немного о семьях, ожидающих возвращения. Вот что написала Энн Джеймс, репортер газеты Post. «Мы отдыхаем на обратной стороне Луны», — сказала Валери Андерс в канун Рождества, ожидая, когда «Аполлон-8» покинет лунную орбиту и направится домой. Миссис Андерс была дома во вторник в 00 утра, и соседи только что собрали всех детей, чтобы семья могла отдохнуть, пока косм
अपोलो
حسنًا. أهز رأسي بعنف من جميع الجهات، وعيناي مغمضتان، للأعلى والأسفل، وللميلان والدوران والانحراف. لا شيء في معدتي؛ لا شيء في أي مكان. الآن... سأحاول الضغط على زر الصفر، زر الوقت صفر. حسنًا، لقد أخطأت. كنتُ مرتبكًا بعض الشيء بشأن مكان الأشياء بالضبط، لستُ متأكدًا مما تريد تحقيقه بالضبط من خلال هذا، ولكن لا توجد مشكلة في تحديد الاتجاه. أذناك الداخليتان وتقييمك العقلي للأفقي، أنت تتكيف مع هذه ال
Мне кажется, у тебя п
그리고 그게 우리
你说你一直在把偶极子天线切换
Sigma Seven, hier spricht Muche
了解。コンピューターはあなたのものです。VHF圏内にいるようですね。VHFチェックを試みま
Roger. From the hot wires of the Public Affairs Office: Apollo 11 still dominates the news around the world. Only four nations, Communist China, North Korea, North Viet Nam, and Albania, have not yet informed their citizens of your flight and landing on the Moon. One newsman said that he has run out of ways to describe your success. Tonight, President Nixon is scheduled to watch the All Star baseball game in Washington. After the game, he will depart for the Pacific recovery area. Wednesday evening, he will fly from Johnston Island by helicopter to the Navy communications ship Arlington. Then on Thursday morning, he will reboard the helicopter and fly to the Hornet in time to witness your splashdown. Accompanying the President will be Secretary of State William Rogers and Frank Borman. They will watch the splashdown from the bridge of the recovery ship with Admiral John Sidney McCain, Jr, Commander of the Pacific Forces. Following the President's stay aboard the Hornet, he will depart for his tour of Asia and scheduled visit to Romania. Luna 15 is believed to have crashed into the Sea of Crises yesterday after orbiting the Moon 52 times. The Soviet News Agency TASS reported that "scientific" "research in near Moon space was carried out." Sir Bernard Lovell at Jodrell Bank Observatory said that Luna 15 hit the surface of the Moon at a speed of about 30
好的。面板 250 上的两个断路器将恢复断开状态；面板 275 上的两个断路器将恢复断开状态；电源入口/落
Ok, 
Da oben h
Водолей, Хьюстон. Нам нужно включить переменный ток, чтобы вы могли измерить показания. Замкните автоматические выключатели инвертора шины, все четыре на пан
Ok. Dai un'occhiata a C
Okay, beim letzten Überflug haben wir etwa 38 Bilder mit der Synoptic Terrain Photography aufgenommen. Wir starteten etwas östlich von San Diego und flogen bis zur nächsten Wolkendecke. Sobald wir den südlichen Teil der USA überflogen, machten wir wieder sporadisch Aufnahmen, genauer gesagt die Gegend um Alabama und Mississippi bis nach Florida. Wir haben einige sehr gute Bilder vom Wetter in dieser Region gemacht und anschließend einige Aufnahmen der Flugplätze um Jacksonville. Wir haben auch ein paar Bilder vom Cape gemacht. Eines der besten Bilder ist wahrscheinlich die Rückansicht, auf der wir die gesamte Wetterformation entlang der Küste von Florida bis nach Texas eingefangen haben. Eine sehr klar definierte Wetterlinie, die dicht an der Küste entlang verläuft. Dann haben wir einige Bilder der Wette
चार्ली, हम जिस चीज़ की तलाश कर रहे हैं, वह है T2 तक गिनने पर वह समय जो 60 मिनट 
嗯，我们——我们应该在——哦——16——18——大约再过20分钟就能收到AO
अपोलो 11, अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्ट
Roger. Seems nominal here. Everything looks good. Got 55 percent auto fuel. Passing through 70,000 feet, 65,000. Attitudes are very stable. Coming up on 60 (thousand). Rate command doing very well. Coming up on 50 (thousand). She looks like a sweety. Coming up on 45,000. I'm down to about 1 g. Preparing to punch the, at 40, 41 (thousand). I'm punching, and the is out. You can hear it; I can't see it because of the clouds. Attitudes are holding well. Manual lever is in. fuel is going pretty fast. I can see the now. looks very good. I'm going to aux 
... bit like zodiacal light. It keeps going out farther and fa
Après avoir fait demi-tour,
D'accord, C
알겠습니다. 산소 문제에 관해서는, 우주선 안에 충분한 산소가 있어서... 재진입에는 문제가 없을 겁니다. 저는... 사령선... 재진입 전 우주복 루프에 대해서는... 제가 살펴보고
Roger, Houston. That's what we're trying to do. I'm trying to get 15 for an optics. It's been very difficult with the bright earth to find a star that we can get into the sextant. I'm trying to use the auto optics 
了解です、ジム。ワンアティチュード・
अरे यार, ये तो चिपक ही नहीं रहा। अभी तक इस पर वेलक्रो का एक टुकड़ा
尼尔，这里是休斯顿。声
Я могу включить режим "Заполнение" на минуту
ठीक है। हमने खुद से लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड का कनस्तर बदल लिया है। जो, बस एक ही फर्क है कि इस गत्ते पर बना हमारा आर्क इतना बड़ा नहीं है कि लाल नली को नीचे की ओर मुंह करके उसमें डाला जा सके, और लाल नली का सिरा एक तरफ पड़ा है, लेकिन मुझे लग
На наших наземных компьютерах мы подтверждаем, что угол наклона вала и цапфы направлен на звезду. Однако, похоже, что этот угол наклона вала и цапфы также направлен в сторону структуры, так что, хотя вы будете видеть горизонт Земли, звезда... будет скрыта ею. Мы рекомендуем выполнить автоматический 
Mettici un timone più gr
짐, 비행 계획 초반에 스러스터 사용 비율, 즉 후방 추진기와 전방 추진기를 각각 얼
Okay, Jack. Wir möchten nicht, dass du die letzten beiden Fenster schließt. Das sind Änderungen an deiner
حسنًا. أعلم أنك تحاول التزام الهدوء، لذا سأقرأ لك بعض المعلومات. من بين الأمور التي توصلنا إليها مؤخرًا والتي قد تمنحك بعض الاطمئنان، أنه في حال فقدان خزان الأكسجين المبرد، يتبقى لديك 80 رطلاً عند /. العامل المحدد لتشغيل الطائرة بخزان واحد حاليًا هو خزان الهيدروجين الذي يتمتع بهامش أمان عند / ، بافتراض أن ملفنا القياسي يمنحك حوالي 143 ساعة. لذا يبدو أنك تجاوزت الحد الأقصى المسموح به في هذه الحالة. لاحظ أنك تطير في الوضع 2، وهذا جيد. فقط تأكد من أنك ما زلت تحافظ على وضعية
فانس، قد يهمك الأمر - الطريقة التي رتبنا بها هذا الأمر، لدينا خوذة واحدة متصلة بخطوط الاتصالات المتصلة بالخراطيم، والشخص المكلف بالمهمة يرتدي ا
그는 한 번 키보드를 쳤어요, 
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Nous allons effectuer un test de communication de secours. Réglez l'entrée AUX bande S sur « SURVEILLA
Роджер, давай, капитан связ
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 기동 시간을 정하고, 평소 기동 전 절차대로 진행하겠습니다. 그리고, 4쿼터 현재 점수는 31대 13입니다. 혹시라도 점수 차이에 대해 궁금한 점이 있으시면 언제든 말씀해 주세요. 그리
La le
Il volo procede bene. La sensazione di assenza di peso è buona. Tutti i dispositivi, l'intero sistema funzionan
मिथुन 
Okay. Good readback. Proceeding on down the page. "BALANCE COUPLE" switch, "BALANCE COUPLE OFF." Okay, down to the - it's the last line before minus 2 minutes - " COMMANDER THROTTLE, MINIMUM; LMP to JETS." At minus 2 minutes, scratch "400 plus 1." At minus 1 minute, scratch "MASTER ARM, ON." At minus 10 seconds, add "MANUAL ULLAGE." At plus 5 seconds, scratch "DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, ON;" add ", 40 percent." Okay, "At the igniti
حسنًا، لم أسألك ذلك بعد يا جاك؛ ان
Okay, Houston. Basierend auf der Lösung mit dem negativen MA-Wert habe ich eine Einschlagslänge von -160,95 erhalten. Ich habe diese korrigiert, um eine Einschlagsbreite und -länge von 163,75 zu erhalten. Ich wollte meinen Einschlagpunkt um 30 Grad nach Osten verlegen und habe versucht, die entsprechenden Brennparameter zu bestimmen. Dabei habe ich einen X-Brennwert von -11,6, einen C-Wert von +600 und einen Y-Wert von null erhalten. Dadurch hat sich mein vorheriger X-Brennwert von -50,2 geändert. Ich möchte nur wissen, ob d
非常に静かな乗り心地で、前後にゆっ
네, 맞습니다. 다시 말씀드리지만, X 7.7, Y 0.1, Z 없음, 롤, 피치, 요는 각각 180, 310, 
Bene. Per quanto riguarda le batterie, la batteria A aveva 39,32 ampere-ora, la batteria B 35,21 e la batteria C 38,46. Le quantità di crio rimaste erano le stesse che vi abbiamo fornito l'ultima volta, 180 libbre di ossigeno per bombola e 11 libbre di idrogeno per bombola. Al momento, il modulo di servizio, utilizzando i valori del computer per le quantità, ha quad A al 45%, Bravo al 50%, Charlie al 58% e Delta al 48%. Quello che intendiamo fare con i serbatoi secondari è accenderli al 37% effettivo e, in caso di perdita di COMM o qualcosa del genere, consigliamo di utilizzare il 50% di misurazione di bordo come momento pe
I
Den Signalstärkeanzeigen zufolge befinden wir uns möglicherweise in einem Nebenkeulenbereich mit einer Antenne mit hoher Verstärkung. Bitte schalten Sie für etwa 15 Sekunden in den Breitbandmodus und anschließend wieder zurück in den Schmalbandmodus. Ende
الآن، سنحصل على كسب عالٍ، ثم
Okay. Wir haben hier eine weitere Eingabe, 11, dass die Daten als Bild erkennbar waren, aber wir haben kein
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نود منك
That is affirmative. Attitude: roll 0 [degrees], yaw 2 [degrees] right, pitch --33 [degrees]. Rates are all indicating zero. I am on at present time. The clock is still set for time to ret, for retrograde time of 04 plus 32 plus 28. I have retrograde times okay from Bermuda. Cabin pressure holding steady at 5.7. Cabin air 90 [degrees]. Relative humidity, 30 [percent]. Coolant quantity is 68 [percen
ठीक है। य
Yeah. Now that we know where (illegible) will be a lot easier the n
Da ist ein ganz neuer, heller Einschlagkrater; er sollte jetzt im S
Ok, sembra che stiamo vedendo alcune aree illuminate sopra la punta meridionale dell'Africa. Ho sicuramente una città in vista, e... questa è Sigma Seven. I
مباشر؟ رئيسي أ/رئي
ठीक है, फ्रेडो, बढ़िया रीडबैक। 15 सेकंड आगे बढ़ने पर, "मास्टर आर्म - ऑफ" को हटा दें; और "इंजन कटऑफ पर" तक नीचे जाते हुए, "मोड कंट्रोल: टू एटीटी होल्ड" के बाद, हमें एक "," चाहिए और "वाई, जेड ट्रांसलेशन के माध्यम से अत्यधिक दरों को कम
Bene. Siamo arriva
检查航天器系统后，我们发现 8 号推进器
좋아
Nun, wenn ich das Ding nicht mehr brauche, wird es das wohl verstauen. Gehören d
わかりました。それでは、皆さんにお伝えしたい情報がかなりあります。眠っているパイロットは、フェイスプレートを開けたまま、手袋を外しておいてください。起きているパイロットは、ヘルメットと手袋を外し、可能で
私たちはT/Mだと思います...ほら、私はあなたの手袋を1つ手に入れました...私はあなたの手袋を
Gémeaux VI, H
Tranquillité, Houston. La tension monte sur les
ठीक है। अब मुख्य बात पर आते हैं। रोल को छोड़कर आपका एटीट्यूड काफी अच्छा दिख रहा है, और हम चाहते हैं कि आप निम्नलिखित करें। MIN इंपल्स में, हम चाहते हैं कि आप पिच को शून्य पर ट्रिम करें, जो लगभग आपकी वर्तमान स्थिति है; रोल को 0.08 डिग्री पर ट्रिम करें, जो आपके वर्तमान रोल एटीट्यूड से लगभग 16 डिग्री आगे है; और यॉ को शून्य डिग्री पर ट्रिम करें, जो लगभग आपकी वर्तमान स्थिति है। फिर हम चाहते हैं कि आप बॉडी-एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट को 400 प्लस 5, 400 प्लस 0 पर सेट करें। पिच और रोल को पल्स पर सेट करें, चुनें, और बर्न-इन करें।
로저. 어댑터 배터리는 모두 암페어 2, 전압 24V를 나타내고 있습니다. RCS 링은 양호한 상태입니다. 보조 산소통도 양호합니다. 메인 배터리는 암페어 9, 전압 22.5~23V를 나타내고 있습니다. 제어 버스는 (판독 불가), S2는 26, S2는 26, 메인은 23.5V입니
حسنًا. وصلنا الآن إلى النقطة التي، وفقًا لخطة العمل الت
روجر. ما حدث هو أن جهاز هيدروكسيد الليثيوم الخاص بنا علق في صمام تخفيف الضغط الخاص بالبدلة. وهو مغلق الآن. هذا هو المكان الذي ت
Roger. Ich verstehe die Beschreibung. Und zum nächsten Thema: Wie unterschied sich die zum Sammeln der beiden Ker
Роджер. Коррекция по курсу номер 2. SPS/G&N: 63059, плюс 097, минус 020 02644 5792, плюс 00118, минус 00003, плюс 00177 277 - Вы все еще записывает
Canary CAP COM. Mehr haben wir nicht. Wir
R-dots는 전체적으로 상당히 정상적인 것으로 보였고, 중간에 설치한 백업
Насколько я понимаю, мы пролетаем над Гималаями. Совсем рядом с теми местами, где Г
Au
Роджер, Базз. Это запись PAD, MPL, начинающаяся с номера 05, 35 - исправление - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, плюс 1102, минус 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 69, все четыре строки - NA. Продолжаем с D ноль: 400 02 09. RET затемнения, 00 17 03 38 08 20. Звезда секстанта, 02 0945 149. Звезда на оси обзора - Скорпион тета, это Ск
Roger. In Washington hat der Finanzausschuss des Senats die Verlängerung des Einkommensteuerzuschlags genehmigt, eine Abstimmung im Senat über den Gesetzentwurf scheint jedoch derzeit unwahrscheinlich. In Austin wurde der Abgeordnete Ray Lemmon aus Houston zum Nationaldirektor der Amerikanischen Gesellschaft für Ozeanographie ernannt. Lemmon hat eine Studie zur Möglichkeit der Gründung eines ozeanographischen Instituts in Texas vorgeschlagen. Dies wäre das erste Institut dieser Art am westlichen Golf von Mexiko. In Minneapolis, Minnesota, meldete das Wetteramt nach einer Zusammenfassung des heutigen Wetters mit Höchs
गस, वो बाहर है और ये बहुत बढ़िया है। स
AGS在燃烧完成后留下了这些残
Roger, Gemini VI. Request that you kick the tap
Oh, nevica. No, no, non proprio. Le fine
磁带似乎还
Ich glaube, das ist etwas knapp bemessen; das sind etwa 0,25 Grad. Da können wir noch etwas rausnehmen. Moment bitte. Fred, wir geben dir gleich eine Antwort. Und we
... 마이너스 1, 마이너스 1, 플러스
Roger. Wir werden in etwa anderth
Confermo, Fred. Prevedo che te
水上での設
わかりました。私のIVIでは、前進速度が97フィート/秒で、他は
E, immagino, per quell'ultima fase intermedia, dovremmo iniziare a osservare la fase intermedia abbastanza presto, se ne abbiamo la possibilità, soprattutto per via del controllo dell'assetto. L'ultima vo
阿波罗8号，休
Il s'agit du temps écoulé 
Comprenez-vous que la tension de 37 volts est sur la b
자, 휴스
请注意，本次过境期间，您有一份关键的磁带转储文件和一份一级医疗数据通行证，供RKV指挥飞行
Верно. Сейчас измените нас
이것들을 이 어두
Через несколько минут, Вэнс, я думаю, мы посмотрим, как
Fred, did you get any MASTER ALARMS up there about 5 or 10 minutes ago? Folks thought they saw some here and they were cur
OK, on ​​a une bonne connexion internet. Attendez une seconde. Je ve
哦，好的。没问题。
罗杰，你是第一时间发现问题就告诉我们
روجر، هل فهمت؟ في الساعات من 18 إلى 22. في المراجعة 12 فوق RKV، سأتلقى تحديثًا ببيانات PLA وCLA. في المراجعة 13 فوق كاناري، سأحصل على مسار نطاق C. في تمام الساعة 12:16:00 بتوقيت غرينتش، يمكنني القيام ببعض الملاحة المدارية بشرط ألا تتطلب وقودًا. في المراجعة 13، سأحصل على بيانات مسجلة فوق كارنارفون، وسأبدأ خطة طيرا
A quale distanza potevano v
Nur zu, Wa
オデッセイ、ヒューストン。オーバ
休斯顿。阿波罗11号。透过窗户照射进来的地球反照光非常
Are you making an aim to your right and come a
Ici Friendship Seven
Nun, Houston, wir hatten nicht viel Zeit, Ihnen von unserer Sicht aus dem Fenster zu berichten, als wir uns auf den Ausstieg vorbereiteten. Bis dahin hatten wir jedoch die gesamte beleuchtete Nordhalbkugel im Blick, einschließlich Nordamerika, Nordatlantik, Europa und Nordafrika. Das Wetter war fast überall gut. Es gab eine zyklonale Depression im nördlichen Kanada, im Athabaska-Gebiet – wahrscheinlich östlich davon. Grönland war klar, und es schien, als sähen wir nur die grönländische Eiskappe. Der gesamte Nordatlantik war recht gut zu sehe
Questo è confermato. In particolare, queste bruciature saranno perpendicolari alla nostra traiettoria di
Okay, Ron, per MIDPAC: 000, 152, 001, 194, 46 06, 267, più 1332, meno 16917, 064, 36194, 649, 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 0028, 154, 084, 2240, 180, 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02, 45, 0189, 
T
Gemini 4，这里是休斯顿 CAP COM，以下是 11-BRAVO 更
जी हां, और एक और सिस्टम आइटम यहां है - अपने क्रायो टैंकों को संतुलित करने के लिए, क्या आप अपने ऑक्सीजन टैंक 1 और अपने हाइड्रोजन टैंक 2 के हीटर 
とりあえず、MAIN A
Хорошо. Мы сейчас вам всё подробн
Roger, Kano. This is Sigma Seven. I read you 
One thing the world might be interested in knowing is what you do after the burn in the way of configuring switches back. We - We heard you go through the checklist. But, I guess right now, basically, you probably have all the switches back in position and you're in the mode to continue on with - Okay. What does the flight plans say? You're going to b
Нет, он пошевелился. Мы уже загнали его под сиденье. Хорошо, теперь вы хотите, чтобы включили только кислородные вен
Hey Joe. Wollt ihr den Abwasseranteil auf
क्या आपने उन्हें फोन किया? हेलमेट उतारकर रख दिया... बाजूबंद
Да. Мы понимаем, что в резервуаре для питьевой воды больше нет воды, но мы сл
Mike, da liegen ja unzählige Objekte auf der Landestelle. Das würde Jack Schmidt sicher freuen. Die Zielfernrohre verfolgen das
रॉजर। 64 हज़ार डॉलर के लिए, हम अभी भी आपके लैंडिंग साइट, ट्र
Okay. Ich gehe das vielleicht noch einmal mit 
Okay. It sounds straightforward enough. Understand constant g backup backup procedure, lift vector up until MAX g an
はい、はい。さて、今はマイナス5プラス5です。ジ
Jack, en regardant dehors, constate que le nombre de particules a considérablement diminué, voire cessé, ce qui
ठीक है। उससे तीन मिनट पहले वे चाहते हैं कि आप अपना ओरल टेम्परेचर प्रोब अपने मुंह में डालें। 
И снова нам нужна небольшая корректировка положения. Наша Земля уходит вверх и вправо. Наша Земля и ваша Земля. В неправильном направлении, в неправильном направлении. Еще немного. Хорошо. Это нормально, если вы сможете удержать ее в этом положении. Ой! Теперь она снова соскальзывает. Хорошо. Продолжайте двигаться еще немного, еще немного. Хорошо. Девяносто градусов в этом направлении; это неправ
ठ
ठीक है। ऐसा लगता है कि हमार
알겠습니다. 잠시
Affermativo. Ho manovrato l'ottica in modo da poter ripren
О, здесь всё идёт довольно гладко. С ни
جميع الأنظمة تعمل الآن بشكل 
OK. Fin de la gravure: 2 18 00; Delta-V: 
अ
Apollo 11, Houston. Puoi confermare di aver sostituito il filtro CO2 come da piano di volo nell'ulti
자세 제어는 속도 제어(Rate Comm
Ja, das ist in Ordnu
Roger. Wir hatten in den letzten Tagen immer wieder leichte Gewitter. Heute hat e
Avant, on pensait qu'il était impossible de maîtriser le LOI 2;
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11. और स्व
Bon, Jack, la configu
انتظر لحظة. دعني ألتقط لك 
오로라 세븐, 오로라 세븐, 오로라 세븐. 여기는 HF
Bene, quando guardavi, quando camminavi o semplicemente guardavi fuori dal finestrino del modulo lunare, ti sembrava tutto molto 
In sports, the Houston Oilers are showing plenty of enthusiasm in their early preseason workouts at Kerrville, and Coach Wally Lemm says he is impressed with the fine group of rookies. National League baseball yesterday, Thursday: St. Louis 11, Philadelphia 3; Montreal 5, over Pittsburg 4; Atlanta 12, Cincinnati 2; San Fransciso 14, and Los Angeles 13. American League: we have Baltimore 3, over Cleveland 2; Detroit 4 to Washington's 3; Minnesota 8 to Chicago 5. Boston at New York was rained out. And in Corby, England, an Irishman, John Coyle has won the wo
We're discussing that now, Jim, and it looks like we're going to wait on the tracking. For the time being
الوضعية جيدة. نعود إلى وضعية العودة،
Ici Jim. J'ai beaucoup de mal à évaluer la distance qui me sépare du relais. Je vois les deux feux clignoter de temps en temps, et c'est le seul indice qui me permet de me situe
- - 바닥이 당신을 따라 올라왔죠. 제 생각엔 중력 가속
تفضل. انته
Außerdem möchte Houston wissen: Hab
알겠습니다. 알겠습니다. 그리고 짐, 한 시간 후에 당신과 함께 논의할 입장 시간표가 있을 
Tell them
Die Hasselblad hat bei dem einen Schuss d
Nous vous compren
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend die Details erläutern. Okay. Der Eintritt in die Atmosphäre erfolgt um 142:40 Uhr; etwa 6,5 ​​Stunden vorher, also ungefähr, beginnen wir mit der Aktivierung der Heizleistung, indem wir die Temperaturen des Kommandomoduls überprüfen und dieses gegebenenfalls vorheizen. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies notwendig sein wird. Detaillierte Anweisungen dazu folgen später. Ungefähr 6 Stunden vorher beginnen wir mit dem Hochfahren der Heizleistung anhand der modifizierten 30-Minuten-Checkliste, die Sie bereits für den vorherigen Zwischenkurs verwendet haben. Kurz darauf, etwa 5 Stunden vorher, benötigen wir die Ausrichtung für die Körperachsenausrichtung mithilfe des Erdterminators, wie zuvor. Sobald wir das haben, führen wir -7 durch, was jetzt etwa einer Brenngeschwindigkeit von 2 Fuß pro Sekunde oder etwa 15 Sekunden entspricht. Mir wurde gesagt, dass sie jetzt bei 1,5 liegt, also deutlich innerhalb der Toleranz. Okay. Danach beginnen wir sofort mit dem Manöver zur Abwurfposition des Servicemoduls. Da wir es früher als üblich abwerfen, befindet es sich in der Flugebene. Wir benötigen und wollen keine Abw
حسناً. لدي وق
في هذه الوضعية، ما هي زوايا التصوير الأمثل التي يجب أن نستخدمها؟ ربما يساعدنا ذلك في تحديد موقعك. 
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम उस पानी के बहाव का समय अगले ओम्नी के प
Per un po' non ti leggevo. Ora ti leggo 
Okay. Meinem Verständnis nach soll die Scan-Warngrenze dieses Geräts die Verfolgung stoppen; und wenn die Sperre aufgehoben
Gemini 4，休斯顿 CAP C
그러면 왼쪽에 있는 두 개, 즉 세트 A를 보실 수 있을 겁니다. 바로 여기로 
Apollo 11, Houston. Das ist jetzt sehr
मैं आपको बता दूं, जब रेट्रो मॉडल धूम 
也许是吧？这一点毋庸置疑
Роджер. Ты имееш
روجر، استخدمنا نظام التحكم النبضي بأقل قدر ممكن؛ كان الهدف رقم ١٢ محجوبًا بالغيوم؛ كنتُ قد حددتُ الوقت والموقع بد
حسنًا، لنرى. لا أعرف إلى أي اتجاه أشير الآن. يبدو المنظر جيد
わかった。いつもの、
好吧，我放手吧，巴兹；它会
MA
No. We're all sitting here eating. I'm just going to get a bite to eat. Then I'll write down t
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。我认为问题在于这个姿态离
네, 이해가 갑니다.
Большое
नील, यह ह्यूस्टन है। क्या आप अपने वेंट विंडो की जांच कर 
D'accord. Le LMP est entré dan
Roger. Verstanden
Aquarius, Houston.
ठीक है। यहाँ हम इससे ज़्यादा आवाज
Roger. Will you turn 
Okay, I'm ready for you cats to transfer to LM power.
Ok. Una cosa, Joe; voglio solo ricontrollare di nuovo. Tutto ciò che n
जिन चीज़ों की हमें अभी भी ज़रूरत है, उनकी जानकारी अंतिम भंडारण से पहले, जितनी देर तक आप सुविधापूर्वक कर सकें, ले लें। और हमारे पास क्रू के अंतिम विश्रा
Роджер. У нас есть для вас кое-какая информация, которую мы рассмотрим сразу после следующего упражнения. На этот раз мы хотели бы, чтобы вы попробовали положение носа самолета на север, то есть тангаж 180 градусов и рыскание 315 градусов. Также мы хотели бы еще раз взглянуть на этот режим свободного вращения, и мы думаем, что, возможно, получ
Roger. Nous 
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आपके पास उसके लिए कुछ अल
Также имейте в виду, что ваши TPI и TPF могут быть задержаны примерно на 
Ой, черт! Как же мне теперь убрать этот козырек? И монитор т
هيوستن، أبولو 11. رون، أنا مستعد لنسخ رسالتك حول مستو
Davanti a te c'è la luce d
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11
Верно. Думаете, они будут делить окно? Никакого мыла. Также обратите внимание, ч
알았어. 디크, 내가 한번 알아듣도록 
시그마 세븐, 시그마 세븐, 여기
现在几点了，格
Okay. Jetzt nutze ich den Mond links von mir, und das hilft wirklich gut. Ich decke den Lagenanzeiger ab, damit ihr die Gierbewegung beobachten könnt. Ich deaktiviere die Kreiselsteuerung und versuche, jetzt den Fly-by-Wire-Modus für niedrige Flughöhen zu wählen. Ich positioniere den Mond zuerst in der Mitte des Sichtfelds – halte dabei Rollen und Nicken gedrückt und bringe den Mond dann wieder an seine ursprüngliche Position. Der Mond nähert sich jetzt der Mitte des Sichtfelds. Okay, ich halte ihn dort an und steuere das Rollen, um das ausz
D'accord. Demandez-lui de nous dire ce qu'il regarde. Et rappelez-lui qu'
D'accord. Vous me recevez parfaitemen
ठीक है। करूँगा। मुझे यहाँ कोई रुकावट नहीं दिख रही, चार्ली। मैं बस यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए जाँच कर रहा था, क्योंकि पिछली बार मैं 8
Я... внутри, и, судя по всему, учитывая нынешнюю холодную погоду, нам, вероятно
그는 
Теперь у Нила антенна наготове. Посмотрим, 
Gut gelesen, Wassermann. Um die Nadeln auf die Anzeige zu bringen, müssen wir das Kommandogerät hochfahren. Die Vorgehensweise er
Sì. Esiste un termine della Marin
Хорошо. Тогда нам нужен выключатель восходящего канала св
Another little of local news: the County Court House at Huntsville burned down before dawn yesterday, so it looks like they will go in the construction business there again. On the got a little bit about the waiting families. This one is by Ann James, Post reporter. "We rest on the backside of the moon," said Valerie Anders on Christmas Eve, as she and her family waited for Apollo 8 to get out of the moon orbit and head back toward home. Mrs. Anders had been 00 a.m. Tuesday, and neighbors ha
Wir versuchen gerad
ठीक है। बिल्कुल सही। ये जिम लवेल हैं। आज हम आपको अपोलो 8 के अंदर के जीवन के बारे में थोड़ा सा दिखाना चाहते थे। हमने आपको चंद्रमा के दृश्य दिखाए, पृथ्वी के दृश्य दिखाए, और अब हम आपको अपने घर में आमंत्रित करना चाहते हैं। जैसा कि आप इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर देख सकते हैं, यह कम से कम चार दिनों से हमारा घर है। हम इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर हर दिन को चिह्नित करते हैं। चार दिन पूरे हो चुके हैं, और हम पाँचवें दिन पर काम कर रहे हैं। बेशक, हम सभी शुक्रवार को
D'accord. J'
11،
Это «Дружба Семь». Топливо 62-74 [процента], кислород 64-98 [процента], ампер 23. Кон
لقد التقطت صوراً للتو
What bu
ये मुझे कुछ-कुछ टी-बर्ड की याद दिलाता है, ज
हाँ। "VHF/S-बैंड सक्रियण और जाँच" के अंतर्गत, चरण 1 को हटा दें। चरण 2 के अंतर्गत, "डाउन वॉइस बैकअप" को वॉइस में बदलें। चरण 3 को हटा दें।
收到。收
我是鲁德涅夫，电话那头是尤里·阿列克谢耶维奇。你感觉怎么样？那边有什么消息吗？你从窗户往
نعم. كانت الاضطرابات أكثر وضوحًا من عمليات الاحتراق السابقة يا تشارلي. لقد عزوتُها إلى وجود وحدة تحكم خفيفة، ولكن كان هناك دوران ملحوظ خفّ بعد أول 20 ثانية، على ما أظن، من الاحتراق؛ ولكن بعد ذلك كان هناك أيضًا بعض التذبذب في الميل والانعراج. لا أعتقد أنه كان غير طبيعي، وبدا أن نطاق الدوران ثابتًا بشكل جيد، بزيادة أو نقصان حوالي 8 درجات على جانبي خط المنتصف؛ وبعد أول 20 ثانية تقريبًا، استقرت محاور التوجيه، وكان ال
IMBAVAGLI
버스를 끄겠습니다. 그 사람들이 원했던 냉각수 밸브들을 전부 제거해서 압력을 0으로 맞출 겁니다. 그리고 벌써 보조 비상등 소리가
Okay. Fred is now going down there, and he is going to try to get underneath the sleep 
Nein, ganz sicher nicht (hust) – 
Alright. Still on page E-9 and under step 39 at the bottom of the 
짐, 방금 하신 말씀을 전부 알아듣지는 못했지만, 입국 절차 관련 자료가 언제쯤 제공될지 궁금해하시는 것 같네요. 맞다면, 대략 120시간 정도 걸릴 것 같습니다. 배터리 A 충전은 다른 분들이 일어나서 도와드리는 대로 바로 진행하려고 합니다. 이미 일부 절차는
今、時間があるうちに、で
13, ici Houston. Nous aimerions que vous nous fassiez un état des lieux de vos aff
Tranquility, Houston. Abbiamo ricevuto indicazioni che lo scambiatore di calore dell'elio del carburante di disc
Fred, in etwa 4 Minuten werden wir Sie an eine andere Kommuni
Das ist bestätigt. Lage: Rollen 0 Grad, Gieren 2 Grad rechts, Nicken -33 Grad. Alle Werte ze
I'm alr
还有一样东西——你给我的那件，标价2
روجر دودجر. رحلة أ
ज़्यादा फ़र्क़ नहीं पड़ा। मैं पहले 2 इंच तक तो आसानी से ठोक पाया, लेकिन फिर जैसे-जैसे मैं उसे पूरी ताकत से 
稍等。我们让医生检查一下。巴兹，
Nous avons l'impression d'êtr
Roger. Nous étions sur le scanner secondaire pendant un bon moment. Nous sommes de retour sur le scanner princ
Tranquillité, ici Houston. Nous avons égale
Okay, Jack. It appears that we're going - funny diversion here, the attitude in - in pitch. I'm going to do a check now, but the last time the Moon went around, it was above - way away above the angle and I see the Earth coming around now which is going to be pretty low. They oscillate back and forth, but each time they seem to get a little farther away from the center line. You might think of some
Ok. Esaminando le previsioni meteo che ti ho fornito, i 600 metri di dislivello nel punto di destinazione potrebbero avere uno strato di 1800 metri di di
That
네, 짐. 저희는 사령선에서 더 나은 별 관측을 위해 발사대 자세와는 다른 자세로 이동하는 것에 대해 이야기해 왔습니다. 저희가 부탁드리고 싶은 것은 다음과 같습니다. 지금 또는 곧 원하는 자세를 예측하여 그 자세로 이동하신 후, 해당 자세에 대한 대략적인 짐벌 각도를 계산할 수 있도록 도와주시겠습니까? 선택하신 자세로 이동하신 후, 해당 자세를 유지하시고, 저희에게 짐벌 각도를 알려주시면, 저희가 그 값을 바탕으로 대략적인 짐벌 각도를 계산할 수
وأكواريوس، هيوستن. بدأنا نفكر في تراكم ثاني أكسيد الكربون
Joe, ont-ils jamais compris ce qu'était ce carburant 
Roger. If I use just one fan - You mentioned about coveri
जब हमने गति को उस स्तर तक कम कर लिया जहाँ हमें लगा कि हम सुरक्षित रूप से डॉक से अलग हो सकते हैं, तो हमने ऐसा किया और एजेना से कुछ फीट प्रति सेकंड की
Ora... potresti darmi un'occhiata, io... sono... sono pronto a partire quando vuoi
حسناً، أنت 
Roger. Aktuelles zu Luna 15: TASS meldete heute Morgen, dass die Raumsonde in eine Umlaufbahn nahe der Mondoberfläche gebracht wurde und al
36岁半…
私たちがしなければならないのは、
好的。来自英国乔德雷尔班克天文台，美联社报道：英国乔德雷尔班克大型射电望远镜于美国东部时间今天下午5点49分停止接收来自苏联无人登月探测器“月球15号”的信号。一位发言人表示，“月球15号”飞船似乎“已经飞越月球”。另一则消息称：“我们认为它没有着陆，”天文台台长伯纳德·洛弗尔爵士的发言人说道。华盛顿合众国际社报道：副总统斯皮罗·T·阿格纽呼吁在2000年前将人类送上火星，但民主党领导人回应称，必须优先考虑地球上的需求。阿格纽是周三阿波罗11号发射时在场的最高级别政府官员，他当时说“依我之见，我们应该在本世纪末之前将人类送上火星”，显然他当时是在代表自己，而不是代表尼克松政府。德克萨斯州拉雷多，美联社报道：新拉雷多的移民官员周三宣布，
Okay. I got the idea. Okay. Let m
아니, 정말이에요. 아주 흥미롭게도, 지금 지도를
وجاك، يمكنك أن تخبر أوين موريس
Quad C est la température la plus élevée que
Хорошо. А как насчет показаний батареи и зарядного устрой
Okay. Wir benötigen die Eingabetaste ENTER, dann 333 ENTER und anschließend den Wert von Register 1. Wir e
Ja, das war ein ordentlicher K
Кормовая часть состоит из 27 суд
रॉजर। कृपया ध्यान दें, हमने अभी-अभी एक HF टेस्ट 31 किया है और रेंज पर मौजूद किसी भी स्टेशन से कोई प्रतिक्रिया नहीं मिली है। क्या आपको पता है कि कोई स्टेशन हमें 
No, don't thru
I've got 140 (degrees) here. And the trend has been 
حس
Roger. On a bien senti la poussée supplémentaire quand on a bascul
Okay, Charlie. Ich habe die Notfallchecklis
Apoll
Ja. Der Punkt ist, dass man, zumindest in der jetzigen Ausrichtung, sozusagen warten muss, bis die Sonne nicht mehr von ihr reflek
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। अब आप कैस
حسنًا يا فريدو. هذه هي التغييرات. ليست واسعة النطاق كما كانت سابقًا، لكنها لا تزال طويلة جدًا.
네, 저희도 여기서 그의 소리를 들을 수 
Roger, 11. Wir würden gerne in naher Zukunft bei Ihnen zu e
Und, Houston, habt ihr ein Fernse
Beim ersten Mal – beim zweiten Versuch gelang mir die Messung dann doch recht genau. Ich benutzte keinen Filter und nutzte die Oberseite des Glühens der dicken Luftschicht. Es ist ziemlich ungenau – man muss sein Auge quasi kalibrieren und versuchen, jedes Mal denselben Punkt zu treffen. Für diese Messungen ist absolute Präzision erforderlich. Man kann nicht erwarten, diese Messungen ohne Treibstoff durchzuführen. Da
ठीक है। दूसरा चरण, बेनेट धूमकेतु को 32 घंटे तक देखने का है - हम चाहते हैं कि तस्वीरें तब ली जाएं जब अंतरिक्ष यान शुरू करने से पहले जितना स्थिर हो सके उतना स्थिर हो। स्थ
Roger. Tu ferais mieux
D'accord, Jack. Nous avons une ALARME PRINCIPALE et le voyant de la bat
알겠습니다. 제가 못 볼 경우를 대비해서, 전등을 켜는 방법이
那一定是他们的纪录吧？我记得他们在莱斯体
This is Apollo 8, coming to you live from the moon. We've had to switch the TV cameras now. We showed you first a view of earth as we've been watching it for the past 16 hours. Now we're switching so that we can show you the moon that we've been flying over at 60 miles altitude for the last 16 hours. Bill Anders, Jim Lovell, and myself have spent the day before Christmas up here doing experiments, taking pictures, and firing our spacecraft engines to maneuver around. What we will do now is follow the trail that we've been following all day and take you on through to a lunar sunset. The moon is a different thing to each one of us. I think that e
Tu sais combien de fois j'ai fa
是的。我猜它现在正在进行24分钟的热身
Eagle, Columbia. Ich habe Sie in einer Umlaufbahn 49,5 mal 4
D'accord. Puissance 6. D'accord. Puissance 6 correspond au panneau 11. Suivez le schéma, à l'exception des disjoncteurs que j'ai indiqués. La première ligne est correcte. Ou plutôt, la première rangée. Deuxième rangée: QUAD 4, TCA, fermé; QUAD 3, TCA, fermé; QUAD 2, TCA, fermé; et QUAD 1, TCA, fermé. Le reste de cette rangée est correct. Troisième rangée, à peu près au milieu: ATCA (PGNS), fermé. D'accord. Le reste de cette ligne est correct. Quatrième ligne: CHAUFFAGE - veille. D'accord. Cette ligne est entièrement correcte, à l'exception des trois derniers disjoncteurs, Fred, sous « VEILLE », qui indiquent « FONCTIONNEMENT ». Ces trois-là doivent être fermés, au moins pour le moment. Enfin, la cinquième ligne est correcte
Seven, this is Cape. Do you ha
حسناً يا فريد، لقد بدأت 
ठीक है। प्रतीक्षा करें
夏威夷首都通讯中心。我快了4秒。
Du côté du sport, voici quelques nouvelles. Pendant que vous étiez occupé l'autre jour, Joe Namath et le commissaire de la NFL, Pete Rozelle, ont annoncé que « Broadway Joe » avait accepté de vendre ses parts dans le restaurant Bachelors III et de rejoindre les Jets de New York. Joe est arrivé aujourd'hui au camp d'entraînement des Jets et a effectué sa première séance. Plusieurs autres joueurs des Jets, qui avaient fait grève avec lui, ont également rejoint l'équipe. Davy Hill, originaire de Jackson, dans le Michigan, a remporté son troisième tournoi majeur de golf en autant de participations la semaine dernière. Il a gagné le Philadelphia Classic. Hill a remporté quatre tournois cette année et est le joueur ayant accumulé le plus de gains avec la coquette somme de 129 000 $. En baseball, la division Ouest de la Ligue nationale reste très disputée. Los Angeles et San Francisco sont à un match des Astros d'Atlanta, leaders du championnat. Les Astros affichent un
Bitte warten Sie. Ich werde Ihnen die genaue Zahl mitteil
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。如果您有时间，我们想测试一下合适的甚高频天
罗杰。好的，舱压仍然保持在5.5，自从我们离开后就一直是这个数值。舱温90%，相对湿度现在又回升到36%左右，冷却剂用量也略有下降，可能是因为湿度上升了这么多，之前下降了20%左右，所以某
У меня есть (ретро-ракета номер) 1, и она держится очень крепко. Очень крепко. У меня есть 2, и мои взгляды абсолютно в
无论我做什么，都阻止不了。往任何方
11، هيوستن. الآن أصبح المنظر جيداً لمنطقة
अब क्या हुआ, 
OK, configuration du panneau 11, rangée du haut: BUS CA B, ANTENNE BANDE S, OUVERT; BUS CA A, MAGICIEN, OUVERT. Deuxième rangée, sous SYSTÈME A, SOV PRINCIPAL via QUAD 1 TCA, tous FERMÉS. POINTEUR X DU COMMANDANT sous AFFICHAGES DE VOL, OUVERT; CHAUFFAGE DE VEILLE DU RADAR DE RENDEZ-VOUS, OUVERT; CHAUFFAGE DU RADAR D'ATTERRISSAGE, OUVERT. Disjoncteur DIRECT D'ATTITUDE, FERMÉ; ED: ALIMENTATION LOGIQUE A, OUVERT; UTILITAIRE, OUVERT. Sous: VENTILATEUR DE 
خمس كرات
Хоро
알겠습니다. 네, 꼭 시도해 보겠습
Понял. Вам нужно будет включить квадрокоптеры Alfa и Bravo с помощью переключателей автоматического выбора. Отключите Charlie и
是的
روج
टीआर-10 सामान्य स्थिति में आ गया है। मैंने यह पहले भी किया है। ठीक है, सूट का दबाव सही है। इनवर्टर को फिर से देख लीजिए। 250 डिग्री पर 141 डिग्री है, 150 डिग्री पर लग
जो, मुझे नहीं लगत
Roger. À 74 h 30, nous vous demandons de mettre en marche les ventilateurs des quatre cuves cryogéniques et de régler les résistances chauffantes des quatre cuves sur la position AUTO. Nous effectuons cette opération en amont afin d'éviter toute déstratification 
好的。为了进行天线切换，我想我们需要将 AUX 磁带开关和磁带前进开关都关闭；然后我们将在全向天线的 Br
ज
OK. Ceci est un 9, /: 45597, moins 040, plus 157, plus 34188, moins 01353, plus 00780 180 008 001, Novembre Alfa, plus 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, bas 131, gauche 28, plus 0758, moins 16500 12987 36277; étoile principale Sirius, secondaire
Ok, Fred-o, ti chiediamo di prendere la lista di controllo delle emergenze; ​
Привет, Джек. Мы тебе покажем процедуру
... qu
Bien, 11. Il s'avère que les performances du moteur lors de vos deux allumages effectués jusqu'à présent dans cette mission sont identiques à celles des tests de réception du moteur. L'affichage de l'ordinateur de bord est dû à un facteur d'étalonnage connu du manomètre entre la pression réelle dans la chambre et la pression affichée. En fonctionnement mono-rangée, no
Bien reçu. Ici Friendship Seven. Mon statut: je suis en ligne, mais la connexion n'est pas stable. Mon problème de lacet s'est inversé. Au début du vol, lorsque j'ai rencontré des difficultés au-dessus de la côte ouest des États-Unis, j'avais un problème de lacet, sans poussée minimale à gauche; maintenant, j'ai de la poussée dans cette direction, mais pas à droite. Lorsque la capsule déri
Apollo 11, 
로
Okay. Für den Brennvorgang gehen wir zu GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, ATTITUDE CONTROL. Die
完毕。好的。5000英尺/秒，100英尺/秒的速度不错，我要检查一下姿态控制
In secondo luogo, torneremo alla linea temporale nominale con il tuo risveglio programmato di 121 ore e
रॉजर। आखिरकार, 50 लोगों द्वारा इस समस्या पर विचार करने के बाद हमें इस पर सहमति मि
ここでも、ある意味では同じこ
Okay. Alles klar, Jim, und so geht's weiter. Das ist die Startrampe für Start +60. Der G
Это «Дружба номер семь», мы
Okay. Ich habe folgende Details zum Flu
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Через пару 
Хорошо, Джо. Как тебе п
Buzz, hier spricht Houston. Falls du noch in
I have completed my day yaw checks. I am very sa
روجر
26, 36 футов в секунду вверх. Будьте осторожны с опрокидыванием. Очень плавно. Балансировочная пара ВЫКЛ. Очень тихая езд
Okay. I'll read these in bunches of thr
Okay. Next, panel 3: TRANSPONDER, PRIMARY; POWER AMPL, to PRIMARY, that's a verify; POWER AMPL, HIGH; MODE, VOICE, to OFF; POWER,, to NORMAL; PMP to NORMAL; S-BAND ANTENNA, OMNI D, that's Delta. Okay, why don't you read th
عندما نصل إلى الولايات المتحدة التالية، دعنا نجربها لمدة خمس دقائق ت
收到。请检查一下你的上行遥测开关是否设置为 BLOCK 状态
Si può anche usare la gravità zero per dimostrare molte cose che abbiamo imparato a scuola. Vorrei dimostrare brevemente quanto sia facile spiegare il funzionamento del giroscopio. Se faccio ruotare questa lattina, sappiamo che, secondo le equazioni del moto, ci aspetteremmo che, una volta che le viene data una rotazione e ha un asse di rotazione in questa direzione, se le diamo una particolare coppia, e lo farò spingendo le mie mani contro di essa in questo modo mentre gira. Dalle equazioni possiamo prevedere 
Х
COMMAND
Okay; right. Okay. I'm ready to start into the procedure. When you answer me back, speak up - speak up into the microphone, because our downlink is pretty noisy. The first thing we want you to do, and we'll do this on one canister, and then let you go ahead and repeat it on the second. So take one of the s and cut off the outer bag. By cutting along one the heat seals; do it carefully and close t
Roger. Wir haben hier einige hervorragende Daten, Ea
روجر. فهمت يا جيميني، وأعلم أنهم يخططون للدخول إلى منطقة -3. إنهم يبحثون ف
알겠습니다. 다음 중간 지점, 즉 진입 인터페이스에서 2시간 전을 기준으로 초당 1.4피트의 연소
Je ne sais pas. Le soleil te tape vraiment dans les yeux, Gus. Je ne pense pas qu'on va essayer. Ed a essayé de dormir avec son casque relevé puis baissé, et là, il vient de le relever. Il a vraiment du mal avec le soleil. 
حسنًا، لقد شهدنا عاصفة ثلجية قوية هنا في الغرب الأوسط؛ لا أعرف إن كان بإمكانكم رؤيتها من هناك أم لا.
روجر، أنا سعيدٌ لأنك مس
حسنًا، لم يكن لدينا متسع من الوقت يا هيوستن لنحدثكم عن المناظر التي رأيناها من النافذة أثناء استعدادنا للإقلاع؛ ولكن حتى ذلك الحين، كان بإمكاننا رؤية الجزء ال
Hell
Ok. Ottimo affare, Frank. L'altra cosa 
الأمور تسير على ما يرام حتى الآن يا تشارلي. لقد ركبنا واحدة على مسدس الماء والأخرى على الصنبور في الأسفل، ولدينا مشكلة واحدة فقط، وهي تسرب الماء من نقطة اتصال كيس الطعام بفلتر الماء. مع ذلك، وبغض النظر عن هذه المشكلة، يبدو أنهما يعملان بشكل جيد. في البداية، كان هناك بعض الغاز يتسرب، وأع
Je crois que vous vouliez ça, Jack, et le présent est de 9
Okay. Vuoi che elimini "Per 30 s
了解、カナリア。これを受け取る前に電波が途切れる。写真を撮りたい。ムチア、いや、訂正するならカノに、この順番で送ってもらって。日没、日の出、
わかった。でも、戻れるなら何も変わらないと思う。プラットフォーム、
さて
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Вы можете отстыковаться в удобное для вас время, поправка, сбросить корабль в удобное для вас время. Мы хотели бы, что
Роджер. Мы исходим из принципа "предупреждаем заранее". Имейте в виду, что тренажера у нас нет, поэтому мы не сможем провести вам тест типа 1
D'accord. Le seul commentaire est que la situation s'est détériorée au point que la Lune apparaît maintenant par la fenêtre d'amarrage supérieure, pendant une partie de chaque passage, et à peu près à ce moment-là, je perds la communication sur l'une ou l'autre antenne. Il y aura donc
시간을 잘못 입력하신 것 같습니다. 중간
Ok, facciamone un'altra
आज दोपहर, जिम। उम्मीद है कि मैं भी आपके आने के कुछ ही देर बाद वहाँ
ठीक है। आपका इवेंट टाइमर उलटी गिनती शुरू
रिकॉर्डर की बैटरी खत
ठीक है। हम चाहते हैं - स्पैन के लोग कहते हैं कि यह ठीक लग रहा है - उन्हें लगता है कि एक हेलमेट पर लगेगा जो आप बी1 में पहनने वाले हैं, और दूसरा माइक के हेलमेट पर लगाया जा
Хоро
Bene, ora siamo quasi sopra Maske
네, 알겠습니다. 저희는 만약 수동 ON, 아니 자동 ON을 얻지 못할 경우를 대비해, 점화 후 1초 뒤 하강 엔진 명령 오버라이드의 중단 단계를 사용하여 후진할 것입니다. 17페이지, -4분 지점으로 돌아가서 "CB(11) INVERTER 2"라고 되어 있는데, "CB(16) INVERT
ठीक है, पि
Quanto tempo ci hai
Roger. Parfait. Nous avons rencontré des problèmes de transmission lors de votre précédent vol. Nous venons de recevoir un message du Cap: économisez le carburant. J’ai écouté une partie de votre transmission vers Zanzibar et je c
好的，然后跳到大约 159:28。划掉
Bene. Eccoci qui. L'interesse per il volo dell'Apollo 11 continua a essere elevato, ma un interesse concorrente nell'area di Houston è l'allentamento delle norme sull'irrigazione. Il sindaco Louie Welch promette la revoca delle restrizioni sull'irrigazione dei prati se le piogge continuano. Venerdì è parzialmente nuvoloso e c'è una probabilità del 30% di temporali nel pomeriggio. A Washington, D.C., la Commissione
加上正常配
Чарли, завтра мы переставим наши вещи, максимально приблизив их к штатным. Вот некоторые вещи, которые будут не соответствовать штатным: забрала были возвращены в командный модуль, и мы пока не нашли для них место. Мы сообщим вам, куда их деть. Кроме того, около 5 фунтов разного веса из отсека Able 8 займут место защитных ш
لقد كنت أقوم بذلك من خلال وحدة إدارة المعلومات ال
罗杰。约翰，你的截获非常出色。你的速度比标准速度
कृपया ध्यान दें कि पिछली बार जब मैंने एमएससी पास के दौरान विसंगति का सामन
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 여기는 휴스턴이에요. 파워 앰프 회로 차단기를 내려주시겠어요? 그러면 고속 비트 전송이 가능해질
Se non parlo più di questo, non ci vorrà molto per registrare in tempo reale questo registratore. Ci stiamo avvicinando. È abbastanza ovvio che non ti importa davvero quale sia il tuo atteggiamento. C'è sempre la preoccupazione di cercare di tornare all'atteggiamento che dovresti avere. S
Beim Masters stand es unentschieden, und wir warten gespannt. Nach 72 Löchern lagen Littler und Casper gleichauf, und es wird, wie wir erfahren haben, am 
Ich sage Ihnen, ich habe keine Lust mehr, m
هل سنحصل على قفل خلال 15 
Buzz, qui Ho
プラットフォーム並列処理テストを短縮することになったとしても、私たちはそれ
好的，Fred-o。这是机动垫显示器 PC 加 2 小时；所有 N/A 直到你到达纬度 -21.65，-165.00，1
ठीक है। हो सकता है, चार्ली। शुरुआती कुछ निशानों में शायद मुझे उप-तारकीय बिंदु की सटीक जानकारी नहीं थी। मुझे लगता है कि समय के साथ-साथ वे अधिक सटीक होते जा रह
You had your transmitter keyed,
地平线景色优美，引人入胜。太阳在左侧，大概——嗯，我猜是40度左右。可以看到地球表
水を大量に飲んだのに、まだ喉が渇いているんです。実は、小便
Rog
Hey, I'm pointing it at the front hatch now. Ever
La prossima voce che s
好的。目前有一个方案听起来不错：如果让吉姆通过望远镜进行评估，你只需按照原计划操作，转身180度，让头部朝上，然后让吉姆通过望远镜进行跟踪。这样，当你拿起电视机之类的设备时，你的飞行姿态仍然会保持偏航角。看起来这样应该可以涵盖所有情况。我们可以采用这个方案
계
रॉजर। पैनल का संक्
حسنًا. البطارية 
Ok. Ricontrollerò tutt
Ces hamacs, soit dit en passant, sont très confortables. Lorsque nous en avons entendu pa
Okay. Dies ist die Vorgehensweise zum Laden von BAT Baker. Bedienfeld 3: BAT LADEN, AUS; Bedienfeld 5: HAUPTBUSVERBINDUNG, BAT A/C an A/C; CB BAT LADER, BAT A LADEN, öffnen; CB BAT LADER, BAT B LADEN, schließen. Bedienfeld 250: CB BAT B STROMEINTRITT und NACHLANDUNG, schließen. Bedienfeld 5: HAUPTBUSVERBINDUNG, BAT B/C, AUS; Bedienfeld 3: BAT LADEN an B. Dies ist eine DELTA-Anweisung für den e
Аквариус, Хьюстон. Что касается баллончиков с CO2, кстати, сейчас здесь PCO2 показывает 1,6. Мы ожидаем, что сможем использовать еще 6 часов с двумя имеющимися у нас баллончиками — как минимум 6 часов. Однако, через 112 часов, когда у нас будет несколько человек, мы установим еще два, и у нас есть новая упрощенная процедура для этого. Тем 
D'accord. Nous avions un voyant - MODULE DE SERVICE B, prise, en raison de
L
Les deux commentaires supplém
ヒューストン、こちらアポロ8号です。こちらを見失いました。分離操作は少し遅れるかもしれませんが、そうでなければ、こちらを見失うこ
روجر. مناورة
Da ist die alte Corona Australis, die sieht man ja wunderbar, und wir haben die Nunki. Wir haben auch die Kaus Australis, und die Nunki ist genau auf der Flugroute, wo sie hingehört. Ich lese 0° Gieren, 5° Rollen nach links, im Rückwärtsgang. Ich wüsste wirklich gern, warum das so kompliziert ist. Und über denen sollte ich noch eine helle Maschine entdecken. Das muss die Altair sein. Sehr gut. Man hat tatsächlich das Gefühl, dass man auf diesem Flug ga
You say Jack is on the 
Roger, don't worry about that one in Africa because that is some 19
Roger. Il me semble que, puisque nous connaissons les orbites avec une telle précision, la position des étoiles avec une telle exactitude, et l'heure du co
रॉजर। क्या आप कृपया पुष्टि कर सकते हैं या बता सकते हैं कि आप किस एस-बैंड एंटीना कॉन्फ
Roger, Apollo 8. Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Bitte bestätigen Sie die Aktualisierung mit ACCEPT. Der Statusvektor wird an Ihre Seite gesendet. Wir möchten Sie bitten, F
Хорошо. Угол тангажа 10, угол рыскания 45.
Roger, 13-BRAVO; 146, 03+32. 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 27 11. 56 46. 3+17, 8+36. 
分かりました。引き継ぎを理解してください。通信が失われる可
Ok. Abbiamo circa tre punti. Il primo è che tutto il tuo lotto - due punti sono stati valutati e - Ehi, congratulazioni. Sembra davvero bello; ne sono molto soddisfatti. Sei sceso a 4 minuti d'arco sull'aspetto substellare, e questa è la prima cosa da menzionare. Il secondo è che, a meno che tu non ne veda la necessità, non vedo alcuna necessità che tu rilegga le informazioni che ti ab
네, 여기 
Questo è certo. Possiamo procedere e avra
Хорошо. И позвольте мне расс
ثيتا، 11.8؛ المدى 68.90؛ إجمالي دلتا-في 232؛ دلتا-في 101.1؛ نقطة البيانات كانت 05:40. البيانات 12.5 ثيتا؛ 63.75 في المدى؛ إجمالي دلتا-في 199؛ دلتا-في 84.2. نقطة البيانات 40:... 13.5 ثيتا؛ 61.19 المدى؛ إجمالي دلتا-في 181؛ دلتا-في 74.8. 12:20: ثيتا 13.7؛ المدى 58.63؛ إجمالي دلتا-في 169؛ دلتا-في 69.5؛ 40: ثيتا 15.5؛ المدى 53.55؛ إجمالي دلتا-في
Аполлон-11, это Хьюс
Houston, 
Роджер: Начинаю проверку скафандра. Че
Что ж, мы пробовали это вчера вечером несколько раз, со скорост
Мы вовремя. Включаем двигатель, и я сбавлю скорость. 
Scusami,
오로라 세븐. RSCS가 작동
Nous ret
Nicht zu lange. Okay, Wechselrichter 2... Hier, Jim, halt mal kurz die Lampe an. Genau hier am... Bedienfeld. Halt s
네, 죄송합니다. 그것들을 
Affermativo. Hai interrotto la discussione per un minuto, Jim. Lo faremo sulla palla partendo dall'assetto di partenza. Vogliamo solo che tu ruoti di 90 gradi in entrambe le direzioni, mantieni beccheggio 0 e imbardata 0. Ora, passo 3; "Quando sei in
알겠습니다. 저희 설정이 현지에서 어떻게 작동하는 것처럼
Beh, non possiamo osservare molto verde dall
こちらはシグマ・セブン。日の出の中、90度のヨー角で逆さまに飛行しているような映像です。自分の進路方向が最もはっきりと分かります。まるで列車の窓から外を眺めているようです。目の前を通り過ぎる地形が見えます。さまざまな種類の雲があります。機体の縦軸に対して-90度の90度平面
حسنًا. من جودريل بانك، إنجلترا، عبر وكالة أسوشيتد برس: توقف تلسكوب جودريل بانك الراديوي البريطاني الضخم عن استقبال الإشارات من مركبة لونا 15 الفضائية السوفيتية غير المأهولة التي أُرسلت إلى القمر، وذلك في تمام الساعة 5:49 صباحًا بتوقيت شرق الولايات المتحدة اليوم. وقال متحدث باسم المرصد إن المركبة الفضائية لونا 15 بدت وكأنها "تجاوزت القمر". وفي تصريح آخر، قال متحدث باسم السير برنارد لوفيل، مدير المرصد: "لا نعتقد أنها هبطت". واشنطن، وكالة يونايتد برس إنترناشونال: دعا نائب الرئيس سبيرو تي. أغنيو إلى إرسال إنسان إلى المريخ بحلول عام 2000، لكن قادة الحزب الديمقراطي ردوا بأن الأولوية يجب أن تُعطى للاحتياجات على الأرض. ويبدو أن أغنيو، المسؤول الحكومي الرفيع الذي حضر إطلاق أبولو 11 يوم الأربعاء، كان يتحدث باسمه وليس بالضرورة باسم إدارة نيكسون عندما قال: "في رأيي، يجب أن نرسل إنسانًا إلى المريخ بحلول نهاية هذا القرن". لاريدو، تكساس، وكالة أسوشيتد برس: أعلن مسؤولو الهجرة في نويفو لاريدو يوم الأربعاء أنه سيتم رفض منح بطاقات سياحية لدخول المكسيك للهيبيين ما لم يستحموا ويقصوا شعرهم. قال هوبيرتو كازاراس، رئيس إدارة الهجرة المكسيكية في نويفو لاريدو، إن السلطات في مكسيكو سيتي وأكابولكو وغيرها من المواقع السياحية الشهيرة قد تلقت شكاوى بشأن مجموعة من الهيبيين. وذكرت وكالة يونايتد برس إنترناشونال أن رد الفعل الأولي على قرار الرئيس نيكسون بمنح يوم الاثنين عطلة رسمية للموظفين الفيدراليين للاحتفال بيوم وطني لإحياء ذكرى مهمة أبولو 11 للهبوط على سطح القمر، كان في معظمه دهشة. وكتب رودني بيدنر، من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في لندن: "أوروبا مفتونة بمهمة أبولو 11. فقد ملأت الصحف في جميع أنحاء القارة صفحاتها بصور صاروخ ساتورن 5 وهو ينطلق ليُنشئ أول اتصال بين الأرض وقمرها الطبيعي. وقد بذل كتّاب العناو
Read you loud and clear a
حسناً. سيستغرق الأمر منا حو
Подтвержд
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Приня
D'accord. Si vous avez tout fait le reste, que diriez-vo
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。CWGのパッチを皆さんに見せて
알겠습니다. 
I'm now starting to see the sunrise in the periscope. First light in the periscope during this particular orbit as a result of the night side. It is obvious that the periscope has no function whatsoever in retroattitude on the night side. First light that I get is right now at a of practically. The sunrise is coming in rather rapidly through the periscope. I do have the lighted objects that John mentioned, and I can create some by knocking them off. I definitely have a sensation of their being a field and varying in size from small to bright. The periscope itself is blinding me. I'll
Jim, bitte deaktiviere für heute Abend die Quadranten C und D
Это «Дружба Семь». Гироспинки вернулись 
Je voudrais dire un mot sur le sextant. Son utilisation dans un vaisseau spatial exigu est très difficile, surtout avec le casque. J'ai finalement conclu qu'il serait inutile, avec le casque, d'essayer de prendre les angles requis pour les étoiles visées. J'ai donc retiré mon casque. Cela m'a donné un peu plus de liberté de mouvement, mais j'étais toujours limité à des angles d'environ 20 à 23° sans manœuvrer le vaisseau. L'étoile était alors masquée par la partie supérieure du hublot. En manœuvrant le vaisseau plus fréquemment et plus amplement, on pourrait aligner le grand axe du hublot avec le plan de visée. Mais, limités par le carburant, nous n'avons pas opté pour cette méthode. Nous avons également utilisé le mode pulsé, sans trop de manœuvres. Les étoiles sélectionnées pour cette campagne avaient des angles assez élevés, ce qui rendait l'horizon difficile à atteindre. Nous avons finalement décidé de les photographier un peu plus près de l'horizon. J'ai effectué quelques mesures sur Canopus et quelques autres télescopes, comme vous le remarquerez. Le filtre bleu semblait masquer complètement l'horizon; je ne voyais aucun horizon avec ce filtre. La qualité de notre image de l'horizon est probablement moins bonne en présence de lune. Le filtre vert, en revanche, m'a permis d'obtenir un horizon légèrement plus net qu'avec l'absence totale de filtre. Je n'ai rencontré aucune difficulté pour effectuer ces mesures, que ce soit avec le filtre vert ou le filtre transparent. Cependant, l'horizon reste mal défini et il est nécessaire de se standardiser et de mesurer au même endroit qu'auparavant afin d'obtenir une mesure fiable. Personnellement, j'ai trouvé plus facile de m
안 돼, 브루스. 위도(2의
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 인
Ja, das werden wir, Frank. Bitte warte
네, 알겠습니다. 준비되셨다고 읽은 것 같은데... 이어폰을 깜빡했네요. 간단히 설명드리자면, 커맨드 모듈에서 카트리지 한 쌍을 더 꺼내고, 회색 접착 테이프를 접착면이 바깥쪽으로 향하게 해서 새 카트리지 윗부분 양쪽에 둘러 붙입니다. 그런 다음, 큐 카드 한 장을 2~3인치 정도의 정사각형으로 네 조각 잘라서 직각으로 구부려 모서리 지지대를 만들고, 이 지지대를 접착 테이프에 붙여서 기존 카트리지 위로 겹치도록 합니다. 마지막으로 기존 카트리지를 새 카트리지 옆에 놓고 테이프로
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。クルーの状況報告と、先ほどCO2ボンベを交換したことの確認が取れれば、ベッドに寝かせて「おやすみなさい」と挨拶する準備はできていま
هيوستن، قمنا بعملية الاحتراق عند 7.7 زائد X زائد 00001 Y؛ وجميع قيم Z أصفار. زوايا الجيمبال: الدوران 180، والميل 31
ठीक है। यह प्लस 11 है, /। यह 40 माइनस 163, प्लस 129, माइनस 005, 99, प्लस 00 00 0, प्लस 47016, 177 143 000 नवंबर अल्फा, प्लस 001 97 47 020 5 51 468 18 12 12 83 257 023, ऊपर 263, बाएँ 17, प्लस 11 95, माइनस 165 00 126 83 356 08, उत्तर तारे; 068 097 356, कोई उलेज नहीं। तेज़ वापसी के लिए, हिंद महासागर के लिए 7900, एमएस के लिए उच्च गति प्रक्रिया 
Zu diesem Zeitpunkt, kurz vor Sonnenuntergang, sehen wir eine ganze Ladung weißer Partikel. Sie erscheinen am blauen Himmel. Ich kann den Horizo
Corona Australis arr
ठीक 
Bitte beachten Sie, dass Ed um diese Zeit anfangen wird, zu versuchen,
D'accord. À suivre. Houston, avez-vous 
Antennenstrahlbreite für h
حسنًا يا جون. سنبدأ العمل على هذا الأمر. أودّ أن أطلعك على درجات حرارة ا
Et tu as raison, J
了解しました。パネル275の回路ブレーカーMAIN 
هذا صحيح، والمنطقة المحيطة بالقمر بأكمله الآن، السماء وال
삽입 후 점검 목록. 이제.
Hé, j
Carnarvon's acquisition 11 5
That's correct, Apollo 8. And we'll have a couple more things for you before too long. We're working on a flyby at this time. And we're going to be talking
Neil, this is Houston. We're estimating about 10 minutes for the docu
Okay. Und die Reaktion
रॉजर। सूर्यो
То самое... сейчас это
8 دق
Theta, 11.8; range 68.90; Delta-V total is 232; Delta-VI is 101.1; data point was 05:40. Data 12.5 Theta; 63.75 in range; Delta-V total, 199; Delta-VI, 84.2. Data point 40:... 13.5 Theta; 61.19 range; Delta-V total is 181; Delta-VI, 74.8. 12:20: Theta is 13.7; R, 58.63; Delta-V total is 169; Delta-VI i
No, no. It's a happy home here. It'd be nice to have company. As a matter of fact, it'd be nice to have a couple of hundred million Americans up 
La première fois que j'ai essayé, j'ai obtenu une mesure assez précise. Sans filtre, j'ai utilisé la lueur superficielle de l'épaisse couche de luminescence atmosphérique. C'est assez nébuleux; il faut se familiariser avec la mesure et essayer de viser toujours au même endroit. Ces mesures exigent une maîtrise parfaite de l'attitude. Impossible de les effectuer sans carburant. La fenêtre de visée est très réduite: il faut repérer l'étoile et la ramener vers l'horizon en gardant l'horizon et l'étoile dans le champ
Хорошо. А вы поверите, что С
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لدينا المتجه في البداية على متن ا
Roger. Seguono i TIG: fase 103 40, me
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben etwas Schwierigkeiten, die Gierrate
And, Fred, on this jerry-rigged command module lithium hydroxide canister, what we're going to do is we're going to have to make at least two up and use two at a time - one on each set of hoses. What we'll do 
Houston, Apollo 11. Sulla velocità 0,7, la velocità cari
Es sieht so aus, als ob wir im abgeschalteten Zustand (unleserlich) immer noch knapp 11 Ampere ziehen. An Anschluss 1 liegen 10 Ampere an, an Anschluss 2 etwas weniger als 11. Die Position des Sicherungsseils bzw. der Kabelbefestigung an der Außenluke erschwerte jegliche Außenbordeinsätze aufg
로저. 알겠습니다. 참고로 말씀드리자면, 혹시 현장에서 직접 확인해 보셨나요? 저희가 항법에 사용한 항성 상태 벡터를 기준으로 고도를 계산해 보니 84.7마일이 나왔고
Roll 没
फ्लैग लॉक्स की पूरी तर
D'accord, Jim. Voici une mise à jour du plan de vol. Le contrôle de visibilité de l'étoile est effectué, et il semble que Navi soit toujours notre étoile. Les valeurs correspondantes sont: roulis 102,6, tangage 328,9 et lacet 346,3. Cela donne un axe et un tourillon de zéro. Si tu
Okay. Appreciate that
In the American League, Detroit beat Cleveland 4 to no
크기가 상당히 크지만, 원하는 방향으
了解。2番目のエラーを修正したアルファ3は03 + 11 + 26
И 11, Хьюстон. У нас к вам просьба. Что касается клапана надду
Okay, ich geh
Хорошо. Теперь, когда мы вернемся к процедур
Я думаю, что экстраполировать все, что вы получаете от этой работы с битами, 
फ्रैंक, क्या आ
... ये सभी पृथ्वी के है
Хорошо. Ну, я не знаю, сможем ли мы так долго этим заниматься, и я собираюсь убрать все остальные эксперименты, стереоскопическое изображение или другие виды фотографии, и мы немного устали; я хочу использовать
ठीक है। चलिए देखते हैं कि मैंने सब कुछ सही समझा है या नहीं। सबसे पहले, हमें CB 16 INVERTER 2 को बंद करना है, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2 को भी बंद करना है। फिर पैनल 14 पर, INVERTER 2 के चयन की पुष्टि करें। और CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 को भी बंद करें, दोनों ब्रेकर। फिर हमें RENDEZVOUS RADAR RELEASE हैंडल को खींचना है। पैनल 3 पर, हमें RENDEZVO
稍等片刻，我忘了。比尔·安德斯大概工作了5个小时，吉姆·洛弗尔大概工作了5个小时，我大概工作了5个半小时或
J'ai effectué une mesure de luminosité, et la valeur de luminosit
Apollo 8, Houston.
Что ж, попробуем другую
Okay. Well, did you 
わかりました。少し前に酸素流量に小さな不具合がありましたが、今は正常に戻りました。まず、キャニスター操作中に酸素需要レギュレーターAをキャビン以外の位置に動かしたかどうかを教えていただけますか？その後、一旦オ
双子座4号，双子座4号。这里是休斯顿。如果你们能读懂，我将向你们汇报27-BRAVO的最新情况。这是一次分段燃烧。前向
네, 마지막으로 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 결정이 내려지기 전에 계속 설명드리겠습니다. 허용 가능한 데드밴드는 660~770psi입니다. 다시 말해, 이 두 값 사이의 압력을 발생시키는 상승 시간은 약 103시간 후에 임계 압력 이하로 유지됩니다. 따라서 압력이 이 범위 내에 있으면 문제가 없습니다. 만약 
Il se tient à côté de 
はい。これはデルタ速度ではなくデルタ時間であることを覚えてお
Roger. In Washington hat der Finanzausschuss des Senats die Verlängerung des Einkommensteuerzuschlags genehmigt, eine Abstimmung im Senat über den Gesetzentwurf scheint jedoch derzeit unwahrscheinlich. In Austin wurde der Abgeordnete Ray Lemmon aus Houston zum Nationaldirektor der Amerikanischen Gesellschaft für Ozeanographie ernannt. Lemmon hat eine Studie zur Möglichkeit der Gründung eines ozeanographischen Instituts in Texas vorgeschlagen. Dies wäre das erste Institut dieser Art am westlichen Golf von Mexiko. In Minneapolis, Minnesota, meldete das Wetteramt nach einer Zusammenfassung des heutigen Wetters mit Höchstwerten von 88 und Tiefstwerten von 72 Grad: „Kein Schneefall“. Aus St. Petersburg, Florida, kommt ein Funkbericht des norwegischen Polarforschers Thor Heyerdahl. Er berichtet, dass die Besatzung seines Papyrusbootes „Ra“ trotz Schäden durch schwere See nach Bridgetown, Barbados, segeln wird. Die Besatzung wird jedoch auf einem Begleitschiff übernachten. N
Well, of course, the Earth is pretty bright, and the black sky, instead of being black, has sort of a rosy glow to it. The star, unless it is a very bright one, is probably lost somewhere
जिम, हमें कुछ खबरें मिली हैं। राष्ट्रपति निक्सन ने सुप्रीम कोर्ट में एसोसिएट जस्टिस के पद के लिए मिनेसोटा के एक जज को चुना है। संघीय कर्मचारियों के वेतन में 6 प्रतिशत की बढ़ोतरी करने वाला एक विधेयक प्रतिनिधि सभा से पारित हो
ठीक है। केबिन का पानी वापस ज
好的。您更新的其余部分是说，压力在 660 到 770 psi 之间是可以接受的。如果超过 770 psi，您要求我们考虑在运行 
О, 
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы,
هذه سفينة الصداقة السابعة. لا أجد أي صعوبة في تناول الطعام، ممتاز. أرى من خلال المنظار الأفق الأزرق الرائع يل
Roger, controllo HF alle 05:15. Un ultimo control
ジェミニVI、ヒューストン。今、あなたの電波は
Ok. E c'è un'altra cosa di cui non so se sei 
Аполлон-8. Это Хьюстон, с пролётом мимо него 
지상 상황은 여전히 ​​매우 양호합니다. 기내 압력을 측정해 보니 4.8 psia가 나왔습니다. 참고로 말씀드리자면, 이는 지금
Roger. Sachez que vos deux épouses sont à Houston et qu'elles vous contacteront dès que vous aurez la meilleure 
他们建议你使用
Okay. Der Griff steckt etwa 15 bis 20 cm tief in der Oberfläche. Ich könnte ihn leicht
Хо
Regardez cette étoile qui 
目前正在检查逆变
그는 그것들을 다시 시도해보고 
Siamo in ottima forma so
Après avoir 
ダウンリンクから奇妙な音が聞こえてきました。そこには友達がいるような
И, немного потянув за голову, я могу разглядеть почти южную оконечност
जब हम दबाव डालना शुरू करते
分かりました。ところでフランク、今の気持
Okay, Jack. Avanti A-4; ferma il pitch rat
On the right-hand half of the page, cross out the "Orbital science block," and under that "Visual target 1 south of track TR." And under that, 
Roger, Columbia. Nous avons pris connaissance de votre configuration.
现在，我
감사합니
알겠습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 바로 꺼내 드릴게
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम
네, 맞습니다. 방금
了解。非常に正確
शायद अब आप यह समझने की कोशिश कर सकते हैं कि आखिर वह क्
روجر. لقد تعاقدنا مع شركة 
हमें यहाँ एक 
알겠습니다, 밴스. 전원을 끌 때는 저비트 
D
يا فرانك، سلك التوصيل ما زال معلقاً. بفضل قوة الطرد المركزي، أصبح الآن شبه مستق
아주 좋습니다. 제가 이걸 찾느라 좀 애썼습니다.
ओह, केबिन की सही लाइट बंद करने की कोशिश में मैं अपना पहला सूर्यास्त देखने से बाल-बाल बच गया। जैसा कि मुझे बताया गया था, सूर्यास्त बहुत तेज़
わかりました。Indicate Retro Attitude、Sections 1 Platform-ORBIT RATE、FDR-PLATFORM、FDM-RATE、FDI Scale-High を押します。Verify Rate Gyros-PRIMARY は既に実行済みです。Attitude-RAT
Verstanden. Das ist zu
아니, 모르겠어요. 그냥 세상이 거꾸로 돌아가는
J'ai pris des photos. Je suis sûr que ça finira
Okay. 8, /: 45701, minus 040, plus 157 , plus 33195, minus 01267, plus 04716 179 0
ジャック、私が今探し出しているのは、アポロ 12 号の飛行に関するい
Wir sind nahezu perfekt ausgerichtet. Was meinst du, wenn du aus dem Fenster
Okay, it
좋아, 존이
Но вам придётся использовать
Amicizia Sett
Okay. We're reading 3 g's, think we'll have to let the reentry damping check g
罗杰。我这里有1号
Al
Roger. Nous partons d'ici sous peu, et nous viendrons te che
닐, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 코어 튜브와 태
了解。大丈夫です。それが私たちの期待
पावर डाउन की स्थिति में
こんにちは、
收到。线控飞行，手动模式开启
Roger.
And under row 4, under S
了解。久しぶりに窓の外に世界が広がり、単眼鏡を通して眺めると、本当に素晴らしい。うまく言葉で表現できればいいのだが。天気はとても良い。南米が視界に入ってきた。地平線の上の方に見える、ワシントン州シアトルあたりに見える地点から、ティエラ・デル・フエゴの南端、そして大陸の南端
Wa
11, Houston. Wir möchten das gleiche Verfahren noch einmal versuchen. Wir lassen den Anbieter noch etwas länger in der Leitung und sind in vi
Du willst ein VERB 76? Okay, bi
ठीक है, पैनल 11 कॉन्फ़िगरेशन, पहली पंक्ति: AC बस B, मुझे S-बैंड एंटीना चाहिए, 
Apollo 8, Houst
Okay, Aquarius. When you get her pretty much in attitude there, and it looks like you're as close as we need to be, 
Хорошо, Джим. Не могли бы вы надавить на внешний провод? Кстати, у 
Ok. Stiamo ancora eseguendo il tracciamento e, come sapete, continueremo a concentrarci sugli scarichi d'acqua e così via durante le ultime due ore di volo, per facilitare le procedure di tracc
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Können Sie les
水瓶座，休斯
Houston, Tranquility. Would yo
Sì. Sembra che sia successo nel momento in cui ho dato la spinta più X, e a quanto pare non era centrato, perché in un modo o nell'altro sono uscito accidentalmente in assetto
ح
حسنًا. ربما سأقوم بذلك جزئيًا فقط - جزء منه بسرعة ستة إطارات في الثانية، وجزء آخر بسرعة إطار واحد في الثانية. لذا قد أقوم بتغيير الإعدادات أثناء ال
空隙时间为 16 秒，2 
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमने आपको पीटीसी में रोक लिया है; स्थिति हमें ठीक लग रही है। माइक, मुझे संचार जां
Détenir 
了解。分かり
- - l'ho lasciato con 
は
Ok. Immagino che te l'abbiano inviato questo pomeriggio. E quando giri pagina, alla pagina E-8, vedi che il controllo d'ingresso viene eseguito a meno un'ora, e sai che è un test breve. Non c'è davvero motivo di aspettare un'ora; potremmo anche farlo non appena avrai completato il passaggio 35 a pagina E-7, perché ci stiamo avvicinando a un peri
R
حسناً، ما زلت لا أملك أي 
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मैं मुख्य घटनाओं के समयों पर संक्षेप में चर्चा कर लेता हूँ, और फिर हम कुछ विवरण भरेंगे। ठीक है। प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस 142 घंटे 40 मिनट पर है; लगभग 6-1/2 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम हीटर पावर लगाकर, CM/ तापमान की जाँच करके और आवश्यकता पड़ने पर CM/ को पहले से गर्म करके इस पूरी प्रक्रिया को शुरू करेंगे, और हमें लगता है कि हमें ऐसा करना पड़ेगा। इसके लिए विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ बाद में उपलब्ध होंगी। लगभग 6 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम संशोधित / 30-मिनट की चेकलिस्ट का उपयोग करके पावर चालू करना शुरू करेंगे, जिसका उपयोग आपने पिछले मध्यक्रम के लिए किया था। फिर कुछ ही समय बाद, लगभग 5 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम चाहेंगे कि आप बॉडी एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट के लिए सही स्थिति में हों, जैसा हमने पहले किया था, अर्थ टर्मिनेटर का उपयोग करके। और जैसे ही हमें वह मिल जाएगा, हम -7 का प्रदर्शन करेंगे, जो अब लगभग 2 फुट प्रति सेकंड की बर्न दर या लगभग 15 सेकंड का प्रतीत होता है। और मुझे बताया गया है कि यह अब 1-1/2 तक कम हो गया है, इसलिए यह मार्जिन के भीतर आराम से है। ठीक है। जैसे ही हम ऐसा करेंगे, हम तुरंत सर्विस मॉड्यूल जेटिसन एटीट्यूड के लिए पैंतरेबाज़ी शुरू कर देंगे, जो प्लेन में होगा क्योंकि हम इसे सामान्य से पहले जेटिसन कर रहे हैं। हमें आउट-ऑफ-प्लेन कंपोनेंट की आवश्यकता नहीं है, और न ही हम इसे चाहते हैं। इसलिए यह सर्विस मॉड्यूल के साथ प्लेन में होगा जो त्रिज्या वेक्टर के साथ वापस बाहर की ओर इंगित करता है। फिर हम कमांड मॉड्यूल को सर्विस मॉड्यूल एसईपी के 
Roger. Tu as été coupé au montage cette
Jim, this has been tried in the simulator by Charli
रॉजर। लेकिन क्या यही वो चीज़ थी जिससे आपने हमें
现在声音很清晰了，我们来看面板 5。我们需要将以下设置关闭：燃料电池泵交流 1 关闭；交流 2 关闭；燃料电池 1 泵交流 1 关闭；燃料电池 2 
L'
저도 그걸 시도
Roger, folgende 
휴스턴, 귀하의 퀸다르 장비가 송신 중에
Ro
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन। हमें आपकी भोजन और पानी की रिपोर्ट दोबारा चाहि
Okay, Jim. We're looking at doing this 
짐, 우리가 아는 한 지금 당신이 가진 것만큼, 혹은 그보다 더 나은 결과를 얻는 유일한 방법은 진앤노벨을 더 많이 마시는 건데, 우리는 그렇게 하고 싶지 않아요. 그래서 우리는 지금 이 상황에서 얻는 게 뭐든 간에 최대한 활용하려고 해요. 나중에 당신이 '태도를 태우다'라는 단계에 도달할
ビーコンはしばらく待つよ。電源を入れた時の時計はだいたいだいたい10時だから、だいたい10時くらいで大丈夫だと思う。消耗品はもうない
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, qui Hou
Questo è Aquarius. Stiamo ricevendo 
Jack, en référence à votre question concernant, lors de cette derni
ロジャー、ウォーリー、君は最後にフェードアウトしたね。上のほうは大丈夫だよ。また良い旅になるよう
Dobbiamo escogitare un metodo per utilizzare quelle bombole di idrossido 
TR-10 릴레이가 작동하기 시작한 것 같은데, 정확한 원인은 모르겠습니다. 다만 레이트 자이로스코프가 작동한다는 점은 알 수 있지만, TR-10 바이패스 스위치가 선택되어 있기 때문에 레이트 자이로스코프
حسناً، ما هذا الشيء ه
네. 눈에 보이는 습기는 전혀 없습니다
Houston, Apollo 11. hat begonnen und es sieht gut a
P22 的所有操作似乎都很顺利
Okay. Capito; e vuoi una specie di modalità
双子座 VIII，
Sì, sono co
Близнецы 4, Канарск
What - what -
D'accord. Laissez-moi...
Führen Sie die optische Inbetriebnahme gemäß Se
罗杰，你——我想把你的 2 Alpha 时间转给你，斯科
Хорошо. На пятом уровне питания, аварийное отключение. Пункт 1, первая строка, я вычеркиваю "И VHF-A". Вторая строка "SIMPLEX operation". Третья строка, я заменяю второе кавычное слово, обозначающее усилитель мощности, на
Be
وفكرت أنن
D'accord. Écoutez. Sachez que je
わ
我们真正想做的是让你摆好姿势，这样当你看到地球透过窗户出
Давайте проверим, действительно ли мы 
فريندشيب سفن، لاحظنا إشارة على أرضية القطاع 51، وهي "نشر أكياس الهبوط". نعتقد أن هذه إشارة خاطئة. مع ذلك، تود كيب أن تتحقق من ذلك بوضع مفتاح أكياس اله
रॉजर। हम आपकी वर्तमान स्थिति को पूर्व की ओर देखते हुए लगभग 77-76 डिग्री पूर्व
もう一度確認します。彼らはあなたの声を
好的，阿波罗8号。我们还没
Das TR-10-Relais muss aktiviert sein, obwohl ich keine Ahnung habe – außer dass die Drehratensensoren anspringen, aber darauf kann ich nicht wetten, da sie sowieso aktiviert sind, weil der Schalter auf TR-10-Bypass 
١٣، هيوستن. سنطلب منك تنفيذ إجراءات إيقاف تشغيل خلية الوقود رقم ١. ضغط الأكسجين لدينا ينخفض ​​كما ذكرت
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस
약 1.5도, 즉 0.1도 정도를 조절하려면 세 번 작동
Questa è Friendship Seven. La capsula è di nuovo i
Oui, la lune est là, mon garçon
Roger, Jim. Wir haben uns das angesehen. Mit dem
Okay. We co
Eh bien, il 
RKV, qui Gemini
D'accord. Depuis Jodrell Bank, en Angleterre, via AP: le grand radiotélescope britannique de Jodrell Bank a cessé de recevoir les signaux de la sonde lunaire soviétique Luna 15 à 5h49 EDT aujourd
That's right. Refer to S/2-6. This - Really what we're talking about, Jack, is the hatch integrity check decal. And I think it'll be easiest, if y
Decisamente sotto di me. L'avevo seguito sotto di me da Carnarvon in poi. Fino a Carnarvon l'avevamo tenuto sotto di noi, poi fino all'orizzonte, e poi di nuovo sotto di noi. Sembrava quasi che fosse in un'orbita diversa dalla mia. Aveva un apogeo e un perigeo diversi dai miei. Comunque, ho tentato di avvicinarmi all'alba non appena ho potuto capire dove si trovava. Come ho detto, in quel momento era a un miglio o due davanti a me, sotto
Yes, they put all this TLI crap in my checklist; even though 
रॉजर। यह आरकेवी कैप कॉम है। आपको सीएसक्यू पर एक महत्वपूर्
Bene. Quello che possiamo mostrarvi ora, un piccolo vantaggio a
I am now going to low mag. Correction high mag on the periscope see how it looks?... yawed right about 5 degrees. See how she matches up with the periscope at this point. Say, we have the yaw axes (indicator) at about 10 degrees ri
Ricevuto. Sono 05 più 39 più 41; Rev 4; 112,2 gradi est; 08:22 più 5
حسنًا. 63-1 مع المناورة، 16 56
わかりました。ジャックはMAIN AにあったRING 1をオフにしましたが、電圧はまだ30.2ボル
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к 2000 году, но лидеры демократов ответили, что приоритет должен быть отдан потребностям на Земле. Агню, высокопоставленный правительственный чиновник, присутствовавший на запуске «Аполлона-11» в среду, по-видимому, говорил от своего имени, а не обязательно от имени администрации Никсона, когда сказал: «На мой взгляд, мы должны отправить человека на Марс к концу этого столетия». Ларедо, Техас, AP: Иммиграционные власти Нуэво-Ларедо объявили в среду, что хиппи будут отказывать во въезде в Мексику по туристическим картам, если они не примут ванну и не подстригутся. Уберто Касарас, начальник мексиканской иммиграционной службы в Нуэво-Ларедо, заявил, что власти Мехико, Акапулько и других популярных туристических мест получили жалобы на хиппи. По сообщению United Press International: Первоначальная реакция на решение президента Никсона предоставить федеральным служащим выходной в понедельник, чтобы они могли отметить национальный день участия в лунной миссии «Аполлон-11», была в основном удивлением. Родни Биднер, Associated Press, Лондон, AP: Европа поражена миссией «Аполлон-11». Газеты по всему континенту заполняют свои страницы фотографиями ракеты «Сатурн V», стартующей для установления первой связи Земли с ее естественным спутником. И авторы заголовков напрягали воображение, чтобы подобрать слова, чтобы восхвалять этот подвиг. «Величайшее приключение в истории человечества началось», — заявила французская газета Le Figaro, посвятив четыре страницы репортажам с мыса Кеннеди и схемам миссии. Таблоид Paris Jour провозгласил: «Весь мир говорит им „браво“». Коммунистическая ежедневная газета L'Humanite начала с фотографии запуска и посвятила всю последнюю страницу восторженному репортажу о Луне, описывающему обратный отсчет и запуск, жен и семьи астронавтов, а также справочную информацию о лунной деятельности. Хемпстед, Нью-Йорк: Джо Намат официально прибыл в тренировочный лагерь New York Jets в Университете Хофстра в среду после закрытой встречи со своими товарищами по команде по поводу разногласий с комиссаром профессионального футбола Питером Розеллом. Лондон, UPI: Палата лордов получила в среду заверения, что американская миниатюрная подводная лодка не «повредит и не нападе
Д
Der Adle
हाँ, अगर इसकी शक्ति का स्तर और भी अधिक होता तो बेहतर होता। बेशक, यह थोड़ा हिलता-डुलता रहता है, इसलिए शायद आपको इसे
Хорошо, Джим. Мне показалось, что лучше всего будет, если ты соберёшь оборудование, а мы будем объяснять тебе процедуру по ходу дела. Может быть, ты передашь Дж
Je vais simplement mettre un point d'interrogation ici – pour ne pas faire étalage de notre ignor
휴스턴, 트
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。你收到数据了吗
That's affirm. And now, we have an addition to put in place of what we delete
대략 110 정도까지 내려가면 계속 쫓아가기만 하면 되는 것 같아요. 한 축으로 조준하면 다른 축으로 빠져나가는데, 특히... 거의 일정한 상태를 유지할 때 그런 것 같습니
Roger, Mike. È il punto d
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。4時半頃到着予定です。システムはすべて順調ですね。イーグル
로저. 리백은 다음과 같습니다. TI
Vous m'enten
Tr-10 wieder im Normalzustand. Das hatte ich schon. Okay, wir haben den Anzugdruck. Schauen Sie sich die Inverter hier nochmal an. 250 sind 141 Grad, 150 sind etwa 107 Grad. So weit, so gut. Standby ist... 7. Fast Umgebungsdruck. Negativ, sogar ein bisschen... Der Kabinendruck liegt bei etwa 5,3 psi, 
हाँ। मुझे लगता है हमें अब यह काम बंद कर देना चाहिए..
D'accord. Compris. Tout est nominal sur les adresses, la combustion a été effectuée à temps et les résidus sont
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM
Хорошо. Обновление карты на 5/6, восход солнца, нулевой меридиан, закат; -1, время ближайшего сближения с целью B-1. Теперь ваши две контрольные точки: номер 1 — захват,
On dirait du vent qui si
روجر، جيم. بخصوص المبخر
Roger. GET of acquisition 3 plus 07; GET of R = 248 nm; GET rendezvous, 3
D'accord. Pour répondre à ta question, Joe, non. J'ai vérifié la CABINE en permanence. Qualitativement, quand on est passés à cette configurat
Roger, that's affirmative. The ECS O2 heater
Gemini 4, Houston. Puo
Что ж, 
Ok. La temperatura in cabina è di 100 gradi, quella nella cupola di 40 gradi; lo scambiatore di calore in cabina è di
아
Cape Cap Com, Sigma Seven. Sag das nochma
Dopo aver controllato i sistemi della navicella spaziale, abbiamo scoperto che il propulsore numero 8 apparentemente non si è aperto a
Okay. Are we going to use the same techniques t
コンピュータの電源を入れま
Roger. That's the Data Point 13
了解。はっ
Man sollte sich dringend darum kümmern, diese Fenster zu reparieren. Die drei Fenster – die Dachluke und die beiden Seitenfenst
I wan
Я ва
はい、一
Ott
Аполл
Ich schlage vor, dass wir, während du das machst, hier eine Messung durchführen und das Programm automatisch laufen lassen, um die Einstellun
シグマ・セブ
كلامك واضح وجليّ. كل شيء على ما يرام هنا. أعتقد أنك فهمت الأمر. هل هذ
Hal
Хорош
Wilco, Apollo 8. Во-первых, если у вас есть воз
Roger. Gemini 4, nous aimerions que vous remettiez votre interrupteur d'alimentation CA sur IGS et que vous 
D'accord. Panneau 11, rang
D'accord. Puissance 6. D'accord. Puissance 6 correspond au panneau 11. Suivez le schéma, à l'exception des disjoncteurs que j'ai indiqués. La première ligne est correcte. Ou plutôt, la première rangée. Deuxième rangée: QUAD 4, TCA, fe
Okay. One thing, Joe; I just want to doublecheck again. All the stuff that normally was going to start at 57 hours, which the first item was
제미니, 제미니 VI. 드로그 시간은 
Bene. Ora premi il sacchetto contro le fascette adesive che abbiamo messo ai lati del contenitore. Se c'è del materiale in eccesso, piegalo leggermente 
はい。了解しまし
好的。那我们就稍等片刻。我们有个好办法。我们只要等你输入一个参
알겠습니다. 페
是的，我注意到了。之前它的数值一直低于这个值，异常低。我差点在加速的时候问他们，后来想
Roger, Mike. Eure Atemfrequenzkurve ist immer noch flach. Falls ihr heute Abend vor dem Schlafengehen noch Zeit habt, würden wir vorschlagen, dass ihr etwas frische Paste auf die beiden Elektroden an der Seite eures unteren Rippenbogens auftragt. Wenn das nicht hilft, ge
Roger. Terminé. Votre tra
ठीक है। मैं आपके तैयार होने का
Роджер, тот самы
حسناً يا فرانك. هل ما زلت تسمعن
Oui. Je le mont
我觉得我们
فهمت قصدك بوضوح 
飞机偏离航线的物体在雷达范围内，
Jack, potresti s
Хорошо. А что, если мы подождем,
では、キャニ
D'accord. La seule autre chose qui me vient à l'esprit en l'observant, c'est que le signal semble provenir d'un seul point; mais c'est la seule différence, même si je ne peux
Fokus auf Unendlich. Den sollten Sie unbedingt auf Unendlich lassen. Beim Zoomen wird man Sie wahrscheinlich bitten, den Horizont, das Gelände oder Ähnliches etwas zu vergrößern. Ich würde mit einem Weitwinkelobjektiv bei 12,5 beginnen und die Blende auf f/22 einstellen, um zu verhindern, dass zu viel Licht einfällt. 
Род
Der Sonnenuntergang ist wirklich beeindruckend, ich glaube nicht, dass ich viel Zeit damit verschwenden muss, ihn anzusehen. Er ist sehr interessant. Faszinierend ist auch, wie schwarz es ist, wenn sich die Augen nicht daran gewöhnt haben. Ich kann definitiv eine Beschichtung auf dem Fenster erkennen. Ich schalte jetzt wieder auf VOX im UHF-Hi-Modus, um zu senden. Ich öffne das Visier, um das rechte Mikrofon abzuwischen. Ich habe es abgeleckt. Visier zu. Das Visier wurde sofort abgedichtet, damit die Anzugselektronik ihre Arbeit aufnehmen konnte. Ich will damit nicht noch einmal Probleme haben. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hält die Temperatur sehr gut bei etwa 68 Grad. Also wird die Kuppel wieder hochgefahren. Sie steht jetzt bei 76, 75 Grad. Anscheinend ist diese höhere Einstellung die richtige. Ich denke, ich drehe sie jetzt noch eine halbe Markierung hoch, dann haben wir sie vielleicht fixiert. Sie kühlt endlich etwas ab, also weiß ich, in welche Richtung ich die Einstellung ändern muss. Ich habe die Kühlmittelmenge für den Anzug und den Steuerhebel auf 8,5 eingestellt. Die Anzeige in der Kuppel zeigt aktuell 75 Grad an. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hat 68 Grad. Sehr angenehm. Ich spüre die kühle Luft auf meinem Gesicht. Der Sauerstoffgehalt sieht sehr gut aus, 60 und 75 psi. Ich habe den Inverter 250 im Auge behalten. Er nähert sich 140 Grad, während der Contrast 150 auf etwa 100 Grad gesunken ist. Im Standby-Modus liegt die Temperatur bei etwa 100 Grad, was der Kabinentemperatur entspricht. Drittens, der 250er – der macht Probleme, und ich werde ihn im Auge behalten. Der Wärmetauscher der Kabine pendelt sich definitiv bei 40 Grad ein, und das bereitet mir Schwierigkeiten, da ich Frank Samonski offensichtlich 50 Cent schulde. Ich bin angenehm überrascht. Auch der Kabinentreibstoffwert ist etwas hoch. Mal sehen, wir haben 5,5 psi an Bord. Der Luftdruck liegt bei etwa 5, Korrektur, 5,3, das ist nicht zu hoch für diese Kabine. Es wird schön dunkel draußen, ich glaube, ich schaue mir jetzt mal die Sterne an. Die Abdeckung des Batteriefachs für die Taschenlampe am linken Handschuh löst sich. Nur da, wo der Schalter ist, ist es kein Problem, sie ist einfach vorzeitig abgenutzt
로저 세븐, 가능한 한 연료를 적게 사용하면서 재진입 자세에 가깝게 접근하고, 연료 소모율이 안정될 때까지 플라이 바이 와이어 상태로 대
まだ境界
Bestätigt. O2-Zufuhr des Servicemoduls abschalt
Buzz, die Sicht durch deine - rechts - links Schulter ist so gut, dass wir die Triebwerksabdeckung und den Klettverschluss daran sehen können, und das ist so ziemlich alles, was wir im
了解。電源を切ったところです
알겠습니다. 아폴로 8호 말입니다. 저희도 그걸 하려고 노력해 왔습니
Ну, мы почти готовы ко сну; просто подожди час, а как только
Нил, нам нужно сделать несколько конкретных фотографий зоны отбо
はい。そのことについてはずっ
알겠습니다
로저. 파일럿
И сказал Бог: «Да соберутся воды под небом в одно место, и да явится суша». И стало так. И назвал Бог сушу землей, а собрание вод назвал морями. И увидел Бог, что это хорошо. И от эк
जब मोटर की लाइट जलती है,
收到，吉姆。稍等，我看看他们是不是全都
...débarrassez-
わかりました。このNAVの視認は延期できます。予定時刻はここです。延期できます。寝る時間についてのご指摘から判断すると、できるだけ早く実施したいと考えており、現時点では2時間延期する予定です。これは「」と関連しているため、同じ時刻に戻して実施します。もしご都合
알았어, 찰리. 수동 시동
حسنًا، قائد المركبة الفضائية، هذه أنظمة ووميرا. هل قمت بأي عمليات دفع عالية خلال مر
अरे, एक मिनट रुकिए; मुझे खेद है कि मैं
これは上昇エンジンの下にあるもので、プローブが最初
Friendship Seven, F
Okay, ich habe das SYSTEMTEST-Messgerät
네, 5만 마일 거리에서 볼 수 있었던 만큼 이 거리에서는 색채의 깊이를 제대로 볼 수 없는 것은 사실입니다. 하지만 바다는 여전히 분명한 파란색이고 대륙은 대체로 갈
Aveva difficoltà a mantenere l'orientamento, e da quel momento in poi mi è sembrato che si orientasse fuori dalla navicella senza prestare attenzione alla direzione in cui puntava. Riusciva effettivamente a imprimerle velocità piuttosto elevate, fino a 2° al secondo. Intendevo mantenerle al di sotto di quel livello. Mentre risaliva nella navicella, abbiamo avuto notevoli difficoltà con il portello. Per prima cosa abbiamo sollevato la parte a cricchetto del portello per agganciarlo. Dopo averlo agganciato, non siamo riusciti a chiuderlo abbastanza. In realtà, abbiamo iniziato a tirare verso il basso le maniglie di bloccaggio per far uscire i fermi. Quindi, ci siamo divertiti parecchio e credo che sia 
Ciao, Apollo 11. Housto
Oui, monsieur. Nous préférons… Au cas où nous n'obtiendrions pas de mise en marche manuelle (enfin, automatique), nous allons revenir en arrière en utilisant la procédure d'annulation de la descente du
Siehst du das? Buzz sc
حسنًا. لقد تتبعت نجمًا ساطعًا
Roger. Go ahead. 
是的。你应该保留你原来的那个。
D'accord, Fred. C'est
Роджер. Эт
はい。プログラムがきちんと動作し、良好な軌道姿勢を保っているようであれば、そのままにして手動でバックアップします。そうでない場合、ジャイロが少し前と同じよう
Роджер. Начало р
मैं कह रहा था कि, ह्यूस्टन, *** रुककर एक तस्वीर वगैरह ले लो और फिर बगल में चलना शुरू कर दो, तो अक्सर लोग धीरे-धीरे बगल में उछलते हुए चलना शुरू कर देते हैं ज
气压还在下降。现在开
Okay, preliminary analysis of the data indicates that the center S-II engine vibrated at a somewhat higher amplit
Ecco un articolo di Harry Rosenthal dell'Associated di Houston. Due Babbi Natale illuminano la vigilia di Natale per Jeffrey Lovell, 2 anni. Il primo ha bu
Roger, this is Gemini 4. Pilot got up about 20 minutes ago and had about 3 and a 1/2 hours of rest. It wasn't deep sleep. It was an on-and-off type sleeping, b
Roger. Understand; 
로저, 휴스턴. 아폴로 11호가 약 
少し何か聞い
ヒューストン、こちらはVIIIです。それに、まだロックオンできていません。ロックオンできるまで270番を送るのは待たなけ
هذا الب
ठीक है। प्लस 90: /G&N, 63825, माइनस 1.54, प्लस 1.32, माइनस 0491.7, प्लस 0000.1, प्लस 6634.0, 180, 228, 001; N/A; प्लस 0017.9, 6652.2, 7:37, 6626.5, 26, 155.4, 15.7; ज़ेटा सैजिटेरियस; ऊपर, 08.0; दाएँ 2.1; माइनस 22.81, माइनस 025.00, 1140.7, 34087, 32:14. सेट शुरू होता है: आर्कटुरस, डेनेब
Alfa 3 
자,
من واشنطن: "في عيد الميلاد هذا، يُشرق العالم بأمل السلام. وعندما يتحقق، عندما يتحول الأمل إلى واقع وتهدأ البنادق من جديد، سيأتي ذلك لأ
메인 스위치를 끄고 어떻게 되는지 볼게요. 보세요, 아직… 이것들을 꺼야겠어요. 하나씩 꺼
Роджер. Это музыка доносится из
Je vole en mode d'impulsion mi
休息和
カナリア、ジェミニ4。プラットフォームをうまく整列させる時間がないので、ご注意ください。この物体が私
حسنًا. بينما نتحقق من موضع التمرير - إنهم يتناقشون حول هذا الأمر في الغرفة الخلفية الآن - أود أن أستعر
Okay. Alle Freileitung
ठीक 
Chissà se sono stato così lento a far parti
روجر، كا
Das ist 
fuel temperature — 68. A temperatur
इस समय हमारी दाईं ओर की यॉ दर 1 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड है। पिच 0 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड है, और बाईं ओर की रोल दर 3/4 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड है। ईंधन की मात्रा में कोई परिवर्तन नहीं हुआ है। थ्रस
极光七号，Cap C
Хорошо. Вес 33627, 
Alpha/PC vers PC; INDICATEUR DE LANC
Okay, I wouldn't be surpr
了解。次
네, 이제 배터리 A를 충전하기 시작
Okay, Fred. First of all, preparations for this, starting with contingency checklist, page 24, we would recommend should start at, and we'll be happy to receive any comments you have on that, though. Second point: when you're in the burn attitude, you should see the Sun at the very top of the. It'll be splitting the cursor
Ok, lo faremo. Non 
ठीक है। समझ गया। जो, मेरा बस एक ही सवाल है कि ऑटो मोड में उड़ान भरने पर रोल और यॉ 
そこに惑星が
At 00 34 28, I'm increasing the cabin water va
Okay. Church services around the world today are mentioning Apollo 11 in their prayers. President Nixon's worship service at the White House is also dedicated to the mission, and our fellow astronaut, Frank Borman, is still in there pitching and will read the passage from Genesis which was read on Apollo 8 last Christ
アクエリアス、
コックピット内には大量の煙が充満して
Tutto sembra a posto, vi darò una lettura veloce. Il carburante è al 29-27%. La pression
캐빈 압력 
첫 번째 별에 대한 결과가 나왔는데, 들어보시겠어요?
Posizione del contenitore dell'LMP: il contenitore dell'LMP è o
Rog
حسنًا. أعتقد أنني قرأت أنك جاهز. نسيت... سماعات الأذن. الأمر بسيط، كل ما عليك فعله هو إخراج زوج ثانٍ من الخراطيش من وحدة التحكم، 
13, Houston. Siamo pronti con un "ora, per f
Affirmative, Jim. Laissez vo
हम लगभग 40,
Bestätigt. Echo in Bereich 3, Echo in Bereich 3: 4 Stunden, 22 Minuten, 12 Sekunden. Ich wiederhole: 4 Stu
मुझे उम्मीद है कि आप देख रहे होंगे कि मुझे इसे जमीन में 
और, एक्वेरियस, आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें कि हमारी जल आपूर्ति के संबंध में, बिजली आपूर्ति बढ़ाने की 
Rog
ठीक है। देखो। चलो कैमरे ठीक से लगा लेते हैं;
Roger. Could you confirm that? I thought there was some question after we got into the command module 
Ricevuto. La modalità di c
نحن
Roger. Nous avons vérifié vos consommables et tout est en ordre
Роджер. PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50, минус 00021, 182 287 000, плюс 56919. прерывание, менее 10 минут, 105 12 30.00. прерывание, более 10 мин
時計を開始
안정화가 된 후, 우리는 전체 추력 제어 시스템을 점검했는데, 요(yaw) 또는 롤(r
Ti trovi a circa 1.1
Roger. I'm reading you. I'm on the main chute at 5,000 [feet]. Status is good. I am not in contact with any recovery forces. D
시간이 되시면 송신기 KB에 연결해서 말씀해 주시고, 20까지 세어 주세요. 지금 시간 되시고 바쁘지
रॉजर। आपको कैसा 
你的宇航服进气口
아니, 잘하고 있는 것 같아. 짐, 
Ho eseguito tre test durante quel passaggio di consegne. Due con un valore superiore a -19,6 (due di questi con un valore inferiore a -19,8); e uno con un valore infe
了解。D-9の最新情報をお伝えします。ラン番号1、レボリューション55と56
وكولومبيا، هيوستن. نتوقع أن نفقد مكاسبك العالية في وقت ما أثناء الهبو
Okay, I've looked around, and I've essentially done steps 1 through 5 with the exception of floodlights and utility lights and I think we'll just do without 
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Pourriez-vous confirmer que vous avez
Ну, он сказал, что для то
ケープ・キャップ・コム、シグマ・セブンUHF-
目前，我的偏航角速度为每秒向右 ½ 
Things are looking very good at primary. We'll check s
わかりました。13秒より少し下です。参考までに、現在いくつかの課題に取り組んでいる人がいます。中間コースについては、管制システムを決定する作業と、選択した管制システムでどのように運用するか、アラインメントはどうすべきかを検討しています。LMSも稼働しており、数人のクルーが作業に取り組んでいます。また、進入についても、いつどのように
Roger, Apollo 8. Ein paar Anmerkungen: Wir haben uns Ihre Zustandsvektoren und alle Informationen angesehen. Die Plattform sieht gut aus, und es scheint, als ob Sie diesen Schritt überspringen können; Ihre Plattform wird auch im nächsten Durchlauf noch funktionieren. Wir würden gerne Ihre Messwerte erhalten.
Roger. Cinque per Buz
Et vous nous suivez, et avez-vous des résultats concer
Roger. We would like to tak
저는 부스터를 향해 초속 약 
- - sél
Roger. Ora di decollo e risalita: 124 22 0000. Il tuo TIG, ripeto TIG: 125 19 3470. Il tuo TIG di TPI: 126
You got it right here. 
ठीक है। हमने अभी-अभी टीवी के पैनल के बाईं ओर चेतावनी प्रणाली का आपका परीक्षण देखा। देखिए, सारी बत्तियाँ एक साथ जल
अपोल
자, 이제 마스켈린 B(수면의 늪)를
I tramonti sono spettacolari. La Terra è nera dopo il tramonto. La Terra è nera; la prima
Der Sonnenuntergang ist wirklich beeindruckend, ich glaube nicht, dass ich viel Zeit damit verschwenden muss, ihn anzusehen. Er ist sehr interessant. Faszinierend ist auch, wie schwarz es ist, wenn sich die Augen nicht daran gewöhnt haben. Ich kann definitiv eine Beschichtung auf dem Fenster erkennen. Ich schalte jetzt wieder auf VOX im UHF-Hi-Modus, um zu senden. Ich öffne das Visier, um das rechte Mikrofon abzuwischen. Ich habe es abgeleckt. Visier zu. Das Visier wurde sofort abgedichtet, damit die Anzugselektronik ihre Arbeit aufnehmen konnte. Ich will damit nicht noch einmal Probleme haben. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hält die Temperatur sehr gut bei etwa 68 Grad. Also wird die Kuppel wieder hochgefahren. Sie steht jetzt bei 76, 75 Grad. Anscheinend ist diese höhere Einstellung die richtige. Ich denke, ich drehe sie jetzt noch eine halbe Markierung hoch, dann haben wir sie vielleicht fixiert. Sie kühlt endlich etwas ab, also weiß ich, in welche Richtung ich die Einstellung ändern muss. Ich habe die Kühlmittelmenge für den Anzug und den Steuerhebel auf 8,5 eingestellt. Die Anzeige in der Kuppel zeigt aktuell 75 Grad an. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hat 68 Grad. Sehr angenehm. Ich spüre die kühle Luft auf meinem Gesicht. Der Sauerstoffgehalt sieht sehr gut aus, 60 und 75 psi. Ich habe den Inverter 250 im Auge behalten. Er nähert sich 140 Grad, während der Contrast 150 auf etwa 100 Grad gesunken ist. Im Standby-Modus liegt die Temperatur bei etwa 100 Grad, was der Kabinentemperatur entspricht. Drittens, der 250er – der macht Probleme, und ich werde ihn im Auge behalten. Der Wärmetauscher der Kabine pendelt sich definitiv bei 40 Grad ein, und das bereitet mir Schwierigkeiten, da ich Frank Samonski offensichtlich 5
ठी
Bien. Dans la zone d'amerrissage du Pacifique central, la météo est bonne. La couverture nuageuse est de 2000 pieds, avec des nuages ​​épars; la visibilité est de 10 pieds; le vent souffle à 60 nœuds à 10 nœuds; la hauteur des vagues est de 4 pieds et l'altitude est de 2986 pieds. Des averses éparses sont prévues sur moins de 10 % de la zone. Les forces de récupération de l'Iwo Jima seront au poin
كال كا
Хорошо, Гас. Я хочу поговорить об
ア
Die Steuerung mit der Waffe war... in Gier- und Nickrichtung sehr gut. Die Rollsteuerung war nicht ganz so gut, aber mit der Waffe konnte ich einen Punkt auf dem Raumschiff anvisieren und dorthin zurückkehren. Ich konnte sowohl
D'accord. Vous pouvez prendre
罗杰。看来上面
Okay. I've got a Haney special here for you. The Interstellar Times latest edition says the flight to the moon is occupying prime space on both paper and television; it's THE news story. The headlines of the Post says 
ठीक है, फ्रेड। और जब आप प्राइमरी कार्ट्रिज को
Okay, wir haben nach rechts gegiert. Das denke ich auch. Ungefähr 1
Roger, Buzz. Uns ist dasselbe aufgefallen. Es ist ganz ähnl
Ok, Odyssey, Houston. Sia
Hast du dir ein paar Konditionen a
نعتقد أن عملية المحاذاة ستكون جيدة، لذا لسنا بحاجة لإجراء هذه المحاذاة الكاملة. نعتقد أن الفحص سيكون ناجحًا. 
Jetzt bin ich über Afrika. Ich habe gerade Bild 56 mit der Hasselblad aufgenommen. Es war eine topografische Besonderheit. Es sah aus, als wäre es einst ein alter Vulkan gewesen, und man ko
BAT Charlie، 37.0؛ pyro A، 37.0؛ pyro B، 37.0؛ ضغط الهيليوم، 3450؛ وللمتعة فقط، النيتروجين A، 2300؛ النيتروجين B، 2400؛ 5 Charlie، 4.5؛ 5 Dog، 3.5؛ 
मुझे ऐसा नहीं 
روجر. كانت هاواي تحاول تزويدي بمعلومات
روجر، يبدو أن لديك بعض ال
Lascia che te li rilegga. RN meno RP, più 77; lancio per 400K, nominale; RET 400K, 22 più 02; ETO
Давление в источнике составляет 2050. Температура в
Ich habe es ausprobiert... Darkside
حسنًا. لننتقل إلى Surface 60، ثم إلى أسفل منتصف الصفحة، بعد توصيات نظام 
Roger, Canary Cap Com. Ti leggo fo
Okay. Das ist bestätigt. Im nächsten Schritt wird der Schalter für die Hauptbusverbindung B/C eingeschaltet und die Spannun
D'accord. Vas
罗杰，请注意，你的两位妻子都在休斯顿，当你在美国境内信号最佳
МАРК. 57 3
우리는 지금 당장 그 MOD 작
D'accord. Il nous en 
휴스턴, 지금 전
Okay. CLA 40-DELTA: 8
ومن الأمور الرائعة يا جاك، خاصةً بالنسبة لشخص مبتدئ مثلي، سهولة الحركة هنا. وكما تعلم من عملك في محاكي وحدة القيادة، فإن انعدام الجاذبية يُعدّ ميزةً كبيرة. لأنك تشعر بضيق المساحة عند مستوى جاذبية واحد، ما يجعل الحركة صعبةً للغاية، بينما الحركة سهلة في هذه البيئة. وكما ترى، كان المكان نظيفًا، وجدتُ بعض الحل
我不知道还能去哪里……除了那
了解。2番目のエラーを修正したアル
ठीक है। मूलतः, यह सही है। चलिए, मैं इसे संक्षेप में समझा देता हूँ, फिर मैं आपको चरण बताऊँगा। मुझे लगता है कि इससे आपको बेहतर समझ आएगा। योजना यह है कि आप कुछ ऐसे कोण पर उड़ सकते हैं जो आपके ऑप्टिक्स को चंद्रमा की ओर इंगित करेंगे। अब, किसी भी समय, किसी भी स्थिति में, यदि आप दूरबीन में देखकर तारों के पैटर्न को पर्याप्त रूप से पहचान सकते हैं और आपको लगता है कि आप स्वयं संरेखण कर सकते हैं, तो हम यहीं रुकना चाहेंगे और आपको अपना संरेखण स्वयं करने देंगे। हालाँकि, हम आपको एक ऐसी प्रक्रिया बता रहे हैं जिससे आप दूरबीन में उन चीजों को देख सकेंगे जिन्हें आप बिना किसी परावर्तन या ऐसी किसी भी चीज की चिंता किए देख सकते हैं, और यह आवश्यक नहीं है कि इस प्रक्रिया का पालन तब तक किया जाए जब तक आपको यह पता न चल जाए कि दूरबीन में तारों के पैटर्न स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई दे रहे हैं। यदि आपको आगे बढ़ना है, तो हम पैंतरेबाज़ी करेंगे, चंद्रमा पर एक नज़र डालेंगे, वहाँ एक निशान लगाएंगे, और फिर / कोणों के साथ फिर से पैंतरेबाज़ी करेंगे और सूर्य पर एक नज़र डालेंगे, और सूर्य पर एक और निशान लगाएंगे, जिससे संरेखण पूरा हो जाएगा। अब, संरेखण योजना यह है कि हम आपको कोणों का एक सेट देंगे जिसके माध्यम से आप गेंद को मोटे तौर पर संरेखित कर सकते हैं जब चंद्रमा की ओर इंगित कर रहा हो। अब, कोणों का यह सेट आपके पास मौजूद नाममात्र के साथ मेल खाएगा। आप उसके साथ मोटे तौर पर संरेखित कर सकते हैं, एक ड्रिफ्ट फ्लैग और REFSMMAT फ्लैग सेट कर सकते हैं, और आपके पास एक अच्छा प्लेटफॉर्म होगा और हम एक अच्छे संरेखण से कुछ डिग्री के भीतर होंगे। और, यदि आवश्यक हो, तो हम इस बिंदु पर रुक सकते हैं और प्रवेश के साथ आगे बढ़ सकते हैं; हालाँकि, एक अच्छा प्लेटफॉर्म प्राप्त करने के प्रयास में, हम आपको विकल्प 1 करने के लिए कहेंगे, और विकल्प 1 स्लॉट में आपको प्रवेश मिलेगा। आप मान निकालेंगे, और हम गेंद को प्रवेश बिंदु के अनुसार लगभग संरेखित करेंगे, फिर हम सामान्य क्रम में अ
ジェミニ4
好了，尼尔，当你感觉到我们接触时，你要
わかりました。メインバスBについて私の観察をお話ししましょう。そこでは物事がかなり急速に進み、最初に衝撃音か爆発音か、あるいは原因が何だったのかは分かりませんが、その音を聞きました。次に、約1秒後に、マスターアラームが発生しました。これはメインバスBの電圧低下でした。電圧を確認したところ、この時点では電圧は良好だったので、スパイクだったのではないかと考えています。燃料電池3も良好で、流量も良好で
حسنًا. الآن لديّ نجم واضح. بدأتُ من أسفل توهج الهواء، ثم يتلاشى تدريجيًا حتى يكاد يختفي، حيث تبدأ النجوم بالظهور، ثم تبدأ بالتحرك نحو توهج الهواء. أرى نجمًا بوضوح شدي
로저. 이글호는
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. До места сброса отходов осталось примерно минута, а
Say again your prop quantity. 46
请稍等。我们需要调整目标定
好的。如果我没听错的话，乔，这次机动操作的时间是 2 
حسنًا. نريد الحصول على كل من الأكسجين والهيدروج
جيميني 6، كان ذلك REP RB. هل فه
يجب أن تحرص على الميل في الاتجاه الذي ترغب بالذهاب إليه، وإلا ستكون في حالة سُكر طفيف. بعبارة أخرى، عليك أن تُمرر قدمك فوق الأخرى لتبقى أسف
هذا صحيح. لقد
ठीक है। मैं बस 
Question, Joe. Jim has been talking to me about how we are going to do this midcourse, and awhile back when we went through this power up, we had pulle
ठीक है। यह 
Très bon.
로저, 프랭크. 그 자세에서 고이득을 확보할 수 있습니까? 원격 측정에 문제가 생겼
음, 여기 어딘가에 주
Очень ин
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 데이터를 검토한 결과 상태가 양호하며, 준비가 되면 언제든 원래 자세로 복귀할 수 있을 것으로 
Ну, мне нужно туда з
Avez-vous constaté des
Roger. Muchea Cap Com. Loud and clear. Tell Jerry and Gus and Lewis and--everybody else t
네, 이번 촬영은 17시 47분에 완료했고, 39번 카운터로 이동했습니다. 1시
Okay. It's about a 10-stepper, but real easy. Okay. On CB 16, INVERTER 2, close. CB 11, AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2, close. Panel 14, verify INVERTER switch 2. CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2, close. RENDEZVOUS RADAR, release. RENDEZVOUS RADAR to on panel 3. Are you with me?
Okay. 
حسناً. لاحظتُ تغيراً في الأصوات المح
右
فري
Es ist ein ziemlich unheimlicher Anblick. Die Tatsache, dass die Sonnenko
ठीक है, मैंने तुम्हारी बात
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हम जल्द ही गोल्डस्टोन को हैंडओवर करने वाले हैं, और इसके बाद हमारी डाउनलिंक स्पीड में कोई सुधार नहीं होगा। मुझे नहीं पता कि आपको अपलिंक स्पीड में कोई फर्
Yes, I be
Okay. Drehen Sie das Raumschiff nach links, um eine gute Sicht auf die Erde und Ihr Rendezvous-Fenste
This is Friendship Se
حسنًا. في الخطوة 34 ضمن قسم التخزين النهائي، وهو قسم مخصص لجميع الأغراض، توجد خطوة بعنوان "توصيل الجليكول الثانوي بالمبرد"، وفيها خيار "تجاوز، تحقق". أثناء وجودنا في هذا القسم، نود الانتقال إلى اللوحة 382، وهي لوحة التحكم بالماء، وضبط صمام التحكم في
Roger. Wir fliegen gerade ü
Roge
بدأتُ الآن أرى شروق الشمس في المنظار. هذا أول ضوء يظهر في المنظار خلال هذه الدورة تحديدًا نتيجةً للجانب الليلي. من الواضح أن المنظار لا يعمل إطلاقًا في وضع الرجوع للخلف على الجانب الليلي. أول ضوء أراه الآن في وضع شبه مظلم. يشرق الشمس بسرعة كبيرة عبر الم
了解しました。分かりました。高利得アンテナはリセット位置まで切り替わった後もオンのままにしている
Apollo 8, die Verfolgung ist noch im Gange und es ist noch etwas zu früh, um Ihnen eine endgültige Antwort auf die Ergebnisse geben zu
रॉजर। कुछ दिलचस्प बातें - मैंने अभी-अभी चंद्रमा के साथ NAV किया; सूर्य अभी बीच में है। मैंने एंटारेस का एक सेट कैप्चर कर लिया था और दूसरे सेट पर काम कर रहा था, तभी चंद्रमा का किनारा पूरी तरह से गायब हो गया। सेक्स्टेंट से देखने पर आस
Houston, Apollo 11. Abbiamo ancora acceso il ventilatore dell'ossigeno per il serbatoio 2. È questo che vu
حسنًا. يُمكنك توقع عملية تنظيف خلية الوقود، وسننتهي من شحن البطارية (أ) ب
Roger. À première vue, il semble que vous ayez
Bonjour Houston; Ver
Roger. Nous allons commencer par l'actualité internationale. Les messages diffusés la veille de Noël, alors que le petit vaisseau spatial orbitait autour de la Lune, ont suscité des éloges pour les astronautes américains d'Apollo 8 et l'espoir d'une coopération internationale dans l'exploration spatiale. Même dans le monde communiste, l'enthousiasme était palpable pour le premier voyage de l'homme sur la Lune. À Moscou, le scientifique soviétique Anatoly Besaranov a rappelé que son pays et les États-Unis avaient déjà partagé des connaissances spatiales et a prédit que le vol d'Apollo 8 mènerait à une coopération accrue. À Cuba, Radio La Havane a rediffusé le programme de la Voix de l'Amérique pour informer ses auditeurs du discours d'Apollo 8. Les responsables de la Voix ont indiqué que c'était la première fois que les programmes d'une agence américaine étaient diffusés par la radio de La Havane. La Tchécoslovaquie a suivi le vol lunaire grâce à une large couverture télévisée; et à Budapest, en Hongrie, on ne parlait que de ça dans les trains et les bus. Dans le monde non communiste, les employés de bureau et les personnes faisant leurs achats de Noël retenaient leur souffle tandis que le vaisseau spatial se préparait pour son décollage vers la Terre. Dans les rues, les Français louaient le savoir-faire américain et l'exploit spatial, et certains téléspectateurs, en regardant les images lunaires à la télévision, s'exclamaient « Magnifique! ». À Londres, des hordes de clients, venus faire leurs achats de Noël, se pressaient dans les magasins et les pubs pour regarder les images télévisées des cratères lunaires. Le plus éminent astronome spatial britannique, Bernard Lovell, qui, jusqu'à il y a quelques semaines, critiquait le projet Apollo 8 au motif que des instruments pouvaient accomplir la mission sans mettre en danger la vie des astronautes, a clairement fait savoir qu'il était profondément impressionné par le vol lunaire. Le pape Paul VI a rendu hommage à ces pionniers de l'extension de l'intellect et de l'activité humaine. Seuls quelques grincheux ont cependant dénigré ce voyage d
自动警示灯已开启。摄像
Roger. And got a couple of words for you. Jack's been watching you since, and he has a few words he wants t
Roger. Stimmt. Es zählte hoch, als wir es ausgeschaltet haben. Als ich es das letzte Mal gesehen habe, stand es bei 6,9. Frank hat es jetzt wieder auf AUTO gestellt, mit dem Funktionsschalter drin, und es ist um sechs Zehntel gesprungen. Dann hat er es ein zweites Mal versucht, und es bli
حسنًا، لديّ بعض الأمور التي أودّ توضيحها لك، ثم سنتركك وحدك لبعض الوقت. أولًا، نودّ منك التأكد من أن مقياس حساسية الضوء (ASA)
Très bien. C'est clair maintenant, Frank. Vas-y, répète ce que tu disais à propos du burea
रॉजर। हम
هل هناك أي شيء آخر يمكننا القيام به من أجلك، أو هل هناك أي شيء 
了解しました。6万4千ドルで、トランクウィリティ基地の着陸地点の位置をまだ特定中です。LAM2のチャートでジュリエット0.5と7.8にあると思われます。そのチャートはまだ船内に保管されていますか？オーバー
جميع المواقف تبدو مثالية هنا. كيف تبدو 
Есть ли на данный момент информация о наличии сигнала VII на тр
分かりました。今お見せできるのは、ちょっとした追加情報ですが、コマンドモジュールのフレッドのソファの上にドラッグが置いてあることです。アクエ
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لا يمكن قراءة بياناتك. سنؤجل العملية حتى نتمكن من تح
Salve, Apollo 11. Houston. Abbiamo notato alcune stranezze sul trasduttore dell'indicatore di flusso di O2. Abbiamo il sospetto che il trasduttore... Ci aspettavamo di vedere un flusso di O2 elevato con lo sfiato dello stivaggio dei rifiuti su VENT. Non è stato così. Abbiamo anche notato alcune strane indicazioni quando avete chiuso la valvola di sfiato dello stivaggio dei rifiuti. Continueremo a esaminarlo per tutta la n
わかりました、ヴァンス。待っている間に、参考までにお伝えしますが、コマンドモジュールはハッセルブラッドのカメラ2台を除
Roger. Vedo che le co
Vuoi vedere u
实时
क्या इसे उसी चार्ट
はい、アポロ8号です。私が持っている最初のも
昨日ほどは晴れてはいませんが
설정 완료
알겠습니다. 그건 이해했어요. 40 ∆V라고 다시 한번
アポロ
Roger, tutto bene.
Okay. Jack, right now we're not able to. The sunlight's reflecting
무슨
네, 맞습니다. 잠시만 기다려주세요. 현재 6.13과 4.80이 나
Хорошо, Хьюстон; 13. В ответ на вопрос 1, изменения уровня шума происходили главным образом между первой ступенью и остальными ступенями — уровень шума н
Ok, Jim ha ragione. Dovremmo cancellare tutto questo, con un paio di eccezioni. La valvola di scarico anteriore, chiusa, il pr
Apollo 11, répétez. Vous avez été coupé. Term
Начав с Соединенных Штатов, Эд фактически начал распаковыват
य
알겠습니다, 밴스. 절차: 유도 제어,; 모드 제어, 자세 유지;, 입력; 자세 제어; 롤 0, 피치 90, 요 0; 물론 제 볼이 지금 작동하지 않아서, 그건 제가 알아서 해야겠네요. 5는 모드 제어, 자동입니다. 6:,, 속도 모니터링; 각 축에서 초당 1도 미만의 속도, 비활성화, 그리고 마지막 부분은 못 들었습니다. 다음은,, 입력; 1257, 입력; 252, 입력; 1, 입력;, 입력;, 입력; 22110, 진행;, 입력;,, 입력; 속도 모니터링. 모든 축에서 초당 0.01도 미만의 속도, 입력; 모드 제어, 자세 
Насколько нам известно, единственным возможным спутником в данном случае может б
Roger.... REP RB 26 plus 39; roll left 47 degrees, ro
오, EECOMM은 만족해하고 있습니다. 설정이 완
Roger. Noch etwa 2 Minut
Okay, Jack. Hold the phone. I forgot the rheostat was cranked all the way down on the ANUN/NUM and it's showing 720, which looks like a pr
Okay, auf Schritt Nummer - oder Seite 2, sollten wir Schritt 5 durchführen und die zweite Zeile von Sc
Rog
ठीक है। हम इसे बाहर निकालना चाहेंगे, और फिर बैटिंग 2 शुरू
Okay. Bei den 226 Leitungsschutzschaltern, die ich mir angesehen habe – es handelt sich um sechs Leitungsschutzschalter, und zwar die ersten sechs von links in der unteren Reihe des Verteilerkastens. Sie sind unter „Beleuchtung“ zu
ठीक है। हम SPAN टीम से इस समस्या के बारे में बात करेंगे और आपको सुबह बता देंगे। अगर आपको आज रात हमें कॉल करना पड़े, तो कृपया DOWNVOICE BACKUP मोड में कॉल करें। हम उस मोड के लिए कॉन्फ़िगरेशन कर रहे हैं; और जहाँ तक हमें लगता 
马克。一张助推器的照片。现在开始传
Ich krieg
ठीक है। लगभग आधे रास्ते तक। जब प्रणोदक की मात्रा 30 प्रतिशत, या बल्कि 37 प्रतिशत हो जाती है, तो हम उस पंक्ति को इस प्रकार बदलना चाहेंगे - जब शेष समय 10 सेकंड हो - बेशक, उसके नीचे वाली पंक्ति वै
13، هيوستن. خمس دقائق قادمة. تبد
Okay, Joe. Ich hab
Nous aurons une mise
자, 여기 가방 두 개가 있습
D'accord, Joe. La dernière fois qu'on a vu le signal positif, c'était quand Fred a vu une évacuation de gaz, environ 5 heure
L'abbiamo cambiato: abbiamo provato a spegnere il nostro sistema di controllo della navicella spaziale, ma la combinazione continuava a 
好的，吉姆。“姿态控制时，ACA 指针离开定位点，指向零误差。然后设置事件计时
Roger, Aurora
جميع الأنظمة تبدو بحالة 
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, всякий раз, когда скорость вашего OAMS превышает 120 футов/сек, мы будем использовать р
حسناً يا جاك. هل لديك أي ماء متبقٍ من تلك المياه - المياه المعبأة في
केबिन की सापेक्ष आर्द्रता 20 प्रतिशत है। शीतलक की मात्रा 66 प्रतिशत है। सूट का तापमान 68 डिग्री है, दबाव 5.8 डिग्री है, सूट सर्किट में भाप का तापमान 50 डिग्री है और आरामदायक है
जब आप कॉपी करने
Gut. Also, wir hatten hier im Mittleren Westen einen heftigen Schneesturm; ich weiß nicht, ob man den von da oben sehen kann. Und in Houston ist es übrigens ziemlich kühl geworden, so um die 35 Grad. Und wir würden gerne wissen, wen ihr nächsten Sonntag favorisiert, Baltimore oder Cleveland? Die Verteidigung von Baltimore war gestern wirklich beeindruckend. Sie haben eine
罗杰，哥伦比亚。
حسنًا. سيكون هذا منتصف المحيط الهادئ، 357 152 359 268، زائد 0813، ناقص 165
Adios. 
脉冲。我这就去追赶。到
Ça me donne le mal de mer, Charlie. Je vais juste te remettre à l'endroit, là où est ta p
这里视线很差，
...atteggiamento da palla di fuoco...spegni
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地から昨夜の地
罗杰，休斯顿。这
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Сейч
Ricevuto. Stiam
Und, 11, nur zur Information: Die Stärke der ersten Kurskorrektur, falls wir sie durchführen, beträgt etwa 17 Fuß pro 
हाँ, मुझे ल
Ja. Jawohl, Sir. Schnurrt über 
功能，关闭；模式，待机；GTA，向下；GTA 盖，锁定；姿态，；刻度，5/5；选择，1；源，；姿态设置，；手动姿态横滚、俯仰、偏航、速率指令；极限循环，关闭；死区，最小；速率，高；THC 功率，
هذا
네. 지금 목소리가 너무 약하게 들리네요. 산소 탱크 1 히터는 끄고,
ヒューストン、脱出準備をしていた時の窓の外の景色について話す時間はあまりありませんでしたが、その時までには北半球の明るい部分全体、北米、北大西洋、ヨーロッパ、北アフリカなどが見えていました。天気はどこもかしこも良好でした。北カナダ、アサバスカ、おそらくアサバスカ地域の東側に、低気圧が一つありました。グリーンランドは晴れていて、グリーンランドの氷床だけが見えるようでした。北大西洋は全体的に良好で、ヨーロッパと北アフリカも晴れているようでした。
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 스틸헤드입니다. 현재 상태가 아주 좋다고 들었습니다. 찰리 씨 맞
Oui. Je ne le ferai probablement pas
Хор
了解、ジェミニ4号。了解しました。それから、飛行
Nu
حسنًا يا جيم. تمهيدًا لهذا الإجراء الذي سنستخدمه في منتصف المسار، وهو عبارة عن احتراق يدوي. سيتم التحكم في وضعية المركبة يدويًا، وكذلك تشغيل/إيقاف المحرك. لدينا الآن اتجاه جيد نحوك، ولكن اتضح أنك تقترب بزاوية أقل من اللازم. هذا يعني أننا سنزيد زاوية الاحتراق لنقترب بزاوية أكثر حدة، وسنقترب من الجانب المظلم للأرض. وبالتالي، ل
آمل أن يكون الجميع قد فحصوا هذا الأمر بدقة متناهية. أحد أهم أهدافنا هو الحصول على مركبة فضائية مث
रॉजर। समझ गया; लगभग बूस्टर के
И, пожалуй, стоит повысить качество связи на время длительного чтения контрольного списка. Для этого требуется панель 16: основной усилитель 
前进
Хорошо. Поймите, площадка без связи больше недействительна из-за смещения курса. Угол входа, рассчитанный на основе отслеживания за последние 2 часа, составляет 5,99, и я так понимаю, вы собираетесь продолжать отслеживание еще некоторое время, чтобы определить, нужно ли нам еще одно смещени
Oh, ich sehe, dass der Strom – der Strom 
रेट्रो पावर, सुरक्षित
好的，比尔。在我们阅读这里的重要更新之前，我想先给吉姆简要说明一下操作步骤。当他恢复意识后，请他按回车键。
حسنًا. أستطيع تمييز أجزاء صغيرة جدًا - أراضٍ زراعية، وأراضٍ رعوية في الأسفل
We'll be char
Роджер. Y 001, NA, плюс 00202 46420 547 46211 12 1383 327 023 вверх 172 влево 22, плюс 1293, минус 16500, плюс 12905, плюс 36180, Сириус, 010 294 320, без зазора, быстрый возврат, 7821 mid-PAC; высокая скорость не требуется. Кон
Zwei Dinge, Jim. Wir möchten Sie darauf hinweisen, dass es einige ziemlich große Einstellungsfehler gibt. Wenn Sie also auf AUTO gehen, wird der Computer versuchen, Sie durcheinander zu b
アポロ13号、ヒューストンです。電
私も影響
ठी
Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Есть какие-нибудь новости о прохождении этого маршру
Bene. Fase 1, "CONTROLLO DELL'ATT
Roger. 
62970, minus 162, plus 129, plus 00966, plus 00552, minus 02079. Next three are all zeros, NA, plus 00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013, up 04.7, righ
حسنًا. هذا اختياري. الطريقة التي كتبنا بها الصفحة -1أ، كانت جزءًا من الخ
Ora dovremmo vedere la luce di tracciamento. Eccola. Non sembra
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11
ロ
Мы снова вернулись к стойке с Z-образным
— Весь наш анализ основ
C
Mike, 
इस समय एमएससी क्षेत्र में बारिश के बादल छाए हुए हैं। यहाँ
Okay. Zum Warmwasserboiler: Es ist interessant, dass ich mein eigenes Mikrofon habe – ich wollte gerade sagen, dass ich mich selbst mit etwa zwei Sekunden Verzögerung höre, sobald un
أنا خائف بالفعل من أن يقوم جاك بإغلاقه 
アポロ8号、アポロ8
Und ich dachte, ich nehme mir hier nur kurz Zeit (ca. 5 Sekunden) und schaue, ob ich
알겠습니다. 배터리 5, 고전압 - 또는 배터리 5 일반 전원 공급 장치
收到。3号三角洲区域，3号三角洲区域时间为
हमारे सामने इस घाटी में जमाव वाली सामग्री में एक बहुत गहरा गड्ढा है। यह कुछ असामान्य है क्योंकि यह स्पष्ट रू
Ok, molto bene. Sotto "Stivaggio finale", la prima cosa che vedi alla ri
Houston, wohin soll der Abwasser
نود منك تحويل مفتاح الكمية إلى وضع القراءة من
좋아요, 월리, 저희가 
Okay. Genau. Das ist Jim Lovell. Wir dachten, wir zeigen Ihnen heute einfach ein bisschen was vom Leben an Bord von Apollo 8. Wir haben Ihnen bereits Bilder vom Mond und von der Erde gezeigt und möchten Sie nun in unser Zuhause einladen. Wie Sie auf dem Instrumentenbrett sehen können, ist es nun schon seit mindestens vier Tagen unser Zuhause. Wir markieren jeden Tag auf dem Instrumentenbrett. Wir haben vier Tage hinter uns und arbeiten am fünften. Natürlich freuen wir uns alle auf die Landung am Freitag. Hier unten, im unteren Geräteraum des Raumschiffs, befindet sich der Fitnessberater des Präsidenten, Captain Jim Lovell, der gerade sein tägliches Trainingsprogramm absolviert. Sie sehen, wie er sich ganz frei bewegt. Er hat sich gerade den Kopf an der Optik gestoßen, die wir zur Navigation verwenden. Er trainiert mit einem Gerät, das die Muskeln in Form hält. Eine weitere sehr wichtige Funktion unseres Raumschiffs ist der Bordcomputer. Ich dachte, Sie wären vielleicht daran interessiert, die Anzeigen hier zu sehen, die uns alle Informationen über unsere Triebwerkszündung, die Navigation und die Geschwindigkeit beim Eintritt in die Erdumlaufbahn und beim Bremsen liefern. Sie sehen, dass er über ein Tastenfeld, ähnlich einer Schreibmaschinentastatur, gesteuert wird. Die Eingaben und Ausgaben darüber sind wirklich erstaunlich. Er hat uns fantastische Dienste geleistet, und Jim Lovell hat ihn hervorragend bedient. Ein weiterer wichtiger Punkt, ob im Weltraum oder auf der Erde, ist die Ernährung. Ich habe Bill Anders gebeten, Ihnen zu zeigen, wie wir hier oben im Flug essen. Entschuldigen Sie die Bildstörungen, während wir uns hier bewegen und die Kameras wechseln. Unsere Nahrung ist dehydriert und in Vakuumbeuteln verpackt. Sie sehen, dass Bill sie nur loslassen muss, damit sie an Ort und Stelle bleibt. Abgesehen von den Luftströmungen im Raumschiff würde sie vollkommen still liegen. Er holt seine praktische Schere heraus und schneidet den Beutel auf. Das Essen ist abwechslungsreich und im Allgemeinen recht gut. Wenn das nicht gerade nach einer überschwänglichen Empfehlung klingt, dann ist es das auch nicht, aber trotzdem: Es ist wirklich gutes Essen. Man merkt, dass Bill sehr geschickt ist. Er arbeitet schnell. Die Beutel mit dem Essen kleben übrigens zusammen, weil sie vakuumverpa
D'accord. À 27 minutes après... On leur indi
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Das ist eine gute Frage. Ich wünschte, ich wüsste es auch. Diese Fehler traten während des gesamten Fluges immer wieder auf. Ich habe die Gyroskope ein- und ausgeschaltet. Ich befinde mich jetzt wieder in der Umlaufbahnlage, aber irgendwie auch nicht. Die Lageanzeiger zeigen zwar die Umlaufbahnlage an, aber sie stimmt nicht. Wenn ich zum Horizont schaue, rolle ich etwa 20° nach rechts und habe 20° zu viel Nickwinkel nach unten. Visuell messe ich etwa 
好的。你希望我们
Le luci sulla punta delle dita si trovano propr
Seve
Yes. For your information, Jim, I don't know whether you heard that originally, but t
夜はここで、ただ写真を撮ること、特に気にせず目撃情報を集めることに時間を費やすべきだ。ゲームの目的
Can't see a thing, Gus. The quantity at the end of the O2 High Rate Check was down to 62 percent. Started at 66 an
好
आप 
चलिए इसे
Okay, keine Beschwe
Как отличить концы друг от 
バズ、窓ガードを
罗杰。我想知道你是否注意到
大丈夫ですよ。コロンビアさん、リクエストして承
حسنًا. الصورة التي أعطاني إياها جيم عن رؤيته من خلال القمر الص
A
11، هيوستن. تمام. يبدو الأمر جيدًا. و، 11، لديّ تحديثات لوحة المناورة والمواد الاستهلاكية الخاصة
I am now in, gyros normal, maneuver off, al
Ric
Pou
Dieser kleine Kassettenrekorder war uns eine große Hilfe – er hat uns die Zeit auf unserer Reise zum Mond sehr angenehm vertrieben – und es ist schon etwas seltsam, ihn so in Odyssey schweben zu sehen, während er die Titelmelodie von „2001“ spielt. Und
... ٤٢ بالمئة. حوا
好的，本质上，我们已经绕过了步骤 4，而且我们还没有把所有 4 个 aps - 优质 BAT 连接到高压插座上，所以我将划掉步骤 4
알겠습니다.
Rudnev speaking. Comrades from Moscow are asking about your health and wellness. We told them that everything is fine, you are feeling fine and we 
Роджер. Мы просто сидим и ждём, когда же что-нибудь сделаем. Нам нужен вектор состояния, показания. И нам нужно, чтобы ты следил за нашей нагрузкой, давал голосовую проверку и проверял тягу. Конец свя
أبولو 8، لقد
没错。我们脱离长脐带已经有
Всё работает отлично. Я закончил — один набор наблюде
まあ、それに関しては、キャビンを何とかしないといけないん
オレンジ色
Back u
Okay. Ja, wir 
Why don't you, between each one of these, turn it
300 pieds en dessous, 3,5, 47 en avant. À venir - 1 par minute, 1,5 en d
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Пока рано говорить о каких-либо конкретных цифрах по работе вашей связи. Похоже, она работает так же хорошо, как и предсказывалось, и всё остальное, кажется, работает лучше, так что, возможно, и здесь всё будет лучше. После того, как мы проведём следующие проверки связи, некоторые другие вещи будут работать лучше; я смогу дать ва
Okay, Joe. Der Bogen ist fertig gebaut un
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। आपकी व्हाइट टीम अब शुरू हो चुकी है। हम टीवी के एक रोमांचक शाम और सोने से पहल
Questo è negativo. A questo punto, a questa combustione, non si raggiunge il 37%, quindi non credo che dovremo eseguire quel passaggio. Lo verificheremo per voi. Okay. Un altro: "Allo spegnimento motore, 
مضختا التبريد تعملان. مراوح البدلة تعمل. أجهزة استقبال الإرسال عالية التردد في وضع إعادة الدخول. وضع الصوت الجديد مُفعّل على التردد العالي. لن نتمكن من فعل ذلك. 
Bene. Ora i successivi uno, due, tre, quattro, cinque sono uguali e vogliamo che AUTO sia OFF. Fine
收到。所有系统都正常。您的D-9实验第四次运行的变更时间已确
Looks to us like you'v
حسنًا يا جيم. أسمعك تتحدث هناك مرة أخرى، لكنني ل
はい。メキシコ南部のすぐ
Il est en bonne voie, prêt à partir. Et je vais passer en mod
Okay, Aquarius; Houston. With the present amount of power you've got in the LM, which is over 500 amp-hours, and the rate you're using them, we figure you've got almost 12 hou
ねえ
현재 고도 
C'est super! Je serai ravi de voir ça. On vous montre le départ ici sur le terrain et j'ai une mise à jour sur la manœuv
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴
حسنًا. ما زلنا نبحث عن وضع النطاق العادي لنطاق S إلى وضع الن
Roger. Bill möchte den Arzt u
Fred-o, diresti il ​​posto di bloc
К
ヒューストン、次はお家のお子さんたち、いや、世界中の子供たちにちょっとしたデモンストレーションをします。スプーンで水を飲む様子を見せようと思っていたのですが、スプーンに水を入れすぎてしまい、気をつけないと水がスプーンの端からこぼれ落ちてしまいそうです。スプーンの上で
Sigma Seven, qui Muchea. Non ho letto le vostre tras
在此期间，为了帮
Ну, учитывая, что он холостяк и ему не 
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। आज हम आपके लिए जो करने वाले हैं, वह है अंतरिक्ष यान ओडिसी से शुरू करना और आपको ओडिसी से सुरंग के रास्ते एक्वेरियस तक ले जाना। हम आपको लैंडिंग
Columbia, Houston. Per quelle P76, un amichevole promemoria dal tuo amico a quattro zampe: 
Хорошо. Это касается переноса оборудования. Фильтр и мешок для салонного вентилятора, и всё это следует положить в... Хорошо, дальше: дезинфекционные пакеты, за исключением тех, которы
D'accord. Je suppose qu'on peut trouver la solution par nous-mêmes,
Хорошо. Последние 12 часов мы работаем с открытой лицевой панелью и без перчаток, но в основном
Ok, fammi vedere il graf
弗雷德，我听到了你
Ok. Ho un aggiornamento per te sul D-9. È la corsa numero
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. للعلم، نتوقع أن تبدأ مناورة وضعية الانفصال عند ٣ + ٠٥ + ٠٣، وأن تكتمل عند + ٠٩ + 
Ро
Ok. Abbiamo avuto alcuni problemi con i nostri display e credo che ora siano risolti, ma potresti doverci tenere informati se dovessimo superare i limiti 
ヒューストン、燃料電池 3 の O2 フローが増
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven. Impossibile leggere la trasmissio
Роджер. Ред. 33. 
Ja, ist
それを元
Ok, non abbiamo ancora un orario preciso per l'inizio del
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к 2000 году, но лидеры демократов ответили, что приоритет должен быть отдан потребностям на Земле. Агню, высокопоставленный правительственный чиновник, присутствовавший на запуске «Аполлона-11» в среду, по-видимому, говорил от своего имени, а не обязательно от имени администрации Никсона, когда сказал: «На мой взгляд, мы должны отправить человека на Марс к концу этого столетия». Ларедо, Техас, AP: Иммиграционные власти Нуэво-Ларедо объявили в среду, что хиппи будут отказывать во въезде в Мексику по туристическим картам, если они не примут ванну и не подстригутся. Уберто Касарас, начальник мексиканской иммиграционной службы в Нуэво-Ларедо, заявил, что власти Мехико, Акапулько и других популярных туристических мест получили жалобы на хиппи. По сообщению United Press International: Первоначальная реакция на решение президента Никсона предоставить федеральным служащим выходной в понедельник, чтобы они могли отметить национальный день участия в лунной миссии «Аполлон-11», была в основном удивлением. Родни Биднер, Associated Press, Лондон, AP: Европа поражена миссией «Аполлон-11». Газеты по всему континенту заполняют свои страницы фотографиями ракеты «Сатурн V», стартующей для установления первой связи Земли с ее естественным спутником. И авторы заголовков напрягали воображение, чтобы подобрать слова, чтобы восхвалять этот подвиг. «Величайшее приключение в истории человечества началось», — заявила французская газета Le Figaro, посвятив четыре страницы репортажам с мыса Кеннеди и схемам миссии. Таблоид Paris Jour провозгласил: «Весь мир говорит им „браво“». Коммунистическая ежедневная газета L'Humanite начала с фотографии запуска и посвятила всю последнюю с
Roger. Ils en sont à la page Surface 27 de la liste de contrôle, 
بغض النظر عن المكان الذي تسافر إليه، من الجميل دائماً
D'accord. T
Okay. I disagree on the fifth line
Gemelli
그리고 켄, 당신 남편분이 OMNI-Switch 게임을 하고 싶어 하신다면, 저희는 지금 Dog - Bravo 채널에 있습니다. 정확히는 Bravo 채널이지만 D 채널로도 
Okay. -2, /G&N: 63634; plus 0.96, minus 0.23,; min
Roger. Je vous ai bien comp
रॉजर। 16 पर भी यही बात लागू होती है, फ्रे
ह
ऑरोरा सेवन, क्या हम चेकलि
了解。もう一度言います。ΔV 167。3+35。GETRC 01 32 35。読み取りス
Нет, я не пробовал много альтернативных вариантов. На самом деле, вариант номер 1 — это не опорожнение мочевого пузыря. Думаю, дело в каком-то соединении в мочеприемнике или
Stehen
Nella riga 2, DISPLAY DI VOLO, aprire SPINTA, aprire TIMER MISSIONE, aprire AUTONOMI
यह नकारात्मक है, अपोलो 8। हम पहले चीजों को अपडेट करना चाहेंगे, और
まだ風邪を引いていないけど、今まで
Okay.
За кого ты меня прини
بمجرد أن أضبط رمية 
इस फ्लाइट में हमारे पास ज़्यादा लोग नहीं ह
On essaie juste de déterm
D'accord. Je croyais que tu avais appelé, Jack. On est en train de manœuvrer pour pêcher la Terr
そうだ。レスキュービーコンはオンにな
Перед нами небольшой, хорошо различимы
Роджер. Близнецы 8, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы проинформировать вас о ситуации со связью, пока у нас есть немного свободного времени. Через 2 минуты мы будем в Тананариве; мы забере
没错，因为读数有点低。我现在把防护服的设置调到6，准备调到6.5。进展不大
حسنًا. إذا فهمتُك بشكل صحيح، فهذا يمنحني مجالًا للمناورة عند اكتمال التفعيل، ويمكننا أن نكون في وضعية الحرق، لكننا لن نحرق
本当にがっかりしましたが、心に留めて
Apollo 8. Houston. We ha
Они 
Houston, Apollo 11. Sind Sie bereit, einige Zahlen aus dem Statusbericht usw. ab
네, 확인했습니다. 요(yaw) 방향으로 진행하시면 요(yaw) 자세가 바뀔 때마다 저희가 연락드리겠습니다. 그 외에도 저비트 전송률 끄기
Roger. Bemerkungen: Charlie Poppa 1,, Charlie Poppa 2,, Ch
了解。PAD: 102 33 04.36, 09 50、マイナス 00021 182 287 000、プラス 56919。10未満: 105 12 30.00。10より大きい
没错。姿态：横滚0度，偏航2度（右），俯仰-33度。所有速率均为零。我目前处于工作状态。时钟仍设置为返航时间，逆行时间为04+32+28。我从百慕大收到的逆行时间正确。客舱压力稳定在5.7。客舱空气温度90华氏度。相对湿度30%。冷却剂用量68%。宇航服环境温度65华氏度。宇航服压力指示为5.8。宇航服蒸汽温度60华氏度。我感觉非常舒适。但是，我暂时不想调低温度。主氧气
分かりました。ジムが見せてくれた地球の一部の写真は、地球の一部で、明るい部分は地球の上半分にあり、カスプはY-Y線上にありました。つまり、地球の暗い部分全体が地球の底部にあり、暗い部分の非常に細い三日月形がY-Y線より上の線まで伸びている
Okay. We got a number of interesting ideas on that and the latest one I've heard is to power up the platform and a
Sì. Abbiamo notato che la temperatura nell'abitacolo era aumentata al rientro rispetto all'uscita. E ricordo che, uscendo, abbiamo posizionato manualmente la valvola a dieci pin, ma avevamo un controllo piuttosto preciso sulla temperatura di uscita dell'evaporatore di glicole. Quindi, probabilmente, sarebbe stato quello il problema da affrontare per primo, piuttosto ch
I miei erano in LOCK dove avrebbero 
आपने बट
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Votre signal est faible. Je répète les informations concernant votre tr
收到。这里是友谊七号。舷窗、姿态指示器和潜望镜都运行良好。目前我可以通过潜望镜看到我身后的暗面正在升起。舱压为5.5，保持稳定。舱内温度为95华氏度。相对湿度为28%。我已经将舱内水温调节器调至水温升高模式，以增强冷却效果。蒸汽温度目前显示为61华氏度。氧气浓度为75%至100%。我没有报告宇航服温度。宇航
अगर आपको ठीक लगे तो मैं अपन
没错。现在，我们需要添加一些内容来替
Houston, Apollo 8. Fine
Questo è negativo. Aspetta. Tutto quello c
Хорошо, а сколько сей
Je vais essayer ta technique pour la période de dérive sur cette orbite; je pense que ça va être super. J'ai raté un trou près d'une île. On dirait San Clemente, mais je n'en suis pas sûr. Oui, je suis au-dessus des terres mainten
Und, Jack, habt ihr da unten jetzt alle verl
휴스턴입니다. 짐, 신호가 잡힌 것 같습니다. 데이터 흐름이 훨씬 원활해질 겁니다. 다만
Да, эти обогреватели работают ис
Wir würden je
D'accord, Vance. Ce que nous allons faire, c'est que, lorsque nous aurons atteint l'attitude requise, nous désactiverons les quadrilatères et ferons comme hier soir: nous laisserons les autres en bas nous dire quand vous jugerez la stabilité suffisante; ensuite, nous effectuerons tous ces réglages au sex
Getting a l
那当然很好，但是——很好
मैंने पढ़ने के लिए अल्वाग्रिन को विलुप्त कर दिया है। अब यह प्रयोग उपयोगी नहीं होगा; मुझे देखने के लिए केबिन की रोशनी चाहिए। विलुप्तिकरण फोटोमीटर ढूंढना बहुत मुश्किल है। देखते हैं कि क्या मैं इसे अभी ढूंढ पाता हूँ। समान प्रकाश व्यवस्था
Роджер. 
我收到你的Z校准了。好的，速率很理想，正在归零。我要切换回正常位
Ich habe die dunkle Seite nun hinter mir gelassen. Der Mond ist noch nicht aufgegangen, und obw
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, Hous
روجر، هيوستن
जी हां,
休斯顿。收到。
창문에 김이 서린 건가요, 아니면 
ठीक है। रंगों की बात करें तो, पानी का रंग गहरा नीला है; बादल तो चमकीले सफेद हैं ही; पृथ्वी से परावर्तन चंद्रमा से कहीं अधिक दिखाई देता है। ज़मीनी इलाके आमतौर पर भूरे रंग के हैं - गहरे भूरे से हल्के भूरे रंग के। विभिन्न मौसमीय क्षेत्रों के कई बादल भंवर दिखाई दे रहे हैं। मैक्सिको की खाड़ी के प्रवेश द्वार से अटलांटिक महासागर तक फैली एक लंबी पट्टी सीरस बादलों की प्रतीत होती है। टर्मिनेटर रेखा इस समय अटलांटिक महासागर 
Esa
يمكنك أيضًا استخدام انعدام الجاذبية لتوضيح العديد من الأمور التي تعلمناها جميعًا في المدرسة. أود
और नील, क्या मैंने नहीं कहा था कि हमें कुछ बै
D'accord, Vance. Tu as raison. Nos caméras sont presque configurées comme tu l'as dit. Pour le module de commande, tu penses
Okay, wir empfangen Ihre Nachricht, Mike? Ich lasse sie im SLEW-Mod
现在正在播
Ему надоело ждать, по
Und während des Brennvorgangs steuerst du natürlich Nick- und Rollwinkel über die Fehleranzeigen. Das ist das kleine Schema, das wir in einigen Simulationen geübt haben
Ok, voglio prendere la pellicol
Okay, I'd like to show this to you while I'm talking. It works like a camera. It has the - The f-stop control is right here, and you set it on f:22 which, of course, lets in the smallest am
Wir haben außerde
收到，
알겠습니다. 말씀하신 내용을 잘 들었습니다. - 아직 3g 정도의 중력이 느껴지네요. 캡슐은 아주 잘 작동하고 있습니다. 속도 조절도 잘 유지되고 있고요. 고도계도 정상입니다. 자세도 아주 잘 유지되
Ok, Jack. Questa è l'ul
Он лежит у меня прямо рядом с моим плюшевым миш
珀斯和罗金厄姆，
D'accord. 
Роджер. Похоже, испаритель работает нормально, или, по крайней мере, пытается. Температура упала примерно до 32 градусов, а теперь снова поднялась и с
那个电视摄像机云台驱动器是不是占用了太多电
आप सही क
Wir glauben, wir wissen
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मैं मुख्य घटनाओं के समयों पर संक्षेप में चर्चा कर लेता हूँ, और फिर हम कुछ विवरण भरेंगे। ठीक है। प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस 142 घंटे 40 मिनट पर है; लगभग 6-1/2 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम हीटर पावर लगाकर, CM/ तापमान की जाँच करके और आवश्यकता पड़ने पर CM/ को पहले से गर्म करके इस पूरी प्रक्रिया को शुरू करेंगे, और हमें लगता है कि हमें ऐसा करना पड़ेगा। इसके लिए विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ बाद में उपलब्ध होंगी। लगभग 6 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम संशोधित / 30-मिनट की चेकलिस्ट का उपयोग करके पावर चालू करना शुरू करेंगे, जिसका उपयोग आपने पिछले मध्यक्रम के लिए किया था। फिर कुछ ही समय बाद, लगभग 5 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम चाहेंगे कि आप बॉडी एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट के लिए सही स्थिति में हों, जैसा हमने पहले किया था, अर्थ टर्मिनेटर का उपयोग करके। और जैसे ही हमें वह मिल जाएगा, हम -7 का प्रदर्शन करेंगे, जो अब लगभग 2 फुट प्रति सेकंड की बर्न दर या लगभग 15 सेकंड का प्रतीत होता है। और मुझे बताया गया है कि यह अब 1-1/2 तक कम हो गया है, इसलिए यह मार्जिन के भीतर आराम से है। ठीक है। जैसे ही हम ऐसा करेंगे, हम तुरंत सर्विस मॉड्यूल जेटिसन एटीट्यूड के लिए पैंतरेबाज़ी शुरू कर देंगे, जो प्लेन में होगा क्योंकि हम इसे सामान्य से पहले जेटिसन कर रहे हैं। हमें आउट-ऑफ-प्लेन कंपोनेंट की आवश्यकता नहीं है, और न ही हम इसे चाहते हैं। इसलिए यह सर्विस मॉड्यूल के साथ प्लेन में होगा जो त्रिज्या वेक्टर के साथ वापस बाहर की ओर इंगित करता है। फिर हम कमांड मॉड्यूल को सर्विस मॉड्यूल एसईपी के लिए तैयार करना शुरू करेंगे, जिसमें कमांड मॉड्यूल चेकआउट और हॉट फायर शामिल है, और लगभग 4 घंटे 30 मिनट पहले, हम सर्विस मॉड्यूल को जेटिसन कर देंगे। हम सर्विस मॉड्यूल प्राप्त करने तक इसे ऊपर उठाएंगे... और कुछ तस्वीरें लेने की कोशिश करेंगे, लेकिन तस्वीरों के लिए हम ट्रांसलेशन पैंतरेबाज़ी में समय बर्बाद नहीं करेंगे क्योंकि हम उस समय आपके उड़ान पथ के कोण को बिगाड़ना नहीं चाहते। ठीक है। इससे हमें लगभग 2 घंटे का खुला समय मिलता है, अगर हम इसमें देरी करते हैं, तो चेकलिस्ट पर जाकर कमांड मॉड्यूल को चालू करने की तैयारी कर सकते हैं। हम कमांड मॉड्यूल को 2 घंटे 30 मिनट पहले पूरी तरह से चालू करना शुरू करेंगे। हम कंप्यूटर को लाइन पर लाएंगे, इसे चालू करेंगे, आपके स्टेट वेक्टर्स को अपलोड करना शुरू करेंगे, और इसी तरह कमांड मॉड्यूल प्लेटफॉर्म को संरेखित करेंगे। लगभग 1 घंटे 30 मिनट पहले, यानी कमांड मॉड्यूल से संबंधित काम करने के लिए एक घंटे के भीतर, हम जेटिसन स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी शुरू करेंगे। फिर आप इसे बंद करना शुरू करेंगे। बेशक, इससे पहले हमारा सारा सामान व्यवस्थित नहीं होगा। हम हैच बंद कर देंगे, दबाव अखंडता 
Роджер, Чарли. Хочу проинформировать вас о текущем состоянии хлорирования. В отсеке B4 у нас есть один, два, три, четыре, пять, шесть, семь — точнее, восемь отсеков для ампул с хлором и буферным раствором, из которых — позвольте мне поправить. — семь отсеков, один из которых пуст и всегда был пуст, осталось шесть. С другой стороны, в отсеке B7, у нас есть еще один контейн
Okay, Ken. Pericynthian più 2, ritorno veloce / 62871, meno 161, più 129, più 45224, meno 06216, meno 18712 001 28 603 49118 112 038 296 terra in alto 010, destra 37, più 1475, più 06400 1323 936 913, Sirio primario, Rigel secondario 129 155
명령 모듈 온도
Tu sais, j'ai regardé en bas. J'ai cru voir mon anneau en D qui dépassai
А вот и горизонт — вот что он собой представляет. Сейчас вы этого не видите, но горизонт меняется между закатом и во
Roger. P76: 84 è meno 00758, tutte le palline, più 0009
Je pense qu'à ce stade, vous avez pu remarquer que nous nettoyions le cockpit, préoccupés par la température de la combinaison.
Roger, 11. Hier spricht Houston. Gegen 71 bis 72 Uhr ist eine Ruhepause geplant, die vermutlich bereits läuft. 71 Uhr: Spülung der O2-Brennstoffzelle; 72 Uhr: CO2-Filterwechsel Nr. 6, Überprüfung des Sekundärkühler-Durchflusses. Wir senden Ihnen Blockdaten für einen 2-Stunden-Überflug, Pericynthion-Überflug und Abbruch im Rückkehrmodus. Bei 73 Uhr:00 Minuten
Now, you might want to take into account what will happen when the maneuvers t
أنا أقرأ لك خمسة - بصوت عالٍ وواضح، وأنت تقو
Roger. Ich habe mich gefragt, welchen Nutzen die bordeigene Positionsbestimmung auf dem Kurs nahe am Mond hat, insbesondere im Hinblick auf die Positionsbest
حسنًا يا جاك. لم نتمكن من رؤية الأرض في تلك
双子星六号，德克萨斯
حسناً يا جاك. على اللوحة 3، شاحن البطارية، مطفأ، محول التيار المتردد 2، مطفأ؛ على اللوحة 5، ربط ناقل التيار الرئيسي ألفا تشارلي، قيد التشغيل؛ اللوحة 250، بط
بعد خمس دقائق. صح
Okay.
Roger... GET RC 25 
No problem, Jim. Go ahead and open them, TRACK and FLOOD, 
Ok, 11. Sembra che le prestazioni del motore durante entrambe le accensioni di questa missione siano state le stesse dei test di accettazione del motore. La lettura del PC di bordo è dovuta a un fattore di calibrazion
Okay. 17 Ost um 17:00
Yes, final
В качестве альтернативы, мы могли бы подождать и сделать это тогда, когда перейдем на электросн
맞아요, 그가 해외에 있는 군인들과 함께 크리스마스를 보내러 온 건 이번
Относительная влажность в салоне составляет 20%. Количество хладагента — 66%. Температура в скафандре — 68 градусов, давление — 5,8, температура пара — 50 градусов в контуре скафандра, комфортная температура. Кислород — 65
*** entrambe le val
Forte e ch
了解、CSQ…衛星は太陽の近くにありました。私の小さな端がゆっくりとこちらに向かってきました。そして、小さな端の上に何かが見えました。それは東の方角を指していたと思い
ठीक है। पावर 5 पर, आपातकालीन पावर डाउन। आइटम 1, पहली पंक्ति, मैं "और VHF-A" को हटा देता हूँ। दूसरी पंक्ति "सिम्प्लेक्स ऑपरेशन"। तीसरी पंक्ति, मैं दूसरे प्राइम (जो कि पावर एम्प है) को "ऑफ" से बदल देता हूँ, और उस पंक्ति का अंतिम शब्द "ऑफ" है, उसे "PCM" से बदल देता हूँ। चौथी पंक्ति ठीक है। पाँचवीं पंक्ति, मैं पूरी पंक्ति हटा देता हूँ। लाइटिंग, हमें अभी तक फ्लड लाइट्स की ज़रूरत नहीं पड़ी है, इसलिए हम उन्हें बंद रखेंगे, बाहरी लाइटिंग बंद। पंक्ति 2 हटा दें और अब मैं पावर 6
Le voyant CRYO PRESSURE est allumé. La pression du H2 a
네, 제리, 밝은 점이 보이네요. 저건... 아마도 태양 직하점인 것 같아요. 남아메리카 해안 근처인 것 같습니다. 주변의 푸른 바다와 비교했을 때 회색빛을 띠는 점이에요. 지름은 정확히 알 수 없지만, 완전
네, 질문은 "라인에 
Удивительн
Okay. Step 2: "BALANCE COUPLE, OFF; DEAD BAND, MINIMUM; ATTITUDE CONTROL: PITCH and ROLL to PULSE; YAW to DIRECT; MODE CONTROL:, ATT HOLD; GUIDANCE CONTROL to ACS; damp rates; p
こちら
Affermativo. Sei pronto a copiare? All'epoca tutti i sistemi erano ecologici. Il car
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。点火まであと1分弱。準
Non c'è molta luce in quella zona, ma a quan
我们真的很想把它用在长焦拍摄中
네, 짐. 시작하기 전에 한 가지 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 저희가 전에 말씀드린 내용은 여전히 ​​정확하다고 생각합니다. 컴퓨터 메모리에서 변경되는 부분은 W-매트릭스뿐입니다. 하지만 추가적인 안전 조치로 컴퓨터 메모리를 덤프해서 비트 단위로 하나
روجر. 
Я не знаю. Мне все еще жарко и я все еще потею, но особого дискомфорта нет. Я бы хотел... я бы хотел разобраться
It was like - like perfect! DELTA-TIG zero, burn time 557, shaft value on the angles, VGX minus 0.1, VGY minus 0.
لا، لا. إنهم بطيئون للغاية؛ لا
Хорошо. Если вы его увидите, можете достать секста
Хорошо, Джек. Я не планировал сбрасывать этот клапан сброса давления на квадроцикле Чарли. Хочешь, я это сделаю? Хорошо. Мы т
Roger. Compris. Sout
Wir hatten in etwa 179 Meilen Entfernung ein Radarsignal und die Radarausrichtung lag bei etwa 156 Meilen. Die Zeiger bewegen sich relativ ruhig und sehen recht gut aus. Der Gierzeiger schwankt leicht, vielleicht um plus/minus ein Grad. Schwierigkeiten bereitet uns die Beseitigung der Restwerte. Wir reduzieren sie auf einen kleinen Wert, doch bei der nächsten Messung steigen sie wieder an und bei der übernächsten sinken sie erneut. Es ist schwer zu erkennen, wann wir tatsächlich null Restwerte erreicht haben. Die Bodenstation bestätigte, dass keine vorhanden sind. Die Beschleunigungsmesserabweichung sah gut aus, aber irgendetwas scheint 
Et en Italie, le pape Paul VI a fait installer un circuit de télévision couleur spécial dans sa résidence d'été afin de pouvoir vous regarder, même si la télévision ital
I've got a real dim light
Forza. Houston. P
روجر، جيم. لقد كنا نتفحص هذه النجوم التي خصصناها لك
알겠습니다. 프랭크 씨, 저희 
아폴로 11호. 30초. 94 더하기 21이 될 것
Roger. Pilot. We have a good temperature for you
जी हाँ। पिछले कुछ दिनों से हल्की-फुल्की बारिश हो रही है, जैसे गरज के साथ तूफान। आज अच्छी बारिश हुई और आसमान में बादल छाए हुए हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों से एक धीमी गति से चलने वाला तूफानी तंत्र इस क्षेत्र से गुजर रहा है, और मुख्य रूप से शाम और दोपहर में गरज के साथ बारिश हो रही 
알겠습니다. G&C 체크리
Okay. Coming up on the 88-hour
Roger. 07:15 Uhr: Kommand
쌍둥이자리 4인 저는 코로 어떻게
Roger. I just wondered how temp on quad A tank is do
اسمحوا لي أن أعلق قليلاً على ذلك. بالنسبة لي، كان تأثير الفلتر الأخض
حسنًا. طاقة الإلكترونيا
Понял. Это значит, мне нужно нажать кнопку RetroSequenc
ليس من الضروري إيصال هذا إليك في وقت محدد. ولكن قبل أن تشرع في تجميع هذه الأشياء بنفسك، نود أن نشاركك بعضًا من
好的
Lass mich mich um den Rücken kümmern. Hör
और एक्सपोज़र के लिए हमें एक सेकंड का आठवां हिस्सा, आधा सेकंड चाहिए। और अगर आपको लगता है कि आप कैमरे को किसी चीज़ के सहारे स्थिर करके लंबे एक्सपोज़र ले सकते 
鹰，哥伦比亚。随时准备支援你进行燃烧作业。到时候
Okay, und du machst das wirklich gut. Es ist eine Wohltat, dass es hier nicht so laut ist. Lass mich dir erklären, was ich vorhabe, Jim. Wie gesagt, wir werden dir jetzt keine detaillierten Anweisungen geben. Wir werden dir aber in Kürze Anweisungen geben, die wir dir in folgender Form zukommen lassen: Zuerst erstellen wir eine Art Zeitleiste, eine Art Flugplan, mit den Zeiten aller wichtigen Ereignisse und allen Konfigurationen, Schaltereinstellungen usw., die speziell für unsere Konfiguration sind und daher nicht in der Ch
Р
收到。我们刚刚进入飞船黑暗状态。在那之前，我们什么也看不见。但现在，有了地
This is Texas Cap Com, Friendship Seven. We are recommending that you l
Jack, Houston. Sie sind nicht zu hören. Sprechen Sie bitte etwas deutlicher ins Mikrofon. Ich habe das „S“ in „RATE 2“. Fan
わかった。月はマイナス15度で、かなりうまく設
Давление в источнике 1500, температура источника 60-50, я имею в ви
جيميني 4،
Okay. Our do-it-yourself lithium hydroxide canister change is complete. Joe, the only thing different is that our 
حسنًا. بالنسبة
조, 잭이 아직도 조준경으로 보는 데 어려움을 겪고 있다고 하
You're looking good. 8100 feet, 39 feet per second, I ge
That's a negative, Fred. The com
Oh, mal sehen. Wir lesen gerade 
ठीक है। हमने बिजली चालू कर दी है और सब ठीक लग रहा है। मुझे एक चेतावनी और चेतावनी वाली बिजली की बत्ती दिख रही है, और सारे खतरे के संकेत दिख रहे 
Grazie, J
Va bene. 24 10. Vai avant
Одиссе
D'acc
Хорошо. На панели 225 показания будут такими же, за исключением того, что нам нужно разомкнуть еще три автоматических выключателя, и я буду п
ليس الأمر سيئاً. الجو هنا دافئ قليلاً. يبدو أنه يدفأ عندما أنام. لا أعرف السبب. من المفترض أن يبرد حينها، لكنه يدفأ، وقد شغلنا المروحتين لمدة ثل
Kano, ici Sigma Sept. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Comment 
分かりました。もう一度スイッチ
هيا يا
Хорошо. Верно. Это Джим Ловелл. Сегодня мы решили немного рассказать вам о жизни внутри «Аполлона-8». Мы уже показали вам виды Луны, виды Земли, и решили пригласить вас к нам домой. Это наш дом, по крайней мере, уже 4 дня, как вы можете видеть на приборной панели. Мы отмечаем каждый день на приборной панели. Мы уже отработали четыре дня и работаем над пятым. Конечно, все мы с нетерпением ждём посадки в пятницу. Здесь, в той части космического корабля, которую мы называем нижним отсеком оборудования, находится советник президента по физической подготовке, капитан Джим Ловелл, который собирается выполнить программу упражнений, которую мы делаем каждый день. Вы заметили, что он очень свободно перемещается внутри. Он только что ударился головой об оптику, используемую для навигации. Он работает с тренажером, предназначенным для поддержания мышц в форме. Ещё одна очень важная функция нашего космического корабля — это компьютер, и я подумал, что вам будет интересно посмотреть, что у нас здесь есть: дисплеи, которые предоставляют нам всю информацию о работе двигателя, о навигации и о скорости, которую мы используем во время входа в атмосферу и торможения на околоземных орбитальных миссиях. Вы видите, что он управляется с помощью клавиатуры, похожей на пишущую машинку, и то, что происходит на ней, — это просто чудо. Он проделал для нас фантастическую работу, и Джим Ловелл отлично справился с его управлением. Ещё одна очень важная вещь, независимо от того, находитесь ли вы в космосе или на Земле, — это питание, и я попросил Билла Андерса показать вам, как мы питаемся здесь, в полёте. Извините за фотографию, пока мы будем двигаться и менять камеры. Вся используемая нами еда — это обезвоженная пища; она поставляется в предварительно упакованных вакуумных пакетах. Вы заметите, что всё, что Биллу нужно сделать, чтобы удержать её на месте, — это отпустить её. За исключением воздушных потоков внутри космического корабля, она оставалась бы совершенно неподвижной. Он достаёт свои удобные ножницы и разрезает пакет. Еда разнообразная, в целом довольно хорошая. Если это не звучит как восторженная рекомендация, то так оно и есть, но тем не менее, еда довольно хорошая. Видно, что Билл оче
好的。休斯
Ti ho sentito forte e chiaro, John. Com
La mer de Salton est à peu près aussi loin au nord que je puisse la voi
Ok. Vorrei solo chiarire un
Eh bien, je ne peux pas dire que 
또한 버뮤다에서 풍선은 피치와 요 방향으로 원뿔형 진동을 할 뿐만 아니라 캡슐 쪽으로 안팎으로 진동하는 것처
मुझे नहीं पता कि आप इसे देख पाएंगे या नहीं। यहाँ बहुत तेज ब
이제 병렬성 검사를 위해
Roger. W
روجر،
Хорошо. В правом нижнем углу страницы 2-22 в настройк
Okay, Houston. Der Wasserkocher wurde überholt, das Geg
Прошёл все 6, на 7 вы выбыли. Повторите для 7 и 
好
J'ai suivi la procédure jusqu'à l'étape 7, jusqu'au point où j'obtiens 27
휴스턴, 이글입
다시 말씀해 주
ठीक है। आखिरी पंक्ति के नीचे, केवल एक ही डेल्टा है और वह क्रॉस टा
Roger. Fine. Old golden fingers there is getting so swift we missed some marks on the downlink. I wonder - if you hand recorded them, could you read us your three marks - trunnion angles
Okay. Here
以下是云台角度。指令舱：356.69°，163.42°，346.67°
Ich habe danach gesucht, konnte es aber nicht erkennen. Ich habe es nicht gesehen. Hätte ich mehr Zeit gehabt, nach u
わかりました。次は2000、
닐이 
이글, 휴스턴. 각도 정보를 받았습니다. 다시 읽어드리겠습니다. 이상. 지휘 모듈의 경우, 11154, 20792, 00230입니다. 그리고 18995, 02
Roger. Ich hab
Okay. Potresti darmi di nuovo
罗杰。45-1 101。2+08。12 37 50。5+36。10+33。46-1 114。2+25 14 12 47。4+05。9+33。47-1 前后推进器。08 和 120。0+14 和 2+30。15 
Jack, Jim meinte, es sei nicht unangenehm. Das ständige Umschalten zwischen den Planeten sei etwas nervig, und außerdem sagte er, diese Beziehung zwischen
В данный момент, в 02:19:13, наблюдается небольшое увеличение тангажа. Сейчас я это обнулю. В режиме управления по проводам наблюдается небо
休斯顿。这个视野范
罗杰，吉姆。
Das ist in Ordnung; stören Sie ihn nicht damit. Er schläft
프렌드십 세븐, 스틸헤드입니다. 헬리콥터가 이동 중입니다. 현재로서는 약 8분 후에 도착할
مرحباً، أبولو ١١
Roger. With respect to the Dow Jones industrials, since closing on Tuesday afternoon the 15th up to about 1:05 p.m. Houston 
На самом деле, Билл только что упомянул, что вид
Apollo 13, Houston. Die Übergabe erfolgt in etwa einer
Roger, Friendship Seven. La temperatura della cabina si mantiene stabile sui 32 gra
Транквилити, Хьюстон. Запросите 
Oui. Ces Astros ont vraiment attrapé beaucoup de mou
저기 사이드와인더와 다이아몬드백이 가네. 세상에, 만약 당신이 인생에서 체크
Je prends beaucoup de
Aigle, Houston. Vous 
Sì. Immagino sia in parte perché s
わか
ええ。あなたの方角にアルタイルが見えるかどうか見てみてください。わし座、あの二つの…星
Fo
Voilà, c'est tout pour le moment, Frank. On a reçu d'autres nouvelles qu'ils ont promis de nous transmettre dès leur arrivée. Les seuls sujets vraiment intéressants étaient la sortie de Pueblo. Je crois que tu as déjà entendu parler du mariage Nixon-Eisenhower. Et puis, il y a la météo, qui est plutôt bonne par ici. On a un ciel très couvert. Mais il fait froid, la visibilité est bonne et on commence à sentir
फ्रैंक, आपको शायद पहले भी बताया गय
Роджер, Гуаймас. Это «Близнецы 4». Пилот всё ещё не спит. Сейчас он тоже что-нибудь поест. Как т
Верно. Это должно вам помочь. Обратите внимание, что защита от перегрузки по току на этой цепи ограничивает доступный ток до 15 ампер. Хотя мы думаем, что сможем многое с этим сделать. И кабель питания будет под напряжением, а напряжение на главной шине можно контролировать, выбрав
Bien. Enfin, maintenant que le vaisseau spatial est en vue, ori
Roger. Je comprends; mais lorsque nous passerons à un débit binaire élevé, souhaitez-vou
Très bien. Je ne suis pas certain des conséquences de ce
Pronti a vi
Houston, Apollo 11. Abbiamo quello che sembra essere in vis
روجر، نحن
Rév. 22 01 07 00. L
Roger. So che abbiamo intenzione di usare q
네, 카메라를 렌즈
你按下了
좋습니다. 12 1383 327 023 위쪽 172 왼쪽 22, 더하기 1293, 
별을 자주 볼 수 있는 건 아니잖아요. 알고 계세
Avete già iniziato a dare un'occhiat
रॉजर। मैं इस विंडो ब्रैकेट को देख रहा हूँ जहाँ मैं इसे नील के सीढ़ी से नीचे उतरते हुए की तस्वी
ठीक है, जिम। शुरू करने से पहले एक बात। हमने आपको जो पहले बताया था, वह अब भी बिल्कुल सही है। कंप्यूटर मेमोरी में केवल W-मैट्रिक्स ही बदलता है। हालांकि, अतिरिक
了解しました。6万4千ドルで、トランクウィリティ基地の着陸地点の位置を
Okay. From Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Britain's big Jodrell Bank radio telescope stopped receiving signals from the Soviet Union's unmanned Moon shot at 5:49 EDT today. A spokesman said that it appeared the Luna 15 space ship "had gone beyond the Moon." Another Quote: "We don't think it has landed," said a spokesman for Sir Bernard Lovell, Director of the Observatory. Washington UPI: Vice President Spiro T. Agnew has called for putting a man on Mars by the year 2000, but Democratic leaders replied that priority must go to needs on Earth. Agnew, ranking government official at the Apollo 11 blastoff Wednesday, apparently was speaking for himself and not necessarily for the Nixon administration when he said, "We should, in my judgment, put a man on Mars by the end of this century." Laredo, Texas, AP: Immigration officials in Nuevo Laredo announced Wednesday that hippies will be refused tourist cards to enter Mexico unless they take a bath and get haircuts. Huberto Cazaras, Chie
Eagle, Houston. Lors de notre cha
Come sono le tue finestre? Ne hai
Хорошо. Если вы найдете свой контрольный список для входа на странице E6 1, я обновлю там ваши данные по времени полета в ретроспективе для разных высот. К
你好，阿波罗11号。休斯顿。
١١، هيوستن. يبدو أن الساعتين القادمتين ستكونان هادئ
Aspe
Trennen Sie die ECS-Einlass- und Auslassschläuche. 
E sul
Le rapport de corrélation des
Apollo 13, Houston.
好的。第一步，“
Looks like I am coming right - I might be able to see the city 
Ok. Proviamo con un altro, ed è un po' più centrato. In effetti, è l'unico altro che abbiamo che mostra l'immagin
Хорошо. Время 32 часа 00 минут. Инструкции по завершении маневра: крен 101,0, тангаж 090,0, рыскание 000,0. Верхний тангаж минус 23, рыскание 93. Используйте стандартные процедуры для снижения скоростей. После стабилизации аппарата и перед началом вращения сделайте фотографии кометы Беннета. Используйте секстант с магазином G. То есть, очень светочувствительную черно-белую пленку, верно? Это пленка для съемки в условиях низкой освещенности. Сделайте три фотографии,
You got your cabin lights up bright i
La combinazione Spacecraft-Agena è d
알겠습니다. 경계를 늦추지 않겠습니
了解。それで、アクエリアスさん、君
मैं क्या करूँगा - मैं दोहराता हूँ - ठीक है। मैं आपको सब कुछ फिर से बताता हूँ। पैकेज वाल्व दबाएँ, बंद; आपातकालीन केबिन दबाव, बंद; प्रत्यक्ष ऑक्सीजन, बंद; दोनों डिमांड रेगुलेटर, बंद; दोनों H2O संचायक, जल ग्लाइकॉल संचायक, बंद; मुख्य रेगुलेटर A और B, खुले; जल और ग्लाइकॉल टैंक का इनलेट और आउटलेट, खुला; पानी के लिए, सर्ज टैंक को क्षण भर के लिए दबाव दें, आवश्यकतानुसार 
That's affirmative. Once we get that alined and get a time hack on it, the good people down here will be able to give us -, 8-ball attitudes for the service module separation attitude, for the command module alinement attitude, which we are going to pass you up the - a Moon/Sun -type alinement. We'll have 8-ba
Ricevuto. Ricevuto. Traslazione della spinta - quattro g
Хорошо. Я попр
Il contrasto è aumentato e solo il lato illuminato dal sole di queste creste rimane illuminato, mentre i lati scuri e l'ombra diventeranno c
Stand by, I'll get it for you. This means that we have some extra fuel to play with. S
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM
Checking over the other systems. They all seem to be fairly constant. Suit dome is still about 71 (degrees), suit inlet is 62 (degrees), which this time is comforta
我们现在在 OMNI E
Houston, Gemini 4. Ich habe 
잭, 아주 편안한 시간입니다. 이미 여러 번 시험 비행을 해봤고, 사실 지금도
休斯顿，Gemini VI。所有核心部件检查结果均令人满
Roger, Jim. On vient d'avoir une idée: il faudrait sans doute retirer les cartouches d'hydroxyde de lithium du module de commande assez rapidement pour éviter qu'elles ne restent coincées et ne gonflent au point d'être diff
Okay. We've got it. How far open do you want this the DIRECT O2 valve to be opened at this point? I guess you want it - just leave
了解
هيوستن. على أهبة الاس
了解。君に伝えたい言葉がいくつかある。ジャックは君をずっと見守っていて、君に伝えたい
Roger. D'après les données des États, votre TPI sera en reta
Roger, Apollo 11. We've got a laser that we're going to - It's a blue-gr
और मैं अभी रात में प्रकाश के अनुकूल नहीं हूं, इ
フロリダ上空は雲に覆われています。東海岸付近では0.3～0.4インチ（約10分の3～10分の4インチ）。ハ
잠시 기
मैंने अभी-अभी हैसलब्लैड फिल्
Mi hai gi
Je dirais que les nuages ​​parcour
Jack, c'est très confortable. Nous l'avons déjà testé plusieurs fois, e
好吧，我觉得
비행 초반 부스터에 대한 브리핑을 이어가겠습니다. 어둠 속으로 들어간 후, 제가 생각하기에 약 1200피트(약 366미터) 거리에서 부스터와의 위치 유지를 시도했지만, 당시 부스터와의 거리를 가늠할 수 있는 유일한 방법은 깜빡이는 불빛 사이의 거리뿐이었습니다. 불빛이 간헐적으로, 아니 간헐적으로
そうです。S-BAND AUX
لا، لسنا واثقين إلى هذا
Ok
一切顺利
Stand by on step 1, Fred. We're getting the word for yo
Roger, Tranquility. Vorremmo rimandare il più a lungo possibile la consegna della bomboletta di idrossido di litio. Se possibile, fate in modo che sia una delle ultime cose che fate prima di pre
جهاز تغيير الطور 
Ho inserito una nuova
On arrive en trombe et on ne peut rie
Questa, questa operazione è stata molto irregolare. Non sono riuscito a ricondurla a un elemento specifico. Una volta ha deviato in una direzione di imbardata; la volta successiva ha deviato nell'altra. Per un po' ho avuto la sensazione che il beccheggio stesse andando alla deriva. A un certo punto sembrava che avesse una piccola spinta bloccata nel beccheggio e dovevo continuare a correggerla, m
कोलंबिया यह बात 
11, this is Houston. Roger. And we're through with the uplinks; the computer is yours. You can go to BLOCK and we'll have the information on nitrogen for you shortly
حسناً يا هيوستن. يبدو أن الأمور على ما يرام الآن؛ ل
Come appare la situazione da lì d
Понял. Мы переходим на высокую скорость
We've got a little more work to do up here, Charlie. We're going to mak
ブースターに向かって約5フィート/秒の速度で噴射しました。分離噴射は約6～7秒でした。ブースターに向かって約5～6フィート/秒の速度で噴射し、その後、分離していく様子を見守りました。さらに約5フィート/秒の速度で噴射しました。接近し始めたように見
Две д
क्या आपने हमारे लिए कोई अच्छा इलाका चुन
Il circuito di raffreddamento secondario sembrava davvero a posto. Sembra che il radiatore fosse ben a tenuta e che tutto il resto funzionasse correttamente, rispettando le curve di prestazione. I regolatori principali dell'ossigeno si so
Ну, они ловко это делают — прямо на противоположных 
Wenn Ihr Rendezvous-Radar-Selbsttest abgesc
Dann schien jegliche Bewegung zum Stillstand gekommen zu sein, und wir näherten uns wohl. Also drehte ich das Raumschiff und versuchte, die Plattform auszurichten. In der Zwischenzeit sank die Boosterstufe deutlich unter uns ab. Daher gab ich den Versuch auf, die Plattform auszurichten und auf die Boosterstufe zuzusteuern, und bremste leicht ab. Wieder sah es so aus, als ob unsere Geschwindigkeit zum Stillstand gekommen wäre. Inzwischen waren 
"- - DELTA-VX가 최종 DELTA-VX와 같을 때" 해당 줄을 삭제합니다. "
Präsident Nixon hat außerdem einen Aktionstag für alle Bundesangestellten am Montag ausgerufen, damit jeder Ihre Aktivitäten an der Öffentlichkeit 
Houston, pour votre information, nous avons perdu le contact radio à
好的。我们估计大约76小时后，我们将开始启
Ты права, Водолей. Давай удалим оформ
Yes. The transients were more noticeable than on the previous burns, Charlie. I just wrote it off on the fact we had a light command module, but there was considerable roll activity which dampened down after the first 20 seconds, I would guess, of the burn; but then there was also some pitch and yaw activity. I don't believe it was abnormal, and it seemed to be deadbanding ratherly crisply in roll plus or minus about 8 degrees either side of the center line; and after the first couple of - oh, after the first 20 seconds or so, the gimbals were quiet, and pitch and yaw were relatively quiet. Before that, there was some oscillation 
Хорошо, Джим. Роджер. Мы собираемся сделать это в максимально возможной степени. И это выглядит вполне осуществимо. Для начала нам нужно будет отправить вам отдельные 
휴스턴, 탈출 준비를 하느라 창밖 풍경에 대해 자세히 이야기할 시간은 없었지만, 그때까지는 북미, 북대서양, 유럽, 북아프리카를 포함한 북반구 전체가 보였습니다. 날씨는 거의 모든 곳에서 좋았습니다. 캐나다 북부 아타바스카 지역, 아마도 아타바스카 동쪽에 저기압성 저기압이 하나 있었고, 그린란드는 깨끗했으며, 그린란드의 빙하만 보이는 것 같았습니다. 북대서양 전체가 상당
Ok, la mia soluzione di riserva è 60 cm al secondo in salita e 70 cm in avanti, il che ci porterà a questa posizione. Faremo un 
分かりました。彼らは小型ボートで接続し、私を引き上げるよう指
ठीक है, आपको यहाँ समस्य
はい、酸素濃
Громко и
ह्यू
好了。回
Ehi, Jim, sto guardando attraverso il monocolo e, per usare un'espressione, la vista è semplicemente meravigliosa. È fuori dal mondo. Riesco a vedere tutte le isole del Mediterraneo. Alcune isole più grandi e più piccole di Maiorca, Sardegna e Corsica. Un po' di foschia sulla penisola italiana settentrionale, alcuni cumuli sulla Gre
روجر. أنا مست
好的。在出舱检查清单第6页第1项“主部署按钮”下方，我们还有
Roger. E tu, sceglieresti ATTEGGIAMENTO
ठीक है, लोग इस
在其下方，用“'C' 0, 353, 0”和“HU,SCF”划掉
Houston, Apollo 13. Chiamami quando sei pronto per lo scarico d
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Puoi interrompere la TV quando vuoi. Abbiamo abbastanza 
रॉजर। आपके सिस्ट
罗杰。继续播报《栗色号角》。尼克松总统在登机飞往与您会面之前，从旧金山给您的夫人打了个电话，令她们惊喜不已。她们都被您的电视讲话深深感动。简和帕特在任务控制中心观看了直播。昨晚，国际通信卫星组织（Intelsat）在卡纳维拉尔角的发射第四次被推迟。据说问题出在德尔塔火箭第二级的氮
Okay. Un giorno, quando ci saranno due ragazz
ठ
Soll ich ein Testmuster 
R
أورور
لا أعتقد أن هذا كان القصد يا بيل. ما كان يدور في أذهانهم هو أن لدينا مبادل حراري للبدلة على كلا الدائرتين؛ وإذا انخفضت درجة الحرارة كثيرًا، يمكنك استخدام مفتاح اللوحة لإيقاف الدائرة
Eagle，你还有 30 秒时间完成 P6
आगे बढ़ो आरकेवी, जेमिनी अष्ट
Roger Freedom Seven, je comprends que vous êtes à 7 000 pieds, vo
Magaz
كان الهدف محاذيًا تمامًا لز
Roger, Houston. Inserimento come segue: Pacifico centrale, 357 152 359 267, più 0813, meno 16503 066 36221 647 12166 36301 0028, NA, 400 0210 0025 0335 0816 160590 312, 
هذا سيجما سفن. فه
في كل
Okay. The purpose is to bring the and the state vectors to earth's sphere of Verb 37 ENTER, 23 ENTER. At, at, load in register 1, 2, and 3 the following numbers. Register 1, 00002; register 2, five balls; register 3, 00210. Step 3: proceed on, . Step 4: proceed on, 25. do not proceed on. 
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к 2000 году, но лидеры демократов ответили, что приоритет должен быть отдан потребностям на Земле. Агню, высокопоставленный правительственный чиновник, присутствовавший на запуске «Аполлона-11» в среду, по-видимому, говорил от своего имени, а не обязательно от имени администрации Никсона, когда сказал: «На мой взгляд, мы должны отправить человека на Марс к концу этого столетия». Ларедо, Техас, AP: Иммиграционные власти Нуэво-Ларедо объявили в среду, что хиппи будут отказывать во въезде в Мексику по туристическим картам, если они не примут ванну и не подстригутся. Уберто Касарас, начальник мексиканской иммиграционной службы в Нуэво-Ларедо, заявил, что власти Мехико, Акапулько и других популярных туристических мест получили жалобы на хиппи. По сообщению United Press International: Первоначальная реакция на решение президента Никсона предоставить федеральным служащим выходной в понедельник, чтобы они могли отметить национальный день участия в лунной миссии «Аполлон-11», была в основном удивлением. Родни Биднер, Associated Press, Лондон, AP: Европа поражена миссией «Аполлон-11». Газеты по всему континенту заполняют свои страницы фотографиями ракеты «Сатурн V
753, 09 - 11:09 बजे - सूरज क्षितिज पर बिल्कुल सामने था। हैसलब्लैड के फोटो-इवेंट इंडिकेटर के साथ हमें ज़्यादा सफलता नहीं मिली। आखिरकार, हमने इसे ढूंढ लिया। शटर को उस - उसे क्या कहते हैं? - में डाल देता है। शटर ठीक
Gemini VIII w
Pendant que Jack range le coin nuit, je me suis dit que j'allais vous montrer un petit coin sympa. On a un sac de rangement temporaire ici, et c'est là qu'on met tous nos papiers et autres déchets après chaque repas. Il es
今、目の前にあるこの谷の堆積物の中に、非常に暗いクレーターがあります。新しいクレーターの多くは内部が非常に明るいのに対し、このクレーターは輪郭がはっきりしているにもかかわらず、内
Roger. Abbiamo i nostri interruttori automatici SEQUENTIAL ARM e la nostra SEQUENTIAL LOGIC, d
4 вперед,
Roger. Ich habe die RCS-Heizung in letzter Zeit immer wieder ein- und ausgeschaltet. Zuerst lag die Temperatur bei 47 °C, dann habe ich die Heizung eingeschaltet, und die Kontrollleuchte zeigte 54 °C an. Das war Ring A. Ring B lag bei 05 °C. Es dauerte 5 Minuten, bis die Temperatur auf 20 °C sank, und ebenfalls 5 Minuten, bis sie erlosch. Ring B schaltete sich bei 37 °C ein und lief nach 5 Minuten ab, und Ring A schaltete sich bei 50 °C 
Роджер. Здесь, наверху, всё хо
好的。胸包上的止血阀是否已关
알
Affermativo, Odyssey. E disattiva anche il pacchetto elettronico e l'alimentazione, e disattiva anche il POWER/GPI e l'AUTO jet SELECT, tutti e 16 disatt
아니요. 어떻게 플랫폼 간
Хорош
Да, Джим, я согласен. 
व
Esatto, Fred. Non abbiamo ancora procedure per questo, e non abbiamo alcuna reale aspettativa di riuscirci. La procedura che vorrei leggerti ora riguarda semplicemen
Хорошо. В записке сказано, что вы должны нас слышать. Если через пару минут мы вас не услышим, вам следует замкнуть автоматический выключатель усилителя мощности на панели 16, и мы рассчитываем сэкономить один или более ампер на этом. В текущем положении это должно работать. Когда мы перейдем к новому положению по рысканию, мы планируем включить питание управляе
حسنًا، الآن يا بيل، ف
Roger. You residents of the spacecraft Columbia may be interested in knowing that today is Independence Day in the country of Colombia. Gloria Diaz of the Philippines was crowned Miss Universe last night. She defeated 60 other girls for the global beauty title. Miss Diaz is 18, with black hair and eyes, and measures 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. First runner up was Miss Australia, followed by Miss Israel, and Miss Japan. While you're on your way back Tuesday night, the American and National League Allstars will be playing ball in Washington. Mel Stottlemyre of the Yankees is expected to be the American League's first pitcher. No one is predicting who will be first pitcher for the National League yet. They have nine on the roster. Even though research has certainly paid off in the space program, research doesn't always pay off, it seems. The Woodstream Corporation, parent company of the Animal Trap Company of America which has made more than a billion wooden spring mousetraps, reports that it built a better mousetrap but the world didn't beat a door to its path - didn't beat a path to its door. As a matter of fact, the company had to go back to the old-fashioned kind. They said, "We should have spent more time researching housewives and less time researching mice". And the "Blac
こんにちは、マイケル。ロックが失われ、ビルがコマンド リセットを押してロックを再びオンにしましたが、アンテナはそのままにしておいてくださ
좋아요. 땅바닥에 서
Хорошо, Вэнс. Дай мне проверить, есть ли у меня это здесь. Для этого нужно использовать 70-миллиметровый объектив Hasselblad DC 80-миллиметровый объектив в режим
D'accord. Nous s
Aurora Seven, Aur
एल्ड्रिन, मेरे गलियारे से बाहर निकलो, ताकि मै
Wir können nichts sehen... Ich hoffe, sie a
로저, 수동 연료 온도계에서 65°로 표시
Ok. Per quanto riguarda la correzione di metà rotta, vorremmo rimandarla a circa, e sarà una combustione di circa 25 piedi al secondo. Il motivo per cui stiamo ritardando il tempo di combustione è per consentire un tracciamento migliore grazie ai 7 piedi e mezzo al secondo che hai inse
Okay. How do yo
... HF GMT 16 31 59 MARK पर परीक्षण। कैप्सूल सिग्नल कमजो
好的，杰克。那是 CB 传感器单元，直流电，那是 
Roge
ええ
알겠습니다, 밴스. 제가 제대로 이해했는지 확인해 볼게요. A-13 포맷에 70mm DC 하셀블라드 80mm 렌즈를 사용하고, 3400 흑백 필름(MAG R 또는 S)을 사용할 예정입니다
Gemini VI, wir möchten hier noch einen Bandauswurf ve
Very good. That's all correct, and I have a for you 
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Мы их потеряли. Скажите им, что
Хорошо, на мгновение переведите переключ
罗杰。请注意，大约 50——我经常听到这些回声，如果你试图播
Wie weit müssen wi
それを確認しなければなりま
Tangage 
Sie können einfach in Ihrer jetzigen Konfiguration fortfahren. Wenn Sie jedoch Triebwerke aktivieren, versucht das System, 
Я хотел бы пос
아니요, 괜
Okay. The only comment that we jus
سيجما سفن، كانو 
روجر. نود تقييم التعليق
أبولو 8، هيوستن. 
Hé, vous voulez parler à vos fe
여기는 휴스턴입니다. 로저. 감사
... 구름들이네요. 층운처럼 보이지만, 확실히 날씨에 상당한 영향을 미치는 것 같아요. 이런 날씨 현상이 하와이 지역에도 영향을 미칠지
حس
Et je vais
11, Хьюстон. Судя по вашей температуре, по
L'orizzonte è molto limpido. Rollio e beccheggio sono ottimi. Anche l'imbardata è buona.
जिम, आपकी नंबर 2 बैटरी के बारे में, हमें लगता है कि यह अलार्म बैटरी के अत्यधिक गर्म होने के कारण नहीं, बल्कि किसी सेंसर की खराबी, खासकर तापमान सेंसर की खराबी के कारण आया है; क्योंकि हमें ग्लाइकॉल लूप में इससे अधिक तापमान नहीं दिखा है। हम लगभग 101 घंटे बाद बैटरी को वापस लगाएंगे। इसमें लगभग 10 मिनट लगेंगे, और फ
저는 그 의견에 100% 
罗
Tout ce que je viens de vous donner, vous pouvez l'effacer. Ils vous donnent le feu vert pour une nouvelle
훌륭한 공연이었습니다
看那只萤火虫闪闪发
फिर से कहो, जैक। संचार में अभी
Sounds like it is being run at the wrong
أبولو 8، أبولو 8. تشير البيانات الأرضية إلى أن المبخر الرئيسي قد
S-6
أقول، الأمر ليس مزع
हाँ, बिल्कुल। ठीक है, अब हम -5 + 05 पर हैं। और जहाँ तक आपकी जानकारी का सवाल है, जैक, कमांड मॉड्यूल इसका उपयोग केवल सूचना के लिए कर रहा है। यह अर्थ-टर्मिनेटर अलाइनमेंट होगा; और 5 + 05 के समय वे अपना गोला छोड़ देंगे। और यह चेकलिस्ट में शामिल होगा; इसे इसके बाद अपलो
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 말씀하세요
Ricevuto. La procedura MA negativa è corretta dopo l'interruzione
了解、フレンドシップ・セブン。はっきりと聞こえま
Roger. Sie sehen die Erde, so wie wir sie sehen, durch unser linkes Fenster – etwas mehr als die Hälfte der Erde. Wir blicken auf den östlichen Pazifik und die nördliche Hälfte des oberen Bildschirmbereichs. Dort sehen wir Nordamerika, Alaska, die Vereinigten Staaten, Kanada, Mexiko und Mittelamerika. Südamerika verschwindet knapp jenseits des Terminators oder im Schatten. Die Ozeane erscheinen deutlich blau, weiße Bänder großer Wolkenformationen ziehen über die Erde, und wir können Küstenlinien erkennen. Wir können den Westen der USA, das San Joaquin Valley, die Sierra Nevada, die Halbinsel Baja California und einige Wolkenformationen über dem Südosten der USA ausmachen. Südwestlich von Alaska zieht ein schwaches Gewitter auf, etwa 800 bis 1
로저. 네, 객실 압력은 여전히 ​​5.5로
Roger. Mannschaftsstatusbericht: Wasservorrat, Kommandant hat heute bisher ca. 50 Knoten; CMP 43; LMP 44. Wir haben heute bisher zwei Mahlzeiten eingenommen. Mahlzeit A und B für Tag 3; fast alles aufgegessen, bis auf den harten Biss, den niemand mag. Der Nachtisch 
الآن لدينا - لدينا سابين على يمي
आप शायद
Je sais que nous tenons tous ici à vous remercier, vous tous là-bas, p
Ro
Roger, Carnarvon. Pour le changement d'avion. À GET 02 + 42 + 07; Delta-V, 31,7; durée, 0 + 40 secondes; lacet,
了解。SHeタンク内の打ち上げ前の圧力と
Д
Wenn Sie mit der Orbit Rate driften, empfehlen wir Ihnen, für Ihre bevorstehende Tracking-Aufgabe an der
Ok, ho un paio di cose da chiarire per te, poi ti lasceremo in pace per un po'. Per prima cosa, vorremmo che tu confermass
好的。杰克，我们还能继续使用全向天线吗？那我可以
Sind wir schon unten
هيوس
ジェミニ4号、ヒューストン。63-
Ok, Fred. E quando selezioni... Quando sostituisci la cartuccia primaria, 
... steigt wei
Permettez-m
On ne voit pas beaucoup d'étoiles. Vous le savez
جيم، 
Ricevuto. Quando torni alla
Roger. È così che dovrebbe essere fatto, e asp
Я с
Eagle, qui Houston.
इस समय, मेरे पास तीन अक्ष लगभग प्रतिगामी अभिवृत्ति पर हैं। रेटिकल के माध्यम से यॉ को आमतौर पर एक दर के रूप में देखा जाता है और अब मैं यॉ में अभिवृत्ति में परिवर्तन की जाँच करने का प्रयास कर रहा हूँ। मैं देख
... т
11、ヒューストンです。OMNI Deltaから高利得アンテナへの切り替え準備が整
Das geht unmöglich – ich kriege das nicht weit
Как дела? Здесь всё хорошо, мы готовимся. Ника
हा
ج
水瓶座，在我们处理这件事的同时，我们还有一个关于你工
Это его второе любимое занятие. Сейчас он обустраивает свой гамак для сна на лунной поверхности, чтобы выяснить — посмотреть, каков
收到。明
Fortf
Roger, pourriez-vous nous communiquer les températures de bulbe
Roger. 0,98, et quelle val
حسنًا. يجب أن تكون ف
No. No. Come right up from the bottom of the horizon, up through the air glow layer. From the first time, I saw it till it reached what I consider the top of the a
Эй, ну, пока 
프
D'accord. Les panneaux d'affichage GASTA FLIGHT DISPLAYS e
Хорошо. Теперь у нас 
はい。すべて順
我们既能
...보조로요. 15까지 가도록 하죠. 헤드셋 끼고 오세요. 제가... 잠시 기다려 드릴
水瓶座，你们所有的垫片将在大约3
ر
Va bene. Vorrei leggere ad alta voce i dati relativi alla pressione e alla quantità di O2 primario, per favo
Ich habe einen guten Blick auf die Linie.
रॉजर। फेस प्लेट बंद है और मेरी नाभि की
بدأتُ الآن أرى شروق الشمس في المنظار. هذا أول ضوء يظهر في المنظار خلال هذه الدورة تحديدًا نتيجةً للجانب الليلي. من الواضح أن المنظار لا يعمل إطلاقًا في وضع الرجوع للخلف على الجانب الليلي. أول ضوء أراه الآن في وضع شبه مظلم. يشرق ا
حسنًا يا جو. أنا أستخدم جهاز أومني س
Friendship Seven, ici Zanzibar Cap Com. La télémétrie indique que tous les systèmes sont opérationnels. L'état médical est bon... même constat, nous avons quelques pertes de données télémétriques... 
Roger. Versuchen Sie es vo
कहानी 
MARQU
——而且我们离他也
さあ、ヒューストン
了
很好。嘿，埃德，你刚才说要在飞船上行走
ل
مرحباً، 11
Are you, - what's your 
Roger. Understand. Your particles
好的。第一颗星是26号星，我们将进行两组测量，一组是地球近地平线时使用26号星进行测量。然后我们希望用16号星（也就是16号星）进行一组测量，这组测量是在地球远地平线时进行的。如果26号星无法在地球近地平线时进行测量，那么我们希望用16号星在地球远地平线时进行一组测量，用22号星在地球远地平线时进行另一组测量。完毕
了解。どうもあり
You're not kiddin
Alright. VERB 37, ENTER; 40, ENTER. O
حسنًا، لدي بعض التعليمات لك. حسنًا، يمكنك تشغيل الجهاز. أريد تشغيل جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بك، وتوصيلك بمصدر الطاقة، ووضع جهاز الرادار في وضع الاستعداد؛ بعد 5 دقائق، قم بتشغيل الرادار وانسخ قراءات الرادار كل 10 دقائق، بين كارنارفو
Ils croient que je 
좋아, 상승 중 - 탱크 압력 - 
Bene. Grazie. Bene, ora pannello 275: interruttore P
Ты готов к своему нижнему белью? Майк, ты гот
Bon, tant pis pour
حسنًا، ها نحن قادمون. منصة الدخول: منتصف المحيط الهاد
حسنًا. لقد دخلنا للتو في ظلام المركبة الفضائية. حتى ذلك الحين، لم ن
روجر، مايك. شكرًا جزيلًا. هل لاحظتم أي تجمعات أخرى للمياه 
Und im letzten Schritt, Schritt 7, 
Das ist bestätigt. Okay, wir sind jetzt bei -5 + 05. Und, Jack, das Kommandomodul nutzt diese Daten nur zur Information. Hier wird eine Ausrichtung zur Erd-Termin
Bene. Il titolo principale è "Entrata, PREPARAZIONE LM, meno 6 ore". Primo, BAT 5 ALIMENTAZIONE NORMALE, ATTIVA; secondo, utilizzare la checklist di attivazione modificata /, 30 minuti. Poi, a meno 5 ore, -7, se necessario. Ora, abbiamo una procedura di pre-ingresso. Per prima cosa, manovriamo per raggiungere l'assetto SEP del modulo di servizio. Secondo, configuriamo per l'hotfire. Sotto questo, DEADBAND MAX e CONTROLLO ATTEGGIAMENTO, tre, su PULSE. Terzo, eseguiamo l'hotfire. Quarto, noi - L
콜롬보와 구
こんにちは、ハワイ、こんにちは、ハワイ・コムテック、
좋아요, 냉동 컨테이너라고 부르지 마세요. 알겠죠? 영하 19도쯤 되면 2-2페이지에 있는 표준 진입 체크리스트로 돌아가는데, 거기서부
Roger, Jack. Damit ist dieser Vorgang abgesch
Oui, c'est exact. D'accord
はい、そうです。コピーする準備はできましたか？当時は全てのシステムがグリーンでした。燃料はオ
- 残りの手順については後ほど
You've got it; you're on th
Нет. Наверное, это по
تم تثبيت النظام على مسافة 179 ميلاً تقريبًا، وتم ضبط محاذاة الرادار عند حوالي 156 ميلاً؛ والإبر ثابتة نسبيًا، وتبدو جيدة جدًا. أما إبرة الانحراف فتتذبذب ذهابًا وإيابًا، ربما بمقدار درجة واحدة زائدًا أو ناقصًا. تجدر الإشارة هنا إلى أن المشكلة التي واجهناها هي التخلص من القيم المتبقية. عندما نخفض هذه القيم إلى م
مق
네. 저
罗杰，11。关于您提到的电池充电问题，我们
Go
حسنًا. بعد الحدث، اضبط مؤقت الحدث، وه
わかりました。LMPのホースと同じように、コマンダーのホースの設定を始めます。それから、代わりに…というか、打ち上げチェックリスト
ところで、ジャック、火傷の期間はどのくらいにな
地上ではすべて順調に見えます
Я попрошу Билла записать это на диктофон и отпра
Bene. Ci crede
كين، لقد أوشكنا على استنفاد مواردنا هنا فيما يخص هذه المجموعة النجمية ال
로저, 알겠습니다. 비행 계
11，休斯顿。你能在爱德华
Ну, скаж
ジェミニVI、こちらはC
Le carte segnaletiche hanno un no. Non abbiamo alcuna intenzione di competere con i professionisti, credetemi. Ci troviamo molto bene qui, però. Abbiamo una casa felice. C'è un sacco di spazio per tutti e tre e credo che stiamo tutti imparando a trovare il nost
Роджер. Просто хотел убедиться, что вы, ребята, не уснули снова. А ещё у меня есть кое-какие 
روجر. مايك، أعتقد
11, Houston.
わかった、ジャッ
We got 13 degrees left on the ball, and I think that's probably a
Vado
そして、今ジンバ
了解。それは…の
스콧님, 요청하신 내용을 확인하고 있습니다. 버튼
Hous
Roger. Du hast also in die Sonne geschaut, als du es gesehen 
B
휴스턴, 아쿠아리우스. ASA 패키지 온도는 
ニール、こちらヒューストン。はっきり聞こえる。ブレー
La temperatura della cabina è 10 gradi; quella della tuta è 62 gradi. Vorrei aumentare un po' la temperatura, ma non ci riesco. La temperatura della tuta è 60 gradi; quella della cabina rimane
Well, it extends the full length of the sextant. Actually, I could see u
好的。收到，哥伦比亚。T1 104 32 24，
わかりました、ヴァンス。手順：ガイダンスコントロール、モードコントロール、アッテネータホールド、ENTER、姿勢制御、ロール0、ピッチ90、ヨー0。もちろん、今のボールは操作不能なので、それを修正する必要があります。5はモードコントロール、自動、6は速度監視、各軸の速度が毎秒1度未満、無効、最後の部分は聞き取れませ
Здравствуйте,
シグマ・
الأمور على ما يرام. انتظر قليلاً، سأعطيك قراءة دلتا-بي - 3.0؛ أحتاج إلى 3.5 قبل أن أتمكن من إعادة تشغيل محركات ال
继续。如果在燃烧过程中发动机停止运转，并且NOUN 97闪烁，你应该先执行PROCEED指令，然后执行ullage
Понял. Уровень топлива 
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous avons testé les angles d'attitude indiqués dans le plan de vol avec nos machines, et les résultats sont toujours les mêmes. Tout semble correct, Mike, et nous nous demandons si l'horizon asymétrique pourrait pose
了解。アダプターバッテリー1は24.5ボルト、1Aは7.0アンペアです。アダプターバッテリーDは24ボルト、6.8
المتبقي لدينا يساوي صفرًا. 
双子
ठीक है, अब प्रश्न संख्या 3 के उत्तर में, हमें कोई अप्रत्याशित क्षण
알았어, 짐. 안테나 전환이 좀 번거롭긴 하니까,
Die Lichter leuchten, ich fühle mich wohl, bin bester Laune. Kabinenparameter: Druck 1, Luftfeuchtigkeit 65, Temperatur 20, Druck in Abteil 1, erster automatischer Druck 155, zwe
Vous avez r
まだコンピュ
L'horizon va bientôt se dessiner et nous aurons probablement le soleil dans les yeux. Si cela se produit, je devrai mettre les instruments à plein
알았어, 에드 자기야, 이제 시작해야겠
了解しました。この時点で簡単に報告していただけますか
Okay, Apollo 8. Alle Systeme – ein kurzer Blick in den Raum – sehen einwandfrei aus. Sie haben ein Update der Messwerte vom Quadcopter erhalten, diese Information liegt also vor. Die Temperatur der Oxidator-Zuleitung und die Treibst
Yes. Yes, and as the stars drop through it, they occult a little bit; then they pop out on the left-hand part and you can actually see them go out all the way out as they hit the true horizon down at the bottom. It looks like to m
Ok, Aquarius; Houston. Con l'attuale quantità di energia che hai nel modulo lunare, che è di oltre 500 ampere-ora, e la 
Sì, credo che sia meglio prendere quella tasca e la borsa. Ti dico una cosa: che ne dici di mettere quei fazzoletti in quella 
आरकेवी से कितना प
Ro
Okay. F
Columbia, Housto
这里是西格玛七号。我现在开始进行日间偏航检查。我是——瓜伊马斯。请听清楚。完毕。这里是西格玛七号。我现在要发送血压数
मुझे लगता है मैं सब ठीक कर स
Das Dockingfenster. Verstanden. Jemand hat mir gerade Ihren neuesten Verbrauchsmaterial-Statusbericht gegeben, und Sie verbrauchen konstant zwischen 11 un
Nach meinem jetzigen Kenntnisstand können Sie mit dem verbleibenden Treibstoff praktisch den gesamten Flugplan umsetzen. Wir halten Sie auf dem Laufenden. Jetzt sollten Sie sich erst einmal ausruhen. Was Ihre Apollo 
没错，吉姆。我们只需要11号面板上的UPDATA LI
Возможно, это еще один спосо
حسنًا يا جاك، هذا إجراء مطوّل، ق
फि
حسنًا. لديّ خبرٌ خاصٌّ من هاني. تقول أحدث طبعةٍ من صحيفة "إنترستيلر تايمز" إنّ رحلة القمر تحتلّ مكانةً بارزةً في الصحف والتلفزيون؛ إنّها الخبر الأبرز. تقول عناوين صحيفة "الواشنطن بوست": "القمر، ها هم قادمون". علمنا أنّ بيل أندرس سيجري محادثةً أو اتصالًا خاصًّا اليوم مع رجلٍ مسنٍّ يرتدي بدلةً ح
Okay, Bill. I guess I want to belay my last about using the onboard state vector for 4. After looking at it some more on the ground, they've got to get going on making the 's and doing all their computations, and rather than put it off or do it twice, we're going to go ahead and go with the procedures we've been using all along. On the lunar orbit stuff, we've been looking it over and we got several guys - Jack Schmitt and company in the back room - looking at what effect your windows have. And, basically, it looks like there's two options that will make an impact on that 2. One of the options, of course, will be just to have you and Jim change seats and let Jim look out and get his SAM that way, and another option will be to roll the bird ove
弗雷德，我提前通知你一下，备用气罐的二氧化碳浓度快要达到极限值了，预计半小时左右就会达到，到时候我们会要求你切换到指令
يا إلهي، ما أجمل
انتظر يا فريد
好的。首先要确认交流电已接通，也就是面板 16 上的逆变器 2 断路器已闭合。然后，在面板 11 的“飞行显示”部分，我们需要确认 GASTA 和 COMMANDER 的断路器已闭合。同样在面板 11 下，GASTA 和 COMMANDER 的交流母线 A 断路器也需要
Вы планируете включать компрессор гидрокостюма во время
Okay. Looking on entry 1: the second item there is the 12-hour Kelvin cold soak, and in discussions I here and preflight, I think it is agreed that we don't want to do the cold soak there. So we are going to delete that step 2. And what it amounts to is, I think we do want to do a cold soak, 
The dro
جاك، الأمر مريح للغاية. لقد أجرينا التجربة عدة مرات، وفي الواقع، يجري تشغيلها الآن مجددًا. وقد أجريناها هنا في هيوستن وفي كيب كانافيرال. المكان الوحيد الذي قد تحتاج فيه إلى متابعة الأمور بدقة هو خلال فترة مح
حسناً. فهمت؛ تقريباً أمام
그건 부정적이네요. 지금 두 설정 모두 7로 맞춰놨는데, 설
अरे
好的，这次看来我们可能真的需要预热了，所以我们要确保预热时间不要超过20分钟。因为
Roger. Wir sitzen 
Okay, Gemini VIII. T/M ist stab
Roger, Houston. Columbia… en haut. J’ai gardé les yeux rivés sur le sextant à ce moment-là, espérant apercevoir un reflet du miroir lunaire, mais je n’ai pu distinguer auc
Du würdest es nicht glauben, aber ich habe jetzt das Kommando über die... Okay. Vance, ich bin wahrscheinlich der einzige CMP, der jemals 
حسنًا. إذا حصلت على 1257، ا
Negativo. Nessun farmaco,
This is Friendship Seven. Have beautiful view of the African Coast, both in the
ويا هيوستن، هل يمكن
St
收到。明白
Slight delay here, Jim. It will be a couple of minutes before we read that up to you, and we're looking at the contingency checklist pow
रॉजर। पुष्टि कर
Oka
此外，我们还有关于您轨道的新计算结果。近地点 85.3 度，远地点 139 度，寿命为 3
I think that on this tracking task, using the world map
계속
好的。我想我看到你已经准备好了。我忘了……耳机。这很简单，只需从控制舱里取出第二副音源盒，在每个新音源盒顶部附近贴上一圈灰色胶带（粘性面朝外），然后取一张提示卡，裁成四个边长约2到
Wir mü
롤링은 이쪽에서 발생하겠지만, 요잉은 벨리밴드에서 벗어날 겁니다... 절
Tous les systèmes fonctionnent maintenant parfaitement. Je vais vous faire un petit bilan des commandes de vol. Les commandes de vol électriques sont excellentes. La commande manuelle était un peu lente, mais très performante. La capsule est actuellement en mode auto
阿波罗11
Игл, Хьюстон. В этом режиме у нас всё хорошо через 210-дюймовую антенну. Сейчас переключимся на 85-футовую антенну, чтобы посмотреть, что у нас есть, а затем вернёмся к вам через 210-дюймовую антенну. Если вы подождёте пару минут в этом режиме, мы снова с 
حسنًا، سأقوم بنقل التلفاز مباشرةً. سأسحبه 
Roger. Nous vo
ح
알겠습니다. 저는 일반 모드이고, 전원 공급 시간을 위해 재진입 자세 선택을 하겠습니다
У нас есть для вас Бермудский вектор. Ваши размеры 87 на 140, что требует выполнения маневра вне пл
わかりました。今停止して、光学CAL姿勢へ機動します。それに関して、昨日お話ししたのもまさにその点についてです。Mラインは、あなたが星間下点に向けて
ठीक है। पैनल 101 पर, 
Okay. Mal sehen, ob ich alles verstanden habe. Für das Rendezvous-System muss zunächst CB 16 INVERTER 2 geschlossen und CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2 ebenfalls geschlossen sein. Anschließend muss auf Bedienfeld 14 überprüft werden, ob INVERTER 2 ausgewählt ist. Außerdem muss CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 geschlossen sein (beide Leistungsschalter). Danach muss der RENDEZVOUS RADAR-Auslösegriff gezogen werden. Auf Bedienfeld 3 muss RENDEZVOUS RADAR auf A ENTER mit Plus aller ZIP-Werte und Plus 28300 in den Registern 1 und 2 eingestellt werden. Anschließend wird die Bewegung mit dem 16 72 überwacht. Nach dem 
أستطيع بالكاد أن أ
जैसे ही मैंने उस बोतल को चलाया, वाह
Доброе утро, Хь
휴스턴, 아폴로 8
Okay, Vance. 
Una guida abbastanza fluida, sai; è solo
ठीक है। ओरिएंटेशन टेस्ट पर - मैंने मैनुअल लीवर को छुआ; मैंने घड़ी को छुआ, घड़ी के ऊपर लगभग 10:30 बजे की दिशा में, घड़ी के डायल और यॉ इंडिकेटर के 
짐, 지금처럼 정밀한 관측을 유지하시고 다른 부분은 무시해 주세요. 저희는 LMS 시뮬레이션을 통해 당신의 창문에서 
ठीक है। चलिए देखते हैं कि मैंने सब कुछ सही समझा है या नहीं। सबसे पहले, हमें CB 16 INVERTER 2 को बंद करना है, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2 को भी बंद करना है। फिर पैनल 14 पर, INVERTER 2 के चयन की पुष्टि करें। और CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 को भी बंद करें, दोनों ब्रेकर। फिर हमें RENDEZVOUS RADAR RELEASE हैंडल को खींचना है। पैनल 3 पर, हमें RENDEZVOUS RADAR को चालू करना है। सभी ज़िप कोड के साथ ENTER दबाएं, और रजिस्टर 1 और 2 में 28300 
Okay. I now have Aldebaran in the scanning telescope; I might want to call that one instead of Cap
حسنًا. سأعطيك أرقام IVI. إنها 1
Bonjo
알겠습니다. 첫 번째 줄은 그대로 두세요. 두 번째 줄, FL
Хорошо, Джек. В твоем контрольном списке, на странице 2-5. Там, на шаге 9, где написано «152 градуса шага при 0,05g», рядом с этим, чтобы Recovery лучше тебя видела во время спуска, мы хотим, чтобы ты включил S-диапазон и усилитель мощности на максимальную мощность. Конец связи
G
A
حسنًا،
Okay. Ich denke, wen
이미 35단계에서 이 내용을 확인하셨을 수도 있습니다. UP TELEMETRY를 BL
Grazi
1 प्लस 21 00. रॉजर. धन
ठीक है। अब आपकी मर्ज़ी। जैक के उठते ही, मेरा सुझाव है कि हम इन लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड के डिब्बों को तोड़कर कुछ डिब्बे बना
Roger. Mike, je pense que nous pouvons expliquer ce taux de sept dixièmes. Lors de notre premier essai, nous n'avons pas réussi à effectuer le test, ce qui a entraîné une erreur importante entre
Bene. Jack riferisce dal piano di sopra che riesce a vedere stelle e costellazioni attraverso l'ottica, ma l'angolazione del Sole è tale che si riflette sulla
Eagle, hier spricht Columbia. Houston hat Sie schon wieder verloren. Sie bitten um einen weiteren V
حسنًا. يظهر المؤشر نسبة ٢٢٪. لا نملك أي تحكم في الانعراج أو الدوران، ولا يمكننا استعادة السيطرة على محركات الانعراج، على ما يبدو لا يوجد أي منها. لكن مح
Veuillez également noter que votre TPI et votre TPF pourraient avoir environ 9 minutes 
没错，地面控制中心，用这门炮操控非常容易。我唯一的问题是燃料
맞나요? 제가 많이 찍어봤는데, 별로 잘 안 나더라고요. 대부분 너
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 약 4분에서 1시간 정도 걸렸는데, 1시간이 되면 점수를 드리겠습니다. 사령선
Roger. Durante il mio ultimo periodo di sonno, ho dormito quattro ore, per la maggior parte delle quali ho dormito profondamente. Il mio ultimo pasto è stato a base di cubetti di arachidi, succo d'arancia, panini e macedonia di frutta, il che era tutto... Ho bevuto circa sei sorsi d'acqua con quel pasto, 
Okay. We are 
Fred, hanno detto ch
わかりました。フライトプランでその点を考慮しているのは、もしロールオーバーしてヘッドアップ飛行などを試してみたい場合、ビルに新しいフィルム設定などを提供することで、彼の写真撮影の精度を向上で
最
Думаю, наша высокоскоростная пленка см
Je pense qu'il y a des b
نعم.
Roger. Grazie, Mike. Potresti darci una mano? È strano: non assomiglia a niente che abbiamo visto prima. Ci chiedevamo se avessi
로저, 11. 당신이 묘사한 내용을 기록해 두겠습니다. 
Roger. We copy that. What's your 
But more than anything, it re
나는 스위치가 켜진 상태로 고정된 채로 전원을 껐을 때 컴퓨터가 고장난 것 같다고 말
Okay. Zu Eintrag 1: Der zweite Punkt dort ist die 12-stündige Kaltstartphase (Kelvin). In den Diskussionen hier und vor dem Flug haben wir uns darauf geeinigt, dass wir diese Kaltstartphase nicht durchführen wollen. Daher streichen wir Schritt 2. Im Endeffekt wollen wir aber doch eine Kaltstartphase durchführen und die Wasserkessel vor dem Wiedereintritt testen, um sicherzustellen, dass keiner trocken läuft, so wie es bei einem vorherigen Fall der Fall war. Wir arbeiten an entsprechenden Verfahren und werden uns später damit bei Ihnen melden. Wir versuchen, dies zu besprechen, wenn Bill in der Leitung ist, damit alle gleichzeitig informiert sind. Wir möchten ei
了解。RKVの取得は約10
Роджер,
아폴로 8호, 고이득을 기다리는 동안 궤적 요약을 계속하겠습니다. 13번째 지점에서 태평양 중부선으로 복귀할 수 있으며, 연소 후 138초가 지나면 귀환이 시작됩니다. 138초면 버터플라이 영역을 벗어나게 됩니다. 20초 이후에는 조기점화나 재시동을 시도하지 않는 것이 좋습니다. 20초를 넘기면 궤적이 수정 범위를 벗어나 자유 귀환으로 이어질 수 있습니다. 귀환 지역의 날씨는 양호합니다. 추적 및 미추진이 가능합니다. 연소 중에는 저장 탱크와 섬프 탱크의 연료 소모로 인해 연소실 압력과 탱크 압력에 약간의 변화가 있을 수 있습니다. 이는 연소 시작 후 2~5초 사이에 발생할 수 있습니다. 두 시스템 모두 압력 변화가 미미할 것입니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동합니다. 연소 후에는 궤적 유지를 위해 물 끓임을 방지해야 합니다. 물 배출 상황은 양호해 보입니다. 그 이상은 괜찮을 겁니다. 5시 이후까지는 물 배출을 미루도록 하겠습니다. 그 전에 극저온 장치를 휘저어주고 싶습니다. (수정) 연료 전지의 다음 퍼지는 대략 에 이루어질 예정이며, 수소 배터리 A는 34.9, 배터리 B는 39.1, 찰리는 38.5가 될 것입니다. 저희는 단일 탱크 극저온 장치를 갖추고 있습니다. 이전 연소 성능을 보면, 정상 연소는 계산된 값보다 약 3.7초 정도 더 걸릴 것으로 예상됩니다. 엔진 성능은 정상이며 모든 매개변수가 안정적입니다. 좋아 보입니다. 컴퓨터 프로그램에 따르면 네 개의 쿼드 모두 용량이 거의 같습니다. 좋은 안내를 드리겠습니다. 몇 분 후에
U
D'accord. Sous la ligne 4, le TRANSFERT AUT
收到。目前，关于月球表面书籍，我们没有任何更新可以告诉您。我们正在考虑一些细节，也正在讨论，但都只是些非常小的改动。完毕
Okay. Nur zur Sicherheit. Es beginnt mit Panel 3, BATTERIELADUNGSSCHALTER, AUS; WECHSELRICHTER 2, AUS; Panel 5, HAUPTBUSVERBINDUNG, BAT A/C, EIN, 
收到
روجر، أبولو 11. ه
Давление в батарейном отсеке, Майк, должно быть меньше 1,5. Однако до первого вентиляционного отверсти
了解しました。テレビでもそう映っていたと思います。では最後の質問です。ニールさん、着陸地点への進入時に、フットボール場ほどの大きさのクレーターを通過したとのことですが、そこにはおそらく3メートルから4.5メートルほどのかなり大きな岩塊がありましたね。現在の位置か
ヒューストンさん、ジャックは、ピッチ角約1
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Ancora non ti ho ricevu
روجر. جاهز الآن لتشغيل الكمب
ठीक है। मैं खराबी संख्या 23, चरण 2 पर हूँ। मुझे लगता है कि थोड़ी सी संभावना है कि हम उबल रहे हैं, लेकिन मुझे इस पर संदेह
ORDEAL を設定しましたか? とにかく、何
سأطير بعيدًا، وعندما 
Это подтверждается. При таком расположении оба окна были обращены пря
了解、マイク。どうもありがとう。
没错。面板 1 上：旋转控制电源，
Actuellement, nous volons à très basse altitude, si bien que je ne pense pas que les stations au sol puissent nous localiser. Nous avons entendu plusieurs communications intermittentes. Nous allons toutefois maintenir cette position un moment afin de garder le lanceur en vue. Il ne semble pas que nous progressions beaucoup vers lui pour le moment. Il semble rester à peu près à la même distance qu'auparavant. Lors de l'observation nocturne, lorsque le lanceur était en dessous de nous, le ciel paraissait presque entièrement étoilé. Les émanations du lanceur étaient si nombreuses qu'elles projetaient des traînées lumineuses dans le ciel. J'ai d'ailleurs fait remarquer que ces émanations ressemblaient à des étoiles. En observant attentivement le lanceur à ce moment-là, on pouvait voir le carburant – plus précisément les vapeurs blanches qui s'échappaient de son extrémité arrière – et je suppose que c'est
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, कैंटन कॉम टेक। आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से सुन पा रहे हैं। कैप कॉम
Sì. Jim farà un salto lassù. Fred-o sta do
GLICOLE PRIMARIO
Roger. N
Ap
Ok. Stai parlando dell'assegno
Okay. Wir sehen jetzt die gesamte Erde
Okay. You want the horizon
حسنًا يا جيم، لقد نسخنا ذلك. أولًا، عل
Sì. Immagino che la domanda fondamentale sia che confrontando le palle qui e fuori dalla finestra non sembra troppo irragionevole, e immagino che Jim dica che l'imbardata e il rollio sono leggermente diversi da quelli che potrebbe vedere a occhio; eppure, gli aghi dell'aria mostrano una scala completa residua nel rollio e una scala completa 
هذا صحيح يا جيم. ما يحدث هو أننا، بالطبع، عندما تخرج من وضع التوقف، تعيد ضبط مؤشرات الخطأ، وبالتالي تفقد مرجع وضعك. تُنشئ مرجع وضع جديد، وقد لا يكون وضع الاحتراق لأننا، في هذه المرحلة، نتحكم في الوضع باستخدام... الآن، لنبدأ بـ "، ثم اضغط على زر الإدخال، ثم امسح ك
Wir konnten uns gerade noch so behaupten, aber die Raten waren zu
रॉजर। हम यहाँ एकत्रित किया हुआ कुछ पानी बहा रहे हैं, और हम अपशिष्ट जल की मात्रा को 25 प्रतिशत तक कम करने के लिए तैयार हैं। क्या आप सहमत ह
Это утвердительно,
D'accord. Je ne mesure aucune tension sur la batterie C, et l'ampérage
좋습니다. 오늘은 절차에 따라 관측 전과 후에 트러니언 바이어스를 측정해 주시길 바랍니다. 이는 열 효과로 인해 육분의 각도 측정에 오차가 발생하는지 확인하기 위한 것입니다. 관측 전에 측정한 바이어스 값을 반영해야 합니다. 연속 두 측정값이 0.003도 이내이면 NOUN 87에 PROCEED 표시를 하십시오. 그리고 측정 사이에 트러니언을 몇 도 정도 움직여 주십시오. 오늘은 지구의 시야가 평소보다 훨씬 작을 것입니다. 이 부분에 대해서는 저희보다 더 잘 아실 거라고 생각하지만, 별과 지구 지평선 사이의 각도를 정확하게 측정하려면 육분의의 M선(두 개의 눈금을 지나고 R선에 수직인 선)이 별의 직하점에서 지구 지평선과 평행해야 합니다. 그리고 나서 육분의 시야 내 어느 지점에서든 지평선에 별을 실제로 겹쳐 놓을 수 있습니다. 위, 아래 또는 M선상에서도 가능합니다. 자동 조작 후 가능한 한 빨리
Questa è Friend
Penso di poterlo vedere, di sicuro. Sì, l'ho visto benissimo, posso vederlo. Ho visto tut
हमें नहीं लगता कि इसमें कोई समस्या है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप क्वांटिटी रीड स्विच को चालू कर दें और अगले कुछ घ
Versteh
حسنًا. قراءة جيدة. نتابع إلى أسفل الصفحة. مفتاح "مُوازنة الاقتران"، "مُوازنة الاقتران مُطفأة". حسنًا، نصل إلى السطر الأخير قبل دقيقتين ناقصتين - "خانق القائد، الحد الأدنى؛ ضغط منخفض إلى فوهات". عند دقيقتين ناقصتين، احذف "400 زائد 1". عند د
Roger. Schritt 9 ist a. Schr
जेमिनी 4, ज
Keep g
了解。
Du könntest mich hin und wieder anrufen, Jerry, nur um mir mitzuteilen, dass du noch da bist, während wir die Antennen 
Roger. Copy. Thrust translation - four jets - Balance couple - ON. throttle - MINIMUM. Throttle - AUTO CDR. Prop button - RESET. Prop button. Okay. ABORT/ABORT STAGE - RESET. ATT CONTROL - three of them to MODE CONTROL. Okay, MODE CONTROL is set. is reading 400 plus 1
C'est le soleil qui brille dessus, car nous n'avons pas encore 
알겠습
Columbia, Houston. Abbiamo caricato il carico. 
はい、その手続きの開始時間はまだ正確には決まっていません。現在、懸命に作業を進めてい
Sarò felice di dormire lì, va bene? Non credo che influenzerà la cosa;
التقطتُ صورةً للتو. الإطار رقم ١٤ على كاميرا كونتاكس، وهي نفس 
네. 아폴로 11호가 여전히 가장 중요한 뉴스이며, 전 세계는 오늘 휴스턴 시간으로 오전 11시 49분경에 있을 아폴로 11호의 착륙을 기다리고 있습니다. 워싱턴에서는 하원 세제 개혁 위원회가 부유층이 비과세 투자나 특별 공제를 통해 소득세를 완전히 회피하는 것을 불가능하게 만드는 조항을 마련했습니다. 하원 세입위원회가
Okay. Prüfen Sie, ob die Wechselstromversorgung (AC) funktioniert. Dazu muss der Wechselrichter 2 an Panel 16 geschlossen sein. Der Leistungsschalter für den Wechselrichter 2 muss ebenfalls geschlossen sein. An Panel 11 unter „FLIGHT DISPLAYS“ müssen die Leistungsschalter GASTA und COMMANDER geschlossen sein. Auch an Panel 11 müssen die Leistungsschalter GASTA und COMMANDER für den Wechselstrombus 
Yes, it's only gone up to 2
आपको शायद पता चल जाए कि क्या वे पायलट के 
हां, मुझे भी यही लगा था
Okay, 13. We've got Fred-o o
تسبب تعطل المحرك في استهلاك المزيد م
嘿，乔，当我们返回去重新检查那里的隧道时
Tatsächlich, Vance, was du da siehst, sind feste Wassertropfen, die fast ständig austreten. Sie
フォーカスは無限遠です。そのまま無限遠にしておくべきです。間違いありません。さて、ズームについては、地平線や陸地などを少しズームインして撮影したいかもしれません。私なら、まずは広角12.5mmから始め、光を取り込みすぎないようにf値22で撮影
Sehr 
D'accord. Une entrée en matière appropriée ralentirait en quelque sorte... les allers-retours d'une heure... jusqu'à ce moment-là... entraveraient notre progression.
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। पहले चरण में, ईंधन और ऑक्सीडाइज़र का दबाव 10 psi है; दूसरे चरण में, ईंधन का दबाव 10 psi 
了解。地上での誘
- - at the top of the page, you have step 
There was no disorientation whatsoever. I felt that I could either look down at the ground - I felt perfectly at home looking down at it - and I could roll around on my back and look up and it was not disorienting me in any way. The spacecraft was my best reference. Any time I saw it I immediately had a good reference and, in fact at times near the 
And if you can find the, then by all means, track it or make a note of where it was and we can track it on the nex
그리고 돔 경기장 임대 논란은 
D'accord, Jack. Ce so
Questo è 
-
Roger, we hav
了解しま
ठीक है, जैक, मैं अब लाइन पर वापस आ गया हूँ। एस-बैंड पर, आप चाहते हैं कि मैं ट्रांसमीटर/रिसीवर और पावर एम्पलीफायर को 5 मिनट के लिए बंद कर दूं। क्या आप यही चाहते हैं - जब आप मुझे नि
收到。安静。请注意，
Okay, Fr
This little tape recorder has been a big benefit - has been a big benefit to us in passing some of our time away on our transit to the Moon, and it's rather odd to see it floating like this in Odyssey while it's playing the theme from "2001." And, of course, the tapes wouldn't be complete without "Aqu
Это подтверждение. Шаг 8: «От
- - 
Sì, l'ho notato. Prima, manteneva meno di così; era insolitamente basso. Ho quasi chiesto spiegazi
, Cap.
روجر. ترانكويليتي، هذه هيوستن. نستقبل الرسا
E a quanto pare il nostro separato
Нет. Я тоже не совсем понимаю, почему происходит снижение количества вторичного спирта, разве что бутылки начинают остывать, но они не должны так 
١١، هيوستن. لقد حصلنا على بعض البيانات، لكنها تعاني من نفس المشكلة التي واجهناها مع جهاز تكييف الإشارة الخاص بباز، لذا يبدو أن السلك مكسور ونود منك استبدا
Apollo 8, Houston. Bestät
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 중간 항로 수정 번호 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, 피치 및 요 트림 없음, TIG 150 29 5453, -00048, 모든 볼 추가, +00001 075 159 328; HA는 없음; HP +00230 00048 011 00048; 육분의 별 03 0908 382. 보어사이트 별 블록,
ヴァンスさん、月のあそこの特徴がわかるかどうかわかりませんが、境界線はおそらくデカルトあたりの中央平原地帯にあるようで
로저. 첫 번째 단계인 47페이지 1단계
Affermativo. Sto
Ah, 
了解。レーダーの調子は良好でした。友人のジュリアンが同席できず、大変残念です。操縦モードについてご報告します。まず、手動操縦とフライ・バイ・ワイヤの低速操縦は良好で、補助ダンピングも良好です。現在は自動操縦モード、つま
The rates... Yes, the total rate never real
D'accord. Je crois que c'est tout, mais nous consultons les membres pour savoir si 
もう一つ。この中間コースのタイミングを計るという考え方自体は、SHeタンクが排気される直前に行うという考えに基づいています。そうすれば、もし皆さんが少し揺さぶられたとしても、排気が起きた時に電源が入り、皆さんが制御できる
Jim, solo un punto su cui tu e Fred dovreste riflettere nel caso non siate stati informati, qualcosa di cui si sta parlando un po' ora. Questi conservatori vorrebbero che leggeste la pressione della bombola SHe quando entrate per la familiarizzazione a 58 ore. Se non c'è un midcourse-3, e sembra che ci siano buone probabilità che non ci sia, beh, potrebbero voler anticipare la familiarizzazione da 58 a 55 ore. Pass
没
Okay. Ich habe die Batterieladung, das Entlüftungsventil und die Treibstoffzellenspülung durchgeführt und den Vorgang bei 55 Stunden gestoppt. Ihre Rollneigung beträgt dann 285 Grad, wie im Flugplan vorgesehen. Die Winkel der Hochleistungsantenne sind leicht abweichend: Nickwinkel 23 Grad und Gierwinkel 267 Grad. Die TV-Übertragung erfolgt standardmäßig, mit Ausnahme einiger spezieller Schritte, die wir Ihne
좋습니다. 저는 접속했습니다
Probabilmente è 
안녕하세요, 인디언 컴 테크, 프렌드십 세븐입
حسنًا. لقد تتبعت نجمًا ساطعًا، وأعتقد أنه موجود في كوكبة العقاب. في الواقع، أنا متأكد تمامًا. أستطيع رؤية النجمين المستهدفين. لقد تتبعته حتى وصل إلى قمته. إنه يكاد يصل إلى القمة. سيختفي عن نظري الآن. لقد تتبعته من أسفل الكوكب، واستغرق الأمر 3 دقائق
听起来不错；我们燃烧结束后看看月亮。那样能获得高增益，对吧
了解、ヒューストン。パネル276、
13번
E gli angoli di guadagno elevati per lo stivaggio, o per lo stivaggio, sono beccheggio meno 52, imba
Nous aimerions savoir ce que vous comptez faire ce soir. Notre plan de vol indique une période de repos prévue vers 182 heures. Qu'avez-vous prévu d'en faire? Nous suivons la météo et nous devrions vous communiquer
और, 
How's the B
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 아폴로 
ठीक है। हम कंप्यूटर को सभी मोड में चेक करना चाहते हैं। इस चेक के तीन चरण होंगे। सबसे पहले सभी IVI विंडो में 10 ft/sec की गति सेट करें। फिर मालफंक्शन रीसेट बटन दबाएं। इसके बाद स्टार्ट कंप बटन दबाएं और कंप्यूटर रनिंग लाइट के जलने का इंतज़ार करें। यह सभी मोड में करना है। अगर आपको कंप्यूटर के चलने का कोई संकेत नहीं मिलता है, तो आप एक और टेस्ट करेंगे। इस दूसरे टेस्ट में, आप सभी मोड में चेक करेंगे। आप कंप्यूटर को 2 सेकंड के लिए बंद करेंगे। कंप्यूटर को दोबारा चालू करने के बाद, मैनुअल मालफंक्शन रीसेट और स्टार्ट कंप बटन को दोबार
네, 그 수소 문제 말인데요, 확실하진 않지만 역압 문
휴스
ठीक है, फ्रेड। जो मैंने आपको दिया है, वह कमांड मॉड्यूल की अम्बिलिकल से बिजली हटाने के अंत में है। और आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, इस पूरी प
Fr
Roger. Sigma Seven. Guaymas Cap Com. Parfait. Il y a eu une panne de courant du côté californien. Nous lisons correctement votre temps de rétroséquence. À mon signal, voyons voir, le temps écoulé de votre capsule est actuellement en avance de 4 
Oka
Вот репортаж Гарри Розенталя из Associated, Хьюстон. Два Санта-Клауса украсили сочельник для двухлетнего Джеффри Ловелла. Первый постучал в его входную дверь и принес подарки. Второй проводил его папу домой с Луны. Первый был в красном костюме и с белой бородой, и его крики «Хо-хо» были слышны за кварталом. Второй представлял собой огромный двигатель, извергающий пламя за Луной, и тысячи людей ждали известия о его запуске. «Пожалуйста, примите к сведению, что Санта-Клаус существует», — такими были первые слова «Аполлона-8», когда он вышел из радиомолчания, чтобы сообщить встревоженному миру через 15 минут после того, как двигатель выполнил свой критически важный запуск. «Никто из нас никогда не ожидал получить лучший рождественский подарок, чем этот», — сказал Кен Маттингли из Центра управления полетами. «Поблагодарите всех на Земле за нас. Вы знаете, что мы бы не справились без вас», — последовал ответ полковника Фрэнка Бормана, командира космического корабля. В этот момент перед пультами в Центре управления полетами загорелась рождественская елка, и астронавт Харрисон Шмидт прочитал экипажу космическую версию «Визита Святого Николая». «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и далеко в космосе экипаж «Аполлона-8» только что выиграл лунную гонку», — начиналось чтение. Экипаж Центра управления полетами отложил празднование до тех пор, пока отец Джеффри, капитан ВМС Джеймс Ловелл, вместе с майором ВВС Уильямом А. Андерсом и полковником Борманом не отправятся домой. В любой другой сочельник семьи астронавтов были бы в церкви на рождественской службе, но в этом году все они были прикованы к своим телевизорам. Дома рядом с Центром пилотируемых космических аппаратов были украшены. Газоны вокруг дома Ловелла и по всему его поселению Тимбер-Коув были украшены мексиканскими фонариками, и четверо Ловеллов 30. Они 00, по
هيوستن، هذا أبولو 8. لق
はい、まずはRetro Jettison ARMです。Jettison Retroです。Jettison RetroはGuaymasに報告してください。Retro Power-SAFE、Retro Jet
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们掌握了所有三名宇航员的可靠数
In dieser Fluglage hat man definitiv den Eindruck, weit nach oben zu blicken, und wenn kein Horizont zu sehen ist, ist der Himmel einfach schwarz. Die Lichtmenge im Cockpit ist ziemlich hoch. Sobald man sich daran gewöhnt hat, kann man sie natürlich mit der Kabinenbeleuchtung reduzieren. Im Moment zögere ich jedoch, die Beleuchtung hier zu verringern, da es Probleme mit der Anzugselektronik gibt. Ich benutze meine Fingerlampen ausgiebig. Es wurde festgestellt, dass wir für zukünftige Flüge eine Art Auffangbehälter benötigen, in den wir Gegenstände stopfen und sie dort für eine gewisse Zeit festhalten können. Ich arbeite weiter an dem Problem mit der Unterlegscheibe und dem kleinen, verbogenen Metallstück. Ich glaube, ich habe sie endlich in den kleinen Beutel an der Luke bekommen. Die Anzugtemperatur hält sich gerade so. Mir ist warm, und ich werde die Einstellung wahrscheinlich verringern müssen. Ich verstehe nicht, warum die Anzugselektronik so lange braucht, um zu reagieren. Meine Kabinenelektronik f
Gemini VIII, hier spricht Houston. Wir haben Delta-P-Scheinwerfe
ヒューストン、私がこれを地面に5インチ
Roger, Buzz. Veuillez placer le commutateur OMNI A de l'antenne bande S sur la position Bravo. Placez le commutateur OMNI de l'antenne bande S sur la position OMNI, le réglage du gain élevé sur MANUEL, et les angles de gain élevé seront 
Dès que j'active SQUELCH, je vous perds
Roger. Tout semble correct. Je pense qu'ils essaient 
Gemini VIII, 
Ok. L
Хорошо. На дисплее вашего сервисного модуля Quad Bravo отображается немного заниженная температура. Похоже, примерно на 20 градусов ниже, чем у остальных модулей. Не могли бы вы подтвердить, что переключатель нагревателя для Quad Bravo находится в положении PRIMAR
Caso fuor
Хорошо, ла
Okay, Chef. Wir sehen uns dort. Das war eine wirklich sehr, sehr angenehme Fahrt, die letzte; di
هل لديك توقيت ب
了解しました。了解しました。バッテリー残量はすぐに記録します。光学CALの姿勢は、ロール330.5、ピッチ086.3、ヨーはすべてゼロです。飛行計画の姿勢は問題ありません。バッテリー残量も確認しました。クルーのステータスレ
罗杰。约翰，你的截获非常出色。你的速度比标准速度低了8英尺/秒。V/VR，1.0002。你能确认一下你从印度洋号上起飞的逆向飞行序列是1 Easy、Fo
أوديسي، هيوستن. يمكننا أن نعطيك فرصة إذا ق
روجر. أمامنا دقيقتان ونصف، وجميع الأنظمة تبدو جيدة. كل شيء على ما يرام 
تم ضبط ضغط المقص
Ehi, quando avrai un buon colpo su
Аполло
D'accord. La procédure est la suivante:, ENTRÉE; 1331, ENTRÉE; 7, ENTRÉE; et ENTRÉE. Explication: lors de la procédure, il est arrivé une fois que la valeur soit saisie dans l'ordinateur environ 16 secondes après que le commutateur OPTICS ZERO ait été mis sur ZÉRO. Il s'agit d'une anomalie très rare, car si vous effectuez cette opération pendant l'
It appears that we did a grave injustice to the food people. Just after our TV show, Sa
Gemini VIII, CSQ CAP COM on HF. Do you read? Over
Okay. D
بالطبع، الأمر الآخر الوحيد الذي قد يشغلنا هو مقدار التغير في سرعتك، ومقدار التغير في السرعة (دلتا-في)، وسنحتاج إلى دراسة ذلك لبعض الوقت قبل أن نتمكن من تحديده. وإذا لم يكن هناك أي تغيير ملحوظ، فإن
Я не пойду. Ах да, кстати, как насчет того, чтобы взглянуть на мои мощные д
Let me che
Roger, ich hatte kurzzeitig Probleme, als ich auf die 3er-Einstellung zurückgegangen bin, bin aber nicht lange dort geblieben. Der Wert sollte definitiv zwischen 7,5 und 8 liegen. Momentan nutze ich die automatische Rückwärtsneigungskorrektur. Ich werde gleich auf Fly-by-Wire umschalten. Die Gyroskope waren auf Normalbetrieb eingestellt, und das Manöver war deaktiviert. Alle Systeme funktionieren einwandfrei. Einmal habe ich versehentlich etwa 2 % der manuellen Steuerung (Kraftstoff) durch eine Berührung abgebrochen. Es war eine Doppelsteuerung. Das war mein Fe
रॉजर, 2: एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 38320, प्लस 166, माइनस 081 080 11 3603, माइनस 01408, सभी गेंदें घटाएँ, माइनस 00743, सभी शून्य, 196 359 00657, प्लस 0053
好了。数据导出已经完成，录音机还给你了。你可以随意使用。我们可能还会再次导出数据，如果需要，我们会使用相同的信息，除非你之后有其他特别想添加的内容。听了一下语音质量——听起来很不错。我们即将到达中途点4，现在正在讨论如何按时完成，你可以预计燃烧速度在每秒3英尺左右。我们正在考虑，也希望你能考虑一下，使用机载矢量进行这次燃烧的可能性，我们只需更新插槽中的矢量即可，这样你就能使用机载矢量了。但这似乎不会对燃
Да уж, мы еще как-то этим воспользовались. Каждый из нас один раз воспользовался системой дефекации, а системой мочеиспускания, на
Roger. À Washington, la commission des finances du Sénat a approuvé la prolongation de la surtaxe sur le revenu, mais un vote du Sénat sur le projet de loi semble pour l'instant peu probable. À Austin, le représentant de l'État, Ray Lemmon, de Houston, a été nommé directeur national de la Société américaine d'océanographie. M. Lemmon a proposé une étude sur la poss
J'ai une question pour John. J'aimerais savoir comment se por
И я
그들이 
That was the most natura
了解。88と8.5ですね。準備ができたら、フライトプランのアップデートを少しだけ
Ho
Apogee is 155.7 - Perigee is 88. They will give you better data after they get our 
Es ist ziemlich schwierig hier, Jack, in der Schwerelosigkeit in eine Hängematte zu kommen. Ich bin mir nicht sicher, ob ich immer weiter von ihr wegtreibe oder ob sie sich
Think you can reach the - reach this hook
알겠습니다. 제가 이해한 바로는, 잭, 이 절차는 모든 DESCENT 배터리가 켜져 있고, BAT 6이 정상 전원 공급 상
Hey, Joe, when we went back up and
了解しました。フライトプランを見ると、午前に予定されているので、その準備として午後にもう一度行う必要があります。地上手順では、アライメントを
Rog, 5 minutes pour la rétrograda
I am stopping the capsule in reentry attitude. Taking roll out. Yaw is zero; roll is coming ou
Hello, Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven
휴스턴, 11. 5750을 읽었고, 두 병 모
Roger, Jim. D'apr
زائد 59578، ناقص 00086، ناقص 05287، 012 080 018، غير قابل للتطبيق، زائد 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160، 332، الأرض لأعلى 005، يمين 27، زائد 0398، زائد 06500 13
Хорошо. Это полезная информация, и пока мы видим, что вы продолжает
Apollo 8, Houston.
了解しました。96度FC-7で30
Okay. Zu Eintrag 1: Der zweite Punkt dort ist die 12-stündige Kaltstartphase (Kelvin). In den Diskussionen hier und vor dem Flug haben wir uns darauf geeinigt, dass wir diese Kaltstartphase nicht durchführen wollen. Daher streichen wir Schritt 2. Im Endeffekt wollen wir aber doch eine Kaltstartphase 
操
Хорошо. Два момента: 
Okay. Wir haben beides versucht. Wen
继续我之前对助推器飞行初期情况的汇报。进入黑暗区域后，大约在1200英尺（约366米）的距离，我尝试与助推器保持位置，但当时我唯一能判断与助推器距离的方法就是观察两盏闪光灯之间的距离。它们会不时地——不是偶尔，而是持续不断地——出现一盏灯、两盏灯、再一盏灯的交替闪烁，有时甚至要过很久才能再次看到两盏灯——这表明助推器一直在旋转。我完全无法确定它的旋转方向。根据两盏灯之间的距离，当我能看到它们时，我感觉与助推器保持着非常有利的位置，直到我们到达卡那封附近。那时，我感觉自己正在迅速接近它，尽管我无法确定。到目前为止，我积累的所有速度变化量（ΔV）都是朝着助推器的方向，也就是
Okay. Rechts von mir erheben sich die Pyrenäen, und wir befinden uns fast über Messier und Pickering. Unser erster Ausgangspunkt ist aus unserer Höhe gut zu erkennen. Der Kontrast ist deutlich sichtbar, je näher wir der Terminatorlinie kommen. Die Sicht ist gut, keine Sonnenreflexion in unseren Augen; die Sicht an diesem Punkt ist ausgezeichnet. Unser erster Ausgangspunkt ist leicht zu erkennen; und über dieser Bergkette sehen wir den zweiten Ausgangspunkt, den Dreiecksb
11, Houston. Pourriez-vous nous indiquer la positi
Roger, sono in ottima forma. Tra un minuto ti spiegherò come fare gli esercizi, non appena avrò finito con la lista 
जो, अगर आपको कोई आपत्ति न हो तो थोड़ी देर रुक जाइ
好了，杰克，你
——10101确实发生了变化—
罗杰。大约一小时前
D'accord, Vance. Voici le module de commande pour: le filtre et le sac du ventilateur de cabine; les sacs de décontamination, à l'exception de ceux que nous utilisons pour la caméra de télévision; de
सेवन, तुम तेजी से कमजोर पड़ रहे हो। मैं इस बार एरिया 1 चार्ली के लिए गुप्त रूप से
Roger. BLOC, en cours, option 
아니요. 현재 명령 모듈에
11, CM
Ok
好的。你可以稍后再获取这些配置信息。接下来我要给你讲解的是验证主总线 B 是否正常的步骤。之
罗杰。功率放大器断路器面板 16
Ich glaube nicht, dass viele das so gesehen haben. Ich suche immer noch nac
Хорошо. У меня есть неплохой
肯定的なもの
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티 기지. 아직 하지 않으셨다면, 지금 바로 연료 및 산소 배출
好的。在 PC+2 之后，没有配平要求；而且，如果在 PC+2 期间发生发动机故障，后续的中段机动——最早的一次是在 PC+4。如果您没有进行 PC+2，但我们仍然想进行一次——稍后。在 PC+4 时，速度增量​​（DELTA-V）的增加，或者说惩罚，大约为每秒 24 英尺，着陆点位于太平洋中部。现在，您应
네. 제가 재생해 봤습니다. 녹음기
Roger. Joan ist gerade nicht da, Buzz, aber Janis berichtet, dass das Gras schon ziemlich hoch steht, und ich schätze, es wird dir
Non c'è da stupirsi che la Terra non
好的，阿波罗8号。所有系统——快速环顾一下——看起来都很好。数量方面已经更新了四重更新，所以你掌握了相关信息。氧化剂进料管温度和燃料温度都是73度。低温系统正在运行，A电池的电
Да, и, к сожалению, из-за того, как мы смотрим в окно, мы можем довольно хорошо выравн
Это показания прибора Phecda в Большой Медведице перед входом в слой дымки. Она окклюдируется — её свечение прекращается примерно на 2,5 град
Bene, questo è stato bello... Passiamo alla manovra, intendo all'atteggiamento del sonno: qualcuno ha qualcos
Наилучший угол наклона Солнца для получения снимка космического аппарата — это отойти от него на 
알겠습니다. 전원 5번, 비상 전원 차단. 항목 1, 첫 번째 줄에서 "And VHF-A"를 지우겠습니다. 두 번째 줄은 "SIMPLEX 작동"입니다. 세 번째 줄에서 두 번째 주요 단어인 "POWER AMP"를 "OFF"로 바꾸고, 마지막 단어인 "OFF"를 "PCM"으로 바꿉니
ومرة أخرى، نحتاج إلى تعديل بسيط في الوضع. أرضنا تختفي للأعلى ولليمين. أرضنا وأرضك. الاتجاه خاطئ، الاتجاه خاطئ. قليلاً بعد. حسنًا. لا بأس إن استطعتَ تثبيتها هنا. أوه! الآن تنزلق للخلف مجددًا. حسنًا. استمر في الاقتراب قليلاً، قليلاً بعد. حسنًا. تسعون درجة في ذلك الاتجاه؛ هذه التسعون خاطئة، الاتجاه الآخر. ها نحن ذا. قليلاً بعد. لا، الاتجاه خاطئ، الاتجاه خاطئ؛ أنا آسف. استمر في الاقتراب في ذلك الاتجاه. لا، لقد ارتفعت عند الساعة الثانية عشرة. ها نحن ذا، إنها تعود للأسفل. ها نحن ذا، إنها تعود للأسفل، إنها تعود للأس
Gemini 4, sei 
Apollo 
Bon. Le seul problème, c'est qu'il est quasiment impossible de viser avec cette caméra; le champ de vision est tellement étroit qu'il a fallu trois hommes et un garçon pour réussir à l'orienter correctement. On a même essayé avec du chewing-gum p
Хьюстон, Апо
Roger. Und wir haben jetzt ein Bild; es wackelt allerdings ziemlich stark. Könnten Si
C'è un cratere in arrivo, Buzz? Pr
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。吉姆，请你点击“接受”按钮，我们会
Abbiamo Haney qui sotto che
Negative, Charlie. I just - I don't have that resolution. But to give you some idea, I can - on the lower Texas coast, I can see - knowing what I'm looking for, I can see Padre Island. I can just barely make o
我们比原计划提前了大约10度，不过还好。我们转移得稍微晚了点……但一点也不
克里夫现在不在。吉恩
Sì, l'ho fatto, ed Ed diceva che il suo mal 
아폴로 8호 추적 작업이 아직 진행 중이라 결과를 확실히
Vous avez raison. Il n'était pas e
Я бы не возраж
रॉजर, कैंटन कैप कॉम। मेरी रिपोर्ट इस प्रकार है: ईंधन 90-100 [प्रतिशत], ऑक्सीजन 73-100 [प्रतिशत], एम्प्स 22, केबिन क
请给我提供核心 2
… combien de lumi
दोस्ती सात। जल्दी जा रहे हैं। काफी अच्छा प्रदर्श
알겠습니다. 다음 단계는 12번 패널입니다. S-밴드 기능을 음성으로, 범위 기능을 범위 설정으로
Roger. Naha RESCUE 1 will be on station at splashdown with parajumpers and a flotation collar. The USS Mason will be on site about 3 ho
Ou
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du d
D'ac
Роджер, «Дружба семь». Крен указывает на 19 градусов вправо, рыскание, 2 градуса в
They're both 
Хоро
GET AB 03 47 34; Delta-V, 61,6; Delta-T, 01 + 22; lacet zéro, tangage 23 degrés vers le bas; Noyau 25, 00567; Noya
Ich dachte, ich 
よし。重さは45701、マイナス040、プラス
分かりました。あり
로저, 마이크. 130번 도로로 향하고 있습니다. P1은 98 37 35, P2는 98 42 44이
Oh, absolut, Jim. Wir liegen weit vorn. Ich wollte dir nur Bescheid geben, dass wir es 
혈압과 체온을 
تبدو في حالة جيدة جد
Roger, Mike. Veuillez noter vos angles maintenant, puis exécuter la commande et charger ces angles (ceux que vous voyez sur la commande) dans l'emplacement prévu à cet effet; et appuyez sur PRO, ce qui lancera notre période de tarifica
Al contrario, VIII. L'azimut è 27,4 e l'elevazi
La risposta 
罗杰。我们批准你执行 6-4 的方案。我会为你更新一个包含机动时间的 4-4 载荷和一个不包含机动时间
在其下方，划掉“Spacec
わかりまし
我已经切换到语音控制发射和记录模式。我很满意，无需使用十字线，就能通过窗口看到各个方向的图像
而且，鉴于需要长时间阅读检查清单，不妨将
阿波
네, 맞습니다. 1, /: 6
هذا 
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi, poco prima delle 5 ore circa, o verso, vi vorremo in assetto per un allineamento dell'asse corporeo, usando il terminatore terrestre come abbiamo fatto prima; E non appena lo avremo, eseguiremo -7, che ora equivale a circa 60 cm al secondo, ovvero circa 15 seco
少しだけ
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。滚转零度，俯仰角0.25度，偏航角零度。完
I think the
네, 알겠습니다. 정말 감사합니다, 
ठीक है। 15 44 55 पर, यह गुआयमास अधिग्रहण
Joe, wir hatten ungefähr auf halber Strecke oder nach einem Fünftel des Startpunkts einen Signalausfall, und Fred hat die Übertragun
Houston, Tranquility Base è pronta a passare attraverso lo spegnimento e terminare il conto alla r
음, 우리가 지나온 큰 분화구 하나를 제외하면, 우리 주변에는 다른 분화구가 없었던 것 같습니다. EASEP를 설치하고 나서 산책을 나갔는데, 버즈가 기록된 샘플들을 정리하기 시작하는 동안, 우리 뒤쪽에 있는 지름 70~80피트, 깊이 15~20피트 정도 되는 분화구로 가서 사진을 몇 장 찍었습니다. 바닥에는 꽤 큰 암석들이 있었는데, 지표면에 있는 것들보다 훨씬 컸습니다. 하지만, 우리가 15피트 정도 깊이까지 내려갔을 때는 표토층 아래로는 내려가지 못했던 것 같습니다. 적어도 그
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. You can do the. The computer is 
Tr-10 back to normal. I've done that earlier. Okay, we got - got suit pressure. Go ahead and take a look at the inverters again here. 250 is 141 (degrees), 150 is about 107 (degrees). Well enough alone. Standby is... 7. Just about ambient. Negative, it's even a little.... The cabin pressure is about 5.3 (psi), which is perfect. Suit dome is 72 (degrees). Cabin dome is 45 and cabin is holding. Suit temperature is about 64 (degrees) and I like it. Oxyg
Ja. Lasst uns schl
Roger. Still reading you. Broken a little bit. At 30, my status is good. Fuel and oxygen are steady. C
Yes. I think if you add up the - Yes - if you add up the operating time, 
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон
Ну, хорошо, это отлично. Вся эта процедура, которую я собираюсь вам здесь описать, относится к тому, что, как мы надеемся, поможет исправить проблемы с объективом и позволит смотреть в окно вашей встречи на Землю, а все эти углы подвеса и прочее основаны на наблюдении за Землей и
मैं इ
Okay. Ich kann bestätigen, dass wir uns in dieser Konfiguration befinden, mi
はい、あな
로저. 이전 건, 14시 54분 00초 호라이즌 스캐너 일몰
Хорошо, Джо. Наши колебания усилились там, где Луна находится довольно высоко в окне, а Земля довольно низко;
了解、フレンドシップセブン、軌道に戻る
Je vois clairement un mouvement de lacet dans la fenêtre, le périscope et le réticule. La fenêtre est c
روجر. تشير القراءة عند 269°10' إلى خط عرض يبلغ حوالي 67.4 ميلاً. أعتقد أننا 
주낙하산이 녹색으로 접혀 있습니다. 낙하산은 펼쳐져 있으며, 10,800피트 고도에서 리프 형태로 변형되어 아름다운 모습을 보여주고 있습니다. 낙하산 상태는 양호해 보입니다. 산소 비상 
Sigma 
このコンパスが動いているなんて言わないでほしい。もっと話すべきだった。私がやってきたのは、標準的な光源を外に出すことだった。この時点では、カプセル側、つまり私の顔側は、コンパスをまっすぐ見上げて
分かりました。正解です。では、この設定から再構成するには、ジャック
好的
إليكم تقريرًا من هاري روزنتال من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في هيوستن. أضفى بابا نويلان البهجة على ليلة عيد الميلاد للطفل جيفري لوفيل، البالغ من العمر عامين. طرق الأول باب منزله وجلب الهدايا، بينما قام الثاني بتشغيل محرك أبولو 8 العائد من القمر. ارتدى الأول بدلة حمراء ولحية بيضاء، وأطلق صيحة "هو هو" بصوت عالٍ سُمع في آخر الشارع. أما الثاني، فكان محركًا ضخمًا ينفث اللهب خلف القمر، وكان الآلاف ينتظرون بفارغ الصبر خبر تشغيله. "يرجى العلم أن هناك بابا نويل" كانت أولى كلمات أبولو 8 بعد أن خرجت من الصمت اللاسلكي لتُعلم العالم القلق بعد 15 دقيقة من إتمام المحرك لمهمته الحاسمة. قال كين ماتينجلي من مركز التحكم بالمهمة: "لم يتوقع أحد منا أن يحصل على هدية عيد ميلاد أفضل من هذه". وجاء الرد من العقيد فرانك بورمان، قائد المركبة الفضائية: "نشكر كل من كان على الأرض نيابةً عنا. كما تعلمون، لم نكن لننجح لولاكم". في هذه اللحظة، أضاءت شج
ऑक्सीजन प्रेशर गेज कई मामलों में असंतोषजनक ह
Roger. Possiamo riprovar
Хорошо. У меня есть данные как в процента
... vraiment 
Okay – also, heute Morgen schauen wir mal, wie nah die Flugbahn an die Parallelität zur M-Linie herankommt. Bevor wir mit dem Markieren begannen, schien die Berechnung dieser drei Winkel etwas ungenau zu sein, und ich verbrauchte unnötig viel Treibstoff, indem i
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。以下是一些最后的更新。关于进入太空，我们之前告诉你们把摄像机的刻度设为50英尺。但实际上摄像机的最大刻度只有25英
鹰号，休斯顿。我们已经掌握了角度信息。我来复述一遍。完毕。指令舱：11154、2
حسنًا. اتفاق جيد. فهمنا ذلك يا فريد. ولإظهار مدى استرخاءنا بشأن الدخول، يقوم كين بالنظر - 
حسنًا. المدخل: منطقة منتصف المحيط الهادئ، 357 152 359 26
La temperatura della nostra tuta è scesa di circa
अपोलो 8. हम अगले लगभग तीस मिनट तक ओम्नी स्विच
هيوستن، كولومبيا في أومني سي، تشارلي، صوت منخفض احتياطي، وعندما يتسنى لك الوقت، هل ي
시그마 세븐, 시
Okay. Jim says the docking tunnel index is a plus 2.1 degrees
هذا سلبي.
Columbia. Columbia, hier spricht Ho
البوصلة تتأثر بشدة بأجهزة تحديد الاتجاه والجيروسكوبات الموجودة خلفه
我打算尝试将你的数据加44，并使用4
Roger. Bedienfeld 9 ist auf VHF-Empfang eingest
BAT 찰리, 37.0; 파이로 A, 37.0; 파이로 B, 37.0; 헬륨 압력, 3450; 그리고 재미 삼아 질소 A, 2300; 질소 B, 2
Чарли, мы проверили длину кабелей, и думаем, может быть, завтра на некоторое время в
ह्यूस्टन, आप
Et nous avons un voyant pour le séparateur d'eau. Tenez-le, je vais vérifie
Finalmente siamo riu
로저
제미니 4호, 휴스
Ok, Jack. La seconda riga sotto "
At that time you'll put the Retro Power to ARM, but we're going to move that up to th
Oh! D'accord. La canette 
Aquarius, do you have a star close by there you could che
好的。新月中心大
REP RB 26 plus 39; roll left 47,
アクエリアス、ヒ
لدي تحديث لك إذا لم تكن مشغولاً للغاية بحيث لا يمكن
D'accord. Que diriez-vous de
هل يمكنك الانتظار لحظة؟ لا يمكننا تأكيد ذلك حاليًا. لاحظ
Roger, ich verstehe. Und nur zur In
收到。
Ge
Мне кажется, наша нестабильность усиливается. Земля сейчас находится практически у самого верха окна. Мне приходится наклоняться почти до пола, чтобы её увидеть. А Луна, наоборот, находится очень низко, у са
罗
Sì, puoi piegarlo completamente; ti sarebbe utile
로저. 랜딩백은 이미 꺼져 있었습니다. 제가 먼저 확인하고 보고했어요. 레트
それは私の想像ですか、それとも音
Okay. There's - on the right side of the screen at the present time, there's a triple crater w
Хорошо. Ладно. А вы примерно представляете, сколько времени продлится это горение? Во врем
Ja, ich wette, wir 
알겠습니다. 마이너스 6시간, 정확히는 6분 후에, 모드 컨트롤에서 ATT HOLD(지워져 있던 부분)를 누르고, 삽입, ENTER를 세 번 더 누릅니
Eagle
Una parte delle Can
好的。读取以下设置：向上遥测命令关闭；甚高频调幅B，中心；S波段静噪关闭；燃料电池反应阀正常；磁带录音机前进，中心；磁带运动，旋转；电源，中心；PMP电源，中心；交流逆变器1关闭；交流逆变器2关闭；逆变器1至交流1关闭；交流1复位关闭；逆变器2至交流2关闭；交流2总线复位关闭；接下来是面板4，计量；电信，第1组；电信，第2组；以及乙二醇泵全部关
यह तो नकारात्मक है। सिवाय स्टीम वेंट के तापमान की इस समस्या के। मैं सोच रहा हूँ—मैं एक मिनट के लिए विज़र खोल देता हूँ; इससे ठंडक मिलेगी—विज़र खोल
Il reste trois minutes. Correction: il reste deux minutes, Jack
Fred-o，我们还有大约两分钟时间到达全向交换机。你可以先关闭测距和语音备份功能
우리는 약 180도 
Нач
80毫米可能也
Итак, мы в P00, теперь кто чего 
Forse un po' spostati orizzontalmente verso - vediamo - Houston, per aiutarti, st
Roger, verstanden? Zwischen 18 und 22 Uhr werde ich auf Rev 12 über RKV meine PLA und CLA aktualisieren. Auf Rev 13 über Canary fliege ich auf C-Band. Um 12:16:00 Uhr GMT kann ich eine Orbitnavigation durchführen, sofern sie keinen Treibstoff verbraucht. Auf Rev 13 führe ich über Carnarvon einen Datenabgleich durch und beginne danach mit einem normalen Flugplan. Stimmt das 
حسنًا يا باز. بخصوص بنود خطة الطيران، إليك بعض التحديثات أولًا. لقد ألغينا نقطة المنتصف رقم 6. ابقَ في مكانك. سأمنحك وقتًا إضافيًا هذا الصباح. البند الثاني في خطة الطيران هو أننا جاهزون لشحن البطارية B في أي وقت ترغب فيه. أما البند الثالث، فنريد تفريغ مياه الصرف الصحي بطريقة مختلفة قليلًا هذه المرة. نود القيام بذلك عند علاماتنا من الأرض. المسار غير منتظم قليلًا، ونود تفريغ المياه في وقت نعتقد أنه سيحافظ على استقراره، بحيث يبدو أن لدينا فرصة مناسبة قادمة - بين 15 و20 دقيقة. وعند علامتنا، نود أن يكون مستوى مياه ال
Okay, da drüben sind die vier Sicherungsautomaten, Ken. Als du „Schalttafel 8“ sagtest, dachte ich, du meintest die. Ich glaube nicht, dass die Sicherungsautomaten momentan ausgefallen sind
لقد توصلتُ للتو إلى حلٍّ لتغيير خط طول الهبوط بمقدار 6 درجات شرقًا. أريد ف
D'accord. Il semble que le système ne puisse pas pirater la voix normale. Concernant
D'accord. À Sun demi-vecteurs unitaires, X, R1, est plus 0,4
好的。关于热水器：有意思
ح
起初，由于需要进行另一次规避机动，我们无法按计划立即开始观测。抛射物在目标区域产生了大量的伪星，使得光学校准几乎不可能。我们之前研究的方法似乎不太奏效。我最终采用的方法是进入天狼星轨道（我们最亮的恒星），取回轴和耳轴，然后驾驶航天器飞向天狼星，利用它们进行光学校准，这项工作我们稍后完成。关于光散射，似乎在被动热控过程中，几乎在任何姿态下，扫描望远镜都会接收到光散射。它主要表现为一条宽阔的光带，横跨望远镜中心，位于零度两侧约10度范围内。在这个区域很难看到恒星。重新校准的效果不错。我已经能够用六分仪找到那颗星来进行校准，但我无法在扫描望远镜中识别出我们通常使用的星，例如雷戈尔星或门肯特星。我第一次观测地球时，地平线非常模糊。但地球地平线和大气层之间似乎确实存在一条非常清晰的分界线。地标视线滤镜似乎有助于确定地平线。太空和大气层顶部之间存在一条
١١، هذه هيوستن. نتيجةً لتفريغنا عبر مصرف إدارة النفايات، استنتجنا أن مستشعر معدل تدفق الأكسجين لديك معطل. ذكرتُ عندما شرحتَ لنا عملية تفريغ خزان 
Да, почему бы нам просто не сказать, что если у нас возникнут пр
मेरा अनुमान है कि वे क्या करेंगे - खैर, मे
Come probabilmente saprai, abbiamo diversi gruppi che lavorano sulle procedure da qui in poi. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sulle correzioni di metà rotta per determinare un sistema, gli assetti, come eseguirle, le tecniche di allineamento e così via. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sull'ingresso, incluso come e quando attiveremo il. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sullo stato del sistema e tra poche ore - più tardi domani, da dove lo vediamo, passeremo a una configurazione di base sul e condurremo un controllo del MAIN BUS B. In questo momento il COMM è un po' in degrado e non riesco a sentire molto bene quello che stai per dire. Ma voglio solo tenerti aggiornato su come stanno andando le cose qui. E ricorda che h
Vogliamo solo che tu proceda per
收到。尼尔的心跳是载人航天飞行中最快的，而我们刚刚才切换到低比
日光から日陰に入るときに何度か気づいたのですが、ちょうど日中に入るときに、バイザーに映った自分の顔の反射に加えて、バイザーからの反射も目に入るため、日光から日陰に
这就是我
ठीक है। उद्देश्य पेरीसिंथियन प्लस 2 घंटे का अबॉर्ट है: प्लस 1633.0, माइनस 0014.5, माइनस 0751.5; अपोजी लागू नहीं है, पेरीजी प्लस 0020.5 है; 1797.7, 8:35, 268, 264, प्लस 16410, माइनस 00145, माइनस 07338 लागू नहीं है। और मेरे पास आपके लिए दो गिम्बल ट्रिम कोण हैं जिन्हें अपडेट किया जाएगा। फिलहाल, हम चाहते हैं कि आप पिच 5.86, रोल 6.75 के सा
네, 연
Gémeaux 4, inutile de prendre votre température buccale. Nous n'aurons pas le temps. Passons à la 
Roger. FÜHRUNGSKONTROLLE, MODUSKO
好的，成交。
Нет. Кажется, я их здесь, на этой стороне, не вижу. Я видел несколько, совсем немного, сразу после того, как покинул Канаверал и повернулся лицом вперед. В тот момент они приближались ко мне. Я улетал, поэтому знаю,
アクエリアス、ヒュースト
Roger. Parcours intermédiaire numéro 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, tangage et lacet NA, 150 29 5453, moins 00048, plus tous les zéro
了解。受信状態はだいぶ良くなりました、ウォーリー。非常に良好です。燃料は62～62パーセント、酸素は62～95パーセント、アンペアは25です。すべてのシステムは正常に動作しています。少し不安定な動作がありました。夜側でケージを掛けたり外したりしてみましたが、少し前にロー
Vuoi che l'interruttore del mio computer sia su ON e che l'aria condizion
Ok, Jack. Non vogliamo ch
Roger. Voici le compte rendu du panneau: les fusibles du panneau de gauche sont tou
Okay. Das stimmt, Jack. Gehen wir zu Seite 1-10. Und zu Panel 2
Wir wissen, dass zahlreiche Wissenschaftler aus verschiedenen Ländern die Mondproben begutachten, und wir dachten, Sie wären daran interessi
روجر. جهد البطارية: الرئيسية 24، رقم واحد 25، رقم اثنين 25، رقم ثلاثة 25. الاحتياطية الأولى 25
OK, Buzz. Dernière entrée: il y a une faute de frappe sous le « trois » dans la ligne « contrôle d'attitude à trois axes ». Si vous allez à droite à +05, vous v
迈克，
알겠습니다. 그리고 최대 이득 각도는 피치
يا أهل هيوستن، هل تقرؤون ب
Well, it was a hi
Фред, я просто хотел заранее предупредить тебя, что мы приближаемся к критической отметке уровня CO2 во вторичном баллоне, и ожидаем, что это произойдёт примерно через полчаса, после чего мы попросим тебя переключиться на баллоны командного модуля. Остальная часть процедуры у меня готова, и я просто хотел немного предупредить тебя заранее. Конец свя
Okay, Jim. I didn't copy your second t
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 약 155도 30분
罗杰。我们现在正在调整位置，准备架设电视。比尔已经把它架在弗兰克左侧的会合窗口了，我则在比尔的位置，透过右侧的会合窗口往外看，现在地球正穿过
太陽は
Roger. Das klingt nach einer sehr guten Idee. Sie h
알겠습니다, 밴스. 공이 위로 올라가 있으면 바늘을 조종하기가 훨씬 쉽죠. 그러면 58g 정도의 드리프트 기동이 가능해집니다. 수동으로 조종할 
了解しました。そして左手、つまり北の方角には、西インド諸島周辺の明るい海域が見え、フロリダも見えます。ビルの単眼鏡を覗いてみると、南アメリカ、そしてアメリカ合衆国の中央部と南部といった様々な陸
كان بالتأكيد أسفل مني. كنت أتابعه أسفل مني منذ كارنارفون تق
L'ASCS funziona c
Хорошо. Меня прервали на минутку. Боб Хоуп снова во Вьетнаме со своими войсками, как обычно, отлично справляется со своей работой. В новостях упоминается одно имя, связанное с линкором USS New Jersey. Вчера — или в среду — Боб Хоуп, стоя на вершине огромной орудийной башни, пошутил, чтобы порадовать 1500 человек на борту линкора New Jersey в его 20-ю годовщину, когда он развлекал американские войска за границей. Хоуп и его отряд из 27 человек развлекали моряков New Jersey после посещения рождественской мессы на борту авианосца Hancock, оба корабля находятся у бер
我们现
알겠습니다. BAT Baker 충전 절차는 다음과 같습니다. 패널 3: BAT CHARGE, OFF; 패
حسنًا، لنرى إن كنتُ قد فهمتُ الأمر. الخطوة الثانية هي: "إيقاف تشغيل مُزدوج ال
ヒューストン、了解。イーグル号はトランクウィ
去吧，海
はっきりと聞こえました。機首のアンテナに戻り
Un attimo, Gus, sto cercando di riporre questo tubo d
Хорошо, Майк. Мы попросили вас отсоединить желтый разъем от преобразователя сигнала и убедиться, что он в порядке, затем снова подключить его и, если возможно, проверить два электрода, расположенных по обе стороны от нижней части грудно
हेलो, मुचेआ कैप कॉम। ऑरोरा सेवन। आवाज़ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही ह
سيجما
У нас на приборе номер 2 показание 3050, а на приборе номер 1 -3000, и в итоге он опускается до 2990. Так что я не уверен, что это действительно указывает на то, что показания не превыси
रॉजर। और क्
收到。我把
알겠습니다. 그게 바로 따라잡
سآخذ ق
Roger. This is Friendship Seven, controlling manually on fly-by-wire, having no trouble controlling. Very smooth and easy; controls very nicely. Fuses are still the same on the left panel. Squib is, Squib is armed. Auto Retrojettison is off. is fly-by-wire, auto, gyro normal. All fuel, all "T" handles are in, Retro Delay is normal. I have beautiful view out the window of the coast at present time. Just departing. Can see the, way down across Florida. Ca
どう
रॉजर। यह तस्वीर फिर से केंद्र से हट रही है। अगर आप इसे वापस लाने के लिए एक और सुधार कर सकें। मैं आपको दिशा तो नहीं बता सकता, लेकिन आप सही दिशा में जा रहे हैं, आप 
Maintenant,
Jim, per quanto riguarda la finestra 5, ho un disegno qui; e, quando si è attraccati, si ha un angolo di circa 60 gradi tra gli assi Z delle due navicelle. Sembra che guardando fuori dalla finestra 5, si guardi il radar di rendezvous in cima, che, se si inclinasse, offrirebbe più o meno una visuale del modulo di servizio. 
Okay, 1 plu
C'è il vecchio Corona Australis, che si presenta magnificamente, e abbiamo Nunki. Abbiamo Kaus Australis, e Nunki è proprio sulla traiettoria di volo giusta. Leggo 0 imbardata, 5 gradi di rollio a sinistra, in retroassetto. Mi piacerebbe proprio sapere perché è così complicato. E sopra quei ragazzi dovrei prendere un altro brillante. Deve essere, deve essere Altair. Molt
了解。どう
I'm unable to run any more t
Pensi che dormiamo troppo? Non facciamo altro che do
Nun ja, s
Ok, Joe. Lascia che te lo restituisca e veda se l'ho trovato qui. Dopo, durante il nostro... vuoi che usiamo e osserviamo la cometa di Bennett attraverso il sestante; nota un angolo di rollio se riusciamo a trovarlo visibile. Sarebbe visibile da qualche parte
Nous avons maintenant un horizon
阿
友谊
Roger, Jim. Das ist Manöver Nummer 5 im Mittelkurs, und es ist ein /, un
シグマ・セブ
알
حسنًا. بقية هذه ال
마이크, 나머지 사람들이 잠들기 전에 내 상황을 알려줄게
收到。我们现在建议采用以下姿态：横滚 307.0，俯仰 354.0，偏航 019.5，液氧排放已经启用，所以我
11, Houston. Con un cavo da 3
에드는 괜찮아요. 그럼 
حسنًا. لديّ هنا
À 00:43:02, je
カミソリはここに入っているし、それを引き抜いたときにはシェ
小さいの。
ああ、確かに見
حسناً يا جاك. 
很好。5小时休息周期中，有4小时质量很
Und das können Sie von Ihrem jetzigen S
了解しました。大体のところはわかりました。今必要なのは最初のものです。それを、アメリカ大陸の上のHeight-Adjustに読み上
彼女は今
罗杰。后方速度为每秒 2
わかった、バズ、探してくるよ。これを持って
ठीक है। सबसे ज़रूरी बात यह है कि फ़्लाइट प्लान के अनुसार CDR को आराम करना चाहिए। दूसरी बात, आपके बर्न का संक्षिप्त विवरण। आपके सभी सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहे हैं। ट्रैजेक्टरी से पता चलता है कि आपके पास 69.67 मील के मोड वाला CPA है और पेरीसिंथियन का समय है। आपने एक अच्छे फ़्री रिटर्न पर कैप्चर किया है। कॉरिडोर कंट्रोल के लिए ट्रैजेक्टरी का पूरी तरह से मूल्यांकन करना अभी थोड़ा जल्दी है। आपको प्लस 11 ब्लॉक डेटा का कोई अपडेट नहीं मिलेगा। कर्व्स को देखने के बाद, ऐसा लगता है कि 0.2 से 0.3 वोल्ट पर बैटरी-वेंट प्रेशर वास्तव में शून्य है, इसलिए हम आ
31700, NA, NA,, माइनस 00050, प्लस सभी शून्य, प्लस 00001
我们可以挪动——我们
ए
रॉजर। हमने आपके सिस्टम के प्लेबैक डेटा की जाँच की है, और सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है। विशेष रूप से, यह ठीक लग रहा है। हालाँकि, मैं आपको याद दिलाना चाहूँगा कि बैंक A के केवल बॉल वाल्व पर यह बर्न करने का अनुरोध है, और आप इसके लिए तैयार हैं। साथ ही, वर्
ठीक है। धन्य
Friendship Seven, California Cap Com. Abbiamo ampliato il tuo raggio d'a
Okay. I think we weren't too clever in our gro
Und falls Sie Lust haben, etwas abzuschreiben, habe ich – Sie werden es glauben – ein paar Änderungen an Ihrer Checkliste für die Anmeldung, die ich Ihnen ge
Ok. L'equipaggio si lamenta di alcu
120
好
Roger, Frank, concernant ce réservoir d'hélium dans le quadrant A, il semble que nous vous ayons inquiétés inutilement à ce sujet. Apparemment, il n'y a pas de problème
Ich muss erst auf die andere Se
Okay. Pe
はい、大丈夫です。了解です。システムチェックリストに関して、もう1つコメントがあります。スタンバイ1で、これで終了です。ああ、新しい項目が入りましたよ、ジャック。上昇水に切り替える必要が
هيوستن، أبولو 11. هل يمكنك التأكد من إيقاف تشغيل محرك جيمبال الميل رقم 1؟ لقد أوقفنا تشغيل المحركات الأربعة جميعها، وحصلنا على إشارة غير واضحة عل
You might get it coming sideways here; stand by in case it does. 
वॉली, मैंने तुम्हें बीच में ही रोक दिया। मुझे अपने इन्वर्टर पर पानी के वाल्व की
Okay. Wir beginnen mit der K
Mais j'ai envie de sortir et de prendre de belles photos. 
यहां सब कुछ तैयार है। क्या आप केप को बता देंगे कि सब कुछ मेरे नियंत्रण में है। हम यहां पूरी तरह से तैयार ह
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। यह कैनरी कैपकॉम है। रक्तचाप की जाँच दोबारा करें, रक्तचाप की जाँच दोबारा करे
I
अपोलो 8, अपो
Ich frage mich, wo wir bei 1:34 sein werden. Oh, ich weiß! Es ist auf der – auf der – wir werden bei diesem Pass 
Роджер. Свет работает нормально. Точное расстояние определить не могу, думаю, примерно полмили. Ускоритель начал вращаться сразу после отрыва от него. Я попытался снизить скорость вращения, и мне это удалось до четверти градуса в секунду, но как только мы оторвались, я подошел поближе и увидел, 
Okay. Hier spricht Ihr freundlicher COMM-Do-it-yourself-Kit mit einer empfohlenen Vorgehensweise im Fall von Lithiumhydroxid. Es sieht gut aus. Wir haben 1,8 Millimeter abgelesen, und Sie haben ausreichend Flüssigkeit für den Rest des Fluges. Sicherheitshalber möchten wir jedoch einen weiteren Satz Kommandomodul-Kanister verwenden, um mögliche Probleme mit dem Hauptkanister zu vermeiden. Ich
안녕하세요, 과이마스 통신 기술팀입니다. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. HF 신호 잘 수신됩니다. 
알겠습니다. 제 제어 모드는 수동입니다. 자이로스코프는 작동 중지되었고, 기동은 꺼져 있
わかりました。私たちは、姿勢保持の修正を行わないように、最小インパルスモードで実行する必要があるという指示があります。姿勢の変動を追跡するのですが、これは6時間程度、あるいは制限に達す
Okay. Die Zapfenkal
أبول
Right. The - At these low Sun angles, there's no trace of brown, it's now 
收到。是
Aquarius, something we're thinking about right now is, if we can do it without using a lot of , it would be to 
हम आपकी तस्व
Wir bestätigen d
了解しました。廃水処理場からの干渉が解消され、プラットフォームの位置合わせ航法などのための星観測が適切に行えるようになるまでには、約1時間かかると想定して作業を進めてきました。もしお時間があれば、
実は、あまりうまくいってないんです。というのも、残念ながらラジオを消す方法がなくて。だからこうやって話している間、エドは私たち二人の声が聞こえてしまうんです。彼は音量を下げているとはいえ
Ok. Volevo solo che ne foste consapevoli e che ci pensaste e che ci rifletteste sulle possibili implicazioni per il piano di volo. Poi vi mostrerò questo grandangolo e il commento sulla Luna e vedrò quali sezioni ritengono più appropriate. Ok. Sulla pergamena, Frank voleva che verificassimo l'ordine in cui poteva aspettarsi di vedere il profilo di ingresso, e il primo profilo che appare è etichettato "Nonexit Numero 2" e si tratta dell'ingresso a corto raggio e ad alta velocità. Il secondo profilo che apparirà è intitolato "The 3500 Mile" che è anche un ingresso ad alta velocità, ma è quello che usereste nel caso in cui dovessimo raggiungere distanze di ingresso più lunghe. Poi il terzo profilo sarà "Nonexit Entry Numero 1", seguito da un quarto da 3500 miglia. Quindi avete quattro profili di ingresso. I numeri 1 e 3, man mano che li incontrate, sono i brevi raggi, mentre i numeri 2 e 4 sono i raggi a lungo raggio. Per quanto riguarda il coldsoak, credo che abbiamo parlato di cosa faremo lì, ma da qualche parte entro un'ora circa, vorremo entrare nel vivo della questione. Di certo non vogliamo farlo a mezzanotte. Parlando con gli addetti alla traiettoria - cosa ne pensano dell'ebollizione dell'acqua - una cosa da tenere a mente è il fatto che vedono i tuoi scarichi d'acqua e l'acqua che bolle sul tuo grafico della traiettoria. Sembra che sia una funzione del loro schema di calc
好的，很好。所有2型都转
友谊七号，这里是科德角通信技术学院，科
Ja,
另一则本地新闻：亨茨维尔县法院大楼昨天黎明前被烧毁，看来他们又要在那里开工建设了。接下来是一些关于等待返程的家庭的报道。这篇报道由《邮报》记者安·詹姆斯撰写。“我们就像在月球背面休息一样，”瓦莱丽·安德斯在圣诞夜说道，当时她和家人正在等待阿波罗8号脱离月球轨道，返回地球。安德斯太太周二凌晨0点就到了，邻居们刚刚把孩子们都接走，这样在飞船飞到月球背面、与外界失去联系期间，他们一家人就可以休息一下。弗兰克·博尔曼上校的家在户外装饰着四个巨大的常青花环，上面撒满了粉状的雪花，还系着红色的蝴蝶结。书房里的一棵圣诞树正等待着他平安归来，他漂亮的金色头发的妻子苏和两个健壮的儿子弗雷德里克和埃德温计划留在家里，等待午夜时分飞船脱离月球轨道。通常情况下，他们会
Guten Morgen, Ho
استكمالاً لما كنتُ أُقدّمه من معلومات حول الصاروخ المُعزِّز، في بداية الرحلة. بعد دخولنا الظلام، على مسافة تُقدّر بـ 1200 قدم، حاولتُ الحفاظ على موقعي بالنسبة له، لكنّني لم أكن أملك سوى المسافة بين الأضواء الوامضة لتقدير المسافة بيني وبين الصاروخ في ذلك الوقت. كنتُ أرى ضوءًا واحدًا، ثم ضوءين، ثم ضوءًا واحدًا، وأحيانًا أخرى، كان يمرّ وقت طويل قبل أن أرى ضوءين، مما يُشير إلى أن الصاروخ كان يدور باستمرار. لم يكن لديّ فكرة واضحة عن اتجاه دورانه. بناءً على المسافة بين الأضواء، عندما كنتُ أراها بوضوح، شعرتُ أنني في وضع جيد بالنسبة له حتى وصلنا إلى كارنارفون تقريبًا. في 
Это подтверждает
Yaw 的回答很好。Roll 的回答也很好。她转身转
正解です。次のス
रॉजर. 1, /: 62844 माइनस 16
이해했습니다 - 방금 간신히 알아들었지만, 계속 진행하겠습니다. UHF/DF 스위치가 R/T 위치에 있는지 확
AB 03 47 34; Delta-V, 61,6; Delta-T, 01 + 22; Gierwinkel null, Nickwinkel 23 Grad nach unten; Kern 25, 00567; Kern 26, 
알겠습니다. 7시 15분부터 11시 15분까지 조종사가
روجر. مع هذه الرؤية الجيدة والاتصالات الممتازة، سنكتفي بوصف شفهي دون رؤية التلسكوب الماسح الآن. كانت زوايا المناورة نحو نجم السماك الرامح جيدة جدًا. لقد وضعتُ السماك الرامح في مركز التلسكوب الماسح. عند هذه الزاوية الشمسية، يوجد شعاع ضوئي يمر مباشرةً عبر مركز التلسكوب، بالإضافة إلى حزمة ضوئية. هذا يمنع رؤية العديد من النجوم المحيطة بنا، وعلى الرغم من أنني أبقيتُ عيني مثبتة على التلسكوب لبعض الوقت، إلا أنه من الصعب جدًا رؤية أي أنماط نجمية أو أي شيء آخر. لم أكن لأتمكن من تمييز ذلك مع السماك الرامح لولا أن العدسات هي التي قادتني إليه. الآن، ولأنني قريب من الصفر في كل من الشعاع والمحور، ألاحظ حركة كبيرة لل
روجر. ستتلقى أيضًا تحديثًا صو
Roger. Ich hab dich verstanden. 
نعم، هنا
अच्छा, तो। मु
Finalmente abbiamo risolto il problema della temperatura del circuito della tuta. Capisco perché Scott fosse preoccupato solo per questa posizione record. Non c'è nemmeno un tono laterale. La temperatura della tuta in questo momento è - MARK.T - di 68 gradi e mi sento benissimo. La cupola della tuta è di nuovo a circa 72 gradi. A q
A와 B는 해
**
في دائرة التبريد الثانوية، يبدو أن صمام الضغط العكسي مفتوح قليلاً. أنصحك بإعادة ضبط مفتاح نظام تبخير الوقود (EVAP) في
ठीक है। मैंने बैटरी चार्ज, वेंट वाल्व, फ्यूल सेल पर्ज की जाँच कर ली है, और फिर 55 घंटे पर रुक जाइए। उस समय आपका रोल एटीट्यूड 285 डिग्री होगा
Roger. Status report. I have sent you a blood. All systems are green, but for suit circuit, which
ठीक है, चार्ली। मैं वहाँ हूँ, और मेरे पास ट्रनियन कोण 30.5 डिग्री है। फिर से, रोल में काफी गलत संरेखण है और मु
Rollwinkel null, Nickwinkel 
حسنًا. لقد استلمنا مضختك قيد التشغيل. GET B 03:19؛ دلتا-في، 0.8؛ زمن 
حسنًا. نافذة التهوية واضحة. قم بإزالة غطاء
好的，比尔。这会写在你的飞行计划第2-22页。对于指令舱驾驶员——我已经跟他提过了——在页面顶部，大约在……的位置，我们希望他进行一次对准，然后按计划完成。这四颗星是南河三、轩辕十四和天象座α星，我们意识到天象座α星可能不太好找，轩辕十四在地平线以上大约3度，角宿一的倾斜角度是48度；所以我想说的是，如果吉姆觉得对这四颗星分别进行一次对准有困难，我们建议他跳过有困难的那颗星，然后用两组对准他喜欢
Roger. We'd like you to pick up the - out of the flight data fil
Колумбия, Хьюстон. У меня для вас есть новост
Roger, Jim. Das ist 
Roger. Pourriez-
Ok. I
Yes. That's what I see. (First night si
Roger, Jim. Pause, Jack, wir möchten, dass du in der aktuellen Totzone bleibst. Wir nehmen die Änderung vor, sobald die Fernsehsendung vorbei ist. Außerdem möchten wir dich bitten, deine Nick- und Gierwinkelwerte auf deinem Hochvers
우리는 지금 폐기물 탱크 위치에 있으며, U
11 40 41，即启示录 8；东经 19.8 度；赤经
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 지금까지
Roger. Backup gestartet und läuft gut. Ich melde mich in 30 Sekunden. Ah, sie fähr
Роджер. Дружба Семь. Острота зрения по-прежнему хорошая. Могу читать те же стро
Jim, notre plan actuel est de ne pas corriger les données. On va accepter ce qu'on obtient et faire avec. On pourrait mieux suivre la situation si, lors de votre passage près de la Terre et du centre de la Lune, vous pouviez mes
Roger. D-8 Experiment, Prüfung Nr. 1. Start bei 57. Prüfung Nr. 2. Start bei 01:30. Punkt 4, Rev 50, aufsteig
Ich hoffe, dass alle Beteiligten das Ganze sehr sorgfältig geprüft haben. Wir wollen ein einwandfreies Raumschiff, bevor wir den Zündvorgang in Betracht ziehe
わか
알겠습니다. 입
ハッチと手すりが全部
Okay,
Колумбия, Колумбия
Ich sehe, wie sich Dinge lösen, aber ich kann sie nicht genau erkennen. Da sind wir bei 0,05, grün. Ich lasse die Steuerung jetzt laufen. Rate Command, Aux-Dämpfung. Und ich habe eine Rollrate gestartet. Eine leichte Nickrate, gar nicht schlecht. Aus irgendeinem seltsamen Grund kann ich endlich aus de
Qui è Sigma Seven. In HF. Qui è Sigma Seven. In HF. Un breve conteggio a. Questo serve per verificare la copertura HF sul World Wide Range. La durata della trasmissione è di 60 secondi. Vorrei sapere cos'altro potrei dire per perdere tempo. Se respiro abbastanza forte, questo potrebbe aiutare. La capsu
It's very interesting to remark that my attitude--and the--is roughly pitchup plus 30 [degrees], roll right 130 [degrees], and yaw left 20 [degrees]. The balloon at this time is moving right along with me. It's keeping a constant bearing at all times. There is the horizon band again; this time from the moonlit side. Let me see, with the 
わかりました。あり
ठीक है। और एक और बदलाव यह है कि इसके त
또한, 귀하의 DL과 MAX 및 MIN은 각각 22,400과 18,000 이상일 것이라고 
Когда я был на улице, я заметил на окне Джима какое-то покрытие снаружи. Однажды, когда я задел его плечом или рукой, оно размазалось по всей поверхности, и верхняя часть лобового стекла оказалась испачкана так, что он ничего не видел. Если посмотреть с этой стороны, видно, что оно довольно сильно пок
Je ne sais pas si tu peux
أظن أن التلسكوب عديم الفائدة على الأرجح، ولكن يمكنك التمييز في السدس بين قطرات الماء والنجوم من خلال الفرق ف
Верно; исходя из текущих показателей, именно такой прогноз они и делают, так что можете смело пить воду. Ника
Ok, Joe. Ho un'altra domanda. Se riusciamo ad anticipare un po' l'accensione completa del modulo di comando dopo aver sganciato il modulo di servizio, vorrei passare in assetto JETT in anticipo, assicurarmi di sistemare quella parte e aspettare un po' prima del JETT di un'ora. Ora, useremo
断断续续地进行
자, 휴스턴, 
Okay, als ich vorhin oben war, bemerkte ich etwas, das wie eine neue Entlüftung auss
分かりました、よくできました！コミュニケーションは良好です
자, 이제 그 시간이 어떻게 될지 알고 싶습
Wie wäre es mit eine
はい。1～8ペ
Роджер. Здесь всё в порядке. У нас есть достоверная инф
روجر. نحن نطير، وكنت أتساءل لماذا يخرج عن ن
了解。フレンドシップ・セブン。カプセル内のシステムは全て作動中だ。カプセルの周囲には、まだ時折小さな粒子が飛んできているのが見える。昼側でも暗い空を背景に見えている
분명 그
Aurora Seven. Kano Cap Com ti legge forte
Columbia, Houston. I have a new weight for you whenever
روجر. ا
Okay, Houston. We're in DOWN VOICE BACKUP 
了解しました。ジム、燃料が少し残っているので、フライトプランで調整することにしました。これから8時間はホライゾン・スキャン・モードに切り替えてください。高度は30
Роджер. И следующий пункт: скорость подъема сверхкритического гелия номинальная, и вы также задавали нам вопрос о работе ваших двигателей во время последнего запуска. Полагаю, теперь мы это понимаем, поскольку вы сообщили, что ваш тангаж был в режиме ускорения, а рыскание и крен — в режиме скорости. Вы включали двигатели тангажа. Это совместит скорости с осями рыскания и крена, и в тот момент вы удерживали мертвую зону всего в полградуса, а совме
괜찮아요. 방금 저와 함께 여기 위에서 뭔가를 봤는데, 좋은 사진을 찍으려고 가까이 다가가는 순간 햇빛 때문에 놓쳐버렸어
That horizon is right where they said it wou
아니요. 캐리어가 떨어지자마자, 그쪽 방향으로 표류하다가 거기에 머물렀습니다. 그러다가 다시 올라왔을 때는 한동안 주변을 맴돌았지만 더 이상 벗어나지는 않았습니다. 그러다가 서서히 지금 위치의 각도로 들어왔고, 그 후 신호 강도가
需要说明的是，即使由于某种原因，我们时间不够或者其他什么原因没能完成“日月”挑战，杰克也会有一个平台粗略地连接到入口，我们觉
حسنًا يا جيم. نقوم بنسخ 
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह ज़ांज़ीबार कैप कॉम है। एरिया 2 डेल्टा के 
Ciao Jim. Jim, qui è Houston. Ciao, Gemini 4, Houston CAP
Donnez-moi des instructions sur le moment où prendre la
F
좋습니다. 유도 제어(GUIDANCE CONTROL)에서 연소를 진행하겠습니다. 그리고 모드 제어(MODE CONTROL)에서 자세 유지(ATTITUDE HOLD)로 전환합니다. 자세 제어 스위치는 롤(ROLL)에서 펄스(PULSE), 피치(PITCH)에서 펄스(PULSE), 요(YAW)에서 모드 제어(MODE CONTROL)로 설정됩니다. 따라서 는 요(yaw)를 제어하고, 는 피
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نود تمديد فترة التخميد لخ
Bien reçu. En attente, je vous ferai un compte rendu. Je suis en orbite pour votre suivi. Voici le compte rendu: tous les fusibles sont en position 1, sauf celui de la tour de largage, en position 2. La rétroséquence d'urgence, le largage d'urgence et le parachute de secours sont en position centrale d'arrêt. Le dispositif anti-retour est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le système est normal (automatique et gyroscopique). Toutes les poignées en « T » sont en position « entrée ». Le délai de rétroséquence est normal. Les deux éclairages de cabine sont allumés. Les projecteurs photo sont toujours allumés. La télémétrie 
컬럼비아
Ja, die Anzugbänder stehen
لم أشعر بأي ارتباك على الإطلاق.
Tieni presente
好的。太平洋中部地区总体情况良好。预计云底高度2000英尺，云量分散，能见度10英里，风向70度，风速12英里/小时，浪高4英尺，气压2974英尺。日出时间为祖鲁时间10:00，黎明时间为祖鲁时间16:49。救援船将是约克城号；救援飞机将是1号和2号空中指挥机，以及1号、2号和3号回收机。预计到达救援船的时间是——约克城号已到达目标点，空中指挥机将在15分钟内到达，并由现场指挥官指挥。1号、2号和3号回收机是SH3阿尔法型飞机，它们与约克城号一同前往，因此也已到达目标点。所有飞机上都配备了游泳救援人员。如果回收飞机没有收到航天器的消息；他们会先让游泳者下水，如果你身体状况良好并给他们打个
Nun, wenn ich das Ding nicht mehr brauche, wird es das wohl verstauen. Gehören die Systeme morge
罗杰，弗兰克。北纬7度38分，西经165度的着陆区，云量显示云底高度2000英尺（约610米），云底高度12000英尺（约360米），云顶高度10英尺（约31米）；风向东，风速12节，涌浪4英尺（约1.2米），气温约82华氏度（约28摄氏度）。该区域约10%至30%的范围内会有阵雨，云底高度约2000英尺（约610米）。如果该
Gemini 4, this is Houston CAP COM. We're concerned about your O2 
了解しました。現在、真空近地点高度は23.6度、飛行経路角はマイナス6.25度です。もしこれを調整すれば、中間速度は秒速
रॉजर। हम दिखा रहे हैं कि फ्यूल सेल 2 का रेडिएशन आउट तापमान लगभग 90 डिग्री होगा, और 1 और 3 का तापमान थोड़ा कम होगा - शायद 75 या 80 डिग्री। लगभग एक घंटे पहले आपने 
Okay. One more note on the water, Jack. If you don't bleed the pressure off when you - don't take enough water to bleed the pressure off c
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 곧 골드스톤으로 인계할 예정인데, 다운링크는 
Итак, начнем с пункта «Маневрирование для съемки поля загрязнения» и вычеркнем все пункты вплоть до «Включить двигатели A3, C4
Ok, Jack. 
저기, 마지막 별의 값을 변경하셨는지 확인하고 싶습니다. 변경되지 않은 것 같습니
알겠습니다. V
انفصلت حل
ジム、機動を続行す
Roger.
Lors de nos tests de pression de la batterie, nous avons constaté qu'à l'ouv
Хьюстон, 
켄, 혹시
धन्यवाद। ग्रीन 
はい、ジム。つまり、アンテナの切り替えはあなたにお任せします。アンテナを切り替えた後、再びロックオンを確立するまで3～5分かかります。その後、音声チェックを開始します。それ
حسناً. لا بأس. شكراً
रॉजर, राहत क्षेत्र में मौसम की जानकारी इस प्रकार है: 0.5 बादल छाए हुए हैं, दृश्यता 10 मील है, हवा की गति 3 नॉट है और यह उत्तर दिशा से 360 डिग्री की दिशा में चल रही है। समुद
Ricevuto. 2 manovre, /: 46728, meno 053, più 121 più 28466 meno 00352. Non ho ottenuto il 502406 per 
Сейчас он то переходит в режим ориентации, то выходит из него, расходуя топливо из-за рыскания. Возможно, мне придётся его повернуть, я не знаю. Хотя, похоже, сейч
ولا، لا، أنا متأكد من ذل
Отме
D'accord. Je suis en mode de contrôle automatique rétro. – Les gyroscopes sont disponi
Хорошо. Честно говоря, я думаю, нам следует дать вам более подробное описание процедуры; и, в общем, это те материалы, 
Pour information, Vance, il y a environ une demi-heure, Jack et moi ne pouvions pas observer les constellations ni les étoiles depuis certaines positions du vaisseau spatial. Nous pouvions distinguer le Scorpion et le Sagittaire, ainsi qu'Alt
...の
罗杰。请你让巴兹检查一下他的生物医学TM传感器，看看有没有松动
Okay. Jetzt haben wir etwas besseres Signal. Ich möchte bestätigen, dass die Lukenklemmen an der Seitenluke entweder auf den Rutschen oder im Wasser entfernt werden, je nachdem, wo Sie hinkommen.
حسناً. تتصل بهم؛ أنت تعرف رمز النداء الخاص ب
Под
我们得开始考虑怎么让……重新入睡了，因为——我知道——我
हम यह विश्लेषण करना चाहें
वे चाहते हैं कि आ
Et, 
Хорошо. Вот в чем суть. Ваше положение в пространстве выглядит довольно неплохо, за исключением крена, и мы хотели бы, чтобы вы сделали следующее. В режиме MIN impulse мы хотели бы, чтобы вы установили триммер на нулевой тангаж, что примерно соответствует вашему текущему положению; на 0,08 градуса по крену, что примерно на 16 градусов отличается от вашего текущего положения по крену; и на нулевой рыскание, что примерно соответствует вашему текущему положению. Затем мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили выравнивание по осям корпуса 400 + 5, 400 + 0. Установите PITCH и ROLL 
Okay.
Things are looking re
Negative. At this time, we do not have any updates for the lunar surface book. We wanted you to have it just in case. Ove
Das ist sehr interessant. Es ist eine sehr weiche Oberfläche, aber hier und da, wo ich den Probennehmer ansetze,
세타 11.8, 범위 68.90, 델타-V 총합 232, 델타-VI 101.1, 데이터 포인트 05:40. 데이터 12.5 세타, 범위 63.75, 델타-V 총합 199, 델타-VI 84.2. 데이터 포인트 40:... 세타 13.5, 범위 61.19, 
حسنًا. لا يزال إعصار بيبي بعيدًا عن فورموزا. ستصل الساعة 6 صباحًا. تشير توقعات الأرصاد الجوية إلى وجود إعصار جديد الساعة 13 ظهرًا بتوقيت غرينتش.
ठीक है, फ्रेड। और अब आपकी आवाज़ यहाँ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है। ठीक है। हम आपके लिए एक प्रक्रिया तैयार कर रहे हैं जिसके तहत लगभग 74 घंटे या लगभग 3 घंटे बाद सूर्य की जाँच की जाएगी। यह डिटेंट 2 होगा; हम जल्द ही एक विस्तृत प्रक्रिया उपलब्ध कराएंगे जिसमें रडार के पुनर्निर्धारण और स्थिति में बदलाव शामिल होगा। हमारा मानना ​​है कि यदि जाँच 1 डिग्री के भीतर सही रहती है, तो आपका प्लेटफ़ॉर्म बिना किसी अतिरिक्त प्रयास के बर्न के लिए तैयार रहेगा। यदि यह 1 डिग्री के भीतर नहीं है, तो हम प्लेटफ़ॉर्म को संरेखित करने के लिए पृथ्वी/सूर्य संरेखण प्रक्रिया तैयार कर रहे हैं, और हम इसे आपको बाद में उपलब्ध कराएंगे। ठीक है। मान लीजिए कि सूर्य की जाँच सही है, तो हम आपको अंधे
Okay, on comparing the flight of 13 to Apollo 8, lift-off was about the same amount of vibration as I noticed on 8, but at the beginning of the flight, there was less of the sideways motion than we experienced on Apollo 8. The S-IC separation felt more violent on 13 than it did on 8, maybe that's because I was in a different seat, I don't know. But there was about three sharp transients of the cut-off and a couple of big bangs where we were thrown backwards longitudinally on our straps before the S-II went off. A
Das ist bestätigt, und ich konn
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン、1分です。軌道と誘導は良好で、ス
Houston, geben Sie uns einfach den Zeitpunkt, wann wir damit beginnen 
C'est exact. J'ai ajusté l'optique pour pouvoir pointer la lune dans le sextant, e
Роджер. Перед вами наш DELTA-R DELTA-V. Похоже, DELTA-R довольно большой. Мы хотели бы обсудить его с вами, прежде
جيميني
알겠습니다. 15시 44분 55초에 Guaymas 인수가 
알겠습니다. 음성으로 업링크를 확인해 보겠습니다. TV 방송 내용은 골드스톤에서 약 10분 정도의 신호를 수신하여 휴스턴에 있는 저희가 
Columbia, Houston. Vi daremo un aggiornamento sullo stato del vettore più avanti. Al moment
상황이 좋아 보입니다, 프랭크. 방금 새로운 데이터가 추가되어 처리 중입니다. 초기 분석 결과, 두 번째 중간 점검은 필
Qui è Frie
Bene. Pronti a tornare al 275? Chiudete l'inter
Das Problem ist, egal wie vorsichtig man loslässt, man stößt es nur ganz leicht an und setzt es 
Ja, Jack. Ich hätte da eine Frage. Wie lange schätzen Sie, dass unsere Kommandomodulbehält
Oui, cela ne me surprend pas
And in the figure, where
Okay. On my IVI's, I have 97 ft/sec forwa
Ricevuto. Copia tre pasti a testa, uno con 129 bevande da mezza oncia e uno con 1
Roger. Nur ein paar interessante Beobachtungen
Apollo 8, this is Houston. All systems are GO. We're evaluating the strip charts on your burn, and we'll give you a readout on that
六分儀について少しコメントしたいと思います。狭い宇宙船内での使用は、特にヘルメットをかぶっていると非常に困難です。最終的に、ヘルメットをかぶったまま、要求されている星々の角度を測ろうとするのは無駄だと判断しました。そこでヘルメットを外しました。これにより、六分儀の使用範囲は多少広がりましたが、それでも宇宙船を操作せずに観測できる角度は20～23度程度に限られていました。星々が窓の上部に隠れてしまうのです。宇宙船をより頻繁に、そして自由に操作すれば、窓の長軸が追跡面に入るように操作できます。しかし、燃料の制限があったため、このような操作は選択しませんでした。パルスモードも使用しましたが、操作はあまりしませんでした。この実験で選ばれた星々は、地平線からかなり離れた角度にあるため、観測が非常に困難でした。最終的に、星を地平線にもう少し近づけることにしました。お気づきだと思いますが、カノープスと他のいくつかの星で試しました。青いフィルターは地平線を完全に遮っているように見えました
نودّ معرفة خططكم
Sei imbattibile, Chris. Ho appena 
罗杰。明白了。区域 7-3 GET RC，10 04 47；RET 400K，22 加 02；RET RB，28 加 15；向左倾斜 50
OK. Temps restant: 32 heures et 00 minutes. Instructions à la fin de la manœuvre: adopter l’attitude suivante: roulis 101,0, tangage 090,0, lacet 000,0. Tangage maximal -23, lacet 93. Utiliser les procédures normales pour amortir les mouvements. Une fois le véhicule stabilisé et avant la mise en rotation, prendre des ph
In 
روجر، إيجل. إليك البيانات التالية: 101 36 14.07، ناقص 00758، زائد جميع الكرات، زائد 00098 زائد - ت
Okay. Verstanden. Können Sie –
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। आप इसे
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы остановились под правильным углом крена, а затем 
Balises automatiques. Les balises sont maintenant sous t
收到
روجر، أعتقد أن الدكتور مولر في طريقه للعودة من كيب كود
Jim, dans ce mode de contrôle, ça semble être la meilleure solution. Il te suffit d'activer le maintien d'attitude. Avant de commencer à manœuvrer, tu devras donc monter le volant et entrer 400 + 0, puis le pilote réagira en lacet lorsque tu passeras en mode de contrôle. Autrement dit, le pilote contrôlera le lacet en mode de contrôle, tandis que le tangage et le roulis seront gérés en mode impulsion. Une fois l'attitude stabilisée, tu devras réaligner l'axe du fus
ठीक है, जिम। हम प्रक्रियाएँ
프레드, 급한 일은 아니지만, 지금 사람
रॉजर, 11. हमारे पास वह क्षमता नहीं है। अच्छे अंक प्राप्त करने के लिए हमें एम-लाइन का क्षितिज के समानांतर
Well, we want your recommendation on that, but I think we would just as soon, ourselves, terminate the TV. But if you have a commitment to keep, we'd be more than willing 
मैं उस आखिरी स्टेशन की पहचान नहीं कर सका जिसने हाई-फायर पर बात की थी। वह बहुत स्पष्ट रू
حسنًا. نحن الآن بصدد تسجيل بيانات BLOCK بالإضافة إلى
Хорошо, я немного п
انتقل إلى صفحة التفعيل لمدة 30 دقيقة في 
ठीक है। जब आप सभी को थोड़ा समय मि
好的。查理，我想问一下，在我们
Apollo 11, Houston. Ci dispiace dirlo, ma vorremmo interrompere tutt
Canton Com Tech, Aurora Seven. Loud and 
Хорошо, но я не думаю, что это что-то изменит, главное, чтобы мы вернулись. Хорошо — платформа — скорость — компьютер для входа в атмосферу — команда скоро
Per quanto riguarda la finestra, Houston: le finestre 1
かつては、LOI 2 では制御不能であり、どのようなバーンや態度をとっても通常の態度より安全であると考えられていましたが、今では
はい
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आपक
Roger. As-
R
احصل على المزيد 
C'è una foto scattata nella parte posteriore destra della navicella, che mostra la gonna dello stadio di discesa, e mostra un notevole oscuramento del colore della superficie, con una quantità piuttosto minima di radiazioni, abrasioni o erosioni superficiali. Durante la discesa, entrambi abbiamo notato che potevamo vedere una grande quantità di particelle di polvere molto fini che si muovevano verso l'esterno. Era stato riferi
水瓶
You might check that for us but that seems to be a rather late c
Sag
Большое спасибо. Хорошо, я зачитаю эти значения. Время по Гринвичу, когда мы стартовали, было 17:16. Количество топлива — 60. Температура в кабине — 92. Температура скафандра — 58. Давление в кабине — 5,6. Уровень CO2 в скафандре — 3/4 миллиметра. Дополнительный левый кислородный баллон — 5100. Дополнительный правый кислородный баллон — 5050. Количество кислор
ठीक है। एजीसी का वोल्टेज स्तर घटकर उस स्तर पर आ गया जिसे हम नॉइज़ लेवल कहते हैं, यानी एजीसी पर मापा गया वोल्टेज स्तर 
赤い方はここまで出て、緑の方はもっと遠
Apollo 8, Ho
パネル 11 の回路ブレ
무중력 상태를 이용하면 학교에서 배운 여러 가지 개념을 쉽게 시연할 수 있습니다. 자이로스코프의 작동 원리를 간단하게 설명해 보겠습니다. 이 캔을 돌리면 운동 방정식에 따라 회전축이 이 방향을 향하게 되고, 회전하는 동안 손으로 캔을 밀어 특정 토크를 가하면 캔은 이 방향으로 회전할 것입니다. 운동 방정식에 따르면, 이 토크를 가하면 캔은 이 방
Roger, 
Das ist bestätigt. Okay, wir sind jetzt bei -5 + 05. Und, Jack, das Kommandomodul nutzt diese Daten nur zur Information. Hier wird eine Ausrichtung zur Erd-Terminator-Achse durchgeführt; zum Zeitpunkt 5 + 05 wird die Sonde freigegeben. Das wird auf d
Roger. Wir möchten Sie bitten, Ihr C-Band-Ba
この臍の緒にたどり着くには、少し前
Negative. We Would like to stay on the high gain if we can. 
Ja, das würde es. Man merkt gar nicht, wie kalt das Ding wird, wenn es langsamer fliegt. Ich habe gerade die Zyklen mit meinem... gemessen. Es sind jetzt etwa 11 bis 12 Minuten vergangen, und d
Хорошо. Фред видел, как кто-то выходи
11, Houston. Les prévisions actuelles indiquent des conditions acceptables dans votre zone de récupération: nuages ​​épars à 600 mètres d'altitude, vent du 070° à 13 nœuds, visibilité de 16 kilomètres et mer agitée (vagues d'environ 1,2 mètre). Les prévisions d'hier signalaient une tempête tropicale, Claudia, à environ 800 à 1 600 kilomètres à l'est d'Hawaï. Les images satellites prises hier après-midi montraient que Claudia se dissipait, ce qui semble indiquer que son impact est encore moindre qu'auparavant. Votre zone de récupération se situe désormais légèrement au nord de la zone de convergence intertropicale, que vous pouvez probablement apercevoir par vos fenêtres. Hier, une tempête tropicale, Viola, a également été signalée plus à l'ouest. Elle se trouve actuellement à environ 1 600 kilomètres à l'est des Philippines et se déplace vers le nord-ouest. La tempête tropicale Viola s'intensifie et devrait atteindre le stade de typhon d'ici une douzaine d'heures; cependant, elle se trouvera bien plus à l'ouest que votre zone de récupération. En fait, le terminateur du soleil levant n'a pas encore atteint Viola. Lorsqu'il apparaîtra dans quelques heures, vous pourrez probablement le distinguer assez facileme
オーロラセブン、キャプテン・コム。グローブボックスがきちんと閉まっているか確認してくれ
Я смотрю почти вертикально вниз. Думаю, можн
了解
روجر. نحن ننقل
अपोलो 8, ह
لا يوجد غطاء
Cer
Non hai un nuovo aggiornamento della ma
알겠습니다. 지금 진행 중인 순서가 이렇다는 걸 알려드리고 싶었어요. 네. 이 과정이 끝
우리
Roger. Und ich habe noch ein paar andere Dinge, Mike. Wir müssen jetzt den Ladevorgang von Batterie B beenden. Außerdem zieht das Wetter an unserem Ziellandepunkt wegen vereinzelter Gewitter auf. Wir wollen nicht in ein Gewitter geraten, deshalb verlegen wir den Zielpunkt nach vorne – Korrektur: nach hinten – auf 1500 Seemeilen, um die Aufwindkontrolle zu gewährleisten. Die neuen Koordinaten sind 13° 19' N, 16° 10' W. Das Wetter dort ist hervorragend. Wir haben vereinzelte Gewitter in 2000 und 8000 Fuß Höhe, 10 Meilen Sichtweite und 6 Fuß Wellengang. Die Hornet befindet sich in einer optimalen Position, um das Ziel zu errei
我现在开始从潜望镜里看到日出了。这是这次轨道飞行中，由于夜侧的原因，潜望镜里出现了第一束光。很明显，在夜侧进行逆向姿态调整时，潜望镜完全不起作用。我看到的第一束光几乎就在……。日出正迅速地透过潜望镜照射进来。我确实看到了约翰提到的那些发光物体，而且我可以敲掉一些。我明显感觉到它们像一片光斑，大小不一，从小到亮都有。潜望镜本身太刺眼了。我得把海图盖在上面，这样才能看清窗外。我随时可以进行逆向姿态调整，所以除了看着窗外，我别无他事可做。前提是宇航服电路运行正常。那张海图真是帮了大忙，可以遮住那该死的潜望镜。这些物体分布范围相当大。正如斯
Ну, име
تشغيل طاقة التحكم في المحول. طاقة الت
罗杰。我们同
RKV医療データパス1番をパイロット宛に、GMT02 17 43に発行。パイロットはデータ取得の3分前に体温プローブを口に含むように指示。また、回収エリア9-3から
Sie könnten Houston mitteilen, dass die Flüge S-5 und S-6 für uns abgeschlossen si
روجر. نحن - لا نرى
फिर, जब मैंने बोतल चलाई, और फिर, लगभग सब कुछ जो हुआ... जब से यह सब शुरू हुआ, मैं सीएमसी, ऑटो पर वापस चला गया,... मुझे परेशान कर रहा था। और लगभ
Ho scattato la foto S-5 appena ho avu
Okay. Ich glaube, ich habe das falsch verstanden. Ihr habt das VHF-Signal bis 20 km kopiert. Wir prüfen gerade die Downlink-Verbindung. Aber in jedem Fal
네, 레볼루션 16번
Houston, this is Eagle. Do you want us to 
짐, 저희는 당신이 원하는 대로 작업을 진행하시기를 권장하지만, VERB 49 상태를 유지하시고 데드밴드를 아직 좁히지 마세요. 그런 마음가짐을 갖추신 후에 스타 
了解。了
- - 공... 다시 - 좋아요. 지금 우리가 바라는 건 다음 단계의 마음가
ああ、ずれてる。そうだ、月は消えて
This migh
時間は分かりましたか？97年14月20日でした
Mir geht es 
La velocità di discesa sembra davvero buona. L'altitudine è quasi corret
Ich habe nicht alle diese Änderungen der Steuerungskonfigurationen auf die Checkliste gesetzt, aber genau das haben wir getan, wir haben MINIMUM IMPULSE angewen
Là-bas, à droite. Je crois que c'est le soleil qui brille dessus, ou quelque chose comme ça. Le soleil est-il de mon côté? Co
Apollo 8, 
मुझे ऐसा ही लगता है, केन। यह बैंड एम-लाइन के समानांतर है, और मुझे लगता है कि इसका संबंध ऑप्टिक्स के डिज़ाइन से है, जहाँ बाहर से ऑप्टिक्स का वह शाफ्ट या आयताकार प्रवेश द्वार है। सूर्य के इस विशेष कोण पर, यह ठीक बीच से गुजरता है। मैंने देखा कि पृथ्वी और सूर्य दोनों ही स
はい、11番です。こちらはヒューストンです
休斯
ठीक है, फ्रेड। आखिरी बात में तुम कुछ ज़्यादा ही कमज़ोर पड़ गए। मैं समझता हूँ कि तुम डिस्कनेक्ट कर रह
발사체 유도 시스템 모두 양호한 상태인 것으로 보입니다. 발사체 유도 차단 확률은 99% 이상으로 예상됩니다. 따라서 모든 것이 매우 잘 유지되고 있는 것 같습니다. 참고
11号，休
11, Houston. Stavo guardando il tuo serbatoio di azoto Bravo. Non p
아폴로
휴스턴, 저희는 지금 정렬 상태가 아닙니다. 무슨 이유로든 저희가 정렬
밴스 씨, 질문에 답하자면, 요(yaw)를 바로 0으로 맞추는 건 꽤 어렵습니다. 그래서 지금 요는 0을 향해 움직이고 있고
阿
Roger. Faremo qualsiasi sacrificio, purché continuino
Der Kraftstoffstand bet
I was supposed to lay-read tonight, and I couldn't q
夏威夷，这里是双子座六号。在赤经35度40分，我们得到以下数据：θ角6.4度；射程115.58；总速度变化量523；速度变化量24.8。数据图看起来完全正常。24:32 CC
ठीक है। चलिए इस टेप को बाहर की तरफ लपेटते
Nun, ich de
Affermativo. Hai capito bene, Jim, potresti accendere l'interruttore di lettura della quantità pe
待機して
Ok, 13. Qui Houston. Ci sembra che stiamo perdendo flusso di O2 attraverso la cella a combustibile 3. Quindi, vogliamo che chiudiate la valvola REAC sulla cella a combustibile 3. Sembra che le
제미니 4, 여기는 휴스
حسناً. عند فحص الحلقة الثانوية، عندما انتقلنا إلى وضع التدفق على المشعات الثانوية، انخفضت الكمية من 40 بالمائة إلى 36 في أول 10 ثوانٍ ثم استقرت عند 36 لبقية الـ 30 ثاني
Okay, Jim. Just as kind of a lead-in to this procedure that we're going to use for the mid-course to use and it's going to be a manual burn. The attitude will be controlled manually; the start/stop on the engine will be controlled manually. So we have a pretty good vector on you now, and it turns out you're coming in a little bit too shallow. So what that means is we're going to make our burn to come in a little more steeply, and we're going to be coming in around the dark side of the Earth. Therefore, to come in more steep, our thrust shoul
好了，杰克。你
Jim, bezüglich Ihrer zweiten Batterie vermuten wir, dass der Alarm e
わかりました。まず最初にやらなければならないのは、プラットフォームの平行度を06 50から07 10にすることです。SPCを積んだ
ठीक है। पृथक्करण से पहले द्वितीयक लूप को सक्रिय करने के संबंध में आपके मन में क्या विचार है? ऐसा
Apollo 11, Houston. Mike, wegen des Behälters: Wir hatten dich schon mal bei 133 gebeten, einen zu wec
好的。再往前大约10英尺，还有一块更大
Хорошо, Джим. В качестве вводной части к процедуре, которую мы будем использовать на среднем участке траектории, это будет ручное включение двигателя. Ориентация будет контролироваться вручную; запуск/остановка двигателя также будут контролироваться вручную. Итак, теперь у нас есть довольно точный вектор вашего движения, и оказывается, что вы заходите на посадку немного слишком пологой. Это означает, что мы будем включать двигатель, чтобы заходить на посадку 
一旦我们拿到IP地址，就会给你更
Bonjour Houston, ici Gemini VI pour les bulletins sur l'eau, la nourritu
Bien reçu. Avant que Bill ne fasse une sieste, nous aimerions qu'il nous fasse un compte rendu sur les trois membres d'
Okay, Jim. I didn't catch that suggestion on account of the backgro
嗯，我不知道。应该——让我想想，液氧转储应该早就开始了。我想
D'accord. Et lorsque vous arriverez à Power 6, vous devriez
روجر، أعطني مفتاح القراءة الخاص بك، قم
LMP 的容器位置 - LMP 的
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。AFT OMNIをお願いします。追跡を確立するため、約1分間通信が途絶えます。最新のデータによると、月への最接近は近地点60マ
A
Хорошо. Мне интересно, останется ли это лучшим
... рабо
روجر، هيوستن. أفهم أن الرقم
ठीक है। एक और बात, जिसके बारे में हम आपको थोड़ी और जानकारी देना चाहते हैं। जैसा कि हमने आपको बताया, एसेन्ट एसईपी एटीट्यूड समतल में था और जेट्ट एटीट्यूड एक सामान्य सर्विस मॉड्यूल एसईपी एटीट्यूड के समान होगा, यानी यह ऊपर की ओर, त्रिज्या वेक्टर से बाहर और 45 डिग्री दाईं ओर, समतल से बाहर दक्षिण की ओर होगा। हम सुझाव देते हैं कि जेट्ट से पहले, कॉन्फ़िगरेशन इस प्रकार हो कि ओवरहेड हैच बंद हो, वेंट वाल्व खुला हो, और हम टनल को दबावयुक्त रखते हुए जेट्ट
Okay, Fred. Ich empfehle dir, den BIOMED-Schalter auszuschalten. Wir hatten nie Probleme mit 
Напряжение всех батарей около 23,5 вольт или выше, амперметр почти стабильно показывает 20 ампер. Хотел
Сейчас я приближаюсь к горизонту, и вы м
И теперь у тебя должна быть высокая скорость передачи данных,
D'accord. Je ne pense pas que cela remette tout
Roger. Su quel cratere più a sud, tra quelli vecchi, c'è un piccolo cratere luminoso sul bordo meridionale. Un grafico lo collocherebbe leggermente a ovest di quel piccolo cra
Хорошо. Под всем этим на странице добавьте следующее. Вернитесь к отметке «Ввод, - ПОДГОТОВКА» - вернитесь к контрольному списку 
V
Et Houston, pendant que vous y réfléchissez, essayez de trouver une procédure permettant d'utiliser l'optique du module de commande avec un mode de pi
Roger. Il nostro primo punto di controllo è molto vicino al terminatore e, mentre l'ottica lo seguiva, ho avuto modo di osservare il sorgere del sole. E circa 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. اط
不，我没有；我当时并不知道时间已经过去
Хорош
لقد تلقيت للتو إشارة صاعدة سريعة جدًا عندما قمت بفصل مفتاح البيانات
좋아요. 괜찮네요. 제리, 크리스마스
क्या हमारा रवैया काफी अच्छा है? उम्मीद है ऐसा ही हो। हम इस खिड़की से बाह
오늘은 
روجر. أفهم أن الأشعة بدت أغمق قرب الطرف الخلفي باتجاه الشرق. أفهم يا باز أن هذا كان مظهر المادة التي كشفتها الأشعة، والتي بدت أغمق لمسافة قدمين أو ثلاث أقدام ممتدة لل
Right. Just wanted to verify - We had poor reception when I was talking to you bef
В качестве заключительного теста, когда у вас закончится отведенное
*** 片方の方向にバランスを失いそうになりますが、回復するのは非常に自然で簡単です *** そして、腕を動かしても、ジャック、 *** 表面から離れ
わかりました。メ
Хорошо. У вас нормальное давление
मुझे नहीं लगता कि इसमें ऐसा करने के लिए कहा गया है, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि कोई बात नहीं। मुझे लगता है कि हमें इसे पहले प्रयास में
Se riesco a raccogliere un po' del cibo di Bill qui intorno e a portarlo via... In questa zona si trova la cosiddetta stiva inferiore, dove abbiamo le nostre apparecchiature ottiche di posizionamento. Eseguiamo tutta la nostra navigazione qui sotto osservando le stelle e gli orizzonti della Luna o della Terra. Ed è qui che scopriamo esattamente dove ci troviamo nello spazio, in che direzione e a che velocità stiamo viaggiando. E il nostro computer, come ha detto Frank, raccoglie le informazioni e ci dice come manovrare per tornare a casa sani e salvi. Io lavoro con il telescopio a scansione e il sestante 
ピッチは45°を超えないようにしてください。このテープダンプが必要で
И нам нужно в
...만약 당신이 저를 원한다
ठीक है। ज़ाहिर है, सारी बड़ी सुर्खियाँ अभी भी आपके कामों और खासकर कल 
En observant les alentours, le contraste est globalement dû à l'ombre portée par le soleil: un gris très clair, un halo autour de mon ombre et de celle de mon casque. En regardant au loin, le contraste est maximal car la couleur environnante reste assez claire. En regardant vers le soleil,
11h, ici Houston. Normalement, il nous faut encore une heure et demie environ, mais nous aimerions continuer la charge jusqu'à peu avant votre coucher. Te
मैं यहाँ थोड़ी सी दार्शनिक बात करना चाहता हूँ। फ्रेड ने मुझे बताया कि एक बार आप आए थे और आपने उनसे कहा था कि हमारा प्रवेश कोण थोड़ा ज़्यादा झुका हुआ है, और अब हमारी बर्निंग प्रक
ठीक है। हमारे पास टेलीमेट्री की सुविधा नहीं है, इसलिए अगर आपने अपना ब्लड प्रेशर 
罗杰。你当时是不是正看着
Und zurück in Washington stimmte der Finanzausschuss des Repräsentantenhauses Steueränderungen zu, die Ölkonzerne, Banken und Energieversorger betreffen und die Bundeseinnahmen um fast zwei Milliarden Dollar pro Jahr erhöhen könnten. Außerdem kündigte die NASA heute an, 1972 eine große Or
This is Cape 
제 생각엔 저기 위에도 필요하겠네요. 짐, 지금 지휘실에서 자고
Хорошо. BAT B, 37.0; pyro A, 37.0; pyro
了解
Houston, Columbia. Wie liest man bei hohe
روجر، جيم. خطرت لنا فكرة؛ وهي أنه من الأفضل إخراج عبوات هيدروكسيد الليثيوم من 
Хорошо. Еще одно замечание по поводу воды, Джек. Если вы не сбросите давление, когда наберете достаточно воды, чтобы полностью сбросить давление, оставшееся давление исчезнет в течение 1-3 часов. Это небольшое количество кислорода, но мы можем его сохранить. Поэтому, если вы хотите исключить эту проблему, вы можете полностью сбросить давление, поместив воду
你的宇航服进气口温度接近 61 
Когда м
はい、そうです。だから選んだんです
حدث ذلك عندما كنا في وضعية المركبة الفضائية أجينا عند 0°، 180°، 0°، وكنا مستقرين عند هذه النقطة. كان نظام التحكم في الوضعية في المركبة ا
D'accord. Nous avons un système d'alignement de télescope si vous voulez essayer. Votre étoile de référence au sextant est toujours bonne, mais si vous avez des problèmes avec ça, il a été constaté qu'en regardant à travers le télescope, on peut 
Okay. You want me to trim the excess material that's stic
알았다
Роджер. Хорошо. Не могли бы вы дать им прогноз погоды на 2
Roger. Wir haben Ihre Systemdaten zur Wiedergabe geprüft, und alles sieht gut aus. Insbesondere die Daten sehen gut aus. Ich möchte Sie jedoch an die Anweisung erinnern, diesen Brennvorgang nur an den Kugelventilen der Bank A durchzuführen, und Sie haben grünes Licht für 2. Außerdem ist in Ihrem Flugplan für morge
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 제 상태는 최상입니다. 현재 캡슐의 플라이바이와이어 제어를 완벽하게 수행하고 있습니다. 연료는 80~1
Roger. Pour l'ajustement de hauteur, c'est-à-dire: Delta-V, 14,0; durée, 0 plus
Plötzlich fällt ein heller Lichtstrahl durchs Fenster. Ich habe keine Ahnung, was das ist. Eigentlich müsste jetzt der Sonnenuntergang bevorstehen. Das Periskop ist dunkel. Ich muss wohl nur noch einen letzten Blick auf den Horizont werfen; trotzdem bin ich nicht unten. Jetzt wird es ziemlich schnell dunkel. Wir befinden uns nun auf der Nachtseite. Offenbar bin ich auf die Erdoberfläche g
了解。地上
С обратной
Хорошо, Джо. Я заметил одну вещь: в паре цепей импульс... по крайней мере, их количество, заметно уменьшилось, и... это довольно плохо. И, по-видимому, дополнительный выброс воздуха из сервисного модуля был вызван каким-то 
Sì, lo so, non credo c
Es-tu prêt à copier le temps rét
좋아요, 진, 먼저 슈트에 대한 설명을 드릴게요. 그래야 모두가 부담에서 벗어날
Die Fläche 3 
Изменения происходят не оче
分かりました。パネル250の回路ブレーカーBAT A（POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING）は閉、パネル275の回路ブレーカーINVERTER POWER 2（MAIN B）は閉です。次の回路ブレーカーはパネル5にあります。回路ブレーカーBAT RELAY BUS（BA
ジェミニ4号、ハワイ、逆噴射のため8
Comment
2-1 
I th
Roger. It looked goo
नहीं, ऐसा लगता है कि इसने कभी भी पृथ्वी से उपस्थिति का संकेत नहीं खोया। ऐसा लगता है कि यह हर समय वन-वे लॉक प्राप्त करने की कोशिश कर रहा था, और हम आमतौर पर थोड़े समय को छोड़कर 2-वोल्ट एजीसी के आसपास ही रहत
现在就
11日、ヒューストン。マクドナルド天文台が望遠鏡で宇宙船を捉えたと先ほ
Roger, Buzz. Credo di aver capito. Hai detto che c'è poca di
好的。在第三行，COMM（通信）下方：DISPLAY（显示器），打开；SE AUDIO（单声道音频），关闭；VHF A 发射机，打开 - 这是个变化 - VHF B 接收机，打开；PRIMARY S-BAND（主S波段功率放大器），打开；发射机/接收机，关闭；S波段天线，打开；PMP（功率放大器），关闭；T
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Центр управления 
わかった。私がどう思っているか、分かるよね？喜ん
11, ह्यूस्टन, मैं
ヒューストン、FM放送をこちらで受信して、こちらでテレビ放送を視聴できるようにしたい。それでは55時に送
D'accord. Nous arrivons à la fin des modifications du manuel de vol solo, et il me reste deux pages de modifications dans le plan de vol. Ce sont les pages
Das ist bestätigt. Bevor ich mit den Pads beginne, noch eine Anmerkung. Die allgemeinen Hinweise, die wir Ihnen zuvor bezüglich der Position der Sonne im Sichtfeld des Kommandanten und der Ster
Roger, Houston. Je crois que 
ठीक है। कर दूंगा। अब त
Roger. Hier spricht Odyssey. Auf Wiedersehen
私たちもそれを調べています。なぜかヨーよりもピッチの方向がずれ続けています。もう一度見てみようかとも思っていました。一度戻らなければならなかったのですが、どれくらいずれるか見ていたんです。少しずれて自然に戻ってくると
收到。这样做是为了让电脑预热，同
Роджер. На данном этапе я уже продумал план полета. Честно говоря, мне кажется, что для точного определения положения в пространстве необходимо гораздо больше информации о звездах 
하
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। आपके लिए हमारे पास टीवी से जुड़ी जानकारी है और साथ ही आपके इरेज़ेबल लोड और 
Soyez à l'écoute, des changements ou modifications peuvent survenir au niveau 
War es angemeldet, als ich 
휴스턴, 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 들리
Roger. PAD di ingresso MIDPAC: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, più 1102, meno 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 0028, DL e VL NA, 4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380, Scorpii Delta - Scorpii 
알겠
Und ich wette, bei Bill 
Роджер. Мы не торопимся с переходом к новому положению; до Нави еще довольно далеко, а нам нужно другое положение. У меня есть поправка по поводу 20-го кадра — на Нави после адаптации к темноте: можно различить Кассиопею и саму Нави. Трудно увидеть, какие звезды находятся вокруг. У нас все еще довольно много частиц, которые плавают вместе с космическим аппа
य
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们正在努力确定时间
네, 알겠습니다. 감사하다는 말씀 감사합니다. 저희는 지금 여기서 온갖 새로운 절차들을 개
ऑटो मोड कंट्रोल, दोनों ऑटो; डिसेंट इंजन कमांड ओवरराइड, बंद; इंजन आर्म, बंद
不过下次请告诉他们，把那些云拨开，这样
Nun, ich fürchte, das wird die letzte Mond
रॉजर, फ्रेडो। हमारे पास एक और प्रक्रिया बाकी है, और फिर हम इसे बंद कर सकते हैं। वह है इस पैंतरेबाज़ी के लिए सुइयां और उपकरण प्राप्त करना। वह 5018 आपको ग
جيميني 4، مرة أخرى. أرى نفس شكل منحنى الأضواء، كالشفق القطبي، إلا أنه أسفلنا. رأيته مرة أخرى، كان عبارة عن خطوط طويلة وكبيرة. يبدو أنها تمتد بالتوازي تقريبًا مع مسار رحلتنا، من أسفل التوهج الجوي في أفق
友谊七号，友谊七号，这里是加州通信技术学院，加
Для 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. بقي لدينا حوالي دقيقة واحدة لل
Questa è una risposta affermativa, e l'area attorno all'intera luna, sia il cielo che la l
좋아요, 전진 25피트/초, 후진 41초 120, 2+32. 23+16+02에서. 2+42. 8+45
This is Friendship Seven. I'm on but it 
ह्यूस्टन, हमने वांछित दृष्टिकोण प्राप्त कर लि
Наши проверки местоположения на полигоне пок
...조리개는 대략 f:4 정도인데, 이 정도면 충분히 밝을 거라고 생
Vous êtes à mo
我们现在已经对您的
روجر. أعطني كلهم ​​يا ديك، أو الذين سيأتون. أعطني "انهض، اغرب،
Nous savons que de nombreux scientifiques de différents pays attendent avec impatience de voir les échantillons lunaires, et nous pensions que vous seriez intéressés de les voir tels qu'ils sont ici. Ces deux boîtes sont les conteneurs de retour des échantillons. Ce sont des conteneurs emballés sous vide, scellés sur la surface lunaire, puis placés à bord du module de commande, dans des sacs en fibre de verre fermés par une fermeture éclair et rescellés. Ces sacs ont ensuite été déposés dans les réceptacles situés sur le côté du 
रॉजर, माइक। मैं डेटा पर कुछ टिप्पणी देना चाहूंगा। स्वचालित पैंतरेबाज़ी काफी सटीक थी। ऐसा लगता है कि पैंतरेबाज़ी में हमें कोई उपतारकीय बिंदु मिला; स्वचालित प्रकाशिकी ने कैनोपस को ठीक उसी स्थान पर रखा जहां उसे होना चाहिए था; न
十分です
В удобное для вас в
Roger, Jim. Veuillez activer votre fonction de lecture
Cela se fera en tant qu'option 1. La seule raison pour laquelle l'autre se trouve à l'intérieur de l'ordinateur est que, pour défi
Pul
— Это Хьюсто
VII, voici VI. Apparemment, on voit beaucoup d'eau qui sort de partout à l'
Джерри, когда ты собираешься
ठीक है, देखते हैं कि मुझे समझ आया या नहीं। चरण 2 है: "बैलेंस कपल बंद; डेड बैं
Роджер, Близнецы 4. Я только что проснулся после долгого... сна. Я спал 4,5 
Мы не думаем, что это проблема. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы включили датчик количества и оставили его включенным на несколько часов, чтобы мы могли понять, что происходит. Даже при той скорости, которая использовалась в последние несколько часов, это не будет проблемой, но мы хотели бы найти способ контролировать это устройство, чтобы оно не доставляло вам не
Roger, qui Gemini 4. Il pilota si è alzato circa 20 minuti fa e ha riposato per circa 3 ore e mezza.
Я делаю много снимков MIT, время в капсуле [время] 03:38:38. Это будет наш единственный шанс. Я
روجر. التوجيهات تبدو
Ok. Non è del tutto chiaro se abbia effettivamente raggiunto l'arresto meccanico, e se lo fa, quelli d
Pericynthion più 2 - Okay, pericynthion più 2, a; più 1633.0, meno 0014.5, meno 0751.5; HA N barra A, HP più 0020.5; 1797.7, 8:35, 268, 26
روجر. PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50، ناقص 00021، 182 287 000، زائد 56919. إيقاف، أقل من 10 دقائق، 105 12 30.00. إيقاف، أكثر من 10 دقائق، 103 40 00.00 107 11 30.0
そうです。ここでもう 1 つシステムに関する事項があります。CRYO タンクのバランスを取る
1/200とf1
Roger. Tout va bien; le carburant est à 51 % et à 69 %; l’oxygène est à 84 % et à 100 %; la pression cabine est stable. L’alime
로저. 저희도 여기서 조금씩 배우고
Mi chiedo perché non
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आपने वो टेप डंप कर दिया है? हम जल्द ही सबसे ज़्यादा बढ़त ह
Сейчас у нас горит индикатор криогенного давления. Уровень H2 достиг своего нижнего предела, поэтому хотите, чтобы мы вернулись в автоматический ре
Jim, wir verstehen, dass Sie weiterhin trinken
Хор
Er hatte Schwierigkeiten, die 
Roger.
Roger. Il me semble que, puisque nous connaissons les orbites avec une telle précision, la position des étoiles avec une telle exactitude, et l'heure du coucher d'une étoile ou d'une planète avec une telle finesse, cela pourrait être un moyen assez efficace
Oka
यह कानो कैप कॉम अंध
Хорошо. До следующего раза у нас не будет большого прироста. Можете сказать, какой участо
前進25、左に8、上に3、そしてレートコマンドを実行します
彼女は
Der Lichtwert für den Schwarzweißfilm beträgt 13 bei ASA 64. Lichtwert auf 13 eingestellt. Aufnahme Nummer 7 mit Filter. Der südamerikanische Kontinent ist aufgrund des Wetters schwer zu fotografieren. Ich werde jetzt ein Panorama aufnehmen. Beginn in fast 8 Stunden. Tatsächlich wird es so sein. MARKT, 7, 8, 9 Schwarzweißaufnahmen, Schwarzweißfilm. Zehn Aufnahmen, Schwarzweißfilm. Die Aufnahmen werden mit 250 5.6 (1/250 Sekunde und f/5.6) auf Unendlich gemacht. Aufnahme Nummer 11, Blick nach links. Ich überfliege jetzt den südamerikanischen Kontinent. Ich habe einen großen Fluss in Sicht. Ich mache ein Foto, die Kamera so weit wie möglich nach unten gerichtet. Ich glaube, ich habe das Kapselfenster sehr gut erwischt. Ich komme jetzt zurück zu - B-1. Ich habe die ersten 12 Bilder gemacht. Ich bin auf B-1 und fotografiere die Wolkenstreifen. Ich habe B-2-Aufnahmen gemacht, alle in Schwarzweiß, mit Wetterfilter. Ich mache je
Roger. Avant d'aller plus loin, nous aimerions voir, essentiellemen
好的
«Аполлон-11»,
로저, 디크, 잘 들어. 요각 +80도, 피치각 -80도야
Okay. I'll catch up here. On page 12, you'll give us updates, some vectors,
Gemini 
물병자리, 휴스턴입니다. 부정적인 의견입니다.
Aurora Seven. Hier spricht Kano auf UH
罗杰，双子座4号，我想向你
هذا هو أول تقرير عن حالة الطقس الفضائي من خلال التنبؤات الجوية المأهول
アポロ8号、ヒュースト
Roger, Mike. Wenn wir den Abwurfzeitpunkt vorverlegen und euch eine neue Ladung geben, bräuchten wir eine neue Fluglage. Das ist abe
好的。现在我们已经准备好这个袋子了，下一步是准备把红色防护服软管——指挥官的或者LMP的都可以，因为我们最终需要你把这两根软管都准备好——放进袋子的顶部。为此，首先你必须确保红色软管和蓝色软管分开。我不知道你之前是否已经这样做了，但如果还没有，你需要做的就是沿着软管的整个长度剪开外层的Beta布料护套，然后剪断固定两根软管的橡胶扎带，这样软管
さあ、アクエリアス
मुझे लगता है कि आज कैलिफोर्निया का भी जन्मदिन है, और मेरा मानना ​​है कि वे 200 साल के हो गए हैं, और हम उन्हें जन्मदिन की शुभकामनाएं भेजते हैं। और मुझे लगता है कि आज डॉ. मुलर का भी जन्मदि
Gemini VII et VI, pourriez-vous poursuivre la description de votre maintien 
알
Ok, Jack. Ora i pa
嗯，月亮几乎完全消失了。我们想知道你有没有可能从其他窗户往外看，看到月亮？嘿，它又出现了，比尔。好的。就保持
로저, 프랭크. 세 번째 중간 지점 속도가 초당 1피트(약 30cm)를 조금 넘는 수준이라서 권장하지 않습니다. 따라서 네 번째 중간 지점 속도는 현재 초당 약 3피트(약 90cm) 정도입니다. 궤적은 아주 좋아 보입니다. 근신성 고도는 70마
아폴로 11호. 30초. 94 더하기 21이 될 것입니
11, Houston. Wir sehen sie alle derzeit behi
म
...arrivando prima. Sì, è meglio, è megl
로저. 달 궤도에서 발생한 재부팅과 관련하여, 컴퓨터 전문가들과 MIT 관계
Согласно расчетам, вы должны увидеть Луну. Это будет полнолуние. Вы 
База «Транквилити», Хьюстон. По моему расписанию эт
And 43 Bravo, 42 Bravo, 44-2, 43-2. Did you give 
DECA GIMBAL AC - замкнут? Автоматический выключатель? ПЕРЕОПРЕДЕЛЕНИЕ КОМАНДЫ - выключено? GIMBAL
R
Roger. Iss u
Roger, Houston, Apollo 11. Votre voix est beaucoup 
Rog
로저. 마이크, 7/10 비율에 대해 설명해 드리겠습니다. 처음 시도했을 때, 제대로 진행하지 못해서 실제 CDU와 목표 CDU 사이에 큰 오차가 발생했습니다. 그런 상황에서는 차량이 하중을 받는 비율, 즉 3/10에 4/10을 더한 비율로 움직이게 되고, 목표 비율보다 4/10 높은 값에서 제한됩니다. 즉, 목표 비율과 실제 비율 사이의 각도가 충분히 클 경우에만 그렇습니다. 실제로 우리는 그 각도를 충분히 크게 만들었습니다. 따라서 비율은 4/10에 3/10을 더한 값인 7/10이 됩니다. 이상입
F
रॉजर, कानो, यूएचएफ पर वापस जा रहे हैं। हाय। ओ
Hall
ठीक है। आप देखेंगे कि सीढ़ी के आसपास का पूरा इलाका घने अंधेरे में डूबा हुआ है, इसलिए हमें टीवी देखने में
Nach allem, was da gerade gemacht wird und noch immer wird, dürfte dieser Flug für das System am Boden eine viel gr
つまり、つまり、ガソリンの消費量は予想していたよりも
Okay. Mach ich. Ich sehe da keine Einschränkung, Charlie. Ich wollte nur sichergehen, weil ich letztes Mal etwas schneller von 8 auf 9 auf 10 auf 11 ge
我眼前出现了一些漂亮的星星，还有一些白色的小物体，它们似乎是从太空舱里飞出来的，然后飘散开来。如果它们是偏航指示器，那就太棒了。我怀疑我看到的那颗星是大角星。很有意思——它既不是大角星也不是大角星。它是其中一个白色物体……有两颗星保持静止不动。那个白色物体看起来像是朝我飞过来的
No, if you've got some
मैं अब 70 पर स
जिम, अगर आपको और फ्रेड को इसके बारे में जानकारी नहीं दी गई है, तो एक बात
Yes, all the fuse switches are still in the same position, Gordo. I haven't changed any of those. Squib is armed, Auto Retrojettison is off. I am on fly-by-wire, auto, and gyro normal. All "T" handles are in. The sequen
Okay. Real fine. Now the next step is to cut a diagonal hole in one ear of the - of the plastic bag near the arch. You can pick either one and cut about, a 1-1/2 or 2 inch diagonal hole, big enough to slip the red hose through. And when yo
On the way out, they gave us some REACQ angles which we used, and once
ठीक है, वह मेरे पीछे रहेगा
11号，休斯顿。这能清楚地看到八号球。我们看到了——甚至还能看到“OFF”旗
इसमें लिखा है कि घर के काम निपटाएं, हेलमेट और सामान रखने वाले बैग रखें; दर्पण, चेकलिस्ट और डिस्पोजल असेंबली को निकालें। अंतरिम सामान रखने वाली असेंबली को रखें, निकालें और 16 मिलीमीटर, HC-EX, f:4, 500, इन्फिनिटी, 6 फ्रेम प्रति सेकंड के लिए कॉन्फ़िगर करें। बस इतना ही उस पेज पर लिखा है। अभी हम यहीं पर हैं। अगला काम एक घंटे बाद का है जब 
Apollo 11, Houston. Die FIDO-Instrumente werten die Daten aus. Es ist noch zu früh für genaue Aussagen. Bisher sieht es a
حسنًا. في الخطوة 34 ضمن قسم التخزين النهائي، وهو قسم مخصص لجميع الأغراض، توجد خطوة بعنوان "توصيل الجليكول الثانوي بالمبرد"، وفيها خيار "تجاوز، تحقق". أثناء وجودنا في هذا القسم، نود الانتقال إلى اللوحة 382، وهي لوحة التحكم بالماء، وضبط صمام التحكم في ماء المبخر، الأس
And CRYO 
Okay. Now, that - that complete procedure for getti
ما مقدار الت
그건 확인
روجر، هل يمكنك التعليق مرة أخرى على هذا، نظام المواقف فيم
我们可以试试，杰克，虽然我不知道效果会怎么样。我
Vorremmo sapere quali sono i tuoi piani per la riconsegna del volo stasera. Nel nostro piano di volo ti mostriamo un periodo di riposo che inizierà a
Привет, Джим, я сейчас смотрю в монокуляр, и, если можно так выразиться, вид просто потрясающий. Он неземной. Я вижу все острова Средиземного моря. Несколько больших и маленьких островов Майорки, Сардинии и Корсики. Небольшая дымка над верхней частью Итальянского полуострова, кучевые облака над Грецией. Солнце сейчас садится над восточным Средиземном
Я собираюсь попробовать HF еще раз после того,
알겠습니다. 시스템 현황을 간단히 요약해 드리겠습니다. 기본적으로 모든 시스템은 정상입니다. 귀환 궤적과 관련해서는 13일까지 기다리면 태평양 
Rog. Survival lanyard. Yours con
아폴로 8호, 혹시 테이프를 사용하지 않으신다면 다시 한번 덤프해 드리고 싶습니다. 덤프가 필요한 이유는 디스크 굽기 전에 일부 데이터가 완전히 덤프되지 않았기 
Roger. Apollo 8, Houston. Nous transmettons pa
Bene. Aspett
रॉजर. 12
هل ستوافق على ذلك يا جيم؟ نود أن نوضح لك الإجراء ا
我看到了，我不确定我的VOX录音功能是
Роджер. Дав
Фред, Хьюстон. Через некоторое время я зачитаю вам инструкцию, которую вы сможете
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 옴니 브라보에 탑승 중이신지 확인해 주
I've got to lean forward a minute to get 
休斯顿，哥伦比亚。我再说一遍，我没看到他。自动光学系统指
Columbia, Houston. Vous pouvez larguer les navires à votre convenance. Nous vous demandons de larguer Eagle et de maintenir votre position. Nous vous proposerons ensuite une autre approche et
はい、わかりました。早めに点検していただければ、AUTOのままで大丈夫
In manual proportional, with manual lever pulled out, and having selected rate com
好的。或许
Также можно использовать невесомость для демонстрации многих вещей, которые мы все изучали в школе. Я хотел бы кратко показать, как легко объяснить работу гироскопа. Если я раскручу эту банку, то, согласно уравнениям движения, мы ожидаем, что после того, как ей будет придано вращение и ось вращения будет направлена ​​в эту сторону, если мы приложим к ней определенный 
Хорошо. Они оба уже спят; как насчет того, чтобы просто рассказать мне кое-какие новости, а я помолчу, чтобы вы могли рассказать мне кое-что о т
रॉजर, मुझे अच्छी तरह समझ आ गया। मैंने आपकी बात पहले से कहीं बेहतर सुनी है, हाई-फायर पर तो नहीं 
ほぼ真下です。積雲の写真を撮ります。タイムハック
Oka
Non, laissez-le simplement en phase de P
Dis donc, regarde-moi cette grosse bête qui arrive là-haut! On dirait qu'on f
क्या हम इसे अभी के लिए स्थगित
هذا مسدس الماء. هذا الجزء الأسطواني في نهايته عبارة عن مرشح مزود بعدة أغشية: يسمح أحدها بمرور الماء فقط، بينما يسمح الآخر بمرور الغاز فقط. وهكذا، بتمرير الماء الغازي
Gemini VI, Houston, abbiamo completato l'aggiornamento del bias dell'accelerometro. Puoi tornare alla fase PRELAUNCH e - correzione - alla fase CATCH-UP. Ti consigliamo di ripetere il cont
Привет, Хьюстон. Хьюс
Al mio segnale, saranno 85 mi
Roger, Mike. Merci beaucoup. Avez-vous constaté une accumulation d'eau supplémentaire sur la cloison arrière? À vo
Roger. Verstanden. Ich gebe Ihnen jetzt die Einstellungen, Korrekturen und die Fluglage für den ersten Flare. Das wären +
O
ها هو زر الإدخال. ثم اضغط على زر التحكم في الوضع للتثبيت. الآن تريدن
Okay. Wir schlagen vor, dass sich der LMP ausruht, während CMP und CDR wach sind. Der LMP sollte gegen 63 Uhr schlafen gehen, das ist in 25 Minuten. Sie haben dann 6 Stunden Ruhezeit. Um 69 Uhr stehen Sie auf. Um 70 Uhr schlafen Kommandant und Pilot des Kommandomoduls 6 Stunden bis 76 Uhr. Um 70–76,5–77 Uhr führen wir einen 52-Sekunden-Test durch. Um 78:30 Uhr laden und richten wir die Triebwerke aus. Die Zündzeit für den zweiten 
Okay, Jim. Wir haben eine Empfehlung für die Kommunikationsabteilung, die hoffentlich Energie spart, indem sie den Leistungsverstärker abschaltet – vorausgesetzt, sie funktioniert. Ich möchte Ihnen die einzelnen Schritte kurz vorlesen und Sie bitten, kurz darüber nachzudenken. Wir empfehlen, dies vor
Ok. Buona idea. Lo stiamo 
Oh, lass mich – hier, lass mich
了解、ケン。ペリシンシアンプラス2、高速リターン/62871、マイナス161、プラス129、プラス45224、マイナス06216、マイナス18712 001 28 603 
Ça a l'air d'aller beaucoup mieux maintenant.
Friends
Roger. Sind Sie bereit, Ihre 36-4 Backup-Leitlinienwert
はい、そうです。BAT 1、2、3、4、6がオンになっています。2つの注意事項があります。1つ目は、回路ブレーカーの保護限界です。回路ブレーカーの保護限界は、コマンドモジュールと接続しているアンビリカルケーブルが高温になっています。メインバス電圧は、
मुझे ये खिड़की साफ करनी
ジェミニ4号、こちらヒューストンCAP COM
هورنت. روجر
Gemi
지금 우리는 기체를 지면에 거의 밀착시킨 자세로 비행하고 있어서 지상 관제소에서 우리 위치를 파악하지 못하는 것 같습니다. 간간이 교신이 끊기긴 했지만요. 부스터를 계속 시야에 두기 위해 당분간은 이 자세를 유지할 예정입니다. 현재로서는 부스터에 접근하는 데 큰 진전이 없는 것 같습니다. 이전과 거의 같은 거리를 유지하고 있는 것 같습니다. 부스터가 우리 아래에 있을 때 야간 관측을 했는데, 마치 하늘이 별들로 가득 찬 것처럼 보였습니다. 부스터에서 뿜어져 나
好的。这里是太平洋中部，坐标为 357 152 359 268，正负 0813，负 16503 065 36221 645 1
Хьюстон, криогенные установки запущены, и не могли бы вы также вкратце рассказать о темпера
麻省理工学院的人们可能
Okay. And we concur. The is maneuv
Хорошо. Почему бы вам просто не зачитать мне сейчас показ
Roger. Es gab eini
さて、ヒュース
Era Gemini VII, e sono sicuro che li abbiano visti da quella distanza. Noi li vedevamo; sembrava che
Non c
Très bien. Concernant le récipient d'échantillons mentionné dans la documentation: à la télévision, il nous a semblé que les échantillons destinés à ce récipient étaient effectivement sélectionnés en fonction des caractéristiques des roches elles-mêmes. Pourriez-vous nous donner, de mémoire, des précisions sur ces échantillons, ainsi q
Ja, das habe ich. Sie möchten beide Busse mit den BUS TIE-Motorschaltern einschalten; erstens, um sicherzustellen, dass keine Lasten an den Bussen anliegen, und zweitens, um die Busse anschließend durch Ziehen der Leistungsschalter stromlos zu machen, damit die Motorschalter nicht – also die BUS TIES – eingeschaltet bleibe
D'accord, Vance. Voyons si j'ai bien compris. Je souhaite utiliser l'objectif 70 mm DC Hasselblad 80 mm en format A-13, avec un film noir et blanc 3400 ISO MAG R ou S. Préparez-vous à prendre la photo, et le réglage serait: /DC/80/BW 3400 (f/5,6) à une vitesse d'obturat
わかりました。: 2 プラス 26 プラス 05、179、108、000、5 プラス 47、10416.9、35587、358、139、320、30
जेमिनी VI, हमने इसे यहाँ उल्टा समझ लिया है। इसकी रेंज 32.69 और रेंज रेट 
Houston, Apollo 8. That last set of marks are invali
روجر. 30، SPS/G&N: 36691، -061، +066 135 23 4156، +32011، +06 818، -02650، 181 054 014؛ الأوج غير متوفر، +00230 32836 
了解しました、ジム。ありがとうございます。
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。ど
Je ne peux plus effectuer de tests sur les étoiles pour le moment. Je reviens à l'observation de la surface de la Terre
罗杰
当你飞越阿森松岛时，我想试着给你检查一下那里的情况。今天的空地遥控系统不太好用，但
ダメなら、ど
Роджер. Там есть две шестерни, которые вращаются, когда вы тянете ручку вперед и назад. Одна из них 
페가수스 관련 업데이
その時、待ち合わせ場所の窓からマイクの姿がかすかに見えました
Roger. Nous sommes d'accord avec votre nouvelle stratégie. Quel est le programme? Vous nous voulez dans la partie, e
पुराना तारा संख्या 30 ऐसा प्रतीत होता है
Roger. This trip of ours to the Moon may have looked, to you, simple or easy. I'd like to assure you that has not been the case. The Saturn V rocket which put us into orbit is an incredibly complicated piece of machinery, every piece of which worked flawlessly. This computer up above my head has a 38,000 word vocabulary, each word of which has been very carefully chosen to be of the utmost value to us, the crew. This switch which I have in my hand now, has over 300 counterparts in the command module alone, this one single switch design. In addition to that, there are myriads of circuit breakers, levers, rods, and other associated controls. The engine, our large rocket engine on the aft end of our service module, must have performed flawlessly, or we would have been stranded in lunar orbit. The parachutes up above my head must work perfectly tomorrow or we will plummet into the ocean. We have always had confidence that all this equipment will work, and work properly, and we continue to have confidence that it will do so for the remainder of the flight. All this is possible only through the blood, sweat, and tears of a number of people. First, the American workmen who put these pieces of machinery together in the factory. Second, the painstaking work done by the various test teams during the assembly and retest after assembly. And finally, the people at the Manned Spacecraft Center, both in management, in mission planning, in flight control, and last, but not least, in crew training. This operation is somewhat like the periscope of a submarine. All you see is the three of us, but bene
Ho capito e ho preso nota nella mia lista di co
Di conseguenza, la visibilità è sicuramente ridotta. A questo punto, il tasso di cambio MARK,T è quasi tutto pari a
로저. 별 25개와 42개; 각도 차이 5볼; +0.00165, +0.00186, -0.0
Да, Джим, подтверждаю. Переходим к странице 29. У нас есть… На этом этапе тре
О, нет, Фрэнк. Я на сто процентов уверен: одна птица в 
乔，他们最终弄明白TD和E燃料
俯仰配平已调高至 1.5 度，并在此值附近波动，这与模拟值略有偏差。偏
Roger. Mode II de
我把它
Привет, Джим, я сейчас смотрю в монокуляр, и, если можно так выразиться, вид просто потрясающий. Он неземной. Я вижу все острова Средиземного моря. Несколько больших и маленьких островов Майорки, Сардинии и Корсики. Небольшая дымка над верхней частью Итальянского полуострова, кучевые облака над Грецией. Солнце сейчас садится над восточным Средиземноморьем. Британские острова определенно зеленее, чем коричневато-зеленые, которые мы видим на островах, на полуострове Испании. Коне
オーケー、バズ。まず、着陸地
Bene. Per prima cosa
Ce système de communication étai
わかりました。無視することをお
我
ठीक है, वैंस। डेल्टा-वी पास पैसिव
T
A
Sì. Abbiamo gestito le p
了解しました、ジム。スキャン望遠鏡よりも六分儀の方が使いやすいですね。より細かい制御が可能ですから、後でもう一度言ってください
Wissen Sie, egal wie oft ich diese O
ジム、機会があれば、あなたとビルのど​​ちらかで、あなたとビルのク
Sì, un attimo. Un attimo: il tuo MASTER è ACCESO; il tuo INTERCOM è ACCESO; il tu
هذه مركبة 
알겠
ठीक है। लगभग 114:10 पर, "ऊंचाई 60 मील के बराबर निर्धारित" के अंतर्गत सभी जगह "सौर कोरोना, वैकल्पिक" टिप्पणी होनी चाहिए, और उस वैकल्पिक की पहली पंक्ति में जहां लिखा है 
Roger. Stiamo manovrando per posizionarci per la TV. Bill l'ha sistemata nella finestra di ritrovo di sinistra di Frank, e io sono al posto di Bill e guardo fuori dalla finestra di ritrovo di destra, e la Terra sta passando attraverso la mia finestra. È grande più o meno
네, 알겠습니다. 지금 설정해 놓은 구성이 바로 그겁니다. 저희가 생각하는 바는 이렇습니다. 탱크 1을 자동(AUTO)으로, 탱크 2를 끄고 설정했을 때, 히터 작동 중 탱크 1의 
एक और समस्या - अभी, जैक, मैं दाहिनी खिड़की से बाहर देख रहा हूँ और वहाँ काफी अंधेरा है, लेकिन यहाँ मलबे के बचे हुए लगभग एक हजार 
그 말
Okay. It'
Okay, ich hab's... Jetzt dreh dich nac
Ich schätze schon. Er 
알겠습니다. 연료는 1.0, 산화제는 0.25입니다. 산소 불균형 수치가 감소 추
レトロロケットスクイブ
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 지금 우리를 향해 보이는 것은 아프리카 대륙입니다. 물론 시간이 지남에 따라 모든 것이 점점 작아지고 있습니다. 지중해는 아주 깨끗합니다. 태양은 마다가스카르 너머로 지고
Ciao, Atlantic Ship. Amicizia Se
Roger. Sigma Sept, je vais maintenant effe
Oh, sì. Molto megli
Go ahead
D'acc
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴입니다. 어센트 탱크 O2의 산소 압력
네, 맞습니다, 프랭크
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 데이터 복사 준비가 완료되었습니다. 
جيم، من هيوستن هنا. لديّ نقطتان: أولاً، يبدو جهازك جيداً
يترك لي ذلك شريطاً صغيراً جداً.
نريد منك التوجه مباشرةً إلى 060 وإلغاء معدلات التصوير الخاصة بك لتصوير المذنب بينيت. وللقيام بذلك، نريد منك تفعيل الطائرات الرباعية C وD. استخدم جميع طائراتك الرباعية 
迈克，你把剃须膏藏
... استفسارات، يمكنك متابعة ملاحظات
D'acco
D'accord, Jack. Je vois que tu as obtenu gain de cause, et c'était de toute façon notre recommandation. On va demander
من المؤكد أن المرء يشعر وكأنه ينظر إلى أعلى من مستوى نظره عند هذه الوضعية، وإذا لم يكن هناك أفق، فستبدو السماء سوداء حالكة. كمية الضوء في قمرة القيادة عالية جدًا. بمجرد أن يعتاد المرء عليها، يمكن تقليلها بالطبع باستخدام إضاءة المقصورة. في هذه المرحلة، أتردد بعض الشيء في تقليل مستوى الإضاءة هنا، بسبب مشكلة في دائرة البدلة. أستخدم مصابيح أطراف أصابعي بكثرة. من الملاحظ أنه في الرحلات المستقبلية، يجب أن يكون لدينا جهاز تجميع يمكننا وضع الأشياء فيه، وتركها محصورة هناك لفترة من الوقت
이 비행의 책임은 우선 역사와 이 노력에 앞서 나간 위대한 과학자들에게 있습니다. 다음으로는 의지를 표명해 주신 미국 국민들에게, 그리고 그 의지를 실행에 옮긴 네 개의 행정부와 의회에, 마지막으로 새턴, 컬럼비아, 이글, 그리고 달 표면에서 우리의 작은 우주선 역할을 했던 우주복과 배낭인 EMU를 제작한 기관과 산업
Отличная идея, детка. Ты будешь ждать и наблюдать за ходом мыс
V
Ich kann im Sichtfenster, im Periskop und im Fadenkreuz deutlich ein Gierenmuster erkennen. Das Sichtfenster selbst ist bei (-) 34 Grad zufriedenstellend. Ich habe den Kreisel abgedeckt und gehe nun wie
Roger, Houst
ヒュース
हाँ। हम बस इतना चाहते थे कि प्लस-एक्स थ्रस्टर्स को निष्क्रिय करने से पहले और अंत में मिन इम्पल्स पर जाने से पहले, हम ची
I am just about straight down. We will take some cumulus pictures. The ti
Gut. Also, wir hatten hier im Mittleren Westen einen heftigen Schneesturm; ich weiß nicht, ob man den von da oben sehen kann. Und in Houston ist es übrigens ziemlich kühl geworden, so um die 35 Grad. Und wir würden gerne wissen, wen ihr nächsten Sonntag favorisiert, Baltimore oder Cleveland? Die Verteidigung von Baltimore war 
Okay, Mike. Das gilt natürlich nur für den Fall, dass die G&N-Steuerung ausfällt und du mit konstanter G-Belastung fliegen musst. Wir versuchen, den Bereich für konstante G-Belastung von 1100 auf 1500 Meilen zu erweitern. Wir haben das Verfahren im Simulator getestet, und es funktioniert einwandfrei. Ich erklä
好的。在倒计时 6 小时（或者更准确地说是 6 分钟）时，在模式控制 (MODE CONTROL) 下，按下“ATT HOLD”（已被划掉），然后按下“插入 (Insert)”，再按“ENTER”，最后再按三次“ENTER
حسناً، إذا نام إد، وإذا رأيته،
D'accord. Ceci suppose que tous les
Ok. Aspet
Oui, j'avai
ح
はい、できます。実は、廃水処理がどのような影響を与えるのか、かなり興味があったんです。以前のミッションで廃水処理を
حسنًا، لا بأس. لديّ تحديثان لك يا جيم. الأول يتعلق بإجراءات البحث عن المذنب بينيت في حوالي الساعة 10:00 صباحًا، وسأنتظر حتى يستيقظ جاك قبل أن أُطلعك على التفاصيل. أما التحديث الثاني فيتعلق بالدخول قبل ثلاث ساعات من الموعد المحدد، وأعتقد أن فانس ذكر لك الليلة الماضية أن هذا احتمال وارد، وأننا نرغب في فحص ضغط خزان الوقود مبكرًا. وبما أننا لن نقوم بالمناورة الثالثة في منتصف المسار، فإننا نفضل الدخول في الساعة 55. هل هذا منا
Довольно сильно качает. Возможно, у меня ещё остался какой-то заряд. И заглушить его я т
了解
我们现在的位置差不多适合高增益；我们想知道您是否想先
Роджер. Мы зафиксировали у вас давление кислорода на уровне 960, возможно, вам
Хорошо. Это была вся процедура демпфирования скоростей, только — хотя я вам только это сказал — что это шаг 2, это была вся процедура. Теперь перейдём к тому, что напечатано на странице 29 — Исправление: у вас была одна ошибка в пересказе в разделе УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ПОЛОЖЕНИЕМ. Там было PITCH и ROLL вместо PULSE; YAW вместо DIRECT. Продолжая, на странице 29 с напечатанной процедурой, первые четыре строки — вычеркните. Шаг 3 — вычеркните. В разделе «Активация» добавьте шаг. Первый шаг будет «Проверить ASA CB(16) в течение 10 минут». Остальная часть активации — 
ينصح قسم الطيران بأنه إذا ظهر لك مؤشر ضوء التشغيل أثناء المجموعة الثانية من الاختبارات، فعليك العودة إلى المجموعة الأولى 
Вот репортаж Гарри Розенталя из Associated, Хьюстон. Два Санта-Клауса украсили сочельник для двухлетнего Джеффри Ловелла. Первый постучал в его в
E Bill... ha suggerito che se avessimo la caldaia dell'acqua in funzione sul circuito primari
Jerry, sono Frank. Hai notizie più recenti sulla nostra traiettoria e su c
Bene. Questa è la configurazione che vogliamo per te, ed ecco cosa stiamo pensando. Qu
Comment se passe le sommei
ठीक है, 11. आप वापस ऑनलाइन आ गए हैं, स्क्रीन
Ein strahlend blauer Horizontstreifen, während die Sonne immer tiefer sinkt – der Horizontstreifen leuchtet immer noch. Er scheint fünfmal so breit zu sein wie der Durchmesser der Sonne. Ich befin
알겠습니다. 다시 모드로 돌아가서 대기 모드로
Apollo 8, Houston. You don't need to answer this transmission, but doctors observe that it looks like your - some of your senso
لاحظت أنك أغفلتَ المحاذاة لفترة وجيزة لأننا كنا لا نزال ن
Водолей, Хьюст
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 아프리카에서 몰려오는 구름이 많았는데, 지금은 상당히 옅어졌습니다. 바다는 확실히 보이지는 않지만, 구름
휴스턴 여러
了解。距離は11プラス14プラス29、デルタVは毎秒9.0フィート、持続時間は0プラス15、ヨー0、ピッチ0、コア25は90090、26と27はすべてゼロ、スラスタは前方噴
了解、ジム。ここで1、2アンペアの電力を節約するために、ダウンボイスバックアップ通信設定に切り替えてください。これは、電源と回路ブレーカーを抜いて、ダウンボイスバックアップに切り替える設定です。通信に問題が発生した場合は、この
好的。PC加2；加0819.2，减0020.0，减0218.9；不适用；加0020.9，0848.2；420，274，082；加0820.3，减0020.0，减0215.0
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, पृष्ठ 12 खोलें। पृष्ठ के दाहिनी ओर, पृष्ठ के मध्य से नीच
好的。你打算
نعم، كان جهاز الاتصال الخاص بك مشغولاً طوال الوقت ولم نتمكن من الدخول أو محاولة إخبارك بأن وقتك قد انتهى وطلب منك ال
रॉजर। और मुझे कुछ और बातें पता हैं, माइक। हमें इस समय बैटरी बी का चार्ज बंद करना होगा, और साथ ही, छिटपुट गरज-चमक के कारण हमारे लक्षित लैंडिंग पॉइंट पर मौसम बहुत खराब है। हम उनमें से किसी एक में फंसना नहीं चाहते, इसलिए हम - आपका लक्ष्य बिंदु आगे की ओर ले जा रहे हैं। सुधार, यह आगे की ओर होगा, 1500 नॉटिकल मील की एंट्री के लिए, ताकि हम अपलिफ्ट कंट्रोल सुनिश्चित कर सकें। नए निर्देशांक 13 डिग्री, 19 मिनट उत्तर, 169 डिग्री, 10 मिनट पश्चिम हैं। उस क्षेत्र में मौसम बहुत अच्छा है। हमें 2000 और 8000 नॉटिकल मील की छिटपुट गरज-चमक मिल रही है, दृश्यता 10 मील है और समुद्र में 
Roger. Woomera Cap 
陰性です。中間コース4は必須ではありません。寝返り
Roger. Molto bene. Pausa. Le previsioni meteo per l'area di atterraggio in questo momento sono 2000 raffiche sparse, alte e spar
أعتقد أن الصوت المجسم العمودي سيكو
V
Okay, Ken. Dein Funksignal ist furchtbar schwach – wirklich furchtbar schwach. Ich kann n
जिम, यहाँ नियंत्रण केंद्र जिस तरह से काम कर रहा है, उससे हम बह
Роджер. Подождите, я предоставлю отчет о состоянии. Я нахожусь в орбитальном положении для вашего отслеживания. Отчет о состоянии: Все предохранители номер один, кроме второго предохранителя на башне разделения. Аварийная последов
네, 이제 곧 측
और क्या आप हमारे लिए पर्ज टैंक और क्र
क्या आप नहीं कर 
निश्चित रूप से मुझसे नीचे। मैं कार्नार्वोन से ही इसे अपने नीचे ट्रैक कर रहा था। कार्नार्वोन तक यह हमारे नीचे था, फिर क्षितिज तक, और फिर से हमारे नीचे। ऐसा लग रहा था मानो यह मुझसे अलग कक्षा में हो। इसका अपोजी और पेरिजी मुझसे अलग था। खैर, जैसे ही मुझे इसकी स्थिति का पता चला, मैंने दिन के उजाले में इसके करीब जाने की कोशिश की। जैसा कि मैंने कहा, उस समय यह मुझसे एक या दो मील आगे था - मेरे नीचे। इसलिए, जितना अधिक मैंने करीब जाने की कोशिश की, उतना ही मैं इसके करीब नहीं पहुँच पाया। मैं प्रतिगामी गति से थ्रस्ट चला रहा था। मैं अपने ऊपरी थ्रस्
Oui. Je ne crois pas. En fait, Ed n'a pas fermé son hublot depuis 12 heures, et je ne l'
Columbia, Houston. The computer is you
Roger. Gemini 8, Houston. Wir möchten Sie über die aktuelle Kommunikationssituation informieren, währen
حسنًا، شكرًا لك. وبالنسبة لسؤالك عن الرقم 8750، فهو الرقم الذي يُستخدم في خيار الحد 
ジェミニ4、RKV外科医。素晴らしい記録
Хорошо, это подтверждается. Вы 
Роджер. Стэн обеспокоен тем, что наша нынешняя процедура, показанная в контрольном списке, на самом деле не обеспечивает циркуляцию гли
Okay, we've done that.
Ok, Jim. Questi sono i termini di compensazione del giroscopio. Sono già stati caricati e stiamo aggiornando le tue carte di bo
分かりました。クワッドの数値については、コンピュータープログラムとそこに入っている補正係数を使って、あなたと同じ値を読み取っているように見え
نعم، هذا صحيح - الطريقة التي كان يعمل بها ذلك الشيء - الطريقة الت
休斯顿，阿波罗8号。休斯顿，阿波罗8号。
Да, сэр; там действительно очень
Ok, Gus. Ho solo una domanda per te prima che tu vada fuo
Хорошо, Фред. Два-три момента. Во-первых, нам нужна проверка угла стыковки, как только у тебя появится такая возможность. Во-вторых, ты мож
好的。在检查清单 G/8-2 的第 5 步中，有一条说明是“禁用相邻两组四联机上的所有喷气发动机”，这就是我们之前提到的“禁用 A 和 B 组四联机”。所以这部分没问题；但是，现在来看第 7 步，上面写着“启用所有喷气发动机”，我们希望您没有误以为我们是指保持 A 和 B 组四联机禁用状态。如果是这样，那就按照说明操作。所有喷气发动
Ok. Ti darò solo - penso che sarà più facile darti quello che ho dentro. Ok, nella riga superiore, sulla 11, abbiamo i quattro interruttori AC BUS TIE INSERITI e l'interruttore AC BUS VOLTS INSERITO, e questo è tutto. Seconda riga, abbiamo i quattro interruttori TCA INSERITI. Abbiamo il GASTA sotto FLIGHT DISPLAYS e COMMANDER's. E allo stesso modo sotto AC BUS 
軌道レートが不安定な場合は、海岸に近づくにつれて追跡タスク
حسنًا يا توم، لقد فهمت كل ش
さあ、さあ、さあ、さあ、さあ
— — Проверены мониторы RCS — (Смех) Ладно, вот и малыш Базза — Глагол 83 — д
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフ
D'accord. Trois à
好的，休斯顿。
نعم، أنا راضٍ عن التحديثات الأخيرة التي تلقيناها، خاصةً فيما يتعلق بتأثيرها على متجه الحالة. مع ذلك، ما زلت غير راضٍ تمامًا عن الإجراءات المختلفة. لو أمكننا اختيار النجوم ضمن نطاق أصغر من زوايا الدوران، بحيث يُتاح للمسبار اختيار مناورته الخاصة والوصول إلى تلك النقطة دون النجمية، ثم رؤية ذلك النجم، لكانت هذه الط
Prenderemo il cavo ed Ed lo terrà tra le gambe, più o meno all'altezza della base del sedil
司令パイロットはまだ寝ています。
حسنًا. الآن أستخدم القمر الموجود على يساري، وهو حلٌّ ممتاز. سأقوم بتغطية مؤشر الوضعية، ويمكنك مراقبة الانحراف. سأترك الجيروسكوبات حرة، محاولًا اختيار وضع التحكم الإ
現在作業中
잭, 달의 각 크기가 정확히 얼마인지 지금 당장은 잘 모르겠네요. 육분의로 측정하는 게 가장 좋지만, 중심을 정확히 맞추려면 망원경을 사용해야 할 수도 
지금 저는 마이너스 Y자형 지지대 근처에서 사진을
Ed hat den Großteil der Ausrüstung dabei. Ich habe die Pistol
괜찮아요, 저희는 어젯밤에 푹 잤어요. 모두 어제 최소 7시간은 잤고, 방금 아침도 먹고 물도 많이 마셨어요. 컨디션도 아주 좋은 것 같아요. 방금 운동기구도 사용했고
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि हम उड़ान भरने के लिए तैयार हैं, और हम चढ़ाई संबंधी जान
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 자동 역추진 장치는 꺼져 있습니다. 모드 선택기는 정상이고, 이륙률 명령, 자이로스코프도 정상입니다. 모든 "T" 핸들은 수동 모드를 제외하고 모두 작동 중이며, 수동 모드는 꺼져 있습니다. 현재 수동으로 조종하고 있습니다. 착륙 백 스위치는 꺼져 있습니다. 시퀀스 패널은 해당 스위치를 제외하고 모두 정상입니다. 제어 연료는 60~82%입니다. 현재 수동 조종 시 자세는 롤 5도(우측), 요 15도(우측), 피치 -34도(궤도 자세)입니다. 발사 후 경과 시간은 2 + 33 + 60입니다. 아, 정정합니다. 2 + 34입니다. 수신하
J'ai utilisé le filtre vert sur le sextant, et il permet d'obten
你
Roger. And next item, the supercritical helium rise rate is nominal, and you also had that question for us about your thruster activity during the on the last REV. Believe we understand that now, as you reported that your pitch was in ACCEL COMMAND and your yaw and roll were in RATE COMMAND. You were firing your pitch thrusters. This will couple rates into your yaw and roll axes, and the - You were at that time holding only 
Gemini VIII, qui Houston. Imposta l'interr
حسنًا. سنتواصل مع فريق SPAN بخصوص هذه 
双子座 V
예정보다 10도 정도 앞서고 있지만, 그 
OK. +90: /G&N, 63825, -1,54, +1,32, -0491,7, +0000,1, +6634,0, 180, 228, 001; N/A; +0
I was saying that, Houston, *** stop and take a photograph or something and then want to start mo
روجر. قد يهمّكم يا سكان المركبة الفضائية كولومبيا أن تعلموا أن اليوم هو عيد الاستقلال في كولومبيا. تُوّجت غلوريا دياز من الفلبين بلقب ملكة جمال الكون الليلة الماضية، بعد أن تفوقت على 60 فتاة أخرى لتفوز باللقب العالمي. تبلغ الآنسة دياز من العمر 18 عامًا، بشعر وعينين سوداوين، ومقاساتها 34.5-23-34.5. أما الوصيفة الأولى فكانت ملكة جما
Roger. Am Anfang sah alles gut aus. Jetzt driftet die Antenne mit einem seltsamen Muster ab, das 
좋습니다. 이제 연료와 산소
रॉजर। मरून बगुल के साथ जारी। राष्ट्रपति निक्सन ने आपसे मिलने के लिए विमान में सवार होने से ठीक पहले सैन फ्रांसिस्को से फोन करके आपकी पत्नियों को चौंका दिया। वे सभी आपके टेलीविजन प्रसारण से बहुत प्रभावित हुईं। जेन और पैट ने यहां मिशन कंट्रोल से इसे देखा। कल रात केप से इंटेलसैट क
彼らが燃料量が 16 パー
नहीं, हम नहीं कर सकते - हम भी इसका उच्चारण नहीं कर सकते। मुझे लगता है आपको यह पसंद आएगा। वे बढ़िया किस्म का पनीर
D'accord, Fred. Je te conseille de désactiver le service BIOMED. On n'a jamais eu de connexion BIOMED et ça pourrait améliorer 
すでに旅の途中にいるあなた、ヒューストンの占星術師ルビー・グラハムが、あなたの月への旅の星座がすべて良好だと言っていることをご存知でしょうか。彼女はニールは賢く、マイクは判断力があり、バズは複雑な問題を解決できると言っています。また、ニールは世界をバラ色の眼鏡で見る傾向があるものの、苦しんでいる人や困っている人をいつでも助ける用意があるとも言っています。ニール、あなたは「感情を込めて人生を解釈できる直感」も持っているはずです。バズは優れた批判力に加えて、とても社交的で孤独に耐えられないでしょう。彼女はマイクが何時に生まれたのか知らなかったので、彼はニールと同じ性
Apollo 8, 
D'accord. Et j'aimerais aussi vous envoyer votre ch
Roger. Per quanto riguarda i voti di Jim, vorremmo o
Odyssey, Houston. Avez-vous réglé le feu de position e
알겠습
अपोलो 11, ह्य
了解しました。状態は良好です。燃料は51パーセントと69パーセント、酸素は84パーセントと100パーセント、客室内の気圧は良好です。直流電源と交流電源はすべて正常です。飛行計画に関して報告できることは、燃料レベルが予想よりも低いことです。現在、操縦モードはASCSです。夜間飛行後に機体姿勢を調整しようとして、余分な燃料を消費してしまいました。これは飛行計画の要件が矛盾していたためだと思います。機体姿勢を調整してから、他の項目に取り組むべきでした。自動操縦モードのままにしておけば、この過剰な燃料消費を抑えることができると思います。気球は時々見えたり見えなかったりします。今どこにいるのか全く分かりません。気球が行ったり来たりしているようには見えません
了解。「ブラ
13, Хьюстон. Теперь всё ясно. Он говорит, что у него небольшие проблемы в Голдстоуне, и просит меня подо
짐, 우리 여기서 그와 함께 나흘 더 있어야 하는데, 
Friendship Seven, qui Bermuda Cap Com in H
حسنًا يا كين. شكرًا لك. لقد انتهينا للتو من وجبة اليوم الثالث (ج)، والآن سننفصل و
कैप कॉम। अगर आप पढ़ना चाहते है
حسناً. انتظ
You can see by the numerous crater
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, समझ लीजिए कि आप तीनों अक्
Ver
Фред, у тебя накапливает
حسنًا. الوقت هو 
Columbia, Houston. Innanzitutto, vorremmo uno scarico delle acque reflue al 10% sul retro. In secondo luogo, non sembra che dovremo cambiare aereo in questo momento, quindi non ne collegheremo uno nuovo. Terzo punto, vorrei che tutti i vostri riscaldatori CRYO fossero impostati su AUTO e siamo pronti per una carica della batteria, la batteria BRAVO; durerà circa 7 ore. Se doveste andare a dormire, interromperemo la carica BATT, ma al momento possiamo procedere e avviare la ca
ठीक है, फ्रेड। और अब आपकी आवाज़ यहाँ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है। ठीक है। हम आपके लिए 
यही सही समय है
OK. Procédure de combustion. Nous devons couper le moteur si le moniteur de poussée indique 77 % ou moins; 2, si la pression de remplissage du propergol est inférieure à 160 psi; 3, si le ΔP de l'oxydant est supérieur à 25 (un appel au sol sera alors nécessaire); 4, si l'erreur d'attitude est de ±10 degrés, sauf lors des transitoires de démarrage. OK. La limite de vitesse est de ±10 degrés par seconde. Un voyant ENGINE GIMBAL, un voyant ISS avec une alarme de programme, un voyant CES DC et un voyant d'onduleur (s'il est toujours allumé après avoir essayé de changer d'onduleur) doivent s'allumer. Si, pendant la combusti
알겠습니다. 배터리 전압: 메인 배터리 24V, 1번 배터리 25V, 2번 배터리 25V, 3번 배터리 25
Beh, questo vale se hai nuov
Одиссея, Хьюстон. 
Die Belüftung in unserer Kabine ist ebenfalls unten. Die Kabine fasst etwa 
Es scheint keine bestimmte Form zu geben... es kommt 
Roger, Buzz. Als du das Gerät gestoppt – oder, genauer gesagt, als du es beendet hast –, scheint es uns so, als ob du eine Fehlermeldung erhalten hast, die die Totzone auf 0,5 reduziert hat. Solange du keine AU
Okay. Der Fernseher ist je
Okay, Vance. Let me see if I have it he
さあ
Scendendo ulteriormente fino a 114:16, cancella la riga "
よし。新しい
D'accord. Pouvez-vous nous donner la pression de la source d'héliu
Роджер. За 64 тысячи долларов мы все еще пытаемся определить местоположение вашей посадочной площадки, базы «Транквилити». Мы думаем, что она находится на карте LAM 2 в точках Джульетты 0,5 и 7,8. У вас еще есть эти карты на бор
Ok, Apollo 8. Abbiamo esaminato tutti i vostri sistemi. Avete un GO per. Una delle cose che 
11，休斯顿。我们注意到你刚才扫视第二格时，1号和2号格上的两个八号球位置略有不一致。控制员说他想
Ciao, Apollo 11. Qui Houston. Vi mostriamo l'arrivo del Terminator alle 78:53, tra circa 7 minuti, e abbiamo anche i PAD 2 e 5 p
Ho fatto girare l'interruttore
Noch ein Hinweis zum Störungsmanagement. Es ist unwahrscheinlich, dass Sie sich morgen darum kümmern müssen, aber in Ihrer Störungsliste unter „Andocken“ auf Seite F11 9 finden Sie oben unter „Tunnel“ auf Seite 11 9 ein Störungsmanagement für einen hohen Sauerstoffdurchfluss. Wir bitten Sie, dieses Verfahren nicht anzuwenden, falls Sie auf einen hohen Sauerstoffdurchfluss stoßen. Wenden Sie sich stattdessen bitte an Houston, um ein aktua
Wir haben den US-Weltraumrekord gebrochen. Und wir O3. Ich glaube, es war über CSQ, und sie wollten... dabei sein. Ich fragte sie: „Empfangen Sie alle unsere zeitlich festgelegten Daten?“ Sie sagten: „Perfekt.“ Ich sagte: „Warum können wir nicht einfach im Driftflug bleiben, mit abgeschalt
En veille. Oui, 2 Easy et G
シグマ・セブン、こちらはカナリー・キャップ通信です。UHF/HFで送信し
信じてください、あ
Хорошо, Джек. Продолжаем, всё в порядке, пока вы не дойдете до следующего шага — на следующей странице вы дойдёте до пункта «Проверьте индикатор расхода кислорода, увеличения нет». Мы хотели бы удалить всё, что находится ниже, до последнего шага, который называется «Освещение туннеля выключено». Поэтому, начиная с пункта «Только перед отстыковкой», удалите все строки до «Вентиляционный клапан туннеля» и далее до «Вентиляци
كلامك وا
Friendship Seven, ici Kano Cap Com. Je ne crois pas pouvoir vous recevoir, je passe la parole à Zanzib
صحيح. نحن نستخدم حلقة واحدة، 
حسنًا، الصفحة التالية، 16. هذا استكمال لنفس موضوع ا
Хорошо. Верно. Это Джим Ловелл. Сегодня мы решили немного рассказать вам о жизни внутри «Аполлона-8». Мы уже показали вам виды Луны, виды Земли, и решили пригласить вас к нам домой. Это наш дом, по крайней мере, уже 4 дня, как вы можете видеть на приборной панели. Мы отмечаем каждый день на приборной панели. Мы уже отработали четыре дня и работаем над пятым. Конечно, все мы с нетерпением ждём посадки в пятницу. Здесь, в той части космического корабля, которую мы называем нижним отсеком оборудования, находится советник президента по физической подготовке, капитан Джим Ловелл, который собирается выполнить программу упражнений, которую мы делаем каждый день. Вы заметили, что он очень свободно перемещается внутри. Он только что ударился головой об оптику, используемую для навигации. Он работает с тренажером, предназначенным для поддержания мышц в форме. Ещё одна очень важная функция нашего космического корабля — это компьютер, и я подумал, что вам будет интересно посмотреть, что у нас здесь есть: дисплеи, которые предоставляют нам всю информацию о работе двигателя, о навигации и о скорости, которую мы используем во время входа в атмосферу и торможения на околоземных орбитальных миссиях. Вы видите, что он управляется с помощью клавиатуры, похожей на пишущую машинку, и то, что происходит на ней, — это просто чудо. Он проделал для нас фантастическую работу, и Джим Ловелл отлично справился с его управлением. Ещё одна очень важная вещь, независимо от того, находитесь ли вы в космосе или на Земле, — это питание, и я попросил Билла Андерса показать вам, как мы питаемся здесь, в полёте. Извините за фотографию, пока мы будем двигаться и менять камеры. Вся используемая нами еда — эт
روجر، جيم. لدينا إجراء
제미니 4호, 하와이 CAP 
D'accord. Pourriez-vous réinitialiser l'attitude et réessayer une dernière
Premi il pulsante di arresto della pressione sanguigna, stiamo an
R
Roger. Au
روجر. 63-1 16 ساعة 56 دق
Roger, die Seite ist NC-7. Ich lese sie noch einmal. Dann weiter zur Längensteuerung für das
Und, Houston, während du darüber nachdenkst, überlege dir doch mal, ob du ein Verfahren entwickeln kannst, um vielleicht mit de
알겠습니다. 1257이 입력되면 엔터를 누르고, 그다음 252가 입력되면 엔터를 누르고, 다시 엔터를 누
I u
E Houston, potresti farci sapere se c'è la possibilità che l'orario di inizio venga posticipato ulteriormente, perché in un certo senso manterremo quell'orario di inizio. E se dovessi ritardare qualcosa, 
ठीक है, पृ
11, qui Houston. Ricevuto. Abbiamo terminato con gli uplink; il computer è tuo. Puoi andare al BLOCCO e 
We're on a maneuver to burn att
好的，比尔。这会写在你的飞行计划第2-22页。对于指令舱驾驶员——我已经跟他提过了——在页面顶部，大约在……的位置，我们希望他进行一次对准，然后按计划完成。这四颗星是南河三、轩辕十四和天象座α星，我们意识到天象座α星可能不太好找，轩辕十四在
حسنًا يا جاك. ارجع إلى إجراء شحن البطارية الذي شرحته لك. ولإيقاف الشحن، ما عليك سوى كتابة "فتح" أو "إيقاف" بجوار مفتاح الدائرة الذي أعطيتك إياه. في اللوحة 250، قاطع الدائرة الذي فتحته بالفعل؛ في اللوحة 275، طاقة العاكس 2 الرئيسية B، مفتوحة؛ اللوحة 5، مرحل البطارية BAT A، مفتوحة؛ وحدة الاستشعار AC BUS 2، مفتوحة، إشارة المستشعر AC2، مفتوحة؛ شاحن البطارية، الرئيسي B، مفتوح؛ طاقة التيار المتردد لشاحن البطارية، مفتوحة؛ شحن البطارية A لشاحن البطارية، مفتوح؛ وحدة التحكم في العاكس 2، مفتوحة؛ وحدة التحكم في العاكس 3، مفتوحة؛ لقد قمت بالفعل بربط ناقل التيار 
알았
Хорошо, Вэнс..., плюс 0833.0, минус 0050.9, 
ठीक है। एक और बात जो प्रवेश से कुछ समय पहले 
ロジャー、ヒューストン。コロンビア号…上
Very good, Gus; we'd like to get a blood pressur
罗杰，13-BRAVO； 146、03+32。 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 27 11. 56 46. 3+17, 8+36. 14-布拉沃：04+07、09+03。 15-布拉沃：121、02+34、14 10 30、8+35、16-布拉沃：096、02+03、15 50 26、11+28。 158、3+48、16 28 28、2+39、08+22。 17-布拉沃：087、01+51、17 
好的，杰克。我看看我有没有记下来。我们先像中途飞行时那样把目标指向地球，然后进行一次机身轴线对准。之后你
네, 멋지네요. 이분은 이 팀의 3
لقد قمت بضبط صمام تبريد دائرة البدلة على الوضع رقم 8 فقط للتبريد 
फिर आप माइनस 5 पूर्ण किए गए कार्यों की रिपोर्ट कर
لم أسمع أي شكاوى، ولكن لحظ
Tutto il r
Roger. Wir könne
Oh, I see. See if it's possible to see the reticle without the lig
Verstehen
알겠습니다. 104시간 후, 즉 지금으로부터 약 20시간에서 18시간 후에 중간 경로 수정을 고려하고 있는데, 속도는 초당 7피트밖에 되지 않습니다. 다른 옵션은 현재 속도를 유지하는 것입니다. 다시 진입하지 못할 수도 있기 때문입니다. 그래서 저희는 여러 가지 방안을 검토하고 있습니다. 그런데 현재로서는 거의 페어웨이 한가운데에 위치해 있다는 것을 알려드리고 싶었습니다. 중간 경로 수정 없이 현재 추적 결과 감마 값이 7.11로, 기존 값인 6.51보다 높습니다. 이미 목표 지점에 도달한 상태이며, 중심과 외곽 경계선 사이에서 단
Потерял 
وللعلم يا كولومبيا، أنتِ تقتربين من حدّ الاتصال المباشر عبر نطاق التردد العالي جدًا (VHF) مع قاعدة ترانكويليتي. سيستغرق الأمر 38 دقيقة و25 ثاني
Хорошо, Билл. Спасибо. Первый находится на ст
로저, 그 내용을 그들에게 전달
Wassermann, Houston. Nur 
Луна тольк
Ti ho messo su GRATIS com
Roger, Jim. Per quanto riguarda il tuo evaporatore, riteniamo che se la prossima volta dovessi riscontrare un problema simile sul lato posteriore esposto al sole, dovresti controllare la temperatura di uscita dell'evaporatore e, se supera i 60°C, concordiamo che sarebbe una buona idea aumentare la temperatura del circuito secondar
哥伦比亚，这里是休斯顿。估计位置为纬度加 0.7
मुझे गर्मी नहीं लग रही है। मैं बहुत आरामदायक महसूस कर रही 
Okay. That part's all right, Jack. And we had - about 11 or 12 steps for the command module. They go as is with no change. And then we had a couple of more procedures f
And, Joe, looks like a lot of - a lot of debris is just hanging out the side near the S
Und, Jack, wir möchten Sie bitten, die COMM-Konfiguration so zu belassen, bis wir die COMM
分かりました。何かあ
حسناً
نعم، أربع ساعات هذه المرة وأربع ساعات في المرة ال
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। यहाँ कुछ अंतिम समय के अपडेट हैं। प्रवेश के समय, हमने आपको कैमरे की दूरी 50 फीट पर सेट करने के 
Хоро
そうです、マイクさん。クワッドブラボーとクワッドチャーリーは現在オフになっていると思いますが、デッドバンドは5度です。夜間の睡眠時間はデッドバンド
Al
जब आप यह कर रहे हों, तो क्या कमांड पायलट मुझे बूस्टर के बारे
了解。どうですか
わかりました。星は20番と27番で、星の角度差は5球分、トルクをかける時間は10時
Bereit 
イベント タイマーはス
سأرتاح قليلاً
ठीक है। हमने बिजली चालू कर दी है और सब ठीक लग रहा है। मुझे एक चेतावनी और चेतावनी वाली बिजली की बत्ती दिख रही है, और सारे खतरे के संकेत दिख रहे हैं; और हमने दोनों X लूनर बस टाई ब्रेकर चालू कर दिए हैं। यूटिलिटी लाइटिंग ब्रेकर चालू है; फिर एसी बस बी हीलियम पीक्यूएस डिस्प्ले; एसी बस बी न्यूमेरिक लाइटिंग, और एसी बस बी इन्वर्टर 1 - बस टाई बंद है। फिर मैंने इन्वर्टर 1 ब्रेकर बंद कर दिया, और मैंने पैनल 16 पर सिग्नल कंसेंसर ब्रेकर चालू कर दिया है; मैंने इन्वर्टर 1 को चुना है और हीलियम मॉनिटर स्विच को सुपरक्रिट पर सेट कर दिया है,
了解。147プラス00、合計マイナス2.0%、つまり約マイナス14ポンド。アルファマイナス12.0、ブラボープラス10.0、マイナス3.0、マイナス2.0。水素合計マイナ
ठीक है। मुझे डर है कि तब तक एड सो चुक
わかりました。推進剤表示オーバーライド回路ブレーカーが閉じています
Oh, zut! Vous croiriez que la balle est en plein 
No, optional..
这里是Sigma Sev
Хорошо. Да, каждый раз, когда я бываю 
أرى لهيبًا أسودًا في الصحراء. يمكنك رؤية مصدره بوضوح. لم أتمكن من تحديد ماهيته بدقة، لكنه ترك أثرًا واضحًا جدًا على الأرض. التقطتُ عدة صور جوية باستخدام كاميرا S-5 أثناء عبورنا الطريق السريع 17. يبدو أن هناك خللًا في مخزن الفيلم رقم 7. يبدو أن أحد أجهزة التصوير لا يلتقط الفيلم بشكل صحيح أو أن الفيلم 
— Ja
收到。等您的升温速率降到足够低的水平后，
C'est exact; et sur le panneau 229: disjonct
Passaggio a ta
好的，我进行月球检查姿态机动
Hol mir besser das
Roger, Ed. Nous souhaitons que vous repreniez votre plan de vol normal. Nous nous basons sur le fait qu'il vous res
Ricevuto.
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフランク・ボーマンが同行します。彼らは太平洋軍司令官ジョン・シドニー・マケイン・ジュニア提督と共に、回収艦のブリッジから着水を見届けます。大統領はホーネット号での滞在後、アジア歴訪と予定されていたルーマニア訪問に出発します。ルナ15号は昨日、月を52周した後、「危機の海」に墜落したとみられています。ソ連の通信社TASSは、「月近傍空間における科学的」「研究」が行われたと報じました。ジョドレルバンク天文台のバーナード・ラベル卿は、ルナ15号が時速約300マイル（約480キロメートル）の速度で月面に衝突したと述べました。ベトナムでは最近、比較的静穏な状況が続いています。パトロール中の米兵が、飛行中の航空機に同調するトランジスタラジオを携帯しているのが目撃されました。ベトナムの軍のラジオ・テレビネットワークは、このミッションを全面的に報道しました。スエズ運河沿いでは、エジプトとイスラエルの間で小競り合いが依然として続いています。国連監視団は、この動きを阻止しようとしています。ワシントンでは、下院歳入委員会が、27.5%の石油枯渇許容量を20%に削減することを決議しました。ここヒューストン地域では、何度か雨が降っています。今日は曇りで、にわか雨が降る見込みです。スポーツに関しては、先ほども述べたように、オールスター ゲームが今夜開催されます。昨日は試合がありませんでした。昨夜ニューヨークで、全米野球記者協会がベーブ ルースを史上最高の野球選手に、ジョー ディマジオを現存する最高の野球選手に選びました。選手たちを称える夕食会で、フランク ボーマンが発表を行いました。ジョー ネイマス選手は、ニューヨーク ジェッツのトレーニング キャンプで丸一日を過ごしました。ブロードウェイ ジョーに触ろうとした約 500 人の子供達を 5 人の警官が制止するのに苦労しました。彼は気分は良く、ウィーブ ユーバンク コーチの許可があれば 8 月 1 日のオールスター ゲームに出場すると述べました。カービルのオイラーズのキャンプは昨日雨になりましたが、トレーニングは続行されました。軽傷者は数名いましたが、大したことはありません。ウォーリー レム コーチは、これまでのトレーニングに満足しています。オイラーズはバッファローとのプレシーズンゲームに3万人以上の観客動員を見込んでいます。ドン・メレディスの引退発表も、特にここヒューストンではファンの熱狂に水を差すことはないようです。マリオ・アンドレッティは日曜
Okay. Sie
そして13
We want to transfer some power - I want
Wir analysieren den Wasserverbrauch sehr genau. Aktuell deutet alles darauf hin, dass w
Stehen z
Аврор
Х
仔细想想，既然那样会影响续航里程，我想我们最好还是别这么做。目前
Das war's im Großen und Ganzen mit den Welt- und nationalen Nachrichten und Reportagen. Auf der Sportseite wurde Hank Stram von den Kansas City Chiefs zum AFL-Trainer des Jahres gekürt. Dies ist seine zweite Auszeichnung in drei Saisons. Die Wahl erfolgte durch ein Gremium der Associated Press, bestehend aus 30 Sportjournalisten und -kommentatoren, drei aus jeder Stadt. Der ihm am nächsten stehende war Weeb Ewbank. Weitere nominierte Trainer waren Sid Gilman aus San Diego und Lou Sabin aus Denver. Was das Shriners College All-Star-Spiel gestern angeht, so besiegte der Norden den Süden mit 3:0. Dick Berlinsky von Michigan State erzielte im ersten Viertel ein Field Goal aus 23 Yards, und das reichte dem Norden, um den Süden am Mittwoch im Shriners College All-Star-Footballspiel zu schlagen. Interessant sind dabei die First Downs: Norden 19, Süden 16; Laufspiel: Norden 214, Süden 169; Das Passspiel endete mit 96:109 für
ولديّ نجمة انحراف احتياطية لك لـ Retrofire ناقص 4 دقائق. سيكون Sirius على بعد
좋아요. 왼쪽에는 공간이 넉넉하
そして、とてもきれいな月の入りがありまし
맞습니다, 잭. 1번부터 3번까지의 스위치는 변경 사항이 없습니다. 이제 1번부터 4번까지 살펴보겠습니다. 나머지 세 개의 패널 2 스위치는 변경 사항이 없습니다. 패널 3에서는 첫 번째, 두 번째, 세 번째, 네 번째 스위치는 그대로 두고, 연료 전지 히터(FUEL CE
了解
ठीक है। कर दूंगा। जिम, मुझे एक छोटा सा काम औ
了解。3-1 
روجر، نيل. بدايةً: تتوالى رسائل التهنئة على مهمة أبولو 11 إلى البيت الأبيض من قادة العالم طوال اليوم. ومن بين أحدثها برقيات من رئيس الوزراء البريطاني هارولد ويلسون وملك بلجيكا. وقد هيمنت أخبار أبولو 11 على الصحافة العالمية. ويُقدّر بعض الصحفيين أن أكثر من 60% من الأخبار التي نُشرت في الصحف في جميع أنحاء البلاد اليوم كانت متعلقة بمهمتكم. وقالت صحيفة نيويورك تايمز، التي كما ذكرنا سابقًا، شهدت إقبالًا كبيرًا على طبعتها اليوم (على الرغم من أنها طُبعت منها 950 ألف نسخة)، إنها ستعيد طباعة العدد كاملًا يوم الخميس كطبعة تذكارية. وقد أرسل رئيس الوزراء أليكسي كوسيجين تهانيه لكم وللرئيس 
Okay. Und au
アポロ11号。了解
ठीक है। हम यह जानकारी आगे
我们已经开始提供一些时间信息了。我们认为很快就能提供更准确的信息。但看起来您的水质
Roger, Houston – Ici Houston. Pourriez-vous couper le disjoncteur de l'am
Oh, sorry about that. Incidentally, Fred, if switching OMNIs every couple of minutes bugs you, you can skip it for now. We can always wait
Ti dico che non ho 
حسنًا، الأكسجين. لديك 44 رطلاً متبقية. بمعدل استهلاك 0.36 رطل في الساعة، يتبقى لديك 120 ساع
ジェミニ4、カナリアC
Ok. Esaminando le previsioni meteo che ti ho fornito, i 600 metri di dislivello nel punto di destinazione potrebbero avere uno strato di 1800 metri di dislivello al di sopra. Al punto di massima risalita, avrai più o meno la stessa situazione, e l'altimetro è lo stesso lungo tutta la catena. Man mano che ti sposti verso est, i
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 제 상태는 최상입니다. 현재 캡슐
La cosa principale a cui dobbiamo pensa
Jim, abbiamo appena esaminato i tuoi punteggi in termini di precisione e si stima che si collochino entro un paio di millesimi di grado dall'ot
Я ещё не слышал, чтобы срабатывали какие-либо пиротехнические устройства для изоляции от пиротехнических за
夏威夷地面控制中心，我将开始向您提交一份标准报告。我已进入自动反向姿态。陀螺仪正常，机动已关闭，所有系统
Eintrag wie folgt: Mittelpazifik, 357 152 359 268, plus 0813, minus 165 03 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028, NA 4 Mal, mit TO 400 0207 0025 0333 0816 16 0590 312, Zeta Persei, auf 165, rechts 34, aufwärts. Anmerkungen: Nichtausstiegsmuster verwenden. Zeta Persei liegt zwischen Mi
わかりました。マイナス6時間半から始めてください。パッドとパッドをもう一度用意してください。コピーしてもいいですか？これは私が読み上げます。以上です。
روجر. فهمت قصدك جيدًا، وبصوت عالٍ وواضح. - لا يزال لديّ حوالي 3 غرامات. أداء الكبسولة ممتاز. معدل ال
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। ऐसा लगता है कि हम पिच और यॉ दोनों में काफी गलत दिशा 
Okay. Sembra una buona idea. Ken, immagino ch
휴스턴, 달을 촬영할 수 있도록 짐벌 각도를 좀 알려주시겠어요? 이번 여행 내내 달을 한 번도 못 봤는데, 지금 우리 쪽에서 달이 어느 방향인지
انتقل إلى OMNI B
Roger. We have it stabilized about 53 degrees, and we will leave it there, but we will go back AUTO if you start having any concern about the radi
पैनल 250 पर ठीक है, सीबी बैट ए पावर, एंट्री और पोस्टलैंडिंग, बंद; बैट बी पावर एंट्री और पोस
太平洋からケベック沿岸警備隊の海域に00時に雲が迫ってくる様子を、絞りf/11、絞り150でS-5で撮影しました。フレーム番号は28です。S-5用に数枚撮影しています。ちょうど熱帯暴風雨カーラのエリアにいます。今は雲が厚く垂れ込めています。雲の形をいくつか撮影します。雲の上には、とても興味深い模様が織り交ぜられています。カメラが捉えてくれるかもしれません。とても明るいので、絞り250、絞り16で撮影します。28、29がフレームになり、さらに少なくとも2枚撮影します。30、31です。嵐のエリア
روجر. في واشنطن، وافقت لجنة المالية في مجلس الشيوخ على تمديد الضريبة الإضافية على الدخل، لكن يبدو أن تصويت مجلس الشيوخ على مشروع القانون مستبعد حاليًا. في أوستن، رُشِّح عضو مجلس النواب عن ولاية تكساس، راي ليمون، من هيوستن، لمنصب المدير الوطني للجمعية الأمريكية لعلوم المحيطات. وقد اقترح ليمون دراسة إمكانية إنشاء معهد لعلوم المحيطات في تكساس، ليكون أول معهد من نوعه في غرب خليج المكسيك. في مينيابوليس، مينيسوتا، أشار مكتب الأرصاد الجوية، بعد استعراضه لأحوال الطقس اليوم التي تُظهر درجة حرارة عظمى تبلغ 88 درجة فهرنهايت وصغرى تبلغ 72 درجة فهرنهايت، إلى "انعدام تساقط الثلوج". من سانت بطرسبرغ، فلوريدا، ورد تقرير إذاعي من المستكشف النرويجي، ثور هايردال، يفيد بأن طاقم سفينته المصنوعة من ورق البردي، "را"، سيبحر إلى بريدجتاون، بربادوس، على الرغم من الأضرار التي لحقت بها جراء الأمواج العاتية. ومع ذلك، سينام الطاقم على متن سفينة مرافقة. قال نورمان بيكر، ملاح الرحلة، إن الطاقم كان على متن سفينة "را" اليوم لإصلاح الأضرار الناجمة عن العواصف التي ضربت المنطقة الأسبوع الماضي، والتي تسببت في انقسام قاعدة الصاري. وقد أُلقي جزء من الصاري المكسور في البحر، وكانت السفينة على بعد 725 ميلاً شرق باربادوس. وأضا
로저입니다. 케이프에서는 운전 스위치를 보조(S
Хорошо. В левой части страницы 28, в самом низу, зачеркните «Цель для фотосъемки 5 север, 5,6
هذه مركبة فريندشيب 7. نظام الإطلاق العكسي التلقائي مُعطّل. مُحدد الوضع طبيعي، وأمر التحكم في السرعة، والجيروسكوب طبيعيان. جميع مقابض "T" في وضعها الصحيح باستثناء الوضع اليدوي، وهو مُعطّل. أتحكم يدويًا حاليًا. مفتاح حقيبة الهبوط مُعطّل. لوحة التسلسل طبيعية تمامًا باستثناء ذلك. نسبة الوقود المُتحكم به تتراوح ب
알겠습니다. 조용히 하려고 하시는 걸 알고 있으니, 제가 정보를 좀 읽어 드리겠습니다. 방금 알아낸 정보 중 하나는, 산소 극저온 탱크가 고장 나더라도 현재 80파운드(약 36kg)의 산소가 남아 있다는 점입니다. 현재 단일 탱크 운용의 제한 요소는 수소 탱크인데, 표준 프로필을 기준으로 약 143시간 
موقع علبة LMP - علبة LMP موجودة على اللوحة الآن، وعلبة CDR موجودة
ठीक है। हम 3 g's पढ़ रहे हैं, लगता है इस बार हमें रीएंट्री डैम्पिंग चेक को छोड़ना पड़ेगा। अब रीडिंग 4 g's है। रीएंट्री ठीक चल रही है। ऑक्स डैम्पिंग रेट्स को संभाल रहा है। मुझे नह
了解。も
Nein. Ich verst
ठीक है। मैं आपसे थोड़ी बात करना चाहता था, जिम की वजह से उड़ान योजना में कुछ बदलाव हुए हैं। क्या 
نحن في وضع التسجيل المستمر. سن
في حال لم تحصل على احترا
R
Eh bien, le REACQ n'a pas fonctionné comme prévu. Il a semblé dépasser la limite de balayage et atteindre la limite mécanique, tout en suivant du 
Roger. Vous pouvez rester là pour le moment. Quand nous partirons, nous aimerions que vous vo
حسنًا يا جيم، لقد نسخنا ذلك. أولًا، عليك اتباع إجراءات التشغيل الدقيقة لكل قاطع دائرة على حدة قبل عملية الحرق التالية، ونحن نعمل على ذلك. ثانيًا، أنت بحاجة إلى إجراء لإعادة تشغيل وحدة التحكم عند الحاجة إلى إعادة الدخول 
Houston, Eagle. The 
了解。とても短いバーンだったね。フレッド、機会があればパネル全体をざっと見てほしい。ジャックとジムを
好的，我们再
はい。これでディスプレイ/エンジン、オーバーライ
Ho proceduto troppo lentamente, dubito che ce la faremo. Oh, g
Okay, der letzte Teil lautete also: Die „125“ durchstreichen und „1/8“ einfügen. Stimmt d
我们测得二氧化碳分压为 4.2 毫米汞柱。我们可以继续使用二次气体，直到二氧化碳分压
好的。
로저. 한 가지 더 말씀드리자면, 알려주신 제
سنكون على أهبة الاستعداد إذا احتجت إل
أبولو 8، هيوستن. درجة الحرارة طبيعية. بل إنها أدفأ قليلاً مما توقعنا، لذا فأنتم في وضع جيد للغ
Got it
L'endroit semble lisse, mais je n'ai rien vu. J'ai simplement repéré un cratère bien v
Хорошо. Отличн
War
Хорошо. Джим только
Роджер
नहीं, ऐसा नहीं है। मुझे लगता है कि हम मिडकोर्स करेक्शन से पहले वॉटर बॉयलर की जाँच करने पर विचार कर रहे हैं। कोल्डसोक प्रक्रिया में भी वॉटर बॉयलर का उपयोग होता है, लेकिन यह प्रवेश से ठीक पहले किया जाएगा जब ये चीज़े
Ich hätte gerne die Heliumtemperat
Houston, manteniamo l'inerzia per un po' di tempo per studiare l'avvicinamento alla zona di atterrag
不，我不会说那一定是裸露出来的材料。我认为有些材料可能被烘烤过，或者以某种方式变得更粘稠，或许还会以某种方式融合在一起，我也不确定。现在，
Okay. Stand by. If we configure the
ヒューストン、参考までに言うと、ヌンキと、
Alpha/Pc to Pc; LAUNCH VEHICLE INDICATOR to GPI; GIMBAL DRIVE PITCH and YAW to AUTO; EVENT TIMER RESET, up; EVENT TIMER START to STOP; EVENT TIMER MINUTES, SECONDS to center; POSTLANDING VENT valve, push; PROBE EXTEND/RELEASE to OFF; EXTEND/RELEASE talkbacks, two of them, gray; 
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。その通りです。ノイズは多少ありましたが、か
D'accord. Votre dos est appuyé contre le sac. Parfait. Maintenant, il est dessus. En avant et en haut; vous êtes dégagé. Un peu vers moi. Tout droit en bas, un peu à gauche. Il y a largement assez de place. Neil, vous êtes bien aligné. Un peu vers moi, en bas. D'accord. Vous êtes déga
罗杰。你的地平线支票进展
- - V
Or
Роджер. Хантсвилл, это «Сигма Семь». Слышу вас хорош
Sagen Sie das bitte nochmal. Sie wollen, dass wir Batterie 2 ausschalten und sie ausgeschaltet lassen, bis Sie sie 
お
لا تزال شركة جنرال كرافت قلقة بعض الشيء بشأن وقود السيارات. استخدم
अभी इसे देखते हुए, इस वक्त। यह एक... त्रिभुज है। मुझे लगता है कि मैं तीनों तारामंडल स्पष्ट रूप से देख सकता हूँ।... और वेगा। वास्तव मे
Ich habe dich laut und deutlich verstanden. Wir haben recht g
ठीक है। "केवल
なかなか良いね、フレ
ओह, क्या सच में? मुझे ख
11番、ヒューストン。誰が電話に出てるんだろ
罗杰
它确实给我们
Okay. It will be about two minutes before we start it. So you
अब आप ठीक हैं। आगे
11 40 41 ه
ठीक है, बिल। मुझे लगता है कि मैं 4 के लिए ऑनबोर्ड स्टेट वेक्टर का उपयोग करने के बारे में अपनी आखिरी बात को टालना चाहता हूँ। ज़मीन पर इसका और अधिक अध्ययन करने के बाद, उन्हें 's बनाने और अपनी सभी गणनाएँ करने में जुट जाना होगा, और इसे टालने या दो बार करने के बजाय, हम उन प्रक्रियाओं के साथ आगे बढ़ेंगे जिनका हम शुरू से उपयोग करते आ रहे हैं। चंद्र कक्षा के बारे में, हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं और हमारे कई लोग - जैक श्मिट और उनकी टीम पीछे के कमरे में - यह देख रहे हैं कि आपकी खिड़कियों का क्या प्रभाव पड़ता है। और, मूल रूप से, ऐसा लगता है कि दो विकल्प हैं जो उस 2 पर प्रभाव डालेंगे। एक विकल्प, निश्चित रूप से, यह होगा 
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. McDonald's a activé son laser. Pourriez-vous jete
休斯顿，阿波罗8号。你
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. We have your temperature. You can start your blood pressu
Guaymas, qui è Gemelli 4.
حسنًا. بالنسبة لبطارياتك - كانت البطارية A بسعة 39.32 أمبير/ساعة، والبطارية B بسعة 35.21، والبطارية C بسعة 38.46. كانت كميات التبريد المتبقية هي نفسها التي زودناك بها سابقًا، 180 رطلًا من الأكسجين لكل خزان و11 رطلًا من الهيدروجين لكل خزان. حاليًا، باستخدام قيم الكمبيوتر للكميات، فإن وحدة الخدمة لديك تحتوي على 45% من الوقود في الخزان A، و50% في الخزان Bravo، و58% في الخزان Charlie، و48% في الخزان Delta. ما نخطط لفعله بالخزانات الثانوية هو تشغيلها عند 37% من الكمية الفعلية، وفي حالة فقدان الاتصال أو ما شابه، نوصي باستخدام 50% من القياسات الداخلية كوقت لتشغيل الوقود الثانوي. مع ذلك، طالما يمكننا استخ
جميلة حقاً. أتمنى أن تكون قد التقطت بعض 
, Hawai
Nachdem ich mit dem Ausrichten begonne
Roger, Columbi
FDR。プラットフォームはそのままにしておいてください。レート
Okay. Wir haben si
我们想向右
ठीक है, पृष्ठ 17 पर। लोड को माइनस 4 मिनट पर सेट करें; यह CB(11), इन्वर्टर 
Oh! Vous savez une chose: voyez-vous, je ne vous 
Roger. What ki
ठीक है। प्रक्रिया इस प्रकार है:,, एंटर; 1331, एंटर; 7, एंटर; और एंटर। स्पष्टीकरण इस प्रकार है। इस दौरान, एक बार ऐसा हुआ जब ऑप्टिक्स ज़ीरो स्विच को ज़ीरो पर करने के लगभग 16 सेकंड बाद कंप्यूटर में दर्ज किया गया। यह एक बहुत ही असामान्य विसंगति है क्योंकि, यदि आप ऑप्टिक्स को ज़ीरो करने के लगभग 16 सेकंड बाद -0.4 सेकंड के अंतराल के दौरान ऐसा करते हैं, तो कुछ OPT-मोड बिट्स रीसेट हो जाते हैं; और इसका मतलब यह होगा कि, यदि आपका OCDU विफल हो जाता है, तो इसका संकेत नहीं मिलेगा; इसलिए यह प्रक्रिया केवल इन तीन बिट्स को उनकी सह
Okay. Die Zeit ist – das Ereignis findet um statt; und wir sollen die folgend
Affermativo, abbiamo completato il test. Vi daremo i dati tra un secondo. Abbiamo superato il controllo stellare del sestante in assetto di ingresso e in questo momento stiamo manovrando per il n
Die Sprachqualität ist momentan nicht optimal, und die Leitstellenmitarbeiter haben nicht alles verstanden. Könnten Sie bitte zwei bis drei Minuten warten? Wir tauschen dann die OMNI-Antennen, und anschließend sollten wir 
로저. 프랭크, 
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. ننصحك بحذف اختبار الضبط، واختبار الجيمبال/الخانق - فقط تأكد من إغلاق قواطع الدائرة ا
Und ob! Ich sehe alles an diesem
Bon, Jack, pendant que Fred range mon casque, 
D'accord, Houston. La Lune est essentiellement grise, sans couleur; elle ressemble à du plâtre ou à une sorte de sable grisâtre et profond. On distingue assez bien les détails. La Mer de la Fertilité est moins visible ici que sur Terre. Le contraste avec les cratères environnants est moins marqué. Ces cratères sont tous arrondis. Il y en a un bon nombre; certains sont plus récents. Beaucoup d'entre
まだ地上で私たちにできる限りの指揮を執ってもらいたいで
Houston. Stand
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Я переключился на электронное управление, чтобы контролировать самолет точнее. Проблема началась сразу после прибытия в Гуаймас, и, похоже, самолет начинает отклоняться от курса вправо примерно на 1° в секунду. Он переходит в положение примерно на 20°, удерживает его, а когда достигает этой точки, переходит в режим ориентации и возвращается к нулю. В этом режиме он постоянно переключается туда-обратно. Сейчас я использую электронное управление и управляю самолетом вручную. Конец связ
ठीक है। अब आप मुझे कैसे सम
11. Houston. Buzz, suchst du i
Ok, vado su Catch-Up e 
Ok, Jac
Bonjour, Apollo 11, Houston. Nous avons visionné la deuxième manœuvre d'allumage. Tout semble s'être très bien passé. Tous les systèmes ont fonctionné correctement. Nous avons réussi à nous placer en orbite avec un suivi limité, à 65,4°
알겠습니다. 전원을 연결했는데 괜찮아 보였습니다. 그
Это, по сути, тот уровень чистоты, который нам обычно т
Base Tranquility, Houston. À mon signal, lancez le compte à rebours de votre évén
Хорошо, мы это приняли. У нас состоялось обсуждение. Оставайтесь на
Cuff is full-scal
برج الجوزاء 4، هاواي، استعدوا لمد
現時
Les faisce
よし、ケン。さて、アティチュードの話に戻りましょう。最初のロールで、この高ゲインREACQテストを実施しましょう
这是友谊七号。它向右漂移大约20度，然后受到一个强脉冲
收到，哥伦比亚。高增益模式下
11, Houston. On est en mode haute tension. Vous pouvez vous échauffer maintenant si vous voulez. Termi
تشير مؤشرات قوة الإشارة إلى أننا قد نكون عالقين في نطاق جانبي باستخدام هوائي عالي الكسب. نرجو منك الانتقال إلى وضع 
हाँ, लेकिन यह 48 होना चाहिए था। मुझे नहीं पता कि यह 50 क्यों आया। क्या हमे
Roger. Bereitmachen, Woom
لا بد لي من توجيه تحياتي إلى جميع أبناء منطقتنا. إن حقي
حسنً
मैं ज़रूर करूँगा। और चलिए देखते हैं, हम आपको बताना चाहते थे कि इस बार बैटरी चार्ज बहुत अच्छा है। यह बिल्कुल किताब में दी गई बैटरी जैसी दिखती है, और मैं चाहता हूँ कि आप बंद करने से पहले बैटरी का C वोल्टेज माप ल
Okay. Are you going to give—you want me to give Texas a mark when you start burn
Roger, potremmo avere un altro controllo della pressione, per favore? Non ho ricevuto l'ultimo. Il tuo (area di recupero) 5-1 TORF 
Joe, was zeigst du d
D'accord. C'est une procédure en une dizaine d'étapes, mais très simple. D'accord. Sur le disjoncteur 16, ONDULEUR 2, fermez. Sur le disjoncteur 11, BUS CA A BUS TIE ONDULEUR 
Buzz, la visuale attraverso la tua spalla destra/sinistra è così buona che possiamo vedere la copertura del motore di risalita, il velcro su di essa, ed è tutto c
Möchten Sie die IVI-Prüfungen a
Когда я поставил тебе этот знак — когда я поставил тебе этот знак, — на этом всё закончил
11, ici Houston. Pendant votre manœuvre, pourriez-vous nous fournir une m
मान लीजिए, जब मैं जैक को छोड़कर जाती थी, फ्रेड आता था और हम लगभग एक घंटे तक खाना खाते थे, फिर मैं सो
罗杰。你的轨道衰减速度没有我们预期
好的。我们将在格林威治标准时间 02:15 发布新的 D-8。我们删除了多
Зарядите батарею А. Роджер
Ok. Prima un commento. A metà pagina finisce la parte relativa alla luce zodiacale, appena sotto
Хорошо. Это дает нам хорошую платформу. Теперь они будут маневрировать, чтобы з
제 생각엔 그 말이
Okay, Apollo 8. Damit ist unser Kommunikationstest abgeschlossen. Vielen Dank für Ihre Mitarbeit. Ich habe hier eine Änderung bei den Navigationssignalen, die gleich angezeigt werden. Und wir möchten Ihren Stern dort 
了解。あり
Apollo 8, Houston. L
نود منك الانتقال إلى
Roger. It should be the second step in that procedure. A
بما أننا لسنا كذلك - ليس واضحًا لي أننا لم نواجه توقفات ميكانيكية لفترة من الوقت في المرة السابقة. قد يفسر ذلك 10 دقائق من تلك الـ 15 دقيقة، ولا جدوى من 
Et nous aurons bientôt les fonctions restantes dans le plan de vol. Terminé
현재 기체는 우측으로 초당 1도씩 회전하고 있습니다. 피치는 초당 0도, 롤은 초당 0.75도입니다. 
Окно док-станции. Понял. Мне только что передали 
العدسة معطلة في هذه الصورة... ومختلة في تلك... وا
روجر
Okay. In answer to the battery-charging questions, I calculate it should be fully charged at. Play t
Unse
मुझे पृथ्वी पर उस बिंदु के बारे में एक टिप्पणी मिली है जहाँ से सूर्य क
Ich fürchte, das habe ich nicht mitbekommen, Fred, und während ich zuhörte, sagte er mir, dass er gerne noch einmal den Ak
Okay, Jim. Ver
Gemini 4, Хьюстон, CAP COM. Сообщите мне ваш
음, 양방향 잠금은 해
حسنًا. نعم، سنجربها بال
Wally, ich kann sehen, dass deine seitlichen Triebwerke etwa 40 Fuß 
네, 알겠습니다. 확인했습니다. 짐, 다른 정보가 있는지 볼까요? 미드코스-2는 초속 약 23피트로 예상되며, 역행 방향으로 예정대로 이동하고 있습니다. 현재 매우 안정적인 상태입니다. 참고로, 아직 확정된 수치가 아니니 받아 적으실 필요는 없지만, 영향 지점은 남위 약 8.57도, 서경 약 33.9도로 예상됩니다. 이는 비행 계획 값보다 약간 서쪽, 남쪽으로 치우친 수치입니다. 속도는 약 77에 51을 더한 값으로 예상보다 약간 빠릅니다. 착륙 패드는 
わかり
Вы готовы скопиро
Okay. E il passaggio 8 è "Spegnimento secondo la checklist di emergenza Po
Значение яркости для черно-белой пленки составляет 13 при чувствительности ASA 64. Устанавливаю значение яркости 13. Делаю снимок номер 7 с фильтром. Южноамериканский континент сложно фотографировать из-за погодных условий. Сейчас сделаю панораму. Начинаю примерно через 8 часов. На самом деле, так и будет. МАРКТ, 7, 8, 9 черные фотографии, черно-белая пленка. Десять фотографий, черно-белая пленка. Снимки делаются на выдержке 250 5.6 (1/250 секунды и f5.6) на бесконечность. Снимаю снимок номер 11, смотрю влево. В этот момент я пересекаю южноамериканский континент. В поле зрения большая река. Делаю снимок, направив камеру как можно ниже. Думаю, окно капсулы получилось очень удачным. Вернусь к B-1. Сделал первые 12 снимков. Нахожусь на B-1, снимаю полосы облаков. Я снял B-2, и все эти снимки черно-белые, с фильтром метеорологического бюро. Я сделаю последние фотографии из этой серии. На этом снимки метеорологического бюро заканчиваются. Думаю, мы сде
मुझे चंद्रमा के मानचित्र
아폴로 8호, 
ويفيدو
ठीक है, जिम। यह एक अच्छा विचार है, और हमने इस पर विचार किया है, और यह संभव प्रतीत होता है। इसलिए जब भी हमें ऐसा करने की आवश्यकता होगी, ह
रॉजर। हमें
Роджер, Майк. Это ориентир Альфа 1: Т1, 82 37 35; Т2
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。你们的系统一切正常。96分钟时收到飞行计划更新，可以删除
Oui. J'ai trouvé que j'étais très à l'aise, et la marche es
Espérons
स्थानीय समाचारों में एक और छोटी सी खबर: हंट्सविले स्थित काउंटी कोर्ट हाउस कल सुबह भोर से पहले जलकर राख हो गया, इसलिए लगता है कि अब वहां निर्माण कार्य फिर से शुरू करना पड़ेगा। प्रतीक्षा कर रहे परिवारों के बारे में एक छोटी सी जानकारी। यह पोस्ट रिपोर्टर ऐन जेम्स द्वारा है। क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या पर वैलेरी एंडर्स ने कहा, "हम चंद्रमा के पिछले हिस्से पर आराम कर रहे हैं," जब वह और उनका परिवार अपोलो 8 के चंद्रमा की कक्षा से बाहर निकलने और घर की ओर लौटने का इंतजार कर रहे थे। श्रीमती एंडर्स मंगलवार की सुबह 12 बजे से घर पर थीं, और पड़ोसियों ने सभी बच्चों को इकट्ठा कर लिया था ताकि परिवार को कुछ आराम मिल सके जब तक कि अंतरिक्ष यान चंद्रमा के पीछे है और संचार से बाहर है। कर्नल फ्रैंक बोरमैन के घर को बाहर चार बड़े सदाबहार फूलों की मालाओं से सजाया गया था और उस पर हल्की बर्फ गिरी हुई थी और लाल धनुषों से सजाया गया था। बैठक में एक पेड़ उनके सुरक्षित लौटने की प्रतीक्षा कर रहा है, और उनकी सुंदर गोरी पत्नी सू और हट्टे-कट्टे ब
Je le crois, Ken. Cette bande est parallèle à la ligne M, et je pense que c'est lié à la conce
ええと、COAS（陸軍特殊部隊）のダストカバーも同じ
素晴らしい仕事をしていますね。ジム、プラットフォームの電源が入っている間に、ここの加速度計のバイアスをハックしてみましたが、問題なさそうで
내 생각엔 12시간 정도 걸린 것 같네. 이제 로모틸 한 알 먹을 시간이지? 음, 
はい。締め付け時間は5時間30分40秒
حسنًا. الصورة التي أعطاني إياها جيم عن رؤيته من خلال القمر الصناعي كانت داخل - جزء من الأرض، الجزء المضاء يقع في النصف العلوي من القمر الصناعي مع وجود نقطة ا
我们在大约179英里处锁定了目标，雷达波束指向大约在156英里处；指针相对稳定，看起来不错。偏航指针来回摆动，大概正负1度。这里需要说明的是，我们遇到的问题是消除残差。我们把残差降到一个很
Non preoccuparti di svegliarlo p
Das ist
Okay. Looking on entry 1: the second item there is the 12-hour Kelvin cold soak, and in discussions I here and preflight, I think it is agreed that we don't want to do the cold soak there. So we are going to delete that step 2. And what it amounts to is, I think we do want to do a cold soak, and we certainly want to exercise the water boilers prior to entry in order to insure that we don't have one that is dried out, in the same manner that we had one dried o
C'est négatif, Jack. Nous n'avons pas encore activé la liaison descendante. Vous devrez vous charger vous-même de cette opération et de la pressurisation du module
こ
जी हां, ज
Okay. Gut. Mach weite
로저. 이제 앞으로 어떤 일들이 일어날지 알겠네요. 제리, 블록 데이터를 수집하고 정렬 작업을 한 다음 지구-달 궤
Aquarius, Houston. Il va falloir mettre en marche la climatisation pour que vous puissiez prendre une mesure. Fermez les quatre disjoncteurs de l'onduleur de bus (panneau 11). Fermez le disjon
Okay. Ich werde einfach versuchen, unseren Schatten die ganze Zeit von ih
Beh, quella 
ジェミニ4号、
申し訳ありませんが、+ 4 と言
자, 기내식에 대해 한마디 하고 싶네요. 지금까지 제가 물을 담아본 오렌지 주스 봉지, 그러니까 오렌지 주스든 파인애플 주스든, 아니면 그냥 오렌지 주스든 어떤 형태로든 담아본 모든 봉지에서 물 밸브가 새더라고요. 지금까지 물이 새는 봉지는 딱 하나밖에 없었는데, 벌써 비행시간이 60시간이 넘었네요. 오렌지 주스 봉지마다 물이 새는 문제가 있었어요. 그리고
まあ、それはそうなるでし
Vance, Joe a évoqué l'alignement à moins 2 plus 30. Alliez-vous envoyer un messa
डायरेक्ट मोड में सब ठीक है। हमने आरसीएस की पूरी तरह से जांच नहीं की है। कुछ समय पहले इसे चालू करने का
Gardez vot
あ
ケン、こちらはフラン
嗯，这不仅仅是
Roger. Si vous savez lire, éteignez vot
Bon, je jette un œil à l'adaptateur et à l'équipement là-bas. Je vois le plan de séparation; il est impeccable. Les propulseurs sont propres. La peinture thermique et les bandes thermiques sont en très bon état. De plus, le velcro que no
يا رجل، أقول لك،
Это 
계속하시겠습니까? 그대로 적어 두세요. 자르지
シグマ・セブン、シグマ・セブン。ケープ・コム・テック、ケープ・コム・テッ
알
روجر، تشارلي. أودّ إطلاعكما على آخر مستجدات عملية الكلورة. في الحجرة B4، لدينا 8 جيوب لأمبولات الكلور والمحلول المنظم، منها - دعني أصحح ذلك. لدينا 7 جيوب، واحد منها فارغ وكان كذلك دائمًا، مما يترك 6 جيوب متبقية. على الجانب الآخر هناك في B7، لدينا حاوية أخرى بها 7 جيوب، أي أن لدينا 7 بالإضافة إلى 6، وهذه مملوءة بـ 6 أ
はい。すべてはデク
알겠습니다. 구조대에 연락
ठीक ह
罗杰。我们这里有两个齿轮，拉动把手来回转动时它们会跟着转。其中一个齿轮有点像棘轮，它
알겠습니다. 그 부분에 대해
बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। वह कविता बहुत अच्छी थी; लेकिन दौड़ जीतने के लिए आपको
روجر. نود أن نعرف ما إذا كنت قد جربت الإجراء الذي تم تقديمه لك عبر CSQ على جهاز الكمب
Roger. Nous attend
Now 
HFで最後に話していた局は特定できませんでした。非常にクリアな音声で、カプセルに記録されているはずです。記録
알겠습니다, 버즈. 비행 계획 항목에 대한 몇 가지 업데이트 사항부터 말씀드리겠습니다. 먼저 6번 중간 코스는 취소했습니다. 대기하세요. 오늘 아침에는 조금 더 시간을 드리겠습니다. 비행 계획의 두 번째 항목은 BATT B 충전을 언제든지 원하실 때 할 수 있도록 준비되어 있다는 것입니다. 세 번째 항목은 이번에는 폐수 배출 방식을 조금 다르게 하고 싶습니다. 지상에서 표시해 둔 지점에서 배출하려고 합니다. 기체가 약간 불안정한 상태라서, 기체가 적절한 상태를 유지할 수 있는 시
君たちの「グリーン」の味方だ。君たち
Houston, A
أبول
Passaggi
了解。
ठीक है, फ्रेड। ये 
Хорошо. Мы бы хотели — ребята из SPAN говорят, что, по их мнению, один подойдет к шлему, который будет в B1, а другой можно будет прикрепить к шлему Майка, котор
了解しました。11. バッテリー充電に関するご質問ですが、おそらく個々のバッテリーの個体差によるものだと思います。また、今回の場合は起動時の過渡現象のようなものが解消されたようです。他に影響する可能性のある要因としては、バッテリー温度などが考えられます。EECOMMは
That's dange
姿勢は良好です。間違いありません。ヨー角は潜望鏡で確認できます。しかも、非常に迅速に捕捉できます。また、
Roger, 11. Neil, deine Verbindung ist etwas schwach. Deine Signale sind zwar laut, aber ab und zu unterbrochen. Vom Boden aus sieht dein Raumschiff einwandfrei aus. Wir haben bemerkt, dass du dich im Cockpit bewegt hast und dachten
Gemini 4, Guaymas CAP 
세계 및 국내 뉴스, 그리고 특집 기사는 여기까지입니다. 스포츠면에서는 캔자스시티 치프스의 행크 스트램 감독이 AFL 올해의 감독으로 선정되었습니다. 3시즌 만에 두 번째 수상입니다. 투표는 AP 통신 소속 스포츠 기자 및 해설자 30명(각 도시에서 3명씩)으로 구성되었습니다. 스트램 감독에 이어 위브 유뱅크 감독이 가장 많은 표를 받았습니다. 샌디에이고의 시드 길먼 감독과 덴버의 루 세이빈 감독도 표를 받았습니다. 어제 열린 슈라이너스 대학 올스타전에서는 북부팀이 남부팀을 3대 0으로 완파했습니다. 미시간 주립대의 딕 베를린스키 선수가 1쿼터에 23야드 필드골을 성공시키며 북부팀의 승리를 이끌었습니다. 흥미로운 점은 퍼스트 다운 횟수에서 북부팀이 19, 남부팀이 16이었고, 러싱 야드에서는 북부팀이 214, 남부팀이 1
Roger, non preoccuparti per quello in Africa p
Oui, la pression – il pourrait y avoir une légère 
البوصلة تتأثر بشدة بأجهزة
في البداية، حالت العملية دون بدء عمليات الرصد فورًا كما خططنا، نظرًا لوجود مناورة مراوغة أخرى. تسبب تفريغ الحمولة في ظهور كمية هائلة من النجوم الزائفة في المنطقة، مما جعل معايرة البصريات شبه مستحيلة. لم تكن الطريقة التي ابتكرناها فعالة. أما الطريقة التي استخدمتها في النهاية، فكانت التوجه إلى نجم الشعرى اليمانية (سيريوس)، وهو ألمع نجومنا، والحصول على العمود والمحور، ثم توجيه المركبة الفضائية إلى سيريوس لاستخدامهما في البصريات، وهو ما فعلناه لاحقًا. فيما يتعلق بتشتت الضوء، يبدو أننا نتلقى تشتتًا ضوئيًا في التلسكوب الماسح الضوئي في أي وضع تقريبًا أثناء التحكم الحراري السلبي. يتخذ هذا التشتت شكل شريط ضوئي عريض يمتد عبر مركز التلسكوب بزاوية 10 درجات تقريبًا في كلا الاتجاهين من الصفر. من الصعب جدًا رؤية النجوم في هذه المنطقة. وقد كانت عمليات إعادة المحاذاة جيدة. تمكنتُ من تحديد النجم في السدس لإجراء المحاذاة، لكنني لم أستطع التعرف على النجم الذي استخدمناه في حالات مثل ريغور أو مينكنت في التلسكوب الماسح. أظهرت أول رؤية نجمية التقطتها للأرض أفقًا غير واضح المعالم. لكن بدا أن هناك خطًا واضحًا إلى حد ما بين ما بدا أنه أفق الأرض والغلاف الجوي. بدا أن مرشح خط الرؤية المرجعي قد ساعد في تحديد هذا الأفق. يوجد أفق ضبابي وغير واضح للغاية بين الفضاء وأعلى الغلاف الجوي نفسه، وهذا يصعب استخدامه. كما ذكرت سابقًا، في بعض الأحيان، عند النظر إلى القمر مع وجود الشمس في الجوار، لا تكون المنطقة المحيطة بالقمر مظلمة، بل فاتحة - تظهر كلون أزرق فاتح. وينطبق الأمر نفسه عند النظر في السدس أثناء المحاذاة مع النجم - مع وجود الشمس في مكان قريب من العدسات. ومع ذلك، لا أجد صعوبة في العثور على هذه النجوم في السدس. لم أجد صعوبةً في رصد النجوم التي استخدمتها، مثل الشعرى اليمانية والشعرى اليمانية والرأس السُّنُوب، على خلفية الأرض أثناء قياساتنا لأفق النجوم. أستطيع رؤية هذه النجوم الثلاثة بوضوح على خلفية الأرض. أعتقد أنه سيكون من الصعب جدًا إجراء محاذاة احتياطية باستخدام نجوم الشمال، لأن نجم نافي ليس ساطعًا جدًا. تمكنت من رصد مجموعات نجمية في التلسكوب الماسح إذا كانت ساطعة ومعروفة، مثل قيطس والجبار، وهي نجوم من هذا النوع. لم أ
In questo momento, siamo in u
Columbia, Hous
Аврора Севен, Аврора Севен, эта Вумера Кэп Ком. Как 
我想，如果我们真的要选个时间，我们应该选个即使出了什么岔
罗杰，我们看到了，杰克。对接指数读数是零下2度。我们想知道这个读数是精确到2.0度，还是2.1度或1.
Es ist 1 15 auf dem St
ह्यूस्टन, अपो
了解。ありがと
D'accord. Sous « manœuvre définie par l'équipage », les indications clignotantes 0622 correspondent aux angles que nous vous avons communiqués et qui ont été chargés. Les indications clignotantes 5018 représentent quant à elles des angles; ce que vous lisez sur 5018 
Sette da Muchea. Potresti invi
Суть в том, что Вьетконг заключил перемирие раньше, чем мы п
ठीक है। हमने इसे चालू कर दि
了解。私がコピーしたと思ったの
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। सेल्फ-चेक और कंडीशन लाइट में मुझसे गलती हो गई। यह एक व
Технический
你好，休斯顿，双子座4号。你
罗杰。PQGS 测试结果
收到。获取 B 2 18 26；速度增量，
Gemini VI Pilot, Blutdruc
沃利，你想让我保持静止吗？我们几乎已经仰面朝
हमें टेक्सास की इस भीषण
روجر. إذا أردت الذهاب إلى ه
はい、わかりました。3行目、推進剤の下の「降
... rangeant à nouveau l'appareil photo... pour sor
Roger. Pourriez-vous répéter en quelques mots pourquoi vous pensiez que la
Du musst die Timer mit einem Trick von
こんにちは。カリフォルニア・コムテック、オーロラ・セブンです。はっき
Okay. Und wir befin
We are reading you loud and clear also, Bill. The problem here over Honeysuck
La pression
फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड पर स्विच करना
Hell
Apollo 8, en attendant le gain maximal, je vais poursuivre le résumé de la trajectoire. Nous pouvons encore rejoindre la ligne du Pacifique central à partir du treizième point, et vous êtes en route après 138 secondes de combustion. Ces 138 secondes vous permettent de sortir de la zone de correction. Nous recommandons de ne pas tenter de pré-allumage ni de redémarrage après 20 secondes. Au-delà de 20 secondes, la trajectoire pourrait dépasser la capacité de correction pour un retour libre. Les conditions météorologiques dans la zone de récupération sont bonnes. Nous avons un suivi et un sans. Pendant la combustion, vous pourriez remarquer une légère variation de pression dans la chambre et les réservoirs en raison de l'épuisement du carburant dans le réservoir de stockage et de son transfert vers le réservoir de décantation. Cela pourrait se 
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. TV 방송은 고이득 안테나가 다시 연결되는 대로 볼륨을 높여서 시청하실 수 있도록 하겠습니다. 제 생각에는 
*** Горит предупреждающий индикатор и индика
아제
Mine were in LO
没错。我们希望将我们获得的信息与您提供的信息
Roger. Ottimo. E questo è l'equipaggio dell'Apollo 13 che augura a tutti una buona serata, e siamo quasi pronti a concludere la nostra ispezione di Aquarius e tornare per una piacevole serata a bordo di Odyssey. B
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。如果你看到了，请尝试在高增益模式下获取信号。我们无法锁定TM，也没有声音。完毕
Ec
إتقاني للاختزال 
لا أطيق الانتظار للتحدث معك حول 
Хорошо, Вэнс. Запрашиваю разрешение на повторное закрытие вентиляционного клапана, а также на отключен
Roger, mach weiter, CA
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Be advised to switch back to REENTRY. Did you copy, Gemini
मैं आपको सलाह देना चाहूंगा कि आप आरकेवी के ऊपर पायलट के रूप म
Роджер. Вероятно, основная часть разбора будет посвящен
روج
MARK
Sie schreiben sehr undeutlich; Ho
大约9
Хорошо. «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и в открытом космосе экипаж «Аполлона-8» только что выиграл лунную гонку; наушники были аккуратно развешаны у пультов, в надежде, что Крис Крафт скоро будет там; Фрэнк Борман уютно устроился в своей постели, а в его голове мелькали образы; Джим Ловелл на диване, а Андерс в отсеке ломали голову над экраном компьютера, когда из ниоткуда раздался такой грохот, что Фрэнк вскочил с кровати, чтобы посмотреть, что случилось. Он молниеносно полетел к секстанту, чтобы убедиться, что они не разобьются. Свет на изрезанной лунной коре придавал серой лун
네
여러 층으로 이루어진 것 같네요. 아주 높은 권운층이 있고… 권운이 조금 덜한 층도 있고… 구름이 연속적으로 나타나는 모습을 사진으로 찍어 보세요. 높
रॉजर। केप तैयार है और मैं भी 
Non. Cette première vue 
Мы подготовили дл
2A、2B、2C の開回路電圧の測定値はすべて、スケール外
是
Grazie, Jim. Abbiamo copiato il tuo lavoro e ora 
Джим? Вы оба сейчас в отличной форме, и все ЭКГ в порядке
Houston, this is Columbia. 
我刚才说的是——我们想弄清楚主氧气系统中压力积聚的原因。我们想找到某种方法来控制它，而无需您每隔几分钟或几小时就释放一次舱内压力，所以这就是为什么我们希望您在接下来的几个小时内保持“氧气量读取开关”开启的原
Ich sage, ich kann diesmal nicht nach unten Richtung Australien sehen – sie ist 
Hawaii
Nous avons terminé la p
네. 
ठीक है, जो। खबरों के बारे में, जिम इस पर थोड़ा विराम लेना चाहेंगे, और मैं एफएओ से अनुरोध करना चाहता हूं कि यदि वे दिन में किसी समय, जब हमें उड़ान योजना का अपडेट मिले जिसमें उन गतिविधियों का विवरण हो जिन्हें हमने चंद्र कक्षा के दौरान वैकल्पिक बनाने पर सहमति व्यक्त की थी और कुछ ऐसी गतिविधियां जि
Ok, Vance. Allo spegnimento, abbassiamo il bit rate; togliamo il BACKUP VOCALE, stacchiamo l'interrutt
Apollo 8, Houston. Ci serviranno alcuni dati dei tuoi voti passati. Abbiamo tralasciato alcuni elementi, quindi non metterli via. Qu
아폴로
I am going--I am in the record only position now. I think the best answer to the autokinesis--is that there is none. I noticed none--and I tend to aline the horizontal with my head--it--a horizontal line under zero g is a line parallel to the line drawn between your eyes. I don't get autokine
Ricev
C'est exact. Nous n'utilisons plus le cordon ombilical depuis un certain temps. À cette époque, n
그리고 빨간색과 초
Nein, ich dachte eher, dass wir nicht etwa vier Seiten davon schreiben müssen, sondern dass wir wahrscheinlich nur so viel brauchen, und das gleicht den 
Penso
明白了。我听
D'accord. Donc la première chose à faire sera de - « Passer en mode AUTO sur les systèmes A et B 
로저. 그리고 첫 번째 레지
D'
Gemini 4, Houston CA
Columbia, Housto
Der Horizont hier ist extrem karg. Der Himmel ist pechschwarz, und die Erde – oder besser gesagt der Mond – ist hell; der Kontrast zwischen Himmel und Mond bildet eine deutliche, dunkle Linie. Nun kommen einige interessante, alte Doppelringkrater ins Bild, interessante Merkmale, die in der Mare-Region recht häufig vorkommen und mit Material von ähnlicher Konsistenz und Farbe wie die Maria gefüllt sind. Hier sind drei oder vie
Ricevuto. Pronti
13, ह्यूस्टन। हम चाहेंगे कि आप ऑक्सीजन टैंक 1 में पंखे भी चालू कर दें, और हम उस
D'accord, Aquarius; Houston. Avec la quantité d'énergie actuellement stockée dans votre module lunaire, soit plus de 500 ampères-heures, et votre consommation actuelle, nous estimons qu'il vous rest
我随时准备开始对接粗略校
阿波罗11号，休斯顿
Игл, Хьюстон. Подожд
Guardando oltreoceano, scopriamo che la prima superstrada della Corea del Sud, che collega Seul al porto di Inchon, è stata chiamata Apollo Highway per commemorare il vostro viaggio. Credo di aver accennato ieri sera che il Presidente Nixon ha già iniziato il suo giro del mondo e oggi è a San Francisco per la sua prima tappa ch
杰克，在我们开始阅读操作步骤之前，我们想先说明一下——我们发现A电池电量充足，状态良好。现在切换到B电池，再给B电池充一会儿电。再充两个小时。这里有一个七到八步的操作流程，如
プラ
Dire
꽤 
我们现在预测
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 마이크, 지상에서 계산한 축과 트러니언 값은 지금 당신이 보고 있
Роджер, Близнецы 4. Продолжайте обно
19 Seku
ठीक है। जैक, उस सूची में से हमें कमांडर के थ्रॉटल को थ्रॉटल और मिन पर सेट करने की 
Аврора Семь, командир корабля. Вы мен
알겠습니다. 두 가지 방법 모두 시도해 봤습니다. 차단기를 리셋 위치에 놓으면 902 04 40 오류가 발생하고, 리셋 버튼을 놓으면 902 04 49 오류가 발생합니다. 차단기를 다시 껐다 켜보겠습니
Okay. I'll try to squeeze them in there, 
غوايماس، الجوزا
आरईपी आरबी 26 
如果你没有复制，400K 的 
ठीक है। हमने दोनों तरीके आजमा लिए हैं। अगर सर्किट ब्रेकर रीसेट करते समय 
روجر. هذا مركز اتصالات RKV CAP. ستتلقى رسالة عاجلة عبر CSQ. 
Roger. Sappiate che ora ho una bella vi
Roger. Copy. Agena very stable and no noticeable os
Ok. Alzatevi... conto alla 
और मैंने उसकी तस्वीरें ले ली हैं। मुझ
روجر، فرانك. يبدو أن المسار المتوسط ​​رقم 3 سيبلغ سرعته ما يزيد قليلاً عن قدم واحدة في الثانية، لذا لا ننصحك بالقيام بذلك. وهذا يقودنا إلى 
Decisamente sotto di me. L'avevo seguito sotto di me da Carnarvon in poi. Fino a Carnarvon l'avevamo tenuto sotto di noi, poi fino all'orizzonte, e poi di nuovo sotto di noi. Sembrava quasi che fosse in un'orbita diversa dalla mia. Aveva un apogeo e un perigeo diversi dai miei. Comunque, ho tentato di avvicinarmi all'alba non appena ho potuto capire dove si trovava. Come ho detto, in quel momento era a un miglio o du
휴스턴, 아폴로
Okay. Das ist richtig. Der letzte Teil des Startfelds befindet sich bei -4,5 Stunden. Dort wird ein Schub mit 0,5 Fuß pro Sekunde, vier Düsen und Plus
好的。刚才那个声音很响亮也很清晰。现在我们没什么大事发生，你也知道，我们正在处理入境手续。我这里有一些初步的副本，但还没准备好交给你。看起来
Roger. Nous les a
네, 덤프 작업이 완료되었고 테이프 레코더를 돌려드렸습니다. 원하시는 대로 사용하셔도 됩니다. 나중에 다시 덤프해야 할 수도 있는데, 그럴 경우 특별히 추가하고 싶은 내용이 없으면 기존 정보를 그대로 사용하겠습니다. 음질을 들어보니 아주 좋습니다. 지금 중간 코스 4에 가까워지고 있는데, 예정대로 진행되고 있고, 굽는 속도는 초당 약 3피트 정도 예상됩니다. 온보드 벡터를 사용해서 굽는 방식을 고려 중인데, 슬롯에서 벡터를 업데이트하는 방식으로 진행하면 굽기 결과에 큰 영향을 미치지 않을 것 같고, 흥미로운 결과가 나올 수도 있을 것 같습니다. 잠시 생각해 보시고 의
まだ半分しか残っていません。ほとんどは隠してあります。ここでカメラワークを全部やるのは、
Ok. Ci alziamo e ci dai un voto. Tra un secondo controllerò l'antenna. Ok. Sembra che siamo pronti per il controllo dell'antenna ad alto guadagno. Possiamo procedere con i comandi impartiti da terra, e tu puoi monitorarli, oppure possiamo essere guidati, come preferisci
Roger. Einen Moment bitte, Jim. Unser 
क्या मे
ठीक है। आप फ्यूल सेल प्यूर्ज की उम्मीद कर सकते हैं, और बैटरी A की चार्जिंग इसके बाद लगभग पूरी हो जाएगी; और लगता है कि आपकी बैटरी लगभग पूरी तरह चार्ज हो चुकी हो
मुझे अपना सामान लेना होगा... और अंतरिक्ष यान से बाहर निक
أما ا
Если я смогу убрать немного еды Билла отсюда — В этом месте, которое называется нижним отсеком оборудования, находится наше оптическое 
好的。听起来很简单。理解恒定过载备份程序，向上拉升直到最大过载，然后向下拉升；然后调整直
ठीक है। अब मैं आपकी बात अच्छे से समझ गया हूँ। बस आपको याद दिलाना चाहता था कि संचार बाधित होने की स्थिति में, हम नहीं चाहते कि आप 7 नंबर का इस्तेमाल करें। आपकी वर्तमान जानकारी सही है। हम आपके लैंडिंग पॉइंट्स को उसी समय अपडेट करेंगे जब आपको 7 नंबर का अपडेट मिलना चाहिए था, और ज
ठीक है, जिम। हम चाहेंगे कि आप पृष्ठ 24 खोलें, जो "30-मिनट सक्रियण" है, और यह मध्य-अवधि की जलन के लिए एक प्रक्रिय
Роджер, я в отличной форме. Сейчас я расскажу о у
그
Roger, wir verstehen Sie deutlic
Th
حسنًا. نود أن 
罗杰，我们现在指示的
حسنًا. نقوم بنسخ عرض الخليج العربي، وأعتقد أن كل ما يمكنني تقديمه لكم بشكل مباشر هو معلومة واحدة معزولة، وهي أن السماء كانت صافية هنا في هيوستن هذا الصباح. هذه ملاحظة محلية نوعًا ما. نتيجةً لتصريف مياه الصرف الصحي، يبدو أن الوضع قد تأثر قليلًا. نعرض لكم حاليًا انحرافًا في الميلان يبلغ حوالي 20 درجة، وانحرافًا في الانحراف الجانبي يبلغ حوالي 6 درجات، وهو أكبر بكثير، أي ما يقارب ضعف الانحراف الذي كان لديكم 
Роджер, Фрэнк. Пока что мы не наблюдаем снижени
Okay. Im Rest Ihres Updates hieß es, dass ein Druck zwischen 660 und 770 psi in Ordnung sei. Liegt er über 770 psi, bitten Sie uns, nach 59 Betriebsstunden erneut vorbeizuschauen und entweder das PCM zu aktivieren oder Ihnen anhand der Messwertänderungen die entsprechenden Informationen mitzuteilen. Sie erwähnten auch eine extreme Maßnahme. Wir müssen möglicherweise ein bestimmtes Manöver in Erwäg
Okay, Apollo 8. We're starting in - setting up for our first COMM test. This is going to be an uplink voi
حسنًا. لقد راجعنا وقتك، والرقم 16 في إدخالك صحيح. سنزودك بإدخال مُحدّث في الوقت المُجدول. في الوقت نفسه، سنزودك بتحديث لمتجهات حالتك. كان تصحيح المسار رقم 7 أقل من سبعة أعشار قدم في الثانية، ولن نقوم بتنفيذه. لديك موعد مُجدول في وقت غير مطلوب. 
Nein, Charlie. Ich kann es einfach nicht auflösen. Aber um dir eine Vorstellung zu geben: An der südlichen Küste von Texas kann ich – wenn ich weiß, wonach ich suche – Padre Island erkennen. Ich kann gerade noch erkennen, dass es dort eine schmale Landzunge gibt und dazwischen, vom Festland, eine kleine dunkle Zone – die Laguna Ma
Okay, Fred. We still don't have a final answer on whether or not it'll leak. If you need it, I'd go ahead and use it; and s
这次飞行操作非常不稳定。我还没
Ja, das überrascht 
Okay, als ich vorhin oben war, bemerkte ich etwas, das wie eine neue Entlüftung aussah, die vom Servicemodul ausging. Ich sah das durch Fenster 1 und entdeck
Okay, 59:25 - and this light will go of
That's affirmative, Jim. You're going to have to roll 90 degrees to point your plus X-axis at the Sun and put the crescent - the points of the crescent on the Y-axis. The points of the crescent on the Y-axis with the pointed
はい、2-C は 24、6、2-B は 24、5.5、2-A は 24、6、1-C は 24、12、1-B は 24、11、1-A は 24、7 です。コントロールは 26、5、S-2 は 27、S-1 は 27、メインは 23
D'accord. Houston, tu veux qu'on reprenne l'habitude et qu'on relance la rôtisserie
罗杰。10906
Roger. Wir haben eine 
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Можете смело запускать этот 37-й, и мы тоже будем наблюдать за этим с Земли, чтобы посмотреть, что получится. Пара моментов, представляющих общий интерес в мире траекторий. Похоже, неопределенность положения составляет около 12 миль. Неопределенность ско
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Похоже, теперь вы можете отключить криогенные вентиляторы, и мы оставим вас на некоторое время в покое, чтобы вы смогли наверстать упущенное. Проверка высокочувствительной антенны и проверка режима связи, которые вы ука
Wh
حسناً، أصبح لها اسم جديد الآن، لأن درجة الحرارة فيها أقل ب
You can take it back to BLOCK, and for Bill's inform
Das war bei 
우리
收到，明白了。根据飞行计划，你现在应该切换到电传操纵模式，但他（飞行员）说你目前处于自动模式，我想知道你是否打算继续执
Je crois que vous vouliez ça, Jack, et
네. 전원 6번입니다. 전원 6번은 11번 패널을 말합니다. 제가 부르는 차단기를 제외하고는 차트대로 하시면 됩니다. 첫 번째 줄은 괜찮습니다. 첫 번째 행이라고 하겠습니다. 두 번째 행은 QUAD 4, TCA, 닫힘; QUAD 3, TCA, 닫힘; QUAD 2, TCA, 닫힘; 그리고 QUAD 1, TCA, 닫힘입니다. 나머지 행은 괜찮습니다. 세
Ed erano del tuo colore, John. Ottima descrizione. Anche se, durante il giorno, se li osservo, sono decisamente bianchi. Mentre, al sorgere del sole, emergono dal vero colore delle lucciole che hai desc
진정하십시오.
15 seconds to a rea
روجر، 11. لدينا موقف محدّث لك بشأن ملاحظة المقل
खैर,... जैसे ही यह बाहर निकलता है... पृथ्वी पर रहते हुए यह... वायुमंडल में प्
Хорошо. Мы 
حسنًا. السؤال الإضافي الأول هو، ودعني أعود إلى السؤال الأصلي لأن هذا السؤال يقول: "بشكل أكثر تحدي
アポロ8号、アポロ
Roger. Verstanden. Eine Sekunde schnell, und es sieht so aus, als o
Хорошо. Отлично. Они обновят ваши предпочтения после того, как в
プラス 00187 32870 307 32676 32 - 訂正、420880 253033、下 121、左 27、プラス 0790、マイナス 16500
क्या आप ह्यूस्टन को बता देंगे कि हमारे सेक्स्टेंट की पिछली खिड़की में एक बल्ब फ्यूज हो 
حسنًا. لأنني كنت أنظر 
Roger, 11. Questo è il CAP COM originale. Congratulazioni per l'eccellente lavoro. Avete davvero dato una bella dimostrazione lassù. Credo sia ora che vi speniate e vi riposiate un po'. Avete avuto una giornata davvero lunga qui. Spero che riuscirete tutti a dormire bene sulla via del ritorno. Non vedo l'ora di rivedervi al vostro ritorno. Non fraternizzate con nessuno di 
Настоя
Roger. Bitte wart
Jim, ti consigliamo di procedere con la tua manovra, ma di rimanere al VERBO 49 e di non restringere la zona morta per il momento. E, quando sarai in questo 
Friendship Seven, Бермудские остр
إيجل، هيوستن. نوصي بالبدء - حسنًا، نراه يظهر
حسنًا. لم 
알겠습니다. 약 114분 10초쯤에 "고도 설정 60마일" 아래 모든 항목에 "태양 코로나, 선택 사항"이라는 주석을 달고, 그 선택 사항의 첫 번째 줄에 있는 "태양 코로나 및 태양 가장자리 밝기 증가 자세로 기동" 부분에서 "그리고 태양 가장자리 밝기 증가 자세
닐과 버즈, 저는 지금 백악관 집무실에서 전화 통화를 하고 있는데, 이 통화는 분명 역사상 가장 역사적인 통화일 것입니다. 여러분이 모든 미국인을 위해 해낸 일에 대해 우리 모두가 얼마나 자랑스러워하는지 말로 다 표현할 수 없습니다. 오늘은 우리 인생에서 가장 자랑스러운 날입니다. 그리고 전 세계 사람들도 미국인들과 마찬가지로 이 얼마나 위대한 위업인지 공감할 것이라고 확신합니다. 여러분이 해낸 일 덕분에 하늘은 이제 인간의 세상이 되었습니다. 고요의 바다에서 우리에게 이야기하는 여러분의 모습은 우리에게 지구에 평화와 안정을 가져오기 위해 더욱 노력할 용기를 불어넣어 줍니다. 인류 역사상 가장 값진 순간, 지구상의 모든 사람들은 진정으로 하나가 되었습니다. 여러분이 해낸 일에 대한 자부심으로 하나 
Zeit fü
我们的Agena天线状态良好。TDA天线已展开并固定。天线上的须状天线如预期般伸出。偶极子天线已竖起
よし、ジーン、まずはスーツの話をしよう。みんなの負
ごめんなさい。聞
Right. That's for the flyby and pericynthian plus 2 hour block update. We would like also to get a current up-to-date report on all your windows. We are trying to make some alternate plans for using the center hatch window when you are in lunar orbit, and we would like to m
علق حزام الكتف الأيسر الخاص بي في اللوح الخلفي
All right. You can anticipate a fuel cell purge at, and we ought to be through with battery A charging somewhere after; and looks like you'll h
Gemini 4
Jim, das wurde im Simulator von Charlie und anderen getestet. Sie empfehlen, die Kursänderungen an den Fehleranzeigen auf Null zu stellen, bis sich 
И снова загорелся индика
ا
Roger. Okay, Jim, we decided that you've got a little bit of fuel left that we can play with here in the Flight Plan. We would like for you to go to the Horizon Scan Mode for the next 8 hours. That's at 30, and we want you to use the Primary Scanner. We don't want you to do any controlling in yaw, and if the scanner breaks lock, don't co
了解、フレンドシップセブン。こちらはザンジバル
好的。阿波罗8号。看来由于一些跟踪要求，我们不得不推迟这次通信测试。如果这不会对你们目前的操作造成太大影响，我们可以在大约一个小时后完成。这可能需要15到20分钟
Хорошо, Джо. Я начал. Я перешел к варианту 3, и на дисплее - 1520 - 1525 я вызвал 1691. Я позволю тебе понаблюдать и посмотреть, как угол наклона вала изменяется, пока оптика находится в нулевом п
您的指挥飞行员用餐时间为00:15至
रॉजर, समझ गया। फ्लाइट प्लान के अनुसार, आपको अभी FBW जाना था, और वह कह
И мы просим вас оставить это включенным, пока вы почти не закончите свой проход здесь. Мы хотим
Aquarius, Houston. Il semble que vous soyez en t
11, 휴스
... هذا سيقتلنا. فقط أمسكها هنا. حس
حسناً. النفايات التي لا تتسع في صندوق الطعام الأيمن ستوضع إما في صندوق الطعام الأيسر أو في الصناديق الجانبية ح
わかりました、フレッド。私があなたに渡したいのは、司令船
لا. تُفيدنا كيب بأنك ستُبث
لا، إنه أفضل بكث
닐, 여기는 휴스
ジム、分かりました。ヨー、ピッチ、ロールと読み上げ
你好
Qui n
了解。NSR機動の噴射GETは03+47+37、デルタVTは
حسنًا يا مايك، إذا كانت هناك بعض حقائب البيانات هناك - ربما لدي واحدة أو اثنتان في مخزني المؤقت - فقد نرغب في الحصول عليها بالإضافة إلى الحقائب العادية الأخرى، حتى نتمكن من إعادة بعض هذه البيان
Roger. Au travail, il sort
C'est cer
よし、トム。準備は万端だ。それでは、噴射前にやってほしいことがある。宇宙船VIIの北に5～10フィート、そして後方に約50フィート移動してほしい。これは噴射前に行う必要がある。これは宇宙船VIIのD-4/D-7搭載機
……在重返
알겠습니다, 잭. 그리고 지금 오른쪽을 보고 있는데, 아니, 4번 걸쇠 쪽에서 뭔가가 배출되고 있어요. 명령 모듈 옆으로 입자
Arrêtez-vous là. C'est pire, Bill. Retournez à votre position initiale. Vous l'avez fait disparaître à
Gemini 4, we'll update you with the orbit calculations some ti
Roger. Good r
Apollo 8, Houst
Okay. 
حسنًا. حسنًا، هذه مناورة تمهيدية PC + 2. البداية: ؛ + 0819.2، - 0020.0، - 0218.9؛ غير متوفر؛ + 0020.9، 0848.2؛ 420، 274، 082؛ + 0820.3، - 0020.0، - 0215.0. ملاحظات: سعة الخزان عبارة عن فوهتين لمدة 10 ثوانٍ. الوزن، 62480. الوزن 33576. وفيما يلي مخطط الخانق: 5 ثوانٍ عند الحد الأدنى متبوعة بـ 21 ثانية عند 40 بالمائة، والباقي عند الحد الأقصى
Pourriez-vous surveiller de près le réservoir de purge et le réservoir cryogénique d'O2 1, car notre débitmètre es
120에서 
让我看看。在其他国内新闻方面，新婚夫妇大卫·艾森豪威尔和朱莉·艾森豪威尔结束了他们的秘密蜜月之旅，与候任总统尼克松及其家人共进圣诞晚餐。在纽约市，由于持续五天的码头工人罢工和罕见的航运计划中断，世界上最繁忙的港口在圣诞节当天几乎完全停摆。没有船只进出港口。渡轮
안녕하세요, 물병자리 여러분. 잘 들립니다. 저는 지금 어
로저 씨, 그리고 남은 MSC-1
그리고 우리는 지금 이 시점에 A
好的，
रॉजर। वे तरल ऑक्सीजन टैंक से गैर-प्रणोदन वेंटिलेशन जारी रख रहे हैं। तो यह त्रिज्या के विपरीत दिशा में होगा। और बूस्टर मुझे बता रहे हैं कि यह निरंतर वेंटिलेशन प्रणाली है। वे इस समय थोड़ी मात्रा में ईंधन भी निकाल रहे हैं। जलने में लगभग 23-1/2 मिन
S
جيري، أثناء قيامنا بهذه الرحلات، كنا نقضي معظم الوقت فوق أفريقيا. على الأقل، كانت في مرمى البصر؛ فالطقس هناك جميل في هذا الوقت م
ठीक है। आपने कहा कि हम तीनों ता
...،
Eagle, Houston. No voice. Will you 
Apollo 8, Houston. Falls wir diese Zwischenlandung nicht schaffen, werden wir trotzdem versuchen, und es wurde vorgeschla
أنت را
分かりました。色については、海は全体的にロイヤルブルーのような色合いで、雲は
Роджер. По
नमस्कार
कॉपी। आपके पास OAMS से Aline Pl
Bon. Il n'y a pas grand-chose à dire. Voyons voir, commençons par le sport, pourquoi pas? Les Astros ont gagné 8 à 7, les Braves ont marqué cinq ou six points – cinq points en neuvième manche – mais ils ont réussi à s'imposer de justesse. Dans l'autre match important du jour, la rencontre des Cubs a été annulée à cause de la pluie. J'ai tous les autres scores, dites-moi si vous en voulez. Il y a eu des tremblements de terre à Manille et dans d'autres régions de l'île de Luzon. Il y a eu trois secousses qui ont fait trembler les bâtiments pe
Esatto, e visto che sei ancora a un'ora di distanza, immagino che non ti farebbe male usare MINIMUM IMPULSE o qualcosa del genere invece di, almeno finché non ti sarai avvicinato. Ne avremo un sacco più tar
Possiamo farlo in entrambi i modi. Avevo pianificato la cosa posit
Hör mal, Liebling.
Okay. Ich esse, nachdem ich zwisch
Sie interessieren sich wahrscheinlich für die Kommentare Ihrer Frauen. Neil, Jan sagte über die gestrigen Ereignisse: „Der Abend war einfach perfekt. Es ist mir eine Ehre und ein Privileg, mit meinem Mann, der Crew, dem bemannten Raumfahrtzentrum, der amerikanischen Öffentlichkeit und der gesamten Menschheit dieses großartige Erlebnis des Beginns der Mondforschung zu teilen.“ S
जिम, हमें असली गड़बड़ी का पता लगाने के लिए लगभग एक दिन का समय दीजिए, ताकि हम देख सकें कि क्या हम वाकई इनमें से कोई भी ओएएमएस रेट्रोस्पेक्टिव कर सकते हैं। उदाहरण के लिए
On a point between it and Censorinus - FPA 8 and - the point halfway betw
好的，Buzz。最后一个条目在下面，是“三轴姿态控制”这行中“
Roger, verstanden. Wir befinden uns jetzt in der Umla
好了，还有 2 分钟，这次
أوه،
रॉजर, 11. आपने अच्छी तरह से जानकारी दी। यह 12 घंटे के लिए निर्धारित ब्लॉक डेटा था। हम यहाँ उड़ान योजना अपडेट के माध्यम स
了解。これは水に気づ
아폴로 11호, S밴드 신호가 끊기면 OMNI Charlie 신호를 보내주시면 감사하겠습니다. 그리고 지난번에 말씀드렸던 내용을 업데이트하자면, 77시 4분에 아리스타르코스가 지평선 
Хорошо. У меня есть данные как в процентах, так и в фунтах; я дам вам оба числа. Фунты немного точнее для построения графика. Четверка А: 72 процента, 219 фунтов; четверка В: 76 процентов, 233 фунта; четверка С: 70 процент
Ricevuto. Spurgo della cella a combustibile a ossigeno alle 11:30. Ritorno alla linea temporale nominale alle 12:10 del risveglio. Cambio di idrossido di litio numero 9 in questo momento. Configurazione di
了解しました。こちらはミッドコース7の回廊管制です。N/A、42、N/A、プラス0020.5、0019
RKV，双子座4号。
It's about 30 degrees up. It's just coming into view. Bright and unblinking. I cannot--I c
لديك ب
네, OMNI C에서 말씀하신 내용이 아주 잘 들립니다. 잠시만 기다려 주시
로저. 45세
All that procedure for seemed to work very well. The only thing that was a little odd, is that there was some thruster activity. I had pitch in ACCEL COMMAND, and roll and yaw in RATE COMMAND, and somehow, roll and yaw got excited and the went into a flurry of thruster firing. We've noticed the same thing i
أورورا سفن، أورورا سفن. هذا هو قسم الاتصالات التقنية في نظام التشغيل I.O.S. 
For use in connection with the prime me
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。你的显示器（电视显示器）底部是不是有个小白点？
Это норма
如果你愿意，我可以。
Roger. Il computer è tuo ora. Sembra che tu sia nel raggio d'azione VHF, qui. 
收到。1，G&N：38658，减054，加065，TIG 078 02 0345，加29180，加03779，减01325；滚转NA，俯仰041。PAD的其余部分NA。空高两台喷气发动机，19秒。4 PAD，G&N：386
أليس 
Es ist wirklich kinderleicht, Dinge zu bewegen, nicht wahr? Diesen 8 Pfu
Okay, Jack. As I read that, the LMP is to go to sleep at for about 6 hours. During that period, the CDR and CMP should try to get a bite to eat. I'm to awake at 69 hours. CDR and CMP sleep at 70 hours,
Die Verantwortung für diesen Flug liegt in erster Linie bei der Geschichte und den wissenschaftlichen Giganten, die diesem Vorhaben vorausgingen; dann beim amerikanischen Volk, das durch seinen Willen seinen Wunsch bekundet hat; dann
好的，乔。为了确认一下，我查看了你给我的开关清单。我们的配置和清单上的一模一样，只有一个例外，那就是382号面板上的那个开
E non ti disturberò più co
أبول
أجل، أعتقد أنني سأفعل ذلك 
Okay, Jack. That's completely correct on 1-4. Let's go to 1-5, and on that page the first one, two, three, 
Roger. Commissaire de la capi
Ok. Ci stiamo preparando per il cambio turno e volevo prima di tutto chiarire alcuni punti: sembra che la velocità sia al massimo di 0,3 piedi al secondo, quindi non ci saranno accensioni a metà rotta numero 6. La metà rotta numero 7 è un po' più grande, e prenderemo una decisione più tardi. Il meteo nel sito di atterraggio è ancora segnalato come buono e le previsioni indicano circa 2000 fulmini sparsi e 12000 fulmini sp
Нам нужно, чтобы дисплей был открыт; антенна S-диапазона закрыта — чтобы избежать срабатывания главной сигнализации, камера — последовательная камера открыта; а ниже на
Ok. Sembra un'ottima idea. Inoltre, mentr
هذا صحيح، وقم بتشغ
Ja. Wir haben es in der Ecke unseres Bildschirms. Sie zeigen zwar
ウーメラさん、こんにちは。HFのフレンドシッ
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。在陨石坑背面一个较大的陨石坑里，我注意到外壁上有一个小小的黑点，于是我用单筒望远镜观察了一下。我看到了——哦，大概有四
Ich habe jetzt sowohl Nick- als auch Gierwinkel – bzw. Nick- und Rollwinkel – in Richtung der vorgegebenen Werte. Der Nickwinkel liegt jetzt bei 23 Grad und der Rollwinkel bei über 321 Grad. Ich lasse die St
ठीक है। अब हमें थोड़ा बेहतर सिग्नल मिल रहा है। कृपया पुष्टि करें कि साइड हैच पर लगे क्लैंप को या तो पानी में या ढलान पर, ज
11, на этом, с точки зрения ситуа
Ha
我在干什么？反正我也做不到。让我想想，交叉喂养。不行。现
わかった。じゃあまた後で。
알겠습니다. 구역 7-3 GET RC,
Ok, Fred. Prima di tutto, i preparativi per questo, a partire dalla checklist di emergenza, pagina 24, che consigliamo di seguire, e saremo lieti di ricevere qualsiasi commento tu abbia in merito. Secondo punto: quando sei in assetto di accensione, dovresti vedere il Sole in cima al Sole. Dividerà il cursore, quando il cursore è impostato su zero. Una cosa da tenere presente, però, è che scivolerà fuori dall'assetto molto facilmente, poiché sarà molto sensibile a rollio e imbardata. Capisci che questo è nel punto di arresto 2, perché l'accensione è molto insensibile al tempo di accensione e all'assetto. In altre parole, se necessario, possiamo farlo slittare se c'è un problema, e l'assetto non è troppo
Houston, Sie sehen hier unseren DELTA-H. 
그리고 피커링 산에서 뻗어 나오는 햇살이 보입니다. 지금 P-1 초기 착륙 지점 근처에 다다랐
Well, let's get going here. PRIMARY, PRIMARY, HIGH, VOICE, (cough) PCM, RANGE, DOWN VOICE BACKUP, AUX TAPE, OFF; TELEMETRY to DATA; and UP TIM COMMAND to NORMAL; VHF A and B, OFF; RECEIVE only,...; PCM/ANALOG, RECORD, FORWARD, NORM
Paracadute principale in verde. Il paracadute è fuori uso, in condizioni di barriera corallina a 10.800 piedi e il paracadute è splendido. Il paracadute sembra in buone condizioni. In emergenza O2 e il paracadute sembra in ottime condizioni. La velocità di discesa è 
हम अभी लगभग 50 प्रत
불쾌할 정도로 덥진 않지만, 약간 따뜻해요. 슈트 회로를 제대로 제어할 수 있을 때까지는 물을 마시지 않으려고 해요. 만약 바로 제어할 수 없으면 물을 좀 마셔야겠어요
好的。我们复制 39.3 和 1.20。吉姆，我还有一件事要告诉你。大约 45 分钟后，下降气瓶上的水量警告灯会亮起。这是预期的。它会
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン
さて、「マイナス 06:30」、電圧の測定値
. Thi
لم أجده منذ حلول الظلام. إنه... إنه... إنه يتحرك كثيرًا يا ديك. لم يُنفخ بالكامل،
Bonjour, je ne sais pas. C'est… je vous dis, ce n'est pas une mauvaise façon de vivre, avec ce canapé là-dedans… enfin… oh oui, je suis d'accord; on peut en mettre deux
네
Roger. Et po
हवाई कैप कॉम, हवाई कैप कॉम। सिग्मा
Okay. In Feld 226 sollen alle Felder geöffnet sein, außer dem Feld „Geschlossen“. Ändern Sie also
好的，我
ठीक है, जो। मैं पैड की कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हूँ
Beh, penso che probabilmente pensassero che queste particelle che ho visto potessero provenire da lì, ma queste sono... ce ne sono migliaia, e si estendono per, sembra, chilometri in ogni direzione da me e si muovono molto lentament
저희도 그걸 
你现在就想在工作中实现这
わかった。了解。待機し
Ihr... für
अब हमें फ्लोरिडा का ए
Oui. Je ne pense pas que ce sera 
Хорошо. Звучит неплохо. Кроме того, пока вы ждёте стабилизации аппарата, было бы интересно посмотреть в окуляре и убедиться, что
GT-4、ヒュースト
Хорошо, Джо. Прямо сейчас мы открываем вентиляционное отверстие для отвода отхо
Durante il volo, ho notato che l'ottica AUTO non si dirigeva verso la stella selezionata. Per esempio, una volta aveva scelto Alpheratz, non si dirigeva verso quella posizi
D'acco
了解、軌道姿
了解しました。TMで焼き込み後の状態が気付かな
Neg
لا أعتقد أن لدينا
ما سأفعله - دعني أكرر - حسنًا. دعني أكرر كل شيء لك. صمام ضغط العبوة، مُغلق؛ ضغط مقصورة الطو
Apollo 8, vorremmo che tu andassi e ACCETTASSE e vorremmo prendere il registratore in questo momento
玩得开心吗？
Okay. Ich habe das nachgerechnet, un
حسنًا. أولًا، من المرجح أن يكون تصحيح المسار في منتصف الرحلة عند 104 ساعات، وكل ما نبحث عنه هو تغيير 
Sende 
Okay, Vance. Okay - I don't think you've given me the backout procedure, have you,
धीमी आवाज में बैकअप। रॉ
LMP 的容器位置 - LMP 的容
Roger. Cap ti chiede di correlare le azioni delle particelle che circondano il veicolo con la reazione
아쿠아리우스, 저희가 처음 추정했던 물 사용량과 전력 사용량을 비교해 보니, 물 사용량은 거의 정확한 것 같고, 전력 사용량은 처음 분석했을 때 예상했던 것보다 약간 적은 것 같습니다. 따라서 이 부분에 있어서는 저희가 정확히 예측했
Non in modo significativo. Riuscivo ad arrivare ai primi 5 cm senza troppi problemi, e poi, mentre lo spingevo dentro con tutta la mia forza, per il secondo ci volevano due mani sul martello, e stavo facendo delle belle ammaccature nella parte superiore dell'asta di prolunga, e non andava molto oltre... credo che la profondità totale potesse essere di circa 20 o 23 cm. Ma anche lì, non ce la faceva... Per qualche motivo sembrava non voler stare in piedi. In altre parole, continuavo a spingerlo de
Roger. C'est exact. Le compteur affichait 6,9 quand on l'a éteint. La dernière fois que je l'ai vu, il indiquait 6,9. Frank vient
بام، لقد ص
음, 여기 아래에는 함께 가고 싶어하는 사람들이 많이 있습니다
Bene. Voce: area del Pacifico centrale, 357 152 359 268, più 0813, meno 16503 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028, non applicabile quattro volte, in a
Vot
Gemini VI, Хьюстон, обновление смещения акселерометра завершено. Вы можете вернуться в режим ПРЕДЗАПУСКА, а затем — поправка — в режим ДОГОТОВЛЕНИЯ, и мы рекомендуем 
11、ヒューストン。こちらです。あなたのサブスペースクラフトの地点は、南米の西海岸沖、メキシコ
로저, 마이크. 지금 고이득 안테나로 
杰克，你知道吗，我第一次来这里的时候就注意到一件事，就是从指令舱里直立行走到进入水瓶座舱，方向会略有变化，虽然我在水箱里经历过一次，但仍然感觉很不寻常。现在，我发现自己下到舱里
Джим, мы запланировали для тебя обед примерно час назад. Полагаю, ты уже об этом позаботился. Ещё нас интересуе
よし、3分
좋아
좋아요. 6대 1
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. نحن ننظر إلى جهاز التثبيت الخاص بك، ونلاحظ أن لدينا نظام حقن رباعي الفوهات مُحمّلًا، وقد خصصنا لك فوهتين على المنصة. لكن دعنا نعتمد على الن
아니요
Okay. That's right. That's Jim Lovell. What we thought we'd do today was just show you a little bit about life inside Apollo 8. We've shown you the scenes of the moon, the scenes of the earth, and we thought we'd invite you into our home. It's been our home at least for 4 days as you can see on the instrument panel. We mark off each day on the instrument panel. We're four down, and we're working on the fifth day. Of course, we're all looking forward to the landing on Friday. Down here in the part of the spacecraft that we call the lower equipment bay, we have the President's adviser on physical fitness, Captain Jim Lovell, about to undergo an exercise program that we do every day. You notice that he floats around very freely. He just bumped his head on the optics, used for our navigating. He's working with an exercise device that's designed to keep the muscles in shape. Now another very important function of our spacecraft is the computer, and I thought you might be interested in seeing what we have here, the displays that give us all the information about our burn, about navigating, and about the velocity that we use during entry and retrofire on earth-orbital missions. You can see it's controlled by a , or similar to a typewriter keyboard, and the things that go in and out of that are absolutely miraculous. It's done a fantastic job for us, and Jim Lovell has done an excellent job operating it. Now another very important thing whether you're in space or the ground is eating, and I've asked Bill Anders to show you how we eat up here in th
Sigma Seven。Woomera 
ويا هيوستن، يا برج الدلو. أعتقد أن الخطوة التالية ستكون عبارة عن مسار تقريبي، لكن أعتقد أنه يجب
Roger, Buzz. And break. Break. Columbia, this is
了解しました。しばらくセカン
Roger th
はい、はい。つまり、上昇タンクに乗るのは理解しています、と
Do you 
ठीक है। और अब तक 
Per chi non l'avesse ancora letta, leggiamo quella che si trova sul carrello di atterraggio anteriore. Innanzitutto ci sono due emisferi, uno raffigurante ciascuno dei due emisferi della Terra. Sotto c'è scritto: "Qui l'uomo del pianeta Terra ha messo piede per la prima volta sulla Luna, nel luglio 1969 d.C.
Roger, Woomera Cap Com. Ich v
Roger. Ça va plutôt bien maintenant. J'imagine q
Х
了解しました、アポロ8号さん。その通
I don't think that was..
了解。アン
Usane quanto vuoi, di qualsiasi cosa tu voglia. 80 millimetri, 250, va bene
Rog
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 마이크, 지상에서 계산한 축과 트러니언 값은 지금 당신이 보고 있는 값과 정확히 일치합니다. 수평선이 약간 기울어져 보이는군요. 우리가 광학계에 반사가 생기는 것을 방지하기 위해 알려
好的，从页面顶部开始，划掉前五行，分别是“设置相机进行
ठीक है। टीवी उद्योग को करीब से देखने वाले कुछ लोगों के मन में फ़िल्टरों के इस्तेमाल को लेकर कुछ विचार ह
Va ben
Okay. The first two lines are okay. CB - third line, CB(11
Währenddessen können wir nicht sicher sagen, ob sich Ihr Landekissen entfaltet hat. Wir gehen davon aus, dass ein Wiedereintritt mit aktiviertem Bremssystem möglich ist. Derzeit sehen wir bei dieser Art von Wiedereintri
Подсказки на карточках — нет. Поверьте, 
Oh, snowing. No - no, not quite. The windows are in pretty bad shape, and I guess the service module - we'll be trying to shoot out of the window, because every window in the command module is just covered with water droplets. It's going to take a lot o
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. As the Sun sinks slowly in the west, the White Team bi
分かりました。わかりました。これは機動作戦だと思います。サービスモジュールを失ったので、負担
Roger. We expect to go off power at the time we start powering up the or about minus 2-1/2 hours. That is not a hard number, and we'll be updating you on it. As far as going to the JETT attitude, that's completely permissible as soon as you have a powered up command module and a 
Okay. Oka
ठीक है। रोल 180, पिच 228, यॉ 001; लागू नहीं; प्लस 0017.9, 6652.2, 7:37, 6626.5 और मैंने सेक्स्टेंट शाफ्ट को मिस कर दिया; - ट्रनियन - ट्रनियन, 15.7, ज़ेटा सैजिटेरियस, ऊपर, 08.0; रोल 2.1; म
Präsident Nixon hat außerdem einen Aktionstag für alle Bundesangestellten am Montag ausgerufen, damit jeder Ihre Aktivitäten an der Öffentlichkeit verfolgen kann. Viele Landes- und Stad
यह सही है। एक समय था जब मेरे पास यॉ में बाएँ निचले थ्रस्ट नहीं था, अब वह काम कर रहा है, और अब मेरे पास यॉ में दाएँ निचले थ्रस्
现在把它关掉
ACSは本当に行
Хорошо. Это общее замечание, которое относится ко всем случаям, когда вы работаете или переключаетесь между ними, и вам следует быть осторожными, чтобы не использовать расширенный глагол в это время. Это указано в примечаниях к программе, и это просто напоминание. Что произойдет, если мы перейдем к расширенному глаголу, такому как или? Мы можем застрять в и нам придется перебирать его, чтобы получи
제 생각엔 
Okay, das kling
Yes. Those are Buzz's two star charts that he is using right n
キャビンは5.5で維持されて
Più o meno un pai
روجر، ١١. تم الاستلام. ننصحك بالذهاب إلى هذا الخيار، الخيار ١ هو الأفضل، ثم انتقل إلى وضعية الطائرة. انتهى. بعد ذلك سنحصل 
Bien reçu. Et cela correspond à une vitesse de 0,2 pied par seconde, comm
I don't see anyt
Die Sonne ist hell, nicht wahr?... Um ehrlich zu sein, ist es eine ziemlich gute Kamera
ロジャー。ジム、君が起きていて、周りが落ち着いている間に、他に考えておくべきことをいくつか教えてあげよう。一つは特に。君たちみんな、寒すぎてまともに寝てないのは分かってる。35度かそのくらいの温度で、デ
ジェミニVI、はっきりと聞こえ
Wir planen nic
Ich glaube, wir sind für Nummer 9 zuständig. Ungefähr um diese Uhrzeit ging die Kontrollleuchte Nr. 5 im S-II an,
हाँ, डलास में लोग रो रहे हैं। बास्केटबॉल के नतीजे: ह्यूस्टन का प्रदर्शन इस सप्ताहांत अच्छा नहीं रहा। इलिनोइस ने ह्यूस्टन को 97-84 से हराया। और नॉर्थ कैरोलिना ने ओवल्स को 85-77 के स्कोर से मा
ह्यूस्टन, यह देखना बहुत दिलचस्प है कि जब मैं अपना पैर मारता हूँ (यहाँ वायुमंडल नहीं है और गुरुत्वाकर्षण भी नहीं है) तो कण उठते हुए प्रतीत होते हैं, और उनमें से अधिकांश का प्रस्थान कोण और वेग लगभग समान होता है। जहाँ मैं खड़ा हूँ, वहाँ से देखने पर, उनमें से अधिकांश एक निश्चित दूरी पर गिरेंगे। कई कण (यहाँ तक कि प्रतिशत के हिसाब से) अलग-अलग 
روجر. 4، / 62888 غير متاح، غير 
حسنًا. نحن ندرس ا
いや、今まで嗅いだ中で一番強い匂いだ。このパッドを選んだのは大失敗だ
ロジャー、了解。飛行計画によると、君は今頃FBW（機首下げ）に行くはずだった。自動モードになってい
当时我们处于阿金纳-航天器组合姿态0°、180°、0°
Ok, Aquarius. I nostri dati di tracciamento mostrano che, dopo lo scarico di elio, il nostro angolo di ingresso non è cambiato rispetto al suo valore di 6,24 e qualcuno ha calcolato che se avessimo avuto una ventola propulsiva, qu
This is Sigma Seven. I had a slight case of double authori
Que
नहीं, इतनी भी बुरी बात नहीं है। हमने अपना ज़्यादातर अतिरिक्त सामान एड़ियों के पीछे, पैरों के नीचे रखा हुआ है, वैसे भी ये वो सामान है जिसका ज़्यादा इस्तेमाल नहीं होता, इसलिए कोई खास असुविधा नह
好的，我们继续处理其他一些事情，临睡前我们会和你确认一
알겠습니다. 그럼 어떤 버스 구성을 원하시나요? 어떤 메인 버스에 전원을 공급하
好的。也没什么特别的。嗯，我们先从体育说起吧，管它呢。太空人队以8比7险胜，勇士队在第九局得了五六分，但他们最终还是赢了；当天另一场重要的比赛，小熊
هذا صحيح. بذلك تكتمل هذه البطاقة. أما التحديثات الأخرى فهي للعلم فقط، وتستند إلى بيانات منصتنا التي تم جمعها خلال 58 ساعة - انظر إلى المنصة. وضعنا ممتاز. لم تشهد أجهزة الجيروسكوب أي انحراف تقريبًا منذ التحديث الذي رصدناه - حيث كانت قيمة X سالبة 2.24، وقيمة Y موجبة 0.87، وقيمة Z سالبة 0.11. منذ التحديث، الذي استند إلى بيانات 52 ساعة على ما أعتقد، سجلنا انحرافًا في X موجب 0.79، وانحرافًا في Y موجب 1.06، وانحرافًا في Z موجب 0.02... أستطيع أن أرى الفرق بين محاذاة 52 ساعة ومحاذاة 57 ساعة - لم يمنحنا ذلك وقتًا كافيًا للحصول على تحديث دقيق وكامل لفحص الانحراف. لذا، نحن راضون تمامًا عن أداء أجهزة الجيروسكوب. كما أن أجهزة PIPA تبدو رائعة أيضًا. وضعنا ممتاز م
Роджер. Отчет о состоянии. Я отправил вам кровь. Все системы работают исправно, кроме схемы скафандра, над которой я тщательно работаю. Я нахожусь в ретроградном положении; гироскопы в норме; маневр отключен. Я ра
아니요. 원지점은 적용되지 않으니 다시 돌아가서, 저
- - 사진 찍
Роджер. Ни одна из этих звезд не будет точно центрирована, но, по нашим расчетам, при угле наклона 115 градусов Вега, Альтаир, Расальхаге и Денеб будут находиться в поле зрения телескопа, а первые три также были видны при угле наклона 91 градус, так что он должен увидеть о
哦！你知道吗——你看，我根本
你终于把它弄平了，是吗？你刚才说的那个东西，本来应
Mein oberes Trie
Negativo. Li ho tu
Nein. Wie sollen wir eine
...BAT B 전압을 전혀 측
そして、私たちにいつも尋ねられる昔からの質問は、液体廃棄物をどのように処理するかということです。ご覧のとおり、このラインは、船
以下是休斯顿联合通讯社记者哈里·罗森塔尔的报道。对于两岁的杰弗里·洛弗尔来说，两个圣诞老人点亮了他的平安夜。第一个圣诞老人敲响了他的家门，带来了礼物。第二个圣诞老人则从月球上接回了他的爸爸。第一个圣诞老人身穿红色圣诞老人套装，留着白色胡子，发出响亮的“嚯嚯”声，整个街区都能听到。第二个圣诞老人是月球背后喷吐火焰的巨型发动机，成千上万的人都在等待着它点火成功的消息。“请知悉，圣诞老人来了！”这是阿波罗8号打破无线电静默，向焦急的全世界宣布发动机完成关键点火15分钟后发出的第一句话。“我们谁也没想到会收到比这更好的圣诞礼物，”任务控制中心的肯·马丁利说道。“感谢地面上的所有人。你们知道，没有你们，我们不可能完成这项任务，”飞船指挥官弗兰克·博尔曼上校回应道。这时，任务控制中心控制台前的圣诞树亮了起来，宇航员哈里森·施密特为机组人员朗读了太空版的《圣尼古拉斯的来访》。故事开头是这样的：“圣诞前夜，在遥远的太空，阿波罗8号的宇航员们刚刚赢得了登月竞赛。”任务控制中心的工作人员推迟了庆祝活动，直到杰弗里
Jack, credo che tu abbia chiesto se il MOD del contenitore funzionasse e la risposta è che sicuramente 
बहुत सुंदर, बहुत सुंदर, बहुत सुंदर, बहुत सुंदर
Apollo 8, Houston. We have about 1 minute to Carnarvon, and everything is looking good with
POWER/GPI, ВЫКЛ. АВТОМАТИЧЕСКИЙ ВЫБОР СВЕ
알겠습니다. 그건 고
好的。鉴于今天下午我们跟你们讲的隧道情况不一样，我来解释一下我们接下来要怎么做。我们实际上要降低隧道内的气压，使隧道内的绝对压力降至 1.
Vance,
Хорошо. Это довольно точно совпада
Ti ho sentito forte e chiaro. Potresti darmi il carburan
We feel like we have to use the. The gains are not too good in p
Okay, alles kla
Good readbac
了解。こちらはフレンドシップ・セブンです。30分後の報告です。頭を動かしても吐き気や不快感は全くありません。太陽をできるだけ近くで見ることができるなんて驚きです。今は太陽が顔に直接当たっていて、眉毛で目を覆えばいいだけです。左パネルのヒューズスイッチはすべて、以前の報告通りです。モードセレクトは正常、自動、ジャイロは正常。スクイブは作動状態、自動逆噴射はオフ。手動以外の「T」ハンドルはすべてオンで、万が一故障した場合に備えてすぐに手動に戻せるように引いています。レスキューエイドは正常です。ランディングバッグはオフです。シーケンスパネルのその他の項目はすべて通常位置です。制御燃料は68～100パーセント、これを繰り返し、68～100パーセントです。EP
नहीं। दरअसल, मैं काफी देर से 
لا بأس. معدل الدوران ه
Это Т
Ringsum braun. Es besteht kei
Hier sprich
Вперед, продо
OK. + 0858, - 16500 12960 36195; constellation nord Sirius 
أحرقت المركبة الفضائية جيميني 8 نقاط TPI في وض
收到。点火时
ええと。ちょっと早口になりすぎたかもしれません。3回目はターゲット58、63、65を撃ちまし
オーケ
Apollo 8, prépar
L'area che stiamo sorvolando in questo momento suggerisce un possibile accenno di attività vulcanica, anche se al momento non riesco a valutarla a occhio nudo pe
سبعة هنا. الوقود جاهز، 4 جالون،
Apollo 11, Ho
Ich verstehe, ich ha
いいえ。必ずしも露出した物質だとは言え
... aufgenom
はい、どう
रोजर. 224, प्लस 60267; 225, प्लस 58148; 226,
休斯
मुख्य पैराशूट हरी बत्ती पर 
Okay. Wir möchten, dass Sie mit der Feinjustierung fortfahren. Die Drehmomentwinkel für den Kreiselkompass lauten: X + 0,0
That right-angle bracke
الهدوء، هيوستن. بعد الانتهاء من هذا التقرير،
Okay. Nun, wahrscheinlich wird sie dir bei R
Roger. Beweg dich jetzt ein b
Si je peux débarrasser un peu la nourriture de Bill par ici, et la ranger… Ici se trouve la baie d'équipement inférieur
네, 잘 들립니다. 기분은 괜찮고, 비행도 순조롭습니다. 지구가 보이고, 비행은 
阿波罗13
Gemini 4, CSQ. Turn your computer
음, 거기서는 노조원증이 꼭 있어야 해요. 그래도 뭐, 크게 불평할 
了解。
Роджер. Я думал, мы тебе э
Okay. Fine. We're indicating 84 
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। हम इस कंट्रोल मोड को बंद कर रहे हैं। हम चाहते हैं कि आप मशीन को उसकी मूल स्थिति में वापस ले आएं, और हम एटीट्यूड होल्ड मोड में चले जाएंगे। फिर हमें पावर बचाने के लिए बॉल को लाइन से हटाना होगा। और फिर, तापमान को एक समान बनाए रखने के लिए, हर 15 या 30 मिनट में, हम आपको 90 या 180 डिग्री 
Negative, no medical pass. I wanted to ask him, if he was awake, his opinion upon this sl
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। सीएमपी उठ जाएगा। एलएमपी अब सोने जा रहा है, और वह तब तक सोता रहेगा, फिर मैं भी थोड़ा समय निकालकर सोने की कोशिश करूंगा ताकि तीसरे दिन तक हम सभी एक ही नियमित नींद चक्र में 
Roger, ich habe einige
Das ist richtig. Wir weisen darauf hin, dass Ihre Uhr eine Sekunde nachgeht, dies wird jedoch kompen
روجر. وتذكر أننا لن نستمتع
Показания CD
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。你可以终止激光炮的训练了。我们的速率现在足
아니
Sie haben hier unten von
Here is a feature by Harry Rosenthal of Associated from Houston. Two Santas brighten the Christmas Eve for 2-year-old 
نعم، أنت محق. كلاهما يجب أن يكونا MA
إنها حفرة أكبر بكثير، وسأكون ملعونا
एक्वेरि
Roger. You're coming throug
Well, we're getting in dark. I can see dark here too, Jim
ヴァンスさん、ご質問に
هذا صحيح. 
मैं सीढ़ी के सबसे निचले सिरे पर खड़ा हूँ। इसके पायदान सतह में केवल 1 या 2 इंच ही धंसे हुए हैं, हालाँकि पास जाने पर सतह बेहद 
और क्या आप हमारे लिए पर्ज टैंक और क्रायो O2 टैं
물론 지구는 매우 밝고, 검은 하늘은 칠흑같이 검기보다는 약간 장밋빛을 띠고 있습니다. 별은 아주 밝은 별이 아니라면 그 빛 속에 묻혀 보이지 않을 겁니다. 별이 지평선 아래의 밝음에 가려지지 않도록 조준선을 지평선 위로 상당히 옮겨 보았습니다. 하지만 조준선을 지평선 위로 충분히 올려 검
Nous avons pris des photos et il nous
الهدوء، يا هيوستن. تف
알겠습니다, 잭. 그 절차는 완료되었고, 다음으로 명령 모듈로 돌아가서 메인 버스에 임시로 전원을 
روجر، هل ستمنحني فرصة أخرى بعد 14
نحتاج إلى تعديل بسيط آخر لعرضه في منتصف الشاشة. إذا أمكنك تحريك الكاميرا باتجاه خط النهاية، فهذا هو 
오늘은 어제보다 일찍 자려고 하니까 간단하게 말씀드리겠습니
ये बिल एंडर्स हैं, और उन्होंने लोमोटिल लेते समय 
ऑक्सीजन हाई रेट चेक की शुरुआत 
好的，乔。-7：，减去 0003.1，加上所有球，加上 0000.1，不适用，加上 0020.5，加上 0003.1，0:23，008
이글, 휴스턴. 후방 OMNI
Je le sais, je le sais — 295. Température A — 87. Pression A — 3000. Température B — 82. Pression B — 2650. Ampèremètre principal — 19. N° 2 — 19,5. 1A — 4,5. 1B — 4,5. 1C — 4. 2A — 5. 2B — 4,75. 2C — 4,75. Tension continue 23,5. S1 — 29. S2 — 29. C — 27. 1A — 24. 1B — 24. 1C — 24. Temps moyen de Greenw
Das ist bestätigt. Wir haben es 
是的。它们放在电脑下面，放在那里的东西越重，升压比就越高。我们没有任何设备，所以我只是在想，哪些重物——比如我们可以把一些摄像机、电视摄像机之类的东西放在那里，这些东西通常都很重——放在我们的……不，我们不能把它们放在我们的……里，但我们可以把它们放在下面的那个容器里，这样有助于降低升压比。如果您能想到其他办法，我们将不
7시간 22분... 인공호흡기 
我给你——你能
Roger. Je souhaiterais éga
क्या? मुझे पता है। मैंने इसी तरह से नाप लेने की कोशिश की थी। सच में, यह ठीक से काम न
Die Nicktrimmung liegt
D'ac
ジム、1時間ほど前に食事の時間を予定していました。もう済んでいると思いますが。もう一つ、どれくらいそこにいるのか、それともまたベッドに戻るのか、それとも何か他の予定なのか、教えてい
هذا صحيح. حسناً. 
그래, 너 정말 잘하고 
你收到我的标记了
Very good. The timing is right on, Wally. I'll count down to retros
방금 메인 경보기가 다시 켜졌네요. 이제 계속 켜져 있으니 켜둔 채로 두겠습니다. 왜
Ecco 
मैं बस आपसे बात करना चाहता 
わかりました。パネル3では、最初の3つの手順を実行しました。MODE、VOICEをVOICEに、POWERをOFFに、POWER PMPをOFFにし、S-BAND OMNIを元に戻します。FLIGHT BUS、MAIN Bが開き、CB CTE、MAIN Bが開き
Прежде чем я с вами попрощаюсь, позвольте мне сказать, что св
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. لقد بدّلنا الهوائيات معكم مجدداً. أكرر أنه لا توجد لدينا أي تحديثات على سطح القمر - تحديثات للكتب في الوقت الحالي. نحن ندرس بعض التحديثات الطفيفة، لكننا ما زلنا نناقشها ف
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 잔지바르 캡 컴입니다. 원격 측정 시스템에 따르면 모든 시스템이 정상입니다. 의료 상태도 정상입니다... 보고 내용도 동일하며, 원격 측정 데이터에 약간의 끊김 현상이 있습니다... 
D'
سطوع الشبكة... لا أعرف شيئاً عن ذلك...
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Если вы это читаете, то позиция 000 крайне неблагоприятна для нашей связи. Фактически, мы потеряли все данные с вами, и голосовая связь нечитаема. Мы рекомендуем вам выбрать вариант 1, который является п
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호 기지입니다. 여기서 아폴로 12호의 ​​비행 계획을 
Подождите. Это было неверно. Три минуты. Обратный отсчет до 3 минут, я поставлю вам отметку и учту 2 секу
Qu'en pensez-v
حسناً يا هيوستن، تف
هذا سلبي يا أبولو 8. نود تحديث الأمور أولاً، وسنقدم لكم متجه الحالة ثم متجه 
Roger, 11. We've been watching your activity on the there, and by selecting another major program with a ENTER and all that, we show yo
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP COM. Ho aggiornato il tuo TR, non hanno ricevuto un orario valido a Cape Canaveral. Ora hai un orario valido per il 21-4. Lo stesso GMTRC ti è stato trasmesso da Houston CAP CO
Ripensandoci, come sta andando la temper
ठीक है। हम आपके लिए सेक्स्टेंट स्टार की स्थिति को फिर से ठीक करने जा रहे हैं ताकि हाई-गेन एंटीना
سيجما سبعة. هاوا
मैनुअल एटीट
罗杰。我就知道你会这么说。另外
로저. 그곳을 가로지르는 일련의 균열 또는 단층들은 남쪽으로 약 세 단계에 걸쳐 아래로 내려갑니다. 북쪽의 평행한 단층 패턴도 중앙에서 아래로 내려갑니다. 지구에 계신 여러
Bien, retour à la page 18. Nous continuons ainsi: 30 secondes, 10 secondes, 7 secondes, moins 5 secondes. À « allumage », pas d’allumage, et nous ajouter
Columbia und Eagle, Hou
روجر، جيم، بيل، يمكنك إيقاف تشغيل مضخة تبخير الوقو
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, this is Kano. H
沃利，我们有一些回声探
Роджер, я достану их для тебя, когда
ठीक है। वेंस, थोड
LMのカメラカバー。ちょっと考えてみてください。ちゃんと装着できたので、もう交換する必要はないと思います。今動いているなら、もし実際に船外活動を始める前に止まってしまうなら、交換する理由があるかも
حسنًا. عند 123 + 00، ألفا 78 - 78% PQMD، برافو 76% PQMD، نسبة الأكسجين أثناء الهبوط 62% - 62%. ساعات الهبوط ا
और आगे बढ़ते हैं। अगर बर्न के दौरान इंजन बंद हो जाता है, और आपको NOUN 97 चमकता हुआ दिखाई देता है, तो आपको PROCEED करना चाहिए, फिर उलेज, ENGINE START से PUSH, और DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE ON करना चाहिए। ठीक है। अब कुछ सामान्य जानकारी। अगर आपने PC प्लस 2 बर्न नहीं किया है, तो शायद P - P प्लस 4 सबसे जल्दी होगा। बैकअप केवल रेट-फेल मोड में होगा, जो आप जानते हैं। हम स्टार चेक के बारे में बात कर रहे हैं। इस बारे में आपसे बाद में बात करनी होगी। अगर किसी कारण से PC-2 नहीं है, तो आपके पास 152:02:00 बजे लैंडिंग के साथ एक फ्री-रिटर्न ट्रेजेक्टरी है, और यह एक छोटे मिडकोर्स-5 के बाद होगा, जो शायद 93 घंटे पर लग
Хорошо, Джек. Вернись к процедуре зарядки аккумулятора, которую я тебе дал. И чтобы прекратить зарядку, просто — тебе нужно будет написать «Разомкнуто» или «Выкл.» рядом с выключ
هذا البث يصلكم من
没错。面板 5：
बज़, तुम्हारे दाहिने-बाएँ कंधे के पास से जो नज़ारा दिख रहा है, वह 
Мой люк снят. Можете открыть свой, и я начн
ع
Sag mal, Jerry, gestern Abend meinte Jim etwas davon, VHF Simplex A in etwa 2000 Meilen Entfernung
ठीक है। आप फ्यूल सेल प्यूर्ज की उम्मीद कर सकते हैं, और बैटरी A की चार्जिंग इसके बाद लगभग पूरी हो जाएगी; और लगता है कि आपकी बैटरी लगभग पूरी तरह चार्ज हो चुकी होगी। और हम आपको इसे बंद करने के सही समय के बारे में कॉल करेंगे। हम क्लोरीन प्रक्रिया के बारे में आपसे कुछ पुष्टि चाहते हैं। क्या आपने कल रात क्लोरीन का इस्तेमाल किया था या नहीं? लवेल और एंडर्स, आपको
ポイントは付与さ
罗杰。弗兰克，你觉得你能沿径向完成这次燃烧吗？如果你要沿其他方向燃烧，我们希望增加燃烧强度。完
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。中途修正2号。SPS/G&N 63059，正负0.97，点火时间0.2644 5.792，正负0.118，正负0.0003，正负0.177，滚转2.77°355′0.15″，BLOCK NA，DELTA-VT 0.213°0.3′0.168″，六分仪星30°2082′3.70″。PAD
سأكون سعيداً ج
O
좋아요
罗杰，明白了。你准备好复制一组
Non in modo significativo. Riuscivo ad arrivare ai primi 5 cm senza troppi problemi, e poi, mentre lo spingevo dentro con tutta la mia forza, per il secondo ci volevano due mani sul martello, e stavo facendo delle belle ammaccature nella parte superiore dell'asta di prolunga, e non andava molto oltre... credo che la profondità totale potesse essere di circa 20 o 23 cm. Ma anche lì, non ce la faceva... Per qualche motivo sembrava non voler stare in piedi. In altre parole, continuavo a spingerlo dentro e scavava una specie di buco, m
कृपया ध्यान दें कि 
まだ1.5Gくらい残っています
2.5ダウン。前進。前
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 모든
Sti
Сначала отобразилось 7 —
روجر. هذه الصورة تنحرف عن المرك
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous avons des données fiables sur les trois membres d'équipage. Non. Remettez cela en question. Nous n'avons pas encor
ठीक है। अगला चरण यही है - इसे पूरा करने के तुरंत बाद हम पानी खाली करेंगे। हम पानी का स्तर 30 प्रति
Buonasera. Vorrei discutere con voi alcuni degli aspetti più simbolici del volo della nostra missione, l'Apollo 11. Mentre discutevamo degli eventi accaduti negli ultimi 2 o 3 giorni qui a bordo della nostra navicella spaziale, siamo giunti alla conclusione che questo è stato molto più di un viaggio di tre uomini verso la Luna; più, ancora, degli sforzi di un team governativo e industriale; più, persino, degli sforzi di una sola nazione. Riteniamo che questo rappresenti un simbolo dell'insaz
로저. 그건 잠시 보류하겠습니다. 간단한 3단계 절차였는데, "활성화 페이지 1, 1A, 2를 반복하십시오"라고 되어 있었지만, 아무도 이해하지 못하는 단계가 하나 더 있었습니다. 그래서 기본적으로 저희가 권장하는 방법은 방금 생략했던 SUPERCRIT 압력 측정 절차를 반복하는 것입니다. 필요하면 나중에 다시 설명해 드리겠습니다
Nous recevons votre tem
Ok, Apollo 8. Quello che faremo in TV è di alzare il volume non appena torneremo all'antenna ad alto guadagno, e sembra ch
I can't quite
ठीक है। पैनल 250 BAT B पावर एंट्री/पोस्टलैंडिंग खोलें, और फिर मेन बस वोल्टेज की जा
Se mangiassi di più, Ed, non riusciresti a fare altr
حسنًا، ١١. أولًا، في فحوصات أنظمتنا، سارت الأمور على 
好的，比尔。我想就上次关于使用机载状态向量进行第 4 步操作的说法做个补充说明。经过地面进一步观察，他们必须开始进行相关计算，与其拖延或重复工作，我们不如继续沿用我们一直以来使用的程序。关于月球轨道方面，我们一直在研究，杰克·施密特和他的团队在后台研究了你们的舷窗会产生什么影响。基本上，看起来有两种方案会对第 2 步操作产生影响。其中一种方案当然是让你和吉姆换个位置，让吉姆向外观察，这样就能获得他的 SAM 数据；另一种方案是翻转飞船，让吉姆尽可能地将光学系统指向前方
Oui. 
罗杰。我们想把你的污水箱里的水排到25%；为了便于追踪，我们想在中途之
休斯顿，阿波
没错。382
Понял. Это RKV CAP COM. У 
حسناً. فهمت. أع
네. 목소리는 또렷하게 들리는데, 마이
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous vous montrons 
了
أورورا سفن، آخر تسجيل لك كان غير قابل للقراءة. أنت تتلاشى بشكل ملحوظ، وإن كان متقطعًا. سأقرأ أوقات التسلسل العكسي دون أن أتمكن من قراءتها. المنطقة 3 دلتا، 04
血压
Roger, that'll come up just as it has been coming up and you'll get them at Cana
하지만 우리는 엘파소 지역을 확인했고, 그곳에 구름이 걷힌 듯한 틈이 있는 것을 보았습니다
We'd like you to go back to. Pick either attitude that'
알겠습
Schl
11, Houston. Sembra che qui il tempo sarà piuttosto rilassato per le prossime due ore. Vi faremo avere un PAD, ovviamente, al prossimo
로저, 프랭크. TV 카메라와 브래킷 등에 대해 할 이야기가 많습니다. 
휴스턴, 시작하기 전에 질문 하나만 더 
حذاء Jettison Retro أحمر
안녕하세요. 조준경을 보니, 피스톤 안쪽의 흰색 표시가 빨간색에서 초록색 쪽으로 0.25인치에서 0.38인치 정도 나와 있는 것 같네요. 
收到，巴兹。回音不错。你们这些全向天线在这种配置下大概
روجر. هذه فريندشيب 7. النافذة، ومؤشرات الوضع، والمنظار كلها تعمل بشكل سليم. أستطيع رؤية الجانب المظلم يصعد في المنظار خلفي الآن. ضغط المقصورة 5.5 وهو ثابت. درجة حرارة المقصورة 95 درجة. الرطوبة النسبية 28%. قمتُ برفع درجة حرارة المقصورة - درجة حرارة بذلتي - إلى وضع الماء المُعزز لمزيد من التبريد. درجة حرارة البخار حاليًا 61 درجة. نسبة الأكسجين 
А что касается Водолеев, тесты в симуляторе показали, что если вы позв
हाँ, मैंने किया। आप हटाना चाहते हैं - आप BUS TIE मोटर स्विचों के साथ दोनों बसों को चालू करना चाहते हैं; सबसे पहले, यह देखने के लिए क
Come ti sembra la foto
Okay. Molto bene, Joe... configura per quel panne
روجر. أنت ترى الأرض، كما نراها نحن، من نافذتنا اليسرى، أي ما يزيد قليلاً عن نصفها. ننظر إلى شرق المحيط الهادئ، وفي النصف الشمالي من الجزء العلوي للشاشة، نرى أمريكا الشمالية، ألاسكا، الولايات المتحدة، كندا، المكسيك، وأمريكا الوسطى. تختفي أمريكا 
Подожди минутку. Там спрашивается, какое с
10 मिनट की तै
好的。今天，我们需要您在按照程序进行观测之前和之后分别进行一次耳轴偏差测定。我们的目的是检查是否存在某种热效应导致六分仪角度读数出现误差。您之前测定的偏差应该被计入，也就是说，当您连续两次测量结果相差在 0.003 度以内时，请在 NOUN 87 上执行 PROCEED 操作。当然，在两次测量之间，请将耳轴移动几度。今天地球在您的视野中应该会小很多。我相信您比我们更了解这一点，但为了确保您能够准确测量恒星与地
여기는 휴스턴입니다. 저희가 귀사에서 제공해주신 비율을 참고하겠습니다. 
انتظر قلي
روجر، نعلم أنك 
わ
Okay. Damit wären die Fragen unserer Geologen für heute Abend beantwortet. Sofern Sie keine weiteren Fragen haben, war’s das 
好的，
Позвольте мне зачитать это вам вслух. ВН минус РП, плюс 77; шаг 400K, номинальный; ВОС 400K, 22 плюс 02; ЭТО, 24 плюс 43; конец затемнения, 30 пл
يوري أليكسييفيتش، سننقل محطة الراديو هذه إلى الملجأ الآن. لذا، سيكون هناك صمت لم
这里是休斯顿。收到。另外，告知各位，抛弃包
À E mi - 02:30, lors de la coupure de l'alimentation du câble ombilical, la première étape consiste à ouvrir le disjoncteur principal B (alimentation vers MAIN B). Ensuite, une troisième étape indique « Disjoncteur SENSOR SIGNAL, MAIN B, ouvert ». Supprimez c
好的。我现在又有一台真正的CAP CO
حسنًا يا فانس، لقد كنت أحاول استخدام نظام التحكم في الوضعية "الحد الأدنى من الدفع" فقط للتحكم في الدوران والانعراج - أو بالأحرى الدوران والميل. ولكن، مع استخدام نظام التحكم في الوضعية فقط في هذا الإعداد، لا أستطيع التحكم في الدوران بالطريقة التي أريدها. لذلك، اضطررت إلى استخدام نظام آخر لزيادة الدوران تدريجيًا حتى
Роджер. плюс 90, G&N: 63481, минус 153, плюс 132, 004 10 25 38, минус 04761, плюс 00001, плюс 53361, 180 193 000, неприменимо, плюс 00203 53573 633 53349, 33 1578 122, недоступно, минус 0252, минус 02580 11887 34345 016 03 50. Вега и Денеб, 071 291 341. Нет заполн
아폴로 8호, 
姿
迈克，我们现在在220频道已经接收到远景信号了。不过我会再确认一
D'accord. Nous allons tester l'ordinateur dans tous les modes. Ce test se déroule en trois
يطلبون منك ترك ال
I will check my time as 1 plus 06 plus 50 seconds when I went into reentry attitude. The stars are very easy to see. I see quite a few, but am bothered by a considerable amount of red li
Das ist richtig, Jack. Wir haben die Verfahrensanweisungen – detaillierte Checklisten – soeben fertiggestellt und werden sie Ihnen zusenden. Das heißt, ein Zeitplan mit Bezug auf die Checkliste für die Einreise 
Je vous ai supprimé. Pourriez-vous répéter après la quanti
전력을 절약하고 싶다면 부
I can just bar
You're loud and clear now, and let's go to panel 5. We want FUEL CELL PUMP AC 1, OFF; AC 2, OFF; and that's the FUEL CELL 1 PUMP, AC 1, OFF; FUEL CELL 2 PUMPS, AC 2, OFF; FUEL CELL B PUM
Houston, Eagle. Aurez-vous besoin d'un gain important avant de pouvoir consulter nos indicat
알았어. 잠시만 기다려줘. 먼저 전원을 연결해야
यह बात सही है, और हम इसमें प्रक्षेप पथ संबंधी विचार और इस तरह की
Ci è mancata, Fred. Ri
حسنً
Roger. J'attend
Вот и
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон.
そして、スプラッシュカーテンを取り付け、ネックダムを取り付け、キャビンエアーリサーキュレーションハンドルを上げます。左のシュノーケルハンドルとキャビンベントハンドルを上げます。ハッチリリーストリガーを離します。ウォーターシールが下がって閉じていることを確認します。ランヤードを取り付け、左のハッチを開きます。司令パイロットのサバイバルギアを宇宙船の右側に収納します。リカバリーループ全体は...宇宙船の右側です。サバイバルキットを持って左席に移動します。パイロ
Впере
罗杰。在我们继续
좋아, 잭, 다시 한번 확인해 보자. 펄스 모드에서 우주선 조종을 시
杰克，你看到了
- - 그리고 P에 대한 수
हम सब कुछ साफ कर रहे हैं। मैं जाग
Oh. Die Einstellungen für das Contarex in der Kabine – ich habe sie mir notiert und werde sie holen und Ihnen zeigen, wo
Und, Houston, Ruhe 
Well, I propose to give myself a little bit of a - a bath, but not to put that damn LCG on tonight. You never did ask them about the - about the.., huh? I sure haven't
روجر. ولدينا صورة الآن؛ إلا أنها تتحرك كثيراً، لذا لو أمكنك تثبيت الكاميرا قليلاً. ولد
11, Хьюстон. Роджер. Ваши углы — 45 и 255. Правильно ли я понимаю, что как только несущая частота отключилась, она перешла на эти углы; или же это произошло только после повторного включения восходящей несуще
是的，听起来很有可能，吉姆。弗雷德也报告了类似的情况，但我们还没能确定它们到底是什么，可能要等到
알겠습니다. 동경 170도, 그리니치 표준시는 17시 00분입니다. 요한계시록 47장
You're loud and clear now, and let's go to pa
Ich fühle mich g
Roger. And on that quad temperature - the upper limit of that thing is 105 degrees on the bottle. You are well below that. We have been watching it, and it is tracking, 
Ap
视
Hey, du und Jim solltet euch unbedingt mal treffen. Jim hat gerade erzähl
Je viens de faire un survol de la cible 16-A. L'aérodrome de Bassorah est situé juste au bord du golfe Persique. Je l'ai repéré – j'ai repéré le golfe Persique à un angle d'environ 30°… J'ai piqué puis repéré le lac… au nord-ouest du golfe Per
Роджер. Имейте в виду, что в настоящее время уровень кисл
Роджер, командир аэропорта Кантон. Мой отчет: топливо 90-100% [процентов], кислород 73-100% [процентов], ампер 22, давление в кабине стабильно держитс
Ça fonctionne bien pour l'instant, Charlie. On en a installé un sur le pistolet à eau et l'autre sur le robinet en bas. On a remarqué un petit souci: ils fuient au niveau de la jonction entre le sac à aliments et le filtre à eau. Mais à part ça, ils ont l'air de bien fonctionner. Au début, il y avait un peu de gaz, je pense que c'était juste pour purger le système; et le dernier tube q
好的
Т
11, hier spricht Houston. Wir haben noch etwa sechs Minuten bis zum nächsten Durchgang. Damit wir unsere Bodenleitungen konfigurieren können, möchten wir wissen, ob Sie den F
حسنًا يا جاك. يبدو أننا لا نرغب على الأرجح في تشغيل وحدة التحكم قبل ساعتين تحت الصفر. هذا لا يعني أنه لا يمكننا بدء الإجراء قبل ذلك بوقت كافٍ، لكننا لا نرغب في تشغيلها قبل ساعتين تحت الصفر بوقت طويل.
حسنًا، كما تعلم، تم ضبط وضع التحكم على الانجراف. الوضع المُختار هو الوضع العادي، التلقائي، مع تثبيت الجيروسكوبات. لقد اخترت وضعية ا
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि अंतरिक्ष कार्यक्रम को लगभग सभी ने अत्याधुनिक इलेक्ट्रॉनिक उपकरणों से भरा हुआ ही समझा है, और निश्चित रूप से, इसमें बहुत कुछ ऐसा ही है। लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि मैं यहाँ कुछ और चीज़ें भी दिखाऊँगा। पहली चीज़ से आपको टैंक में बचे हुए पानी की मात्रा का बहुत सटीक माप मिल जाता है। हम इस थैली का उपयोग करेंगे जो मैं अभी दिखा रहा हूँ, टैंक में बचे हुए पानी को इकट्ठा करने के लिए और यह देखने के लिए कि वास्तव में कितना पानी बचा है, और उम्मीद है कि भविष्य के मिशनों में, इन इकाइयों के लिए अनुमत समय को सुरक्षित रूप से थोड़ा और बढ़ाया जा सकेगा। और, मेरे दूसरे हाथ में वह यंत्र 
Okay. Es sind 
Роджер. Вы видите Землю, как и мы, из нашего левого окна, чуть больше половины Земли. Мы смотрим на восточную часть Тихого океана, и в северной половине верхней половины экрана мы видим Северную Америку, Аляску, Соединенные Штаты, Канаду, Мексику и Центральную Америку. Южная Америка становится невидимой сразу за терминатором или внутри тени. Мы видим океаны с отчетливым синим оттенком, белые полосы крупных облачных образований по всей Земле, береговые линии, западную часть США, долину Сан-Хоакин, горный хр
Okay. The
알겠습니다. 샤프
알
你好，百慕大首都公司。友
هل أنت على دراية با
Ora ho impostato la temper
尼尔，尼尔，这里是休斯顿，通过宁
Roger, Type 1 over G
了解。高度調整GETのバーン、03+03+19、デルタV、0.8、持続時間、0+01、ヨー00、ピッチ00、コア25、00008、26と27はす
जब मैं बाहर था, तो मैंने जिम की खिड़की पर ध्यान दिया - उसकी खिड़की के बाहरी हिस्से पर एक परत चढ़ी हुई है। एक बार जब मेरा कंधा या हाथ उससे टकराया, तो वह परत सीधे खिड़की पर फैल गई, और
Roger. That's right. It was counting up 
نعم، أعت
Роджер. Начальная точка PAD: область — центральная часть Тихого океана, координаты: 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, широта: плюс 1332, минус 16917, 064, 36194, 649, дальность полета: 14045, 36275, 195 03 0
Ou plutôt, Houston. Jim, il semblerait que nous ayons établi la liaison, ce qui va améliorer notre flux de données. Le seul hic, c'est que nous risquons de perdre des données, et probablement aussi la voix, pendant une partie de chaque rotation. Il faut donc s'y attendre. Autre chose: si quelqu'un a un appareil BIOMED activé, pourrait-il le mettre s
那是现场演出，VII，不是录
Mancano 13 gradi alla palla, e credo che sia più o meno
ठीक है, पेरीसिंथियन प्लस 2 एमपीएल में, 079, 27, 4013, प्लस 08144, माइनस 00443, माइनस 00226, N/A, प्लस 00205, 08455, 4 प्लस 20, 268, 261, प्लस 08155, माइनस 00443, माइनस 021, 21
Ok. Lasciami dare un'occhiata qui e vedere se c'è qualcos'altro che qualcun altro vuole
Un
Exa
好的，乔。我现在用的是 O
Apollo 8, Houston, avec une mise à jour de la c
Roger. In the, you have 215, that is 2 1 5, poun
알겠습니다. 사실, 좀 더 자세한 절차를 
그리고 저희가 주시하
توصي شركة Cape بإجراء عملية الحرق العكسي بعد المحاذاة، والبقاء في وض
Bene. Quando sono anda
And now we want to ask you a question about 
Okay, ganz oben steht „Zweck“ für Monitor-PC plus 2; alles ist leer, bis man zu „Latitude“ kommt. Die Breitengrade lauten wie folgt: -21,47, -165,00; 1166,0, 36291. E
Ricevuto. Sembra che dovrai riposizionare il radar qui. Ti consigliamo di iniziare la saldatura TIG a men
60 с
Ok, Apollo 8. Abbiamo terminato il primo test e ora cambieremo la modalità uplink in UPLINK COMMAND AND RANGING, senza upvoice. Resteremo in questa modalità per 2 minuti e mezzo e invieremo un messaggio di prova. Non avrà alcun effetto né sul computer né sulla configurazione del pannello di controllo. Quello che potresti vedere sarà il rumore in banda S associato al blocco di interruzione. Tuttavia, dovresti comunque avere un buon segnale sul tuo misuratore di potenza. Questa non è una perdita di segnale, ma piuttosto una perdita di mod
阿波罗8号，
罗杰。好的，那我们就在第5
Um auf meine Nachbesprechung zum Booster vom Anfang des Fluges zurückzukommen: Nachdem wir in die Dunkelheit eingetreten waren, in einer geschätzten Entfernung von 1200 Fuß, versuchte ich, die Position des Boosters zu halten. Zu diesem Zeitpunkt konnte ich meine Entfernung zum Booster jedoch nur anhand des Abstands zwischen den blinkenden Lichtern einschätzen. Gelegentlich – nicht gelegentlich, sondern ständig – sah ich ein Licht, dann zwei, dann wieder nur eines, und manchmal verging eine lange Zeit, bis ich wieder zwei Lichter sah. Dies deutete darauf hin, dass sich der Booster permanent drehte. Ich hatte keine Ahnung, in welche Richtung er flog. Anhand des Abstands zwischen den Lichtern, wenn ich beide sehen konnte, fühlte ich mich bis etwa Carnarvon in einer recht guten Position. Dort schien ich mich recht schnell zu nähern, obwohl ich mir dessen nicht sicher war. Die gesamte bis dah
Roger. Compris 03 47 35; 61.2; 01 plus 22; lacet zéro, tangage 21 degrés vers le bas; 25, 00570; 26, 00224; 27 tous les zéros; propulseurs arrière; Posigrade vers l
रॉजर
Das ist das Schönste, was jemals jemand 
В спорте команда «Хьюстон Ойлерз» демонстрирует большой энтузиазм на своих первых предсезонных тренировках в Керрвилле, и тренер Уолли Лемм говорит, что он впечатлен отличной группой новичков. Вчера, в четверг, в Национа
Roger. 
Can you tell me why they want to use the Repress instead of
Negativo. Amicizia Sette. Sono in or
不，不是
那是给哥伦
わかりました。グリコール リザーバー入力バルブが閉
Roger, 11. 
わかりました。良い考えですね。サービスモジュールの写真を撮るためにどのような操作をさせるかについては、かなり検討を重ねてきま
Eagle, hier spricht Houston. Rufen S
시작한 지 5
... खैर, मुझे सच में नहीं पता - इसका एक हिस्सा यह है - देखो, जिम, मुझे 
नील, क्या आपको 
روجر، 13-برافو؛ 146, 03+32. 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 27 11. 56 46. 3+17, 8+36. 14- برافو: 04+07, 09+03. 15- برافو: 121, 02+34, 14 10 30, 8+35, 16- برافو: 096, 02+03, 15 50 26. 11+28. 158, 3+48, 16 28 28, 2+39
N
Ricevuto. Ci stiamo lavorando. Non ci sono state trasmissioni dalla Base Tranquility dall'ultima volta che ci siamo sentiti. Non possiamo fornirti un ripetitore completo in banda S senza la garanzia di un'antenna ad alto guadagno. Stiamo lavor
Apollo 11, hier ist Houston. Startfreigabe er
はい、了解です。パッドをお渡しします。追跡が安定したら、数時間後にこちらに来る予定です。理由は…あと2、3手順を
Buzz 会想要执行 VERB 82
レコーダーが鳴りました。（2分警告灯が点灯
Режим скорой мед
Okay, I'll give
जिम, यह लगभग सही है। जैक उस स्थिति में कोर्स अलाइन करेगा। हम आपको इसी के लिए उस स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी करने को कह रहे हैं। हम कोर्स अलाइन गिम्बल कोणों की गणना करेंगे और उन्हें जैक को भेज देंगे, और वहाँ पहुँचने पर वह अपनी चेकलिस्ट के अनुसार सबसे पहले अपने प्लेटफ़ॉर्म को कोर्स अलाइन करेगा। फिर वह आगे बढ़ेगा, और यदि उसे तारे दिखाई नहीं देते हैं, तो हम 
로저, 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 연료 90-98%, 기내 압력 55psi, 산소 75-100%
はい。それでは、消費電力を大幅に削減する手順をご紹介します。その後、さらに詳しい情報
Похоже на ливень с 
好的。我们会这么做。我们会等到大家都收到各自的设备后，再
Tutte quelle sonde, quei farmaci e quelle sciocchezze; tutto quel trasferimento EVA, potete dimenti
فريدو، إذا كنت تعتقد أن الأمر عملي، فنحن مستعدون لتزويدك ببعض الإعدادات - نعمل حاليًا على بعض إعدادات الكاميرا لالتقاط صور للفتحات. وإذا كانت لديك كاميرا جاهزة، فأخ
네, 그랬죠. 그리고 말씀하신 대로 생각해 보니, 저는 땅과 평행한 자세가 아니었던 
Oh, to
미안해, 프레드, 우리가 또 시끄럽게 굴
Über Hawaii hatten wir Sichtkontakt, als Sie uns Ihre Schalterstellungen durchgaben. Wir haben die Meldung bis zu Ihrem Befehl 041 „RECORDER ON“ empfangen, und zu diesem Zeitpunkt begann das Raumschiff zu rollen. Könnten Sie bitte von dort aus fortfahren und uns genau Ihre Schalterstellungen an Bord sowie Ih
罗杰。就是这样，杰克。月亮
잠시 기다려
Al momento è debole e illeggibile. Ma trasmetterò alla cieca. Per favore, c
Джим. Я не думаю, что это было..
Roger, Mike. Puoi procedere e a
ठीक
D'ac
まだ終わってない。まあ、今日は失敗を繰り返さないでいい日だね。名目値で一度試
Se avete commenti su questa proposta, fateceli sapere e noi
Gemini
मुझे ज़रा भी दिशाभ्रम नहीं हुआ। मुझे ऐसा लगा कि मैं ज़मीन की ओर देख सकता हूँ - मुझे ज़मीन की ओर देखने में पूरी तरह सहज महसूस हो रहा था - और मैं अपनी पीठ के बल लेटकर ऊपर भी देख सकता था, इससे मुझे ज़रा भी दिशाभ्रम नहीं हो रहा था। अंतरिक्ष यान ही मेरा सबसे अच्छा संदर्भ था। जब भी मैं 
네. 지금 짐이 들고 있는 것 같은데... 아마 조리개 f:22, 무한대 초점, 그리고 50mm 필름일 거예요. 짐은 지금 사진에 바하 칼리
休斯顿，你现在在屏幕中央看到的是舒伯特和吉尔伯特U型陨石坑，它现在就在中心；这大约是在动力下降前12分钟多一点的时候出现的。与其让我回
रॉजर। हम आपकी प्रग
في هذه المنطقة تحديداً، لا أعتقد أن هناك الكثير من *** مسحوق ناعم *** كتل
Bene. Sulla quarta fila. Apri - Da sinistra, apri i primi cinque - correzione - C
Apollo 8, en attendant le gain maximal, je vais poursuivre le résumé de la trajectoire. Nous pouvons encore rejoindre la ligne du Pacifique central à partir du treizième point, et vous êtes en route 
こちら側は太陽がと
عندما يكون لديك انحراف بزاوية 90 درجة، يكون الأمر أشبه بالنظر من نافذة قطار - هذا كل ما في الأمر. ه
रॉजर। ऑनबोर्ड मात्रा रीडिंग। मुझे 30 1/
Сейчас мы — SEF VII и BEF, и мы находимся — ну, 
Roger. 11, /: 45597, 0 - correction - that's minus 040, plus 157, plus 36325, minus 01727, plus 01428 180 003 000, November Alfa, plus 00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254; Scorpii Delta, down 103, left 48, plus 0742
I don't know.
ونتوقع أن نفقد الاتصال عندما يمر فوقنا بسبب معدل الحد الأقص
了解。
はい、項目32の反対側の02:30をマイナスし
Il faudr
روجر. وفقًا للصفحة 47، الخطوة 1، كان لدينا نظام التحكم في التوجيه في وضع PGNS وMODE CONTROL، PGNS، AUTO؛ وبالطبع، لم يتم تفعيل قواطع الدائرة في المحركات النفاثة بعد، لذلك عندما بدأنا من خلال DAP وانتقلنا إلى NOUN 46 - ونحن ننظر الآن إلى NO
Okay, Jack. Ora sono.
Roger. When you commented on that quad Bravo problem at separation, you were a little weak. Could you go through what you did after you noticed the talkbacks barber 
コ
休斯
Okay. Wir führen hier einige Kommunikationsprüfungen durch. Wir wechseln zwischen fünf verschiedenen Modi, und nur einer davon unterbricht Ihre Arbeit. In diesem Fall schalten wir auf die Uplink-Backup-Sprachverbindung um. Dabei kann es kurzzeitig zu einem Ausfall der Uplink-Sprachverbindung kommen. Die Downlink-Sprachverbindung bleibt während des gesamten Vorgangs erhalten. Es sollte maximal 10 bis 15 Minuten dauern. Voraussetzung ist ledigl
Aqu
嗯，你知道，——嗯，就这一个样本来看，我很惊讶你那里
ちょっと待
Роджер, погода в районе восстановления: облачность 0,5 дюйма, видимост
Okay. It looks to us like, although we're reading out the same thing you are on the quad quantity, using the computer program and all of the correction factors that are in there, it looks like all four of your quads 
罗杰。我
समझ नहीं 
ところで、ジャック、我々のためにベクトルに関する
13, Houston. suggerisce di provare la MEDIA se ci si trova in PICCO per 
Attends qu'on obtienne les Bermudes. Je te t
阿波
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। 
Roger. We've checked over the spacecraft and the launch vehicle guidance. They're both looking to be in good shape. We esti
Roger. PAD: 23514 179 071 001 547 104356 35575 357 107 041 301 287 319. 10-Minuten-Abbruch, 22
Good show. How's it? She looks pretty erec
... आपका माइक अटक गया ह
Ok, bene, 
Okay. Mal sehen, ob ich alles verstanden habe. Für das Rendezvous-System muss zunächst CB 16 INVERTER 2 geschlossen und CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2 ebenfalls geschlossen sein. Anschließend muss auf Bedienfeld 14 überprüft werden, ob INVERTER 2 ausgewählt ist. Außerdem muss CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 geschlossen sein (beide Leistungsschalter). Danach muss der RENDEZVOUS RADAR-Auslösegriff gezogen werden. Auf Bedienfeld 3 muss RENDEZVOUS RADAR auf A ENTER mit Plus aller ZIP-Werte und Plus 28300 in den Registern 1 und 2 eingestellt werden. Anschließend wird die Bewegung mit dem 16 72 überwacht. Nach dem Parken muss CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 geöffnet und anschließend ENTER aktiviert werden. CB 16 INVERTER 2 muss ebenfalls geöffnet sein. Wenn es nun an der Zeit
알겠습니다. 그리고, RANGI
Хорошо. У Джима сейчас не включена система BIOMED
C'est ce que ça semble être; à moins que ce ne soit qu'une tr
هذه هي الصداقة السابعة. نعم. يبدو أنها تسيطر الآن
هذه زوايا الكاميرا. وحدة التحكم: 356.69، 16
Roger. Je suis prêt à voi
Okay. Nach PC + 2 gibt es keine Trimmvorgaben mehr. Sollte es während PC + 2 zu einem Triebwerksausfall kommen, sind nachfolgende Mittelkursmanöver erforderlich – das frühestmögliche wäre PC + 4. Falls Sie kein
E notate che il r
Игл, Хьюстон. Мы рекомендуем начальную
Sound
Roger, Houston. Wir
ठीक है। अ
吉姆，收到。我们刚刚计算出机动时间大约是1
Ricevuto. 1, G&N: 38658, meno 054, più 065, TIG 078 02 0345, più 29180, più 03779, meno 01325; rollio NA, beccheggio 041. Il resto del PAD è NA. Ullage due jet, 19 secondi. 4 PAD, G&N: 38658, meno 054, più 065, TIG 084 29 5059, più 31373, più 03760, meno 00968; rollio NA, beccheggio 034. Il resto del PAD è NA. Ullage due jet, 19 secondi. Entrambi questi PAD sono per una manovra di sganciamento. più 4 PAD presuppone l'assenza di LOI-2. Passo. Ossia 4 PAD presuppone l
Роджер... 43-2 101. 2+06. 09 40 59. 5+14. 10+36. 44-2 114. 2+22. 11 15 26. 3+51
Метод выбо
Dein Lächeln verrät, dass du in einer 5000-Meilen-Zone 5040 Meilen pr
は
Ok. Imposta l'altimetro a 298
F
分かりました。パネル16のブレーカー、BAT FEED TIESの2つが開いています。高電圧と低電圧の音を注意深く聞いてください。BATTERY 1の高
Okay. in ACCEPT you got. And this is an updated landing site RESFMMAT. We sti
Très bien, 11. Nous avons une image. Nous voyons la Terre en plein centre de l'écran. Termin
Okay, wir haben einen Schlepp
Colombie. Allez-y
Nous analysons de près les profils de consommation d'eau et, pour l'instant, la tendance est plutôt à laisser l'appareil allumé et à éteindre l'autre. Nous vous donnerons plus d'informations prochainement. Nous vous recommandons de laisser une personne de garde pendant la nuit. Nous vous conseillons d'éviter de déverser de l'urine, si possible, car cela aggraverait le problème des débris. Nous avons quelques articles que vous pourriez vouloir transfére
Anfangs verhinderte die Operation mit dem Treibstoffablass den geplanten sofortigen Beginn unserer Beobachtungen, da wir ein weiteres Ausweichmanöver durchführen mussten. Der Ablass des Treibstoffs verursachte eine enorme Menge an Pseudosternen in dem Gebiet, was eine optische Kalibrierung praktisch unmöglic
Я весь внимание, Хьюст
Apollo 8, mentre aspettiamo l'alto guadagno, continuerò il riepilogo della traiettoria. Possiamo ancora tornare alla linea del Pacifico centrale dal tredicesimo, e siete in viaggio dopo 138 secondi dall'accensione. Sono 138 secondi, e vi portano fuori dalla zona a farfalla. Consigliamo di non provare preaccensioni o riavvii dopo 20 secondi. Se si superano i 20 secondi, la traiettoria potrebbe superare la capacità di correzione, fino a un ritorno libero. Le condizioni meteorologiche nell'area di recupero sono buone. Abbiamo un seguito di 10 secondi e un ritorno senza 10 secondi. Durante l'accensione, potreste notare una leggera variazione nella pressione della camera di combustione e nella pressione del serbatoio, dovuta all'esaurimento del carburante nel serbatoio di stoccaggio e al suo passaggio nel serbatoio di raccolta. Questo potrebbe verificarsi tra i 2 e i 5 secondi dall'accensione. Ci sarà una piccola variazione di pressione in entrambi i sistemi. Per quanto riguarda i sistemi, tutti i sistemi sono in funzione. Vogliamo interrompere l'ebollizione dell'acqua dopo per motivi di traiettoria. La situazione dello scarico dell'acqua sembra buona; dovreste essere a posto o superiori. Cercheremo di ritardare lo scarico dell'acqua fino a dopo le 5. Nel frattempo, vorremmo mescolare la criogenia prima di... correzione. La prossima spurgo delle celle a combustibile avverrà approssimativamente alle 17:00, e sarà sia per la batteria a idrogeno A a 34,9, sia per la batteria B a 39,1, sia per Charlie a 38,5. Abbiamo la capacità criogenia a serbatoio singolo: osservando le prestazioni delle accensioni precedenti, si può prevedere che una normale accensione richieda circa 3,7 secondi in più rispetto ai valori calcolati. Le prestazioni del motore sembrano nominali e tutti i parametri sono rimasti stabili. Sembrano buone; tutti e quattro i quadricicli, secondo i programmi del computer, hanno approssimativamente la stessa capacità. Avete un buon motivo per parlarne. Vi daremo un'opinione tra qualche minuto. E questo riassume praticamente tutto quello che abbiamo su
Et, Aquarius, avant de pouvoir vous expédier une cargaison, nous devrons fermer le disjoncteur UPDATA LINK sur le panneau
Und ich habe eine Frage an John. Ich würde gerne wissen, wie seine Abfallanalyse voranschreite
オーケー、ドーク。速報です。昨日（火曜日）
ठीक है, इ
Können Sie mir s
تم تجهيز وحدة التحكم اليدوية للترجمة. جهّز وحدة التحكم اليدوية الدوارة. لقد جهّزتها بالفعل. حسنًا يا ف
Okay, ich verstehe Sie trotz der Hintergrundgeräusche. S
Roger. Étoi
Ну ладно, оставим включенным и посмотрим, что получится. Если понадобится один-два имп
了解。マイク、他にいくつか連絡があります。この時点でBバッテリーの充電を終了させる必要があります。また、目標着陸地点では、散発的な雷雨のため天候が荒れています。そのような状況に巻き込まれるのは避けたいので、目標地点を上流に移動します。訂正します。目標は下流です。1500海里進入を目指し、揚力制御を確実に行えるようにします。新しい座標は北緯13度19分、西経169度10分です。その地域の天候は良好です。2000メートル、8000メートルが散発的に観測され、視程は1
Мы получаем примерно те же данные о потоке кислорода, что и раньше. Причина такого высокого уровня — переключение газового
Roger. Wir versuchen lediglich, al
Nicht wirklich. Ich ruhe 
Bene. Il misuratore indica il 22%. Non abbiamo alcun controllo di imbardata
わかりました。テープダンプが必要なので、Pegasus は省略し
友谊七号，这里是印度首都通讯站。自动燃油温度显示
はい。無理はし
Dans le module lunaire, ce cache pour la caméra. Réfléchissez-y un i
Ja, da ist ein leichtes Knacken drin. D
في 
还有一个问题，休斯顿。你说的“关闭电源”是指关闭06
روجر. 
ヒューストン
这里是
M
Lass es nicht ausgeschalt
わかりました。「電源オン」の下に、手順1と2をもう一度追加します。つまり、NO A
अभी आवाज कमजोर और पढ़ने में मुश्किल
事实上，在过去的 12 小时甚至更长时间里
쌍둥
هذا تأكيد. نحن جاهزون للانطلاق. ما
E, Apollo 11, Houston. Terminare 
Ricevuto. Mancano due osserva
En fait, Mike, c'est tellement facile de le faire avec la boule noire, dans u
おい、ジェ
Acq
로저. 새로운 수량 3-1 167. 3+35. 14
D'accord. Tout d'abord, nous allons ouvrir le disjoncteur BAL
ठीक है। सूट के तापमान के बारे में यही जानकारी है। लॉन्च के बाद से 
분명 뭔가 적어놨을 거
روجر
Понял. У нас осталось примерно минута до того момента,
ठीक है। बीच में सुधार संख्या 7, /: 3160
Aprirò le finestre e v
41分。Horizo​​n Scanでプ
はい。ページ12と13のアクティベーション、ステップ4です。ディ
ईगल, क्या तुम कोलंबिया प
Роджер, понял
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. 
Roger. Abbiamo mescolato tutti i crioconservanti. Potre
Roger, Cap. Nous allons vous demander de laisser votre interrupteur de propulsion allumé et d'effectuer la manœuvre de survol du Texas. Nous surveillerons ensuite votre consommation de carburant à travers les États-Unis. Si le problème persiste, nous vous dema
Okay, Joe. And just for confirmation, I went through the switch list you gave me. We are in exactly that configuration
V
Ok
يبدو أن النجم القديم ر
... A è 6 e 1/2, 1 A è 24 
أعتقد ذلك يا كين. هذا الشريط موازٍ لخط M، وأظن أن له علاقة بتصميم البصريات، حيث يوجد ذلك العمود أو المدخل المستطيل للبصريات من الخارج. عند هذه الزاوية الشمسية تحديدًا، يقطع الشريط الضوء تمامًا. لاحظتُ أن كلاً من الأرض والشمس تُحدثان هذا التأثير على التلسكوب الماسح. في السدس، يظهر الشريط الضوئي نفسه، مع أنه يُغطي مجال رؤية السدس بالكامل. ومع ذلك، يُبرز التكبير النجوم بشكل جيد، ويمكن وضع علامات عليها. لكن تحديد النجوم باستخدام التلسكوب الماسح أمرٌ بالغ الصعوبة. وجدتُ أن أفضل وضعية للبصريات هي تلك التي تُظهر كوكبتي الكلب الأكبر والجبار في التلسكوب الماسح. عند هذه الوضعية تحديدًا للمركبة الفضائية، يختفي الشريط؛ فنحن في وضع تكون فيه الش
Roger. Okay, der Kabinendruck liegt weiterhin bei 5,5. Er ist seit unserem Start konstant. Die Kabinentemperatur beträgt 90 Prozent, die relative Luftfeuchtigk
Che ne dici se lo fai -
ठीक है, जैक। आपको याद होगा कि पहले सभी ने चंद्रमा अस्त होने से कुछ मिनट पहले उसे देखने की बात कही है, और जब आप वहाँ पहुँचेंगे तब तक क्षितिज शायद अँधेरा होगा; आप सुबह जल्दी प्रवेश कर रहे हैं; और पश्चिम से आने पर भी आपको अँधेरा क्षितिज ही दिखाई देगा। तो, एक बैकअप तकनीक के तौर पर, जैसे आप क्षितिज को ट्रैक करते हैं, हम आपको एक एटीट्यूड देंगे जो पैड पर होगा ताकि आप सीधे चंद्रमा को देख सकें। यह एक इनर्शियल एटीट्यूड है; यह बदलेगा नहीं, और आप 36-डिग्री विंडो लाइन को चंद्रमा पर रखेंगे, और फिर बस वहीं बैठकर उसे देखेंगे। और ठीक
We have a night airglow passing right through the moon at this time, SEF. The time was at 59 minutes, 10 seconds. Estimate the layer at approximately 1/2 degree. It was approximately the same thickness as the moo
هل 
आरकेवी, हमें या तो सीरियस या VII दिखाई दे रहा है! यह रेटिकल के ठी
روجر. ٣ - ٤ = ١٢٠. ٢ + ٣٦. ١٩ ٣٤ ٣٩. ٣ +
Nun, wir dachten, wir wären jetzt in diesem 
分かりました。昨日も同じことがありました。操縦時に教えていただいた数値に44インチを加算してロードしようとしているのですが、中間点とコーナーの終端のゼロをロードしようとするたびにオペレーターエ
Хорошо. Мне просто нужно переключить OMNI. Хорошо. Читая изменения, Джо, на страницах 1-4: нагреватели топливных элементов три, ВЫКЛ., переходим к топливному элементу 1, центральная шина A - главная шина A в ВЫКЛ.; главная шина - топливный элемент 2 к главной шине A, ВЫКЛ.; топливный элемент 3 к главной шине A, обратная связь, серый; сброс главной шины A в ВЫКЛ.; топливный элемент 1 к главной шине B, обратная связь, серый; топливный элемент 2 к главной шине B, обратная связь, серый; топливный элемент 3 к главной шине B в ВЫКЛ.; сброс главной шины B, ВЫКЛ.; транспондер S-диапазона в ВЫКЛ.; усилитель мощности S-диапазона, ВЫСОКИЙ уровень в ВЫКЛ.; обратная связь усилителя 
双子座7号，这里是双子座6号。我们发现了一个物体，看起来像一颗卫星，正从北向南飞行，可能在极地轨道上。它的轨道非常低，爬升率很
حسناً. فهمت.
हवाई कैप कॉम, ये सिग्मा सेवन है, आपकी आवाज़ सा
यह
रॉजर। मुझे समझ आ गया कि नेत्र पर
我们已经非常接
Roger. Ottimo spettacolo sul radar. Mi dispiace molto che il nostro amico Julian non sia potuto essere con noi. Vorrei darti il ​​mio r
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 제 메
Juri Alexejewitsch, ich möchte Sie daran erinnern, dass es nach der letzten Minute der Bereitschaft zu einer sechsminütigen Verspätung vor dem eigentl
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Не могли бы вы сказать, что вы 
I didn't get a stereopair of those two, but they are rig
ठीक है। जैक, तुम
西格玛七号，西格玛七号，这里是沃特敦通信技术学院。我逐个读出你们的信息。稍等，我把你们转接给通
حسناً، لديّ بيان صحفي له هنا، بخصوص 
Eh bien, il y a des nuages ​​un peu partout, et un système de circulation assez 
D'accord. Jerry, c'est tout. Aviez-vous autre chos
ठीक है। अभी यहाँ लिखा है, "G&N से बाहर निकलने के लिए," फिर पेन और स्याही से थोड़ा बदलाव करके लिखा है, "ऑटो सेलेक्ट, 12 मेन A और B।" और फिर आप छपे हुए स्टेप 1 पर आते हैं। हम "ऑटो सेलेक्ट, 12 मेन A और B" को नीचे दूसरे स्टेप में ले जाना चाहते हैं, ताकि प्रक्रिया इस तरह हो जाए, "स्टेप 1, मैनुअल एटीट्यूड 3, एक्सेलरेशन कमांड; स्टेप 2 ऑटो सेलेक्ट, 12 मेन A B।" स्टेप 3 होगा, "लोड वेरिफाई करें," और इस
ठीक है। यह प्रक्रिया आपको हाई-गेन एंटीना की स्कैन सीमा के बहुत करीब ले जाएगी, इसलिए प्रक्रिया करते समय अपनी लाइटें जांच लें। यदि आपकी स्कैन सीमा की लाइट जलती है, तो आपके पास अभी भी 15 डिग्री का मार्जिन है। लेकिन ध्यान रखें, य
자
Rice
لقد أصبح
Super. Hör mal, Ed, wir möchten den Flugplan anpassen und die Schlafenszeit hier verschieben, damit du dich etwas ausruhen kannst. Du solltest jetzt 
Roger. Gut, dann setze ich das Manöver fort: Rollen 82°, Nicken 218°, Gieren n
Понятно. Имеющиеся у нас на
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, qui Houston trasmette in modalità cieca. Se leggete, provate a contattarlo usando l'antenna OMNI,
Je suis désolé d'avoir dit + 4, je partais de la valeur rétroactive, ce qui a probablement pu vous induire e
날이 밝아오고 있고 아직 별이 꽤 많이 보
मैं उम्मीद करता हूँ 
알겠습니다. 현재 시간 32시간 00분. 완료 후 지시사항: 다음 자세로 기동하십시오. 롤 101.0, 피치 090.0, 요 000.0. 최고 피치 -23, 요 93. 감속은 일반적인 절차를 따르십시오. 기체가 안정화된 후, 스핀업 전에 베넷 혜성을 촬영하십시오. G 매거진이 있는 육분의를 사용하십시오. 즉, 초고속 흑백 필름, 맞죠? 저조도용 필름입니다. 5초, 20초, 60초 노출로 각각 한 장씩 총 세 장
Actually the last 12 hours or more, maybe as much as 24, we haven't been too careful about keeping our face-plate clos
Me, too; I'm taki
Ken ist auch nur ein Mensch. Dies ist sei
我刚刚在北非拍摄了第 3、4、5、6 和 7 张照片……（无法辨认）照片（无法
Okay. At minus 4-1/2 hours, configure for SEP. First, BALANCE COUPLE, ON. Secondly, zero the counters in; 404, 405, 406, plus 0; read out 470. Thirdly, translate plus-X to 0.5 foot per second. Fourth, CM/ SEP. Fift
हमें इसकी एक प्रति भेज दे
好的，杰克。你可以先设置开关配置了。我们现在要讨论的是，稍后让你激活主总线连接电机开关，只是为了确认它们工作正常，因为电池可能有点凉了。等你设置好开关配置后，我们会再跟你讲解具体步骤。完毕
У меня есть связ
로저. 닐, 우리 귀에는 소리가 좀 지직거리는 
Du kannst deinen Ko
그건
Gemini
우리는 각자 평균 5시간 30분 정도 잠을 잤고, 수면
罗杰。方便的时候，请您去确认一下好吗？我们会更新您
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы хотел
حسناً. حسناً يا جاك، كلاهم
Affermativo, Jack. 
Близнецы 4
Esatto, Fred. E se hai domande sull'allineamento, faccelo sapere. Saremo lieti di risponderti, come per l'allineamento sulla Terra, come descritto in precedenza. Inoltre, dovresti sapere che l'intonazione è l'atteggiamento più critico per quanto riguarda gli errori in questa comb
Jim, bitte verwenden Sie Ihre aktuelle feine Linie und ignorieren Sie die anderen Angaben. Wir versuchen, einige LMS-Simulationen durchzuführen, um die Ergebnisse Ihrer Beobachtung mit denen des LMS-Systems zu vergleichen und zu sehen, ob uns das weiterhilft. Wenn Sie also Sterne sehen können und glauben, sie und Sternbilder 
И, 11, это Хьюстон. Немного дополнительной информации, основанной на нашем анализе вашего последнего сгорания: похоже, у вас было хорошее, стабильное сгорание. Мы показ
알겠습니다. 아
彼らはそれ以外のす
Aigle, Colombie.
Okay. Grazie. E se ti viene in mente, quando arriverà il momento, quando non ti sfogherai, che ne dici di ricordarti di darci un'occhiata e d
We are reading n
Toujours pas plus que ce à quoi nous nous 
G
I understand you want two sets on number 40, lunar near horizon. Is 
حسنًا. وتريد أن تعرف ما إذا كان بإمكانك استخدام أكسجين إضافي لرفع مستوى وحدة القيادة 
Tenez-vous à côté de l'un d'e
E Joe, hai la... via
1、G&N：62710，正负 098，负 019，点火时间 075 49 4965，负 28897，负 03944，负 00686。滚转角 358，俯仰角 226，347；01692，正负 00610；29173 602 29108；六分仪星 31 1066 358。PAD 其余部分为 NA。对准织女星和天津四 243 183 012。无空隙。点火前 2 分钟，地平线将在舱
Хорошо. Подождите 1
Ricevuto. I Cowboys sono stati distrutti ieri
जी हाँ, बिल
잠들기 좋게 기타 연주를 들려
मुझे लगता है
はい。
Ja, denn wenn ich Ihre Daten aufzeichne, befinde ich mich im SIMPLEX 
House Ways and Means Committee also has agreed yesterday to tax changes affecting oil companies, also banks and utilities, which could add as much as 2 billion dollars per year to the federal revenue. The committee also voted tentatively to change the accounting p
明白了。肯，我今天会试一试。我昨天试过了，但效果不太
استخدمتُ الوقود في تشغيل الدوافع يدويًا وعبر نظام التحكم الإلكتروني على الجانب المظلم، مع اقتراب شروق الشمس. أعتقد أنني أستطيع تقليل استهلاك الوقود بشكل ملحوظ في المدارين الثاني والثالث. 
Roger. We believe we have the load in and we would like to have you ENABLE the SPC's and let the Agena start coming through. If you run into trouble and the Attitude Control System in the Agena goes wild, just send in Command 400 to tu
好的。我们有三张斜视图。最后一张是我最近要求的，它是第二张的放大版。
O
Questo è affermativo. Bene. Ora ci stiamo preparando per iniziare la sequenza di allineamento. Hai familiarità con la sequenza generale degli eventi che us
OK, Ke
Avec toutes ces autres procédures sur lesquelles tu as travaillé, je pensais t'en proposer une nouvelle: comment s
Хорошо. Что ж, для телепередачи, которая выйдет через пару часов, вам бы не помешало подумать, как лучше всего остановиться, если вы решитесь на это, чтобы получи
好的。让我说说我对主总线B的观察。当时情况发生得很快，我们先听到了撞击声，或者爆炸声，或者其他什么原因，我不
48 मिनट
了解。たった9秒
Okay. We'll try another one, and it's a little better centered. In fact, the only other 
روج
Pitch 224, yaw 020, r
비행 지휘관이 "아야"라고 말
Here is a feature by Harry Rosenthal of Associated from Houston. Two Santas brighten the Christmas Eve for 2-year-old Jeffrey Lovell. The first one knocked on his front door and brought presents. The second started his daddy home from the moon. The first wore a red suit and a white beard and ho, ho'd loud enough to be heard down the block. The second was a huge engine spitting flame behind the moon, and thousands of people were awaiting word that it had fired. "Please be informed that there is a Santa Claus" were the first words from Apollo 8 as it emerged from radio silence to inform an anxious world 15 minutes after the fact that the engine had performed its critical burn. "None of us ever expect to have a better Christmas present than this one," said Ken Mattingly of Mission Control. "Thank everyone on the ground for us. You know we couldn't have done it without you," came the reply from Col. Frank Borman, the spacecraft commander. At this point, a Christmas tree came aglow in front of the consoles in Mission Control, and Astronaut Harrison Schmidt read a space version of "A visit from Saint Nicholas" to the crew. "Twas the night before Christmas, and way out in space, the Apollo 8 crew had just won the moon race," it began. The Mission Control crew had delayed the celebration until Jeffrey's daddy, Navy Captain James Lovell, along with Air Force Major William A. Anders and Col. Borman were safely on their way home. Any other Christmas Eve, the families of the astronauts would have been in church for Christmas services, but this year they were all glued to their television sets. The homes all near the Manned Spacecraft Center were decorated. The lawns around the Lovell home and throughout his community of Timber Cove were lined with Mexican style luminarios, and the four Lovell 30. They 0
3
Хорошо, Джо. Пойми, что положение JETT будет аналогично нормальному сбросу сервисного модуля, то есть он будет поднят и вне плоскости
Va 
Роджер. Замените Полярную звезду на Ригель, а Нави на Сириус. А что насчет вала и цапфы? Ост
ヒューストン、コロ
这是Sigma Seven。在
Okay. I got the idea. Okay. Let me just repeat it here. Take a cue card, form an arch over the top, bringing it under the side here. When we're through, run a piece of tape from the sides across th
Okay, Jack. Das 
好的。在此之前，请允许我们暂
是的。02:25..
Ricevuto, Bill. Lo fare
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Далее следует 30-минутный отчет: Движения головы не вызывают тошноты или каких-либо неприятных ощущений. Я удивлен, что могу смотреть так близко к солнцу; солнце сейчас светит прямо мне в лицо, и все, что мне нужно сделать, это прикрыть глаза бровью. Все предохранит
아
遮光罩已经打开一段时间了，我一直在用光度计透过薄雾层测量星光。现
Okay, Bill, unsere BIOMED-Daten sehen immer noch etwas merkwürdig aus. Könntest du bitte den blauen Signalaufbereiter an deinem BIOMED-Kabelbaum überprüfen? Er hat einen Stecker, wahrscheinlich das mittlere Bauteil, der blau ist. Überprüfe den bitte. Ich weiß nicht, ob du die Kabel des BIOMED-Kabelbaums kürzlich gewechselt hast; falls ja, könnte
Roger. This is Frien
야외용 16mm 카메라에는 벨
Hallo Astro, hallo Astro, hier spricht Swiss One. Wie können Sie
जी हाँ। जिम ऊपर जाकर देख लेगा। फ्रेडो
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. У меня есть PAD на время полет
La voce non è un granché in questo momento, e le truppe di Guida non l'han
13, Houston. We see you getting close to gimbal lock there. We'd like you to bring up al
好的。吉姆给我看的那幅图，是从他的角度看到的——部分地球，被照亮的部分位于上半部分，尖点正好落在黄道带上。所以——地球的整个黑暗部分都在下半部分，只有一道非常细的月牙形黑暗部分延伸到黄道带上方的一
로저. 롤링 재진입을 위한 절차 양식을 보내드리겠습니다. OAMS 연소에 필요한 ∆V와 ∆T, GMTRC, 그리고 0.05g의 RET 값을 알려드리겠습니다. 또한, 드로그, 주낙, 착륙 시의 RET 값도 함께 제공됩니
フレッド、わかった
Roger. And a correction on your - on your first number for register 1. That should be plus 27210. And another comment; after you get into the narrow deadband at that attitude, why, you might te
ठीक है, हम आपको इस पर कुछ ही देर में टि
बहुत बढ़िया। पृष्ठ E-9 पर, जब आप कमांड मॉड्यूल की स्थिति में स्थानांतरण करने की तैयारी कर रहे हों, यदि आप अभिवृत्ति सुधार के परि
Cape Cap Com, Sigma 
こちらフレン
我
Поддерживать
好的。你说保留剩余收益，是指
E, Houston, la Tranquility Base v
Apollo 8, Houston. We estimate the charge will b
Okay, Jim. Bevor wir
Roger, le pilote commandant a-t-il lui aussi retiré ses ga
잭, 우리가 최종적으로 원하는 결과는 터널 안에서 1.5에서 2 사이이고, 측정값에 따라 
알겠습니다. 그럼, 이 기동을 계속해서 롤 82, 피치 218, 요 0으로 유지하고, 그 자세에
Columbia, Columbia, Houston.
ええ、私も同感です、ジャック。ジャック・スワイガートと私は先ほど二階へ行って、それぞれキャニスターを持ってきて、何か材料を探して、それを使おうかと考えていました。実は、飲料水を作る時に、パントリーに置いてあっ
了解。了解。目標着陸地点に基づき、T1、104 32 18、T2、1
나는 맨눈으로 호주와
Je vois une étoile brillante là-bas, ça doit être Vénus. J'ai oublié de bien mémoriser les paysages que John Mayer décrit par 
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। सम
——然后返回
Ricevu
Roger. Après votre combustion, 
Джим, что касается окна 5, у меня есть чертеж; и, когда вы состыкованы, угол между осями Z двух космических аппаратов составляет приблизительно 60 градусов. Похоже, что, глядя в окно 5, вы будете видеть радар сближения, расположенный сверху, который, если вы измените угол наклона, более или менее даст вам обзор служебного модуля. То есть, если вы измени
Ok. Spero che tu abbia ottenuto più dettagli di quanti ne abbia io sul monit
قم بضبط مفتاح الماء في مبخر الجليكو
That's wha
फ्रेड, ह्यूस्टन। क्या तुम इसे अभी आजम
Ich wollte gerade sage
로저. 리백은 다음과 같습니다. TIG 124 22 0000 55349 00322, + 0017, + 37104, - 70470, + 58604, + 56936. 무게
Roger. Sono in modalità automatica in questo momento; in assetto di rientro; i giroscopi sono normali; la manovra è disattivata; tutti i sistemi sono ve
ただ、振動はずっと大きかったとだけ言えます。今となっては正確には推測できません。む
На 
वाह, यह तो
Hier ist alles vorbereitet. Könn
Apollo 8, Houston. Wenn Sie die hohe Bitrate aktivieren, geben wir Ih
Affermativo. Stiamo configurando Goldstone per quest
حسناً، قرأتُ كلامك غير واضح قليلاً. كيف ح
罗杰，明白了。我们是否仍然遇到几分钟前出现的那
那是——
Jack, könntest du mir einen Zeit-Hack für eine gerade Ze
알겠습니다. 275번 패널의 해당 단계 이후에 "CB MAIN A, BAT C; CB
Roger,
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. لقد قمنا بمعالجة الزوايا المذكورة في خطة الرحلة لتحديد وضعية المركبة باستخدام أجهزة الحاسوب هنا، وكانت النتائج متطابقة في كل مرة. نعتقد أن كل شيء يسير على ما يرام يا مايك، ونتساءل عما إذا كان الأفق غير المتناظ
Apollo 11, H
इसमें काफी समय लगेगा। यहाँ काफी समय से सूखा पड़ा है। हम आपको 
Ehi, Vance, potresti monitorare le nostre tariffe e darci un'idea di quand
ح
收到。请稍等。在阿波罗D-9第四次试飞中，我们观测了心宿二和天蝎座。我们进行了一次长距离和一次短距离的试飞。我们也观测了心宿二和
Aspetta un attimo, aspetta. Hai bisogno del... Aspetta, Jack,
ठीक है, जिम। हम चाहेंगे कि आप पृष्ठ 2
好的。从“配置相机地球反照光照片”
D'accord. Je pense que vous aurez be
ठीक है
아
Aspe
フランク、今
जी हाँ, हमने किया। आपकी बेहतरीन जानकारी के आधार पर, मुझे उम्मीद थी कि इसमें लगातार वृद्धि की प्रवृत्ति बनी रहेगी, इसलिए ह
١١، نرجو منك التحويل إلى وضع الهوائي متعدد الاتجاهات (OMNI) حاليًا. نطلب منك
حسنًا، ما كان ذلك السؤال مرة أخرى؟ لا أستطيع ا
弗雷德，你复
わかった、
حسنًا. من جودريل بانك، إنجلترا، عبر وكالة أسوشيتد برس: توقف تلسكوب جودريل بانك الراديوي البريطاني الضخم عن استقبال الإشارات من مركبة لونا 15 الفضائية السوفيتية غير المأهولة التي أُرسلت إلى القمر، وذلك في تمام الساعة 5:49 صباحًا بتوقيت شرق الولايات المتحدة اليوم. وقال متحدث باسم المرصد إن المركبة الفضائية لونا 15 بدت وكأنها "تجاوزت القمر". وفي تصريح آخر، قال متحدث باسم السير برنارد لوفيل، مدير المرصد: "لا نعتقد أنها هبطت". واشنطن، وكالة يونايتد برس إنترناشونال: دعا نائب الرئيس سبيرو تي. أغنيو إلى إرسال إنسان إلى المريخ بحلول عام 2000، لكن قادة الحزب الدي
ロジャー。ビルさん、ちょっと興味
쌍둥이자리 4, 쌍둥이자리 4. 
Streichen Sie darunter „Spacecraft control dash AUTO verify“. Streichen Sie die Anführungszeichen und alles in Klammern danach, wie z. B. „Minus 00507“ usw. Streichen Sie darunter „PRO to start
ठीक है। समझ गया। चलिए देखते हैं आपके लिए और क्या है, जिम। मिडकोर्स-2 पर लगभग 23 फीट प्रति सेकंड की गति दिख रही है, लगभग प्रतिगामी और समय पर। और यह अब काफी स्थिर है। आपकी जानकारी के लिए, और आपको इसे लिखने की आवश्यकता नहीं है, क्योंकि यह अभी भी काफी कमज़ोर है, लेकिन हमें लगभग 8.57 दक्षिण और लगभग 33.9 पश्चिम का प्रभाव दिख रहा है, जो उड़ान योजना के मान से थोड़ा पश्चिम और थोड़ा दक्षिण है। हमने इसे लगभग 77 प्लस 51 पर रखा है जो ठीक पहले है, और पैड थोड़ा देर से हैं, और जैसा कि मैंने कहा, यह
On a une autre fuite d'eau à l'extérieur. On voit des particules s'échapper contre 
ठीक है। एक बात ये है: वियत कांग द्वारा पहले से निर्धारित 72 घंटे का युद्धविराम आज 
نعم يا جيم. وفي الصف الرابع، تحت قسم السخانات، نريدها ج
Okay. For today, we'd like you on to make a trunnion bias determination, prior to sightings as calle
Il bracciale è a grandezza natur
Berechnungen zufolge sollten Sie den Mond sehen. Es wird Vollmond sein. Sie sollten den größten Teil der Mondscheibe sehen können, und er sol
わかりました。参加します、承認します、ヴ
Ok. Volevo solo farti sapere che questa è la sequenza in cui ti trovi. Ok. Una volta completato, torniamo al riquadro 8, ed è SEQUENTIAL, 
Hallo, Muchea Cap Com. Aurora Seven. Laut und deutlich. Wie geht es 
Beh, è ​​come ho detto prima. Non possiamo trovare con certezza la Terra. Penso che siamo davanti e un po' più in alto, un po' più in alto, quasi davanti, proprio 
Да, боюсь, это так — мы находимся примерно на положительн
Sigma Se
알겠습니다. 
今、私たちはそこへ連れて行ってくれ
Bene. Tra un minuto risolv
1
Функция Roll отключена
짐에게는 그
好
Wir wünschten, wir könnten Ihnen eine heiße Tasse Kaffee zukommen lassen. Die würde jetzt bestimmt r
まずはいくつか荷物を収納します。まだ分かり
네. 우리가 그런 것들을 추적해 보면, 당연히 
उस सेक्स्टेंट से नज़ारा वाकई अद्भुत है। अभी एक मिनट पहले, ऑटो मोड में जाने के दौरान, ज़ूम लेंस ने भूमध्य सागर को स्कैन किया। उत्तरी अफ्रीका का पूरा इलाका एकदम साफ़ दिखाई दे रहा था; पुर्तगाल, स्पेन, दक्षिणी फ्रांस, इटली का पूरा इलाका एकदम साफ़। वाकई एक खूबसू
Roge
Okay. Ich schildere Ihnen meine Beobachtungen zum Hauptbus B. Dort ging alles ziemlich schnell. Zuerst hörten wir den Aufprall, die Explosion oder was auch immer es verursacht hat – ich bin mir nicht sicher. Ungefähr eine Sekunde später gab es einen Hauptalarm: Unterspannung am Hauptbus B. Ich habe die Spannung überprüft, und sie war zu diesem Zeitpunkt in Ordnung. Ich vermute daher, dass es sich um eine Spannungsspitze handelte. Brennstoffzelle 3 funktionierte ebenfalls einwandfrei und hatte einen guten Durchfluss. Fred kam in diesem Moment ins Kommandomodul und nahm auf seinem Platz Platz. Kurz darauf leuchtete die Kontrollleuchte für den Wechselstrombus 2 auf. Er überprüfte den Hauptbus B, und dieser zeigte Null an. Sowohl der Hauptbus als auch die Brennstoffz
Хорошо. Теперь на той странице, где описан маневр облета, под вашей группой северных звезд, у меня для вас новые номера, потому что мы заменили эти звезды с Нави и Полярной звезды. Как вы помните, мы заменили их на Сириус и Ригель, так что... И это, кстати, обновление контрольного списка, которое я вам предоставлю позже, — но для это
11, Houston. The scan on the camera makes the - that's a little bit better no
Okay. Wir sind jetzt um etwa 25 Grad in der Nickachse abgedriftet. Ich möchte Sie bitten, das Flugzeug erneut auf Nick
Also, ich schlage vor, mir ein kleines Bad zu gönnen, aber dieses verdammte LCG heute Abend nicht anzuschalten. Du hast sie ja nie nach dem... gefragt
Аврора Севен, руководитель отдела связи. Можете прокомментировать эксперимент в 
알겠습니다, 제리. 67에서 우리는 1번 자세로 이동해서 육분의 별자리 점검을 한 다음 다시 돌아가야 합니다. 지금과 같은 자세로 돌아가는 게 좋을지 여쭤보고 싶습
While you're on the horn, be advised our calculations show you might be running out of potable water in the pretty soon. Also, that you might start to have hydrogen tank venting in the and a question. Next time Jack looks through the
네, 모두 11번 패널에 
로저, 쌍둥이자리 4. 방금 긴 낮잠에서 깼어
알겠습니다. 그리고 16번 패널의 균형 하중 크로스 타이(BAL LOAD CROSS TIE)를 열겠
В Хьюстоне сейчас правильный настрой, в плане отсутст
نعم، نعتقد ذلك، وسيوفر ع
11, hier ist Houston. Wir – wir hören nur einen Bruchteil der Kommunikation. Bitte wiederholen Sie den 
ジャック、もう一つ。90度のヨーイングを行う時、私がやろうとしていたのは、NOU
Хьюстон, мы видим сигналы на радаре, но пока не можем заф
La cabina è pronta, non voglio più abbassare la cupola. È andata molto bene. Controllo in tempo: 18 minuti. Bene sull'orologio. Propulsori: il rollio a sinistra automatico è 119 (gradi). Il rollio a destra automatico è 115 
オーケー、アポロ8号。自動
アポロ8号、ヒューストン
फ्रेड, आपकी CO2 का स्तर बढ़ रहा है। हमारे गेज पर यह 11 है, और हमें 15 मिलीमीटर तक CO2 जमा करने की आवश्यकता है, जिसके बाद हम सेकेंडरी मोड पर स्विच कर देंगे। लगता है हमारे पास पर्याप्त लिथियम हाइड्र
No wa
ジョー、星を収めるのに最適なデテントは2番か4番のようです。ランデブーレーダーのアンテナが邪魔になって
روجر. نحن ننق
네, 괜찮습니다. 좋습니다. 시스템 체크리스트와 대기 1에 대한 의견 하나만 더 드리겠습니다. 이것으로 마무리하겠습니다. 아, 새로운 항목이 들어왔습
休斯顿，哥伦比
- - Wir sehen uns laut und d
And mine's about 58
아, 이제 알겠다. 내 
Okay, I've got fly-by-wire low, and the normal on the mode, auto, gyros caged, maneuver is still off. And the bea - and the be
Ricevuto. Aspet
好吧，也许我的拇
はい。ここで何をする
了
Lo prenderai 
好的。3-1是
That's correct. And we want to delete this "Set up camera" that
好的，PD
오로라 세븐. 무체아 캡 컴. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1 명령 음성. 어떻게 읽으시나
자, 이제 됐습니다. 그런데 말이죠, 여러분께 전해드릴 온갖 정보들
روجر. لقد استغرقنا وقتاً أطول قليلاً لمراجعة جميع بنود قائمة التحقق من الدخول وإعادة صياغتها أكثر مما كنت أعتقد، ونحن على وشك الانتهاء من
जिस क्षेत्र में मैं थोक नमूने में गहराई के साथ भिन्नता का अध्ययन कर रहा था, वहाँ हमें लगभग 3 इंच की गहराई तक कुछ नमूने मिले। वास्तव में कोई खास अंतर नहीं था, और मुझे कोई कठोर परत नहीं मिली। बाद में, या कुछ 
D'accord. Vance, j'ai la procédure pour arrêter la charge de la batterie. Voulez-vous que je vous la recopie maintenant, ou préférez-vous que je revienne vous donner la tension, l'intensité e
Okay. I've just got to switch OMNIs. Okay. Reading the changes, Joe, on pages 1-4, FUEL CELL HEATERs three, OFF, coming down to FUEL CELL 1 MAIN BUS A center - MAIN BUS A to OFF; MAIN BUS - FUEL CELL 2 to MAIN BUS A, OFF; FUEL CELL 3 to MAIN BUS A, talkback, gray; MAIN BUS A RESET to OFF; FUEL CELL, 1 to MAIN BUS B 
好的。我唯一的问题是，它现在看起来像是结
짐, 전원을
Уолли, ты бы 
好的。第一颗星是26号星，我们将进行两组测量，一组是地球近地平线时使用26号星进行测量。然后我们希望用16号星（也就是16号星）进行一组测量，这组测量是在地球远地平线时进行的。如果26号星无法在地球近地平线时进行
Ok, Jack. Ved
C'est bon à 
Sembra che io possa impostarlo a zero. Bene, lo farò ora. Allo scadere della capsula, il 1
セブン、急速に衰弱しているな。今回はエリ
Джек, это Хьюстон. Мы хотим, чтобы ты держал двигатель включенным, чтобы было видно, что внутри, и выключил батарею — батарею А, а в подходящее время мы
好的，吉姆。你目前的配置有以下特点。我们已经通过平衡负载断路器将电气总线交叉连接，并且启用了自动驾驶室复位功能。我们现在要做的一件事是给你提供上行链路，所以我们必须立即在11号面板上，闭合上行数据链路断路器。然后连接
Apollo 8, Houston. Roger.
Род
了
Je commence à apercevoir le lever du soleil dans le périscope. C'est la première lumière que je vois dans le périscope pour cette orbite, à cause de la face nocturne. Il est clair que le périscope est totalement inutile en rétroposition côté nuit. La première lumière que je reçois est à une altitude pratiquement nulle. Le soleil se lève assez rapidement à travers le périscope. J'ai bien les objets lumineux dont John a parlé, et je peux en créer certains en les faisant tomber. J'ai nettement l'impression qu'il s'agit d'un champ, avec des objets de tailles variables, des plus petits aux plus brillants. Le périscope lui-même m'éblouit. Je vais devoir y mettre la carte pour pouvoir regarder par le hublot. Je suis prêt pour la rétroposition à tout moment, donc je n'ai rien d'autre à faire que de regarder par ce hublot. En supposant que le circuit de ma combinaison soit satisfaisant. Cette carte est très utile pour masquer ce fichu périscope. Il y a un champ assez vaste de ces objets. Il est définitivement confirmé qu'on peut les faire tomber de l'écoutille, comme l'a dit Scotty. Et ils s'éloignent, il est certain qu'ils se déplacent à une vitesse différente de la vôtre. Leur vitesse est nettement inférieure à celle de la capsule. Un seul coup, et vous les voyez glisser vers l'a
Le TR-10 est revenu à la normale. Je l'ai déjà fait. Bon, la pression de la combinaison est revenue. Jetez un œil aux onduleurs. 250 correspond à 141 degrés, 150 à environ 107 degrés. C'est suffisant. La pression de veille est de 7, soit presque la pression ambiante. Négative, même un peu... La pression cabine est d'environ 5,3 psi, ce qui est parfait. La température du dôme de la combinaison est de 72 degrés. Celle du dôme de la cabine est
حسنًا، هذا واحد من عدة أمور. ونود إخباركم بشيء أخبرتُ به جيم سابقًا، وهو يتعلق بالتحكم. لديكم الآن تحكم كامل في وضع التشغيل الكامل إذا احتجتم إليه، ولكن عند الانتقال إلى أو
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。巻き戻しが完了しました。低ビットレートで約1時間、高ビットレートで約2分間の録画が可能です。保存データはそのまま残ります
わかりました。クロスタイ・バランスロード回路ブレーカーは設置済みです、ヴァンスさん。それではバッテリー2を
Tu as très b
D'accord, nous nous posions simplement la question car il nous semblait que la combustion avait duré 
Roger. Stiamo manovrando per posizionarci per la TV. Bill l'ha sistemata nella finestra di ritrovo di sinistra di Frank, e io sono al posto di Bill e guardo fuori dalla finestra di ritrovo di destra, e la Terra sta passando 
我很
好的，休斯顿，关于各单位的数值：指挥官 (CDR) 为 0.07，指挥官管理计划 (CMP) 为 0.64，领航员管理计划 (LMP) 为 0
D'accord. Pour information, tous nos chiffres sont basés sur une consommation de 14 ampères. Or, nous n'en u
Huntsville Com Tech. This i
こんにちは、ヒューストン。アポロ13号で
انطلق يا أب
अरे बाप रे, ये तो बिजली ही होग
سيجما سفن، هذه ش
ヒューストン
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Простите. Повторите, пожа
就四行。转到激活步骤 1，执行步骤 3。转到激活步骤
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات لوصف نجاحكم. من المقرر أن يشاهد الرئيس نيكسون الليلة مباراة البيسبول في واشنطن. بعد المباراة، سيتوجه إلى منطقة عمليات الإنقاذ في المحيط الهادئ. مساء الأربعاء، سينتقل من جزيرة جونستون بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى سفينة الاتصالات البحرية أرلينغتون. ثم صباح الخميس، سيعود إلى الطائرة الهليكوبتر ويتجه إلى حاملة الطائرات هورنت في الوقت المناسب لمشاهدة هبوطكم في المحيط. سيرافق الرئيس وزير الخارجية ويليام روجرز وفرانك بورمان. سيشاهدون الهبوط من على متن سفينة الإنقاذ مع الأدميرال جون سيدني ماكين الابن، قائد قوات المحيط الهادئ. بعد إقامة الرئيس على متن هورنت، سينطلق في جولته الآسيوية وزيارته المقررة إلى رومانيا. يُعتقد أن المركبة لونا 15 قد تحطمت في بحر الأزمات أمس بعد أن دارت حول القمر 52 مرة. وذكرت وكالة الأنباء السوفيتية تاس أنه تم إجراء "أبحاث علمية" في الفضاء القريب من القمر. وقال السير برنارد لوفيل من مرصد جودريل بانك إن لونا 15 اصطدمت بسطح القمر بسرعة حوالي 300 ميل في الس
D'accord. Envoi d'un vec
로저. 고이득이 필요한 상황이
ठीक है। मुझे 
سيتم إطلاق تطبيق Peris
درجة حرارة المقصورة وتدفق المياه فيها متوقفان تمامًا، ويتراجعان الآن إلى حوالي 7.5، أي أقل بقليل. في هذه اللحظة، سيعمل منفذ بخار المقصورة على التسجي
Roger. There is some speculation that you all are 
Bene. Per quanto riguarda le batterie, la batteria A aveva 39,32 ampere-ora, la batteria B 35,21 e la 
Ein paar Kleinigkeiten noch für Sie: Wir bitten S
Roger. 1, /: 62844 moins 161, plus 129, moins 29840, plus 02390, plus 01053 000 200 005 01693, plus 00600 29954 402 29788 01 0688 259, Persei Zeta, bas 048, gauche 05; Sirius, Rigel, 129 155 010: pas de ullage,
了解しました。コンピューターは接続され、検証済みです。ブロックに移動してください。約45秒後にはここに表示されます。とにかく、始めましょう。タイムベース6P 24136、ロール1
肯，我们今天最多只睡了两个小时。我们现在要走了——比尔还要熬一会儿，
Roger. Dernières nouvelles de Luna 15: l’agence TASS a annoncé ce matin que le vais
Apol
Die Landebahnklappe war offen. 
has 
حسنًا. قبل أن تنسخ، دعني أقرأ لك كل شيء هنا لتفهم ما نتحدث عنه. عنوان هذه الرسالة القصيرة هو "تجربة الربط بين التصوير التلفزيوني والتصوير السينمائي"، وما يريدون فعله هو تثبيت كاميرا التلفزيون المزودة بعدسة مقربة على حامل، في نافذة الالتقاء، والتقاط صورة تلفزيونية للأرض من خلال مرشحين أحمر وأزرق، دقيقة واحدة لكل مرشح؛ أي المرشح الأحمر والأزرق بشكل منفصل. ثم يرغبون في التقاط صورة تلفزيونية للأرض من خلال المرشح الأحمر، في هذه الحالة، مرشح ألفا 25 مع مرشح الاستقطاب. يتم تدوير مرشح الاستقطاب 360 درجة، دقيقة واحدة لكل وضع. ثم يرغبون في التقاط صورة تلفزيونية للقمر باستخ
コマンドパイロットについてもう一度お話しします
Роджер. Итак, что касается положения относительно траектории движения, информация об этом появится на планшете, но, по сути, мы ищем локальное горизонтальное ретроградное дви
Want me to put it back in and give them a blood press
نعم، سأعيدها يا نيل - شكرا
Der Sonnenuntergang ist wirklich beeindruckend, ich glaube nicht, dass ich viel Zeit damit verschwenden muss, ihn anzusehen. Er ist sehr interessant. Faszinierend ist auch, wie schwarz es ist, wenn sich die Augen nicht daran gewöhnt haben. Ich kann definitiv eine Beschichtung auf dem Fenster erkennen. Ich schalte jetzt wieder auf VOX im UHF-Hi-Modus, um zu senden. Ich öffne das Visier, um das rechte Mikrofon abzuwischen. Ich habe es abgeleckt. Visier zu. Das Visier wurde sofort abgedichtet, damit die Anzugselektronik ihre Arbeit aufnehmen konnte. Ich will damit nicht noch einmal Probleme haben. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hält die Temperatur sehr gut bei etwa 68 Grad. Also wird die Kuppel wieder hochgefahren. Sie steht jetzt bei 76, 75 Grad. Anscheinend ist diese höhere Einstellung die richtige. Ich denke, ich drehe sie jetzt noch eine halbe Markierung hoch, dann haben wir sie vielleicht fixiert. Sie kühlt endlich etwas ab, also weiß ich, in welche Richtung ich die Einstellung ändern muss. Ich habe die Kühlmittelmenge für den Anzug und den
이글, 컬럼비아. 착륙 지점 위를 지나가고 있네요. 아래를 내려다보
Okay, Jim. Wir haben's verstanden. Die Erde zog mit minus 8 Grad vorbei. Auf Grundlage der Daten 
Roger, Gemini VI. You'll get your PLA update over the CS
프레드, 당
Ricevuto. Ho un paio di cose da consider
わかりました。その後、月面を捕捉するために着陸します。失礼ですが、彼らは月面を捕捉するために着陸し、サービスモジュールと写真撮影を行います。今後はACAを
아니, 
Roger. Une heure avant le lancem
아폴로 8호, 아폴로
ठीक है। अब, मैं आपसे एक सवाल पूछता हूँ। क्या चंद्रमा पर पहला निशान दूरबीन से बनाया ग
Roger, Sigma Seven. W
検閲済み さて、
Mal sehen, was ich jetzt tun kann – ich bewege gerade meine Arme hin und her, und das kann ich an den Zeigern für Rollen, Gieren und Nicken erkennen. Durch die Bewegung meines Oberkörpers kann ich die Nickrate-Nadel um bis zu 1 Grad pro Sekunde bewegen. Die Rollrate-Nadel reagiert sehr empfindlich darauf. Die Gierrate auch. 
휴스턴, 7.7 + X + 0.00001 Y로 연소를 완료했고, Z 값은 모두 0입니다. 짐벌 각
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. On your CRYO's, we'd like at this time for you to place all four CRYO heaters to AUTO and turn of
Bene. A pagina 15, cambieremo l'intestazione "CHECKOUT" in "Verifica i seguenti interruttori", e
了解しました。ファンを1つだけ使う場合、もう
ثبات الكبسولة ممتاز للغاية يا ديك. لاحظتُ أنني أستطيع ضبط معدل دوران الإبرة بمقدار درجة واحدة في الثانية بمجرد 
Ладно, «Хорнет». «Аполлон-1
...आप लोग पुराने जी एंड एन पुरुषों के साथ ऐसा करना
حسناً، فهمت كل ذلك. الآن، ينطبق هذا الدوران بدون رفع فقط على مناوراتك النهائية. جميع مناورات CLA وPLA على مت
रॉजर, पुनः प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट पूरी
이글, 여기는 컬럼비아입니다. 휴스턴에서 또 연락이 끊겼어
好的。弗雷德，检查清单上的这项没问题。就这些。我们稍后会给你一份关机检查清单，另外，我们想问问你是否打算使用销毁卡。如果打算使用，
Хорошо. Ладно. Я это сделаю. Что касается системы, то — какой бы ни была проблема, похоже, она исчезла без замены датчиков J52 или чего-ли
D'a
그 이야기를 당신과 나눌 생
روجر، في الإصدار ١٢، سيتم تحد
実は、これは修正値です。まだ下がっていません。ただ、そこに向かっているだけです。私の操縦モードについてご説明いたします。オートモード、バイパススイッチは正常
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हमने अपलिंक पूरा कर लिया है; कंप्यूटर
Хорошо. Панель 11,
Ho appena visto qualcosa. Forse è... Hanno detto che Borman... poteva vederlo; non potevano sentirlo, ma potevano vede
알겠습니다. PLA와 CLA 업데이트입니다. 40-3 구역은 분할 연소입니다. 전방 56, 후방 120. 1+34. 2+30. 05 38 10. 2+56. 8+52. 41-DELTA
两三步，或者四步轻松走就
Okay, Houston. Bei
Ed iniziò a stivare le cose e, non appena arrivammo al punto in cui non era più possibile armeggiare con il booster, iniziai ad aiutarlo a tempo pieno, almeno tenendo le cose, stivandole e cercando di evitare che sparissero. Più velocemente lavoravamo, più eravamo indietro. Non perché non stessimo sistemando le cose com
Okay. This is preliminary results, but it will give you some indication. Corrected altitude is turning out to be 17 plus or minus 4 kilometers, and the fact that it's plus or minus 4 kilometers indicates that you're being very consistent in judging the altitude. The effective altitude is turning out to be 10 plus or minus 12 kilometers. Comments are that, as I sai
Apollo 8, Houston. Chiamate
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven. Cape Com 
Okay. L'unica proposta che sembra essere questa, se lasciassimo che Jim facesse la sua valutazione attraverso il telescopio, sarebbe di fare tutto esattamente allo ste
悪くないですね。ここは少し暖かくなります。寝る時に暖かくなる気がします。なぜかは分かりません。寝る時は冷えるはずなのに、暖かくなる気がして、寝ている間に扇風機を
不，我们不这么认为，阿
Messaggio da Cap Com: non lancerà razzi di segnalazione a palloncino in questa or
Roge
Tu veux
좋아
Comprendre; 20 pour cen
تما
रेव 62 देशांतर 168° पूर्व, और जी.एम.टी. 16 35 0
रॉजर। बज़, तुम इस अंदाज़ में बहुत अच्छे लग रहे हो। हम तुम्हें पाँच-पाँच करके गिन रहे हैं। हम कम गिन
On dirait bien qu'on choisit les endroits les plus intéressants pour atterrir sur la Lune. La face cachée ressemble à un tas de sable où mes enfants ont jo
Apollo
Хорошо. Похоже, что обычный голос может не сработать. В криогенных баках наблюдается довольно сильная дестратификация, особенно кислорода, и это заметно во время работы вентиляторов, поэтому мы обязательно напомним вам еще раз перемешать кислород перед началом работы. Все идет как часы. G&C сообщает нам, что количество топлива выглядит хорошо. Вы используете то же количество, что и прогнозировалось для вашего и для вашей юстировки. Мы скажем вам, что вы можете использовать 30 процентов на каждый квадранты на лунной орбите. Это довольно много топлива, и вы можете взять 30 процентов и вычест
好的。关闭EMS功能——把ATT死区设置调到最
جيميني 4،
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. جاهزة لل
मुझे बहुत अच्छा लग रहा है। ठीक है, हम ऊपर की ओर मुड़ेंगे और बाईं ओर घूमेंगे। मैं आपके
好的，杰克。在你的登机检查清单上，第2
Знаете, вот что я знаю. Там, где к нам прикреплен этот тр
حسنًا يا فريد. قبل ذلك، أي قبل ساعة واحدة، قم بتوجيه الطائرة إلى الزوايا التالية: الدوران 130 درجة، والميل 125 درجة، والانع
Okay, Jack. Es scheint, als ob wir – kurioser Exkurs, die Lage – in der Neigung. Ich überprüfe das jetzt, aber als der Mond das letzte Mal seine Bahn zog, war er weit über dem optimalen Winkel, und ich sehe, dass die Erde jetzt in eine
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشم
ジャック、1-Aの目盛りは下が0。1-Bの目盛りは3.45。よし。必要なのは燃料電池1と3だけだ。1-Bの目盛りは無視して。1-Cの目盛りは3.4。1-Dの目盛りは2.4。2-Dの目
रॉजर। क्या आप चाहते हैं कि मैं अपना प्लेटफॉर्म और कंप्यूटर चालू
双子座4
हां, मै
This will give you a trim angle into the atmosphere, a roll rate, and then full lift at 100,000 again for your drogue and m
On your, quads A, C, and D seem to be just about identical
好的，考虑得很周全。我们一直在仔细考虑允许您进行哪些操作来拍摄维修舱。我们目前认为这项工作优先级较低；虽然能拍到维修舱的照片当然很好，但这些照片并非我们故障排除程序的必需品。至于姿态控制权限等等，
好的，收到。再见了，水瓶座，我们谢谢
Roger, il GMTRC per il tuo 48-1 è 3 giorni, 17 ore, 20 m
Okay, Jack. Gib uns ei
Okay
C'est exact. L'interrupteur du sac d'atterri
Bene. Il primo è la modalità vocale NORMALE della banda S, OFF; il secondo, la modalità NORMAL
了解、ジャック。今回の通過では、地球はLMPの窓の上部から見え、CDRの窓を通過した際の角度はマイナス4度でした
روجر. در
Roger. Nous avons le module de commande. Deman
ところで、ちなみにレーダーはちゃんと撤去できたんですよ。ちょうど真ん中あたりにぶら下がってい
Подтверждаю. Удалите эти сообщения, разбудите двух других парней в указанное время, чтобы они могли
ドッキング解除姿勢とSEP姿勢は同じになるはずなので、最新の分離噴射姿勢として指示されたものを使用します。約7度ずれていますが、これ
Ge
Роджер. Позвони в Sigma
37 に印を付けるつもりだったのですが、それはヌンキです
好老吉姆！谢
Okay, Jack, und die seltsame Konfiguration, in der wir uns jetzt befinden, ist folgende: Wir haben die Luke installiert, Sonde und Fangtrichter befinden sich noch im Kommandomodul, und wir werden in dieser Situation bleiben, bis du uns sozusagen das Okay gibst, Sonde und Fangtrich
4시 30분, 시계 기준. 연
Friendship Seven, Hawaii Cap Com. Чтение вашего сообщения громк
알겠습니다. AC 전원, IG
好的。我们指的是将电池5拨到关闭
هذه أبولو 8، ننقل لكم البث المباشر من القمر. اضطررنا لتغيير كاميرات التلفزيون الآن. عرضنا لكم أولاً منظراً للأرض كما كنا نراقبها خلال الـ
ح
Hallo, Muchea Com Tech, Muchea Com Tech. Roger. Fri
알겠습니다, 밴스
ठीक है, मैं दूरबीन से कोशिश करूंगा; और अगर मुझे वह वहां नहीं दिखाई देता है, तो मैं सेक्स्टेंट से कोशिश करूं
ठीक है, ओडिसी; ह्यूस्टन। हम आपके लिए तैयार हैं, बस आपको तैयार हो जाइए और वार्म अप कीजि
了解しました。マイク、7/10という速度について説明できると思います。最初の通過時に、ご存知の通り、通過に失敗したため、ロールにおける実際のCDUと目標CDUの間に大きな誤差がありました。その状況では、車両は、むしろロードされた速度、つまり3/10プラス4/10の速度でロールします。そして、目標速度より4/10高い速度で制限されます。つまり、目標と実際の角度の間に十分な角度があればの話ですが、実際そうで
Хорошо. Мы только начинаем 
रॉजर। 
我明白这个问题是，在那些地方可以存放什
يوري أليكسييفيتش، أود 
معذرةً يا فريد، أود أن أتدخل هنا للحظة. نريد إيقاف تش
1、G&N：62710，正负 098，负 019，点火时间 075 49 4965，负 28897，负 03944，负 00686。滚转角 358，俯仰角 226
Secondo te, dal punto di vista geologico, è polv
Okay, wir würden Sie bitten, bei Gelegenheit eine Kabinentemperaturmessung durchzuführen und die Ergebnisse nach dem Flug in Ihrem Flugbuch zu dokumen
Roger. Wie liest du mi
Хорошо, Джек. Подожди. Я забыл, что реостат на ANUN/NUM выкручен до упора, и он показывает 720, что выглядит довольно неплохо — очень неплохое ч
D'accord, Jack. Reprenons la procédure de charge de la batterie que je t'ai donnée. Pour interrompre la charge, il te suffit d'écrire « Ouvert » ou « Arrêt » à côté de l'interrupteur que je t'ai indiqué. Sur le panneau 250, le disjoncteur que tu as déjà ouvert; sur le panneau 275, INVERTER POWER-2 MAIN B, ouvert; panneau 5, BAT RELAY BUS BAT A, ouvert; SENSOR UNIT AC BUS 2, ouvert, SENSOR SIGNAL AC2, ouvert; BATTERY CHARGER, MAIN B, ouvert; BATTERY CHARGER AC POWER, ouvert; BATTERY CHARGER, BAT A CHARGE, ouvert; INVERTER CONTROL 2, ouvert; INVERTER CONTROL 3, ouvert; tu as déjà effectué le raccordement du bus principal; puis, mets l'interrupteur BAT CHARGE sur AC 1. Sur le panneau 3, tu as déjà mis l'
إليكم خبرًا طريفًا ومثيرًا للاهتمام. يبدو أن هناك عصابة شبابية جديدة في آن أربور، ميشيغان، تُدعى "عصابة جيلنت". تجوب هذه العصابة شوارع آن أربور، وتعمل سرًا، وتتجاوز القانون أحيانًا. يُطلقون على أنفسهم اسم "مقاتلو الخير". من بين أعمالهم: طلاء جسر كان مُغطى بعبارات بذيئة في إحدى الليالي. كما قاموا بإغلاق منزل مُهدم - كان يحظى بشعبية بين أطفال الحي، ولكنه خطير - بألواح خشبية. وملؤوا أحواض الزهور الفارغة في وسط المدينة، بسبب جدل حول الجهة المسؤولة، هل هي الشركات أم الحكومة. وقاموا بتقليم سياج نباتي، كان يُعتقد أنه يُعيق الرؤية، عند تقاطع مزدحم، مما أثار غضب صاحبه. كما قاموا بجمع القمامة على طول جزء من نهر هورون. أعضاء العصابة مراهقون مجهولون لا يسعون إلى الشهرة. هدفهم هو تبسيط الإجراءات، وإنجاز الأمور - الأمور الجيدة في نظرهم. وللمنظمة طابع ديني خفيف. إنها أشبه بجماعة مسكونية، كما قال أستاذ مساعد في جامعة ميشيغان، والذي يُعدّ ب
ओह, हाँ, चार्ली। अब मैं इसे सेक्स्टेंट से देख सकता हूँ, और मुझे दिख रहा है कि तटरेखा साफ 
हमने आपको वापस कर दिया। मुझे आश्चर्य है कि क्या आप गाइडेंस विभाग से माइनस 648 केबिन के लिए कॉरिडोर करेक्शन का पता 
نعم، أع
Roger. We're reading y
Bon, qu'est-ce que c'e
네. 교대 시간이 다가오고 있어서 몇 가지 사항을 먼저 말씀드리고 싶습니다. 현재 풍속은 최대 초당 0.3피트 정도로 예상되므로 6번 중간 코스에서는 연료 분사가 없을 것입니다. 7번 중간 코스는 풍속이 조금 더 높아서 추후에 결정하겠습니다. 착륙 지점의 날씨는 여전히 양호한 것으로 보고되었으며, 예보에 따르면 2000피트 상공에는 산발적 강우, 12000피트 상공에는 부분적 강우가 예상됩니다. 이는 앞서 프랭크에게 알려준 수치와 거의 같습니다. 시야는 약 10마일, 파고는 약 4피트입니다. 소나기가 산발적으로 내릴 가능성이 5% 미만으로 예상되며, 2000피트 상공에서는 부분적 강우가 10~30% 정도 예
सीडीआर अब डॉकिंग लैच की जांच कर रहा है
Roger. Read you loud and clear. How are 
Hier ein Bericht von Harry Rosenthal von Associated aus Houston. Zwei Weihnachtsmänner verschönern dem zweijährigen Jeffrey Lovell den Weihnachtsabend. Der erste klopfte an seine Haustür und brachte Geschenke. Der zweite holte seinen Papa vom Mond zurück. Der erste trug einen roten Anzug und einen weißen Bart und rief laut genug, um es bis zum Ende der Straße zu hören. Der zweite war ein riesiges Triebwerk, das hinter dem Mond Flammen spuckte, und Tausende warteten gespannt auf die Nachricht, dass es gezündet hatte. „Bitte beachten Sie, dass es einen Weihnachtsmann gibt“, waren die ersten Worte von Apollo 8, als die Funkstille 15 Minuten später endete und die besorgte Welt darüber informierte, dass das Triebwerk seine kritische Zündung durchgeführt hatte. „Keiner von uns erwartet jemals ein schöneres Weihnachtsgeschenk als dieses“, sagte Ken Mattingly von der Missionskontrolle. „Vielen Dank an alle auf der Erde. Sie wissen, dass wir es ohne Sie nicht geschafft hätte
罗杰，休斯顿。-11，/: 45597，-040，+157，+36325，-01727，+01428 180 003 000，不适用，+00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254；天蝎座δ星，下103，左48，
Go ahead, 
Ja. Wir haben uns für einen Kanister entschieden, und Sie wissen ja, dass das flüssigkeitsgekühlte Kleidungsstück einen Beutel hat, den wir vermutlich auch verwenden können – oder zumindest wissen, dass wir ihn verwenden können. Wir haben es ausprobiert. Es ist also quasi ein Beutel im Beutel, und darin befindet sich das flüssigkeitsgekühlte Kleidungsstück. Der Beutel, der dem Kleidungsstück am nächsten ist, ist der, den wir brauchen, und wir haben zwei davon. Dann brauchen wir natürlich noch etwas Klebeband und, wie Sie schon sagten, eine der Rückseiten eines Flugdatenblatts oder so et
Tu 
Roger, wir kümmern uns
ああ、たぶ
Hey Frank, wie wär's mit ein paar Worten zu deiner Gesundheit
좋아, 
물론이죠. 스포츠면은 그다지 특별한 소식은 없네
フランク、私たちがやりたいのは、放射状に上向きに噴射することです。そして、窓の外にある光学機器やその他の手段を使って地球の位置を把握し、適切なスラスター
अब तो सब कुछ मेरी नज़रों से ओझल हो गया है, जिम। अब मुझे बहुत दूर तक देख
今、地中海上空を飛んでいます。とても分かりやすいですね。数隻の大型船が見えます。ベイルートから出発しています。
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Судя по нашим наблюдениям с середины траектории, гамма составляет минус 6,57. Это предварительные данные, и мы думаем, что после дальнейшего отслеживания мы сможем скорректировать траекторию и точно направить её в коридор. Сейчас она находится примерно в центре коридора; всё выглядит хорошо. Мы вышлем вам PAD (план входа) через пару часов, перед тем как вы ляжете спать. И ещё от наших друзей из отдела по свя
最後に確認です
रॉजर। समझ गया, फ्
جيميني 4،
La risposta è affer
عرض جيد
नहीं, मुझे लगता है आप ठीक कर रहे हैं। मैं तो पूरी तरह से बाहर निकलकर पूरे अंतरिक्ष यान की तस्वीर लेना चाहता हूँ, जिम। लगता है मैं ऐसा
Guaymas CAP COM. Ich kann die Störungsanzeige an meinem Computer derzeit nicht auss
我不知道。我们现在正从西部过来，他们
आप किस विंडो से काम करना 
पिच 1, ऑफ 
Our here is - Roger. Our here hasn't been correct. I understand
了解、ウォーリー。やってみます。（リカバリ領域を）3-1と6-1でコピー
D'accord, maintenant, voici la procédure: amplificateur de puissance, arrêt; tr
ठीक है। 275 पर, सर्किट ब्रेकर मेन ए, बैट बस ए, बंद;
네, 알겠습니다. 골드스톤을 설정하는 중이니 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 그동안 제가 절차를 읽
알겠습니다. 좋은 거래네요. 알겠습니다, 프레드. 그리고 저희가 진입에 대해 얼마나 여유로운지 보여드리기 위해, 켄이 여러분께 진입 전에 서비스 모
Das Problem mit diesem Fenster ist, Neil, dass es hie
Vi aggiorneremo sulla regolazione finale dell'altezza sulle Hawaii. Inoltre, vorremmo che controllaste l'asse X... È leggermente fuo
ロジャー。フレッド、よかった。これでステップ8に進み、PROすると5018が点滅します。5018で自動操縦を行い、姿勢を制御したいので、GUIDANCE CONTROL、PNGS、MODE CONTROL、PNGS、AUTOのPROを実行してください。これでこの姿勢になります。これで太陽チェックの姿勢になります。ドッキング構成では、このプログラムで1.4度のデッドバンドを設定しています。参考までに、指針を取得するには、そのデッドバン
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。我可以提供一些高增益抛射姿态的REACQ角度。之后你可以随时调整到那个角度。角度参数为俯仰角-50
А в Вашингтоне Комитет по налоговым вопросам Палаты представителей согласовал налоговые изменения, з
还有两点，弗雷德。第一，我们预计你的发动机在燃烧过程中几乎不会出现任何偏差，因此我们预
Nein, das konnte ich nicht. Vielleicht haben Sie mich missverstanden. Ich konnte keine Gebäude sehen. Und Sie könnten den Australiern ausrichten, dass sie ganz schön hohe Stromkosten haben. Beim letzten Überflug konnt
저는 부스터를 향해 초속 약 5피트(약 1.5m)의 추력을 가했습니다. 분리 연소는 대략 6~7초 정도 걸렸습니다. 부스터를 향해 초속 약 5~6피트(약 1.5~1.8m)의 추력을 가한
Roger. Riguardo al primo, lo abbiam
ठीक है। मेरे पास अपोल
알겠습니다. 첫 번째는 플러스 44 기동입니다. 왼쪽 열을 아래로 읽어 내려가겠습니다. 플러스 44, / 62970, 마이너스 162, 플러스 129, 플러스 00197, 모든 0, 플러스 607
अपोलो 11. कॉपी करने के लिए 
Qui a Houston, ieri le tue tre mogli e i tuoi figli si sono riuniti per pranzo
Gemelli, CSQ, mi 
روجر، وVI بخصوص حالة نظام إدارة العمليات (OAMS)، يبلغ الوقود المتبقي لديك 148 رطلاً، وا
अरे बिल, अगर तुम्हें
好的，收到。吉姆，我们来看看还有什么数据。中段-2 的速度大约是每秒 23 英尺，大致逆行，按时到达。现在轨迹非常稳定。给你参考一下，不用记下来，因为数据还比较模糊，我们测得的落点大约在
Apoll
Houston, Co
Mo
Aquarius, Houston. We'll have to get some AC up so you can get a ball reading. Close your BUS TIE INVERTER
Charlie, Apollo 11. Ich habe ein paar Fragen zum Anhalten. Mir scheint, der einfachste Weg wäre folgender: Wir befinden uns ja im Prinzip bei 0 Grad Gierwinkel und nähern uns 90 Grad Nickwinkel. Es geht also nur darum, bei ungefähr 260 Grad Rollwinkel anzuhalten. Wie wäre es mit folgendem Verfahren: Manuelle Lageregelung, dann 3 auf Richtflugregelung, und da unsere Totzone bereits zusammengebrochen ist, aktiviere ich die Triebwerke von Panel 8. Dann sollte das Flugzeug in der jeweiligen Lage anhalten. Und wenn ich das alles mache, während es 261 Grad Rollwinkel
D'accord. La température intérieure est d'environ 76 degrés. C'est très confortable, mais il y a beaucoup de condensation sur
罗杰
Guaymas Com Tech su HF/U
حسناً. فهم
瓜伊马斯，这里是双子星4号。我们必须马上决定，你是希望我全力以赴完成最后这部分工作，还是希望我节省
Assicuratevi che Bill appenda la calza prima di andare a l
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Мы готовы к проверке 
不过，现在看来，我们将比飞行计划提前约 45 分钟启动您的平台。实际运行时间为 95+19 分钟。届时，平台将在第 61 号修订版中飞越
روجر، لقد فهمنا ذلك، الحلقة أ
Хорошо, Джек, вытащи баллоны с гидроксидом лития. Привяжи их, или что-нибудь в этом роде... командный модуль. А потом при
收到。我们希望您方便的时候
«Ап
Esatto. Non sto affatto rotolando su questo paracadute. Ok, ho staccato quel maledetto tubo della visiera e la cinghia in velcro è allentata. La guarnizione della
أبولو 8، هيوستن عبر تاناناريف. انتهى
로저. 수신 확인 완료. 좋습니다, 트랭퀼리티. 모의 카운트다운을 계속 진행
双
D'accord. Je vous entends bien, Jim. Ma question est la suivante: est-il possible d'orienter le vaisseau spatial de sorte que le module de service se trouve entre le Soleil et l'orbite terrestre bas
Ok, a pagina 17. Esegui il carico a meno 4 minuti; è CB(11), INVERTER 2, CHIUSO, e cancella "Seleziona INVERTER 1". SCALA DELLA VELOCITÀ cambiata a "25 gradi al se
सेवन, यह केप है। राहत क्षेत्र में मौसम बहुत अच्छा है, 3 फुट ऊंची लहरें हैं, बादल
Und, Eagle, Houston. Wir möchten Sie bitten, jetzt OMNI auszuwä
Houston, Columbia. Mein erster Anflug steht kurz bevor, und ich kann die Mondlandefähre möglicherweise sehen. Haben Sie topografische Hinweise, die mir dabei helfen kön
Nun ja, ich möchte es versuchen. Ich glaube aber nicht, dass i
Хорошо, продолжаем. После строки "Отключение по истечении времени работы двигателя минус 1 секунда" мы удаляем следующую строку; и удаляем "УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ПОЛОЖЕНИЕМ: ПОВОРОТ, В ИМПУЛЬСНЫЙ РЕЖИМ"; мы удаляем "Снижение чрезмерной скорости с помощью преобразования Y, Z"; мы добавляем стро
정말 감사합니다. 진심으로 감사드립니다. 
Das stimmt. Wir sind schon seit einiger Zeit nicht mehr an die lange Verbindung gebunden. Damals haben wir uns von der Verbindung gelöst und sind auf den Anzug-ECS-Circuit 
예비 카메라에 R을 넣
わかりました。まず
11, Хьюстон. Как
Подтверждаю. Сле
В тот раз я смог это сдел
Einen Mo
休斯顿，你有没有拍摄到采
Ich kann ein hohes Niveau erre
ठीक है, ऑपरेशन हीटर सर्किट ब
D'accord. Nous avons eu une 
D'accord. Étape 1: désactivation de BIOMED; étape 2: passage en mode LOW BIT RATE; étape 3: passage en mode DOWNVOICE BACKUP; étape 4: réglage de l'amplificateur de puissanc
5시 보고 준
좋습니다. 지금 제 왼쪽에 있는 달을 기준으로 삼고 있는데, 아주 좋은 기준점이 됩니다. 자세 지시계를 가리고 요(yaw)를 보여드리겠습니다. 자이로스코프를 자유롭게 설
حسنًا. سنطرح هذا السؤال. ان
ठीक है, आखिरी बार जब हमने सिनॉप्टिक टेरेन फोटोग्राफी का इस्तेमाल किया, तो हमने सैन डिएगो के थोड़ा पूर्व से शुरू करके बादलों के घेरे में आने तक लगभग 38 तस्वीरें लीं। जैसे ही हम संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के दक्षिणी भाग, अलबामा और मिसिसिपी के आसपास से होते हुए फ्लोरिडा तक पहुंचे, हमने रुक-रुक कर तस्वीरें लेना शुरू कर दिया। हमें उस क्षेत्र के मौसम की कुछ बहुत अच्छी तस्वीरें मिलीं, फिर हमने जैक्सनविले के आसपास के हवाई अड्डों की कुछ तस्वीरें लीं। हमने केप की भी कुछ तस्वीरें लीं। शायद सबसे अच्छी तस्वीरों में से एक वह थी जिसमें हमने फ्लोरिडा से शुरू होकर टेक्सास तक तटरेखा के साथ-साथ पूरे मौसम का नजारा देखा। तटरेखा के समानांतर मौसम की एक बहुत ही स्पष्ट रेखा दिखाई दी। फिर हमने फ्लोरिडा राज्य, क्यूबा और द्वीप क्षेत्र के आसपास और खाड़ी में मौसम के नजारे की कुछ तस्वीरें लीं... मौसम का निर्माण, बादल, और हमने द्वीप की भी कु
दिलचस्प बात यह है कि, जैसा कि मैं देख सका, लुढ़कने की गति में कोई खास तेजी नहीं आई। यह वहीं रुकी रही। इसकी शु
Questo è tutto per quanto riguarda le notizie mondiali e nazionali e gli approfondimenti. Nella pagina sportiva, Hank Stram dei Kansas City Chiefs è stato nominato allenatore dell'anno della AFL. Questa è la seconda volta in tre stagioni. La votazione è stata effettuata da una giuria dell'Associated Pres
ヒューストン、水瓶
はい。メキシコ南部のすぐ南を横切っており、おそらく中央アメリカを通過していると思われます。これが赤道帯で、熱帯収束帯と想定されています。もう一つの帯は南緯約30度にあり、地球の左端、地平線のすぐ向こうで赤道と合流しているように見えます。少なくとも、合流し
مضخة خلي
नहीं, मैं बस
Я так и сделаю,
يجب أن تمنح هؤلاء الرجال فرصة ل
يا أهل هيوستن، سيحاول جاك ارتداء بذلته الآن للتدر
Hai notato la
Верно, Вэнс. Секстант весь... он весь в молочном цвете, и любая комета, которую можно было бы увидеть через него, просто о
रॉजर। यह अपोलो 8 है, बैकअप वॉइस के माध्यम से: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 5, 4,
आप कहां ह
ジェミニVI
여러분, 분명하게 말씀하셨습니다. 바로 당신들을 
음, 솔직히 말씀드리자면 관심이 없었지만, 지
这是友谊七号。之前非洲上空云层很厚，现在云层已经稀薄了很
D'accord. Comprenez que vous avez terminé. L'étape suivante du plan de vol est un test de visibilité du télescope de balayage. Il s'agit du même test que celui prévu précédemment, et nous vérifierons que le soleil est à 70 degrés sur Arc
저는 우리가 ***하는 것이 꽤 쉽다는 것을 발견했다고 생각합니다. 
收到。使用线控飞行系统防止翻滚
Кен, мы все сегодня поспали максимум по 2 ча
嗯，
이 기체는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 처음 운항을 시작했을 때, 요(yaw) 방향으로 자세 제어 모드에 들어가면 다른 축들이 틀어지는 문제가 있었습니다. 한동안 이런 현상이 계속되었는데, 기체가 천천히 오른쪽으로 기울어지면서 20도 정도까지 틀어질 때까지 아무런 수정도 이루어지지 않았습니다. 그러다가 갑자기 빠르게 자세를 바로잡고 20도 오른쪽 자세에서 왼쪽 자세로 돌아오는 현상이 반복되었습니다. 이 현상이 한동안 계속되다가 제가 조종을 맡게 되었는데, 그때가 과이마스 직후였습니다. 아프리카 상공을 지날 무렵에는 상황이 완전히 반대로 바뀌어 있었습니다. 똑
Tja, ich sehe da auch keinen anderen Ausweg, Jim. Es sche
Bei einem Gierwinkel von 90 Grad ist 
روجر. إنها الساعة 2
روجر. هذه فريندشيب سفن. لا أجد أي صعوبة في رؤية أفق الليل. أعتقد أن القمر يشرق خلفي. نع
क्य
닐, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 이 글을 읽으
わかりました。14行目のHEATERS SYSTEM A/B-1のQUAD 1～4を開きます。GLYCOL PUM
Well, you could say that. I'm not too sure just what kind of 
Ok, Apollo 8. Sembra che otterremo le informazioni prima di perdere l'el
Roger. Mein Pitch sieht gut aus, er wird jetzt etwas gleichmäßiger. Ich habe das Gefühl, das Pitch-Programm st
Ok, vai avanti e vedi se riesci a trovarne 
Да. Всё
ロジャー、ヒューストン。それが今まさに私たちがやろうとしていることです。光学装置のために15度に調整しようとしています。地球が明るいので、六分儀に収まる星を見つけるのは非常に困難でした。自動光学系を使って星を見つけようとしています。今はそれができています。探査機
Итак, «Аполлон-8». Мы начинаем подго
Cabin Air Recirculation Valve-UP. That's where it 
Comprenez bien qu'il n'est p
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Canton. Unser Aeromed möchte gerne Ihre Kommentare zu Schwerelosigkeit, Übelkeit, Schwindel sowie Geschmacks- und Geruchsempfindun
Bene. Va molto meglio, e immaginiamo che il problema alla batteria fosse dovuto semplicemente all'interruttore termico che ha attivato u
حسنًا. إذن نود أن نعرف ما هي المرشحات التي كان
حسنًا. لقد قرأت ما كتبته حتى
友谊七号，加州
Роджер. Показатель CDR равен 0,06, CMP равен 0,64, а L
Roger, nous 
로저. 이 과학 탐구 때문에 내 E 메
रॉजर। हम दिखा रहे हैं कि फ्यूल सेल 2 का रेडिएशन आउट तापमान लगभग 90 डिग्री होगा, और 1 और 3 का तापमान थो
मुझे खेद है। मैं आपक
没错，吉姆。如果 Antares 和 Peacock 都行不通，那我们就用 Atria 和 Altair 吧。我们希望他们增加 Atria 的机位数量，34 号机位装三台，40 号机位装两台；但这只有在 Antares 和 Peac
रॉजर। समझ गया। मैं आपको अभी पहले फ्लेयर के लिए सेटिंग्स, करेक्शन और एटीट्यूड बता देता हूँ। यह प्लस
برج الجوزاء 4، هذه هيوستن. أكرر، انعطف عا
Кон
ये रह
Okay. Das ist Perizynth plus 2. / 62871 November Alfa, und warten Sie eins. Okay. Wir machen weiter mit einer Nick- und Giertrimmung von nicht anwendbar; Zeit, minus 00468, plus 00254, plus 00181 173 101 027 November Alfa plus 00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044, unten 044, links 45, plus 1100, minus 02500 12967 36198, primär Sirius, sekundär Rigel 155:010, vier Düsen plus X. Dies setzt die Ausführung der Mittelkurskorrektur Nummer 4 voraus und v
Насколько я могу суди
11号，休斯顿。目前的天气预报显示，您的灾后重建区域天气状况良好：2000英尺高度有零星云层，高空有零星云层，风向070度，风速13节，能见度10英里，海况约4英尺。昨天的预报显示，热带风暴克劳迪娅位于夏威夷以东约500至1000英里处。昨天下午地球卫星拍摄的图像显示，克劳迪娅正在消散，因此它的影响似乎比之前更小了。目前，您的灾后重建区域被认为位于热带辐合带以北不远处，您从窗户往外看应该就能看到。昨天还有报道称，更西边的地方出现了热带风暴维奥拉。它目
ممتاز. هذه نسخة 23 ديسمبر من صحيفة "إنترستيلر تايمز" على طريقة بول هاني. نود إعلامكم بأنه لم يتبق سوى يومين للتسوق حتى عيد الميلاد. يقول إن بثكم التلفزيوني حقق نجاحًا كبيرًا أمس. ميكي هيرشك
... و.
7인조 선수
للعلم فقط يا هيوستن، أثناء - قبل الدوران حول القمر مباشرة، رأينا الكثير من الحطام الذي كان يطفو بجانبنا، بما في ذلك قطعة كبيرة نوعًا ما ب
क्रू सिस्टम के लोगों के लिए एक और महत्वपूर्ण बात - उन्हें बता दें कि उन्हें रेफ्रिजरेटर लाने की ज़रूरत नहीं है। मैंने अभी कुछ हॉट डॉग निकाले हैं, और वे लगभग 
Роджер. Спасибо, Майк. Не могли бы вы нам помочь? Это странно: ничего подобного мы раньше не видели. Мы хотели бы узнать, были ли у вас какие-либо события ил
Понял. Из-за меньшей нагрузки при выключенном радаре сближения, мы хотели бы сейчас оставить на 
チェックリストに「キャプチャラッチが接続されているか確認する」という項目がもう一つ追加されました。プローブはすでにプリロード済みです。ちょっとおかしな話ですが、ラッチが接続されているかどうか確認するかどうかは、皆さんの自由で
أوديسي، هيوستن. يمكن
灯光明亮，感觉良好，心情愉悦。舱内参数：压力 1，湿度 65，温度 20，舱室 1 压力，第一自动阀 155，第二自动阀 155，气瓶压力 32
रॉजर। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है, फ्लाई-बाय-वायर सिस्टम पर मैन्युअल रूप से नियंत्रित हो रही है, नियंत्रण में कोई परेशानी नहीं है। बहुत सहज और आसान; नियंत्रण बह
저 총이 발사되는 방
ROT CONTROL POWER、NORMAL、番号 2、
버즈, 제가 이해한 것 같습니다. 네, 맞습니다. 그런데 그가 두 번째로 그렇게 했을 때, 명사는 20이었고, 그가 3175를 입력하고 002 ENTER를 눌렀을 때, 실제로 한 일은 첫 번째 두 개의 실제 CD
هيوستن، هذه أبولو 8. كيف ت
こちらカーナボン外科医です。血圧
Okay. And switch INVERTER 2, AC BUS 2 to on; and another switch, AC BUS 2 RESET, to reset and center; switch BATTERY CHARGE to Alfa; switch DC INDICATOR select BAT CHARGER; and then what we want you to do is to report the charger current and voltage to every 10 minutes for the first half hour, and then once every 30 minutes after that. And that'll be on 
All the blasted wir
わかりました、フレッド。これからは電話は控えます。少しでも眠れるように。まずは部屋の
ठीक है। आ
2
आँखों की स्थिति भी लगभग वैसी ही है, और अब ये थोड़ी बड़ी दिखती हैं। लेकिन कुछ समय पहले तक मैं इन्हें केवल मोनोक्युलर की मदद से ही ठीक से देख पा रहा थ
And, Houston, 13. O2 tank pressure number
今、バハ・カリフォル
It's 
حسنًا. سأعرض عليهم ذلك، وأود أن أعرف ما إذا كان بإمكانهم قراءة ما هو معروض عليه، و
यह मेरी
로저, 13살. 우리도 봤어. 
Да уж, наверное, нет ничего более безлюдного, чем находиться внутри эти
Okay. Copy that, Fred. On the O2 flow th
न
Роджер. В других мировых новостях сообщается, что экипаж «Пуэбло» приземлился вчера днем ​​на военно-морской авиабазе Мирамар и проведет несколько дней в больнице Бальбоа со своими семьями, отмечая Рождество. На местном уровне Ассоциация розничных торговцев объявила, что ее политика обмена рождественскими подарками в этом году будет такой же, как и в прошлом, то есть очень либеральной. Друзья, мы будем рады заменить любые сломанные вещи, которые вы можете вернуть; но, к 
Je suppose que je ferais mi
음, 저 줄, 그러니까 우주선의 모양 때문에 제가 항상 여기에 떠 있을 수 있었던 거죠. 제가 이쪽으로 나가면 줄의 역학 때문에 다시 이쪽으로 올라왔고, 
取り外せると思うものはすべて、マジックテープを付け忘れたも
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. If you rea
في ذلك الوقت، كان مؤشر ال
Mais la pl
D'
Well, that was quick. Did you decide you didn't want to sleep
Водолей, Хьюстон. Я скопировал от вас — что он завершил основную линию; он пер
了解。何度か間違ったバケツに入れてし
Je croyais que tu étais Gémeau
Mal sehen. In Springfield, Missouri, beschloss Mickey Owen, der legendäre Catcher der Brooklyn Dodgers, der Geschichte schrieb, indem er 1941 in der World Series den dritten Strike fallen ließ und so den New York Yankees den Sieg über die Dodgers bescherte, dass er nicht nur für seinen sportlichen Rekord in Erinnerung bleiben wollte. Fünfundvierzig Jungen und Mädchen erhielten von ihm angebotene Ponys. Die Kinder wurden gebeten, ihm Brie
I understand; go for the next. Mike, we'd like to, if we could, time the TV to a passing over the terminator. We would like to track the terminator with the TV; think that's the most impressive thing we've seen, and 
フレッド、そうは思わない。君の数百マイル後方だ。700マイルって、聞いた話ではその数字だ。委員会が途中で航路修正をしなかったということは、それが正しいのかも
टेक्सास पार 
待
Джон, врачи в аэромедицинском корпусе очень довольны тобой; ты отлично выглядишь наверх
11, Houston. Per quanto riguarda il flusso di O2, cella a combustibile 3: a quanto pare, durante la
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Думаю, причина в том, что в последующих заходах на посадку фигурирует число 1620, или, по крайней мере
휴스턴, 컬럼비아. 뒷면 플랫폼을 약간 수정했습니다. 데이터를 복사할
대서양
Похоже, это будет интересный день. Жду вашего отчета о
11, Houston. Roger, Neil. 8 1/
Очень туго. Очень ту
いいですね。ちょっと探していたんです。よし、ピッチをそのままにして、ヨーもそのままにして、ロールを止めます。フレアが見えなくてすみません。ピッチングを
1분 - 닐이
Roger. Understand. Just for information, perhaps you read it out on the ground. I ran our pericynthian altitude determination using first of all, . The star state vector that we navigat
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。最後のトラニオンを見逃してし
よし。では、
أوديسي، هيوستن. أنتَ تقوم بكل
D'accord, j'ai encore les disjoncteurs PYRO A séquence A et PYRO B séquence B en place. Voulez-vous les retire
Oh, è buio, ecco cosa è successo. Sta affrontando una terra scura. Tramonto da F16 a F, ok; inizieremo con F16. Verso nord, verso sud. Prova
Я только что увидел ускоритель на со
हाँ। मेरा अनुमान है कि मूल प्रश्न यहाँ और खिड़की से बाहर गेंदों की तुलना करने का है, यह बहुत अनुचित नहीं लगता, और मुझे लगता है कि जिम का कहना है कि यॉ औ
좋아요. 시작. 127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15도/초 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-BRAVO: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-BRAVO: 93. 1+58 14 45 02. 11+04. 62-BRAVO: 85. 1+47. 16 18 08. 10+29. 63-BRAVO:
Diresti a Pete Conrad di far scendere i 
好的。在激活阶段，我们会同时进行多次输入，读取角度差值，然后提供扭矩调整后的角度，以便对平台进行精细对准。您计划采用类似的方法，还是只使用三个粗略的对准
स्कैन
Ok, 11. Sembra che le prestazioni del motore durante entrambe le accensioni di questa missione siano state le stesse dei test di accettazione del motore. La lettura del PC di bordo è dovuta a un fattore di calibrazione noto tra ciò che si ha effettivamente nella camera e ciò che si legge sul manometro. Ci aspettiamo che il funzionamento a bancata singola sia di 90, ovvero 90 psi sul manometro con una pressione effettiva nella camera di 95 psi. Nel funzionamento a bancata doppia, la pressione nella camera è di 94 psi sul manometro con una pressione effettiva di 99 psi. 80 psi sul manometro di bordo corrispondono a 83 psi effettivi. E consigliam
Molly Brown, korrigiere das: 400.000 Fuß.
D'ac
यह 
حسنًا، تم إغلاق قسم الأجه
Roger
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस; ह्
D'accord, 
Хорошо. «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и в открытом космосе экипаж «Аполлона-8» только что выиграл лунную гонку; наушники были аккуратно 
An der Südspitze Südamerikas wirbelt unten eine riesige Wo
जैक, जि
Я возьму предохранительный кл
Акт
D'accord. Je 
Friendship Se
Das ist richtig. Gehen Sie zu Seite 1-9 und überspring
OK. Nous enregistrons le fonctionnement de votre pompe. GET B 03:19; Delta-
了解。AFT OM
طاقة التحكم في الدوران، عادي، اثنان منها، تيار متردد/تيار مستمر
Да, Фред, это утвердительно. Этот в
分かりました。ジャック、これは長い手順で、おそらく2、3ページかかります。これは、あなたが先ほど送られてきた公称構成、もしくは本日送られ
यह श
了解、オーロラ・セブン。ピッチマ
Хорошо. Вот что на самом деле означает вторая часть этого упражнения: нам нужно сделать это с помощью Hasselblad, и опять же, мы не будем использовать красный и син
Roger, Frank. We would like to ask you about the next few hours in the flight plan. We are inclined to let Jim go ahead and sleep and to slip the that occurs at. On the other hand, we would think it would probably be a good idea if he returned more to the normal sleep rest cycle; and if you got him up nominally to do the work, then perhaps he would be ready to go back t
Roger. Oui. Il est venu pour deux ou trois
Ricevuto, Buzz. Ricevuto. Sembra che la vista
Мне не нужно заниматься спортом. Я действительно не чувствую в этом необходимости. Мне будет слишком жарк
This is affirmative. During the dark side I we
Okay. Stand by. I'll give you volts and
Das ist richtig, Jim, mit den folgenden Änderungen in Schritt 3. Wenn Sie auf Seite 26 blät
Роджер. В разделе примечаний добавьте следующее: "требуется процедура 
这大概只是因为金属太烫
Okay, Jack. Per favore,
Roger. Bien re
了解。六
Roger.
أرى شيئاً ما في الأفق
حسنًا. هل يخططون للمشاركة في مسابقة G&N أم سيستخدمون
Deuxièmement, nous reprenons le calendrier prévu, votre réveil étant programmé à 1
Roger. Ho iniziato co
さて、排出圧力が急激に低下してこのような状態になるのは正常なのでしょうか？
रॉजर। कॉपी, बज़। आपकी सरफेस चेकलिस्ट में कुछ बदलाव हैं, और सामान्य तौर पर, हम चाहते हैं कि आप कमांड मॉड्यूल को ट्रैक करें ताकि आप वहां अपनी स्थिति का अंतिम बार जायजा ले सकें। यानी, P57, और फिर चेकलिस्ट के अनुसार आगे बढ़ें। बाकी चेकलिस्ट में कुछ छोटे-मोटे बदलाव हैं। मुख्य बदलाव यह है कि हम चढ़ाई के दौरान रेंडेज़वस रडार को चालू नहीं रखना चाहते, और हमें लगता है कि इससे उतरने के दौरान आने वाले प्रोग्राम अलार्म की समस्या कुछ 
必须
알겠습니다. 첫 번째로 비행 계획을 보니 CDR은 이제 잠자리에 들어야 할 것 같습니다. 두 번째로, 연소 과정 요약입니다. 모든 시스템이 정상적으로 작동하는 것 같습니다. 궤적을 보니 69.67마일의 모드와 근일점 통과 시간으로 CPA가 설정되어 있습니다. 자유 귀환 경로도 양호합니다. 회랑 제어를 위한 궤적을 완전히 평가하기에는 아직 조금 이릅니다. 플러스 11 블록 데이터는 업데이트되지 않을 것입니다. 곡선을 살펴본 결과, 배터리 벤트 압력이 0.2~0.3볼트로 0인 것
Houston, questa è una piccola dimostrazione per i bambini a casa, per tutti i bambini del mondo, 
Утверждаю: 15 секунд, чет
병진 제어 전원
Rapporto sullo stato di combustione come segue: combustione in orario, tempo di combustione 4 minuti e 6 secondi e mezzo, VGX meno 1,4, assetto nomina
Yes. We wish we could send you a kit and it would be kind of like putting
لا 
Ken, chiamami se vedi che gli angoli de
Роджер, повторяю, 42 Браво Разделение ∆V. 
Хорошо. Дума
Okay. I think what we'll do here is, if I see the high gain definitely going past the scan limit before it gets the mechanical limit,
알겠습니다. 
分かりました。唯一理解できないのは、なぜあんな速度で急上昇したのかということです。そ
Jetzt könnte Ihnen die Sonne direkt in die Au
تقول إنك تريد التحقي
D
Ok, Jack, capito. Chiudi gli interruttori automatici della valvola REAC nella cella a combustibile 2. Spegni gli inverter. Spegni il bus relè BAT. COLLEGAMENTI BAT, OFF. Ingresso alimentazione ed entrambi gli interruttori autom
Amicizia Sett
Roger. Hie
Roger sull'inerziale. Ed eccoci al 2 PAD. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, più 166, meno 081; TIG 080 11 3603. NOME 81: meno 01408, meno tutte le palline, meno 00743. Rotola tutte le palline, 196 359 00657, più 00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Stella sestante 23 1160 138. Il resto del PAD è NA. Allineamento, Vega e Deneb 243 183 012. Ullage, due jet 19 secondi. Note: Sul tuo carico, vorremmo un R1 20101, in contrapposizione al valore che appare nel piano di volo. Per effettuare il controllo stellare del sestante, questo deve essere fatto tra le 79:30:10, momento in cui la stella emerge dall'orizzonte, e le 79:52:10, che corrispondono al sorgere del sole locale, dato che questa stella è relativamente vicina al Sole. L'orientamento della tua stella è a testa in giù, retrograda e inclinata di 28 gradi rispetto all'orizzontale locale. I valori calcolati per NOUN 42 sono HA 65,6 e HP 54,6. Entrambi sono p
알겠습니다. 카메라 한 대를 꺼
هيوست
ठीक है। मैं पैनल 9 पर हूँ। रिसीव करने के लिए तैयार हूँ। क्या आप चाहते हैं कि मैं किसी कारणवश इसके साथ 
Roger. Ne abbiamo presa una bella po
Anche i bambini al campo estivo sono finiti al centro dell'attenzione quando Mike Jr. ha risposto "sì" a qualcuno che gli aveva chiesto se suo padre sarebbe entrato nella storia. Poi, dopo una breve pausa, ha chiesto: "Cos'è la storia?". A Washington, il presidente Nixon sta pianificando di usare il suo potere esecutivo per snellire la Commissione per il Commercio Interstatale. Secondo fonti del settore, Nixon avrebbe ridotto il numero dei membri della commissione da 11 a 7, evitando di nominare nuo
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8
Okay, Mike, falls da irgendwo Datentaschen herumliegen – ich habe vielleicht ein oder zwei in meinem provisorischen Stauraum –, dann könnten wir sie zus
You might note for the people at MIT that the next series of stars will be shot by the master navigator with a space helm
È un libro grande, con un sacc
Columbia, Houston. La logica sembra azzeccata. Puoi armar
Nun ja, im Moment arbeiten wir alle dre
제 말은 
Bitte w
Роджер. Примерно за 12 минут до вашего мощного сброса давления есть небольшое непрерывное вентиляционное отверстие, которое открывается на определенное расстояние. Вы можете заметить, что на ускорителе тяга составляе
مرحباً يا تشارلي، أستطيع أن أرى الثلج على الجبال في كاليفورنيا، ويبدو أن
好的。我们有：
ジムは
Gemini 4, ici Houston.
收到。问题出在扫描仪测试上。正如我们预期的那样，滚转动作也正常进行。我现在恢复陀螺仪正常模式，比预定时间提前
アポロ1
好了，查理，我们现在
ऐसा बिल्कुल नहीं लगता कि ये कैप्सूल से आ रहे हैं। इनकी संख्या बहुत अधिक है। ये सब जगह-जगह फैले हुए हैं; ऐसा लगता 
Sembra il
Okay. RRT, 07 20, 50 000, 08 16. That's - 07 20 is - is the time of steam pressure peg from RRT; and 40 000, 08 30; 24 000, 09 02; 10 000,
روجر. يا جيم، بما أنك مستيقظ والجو هادئ، دعني أطرح عليك بعض الأمور الأخرى. أمر واحد بالتحديد. أعلم أنكم لا تنامون جيدًا بسبب البرد الشديد، وقد ترغبون في تناول حبتين من ديكسيدرين في حوالي 
T/M，实时；ACQ-AID 和 ANTENNA-
रॉजर। 
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है हम उन्हें देख सकते हैं। रंग वास्तव में हमार
रॉजर, को
Я
로저. 전화 주시기 전에 이미 거의
Zwillinge 4, Zwil
Roger. I am about 15 minutes early with the fix update and 
Roger, Aurora Seven
彼はあ
ヒュー
أيضًا، تجربة S-5. يطلب مركز التحكم في العمليات من ا
Affermativo, Jack. E giusto per essere sicuri che non ci siano errori nella procedura, pa
Роджер. Просто чтобы убедиться, что в этом тесте телевизора не возникло желания сделать снимки Луны с красным и синим фильтром. У нас уже есть снимки Луны с красным и син
Ma
그에게 우리 눈에는 
M
Роджер. У меня наблюдаются периодические сбои в работе нагревателя RCS. Первый раз было 47, я включил нагреватель, и индикатор загорелся на 54. Это было кольцо А. Кольцо В — 05. Потребовалось 5 минут, чтобы он загорелся до 20, и еще 5 минут, чтобы погас. Кольцо В загорелось на 37, и потребовалось 5 минут, а кольцо А загорелось на 50, и потребовалось 5 минут. Похоже, показания довольно точные. Температура на нагрев
Il s'agit de l'expérience Zodiacal Light Experim
You're cutting 
Хорошо, 13; Хьюсто
ठीक है। मुझे आसपास की आवाज़ों में कुछ बदलाव महसूस हुआ, मुझे लगा कि
Apo
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们再试一次，这次的电视拍摄请求。我们需要10分钟的电视
Tieni duro. Roger, ti abbiamo portato un bel car
Mike, dans combien de te
Nous atteindrons la position à 120 pieds par seconde. Nous avons un nive
Sì. Immagino che la domanda fondamentale sia che confrontando le palle qui e fuori dalla finestra non sembra troppo irragionevole, e immagino che Jim dica che l'imbardata e il rollio sono leggermente diversi da quelli che potrebbe vedere a occhio; eppure, gli aghi dell'aria mostrano una scala
So, wir sind fast im Schlafmodus; wartet einfa
जी हां, जेमिनी 4। वे चाहते हैं कि यह प्रयोग लगभग 5 मिनट तक चले, जिसमें ACQ एड बीकन बंद रहे और कोई U
이것은 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 제 생각에는 좌측 요(yaw) 방향으로 
ああ、ジャック、それは君の判断でいいよ。少なくとも1匹は欲しいんだけど、2匹ともトンネルの中に入れるように勧められたん
嘿
रॉजर। हम टीएम पर स्टेजिंग की प
И передайте Гленну Паркеру на мысе
अगर 
わかった。新しい姿勢では、彼を追い抜くつもりだったシャフトとトラニオンの角度は意味をなさないが
Ha! Ha! Ha! Qui était-ce? C'était Gus? Je croyais que c'était
Roger, Houston. Lagebericht der Crew. Wir haben zu wenig Wasser und Proviant und haben auch nicht wirklich Appetit. Wir versuchen, den Wasservorrat aufzustocken, aber beim Essen – nicht, dass mit dem Essen etwas nicht stimmt, wir s
不，我没有。听起来像是有回声，我检查过了，当时我也没有按住按键
Sono ancora un po' confuso su questo: sull'attivazione del circuito secondario. Hai indicato di disattivarlo 1 ora o 5 minuti dopo l'attivazione dell'ev
D'accord. La charge de la ba
لماذا لا تضغط على زر أعلى وتدعنا نلقي نظرة على ذلك
Ich bin mir nicht sich
Ces
Nur zu, Houston.
11, ici Houston. Au moment du déclenchement de votre accumulateur cyclique, nous étions en mode de transmission de données à faible débit et, par conséquent, nous ne recevions pas le paramètre de débit d'O2. Nous pensons que ce que vous observez est probablement normal. Autrement dit, c'est probablement ce à quoi on pourrait s'attendre d'un transducteur qui dysfonctionne de cette manière, et cela ne fera qu'empirer. Pas d'inquiétude à avoir. Nous surveillons la situat
لا أعرف. الشمس تُؤذي عينيك يا غاس 
فرانك، بينما تتحدث عن قائمة التحقق الخاصة بالدخول، بخصوص حمام الماء البارد هذا - هل قررت بالضبط أين
Tu peux le c
صورة ملتقطة بالأبيض والأسود للقمر، بعد إزالة فلتر الأرصاد الجوية. هذه الصورة رقم 6. ومع غروب القمر، سنحاول التقاط صورة أخرى بسرعة غالق أبطأ، مع 
네, 짐. 저희가 수신
11日、ヒューストン。現在の予報では、回復エリアの気象状況は良好です。高度は散在して 2,000 フィート、高散在して、風向は 070 度、風速 13 ノット、視程 10 マイル、海面は約 4 フィートです。昨日の予報では、熱帯暴風雨「クラウディア」がハワイの東 500 ～ 1,000 マイル付近に発生するとされていました。昨日の午後に地球の衛星から撮影された写真では、午後にはクラウディアが消滅しつつあることが示されており、以前よりもさらに影響は小さくなっているようです。回復エリアは現在、窓の外を見ればおそらく見える熱帯収束帯のすぐ北にあると考えられます。昨日は、さらに西​​に熱帯暴風
Sehr schön. Weiter südlich und landeinwärts sehe ich noch mehr Lichter. Dort sind zwei, eigentlich vier Muster zu erkennen. Und jetzt sehe ich im Fenster noch ein weiteres, fast direkt unter mir. 
Роджер. Жителям космического корабля «Колумбия», возможно, будет интересно узнать, что сегодня в Колумбии День независимости. Вчера вечером Глория Диас из Филиппин была коронована как «Мисс Вселенная». Она обо
Je t
프렌드십 세븐, 과
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Vos 
好的。请您在方便的时候进入系统，检查以下阀门，并按照我们这里列出的设置进行操作。减压阀（REPRESS PACKAGE），关闭；紧急舱压阀（EMER
アポロ13号、
Мы это обсуждали. Мы решили завтра заняться уходом за бородами и сделать это одной из
Yes. I'm oscillating between 0.69 a
Хорошо. Теперь всё в порядке
ठीक है। मैं आपको याद दिलाना चाहता हूँ कि कैनरी के AOS की पुष्टि होने तक होराइजन स्कैन थ्रस्टर चेक शुरू नहीं किया जाना चाहिए। AOS पर कैनरी आपको कॉल करेगी। ओवर
Und Gott nannte das Licht Tag und die Finsternis Nacht. Und es wurde Abend und es wurde Morgen: der erste Tag. Und Gott sprach: „Es werde eine Feste inmitten der Wasser! Sie scheide die Wasser voneinander!“
PROCE
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। क्या 
D'accord. Comme je vous l'ai expliqué, on prend le ruban adhésif gris et on le plie de façon à ce que la partie arrière adhère autour des boîtes. Ensuite, on fixe les quatre côtés de nos cartes dessus, comme nos cartes. Puis on superpose ces cartes autour de la base de la boîte. Ensuite, on... puis on... par-dessus... en haut... Ensuite, on prend la serviette des anciennes boîtes et on la met au fond des nouvelles.
Roger. 40 2711 398 033, bas 043, gauche 23, plus 0832 moins 16500 12956 36208; l’ensemble d’étoiles au nord reste Sirius et Rigel; le roulis, le tanga
Aquarius, Hous
Well, that's my question. We're not - Our 16 20 doesn't match our eight-ball here. We went to s ON, and we don't have o
Regardez ç
Хорошо. Шаг 1, BIOMED выключен; шаг 2, перейдите к НИЗКОЙ СКОРОСТИ ПЕРЕДАЧИ СВЯЗИ; шаг 3, перейдите к РЕЗЕРВНО
C'est exact. Et nous allons égalemen
如果你能找到它，请务必追踪它或记下它的位置，以便我们
Okay. Wir werden das tun. Sobald Sie bereit sind, geben wir Ihnen Bescheid, wenn wir den Befehl zum Umschalten der An
这是西格玛七号。如有需要，我已做好进行逆序演化的准备。我目前只有一张星
अच्छा, हमारे पास ताननारिव होना चाहिए। चलिए आगे बढ़ते हैं 
Era so
मैं अभी OMNI A पर संचार कर रहा हूँ, लेकिन मुझे अभी नए उच्च-लाभ कोण मिलने वाले
D'accord. Je vais me redresser et te regarder
わか
حسناً. ممتاز. يبدو أنه خيارٌ
روجر، جيم. اعلم أن ضوء الشمس يدخل إلى التلسكوب الماسح، مما يجعل الرؤية مستحيلة، وعليك الاعتماد على السدس فقط
Roger, vérifier les commandes de vol électriques est très simple. Notre système de télémétrie vérifie que tous vos systèmes fonctionnent correctement. Êtes-vous prêt pour la rétr
ヒューストンのトランクウィリティ基地。食事の進み具合と、いつから準備を始められるか、おおよその目安
Ricevuto. Sono 13 gradi a sinistra dell'ombra. E la prossima domanda riguarda la profondità del campionamento di massa che hai ottenuto vicino alla prima parte del grafico e qualsiasi variazione di composizione che pot
11、ヒューストン。ここのモニターでは解像度はかなり良好です。色も…少なくともこのセットでは…あまり…ではありません。ご覧になっているものについて説明していただけますか？どう
"0.1 foot per second." The reason we are shutting down on the burn time is, since the ASA breaker has been out for so long, we're not real confident that our s are going to be super-sharp. So we want to make sure that we just get a burn time - no overburn; so we're shutting down on burn time minus 1 second. And then that will allow us a plus-X
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Ricevuto. La tua acc
オーロラ・セブン、急速にフェードア
O
La pression dans la ch
Oh, eccolo. Stavo perdendo l'orizzonte. Non dirmi che i nostri scanner secondari sono fuori uso. Non è giusto. Vediamo cosa succede. Questa palla è molto lontana. Buonanotte! La nostra palla si è allontanata molto. Andiamo alla luce del giorno
Vielen Dank, Owen. Ich glaube, mein Garten könnte etwas W
阿波罗11号
Хорошо, Фрэнк. При выполнении дополнительного маневра по отделению мы рекомендуем вам сделать радиальное включение двигателя, направить положительную ось X к земле и увеличить скорость на отрицательной оси X на 3 фута в секунду. Конец
I 
Ну, это не так уж и полезно; кажется, никогда и не бывает. В зависимости от положения Солнца, по
حسنًا. السؤال الإضافي الأول هو، ود
Roger, Buzz. I think I've got the picture. You indicate that little difference betwe
Apollo 11, Houston. D'après nos observations depuis le milieu de la trajectoire, nous affichons un gamma de -6,57. Ce chiffre est préliminaire, et nous pensons qu'après quelques suivis supplémentaires, la trajectoire devrait se stabiliser et nous pourrons l'ajuster précisément dans le couloir d'atterrissage. Nous sommes quasiment au centre du couloir; tout semble bien se passer. Nous vous enverrons un plan d'entrée dans quelques heures, avant que vous n'alliez vous coucher. Et de la part de nos amis des affaires publique
你们地面系统一切正常。我
La vista a questa altitudine, a Houston, è spettacolare. Non abbiamo avuto difficoltà a individuare i dett
Roger. Im Bericht zu Essen und Trinken steht, dass beide Piloten zwei
جيم، هذا لا يزعجنا على الإطلاق، إذ
迈
Apollo 8, Houston. Procédez à la vér
Roger. Nous préférerions reporter la mise en place du contrôle thermique passif et, en attendant, obtenir un maximum de points, en commençant par la première étoile et en réalisant deux séries de trois points chacune, avant de passer à la d
حصلنا عليه من كارنارفون. لا نستطيع الخروج وطردهم بالطريقة المعتادة.
Roger. 
여기 온도가
Gemini VIII, Houston CAP COM. Ich habe
Bien, tout en bas de la vérification d'entrée, juste là où nous sommes, la dernière ligne indique maintenant « MODE en veille ». Juste au-dessus, je vous rappelle d'ajouter la remarque: « Ne pas initialiser la plage de valeurs ». En effet, vous allez effectuer la vérification d'entrée, parcourir toutes ces étapes, puis nous allons couper l'alimentation. Je voulais simplement éviter que vous n'initialisiez les paramètres d'entrée prématurément, car vous les perdrez lors de la mi
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Es sieht so aus, als ob wir die Verbindun
友谊七号，钢头鳟。我的速度现在是10节，
제미니 4호, 여기는 휴스턴 CAP COM입니다. 테이프 재생 스위치를 리셋 위치로 옮겨주십시
休斯顿，哥伦比亚。我再说一遍：我没看到它们。自动光学
أظن أنك ستخبرني أن قلبي قد توقف عن النبض
Роджер. Теперь у нас есть сравнение 
यह कहना मुश्किल है कि उचित गति क्या हो सकती है। मुझे लगता है कि जो गति मैं अभी अपना रहा हूँ वही ठीक है - कुछ सौ किलोमीटर के बाद यह काफी थका देने वाल
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 
Это верно. Хорошо, теперь мы перейдём к автоматическим выключателям: датчики давления 1 и 2, главный A и главны
今は UHF に切り替えながら録画のみにすることにします
У меня есть комментарий по поводу точки на Земле, куда отражаются солнечные лучи. В целом, цвет океанов в основном однородный, ярко-синий и тёмно-синий, за исключением области, диаметр которой составляет примерно одну восьмую радиуса Земли; в этой круглой области синий цвет воды становится сероватым, и я уверен, что именно 
ええ。これで（判読不能）がどこにあるかがわかったので、次回はずっと楽になります。カイロとアレクサンドリアを初めて探した時は、（判読不能）がなかなか見つからず、飛行場は結局見えませんでした。ただ、その辺りだけが見えたんです。カメラを正しく向ければカイロの写真が撮れるだろうと思っていました。でも今回は、ちゃんと飛行場を捉えました。アレクサンドリアでも同じです。もしああいう場所を写真に撮るなら、一度上空を通過して、よく見
Roger, Hawaii. Verstanden. GET B Brennvorgang, 01 34 37; Delta-V, 2,9; Dauer, 0 plus 05; Gierwinkel 0, Nickwinkel 0; Adresse 25, 90029; 26 alles Nullen; 
Roger. Il y a deux engrenages qui tournent quand on actionne la poignée. L'un d'eux sert de cliquet: un petit cylindre avec un piston et une pointe derrière qui s'enclenche. On a eu un peu de mal avec ça avant d'ouvrir le hayon, et même après, on a eu du mal à faire fonctionner le cliquet. On a aussi eu beaucoup de mal à fermer suffisamment le hayon pour
Ha una bellezza austera e unica. È come gran parte dell'alto deserto degli Stati Uniti. È diverso, ma è molto bello qui. Tieni presente che molti dei campioni di roccia qui, i campioni di roccia dura, hanno que
Oui, je suis d'accord, Jack. Jack Swigert et moi sommes montés à l'étage tout à l'heure et avons chacun pris un bidon. On cherchait du matériel et on réfléchissait à comment les utiliser. C'est d'ailleurs pour ça que, quand on a préparé toute l'eau à boire, on a utilisé le récipient en plastique dans lequel ils étaient rangés, dans le garde-manger. On l'avait sous la m
... على الأقل يبدو هذا أفضل لأغراضنا 
Ora posso di
11, Houston. Les prévisions actuelles indiquent des conditions acceptables dans votre zone de récupération: nuages ​​épars à 600 mètres d'altitude, vent du 070° à 13 nœuds, visibilité de 16 kilomètres et mer agitée (vagues d'environ 1,2 mètre). Les prévisions d'hier signalaient une tempête tropicale, Claudia, à environ 800 à 1 600 kilomètres à l'est d'Hawaï. Les images satellites prises hier après-midi montraient que Claudia se dissipait, ce qui semble indiquer que son impact est encore moindre qu'auparavant. Votre zone de récupération se situe désormais légèrement au nord de la zone de convergence intertropicale, que vous pouvez probablement apercevoir par vos fenêtres. Hier, une tempête tropicale, Viola, a également été signalée plus à l'ouest. Elle se trouve actuellement à environ 1 600 kilomètres à l'est des Philippines et se déplac
Das ist bestätigt, Jack.
就像在模拟器里一样，你会向
Знаете, если вы ударите по этому контроллеру, как в симуляторе, с МИНИМАЛЬНОЙ СИЛОЙ ИМПУЛЬСА, просто ударьте, он ударится в одну сторону и
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है। आपके
わかった。それから、ジョンの友達が何人かここにいたのを見た。残念ながら、君と同じようにやられたん
Okay. Set your altimeter 2986
마이크, 영구적인 자리는 아니야. 찰리가 카메라에 달린 특수 도구 사용법을 확인하는 동안 여기
تلك
ठीक है। हम इसे
Apollo 8, Houston. Dans deux minutes. Nous avon
Ah, d'accord. Le dernier élément était l'él
حسنًا. يوجد بعض الدخان عند نافذتي. آم
Apollo 8, Houston. Das ist bestätigt, Frank. Wir bereiten gerade die Erstellung eines löschbaren Datenabbilds vor. Wir beginnen jetzt mit den Vorbereitungen und melden uns, sobald wir zum Kopieren be
ابتعد الصاروخ المعزز بسرعة كبيرة وأصبح أسفلنا كما 
好的，我们正在记录完成时间。这里有两张清单，一张是设备转移清单，另一张是相反的清单。请您划掉第一张清单上的最后一项，即归还用过的
Всё работает отлично. Я закончил — один набор наблюдений с Сириусом, тремя звёздами, и один набор с Проционом, или два наблюдения; три наблюдения с Сир
Ok. Per qualche motivo vuoi un fascio
よし、ジョン。これ
Houston, Apollo 11. Potresti spi
了解。バックグラウンドノイズで読み上げています。OMNI Delt
Хорошо. Через 27 минут после
はい。バー
E Houston, Fred s
Ro
わかりました。そう言おうと思って
分かりました。ジャック、宇宙ステーションや宇宙ステーションについて、どのような計画や考えがあるのか​​、LiOHキャニスターを使うのか、それとも司令船に積んで持ち帰るのか、あるいはあなたの計画はどうな
يا برج الدلو، هل
난 정상 체
That is corre
Ricevuto. I prossimi sono ELS BAT A, BAT B, due, ape
रॉजर, 11. हम वहां आपकी गतिविधि पर नज़र रख रहे थे, और एंटर दबाकर एक और प्रमुख प्र
ウォーリ
Прошу проще
了解。注意と警
١١، هذه هيوستن. انتظر دقي
في عالم الرياضة، يُظهر فريق هيوستن أويلرز حماسًا كبيرًا في تدريباته التحضيرية للموسم الجديد في كيرفيل، ويُعرب المدرب والي ليم عن إعجابه بمجموعة اللاعبين الجدد المميزة. أما
아폴로 8호,
是的，我还以为你已经听说了。好了，继续工作；我们需要你提供一个低温风扇循
さあ、記録だけを書き留めておきます。オートキネシスに対する最良の答えは、存在しないということだと思います。私はオートキネシスに気づきませんでした。そして、私は頭の水平線を水平線に合わせるようにしています。無重力状態での
Ok. Potenza 6. Ok. La potenza 6 si riferisce al pannello 11. Dovresti seguire la tabella, ad eccezione degli interruttori che ho indicato. La prima riga è ok. O, diciamo, la prima riga. Seconda riga, QUAD 4, TCA, chiuso; QUAD 3, TCA, chiuso; QUAD 2, TCA, chiuso; e QUAD 1, TCA, chiuso. Il resto di quella riga è ok. Riga 3, circa a metà, ATCA (PGNS), chiu
ヒューストンさん、ジャックは、ピッチ角約105度、ロ
Okay. We're going to and DATA. The cir
Bene. Farò un te
फ्रैंक, अगर आप शून्य का उपयोग करते हैं, तो संभव
ジェミニ4号、こちらはヒューストンCAP COMです。6時間12分経過時点で、パイロットにタイプ1の医療データパス
不
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। मैं आज सुबह की कुछ रिकॉर्डिंग पढ़ रहा था, जिसमें हमने जो कोशिश की थी, उसके बारे में बताया गया था। जब आपने बटन दबाया और दो बार एंटर किया, तो वह अचानक चल पड़ा। मुझे लगता है कि हमारे पास उस पर एक रिपोर्ट है, अगर आप सुनना चाहें कि उसकी गति इतनी तेज़ क्यों
Roger. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, minus 061, plus 066 135 23 4156, plus 32011, plus 06 818, minus 02650, 181 054 014; Apogäum NA, plus 00230 32836 228 32628 42 1511 357, NA drei Linien, plus 1103, minus 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52, Deneb und Vega, 242 172 012, zwei Jets, Tankinhalt, 1
Okay. Bei 1 hatten wir Fotoziel 90 und Terminatorfotografie südlich für den nahen Terminator. Ab 2 hatten wir Ziel 12 und die Ziele 10, 14, 1
حسنًا، كنتُ سأخبركم للتو عن عملية التسليم التي أجريناها، لكنني تأخرتُ قليلًا. بما أن لدينا فائضًا من الطاقة، ونودّ أن يكون جهاز S-band معكم بعد انقطاع التيار الكهربائي، نرجو منكم حذف الخطوة من صفحة 2-5 من قائمة التحقق الخاصة بكم، بعد عبارة "بدء ان
Non, ils 
ええ、そうですね。スポーツ面は、あまり動きがありません。UCLAは両方のバスケットボールの投票でトップです。もし何か特定のチームについて聞きたいことがあれば、教えてください。どちらの投票でもトップ10に入っているかどうかお教えします。明日行われる大学オールスターゲーム、ノースチームに関しては、ノースがサウスチー
-01594 +00000 +52885 178 155 000, 해당
Definitely below me. I'd been tracking it below me from about Carnarvon on. Up until about Carnarvon we had it below us, and then up to the horizon, and then down below us again. It almost looked like it was in a different orbit than I was. It had a different apogee and perigee than what I did. Anyway, I attempted to close with it at daylight as soon as I could tell where it was. As I said, at that time it was a mile or two out in front of me - down below me. So, the more I tried to close, the less I really gained on it. I was firing retrograde. I was using my top thrusters to fire in such a manner as to decrease my total velocity, and then firing... at the same time. I never really closed, and it continued to pull away from me. It became obvious to me that by the time we got to Hawaii that to close on the booster in time to do the EVA with the booster would probably take all the fuel we had onboard. In the ground rule we had agreed not to do this. So I checked with CAP COM and we decided to not go ahead with the booster portion of the mission. I don't know if I mentioned it, but when we separated from the booster, it seemed like our rates on the booster were low, on the order of a half a degree a second in pitch and yaw. I tried to damp these. I fired one impulse in each direction, and then I concentrated on coming off the booster. We came off, and we came off in the manner in which we generated some other rates. We came right-side-up, eventually, and turned around. Probably about a minute and a half or two minutes. It look
Okay. 
了解しまし
我明白了；继续下一个。迈克，如果可以的话，我们想让电视机在晨昏线过后播放。我们想用电视机追踪晨昏线；我们觉得这是我们见过的最震撼的事情，而且这可能比
ठीक है। हमें उच्च बिट दर चाहिए। हमने आपकी सेवा छोड़ दी है, और हम कुछ समय
休斯顿
Ricevuto. Dovrebbe aprirsi completamente e da quel momento in poi puoi lasciarlo acceso. L'obiettivo è depressuri
Roger. Sono in modalità automatica, ovvero in modalità normale. I giroscopi sono normali, le manovre sono disattivate, tutti i sistemi sono verdi. Sono davvero soddisfatto del circuito della tuta
イーグル、ヒューストン。ハイゲインを試してみたい
당신이 자는 동안 전할 메시지가 있어요. 발레리가 아이들과 함께 당신이 돌아오기를 간절히 기다리고 있다고 전해달라고 했어요. 크리스마스트리 아래에 선물들이 마법처럼 다시 나타나
Okay. Gut. Und
Non ho mai capito quale int
Eagle, qui Houston. Abbiamo perso
अपोलो 
어디선가 남은 과일 케
わかりました。私たちも同じように読ませていただいています。ありがとうご
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। पहाड़ी के ऊपर से गुजरते समय आपकी व्यवस्था ठीक लग रही है। लगभ
रॉजर। अब तक आपको जो समस्याएं आ रही हैं, वे किसी अज्ञात का
Это «Дружба номер семь». Нет. У меня тут некоторые проблемы. Моё настроение не с
Dome, cabin dome
이제 곧 밤이 다가오네요.
ドッキングウィンドウ。了解。誰かが君の最新の消耗品ステータスレポートを渡してくれたんだ
मेरे पास स्कैनर लाइ
Okay. W
Diese Übertragung erreicht Sie etwa auf halbem Weg zwischen Mond und Erde. Wir sind seit 31 Stunden und etwa 20 Minuten in der Luft. Bis zum Mond haben wir noch knapp 40 Stunden. Sie sehen, dass Bill hier seine Zahnb
我
Deine Temperaturwerte sehen gut aus, Frank. Es gibt zwar noch einen Temperaturunterschied zwischen den Quads, aber nichts, was uns auch nur im Geringsten 
D'accord. On a la Terre à peu près au centre de l'écran, un peu basse, et il semblait que des objets se déplaçaient dessus, en même temps q
Je v
Montrez-nous ce que vous ête
قلتُ إنني أعتقد أن هذا الكمبيوتر قد تعطل عندما قمنا بإيقاف تشغيل الطاقة بينما كان المفتاح عالقًا في 
Roger. Ti abbiamo ricevuto un'ora e mezza fa. Afferma
Водолей, Хь
这是友谊七号。我转了个圈，旋转了180度，
좋아요. 잘됐네요
Хорошо, Фред, я больше тебя не слышу из-за фонового шума. Я предполагаю, что... кажет
好了，我已经把系统测
さて、アライン
Meno 
Roger, Guaymas. Die IVI-Anzeige lautete 331 achtern, 105 rechts und 4 oben. Genau in der Mitte. Ein automatisch
特此告知，卡佩天文台通知我们，如果我们不在这里长时间保持手动操作，我们可能就不得不结束这次轨道
저 TVC 짐벌 드라
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Muche
Ok. Abbiamo il tubo blu dell'LMP vicino al finestrino dell'LMP e il - Ovviamente, il tubo rosso è separato da circa 1,2 metri. E il - Ok. Stiamo per - e l'altro tubo - il - ha la prolunga - Il tubo blu del CDR, ovviamente, ha la prolunga, e sta soffiando in alto nel modulo di comando. E il tubo rosso è circa - Oh, è proprio all'anello di attracco dov
Хорошо, т
Okay, I'll try it with the telescope; and if I don't see it there, then 
लगता है कोई और ही था - वहाँ बहुत सारे लैनयार्ड इधर-उधर बिखरे पड़े थे
मैंने व
На
2
Oka
من ا
Si je peux débarrasser un peu la nourriture de Bill par ici, et la ranger… Ici se trouve la baie d'équipement inférieure, et nous avons notre équipement de positionnement optique juste ici. Nous effectuons toute notre navigation ici en visant les étoiles et l'horizon de la Lune ou de la Terre. C'est ici que nous déterminons précisément notre position dans l'espace, notre direction et notre vitesse. Et notre ordinateur, comme Frank l'a mentionné, reçoit ces informations et nous indique comment manœu
잭, 이제 확실히 달에서 멀어지고 있다는 걸 알겠어. 망원경으로 한 번에 다 봤어. 지금 FPA 8 바로 위를 지나가고 
豊穣の海は
了解です。R1に27210、R2に35570、R3に33010を加えます。2つ目の項目は、ご存知の通り、「PROCEED」と「PROCEED」の指示による操縦によるものです。姿勢制御の後は、狭いデッドバンドに戻らないようにするための注意事項です。1.40度のデッドバンドに戻るには、私がお教えした手順、つまり「NOUN 01、ENTER」、3011、「ENTER」、そして「200
Bene. Sotto ogni cosa in quella pagina, aggiu
Ich 
フライトプランが
Bene. Dopo la prima ripressurizzazione, dopo circa 12-15 minuti, vogliamo che tu passi a BYPASS e torni a FLOW dopo aver
ヒューストン、ロジャー。うちはまだ52%くらいで、無駄な電力を消費するスイッチを入れていたため、高い値から下がったかどう
До линии визирования на Бермудских ост
双
버즈, 거
نظام TR
हम आपको हवाई के ऊपर अंतिम ऊंचाई समायोजन के बारे में अपडेट देंगे। स
Stiamo scattando la serie 6 qui. Foto
Roger. Waste compartment valve has been in VENT for - oh, I guess, 4
11, Houst
A questo punto vorrei bere un po' d'acqua, ma preferirei tenere la 
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Проверка св
Roger. Mike, did yo
Майк, на посадочной площадке ужасно много объектов. Это бы только подогрело сердце Джека Шмидта. Автоматическая оптика идеально наводится на цель, и две высокие вершины выделяются великолепно. У меня прекрасный 
了解。REACQで出発して、我々が
好的。在第 1 页，我们需要在“激活”下，步
我
Теперь положение при
D'accord, Jim. Comme le changement d'antenne est un peu agaçant, on les a convaincus de n'acheter que la moitié des données. Si changer d'ant
Okay, Mike. Of course, this is in the event the G&N and the quits and you have to fly the constant g; and what we're trying to do is extend the constant g range from 1100 to 1500 miles. We've run this procedure in the simulator, and it works fine. Basically, I'll go through it - just go through it, and then if you have any questions come back. But it's the same lift vector up until MAX g, and then lift vector down, and then modulate the lift vector until g dot goes to zero. Okay. This procedure is essentially the same so far. And then hold g dot zero until you pass the RETRO e
わかりました。右手にピレネー山脈が見えてきて、ちょうどメシエ山とピカリング山の上空を飛んでいるところです。最初の地点は、私たちの高度から簡単に見えます。境界線に近づくにつれて、かなりコ
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Mi
Это Фрэнк Борман. Нам понравились наши телепередачи, и мы хотели бы, чтобы в
And, Apollo 8, you can do the first part of that now at your convenience to verify that register 1 is reading 10 000, but would you hold up on the dump itself until we get our ground stations configured, please. Over
خزان الأكسجين رقم 1: 270 رطلاً، 270؛ خزان الأكسجين رقم 2: 267 رطلاً، 26
여기는 HF 통신 중인 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 제 상태는 최상입니다. 모든 것이 계획대
127 03 3082, plus 2
ह्यूस्टन, यह देखना बहुत दिलचस्प है कि जब मैं अपना पैर मारता हूँ (यहाँ वायुमंडल नहीं है और गुरुत्वाकर्षण भी नहीं है) तो कण उठते हुए प्रतीत होते हैं, और उनमें से अधिकांश का प्रस्थान कोण और वेग
…, voici Gémeaux 4
好的。你们友好的绿队已经基本被你们友好的栗色队接替了，接下来就由欧文来提
Hou
Возможно, вы уже это запомнили как шаг 35. Там написано: «ВВЕРХ ПО ТЕЛЕМЕТРИИ, ЗАБЛОКИРОВАТЬ, ПРОВЕРИТЬ», а сразу после этого идет шаг, в котором говори
わ
D'accord,
了解、コロンビア。アップリ
Хьюстон, это L
حسناً، لقد سمعتك منذ
好的。开始。127. 2+40. 16 5
إنها تعمل بشكل جيد للغاية. لقد انتهيت - مجموعة واحدة كانت سيريوس، بثلاثة نجوم، ومجموع
Roger. Gemäß Seite 47, Schritt 1, bef
रेट्रोडिले सामान्य है। मैं फिर से क
Und einer der Vorteile, Jack, besonders für einen Neuling wie mich, ist die Bewegungsfreiheit hier. Wie du ja vom Kommandomodul-Simulator weißt, ist die Schwerelosigkeit ein echter Segen. Denn bei 1 g ist die Bewegungsfreiheit ziemlich eingeschränkt, und hier ist es viel einfacher. Wie du siehst, war alles recht sauber. Ich habe ein paar lose Unterlegscheiben gefunden, und eine kleine Plastikkappe der Sequenzkamera hatte sich gelöst und lag neben dem ED-Panel. Okay. Direkt unter Jim steht er 
On dirait que l'enregistrement est toujours en cours et le voyant rouge ne s'allume pas. C'est vraiment inadmissible, cet emplacement pour le v
好的。按回车键，输入 333，再按回车键，然后读取寄存器 1 的值，寄存器 1 的值应该是 10000。如果不是，我可以告诉你如何把它变成 10000。如果
Jerry, en faisant ces photos, on survolait l'Afrique presque tout le temps. Du moins, on la voyait; il faisait beau là-b
O
نعم يا جيري، أستطيع رؤية البقعة المضيئة. أعتقد أنها النقطة تحت الشمسية. تقع قبالة سواحل أمريكا الجنوبية، على ما يبدو. إنها بقعة رمادية اللون مقارنةً بالمياه الزرقاء المحيطة بها. قطرها غير محدد، فهي لي
11, ह्यूस्टन।
La qualité de la voix est mauvaise pour le moment, et les équipes de guida
알겠습니다. 태평양 중부의 전반적인 상황은 양호합니다. 구름 높이는 2000피트(약 610m)에 흩어져 있고, 시야는 10마일(약 16km), 풍향은 070도, 풍속은 12노트, 파고는 4피트(약 1.2m), 고도는 2974피트(약 800m)입니다. 일출은 줄루 시간으로 오전 10시, 첫 빛은 줄루 시간으로 오후 4시 49분입니다. 탐사선은 요크타운(Yorktown)호이며, 항공기는 에어보스(Airboss) 1호와 2호, 그리고 리커버리(Recoveries) 1호, 2호, 3호입니다. 탐사선 도착 예상 시간은 다음과 같습니다. 요크타운호는 목표 지점에 있으며, 에어보스 항공기는 15분 후 도착하여 현장 지휘를 맡을 것입니다.
Ich glaube, die Welt dreht sich wirklich
Are you pl
रॉजर। आपकी वर्तम
حسنًا. قبل أن تُخرج كتاب الخرائط، لدى فنيي الاتصالات في هيوستن كلمةٌ قصيرة
Buzz può tenerlo, e tu devi far funzionare il monitor; hai fatto
क्या? क्या यह
Roger. Vous souhaitez mainte
روجر. من وضعية دوران بزاوية 60 درجة، إلى وضعية دوران بزاوية 058 درجة بالقصور الذاتي. ستكون زاوية الميل + 30 درجة وزاوية الانحراف 270 درجة على الهوائي ع
Хорошо. После проверки напряжения на главной шине, соединяющей питание, я хочу разомкнуть цепь
نحن على وشك الو
Понял. Панель 9 настроена на
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。您可以随时调整姿态和
Okay. 3
알겠습니다
ठीक है -
Roger
अरे, जा
Oui. Je ne sais pas si c'est une vibrat
13번, 휴
D'accor
...выключен
Ok, eccoci qui. Blocco note: Pacifico medio, 000153; 000. Le due righe successive saranno quelle del tramonto della luna e dell'assetto di controllo della luna;, 178; NOUN 61, meno 21,66, meno; 00:28. Le quattro successive sono N/D; DO è 4,00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353,1, 29,9. La stella di puntamento è Sigma Libra, in basso 08,8, a sinistra 0,4; vettore di risalita in alto. Per l'allineamento di ingresso, 
, this is Intrepid. It appears you will land 5 miles ahead of me. O
好的，弗雷德。你现在的声音很清晰。好的。我们正在为你准备一个程序，大约在74小时后，也就是3个多小时后，进行一次太阳检查。这将是第二级定位；我们稍后会
泄漏检查完成，我现在要打开舱口泄压阀
Сейчас прямо перед космическим аппаратом виднеется интересная ручейка, тянущаяся вдоль края небольшой гор
रॉजर।
Rog
Très bien. Je suis prêt à continuer 
ठीक है, जिम। अगर हमें आपकी ज़रूरत पड़ी, तो हम क्रू को सूचित कर देंगे, और हम यह जानना चाहते हैं कि आज रात बायोमेड पर किसकी ड्यूटी है
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Prima di iniziare, vorremmo for
यह विकल्प 1 के रूप में किया जाएगा। कंप्यूटर के अंदर दूसरे 
Gemini 4, Гавайи, CAP COM. Вы разместите свою систему оповещения о 
Roger. Entschuldigung für die Störung, Columbia. Zwei Dinge: Wir bitten Sie, gemäß den Anweisungen auf Foxtrot 9.7 in Ihrer Checkliste eine Totzone von 10 Grad einzustellen. Zweitens möchten wir eine statische Anzeige verwenden, die nicht ständig aktualisiert wird. Nach der Verg
حسنًا. لدينا الخطوة الأولى: البطارية 2، جهد منخفض، إيقاف/إعادة ضبط، ثم تشغيل. ثم لدينا الخطوة الثانية: البطارية 2، 
風船が開きます。風船は飛び出しました。かなり遠くまで飛んでいるように見えますが、今はもうかなり遠くまで飛
버즈, 이 정신 나간 대진표가 바로 여기야. 아
आगे बढ़ो आरकेवी कैप कॉम, जेमिनी
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。了
はい、13番。こ
हाँ, यही है 
Ruhe bewahren, Houston. Wir hätten gerne Ihre Messwerte und haben Ihren EM-Dump nochmals überprüft. Alles scheint in Or
ヒューストン、イーグルがショートカウントで攻撃します。1、2、3、4、5、5、4、3、2、1。イーグル。
Нет, не так уж и плохо. Большая часть лишних вещей хранится у нас под ногами, за пятками, это вещи, которыми мы все равно редко пользуемся, так что особо
Se mangiassi di più,
맞습니다. 배터리 릴
Non sembra che abbiano danneggiato l'ottica, ma hanno sicuramente intaccato alcune finestre. Ci sono alcuni piccoli pezzi di ghiaccio sulla finestra numero 1, quella più vicina alla presa d'aria, e anche un po' sulla finestra
الصورة رقم 1. لحظة الهبوط في الماء
A
Роджер, «Дружба Семь». Температура на линии автоматической прокатки составляет
उस
よし。いい星が撮れた。最初は大気圏の輝きより下で撮影したんだけど、だんだんとほとんど見えなくなってきて、そこから星が顔を出すようになって、それから大気圏の輝きの中に入っていく。星
ठीक है। मैंने कहा कि फ्रेड द्वारा प्रश्नित डेल्टा-वीआर
Аполлон-8, Хь
Amicizia Se
好的。我这里有个哈尼特别报道。《星际时报》最新一期说，登月计划占据了报纸和电视的头条，成了头条新闻。《华盛顿邮报》的头条标题是“月球，他们来了”。据
أورو
嗯，天空中有一些云，
Cap
제 음성
好的，杰克。飞行计划更新包含几个项目，我们首先要更新的是G/9-2页G&C检查清单中的Tephem值。这些
罗杰，休斯顿。阿波罗11号。我们读取到的VI值
看来你不希望我自动删除 5018
本のリングが1つ外れてし
네, 맞습니다, 잭. 절차를 확실히 이해하시도록 다시 한번 말씀드리
توجد صورة التُقطت من الجهة الخلفية اليمنى للمركبة الفضائية، تُظهر حافة مرحلة الهبوط، وتُشير إلى اسمرار ملحوظ في لون السطح، مع وجود قدر ضئيل من الإشعاع أو التآكل أو التآكل السطحي. أثناء 
わかりました。次の1、2、3、4、5、6、7、8も同じです。そして、FUEL 
네, 그렇습니다. 자세: 롤 0도, 요 2도 우측, 피치 -33도. 모든 수치가 0을 나타내고 있습니다. 현재 작동 중입니다. 시계는 여전히 복귀 시간으로 설정되어 있으며, 역행 시간은 04 + 32 + 28입니다. 버뮤다에서 역행 시간 정보는 정확합니다. 객실 압력은 5.7로 안정적으로 유지되고 있습니다. 객실 온도는 90도입니다. 상대 습도는 30%입니다. 냉매량은 68%입니다. 우주복 내부 온도는 65도입니다. 우주복 압력은 5.8을 나타내고 있습니다. 우주복 증기 온도는 60도입니다. 매우 편
好的。第一个动作是机动，一，这将是一个/从重量开始，63295减去163加上129加上0
حسنًا. لنرى إن كنت قد فهمت كل شيء. للالتقاء، أولًا، نريد أن يكون قاطع الدائرة 16 (INVERTER 2) مغلقًا، وكذلك قاطع الدائرة 11 (AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2). ثم على اللوحة 14، تأكد من تحديد INVERTER 2. وقاطعي الدائرة 11 (RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2) مغلقين. بعد ذلك، نسحب مقبض تحرير رادار الالتقاء. على اللوحة 3، نريد تشغيل رادار الالتقاء. اضغط على زر الإدخال (ENTER) مع جميع الرموز البريدية، بالإضافة إلى 28300 في السجلين 1 و2. ثم اضغط على زر المتابعة (GO). بعد ذلك، نراقب الحركة باستخدام 16 72. بعد أن يتوقف، افتح قاطع الدائرة 11 (RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2)، ثم اضغط على زر الإدخال (ENTER). وافتح قاطع الدائرة 16 (INVERTER 2). الآن، عندما يحين وقت محاذاة المصباح، يتم إغلاق قاطع الدائرة 16، العاكس 2، وقاطع الدائرة 11 
Hello, California Com Tech. Friendship Seven. How me?
Okay. Entweder habe ich den Sicherungsautomaten falsch abgeschrieben, oder ich kann ihn nicht le
そしてもう一度、少し姿勢を修正する必要があります。私たちの地球が右
Sie fliegen genau auf der Mittellinie der Luftstraße. Wen
Plus la nuit avance, plus les autres étoiles apparaissent. Je les vois – je crois que je peux distinguer jusqu'à la magnitude 5 environ. Le spectacle n'est pas encore aussi éclatant que par une nuit claire à 6 000 mètres d'altitude, depuis la verrière d'un avion. J'ai forte
In the beginning, the operation with the precluded immediate starting up of our sightings as we had scheduled since we had another evasive maneuver. The dumping of the caused a tremendous amount of - of pseudo stars in the area which made an optics calibration practically impossible. The method which we had worked out did not seem to work too well. The method which I finally used was to go into, go to Sirius, which was our brightest star, get the shaft and trunnion, and then fly the spacecraft up to Sirius to use that
休斯顿，
Ormai non puoi più far
로저, 확인차 연락드렸습니다. 혹시 접지 
Roger. We're having difficulty getting commands into the spacecraft. We'd like you to cycle your UP TELEMETRY switch to COMMAND RESET and OFF and then ba
You'
जी हां, यह ठीक है। इसका मतलब है कि हमने ईंधन का इस्तेमाल न
Okay. At 1 minute, "MASTER ARM," we scratch. At 35 seconds, scratch the first two lines. "Manual Ullage" will start at 9 seconds; we're scratching the blocks at 02 second
Roger. We'll give you a call when your rates ha
알았어, 잭, 쿼드 A의 
Okay, Apollo 8. What we're going to do on the TV is to go ahead and let you crank it up as soon as we get back on the high-gain antenna, and it looks like - my guess is that this will be about, and we'll just use this to - as long as we have the coverage there. I have an update to
That's affirmative. Okay. Panel 5: circuit breaker CENTRAL INSTRUMENTATION POWER,
لنجعلها 80 كيلومتراً، ن
Oui, i
Gee, I
कार्नरवन, मुझे आपकी बात समझ नहीं आ र
收到。分离燃烧 GET，09 加 44 加 00；ΔVT 为 9.0；持续时间，0 加 15；偏航 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 약 2분 30초 후에 안테
Roger. Vorremmo rimandare il controllo t
分かりました。ところで、ヴァンスさん、バッテリーBの充電時間はどれくらいかかる
Ok, Gemini VI. Vu
그리고 지금 우리가 '부트 힐'이라고 부르는 구간을 보
Vous le voy
Non che l'abbiamo visto. Abbiamo ricevuto una segnalazione tramite il ci
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, गुआयमास। मैंने कहा, मुझे स्कोप रिट्रैक्ट का संकेत मिल रहा है। लेकिन आप कह रहे हैं कि आपका 
Roger. Looks like you are getting some 
Роджер. Это подтве
コロンビア、次回の通過では、そのような作業を行うのでは
روجر. بدأت تظهر أداة تثبيت الأرجوحة تح
51-DELTA 55 avant, 73 arrière. 1+
알겠습니다. 그렇게
Это подтверждается. Сначала я быстро пройдусь по времени основных событий, а затем мы вернемся и уточним некоторые детали. Хорошо. Вход в атмосферу запланирован на 142 часа 40 минут; примерно за 6,5 часов до этого мы начнем весь процесс, включив питание нагревателя, проверив температуру в модуле управления и предварительно прогрев его при необходимости. Мы предполагаем, что нам, вероятно, потребуется это сделать. Подробные инструкции будут опубликованы позже. Примерно за 6 часов до этого мы начнем включать питание, используя модифицированный 30-минутный контрольный список, который вы использовали для предыдущего промежуточного этапа. Затем, незадолго до 5 часов до этого, мы попросим вас принять положение для выравнивания по оси тела, используя терминатор Земли, как мы делали раньше; И как только мы это получим, мы выполним маневр -7, который, судя по всему, сейчас будет представлять собой примерно 2 фута в секунду или около 15 секунд работы двигателя. Мне сказали, что сейчас скорость снизилась до 1,5 фута в секунду, так что это вполне в пределах допустимых значений. Хорошо. После этого мы немедленно начнем маневр по сбросу служебного модуля, который будет в плоскости, поскольку мы сбрасываем его раньше, чем обычно. Нам не нужна и нежелательна внеплоскостная составляющая. Таким образом, он будет в плоскости, а служебный модуль будет направлен обратно вдоль радиус-вектора. Затем мы начнем подготовку командного модуля к запуску, включая проверку командного модуля и запуск двигателя, и примерно за 4 часа 30 минут до или мы сбросим служебный модуль. Мы будем держать самолет поднятым, пока не получим доступ к сервисному модулю... и попытаемся сделать несколько фотографий, но мы не будем возиться с маневрами перемещения для получения снимков, потому что не хотим испортить угол траектории полета в это время. Хорошо. Это дает нам примерно 2 часа свободного времени, чтобы закончить, если мы опоздаем, перейти к контрольному списку и подготовиться к включению командного модуля. Мы начнем полное включение командного модуля за 2 часа 30 минут до конца. Мы подключим компьютер, поднимем самолет, начнем передавать ваши векторы состояния и так далее, и выровняем платформу командного модуля. Примерно через 1 час 30 минут, самое позднее, у нас будет час на выполнение этих действий с
ठीक है, जिम। पैंतरेबाज़ी पैड: उद्देश्य मध्यमार्ग-7 है। है। उपलब्ध नहीं है। HA उपलब्ध नह
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 여기는 휴스턴이에요. 파워 앰프 회로 차단기를 내려
알았어, 잭. 내가 읽어주고 나서 몇 가지 의견을 덧붙인 다음, 좀 더 자세히 얘기해 보자. 이건 49시간 후쯤에 진행될 거야. 시간이 허락한다면, 승무원들이 혜성을 사진 촬영에 적합한 회전 각도가 있는지 조사해 줬으면 좋겠어. 만약 있다면, 사진 촬영에 가장 적합한 회전 각도를 기록해 둬. 그리고 49시간쯤에 재진입을 시작할 때쯤, 승무원들이 작업을 마치면 행성 추적 옵션을 사용하고, 베넷 혜성을 추적하기 위한 다음 반 단위 벡터들을 기록해 둬
ठीक है। यही आखिरी चीज़ थी जो मुझसे छूट गई थी। और जब तक हम यहाँ निर्णय लेने का इंतज़ार कर रहे हैं, मैं आगे बताता 
Le système de guidage du lanceur semble fonctionner correctement. Nous estimons à plus de 99 % la probabilité d'une coupure du guidage du lanceur. Tout semble donc se dérouler sans encombre. Pour information, MLA a reçu environ une
...Не совсем подобрано по высоте. Ну, может, я смогу это вытащить.
压力很大
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 궁금해서 여쭤보는 건데, 저희 산소
A couple of items, Jim. The first is, the time for closing the waste stowage vent is. If you turn in before that time, why it's okay as far as we're concerned down here to close it before that time just before you go to bed. The second point, we have some results on the s, and, if Jack's interested, we could give him the corrected altitude
ठीक है। अभी शुरू करते 
रॉजर, सीएसक्यू। बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। यहाँ सब कुछ ठी
エド、こちらはヒュースト
Non riusciremo a superarlo d
Okay. I just wanted you to be aware of this and think about it and what its implications to the flight plan might be, and I'll run this wide angle and comment about the moon back by and see which sections they think would be most appropriate. Okay. On the scroll, Frank wanted us to verify the order that he could
Okay, das klingt gut. Ich nehme an, sie haben die Anw
Хоро
حسناً. صفقة جيدة. انظر إلى ش
D'accord. Personne n'a pris d'autres médicaments; personne n
Okay, Buzz. The first item is that we have indications that your landing site obliques are not in the proper position. If you'll check, we think that the intermediate scale landing site oblique is stowed in the lunar landmark book. We think that the large scale landing site oblique is stowed in the back of the lunar surfa
In questo momento siamo stanchi, ma dovremo aspettare prima di tornare al ciclo normale
وها نحن في المركز الثالث عشر، هيوستن. وكخطوة أخيرة، نرجو منكم تشغيل المراوح في
Хорошо. Теперь на той странице, где описан маневр облета, под вашей группой северных звезд, у меня для вас новые номера, потому что мы заменили эти звезды с Нави и Полярной звезды. Как вы помните, мы заменили их на Сириус и Ригель, так что... И это, кстати, обновление контрольного списка, которое я вам предоставлю позже, — но для этого маневра у меня есть три новых угла, используя
روجر، أستعد لتنظيف خلية وقود الأكسجين. هل لديك أي تفاصيل محددة حول هذا الأمر؟ وأفترض أنك تريد تنظيفها واحدة تلو الأخرى، أم يمكنني تنظيفها ثلاث م
Accid
Roger, je 
طبيعي. درجة حرارة المقصورة — 92. درجة حرارة البدلة — 58. ضغط المقصورة 5.6. تركيز ثاني أكسيد الكربون في البدلة 3/4. أسطوانة الأكسجين ا
حسنًا، إذا قلبت الصفحة على Power 8، ستجد وظائف المركبة الفضائية المتبقية لك. لدينا معدل بت منخفض ™. مع ذلك، ليس لدينا أي VHF. لدينا مضخات جلايكول. ل
彼は彼らを観察しているが、今の
D'accord. Ont-ils 
Okay, Jack, während der TV-Übertragung waren Auto Track, schmale Strahlbreite und die Primärelektronik aktiviert. Die Signalverriegelung funktionierte einwandfrei. Kurz nach Beginn des Manövers konnte ich dich verriegeln und eine sehr gute Signalstärke erreichen. Es schien, als ob genau bei etwa 239 Grad Gierwinkel die Signalstärke abfiel, d
그리고 11번, 휴스턴. 이글, 참고로 말씀드리자면, 3시 19분경 CDU 과열로 인해 ISS
मैंने अभी-अभी टारगेट 16-A पर एक रन बनाया। बसरा का हवाई अड्डा, यह ठीक फारस की खाड़ी के किनारे पर है। मैंने इसे पकड़ लिया - मैंने लगभग 30° के कोण पर फारस की खाड़ी को पकड़ा... मैंने नीचे की ओर उड़ान भरी और फिर झील को पकड़ा... फारस की खाड़ी के उत्तर-पश्चिम में। बसरा झीलों के ठीक किनारे पर, झीलों के बहुत पास होने के कारण, आप सीधे ऊपर से फॉलो कर सकते हैं और तुरंत हवाई अड्डे को पकड़ सकते हैं। इसलिए मैंने टारगेट तक पहुँचने से काफी पहले हवाई अड्डे को पकड़ लिया, और फिर टारगेट को ट्रैक करना शुरू कर दिया। जब मैं ऊर्ध्वाधर से 20° के कोण पर था, तब तक मैं वास्तव में टारगेट पर था - और रनवे से लगभग 40° के बिंदु तक इसे ट्रैक किया, और मैंने ट्रैकिंग बंद कर दी। मेरे पास 16-mm कैमरे पर 75-mm लेंस था, जिसमें आगे के सिरे से तस्वीरें लेने के लिए एडेप्टर लगा हुआ था और मैंने इस
Reading back a GMT of 2-1—15 55 47. GMTRB is 16 05 31. Bank ang
Houston, nous venons de réaliser un PROGRAMME 21, et nous montrons un péricyntien de plus de 74,9 miles sur le vecteur d'
알겠습니다
ر
Apollo 13, Houston. Dans environ 1 minute. Nous souhaiterions une COMMANDE DE RÉINITI
尤里，
Ok. Non perdiamo
カーナボンで
프렌드십
हां, उसने 60 सेकंड तक पुकारा; 
下一个出现在底部的陨石坑就是杜克岛，就在左边，也就是画面中心附近最
11번, 휴스턴. 좋은 생각 같네요.
そしてレトロヒーター、レトロパッケージの温度は約 74 
D'accord. Oui, c'est plutôt cool. Voici le troisième officier de cet équipage. 
Okay, Skipper. We don't see any thermal problems as a result of this change. If we see some communications problems, we may have to do something different, but so far, so good. And we'd kind of like to he
Ро
好的。这是BAT Baker电池的充电步骤。面板3；BAT CHARGE，关闭；面板5；MAIN BUS TIE，BAT A/C至A/C；CB BAT CHARGE，BAT A CHARGE，断开；CB BAT CHARGE，BAT B CHARGE，闭合
罗杰
D'accord, je 
Roger. Ich habe im AUTO-Modus angedockt, und wie gesagt, ich war mir des genauen Kontaktzeitpunkts nicht sicher. Ich habe die Anzeigen der Andocksonde ständig überprüft. Zwei „Barber Poles“-Symbole zeigten an, dass die drei Verriegelungen – nicht die Verriegelungen, sondern die drei Verriegelungen – eingerastet waren und wir sanft angedockt hatten. Zu diesem Zeitpunkt wirkte die Situation sehr stabil. Also schaltete ich auf FREE, warf einen Blick aus dem Fenster, und es sah immer noch stabil aus; dann zündete ich die zweite Primärtriebwerksflasche. In diesem Moment begann eine Drehung zwischen den beiden Fahrzeugen, deren Ursache mir unklar ist. Vielleicht der Schub, oder viell
56-BRAVO 分段燃烧，55 号机前，106 号机后。1+31。2+15。06 57 55。6+42。57-BRAVO 区域分段燃烧，55 号机前，103 
Okay. Quando riprenderai le tue attività, ho un allineamento preferito qui che voglio che tu segua quando le fai, e avrò circa quattro elementi da modific
Roger, éteins l'ordinateur
Okay. Wir haben die Breite des Persischen Golfs übernommen, und ich kann Ihnen aus erster Hand wohl nur einen einzigen Datenpunkt liefern: Hier 
هيوستن، أبولو 11. ما هو موقفنا من عملية تنظيف خلية
Подтверж
جاك، وهو ينظر إلى الخارج، لاحظ أن عدد الجسيمات قد انخفض بشكل كبير، وكاد أن يتوقف الآن، مما يشير إلى أن ما
내가 이해할 수 있고 내 말을 들어주는 사람과 
Got to check the Sanborn I guess, for that one. Coming up on BPMS. Gene, I'm real pleased with the suit temperature now. I've got a real steady 65 (degrees
そうです。先ほど、パネル左側の注
그리고 FDAI 사
Nein, Moment mal. Wir haben 
Et je regarde là, Jack, e
التركيز مُوجّه نحو اللانهاية. يُفضّل تركه على اللانهاية، لا شك في ذلك. أما بالنسبة للتكبير، فقد يُطلب منك تكبير الأفق قليلاً، أو الأرض، أو أي شيء آخ
Je vois les étoiles doubles de la constellation de la Grue alignées, convergeant vers le centre du hublot. Jupiter, bien sûr, brille de mille feux. Je distingue Ankaa et… correction, Al Naiir. Cela devait être le Paon. Al Naiir est légèrement à droite de la trajectoire de vol. Je vole, mais ça doit être elle. Jupit
إل
Хорошо, в это время мы должны провести иссле
Apollo
로저. 저는 그로부터 약 30분 후에야 정렬 작업을 시작했어
In the middle of the haze layer, Phecda will not--I can't even get a reading on i
حسنًا يا جاك. هذه الملاحظات هي: قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية يحد التيار إلى 15 أمبير. الأنبوب، والكابل الواصل بينه وبين الدائرة موصل للتيار. يمكنني مراقبة جهد ن
Roger, Friendship Seven. The first part of your transmi
روجر. أقرأ لكم خمسة أيضًا يا باز، وقد ح
不，我现
At this point I'm in VOX record. I'm going to switch to UHF for relay aircraft in Haw
我宁愿快
À mon avis, ce qu'ils vont faire… Eh bien, je suppose qu'ils vont
До начала торможения осталось около 2 минут. Я на УВЧ-диап
好的，Fred-o。在第12页，我们需要更新。我们有一些矢量信号和一个垫子给你。当你到达那个状态时，我们会通知你何时需要上行链路。好的。在“激活和自检”下，执行整个程序。在第13页，“AGS Aline”下，执行步骤1；在“
Just how
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Come stai 
Роджер. Когда у вас будет свободная минутка, 
わかりました。まだ必要量よりも多
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь
S
さあ、ハワイ、ジェ
Is this Owe
13, Houston. Jack, könnten Sie uns bitte jetzt den Zählerstand mittei
자, 진입합니다. 진입 좌표: 태평양 중부, 000153; 000. 다음 두 줄은 월몰 시각과 달 관측 자세입니다., 178; NOUN 61, -21.66, -; 00:28. 다음 네 줄은 해당 없음입니다. DO는 4.00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14;
और, आपकी जानकारी के
好的。我们有三件事要说。第一件是，你们这批星图——两张星图的成绩都已经评定好了——嘿，恭喜！看起来很棒，他们非常满意。你们的星点误差已经降到了4角分，这是首先要提一下的。第二件是，除非
ねえ、ヴァンス、君はそこで話
11, qui Houston. Abbiamo completato l'impostazione de
로저, 쌍둥이자리 4. 제자리에서 운동을
रॉजर। हम पूरी तरह सहमत हैं। और जब आप इस पर काम शुरू कर रहे हैं, मैं ये नोट्स पढ़ लूँगा। संभावित प्रोग्राम अलार्म 5.6, रेंज 400 नॉटिकल मील से अधिक, कॉल करें और फिर 20 पर बताए अनुसार उपयोग करें। NOUN 06 में विकल्प 1 लें और नो अपडेट मोड का उपयोग करें। रेंडेज़वस रडार क्षितिज से लगभग 25 डिग्री ऊंचाई पर लॉक हो जाएगा। यदि 503 अलार्म आता है, तो इसे विफल घोषित करें। PROCEED कुंजी दबाएँ और रेंडेज़वस रडार को खोज करने दें। और टेप मीटर को स्टॉप तक जाने से रोकने के लिए रेंज एल्टीट्यूड मॉनिटर स्विच को एल्टीट्यूड/एल्टीट्यूड रेट पर रखें। 
分かりました。ところでフランク、今の気持ちはどうですか？さっき見たちょっとした面白
حسنًا. شكرًا لك. هل كنت تقرأ طوال الوقت؟ نحن فقط - هذه هي المرة الأولى التي نس
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We'd like you to terminate the O2 purge if you have not done so already, and the TV camera people say that the lines are inherent in the camera, Buzz;
Sembra che abbia appena sorvolato alcune delle Isole Marshall laggiù. Erano piuttosto limpide e si potevano vedere gli atolli e il paesaggio circostante. Ho provato a fotografarle, ma le ho viste un po' tro
자, 시작해 볼까요? PRI
Eines der Etiketten eines Sicherungsschalters ist herausgerutscht und seitlich verrutscht und hat den benachbarten Sicherungsschalter mit diesem verklebt. Dies geschah bei Not- und Reserve
Ok. Sono pronto ad acce
Yes. Apparently they couldn't get together on t
Использ
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन।
حسنًا. حسنًا؛ سيُنهي المستشار الألماني الغربي ويلي برانت، الذي شهد إطلاقكم من كيب كانافيرال أمس، والرئيس نيكسون جولتهما من المحادثات اليوم. وتشير التقارير إلى أن برانت جاء إلى الولايات المتحدة للحصول على تأكيدات 
Хьюстон, 
Spero che abbiate fatto sì che tutti
Aurora Seven, Cap Co
Okay. Joe, ich verstehe dich in diese
Sì. Lì abb
Roger, Apollo 11. We've got a laser that we're going to - It's a blue-green laser that we're going to flash on and off at a frequency of on for a second, off for a second. It's coming out of McDonald Observato
分かりました。月がどんな感じか見てみたい方は、袋を開けて見て下さい。で
Сейчас здесь, наверху, всё идёт довольно хорошо. Дж
Ja, wir haben gerade auf der K
रॉजर। क्या आप अपने इंडिकेटर लाइट टेस्ट सर्किट ब्रेकर को चेक करके उसे बंद करके देखेंगे कि क्या इससे आपकी माल लाइट बंद हो
J'ai votre mise
ああ、そうだ。今は6.6だ、フ
8번 볼 정렬에 문제가 있거나, 궤도율 
Houston, Tranquility. Avete trovato qualche altra soluzione al problema del timer de
मुझे यह बताना चाहिए कि 3:26:33 बजे, आकाश में मुझे एक साथ 10 कण दिखाई देते हैं। वे निस्संदेह 
جيميني 4، آر كي في كاب 
OK, revérifions… Bon, voyons voir; nous n’avons rien gagné sur les anciens PUGS cette fois-ci
로저. 마이크, 당신은 5륜 구동입니다. OMNI 설정은 다음
시그마 세븐, 여기는 HF 대역의 워터타운 캡 콤입니다. 제 목소리가 들리신다면, 케이프 플라이트 관제소에서 UHF 대역으로 전환하여 중계 항공기와 교신을 시도해 달라고 요청하고 있습니다. 다시 한번 말씀드립니다. 케이프 플라이트 관제소에서는 UHF 대역으로 전환하여 중계 항공기와 교신을 시도해 달라고 요청하
我们想提醒您多喝水。我们认为您的饮水量可能不足。我们已读取了您的剂量计读数。另外，我们只是想了解一下您的整体感觉。数据显示您总共睡眠时间约为15小时——弗兰克或比
هذا ما فهمته من خلال الاستماع إلى مؤتمر غودارد (حلق
फोटो 1 स्टेशन पर है। फोटो 1 इस समय पानी में विमान के उतरने का अवल
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CA
नह
그리고 저희는
ヒュース
Okay. Ich muss herausfinden, ob der Kondensatbehälter, den wir zum Filtern von Wasser auf der Mondoberfläche verwenden wollten, auch absolut luftdi
दरअसल, वो डोरी - अंतरिक्ष यान का आकार - मुझे हमेशा यहीं ऊपर रखता था। मैं यहाँ जाता 
Okay. And once again in the - in the area where I said order was not critical, it's still not critical when you back out. But now I'll go ahead. Okay, panel 4: TELCOMM, GROUP 1, AC1, it will not be AC1, it'll go to OFF. Panel 5: all circuit breakers on that panel which were positioned will now come t
范斯，要想看到太
Okay. Understand. My only question, Joe, is the fact that bot
تُشير قراءة درجة حرارة الوقود إلى 64 درجة مئوية أثناء الهبوط، بينما تُشير قراءة درجة حرارة المؤكسد - في الهبوط الثاني - إلى انخفاض 
了解。緯度は00.691、つまりプラス00.691です。経度を2で割るとプラス11.713です。高度は
Roger. Nous avons vérifié vos consommables et tout est en ordre. Avec votre accord, nous souhaitons prolonger la durée initiale de 15 
알겠습니다. 연소의 높이 조정 GET을 위해 복사했습니다. 03 + 03 + 19; 델타-V, 0.8, 지속 시간, 0 + 01; 요 00, 피치 00; 코어 25, 00008; 26 및 27, 모두 
हमें लगभग 65° (वेट 
ターゲット16-Aに向けて滑走しました。バスラの飛行場はペルシャ湾に面しています。ペルシャ湾を約30度の角度で捉え、機首を下げて湖を捉えました。ペルシャ湾の北西です。バスラは湖のすぐそば、湖のすぐ近くにあるので、そのまま滑走路を辿って飛行場をすぐに捉えることができます。つまり、ターゲットに着く前に飛行場をかなり離れた
ठीक है। फिर आपके दूसरे टीवी पास के अंत में, या यहाँ से अनु
双子座4号，这里是休斯
현재 제 방호복 내부 온도가 75도까지 내려갔습니다
好的，吉姆。我得到了指令舱 356.6
حسنًا، 6 - حسنًا، حوالي 5 ثوانٍ للوصول إل
Roger. Gemini 4 here. This is the Command Pilot. I just finished about a 5 and a half hour nap of which the last 3 hours of sleep were quite good. The first 2 and a half we
Questa è l'Amiciz
Вы ведь не против, если я внесу изменения в скаф
Du wirst besser
Okay. I've got some details on the flight plan for you as follows. Of course, since there's no -3 you'll be deleting all the midcourse 3 stuff including the - the, which is called out at about 54-1/2, and we'll be slipping that until later, which I'll - which I'll tell - which I'll tell - which I'll tell you in a minute. Okay. Then you - we want to move the battery charge up 3 hours to about. And we want to move the - 
Asp
Pourquoi ne pas le
Have you
로저
ठीक है। आगे बढ़ने से पहले आप मुझे बता दीजिए। हम
Ok. 24 piedi/sec in avanti, sono 40 secondi, 120 piedi/sec
그리고 아쿠아리우스님, 그 방향으로 생각해 보시도록 말씀드리자면, 저희
可惜的是，这些数据一直没录入到这里。如果你看一下弗雷德·海斯的那张图
Вы делали фотографии
Ok, configurazione pannello 11, riga superiore: AC BUS B, voglio l'AN
프로그램 52를 실행하는 동안 프로그램 알람 
Houston, konnten Sie die Dokumentation darüber aufzeichnen, wie die beiden 
I've got a comment about the point on the Earth where the Su
Ok, Acquario. Stiamo lavorando
वह काला धब्बा कह
На то, чтобы оно поднялось, потребовалось 49 с половиной секунд. Посмотрим, смогу ли я это повторить. Сделаем ещё одно и
我们正
罗杰。佩里辛托斯星加 2，最小值 / 62871，NA，NA，减 00468，加 00254，加 00181 173 101 027，NA，加 00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044，向下 044，向左 45，加 1100，减 02500 12967 36198，主天狼星，副参宿七，1.29 155
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. كيف تقرأني ال
केन, ट्
Ricevuto. 47,2 per 9
私は信じて
로저, 마이크. 수동 자세 스위치에서 가속 명령(ACCEL COM
他们要求您今晚睡觉前将开关保持在“自动”位置。稍等。我是说保持在“开启”位置。我再说一遍。今晚睡觉前请将
それをやったことがある。やったよ
알겠
アフリカ南端に明るい場所が見えてきました。確かに都市が見えています。こちらはシグマ・セブンです。送信中ですが、VOXの記録のみです。アフリカに都市が確かに見えています。数秒後に初めて見えました。光は非常に鮮明です。この時点では、自分の位置を示すために逆姿勢になっています。ヨーの基準として、月が飛行経路上にあり
Ricevuto. Segnala tutto ciò ch
彼らがやろうとしているのは...アクエリアスをパワーア
В обмен на это хирург хотел бы получить приблизительное количество часов, которые каждый из вас провел во сне, и
Okay, DECA POWER wird später im Ablauf 
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। रोल 19 डिग्री दाएँ, यॉ 2 डिग्री बाएँ, पिच --22
هذه صورة لـ"فريندشيب سفن". لا، لا أستطيع؛ هناك غطاء سحابي كثيف في هذه المنطقة. كانت أضواء ب
Yes, t
Bene, oggi dovremo farlo al chiuso perché non ci sono buone foto della luna o della
C'est exact. Je préfère ne pas 
Okay. I'll just try to keep our shad
Un'altra domanda, Houston. Quando dici "spegnere il" o 
On our ground computers we confirm the shaft and trunnion angle that you have as being pointed at the star. However, it looks as thou
Ok
Okay.
Dal
Richiedi il 2
Il tramonto è piuttosto suggestivo, non credo di dover perdere molto tempo a guardarli. Sono molto interessanti. L'altra cosa affascinante è quanto sia buio quando gli occhi non sono abituati. Vedo sicuramente un po' di patina sul finestrino. Torno a VOX a questo punto in UHF-hi per trasmettere. Apro la visiera per pulire il microfono destro. L'ho leccato. Chiudo la visiera. La visiera è stata sigillata immediatamente per consentire al circuito della tuta di funzionare al mio posto. Non voglio rovinarmi di nuovo. L'ingresso della tuta si mantiene molto bene a circa 20 gradi. Quindi la cupola tornerà di nuovo su. Ora è a 23, 24 gradi. A quanto pare questa impostazione più alta è quella che vogliamo. Credo che aggiungerò un altro mezzo segno e potremmo averla agganciata. Finalmente si sta raffreddando un po', quindi so dove voglio arrivare con l'impostazione. Ho impostato la quantità di refrigerante per la tuta e la leva di comando a 8,5. La lettura d
双子座八号，我有一
Готов
Роджер, Эл. Я в автоматическом режиме; ретроград; переключатели гиромотора работают нормально; маневр отключен. Капсула подготовлена ​​для ретроградного движения, но для укладки двух карт. Я уверен, что мы готовы. У меня 81 процент автоматического режима (топливо), 80 процентов ручного (топливо), что совпадает с моим промежуточным отчетом. Они не изменились. У меня 52 (psi, в сотнях) на основном кислороде, 75 (psi, в 
네, 감사합니다. 그리고 8750에 대한 질문에 답변드리자면, 그 숫자는 최소
알겠습니다. 짐, 잘 들었습니다. 그리고 잭이 지금 바로 메모를 읽어줄 테니, 바로 시작하시는 게 좋겠습니다. 메모 때문에 지연될 일은 전혀 없을 
Nur zu,
Rev 4 
Ok, Jim. Ti mostriamo che la valvola di sicurezza del circuito SUIT è di nuovo in posizione AUTO e vorremmo toglierla per una buona pulizia
彼は自分の向きを維持するのに苦労していました。そして、それ以降、宇宙船がどの方向を向いているかに関係なく、宇宙船から離れて向きを変えているように見えました。彼は実際には宇宙船に非常に高い回転速度、毎秒2度もの速度を与えることができました。私はその速度以下に抑えるつもりでした。彼が宇宙船に戻ったとき、ハッチの開閉にかなり苦労しました。まず、ハッチのラチェット部分を持ち上げてかみ合わせました。かみ合わせた後、ハッチを十分閉めることができませんでした。実際には、ドッグを外に出すためにロックハンドルを引き下げ始めまし
Der Anblick durch diesen Sextanten ist wirklich fantastisch. Vor einer Minute, während des automatischen Manövers, strich das Fadenkreuz über das Mittelmeer. Man konnte gan
Et Houston, Apollo 11. Nous avons br
حسنًا. ما يفعله هذا الجهاز إذًا هو أنه يوفر لك فحصًا لسلامة ضغط النفق أو سلامة ضغط الفتحة، مع فرق ضغط
はい、上昇中 - タンク圧力 - 温度が上昇、変更されました - わかりません
Gli elementi di cui abbiamo ancora bisogno saranno letti il ​​più tardi possibile, prima dello stivaggio finale. E non ab
okay. I'm in Bravo Dog switch configuration, and go ahead with the music. Be advised last time the fideli
Okay, Jack. Now - now remove the inner bag from the outer bag, and cut the in
Okay. Unter „VHF/S-Band-Aktivierung und -Prüfung“ streichen Sie Schritt 1. Führen S
Es is
Columbia, Houston. Ricevuto. Ricev
जी श्र
Roger. Das Abflussventil ist seit – ich schätze, etwa
哦，好的。好的。那我
Wir haben heute drei Tassen Kaf
Roger. 01 0688 259, Pe
收到。天气状况恶劣，能见度10英里，海浪3英尺。我们目前还没有追踪到
알겠습니다. 말씀하신 내용을 잘 읽었습니다. 초기 
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。您可以随时脱离对接，更正一下
Forte e chiaro. Vuoi spegnere la ventola della cabina, lo 
Non so in che
حاولنا الحصول عل
ロジャー、私
هذا ضغط أعلى قليلاً في الحجرة مما كانوا 
Ja, das können wir. Wir bewegen es ein Stückchen weiter in Richtung Terminator – Korrektur, ein kleines Stück weg
Roger. From the hot wires of the Public Affairs Office: Apollo 11 still dominates the news around the world. Only four nations, Communist China, North Korea, North Viet Nam, and Albania, have not yet informed their citizens of your flight and landing on the Moon. One newsman said that he has run out of ways to describe your success. Tonight, President Nixon is scheduled to watch the All Star baseball game in Washington. After the game, he will depart for the Pacific recovery area. Wednesday evening, he will fly from Johnston Island by helicopter to the Navy communications ship Arlington. Then on Thursday morning, he will reboard the helicopter and fly to the Hornet in time to witness your splashdown. Accompanying the President will be Secretary of State William Rogers and Frank Borman. They will watch the splashdown from the bridge of the recovery ship with Admiral John Sidney McCain, Jr, Commander of the Pacific Forces. Following the President's stay aboard the Hornet, he will depart for his tour of Asia and scheduled visit to Romania. Luna 15 is believed to have crashed into the Sea of Crises yesterday after orbiting the Moon 52 times. The Soviet News Agency TASS reported that "scientific" "research in near Moon space was carried out." Sir Bernard Lovell at Jodrell Bank Observatory said that Luna 15 hit the surface of the Moon at a speed of about 300 miles per hour. Things have been relatively quiet recently in Viet Nam. GI's on patrol were observed carrying transistor radios tuned into your flight. The Armed Forces radio and TV network in Viet Nam gave the mission full coverage. Skirmishes still continue between the Egyptians and Israelis along the Suez Canal. U.N. observers there are trying to halt the action. In Washington, the House Ways and Means Committee has voted to reduce the 27.5 percent oil depletion allowance to 20 percent. We've had rain several times here in the Houston area. Today it is cloudy, and more showers are expected. On the sports front, as we mentioned earlier, the All Star game is tonight. There were no games played yesterday. Last night in New York, the Baseball Writers Association of America named Babe Ruth the greatest ball player of all time. Joe DiMaggio was named the greatest living ball player. Frank Borman made the announcements at a dinner honoring the players. Joe Namath put in a full day at the New York Jets' training camp. Five policemen had a hard time restraining about 500 kid
알겠습니다. 중간 활주로에 관해서는, 기존 방식대로 진행하는 것에 대체로 동의하시는 것 같습니다. 창문에 대해서는, 중앙 창문은 사실상 사용할 수 없습니다. 양쪽 측면 창문은 관측용으로는 괜찮을 수도 있고, 집결지 창문은 너무 작습니다. 그래서 창문 문제는 상황에 맞춰 유연하게 대처해야 할 것 같습니다. 어떤 기능을 활용할 수 있을지 아직
Oops! La checklist no
Vous dites vous être réveill
わかった。よか
Хо
We copy, Buzz
Roger. Und auf der Seite „Aktivierung“
ठीक है, जैक। मैं जिम बोल रहा हूँ। मैं ब
حسنًا. هذا هو النظام الذي ي
ठीक है, एड, क्
अ
जी हाँ, महोदय; आपके चार्ट बुक में मेरे पास कुछ चार्ट हैं, और मुझे उनमें कुछ संख्याएँ भरनी हैं, जिनमें से
谢谢你，布
11番、ヒューストン。お願いがあります。サービスモジュールの二次推進剤燃料加圧バルブについてですが、予防措置として、4つのスイッチを一時的に「閉」の位置に切り替えてから放してください。ご存じの通り、これらのバルブの位置についてはTMやトークバックがないため、分離の衝撃でスイッチの
Houston, qui Gemini VI
I don
了解。星25と42、角度差5球、プ
Okay. I volt, Joe, s
E, 
Vous en avez déjà beaucoup. Bi
저는 기동 태세이며, 필요하다면 용접할 준비가 되어 있습니다. TIG 용접까지 약 45분이 남았는데, 실제로 용접을 시작할 시간은
Roger, Friendship Seven. Be advised, I got your c
D'accord, Fred. Ensuite, je te demande de prendre du ruban adhésif gris et de recouvrir la moitié de la surface de sortie de chacune des buses bleues: celle du commandant et celle du LMP. On fait ça parce qu'on va faire passer ce circuit par l'orifice du second réservoir de LiOH, ce dernier étant retiré. On n'aura
Хорошо. Но когда оно проле
अब मुझे पेरिस्कोप में सूर्योदय दिखने लगा है। इस विशेष कक्षा के दौरान पेरिस्कोप में पहली रोशनी रात के समय दिखाई दे रही है। यह स्पष्ट है कि रात के समय रेट्रोएटीट्यूड में पेरिस्कोप का कोई कार्य नहीं है। मुझे जो पहली रोशनी मिल रही है, वह लगभग अभी है। सूर्योदय पेरिस्कोप से काफी तेजी से आ रहा है। मुझे वे प्रकाशमान वस्तुएं दिखाई दे रही हैं जिनका जॉन ने उल्लेख किया था, और मैं उन्हें गिराकर कुछ और बना सकता हूँ। मुझे निश्चित रूप से ऐसा महसूस हो रहा है कि वे एक क्षेत्र में हैं और उनका आकार छोटे से लेकर चमकीले तक भिन्न-भिन्न है। पेरिस्कोप ही मेरी आंखों को चकाचौंध कर रहा है। मुझे इस पर चार्ट लगाना होगा, ताकि मैं खिड़की से बाहर देख सकूँ। मैं किसी भी समय रेट्रोएटीट्यूड के लिए तैयार हूँ, इसलिए मेरे पास इस खिड़की से बाहर देखने के अलावा और कोई काम नहीं है। मान लीजिए कि सूट सर्किट संतोषजनक है। वह चार्ट उस खराब पेरिस्कोप को ढकने में बहुत मदद करता है। इन वस्तुओं का काफी बड़ा क्षेत्र है। यह निश्चित रूप से पुष्टि हो गई है कि आप उन्हें हैच से गिरा सकते हैं, जैसा कि स्कॉटी ने कहा था। और वे तेज़ी से आगे बढ़ रहे हैं, यह स्पष्ट है कि वे कैप्सूल से अलग गति से दूर जा रहे हैं। उनकी गति कैप्सूल से निश्चित रूप से धीमी है। एक बार खटखटाने पर ही आप उन्हें पीछे की ओर खिसकते हुए देख सकते हैं। वे इतने छोटे हैं कि उनकी तस्वीर लेना सं
I'm looking out at the stars now. it's not as - it's light, not fully dark. It appears that the window gives you a filter that cuts down 
짐, 비행 계획 초반에 스러스터 사용 비율, 즉 후방 추진기와 전방 
Игл, это Хьюстон. Мы видим, что переключатель пристрелки оптики включен. Прежде чем делать какие-либо отметки, не забудьте выключить и снова включить его. Конец св
«Канарейка», «Дружба Семь». Принято. Проверка управления завершена. Капсула вставлена ​​и удерживается. Я вижу бустер в окне. Он примерно в м
Houston, diffusez-vous le - Houston, Apollo 8 - diffusez-v
D'accord. Lorsque vous les utilisez, la position 1 de fonctionnement est préfér
Roger, tutto ok. Ho capito come
罗杰，巴兹。我想我明白了。你提到两个样本之间差别很小，而且每次都顺利地打入大约2英寸，然后就必须用力敲打才能继续打入到8到9英寸的深
ينبغي أن يكون
よし、ジャック。操縦パッド、自由帰還のための中間コースが確保できた。:; マイナス0021.3、プ
Apollo 8, H
Roger. Le plan de vol prévoit
Houston, Apollo 11. Riteniamo che queste letture siano entro i limit
Gemini 4, pour cette insertion des IVI, vous dev
Okay, Jack. Wir übernehmen die Winkel. Du kannst sie jetzt festzi
حسن
Okay, Fred. Der nächste Schritt ist ganz einfach: Stellen Sie den Schalter für die Treibstofftemperaturanzeige auf Sinkflug 1, lesen Sie die Treibstoff- und Sauerstofftemperaturen
네. 목소리는 또렷하게
로드 로즈는 시청실에
GMT 기준으로 28일이 다가오는데, 사실 이미 지
Посмотрим
다른 정보도 좀 있습니다. 궤적에 대한 정확한 정보는 약 2시간 후에나 얻을 수 있을 것 같습니다. 연소는 매우 양호해 보였지만, 현재 면밀히 관찰 중이며 2시간 후에 다시 연락드리겠습니다. 또 하나 예상되는 것은 초홀로오스 탱크가 파열 한계에 도달할 것이라는 점입니
D'accord. Ce n'est pas encore tout à fait ça. Déplacez-vous légèrement vers la
That is negative. I have then both set on seven at this time and--an incr
ठीक है। छठा चरण था "घूर्णन को 0.3 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड तक बढ़ाएँ"; यानी लगभग 21 स्पंद
قراءة التوقيت العالمي المنسق (GMT) هي 2-1—15 55 47. ا
Хорошо. Для управления двигателем перейдите в GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, ATTITUDE CONTROL. Переключатели будут ROLL PULSE, PITCH PULSE, YAW MODE CONTROL. Мы будем использовать управление тангажем и креном. ENGINE GIMBAL будет ВЫКЛ.; мы будем использовать 10-процентную тягу; мы будем запускать и 
वे बड़ी चतुराई से ऐसा करते हैं - दुनिया के बिल्कुल विपरीत छोरों पर, ताकि आपको हम
Вы, жители Австралии, нас
로저. 대규모 폭발 작업 약 12분 전에 작은 연속 통풍구
روجر، هل يمكنك ترك مفتاح T/M في وضع REAL-TIME ACQ-AID حتى اكتمال عملية الالتقاء من
Ach komm schon, das meinst du do
Выключите автоматический выключатель системы 
ठीक है। ओरिएंटेशन टेस्ट पर - मैंने मैनुअल लीवर को छुआ; मैंने घड़ी को छुआ, घड़ी के ऊपर लगभग 10:30 बजे की दिशा में, घड़ी के डायल और यॉ इंडिकेटर के ठीक बीच में
Demain, Charlie, nous allons réorganiser notre rangement au plus près de la configuration nominale. Voici quelques éléments qui ne seront pas conformes: les visières ont été remises dans le mo
Es sieht ganz so aus, als würden wir uns die interessantesten Landeplätze auf dem Mond aussuchen. Die Rückseite sieht aus wie ein Sandkasten, in dem meine Kinder schon ewig spielen. Total zerfurcht, keine Konturen. Nur noch Unebenheiten und Löc
11日、ヒューストン。気温を確認したところ、宇宙船は過去24時間で2～3度
好的。我阅读检查清单后有些疑问。我的理解是，主热水器和辅助热水器在实际操作时都应该开启，但我在检查清单中没有找到开启热水器的具体步骤。所以我们想确认一下，并确保所有开关都已正确设置并添
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니
음, 제어 시스템은 정상적으로 작동하고 있습
잠시 기다려 주
好的
D'accord. Nous avons bien
سأقوم بالتتبع على... هل تر
다시 말씀
Apol
Okay. Kurz vor 2 Stunden und 15 Minuten, ich nehme an, das ist bevor sie ihr Update geben, mache ich a. R
ハワイ・キャプション・コム、
And you say clouds from about a third of the
Gemini VI, Houston. Ich verstehe, dass S
13
That's af
روجر. لقد قمتُ بضبط الإعداد
حسنًا. لقد التقطنا للتو بعض الصور في اللحظات الأخيرة. انتهينا من فحص ال
Houston, Columbia. Lo ripeto: 
Il vaut mieux le garder asse
알겠습니다. 현재 진공 상태에서의 근지점은 23.6이고, 비행 경로 각도는 -6.25입니다. 만약 고도를 조정하기로 결정한다면, 중간 항로 속도는 초당 약 2피트가 될 것입니다. 소모품은 계속해서 늘어나고 있습니다. 물은 163시간, 산소는 230시간, 전력은 172시간 동안 사용할 수 있습니다. 
R
मैं संरेखण
少し暖
العلامة السادسة، هذا يعني - هل طلب منك لوفيل أن تفعل هذا؟ هيا يا
Roger, Gemini VI. Ho capito che il test di agganciamento radar e rendezvous sta procedendo bene. La durata è di 53 secondi
Molto b
ठीक है, पृष्ठ 18 पर
रॉजर। मैं आप
هل وجدت صخرة أرج
आगे
Lettura GMT 2-1—15 55 47. GMTRB 16 05 31. Angolo di inc
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。はっきりと聞こえ
Indian Cap Com, ich emp
जेमिनी 4
了解
Ora vedo l'ampia fascia blu dell
收到。
Es gibt einen Stern, der dort erscheint. Um welchen Stern es sich handelt, wird es eine Weile dauern, ihn zu identifizieren. Lesen Sie den Computer ab, stellen Sie ihn ein, und die Uhrzeit 
Джим, мы хотели бы, чтобы ты подумал об этом режиме управления и оценил, насколько он может сработать, исходя из того, что ты знаешь сейчас. Мы немного скептически настроены, но хотим тебе это предложить. Итак, как только ты займешь достаточно хорошую позицию, следи за настройками, перейди в режим «МИНИМАЛЬНЫЙ ИМПУЛЬС»,
11, यह एक है, विकल्प 1
Ok, come sai, la modalità di controllo è impostata per la deriva. La modalità sel
Et sous la rangé
連絡が
Apollo 13, Houston. I have the pl
Хорошо. Отлично. Передайте им,
알파/PC에서 PC로; 발사체 표시기에서 GPI로; 짐벌 드라이브 피치 및 요우를 자동으로; 이벤트 타이머 재설정, 위로; 이벤트 타이머 시작에서 정지로; 이벤트 타이머 분, 초를 중앙으로; 착륙 후 환기 밸브, 누르기; 프로브 확장/해제 끄기로; 확장/해제 음성 응답, 두 개, 회색; 도킹 프로브 수축, 주 및 보조, 끄기; 주행등/EVA등 확장, 끄기; 주행등 - 랑데부등 확장, 끄기 - 터널등, 끄기; 전원등, 끄기; 헬륨 서비스 모듈, 네 개, 중앙; 헬륨 1 음성 응답, 네 개, 회색; 텔레메트리 명령 모듈 위로 및 차단으로; 명령 모듈
罗杰。关于服务舱喷射器，我觉得你应该知道一个细节：我们会建议你采用推拉
... pad; I'm going to have to
Aurora Seven, wie fühlen Sie sich? Ihre Körpertemperatur ist etwas e
是的
よし、よく読み返したな、フレッ
अरे वाह, तुम तो बहुत जल्दी वापस आ 
Alors, B
——污水
11, this is Hor
بعد كل هذه الساعات التي كنا نتحد
Roger. Will you check your up-telemetry switch to 
Col
روجر، لا أملك في هذا الوقت سوى حمولتك وا
Роджер. Ты спешь примерно на 3 секунды. Я вижу, что твой TORF (время ретрофорации) раве
어느 쪽인지 모르겠네요
双子座4号，夏威夷 CAP CO
Apollo 8, this is Houston with an 2 maneu
Gemini 4, Gemini 
إيجل، هيوستن. كل شيء يبدو 
네. 지금은 "G&N 종료"라고 되어 있고, 그 아래에 펜으로 쓴 "자동 선택
好的。这是可选的。我们之前写第-1A页的方式，那都是步骤6的一部分。你还没到步骤7呢。
我觉得可以。告诉他们走之
Okay. Als Erstes wollen wir die Batterie laden, damit wir dort Strom haben. Die entsprechenden Prozeduren sind bereits vorbereitet. Was den Wiedereintritt angeht, planen wir unseren letzten Kursanstieg 5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt in die Atmosphäre – falls wir überhaupt einen durchführen müssen. Das Servicemodul möchten wir dann etwa 4,5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt abtrennen und die nächsten 3 bis 3,5 Stunden für Fotos, die Inbetriebnahme des Kommandomoduls (G&N), die Verstauung der Ausrüstung und sonstige Kleinigkeiten nutzen. Das Servicemodul würden wir bis 1 Stunde vor dem Eintritt behalten und dann abtrennen. Diese Prozeduren werden morgen früh in CMS und LMS integriert ausgeführt, und hoffentlich können wir sie später am Tag mit der Missionskontrolle wiederholen. Eine Frage ist, was wir mit dem Servicemodul machen. Man geht davon aus, dass im Kommandomodul ausreichend Sauers
روج
جيميني
Vous voulez vous retrouver face à cette fenêtre – celle qui est en face de sa fenêtre de droite – don
尽量爬到足够高的地方，能看到星星……地平线
11、ヒューストン。これが単なる誤差なのか、それとも月周回軌道から外れたことによる影響なのか、もう少し考えてみる必要がありそうです。確かなことは分かりません。より良い答えを出すには、もう少し謎
13, Houston. Before you secure the TV, we'd like to know whether
はっきりと
R
نعم، كنا ننظر 
Ricevuto. PAD di ingresso: l'area è il Pacifico centrale, rollio 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, latitudine più 1332, meno 16917, 064, 36194, 649, distanza da percorrere 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 00 28, DL max 154, 084, 22400, 18000, D0 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02, stella sestante 45 0189, 277, stella di puntamento, nessuna disponibile, vettore di risalita in alto. Commenti: allineamento, Vega e D
不久前我打开了面罩，吃了木糖片。我船上其他的食物要么碎了，要么融化了。现在都不能吃了，所以我想这颗木糖片将是我在零重力状态下的最后一餐。不过，第一颗木糖片，在食物碎之前，吃起来很轻松。在失重状态下吃这种一口大小的食物完全没问题
听起来是
All right. I was just thinking. I'm trying to get as much weight as possible down there in that . We have no s and then our waste tank is - you 
Je décris la bande bleue. Il y a une bande bleu foncé à la surface de la Terre, une bande bleu clair, une autre bande bleu foncé, une large bande blanche (la luminescence atmosphérique), puis une bande noire profonde, qui passe progressivement d'un bleu grisâtre à un noir intense. La transition entre la bande bleue et l'obscurité totale est presque comme sous un nuage de pluie. Je vais utiliser mes lampes frontales. Mercure est juste à l'horizon. Arcturus devrait être visible
Ниже зачеркните «Продолжить визуальные наблюдения» и «Прекратить наблюдения». А еще ниже зачеркните «Фотомишень 56 на 8, 250, бесконечность, 5» и так далее до ко
ठीक है।
أبولو
هيوستن، أبولو 8. مناورات 1: / 63295 ناقص 163 زائد 129 زائد 00136 ناقص 00045 زائد 00202 345 188 343 جميعها 9 زائد 01685 000248 002 00186 23 2013 164 012، لأعلى 27-6، يسار 04 نوفمبر ألفا للباقي. نجوم المجموعة الشمالية، لفة 068، ميل 097، انحراف 356، لا ي
Non, attendez une minut
D'accord. Vous nous avez indiqué que la pression entre 660 et 770 psi est acceptable. Si elle dépasse 770 psi, vous allez nous demander d'envisag
짐, 또 한 가지 말씀드리자면, 요(yaw)를 제어하면서 원하는 자세로 조종하는 도중에 요가 원하는 위치에 정확히 맞춰지지 않았다는 것을 알게 되면, ACA를
Roger. All systems look green. Flight would like you to think about where you plan on storing the e
نعم يا جيم. ستحتاج إلى تدوير المركبة 90 درجة لتوجيه محورها السيني الموجب نحو الشمس، ووضع الهلال - أي نقاط الهلال - على المحور الصادي. ستتولى نقاط 
Роджер, Джим. Мы рассматривали эти звезды, которые мы вам сейчас показали. Похоже, у второй звезды, номер 11, уг
了解。リモコンを交換したばかりだ。エドは
Roger. 033 0000, links 17, plus 0883, minus 16500 12955 36185; Sirius, Rigel 129, 155 010, Gasfüllung zwei Düsen, 20 Sekunden, Vierergruppen Bravo und Delta. Horizont auf der 2
और ऐसा लगता है जैसे - मुझे लगता है कि इसे त्रि-आयामी प्रभाव पृथ्वी की रोशनी से मिल रहा है। मैं टाइको को काफी स्पष
Ti sento bene, mi sento bene, la macchina funz
Okay. Potresti ripeter
Roger. T
Если, конечно, ты не предпочитаешь спать наверху, Базз; мне нравится...
Reçu
Apollo 8, H
ビル、もし窓から離れられるなら、二次蒸発器をオフにしてくだ
ठीक है, ज
네. 여기 카메라가 세 대 있는데, 두 대는 사진 촬영용이고, 한 대는 5번 창문에서 사용할 겁니다. 먼저 카메라부터 설명드리겠습니다. 지금 말씀드릴 이 카메라가 가장 우선적으로 사용될 겁니다. 최고의 결과물을 얻을 수 있도록 설계된 카메라죠. 바로 70mm DC 레조 카메라, 하셀블라드 제품입니다. 80mm 렌즈가 장착되어 있고, A-13 박스에 들어있습니다.
Gonflez le brassard – demandez au pilote de gonfler son tensiomèt
Стабильность кап
Roger. Die Spanne um 20 Uhr – bei unserem GET von 21:50:00 plus 22,24. Die Spanne um 22:00:00 plus 00 betrug 17,63. Die Spanne um 22:12:00 betrug 18,33. Die Spanne um 22:20:00 betrug 19,55. Die Spanne um 22:30 betrug 2
回到这里。P 窗前。P 仪表盘前。P 下到地板上。C 如果有什么实验需要我
Ok, Jack. Vediamo se ci sono riuscito. Quello che facciamo è puntare la sonda verso la 
ठीक है। बढ़िया सोच। हमने इस बात पर काफी विचार किया है कि आपको सर्विस मॉड्यूल की तस्वीरें लेने के लिए किस तरह की सुविधा दी जाए। हम इसे कम प्राथमिकता देते हैं; हमारा मानना ​​है कि सर्विस मॉड्यूल की तस्वीरें लेना अच्छा रहेगा, लेकिन हमारे समस्या निवारण कार्यक्रम के लिए इनकी आवश्यकता नहीं है। जहां तक ​​एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल अथॉरिटी वगैरह की बात है, हम आपको इसके बारे में बाद में और विस्तार से जानकारी देंगे; हम इस पर काम कर रहे हैं। ऐसा लगता है कि आफ्टर सर्विस मॉड्यूल JETT के बजाय ACA का उपयोग करने से
उस पैड पर 100 डिग्री के क्षिति
مرحباً يا جيم. ديك أندروود هنا. إنهم يُجهّزون عملية تحميض فيلمك عندما تعود، وهل يمكنك أن تُعطينا فكرة مبدئية عن مقدار التعريض 
Questo è affermativo. Qual è il tuo proble
アポロ11号、アポロ11号、こちらはヒューストン。ブラインド放送中。もし聞こえるなら、OMNIアンテナで捕捉を試みてください。OM
Roger. Et nous voulons que vous m
哦，听着，戴夫，我
Я говорю, что очень рад, что мы 
D'accord. La durée des manœuvres sera probablement inférieure à une minute. Nous voulons que 
Ok, e se giri pagina su Power 8, abbiamo le funzioni rimanenti
Я не нашёл его с наступлением темноты. Он... он... он довольно сильно блуждает, Дик. Он не полностью надут и не натягивается на тросе так туго, как я ожидал. Он подпрыгивает и выпрыгивает, колеблется вверх и вниз, и в стороны. Пока 
Roger. Ja. Ich habe das Fieberthermometer im Mund. Soll ich es für ein paar Minuten geschlossen halten, damit Sie die Temperatur messen k
«Дружба Семь», Гуаймас. Вам нужны ваши резервные часы прямо сейчас? 
ठीक है। अब मेरे पास आपको बताने के लिए काफी जानकारी है। हम चाहते हैं कि जो पायलट सो रहा है, वह अपना फेसप्लेट खुला रखे और दस्ताने न पहने। और जो पायलट जाग रहा है, वह अपना हेलमेट और दस्ताने उतार दे और यदि संभव हो तो संचार के लिए हल्के हेडसेट का उपयोग करे। हम चा
Das ist richtig, Jim. Nach der Übergabe wollen sie offenbar sicherstell
Хорошо. Хочу уточнить пару моментов. Я хотел бы убедиться, что люк для собаки будет снят, пока вы находитесь на парашютах, если это возможно. Если нет, то вы будете де
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 레트로파이어를 시작하세요... 일출 시간은 10시 8분 40초입니다. 그리고 날씨 정보, 고도계 2986, 나
你的摄像
다시 말씀
Okay. Unsere Kollegen hier unten schauen sich gerade ein Programm zur Ausrichtung von Hochl
哦，我估计大概需要4个小时，杰克。等等，你说的烧伤是指哪
L'attitude de désamarrage et l'attitude SEP devraient être identiques. Je vais donc utiliser l'a
继续，金丝
जी हां, अपोलो 11। और माइक, यह यहां अनडॉक करने के बाद उड़ान से पहले SEP बर्न के समान है। और आपको रजिस्टर 1 - 2 पर दिखना चाहिए, और फिर आप माइनस X बर्न करते हैं जब तक कि आपको 4 न दिखे। स
حسناً يا جيم
Roger. 10, /: 45597, moins 040, plus 157, plus 35189, moins 01513, moins 00346 180 007 000, Novembre Alfa plus 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, étoile de visée Scorpii Delta (également appelée Dzuba) en bas 071, gauche 45, plus 0748 moins 16500 12995 36300; étoile principale Sirius, secondaire Rigel, 129 155 010; quatre quadrangles, 15 secondes, espace libre; horizon sur la ligne de fenêtre 2,9 à T moins 3; utiliser la procéd
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Я так понимаю, вы хотите, что
حسناً، هذا موجود على بط
... 90 градусов в неправильн
الماء مُشغّل، ودرجة حرارة المقصورة مضبوطة على الرقم ٢. أما درجة حرا
Präsident Nixon hat außerdem einen Aktionstag für alle Bundesangestellten am Montag ausgerufen, damit jeder Ihre Aktivitäten an der Öffentlichkeit verfolgen kann. Viele Landes- und Stadtverwaltungen sowie Unternehmen im ganzen Land geben ihren Angestellten ebenfalls frei, sodass Sie voraussichtlich ein recht großes Publikum erreichen wer
Хорошо. В разделе «Активация и проверка VHF/S-диапазона», шаг 2, у нас есть изменения 
Okay. Ho
わかりました。もう一度、いろいろ試してみます。捕捉できるか確認してみます。オリオン座は少し左の方に見えますが、かなり近いですね…ああ、ここに。シリウスも見えます。い
休斯顿
...
Di solito non us
Houston, Apollo 8. Einflug wie folgt: Mittelpazifik, 357 152 359 2
Sembra che il modo migliore per ottenere una visione stabile attraverso il monocolo sia semplicemente tenerlo fermo e lasciarlo chiudere quando è davanti all'occhio, per poi fluttuare accanto ad esso in modo da non toccarlo affatto. La deriva è molto lenta e in questo modo si ottiene una visione mig
好的。你可以开始舱外活动了。准备减压——调整，减压。你能给我们量一下血压吗？指挥飞行员的血压
あ
11, Houston. Um die Kommunikation hier etwas zu verbessern, möchten wir versuchen, Sie auf die Hochleistungsantenne umzustellen. Wir empfehlen einen Nickwinkel von 0°, einen Gierwinkel von 355° – ich wiederhole: 355° –, den Fahrschalter auf MANUELL und einen
أنظر إليه الآن، الآن. إنه... مثلث. أستطيع رؤية الأبراج الثلاثة جميعها بوضوح، على ما أعتقد. الـ... والنسر الواقع. في الواقع، أست
了解、イーグル。訂正 - 了解、コロンビア。了解しました。君たちは素早いね。先を越されたね。君に伝えたいことがいくつかあ
弗雷德，就这件
يبدو جيدًا جدًا، على حد علمي دون استخدام العدسة الممتدة. 
Der nächste Krater unten ist Duke Island, und links davon befindet sich der größte Krater in der Bildmitte – Maskelyne W. Dies ist eine Positionsprüfung während des Sinkflugs
Okay, pericynthion plus 2 into the MPL, 079, 27, 4013, plus 08144, minus 00443, minus 00226, N/A, plus 00205, 08455, 4 plus 20, 268, 261, plus 08155, minus 00443, minus 021, 2187, N/A. GDA should be okay as is, which hopefully is pitch 5.85, yaw 6.74. Two-jet ullage for 10 seconds, the throttle 10 percent for 5 seconds, 40 percent for 21 seconds, 100 percent for the rest of the burn. And this should put us into the water at 142 
هذا
And, Houston, Tranquility Base is going to give you a few comments with regard to the geology question of last night. We are landed in a relatively smooth crater field of 
また、VI、9月までの機動アップ
ठीक है। शुरू करते 
D'accord. L'attitude est la suivante: tangage 23,4°, roulis 184,7°, lacet 14,3°. Nous effectuons l'alignement da
... 25 minuti... non svegliarlo a qu
Roger, turn you
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 현재 근신성 경계선에서 64해리 떨어져 있습니다. 다음 중간 
제가 잠시 날아갈게요. 그리고 30분이 지났을 때, 30분이
フレンドシップ・セブン。了
……
Джим, я не всё понял из того, что ты сказал, но, кажется, ты хотел узнать, когда будут доступны и зачитаны процедуры входа. Если это так, то речь идёт примерно о 120 часах. Что касается зарядки батареи А, мы хотим сделать это, как только остальные ребята встанут, чтобы помочь тебе. Мы уже передали часть этой процедуры, и у нас е
Хорошо. Отличная обратная связь. Продолжаем вниз по странице. Переключатель «БАЛАНСИРУЮЩАЯ ПАРА», «БАЛ
Не на этой высоте, и это странно. Мне казалось, я мог бы это увидеть. На этой высоте преломление света в самих оптических приборах, вызванное, как я подозреваю, отражением солнечного света или света Земли, полностью заслон
Wo
Negative. This is the procedure that they came up with. It's just a check, M
حسنًا، أقرأ 70 درجة. أنا في حيرة من أمري بشأن كيفية خفضها، صمام الماء في بذلتي مضبوط الآن على قي
Я хотел сказать «Кадиллак», 
Ciò che cercheremo di fare è ripristinare il ciclo del sonno, tornando ai periodi di 
로저. 전적으로 동의합니다. 그리고 당신이 그 작업을 시작하는 동안, 저는 이 메모를 읽어보겠습니다. 프로그램 경보 5.6, 범위가 400해
Non. On ne peut pas le blâmer. Page E-7, sous préchauff
Gemini VI, Gemi
珀斯应该已经出现在视野里了，哦，多么漂亮的偏航角啊！它在航线左侧大约10度。最好
11, Houston. Die Leute von Goldstone TV sehen die Streifenbildung auch, wenn – gleichzeitig mit Ihnen
자, 캡콤, 여기는 제미니 4호입
罗杰。我们正在排放一些收集到的水，准备将废水排
У меня их двое
No, I'm just going to tell t
ニール、こちらヒューストン。はっきり聞こえる。ブレーク。ブレーク。ブザー、こちらヒューストン。ラジオをチェックして、テレビのブレーカーがオンになっているか確認
وأنا أنتظر قراءة 
...ここで何かを降ろすのは困難です
Eighty-six de
मारने के ल
Okay. Apollo 8. Es sieht so aus, als müssten wir diesen Kommunikationstest aufgrund einiger Tracking-Anforderungen verschieben. Wir könnten ihn in etwa einer Stunde durchführen, falls dies Ihre laufenden Operationen nicht zu sehr beeinträchtigt. Er würde etwa 15 bis 20 Minuten dauern und erfordert ein kurzes Gespräch zwischen den Besatzungsmitgliedern. Sollte dies Ihren Schlaf stören, verschieben wir den Test und kümmern uns später um die an
好的。回答你的问题，乔，答案是否定的。我一直都在检查舱室。从定性上看，当我们
Ро
حسنًا يا فانس. عند إيقاف التشغيل، سنقوم بخفض معدل البت؛ وإيقاف النسخ الاحتياطي للصوت، وسنقوم بفصل قاطع مكبر الطاقة؛ وسنقوم بإيقاف تشغيل FDAI 
О,
يا إلهي، سيضطرون - دعنا نرى، سيضطرون لإرسال جهاز إرسال إشارة TLI، وجهاز إرسال إشارة إجهاض TLI، وجهاز إرسال إشارة P37. جميعها موجودة هنا في هذا الكت
As long as you're reading me okay, Frank, I'll bring you up to date on a couple of things. Th
Ядро двигателя откроется, и, я 
TVC SERVO POWER, Nummer 1, AC
Il est en trai
Okay. Jack reports from upstairs that he can see stars and constellations out of the optics but the Sun 
Tout a l'air d'un beige très clair et gris, vous savez, c'est… c'est sa couleur. Mais quand on s'approche, quand on le voit de près, on se rend compte que ce n'est pas du tout sa couleur
2번 배터리가 이제 어떻게 보이시나
제미니 4, 휴스턴 CA
查理，就算盖着盖子也黑
Correct. BATTERIE 1, HAUTE TENSION - HAUTE TENSION pour ARRÊT/RÉINITIALISAT
Okay. Quello che voglio fare, Jim, è tirare fuori questi altri obiettivi. Penso che pot
Mais 
알겠습니다. LMP의 파란색 호스는 LMP 창문 근처에 있고, 빨간색 호스는 약 4피트 정도 떨어져 있습니다. 그리고... 네. 다른 
نيل وباز، أتحدث إليكما عبر الهاتف من الغرفة البيضاوية في البيت الأبيض، ولا شك أن هذه الم
П
Du verlässt den 
没
Apo
이렇게 하면 대기권 진입 시 트림 각도, 롤링 속
All windows are clear. And suit circuit is 42 - 43. And I g
बस, अभी के लिए इतना ही, फ्रैंक। हमें कुछ और खबरें मिली हैं, जिन्हें वे जल्द से जल्द आप तक पहुंचाने का वादा कर चुके हैं। उनमें से सबसे दिलचस्प खबर प्यूब्लो की रिहाई थी। मुझे लगता है कि आपको निक्सन-आइजनहावर की शादी के बारे में पहले ही बताया जा चुका है। और बस मौसम की बात करें तो, यहाँ का मौसम काफी साफ है। आसमान में घने बादल छाए हुए हैं। लेकिन ठंड है, दृश्यता अच्छी है, और फिर से सर्दियों जैस
Apollo 8, Houston. We got a good load in; it's yo
、回路ブレーカーを使って、その不安定なスラスターを切断して
네. 카메라에 이제 안으로 들어오시는 것 같
Wenn du auf High Gain umsteigst, würdes
わかりました。これで良いプ
جيميني 4، هذا جراح كارنارفون. نحن جاهز
Ja. Roger. Alles kla
Je déclare le contrôle d'étanchéité terminé et je procède à l'ouverture de la vanne de v
هذا صحيح. عند إتمام المرحلة السابعة من ال
알겠습니다. 21시 50분 현재 항속거리는 22.24해리입니다.
Роджер. Наш переключатель T/M на
حسناً. لقد استيقظ الآن ويتناول طعامه. نخطط لاتباع الإجراءات المعتادة في خطة
Korrektur. Moment; das s
Encore 35 secondes,
हाँ। आपको वही रखना चाहिए था जो आपके पास था। उसकी आवाज़ थोड़ी बेहत
로저. 지금 보고 계신 것은 우리가 왼쪽 창으로 보는 지구의 절반 정도입니다. 동태평양이 보이고, 화면 위쪽 절반의 북쪽에는 북미 대륙, 알래스카,
Wenn Sie über Ascension fliegen, möchte ich versuchen, dort einen Kontrollpunkt zu find
यही मौजूदा सोच है। हो सकता है क
Roger, Jim. Wie geht es euc
好的。当我们把交流电源开关从IGS切换到ACME时——这不应该给电脑供电——电脑指示灯熄灭了。故障指示灯亮起后，电脑指示灯又亮了起来，故障指示灯一直亮着。很快，两个指示灯都变暗了……过了三四分钟，我们换回ACME电源后，电脑
とても良いで
وكذلك 5D. 6A مرتفع؛ 6B مرتفع؛
Okay. Church services around the world today are mentioning Apollo 11 in their prayers. President Nixon's worship service at the White House is also dedicated to the mission, and our fellow astronaut, Frank Borman, is still in there pitching and will read the passage from
ठीक है। रीडबैक सही है, लेकिन मैं इसे द
Apollo 8, Houston. Das ist bestätigt, Frank. Wir bereiten gerade die Erstellung eines löschbaren Dat
收到。
Нет, мы можем остав
Один из кратер
로저. 약 148시간 후에, 아직 하지 않으셨다면 CO2 필터를 교체하
フレンドシップ・セブン、ハワイ・キャップ・コミッションは、現在、
그리고 나서 배터리 충전을 시작할 텐데, 그
제미니 4,
وهذا قد يجعل جدولك الزمني مزدحماً بعض الشيء، حيث يمكنك وضع بدلاتك في اللحظة الأخير
Okay, Jack. I got another question on page 18. At 1 minute, I concur with MASTER ARM ON, but I wonder why I have to have the ABORT STAGE breaker in. We sure 
We're going to take the cable and Ed's going to hold it between h
ठीक है। सब
わかった。聞
अब इंसर्शन चेकलिस्ट देख रहा हूँ। डी
Хорошо, «Аполл
50 度のロール姿勢
はい、本
... اجعلها ت
ह्यूस्टन, यह VIII है। इसके अलावा, हमारे पास अभी तक लॉक-ऑन नहीं है। इसलिए मुझे लगता है कि लॉक-ऑन होने तक हमें इंतजार करना होगा, उसके बाद
Okay. Jack meldet von oben, dass er durch die Optik Sterne und Sternbilder sehen kann, aber der Sonnenwinkel ist so, dass das Licht vom ne
Der 
حسنًا. سنرسل ذلك، وسأقدم لك الآن تحديثًا عن المواد الاستهلاكية. بعد 170 ساعة، أصبح إجمالي استهلاكك سالب 3.5%، ألفا سالب 14.5%، برافو موجب 7%، تشارلي سالب 4.5%، دلتا سالب 3%؛ إجمالي الهيدروجين سالب 1%، وإجمالي ال
어쨌든 RCS가 제대로 작동하는지 확인
Ricevuto. Piastra f
Ok, Jim. Stiamo ancora raccogliendo le nostre idee, ma alcune considerazioni ci dicono che possiamo effettuare quella correzione probabilmente anche dopo 118 ore, senza penalità significative per il DEL
Buzz, hier spricht Houston. Wir möchten Sie bitten, den Schutzschalter DELTA P für den Anzuglüfter an Schalt
روجر. نحن نقترب من مسار الإشعال. هذا يعادل 13 دقيقة قبل
オーウェン、プラットフォームの位置合わせで奇妙なのは、時間をかけて、本当にゆっくり、慎重に、正確にマーキングすると、DTCで急いで、トラッキングが比較的悪い状態で作業するのとほぼ同じ星の角度差が出てくることです。星の角度差は鈍
Ken, chiamami se vedi
コントラストが増し、これらの尾根の太陽に照らされた側だけが照らされ、暗
Ok. Lasciami sottolineare, Jack, che 2 ore e mezza è il tempo minimo per iniziare con quella roba dei potenziamenti. Tutto il resto puoi farlo come faresti normalmente, ovvero arrivare il più avanti possibile nel gioco. Ma il tempo di 2 ore e mezza si basa sul risparmio di materiali di consumo del modulo di comando. E se lo fai, beh, siamo grassi; abbiamo un sacco di tempo per darti qualche ventilatore anche in acqua. Quindi questo è l'unico punto su cui non dovresti iniziare troppo presto. Ho ancora un paio di righe da ripassare nella checklist di ingresso e due pag
Il centro di recupero 3 riferisce che il tempo di ammaraggio è stato di 51 e 50 secondi e che le operazioni di soccorso sono in cor
另一则本地新闻：亨茨维尔县法院大楼昨天黎明前被烧毁，看来他们又要在那里开工建设了。接下来是一些关于等待返程的家庭的报道。这篇报道由《邮报》记者安·詹姆斯撰写。“我们就像在月球背面休息一样，”瓦莱丽·安德斯在圣诞夜说道，当时她和家人正在等待阿波罗8号脱离月球轨道，返回地球。安德斯太太周二凌晨0点就到了，邻居们刚刚把孩子们都接走，这样在飞船飞到月球背面、与外界失去联系期间，他们一家人就可以休息一下。弗兰克·博尔曼上校的家在户外装饰着四个巨大的常青花环，上面撒满了粉状的雪花，还系着红色的蝴蝶结。书房里的一棵圣诞树正等待着他平安归来，他漂亮的金色头发的妻
Okay. But I'm goi
حسنًا، ممتاز. تحت عنوان "التخزين النهائي"، أول بند مُدرج في السطر 36، الصفحة 1-5، هو "البصريات". وإذا كنت ترغب في البدء بالتخزين، فنفضل عدم وضع البصريات جانبًا، لأننا سنجري فحص النجوم بعد ذلك بوقتٍ كافٍ. أما باقي الأمور، فيمكنك إنجازها 
Nessun problema, Jim. Vai avanti e aprili, TRACCIA e ALLAGA, va ben
Roger, 11. Ich glaube, da hatten wir nicht viel Einfluss. Sieht so aus, als müsstest du dich 
罗杰。信不信由你，我们在“鹰
لا يبدو أن
Роджер. Пожалуйста, еще раз назовите температуру на вход
Ok, bene. Arriveremo dagli Stati Uniti alle 11 GMT e vorrebbero che scattassi qualche foto del meteo.
Okay. Sie sagten, wir würden jedem der dre
Gemini VI. Wir sind noch etwa 154 Meilen entfernt. Die voraussichtliche Ankunftszeit beträgt 3–4 Stunden, 0 Minuten und 0 Sekunden; unsere Reichweite beträgt 154,52 Meilen; neue Tonbandkassette 
ロジャー、ジェミニ4。解雇されたと
Вот и всё, она по-прежнему права. Хорошо. 
D'accord. Tu devrais l'avo
هذا هو سيجما سفن. أشعر بالروعة، وقد تمكنت أخيرا
Le
Sto solo scherzando; di cosa hai bisogno? Dell'ora di AOS? AOS sarà... beh, vediamo... 82:30, tra circa 1
밴스, 여러분은 어떤 카메라를 사용할지 생각해 보셨나요? 현재 저희는 Hasselblad 250을 구성했고, 저는 달 표면 촬영용 Hasselblad 1번 카메라와 달 표면 시퀀스 카메라도 설치 및 준비를 마쳤습니다. 혹시 다른 선호 사항이 있
关于光学系统还有一点需要说明。我们现在处于最佳状态。我们正经过——横滚角大约是182度；俯仰角大约是226度，偏航角大约是18度。在这个特定的姿态下，我可以把轴旋转360度，在M线这一侧大约10度的位置，我看到了一条光带。它的强度会
Roger, Mike. NOUN 80 - Korrektur, NOUN 84: minus 00758, plus alle Nullen, plus 00098; NOUN 33: 101 36 1400, und warten Sie auf die plus
Okay. Das ist richtig. Schritt 8 lautet nun: „Führen Sie auf Anfrage Schritt 9 aus.“ Anders gesagt: Sie warten, bis wir uns entschieden haben, wie vorzugehen ist, und zwar gemäß de
Supprimez le rest
Боюсь, я не расслышал это, Фред, и пока я слу
ठीक है, जिम। हम इस विषय पर आपसे बात करना चाहते थे। हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं, और हमारा मानना ​​है कि - बेशक, यह आप पर निर्भर करता है, लेकिन इसके फायदे और नुकसान को देखते हुए, आपने फायदे पर ध्यान दिया है। हम EI माइनस 1 घंट
Готов поспорить на любые деньги, что тот город был слева о
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。A1にチェックインして、マイク、何
BATT Charlie 370، PYRO BATT A 370، BATT B 370؛، 55، 65، 6
宁静基地，这里是休斯顿，收到。收到。你开始准备。休息。休息。哥伦比亚，哥伦比亚，这里是休斯顿。收到你的声音，非常清楚。完
了解。君の鼻はまっすぐ
रॉजर। X के लिए 4.4 और Z के लिए 2.4 कॉपी करें। और ट्रिम से पहले Y पर ऋणात्मक अवशिष्ट
Хорошо. Я возьму свои слова обратно насчет "очень", но оставлю
جيد جداً. لقد حصلت على مر
Roger. Et pour votre information, votre al
रॉजर। 1A 3-24 है, 1D 3 1/2 और 24 है, 1C 3 1/2 और 24 1/2 है; 2A 2 1/2 और 25 है, 2D 2 1/2 और 25 है, 
Bene, puoi semplicemente continuare con la tua attuale configurazione. Tuttavia, se provi ad accendere i propulsori, questi cercheranno di porta
Certaines de ces petites dépressions 
REP RB 26 plus 39; roulis à gauche 47, roulis à droite 47; la déviation initiale de l'aiguille indique un dépassement de 12 mi
지금 시점에서 동전 던지기를
よし、ヒューストン。データのレジスタ3を見てく
前
我们要给指令舱加水
تلك الصورة الأخيرة التي التقطتها
حسنًا. لم ألاحظ أي قراءة للجهد على البطارية C، ويبدو أن شدة التيار حوالي 2 أمبير، لكن قد يكون ذلك مجرد ضوضاء. أطفأت جميع الأضواء الكاشفة، و... هل يمكنك التفكير في أي شيء آخر يمكنني فعله لخفض التيار إلى مست
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。当时我什么也没说。现在我们正在想办法解决你们的问题。关于你们之前提出的睡眠周期调整问题，我们同意你们的看法。我们希望在进入月球轨道之前，能够重新回到飞行计划中，尤其是在睡眠周期等方面。所以，我们希望你们自行判断如何最有效地协调睡眠周期，并合理分配时间。请你们随时告知我们每个人的工作安排和计划。我们之前把其中一个人的睡眠时间推迟了2个小时。我们希望能够把另一个人的睡眠时间也调整过来。如果其他人的睡眠时间会冲突，我们也可以调整——我想这又多了两个人。如果你们能告诉我们吉姆预计什么时候可以进行观测，我们就可以调整他们的睡眠时间。所以，最重要的是，我们希望尽力满足你们的需求。如果您能告诉我们，我们会挑选一些明星和一些拍摄角度，并为您
ठीक है। अभी-अभी हमें लगभग एक मिनट के लिए एकदम स्थिर स्थिति मिली है। सुई ऊपर-नीचे हो रही थी, और पिच और यॉ क
The visibility through the telescope has been very poor. It's, I would say, even worse than the simulator is right now. It requires long periods of dark adaptation which most times are most inconvenient; so it's really a tremendous asset to keep the platform powered up at all times and to keep it tweaked w
रॉजर। मैं अभी रिकॉर्डर पर कुछ रिकॉर्ड कर रहा था। मुझे बस एक ही असामान्य चीज़ नज़र आई है, वो है क्षितिज से लगभग 7 या 8 डिग्री ऊपर रात के समय एक ध
जेमिनी VI, मैं रस्स लैंड लीडर ह
Ricevuto. Benissimo. Lo controlleremo mentre entri e ti faremo
Nous vous recommandons de rétab
Все еще в относительно горизонтальном положении. Управление скоростью работает хорошо. Рад, что она держится. Все идет очень хорошо. Приближается к 5½ (g). Управление скоростью все еще держится, топлива по-пре
ठीक है, धन्यवा
배터리 C 전원 입력 및 착륙 
Okay. Eine Frage. In diesem kurzen Einschaltschritt 3 auf Seite 24 schalten wir nur das SYSTEM A/B, zwei Quads ein, und die Sicherungen auf Verteilerkas
ठीक है। यह पेरिसिंथियन प्लस 2 है। / 62871 नवंबर अल्फ़ा, और एक पर प्रतीक्षा करें। ठीक है। हम पिच ट्रिम और यॉ ट्रिम के साथ आगे बढ़ेंगे जो लागू नहीं है; समय, माइनस 00468, प्लस 00254, प्लस 00181 173 101 027 नवंबर अल्फ़ा प्लस 00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044, नीचे 044, बाएँ 45, प्लस 1100, माइनस 02500 12967 36198, प्राथमिक 
Eag
Roger. 07 S
Oui. Les choses ont vite dégénéré après ce spectacl
حسنًا. بعد تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بيومين، لا توجد متطلبات لضبط الطائرة؛ وإذا حدث توقف مفاجئ أثناء تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بيومين، فستكون المناورات اللاحقة في منتصف المسار مطلوبة - حسنًا، ستكون أقرب مناورة هي تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بأربعة أيام. إذا لم تقم بتجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بيومين، ولكننا ما زلنا نرغب في القيام بواحدة - فسيكون ذلك لاحقًا. عند تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بأربعة أيام، ستكون الزيادة
Okay, register 1, plus 27218; register 2, plus 35570; register 3, plus 33010; and to get the narrow deadband back we want a , NOUN 01, ENTER, 3011, ENTER, 200 ENTE
好的，休斯顿，关于各单位的数值：指挥官 (CDR) 为 0.07，指挥官管理计划 (CMP) 为 0.64，领航员管理计划 
보조 냉각수 루프의 배압 밸브가 약간 열려 있는 것 같습니다. 보조 냉각수 루
Ge
Роджер. Обратите внимание, что вы начинаете свою последнюю запланированную операцию. Первоначальное отслеживание показывает, что начальная скорость на среднем участке траектории может быть меньше 4 футов в секунду, как предполагалось изначально. Мы также просмотрели ваши данные о работе двигателя, и вс
Okay, and if you turn over the page on Power 8, we have the spacecraft functions remaining to you. We've got low bit rate TM. However, we don't have any VHF. We have. We have GLYCOL PUMPS. We have SUIT FANS. We have CABIN REPRESS for you, and stand by in ATTITUDE CONTROL here. Okay, in ATTITUDE CONTROL, we'll have hardovers for uses in emergency, and for normal usage we
Роджер. Мы видим центр Земли, как он виден с космического аппарата в восточной части Тихого океана. Нам не удалось визуально различить Гавайские острова, но мы отчетливо видим западное побережье Северной Америки. Соединенные Штаты, долина Сан-Хоакин, Высокие Сьерры, Нижняя Калифорния и Мексика вплоть до Акапулько и полуострова Юкатан; и вы можете видеть дальше через Центральную Америку до северного побережья Южной Америки, Венесуэлы и Колумбии. Я не уверен
알겠습니다. 잭, 이 절차는 꽤 
वेंट वाल्व और ईसीएस ऑक्सीजन की मरम्मत बहुत चतुराई से की गई थी ताकि जॉन की इस शिकायत का समाधान हो सके कि ऑक्सीजन स्केल से बाहर निकल रही थी। अब, ज़ाहिर है, ऑक्सीजन स्केल में नीचे की ओर निकलती है और ऑक्सीज
收到。我来告诉你我的配置。我目前处于自动反向控制模式；陀螺仪工作正常；机动开关已关闭；所有消耗品指示灯都亮着；电气系统检查一切正常；太空舱跟踪良好。此时月
Хорошо. Шаг 6: «Увеличить скорость вращения до 0,3 градуса в секунду по рысканию»; это примерно 21 импульс. Шаг 7: «УПРАВЛЕНИЕ РЕЖИМОМ, выключит
D'accord. Je vai
啊，原来如此。好的，谢谢。我会更新我的清单。但我不知道该更
네, 저희
روجر. نسبة الوقود في نظام التحكم تتراوح بين 90 و100%، والأكسجين بين 75 و100
Apollo 8, Hou
现在吉姆那边是白天，
मुझे लगता है कि जिम के साथ भी शायद ऐसा ही है। म
Okay. Und sobald Sie einen guten Kontrollmodus eingestellt haben, sol
Well, we're working on that some more. I'm not sure that the whole thing is lost yet. It appears that our problem is one where the light intensity which is sensed by our light meter in there is picking up an average field which is much larger than the earth, and so it's sensing a great deal of deep space environment which is dark, and we're suspicious that this is probably opening up the lens aperture as 
D'accord. L'enregistrement est terminé et l'enregistreur vous est rendu. Vous pouvez l'utiliser comme bon vous semble. Nous pourrions l'enregistrer à nouveau, et si c'est le cas, nous utiliserons les mêmes informations, sauf si vous souhaitez y ajouter des données ul
ジェミニVIII、彼らはアセンションを通してあなたと話します。アセンション取得時間は9時52分
罗杰。吉姆，你继续
Okay. On, the thinking runs that you had a slight error in your stat
Exactement comme ils le sont. Non, ils vo
Bonjour, Ca
休斯顿
Go ahead, C
好的。杰克刚才
오, 이 포도 음
That's affirmative. You broke up there 
جيميني 4، هيوستن كاب كو
ह
ああ、いや。理由はわかっている！…それだけではあれを動かすのに十分じゃな
ओह, अंधेरा हो गया है, यही हुआ है। यह एक अंधे
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्ट
Je n'ai pas trop som
Okay. Die guten Daten zeigen uns aktuell einen Vakuum-Perigäum von 23,6 mit einem Flugbahnwinkel von -6,25 Grad. Das ist ohne Kurskorrektur. Er überlegt, 5 Stunden
ठीक है। इंग्लैंड के जोड्रेल बैंक से, एपी के माध्यम से: ब्रिटेन की विशाल जोड्रेल बैंक रेडियो दूरबीन ने आज सुबह 5:49 पूर्वी मानक समय (ईएसटी) पर सोवियत संघ के मानवरहित चंद्र प्रक्षेपण से संकेत प्राप्त करना बंद कर दिया। एक प्रवक्ता ने कहा कि ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि लूना 15 अंतरिक्ष यान "चंद्रमा से आगे निकल गया है।" एक अन्य बयान: वेधशाला के निदेशक सर बर्नार्ड लवेल के प्रवक्ता ने कहा, "हमें नहीं लगता कि यह 
...quella macchia bianca laggi
ठीक है। हमें समझ आ गया है, और जैसे ही हम वापस उस दूरी की ओर ज़ूम करते हैं जहाँ से हमें पृथ्वी दिखाई देती है, 
Роджер. Понятно. Просто для информации, возможно, вы зачитали это на земле. Я провел расчет перицинфической высоты, используя, во-первых, вектор состояния звезды, с помощью которого мы осуществляли навигацию, дал нам плюс 84,7 миль высоты, а затем мы использовали ваш вектор состояния, который вы нам обновили в прошлый раз. Мы получили 64,2, а затем я провел расчет, используя н
في الصفحة التالية، في الحجرة B1، نُقدّر أن حوالي 15% من الطعام لا يزال موجودًا. في الحجرة B2، أخرجنا PPK ووضعنا ا
알겠습니다. 조종 가능한 안테나가 이륙 직후 제대로 작동하지 않으면, 
Okay. Listen. Be advised that I've just been maintai
क्या उड़ान योजना में शामिल सितारे इस अगले
Regardez-nous, nous aussi on fait du 
Va 
Okay. Es gibt heute Morgen nicht viel Neues in den Nachrichten. Es ist ziemlich ruhig. Die wichtigste Nachricht betrifft wohl die Unfallzahlen – die Todesfälle an den Feiertagen –, was natürlich keine erfreuliche Nachricht ist. Landesweit kamen 233 Menschen ums Leben, neun davon in Houston am Heiligabend und an Weihnachten. In den Weltnachrichten sorgten die Familien
ニールとバズ、私はホワイトハウスのオーバルルームから電話であなたたちに話しています。これは間違いなく、これまでで最も歴史的な電話通話でしょう。あなたたちがすべてのアメリカ国民のためにしてくれたことを、私たち全員がどれほど誇りに思っているか、言葉では言い表せません。これは私たちの人生で最も誇らしい日です。そして世界中の人々も、アメリカ国民と共に、これがいかに偉大な偉業であるかを認識していると思います。あなたたち
Potresti riferire a Houston che eravamo fuori... ma siamo riusciti a vedere la costa del Texas abbastanza chiaramente e in realtà abbiamo captato... fuori si poteva vedere molto di più... la costa del Texas fino alla Louisiana... scendendo su
로저... 저희는 아무 문제 없습니다. 곧 승선하겠습니다..
Roger, capito, dalle 18 a
روجر. سبب التأخير يا تشارلي هو أنه من الصعب العثور على نجمي
ठीक है। मैं इन्हें तीन-चार के समूह में एक बार में पढ़ूंगा, इनमें से कुछ एक जैसे हैं, कुछ बदले हुए हैं, और आप इन्हें कुछ चरणों के बाद दोबारा पढ़ सकते हैं। फंक्शन को बंद करें; मोड को स्टैंडबाय पर सेट करें, कोई बदलाव नहीं; जीटीए को बंद करें, नीचे करें, कोई बदलाव नहीं; और जीटीए कवर को सुरक्षित करे
ठीक है। टॉमी जैकब्स के बाद, हमारे पास ह्यूस
はい
Хорошо. После клапана
أورورا سفن، أورورا سفن. هذه شركة كانتون كوم تك.
준비됐나요
주변에 물이 떠다니는 게 보이면 다시 전
Okay. This is preliminary results, but it will give you some indication. Corrected altitude is turning out to be 17 plus or minus 4 kilometers, and the fact that it's plus or minus 4 kilometers indicates that you're being very consistent in judging the altitude. The effective altitude is t
로저. 제가 당신의 말을 일부 잊어버린 것 같네요. 역추진 직후
Apollo 8, Houston. L
Хорошо. В разделе «Включение питания» первая строка гласит: «АВТО ВЫБОР, 16, ВЫКЛ.». Хорошо. Можете просто удалить эту часть. В пятой строке написано «ПИТАНИЕ ЛОГИЧЕСКОГО АВТОМАТИЧЕСКОГО ВЫКЛЮЧАТЕЛЯ», на самом деле это «ЛОГИЧЕСКАЯ ШИНА, четыре из них, замкнута». DELTA-V CG не важен, поскольку мы не сжигаем двигатель. В разделе «КОНДИЦИОНЕР СИГНАЛА/ПИТАНИЕ СМЕЩЕНИЯ ДРАЙВЕРА» указано «Два к AC 1». Мы сделаем это одним из них; сделаем это «КОНДИЦИОНЕР СИГНАЛА/ПИТАНИЕ СМЕЩЕНИЯ ДРАЙВЕРА, один, к AC 1». В строке «ПИТАНИЕ», которая находится в третьей строке снизу, написано «ПИТАНИЕ, два, ВКЛ.»; мы сделаем это одним. Мы выведем номер 1 и сделаем «ПИТАНИЕ, номер 1», а последнюю строку «АВТО ВЫБОР, 16
Okay. Die Crew beschwert sich über horizontale Streifen auf ihrem 
남반구 브라질
Non. Aucun des remèdes n'a f
Na ja, das ist ja... – Mir scheint, du hast es geschafft. Denk nur daran, dass du die Blende wahrschein
了解。27番、了解しました。了解しました。アウト
I'll darn sure never get it in. Oh yes,
D'accord, Jim. Comment va la communicat
Нил, это Хьюстон. Мы при
Ok, Skipper. Abbiamo trovato un modo per tenerti al caldo. A
Roger. Êtes-vous prêt à copier vot
Ricevu
ठीक
حسنًا، أرى عطارد يمر عبر وهج الهواء. سنرى إن كان سيصمد. عندما قلتُ "أرى"، كانت تلك البداية. مارك، أول تغيير في اللون، وهو الآن أز
फिलहाल, मध्यमार्ग सुधार शून्य है; और लगभग डेढ़ 
Принято, без отклоне
और दो काम हैं जो हम जैक से कमांड मॉड्यूल में करवाना चाहते हैं ताकि मेन ए पर लोड कम हो सके। पहला काम है सीएम/आरसीएस हीटर स्विच को चेक करना या उसे बंद करना। हमने वह काम पूरा कर लिया है, और भले ही सर्किट ब्रेकर बंद हैं, स्विच थोड़ा करंट खींच रहे होंगे। दूसरा काम है लॉजिक पावर 2/3 को बंद करना; अभी इसकी जरूरत नहीं है। चेकलिस्ट में इसे सही समय पर दिखाया गया है, और हम चाहते हैं कि वह इसे बंद कर दे। सम
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। पहले चरण में, ईंधन और ऑक्सीडाइज़र का दबाव 10 psi ह
Non credo che sia più difficile... di quanto non lo sia - a velocit
了
Cabin t
Okay, activate the primary evaporator. All this time, Ken, what've we been getting our cooling? Right now, I
好吧，看来你很
はい、はい。つまり、一般的に言うと、電源を入れてエイトボールを上げて姿勢を設定する必要があります。そして、地球の中心がZ軸の真上にくるように宇宙船を手動で向きを変えます。次に、Z軸を中心に回転させて、三日月形の先端がY軸上にくるようにします。すると、先ほど説明したように、X軸のプラス方向が太陽の方向になります。つまり、
C'è qualcosa nella quantità di 
罗杰。我有一张 10-Charlie 123 的星历表。1+45。01 天 05 13 47
Dopo aver ridotto la velocità a un punto tale da ritenere di poterci sganciare in sicurezza, lo abbiamo fatto e ci siamo allontanati dall'Agena a diversi metri al secondo il più velocemente possibile. Avevamo visto la 
そうです。入力はしていませんが、コンピューターに少しだけ任せていました。モードスイッチをMANUALから切り替えて、いろいろいじっていたら、コンピューターが星を見えなくしてしまいました。つまり、ここでの遅延は
١١، هيوستن. كانت لقطة جيدة للوحة ٢. الآن نرى اللوحة ٣ مع مفتاح مراقبة درجة الحرارة. محطة التثبيت ولوحة التحكم، كما نرى الآن، 
Roger. Il GMT di quell'esper
Ich habe eine Anmerkung zu dem Punkt auf der Erde, an dem die Sonnenstrahlen zu uns zurückreflektiert werden. Im Allgemeinen ist die Farbe der Ozeane größtenteils einheitlich, hell- bis dunkelblau, außer in einem Gebiet mit etwa einem Achtel des Erdradius im Durchmesser. In diesem kreisförmigen Bereich nimmt das Wasser einen gräulichen Farbton an, und ich bin mir sicher, dass genau dort die Sonnen
우리가 정말로 하려는 것은 창문을 통해 지구가 들어오는 것을 볼 때, 그 움직임을 멈추고 지구를 창문에 담아둘 수 있도록 자세를 잡는 것입니다. 29페이지의 "PRESS" 아래에 있는 세 단계를 모두 지우세요. 30페이지의 "PRESS" 아래에 있
Beh, leggo 70 [gradi]. Sono davvero un po' indeciso su come abbassarla, la valvola dell'acqua della mia tuta è ora impostata oltre i segni. Questo non sembra
Apo
Apollo 8, Houston. VH
Okay. Wir haben auch mit dem Manövrieren begonnen. Wir geraten etwas in Rückstand, und was mir Sorgen bereitet, Mike, ist, dass Jim jetzt seinen Druckanzug ausz
I
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। यदि आप उच्च बिट दर का उपयोग करेंगे, तो हम आपको एक टेप रिकॉर्डर वापस आपके कम
第二点当然是，当你停止被动热控时，你与地面的夹角大约是90度，所以
알겠습니다. VE
Affermativo. Stiamo configurando Goldstone per questo; ci vorrà solo un minuto. E me
रॉजर, फ्र
ह
Quelle est la taille des pierres que tu as ramassées avec les pinces? Nom d'un chien! Magnifique! Il suffit de les ouvrir et d'en extraire l'intérieur vierge sous vide, et elles vont se
D'accord. Nous aimerions qu'il les réalise, comme je l'ai dit, une fois la série en cours terminée. Ce sont les mêmes que celles imprimées sur votre plan de vol, page 2-86. Nous souhaiterions doubler le nombre d'exemplaires de la première et de la seconde, ce qui ferait un total de cinq séries pour
Хорошо, 11. У меня тут несколько небольших пунктов: одно обновление плана полета и некоторая информация о фотосъемке при входе в атмосферу, если вы готовы скопировать. Конец связи
आज ह्यूस्टन में सबसे बड़ी खबर एस्ट्रोस से जुड़ी है। खेल जगत में, ह्यूस्टन एस्ट्रोस ने सिनसिनाटी में नौवें इनिंग में वापसी करते हुए रेड्स को 7-4 से हरा दिया। हालांकि, नौवें इनिंग की शुरुआत में हालात काफी निराशाजनक लग रहे थे। एस्ट्रोस 4-3 से पीछे थे। फिर एक आउट होने पर, जीसस अलू ने राइट फील्ड में एक सिंगल मारा। जॉन एडवर्ड्स ने भी राइट फील्ड में एक सिंगल मारा, और सैंडी वाल्डेस्पिनो ने डबल मारकर स्कोर बराबर कर दिया। जूलियो गोटे को वॉक मिला और जो मॉर्गन ने बन्ट मारकर मैच जिताने वाला रन बनाया। प्लेट पर एक गलत थ्रो के कारण एक और रन बन गया, फिर डेनिस मेनके के सैक्रिफाइस फ्लाई से आखिरी रन आया। नौवें इनिंग में उन्होंने वाकई श
نعم. للعلم يا جيم، لا أعرف إن كنت قد سمعت هذا من قبل، لكن تلك الفترة الزمنية من 2.5 إلى 1 بوصة قد تم تكرارها حوالي ثلاث مرات، وهي ضيقة جدًا، لذا حاولنا استبعاد ما استطعنا، وهو ليس بالكثير، لكن أعتقد أن الرسالة الأخرى التي قد ترغب في إيصالها إلى جاك عندما ت
Роджер. Мы были *** совершенно пра
いいえ。IVIインジケータ
Bien. Appuyez sur ENTRÉE, puis sur 333, puis de nouveau sur ENTRÉE. Ensuite, nous vous demandons de lire le registre 1. Nous nous attendons à ce que le registre 1 contienne la valeur 10 000. Si c'est le cas, l'ordinateur effacera sa mémoire deux fois. Cela correspond à 10 000, deux fois la valeur affichée. Si la valeur affich
Roger, Houston. 
Non, non, c'est 
Qu
わかりました。もう一度血圧を測っていただけます
صحيح، لأن القراءة منخفضة قليلاً. على البدلة، أنا الآن ع
ठीक है, जैक। समझ गया। बह
Tu vois, tu ne peux pas me berner, hein Scott? J'ai maintenant la P O2 (pression partielle d'oxygène), qui tombe à 0 dans ce cas. OK, R Cal. Ça te va? Quelqu'un veut connaître sa ten
Roger, John. Sono appena uscito dalla configurazione di spegnimento, in cui avevamo l'inverter spento. È tornato in buon
이 함선은 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 망원경으로 보나 창밖으로 보나 아프리카 해안의
G
Fred, abbiamo dati sufficienti; raccomandiamo a Jack di disattivare il TM e di riattivarlo, seguendo la sua procedura di backout. Facci sapere quando lo
और हमें एम्पियर और वोल्ट की एक और रीड
और 11, ह्यूस्टन। आपसे एक अनुरोध है। सर्विस मॉड्यूल सेकेंडरी प्रोपेलेंट फ्यूल प्रेशराइजेशन वाल्व के संबं
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी। क्या 
嗯，我们无法判
罗
はい。30 プラス 15 でバッテ
好的。删除“自动选择，16，关闭”。将“CB逻辑电源”更改为“逻辑推力电源 - CBS CS逻辑推力，4，关闭”。删除“DELTA-V CG”，向下移动到“信号调节器/驱动器偏置电源，1，AC 1；电源
パワーダウン（判読不能）状態でも、まだ 11 アンペア弱しか消費していないようです。1 番機では 10 アンペア、2 番機では 11 アンペア弱です。テザー、つまり外側のハッチにあるテザーもしくは臍帯拘束具の位置のせいで、宇宙船前方での自由テザーの空気力学的制約による船外活動（EVA）作業はかなり困難でした。そのエリアで作業している時はいつでも、テザーが端に達すると私は引き戻され、その反動で宇宙船上方、アダプター セクションの方へ運ばれていました。そのため、窓の上方で操縦している間、私は視界から消え、その後宇宙船後方へと戻されていました。宇宙船の前部に出るために
罗杰。我会再读一遍 41 Delta，41 Delta
Columbia, Hous
- 그리고 한 가지 방안은 중간 코스를 생략하고 입국 8시간 전쯤에 전체 중간 코스를 
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。首先，我们希望后侧的废水排放量降至
I have a - static. A li
Gemini VIII, this is Houston CAP
حسنًا. في الجانب الأيسر من الصفحة 28، في الأسفل
I'm going to go ahead and put it o
حسنًا. السؤال الإضافي الأول هو، ودعني أعود إلى السؤال الأصلي لأن هذا السؤال يقول: "بشكل أكثر تحديدًا حول البند 2"، والبند 2 يقول: "هل كانت هناك أي تغيير
Хор
대기하세요. 준비
私の見るところ、短いものの中には、遅
はい、大丈夫です。次は、ビニール袋の片方の耳のアーチ付近に斜めの穴を開けます。どちらかを選んで、約1.5インチか2インチの斜めの穴を開けてください。赤いホースを通せる大きさです。穴を開けたら、赤いホースをキャニスターの中央あたりまで通します。開口部を下向きにすること
हमने खूब मज़े किए। वाकई बहुत अच्
ठीक है, चार्ली। अभी तक तो म
좋아요. 저희 제품이 뭔지 알
ठीक है, बस इसे रीफर मत कहना। ठीक है। लगभग -19 डिग्री सेल्सियस पर, हम पृष्ठ 2-2 पर मानक प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट पर वापस आ जाते 
Фред, я просто хотел заранее предупредить тебя, что мы приближаемся к критической отметке уровня CO2 во вторичном баллоне, и ожидаем, что это произойдёт примерно через полчаса, после чего мы попросим тебя переключиться на баллоны командного модуля. Остальная часть процедуры у меня готова, и я просто хотел немного п
Vogl
ستكون نسبة الوقود إلى 
क्या इतनी ज्यादा तैयारी करना और बिल्कुल भी गंभ
Ну, если бы нам досталось полотенце, мы бы смогли сделать пару неплохих фото
زاوية ميل صفرية وانحراف 1 درج
Roger. Wir lagen *** g
Ho 
음, LM 내부를 걸어 다니거나 창밖을 내다볼 때, 모든 게 다 같은 색깔처럼 보이거나 균일해 보
Diese Anzeige schwankt genau um 15 Prozent, wenn man sie rechts... nach links betrachte
好的。最后那颗星是导航星（Navi），但不太容易辨认。我能看出误差可能出在哪里。我认为，如果用
稍等。
Ok. Con una picc
Okay
Гавайская капитанская конструкция. Сигма Семь. Гавайская капитанская конструкц
알겠습니다. 광대역 데드밴드 ATT 홀드로 전환합
Apo
Roger. 11, /: 45597, 0 - correction - that's minus 040, plus 157, plus 36325, minus 01727, plus 01428 180 003 000, November Alfa, plus 00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254; Scorpii Delta, down 103, left 48, plus 0742, minus 16500 13005 3
はい、それが彼で
حسنًا. أردنا طرحه قبل الوصول إلى أقصى مدى، ألا تعتقد ذلك؟ هل لديك فك
Roger, Columbia. Bien reçu concernant le gain élevé. Le relais unidirectionnel demandé est activé. L'équipage de la b
Okay, 11. We have a picture. We see the Earth right in the center of the screen. O
Je coupe le bus. Je vais supprimer
締め
了解。了解
Pour Fred. L
अगर इससे आपको कोई मदद मिले तो मैं आपको ओम्नी पर हाई बिट र
Aquarius, Houst
Oka
माइक, यहाँ आपकी चेकलिस्ट के पृष्ठ 97 पर, जहाँ हम सेटअप कर रहे हैं, उसके बाद पेंसिल से एक नोट लिखा हुआ है, "रेट को स्थिर होने के लिए 20 मिनट प्रतीक्षा करें। निगरानी न करें।" इसका महत्व यह है कि, यदि आप 16 की निगरानी कर रहे हैं, तो जब आप चरण 7 में यहाँ पहुँचते हैं, तो दूसरी बार जब आप 'a' करते हैं, तो आपको 
अच्छा, ठीक है। मुझे यहाँ बिल्कुल भी बोरियत नहीं हो रही है। मैं अभी थोड़ी देर पहले मिडवे के ऊपर से उड़ा था। उस
Hey Bill, kannst du uns sagen, welche Winkel das Gerät durchlaufen hat? Die Kurve, die wir aufgezeichnet haben, scheint eher die HF-Grenze als die mechanische Grenze darzustellen. Wenn wir über die Funktion des AUTO-REACQ-Modus
N
Anche i bambini al c
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. Buzz, you brought the surgeon right out 
ठीक है। हमें अंतरिक्ष यान से निकलते हुए कोई कण दिखाई नहीं दे रहे हैं। हमारा सुझाव है कि आप
Близнецы 4. Отрица
Ne hai tantissime. Molte di p
Okay, Fred. Ich glaube, du hast es verstanden. Ich habe deine Erklärung nicht ganz genau wiedergegeben, aber so einfach ist es. Wir setzen einfach die neue Kasset
На этом пока всё. Позже мы ещё кое-что расскажем о телевизоре. Я бы посоветовал вам подготовиться заранее, и если у вас возникнут какие-либо вопросы, задавайте их нам. У нас здесь ра
«Дружба Семь»
За всю поездку я использовал только пульсоксиметр
Spero che tu stia gu
لقد توقفتَ بعد خط
लेकिन हमें लगता है कि यह काफी छोटा
لا يزال الوضع جيدًا. لم يُحدث ذلك تغييرًا كبيرًا في أي من الاتجاهين، ولكن بشكل عام، بالنظر إلى بُعد المسافة، يبدو ال
जैक, मुझे साफ पता चल रहा है कि हम अब चांद से दूर जा रहे हैं। मैंने एक ही 
いよいよ
Apollo 11 erhält die erste Ansicht des Landeanflugs. Diesmal fliegen wir über den Taruntius-Krater, und die von Apollo 8 und 10 mitgebrachten Bilder und Karten haben uns eine sehr gute Vorschau auf das gegeben, was uns hier erwartet. Es sieht den Bildern sehr ähnlich, aber es ist wie der Unterschied zwischen einem echten Fußballspiel und dem, das man im Fernsehen sieht. Nichts ersetzt den Eindruck, selbst da
Installation du rideau anti-éclaboussures, du déflecteur d'air, poignée de recirculation d'air cabine vers le haut. Poignée du tuba gauche vers le haut, poignée de ventilation cabine vers le haut. Gâchette d'ouverture de la trappe relâchée. Vérifier que le joint d'étanchéité est abaissé et fermé. Attacher la dragonne, trappe gauche ouverte. Ranger l'équipement 
了解しま
А ваш небольшой маневр, предпринятый здесь минуту назад, позвол
Roger, Joe. Figured, if we're going to do this burn in now, I ought to give you an update on the contingency b
١١، نرجو منك التحويل إلى وضع الهوائي متعدد الاتجاهات (OMNI) حال
よ
نعم. ستكون
TEMP/PRESS
Roger, Bill. Ho capito che avete agitato la criocell
제 생각엔... 곧 
편안
여기
We have, as you probably know, several groups working on procedures from here on out. We have a group working on midcourse corrections to determine a system, the attitudes, how to do it, alinement techniques, and so forth. We have a group working on the entry, includ
平静，没错。再尝试锁定目标，大约
13, Houston. We se
The entire surface is getting considerably darker than the surface that we looked at previously when the Sun was quite high above us. The crater in the - bright crater in the center of the screen, - well, the smaller one is C
그래도 롤
Jim, während wir darauf warten, ob weitere Fragen auftauchen, möchte ich dir die
تم الت
우리는 복
الطريق أمامنا مباشرة تق
حسنًا، احذف فحص تسلسل المنطق عند الساعتين ا
Ok, Joe. Ho creato una nuova pagina qui chiamata -1A, punto 6, Trasferimento alla corrente e il solito controllo che il proiettore sia spento e che la spia di AVVERTENZA e ALIMENTAZIONE sia ACCESA; ho ricevuto una comunicazione da Jack e te la riferirò. Punto 7, INTERRUTTORE AUTOMATICO CONGIUNTORE BUS TRANSLUNARE, pannelli 11 e 16, CHIUSO. Fase 8, interruttore automatico illuminazione e utenza sul pannello 1, CHIUSO, e accendi le luci di utenza. Tuttavia, l'illuminazione è 
罗杰。距离第二次中期修正燃烧还有不到一个小时。我们建议您在此结束作业，继续进行废水倾倒作业（我们
Bene. Ciclo della ventola criogenica; farò fu
Vous m'entendez? Transmission du prochain rapport: 9h48, vol en bon état. L'obturateur 1 fonctionne correctement. L'index est en mouvement. Pression cabine 1, humidité 65, température 20 °C, pression dans le compartiment 1,2, manuel 150, premier au
يبدو أن هناك مكاناً راكداً في خوذتي. البدلة ب
うん、悪くないだろう？酸素
أت
Я снова в режиме VOX. Ты меня слышишь, Дик? У меня получился красивый крен на 90 градусов влево. Вот это да, какой красивый восьмиточечный кр
2분만 기다려주
D'
OK. Je suis en configura
As the booster departed us, you could see the fuel spraying out of the roll nozzle. As the booster tu
Circuit b
알겠습니다. 저희는 MAX 범위 출시 전에 먼저 알려드리고 싶었어요. 언제쯤 출시될지 대략적
第11集，你
.
Roger. Ic
了解。プラス0858、マイナス16500、12960、36195。北の星座はシリウスとリゲル、ロール129、ピッチ155、ヨー010、アレージは2クワッド
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन, यह मुचेआ कैप कॉम है। क्या 
Это было действительно тяжело, Майк. Над предполагаемой зоной посадки была ужасная неровность, вся в воронках, и повсюду вал
जी हाँ, बिल्कुल। बहुत भीड़ है। हमारा ज़्यादातर सामान पैरों के नीचे वाली जगह में है, और मुझे लगता है कि हमें दोबारा अंदर आत
11, Houston. La nostra impressione del pannello 11 è che diventa più luminoso, poi più scuro. Stai modificando l'apertu
Okay. Damit wir die Antennenumschaltung übernehmen können, sollten w
11번, 휴스턴. 산소 유량 관련해서, 연료 전지 3번의 경우 퍼지 과정에서 다른 두 개보다 유량이 약간 높았던 것 같지만, 유량은
Ich beschleunigte mit etwa 1,5 m/s auf die Trägerrakete zu. Mein Trennmanöver dauerte ungefähr 6 oder 7 Sekunden. Ich beschleunigte mit etwa 1,5 bis 1,8 m/s auf die Trägerrakete zu und beobachtete dann die Trennung. Anschließend beschleunigte ich nochmals mit etwa 1,5 m/s. Es sah so aus, als ob wir uns näherten – wir näherten uns seitlich und schätzungsweise in einer Höhe von 180
Это подтверждается. У нас здесь довольно сложная процедура, но, если коротко, вы используете пластик в качестве покрытия для всей конструкции. Вы устанавливаете какой-то уплотнитель сверху, чтобы пластик не прилипал к входной стороне LiOH. Вам понадобится серая лента, чтобы склеить все вместе, и что-то вроде носка
はい、待機してくださ
ああ、あの光学系には本当にがっかりした。あの望遠
Джим, ранее вечером Фред-о сообщил о выбро
Kilo 0,9 und 6,3. Danke. Ein solches Rasterfeld entspri
Santo cielo, dev'essere una v
알겠습니다. 절차는 ENTER, 333, ENTER 순으로 입력하고 레지스터 1의 값을 읽어냅니다. 그런 다음 10,000을 입력하면 컴퓨터가 메모리 내
Columbia, Houston. Ne cherchez pas à le rattraper, contentez-vous de ce que 
收到。我们准备就
ठीक है। कैनरी द्वीप समूह के लिए आपके पास 1 मिनट का समय है। अंतरिक
Okay
了解、ジェミ
Roger. Nous avons ici l'Interstellar Times, édition du
11, qui Houston. 5 SPS/G&N
了解です。燃焼ルールです。1. 推力モニターが77%以下の場合、2. 推進剤のアレージ
Non, je pense à la 
Мы до сих пор не можем получить ответ от космическ
Scott, I think they are reflecting. I'm going to go ahead now, Scott, and do some yaw check as long as I've got some good terrain to look at and leave the particle
Salve, Base Tranquility. Houston. Per quanto riguarda il nostro sistema di ventilazione e il problema del carburante, lo scambiatore di calore è a posto. Abbiamo sentito che il ghiaccio si è 
आपको समझ में आया होगा कि अब हमारे पास प्लेटफॉर्म को संरेखित करने के 
まあ、それはど
रॉजर। ठीक है। मैं समझ गया। ठीक है। हम डालेंगे, एंटर, 7
تشير البيانات الحالية إلى أن زاوية دخولك هي -6.03 درجة. تبلغ سرعة تغير السرعة (DELTA-V) في منتصف المسار 2.8 ق
Okay. First thing, we've made no provisions in these instructions for taking pictures of the moon. If you get some m
Игл, Колумбия. Я хотел бы вернуться к настройке опред
読み取りスイッチをオンにしてください - 訂正します
...여기서 당신을 읽습
ठीक है, तैयार हो? 3
आ
了解しました。コンピューターは接続され、検証済みです。ブロックに移動してください。約45秒後にはここに表示されます。とにかく、始めましょう。タイムベー
Houston, Apollo 11. J'ai maintenu ici le taux de b
よし。バックミラーを変えて、もし可能であれば気象庁の写真も撮ってこよう。残りを軽く撃っておこう。これがA10で、11が近づいてきて、左に雲がかかっている。よし。プレートを戻して、これを
Est-ce celui où Jack a tout consigné par écrit? Le long compte-rendu? Il 
13, Houston. Vorremmo che apriste il circuito de
Sigma Seven, qui Indian Com Tech. Vi ho se
Houston, Tranquility wartet auf GO, um sich mit einer Mondphase auszuri
रॉजर, 11. मेरे पिछले संदेश में सुधार। 73:20 पर, हम आपको नया संदेश अपलोड करेंगे। और 73:30 पर,
Odyssey, Houston. Wir benötigen einen Befehl zum Zurücksetzen Ihres COMM-Geräts. Anschließend möchten wir Sie bitten, das
Okay. Radiazioni: CDR 11009, CMP 1
ठीक है, जैक, इस स्थिति में, जिसमें हम इधर-उधर हिल रहे हैं, मैं तारों 
حسنًا. سنحتاج إلى هوائي عالي الكسب، ولا ين
きれいな星がいくつか見えています。それと、カプセル自体から出てきて漂っていくような小さな白い物体も見えます。もしあれがヨーイングチェックだとしたら、素晴らしいですね。私が見ている星はアークトゥルスではないかと思っています。もしそうだったらとても興味深いのですが、どちらでもありません。白い物体の1つです…2つの星は全く静止しています。白い物体は実際にはこちらに向かって来ているように見えましたが、そうではありませんでした。ジョンが描写したように、粒子が旋盤の削りかすのように飛んでいくのが今、実際に見えます。まさにその描写です
Roger. Ho un
Sarò felice di dormire lì, va bene? Non credo che influenzerà la cosa; preferisco dormire, preferisco dormire con la sonda e il farmaco piut
Хорошо. Вы имеете в виду, что если посмотреть на лапу кота, то это примерно, ну, о, его средний п
아, 잠깐만, 잭. 근지점이라고 했어, 아니면 근일
D'accord. Barrez la première ligne à droite de cette page, qui indique « allumé pendant 4 secondes, 50 images par seconde, objectif de couvert
जी हां। अब आपको कंप्यूटर पर 37 एंटर 06 एंटर टाइप करना होगा। हमें कंप्यूटर को स्टैंडबाय मोड में डालना है। अगर आपको 37 06 टाइप करना है, तो आपको कोड 62 प्राप्त करने के लिए एंटर दबाना होगा। अगर कोड 62 आता है, तो आप खाली जगह तक प्रोसीड बटन दबा सकते हैं। आपको याद होगा कि इस समय एसी बंद है, इसलिए आपको स्टैंडबाय स्टेटस लाइट नहीं दिखेगी, और कंप्यूटर के स्टैंडबाय मोड में जाने का संकेत तब मिलेगा जब
로저. 무체아에서 보내주신 최근 보고서 잘 받았습니다
わかりまし
Ricevuto. Capisco. A breve sostituiremo il filtro, il riscaldatore della linea di spurgo è acceso ***, tra poco verranno spurgati O2 e H2 e a 148 ore avvieremo una carica sulla batteria A fino a nuova comunicazione. A 150 ore, lo scarico delle acque reflue sarà al 10%. E non vediamo l'ora di raggiungere la correzione di metà percorso 5 a circa 1,5 metri al secondo al tempo nominale. Fini
네, 마지막으로 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 결정이 내려지기 전에 계속 설명드리겠습니다. 허용 가능한 데드밴드는 660~770psi입니다. 다시 말해, 이 두 값 사이의 압력을 발생시키는 상승 시간은 약 103시간 후에 임계 압력 이하로 유지됩니다. 따라서 압력이 이 범위 내에 있으면 문제가 없습니다. 만약 압력이 770~800psi 사이로 측정되면 약 59시간 후에 다시 압력을 측정해 주셔야 합니다. 자세한 절차는 잠시 후에 알려드리겠습니다. 압력이 800psi 이상이면 좀 더 자세한 절차를 진행해야 합니다. 우선 PCM 데이터를 확보하는 등의 조치를 취해야 합니다. 정확한 상승 시간을 확인하고 계기판이 딸깍 소리를 내며 올라가는 시점을 알아내려면 잠시 동안 계기판을 응시하셔야 할 수도 있습니다. 극단적인 경우에는 연소 과정을 고려해야 할 수도 있지만, 실제로 그런 일이 발생할 가능성은 낮다고 생각합니다. 자, 이제 필기할 
هذا صحيح، أ
Роджер. Это время по Гринвичу 14:53:21. Ваш G
Frank, das hat man dir wahrscheinlich schon gesagt, aber du sahst heute im Fernsehen fantastisch aus. Eine kleine Anekdote am Rande: I
로저. 그런 것 같군, 버즈. 그들에게 알아보라고 하고, 
Jim, finora abbiamo tralasciato so
Ja, das hatte ich befürchte
分かりました。それについてはいくつか興味深いアイデアがあり、最近聞いたのは、プラットフォームを強化して調整し、CM
Roger, Frank. Nous aimerions vous interroger sur le programme des prochaines heures. Nous serions tentés de laisser Jim dormir et de reporter l'intervention prévue à [heure manquante]. Cependant, nous pensons qu'il serait préférable qu'il reprenne un rythme de sommeil plus normal; et si vous le faisiez se lever pour qu'il travaille, il serait peut-être prêt à se rendormir vers [heure manquante], comme p
존, 하층부를 통과하고 있어. 충돌 준비나 해둬. 
OK, zone de manœuvre, objectif: survol, /G&N; 63385; + 0,97, - 0,23; + 0212,7,
Пока всё работает хорошо, Чарли. Один установлен на 
No, Frank is asleep now. We'll get these out of the way. So I'm co
That's corre
Und was ich eigentlich zeigen wollte – ich weiß nicht, ob es offensichtlich ist –, aber … um den Vorteil zu verdeutlichen, alle Aufnahmen kurz vor dem Brennen zu machen, sehen wir uns dieselbe Szene über Quad 1 beim Mond noch einmal an. Und jetzt sieht man die ganzen glitzernden, gefrorenen Partikel
Bien sûr que oui! –
Ok, Jack. Torna alla procedura di carica della batteria che ti ho indicato. E, per terminare la carica, devi solo scrivere "Aperto" o "Spento" accanto all'interruttore di circuito che ti ho indicato. Quindi, sul pannello 250, l'interruttore che hai già aperto; sul pannello 275, INVERTER POWER-2 MAIN B, aperto; pannello 5, BUS RELÈ BATTERIA BAT A, aperto; UNITÀ SENSORE AC BUS 2, aperto, SEGNALE SENSORE AC2, aperto; CARICABATTERIE, MAIN B, aperto; CARICABATTERIE AC POWER, aperto; CARICABATTERIE, CARICA BATTERIA A, a
Wir nähern uns den Kratern Colombo und Gutenberg. Sehr gute Details sind erkennba
À
そして、オデッセイ、姿勢制御についてはアクエリアスと連携するよう要請
V
Roger. Forty-four is just not bright enough for this. There's a reddish glow filling the black area of the sextant, and the star is lost somewhere in there, and I cannot
좋습니다, 11. 이번 임무에서 지금까지 두 번의 연소 동안 엔진 성능은 엔진 인수 시험 때와 동일한 것으로 나타났습니다. 온보드 PC 판독값은 실제 연소실 압력과 게이지 판독값 사이의 알려진 게이지 보정 계수
रॉजर। हम इस 2 बर्न 
Compris. Nous disposons de données télémé
구
12분이면 카
はい。ヴァンス、ちょうど角を曲がった時に、地震があったと聞きました。今は位置は覚えていませんが、衝撃があったそうです。地震計に記録され
Sì, l'ho fatto. Vuoi rimuovere - Vuoi alimentare entrambi i bus, con gli interruttori del motore BUS TIE; prima di tutto, per verificare che non ci siano carichi sui bus, e in secondo luogo, e poi togliere l'alimentazione ai bus tirando gli interruttori automatici per garantire che gli interruttori del motore non 
로저, 쌍둥이자리 4. 이제 혈압을
Gémeaux 4, Chirurgien de Carnarvon. Pourriez-vous garder la sonde de température dans votre bouche pendant la prise de tension a
...हम अभी f:4 के आसपास अपर्चर सेट कर रहे हैं, जो हमें लगा कि काफी होगा। खैर
ロジャー、ヒューストン。それが今まさに私たちがやろうとしていることです。光学装置のために15度に調整しようとしています。地球が明るいので、六分儀
把香肠递给我
好了，
D'accord. La pression de l'hélium est d'environ 37, la pression d'admission est de 182 et la quantité est de 80. En B, la température est d'environ 112, la pression de l'hélium d'environ 36,5, la pression du carburant de 180 et la quantité d'environ 77. En C, la température est de 140; d'ailleurs, les autres températures auraient dû être de 120 au lieu de 110; je consultais le mauvais étalonnage. La pression 
オーケー、
रॉजर। रक्तचाप—शुरू—अभी। मेरा बैलून—अभी—मेरे नीचे काफी स्थिर है, हिल न
Хорошо. На боковой с
ねえフ
ジムの言う通りだ。いくつか例外を除いて、この項目はすべて削除しよう。最初のステップ「FORWARD DUMP valve, closed」は残しておこう。最後のステップ「OVERHEAD DUMP valve, closed」を除いて、他のステップはすべて削除しよう。これで
阿波罗8号，在我们等待高增益期间，我将继续进行轨迹概要。我们仍然可以从13号返回太平洋中线，你们将在点火138秒后开始返回。138秒足以让你们脱离蝶形区。我们建议在20秒后不要尝试预点火或重启。如果超过20秒，轨迹可能会超出修正范围——修正能力足以让飞船自由返回
Schau dir
ああ、そう
Roger. J'ai besoin d'une position très précise, car
收到。扫描仪已关闭
Okay. 
Ok, Jack. Non vogliamo che tu chiuda gli ultimi due. Sono modif
알겠습니다. 테이
11, Houston. Ce n'est pas encore en serv
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 지금 소변 투기를 진행하는 데에는 아무런 이의가 없습니다. 그리고 참고로 말씀드리자면, 폐수 투기는 저희 일정상 약 90% 정도까지 미룰 예정입니다. 평소보다 조금 높지만, 연소 과정이 완료된 후로 미루려고 했습니다. 앞으로 산소 연료 전지 퍼지 작업도 있고, 항성 랜드마크 관측 삭제
تكلم عن نفسك يا إدوارد. ح
Okay. We're rolling around to a good view of the earth, and as soon as
ठीक है। मैं बस आपको इस बात से अवगत कराना चाहता था और इस पर विचार करना चाहता था कि उड़ान योजना पर इसके क्या प्रभाव पड़ सकते हैं। मैं इस वाइड एंगल वीडियो को चलाकर चंद्रमा के बारे में टिप्पणी करूँगा और देखूँगा कि उनके अनुसार कौन से खंड सबसे उपयुक्त होंगे। ठीक है। स्क्रॉल पर, फ्रैंक चाहते थे कि हम प्रवेश प्रोफ़ाइल के क्रम की पुष्टि करें, और जो पहली प्रोफ़ाइल दिखाई देगी, उसे "नॉनएक्ज़िट नंबर 2" के रूप में चिह्नित किया गया है, जो अल्प-श्रेणी उच्च-गति प्रवेश है। दूसरी प्रोफ़ाइल जो दिखाई देगी, उसका शीर्षक "3500 मील" है, जो भी उच्च-गति प्रवेश है, लेकिन इसका उपयोग तब किया जाएगा जब हम लंबी दूरी की प्रवेश सीमा पर जाएँगे। फिर तीसरी प्रोफ़ाइल "नॉनएक्ज़िट एंट्री नंबर 1" होगी, और इसके बाद चौथी 3500 मील की प्रोफ़ाइल होगी। तो आपके पास चार प्रवेश प्रोफ़ाइल हैं। नंबर 1 और 3, जैसे ही आप उन पर पहुँचेंगे, अल्प-श्रेणी की हैं, और नंबर 2 और 4 लंबी दूरी की स्क्रॉल हैं। कोल्डसोक के बारे में, मुझे लगता है कि हमने इस बारे में बात की थी कि हम वहाँ क्या करने वाले हैं, लेकिन लगभग एक घंटे के भीतर, हम कोल्डसोक प्रक्रिया शुरू करना चाहेंगे। हम निश्चित रूप से इसे 12 बजे नहीं करना चाहते। ट्रैजेक्टरी टीम से बात करते हुए - पानी उबलने के बारे में उनके क्या विचार थे - ध्यान रखने वाली बात यह है कि वे आपके ट्रैजेक्टरी प्लॉट पर आपके पानी क
Wo sind diese Di
而且，以你的运气，
هل قلت إنها كانت رحلته العشرين إلى هناك في وقت عيد ال
Roger.
جيميني 4، جيميني 4، هذا هو مركز اتصالات آر كي ف
好的，休斯顿。你
Well, we stopped and went through coarse align of and then we got fine align, and pick-a-pair, pick Capella, but she drove and didn't get to any place. I di
我没看到哪里要求我们这样做，不过我想这样也行。我觉得我们应该在第一遍的时
D'accord, Fred. Voilà pour les DELTA. Et vous avez peut-être entendu dire que nos GAMMA sont toujours à -
Roger, Mike. That's real ni
Yes. That's about it. It wasn't a rapid change in resistive force. And also I noticed when I took the bit off that the material was quite well packed, a good bit darker, and it - The way it adhered to the core tube gave me the distinct impression of being
再突入姿勢に入った時のタイムは1秒650秒でした。星はとてもよく見え
يا فريد، نحن نحقق نتائج أفضل قليلاً فيما يتعلق بالمياه مما كنا نتوقع. لقد صممنا حساباتنا على أساس استهلاك 3.5 رطل في الساعة؛ ونحن نستخدم حوالي 3.0 رطل، ونتوقع أن
Ну, давайте дадим им посмотреть на основ
왜 B사분면의 수치가 다른 세사분면에 비해 
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है। यदि आप संदेश भेज रहे हैं, तो हम प्राप्त नहीं कर 
Хорошо. Сейчас мы как раз подошли к тому моменту, когда, согласно составленному для вас плану полета, вы все должны были закончить 
아쿠아리
내 신호에 맞춰
最後に私に読んでもらった数字は、星番
Gemelli 4, chirurgo RKV. Puoi pomparlo ancora una 
Gemini VI, we'r
로저,
Aquarius, 
好的。我追踪了一颗明亮的星星，我相信它在天鹰座。事实上，我非常确定。我能看到那两颗目标星。我一路追踪它，它几乎已经到达顶端了。它马上就要离开我的视野了。我从底部开始追踪它，花了3分23秒才到达顶
ठीक है, आखिरी बार जब हमने सिनॉप्टिक टेरेन फोटोग्राफी का इस्तेमाल किया, तो हमने सैन डिएगो के थोड़ा पूर्व से शुरू करके बादलों के घेरे में आने तक लगभग 38 तस्वीरें लीं। जैसे ही हम संयुक्त राज्य
Tutto be
로저, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 보고를 계속해 주
はい、見えています。地球の境界線に近い部分は見えていません。地球の暗い部分は、私たちが捉えられていない部
Gemini 4, это Гавайи передают данные вслепую. Рыскание — 0°, тангаж — 60°, немного правее вас, курс вверх, 300 морских миль. Повторяю еще раз. Вслепую, Гавайи передают данные, 01 39 00, Pegasus, Рыскание — 
フリーモードではロールオフされないと
Magnifique. FONCTION EMS DÉSACTIVÉ
好的。氮原子在
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11. क्या
मुझे लगता है कि 
收到。一切进展顺利。我的状态非常好。太空舱状态也非常好。控制模式正常。自动陀螺仪正常，机动功能已关闭。燃料量为72-10
روجر. لقد قمت بالتب
Les serviettes bleues de 
Bon, dans cette position, Jack, avec tous ces mouvements, je ne peux pas utiliser le télescope pour voir les étoiles. On ne les voit absolument pas. On pourrait peut-être manœuvre
Подождите. Мы наход
Roger. Understand the description there. And the next subject, on the two core tubes which you collected, how did the driving force required to collect these tubes compar
Roger, Aurora Seven. Kano Cap Com vi riceve forte e 
Роджер: герме
Okay. Following Tommy Jacobs, we have the hot smoking word from a local Houston astrologer by the name of Ruby Graham. She says that all the signs are right for your trip to the Moon. Neil is clever, Mike has good judgment, and Buzz can work out intricate problems. She also says Neil tends to see the world through rose colored glasses but is always ready to help the afflicted or distressed. Neil, you are also sup
了解。どうやら昨夜、チャーリーバッテリーとアルファバッテリー、ブラボーバッテリーのオンボードデータを入手できなかったようです。最新の数値を教えていただけま
ええ、そうですね。スポーツ面は、あまり動きがありません。UCLAは両方のバスケットボールの投票でトップです。もし何か特定のチームについて聞きたいことがあれば、教えてください。どちらの投票でもトップ10に入っているかどうかお教えします。明日行われる大学オールスターゲーム、ノースチームに関しては、ノースがサウスチームをわずかに上回っています。ノースチームのコーチはアラ・パーセギアンで、ノートルダム大学の選手6名が彼の下にいるため、かなり手強いはずです。サウスチームのコーチはクレムソン
Hey Ken. Hier 
D'ac
Wir befinden uns momentan in einer sehr flachen Fluglage, sodass die Bodenstationen uns vermutlich nicht orten können. Wir haben zwar einige Funksprüche gehört, die immer wieder unterbrochen wurden, aber wir bleiben noch eine Weile in dieser Position, um die Boosterstufe im Blick zu behalten. Im Moment scheinen wir nicht viel näher an die Boosterstufe heranzukommen. Sie ist anscheinend immer noch ungefähr gleich weit entfernt. Als die Boosterstufe unter uns war, sah der Himmel fast sternenklar aus. So viel Treibstoff strömte aus der Boosterstu
휴스턴
Alor
D'accord, ma solution de secours est de 2 pieds par seconde en montée et de 23 pieds par seconde en avant, ce qui nous amènera à cette position. Nous effectuerons
فريندشيب سفن، غوايماس كاب كوم. لدينا مؤشر على تراج
بدأت عملية تنظيف خلية الوقود، وسأنتقل إلى 15، وسأبدأ اختبار تثبيت الدوران بمقدار ثلاثة أعشار الدر
روجر سي إس كيو. شكراً جزيلاً
Ricevuto. Computer spento. IGS su 
你好，Woomera，Woomera C
Roger. Du bist zwar schwach, aber sehr deutlich. Es wird besser. Könntest du bitte bestätigen, dass der Radiator auf FLOW, der Adapter-C-Band auf CONT
We can
Va bene. Va bene
That is a
로저입니다. 저는 조종사입니다. 약 3시간 전에 2일차 두 번째 식사를 했습
はい、私のコンピュータ
R
아니요. 아니요, 그는 녹음기를 가지고 
Affirmative. Je possède un laissez-pas
تمام. وضع التحكم يدوي؛ الجيروسكوبات مغلقة؛ المناورة معطلة. انتظر لح
Roger, Muchea Cap Com. Message cla
Roger
حسناً. 
杰克
Und zurück in Washington stimmte der Finanzausschuss des Repräsentantenhauses Steueränderungen zu, die Ölkonzerne, Banken und Energieversorger betreffen und die Bundeseinnahmen um fast zwei Milliarden Dollar pro Jahr erhöhen könnten. Außerdem kündigte die NASA heute an, 1972 eine große Orbitalstation mit einer verkleinerten Version der Saturn V zu starten. Ihre Fer
Bene. E tu, Jac
舱内积水指示灯亮着，时间是 03:56:24。我打算把水温调低一点——大概到潜水服所在的位置。我估计，水温已经降到冰点
Vorrebbero che t
알겠습니다. 아주 흥미롭네요. 그게 당신과 비교해서 어디쯤에 위치하는지 알아볼게요. S-IV가 우리에게 미치는 영향에 대한 정보가 계속 업데이트되고 있어요. 최근 예상으로는 우리가 알려드린 경도와 거의 같은 위치에 영향을 미치지만,
Роджер. Четыре из восьми сигналов тревоги автоматических выключателей показывают красный уровень опасности. Автоматические выключатели пока отключены. Насколько я понимаю, в данный момент мы только что подключились к записи 3052 и готовы приступить к пожару. Норм
Я выключаю шину. Я собираюсь избавиться от эт
はい、大丈夫です
Roger. 
了解。良いデータが取れま
Хорошо. Температура измерена правильно. Удалите датчик. Как вы чи
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप प
收到。光学校准姿态：横滚 330.5，俯仰 086.3，偏
Bene. Nella riga 4: sotto RISCALDATORI, i riscaldatori QUAD dovrebbero essere chiusi
Okay. We're still going through the tracking, and as you know, we're going to hold down on the water dumps and so forth during the last couple of hours in and out, sort of aid the tracking procedures. Everything is running along the line normally now. Do you have any other specific questions? We are looking for an angle on the moon. I gu
Okay. 10, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35186, minus 01512, minus 00520 180 007 000, November Alfa, plus 00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253; Scorpii Delta, unten 069, links 45, plus 0748, minus 16500 12994 36300; Hauptstern Sirius, Begleitstern Rigel, 129 155 010
दरअसल, माइक, आठ-बॉल से इसे करना इतना आसान है कि उचित सीमा के भीतर इसे देखने के लिए सीट पर बहुत आगे खिसकने की कोई ज़रूरत नहीं है, और कॉकपिट में इतनी रोशनी है कि तारा आसानी से दिखाई नहीं देता। इसलिए मैं यहाँ IFR तकनीक का उपयोग करना पसंद करूँगा, जिससे आप इंस्ट्
هذا صحيح يا فانس. السدس كله - إنه - إنه كله ضبابي، وأي مذنب يمكن رؤيته من خلاله سيضي
جهاز الإر
Houston, comment recevez-vous les messages? Ici Apol
Ich
Говорите медл
13, Houston. Tuttavia, il numero che hai letto sulla telecamer
Gemini 4, pourriez-vous tenter une autre réinitialisation suite à ce dysfonctionnement informatiqu
Roger. Ich werde einen 5-Sekunden-Countdown bis zum Start de
Okay. Die automatische Verstärkungsregelu
收到。明白了。我们
好的
Il colore della luna sembra un grigio molto biancastro, simile 
알겠습니다, 밴스. 제가 알려주신 절차를 처음부터 끝까지, 특
我想是的，不过让我再确认一下。水瓶座，休斯顿。没错。你可以随时抛弃服务模块
네, 저희도 그 점을 고려했
روجر. كنا
Jim ha appena visto un altro satellite. Non ce l'ha ancora descritto come ha fatto con l'altro. Questo era a 37. Non era corretto. Correggilo a
Roger. Verstanden. Wir werden den Filterwechsel in Kürze durchführen, die Spülleitungsheizung ist eingeschaltet, die O₂- und 
حسنًا، هذا صحيح يا جيم. كان هناك الكثير من التشويش، ولم نتمكن من تسجيل الجزء الأوسط، لكن أعتقد أن هذا واضح لك تمامًا، ولا داعي لإعا
ピッチするジンバル角度 - ピッチダウン 70 の場合 - 
Yes, you're into - a 
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। मध्यमार्ग सुधार संख्या 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, पिच और यॉ ट्रिम अनुपलब्ध, TIG 150 29 5453, माइनस 00048, सभी गेंदों को जोड़ें, प्लस 00001 075 159 328; HA अनुपलब्ध है; HP प्लस 00230 00048 011 00048; सेक्स्टेंट तारा 03 0908 382. बोरसाइट तारा ब्लॉक
这里看不清楚。我觉得我看到了地平线——就在那边，但我……离
Canary, Friendship Seven. Roger. C
飞掠机动 / 62954，减 162，加 129 953 578 - 这些是 00953 和加 000578 - 减 02076 000 000 000，不适用，加 00202，02356 022 02280 03 0393 310 013，上 048，右 35，加 1418，减 165 05 12904 36160，天狼星，参宿七 137 
أبول
了解、グアイマス、はっきりと。操縦モードはフライ・バイ・ワイヤになりました。ジャイロはケージド、操縦はオフです。すぐに自動モードに移行します。私の状態は良好です。カプセルの状態も良好です。燃料は69～69パーセント、酸
分かりました。BAT Cの電圧は全く計測できていません。電流は2アンペアくらいに見えますが、ノイズレベルの
Okay. Jim, während wir an diesem Vorgang arbeiten, möchten wir wissen, ob Sie 01 ausgewählt haben und di
Okay. Ich habe folgende Details zum Flugplan für Sie. Da es keine -3 gibt, streichen Sie bitte alle Anweisungen für die Kursmitte, einschließlich des Bindestrichs, der bei etwa 54,50 Stunden ange
ブースターが私たちから離れた時、ロール ノズルから燃料が噴き出すのが見えました。ブースターが回転するにつれ、宇宙船の主軸からブースターまでを結ぶ線に垂直な面を回転しながら回転し、そこから長く流れるような尾が出てく
. TRANSLATIONSSTEUERUNG, NE
Ok, Jack. L'aggiornamento del piano di volo contiene un pa
在那里你只会犯一个非常严
هل لديك
أجل، لا بأس. لا
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Excusez-nous de vous déranger, mais nous aimerions qu
Ich habe (unleserlich) etwas (unleserlich) R
Okay. Holen wir uns die Tantiemen. Okay, Houston, da sind 
यह यहाँ अंदर-बाहर हो रहा है; मैं इसे मैन्युअल रूप स
Très bien. J'ai relu: 11, G&N: 37200, moins 060, plus 047, plus 098, 05 2422, plus 41448, plus 03719, moins 02422; N
ロジャー、地図の最
ठीक है। मेरे पास आपकी व
D'acc
ジム、君の飛行距離は10
네, 말씀이 맞는 것 같아요. 정말 처진 게 확연히 보이네요. 특히 모서리, 가장
호주 코로나19가 
了解しました。私たちは、10ピンバルブを手動にするか、部分的に
알겠습니다. RKV에서 조종사의 1종 의료 통행증에
Okay. In der vierten Reihe. Öffnen – Von links die ersten fünf öffnen – Korrektur – die ersten fünf schließen und CABIN FAN 1 öffnen. Die drei GLYCOL PUMP-Leistungsschalter schließen; alle COMM-Leistungsschalter öffnen, außer COMMANDER'S A
Tutta quella procedura per P22 sembrava funzionare molto bene. L'unica cosa un po' strana è che c'era un po' di attività dei propulsori DAP. Avevo beccheggio in ACCEL COMMAND, e rollio e imbardata in RATE COMMAND, e in qualche modo rollio e imbardata si sono eccitati, e il DAP ha iniziato a sparare una raffica di propulsori. Abbiamo notato 
Friendship Seven, would you take 
Роджер. Я скопировал, и яйца морского ежа а
Okay,
Roger. Questo è quello 
好的，Odyssey；休斯顿。我们现
먼저, 전반적인 건강 상태에 대해 몇 가지 질문드리겠습니다. 수면의 질은 
О, мы просто хотели, чтобы вы замкнули выключатель датчика CO2 и предоставили нам бортовые данные из Eagle, но это всё. Колумбия, Хьюсто
This exp
حسنًا. فهمت. دعنا نرى ما لدينا أيضًا يا جيم. يبدو أن مسار الهبوط الثاني (Midcourse-2) يتحرك بسرعة 23 قدمًا في الثانية تقريبًا، في اتجاه عكسي وفي الوقت المحدد. وهو ثابت تمامًا الآن. للعلم فقط، ولا
حسنًا. عند زاوية العمود 006.2، وزاوية المحور 1
Que
ما رأيك في تناول زبدة الفول السو
了解しました。ジェミ
Another little thing about this: you know, we had it set up when we separated from the
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्टन। मिथुन 4
Das wäre es dann wohl g
This is Friendship Seven. I now have control in low thrust to the lef
And also, President Nixon has reported - or declared a day of participation on Monday for all federal employees to enable everybody to follow your activities on the surface. Many state and city governments and businesses throughout the country are also giving their employees the day off, so it looks like you're goi
Croiriez-vous que vous avez sous les yeux un ragoût de poulet? Il vous suffit de faire mijoter 90 ml d'eau chaude pendant 5 à 10 minutes. On utilise un petit robinet a
Хорошо, мы — мы контроли
わかった。残りは私がやる。そして君に渡す――い
アポロ8号、アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン、ヒュース
罗杰
Roger. Parfait. On va se renseigner auprès de l'équipe SPAN et vous tenir au courant demain matin. Si vous devez nous appeler ce 
मुझे कभी समझ नहीं आएगा कि जब आप इन तीन 3500 पाउंड के रॉ
لا أستطيع تحديد ا
حسنًا، شروق الشمس - سأبدأ بتصوير غروب الشمس الذي مضى، ولكن كان من الم
Buzz, wir haben absolut nichts auszusetzen. Es is
13，现在
حسناً. يج
로저. 1, /: 62844 마이너스 161, 플러스 12
Привет, Джим. Примерно через 2 минуты у нас будет передача управления, и связь временно прервётся. Переключать антенны не нужно.
Джим, мертвая зона и так хо
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。你们刚才还在戈德斯通航天中心附
Columbia, Co
Роджер, Джим. Рождественское утро в вашем доме прошло как-то тихо, — гово
Roger. Copy. Sounds good to us, Tranquility. We'll let you press on through the simul
Il me semble que les deux points qui restent à éclair
فرانك، هل ستحتاج إلى مسطرة
Roger. VHF Sim
नहीं, मैं नहीं देख सका। शायद आपने मुझे गलत समझा। मुझे कोई इ
ठीक है। और अगर संभव हो तो, 
وكن على علم يا فانس، بأننا نتلقى العديد من الصدى في وصلة الاتصا
Roger. You're 
わかりました、ジャック。上から始めましょう。わかりました。クライオタンク; H2 1は230を示し、2も同様です。私たちのO2クライオタンク1は- 300でかろうじて持ちこたえているようです。そして、クライオタンク2は、H2 1は73、2、74を示しています。O2側では、O2 1の量は76で、O2は最大スケールの上限に固定されています。ラジアン温度は、プライマリ入口は約55を示し、ラジアン出口は約30を示し、セカンダリ出口は52度を示しています。そして蒸発器出口温度は45、蒸気圧力は0.17、グリコール排出は48です。スーツコンプレッサーはゼロを示しています。アキュムレータは30を示しています。 H2O WASTE は約 34 を示しています。POTABLE は約 98 を示しています。SECONDARY R
Apollo 11, this is H
Hey, hast du das schon überwunden, M
来自华盛顿：“这个圣诞节，世界因和平的希望而充满光明。当和平到来，当希望化为现实，当枪炮再次沉寂之时，
9.
로저. SPS/G&N 근접 비행: 62815, +0.97, -0.20 0.70 54 5944, -0.002
Uffa! Sento un odore, ma non credo sia catti
ठीक है। मैं बस आपको इस बात से अवगत कराना चाहता था और इस पर विचार करना चाहता था कि उड़ान योजना पर इसके क्या प्रभाव पड़ सकते हैं। मैं इस वाइड एंगल वीडियो को चलाकर चंद्रमा के बारे में टिप्पणी करूँगा और देखूँगा कि उनके अनुसार कौन से खंड सबसे उपयुक्त होंगे। ठीक है। स्क्रॉल पर, फ्रैंक चाहते थे कि हम प्रवेश प्रोफ़ाइल के क्रम की पुष्टि करें, और जो पहली प्रोफ़ाइल दिखाई देगी, उसे "नॉनएक्ज़िट नंबर 2" के रूप में चिह्नित किया गया है, जो अल्प-श्रेणी उच्च-गति प्रवेश है। दूसरी प्रोफ़ाइल जो दिखाई देगी, उसका शीर्षक "3500 मील" है, जो भी उच्च-गति प्रवेश है, लेकिन इसका उपयोग तब किया जाएगा जब हम लंबी दूरी की प्रवेश सीमा पर जाएँगे। फिर तीसरी प्रोफ़ाइल "नॉनएक्ज़िट एंट्री नंबर 1" होगी, और इसके बाद चौथी 3500 मील की प्रोफ़ाइल होगी। तो आपके पास चार प्रवेश प्रोफ़ाइल हैं। नंबर 1 और 3, जैसे ही आप उन पर पहुँचेंगे, अल्प-श्रेणी की हैं, और नंबर 2 और 4 लंबी दूरी की स्क्रॉल हैं। कोल्डसोक के बारे में, मुझे लगता है कि हमने इस बारे में बात की थी कि हम वहाँ क्या करने वाले हैं, लेकिन लगभग एक घंटे के भीतर, हम कोल्डसोक प्रक्रिया शुरू करना चाहेंगे। हम निश
我从5号窗户往外看，看到的似乎是……，我看到两股烟柱，呈两条非常窄的带状，大概3度左右，从那里向外延伸。然后还有一条密度较低的带状烟柱，覆盖了大约40度的天
まあ、私
Это «Дружба Семь». Солнце, я хочу поставить здесь отметку, когда солнце сядет. Сейчас солнце на горизонте, по обе стороны от него сверкает ярко-голубое небо. И я поставлю отметку в самом конце. Солнце садится. Готово, ОТМЕТКА (2:09:06). По обе стороны от солнца сверкает ярко-
Roger. Your attitude will be roll 12 degrees, pitch 270 d
Roger. Nuove quantità 3-1 167. 
Roger. And of course that's pitch up. Also have 39:41: Re
彼は暗闇の
Понял. У нас есть команда, которая работает над этим, и, кстати, один из вопросов, который их интересует, — какие контейнеры с гидроксидом лития в командном модуле пусты. Им это нужно только для балансировки и контроля вес
ह्यूस्टन, आगे बढ़ो। जेमिनी 4 नकल 
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Вход в систему следующим образом: середина Тихого океана, 357 152 359 268 плюс 0813 минус следующий блок неприменим, 400 0212 0025 0334 08
حسنًا. وهناك تغيير آخر لدينا، وهو أنه 
أولاً هذا ث
أبولو 8، هي
아, 죄송합니다. 그런데 프레드, 
- - okay, here comes
You wouldn't believe it, but I'm now in command of the. Okay. Vance, I'm probably the only CMP that's ever witnessed a burn sitting on the ascent 
बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। चार्ली, अब हम इस ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रे
이글, 콜럼비아입니다. 제가 큰 소리로, 그것도 잡음이 섞여서 읽고 있습니다. 닐의 음성이 잘 안 들리네요. 제가 통화를 제대로 연결하는 동안 
Friendship Seven, qui Califo
Подожди, Дж
好的。您需要
Roger. J'ai besoin d'une position très précise, car je ne peux scann
坎
它不像两个风扇同时运转时那么吵；我们把它减少到只有一个风
Roger. Ti presento un CSI: NOME 1
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। हम यहाँ फिर से संगठित हो रहे हैं, आपके नियंत्रण मोड पर काम कर रहे हैं और कुछ व्यवस्था करने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। उड़ान योजना के बजाय हम उपभोग्य सामग्रियों पर नज़र डाल रहे
هذا خيار جيد لأنه يضع الأرض خارج النافذة 1
Yes, Jerry, I can see the bright spot. It's - I guess it's the subsolar point. It's off of South America, it appears to me. It is a grayish spot compared to the blue waters surrounding it. It's 
わかりました、ジョー、私は今ベルを下から見ていますが、中は大丈夫そうです。た
Führst du gerade die Überprüfung de
全世界可能都想知道，在点火结束后，你是如何重新配置​​开关的。我们——我们听到你检查了一遍清单。但是，我想现在，基本上，你可能已经把所有开关都恢复到位了，可以继续执行任务了——好的。飞行计划
Gegen 05:02 Uhr wurde es dunkel. Wir verloren den Sic
ماذا تقصد؟ سنقوم بمحاذاة القمر والشمس؛ عد
알겠습니다. 입력 체크리스트 E/1-6 페이지의 39단계를 수행하십시
자, 시작해 볼까요? PRIMARY, PRIMARY, HIGH, VOICE, (콜록) PCM, RANGE, DOWN VOICE BACKUP, AUX TAPE, OFF; TELEMETRY를 DATA로; 그리고 UP TIM COMMAND를 NORMAL로; VHF A와 B, OFF; RECEIVE
Роджер, Ф
몇 가지 테스트를 더 진행해 보고 싶습니다. 전반적으로 특별한 문제는 없는 것으로 판단됩니다. 4~5가지 테스트를 더 실행해 보고 결과를 확인해 보겠습니다. 그 전에, 널 바이어스 테스트를 한 번 실행해 보겠
Hey, gib mir mal d
로저, 평온. T8, 114 30 57; T9, 11
Hier ist Friendship Seven. Ich bin an, aber sie läuft sehr unzuverlässig. Ich sichere sie momentan mit dem Handbuch. Ich versuche, sie so einzuricht
重返大气层过程相当顺利。辅助阻尼器似乎很好地控制了振荡。我们现在承受了1.5个G的重力。有一大块燃烧的碎片脱落了，看起来几乎
ヒューストン、アポロ 8 号。進入は次のとおり: 太平洋中部、357 152 359 268 プラス 0813 マイナス次のブロックは適用不可、400 0212 0025 0334 0814 16059 312、ペルセウス座ゼータ星、上 165、右 35 上、非出口パタ
双子座4号
ठीक है, नया विषय। मैं बीच में टोकना चाहता हूँ, लेकिन आपसे अनुरोध है कि PTT को पुनः आरंभ करें। पता नहीं क्यों, पिच और यॉ दोनों में यह 18 डिग्री तक बढ़ गया है। हमें यह समझ नहीं आ रहा है। हम बस यही सोच सकते हैं कि इसे फिर से शुरू
아시다시피, 저는 제 카메라가 돌아가고 있다는 걸
为什么不试试 PCM 低音量呢？不用担
Roger, Buzz. First entry's on t
Okay, Jack. Mich interessiert, wie stark unsere Einstellung schwankt.
هذا صحيح. ليس 
알았어, 잭. 물
...にどれくらいの水が入っ
確認で
ठीक है। रोल 180, पिच 228, यॉ 001; लागू नहीं; प्लस 0017.9, 6652.2, 7:37, 6626.5 और मैंने सेक्स्टेंट शाफ्ट को मिस कर दिया; - ट्रनियन - ट्रनियन, 15.7, ज़ेटा सैजिटेरियस, ऊपर, 08.0; रोल 2.1; माइनस 22.81, माइनस 00 - सुधार, माइनस 025.00, 1140.7, 34087, 013:32:14। सेट शुरू होता है: आर्कटुरस और डेनेबोला; रोल एलाइन 044, पिच 012, यॉ 02
ठीक वहीं 
マイクに「チンチバグは全部
Okay. Circuit 
Okay, Wally, genau dorthin sollen
The one time - the other time I tried to use it, I got a pretty good measure on it the next time. The ... using no filter, I used the top of the glow of the thick layer of the air glow. It's a rather nebulous -- you've got to kind of calibrate your own eyeball and try to put it in the same place each time... It takes definite attitude control to make these measurements. You 
Je suis maintenant en attitude de rentrée atmosphérique. Prêt à passer en mode automatique. Les commandes de vol électriques fonctionnent parfaitement, comme lors de l'entraînement. L'utilisation du simulateur de procédures a donné des résultats très positifs. Le temps passe vraiment vite, c'est indéniable. Retour en mode automatique. J'ai reçu un signal de piqué, une légère 
제미니 4, 휴스턴 CAP C
क्या आप उन्हें "बुएनस डियास" या इसी
ठीक है। मैं करूँगा। कैनोपस अभी-अभी नज़र से ओझल हो गया है, और शायद जब हमें यह
Die Fenster sind übrigens in einem super Zustand angekommen. Fenster 5 sieht richtig sauber aus, daher bin ich rech
アポロ8号、こちら
Nun ja, wenn man bedenkt, dass er Junggeselle ist und diesen Steuerabzug nicht in Anspruch nehmen kann, dann
Roger, una gittata obliqua di 268 miglia
Grazie mille. Il curriculum che hai inviato è davvero ottimo. Al momento stiamo cercando di smaltir
Okay. In der Golfwelt hat Tommy 
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。インディアン・コム・テック、聞こえますか？フレンドシップ・セブンです。現在、マニュアルコントロールで走行して
- - piutto
Roger, than
В небе светятся удивительные 
Sigma Seven, ici Canary Com Te
没错，我们正在制定相关程序。肯一直在
38
Okay. Yes, why do
Хор
Tranquillité, c'
Roger. Ho degli aggiornamenti 
カノを越えるまではこれらのピンを収納できないだろうことはわかって
ठीक है। ठीक है, बैट चार्ली वोल्टेज। लगता है हम दोनों में कुछ अंतर है - मुझे बैट चार्ली और बैट डॉग में फर्क समझ नहीं 
우리는 그 추적 작업을 수행하는 데 어려움을 겪을 것
Roger, Charlie. Ich möchte euch über den aktuellen Stand unserer Chlorung informieren. In Fach B4 haben wir acht Fächer für Chlor- und Pufferampullen, von denen – Moment, ich korrigiere mich: sieben Fächer sind, von denen eines leer ist und es auch immer war. Es bleiben also noch sechs übrig. Drüben in Fach B7 haben wir einen weiteren Behälter mit sieben Fächern, also insgesamt sieben plus sechs. Diese sind mit sechs Chlor- und sieben Puff
Roger. Bitte warten. Wir könne
是的，我的清单上没有提到这一点。我觉
Ja
Okay, Jack. The switches all remain in their present position,
D'accor
Okay. Unter „VHF/S-Band-Aktivierung und -Prüfung“ streichen Sie Schritt 1. Führen Sie Schritt 2 mit folgender Änderung durch: „DOWN VOI
Roger. Mike, lorsque vous jouiez avec le vaisseau il y a quelque temps et que nous avons réduit la zone morte, nous avons supposé que cette zone était centrée sur la nouvelle attitude du moment. Depuis,
روجر، جيم. نح
Oddi
Okay, Jack. Als Nächstes nimmst du die Karte und formst damit einen Bogen über dem Behälter. Stecke einfach ein kurzes Ende unter eine Kante oben und das andere an die Kante auf der anderen Seite, sodass ein abgerundeter Bogen entsteht. Weißt du, Jack, wir ziehen jetzt den Beutel über das 
ジム、その通りです。まだ写真はありません。それは…の上部、つまり…の上部、つまり…のデテント2の上部、そして…の上部にあります。姿勢に関しては、もし太陽の真上にいるなら、カーソルが分割されるはずです。ただし、ロール角はそれほど重要ではありません。10度くらいであれば大丈夫です。でも、もっと良い結果が得られると思います。31ページの「バーンテクニック」のところで、ジンバルがロックされているの
नहीं,
Это «Дружба Семь», возвращающаяся на орбиту. К
Houston, vous regardez notre DELTA-H. Al
わかった。これからはずっと彼の影を消そ
Ok, Fred-o, bel colpo. Nella riga 4, iniziando con: VENTILATORE TUTA 1, CHIUSO; TRASFERIMENTO AUTOMATICO POMPA GLICOLE, TRASMETTITORE VHF B, APERTO; RICEVITORE VHF A, APERTO. Sotto: VISUALIZZAZIONE INTENSITÀ SEGNALE, APERTO; AZIONAMENTO, CHIUSO. Sotto, riga 5: BUS DI COLLEGAMENTO, APER
OK, on ​​a une bonne connexion internet. Attendez une seconde. Je veu
रॉजर। समझ गया; अब तुम्हें कुछ काम
是的，接下来是
Oh. Negativo, non ho staccato la radio. L'ho lasciata acces
Roger. Zone 26-DELTA 
わかりました。まず、この説明書には月の写真撮影に関
Ok. Vai. 127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 gradi/sec 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-BRAV
Сейчас перед нами открывается прекрасный ви
روجر، هيوستن. بالنسبة لتعديل الارتفاع، فإ
罗杰，比
Хьюстон. По 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। आवाज़ साफ़ सु
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, hier 
わ
최종 단계 경과 시간 1 + 29 + 17; 연소 GET, 5 + 16 + 54; 델타-V, 33.0; 지속 시간, 41초; 코어 25, 00301; 코어 26, 90135; 코어 27, 00016; 델타-V, 32.9, 1.5, 1.5; 연소 시간, 전진 40, 하강 4, 좌회전 4; 요 0, 피치 26.8; 범위 1
La combustione è stata completata, non ci sono 
Впер
حسنًا يا جيم. في الصفحة 2-107، نوصيك بحذف ذلك والاكتفاء بالنهج نفسه. منصتك ممتازة، ولا نرى ضرورة لهذا التعديل. على أي حال، سيتم التطرق إليه مجددًا. وأيضًا، في الصفحة نفسها، نود حذف عبارة "بدء نقع المقصو
네, 맞습니다. 풍선을 띄워 놓았습니다. 하지만 한동안 보이지 않네요. 풍선이 꽤 많이 떠다니고 있어서 지금은
D'accord. Et le deuxième commutateur permet de régler la pression de vapeur
«Сигма Семь», «Сигма Семь», это диспетчерская 
了解。GET B 05 13 13; GTNSR, 012538; Delta
結局、ECMは床に置き、ケーブルはエドの膝の上に置くことになりそうです。銃は元あった中央のフ
Интересно, подготовилс
إيجل، هيوستن. هل يمكنك إخبارنا بالوقت الذي قمت فيه بتشغيل الطاقة والتأكد من أننا على مضخة الجليكول رقم 
ジェミニVI、
わかりました。T
前景中的物体是你正在
Nur zu, Ho
جيميني 4، لدينا دقيقة أخرى تقريبًا. هل يمكنك إخباري بوضعك قبل ذ
Roger. Ich glaube, ich..
血圧を測っていただけますか？まず
Okay. Jack, you're starting to
मुझे 
Роджер. У нас есть пара изменений в правилах миссии, касающихся вашей кар
카메라는 수납했습니다. 광도계는 가
نحتاج إلى تعديل بسيط آخر لعرضه في منتصف الشاشة. إذا أمكنك تحريك الكاميرا باتجاه خط النهاية، فهذا هو الجزء المفقود. نحن نرى الجزء المضاء. 
Хорошо. Насчет водонагревателя: интересно, что у меня свой собственный — я хотел сказать, что всякий раз, когда вы включаете наш микрофон, я
मुझे बस इतना समझ में आया है कि हमें सेकेंडरी लूप को 1 घंटे पहले चालू करना ह
Anfangs verhinderte die Operation mit dem Treibstoffablass den geplanten sofortigen Beginn unserer Beobachtungen, da wir ein weiteres Ausweichmanöver durchführen mussten. Der Ablass des Treibstoffs verursachte eine enorme Menge an Pseudosternen in dem Gebiet, was eine optische Kalibrierung praktisch unmöglich machte. Die von uns entwickelte Methode erwies sich als wenig effektiv. Schließlich verwendete ich die Methode, in den Weltraum einzudringen, Sirius, unseren hellsten Stern, anzusteuern, die Achse und den Zapfen zu bergen und das Raumschiff dann zu Sirius zu fliegen, um diese für die optische Kalibrierung zu verwenden, was wir später auch taten. Bezüglich der Lichtstreuung scheint es, dass wir in fast jeder Lage wäh
Roger, we copy. Radiation 11005, 10006, 09007; no med
حسناً. حسناً. لقد استسلمت في البحث عن ذ
ジャック、これはただの予防措置だよ。光学部品をシャフト角度90度で設置すれば、スリットが一列に並び、ヒートシ
Und, Jim, wir haben hier ein ausführliches Verfahren zum Einschalten der Geräte und zum Aktivieren der Instrumente, damit wir das TM überprüfen können, und dafür benötigen Sie ein großes Stück Schmierpapier, wann immer 
Ricev
ठीक है। क्या आप विश्वास करेंगे कि मैंने आपको जो आखिरी कैमरा दिया था, उसमें अब एक सुधार है? उस 18 
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。話が逸れてしまいましたね。高利得アンテナのピッチ角とヨー角は、ビルからの要請に応えて、自動再捕捉（AUTO REACQ）位置としてどのような位置を設定できるか
Базз, я поставил сюда 39,5 вольт; это напоминание о проверке батареи — на стене всё хорошо. Хорошо, Нил, теперь TLI — я напишу здесь на стене — TLI — номинальное значение 0,5 + 47; а через 6 секунд — 0,5 + 53. И если ты хочешь, чтобы я
哥伦比亚，哥伦比亚，休斯顿。请求并接受，我们将向您发送
जेमिनी 4, कैनरी कैप कॉम। आपसे अनुरोध है कि अपना कंप्यूट
ضع علامة على صور معهد ماساتشوستس للتكنولوجيا إلى 3 35 36، ثم قم بتشغيل اثنين من خ
حسنًا، ٨. نريد إجراء اختبار ميداني بسيط هنا للتأكد من قدرتنا على إرسال التسجيل الصوتي إلى هيوستن في الوقت المناسب. لذا، نخطط لإرسال تسجيلك، وسنجري اختبارًا ميدانيًا لإعادته إلى هنا والاستماع إليه. نعتقد أن لدينا تسجيلًا بالفعل، إلا إذا كنت قد سجلت فوقه بعد آخر عملي
फ्रेड, मैं तुम्
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। और इसका कारण यह है कि क्षितिज अंशांकन के लिए कई बिंदुओ
Прошло уже 6+35 минут, и я полностью выключаю космический аппарат. Ранее, после проверки связи с Землей и завершения выхода в открытый космос, мы отключили платформу и компьютер. Сейчас я выключаю все остально
Beide Reißverschlüsse der Kle
時間はたっぷりあります。フライ・バイ・ワイヤ
أنا متأكد تمامًا من ذلك، لأنني كنت سألاحظه بسرعة. لقد استخدمت قوة دفع عالية مرة واحدة فقط خلال الرحلة حتى الآن، عندما كنت أعود من التحكم اليدوي النسبي إلى التحكم الإلكتروني، ونسيت تحريك مفتاح التحكم في معدل الدفع إلى الوضع التلقائي. كان لديّ وظيفة وا
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Abbiamo completato l'uplink; il computer è tuo. Puoi tornare al BLOCK. Vuoi verificare di aver
हैलो, कैप कॉम। फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। ईंधन 62-60 [प्रतिशत]; ऑक्सीजन 62-95 [प्रतिशत]; एम्प्स 23। 
了解。もちろん、ピッチアップです。
평면 외 방향으로의 속도는 초당 약 
Подтв
제미니 4. 참고로, 운동기구는 현재 기장 조종석 쪽에 있습니다. 기장 조종석에 계신 것 같은데, 곤히 주무시고 계실 것 같습니다. 깨우고 싶지 않으니, 제가 이 운동기구를 바꿔드리고 기장 조종석에서 깨어나시면 새 운동기구를 
Roger. My s
Roger. V
لم أشعر بأي ارتباك على الإطلاق. شعرتُ أنني أستطيع النظر إلى الأرض - شعرتُ براحة تامة وأنا أنظر إليها - كما أستطيع الاستلقاء على ظهري والنظر إلى الأعلى دون أن يُربكني ذلك بأي شكل من الأشكال. كانت المركبة الفضائية مرجعي الأمثل. كلما رأيتها، كان لديّ مرجع جيد على الفور، وفي الواقع، في بعض الأحيان قرب النهاية، كنت أستخدم حبل الأمان وأمشي صعودًا وهبوطًا على سطح المركبة الفضائية، مستخدمًا إياها لتثبيتي، كنوع
いいえ、まだ必要ありません。よし、BMAGモードを3つ、A
Хорошо. Мы предлагаем, чтобы пилот левого модуля отдыхал, пока командир левого модуля и командир левого модуля бодрствуют. Пилот левого модуля должен лечь спать примерно через 63 часа, через 25 минут. А вы отдыхаете 6 часов. Вы встаёте в 69 часов. В 70 часов командир и пилот левого модуля спят 6 часов до 76 часов. Примерно через 70-76,5-77 часов мы выполним первый и второй маневры. В 78:30 мы загрузим и выровняемся. Время зап
Lui e
ジェミニVI、ヒューストン。テープレコーダーの
لا، ل
ジェミニ4号、ハワイCAP CO
Okay, noc
MAN ATT, trois, au RATE CO
無料で見られるものばかりです。大きなものも小さなものも見えます。写真を撮るのはほぼ不可能です。ほとんどは
Роджер, ты прове
هيوس
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티입니다. 임
Pour l'instant, l'indicateur d'événement fonctionne correctement. Il semble que j'aie réussi à 
Gem
Хорошо. Никто не принимал никаких других лекарств; никто не принимал Марезин; никто не болен. Билл вчера вечером принял одну из этих таблеток, снотворное Секонал. Все позавтракали с
We haven't crossed the terminator yet. You have
オムニ・チャーリー
حسنًا. سنصعد إلى المحطة النهائية
Хорошо. У нас есть шаги с 6 по 12, но шаг 7 тако
はい、私たちもここでそのことについて盛んに話し合っていました。私たちのシステムとの比較を本当によくしてい
مرحباً، هل ترغب في الحص
يا رجل، أكره أن أقول هذا بناءً على ما رأيته من خلال هذا المنظار، ولكن هناك بقعة بيضاء تشبه الفوهة - تبدو وكأنها كبيرة جدًا تحت هذه الفوهات الصغيرة الحديثة في قاع هذه الفوهة القديمة نوعًا ما، ولكن في مركزها تمامًا، يبدو الأمر كما لو أنها صخرة بدلًا من فوهة بركانية... عين
Okay. We do have the Spacecraft under control at the present time. We're in slowly drifting flight - do have a slight amount of control. We have - 1550 po
接
Возможно, мы оказываем давление на значительную часть системы, которая до этого
아폴로
Хорошо, Джо. Позвольте мне вернуть вам его и посмотреть, есть ли он у меня здесь. После этого, во время нашего наблюдения, вы хо
Voici Sigma Seven, qui illustre les effets d'un vol inversé au lever du soleil, avec un lacet de 90 degrés. Votre trajectoire est immédiatement perceptible. C'est comme regarder par la fenêtre d'un train. Le terrain défile sous vos yeux. Des nuages ​​de toutes sortes se succèdent. Je les vois passer à toute vitesse, juste derrière le plan à 90 degrés – à 90 degrés de l'axe longitudinal du véhicule. Une représentation très, très parlante du lacet. Alors
Molto bene. Al momento non abbiamo comunicazioni con Cape Canaveral
حسنًا. لقد درسنا جميع الاحتمالات الممكنة هنا. أسوأ سيناريو توصلنا إليه هو خطأ مسافة الخطأ 3 سيجما - أي 70 ميلًا بحريًا. هذا صحيح. ما نود منك القيام به هو مناورة رجوع OAMS؛ ثم سنقوم بإطلاق نار يدوي عكسي، بالطبع، بدون استخدام الكمبيوتر. نريد دخولًا دوارًا بدون رفع. هذا هو الدخول الدوار بدون رفع. سبب اختيار الدوران بدلًا من الميل بزاوية 90-90 هو تقليل احتمالية التشتت. ستميل
Nei
Okay. Meine einzige Sorge bezüglich des Zurücklass
Джим, это просто п
Das ist bejahend. Ich richte die Kapsel gerade neu aus und lasse die G
حسنًا يا جاك. في MDC 1، لا يوجد شيء غير طبيعي. جميع مؤشرات المعدل تساوي صفرًا. الكرة رقم 2 متوقفة، بالطبع؛ لقد فقدنا MAIN B. الكر
और यह - यह कुछ हद तक बदलता रहता है - 865 नहीं, बल्कि 8
Okay. Jack, ich möchte noch einmal betonen, dass wir frühestens nach 2,5 Stunden mit den Energie-Vorbereitungen beginnen können. Alles andere kannst du wie gewohnt erledigen und dich so weit wie möglich vorbereiten. Die 2,5 Stunden beziehen sich aber auf das Sparen von Verbrauchsmateria
ठ
11 للأمام. يهبطون بشكل جيد
선
... auf dem Weg zu grauen Haaren und Friseursa
尼尔，你想要的那个，就在
Это более точное показание уровня топлива, если я смогу до него дот
На турнире Masters была ничья, так что ждите результатов. После 72 лунок Литтлер и Каспер сыграли вничь
로저. 질문을 전부 이해하지는 못했습니다. 저는 깨어나자마자 물을 다섯 모금 
Bene. Mancano 30 second
电池 A 
Friendship Seven,
Atlantic Ship, This is Friendship Seven. Wish you would pass to Cape. I let the capsule drift around to the 180° position and I am having to reorient at present time. When Iain all lined wi
Хорошо, Гас, мой статус в порядке; режим управления — электронное; гироскопы по-прежнему в защитной решетке; маневр отключен. Топливо 62 и 68 [процентов]. Небольшой прирост топлива; горит индикатор уровня топлива; горит индикатор избытка воды в кабине. Попробую сразу включить автоматический режи
表现远超预
Okay. Verstanden. Und noch eine letzte Sache: Wir möchten Ihnen ein IRIG-Update zusenden
Roger. Ihre Nachricht ist kaum lesbar. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, uns Ihre Schlafzeiten mitzuteilen, unabhängig davon, ob Sie das Gefühl haben, ausr
좋아
그 점에 대해서는 죄
D'accord. Je voulais simplement vous en informer et vous inciter à réfléchir à ses implications sur le plan de vol. Je vous présenterai ensuite une vue d'ensemble et commenterai la Lune afin de déterminer les sections les plus appropriées. Frank souhaitait que nous vérifiions l'ordre d'apparition des profils d'entrée. Le premier profil affiché est intitulé « Non-sortie n° 2 » et correspond à l'entrée rapide à courte portée. Le deuxième profil, intitulé « 3 500 milles », est également une entrée rapide, mais celle à utiliser en cas d'entrée à plus longue portée. Le troisième profil sera « Non-sortie n° 1 », suivi d'un quatrième profil de 3 500 milles. Vous avez donc quatre profils d'entrée. Les profils n° 1 et 3 correspondent aux entrées à courte portée, et les profils n° 2 et 4 aux entrées à longue portée. Concernant le refroidissement, je crois que nous avons discuté de la procédure à suivre, mais environ une heure plus tard, nous devrons l'effectuer. Il est hors de question de le faire à midi. En discutant avec l'équipe en charge des trajectoires – et notamment de l'ébullition de l'eau – il est important de noter qu'ils observent bien les déversements et l'ébullition de l'eau sur le graphique de trajectoire. Il semble que cela soit lié à leur méthode de calcul plutôt qu'à l'ampleur des perturbations subies par la trajectoire. Par conséquent, si nous devons implémenter cette ébullition de l'eau, nous pourrions le faire juste avant le point médian, une fois le suivi stabilisé et la correction de point médian connue. Ainsi, pendant cette période précédant le point médian, nous pourrons l'effectuer, et ils reprendront 
Affirmati
그 속도… 네, 전체적인 속도는 뭔가 제대로 빨라지지
はい。そうだと思います。混雑する場所では、かなりの時間を節約できます。ガソリ
さあ
Jerry, another ID feature: these small impact craters have dark spots in the center where it appears that they buried in it and hit some new material down below and scat
Ok, 11. Sembra che le prestazioni del motore durante entrambe le accensioni di questa missione siano state le stesse dei test di accettazione del motore. La lettura del PC di bordo è dovuta a un fattore di calibrazione noto tra ciò che si ha effettivamente nella camera e ciò che si legge sul manometro. Ci aspettiamo che il funzionamento a bancata singola sia di 90, ovvero 90 p
Ho detto ch
ठीक 
Базз, это Х
वैंस, क्या आप सभी ने इस बारे 
حس
VI، سلبي. 
Roger. Bien reçu, Gemini. Sachez qu'ils prévoient d'entrer dans une zone -3. Ils s'intéressent actuellement aux zones 6 ou 7-3. Ils souhaitent que vous vous rendiez au module 4 et à l'ordinateur du distributeur automatique. T
分かりました。準備はできたと読んだと思います。イヤホンのことを忘れていました。これは単に、コマンドモジュールから2組目のカートリッジを取り出し、新しいカートリッジの側面上部付
ठीक है। शुरू करो। 127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 डिग्री/सेकंड 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-शाबाश: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-शाबाश: 93. 1+58 14 45 02. 11+04. 62-शाबाश: 85. 1+47. 16 18 08. 10+29. 63-शाबाश
ベーコン。ラヴェル以外全員。彼はエッグベネディクトを食べ
알겠습니다, 조. 이 용기는 이미 호스에 장착되었으니 지금 바로 작동시켜
네, 
Род
Houston. Zu deinem Kommentar, Neil, dass das Wasser an das Gelände – bergiges Gelände – heranreicht: Ist das ein Eindruck wie ein Lavastrom, der um eine Erhebung herumfließt, oder sieht es eher so aus, als würde es an dieser Stelle ansteige
हम पानी के उपयोग के पैटर्न का बारीकी से विश्लेषण कर रहे हैं, और फिलहाल हमारा रुख यही है कि एक को चालू रखा जाए और दूसरे को बंद कर दिया जाए, लेकिन हम आपको जल्द ही और जानकारी देंगे। सोते समय हम आपको सलाह देते हैं कि एक व्यक्ति को निगरानी के लिए तैनात कर दें। यदि संभव हो तो कृपया पेशाब न करें, क्योंकि इससे कचरे की समस्या और भी बदतर हो जाएगी। हमारे पास कुछ सामान हैं जिन्हें 
Хорошо. Проверяем: команда 
돔(온도)은 70도로 유지되고 있습니다. 기내 돔은 50도입니다. 우주복 흡입구는 62도로 쾌적합니다. 우주복 압력은 5psi로 안정적입니다. 컬러 사진 뒷면의 6b 사진에 보이는 구름
Ora possiamo osservare la struttura del montante seconda
Роджер. Жителям космического корабля «Колумбия», возможно, будет интересно узнать, что сегодня в Колумбии День независимости. Вчера вечером Глория Диас из Филиппин была коронована как «Мисс Вселенная». Она обошла 60 других девушек в борьбе за титул чемпионки мира по красоте. Мисс Диас 18 лет, у нее черные волосы и глаза, параметры фигуры 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. Первой вице-мисс стала Мисс Австралия, за ней следуют Мисс Израиль и Мисс Япония. Пока вы будете возвращаться во вторник вечером, в Вашингтоне будут играть команды всех звезд Американской и Национальной лиг. Ожидается, что Мел Стоттлмайр из «Янкиз» станет первым питчером Американской лиги. Пока никто не предсказывает, кто станет первым питчером Национальной лиги. В составе команды девять питчеров
稍等片刻，宁静。我们马上
أقوم حاليًا بالتقاط صور عامة - بعدسة عادية - للماء والسحب باستخدام فيلم 16 ملم. نواجه مشكلة كبيرة مع زر التشغيل/الإيقاف في هذه الكاميرا، فهو لا يعمل إلا بعد الضغط عليه ثلاث أو أربع مرات. قد يفسر هذا جزئيًا سبب عدم تمكن جيم من التقاط الكثير من الصور في البداية - خلال عملنا في مهمة السير في ا
休斯顿的朋友们，接下来我要给家里的孩子们，或者说给全世界所有的孩子们做一个小小的示范。我本来想教你们怎么用勺子喝水，但我怕勺子装得太满了，一不小心水就要溢出来了。孩子们，
... the Controller is off and on. S
Allez-
Apollo 8, Houston. Would you put the BIO
SPS/G&N: 36639; 당신의 값에서 -0.72, +0.51을 뺀 값; 당신의 값에서 135 24 4000을 뺀 값; +32178, +0.6036, -0.1304, 당신의 피치는 0.64입니다. 나머지는 해당 없음입니다. 여유
추진체와의
Хьюстон, вы читаете книги, связанные с
J'ai une remarque concernant le point sur Terre où les rayons du Soleil se réfléchissent vers nous. En général, la couleur des océans est assez uniforme, d'un bleu clair à un bleu foncé, sauf dans une zone circulaire d'un diamètre équivalent à environ un huitième du rayon terrestre. Dans cette zone, le bleu de l'eau vire au grisâtre, et je suis persuadé que c'es
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 중간 항로 수정 번호 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, 피치 및 요 트림 없음, TIG 150 29 5453, -00048, 모든 볼 추가, +00001 075 159 328; HA는 없음; HP
温度约为 111，氦气压力——您
좋아요, 이제 들어갈 수 있어요... 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन से। हम इस समय डाउन-वॉइस बैकअप COMM चेक करना चाहते हैं। S-बैंड AUX टेप को ड
Alors
Scanner
好的。在第 14 行，“加热系统 A/B-1”下方：打开 QUAD 1 至 4；下方，唯一需要更改的是 - 在“乙二醇泵”下方，关闭“自动传输”；在“通信”下方，唯一需要更改的是：打开 VHF 
Je suis retourné sur place pour je
Близнецы VI, Близнецы VI, по нашим оценкам, это примерно 25 плюс 15,
わかりました。ブルース、次は水分蓄積装置の活動についてです。0.85、いや、0.95くらいまで上昇してピークに達し、その後徐々に0.6、今は0.4まで下がり、0.35まで落ち​​着いて
D'accord. La seule autre chose qui me vient à l'esprit en l'observant, c'est que le signal semble provenir d'un seul point; mais c'est la seule différence, même si je ne peux pas voir d'où il vient car il est au-delà de la cour
रॉजर, ईगल। सुधार - रॉजर, कोलंबिया। हमें समझ आ ग
Le coucher de soleil est vraiment saisissant, je ne pense pas avoir besoin de m'attarder à l'admirer. C'est fascinant. L'autre chose, c'est le noir absolu quand on n'est pas habitué. Je distingue nettement un revêtement sur la vitre. Je retourne en mode VOX sur UHF haute fréquence pour transmettre. J'ouvre la visière pour nettoyer le micro droit. Je l'ai léché. Je referme la visière. Elle a été immédiatement scellée pour que le circuit de ma combinaison puisse fonctionner. Je ne veux plus avoir de problème avec ça. L'entrée d'air de la combinaison se maintient bien à environ 68 degrés. Je vais donc remonter le dôme. Il est maintenant à 76, 75. Apparemment, ce réglage plus élevé est celui qu'il nous faut. Je pense que je vais encore augmenter d'un demi-cran et on aura peut-être trouvé la bonne température. Il commence enfin à faire un peu frais, je sais donc où je vais avec le réglage. J'ai réglé la quantité de liquide de refroidissement pour la combinaison et le levier de commande à 8,5. L'affichage du dôme indique actuellement 75 degrés. L'entrée d'air de la combinaison est à 68 degrés. Très agréable. Je sens l'air frais sur mon visage. La quantité d'oxygène est excellente, entre 60 et 75 psi. Je surveille l'onduleur 250. Il approche les 140 degrés, et le contraste du 150 est descendu à environ 100 degrés. La température de veille est d'environ 100 degrés, soit la température de la cabine. Troisièmement, le 250 – celui-ci souffre, et je vais le surveiller de près. L'échangeur de chaleur de la cabine se stabilise définitivement à 40 degrés, et cela me cause bien des soucis car je dois visiblement 50 centimes à Frank Samonski. Je suis agréablement surpris. Le niveau de carburant de la cabine est également un peu élevé.
Roger. Bien 
저 작은 혹 같은 건 뭐지...? 
रॉजर। ठीक है। आपकी उंगलियाँ
罗杰。我们正在讨论一些事情，比如把十针阀调到手动模式或者部分关闭它，或者
क्या आपको लगता है कि अब ये सेटि
Okay, Joe, we got the WATER 
我说，
まあ、
Ach, Ca
تما
يرجى من جميع من استمعوا إلى التسجيل الإبلاغ عن أننا بحاجة إلى تغيير ف
Мы собираемся в 
This is Houston. We copy, and right toward the end of your transmission after yo
रॉजर। 
Roger. ID punto di riferimen
わかった
That's a pretty good sleep station I had rigged up, Jack. I took one of the sleep restraints out of the comman
Хорошо. Угол тангажа 10, угол рыскания 45. Начинается с... 
ठीक है। बिट रेट, LO; वॉइस फंक्शन, वॉइस बैकअप कम; पावर एम्प S-बैंड, खुला; और रेंज फंक्शन, रेंज पर सेट; और यह सत्यापित हो गया। और मेरे पास अभी भी बायोमेड चालू है, इसलिए माइक में को
The second point is, of course, when you stop your passive thermal control, you are about 90 degrees to the earth line, so when you make that yaw left, you are going to have to yaw left until your middle gimbal angle is in the vicinity of 60 degrees. You will get the additional 30 degrees by offset between where the camera is pointed and
よし。
حسنًا يا جو. لقد دخلت في الموضوع تقريبًا. قمنا بتحميل متجهات الكوكب - أو متجهات مذن
好的。我想我还是回去试试能不能
로저. 저기, 오늘자 포스트지 헤
रॉजर, मुझे पता 
ठीक है। आज के लिए, हम चाहेंगे कि आप अवलोकन से पहले और बाद में भी ट्रनियन बायस का निर्धारण करें, जैसा कि प्रक्रिया में बताया गया है। हमारा उद्देश्य यह जांचना है कि क्या किसी प्रकार का थर्मल प्रभाव सेक्स्टेंट में कोणीय रीडिंग में त्रुटियां उत्पन्न कर रहा है। पहले प्राप्त बायस को शामिल किया जाना चाहिए, यानी दो लगातार माप 0.003 डिग्री के भीतर बराबर होने पर NOUN 87 पर आगे बढ़ें। और हां, मापों के बीच ट्रनियन को कुछ डिग्री स्थानांतरित करें। आज आपके दृश्य क्षेत्र में पृथ्वी काफी छोटी दिखाई देनी चाहिए। मुझे यकीन है कि आप इसके बारे में हमसे कहीं अधिक बेहतर बता सकते हैं, लेकिन यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि आपको तारे और पृथ्वी क्षितिज के बीच एक अच्छा कोण माप मिल रहा है, सेक्स्टेंट एम-लाइन, जो दो हैश चिह्नों से होकर गुजरने वाली और आर-लाइन के लंबवत रेखा है, उप-तारकीय बिंदु पर पृथ्वी क्षितिज के समानांतर होनी चाहिए
Roger, Houston. È quello che stiamo cercando di fare. Sto cercand
Sto scattando foto del meteo quasi in verticale. Il valore di luce è 13-½. Il risultato è circa 250 e 5 6 (1/250 di secondo e f5.6). L
Das ist richtig. Die positive X-A
ロジャー。マルーン・ビューグルの続きです。ニクソン大統領は、あなた方に会いに行く飛行機に乗る直前に、サンフランシスコから電話をかけ、奥様たちを驚かせました。奥様方は皆、あなた方のテレビ放送に感動していました。ジャンとパットはここミッションコントロールから見ていました。ケープカナベラルからのインテルサットの打ち上げは昨夜、4度目の延期となりました。デルタ衛星の第2段にある窒素調整器の故障が原因とされています。今夜、新たな打ち上げが試みられる予定です。メキシコ湾流を調査している調査潜水艦ベン・フランクリンは、ジョージア州沖の水深1300フィートで、海底から10フィートから100フィートの高さを24時間漂流するという記録を樹立しました。このミッションはジャック・ピカールが指揮しています。ウォーリー・シラーがデトロイト工科大学の評議員に5年の任期で選出されました。彼は同大学の開発委員会に所属します。エア・カナダは、過去5日間で月行きのフライトの予約を2300件受け付けたと発表しました。注目すべきは、義理の母への男性からの予約が100件以上あったことです。そして最後に、月をテーマにしたロマンチックな歌が消え去るどころか、何百人ものソングライターにインスピレーションを与えたようです。おそらく全米で最も多くのレコード会社と音楽出版社が集まるテネシー州ナッシュビルには、月をテーマにした歌が殺到しているとのことです。中には成功する
地上では引き続き状況は良好です。機内気圧の測定値を確認しま
Да, знаете, это был наш ум
المقصورة جاهزة تمامًا، لا أريد خفض القبة أكثر. كانت الأمور على ما يرام. الوقت المتبقي 18 دقيقة. كل شيء على ما يرام. الدوافع - الدوران التلقائي لليسار 119 درجة. الدوران التلقائي لليمين 115 درجة. الدوران اليدوي لليسار 100 درجة. مبادل حرارة المقصورة 43 درجة. رفع المقدمة تلقائيًا 95 درجة. خفض المقدمة تلقائيًا 95 درجة. الانعطاف التلقائي لليسار 80 درجة. الانعطاف التلقائي لليمين 100 درجة. محول الطاقة 25
لقد التقطت صورة، صورة جيدة جداً، لمطار القاهر
Роджер. Теперь, чтобы выполнить маневр до крена 0, тангаж 90 и рыскание внутрь — тангаж внутрь здесь, крен здесь. Рыскание — какое бы рыскание мы ни выбрали. Хорошо, Вэнс. В нашем первоначаль
ほら、6-5-4。どうやって入ったんだ？私の態度は0、0、180じゃな
Vérifions si nous obtenons effectivement un lacet. Ils ont tendance à monter par rapport à moi, plutôt qu'à reculer. Ave
Roger. The standpipe is full of the fluid. The fluid is halfway up the outside
Roger. Nun z
Ricevuto. La tua manovra di +44 è corretta, non richiede aggiornamenti. La mano
खैर, इससे आराम नहीं मिलता। इस रेडियो की आवाज़ दूसरे हेलमेट में भी जात
收到。好的。我们直接
근
了解しました、ヒューストン。ジャッ
अब हमारे पास तारे देखने के लिए लगभग एकदम सही परिस्थितियाँ हैं, क्योंकि चंद्रमा का प्रभाव बहुत कम है। जैसा कि हम पहले कह रहे थे, तारों की चमक - ऐसा लगता 
ठीक है। पीसी प्लस 2 के बाद, ट्रिम की कोई आवश्यकता नहीं है; और, यदि पीसी प्लस 2 के दौरान इंजन बंद हो जाता है, तो बाद में मध्य-मार्ग युद्धाभ्यास की आवश्यकता होगी - खैर, सबसे पहला पीसी प्लस 4 होगा। यदि आप पीसी प्लस 2 नहीं करते हैं, लेकिन हम फिर भी इ
Pitch trim is holding a little over 2; it's oscillating between 2 and 2.4, roughly. Yaw trim is oscillating between minus 0.5 and zero. It's just sort of aimlessly wandering back and forth between those values. Rates are still wandering; they'r
Un altro problema: in questo momento, Jack, sto guardando fuori dal finestrino destro ed è piuttosto buio, ma ci sono circa un migliaio di stelle false qui fuori, lasciate da alcuni detriti. È difficile distinguere cosa è reale da cosa 
DE
Une h
Hmm - voici la lun
是的。我想最根本的问
Apollo 8, Housto
Et vous, Aquarius; Houston. J'ai des disjoncteurs que vous pouvez ouvr
Roger, Jack. Since we've got the up, we plan to use that information to give the a dock coarse aline, and then we're in the service module jettison attitude, we'll wait until it comes time to power up the, and we'll get the a dock coa
حسنًا، ١١. اتضح أن أداء المحرك خلال عمليتي الاحتراق حتى الآن في هذه المهمة كان مماثلاً لأدائه في اختبارات قبول المحرك. تعود قراءة الكمبيوتر المحمول على متن الطائرة إلى عامل معايرة معروف بين الضغط الفعلي في غرفة الاحتراق والقراءة الظاهرة على المقياس. نتوقع أن يكون ضغط التشغيل أحادي الجانب ٩٠ رطل/بوصة مربعة - أي ٩٠ رطل/بوصة مربعة على المقياس مع ضغط فعلي في غرفة الاحتراق يبلغ ٩٥ رطل/بوصة مربعة. في حالة التشغيل ثنائي الجانب، يكون ضغط غرفة الاحتراق ٩٤ رطل/بوصة مربعة على المقياس مع ضغط فعلي يبلغ ٩٩ رطل/بوصة مربعة. ٨٠ رطل/بوصة مربعة على المقياس على متن الطائرة تعادل ٨٣ رطل/بوصة مربعة ضغطًا فعليًا.
Roger. GET B 13 25 52; ​​Delta-V, 9 pieds par seconde; temps de combustion, 0 plus 11; 0 lacet, 0 tangage; Noyau 25, 00090; Noyau 
حسناً، أعتقد أنه 
V
How
Wenn wir uns hier draußen im freien Bereich befinden, wenn wir definitiv außerhalb des Scanbereichs sind, werde ich die manuelle und autom
はい、わかりました。3行
好的。我们要去查看数据了。断路器已闭
- 
لا، لم أفعل... الحد الأدنى
रॉजर,
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Cercherò di descrivere cosa mi trovo qui dentro. Sono in una grande massa di pa
حسنًا. على MSC-2 و-3، يكون التوقيت العالمي المنسق هو 00:30:00.
分かりました。今読んでいる通り、灰色のテープを折って、裏側をキャニスターの外側に沿わせます。それから、カードの四辺に、カードのように貼り付けます。そして、そのカードをキャ
罗
Bene, ok, va bene. Tutta la procedura che vi spiegherò qui è relativa a quelle che speriamo siano soluzioni per l'obiettivo e per guardare la Terra dalla finestra di rendez-vous, e tutti gli angoli del gimbal e tutte quelle belle cose sono orientati a guardare la Terra dalla finestra piuttosto che l
罗杰，休斯顿
Mentre puntiamo verso l'alto in questa direzi
Okay, Jack. Wir haben in wenigen Minuten ein Pad für dich. Wir erfassen gerade die Tracking-Daten, und obwohl wir vermuten, dass die Änderungen gegenüber deinem vorläufigen Pad sehr gering sein werden, empfehlen wir dir, mit der Initialisierung zu warten, bis wir dir das endgültige Pad geschickt 
रॉजर। यह तस्वीर फिर से केंद्र से हट रही है। अगर आप इसे वापस लाने के लिए एक और सुधार कर सकें। मैं आपको दिशा तो नहीं बता सकता, लेकिन आप सही दिशा में जा रहे हैं, आप सही दिशा में जा रहे हैं। थोड़ा और; थोड़ा और। अरे,
١١، هذه هيوستن. تصحيح منتصف المسار رقم ٥، RCS/G&N: ٢٦٠٢٥، ضبط الميل والانحراف غير متوفر، TIG ١٥٠ ٢٩ ٥٤٥٣، ناقص ٠٠٠٤٨، زائد جميع الكرات، زائد ٠٠٠٠١ ٠٧٥ ١٥٩ ٣٢٨؛ HA غير متوفر؛ HP زائد ٠٠٢٣٠ ٠٠٠٤٨ ٠١١ ٠٠٠٤٨؛ نجم السدس ٠٣ ٠٩٠٨ ٣٨٢. كتلة نجم الموقع الداخلي، غير متوفرة. خط العرض زائد ١١٠٢، ناقص ١٧٢٠٤ ١١٨٠٣ ٣٦٢٧٥ ١٩٥ ٠٣ ٣٣، محاذاة، ذنب الدجاجة والنسر الواقع، ٠٠٧ ١٤٤ ٠٦٨، لا يوجد فراغ، بالطبع، دفع ر
रॉजर। चंद्रमा की हमारी यह यात्रा आपको शायद सरल या आसान लगी हो। मैं आपको आश्वस्त करना चाहता हूँ कि ऐसा बिल्कुल नहीं था। जिस सैटर्न वी रॉकेट ने हमें कक्षा में पहुँचाया, वह एक अविश्वसनीय रूप से जटिल मशीन है, जिसका हर एक पुर्जा त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता है। मेरे सिर के ऊपर स्थित इस कंप्यूटर में 38,000 शब्दों की शब्दावली है, जिनमें से प्रत्येक शब्द को हमारे, यानी चालक दल के लिए अत्यंत महत्वपूर्ण होने के लिए बहुत सावधानी से चुना गया है। मेरे हा
好的。请您关闭2号电池，并保持关闭状态，以便我们检查一下
Ok. Pann
Ora, l'assetto di sgancio e l'assetto SEP dovrebbero essere gli stessi, quindi mi baserò su quello che mi hanno dato per l'assetto di separazione-accensione aggiornato. È solo circa 7 gradi in meno, ma è nel tuo piano
I guess that item isn't going to change yo
正解です、ジャック。はい、以上です。それでは、あなたがいつ来ても、この手順で進めていきましょう
こんばんは。私たちのミッション、アポロ11号の飛行における象徴的な側面についていくつかお話ししたいと思います。ここ2、3日、宇宙船内で起こった出来事について議論を重ねる中で、私たちは、これは単なる3人の月への旅以上のものであり、政府と産業界のチームの努力、さらには一つの国の努力をはるかに超えるものだという結論に達しました。これは、未知の世界を探求しようとする全人類の飽くなき探究心の象徴であると感じています。先日、ニール・ボルトンが初めて月面に足を踏み入れた際に述べた「これは人間にとっては小さな一歩だが、人類にとっては偉大な飛躍だ」という言葉は、まさにこの思いを的確に表していると思います。私たちは月へ行くという挑戦を受け入れました。この挑戦を受け入れることは避けられないことでした。ミッションを比較的容易に遂行できたのは、その受け入れがいかにタイムリーだったかを示すものだと私は考えています。今日、私たちは宇宙探査において、より広範な役割を担うことができると確信しています。振り返ってみると、宇宙船「コ
ए
D'accord. Nous allons activer le minuteur de missio
P
了解。軌道姿勢に戻り、現在軌道に向かって漂流しています。TMは安定していますか
D'accord. Nous nous dirigeons vers un endroit offrant une belle vue sur la Terre, et dès que nous y serons, nous nous ar
अपोलो 8, अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है, ह्यूस्टन। 
نعم. قل، من الأفضل أن نخفي ذلك
Roger. Neil, ti sentiamo forte e chiaro. Ti abbiamo visto scattare qualche foto e raccogliere il camp
Roger. Endlich habe 
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 말씀하
حسنًا يا جيم. سأشرح لك الأمر على جزأين. الأول يتعلق بنقل المعدات إلى وحدة القيادة. أما الثاني فهو عكس ذلك، أي نقل المعدات من وحدة القيادة إلى وحدة التحكم. ويمثل كلا الجزأين فرقًا بين موقع التخزين في منصة الإطلاق، وإليك القائمة الأولى، وهي نقل المعدات إلى وحدة القيادة. سأ
好的，氧气。你还剩44磅氧气。按每小时0.36磅的消耗率计算，你还剩下120小时的氧气。好的。接下来，A和B的氧气消耗量均为6.2%。我们预计只有2%的氧气会用于其他用途，所以你的氧气供应充足。接下来是速度增量（ΔV）。你还剩下1190英尺/秒。最后，我们估计你还有99安时。这只是一个估计值。
휴스턴, 지금 작업 도
الآن... 30 ث
ह्यूस्टन। हमने क्रायो फैन चालू कर दिया है - नंबर 1 H2 ट
훌륭하군, 프랭크. 오늘 밤 블랙 워치가
La risposta è afferma
Voilà
Now, you want me to power down the ball, and if you'll give me the procedure for that, I'll do it rig
휴스턴, 이글. 콜럼비아호가 수면 상태
罗杰，11。关于您提到的电池充电问题，我们认为这可能是不同电池之间的差异；而且这个问题似乎已经消失，就像启
روجر. ن
У меня закончилось топливо для ручног
...у меня так
로저. 안구회전술로 인한 부작용은 없다는 것을 이해했습니다
双子座4号，夏威夷
ठीक है। हम थोड़ी देर के लिए व्यस्त रहेंगे
Vous 
Roger, Seven,
Gemini 4，Canary CAP COM。加压和再加压时，
سأصور هذه اللقطة التالية باتجاه الشمس، ولدي انعكاس على النافذة. لنرَ كيف ستكون النتيجة. ستكون اللقطة رقم 43 في مجموعة الأفلام رقم
Hello, Ap
AP通信によると、ワシントン州シアトル、オレゴン州ポートランド、ブリティッシュコロンビア州バンクーバー、そしてサンフランシスコの西海岸の住民は、今夜9時から深夜までの間、それぞれの地
Okay, Fred. Der nächste Schritt ist ganz einfach: Stellen Sie den Schalter für die Treibstofftemperaturanzeige auf Sinkflug 1, lesen Sie die Treibstoff- und Sauerstofftemperaturen ab, s
CSQ，双子座4号。
알겠습니다. 참고로, 프레드는 어젯밤 통신실에 있었고 왼쪽 자리에 앉아 있었습니다. 방사선량 측정 결과가 궁금하시다면, 저희가 실수로 측정값을 빼먹었습니다. 모두 방호복 안에 넣어둔 채로 나갔는데, 지금은 잘 보관해 두었습니다. 한 시간쯤 후에 잭의 방호복을 꺼낼 예정이니, 필요하시면 그때 방사선량계를 꺼내서 
현재 연료량은 75~100%입니다. 창은 금성 폐색 상태인가요? 아니, 그건 아닙니다. 금성 폐색은 없었습니다. 금성 폐색
방호복 온도는
晚上好。我想和大家探讨一下我们阿波罗11号任务中一些更具象征意义的方面。过去两三天，我们在飞船上讨论了一系列事件，最终得出结论：这远不止是三个宇航员的登月之旅；它超越了政府和工业团队的努力；甚至超越了一个国家的努力。我们认为，这象征着全人类探索未知世界的永不满足的好奇心。尼尔前几天首次踏上月球表面时说的那句话——“这对个人来说是一小步，但对人类来说是一大步”——我认为很好地概括了这种感受。我们接受了登月的挑战；接受这个挑战是必然的。我认为，我们相对轻松地完成任务，正是对当时接受挑战的及时性的肯定。今天，我觉得我们完全有能力承担起在太空探索中更大的责任。回想起来，我们
バズ、理解できたと思う。肯定だ。でも、彼が2番目にやった時、君は…NOUNは20だった。だから、彼が3175と入力して、次に002のENTERを打った時、実際には最初の2つのCDUの位置をロードしたんだ。コンピューターはそれを、実際のCDUの瞬間的な
फ्रेड अब COMM 
Roger. Comment vas-tu,
यूरी अलेक्सेयेविच, हम अभी इस रेडियो स्टेशन को बंकर में ले जा रहे हैं। इसलिए चैनल पर 5 मिनट का मौन रहेगा। निकोले पेट्रोविच और पावेल रोमानोविच बंकर में जा रहे हैं। मैं 5 मि
Roger. Nous prévoyons une coupure de courant au moment de la mise sous tension, soit environ 2 h 30 avant. Ce n'est qu'une estimation, nous vous tiendrons informé. Concernant le passage en mode JETT, c'est tout à fait autorisé dès que vous disposez d'un module de commande sous tension et d'une plateforme stable. Vous pouvez y aller immédiate
لقد خرج يا غاس، وهذا رائع حقًا. اسمع، جهاز الاتصال اللاسلكي لدينا لا يعمل جيدًا، ولا يبدو أنن
좋아요
مهلاً، نحن ن
프렌드십 세븐, 캘리포니아 캡 콤. 존, 당신 말이
Okay, Jack. Lass uns kurz besprechen, wie ich die Lage erreiche und dann den Triebwerkszündvorgang durchführe. Ich spreche von den Steuerungstechniken. So wie es jetzt aussieht, versuche ich, das Raumschiff in der Gierachse zu stoppen, wobei die Erde aus meinem Fenster sichtbar ist. Dann befinden wir uns im Führungs- oder Steuerungsmodus; die Gierachse befindet sich im Steuerungsmodus. Anschließend steuern wir die Nick- und Rollachse. Ich sehe keine andere Möglichkeit, diese Kombination ohne die Steuerung zu kontroll
了解。バミューダ待機中。こちらはフレンドシップ・セブン。燃料103～101パーセント、酸素78～100パーセント。電圧
Ещё одно отклонение от плана заключается в том, что мне не удалось сбросить воздушный шар. Шар всё ещё прикр
Amitié Sept, je ne ressens absolument rien d'anormal à l'apesanteur, si ce n'est une sensation très agréable. Aucun effet indésirable, je ne suis pas malade; je me sens bien. J'ai effectué les tests de la tête et des mouvements de tête, et tout est normal. J'ai également effectué le test oculogyre, et là aussi, tout est normal. Cependant, je n'ai pas pu utiliser beaucoup d'équ
База Спокойств
… questions, vous pouvez poursuivre vos observation
わかりました。これは、との間を移動していると
Ricevuto. Ti leggo forte e chiaro. Il monitoraggio iniziale indica che una velocità di 1,2 metri al secondo a 8 ore ti porterà sulla strada 
네. 거기에 있는 제품들을 구매하고, 전체 전원 차단 절차를 진행하겠습니다. 이 과정에서 볼과 인버터도 차단될 것이고 몇
Gemini 4, CSQ. I got cut up b
नमस्कार, ह्यूस्टन; अपोलो 11
روجر، بيل. سنكون سعدا
मैं ASCS 
Apollo 8,
1 minuto - Neil ce l'ha fatta. Ce l
ठीक है, फ्रेड। अगला कदम बस इतना है कि प्रोपेलेंट टेम्प प्रेस मॉनिटर स्विच
目前为止，我们对时钟灯或 ACQ 灯都没有任何
休斯顿，宁静。我们已将气温提升至大约4.5度。
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Le carburant est à 60-55 %, l'oxygène à
रॉजर. 45-1 101. 2+08. 12 37 50. 5+36. 10+33. 46-1 114. 2+25 14 12 47. 4+05. 9+33. 47-1 आगे और पीछे फायरिंग थ्रस्टर्स. 08 और 120. 0+14 और 2+30. 15 46 36. 3+17. 8+37. 48-1 आगे और पीछे थ्रस्टर्स. 24 और 120. 0+40 और 230, सुधार 2+30. 17 20 19. 2+42. 8+43. 49-4 111. 2+21. 20 06 48. 4+
Sind Sie der Meinung, dass Ihnen diese Einstellungen jetzt eine ausreichende Kühlung biet
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Nous avons perdu toutes les données vous concernant. Les dernières données en notre possession indiquaient un angle
收到。我这里
«Дружба Семь», это Muchea Com T
E, Jim, prima sera pensavamo ci fosse un malinteso sulla quantità di acqua potabile che puoi bere, ma vogliamo avvisarti che puoi bere quanta acqua vuoi. Ci sono 17 chili nel serbatoio dell'acqua potabile, e questo è 
罗杰，弗兰克。
彼は
ठीक है। पहला कथन है: "ऑपरेट मोड में 5 मिनट तक सत्यापित करें।" फिर हम "एड्रेस 400 प्लस 5, फिर 400 प्लस ज़ीरो पर जाते हैं। पिच और रोल को पल्स मोड पर सेट करें; यॉ, मोड कंट्रोल। पिच और रोल का उपयोग करके पैंतरेबाज़ी करें।" कंप्यूटर यॉ को नियंत्रित कर रहा है, लेकिन आप ACA का उपयोग करके इसे ओवरराइड कर स
У меня его пока нет, но сейчас я чувствую себя ближе к тому, чтобы его получить, чем когда-либо. Думаю, дело в этом чертовом стопроцентном кислороде. Я вдыхаю его, и мне кажется, я никогда еще не чувствовал такой сухости. Даже при самой сильной простуде, когда я не мог дышать носом, и мой голос звучал так, будто у меня сильный, глубокий насморк. Мне самому кажется, что я очень... но теперь я могу так думать, если... Я и во сне тоже так думал. Но на самом деле, во сне у меня жгло нос. Мой голос звучал очень 
मैं कहूंगा कि स्थानीय सतह का रंग लगभग वैसा ही है जैसा हमने सूर्य के इस कोण (लगभग 10 डिग्री) पर कक्षा से देखा था। यह लगभग रंगहीन है। यह धूसर है, और शून्य चरण रेखा की ओर देखने पर यह बहुत सफेद, चॉक जैसा धूसर दिखता है; और सूर्य से 90 डिग्री दूर देखने पर यह काफी गहरा धूसर, राख जैसा धूसर दिखता है। रॉकेट इंजन के धुएं से क्षतिग्रस्त या विचलित हुई कुछ सतही चट्टानें बाहर से हल्के धूसर रंग से ढकी हुई हैं; लेकिन जहां वे टूटी हैं, वहां उनका
看起来即使在断电状态下（字迹模糊），我们仍然消耗着略低于11安培的电流。1号机组是10安培，2号机组略低于11安培。系绳——或者说系绳或脐带式约束装置在外部舱门的位置——使得在航天器前方进行任何舱外活动（EVA）都相当困难，尤其是在自由系绳空气动力学方面。每当我在那片区域操作时，系绳末端会把我往后拉，反作用力会把我带回航天器上方，然后回到适配器部分。这就是为什么我在舷窗上方进行操作时，总是会超出视线范围，然后又漂回航天器后部的原因。我不得不不断地拉动自己才能回到航天器前部。我对拍摄到的照片并不满意。我身上系着好几根绳子，很难把它们都固定住……枪上的绳子、我身上系的缆绳、脐带缆绳，还有其他几根杂七杂八的绳子到处乱甩，很难不让它们挡住镜头。你可能会注意到，照片里我的手臂移动得很快。我一直在努力把它们移开，好让我能拍照
يمكنك تولي زمام الأمور 
Игл и Колумбия, это резервная команда. Поздравляем вас со вчерашним выступлен
로저. 서비스 모듈 JETT에 대해 알아두셔야 할 중요한 사항이 있습니다. 제가 설명드린 자세에서 푸시-풀 기동을 권장할 예정입니다. 먼저 초당 0.5피트(약 15cm)에 X를 더한 속도로 이동한 다음, 서비스 모듈을 분리하고, 다시 초당 0.5피트(약 15cm)에서 X를 뺀 속도로 이동하십
حسنًا. نحن جاهزون
حسنًا، كما ترون، نحن نتجه يمينًا، ونسير بشكل جي
Okay. On that page in l
罗杰，我这里有个48比1的负
좋아요. 다시 *** 발을 살짝 움직여서 *** 현관으로 돌아왔습니다. 등을 살짝 굽혔
Bien, Apollo 8. Tous les systèmes, après un rapide coup d'œil, semblent fonctionner parfaitement. Nous disposons d'une mise à jour complète des quantités, donc cette information est disponible. La température de la conduite d'alimentation
Роджер. Мы измерили вашу температуру. Пожалуйста, подним
روجر. لقد استخدمتُ السدس للتو وأنظر الآن إلى تكساس، ويبدو أن خبير الأرصاد الجوية مُحق، فالجو يبدو جميلاً. السماء ملبدة بالغيوم في الأس
그 일은 우리가 아제나와 우주선이 0°, 180°, 0°의 각도로 결합된 상태에서 안정화되었을 때 발생했습니다. 우주선의 자세 제어 전원과 OAMS 자세 제어 전원이 꺼진 상태였고
该死的靶子。你应该把对焦距离设为无穷远，快门速度设为1/2
好的。现在，在飞掠机动的页面上，在你北极星下方，我有一些新的数字，因为我们把北斗七星和北极
收到。模式 2
حسنًا، لديّ عنصر رؤية النجوم الخاص بتلسكوب المسح الضوئي لتأخذه عندما تكون م
侧面，我们处于最小死区姿态保持状态；接触时，我加大了
Хорошо. Понятно. Второй вопрос: когда мы закончим -7, этот маневр для достижения положения
아폴로 8호입니다. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 근접 비행과 근일점 통과 후 2시간 동안의 기동을 보여드리겠습니다. 준비가 되시면 수신하세
13, ह्यूस्ट
Okay, Aquarius. Wir hier unten sammeln uns neu, arbeiten an euren Steuerungsmodi und versuchen, etwas einzurichten. Wir schauen uns die Verbrauchsmaterialien im Gegensatz zum Flugplan an und so weiter. Sobald wir alle Informationen haben, geben wir sie euch weiter. Die 14 Ersatzcrewmitglieder üben in den Simulatoren die Andockmanöver und entwickeln Ausrichtungsverfahren, um die Sterne durchs Fenster zu beobachten. Wenn ihr also jemals Sterne seht und glaubt, eine Ausrichtung durchs Fenster durchführen zu können, lass
Okay. The PR
Roger. Die haben vollkom
And the Domed Stadium rental controversy is still going on. Then, there's a nice story about Chris and the Control Center and your flight team and your families in t
Да
Je te comprends très bien. J
Roger
Well, aside from the one big one that we went over, I guess there were none in our area. I took a stroll back after putting up the EASEP, and while Buzz was starting to unpack the documented samples - took a stroll back to a crater behind us that was maybe 70 or 80 feet in diameter and
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ど
Farò un test di orientamento a questo punto, mentre sono in volo e non sono così impegnato. Cerco la maniglia manuale - e ci sono andato, esattamente lì. Cerco l'assetto di imbardata. L'ho colpita a 20 gradi, a destra 20 gradi. Cerco la maniglia di emergenza. Proprio lì, negativa, quella - leggermente fuori, ho toccato prima il lato della scatola. Non l'ho colpita esattamente, ne sono sicuro. Questo è il completamento del test di ori
제미니 4호, CSQ입니다. 들
هل سخانات RCS الخاص
D'accord. D'accord, l'onduleur 1 est maintenant alimenté sur les deux bus CA. Jack, nous avons désactivé toutes les pompes des piles à com
روجر. أنت أيضاً بلغت الخامسة من عمرك الآن يا ما
Roger
खेलों की बात कर
好的。我已经切换到 FOR
Je n'ai pas bien compris votre der
そ
好吧。如果他们能在这儿撑几个小时，如果他们还有什么办法，就告诉他们我还活着，等我忙完，我一定全力以赴。我甚至可以向全世界宣布，我根本没注意到他们的小放
Что ж, мы
Roger. Wir würden lieber etwas Ne
好的。我得切换一下全向天线。好的。乔，看看第1-4页的更改，燃料电池加热器3，关闭，向下到燃料电池1主总线A中心 - 主总线A关闭；主总线 - 燃料电池2到主总线A，关闭；燃料电池3到主总线A，对讲，灰色；主总线A复位关闭；燃料电池1到主总线B对讲，灰色；燃料电池2到主总线B对讲，灰色；燃料电池3到主总线B关闭；主总线B复位，关
좋습니다. 1
अच्छा। वैसे, यहाँ मिडवेस्ट में ज़बरदस्त बर्फ़ीला तूफ़ान आया था; पता नहीं आप लोग ऊपर से देख पा रहे हैं या नहीं। और ह्यूस्टन में, सच कहूँ तो, काफ़ी ठंड हो रही है, लगभग 35 डिग्री। और हम जानना चाहेंगे कि अगले रविवार को आप किसे पसंद करते हैं, बाल्टीमोर या क्लीवलैंड? कल बाल्टीमोर का डिफेंस ज़बरदस्त था। उन्होंने शानदार पास रश किया, और कैप कॉम को लगता है कि हैनी आप लोगों को शर्त लगाने के 
Если вы можете переключиться там, внизу, без проблем, то, пожалуйста, сделайте эт
बिल, थोड़ा इंतज़ार कीजिए। हम आ
ठीक है। हमने एक काम पूरा कर लिया है। क्या आप चाहते हैं कि 
Dies ist Sigma Seven, nur VOX-Aufnahme. Ich habe den Automatikmodus auf Normalbetrieb ohne Hochgeschwindigkeitsantrieb wiederhergestellt. Aktuell liegt der Automatikmodus bei 85 Prozent, der manuelle Modus bei 90 Prozent. Jetzt, wo ich eingeschaltet bin, kann ich einige Experi
Apollo 8, Houston.
Apollo 8, th
了解、ジェミニVIII。時刻は03:47:35、デルタV:6
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。
네, 8번입니다. 방금 테스트 패턴에 대한 답변을 받았습니다. 저희는 지상 테스트용으로 25개의 테스트 패턴이 배정되어 있다고 생각했고, 지금까지 살펴본 패턴들이 바로 이것들
هذا
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. سنشحن البطارية "ب" حتى فترة السكون. سنتوقف عن الشحن حينها. أيضاً، في حوالي الساعة 
Bon. Premièrement, il semble impossible d'échapper au fait que vous monopolisez l'actualité ici sur Terre. Même Pravda, en Russie, fait sa une sur la mission et surnomme Neil « le tsar du vaisseau ». Je crois qu'ils se sont tr
Un instant. On s'en occupe. 
Контроллер маневрирования — убран. Индикаторы по
Bon, j'ai tout compris… mais avant ça, je voulais vous dire que mes batteries ont t
Роджер. Я
Roger. Ich bi
ジム、機動を
Okay, and something is giving us a reach, Jack, both in pitch and roll, so I'm susp
아직 진행 중입니다. 고르도, 아직 약간씩 오차가 있
そして、スプラッシュカーテンを取り付け、ネックダムを取り付け、キャビンエアーリサーキュレーションハンドルを上げます。左のシュノーケルハンドルとキャビンベントハンドルを上げます。ハッチリリーストリガーを離します。ウォーターシールが下がって閉じていることを確認します。ランヤードを取り付け、左のハッチを開きます。司令パイロットのサバイバルギアを宇宙船の右側に収納します。リカバリーループ全体は...宇宙船の右側です。サバイバルキットを持って左席に移動します。パイロットのサバイバルギアをリカバリーループの上の左ハッチに投げます。メイウエストを膨らませ、宇宙船の右側にあるこ
是的，我对一切都非常满意。我停下所有事情去修理那套防护服的电路
ロジャー、Rev 12 RKVでPLAとCLAの時刻を更新します。Rev 13ではカナリア諸島にCバンドの航跡が残ります。また、軌道航法チェックランも行います。姿勢制御には燃
제 눈에는 전부 눈송이처럼 보여요. 아니, 그렇지 않아요. 눈
Роджер. Не могли
了解。PAD: 102 33 04.36, 09 50、マイナス 00021 182 287 000、プラス 56919。10未満: 105 1
रॉजर। क्या आप 6-4 को ग्रीनविच मीन टाइम और रेट्रो कमांड पढ़कर सुना सकते हैं? मुझे ΔV 00, ΔT 00, 8+
Хорошо. Думаю, мы не очень удачно определились с наземным оповещением о том, как направить космический аппарат. Во-первых, я думаю, в следующий раз мы сможем сделать это намного лучше, теперь, когда мы допустили ошибку. Я с вами с
Да. Хорошо. 
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらスティールヘッド。視界に入った。今から接近する。約4分後には回収作業を開始で
さあ、アポロ8号です。まず、すべての入室手順と
この燃焼中に少し振動を感じます
そうです。これで飛行計画の変更、つまりフライトプランの
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह ज़ांज़ीबार कैप कॉम
Apollo 13, Houston. Perderemo i dati da Carnarvon tra circa 1 minuto. Probabilmente avremo la comunicazione vocale. Tutto procede a
Pour répondre à ta question, Vance, il est assez difficile d'utiliser le lacet à zéro immédiatement. Donc, pour l'instant, le lacet tend vers zéro, le tangage vers 90° et l
Roger, sir, if you will give 
ジェミニ4号、弱気な様子ですね。OAMSなしの6-4アップデートをお届けします。01日
로저. 연소 상태 보고서는 다음과 같습니다. DELTA-TIG 0, 연소 시간 
了解。テープの音声の可能性が高いです
حسناً. سيتم إدخاله. قل متى
そうです。ジャック、どうやら揺れは逆方向に動いているようです。地球が昇り始め、月が窓の中で低くな
Хорошо. Теперь я продолжу прове
Plus 00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013 vers le haut 048 à droite 37, plus 1418, moins 16500 129 
记录如下：太平洋中部，357 152 359 268，加 0813，减 165 03 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028，NA 4 次，与 T
是的，达拉斯那边的人都在哭。篮球比分：休斯顿这周末表现不太好。伊利诺伊大学以97比84击败了休斯顿。北卡罗来纳大学也战胜了休斯顿，比分是85比77。弗兰克，报纸上刊登了一些关于休斯顿油人队的报道。油人队投票选出了乔治·
카노, 여기는 시
Roger, Jack. tells me that's all one circuit breake
Okay. Da unten ist es gar nicht so schlecht. Wir sind drin – es ist hell
بعد ثلاث دقائق. لا يزال مستوى الوقود والأكسجين مستقرًا؛ وضغط المقصورة 5.8 رطل/بوصة مربعة. تبدو الطاقة جيدة؛ وحالتي الصحية جي
È molto interessante notare che il mio assetto, e il... è all'incirca di beccheggio più 30 gradi, rollio a destra di 130 gradi e imbardata a sinistra di 20 gradi. Il pallone in questo momento si muove proprio con me. Mantiene una direzione costante in ogni momento. Ecco di nuovo la fascia dell'orizzonte; questa 
Ok,
سأتحقق من ذلك يا 
알겠습니다. 육분의에서 어떤 전구가 나갔는지 알려
分かりました。ヘイニーのニュー
Je suis maintenant en attitude de rentrée atmosphérique. Prêt à passer en mode automatique. Les commandes de vol électriques fonctionnent parfaitement, comme lors de l'entraînement. L'utilisation du simulateur de procédures a donné des résultats très positifs. Le temps passe vraiment vite, c'est indéniable. Retour en mode automatique. J'ai re
Roger. Comprendre une distance d'erreur maximale de 70 milles nautiques (3 sigma), une rétro-allumage OAMS, une rétro-allumage manuelle, un roulage à portance nulle, j'ai obtenu une récupération plus rapide, être capable de tracer le 
روجر. بقي ملاحظتان. النقطة الرابعة: استخدم NC-4، الخطوات من 1 إلى 10، وNC-8، الخطوتين 3 و4. متوسط 
我会从坎恩那里买
极光七号，你感觉怎么样？
Jim, we'r
Проводилась ли повторная провер
Um welc
و CB - CB INVERTER
Be sure I don't throw any switches over there while I'm moving a
收到。我是双子星4号的指令长。我刚刚睡了大约五个半小时的午觉，其中最后三个小时睡得相当不错。前两个半小时睡得断断续续的
हम
J
11, questa è Houston. L'immagine sta diventando un po'
Vous leur répondriez: « Buenas día
Ich glaube schon, Ken. Dieses Lichtban
Oui, je
E la valvola di flusso EVAP, 
네. 조, 길이가 얼
알겠습니다. 저는 일반 모드이고, 전원 공급 시
Yorktown, Rec 3. Das Kommandomodul be
알겠습니다. 지금 상황은 저희가 여러분을 위해 짠 비행 계획대로라면 식사를 모두 마치시고, 여러분과 잭이 당직을 맡고 프레드는 잠을 자는 시간입니다. 그러니까 계획대로라면 여러분은 3~4시간 일찍 일어난 셈이죠. 다음 휴식 시간은 96시간, 즉 지금으로부터 7시간 후입니다. 그리고 그보다 한 시간 전인 95시간에 세 분 모두 식사를 하시고, 여러분과 잭은 
حسناً، هذا واض
, this is 
जब आप फोन पर बात कर रहे हों, तो कृपया ध्यान दें कि हमारी गणना के अनुसार आपके यहाँ पीने का पानी जल्द ही खत्म हो सकता है। साथ ही, आपके हाइड्रोजन ट
了解し
روجر، أبولو ١١. لدينا ليزر سنقوم بتشغيله وإطفائه - إنه ليزر أزرق مخضر - بتردد نبضي، نبضة ثانية واحدة تشغيل، نبضة ثانية واحدة إطفاء. يصدر هذا الليزر من مرصد ماكدونالد بالقرب من إل باسو، والذي يقع على خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار، أو داخله. سنقوم بتشغيله للحظات. هل يمكنك إلقاء 
イーグル、ちょっと待ってくれ。通信チェックに進む前に、ちゃん
마스터 
好的。您的服务模块四极管 Bravo 组件的温度显示略低，大约低了 20 度，比其他四极管都低。请确认四极管 Bravo 的加热器
Ok, pagina successiva, 16. Questa è la continuazione della stessa cosa sulla corona solare. Sul lato destro della pagina, a partire da poco sopra 107:40 con ", manovra per
Okay, Joe. Mi sono messo nei guai. Abbiamo caricato i vettori del 
सचमुच, मैंने जितने भी खूबसूरत नज़ारे देखे, उनमें से एक था नीचे देखना और फ्लोरिडा के दक्षिणी छोर, क्यूबा द्वीप, प्यूर्टो रिको और सांता डोमिंगो द्वीप समूह को देखना। यह वाकई एक अद्भुत दृश्य था। नीले रंग के विभिन्न शेड्स और जैसे-जैसे पानी गहराता गया, द्वीपों का नज़ारा बेहद खू
Pour information, nous voyons 3.0 dans le registre 1. Nous vous avons lu 3.1 sur le bloc-notes. La DELTA-V réelle était de 3.05, et on m'avait prévenu
11, we'd like you to shift to an OMN
حسنًا. تبدو جيدًا هنا على ا
ठीक है। दूसरी बात यह है कि जब आप पहली परिक्रमा के दौरान पैंतरेबाज
Роджер. Мыс Доброй Надежды хотел бы получить для пилота пропуск медицинских данных номер один. Рекомендую ему прямо сейчас ввести датчик температуры ртом, 
Roger. Bevor Bill einschläft, möchten wir ihn bitten, die zweite EVAP-Prüfung jetzt durchzuführen, wann immer es ihm pass
Ну, это было хорошо... Может, перейдём к маневру,
La voce di Goddard ti sent
Roger. 
रॉजर। हम इस पर विचार करेंगे। ब
它们发出的声音真不少，不是吗？不过那可能是姿
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。弗兰克，我们想确保你明白，当你操作时
重量を変更できるかもしれ
로저, 
놀랍네요.
有什么值
Хорошо, Вэнс. Пока мы ждём, не мог
Okay. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, beim JETT dabei zu bleiben, da wir alles sorgfältig durchdacht haben. Die passenden Dämpfungsbänder sind vorhanden und a
Роджер, Хьюст
罗杰，还有7分钟。我明白你要把戴着项圈的人放
Роджер. Понимаете, моя ретроспективная последователь
... 42 процента. Примерно 100-120 фунтов видно. Это не оставляе
네. TV 업계를 지켜보는 몇몇 분들이 필터에 적용해 보고 싶은 아이디어들을 가지고 계십니다. 그분들의 아이디어를 읽어드리고 생각해 보신 후, 앞으로 10시간 안
नहीं, जैक; मैं इसक
नहीं, हमें अंतरिक्ष यान म
ठीक है। यह फ्लाईबाई और पेरिसिंथियन प्लस 2 घंटे के ब्लॉक अ
알겠습니다. 이제 탱크의 마지막 벤트 설정을 하겠습니다. 페이지 맨 위에서 INVERTER 1, CLOSE 바로 다음에 PROP DESCENT HELIU
分かりました。キャビンの温度は100度、キャビンドームは40度、キャビン熱交換器の温度は42度です。キャビン
D'accord. Merci, Fr
Roger. Nous avons ici l'Interstellar Times, édition du 24 décembre. Votre émission a rencontré un vif succès. Elle a été regardée ce matin par la plupart des nations de votre planète voisine: la Terre. Elle 
Roger, si vous avez un peu de temps, pourriez-vous me
好的，弗兰克，这
Ich habe kein Stereobild von den beiden aufgenommen, aber sie befinden sich genau in der Nähe 
La Terra tornerà a comparire nella finestra tra 1 o 
わかりました。15ページの「CHECKOUT」という見出しを「Verify following switches（以下のスイッチを確認してください）」に変更します。これらのスイッチは「GUIDANCE CONTROL」、3行目の「ATTITUDE CONTROL (3)」を「MODE CONTROL」に変更し、「MODE CONTROL (BOTH)」
毎秒32フィート、1.5マイルの速度でゆっくりと
حسنًا. منتصف PAC، 000152، 000، 178؛ وتذكر أن هذا غروب القمر وحالة فحص القمر. الاسم 61، ناقص 21.66، ناقص 165.37؛ 30؛ الأربعة التالية غير متوفرة؛ DO هو 4.00، 02:20؛ 19، 03:38، 07:59. بقية اللوحة غير متوفرة لهذه. أنت متجه الرفع لأعلى في الأسفل تمامًا. وتبقى جميع الملاحظات كما هي؛ إذا كنت تريد مني نسخها، فأخبرني؛ وإلا، يمكنك قراءتها مرة أخر
Okay, Wassermann. Folgendes machen wir: Richten Sie die X-Achse (die positive X-Achse) entweder nach Norden oder Süden aus. Es scheint uns sinnvoller, die positive X-Achse nach Süden auszurichten. Tun Sie dies bitte bei eingeschaltetem Gerät. Anschließend schlagen wir vor, das Gerät auszuschalten, um Energie zu sparen. Dadurch verlieren wir jedoch die Möglichkeit, das Raumschiff zu steuern, und müssen es dann mit der Handsteuerung im
Roger, Colombie. L'identifiant du point de repère est le module lunaire – plus précisément la Base Tranquillité; P1, 112 h 25 min 08 s; P2, 112 h 30 min 1
Houston, Eagle. Read you loud and clear.
الشريط الجديد للنسخة القديمة هو الشريط رقم 15، ولدي ا
Хорошо. С этим все в порядке, Джек. И у нас было около 11 или 12 шагов для командного модуля. Они выполняются как есть, без изменений. А затем у нас было еще несколько процедур для
Ого! Этот кормовой модуль в
요(ya
Roger, It seems to be flowing a little bit more, and act
Роджер. После того, как вы сообщите нам целевую нагрузку, мы перейдем к ПРОГРАММЕ 30, и я не думал, что пр
방금 편광 필터를 통해 본 사진에 대해 말씀하셨는데, 그게 바로 편광 필터를 통해 
Roger, Deke. Je suis en mode talkie-walkie. Comm
Wenn – ich bin mir gerade nicht sicher, wie groß der Winkel des Mondes ist, Jack. Am besten wäre es, wenn du ihn mit dem Sextanten beobachten könntest, aber du müsstest eventuell ins Teleskop gehen, um den Mittelpunkt zu 
Questo è confermato, Jack. Ri
Roger, Frank. The helium tank temperature that we are watching on quad A has only 
حسنًا. هذا لنقل المعدات. فلتر مروحة ا
프랭크, 좋은 아침입니다. 아폴로
了解。3 53 23 
좋아요. 하나 드실
BAT Charlie, 37,0; Pyro A, 37,0; Pyro B, 37,0; Heliumdruck, 3450; und nur zum Spaß, Stickstoff A, 2300; Stickstoff B, 2400; 5 Charlie, 4,5; 5 Dog, 3,5; 6 Alfa, 4,0; 6 Baker, 4,6; 6 Char
알겠습니다. 제가 이해가 안 되는 부분은
ハワ
Apollo 8, torniamo indietro e confermiamo sul tuo pericinzio minimo p
Okay, Aquarius. Here's what we're going to do. We'd like you to point the X-axis either north or south. That's the positive X-axis. It appears to us that it would be closer to orient the plus X-axis toward the south. Do that with the powered up using the. After that, we propose to power down the to save some power. However, this means that we lose the use of the , and we'll have to control the spacecraft with 
Bene. E sto chiudendo i RI
А что касается фотографии, Вэнс, я уже собирался её сделать незадолго до твоего звонка, а Зем
La colazione è stata magn
로저, 마이크. 원하실 때
نعم يا جيم. هذا هو الملف الذي أعطيناه لك الليلة الماضية بعد الحرق الكبير، وسنستخدمه بعد تعديله من قبلنا. جربنا هذا الملف في جهاز المحاكاة، وبالطبع، بدون أي اهتزازات أو مشاكل، لكن يبدو أنه يعمل بشكل جيد جدًا 
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हम
حسنًا. أبولو 13، هيوستن. لديّ تحديث صغير آخر لكم، وهو تحديث آخر
फ्रेड, आपको दोबारा बोलना पड़ेगा। आपकी आवाज़ सुनाई नहीं दे रही। बहुत शोर है। शायद हमें नया एंटीना लगाना
रॉजर। य
حسناً، قال إنه للحصول على MSC-1، أرادوا إيقاف تشغيل منارة المساعدة ACQ لمدة 5 دقائق. كما 
Ok, 13; qui siamo a Houston. Vorremmo che andassi alla t
11, Хьюстон. Мы собираемся проверить возможность автоматического повторного захвата в S-диапазоне, и для этого нам нужно зафиксировать нашу восходящую несущую примерно на 30 секунд. Затем мы снова включим её и посмотрим, сможет ли оборудование космического аппарата автоматически повторно захватить сигнал. Поэтому, если вы не 
Quelques lignes plus bas, là où vous voyez « DAC acti
रॉजर, अल। मैं ऑटो मोड में हूँ; रेट्रो; जाइरो स्विच सामान्य हैं; पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है। कैप्सूल र
分かりました。凝縮液容器の話に戻りましょう。本当に知りたいのは、漏れるかどうか
如今的阿波
Сколько времени нужно, чтобы это устройство прогрелось? 
好的……好的。你想要这些数字吗？
罗杰，弗雷德。我想确认一下，你们是否能从指令舱获得饮用水，如果你们能估算一下随着时间的推移你们的用水量以及你们已经使用了
Roger. Hey Jim, solange du wach bist und es schön ruhig ist, lass mich dir noch ein paar Dinge mitgeben, über die du nachdenken solltest. Eines ganz konkret. Ich weiß, keiner von euch
… Juste un… Ce sont ces angles de 13 à 20 degrés. Ici. Juste ici
休斯
Vous pouvez commencer à travailler sur ces projet
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. В следующий раз, когда мы пройдем через точку нулевого крена, мы остановимся, и это даст нам тангаж в 90 градусов. Теперь я понимаю, вы хотите, чтобы мы перешли от тангажа в 90 градусов к тангажу в 0 градусов для выравнивания пла
..
たぶん、しばらくはぐっすり眠れるのに、その後に「ガシャン！」ってなるのはこのためなのでしょう
컬럼비아, 휴스턴.
Yes. It impacted 74 nautical miles from the and the passive seismic detected major s
はい、そう
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, hier spricht RK
ठीक है। हम इस
Okay. L'ultimo Joe è stato eseguito a -4 ore e mezza; eseguire una spinta di 0,5 piedi al secondo, capacità di car
Un buon carico e un buon mo
11, Houston. The definition is pretty good on our monitor here.
क्या यह सही
이글, 휴스턴입니다. 음성이 없습니다. OMNI로 착신 전환 확인하시겠습니까? 이상입니
Le 
ねえ、ジ
ठीक है। हम कॉपी कर 
제미니 VI, 제미니 VI, 휴스턴 CAP COM. 어떻게 읽으시나
さて、ジャック、今お見せしているのはLEVVAです。これも以前にもお見せしたことがあります。地上で着用する頭巾で、ジムのLEVVAを持ってきて、いくつかのMODをお見せしています。これまでの問題の一つは、地上のキャラクターの区別があ
Esatto. Bene, a questo punto vogl
Oui. Plus lent ou plus rapide, peu importe
ممتاز. كلما اتجهت جنوبًا نحو الداخل، أرى المزيد من الأضواء. هناك نمطان، بل أربعة أنماط في تلك المنطقة. كما يظهر الآن
В тот момент вы передадите слово «ретро-э
لديك ا
روجر، هل ي
Roger. Big vent time, and it 
알겠습니다. 비행 계획 업데이트가 있는데, 시간 되실 때 복사해서 보내드릴게요. 급하실 필
Roger. Sie
非
जब मैं बाहर था, तो मैंने जिम की खिड़की पर ध्यान दिया - उसकी खिड़की के बाहरी हिस्से पर एक परत चढ़ी हुई है। एक बार जब मेरा कंधा या हाथ उससे टकराया, तो वह परत सीधे खिड़की पर फैल गई, और उसकी विंडशील्ड के ऊपरी हिस्से पर भी लग गई, जिससे उसे बाहर दिखाई नहीं दे रहा था। जब मैं इस तरफ से बाहर देखता हूँ, तो मुझे दिखाई देता है कि खिड़
알겠습니다. 페리신시안 플러스 2입니다. / 62871 11월 알파, 그리고 대기하세요. 좋습니다. 피치 트림과 요 트림은 적용되지 않습니다. 시간, -00468, +00254, +00181 173 101 027 11월 알파 +00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044, 하강 044, 좌측 45, +1100, -02500 12967 36198, 주 항성 시리우스, 보조 항성 리겔 155:010, 제트기 4개
Sono Jim. Ho appena scattato due foto con il dorso Hasselblad n. 7 e con i telai n. 11 e 12. 
هل تريد قياس درجة الحرار
Na sowas! Geht es jetzt schn
네, 모두 맞습니다. 혹시 궁금한 점이 있으시면 언제든지 질문
روجر. أجل، صحيح، أنا أيضاً لم آكل الخبز المحمص.
Wir brauchen eine – Kann ich eine Taschenlampe haben? Du hast doch eine Taschenlampe. Wir brauchen vielleicht eine Ersat
무엇이 그렇지
Гот
उन्हें बता दें कि हमने कूलेंट पंप की जांच कर ली है
はい、わかりました。ありがとうございます。VHFアルファ・シンプレックスです。設定しておきます。その合間に、はるか上
Je décris la bande bleue. Il y a 
نعم. حسنًا، أنت تميل دائمًا إلى المبالغة في تقدير قدراتنا أيضً
Roger. Ça me paraît une excellente idée. Le p
AC 버스 
فريندشيب سفن، هذا مركز قيادة كانو كاب. لا أعتقد أنني
알겠
Okay, Bill. We are coming up on the and then the sightings, and there is some conc
Роджер, Фрэнк. У нас есть некоторые данные, которые были упущены в вашей информации. Если у вас 
好的。我们已经考虑了所有可能的情况。我们能想到的最坏情况是你的3σ误差脱靶距离——最坏
Jim, when you get a chance, either you or
Nous n'avons 
Vuoi che resti fermo adesso, Wal
Permettez-moi de vous demander. Des retours d'information su
और आज श्रीमती रॉबर्ट गोडार्ड ने कहा कि उनके पति बहुत खुश होते। "वे चिल्लाते नहीं, बल्कि खुशी से झूम उठते।" उन्होंने आगे कहा, "उनका सपना था चांद पर रॉकेट भेजना।" अपोलो 11 मिशन को लेकर दुनिया भर के लोगों के पास खुश होने के कई कारण थे। इतालवी पुलिस ने बताया 
It's getting appreciably larger n
क्या आप ये सब चीजें पहने रह स
알았어, 프레드. 네 말이 맞는 것 같아. 네가 다시 읽어준 걸 완전히 따라한 건 아니지만, 아주 간단해. 새 카트리지를 넣을 건데, 새 카트리지 윗부분을 기존 카트리지 아랫부분에 대고, 수건 걸이 마
追跡データはど
रॉजर और जॉन सुझाव देते हैं कि आप उन कणों को देखने के लिए
13. फिलहाल हम जलने के मामले पर ध्यान नहीं देंगे। अभी इसमें कुछ समय लगेगा; लेकिन हम आपको अन्य प्रक्रियाएं उपलब्ध कराने पर काम कर रहे हैं, जिनकी मदद से हम सिस्
Apollo 11, qui Housto
CSQ。ジェミニ
Okay. In answer to the battery-charging questions, I calculate it should be fully
알겠습니다. 그리고 가능하시다면, EVA 장갑을 비닐봉지에 넣어 최대한 밀봉해 주시면 감사하겠습니다
نعم. حاولتُ إطلاقه فوق محطتهم لكنني لم أتمكن من ذلك. ربما عليك تذكيرهم بأن ال
Роджер. Ваша орбита снижается не так быстро, как мы ожидали, коэффициент снижения составляет приблизитель
मैं यहाँ
알겠습니다. 일반 음성으로는 제대로 전달이 안 되는 것 같네요. 극저온 탱크에서, 특히 산소 부분에서 기체층 파괴가 꽤 심하게 발생했습니다. 팬 작동 중에 이런 현상이 나타나는 걸 확인할 수 있는데, 앞으로 산소를 충분히 휘저어주도록 다시 한번 알려드리겠습
分
제미니 4호, RKV 대기 중입니다. 남은 시간은
Ok, F
Bene. Andare a pagina 25. A pagina 25, omettere il passaggio 3; eseguire il passaggio 4. Al passaggio 4, ultima riga, cancellare "CB(1
分かりま
Das Oberflächenmaterial ist pulverig. *** Wie gut Ihr Objektiv ist, aber wenn Sie *** Flecken erkenn
Роджер. Я как раз записывал на диктофон. Единственное необычное, что я заметил, это довольно высокий слой дымки, примерно на 7-8 градусов выше горизонта на ночной стороне. Звезды я вижу сквозь него, когда они опускаются к настоящему горизонту, но это очень хорошо различимая одиночная поло
ठीक है। प्रतीक्षा करें। क्या आप
分かりました。いくつか確認したい点があります。可能であれば、パラシュートに乗っている間にハッチドッグを外す予定ですか？もし無理なら、水中で行う予定ですか
大
И, кажется, у нас возникли 
Started the fuel cell purge, and I'm going to 15, a
Ok. Il circuito primario qui sotto sembra ancora in buone condizioni, quindi sembrerebbe che tu sia a posto. La carica della batteria B dovrebbe essere completata entro circa, e pensiamo che non
但 
Buzz peut le ten
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM Over
电压为 39.3，电流为
Roge
Бедный
알겠습니다. 첫 번째는 
... BACKUP VOCALE G
रॉजर, मैं समझता हूँ। आप इसे कुछ और समय तक स्थिर 
फ्रैंक, हम जो करना चाहते हैं वह है एक रेडियल अपवर्ड बर्न प्राप्त करना; और जितनी देर तक संभव हो, ऑप्टिक्स या खिड़की से बाहर किसी अन्य माध्यम से पृथ्वी की स्थिति का पता लगाना, फिर उपयुक्त थ्रस्टर्स का उपयोग करके 3 फीट प्रति सेकंड की
D'accord, maintenant, voici la procédure: amplificateur d
OK, Houston. Ça fait plus d'une he
Okay. Wir empfehlen, bei 54°45°00' anzuhalten. Damit sollten Sie den optimalen Rollwinkel erreichen. Die empfohlene Fluglage ist: Roll 263°, Nick 090°, Gier 000°. So haben Sie im Kommandomodul freie Sicht auf die Erde durch Fenster 1 und können die Hochleistungsantenne für Fernsehempfang 
Roger: Starte die Überprüfung des Rau
अप
마이크, 실내가 좀 습해지는 것 같아요. 재생음이 들리네요. 실내가 꽤 습한 것 같습니다. 실내 온도 
11, Houston. Una piccola informazion
حدث ذلك عندما كنا في وضعية المركبة الفضائية أجينا عند 0°، 180°، 0°، وكنا مستقرين عن
روجر. فقط للتأكد من أن الرغبة في التقاط صور للقمر باستخدام مرشحات حمراء وزرقاء لم تتسلل إلى هذا الاختبار التلفزيوني. لقد التقطنا صورًا للق
13, Houston. Nous vous ferons traverser Hawaï en 3 minut
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Слышал, вы общались 
Роджер. Майк, я думаю, мы можем объяснить эту скорость в семь десятых. Когда мы — в первый раз, знаете, мы не смогли пройти через это, поэтому у нас была большая ошибка между нашим фактическим CDU и желаемым CDU при крене. И в этой ситуации — транспортное средство будет крениться — будет маневрировать, скорее, со скоростью, которая задана, которая составляет три десятых плюс четыре десятых скорости, и оно будет ограничиваться четырьмя десятыми выше желаемой скорости, то есть, если у нас достаточно большой угол между желаемым и ф
Ich spüre die Beschleunigung
Well, at this 
And, 13,
いや、どうやら
Roger. Wir haben gute Blutdruckwerte v
रॉजर। समझ गया; अब तुम्हें कुछ काम करने होंगे। हमने सोचा था कि 
روجر. نحصل منك على معدل بت منخفض، وليس عالياً، وفي هذا العمل، لكي نحصل على بياناتنا، سيتع
Yes. Look -
——减速。比
Roger, nous avons suivi le plan de vol. Si je me souviens bien, nous avons laissé les MSC-2 et -3 activ
Rei
尼尔
Roger, Canary, Gemini. Nous reprenons notre plan de vol habituel, mais celui-ci manque actuellement de précision quant aux horaires. Pourriez-vous transmettre à Houston que nous souhaiterions qu'il soit mis à jour avec des horaires précis au fur et à mesure de notre progression, afin de faciliter le démarrage de nos expériences? Ils utilisent le même plan de vol que nous. Nous aimerions simplement le mettre à jour et p
جيم، نسمع تشويشًا في صوتك. هل يمكنك ضبطه بحيث يكون صوتك متواص
Gemini VI, Хьюстон. Как продвигается подготовка к ретро-мероприятию? Всё 
E Boothill, Duke Island, Sidewinder, guardando Maskelyne W, che è il punto di controllo del giro di imbardata, e appena in prossimità del terminatore. Al terminatore è cinereo e grigio. Man mano che ci si allontana dal terminatore, diventa di un grigio più chiaro, e man mano che ci si avvicina al punto subsolare, si posson
Let's see, now what can--I am at this moment rocking my arms back and forth and I can make this show up in the roll, yaw, and pitch needle. By moving my torso, I can make the pitch rate needle move up to 1 degree per second. Roll is, needle, rate needle i
Ricevuto. Capito. GET brucia 02 45 50; Delta-V, 26.2; 0 più 35; imbardata 90 a destra, beccheggio 0; 25 e 26 sono tutti zeri; 27, 90262; propulsori di popp
ロジャー、それ
ところで、ジョー、知ってる？次の周回で
Roger. Il fait un peu sombre maintenant, 11. Peut-être qu'une plus g
アポ
밴스
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston. Es sieht so aus, als ob Sie im Wiedereintrittsbereich – im Spritzbereich – gutes Wetter haben we
जिम, अगर तुम कुछ भेजने की कोशिश कर रह
这又引出了另一种可
..
罗杰。现在我们要拍摄一些地球天气照片了。如果你准备好了，我已
阿波罗8号，这里是
휴스턴, 7.7 + X + 0.00001 Y로 연소를 완료했고, Z 값은 모두 0입니다
أبولو 8، هيوستن. المسار و
나는 그가 충분히 오랫동안 노
रॉजर। 04 प्लस 32 प्ल
يمكننا أيضًا أن نعرض لك الوقت بنظامنا لحساب الوقت المنقضي للمهمة. ال
मिथुन राशि 4, कार
Roger. Bene. Le vecchie dita d'oro stanno diventando così veloci che abbiamo perso alcuni segni sul downlink. Mi chiedo: se li hai registrati a mano, potresti leggerci i tuoi tre segni: gli angoli del trunnion, i tuoi
I got out - I got out of kil
わかりました。今、どのバイ
Roger. È stata una bruciatura molto breve. Ti prego di darci un'occhiata al pannello quando ne hai la
बज़, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप
Roger, Jim. In your computer, we'd like to do an erasable memory dump again, like we did the other day, and the reason w
Roger. Rod und ich haben uns getroffen, und ich wollte eine kleine Aufnahme machen – ein ku
13, ह्यूस्टन। हम चाहेंगे कि आप ऑक्सीजन टैंक 
ح
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। हमें अभी-अभी एक मास्टर अलार्म और एक लाइट मिली है। मेरा मानना ​​है कि आंशिक दबाव CO2 की 
नैच। केबिन का तापमान — 92. सूट का तापमान — 58. केबिन का दबाव 5.6 है. सूट में CO2 की मात्रा 3/4 है. बाएँ बोतल का 
是的，从我看到的图片来看，它们都连接在一起，然后连接到中央皮带、信号调节器，上面
تم
そうです、ジャック。これからやることは…地球を船長の窓、つまり下から見た状態で停止します。そして宇宙船を操縦して、地球の明るい部分が窓の上になるようにします。つまり、宇宙船のプラスY字に沿って、ランデブー窓
Roger. Au départ, tout semblait normal. Maintenant, la trajectoire est étrange et suit un schéma inhabituel pour nous. Nous essayons de comprendre ce qui se passe; je pens
Мы не 
はい。次のステップ、パネル12：
ह्यूस्टन, तुम्हारा दिल टूटने लगा है... ह्यूस्टन, क्या तुम म
हे बिल, क्या आप बता सकते हैं कि यह किस-किस कोण से गुजरा? हमने जो वक्र बनाया है, वह स्पष्ट रूप से RF सीमा है, न कि यांत्रिक सीमा; और ऑटो रिएक्वि
रॉजर, 11. हमने आपके द्वारा दिए गए विवरण को कॉपी कर लिया है। मुझे समझ आ रहा है कि आप अफगानिस्तान और पाकिस्त
Roger, 11. E vorremmo che tu facessi uno scarico delle acque reflue dopo
روجر. جاهز للنسخ
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन CAP COM। क्या आपको मेरा पिछला संदेश मि
حسنًا، انسَ كل تلك الأمور الأخرى. يبدو لي أن لديك مشكلة ميكانيكية في الصمام.
- - हमारी प्रक्रिया कई जगहों पर सूचीबद्ध है। यह आकस्मिकता चेकलिस्ट में पृष्ठ 1 के दूसरे 
我们仍然可以透过左侧的窗户看到地球，而且似乎我们还可以看到左侧有一盏探照灯，要么就是阳光透
लगातार बाईं ओर लुढ़कते हुए गति बढ
D'accord, je vais revé
D'accord. Maintenant, tout en bas, vé
Хорошо. Единственное замечание, которое мы только что сделали, заключается в том, что, если вы подумываете о прекращении показа, нет необходим
कैनरी, मैं तुम्हें बताता हूँ, मुझे लगता है कि जब हमने स्विच को चालू हालत में छोड़कर बिजली बंद की, तब व
了解。待機
かわいそうなLMは汚染されている。尿の粒子がびっしり付いていて、光の加減で黄色く見える。あの小さな粒子は、たぶん少し固まっているんだろうけど、他のものはすべて蒸発して、少し固まってい
Dopo aver controllato i sistemi della navicella spaziale, abbiamo scoperto che il propulsore numero 8 apparentemente non si è a
Okay. The other thing that - sometime prior to entry - and we're going to be looking at it - is the normal entry test pattern, and it's called out presently in the checklist as somet
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Vérification ra
Correction, passage en mode commandes de vol électriques. Termin
That's pretty clo
Apollo 11, Houston. Und was das Wasser am hinteren Schott angeht: Wenn es nicht viel ist, empfehlen wir, es einfach aufzutupfen und die Schwämme anschließend im Abfallbehälter zu entsorgen. Falls es zu viel ist, empfehlen wir die Vorgehensweise auf der C
로저. 명사 33부터 시작합니다: 130 30 0000, 더하기 00020, 더하기 모든 0, 더하기 모든 0. 모든 0을 굴리고, 피치 230
روجر، هل يمكنك أن تعيد بإيجاز سبب اعتقادك بأن استهلاك الوقود كان ممتاز
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। आपका राशिफल क्या 
Роджер, 11. Похоже, зд
В чём про
Ich habe Bild 4a aufgenommen, das die Küste der Vereinigten Staaten zeigt. Ich nehme an – ich muss gleich auf meiner Karte nachsehen, wo wir uns befinden. Im Mome
11, Houston. Apprezzeremmo anche se annotaste gli angoli che l'antenna segue nel tentativo di riacq
Okay. Più 1197 meno 16500 12681 35608, allinea a nord imposta stelle, rollio 068, beccheggio 097, imbardata 356, spazio vuoto nessuno; altro: uno, ritorno veloce, uguale a 7900 per l'Oceano Indiano; numero 2, proce
Il riscaldamento è spento. Non abbiamo fatto q
Ne ho un altro per te. Copialo e me lo darai tutto sul readback. Okay. Una volta che hai preso l'atteggiamento e vuoi usare il - vuoi prendere la lampada, dobbiamo andare su CB 16 INVERTER 2, chiudi; CB 11, AC BUS A LAMPADA, chiudi. Dopodiché, puoi aprire CB 16 INVERTER 2 e aprire CB 11 AC BUS A LAMPADA e AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERT
Jack, Houston. Sie sind nicht zu hören. Sprechen Sie bitte etwas deutlicher ins Mikrofon. Ich habe d
Aquarius, Houston. Nous constatons que le réservoir d'oxygène ASCENT numéro 2 se remplit à nouveau, nous aimerions donc l'utiliser. Veuillez activer le réservoir d'oxygène ASCENT numér
فيما يلي، نود توضيح ما إذا كنت تنوي مسح نقاط التحكم 1 و2 و3 فقط، ثم إنشاء موقع الهبوط الوهمي؛ أم 
حسنًا. تم إيقاف تشغيل خلايا ال
Roger. We're working on that. There haven't been any transmissions from Tranquility Base since we last talked to you. We cannot give you a full S band relay without being assured of high ga
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Одновременная связь в диапазо
D'
हमने एक बात गौर की, वैंस। तुम्हें पता है वो नया फैशन जिसमें लंबे बाल होते हैं? अ
Sous ÉCLAIRAGE; PROJECTION, ouvrir; SUIVI, ouvrir.
我打算把西装控制设
Okay. For the burn there will be go to GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, ATTITUDE CONTROL switches will be ROLL PULSE, PITCH PULSE, YAW MODE CONTROL. We'll use control for pitch and roll. ENGINE GIMBAL will be OFF; we'll be using 10-percent thrust; we'll start and stop manually, the... control ullage will 
هذا سيجما سف
로저. 드디어 OMNI D 모드로 다시 연결했어요. 고이득 모드로 연결하려고 여러 번 시도했지만 실패했고, COMMAND RESET을 통해 PROCESS 모드로 전환했습니다. 이제 제 목소리가 어떻게
Ricevuto. Era 0,
जिम, हम जल्द ही आपसे पीसी प्लस 2 के लिए कुछ बर्निंग दिशानिर्देशों के साथ संपर्क करे
알겠습니다. 고이득 모드로 설정하도록 하겠습니다. 배경에서 들리는 소리는 아마 글리콜 펌프 소리일 겁니다. 이제 IMU를 켜야 하는 단계인데, 여기서 몇 분 정도 기다리는 
Oui. J'étais soulagé de ne pas avoir à rentrer dans l'avion a
- ジンバル
로저. 화물 입고 및 검증 완료했습니다. 컴퓨터에서 BLOCK으로 돌아가서 확인해 보세요. 조지 로우는
La loro efficienza varia da quasi per
友谊七号，这里是百慕大首都通讯中心，使
알겠습니다. 공 없이도 할 수 있을 것 같고, 16과 20만 주시면 우주선을 조종할 수 있
Rog
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous sommes prêts à vous envoye
इस उड़ान की ज़िम्मेदारी सबसे पहले इतिहास और उन महान वैज्ञानिकों की है जिन्होंने इससे पहले यह प्रयास किया; इसके बाद अमेरिकी जनता की, जिन्होंने अपनी इच्छाशक्ति से अपनी आकांक्षा ज़ाहिर की; फिर चार प्रशासनों और उनकी संसदों की, जिन्होंने उस इच्छाशक्ति को साकार किया; और अंत में उन एजेंसियों और उद्योग जगत की टीमों की, जिन्होंने हमारे अंतरिक्ष यान - सैटर्न, कोलंबिया, ईगल और छोटे से ईएमयू (स्पेस सूट और बैकपैक) का निर्माण किया, जो चंद्रमा की सतह पर हमारा छोटा सा अंतरिक्ष यान था। हम उन सभी अमेरिकियों को विशेष धन्
I've got to lean forward a 
J'étais déjà sorti – je suis arriv
Gemini 4, Can
Columbia. Roge
Now the crater that's in the center of the screen now is Webb. We'd be looking straight down on it at about 6 minutes before power descent. It has a relatively flat bottom to the crater, and you can see maybe two or three craters that are in the bottom of it on the western wall, the wall that's now nearest the - the camera. Near the bottom of the screen, we can see a dimple crater, just on the outside. And then coming back toward the bottom of the screen and to the left, you can see a series of depressions. It's this type of connected craters that give us most interest to discover why they're in the particular pattern that they're i
Okay. It's reasonably good. We can make out Fred fairly well. Looks like he's in a shadow. H
روجر، إيجل. 
好的。PAD：102 33 04.36，09 50，减去 00021 182 2
Хорошо. Я просто хотел с вами поговорить, похоже, у нас произошли некоторые изменения в 
روجر. مدة عرض "إيريا فوكستروت" ساعة واحدة و28 دقيقة و5
Houston, ici 8h. Je regarde à travers le télescope de balayage et ce déversement de LOX, puis
Ok, Vance. Ho appena sentito un piccolo tonfo, sembrava provenire dalla fase di discesa, e ho visto una nuova pioggia di fiocchi di neve che sembravan
و
좋아, 월리. 한 명 
D'a
أما بالنسبة لاهتزاز المركبة نفسها، فلم يكن هو ما... ثانياً... الطيران المدعوم - اهتزاز 
Мы будем следить за температурой ваших квадрокоптеров, и когда нам понадобится немного их прогреть, мы скажем в
148 550; 
좋아, 버즈. 목적은 근접 비행이야. SPS/G&N: 62815, +0.97, -0.20 0.70 54 5944, -0.0028, +0.0023, +0.0069 0.29 149 312, 원지점은 NA, +0.0221 0.0078 0.01 0.0034, 육분면 별 0
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。距离发射还有4
Roger. Eine Sache, di
休斯顿，阿波罗 8 号。进入方式如下：太平洋中部，357 152 
Roger. 91 plus 30, moins 7 %; Alfa moins 8, Bravo moins 2,
Roger. Je crois comprendre qu'il était sur p
크리스마스 선물로 짐벌 하나 더 보내주시면 어
Okay. Die automatische Verstärkungsregelung (AGC) fiel auf das sogenannte Rauschen ab. Das war der Spannungspegel an der AGC, gemessen – integriert, als das Rauschen einsetzte. Er befand sich etwa auf der 11-Uhr-Positio
अच्छा लगा। उस समय के आसपास, बिल पानी उबाल रहा
アポロ11号、
休斯顿，阿波罗8号。你们希望我们机动到某个特定姿态进行水倾
روجر. تحقق من الانحراف عند درجة واحدة في الثانية، وتأكد من ثبات الوضع على جميع المحاور، لدي و
Roger. Panel rundown follows: The fuse switches on the left panel are all as previously reported, without repeating them again. Squib is armed. Auto Retrojettison is off. Mode Select is normal, auto, gyro normal. All "T" Handles are in. The Retro Delay is normal, Cabin lights are on both. I have the red filters on, of course. The Telem low frequence is on. Rescue Aids is auto. All sequence panel items are normal except the Landing Bag to the center-off position. Fuel is 90-100 [percent]. Attitude indications are 5 [degrees] 
Хорошо. Продолжая с центральной звезды, это старый Дзуба, звезда в голове Скорпиона; он находится на 060 градусов вниз, на 42 градуса влево, плюс 0773, минус 16500 12982 36256. Звезды, заходящие на север, остаются Сириус, Ригель, крен 129, тангаж 155, рыскание 010; четырехквадрантный и
Roger. Stavo entrando u
Wir
हाँ। ये बिल्कुल कसे हुए हैं। मैं आपको बताता हूँ; मैं इन्हें उतारकर दोबारा पहनता हूँ और देखता हूँ कि इससे कोई फर्क पड़ता है य
G
吉姆，为了方便我们进行这次简报，我们希望通信信号更好一些，而且我们完全可以腾出电力；所以请你到16号面板合上功率放大器断路器，然后请你到12号面板将语音功能开关拨到“语音”位
좋습니다. 다음 1, 2, 3, 4는 변경하지 않습니다. 그리고 TRANSLATION CONTROLLER POWER를 OFF로, ROTATION CONTROL POWER NO
Okay, Jack, we have a maneuver pad, a midcourse for free return.:; minus 0021.3, plus 004.1, minus 0031.2; HA an
Roger, 11. Verstanden. Ich empfehle Ihnen, diese Option (vorzugsweise 1) zu w
यह सही है। ठीक है। अगला: अगला कैमरा - स्टैंडबाय 1। मुझे यहाँ शोर सुनाई दे रहा है। ठीक है। अगला - अगला कैमरा 16-मिलीमीटर वाला होगा, और इन तस्वीरों को प्राथमिकता 3 माना जाता है। ठीक है। A-8 से 16-मिलीमीटर वाला लेंस और पावरपैक लें। 10-मिलीमीटर वाला लेंस लें और उसे हटा दें - 10-मिलीमीटर वाला लेंस हटा दें, और B-3 से 18-मिलीमीटर वाला लेंस लें और उसे कैमरे से जोड़ दें। और पावर केबल को कैमरे से जोड़ें, फ्रेम रेट को 12 फ्रेम प्रति सेकंड पर सेट करें, और वही डेटा लाइन जो मैंने आपको पहले दी थी, इस बार इस तरह दिखेगी: /DAC/18/CEX, बैटरी (f:8 और 1/250th)। ठीक है। अब इन दोनों कैमरों को देखते हुए, यह सलाह दी जाती है कि आप पहले 2-1/2 मिनट के लिए 16-मिलीमीटर वाले लेंस का उपयोग कर
Roger, Jerry. Capisco. Noto una differenza. Abbiamo fatto delle scelte preferenziali. La prima volta abbiamo avuto problemi; l'ultima ha funzionato come previsto. Ho notato che per la prima volta, quando si è presentata l'opzione, si trattava di un'opzione nominale, mentre con la stessa procedur
Gemini 4, CSQ. Не могли бы вы проверить свои основные батареи и сообщить нам, ГОТ
了解
Nous survol
제가 그렇게 했습니다. 다만 제대로 마무리하지 못했을 뿐입니다. 이제 흔적은 없어졌나요? 이상
제가 방금 말했듯이, 네, 인수인계 준비되셨나요? 음, 그분이 방금 물어보셨는데, 제가 자고 있어야 하는 줄 알았다고 하셨어요. 그래서 저는 당신이 오기를 기다리고 있다고 말씀드렸죠. 네. 그분들이 설명하실 때 당신은 인터넷에 접속하지 못하셨잖아요. 그런데, 이제 더 이상 CDU를 모니터링해서 안테
ロジャー、エディ・ホワイトが出場した試合のスコアは何点でしたか
ممتاز. شكرًا جزيلًا. أليس لديك أي كلمة تنقلها؟ هل يمكنك التحدث بالإسباني
Roger
حسناً. ل
روجر، بيل. لدينا هنا مجموعة من أشرطة بعض موسيقا
이 물이 
Я предлагаю начать укладывать космический аппарат, привести его в порядок, а затем спать и есть. С этого м
Apollo 8, Houston. Roger. Nous procédons à l
Okay. Immagino che, se Jack non riesce a vedere le stelle con questa posizione dopo avergli fornito gli angoli di allineamento grossolani, non ti leggeremo gli angoli del nostro gimbal e non ti chiederemo di calcolare un angolo bersaglio per Jack, ma vuoi che lui osservi la L
रॉजर। हमारे पास एक छोटा सा लेजर दृश्य प्रयोग है जिसे हम चाहते हैं कि आप हमारे लिए करें। अगर आप पृथ्वी को अपनी किसी खिड़की या दूरबीन से देख सकें, तो क्या आप ऐसा करने की सल
私に
D'accord, après BAT 2, FAIBLE TENSION, OFF/RESET, je vais - puis ON, j'attendrai 
Hey, wir haben immer noch – die haben jetzt die Bandwiedergabe im kontinuierlichen Modus. Wusstest du 
알겠
मेरे पास कुछ और जानकारी है। अगले दो घंटों तक हमें आपके मार्ग के बारे में कोई सटीक जानकारी नहीं मिल पाएगी। हमें लगता है कि दहन प्रक्रिया बहुत अच्छी रही है, इसलिए हम इसकी बारीकी से जांच कर रहे हैं और लगभग दो घंटे में आपको इसकी जानकारी देंगे। एक और बात जो होने की आशंका है, वह यह है कि SHe टैंक अपनी विस्फोट सीमा तक पहुंच जाएगा। हमारे अनुमान के अन
了解。待機して
How's the monitor
检查航天器系统后，我们发现 8 号推进器目前似乎处于打开状态，这在事故发生时也可能是事实，尽管我们目前无
Роджер. Ж
Ладно, думаю, я тебе за это хорошенько помог. Спасибо за обм
We don't have any other place to put the oxygen except in the cabin. We've just
わか
아직 최
Хорошо. S-диапазон, PM, 
هذا صحيح، إذا أخرجت كتاب خطط الطوارئ الخاص
Ho appena visto il 
Okay, Houston;
OK, on ​
नेगेटिव, कोई लक्षण नहीं हैं। मैं बिल्कुल ठीक म
We are ginning up a procedure for attitude for you, Jim. For the no-COMM case, it may be a little different than what the guys working on the procedures come up with for the burn at 
حسنًا. بالنظر إلى المدخل 1: البند الثاني هو اختبار التبريد لمدة 12 ساعة على درجة حرارة كلفن، وفي المناقشات التي أجريتها هنا وقبل الرحلة، أعتقد أنه تم الاتفاق على عدم إجراء اختبار التبريد. لذلك سنحذف الخطوة 2. والخلاصة هي أننا نرغب في إجراء اختبار التبريد، وبالتأكيد نريد تشغيل غلايات المياه قبل الدخول للتأكد من عدم وجود غلاية جافة، كما حدث مع إحداها سابقًا. ونحن نعمل على بعض الإجراءات لذلك، وسنوافيكم بها لاحقًا، وسنحاول القيام بذلك عندما يكون بيل على الخط حتى يتمكن الجميع من الاطلاع على التفاصيل في نفس الوقت
On
今、マイクがコネク
In modalità proporzionale 
- - and we'll keep watching the temps, and if we need it, why we'll start the evaporator ea
네. 이게 오늘 뉴스의 전부입니다. 휴스턴, 대기
Нет. Я чувст
All right. I was just thinking. I'm trying to get as much weight as possible down there in that . We have no s and then our waste tank is - you know - rather depleted. I think it's about down to 40 percent or so. So I'm trying to get as much L over D
जी हाँ। पिछले कुछ दिनों से हल्की-फुल्की बारिश हो रही है, जैसे गरज के साथ तूफान। आज अच्छी बारिश हुई और आसमान में बादल छाए हुए हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों से एक धीमी गति से चलने वाला तूफानी तंत्र इस क्षेत्र से गुजर रहा है, औ
ジェミニ 
الجوزاء 4، جراح الك
मैंने VOX ट्रांसमिट और रिकॉर्ड मोड पर स्विच कर लिया है। मैं इस बात से संतुष्ट हूँ कि मैं बिना रेटिकल का उपयोग किए, सभी दिशाओं से छवियों को आने देकर खिड़की से ही यॉ देख सकता हूँ। कुछ ही समय में वस्तुएँ तुरं
D'accord, Frank, voici les prévisions météo. Elles annoncent des averses éparses à 2000 pieds et des averses fragmentées à 4000 pieds, avec u
Oka
روجر. أبولو 11 جاهزة للنسخ
Roger. 
Хорошо. Я понимаю. Да, в
やったね。よくやった、いいショーだった。おい、ちょっと待って、止まれ！
11, ह्यूस्टन।
Houston, unser Missionstimer scheint normal zu laufen. Hast du einen Tipp für uns, wie wir die Zeit besser einteilen können? Oder könn
Nicht dauerhaft, Mike. Halte einfach jemanden bereit, während Charlie sich mit dem Spezialwerkzeug an der Kamera vertraut macht. Das Team in den roten Farben ist morgen im E
Et pour rappel, n'oubliez pas notre problème d'arrimage. Nous devons encore ranger une bonne partie du matériel, notamment la 
وأبولو 11، هيوستن. إنهاء -
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous avons bien reçu votre message. Merci beaucoup. Mike, nous allons… Nous essayons de vous préparer un reportage; nous serons avec vous dan
Gemini 4. إذا لم تتم إعادة ضبط ضوء العطل 
说真的，我看到的最美的景色之一
了解。バズ、君も5つ読み上げている。高ビットレート
了解。ダウンボイスのサブピリオドが鳴ったのを確認しました。もしかしたら電話しようとしていたのかと思いました。申し訳ありません。ご迷惑をおかけしていないといいのですが。私の立場からすると、上の方で老人ホームを経営されているようです
I am getting a crossed eye looking at this thing. Hey, Mike, just as a matter of interest, I have been just looking at the earth the last hour and a half and there are two tremendous storms down there. I am not sure just wh
क्लिफ
Okay. AUTO-Manöve
はい。すべて順調に
حسنًا، ممتاز. الآن، ربما يوجد بضعة سنتيمترات زائدة من الكيس بارزة من أسفل العلبة. لمنعها من الالتصاق بالشبكة السفلية، نود منك قصها بالمقص. بعد ذلك، نود منك قص شريطين إضافيين من اللاصق بطول 3
Корабль Friendship Seven, командование по наземному контролю Гавайев. Можете ли в
Roger. 
好的，万斯。你说我们应该从应急手册的准备阶段开始，大概是……我一会儿和吉姆商量一下，马上回复你。在点火姿态下，我们应该能看到太阳正好在顶部，我猜这是第二个定位点。吉姆和我之前已经讨论过这个问题了，我们目测了一下地球上的晨昏线，估计太阳的角度大概在70度到65度之间，所以应该就在那里
Das ist bestätigt, Jim. Und falls weder Antares noch Peacock funktionieren, nehmen wir eben auch Atria und Altair. Wir würden uns wünschen, dass sie die Anzahl der Sets erhöhen und drei auf Atria, also Nummer 34, und zwei auf Altair, Nummer 40, anbieten; aber das gilt nur für den Fal
Okay. Wir haben Jacks Dosimeter gebo
Going
알겠습
ما رأيك بتحديد 52 دقي
네, 창문 1번에서 환기가 되는 것을 보셨고, 은색의 4인치 정사각형 크기의 금속 조각이 떨어져 나온 것을 보셨다고 하셨는데, 환기는 아직도 되고 있
Последнее сообщение от местных синоптиков было так
こんにちは、ムチア・コム・テックです。よく聞こえます。スタンバイです。ただいま運用中で
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हमारा संचार परीक्षण पूरा हो गया है। आपके सहयोग के लिए धन्यवाद। और यहाँ नेविगेशन अवलोकन में कुछ बदला
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Мы предоставим вам обновленную информацию о ситуации чуть позже. Сейчас мы к этому не готовы; и, что касается другой темы, с базы «Транквилити» они готовы начать свои операции по снижению интенсивности. Они ожидают начать операции DEPRESS примерно через 3 часа при температуре 108 градусов, приблизительно 108. Конец 
로저
클리넥스 용기의 지퍼 두 개 모두 고장났습니다. 지퍼 아래쪽이 벌어
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota
No, va bene
阿波罗11号，这
هذا صحيح. في أي وقت بعد ذلك؛ فا
D'accord. Bien reçu. Voyons voir ce que nous avons d'autre pour vous, Jim. Le point d'impact 2 semble être à environ 23 pieds par seconde, en rétrograde et à l'heure. Il se maintient bien pour le moment. P
그리고 잭, 우리가 그
D'accord, Jim. Je vais te transmettre une brève procédure pour activer
रॉजर। कोर 81
كولومبيا، هيوستن. لستِ مُلزمةً بتكرار ذلك إلا إذا رغبتِ. استراحة. وأيضًا، يا كولومبيا، عن
ठीक है। आपके लिए उड़ान योजना में कुछ बदलाव हुए हैं। क्या आप इसे कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार
हमने बस एक स्वचालित पैंतरेब
أحسنت
ي
هذا صحيح، أبولو 8. وسنوافيكم ببعض المعلومات الإضافية قريبًا. نعمل حاليًا على التحليق بالقرب من المركبة. وسنتحدث معكم بتفصيل أكبر عن مشكلة رصد النجوم باستخدام السدس والتلسكوب. وما نود فعله فور وصول الفريق الأسود إلى جهاز MOKR، مع وجود فريقين هنا، هو أن نستمع إلى شرحكم لما ترونه وما لا ترونه، وتحت أي ظروف، لنرى إن كان بإمكاننا توضيح ذلك ليفهمه الجميع. وإذا كانت لدي
알겠습니다. 이해했어요. 제가 시
Roger.
Sigma Seven，Com Tech，夏威夷。你读什
了解です。PDIパッド：102:33:04.36; 09:50; マイナス0002.1; 182,287,000; プラス56919。PDIが10未満：105:12:30.00。PDIが10より大きい場合の中止：103:40:00.00、107:11:30.00。PDIなしプラス12
حسناً. مقياس الارتفاع ل
ठीक है। मैंने बैटरी चार्ज, वेंट वाल्व, फ्यूल सेल पर्ज की जाँच कर ली है, और फिर 55 घंटे पर रुक जाइए। उस समय आपका रोल एटीट्यूड 285 डिग्री होगा, जो फ्लाइट प्लान के अनुसार है। हाई गेन एंटीना के कोण थोड़े अलग हैं, पिच 23 और यॉ 267 डिग्री। टीवी पास अभी भी सामान्य है, सिवाय कुछ विशेष चरणों के जो हम आपको SHe टैंक प्रेशर देखने के लिए देंगे, जो मेरे पास अभी नहीं है। लगभग या जब भी आप गतिविधियाँ पूरी कर लें, तब रीस्टार्ट क
C'est confirmé. Je vais tout d'abord passer rapidement en revue les horaires des événements principaux, puis nous reviendrons sur les détails. Bien. L'interface d'entrée est prévue à 142 heures et 40 minutes; environ 6 heures et demie avant, nous commencerons la procédure en appliquant la puissance de chauffage, en vérifiant les températures du module de commande et en le préchauffant si nécessaire. Nous pensons d'ailleurs que nous devrons probablement le faire. Nous vous fournirons des procédures détaillées ultérieurement. Environ 6 heures avant, nous commencerons la mise sous tension en utilisant la liste de contrôle modifiée de 30 minutes que vous avez utilisée pour la précédente inspection à mi-parcours. Puis, peu de temps avant, environ 5 heures avant, nous vous demanderons d'adopter l'attitude pour un alignement sur l'axe du corps, en utilisant le terminateur terrestre comme précédemment. Dès que nous aurons cela, nous effectuerons la manœuvre -7, ce qui correspond à une combustion d'environ 60 cm/s, soit environ 15 secondes. On m'indique que la vitesse est maintenant descendue à 45 cm/s, ce qui est largement dans la marge. Bien. Une fois cela fait, nous entamerons immédiatement la manœuvre d'évitement du module de service, qui sera dans le plan de la fusée puisque nous l'éjecterons plus tôt que d'habitude. Nous n'avons pas besoin, et ne voulons pas, de composante hors plan. Le module de service sera donc dans le plan de la fusée, pointant vers l'extérieur le long du vecteur radial. Nous commencerons ensuite à préparer le module de commande pour l'éjection du module de service, y compris la vérification et l'essai à feu du module de commande, et environ 4 heures et 30 minutes avant l'heure prévue, nous largons le module de service. Nous allons cabrer jusqu'à l'acquisition du module de service... et tenter de prendre des photos, mais nous n'allons pas nous aventurer dans des manœuvres de translation pour les photos afin de ne pas perturber votre trajectoire de vol. Bien. Cela nous laisse environ deux heures pour terminer, si nous sommes en retard, la checklist et la préparation de la mise sous tension du module de commande. Nous allons lancer la mise sous tension complète du module de c
ワシントン発：「このクリスマス、世界は平和への希望で明るく輝いています。希望が現実となり、再び銃声が静まる時、それ
ठीक है। मैं दोबारा पढ़ता हूँ। सूट कंप्रेसर 1 और 2, बंद; फ्यूल सेल पंप 1, 2 और 3, बंद; ग्रीन/न्यू पावर, बंद; मेन बस टाईज़, बंद; इंटीरियर इंटीग्रल लाइटिंग, बंद; इंटीरियर फ्लडलाइटिंग, बंद; फिर नीचे आते हुए, पैनल पर सभी सर्किट ब्रेकर खुले; पैनल 6, पावर बंद होनी 
Roger. DELTA-VZ is plus 00190, roll your option, pitch 213 357, and is NA. DELTA-VT 00197 003 00152. The rest of th
好的。你会发现梯子周围完全处于阴影中，所以电视信号可能会有点问题，但我相信你会看到——你会从明亮的地平线上拍到画面
Fo
13번,
Roger. Copy on the primary EVAP. We've got the low bit rate, Buzz. We could
了解。ランデブーレーダーをオフにして負荷を軽減するため、バッテリー5と6を稼働
S
1回目はDCSランプが点灯しましたが、IGSの電源が入っていませんでした。2回目はDCSランプが点灯しません
좋아요, DUMP로 가서 3.5까지 낮춘 다음 다
E sembra che potremmo sostenere un allineamento tra qualche 
Don't look out window 1. If you're - if it looks like what I see out window 5, you don't want to look 
रॉजर, स्कॉट। मैं ड्रिफ्टिंग मोड में हूँ, लेकिन मैंने एयर कंडीशनिंग बस चालू कर दी है। यह बहुत अच्छे से काम कर रही है। मैं बीकन बाद में चालू करूँगा। कंट्रोल मोड फ्लाई-बाय-वायर चुना गया है, हालाँकि मैं अभी इसे नियंत्रित नहीं कर रहा हूँ। ऑटो स्विच ऑटो पर है, जाइरो स्विच अभी भी बंद है। रीएंट्री एटीट
ठीक 
收到。鹰眼机器人已进入语音模式。如何朗读？
ठीक है। मेरे पास केन की फोटो लॉग के
ジム、今すぐ高ビットレートをお
Roge
Okay. Now I'm using the moon which is to the left of me, and it's a real good fix for it. I'm just gonna go ahead and cover up the attitude indicator and you can watch the yaw. I'm going to gyros free, trying to select to fly-by-wire low at this time. I'm gonna put the moon in the center of the window first - and holding roll and pitch and then put the moon back where it belongs. The moon is approaching the center of the window at this point. Okay, I'm gonna stop it there, and we'll put the roll control in to get that balanced out. Okay, at this point, I will get 0 roll. I have overshot the moon and am picking up the planet Mercury which is nice and bright, and that's a little bit far to the right. Now take a check off and we'll see how many degrees we've got here in yaw. About 20, which is enough fo
Ja. So weit sind wir noch nicht. Ich habe noch elf Minuten Zeit, um das z
En exécutant le PROGRAMME 52, nous avons reçu une ALARME DE PROGRAMME 401 indiquant que si nous continuions, nous le conduirions à un blocage de carda
C'est exac
أبولو 8، في أول لحظة مناسبة، ن
Houston, we'd like to check this on the tape meter against the. We'll go back to 
पंक्ति 4 के अंतर्ग
Hat jeman
روجر، أكمل قائمة التحقق. أنا الآن بصدد مراجعة مو
我用偏航瞄准镜在这个模式下进行了非常准确的偏航检测，完全
And rain clouds are over the MSC area at the moment. It began raining here just about 10 minutes ago, and last report, we were having a pretty heavy deluge. So, that's i
Обычно мы даём этим напиткам отстояться 5 или 10 минут, но Билл собирается выпить его прямо сейчас. Затем, чтобы продолжить, он разрезает ещё одну засл
No. Torniamo all'apogeo, non è applicabile, e poi ho ricominciato a leggere i numeri
ठीक है। मैंने सुना कि आपने ए
我没有扫描灯，但我觉得它工作不正常。我们现在在地平线以上20度，看不到地平线。它把我拉
D'accord. Apollo 11 reste l'événement majeur, le monde entier attendant votre atterrissage aujourd'hui vers 11h49, heure de Houston. À Washington, les réformateurs fiscaux de la Chambre des représentants ont élaboré une disposition qui empêcherait les personnes fortunées d'échapper totalement à l'impôt sur le revenu grâce à des placements exonérés d'impôt ou des abattements spéciaux. Selon la proposition adoptée provisoirement par la commission des voies et moyens de la Chambre, chacun paierait des impôts sur au moins la m
弗雷
Und Boothill, Duke Island, Sidewinder, Blick auf Maskelyne W, das ist der Kontrollpunkt für die Gierrunde, und kurz vor dem Eintritt in den Terminator. Am Terminator ist alles aschfahl und grau. Je weiter man sich vom Terminator entfernt, desto 
حسنًا. أود فقط أن أؤكد لك أن الأرقام لم تعد أبدًا إل
休斯顿，我们刚刚完成了 PROGRAM 21，结果显示，在您刚刚上传的州向量上，有一条环状物向外
收到。明白了。我们很快就会完成过滤器更换，吹扫管路加热器已开启，氧气和氢气吹扫即将开始，148小时后将开始对A电池充电，直到您另行通知。150小时后，废水排放至10%。我们期待在预定时间以大约每秒5英尺的速度进行中期修
Roger. Nous 
Canary Cap Com，这里是 Sigma
Привет, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Если хотите, у нас есть
نعم، وسأقوم بحركات ال
अरे यार! मुझे उम्मीद है कि 8-बॉल सही होगी, क्योंकि यहाँ तो क्षितिज ही
了解。宇宙船は
Roger. Be advised that you are, will - request that you make an HF check at Ascension during this pass. The time of that HF check will be 05 hours 15 minutes. You will turn your transmitter on at our LOS to make a short check and make the final check at Ascensi
フレンドシップセブン、セ
Okay. We want you to power up your eight-ball. We want you to get your heaters on. Pressurize the and open up the MAIN SOVs. Ove
D'accord. Attends une minute, Jack. Je voulais rappeler Jack. Je ne suis pas a
好的。我这里有百分比和磅两种单位的数据；我会把两种数字都给你。磅数更适合在你的图表上绘制，
Вернее, Хьюстон. Джим, похоже, мы получили блокировку, что улучшит наш поток данных. Единственное, что нас беспокоит, это то, что мы, вероятно, будем терять данные и, возможно, голосовую связь во время части каждого цикла. Так что это вполне ожидаемо. И еще один вопрос: если у кого-то есть BIOMED, ​​не могли бы вы перевести свой пе
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे पास आप
Ich sage, nachdem wir wieder im Raumschiff waren, versuchte ich, über Kurzwelle jemanden zu alarmieren, dass wir wieder drin wa
我准备好接受你的时间修改器指令了。加
Hier spricht Friendship Seven, ich sende im Dunkeln. Moment mal. Friendship Seven, ich sende im Dunkeln und beobachte die Nacht draußen. Hoch über dem Horiz
I'm thinking about 
Кен, обязательно позвони мне, если увидишь, что углы подвеса начинают приближаться к блокировке или чему-то подобному. Я все еще немного
रॉजर। वाशिंगटन में, सीनेट वित्त समिति ने आयकर अधिभार के विस्तार को मंजूरी दे दी है, लेकिन विधेयक पर सीनेट में मतदान की संभावना फिलहाल कम ही लग रही है। ऑस्टिन में, ह्यूस्टन के राज्य प्रतिनिधि रे लेमन को अमेरिकन सोसाइटी फॉर ओशनोग्राफी के राष्ट्रीय निदेशक के रूप में नामित किया गया है। लेमन ने टेक्सास में एक समुद्र विज्ञान संस्थान स्थापित करने की संभावना का अध्ययन करने का प्रस्ताव रखा है। यह पश्चिमी मैक्सिको की खाड़ी में इस प्रकार का पहला संस्थान होगा। मिनियापोलिस, मिनेसोटा में, मौसम विभाग ने आज के मौसम का सारांश देते हुए बताया कि अधिकतम तापमान 88 और न्यूनतम तापमान 72 रहेगा, और कहा है कि "बर्फबारी नहीं होगी।" सेंट पीटर्सबर्ग, फ्लोरिडा से, नॉर्वेजियन खोजकर्ता थोर हेयर्डाहल की एक रेडियो रिपोर्ट आई है, जिसमें कहा गया है कि उनकी पपाइरस नाव, रा, का दल भारी समुद्री तूफानों से हुए नुकसान के बावजूद ब्रिजटाउन, बारबाडोस की ओर रवाना होगा। हालांकि, दल एक एस्कॉर्ट पोत पर सोएगा। अभियान के नाविक नॉर्मन बेकर ने कहा कि दल आज रा पर सवार होकर पिछले सप्ताह आए तूफानों से हुए नुकसान की मरम्मत कर रहा था, जिससे मस्तूल का आधार टूट गया था। टूटे हुए मस्तूल का एक हिस्सा समुद्र में फेंक दिया गया, और जहाज बारबाडोस से 725 मील पूर्व में था। बेकर ने रेडियो रिपोर्ट में कहा, "रा पर सोना संभव तो है, लेकिन असुविधाजनक है। लेकिन हमारी यात्रा का उद्देश्य शक्ति या मानवीय सहनशक्ति की परीक्षा लेना नहीं है।" यही कारण है कि चालक दल एस्कॉर्ट जहाज शेनान्ड
Ricevuto. 
ठीक है। अब वापस पढ़ते हैं: टेलीमेट्री कमांड को बंद करें; वीएचएफ एएम बी, कें
Gli assetti son
You might be interested in knowing, since you are already on the way, that a Houston astrologer, Ruby Graham, says that all the signs are right for your trip to the Moon. She says that Neil is clever, Mike has good judgment, and Buzz can work out intricate problems. She also says Neil tends to see the world through rose colored glasses, but he is always ready to help the afflicted or distressed. Neil, you are also supposed to have "intuition that enables you to interpret life with feeling." Buzz is to be very sociable and cannot bear to be alone in addit
आप उन्हें सुन 
حوالي ثلاثة في
Хорошо. Можно ожидать продувку топливного элемента, и зарядка батареи А должна завершиться где-то после этого; похоже, у вас будет почти полностью заряженная батарея. Мы позвоним вам, чтобы сообщить точное время отключения. Мы хотели бы получить от вас подтверждение 
بينما أنظر حولي في المنطقة، يكون التباين، بشكل عام، *** ناتجًا كليًا عن الظل *** أسفل الشمس... لون رمادي فاتح جدًا، لون رمادي فاتح، هالة حول ظلي، حول ظل خوذتي. ثم، عندما أنظر عبر *** يصبح التباين أقوى حيث أن اللون المحيط لا يزال فاتحًا إلى حد ما. عندما تنظر لأسفل باتجاه الشمس ***، فإن مساحة أكبر *** من المنطقة المظللة تنظر نحونا. اللون العام *** للمنطقة المحيطة *** يكون التباين أقل وضوحًا. مسح جميع المناطق المغبرة التي أثرناها *** أغمق بكثير في الملمس. الآن، أثرت واحدة، وأتخيل أن هذا *** المساح. وينطبق الشيء نفسه عندما أمسح عبر المنطقة التي نسير فيها. بشكل عام
Ok. Perché siamo in attesa. Vogliamo effettuare uno spurgo delle celle a combustibile e uno scarico delle acque r
Хорошо, Джим прав. Нам следует вычеркнуть в
إنها تنخفض
로저, 휴스턴. 잘 들립니
Ora, il cratere che si trova al centro dello schermo è Webb. Lo osserveremmo dall'alto circa 6 minuti prima della discesa di potenza. Ha un fondo relativamente piatto, e si possono vedere forse due o tre crateri sul fondo, sulla parete occidentale, la parete che ora è più vicina alla telecamera. Vicino al fondo dello schermo, possiamo vedere un cratere a fossetta, appena all'esterno. E poi, tornando verso il fondo dello schermo e a sinistra, si può vedere una serie di depressioni. È questo tipo di crateri collegati che ci interessa di più, per scoprire perché si trovano in quella particolare disposizione. Ora ingrandirò la telecamera e 
Хорошо. Говорите медленнее, потому что на заднем плане много шума. Вы уже выполнили свой первый маневр рыскания на 90 градусов? А если нет, то
نعم، سأدخلها. سأضعها على المؤشرا
了解。プラ
ठीक है, जैक। अगला चरण है क्यू कार्ड लेना और उसका उपयोग करके कैनिस्टर के ऊपर एक चाप बनाना; बस एक छोटा सिरा ऊपर की एक उभार के नीचे और दूसरा सिरा दूसरी तरफ की उभार के साथ इस तरह दबा दें कि कैनि
이 물 분리기는 정말 형편없네. 다른 거, 그러니까 물 분리기를 써볼까? 아, 이거 진짜 제대로 
わかりました。OPERATE（運用）ブレーカーを引いて、姿勢が見えないようにしておきます。アンテナの切り替え方法は教えてもらえません。SQUELC
- - Okay, Joe. There's nothing but clouds outside, and when we get 
まあ、私たちが計画していたのは、通常
Хорошо. Верно. Это Джим Ловелл. Сегодня мы решили немного рассказать вам о жизни внутри «Аполлона-8». Мы уже показали вам виды Луны, виды Земли, и решили пригласить вас к нам домой. Это наш дом, по крайней мере, уже 4 дня, как вы можете видеть на приборной панели. Мы отмечаем каждый день на приборной панели. Мы уже отработали четыре дня и работаем над пятым. Конечно, все мы с нетерпением ждём посадки в пятницу. Здесь, в той части космического корабля, которую мы называем нижним отсеком оборудования, находится советник президента по физической подготовке, капитан Джим Ловелл, который собирается выполнить программу упражнений, которую мы делаем каждый день. Вы заметили, что он очень свободно перемещается внутри. Он только что ударился головой об оптику, используемую для навигации. Он работает с тренажером, предназначенным для поддержания мышц в форме. Ещё одна очень важная функция нашего космического корабля — это компьютер, и я подумал, что вам будет интересно посмотреть, что у нас здесь есть: дисплеи, которые предоставляют нам всю информацию о работе двигателя, о навигации и о скорости, которую мы используем во время входа в атмосферу и торможения на околоземных орбитальных миссиях. Вы видите, что он управляется с помощью клавиатуры, похожей на пишущую машинку, и то, что происходит на ней, — это просто чудо. Он проделал для нас фантастическую работу, и Джим Ловелл отлично справился с его управлением. Ещё одна очень важная вещь, независимо от того, находитесь ли вы в к
Здесь, на улице, образуются всевозможные инверсионные следы
La Commissione Ways and Means della Camera ha inoltre approvato ieri modifiche fiscali che interesseranno le compagnie petrolifere, le banche e le utility, che potrebbero aggiungere fino a 2 miliardi di dollari all'anno alle entrate federali. La commissione ha anche votato provvisoriamente per modificare le procedure contabili per le compagnie telefoniche, elettriche, del gas e degli oleodotti e per ridurre i benefici fis
さて、テーピングをしている間、特定のスーツのフロー
罗杰，迈克。看来如果我们提前抛弃货物
Ja, du solltest es jetzt besser nic
Vous avez votre harnais d'épaule maintena
أهل هيوستن. أسعار الفائدة لديك
Houston, Columbia ist im OMNI Charlie Downvoice-Backup. Könnten Sie mir bitte, f
TIGマイナス17でCB（11）を削除します。ACバスA、RENDEZVOUS RADAR、CLOSE、30秒待ちます。PGNS：RENDEZVO
- - and the launch - vehicle guidance are both looking to be in good sh
Roger. Hast du das dort und den Messw
Il faut lancer les chronomètre
네, 당신의 말을 아주 잘 알아듣겠습니다. 
بعد استراحة هادئة دامت حوالي 45 دقيقة، أردت فقط الاطمئنان عليك. لاحظنا، على سبيل المثال، أنه يمكنك تحسين أداء هوائي الاستقبال عالي الكسب لديك، إذا رغبت، بالتبديل إليه من وضع OMNI عندما تكون زاوي
И извечный вопрос, который нам постоянно задают, — как нам избавиться от жидких отходов? Эта труба, которую вы видите, я думаю, вы ее теперь видите, идет прямо наружу, туда, где мы открываем сливной канал для сброса отходов за борт, и
روجر، ربما لستَ مضطرًا لفكّها. الموقع الذي أعطيتك إياه للتو يقع غرب فوهة البركان الغربية بقليل. أعتقد أنه يبعد حوالي عُشرَي كيلومتر غربها، وكنا نتساءل عما إذا كان نيل أو باز قد لاحظا أي معالم إضافية أثناء الهبوط أو البقاء على سطح القمر أو الصعود، مما قد يؤكد أو ينفي هذا. أحد الأمور التي نتساءل عنها هو أنه لو كنتَ في هذا الموقع، لكنتَ رأيتَ "مخلب القط
Apollo 8, Houston. Hai il VIA libera per un secondo tentativo con l'OPZI
好的，Ron，对于MIDPAC：000、152、001、194、46 06、267、加1332、减16917、064、36194、649、14045、36275、195 03 06、0028、154、084、2240、180、400、02 13、00 
और, एक्व
Das ist richtig. Früher hatte ich beim Gieren keinen Schub nach links unten, jetzt funktioniert er,
حسنًا.
わ
C'est pourquoi j'essaie de le fai
روجر. كنا نظن أنك ستشعر بذلك حيال 
حسنًا. سيكون النجم الأول هو 26، وسنجري مجموعتين من القياسات: الأولى على الأرض من الأفق القريب باستخدام النجم
아폴로 8호, 아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입
Вы заметили разницу между вчерашним и сегодняшним днем? Это максимально крупное изображение, кот
जैक, मुझे नहीं लगता कि
收到。
Я не думаю, что это большая проблема, потому что переключение антенн совсем несложное, и для работы требуется...; если оно не работает так, как заявлено, по крайней мере, раб
うーん、違い
13، هيوستن. نود م
分かりまし
... に
كما لدينا حسابات جديدة لمدارك. نقطة الحضيض 85.3 ونقطة الأوج 139، مع
好的。我现在要进去了，先选免费版的陀螺仪。然后我要换成普通版的陀螺
Voilà notre logement pour les prochaines heures et nous voulons en prendre grand soin. Bon. Je suis sur la dernière marche et je peux voir les patins du train d'atterrissage. Descendre d'une marche à l'autre 
يا جيم، في وقت سابق من المساء، ظننا أن هناك سوء فهم بشأن كمية المياه الصالحة للشرب التي يمكنك تناولها، ل
罗杰。你能告诉
Yes. T
Je soupçonne que ce champ de blocs rocheux tire en partie son origine de ce grand cratère rocheux aux arêtes vives que nous avons longé lors de notre descente finale. Hier, j'ai dit qu'il avait à peu près la taille d'un terrain de football, et je dois admettre qu'il était un peu difficile à mesurer à l'arrivée. Mais je pensais qu'il pourrait tout juste tenir dans l'Astrodome en passant à proximité. Les rochers aux alentours de ce cratère sont bien plus gros que ceux de cette zone. Certains mesurent environ trois mètres, voire plus, et ils sont très dens
ठीक है, लगभग 2 मिनट बचे हैं; मैं डेल्टा-वी थ्रस्ट, नॉर्म
저희는 중간 과정 3을 삭제하고 입장 시간을 55시간으로 앞당겼습니다. 
Oh! Mi sento sempre meglio. Ecco, ora sta diventando bella
أوه، لا تفعل... إنهم لا يريدون
了解、フランク。今日のボルチモア対ミネソタの試合のスコアについてだけど、何か聞きました
; レコーダーは司
Sì. Dobbi
ヒューストン便、こちらジェミニ8号です。高度約150フィートでアジェナのステーションキーピングをしてい
Nous avions activé le contrôle d'att
Okay. That's correct. Now step 8 is, "On request, perform step 9." In other words, you wait for us to decide what to do and that's according to the gouge 
再说一遍，双子座4
알겠습니다, 괜찮아요. 감사합니다. 수치가 
请告诉我你的
로저. 이번 달 탐사가 당신 눈에는 간단하거나 쉬워 보였을지도 모르겠습니다. 하지만 결코 그렇지 않았다는 것을 말씀드리고 싶습니다. 우리를 궤도에 올려놓은 새턴 V 로켓은 엄청나게 복잡한 기계 장치이며, 모든 부품이 완벽하게 작동했습니다. 제 머리 위에 있는 이 컴퓨터는 38,000개의 단어로 이루어진 어휘집을 가지고 있는데, 각 단어는 승무원인 우리에게 최대한 중요한 의미를 갖도록 매우 신중하게 선택되었습니다. 지금 제 손에 쥐고 있는 이 스위치는 사령선에만 300개가 넘는 동일한 스위치가 있습니다. 이 스위치는 단 하나의 설계로 만들어진 것입니다. 그 외에도 수많은 회로 차단기, 레버, 막대, 그리고 기타 관련 제어 장치들이 있습니다. 우리 서비스 모듈 후미에 있는 대형 로켓 엔진은 완벽하게 작동해야만 했습니다. 그렇지 않았다면 우리는 달 궤도에 고립되었을 것입니다. 제 머리 위에 있는 낙하산도 내일 완벽하게 작동해야 합니다. 
罗杰，比尔。谢谢。明白了；X轴正方向45
Das müssen wohl unsere Scann
مرحباً أيها النسر. هذا هيو
لا يزال تقييم 
...dovrebbe risalire di lato. Allora, ci hai messo sul piano giusto, Jim. Siamo sul piano giu
这些东西都运到这里来
说真的，我看到的最美的景色之一，就是当我向下望
I tell you, I like it
- - 제가 표시를 했기 때문에 결론이 나지 않네요 - 보세요, 그들이 저에
आ
시그마 세븐, 케이프 콤 테크 UH
D'
Roger, Friendship Seven, qui Zanzibar Cap Com. Procediamo con il reportage di 30 minut
Роджер. И мы хотим, ч
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम प्र
好的。在主乙二醇环活化中，第一步的第一行选择“crew”
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 좋은 질문입니다. 저도 알았으면 좋겠네요. 이 오류는 비행 내내 간헐적으로 발생했습니다. 자이로스코프를 케이지에 넣었다 뺐다 해봤습니다. 지금은 궤도 자세로 돌아온 것 같지만, 자세 지시계에는 궤도 자세로 표시되지만 실제로는 그렇지 않습니다. 수평선을 보면 롤은 오른쪽으로 약 20°, 피치는 아래쪽으로 약 20° 정도 기울어져 있습니다. 육안으로 봤을 때는 피치가 
Ah, that is good. We lost all c
L'
Okay. Ich lese sie hier zuerst schnell vor, damit Sie einen allgemeinen Überblick bekommen. Landeplatz, JETT-Lage des Servicemoduls, Mondbeobachtungslage, Sonnenbeobachtungslage und JETT-Lage. Die Landeplätze geben die groben Anflugwinkel für die Lage während der Mond- und Sonnenbeobachtung, die groben Anflugwinkel für den Eintritt und die Winkel beim Eintritt für JETT an. Mondbeob
فريد، لدينا هذه القصة جاهزة لك، ونحن نراجعها الآن. وأود تأجيل هذا السؤال إلى وقت لاحق. باختصار، سنتوقف ونأخذ ما لدينا، ولدينا مسار متوسط ​​بسرعة قصوى تبلغ حوالي 5 
잘됐네요. 여러분들이 정말 훌
بشكل عام، لا يبدو أن قضاء الوقت في الظ
हे जिम, मैं शेकी बोल रहा हूँ, असिस्टेंट सर्जन। अपशिष्ट प
Gémeaux 4, Canar
روجر، جيم. سنعرض لكما بيانات ال
ठीक है। मैं इसे यहाँ दोबारा पढ़ता हूँ... क्रम... पावर, बंद। न्यूमेरिक्स लाइटिंग, फ्लड लाइटिंग और इंटीग्रल लाइटिंग, तीनों, बंद। पैनल 101, यूरिन डंप हीटर, यूरिन डंप बंद, अपशिष्ट जल बंद। पैनल 122, कंडीशन लैंप, बंद। पैनल 201, फूड वार्मर, बंद। पैनल 225, मैंने जो अतिरिक्त जानकारी पढ़ी है उसे जोड़ें: एस-बैंड ट्रांसमीटर, ग्रुप 1; फ्लाइट 
OMNI Char
알겠습니다. 그렇게 하겠습니다.
罗杰，他
I'm going to hold it in my lap during
Okay. Jetzt zeige ich Ihnen hier ein paar Schalter in der Wasserleitung. Stellen wir das Sauerstoffventil
روجر. أفهم يا بيل، وأفهم أن جيم يعتقد أن نظام 2P-2 القد
Tranquillité, Houston. Le compte à rebours avant 
收到。我们只是想确认一下，你的实验设备是否按时
चलिए, मैं उन्हें टी
分かりました。精密な直線に沿って進めてください。ジャイロのトルク​​角度は、X軸プラ
روجر، جهاز الكمبيوتر الخ
F5.6 كانت تلك الصور الأر
Na ja, hoffen wir, dass
Roger. Veuillez confirmer q
22590. Mo
Колум
Non lo so. Seco
너무 걱정하지 마. 이번에
Gemini 4, CAP COM. Voulez-vous éte
Okay. La prim
حسنًا... إنهم يتص
Roger. und optische Kalibrierungslage: Rollen 330,5, Nicken 086,3, Gieren 000,0. Die handschriftlich eingetragene Solllage i
Ich werde das jetzt überp
11, this is Houston. Midcourse correction number 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, pitch and yaw trim NA, TIG 150 29 5453, minus 00048, plus all balls, plus 00001 075 159 328; HA is NA; HP plus 00230 00048 011 00048; sextant star 03 0908 382. Boresite star block, none available. Latitude plus 1102, minus 17204 11803 36275 195 03 33, align, Deneb and Vega
血圧
كولومبيا، هيوستن. دوران صفر، م
Gemini VI, RKV. Как только мы закончим отчет о состоянии экипажа Gemini VII, мы предоставим вам обновленную информацию о ма
了解。フライ・バイ・ワイヤ方式にします。それほど費用はかかり
Wie meinen Sie das? Wir werden eine Ausrichtung auf den Mond und die Sonne vornehmen; darüber hinaus – ich
西格玛七
D'accord. Pour info, Fred était aux commandes hier soir; il était assis à gauche. Si vous voulez nos relevés de radiation, on a fait une petite erreur. On les a tous laissés dans leurs combinaisons, qui sont mainte
Хорошо. В данный момент мы управляем космическим аппаратом. Мы находимся в режиме медленного дрейфа — у нас есть некоторый контроль. На шкале RCS B отображается 1550 фунтов, а на шкал
Ok. Il tuo RAD IN SECONDARY, ti ho dato 70 - circa 72 gradi; il RAD OUT è circa 30; la TEMP EVAP GLICOLE è circa 65; la PRESSIONE VAPORE a fondo scala alta, la PRESSIONE DI SCARICO GLICOLE circa 9 psi. L'ACCUMULATORE SECONDARIO TUTE mostra circa 52 gradi; CABINA circa 58 gradi; pressioni, TUTA lettura 4.1, CABINA a 5. LA PRESSIONE PARZIALE CO2 è salita a poco più di 1, circa 1.1. Sul lato della casa, la temperatura è 72 gradi, la lettura dell'elio 3500; N2 A lettura 2300; N2 B circa 2450. IL COMBUSTIBILE è circa 165; CELLA A COMBUSTIBILE 1, entrambe CHIUSE, sono zip; TEMP. INTERNA 405 gradi; LO SCARICO CONDENSA è a scala inferiore.
Okay. Now when we get in the fourth row, we're going to open the OPERATE circuit breaker; and what that means i
太棒了！看看我们身后，那看起来就像一个巨大的陨石坑；再看看环绕着它
卡那封，双子
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 관측 없이 방송하고 있습니다. 해가 잠망경 뒤편
Okay. We've got your 's. We're ready to read up to you, An
Gemini VIII, CSQ CAP
Okay, dann benutzt 
Houston, p
Кла
Rientro in banda C
जी हाँ। वाकई बहुत बढ़िया रहा है, बस कभी-कभार ही दिक्कत आती है जब स्विच करने से ठीक पहले OMNI में कोई खराबी आ जाती है। तब बहुत ज़्यादा बैकग्राउंड नॉइज़ आती है, लेकिन कुल मिलाकर यह शानदार रहा है, और हम इसके लिए बहुत आभारी हैं क्योंकि जैसा कि आप जान
Roger. Sca
Okay. Das sollte die da hinten zufriedenstellen. Wir schicken Ihnen keine Ladung. Ihre Transportzeit ist in Ordnung. Meine Uhr zählt nicht mit Ihrer herunter. Ich nehme an, Sie haben eine andere. Wir haben Ihren Blutdruck gemessen, und Ihre Uhren stimmen, was
收到。我完全明白你的意思
로저. 맞습니다. 5단계에서 5단계를 수행하십시오. "기본 글리콜 루프 활성화"의 1단계 1번째 줄에 "CB(16): DISPLAY - CLOSE."가 있습니다. 이는 선택 사항이며, 원하시면 사용하실 수 있습니다. 1단계와 2단계의 
ニールとバズ、私はホワイトハウスのオーバルルームから電話であなたたちに話しています。これは間違いなく、これまでで最も歴史的な電話通話でしょう。あなたたちがすべてのアメリカ国民のためにしてくれたことを、私たち全員がどれほど誇りに思っているか、言葉では言い表せません。これは私たちの人生で最も誇らしい日です。そして世界中の人々も、アメリカ国民と共に、これがいかに偉大な偉業であるかを認識していると思います。あなたたちの功績により、天空
Ja, okay. Ich wollte nur sichergehen, dass du sie tust.
然后，当我开枪射击时，之后，几乎所有的事情都发生了……自从那件事开始以来，我又回到了CMC、AUTO……这些事情一直困扰着我。就在那时，所有那些……我的天，那些闪光……
OK. Je suis en mode automatique. Tout fonctionne parfaitement. Le commutateur de manœuvre est sur la position « arrêt ». Tous les systèmes son
我想快
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Mettez votre int
حسنًا. تخطى الخطوة الأولى، ونريد أن يكون مفتاح الاتصال الخاص بـ "خلية ال
네, 참고로 말씀드리자면, 구름 크기는 5/10이고 포트모르즈비 북쪽으로 1/8 정도 떨어져 있습니다
في هيوستن، بينما كنت أقوم بضبط المسافة، تم نشر المصفوفة الشمسية اليمنى تلقائيًا. أما المصفوفة اليسرى، فكان عليّ تشغيلها يدويًا *** الشريط الموجود في الطرف البع
Ok
और आपके पास उस र
Me revoilà près de la Croix du Sud, avec cette zone tachetée de lumière… je suppose qu'il y a beaucoup d'étoiles très brillantes. Je ne me souviens pas avoir vu exactement le même spectacle au planétarium. Alpha Centauri e
ठीक है। मैंने आपके जाइरो टॉर्क कोण को प्लस 003.30 पढ़ा है, Y प्लस 023 है, मेरे पास Y के लिए केवल चार अंक हैं; आपको वह मुझे फिर से देना
D'accord. Radiographie CDR 11005, CMP 10006, LMP 09007; médicament négatif. Et j'ai des informa
Charlie, Apollo 11. I have a couple of questions on stopping the. It seems to me the easiest way to stop it would be - we're essentially, of course, at 0 degrees yaw and closing up to 90 degrees pitch, so it's just a question of stopping at 260 roll, roughly, and - How about for a procedure going MANUAL ATTITUDE, three to RATE COMMAND and then, seeing as how our deadband has already
罗杰，尼尔。谢谢。看起来在北半球，就在晨昏
It
11, Houston. Roger. Ihre Winkel sind 45 und 255 Grad. Verstehe ich das richtig, dass diese Winkel sofort nach dem Ausfall des Trägersignals erreicht wurden, oder erst, nachdem das Uplink-Trägersignal wiederhergestellt
لا يمكنك أن تطلب أكثر من ذلك. فقط حتى لا يكون الأمر سريعًا جدً
よし、時間
حسنًا يا جو. لقد ازداد تذبذبنا في هذا المكان حيث يمر القمر عاليًا جدًا في 
好的。我们要进行更新。更新顺序是：状态向量、状态向量，然后是外部
Je crois que nous répondons au numéro 9
11号，休斯顿。我们从会合点——更正一下，是头顶的窗户——视野很好。不
Okay. Hier die wichtigsten Infos: Ihre Fluglage ist bis auf die Rollbewegung eigentlich ganz gut, und wir bitten Sie daher um Folgendes: Im MIN-Impulsmodus trimmen Sie bitte auf null Nickwinkel (ungefähr Ihre aktuelle Position), auf 008 Grad Rollwinkel (ca. 16 Grad weniger als Ihre aktuelle Rolllage) und auf null Grad Gierwinkel (ungefähr Ihre aktuelle Position). Anschließend führen Sie bitte die folgenden Schritte zur Körperachsenausrichtung durch: 400 + 5, 400 + 0. Nick- und Rollwinkel auf Impuls einstelle
Da h
こちらフレンドシップセブン、ヨーカットは自動、私はそれを手動
11日、ヒューストン。現在の予報では、回復エリアの気象状況は良好です。高度は散在して 2,000 フィート、高散在して、風向は 070 度、風速 13 ノット、視程 10 マイル、海面は約 4 フィートです。昨日の予報では、熱帯暴風雨「クラウディア」がハワイの東 500 ～ 1,000 マイル付近に発生するとされていました。昨日の午後に地球の衛星から撮影された写真では、午後にはクラウディアが消滅しつつあることが示されており、以前よりもさらに影響は小さくなっているようです。回復
好的。全部开放
حسنًا، يمكنكم توقع عملية تسليم بين المحطات هنا في رأس 
Und gleichzeitig können wir Afrika sehen. Westafrika ist wunderschön. Ich kann auch Gibraltar sehen, währ
没错，吉姆。其他电路现在都已经关闭了，所以我们只需要关
Je n'ai jamais eu l'occasion de chercher 
Roger. Ich lese dasselbe. Wir haben hier
Sai, in qualche modo, ogni volta che faccio una serie di s, voi mi in
Ehi, è p
सीरियस की ओर नीचे
गुआमा
Roger. Canton Cap Com, Friendship Seven. Carburante 62-75 [gradi], ossigen
Der Anblick durch diesen Sextanten ist wirklich fantastisch. Vor einer Minute, wä
Ricevuto. Il vapore della tuta è di 69 gradi e la cabina è di +11. La temperatu
Roger. Ich bin momentan etwas im Verzug mit dem Flugplan. Ich konnte die MIT-Folie bisher nicht installieren. Jetzt habe ich sie endlich. Ich werde die Gyro-Entkopplungsprozedur in Kürz
E hai 6 fotogrammi al s
ठीक है, जिम। हम लगभग 6 मिनट में अगला यॉ पै
Nous examino
Definitely below me. I'd been tracking it below me from about Carnarvon on. Up until about Carnarvon we had it below us, and then up to the horizon, and then down below us again. It almost looked like it was in a different orbit than I was. It had a different apogee and perigee than what I did. Anyway, I attempted to close with it at daylight as soon as I could tell where it was. As I said, at that time it was a mile or two out in front of me - down below me. So, the more I tried to close, the less I really gained on it. I was firing retrograde. I was using my top thrusters to fire in such a manner as to decrease my total velocity, and then firing... at the same time. I never really closed, and it continued to pull away from me. It became obvious to me that by the time we got to Hawaii that to close on the booster in time to do the EVA with the booster would probably take all the fuel we had onboard. In the ground rule we had agreed not to do this. So I checked with CAP COM and we decided to not go ahead with the booster portion of the mission. I don't know if I mentioned it, but when we separated from the booster, it seemed like our rates on the booster were low, on the order of a half a degree a second in pitch and yaw. I tried to damp these. I fired one impulse in each direction, and then I concentrated on coming off the booster. We came off, and we came off in the manner in which we generated some other rates. We came right-side-up, eventually, and turned around. Probably about a minute and a half or two minutes. It looked like the big problem was the time I took out to semi-aline the platform before we went into the dark side. We'd probably gotten right on top of the booster instantaneously. If I'd ignored the platform we would have been able to go ahead and complete it. On the other hand, I wanted to make sure we had
由于太阳
Esatto, ecco un altro elemento del sistema: per bilanciare i tuoi serbatoi CRYO, potresti spegnere i riscaldatori del serbatoio O2 1 e del serbato
회전식 핸드 컨트롤러, 2
حسنًا. لديّ بعض الاستفسارات بخصوص قائمة التحقق. فهمتُ أن سخاني المياه الرئيسي والثانوي سيكونان قيد التشغيل عند بدء العملية، ولكنني لم أجد في قائمة التحقق مكانًا يشير إلى تشغيلهما فعليًا. لذا، نودّ التأكد من ذلك، وسنتأكد من وجود جميع مفاتيح التشغيل اللازمة لإدراجها في قائمة التحق
D'accord. Nous voulons que vous régliez le minuteur de votr
In the beginning, the operation with the precluded immediate starting up of our sightings as we had scheduled since we had another evasive maneuver. The dumping of the caused a tremendous amount of - of pseudo stars in the area which made an optics calibration practically impossible. The method which we had worked out did not seem to work too well. The method which I finally used was to go into, go to Sirius, which was our brightest star, get the shaft and trunnion, and then fly the spacecraft up to Sirius to use that for the optics, which we did at a later time. With regards to light scatter, it appears that at almost any attitude during our passive thermal control, we are receiving light scattering in the scanning telescope. It takes the form mostly of a wide band of light right across the center of the scope about 10 degrees either direction of zero. It is very difficult to see stars in this area. The realignments have been good. I have been able to pick up the star in the sextant to do the alignment, but I was not able to identify the star which we u
長い臍帯を締めて通常のスーツ回路に戻っているかどうか
알겠습니다. 저희도 동의합니다. 그
알겠습니
مخرج غاز
रॉजर। 88 और 8.5। जब आप तैयार हों, त
자, 
あまり助けるこ
حسنًا يا فانس. لقد اكتشفنا بعض الأشياء لتعديل الخرطوشة. أولها كيس الغبار الخاص الذي كنا سنستخدمه على حقائب الحمل، وهو سميك جدًا وغير مسامي؛ وصعدنا إلى المطبخ في الطابق العلوي وقمنا بتفريغ الماء عدة مرات أخرى، وصنعنا مجموعة كبيرة من أكياس المشروبات، مرة أخرى؛
Вп
좋습니다. 연결 케이블을 연결하세요. 2단계, 전원 1 AC와 2 AC 회로 차단기를 닫습니다. 3단계, 패널 5: 센서 신호, 메인 B 회로 차단기를 닫습니다. 4단계, 패널...을 닫습니다. 그런 다음 메인 B 배터리 버스 B 회로 차단기를 닫습니다. 메인 버스 전압을 확인한 후 
Ich sehe ein schwarzes Feuer unten in der Wüste. Man kann bis ganz nach unten sehen, wo es herkommt. Ich konnte nicht genau erkennen, was es war, aber es hat eine sehr deutliche Spur auf dem Boden hinterlassen. Ich habe mehrere Geländeaufnahmen mit der S-5 gemacht, als wir die 17 überquerten. Es scheint, als ob Magazin Nr. 7 defekt ist. Es sieht so aus, als ob einer der Sensoren den Film nicht richtig einfängt oder der Film sich aufrollt. Ich weiß es nicht. Ich glaube nicht, dass w
ただいまジャン
알겠습니다. BAT C에서 전압이 전혀 측정되지 않고 전류는 약 2암페어 정도인
Bene. Affermativo. Il passo successivo sarà portare l'interruttore MAIN BUS TIE B/C in posizione ON e leggere la tensione MAIN B e l'amperaggio della batteria B come sopra. F
Das ist richtig. In den nächsten drei Zeilen
Bene. Grazie. Bene, il prossimo piccolo passo dopo aver i
稍等片
罗杰。入口停机坪：区域为太平洋中部，滚轴坐标 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267，纬度加 1332, 减 16917, 064, 36194, 649，航程 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 00 28，最大升力 154, 084, 22400, 18000，D0 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02，六分仪星 45 0189, 277，瞄准星，无可用，升力矢量向上。备注：对准织女星和天津四，横滚078度，俯仰角223度，偏航角340度。补充备注：使用非出口航
안녕하세요, 휴스턴, 쌍둥이자리 
물병자리입니다, 휴스턴. 지금은
إذا لم تقم بالنسخ، فإن قيمة RET البالغ
아이고,
Ora tornerai indietro. V
SCS TVC SERVO
حسناً. ربما كان ذلك بس
Хорошо. И еще один вопрос. Было бы интересно узнать мнение Джека о состоянии основной шины B
我正在抄写查理教我的重新建立机动动作。第五步是：“当速率小于每秒0.05度时，使用姿态控制偏航
……罗杰，休斯顿。燃烧状态报告如下：DELTA-TIG 零；燃烧时间 17；焊缝角度值：DELTA-VGX 为 +0.3；VGY 为 -0.0；VGZ 为 -0.1；DELTA-VC 为 -5.2；燃料 362；氧气 364；不平衡量 
Guten Morgen, Apollo 8; hier spricht Deke. Ich wünsche Ihnen allen im Namen der gesamten Kontrollzentrale und sicherlich au
比尔，我完全没听清你的意思。我刚才几个电话都没听到。你怎么
알겠습니다. 여기 경고등 하나가 켜져 있는데
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Похоже, мы проиграли. Они ещё не закончили. Мы ждём обратного отс
你说，你估计你会一直给 BAT A 充电到
Ha! Tu vois 
로저, 11. PADS 두 개 가져왔어요. 30번이
D'accord. Sur les 226 dis
정말 멋지네요. 우리 뒤를 보세요,
13, Houston. Wir sehen Sie jetzt
11
Это подтверждается. Сначала я быстро пройдусь по времени основных событий, а затем мы вернемся и уточним некоторые детали. Хорошо. Вход в атмосферу запланирован на 142 часа 40 минут; примерно за 6,5 часов до этого мы начнем весь процесс, включив питание нагревателя, проверив температуру в модуле управления и предварительно прогрев его при необходимости. Мы предполагаем, что нам, вероятно, потребуется это сделать. Подробные инструкции будут опубликованы позже. Примерно за 6 часов до этого мы начнем включать питание, используя модифицированный 30-минутный контрольный список, который вы использовали для предыдущего промежуточного этапа. Затем, незадолго до 5 часов до этого, мы попросим вас принять положение для выравнивания по оси тела, используя терминатор Земли, как мы делали раньше; И как только мы это получим, мы выполним маневр -7, который, судя по всему, сейчас будет представлять собой примерно 2 фута в секунду или около 15 секунд работы двигателя. Мне сказали, что сейчас скорость снизилась до 1,5 фута в секунду, так что это вполне в пределах допустимых значений. Хорошо. После этого мы немедленно начнем маневр по сбросу служебного модуля, который будет в плоскости, поскольку мы сбрасываем его раньше, чем обычно. Нам не нужна и нежелательна внеплоскостная составляющая. Таким образом, он будет в плоскости, а служебный модуль будет направлен обратно вдоль радиус-вектора. Затем мы начнем подготовку командного модуля к запуску, включая проверку командного модуля и запуск двигателя, и примерно за 4 часа 30 минут до или мы сбросим служебный модуль. Мы будем держать самолет поднятым, пока не получим доступ к сервисному модулю... и попытаемся сделать несколько фотографий, но мы не будем возиться с маневрами перемещения для получения снимков, потому что не хотим испортить угол траектории полета в это время. Хорошо. Это дает нам примерно 2 часа свободного времени, чтобы закончить, если мы опоздаем, перейти к контрольному списку и подготовиться к включению командного модуля. Мы начнем полное включение командного модуля за 2 часа 30 минут до конца. Мы подключим компьютер, поднимем самолет, начнем передавать ваши векторы состояния и так далее, и выровняем платформу командного модуля. Примерно через 1 час 30 минут, самое позднее, у нас будет час на выполнение этих действий с командным модулем, мы начнем маневр по сбросу. Затем вы начнете закрывать... Конечно, у нас не все места для хранения будут сконфигурированы задолго до этого. Мы закроем люк, проведем проверку герметичности, и за 1 час до захода (141 час и 40 минут) сбросим его. Как только мы это сделаем, вы можете начать маневр по определению положения при входе в атмосферу. Когда вы окажетесь там, проверьте положение с помощью секстанта, снимите оптику, и в этот момент мы предоставим вам вашу окончательную площадку для входа. Вы можете инициализировать систему, и в этот момент вы, по сути, вернетесь к контрольному списку. Есть одно небольшое отличие от вашего номинального вход
네, 파워 8 페이지를 넘기시면 남은 우주선 기능들을 확인하실 수 있습니다. 저속 비트 전송률(TM)이 있지만, VHF
Подож
حسنًا. يريد أن يعرف ما إذا تم تجربة الإجراء وما إذا ثبت 
Gemini 
للعلم فقط، على ال
我们需要允许打开BIOMED设备，以便退出麦克风开启模式。如果你已经打开了大天线罩，我想我们现在应该没必要
안녕하세요, 티푸스 잭입니다. 케이프 커내버럴에서 당신의 친구분들과 함께 만든 재미있는 글귀가 몇 개 있습니다. 아마 당신도 잘
Аполлон-11
알
Continuons. Si, pendant la combustion, le moteur s'arrête et que le voyant NOUN 97 clignote, vous devez poursuivre la manœuvre, puis effectuer le sullage, passer en mode PUSH (démarrage moteur) et activer le mode DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE. Bien. Voici quelques informations générales. Si vous n'avez pas effectué la combustion PC + 2, la première exécution possible se situe probablement entre P et P + 4. Le système de secours ne fonctionnera qu'en mode de défaillance, comme vous le savez. Nous en discutons lors de la vérification de l'étoile. Je vous recontacterai à ce sujet. Si, pour une raison quelconque, il n'y a pas de PC-2, vous 
알겠습니다. 엘라고에서는 모든 게
Apollo 11, Houston. In base al nostro avvistamento da metà percorso, stiamo mostrando un gamma di -6,57. Questo è preliminare, però, e pensiamo che dopo un ulteriore monitoraggio dovrebbe entrare, e potremmo regolarlo direttamente nel corridoio. È più o meno al centro del corridoio; tutto sembra a posto. Ti faremo avere un PAD di ingresso tra un paio d'ore prima che tu vada a dormire. E dai nostri amici degli affari pubblici, qualche titolo, oltre al tuo volo. Stai ancora dominando le notizie. Tuttavia, ci sono altre cose di tuo interesse. Come ho detto prima, la partita All Star è stata annullata a causa della pioggia. Si giocherà domani. Tuttavia, il presidente Nixon non potrà vederla come previsto. Ti terremo aggiornato sui risultati. E, inoltre, i meteorologi saranno clementi con te. Le nostre previsioni sembrano buone per l'area di recupero; dovrebbe essere davvero bello là fuori. Il Presidente Nixon, mentre si preparava a volare per accogliervi al ritorno, predisse che entro 31 anni l'uomo avrebbe visitato almeno un altro pianeta ospitante una qualche forma di vita. "Nel 2000, noi, su questa Terra, avremo visitato nuovi mondi dove ci sarà una forma di vita", disse a 2000 studenti stranieri in scambi
很好。非常感谢
Okay, Jack. The switches all remain in their present position, which is c
تعليق
私がやるべきことは、スクイブをARMすること、それだけですよ
Хорошо. Теперь я вас хорошо понял. Похоже, сегодня у нас был
ठीक है। पंक्ति 3, प्रणोदन के अंतर्गत: स्टैंडबाय रेंडेज़वस हीटर खुला रहेगा और लैंडिंग रडार हीटर सर्किट ब्रेकर भी खुला रहेगा। मैंने अभी-अभी एंटेना बदले हैं; और 
It's taken just a little - 
Knoten 0
아니, 잘하고 있는 것 같아. 짐, 내가 정말 하고 싶은 건 우주선 전체 모습을 사진에
, j'ai vos temps de secours pour les ang
Roger. Ho già alzato la pre
휴
注意那里
それは
――そして彼は
Okay. Number one on the list of things is that the flight plan shows CDR shoul
好的，杰克。看来我们正朝着——有点跑题了，姿态——音调。我现在要检查一下，但上次月球绕地球运行时，它的角度远远高于——而我看到地球现在正绕地球运行，它的角度会很低。它们来回摆动，但每次似乎都离中心线更远一些。如果需要的话，你可以考虑一些方法来重
Bien. Bien. Le chancelier ouest-allemand Willy Brandt, qui a assisté hier à votre décollage depuis Cap Canaveral
نواجه بعض الصعوبة في 
مجرد تقدير تقري
हाँ। अब जब हमें पता चल गया है कि (अस्पष्ट) कहाँ है, तो अगली बार यह बहुत
로저, 11. 방금 다른 모니터로 연결됐는데, 확실히 제어 센터 화면에 띄워놓은 에이데포어(Eidephor)에서 갈색이 
Go ahead, Vanc
肯定です。これが構成です。左が閉、右が開
Columbia, Houston. Roger. We copy. Thank you
Roger. Nous vous demandons de cesser d'utiliser AUTO OPTICS sur le site de test. Nou
Показания прибора составляют примерно 104 800 миль, и мы предполагаем, что заряда батареи хватит еще на 8
05 13 13; 0
さあ、カナリア。ジ
Esatto. Va bene. Riga 4 o passaggio 4, dove viene visualizzato "check". Ciò si verifica 
بينما نوجه المركبة نحو الأعلى في هذا الاتجاه، نرى من نوافذنا الجانبية الشمس وهي تمر، وبالطبع نرى الأرض من إحدى نوافذنا الآن. وخلف نافذتي مباشرةً، نرى الشمس، لأنها تُضيء خرائط النجوم التي نراها. يُمثل هذا الخط مستوى مسار الشمس، وهذه الخطوط الرأسية تُمثل نظام الإسناد الذي تستخدمه المركبة الفضائية حاليًا. ومع اقترابنا من القمر، سيكبر حجمه تدريجيًا حتى يحجب الشمس تمامًا عندما نمر خلف
I'd hate to land way out in the wilderne
Игл, Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы подтвердить, что вы
Guardando al mondo dello sport, vediamo un po'. Mentre eravate impegnati l'altro giorno, Joe Namath e il commissario di football Pete Rozelle hanno annunciato che "Broadway Joe" aveva accettato di vendere la sua quota nel ristorante Bachelors III e di presentarsi ai New York Jets. Joe è arrivato oggi al campo di allenamento dei Jets e ha svolto il suo primo allenamento. Anche diversi altri giocatori dei Jets che avevano resistito insieme a Joe si sono presentati. E Davy Hill, di Jackson, Michigan, ha vinto il suo terzo torneo importante di golf in altrettante partite la scorsa settimana. Ha vinto il Philadelphia Classic. Hill ha vinto quattro tornei finora quest'anno ed è il miglior vincitore in denaro quest'anno con una bella vincita di 129.000 dollari. E nel baseball, la divisione occidentale della National League rimane una gara serrata. Los Angeles e San Francisco sono a una partita di distanza da Atlanta, capolista del campionato. Gli Astros hanno un record di 48 vittorie e 48 sconfitte, e ora sono al quinto posto, a sette partite di distanza. Un doppio incontro tra gli Astros e Cincinnati di ieri sera è stato rinviato a causa della pioggia. I Chicago Cubs sono ancora al primo posto nella East Division. Hanno un vantaggio di quattro partite e mezzo sui New York Mets. E nell'American League, Baltimora si sta avvicinando al titolo della Eastern Division. Hanno un vantaggio di 11 partite su Boston, seconda in classifica. Guardando al futuro, l'All
यह डी-9 रन नंबर 1 है। कृपय
ر
ठीक है। इंतज़ार कीजिए। मुझे पह
Poursuivr
वाह, यह तो हमारी उम्मीद से कहीं बेहतर चल रहा है। डेटा पॉइंट प
ロジャー、声が弱々しく途切れ途切れだ。聞こえますか？
好的。我有一个解决方案。速度为 4.5，下降
Да, все предохранители по-прежнему находятся в том же положении, Гордо. Я ничего из этого не менял. Пиротехнический взвод активирован, автоматическое реверсивное управление выключено. У меня включено электронное управление, автоматический режим и нормальный режим работы гироскопа. Все Т-образные рукоятки выдвинуты. Панель управления работает нормально, за исключением посадочного мешка, который находится в выключенном положении. Индикаторы положения в пространстве ведут себя довольно нестабильно, иногда они очень быстро смещаются. Особенно когда я выполняю маневр, а затем возвращаюсь в исходное положение. Похоже, в это время они сильно отклоняются о
... j'ai essayé d'alerter quelqu'un, n'importe qui, sur les ond
Okay. I'll give you the steps f
ええ。ジムは今寝てるし、ジャックと私は起きてるし、私もまだ5、6時間くらい
Ok. Per informazione, Fred era in comunicazione ieri sera; era seduto sul sedile di sinistra, e se volete i nostri valori di radiazioni, abbiamo semplicemente sbagliato. Li abbiamo lasciati tutti nelle tute, che ora sono ben nascoste. Comunque tireremo fuori la tuta di Jack tra un'ora circa, e prend
बहुत शोरगुल है।
D'accord. Nous vo
Принято, Сигма Семь. Я не читал ваши сообщения. К
Родже
ठीक है। मैं इसे फ
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы понимаем, что вы нас перехватываете. Пока мы пытаемся восстановить с вами связь, не могли б
जी हाँ। मेरे पास गुब्बारा है। हालाँकि, मैंने इसे कुछ समय से नहीं देखा है। यह काफी इधर-उधर भटकता रहता है और इस समय यह मेरी नज़र में नहीं है। मुझे लगता है कि शायद इस स
好的，Vance。我给BAT Baker充电了；我觉得它还没完全稳定下来。我离开的时候，它的读数是1.
Oui. D'acco
صحيح. في الساعة ال
حسنًا. قبل أن تنسخ، دعني أقرأ لك كل شيء هنا لتفهم ما نتحدث عنه. عنوان هذه الرسالة القصيرة هو "تجربة الربط بين التصوير التلفزيوني والتصوير السينمائي"، وما يريدون فعله هو تثبيت كاميرا التلفزيون المزودة بعدسة مقربة على حامل، في نافذة الالتقاء، والتقاط صورة تلفزيونية للأرض من خلال مرشحين أحمر وأزرق، دقيقة واحدة لكل مرشح؛ أي المرشح الأحمر والأزرق بشكل منفصل. ثم يرغبون في التقاط صورة تلفزيونية للأرض من خلال المرشح الأحمر، في هذه الحالة، مرشح ألفا 25 مع مرشح الاستقطاب. يتم تدوير مرشح الاستقطاب 360 درجة، دقيقة 
11, Хьюстон. Ваша
Okay, ich hatte hier eine Pressemitteilung für ihn, über Mikes Baseballteam. Möchtest du sie nehmen
Now the crater that's in the center of the screen now is Webb. We'd be looking straight down on it at about 6 minutes before power descent. It has a relatively flat bottom to the crater, and you can see maybe two or three craters that are in the bottom of it on the western wall, the wall that's now nearest the - the camera. Near the bottom of the screen, we can see a dimple crater, just on the outside. And then coming back toward the bottom of the scree
हे जिम, क्या आप मुझे बता सकते हैं कि आपने फ्लाइट प्लान के शुरुआती दौर में थ्रस्टर के उपयोग का अनुप
Affermativo. Sto c
Ricevuto. E non conosciamo lo stato dei tuoi finestrini. Se tu... Durante questa combustione, dovremo
मैं मुख्य बैटरी नहीं लगाना चाहता था। आपको बस ORBIT RATE, pla
我们来加一点…
Voici Friendship Seven. Les taux de dérive s
Ich hatte vorhin kurz das Visier geöffnet, um die Xylose-Tablette einzunehmen. Alle anderen Lebensmittel an Bord si
아, 로저, 프렌드십 세븐이군. 현재 어떤 제어 모드를 사용
मुझे लगा कि मुझे पहले भी स्टेशन के स
Friendship Seven, continue with 30
我想你也知道你们那边热闹非凡，而我们这里却格外安静。每个人都面带笑容；圣诞老人对全世界大多数人都很好，一切都很平
밴스
Oh, sì. Ci sarà qualcuno pronto ad assistermi,
迈
कार्नार्वोन, मेरा एक सवाल है। ऐसा लग रहा है कि हम ईंधन भरने का काम फिर से शुरू कर रहे हैं और उ
네. 5번 패널에서 전원 1번과 2번 회로 차단기를 엽니다. 그런 다음 전원 스위치를 리셋하고 놓습니다. 11번 패널과 16번 패널에서 초월 버스 타이(TRANSLUNAR BUS TIE) 회로 차단기를 모두 닫습니다. 16번 패널에서 상승 ECA 제어 회로 차단기를 닫습니다. 16번 패널에서 하강 ECA 제어
Puis, quand j'ai tiré la bouteille, et ensuite, à peu près tout ce qui s'est passé... depuis le début, je suis retourné à CMC, AUTO... ça me tracass
रॉजर। मैं बिल्कुल शांत हू
Okay. Ich mache mir hier nur kurz eine Notiz, und wir können es auch andersherum machen. Der ander
J'ai déjà peur que Jack l'ait fermé a
罗杰
جيميني 4، هاواي CAP COM. هل يمكنك إعادة إرسالك
गस, तुमने अपने प्रणोदक पर क्
No, poss
La linea non è ancora tesa. Ho alcune foto della linea che ondeggia dietro. Di
रॉजर। आपके एडाप
Houston, Columbi
Roger. Cosa st
يمكننا تجربة ذلك يا جاك، مع أنني لا أعرف مدى نجاحه. لقد حاولنا بالفعل - الضوء المنعكس من مصابيحنا الرباعية يجعل رؤية النجوم صعبة. لدينا الأرض والقمر، إن كان ذلك ي
Sig
ठीक है। कोर्स एला
好了，现在已经完全放大
الجوزاء 4، ا
Roger. Okay. Noch etwas zur Nachsorge nach der Landung: Wir möchten es nochmals betonen: Sie sollten nicht länger als eine Stunde im Raumschiff bleiben. Sie können Ihre Raumanzüge 
Rispondi, Houston
I think Tom be
アポ
Ich glaube, ich hab's verstanden, Buzz. Das stimmt. Aber als er das zweite Mal – der NOUN war 20 – also 3175 und dann 002 ENTER eingegeben hat, hat er damit die ersten beiden tatsächlichen CDU-Positionen geladen, und der C
Columbia, hier ist Houston. Auf Breitengrad 0,692, gerundet
로저, 케이프. 추진제 스위치를 켜둔 채로 텍사스식 연소 작업을 진행하겠습니다. 그리고 미국 전역을 비행하는 동안 연료 사용량을 관찰할 것입니다. 만약 계속해서 연료 소모량이 적다면, 다음번에 케이프 상공을 지날 때는 
好吧，今天我们只能在室内
ठीक है। कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हूँ। क्या आप 
D'acc
Ja, wir könnten 
حسنًا يا جاك. السطر الثاني تحت "تشغيل الطاقة" يقول "تشغيل الطاقة لكليهما"، وسنجعله "1". والسبب في ذل
아폴로 8호, 고이득을 기다리는 동안 궤적 요약을 계속하겠습니다. 13번째 지점에서 태평양 중부선으로 복귀할 수 있으며, 연소 후 138초가 지나면 귀환이 시작됩니다. 138초면 버터플라이 영역을 벗어나게 됩니다. 20초 이후에는 조기점화나 재시동을 시도하지 않는 것이 좋습니다. 20초를 넘기면 궤적이 수정 범위를 벗어나 자유 귀환으로 이어질 수 있습니다. 귀환 지역의 날씨는 양호합니다. 추적 및 미추진이 가능합니다. 연소 중에는 저장 탱크와 섬프 탱크의 연료 소모로 인해 연소실 압력과 탱크 압력에 약간의 변화가 있을 수 있습니다. 이는 연소 시작 후
Roger. Credo che
Well, I'll look again, Jack, but at this attitude, the Sun is reflecting off 
रॉजर, सीएसक्यू। यह जेमिनी 4 है। मुझे 
Хорошо. Показания 3 g, думаю, на этот раз придётся проп
很好，加上 30627，减去 00625，加上 00577 180 01
아쿠아
弗雷德，如果非做不可，或许可以试试。目前，升华器里的水已经绰绰有余了。今天早上我们讨论过让你试试把水转移到上升水箱里，但我们决定不这么做，也不建议这么做，因为我们估计要花30个小时才能把一个上升水箱里的水排空（而要往上升水箱里加水就必须先排空），我们宁愿用下降水，而且我们觉得这方法也没什
我
Installation du rideau anti-éclaboussures, du déflecteur d'air, poignée de recirculation d'air cabine vers le haut. Poignée du tuba gauche vers le haut, poignée de ventilation cabine vers le haut. Gâchette d'ouverture de la trappe relâchée. Vérifier que le joint d'étanchéité est abaissé et fermé. Attacher la dragonne, trappe gauche ouverte. Ranger l'équipement de survie du pilote commandant sur le côté droit du vaisseau. Boucle de récupération complète... côté droit du vaisseau. Vous vous déplacez vers le siège gauche avec votre kit de survie. Jetez l'équipement de survie du pilote sur la trappe gauche, au-dessus de la boucle de récupération. Gonflez le parachute de
म
मैंने सूट
Ici Friendship Seven. Je vous reçois, Indian Com Tech. Ici Friendship Seven. Je suis actuellement en
Ich habe wahnsinnig viel Wasser getrunken und bin immer noch durstig. Ich glaube sogar, d
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Zanzibar Cap Com. Wir haben stabilen Telemetriekontakt, bitte melden 
ठीक है। चेकलिस्ट के साथ आगे बढ़ो। मैं अब रेट्रोएटीट्यूड पर आ रहा हूँ और मेरा कंट्रोल मोड ऑटोमैटिक है और मेरा एटीट्यूड 
Нет. Мы можем найти другой источник света. Это просто означает, что операция замедлится, и я уверен, что мы действительно с
알겠습니다,
O
那只是轻微的碰撞。
Bene. Ci vado 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. بياناتك تبد
जेमिनी 4,
And because it will be too late to do much about a hatch in
乔，我们唯一的评论是，据我们所
Mon mode de contrôle est désormais manuel; les gyroscopes sont désactivés et je la
然后，
Roger, that is affirmative. Descent is normal,
D'accord. Et puisque vous connaissez notre position approximative, pourriez-vous me donner quelque cho
罗杰。复制加 100 到加 101
好的，休斯顿；水瓶座。你如何解读“DOWN VOICE BACKUP
Roger. Ti ricevo. Sono sul paracadute principale a 1500 metri. Le condizioni sono buone. Non sono in contatto con nessu
روجر. ه
Gemel
SERVICE 
Well, the area
わかりました。被害状況を確認す
I hear
今はパネルのボタンを操作しています。次はコントロールノブのボタンです。そして両方のボタンも操作しています。聞こ
Sì, è corretto. Okay, Fred -
И, 13, Хьюстон. В качестве последнего предложения, мы хотели бы попросить вас включить вентиляторы во втором танк
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。DELTA-Rとトラニオンをすべ
Non ho ricevuto a
There is onl
10, 9, 8, 7, 6, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1
分かりました。車両のコントロール
रॉजर। आज खिड़की से दुनिया का नज़ारा दिख रहा है और एक दूरबीन से इसे देखना वाकई अद्भुत है। काश मैं इसे ठीक से बयान कर पाता। मौसम बहुत सुहावना है। दक्षिण अमेरिका नज़र आ
双子座 4. 你读过
दरअसल, यह सेक्स्टेंट की पूरी लंबाई तक फैला हुआ है। वास्तव में, जैसे-जैसे हम आगे बढ़ रहे थे, मुझे हमारा आना दिखाई देने लगा, क्योंकि स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में प्रकाश की पट्टी उस जगह से गुजरी जहाँ चंद्रमा था, और यह उस क्षेत्र में आगे बढ़ा। मेरा मानना ​​है कि यह 
ठीक है। चारों हीटर बंद रहेंगे; डिस्प्ले खुले रहेंगे; एस-बैंड एंटीना बंद रहेगा; कैमरा सीक्वेंस खुला रहेगा; डिस्प्ले खुला रहेगा; डीसी बस वोल्ट बंद रहेगा; इन्वर्टर 2 खुला रहेगा; एसेंट ईसीए बंद रहेगा, लेकिन एसेंट ईसीए कंट्रोल खुला रहेगा; डिसेंट ईसीए बंद रहेगा; डिसेंट ईसीए कंट्रोल बंद रहेगा; ट
Bill, wir zeigen dir 168 000 an, und wir bekommen immer noch eine ziemlich gute hohe Bitrate von den 30-Fuß-Ante
Cela aurait été impossible. Nous 
मुझे पता है... तुम्हारे 
Houston, 11. It might help us a little bit if you could give us a time of crossing of 45 west
Я дам вам несколько вариантов углов установки антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления для телевидения, а остальное — просто информация, общие рассужд
Oh, ich sehe da draußen ein klein
C
حسناً، الأحذية القمرية وزوجان 
Copia T1: 122 16 05. T2: 122 21 11, 6
Oh, yes - got your high gain in sight; your tracking light - whole vehicle shows. I see tha
了解、ヒューストン。これからサー
ジャック、最初の角度
Ho
了解。テレビ撮影のために地球の方角に向ける時間
تاناناريف، هيوستن شبكة ت
रॉजर। जलने का समय 2+40 है। जीएमटीआरसी 16 56 0
正解です。ジャック、私たちがやっているのは、MAIN Bに電源を供給し、そこに様々な負荷をかけている状態で、電源を確保する準備を整えることです。そのため、電源を切る前に、コンピュータ
Привет, Канарейка, Семерка Дружбы. Я тебя прекрасно 
Bene. Ora sposteremo l'uplink sul backup UpVoice per circa 2 minuti, e potrebbero volerci un paio di secondi pr
其中一个保险丝开关的标签滑落并向侧面移动，将相邻的保险丝开关粘在了一起。这种情况发生在应急主保险丝开关和备用启
This is a mighty nice view we have down there today. A little bit more
هذا صحيح؛ والخطوة الأخيرة في الـ BATs 5 و 6 هي 
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich glaube, ich sehe hier ab und zu etwas Dampf aus meinem manuellen Schubregler in den
Now indicating 20 psi in the
さて、今朝のニュースは実はあまりなく、静かですね。最大のニュースは事故率、つまりホリデーシーズンの死亡率でしょう。これは決して喜ばしいニュースではありませんが、全国で233人が亡くなり、そのうち9人がクリスマスイブとクリスマスにヒューストンで亡くなりました。世界のニュースでは、またしても家族に関するニュースが取り上
13번, 휴스턴. A와 C의 추진 밸브에 전력을 공급하려고 해도 소용없으니, 찰리의 AUTO 기능을 비활성화해 주십시오. 그리고 전원을 공급받는 절차가 있으니, 잘 적어
रॉजर। सैंतीस वोल्ट, ठीक है। अनुमानित क्रायो मात्र
好的，如果您愿意的话——事实上，我们希望您把所有的 
Вот почему я сегодня так много ела. Мне было нечем заняться. Он больше не позволяет мне к э
هيوستن، هذه أبولو 8. سأقوم بمجموعتين إضافيتين على 15، ثم سنقوم بمجموعة واحدة على 1
Roger. Nun, es ist 36:41
收到。我们正在接近点火路径。这相当于点火前13分钟，我们大约
Vorbeiflugmanöver / 62954, minus 162, plus 129 953 578 - das sind 00953 und plus 000578 - minus 02076 0
- وسنخرج الكاميرا
والنتيجة التي حصلت عليه
Roger, 15 minutes ago. Jim, I'm going to pass you the general procedures for the reentry. You'll get the 63-1 update and the details on your next pass over the States from Gus. The general procedure after retrofire, roll to the normal position to a heads-down position, for full lift to 400 K. We will give you an altitude angle to hold
I can just b
D'accord, Apollo 8. Il est un peu tôt pour vous donner des chiffres précis sur les performances de votre système de communication. Il semble fonctionner comme prévu, et tout le reste semble aller mieux; il est donc probable que ce système fonctionne également mieux après nos prochains tests de communication. Certains autres éléments seront alors mieux opérationnels; je pourrai alors vous donner une réponse quantitative à votre 
Okay. Apollo 8, Sie können die
حسنًا يا هيوستن. كيف 
좋아, 찰리. 
Okay. We'd like another volt, amp reading
النقطة الثانية، بالطبع، هي أنه عند إيقاف نظام التحكم الحراري السلبي، تكون الكاميرا بزاوية 90 درجة تقريبًا مع خط الأرض، لذا عند إجراء الانعطاف إلى اليسار، سيتعين عليك الاستمرار في الانعطاف إلى اليسار حتى تصبح زاوية المحور المركزي للكاميرا في حدود 60 درجة. ستحصل على 30
ああ、よかった。ウォーレン、連絡をくれて嬉しいよ
了解、イ
よし、そうか。ところで、皆さんにお伝えしたい情報がいろいろ届いているんだ。野球のスコアやバスケットボールのスコアも入ってきた。クリスマスまであと220日、ショッピングデーもあるって
了
Transmission en aveugle. Nous avons une visibilité directe. Temps écoulé depuis le sol: 4 heures, 29 minutes et 30 secondes. Transmission en aveugle à Aurora Seven. Ass
罗杰……43-2 10
Oka
Ja. Mist! Ich hab's überall hingekleckert. Vielleicht ziehen wir's zu fest an, Ed. Du kennst doch das alt
알
Роджер. Спасибо. Наши предварительные данные слежения за первые несколько минут показыва
نعم يا جيم، ننتقل إلى
不，我——我跟你说，这是我这辈子见过的最
Okay, Aquarius. Wir arbeiten an den nächsten Schritten. In der Zwischenzeit möchten wir einige Hochleistungskomponenten vom Netz nehmen. Öf
Houston
收到。阿波罗8号，你背面传回的数据几乎无法
いいえ。必ずしも露出した物質だとは言えません。一部の物質は焼かれたか、あるいは何らかの方法で凝集性を高め、もしかしたら何らかの形で流れ込んだのかもしれません。よく分かりませんが。さて、他の場所では、私たちが正面を踏みつけ始める前に、放射状に外側に向かって小さな浸食が起こっていたのがわかりましたが、表面には浸食されただけで、目立った痕跡は残って
調子はどうですか？こちらは順調です。準備も順調です。準備に遅れはなく、何も問題はありません。皆さん、今から出
Cabin pressure, cabin altimeter agree on altitude. Should be 13,000 [feet] now. Mark 10; I see the main is out, and reefed, and it looks good to me. The main chute is out. Landing bag goes to auto now. The drogue has fallen away. I see a perfect chute, visor open. Cabin temperature is only 110 [degrees] at this point. Helm
Oui. C'est un cratère très lumineux. Il n'est pas grand, mais extrêmement brillant. On dirait un cratère d'impact très récent, avec des rayons qui s'en échappent dans t
Bonne affaire. Cette photo es
私はただスモールエンドフォワードに回り込み、ヨーを止め、
ヒューストン、脱出準備をしていた時の窓の外の景色について話す時間はあまりありませんでしたが、その時までには北半球の明るい部分全体、北米、北大西洋、ヨーロッパ、北アフリカなどが見えていました。天気はどこもかしこも良好でした。北カナダ、アサバスカ、おそらくアサバスカ地域の東側に、低気圧が一つありました。グリーンランドは晴れていて、グリーンランドの氷床だけが見えるようでした。北大西洋は全体的に良好で、ヨーロッパと北アフリカも晴れているようでした。アメリカ合衆国の大部分は晴れていました。低気圧、まるで前線のようなものが国土の中央から五大湖の北を横切り、ニューファンド
नहीं,
حسنًا. وحدة استشع
罗杰。我们需要检查一下你这次考试期间的电脑故障情况。请你按下
好的。在面板 5 上，断开电源 1 和 2 号断路器。然后复位并释放电源开关。在面板 11 和面板 16
في الحقيقة، 
Roger.
... put it on ACME, the Computer Light keeps going on and off and once in a whil
Корабль в Индийском океане, корабль в Индийском океане, «Си
分かりました。まずは
Wie wäre es mit SUIT FLOW CONT
了解しました、ビル。二次蒸気圧がゆっくりと回復しつつある
ما زلنا غير قادرين على الحصول على رد من المركبة الفضا
Roger, Houston. -1 Breite - 606269, Länge über 2, - 78954, Höhe + 00152; für -2 Breite - 09638, Länge über 2, + 81691, Höhe - 00007. Ich habe versucht, -3 beim selben Anflug zu erreichen, habe es aber verstreichen lassen, um mich für
Okay, NOUN 01, EINGABE; 3011, EINGABE; 44, EING
罗杰。血压计启动，旋钮。我的情况良好。舱
혹시라도 시간 부족 등의 이유로 문-썬 프로젝트를 완료하지 못하더라도, 잭은 참가작까지 이어지는 대략적인 플랫폼을 마련해 둘 것이며, 저희는 그 정도면 충분히 괜
ممتاز. هذا هو الأسلوب الأمث
现在我们处于机头朝下的姿态，
제너럴 크래프트는 여전히 자동차 연료에 대해 다소 우려하고 있습니다. 자동차 연료 사용을 최소화
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。皆さんのフレンドリ
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 네, 맞습니다. 약간의 노이즈는 있었지만 상당히 높은 비트 전송률을 얻었습니
좋아요. 11단계로 설정하면 다시 솔턴 해를 내려다볼 수 있겠네요. 무한대
了解しました。RCSヒーターの要件がオンとオフを繰り返し
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。ヨー90度に旋回してください。中間ジンバル角に注意してください。ジンバルロックま
ジャック、ヒューストン。通信機がかなり騒がしくなって、聞き取れなかった。ち
... Beh, in r
Ok
Roger. Ich glaube, wir sollten damit aufhören, Gus. Es fällt immer weiter, es ist wahrscheinlich drei oder vier Meilen entfernt, und wir können einfach nich
收到。这里是友谊七号。我能清楚地看到夜空。我想月亮可能正在我身后升起。是的，我能从后面的望远镜里看到它，它在下面的云层上投射出一片明亮的白
네. 좋습니다.
Роджер, ты чит
أنا متأكد من أنني أش
Je vais a
Scomm
好的，弗雷德。我给你的这份文件是关于从指令舱脐带电缆断开电源的最后步骤。还有一点要说明，在你完成整个流程，准备切换到指令舱的时候，脐带电缆的电源就会断开，这时就可以把它断开了。也就是说，在你拨动开关之后。明白
أمران يا جيم. نريدك أن تعلم أن هناك بعض الأخطاء الكبيرة في الإعدادات، لذا إذا قمت بالتحويل إلى الوضع التلقائي، فسيحاول الكمبيوتر أن يقلبك ر
How mu
Abbiamo perso. L'unico vantaggio di farlo presto è che, se riusciamo a riprendere potenza, la discesa. L'unico vantaggio di farlo presto è che si può fare una grande accensione ora e una a metà rotta e poi dare potenza alla discesa. Altrimenti, dobbiamo tenere la potenza libera finché non avremo circumnavigato la Luna. Inoltre, sarebbe all'interno durante l'a
Ok. Ci sono alcuni dubbi derivanti dalla lett
Вот примерно то, что мы имеем... Да, это самая удобная маленькая штучка, которую вы когда-либо видели... она вставляется прямо в шлем, не выпадает, и вы можете схватить все, что захотите, и оно будет т
Ho 
Okay. You're in pulse alining the platform. Are your logic yaw rate 
26 à 36 pieds par seconde en montée. Attention au tangage. Très doux. Coupleu
J
रॉजर
了解。DELTA-はちょうどいい感じでした。燃焼時間は517秒と、2秒ほど長く感じました
That's the configuration we're
ترانكويليتي، هذه هيوستن. هذا حاسوبك. لقد تم تحم
Sì, 
Houston, qui Eagle con un conteggio breve. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5; 5, 4, 3,
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Êtes-vous en train d'acquérir des données sur la manœuvre d'incinération? À
那是老款的南冕座星，显示得非常清晰，还有努基星。南冕座星就在它应该在的航线上。我读到的是0度偏航，5度左滚，处于反航向。我真想知道为什么这么复杂。在那几个家伙上方，我应该还能看到另一个明亮的星体。那一定是，一定是牛郎星。很好。你甚至会感觉这次飞行你并没有真正飞越澳大利亚。好的。现在让我们看看，我们已经完成了对那几个家伙的偏航检查，他们即将到达广州。这次
हमारा प्रव
Nous affichons 0,2 sur nos appareils de mesure du CO2, et nous en sommes ravis. Tout semble fonctionner parfai
Да, ты прямо мои мысли произнес, Фрэнк, и мы хотели бы также узнать, как далеко ты сейчас нах
좋아. "크리스마스 이브 밤, 우주 저 멀리 아폴로 8호 승무원들은 달 착륙 경쟁에서 막 승리했지. 헤드셋은 콘솔에 조심스럽게 걸려 있었고, 크리스 크래프트가 곧 도착하길 바랐어. 프랭크 보먼은 침대에 포근하게 누워 '킬로이가 여기 있었다'라는 환상에 잠겨 있었지. 짐 러벨은 소파에, 앤더스는 선실에서 컴퓨터 화면을 보며 머리를 싸매고 있었는데, 갑자기 요란한 소리가 
11, Houston. We see them all dis
मुझे बस इतना पता है कि यह एक तरफ से अंदर नहीं जाता, लेकिन
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 아프리카에서 몰려오는 구름이 많았는
يمكنك أيضًا استخدام انعدام الجاذبية لتوضيح العديد من الأمور التي تعلمناها جميعًا في المدرسة. أود أن أوضح بإيجاز مدى سهولة شرح آلية عمل الجيروسكوب. إذا قمت بتدوير هذه العلبة، فنحن نعلم أنه وفقًا لمعادلات الحركة، نتوقع أنه بمجرد
Okay. Ich habe folgende Details zum Flugplan für Sie. Da es keine -3 gibt, streichen Sie bitte alle Anweisungen für die Kursmitte, einschließlich des Bindestrichs, der bei etwa 54,50 Stunden angegeben ist. Wir verschieben diesen auf später, worauf ich gleich noch eingehen werde. Okay. Wir möchten die Batterieladung um 3 Stunden vorverlegen. Außerdem möchten wir das Tunnelentlüftungsventil (DELTA-P) um 3 Stunden vorverlegen. Ab diesem Zeitpunkt können Sie im Flugplan einfach zu Punkt 57 gehen, die Zahl von 57 auf 54 Stunden ändern und von dort aus fortfahren. Im Bemerkungsfeld bei etwa 54 Stunden steht: „Sauerstoffzellenspülung und Abwasserentsorgung“. Falls dies noch nicht geschehen ist, führen Sie es bitte bei 54 Stunden und 50 Minuten durch. Der TV-Überflug findet dann bei 55 Stunden statt. Du wirst die Punkte auf der Aktivierungs-Checkliste direkt abarbeiten. Ich verliere dich; l
, are y
روجر، بيل. أنت تعرف الثانوي - حسنًا، في الواقع، كلا إج
Roger. The series of cracks or faults across they drop down in about three steps to the south. The parallel fault pattern to the north has a drop down in the center. I hope all of you back down on earth can see what we mean when we say that it is a rather foreboding horizon, a very rather dark and unappetizing looking place. We are now going over - approaching one of our future landing sites selected in this smooth region to - called the Sea of Tranquility - smooth in order to make it easy for the initial landing attempts in order to preclude the having to dodge mountains. Now you c
ウォータータウン、こちらシグマセブンです。HFです。訂正します。UHF-Hiです。HFははっきりと聞こえます
알겠습니다. 공 없이도 할 수 있을 것 
入場時の撮影についてですが、新品のカラー内部フィルムのマガジンを使用する場合は、以下の露出設定をお勧めします。f11、1/250秒
Ok. Vignetta 8: SEQ LOGIC, due, su OFF. Sono accesi adesso, Ken? Non ricordo di averli attivati ​​- immagino che faccia par
好的。前射速度 47 英尺/秒，1+18。后射速度 120 英尺/秒，2+31，坐标 17 42 
Ich sage es dir nur ungern, Frank, denn Jim wird seinen COMM-Träger wahrscheinlich gar nicht mehr tragen können, aber diese letzte Markierungsgruppe platziert deinen Zusta
分かりました。クワッドの数値については、コンピュータープログラムとそこに入っている補正係数を使って、あなたと同じ値
ケープ・
Okay, what I have out now, Jack, is LEVVA, which has also been shown before. It's a head garment for wearing out on the surface, and I - I'm bringing Jim's out here to show a couple of MODs. One problem before is
بإمكاننا فعل ذلك بأي طريقة. كنت
All that probe and drogue and claptrap wo
Okay. Hier leuchtet eine Warnleuchte, die Sie nicht gemeldet haben – es handelt sich um die Vorverstärker – vermutlich, weil wir den ATCA-Schutz
It looks like I just passed over some of the Marshall Islands down there. They were quite clear and you can see the atolls and stuff around the islands themselves. I tried to get a picture of them, but I caught them just a little too
جيميني
Ok. Solo qualche informazione. Stiamo elaborando una procedura da utilizzare per... utilizzare i contenitori di LiOH del modulo di comando per collegarli ai tubi flessibili, i tubi di scarico, in modo che, con il passare del tempo nella missione, possiate continuare a depurare l'atmosfera. E tutto questo richiede la modifica di un kit in modo da poter collegare il tubo flessibile. Modificando un contenitore di LiOH, potrete collegarvi il tubo. Quindi, in futuro, vi presenteremo questa procedura. Secondo punto... Secondo punto, siamo in attesa di osservare la vostra 
你好，
Vance，趁着Jack还在通话，我想
-01594 +00000 +52885 178 155 000, 해당 없음, +00192 52909. 제 말 이해하시겠습
J'espère que vous avez fait examiner ce projet par tout le monde avec la plus grande attention. Notre priorité absolue est d'obtenir un vaisseau spatial en parfait état avant d'en
ジェミニVI、ラス・ランド・リーダー。聞こえます
Frank, we've got some guys looking at it. We migh
Понял. Вот где мы хотим быть, Дж
Forza, 
자
Sigm
Sehr gut. Auf Seite E-9, wenn Sie sich auf den Wechsel in die Kommandomodulposition vorbereiten, sollten Sie, um ein Zünden der Triebwerke infolge einer Lagekorrektur zu vermeiden, die manuellen Lageregelungsschalter auf „Beschleunigungsbefehl“ oder „Minimaler Impuls“ stellen. Und noch einmal auf Seite E-9 Alfa, Schritt 41 „Bravo“: Wenn Sie wieder in den Lageregelungsmodus zurü
로저
SEGNO
지금 몇
Хорошо. На шаге 34 в разделе «Окончательное размещение», который является своего рода общим разделом, есть шаг, где указано «вторичный гликоль в радиа
- - 저희는 수분 섭취량이 그렇게 많지 않아서 이 
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Abbiamo notato che il tuo ALLARME PR
최종 단계 경과 시간
La responsabilité de ce vol incombe d'abord à l'histoire et aux géants de la science qui ont précédé cet effort; ensuite au peuple américain, qui a exprimé son désir par sa volonté; puis, aux quatre administrations et à leurs Congrès,
Apollo 8, Houston. C'est normal; c'est ce à qu
Houston, Apollo 1
Fine, fine, Jim. You are sounding good this morning. We would like to give you a little rundown on these stars. As you can see in the flight plan, we've got you
分かりました。パネル275のそのステップの後、「CB MAIN A、BAT C、CB MAIN
分かりました。ありがとうござ
11، هيوستن. نراك الآن وأنت تز
了解しました。それから、ページの一番下にちょっとしたメモを追加してください。 - 注： - これは61ページの一番下です - 注：テープメーターは使用し
ठीक है। हम ज़रूर कोशिश करेंगे। जैसा कि मैंने कहा, हमारे पास कुछ तारे हैं। वे शाफ़्ट और ट्रनियन के शून्य बिंदु के साथ केंद्रित नहीं हैं। चलिए, 105 पिच, शाफ़्ट और ट्रनियन के शून्य बिंदु पर एक नज़र डालते हैं और 
...
좋아. 다음
Neil e Buzz, vi parlo al telefono dalla Sala Ovale della Casa Bianca, e questa è sicuramente la telefonata più storica mai fatta. Non riesco proprio a descrivervi quanto siamo tutti orgogliosi di ciò che fate per ogni americano. Questo deve essere il giorno di cui siamo più orgogliosi della nostra vita. E sono sicuro che anche le persone di tutto il mondo si uniscano agli americani nel riconoscere l'immensa impresa che questa è. Grazie a ciò che avete fatto, i cieli sono diventati parte del mondo dell'uomo. E mentre ci parlate dal Mare della Tranquillità, ci ispirate a raddoppiare i nostri sforzi per portare pace e tranquillità sulla Terra. Per un momento inestimabile nell'intera storia dell'uom
Houston, bitte beachten Sie, dass Ihre Quindar-Anlage Ihre Stimme
よし。バックミラーを変えて、もし可能であれば気象庁の写真も撮ってこよう。残りを軽く撃っておこう。これがA10で、11が近づいてきて、左に雲がかかっている。よし。プレートを戻して、これをAで保存する。プレートをま
نبض. سألحق بالركب. سأضطر لتشغيل ال
水
阿波罗
Esatto. La temperatura della 
روجر. أنا في حالة مزاجية جيدة لل
قال إن عبور جمي
알겠습니다. 18 대 1 
Похоже, что делать нужно не прикладывать его к окну, потому что он начнет цепляться за
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. К перечитыванию. Вы готов
Okay. Wir sind jetzt bei der Checkliste vor dem Schlafengehen. Was den Statusbericht der Crew und die Medikamente angeht: Wir haben keine Medikamente bekommen. Und uns allen geht es richtig gut. Ich habe euch die Bordanzeigen gegeben. Jim chlort gerade das Trinkwasser. Ich bin bere
Affermativo. Abbiamo caricato il tuo carico di TR e Gemini. I tuoi orologi a terra sembrano a posto e qu
ठीक है। क्या इनमें से कोई चीज़ उड़ान योजना में शामिल है?
روجر، نيل. أردنا فقط سردًا يسمح لنا - عندما نشاهد ال
Eagle, Houston. Potresti darci un'i
Oh
أعتقد أنني لن أتمكن من
Jack and Fred both are going to sleep. It's sort of humorous; Fred's sleeping place now is in the tunnel, upside down with his head resting on the ascent engine. Jack is on the floor of the, 
Okay. Stand by. How's that? Is that the right dire
Хорошо.
老鹰，你
Eigentlich wollten wir dich nur noch etwas länger schlafen lassen, weil wir davon ausgehen, dass du ziemlich erschöpft 
Ok. Aspetta solo 1, Charlie. Jim andrà a vedere
Yes, they're crying in Dallas. Basketball scores: Houston didn't do so good this weekend. Illinois beat Houston 97 to 84. And North Carolina took the Owls. The score was 85 to 77. We had a couple of words in the paper, Frank, on the Oilers. The Oilers voted George Webster their most valuable player and - although Houston didn't make anybody on the A
休斯顿宁静基
В ходе системного тестирования давления вентиляционного клапана батареи мы заметили, что при открытии клапана происходит резкое падение давления, которое обнуляется примерно на уровне двух десятых до трех десятых вольта. И мы считаем, что на коллекторе батареи это значение равно нулю. Вы 
Oui, ils sont toujours ensemb
تيار
Okay. So it may be on tape and it may not. It went on for - I think we were 44 minutes after we started EVA. I was looking 
Hier spricht Cal. Ich verstehe dich sehr schwach, Wally. Nach der ersten guten Übertragung ist deine Stimme abgefallen. Ich habe verstanden, dass du die Glühwürmchen gesehen hast
I tell you, I wouldn't open that face plate with those thrust
Apollo 8. Une des choses que nous aimerions avoir avant
Accidenti, cred
... 
يبدو أن مدة إطلاق النار لديهم أطول مما كنت أتوقع. أعتقد 
我把燃料用在了——在暗面通过手动和电传操纵推进器操作，当时正接近日出。我认为在第二圈和第三圈轨道上可以大幅降低燃料
收到。轮到
रॉजर। हमें बहुत ज़्यादा स्टैटिक सिग्नल मिल रहे हैं।
罗杰，你的设置完成了，你现在处于宽死区。这应
Hous
Wir befinden uns momentan in einer sehr flachen Fluglage, sodass die Bodenstationen uns vermutlich nicht orten können. Wir haben zwar einige Funksprüche gehört, die immer wieder unterbrochen wurden, aber wir bleiben noch eine Weile in dieser Position, um die Boosterstufe im Blick zu behalten. Im Moment scheinen wir nicht viel näher an die Boosterstufe heranzukommen. Sie ist anscheinend immer noch ungefähr gleich weit entfernt. Als die Boosterstufe unter uns war, sah der Himmel fast sternenklar aus. So viel Treibstoff strömte aus der Boosterstufe und stieg in den Himmel. Ich habe sogar gesagt, dass es wie Sterne aussah. Wenn man die Boosterstufe zu diesem Zeitpunkt genauer betrachtete, konnte man den Treibstoff sehen – genauer gesagt die weißen Dämpfe, die aus dem Heck der Boosterstufe austraten. Ich vermute, dass diese Dämpfe die kleinen Leuchters
確かにデテント 2 を試してみたいのですが、私たちのプラットフォームは大丈夫な
查理，我们刚刚把角度调整
짐, 60번부터 64-4번까지의 업데이트는 뱅크 앵글 정보와 함께 이전과 동일하게 전달해 드릴 예정
60개 남
وبينم
Ehi, Ken, come hai fatto a fare il turno di notte la vigilia di Natale? Succede sempre 
रॉजर। माइक, आप पाँच-बाई हैं। हमें ओम्नी कॉन्फ़िगरेशन इस प्रकार चाहिए: ब्रावो में ओम्नी अल्फ़ा प्लेस, ओम्नी से ओम्नी, हाई-गेन ट्
روجر. لدينا
جاهزون لتقرير الساعة الخامسة. الوقود 89-90. الأكسجين 56-75 رطل/بوصة مربعة
Verso l'oscurità, vediamo, alle 05:02. Abbiamo perso la visuale sull'Agena e ho visto subito la luce ACQ. La distanza era di 45 miglia.
У вас достаточно тепла, чтобы поддерживать давление. А вот вам регулятор высоты, если хотите, можете его с
Базз захочет сделать VERB 82; я не знаю, что здесь стоит перв
Nein. Wir haben den Brennvorg
حسنًا. سنبدأ
Ich sehe noch einige der weißen Partikel unterhalb der Kapsel. Sie scheinen sich genau mit meiner Geschwindigkeit zu bewegen. Eines driftet davon. Es ist sogar schneller als
Хорош
I'm using the airglow filter at this time. Visor is coming open for a better look at that. H
Roger.
이것이 키어사지호라는 것을 이해했
Misura la pressione sanguigna. Il tuo primo tentativo a terra era ille
You are right
好的。
TR-10 恢复正常。我之前已经试过了。好的，宇航服压力正常。再看一下逆变器。250 是 141 度，150 大约是 107 度。单独来看就足够了。备用压力是……7。差不多是环境压力。负值，甚至还有点……舱内压力大
روجر. الآن، للمناورة بحيث يكون الميلان صفرًا، وا
टेप रिकॉर्डर न तो ऑटोमैटिक और न ही मैनुअल रिकॉर्डिंग के लिए काम कर रहा
3.3 ع
진흙탕에 빠졌군요. 네, 알겠습니다. 다시 켜달라고 요청하세요. 짐, 오토 코일, 링 1, 메인 A를 다시 켰습니다. 작업이 끝나면 입력 패드를
नमस्कार, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस, ह्
Oh, laut und de
रॉजर। क्या आप इस पर दोब
Aurora Seven, standby for
Houston, la Base Tranquillité va vous donner quelques précisions concernant la question géologique d'hier soir. Nous avons atterri dans un champ de cratères relativement lisse, composé de cratères secondaires allongés et circulaires, dont la plupart présentent des rebords, quelle que soit leur taille. Ce n'est toutefois pas toujours le cas. Quelques petits cratères alentour n'ont pas de rebord visible. Le sol de toute la zone est composé de sable très fin, voire de limon. Sur Terre, on pourrait le comparer à de la poudre de graphite. Dans ce sol se trouvent une grande variété de roches de formes, de tailles et de textures diverses, arrondies ou anguleuses, et de consistances variées. Comme je l'ai dit, j'ai vu ce qui semblait être du basalte pur et du basalte vésiculaire. D'autres roches étaient dépourvues de cristaux, certaines présent
Это «Аполлон-8», прямая трансляция с Луны. Нам пришлось переключить телекамеры. Сначала мы показали вам вид Земли, который мы наблюдали последние 16 часов. Теперь мы пе
Okay. And the note says that you should be able to hear us. If we can't hear you in a couple of minutes, you should close the POWER AMP circuit breaker on panel 16, and we expect to save an amp or more on this. It should work in the present attitude. W
अपनी गीली बल्ब की आवाज़ फिर से 
रॉजर, ब्रू
はい、どうぞ、ヴ
أقول 
Dici
Ricevuto. Dovrebbe essere il secondo passaggio della procedura. Alle 22:40, o quando arriverà, vorremmo iniziare la carica della batteria A. E alle 24:10, avremo un ass
13، هيوست
Roger. C'est un problème de mise à la ter
20 स
11, Houston. The scan on the camer
حسناً. تم إطلاق أربع قذائف ارتدادية في وضع إطلاق
Okay, Joe. Slip the bag over the canister so that the arch is at the bottom of the bag and that the ears are along oriented
Ich habe dich laut und deutlich verstanden. Wir 
Même M. Kraft fait parfois quelque chose de bien
حسنًا. سيأتي PYRO B مُجهزًا. أعتزم استخدام الزجاجة الأساسية رقم 1، وفقًا 
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ビットレートが低いため、蒸気圧は確認できません。RAD出力
Да, Джим, это точно, а если ни Antares, ни Peacock не подойдут, то мы будем рады использовать Atria и Altair. Мы бы хотели, чтобы они увеличили 
Je suis passé du mode Prélancement au mode Rattrapage. Le voyant Comp s'est éteint. Voyons s'il se rallume. C'est bon. Il est rallumé. On va maintenant éteindre complètement l'ordi
17-BRAVO 87, 01+51.
是的。好的，我前面四五项是：面板 3 上的 BAT CHARGE 开关关闭；AC INVERTER 2 关闭；面板 5：MAIN BUS TIE，BAT A/C 打开；面板 250：CB BAT A POWER 
아폴로 8호, 혹시 테이프를 사용하지 않으신다면 다시 한번 덤프해 드리고 싶습니다. 덤프가 필요한 이유는 디스크 굽기 전에 일부 데이터가 완전히 덤프되지 않았기 때문입니
И, Аполлон
맞아요, 짐. 태도는 제대로 잡았어요. 그리고 400점에 5점을 더한 다음에 400점에 5점을 더하는 것에 대해 이해했나요? 그러니까 400점에 5점을 더하고 400점에 0
Ok, Van. Pronto a copiare gli angoli di coppia dell'
من الأفضل 
알겠
ठीक है। आगे बढ़ो। कॉपी करने के लि
네, 마이크 씨, 이제 차량의 형태가 
برج ا
The shutter to the Hasselblad see
Okay. Zunächst einmal wird die Kur
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон, с небольшой информацией о сп
Columbia, Houston. Tout d'abord, nous souhaitons une vidange des eaux usées à 10 % à l'arrière. Ensuite, il ne semble pas nécessaire de changer d'avion pour le moment, nous n'enverrons donc pas de nouvelle connexion. Troisièmement, je souhaite que tous vos réchauffeurs cryogéniques soient en mode AUTO. Nous sommes prêts pour la charge de la batterie BRAVO; son autonomie est d'environ 7 heures. Si vous vous endormez, nous interromprons la charge de la batterie, mais pour l'instant, nous pouvons lancer la charge de la batterie Bravo. Enfin, pour votre configuration pendant la période de repos, le registre 1 est 11111; le registre 2, 01100. Et vos commutateurs de sélection AUTO: quad Alfa, jets de pas activés uniquemen
휴스턴, 우리가 정확히 어디에 있는지 알 수 없을 거라고 했던 사람들이 오늘 승자입니다. 착륙 지점을 확인해야 할 하강 단계에서 프로그램 경보 같은 것에 신경 쓰느라 정신이 없었거든요. 마지막 하강에서 지나온 몇몇 분화구는 자세히 살펴봤지만, 아직까지 지평선에 있는 지형물을 기준으로 삼을 만한 것을 찾지 못했습니다
我们刚把它拿出来。
रॉजर। हम उन्हें देख रहे हैं। हम आपको थ
D'accord. Ce que nous souhaitons tous, c'est que nous n'insistons absolument pas sur l'utilisation de la Lune et de la Terre; si vous trouvez de bonnes étoiles, pourquoi les utiliser? Cependant, cet alignement est largement suffisant pour nous guider eff
好的。电子电源关闭；信号调节器/驱动
TTC - نعم. يبدو أنه يجب أن 
Schau mal. Es deckt ein weites Gebiet ab. Mann, diese dunkle Wolke … Wie zwei Kondensstreifen. Nur wenn man die Arretierung umstellt, leuchten sie r
COMM ist plöt
アポロ8号、ヒュ
حسنًا، دعني أحضر - دعني أحضر إزم
Ich bezweifle, dass es in B1 auf den Helm passt. Das andere vielleicht – es könnte in die Schlafhalterung passen. Wir haben sie in unseren Hel
Oui. Apparemment, ils n'ont pas réussi à s'entendre sur le prix de la location. Bud Adams aurait déclaré que le Dôme était peut-être la huitième merveille du monde, mais que le pr
Okay. Sembra una buona ide
हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप अपने एडैप्टर सी-बैंड बीकन स्विच को 11 52 43 पर निरंतर स्थिति में स
D'accord. Jack signale depuis l'étage qu'il peut voir des étoiles et des constellations à travers les optiques, mais que l'angle du soleil est t
Fred, das könnte ein Datenfehler 
역추진 중에는 두 개의 링을 모두 사용하십시오. 역추진 후에는 링 B를 끄고 링 A만 사용하십시오. 단, 자세 제어에 두 
И назвал Бог свет Днём, а тьму Ночью. И был вечер, и было утро: день первый. И сказал Бог: да будет твердь посреди вод, и да отделит она в
13, Houston. Wir sehen, dass Sie sich dem Gimbal-Lock nähern. Bitte bringen Sie alle Quad Cs 
네, 알겠습니다. 좋습니다. 이제 절차를 시작할 준비가 되었습니다. 답변하실 때는 마이크에 대고 크게 말씀해 주세요. 다운링크가 상당히 잡음이 심하기 때문입니다. 먼저, 한쪽 용기에 먼저 이 작업을 하고, 그 다음 다른 쪽 용기에도 똑같이 해 주시면 됩니다. 용기 하나를 잡고 외부 포장을 잘라내 주세요. 접착면을 따라 자르시면 되는데, 접착면에 최대한 가깝게 조심스럽게 잘라주세요. 내부 포장이 손상될 경우 외부 포장을 다시 사용해야 할 수도 있기 때문입니
Roger. Un instant, s'il vous plaît. Lors de la mission Apollo D-9 Run 4, nous avons survolé Antarès et Scorpion. Nous avons effectué un survol long et un survol court. Nous avons également survolé Antarès et l'étoile de magnitude 3 dans la constellation du Scorpion. Nous n'avons effectué aucune observation directe entre les propulseurs d'appoint d'Apollo et les étoiles. N
Apollo 8, Houston. Le transfert des données est terminé; vous pouvez récupérer votre ordinateur. Ce transfert avait pour but d'approfondir l'étude de l'anoma
ヒュースト
알
هل تريد أن ترتاح قليل
Ich kann den 
نطاق مقياس الاستثمار الأجنبي المباش
- - at the top of the page, you have step 38, and right underneath that, prior to step 39, we want to have a primary glycol loop activation. What we are doing is to get the glycol evaporator 
네, 연료 상태는 양호하고 압력은 101~95 정도입
मैं कह रहा था कि, ह्यूस्टन, *** रुककर एक तस्वीर वगैरह ले लो और फिर
629
Базз, мы видим, как ты устанавливаешь защитную решетку на окно, и возвращ
—9,5 und 24 auf Bahn eins, 9,5 und 24 auf Bahn zwei und 9,5 und 24 auf Bahn drei. 9,5 und 24 auf Bahn vier. Die 
오로라 세븐, 하와이 통신 기술자입니다. 제
نقطة
56-BRAVO 分段燃烧，55 号机前，106 号机后。1+31。2+15。06 57 55。6+42。57-BRAVO 区域分段燃烧，55 号机前，103 号机后。1。1+31。2+10。08 27 38。7+22。收到请
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 컴퓨터 작업은 끝났습니다. BLOCK으로 돌
Ok, Jack. Torna
하하! 네가 덤불 속으로 들어갔을 때 내 오리발에 아직도 검은 미끄럼 자국이 남아있네. 좋아, 또 오른쪽으로 요잉했네. 바로잡아야 하는데... 아
Роджер. Начнём с мировых новостей. Всеобщие поздравления американским астронавтам «Аполлона-8» и надежды на международное сотрудничество в освоении космоса сопровождались рождественскими посланиями, разосланными по всему миру, пока крошечный космический корабль вращался вокруг Луны. Даже в коммунистическом мире царил энтузиазм по поводу первого полёта человека на Луну. В Москве советский учёный Анатолий Бесаранов вспомнил, что его страна и Соединённые Штаты уже обменивались знаниями о космосе, и предсказал, что полёт «Аполлона-8» приведёт к дальнейшему сотрудничеству. На Кубе радио Гаваны ретранслировало программу «Голоса Америки», чтобы рассказать слушателям о речи «Аполлона-8». Представители «Голоса» заявили, что это был первый случай, когда программы амер
ठीक है। पावरअप के नीचे, पहली पंक्ति में लिखा है "ऑटो सेलेक्ट, 16, टू ऑफ"। ठीक है। आप इस हिस्से को हटा सकते हैं। पाँचवीं पंक्ति में लिखा है "सर्किट ब्रेकर लॉजिक पावर", असल में यह "लॉजिक बस, चार, टू क्लोज्ड" है। डेल्टा-वी सीजी महत्वपूर्ण नहीं है क्योंकि हम इंजन को जला नहीं रहे हैं। "सिग्नल कंडीशनर/ड्राइवर बायस पावर" में "टू टू एसी 1" लिखा है। हम इसे केवल एक ही रखेंगे; इसे "सिग्नल कंडीशन/ड्राइवर बायस पावर, वन, टू एसी 1" कर देंगे। "पावर", जो नीचे से तीसरी पंक्ति है, उसमें लिखा है "पावर, टू, ऑन"; हम इसे केवल एक ही रखेंगे। हम नंबर 1 को लाएंगे, और हम "पावर, नंबर 1" लिखेंगे और आखिरी पंक्ति "ऑटो सेलेक्ट, 16, इनेबल" को आप हटा
Роджер. Переворачиваем страницу 33. Минус 4 минуты. Хорошо. Двигаемся вниз по странице, примерно строка 7, к "РАСПРЕДЕЛИТЕЛЬ КАРДАННОГО БАЛАНСИРА ДВИГАТЕЛЯ": "РАСПРЕДЕЛИТЕЛЬ КАРДАННОГО БАЛАНСИРА ДВИГАТЕЛЯ, ВЫКЛ.". 
Ah, quindi. Okay, va bene. Grazie. Aggiornerò la mia lista di controllo. Non so perché aggiornarla, no
はい。ジャック、あなたの質問にはすぐに答えますが、ジャックの第一印象は、事故直後の激しさには遠く及ばないということです。私もその意見に賛成です。彼は半分だと言いましたが、私は3分の1くらいまで減ったかもしれないと言いました。ヒューストンは、まだ事故の影響が残っているのか、それとも何か新しいものなのか、何か印象をお持ちでしたらお
Роджер, я
The humidity stays down around 50 perce
C'est une sensation très é
Tenez-vous à côté de l'un 
Gemini, Canary. Stand by to copy new 3-
11, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अभी OMNI एंटीना कॉन्फ़िगरेशन पर स्विच करें। हम S बैंड एंटीना OMNI को Bravo में और S ब
Хорошо. В дело вступают вторичные гликолевые 
Yes. Okay. Third row. Attitud
Wir werden in Houston zukünftige Manöver in einem langsameren, automatisierten Manövermodus durchführen. 
Давайте посмотрим. В Спрингфилде, штат Миссури, Микки Оуэн, ветеран-
Roger, Friendship Seven. Wir haben TM-Kon
حسنًا. انتظر لحظة عند تلك
Нам придётся немного подо
好的，11. 我这里有一些小东西：一份飞行计划更新和一些入境摄影信息，如果你准备好了
Très bien. Voilà qui conclut les questions de nos géologues pour ce soir. À moins que vous n'ayez autre chose, c'
Это подтверждается, и мне н
计算机处于预启动状态。我们将磁带播放设
13, Houston. Nous aimerions que vous vérifiiez certains disjoncteurs sur le panneau 226.
Roger. Étape 5: « Lorsque les taux sont inférieurs à 0,05 degré par seconde, CONTRÔLE D'ATTITUDE: LATELLATIN, à PU
わかりました。我々の部隊は、システムテストメーターに行ってインジェクターの温度を読み取っ
はい。彼がハサミで小さなノズルのプラスチックの端を切っているのが見えます。これから水鉄砲を差し込みます。水鉄砲はクリックごとに半オンス（約14g）の水が噴射されます。さあ、始めましょう。ビルがノズルを差し込み、水が入ります。皆さんは今日、私たちより美味しいクリスマスディナーを召し上がっていらっしゃることを願っていますが、それでも、私たちの食事に興味を持っていただけるかもしれないと思い、この機会
Хорошо. Я про
Il vaudrait mieux envoyer plus de no
Bon sang, Jack. Tu n'utilises pas un très bon système... Juste si tu pouvais... vérifier ton point de référence d'attitude... et le g-mètre de secours. Parce que, franchement, tu peux presque... Le module de commande et te
قل مرة أخرى عن الا
로저, 휴스턴. 6, /: 45701, -040, +157, 
了解しました。アップテレメトリスイッチがブロックになっているか確認していただけ
さて、ジャック、クワッド A パッケージ
了解。念のためお知らせしますが、ランデブーレーダーのサ
あと
ए
Stavamo monitorando gli atteggiamenti con Fred in precedenza e sembrava che il nostro comportamento oscillasse intorno a un certo punto, per poi tornare sui propri passi. Stai rilevando qualche tipo
У меня нет ваших сигнальных ракет. Простит
Questa è Friendship Seven. In attesa. Non sono ancora
Roger. Wir
Die Kreisel sind deaktiviert und das VOX-System ist ausgeschaltet. Ich wähle den Wiede
ठीक है। हमें उस युद्धाभ्यास के अपड
You 
Bonjour, Columbia. Houston. Nous vo
रॉजर। एडाप्टर बैटरी 1 24.5 वोल्ट की है, 1A 7.0 एम्पियर के बराबर है। एडाप्टर बैटरी D 24 वोल्ट की है और 6.8 एम्पियर की है। नंबर 1C 24 वोल्ट की है और 6.9 एम्पियर की है। 2A 24 वोल्ट की है और 8.5 एम्पियर की है। 2B 24 वोल्ट की है और 8.3 एम्पियर की ह
And ar
At the time of, as I recall, you had 6 seconds longer than the nominal burn which
제미니 4호, 휴스턴. 최근 궤도 비행 동안 OAMS 고도 제어 기능을 꽤 많
Okay. Vance, ci ho pr
Okay. Die zweite Aufnahme, die nach 32 Stunden den Kometen Bennett zeigt, sollte so aufgenommen werden, dass das Raumschiff vor dem Start so stabil wie möglich ist. Die Stabilitätsanforderungen sind sehr hoch. Wir waren uns nicht sicher, ob Ihnen das aus den bisherigen Informationen klar war. Außerdem zeigen die Fotos möglicherweise nicht so viel vom Kometen, wie das bloße Auge sehen kann. Wenn Ihnen also etwas Interessantes an der Struktur des Kometen auffällt, ist eine Skizze angebracht und erwünsch
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 현재 근신성 경계선에서 64해리 떨어져 있습니다. 다음 중간 항로인 28해리 지
Ich sage, wir fangen jetzt an, das Raumschiff zu verstauen, alles vorzubereiten und dann zu schlafen und zu essen. Von
Gemini 4
水泵
罗杰，双子座4号
टर्मिनल चरण का बीता समय 1 प्लस 29 प्लस 17; बर्न का GET, 5 प्लस 16 प्लस 54; डेल्टा-V, 33.0; अवधि, 41 सेकंड; कोर 25, 00301; कोर 26, 90135; कोर 27, 00016; डेल्टा-V, 32.9, 1.5, 1.5; बर्न समय, 40 आगे, 04 नीचे, 04 बाएँ; यॉ शून्य, पिच 26.8; रेंज 139; रेंज दर, 32.69। क्या आपको समझ आ
Voyons voir. À Springfield, dans le Missouri, Mickey Owen, l'ancien receveur des Dodgers de Brooklyn, entré dans l'histoire en laissant échapper une troisième prise qui a permis aux Yankees de New York de remporter la victoire contre les Dodgers lors des Séries mondiales de 1941, a décidé de laisser une trace indélébile dans les mémoires, au-delà de ses exploits sportifs. Quarante-cinq garçons et filles ont reçu un poney grâce à son geste généreux. Ces jeunes étaient invités à lui écrire pour lui expliquer comment ils prendraient soin d'un poney. Face à l'afflux de lettres, il a ajouté cinq poneys aux vingt qu'il avait déjà offerts; d'autres donateurs ont également contribué à en offrir vingt autres. « Je pensais recevoir une quarantaine de lettres, mais j'en ai finalement reçu près de 900 », a déclaré Mickey Owen. Passons maintenant à la une: à Wellington, en Nouvelle-Zélande, une cinquantaine d'hommes ont dégusté aujourd'hui la traditionnelle dinde et sa sauce aux canneberges au pôle Sud, mais les festivités de Noël avaient aussi une saveur orientale. Au menu figurait du sukiyaki préparé par des membres d'une expédition japonaise traversant l'Antarctique et ayant fait escale pour la journée à la base polaire de l'US Navy. À San Diego, en Californie, les membres d'équipage du Pueblo, navire de renseignement capturé, ont offert leur première paie au personnel de l'hôpital naval Balboa de San Diego. I
Je retourne dans le champ
Okay. Ich bin bereit, wieder mit dem Lesen anzufangen. Wir beginnen 
물병자리, 휴스턴.
Roger. We received negative C-band track over Ascension. Can you tell 
D'accord, attendez. Voyons ce que Frank a
Роджер. Думаю, проблема была в том, что центральный провод высох... пост
روجر. شكرًا لك يا مايك. هل يمكنك مساعدتنا؟ هذا غريب، لم نرَ مثله من قبل. كنا نتساءل إن كنت قد رصدت أي أحداث أو
Mike, an interesting viewpoint of the NAV sightings: maneuvering with the minimum impulse controller on the way home is a lot more difficult than going out because of all the fuel we don't have now. Every litt
Pour votre information, nous disposons déjà d
D'accord, Jack. Je ne pense pas que tu aies besoin de reli
सबसे ऊपर...
D'accord, Jim. Votre configuration actuelle présente les caractéristiques suivantes: les bus électriques sont interconnectés via les disjoncteurs BAL LOAD et la fonction AUTO CABIN REPRESS est activée. Nous souhaitons vous fournir une liaison montante; pour cela, sur le panneau 11, fermez immédiatement le 
D'accord. La photo est-elle trop sombre, Jack? Tu penses qu'ouvrir
쉬운
Vous pouvez leur demander d'éteindre la lumière du quai s'ils veulent économiser de l'énerg
ठीक है। मैं मोड कंट्रोल एटीटी होल्ड के साथ एंटर दबाऊंगा और फिर पैंतरेबाज़ी सेट करने के लिए दाईं ओर 30 बार यॉ करूंगा
روجر، يا صديقي السابع. لقد أوضحنا ذلك بشكل جليّ في
ここ
Создается иллюзия, что вы находитесь в
我们尝试稍微调整一下频率，以减
로저, 말씀하신 내용을 잘 들었습니다
रॉजर। आपको सूचित किया जाता है कि आपसे अनुरोध है कि आप इस पास के दौरान एसेंशन पर एक हाई-फायर सिग्नल चेक करें। यह हाई-फायर सिग्नल चेक 5
시그마 세븐, 여기는 HF 대역의 워터타운 캡 콤입니다. 제 목소리가 들리신다면, 케이프 플라이트 관제소에서 UHF 대역으로 전환하여 중계 항공기와 교신을 시도해
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। मैंने आपकी आवाज़ सुनी। आवाज़ क
كلامك واضح يا والي. هل يمكنك، إن كان لديك وقت، أن تعطينا تقريراً عن أدائك في اختبارات التوجيه؟ انت
本当に6月の
Roger. You 
휴스턴, 말씀하십시오. 여기는 아
アポロ8号、こちらはヒュ
Gemini 4
Ich gebe Ihnen einen Zeit-Hack bei 75 Stunden
休斯顿，阿波罗11
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Всё ясно. Я получил ваше пр
«А
The Eag
11, Houston. Ricevuto. Ti leggo bene, e sembra che il REACQ automatico sia a
你的四轴飞行器 A、C 和 D 看起来几乎完全相同。B 的温度略低一些，但差别很小。所有温度读数都正常，所以从散热角度来看，系统运行良好。
जिम, बस एक याद दिलाना चाहता हूँ। इस सम
残念ながら、あなたも窓の霧を通して見ているのです
Apollo 8, Houston. We got a
Ich kann die Fünf-Krater-Sternformation, die wir auf uns
罗杰。吉姆下次行动之前，能不能打个电话？我们错过了最后一个耳
Your oxygen pressure, your O2 pressure, is off the high side of the scale. You may have had tha
로저. 179 346 357, 해당 없음, 그리고 00176
로저. 거스, 이제 그만해야 할 것 같아. 계속 떨어지고 있어. 아마 3~4마
Сейчас я перейду к малому увеличению. Поправка: к большому увеличению на перископе, видите, как это выглядит?... Поворот вправо примерно на 5 градусов. Посмотрите, как она совпадает с перископом в этот момент. Допустим, ось поворота (инди
Roger. Wir positionieren uns gerade für den Fernseher. Bill hat ihn in Franks linkem Rendezvousfenster aufgebaut, und ich sitze drüb
Es rollt ziemlich stark, hält aber innerhalb de
जी हां,
Très bien. Écoutez, que pensez-vous d'une rentrée en roulis par rap
Роджер, Джерри. Понимаю. Я заметил одно р
Мы собрали все необходимые материалы, я могу надеть на Джека гарнитуру, и он сможет скопировать инструкцию и передать её Джеку. Или вы считаете, что она
알았다..
Va ben
هيوستن، أبولو ١
Roger. Une erreur, Columbia, sur le TIG pour DOI; secondes: 1407.
أنا كارنارفون. يمكنك إيقاف تشغيل دائرة ا
और बदलाव का काम पूरा हो गया है,
알겠습니다. 제가 확인해야 할 것은, 달 표면에서 물을 걸러낼 때 사용하려던 
11, CDR, fort et clair
Я подозреваю, что это поле валунов может частично образоваться из-за большого кратера с острыми краями и скалистым обрывом, над которым мы пролетели на заключительном этапе спуска. Вчера я говорил, что он примерно размером с футбольное поле, и должен признать, что измерить его было немного сложно, когда мы приближались. Но я подумал, что он вполне мог бы поместиться рядом с Астродомом, когда мы пролетали мимо него. А камни в окрестностях этого кратера со скалистым обрывом гораздо крупнее, чем эти в этом районе. Некоторые достигают 3 метров в длину, а может быть, и больше, и они очень густо расположены примерно на один диаметр кратера за его краем. Дальше их становится меньше, и даже в этом районе блоки, кажется, выстраиваютс
Roger. Unsere Mondreise mag Ihnen einfach erschienen sein. Ich kann Ihnen versichern, dass dem nicht so war. Die Saturn-V-Rakete, die uns in den Orbit befördert hat, ist eine unglaublich komplexe Maschine, deren einzelne Teile einwandfre
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven,
حسنًا يا فريد. نوصيك بتفعيل قاطع دائرة الإنذار الرئيسي لديك لتفعيل ا
मुझे डर है कि रेंज-
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, Houston. Nous vous recevons parfaitement. Nous avons examiné votre problème de quantité d'eau potable et il semblerait qu'il provienne d'un transducteur. Nous vous suggérons de laisser le réservo
Альтаир идеа
क्या हमारा रवैया काफी अच्छा है? उम्मीद है ऐसा ही हो। हम इस खिड़की से बाहर निकल चुके हैं, जान, लेकिन उस खिड़की से नहीं। अगर धरती वहीं है, तो वहीं से 
Okay. Der westdeutsche Bundeskanzler Willy Brandt, der gestern Ihren Start vom Cape aus verfolgt hat, und Präsident Nixon werden ihre Gesprächsrunde heute abschließen. Brandt reiste Berichten zufolge in die USA, um sich vom Präsidenten die Zusicherung zu hole
P-1の最初の初期点の真上にいます。見逃すことはほぼ不可能で、見つけるのは非常に簡単です。そして、2番目の初期点
Bien reçu. Il est
खैर, एक बार सब कुछ ठीक हो जाए, जो, तो मुझे लगता है कि मुझे अंतरिक्ष केंद्र जाना होगा और एक अच्छा सा आराम करना होगा और लगभग सब कुछ छोड़ देना होगा। मैंने बहुत
스캐너도 일치합니다. 피치 스캐너는 자이
Forza 
Roge
Roger, Houston, auriez-vous des angles de vue à for
了解しました。中部太平洋の状況は概ね良好です。雲底は2,000フィート（約600メートル）、視程は10マイル（約16キロメートル）、風速は0.70メートル（約12メートル）、波高は4フィート（約1.2メートル）、高度計は2,974メートル（約2,974メートル）と予想されます。日の出は10時（ズールー）、夜明けは16時49分（ズールー）。出撃予定艦はヨークタウン、航空機はエア
闪电看起来像一大团光
Okay, Fred, I can't hear you any more on account of the background noise. I assume that - I think I heard Jack tell you what we're going to do about COMM. UPLI
はい、もちろんです。ここで要約をまとめて
जेमिनी VI, ह्यूस्टन, हमने आपके एक्सेलेरोमीटर बायस अपडेट को पूरा कर लिया है। आप प्र
Roger. We 'can see portions of the now. The systems test meter 
是的，那样没问题。您可以采取一些措施，比如重新维护。但这确实比较繁琐，所以我们才想密切关注，以便在进入之前大致了解情况，看看是能有两个循环回路还是只有一个。这引出了我们正在努力解决的另一个问题，实际上是两个问题。第一，我们想确认您是否计划在实际进入过程中同时使用主锅炉和副锅炉；第二，我们也在寻找一种方法来检查主锅炉，确保它在进入之前没有干涸。这比您想象的要更具挑战性。如果您
Très bien, Houston. Êtes-vous prêt à parler du problème de la
パワーダウン（判読不能）状態でも、まだ 11 アンペア弱しか消費していないようです。1 番機では 10 アンペア、2 番機では 11 アンペア弱です。テザー、つまり外側のハッチにあるテザーもしくは臍帯拘束具の位置のせいで、宇宙船前方での自由テザーの空気力学的制約による船外活動（EVA）作業はかなり困難でした。そのエリアで作業している時はいつでも、テザーが端に達すると私は引き戻され、その反動で宇宙船上方、アダプター セクションの方へ運ばれていました。そのため、窓の上方で操縦している間、私は視界から消え、その後宇宙船後方へと戻されていました。宇宙船の前部に出るために、私は絶えず自分自身を引き上げ続けなければなりませんでした。私は自分が撮っている写真に満足していませんでした。装着していたランヤードを固定するのはかなり困難でした。銃に装着していたランヤード、私が繋いでいたテザーとアンビリカルケーブル、その他様々なランヤードがぶらぶらと揺れていて、カメラの前に入らないようにするのが大変でした。写真では腕を素早く動かしているのがお分かりいただけると思います。写真を撮るために、腕をどかそうと何度も試み
좋습니다. 이것은 예비 결과
19 m
Roger. Credo di aver capito. Me ne ricordavo parecchio, quindi con quello che mi hai raccontato 
了解。フォックス
Je le crois, Ken. Cette bande est parallèle à la ligne M, et je pense que c'est lié à la conception de l'optique, notamment à l'entrée rectangulaire extérieure. À cet angle solaire précis, elle la traverse complètement. J'ai remarqué que la Terre et le Soleil produisent le même effet sur le télescope de balayage. Dans le sextant, la même bande lumin
Rog
روجر. 355 015، غير متوفر، 00213 003 00168 30 2082 370. فيغا ودينيب 0
ठीक है
Roger. Tu as compris
네, 맞습니다, 
Джек, это очень удобно. Мы уже несколько раз проводили этот маневр, и, по сути, он проводится прямо сейчас, снова. Мы проводили его и здесь, в Хьюстоне, и на мысе. Единственное место, где вам может понадобиться опережать события, это период выравнивания платформы, когда вы готовитесь завершить маневр, а затем, когда вы доберетесь до командного модуля и сбросите его, вы снова окажетесь в очень удобном положении. И, конечно же
Roger. Kopiert für die Höhenanpassung GET des Brennvorgangs, 03 plus 03 plus 19; Delta-V, 0,8, Dauer, 0 plus 01; Gierwinkel 00, Nickwi
是的。好的。昨晚在沃克空军基地，一架KC-135加油机在着陆时坠毁，造成五名机组人员遇难。大部分新闻都集中在这次
रॉजर, ठीक है, जिम। हम इन सभी दूरस्थ स्थानों पर मौजूद रहेंगे। मैं आपको बस एक कॉल करके कहूँगा, "हम मौजूद हैं," और अगर आपको अ
I say after we get back in the sp
Des nuances de Gemini retrofire, êtes-vous sûr que nous sommes - (rires) - Non, voyons voir - les moteurs pointent dans cette direction et les gaz s'échappent dans cette direction, imprimant 
Okay, hatten Sie seit Ihrem 
Roger, Houston CAP COM. Gemini 4, ti ho sentito f
Вы могли бы указать нам время пересечения 45 градусов западн
حسنًا. وأفهم أنك تريد منا القيام بالخيار الثالث من الصفحة 57، ثم...
ठीक है, हमने - आपने वार्मअप
Okay. Verstanden. Sie haben den Hauptalarm mit der Kontroll
Okay. Based on your vector, the vector, the ground computes 15.3 feet per second on the midcourse, VEI of 36221, a gamma of minus 6.51 so it looks like your program is pretty goo
收到。明白了。所有
रॉजर, ट्रैंक्विलिटी। कोई बात नहीं। हम हल निका
Only saw one flake that time,
Ti abbiamo fatto dare il massimo a terra. Hai sganciato la corda
Roger. This is Friendship Seven, controlling manually on fly-by-wire, having no trouble controlling. Very smooth and easy; controls very nicely. Fuses are still the same on the left panel. Squib is, Squib is armed. Auto Retrojettison is off. is fly-by-wire, auto, gyro normal. All fuel, all "T" handles are in, Retro Delay is normal. I have beautiful view out the window of the coast at present time. Just departing. Can see the, 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हमने सेकेंडरी इवेपोरेटर को काफी देख लिया है। कृपया रीसेट बटन दबाने और पंप बंद करने के बीच लगभग 2 मिनट का अंतराल र
Sì. Oppure una striscia di nas
J'entendais Watertown
로저. 닐, 말씀 잘 들었습니다. 사진 몇 장과 예비 샘플을 받고 계신 것
Roger. Und was die Temperatur des Quadrocopters angeht – die Obergrenze liegt bei 105 Grad. Sie liegen deutlich darunter. Wir haben das beobachtet, und die Position wird gehalten, wenn auch sehr langsam. Beim Rollen des Raumschiffs scheinen die Temperaturänderungen etwas träge zu sein, aber der Sensor ist nicht eingefroren. Um noch einmal darauf zurückzukommen: Könnten Sie Jim beim nächsten Mal, wenn er an der Optik
Подтверждаю, Джим. Закройте DE
是的。它影响了距离海岸74海里的地方，被动地震仪在所有长周期通道上都探测到了强烈的地震活动
Ok, Jack. Torna alla procedura di carica della batteria che ti ho indicato. E, per terminare la carica, devi solo scrivere "Aperto" o "Spento" accanto all'interruttore di circuito che ti ho indicato. Quindi, sul pannello 250, l'interruttore che hai già aperto; sul pannell
로저.
Rog
わかりました。特に問題はありません。私たちがやっていることはこれだけです。この調子でいくように努力します。今のところ、この姿勢に満足しているようですね。上昇気流を見て、別の姿勢になる
Okay. Jetzt nutze ich den Mond links von mir, und das hilft wirklich gut. Ich decke den Lagenanzeiger ab, damit ihr die Gierbewegung beobachten könnt. Ich deaktiviere die Kreiselsteuerung und versuche, jetz
Okay, auf Seite 17. Die Last bei minus 4 Minuten durchführen; dazu CB(11), Wechselrichter 2, Schließen, und „Wechselrichter 1 auswählen“ markieren. Die Drehzahlskala wurde auf „25 Grad pro Sekunde“ geändert. „Ausbalancieren“ wird deaktiviert; und übrigens, Charlie, beim Thema Dämpfungsraten kommt die Diskuss
罗杰。DEL
Да, Майк. М
지상에 있는 것들은 모두 괜찮
그 물건들 다
Чт
了解しました。このレンジシーケンスは、ダウンボイスバックアップで発生する現象です。この
Houston, Apollo 11. Come s
E naturalmente, quando vi preparate a rientrare, t
Apollo 8, Houston. Ich glaube, wir sind vom Thema abgekommen. Die Nick- und Gierwinkel, die wir Ihnen für die Hochgewinnantenne mitgeteilt haben, bezogen sich auf Bills Anfrage, welche Positionen wir für die automatische Empfangsposition (AUTO REACQ) einnehmen könnten. Die Einschränkung besteht weiterhin, wenn wir nicht gleichzeitig eine Omni-Antenne verwenden wollen. Wir befinden uns in der AUTO REACQ-Position; wir sollten uns für eine der beiden entscheiden. Sie können diese Informationen also gerne verwenden, wenn Sie es ausprob
ジム、おそらく六分儀で星を
और, एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हम कमांड मॉड्यूल में CO2 के जमाव के ब
Gemelli 4, qui è Hou
Vous avez coupé la communication. Veuillez répéter, Houston CAP COM. Mise à jour du plan de vol effectuée. En attente de votre mis
알겠습니다. 약 114분 10초쯤에 "고도 설정 60마일" 아래 모든 항목에 "태양 코로나, 선택 사항"이라는 주석을 달고, 그 선택 사항의 첫 번째 줄에 있는 "태양 코로나 및 태양 가장자리 밝기 증가 자세로 기동" 부분에서 "그리고 태양 가장자리 밝기 증가 자세"를 지우
Affermativo. Questo completa la scheda. Il resto degli aggiornamenti sono solo per vostra informazione, basati sulla nostra piattaforma a 58 ore - guardate la piattaforma. Siamo davvero in ottima forma. I vostri GYRO non hanno praticamente alcuna deriva da quando - nell'aggiornamento tracciato stavamo osservando X di a - 2,24... Y di punto più 0,87, Z di - 0,11. Dall'aggiornamento, che s
Würdest du das kaufe
Non importa, sono tutti buon
我们已记录了您
Roger. It looks like I might have to do a couple more small maneuvers to stay away from the front of this, the way we are ending up now. Do you want me to do these with
罗杰，请再
Roger. Deaktiviert. Und hier unten sehen wir, dass Ihr Wasserstoff und Sauerstoff in der Brennstoffzelle exakt übereinstimmen, daher vermuten wir, dass es sich lediglich um ein Problem mit den Auslesegeräten des Raumschiffs
Roger. Vo
حسنًا. وينطبق الشيء نفسه على رؤوس وحدات الخدمة، دلتا الرباعية، الرئيسية أ
أعتقد أننا T/M... ها أنا ذا، أخذت أحد قفازاتك... أخذت كلا قفازيك
罗杰。潜水服穹顶温度为 68 度。舱内穹顶温度为 48 度。潜水服设置温度为 7.5。
जेर
We got two core tubes and solar wind and about half of the big sample bag
Aurora Seven, Cap Com. Können Sie uns einen Kommentar zum Schwerelosigkeitsex
Roger, Jim. Lorsque nous avons perdu notre antenne ici, nous avons interrompu l'enregistrement de votre bande, 
Судя по уровню сигнала, похоже, что мы попали в зону бокового лепестка диаграммы направленности с помощью антенны с высоким коэффициентом 
Хорошо. Что мы будем делать, Джек,... вон там.
हमें टीआर माइनस 2 56 सिग्नल नहीं मिला,
Roger. Se hai un minuto libero, ho degli aggiornamenti sui PAD che ti abbiamo passato ieri pomeriggio, credo. A seguito della correzione di m
はい、進め
아직 부스터가 보이네요... 바로 부스터였어요. 지금 부스터에 불빛이 번쩍이는 게 보여요. 지평선 너머로 지나가고 있네요. 어둠이 깔리기 직전에 부스터에 햇빛이 반사되어 아주 밝게 보이는군요. 저게
Wir hatten einige seltsame Gerä
حسنًا. بالنظر إلى اليمين، ستجد أن الوضعية، أو بالأحرى الوضعية، غير صحيحة، لذا يمكنك شطبها. وتحت صورة القمر، اشطب الشرطة (-) بين قوسين، و"108.19"، و"
В конце концов, это так и есть - 
Roger, Buzz. Vorremmo che posizionassi l'interruttore OMNI A dell'antenna a banda S in posizione Bravo. L'interruttore OMNI dell'antenna a banda S in posizione OMNI, la traccia ad alto guadagno su MANUALE e gli ang
Esatto. Sul pannello 3: AC INVERTER, AC BUS 1 e 2, RESET e ritorno al c
로저, 캘리포니아에 연락하기
제미니 4, 휴스턴 CAP C
Are you
收到。既然一切进展顺利——通讯良好——那我们就提前十分钟开始烟火电路检查吧。你觉得
Roger. Say again R1 and N
Okay. Alles klar. Das war der höchste Füllstand im Tank, und anscheinend ist der Druck in Tank 1 während des Wartens auf das Schließen des Druckschalters zum Starten des Heizzyklus 
ठीक है। अब मुझे लगता है मैंने बिल्कुल भी जम्हाई नहीं ली है, एड। 
Qui Sigma Seven. Ho letto una stazione, molto confusa, per fa
Хорошо. Он говорит, что знал об этом с самого начала. Он говорит, что ег
TPI 연료와 제동 연
そうですね、ビル、私たちがあなたにお願いしたいのは、AUTOモードで再取得するだけです。確かに、それも一つの方法
Negative. I've tried not to get into that. If I can get the suit temperature down a little bit, I'll open the visor and get some water th
わかりました、ビル。これから観測が始まりますが、そのまま姿勢制御に移行するとクワッド・チャーリーが過熱す
Houston, Apoll
मेरे पास आपके लिए एक और है। आप इ
Okay. We'll sure give it a go. As I said, we - We have some stars. They're not - They're not centered with the shaft and trunnion zero. Let us take a quick look at 105 pitch, shaft and trunnion zero, and see if we can g
حسنًا، أبولو 8. دعوني أخبركم بموضوعنا الأول، وهو مراجعة جميع إجراءات الدخول والمعلومات ذات الصلة، وسنراجع قائمة التحقق الخاصة بالدخول. لا يزال فريق العمل يُجري التحقق من ذاكرة الوصول العشوائي، ونحن نبحث في المشكلة، ونتناقش حول درجة حرارة المركبة الرباعية، لذا سأشارككم بعض هذه المعلومات حال ورودها، ونحن الآن بصدد 
확실히 제 아래에 있었습니다. 카나본(Carnarvon) 부근부터 계속 제 아래
高度約179マイルでロックオンし、レ
Roger. Facci sa
로저. 다음 작업에서도 이 컨트롤 포인트 관측 기록들을 모두 지우고 짐에게 휴식을
جيميني 7، 6. من خلال الرسم البياني لنقطة البيانات، يبدو أننا على الخط تمامًا. كانت آخر نقط
프레드, 배경 소음 때문에 더 이상 잘 안 들리네요. 잭이 통신 업링크 스퀠치에 대해 어떻게 할 건지 얘기한 것 같은데, 이제 알아들을게요. 자세를 확인할 수 없으니 안테나는 당신이 알아서 조절해 주세요. 신호가 올라오면 음성 확인을 해드리겠습니다. 신호가 올라오는 데 3분에서 5분 정도 걸릴 거예요. 그리고 우주비행사들이 사용하기 쉽도록 지구가 보이면 앞쪽 안테나를, 달이 보이면 뒤쪽 안테나를 
التقطتُ صورةً لدعامة Y الإضافية من قرب مرحلة الهبوط، وأعتقد أننا سنتمكن من رؤية التأ
罗杰。你能给我一个——更正一下吗？你能开始升高血压吗？我目前还没有任何T/M症状。你现在处于
了解、ビル。ダンプを受け取りました。音質はと
लग
Роджер. А затем слева, или в северном направлении, мы видим светлые воды вокруг Вест-Индии, и мы даже можем разглядеть Флориду. Я смотрю в монокуляр Билла и вижу различные материки, Южную Америку
Хорошо, Джек, во время просмотра телевизор
罗杰。事情是这样的，我们这台氢氧化锂装置卡在了宇航服的泄压阀里。现在
Soll ich die Ni
أنت ا
C'est négatif, Jack. Nous n'avons pas encore activé la liaison descendante. Vous devrez vous charger vous-même de cette opération et de la pressurisation du module de co
Affirmative. We sure can. Move it up toward the terminator - correction, away f
네, 괜찮습니다
Родж
네. 먼저 빠르게 읽어 드릴게요. 대략적인 내용을 파악하실 수 있도록요. 패드, 서비스 모듈 JETT 자세, 달 관측 자세, 태양 관측 자세, 그리고 JETT 자세입니다. 패드는 달과 태양 관측 시 자세에 대한 대략적인 수
혹시 데이터 파일 바로 뒤에 있는 음식 보관함을 열어보셨나
Bene. Ora iniziamo a smaltire le acque reflue
कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार। माइ
Знаете, сколько бы раз я ни надевал эти опти
रॉजर। मैं 04
了解し
Jim, Charlie et d'autres ont testé ça dans le simulateur. Ils recommandent d
ジェミ
阿波罗8号，这
Jack, that's what we want to end up with ultimately is 1-1/2 to 2 there in that tunnel
Censu
Apollo 8, H
Mike, je crois p
OK, Aquarius; Houston. Nous avons reçu les données et je
Houston, ich werde Ihnen in 4 
是的，在航天器分离阶段。在我看来，我们似乎出现了一些偏差，但我无法
돔, 객실 돔 온도는 약 57도입니다. 객실 온도는 90도입니다. 우주복 흡입구 온도는 62도입니다. 산소 잔량은 1차 공급 시 50psi(단위: 100psi), 2차 공급 시 75psi(단위: 100psi)입니다. 모든 전기 장치는 정상 작동하는 것 같습니다. 연료 잔량은
हैलो, हवाई, हैलो, हवाई कॉम टेक, ऑरोरा सेवन। कमज़ोर है लेकिन पढ़ने 
سأعطيك خدعة زمنية عند 75 ساعة و37 دقيقة، وسأجرب هذا التح
Роджер, я вас довольно хорошо слыш
見て...それの写真は撮
Okay. One more thing we want to update you on with a little detail. As we told you, the ascent SEP attitude was in plane and the JETT attitude will be more similar to a normal service module SEP attitude, that is it will be up, out the radius vector and 45 degrees right, out of plane toward the south. We are going to recommend that prior to JETT, the configuration 
つまり、印刷された飛行計画より約 3 分進んでいます。約 3 分早めに SEP を試みるのが賢明かもしれません。そうすれば、必要なときにいつでも正確な SEP の GET 
プライマリおよ
Die Notfallprobe ist in der Tasche. Mein Sauerstoffgehalt liegt bei 81 Pro
Посадочная подушка снята. Аварийная система стабилизации отключена. Аварийное раскрытие то
Hier spricht Aquarius. Wir haben derzeit massive Stö
Okay, Jim. So we want to get the Y-axis of the spacecraft parallel to the termina
هيوستن، هل تريدون منا اختبار الكاميرات في الطائرة؟ كنت أتساءل عن ذلك. رأيت ذلك في خطة الرحلة، لكنني أتساءل فقط عما إذا كنتم تريدون القيام بذلك أثناء تشغيل المحرك، أم تري
Да. Подождит
はい。マイナス4:30
Ich kann Ihnen
मिथुन राशि
D'accord, les 
قد يكون من المثير للاهتمام أنه بعد أن خلدنا إلى النوم الليلة الماضية مباشرة، انطلق جرس الإنذار الرئيسي، وقد أرعبنا ذلك بشدة. وكنا نتحرك في جميع
Okay. Es sieht so aus, als ob die 
صحيح، وهناك عنصر آخر متعلق بالنظام هنا
Ich sage Ihnen, mir gefällt es hier drinnen besser, wenn das Visier offen
रॉजर। मैंने कुछ 
Apollo
Ok, Buzz. La prima cosa che abbiamo è che le tue oblique del sito di atterraggio non sono nella posizion
Westlich Ihrer Station sehe ich viele Wirbel und Gebilde aus Wolkenformationen. Bilder von diesem Zeitpunkt: 2, 3, 4, 5. Der Steuerungsmodus ist jetzt 
Джерри, кто из системных 
ठीक है
Ok. Ti dico cosa potresti fare, se non stai facendo altro: dovresti prendere cinque segni a 30 secondi di distanza l'uno dall
곧 LOS가 될 것
हां, शेफ़र ने गड़
C'est plus que ce qu
Gemini 4, 
おい、デイク、上は寒いぞ。今夜はそこで寝られるか分からない。きっと35
ठीक है। फिर से कोशिश क
好的。那我们就直接进入正题，我先给
Roger. Könnten Sie uns bitte die Kabinendruck- und Anzugsdru
はい。他に何かございません。何かおっしゃりたいことがあれば、いつでもお待ちしてい
Okay, Delta-V Schub A, Normal; auf eine
好的。我的高增益天线
Sì, credo che dovrebbe esserci un passaggio 4A che
Shannon finisce il carb
Это однозначно НЕ ПОДХОДИТ — ПОДХОДИТ/НЕ ПОДХОДИТ — именно то, что мне нужно. Эй,
星期
姿态正常。正在俯仰回到再入姿态，修正
Ok. Ottima idea. Siamo... è... Abbiamo riflettuto a lungo sul tipo di manovre da consentirvi di fotografare, intendo il modulo di ser
Вот примерно то, что мы имеем... Да, это самая удобная маленькая штучка, которую вы когда-либо видели... она вставляется прямо в шлем, не выпадает, и вы можете схватить все, что захотите, и оно б
Да, думаю, вы правы. Да уж, провисание действительно заметно. Большая часть – видно, где вс
了解。こちらフレンドシ
Hallo, Canaveral Com Tech. Friendship 
О, нас только что удостоили чести присутствия г-на Нила Армстронга, который сейчас сто
«Дружба Семь»,
ठीक है धन्यवाद
Aurora Seven，这里是印度资本通信公司。我们所有的回溯序列时间都是标称值。需要我报
كانتون كوم تك، هذا سيجما سفن. فهمت رسالتك بوضوح. كيف حال
Наверное, это на будущее. Подождите. Я посмотрю, о чём они г
حسناً،
D'accord. Nous allons effectuer nos dernières observations d'étoiles pour le moment, et même si nous perdons les communications, nous conti
飞船看起来真的像是在释放气体，因为每当有一小块灰尘或其他东西经过时，它总是会朝
ठीक है। अगला एक, दो, तीन, चार, पांच, छह, सात एक जैसे हैं, और फिर ह
ठीक है। प्रत
Roger. Eagle è in modalità VOCE
Okay. I'm i
了解、トランクウィリティ。分かりました。きっと美
Right, S
В данный момент скорость рыскания составляет ½ градуса в секунду вправо, скорость тангажа — ½ градуса в секунду вверх, а скорость крена — ½
Colu
明白你已准备就绪。9-Bravo 区域。获取遥控指令，13:19:36；400K 为 20 加 25；反向倾斜为 26 加 13；所有这些倾斜角度，对于所有这些更新，都将是 90 度：获取遥控指令，14:17:05；400K，20 加 32；反向倾斜，25 加 54。11-2：获取遥控指令，52:02；400K，20 加 11；反向倾斜，25
The batteries are c
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। बज़, हमने तुम्हारा अच
روجر. 7.5، 7.5، و6.5. ولديّ بعض الكلمات 
روجر، أنا في حالة بدنية ممتازة. سأبدأ ببعض التمارين بعد دقيقة وا
रॉजर। यह सुनकर 
加油
Zu Ihrer Information, da Si
روجر. مايك، عندما كنتَ تُجرّب النظام منذ فترة، وعندما قمنا بتقليص نطاق التوقف، افترضنا أن نطاق التوقف كان مُتمركزًا حول الوضعية الجديدة التي كنا عليها آنذاك. منذ ذلك الحين، انحرفنا درجتين تقريبًا في كلٍّ من الميل والانعراج عن تلك الوضعية، بحيث إذا اتبعنا الإجراء الذي شرحناه لك - وهو الضغط على زر "أمر التسارع"، ثم تشغيل جميع مفاتيح "الاختيار التلقائي"، ثم الضغط على زر "أمر المعدل" - فسيحاول النظام العودة إلى وضعية الميل والانعراج التي
Roger, Buzz. Vorremmo che posi
そ
حسناً. يجب أن يك
ジェミニ4号、口腔内の体温を測る必要はありません。時間がありませんの
Уотертаун, диспетчерская служба, это «Сигма Семь». Я вас слышу громко и четко по УВЧ. 
روجر، فهمت المظلة جيداً، الهبوط طبيعي. هل هذا
Nu
On a juste mangé une boîte de
好的，吉姆。我们建议你先调整到燃烧姿态，保持最小冲量，然后进行机身轴线调整，400+5，接着400+0，最后
好的。在启动设置下，第一行写着“自动选择，16，关闭”。好的，您可以删除这部分。第五行写着“断路器逻辑电源”，实际上是“逻辑总线，四个，闭合”。由于我们不会烧毁发动机，所以DELTA-V CG并不重要。“信号调节器/驱动器偏置电源”列为“两个接交流1”。我们将只保留一个，改为“信号调节器/驱动器偏置电源，一个接交流1”。倒数第三行的“电源”写着“电源，两个，开启”，我们将只保留一个。我们把数字1调高，改为“电源，数字1”。最后一行“自动选择，
Roger. 355 015, NA, 00213 003 00168 30 2082 370. Vega et Deneb 007 144 068. Pas de marge de sécurité. Po
That's affirmative, Apollo 11. And, Mike, it's similar to the SEP burn prior to flight after the undocking here. And the you should see on register 
好的。关于定向测试——我
Vorbeiflugmanöver / 62954, minus 162, plus 129 953 578 - das sind 00953 und plus 000578 - minus 02076 000 000 000, nicht anwendbar, plus 00202, 02356 022 02280 03 0393 310 013, nach oben 048, nach rechts 35, plus 1418, minus 165 05 12904 36160, Sirius, Rigel 137 311 339, kein Tankinhalt, erfordert Neuausrichtung auf
Roger. Mon statut est « actif ». Je pouvais recevoir toutes les stations du Pacifique, mais apparemment elles ne me rec
알았
ह्यूस्टन, हम फोन नहीं कर र
Мы зафиксировали цель на расстоянии около 179 миль, а на радаре определили точку пристрелки примерно на 156 милях; стрелки относительно стабильны, выглядят довольно хорошо. Стрелка рыскания колеблется взад-вперед, возможно, на плюс-минус 1 градус. Следует отметить, что проблема заключается в устранении остаточных отклонений. Мы уменьшаем остаточные отклонения до небольшого значения, затем при следующем измерении они увеличиваются, а затем снова уменьшаются. Трудно определить, когда остаточные отклонения достигают нуля. Наземная станция со
역행 후 경과 시간
После включения режима регулировки высоты за нами следовал красный объект
分か
了解。着陸バッグが落ちたかもしれないという報告はありましたか？オーバ
يبدو الأمر جيداً. إذا استطع
我需要一点时间
Roger. Lass es bis nach dem Brand in Texas an, dann beobachten wir den Wasserverlust. Sollte es weiterhin
Я увеличу громкость и посм
माइक, बैटरी कंपार्टमेंट का दब
Bon, je m'apprêtais à vous parler de la passation de relais, mais j'ai un peu tardé. Comme nous avons suffisamment d'énergie et que
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। तुम बहुत कमजोर हो।
Mi senti? Trasmetto 
Ecco fatto. Ora ce l'abbiamo fat
좋습니다, 델타-V 추력, 정상, A는 꺼져 있
अरे, क्या तुम इस बी बी को द
위를 올려다보니, 나는 지금 그림자 속에 서서 창문에 있는 버즈를 올려다보고 있다. 모든 것이 아주 선명하게 보인다. 빛이 충분히 밝아서 창문 앞쪽에서
아름다운 별들이 보이고,
Genau. Die ausländischen Direktinvestitionen werden auf eine einheitliche Plattform 
Joe, Jack tells me that there's still a lot of particles floating around and he's - he can't pick out any constellation that he recognizes so far. But it might clea
Je vois les étoiles doubles de la constellation de la Grue alignées, convergeant vers le centre du hublot. Jupiter, bien sûr, brille de mille feux. Je distingue 
Except there's such a big shadow being cast by ev
로저, 에드. 원래 비행 계획을 재개해 주시길 바랍니다. 현재 ΔV가 205ft/sec 남았고 63회전 후에도 81, 125.7 궤도를 유지할 것으로 예상되기 때문입니다. 그렇게 되면 OAMS 
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في ج
OK, 13. Nous avons énormément de personnes qui travaillent là-dessus; nous vous donnerons des infos dès que nous en aurons, e
气室压力持续上升，已
База «Транквилити», Хьюстон. В
Roger. You cut out
13番、ヒ
D'accord. L'étape 4 est « CONTRÔLE D'ATTITUDE: LATYPAGE, vers CONTRÔLE DE MODE »
好的。我只是想
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。完毕
좋아, 우리가 한 일 때문에 가스를 낭비한 건 아니지만, 그 빌어먹을 DAP 활동 때문에 가스를 낭비했어. 도대체 이해가 안 가. 시
Le taux d'humidité se maintient aux al
罗杰
11, Houston. Bei einem 12 F
ठीक है। दरअसल, बैटरी 2 पर लगा तापमान सेंसर बार-बार चालू-बंद हो रहा है और हर बार चालू-बंद होने पर यह एक मास्टर अलार्म को ट्रिगर
좋
आपको यह
BAT 2 et 4 quittent 
물병자리 여러분, 지금 우리가 고민하고 있는 것은, 많은 에너지를 사용하지 않고도
That's affirmed. And let's go back to page 1-6, lin
Okay. One more note on the water, Jack. If you don't bleed the pressure off when you - don't take enough water to bleed the pressure off completely, the pressure that's left on there is going to drain away in a period of 1 to 3 hours. So it's a small amount of oxygen, but we might as well save it. So if you want to eliminate that problem you could completely drain the pressure off by putting the water in a wa
Роджер. Напоминаю, что перед включением режима удержания положения после перехода в режим торможения необход
로저. 우주선과 발사체 유도 시스템을
보시다시피, 휴스턴, 전원이 켜지면서 예전처럼 다운링크
Okay. Ich habe einige Wetter- und Einsatz
不
D'accord. Panneau 229: MINUTERIE CB, PRINC
Das ist Friendship Seven. Anscheinend ist Folgendes passiert: Ich habe, glaube ich, keinen Schub von einem Pfund in der linken Gierachse. Deshalb dr
로저. 삽입 후 탈출 모드에서 객실 모드로 전환한 후에 슈트 루프 설정을 변경했습니까? 특히, 보조 캐니스
D'accord. Mais ils ne l'ont pas encore fait. Nous sommes presque en
阿波罗
Roger, ich habe das Upda
ठीक है। जैक, मैं इस पर आपके साथ चर्चा कर सकता हूँ, क्योंकि हमारी विभिन्न प्रक्रियाओं में इस चेकलिस्ट को दो-तीन बार लिखा जा चुका है। सबसे ऊपर वाली पंक्ति में, पहले दो खुले हैं, अगले तीन बंद हैं, और अब हम QUAD TCA के 1, 2, 3, 4 को खोलने जा रहे हैं; CROSSFEED बंद रहेगा, और TEMP/PRESS DISPLAYFLAG खुल जाएगा, और हम PQCS क
您好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们注意到氧气流量指示器传感器出现了一些异常。我们怀疑传感器本身存在问题——我们原本预期在废气储存通风阀处于“通风”位置时，氧气流量会达到峰值。但实际情况并非如此。此外，当您关闭废气储存通风阀时，我们也注意到了一些异常
거기서 자도 괜찮아요, 알겠죠? 별로 문제될 것 같진 않아요. 전 차라리 자는 게 낫죠. 아침에 그걸 만지작거리는 것보다 차라리 프로브랑 드로그를 달고 자는 게 훨
अंतरिक्ष यान के ठीक सामने अब एक रोचक जलधारा है, जो एक छोटे पहाड़ के क
ह्यूस्टन, अब
Ein Blick ins Ausland zeigt, dass Südkoreas erste Autobahn, die Seoul mit dem Hafen von Incheon verbindet, zu Ehren Ihrer Reise den Namen Apollo Highway trägt. Ich gl
يا برج الدلو، قرارنا المؤقت هو ترك الجهاز قيد التشغيل، وإيقاف تشغيل الجهاز الآخر، وإيقاف تشغيل الأجهزة غير الضرورية. سنُعدّ قائمةً أكثر دقةً حا
好的。收到。根据目标着陆点理解：T1，104 32 18；T2，104 37 28
Das ist ja spektakulär da draußen – sieht aus, als würdest du direkt gegen eine
मैं ऑस्ट्रेलिया को नंगी आंखों से और चीन के भूभाग को देख सकता हूं, लेकिन कोरियाई प्रायद्व
こちらシグマ・セブン。30秒間のHFチェックです。開始時刻は10秒後です。南米へ向かう途中、バハ・カリフォルニアの海岸線を南下しながら、30秒間のテストを実施します。すべてのシステム
Blood pressure is.., Gemini 4. Start exercise on
روجر. 88 و8
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 산소 유량계 센서에서 이상한 점을 발견했습니다. 센서에 문제가 있는 것 같습니다. 폐기물 저장 벤트 밸브를 'VENT' 위치로 돌렸을 때 산소 유량이 높게 표시되어야 하는데 그렇지 않았습니다. 또한 폐기물 저장 벤트 밸브를 닫았을 때도 이상한 표시가 나타났습니다. 밤새도록 이 문제를 계속 살펴보고 내일 아침에 문제
日の出や日の入りの時刻を
Bene. Appare c
わ
Okay. Mike, what happened is - you know, you were sitting there monitoring,, and at step 7 you went into, NOUN 01, and keyed in the address and then INFORMATION INFORMATION; and on the final ENTER of that 35400 ENTER, right after that, it - that then put you back into the 16,. Then when you did the, ENTER, you were really entering the information in the actual CDU; and when you got the two entries in, in register 1 and 2, it was an - it was an instantaneous change in the actual CDU, and the looked at that and saw - saw what it thought it had. My - my gosh, I got a 600 degree per second rate. And it turns on the jets to tr
Since this is winter - since this is winter ti
Roger. I am back in - retroattitude. I'm going back to chimpanzee configuration. The gyros are no
D'accord. La pl
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ وضعية مُحاذاة محور الجسم، باستخدام خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار على الأرض كما فعلنا من قبل. وبمجرد حصولنا على ذلك، سننفذ -7، وهو ما يبدو الآن وكأنه احتراق بمعدل قدمين في الثانية أو حوالي 15 ثانية. وقد أُبلغتُ أنه انخفض إلى قدم ونصف الآن، لذا فهو ضمن الحدود الآمنة. حسنًا. عند القيام بذلك، سنبدأ فورًا المناورة للوصول إلى وضعية إطلاق وحدة الخدمة، والتي ستكون في مستوى الطائرة لأننا نُطلقها أبكر من المعتاد. لسنا بحاجة، ولا نرغب، في وجود عنصر خارج مستوى الطائرة. لذا ستكون في مستوى الطائرة مع توجيه وحدة الخدمة للخارج على طول متجه نصف القطر. سنبدأ بعد ذلك في تجهيز وحدة القيادة لوحدة الخدمة SEP، بما في ذلك فحص وحدة القيادة وإطلاق النار الساخن، وقبل حوالي 4 ساعات و30 دقيقة من الإطلاق، سنُطلق وحدة الخدمة. سنرفع الطائرة حتى نحصل على وحدة الخدمة في... ونحاول التقاط بعض الصور، لكننا لن نُجري مناورات تحويلية لالتقاط الصور لأننا لا نريد إفساد زاوية مسار الطيران في ذلك الوقت. حسنًا. هذا يُعطينا ساعتين تقريبًا من الوقت المتاح هنا للانتهاء، إذا تأخرنا في ذلك، للانتقال إلى قائمة التحقق والاستعداد لتشغيل وحدة القيادة. سنبدأ التشغيل الكامل لوحدة القيادة قبل ساعتين ونصف. سنُشغّل الكمبيوتر، ونرفع الطائرة، ونبدأ في إرسال بيانات الحالة، وما إلى ذلك، ومحاذاة منصة وحدة القيادة. بعد ساعة ونصف تقريبًا كحد أقصى، مما يُعطينا ساعة للقيام بهذه الأمور المتعلقة بوحدة القيادة، سنبدأ المناورة للوصول إلى وضعية التخلص. ثم ستبدأ في إغلاق... بالطبع، لم نُهيّئ نظام التخزين بالكامل قبل ذلك بوقت طويل. سنغلق الفتحة، ونجري فحصًا لسلامة الضغط، وعند الساعة -1، أو 141 ساعة و40 دقيقة، سنتخلص من المركبة. بمجرد القيام بذلك، يمكنك البدء في المناورة للوصول إ
आप 
حسنًا. الآن، بدأنا العمل على الحقيبة، والخطوة التالية هي تجهيز خرطوم البدلة الأحمر، سواءً كان خرطوم القائد أو خرطوم المركبة، لأننا سنحتاج إلى تجهيز كليهما في النهاية، ووضعهما في الجزء العلوي من الحقيبة. وللقيام بذلك، عليك أولًا التأكد من فصل الخرطوم الأحمر عن الخرطوم الأزرق. لا أعرف إن كان هذا قد تم بالفعل، ولكن إن لم يكن كذلك، فما عليك فعله هو قص الغلاف الخارجي المصنوع من قماش بيتا على طول الخرطومين، ثم قص الأر
जी हाँ। मेरे पास पायलट प्रोजेक्ट के लिए 02:17:43 बजे का आरकेवी मेडिकल डेटा पास नंबर
Je largue le H2O2. Fusible activé. En attente. Le bras de récupération est armé. Prêt pour le parachute principal. Tous les interrupteurs sont en position correcte. Le carburant manuel est presque épuisé. Ça y est, le parachute principal est 
Bene. Ora, sul pannello 8, dovrò indicarti un certo numero di interruttori automatici che vogliamo aprire, quindi iniziamo con il pannello CB 8 completamente chiuso, tranne i due che abbiamo lì, CM/HEATER, aperti, e FLOAT BAG aperto, 
Très bien, DECA PO
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11. क्या आप इन NOUN 49 की नकल क
好的。您打算如何在分离前激活辅助回路？看起来如果客舱风扇出现问题，我们就无法进行完整的冷浸过程。有什
好的。在“PRESS”下方，我们划掉第一行，改为“下降氦气调节器，与理发柱对话”。我们划掉步骤2和3，并划掉“起落架放
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们将持续为B电池充电，直到进
Bene. Abbiamo diversi elementi qui. Il primo è un promemoria: R
说吧，把你刚才
전기 케이블을 연결하세
48587 603 48383 06 2027 250、そして照準星は地球の中心です。
Houston, hier spricht Apollo 8. Wir sind uns einig. Sirius und Rigel wären zwei Sterne, die sich deutlich besser eignen als Navi und Polar
We're well clear of the now, Housto
ईगल,
वाह, बढ़िया! - मौसम विभाग का बैक फिल्टर आखिरकार निकल आया। पहली तस्वीर काम की नहीं थी, इसलिए मैं इसे बदल दूंगा। - ठीक है। स्लाइडर निकल गया। अगर हो सके तो वेदर
アポロ11号、
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston. Wi
Okay. Die Kuppel senkt sich anscheinend etwas ab. Ich bleibe erstmal bei die
St
Ro
That does sound pretty good. As a matter of fact
यह फ्रे
Ok, Jim. Ho un aggiornamento sul piano di volo. Hai il controllo della visibilità stellare, e quello che abbiamo sembra indicare che Navi sia ancora la nostra stella, e i numeri associati sono rollio 102,6, beccheggio 328,9, im
Okay. We're in business now with the bag, and the next step to perform is to get ready to put the red suit hose, either the commander's or the LMP's because we're - we're going to want you to have both of these made up eventually, into the top of the - of the bag, and to do that you, first of all, have to assure that the - that the red hose is separated from the blue hose. I don't know whether this has been done already, but if it hasn't, what you have to do is cut the outer Beta-cloth sheath down the full length of the - of th
Игл, Хьюстон. Расстановка и инициализация показались нам удач
Int
*** Warnleuchte und Wasserabscheiderleuchte leuch
C'est une bonne solution car elle place la Terre par la fenêtre 1, la Lune par la fenêtre 3 et le Soleil en bas, de sor
End blackout, 30 plus 01; Drogue, 31 plus 37; Main, 32 plus 58; and 
グリコール圧、グリコール量、PCO2の目盛りが計器に表示されてい
यह जेमिनी 4 है। इससे पहले मुझे कौन कॉल कर रहा 
Okay, Jack. CB BAT CHARGER to AC POWER, close. Stand by. Okay. I had to get a light here. CB BAT CHARGER, BAT A CHARGE, close; CB INVERTER C
And Charlie, I'd like to say hello to all my fellow scouts and scouters at Farragut State Park in Idaho having a National Jamboree there this 
3時26分33秒に、空に10個の粒子が見えることに気付きました。それらは間違いなく私には輝いて見えます。小さな霜のかけらのように見えました。しかし、中にはずっと遠くにあるように見えるものもあります。100ヤードほど
R
Roger. Sie sehen die Erde, so wie wir sie sehen, durch unser linkes Fenster – etwas mehr als die Hälfte der Erde. Wir blicken auf den östlichen Pazifik und die nördliche Hälfte des oberen Bildschirmbereichs. Dort sehen wir Nordamerika, Alaska, die Vereini
我说的不是测试图案。我说的不是测试图案。我们
Хорошо. Думаю, все представляют космическую программу как сплошную экзотическую электронику, и, конечно, многое из этого так и есть. Но я подумал, что стоит показать здесь пару приборов. После первого прибора вы получите очень точное измерение количества оставшейся воды в контейнере
비행 초반 부스터에 대한 브리핑을 이어가겠습니다. 어둠 속으로 들어간 후, 제가 생각하기에 약 1200피트(약 366미터) 거리에서 부스터와의 위치 유지를 시도했지만, 당시 부스터와의 거리를 가늠할 수 있는 유일한 방법은 깜빡이는 불빛 사이의 거리뿐이었습니다. 불빛이 간헐적으로, 아니 간헐적으로가 아니라 계속해서 하나, 두 개, 다시 하나로 바뀌고, 때로는 두 개의 불빛이 보이기까지 오랜 시간이 걸리기도 했습니다. 이는 부스터가 계속 회전하고 있음을 나타내는 것이었습니다. 부스터가 어느 방향으로 회전하는지는 확실히 알 수 없었습니다. 불빛 두 개가 모두 보일 때는 카나본(Carnarvon) 부근까지 부스터와 좋은 위치를 유지하고 있다고 생각했습니다. 그때쯤에는 꽤 빠르게 접근하고 있는 것 같았지만, 확실히는 알 수 없었습니다. 그때까지 제가 계산한 모든 ΔV는 부스터의 방향, 즉 역추진 방향이었습니다. 불행히도, 그 망할 부스터 때문에 접근하려면 포지그레이드(posigrade) 기동을 해야 했고, 그러면 일정 시간이 지난 후 다시 부스터에서 멀어지게 되는 문제가 발생했습니다. 게다가 45분에서 40분 동안의 어둠 속에서 저는 제가 어디에 있는
안녕하세요, 인디언 캡 콤, 인
알겠습니다. 아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 1번 채널을 통해 
Roger. Finalmente abbiamo trovato un accordo sul nostro problema, con 50 persone che lo stanno esaminando. Quando eravamo seduti sul 5018, abbiamo tentato di caricare il cancellabile prima che tu terminassi il. Quindi Mike, quello c
ठीक है। और फिर उससे आगे लगभग 10 फीट की दूरी पर एक और भी बड़ी, गोल चट्टान है। वह चट्टान - आपके सबसे करीब वाली चट्टान रेत से लगभग 1 फु
لا، لا بأس يا فانس. قبل أن نضطر للقلق بشأن ذلك، أعتقد أن لدينا انتخابات تمهيدية أخرى وثلاث انتخابات ثانوية يجب 
حسنًا، تم إيقاف تشغيل نظام الدفع دلتا-في، الوضع العادي، A؛ انتظر حتى يتم إيقاف
Roger. Just give us a call. We're pressing on with some o
D'accord. Dites-moi simplement quel matériau vous aviez en t
Roger, vor 15 Minuten. Jim, ich gebe dir die allgemeinen Wiedereintrittsverfahren durch. Du erhältst das 63-1-Update und die Details zu deinem nächsten Überflug über den USA von Gus. Das allgemeine Verfahren nach dem Bremszünden: Rolle in die normale Position, dann in eine Position mit dem Kopf nach unten,
我以为你是
好的，我明白了。加上 51.
Okay. Wir konzentrieren uns jetzt darauf, uns z
아쿠
了解しました。中間軌道修正2号焼却まであと1時間弱です。ここで作業を中止し、廃水
我得想办法……而且得想个好办法……才能离开这艘飞船。我们需要的是一艘大型飞船，带一个向内敞开的大舱门——就像潜艇
Neil, hier ist Houston. Wir bekommen ein Bild. Du bist momentan
好的。我们正在考虑或许可以把一部分视频以每秒 12 帧的速度播放。我觉得我们可以把所有 0.5 到 0.5g 的下载
They'r
Okay. Because I was looking in the wrong place last time. AU
सर जॉन, म
坎顿通信技术学院，这里是Sigma Seven。我完全明白你们的意
Genau. Die ausländischen Direktinvestitionen werden auf eine e
Ладно. Думаю, меня посадят в лифт номе
我们刚刚欣赏到了非常美丽的月落
Ok. Il controllo delle stelle all'ingresso è un controllo delle stelle tramite sestante o un c
双子座六号。我已准备好向您提供MDIU数据
حسناً. لدي
روجر. ΔV90. 16 52 25. 02 28 35. 
Thank
لا، لم أقم بذلك مؤخرًا. سأقوم بذلك الآن كجزء من هذا ا
Б
Okay... unisci i 
Роджер, 11. Это Хьюстон. Мы вас сл
每秒
Okay, „Die Abschaltung erfolgt nach Ablauf der Brenndauer minus einer Sekunde.“ Ich gebe Ihnen ein Beispiel
Très bi
D'accord. Mais je crois que ce que je vou
地球がどの方向にあるかを教えてくれる古い高ゲイン角度があ
Хорошо. В третьем ряду, в разделе «ТОПЛИВО» — двигательная установка: будет открыт резервный обогреватель зоны посадки и автоматический выключатель обогревателя посадочного радара. Я только что сменил антенну; и, продолжая по списку, будет открыт ATCA, а последние четыре автоматических выключателя, два в разделе
इसे पर्याप्त जगह दें - हाँ, मुझे ऐसा लगता ह
Roger. Ich bin momentan etwas im Verzug mit dem Flugplan. Ich konnte die MIT-F
好的。您更新的其余部分是说，压力在 660 到 770 psi 之间是可以接受的。如果超过
好的
阿
로저, 11입니다. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 당신의 목소리가 크고 또렷하게 들립니다. 참고로, 타나나리브 레이더는
ठीक है। हमने यही योजना बनाई थी। जैक अपने तीन काम 
حسنًا، ما أعرضه الآن يا جاك هو LEVVA، وقد سبق عرضه أيضًا. إنه غطاء رأس يُرتدى على سطح الأرض، وأنا - أحضر غطاء جيم هنا لأعرض بعض التعديلات. إحدى المشاكل السابقة هي عدم القدرة على تمييز الشخصيات الموجودة على سطح الأرض بشكل جيد. لذا، ليس فقط بدلة جيم بها بعض الخطوط الحمراء، بل كما ترى، غطاء LEVVA ال
Eagle，休斯顿。方便的话，我们想先试试您的氢氧化锂，
프렌드십 세븐. 로저. 모든 스위치 퓨즈는 여전히 같은 위치에 있습니다. 스퀴브는 작동 준비 완료. 자동 역추진은 꺼져 있습니다. 모드 선택기, 속도 명
Ich habe die Erde am Strebenboden herunterg
好的。把目镜递给
Ja. Sie können 
そう
如果看起来我需要，你就把纸卷取下
分かりました、ジム。2行目のSYSTEM Aの下のASCENT FEED 2とASCENT FEED 1は開いているはずです。MISSION TIMERも開いているはずです。GASTAも開いているはずです
Ci stiamo arrivando lentament
没错，吉姆。那一行的其他断路器都和你清单上看到
Roger. Wir sehen es, Jack. Und wir haben
Okay, Jack. Tutti gli interruttori rimangono nella loro posizione attuale, ovvero al centro, ma noi... Dato che non abbiamo corrente sul bus, la fila inferiore di talkback verrà caricata a molla nella posizione del palo del barbiere e questo è per tua informazione. Passo
好了，阿波罗
イーグル、ヒューストン。ヨー旋回後、角度：Sバン
15分だ。僕は15分だ。バックアップクロックでは3秒
क्या आप हमें मिथुन राशि 4 में जल की स्थित
रॉजर, इसे फिर 
Аполлон-8, 
Roger. That's why we have the top priority stuff 
ठीक है। पैनल 8: सीक्वेंस लॉजिक, दो, बंद। क्या अब ये चालू हैं, केन? मुझे याद नहीं आ रहा कि मैंने इन्हें चालू किया था - मुझे लगता है कि यह किसी 
Aquarius, Houston. Fred-o, on that - to pass that check, the Sun
यह AC 2 बस रीसेट था, है ना? ठीक है। अगले चरण को छोड
RKV，我们视野里要么是天狼星，要么是七号星！它就在瞄
ジェミニ8世を呼び出しているステーション、も
Okay. The two switches - two circuit breakers on panel 250 will go back to open; the two circuit br
罗
네, 잭. 질문 하나
哦，好的。对不
I got to vacuu
안녕하세요, 알파 센타우리와 베타 센타우리, 그리고 남십자성 
Роджер. Думаю, единственная проблема — это схема костюма. Поработаю 
로저. 해당 페이지로 이동하여 '승인'을 클릭해 주시면, 값을 업데이트
يا رجل، ل
Je ne sais pas dans quelle direction je suis orienté, et cela m'est as
水鉄砲の順番を待っている間に、光学系について少しコメントさせてください。太陽の近くのどこでも、走査望遠鏡を横切るよ
Sigma Seven, hier spric
Gémeaux 4, ici RKV Surgeon. Vous recevez un bilan progressif de votre tension artérielle. Pourriez-vous vérifier que vos paramètres sont bie
... S-6 영상을 00:15와 22:35에 각각 하나씩 
Okay, Jack. We'll have a pad for you in a few minutes. We're getting data now on the tracking, and although we suspect the
Ok, ora ti sto provando con una larghezza del fascio ampia
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Schalten Sie den Mengenleseschalter ein und lassen Sie ihn einge
你说什
Die Erde wird in 1 bis 2 Mi
وأنا كذلك. كل شيء يسير ع
حسنًا. في قاطع الدائرة رقم 16، وصلات تغذية البطاريات، اثنان، مفتوحان؛ والآن عليك الاستماع جيدًا للفولتية العالية والمنخفضة، البطارية 1، فولتية عالية، إلى إيقاف/إعادة ضبط؛
Okay. From Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Britain's big Jodrell Bank radio telescope stopped receiving signals from the Soviet Union's unmanned Moon shot at 5:49 EDT today. A spokesman said that it appeared the Luna 15 space ship "had gone beyond the Moon." Another Quote: "We don't think it has landed," said a spokesman for Sir Bernard Lovell, Director of the Observatory. Washington UPI: Vice President Spiro T. Agnew has called for putting a man on Mars by the year 2000, but Democratic leaders replied that priority must go to needs on Earth. Agnew, ranking government official at the Apollo 11 blastoff Wednesday, apparently was speaking for himself and not necessarily for the Nixon administration when he said, "We should, in my judgment, put a man on Mars by the end of this century." Laredo, Texas, AP: Immigration officials in Nuevo Laredo announced Wednesday that hippies will be refused tourist cards to enter Mexico unless they take a bath and get haircuts. Huberto Cazaras, Chief of Mexican Immigration in Nuevo Laredo, said authorities in Mexico City, Acapulco, and other popular tourist spots have registered complaints about the hippies. By United Press International: Initial reaction to President Nixon's granting of a holiday Monday to Federal employees so they can observe a national day of participation in the Apollo 11 Moon landing mission mostly was one of surprise. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, London AP: Europe is Moon struck by the Apollo 11 mission. Newspapers throughout the continent fill their pages with pictures of the Saturn V rocket blasting off to forge Earth's first link with its natural satellite. And the headline writers taxed their imagination for words to hail the feat. "The greatest adventure in the history of humanity has started," declared the French newspaper Le Figaro, which devoted four pages to reports from Cap
Das ist richt
... 
جيم، يبدو أ
わか
好的。来自英国乔德雷尔班克天文台，美联社报道：英国乔德雷尔班克大型射电望远镜于美国东部时间今天下午5点49分停止接收来自苏联无人登月探测器“月球15号”的信号。一位发言人表示，“月球15号”飞船似乎“已经飞越月球”。另一则消息称：“我们认为它没有着陆，”天文台台长伯纳德·洛弗尔爵士的发言人说道。华盛顿合众国际社报道：副总统斯皮罗·T·阿格纽呼吁在2000年前将人类送上火星，但民主党领导人回应称，必须优先考虑地球上的需求。阿格纽是周三阿波罗11号发射时在场的最高级别政府官员，他当时说“依我之见，我们应该在本世纪末之前将人类送上火星”，显然他当时是在代表自己，而不是代表尼克松政府。德克萨斯州拉雷多，美联社报道：新拉雷多的移民官员周三宣布，除非嬉皮士洗澡理发，否则将被拒绝发放旅游签证入境墨西哥。新拉雷多墨西哥移民局局长胡贝托·卡萨拉斯表示，墨西哥城、阿卡普尔科和其他热门旅游景点的当局都收到了关于嬉皮士的投诉。合众国际社报道：尼克松总统宣布周一联邦雇员放假，以便他们能够庆祝参与阿波罗11号登月任务的全国性纪念日，这一决定最初引发了人们的
다시 한
分かりました。ありがとうございます。システムが良
D'accord.
Okay. We've got that one. What kind of a ATT HOLD MODE do you want us to do
जी हाँ। मैं इससे सहमत हूँ, लेकिन हम आपकी बात सुन रहे हैं। ठीक है।
ठीक है, एकदम बढ़िया, और हमारा अनुमान है कि अगला यॉ पैंत
了解。もう一度燃料を言
Gemini V
Apollo 11, ici Houston. C'est part
分かりました。コンピュータをすべてのモードでチェックします。このチェックには 3 つの手順があります。まず、すべての IVI ウィンドウで 10 フィート/秒を入力します。次に、誤動作リセットを押します。次に、Start Comp を押して、Computer Running Light の表示を確認します。これをすべてのモードで実行します。繰り返しますが、コンピュータが動作しているという表示が得られない場合は、別のテストを実行します。この別のテストでは、すべてのモードでチェックします。コンピュータの電源を 2 秒間オフにします。コンピュータの電源を 2 秒間オフにします。コンピュータの電源が再投入されたら、手動の Malfunction Reset と Start Comp を再度押します。どのモードでも Computer Running Light が点灯した場合は、この 2 秒間の電源オフを中止します。わ
Хорошо
حسن
...контроллер то включается, то выключается. ЗАПУСК КОМПЬ
Роджер, Фрэнк. Мы провели дополнительную проверку и подтверждаем, что это верное кеплеровск
Négatif, Z Cal non e
好的，我马上就
753 alle 09 - 11:09 - Sole proprio all'orizzonte. Non abbiamo avuto molto successo con l'indicatore di evento fotografico sulla Hasselblad. Ce l'abbiamo. Mette gli otturatori in... come si chiama quella cosa?
ठीक है। आरएन, आरपी, प्लस 77, 400 फुट नाममात्र पर पिच कोण; सुधार, 400,000 फुट नाममात्र; आरईटी 400,000 फुट, 22 प्लस 02; ब्लैकआउट की शुरुआत, 24 प्लस 43
मैं तो बस ऐसे ही मज़ाक कर रहा हूँ; आप
Gemini 4, CSQ. Ich bin in der Goddard-Schleife hängengeblieben. Si
了解。専門家が全員ここに集まって本
On en v
제미니 4호, 휴스턴. 63-1 기록을 재현할 준비가
Columbia, Houston. Wir werden
Jim, ce que je t'ai dit à propos de ta mémoire est inexact. Nous ne sommes pas en mes
알겠습니다. 다
알겠습니다. 2-C는
静けさを、ヒューストン。今も聞こえますか？オーバ
Ci
Aurora Seven, il p
제가 방금 알려드린
Хорошо. Следующие три параметра такие же, а затем нам нужно, чтобы параметр «Сброс топлива» был установлен в положение «КОМАНДА»; параметр «Выключение двигателя 2» — в положение
Houston, Apollo 11. Se ti piace, lo accetter
ह्यूस्टन, सूर्योदय के बारे में मेरी टिप्पणियाँ ऊपर दिए गए भूभाग के संदर्भ में थीं। वहाँ तिरछी रोशनी या धुंध के क
روجر
从地质学的角度来看，你认为它是什么？是玄武岩粉尘吗
ठ
Хорошо. Что каса
네. 방금 전까지만 해도 안정적으로 추적되고 있었는데, 약 1분 정도 걸렸네요. 바늘이 위아래로 흔들리고, 피치와 요우 바늘도 이리저리 움직였지만, 이제 안정
Bene. In quella pagina, alla riga 04, colonna B, cambia il n
Sembra che tu ci stia
Rog
分かりました。わかりました。これは機動作戦だと思い
Und Sie können loslegen. Huntsville meldet eine 6-Se
그게 바로 
Plus 00187 32870 307 32676 32 - correction, 420880 253033
Apollo 11, Houston. Based on our sighting since the midcourse, we're showing a gamma of minus 6.57. This is preliminary, though, and we think that after some more tracking it should come on in, and we could tweak it right on into the corridor. It's just about in the center of the corridor; everything's looking fine. We'll have you an entry PAD in a couple of hours before you go to sleep. And from our friends in public affairs, a few headlines, other than your flight. You're still dominating the news. However, there are some other things of interest for you. As I mentioned earlier, the All Star game was rained out. It's going to be played tomorrow. However, President Nixon will not be able to see it as he planned. We'll keep you posted on results. And, also, the weathermen are going to be good to you. Our forecast is, looks like it's holding good for the recovery area; it should be real fine out there. President Nixon, as he prepares to fly out t
Род
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 저
मुझे ल
ضوء خافت جدا
And, Joe, just a reminder; now that you mention it - that it's less than 24 hours to go, what I'd like to do, and I have aboard all the procedures that you are working up; so I
マーク。1分が経過しま
Роджер. Наша каюта держится неплохо. Похоже, мы ничего не можем с этим поделать. Давление в баке повышается, и это, пожалуй, всё. Мы фактически сбрасываем за борт кислород, кото
双子座六号，休斯顿。返航准备工作进行得怎么样了？所有
Okay
358.1.64, 020.73, 3
Roger
好的。我重新读了一遍：监测二次蓄压器液位；二次乙二醇散热器阀，正常模式保持30秒，然后切换至旁通模式。如果二次蓄压器液位没有下降，则将二次乙二醇散热器阀切换至正常模式。二次冷却液循环泵，AC 1 或 2。3分钟后，确认二次乙二醇排放压力在39至51 
Roger. Il est allumé, et je n'y ai
そ
Ricevuto. Capisco 14 secondi, accensione a tempo, assetto nominale, due decimi di X, un decimo di Y e niente - meno un decimo di Y e niente Z; e hai messo 6,2, e ha continuato a contare dopo l'accensione. È af
Capisco che stai ancora cercando di far addor
Затем мы хотели бы, чтобы вы приложили камеру к окну так, чтобы нос аппарата не попадал в поле зрения. Затем нам нужны два набора фотографий. Мы хотим, чтобы вы находились в импульсном режиме, и чтобы космический аппарат был направлен прямо вниз на Землю. Это будет... я дам вам время, чтобы начать. Но это будет черная Земля на ночной стороне. Затем сделайте один импульс вверх, подняв тангаж, и получите снимок с открытыми затворами камеры в режиме «булт». Затем, когда вы будете поднимат
本質的に
信号強度の表示から判断すると、高利得アンテナではサイドローブに閉じ込められている可能性があります。15秒ほど広帯域に切り替えてから、再び狭帯域に戻して
Tranquility, this is Houston. Yes, in
了解。5×2くらいでコピーしています
ठीक है। 
حسنًا يا جيم،
알겠습니다. GET of the burn 2 18 00; Delta-V, 60.8;
Right. I was having to actually manipulate the gain dogs on the hatch each time that I stroked it, so that I wasn't able to pull as hard as I usually had been able to. So we had to coordinat
سأتبع اقتراح فلايت، وأخفض إعداداتي إلى الوحدة 3 لبضع دقائق، ثم سأحاول مرة أخرى 
Bene. L'immagine che Jim mi ha dato della sua visione attraverso la Terra era all'interno della - parte d
Ja. Ich möchte sichergehen, dass ich e
Oui, l
Okay. I was just think
Okay. Verstanden, Jim. Ich möchte noch ein paar Dinge überprüfen, bei denen ich mir nicht sicher bin, ob ich sie richtig verstanden habe. Das erste war Zebra Libra, das ist Sigma Libra. Die Sterne
روجر، برج الجوزاء 4. استيقظتُ للتو من قيلولة طويلة... استغرقت أربع ساعات ونصف. منها، نمتُ ثلاث ساعات ونصف
جي
Ricevuto, Jim. Pensiamo che sarà necessario prima della prossima serie di avv
わかりました。中間軌道修正については、約25フィート/秒の噴射時間まで延期したいと思います。噴射時間を遅らせるのは、分離時に7フィート/秒半の噴射を行ったことで、より正確な追跡を可能にするためです。もう少し時間をかけて追跡データを確認したいと思います。修正時のばらつき
ठीक है, वैंस। हम सोलो बुक और फ्लाइट प्लान में किए गए बदलावों की कॉपी बनाने के लिए लगभग तैयार हैं, और जब आपके पैड
Ok. L
Both hoses in the - up into 
Dove sono quelle b
Хор
Roger. Comptage du biais de 
हां। यह अभी भी इसमें फंसा हुआ है। एक मिनट रुकिए। ठीक है।
Roger. Sembra che Neil stia arrivando a cinque per cento, 11. Mike, ci vediamo sullo sfondo. La definizione è davvero eccezionale. I colori sono buoni. Stiamo ottenendo un'immagine davvero bella del Comanda
11، هيوستن. لقد تم تحميل البضائع.
لنتابع. إذا توقف المحرك أثناء الاحتراق، وظهر لك مؤشر NOUN 97 يومض، فعليك المتابعة، ثم ضبط مستوى الوقود، وبدء تشغيل المحرك، وتفعيل تجاوز محرك الهبوط. حسنًا. الآن، بعض المعلومات العامة. إذا لم تستخدم دورة الاحتراق PC+2، فمن المحتمل أن يكون P-P+4 هو أقرب وقت ممكن. سيعمل نظا
Sie könn
好的。嗯，我们中西部这边下了场大暴雪；不知道你们那边能不能看到。休斯顿那边，实际上已经很冷了，大概只有35华氏度（
Насколько я помню, в тот
네, 마지막으로 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 결정이 내려지기 전에 계속 설명드리겠습니다. 허용 가능한 데드밴드는 660~770psi입니다. 다시 말해, 이 두 값 사이의 압력을 발생시키는 상승 시간은 약 103시간 후에 임계 압력 이하로 유지됩니다. 따라서 압력이 이 범위 내에 있으면 문제가 없습니다. 만약 압력이 770~800psi 사이로 측정되면 약 59시간 후에 다시 압력을 측정해 주셔야 합니다. 자세한 절차는 잠시 후에 알려드리겠습니다. 압력이 800psi 이상이면 좀 더 자세한 절차를 진행해야 합니다. 우선 PCM 데이터를 확보하는 등의 조치를 취해야 합니다. 정확한 상승 시간을 확인하고 계기판이 딸깍 소리를 내며 올라가는 시점을 알아내려면 잠시 동안 계기판을 응시하셔야 할 수도 있습니다. 극단적인 경우에는 연소 과정을 고려해야 할 수도 있지만, 실제로 그런 일이 발생할 가능성은 낮다고 생각합니다. 자, 이제 필기할 준비가 되셨다면, -1페이지와 -2페이지 사이에 활성화 체크리스트에 추가 또는 변경 사항이 있습니다. 총 
نعم، نحن نشاهده أيضاً يا فرانك. حتى الآن، لا ي
Вперёд, Гавайи, Близн
Nous aurons plus d'informations sur la télévision lors de la prochaine mise à jour. Nous ne prévoyons pas de changement majeur au niveau de la dur
Я почти уверен, что это так, по
25분 후에 주 스캐너로 이
Okay. Wiederholen wir es. Bitte warten. Aus. Wir haben hier wirklich eine seltsame Einstellu
Guten Morgen, 13. Du bis
ई-मेमोरी डंप के लिए 1 पर प्रतीक्षा करें, जैक। मुझे लगता है कि हम 
네,
알겠습니다. 약 1분 30초 후에 지상 안테나를 전환할 예정입니다. 그때 통신에 일시적인 문제
Ну, всё, что мы от вас хотим, это чтобы вы снова навели прицел в ав
Potresti chiamarmi ogni tanto, Jerry, solo per farmi sapere che sei ancora lì, dato che stiamo cambiando ant
This is Friendship Seven. I am in manual. While on the dark side, I aligned myself with the horizon, when up to 0 0 0, and caged the gyros a
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस। क्या आपके पास हमारे लिए अद्यतन वजन
你知道不要让它们停留太
- - in cima alla pagina, c'è il passaggio 38, e subito sotto, prima del passaggio 39, vogliamo attivare il circuito primario del glicole. Quello che stiamo facendo è impostare l'interruttore dell'acqua dell'evaporatore del glicole su AUTO e la pressione del vapore 
Ok
Спасибо. 179 009 001, неприменимо, плюс 00187 32870 307 32676 42 0880 253 033, вниз 121, влево 27, 
रॉजर। एरिया 1 इको एक घंटा, 15 मिनट, 42 सेकंड का है। मैं फिर से कहता हूँ, एक घंटा, 1
Just saying hello. On the sight gage, you got about - oh, it look
Ciao, Carna
Роджер, Базз. Нынешнее положение дел — удобное
嗯，当你四处走动或者只是从L
好的。“圣诞前夜，在遥远的太空，阿波罗8号的宇航员们刚刚赢得了登月竞赛；耳机被小心翼翼地挂在控制台旁，盼望着克里斯·克拉夫特很快就能赶到；弗兰克·博尔曼舒舒服服地躺在床上，脑海中浮现着登月的景象；吉姆·洛弗尔躺在沙发上，安德斯则在驾驶舱里，对着电脑屏幕绞尽脑汁；突然，太空舱里传来一阵嘈杂声，弗兰克猛地从床上跳起来，想看看发生了什么事。他像闪电一样飞奔到六分仪旁，确保飞船不会坠毁。月球崎岖地壳上的光芒，给灰色的月尘染上了一层绿色的光泽，这时，他惊奇地发现，一块缅甸剃须膏的招牌上写着：‘基尔罗伊到此一游’。”但弗兰克可不是傻瓜；他很快就明白，他们抢先一步；这一定是骗人的伎俩。他的咒骂声比火箭还快，他转向船员，骂道：“洛弗尔，安德斯，别以为我会上当，相信你们写在墙上的那些老掉牙的笑话。”他们一句话也没说，只是像精灵一样咧嘴笑着，不由自主地被自己的笑话逗笑了。弗兰克跳到沙发上，猛地推了一把飞船，他们便飞驰而去，掠过灰色的月尘。“祝地球圣诞快乐；我们很快就会回去。”干得好，伙计们
Roger. Gemini 4 ici. Ici le pilote commandant. Je viens de faire une sieste d'environ cinq h
ケン、こちらはフランク。一つ確認したいことがある。これは燃焼に使う負荷物だよね？これはただの10回打ち
Хорошо, Джек. Я подключил два автоматических выключателя Commander, переменного и постоянного тока, и два выключателя GASTA переменного и постоянного тока, а затем тебе нужно включить все нагреватели, создав давление, а затем открыть главные клапаны SOV. И я думаю, они 
Мой рейтинг
他に必要な情報は、フライトプランの3-13ページに記載されているものだけです。BAT C、パイロBA
是的。我现在打开面罩是
समर्थन कर
सीबी जी एंड एन, पा
D'accord, Jack. Et c'
罗杰……在飓风或台风区域上空……就在卡拉飓风的正上方……具体是哪些台风呢？不过，我相信我用哈苏相机拍到了一些
了解。こちらフレンドシップ7号。機体は方向転換モードから外れたり入ったりを繰り返し、現在燃料を無駄にしている。手動で軌道姿勢を維持するようにする。オーバー。あるいはフライ・バイ・ワイヤで。オ
Roger. Ho una differenza piuttosto consistente tra i volt della batteria sul 5 e sul 6; il 6 segna 33,5 e il 5 segna 36,5. È quello che ti asp
제미니 4호, 휴스턴 C
Come si presenta l'atteggiamento d
Oui. Je pense que le problème vient du fait que je mesure environ 60 cm et que la ha
Apollo 11, this is Houston.
Friendship Seven, potresti fornirci una lettura su tutti e tre gli assi? 
Roger. La série de fissures ou de failles qui la traversent plonge vers le sud en trois paliers environ. Le réseau de failles parallèles au nord présente une dépression centrale. J'espère que vous tous, sur Terre, comprenez ce que nous voulons dire lorsque nous affirmons que l'horizon est plutôt inquiétant, un endroit sombre et peu engageant. Nous survolons actuellement l'un de nos futurs sites d'alunissage, choisi dans cette région lisse appelée la Mer de la Tranquillité. Cette surface lisse facilitera les premières tentatives d'alunissage et nous évitera d'avoir à contourner des montagnes. Vous pouvez maintenant apercevoir les longues ombres du lever de soleil lunaire. Nous approch
네, 브루스 씨. 지금 수분 축적기 수치가 0
Mentre mi guardo intorno, il contrasto, in generale, è *** generato completamente dall'ombra *** del Sole... un grigio molto chiaro, un grigio chiaro, un alone attorno alla mia ombra, attorno all'ombra del mio casco. Poi, mentre guardo verso ***, il co
11, Houston. Nous souhaiterions avancer l'heure de la purge d'eau à environ 171 minutes, plus 30 secondes, juste après la prochaine acquisition de données lors de la prochaine mission OMNI. Comme je l'ai mentionné, la quantité sera alors réduite à 45 %. Nous attendons également la température de l'éjecteur. T
Af
ठीक है। चरण 8 कहता है, "होल्ड में सेट करें।" चरण 9 कहता है, "के शब्दों में, हीलियम मॉनिटर बंद, इ
收到。G&N：62710，加098
Джим, ранее вечером Фред-о сообщил о выбросе газов из окна № 1 в командном модуле. Он также сообщил о куске незакрепленного металла размером примерно 4 на 4 дюйма, серебристого цвета, плавающем рядом. Мы пытались выяснить, является ли это новым выбросом газов или частью остаточного выброса, возникшего в результате нашей первоначальной проблемы. У вас есть еще какие-нибудь слова или комментарии? Он т
Хорошо. Л
Bene, vediamo. Non so che direzione sto indicando adesso. Sembra piuttos
Non 
Roge
सिग्मा सेवन। आ
रॉजर, वूमेर
Roger. Ich höre gerade, wie Kano nach einer Blutdruckmessung ruft. Ich werde sie ihm jetzt geben. Mal sehen, ich habe Treibstoff 45-43, hätte aber trotzdem gerne noch eine 
没错。我的控制模式是手动；陀螺
Non pensavo che
哥伦比亚，这里是休斯顿。那边那边有什么消息吗？
알겠습니다. 음성 통화의 낮은 비트 전송률에 대한 확인을 원하시
रॉजर। मुझे आरसीएस हीटर की आवश्यकताएँ बार-बार चालू-बंद होती दिख रही हैं। पहली बार तापमान 47 था, मैंने हीटर चालू किया तो लाइ
阿波罗8号
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。話が逸れてしまいましたね。高利得アンテナのピッチ角とヨー角は、ビルからの要請に応えて、自動再捕捉（AUTO REACQ）位置としてどのような位置を設定できるかを尋ねたものです。同時にオムニアンテナを使用
前进
آه،
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Интересно, вы сравнивали точность вектора состояния ваше
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴입니다. 알겠습니다. 저희 쪽도 지금 소음이 심해서요. 잠시만 기다려 주시면 생각해
Roger. Wir beantragen eine Abwasserentsorgung von 25:30 au
Roger, tu pourrais peut-être me dire qu'on a vu les lumières de Sydney. Je ne sais pas s'ils les ont allumées, mais si c'est le cas, la facture d'électricité a dû exploser! Je les ai vues lors du dernier survol. On est passés juste au-dessus de la ville de Sydney et ell
Roger. Stiamo parlando di diverse cose, sai, come mettere la valvola a dieci pin su MANUALE o chiuderla parzialmente o altre idee del genere, e di qualcosa a cui puoi pensare mentre sei lì sdraiato senza nient'altro da fa
डेव ने बताया कि न्यूक्लियर इमल्शन 23 मिन
حسنًا، أعتزم أن أغتسل قليلًا، لكن لن أضع ذلك الغسول اللعين الليلة. ألم تسأليهم أبدًا عن... عن...؟ بالتأكيد 
Хорошо. На первом же шаге выше, в разделе "УПРАВЛЕНИЕ НАПРАВЛЕНИЕМ
Okay. Führen Sie e
罗杰。休斯顿那
Gemini 4, Houston CAP
Prevedo le 
Bene. Dopo 47 ore, totale 1096, quattro Alfa 270, Bravo 278, Charlie 270, Delta 278 e l'H2... Mi hanno dato l'H2 in percentuale, 76%; e sull'O2 abbiamo l'81%. Tuttavia, ora mostriamo la lettura del serbatoio O
了解。まだそこ
Nun, genau das wollen sie doch, oder?
ठीक है। हाँ, यह सकारात्मक है। हमें इन्हें बंद करना होगा ताकि
Хорошо. Вот и все. И, конечно же, Хьюстон попросит вас перейти к шагу 9,
Questa è Friendship Seven. Il retrogetto automatico è disattivato. Il selettore di modalità è normale, il comando di rateo di volo è normale, il giroscopio è normale. Tutte le manopole a "T" sono inserite tranne quella manuale, che è disinserita. Al momento sto controllando manualmente. L'interruttore del Landing Bag è disattivato. Il pannello di sequenza è tutto normale tranne quello. Il carburante di controllo è al 60-82 [percento]. Gli assetti al momento con controllo manuale sono rollio 5 [gradi] a destra, imbardata 15 [gradi] a destra, beccheggio --34 [gradi] in assetto orbitale. Il mio tempo dal lancio è 2 più 33 più 60, MARK! Correzione: sarebbe 2 più 34 su quel segno. 
さて、漏れてい
休斯顿，宁静基地
Roger, das ist bestäti
Jim, questo è certo. Stiamo monitorando e ci sei quasi, m
Хорошо. Чуть ниже 13. И просто для вашей информации, у нас есть люди, работающие над несколькими вопросами. Мы работаем над промежуточным этапом, чтобы определить нашу систему управления и как это делать с выбранной системой управления, что на
了解です。シュノーケルが開いて
Роджер, понятно, с 18 до 22 часов. Во время полета Rev 12 над RKV я получу обновленную информацию о PLA и CLA. Во время полета Rev 13 над Canary будет указан маршрут в C-диапазоне. В 12:16 по Гринвичу я смогу выполнить орбитальную навигацию, если это не потребует топлива. Во время полета Re
11, Хьюстон. По данным нашей телеметрии в реальном времени, давление в камере составляло от 95 до 97 psi. Мы — мы посмотрим 
J'ai essayé de 
И прямо здесь находятся два кратера. Тот, что прямо передо мной сейчас, если смотреть в ст
मुझे लगता है कि हमें 
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir schlagen vor, die Fernsehübertragung zum geplanten Zeitpunkt um [Uhrzeit einfügen] zu starten und die Stoppzeit um einige Minuten zu verlängern. Derzeit ist
わかりました、ありがとうございます。OMNIが機能していない限り、私たちにとってはずっと簡単です。エイトボールでロールしてOMNIの数字を指し示すことで
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. سنشحن البطارية "ب" حتى فترة السكون. سنتوقف عن الشحن حينها. أيضاً، في حوال
वह बात... अब, हो सकता है कि वह अभी न हो; हो स
24 pieds par
Roger. Indirizzo 72, 25729; Indiriz
«Апол
نعم. لقد أجريت اختبار P21 للتو وحصلنا على 559
Très bien. Ceci est une remarque générale qui s'applique à chaque fois que vous travaillez avec des instructions `and` ou que vous passez d'une instruction `and` à une autre. Il est important de ne pas appeler de verbe étendu pendant ce temps. Cette information figure dans les notes du programme et sert simplement 
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous allons changer d'antenne dans environ 2 minutes. Vous pouvez vous attendre à une perturbation de vos communicatio
Das werden wir nicht tun; wir bleiben 
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete 
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है। यदि आप संदेश भेज रहे हैं, तो हम प्राप्त नहीं कर पा रहे हैं, ले
Ja. Wir sind jetzt weit genug drau
La pression de cette
Да ничего особенного. Просто из любопыт
It vents 
Continuando il mio debriefing sul booster, all'inizio del volo. Dopo essere entrati nell'oscurità, a quella che considero una distanza di 360 metri, ho provato a mantenerlo in posizione, ma l'unico modo per valutare la distanza dal booster in quel momento era la distanza tra le luci lampeggianti. Ogni tanto si accendevano - non occasionalmente, ma continuamente - vedevo una luce, poi due luci, poi una luce, e a volte passava molto tempo prima di vederne due, a indicare che il booster ruotava continuamente. Non avevo davvero la minima idea di quale direzione stesse andando. In base alla distanza tra le luci, quando riuscivo a vederle entrambe, sentivo di essere in una posizione davvero buona finché non arrivammo a Carnarvon. In quel momento mi sembrava di avvicinarmi piuttosto rapidamente, anche se non potevo esserne del tutto sicuro. Tutto il ΔV che avevo sommato fino a quel momento era stato nella direzione del booster, ovvero retrogrado. Sfortunatamente, il maledetto booster si posizionava in modo ta
Ben
好的，8. 我们想在这里进行一次现场演练，确保我们能够及时地将录音带导出并把语音部分传回休斯顿。所以我们计划导出您的录音带，并在此演练一下将录音带传回休斯顿并进行试听的流程。我们相信录音带上已经有内容了，除非您在上次导出后又重新录制了一遍。为了确保万无一失，我们想请您简单说几句话，或者在录音带上简
了解です。-34度
Roger, Jim. I've got a short procedure I would like to read up to you on your, and I'd like to explain what it is. Your W-matrix shared some memory locations with; therefore, the W-matrix that you have right now is not a good one, and we would not want you to continue your sightings with that matrix. So the procedure I'm going to give you is going to cause the matrix to reinitialize itself prior to your next, when you go into. And this will put you back
좋습니다. 페리신시온 + 2를 MPL에 넣고, 079, 27, 4013, + 08144, - 00443, - 00226, N/A, + 00205, 08455, 4 + 20, 268, 261, + 08155, - 00443, - 021, 2187, N/A. GDA는 이대로 괜찮을 것 같고, 피치는 5.85, 요는 6.74가 될 겁니다. 10초 동안 두 개의 제트 엔진으로 연료를 채우고, 스로틀은 5초 동안 10%, 21초 동안 40%, 나머지 연소 시간 동안 100%로 유지합니다. 이렇게 하면 
روجر. أثارت بعض تعليقات جيم السابقة حول سطوع أطراف النجوم عند شروق الشمس اهتمامًا كبيرًا هنا. ونود أن نسأله، إن سنحت له الفرصة لملاحظة ذلك مجددًا أو ربما يتذكره، ما إذا كانت هنا
The vehicle is surprisingly free of any debris floating a
夏威夷，我们现在都很干净，并且都做好了重
Grazie mille. Il curriculum che hai inviato è davvero ottimo. Al momento stiamo cercando di smaltire l'acqua, le UCDA e così via. Quindi ti aiuteremo a ragg
彼は暗闇の中で
Erinnerungen an Gemini Retrofire, sind Sie sicher, dass wir - (Gelächter) - Nein, mal sehen - die Triebwerke zeigen in diese Richtung und die Gase entweich
Cer
Okay. Understand you're going 
Houston, Eagle. Are you satisfied with the self te
番泻叶加 2 - 好的，番泻叶加 2，at；加 1633.0，减 0014.5，减 0751.5；HA N 斜杠 A，HP 加 0020.5；1797.7，8:35，268，264，加 16410，减 00145，减 07338 - 
E tieni premuto il pulsante di lett
ठीक है, जैक। हम यहाँ एक नियमित जागने और सोने का समय तय करेंगे। फ्रेड काफी देर से जागा हुआ था, इसलिए मैं उसे आराम देने के लिए थोड़ा जल्दी उठ गया। जैक और फ्रेड अब सो रहे हैं, इसलिए मैं उन्हें जितनी देर तक सो सकते हैं, सोने दूंगा, फिर हम खाने का समय लेंगे और फिर मैं थोड़
Okay, and we're recording the time that that was complete. You have two lists there, one is to equipment transfer and the second list is the reverse. Request you scratch the last item on the first list, which
धन
Roger, Gemini VIII. And on this medical update, if you do lea
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie können die 37er-Marke heben, wir werden das Ganze vom Boden aus beobachten und sehen, wie es läuft. Ein paar Punkte, die allgemein für die Flugb
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम अभी बेसलाइन डेटा एकत्र कर रहे हैं, और हम अगले कुछ मिनटों तक इसी म
Отлич
Bene. Ti daremo il trucco per ottenere l'orario GET
फ्रेड जो खोल रहा है, वह एक पानी की थैली है जिसे हम अपने गल
يساعدني جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بالنجوم كثيراً في تأكيد النجوم، لكن من
我已经系好了
Ich habe wahnsinnig viel Wasser getrunken und bin immer noch durstig. Ich glaube sogar, dass da
روجر. قادم إليك. 30، SPS/G&N: 36691؛ ناقص 061، زائد 067 135 23 4149؛، زائد 32020، زائد 06713، ناقص 02773 181 054 013؛، HA غير متوفر، زائد 00230 32833 228، دلتا VC 32625 24 1510 355. الخطوط الثلاثة التالية غير متوفرة. زائد 1103، ناقص - ناقص 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. نجومك هي ذنب الدجاجة والنسر الواقع، 242 172 012. نفضل وجود نفاثتين بفجوة 16 ثانية. سيكون الأفق عند علامة 11 درجة عند TIG ناقص دقيقتين. وتعليقات أخرى: نجم السدس الخاص بك مرئ
さて、動詞89を呼び出して、それがどのようになるか見てみましょう -
……在76英里处，我们观测到了疑似阿金纳星的天体，同时，我们还观测到了另
С
هذا صحيح. حسنًا، الآن ستزودك المحطة الأرضية بتحديث عند -2 + 15. هذا هو الوقت الذي يجب عليك ضبطه لاستقبال بيانات القياس عن بُعد. وما ستحصل عليه في التحديث هو زيادة في
Хорошо. На странице 6.1 контрольного списка для выхода из самолета, внизу, после кнопки «ГЛАВНОЕ РАЗВЕРТЫВАНИЕ», есть три дополнительных шага, которые мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили. Цель этого 
잠시 기다려 주세요. 저희가 당신의 상황을 제대로 파악
오전
حسنًا. إليك التفاصيل. وضعية الطائرة جيدة جدًا باستثناء الدوران، ونود منك القيام ب
On est en plein dans la recherche de nourriture, Ken. On peut peut-être purger 
Tous ceux qui écoutent l'enregistrement, veuillez le signaler - nous avons besoin d'une mo
Yes.
알
はい、GMT。16時5
Domanda, Joe. Jim mi ha parlato di come faremo questo percorso intermedio, e un po' di tempo fa, quando abbiamo fatto questa accensione, avevamo staccato l'in
रॉजर। धन्यवाद। क
おはよう、クリス。楽
明白了。为什么您不就这些地标性建筑
D'acc
روجر. أنت الآن عند 107 + 23 + 03. عند 108 + 09 + 06. المرور 
أبولو ١١، هيوس
中止ステージのカバーを上げているようですが、こ
Houston, Apollo 11. Benötigen Sie Unterstützung dabei, die
No, non ho fretta. Forza, vai avanti e metti via tutto; detesto dover tirare fuori un paio di tute. Se vuoi farla prendere un po' d'aria, vai avanti e puliscila con la pompa, e... non ho fretta. Toglierò questa 
Yes, we can have it on schedule. We don't have much to do, but we'l
Roger. Ici le pilote. Je voudrais profiter de cette occasion pour demander à chaque au
알겠습니다. 마지막 세 줄에는 각각 FLOOD 및 TRACK 회로 차단기(2번째 줄)가 열려 있고, LOGIC POWER B, DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE, SUIT F
Comme
Weißt du, ich habe da unten nachgesehen. Ich dachte, ich sähe meinen D-Ring herausragen. Aber jetzt fühle ich ihn, er steckt
And, Aquarius; Houston. I 
Okay. Your back is up against the purse. All ri
هذا هو أول تقرير عن حالة الطقس الفضائي من خلال التنبؤات الج
Okay, Vance. Vorgehensweise: FÜHRUNGSSTEUERUNG,; MODUSSTEUERUNG, ATT HOLD;, EINGABE; Manöver in die richtige Lage; Rollen 0, Nicken 90, Gieren 0; mein Ball ist jetzt natürlich außer Betrieb, also muss ich das noch einstellen. Die 5 ist MODUSSTEUERUNG, AUTO; 6:,, Raten überwachen; Raten unter 1 Grad pro Sekunde in jeder Achse, deaktivieren, und ich habe den letzten Teil nicht gehört. Die nächste war,, EINGABE; 1257, EINGABE; 252, EINGABE; 1, EINGABE;, EINGABE;, EINGABE; 22110, FORTFAHREN;, EINGABE;,, EINGABE; Raten überwachen. Raten unter 0,01 Grad pro Sekun
Th
روجر. لا نتلقى بيانات القياس عن ب
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Mein Status ist ausgezeichnet. Ich habe die Kontrolle über die Kapsel, Fly-by-Wire-Steuerung läuft. Treibstoff: 80–100 %; Sauerstoff: 69–100 %; 
Okay, e... Ehi, noi... regis
알겠습니다. 3번 패널에서 처음 세 단계는 완료했습니다. MODE, VOICE는 VOICE로, POWER는 OFF
我们不仅考虑废水
Prévoyez-vous de manger com
We're just at 3+34 right now. Just going into darkness. The sunlig
방금 16-A 표적을 촬영했습니다. 바스라 비행장은 페르시아만 바로 옆에 있습니다. 페르시아만을 약 30도 각도로 포착한 후, 기체를 아래로 기울여 페르시아만 북서쪽에 있는 호수를 포착했습니다. 바스라는 호수 바로 옆에 있어서, 호수를 따라가면 바로 비행장을 포착할 수 있습니다. 그래서 표적에 도달하기 훨씬 전에 비행장을 먼저 포착했고, 그 후 표적을 추적하기 시작했습니다. 수직에서 20도 정도 기울어진 상태에서 이미 표적에 도달했던 것 같습니다. 활주로에서 약 40도 정도 기울어진 지점까지 추적한 후 추적을 멈췄습니다. 16mm 카메라에 
أعتقد أن التركيز كان أفضل قليلاً على الصورة الثانية. أعتقد أنها جميلة. رائعة حقاً
Роджер. Я понимаю. Очевидно, вы нас не читали, когда мы проводили тест, потому что не д
Parfait. J'espère qu'ils seront aussi bons pour le couloir que pou
わかりました
D'accord, Jack. Voyons si j'ai bien compris. On pointe le drone vers la Terre comme pour la phase intermédiaire, puis on effectue un alignement sur l'axe du corps. Ensuite, vous nous donnez une attitude de vol vers… la Lune, et ensuite on… pointe le drone… vers la Lune. Puis vous mettez à jour les données – donnez-nous des CDU pour un alignement grossier… un alignement fin… sur les étoiles, la Lune ou la Terre. Attendez. D'accord. On a eu une autre alarme générale, Jack. Je ne vois aucun voyant là-bas, sauf celui de la batterie. Vous voulez… l'affichage. D'accord. Et le voyant de la batterie n° 2 est toujours allumé. Je soupçonne que ce soit
Roger. Than
شكراً
Solo una quest
그리고 물론, 진입 준비를 하실 때는 주의 및 경고 단계로 돌아가시고, 활성화 버튼을 눌러 주십시오. 휴스턴에 있는 저희 모두를 대표하여
35-델타 84 전방, 57 후방, 2+19. 1
您肯定有我们没有的东西。您想让我们给您提供GO所需的数量
Roger. My status is good, the capsule status is good. I am in drifting flight on manual control. Gyros are caged. The fuel reads 45-42 [percent], oxygen 79-100 [percent]. Steam vent temperatures both read 65 [degrees] now; suit temperature has gone down nicely. It is now 62 [degrees], and all the power is good. The blood pressure is starting at this time. I've just finished taking some MIT pictures, and that is all I have to
Ja, ich denke, wir werde
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Ваш дружелюбный офицер наведения подготовил дл
Roger.
रॉजर। टीएम रीडआउट के 
Okay. Two minutes. DELTA-V thru
Passage au test 3: allumer le voyant inférieur du côté opposé pendant 10 secondes; réglage du compteur de portée à 58. OK. Ré
そして、翻訳されてXが追加されました。CAPTURE PR
Aspetta Buzz. Sembra tutto a posto, per quanto ne so. Abbiamo... lungo la linea di convergenza tropicale, ci sono alcune nuvole 
罗杰。或许在你看来，我们这次登月之旅看似简单轻松。但我可以向你保证，事实并非如此。将我们送入轨道的土星五号火箭是一台极其复杂的机器，每一个部件都运转得完美无瑕。我头顶上的这台计算机拥有38000个词汇，每个词汇都经过精心挑选，对我们宇航员来说至关重要。我手中的这个开关，仅在指令舱内就有超过300个相同的开关，而这仅仅是一个开关的设计。除此之外，还有无数的断路器、操纵杆、连杆和其他相关控制装置。我们服务舱尾部的大型火箭发动机也必须运转完美，否则我们就会被困在月球轨道上。我头顶上的降落伞明天也必须完美无缺，否则我们将坠入大海。我们始终坚信所有这些设备都能正常运转，并且
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。サ
Мы зафик
分かりました。それではその質問をさせていただきます。お待ち
了解。マイク、今マークすべき星が山ほどあるんだけど、彼らは少し心配していたんだ。もし同じ位置に長く留まりすぎたり
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस
क्यों न हम उसके मुंह में ओरल 
没事。我只是想说我的情况仍然很好。我正在为冲
- - قم بمحاذاة وحدة القياس بالقصور الذاتي. أخرج مقابض البصريات. إذا كان أي شخص يريد التخلص من هذا الهراء في R-1، فقد حان الوقت ل
Pour information générale, Houston: tout le monde se porte bien et le commandant en chef fait
Ok. Quando siamo entrati lì, eravamo a circa 66 gradi di rollio, quindi o siamo partiti
रॉजर। समझ गया। फेज-एडजस्ट 02 18 26 49.3 पर; 1 प्लस 07; यॉ 0, पिच 0; 25, 00493; 26 और 27, सभी श
الإرسال في وضع عدم الرؤية. لدينا خط رؤية. الوقت المنقضي على الأرض مضبوط على علامتي، 4 ساعات و29 دقيقة و30 ثانية. الإرسال في وضع عدم الرؤية إلى أورورا 7. تأكد من تشغيل جميع مفاتيح النغمات؛ وإضاءة أضواء التحذير؛ وتشغيل مفتاح الفيوز اليدوي العكسي؛ وإيقاف مفتاح فيوز الإطل
ठीक है। यह सही है। फिर, इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन से पुनः कॉन्फ़िगर करने के लिए, जैक, हम चाहते हैं कि आप मेन बस टाई स्विच को ऑन स्थिति में छोड़ दें और सर्किट ब्रेकर को उसी क्रम में बाहर निकालें जिस क्रम में हमने आपको उन्हें बंद करने के लिए कहा था। ठीक है; और क्या आप चाहते हैं कि मैं उन्हें एक-एक 
Cela figure dans votre list
오로라 세븐, 여기는 카나리 캡콤입니다. 귀하로부터 아무런 송신이 없었습니다. 카나리 아일랜드
Roger, Houston. Stiamo ancora mostrando circa il 52% e abbiamo attivato il nostro interruttore sui ri
D'accord, Joe. J'ai remarqué une chose: sur certains circuits, l'impulsion… enfin, leur nombre est nettement réduit, et… plutôt mauvais. Apparemment, cette purge supplémentaire au niveau du module de service était une sorte de soupape de décharge qui s'est peut-être dé
Aurora Sev
Non, ce qui se passe, c'est que de temps en temps, on s'approche très près de la fenêtre, et ça déclench
- - Non siamo così grassi da voler bere regola
Pareil pour moi. Je ne sais pas si je suis en haut, en bas, sur le côté, ou 
I'm seeing things come off, but I can't see them very clearly. Ther
Ora dobbiamo accendere i riscaldamenti che vuoi rispa
चूंकि आप पहले से ही यात्रा पर हैं, इसलिए आपको यह जानकर शायद दिलचस्पी हो कि ह्यूस्टन की ज्योतिषी रूबी ग्राहम का कहना है कि
Okay. Are you satisfied that the CO2 ci
我把总电源关掉，看看情况如何。你看
Роджер, 11. Мы записываем
好的，格斯。就飞行计划而言，我们还没能好好
现在，我们是 SEF VII 和 BEF，我们——哦，我
حسنًا. أريد التأكد مما إذا كان وعاء التكثيف الذي كنا سنستخدمه لتصفية بعض الماء على سطح القمر محكم الإغلاق تما
Arriva alla fine di que
Fred, un point 
Hey, hast du ein
Левый бе
Роджер. Мы стабилизировали темпе
Ricevuto. Ri
네, 그랬습니다. 저는 테더를 이용해서 우주선 쪽으로 몸을 끌어당기고 있었고, 사실 우주선 바로 위에 있었습니다. 다음에 이런 종류의 테더 작업을 할 때는, 꽤 괜찮아 보이지만 위
Gut, Indian Cap Com, ich melde mich. Ich befinde mich in 7.000 Fuß Höhe, der Hauptfallschirm ist in Ordnu
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。どうぞ
Roger, Hous
Going down to 127:11, cross out "Verify ON." Beneath that a ways, cross 
Okay, Houston. Wir werden die Secondary jetzt für 30 Sekunden komplett aushebeln, ich meine,
Резина — резиновая оболочка защитного чехла на тренажере — п
Хорошо, Фред, я больше тебя не слышу из-за фонового шума. Я предполагаю, что... кажется, я слышал, как Джек сказал тебе, что мы собираемся делать с шумоподавлением в восходящем канале связи, выключи его. Ты займешься антеннами, потому что мы не видим твоего положения. Мы проверим твой голос, когда поднимемся. На это у нас уйдет от 3 до 5 минут. И ч
И, знаете, иногда какой-то маленький кусочек чего-то ударяется о — как это называется — покрытие? Весь LM время 
حسنًا. أخبرني ما هي تلك الطريقة لتشغيل ال
अपशिष्ट जल डंप के लिए, हम 84 घंटे तक इंतजार करेंगे; हो सकता है कि वे वेंट का मॉडल बना रहे हों या कुछ
سيجما سفن، هذه هي قياد
了解。状態は良好
روجر
«Дружба Семь», это командование воздушного движения Гавайев, я вас хорошо слышу. Каков ваш отчет 
찰리, 시작하기 전에 우리
Jim, ici CAP COM. Tu pourrais aussi dire au pilote, à son r
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 일몰 사진을 
Ausführung 2: Start 22:43:00. Ende 23:22:00. Geplante Filtereinstellung verwenden. K
نعم. نعم
Ther
Okay, Fred. Du bist fast bei 
И, Джим, Хьюстон. В частности, конечно, нам не нужн
さあ、ヒュ
Водолеи, по
Ciao, Guaymas Com Tech, Guaymas Com Tech. Qui è Friends
रॉजर. / - यह 3 - 46427, माइनस 053, प्लस 141, प्लस 28960, माइनस 00456, 
罗杰，比尔。在你们尝试手动混合之前，我们希望你们先试一下手动调节并提高车厢温度
أعتقد أنني سأحصل على هذا الجزء خلال دقيقة
Oka
Hallo Kalifornien, Friendship Seven. 
357と1511。そこに星があ
टेप रिकॉर्डर हाई बिट रेट पर कमांड रीसेट करने ज
Ну, они думают, 
And, Houston, 13.
Да, э
रॉजर। 1, G&N: 38658, माइनस 054, प्लस 065, TIG 078 02 0345, प्लस 29180, प्लस 03779, माइनस 01325; रोल NA, पिच 041. PAD का शेष भाग NA है। उलेज दो जेट, 19 सेकंड। 4 PAD, G&N: 38658, माइनस 054, प्लस 065, TIG 084 29 5059, प्लस 31373, प्लस 03760, माइनस 00968; रोल NA, पिच 034. PAD का शेष भाग NA है। उलेज दो जेट, 19 सेकंड। ये दोनों PAD एक अनडॉक्ड पैंतरेबाज़ी के लिए हैं। प्लस 
Okay. Let's see if I got it all. For rendezvous first of all we want CB 16 INVERTER 2, closed, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2, closed. Then on panel 14, verify INVERTER 2 selected. And CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 closed, both breakers. Then we are to pull the RENDEZVOUS RADAR RELEASE han
さあ、ヒュースト
Negative, I have not do
——并完成激活步骤 28 的第 2、3 和 4 步。
네, GMT 16시 
Измерьте артериальное давление и ждите ответа хирурга по по
Roger. Ti abbiamo preso alle Bermuda in questo momento. Hai appena attraversato il Texas e Canaveral
Hey, you've got a new CAPCOM on now with
ジェミニ4、CSQ。聞こえま
로저. 골드스톤
Okay. We've had some problem
Roger. Normalement, cela se fait automatiquement, Jim; et si vous aviez suivi le programme à la lettre, cela aurait été le cas, mais un doute subsistait. L'opération a été arrêtée environ 7 minutes avant le point de transition et, par
CB BAT RELAY BUS, BAT A und B, 
……指
حسنًا. بعد إيقاف التشغيل، نتوقع أن تستهلك من الماء ما بين 2.7 و3.2 رطل - أي بمعدل استهلاك كهربائي 14 أمبير في الساعة. ملاحظة: هذا لا يشمل الماء المتوفر، لذا يُضاف الماء المقطر. الآن، ننتقل إلى هيدروكسيد الليثيوم (LiOH). باستخدام العبوات، سيكون لديك 16 عبوة، كل عبوة تكفي لمدة 12 ساعة،
रॉजर। मेरे पास आपके लिए उड़ान योजना से संबंधित अपडेट हैं। आपने CSQ में कितन
了解。了解しまし
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。アフガニスタン・パキスタン地域上空の単一細胞雲
Roger. Che ne dici di darci lo stato del sis
Roger. Vos parcelles semblent très
11号，休斯顿。你们在那里表
Roger. Je ne sais pas exactement ce qui s'est passé, Mike. J'étais en train de marquer les sites d'atterrissage avec le code, et j'avais sans cesse un gros message
PYRO 已
はい。フライバイとペリシンシアン、そして2時間ブロックのアップデートです。また、すべての窓の最新情報もお知らせください。月周回軌道上では、中央ハッ
收到。我
Eagle, Houston. Sie bleiben für T2
Ja. Die Transienten waren deutlicher spürbar als bei den vorherigen Brennvorgängen, Charlie. Ich habe es einfach auf unser leichtes Kommandomodul geschoben, aber es gab erhebliche Rollbewegungen, die sich nach den ersten 20 Sekunden des Brennvorgangs, schätze ich, beruhigten; dann gab es aber auch Nick- und Gierbewegungen. Ich glaube nicht, dass das ungewöhnlich war, und die Rollbewegung schien sich recht präzise zu stabilisieren, plus/minus etwa 8 Grad beidseitig der Mittellinie; und nach den ersten paar – ach, nach den ersten 20 Sekunden oder so – waren die Kardanaufhängungen ruhig, und Nick- und Gierbewegungen waren relativ gering. Davor gab es e
范斯，大概半小时前，我和杰克在某些航天器姿态下看不到星座和恒星。我们能看到天蝎座和人马座，也能看到牛郎星（或称南十字座）、半人马座α星、织女星等亮度相近
ロジャー。ビルさん、ちょっと興味があるので、クライオタンクのヒーターとファンについて少しお話しします。ヒーターは正常に作動しており、オンとオフを繰り返しています。時間が経つにつれて、このサイクル速度が上昇し、タンク内の水が少し成層化していることを示しています。その後、4時間ごとにファンを数分間オンにすると、これがタンク内の温度をかき混ぜ
Понял, давай, стреляй изо всех с
ठीक है। नीचे का मुख्य लूप अभी भी काफी अच्छा दिख रहा है, इसलिए लगता है कि सब ठीक है। आपकी बैटरी B की चार्जिंग लगभग पूरी हो जानी चाहिए, और हमें लगता है कि आपक
Okay
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Atlantic Ship Com Tech. Мы читаем, что вы слабы, но сломлены, слабы, но 
Sie haben vier Minuten Zeit; das reicht völlig
روجر. نسخة 42. هل هذا
When you move into, we recommend
了解
로
了解しました、ジム。あなたのコンピューターで、先日やったように、もう一度消去可能なメモリダンプを取りたいのですが。理由は、約8時間前にやった時、その時間
Acquario, Hou
روجر، مايك. شكرًا جزيلًا. هل لاحظتم أي تجمعات أخرى للمياه على الحاجز الخل
C'est dommage, il ne me rest
よし、進め。よし、そこにVERB 82が
D'accord. À ma connaissance, aucun d'entre nous n'a pris de médicaments, et pour l'instant, en ce qui concerne le repos, je suppose que nous ne sommes pas plus fatigués que d'habitude dans cette situation. Je vais vous décrire le cycle
Okay. Wir möchten ein Update durchführen. D
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地
Tutta l'alimentazione a corrente continua, d-c, è pari o superiore a 25 vol
Welches Problem versuchen
월리, 잘 들었습니다. 시간이 되시면 오리엔테이션 테스트 진행 상황을 알려주시겠습
Okay, Vance. Un'altra piccola differenza che abbiamo notato è che il flusso di idrogeno rispetto al
Хорошо. Теперь ваш голос слышен отчетливо. Вы распознали информацию о моей траек
And the final step, 7, if any problem arises, go back to your initial gimbal angles of 10 degrees pitch, 45 degrees yaw, and 150 degrees roll; reacquire and go to 
"0,1 фута в секунду". Причина, по которой мы сокращаем время работы, заключается в том, что, поскольку автоматический выключатель ASA не работает так долго, мы не уверены, что наши характеристики будут идеально четкими. Поэтому мы хотим убедиться, что получим ровно такое время работы, без перегрева; таким образом, мы сокращаем время работы минус 1 секунду. Это позволит нам выполнить корректировку на 470 градусо
This is Houston. 
Lec
Okay, Jim. The circuit breakers are the ANUNCIATOR/DOCK/COMPONENT circuit breakers on panel 11, third row, far right, under LIGHTING; and on panel 16, also under LIGHTING
Okay, vielleicht doch nicht. Übrigens, es sind noch weniger a
D'accord. Merci. Et si vous y pensez, le mome
Это подтверждается. Сначала я быстро пройдусь по времени основных событий, а затем мы
好的。第一行的设置是正确的。第二行我们需要将 QUAD TCA 1 到 4 关闭。第三行我们需要将 AT
We had Attitude Control POWER on and went
Roger. Mike, hai copiato il nostro consiglio di proceder
Je vais m'arrêter. En fait, je
로저, 11. 대체 및 비상 점검 목록을 꺼내주시겠습니까? F2-20페이지에 있는 삭제 가능
Roger. Verstanden, Neil. Nächstes Thema: Kurz nach der Landung hast du erwähnt, dass sich westlich entlang der positiven Z-Achse ein Hügel befindet. Gibt es dort größere Felsen, die die Sonnenstrahlen bei Sonnenuntergang abschirmen könnten? Gibt es in deiner Gegend größere Felsen,
Ро
Non ho avuto problemi a far capire alle stelle di che tipo sono, e questo sarà il problema. Soprattutto con due gadget da tenere in mano come computer. Questo non aiuta per nie
阿
Okay, and if you turn over the page on Power 8, we have the spacecraft functions remaining to you. We've got low bit rate TM. However, we don't have any VHF. We have. We have GLYCOL PUMPS. We have SUIT F
आह, कार्डफाइ
Brother. He had better t
休斯顿，继
Un cambiamento al piano di volo. Condurrete l'esame medico p
ジョー、了解。ここから始めました。オプション3に進み、ディス
Да. Я начинала волнова
OK, MARK. Réarmement du déb
Roger. Wir sind auch vor Ort. Ich wer
Neil, qui è Houston. Il campo visivo è a posto. Vorremmo che 
ठीक है। या तो मैंने सर्किट ब्रेकर गलत लिखा है, या फिर मैं इसे पढ़ नहीं पा रहा हूँ। यह लगभग बीसवें नंबर पर है, पैनल 276 के बाद, जहाँ लिखा है CB INSTRUMENTATION POWER CO
फ्रैंक, मुझे अपनी मुर्
음, 지금은 그 장치를 설치한 후로 수치가 0.35로 돌아왔습니다. 그 전에는 눈금이 수평으로 표시되었죠. 제 생각에는 우리 제품은 비교적 정확한 것 같습니
Oh, è buio, ecco cosa è successo. Sta af
Roger. Bei so guter Sicht und Kommunikation geben wir Ihnen jetzt einfach eine mündliche Beschreibung, ohne das Teleskop zu sehen. Ihre Anflugwinkel auf Arktur waren sehr gut. Ich habe Arktur im Zentrum des Teleskops. Bei diesem Sonnenstand verläuft ein Lichtstrahl direkt durch die Mitte des Teleskops – ein Lichtband. Dadurch sind viele Sterne in unserer Umgebung 
Mike, il y a une quantité incroyable d'objets sur le site d'atterrissage. De quoi faire plaisir à Jack Schmidt! Le système de visée automatique suit par
चलिए देखत
Roger, 11. Ricevuto, e li abbiamo controllati anche qui a terra. Una correzione alla mia ultima trasmissione. Vorremmo che fosse fatta prima 
C'est confirmé. Quel e
もっと詳しく知ることができた
Оставьте переключатель компьютера вк
Мы можем это достать. У нас есть запись, Хьюстон, можете выложить её в любое удобное для вас врем
Houston, the cam
حسنًا. فيلمان مُعرَّضان للضوء مقاس 16 ملم و70 ملم في محلول R-13. حسنًا، التالي. أغطية شبكية لخرطوم الأكسجين. التالي: كاميرتان من نوع هاسلبلاد مقاس 70 ملم، وتخزين
حسنًا. أعتقد أنني فهمت الأمر بشكل خاطئ. لقد قمتم بنسخ إشارة VHF إلى مسافة 20 كيلومترًا. نحن نتحقق الآن من وصلة الاستقبال. على أي حال، ستستغرق هذ
Ich habe die Fortsetzung von "" gefunden. Verstan
알겠습니다. 현재 기체 자세는 피치 0도, 요우 좌
Роджер. Ты тоже говоришь
感觉好可惜，只剩不到半小时可以玩了。我现在要用电传操纵低空飞行。陀螺仪释放，俯冲下去观察德班灯塔。陀螺仪释放，电传操纵低空飞行，修正，现在我要切换到手动比例。我还没设置任何速率，所以先回到设置
로저, 11. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 약 71시간에서 72시간 사이에 식사 시간이 시작될 예정이며, 아마 이미 식사 중이실 겁니다. 71시간: 산소 연료 전지 퍼지; 72시간 GET: 이산화탄소 필터 교체 6회, 보조 라디에이터 유량 점검. 그리고 2시간 통과, 준위 통과, 복귀 모드 중단에 대한 블록 데이터를 보내드리겠습니다. 73시간 00분: 롤 각도 약 0도에서 정지하십시오. 즉, 73시간경 롤 각도가 0도에 가까워지면 정지해 주십시오. 그리고 남은 옵션 3을 수행하여 드리프트 점검을 하십시오. 73시간 20분: 착륙 지점, 1개 상태 벡터, 목표 하중에 대한 업데이트를 제공해 드리겠습니다. 73시간 30분: 롤, 피치, 요우를 000도로 기동하십시오. 고이득 안테나 각도는 피치 0도, 요우 335도입니다. 새로운 착륙 지점을 
Roger. We'd like you, some
Paracadute principale in verde. Il paracadute è fuori uso, in condizioni di barriera corallina a 10.800 piedi e il paracadute è splendido. I
Okay. After number 1, first line, cross out "And VHF-A." Second line, cross out "SIMPLEX operation." Third line, cross out "Prime." That refers to PRIME POWER AMP, OFF. That - that "PRIME" should actually be replaced by OFF. And that's the second prime that line. Also in t
我也不知道
D'accord. On a maintenant une personne la tête en bas sur la pho
Roger, Canary Cap Com. Reading you loud and clear; H
ठीक है। लगता है आपको रडार को यहाँ फिर से सेट करना होगा। हमारा सुझाव है कि आप TIG प्रक्रिया को 45 मिनट पहले शुरू करें - चेकलिस्ट में दिए गए बिंदु पर, लगभग TI
Роджер. Ваш инвер
Okay. I'll read back. SUIT COMPRESSOR 1 and 2, OFF; FUEL CELL PUMPS 1, 2, and 3,
了解。16番も同
Ihr a
Good morning, Frank. Apollo 8, this is Houston. We're wondering about your backup align; we'd like your opinion on the possibility of doi
ビルがテープレコーダーを手に入れました。ダンプを評価中です。データ
Gemini 4, qui Omnibus 64. Il tuo elicottero di soccorso sta arrivando per
대량 샘플에서 깊이에 따른 변화를 살펴보던 지역에서는 최대 3인치까지 파낼 수 있었습니다. 실제로 큰 차이는 없었고, 단단한 층은 발견되지 않았습니다. 그런데 나중에, 또는 다른 시기나 다른 지역에서는, 1~2인치 정도만 파내려가면 더 이상 파낼 수 없는 
罗杰，11。我们
Sage
わかりました、ジム。その件については、私たちがあなたに提案したいと思っていたテーマです。私たちはその件について検討してきましたが、私たちの考えは、もちろんあなた次第ですが、長所と短所を考えると、あなたは長所を指摘したばかりです。私たちはEIマイナス1時間の直前にハッチの完全性チェックを行いますが、それが破綻すると、宇宙服を着るのに苦労するでしょう。一方、宇宙服を着ることのデメリットは、着用する時間を除いても、かなり遅くなる可能性があることです。さらに、宇宙服を着ている時間がこれこれこれこれというと、暑くなりすぎて宇宙服の換気のためにスーツループに電力を供給しなければならないのではないかと非常に懸念する人もいますが、かなりの電力を消費するため
كيف تبدو بيانات ال
アポロ8号。フライバイ操作を開
Roger. Ansch
Fort
Fort et clair à
ठीक है। जीएमटीबी 15 43 23. ΔV 139. जलने की अवधि - 2 मिनट 39 सेकंड. आपका 15 55 24. बाएँ रोल करें 55. जीएमट
罗杰，8.010 689 260 英仙座ζ星，向下048，向左05。其余部分不
Ok. Dopo il numero 1, prima riga, cancella "E VHF-A". Seconda riga, cancella "Funzionamento SIMPLEX". Terza riga, cancella "Prime". Questo si riferisce all'AMPLIFICATORE DI POTENZA PRIME, SPENTO. Quel... quel "PRIME" dovrebbe essere sostituito da SPENTO. E questo è il secondo "prime" di quella riga. Anche nella terza riga l'ultima parola "SPENTO" dovrebbe essere cancellata e sostituita da "PCM". La quarta riga va bene. La quinta riga, che è "VHF VOICE, ON, OFF, OFF", cancella. "Illuminazione, FLOODS", che è la riga successiva, dovrebbe essere "SPENTO", ma aggiungi quanto
안녕하세요, 연료 전지 - O2 
अरे, बेहतर होगा कि तुम लू को फोन करके बता दो कि हमें रात के खाने में थ
로저. 프렌드십 세븐. 시력은 여전히 ​​좋습니다. 처음 시작했을 때와 똑같이 읽을 수
Apollo 8, Houston. You are in the scan limit right now on the high-gain antenna; although you may have NARROW beam width selected, you are in WIDE. To improve the situation would take a pitch down and a ya
Okay. We will do Orbit Nav Runs
ジャック、特に私のような初心者にとって、ここの良い点の一つは、動きやすさです。司令船シミュレーターで作業した経験があれば分かると思いますが、無重力状態は確かに大きな助けになります。なぜなら、1Gの重力下では、宇宙船内で動き回るのはかなり制限されるからです。しかし、この環境では動き回るのはとても簡単です。ご覧の通り、かなりきれいに見えます。ワッシャーがいくつか緩んでいました。また、シーケンスカメラの小さなプラスチック製のキャップが外れて、EDパネルのそばに引っかかっていました。さて、ジムの真下、彼はここにある缶のような
はい、あそこ、ちょっと上
अब उन सभी का स्कोर 3.9 से ऊपर
I turned the auto h
Roger. Il motivo del ritardo, Charlie, è che è difficile trovare due stelle che non siano occultate dall'astro e che non siano nel mezzo di un campo stellare arti
アポロ8号、ヒュー
Хорошо, Джим. С этой информацией мы перейд
わかった、ロジャー。ありがとう。私は向こ​​う側にいる
Хорошо. Батарея A 38,3 В, батарея B 36,9 В, батарея C 38,5 В. Выглядит неплохо. Похоже, мы установили обратно вс
Oh, aspetta un attimo, eccolo qui. Ci 
35 सेकंड; DSKY 
이벤트 타이머
حسنًا. هذا صحيح يا جيم. ما عليك سوى قص بطاقة التلقين، وهي قطعة ورق مقوى مناسبة الحجم، على بُعد بوصة ونصف تقريبًا من الحلقات. أي قص فتحات الحلقات فقط، وستحصل على بطاقة بطول 11 
Роджер, и можно еще один тонометр, пожалуйста? Предыдущий я не замерил. У меня есть ваш (зона восстановления) 5-1 TORF (время ретрофорации). Вы готовы к з
阿波罗发射台随后。TIG 125 19 3470；TIG 126 57 
一切正常，我来快速汇报一下。燃油量为29-27%。舱压为5.5，舱内空气温度为88华氏度，相对湿度为33%；冷却液量为58%，舱内温度为71华氏度，宇航服温度为71华氏度，宇航服压力为5.8，宇航服内蒸汽温度为53华氏度，主供氧量为60%，副供
Stiamo arriva
While we're pointing up in this direction, we see out our side windows the Sun going by and, of course, out one of our windows right now we've got the Earth. Now right behind my window, of course, we have the Sun, because the Sun is illuminating the star charts that we see. This line represents the ecliptic plane and the
わかりました。Sバンド送受信機の電源を切って、5分後に再起動してほしいとのことですが、
Hier ist Columbia. Bitte fahren Sie fort. Und ich hätte gerne mehr Informationen zu dem, was als Nächstes ansteht. Ist das das Projekt, das ich gerade abgeschlosse
휴스턴, 로저
Ok, ora vado un po' alla deriva li
... الخطوة التالية هي 400 
Nur zu, Canary, G
플랫폼에서 가속도계 바이어스를 확인해 볼 기회가 없었어요. 거의 내내 추진력을 주고 있어서 기체를 안정적으로 유지할 수가 없었거든요. 기체의 상태가 워낙 불안정해서 테이프 덤프를 몇 개 건너뛴 것 같아요. 첫 번째 시도에서는 카나본과 제대로 교신도 못 했고요. 분리될 때 바로 카메라를 꺼내놓지 않은 
Ricevuto. Primo elemento, cancellare D-8 alle 23
로저님, 인버터 온도는 150볼트 인버터의 경우
嗯——已经过去2分22秒了。卡
هذ
रॉजर। आज सुबह अपोलो से जुड़ी बड़ी-बड़ी खबरों में से एक खबर यह है कि आपको एक सुंदर लड़की और उसके साथ एक बड़े खरगोश को देखना चाहिए। एक प्राचीन कथा के अनुसार, चांग-ओ नाम की एक खूबसूरत चीनी लड़की 4000 वर्षों से वहां रह रही है। ऐसा लगता है कि उसे चंद्रमा पर निर्वासित कर दिया गया था क्योंकि उसने अपने पति से अ
Non, Charlie. Je n'ai pas cette
Хорошо. Мы бы хотели — ребята из SPAN говорят, что,
はい、OPTIC
地平线看起来像一条橙色的带子。太阳落山后，向两侧延伸很远，大概在太阳两侧各45度，地平线逐渐变成浅黄色，然后是深蓝色，再是浅蓝色，直到天
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Запрос на отключение режима измерения расстояния в S-диапазоне (NORMAL) и отключение режима измерения расстояния в S-диапазоне (NORMAL). Повторяю: режим изме
Sì, vorrei sapere a che ora
Debole 
ठीक है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप पावर डाउन प्रक्रिया को तब तक दोहराएं जब तक आपको 10 एम्पियर का डेल्टा न मिल जाए। 
我拿到了S-5的装
6,50 градусов. И, Джим, Хьюстон. В заключение, мы ожидаем, что нам потребуется около часа, чтобы обновить ваш контрольный список и график работ позже сегодня, и мы хотели бы, чтобы вы это учли. Я думаю, что на подготовк
好
...널 제외시켰어. 수량 다음에 다시 말하
قاعدة ترانكويليتي، هذه هيوستن. نرجو منكم فتح قاطع دائرة التلفزيون الآن.
ह्यूस्टन,
Темпе
जी हाँ, जैक। हम
Нил, я сейчас поднимусь и возьму команду на изменение тангажа — РУЧНОЕ УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ТАНГАЖОМ И УСКОРЕНИЕМ. Эти ручные контроллеры активированы, так чт
キャビンの気圧は
네. 그 띠들은 멕시코 남부 바
كانت تنطلق نحو الأس
Veuillez patienter une 
इस समय, मुझे निश्चित रूप से ऐसा महसूस हो रहा है कि मैं 90 डिग्री के कोण पर,
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Tutto è ancora in
杰
Sinuous Rille est celle qui éta
Roger. Je vais relire l'intégralité des remarques pour être sûr que nous avons bien compris. Utilisez NC-4, étapes 1 à 11; puis passez au cont
Ok, Apollo 8. Puoi dirci se hai fatto qualcosa con la tua acqua potabile? Abbia
Хорошо. Мы готовимся к смене смены, и я хотел бы обсудить несколько моментов. Сейчас скорость ветра, похоже, составляет максимум 0,3 фута в секунду, поэтому на шестом участке траектории маневра не будет. Седьмой участок немного больше, и мы примем решение по нему позже. Погода в месте посадки по-прежнему хорошая, 
Okay. Wie wäre es, wenn wir die Idee umsetzen, dass Jim seine Pol
Es sieht nun so aus, als würden wir Ihre Plattform etwa 45 
ठीक है,
حسناً. بمجرد الانتهاء من هذا الإرسال، ه
Ruhe bewahren, Hou
Finally 
好的。好的，我已
D'accord. L'étape suivante est la séparation du module de service. Voici les différentes étapes, mais pour que vous compr
太陽は窓自体に影響を及ぼすことはありませんが、
Abbiamo un contenitore 
हम 
Flight 측에서는 지상과의 원격 통신이 매우 원활하며, 해
Roger, John. Sono appena uscito dalla configurazione di spegnimento,
We're 
حسنًا، اللوحة 16، الصف العلوي، شاشات العرض: مؤشر مهندس النظام، مفتوح؛ وحدات التحكم في النظام الرباعية من 1 إلى 4، جميعها مغلقة. الصف الثاني، الإضاءة: من المحتمل أن تكون وحدات الإضاءة الكاشفة مفتوحة؛ وحدة الطاقة المنطقية B، مفتوحة؛ وحدة التحكم في تدفق النظام، مفتوحة. أسفل الاتصالات: الشاشة، مفتوحة؛ جهاز إرسال VHF A، مفتوح؛ جهاز استقبال VHF B، مفتوح؛ هوائي النطاق S، مفتوح. الصف السفلي، الشاشة، مفتوحة. أسفل: العاكس 2
ठीक है। समझ गया। चलिए देखते हैं आपके लिए और क्या है, जिम। मिडकोर्स-2 पर लगभग 23 फीट प्रति सेकंड की गति दिख रही है, लगभग प्रतिगामी और समय
好的，
로저입니다. 여기는 UHF 통신을 사용하는 프렌드십 세븐
ठीक
Ich hoffe, wir könn
Wir schalten die Sprachunterstützung unserer Uplink-Verbindung zu Ihnen ab, um Sie während des Gesprächs mit Tranquility Base nicht zu stören. Falls Sie uns brauchen, rufen Sie uns einfach an. Wir sind innerhalb von etwa ein bis anderthalb
أنا في وضع شبه عمودي. سنلتقط بعض الصور للسحب الركامية. ال
Хорошо, 11. Мы почти готовы начать. Однако я
收到。我状态良
大丈夫です。バックアップクル
Sette, qui è Cape Cod. Le condizioni meteo nella zona di recup
रॉजर, अपोलो 11। हमारे पास एक लेज़र है जिसे हम इस्तेमाल करने वाले हैं - यह एक नीले-हरे रंग का लेज़र है जिसे हम एक सेकंड के लिए चालू और एक सेकंड के लिए बंद की आवृत्ति पर चालू और बंद करेंगे। यह एल पासो के पास मैकडॉनल्ड वेधशाला से आ रहा है, जो टर्मिनेटर पर या उसके ठीक अंदर होना चाहिए। हम इसे कुछ देर के लिए सक्रिय करने वाले हैं। क्या आप कृपया दूरबीन से देखक
Roger. Ho attraccato in modalità AUTO e, come ho detto, non ero molto sicuro del momento del contatto. Ho continuato a controllare gli indicatori della sonda di attracco. Ho visto due pali di barbiere che indicavano che i tre fermi di cattura - non fermi di cattura, ma i tre... fermi - si erano attivati, e avevamo effettuato un attracco morbido. E in quel momento la situazione sembrava molto stabile. Così, sono passato alla modalità FREE, ho guardato fuori dal finestrino e sembrava ancora stabile; e ho acceso la bombola principale 2. E in quel momento, è iniziata una rotazione tra i due veicoli, non so bene a cosa. Forse la spinta o forse si stava accumulando prima, e non me ne ero accorto. Comunque, durante la RETRACT della sonda, ci sono state delle imbardate - le mie escursioni di imbardata di, direi, circa 15 gradi, e ho dovuto tornare indietro, prendere l'interruttore FREE e riportarlo in modalità AUTO, cercando di smorzarle; e i
Du côté du sport, voici quelques nouvelles. Pendant que vous étiez occupé l'autre jour, Joe Namath et le commissaire de la NFL, Pete Rozelle, ont annoncé que « Broadway Joe » avait accepté de vendre ses parts dans le restaurant Bachelors III et de rejoindre les Jets de New York. Joe est arrivé aujourd'hui au camp d'entraînement des Jets et a effectué sa première séance. Plusieurs autres joueurs des Jets, qui avaient fait grève avec lui, ont également rejoint l'équipe. Davy Hill, originaire de Jackson, dans le Michigan, a remporté son troisième tournoi majeur de golf en autant de participations la semaine dernière. Il a gagné le Philadelphia Classic. Hill a remporté quatre tournois cette année et est le joueur ayant accumulé le plus de gains avec la coquette somme de 129 000 $. En baseball, la division Ouest de la Ligue nationale reste très disputée. Los Angeles et San Francisco sont à un match des Astros d'Atlanta, leaders du championnat. Les Astros affichent un bilan de 48 victoires et 48 défaites et occupent actuellement la cinquième place, à sept matchs du leader. Le double match entre les Astros et Cincinnati, prévu hier soir, a été reporté en raison de la pluie. Les Cubs de Chicago sont toujours en tête de la division Est. Ils devancent les Mets de New York de quatre matchs et demi. Dans la Ligue américaine, Baltimore file tout 
정말 놀랍네요. 네 발바닥 패드 모두 땅속으로 거의 파고들지 않았다
Roger. Nous vous avons mis en copie et avons accepté l
네. 다들 우주 프로그램 하면 온갖 신기한 전자 장비들을 떠올리시죠? 물론 그렇긴 합니다. 하지만 오늘 보여드릴 몇 
سما
ケン、その時も同じことがありまし
了解しました。現在、水に塩素を散布しているとのことで
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. في الخطوة 5، نفّذ الخطوة 5. تحت "تفعيل حلقة الجليكول الأساسية"، الخطوة 1، السطر 1، "CB(16): عرض - إغلاق". هذا خيارٌ للطاقم؛ يمكنك تفعيله إن أردت. تجاه
Poi vorremmo che posizionaste la macchina fotografica contro il finestrino in modo che... e la teneste in modo che il muso non sia nel campo visivo. Poi vorremmo due serie di fotografie. Vogliamo che siate in modalità Impulso e che la navice
我必须向我们同一地区的其他人民致以问候。我们虽然身处两个半球，但彼此相连的事实，即使在今天，我们能够飞越对方的国界线，意识到我们本是一体，也足以证明这一点
吉姆，到目
Und einer der Vorteile, Jack, besonders für einen Neuling wie mich, ist die Bewegungsfreiheit hier. Wie du ja vom Kommandomodul-Simulator weißt, ist die Schwerelosigkeit ein echter Segen. Denn bei 1 g ist die Bewegungsfre
لا. أعتقد أننا سنضطر إلى تأجيل زيارة القمر إلى وقت آ
Ok, stiamo iniziando con il pacco di nastri per pellicole n. 11. Abbiamo appena finito con il n. 9. Sembra che la luce si sia accesa su quel pacco. Meglio controllare se il n. 8 ha un modo 
Roger. Ti ricevo. Sono sul paracadute principale a 1500 metri. Le condizioni sono buone. Non sono in contatto con nessuna forza di recupero. Hai informazioni s
好的，Retro J
كادت أن تفوتني هذ
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Vous avez raison; la puissance est de 2. Elle a été déterminée avant la dernière correction de trajectoire, et depuis, il y a eu un léger changement de trajectoire. Le point où vous brûlez actuellement 
Die Augenklappe sitzt dies
Now, the next big thing we got to do is, after the attitude reference check, is extend the docking probe. No big thing. Copy down a bunch of pads and then you got your RCS hotfire
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on your own, that's the place we'd like to break off and let you go ahead and take over with your own alinement. However, we are giving you a procedure which will give you things we know you can see in the telescope without worrying about any reflections or anything of that nature, and it's not intended that this procedure has to be followed past the point where you know you've got good definition of star patterns in your telescope. If you need to go on, we'll maneuver, take a look at the Moon, we'll take
... 110. आपके मुख्य इन्वर्टर का तापमान थोड़ा बढ़ रहा है, लेक
जिम, अगर आपको कंप्यूटर की ज़रूरत नहीं है, तो कृपया एंटर बटन दबा दें, हम यहाँ नीचे एंटीना बी-डी 
Oh. Nein, ich habe mein Radio nicht ausgesteckt. Ich h
Ich glaube, ich habe einen anderen
로저. 여기 인터스텔라 타임즈 12월 24일자 신문이 있습니다. 당신의 TV 프로그램은 대성공이었습니다. 오늘 아침 이웃 행성인 지구
Okay. Panel 4: TELCOMM, GROUP 1 will go OFF. all the circuit breakers that we closed will go back 
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। मैंने सूर्या
Okay, ganz rau
Roger, Houston. Dies ist ein Plus 90, und zwar wie folgt: minus - das Gewicht wird plus 63531 minus 164 plus 129 0041 74265 minus 04402 minus 0001 plus 48387 178 169 359 plus 0018
Houston ha un DE
You're probably intereste
알겠습니다. 연료 소비를 줄이기 위해, ATT H
Roger, Columbia. Ici Houston. Dites 
닐, 대
オーケー。本物のパスが手に入った
だから、当たったときに少し回
Okay, Jim. We'd like you to turn to page - page 24, which is 
了解。マイク、その動きは確認しました。追跡して連絡しま
你这只脏狗，把我的挡
わかりました。その時、地球は62度で通過しました。そして、2回の公転の合計時間は…
Il cavo elettrico, Frank, è appeso. 
All right now, I'm begin
प्रतीक्षा कीजिए, आप हमें अच्छे लग रहे हैं। 3 बजने पर भी आप अच्छे ही लग रहे हैं, बस 3 मिनट और
이제
姿态正常
اثنا عشر ساعة، أليس كذلك؟ يمكننا 
Das ist bestätigt. Tatsächlich hat Jack dort eine L
로저. 잠시 대기해 주십시오. 아폴로 D-9 4차 임무에서 우리는 안타레스와 스
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。オー
Хорошо. Отлично. Сейчас мы заряжаем батар
Und Fred, Houston. Gleich werde ich Ihnen eine Vorgehensweise vorlesen, die Sie sich bitte für später notieren. Es handelt sich um eine Anleitung zum Abschalten des Hauptbusses des Kommandomoduls. Wir glauben, dass diese Vorgehensweise später sehr nützlich sein wird, beispielsweise zum Abklemmen der Eingangsbatterien des Kommandomoduls und möglicherweise auch zum Vorheizen und vorläufigen Einschalten des Kommandomoduls, bevor wir es entfernen. Wir werden Ihnen die Anleitung in etwa 10 bis 15 Minuten ze
Tr-10 wieder im Normalzustand. Das hatte ich schon. Okay, wir haben 
거기엔 볼
Roger, je s
Roger. Votre alignement est inchangé, le litre est inchangé, l'horizon est sur la ligne des moins 2 degrés 
How big are the 
罗杰。9号面板已配置
Noch ein Punkt. Die Philosophie hinter diesem Zwischenschritt ist, ihn kurz vor der geplanten Entlüftung des Dampftanks
Frage, Joe. Jim hat mir erklärt, wie wir das mitten im Kurs handhaben werden, und vor einiger Zeit, als wir die Stromversorgung durchführten, hatten wir den STAB/CONTROL ASA-Leistungsschalter gezogen. Ich frage mich – wir haben die Heizungen im ASA verloren – wie sieht es da aus? In welchem ​​Zustand befindet 
Houston, sto notando una piccola fluttuazione nella tensione CA. Forse è solo il contat
好的，吉姆。我们现在设置的这个配置，B系统的燃料消耗量比我们预期的要高
よし、マスターアー
……应该从侧面过来。这样，吉姆，你就把我们带到正确的轨道上了。我们现在在正确的轨道上。我们已经对准了目标，接下来会再次跟随
わかった
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 지평선 점검은 33도에서 해야
Can't say too much for the visibility right here without the visor up. It's dark. It looks li
OK. Étape 6: « Mise sous tension (project
Okay, Fred. Das letzte war zu schwach. Ich verstehe, dass du die Verbindung trennst und dein BIOMED-Gerät au
جيميني 4، هذه شركة كانتون كوم 
콜롬보와 구텐베르크 분화구가 나타나고 있습니다. 아주 자세한 모습이 보입니다. 길게 평행하게 뻗어 있는 단층, 즉 지구대가 
Que
休斯顿，趁你还在思考，看看能不能想出一个办法，比如用
피치 트림은 2를 약간 웃도는 수준을 유지하고 있으며, 
حسنًا. R1 زائد 0.34202، R2 ناقص 0.07374، R3 زائد 0.35719. اقرأ 
罗杰。哥伦比亚号飞船上的各位居民或许会感兴趣，今天是哥伦比亚的独立日。菲律宾的格洛丽亚·迪亚兹昨晚荣膺环球小姐桂冠。她击败了其他60位佳丽，摘得全球选美桂冠。迪亚兹小姐今年18岁，黑发黑眸，三围是34.5-23-34.5。亚军是澳大利亚小姐，以色列小姐和日本小姐分列第三和第四。周二晚上你们返回地球的时候，美国联盟和国家联盟
फ्रैंक, आपके तापमान ठीक लग रहे हैं। चारों भ्रूणो
مهلاً، ظن
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 데이터 덤프
D'accord. La durée des manœuvres sera probablement inférieure à une minute. Nous voulons que vous ayez une coupure horaire. Nous vous indiquerons donc la durée de la manœuvre. J'ai également une zone de manœuvre pour le module 7 en milieu de parcours au cas où nous perdrions les communications. Si vous êtes prêt à recevoir les instructions, veuillez nous en info
- 나머지 절차는 나중에 진행하겠습니다
Okay, Columbia. Die Verbindung ist hergestellt; der Computer gehört Ihnen. Sie können jetzt BLOCK gehen; wir bi
Roger. Perigäum 86 [Seemeilen] kopiert. Apogäum nicht ermittelt
Роджер. Всё верно. Хочу уточнить, что DELTA-VX — это п
Roger. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Com Tech Canton. Treibstoff 90-100 Prozent, Sauerstoff 73-101 Pr
حسنًا. سأقوم بإيقاف تشغيل
Ты вообще что-нибудь видишь, 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们准备前往
罗杰，弗兰克。我们又做了一些检查，确认了
ゴミフィルターが本当に詰まるん
네, 알겠습니다. 아까 알려주신 배터리 암페어 값을 보고 있는데요. 0.5암페어에서 1암페어 정도 낮추는 게 좋겠다고 하네요. 잭에게 지금까지 뽑아 놓은 회로 차단기와 스위치를 확인해서 메인 A 라인에 불필요한 부하가 없는지 확인해 달라고 부탁해 주세요
罗杰，卡纳里。在我收到这些照片之前信号就会中断。我想拍几张照片。让穆切亚（或者更正一下，让卡诺）按以下顺序发给我：日落、日出、日落、日出、休息、休息。收到吗
Bene, Acquario. Abbiamo nuove informazioni su c
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 아주 희미
ह्यूस्टन में, जैक ने कहा कि उसने इसे शुरू कर दिया है, और उसने कहा कि एक और मि
Roger, Jim. Ich möchte Ihnen kurz eine Vorgehensweise erklären. Ihre W-Matrix teilt sich einige Speicherbereiche; daher ist die aktuelle W-Matrix nicht optimal, und wir raten Ihnen davon ab, Ihre Peilungen mit dieser Matrix fortzusetzen. Die folgende Vorgehensweise bewirkt, dass sich die Matrix vor Ihrem nächsten Peilvorgang neu initialisiert. Dadurch erhalten Sie wieder den Wert der W-Matrix, den Sie nach dem Vorfall mit der 3303 geladen haben. Sollte dies weitere Auswirkungen auf den Flugplan haben, klären wir das
アポ
Jim, hier spricht die Bordleitstelle. Sie könnten dem Piloten au
«Аполл
У нас это
もう一度アドレス 81 を試して、それが何であるかを
알겠습니다. 다음 중간 지점, 즉 진입
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP
Roger. We're going to gi
I'm afraid I didn't copy that, Fred, and while I was listening, told me that he'd like another b
Okay. Das ist die letzte Entlüftung am Tank. Fügen Sie also oben auf der Seite, direkt nach „INVERTER 1, CLOSE“, Folgendes hinzu: „Okay, nach INVERTER 1, CLOSE“
はい、その通りです。地球の地平線での作業には皆とても満足しています。
Roger. Ich wünsch
鹰牌和哥伦
أرى بوضوح ميلانًا لليمين بزاوية 5 درجا
そして、あなたが今いる場所からはそれ
对于那些还没看过铭牌的人，我们来读一下这块位于飞机
Сейчас в центре экрана находится кратер Уэбба. Мы смотрим на него прямо сверху примерно за 6 минут до начала спуска. У него относительно плоское дно, и вы можете увидеть, возможно, два или три кратера на его дне на западной стене, той стене, которая сейчас ближе всего к камере. В нижней части экрана мы видим небольшой кратер, расположенный чуть дальше от камеры. А затем, вернувшись к нижней части экрана и влево, вы можете увидеть ряд углублений. Именно такие соединенные кратеры вызывают у нас наибольший интерес, и нам интересно выяснить, почему они расположены име
Okay. It's looking good so far as consumables are concerned, Jack. You're standing about 20 pounds above the curve right now. Looking at the TD&E, you expended 65 pounds or - Stand by - 55 pounds, correction on tha
Houston, Apoll
Roger. Bill hat seinen Kassettenrekorder wieder, und uns ist beim letzten Übertragen aufgefallen, dass die Aufnahmen alle in niedriger
'
Roger. We'll be going off here shortly, and we'll pick you up in the morning for s
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप एस बैंड
알
Well, I've
Half covered with clouds, and--and the other half is dry. Will you pass on--this message for me, Gordo, to all the troops at Guaym
起初，由于需要进行另一次规避机动，我们无法按计划立即开始观测。抛射物在目标区域产生了大量的伪星，使得光学校准几乎不可能。我们之前研究的方法似乎不太奏效。我最终采用的方法是进入天狼星轨道（我们最亮的恒星），取回轴和耳轴，然后驾驶航天器飞向天狼星，利用它们进行光学校准，这项工作我们稍后完成。关于光散射，似乎在被动热控过程中，几乎在任何姿态下，扫描望远镜都会接收到光散射。它主要表现为一条宽阔的光带，横跨望远镜中心，位于零度两侧约10度范围内。在这个区域很难看到恒星。重新校准的效果不错。我已经能够用六分仪找到那颗星来进行校准，但我无法在扫描望远镜中识别出我们通常使用的星，例如雷戈尔星或门肯特星。我第一次观测地球时，地平线非常模糊。但地球地平线和大气层之间似乎确实存在一条非常清晰的分界线。地标视线滤镜似乎有助于确定地平线。太空和大气层顶部之间存在一条非常朦胧模糊的地平线，这很难使用。正如我之前所说，有时，当太阳在附近时观察月亮，月亮周围的区域，也就是月亮周围的空间，并非黑暗，而是明亮的——呈现浅蓝色。在用六分仪进行校准时，当太阳在
로저,
Джон, у тебя хороший го
That's correct. Okay, at this point, we want to lo
Роджер. В Вашингтоне финансовый комитет Сената одобрил продление действия дополнительного подоходного налога, но голосование в Сенате по этому законопроекту пока кажется маловероятным. В Остине представитель штата Рэй Леммон из Хьюстона был выдвинут на должность национального директора Американского общества океанографии. Леммон предложил изучить возможность создания института океанографии в Техасе. Это был бы первый подобный институт в западной части Мексиканского залива. В Миннеаполисе, штат Миннесота, метеорологическое бюро, после подведения итогов сегодняшней погоды, показав максимальную температуру 88 градусов и минимальную 72, отметило: «снегопада нет». Из Сент-Петербурга, штат Флорида, поступило радиосообщение от норвежского исследователя Тора Хейердала, который сообщил, что экипаж его папирусного судна «Ра» прибудет в Бриджтаун, Барбадос, несмотря на повреждения от сильного шторма. Однако экипаж будет ночевать на борту сопровождающего судна. Норман Бейкер, штурман экспедиции, сообщил, что сегодня экипаж находился на борту «Ра», ремонтируя повреждения, полученные во время штормов на прошлой неделе, из-за которых треснуло основание мачты. Часть сломанной мачты была выброшена за борт, и судно находилось в 725 милях к востоку от Барбадоса. «Спать на борту «Ра» возможно, но неудобно», — сказал Бейкер в радиосообщении. «Но цель нашего путешествия — не проверка сил
Roger, cambieremo di nuovo ante
네, 휴스턴 씨, 물
كيف هو ضغط 
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフランク・ボーマンが同行します。彼らは太平洋軍司令官ジョン・シドニー・マケイン・ジュニア提督と共に、回収艦のブリッジから着水を見届けます。大統領はホーネット号での滞在後、アジア歴訪と予定されていたルーマニア訪問に出発します。ルナ15号は昨日、月を52周した後、「危機の海」に墜落したとみられています。ソ連の通信社TASSは、「月近傍空間における科学的」「研究」が行われたと報じました。ジョドレルバンク天文台のバーナード・ラベル卿は、ルナ15号が時速約300マイル（約4
좋습니다. 친절한 DIY 키트 COMM입니다. 수산화리튬 상황에 대한 권장 절차를 알려드리겠습니다. 상태는 양호합니다. 측정 결과 1.8mm이고, 남은 비행 시간 동안 사용하기에 충분한 양입니다. 하지만
La pression dans la chambre se maintient; elle atte
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ブロッ
You're going to
알겠습니다. 건조 시 79도, 습윤 시 62도입니다. 계산해 드리
Okay. Il tuo atteggiamento sembra ottimo, 
Roger. Capisco che il GET di acquisizione è 03:07; GET di R = 248 nm; GET del rendez-vous 03:15; azimut 0 gradi; eleva
लैंडिंग के दौरान झटका 
好的，阿波罗8号。让我先说明一下，首先，我们正在审查所有登月程序和相关信息，我们会仔细核对登月检查清单。我们还有人员在验证你们的可擦除存储器，我们正在研究这个问题，也在讨论舱内温度。我会随时更新这些信息，现在我
Это Muchea Cap Com. С вами свяжутся не ра
Roger. Beau travail au radar. Je suis vraiment désolé que notre ami Julian n'ait pas pu être avec nous. Je voudrais vous faire un compte rendu sur le mode de pilotage. Tout d'abord, les modes manuel et fly-by-wire basse vitesse sont excellents; l'amortissement auxiliaire fonctionne parfaitement. Je suis maintenant en mode automatique; assiette rétro. L'assiette se maintient à merveille. C'est part
تلك هي الأر
Ro
Ora siamo esattamente sopra il nostro primo punto iniziale per P-1. È quasi impossibile non vederlo, è molto facile da individuare e possiamo guardare direttamente verso i
जी हाँ। यह सुनक
Gemini 4, RKV Surgeon. We have nothing else. We'll stand by for your co
罗杰。我们
わかりました。いくつか良いお知らせがあります。消去可能
没错
Ладно. Черт, мы почти не использовали пленку. Конечн
好
Roger, 11. Ici Houston. Entre 71 et 72 heures environ, vous atterrirez pour une période de repos, probablement déjà en cours. 71 heures: purge de la pile à combustible O2; 72 heures: changement du filtre CO2 n° 6, vérification du débit du radiateur secondaire. Nous vous enverrons ensuite les données de vol après un passage de 2 heures, un passage de péricynthion et une interruption du mode retour. À 73 heures 00 minutes: arrêt à environ 0 degré de roulis. Autrement dit, lorsque vous approchez de 0 degré de roulis vers 73 heures, nous vous demandons de vous arrêter. Effectuez ensuite l'option 3 restante pour une vérification de dérive. 73 heures 20 minutes: nous vous communiquerons les informations relatives au site d'atterrissage, au vecteur d'é
Non in modo significativo. Riuscivo ad arrivare ai primi 5 cm senza troppi problemi, e poi, mentre lo spingevo dentro con tutta la mia forza, per il secondo ci volevano due mani sul martello, e stavo facendo delle belle ammacca
맞아요. 그
11, это Хьюстон. Что касается вашей субъективной оценки того, что прошлой ночью внутри космического корабля было прохладнее, мы ранее сообщали, что действительно наблюдали снижение температуры примерно на 3 градуса по сравнению с предыдущей ночью. Оглядываясь назад, кажется, что экипаж «Аполлона-10» сообщал о подобных ощущениях во время транслунального и трансземного этапов полета. Мы хотели бы узнать, могли бы вы указать относи
На этом, пожалуй, всё на сегодня. Я — каждый из нас — желаю каждому из вас очень счастливого Рождества. И, думаю, увидимся завтра, мы приземлимся рано утром в пятницу
알겠습니다. 5번째 패널: CB 배트 차지, 배트 A, 
休斯顿，阿波罗11
是0.37还是
ठीक है। समझ गया कि आपने उतरते समय एक धमाका और
Roger. A Washington, la Commissione Finanze del Senato ha approvato l'estensione della sovrattassa sull'imposta sul reddito, ma un voto del Senato sul disegno di legge sembrava al momento remoto. Ad Austin, il deputato statale Ray Lemmon di Houston è stato nominato Direttore Nazionale dell'American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon ha proposto uno studio sulla possibilità di istituire un istituto di oceanografia in Texas. Sarebbe il primo istituto del genere nella parte occidentale del Golfo del Messico. A Minneapolis, Minnesota, l'ufficio meteorologico, dopo aver riepilogato le previsioni meteo odierne con una massima di 88 e una minima di 72, ha annotato "nevicate: nessuna". Da St. Petersburg, Florida, arriva un rapporto radio dell'esploratore norvegese Thor Heyerdahl, che afferma
Хорошо,
रॉजर, हम आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से सुन पा रहे हैं। हम यहाँ एक वोबुलेटर परीक्षण करना चाहते हैं। जब भी आप हमें निर्देश देंगे, हम व
Le Cap recommande d'effectuer ce contrôle de l'horizon et de
Roger, Amicizia Sette, hai capito che hai il controllo automatico su tutti e tre gli assi, e che stai facendo retromarcia con il controllo manuale. È aff
了解しま
Okay. Ora 
Let's see. You've got a minute and 3
로저, 코퍼스 크리스티 상공에서의 기동에 대한 TR과 제미니 정보를 전송했습니다. CATCH-UP 모드에 진
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। समाप्
Voilà, c'est tout pour le moment, Frank. On a reçu d'autres nouvelles qu'ils ont promis de nous transmettre dès leur arrivée. Les seuls sujets vraiment intéressants étaient la sortie de Pueblo. Je crois que tu as déjà e
Хорошо. В этот момент я в
मुझे यकीन नहीं हो रहा। मेरे स्विमसूट का तापमान 60 डिग्री दिखा रहा है और मुझे काफी आराम महसूस हो रहा है। मुझे यकीन है कि अ
Kano，我是双子座
Tu ne
Роджер, здесь всё в 
わかりました。信じられますか？北軍が南軍を3対0で破ったんです。し
ठीक है। इस मोड
Hier oben ist alles in Ordnu
What? Say aga
जी हां। इससे यह कार्ड पूरा हो जाता है। बाकी अपडेट सिर्फ आपकी जानकारी के लिए हैं, जो हमारे 58 घंटे के प्लेटफॉर्म पर आधारित हैं - प्लेटफॉर्म को देखें। हमारी स्थिति बहुत अच्छी है। आपके GYRO में लगभग कोई विचलन नहीं है क्योंकि - प्लॉट किए गए अपडेट में हम X का मान
了解しました。写真の中央位置は相変わらず良好ですね。明るさに少し変化が見られましたが、フィルターは変更されま
Okay. And we did not get a valid oral temp AOS anyway,
Хьюстон
로저. 이제 거의 다 본 것 같습니다. 회전하는 
하와이 
Niente paura, sto scherzando. Qui va tutto b
ヒューストン
١١، هذه هيوستن. بالإشارة إلى تقييمك الشخصي بأن الجو كان أبرد داخل ا
Die Lageregelung funktioniert sehr gut. Es scheint genügend manueller Treibstoff vorhanden zu sein. Ich bin noch bei 72 Prozent. Die Nickrate ist definitiv vorhanden. Die Gierachse ist recht stabil; die g-Kräfte nehmen zu. Die Kapsel ist recht stabil. Es gibt einen grünen Fluss – und hin und wieder orangefarbene Streifen. Der Wiedereintritt verläuf
看来我们目前一
我刚才看到了一样东西。也许是……他们说博尔曼的……能看到它；他们听不到它，但他们
क्या हम यहाँ
Roger. Wir haben gerade auf hohe Bitrate umgeste
ジム、ちょっとお知らせです。もし何らかの理由でスリップしなければならなかった場合、3
Right. Now we have some additional instructions in case this does not work. They say a full 20, Frank, on that ALC. It requires a full 20 seconds undisturbed for the ALC to properly do its thing. Now if these procedures that I've given you do not work, then we will be giving you some more, and they have to do with other filters and various combinations thereof. So I'd have the polarizing
알았어, 짐. 다시 한
Okay. Die automatische Verstärkungsregelung (AGC) fiel auf das sogenannte Rauschen ab. Das war der Spannungspegel an der AGC, gemessen – integriert, als d
ह्यूस्टन, हमारा मिशन टाइमर ठीक से चल रहा है। क्या आप हमें समय बच
Très bien. Concernant le récip
로저. 당신은 조금씩 흐릿해지거나 희미해
Apollo 8, Houston. Stiamo monitorando le vostre temperature. I quadricipiti se
Ogni volta che lo fa, il nostro cuore... il nostro cuore salta in gola. E, Jack, ogni volta che vuoi chiu
D'accord. C'est bon. Il faut les fermer pour que vous puissiez lire les tensions et les ampères. Prochaine étape: sur le panneau 250, il faut fermer les disjoncteurs BAT A POWER ENTRY et POSTLANDING et BAT B POWER ENTRY et POSTL
No, signore. Non abbiamo 
حسنًا يا جاك. الآن، الخطوات المتبقية هي ببساطة خطوات تهيئة حلقة البدلة لتشغيل هذا الجهاز بكامل طاقته، ويريد فريقنا تأجيل ذلك حتى يصل ضغط الخزان الذي تعمل عليه إلى 7.6 مليمتر زئبقي، وهو ما سيستغرق على الأرجح 45 دقيقة أو ساعة أخرى - نحن نقرأ الآن 4.7. لذا، ما نود منك فعله في هذه الأثناء هو إعداد خزان وحدة القيادة الثانية بنفس
はい、本当に素晴らしいですね。あれほど騒がしい音がなくて嬉しいです。ジム、私が何をしたいのかお話ししましょう。先ほど言ったように、今は詳細な手順はお伝えしません。まもなく、以下の形式で手順をお伝えする予定です。まず、タイムライン、いわば飛行計画のようなものを用意します。そこには、すべての主要なイベントの時刻と、構成、スイッチ設定など、私たちの構成に特有のもの（チェックリストには記載されていないもの）が記載されます。例えば、司令船の電源投入方法などがこれに該当します。次に、もちろん、チェ
روجر. أفادوا أنه خلال الاختبارات الأرضية على المركبتين الفضائيتين GT-2 وGT-3، وُوجهت هذه المشكلة نفسها، ويبدو أنها ناجمة عن انخفاض درجة حرا
मुझे नहीं पता क्य
好的，面板 11 配置，顶行：交流总线 B，S 波段天线，打开，打开；交流总线 A，磁带录音
ヒューストンさん、この配置で星が見えるかどうかは今のところ疑わしいですね。一直線に並ぶ唯一の方法は、地球と月、あるいは月と月が一直線になることです。できれば
Houston, mes commentaires concernant le lever du soleil portaient sur la zone située au-dessus du relief. On pouvait observer une lumière oblique, peut-être due à la brume, ou quelque chose d'approchant. Au moment où le soleil est apparu au-dessus du limbe, ou même juste avant, des rayons distincts provenaient de l'autre côté. Une brume uniforme émanait du point central où le soleil allait se lever, ce à quoi je ne m'
Роджер, Аполлон-11. Мы видим, как он отсчитывает время каж
Roger. Pour une fois, j'ai le monde à portée de main et, en l'observant à travers le 
ये है दोस्ती सातवां एपिसोड। आसमान में घने बादल
11，这里是休斯顿。Readh
Roger. We're going to h
روجر. نيل لديه أعلى معدل نبضات قلب تم رصده على الإطلاق في رحلة فضائية مأهولة، وقد خفضنا معدل نقل البيانات للتو. الجراح على و
No, that wire's really gouging me in the hand. I wonder -- if I bend
フレッド、もしやらざるを得ない状況なら、うまくいくかもしれない。今、昇華器を通る水は余裕で余っている。今朝、上昇タンクへの水移送を
Stage 2 tanks
Bene. Ora, vogliamo che tu prenda il nastro adesivo e ne tagli due pezzi lunghi circa 90 cm, ovvero la lunghezza di un braccio, e qu
Non so se riesci a distinguere le caratteristiche lì, Vance, sulla Luna, ma sembra che i termina
Bene. Abbiamo appena interrotto il blocco sulla banda S
Nous allons effectuer des manœuvres futures à Houston en mode AUTO à vitesse réduite. Concrètement, nous allons charger le moteur avec le code 11101 pour économiser du carbu
Tu me 
Affermativo. Questo è 02. E hai una stima de
Хорошо. Брюс, мы приближаемся к уровню активности водонакопителя, он поднимается до 0,85, примерно до 0,95, достигает пика, а затем постепенно снижается до 0,6, 0,4, и, похоже, стабилизируется на уровне 0,35. Конец связ
سيعطيك 
조명(LIGHTING) 항목 아래; 투광 조명(FLOOD), 열림; 트랙(TRACK), 열림. ED 로직 - 수정(ED LOGIC - Correction) 항목 아래, ED: 로직(LED: LOGIC), 열림. 하강 엔진 오버라이드(DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE), 열림. 슈트 흐름 제어(SUIT FLOW CONTROL) 항목 아래, 열림. 3번째 줄, 통신(COMM): 디스플레이(DISPLAY), 열림; VHF A 송신기(VHF A TRANSMITTER), 열림; VHF B 수신기(VHF B RECEIVER), 열림. 디스플레이(DISPLAY) 항목은
Okay. You want us to 
È sotto
好的。TVC伺服电源1和2，关闭
Роджер, Фрэнк, этот баллон с гелием в квадранте А — похоже, мы вас зря побеспокоили. Насколько мы можем
Okay, Fred. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, den Hauptsicherungsschalter für die Alarmanlage einzuschalten, damit Sie Ton und Bild haben. Außerdem fühlen wir vom medizinischen Personal uns hier unten etwas vernachlässigt. Könnten Sie uns bitte Ihre Position im 
짐, 저희도 그런 가능성을 생각해 봤습니다. 저희가 탱크를 가열했는데 수소를 전혀 사용하지 않았기 때문에, 해상 방출구를 통해 수
Jack, avant de commencer la procédure, nous constatons que la batterie A est complètement chargée et en excellent état. Nous allons recharger la batterie B. Laissez-la charger encore deux heures. Voici une procédure e
Houston, Tranquility. I used Capella in the last sighting, and it's a good ways near the edge. A good ways away from the center of detent 4. I'm wondering if it would pay any to use Alpheratz, star number 1. It might be a little closer. However, it would delay things a little, since I
lights are glowing, feeling fine, buoyant mood. Parameters of cabin: pressure 1, humidity 65, temperature 20, pressure in compartment 1, first automatic 155, second automatic 155, pressure in 
Apollo 8, H
Okay, I'm trying you in wi
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 지난 한 시간 동안 비행 계획에 따라 이산화탄소 필터를 교체했는지 확인해 주시겠습니까? 
Хорошо. Я сейчас начну. 
方向感覚は全く失われませんでした。地面を見下ろすこともできました。地面を見下ろすのに全く違和感はありませんでした。仰向けに転がって上を見上げることもできましたが、方向感覚は全く失われませんでした。宇宙船が私にとって最高の基準でした。宇宙船を見るたびに、すぐに良い基準点ができました。実際、最後の頃にはテザーを使って宇宙船の表面を上下に歩き、まるでアンカーのように体を
لم يكن هناك الكثير من الحطام في وحدة القيادة أو المركبة الفضائية. وجدنا القليل جدًا من جزيئات البراغي والصواميل والمسامير والوبر وغيرها. عدد قليل
Hé, on largue les amarres maintenant, Houston
ولا داعي للقلق بشأن مياه الشرب. اشرب ما تشاء، فهي متوفرة بكثرة. يوجد منها 38 رطلاً، وينصحك الطبيب أيضاً بتناول بعض عصائر الفاكهة. ا
ह्यूस्टन, मैं जिम बोल रहा हू
ヒューストンさん、州のベクトルの最新情​​報をお知らせいただく
Bu
네, 그 수소 문제 말인데요, 확실하진 않지만 역압 문제인 것 같아요. 백을 연결했을 때처럼 역압이 조금이라도 발생하면 유량이 서서히 줄어들어 거의 0에 가까워지죠. 그러면 마지막 한 방울이 나오기를 기다리고 또 기다리게 됩니다. 다 나왔다고 생각하고 백을 제거하면, 그 직후에 10센트 동전이나 25센트 동전 크기만 한 덩어리가 순식간에 나와서 매달려 있는 걸 볼 수 있어요. 백 입구가 막
Ich bleibe bei OMNI B, wenn ihr alle das Kommando wieder übernehmen wollt, und ihr könnt sie zwischen B und D hin- u
ठीक है। और हम आपको वर्तमान समय मे
グアイ
Okay. Vielleicht gibt uns das etwas mehr Zuversicht, dass wir es schaffen würden, falls wir auf dem Heimweg no
目前无法获取塔那那利佛在此期间的语音录音。塔那那利佛通信技术
Bien reçu. Vous êtes dans l'ombre
私たち
VHF AとBをオフのままにして
これはオプ
Stand by 
حسنًا. الآن يا هيوستن، يبدو أن الجهد الكهربائي جيد. وقد شهدنا 
Hallo Frank. Es ist Weihnachtsmorgen im Hause Borman. Die Jungs, Susan, deine Eltern und alle schicken dir liebe Grüße. Sie sagen, du sollst dri
Very good. We'll start 
了解。参考までに、ジャック -
हां। जैक ने प्रक्रिया पूरी की और जितने हो सके उतने पेय पदार्थ भरे, और उसने लगभग 8 औंस प्रति बैग के दस बैग तै
كين، بينما نحن هنا نمضي الوقت فقط، لاحظنا بعض الأمور غير المعتادة. الجوارب، كما تعلم، الخاصة
?:
ठीक है। अम्बिलिकल कनेक्ट करें। चरण 2, पावर 1 एसी और 2 एसी, बंद, सर्किट ब्रेकर। चरण 3, पैनल 5: सेंसर सिग्नल, मेन बी, बंद। चरण 4, पैनल... बंद। फिर मेन बी बैट बस बी, बंद। मेन बस वोल्टेज की ज
Нет, я скажу вам, это лучшая колкость, которую 
Эй, Хьюстон, Аполлон-11! Этот Сатурн по
Tranquility Base, Tra
هناك فوهة نيزكية جديدة ساطعة للغاية؛ ينبغي أن 
Я вас очень хорошо слышу, на панели отображается информация о передаче света и звука. Очевидно, ведётся запись на плёнку. Вы пон
यहां एकदम सन्नाटा पसरा है। हम बस यहां बैठे हैं औ
ヒューストン、イーグル。はっきりと聞こえました。
Да. Это вполне приемлемо. Есть кое-что, что вы можете сделать; вы можете провести его техническое обслуживание. Это довольно утомительный процесс, и именно поэтому мы хотим просто следить за ним, чтобы иметь представление до начала работ, можем ли мы рассчитывать на два контура или на один. Это подводит нас к другому вопросу, который мы пытаемся прояснить, точнее, к двум вопросам. Во-первых, мы хотели бы убедиться, что вы планируете использовать как первичный, так и вторичный котлы во время фактического ввода в эксплуатацию, а также мы ищем способ проверить первичный котел, чтобы убедиться, что он не пересох до начала работ. И это оказывается немного слож
मैंने ए-रिं
نعم. تود شركة الطيران أيضاً معرفة وضع مفتاح سخان ن
Roger. Are you satisfied with o
好了，就这些。当然，如果压力低于 770，休斯顿会要求您进入步骤 9。如果压力在
D'accord, Jack, j'ai la procédure à te lire. Avant cela, je voulais mentionner un point qui pourrait intéresser Fred. Nous surveillons la montée en pression du réservoir de supercondensateur et nous prévoyons une explosi
Diese Anzeige schwankt genau um 15 Prozent, wenn man sie rechts... nach
بيل الآن يحمل جهاز التسجيل؛ ونحن بصدد تقييم البيانات المُستخ
Rea
好的，在最后一次飞行中，我们使用地形同步摄影仪拍摄了大约38张照片，从圣地亚哥以东一点开始，直到再次遇到云层覆盖。当我们飞越美国南部，沿着阿拉巴马州和密西西比州一路南下到佛罗里达州时，我们开始断断续续地拍摄。我们拍到了一些该地区天气状况非常好的照片，然后又拍了一些杰克逊维尔附近机场的照片。我们还拍了几张科德角的照片。其中一张可能是我们拍到的最好的照片，它记录了从佛罗里达州一直延伸到德克萨斯州的整个海岸线的天气变化。一条非常清晰的天气带紧贴海岸线。之后，我们拍摄了一些佛罗里达州、古巴及其周边
Ja, ich hoffe, Sie erhalten einige gute Ergebnisse. Könnten Sie uns d
Хорошо. Это последнее, что я упустил. И пока мы ждем решения, позвольте мне продолжить. Допустимый диапазон мертвого давления составляет от 660 до 770 psi. Другими словами, любое время нарастания, которое обеспечит давление в пределах этих двух значений, позволит поддерживать давление ниже критического уровня приме
收到，阿波罗8号。我们没有什么需
Roger, capito, dalle 18 alle 22. A Rev 12 su RKV sarò aggi
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, hier spricht Texas Com Tech. Können 
いいえ、何が起こっているかというと、私たちがときどき窓にかなり近づくと、自動ライト制御
नहीं, यह शायद हमारे द्वारा गिम्बल 
هل مفتاح المنا
네, 알겠습니다. 감사하다는 말씀 감사합니다. 저희는 지금 여기서 온갖 새로운 절차들을 개발하느라 아주 즐겁게 일하
يا للأسف، لم يتبقَّ سوى أقل من نصف ساعة للعب بهذه الطائرة. سأستخدم الآن نظام التحكم الإلكتروني بالطيران على مستوى منخفض. سأحرر الجيروسكوبات لخفض زاوية الميل لمراقبة أضواء ديربان. الجيروسكوبات حرة، نظام التحكم الإلكتروني بالطيران على مستوى منخفض، تصحيح، سأستخدم الآن التحكم اليدوي
Je ne sais pas. J'ai encore chaud et je transpire encore, mais je ne suis pas vraiment mal à l'aise. J'aimerais vraiment comprendre ce problème de température avec ma combinaison. Pour autan
네, 알겠습니다. 모두 준비된 것으로 
ह्यूस्टन
Ok, è
That's right. We - we noticed 
نعم، ما زلنا نخطط لهذا النشاط إذا كانت أطوال الحبال مناسبة، وسنقبل تلك المواقف التي ستتخذونها من أجلن
Il vous faudra maintenant prendre en compte ce q
11, Houston. Könnten S
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota quattro e stiamo lavorando al quinto giorno. Naturalmente, non vediamo l'ora che
ジェミニ4号、ハワイの外科医。テレメトリの中断により、2回目の血圧測定ができ
わか
Oddio, ce ne eravamo dimenticati, ma vorremmo
Alpha/PC vers PC; INDICATEUR DE LANCEMENT DU VÉHICULE vers GPI; INCLINAISON et LAYAUGLEMENT DE LA CARROSSERIE 
वहाँ दो ब्रेकर हैं; वहाँ द
Bien. Une fois au quatrième rang, 
هذا صحيح تماماً. لقد نسيت بالضبط
자, 잭. 다음 단계는 큐 카드를 이용해서 용기 윗부분에 아치 모양을 만드는 겁니다. 큐 카드의 
好的。我会告诉你 Al
全部綺麗になったってことだよ。綺麗に焼けたから、全然…違う色に見えないんだ。銅色、青銅色、酸素セルの色。焼けたのを見たから焼けたんだ。そうか。地
Roger. This is just for free. This isn't w
スーツの電源をオンオフしていたんだけど、それだとBIOMEDが定期的にオフになるから。そうす
Okay, down at the bottom of th
这里是超高频低频段的友谊七号电台。你们能收到吗？
私は今起きたばかりですが、あなたは
И это всё,
Roger, Zwillinge VI. Hier spricht Tananarive. Auf mei
ええと、彼らは私が見た粒子がそこから来たと考えたのでしょう。でも、これらは何千個もあって、私から何マイルも離れた方向に飛び出していて、
Отлично, отлично. Да, это – прекрасно. Боже, это красиво. Здесь нет ни малейшего намека на то, ч
收到。指示灯工作正常。我不太确定我离它有多远。我
Ok. Un pa
Roger, as-tu l'impressio
Ampia larghezza del fascio. Ri
Tu nous 
了解。コン
حسناً ي
Послушайте, нас не волнует бак с питьевой водой, но бак с отходами нас очень волнует, поэтому на всякий случай, ес
Roger. Nous allons nous en occuper. La lentille sensible à la lumière est celle que vous utilisiez. Il 
Okay. Panel 3: the first three lines have been taken care of already in my beginning in the backout procedure, so starting with MODE, VOICE, that
हमने आवृत्ति को थोड़ा सा बदलने की कोशिश की ताकि हस्तक्षेप कम हो सके। मुझे लगता है कि यह काम करेगा - हम चाहते हैं कि आप उतरने के समय ऑक्सीजन चालू करें और चढ़ने के समय ऑक्सीजन बंद करें। ओवर। और फॉरवर्ड ओम्नी का अनुरोध क
好的
Eagle, Columbia. Il mio P22 è completo. Continuo la manovra in assetto AGS C
了解。カラーフィルムがどれくらい残っているか教えていただけますか？ハッセルブラッドと16mmカメラの推
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies ein normaler Systembetrieb ist. Die Kühler dürften momentan sehr kalt sein, und der von Ihnen beobachtete Temperaturabfall war of
好的。来自英国乔德雷尔班克天文台，美联社报道：英国乔德雷尔班克大型射电望远镜于美国东部时间今天下午5点49分停止接收来自苏联无人登月探测器“月球15号”的信号。一位发言人表示，“月球15号”飞船似乎“已经飞越月球”。另一则消息称：“我们认为它没有着陆，”天文台台长伯纳德·洛弗尔爵士的发言人说道。华盛顿合众国际社报道：副总统斯皮罗·T·阿格纽呼吁在2000年前将人类送上火星，但民主党领导人回应称，必须优先考虑地球上的需求。阿格纽是周三阿波罗11号发射时在场的最高级别政府官员，他当时说“依我之见，我们应该在本世纪末之前将人类送上火星”，显然他当时是在代表自己，而不是代表尼克松政府。德克萨斯州拉雷多，美联社报道：新拉雷多的移民官员周三宣布，除非嬉皮士洗澡理发，否则将被拒绝发放旅游签证入境墨西哥。新拉雷多墨西哥移民局局长胡贝托·卡萨拉斯表示，墨西哥城、阿卡普尔科和其他热门旅游景点的当局都收到了关于嬉皮士的投诉。合众国际社报道：尼克松总统宣布周一联邦雇员放假，以便他们能够庆祝参与阿波罗11号登月任务的全国性纪念日，这一决定最初引发了人们的惊讶。美联社伦敦记者罗德尼·比德纳报道：阿波罗11号任务让欧洲为之疯狂。整个欧洲大陆的报纸都刊登了土星五号火箭发射升空，建立地球与其天然卫星月球之间首次联系的图片。报纸的标题撰写者们绞尽脑汁，寻找合适的词语来赞美这一壮举。法国《费加罗报》宣称：“人类历史上最伟大的冒险已经开始”，该报用了四版篇幅报道了来自卡纳维拉尔角的发射消息和任务示意图。小报《巴黎日报》则宣称：“全世界都为他们喝彩！”共产党的日报《人道报》以发射照片作为头版，并在最后一版刊登了一篇热情洋溢的登月报道，描述了倒计时和发射过程、宇航员的妻子和家人，以及月球活动的背景信息。纽约州亨普斯特德：乔·纳马斯周三正式前往霍夫斯特拉大学的纽约喷气机队训练营报到。此前，他与队友就他与职业橄榄球联盟主席彼得·罗泽尔的分歧举行了闭门会议。伦敦合众国际社：英国上议院周三得到保证，一艘美国小型潜艇不会“伤害
यहां से आप चीजों को काफी दूर तक फेंक सकते
Потом, когда я выстрелил из бутылки, и потом, почти все, что произошло... с тех пор, как все началось, я вернулся к CMC, AUTO... которые меня беспокоили. И как раз в это время все эти.
Et pour votre information, Houston, lorsque le soleil brille sur la fenêtre numéro 5, c'est assez brumeux; la fenêtr
Okay, Jack. Der Druck in O2-Tank 1 scheint knapp übe
आप क
フレッドさん、画面の4分の1
Très bien, ça me va; je peux le laisser là. Je ne sais pas comment je m'en sortirais, mais… 
ठीक है। हम ज़मीन पर आपसे कुछ नहीं कहेंगे। अगर आपको किसी चीज़ की ज़रूर
让我说完。好的。我就知道是这样。BAT Charlie BAT CHARGE/2，关闭；BAT Baker POWER ENTRY/POS
E anche questo non è corretto. I giroscopi sono... sono a posto; ma in standby ASCS. Potrebbe essere un problema di orientamento. Mi orienterò visivamente e... vedrò se questo risolverà i
Roger. Vérification informatique de tous les modes. Insérez 10 pieds/seconde dans tous les IVI, appuyez sur le voyant de dysfonctionnement, puis sur le bouton de démarrage du calculateur. Éteignez l'ordinateur pendant 2 second
روجر. 
11, यह ह
रॉजर, जिम। मेरे पास एक छोटी सी प्रक्रिया है जिसे मैं आपको पढ़कर सुनाना चाहता हूँ और समझाना चाहता हूँ कि यह क्या है। आपकी W-मैट्रिक्स कुछ मेमोरी लोकेशन साझा करती है; इसलिए, आपके पास जो W-मैट्रिक्स है वह ठीक नहीं है, और हम नहीं चाहते कि आप उस मैट्रिक्स के साथ अपनी खोज जारी रखें। इसलिए, जो प्रक्रिया मैं आपको बताने जा रहा हूँ, उससे अगली बार जब आप लॉग इन करेंगे, उससे पहले मैट्रिक्स स्वयं को पुनः आरंभ कर देगी। और इससे आप उस W-मैट्रिक्स के मान पर वापस आ जाएँगे जिसे आपने 3303 वाली घटना के बाद लोड किया था। और यदि इससे उड़ान योजना पर कोई और प्रभाव पड़ता है, तो हम उसे सुलझाने की प्रक्रिया में हैं, और यदि आवश्यक हुआ, तो हम आपको बाद में एक संशोधित खोज कार्यक्रम भेजेंगे, जिसमें संच
في الحقيقة، 
قدمين، وضعية الوقوف
Bitte beachten Sie, 
Nei
Roger. 40 2711 398 033, unten 043, links 23, plus 0832 minus 16500 12956 36208; nördliche Sternengruppe bleibt Sirius und Rigel; Rollen, Nicken und Gieren bleiben gleich: 129 155 010, Tankinhalt bleibt zwei Quads für 20 Sekunden, Quads B und D; Horizont auf der
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们的操作人员说，瞄准
रॉजर, जीन। मैं कहता हूँ कि सुबह 5 बजे की पिछली रिपोर्ट के 
Хорошо, Джим. Мне показалось, что лучше всего будет, 
Roger, Gemini 4. How were
Oui, absolument, Bill. Ils peuvent vous fournir n'importe quel numéro pré
Хьюстон, и два других космических аса уже на старте, а LMP
13, Houst
罗
हा हा। बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। मुझे लगता है उन्हें यह
Tu m'as at
分かりました。マイナス6時間、正確には6分で、MODE CONTROLのATT HO
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 오늘 오전에 시도했던 통신에 대한 녹취록을 읽어보니, 마이크 씨가 입력 후 엔터 키를 두 번 누르셨을 때 통신이 갑자기 폭주했었죠. 그와 관련
Okay. GMTB 15 43 23. ΔV di 139. Durata della combustione: 2 minuti e 39 secondi. Il tuo 15 55 24. Rotola a sinistra 55. GMTRB 16 05 28. Rotola a destra 65. GMT 4
Roger. Für Sie um 101 2
11, we'd like you to shift to an OMNI antenna configuration at the present time. We're 
Roger. The LMP is going to take a little snooze here for a w
Roge
That's affirmative. We also have the computer test for you. Are you prepared t
पुनः स्थापित करने के लिए। आ
كاب كوم. هل يمكنك تزويدنا بمعلومات عن توقيت غرينتش؟ لقد فاتن
Vous
好的，休斯顿。中央面板——我正在查看指示器 A。组件温度约为 180 度。氦气压力为 3900。我看到燃料压力约为 180 度，百分比约为 85%。
كيف حال وايت العج
Доктор, имейте в виду, у меня большие проблемы с этой манжетой для измерения артериального давления. Она никак не дер
This is Sigma Seven. A 30 second HF check, at minutes commencing at 10 seconds after that. This is a 30 second duration test, as I pass down through the coast of Baja California, enroute to South - South America. Every system is working very properly. I have 5 more seconds of check to go. Test out. Sigma Seven. Switching to UHF for relay
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. استمتع بإطلالة رائعة على الساحل الأفريقي، سواء من خلال المنظار أو من النافذة. الإطلالة من النافذة هي الأفضل
Roger, Al. I am in auto; retro; the gyro switches are normal; maneuver is off. The capsule is prepared for retrosequence but for stowing two charts. I'm sure we're go. I have 81 percent auto, (fuel) 80 percent manual (fuel), which is the same as my intermediate report. The
حسنًا. السبب الذي يدفعنا إلى إجراء حرق شعاعي هو زيادة تصحيح منتصف المسار حتى نتمكن من استخدام
Okay. On panel 250, circuit breaker BAT A, POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING, close; on panel 275, circuit breaker INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B, close. Next several circuit breakers are on panel 5; circuit breaker BAT RELAY BUS, BAT A, close; circuit breaker SENSOR UNIT, AC BUS 2, close; CB SENSOR SIGNAL, AC2, close; CB BATTERY CH
Хорошо. Тогда это будет 
네. 색깔을 보면, 바다는 전체적으로 진한 파란색이고, 구름은 당연히 밝은 흰색입니다. 지표면에 반사된 빛은 달빛보다 훨씬 더 크게 보입니다. 육지는 대체로 갈색을 띠는데, 어두운 갈색에서 밝은 갈색까지 다양합니다. 여러 기상 현상으로 인해 생긴 소용돌이 모양의 구름들이 많이 보입니다. 멕시코만 입구에서 대서양을 가로지르는 긴 권운 띠도 보입니다. 명암 경계선은 지금 대서양을 남북으로 가로지르고 있습니다. 남반구는 거의 완전히 구름으로 덮여 있고, 북극 
मैं चार्
En ce moment, il fait jour du côté de Jim, et de mon côté, je peux encore distinguer quelques étoiles. Il semblerait qu'on puisse orienter le vaisseau de façon à ce qu'un côté soit dans l'obscurité, tandis que l'autre est éclairé par la lumière du jour. Le côté de Jim est clairement éclairé en ce moment, et le mien est dans l'obscurité. C'est l'une des choses qui m'a le plus surpris au début du vol, lorsque j'observais les petites lucioles qui scintillaient depuis le propulseur et que je remarquais à quel point il faisait sombr
Okay. I can verify that we are in that configuration with the exception of panel 382, the water accumulator
حسنًا. أقل بقليل من 13. وللعلم فقط، لدينا فريق يعمل على عدة مواضيع. نعمل حاليًا على المرحلة المتوسطة القادمة لتحديد نظام التحكم وكيفية استخدامه مع النظام الذي نختاره، وماذا نفعل بشأن المحاذاة. لدينا نظام إدارة القمر (LMS) وفريقان يعملان بجد على ذلك. كما نعمل أيضًا على دخولنا، وكيف ومتى يجب تفعيله. ونعمل أيضًا على حالة الأنظمة. غدًا سنجري فحصًا للحافلة الرئيسية B، لذا لدينا فريق كبير يعمل بجد هنا، ولدي بعض إعدادات فتحة العدسة (f-stop) لكاميرا سطح القمر. عند سرعة 1/250،
Since we did not hear any of 
रॉजर। समझ गया; यह कथित तौर पर एक गैर-प्रणोदक वेंट है। बड़ा ब्लोडाउन पैंतरेबाज़ी, यह ब्लोडाउन स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी शुरू करता है, और वेंट 
نعم، يمكننا 
好的，吉姆。这些断路器分别是：11号配电盘第三排最右侧“照明”下方的“报
मुझे कुछ भी दिखाई नहीं दे रहा 
ربما يكون الأمر أس
Таким образом, мы опережаем расп
रॉजर, बज़। समझ गया कि खिड़कियों से बाहर देखने पर आपको पूरा लैंडिंग एरिया दिखाई देगा। 
了解。待機しておき
Houston, le
准备
Vorremmo sapere quali sono i tuoi piani per la riconsegna del volo stasera. Nel nostro piano di volo ti mostriamo un periodo di riposo che inizierà alle 182 circa, e cosa hai intenzione di fare in quel periodo? Terremo d'occhio il meteo e prevedia
जेमिनी 4, हवाई CAP COM। आपको सूचित कि
حسنًا. مع و
سيجما سفن
ठीक है। मध्य प्रशांत क्षेत्र के लिए, सामान्य स्थिति अच्छी है। आप 2000 फुट की ऊंचाई पर बिखरे हुए बादलों, 10 मील की दृश्यता, 070 की गति से 12 की रफ्तार से हवा, 4 फुट की लहरों और 2974 के अल्टीमीटर की उम्मीद कर सकते हैं। सूर्योदय 10 ज़ुलू समय पर और पहली रोशनी 16:49 ज़ुलू समय पर होगी। जहाज यॉर्कटाउन होगा; विमान एयरबॉस नंबर 1 और 2, और रिकवरी विमान 1, 2 और 3 होंगे। जहाज तक पहुंचने का अनुमानित समय - यॉर्कटाउन लक्ष्य बिंदु पर है, एयरबॉस विमान 15 मिनट में घटनास्थल पर कमांडर के रूप में मौजूद होगा। रिकवरी विमान 1, 2 और 3 SH3 अल्फ़ा विमान हैं, और वे यॉर्कटाउन के साथ जा रहे हैं, इसलिए वे लक्ष्य बिंदु पर हैं। उन सभी में तैराक सवार हैं। यदि रिकवरी विमान को अंतरिक्ष यान से कोई सूच
Je voulais juste vérifier l'heure avec vous. Quand voulez-vous qu'on commence à accélérer le rythme? On vient de trouver notre ry
Mike, we're within 3 fe
D'accord. Encore deux étapes. Étape 6: restez sur l'antenne à gain élevé dans ce mode pendant deux secondes. Ne 
And I won'
Ricevuto. Saremo tra circa 30 secondi e verremo
Roger. Request th
हाँ, बिल्कुल। अगली तीन पंक्तियों में हमें के
Neil
Qua
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। आप 4 मिनट और 40 सेकंड दूर हैं। कृपया पुष्टि करें कि आपका एस-बैंड ऑक्स स्विच डाउन-वॉइस
ريترو فاير - ريترو فاير أكثر متعة
Ehi,
दस,
Los ge
Okay. Hier die wichtigsten Infos: Ihre Fluglage ist bis auf die Rollbewegung eigentlich ganz gut, und wir bitten Sie daher um Folgendes: Im MIN-Impulsmodus trimmen Sie bitte auf null Nickwinkel (ungefähr Ihre aktuelle Position), auf 008 Grad Rollwinkel (ca. 16 Grad weniger als Ihre aktuelle Rolllage) und auf null Grad Gierwinkel (ungefähr Ihre aktuelle Position). Ans
Bene. Ques
Gemini
좋아요, 테이프를 보관할 새로운 장소가 필요해
시그마 세븐, 캡콤,
네. 알겠습니다. 이 시계로 확인해 보면, 지금으로부터 약 30분 후
आपके पास काफी समय है। रीएंट्री एटीट्यूड में आने के लिए फ्लाई-
네, 그렇습
Okay. Good deal. That's been the high tank and apparently while waiting for that pressure switch to close
Ok, MARK. Quattro minuti per il controllo dell'alta portata di O2. Ora passiamo alla pri
It's there, but it's not dab-smack in the middle of the sextant; it's off, I would 
Роджер. Мы сч
ورقم 13، هيوستن. إذا رغ
ठीक है। मैं आपको बताता हूँ, मैं जैक से कॉन्फ़िगरेशन करवा लेता हूँ। वो इसे लिख लेगा और मैं उससे - हम 
そうですね、シ
Roger. En consultant le plan de vol, vous avez un alignement prévu à A, et nous devrons en effectuer un autre à A en préparation du suivant. Les procédures au sol permettent de reporter l'alignement et de ne le faire qu'une seule fois à A, ou vous pouvez le faire directement à l'emplacement prévu dans le plan de vol. Si vous préférez ignorer
罗杰。哥伦比亚号飞船上的各位居民或许会感兴趣，今天是哥伦比亚的独立日。菲律宾的格洛丽亚·迪亚兹昨晚荣膺环球小姐桂冠。她击败了其他60位佳丽，摘得全球选美桂冠。迪亚兹小姐今年18岁，黑发黑眸，三围是34.5-23-34.5。亚军是澳大利亚小姐，以色列小姐和日本小姐分列第三和第四。周二晚上你们返回地球的时候，美国联盟和国家联盟的全明星队将在华盛顿进行比赛。预计洋基队的梅尔·斯托特尔迈尔将担任美国联盟的首发投手。目前还没有人预测谁会是国家联盟的首发投手。他们的名单上有九位投手。虽然太空计划的研究成果显著，但研究并非总能带来回报，这一点似乎已成定局。伍德斯特里姆公司（Woodstream Corporation）是美国动物捕鼠器公司（Animal Trap Company of America）的母公司，该公司生产了超过十亿个木制弹簧捕鼠器。该公司表示，他们制造了一种更好的捕鼠器，但市场反应冷淡——根本无人问津。事
了解しました。お忙しいとは存じ上げておりますので、ご迷惑をおかけすることはございません。進捗状況を確認しております。順調に進ん
Oui. Vous vous souvenez que j'ai commencé du côté de la paroi où se trouvait la caméra de télévision. J'ai prélevé plusieurs échantillons de roches en surface, ainsi que d'autres juste en dessous, à environ 6 mètres au nord de la paroi. Puis je me suis rappelé que cette zone avait probablement été bien balayée par les gaz d'échappement du moteur de descente. J'ai donc traversé vers le côté sud et prélevé des échantillons autour du double cratère allongé dont nous avons parlé, ainsi que d'autres plus loin. J'ai essayé de prélever autant de types
いいえ、もし右側の列にそれら全てについて何か
Roger, vous voulez que nous construisions une cabine jusqu'à 5,
Yes, it's, I can't really tell for sure even through the monocular that i
Sixième point, c'est… Lovell t'a dit de faire ça
罗杰。3-4是120。2+36。19 34
뭔가가 정말 많이 섞여 있었네요. 아래를 내려다보면서 생각했던 것
Плюс стандартная конфигу
Ricevuto. Riceviamo. E questo vale per la ste
큰 경기인 애스트로 블루 보닛 게임을 위해 SMU와 오클라호마 대학이 도착했습니다. 농구 빅매치에 이어 열리는 이 경기를 앞두고 선수들은 들뜬 분위기입니다. 어느 팀이 우세한지는 나와 있지 않네요. 나중에 확인해보고 우세팀이 있는지 알려드리겠습니다. 데이비스 컵은 현재 호주에서 진행 중이며, 미국은 다시 한번 우승을 탈환하기 위해 노력하고 있습니다. 오늘 경기에서는 미국이 우승 후보로 꼽히고 있습니다. 또 다른 소식으로는 O.J. 심슨이 월터 캠프 풋볼 재단에서 2년 연속 대학 풋볼 올해의 선수로 선정되었다는 것입니다. 어제 말씀드렸듯이 우디 
这些
了解です。二次アキュムレータの流量が減少していない場合は、二次グリコールからラジエーターバルブへの流量を「通常」に戻します。次のステップとして、二次冷却液ループポンプ（AC 1 または AC 2）を起動します。3分後、グリコール排出二次圧力が39～51 psigであることを確認します。また、二次蒸発燃料出力温度が変化していることを確認します。次
Roger. R
Роджер. 50 минут и 18 секунд. Температура на входе в радиатор — 73, на выходе — 38. Всё выг
そうです。そして残
Roger. Appar
Roger. Il nuovo tempo One
Closing visor. Okay. Let's take a look and see where we are. At this point we made a dosimeter check. I will pitch down on fly-by-wire to reentry attitude. Now let's 
The ES sensor i
Bene, i ganci di aggancio sembrano a posto 
Apollo 13, Houston. Ich habe die Plus 90 und Lift-Off Plus 8 Pads, wann immer Sie bereit sin
المدفأة مطفأة. لم نقم بف
알았어, 조. 5번 창밖에서 방금 다시 떨어지는 물체를 잡았어. 그러니까 확실히 패널이었던 것 같아. 지금 이 시간에 우리가 S-IV 근처에 있었
No, dirò loro solo che parte di quell'addestramento ha dato i s
D'accord. La prochaine fois, je mettrai mon chapeau et j'entendra
Ja. Okay, der Sauerstoffdruck ist jetzt auf 925 gesunken und wir beatmen seit zwei Minuten mit hohem Sauersto
Apollo 8, this is Houston reading you fairly weak. I'll repeat the state vector information. Your state vector is now based on 5 hours, more than 5 hours of tracking. We show you on a pericynthian of 69.7 miles with a free return with entry path flight angle of minus 14 degrees. Will only need a few feet per second at the lunar distance to get you back on a nominal entry angle
Ricevuto. 104. 2+15. GMTRC 01 giorni, 00 ore, 52 minuti, 14 secondi. 13+4
J'ai dema
I can see some
11. D'ici, sur les images de télémétrie, tous vos systèmes sem
Roger. Ora abbiamo un aggancio... a 21:50 avevamo un'autonomia di 22,24 miglia nautiche... a 22 più 00 avevamo un'autonomia di 17,63 miglia nautiche e abbiam
Tranquility Base, Houston. Abbiamo esaminato la checklist e l'unic
Okay. In Feld 5 die Leistungsschalter POWER 1 und 2 öffnen. Dann den Netzschalter (POWER) zurücksetzen und loslassen. In Feld 11 und Feld 16 die Verbindung zum Translunarbus herstellen. Beide Leistungsschalter schließen. In Feld 16 den Leistungsschalter ASCENT ECA CONTROL schließen. In Feld 16 den Leistungsschalter DESCENT ECA CONTROL schließen. In Feld 14 die normale Zuleitung von Batterie 5 einschalten
... ha un bell'aspe
ロジャー、あなたの状況
Роджер. Плюс 0888, минус 16500 12955 36185, выравнивание без изменений, зазор без изменений, горизонт 1 градус в точке зажигания минус три. Предполагается 2. Све
Ricontrolla che la mascherina sia chiusa e bloccata. Casco bloccato, guanti indossati, ingresso-uscita a "Y" e tubi ECS liberi. E poi farò un controllo della tuta da pilota di comando, che ho già fatto... per controllare il flusso. Blocco del portello APERTO. Poi hai altre cose da controllare. Quando avviamo effettivamente la modalità di depressurizzazione, la va
罗杰。不适用，另加 00188 30193 255 30008 40 2742 396 0
Loud and clear. I
La temp
आपको इस
Hey, James. This is Shakey, the Assistant Surgeon. How's the 
D'accord. C'était 74 30? Vous voulez qu'on act
당신은 엔진이 의도치 않게 시동되는 일이 없는지 항상 모니터링하고 있는 거
Roger. Entrée lunaire, MPL: 359 152 001 194 46 03 267, plus 1102, moins 17203 068 36194 656 11894 36275; 195 03 03 0027, quatre NA, 400 02 
Base Tranquility, ici Houston. Nos données télémétriques indiquent q
D'accord. Ceci concerne le transfert du matériel. Le filtre et le sac du ventilateur de cabine doivent être placés dans le sac. Ensuite:
Je crois 
Certaines de ces petites dépressions ont tendance à s'affaisser – d'environ 5 à 7 cm. Cela correspond exactement à ce que les photos du géomètre ont montré
Okay. And, close BAT FEED TIES, CROSSTIE BAL LOAD, and open the CROSS TIE BUS. Close the next three; open ASCENT ECA CONTROL, ASCENT ECA, and INVERTER 1. C
لم يكن هناك الكثير من الحطام
Roger, Houston. Reading you
Антенна выбрана для входа в атмосферу, и она уже включена. Индикатор уровня топлива RCS-B, и я уже установил его на B. Количество выключено. Количество выключено. Укажите ретроградное положение, и я... хотя, дум
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हम इस समय टेप रिकॉर्डर को रिवाइंड कर रहे हैं। समा
Sigma 
अगर आप इसे 3 फीट प्रति सेकंड की गति से जलाते हैं, और प्लेटफ़ॉर्म पर 10 डिग्री का भी विचलन होता है, तो डेल्टा-वी ऑपरेशन के लिहाज़ से इसे देखना हमारे लिए मुश्किल होगा। तो क्यों न हम - जैसे ही हम स्टेज पर पहुँचें, इसे थोड़ी देर के लिए SEF मोड में डाल दें। ठीक है, ऑर्बिट रेट पर जाने से 5 मिनट पहले। ठीक ह
Mein Gott, Jerry. Die Erde sieht aber klei
Да, Джим, подтверждаю. 
Okay. And I'll have a consumables update for you in a little while, and I have a small flight plan update for you sometime a little later on when y
كولومبيا، كولومبيا، هذه هيوستن. سنفقد اتصالك على أجهزة الإر
हां, मैंने किया। और हमें लगभग 20 पाउंड सावध
حسنًا. بعد 47 ساعة، بلغ إجمالي القراءات 1096، موزعة كالتالي: ألفا 270، برافو 278، تشارلي 270، دلتا 278، والهيدروجين (H2). أعطوني قراءة الهيدروجين (H2) كنسبة مئوية، 76%؛ وقراءة الأكسجين (O2) 81%. مع ذلك، تُظهر قراءة خزان الأكسجين الثاني (O2) الآن قراءة مرتفعة جدًا خارج النطاق. نحن على يقين تام بأن هذا عطل في الحساس. نرجو منك التحقق من ذلك باست
Dispiegamento del pallone, ora. Il pallone è fuori e via. Io, io lo vedo molto lontano, ma... credo che ora sia molto lontano, e si stia allontanando costantemente. Non vedo la linea. Non vedo che sia stato fatto alcun tentativo d
We'
Das ist richtig. Okay. Weiter: die nächste Kamera – Moment 1. Hier gibt es Rauschen. Okay. Die nächste Kamera ist die 16-mm-Kamera, und diese Fotos haben Priorität 3. Okay. Nehmen Sie die 16-mm-Kamera und den Akku von A-8. Nehmen Sie das 10-mm-Objektiv und entfernen Sie es. Nehmen Sie das 18-mm-Objektiv von B-3 und setzen Sie es an die Kamera. Schließen Sie das Stromkabel an, stellen Sie die Bildrate auf 12 Bilder pro Sekunde ein, und die gleiche Datenleitung, die ich Ihnen zuvor gegeben habe, hat diesmal folgenden Inhalt: /DAC/18/CEX, Akku (f/8 und 1/250 Sek.). Okay. Wenn Sie sich diese beiden Kameras ansehen, wird empfohlen, die 16-mm-Kamera für die ersten 2,5 Minuten zu verwenden und dann zur 70-mm-Kamera zu wechseln. Das liegt unter anderem daran, dass der Bildausschnitt – oder die Kamera – für Nahaufnahmen un
Die Drehratensensoren sind deaktivier
هذا صحيح. لقد لاحظنا الاهتزاز، لكنه لم يكن شديداً لدرجة أننا اعتقدنا أن شيئاً كارثياً سيحدث؛ لقد بدأ الاهتزاز فقط، ثم أضاء ضوء EN، ثم اختفى الاهتزاز وأصب
حسنًا. لدينا عدة أمور هنا. أولًا، تذكي
حسنًا. لا أعرف ما إذا كان بإمكاننا الاستمرار في ذلك لفترة طويلة، وسأقوم بإلغاء جميع التجارب الأخرى، مثل التصوير المجسم المتقار
헬멧을 쓰고 창문을 통해 최대한 잘 보려고 고개를 돌릴 때마다 머리카락이 잘못된 방향으로 자꾸 마찰되어 
よし。まず、赤フィルター、偏光フィ
रॉजर। टीपीआईआर के तुरंत बाद हमने जो चंद्र सर्वेक्षण किया, उसकी तुलना में आपके द्वारा किए गए सर्वेक्षण 
Got 
아, 네. 필요한 내부 연결 장치는 
हम यहाँ की चीज़ों के बारे में विस्तार से बात करेंगे, लेकिन फिलहाल ऐसा लगता है कि यहाँ हर तरह के आकार, कोणीयता, कणिकता और हर प्रकार की चट्टानें मौजूद हैं। रंगों की बात करें तो, ये शून्य-चरण बिंदु के सापेक्ष देखने के नज़रिए के आधार पर बदलते रहते ह
Apollo 8, can you stand by? We'll try to get you a better ante
لا. كنت أسألك إن
ठीक है। मुझे आसपास की आवाज़ों में कुछ बदलाव महसूस 
Okay, Fred-o. Das sind die Änderungen. Nicht ganz so umfangreich wie vorher, aber immer noch ziemlich lang. Irgendwel
मैंने प
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ وضعية مُحاذاة محور الجسم، باستخدام خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار على الأرض كما فعلنا من قبل. وبمجرد حصولنا على ذلك، سننفذ -7، وهو ما يبدو الآن وكأنه احتراق بمعدل قدمين في الثانية أو حوالي 15 ثانية. وقد أُبلغتُ أنه انخفض إلى قدم ونصف الآن، لذا فهو ضمن الحدود الآمنة. حسنًا. عند
T
कृपया ध्यान दें कि पिछली बार जब मैंने एमएससी पास के दौरान विसंगति का सामना किया, तो मुझ
Affermativo. Vorremmo confrontare le informazioni che riceviamo con le t
روجر، هيوستن. ك
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 잔지바르 캡 콤입니다. 신호는 약하지만 읽을 수 있습니다. 원격 측정 데이터는 확실합니다. 상태를 
D'accord. La première manœuvre sera une, une seule, et ce sera un / commençant par le poids, 63295 moins 163 plus 129 plus 001 36 moins 00 045 plus 002 02 345 188 343 999 99 plus 016 85 002 48 002 001 86 23 2013 164 012 vers le haut 276, à gauche 04, novembre Alfa pour le reste de cette colonne. Dans les 
ठीक है, वैंस। यह कमांड मॉड्यूल है: केबिन फैन फिल्टर और बैग; डीकंटैमिनेशन बैग, टीवी कैमरे के लिए 
Ich habe Ihre 21-4 Backup-Richtlinien erhalten. Sind Sie bereit, 7 zu kopiere
Roger. Io... per tua informazione, l'ho aumentato solo leggermente. Le mie letture ora sono 7 [ps
هيوستن، أبولو 
了解、ビル。ありがとう。ご都合がよろしければ、占星術の結果を教えていただけますか？とりあえず、それで大丈夫です。最初の星、14番は、だいたい…くらいま
Okay, gut. Okay. Ich kann jetzt mit der Prozedur beginnen. Wenn Sie antworten, sprechen Sie bitte lauter ins Mikrofon, da unsere Verbindung ziemlich störanfällig ist. Als Erstes möchten wir Sie bitten, Folgendes zu tun. Wir führen das an einer Dose durch und lassen Sie es dann an der zweiten wiederholen. Nehmen Sie also eine der Dosen und schneiden Sie den äußeren Beutel ab. Schneiden Sie dazu entlang einer der Heißsiegelnähte. Gehen Sie dabei vorsichtig und nah an der Heißsiegelnaht vor, da wir den äußeren Beut
Ja
Roger. Nous étions surtout curieux de connaître la quantité relative d'humidité entre, par exemple, la nuit dernière et la nui
Roger. Certo che sì. Le indicazioni indicano che il sistema sta iniziando a scaldarsi un po' e pensiamo che il computer si accenderà pr
ところで、ジャ
そ
いいえ、でもスイッチの組み合わせがおかしいんです。ACMEの電源を入れ
And once again, we need a small attitude correction. Our earth is disappearing up and to the right. Our earth and your earth. The wrong way, wrong way. A little bit mor
Roger. We'll give you the
ああ、ごめん、フレッド。今は君の声が聞こえないんだ。もう少し待
حسنًا. في قائمة التحقق G/8-2، ضمن الخطوة 5، توجد عبارة "تعطيل جميع المحركات النفاثة في طائرتين رباعيتين متجاورتين"، وهذا ما كنا نشير إليه عندما قلنا "تعطيل الطائرتين الرباعيتين A وB". هذا صحيح؛ ولكن، بالانتقال الآن إلى الخطوة 7 حيث تقول "تفعيل جميع المحركات النفاثة"، نأمل ألا تكون قد ظننت أننا نقصد ترك الطائرتين A وB معطلتين. في هذه الحالة، فالأمر كما هو مكتوب. يجب تفعيل جميع المحركات ال
لا بد أن هذا... خفيف. إنه 55 ز
Bene. Poi, dopo questo
Понял. Роджер. Свалка остановлена
吉姆，如果你有空，你
रॉजर। समझ गय
Wir sollten diesen Sauerstoff verbrauchen und ihn 
静海基地，这里是休斯顿。上行链路已
Хорошо, теперь вот — для наглядности, вот усилитель мощности, выключен; транспондер выключен; инвертор переменного тока, 2, выключен; и последний на панели 250, CB BAT Baker POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING, открыт; а затем выполните действия в обратном порядке, как вы мне дали, и вернитесь назад, например, я бы начал с 
Roger. 2 Delta et 2 Echo sont toujours nominaux.
はい、はい。ジム、ちょっと話が逸れましたね。では、バーン姿勢からボールを​​使ってやってみましょう。ロールはどちらかの方向に90度、ピッチとヨーは0度に保ってください。
パトリックの気象事務所の人たちは山頂についての報告を欲しがっていたが、我々が言えるのは、我々が彼らより上にいるということだけ
Non, je l'ai perdu. Il y avait comme de gros bras qui en sortaient. Je ne l'ai eu qu'une minute. J'ai pris quelques photos avec une caméra et une avec le Hasselblad; mais j'ét
알겠습니
D'accord. Oui, je reçois tout ça. Je crois que vous avez quatre ou cinq repères sur
Apollo 8, prima di iniziare, vorremmo chiederti di azzerare l'ottica e di leggere i dati meccanici delle u
Okay. NOME 71: abbiamo usato 30 e 37, quattro palle 1; NOM
So, wir sind fast im Schlafmodus; wartet einfach bis 1 Uhr, und sobald wir da sind, finde ich heraus, wo sie
ठीक है, जैक, अब मेरे पास जो है वो है LEVVA, जिसे पहले भी दिखाया जा चुका है। ये सतह पर पहनने वाला एक हेडगारमेंट है, और मैं जिम का LEVVA यहाँ दिखा रहा हूँ ताकि कुछ MODs भी दिखा सकूँ। पहले एक समस्या ये थी कि सतह पर मौजूद किरदारों को ठीक से अलग-अलग पहचानना मुश्किल था। तो, जिम के सूट पर न सिर्फ लाल धारियाँ हैं, बल्कि जैसा कि आप देख सकते हैं, उसके LEVVA पर भी एक लाल धारी है। और अब आप यहाँ एक और MOD भी देख सकते हैं, जैक, जिसे मैंने खुद पहले नहीं देखा था। मुझे लगता है कि एपिसोड 12 में, पीट और A1 ने आँखों में धू
Roger. Per quanto riguarda i voti di Jim, vorremmo otte
Okay. Auf CB 11, bitte die RENDEZ
Zwillinge
هيوستن، برج
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप चाहें तो ही दूसरा कॉल करें। ब्रेक। और हां, कोलंबिया, जब मौका मिले
Okay. Ich werde jeweils die Hälfte
这是友谊七号。
C'è un leggero ritardo, Jim. Ci vorranno un paio di minuti prima che te lo leggiamo, e stiamo esaminando la checklist di emergenza, che si trova a pagina 5. Potresti leggerla me
D'acc
情况好多了。你现在大概在1点或2点钟方向。好多了。再往那个方向移动一点。你现在在3点钟
케이프타운에서 들은 바로는 프로펠러 스위치를 껐다가 몇 번 재
There go Sidewinder and Diamondback. God,
Утверждаю. Подтвержда
真是棒极了，我跟你
收到。你说话很清晰。只是你的语音识别系统
रॉजर, जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन सीएपी 
Ich glaube, dass sich zwei Ecken berührt haben, da sie sich beim Ausklappen nicht gleichzeitig entfalteten. Es entfaltete sich etwas ungleichmäßig, und der Untergrund war nat
आप
Как поживают ребята из VII класса? Они уезжали т
أعتقد أنك فعلت ذلك أي
यदि आप चाहें तो मैं आपको आरकेवी अधिग्रहण समय बत
और, ह्यूस्टन, मेरा बस एक ही सवाल है कि क्या आप चाहते है
«Дружба Семь», это Zanzibar Com Tech, вещание в диапазоне КВ/
Roger, Mike. Es ist der Orientierungspunkt Alfa 1: T1, 82 37 35; T2, 82 42 50. Wir sind 
Roger. Nur aus Interesse für Bill: Wir möchten kurz etwas zu den Heizungen der Kryotanks und den Lüftern sagen. Uns ist aufgefallen, dass die Heizungen normal funktionieren und sich ein- und ausschalten. Mit der Zeit erhöht sich diese Zyklusfrequenz, was auf eine leichte Schichtung im Tank hindeutet. Wenn wir d
MASTER ARM coming
حسنًا. ممتاز. الآن، الخطوة التالية هي قص فتحة مائلة في إحدى طرفي الكيس البلاستيكي بالقرب م
收到。时长为
जैक, यह ठीक है। आपको इसके लिए म
So it's no problem. You're above nomi
查理，目
Columbia, this is Houston. We request that you p
了解しました。マイク、少し前にあなたが をいじっていた時、デッドバンドを縮小したのですが、デッドバンドはその時の新しい姿勢を中心にしていると思い込んで
C'est exact, Mike. On prévoit un temps normal. On a envisagé d'augmenter la vitesse d'un cran, mais on ne pense pas que ce réglage soit optimal, vu qu'on a déjà eu un problème de combust
Je pense qu'ils sont en 
거기서 정말 신나게 즐기고 있는 것 같네요. 음
حسنًا يا ب
روجر. نحصل منك على معدل بت منخفض، وليس عالياً، وفي هذا العمل، لكي نحصل على بياناتنا، سيتعين عليك تأخير ال
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Мы получили н
Questo è certo. Il motivo per cui stiamo disattivando la logica, Jack, è per risparmiare energia. Quindi la disattiveremo e la riattiverò quando scenderemo; poi la disattiveremo di nuovo e la riattiveremo prima dell'ingresso. Giusto per farti sapere cosa 
E disattiveremo la parte della sottoportante vocale del nostro uplink verso di te per non disturbarti mentre parliamo con Tranquility Base. Se hai bisogno di noi, chiamaci e possiamo rispondere con un ritardo di circa un minuto o un minuto e mezzo nella riconfigurazione delle impostazioni. Passo
Хорош
ठीक है। एक और बात, जिसके बारे में हम आपको थोड़ी और जानकारी देना चाहते हैं। जैसा कि हमने आपको बताया, एसेन्ट एसईपी एटीट्यूड समतल में था और जेट्ट एटीट्यूड एक सामान्य सर्विस मॉड्यूल एसईपी एटीट्यूड के समान होगा, यानी यह ऊपर की ओर, त्रिज्या वेक्टर से बाहर औ
아니요, 출발선은 못 봤어요. 너무 안개가 껴서 볼 수 없었지만, 몇 마일 떨어진
わかりました、ジョー、私は今ベルを下から見ていますが、中は大丈夫そうです。ただの筋かもしれませ
짐, 레인징 기능 스위치가 레인징 위치에 있는지 확인해
Wir melden uns in Kürze wieder bei Ihnen, Jim, mit einigen
Okay, Jack. It looks like O2 tank 
Хорошо, ладно. У меня для тебя две новости, Джим. Первая касается процедуры поиска кометы Беннета примерно в это время, и я подожду, пока Джек проснётся, прежде чем передать тебе подробности. Вторая новость касается в
Columbia, ici Houston. Veuillez confirmer. Nous avons une charge pour vous. Pause. Eagle, nous sommes prêts à passer à l'étape 4. Veuillez sélectionner la voix de bande S pour VO
Okay. Copy tha
Oh, Roger, Apollo 11. W
はっきりと聞き取れました。パネル5に進みましょう。燃料電池ポ
حسنًا. سأبقي إحدى 
Roger
Okay. Ich habe jetzt die Leistungsampere: PC plus 2 Stunden,; 38.030, plus 08330, minus 00509, minus 02139, N/A, plus 00205, 08615, 4:24, 272, 081; Rest N/A. Füllstand zwei Düsen, 10 Sekunden, Gewicht 62480, Gewicht 33452; Gasprofil gl
알겠습니다. 사모아 남쪽 약 560마일 지점인 착륙 지역의 기상 예보는 다음과 
로저. 마이크, 네 말 잘 알아듣겠어
إنه هنا بالضبط.
I'm not readin
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। डि
こ
Gemini 4，RKV 外科医生。你能
顶排所有断路器全部断开
Хо
Хорошо, Джек. Начнём сверху. Итак. Криогенные баки: H2 1 показывает 230, то же самое для 2. В нашем кислородном криогенном баке 1, похоже, еле держится на уровне 300. А в криогенном баке 2 H2 1 показывает 73, 2, 74. На кислородной стороне мы видим O2 1 в количестве 76; O2 зафиксирован на максимальной шкале. Температура радиатора на первичном 
はい、バッテリーは…でもその前に、アメリカでバッテリーチェックが全て正常だったことをお伝えしたいんです。アメリカを出た直後にバッテリーチェックを
水瓶座，休
Columbia, ici Houston. Nous vous demandons de faire fonctionner les ventilateurs du réservoir d'hydrogène cryogéniq
Okay. There's not a whole lot to it. Well, let's see, we'll start with the - Let's start with sports, what the heck. The Astros survived 8 to 7, the Braves got five or six runs in the - five runs in the ninth inning, but they just made it; and in the other important game of the day, the Cubs were rained out. I have all the rest of the scores, you can tell me if you want any of them. They had earthquakes in Manila and other areas of the island of Luzon. There were three tremors and they kept the buildings shaking for about a half an hour or so, and it was about a 5 on the Richter scale. Okay, let's see. The Beatles have announced they will
好的。我的评论是—
يعمل كما ينبغي. المرحلة الأخيرة. كل 
Eagl
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们现在就尝试导出您的磁带。在目前的配置下，电路裕量不太理想。我们会检查一下。如果
Friendship S
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Wir empfangen Sie. Sobald Sie uns 
62970, minus 162, plus 129, plus 00966, plus 00552, minus 02079. Die nächsten drei sind alle Nullen, NA, plus 00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317
Roger, ich
这里有个挺有意思的小新闻，听起来挺不错的。密歇根州安娜堡市出现了一个新的青少年帮派，名叫吉尔内特帮（Gilnet Gang）。他们秘密地在安娜堡的街头游荡，有时甚至会绕过法律。他们自称“行善游击队”（Guerillas for Good）。他们做过的一些事包括：在一个晚上，他们把一座被污言秽语涂满的桥重新粉刷了一遍；把一栋被判定为危房的房子——虽然很受附近孩子欢迎，但其实很危险——用木板封了起来；把市中心那些因为争论是商家还是政府负责而空着的花坛重新种满了鲜花；修剪了繁忙路口的一丛被认为遮挡视线的树篱，这让树篱的主人很生气；清理了休伦河沿岸一段的垃圾。帮派成员都是匿名青少年，他们不求任何个人荣誉。他们的目标是打破官僚主义，把他们认为的好事办成。这个组织带有一丝宗教色彩。一位密歇根大学的助理教授说，这有点像一个跨教派的团体，他非正式地为这个团伙提供咨询。他们的名字来源于圣彼得和渔网。而且，由于地处偏远，他们与任何特定的教会都没有关联。他们的老师（同样不愿透露姓名）说，这个团体里贯穿着罗宾汉式的精神。他们的很多活动都游走在法律边缘。当正规机构运转不畅时，他们会直接行善，而不是走繁琐的官僚程序。这个团伙由大约55名高中生组成，男女都有，还有40到50名学生在毕业前就加入了这个团伙。这个团伙的构想源于一次底特律贫民窟之旅。当时，一个教会青年团体注意到了街头帮派的运作
अच्छा, देखो, अगर हम इसमें फिल्म लगा दें - अगर मैं इसमें फ
没错，巴兹；最后
请问能否提
제미니 4호, 하와이 CAP COM입니다. 대기 중
收到，请稍等。我们建议您稍等
Я не могу вставить грушу для измерения артериа
Houston,
Роджер, Джек. Не хотелось бы вас беспокоить, но 
روجر، جيم. يسعدني سماع ذلك. جا
Apollo 8, Houston. Tre posizioni dell'interruttore. Interruttore INGRESSI TELEMETRICI
На панели 8 отключены B3 и C4, и я понимаю, чт
로저. 헌츠빌, 여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. 잘 들립니다. 케이
Jim, Charlie et d'autres ont testé ça dans le simulat
We have one 16 millimeter roll on the ASA 1000 color interior film. We were thinking of shooting that during the entry, out window number 4 on a bracket, and you mig
हनीसकल नेटवर्क, गॉ
是这
Negativo. Abbiamo quattro Brav
Okay, Jack, wir müssen hier einen Schritt zurückgehen. Wenn wir der hier beschriebenen Vorgehensweise folgen wollen, bei de
Roger. Und ich habe gehört, dass Denubla, De
로저. 이해했습니다. 사진 구도는 여전히 아주 좋습니다. 다만 밝기가 순간적으로 변
Gemini
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्टन। ईगल नकल 
我想我们可能得重新调整一下。是的，杰克，我们刚才的偏航漂移速度
Ok
现在吉姆那边是白天，我这边还能看到一些星星。看来航天器可以调整方向，让一侧处于黑暗中，另一侧则沐浴在阳光下。吉姆那边现在肯定是阳光明媚，而我这边则是黑暗中。飞行初期，我从助推器上望向窗外，看着那些闪烁的萤火虫，感叹周围一片漆黑，景色奇特，这时我才意识到这一点，着实让我感到惊讶。我转头看向吉姆
Jim, we're ready to put that battery ba
Ti perderemo tra circa 30 secondi
OK. Voi
Seems so sad just a little less than a half an hour left to play with this. I am now going to fly-by-wire low. Gyros free, to pitch down to observe the Durban light. Gyros free, fly-by-wire low, correction, I am going to manual proportional at this point. I have not charged any rates so I will go back to. Clean. Over to rat
Okay, Joe. We can see it start to move. However, it doesn't seem to be a lot of d
Роджер. Я, наверное, выпил 10 глот
يا جاك، لحسن الحظ، بدأنا للتو في التنفيس قليلاً من 
Roger. Voici le compte rendu du panneau: les fusibles du panneau de gauche sont tous dans la position indiquée précédemment. Le propulseur d'appoint est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le sélecteur de mode est en mode normal (auto) et le gyroscope est en mode normal. Toutes les poignées en « T » sont enfoncées. Le délai de rétrogradation est normal et les deux éclairages de cabine sont allumés. Les filtres rouges sont activés. La fréquence basse du télémètre est activée. Les aides au sauvetage sont en mode automatique. Tous les éléments du panneau de séquence sont normaux, sauf le coussin d'atterrissage qui est en position centrale (arrêt). Le niveau de carburant est de 90 à 1
Das ist bestätigt. Okay. Reihe 3, unter TREIBER: HELIUMREGLER/ENTLÜFTUNG FÜR DEN SINNESANTRIEB sollte geöffnet sein. RENDEZVOUSRADAR STANDBY, geöffnet; LANDUNGSRAD
Подтверждаю. Следующий шаг на панели 5: нам нужно перевести переключатель MAIN BUS TIE A/C в положение BAT A/C, проверить правильность напряжения на MAIN BUS A и измерить ток на BAT A, чтобы убедиться 
Это верно. На странице 2-1, строка
مفهوم. ف
Columbia, Houston. Abbiamo un altro paio di vettori da inviarti. Arriveranno a breve e poi potrai procedere dopo averli ricevuti. 
Регулятор расхода воздуха в радиаторе ECS, о
Okay. Für euer PLA- und CLA-Update, Bereich 40-3, ist dies ein geteilter Angriff. 56 
이것은 S
天哪
Houston copia. Fu
जी हाँ, आवाज़ एकदम साफ़ आ रह
Это утвердительн
Temperatura di 
Это не везде так, но определенно есть места, где, судя по всему, наблюдается уклон вниз к 
I don'
로저, 
حسناً. النقطة الأخيرة كانت جيدة. 
好了，主S波段功率放大
और अभी भी मुझे बर्फ के टुकड़ों जैसे कुछ प्रभाव
बस हमारी यही गुजारिश है 
프렌드십
Bei der ersten Messung, die ich vorgenommen h
अगर सिस्टम टीम को किसी भी तरह की जानकारी चाहि
11号，休斯顿。我们希望在下次OMNI重新定位后，将洒水时间提前到大约171+30秒，正如我刚才提到的，新
さて…30秒… よし。さあ、もう一度やり直しましょう
لا، لم أفعل ذلك - لم أنم منذ كل ما حدث في الليلة السابقة، وذهبت للنوم لمدة 
了解。テレビについ
Не слишком сильно. Я замечаю, что это отличается от того, как было, когда я засыпал. Сейчас мы находимся под большим углом к ​​терминатору Земли, поэтому, когда мы начинали движение, мы были почти параллельны терминатору, а теперь мы нес
ठीक है। अब मैं आपको बताता हूँ कि हम क्या करने वाले हैं, क्योंकि हमने आज दोपहर इस सुरंग के बारे में एक अलग कहान
...конец. Хорошо. 5000, 100 футов в секунду — это хорошо, и я собираюсь проверить сист
オーロラ・セブン、
ठीक है। समझ गए; यह नंबर 8 है,
रॉजर, अगर आप चाहें तो इसे कॉकपिट में डालने में कोई समस्या नह
DREHBA
Я действительно чувствую, что мне становится прохладнее. 
ジョー、今すぐリチウムを投与し始めたほうがいいで
Roger. Let us do a little more detective work here and we'll s
Ich prüfe gerade die Gleichspannung. Hauptbus 24 V, isolierter Bus 27,5 V, Anschluss 1: 25 V, Anschluss 2: 25 V, Anschluss 3: 25 V. Standby-Anschluss 1: 25 V, Standby-Anschluss 2: 25 V, isolierter Anschluss: 28 V. Zurück zum Hauptbus: Lüfter 1 und 2: jeweils 115 V. Stromaufnahme: 20 A. Restsauerstoffdruck
Okay. In relationship to the midcourse correction, we'd like to put that one off until about, and it will be approximately a 25-foot-per-second burn. The reason we're delaying the burn time is to allow for better tracking as a result of the 7-1/2-foot per second you put in on the separation. We'd like to take a little more time to look at the tracking data. And the dispersions in your correction aren
الكمبيوتر لنا. نحن في وضع "بلوك"، ومتى تريد بال
지금 잠망경으로 일출이 보이기 시작합니다. 야간 쪽 때문에 이번 궤도에서 잠망경으로 들어오는 첫 번째 빛입니다. 야간 쪽에서는 역행 자세에서 잠망경이 전혀 작동하지 않는다는 것이 분명합니다. 제가 처음으로 빛을 받는 것은 바로 지금입니다. 일출이 잠망경을 통해 꽤 빠르게 들어오고 있
Our Agena looks in fine shape. The TDA is out. It's Rigidized. The whiskers are sticki
अपोलो 11, अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपको
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous avons regretté votre absence concernant le DELTA-TI
CMC verified; AUTO
Cosa -... il tempo è 36 e qualcosa
Beh, preferirei farl
分かりました。では、じっと待ちましょう。良い準備ができました。あなたが何かを入力するまで
地球の揺れがひどくなってきているようです。地球は窓の一番
ثم ال
That's affirm. I'll give
ちょうど今、メシエ・クレーター群の上空を飛行していて、垂直に下から見下ろしています。メシエAのクレーターの底には、かなり大きな岩塊が見えます。今の高度は分かりませんが、いずれにしてもかなり大きな岩塊で
Ed iniziò a stivare le cose e, non appena arrivammo al punto in cui non era più possibile armeggiare con il booster, iniziai ad aiutarlo a tempo pieno, almeno tenendo le cose, stivandole e cercando di evitare che sparissero. Più velocemente lavoravamo, più eravamo indietro. Non perché non stessimo sistemando le cose come dovevano essere, ma ci volle molto più tempo del previsto. In realtà non era molto più facile a gravità zero che nel simulatore, seppur altrettanto facile. Quindi lavorammo a tutto campo. Quando arrivammo a Carnarvon, avevo deciso che non ce l'avremmo fatta, ma pensavo che avremmo continuato ancora un po'. Quando arrivammo a Carnarvon, o poco prima ancora di partire, mi fu chiaro che non potevamo superare la depressurizzazione. Chiesi di passare all'orbita successiva. Poi... riprendemmo fiato per circa 20 minuti e cercammo di sistemare la roba che avevo in giro nella cabina di pilotaggio. Poi ho tirato fuori la checklist e l'abbiamo ripassata in dettaglio per assicurarci di non aver saltato nulla nella fretta. Abbiamo iniziato l'attività extraveicolare - abbiamo ricevuto il via libera su Carnarvon. Eravamo tutti pronti a partire ed eravamo in attesa del via libera per iniziare la depressurizzazione. Ce l'abbiamo fatta. Abbiamo completato il ciclo di depressurizzazione. Mentre lasciavamo Carnarvon, ci è stato dato il via libera per l'EVA completa. Siamo arrivati ​​a Cant
Ja, ich glaube, du hast wahrscheinlich die rich
ちょっと探
उन्होंने पूरी बात कह 
Роджер. Близнецы 8, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы проинформировать вас о
Хорошо. Хорошо. 
로저, 찰리. 염소 소독 현황에 대해 알려드리겠습니다. B4 칸에는 염소 및 완충액 앰플을 넣는 칸이 8개 있는데, 그중 7개 중 1개는 비어 있고 항상 비어 있었습니다. 따라서 6개가 남아 있습니다. 반대편 B7 칸에도 칸이 7개 있는 용기가 하나 더 있습니다. 따라서 총 7개에 염소 앰플 6개와 완충액 앰플 7개가 들어 있습니다. 저는 매일 염소 앰플과 완충액 앰플을 하나씩 사용하고 있는데, 지금 염소 소독을 하기 전에는 염소 앰플 1개와 완충액 앰플 2개가 남았습니다. 염소 앰플이 1개 부족한 것 같은데, 마지막 용기에 있는 앰
ठीक है। चलिए, मैं शुरू से बताता हूँ। हो सकता है कुछ बातें मिलती-जुलती हों, लेकिन यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि हम सब एक ही बात समझ रहे हैं, हम समय-सीमा प्रक्रियाओं के एक सेट से शुरू कर रहे हैं जो हमें सामान्य प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट तक ले जाएगा। चेकलिस्ट में कुछ बदलाव होंगे, लेकिन मुख्य रूप से समय-सीमा से संबंधित जानकारी है। यह 6 घंटे 30 मिनट पहले से शुरू होता है और यह मानकर चलता है कि कमांड मॉड्यूल में मेन बी को बिजली मिल रही है। मुझे लगता है कि आपके पास पैड 
E hai intenzione di iniziare a dormire dopo questo passaggio? In tal caso, disattiveremo il collegamento con te mentr
Roger, je descends à 20 000 pieds. Prêt à déployer le tuba. La pression en cabine augmente. Le tuba devrait être déployé. Je crois que le couvercle du tuba a explosé. Je l'ai senti, mais je vais le déployer quand
أقوم حاليًا بفحص جهد التيار المستمر. جهد ناقل التوزيع الرئيسي 24 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع المعزول 
13ページ目、起動チェックリストにあ
You don't need to
Хорошо. Наше существительное 49 читается так: регистр 1, плюс 08793; регистр 2, все ша
哦，
Habt ihr uns in Sicht, 
Roger. Oxygen fuel cell purge at 113 30. Return to the nominal timeline at 121 hours wakeup. Lithium hydroxide change number 9 right now. Normal lunar COMM sleep configuration, I'm in that now. On the, I understood before you wanted to load the register 2 0110
ご存知のとおり、側面の窓が曇っているのは本当に残念です。なぜなら、待ち合わせ場所の窓からは太陽の光がまったく見えず、曇った窓からは良い写真が撮れな
Роджер, Хьюстон. Именно этим мы и пытаемся заниматься. Я пытаюсь получить 15 для оптики. Из-за яркой Земли очень сложно найти звезду, которую можно было бы навести на секстант. Я пытаюсь использовать автооптику, чтобы навести звезду. Сейчас у на
Roger. Reçu. 
Sì, credo sia giusto. Hai intenzione di
Хьюст
Well, that has disappeared, just practically. We were wondering if there was any chance of your looking out one of the other
D'accord, Aquarius. On examine votre nacelle et on remarque qu'un système à quatre jets est installé, alors qu'on vous a fourni deux jets sur la plateforme. Mais on va garder la configuration installée: un système à quatre 
Ich möchte anmerken, dass ich um 3:26:33 Uhr zu jedem Zeitpunkt 10 Partikel am Himmel sehe. Sie scheinen mir zweifellos zu leuchten. Es waren kleine Frostpartikel. Einige scheinen jedoch sehr, sehr weit entfernt zu sein. Zwei davon sehen aus, als wären sie etwa 100 Meter entfernt. Ich habe das Triebwerk seit einiger Zeit nicht mehr betätigt. Hier sind zwei näher. Nun eine Densiometermessung an diesen nahen Partikeln
ठीक है। पेज के
रॉजर ने इसे 10 सेकंड क
Well, let's see
알겠습니다. 다시 말씀드리지만, 그건 경보가 아니라 코드였습니다
Va bene. Puoi prenderti un po' di tempo per capire 
好的。现在，我们要你用胶带剪出两段大
パワーダウン（判読不
È un po' p
Quello che faranno è... dare potenza all'Acquar
네. 그건 요금 외에는 별다른 기능을 하지 않았던 것 같아요. 그때
查看
Questo è affermativo. Fase 8: "
Я не думаю, что это было задумано, Билл. Они имели в виду, что теплообменник скафандра подключен к обоим контурам; и если они сл
Friendship Seven, Guaymas. Du warst dabei, als die Verbindung 
रॉजर। क्या तुम वापस अपने नाक पर लगे एंटीना 
روجر. نستلم، ١١. نفهم أن البرنامج يمكن أن يعطيك عددًا لا نهائيًا ت
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tempo per assistere al vostro ammaraggio. Ad accompagnare il Presidente ci saranno il Segretario di Stato William Rogers e Frank Borman. Assisteranno all'ammaraggio dal ponte della nave di recupero con l'Ammiraglio John Sidney McCain, Jr., Comandante delle Forze del Pacifico. Dopo la permanenza del Presidente a bordo dell'Hornet, partirà per il suo tour in Asia e la visita programmata in Romania. Si ritiene che Luna 15 si sia schiantata ieri nel Mare delle Crisi, dopo aver orbitato attorno alla Luna 52 volte. L'agenzia di stampa sovietica TASS ha riferito che sono state condotte ricerche "scientifiche" nello spazio vicino alla Luna. Sir Bernard Lovell dell'Osservatorio di Jodrell Bank ha affermato che Luna 15 ha colpito la superficie della Luna a una velocità di circa 480 chilometri orari. La situazione è stata relativamente tranquilla di recente in Vietnam. Soldati in pattuglia sono stati osservati con radio a transistor sintonizzate sul vostro volo. Le emittenti radiotelevisive delle Forze Armate in Vietnam hanno dato piena copertura alla missione. Le schermaglie continuano tra egiziani e israeliani lungo il Canale di Suez. Gli osservatori delle Nazioni Unite stanno cercando di fermare l'azione. A Washington, la Commissione per i Modi e i Mezzi della Camera ha votato per ridurre la tolleranza al depauperamento del petrolio dal 27,5% al ​​20%. Abbiamo piovuto diverse volte qui nella zona di Houston. Oggi è nuvoloso e sono previsti altri rovesci. Sul fronte sportivo, come accennato in precedenza, stasera si gioca l'All Star Game. Ieri non si è giocata nessuna partita. Ieri sera a New York, la Baseball Writers Association of America ha nominato Babe Ruth il più grande giocatore di baseball di tutti i tempi. Joe DiMaggio è stato nominato il più grande giocatore di baseball vivente. Frank Borman ha fatto gli annunci durante una cena in onore dei giocatori. Joe Namath ha trascorso un'intera giornata al training camp dei New York Jets. Cinque poliziotti hanno avuto difficoltà a trattenere circa 500 bam
Vous avez t
Gemini VI, Carn
제미니 4호, 여기는 휴스턴 CAP COM입니다
هذا صحيح. يقوم فريقنا هنا بتقييم الوضع الحراري. يبدو أنك ستكون خارج المنطقة لفترة طويلة نوعًا ما. لهذا السبب طلبنا منك إعادة المحاولة بمجرد انتهائك من رصد النجوم الثلاثة. ما زلنا نعمل على ذلك - خلال الساعات العشر القادمة تقريبًا. نراقب الوضع الحراري ووضع رصد النجوم، وسنوافيك بمزيد من التحديثات لاحقًا. ا
Vediamo. A Springfield, Missouri, Mickey Owen, il ricevitore storico dei Brooklyn Dodgers che è entrato nel libro dei record segnando un terzo strike che ha portato i New York Yankees alla vittoria sui Dodgers nelle World Series del '41, ha deciso che sarebbe stato ricordato per qualcosa di più del suo record sportivo. Quarantacinque ragazzi e ragazze hanno ricevuto i pony da lui offerti. A questi ragazzi è stato chiesto di inviargli delle lettere in cui spiegavano come si sarebbero presi cura di un pony. Quando le lettere sono arrivate a fiumi, ha aggiunto cinque pony ai 20 già offerti; e altri donatori ne hanno aggiunti altri 20. E Mickey Owen ha detto: "Pensavo di ricevere circa 45 lettere, ma alla fine ne ho avute circa 900". Ora, nella pagina principale: Wellington, Nuova Zelanda, circa cinquanta uomini si sono seduti oggi al Polo Sud per gustare il tradizionale tacchino con salsa di mirtilli rossi, ma il Natale aveva anche un sapore orientale. Tra questi, il Sukiyaki cucinato dai membri di una spedizione giapponese che stava attraversando il continente antartico e che si era fermata per un giorno alla base polare della Marina degli Stati Uniti. A San Diego, in California, l'equipaggio della nave di intelligence Pueblo, catturata, ha donato i suoi primi stipendi ai lavoratori del Balboa Naval Hospital di San Diego. Avevano ricevuto venti dollari a testa e, quando sono sbarcati a San Diego, hanno ritenuto che questa fosse 
我这里有一份飞行计划
ええ、その通りです。大丈夫です。あと2、3本だけです。7番ほど
That's affirm. An
D'accord, Jack. Bon, on n'a pas réussi à avoir la Terre cette fois-ci. La Lune est repassée à environ 10 degrés, et maintenant on arrive de nouveau sur Terre.
好的。第一个是S波段正常模式语音，关闭；
Okay. ATTEGGIAMENTO,; scala, 5/5;, seleziona 1; FONTE. Ehi, quello che devi fare è leggere
Salut Jack, c'est en cours. En comparant l
Роджер. Наша первая контрольная точка находится очень близко к терминатору, и пока оптика следила за ней, мне довелось наблюдать восход солнца. И примерно за 2 минуты до восхода солнца — край диска начинает светлеть, превращаясь в некую тонкую белую дымку, тонкое свечен
Roger. Let's see, you're at 24 hours and 54 minutes and approximate
Das ist bestätigt. Okay. Reihe 3, unter TREIBER: HELIUMREGLER/ENTLÜFTUNG FÜR DEN SINNESANTRIEB sollte geöffnet sein. RENDEZVOUSRADAR STANDBY, geöffnet; LANDUNGSRADAR, geöffnet. Unter STAB/CONTROL: ATCA, geöffnet. Unter ED und 
The eart
好的。
Сегодня миссис Роберт Годдард сказала, что ее муж был бы так счастлив. «Он бы не кричал и ничего такого. Он бы просто сиял». Она добавила: «Это была его мечта — отправить ракету на Луну». У людей по всему миру было много поводов для р
D'accord, Apollo 8. C'est exact. Vous utilisez un débit binaire élevé et nous craignons que la mémoire ne soit épuisée avant la gravure. Nous allons donc la décharger et vous la restituer avec une charge complète avan
Le voyant d'excès d'eau en cabine s'est allumé à ce moment-là. Je vais devoir tout éteindre. Ma combinaison est encore haute. Le manomètre indique +9, ce qui est incroyab
Перейти только к записи VOX. Ваша ставка (Прав
On veut le gros appareil photo, hein? Gros objectif 
Bene. Quello che abbiamo qui sono un paio di controlli COMM. Passeremo a cinque diverse modalità, e solo una di queste interromperà le vostre attività. In tal caso, passeremo alla voce di backup in uplink, e quella è l'unica volta in cui potreste perdere temporaneamente la COMM vocale in uplink. Avrete la COMM vocale in downlink per tutta la procedura, e dovrebbe d
Prêt à 
那是负数，杰克。
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हम यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि हमें यह गलतफहमी न हो कि यह 7900 फीट प्रति सेकंड की गति, उच्च गति प्रति फीट के वैकल्पिक समाधान से संबंधित है। यह
حسنًا. أعتقد أنني قرأت أنك جاهز. نسيت... سماعات الأذن. الأمر بسيط، كل ما عليك فعله هو إخراج زوج ثانٍ من الخراطيش من وحدة التحكم، ووضع شريط لاصق رمادي اللون، مع توجيه الجانب اللاصق للخارج، حول جوانب كل خرطوشة جديدة بالقرب من الأعلى، ثم أخذ قطعة من ورق مقوى وتقطيعها إلى أربعة مربعات، طول ضلع كل من
11، هيوستن. لقد قمتم بعمل رائع هناك. نحن جاهزون للانطل
Подождите минутку. Я сейчас для вас найду самую свежую информ
Роджер. Хирург советует вам пить как можно больше в
Attendez, Bill. Nous 
Хорошо, Джек. Следующий шаг — заткнуть обходное отверстие, то есть отверстие в центре дна канистры; нам нужно его заткнуть, потому что мы не хотим, что
좋습니다
ええ、地球はとても明るいですね。レンズに焼き切れそうなものはありません。カメラはまだ動いているようです。よろし
ठीक है, जैक। यह सही है। पृष्ठ 1-7 पर जाएं। इलेक्ट्रॉनिक्स पावर, बंद; सिग्नल कंडीशनर/ड्राइवर बायस 1 और 2, बंद; और पावर, दोनों, बंद; और डायरेक
好的。休斯顿，请稍等，另一张照片上会有标记
I medici non riescono a ripulire il 
Und eine Sache würde 
Roger. Con una visibilità così buona o comunicazioni così buone, ti daremo solo una descrizione verbale senza vedere il telescopio a scansione in questo momento. I tuoi angoli di manovra per Arturo erano piuttosto buoni. Ho Arturo centrato nel telescopio a scansione. A questo angolo del sole, c'è un fascio di luce direttamente attraverso il centro del telescopio a scansione e... una banda di luce. Impedisce di vedere molte stelle intorno a noi, e anche se ho tenuto l'occhio incollato al telescopio per un po' di tempo, è molto difficile vedere qualsiasi schema stellare o altro. Non potrei riconoscerlo con Arturo a meno che... l'ottica non mi abbia semplicemente spinto lì. Ora,
Fortfahre
好的，迈克。当然，这是在G&N系统和发动机都出现故障，需要你进行恒载
네, 마지막으로 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 결정이 내려지기 전에 계속 설명드리겠습니다. 허용 가능한 데드밴드는 660~770psi입니다. 다시 말해
罗杰。关于你这次的航向：我们希望你使用滚转角 096，螺距 356，偏
네. 아직 완전히 도착한 건 아니에요.
13, nous n'allons 
سيكون الن
不。既然大家都喜欢这个，为什么不试试动词83或者
पता लगाने का कोई तरीका नहीं 
Roger. 
Il cratere che vedi all'
Amicizia Sette. Carburante 103-101 [
All I'm d
Non credo che ci sia
П
네, 잭. 비행 계획
Roger. Quelles sont les informations concernant la ventilation? Le débit d'O2 est-il élevé à travers le réservoir o
ロジャ
ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म के लिए लाइट वैल्यू रीडिंग
C'est exact, Jim. Et dans la rangée 4, sous CHAUFFAGES, nous voulons que tous les CHAUFFAGES QUAD soient ouverts. Correction: nous voulons que tous les CHAUFFAGES 
は
저는 그게 
Well, the radar needles were wandering around some, Dave. I can't really be sure.
Остановка
わかりました。次回はも
Vous restez à l'écoute, et je vais effectuer une simulation de
好吧。照我们
Roger. Kopiert. Agena ist sehr stabil und zeigt keine mer
ठीक है। प्रोपेलेंट डिस्प्ले ओवरराइड सर्किट ब्रेकर बंद हैं... प्रोपेल
13号，休斯顿。还有4分钟你就出发了。红色的小线正好和下
Ricevuto. Non abbiamo ricevuto la conferma dell'aggiornamento sulla manov
Laut Associated Press verfolgten Amerikaner die Weihnachtsmesse von Papst Paul VI. in Italien, und Europäer empfingen Weihnachtsgrüße von Apollo 8 über den bis dato leistungsstärksten Kommunikationssatelliten. Die Nachricht von Papst Paul VI. und der Apollo-
我们现在预测的时间提前了 5 
알겠습니다.
Roger. Just some interesting things on the - just done a NAV with the moon; the sun is currently right in the way. I managed to get one set on Antares and was working on the second set, and the rim of the moon just disappeared completely. The view through the sextant is a milky white, whether you're looking 
तीन गड्ढे - तीन क्षैतिज गड्ढे जो अब आपके दृश्य क्षेत्र में हैं, ज़मीनी मार्ग के ठीक नीचे स्थित
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Steelhead. Ich verstehe
R
우리
«Аполлон-11», это 
分かりました。一つ提案があります。ジムに望遠鏡を通して評価をさせるというものです。あなたは全く同じことをしますが、180度回転して頭を上げます。そしてジムに望遠鏡を通して追跡をさせます。テレビを拾おうとした時などは、まだヨーが残って
روجر، نيل. بدايةً: تتوالى رسائل التهنئة على مهمة أبولو 11 إلى البيت الأبيض من قادة العالم طوال اليوم. ومن بين أحدثها برقيات من رئيس الوزراء ال
Ricevuto. Quando torni alla tua checklist di Surface e arrivi alla riconfigurazione COMM a pagina 45 di Surface, ti chiediamo di abilitare la funzione di misurazione della distanza sulla tua banda S. Cioè, quando torni alla configurazione della banda S, invece di ATTENZIONE e AVVERTENZA ELETTRONICA, ABILITA TV, ti chiediamo di andare in posizione RANGE e di lasciarla lì il più a
جاك، الأمر مريح للغاية. لقد أجرينا التجربة عدة مرات، وفي الواقع، يجري تشغيلها الآن مجددًا. وقد أجريناها هنا في هيوستن وفي كيب كانافيرال. المكان الوحيد الذي قد تحتاج فيه إلى متابعة الأمور بدقة 
了解、タナナリ
ठीक है। हम
And we recommend you go to normal on your gyros with t
無重力センタの感覚は素晴らしいです。このスーツを着て、こんなに
Хорошо, Фред. До этого момента, то есть за 1 час до истечения времени, выполните маневры на следующие углы: крен, 130; тангаж, 125; рыскание, 012,4. Соответствующие уг
Okay. The good gives us a vacuum perigee at the present time of 23.6 with a flight path angle of minus 6.25 degrees. That's without a midcourse. He's kind of tossing around the idea of doing a midcourse-7 maneuver at 5 hours before entry. If we do
This is Friendship Seven. Negative. I have felt perfectl
यह फ्रैंक बोरमैन हैं। हमें टेलीविजन शो बहुत पसंद आए, और हम चाहेंगे कि आप आगे भी देखते रहें क्योंकि आगे उड़ानें होंगी, मिलन
... entre 150 et 180 mètres, mais suffisamment près pour qu'on puisse le voir parfait
알겠습니다. 관제센터는 어떻게 돌아가고 있나
MARQU
वहां रहने वाले लोग शायद कभी बाहर नही
Roger.
मुझे अब स्टार्टर चालू क
Okay. That "VERB 48" should be moved up to 05 and also the "VERB 49
Okay, Jim. Schlagen Sie bitte Seite 24 auf,
Esatto. E la prossima cosa che farete sarà impostare il timer della missione, e quello che abbiamo fatto è stato attivare il timer 
Aktuell sprechen wir von einer Strömungsgeschwindigkeit von 7 Fuß pro Sekunde in der Mitte der Bahn, etwa 104 Stunden vor dem Eintreffen. Hochgerechnet auf die 8 Stunden vor dem Eintreffen haben wir einen Puffer angegeben – das sind nur etwa 19 Fuß pro Sekunde. Wenn sich also nicht viel ändert,
Acquario, qui Houston. Ti sentiamo con un sacco di... interfer
हम अभी 3+34 पर हैं। बस अंधेरा छाने ही वाला है। अंतरिक्ष यान के अगले हिस्से पर सूरज की रोशनी पड़ रही है, छोटा सिरा आगे की ओर है। असल में, हम सीधे आगे की ओर होने से लगभग 30 डिग्री बाईं ओर हैं। और जिस तरह से सूरज बूस्
روجر. بعد ذلك بقليل - حوالي الساعة 106 
मैं उस गड्ढ
알았어. 그리고 존의 친구들 몇 명을 여기서 봤는데, 솔직히 말해서 내가 너처럼 그들을 해
Мы только что снова измерили температуру двигателей, и он
是的，我能看到
休
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات لوصف نجاحكم. من المقرر أن يشاهد الرئيس نيكسون الليلة مباراة البيسبول في واشنطن. بعد المباراة، سيتوجه إلى منطقة عمليات الإنقاذ في المحيط الهادئ. مساء الأربعاء، سينتقل من جزيرة جونستون بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى سفينة الاتصالات البحرية أرلينغتون. ثم صباح الخميس، سيعود إلى الطائرة الهليكوبتر ويتجه إلى حاملة الطائرات هورنت في الوقت المناسب لمشاهدة هبوطكم في المحيط. سيرافق الرئيس وزير الخارجية ويليام روجرز وفرانك بورمان. سيشاهدون الهبوط من على متن سفينة الإنقاذ مع الأدميرال جون سيدني ماكين الابن، قائد قوات المحيط الهادئ. بعد إقامة الرئيس على متن هورنت، سينطلق في جولته الآسيوية وزيارته المقررة إلى رومانيا. يُعتقد أن ال
好的，吉姆，没问题。你只要把提示卡裁开就行了，提示卡是一张大小合适的硬纸片，
Ro
좋습니다. 이제 좋은 기
D'accord. Le bus d'atterrissage est armé. N'est-ce pas
好的，05650。然后是1号星，标记2。我们
Роджер, Аполл
Хорошо. Сигнал 
然后，看起来所有明显的运动都停止了，我们可能正在接近目标。于是我调转飞船方向，试图调整平台对准目标。与此同时，助推器开始以相当明显的速度向下坠落。所以我放弃了调整平台对准助推器并向下推
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 재정렬 작업은 잘 진행되었습니다. 저는 육분의로 별을 찾아 정렬하는 데는 성공했지만, 스캐닝 망원경에서 레고르나 멘켄트 같은 별을 관측할 때는 그 별을 식별할 수 없었습니다. 처음 지구를 관측했을 때는 지평선이 매우 흐릿하게 보
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。システムはすべて良好です。時刻96
Это «Дружба Семь» в укрытии для записи. Большая часть Восточной Африки
Хорошо. Позвольте мне передать это Джиму. Это будет 120 ампер-часов, что
حسنًا يا فريد. إضافة واحدة، في الصف الثالث. مضخم
Peut-être qu'ils sont là-bas, en train de calculer très soigneusement si nous pouvons nous 
حسنًا. لقد قرأتُ القيم التالية: زائد 0.692، زائد 11713، وناقص 0.014
罗杰，我把设置调回3的时候，飞机有点失控，不过没待多久。现在应该在7.5到8之间。目前我处于自动后退姿态模式。我马上要切换到电传操纵。之前我一直用的是陀螺仪正常模式，机动
Ap
Si può anche usare la gravità zero per dimostrare molte cose che abbiamo imparato a scuola. Vorrei dimostrare brevemente quanto sia facile spiegare il funzionamento del giroscopio. Se faccio ruotare questa lattina, sappiamo che, secondo le equazioni del moto, ci aspetteremmo che, una volta che le viene data una rotazione e ha un asse di rotazione in questa direzione, se le diamo una particolare coppia, e lo farò spingend
Roger. Zeichnest du alle Daten vo
ठीक है, बिल। हमने कुछ समय पहले पेज E-9 के स्टेप 38 पर, बिल्कुल शुरुआत 
那时你会把 Retro Power 放到 ARM 上，但我们会把它提前到开头，这样我就可
Che bella vista quella che abbiamo laggiù oggi. Poco più di mezza Terra. Sembra che si vedano l'Africa e il Mar Rosso; non n
Roger. Vier von acht Schutzschaltern zeigen Rot an. Die Schutzschalter sind aktuell noch ausgeschaltet. Ich glaube, wir haben ge
Ricevuto. Sono abbastanza sicuri, tuttavia, che se si ri
A questo punto, ho decisamente la sensazione di volare con imbardata di 90 gradi, rollio di 30 gradi a destra e beccheggio quasi dritto sull'orizzont
Houston, Columbia. Mein VHF-Entfernungsmesser funktioniert momentan nicht. Soll ich weiterhin Sextantenmarkierungen setzen oder nichts unternehmen? Ich soll die nächsten sechs bis sieben Minuten ausschließlich VHF-Marki
Роджер. И не могли бы вы перейти в режим ПРИНЯТИЯ, пожалуйста, и мы отправим вам данные о нагрузке, состоящие из вектора состояния и целевой
설마 이 나침반이 작동하고 있다는 건 아니겠죠? 좀 더 설명해야겠네요. 제가 지금까지 해왔던 건 표준 광원을 꺼내는 거였어요. 지금 캡슐 안에서, 그리고 제가 똑바로 위를 보고 있는 제 얼굴 쪽에서는 나침반이 롤 축 평면에서 실제로 회전하고 있는 것처럼 보입니다. 북쪽이 제 오른쪽 팔꿈치를 가리키고 있어요. 제가 움직일 때 나침반이 확실히 흔들
分かりました。次は「回
Voilà pour l'actualité internationale et nationale, ainsi que les reportages. Côté sport, Hank Stram, des Chiefs de Kansas City, a été nommé entraîneur de l'année de l'AFL. C'est la deuxième fois en trois saisons qu'il reçoit cette distinction. Le vote a été effectué par un panel de 30 journalistes et commentateurs sportifs de l'Associated Press, trois par ville. Le candidat le plus proche de lui était Weeb Ewbank. Parmi les 
Jack and Fred both are going to sleep. It's sort of humorous; Fred's sleeping place now is in the tunnel, upside down with his head resting on the ascent engine. Jack is on t
Et, Aquarius, Houston. Nous commençons à nous préoccuper de l'accumulation de CO2 dans le module de commande. Nous avons donc une recommandation: il vous est conseillé de bou
अच्छा, तो अब मुझे पैंतरेबाज़ी शुरू करनी चाहिए; धिक्कार है, मैं किसी तरह प्लेन
هذا يعني الإجابة
E la corsa del D-9 dell'Aeronautica Militare... il modo in cui sono disposte è difficile da eseguire. Abbiamo comunque ottenuto alcune corse, in ordine diverso, e abbiamo ottenut
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们又一次把天线换了。我再次声明，目前我们没有任何关于月球表面的最新消息——包括计划书的更新。我们正在
Okay, Skipper. Wir haben eine Möglichkeit gefunden, dich warmzuhalten. Wir haben beschlossen, dich jetzt hochzufahren. Nimm deine Vorbereitungs-Checkliste und beginne ganz oben 
روجر، 
Spingere prima 
Roger
ओह, हमें अभी-अभी श्री नील आर्मस्ट्रांग की उपस्थिति से सम्मानित होने का सौभाग्य प्राप्त हुआ है, जो इस समय सीएपी कॉम कंसोल के 
أنا لا أعتقد 
Roger. Abbiamo visto 
Man kan
حسنًا. وهذا بالضبط ما كنت عليه. وحدة التحكم: دافع الوقود 2، في المنتصف، تشغيل، لأعلى؛ أجهزة اتصال دافع الوقود، اثنان، رمادي؛ وحدة الخدمة: ضغط الوقود الثانوي، أربعة، في المنتصف، مغلق؛ تلقائي، إيقاف؛ وحدة التحكم/الفصل النهائي، اثنان، إيقاف؛ وحدة التحكم/فصل وحدة الخدمة، اثنان، 
Roger. Versuche bei Sonnenaufgan
Если, конечно, ты не предпочитаешь с
好的。告
Okay, Jack. Ora sono... I
Ce n'est que la moitié. Le reste est caché. C'était plutôt intéressant de faire tout le travail de caméra ici, ça m'a permis de m'entraîner un peu plus à la gestion de la télévision, en espérant que ce soit utile une fois sur place à Fra Mauro. Le moniteur facilit
Роджер, Билл. Спасибо. Понятно; 
分かりました。だいぶすっきりしましたね。
Okay. Readback correct
Notice how you can kic
لقد رفعت مستوى كابينتي إلى 5.4 في هذا الو
He's out, Gus and it's really nifty. Listen, our VOX doesn't work very well, and I don't seem to read anybody. You will have to relay. The gun works swell. He's been able to
Roger. Si muoverà in avanti e saremo
Roger. Will you read back the Greenwich Mean Time and retro command on 6-4? I got the ΔV 00, ΔT 00
我还有一些其他信息。大约两个小时后，我们才能掌握你飞行轨迹的准确数据。不过，从燃烧情况来看，燃烧效果非常好，我们正在密切关注，大约两个小时后会给你回复。另外，我们预计超氦气罐将达到爆破极限。我们预测最早会在107小时25分左右发生，最晚可能在110小时，这应该是一次非推进性泄压，但你可能会听到声音，也可能会看到一些
حسنًا. عليك الانتظار ريثما
実際のところ、宇宙
... Raumschi
Я много где побывал в Северной Африке... при дневном свете — знаю её довольно хорошо. Только что завершил полёт D-9 Apollo Landmark к це
Это было действительно тяжело, Майк. Над предполагаемой зоной посадки была ужасная неровность, вся в воронках, и повсюду валялось огромное количеств
Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы изменить количество импульсов рыскания, ко
हेलो सिग्मा सेवन, हेलो सिग्मा सेवन, यह कैल कैप कॉम है। कैल कैप कॉम। ब्लाइंड ब्रॉडकास्टिंग। हमारे रिसीवर में बिजली गुल हो गई है। मैं ब्लाइंड ब्रॉडकास्टिंग कर रहा हूँ। कृपया रेट्रोसीक्वेंस के लिए अपनी घड़ी रीसेट करें। यह पिछली रीडिंग में आपकी घड़ी की त्रुटि को ध्यान में रखता है। आपकी पिछली रिपोर्ट में 27 सेकंड सेट थे। आपके साथ हमारी पिछली जाँच के अनुसार य
What sort of out-of-plane velocity did we have at ignit
Un altro commento sull'ottica. Siamo dentro adesso. Stiamo sorpassando il... abbiamo un rollio di circa 182°; siamo a circa 226° di beccheggio e 18° di imbardata. Posso ruotare l'albero completamente a questo particolare assetto e ottengo questa
Okay. Fred-o wird je
그건 부정적이네요. 고르도, 제가 그
ケン、その時も同じことがありました。今回はAGC電圧が数秒間フルスケールローまで低下しましたが、アンテナは宇宙船を透過できる能力を持っているようです。そして、地球はアンテナが到達できないはずの場所にまで到達した
E Aquarius, Houston. Stiamo iniziando a pensare all'accumulo di CO2 nel modulo di comando, quindi abbiamo una raccomandazione: prendete i tubi del comandante e mettete un tappo sul tubo di ritorno rosso, quindi trovate un modo per fissarli in modo che si espandano nel tunnel, estendendoli il più possibile. E faremo uscire un po' di flusso dal lato blu, che circolerà su e intorno al modulo di comando, mantenendo basso il livell
わかっ
नहीं, मुझे देखने दीजिए कि
아폴로 1
ر
D'accord. Nous allons donc accéder 
Nu
로저. 지금 기내 압력 조절 작업을 진행 중이고, CSM(압력 평형) 데칼을 기준으로 작업하고 있습니다. 13단계에 도달했는데, 기내 압력
알겠습니다. 3번째 줄, 추진제(PROPELLANT) 항목 아래에 있는 대기 도킹 히터(STANDBY RENDEZVOUS HEATER)와 착륙 레이더 히터(LANDING RADAR HEATER) 회로 차단기가 열려 있을 겁
أفق رؤيتي واضح جدًا الآن. إنه فاتح نوعًا ما، ويتكون معظمه من غيوم. أستطيع رؤية الغيوم - النجوم وهي تبدأ بالغروب في وهج الهواء الرئيسي، لكن الغيوم تُضفي على الأفق مزيدًا من الإشراق. لا يبدو الأمر كذلك - ففي وقت سابق من الرحلة، رأينا أفقًا خاليًا من الغيوم وكان أكثر وضوحًا
Ora sto scendendo all'orizzonte e puoi sicuramente vedere i due strati di aria che brillano, quello che è piuttosto spesso in alto e puoi vedere le stelle che
...ハー
Aquarius, Houston. Nach dem Uplink müssen Sie die Drift und die Flagge wie auf Seite 8 des Notfallhandbuchs, Schritte 5 und 6, einstelle
了解しました。バズ、了解しました。地上チェックリストにいくつか変更点があります。基本的には、司令船を追跡して、最後にもう一度位置を確認することをお願いします。これはP57です。それからチェックリストを進めてください。残りはチェックリストの細か
Ora, in risposta alla domanda 2, c'era, ovviamente, una vibrazione transitoria nel secondo stadio che, a causa dello spegnimento del motore numero 5, si è verificata poco prima dello spegnimento del motore, e poco dopo, quindi lo stad
Nein, das
Sie leg
Hai visto delle lu
알겠습니다. 롤 
罗杰。你是想让我手动导出，还
ジェミニ4号、こちらヒューストン。16+10は聞こえま
アポロ13号、ヒューストン。カーナボンまであと30秒。毎
La cabina è pron
Roger, Eagle. Vi abbiamo p
Roger, it's slowly rotating
ジム、司令船G&Nの打ち上げ手順の概要を説明できます。現在提案されているものです。今後、もっと良い方法を考えつくかもしれませんが、現時点で検討しているのは以下のとおりです。まず、中間軌道で行ったように、地球の照準を使って軌道を合わせます。次に、ACSで400度に5度を加えた角度で、ボールを0度に向けます。そして、光学装置を月に向けるためのボールの姿勢を決定します。星が見えれば、それも利用できます。それから、プラットフォームにトルクをかけるためのCDU角度も算出します。これで大まかな軌道合わせは完了です。次に、月と太陽に向けて精密な軌道合わせを
这样或许会好一些
Люди, слушающие музыку с высокой скоростью передачи данных, говорят, что э
Okay. Cr
D'accord. Lorsque l'appareil est en position d'observation
Apollo 8, Houston. F
了解しました、アポロ8号。グリーンチームは数
所有电池电压都在 23.5 伏或以上，电流表读数稳定在 20 安培。关机
ヒューストンさん、ご覧いただいているのは月の地平線下の地球です。これから月周回軌道を辿り、明暗境界線まで進みます。そこで探査機を方向転換し、明暗境界線の長く影になっている地形をテレビでご覧いただきます。テレビ画面でもかなり
알겠
Ricevuto. Ripeto, il tuo vettore di stato è a posto; è ancora un 
Roger, Jack. Vi vediamo lanciare
Да. Черт! Я все испачкал. Может, мы
حسناً. تأكد من أن إشارة التحدث في مض
Columbia, qui Ho
Roger. Veuillez noter que le taux d'O2 est actuellement d'envi
Vous enregistr
シグマ・セブン、シ
휴스턴, 또 한 가지 질문이 있습니다. 전원을 차단한다는 것은 06번 회로 차단기로 들어가는 것을 의미하는 건
分かりました。プラス00
مرحباً، ١١. هيوستن. ذك
休斯顿的奥德赛
انطلق يا هاواي
分かりました。分かりました。もう一度繰り返します。キューカードを1枚取り、
Okay, Apollo 8. The next portion of 
了解。TM 
Ok. Quando siamo entrati lì, eravamo a circa 66 gradi di rollio,
Oui. Ce sont les deux cartes stellaires de Buzz qu'il utilise actuellement comme pare-soleil sur la fenêtre de droite, la fenêtre numé
보조 루프에 만족하시면
Guardando al mondo dello sport, vediamo un po'. Mentre eravate impegnati l'altro giorno, Joe Namath e il commissario di football Pete Rozelle hanno annunciato che "Broadway Joe" aveva accettato di vendere la sua quota nel ristorante Bachelors III e di presentarsi ai New York Jets. Joe è arrivato oggi al campo di allenamento dei Jets e ha svolto il suo primo allenamento. Anche diversi altri giocatori dei Jets che avevano resistito insieme a Joe si sono presentati. E Davy Hill, di Jackson, Michigan, ha vinto il suo terzo torneo importante di golf in altrettante partite la scorsa settimana. Ha vinto il Philadelphia Classic. Hill ha vinto quattro tornei finora quest'anno ed è il miglior vincitore in denaro quest'anno con una bella vincita di 129.000 dollari. E nel baseball, la divisione occidentale della National League rimane una gara serrata. Los Angeles e San F
もう1つあります。これをコピーして、リードバックで全部教えてください。わかりました。準備ができたら、ランプを使いたいので、CB 16 INVERTER 2を閉じ、CB 11 AC BUS A LAMPを閉じ
Как вам вс
لدينا الكثير من الضوضاء في ال
ठीक ह
روجر، وVI بخصوص حالة نظام إدارة العمليات (OAMS)، يبلغ الوقود المتبقي لديك 148 رطلاً، والمؤكسد المتبقي 193 رطلاً. تُظهر حساباتنا أن هذا ي
Friendship Seven. Roger. Tous les fusibles sont toujours dans la même position. Le dispositif d'amorçage est armé. Le rétrolargage automatique est désactivé. Le sélecteur de mode est normal, la commande de vitesse, le gyroscope sont normaux. La poignée de carburant manuel est tirée. Le carburant automatique est toujours activé. Le délai de rétrolargage est normal, le sac d'atterrissage
Jack, sembra che quando raggiungiamo i 239 gradi con 
Wohin
できれば太
네. 프레드의 창밖을 보고 있어요. 저 멀리 많은 입자들이 보이
Roger, Mike. SEP PAD, RCS/G&N: et sont NA,, 100 395 000, est 
好的，弗雷德。在第16页，执行“对接燃​​烧（PGNS）”动作，
82:30 - a
Gemini VI, Haw
了解しました。通過中にUHFチェックを実施します。念のため、燃料は最小
حسنًا
It's very easy to spot. You can see the entire rims of the craters from here with, of course, the white c
अपोल
Roger. There are two gears that we have that go around when you pull the handle back and forth. One of them is the gear that sort of acts as a ratchet, a little cylinder with a piston in it and a spike behind it that engages the ratchet. And we were having a little trouble with that befo
わ
Das ist Friendship Seven. Mehrmals hatte ich das Gefühl, dass mein Triebwerk teilweise blockiert war oder nur teilweise in Nicklage nach unten arbeitete. Dann plötzlich wieder eine Nickrate nach oben, und im selben Moment spürte ich einen Schub nach unten, und das Flugzeug kippte nach unten. Das wiederholte sich auch dieses
Jack, du hast dir das – in Freds Werkstatt – angesehen und kannst den Abbruch-Navigations
Dann möchten wir, dass Sie die Kamera so ans Fenster halten, dass die Nase nicht im Bild ist. Wir benötigen zwei Fotoserien. Bitte verwenden Sie den Pulsmodus und richten Sie das Raumschiff senkrecht nach unten auf die Erde. Ich gebe Ihnen etwas Zeit zum Starten. Die Aufnahme erfolgt auf der Nachtseite der Erde. Geben Sie nun einen Impuls nach oben und machen Sie e
Ich sehe eine hell erleuchtete Fläche. Sehr hell. – Es sieht eher aus wie ein Flughafe
Il semble que lors de la coupure de courant (illisible), nous consommions encore un peu moins de 11 ampères. Nous avions 10 ampères sur le connecteur n° 1 et un peu moins de 11 sur le n° 2. Le câble d'alimentation, ou plutôt son point de fixation sur l'écoutille extérieure, rendait les sorties extravéhiculaires (EVA) assez difficiles, notamment à cause de l'aérodynamisme du câble libre à l'avant du vaisseau. Lorsque j'opérais dans cette zone, le câble, lorsqu'il arrivait à son extrémité, me propulsait en arrière et la réaction me ramenait vers le haut, au-dessus du vaisseau, vers la section d'adaptation. C'est pourquoi je disparaissais constamment de la vue pendant mes manœuvres au-dessus des hublots, puis dérivais vers l'arrière du vaisseau. Je devais sans cesse me hisser à l'avant du
Roger, Buzz. Bitte stellen Sie den Schalter der S-Band-Antenne OMNI A auf Bravo.
ठीक है। मेरे पास मेरा हैसलब्लैड सरफेस कैमरा भी है, जो यह
알겠습니다. 모든 날짜가 두 번째 날이 될 것입니다. GMTRC 05 51 18. 8+14. 16+55. 영역 26-DELTA: ΔV 86. 1+49. 06 51
Roger. Wir
Roger. Potresti darci la nostra distanza (correzione), la nostra velocità e la distanza
11マイルか12マイル足りないようだな、
Bene, e vorremmo farti un'altra domanda sullo
E questo potrebbe rendere la tua linea temporale un po' troppo affollata, se ti fai tr
ठीक है, बिल। यह आपके उड़ान योजना के पृष्ठ 2 पर होगा। कमांड मॉड्यूल पायलट के लिए - मैंने उसे पहले ही बता दिया है - पृष्ठ के शीर्ष पर, लगभग, वास्तव में, हम चाहते हैं कि वह एक संरेखण करे, और फिर बाकी काम निर्धारित समय पर हो
Roger. 
鹰，休斯
看来
Apollo
الصداقة السا
알겠습니다. 전원 5번, 비상 전원 차단. 항목 1, 첫 번째 줄에서 "And VHF-A"를 지우겠습니다. 두 번째 줄은 "SIMPLEX 작동"입니다. 세 번째 줄에서 두 번째 주요 단어인 "POWER AMP"를 "OFF"로 바꾸고, 
Houston, Apollo 13. Chiam
Кроме того, Хьюстон хотел бы узнать — заверш
ジャック、手順を読み始める前に…BAT Aは満充電されていて、状態は良好です。BAT Bに切り替えて、さらに満充電しましょう。あと2時間充電してください。7～8ステップの手順があるので、参考にしてください。入力手順の記録
收到。穆切亚，指挥官。声音洪亮清晰。告诉杰瑞、格斯、刘易斯以及所有和我一起工作过的人“你好”。约翰
मुझे लगता है कि अगर आप अंक नहीं देते हैं तो आप ऐसा 
Closed face plate. Opened it momentarily, merely to wipe my nose, and try t
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Pour information, le match des étoiles vient de se terminer par la victoire de la Ligue nationale sur la Ligue américaine, 9 à 3. Termin
Il semblerait que B n'ait pas ré
Okay, and you're real good. It's a - It's a pleasure not to have all that noise. Let me tell you what I want to do, Jim. As I said, we're not going to give you detailed procedures, now. What we expect to have for you shortly are procedures which we'll try and get up to you in the following form. First, we'll have a time line, sort of a flight plan thing, which will have the times of all the major events and any configurations, switch settings, and so forth which are peculiar to our configuration and which, therefore, you won't find in the checklist. This, for instance, will be true of the way we power up the command module; and second, of course, we'll have any redlines to the checklist so that you can enter the checklist where poss
わかった。それは、あなたが彼らのうちの一
وخلال عملية الاحتراق، ستتحكم بالطبع في درجة الصوت ودورانه عبر مؤشرا
جيم، يمكنني أن أعطيك فكرة عامة عن الإجراء المقترح لرفع وحدة القيادة والتوجيه والملاحة. هذا هو الإجراء المقترح حاليًا. قد نتوصل إلى إجراء أفضل، لكن هذا ما ندرسه الآن. أول ما نخطط للقيام به هو استخدام المنظار على الأرض كما فعلنا في منتصف المسار. ثم سنقوم بمحاذاة محور الجسم، 400 + 5 على نظام ال
Roger, Gemini 4. Mach weiter mit deinem Upd
Und, Bill, wir müssen warten, bis wir Bravo erreichen, bevor wir mit dem Wechsel beginnen.
Хорошо. На странице 14 значение параметра «загрузка» изменилось на 31021. Я предполагаю, что вы предоставите нам обновленные значения веса, если они нам понадобятся, и после этого нажмите «Ввод». То есть, я... вы говорите
泥の中に落ちた。わかった、理解した。彼にコイルを元に戻してもらって…ジム、RING 1、
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। अभी आपके संचार प्रद
Okay, you got
Com'è la qualità delle tue f
Roger. Wir bitten Sie, auf OMNI Delta umzuschalten, sobald wir Ihnen die Scan-Grenze der Hochleistungsantenne anzeigen. Nachdem Sie uns die Um
Roger. Ich habe die Plattform planmäßig um 11:50 Uhr eingeschaltet, aber sie ist noch
船
さて、とりあえず、私たちのミッション
好的。继
La luc
Non lo
जड़त्वीय पर रॉजर। और अब हम 2 पैड पर चलते हैं। 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, प्लस 166, माइनस 081; TIG 080 11 3603. संज्ञा 81: माइनस 01408, सभी गेंदों को घटाकर, माइनस 00743. सभी गेंदों को रोल करें, 196 359 00657, प्लस 00537. डेल्टा-VT 01592 
रॉजर, फ्रेडो। बढ़िया जवाब। अब, पृथ्वी पर, हमारा अनुमान है - यदि आपको यह संरेखण करना है, तो पृथ
Per la grande partita dell'Astro Blue Bonnet, la grande classica del basket seguita dall'Astro Blue Bonnet, SMU e Oklahoma sono arrivate. Si stanno preparando per la grande partita. Non dice qui chi è favorito. Cercherò e vi farò sapere più tardi, se qualcuno è favorito. La Coppa Davis è in corso ora, in Australia, e gli Stati Uniti stanno cercando di riconquistarla, e a quanto pare oggi siamo favoriti per riconquistare la supremazia. Un altro 
जी हां, सभी फ्यूज स्विच अभी भी उसी स्थिति में हैं, गोर्डो। मैंने उनमें से कोई भी नहीं बदला है। स्क्विब आर्म्ड है, ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। मैं फ्लाई-बाय-वायर, ऑटो और जायरो नॉर्मल मोड पर हूं। सभी "टी" हैंडल लगे हुए 
わかっ
И, Хьюстон, м
不，我们还没有。我们考虑过，但我想我们现
分かりました。ジャック、そのまま続けてください。私はデータに戻りま
好的。连接并连接脐带电缆。步骤 2，闭合电源 1 交流和 2 交流断路器。步骤 3，面板 5：闭合主 B 传感器信号断路器。步骤 4，闭合面板……然后闭合主 B 电池母线 B 断路器。确认主母线电压，然后切换电源。步骤
ロジャー、弱々しくもはっきりと読み取れました。地
Understand. I copied that. For your targ
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। स्टेजिंग के लिए आप अच्छे दिख रहे 
是的。我之前打电话给你咨询过甚高频测距的
هذا ص
잘
接下来，在第35页右侧，从“航天器控制，自动，验证”开始的所有内容
Что касается съемки при входе в атмосферу, если вы собирает
你
No. As a matter of fact, 
حسناً يا هيوستن، لقد انتقلنا إلى الطاقة؛ ك
네. 
C'est pou
Okay. Der Fahrer springt an, holt das
Roger. Jim, go ahead and keep pumping the water down because we have plenty 
평면 외 방향으
ठीक है, जिम। हमारे पास आपके लिए लगभग तीन चीज़ें हैं। एक पैंतरेबाज़ी पैड है; और दूसरा पैंतरेबाज़ी पैड पानी में उतरने के लिए है। इसके अलावा, हमारे
わかりました。でも、10人に遭遇する
射出座席の安全性向上 - Carnarvon GO - およびショル
캘리포니아,
D'accord. Passons à l
Allez-y. Haut -
不，没关系。我只是想确认一下。到79年10月之前，我
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Готовы скопир
맞아요. 제가 입력을 안 했어요. 잠시 컴퓨터에 입력을 맡겼었죠. 제가 이것저것 만지작거리는 동안 모드 스위치를 MANUAL에서 다시 원래대로 돌려놓았는데, 컴퓨터가 별을 시야에서 사라지게 해버렸어요. 그래서 지연된 이유는 M
Roger, pourriez-vous nous indiquer plus précisément la position de Zeta Persei? Elle n'est pas indiquée sur nos cartes. Nous avons Mirfak et nous connaissons Algol, mais laquelle est 
알겠습니다. 
여기 있는 사람들은 모두 100
Okay. Ich habe die Checkliste für die Einfügung v
ورقم 13، هيوستن. إذا رغبتم، يمكننا إعلامكم كل د
わかった
11, Houston. We have a good view out of the rendezvous - correction, the ove
デケ、それは 51 か 50 
روجر، سنزودك بتحديث لخطة الطيران. ما زلنا نحسب عملية الاحتراق التالية، ونستعد لتزوي
11
好的。
La visibilité est nettement réduite en conséquence. Le taux, à ce stade, à MARK,T, est presque entièrement
이 기체는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 몇 번이나 추
吉姆，今天晚上早些时候，我们以为你对饮用水的饮用量有些误解，但我们想告诉你，你可以想喝多少就喝多少。饮用水箱里有38磅水，这差不多足够你喝了
ठीक है। आपकी बैटरियों की स्थिति इस प्रकार है: बैटरी A की क्षमता 39.32 एम्प-घंटे, बैटरी B की 35.21 और बैटरी C की 38.46 एम्प-घंटे। आपके पास क्रायोचार्ज की शेष मात्रा वही है जो हमने आपको पिछली बार दी थी, यानी प्रति टैंक 180 पाउंड ऑक्सीजन और 11 पाउंड हाइड्रोजन। वर्तमान में, सर्विस मॉड्यूल के अनुसार, मात्राओं के लिए कंप्यूटर मानों का उपयोग करते हुए, आपके पास क्वाड A 45 प्रतिशत, ब्रावो 50 प्रतिशत, चार्ली 58 प्रतिशत और डेल्टा 48 प्रतिशत है। हम सेकेंडरी टैंकों के साथ यह करने की योजना बना रहे हैं कि उन्हें 37 प्रतिशत वास्तविक क्षमता पर चालू कर दें, और
Хорошо, Билл. Это будет на странице 2-22 вашего плана полета. Пилоту
Ora ho un orizzonte molto limpido. C'è abbastanza luce e ho un orizzonte composto principalmente da nuvole. Riesco a vedere le nuvole: le stelle che iniziano a scendere nell'aria principale brillano, ma le nuvole sembrano dare un orizzonte più luminoso. Non sembra che noi - prima durante il volo abbiamo visto un orizzonte senza nuvole ed era molto più - era uno strato d'aria piuttosto spesso e si potevano vedere le stelle mentre scendev
Ricevuto. Il DELTA sembrava funzionare correttamente. Il tempo di combustione ci è sembrato essere circa 2 secondi più lungo, 517. VGX segnava 95485 quando l'abbiamo ricevuto. L'assetto era nominale. VI segnava 35452 al cut-off, H-dot 04552 e H è 01791. La temperatura era -2
D'accord. Bon, elle va probablement te saute
जेरी, वैसे तो मुझे यह
Houston, Apollo 11. Konnten Sie vor dem Einsetzen des Sauerstoffs einen Unterschied im N2-Druck feststellen? Mir scheint, als wären die beiden Drü
Tr-10 back to normal. I've done that earlier. Okay, we got - got suit pressure. Go ahead and take a look at the inverters again here. 250 is 141 (degrees), 150 is about 107 (degrees). Well enough alone. Standby is... 7. Just about ambient. Negative, it's even a little.... The cabin pressure is about 5.3 (psi), which is perfect. Suit dome is 72 (degrees). Cabin dome
シグマ・セブン。通信が非常にノイズが多いようです。しばらくは待機し、連絡は控えます。ウーメラへの連絡は
Wilco, Apollo 8. Innanzitutto, se puoi permettertelo
أقول إنها جميعًا تبدو نظيفة مجددًا. أعتقد أنها
Sì. Credo che in
Roger, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ic
ح
حسنًا، لا
Ricevuto. Ripeto, latitudine più 0920, meno 16500 12953 36175. Ri
Okay. Good deal. And whenever you get cleaned up, we got the entry pad and the landing area summary
Bon, on devrait s'occuper de ce problème de roulage que j'avais signalé, maintenan
s、3、ATT 1/R
10
Ja. Er schläft damit, dass es
Понял. Принято. Кажется, по телевизору тоже так показалось. И теперь последний вопрос. Нил, ты заметил, что при приближении к месту посадки пролетел над кратером размером с футбольное поле, содержащим довольно крупные глыбы твердой породы, размером примерно от 10 до 15 футов. Можешь оценить расстояние до 
알겠
네, 감
B
حسناً. أسمعك ب
Bene. Vi darò un breve riassunto dei sistemi. Fondamentalmente, tutti i sistemi sono a posto. Per quanto riguarda la vostra traie
저희는 북쪽으로 5분 거리, 아니, 북쪽으로 9분, 9마일 거리에 있
友谊
D'accord, Vance. Nous avons retiré... envi
好的，弗兰克。这是我们目前正在研究的问题之一。
Ok, 13; qui siamo a Houston. Vorremmo che andassi alla tua checklist G&C, le p
——然后我
रॉजर। डेल्टा-वी के लिए... यह 42.5 है; पिच-डाउन अब 2 डिग्री है; कोर 25 00425 है; 26 00011 है। हमें ऐसा लगता है कि पॉलिसी ड्रॉप-ऑफ लोड है। रडार दर घट रही है जैस
アポロ8号、ヒ
范斯，是不是太近了？现在
انظر إلى ذلك! إنه جميل
わかった。本当に大丈夫だ。では、ここで動
收到。继续报告。舱压5.5，保持良好。舱内空气温度95华氏度；相对湿度20%；冷却剂用量67%；宇航服温度
ठीक है। जैक, सबसे बुनियादी बात यह है कि बिजली बचाने के लिए कंप्यूटर को स्टैंडबाय मोड 
Ciao Houston, 
好的，还有 2 分钟；我会设置 DELTA-V 推力，正常
سهل - سهل 0.3، 7.6، لكنني... تمامًا في الطرف الجنوبي الغربي لفوهة بركانية. 
着陸後のチェックリスト。パラシュートジェットプッシュ。着陸安全。着陸バス安全。ヘルメットを外して収納。私はそのままにしておく。アーム
Roger. Y 001, NA, più 00202 46420 547 46211 12 1383 327 023 su 172 sinistra 22, più 1293, meno 16500, più 12905,
All right, Buzz. It's - flyby is the purpose. SPS/G&N: 62815, plus 097, minus 020 070 54 5944, minus 00028, plus 00023, plus 00069 029 149 312, apogee is NA, plus 00221 00078 001 00034, sextant star 01 2385 227, boresight star is NA NA NA. Latitude is minus 0265, minus 16500, 11899 36228, 144
Solo 
- - हम चाहते हैं कि आप सीधे 060 पर जाएं और धूमकेतु बेनेट की फोटोग्राफी के लिए अपनी दरें शून्य कर दें। ऐसा करने के लिए, हम चाहते हैं कि आप क्वाड C और D को सक्रिय करें। इस प्रक्रिया के लिए, अपने सभी क्वाड का उपयोग करें। और ठीक 1 मिनट में, हम चाहते हैं कि आप बैटरी B
現時点ではそうではありま
Роджер, Аполлон-11. У нас есть лазер, который мы собираемся... Это сине-зе
Gemini VI, Хьюстон
وأخيراً يا جيم، نحن نفكر في استخدام القمر ثم الشمس للحصول على ا
Роджер, Майк. Еду к вам по маршруту 130, точка 1 — 98 37 35, точка 2 — 98 42 44, 4 мили к северу. Конец
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह एटीएस कैप कॉम 
Well, right now we're all
Roger. Do you want to 
哦，是的。我们已经有了所有需要的内部连接——也就是我们需要的各种接口，但我不太确定这个装置是否仅仅是为了 1/6g 环境而设计的，以及它在零重力环境下
알겠습니다. 달 관측 자세를 취한 상태에서 '입장'을
अरे ह्यूस्टन। आप कैसे
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे पास आपको भेजने के 
Ceux qui écoutent avec un débit binaire élevé ici disent que c'est comm
電気系統の点検をしま
Роджер. Мы... Мы больше не видим там никаких частиц, покидающих космический аппарат. Мы бы предложили вам снова немного приблизить изображен
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 배터리 B 충전에는 약 6시간이 더 걸릴 것 같습니다. 충전 속도가 지상에서 확인한 곡선보다는 낮지만, 아폴로 7호 곡선보다는 높고, 현재로서는 순조롭게 진행되고 있는 것으로 보입니다. 그리고 중간 궤도 수정까지의 일정이 
ठीक है। अब, हम -2 प्लस 30 पर हैं; हम सर्किट ब्रेकर एसें
Роджер. Ты выглядишь неп
好的，杰克。我已经装好了两个 Commander 断路器，一个用于交流电，一个用于直流电；还有两个 GASTA 断路器，一个用于交流电，一个用于直流电。接下来，你需要打开所有加热器，并给它们加压，然后打开主安全
Plus 59578, moins 00086, moins 05287, 012 080 018, non applicable, plus 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, terre vers le haut 005, droite 27, plus 0398, plus 06500 13215 36961; Sirius Rigel 137 311 339, pas de marge, supposer l'exécution d'une manœuvre de survol, utilise un
Ok. Mentre ti leggo, prendiamo il nastro grigio e lo pieghiamo in modo da ottenere... il retro si attacca all'esterno dei contenitori, 
روجر. مقاييس التسارع عند
Roger. How far are you from the laun
Поправка.
ठीक है, अभी हमारे पास उस प्रक्रिया के शुरू होने का कोई निश्चित समय नहीं है; हम इस पर कड़ी मेहनत कर रहे हैं। इसमें कुछ घंटे लगेंगे; और जैसे ही हमे
확언입니다. 그리고 "이벤트 타이머 설정" 아래에 ENTER; 1
로저. 잡음이 많이 들리네요. 지평선 너머로 위기의 바다가 보이고, 가운데에는 피카드라는 어두운 크레이터가 보입니다. 지금 우리는 달의 일출, 혹은 우주선의 일몰 지점을 지나고 있습니다. 이곳은 태양이 막 떠오른 지역입니다. 우리가 지금 지나고 있는 바다는 얼룩덜룩한 모습이지만 크레이터가 많지는 않아서 비교적 최근에 형성된 것 같습니다. 이곳은 풍요의 바다이며, 우리는 삼각주 가장자리 형태의 큰 크레이터에 접근하고 있습니다. 크레이터 중앙에는 특이한 원형 균열 무늬가 있습니다. 지금 보이는 크레이터는 지름이 약 3
थोड़ा धीरे चलो, माइक; रुको, रुको, 
Okay, Apo
罗杰。我们正在讨论一些事情，比如把十针阀调到手动模式或者部分关闭
Okay. Now it looks like - Okay, the weather on the horizon -- clouds, clouds on the horizon on the left hand side of the picture, I can see the clouds right up to about the middle, and at the middle it looks like t
알겠습니다. 곧 시작하겠
मुझे यह देखकर बहुत दुख होता है कि हम इस तरह से अपनी ऑक्सीजन का उप
كيف حالكم؟ كل شيء على ما يرام هنا، ونحن نستعد. لا يوجد أي تأخير في الاستعدادات، ولا توجد أي مشكلة على الإطلاق. 
Okay. And the second switch is the glycol evap
알겠
不，我们可以找到其他光源。这只是
अब क्षितिज एकदम साफ़ दिखाई दे रहा है। आसमान में हल्की रोशनी है और ज़
Essayer de faire entrer tout le monde par
Ti piacerebbe che ti suonassimo un po' di musica per chitar
ر
ها هي تل
评分，高，并更新
Das ist richtig. 30 Fuß pro Sek
Roger, Bill. Nous avons effectué une sauvegar
休斯顿，这里是阿波罗8号。我想确认一下燃烧状态报告。VGX为-1.4，VGY为0，VGZ为0.2
Jim, Roger. Il vostro uso del TC... e solo per ricordarvi che in manovra quel... quel... quel rollio è in R3 e 
700, 150 en hau
Columbia, si vous le permettez, nous vou
D'accord, page 17. Effectuez la charge à -4 minutes; il s'agit de CB(11), INVERTER 2, FERMER, et rayez « Sélectionnez INVERTER 1 ». L'ÉCHELLE DE DÉBIT est modifiée à « 25 degrés par seconde ». « COUPLE ÉQUILIBRÉ », nous allons désactiver; et, au passage, concernant les taux d'amortissement, cela nous ramène à la discussion que nous avions déjà eue, Charlie, sur les reprises de contrôle. Vous pourriez discuter de ce que cela va nous coûter en termes de DELTA-V, si nous rencontrons u
У Эда сейчас большая часть оборудования при себе. У меня есть пистолет, камера и фит
Très bien. Je suis prêt à commencer la procédure. Lorsque vous me répondrez, 
S 
... 제대로 조
알겠습니다, 잭. 태도를 그대로 유지하세요
私がやることは…もう一度言います…わかりました。もう一度繰り返します。パッケージバルブを押し下げてオフ、緊急キャビ
D'accord. Le pavé numérique indique ceci, puis je vais répéter les angles pour que vous puissiez les copier. Ensuite, à -7, manœuvrez l'appareil pour obtenir les attitudes suivantes: roulis, 000; tangage, 91,3; lacet, 000. V
Our radar checks indicate 50,000 foot perilune. Our visual altitude c
16:41:00
Looks like there is a lot of room down there, considering all the boxes on the f
77:44 - حسنًا، - خط الرؤية يس
Okay. Bei der Überprüfung unserer redundanten Komponenten ist uns aufgefallen, dass wir die Integrität der Sekundärkreislaufradiatoren noch nicht geprüft haben. Falls dies noch nicht geschehen ist, würden wir die Sekundärradiatoren gerne einmal öffnen, aber den Durchfluss stoppen und lediglich den Druck im Akkumulat
Anda
不，还没——等灯灭了再说。那东西是不是想——嘿，我不知道它还能这样。你没听到
它还在那里。我现在就看着它。我能看到——太阳就在我身后，然后就出现了这么多闪闪发光的小点。是的
잭, 제가 주변을 좀 살펴볼게요. 달의 각도가 정말 맞는지 다시 한번 확인하려고 했는데, 달이 다시 중앙에 
下次降低主氧气压力时，尽量降到大约 800 ps
Хорошо, Кен. Мы возвращаемся к теме отношения. Хочешь, мы сейчас проведём этот тест REACQ с высок
Хорошо. Значит, вы уверены, что это сервисный модуль, и, конечно, нас интер
ठीक है। टेप रिकॉर्डर का इस्तेमाल करते समय सावधान रहना। बिल को 
La distance à parcourir entre le fond du module de commande et la cloison arrière doit être d'environ 5 à 6 mètres. Ce n'est pas du tout déroutant, mais il est très intéressant d'imaginer prendre appui sur l'un des véhicules et bondir dans l'autre
People listening to the high bit rate down here say it's
Ok, 36-DELTA 84 avanti, 43 indietro, 2+19. 0+55. 22 40 42.
Хорошо, а ещё у меня есть для вас предмет "видимость звёзд при использовании сканирующего телескопа", который вы сможете взять, когда будете готовы его скоп
알겠습니다. 스포츠 소식부터 전해드리겠습니다. 로스앤젤레스 다저스 투수 샌디 코팩스와 배우 리처드 위드마크의 23세 딸 
Bene. E poi, più avanti, a circa 3 metri, c'è una roccia 
Sette, qui è California Com
로저. 그건 05 더하기 39 더하기 41이고, 요한계시록 4장, 동경 112.2도, 8시 22분 더하기 57분, 적
わかりました。パネル8で、開回路にするブレーカーの数を読み上げます。ま
Три кратера — три горизонтальных кратера, которые вы сейчас видите в поле зрения, находятся непосредственно под наземным следом. Справа — самый 
Verificare l'assenza di MT
はい、そこは良い場
11番、ヒューストン。電話した？オ
알겠습니다. 저
Apollo 8, this is Houston. O
Okay. Auf Checkliste G/8-2, Schritt 5, steht: „Deaktivieren Sie alle Düsen in zwei benachbarten Quads“. Genau das meinten wir mit „Deaktivieren Sie die Quads A und B“. Soweit so gut. Nun zu Schritt 7, wo „Aktivieren Sie alle Düsen“ steht: Wir hofften, Sie dachten nicht, dass A und B deaktiviert bleiben sollen. In diesem Fall ist es wie beschrieben: Alle
了解、フレッド。もう大丈夫だ。マイナス30秒の時点では、焼ける心配もないので、「ABORT 押しボタン、押す」と消
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कै
로저. 우주선과 발사체 유도 시스템을 점검했습니다. 둘 다 양호한 상태입니다. 발사체 유도 차단 확률은 99% 이상으로 예상되므로, 상황은 매우 안정적으로 유지되고 있습니다. 참고로, 약 1분간 사용 가능
Houston, Colombie. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Comment ça, moi
よし。やっと正しい目盛りが見つかった。VOXの記録に戻らなきゃ。線量計の目盛りが見つかった。そして、その目盛りは0.1未満、ちょうど0.04だ。線量計をハッチに戻している。こ
Et, Verseau, Hous
Oh, stanotte dorm
Not really. I think we are looking at that prior to the midcourse correction as being the time when we would like to check out the water boilers. The coldsoak does involve some water boiler, too, but that's going to be done right before entry when these things are not going to be very sensitive, and if we don't do it in 12 hours, it is not r
알겠습니다. 이제 87시간 35분이 남았네요
لا
收到。滚转和俯仰角与飞行计划略有偏差，11。滚转
음, 거의 사라졌네요. 다른 창문으로 밖을 내다보면 달이 보일 가능성이 있는지 궁금했습니다. 어, 다시 들어오네요, 빌. 좋
更正一下，是
了解。人民解放軍と軍用機の最新情報です。エリア40-3、分割噴射です。前方56、後方120。1+34。2+30。05 38 10。2+56。8+52。エリア41-デルタ83。1+41。06 30 09。8+58。15+01。エリア42-2 9
शुभ संध्या। मैं आप सभी से अपोलो 11 मिशन की उड़ान के कुछ प्रतीकात्मक पहलुओं पर चर्चा करना चाहता हूँ। पिछले दो-तीन दिनों में अंतरिक्ष यान में घटी घटनाओं पर चर्चा करते हुए हम इस निष्कर्ष पर पहुँचे हैं कि यह केवल तीन मनुष्यों की चंद्रमा यात्रा से कहीं अधिक था; यह किसी सरकारी और औद्योगिक टीम के प्रयासों से कहीं अधिक था; यहाँ तक कि किसी एक राष्ट्र के प्रयासों से भी कहीं अधिक था। हमारा मानना ​​है कि यह अज्ञात को जानने की मानवता की अदम्य जिज्ञासा का प्रतीक है। नील ने कुछ दिन पहले चंद्रमा की सतह पर पहला कदम रखते हुए कहा था, "यह मनुष्य के लिए एक छोटा कदम है, लेकिन मानवता के लिए एक बड़ी छलांग है," मेरा मानना ​​है कि यह इन भावनाओं को बहुत अच्छे से व्यक्त करता है। हमने चंद्रमा पर जाने की चुनौती स्वीकार की; इस चुनौती को स्वीकार करना अपरिहार्य था। मेरा मानना ​​है कि जिस सहजता से हमने अपना मिशन पूरा किया, वह उस चुनौती को स्वीकार करने की समयबद्धता का प्रमाण है। आज, मुझे लगता है कि हम अंतरिक्ष अन्वेषण में विस्तारित भूमिकाएँ निभाने में पूरी तरह सक्षम हैं। पीछे मुड़कर देखें तो, हम सभी अपने अंतरिक्ष यानों, कोलंबिया और ईगल के लिए बड़ी मेहनत से चुने गए कॉल साइन से बेहद प्रसन्न हैं। हम अपनी उड़ान के प्रतीक चिन्ह से भी विशेष रूप से प्रसन्न हैं, जिसमें अमेरिकी ईगल को पृथ्वी से चंद्रमा तक शांति का सार्वभौमिक प्रतीक, जैतून की शाखा, लाते हुए दर्शाया गया है। चंद्रमा पर इस प्
ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन के लिए 
Aber geh doch rüber auf deine Seite. Mein erstes Manöver habe ich 
Das nennt man, gleichzeitig Mittagessen zubereiten und 
Роджер, Muchea Com 
알겠습니다. 텍사스 화재가 끝날 때까지 켜 두세요. 그 후 누수 여부를 지켜보겠습니다. 누수가 계속되면 케이프타
Mike, comment se présente tout ça, tous nos systèmes et tout
1
로저. 잘 들립니다. 3, 4, 5, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1. 어떻게 들리시나요
Хорошо, мы это прин
Okay. Lass mich kurz nachsehen, ob ich das richtig v
Okay. Du hast also die anderen Sachen gegessen.
Roger, arriva con un rapporto sul Pilota. L'ultimo pasto del Pilota è stato il secondo giorno, il quarto pasto. Ho bevuto 9 sorsi d'acqua e mi sento benissimo. Il Pilota di Comando, 3 il terzo giorno, e il pasto 
C'est exact, car la température affichée est un peu ba
收到，迈克
Bon, Jack, voici la LEVVA, déjà présentée. C'est une coiffe à porter à la surface, et je vous montre celle de Jim pour vous montrer quelques MODs. Auparavant, il était difficile de distinguer les différents personnages à la surfac
你是想让我切换到实时延时模式，还是想让我用断路器关闭
11号，这里是休斯顿。通讯中的噪音似乎已经安静下来了。我猜想我们已经把新的天线旋转到视野范围内，可能也让地球从你们的窗户里消失
Вп
好了，比尔，我们只想让你在自动模式下重新获取图像。看起来这不失为一个办法。但我们想说的是，如果你想跟我们谈谈什么，或者你遇到了其他问题，或者你不喜欢它现在的样子，总之，无论什么情况，都请在自
了解しました。了解しました。ありがとう
Okay. Now, the next event is going to be the separation of the service module, and these are some steps, but so that you will know what is going on, I'll read them to you. The will do a plus-X of one-half foot per second. Then you'll be hitting the SEP on and up, on their command. As soon as we are free of the service module, the will do another minus-X for 0.5 feet per second. This is called the push-pull maneuver. I think it was described this afterno
また、あなたの DL 
E Houston, Apollo 11. Queste manovre ottiche AUTO, o P23, manovre AUTO, non sembrano raggiungere il punto substellare. Riesci a calcolare l'angolo di rollio
Ok, Jim.
네, 맞습니다. 우선 주요 이벤트 시간을 간단히 훑어보고 나서 세부 사항을 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 좋습니다. 진입 인터페이스는 142시간 40분, 즉 약 6시간 30분 전에 시작합니다. 히터 전원을 켜고, CM/ 온도를 확인하고 필요하면 CM/을 예열합니다. 아마도 예열이 필요할 것으로 예상됩니다. 자세한 절차는 나중에 안내해 드리겠습니다. 약 6시간 전에는 이전 중간 점검 때 사용했던 수정된 30분 체크리스트를 사용하여 전원을 켜기 시작합니다. 그리고 약 5시간 전에는 이전처럼 지구 종단면을 사용하여 기체 축 정렬 자세를 취해야 합니다. 그리고 그게 준비되는 대로 -7 단계를 수행할 건데, 현재로서는 초당 약 2피트(약 60cm) 정도의 연소 속도, 즉 약 15초 정도 걸릴 것 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لستَ مُطالباً بالرد على هذه الرسالة، لكن الأطباء لاحظوا أن بعض أجهزة الاستشعار لديك قد
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Muchea Com Tech, вызываю на КВ и УВЧ диапазонах. «Дружб
장비가 보관되
好的，杰克。我刚才讲的关于回退的步骤是唯一需要严格按照顺序执行的。从现在开始，你可以按照启动程序的步骤进行操作，然后再回退。换句话说，你应该
क्या आप हमें अप
По
待機する
هذه فريندشيب 7. سؤال وجيه. أتمنى لو كنت أعرف الإجابة أيضًا. هذه الأخطاء تظهر وتختفي طوال الرحلة. قمتُ بتقييد الجيروسكوبات وإعادة تثبيته
好的，我完全明白你的意思。我比
We can't see the booster. Have to be turned around for this check. We can't see it. We'r
È affermativo. Quell'INVIO è ciò che avvia il dump. Poi, prima di questo, vogliamo assicurarci di averne 10.0
네, 짐. 지금 녹음기가 보이는데
这次飞行的成功，首先要归功于历史，归功于那些为我们铺路的科学巨匠；其次要归功于美国人民，他们用自己的意志表达了渴望；再次要归功于四届政府及其国会，感谢他们落实了这一意志；最后要归功于建造我们飞船的各个机构和工业团队，包括土星号、哥伦比亚号、鹰号，以及小型月球表面探测器——宇航服和背包。我们要特别感谢所有参与飞船建造、设计、测试，并倾注了全部心血和能力的美国人。今晚，我们向他们致以特别的谢意，也
了解しました。現時点では、月面図鑑に関する最新情報はありません。いくつか検討中ですが、ごく小さ
유효한 혈압 측정값이 있습니다. 조종사의 혈압 측정 결
Fred-o, if you think it's practical, we're ready to give you some - we're working on some camera set
Хорошо, Шкипер. Мы придумали способ, как тебе согреться. Мы решили начать тебя подпитывать прямо сейчас, и вот что мы хоти
تمام
Да, думаю, раз уж мы провели проверку на износ, лучше всего будет установить его обратно над прибор
Okay, maybe y
حسنًا. تقول الخطوة 8: "اضبط على وضع الانتظ
了解。どれくらい捨てたのか教
콜럼비아, 휴스턴
Хорошо, Джим. Мы... Мы говорили о том, что вам нужно изменить положение относительно стартовой площадки для лучшего обзора звездного поля из командного модуля, и вот что мы хотели бы от вас попросить. Если вы можете предсказать сейчас или в ближайшее время, какое положение вы хотели бы занять в данный момент, и занять это положение сейчас, мы хотели бы иметь возможность вычислить углы поворота карданного подвеса для грубой ориентации. Мы можем это сделать, если вы займете выбранное положение, удержите его, вызовете команду и сообщите нам углы поворота карданного подвеса. Мы сможем взять эти значения и вычислить углы поворота карданного подвеса для грубой ориентации, предполагая, что, когда мы вернемся к грубой ориентации, вы вернетесь в выбранное положение. Вас это у
Roger. Abbiamo 
Роджер. Майк, когда ты некоторое время назад экспериментировал с этим, и мы снова уменьшили мертвую зону, предполагалось, что мертвая зона центрирована вокруг нового положения, в котором мы находились в тот момент. С тех пор мы отклонились на пару градусов как по тангажу, так и по рысканию от этого положения, так что есл
فري
क्या यह सब तैयार है? मैं इसे वापस यहाँ रख देता हूँ। यह तुम्हारे सामान के नीचे है। अब, मुझे लगता है कि अगर बज़ अपना कैमरा ऊपर ले जाना चा
没错。这张卡片就完成了。其余的更新只是基于我们58小时的平台数据，仅供您参考——请查看平
네, 짐. 지금 녹음기가 보이는데, 그런데 오
육분의에 대해 조금 말씀드리겠습니다. 좁은 우주선 안에서 육분의를 사용하는 것
CMC 검증 완료; AUT
Kano Cap Com, hier spricht Sigma Seven. Auf HF. Ich verstehe 
Рог. Мы теряем тебя. Мы теряем тебя в воздухе и на земле. Не мог бы ты с
双子座 4，卡那封 CAP COM。结
Apollo 11, Houston. We believe we've tracked down the reacquisition problem we had on the previous REV. It looks 
はい、S バンド アンテナ OMNI A を現在お持ちの B
11番、こちらはヒューストンです。残り約6分です。地上回線の設定をするため
Houston, Roger. Out
알겠습니다. 드로그 전개 및 착수까
Roger. Die Spanne um 20 Uhr – bei unserem GET von 21:50:00 plus 22,24. Die Spanne um 2
الطقس هنا جيدٌ نوعاً ما. أعتقد أنك ستتمكن من ر
Roger, Canary, Gemini. Wir sind wieder auf unserem regulären Flugplan, der derzeit allerdings keine genauen Zeitangaben enthält. Kön
Roger
- -
Roger. Tout va bien; le m
わかりま
Okay. Wir möchten Ihnen unseren Plan kurz erläutern. Wir befinden uns derzeit in einer wasserkri
Hawaii Cap Com, hier spricht Sigma Seven, ich verstehe Sie laut und deutlich
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Ваша траектория и наведение — ВПЕРЁД. Конец свя
روجر، ترانكويليتي. نتلقى اتصالك من الميدان. لقد جعلتَ مجموعة من الرجال على وشك الانهيار. نحن نت
We're going to tak
Ciao 
Négatif. Nous en parlions justement il
Ich befinde mich jetzt in der Wiedereintrittsposition. Bereit für den Automatikmodus. Das Fly-by-Wire-System funktioniert einwandfrei, genau wie im Trainer. Sehr positive Ergebnisse mit dem Verfahrenstrainer. Die Zeit vergeht wirklich rasant. Zurück in den Au
दोस्त
I've noticed several times in going from the sunlight into the shadow, that just
噴射に近づくにつれ、前回の噴射時と同じ確認作業を実施してください。つまり、すべての電源が入っていることを確認しなければなりません…皆さんの指示に従って、回路ブレーカーを一つずつ確認します。そして…司令
और आपके पास क्या-क्या
Et si vous n'avez pas vu nos rési
Oka
杰克的剂量计——杰克的
Хорошо. «А
아직 그 단계는 아닙니다. 대략 25도에서 30도 정도 된 것 같습니다. 지금 요잉(yaw)을 멈추고 있습니다. 잠망경으로 창과 조준선을 확인하고, 잠시 후 표시를 해서 모든 회전 속도를 멈추도록 하겠습니다. 이제 거의 후퇴 자세에 도달했고, 요잉은 아주 깨끗해 보입니다. 잠시 후퇴해서 확인해 보겠습니다. 오른쪽으로
Siamo a vostra disposizione per fornirvi il rapporto sui controlli della pompa del liquido d
نعم. سيكو
CB MAIN A, BAT
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。この中間コースが間に合わなかった場合は
E, un'altra cosa, Jack. Quando sarà il momento di imbardare a 90 gradi, quello che avevo programmato di fare era di tenere NOUN 76 e di dare impulsi e imbardare diverse volte finché l'imbardata non iniziava, sperando che beccheggio e rollio rimanessero en
Roger. I am about 15 minutes early with the fi
Okay. D
नहीं, ऐसा नहीं है। हाँ, हरा रंग तो है
سنقد
Роджер. Мне стало любопытно узнать о ценности бортового слежения на траектории, близкой к Луне, в контексте отслеживания на таком близком расстоянии от Луны. Думаю, что бортовая навигация может давать некоторое сниже
月の写真を白黒で撮りました。気象庁のフィルターを外した状態で。写真6枚目です。月が沈むので、シャッタースピードを落としてもう一度撮っ
로저. 아직 시도해보진 않으셨
Das Gegendruckventil ist geschlossen, und der Wasserfluss ist abgestellt. Vielen Da
Отлично. Ес
روجر، فريد. 
연소 상태 보고서는 다음과 같습니다. 연소 시작 시간, 연소 시간 4분 6.5초, VGX -1.4, 자세는 정상, 트림 없음, VGY는 0, VGZ는 +0.2, 
Okay, Jim. That's a good readback, and in the ev
トランクウィリティ基地、こちらヒューストンです。追尾モードの可動アン
分かり
Okay. Let me have comment on that. I suspect that the roll angles we gave you were calculated for exactly 90 degrees pitch, and you're probably wobbling enough that they'r
罗杰。
وهذا 
Нет
我不确定我是否理解这个问题，但我们在散
أبولو 8، بينما ننتظر الوصول إلى أعلى مستوى للارتفاع، سأواصل تلخيص المسار. لا يزال بإمكاننا العودة إلى خط منتصف المحيط الهادئ من النقطة الثالثة عشرة، وستكونون في طريقكم بعد 138 ثانية من بدء الاحتراق. هذه المدة (138 ثانية) تُخرجكم من منطقة الفراشة. نوصي بعدم محاولة الإشعال المسبق أو إعادة التشغيل بعد 20 ثانية. إذا تجاوزتم 20 ثانية، فقد يتجاوز المسار قدرة التصحيح، مما يؤدي إلى عودة حرة. الطقس في منطقة الاستعادة جيد. لدينا رياح خلفية ورياح خارجية. أثناء الاحتراق، قد تلاحظون تغيرًا طفيفًا في ضغط غرفة الاحتراق وضغط الخزانات نتيجةً لنفاد الوقود في خزان التخزين وانتقاله إلى خزان التجميع. قد يحدث هذا في غضون 2 إلى 5 ثوانٍ من بدء الاحتراق. سيكون تغيرًا طفيفًا في الضغط في كلا النظامين. جميع الأنظمة جاهزة للعمل. نريد إيقاف غليان الماء بعد ذلك لأغراض المسار. يبدو وضع تصريف الماء جيدًا. يجب أن تكون الأمور على ما يرام، بل وأكثر من ذلك. سنحاول تأجيل تفريغ الماء حتى بعد الساعة 5. في هذه الأثناء، نود تحريك المبردات قبل ذلك - تصحيح. ستحدث عملية التنظيف التالية لخلايا الوقود في حوالي الساعة 10، وستكون 
你好，瓜伊马斯通信技术公司，瓜伊马斯通信技术公司。这里是​​友谊七号。请清晰接收您的高频
आप जानते है
Хорошо,
はい、少し前に作業が終わったところです。夜側の半分くらいのところで、ハッチの温度は67度でした。待機して、他の皆さんに伝えて
它在那里，但并不在六分仪的正中间；我猜它偏离了中心——大概偏离了0.02或者其他什么奇怪的数字。好了，完成这些之后，按下VERB 37，回车；……回车，然后我把光学系统调到零位，手动模式，并把这里的泛光灯调到
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Nous
Okay. Was den Mittelkurs angeht, denke ich, dass wir uns im Allgemeinen einig sind, dass wir ihn wie bisher durchführen. Nun zu den Fenstern: Die mittleren Fenster sind praktisch unbrauchbar. Die beiden seitlichen Fenster eignen sich vielleicht zur Beobachtung, und das Problem mit den Rendezvous-Fenstern ist, dass sie ziemlich klein sind. Ich dachte, wir müssten 
Bene. Ho appena copiato e sei 
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات لوصف نجاحكم. من المقرر أن يشاهد الرئيس نيكسون الليلة مباراة البيسبول في واشنطن. بعد المباراة، سيتوجه إلى منطقة عمليات الإنقاذ في المحيط الهادئ. مساء الأربعاء، سينتقل من جزيرة جونستون بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى سفينة الاتصالات البحرية أرلينغتون. ثم صباح الخميس، سيعود إلى الطائرة الهليكوبتر ويتجه إلى حاملة الطائرات هورنت في الوقت المناسب لمشاهدة هبوطكم في المحيط. سيرافق الرئيس وزير الخارجية ويليام روجرز وفرانك بورمان. سيشاهدون الهبوط من على متن سفينة الإنقاذ مع الأدميرال جون سيدني ماكين الابن، قائد قوات المحيط الهادئ. بعد إقامة الرئيس على متن هورنت، سينطلق في جولته الآسيوية وزيارته المقررة إلى رومانيا. يُعتقد أن المركبة لونا 15 قد تحطمت في بحر الأزمات أمس بعد أن دارت حول القمر 52 مرة. وذكرت وكالة الأنباء السوفيتية تاس أنه تم إجراء "أبحاث علمية" في الفضاء القريب من القمر. وقال السير برنارد لوفيل من مرصد جودريل بانك إن لونا 15 اصطدمت بسطح القمر بسرعة حوالي 300 ميل في الساعة. وقد ساد الهدوء النسبي مؤخرًا في فيتنام. وشوهد جنود أمريكيون يقومون بدوريات وهم يحملون أجهزة راديو ترانزستور مضبوطة على رحلة المركبة. وقامت شبكة الإذاعة والتلفزيون التابعة للقوات المسلحة في فيتنام بتغطية المهمة بشكل كامل. ولا تزال المناوشات مستمرة بين المصريين والإسرائيليين على طول قناة السويس. ويحاول مراقبو الأمم المتحدة هناك وقف العمليات. وفي واشنطن، صوتت لجنة الطرق والوسائل في مجلس النواب على خفض مخصصات استنزاف النفط من 27.5% إلى 20%. وقد هطلت الأمطار عدة مرات هنا في منطقة هيوستن. واليوم الجو غائم، ومن المتوقع هطول المزيد من الأمطار. على الصعيد الرياضي، وكما ذكرنا سابقًا، تُقام مباراة كل النجوم الليلة. لم تُجرَ أي مباريات أمس. وفي نيويورك الليلة الماضية، أعلنت رابطة كُتّاب البيسبول الأمريكية عن اختيار بيب روث كأعظم لاعب بيسبول على مر العصور، بينما نال جو ديماجيو لقب أعظم لاعب بيسبول على قيد الحياة. وقد أعلن فرانك بورمان عن هذه التكريمات خلال حفل عشاء أُقيم على شرف اللاعبين. أمضى جو ناماث يومًا كاملًا في معسكر تدريب فريق نيويورك جيتس. وواجه خمسة من رجال الشرطة صعوبة في السيطرة على نحو 500 طفل أرادوا لمس "برودواي جو". وقال إنه يشعر بحالة جيدة وسيشارك في مباراة كل النجوم في الأول من أغسطس، إذا سمح له المدرب ويب يوبانك بذلك. تعرض معسكر فريق أويلرز في كيرفيل للبلل أمس، لكن التدريبات استمرت. وحدثت بعض الإصابات الطفيفة، لكن لا شيء خطير. المدرب والي ليم راضٍ حتى الآن عن التدريبات. ويتوقع فريق أويلرز حضور أكثر من 30 ألف متفرج لمباراة ما قبل الموسم مع فريق بافالو. ويبدو أن إعلان دون ميريديث اعتزاله لن يُؤثر على الحماس، خاصةً هنا في هيوستن. فاز ماريو أندريتي بسباق ترينتون للسيارات لمسافة 200 ميل يوم الأحد، وهو الآن سائق السباقات المتصدر في ترتيب 
Houston, this is Apollo 8. We conc
Привет, Калифорнийский коммуникационный технологический инст
حسنًا. هناك أمر واحد يا جو، أريد فقط التأكد مرة أخرى. كل الأشياء التي كان من المفترض أن تبدأ عند 57 ساعة، والتي كان أول بند فيها هو الضغط إلى 5.7 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة، سنرفعها 
На самом деле, он не хочет распространять слишком много этой информации. Он хочет сохранить её и написать статью, когда вернётся, Майк
OK.: 2 plus 26 plus 05, 179, 108, 000, 5 plus 47, 10416,9, 35587, 358, 139, 320
روجر.
Ja, es ist wirklich schön. Gar nicht schlecht. Stimmt, du hast es nicht gesagt. Das hier ist ein ziemlich – ziemlich schönes Karussell, Vance. Alle zehn Minuten kann ich abwechselnd die Erde und d
Роджер. Телец, Аида; повторяю, Телец, Аида. Вверх 162, влево 01, остальное неприменимо. Выровнять Сириус, Ригел
로저. 멋진 쇼였습니다. 만약 그곳까지 방영된다면
了解、フランク。近地点の予測がマイナス03137度であることに、問題やおかしな点は見当たりません。これはケプラーの予測であり、あまり正確ではありません。ダウンリンクからのベクトルを取得し、こちらで仮想の外部マヌーバを実行した
Ricevuto. Temperatura d
حسنًا. يجب التأكد من وجود التيار المتردد، وذلك بإغلاق قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية رقم 2 في اللوحة 16. ثم في اللوحة 11، ضمن قسم شاشات العرض، يجب إغلاق قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية الخاص بجهاز التح
D'accord. J'ai
Well, that pisses me off. Hasselblad gone. Find that mother before she or I ends the... Everybody look for a floating Hasselblad. I see a pen floating loose down here, too. Is anyb
アポロ8号、ヒュースト
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Предполагаемый рубеж, 52, и это именно 
Il motivo per cui lo chiedo è che presumo che lo siamo, e non ho idea di quanto faccio scendere quel serbatoio di compensazione ogni volta che metto in pressione l'acqua per far uscire il modulo di comando e, se siamo a posto per quanto riguarda l'acqua, vorremmo riempire un paio di sacche 
わかりました。問題ありません。D-9を使ってくださ
Оно не совсем по центру, но примерно на диаметр, чуть 
ये रही पानी की बंदूक। इसके सिरे पर लगा बेलनाकार हिस्सा एक फिल्टर है जिसमें कई झिल्लियां हैं: एक झिल्ली पानी को तो गुजरने देती है, लेकिन गैस 
Okay, Vance. Okay. Wir haben hier gerade die OMNIs gewechselt. Ich meine, wenn 
Okay, 7000,... Sieht gut a
Roger, will you turn your Quantity Read Swi
Wir haben eine weitere Sichtung der T
Ok. Ora, quello era corretto, ma voglio ricontrollare il primo dato, quello era il voltaggio BAT Charlie. È quel
Roger. Everything's GO in the spacecraft. Looking good. The Co
Okay. Your horizon will be l
よし、やめて。ブ
Да, Джим, подтверждаю. Это тот вариант, который мы тебе дали вчера вечером после большого заезда, и мы будем использовать его в модифицированном нами виде. Мы протестировали это в симуляторе, и, конечно, никаких проблем не возникло, но, похоже, это неплохо работает, обнуляя скорости по тангажу и крену и позволяя системе управления полетом (ACS) делать это по рысканию. Вы об
Это «Сигма Семь». На КВ. Это «Сигма Семь». На КВ. Короткий отсчет. Это для проверки покрытия КВ в глобальном диапазоне. Продолжительность передачи — 60 секунд. Жаль, что я не знаю, что еще сказать, чтобы скоротать время. Если я достаточно глубоко вдохну, это может помочь. Капсула работает очень хорошо, и я думаю, что мы почти приближаемся к 
...9
Мне кажется, наша нестабильность усиливается. Земля сейчас находится практически у самого верха окна. Мне приходит
我这边窗口显示的速度大约是每秒30英尺。助推
Il s'agit de l'expérience Zodiacal Light Experiment, qui aura lieu le 5 septembre. L'objectif est de déterminer si les propulseurs de contrôle d'attitude risquent de provoquer un voile sur la pellicule. Nous vous demandons d'utiliser votre appareil photo Contarex 35 mm, en noir et blanc ou en couleur. Réglez l'ouvert
앤더
Roger. Compris. Je vais essayer, Ken, en faisant un essai. J'ai essayé hier, mais les résultats n'étaient pas
Убедитесь, что переключатель автоматического управления освещением (A
A che ora abbiamo pot
Хорошо, я хочу вернуться и проверить этот 35-DELTA. GMTRC должен быть 21 07 34, а сле
마지막으로 1차 산소 측정(P
Well, the problem is, no matter how carefully you let go, you bump it just a tiny little bit and set it in motion, and once in motion there sh
I'll be glad to get to the..
١١، هيوستن. مفهوم. وفي موضوع آخر، أرجو منكم ضبط
مرحباً، كيف تقرأ ال
收
अपनी गति कम करो ताकि मैं चांद को उस गोदी में देख सकूं
- -... die Tasche
과이
نعم سيدي، أقرأك بصوت عالٍ وواض
Joe, Jack sagt, er hat immer noch Probleme, durch das Fernglas zu sehen. Ich gehe jetzt 
Roger, Aurora Seven. C'est difficile à prononcer, mais nou
Roger. C'est très faible à cause du br
كولومبيا، هيوستن. سنوافيكم بتحديث حول وضع ناقلات الأمراض في الولاية لاحقًا. لسنا مستعدين لذلك حاليًا؛ وفي موضوع آخر، من قاعدة ترانكويليتي، هم على أهبة الاستعداد لب
The secondary coolant loop really looked good. Looks like you had a nice tight radiator and everything else on there was working right along the performance curves. Your main oxygen regulators both filled at 104 psi during our check. Looking at the lunar orbit, expect to be doing a water boil of about 1 pound per hour, and this is just an approximation; there's quite a variety of estimates 
روجر، هذه فريندشيب
Roger
了解
Okay. Ich kann bestätigen, dass wir uns in dieser Konfiguration befinden, mit Ausnahme von Panel 382, ​​dem Wasserspeicher, den ich weggelassen habe, fall
알겠습니다
分かりました。ロックが外れました。OMNIを交換しました。ちょっと考えを整理するために、どういうエントリーを計画してい
D'accord, Ed. Espérons que nous n'aurons pas à le fair
ومن باب الفضول، يجب أن ندرك أن المقارنة بين الجهاز والكمبيوتر في نطاق 35000 قدم، وذلك بناءً على آخر رصد، وهو ما يعتقد الناس أ
ठीक है। हमें वह मिल गया। आप किस तरह का ATT होल्ड मोड चाहते हैं? क्या आप वाइड डेडबैं
看起来像
Роджер, Фрэнк, этот баллон с гелием в квадранте А — по
Nave dell'Ocea
알겠습니다, 버즈. 비행 계획 항목에 대한 몇 가지 업데이트 사항부터 말씀드리겠습니다. 먼저 6번 중간 코스는 취소했습니다. 대기하세요. 오늘 아침에는 조금 더 시간을 드리겠습니다. 비행 계획의 두 번째 항목은 BATT B 충전을 언제든지 원하실 때 할 수 있도록 준비되어 있다는 것입니다. 세 번째 항목은 이번에는 폐수 배출 방식을 조금 다르게 하고 싶습니다. 지상에서 표시해 둔 지점에서 배출하려고 합니다. 기체가 약간 불안정한 상태라서, 기체가 적절한 상태를 유지할 
Роджер. Сейчас мы пытаемся добиться максимальной выгоды. Мы 
Сам
أخرجت الظل إلى هناك. 250، أسفل عند 2.5، 1
You expe
C'est une bonne façon de le décrire. Il me semble que le simple fait de s'asseoir dans le tunnel et de regarder par toutes les fenêtres changeait la donne; la fenêtre p
了解、グアイマ
मैं एडाप्टर के पीछे 
Questo viene dall'alto. Un altro sta proprio... sta scendend
Roger. Einen Moment bitte. Sie wollen wissen, ob Sie den Hauptbus B für das 
Роджер. Я поним
حسنًا، نحن على وشك الوصول إلى وضعية النوم؛ فقط ابقَ
Rudnev à l'appareil. Yuri Alekseyevich, comment vous sentez-vous? Avez-vous des nouv
Guaymas standing
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 아프가니스탄-파키스탄 지역 상공의 단일 세포 구름 형성을 육분의로 설명하시던 중 통신망이 혼잡해져서 연결이 끊겼습니다. 
रे
Ich fürchte, Sie müssen noch ein ode
ठीक है। अगर आप अपना कंप्यूटर चालू करेंगे, त
다시 말씀해 주시겠어요? 네, 말씀하세요. 저희는 
遗憾的是，图
Roger. Do you
Это Роджер. Кажется, у нас возникли проблемы с автоматическим режимом. Позвольте мне на минутку проверить систему электронного уп
Oka
Возможно, вас заинтересует один момент: мы прослушали ту низкоскоростную запись, которую вы сделали в первые несколько секунд, и которую мы считали непригодной для использования. И, видимо, проблема была в за
ونحن نتحرك وفقًا 
Roger. Hawaii C
Нет, к
Nein. Wir können eine andere Lichtquelle finden. Das bedeutet lediglich, dass sich der Vorgang verlangsamen wird, aber ich bin sicher, dass wir ihn tr
음, 여기 위쪽은 요(yaw) 방향에 관해서
ठीक है। और हम नीचे आपके पिच सीडीय
罗杰。我们先不处理这个问题。那是一个简短的三步流程，上面写着“重复激活步骤1、1A和2”，但其中还有一步没人能理解。所以，在这
Beautiful, Frank. I'm reading you loud and clea
，海
Gemini VI
네, 휴스턴 씨, 물병자리시군요
Да. Думаю, проблема в том, что мой рост около 60 см, а 
लगभ
Возникли большие пр
짐, 내가 30분 전에 프레드에게 우리가 가진 최신 패드를 건네줬어. 이게 우리 최신형이야. PC+2 방식이고, 7
Eh bien, c
好的。继汤米·雅各布斯之后，我们来看看休斯顿当地占星师露比·格雷厄姆的劲爆预测。她说，所有星座都预示着你们的月球之旅即将启程。尼尔很聪明，迈克判断力强，巴兹则擅长解决复杂问题。她还说，尼尔总是乐观向上，乐于助人。尼尔，你还应该拥有“能够
Je pense qu'il va pro
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-8. Мы прерываем эту музыкальную программу, чтобы представить вам вечер
Они также изучили результаты отслеживания ваших ориентиров. Все метки, по-видимому, были очень хорошими, и у нас есть целая страница данных относительно высот различных точек, которые я не буду вам зачитывать, но я хотел сообщить вам, что отслеживание, по всей видимости, прошло очень хорошо. У меня также есть ваши бюджеты расхода топлива, в частности, количество топлива. Это дельты от номинального значения, если они вам понадо
Да. Время от времени у тебя действительно возникает 
The responsibility for this flight lies first with history and with the giants of science who have preceded this effort; next with the American people, who have through their will, indicated their desire; next, to four administrations, and their Congresses, for implementing that will; and then, to the agency and industry teams that built our spacecraft, the Satu
Je suis just
Sei 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 만약 이 중간 기착지를 확보하지 못하더라도, 우리는 여전히 다른 곳을 시도할 것이며, OCTO 10인 미르팍을 시도해 보는 것도
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Die Updates 
Подтвердить. Под «НАЖМИТЕ», шаг 1, строка 1, вычеркнуть. Строка 4, «СНИЖЕНИЕ ГЕЛИЕВОГО РЕГУЛЯТОРА 1, столб обратной связи». Под шагом 2, вычеркнуть; шаг 3, вычеркнуть; «ВЫПУСК ШАС
ठीक है, जैक। मैंने अभी 
非
Ok. Questo è il... questo è il sistema che lo fa per me, ovviamente. Dovrò aumentare la regolazione della tuta. Sto appena pareggiando i conti. Imposterò la valvola di controllo della t
Roger. Parfait, 
罗杰。我这里有个评论说，
제가 하나 구해
Yes. 
حسناً. فهمت أننا سنبقى حتى مب
고르도에게
Capisco. Abbiamo una telemetria
हाँ, बिल्क
알겠습니다. 14페이지에서 'a', 'load'가 31021로 변경되었네요. 필요한 경우 업데이트된 무게 정보를 제공해 주시고, 그 뒤에 'ENTER'를 누르
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。良い時間になりそうだ。1時間前なら、入力イン
Ken, one thing we are going to do on
Now I was ju
रॉजर। थोड़ी सी हाई क्यू में आ 
알겠습니다. 제가 말씀드리려던
Ja. Wir haben den Blutdruck gemessen. Geben Sie uns
アポロ 8 号では、これらの角度をパネル 2 の AUTO REACQ に設定することを希望しています。これは、高利得アンテナの追跡の下にあります。下の位置に
Ça s'annonce plut
は
존에게 질문이 하나 있습니다. 폐기물 평가가 어떻게 진행되
Roger. No
— Мы не настолько уж зависимы от
Eagle，休斯顿。OMNI 之后，低比特率，我们将在
Wir haben heute alle maximal zwei Stunden geschlafen, Ken. Wir machen uns jetzt auf den Weg – Bill bleibt noch eine Weile wach, Jim und ich legen uns schlafen, und wir versuchen, kurze Schlafzyklen abzuwechseln, bis wir wieder im normalen Rhythm
Roger, tu pourrais peut-être me dire qu'on a vu les lumières de Sydney. Je ne sais pas s'ils les ont allumées, mais si c'est le cas, la facture d'élect
Это подтверждает правильность наших действий. Наш первый курс был 007 вперед, 005 влево и 007 вверх. Финальный промежуточный курс был 004 вперед, 06 вправо и 003 вверх. Это в значительной степени соответствует графику. В этот момент мы находимся немного ниже номинальной лини
Okay, Jack. Vorrei portare il jet A-4. Ho zero sul controllo del passo negativo, e -
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒュース
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. GET 연소 02 45 50; 델타-V, 26.2; 0 + 35; 요 90 우측,
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। तीन संचार स्विच स्थितियाँ। पहली, एस-बैंड ऑक्स टेप को डाउन-वॉइस बैकअप 
Okay. Sie können mit einer Brennstoffzellenspülung rechnen, und wir sollten kurz darauf mit dem Laden von Batterie A fertig sein; dann dürfte die Batterie fast voll sein. Wir rufen Sie an, sobald wir den Vorgang abschalten können. Wir bräuchten noch eine Bestätigung von Ihnen bezüglich der Chlorbehandlung. Haben Sie letzte Nacht Chlor zugegeben? Könnten Sie uns kurz zusammenfassen, wie viel Schlaf Sie auf Lovel
Иво
Сейчас мы все отправимся спать, сразу после того, как сыграем последнюю версию песни "W
高高度スラスタは良好に機能しており、近接追跡はフライ・バイ・ワイヤ低高度でのみ行う必要があります。高高度ではブースターの追尾は困難です。ジャイロはほぼ制限内に収まっています。経過時間は13時56分です。この時点でブースターを見失いました。カナリアレ
로저. 이번 달 탐사가 당신 눈에는 간단하거나 쉬워 보였을지도 모르겠습니다. 하지만 결코 그렇지 않았다는 것을 말씀드리고 싶습니다. 우리를 궤도에 올려놓은 새턴 V 로켓은 엄청나게 복잡한 기계 장치이며, 모든 부품이 완벽하게 작동했습니다. 제 머리 위에 있는 이 컴퓨터는 38,000개의 단어로 이루어진 어휘집을 가지고 있는데, 각 단어는 승무원인 우리에게 최대한 중요한 의미를 갖도록 매우 신중하게 선택되었습니다. 지금 제 손에 쥐고 있는 이 스위치는 사령선에만 300개가 넘는 동일한 스위치가 있습니다. 이
Die LEDs an meinen Fingerspitzen befinden sich genau an meinem ersten Fingergelenk
नहीं, मुझे देखने दीजिए कि क्या यह यहाँ सही से लगा है। मैं पैनल 275 पर जाता हूँ, CB MAIN A, BAT BUS A और C
자,
了解、アル。はっきりと聞こえました
Roger. On Rev 42, longitude 31° 
回転ハンド コントローラー
今のところ、カメラの付いた銃を持っていなかったら、もっとうまく操縦できるだろう。なぜ
ケープ・キャップ・コム。はっきりと聞こえまし
حسنًا، يبدو جيدًا. لأنني لا أعرف أين - إلى أي مدى أضعتك. حسنًا، اللوحة 4؛ الاتصالات، المجموعة 1، إلى AC1. في اللوحة 5، أغلق ما يلي: مجموعة الضغط 1، الرئيسية B؛ مجموعة ا
알았어. 자일로스 알
ठीक है। अब लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड के एक कनस्तर को उठाइए, और मैं आपको ब
Okay, Jim. Wir wollen dir da entgegenkommen; es ist ein Thema, das wir mit dir besprechen wollten. Wir haben darüber nachgedacht, und unsere Meinung dazu ist – natürlich liegt die Entscheidung bei dir, aber wenn wir die Vor- und Nachteile abwägen, hast du ja bereits den Vorteil genannt. Wir führen kurz vor EI minus einer Stunde eine Luken-Integritätsprüfung durch, und wenn diese beschädigt ist, hättest du große Schwierigkeiten, in die Anzüge zu schlüpfen. Andererseits könnten die Anzüge dich erheblich verlangsamen, ganz abgesehen von
Roger. Gemini 4, vorremmo che riportassi l'interruttore di alimentazione CA su IGS e l'interruttore del c
...
另一则本地新闻：亨茨维尔县法院大楼昨天黎明前被烧毁，看来他们又要在那里开工建设了。接下来是一些关于等待返程的家庭的报道。这篇报道由《邮报》记者安·詹姆斯撰写。“我们就像在月球背面休息一样，”瓦莱丽·安德斯在圣诞夜说道，当时她和家人正在等待阿波罗8号脱离月球轨道，返回地球。安德斯太太周二凌晨0点就到了，邻居们刚刚把孩子们都接走，这样在飞船飞到月球背面、与外界失去联系期间，他们一家人就可以休息一下。弗兰克·博尔曼上校的家在户外装饰着四个巨大的常青花环，上面撒满了粉状的雪花，还系着红色的蝴蝶结。书房里的一棵圣诞树正等待着他平安归来，他漂亮的金色头发的妻子苏和两个健壮的儿子弗雷德里克和埃德温计划留在家里，等待午夜时分飞船脱离月球轨道。通常情况下，他们会去圣克里斯托弗圣公会教堂参加午夜弥撒。计划是凌晨0点开始。由于博尔曼家没有小孩，所以圣诞礼物交换只能等到博尔曼上校带着他那份神奇的节日礼物——登月往返之旅——回来之后再进行。洛弗尔上尉忙碌的妻子玛丽莲·洛弗尔说，就孩子们而言，她的四个孩子将过一个完全正常的圣诞节；但谈论礼物的事就没戏了，因为其中两个孩子就坐在她旁边。“我连昨晚穿的衣服都没来得及换，”洛弗尔太太说。不过，大人之间的礼物倒是可以互赠，而且等洛弗尔回家的时候，圣诞树依然会摆在那里。这里有个不错的“行动热线”栏目。还有一封写给“行动”栏目编辑的小信。上面写着：“我们昨晚本打算乘飞碟给你们地球人一个惊喜。结果被一个胖子拉着雪橇，还有三个家伙开着火箭动力水桶绕着月球飙车吓跑了。这就是管理星球的方式吗？” 火星小子们署名。弗兰克，看来这里唯一对阿波罗8号不以为然的只有股市了。它的30个工业指数都下
표시
نعم، هذا جيد. هناك حل، وهو إعادة صيانته. إنها عملية شاقة نوعًا ما، ولهذا السبب نرغب في مراقبته عن كثب لنعرف قبل الدخول ما إذا كان بإمكاننا الاعتماد على وجود دورتين أو دورة واحدة. وهذا يقودنا إلى سؤالين نحاول الإجابة عليهما. أولًا، نود التأكد من أنك تخطط لاستخدام كلٍ من الغلايتين الأساسية والثانوية أثناء الدخول، ونبحث أيضًا عن طريقة لفحص الغلاية الأساسية للتأكد من أنها ليست جافة قبل الدخول. وهذا الأمر أصبح أكثر صعوبة مما تتوقع. إذا كانت لديك أي أفكار حول هذا ا
Okay. Und Vance, haben Sie eine ungefähre Vorstellung, wie lange wir A
روجر، فريندشيب سفن. هذه زنجبار كاب كو
Ich habe es n
쌍둥이자리 
Verseau, Houston. Répétez, s'il vous plaît
우리가 지상전에서 잘하는 것처럼 
Vielen Dank. Ihre Bewerbungsunterlagen waren sehr gut. Wir sind gerade dabei, das Wasse
En fait, détecter une dérive 
了解。それは少し難しいかもしれませんね。それではトンネルを見てみましょう。土のせ
초당 약 0.5도 정도의 미세한 요잉 현상이 있는데, 기체를 완전히 제어하려면 비행을 조정해야 할 정도입니다. 지금이야말로 HF 점검을 준비하기에 적절한 
क्या आप 
아주 좋아요. 저
ええ。チャーリー、過渡現象は前回の噴射時よりも顕著でした。軽い司令船だったからだろうと片付けましたが、ロール方向の変動はかなりありました。噴射開始から20秒ほどで収まったと思います。しかしその後、ピッチとヨー方向の変動も少しありました。異常ではないと思いますが、中心線の両側でロール方向のプラスマイナス約8度の範囲で、かなりはっきりとしたデッドバンドが発生しているように見えました。最初の2、3秒、ええと、最初の20秒ほどが過ぎると、ジンバルは静かになり、ピッチとヨーも比較的静かになりました。それ以前にも多少の振動はありましたが、ほとんどは回転速度だけでした。全体的な姿勢は比較的安定し
Подождите 1, Водолей, Одиссея. Мы просим вас перейти на ПРЯМОЕ соедин
روجر. فهمت. مراجعة 22 01 07
Ja, w
عندما نص
Ro
好的。当时
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Мы вас видим. Вам может потребоваться пара минут, чтобы интегрировать эти векторы, которые мы вам дали, и если вы не достигнете TIG-сварки, то это будет довольно нечувствительно. Вы можете просто позволить сварке дойти до TIG-сварки, а когда дойдете до нуля, можете продолжать. Кон
Примерно 5,3. Сейчас перейду на O2 High 
제리, 우리가 안테나를 바꿀 때쯤 당신이 아직 거기 있는지 알려주려고 가끔 전화해 주거나, 음
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. OMNI에서 Bake
11, Houston. Les prévisions actuelles indiquent des conditions acceptables dans votre zone de récupération: nuages ​​épars à 600 mètres d'altitude, vent du 070° à 13 nœuds, visibilité de 16 kilomètres et mer agitée (vagues d'environ 1,2 mètre). Les prévisions d'hier signalaient une tempête tropicale, Claudia, à 
제 표시를 하면 G.M.T.는 19 더하기 15 더하기
Yes, I noticed that. Y
Роджер, «Дружба семь». Аэромед хотел бы узнать, проводили ли вы 
我们一
हमें पता है गेंद अच्छी है। तो फिर हम 40 रन क्यों नहीं ब
この通信は、月と地球のほぼ中間地点から送信されています。飛行開始から
好的。杰克说你一
Ok. Esaminando le previsioni meteo che ti ho fornito, i 600 metri di dislivello nel punto di d
ユーティリティライトがまだ収納バッグに入っているのが見えた。おい、いい
ह्यूस्टन, हमारे चार्ट देखने के अनुसार, हम अभी स्माइथ सागर के ठीक
はい、11番です。こちらはヒューストンです。フライトプラン、就寝後チェックリスト、そしてその他すべての就寝後チェックリストの22時30分頃、「AUTO JET SELECT、16でON」という記述を削
- - À partir de 108:00 à gauche, tracez « Arrêter le taux ORB à l'attitude scientifique ORB ». À - Tracez dans la colonne de gauche la charge de « 10101 » et « 11111 ». En descendant jusqu'à 10, ajoutez ce qui suit: « Arrêter le taux ORB à l'attitude de la piste »,
مرحباً. مرحباً، موشيا كاب
आप तो कमाल के हैं! - बहुत ब
Хорошо, Джим. Настало время, когда тебе будет удобно, сделать еще одно измерение напряжения и силы тока на командном модуле. К т
Для нович
이글, 휴스턴. 정렬
Сложно сказать, какой темп можно считать разумным. Думаю, сейчас я использую именно такой темп — после нескольких сотен кругов становится довольно утомительно, но это может быть связано с особенностями костюма, а также с отсутствием грави
There seems to be no difficulty in moving around as we suspected. It's even 
Le carenature vengono elim
了解。現在、O2ファン
R
मुझे लगता है कि य
わかりました。マスタータイトルは「進入、LM準備、マイナス6時間」です。まず、BAT 5 NORMAL FEEDをONにします。次に、修正版/、30分起動チェックリストを使用します。次に、マイナス5時間、必要であれば-7です。さて、進入前の手順です。まず、サービスモジュールSEP姿勢に移動します。次に、ホットファイアを設定します。その下で、デッドバンドを最大にし、ATTITUDE CONTROLを3、PULSEに設定します。3、ホットファイアを実行
很高兴听到这
Roger. Kraftstoffgemisch: 90–100 %, Sauerstoff: 75–100 %, Stromstärke: 22 A, alle Systeme funktionieren einwandfrei. Keine Probleme. Steuerungssystem läuft tadellos. End
D'accord, Buzz. Concernant votre plan de vol, quelques mises à jour tout d'abord. Nous avons annulé la manœuvre de mi-parcours numéro 6. Restez simplement en vol. Je vous accorde un peu plus de temps ce matin. Deuxième point du plan de vol: nous sommes prêts pour une recharge de la batterie B à tout moment. Troisième point: nous souhaiterions effectuer le déversement des eaux usées différemment cette fois-ci. Nous aimerions le faire à nos marques au sol. Le terrain est un peu accidenté, et nous aimerions effectuer le déversement à un moment où nous pensons qu'il conservera sa configuration optimale. Il semble que nous aurons une opportunité favorable dans 15 à 20 minutes. À
さあ、ヒューストン。ジェミニ4号はコピーの準備
लेकिन इसका पैटर्न ऐसा है कि यह क्षैतिज रूप से फैलता है, और यह वास्तव में ऊपर आक
로저. 이글, 컬럼비아에서 Y 도트 값이 마이너스 
حسناً، لقد رأيته في المدار الأخير، لذا ربما سأراه في المدا
Sulla palla c'è scritto meno 10°. Immagino che sia per via della velocità orbitale, non è v
We had you on a +5 (degree) roll when you
D'accord. C'est exact. Je dois maintenant vous donner quel
أعتقد أنني أخطأت قليلاً في تقديري سابقاً، حين ظننت أن الأفق يمتد من سطح السحاب. من المؤكد أنه ليس أفقاً يمتد من سطح الأرض. أستطيع أن أرى في الأسفل نشاطاً للعواصف
텔레비전에 나왔네, 자
Roger. Seems nominal here. Everything looks good. Got 55 percent auto fuel. Passing through 70,000 feet, 65,000. Attitudes are very stable. Coming up on 60 (thousand). Rate 
حسنًا يا جو. من النافذة رقم 5، التقطتُ الجسم المتساقط مجددًا، لذا من المؤكد أنه كان لوحة. لا أعتقد أننا ما زلنا ع
Х
好
रक्तचाप दर्ज कर लिया गय
حسنًا، هذا جيد. مهلاً، لا تذهب إلى ج
Hallo, Muchea, Friendship Seven. 
Всё в поря
好的。吉姆，我想把其他镜头也拿出来。我觉得用四个镜头我
Хорошо. Я получил ка
Тета-ритм составил 59 минут плюс 10,0 градусов; диапазон – 79,25
حسنًا. نحن نوضح لك الأمور جيدًا هنا على ال
Sag es noch einma
Ro
알겠습니다. 그리고 잭, 제트 노즐이 4개인 경우와 2개인 경우를 비교해 볼 때, 연료 탱크 여유 시간을 10초로 유지할지 아니면 5초로 줄일지 결정해야 하는데, 어떻게 생각하
روجر. نقطة الدخول: المنطقة هي وسط المحيط الهادئ، الإحداثيات 000، 152، 001، 194 46 06، 267، خط العرض + 1332، - 16917، 064، 36194، 649، المدى المتبقي 14045، 36275، 195 03 06، 00 28، أقصى مسافة هبوط 154، 084، 22400، 18000، D0 400، 02 13، 00 17، 03 51، 09 02، نجم السدس 45 0189، 277، نجم محور الرؤية، غير متوفر، متجه الرفع للأعلى. ملاحظات: محاذاة، فيغا ودينيب، دوران 078، ميل 223، انحراف 340. ملاحظات إضافية: استخدم نمطًا غ
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。根据我们从中途飞行以来的观测，伽马值为-6.57。不过这只是初步数据，我们认为经过进一步跟踪后，它应该会更接近目标，我们可以将其精确地调整到目标区域。它现在几乎位于目标区域的中心；一切看起来都很顺利。几个小时后，在你睡觉之前，我们会给你发送进入着陆平台的指示。除了你的飞行之外，我们公共事务部门的朋友们还带来了一些其他消息。你仍然是新闻的焦点。不过，还有一些其他的事情值得你关注。正如我之前提到的，全明星赛因雨取消了。比赛将于明天举行。然而，尼克松总统将无法像他计划的那样观看比赛。我们会随时向你通报比赛结果。另外，气象预报员也会对你很友好。我们的预报显示，回收区域的天气状况良好；那里应该会非常晴朗。尼克松总统在准备飞往迎接你们归来之际预测，31年内人类将至少造访过一颗存在某种生命形式的星球。“到2000年，我们地球上的人类将造访过存在生命形式的新世界，”他在白宫对2000名外国交换生说道。在他启程进行为期一周的访问之前，总统向国会提交了关于重组州际商务委员
Mike, ci sono un sacco di oggetti sul sito di atterraggio. Farebbero proprio breccia nel cuore di Jack Schmidt. L'OTTICA AUTOMATICA sta puntando perfettam
D'accord, Apollo 8. Nous avons terminé avec l'ordinateur.
進入する際は、CMCで計算された角度をAUTO
D'accord. Parfait. L'étape suivante consiste à découper un trou en diagonale dans l'une des extrémités du sac plastique, près de l'arche. Choisissez l'une ou l'autre et découpez un trou d'environ 4 à 5 cm de diamètre, suffisamment grand pour y glisser le tuyau rouge. Ensuite, glissez simplement le tuyau rouge à travers le sac, de façon à ce qu'il arrive à peu près au centre du réservoir. Ce n'est pas crucial, l'important est que l'ouverture soit orientée vers le bas. Fixez ensuite le sac au tuyau avec du 
We cross Houston at the burn; it's between Ho
حسنًا. في الصفوف الثلاثة الأخيرة، لدينا قواطع دوائر الحماية من الفيضانات والمسارات، الصف الثاني مفتوح؛ وحدة الطاقة المنطقية B مفتوحة؛ وحدة تجاوز محرك الهبوط مفتوحة؛ وحدة التحكم في تدفق البدلة مفتوحة. في الصف الثالث، شاشة العرض مفتوحة؛ جهاز إرسال VHF A مفتوح؛ جهاز استقبال VHF B مفتوح. وتحتها: شاشة العرض مفتوحة، حسب خيار الطاقم. وأخيرًا، العاكس 2 في الأسفل، سيكون مف
알겠습니다. 여기서 두 번
好的。我们吃饭的时候就开始燃料电池吹扫。更换第6个二氧化碳气罐；检查辅助散热器流量；复制
Wechseln zu. Fang an zu zählen: 1, 2, 3, 
後ろに本物の氷の玉があるよ
コロ
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Мы готовимся к сбросу груза. После начала сброса
Roger. 45-1 101. 2+08. 12 37 50. 5+36. 10+33. 46-1 114. 2+25 14 12 47. 4+05. 9+33. 47-1 Propulseurs de tir avant et arrière. 08 et 120. 0+14 et 2+30. 15 46 36. 3+17. 8+37. 48-1 Propulseurs avant et arrière. 24 et 120. 0+40 et 230, correction 2+30. 17 20 19. 2+42. 8+43. 49-4 111. 2+21. 20 06 48. 4+11. 9+46. 44 BRAVO Propulseurs avant e
O
알았다
يذكرني ذلك بلهب الزيت
明白你已准备就绪。9-Bravo 区域。获取遥控指令，13:19:36；400K 为 20 加 25；反向倾斜为 26 加 13；所有这些倾斜角度，对于所有这些更新，都将是 90 度：获取遥控指令，14:17:05；400K，20 加 32；反向倾斜，25 加 54。11-2：获取遥控指令，52:02；400K，20 加 11；反向倾斜，25 加 40。12-2 获取遥控指令，17:25:40；400K，20 加 03；反向倾斜，25 加 35；13-2 区域：获取遥控指令，19
रॉजर। समझ गए? 14 सेकंड, जलने का समय, सामान्य रवैया, X का दो-दसवां हिस्सा, Y का एक-दसवां हिस्सा, और कुछ नहीं - Y का एक-दसवां हिस्सा घटाना, और Z कुछ नहीं; और आपने 6.2 लगाया, और जलने के बाद भी ग
Roger. Ich habe von Ihnen über Vier mal V
हमें
Roger. 1, G&N: 38658, minus 054, plus 065, TIG 078 02 0345, plus 29180, plus 03779, minus 01325; roll NA, pitch 041. The balance of the PAD is NA. Ullage 
Affermativo. In "Attivazione e
Go 
了解。体重は5785。R1は61102、R2は01111にしたい。BDロールを
どれを手に入れましたか? 60 ですか? 60 は手に入れました、そして 80 は..
알겠습니다. 찰리, 당신은 저
1 900
はっき
Forza H
जी हां, वह गैल्वेस
Roger. I
좋습니다, 11. 이번 임무에서 지금까지 두 번의 연소 동안 엔진 성능은 엔진 인수 시험 때와 동일한 것으로 나타났습니다. 온보드 PC 판독값은 실제 연소실 압력과 게이지 판독값 사이의 알려진 게이지 보정 계수 때문입니다. 단일 뱅크 운전 시에는 실제 연소실 압력이 95psi일 때 게이지 판독값이 90psi가 될 것으로 예상합니다. 이중 뱅크 운전 시에는 실제 연소실 압력이 99psi일 때 게이지 판독값이 94psi가
最后，还有一件事，红雀队
Ora, in qu
كارنارفون، 
我注意到好几次，当我从阳光下进入阴影时，刚一进入阴影，除了脸上的反光之外，还会有额外的反光照射到头盔面罩上，导致从阳光下进入阴影的过渡区域能见度非常差。基本上，我的面罩上反射了大量的眩光，以至于头
罗
收到。我们的通讯信号好像好多了。是不是刚
Ho dimenticato 
Lors de votre approche, nous vous recommandons d'utiliser les angles calculés par le CMC pour votre manœuvre AUTO et d'en vérifier le résultat. Si cela ne vous amène pas avec la ligne M parallèle à l'horizon jusqu'au point substellaire, nous essaierons d'obtenir des angles calculés au sol. L'important est de s
रॉजर। समझ गया। हम बैटरी B के स्लीप पीरियड तक च
Et nous avons trois éléments interdits dans les règles de la mission, si vous êtes prêts à les recopier. À vo
Roger. Copia i
Wir zeigen Ihnen das Ganze jetzt in einer Höhe von etwa 110 Meilen; und natürlich werde
Хорошо. Это все изме
Хорошо. Когда вы возобновите свои занятия, у меня есть рекомендуемое положение, в котором я х
好的。现在，13号，请你把它从明
안테나 문제의 원인을 저희 탓으로 돌리
Oui. Ce sont de petits fragments brillants. On pourrait supposer de prime abord qu
Okay. Okay, this is a preliminary maneuver PC plus 2. Starting: ; plus 0819.2, minus 0020.0, minus 0218.9; NA; plus 0020.9, 0848.2; 420, 274, 082; plus 0820.3, minus 0020.0, minus 0215.0. Comments. Ullage is two jets for 10 seconds. weight, 62
للعلم فقط، كلامك غير واضح قليلاً - غير واضح
わかりました。爆弾を準備して待機してく
Okay
了解。了解。推力変換 - ジェット4個 - バランスカップル - オン。スロットル - 最小。スロットル - 自動CDR。プロペラボタン - リセット。プロペラボタン。了解。アボート/アボートステージ - リセット。アタックコントロール - 3つ
一番印象に残ったのは、月の日の出と日の入りです。特に、この風景は地形の荒涼とした自然を際立たせ、長い影は、今私たちが見ているこの非常に明るい地表では見えにくい、この地表の起伏
حسنًا يا جو. آخر شيء حصلت عليه هو جهاز مراقبة الهيل
L'alimentazione dell'ottica si interrom
هل تمكنت من تثبيت دبوس الأما
Это категорически не ре
Apol
حسن
ジョン、
Gemi
这里是友谊七号。我正在尽可
Nicht wirklich, Jim. Es hat mit dieser W-Matrix zu tun. Du erinnerst dich, dass wir sie im Mondorbit neu initialisiert haben und dann daran gearbeitet haben, 
Roge
1 minuto. La pression
Très bien, Vance. Le chargeur de batterie est éteint, et je suis prêt à continu
Hallo, Com Tech, Friendship
罗杰，没错。第 10 步是“根据激活 3 和 4 配
Hallo Naha, hier spricht Gemini VIII. In guter Verfassung, sink
보조 EVAP 시스템이 가동 중입니
Sette, Hawaii Com Tech, ti leggo momentaneame
Roger, that'll come up just as it has been coming up and you'll get them at Canar
Le trajet jusqu'
Давай
ジムさん、2番のバッテリーについてですが、このアラームの原因はバッテリーの過熱ではなく、センサーの故障、つまり温度センサーの故障であると思われます。グリコールループ内ではそれ以上の温度は確認されていないからです。バッテリーは101時間後に再始動する予定です。約10分で
Хорошо. Я тут подумал. Я пытаюсь запихнуть туда как можно больше груза. У нас нет резервуара для сточных вод, и, знаете ли, наш бак для отходов довольно сильно опустошен. Думаю, осталось около 40 процентов. Поэтому я стараюсь максимально увеличить объ
Roger. Ho appena finito il pasto A del terzo giorno. Anch
Okay. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, die
रॉजर। वो मेरे पास से गुज़रा। रे
Okay. Under " turn-on," add in steps 1 and 2 again, which are NO ATTITUDE light off, 
Ok. Dopo il numer
ठीक है, जैक। मैंने दो कमांडर ब्रेकर लगा दिए हैं, एक AC और एक DC, और दो GASTA ब्रेकर भी लगा दिए हैं, एक AC और एक DC। अब आपको सभी हीटर चालू करने होंगे और प्रेशर सिस्टम को चालू करना
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Wir empfangen Sie nur schwach. Bitte sprechen Sie weit
Oui. Moi aus
... 0317; propulsori, a poppa; manov
D'accord. Mettez votre commutateur T/M sur COMMANDE et votre commutateur de lecture de
Нет, я не пробовал много альтернативных вариантов. На самом деле, вариант номер 1
روجر، بالإضافة إلى 28466، ناقص 00350، بالإضافة إلى 02406 180 022 
حسنًا. تأكد من وجود طاقة التيار المتردد، أي أن العاكس 2 مُفعّل وأن
Как у вас с качеством изображения
Ok, bene. Il passo successivo è ancorare il nastro, e il modo in cui vogliamo che tu lo faccia è tagliare circa 60 cm dal rotolo e poi strapparlo nel senso della lunghezza in modo da ottenere due strisce lunghe circa 60 cm e larghe circa mezzo pollice. E le avvolgerai attorno al contenitore ad angolo retto, più o meno, rispetto al nastro che hai in modo che passi attraverso la parte superiore e inferiore; e quando passa attraverso la parte superiore e inferiore, posizionalo in modo che sia fuori dal foro centrale e cerca di farlo pa
Me
D'accord. Pour ceux qui ne le savent pas, c'est ici que nous enregistrons la plupart de nos données pour chaque manœuvre. Nous avons une autre fiche, semblable à celle-ci, qui sert de feuille de route et qui est posée sur la table devant le clavier d'affichage des données. C'est sur cette feuille de route que sont consignées toutes nos procédures. Bien sûr, nous devons maintenir ces fiches en place en apesanteur; nous utilisons donc les bandes Velcro
세상 사람들이 궁금해할 만한 것 중 하나
Salu
Roger. C'est ce q
Nun ja, es gibt einige Wolken darüber 
127 03 3082,
रॉजर। अलग होने से लगभग 30 सेकंड पहले हम आपसे संपर्क कर रहे हैं, और सब कुछ ठीक 
Roger. Il nostr
Tiens-t
ठीक है। पृथ्वी स्क्रीन के लगभग बीच में और थोड़ी नीचे दिखाई दे रही है, और ऐसा लग रह
Понял. Отлично. Мы свяжемся с ребятами из SPAN по поводу этой проблемы и сообщим вам утром. Если вам придётся звонить нам сегодня вечером, пожалуйста, сделайте это через резервный канал DOWNVOICE BACKUP. Мы настраиваем е
У нас есть несколько рабочих процедур, и я их видел, Фред. Думаю, довольно скоро мы отправим их теб
Хорошо. Теперь у меня есть довольно много информации, которую я хочу вам передать. Мы хотели бы, чтобы пилот, который спит, оставил лицевую панель открытой и снял перчатки. А пилот, который бодрствует, хотел бы снять шлем и перчатки и, если возможно, использовать легкую гарнитуру для связи. И мы хотели бы, чтобы вы продолжали в таком же порядке примерно до 3 часов до начала тормозных огней. Затем, оказавшись на орбите, в удобное для вас время, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы изм
ما هو رقم 
二次冷却ループは実に良好でした。ラジエーターはしっかりと固定されており、その他の部品も性能曲線に沿って正常に動作しているようです。メイン酸素レギュレーターは、点検中に両方とも104psiで充填されました。月軌道から見ると、1時間あたり約1ポンドの水が沸騰することになりますが、これはあくまで概算です。水の沸騰要件には様々な推定値があり、大量に沸騰する場合もあれば、全く沸騰しない場合もあります。次の放水はその後に行われるので、通過するまでは何も心配する必要はありません。通信予測は良好で、おそらく期待していたよりも少し良いでしょう。ゴールドストーンにある210フィートのパラボラアンテナで、OMNIアンテナで高ビットレートが得られそうです。最初の数回の打ち上げではうまくいきますが、その後は設置場所を変更するので、高ビットレートにはOMNIアンテナに戻る予定です。音声品質は良好です。燃料電池は
로저, 휴스턴. 4/45695, -0.53 +141, +30627, -0.0625, +0.0577 180 018 001, NA, +0.0188 30639 256 30452
روج
E per quanto riguarda le prestazioni, hai ragione: non sono proprio uguali, 1 e 2 sono un po' più bassi
我会边做边跟你说话。我会分别在1、2、30、20、10这
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 11 PAD 
Роджер. Я не думаю, что это так 
وأنا أدون الآن من
Neil, riesco a scende
理
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। क्या आप हाइड्रोजन टैंक 1 और ऑक्सीजन टैंक 1 के हीटर बंद करना च
रॉजर: कैटवॉक नीचे जा रही हैं, लेक
모든 게 순조롭습니다. 간단히 알려드리겠습니다. 연료는 29~27%입니다. 기내 압력은 5.5psi를 유지하고 있고, 기내 온도는 88도, 상대 습도는 33%입니다. 냉매량은 58%, 온도는 71도, 우주복 온도도 71도, 우주복 압력은 5.8psi, 우주복
はい、分
Okay, 
SCS TVC, 
You're looking now at our probe, the place on the nose of Odyssey. It's a very heavy thing but I suppose in zero gravity it weighs nothing, and it's much easier to move around. As a matter of fact, both Fred and Jack commented, as many people in the past have, of how much bigge
곧 대규모 경보가 울릴 예정이
मुझे लगता है
저는 지금
Je me
ठीक है
Die
好的。最后三排，第二排是洪水和轨道断路器，打开；逻辑电源B，打开；下降发动机超控，打开；潜水服流量控制，打开。第三排，显示器，打开；甚高频A和甚高频A发射机，打开；甚高频B接收机，打开。下方还有显示器，打开，由机组人
Apollo 8, Houston. Du warst gar nicht mehr zu hören, Jim. Ich habe Frank gehört, aber dann wurde es unverständlich, als du angefangen hast zu sprechen. Sa
ジャック、理解してくれ。熱負荷をかけ
はい。ヒューストン、アポロ
吉姆，休斯顿。你刚开始说话
Идём к компьютеру. Часы показывают примерно. Допустим. В это время нам следует взять Muchea, а также проверить рыскание. У нас на другом комп
フレッド、あと2点あります。1つ目は、エンジンの噴射中にミスアライメントはほとんど発生しないと予想しています。そのため、特に推力が非常に低い状態なので、噴射中はエンジン回転数の変化はほとんどないと予想しています。2つ目は、スーツの温度調節器が「フルコールド」になっているこ
我正在排放双氧水。打开保险丝开关。待命。回收臂已“准备”。主伞待命。所有开关均处于正确位置。手动燃油几乎耗尽。好了，主伞打开了。它——它完美地打开了。湛蓝的天空。它已经展开，看起来像个甜美的馅饼。自动燃油正在排放。此时下降率约为35英尺/秒。我没发现任何问题。我要做好着陆准备。自动燃油正在排放。座舱压力正在正常上升
نحن على أهبة الاستعداد لإجراء فحص جهاز إرسال القياس عن بعد الاحتياطي الخاص بك 
How's it going with the TV, Frank? A
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 지금 저속 전송 모드입니다. 지난번에 봤을 때는 아직 데이터 삭제 
L'antenne fouet est déployée. 
휴스턴, 지금 아래쪽이 꽤 작아 보이네
Houston, Apollo 8. Es sieht nach einer Korrektur von pl
Roger, cette page est NC-7. Je vais la relire. Ensuite, passez à la procédure de contrôle de longitude sans communication, page NC-7. La valeur moyenne de V 400K pour les cartes de contrôle de corridor est de 36 253. Je répète: la 
자, 그럼 다른 버스에는 크로스 타이 밸런스 로드 차단기를 통해 전력을 공급하게 
Okay. I'll do it. Okay. Now they want two 
На У
نعم بالتأكيد. تنظيف خلية وقود الأ
Роджер. Повторю. Альфа 225, 74 процента; Браво 240 фунтов, 79 процентов; Чарли 236, 78 процентов; Дельта 238, 19 процентов. Хочу напомнить вам по телевизору, что нам нужна узкая ширина луча при высоком коэффициенте усиления. 
Okay
D'accord, Jack. Voilà les notes concernant le déroulement de la journée. Je suis désolé de te l'annoncer, mais j'ai aussi quelques corrections à apporter à la liste de contrôle d'entrée. Ce ne sont pas vrai
在哪
私たちはそれを信
È incredibile osservare queste piccole goccioline congelate muoversi. Sembrano andare in tutte le direzioni, ma alla fine, dopo aver preso una certa direzione, si stabilizzano e sembrano viaggiare tutte 
罗杰。明白了。180。4+15。18 02 57。3+06
Roger. We have about three and a half minutes to. We give you back the under your control, and in regard to your water dump, we are tentatively predicting a waste water tank dump at about and any other dumps are at your dis
휴스턴, 고이득 상황에서 컬럼비아를 
其实，食物袋本身没问题，问题出在里面的食物上。食物都碎了。我不敢打开
Se è veloc
네, 파워 8 페이지를 넘기시면 남은 우주선 기능들을 확인하실 수 있습니다. 저속 비트 전송률(TM)이
ठीक है। आप चाहते हैं कि मैं एमडीसी 3 पर ये मान पढ़कर सुनाऊं: बैट बी वोल्टेज, पायरो ए वोल्टेज, पायरो बी वोल्टेज, कमांड मॉड्यूल इंजेक्टर तापमान; 5 चार्ली, 5
你应该在上面贴一小块女性用的魔术贴…
Just for information, although I thought I'd never have to use it, that technique looked like it was a pret
Roger, 11. L'entità delle correzioni a metà rotta era solo per tua informazione, ma a metà rotta 4 era scesa di circa 2,0 piedi al secondo. Di nuovo, per tua informazione, sulla pr
روجر. العناوين 24 و53 و54 كلها أسماء ونود أن نعرف كيف سارت عملية ال
روجر، لدي عشرة 
Roger. Das sind 13 Grad links vom Sc
Columbia, Houston. I can give you some REACQ angles for t
Роджер, Фрэнк. Персей Зета находится примерно посередине между Альдеба
Ok. Ti dirò dove si trovano. Sono entrambi posizionati, come dici tu, con il fondo del contenitore esposto all'aria, e uno è posizionat
好的，休斯顿；水瓶座。我正在按照你给我的初始角度（俯仰角257度）飞回目标位置。我会让飞机接近
Хорошо. У вас есть какое-нибудь оборудование из списка? Я просто возьму
Bien, et un pied et d
カーナボン、
Хорош
Здесь всё отли
好了，万斯，如果你正在从他们那里获
Roger, Friendship Seven. Passage au contrôle de 30 m
Ok
मुझे एक 
巴兹，
好的，杰克。这些记录是：断路器保护将电流限制在 15 
是的，我勉强能看到它。我看
로저. 지금까지 발생한 문제는 알 수 없는 
카노 캡 컴, 여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. HF에서요. 제가 읽었습니다. 당신도 제 목소리가 들리나요? 이
ヒューストン、ここで
Роджер и Марк сейчас делают замеры тензиометром. Нить натянута как никогда сильно. Марк делает еще один з
Stand by, Charlie. Yes, we're going to come out of here at 263 roll and then do t
아, 저희는 펄스 작전 중이고, 발포 명령을 내리고 있는 건 아
Abbiamo appena completato l'imbardata dell'Agena a 090° e l'imbardata era esattamente a 1,5 gradi al secondo durante la manovra di imbardata, e ci sono voluti... secondi per raggiungere i 90 gradi. La piattaforma Gemini potrebbe essersi sp
روجر
罗杰。对了，杰瑞不在的时候，我正
فريندشيب سفن، فريندشيب سفن. هذه قناة إن
了解。六分儀を通して見ると単眼鏡よりもずっと鮮明に見えまし
Okay. Wir haben die hohe Verstärkung des OMNI-Geräts kurzzeitig reduziert und sind auf eine niedrige Bitrate umgestiegen. Jetzt schalten wir wieder auf eine hohe Bitrate um. Sollen wir Sie jedes Mal informieren, wenn
يا أصدقاء سبعة، هل تقومون بفحص أفق يومكم
AP通信によると、ワ
This is Carnarvon Surgeon. Your bloo
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。とりあえずチェックリストの指示に従ってください。ブレーカーパネルの設定
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Мы получили ва
더 알려주실 소식이 있으신
That just turned th
Il commence à faire sombre. Laisse-moi voir. Muchea conta
やあ、11番、こちらヒュースト
Okay. At, delete the sightings 
わかりました。行きます。今か
لا يشبه بحر سميث البحرَ كثيراً. فهو منطقةٌ خاليةٌ من الفوهات، والتي لا يوجد منها الكثير، وتبدو أشب
—
好的，吉姆。飞行计划有更新。你做了星体
いや、
그건 긍정적인 답변입니다. 당신의 태도
11, Houston. Nous sommes prêts à passer d'OMNI Delta à votre antenne à gain élevé. Pouvez-vous confirmer que vous êtes passé en mode R
再说一
Esatto. Interruttore auto
Roger, Jack. On est toujours à 220 km, et le Doppler le confirme. On vous donnera des nouvelles da
C'est exact. Bien, passons main
Roger. All those procedures will work - will be worked out precisely, and we agree that the stowage and all of those peripheral details ought to be taken care of 
Ciao, M
Хорош
はい。あれらはバズの星図2枚で、今右
Acquario, ti leggiamo 4 alla 4. Vai 
ठीक है। मेरे IVI में, आगे
Okay,
이해합니
收到。仍然能清晰地收到
All right. My--I am at 01 19 02. Have been several times completely disoriented. There, I have Cassiopeia directly in the window and am yawing around for the sunrise--photographs. The sky
Sembra buono. Okay. Abbiamo fatto un esercizio con il modello sui preparativi pre-ingresso e abbiamo notato che nella checklist dell'LMP a pagina S-12, quando si va a riempire le bombole di ripr
और, ट्रैंक्विलिटी, ह्यूस्टन। 
Negative. I am in attitude at this time. I will give you the 
Negati
ओह, ओह, ओह
Roger. NA, NA, NA, plus 1350, minus 16500 130
Okay. Go
Nous allons effectuer des manœuvres futures à Houston en mode AUTO à vitesse réduite. Concrètement, nous allons charger le moteur avec le code 11101 p
알겠습니다. 노드 07 04 46; 계시록 5; 동경 67.
جميع الكميا
それはコンピューター
حسناً. فهمت. أكمل مع
Роджер, Гуаймас. Близнецы 4. Контрольный 
わかった。ああ、フィルムはほとんど使ってない。もちろん1
わかりま
Bene, ora ho mol
Родже
حسنًا. مرت الأرض بزاوية 62 درجة في ذلك الوقت. والمدة الإجمالية لدورتي الأرض
لدينا رادار جيد جداً حتى الآن، لذا فهو يتمتع بمنطق قف
Gemini 4, cont
Okay. Als Erstes wollen wir die Batterie laden, damit wir dort Strom haben. Die entsprechenden Prozeduren sind bereits vorbereitet. Was den Wiedereintritt angeht, planen wir unseren letzten Kursanstieg 5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt in die Atmosphäre – falls wir überhaupt einen durchführen müssen. Das Servicemodul möchten wir dann etwa 4,5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt abtrennen und die nächsten 3 bis 3,5 Stunden für Fotos, die Inbetriebnahme des Kommandomoduls (G&N), die Verstauung der Ausrüstung und sonstige Kleinigkeiten nutzen. Das Servicemodul würden wir bis 1 Stunde vor dem Eintritt behalten und dann abtrennen. Diese Prozeduren werden morgen früh in CMS und LMS integriert ausgeführt, und hoffentlich können wir sie s
이글, 컬럼비아 대학교 책 
좋습니다. 이제 고수익 
네, 그랬던 것 같네요.
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы только что п
لا نريد منك أن توقظ أحداً للحصول عل
객실 증기 배출구 온도는 10도이고, 우주복 증기 배출구 온도는 62도입니다. 온도를 조금 더 높이고 싶은데, 잘 안 되네요. 우주복 온도는 60도인데, 객실 온도는 계속 102도를 유지하고 있습니다. 역추진까지 
지금 넓고 푸른 지평선 띠가 보입니다. 현재
كولومبيا، هيوستن. سنصل
Да, Скотт. Я чувствую себя хорошо. Уверен, мы справимся с этим контуром скафандра. Температура купола держится. Сейчас около 81 градуса. Я вношу изменения. Температура на входе в скафандр около 78 градусов. Думаю, еще одно и
Houston, Columbia. I say again: I did not see them. AUTO optics pointed at a spot very cl
Хорошо. Мы снова вернулись к поясной части —
سأقوم بتشغيل جهاز إرسال إشارات الإنقاذ 
알겠습니다. 다시 읽어보니: 명사 11, 105 35 3700, 107 11 3000, 0538, 모든 0을 뺀 값, NA, 09356, 10315. 명사 86, 0538을 더한 값, 모든 0을 더한 값, 그리고 마지막은 0012였습니다. 이 숫자의 
제미니 4,
下面
Der Steuerungsmodus ist automatisch.
ジェミニ4、カナリアCAP COM。スイッチラジ
D'accord. Ça fait un mom
えっと…私たちは終わ
也许是因为你总是想
ठीक है, वैंस। हम चांद को सीधे देखने से बस थोड़ी दूरी पर हैं। जिम खिड़की नंबर 3 से कैमरा पकड़े हुए है। सूरज हमारी बाईं ओर से लगभग 40 डिग्री के कोण पर आ रहा है, और हम आपको बस एक मिनट में लगभग 30 सेकंड का अपशिष्ट जल डंप दिखाएंगे और आपको दिखाए
Okay. Sehr g
Хорошо, это было неприятно, или это привело к ухудшению зрения, или что-то подоб
이제 과거로 돌아갈 시
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven. Hier spricht Guaymas Co
Ok, Jack. Su MDC 1, non c'è niente di anomalo. Tutti gli indicatori di velocità sono a zero. La sfera numero 2 è conge
Роджер. На изображении показано ваше текущее положение примерно на 77
أجل، أعتقد أنك محق. يا إلهي، يمكنك حقًا رؤية الترهل. يمكنك أن ترى أين تجمّع كل 
EECOMM 측에서는 밸브 위치를 살펴보고 싶
ठीक है। इसे सीधा होने में थोड़ा समय लग रहा है, लेकिन मुझे लगता 
静海基
... 
Apollo 11, qui Houston. 
را
أبولو 11، هيوستن. بناءً على رصدنا منذ منتصف المسار، يُظهر لنا مؤشر غاما -6.57. هذه بيانات أولية، ونعتقد أنه بعد مزيد من المتابعة، سيتحسن الوضع، وسنتمكن من توجيه المركبة بدقة إلى الممر. إنها تقريبًا في منتصف الممر؛ كل شيء يبدو على ما يرام. سنرسل لكم بيانات الدخول خلال ساعتين قبل نومكم. ومن زملائنا في الشؤون العامة، إليكم بعض العناوين الرئيسية، بخلاف رحلتكم. ما زلتم تتصدرون الأخبار. ومع ذلك، هناك بعض الأمور الأخرى التي تهمكم. كما ذكرت سابقًا، تم إلغاء مباراة كل النجوم بسبب المطر. ستُقام غدًا. لكن الرئيس نيكسون لن يتمكن من مشاهدتها كما كان مُخططًا له. سنُطلعكم على النتائج. كما أن توقعات الأرصاد الجوية ستكون في صالحكم. يبدو أن توقعاتنا جيدة لمنطقة الاستعادة؛ من المتوقع أن يكون الطقس رائعًا هناك. توقع الرئيس نيكسون، وهو يستعد للسفر لاستقبالكم عند عودتكم، أن يزور الإنسان خلال 31 عامًا كوكبًا واحدًا على الأقل يحوي شكلًا من أشكال الحياة. وقال لـ 2000 طالب تبادل أجنبي في البيت الأبيض: "في عام 2000، سنكون على هذه الأرض قد زرنا عوالم جديدة حيث توجد أشكال من الحياة". وقبل مغادرته في رحلته التي تستغرق أسبوعًا، أرسل الرئيس إلى الكونغرس مقترحه لإعادة تنظيم لجنة التجارة بين الولايات. كما تشاور مع رئيس هيئة الأركان المشتركة، إيرل ويلر، عند عودته من فيتنام، وتم تأجيل إطلاق صاروخ إنتلستات إلى الساعة العاشرة مساءً بتوقيت شرق الول
Alright, X minus 00011, Y plus 0002, Z minus 0002, roll 0
Beh, ho fiducia nel portello, finché entra e si chiude senza problemi; non vedo perché abbiamo bisogno delle tute, e una cosa che faremo nel nostro tempo libero è esercitarci a m
Okay. Area 27-2 96. 2+02. 08 27 55. 6+35. 10+58. Area 28-2: ΔV 111. 2+20. 10 02 54. 4+50. 9+39. Area 29-2: Okay, this is a split ΔV. Forward 66. Aft 61. 1+48. 1+17. GMTRC 11 37 05. 3+43. 08+59. Area 24-DELTA: ΔV 89. 1+53. 03 45 30. 11+03. Area 25-DELTA: 86. 1+49. 05 19 09. 09+51. 26-BRAVO, Area 26-BRAVO: Split ΔV
D'accord, Fred. L'instruction que j'ai pour toi se trouve à la fin de la procédure de coupure d'alimentation du câble 
로저, 트랭퀼리티. T4, 106 38 02; T5, 108 36 15; T6, 110 34 3
로저. 저 남쪽 오래된 분화구들 중 남쪽 가장자리에 작고 밝은 분화구가 하나 있습니다. 어떤 지도에서는 ​​
罗杰。从倒数 1 分钟开始，划掉“主臂，开启”。倒数 35 秒，划掉前两行。倒数 10 秒时，改为“倒数 9 秒”；所以，在“倒数 9 秒”时，会显示“手动间隙”。2 秒时，划掉“模式，自由”，并划掉“ACA 脱离定位”。在“
नहीं, इतनी भी बुरी बात नहीं है। हमने अपना ज़्यादातर अतिरिक्त सामान एड़ियों के पीछे, पैरों के नीचे रखा हुआ है, वैसे भी ये वो सामान है जिसका ज़्यादा इस्तेमाल नहीं होता, इसलिए कोई खास असुविधा नहीं है। लेकिन कैमरे, बैग और कचरे के थैले चारों तर
ठीक है, मैं इस पर पूरी तरह से ध्यान दे रहा हूँ। मैं इसे हासिल कर लूंग
Okay, Jim. We'd like to get a suggested time from you. We can figure out a free-return maneuver for any time you want to give us, so
Houston, Ruhe. Vorbe
Roger. Avevamo 2 minuti e 23 secondi. Il nostro... aspetta un
OMNI Ch
好
أتمنى لو تسرع في إخراج تلك القمامة من ه
Roger. Back to BLOCK and DOI: 101:36:14.07; minus 0075.8, plus all zeros, plus 0009.8
روجر. اعتبارًا من 68 00، إجمالي ناقص 4.5%، أي ما يعادل تقريبًا ناقص 53 رطلاً. ألفا ناقص 6.0%، ناقص 1.0%، ناقص 7.0%، ناقص 3.0%؛ إجمالي الهيدروجين، ناقص 1.2 رطل؛ إجمالي الأكسجين، زا
Ok, Fred-o. Impostalo in verticale. Hai circa 30
水瓶座
D'ac
उपकर
バッテリーは全て23.5ボルト以上を示し
I'm not going to do a thing, Mike; I'm just le
Okay. The helium pressure is about 37, the manifold is 182, and the quantity is reading 80. B has got the temperature about 112, the hel
이 고도에서 바라보는 휴스턴의
دعني أتأكد من فهمي الصحيح يا
Хорошо. Теперь мн
Sto guardando fuori dalla finestra 5, verso quello che credo sia il, e vedo quello che sembrano essere doppi pennacchi, che si diramano in due fasce molto strette, forse di circa 3 gradi, che fuoriescono da esso. E poi c'è una fascia men
Отлично, Джон. Мы попробуем довести дело до конца. Я хотел бы сообщить вам температуру вашего 
Ok. Ho i giroscopi normali, automatici,
Apollo 8, this is Houston. Reading you loud and clear. We 
收
好的。我们正在配置 Goldstone，稍等片刻。在此期间，如果
11, Хьюстон. Текущий прогноз показывает приемлемые условия в вашем районе восстановления: местами 2000 футов, местами высокие ветры, ветер с 70 градусов, 13 узлов, видимость 10 миль, волнение моря около 4 футов. Вчерашний прогноз указывал на тропический шторм Клаудия, находящийся примерно в 500-1000 милях к востоку от Гавайев. На снимках со спутников, сделанных вчера днем, Клаудия рассеялась, поэтому, похоже, она представляет собой еще меньшую угрозу, чем раньше. Считается, что ваш район восстановления сейчас находится немного севернее межтропичес
하와이, 우리 모두 이제 깨
… 110. La température de votre onduleur principal a
Okay. Etwas anderes, das wir uns – vor dem Betreten des Gebäudes – ansehen werden, ist das normale Eingangstestmuster. Es ist derzeit in der Checkl
روجر. تنظيف خلية وقود الأكسجين الساعة 11:30. العودة إلى الجدول الزمني المعتاد عند الاستيقاظ الساعة 12:1. تغيير هيدروكسيد الليثيوم رقم 9 الآن. إعدادات السكون القمرية العادية، أنا في هذه الحالة الآن. في السابق، فهمت أنك تريد تحم
Да, подтверждаю, Близнецы 4. Также, что касается эксперимента MSC-1, мы хотели бы попросить вас выключить ваш маяк ACQ Aid Beacon примерно на 5 минут во врем
哥伦
حسنًا، إذا قلبت الصفحة على Power 8، ستجد وظائف المركبة الفضائية المتبقية لك. لدينا معدل بت منخفض ™. مع ذلك، ليس لدينا أي VHF. لدينا مضخات جلايكول. لدينا مراوح للبدلات. لدينا ضغط المقصورة لك، وانتظر في غرفة التحكم بالوضع هنا. حسنًا، في غرفة التحكم بالوضع، ستكون لدينا إعدادات احتياطية للاستخدام في حالات الطوارئ، وللاستخدام العادي نريد تأخيرًا لمدة 15 دقيقة لتشغيل السخانات وتس
对于那些还没看过铭牌的
Ora ho 
Acquario, pe
Да. Мы тоже об этом думаем. Хотите, я быстро расскажу? Похоже, мы это обсуждали, и, кажется, нам нужно будет выровнять наши платформы — одну с другой, а затем выключить питан
Stand-b
Achten Sie auf den Tankdruck und die
제미니 4
Думаю, да. Я 
Эти мамы просто огонь, прав
J'ai effectué trois tests pendant cette transition. Deu
Mike, over here on page 9 7 of your checklist where we're setting up, there's been a note penciled in after, "Wait 20 minutes for rate to damp. Do not monitor,." It turns out that the significance of that is that, if you are monitoring 16, then when you get down here in step 7, the second time you do a, you've got to reload the NOUN 01 to 
夏威夷，
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous n'avons aucune contrainte de
いいえ。そんなことはしてほしくありません。あなたの角度を読んでください。そして、こ
Roger. Guardando il piano di volo, hai un atterraggio previsto a
Roger. Für das Test-Rendezvous mit dem Raumschiff um 05:00 Uhr: Gierwinkel 0, Nickwinkel 5,5; 248 Seemeilen; 03 plus 
روجر، أنا على المحول. 1، 2، 3، 4، 5 - 5، 
Roger. You're sure right. Oh, we're all in fine shap
Roger. Schön, dass du Nummer 6 kopieren kannst. Ich habe noch eine letzte Anmerkung für Jim, bevor du das tust. Das – oder besser gesagt – das, von dem wir sprechen, ist das, das er nach dem Markieren erhä
Okay. The other thing is, when you were doing your maneuvering during the first orbit, did you get that recorded 
Columbia, ici Houston. Nous allo
了解しました。T/Mさんによると、太平洋通過中に燃料電池の酸素・水素ヒーターのブ
罗杰。关于第一件事，我们今天早上早些
Die Lichter der Stadt und dann am Horizont da draußen die blinkenden Lichter... auf dem Kopf stehend... ri
Es kön
أنظر إلى ا
قد نقدم لكم لمحة سريعة عن وسائل الترفيه التي نتمتع بها على م
Ea
ठीक 
Понял. Визор закрыт и герметично запечатан. Бутылка в визоре костю
- - 왼쪽 
والسطح ناعمٌ كالبودرة. أستطيع التقاطه برفقٍ بطرف قدمي. يلتصق بطبقاتٍ رقيقةٍ كالفحم المسحوق على نعل وجوانب حذائي. لا أدخل إلا جزءًا صغيرًا من البوصة، ربما ثمن بوصة، لكنني أستطيع رؤية آثار قدمي ونقوشها في جزيئات الرمل
On the right-hand half of the page, cross out the "Orbital science block," and under that "Visual target 1 south of track TR." 
D'accord. Lorsque l'appareil est en position d'observation de la Lune, je fais un, 
Закат довольно впечатляющий, думаю, не стоит тратить много времени на его созерцание. Он очень интересный. Ещё меня поражает, насколько темно, когда глаза не адаптированы. Я определённо вижу какое-то покрытие на окне. Возвращаюсь к VOX в диапазоне UHF-hi для передачи. Открываю визор, чтобы протереть правый микрофон. Я его лизнул. Закрываю визор. Визор сразу же загерметизировался, чтобы схема скафандра могла начать работать. Не хочу снова с ней возиться. Вентиляционное отверстие скафандра держится очень хорошо, около 68 градусов. Так что купол снова поднимется. Сейчас он поднят 
Tranquility, Houston. Nous avons des indices laissant penser que l'échangeur de chaleur à l'hélium du carburant de descente est gelé, et qu'il y a du carburant piégé dans la conduite entre cet échangeur et les vannes; la pre
그리고 이 130 프라임은 하강하
Houston. Riguardo al tuo commento sulla cavalla che lambisce il terreno - un terreno montuoso - è un'impressione simile a quella di una colata lavica che si riversa attorno a una prominenza, Neil, o è più come se in quel punto stesse
로저. 1, G&N: 62710, +0.98, -0.19, 0.75 49 4965, -28897, -0.3944, -0.0686; 358 226 347; 0.1692, +0.0610; 29173 602 29108; 31 106.6 358. 베가와 데네브 정렬 243 183 0.12.
ヒューストン、時間はどれくらいあります
ठीक है, जिम। हम 39 सेकंड क
D'accord. Nous ne constations aucune diminution de
ठीक है। पृथ्वी सूचकांक से ठीक ऊपर से गुजरी। अगर इसे आगे बढ़ाया 
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11. ओव
저쪽은 아쿠아리우스입니다
ヒューストン、ジェミニVI。すべてのコアは正常
जी हाँ, ठीक है। समझ गया
Roger.
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。
Roger, Ed. Nous souhaitons que vous repreniez votre plan de vol normal
了解しました。星がかなりよく見えるのは理解しています。その時、太
C'est négatif. Je pense que mon niveau de carburant étant bas, je dois rester en mode automatique tant que la consommatio
Roger, Houston. Wir liegen immer noch bei etwa 52 Prozent, und wir hatten unsere Abfallumstellung vor
Ok. Pannello 3: commutare CARICA BATTERIA su OFF. Pannello 5; COLLEGAMENTO BUS PRINCIPALE BATTERIA A/C su BAT A/C; CARICA BATTERIA CB, CARICA BATTERIA A per aprire; CARICA BATTERIA CB, CARICA BATTERIA B, chiudere. Poi, pannello 250; INGRESSO ALIMENTAZIONE BAT B CB/POSTLANDING per chiudere. Pannello 5; COLLEGAMENTO BUS PRINCIPALE BATTERIA B/C, spento. Pannello 3; CARICA BATTERIA su B. Avviso; bene, aspetta. Jack, avvisa che abbiamo una procedura di backout per questo, ma te la leggeremo più tardi, tra circa 2 ore. E, inoltre, che questa procedura è un DELTA rispetto alla tu
هيوستن، لماذا لا يمكنن
了解しました。テレビでもそう映っていたと思います。では
أنا متأكد من ذلك.
むしろ、ドリフトを捉えるのは思ったより難しいです。一番良いドリフトは、窓の外を見て、何かが自分
Pareil pour moi. Je ne sais pas si je suis en haut, en bas, sur le côté, ou autrement. J'aimerais a
至于你问的Vance的问题，要立刻把偏航角调到零度确实比较困难。所以我现在正在做的，是让偏航角逐渐趋近于零，俯仰角逐渐趋近于90度，滚转角
We're rol
يا إلهي! هل ترى جميع الألوان تقريبًا بين الأفق وسماء الليل
روجر. نظامي هو
Позвольте мне зачитать это вам вслух. ВН минус РП, плюс 77; шаг 400K, номинальный; ВОС 400K, 22 пл
रॉजर। क्या यह उड़ने का समय है या रॉकेट की 
Houston, Colombie. Mon transpondeur radar de rendez-vous est opérationnel
收到。我们已经
然后，看起来所有明显的运动都停止了，我们可能正在接近目标。于是我调转飞船方向，试图调整平台对准目标。与此同时，助推器开始以相当明显的速度向下坠落。所以我放弃了调整平台对准助推器并向下推进的尝试，
好的。当时地球的方位角是62度。地球自转两圈的总时间——我之前错过了地球自转，但
オーケー。エ
كولومبيا، ه
Ormai è quasi buio e non riesco a credere di ess
Das ist Bestätigu
يمكنني بسهولة أن آتي من كوكب آخر، وأشعر أنني مستلقٍ على ظهري، وأن الأرض فوقي، لكن هذا هو الشعور الذي ينتابك عندما تخرج من و
Хорошо. Еще один момент, который мы хотим вам немного уточнить. Как мы уже говорили, положение SEP при подъеме было в плоскости, а положение JETT будет больше похоже на обычное положение SEP сервисного модуля, то есть оно буде
Gemini 4, ici Houston. Avez-vous réussi à suivre Pe
Il semble que les optiques n'aient pas été affectées, mais de la glace s'est infiltrée dans certaines vitres. On observe quelques petits morceaux de glace sur la vitre numéro 1, la plus proche de la ventilation, et également, en moindre quantité, sur la vitre numéro 5; les vi
Ok, ho i cuscinetti, devo estendere la sonda ed effettuare un ho
ま
سنحاول أن نكون أكثر تحديداً بالنسبة لك 
Okay, Joe. Ich richte es rüber zu Jack, und es ist zi
Okay, also – schaut euch mal die CDR- und CMP-Werte an und seht, ob sie steigen. Wir treten hier alle auf der Stelle.
정렬은 괜찮을 것 같으니 전체 정렬 작업은 하지 않아도 될 것 같습니다. 검사는 괜찮을 것 같네요. ATT에 계시니 다시 한번 말씀드리지만, 검사가 통과되지 않으면,
Eagle, Houston. Vorremmo andare a p
D'accord. La note indique que vous devriez 
Okay. Und wir wollen LOGIK AUS, nach unten, und der Rest der Seite bleibt unverändert.
Roger. Nous avons reçu et vérifié les données; vous pouvez
Итак, во время последнего пролета мы сделали около 38 снимков на синоптическую съемку местности, начиная немного восточнее Сан-Диего и до тех пор, пока снова не столкнулись с облачностью. Мы продолжили съемку с перерывами, как то
حسنًا. لقد تتبعت نجمًا ساطعًا، وأعتقد أنه موجود في كوكبة العقاب. في الواقع، أنا متأكد تمامًا. أستطيع رؤية النجمين المستهدفين. لقد تتبعته حتى وصل إلى قمته. إنه يكاد يصل إلى القمة. سيختفي عن نظري الآن. لقد تتبعته من أسفل الكوكب، واستغرق الأمر 3 دقائق و23 ثانية
Was ist mit der Karte passiert, die hi
ठीक है। अब मैं अपने बाईं ओर स्थित चंद्रमा का उपयोग कर रहा हूँ, और यह इसके लिए एक अच्छा समाधान है। मैं एटीट्यूड इंडिकेटर को ढक देता हूँ और आप यॉ देख सकते हैं। मैं जायरो को फ्री कर रहा हूँ, इस समय फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड चुनने की कोशिश कर रहा हूँ। मैं पहले चंद्रमा को विंडो के केंद्र में रखूँगा - और रोल और पिच को दबाए रखूँगा और फिर चंद्रमा को उसकी सही जगह पर वापस रख दूँगा। इस समय चंद्रमा विंडो के केंद्र के पास आ रहा है। ठीक है, मैं इसे यहीं रोक देता हूँ, और इसे संतुलित करने के लिए रोल कंट्रोल का उपयोग करूँगा। ठीक है, इस समय, मुझे 0 रोल मिलेगा। मैं चंद्रमा से आगे निकल गया हूँ और बुध ग्रह को देख पा रहा हूँ जो चमकील
在你站西侧，我看到了许多旋涡状的云层。此时拍摄的照片有2、3、4、5。控制模式现在是自动的。助推器就在我正下方。我觉得我的姿态与仪器读数不符。这可能是因为陀螺仪停止工作了。除了姿态指示略有差异外，一切都正常
In the beginning, the operation with the precluded immediate starting up of our sightings as we had scheduled since we had another evasive maneuver. The dumping of the caused a tremendous amount of - of pseudo stars in the area which made an optics calibration practically impossible. The method which we had worked out did not seem to work too well. The method which I finally used was to go into, go to Sirius, which was our brightest star, get the shaft and trunnion, and then fly the spacecraft up to Sirius to use that for the optics, which we did at a later time. With regards to light scatter, it appears that at almost any attitude during our passive thermal control, we are receiving light scattering in the scanning telescope. It takes the form mostly of a wide band of light right across the center of the scope about 10 degrees either direction of zero. It is very difficult to see stars in this area. The realignments have been good. I have been able to pick up the star in the sextant to do the alignment, but I was not able to identify the star which we used in such cases as Regor or Menkent in the scanning telescope. The first star sighting which I took of the earth showed a very indistinct horizon. But there did appear to be a very - or somewhat sharp line between what appeared to be the earth's horizon and the atmosphere. The landma
13, ह्य
Okay. Ich mache noch ein gutes Foto von dem, was da so kommt. Na ja, ich denke, wir könnten genauso gut die andere Kamera anschließen und sicherstelle
Freedom Seven，这里是印度资本公司
Ster
好的，将两倍于最大功率点火提前角（MPL）的参数设置为：079、27、4013，加上 08144，减去 00443，减去 00226，不适用，加上 00205、08455、4，加上 20、268、261，加上 08155，减去 00443，减去 021、2187，不适用。GDA 应该没问题，希望螺距为 5.8
That's affirmative. We'll give you the pad, be coming up here from in a couple of hours, I guess, when we stabilize out on our tracking. The reason for - If you're ready to copy out a couple of more steps, and then I'll explain the reason we want to shut down on this burn time minus 1 second. Picking up o
分かりました。かなり大きなものですね。星2をリストの最後尾に移動させてしまったようですが、本来
Aufgrund der extremen Helligkeit, die unsere Pupillen verengt, können wir im Erdlicht weder Erdschein noch Oberflächenstrukturen erkennen. Der Blick auf die Terminatorgrenze entlang ihrer Kante ist fantastisch. Sie werden mir sicher zustimmen, dass einige der Krater, die Sie jetzt auf dem Bild sehen, durch die länger we
Questa è una risposta affermativa. Questo atteggiamento pone entrambe le finestre direttamente verso il Sole, ovvero verso 
Okay, Fred. Understand only the LMP's red hose is actually
Okay. I got interrupted there for a minute. Bob Hope is back out in Viet Nam again with his troops, doing a great job as usual. One little name in the news story here is from the USS New Jersey. Bob Hope joked from atop of a huge gun turret yesterday - or Wednesday - to delight the 1500 men aboard the battle ship New Jersey on its 20th Christmas entertaining US troops abroad. Hope and his 27 member troop entertained the New Jersey seamen after attend
Nous avons bien reçu votre tension artérielle 
Meglio ancora, così non congeleremo la no
…とてもよく動いているけど、誰かの気配が読めないみたい。だから中継で伝えないといけない。銃はちゃんと動いている。彼は前方に出て、後方に鼻の下をくぐり抜
私の記憶によれば、当時は公称
हाँ, बिल्कुल। फ्यूल सेल 3 पर REAC वाल्व बं
우주
अच्छा, आप वैक्यूम क्लीनर को यहीं क्यो
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы видим, 
I am--let's see, Ca
一切正常，机
لا بأس يا فرانك، هذا رائع. نود، في ختام هذه الجلسة، أخذ ثلاث قراءات من جهاز قياس النشاط الشمسي. يمكنك القيام بذلك في
Forza, Houston
Das ist Houston. Der Plan klingt gut
좋아요. 여기 편리하게 Hasse
两条
嘿，那儿有
ロジャー、ヒューストン
Roger. We h
Ich habe es verstanden – ich habe versucht, es mitzuschreiben, während du es gelesen hast, Vance. Die Pads sind: Lageregelung für den Abwurf des Servicemoduls, Lageregelung für die Mondbe
Oh, da standen wir 
Roger. If we could leave it in REACQ if you want to use the high gain, it would keep from w
Natürlich. Kabinentemperatur – 92. Anzugtempe
177 143 000 NA, più 00197, 47020 551 46818 12 128,3 257 023, su 263, sinistra 17, più 1195, meno 16500, più 126 23 35608, il set nord, rollio 68, beccheggio 97, imbardata 356, nessun ullag
好的。关于中途航段，我想大家普遍同意，我们会像以往一样进行。至于舷窗，中间的舷窗基本上没法用。两侧的舷窗或许可以用来观察，而会合舷窗的
分かりました。分かりました。やります。それからシステムですが… 問題が何であれ、J52センサーの交換などは一切せずに解決し
에드는 짐을 꺼내기 시작했고, 부스터를 더 이상 조작할 수 없는 지점에 이르자 저는 그를 전폭적으로 돕기 시작했습니다. 적어도 짐을 잡아주고, 다시 넣고, 사라지지 않도록 애썼죠. 우리가 서둘러 작업할수록 오히려 더 뒤처졌습니다. 짐을 제자리에 놓지 않아서가 아니라, 예상했던 것보다 훨씬 더 오래 걸렸기 때문입니다. 무중력 상태에서의 작업은 시뮬레이터에서보다 훨씬 더 어려웠습니다. 그렇게 우리는 빙 
Вот вам, ВВОД. РЕЖИМ УПРАВЛЕНИЯ, чтобы УДЕРЖАТЬ. Теперь вы хотите, чтобы я сделал 30 н
좋습니다. 현재 3G가 측정되고 있는데, 이번에는 재진입 감쇠 점검을 건너뛰어도 될 것 같습니다. 지금은 4G가 측정됩니다. 재진입은 순조롭게 진행되는 것 같습니다. 보조 감쇠 장치가 적절한 속도로 작동하고 있는 것 같습니다. 심하게 진동하는 것 같지도 않고, 뒤쪽 하늘의 불빛을 중심으로 안정적으로 회전하고 있는 것 같습니다. 자동 연료는 6.5G에서 여전히 14%를 나타내고 있습니다. 회전 속도는 초당 1.5도 이내로 유지되고 있는데, 이는 초당 약 10도의 회전 속도를 의미합니다. 최고 가속도는 여전히 6.8G입니다. 주황색 ​​불빛은 이제 사라졌습니다. 최고 가속도에서 벗어났습니다. 자동 연료는 여전히 14%를 나타내고 있으며, 가속도는 다
Ah, bene. Abbiamo perso ogni contatto con te. Ho l'orario di retrosequenza corretto per l'area 6-1. Sei p
Roger. 
わ
Роджер. 033 0000, слева 17, плюс 0883, минус 16500 12955 36185; Сириус, Ригель 129, 155 010, заполнение двумя форсунками,
Souhaiteriez-vous que nous choisi
Une fois de plus, je vois très clairement des éclairs jaillir sous mes pie
罗杰，友谊七号。正在进
باختصار يا جيم، لا نتوقع أي مشكلة، لكننا سنشرح الأمر أكثر
Okay, Jack. Schritt 2, die spezielle Unterroutine 1 für das Brenns
Проблема с водой проявилась еще до того
«Аполлон-8
Molto bene. Questa è l'edizione del 23 dicembre dell'Interstellar Time
Немного ближе к терминатору и
Почему бы вам не продолжить, а я сейчас займусь этой процедурой. Она находится рядом с фотоотчетом, я сейчас же е
Okay. I've been not reading any voltage at all on BAT C, and the amperage looks like about 2 amps, but that could be kind of noise-level stuff. I've got all the floodlights o
Хьюстон. Насколько близко вам удаётся сфокусироваться на предмет
We have some procedures in work, and I've seen them, Fred. I think pretty soon we'll be shooting them up to you to specify which camera
Houston. Tranquility is go
Houston. Quanto
Roger. We have a co
مرحبًا، جوايماس كاب كوم، جوايماس كاب كوم. سيجما سبعة. التردد العالي. زياد
रॉजर। अब मैंने बीडी रोल के लिए कॉन्फ़िगरेशन सेट कर लिया है, और मैंने थ्रस्टर C4 और B3 बंद कर दिए हैं, और मैं
休斯顿，我们现在不在Alinment系统里。你是不是出于某种原因想让我们Ali
I'd like to comment a little on the sextant. Its use in a cramped spacecraft is very difficult, particularly with the helmet on. I finally decided it was going to be useless with your helmet on to try to take the angles that the stars, that were being called for, required. So I took my helmet off. This gave me a little more flexibility in using it, but still I was limited to angles of about 20 to 23
Et si on choisissa
こんにちは、グアイマス キャップ コム、グアイマス キャップ コム。シグマセブン。 HF。以
はい、フレッド。コメント
Apollo 8, ici Houston 
오로라 세븐, 오로라 세븐. 여기는 캔턴 컴 테
Роджер. Это повлияет на время выполнения
Okay, Joe. Wenn ich das richtig verstehe, führen wir nach 74 Stunden bei Position 2 einen Sonnencheck durch. Dafür muss das Rendezvous-Radar außer Betrieb genommen werden. Wir nut
そして私は 80 パーセント
जेमिनी VI. कॉपी करने के लि
Che ne dite di una stima a lungo termine di come sarà il meteo nella zona di 
Das ist bestätigt. Wir wissen, dass Sie das Teleskop für die Beobachtung der Sonn
D'accord
Okay. Verify that you got AC power, in other words, the INVERTER 2 selected and the BUS TIE INVERTER 2 AC BUS A closed. We'll be under FLIGHT DISPLAYS, GASTA closed, commander, closed. On the AC BUS A, CBs GASTA closed, CONBIANDER closed. Ove
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴
わか
Roger. Loud and clear. Aurora Seven reading the Cape. Loud and clear. 
Roger. Cape ist startbereit und ich bin startbereit. Die Kapsel ist in gutem Zustand. Treibstoff 103–102 Prozent, Sauerstoff 78–100 Prozent, Kabinendruck konstant bei 5,8, Stromstärke 26 Ampere. Alle Systeme sind betriebsbere
OK. Pile à combustible 3 REAC désactivée, Housto
分かりました。ありがとうございます。私たち
396 033, unten 054, links 21, plus 08 10 minus 16500 12968 36222; gleiche Ausrichtung; Sirius und Rige
準備が整い次第、T
अच्छा होता, लेकि
Gemel
... لأعلى. قمنا بتشغيل نظام المركبة الفضائية، وحاولنا تحقيق الاستقرار، وربما تسببنا في ذلك في احتراق محركات الدفع السف
रॉजर। आज दोपहर हम टेक्सास खाड़ी तट के किनारे आपके क्षेत्र में एक दूरबीन से कुछ बादल देख रहे थे, और हमने यह भी देखा कि बाजा कैलिफोर्निया 
واضح تمامًا. كنتُ أتأكد فقط. انت
Roger. Neil has rigged himself a real
Да, подтверждаю. У нас также есть для 
Да, подтверждаю. Просто БАТАРЕЯ 6, Джек. А в следующей строке у тебя были БАТАРЕЯ 1 и 3. Добавь БАТАРЕЯ 1, 2, 3 и 4. Просто добавь БАТАРЕИ 2 и 4. Все четыре приличных БАТ
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir haben noch keine Daten vom Boden; die Sprachqualität ist seh
Bermuda, Friendshi
E Houston, Aquarius. Immagino che la prossima cosa da fare sarà una linea retta 000, ma credo che ora dovremmo aspettare
如果您有时间，
Roger. Wir gehen davon aus, dass wir die Stromversorgung zum Zeitpunkt des Hochfahrens oder etwa zweieinhalb Stunden vorher unterbrechen. Das ist keine feste Angabe, wir halten Sie auf dem Laufenden. Was die JETT-Positionierung angeht: Sobald Sie ein eingeschaltetes Kommandomodul und eine zufriedenstellende Plattform haben, können Sie sofort damit b
Roger, Muchea C
Хорошо. У нас ничего подобного не было, так что это в любом случае не представляло
حسنًا يا جيم. هذا أقل عمقًا بقل
Qu
제미니 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 레트로파이어 이후에는 저희와 연락이 되지 않을
ALIMENTAT
Das ist bestätigt, Jim. Alle anderen Schalter in 
Gemini 4, Gemini 4. Houston C
Bien, nous y voilà. Zone d'entrée: Mid-Pacific, 000153; 000. Les deux lignes suivantes indiqueront le coucher de la lune et l'attitude de vérification lunaire;, 178; NOUN 61, -21,66, -; 00:28. Les quatre suivantes sont N/A; DO est 4,00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353,1, 29,9. L'étoile de visée est Sigma Libra, bas 08,8, gauche 0,4; vecteur de portance vers le haut. Pour l'aligne
现在地球看起来是不是越来
Eagle, Houston. Uns ist egal, was – wir wollen lediglich die Driftgeschwindigkeit ermitteln und sehen, wie lange es dauert, bis sie nach dem Abwe
Houston, Apollo 11. Avez-vous constaté une différence de pression d'azote avant la perte d'oxygène? Il me semble que les deux pressions n'étaient pas égales… Le réservoir B était légèrement sous-pres
- - 베넷 혜성 촬영을 위해 060으로 바로 이동하여 모든 드론의 작동을 중지해 주십시오. 이를 위해 쿼드콥터 C와 D를 활성화해 주십시오. 모든 드론을 사용하여 촬영을 진행해 주십시오. 그리고 정확히 1분 후에 배터리 B의 충전을 종료해 주십시오. 마지막으로 한 가지 더 확인해 주
एक्वेरियस,
Okay. Looks like may not be able to hack the normal voice. On the cryo tanks, we've had quite a bit of destratification, particularly in the oxygen, and you notice this during the fan c
알겠습니다, 짐. 이전보다 아주 약간 얕아졌지만, 정확한 추적을 기반으로 하고 있으며 여전히 상승 벡터가
Роджер. 
지금까지 우리가 어려움을 겪었던 유일한 부분은 정장 관련 문제였는데, 이제 거의 해결
アポロ
好的。月亮的温度——我
Значит ли это, ч
Alpha/Pc から Pc、LAUNCH VEHICLE INDICATOR から GPI、GIMBAL DRIVE PITCH および YAW から AUTO、EVENT TIMER RESET から上、EVENT TIMER START から STOP、EVENT TIMER MINUTES, SECONDS から中央、POSTLANDING VENT バルブ、押す、PROBE EXTEND/RELEASE から OFF、EXTEND/RELEASE トークバック (2 つ、灰色)、DOCK PROBE RETRACT、PRIMARY および SECONDARY、オフ、EXTEND RUNNING LIGHTS/EVA LIGHTS から OFF、EXTEND RUNNING LIGHTS - RENDEZVOUS LIGHT、オフ、TOGETHER GET A - TUNNEL LIGHT、オフ、POWER LIGHT、オフ、SERVICE MODULE Helium、4 つ、中央、HELIUM 1 トークバック、4 つ、灰色テレメトリ コマンド モジュールを上向きにしてブロックします。コマンド モジュール圧力、オフ。サービス モジュール インジケーター、推進剤量。サービス モジュール ヘリウム 2、4 つ、中央。ヘリウム 2、4 つ、トークバック、グレー。サービス モジュール ヒーター、4 つ、オフ。サービス モジュール推進剤、4 つ、中央、オン、上。サービス モジュール推進剤トークバッ
और नील, अगर तुम कैमरा ले लोगे, तो मैं एसईक्यू बे 
1つ待機
了解。31、SPS/G&N: 36691 マイナス 061、プラス 066、137 22 3985、プラス 32838、プラス 06845、マイナス 02487、NA、ピッチ 052。残り
Je ferais mieux d'essayer d'extraire ce comprimé de xylose. Je déteste faire
Хорошо. Понял. Мой единственный вопрос, Джо, заключается в том, что стрелки крена и рыскания не обнулились при выполнении маневра в автоматическом режиме. Я пытался вруч
Roger，41 Delta（大）83. 1
11, Houston. Les prévisions actuelles indiquent des conditions acceptables dans votre zone de récupération: nuages ​​épars à 600 mètres d'altitude, vent du 070° à 13 nœuds, visibilité de 16 kilomètres et mer agitée (vagues d'environ 1,2 mètre). Les prévisions d'hier signalaient une tempête tropicale, Claudia, à environ 800 à 1 600 kilomètres à l'est d'Hawaï. Les images satellites prises hier après-m
로저. 상승 이륙 시간: 124 22 0000. TIG, 다시 한번 말씀드리겠습니다. TIG: 125 19 3470. TPI의 TIG: 126 57 0000. 그리고 LM의 CSI 값: 0
Roger, Rév. 33, exécution 4, heure de début 19:43:00, soit l'heure du coucher du soleil. Fin 0-20. Je r
Roger, mancano 4 minu
Roger. Wir sitzen alle hier
La COMM è sicuramente una b
Roger. We were jus
Noch ein kleines Stück. Halt sie genau dort an. Sie rutscht immer wieder ein bisschen ab; könntest du dich noch etwas näher an den Terminator heranbewegen
알겠습니다. 텍사스 연소 속도는 73초 동안 초당 48피트가 될 것
Okay. And if you can't attain that, why, of course, just the best you can do. We'll have to give it a try. Maybe it won't be quite
Ciao Sigma Seven, ciao Sigma Seven, sono Cal Cap Com, Cal Cap Com. Trasmetto in modalità nascosta. Abbiamo avuto un'interruzione di corrente al nostro ricevitore. Sto trasmettendo in modalità nascosta. Reimposta il tuo orologio per la retrosequenza alle ore 19:00. Questo tiene conto dell'errore del tuo orologio all'ultima lettura. L'ultimo rapporto era impostato su 27 secondi. Questo dovrebbe essere 33 secondo l'ultimo controllo che abbiamo avuto con te. Cape vuole che tu reimposti 
You're doing a great job. Jim, we took a hack on your acceleromete
機能、オフ、モード、スタンバイ、GTA、ダウン、GTA カバー、安全、姿勢、スケール、5/5、選択、1、ソース、姿勢設定、手動姿勢ロール、ピッチ、ヨー、レート コマンド、リミット サイ
よく聞
还有，13，这里是休斯顿。接下来，我们希望有12，第三步，也就是
एक और बत
알겠습니다. 36-4 40피트/초 전방. 즉, 1+06입니다. 2+31에서 120피트/초 후방. 23 
ठीक है। हम पुष्टि करते है
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कि हमे
ठीक है, जैक। 
Roger. Durante la prima accensione, il tuo motore ha bruciato un po' 
لنفترض أنني أحتاج إلى بعض كتب الب
Affermativo. Hai interrotto la discussione per un minuto, Jim. Lo faremo sulla palla partendo dall'assetto di partenza. 
كولومبيا، هيوستن. لقد أ
了解、ジム。ここで1、2アンペアの電力を節約するために、ダウンボイスバックアップ通信設定に切り替えてください。これは、電源と回路ブレーカーを抜いて、ダウンボイスバックアップに切り替える設定です。通信に問題が発生した場合は、この設定を逆にするだけで、再
ठीक है। समझ गया कि आपने उतरते समय एक धमाका और कुछ बर्फ के टुकड़े देखे। हम यहाँ नीचे देखेंगे, पता लगाने की कोशिश करेंगे कि कुछ दि
Фред, мы не видим ничего плохого. Например, ваша лодка, насколько мы можем судить,
Roger, stand b
حسنً
TRASDUTTORE CB, TEMPERATURA, PRINCIPALE A e PRINCIPA
أبولو 8، هيوستن. سنقوم بتغيير الهوائيات في غضون دقيقتين ونصف تقريبًا؛
D'accord. DELTA-V en faisait partie; j'espère que cela a permis de rehausser un peu cet ang
Okay, Joe. Da
チャーリー、アポロ11号。停止についていくつか質問があります。一番簡単な方法は、ヨー角0度、ピッチ角90度まで接近しているので、ロール角約260度で停止させるだけだと思います。それから、マニュアル姿勢制御、レートコマンド3、そしてデッドバンドが既に崩壊しているのでパネル8のスラスタをオンにする手順はどうでしょうか。この時点で、機体は現在の姿勢で停止するはずです。そして、ロール角261度に達した時にこれを全て実行すれば、機
好的，明白了。你想在我——我——之前得到一个“GO”
好了。你们可以看到他正拿着剪刀，剪掉一个塑料喷嘴的末端，他要把水
지구 자전축의 
Okay, er wi
Okay. Also, dieser Temperatursensor an Batterie 2 tickt irgendwie hin 
D'
Хорошо. Это +11, /. Это 40 минус 163, 
Toujours en assiette relativement horizontale. La commande de vitesse fonctionne bien. Content qu'elle tienne le coup. Elle se comporte très bien. Montée à 5,5 g. La commande de vitesse tient toujours, le carburant est toujours à 70 %, ce qui semble faible. Montée à 6,5 g, 7 g. Montée à 8 g. La commande de vitesse tient le coup. Elle prend un lacet assez important. Pas trop mal, je la gère plutôt bien. Le carburant est à 60 % en mode manuel. El
你好，阿波罗11
Bene. Questa - quando tirerai fuori il tuo libro di manovre - l'ultima manovra che ti abbiamo dato per il sorvolo rimane valida. Vorremmo solo sottolineare che l'angolo di ingresso, il Gamma, è leggermente più ripido di quanto consideriamo ideale, ma rientra nella nostra - in un certo senso - soglia di predizion
콜럼비
はい、ジャック。ちょっと質問があります。司令船の
很高兴再次和
H
Ok. Allora non servirà a 
Come stai man
Roger, Frank. J'ai quelques nouvelles et les résultats des matchs s
没错。吉姆，另外
Okay, Aquarius. Wir arbeiten 
Okay, Wassermann. Folgendes machen wir: Richten Sie die X-Achse (die positive X-Achse) entweder nach Norden oder Süden aus. Es scheint uns sinnvoller, die positive X-Achse nach Süden auszurichten. Tun Sie dies bitte bei eingeschaltetem Gerät. Anschließend schlagen wir vor, das Gerät auszuschalten,
分かりました。5018用に教えていただいた角度は、a用だったので、
是的。我们知道饮用水箱里已经没有水了，但我们了解到您曾把水箱里的一些水装进袋
Stavo solo commentando: ho guardato i propulsori dei quad 1 e 4. Abbiamo una leggera scoloritura all'esterno della canna. Gli ugelli sembrano non essere mai stati sparati, come s
ठीक है। इंग्लैंड के जोड्रेल बैंक से, एपी के माध्यम से: ब्रिटेन की विशाल जोड्रेल बैंक रेडियो दूरबीन ने आज सुबह 5:49 पूर्वी मानक समय (ईएसटी) पर सोवियत संघ के मानवरहित चंद्र प्रक्षेपण से संकेत प्राप्त करना बंद कर दिया। एक प्रवक्ता ने कहा कि ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि लूना 15 अंतरिक्ष यान "चंद्रमा से आगे निकल गया है।" एक अन्य बयान: वेधशाला के निदेशक सर बर्नार्ड लवेल के प्रवक्ता ने कहा, "हमें नहीं लगता कि यह उतरा है।" वाशिंगटन यूपीआई: उपराष्ट्रपति स्पिरो टी. एग्न्यू ने वर्ष 2000 तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेजने का आह्वान किया है, लेकिन डेमोक्रेटिक नेताओं ने जवाब दिया कि पृथ्वी पर जरूरतों को प्राथमिकता दी जानी चाहिए। बुधवार को अपोलो 11 के प्रक्षेपण के समय उपस्थित वरिष्ठ सरकारी अधिकारी एग्न्यू ने स्पष्ट रूप से अपने लिए बोलते हुए कहा था, न कि निक्सन प्रशासन के लिए, "मेरे विचार में, हमें इस सदी के अंत तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेज देना चाहिए।" लैरेडो, टेक्सास, एपी: नुएवो लैरेडो में आव्रजन अधिकारियों ने बुधवार को घोषणा की कि हिप्पियों को मेक्सिको में प्रवेश के लिए पर्यटक कार्ड नहीं दिए जाएंगे, जब तक कि वे स्नान न कर लें और बाल न कटवा लें। नुएवो लारेडो में मैक्सिकन आव्रजन प्रमुख ह्यूबर्टो काज़ारास ने कहा कि मैक्सिको सिटी, अकापुल्को और अन्य लोकप्रिय पर्यटन
حسنًا. نحن ندرس إجراء تعديل في منتصف المسار بعد 104 ساعات - أي بعد حوالي 20 ساعة - أو 18 ساعة، وبمعدل 7 أقدام في الثانية فقط. الخيار الآخر هو الا
ठीक है। अब मैं आपको बताता हूँ कि हम क्या करने वाले हैं, क्योंकि हमने आज दोपहर इस सुरंग के बारे में एक अलग कहानी बताई थी। हम सुरंग को इस तरह से वेंट करेंगे कि सुरंग में लगभग 1-1/2 से 2 psi का निरपेक्ष दबाव हो जाए। इससे हमें डेल्टा-पी का मान 3 मिलेगा। इसलिए, सुरंग
ह्यूस्टन, अगर आपके परिवार को और किसी मदद की जरूरत हो, तो
창문으로 강렬한 빛이 쏟아져 들어오네요. 뭔지는 잘 모르겠지만요. 이쯤 되면 해가 지고 있어야 할 텐데. 잠망경은 어둡습니다. 지평선을 마지막으로 보는 것 같은데, 아직 지평선에 닿지는 않았네요. 순식간에 밤이 되어가고 있습니다. 이제
O
알겠습니다. 참석자분들을 대상으로 설문조사를 했습니다. 소모품 재고는 양호하고, 현재 진입 감마는 -6
Roger. Mir scheint, d
रॉजर, 11. बैटरी चार्जिंग से संबंधित आपके प्रश्न पर, हमें लगता है कि यह संभवतः अलग-अलग बैटरियों के बीच का अंतर है; और ऐसा लगता है कि यह समस्या स्टार्टअप के दौरान कुछ समय के लिए ही ठीक हुई है। अन्य कारक जो इस पर प्रभाव डाल सकते हैं, वे हैं बैटरी का तापमान, आदि। EECOMM का मानना ​​है कि यह सामान्य डिज़ाइन सीमाओं के भ
REACQ 功能似乎没有按预期工作。它看起来像是越过了扫描极限，进入了机械极限，然后绕着航天器转了一圈
ठीक है। मैं इसे हाई गेन पर सेट कर देता हूँ। बैकग्राउंड में शायद ग्लाइकोल पंप की आवाज़ आ रही है, और मैं इसे चालू करने के पॉइंट पर पहुँच गया हूँ। क्या आप सुझाव देंगे कि मैं कुछ मिनट रुक जाऊँ या 
分かりました。正解です。それではパネル275に戻って、CB MAIN B BAT BUS Bを開いてください
تخيل أن المكان قد أصبح خالياً قليلاً بعد ذلك اللقاء. يم
Okay, sehr gut. Ich werde um 14:13:15 Uhr in Texas eine m
В это время начинается период 
好的。断路器 BATTERY B POWER ENTRY 和 PO
알겠습니다. 프랭크, 여기 날씨 예보가 있습니다. 2000m 고도에는 산발적인 구름이, 4000m 고도에는 부분적으로 구름이 끼겠고, 상층부는 흐린 날씨가 예상됩니다. 내려오시면서 보시게 될 겁니다. 파고는 4피트(약 1.2m), 풍향은 시속 70마일(약 11km)에 
लगभग 0.
Ed a commencé à ranger le matériel et, dès que nous avons atteint un point où il n'était plus possible de manipuler le propulseur, je l'ai aidé à plein temps – du moins en tenant les objets, en les rangeant et en essayant d'éviter qu'ils ne disparaissent. Plus nous travaillions vite, plus nous prenions de retard. Non pas que nous ne rangions pas les choses correctement, mais cela prenait beaucoup plus de temps que prévu. En apesanteur, ce n'était pas beaucoup plus facile que dans le simulateur, si ce n'est tout aussi facile. Nous avons donc procédé ainsi. Arrivés à Carnarvon, j'étais convaincu que nous n'y arriverions pas, mais je pensais que nous allions p
34 मिनट पर प्राथमिक स्कैनर पर वापस आ रहे हैं। वार्म-अप का समय लगभग 30 सेकंड है। हम इसे बेह
O
제 생각
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。もし情報
I hope so because tomorrow i
सिग्मा सेवन... त
I am faced the wrong way and limited in maneuverability I have left because of my fuel state. I can see the terminator between moonlit side, and unmoonlit side. Ov
알았어, 잭. 메모 내용은 다음과 같아: 회로 차단기 보호 장치가 전류를 15암페어로 제한해. 튜브, 즉 두 장치 사이의 연결
Une photo prise à l'arrière droit du vaisseau spatial, montrant la jupe de l'étage de descente, révèle un assombrissement marqué de la surface, témoignant d'une érosion ou d'un rayonnement minime. Lors de la descente, nous avons tous deux constaté l'émanation d'une grande quantité de fines particules de poussière. Il avait été annoncé que nous observerions probablement un dégagement gazeux à 
Et, Apollo 13, Houston. Je recommande OMNI Alfa jusqu'à ce que vous adoptiez l'état d'esprit requis pour 
Roger, Elliot. Abbiamo un buon orizz
네, 기본적으로는 맞습니다. 제가 간단히 설명드린 후 단계
좋습니다, 짐. 선실 상태가 아주 좋아
こんにちは、アポ
收
अच्छा, क्या आप कुछ चीजों में आगे बढ़ना च
Roger. Columbia, Eagle. Have you about maneuvered t
Roger. Aktuell haben wir ke
Сейчас мы видим Землю почти ка
刚刚用哈苏相机拍到了第29张，记录了我们在北非
네, 감사합니다
Роджер Джемини 
No, not a thing.
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 약 3분 거리이며, 소모품 업데이트 정보를 알려드리
- - RKV. We'd like to update that SPC l
네, 휴스턴입니다. 지금 
حسنًا. لقد أكملنا عملية التفريغ، وجهاز التسجيل الصوتي أصبح ملكك، واستمعنا إلى تشغيل 
Почему бы вам не выбрать PCM, LOW, и не беспо
أبولو 
Еще
Ic
67 قدمًا
了解。ペリシントスプラス2です。/ 62871 ノベンバー・アルファ、1つ待機。了解。ピッチトリムとヨートリムは適用不可、時間、マイナス00468、プラス00254、プラス00181 173 101 027 ノベンバー・アルファ、プラス00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044、下044、左45、プラス1100、マイナス02500 12967 36198、主星シリウス、副星リゲル 155:010、ジェッ
了解。トーラス、アイーダ。繰り返す、トーラス、アイーダ。上162、左01、残りは適用不可。シリウス、リゲルを129、155、010に整列、負のアレージ、地平線窓点火マイナス3、27度、地平線左。点火時18
Apollo 8, Houston
36-4 40 전방, 120 후방, 
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 창문 가리개는 승무원의 편의를 위한 것 외에는 아무런 기능이 없습니다. 시스템상의 문제는 없는 것 같습니다. 하선하실 때 창문 가리개를 다
يتم تشغيل وإيقاف ال
Хорошо. R1 плюс 27210, R2 плюс 35570, R3 плюс 33010. Второй пункт, как вы знаете, связан с маневром с помощью команд «ПРОДОЛЖИТЬ» и «ПРОДОЛЖИТЬ»; и, после вашего положения, напоминани
ठीक है। बिल्कुल सही। ये जिम लवेल हैं। आज हम आपको अपोलो 8 के अंदर के जीवन के बारे में थोड़ा सा दिखाना चाहते थे। हमने आपको चंद्रमा के दृश्य दिखाए, पृथ्वी के दृश्य दिखाए, और अब हम आपको अपने घर में आमंत्रित करना चाहते हैं। जैसा कि आप इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर देख सकते हैं, यह कम से कम चार दिनों से हमारा घर है। हम इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर हर दिन को चिह्नित करते हैं। चार दिन पूरे हो चुके हैं, और हम पाँचवें दिन पर काम कर रहे हैं। बेशक, हम सभी शुक्रवार को लैंडिंग का बेसब्री से इंतजार कर रहे हैं। अंतरिक्ष यान के इस हिस्से में, जिसे हम लोअर इक्विपमेंट बे कहते हैं, राष्ट्रपति के शारीरिक फिटनेस सलाहकार, कैप्टन जिम लवेल, एक व्यायाम कार्यक्रम शुरू करने वाले हैं जो हम हर दिन करते हैं। आप देख सकते हैं कि वे बहुत आराम से इधर-उधर घूम रहे हैं। नेविगेशन के लिए इस्तेमाल होने वाले ऑप्टिक्स से उनका सिर टकरा गया। वे एक ऐसे व्यायाम उपकरण का उपयोग कर रहे हैं जो मांसपेशियों को चुस्त-दुरुस्त रखने के लिए बनाया गया है। हमारे अंतरिक्ष यान का एक और बहुत महत्वपूर्ण कार्य कंप्यूटर है, और मुझे लगा कि आपको यह देखकर दिलचस्पी होगी कि हमारे पास यहाँ क्या है - वे डिस्प्ले जो हमें हमारे बर्न, नेविगेशन और पृथ्वी-कक्षीय मिशनों में प्रवेश और रेट्रोफायर के दौरान उपयोग की जाने वाली गति के बारे में सारी जानकारी देते हैं। आप देख सकते हैं कि यह एक कंप्यूटर द्वारा नियंत्रित होता है, जो टाइपराइटर कीबोर्ड के समान है, और इससे आने-जाने वाली चीजें बिल्कुल चमत्कारिक हैं। इसने हमारे लिए शानदार काम किया है, और जिम लवेल ने इसे चलाने में उत्कृष्ट कार्य किया है। अब एक और बहुत महत्वपूर्ण बात, चाहे आप अंतरिक्ष में हों या जमीन पर, भोजन है, और मैंने बिल एंडर्स से आपको यह दिखाने के लिए कहा है कि हम उड़ान के दौरान यहाँ कैसे भोजन करते हैं। कृपया तस्वीर के लिए क्षमा करें क्योंकि हम यहाँ घूम रहे हैं और कैमरा बदल रहे हैं। हम जो भोजन उपयोग करते हैं वह सब डिहाइड्रेटेड होता है; यह वैक्यूम-सील्ड बैग में पहले से पैक होकर आता है। आप देख सकते हैं कि बिल को इसे एक जगह रखने के लिए बस इसे छोड़ना होता है। अंतरिक्ष यान में हवा के प्रवाह को छोड़कर, यह
별로 큰 문제는 없었어요. 처음 5cm 정도는 별문제 없이 들어갔는데, 두 번째부터는 망치를 두 손으로 잡고 힘껏 두드려도 연장봉 윗부분에 꽤 큰 자국이 남더라고
क्या आपको कैस्टर और पोल
偏航角现在大约为0度——标记。T. 我会看看——大约向左偏4度。正在修正俯仰角，偏航角没问题
好的。接下来的三个步骤都一样，然后我们要把“录音机前进”旋钮调到中间位置；“磁带运动”旋钮调到
حسنًا، 13. هذه صورة جيد
Okay, Frank. Das ist einer der Punkt
حسناً.
جيميني 4، جيميني 4، هذا هو مركز اتصالات آر كي 
Роджер. Не могли бы вы еще раз прокомментировать это, систему отношения к ви
Roger. Wir glauben, dass die Daten geladen sind und bitten Sie, die SPC
Sunset is rather striking, I don't think that I need to waste much time looking at them. They are very interesting. The other thing, it's fascinating is how black it is when your eyes are not adapted. I definitely can see some coating on the window. Going back to VOX at this point in UHF-hi to transmit. Opening visor to wipe off the right microphone. I licked it. Closing visor. Visor was sealed immediately for the suit circuit to go to work for me. I don't want to get fouled up with it again. The suit inlet is holding very nicely at about 68 (degrees). So the dome again is going to go back up. It's now up at 76, 75 . Apparently this higher setting is the one we want. Think I'll put in another half a mark on that now and we may have her locked. She's getting kinda cool at last so I know where I want to go with the setting. I have set the coolant quantity for the suit and control lever at 8.5 at The readout the dome at this time is 75 (degrees). The suit inlet is 68 (degrees). Very pleasant. I can feel cool air crossing my face. The oxygen quantity looks real good, 60 and 75 (psi, in hundreds). I have been watching the 250 inverter. It is approaching 140 degrees, and the 150 contrast is down to 
Roger. Die DELTA-Anzeige schien korrekt zu sein. D
你有 03
진입 패드는 다음과 같습니다: Mid-PAC, 000153, 000;, 178; 
I think I got that, Buzz. That's affirmative. But when he did that second, y
Также можно использовать невесомость для демонстрации многих вещей, которые мы все изучали в школе. Я хотел бы кратко показать, как легко объяснить работу гироскопа. Если я раскручу эту банку, то, согласно уравнениям движения, мы ожидаем, что после того, как ей будет придано вращение и ось вращения буде
Это «Дружба Семь». Замечание о работе системы управления: похоже, всякий раз, когда я переключаюсь в ручной режим или режим «fly-by-wire» и маневрирую в течение длительного времени, мы каким-то образом вносим значительные ошибки в гироскопическую систему. У меня возникают самые ра
로저. 제가 생각하기
11، هيوستن. لأغراض التخطيط، يمكنك اصطحاب المنظار
रॉ
双子座4号。请注意，训练员现在在指挥飞行员那边
Ok. Abbiamo un paio di assorbenti da darti e ti aspettiamo. Andiamo a vedere se abb
南十字星とアルファ・
كولومبيا، هذه هيوستن. خط العرض زائد 0.523، خط 
ジェミニ4、ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP COM。オーバ
Okay. Wir haben das schon bedacht. Und zwar ziemlich früh im Spielverlauf. Wir werden das Event-Paket wieder 
Ok. C
ठीक है। मध्यमार्ग के संदर्भ में, मुझे लगता है कि इस बात पर आम सहमति है कि हम इसे वैसे ही करेंगे जैसे हम हमेशा से करते आए हैं। अब, खिड़कियों के बारे में बात करें तो, बीच वाली खिड़कियाँ, असल में, इस्तेमाल करने लायक नहीं हैं। दोनों तरफ की खिड़कियाँ शायद अवलोकन के लिए ठीक हों, और मिलन स्थल वाली खिड़कियों क
Roger. Celui que nous avions ici venait de l'ouest et se déplace vers l'est - ou p
심지어 음성 채팅창에서도 이발소 간판을 
दो म
Роджер. Мы хотели бы получить оц
上面的景色真是
Фрэнк
C'est exact. Nous avons remarqué la vibr
D'a
Fred, ton taux de CO2 augmente. Il est à 11 sur notre manomètre, et on a une accumulation médicale jusqu'à 15 millimètres, moment où on passera au système secondaire. On a l'air d'avoir assez d'hydroxyde de lithium, environ 192 heures d'autonomie, cartouches comprises. Et comme tu le sais, on a un moyen de les utiliser. Dès qu'on aura rédigé un protocole, on
이곳의 지평선은 아주 뚜렷합니다. 하늘은 칠흑같이 어둡고, 땅, 아니 달은 아주 밝습니다. 하늘과 달의 대비는 선명한 검은 선처럼 보입니다. 이제 카메라 시야에 들어오는 것은 흥미로운 오래된 이중 고리 크레이터들입니다. 이 크레이터들은 바다 지역에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 지형으로, 바다와 같은 점성과 색깔을 가진 물질로 채워져 있습니다. 여기 세네 개의 흥미로운 지형이 보입니다. 지평선 너머로 
كما ت
看起来内华达山脉西侧，贝克斯菲尔德东北方向有一点云；从贝克斯菲尔德进入莫哈韦沙漠
Négatif. T
Pronti per il rapporto delle 17:00. Il carburante è a 89-90. L'ossigeno a 56-75 (psi, in centinaia). L'ingresso della tuta è... La temperatura della cupola è a 70 (gradi). La temperatura della cupola della cabina è a... 0,
알겠습니다. 제가 있던 위치가 바로 그곳입니다. 명령 모듈 추진제 2, 중앙, 켜짐, 위쪽; 추진제 통신, 2, 회색; 서비스 모듈 보조 연료 압력, 4, 중앙, 닫힘; 자동, 꺼짐; 명령 모듈/최종 분리, 2, 꺼짐; 명령 모듈/서비스 모듈 분리, 2, 아래쪽; / 분리, 꺼짐, 아래
Roger. Nous allons commencer par l'actualité internationale. Les messages diffusés la veille de Noël, alors que le petit vaisseau spatial orbitait autour de la Lune, ont suscité des éloges pour les astronautes américains d'Apollo 8 et l'espoir d'une coopération internationale dans l'exploration spatiale. Même dans le monde communiste, l'enthousiasme était palpable pour le premier voyage de l'homme sur la Lune. À Moscou, le scientifique soviétique Anatoly Besaranov a rappelé que son pays et les États-Unis avaient déjà partagé des connaissances spatiales et a prédit que le vol d'Apollo 8 mènerait à une coopération accrue. À Cuba, Radio La Havane a rediffusé le programme de la Voix de l'Amérique pour informer ses auditeurs du discours d'Apollo 8. Les responsables de la Voix ont indiqué que c'était la première fois que les programmes d'une agence américaine étaient diffusés par la radio de La Havane. La Tchécoslovaquie a suivi le vol lunaire grâce à une large couverture télévisée; et à Budapest, en Hongrie, on ne parlait que de ça dans les trains et les bus. Dans le monde non communiste, les employés de bureau et les personnes faisant leurs achats de Noël retenaient leur souffle tandis que le vaisseau spatial se préparait pour son décollage vers la Terre. Dans les rues, les Français louaient le savoir-faire américain et l'exploit spatial, et certains téléspectateurs, en regardant les images lunaires à la télévision, s'exc
こ
了解しました。SEP OAMS、SE
Хорошо. Не совсем ясно, действительно ли устройство достигло механического ограничителя, и если это так, то, по словам сотрудников, мы можем оставаться у этого ограничителя максимум 15 минут без каких-либо повреждений. И мы хотели бы ещё раз прос
イーグル、ヒューストン。向こう側でお会いしましょう。あなたの時間は飛行計画より
Осталась всего минута;
ロジャー、
시그마 세븐 시그마 세븐입니다. 여기는 무체아 캡 콤입니다. 어떻게
जेरी, हमें H2 का प्रवाह तो मिल रहा है, लेकिन कहीं भी वाष्प के कण नहीं हैं। अब कुछ कण दिखने
روجر
Le magnétophone ne fonctionne pas, ni en mode automatique ni en mode 
ठीक है, जो। और जब आप यह कर रहे हों, तो मुझे कमांड मॉड्यूल चेकलिस्ट
Yes, we've gone through everything
네, 짐. 그건 단일 자세 추진기 고장
Sic
ジェリー、興味深いことに、非常に小さな新しいクレーターが多数あり、そこから小さな白い光線が放射されているよう
좋아요. 그럼
好了，准备好了
I
По крайней мере, мы можем забыть о них до подведения итогов
Ja. Es scheint, als ob die Taumelbewegung in die andere Richtung geht, Jack, den
Okay, 11. This is Houston. At time approximately 22 30 in the flight plan, in your postsleep checklist, and in all other postsleep checklist
जी हां, आप सही
Roger, compris: pas de contrôle de l'attitude. Pourriez
जी हाँ। फिलहाल इसकी गति 
好的……我们如何正确对准
11, Houston. Sembra che siamo d
ठीक है, डेल्टा-वी थ्रस्ट, नॉर्मल, ए, 
धन्यवाद, राष्ट्रपति महोदय
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Пожалуйста, у
Jim, deux points: dans le module de commande
Хьюстон, Gemini VI. Все обра
ومن الأمور الرائعة يا جاك، خاصةً بالنسبة لشخص مبتدئ مثلي، سهولة الحركة هنا. وكما تعلم من عملك في محاكي وحدة القيادة، فإن انعدام الجاذبية يُعدّ ميزةً كبيرة. لأنك تشعر بضيق المساحة عند مستوى جاذبية واحد، ما يجعل الحركة صعبةً للغاية، بينما الحركة سهلة في هذه البيئة. وكما ترى، كان المكان نظيفًا، وجدتُ بعض الحلقات المعدنية المفكوكة، وغطاءً بلاستيكيًا صغيرًا لكاميرا التسلسل 
रॉजर। उस 
Roger. Tra i titoli principali riguardanti Apollo questa mattina, ce n'è uno che chiede di cercare una bella ragazza con un grosso coniglio. Un'antica leggenda narra che una bellissima ragazza cinese di nome Chang-o viva lì da 4000 anni. Sembra che sia stata bandita sulla Luna perché ha rubato la pillola dell'immortalità al marito. P
حسنًا يا بيل، نحن مستعدون لتجربة هذه الموسيقى على نوع مختلف من التوصيلات هذه المرة. ولضمان استمرار الاتصال الصوتي، أرجو 
Okay, Houston. Haben wir gr
Here is a feature by Harry Rosenthal of Associated from Houston. Two Santas brighten the Christmas Eve for 2-year-old Jeffrey Lovell. The first one knocked on his front door and brought presents. The second started his daddy home from the moon. The first wore a red suit and a white beard and ho, ho'd loud enough to be heard down the block. The second was a huge engine spitting flame behind the moon, and thousands of people were awaiting word that it had fired. "Please be informed that there is a Santa Claus" were the first words from Apollo 8 as it emerged from radio silence to inform an 
Роджер. На данный момент мы рекомендуем с вашего согласия начать встречу примерно в восемь часов вечера по хьюстонс
了
Привет, Джо. Я рад, что ты это затронул, потому что я говорил совершенно сер
了解しました。Rev 41. 06 01 44 D
알겠습니다. 페이지 오른쪽 맨 위에 있는 "4초 동안 켜짐, 50프레임 
你好迈克尔，我们失去了信号，比尔按了 COMMAND RESE
Хорошо, Джим, на этом наша процедура отключения питания завершена, и мы ждём,
前
Okay. That's the - that's the system doing it for me, of course. I'm going 
好的，杰克。面板 3，交流逆变器 2，主 B；逆变器
Roger. Fin de la zone orbit
Und Ken, falls dein Mann das OMNI-Switching-Spiel spielen möchte: Wir sind momentan auf Dog – Bravo eingestellt, genauer gesagt, wir sind auf Bravo eingestellt, aber auch für D konfiguriert – Korrektur, wir sind auf D eingestellt und auch für Bravo konfiguriert. Wenn du umschalten möchtest, machen wir 
D'accord, nous sommes prêts à intervenir ici, sur le terrain, si v
حسنًا. هيوستن
Giusto, Jack. È abbastanza chiaro che dovremo stilare con molt
Вот
Comment ça marche
And when we sta
Seven, H
收到。我有一些关于这方面的信息，我们会在下一个练习结束后进行讲解。这次我们希望你尝试机头朝北的姿态，也就是俯仰角180度，偏航角315度。另外，我们还想再观察一下这种无模式飞行，我们认为如果横滚角速率从0.1度/秒改为0.3度/
처리 중입니다. 그에게 
こんばんは。私たちのミッション、アポロ11号の飛行における象徴的な側面についていくつかお話ししたいと思います。ここ2、3日、宇宙船内で起こった出来事について議論を重ねる中で、私たちは、これは単なる3人の月への旅以上のものであり、政府と産業界の
了解しました。すべてのシステムが正常に動作しているようです。フライトでは、機器の保管場所について検討していただきたいと考えています。CGを作成したいと考えています。ですから、もし可能であれば、今後数時間以内に検討していただき、こ
Roger. Du
ठीक है, व्यायाम हो गया। रक्तचाप की जाँच
아주 좋습니다. 정
Roger. 1, G&N: 38658, meno 054, più 065, 078 02 0345, più 29180, più 03779, meno 013
حسناً يا فريد، لقد بدأ
Well, looking at here, Vance, it's hard to be convinced it's even the Earth. All we see is wate
로저. 당신이 그렇게 생각하는 이유는 단지 원뿔곡선 해법 때문이라는 것을 
आपने डायरेक्ट 
That's a
Roger, Jim. Pause, Jack, wir möchten, dass du in der aktuellen Totzone bleibst. Wir nehmen die Änderung vor, sobald die Fernsehsendung vorbei ist. Außerdem möchten wir dich bitten, deine Nick- und G
बोरसाइट तारा पृथ्वी है, नीचे 037, दाईं ओर 22, प्लस 10 68, माइनस 165 00 128 56 361 18। संरेखण तारे: प्राथमिक तारा सीरियस है, द्वितीयक रिगेल 010, 294, 320, कोई उलेज नहीं, पथ वापसी, 8750। यह हिंद महासागर की ओर जाता है और इसके लिए एक उच्च
1 では、トラニオンは 03235、2 では
11، هيوستن. تشير التوقعات الحالية إلى ظروف جوية مناسبة في منطقة تعافيكم: رياح متفرقة
बज़, कृपया प्रतीक्षा करें। जहाँ तक मुझे पता है, मौसम काफी अच्छा दिख रहा है। उष्णकटिबंधीय अभिसरण रेखा के साथ, मौसम मानचित्र पर कुछ बादल दिखाई दे रहे हैं, लेकिन कुछ खास नहीं। अभी - प्रतीक्षा करें। चलिए देखते हैं, अभी मध्य में - हाँ, एमपीएल पर - 3000 बिखरे बादल हैं, दृश्यता 10, लहरों की ऊँचाई 3 फीट है, यह वर्तमान मौसम है। मुझे नहीं लगता कि कोई खास पूर्वानुमान है। कुछ - फ्लाइट ने अभी मुझे सूचित किया है कि मैंने जो पूर्वानुमान बताया है, वही है
Ok, vorrei mostrartelo mentre parlo. Funziona come una macchina fotografica. Ha il - Il controllo f-stop è proprio qui, e lo imposti su f:22 che, ovviamente, lascia entrare la minima quantità di luce, e questa è
وسنواصل الع
Und, Houston, vielleicht interessiert es dich, dass ich aus meinem linken Fenster jetzt den gesamten nordamerikanischen Kontinent, Alaska und über den Pol bis zur Halbins
Une des solutions envisagées serait de supprimer le repa
Okay, Ken. Ich glaube, wir werden die hohe Gewinnchance gleich verpassen. Wollen wir sie nicht beim nächsten Mal nutz
2분이 지나면 30초가 남았을 때 30초부터 카운트다운을 시작해주세요. 30초
11, ह्यूस्टन। नील, टीवी पर आपकी आखिरी टिप्पणी से हमें लगा कि आप इसे बंद करने वाले हैं। इससे संकेत मिला कि आप इसे दोबारा चालू करने पर विचार कर रहे होंगे। हम सोच रहे थे कि क्या हमें लाइनें चालू रख
Ваш голос немного прерывистый, но я вас понимаю. Имейте в виду, что мы снизили давление в нашей сис
Eagle, Houston. Wir haben die Winkel. Ich lese sie vor. Ende. Für das Kommandomodul: 11154, 20792, 0
パネル 16 の BAL LOAD CROSS TIE ブレーカ
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait pas fonctionner correctement. La méthode que j'ai finalement utilisée consistait à entrer dans [nom de la zone manquante], à nous rendre à Sirius, notre étoile la plus brillante, à récupérer l'axe et le tourillon, puis à faire voyager le vaisseau spatial jusqu'à Sirius pour l'utiliser pour l'optique, ce que nous avons fait ultérieurement. En ce qui concerne la diffusion de la lumière, il semble que, quelle que soit l'attitude pendant notre contrôle thermique passif, nous recevions de la lumière diffusée dans le télescope de balayage. Cela se présente principalement sous la forme d'une large bande de lumière traversant le centre du télescope, à environ 10 degrés de part et d'autre de zéro. Il est très difficile de voir les étoiles dans cette zone. Les réalignements ont été bons. J'ai pu repérer l'étoile dans le sextant pour effectuer l'alignement, mais je n'ai pas pu identifier l'étoile utilisée pour des observations telles que Regor ou Menkent avec le télescope de balayage. La première observation d'étoile que j'ai effectuée depuis la Terre a révélé un horizon très indistinct. Cependant, une ligne assez nette semblait se dessiner entre ce qui paraissait être l'horizon terrestre et l'atmosphère. Le filtre de visée à repères a semblé améliorer la définition de cet horizon. L'horizon entre l'espace et la haute atmosphère est très flou et indistinct, ce qui le rend difficile à utiliser. Comme je l'ai mentionné précédemment, il arrive que, lorsque le Soleil est proche, la zone autour de la Lune ne soit pas sombre, mais plutôt claire, apparaissant bleu clair. C'est également le cas lors de l'alignement avec une étoile dans le sextant, lorsque le Soleil est relativement proche de l'optique. Néanmoins, je n'ai aucune difficulté à trouver ces étoiles dans le sextant. Je n'ai eu aucune difficulté à repérer les étoiles utilisées, comme Sirius, Procyon ou Canopus, sur le fond terrestre lors de nos mesures d'horizon stellaire. Je peux distinguer ces trois étoiles sur le fond de la Terre. Je pense qu'il sera très difficile de réaliser un alignement de secours à l'aide des étoiles du pôle Nord, car Navi n'est pas une étoile très brillante. J'ai pu
حسنًا. ما يدور في أذهاننا هنا هو أننا نفحص بعض العدسات الموجودة لديكم للكاميرات، وسنرى ما إذا كان بالإمكان استخدام إحداها لتخفيف بعض هذا الضوء حت
Negative. I wou
저는 OMNI B에 남을게요. 여러분이 다시 지휘권을 잡고 B와 D 사이에서 그들을 조종하게 해주세요. 그리고 몇 걸음 남았는지, 그래야 여기에 크게 써야
로저. 달과 같은 먼 거리에서 OMNI 장비를 사용해도 저비트 전송률의 음성 통화
Roger. P76: 84 est moins 00758, toutes les balles, plus 00098, à 101 36 1400; plus 01223, moins toutes les balles, plus 01889, 102 44 2700; temps d
ठीक है, ओवेन। मैं अपोलो 11 की म
Roger. Mike, je pense que nous pouvons expliquer ce taux de sept dixièmes. Lors de notre premier essai, nous n'avons pas réussi à effectuer le test, ce qui a entraîné une erreur importante entre le CDU réel et le CDU souhaité en roulis. Dans ce cas, le véhicule effectuera une manœuvre à un taux calculé à partir du taux initial, soit trois dixièmes plus quatre dixièmes, et se limitera à quatre dixièmes au-dessus du taux souhaité, à conditi
Хорошо, Колумбия. Мы завершили передачу данных; компьютер ваш. Можете использовать BLOCK; однако мы просим вас воздержаться от выравнивания по варианту 1 до тех пор, пока вы не пройдете посадочную 
네, 프레드 씨. 그 말씀은 이해했습니다. 
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। कृपया 90 डिग्री का यॉ करें। अपने मध्य गिम्बल कोण पर ध्यान रखें। आप गिम्बल लॉक से लगभग 30 डिग्री दूर हैं, और इस प्रक्रिया के मध्य में हम इसे ओम्नी स्विच कहेंगे। समा
Роджер. Спасибо, Майк. И перерыв. Игл, 
Affermativo. Okay. Riga 3, sotto PROPELLENTE: REGOLATORE/VENTILATORE ELIO DISCESA dovrebbe essere aperto. RADAR RENDEZVOUS STANDBY, aperto; RADAR ATTERRAGGIO, aperto. Sotto STABBIGLIAMENTO/CONTR
هيا، هيا، هيا
Ricevuto. Ho acceso l'interruttore del computer e l'interruttore di alimentazione sull'IGS. Lasciami
I don't think 
This
Okay. It was zero for star angle 
Okay, beim letzten Überflug haben wir etwa 38 Bilder mit der Synoptic Terrain Photography aufgenommen. Wir starteten etwas östlich von San Diego und flogen bis zur nächsten Wolkendecke. Sobald wir den südlichen Teil der USA überflogen, machten wir wieder sporadisch Aufnahmen, genauer
Хорошо, Вэнс. Ты прав. У
好的。点火时，需要切换到制导控制、模式控制、姿态控制，开关分别设置为横滚脉冲、俯仰脉冲和偏航模式控制。我们将使用俯仰和横滚控制。发动机万向节将关闭；我们将使用10%的推力；我们将手动启动和停止发动机，控制间隙将通过一个加号-X平移按钮
Примерно одна минута до гла
حسناً. لقد حص
好的。杰克，我可能要跟你再检查一遍，因为这份清
روجر، ما هي الإعدادات التي تنصح بها لرصد هالة الشمس؟ الشمس الآن خلف حافة القمر مب
क्या आप चंद्रमा से कुछ
友
Nein. Sobald das Signal ausfiel, driftete es in diese Winkel ab und blieb dort. Als es dann wieder aufstieg, suchte es eine Weile herum, entfernte sich aber nicht weiter. Es bewegte sich allmählich in die Winkel,
Да, думаю, так и есть. Подождите секунду, и я посмотрю, что FLIGHT скажет нам, прежде чем 
さて、皆さんはちょうど今、縁を越えて来始めていますね。中央
Roger, Apollo Run One 13 54 08, au nord-est de la piste, 92 miles, et... contrainte sur le contrôle d
そして、ヒューストン、あなたは、今私の左側の窓から、北アメリカ大陸全体、アラスカ、北極を越えてユカタン半島、キューバ、南アメリカ北部まで見渡せることに
Nous avons de sérieux problèmes. Nous sommes en plein chaos. Nous sommes déconnectés de l'Agen
Колумбия, это Хьюстон. На вашей карте LAM 2 мы хотели бы уточнить топографическую область, в которой вы проводили наблюдения в этот последний период. Насколько мы понимаем, вы на
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호 휴스턴입니다. 저희는 
Vi darò alcuni angoli di ant
शुभ संध्या। मैं आप सभी से अपोलो 11 मिशन की उड़ान के कुछ प्रतीकात्मक पहलुओं पर चर्चा करना चाहता हूँ। पिछले दो-तीन दिनों में अंतरिक्ष यान में घटी 
收到。如果你想走那条路，就把引擎开到最大，然后你就可以开车到处转转
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。R
Roger. Das ist richtig. Schritt 11 lautet: „Deaktivieren Si
Роджер, пожалуйста, включите переключатель 
알겠습니다. 차량 조종에 어려움은 없었나요?
Roger. Hai idea di dove si 
分かりました。何かあった場合に備えて考えていたん
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une de l'actualité mondiale. Seuls quatre pays, la Chine communiste, la Corée du Nord, le Nord-Vietnam et l'Albanie, n'ont pas encore informé leurs citoyens de votre vol et de votre alunissage. Un journaliste a même déclaré être à court de mots pour décrire votre succès. Ce soir, le président Nixon assistera au match des étoiles de baseball à Washington. Après le match, il se rendra dans la zone de récupération du Pacifique. Mercredi soir, il se rendra en hélicoptère de l'île Johnston au navire de transmissions de la Marine, l'Arlington. Jeudi matin, il reprendra l'hélicoptère pour rejoindre le Hornet à temps pour assister à votre amerrissage. Le président sera accompagné du secrétaire d'État William Rogers et de Frank Borman. Ils observ
Roger. The signal strength dropped very rapidly to zero; and the pitch and yaw, in about 3 seconds, moved toward 40 degrees pitch and 240 degrees yaw. Right now, they're sitting on about 15 degrees pitch and about 265 degrees yaw. So they didn't move very far, about 30 degrees apiece; and then they picked
TR-10 恢复正常。我之前已经试过了。好的，宇航服压力正常。再看一下逆变器。250 是 141 度，150
Ricevuto. Il DELTA sembrava funzionare correttamente. Il tempo di combustione ci è sembrato essere circa 2 secondi più lungo, 517. VGX segnava 95485 quando l'abbiamo ricevuto
Эй, похоже, он довольно хорошо держится, если поставить его вертикально — так, чтобы объек
Et avec ACCEPT, nous allons commenc
还有一样东西——你给我的那件，标价20的—
ठीक है। बहुत बढ़िया। जब आपको फुर्सत मिले, तो आप हमें विकिरण रिपोर्ट दे सकते हैं। हम आपके लिए उपभोग्य सामग्रियों की जानकारी और कुछ अन्य छोटी-मोटी बातें तैयार कर रहे
Джек, похоже, клапан
わかりました。噴射時間はおそらく1分未満です。時間に基づいてカットオフを設定していただきたいので、噴射時間をお伝えします。通信が途絶えた場合に備え、ミッドコース7の
Хорошо
И вот, Игл. Я прочитал адреса 404, 405 и 406
好的，我明白
ठीक है। आगे बढ
아폴로 13호, 휴스턴발 하와이
D'accord. Encore quelques minutes, Jim. Tout semble bien se présenter. Ton séjour à Carnarvon devrait se dérouler comme prévu. Nous n'avons pas encore déterminé avec précis
Nég
А и Б
Roger. As-tu essayé de mettre
ジャック、CB POWER-1、MAIN A を閉じたことはないと思います。POWER-2、MAIN B、および POWER-1、MAIN B を閉じました。どちら
हमें उस ऑक्स
手動操縦です。
コンピュータの電源を入れ
D'accord. Concernant la correction de trajectoire, nous allons la reporter à environ [heure manquante]. Il s'agira d'une combustion d'environ 7,6 m/s (25 pi
Voici un reportage d'Harry Rosenthal, de l'Associated Press de Houston. Deux Pères Noël ont illuminé la veille de Noël du petit Jeffrey Lovell, âgé de deux ans. Le premier a frappé à sa porte et lui a apporté des cadeaux. Le second a ramené son papa sur la Lune. Le premier portait un
D'accord. Vou
حسناً يا جيم. هذا يبد
كيب كاب كوم، تفضل. كيب كاب كوم، هذا سيجما سفن. أسمعك بو
어떻
Roger. Da scheint es eine kleine Unsti
Bonjour Frank. Il semblerait que le capteur de température de sortie du radiateur principal soit défectueux. La tem
7
Hai provato a usare il tuo inter
네. 알겠습니다. 좋습니다. 별
알겠습니다. LMP 이관 직전에, 
نعود
ところで、ヒューストン、Sバンド送信機/受
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 부스터는
नहीं, मुझे देखने दीजिए कि क्या य
Das einzige Problem, Charlie, ist, dass diese Bühnenarbeiter beim Fernsehen nicht wissen
好的。现在我们已经准备好这个袋子了，下一步是准备把红色防护服软管——指挥
わか
Our ECS is still good. It's reading still 50 percent. Looks like we're not even using
चार्ली, एक 
रॉजर, कार्नार
D'accord. Avant de commencer la copie, cette procédure consiste simplement à activer le manomètre à hélium supercritique pour que vous puissiez effectuer la lecture. Le problème est que cette pression d'hélium supercritique n'atteigne pas 1 800 psi d'ici 103 heures, auquel cas nous risquerions de rompre le disque de rupture lors de l'activation. Or, en se basant sur la pression au lancement et sur un temps de montée nominal d'environ 6,5 psi par heure entre ce moment et maintenant, la pression devrait être d'environ 710 psi. Veuillez patienter, 13, jusqu'à ce que nous ayons une meilleure communicat
收到。请稍等。我们会
Roger. Je
Roger. I got you now. I fed in those angles for the S-band, and I couldn't get a lockon; it appears as though the antenna would have to be loo
好的。我看错钟了，现在还差不到10分钟。我9分钟的时候给你打个
नेवादा के रेनो में, एक छोटे लड़के के घर में चिमनी न होने के कारण, उसने स्थानीय अखबार के पते पर सांता क्लॉज़ को पत्र लिखकर कहा, "क्या आप कृपया सामने वाले दरवाजे का इस्तेमाल करेंगे? आपको नीचे से थोड़ा धक्का देना पड़ेगा क्योंकि वह अटकता है।" अर्कांसस के लिटिल रॉक में, क्रिसमस से पहले के सप्ताह और क्रिसमस के दिन तक सेंट विंसेंट इन्फर्मरी में पैदा हुए बच्चों को डिस्चार्ज के समय उनकी माताओं को बड़े-बड़े लाल क्रिसमस मोजों में सौंपा जा रहा है। यहाँ एक उदाहरण सर्वधर्म सहयोग का है। कैलिफोर्निया के इंडियो में, क्रिसमस के दिन पुलिस प्रमुख को एक प्रार्थना पुस्तक दी गई। रब्बी फिलिप एच. वेनबर्ग ने एक दिन के लिए पुलिस प्रमुख का पदभार संभाला ताकि असली पुलिस प्रमुख, होमर हंट, जो एक मेथोडिस्ट हैं, अपने परिवार के साथ छुट्टियाँ बिता सकें। यह लगातार तीसरा क्रिसमस है जब रब्बी ने हंट की जगह ली है। पिछले 6 वर्षों से, रब्बी वेनबर्ग नेवादा के रेनो के रोम
了解しました。T1: 122 + 16 + 05。Tango 2は122 + 21 + 11で、線路から北に6マイルです
Хорошо. Сейчас двое из нас пойдут спать, а один будет присматривать 
奥德赛，休斯顿
روجر. في واشنطن، وافقت لجنة المالية في مجلس الشيوخ على تمديد الضريبة الإضافية على الدخل، لكن يبدو أن تصويت مجلس الشيوخ على مشروع القانون مستبعد حاليًا. في أوستن، رُشِّح عضو مجلس النواب عن ولاية تكساس، راي ليمون، من هيوستن، لمنصب المدير الوطني للجمعية الأمريكية لعلوم المحيطات. وقد اقترح ليمون دراسة إمكانية إنشاء معهد لعلوم المحيطات في تكساس، ليكون أول معهد من نوعه في غرب خليج المكسيك. في مينيابوليس، مينيسوتا، أشار مكتب الأرصاد الجوية، بعد استعراضه لأحوال الطقس اليوم التي تُظهر درجة حرارة عظمى تبلغ 88 درجة فهرنهايت وصغرى تبلغ 72 درجة فهرنهايت، إلى "انعدام تساقط الثلوج". من سانت بطرسبرغ، فلوريدا، ور
听起来不错。好的。我们用模拟设备进行了
روجر، جون. لقد انتهينا للتو من وضع إ
जेरी, क्या आपने इस अगले 
Roger. That's v
1
Bien. Reprenons l'étoile de référence: Dzuba, l'étoile centrale de la tête du Scorpion, se trouve à 060° en bas, 42° à gauche, +0773°, -16500° 12982° 36256°. Les étoiles du nord restent Sirius et Rigel. Roulis: 129°, tangage: 155°, lacet: 010°. Temps de réponse: 15 secondes. L'horizon est aligné sur une
네, 짐. 아직 사진은 없지만, 상단 부분에 있을 겁니다. 아니, 정확히 말하자면 2번 걸쇠의 맨 윗부분, 그리고 상단 부분에 있을 겁니다. 자세에서, 태양을 정면으로 바라보면 커서가 분할될 텐데, 롤 각도는 그렇게 중요하지 않습니다. 10도 정도면 괜찮을 겁니다. 하지만, 제 생각에는 그보다 더 잘할 수 있을 것 같습니다. 31페이지의 "번 테크닉" 부분에서 짐벌이
Roger, Houston. Apollo 11.
Роджер. Мы готовы ввести в эксплуатацию основной во
Okay. What we'
Roger. Quatre boules 6 et quatre boules 1. D'accord. Frank, votre assiette est de 180° de tangage, 315° de lacet et 0,3 degré par seconde de roulis. Si nous voulons l'orienter vers le nord, ce n'est pas parce que nous craignons des changements dus à la purge; d'après nos observations, la purge n'a eu aucun
Okay. Minuspol an Batterie Bravo. Das ist 
I, incidentl
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 객실을 따뜻하게 하는 두 가지 방법을 알려드리겠습니다. 첫 번째 방법은 혼자서도 할 수 있는데, 객실 팬 하나 또는 두 개를 모두 켜고 객실 열교환기를 최대 온도로 가동하는 것입니다. 하지만 이 방법은 시간이 꽤 오래 걸리고, 난방 효과도 크지 않을 겁니다. 두 번째 방법은 혼합 밸브를 이용해 라디에이터 출력 온도를 조절하는 
Apollo 8, da Houston a 
没错。吉姆，另外，我们大致估算了一下飞
了解しま
Roger. Wir werden unsere Antennen in 
Ok, Fred. E ora sei forte e chiaro qui sotto. Ok. Stiamo preparando una procedura per te: un controllo del Sole a circa 74 ore o poco più di 3 ore. Sarà un arresto 2; a breve pubblicheremo una procedura dettagliata che includerà una riassegnazione del radar di rendezvous per toglierlo di mezzo e una manovra per l'assetto. Riteniamo che se il controllo avviene entro 1 grado, la tua piattaforma sarà a posto per l'accensione senza una successiva. Se non avviene entro 1 grado, stiamo elaborando una procedura di allineamento Terra/Sole per allineare la piattaforma, e te la comunicheremo più tardi. Ok. Supponendo che il controllo del Sole sia a posto, ti daremo una stella per un controllo di affida
Okay. As I understand that the reason for this procedure is to bring the and 
هذه هي الصداقة السابعة. لا أجد أي مشكلة في السيطرة على الأفق. 
Okay. Wir bereiten uns auf den Schichtwechsel vor, und ich wollte vorher noch ein paar Punkte ansprechen. Die Windgeschwindigkeit beträgt anscheinend maximal 0,3 Fuß pro Sekunde, daher wird es für Mittelkurs 6 keinen Brennvorgang geben. Mittelkurs 7 ist
やあ、アミーゴス、メキシコとグアイマスの特別な友人たちを祝ってください。 Desde el espacio e
Columbia, this is Houston. The best we can do o
而复古加热器，复古包装的温度大约是 74 度，而且几乎一直保持在这个温
...nuvole. Sembrano strati, ma hanno sicuramente un effetto moderato. Chissà se tutt
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. إذا 
ठीक है, जिम। हमें यह समस्या रुक-रुक कर आ रही है। हमें लगता है कि अगर आप पैनल 16 प
يمكننا رؤيته إذا نظرنا 
Una navi
J
わかりました。二次ループチェックで二次ラジエーターのF
好的。您在“接受”选项中已确认。这是更新后的着陆点 RESFMMA
Ihre Sprach
حسنًا، إنه ليس مريحًا على الإطلاق. هذا الراديو يُرسل إشاراته إلى الخوذة الأخرى، ويمكن
Apollo 11, hier sp
Jack, vos régulateurs de cabine sont encore en train
Dan
我々は―
아직 전기가 
Roger. We're not getting hot if that
بالتأكيد، يسعدني ذلك. يمكنني العودة وإعادة كل شيء واختيار نجو
Gemini 4, this is Houston CAP COM. I'm not receiving you. I'll broadcast the last two items of
Esatto. Fai riferimento a S/2-6. Questo - In realtà, Jack, quello di cui stiamo parlando è l'adesivo di c
برج الجوزاء 4، هيوست
Irgendwas stimmt mit unserer Brenneinstellung nicht. Wir bekommen nicht die richtigen Messwerte vom Ball, obwohl die Nadeln zentriert sind. Ich bin mir nicht sicher, wo
Вы хотите вернуться в 229-й и
それはダメですね。蒸気口の
रॉजर। हर बार ज
D'accord. Je vais fermer une vanne de débit de combinaison à 
11, Хьюстон. Теперь на звездной карте все гораздо лучше. Мы можем различить плоскость эклиптики, планеты, Солнце и Луну, а также их перемещения в различных точках плос
रॉजर, ये फ्रेंडशिप से
Verstanden. Sieht so aus,
Jim, it's been a little warm in the machi
没关系，万斯。除非是严重的事情，否则你不
好的。
引き続き必要な項目は、最終収納前に都合の良いタイミングでで
자,
حسناً يا فانس، أن
حسنًا. في اللوحة 3: جهاز الإرسال والاستقبال إلى الوضع الأساسي؛ مضخم الطاقة إلى الوضع الأساسي؛ مضخم الطاقة، عالي؛ الوضع، الصوت، إلى إيقاف التشغيل؛ الطاقة، إلى الوضع العادي؛ مشغل الوسائط المحمول إلى الوضع العادي؛ هوائي النطاق S، متعدد الاتجاهات D، D كما في
Bene. Su Power 6, pannello 11 - Le prime tre righe, configurale c
이 VGX 열에는 무엇이 들어가야
Oh, ci stiamo arrivando, Jim. Siamo tutti d'accordo che sei quasi, ma non del tutto, nella giusta posizione, e stiamo solo cercando di darti
没错。姿态：横滚0度，偏航2度（右），俯仰-33度。所有速率均为零。我目前处于工作状态。时钟仍设置为返航时间，逆行时间为04+32+28。我从百
了解しました。進入PADはMIDPAC領域：359 153 001 194 46 03 267、プラス1102、マイナス17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28。DLとVLは4つとも適用されません。DOは4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380。ボアサイト星は蠍座シータ、上314、右34、揚力ベクトルは上。コメント：進入データは中間軌道操作なしを前提としています。地球進入：マイナス30分。地平線確認、194プラス33プラス03。ピッチは297。これは進入を前提としています。位置合わせの星はデネブとベガです。ロール、ピッチ、ヨー、078、233、340。復唱。以
알겠습니다, 잭. 49시간째에 그들이 당신에게 부탁하는 것은 광학축 각도에서 약 0.2도 정도의 미세한 떨림이 관찰되었다는 것입니다. 광학축 영점 위치에서 벗어나기 전에, 이
ठीक है। मुख्य शीर्षक, "प्रवेश, एलएम तैयारी, 6 घंटे पहले।" सबसे पहले, बैट 5 सामान्य फ़ीड, चालू; दूसरा, संशोधित /, 30 मिनट की सक्रियण चेकलिस्ट का उपयोग करें। अगला, 5 घंटे पहले, -7, यदि आवश्यक हो। अब, हमारे पास एक पूर
और मैंने स्प्लैश कर्टन लगाया, नेक डैम लगाया, केबिन एयर रीसर्कुलेशन हैंडल ऊपर किया। बाएँ स्नोर्कल का हैंडल 
Okay, wir lassen es j
रॉजर। बिल के लिए - रिकॉर्डिंग के पिछले हिस्से पर आवाज़ की गुणवत्ता ब
Ils travaillent sur la valve de 
Хьюстонская сеть, это Хонисакл ч
Jim, Roger. Nous venons de calculer un temps de manœuvre d'environ 15 
Nous sommes en train de mettre en place une procédure concernant votre attitude, Jim. Dans le cas d'une absence de communication, elle pourra
ठीक है। यहाँ हमें कुछ संचार जाँच करनी है। हम पाँच अलग-अलग मोड में स्विच करेंगे, और उनमें से केवल एक ही आपकी गतिविधियों को बाधित करेगा
알겠습니다. 아래 "GUIDANCE CONTROL"의 세 번째 단계를 "MODE CONTROL"로 변경하고, 두 단계 모두 "
रॉजर। युवा अंतरिक्ष यात्री ने बारिश के लिए नृत
Apollo 11, Houston. Radio check on a
好了，
Хор
في رينو، نيفادا، ولأن منزله يفتقر إلى مدفأة، كتب طفل صغير إلى بابا نويل عبر الصحيفة المحلية مقترحًا: "هل يمكنك استخدام الباب الأمامي؟ ستحتاج إلى ركله قليلًا من الأسفل لأنه عالق". وفي ليتل روك، أركنساس، يُسلّم الأطفال المولودون في مستشفى سانت فنسنت خلال الأسبوع الذي يسبق عيد الميلاد وحتى يوم عيد الميلاد إلى أمهاتهم عند خروجهم من المستشفى وهم ير
D'accord, Joe. Fred a sorti la cartouche s
Для анализа этих снимков мы снимаем в 4 часа. Мы снимаем на фоне океана и облаков. Похоже, что на них изображены кучевые облака с характерными перистыми облаками сверху. Я делаю довольно много снимк
双子座4
Да. Это довольно громоздкое устройство, удерживающее эти шланги. И этот инженер-ко
Vraiment? Je peux voir les pulsati
Хорошо. В конце процедуры, после шагов BAT 5 и 6, ВЫКЛ., добавьте следующее: автоматические выключатели, панели - панели 11 и 16, ASCENT ECA CONTROL, оба разомкнут
Roger. Bien reçu. Je regarde dans la salle de visionnage. 
好的。我在 F2-22 单元格的 Lima 列中，第 6 项为 00001；第 7 项为 
Okay, Jack, ora sto guardando fuori dalla finestra giusta, e non troppo lontano, puoi vedere l'obiettivo, e lo ingrandirò un 
روجر. جهد البطارية: الرئيسية 24
짐, 
Это совершенно верн
D'accord. Pour ceux qui ne le savent pas, c'est ici que nous enregistrons la plupart de nos données pour chaque manœuvre. Nous avons une autre 
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Мы прямо сейчас отправляем снимо
아, 네, 물
네, 맞습니다. 다만 250번 패널의 두 번째 회로 차단기(CB BAT Char
Роджер. Полагаю, мы поняли, что на глубине до 3 дюймов мы не наткнулись на твердое дно, и на этой глубине не про
That's affirmed, Jim. We have you up to 10.6 now, and we're willing to go a little higher on that. We have another cartridge and we have a procedure for making the 
Oui, à Dallas, on pleure. Côté basket: Houston n'a pas brillé ce week-end. L'Illinois a battu Houston 97 à 84. Et la Caroline du Nord a vaincu les Owls sur le score de 85 à 77. Frank, 
حسنًا يا فريد، صوتك واضح تمامًا هنا الآن. حسنًا. ما نُجهّزه لك هو إجراء فحص للشمس بعد حوالي 74 ساعة، أي بعد ما يزيد قليلًا عن 3 ساعات. سيكون هذا بمثابة نقطة توقف ثانية؛ سنُعلن عن إجراء مُفصّل قريبًا، وسيتضمن إعادة توجيه رادار الالتقاء لتجاوز هذه العقبة، ومناورة لضبط الوضعية. نعتقد أنه إذا كان هذا الفحص ضمن درجة واحدة، فسيكون منصتك جاهزة للاحتراق دون الحاجة إلى إجراء لاحق. أما إذا لم يكن ضمن درجة واحدة
أبولو 8، أبولو 8، هيوستن. فهمنا رسالتك بوضوح. لقد راجعنا مشكلة كمية المياه الصالحة للشرب لديك، ويب
फिर से, आप क्या चा
मॉनिटर पर ए
Apollo 11, Houston. Per quanto riguarda le tendine oscuranti, non servono a nulla se non per il comfort dell'equipaggio. Non credo che ab
Oui. Maintenant que nous savons où se trouve (illisible), ce sera beaucoup plus facile la prochaine fois. La première fois que nous avons cherché Le Caire – Le Caire et Alexandrie –, nous avons longtemps cherché (illisible). Je n'ai pas vraiment vu l'aérodrome. J'ai juste aperçu les environs. Je me suis dit qu'en pointant correctement l'appareil photo, j'aurais une photo du Caire. Mais cette fois, j'ai réussi à repérer l'aérodrome. Pareil pour Alexandrie. Je pense que si vous voulez photographier un endroit comme celui-ci, il serait judicieux de le survoler une première fois, de bien l'observer et de prendre les photos la f
わかりました。パネル4：TELCOMM、グループ1、AC1へ。次の回路ブレーカーを閉じます：、グループ1を押してメインB；、グループ2を押してメインB；、TEMP、メインB；、セカンダリーループトランスデューサー、メインB；RAD、コントロール/ヒーター、メインB；BATリレーバス、BAT B；BATチャージャー、BAT B、チャージ - またはBへ、チャージ；インバーターコントロール、2；インバー
了解。フライトプランの更新の準備はできてい
D'accord. On est toujou
Okay. Es gibt heute Morgen nicht viel Neues in den Nachrichten. Es ist ziemlich ruhig. Die wichtigste Nachricht betrifft wohl die Unfallzahlen – die Todesfälle an den Feiertagen –, was natürlich keine erfreuliche Nachricht ist. Landesweit kamen 233 Menschen ums Leben, neun davon in Houston am Heiligabend und an Weihnachten. In den Weltnachrichten sorgten die Familien erneut für Aufsehen. Nordkorea veröffentlichte diese Woche eine Weihnachtsbotschaft der Apollo-8-Besatzung an Kommandant Lloyd Bucher, Kapitän der USS Pueblo. Die an Kommandant und Frau Bucher im Marinekrankenhaus von San Diego adressierte Nachricht lautete: „Wir haben an Sie gedacht und für Sie gebetet. Ihre Wiedervereinigung hat uns an di
Хорошо. Всё верно. Теперь вы можете вернуться к тому моменту, 
आपको सूचित किया जाता है कि लग
No. Non mi interessa nulla. Beh, se è fastidioso, lasciami fare. Posso rimediare se lo è... controllo dell
I'm glad. Th
알겠
罗杰。30，SPS/G&N：36691，减 061，加 066 135 23 4156，加 32011，加 06 818，减 02650，181 054 014；远地点 NA，加 00230 32836 228 32628 42 1511 357，NA 三线，加 1103，减 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52，天津四和织女星，242 172 012，两台喷气式飞机的空隙，16 秒，窗外地平线，10 度，TIG - 2 分钟，六分仪星位于 
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हमारा संचार परीक्षण पूरा हो गया है। आपके सहयोग के लिए धन्यवाद। और यहाँ नेविगेशन अवलोकन में कुछ बदलाव हैं जो आगे आएंगे। और हम आपके तार
قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية مغلق وفي وضع التشغيل. هل يمكنك ت
Et Boothill, Duke Island, Sidewinder, en regardant Maskelyne W, c'est le point de contrôle du lace
はい、少し緑色が見えます。太陽の反射だと思います。さあ、彼らがやって来ます。3人です
यह मिथुन राशि 
Ok, Fred. Ho qualche parola per te su alcune cose che vogliamo fare nelle prossime ore, e per ottenere una buona COMM per questo e anche per darti qualche minuto di intervallo, vorrei che tu mettessi l'interruttore del circuito dell'AMPLIFICATORE DI POTENZ
On your next pass, Columbia, rather than performing a as such, we would like you to look in the vicinity of the coordinates that we gave you, which is our best analysis based on map physics and the trajectory, and we also have an
Le cratère que vous apercevez à l'horizon
한 시간 전에 일어났다고 하셨는데, 몇 시에 잠자
روجر. هل يمكنك تقديم أي تقدير حول نسبة نص
정말 감사합니다. 네, 수치를 읽어 드리겠습니다. 이륙 당시 GMT는 17시 16분이었습니다. 추진제량은 60이었고, 객실 온도는 92도, 우주복 온도는 58도, 객실 압력은 5.6psi였습니다. 우주복 이산화탄소 농도는 0
네, 맞습니다. 일단 정렬이 완료되고 시간 조정이 끝나면, 여기 계신 분들이 서비스 모듈 분리 자세와 사령선 모듈 정렬 자세에 대한 8볼 자세 데이터를 제공해 주실 수 있을 겁니다. 사령선 모듈 정렬은 달/태양과
저쪽 좀 보세요! 고이득 안테나 바로 옆 패널 전체가 완전히 날아갔어요. 바닥부터 엔진까
... 47+00のG.E.T.を削除。翻訳2-アルファ。ホライズンスキャンモード設定の確認、およびホラ
Okay. Feld 5: CB BAT CHARGE
حسناً. سأنفصل عن المركبة الفضا
अच्छा, एक COAS (धूल से बचाने वाला आवरण) ह
대량 샘플에서 깊이에 따른 변화를 살펴보던 지역에서는 최대 3인치까지 파낼 수 있었습니다. 실제로 큰 차이는
いいえ。H2パージラ
Роджер. Мы тоже об этом думаем, и одна проблема в том, что COMM надежно подключен к шлангу, поэтому
パワーダウン（判読不能）状態でも、まだ 11 アンペア弱しか消費していないようです。1 番機では 10 アンペア、2 番機では 11 アンペア弱です。テザー、つまり外側のハッチにあるテザーもしくは臍帯拘束具の位置のせいで、宇宙船前方での自由テザーの空気力学的制約による船外活動（EVA）作業はかなり困難でした。そのエリアで作業している時はいつでも、テザーが端に達すると私は引き戻され、その反動で宇宙船上方、アダプター セクションの方へ運ばれていました。そのため、窓の上方で操縦している間、私は視界から消え、その後宇宙船後方へと戻されていました。宇宙船の前部に出るために、私は絶えず自分自身を引き上げ続けなければなりませんでした。私は自分が撮っている写真に満足していませんでした。装着していたランヤードを固定するのはかなり困難でした。銃に装着していたランヤード、私が繋いでいたテザーとアンビリカルケーブル、その他様々なランヤードがぶらぶらと揺れていて、カメラの前に入らないようにするのが大変でした。写真では腕を素早く動かしているのがお分かりいただけると思います。写真を撮るために、腕をどかそうと何度も試みました。腕が目の前にあったのはおそらく50～60%くらいで、残りの時間は思ったほど良い位置にいられませんでした。おそらく12枚ほど写真を撮ったと思います。テザーが外に出ているだけでも、操作はかなり簡単そうです。宇宙船に
평가. 자, 그럼 플랫
ठीक है। बीच में सुधार संख्या 7, /: 31600, लागू नहीं, लागू नहीं,, माइनस 00014, प्लस पाँच शून्य, प
ट्रैंक्विलिटी, ह्यूस्टन। यहाँ पहला प्रश्न यह है कि उड़ान पूर्व योजना की तुलना में यॉ के बारे में आपका स
罗杰。这就是我们想要的。我们想待在狭窄的航线
ヴァンス、私はロールとヨー、いや、むしろロールとピッチを得るために、MINIMUM IMPULSE 姿勢制御のみを使おうとしていました。しかし、この構成では姿勢制御のみでは、思い通りにロールを制御できません。ロー
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. القيم المحسوبة من الأرض لعمودك ومحورك هي بالضبط ما يظهر لك يا مايك. يبدو لك الأفق مائلاً - يبدو أنك غير متوازن في الدوران لأن الزوايا التي أعطي
حسناً. يجب أن يكون مضبوطاً 
ونقطة إضافية؛ أعتقد أن هذا السؤال موجه إلى جاك. هل لدينا أي فكرة عن سبب عدم تمكننا من قرا
カプセルの経過
좋습니다. 컴퓨터 연결이 완료되었고 확인되었습니다. BLOCK으로 이동하시면 약 45초 후에 여기에 접속하실 수 있습니다. 일단 시작하겠습니다. 시간 기준 6P 24136, 롤 179, 피치 045, 요 001, 연소 시간 5 + 15, DELTA-VC 프라임 105 196 VI 35569, 롤 357, 피치 091, 10분 추가,
रॉजर।
नहीं। मैं बता सकता हूँ कि यह लुढ़क रहा है; मुझे लगता है कि इसका सपाट हिस्सा न केवल मेरी ओर है, बल्कि यह बहुत अधिक चमकदार भी है, और इसका आकार भी
T
Хорошо, если
わかりました。1に窒素、2に酸素ですね
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir überwachen die Temperaturen. Die Quadcopter sehen alle gut aus. Wir werden dies weiterhin tun und erwarten währe
Okay. I've got one side hooked up to the second box and I've
Tranquillità. Ricevuto. Per noi va bene, e diamo
Роджер. Похоже, датчик давления на кислородном датчике вышел из строя. Вероятно, вам лучше перевести нагреватель кислородного датчика из автом
Роджер, Брюс. Спасибо. Мы
还有，Vance，我想应该也提到过我们还有两支额外的备用弹
对于
阿波
这里是西格玛七号。我们不进行发射机演习。我读的是1 2 3 4 5 5 4 3 2 1。西格玛七号。完
로저. 손잡이를 앞뒤로 당기면 돌아가는 기어가 두 개
好的
On that first measurement I made I really didn't - I think the air glow starts down below - a little bit below
네. 우선,
是的，
Très bien. Et le dernier que j'ai pour vous se trou
分かりました。分離前にセ
Ricevut
好
13، نطلب منك وضع قواطع الدائرة الكهربائية POWER AMPL حتى نتمكن من إلقاء نظرة
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous vous recommandons d'accepter l'affich
わかりました。「押す」の下の最初の行を消して、「DESCENT HELIUM REG、talkback to barbe
好的。我数到了1、
로저. 폐수는 뒷면에 10% 정도 남겨두세요
एड का मानना ​​है कि आपको... 20 डिग्री से अधिक के कोणों
राहत क्षेत्र में मौसम अच्छा है। आसमान में घने बादल छाए हुए हैं; लहरें 3 फुट ऊंची हैं; हवा की गति 8 नॉट है; दृश्यता 10 मील है; और बादलों का आधार 1,000 फुट की ऊंचाई पर 
هيوستن، قاعدة ترانكويليتي. هل لديك وزن محدّث لنا؟ انتهى
Sta uscendo dalla finestra 1, propri
IV
好的。接
जो, यह बिल्कुल वैसा ही दिख र
ठीक है, और कमांडर की खिड़की पर छाया डालने के लिए सर्विस मॉड्यूल का उपयोग करने के बारे में क्या 
了解
Sigma Seven, ici Indian Com Tech. Je vous reçois parfaitement. En attente de l'arrivée d'Indian Cap Com. Termi
جيم، لقد جُرِّب هذا في جهاز المحاكاة من قِبَل تشارلي وآخرين، وما يوصون به هو أن تُصفِّر معدلات الخطأ على مؤشرات الخطأ حتى لا ترى أي حركة على الإطلاق، ثم تنتظر دقيقتين إضافيتين، وهذا يكفي. هذه هي الطريقة الوحيدة التي يمكننا م
好的，让我来拿
ヒューストンさん、『アポロ13号』を読
分かりました。ここで考えているのは、搭載されているカメラ用レンズのいくつかを見て、そのどれかを使って光をある
Roger. Al momento non
こんにちはハワイ、受け取りまし
你为什么不把另一根软管接回隧道里，让吉姆也能呼吸一下
아니요. 입술에 땀방울이 맺혔을 뿐이에요. 그게 다
Oui, ce foutu « 1 » dans cet ordinateur, vous savez… l’angle de rotation, il est là; le delta-V, il est là; les angles, il est là. Il est probab
Хорошо. И это происходит с об
Questo pad di si
Roger, wir arbeiten jetzt die meiste Zeit mit einer minimalen Energiesparkonfiguration, und wenn Sie uns anrufen, gibt es normalerweise eine kleine Verzögerung bei unserer
Bien. Notre manœuvre est terminée, et dans cette position, la ligne M est exactement déphasée de 90 degrés. Elle est pointée exactement le long du vecteur vers le centre de la Terre au lieu d'être para
Ruhe, Houston. W
أبولو 11، هذه هيوستن. لقد استعدنا للتو بيانات القياس عن 
درجة حرارة المقصورة وتدفق المياه فيها متوقفان تمامًا، ويتراجعان الآن إلى حوالي 7.5، أي أقل 
Ça ne sembl
Roger. That was good. You can keep it coming do
Okay. And in - in 
أنا دائماً على ما
フリーダムセブン、こちらはインディアン・カプ・コムです、聞こえ
It looks like in our power-down (illegible) we're still pulling just a little less than 11 amps. We've got 10 on no. 1 and a little less than 11 on no. 2. The tether - the location of the tether or the umbilical restraint on the outside hatch made it rather difficult to do any EVA work as far as free tether aerodynamics out in front of the spacecraft. Whenever I'd be operating out in that area, the tether would - when it would come to its end would start me back and the reaction would carry me back up towards the - over the spacecraft and back toward the adapter section. That's why I kept going out of sight during my maneuvering out there up above the windows, and then drifting back toward the back of the spacecraft. I continually had to keep pulling myself to get out in the front part of the spacecraft. I wasn't satisfied with the pictures that I was getting. It was rat
Bene, Mattingly mi ha assic
今、星を眺めています。まだ明るいですが、完全に暗いわけではありません。窓にフィルターがかかっていて、小さな等級の星をカットしているようです。北斗七星からアークトゥルスまで見渡しています。今見ているのは主に2等星から3等星くらいです。小さな星は今のところ、画面からかなりきれいにカットされています。夜が更けていくにつれて、もっと多くの星が見えてくると思いますが、晴れた夜に飛行機で高度4万フィートを飛んでいるときほど
好的。我重新读了一遍：监测二次蓄压器液位；二次乙二醇散热器阀，正常模式保持30秒，然后切换至旁通模式。如果二次蓄压器液位没有下降，则将二次乙二醇散热器阀切换至正常模式。二次冷却液循环泵，AC 1 或 2。3分钟后，确认二次乙二醇排放压力在39至51 psig之间。确认二次蒸发器出口温度是否发生变化。关闭二次冷却液循环泵。将二
هيوستن، لقد مررنا بوحدة الخدمة. إنها مرتفعة قليلاً ومائلة قلي
Hier spricht Apollo 8. Können
尤里·阿列克
आगे बढ
Колумбия, Хьюстон. При координатах широты/долготы более двух, обновите информацию о местоположении.
अभी सिर
还剩20秒，剩
Хорошо
Показания прибора составляют примерно 25,5, а 
Sì, ha una deriva casuale. Non c'è alcuna oscillazione che io possa prevedere. La... la linea che porta al palloncino a volte è tesa; a volte è lenta... abbastanza lenta da formare degli anelli. Il suo... il suo comportamento è del tutto casuale, per quanto ne so. Anche il palloncino non è gonfiato bene. Ha una forma oblunga, piuttosto che rotonda; e credo
알겠습니다. 자이로 토크 각도는 +0.03.30이고, Y는 +0.023입니다. Y 값은 네 자리 숫자밖에 없으니 다시 한번 말씀해 주시겠어요? Z는 -0.15.10입니다. Y 값을 다시 
Try the green filter. See if you don't feel it makes a mo
만약 이게 별로
Кол
ठीक है, बिल। इससे पहले कि हम यहाँ बड़ा अपडेट पढ़ें, मैं जिम को संक्षेप में एक प्रक्रिया बताना चाहूँगा। जब वह होश में आए, तो हम उससे ENTER दबाने का अनुरोध करते हैं। आगे न बढ़ें, और ऐसा करने से वह अपने निशान से अक्षांश और देशांतर शामिल नहीं करेगा, और लैंडिंग साइट का संदर्भ मान नहीं बदलेगा, और हम इस ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स समस्या को हल कर ले
هذا صحيح. حسناً. في اللوح
最近月を眺め
同じ地域に住む皆様にも、心からご挨拶申し上げます。私たちが二つの半球で繋がっているという事実は、今日でも、互いの国の上空を飛行しながら、私たちが同じ存在であることを実感できることからも明ら
Nein, das stimmt nicht, Fred. Wir 
RKV，说的是 MSC-2 和 -3 之后的所有情
아, 다시 20
Il
Jack, as luck would have it, we just now st
Ну, тогд
자, 다음 페이지 16입니다. 이것은 태양 코로나 관련 내용의 연속입니다. 페이지 오른쪽, 107:40 바로
Роджер, Базз. Кажется, я понял. Вы указываете на небольшую разницу между двумя образцами и на то, что в каждом случае вам удавалось забить стержни примерно на 2 дюйма без проблем, а затем приходилось довольно энергично бить молотком, чтобы забить их на общую глу
أعتقد أنه سيكون من الصعب للغاية استقراء أي شيء تحصل عليه من هذا العمل الجزئي إلى مجموعة وحدة القيادة، لأن المركبة الفضائية تتعامل بشكل مختلف تمامًا بمجرد تغيير حمولة الوقود، بما في ذلك الاختلاف في الانجرا
好的，迈克，事情是这样的——你知道，你当时坐在那里监控，在步骤 7，你进入了 NOUN 01，输入了地址，然后是 INFORMATION INFORMATION；在你最后一次按下回车键（35400 ENTER）之后，它就把你带回了步骤 16。然后当你按下回车键时，你实际上是在向实际的 CDU 输入信息；当你把这两个条目输入到寄存器 1 和 
Roger, capisci? Nessun controllo di assetto. Vuoi 
Ok, 11. Sembra che le prestazioni del motore durante entrambe le accensioni di questa missione siano state le stesse dei test di accettazione del motore. La lettura del PC di bordo è dovuta a un fattore di calibrazione noto tra ciò che si ha effettivamente nella camera e ciò che si legge sul manometro. Ci aspettiamo che il funzionamento a bancata singola sia di 90, ovvero 90 psi sul manometro con una pressione effettiva nella camera di 95 psi. Nel funzionamento a bancata doppia, la pressione nella camera è di 94 psi sul manometro con una pressione effettiva di 99 psi. 80 psi sul manometro di bordo corrispondono a 83 psi effettivi. E consigliamo di attenersi a un segnale di terminazion
了解。ボアサイト星の話に戻りますが、蠍座の頭の中心星は老ズバです。下060、左42、プラス0773、マイナス16500、12982、36256です。北極星はシリウスとリゲルのままです。ロール129、ピッチ155、ヨー010。四分円のアレージは15秒、地平線は4度の線上にあ
Roger. Understand. 10 ft/
Roger. I've been having a cycling on and off of the requirements of the RCS heater. The first one was 47, and I put the heater on and the light was 54. That was ring A. Ring B 05. It took 5 minutes to 20, and it also took 5 minutes to extinguish it. Ring B came on at 37 and it took 5 minutes, and Ring A came on at 50, and it took 5 minutes. They look like pretty good readings. The temperature on the - the temperatures are down 
आप उम्मीद कर सकते हैं 
收到。5 SPS/G&N：37201，减 060，加 047 086 09 3666，加 33521，
Okay. Verstanden. Er soll bitte die Stromstärke überprüfen; sehen Sie nach, was Sie jetzt haben, und geben Sie uns bitte auch einen Spannungswert 
罗杰。Cape 建议您将驱动器开关置于 S
Charlie, mi dispiace, continui a interromperti. Abbiamo sentito fino a "puoi fare qualsiasi cosa", e 
Сейчас прямо п
Sì, sai che è stato un trucco intelligente da parte nostr
了解
Warum machst du dir darüb
Okay, Joe. And while you're doing that I've got a ques
Roger. La nostra cabina ha
Roger, I have a couple of questions for you. First, ab
हाँ, मुझे हाल ही में मिले अपडेट से खुशी है, खासकर हमारे स्टेट वेक्टर पर इसके प्रभाव से। फिर भी, विभिन्न प्रक्रियाओं से मैं पूरी तरह संतुष्ट नहीं हूँ। अगर हम ट्रनियन कोणों की छोटी रेंज में तारों का चयन कर सकें, जिससे तारा अपनी मर्जी से उस उपतारकीय बिंदु तक जा सके और फिर वह तारा दिखाई दे, तो मुझे लगता है कि यह
D'accord, Joe. Du point de vue de la plomberie, je ne pense pas qu'
好了，杰克。现在你
Хорошо. Отвечая на ваш вопрос, Джо, нет. Я постоянно проверял каюту. Качественно, когда мы перешли на эту конфигурацию, не похоже, что частота или шум вентилятора скафандра
バッテリーは全て23.5ボルト以上を示しており、電流計は20アン
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Si consiglia
알겠습니다. 남은 비행 시간 동안 켜
Et en dessous de moi? Vous le voyez n'imp
スキャナーのライトがまた点灯しまし
...पुनः प्
حسنًا يا فانس. لقد اكتشفنا بعض الأشياء لتعديل الخرطوشة. أولها كيس الغبار الخاص الذي كنا سنستخدمه على حقائ
Okay. Ich bin wieder bei meiner alten Einstellung und warte ab, bis sich die Kurse wieder normalisieren. Geben Sie mir Bescheid, wenn wir wieder stabil sind
और वह पुराना सवाल जो हमसे हमेशा पूछा जाता है कि हम
Чарли, с об
私のマークでは、G.m.t. は 1
Roger, Buzz. C'est une entrée PAD, MPL, commençant par le rouleau 05, 35 - correction - 359 152 001. 19
50 - 
रॉजर। क्या टीवी कैमरा प्लस X अक्ष 
好的，Fred-o。好的。这是“录入，准备”。从倒计时6小时开始。到时候，你启动ACS系统。
Die gesamte Oberfläche ist deutl
我们现在没有推进器，所以没法给你拍照
로저입니다. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 야간 수평선 
D'accord. T
حسنًا. تُذكر أبولو 11 في صلوات الكنائس حول العالم اليوم. كما خُصصت صلاة الرئيس نيكسون في البيت الأبيض لهذه المهمة، ولا يزال رائد الفضاء فرانك بورمان يُلقي كلمته وسيقرأ المقطع من سفر التكوين الذي قُرئ على متن أبولو 8 في عيد الميلاد الماضي. وقد دُعي أعضاء مجلس 
Roger. Juste un petit rappel: n’oubliez pas de remettre à zéro les erreurs avant d’a
イー
روجر. عدنا إلى الوضع التلقائي، ودرجة الحرارة 29 
Повторите ещё раз. Мы в REACQ - AUTO R
제가 어떻게 하는지 설명해 드리겠습니다. 플라이 바이 와이어를 선택합니다. 자이로스코프를 케이지에 
Роджер. И доброе утро, Джерри, или добрый день, или как
Le chauffage RCS s'arr
아주 분명하게 들립니다. 마지막 교신에서 
Роджер. У меня наблюдается небольшое отклонение по оси рыскания, примерно полградуса в секунду. Я, естественно, одновременно веду запись и передач
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। हमा
رو
네, 그렇습니다. 자세: 롤 0도, 요 2도 우측, 피치 -33도. 모든 수치가 0을 나타내고 있습니다. 현재 작동 중입니다. 시계는 여전히 복귀 시간으로 설정되어 있으며, 역행 시간은 04 + 32 + 28입니다. 버뮤다에서 역행 시간 정보는 정확합니다. 객실 압력은 5.7로 안정적으로 유지되고 있습니다. 객실 온도는 90도입니다. 상대 습도는 30%입니다. 냉매량은 68%입니다. 우주복 내부 온도는 65도입니다. 우주복 압력은 5.8을 나타내고 있습니다. 우주복 증기 온도는 60도입니다. 매우 편안합니다. 하지만 아직 출력을 낮추고 싶
ठीक है। असल में, इससे आपको टनल और केबिन के बीच 3 psi के डेल्टा-पी के साथ टनल प्रेशर इंटीग्रिटी या हैच प्रेशर इंटीग्रिटी की जांच करने का मौका मिलता है। फिर आप इसे बाहर निक
حسناً. سنمضي قدماً في فحص دواسة الوقود... تأ
Да, я это заметил. Раньше он поддерживал более низкий уровень; он был аномально низким. Я чуть было не спросил их об этом во время разгона, но потом решил, что хватит уже. Черт, через эту оптику будет трудно что-либо разглядет
هيوستن، هذه أبولو 8. هل اتصلتم؟ لق
Roger. I
로저, 화이트는 술을 꽤 많이 마시고 있어. 난 이제 막 둘째 날 두 번째 식사를 시작하려는 참이고
और अंतिम चरण, 7, यदि कोई समस्या उत्पन्न 
Бедный старый LM загрязнен; он весь покрыт частицами мочи; и, судя по тому, как здесь светит свет, они выглядят желтыми. Знаете, эти маленькие – я думаю, он, вероятно, немного – твердые, потому что все остальное испарилось
Хор
Hé, ça a l'air bon, Jerry - un bon vieux rôti de bœu
Bene. Procediamo al passaggio 1, correzione, pagina 3,
Au re
Хорошо. Нам еще нужно обсудить два подхода, которые мы будем использовать, чтобы справиться с запотевшим центральным стеклом. Когда будет удобно, 
嗨，
That was POWER to 
알겠습니다. 제가 
Roger. You're five-by, Mike. We'd like the OMNI configuration as follows. OMNI Alfa place in Bravo, OMNI to OMNI, high-gain track to MANUAL, high-gain yaw 270
Хорошо. Сначала вопрос. Вы планируете сегод
そうですね、
Roger. Tu vois? Là-bas, dans le coin gauche, il y a un grand carré qui dit A
I'll tell you, Deke, it's cold up in t
好的，水瓶座。你距离地球15万英里，速度
알겠습니다. 제가 여기서부터 설명드리겠습니다. 12페이지에서는 업데이트, 벡터 몇 개, 그리고 "활성화 및 자체 테스트"
알겠습니다. 전원을 끄신 후에는 시간당 3.2~2.7파운드의 물이 소모될 것으로 예상됩니다. 이는 시간당 14암페어의 전기 사용량을 기준으로 한 것입니다. 참고로, 여기서 말하는 '사용 가능한 물'은
Okay. We'll keep an ey
另一则本地新闻：亨茨维尔县法院大楼昨天黎明前被烧毁，看来他们又要在那里开工建设了。接下来是一些关于等待返程的家庭的报道。这篇报道由《邮报》记者安·詹姆斯撰写。“我们就像在月球背面休息一样，”瓦莱丽·安德斯在圣诞夜说道，当时她和家人正在等待阿波罗8号脱离月球轨道，返回地球。安德斯太太周二凌晨0点就到了，邻居们刚刚把孩子们都接走，这样在飞船飞到月球背面、与外界失去联系期间，他们一家人就可以休息一下。弗兰克·博尔曼上校的家在户外装饰着四个巨大的常青花环，上面撒满了粉状的雪花，还系着红色的蝴蝶结。书房里的一棵圣诞树正等待着他平安归来，他漂亮的金色头发的妻子苏和两个健壮的儿子弗雷德里克和埃德温计划留在家里，等待午夜时分飞船脱离月球轨道。通常情况下，他们会去圣克里斯托弗圣公会教堂参加午夜弥撒。计划是凌晨0点开始。由于博尔曼家没有小孩，所以圣诞礼物交换只能等到博尔曼上校带着他那份神奇的节日礼物——登月往返之旅
И, Джим, Х
Affermativo. Frank, sposta la telecamera verso destra; voglio vedere in che direzione si muove la Terra sullo schermo
Understa
Да, думаю, вы правы. Да уж, провисание действительно заметно. Большая часть – видно, где всё это скопилось внизу, в углу, по краю, куда стекает много белой субстанции, и, очевидно, через некоторое время она покрывается более тёмным слоем. Некоторое количество белой субстанции всегда остаётся по краям. Довольно характерно для всех
Роджер, Хьюстон, связист. Близнецы 4, я вас прекр
Okay...
没错。每次拉动舱盖时，我都得手动调整舱盖上的棘爪，所以没办法像往常那样用力拉。因此，我们必须配合，我拉动舱盖的位置要控制好。吉姆——我会指示他那时用力拉，我知道他确实这么做了。就这样，我们才启动了舱盖。棘爪一旦开始啮合，我就
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। क्या आप अपने कंटिंजेंसी एरिया 1 डेल्टा रेट्रोसीक्वेंस टाइम को कॉपी करन
5 Charlie，4.2；5 Dog，4.6；6 Alf
로저. 색깔에 대해 몇 가지 아이디어를 주시겠어요? 그리고 약간 방향을
罗杰。吉姆，据说他们想确保到达地面时氧气浓度合适，而这种方法是通过排出额
Roger. Pagina F2-20, colonna Alfa: 05, 01042; 07, 00256; 11, ripeto. 11, 00070; 12, 00042; 13, 77730. Colonna Br
هذا صحيح. حسنًا. التالي. الوضع - عند - عندما تستقر على الوضعية المطلوبة، اضغط على زر MODE CONTROL AUTO. أدخل المفتاح لمراقبة المعدلات؛ عندما تكون أقل من 0.1 درجة في الثانية، قم بمراقب
Мы отложим замену LiOH примерно на полчаса. Показания PCO2 низкие, и мы не хотим активизи
Ci riproveremo più tardi, Fr
Роджер, очень и
Oh, in Ordnun
रॉजर
कॉटनपिकर
Sì. È quell
Jerry, j'aimerais aussi connaître notre portée et notre vitesse à l'h
Хорошо. «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и в открытом космосе экипаж «Аполлона-8» только что выиграл лунную гонку; наушники были аккуратно развешаны у пультов, в надежде, что Крис Крафт скоро будет там; Фрэнк Борман уютно устроился в своей постели, а в его голове мелькали образы; Джим Ловелл на диване, а Андерс в отсеке ломали голову над экраном компьютера, когда из ниоткуда раздался такой грохот, что Фрэнк вскочил с кровати, чтобы пос
是的，而且
Хорошо. 97 04 03.8
L'horizon est ici d'une noirceur saisissante. Le ciel est d'un noir absolu, et la Terre – ou plutôt la Lune, pardonnez-moi – est d'une clarté remarquable; le contraste entre le ciel et la lune forme une ligne sombre et nette. Apparaissent maintenant dans le champ de vision de l'appareil photo d'intéressants cratères à double anneau, des formations typiques des mers lunaires, remplies d'un matériau de même consistance et de même couleur que les mers. En voici trois ou quatre. Plus loin à l'horizon, on aperçoit… Les montagnes qui se dressent maintenant sont fortement impactées par de nombreux cratère
روجر، فرانك. بعد ثلاث دقائق، سنسلم زمام الأمور من هانيساكل إل
Roger, Gemini VI. Ti chiedo di calciare il registratore. Riteniamo che il nastro potrebbe essere fuori dai limit
Ok
是的，就是那个氢气的问题，我不太确定，但我认为是个背压问题。如果
Roger, compris. 48 %. Il n'y aur
关于这个东西，你觉得有必要把
Давайте
Bene. Siamo a pagina 12, 13, attivazione, al passo 4, verifica i talkback di discesa, grigi, e s
一切准备就绪，我们准备进行舱外活动。摄像机、武器、所有设备都已组装完毕，我们正在进行最后的宇
D'accord. Notre prochain test consistera à tester la transmission vocale et la télémétrie
Roger, je comprends. Sachez que la pression en cabine semble se maintenir juste en dessous de 5. Elle s'est d'abord stabilisée à 5,5, puis a dimi
경과 시간 42초에 
This is Friendship Seven. Capsule dropped into orientation mode again on. I took it over manually and am reorienting at pres
Итак... мишень расположена на одной линии с центром пояса Ориона. Примерно в геометричес
Роджер. Мы те
Мы даже можем увидеть парикмахерск
Возьми
Bene, state appena iniziando a superare il limite. Riesco a vedere parti dell'America Centrale, e sembra che lì sia abbastanza limpido. Le isole dei Caraibi stanno iniziando ad apparire e si vedono anche alcune linee di nuvole. Sembra che ci sia un sistema fino a... beh, al largo della Groenlandia, con grandi catene di nuvole che si estendono verso sud-ovest. La costa orientale degli Stati Uniti sta appena iniziando a comparire, e non sembra p
Nur zu, Hous
Нет, всё в порядке. Однако интересно то, что в прошлый раз, когда вы сбрасывали воду, они заметили изменение в отслеживании траектории, и, проведя корреляцию, обнаружили человека, который считал, что знает характеристики сопла и количество сбрасываемой воды, и его оценки влияния на траекторию, похоже, совпал
Да, да, д
よし、
알겠습니다. 그럼, 주행 가능 거
자, 버즈, 걔네들을 그냥 '큰 엄마'라고 부르지 말고
D'accord, Jim. On constate que la batterie 3 ne consomme qu'environ un ampère et qu'il est probablement temps de la déconnec
D'accord. Il n'y a plus d'eau dans le réservoir d'eau potable. On a essayé d'en puiser il y a quelques minutes, mais il n'y
Columbia, this is Houston. On your LAM 2 map, we'd like to confirm the topographical area in which you were looking on this last period of sightings. As we 
收到。我来告诉你我的配置。我目前处于自动
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很神奇，就是眼睛还没适应的时候，周围一片漆黑。我确实能看到窗户上有一些涂层。现在要回到超高频VOX模式进行发射。打开面罩擦拭右侧麦克风。我舔了一下。关上面罩。面罩立刻密封，以便宇航服电路开始工作。我可不想再被它弄脏。宇航服进气口的温度稳定在68度左右。所以穹顶又要升起来了。现在温度是76度，75度。看来这个更高的设置才是我们想要的。我想再往上加半格，应该就能锁定温度了。宇航服终于开始降温了，所以我知道该把温度调到什么程度了。我已经将宇航服和控制杆的冷却液量设定在 8.5。此时穹顶读数为 75 度。宇航服进气口温度为 68 度。非常舒适。我能感觉到凉爽的空气拂过我的脸庞。氧气量看起来也很好，分别为 60 和 75 psi（单位为百）。我一直在观察 250 逆变器。它的温度接近 140 度，而 150 对比度逆变器的温度已降至约 100 度。待机温度约为 100 度，也就是舱内温度。第三点，250 逆变器——它有点问题，我会密切关注。舱内热交换器的温度稳定在 40 度，
حسناً. تقول لجنة ا
Roger. Bon accord au sein de
रॉजर. 28570 250 28401 42 0641 296, तीन बार लागू नहीं, प्लस 0920, माइनस 16
Apo
네, 아폴로 13호와 아폴로 8호를 비교해 보면, 이륙 시 진동은 8호 때와 거의 비슷했지만, 비
그리고 수동으로 
Roger. Nous sommes en train de réaliser le PROGRAMME 21, en déterminant la trajectoire au sol pour ce 
机
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호입니다. 당신이 알려주신
На этом, пожалуй, все мировые и национальные новости и статьи. На спортивной странице Хэнк Стрэм из «Канзас-Сити Чифс» был назван лучшим т
알겠습니다. 입학 전 절차에 소요되는 시간은 중간고사 7강 또는 5강이 끝나는 즉
はっきりと言ってるよ、ブルー
Okay. Mod
Ciao Huntsville, ciao Huntsville, sono Sigma Seven, hai letto il mio UHF? Ci
はい、8番です。テストパターンについて回答をいただきました。地上試験用に割り当てられたテストパターンは25個あり、これらを確認してきまし
Oka
جارٍ التحقق من ا
Gémeaux 4, Gémeaux 
هل تق
Погод
D'accord. Zone 7-3 GET RC, 10 04 47; RET, 400
罗杰
ビルはジムと一緒にカメラを下の機材デッ
Roger. We got the Interstellar Times here, th
Apollo 8, ce que nous aimerions faire avec ces angles, c'est de le régler en AUTO REACQ sur le panneau 2, et il se trouve sous le suivi de l'antenne à gain élevé, et il - la position inférieure indiquera REACQ, et 
That's affirm. I'm going to first of all just quickly run through the times of the major events, and then we'll go back and fill in some of the details. Okay. Entry interface is at 142 hours 40 minutes; 6-1/2 hours, roughly prior to that or at about, we'll start this whole thing going by applying HEATER POWER, by checking the CM/ temperatures and preheating the CM/ if required, and we suspect we'll probably want to do that. We'll have detailed procedures up for it later. At about 6 hours prior to or about, we will commence powering up the, powering up the, using the modified / 30-minute checklist, which you have used for the previous midcourse. Then shortly, just before 5 hours, prior to or at about, we'll want you in the attitude for a body axis alinement, using the Earth terminator like we did before; and as soon as we have that, we'll perform -7, which looks like, now, about a 2-foot-per-second burn or about 15 seconds of. And I'm told that it's down to 1-1/2 now, so it's comfortably within the margin. Okay. When we do that, we'll immediately start the maneuver to the service module jettison attitude, which will be in plane since we're jettisoning it earlier than we usually do. We don't need, and don't want, the out-of-plane component. So it'll be in plane with the service module pointed back out along the radius vector. We will then commence to get the command module ready for service module SEP, including command module checkout and hot fire, and at approximately 4 hours and 30 minutes prior to or, we'll jettison the service module. We'll pitch the up until we aquire the service module in the... and try and get some photographs, but we're not going to fool around with translation maneuvers for pictures because we don't want to screw up - foul up your flight path angle at that time. 
जी हां, फ्रेड। और अगर अलाइनमेंट के बारे में आपके कोई भी सवा
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。你们已在计划任务中心（PTC）停稳；姿态看起来不错。迈克，我想检查一下通讯
Okay. Und nochmal: In dem Bereich, in dem ich sagte, die Reihenfolge sei nicht kritisch, ist sie auch
双子
Роджер, понял, Арт. Чтобы отслежи
好的，万斯。我们接下来会这样做：等我们
Gemini 4, 
阿
我感觉还不错，身上还有
嘿，乔？FAO准备好了吗？你准备好了吗？或者说，你准备好把我们在单人游戏手册中设为可选或删除的那些项目给我了
Well - no, I 
روجر، إنها القاهرة في السادس والعشرين من الشهر، الساعة 7:18:37 بتوقيت غرينتش. تقع على بعد 12 ميلاً شمال غرب المسار. المدى الم
And, Jim, earlier in the evening, we thought there was a misunderstanding about the amount of potable water you can drink, but we want to advise you that you can drink as much water 
حسناً
فهمتُ قصدك جيدًا يا جيم. بالنسبة لوضعياتك أثناء السير 
Roger. GMTRC 17 56 03. 7+47.
هل نتجه نحو قف
ランドマーク追跡の結果も確認しました。マークはすべて非常に良好だったようです。また、各地点
ACA – DET
ज़ान्ज़ीबार कैप कॉम, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन पर हाई-फ़ायर सिग्नल। नीचे लंबी-लंबी धारियों वाले 
यह छोटा सा कोरोना ऑस्ट्रेलिस तारामंडल है, जिसे हमने अंशांकन के लिए चुना है। यह अभी मेरे सामने है, और इसमें पाँचवें क्रम के त
私は海軍に特に興味があったわけではありませんが、
Roger. Nous 
네, 프레드. 전원 차단 작업을 계속 진행할 준비가 되었습니다. 두 가지 변경 사항이 있습니다. 전원 차단 1단계는 5페이지를 참조하세요. 이
إذا استطعت أن أجعله يكف عن لمس جسدي، فس
قد تسألون... هل بإمكانهم ضبط بعض الإعدادات لالتقاط صور من داخل المركبة الفضائية؟ لدينا 200 قدم من الفيلم. لقد ال
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 다운링크에 잡음이 많이 들립니다. 고이득 광대역 모드로, 각도는 180도, 요(yaw)와 피치(pit
أوه، لا تريد أن تسمع. دعني أحسب بعض الأ
Friendship Seven, abbiamo una telemetria affidabile e controlliamo tutti i vostri sistemi. Vi ricorderemo di iniziare la checklist pre-Lato Oscuro non
मुझे दो
好的。面板 4：电信，第 1 组，接 AC1。闭合以下断路器：，按下第 1 组，主 B；，按下第 2 组，主 B；，温度，主 B；，二次回路传感器，主 B；散热器，控制/加热器，主 B；电
他们现在都重新被封
Okay. We would 
يا إلهي، أنا محبط للغاي
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। हाई-फाइबर सिग्नल पर। यह सिग्मा सेवन है। हाई-फाइबर सिग्नल पर। एक संक्षिप्त गिनती दे रहा हूँ। यह वर्ल्ड वाइड रेंज पर हाई-फाइबर सिग्नल कवरेज की जाँच के लिए है। ट्रांसमिशन की अवधि 60 सेकंड है। काश मुझे पता होता कि समय बिताने के लिए मैं और क्या कह सकता हूँ। अगर मैं ज़ोर से साँस लूँ तो शायद इससे मदद मिल जाए। कैप्सूल बहुत अच्छे से काम कर रहा है और मुझे लगता है कि हम लगभग 60 सेकंड पूरे करने वाले हैं। वर्ल्ड वाइड रेंज में हाई-फाइ
Les éléments dont nous avons encore besoin seront une lecture effectuée le plus tard possible avant le rangement final. Nous n'avons aucune information concernant la dernière période de repos de l'équipage. Je souhaite vérifier que le système secondaire a bien été activé sur les quatre quadru
주낙하산이 녹색으로 접혀 있습니다. 낙하산은 펼쳐져 있으며, 10,800피트 고도에서 리프 형태로 변
Roger. Du liegst in deinem Diagramm etwas zu niedrig, weil die Werte von Anfa
Salve, Capitano Com. Amicizia Sette. Il carburante è al 62-60 [percento]; l'ossigeno 
13号，休斯顿。我们看到你快要遇到云台锁死了。请你把主轨道A
Basterebbe confrontarlo 
Ok, vorrei commentare il nostro cibo. Finora ogni busta di succo d'arancia, ogni busta in cui ho messo acqua e che conteneva succo d'arancia in qualsiasi forma, o ananas, o succo d'arancia puro, aveva una valvola che perdeva. Ora, f
Il b
好的。减 04402 减 00001 加 48387 178 16
13, Houston
はい。キャビンの内部がどうなっ
Okay. The attitude is pitch 23.4, roll 184.7, yaw 14.3. And the reason we're doing the alignment in this attitude is, the next thing we'll be coming up with is the scanning telescope visibility test and that will be 70 degrees sun and Arcturus with a shaft and trunnion of zero. a
Ricevuto. Entra nel BLOCCO e pr
자, 아폴로
Yeah. Now that we know where (illegible) will be a lot easier the next time around. The first time we looked for Cairo - for Cairo and Alexandria, we found that (illegible) a while. I never did really see the airfield. I just saw the area. I guessed if I pointed the camera right, I'd have a picture of Cairo. But this time I actually picked up the airfield. Same thing with Alexandria. I think if you are going to take a picture of something like that, it might be worthwhile to pass over it one time, take a good look a
네. 6페이지 1번 항목, "메인 전개 버튼" 아래쪽에 추가로 세 가지 단계를 수행해 주셔야 합니다. 이는 하강 중 매니폴드의 산소 압력을 낮추고 식수 및 폐수 탱크를 통한 산소 누출을 방지하기 위한 
...アフリカ上空で写真を1枚撮りました...それはハッセルブ
और हां, पेज के बीच में जहां एक छोटा सा ब्लॉक है जिस पर "राशि चक्र प्रकाश तस्वीरें" लिखा है,
질문을 정확히 이해했는지 모르겠지만, 저희는 대량 시료에서 지표면 물질을 상당 부분 확보했고, 다양한 종류의 암석 조각들
अपोलो 11, यह 
रॉजर। यह आरकेवी कैप कॉम है। आपको सीएसक्यू प
了解。11、/：45597、0 - 訂正 - マイナス040、プラス157、プラス36325、マイナス01727、プラス01428 180 003 000、11月のアルファ、プラス00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254。さそり座デルタ、下103、左48、プラス0742、マイナス16500 13005 36327。シリウスとリゲル、129 155 010、4つの四重連星、15秒。地平線はTマイナス
D'accord. Votre radiateur secondaire est à environ 70 degrés (72 degrés); la sortie du radiateur est à environ 30 degrés; la température d'évaporation du glycol est d'environ 65 degrés; la pression de vapeur est au maximum, la pression de refoulement du glycol est d'environ 9 psi. Les combinaisons de l'accumulateur secondaire sont à environ 52 degrés; la cabine est à environ 58 degrés; les pressions sont les suivantes: combinaison à 4,1, cabine à 5. La pression partielle de CO2 est légèrement supérieure à 1, environ 1,1. Sur le côté de la maison, la température est de 72 degrés, l'hélium est à 3500; N2 A est à 2300; N2 B à environ 2450. Le carburant est à environ 165; les deux piles à combustible 1 sont fermées, elles sont à zéro; la température de la peau est de 405 degrés;
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 방금 들으신 음성 백업을 또렷하게 들었습니다. 남은 교신 시간 동안 스위치는 현재 위치에 그대
알겠습니다. 제가 드린 기상 정보를 다시 살펴보니, 목표 지점의 2,000피트 고도에 흩어져 있는 적설량 위에 6,000피트 고도의 흩어진 적설층이 있을 것으로 예상됩니다. 최대 이륙 지점에서도 상황
يُخبرك هذا بالمدى - معدل المدى بالدرجة المئوية، وهي الزاوية بين خط رؤية المنظار والأ
الانحراف لليسار ليس جيداً. لنرَ ما لدينا. يظهر انحراف خ
하하. 어쩌면 "떠돌아다니며 꿈꾸기"라는 옛 노
Il va
नहीं, मैं इसे OAMS रेट
Roger. Ci stiamo avvicinando al percorso di avvicinamento all'ac
저는 그저 시간을 기다리고 있을 뿐입니다. 다른 
はい、食べました。ただ、食べ物がひどく崩れてしまっていて、カプセル全体にパンくずが散らば
로저. 지상에서 보니 
在 0 到 50 伦琴标度
L'endroit est-il couvert de nuages ​​?
Nur zu, 
Roger, Frank. La température du réservoir d'hélium que nous surveillons sur le quad A n'a augmenté que d'un degré pendant toute cette intervention. Nous ne considérons donc pas cela comme trop préoccupant. Dès que vous aurez terminé, plutôt que de revenir à la configuration initiale, nous vous proposons de faire pivoter le
Okay. L'ultimo Joe è stato eseguito a -4 ore e mezza; eseguire una spinta di 0,5 piedi al secondo, capacità di carico a quattro getti; quindi eseguire SEP se
ここで絡まったコー
B
Houston, Apollo 11. Répét
…食べ
わかりました。項目1は、1から5まで、完了として削除でき
怎么样？这才是正确的打
好的。那么输入这个
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 약 1분 후 
好的，那就太好了。下次，我们会格外仔细地检查所有参数；我们会为你准备好一切。我们会利用最后的方法对所有系统进行一次彻底的破解。我会逐个系统地向你介绍我们
Esatto. Io... non sono entrato... ho dato... l'ho restituito al computer per un secondo. Ho riportato il selettore di modalità da MANUALE a mentre armeggiavo con... e il computer ha fatto sparire la stella dalla vista. Quindi il ritardo qui è stato nel tornare a MANUALE e trovare di nuovo la stella, cosa che finalmente ho fatto. E... un
Roger, Frank. Ich habe euch verstanden. Was die Temperaturen angeht, sollten Quad A und B beide 120 Grad haben. Ro
快点！睡觉
Roger, Zanzi
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। यॉ अपनी
И тут показалось, что всё видимое движение прекратилось, и мы, вероятно, сближаемся. Поэтому я развернул космический аппарат и попытался выровнять платформу. Тем временем ускоритель начал довольно заметно опускаться ниже нас. Поэтому я перестал пытаться выровнять платформу, чтобы направить её вниз к ускорителю, и слегка включил тормоза, чтобы замедлиться вместе с ним. Снова казалось, что скорость падения остановилась. Но к этому моменту мы отклонились примерно на 300 метров. Затем мы следовали за ускорителем над Африкой, направляя его вниз на протяжении всего пути. Мы довольно быстро приблизились к закату, и, дума
罗杰。再说一遍。你太
Ш
하
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम यहाँ हाई गेन ऐरे के साथ ऑपरेशन करने की कोशिश करना चाहते हैं। यदि आप पुनः अधिग्रहण का चयन करते हैं और अपने एस ब
看起来不错
C
Questa è Friendship Seven. Il retrogetto automatico è disattivato. Il selettore di modalità è normale, il comando di rateo di volo è normale, il giroscopio è normale. Tutte le manopole a "T" sono inserite tranne quella manuale, che è disinserita. Al momento sto controllando manualmente. L'interruttore del Landing Bag è disattivato. Il pannello di sequenza è tutto normale tranne quello. Il carburante di controllo è al 60-82 [percento]. Gli assetti al momento con controllo manuale sono rollio 5 [gradi] a destra, imbardata 15 [gradi] a destra, beccheggio --34 [gradi] in assetto orbitale. Il mio tempo dal lan
Cal Cap Com, 
Roger. Wir sind fast abfahrbereit. Ed hat gerade einen seiner Handschuhe wieder angezogen. Er zieht noc
Ils vous fourniron
Ich habe ihn gehört. Ich habe ihn gehört, als wir endlich die Funkverbindung abgeschaltet haben – „HOLT IHN REIN!“ Ha! Ha! Ha! Ha! Habt ih
Нет, я снова всё вытеснил из памя
Roger, Friendship Seven. Will be losing contact any minute now, you have reentry checks to make and approximately 10 minutes, until California co
ब
No. In realtà non abbiamo avuto molto tempo 
Хорошо. Не могли бы вы дать мне это еще раз, п
BMAG MODE、3、R
Roger
इवैपोरेटर सामान्य है
那个应答器检查过了。希望他们给你准备了一个又大又结实的
0,1 градуса. Вероятно, у GDC отклонение намного больш
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। इस समय यह लोअर कैलिफोर्निया
ठीक है, ऑपरेशन हीटर सर्किट ब्रेकर खु
Well, of course, the Earth is pretty bright, and the black sky, instead of being black, has sort of a rosy glow to it. The star, unless it is a very bright one, is probably lost somewhere in that glow, but it is just not visible. I maneuvered the reticle considerably above the horizon to make sure that the star is not lost in the brightness below the horizon. However, even when I get the reticle considerably above the horizon so the star should be seen against the black backgroun
Roger. Mach ich, Jack. Und ich schaue jetzt nach rechts – nein, nach der Rastung Nummer 4 – und da hinten entlüftet sich etwas; ich
حسنًا. شغّل مف
11, Houston. Nelle ultime due ore abbiamo visto un leggero aumento continuo della pressione parziale di CO2. Avete già sostituito la bombola di CO2 st
저희는 연속 기록 중
好的。主调节阀，两个，
نحن على خط SIMPLEX A، لكننا لن نصل إلى ت
シグマ・セブン、シグマ・セブン、こち
Okay. Da wir gerade dabei sind – sollen wir das Gerät einschal
夕焼けはなかなか印象的だ。眺めるのに時間を無駄にする必要はないと思う。とても興味深い。もう一つ魅力的なのは、目が慣れていないと黒く見えることだ。窓に確かにコーティングが見える。この時点で VOX に戻って UHF-hi で送信する。バイザーを開けて右のマイクを拭く。舐めてしまった。バイザーを閉じる。スーツの回路が機能するようにバイザーはすぐに密閉された。またそれで汚れたくない。スーツの吸気口は約 68 度で非常にうまく保たれている。そこでドームを再び上げる。今は 76、75 になっている。どうやらこの高い設定が我々が求めているものだ。今これに半マークを追加すればロックできるかもしれないと思う。ようやく少し涼しくなってきたので、設定をどこに持っていけばいいのかわかっている。スーツとコントロールレバーの冷却剤の量を 8.5 に設定しました。この時点でのドームの表示は 75 (度) です。スーツの吸気口は 68 (度) です。非常に快適です。顔に冷たい風が当たるのが感じられます。酸素量は非常に良好で、60 と 75 (psi、数百単位) です。250 のインバーターを監視しています。140 度に近づいており、150 のコントラストは約 100 度まで下がっています。スタンバイは約 100 (度) で、これはキャビン温度です。3 番目に、250 は苦しんでいるので、注意します。キャビンの熱交換器は間違いなく 40 度で安定しており、明らかに Frank Samonski に 50 セント借りがあるので苦労しています。嬉しい驚きです。キャ
Verstehe. Wenn du anruf
제가 이렇게 묻는 이유는, 지휘 모듈에서 물을 빼내기 위해 서지 탱크에 압력을 가할 때마다 서지 탱크의 압력이 얼마나 떨어지는지 전혀 모르기 때문입니다. 만
R
想像するよ。
확실히 제 아래에 있었습니다. 카나본(Carnarvon) 부근부터 계속 제 아래쪽으로 추적하고 있었죠. 카나본까지는 아래쪽에 있다가 지평선 위로 올라갔다가 다시 아래쪽으로 내려왔습니다. 마치 저와는 다른 궤도에 있는 것처럼 보였어요. 원지점과 근지점이 저와 달랐거든요. 어쨌든, 날이 밝자마자 위치를 파악하자마자 접근을 시도했습니다. 말씀드렸다시피, 그때 부스터는 제 앞쪽 1~2마일 정도, 즉 아래쪽에 있었습니다. 그래서 접근하려고 할수록 오히려 거리가 더 벌어졌습니다. 역추진을 하고 있었죠. 상단 추진기를 사용해서 전체 속도를 줄이는 동시에 추진기를 작동시켰습니다. 하지만 결국 접근하지 못했고, 부스터는 계속 멀어졌습니다. 하와이에 도착할 때쯤에는 부스터와 함께 우주 유영(EVA)을 하려면 남은 연료를 모두 소모해야 할 것 같다는 생각이 들었습니다. 기본 규칙에서 그렇게 하지 않기로 합의했었거든요. 그래서 관제탑과 상의한 결과 부스터 분리는 진행하지 않기로 했습니다. 제가 언급했는지 모르겠지만, 부스터에서 분리될 때 부스터의 피치와 요우 회전율이 초당 약 0.5도 정도로 낮았던 것 같습니다. 저는 이 회전율을 낮추려고 노력했습니다. 각 방향으로 한 번씩
收到。我听得很清楚
ठीक है, अब जब स्कैनर वापस चालू हो गए हैं, तो हमें उस रोल की समस्या को सुलझाना चाहिए जो मुझे वहाँ हुई थी। पिच के हिसाब से तो यह 
... सीएसक्यू, वापस कंप्यूटर पर। 
Wie sieht Batterie Nummer 2 für Sie
Freundschaft Sieben. Könnten Sie bestätigen, dass Sie die Rücksequenzzeit 1 Delta aus Sansibar erhalten habe
你好，休斯顿 CAP COM。现在我们都能
Eagle, Houston. When you get a 
Roger, bien reçu, Jim. Nous restons joignables sur tous ces sites isolés. Je vous appellerai simplement pour vous dire: « À l’écoute ». Si vous vous sentez seul ou si vous avez des commentaires, n’hé
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम पैनल पर लिखे निशान देख सकते हैं। हम पढ़ रहे हैं: सिस्टम ए एसेंट फ्यूल, एसेंट ऑक्सीडाइज़र। क्वाड 1, क्वाड 4। यह वाकई अविश्वसनी
不，我写的是 134 1
Genau das meine ich. Wir können diese Ventilatoren hier verwenden und die Luftzirkulation direkt durch deren Einsatz gewährlei
एक्वेरियस, अपलिंक का काम पूरा हो गया है। कंप्यूटर अब आपका है, और आप अपडेट लिंक सर्
Voyons voir… la prochaine fois qu’on passera la colline, je crois qu’on est censé
D'accord. Nous continuons vers le Pacifique central, 357 152 359 267, plus 0813, moins 16503 066 36221 647
Lo tengo io. Tu apri i
मैं जिम हूँ। मुझे बूस्टर से अपनी दूरी 
هذا هو 
Gemini, CSQ. Переведите переключатель считывания количества 
Roger. Die Wolkendecke hier ist 3.000 Seemeilen breit und besteht aus Stratuswolken. Wir gehen davon aus, dass Sie sie durch die Wolken hindurch sehen werden. 
Bon. Premièrement, il semble impossible d'échapper au fait que vou
Gemini VIII, Hawaii. Ich ha
音声バックア
ي
알겠습니다. 그리고, 저기, 저희가 그걸 기록해 두겠습니다. 프로브
어떻게 보면 이것도 마찬가지
Roger. I un
确认无误。请翻到第 27 页，激活，第 16 栏。在 SYSTEM Bravo 下：ASCENT FEED 1，PQGS 应打开；AS
Buonasera. Sono il Comandante dell'Apollo 11. Cento anni fa, Jules Verne scrisse un libro su un viaggio ve
지금은 카메라가 달린 총만 없었더라면 훨씬 더 자유롭게 움직일 수 있었을 텐데. 총 때문에 한 손을 묶어둬야 하거
Gemini 4, Houst
Danke. Oka
了解しました。11. バッテリー充電に関するご質問ですが、おそらく個々のバッテリーの個体差によるものだと思います。また、今回の場合は起動時の過渡現象のようなものが解消されたようです。他に影響する可能性のある要因としては、バッテリー温度などが考えられます。EECOMMは、通常の設計
E in effetti stai davvero peggi
Роджер. 11, /: 45597, 0 - поправка - это минус 040, плюс 157, плюс 36325, минус 01727, плюс 01428 180 003 000, Ноябрьская Альфа, плюс 00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254; Скорпионы Дельта, вниз 103, влево 48, плюс 0742, минус 16500
Ok Fre
はい。プラスを
Mentre mi guardo intorno, il contrasto, in generale, è *** generato completamente dall'ombra *** del Sole... un grigio molto chiaro, un grigio chiaro, un alone attorno alla mia ombra, attorno all'ombra del mio casco. Poi, mentre guardo verso ***, il contrasto diventa più forte in quanto il colore circostante è ancora piuttosto chiaro. Mentre guardi verso il Sole ***, una porzione maggiore di *** area in ombra è rivolta verso di noi. Il colore generale dell'*** circostante *** il contrasto non è così forte. Esaminando tutta l'area polverosa che abbiamo sollevato ***, la consistenza è considerevolmente più scura. Ora, ne ho sollevato uno, e immagino che sia *** Surveyor. Lo stesso vale quando eseguo un'indagine trasversale - lungo l'area che stiamo camminando. In generale *** al fatto che ci sono impronte lì. Il terreno in generale dove ho sollev
- - そして、状態
不，这是正常音。
ミッションル
الأضواء متوهجة، والشعور بالراحة، والمزاج مبهج. معايير المقصورة: الضغط 1، الرطوبة 65، درجة الحرارة 20، الضغط في الحجرة 1، الوضع التلقائي الأول 155، الوضع التلقائي الثاني 155، الضغط في الأسطوانة 320 ضغط جو
La
Это намного лучше, чем тот статический шум, который у н
Je n'ai jamais eu 
जी हां, जिम। आपको अपने प्लस X-
機能、オフ、モード、スタンバイ、GTA、ダウン、GTA カバー、安全、姿勢、スケール、5/5、選択、1、ソース、姿勢設定、手動姿勢ロール、ピッチ、ヨー、レート コマンド、リミット サイクル、オフ、デッドバンド、最小、レート、高、THC 電力、オフ、回転制
ठीक है, जिम। अब मैं इसे आपको दो भागों में समझाता हूँ। पहला भाग कमांड मॉड्यूल उपकरण स्थानांतरण से संबंधित है। दूसरा भा
मुझे अपना सा
내가 SQUELCH 기능을 켤 때마다 당신과 연락이 끊깁니다. 이
네, 수량 읽기 스위치를 OFF로 설정하셔도 
Okay, ich verstehe
حسنًا.
好的，Fred-o，干得漂亮。第 4 行，从以下项目开始：SUIT FAN 1，关闭；GLYCOL PUMP AUTO TRANSFER，VHF B 发射器，打开；VHF A 接收器，打开。下方：SIGNAL STRENGTH DISPLAY，打开；OPERATE，关闭。下方，第 5 行：CRO
実際に起こっていることは、私たちが転がっていて
Say again, contingency area time. O
Ruhe bewahren, Houston. Wir kümmern uns darum. Bitte warten. Wir bitten Sie, den Schutzschalter für den M
はい、はい。ジム、ちょっと話が逸れましたね。では、バーン姿勢からボールを​​使ってやってみましょう。ロールはどちらかの方向に90度、ピッチとヨーは0度に保ってください。さて、ステップ3
जी हां। ठीक है। जब यह पूरा हो जाएगा, तो वे सूर्य को देखने के लिए उपयुक्त कोण पर आ जाएंग
Gemelli 4, Carnarvon. Come
ご都合がよろしければ、サービスモジュールの推進剤
हम इसमें शामिल हैं और इसे स्वीका
11号，休斯顿
Oui, il y a un orignal ici, tu n'imagines même pas. C'est le plus gros que j'aie jamais vu. Mon Dieu, qu'il est énorme! Il est gigantesque! Il est tellement gros que je n'arrive même pas à le faire entrer par la fenêtre. Tu veux voir ça? C'est le plus gros que 
What I need is - 0.3 to 0.5 on this thing, closer to 
حسنًا. فهمت يا فريد. شكرًا جزيلًا؛ 38.9 و1.9. وهو ببساطة يرسم مخططًا سلسًا قدر الإمكان للتحقق من كمية الأمبيرات التي نعيدها إلى البطارية. لهذا السبب يريدها على فترات نصف ساعة. إذا بدأ هذا الجدو
Хорошо. Вам действительно понятно, что вам нужна холодная обработка? Мы примерно так и предполагали, что это про
Hier spricht Gemini 7/6 auf dem Weg nach Hon
हे ह्यूस्टन, यह अंतिम चरण शायद बहुत लंबा लगा होगा। ऑटो टारगेटिंग हमें सीधे एक फुटबॉल मैदान के आकार के गड्ढे में ले जा रही थी, जिसके चारों ओर लगभग एक या दो गड्ढे के व्यास के दायरे में बड़ी संख्या में बड़े-बड़े पत्थर और चट्टानें थीं, और इसके लिए P66 में मैन्युअल रूप से उड़
Apollo 11, Houston. Concernant le plan de vol, voici nos recommandations pour les activités de la prochaine heure: poursuivez votre familiarisation comme vous le souhaitez jusqu’à environ 58 heures, puis entrez dans la capsule, f
罗杰。我这里有个问题想跟
روجر. لقد تجا
حسنًا. هذا تعليق عام ينطبق على أي وقت تعمل فيه أو تنتقل بين علامتي تبويب، ويجب عليك توخي الحذر من استدعاء فعل موسع خلال هذه الفترة. هذا مذكور في ملاحظات البرنامج، وهو مجرد تذكير. ماذا سيحدث إذا دخلنا في فعل موسع مثل an أو an؟ قد نعلق في علامتي التبويب ونضطر إلى إعادة المرور من خلالهما للحصول على 63، وهاتان العلامتان لا تُستخدمان عادةً، وهذه مجرد ممارسة جيدة. ونحن نحاول فقط تذكيرك بأنه لا يجب استد
Okay. Plus 1197 minus 16500 12681 35608 , align north set stars, roll 068, pitch 097, yaw 356, ullage none; other: one, fast return,, equals 7900 for Indian Ocean; number 2, high-spe
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. نحن نعمل على ما سيحدث لاحقًا. في هذه الأثناء، نود فصل بعض الأجهزة عالية الطاقة عن الخط، لذا في 
로저. 모
哦，原来如此。我还以为自己要醒了呢。我们现在醒了
حسناً، لقد كان اهتزازاً
Okey doke. Hot off the press here: We find Juan Carlos was formally designated yesterday - Tuesday - to become General Franco's successor - as the Chief of State of Spain and eventual King. Juan Carlos will be sworn in today as his successor designate after taking an oath of loyalty to the law and the National Movement, Spain's only legal polit
Это «Сигм
Это отрицательный р
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven. This is Canton Com Tech, Canton Com T
Il tramonto è piuttosto suggestivo, non credo di dover perdere molto tempo a guardarli. Sono molto interessanti. L'altra cosa affascinante è quanto sia buio quando gli occhi non sono abituati. Vedo sicuramente un po' di patina sul finestrino. Torno a VOX a questo punto in UHF-hi per trasmettere. Apro la visiera per pulire il microfono destro. L'ho leccato. Chiudo la visiera. La visiera è stata sigillata immediatamente per consentire al circuito della tuta di funzionare al mio posto. Non voglio rovinarmi di nuovo. L'ingresso della tuta si mantiene molto bene a circa 20 gradi. Quindi la cupola tornerà di nuovo su. Ora è a 23, 24 gradi. A quanto pare questa impostazione più alta è quella che vogliamo. Credo che aggiungerò un altro mezzo segno e potremmo averla agganciata. Finalmente si sta raffreddando un po', quindi so dove voglio arrivare con l'impostazione. Ho impostato la quantità di refrigerante per la tuta e la leva di comando a 8,5. La lettura della cupola in questo momento è di 75 gradi. L'ingresso della tuta è di 68 gradi. Molto piacevole. Sento aria fresca che mi a
Roger. We're showing an indication here on the ground of th
Il casco e i guanti si trovano nella borsa del portello, la grande borsa che si trova sotto il divano sinistro in cui si inserisce il 
Хорошо, конфигурация панели 11, верхний ряд: Шина переменного тока B, я хочу, чтобы S-диапазонная антенна была открыта; Шина переменного тока A, магнитофон, открыт. Второй ряд, под СИСТЕМОЙ A, я хочу, чтобы основной коммут
ジム、パネル 16 インチ上の POWER
रॉजर, जैक। अक्ष
Abbiamo fatto tre tazze di caffè oggi. L'ultima, sai, quando tutti gli impianti idraulici erano già caldi, la pistola a idrogeno e tutto il resto, era la più calda delle tre. Non so chi l'abbia bevuta... Neil, l'hai bevuta tu? Com'era i
Cosa ne pensi di questa folle scala G
로저, 휴스턴. 우리가 하려는 건, 프레드의 정장을 여기서 치우는 겁니다. 프레드의 정장이 지난 30분 동안 지휘관용 보관함에 그대로 있었거든요. 이제 그걸 
I might mention
收到。我们有一条消息要传达给你。他们想尝试通过中继飞机在夏威夷上空与你联系。所以
كينو على التردد العالي. إذا كنت تسمعني، يطلب منك الجراح إجراء فحص ضغط الدم الآن، فحص ضغط الدم لتسجيله في سجل الجهاز. انته
If we can. Go to? Okay. I'm going t
The entire surface is getting considerably darker than the surface that we looked at previously when the Sun was quite high abo
Panel 3: POWER AMPL to OFF. Incidentally, copy this down on a piece of scratch paper as I read it, and then later I'll refer back to your first list where you can write things 
ジム、あなたは参加して構いません。ただし、テレビの時間は依然として 55 時間に固定されていることをお知らせします。私たちはあなたの参加をサポートするために待機しています。1 分後に戻って、O2 燃料電池パージと
O
Хорошо. Полагаю, ограничение в 60 градусов всё 
Okay, maneuver pad, purpose: fly-by, /G&N; 6
अगली
Et, de temps en temps, vous savez, un petit morceau de quelque chose heurte le... comment on appelle ça déjà? Tout le LM trembl
यह है फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, र
لقد لاحظتُ بالتأكيد بعض الضباب على النافذة بسبب صارو
Хорошо. Джим, у нас будет передача управления ровно в начале часа, через полторы минуты. В начале часа, пожалуйста, переведите перек
ठीक है, वैंस। हम चांद को सीधे देखने से बस थोड़ी
Роджер.
Да. Я 
Кстати, я проверил и с
Négatif, pas encore. Je compte faire un réglage dès que la lumière du jour sera de retour et m'en occuper. Je pense que… enfin, je ne suis probablement pas sûr… mes scanners ne fonctionnent sans doute pas correctement. T
起こったこと
Neil and Buzz, the President of the United States is in his office now 
Okay. Rog
Sempre vigile e... Ehi, c'è qualche medico laggiù che sorveglia l'alta quota? Sto cercando di fare un po' di corsa sul posto qui sotto e, solo per curiosità, mi chiedevo se questo mi fa aumentare la frequen
Ok, Vance. Vediamo se ce l'ho qui. Per esempio, voglio usare l'obiettivo DC Hasselblad 80 mm da 70 mm in A-13, usando pellicole MA
Это подтверж
요(yaw) 각도를 
Roger. Entry PAD: area is the mid Pacific, roll 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, latitude plus 1332, minus 16917, 064, 36194, 649, range to go 14045, 36275, 195
Gemini 4, Houston CA
- - 중력 기울기 실험에서처럼 달의 중심을 향해 아래로 끌어당기는 
제가 그렇게 
Ich habe kein Stereobild von den beiden au
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्
R
Jack, Jim ha detto che non è scomodo. È un po' fastidioso per quanto riguard
And it looks as though - I guess what's giving it that three dimensional effect is the earthshine. I can see Tycho fairly clearly - at least if I'm right 
Okay, le
А не могли бы вы уточнить в ФАО, где находится этот лист с испра
ठीक है। हम 3 g's पढ़ रहे हैं, लगता है इस बार हमें रीएंट्री डैम्पिंग चेक को छोड़न
Oui, j'e
Du k
रॉजर। हम आपसे अनुरोध 
Nous avions 0,1 il
Okay. Jetzt haben Sie die Wahl, entweder zu kürzen ode
그게 번개인지, 아니
That's
ठीक है। पृष्ठ 2-22 के निचले दाहिने कोने 
是的，我知道它们已经解
حسنًا. فهمت،
Negative, Buzz. It still looks kind of bad. Apparently, when you move around, it's cutting in and out. Have you checked the littl
Real good, Jim. Santa Claus struck last night before I came in here on the shift, and I guess we will finish 
ジャック、これはただの予防措置だよ。光学部品をシャフト角度90度で設置すれば、スリットが一列に並び、ヒートシールドのその部分に空気の流れが最適になり、高温になるのを防げるんだ。覚えて
روجر. لقد فه
Roger, 8. 010 689 260 Persei Zeta, vers le bas 048, vers la gauche 05. Le reste n'est pas applicable. Sirius, Rigel, ensemble d'étoiles à ali
아폴로 11
没
Okay. In relationship to the midcourse correction, we'd like to put that one off until about, and it will be approximately a 25-foot-per-second burn. The reason we're delaying the burn time is to allow for better tracking as a result of the 7-1/2-foot per second you put in on the separation. We'd like to take a little more time to look at the tracking data. And the dispersions in your correction aren't going to be growing very fast here. What we'll do then is to delete the NAV sightings that occur about in the flight plan, and this will be getting us back on to the normal flight plan sequence. So we'll go ahead and finish the, and the 7-hour limit on that is due to the 
De plus, Seven, nous vous recommandons de laisser la capsule dériver en mode manuel afin d'économiser du carburant. Terminé
了解。ニール、良い
نعم، سيكون من الأفضل لو كانت قوته أكبر بعشر مرات. بالطبع، يميل إلى الاهتز
알겠습니다. 새로운 마음가짐으로, 우리가 그에게 전달하려고 했던 축과 트
अरे जिम, मैं अभी दूरबीन से देख रहा हूँ, और सच कहूँ तो नज़ारा बहुत ही खूबसूरत है। अद्भुत। मुझे भूमध्य सागर
Negative. Okay. I'd like to review with you this blood pressure. You are not going to have the adapter o
잠시 기다려 주세요. 새로운 소식이 있습니다. 어떤
Ricevuto. Sempre per motivi di consumo di carburante, ti consigliamo di tornare alla moda
コロンビア、コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。
Роджер. Жд
سنتجاهل أنظمة المعلومات والترفيه داخل السيارة، ونقوم بتحديث القناة وكل ما ي
你想用吸尘器吸走那些
사
जी हाँ। हमारा पहला स्टिक कोर्स 007 आगे, 005 बाएँ और 007 ऊपर था
D'accord. Il semble que, bien que nous lisions la même quantité que vous sur le quadripôle, en utilisant le logiciel et tous les facteurs de correction intégrés, vos quatre quadripôles affichent des valeurs très proches. En livres, vous avez par exemple 193 livres pour le quadripôle A, 189 pour le B, 200 pour le C et 190 pour le Delta. La différence que vous lisez sur le manomètre est d
Alpha/Pc a Pc; INDICATORE VEICOLO DI LANCIO a GPI; PASSO E IMB
Sta
フレンドシップセブン、こちら
高度は500〜100
Hallo Friendship Seven, Friend
… Signalez au Cap que vous avez vérifié les commandes de vol électriques et que tous les propulseurs sont en bon état. Y a-t-il autre chos
ザンジバ
Okay. Bi
どちらの端にドッキングするか迷
알겠습니다. 다들 움직이
ロジャー、
روجر. انخفضت درجة حرارة خزان ال
روجر، في الإصدار ١٢، سيتم تحديث وقت نقطة الوصول (PLA) ونقطة الوصول (CLA) في RKV؛ أما في الإصدار ١٣، فستتوفر مسارات نطاق C فوق جزر الكناري. كما سيتم إجراء فحص للملاحة الفلكية المدارية. لن يتم استخدام أي وقود للتحكم في وضعية الطائرة. هذا هو الت
لا تُلقِ باللوم علينا في مشاكل ال
로저, 복사했습
Roger. Konnt
패널
Esatto. Ok, andiamo a pagina 2-2 e cancelliamo le prime due rig
좋아요. 좋아요, 지상에 있는 모든 것들이
Хорошо, камера д
يبدو أننا سنضطر إلى استخدام تلك الحقيبة مرة
Хорошо. Похоже, что обычный голос может не сработать. В криогенных баках наблюдается довольно сильная дестратификация, особенно кислорода, и это заметно во время работы вентиляторов, поэтому мы обязательно напомним вам еще раз перемешать кислород перед началом работы. Все идет как часы. G&C сообщает нам, что количество топлива выглядит хорошо. Вы используете то же количество, что и прогнозировалось для вашего и для вашей юстировки.
Ремонт вентиляционног
Sie benötigen Stern 26, Erde naher Horizont, zwei Sätze; Stern 16, Erde ferner Horizont, einen Satz; u
Dans les sacs de données
留
هيوستن، أبولو 11. ماذا عن ابتكار أسلوب تواصل جيد نتبعه بين الآن ووقت
रॉजर। 
제미니 4, CSQ. 
こんにちは、
और हम आपसे स्वीकृति चाहते हैं। हमारे पास एक स्टेट वेक्टर अपलिंक है। और उसके बाद, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपन
Okay. Vuoi
...Вы, р
Break. Columbia, we see the NOUN 49. 
あなたを
Flight advises t
Роджер
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نوصيك بقبول المهمة رقم ٤٩. تابع تسلسل مشاهداتك، ثم سنقوم بتحليل ال
Роджер. Батарея адаптера 1 имеет напряжение 24,5 вольта, 1A — 7,0 ампер. Батарея адаптера D имеет напряжение 24 вольта и ток 6,8 ампер. Батарея 1C имеет напряжение 24 вольта и ток 6,9 ампер. Батарея 2A имеет напряжение 24 вольта и ток 8,5 ампер. Батарея 2B имеет напряжение 24 вольта и то
ジェミニ4号、CSQ。TCMのLOSを確認しました。ハワイにデルタ9実験データを送るよう指示しま
Roger. How's the pic
Sansibar, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Habt ihr meine Tre
D'accord, Frank, voici les prévisions météo. Elles annoncent des averses éparses à 2000 pieds et des ave
Roger, ti sento forte e chiaro. Ora vorrei che tu ti facessi sentire. Suggerisco di usare Pulse. Usa il minimo di carburante. Mentre ti muovi, esegui un altro
انطلق يا برج 
ठीक है, चौथी पंक्ति के नीचे, हमारे पास सभी क्वाड हीटर ब्रेकर हैं, सूट फैन 1। इसके नीचे, ग्लाइकॉल 1 और 2; और कॉम के नीचे, हमारे पास कमांडर ऑडियो इन, और s/, स्टैंडबाय, ऑपरेट हैं, और बस इतना ही। ठीक है, सबसे नीचे वाली पंक्ति में, हमारे पास बैट फीड टाई दोनों इन हैं, और हमारे पास क्रॉस टाई बैलेंस लोड्स इन, एक्स लूनर बस टाई, डिसेंट ईसीए कंट्रोल, डिस
Хорошо. В 4-й строке: в разделе НАГРЕВАТЕЛИ ваши четыре нагревателя должны быть закрыты, откройте ДИСПЛЕИ, откройте S-ДИАПАЗОННУЮ АНТЕННУ, откройте ПОСЛЕДОВАТЕЛЬНУЮ КАМЕРУ. Да
बज़ को उसकी टॉर्च वापस
Roger, Frank. Nous souhaitons vous informer de l'état de votre trajectoire. Le prochain virage intermédiaire s'avère très faible (0,7 pied par seconde) et nous préférons ne pas l'effectuer. Nos données sont excellentes et, en les extrapolant, le virage intermédiaire n° 4, prévu dans 8 heures, serait d'environ 4 pieds par seconde. Par ailleurs, la trajectoire de retour libre est très prometteuse, avec un point d'amerrissage au large des côtes africaines. Vous semblez donc être sur la bonne voie et nous vous proposons de ne pas 
Roger. Apollo Landmark n. 15 Rev 27. 08 52 5
キャビンの蒸気ベントは10度、スーツの蒸気ベントは62度です。もう少し温度を
Роджер. И, полагаю, отсюда следует, что ваш перигей сейчас тоже немного завышен; так что это вернет его — обратн
Go ahead, Houston. This is Apollo 8. Burn complete. Our orbit 160.9 by 
روجر. قبل حوالي 12 دقيقة من عملية النفخ الكبرى، يوجد منفذ صغير
휴스턴, 컬럼비아. 다시 말씀드리지만, 그를 볼 수 없었습니다. 자동 광학 장치가 당신이 알려주신 좌표와 매우 가까운 지점을 가리켰기에, 그 지역의 작은 분화구를 골라 표시해 두었습니다. 그래야 반복적인 데이터를 얻을 수 있을 
Wir sahen es, als es gerade dunkel wurde. Wir blieben die ganze Dunkelheit
C'est confirmé. Je vous maintiens en place avec le DAP, pour obtenir la zone morte. Quand vous serez prêt pour l'étalonnage AGS, je réduirai progressivement le fonctionnement de
Vorresti anch
알겠습니다. 잭, 지금 
罗杰……那是 01 12 08；Rev 1；西经 1
هيوستن، هذا هو مدير العمليات. قبل أن أخلد إلى النوم، هل يمكنك أن تعطيني نبذ
宁静，没错，我们正在努力保持。目前我们已经有
... द
Хорошо. Подключите кабели. Шаг 2, питание 1 A
It's very easy to spot. You can see the entire rims of the craters from
Хорошо. Это просто потребует измен
Verstehst du
We're considering leaving the water bags in the right aft box and not 
На первом из углов угол Джека составляет примерно минус 2 градуса, и 
I'11 try y
Okay. Bitte stellen Sie Ihren Event-Timer auf 15 Minuten ein, RKV übernimmt dann die Zä
Ou
И в топе это т
Eh bien, vous nous avez vrai
로저. 어댑터 배터리는 모두 암페어 2, 전압 24V를 나타내고 있습니다. RCS 링은 양호한
Fred a quitté la communication, Jac
Bene, Vance, è di nuovo il momento di
알겠습니다. 방송 중에는 
Okay. Than
Era proprio come me l'aspettavo, Joe. L'avevo messa lì in REACQ con i numeri impostati e, non app
你好，那霸，那霸救援队，这里是双子座8号。状态良好，正在快速下
D'accord. Côté couleurs, l'eau est d'un bleu roi; les nuages, bien sûr, sont d'un blanc éclatant; le reflet de la Terre est – semble – bien plus important que celui de la Lune. Les terres émergées présentent généralement une texture brunâtre, allant du brun foncé au brun clair. On distingue de nombreux tourbillons nuageux liés aux différentes cellules m
C'est Roger. C'est
Ok, abbiamo appena finito di farlo poco fa. A circa metà strada, sul lato
예,.
हाँ, डलास में लोग रो रहे हैं। बास्केटबॉल के नतीजे: ह्यूस्टन का प्रदर्शन इस सप्ताहांत अच्छा नहीं रहा। इलिनोइस ने ह्यूस्टन को 97-84 से हराया। और नॉर्थ कैरोलिना ने ओवल्स को 85-77 के स्कोर से मात दी। फ्रैंक, अखबार में ऑयलर्स के बारे में कुछ खबरें छपी थीं। ऑयलर्स ने जॉर्ज वेबस्टर को अपना सर्वश्रेष्ठ खिलाड़ी चुना और - हा
Roger, Frank. We're
Jim, if you're trying to transmit, you're completely u
Okay, Jack. What I just gave you now on the backout is the only thing that's order critical. From here on, you can go to the steps for initiating the procedure, and backtrack. In other words, you should go to each of the panels that I read up and put the circuit 
D'accord.
了解。キャビンエリアで排泄しないように警告さ
오케이 휴스턴. 닐도 마이크도 안 보이네. 그런데, 저 축과 회전
Roger, nous v
حسنًا يا فريد، كنا نشك في أنك قد حققت إنجازًا واحدًا على الأقل. لقد لاحظنا انخفاضًا ف
Okay. Ich bin wieder bei meiner alten Einstellung und warte ab, bis sich die Kurse wieder normalisieren. Geben 
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。あと2分です。向こう側は80 33 21です。月の裏側から出てきたら、フレンドリーなホワイトチームが
गति 
Gemini VIII, Хьюстон. После Retrofire связь с нами прекратится. Возможно, мы сможем связаться с вами через CSQ после отключения электроэнергии.
Хорошо, Уолли, сообщи мне температуру в салоне и температуру в кабине. А также, пожалуйста, укажи настройки регулятора потока воз
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们想再用录音机录
Roger. Compris. Léger lacet à gauche. Vous commencez à faibl
わかりました。「初期化」で最初に行うことは、サーキットブレーカーを2つ
ठीक है। जेमिनी VI विमानवाहक पोत से हमें आपके रडार 
Tatsächlich, Vance, was du da siehst, sind feste Wassertropfen, die fast ständig austreten. Sie erhellen den gesamten Himmel um den Mond. Sie sin
Yes, I tightened down all the plugs and checked all the leads, and everything looked in order. And when the other fellows wake up, if you remind me, why, I'll give it a more
TVC 서보 전원 1에
Я вас прекрасно понимаю. Жди
ヒュ
Okay. Panel 16, top row, we want to close QUAD 1 through 4 TCA breakers, and you're saying the other three rows are as is. Again, I have t
13, this is Houston. We'd like you to give us a survey of your displays on MDCs 1 and 2. Give us gage readings a
Okay,. We got your Gemini load. We could not get TR in. We got a spacecraft reject on TR, and it did go in at this time. I'd like to give you a hack on TR at 39:30
A Reno, in Nevada, poiché non c'è un camino in casa, un bambino ha scritto a Babbo Natale sul giornale locale e gli ha suggerito: "Per favore, potresti usare la porta d'ingresso? Dovrai dare un piccolo calcio al fondo perché si appiccica". A Little Rock, in Arkansas, i bambini nati al St. Vincent Infirmary durante la settimana prima di Natale e fino al giorno di Natale vengono consegnati alle loro madri al momento delle dimissioni in enormi calze rosse 
答えはただ一つ、燃料量が
Guaym
제미니 4, 여기는 휴스턴 CAP COM입니다. 당신의 메시지는 읽지 않겠습니다. 11-BRAVO를 다시 한번 블라인드 테스트
Tranquillité, Houst
15～20ステップくらいかな、ジャック。一部は中身が入ってるけ
روجر. إ
Ricevuto. Questo significa che devo attivare la retrosequenza. Giu
Apollo 11, Houston. Siamo davvero colpiti dalla nitidezza e dal dettaglio dell'immagine. I colori sono... ora, è davvero un'immagine eccellente ora che la guardo sul nostro monitor, che impiega circa 12 secondi prima che le reti possano trasmetterla grazie alla conversione che abbiamo qui sul nostro convertitore TV. Stiamo guardando i comandi nell
Ich glaube Ihnen das, aber SPS, ECS und
Fred, circa un quarto del nostro schermo è illuminato ed è imposs
О боже, верните мне камеру. Здесь огромный, великолепный кратер. Жаль, что у нас нет другого объектива,
فريد، هل تلقيت أي إنذارات رئيسية هناك قبل حو
Das ist großartig, fanta
わかりました、ジョー。ここに「-1A」という新しいページを作成し
Okay. Ich werde Ihnen einen R-Wer
Et, Housto
E proprio in questa zona ci sono due crateri. Que
はい、燃えてい
حسناً يا جاك، هل أ
रॉजर। बैंक बी को शामिल करते ही हमें एक झटका महसूस हुआ, झटका नहीं, बल्कि अतिरिक्त बल का 
11, ici Houston. Nous ne recevons
ومن الأمور الرائعة يا جاك، خاصةً بالنسبة لشخص مبتدئ مثلي، سهولة الحركة هنا. وكما تعلم من عملك في محاكي وحدة القيادة، فإن انعدام الجاذبية يُعدّ ميزةً كبيرة. لأنك تشعر بضيق المساحة عند مستوى جاذبية واحد، ما يجعل الحركة صعبةً للغاية، بينما الحركة سهلة في هذه البيئة. وكما ترى، كان المكان نظيفًا، وجدتُ بعض الحلقات المعدنية المفكوكة، وغطاءً بلاستيكيًا صغيرًا لكاميرا التسلسل كان قد انفصل ووجدته عالقًا بجوار لوحة ED. حسنًا. الآن، يقف جيم أسفل ما يبدو أنه علبة. ولتوضيح الأمر للجميع، يوجد داخل هذه العلبة محرك الصعود، حيث يمكنك رؤية يدي موضوعةً فوقه الآن، وهو المحرك الذي نستخدمه للانطلاق من القمر. بجوار غطاء المحرك مباشرةً، أضع يدي الآن على صندوق أبيض سبق عرضه. هذا الصندوق هو حقيبة جيم، أو حقيبة الظهر التي ستزودنا بالأكسجين والماء للتبريد أثناء وجودنا على سطح القمر. نأمل أن نستخدم هذا الجهاز لمدة أربع ساعات مُخطط لها، وربما تصل إلى خمس ساعات. خلفه مباشرةً، توجد
Das Loch ist zwar nicht
13, wir haben noch eine Sache für Sie, we
Roger, bereitmachen. Bereit für den Tower. Treibstoffstand ist gut. Saue
Okay, alles
Роджер. Майк, я думаю, мы можем объяснить эту скорость в семь десятых. Когда мы — в первый раз, знаете, мы не смогли пройти через это, поэтому у нас была большая ошибка между нашим фактическим CDU и желаемым CDU при крене. И в этой ситуации — транспортное средство будет крениться — будет маневрировать, скорее, со скорост
Bene, adesso
我将进行一
Ajouter 6 
C4 बंद है; B3 बंद है। ट्रांसपोंडर हीटर से जुड़ा ह
好的。R1 加 27210，R2 加 35570，R3 加 33010。第二项，如你所知，由于需要进行两次“前进”操作；而且，鉴于你的态度，再次提醒你，这不会让你回到狭窄的死区。要回到 1.40 度的死区，你必须使用我给你的步骤，即：NOUN 01，E
Ok, ventola cabina accesa. 
11,
Да, я затянул все свечи и проверил все провода
Et je vais dormir. On avance à l'
قراءة ف
On page 28, step - perform step 4 with the following changes in the warning light status. Under the warning lights, you will probably - you will have ASCENT PRESSURE and an light. Scratch " A and B REG." Under caution ligh
わかりました、アクエリアスさん。これからやることを説明します。X軸を北か南に向けます。これがX軸の正方向です。X軸の正方向を南に向ける方が近いようです。電源を入れた状態で、を使って操作してください。その後、電力を節約するために電源を切ることを提案します。ただ
Z Cal이 여기로 뛰어내려 
Okay. Die Temperaturanzeige Ihres Servicemoduls für Quad Bravo zeigt einen etwas niedrigen Wert an. Sie liegt etw
Понял. Капитан просит вас с
حسنًا، ضغط المقصورة لا يزال ثابتًا عند 5.5. وهو كذلك منذ مغادرتنا. درجة حرارة المقصورة 90%، والرطوبة النسبية عادت للارتفاع إلى حوالي 36%، وكمية سائل ال
कोलंबिया, ये ह्य
Gemini 4, ici Houston CAP CO
好的。我们还有一
Es gibt sie, und ich we
D'accord, ça a l'air bi
यह बेहतर है। आगे बढ़ो
Ken, peux-tu nous fa
شكرً
Okay, Fred. Dies ist eine Anleitung zum Auslesen der Temperaturen des Treibstofftanks für den Abstieg. Es ist kein großes Problem, aber unsere Leute meinen, dass sich die Unterseite der Abstiegsstufe wahrscheinlich abkühlt, und wir möchten nur sichergehen, dass der Wassertank für den Abstieg in Ordnung ist. Im Moment sieht es so aus, als würde er erst einige Stunden nach der Entleerung einfrieren, aber wir möchten, dass du uns diese Temperaturen durchliest, damit wir sehen könn
Okay. Delete
मैं अब VOX ट्रांसमिट पर वापस आ गया हूँ। क्या तुम सुन रहे हो, डीके? 
Водолей, Хьюстон. Выключи эт
Oui, je veux savoir à quelle 
Installation du rideau anti-éclaboussures, du déflecteur d'air, poignée de recirculation d'air cabine vers le haut. Poignée du tuba gauche vers le haut, poignée de ventilation cabine vers le haut. Gâchette d'ouverture de la trappe relâchée. Vérifier que le joint d'étanchéi
27 
Cape. Come leggi
Хорошо. И именно там я и был. КОМАНДНЫЙ МОДУЛЬ ТОПЛИВА 2, центр, включено, вверх; Обратная связь по ТОПЛИВУ, два, серый; СЕРВИСНЫЙ МОДУЛЬ ДАВЛЕНИЯ ВТОРИЧНОГО ТОПЛИВА, четыре, центр, и ЗАКРЫТО; АВТО, ВЫКЛ; КОМАНДНЫЙ МОДУЛЬ/ФИНАЛЬНОЕ ОТДЕЛЕНИЕ, два, выключено; КОМАНДНЫЙ МОДУЛЬ/СЕРВИСНЫЙ МОДУЛЬ ОТДЕЛЕНИЕ, два, вниз; / ОТДЕЛЕНИЕ, выключено, вниз, защищено; СБРОС ТОПЛИВА В КОМАНДУ; 2 ДВИГАТЕЛЬ ВЫКЛЮЧЕН и НИЗКИЕ РАСХОДЫ
Roger. Step number 2, attach the filter holder to the lens with the tape on the top and
Роджер. При такой хорошей видимости и такой хорошей связи мы просто дадим вам словесное описание, не видя сейчас сканирующий телескоп. Ваши углы маневрирования для наблюдения Арктура были довольно удачными. Я центрировал Арктур ​​в сканирующем телескопе. При таком угле наклона Солнца луч света проходит прямо через центр сканирующего телескопа и — полоса света. Это исключает возможность наблюдения множества звезд вокруг нас, и хотя я уже некоторое время не отрывал глаз от телескопа, очень трудно увидеть какие-либо звездные узоры или что-либо еще. Я не смог 
肯，这
Oh, è vero? Sono contento che
さて、CABI
Джим, мертвая зона и так хороша. Она составляет 5 градусов
Ho ancora questa sensazione, potrei facilmente avere la sensazione di cadere sull
Roger, wir werden danach Ausschau halten. Das ist wirklich gut; wir werden danach suchen, aber nicht so viel Treibstoff verbrauchen. Jim scheint ziemlich gut abgesoffen zu sei
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Д
حسنًا. جيد جدًا يا فانس. سأعطي
لديّ بعض الملاحظات يا جيم. أولًا، وقت إغلاق فتحة تهوية تخزين النفايات هو [الوقت]. إذا خلدتَ إلى النوم قبل ذلك الوقت، فلا بأس من إغلاقها قبل ذلك الوقت مباشرةً قبل أن تخلد إلى النوم. ثانيًا، لدينا بعض النتائج المتعلقة بـ [البيانات]، وإذا كان جاك مهتمًا، فيمكننا تزويده بالارتفاعات المصححة
Es war definitiv unter mir. Ich hatte es seit etwa Carnarvon unter mir verfolgt. Bis Carnarvon war es unter uns, dann bis zum Horizont und dann wieder unter uns. Es sah fast so aus, als befände es sich in einer anderen Umlaufbahn als ich. Es hatte einen anderen Apogäum und Perigäum als ich. Jedenfalls versuchte ich, mich ihm bei Tagesanbruch anzunähern, sobald ich seine Position bestimmen konnte. Wie gesagt, zu diesem Zeitpunkt war es ein bis zwei Meilen vor mir – unter mir. Je mehr ich versuchte, mich anzunähern, desto weniger Abstand gewann ich. Ich zündete die Triebwerke in Richtung Gegengeschwindigkeit. Ich zündete meine oberen Triebwerke so, d
제미니 8호, 여기
You don't have a lens cover on th
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हमने पहला परीक्षण पूरा कर लिया है, और अब हम अपलिंक मोड को अपलिंक कमांड एंड रेंजिंग में बदलने जा रहे हैं, और हम अपवॉइस का उपयोग नहीं करेंगे। हम इस मोड में ढाई मिनट तक रहेंगे और एक परीक्षण संदेश भेजेंगे। इसका आपके कंप्यूटर या पैनल स्विच कॉन्फ़िगरेशन पर कोई प्रभाव नहीं पड़ेगा। आपको ब्रेक लॉक से संबंध
지금은 위치를 다시 파악하는 데 도움이 될지 확인하기 위해 3000초 모드로 비행하고 있습니다. 대략적으로, 달의 위치를 ​​기준으로 제가
Sono iscritto a FORWARD OMNI. Sono iscritto a FORWARD OMNI
ठीक है। मैं बस आपको इस बात से अवगत कराना चाहता था और इस पर विचार करना चाहता था कि उड़ान योजना पर इसके क्या प्रभाव पड़ सकते हैं। मैं इस वाइड एंगल वीडियो को चलाकर चंद्रमा के बारे में टिप्पणी करूँगा और देखूँगा कि उनके अनुसार कौन से खंड सबसे उपयुक्त होंगे। ठीक है। स्क्रॉल पर, फ्रैंक चाहते थे कि हम प्रवेश प्रोफ़ाइल के क्रम की पुष्टि करें, और जो पहली प्रोफ़ाइल दिखाई देगी, उसे "नॉनएक्ज़िट नंबर 2" के रूप में चिह्नित किया गया है, जो अल्प-श्रेणी उच्च-गति प्रवेश है। दूसरी प्रोफ़ाइल जो दिखाई देगी, उसका शीर्षक "3500 मील" है, जो भी उच्च-गति प्रवेश है, लेकिन इसका उपयोग तब किया जाएगा जब हम लंबी दूरी की प्रवेश सीमा पर जाएँगे। फिर तीसरी प्रोफ़ाइल "नॉनएक्ज़िट एंट्री नंबर 1" होगी, और इसके बाद चौथी 3500 मील की प्रोफ़ाइल होगी। तो आपके पास चार प्रवेश प्रोफ़ाइल हैं। नंबर 1 और 3, जैसे ही आप उन पर पहुँचेंगे, अल्प-श्रेणी की हैं, और नंबर 2 और 4 लंबी दूरी की स्क्रॉल हैं। कोल्डसोक के बारे में, मुझे लगता है कि हमने इस बारे में बात की थी कि हम वहाँ क्या करने वाले हैं, लेकिन लगभग एक घंटे के भीतर, हम कोल्डसोक प्रक्रिया शुरू करना चाहेंगे। हम निश्चित रूप से इसे 12 बजे नहीं करना चाहते। ट्रैजेक्टरी टीम से ब
C'est confirmé. Oui. C'est le seul 4 sur cette page 24 et c'est un - actuellement suivi de SYSTEM A/B-2, QUADs, 4, à AUTO. En dessou
Derselbe Kerl, der heute Nachmittag schon wieder
휴스턴, DO
Friendsh
Du würdest es nicht glauben, aber ich habe jetzt das Kommando über die... Okay. Vance, ich bin wahrscheinlich der einzige CMP, der jemals einen Brand auf d
Хьюстон, Спокойствие. О
吉
Близнецы VIII, это Хьюстон. Отвечать необязательно. Мы готовы предоставит
いいえ。そんなことは全く
瓜伊马斯。
قلها مرة أخر
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。如果你决定在2号轨道上进行正面转向，记
休斯
ठीक है। यहाँ एक नोट है जिसमें लिखा है कि कैमरे के ऊपर वाले डोवेटेल का इस्तेमाल करें, न कि साइड वाले डोवेटेल का। ब्रैकेट पर माउंट करन
了解しました。月に近いコースでのオンボードトラッキングの価値、特に月に近いトラッキ
Ich ha
حسنًا. لقد راجعنا معظم الكتاب هن
Schade, dass ich nur noch knapp eine halbe Stunde Zeit habe, um damit zu experimentieren. Ich stelle jetzt auf Fly-by-Wire Low um. Gyros deaktiviert, um die Nase zu senken und das Durban-Leuchtfeuer zu beobachten. Gyros deaktiviert, Fly-by-Wire Low, Korrektur, ich stelle jetzt auf manuelle Proportionalsteuerung um. Ich habe noch keine Tarife berechnet, also gehe ich zurück zu Clean. Weiter zur Tarifsteuerung. Manuelle Proportionalsteuerung deaktivie
Ok. I qua
Bene. Houston, qui A
La bande d'étoiles claires semble – les étoiles juste autour de 
Ok. Iniziamo con lo spurgo delle celle a combustibile mentre mangiamo. Sostituzione della bombola di CO2 numero 6; controllo del flusso del radiatore secondario; copia di alcune pastiglie. Inoltre, a 72 ore, ferma il 
准备好在时
지
روجر، هيوستن. حصلنا على 4 / 45695، -053 +141، +30627، -00625، +00577 180 018 001، غير متوفر، +00188 30639 256 30452 40 2730 396 033، هبوط 030، يسار 19، +0858، -16500، +12960، +36195؛ سيريوس، ريجل، 129 155 010، مربعان، 20 ثان
حسنًا
Der Blitz sieht eher wie ein großer Fleck
शेविंग
Давайте больше не будем расх
嘿，休斯顿；水瓶座。在DOWN VO
Находясь в том месте, где он
好的。请问有什么快速简便的方法可以做到这一点吗
阿波罗8
I 
それほどではありません。最初の2インチくらいまでは特に問題なく打ち込めました。それから、できるだけ力一杯打ち込んでいくと、2回目は両手でハンマーを握り、延長ロッドの上部にかなり大きなへこみをつけてしまいました。それで、それ以上は…全体の深さはおそらく8インチか9インチくらいだっ
물병자리입니다, 휴스턴. 
Bene. Riduciamo tutto a "404 più zero" ed eseguiamo q
Lo chiedo. Non ero sicuro di averlo copiat
それは液体のフロンかネオンか、あるいは冷赤外線実験から得
Roger, Apollo 11. Pas de problème. On se v
And, Houston? Buzz here. I'm sh
Хорошо. Ретро... пиротехнические эффекты для ЗАК
Roger. *** Brennsto
حسنًا. قبل أن تُخرج كتاب الخرائط، لدى فنيي الاتصالات في هيوستن كلمةٌ قصيرةٌ لأحد موظفي الاتصالات السابقين في برنامج CAP. يقولون إنهم يعتبرونك في قسم الاتصالات غ
Donn
حسناً. هل لديك مجموعة ORDEAL 
Bien, et si vous tournez la page sur la puissance 8, vous trouverez les fonctions restantes du vaisseau spatial. Nous avons une transmission TM à faible débit. Cependant, nous n'avons pas de VHF. Nous avons des pompes à glycol, des ventilateurs de combinaison et la dépressurisation de la cabine. Veuillez patienter dans le système de contrôle d'attitude. Dans ce dernier, nous aurons des dispositifs de sécurité pour les situations d'urgence. Pour une utilisation normale, nous prévoyons un délai de 15 minutes pour que les résistances chauffantes se mettent en marche et les préchauffent avant utili
Род
हमने अभी-अभी एक डिब्बाबं
क्या आप चाहते हैं कि 
मै
حسنًا. ماذا بعد
알겠습니다. 무전기 상태 확인만 부탁드리고, 가능하시다면 BIOMED 스위치를
منطقة التعافي الاحتياطية الخاصة بك (2 برا
네. 좋아요, 그럼… AP
حسنًا. لا يوجد الكثير من الأخبار هذا الصباح. الأمور هادئة نوعًا ما. أعتقد أن الخبر الأبرز
我不知道，但它
Roger. We're looking at them. We'll give you the GO on them. Okay, Aquarius. Your quads are 120 to 133 now, so you're cleared 
एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 36639; आपका, माइनस 072, प्लस 051; आपका, 135 24 4000;, प्लस 32178, प्लस 06036, माइनस 01304
فريندشيب سفن، هذه كاناري كابكوم. محول الطاقة الخاص بك ذو 150 
ठीक है; एकदम बढ़िया। अब डिब्बे के निचले हिस्से के चारों ओर शायद कुछ इंच अतिरिक्त थैला बाहर निकला हुआ है। इसे नीचे की जाली से चिपकने से रोकने के लिए, कृपया इसे कैंची से काट दें। ऐसा करने के बाद, लगभग 12 इंच लंबी टेप की दो और पट्टियाँ काटें, उन्हें लंबाई में फाड़कर 12 इंच लंबी और 1/2 इंच चौड़ी चार पट
双子座六号，卡那封。您可以将低温开关拨到“关
أصف الشريط الأزرق. هناك شريط أزرق داكن نسبيًا على سطح الأرض، وشريط أزرق فاتح، وشريط أزرق داكن آخر، وشريط أبيض عريض هو توهج الهواء، ثم شر
حسنًا. تتبع المعلم 130 الرئيسي باستخدام هذا، وللعلم، سيؤدي هذا إلى تحديد موقع جهاز 
Continuing what I was debriefing about the booster, early in the flight. After we entered the darkness, at what I consider to be a distance of 1200 feet, I tried station-keeping with it, but the only thing I had to judge my distance from the booster at that time was the distance between the flashing lights. Occasionally they would - not occasionally, but continually, I would see one light, then two lights, and then one light, and then sometimes there'd be a long time before I'd see two lights - indicating that the booster was rotating all the time. I really didn't have too much of a clue as to which way it was going. Based on the distance between the lights, when I could see both of them, I felt that I was in a real good position with it until we got to about Carnarvon. At that time I seemed to be closing rather rapidly, although I couldn't really be sure of this. All the ΔV I'd added up to that time had been in the direction of the booster, or retrograde. Unfortunately, the darned booster would get in position such that if I were going to close on it, I would have to apply a posigrade to close, which then, in turn, caused me to once again depart from it after a period of time had gone by. Then with the 45 - 40 minutes of darkness, I really had a difficult time telling where I was. As we came out of the darkness, the booster was below me and pulling away from me quite rapidly. Ed, how far away below us d
J'ai effectué un contrôle électrique. Nous avons rencontré des problèmes de communication pendant la traversée. Tous les systèmes f
सब कैसा 
Stellen Sie Ihren
حسنًا. لا أعرف ما إذا كان بإمكاننا الاستمرار ف
Нет (смех)
سيجما سفن، سيجما سفن، هذه شركة بي سي إس كوم تك، بي سي إس كوم تك. 
Roger. Können Sie bitte bestätigen, dass der Schalter für das Landekissen ausgescha
हाँ, लेकिन मुझे यह पसंद 
Negative, very close. I bac
Мы подумали, что вам, в
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप 00 दबाकर स्
好的。在 250 号面板上：断路器 BATTERY A POWER E
Okay. Aline..
Roger, Jack, me dit que tout cela ne concerne qu'un seul disjoncteur, et que le
Bene. Riprendendo la stella boresight, è il vecchio Dzuba la stella centrale nella testa dello Scorpione; è giù 060, a sinistra 42, più 0773, meno 16500 12982 36256. Le stelle a nord rimangono Sirio, Rigel, rollio 129, beccheggio 155, imbardata 010; ullage a quattro quadranti di 15 secondi, orizzonte su u
أنا عند أسفل السلم. لا تتجاوز المسا
Diese Tracking-Aufgabe wird
カノ、ジェミニ4
좋아요, 
Questa trasmissione vi arriva approssimativamente a metà strada tra la Luna e la Terra. Siamo in volo da 31 ore e circa 20 minuti. Mancano meno di 40 ore alla Luna. Potete vedere che Bill ha qui il suo spazzolino da denti. Si è lavato i denti regolarmente. Per mostrarvi come le cose fluttuano in assenza di gravità. Sembra che giochi per gli Astros, per come cerca di catturare quelle cose. Vorrei tanto che potessimo mostrarvi la Terra. È una vista bel
ところで、ジャック、ジン
Okay. Noch etwas: Wenn der Stromausfall beginnt (ca. 05g), können Sie dies in Ihrer Checkliste notieren, sobald die Kommunikation abbricht. Schalten Sie dann den Stromkreisunterbrechungsschutz (POP OFF) und den PMP-Stromkreisunterbrechungsschutz (POP OFF) aus. Dies sollte erfolgen, sobald die Ko
ठीक है। उड़ान योजना में हम इस पर विचार इसलिए कर रहे थे, क्योंकि अगर आप पलटकर सीधे ऊपर की ओर उड़ान भरना चाहते हैं, तो हम बिल को कुछ नई फिल्म सेटिंग्स वगैरह देकर उनकी फोटोग्राफी को और बेहतर बनाने में मदद कर 
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हमारे परीक्षण का अगला भाग वैसा ही है जैसा हमने कल किया था; हम अपलिंक मोड को अपलिंक कमांड और रेंजिंग मोड में बदलेंगे, जिसमें अपवॉयस नहीं होगा। हम लगभग ढाई मिनट तक इस मोड में रहेंगे और दो परीक्षण संदेश भेजेंगे। इस दौरान, हमारे पास अपलिंक न
西格玛七
Vom Mond aus sind wir 
着陆气囊已关闭。紧急逆向启动已关闭。紧急减速伞展开已关闭
Ricevuto. Ho e
المدفأة مطفأ
罗杰。来自公共事务办公室的最新消息：阿波罗11号仍然是全球新闻的焦点。只有四个国家——共产主义中国、朝鲜、北越和阿尔巴尼亚——尚未向其公民通报您的登月飞行和登月。一位记者表示，他已经找不到合适的词语来形容您的成功。今晚，尼克松总统计划在华盛顿观看全明星棒球赛。赛后，他将前往太平洋回收区。周三晚上，他将从约翰斯顿岛乘直升机前往海军通信舰“阿灵顿”号。周四早上，他将再次登上直升机，飞往“大黄蜂”号，以便及时观看您的溅落。陪同总统的有国务卿威廉·罗杰斯和弗兰克·博尔曼。他们将与太平洋舰队司令约翰·西德尼·麦凯恩海军上将一起在回收舰的舰桥上观看溅落。总统在“大黄蜂”号上的停留结束后，将启程前往亚洲访问，并按计划访问
Regardez-le maintenant
ठीक है। और मैंने अभी तक तापमान की लाइट बंद नहीं की है। क्या आप चाहते है
好的。008:00，7835，减去165，
Ok, equipaggio. L'unica altra cosa che ho per voi in questo momento è un aggiornamento sulla vostra piattaforma di lancio per il decollo più 35. Si tratta di una modifica alla piattaforma che vi abbiamo dato ieri. Il motivo dell'aggiornamento è per evitare le condizioni meteorologiche nella zona di atterraggio del Pacifico centrale al
조, 있잖아, 무슨 말이냐면, 앞차가 비행운을 남기면서 가는 뒤에 바짝 붙어
هيوستن، أبو
Okay, Vance. Dici di aver apportato alcune modifiche alle proce
저는 5번 창밖으로 보이는 것을 보고 있는데, 아주 좁은 띠 모양으로 두 개의 연기가 뻗어 나오는 것 같습니다. 폭은 약 3도 정도 되는 것 같고요. 그리고 그보다 밀도가 낮은 띠가 하늘을
R
好了，开始吧。电子设备电源，关闭……
ठीक है। मुझे अब संचार बंद करना होगा; मैं जैक को हेडसेट लाने देता हूँ
नहीं। ठीक है। मैं आपके रक्तचाप की समीक्षा करना चाहूँगा। पानी में उतरने के बाद ही आपको एडाप्टर लगाना है। एड ने इसे पहले ही लगा लिया है, और डेटा से यह स्पष्ट है। उसे रेट्रो के बाद एक रक्तचाप लेना है, फिर लगाम लगाने से पहले पैराश
Penso che questo qui sia altrettanto livellato
イーグル、ヒューストン。
मुझे चक्कर आ रहे हैं, गोल-गोल घूमते-घूमते। देखो, मेरी
Apollo 8, 
رو
बहुत बढ़िया। हम आपको यहाँ ज़मीन पर GO दिखाते हैं और मेरे प
Okay. Sie können jetzt mit de
Роджер. Уотертаунский технический кол
Хорошо, Хьюстон; 13. У нас есть разрешение на использование пиротехничес
ह
不是，但我
Roger, 07:56 Uhr werden wir nördlich der Bodenbahn Taifun Babe seh
Bene. Va molto meglio, e immaginiamo che il problema alla batteria fosse dovuto semplicemente all'interruttore termico che ha attivato un malfunzio
Columbia, Ea
카메라는
OK, zone de manœuvre, objectif: survol, /G&N; 63385; + 0,97, - 0,23; + 0212,7, - 0141,7, - 0254,8; 148, 316, 050; NA, + 0022,5; 0360,9, 0:53, 0356,3; 33, 352,7, 15,0; NA, NA, NA. Latitude: -23,26, -165,00; 1147,7, 36172; 166:54:02. Commentaires: étoiles alignées 31 (Arcturus) et 23 (Denebola). R: 288°, tangage: 205°, lacet: 034°; tonneau: aucun. Autre, la brûlure est réduite. Poids:
...ist das optio
هذا ما توقعناه. هو وأصواته الأربعون أل
로저. 거
Заправка 15% для автоматической коробки передач. Я указываю 7% для меха
روجر،
こんにちは、
켄, 이 슈트 열교환기의 작동 방식이 조금 다른 두 가지 이유가 있습니다. 하나는 콜드소크(coldsoak)를 하지 않는다는 것이고, 다른 하나는 2차 루프의 전원을 먼저 끄는 
كولومبيا، كولومبيا، هذه هيوس
D'accord. Étape 1; test 1: attendez 5 secondes. 5 secondes. Mode automatique activé. OK – tous les voyants sont éteints; la plage est à zéro. Je vais maintena
콜롬비아는 높
रॉजर। GET B 1 34 37; डेल्टा-V, 2.9; बर्न टाइम, 0 प्लस 05; यॉ 0, पिच 0; एड्रेस 25, 90029; एड्रेस 26, सभी शून्य; एड्रेस 27, सभी शून्य; थ्रस्ट
Запись разговора, сделанная во время пролета над Тананаривом в этот период, в настоящее время недоступна. Технический специалист связи Тананарива сообщил в Хьюстоне в 7
जेमिनी VI, ह्यूस्टन। अभी आपकी स्थिति बहुत कमजोर है। क्या आप अपना अप
了解。11、/：45597、0 - 訂正 - マイナス040、プラス157、プラス36325、マイナス01727
대기하세요. 휴스턴 이
Roger. Se puoi d
H2O2を排出中です。スイッチヒューズをオンにしました。待機しています。リカバリーアームは「アーム」です。メインシュートを待機しています。スイッチは全て正しい位置にあります。手動燃料はほぼ空になりました。メインシュートも出ました。美しいですね。明るい青空です。リーフも解除され、まるでお菓子のパイのようです。自動燃料が排出されています。降
D'accord. Et Houston, tu as des conseils à me d
Да, сэр, мне кажется, меня пересыхает от кислорода. У меня действительно пошла кровь из носа... после
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। कंप्यूटर आपका है, और अब आप एंटर दबा स
Jack, wait a
Per
Okay. Proceeding on down below the, to the PROCEED, insert, ENTER, after the PROCEED. And that would 
All right. This is - Sigma Seven - this is Cal. We have your change on of ,
Okay. 
हवाई कैप कॉम। क्या आप मुझे यूएचएफ पर सुन सकते हैं? ठीक है। एचएफ पर स्विच कर रहा हूँ। वार्म अप के लिए त
ジム、了解
Apollo 11, Houston. Si vous nous lisez, veuillez tenter une acquisition en mode gain élevé. Nous rencontrons des difficultés pou
Питание регулятора вращения, нормаль
Stand by. What di
Ok. Li leggerò velocemente prima qui così ti farai un'idea generale. pad, assetto del modulo di servizio JETT, assetto di osservazione della Luna, assetto di osservazione del Sole e assetto JETT. I pad sono angoli lineari approssimativi per gli atteggiamenti durante 
Roger, Jack. Les émanations semblent vraiment… Je l'ai signalé plus tôt, j'ai aussi aperçu le gros morceau passer et avant notre… combustion… Les émanations que vous voyez maintenant sont beaucoup plus importantes… est passé en mode sombre, on pouvait facilement distinguer les ét
Okay. Mike, was passiert ist – du saßest da und hast alles überwacht, und in Schritt 7 bist du zu NOUN 01 gegangen, hast 
콜럼비아. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 좌
네. 그 띠들은 멕시코 남부 바로 남쪽, 아마도 중앙아메리카를 가로지릅니다. 그 띠가 바로 우리가
まだ銘板を読んでいない方のために、このロケットの前部着陸装置に取り付けられている銘板を読んでみましょう。まず、地球の両半球をそれぞれ表
阿波罗11号，阿波罗11号，这里
Секунду, Гас, я пыт
I think our wobble is growing worse. The Earth now is really up to the top of the window. I have to get way down almost to
分かりました。では、じっと待ちましょう。良い準備ができました。あなたが何かを入力するまで待って、それから、もちろん、それに合わせて調整
Роджер. Удалить минус MA/NC-1
Apollo 8, ici Houston. J'ai quelques nouvelles et rep
Roger. Questa è Friendship Seven. Sto usando il fly-by-wire per poter controllare il velivolo con maggiore precisione. Ha iniziato a muoversi appena arrivato a Guaymas e sembra che si sposti in imbardata, verso
आपकी ट्रांसमिशन क्ष
لديّ أمران نرغب أن يقوم بهما جاك في وحدة التحكم لتخفيف الحمل على الدائرة الرئيسية A. أولهما هو التحقق من مفتاح سخان CM/RCS أو
Nur mal so als interessante Anmerkung zu dieser Docking-Konfiguration: Die Dockingsonde des Kommandomoduls befindet sich genau in der Mitte – genauer gesagt, die Dockingleuc
Okay, nach BAT 2, LOW VOLTAGE, OFF/RESET, dann ON, warte ich auf ein GO, bevor ich fortfah
네. 원하시면 망원경 정렬을 시도해 보실 수 있습니다. 육분의 별은 여전히 ​​괜찮지만,
58 w
好的。不过我非常怀疑，如果
ジェミニ VI、カーナボン CAP C
You are full-scale - Beautiful! - That's a beautiful re
이제 시스템 현황에 대한 개요를 설명해 드릴 준비를 하고 있습니다. 모든 최종 단계를 검토하고 있으며, 향후 전망과 시스템 정보에 대해 저희가 파
了解。マイナス1分で「マスターアーム、オン」を消します。マイナス35秒で最初の2行を消します。マイナス10秒で「マイナス9秒」に変更します。つまり、「マイナス9秒」の時点では「手動アレージ」になります。2秒で「モード、フリー」を消して、「ACA デテント解除」を消します。「イグニッション」の後のプラス1秒で「アレージ終了
没错。我刚才利用月亮锁定了目标。我会给你做个简短的报告。我这就出发……
알겠습니다. 번역 확인은 2시 17분, 즉 7분
Anche noi ti sentiamo forte e chiaro, Bill. Il problema qui sopra Honeysuckle è stato a terra. L'equipaggiamento della tua navicella spaziale funziona perfettamente. Ci vediamo tra circa un minuto e ti verremo a prendere sopra Guaymas a
That's right, Jack, and what this - what we're planning to do in order to conserve power is we're going to run the suit compressor from an hour to this point at minus 40. And we'll be watching the PC
Okay. Proceeding on to step, correction, page 3, checkout. Step 1, perform step 1. Warning lights will be ASCENT PRESS, CES AC, and CES DC. Under the caution lights, we may have a heater light. And that's all. Okay, perform - under the ci
제가 처음 생각했던 15.2보다 14시간 비행 후 항로에 접근하기 위해 
Wir besprechen zwei Punkte, aber wir haben sie im Mom
ठीक है। एमएससी-2 और -3, 03:
Panel 5: CB, ABWASSER-/URIN-ENTSORGUNGSHEIZUNGEN, zwei, zum 
खेल जगत की बात करें तो, चलिए देखते हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों में जब आप व्यस्त थे, तब जो नामाथ और फुटबॉल कमिश्नर पीट रोज़ेल ने घोषणा की कि "ब्रॉडवे जो" ने बैचलर्स III रेस्टोरेंट में अपनी हिस्सेदारी बेचने और न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स में शामिल होने पर सहमति जताई है। जो आज जेट्स के ट्रेनिंग कैंप में पहुंचे और उन्होंने अपना पहला अभ्यास सत्र किया। जो के साथ कई अन्य जेट्स खिलाड़ी भी शामिल हुए, जिन्होंने पहले विरोध किया था। और जैक्सन, मिशिगन के डेवी हिल ने पिछले सप्ताह अपने तीसरे मेजर गोल्फ टूर्नामेंट में जीत हासिल की। ​​उन्होंने फिलाडेल्फिया क्लासिक जीता। हिल इस साल अब तक चार टूर्नामेंट जीत चुके हैं और 129,000 डॉलर की शानदार जीत के साथ इस साल सबसे ज्यादा पुरस्कार जीतने वाले खिलाड़ी हैं। बेसबॉल की 
Okay, Jim. Wir überlegen noch, wie wir die Korrektur durchführen können, aber einige unserer Überlegungen lassen uns vermuten, dass wir sie bis zu 118 St
Non è un problema di tempo per consegnartelo. È solo che, prima 
الأمر صعب بعض الشيء هنا يا جاك، الدخول إلى الأرجوحة في انعدام الجاذبية. لست متأكداً مما إذا كنت أطفو
Jim, während wir darauf warten, ob weitere Fragen auftauchen, möchte ich dir die vorläufige Analyse der Be
わかりま
Интересно отметить, что мое положение — и положение самолета — примерно такое: тангаж вверх плюс 30 градусов, крен вправо на 130 градусов и рыскание влево на 20 градусов. В этот момент воздушный шар движется прямо за мной. Он постоянно сохраняет пос
Sept, notre attitude de tangage télémétrique indique environ 27 (degrés) moins et la sortie de votre 
ر
مرحباً، 11. 
B; Delta-V, 13,5. Höhenkorrektur; Delta-V, 59,5. Phasenkorrektur; Delta-V, 31,3. Ebenenwechsel nach Süden; Delta-V, 44,3. Koelliptisch; Delta-V, 33,7. Beginn der Endphase; Delta-V, 42,5. Ende der Endphase. Haben Sie alles ver
휴스턴, 아폴
فريد، بعد بضع د
알겠습니다. 감사
Quelles alternatives avons-no
Roger. What kind of tempera
ये है फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। ये सारे छोटे-छोटे कण; इनकी संख्या हजारों में है; और ये कैप्सूल से नहीं आ रहे हैं। ये कुछ ऐसा है जो पहले से ही ऊपर म
Да, я ела. Однако еда сильно раскрошилась, и мне больше не хочется открывать упаковку, опасаясь, что крошки рассыплются по всей капсуле. Могу подтвердить, что есть еду, упакованную для этого рейса, совсем не
Roger. Giusto per informazione, la lettura del perigeo sarebbe un numero negativo così grande per un'accensione così piccola? Ora stiamo leggendo -03137
ر
Х
अपोलो 8, य
और हमारे पास लगभग 2 मिनट से भी कम समय 
了解しました。
Houston, Tranquility. Did you all come up with any
अच्छा, जब आप इधर-उधर घूम रहे थे या एलएम की खिड़की से बाहर देख रहे थे, तो क्या सब कुछ बहुत समरूप दिखाई दे 
Gemini 4, это Хьюстон. Нам нужна информация о 
わかりました。タイムラインに関しては、ビルとジムを少し長く寝かせて、次の時刻まで起こさないことをお勧めします。そうしないと、次の時刻と次の時刻が削除されて
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。1分経過。軌道と誘導は良好で、ステージも良好です。オ
확인하
Roger, Amici
分かりました。計測結果をお伝えします。スーツドームは80度、スーツ吸気口温度は75度、キャビンドームは41度、キャビン温度は97度、スーツ冷却設定は8、キャビンは
Ça descend. Il fait maintenan
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。如果您方便的话，我们现在可以把一个1号平
È un po' più rumoro
حسنًا، تشغيل الذراع الرئيسية. اعتني بفتحة التهوي
シグマセブン、シグマ
我得到了
Immagino che il telescopio sia probabilmente piuttosto inutile, ma con il sestante è possibile distinguere le gocce d'acqua dalle stelle in base alla differenza nei loro movime
Roger. La luce funziona bene. Non so dire esattamente quanto sia lontana, credo circa mezz
Мы читали вас, несмотря на сильный шум, и этот шум, похоже, указывает на то, что мы вас луч
Род
Okay, pericynthion plus 2 into the MPL, 079, 27, 4013, plus 08144, minus 00443, minus 00226, N/A, plus 00205, 08455, 4 plus 20, 268, 261, plus 08155, minus 00443, minus 021, 2187, N/A. GDA should
ジェミニ4号、こちらヒューストンです。他に何も持っていません。コンピューターの電源を切ってください。私は待
يرغب فريق LMP في أخذ ق
네
Very good. We're just taking a coupl
收到。数量开关已开
설마 이 나침반이 작동하고 있다는 건 아니겠죠? 좀 더 설명해야겠네요. 제가 지금까지 해왔던 건 표준 광원을 꺼내는 거였어요. 지금 캡슐 안에서, 그리고 제가 똑바로 위를 보고 있는 제 얼굴 쪽에서는 나침반이 롤 축 평면에서 실제로 회전하고 있는 것처럼 보입니다.
रॉजर, इंडियन कैप कॉम। मैंने आपकी बात स्पष
機内に表示されているヘリウム圧力は約 35
好的，杰克。为了
D'accord. Il ne nous reste plus qu'à envoyer vos vecteurs d'état et les charges cibles. Cela devra attendre quelques minutes, le temps que nous soyons prêts. Si vous êtes prêt à recevoir, je peux vous donner le pavé de manœuvre pour PC + 2. Ensuite, vous devriez 
रॉजर और VI, आपके OAMS स्टेटस के अनुसार, आपके पास ईंधन की मात्रा 148 पाउंड और ऑक्सीडाइज़र की मात्रा 193 पाउंड है। हमारी गणना के अनुसार, प्रोपेलेंट की वास्तविक मात्रा 4
Д
イーグル、こちらコロンビア。ヒューストンから高ゲ
रॉजर, माइक। ऐसा लगता है कि अगर हम इस जेटिसन टाइम को आगे बढ़ाते हैं और आपको नया लोड देते हैं, तो इसके लिए एक नए दृष्टिकोण की आवश्यकता होगी, और हम पहले से ही बंद किए गए काम के कारण ऐसा नहीं कर सकते, और इससे हमें हर तरफ से परेशानी होगी और हमारा संचार टूट जाएगा। हम लगभग 10 मिनट में इसे अलग करने की
Хорошо. Скоро загорится индикатор нул
Aspetta, fammi t
One, what are we over n
Aquarius, un'idea per la gestione delle antenne OMNI. Potrebbe essere più facile per tutti se disattivassimo lo SQUELCH UPLINK e gestissimo le antenne commutandole quan
気分は落
好的。你成功了，比
Roger: Sie w
और, वैंस, मुझे लगता 
D'ac
내 창문은 더 이상 빛이 들어오지 않는데도 별이 보이지 않아요. 만약 세상에 낮과 지평선에서 동시에 별을 볼 수 있는 가능성이 있다면, 지금 내가 바로 그럴 수 있는 위치에 있어야 해요. 게다가 태양이 우주선 앞쪽에 비치는 것도 아
У вас установлен автоматический выключатель 
Ok. Ottimo affare. Jack, lascia che ti dica qualcosa sul controllo di integrità del portello. Devi sfiatare il tunnel finché non ottieni un DELTA-P di 3 psi. Dovrebbero volerci 9 o 10 minuti, e siamo fermamente convinti che non sia necessario aspettare altri 10 minuti per un cont
Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Ко
Нет, т
Okay. You're coming in very weakly there. We're recommending O2 tank 1 heater OFF, O2 tank 2 heater to AUTO, O2 tanks 1 and 2 fans both OFF, H2 tank 1 heaters to AUTO, and H2 tank 1 heaters to AUT
13; Roger. VIA alla m
This is Gemini 7/6 enroute Honol
حسنًا. لقد وصلنا 
Эй, Кен, передай людям, если увидишь что-нибудь, прибли
Okay. Danke. In welchem ​​Teil 
Roger. Vorrei anche che aumentassi la pressione in cabina a 5,
D'accord. C'est exact pour 1-5, Jack. Passons à 1-6. Et sur la première ligne, nous voulo
フレンドシップ・セブン、フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはザンジバル・コム・テック、HF
Ricevuto. Capito, Jack
Roger. On vous donne le feu vert pour le 6-4. Je vous enverrai un chargement 4-4 
Qui Sigma Seven. Sto iniziando i controlli diurni di imbardata. Sono Guaymas. Mi senti? Passo. Qui Sigma Seven. A questo punto v
Sì, è p
برج الدلو، هيوستن. اطلب إعادة توجيه الرسائل إلى أومني.
आपने कहा कि आप एक घंटा पहले
Jim, mi dispiace. Non capiamo cosa stai dicendo. L
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿
لدي فريد هناك مع جاك الآن يساعدان في تشغيل الطاقة، وأنا سأبقى في الأسفل في برج ا
Во
روجر. يبدو الوضع طبيعيًا هنا. كل شيء يبدو جيدًا. لديّ 55% من وقود الوضع التلقائي. نمرّ على ارتفاع 70,000 قدم، 65,000. الوضع مستقر جدًا. نقترب من 60 ألف قدم. نظام التحكم في معدل الهبوط يعمل بشكل ممتاز. نقترب من 50 ألف قدم. تبدو الطائرة رائعة. نقترب من 45,000 قدم. انخفضت قوة التسارع إلى حوالي 1 جي. أستعد للضغط على دواسة الوقود، عند 40، 41 ألف قدم. أضغط على دواسة الوقود، وفجأة ينطفئ المحرك. يمكنك سماعه؛ لا أستطيع رؤيته بسبب الغيوم. الوضع مستقر. ذراع التحكم اليدوي في وضع التشغيل. الوقود ينفد بسرعة كبيرة. أستطيع رؤية المحرك الآن. يبدو جيدًا جدًا. سأقوم بتفعيل نظام التخميد الإضافي أيضًا. في الواقع، لست بحاجة إليه. نظام التحكم في معدل الهبوط يستهلك الوقود. ونظام الت
Richtig,
Готово к копированию
Houston. Rog
は
Хоро
알겠습니다. 여기 지면에 컴퓨터가 사전 발사 모드에 있다는 표
La responsabilité de ce vol incombe d'abord à l'histoire et aux géants de la science qui ont précédé cet effort; ensuite au peuple américain, qui a exprimé son désir par sa volonté; puis, aux quatre administrations et à leurs Congrès, pour avoir mis en œuvre cette volonté; et enfin, aux agences spatiales et aux équipes industrielles qui ont construit nos vaisseaux spatiaux, Saturn, Columbia, Eagle, et le petit EMU, la combinaison spatiale et le sac à dos qui constituaient notre petit vaisseau spatial sur la surface lunaire. Nous tenons à remercier tout particulièrement tous les Américains qui on
Tell him I hope he can account for haze through the windows. We - on our departure from the moon, we tried to burn up as much as - much of what we had left over, which was quite a bit, and tell him I hope he can 
Чтение
わかりました。今、シューベルトNと呼
Roger, Jim. In regard to your evaporator, we feel that if you do have a similar 
Houston, Apollo 11 ha VHF A Simplex a
Okay. Das gilt für den Vorbeiflug und das Perizynthium-Update (2-Stunden-Block). Wir benötigen außerdem einen aktuellen Bericht über den Zustand aller Ihrer Fenster. Wir arbeiten an alternativen Plänen für die Nutzung des mittleren Lukenfensters im Mondorbit und möchten sicherstellen, dass wir den genauen Zustand aller fünf Fenster kenn
Je vous recontacte après une pause d'environ 45 minutes. Nous avons remarqué que, concernant votre antenne à gain élevé, vous pourriez l'utiliser plus efficacement en passant de l'antenne OMNI à celle-ci lorsque l'angle de lacet est de 90 degrés et l'angle de 
Gemini VII, VI. From our plot on the data point, looks like we're right on the line. The last data point
저희는 이
Nous avons eu une discussion assez animée concernant votre tentative d'observati
ヒューストン、アポロ11号です。アフリカ大陸が今、私たちの方を向いています。そしてもちろん、時間の経過とともにすべてがどんどん小さくなっていきます。地中海は完全に晴れています。太陽はマダガスカルあたりに沈もうとしているようです。アフリカの赤道地帯は非常にはっきりとしています。アフリカ南端や、もちろんサハラ砂漠の北岸の
Mir geht es ganz gut. Dein 41-D war unleserlich. Ich konnte es nicht lesen, aber den Rest habe ich verstande
어머나! 연료 전지 수소 히터 회로 차단기가 내
Okay, Jack; Houston. V
ठीक है, मुझे डीसीएस लाइट नही
क
Хорошо, это просто мера предосторожности, Джек. Если мы расположим оптику под углом 90 градусов, это выровняет щели, обеспечив наилучший поток воздуха над этой частью теплозащитного экрана и предотвратив образование горячей точки. 
हाँ, ठीक है। मैं आपको डीएपी से रोके रखूँगा, डेडबैंड प्राप्त करने के लिए। जब ​​आप एजीएस कैल करने के लिए तैयार होंगे, तो मैं थ्रस्टर फायरिंग को थोड़ा कम कर दूँगा और फिर इसे पूरी तरह 
Роджер. Понимаю, что в
了解。フライバイSPS/G&N：62815、プラス097、マイナス020 070 54 5944、マイナス00028、プラス00023、プラ
Хорошо. Водолей, тест на чувствительность 
ビル、それは意図していなかったと思います。彼らが考えていたのは、宇宙服の熱交換器を両方のループに取り付けるということです。もしループが冷えすぎたら、パネルのスイッチを使って熱交換器を通る一次ループを停止できます。しかし、いずれにせよ、宇宙服の熱交換器には常に何かが流れていることになります。
Теперь и тангаж, и рыскание — или тангаж и крен — приближаются к заданным значениям, сейчас я прохожу 
I say the jets deflector that's mounted on quad 4 seems to be - the surface of it seems lo be more wrinkled than the one that's on quad 1. Generally, underneath part of the seems to have stood up quite well to the *** get some pictures in the aft p
Roger. Je comprends. Vous ne nous avez visiblement pas lu lo
罗杰，金丝雀。我的状态良好；太空舱状态良好；控制模式为自动；陀螺仪正常；机动关
D'accord
- - РЕЖИМ BMAG, три - Вам след
Apollo 
휴스턴, 참고로 말씀드리자면, 당신들이 예측한 바로 그 순간에
了解です。25ページをご覧ください。25ページの手順3を省略し、手順4を実行してください。手順4の最後の行にある「CB(16): INV
了解しました。ヒューストン、こちらはアポロ8号です。コントロールポイントの追跡作業ですが、今回の回転で-2を試みているのと同時に、-1を探すことができました。与えられたものと同じくらい小さいですが、より認識しやすい2つのマークを見つけました。次の回転でも同じ手順を繰り返して、同じ小さなポイントを見つけられると確信しています。これで、記録されているコントロールポイントを探すことができますが、私た
Alpha/PC zu PC; Startfahrzeuganzeige zu GPI; Gimbalantrieb Nick- und Gierachse auf AUTO; Ereignistimer zurücksetzen, nach oben; Ereignistimer starten auf STOP; Ereignistimer Minuten, Sekunden auf Mitte; Entlüftungsventil nach der Landung drücken; Sonde ausfahren/einfahren auf AUS; Ausfahren/Einfahren-Rückmeldungen, zwei Stück, grau; Docksonde einfahren, primär und sekundär, aus; Positionslichter/EVA-Leuchten ausfahren, AUS; Positionslichter - Rendezvouslicht ausfahren, AUS - muss ein - da hast du es - Tunnellicht, AUS; Betriebsanzeige, AUS; Servicemodul Helium, vier, Mitte; Helium 1 Rückmeldung, vier, grau; Telemetrie-Befehlsmodul nach oben und auf BLOCK; Befehlsmoduldrücke, aus; SERVICEMODULANZEIGE, TREIBFÜLLMENGE; SERVICEMODUL Helium 2, vier, Mitte; HELI
えっと、ちょっとお風呂に入ろうと思うんだけど、今夜はあの忌々しいLCGはつけないでおこ
So we're about 3 minutes ahead of the printed flight plan; it m
Ciao Bermuda. 
후방. 좋아요, 얼마인지 알려드릴게요. 80
깃발이나 글자들이... 발사될 때
Хорошо. Вас хорошо слышно на OMNI C. Подождите, пока мы синхро
Roger
Roger. Alcuni dei precedenti commenti di Jim sulla luminosità del bordo mentre il sole stava per sorgere hanno suscitato molto interesse qui. E vorremmo chiedergli se avrà modo di notare di nuovo, o forse riuscirà a ricordare, se ci sono stati cambiamenti nell'aspetto delle stelle. Ad esempio, ha notato qualche scintillio mentre questo accadeva, e ha notato qualche leggero aumento di lumi
هذه هي الصداقة السابعة
そうです
Повтор
Atta boy! Let's see, for the AFL: the big game today was Oakland and Kansas City and Oakland dumped them 41 to 6, so it's looks the AFL title game will be the Raiders a
Roger, Seven. Hai... sudato o hai smesso di sudare in questo momento
Tranquility Base, this is Houston, Roger. Copy. You're beginning PREP. Break. Break. Columbia, Columbia, this is H
Roger. They're continuing with the nonpropulsion vent from the liquid oxygen tank. It would be radially opposite, then. And boosters tell me it's the continuous vent system. They're also dumping a small amount of fuel at this time. We've got abou
알겠습니다. 지금 어떤 생
Roger. In Washington, the Senate Finance Committee has approved extension of the income tax surtax, but a Senate vote on the bill currently seemed remote. In Austin, State Representative Ray Lemmon of Houston has been nominated as the National Director of the American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon has proposed a study of the possibility of establishing an institute of oceanography in Texas. This would be the first such institute on the western Gulf of Mexico. In Minneapolis, Minnesota, the weather bureau, after recapping today's weather showing a high of 88 and a low of 72, has noted "snowfall: none." From St. Petersburg, Florida, comes a radio report from the Norwegian explorer, Thor Heyerdahl, which said that the crew 
ヒューストン。アポロ
Va bene
अपोलो 8, य
My window's not in the light anymore, and I still don't see the stars. If there's any possibility in the world to see stars in the daylight and horizon at the same time, I'm in the position right now where I should be able to do it. And don't have the sun on the nose of the spacecraft. It's on the bottom. I can see the bottom, and I can't
..., немного воды здесь. Майк, помнишь, как ты пытался добавить воды в напиток из грейпфру
ठीक है। पैनल 16, सबसे ऊपर वाली पंक्ति में, हम QUAD 1 से 4 तक के TCA ब्रेकर्स को बंद करना चाहते हैं, और आप कह रहे हैं कि बाकी तीन पंक्तियाँ यथावत
روجر، نرجو منك
No
— Disjoncteur enclenché? Les deux disjo
好的，很好。所有2型都转为1
Роджер. Похоже, мы меняли антенны. Подождите. Подтверждаю, 11. Мы меняли антенны прямо перед вами. В о
Des serviettes hygiéniques. Vous ave
रॉजर। हम अभी केबिन प्रेशर को नियंत्रित करने पर काम कर रहे हैं, और CSM (प्रे
N
水分分離器のランプ
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Comment li
حسنًا، أبولو 8. لقد راجعنا البيانات، ويبدو أنها جيدة، ويعتقدون أنه يمكنك ال
Хорошо. Мы планируем ос
Должно быть, это будет очень весело. Они должны находиться чуть правее ва
Ti abbiamo ri
Et Ken, si ton gars veut jouer au jeu OMNI-switch, on est sur Dog - Bravo pour le moment, enfin, sur 
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نحن على أهبة الاستعداد لمتابعة مشروعك الناشئ في أي وقت. يمكنك البدء من هنا. انته
حسنًا. اللوحة 5؛ ا
Роджер. Одно уточнение. Мы считаем, что самый дешевый способ изменить полож
नमस्कार, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस, ह्यूस्टन। वेंटि
Хорошо. Я 
네, 프레드 씨. 5x 판독 중입니다. 지금부터 설명해 드릴 절차는 태양 정렬
Хорошо. Остальные страницы выглядя
压制—
रॉजर. कार्नार्वोन में 2 
Questo è conferma
क्या आप हमें अपने गिम्बल क
罗杰
Джим, мы разрабатываем для тебя процедуру оценки отношения. В случае отсутствия связи она может немного отличаться от той, которую придумают ребята, работающие над п
Roger. Sigma Seven. Guaymas Cap Com. Loud and clear. They had a power failure up the California way. We're reading your cor
是的。我看到一个比较大的、孤
حسنًا. 47 قدمًا/ثانية من إطلاقك الأمامي. هذا 1+18. 120 قدمًا/ثانية من إطلاقك الخلفي. هذا 2+31. عند 17 42 53. 2+48. 8+49.
ईंधन के तापमान को दोबारा बताएं। समाप
프레드, 그들이 SHe 탱크의 압력 상승을 살펴보고 있는데, 105시간쯤 후에 폭
...
نعلم أن هناك العديد من العلماء من مختلف الدول ينتظرون بفارغ الصبر رؤية عينات القمر، ورأينا أنكم سترغبون برؤيتها على حقيقتها. هذان الصندوقان هما حاويات إعادة العينات. إنهما حاويات مُعبأة بتفريغ الهواء، أُغلقت في بيئة مفرغة من الهواء على سطح القمر، ثم نُقلت إلى داخل المركبة ووُضعت داخل أكياس من الألياف الزجاجية، وأُغلقت بسحّاب، وأُعيد إغلاقها من الخارج، ووُضعت في هذه الحاويات عل
Fred, je vous inter
わかりました。次回からは、きっとはっきりと大きな声で
로저. 
Okay, Fred-
Roger. Control mode, manual; gyros normal; the maneuver switch is off. Fuel is 45-45 [percent]; oxygen is 70
알
Okay. Ich habe folgende Details zum Flugplan für Sie. Da es keine -3 gibt, streichen Sie bitte alle Anweisungen für die Kursmitte, einschließlich des Bindestrichs, der bei etwa 54,50 Stunden angegeben ist. Wir verschieben diesen auf später, worauf ich gleich noch eingehen werde. Okay. Wir möchten die Batterieladung um 3 Stunden vorverlegen. Außerdem möchten wir das Tunnelentlüftungsventil (DELTA-P) um 3 Stunden vorverlegen. Ab diesem Zeitpunkt können Sie im Flugplan einfach zu Punkt 57 gehen, die Zahl von 57 auf 54 Stunden ändern und von dort
No
Jim, questo è negativo. Non abbiamo dati su
ヒ
わかりました、
Fred, wir haben die Story schon für dich, die ist ziemlich gut. Wir gehen sie gerade durch. Und ich würde die Frage gern auf später verschieben. Im Grunde schalten wir jetzt ab und nehmen die Ergebnisse. Wir haben einen Mittelkurs von maximal 1,5 Metern pro Sekunde, egal wo im Brennvorgang, um wieder in den freien Rückkehrmodus z
C'es
La cima di quella p
Wilco, et tu pourrais dire à Jim que notre RTCC 
자, 이제 '금리 높음'에
당신의 T
حسنًا، انتظر. سأضع هذا القلم جانبًا. أنا في وضعية الشمبانزي. الكبسولة تطير بشكل ممتاز. جميع المحركات تعمل بشكل جيد. مفتاح الجيروسكوب طبي
Roger, je t'ai dit que nous avions eu beaucoup de problèmes avec le circuit des combi
Роджер. Мы хотели бы немного сбалансировать криогенные баллоны. Так что, если вы сможете перевести переключатель нагревателя кислородного баллона № 1 в положение «ВЫКЛ», а переключатель нагревателя водородного баллона № 2 — в положение «ВЫКЛ», оставив все остальные переключатели криогенных баллонов в том же положении, мы дадим системе поработать в таком
Roger. Gemini 4, nous aimerions que vous remettiez votre interrupteur d'alimentation CA sur IGS et que vous mettiez votre 
了解、コロンビア。11号機が到着しました。機体番号：37200、マイナス060、プラス047、0
Sì, stiamo imba
Хьюстон, Аполлон-13. Значение DELTA-P составляет 
حسنًا. سنحتاج على الأرجح إ
Roger, Seven. Wir empfehlen, für die dritte Umlaufbahn die Gyroskope nach Belieben zu verwenden, entweder im Normal- oder im Freilaufmodus. Sollten die Scanner vor dem Bremsmanöver in der dritten Umlaufbahn nicht korrekt programmiert sein, können Sie di
...133 घंटों से भी ज़्यादा... ओह, हाँ, मुझे लगता है - हाँ, वह... गुरुवार दोपहर को उतरेगा। उसने हिसाब लगाया था कि 
Coming up on Schmidt here pretty
水瓶
Мы это п
Okay, Apollo 8. Alle Ihre Systeme sind bereit, und wir wollten Ihnen gerade mitteilen, dass Sie den Lad
هيوستن، أبولو 8. هل لدينا وقت لبعض ال
Sa
好的，奥德赛号，休斯顿。提醒一下，C电池似乎会在主降落伞打开前后耗尽；这是预料之中的；其
ठीक है, जो। मैं तुम्हें बताता हूँ,
Mir gefällt das Geräusch, als wäre ich wieder dor
Ricevuto. 1, G&N: 38658, meno 054, più 065, TIG 078 02 0345, più 29180, più 03779, meno 01325; rollio NA, beccheggio 041. Il resto del PAD è NA. Ullage due jet, 19 secondi. 4 PAD, G&N: 3
제가 예전에 그 얘기를 했었어요. 그는 여기서 체중 문제를 지적했죠. 칼로리를 낮게 유지해야 하니까, 저는
Av
Sie haben ein Verfahre
روجر. هذه سفينة الصداقة السابعة. لديّ فحص جيد للأفق الليلي، ويمكنني التحكم بشكل جيد في الأفق الل
Roger.
إيجل، كولومبيا. أقرأك بصوت عالٍ ومتقطع. صوت 
ठीक
Хорошо, Водолей, Хьюстон. Вы сейчас будете отвечать по одному. Сообщите, что я услышал всё, кроме начальных значений и комментариев. Пожалуйста, повт
حسنًا. أنا أنظر من نافذة فريد. أرى الكثير من الجسيمات هناك، لكن الكثير من تلك الأشياء لا يزال ينجرف بعيدًا عن
ハワイ上空での最終高度調整について、また改めてお知らせします。それと、X軸の調整もお願いします。わずかに許容範囲を超えています。高度調整は遅くなるまでSTART COMPボタンを押
水瓶座
Ich kann
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストンです。酸素流量計トランスデューサーにいくつか異常が見られました。トランスデューサーの不具合ではないかと疑っています。廃棄物収納ベントをVENT（通気口）にすると、酸素流量が一定になると思っていましたが、そうではありませんでした。また、廃棄物収納ベントバルブを閉めた際にも、いくつか異常な兆候が見られました。夜通し調査を続け、翌朝に問題の状況を報告します。また、廃棄物
अंतरिक्ष यान से सचमुच गैस निकलती हुई प्रतीत होती है क्योंकि जब भी धूल का कोई छोटा सा कण या कोई और चीज पास से गुजरती है तो वह हमेशा दरवाजे की ओर जात
エドが荷物の出し入れを始め、ブースターをいじるのが不可能な位置まで来た途端、私は彼を手伝い始めた。少なくとも荷物を持ってしまい、しまい込み、無くならないようにするなど、手伝いは全力でやった。作業を速くすればするほど、遅れてしまった。荷物を正しい位置に置けなかったからではなく、予想していたよりもずっと時間がかかっただけだ。無重力状態では、シミュレーターでやるのと同じくらい簡単だったとはいえ、それほど楽ではなかった。だから、ぐるりと回って作業した。カーナボンに着いた頃には、もう無理だと心に決めていたが、もう少し頑張ろうと思った。カーナ
D'accord. Voyons si j'ai tout compris. Pour le rendez-vous, il faut d'abord fermer le disjoncteur CB 16 INVERTER 2, ainsi que le disjoncteur CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2. Ensuite, sur le panneau 14, vérifiez que l'INVERTER 2 est sélectionné. Fermez également le disjoncteur CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2. Tirez ensuite sur la poignée de d
Could we have a blood pr
AC 전원을 다시 공급해 줘야 하고, 차단기를 눌러야 합니다. 음, 
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une de l'actualité mondiale. Seuls quatre pays, la Chine communiste, la Corée du Nord, le Nord-Vietnam 
Decisamente sotto di me. L'avevo seguito sotto di me da Carnarvon in poi. Fino a Carnarvon l'avevamo tenuto sotto di noi, poi fino all'orizzonte, e poi di nuovo sotto di noi. Sembrava quasi che fosse in un'orbita diversa dalla mia. Aveva un apogeo e un perigeo diversi dai miei. Comunque, ho tentato di avvicinarmi all'alba non appena ho potuto capire dove si trovava. Come ho detto, in quel momento era a un miglio o due davanti a me, sotto di me. Quindi, più cercavo di avvicinarmi, meno guadagnavo terreno. Stavo sparando retrogrado. Stavo usando i miei propulsori superiori per sparare in modo da ridurre la mia velocità totale, e poi sparavo... contemporaneamente. Non ho mai veramente avvicinato, e continuava ad allontanarsi da me. Mi è diventato ovvio che quando siamo arrivati ​​alle Hawaii, avvicinarmi al booster in tempo per fare l'EVA con il booster avrebbe probabilmente consumato tutto il carburante che avevamo a bordo. Come regola generale avevamo concordato di non farlo. Così ho contattato il CAP COM e abbiamo deciso di non procedere con la parte della missione con il booster. Non so se l'ho det
It's gone o
ठीक है, जिम। हमने आपको कुछ समय 
Ich versteh
了解。予定通
D
Близнецы VII, это Близнецы VI. У нас объект, похоже на спутник, движущийся с севера на юг, вероятно, по полярной орбите. Он находится на очень низкой траектории, двигаясь с севера на юг, и имеет очень высокий коэффициент набора высоты. Похоже, это может быть даже... Очень низкая траектория. Похоже, он скоро войдет в атмосферу. Подождите... Можете дать мне попробо
Хорошо. Готов к копиро
C'è qualcosa c
«Аполлон-8»
Gemelli VI, Houston. Come leg
رو
L'allumage est confirmé,
Ricevuto. Abbiamo messo il nostro... il nostro rullo per la pista sul lato sbagliato. Continueremo a rotolare finché non otterremo un guadagno elevato. E cancelleremo il... il lancio che era stato programmato dopo i
C'est exact. Je veux vérifier si la logique de réentrée a été implémenté
Roger. Al momento non abbiamo ulteriori aggior
एक बार जब मैंने इसे इस्तेमाल करने की कोशिश की, तो अगली बार मुझे इसका काफी अच्छा माप मिल गया। बिना किसी फ़िल्टर के, मैंने हवा की मोटी परत की चमक के ऊपरी हिस्से का इस्तेमाल किया। यह काफी धुंधला होता है - आपको अपनी आँखों को थोड़ा एडजस्ट करना पड़ता है और हर बार उसे एक ही जगह पर रखने की कोशिश करनी पड़ती है... इन मापों को करने के लिए सटीक दृष्टि नियंत्रण की आवश्यकता होती है। आप बिना ईंधन का उपयोग किए इन मापों की उम्मीद नहीं कर सकते। यह इतना छोटा दायरा है कि आपको अपने तारे को चुनना होता है और उसे क्
Wir würden die Entlüftung gerne erst wieder aufnehmen, wenn wir die Anlage hier innen wieder voll aufgeladen haben. Könnten Sie uns vielleicht kurz anr
शांति। रॉजर। एक मिनट रुकिए।
アフリカ上空です。ハッセルブ
Р
Okay. You want me to read out on MDC 3: BAT B voltage, PYRO A voltage, PYRO B voltage, command module injector temperatures; 5 Charlie, 5 Do
Панорамный снимок, который я буду делать, будет сделан на расстоянии примерно 30-40
11, Houston.
Okay. Schr
11, Хьюстон. Мы можем разглядеть маркировку на панели. Мы читаем: СИСТЕМ
Это уже не изменить, как только оно запустилось; как б
أنت جاهز. المنطقة 9-برافو. هذا هو GET RC، 13:19:36
كل ما سمعته هو أن المقصورة كانت تحافظ على الضغط. لم أسمع أي شيء آخر. وأوديسي، نحن على استعداد لتسخين المقاعد الخلفية حسب رغبتكم، ونتساءل عما إذا كان موقفكم تجاه فحص القمر
صحيح. أنا - لم أدخل - أعطيتُ - أعدتُ الجهاز للحظة. أعدتُ مفتاح الوضع من يدوي إلى وضع آخر بينما كنتُ أُحاول ضبط
好的，吉姆。请翻到
Roger. Control mode, manual; gyros normal; the maneuver switch is off. Fuel is 45-45 [percent]; oxygen is 70 [percent], or, correction, oxygen is 80 and 100 [percent]. Suit temperature is 68 [degrees], now and coming do
Questa è Friendship Seven, che trasmette nella capsula. L'alba è spu
友谊七号，这里是
Ricontrolla che la mascherina sia chiusa e bloccata. Casco blo
イーグル、ヒュース
لكن رغم أن أداء فريق أويلرز لم يكن موفقًا على أرض الملعب، إلا أنهم حققو
제미니 4호, 
Хорошо. Фред, это было хорошо в контрольном списке. На этом всё. Сейчас мы предоставим вам контрольный список для отключения питания, и мы хотели бы спросить, планируете ли вы использовать карту перезарядки. Если да, т
لا بد أن ذلك كان من أجل ا
Okay. Das erfordert lediglich einige Änderungen. Schauen Sie in die dritte Zeile, wo „TUNNEL VENT valve, TUNNEL VENT for 30 seconds“ steht. Streichen Sie „30 seconds“ und die beiden Zeilen darunter durch. Anders ausgedrückt: „
نعم. 
Anche questo è un bel nome:
ビルさん、燃料電池2号については新しい情報はありません。燃料電池自体には全く問題がないと
よし、ヒューストン。レン
Это было глупо. Теперь переходим на низкое управление по проводам. У меня случился двойной контроль, и я сильно его испортил. Но лучше экономить топливо. Слишком легко попасть в двойной контроль, даже с
... hol
Roger, 
نريدك يا ​​جيم أن تفكر في وضع التحكم هذا، وأن ترى إن كان سينجح بناءً على معلوماتك الحالية. نحن متشككون بعض الشيء، لكننا نود طرحه عليك. لذا، بمجرد أن تستقر الطائرة، راقبها، ثم انتقل إلى "الحد الأدنى للدفع"، كما فعلنا، واضبط معدل الانع
Oui. N'oubliez pas de me mettre en FREE, car il se pourrait que ça ne marche pas... vous save
मैं कंप्यूटर से पूछ रहा हूँ कि हम कितनी दूर हैं। और कंप
ダメです、ビル。ビット
スーツドー
はい、分かりま
Хорошо. Похоже, 
ऑरोरा सेवन, ऑरोरा सेवन। यह कैंट
从本质上讲——从本质上讲——是的，从本质
Ouc
こんにちは、アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。ホワイトチームが始動しました。エキサイティングなテレビ番組と就寝前のレポー
У нас есть... в
सम
Well, we can't tell when you'r
仅收到 4 个 SPS/G&N：38320，减 055，加 060 084 30 2749，加 31380，加 03475，减 01032，NA，034。PAD 其余均
Roger，散热器在 40:00 处
Okay. Ich muss nur noch die OMNIs umschalten. Okay. Joe, ich lese gerade die Änderungen auf den Seiten 1-4: Brennstoffzellenheizung
Well, the radar needles were wandering around some, Dave. I can't really be sure. I was - as best I could - in the mid
C'est exact. Bien, le sol va maintenant vous envoyer une mise à jour à -2 +15. 
Роджер, Джим. Что касается вашего испарителя, мы считаем, что если в следующий раз у вас возникнет подобная проблема с обратной стороны, находящейся под солнечными лучами, проверьте температуру на выходе из испарителя, и если она поднимется выше 60 граду
Nous vous communiquerons les chiffr
١١، هذه هيوستن. نخطط الآن لتنفيذ عملية الحرق الثانية باستخدام البنك (أ) فقط. سنجهز ل
제가 HF 통신이 끊긴 이유 중 하나는 다이폴에서 바이콘으로 안테나를 자꾸 바꿔가며 사용하기 때문인 것 같습니다. 이해하시나요
Spero che abbiate fatto sì che tutti esaminassero attentamente questa cosa. Una cosa che vogliamo è un veicolo spaziale perfetto prima di prendere in 
You've got to start your timers going on a hack from Carnarvon. Then go thro
الوضعية جيدة. نعود إلى وضعية العودة، تصحيح الوضعية العكسية. لا داعي للبقاء على وضعية العودة. لا داعي للبقاء على وضعية العودة، فالرؤية واضحة جدًا في الوضعية العكسية. وهذه هي الوضعية المثالية للطيران. نقترب من الوضعية العكسية. الدوران الجانبي سليم. الانعطاف الجانبي سليم. تم اختيار وضعية العودة. سنتوقف عن تعديل الميلان قريبًا. (الميلان ينحرف ببطء شديد). تم إيقاف الميلان - الوضعية الحالية. الانتقال إلى الوض
Good. I'll give him a ca
لم أشعر بأي ارتباك على الإطلاق. شعرتُ
Okay
В последнем проходе вы отдохнули лучше; мы это заметили, но, к сожалению, нам пришлось вас 
Une dernière chose, Jack… Tu es 
C'est exact. Bien. Une fois cette étape terminée, l'appareil se positionnera selon l'angle de visée du Soleil. Une fois en place, vous effect
네. 그럼 이제 실내 조명(숫자 표시 조명)을 끄고, 실내 통합 조명을 끄고
ENGINE STOPボタン
هذه هي سفين
Роджер. Ты же считаешь, верно
Okay. Let me take it from the top here. Just - there might be some overlap, but to make sure we're all on the same signal. We're starting off with a set of time line procedures that are going to give us - end up with the normal entry checklist. There will be some checklist changes into the book, but the bulk of what I have for you is the time line stuff. And it starts at 6 hours and 30 minutes prior to and assumes that we're getting power to MAIN B in the command module. I think you already have the numbers for the pads and the command module pads; I mean the types of pads we'll be giving you. And if you have a question on what they'll be doing or what t
Okay, Fred
चलो कोशिश करते हैं। ज़रूरत पड़ने पर हम इसे और बड़ा क
嗯，Buzz现在正在接收CO
Es soll so kli
Ok, Apollo 8. Sembra che ora possiate disattivare le vostre ventole criogeniche, e vi lasceremo in pace per un po', lasciandovi recuperare. Le cose che abbiamo a bordo, il controllo dell'antenna ad alto guadagno e il controllo della modalità COMM che avete elencato, le rimanderemo e le faremo quando sarete pronti. Quindi, a vostro piacimento. Durante il dump ad alto guadagno che abbiamo eseguito utilizzando una banda larga, ottenevamo ancora ottimi dati a 36K, che è un po' più lontano dei margini di circuito previsti per voi. E abbiamo la nostra combustione in arrivo più o meno tra q
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。OMNIの高ビットレート機能はノイズが多
わかった、ロジャー。ありがとう。私は向こ​​う側にいるか
당신은 Ar
好的。你需要稍微拱起背部才能下来……我
R
Sie würden jetzt n
자, 진입합니다. 진입 좌표: 태평양 중부, 000153; 000. 다음 두 줄은 월몰 시각과 달 관측 자세입니다., 178; NOUN 61, -21.66,
大きなカメラが欲しいですよね？レンズは大きいのと小さいのとど
Apollo 8, mentre aspettiamo l'alto guadagno, continuerò il riepilogo della traiettoria. Possiamo ancora tornare alla linea del Pacifico centrale dal tredicesimo, e siete in viaggio dopo 138 secondi dall'accensione. Sono 138 secondi, e vi portano fuori dalla zona a farfalla. Consigliamo di non provare preaccensioni o riavvii dopo 20 secondi
En fait, j'ai vu la même couleur que celle des lucioles que John a aperçues, et que je peux parfois reproduire en blanc. Je
罗杰，惯性系统已就位。现在开始 2 号 PAD。2，SPS/G&N：38320，加 166，减 081；TIG 080 11 3603。NOUN 81：减 01408，减去所有球，减去 00743。滚动所有球，196 359 00657，加 00537。DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531。六分仪星 23 1160 138。PAD 的其余部分为 NA。对齐，织女星和天津四 243 183 012。空高，两台喷气式飞机 19 秒。备注：关于您的载荷，我们希望使用 R1 20101，而不是飞行计划中显示的值。进行六分仪星体检查时，必须在 79°30′10
Okay. 17 bei 
휴스턴, 아
, Mantello con 1 - 2 - 3 - 4 - 5 - 4 - 3 
Sigma Seven, we 
अगले पृष्ठ पर, डिब्बे B1 में, हमारा अनुमान है कि लगभग 15 प्रतिशत भोजन बचा हुआ है। B2 से हमने PPK निकालकर उसमें कचरा डाल दिया है। B3 में, 16 मिलीमीटर केबल, 18 मिलीमीटर लेंस और 
Roger. La luce funziona bene. Non riesco a capire esattamente a che distanza mi trovo. Credo di essere a circa mezzo miglio o giù di lì. Il booster ha iniziato 
Это подтверждается. Два автоматических выключателя на панели 250 разомкнутся; два автоматических выключателя на пан
Okay, Jack. Ich lese es dir vor, füge dann ein paar Kommentare hinzu und wir besprechen es kurz. Das sollte einige Zeit nach dem Restart erfolgen. Nach dem Restart nach 49 Stunden möchten wir, falls die Zeit es erlaubt, dass die Crew während des Restarts untersucht, ob es einen Rollwinkel gibt, bei dem der Ko
Jim, nous avons quelques nouvelles. Le président Nixon a nommé un juge du Minnesota au poste de juge associé à la Cour suprême. Un projet de loi accor
달을 흑백으로 찍었습니다. 기상청 필터를 빼고 찍었죠. 사진 번호 6번입니다. 달이 지는 동안 셔터 속도를 낮
Proviamo a darti un'idea - Houston, proveremo a darti un'immagine della finestra con la TV fuori, numer
알겠습니다. 이제 서비스 모듈 JETT를 설치한 후 제 절차는 기수를 들어 올려 서비스 모듈이 보이는 중앙 창문을 확보하는 것입니다. 그곳에는 사진 촬영을 담당할 사람이 있
좋은 근무 시간대만 배정받으셔서 운이
أورورا سبعة، Guaymas كاب 
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。テレビはご都合の良い時に解約できます。十分な収入がありま
— Никто в здравом уме не выбрал бы э
रॉजर। हम बदलाव करना चाह
Hier spricht Columbia: Der Rendezvous
再突入は順調に進んでいます。補助ダンプのおかげで振動は良好に抑えられて
Okay. Apollo 11 bleibt das wichtigste Thema, und die Welt wartet gespannt auf Ihre Landung heute gegen 11:49 Uhr Houston-Zeit. In Washington haben Steuerreformer im R
Roger, das war wirklich toll. Habt ihr uns überhaupt gelesen? Wir wussten
मैंने हमेशा कहा था कि वह सोते समय बेहतर प्रद
Steelhead. Ricevuto. Pausa, tenete l'attrezzatura di terra, ecc., pronta sul ponte. Tutta l'attrezzatura è completa
你的意思是，这些仍然是要求吗？我们原
알
我也觉得很难
Roger. Je comprends que vous irez
Apollo 11, Houston. Wenn Sie es sehen, sollte es auftauchen – es scheint, als käme es dur
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। स्क्विब बंद। तीन रेट्रो फ्यूज स्विच चालू। फायर-आर्म चालू। फ
Понял. Вот
That other aviator that's going around the world, Max Conrad with his light plane - he spent C
अब यहाँ सब कुछ ठीक चल रहा है। जिम सो गया है... चार घंटे की नींद। मैंने भी अच्छी नींद ली और अब मैं रोस्ट बीफ और क्रीम कॉर्न का डिनर करने की तैयारी कर 
Roger. Understand. OMNI Charlie. Mike, be advised we have an update for you on the for the. We estimate
Gemini 4, RKV CAP COM. RKV è pronto. Se riesci a completare il tuo esperimento D-9 in tempo, chiamami. Abbia
알파/PC에서 PC로; 발사체 표시기에서 GPI로; 짐벌 드라이브 피치 및 요우를 자동으로; 이벤트 타이머 재설정, 위로; 이벤트 타이머 시작에서
इससे भी 
Jim, ieri e la notte scorsa la temperatura in cabina è stata un po' alta. Con i finestrini chiusi si è abbassata un po', e abbiamo visto temperature nelle tute di circa 4°C e temperature nell'abitacolo di circa 15°C. Ma sembra che la temperatur
Теперь, отвечая на вопрос 2, следует отметить, что на второй ступени, конечно же, наблюдался переходный процесс вибрации, вызванный отказом двигателя № 5, который пр
रॉजर। बज़, आपको पाँच की गिनती सुना रहा हूँ, और हमें हाई बिट रेट मिल गया है। गोल्डस्टो
This is Woomera Cap Com, Seven. 
알았어, 잭. 잠깐만 기다려줘. 이 절차를 고안한 사람들이 곧 방으로 들어올 텐데, 모두가 
약 45분간의 조용한 휴식 후 간단히 확인차 연락드렸습니다. 고이득 안테나 사용 시, 요각(yaw angle)이 90도, 피치각(pitch angle)이 -45도일 때 무지향성(OMNI) 모드에서 고이득 모드로 전환하면 효율이 조금 더 높아질 수 있다는 점을 알
جراح RKV، برج ا
最小死区
हे, जो? क्या एफएओ तैयार है - क्या तुम तैयार हो - या क्या तुम मुझे वे आइटम देने के लिए तैयार हो जिन्हें हम
और एक बार फिर, हमें थोड़ा सा नज़रिया बदलने की ज़रूरत है। हमारी पृथ्वी ऊपर और दाईं ओर गायब हो रही है। हमारी पृथ्वी और आपकी पृथ्वी। गलत दिशा, गलत दिशा। थोड़ा और। ठीक है। अगर आप इसे वहीं रोक सकते हैं तो ठीक है। ओह! अब यह फिर से फिसल रहा है। ठीक है। थोड़ा और आगे बढ़ते रहिए, थोड़ा और। ठीक है। उस दिशा में 90 डिग्री; यह गलत 90 डिग्री है, दूसरी तरफ। हो गया। थोड़ा और। नहीं, गलत दिशा, गलत दिशा; मुझे माफ़ करना। उस दिशा में आगे बढ़ते रहिए। नहीं, यह हमारे 12 बजे ऊपर चला गया 
罗杰，哥伦比亚。地标识别码为登月舱——更正为静海基地；P1，112 25 08；P2，112 30 17，位于南侧4海里处。最近接近时间：112 31 52；轴号357.051，轴颈号047.432，横滚零度，俯仰250，偏航零度。复述
자, 토미 제이콥스에 이어 휴스턴 지역 점성가인 루비 그레이엄의 흥미로운 소식을 전해드리겠습니다. 그녀는 모든 징후가 달 여행을 위한 최적의 시기라고 말합니다. 닐은 영리하고, 마이크는 판단력이 뛰어나며, 버
— Tu vois ces extraits là-haut, l'un d'eux
收到。这意味着我得进行逆向
هذه
はい、これでほぼ完成で
Roger. Reading you about three by, Buzz; a lot of noise on the loop. We think it's coming from Columbia, but we can't tell. We're unable to raise voice with him. 
Je v
Roger. Jack ist schon wach.
Подождите
روجر. مايك، هل يمكنك التأكد من إيقاف تشغيل
로저. 제가 정정해 주시겠어요? 혈압을
C'è una band cinese che s
了解。ボアサイト星の話に戻りますが、蠍座の頭の中心星は老ズバです。下
Le voyage a ét
休斯顿，阿波尔……收到。我们正在商量。我们在这里等你来
जिम, मैंने आपकी पूरी बात नहीं समझी, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि आप यह जानना चाहते थे कि प्रवेश संबंधी प्रक्रियाएँ कब उपलब्ध होंगी और आपको कब पढ़कर सुनाई जाएँगी। अगर ऐसा है, तो इसमें लगभग 120 घंटे लगेंगे। बैटरी A को चार्ज करने की बात करें तो, जैसे ही बाकी लोग आपकी मदद के लिए पहुँचेंगे, हम इसे चार्ज कर
はい、その
わかりました。現在、宇宙船は
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。如果您在
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。機動している間に、DELTA-H
Roger. Mike, nous avons quelques commentaires sur la performance d'a
And one of the nice things, Jack, particularly for a novice like myself, is the - the ease of moving around in here. It's, of course, as you know from working in the command module simulator, it's really quite a boon to have zero gravity as an aid. Because you get - pretty confining, really, at one g, to move around very much in there, and it's quite easy in this environment. The, as you can see, it looked pretty clean, I found a couple of loose washers about it and the - a little plastic cap off the sequence camera had come loose and I found it lodged over by the ED panel. Okay. Right under Jim, now, he's actually standing on a - what looks to be a can here. And, for the sake of all the people back there, housed inside this can is the - the ascent engine where, hopefully, you can see my hand resting on top of right now - the engine that we use to get off of the Moon. Immediately adjacent to the engine cover here, I have my hand on a white box now, which has been shown before. This happens to be Jim's, or the backpack which'll supply oxygen and water for cooling while on the lunar surfac
Vous savez, c'est une b
是的，83 小时，我们用的是
ECS O2 
과이마스. 여기는 VI입니
Apollo 8, Apollo 8. Forte e chiaro. Afferm
Я не включил все эти изменения в конфигурации управления в контрольный список, но именно это мы и с
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Сейчас мы начнём с телевизора: вы сможете увелич
Mann, es muss nichts Trostloseres geben, als sich im Inneren einiger dieser kleinen Krater, dieser keg
네, 맞습니다. 게다가 9페이지에 나와 있어요. VHF는
Из Вашингтона: «В это Рождество мир озарён надежд
एक्वेरियस, हम अपने संचार
好的。我可以进行下一步了吗？也就是按下 1、2、3 和 4 键，然后关闭/
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Non avevo ancora detto nulla. Stiamo cercando di capire come procedere. In riferimento alla tua precedente domanda sulla gestione del ciclo del sonno, concordiamo con il tuo commento. Vorremmo tornare al piano di volo per quanto riguarda i cicli del sonno e così via, prima di entrare in orbita lunare. Vorremmo quindi che tu usassi il tuo giudizio per trovare il modo più efficiente per gestire i cicli del sonno e ripartirli tra di voi. Vorremmo che ci tenessi informati su chi sta facendo cosa e quali sono i tuoi piani.
No, di certo non lo sappiamo (tosse) - di certo non lo sappiamo. Stiamo mostrando - stiamo mostrando circa 15 gradi di inclinazione e circa 2
我大概有 20 分钟
Roger. Verstanden, abgeschlossen, zwei Sätze auf 16, zwei auf 22 und eine
そうですね。おそらく、デッドバンドをきつく締めて姿勢を維持することを推奨するでし
Und dazu gehören im linken Randbereich die "Last" ganz am Anfang sowie die "0.0507" und "plus 0500" weiter unten
Dovremo aspettare che tu otte
Deke，你说话
できました。最初の四つ
जेमिन
알겠
Okay. Houston, Apollo 8. Wir haben
Wozu? Worauf möchtest du würfel
チャーリー、君の言うことは明確だ。TIG
Roger. Très bien. Nous nous sommes trompés dans notre configuration de sauvegarde. Les fichiers étaient mal placés. Les données embarquées semblent correctes. Nous voulions simplement vous laisser vérifier. Nous avons une mise à jour concernant la carte APS/carburant que vous placez sur le tableau de bord. Il s'agit d'une faute de frappe. Si vous pouviez sortir cette petite carte, nous pourrions corriger cette erreu
لا أعرف. لقد صعدتُ إلى الطابق العلوي، وأنا الآن في الأسفل يا جاك. أعتقد أنه عندما يصعد جاك، يمكنه إلقاء نظرة وإخباري. حسنًا، سأفكر في الانتقال إلى الخلف مباشرةً. أرى القم
유리 알렉세예비치, 지금 당장 이 라디오 방송국을 벙커로 옮기겠습니다. 그래서 채널은 5분간 조용할 겁니다. 니콜라이 페트로비치와 파벨 로마노비치가 벙커로 갈 겁니다. 저는 5분간 준비될 때까지 여기 남아
Roger, reading you loud and clear. Now I would like for you to roll head
حسنًا. درجة حرارة المقصورة 100 درجة، ودرجة حرارة قبة المقصورة 40 درجة؛ ودرجة حرارة مبادل حرارة المقصورة 42 درجة؛ وإعدادات المقصورة مضبوطة على 3 وهي ثابتة لفترة طويلة. لا أرغب في تغييره
네. 첫 번째 단계로, 저희가 드린 기본 구성에서 한 가지 변경 사항이 있습니다. 225번 패널의 회로 차단기 두 개를 더 열어두겠습니다
R
わかりました。1つ飛ばして、MAIN BUS B RES
자, 
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 협조해
Роджер. Если вы хотите сделать несколько снимков, мы рекомендуем использовать фотоаппарат Uniform из ма
Okay. "'Twas the night before Christmas and way out in space, the Apollo 8 crew had just won the moon race; The headsets were hung by the consoles with care, In hopes that Chris Kraft soon would be there; Frank Borman was nestled all snug in his bed, While visions of 's danced in his head; And Jim Lovell, in his couch, and Anders, in the bay, were racking the
ジャック、その技術は理解した。進入角を急角度にする時間を稼ぐために炎上しているん
우리가 가져가야 할
罗杰。正负 1
Roger, la 
Роджер. В принципе, все было так же, как и раньше. Тангаж поднялся до 45, затем до 40 и до 45, а рыскание — примерно до 255, 245 и 255; а затем довольно быстро самолет заблокировался на
Roger, 11. That was a good readback. That was the block data scheduled for 12 hours. We'd like to just say that on a fligh
Nous n'allo
Ti leggo forte e chiaro, T
- - د
Es sieht so aus, als gäbe es ein paar Wolken westlich der Si
Oui, monsieur. Voyons voir… un instant… laissez-moi vérifier cette trappe et son intégrité; je pourrai peut-être vous en dire plus. J’ai la réponse à votre question concernant l’alimentation des ombilicaux. Conformément aux procédures, les ombilicaux seront hor
I'll need to holler across to you to get the mission timers on. Do we want to che
Нет, мне гораздо больше нравится обращенность
Aquarius, H
حسنًا، ونحن نقترب منه قليلًا. حسنًا، العنصر التال
Già che ci sei, sappi che i nostri calcoli indicano che potresti rimanere a corto di acqua potabile molto presto. Inoltre, potresti iniziare ad avere problemi di sfiato del serbatoio di idrogeno. E una domanda. La prossima volta che Jack guarda attraverso il sestante e il telescopio, vorremmo che vedesse come appare. Hai notato qualcosa sull'ottica, qualche 
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 1번
रॉजर
Well, stand by
Под капсуло
Jack, we're not certain when the best time is to implement this procedure, and what we want to do at this time is read it up to you, so you'll have it and understand it and we'll - We'll be able to do it quickly when the time comes. A
正解です。ジャック、全部揃っていますよ。素晴らしいですね。あり
Treibstoff vorhanden (2,
Хорошо
Роджер, Гавайи. Близнецы 4. Я тебя пре
शुभ संध्या। मैं 
Houston, Apollo 11. It's triggered the MASTER ALARM three times, now. There goes number 4. It goes up to about 1.4, then oscillates back down 
Gemelli 4. Negativo. Il nostro sigillo idrico non è A
ليس تمامًا يا جيم. الأمر يتعلق بمصفوفة W هذه. أتذكر أننا أعدنا تهيئتها في مدار القمر، ثم عملنا عليها أثناء عودتك بعد المشاهدات السابقة التي قمت بها، والآن أعدنا تهيئتها مرة أخرى في هذه ال
了解。少し待ってく
好的。我们需要高增益天线，在
オーロラセブン、ハワイキャップコム
सिग्मा सेवन, यह कैल क
Roger. E noi siamo pronti a fare il nostro allineamento p
정말 지구가 어떻게 생겼는지 설명하기는 어렵네요. 제 가운데 창문, 그러니까 둥근 창문 밖을 보고 있는데, 창문 자체가 지금 지구보다 훨씬 커요. 명암 경계선이 선명하게 보이고, 남아메리카 대륙 대부분과 중앙아메리카, 유카탄 반도, 플로리다 반도까지 다 보이네요. 동쪽 해안 바로 앞에
D'accord, Jack. Amplificateur de puissance, éteint, reto
Oui, je suppose que ça nous prendra encore 6 minutes
روج
네. 그리고 또 하나 저희가 한 일은 EPC 디스플레이 차단기를 내렸다는 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。气温正常。如果说有什么变化的话，那就是比
La cabine est prête, je ne veux plus abaisser le dôme. Tout se passe très bien. Vérification à l'heure: 18 minutes. OK au chronomètre. Propulseurs: roulis gauche automatique: 119°. Roulis droit automatique: 115°. Ro
Sì, Jack. Te l'ho riletto due volte. Comando reset, che ho già eseguito. Sto
好的
ट्रैंक्विलिटी, ह्यूस्टन। हम इस पर काम कर रहे हैं। प्रतीक्षा करें। कृपया मिशन टाइमर के लिए पैनल 11 पर सर्किट ब्
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Nach dreieinhalb Minuten sieht es immer noch gut aus. Ihre prognostizierte Abbruchzeit entspr
罗杰，休斯顿。我们今天的计划是从太空飞船“奥德赛号”开始，带您穿过隧道进入“水瓶座号”。我们会向您展示一下着陆器，现在您的电视操作员正躺在中央沙发上，看着弗雷德·海斯，他的头现在差不多在隧道入口处，背靠着下方的设备舱光学区域。弗雷德现在将传送进入隧
D'accord. Vous pouvez aussi oublier la « Suivi ». Bien, à la page 17, saisissez toutes les informations. À 4 minutes, nous avons une modification. Première ligne: CB(16) INVERTER 3, FERMER; ligne 2, rayez « Sélectionnez INVERTER 1 ». Ensuite, en descendant la page, après « ATTITUDE MONITOR », veuillez régler l'échelle de vitesse sur « 25 degrés par seconde ». Ensuite, quatre lignes plus bas, jusqu'à « BALANCE COUPLE », veuillez désactiver « BALANCE COUPLE-OFF ». Cela permet de désactiver les jets ascendants au cas où nous aurions besoin d'amortir des vitesses, même si nous ne pensons pas que ce sera nécessaire. Enfin, suiv
ठीक है। जैक, मुझे जो समझ आया, उसके अनुसार
로저. 저는 자동 모드로 도킹했는데, 말씀드렸다시피 접촉 순간을 정확히 기억하지 못했습니다. 도킹 프로브 표시기를 계속 확인했죠. 세 개의 캡처 래치, 아니, 그냥 세 개의 래치가 제대로 걸렸다는 걸 나타내는 두 개의 바버폴 표시가 떴고, 소프트 도킹이 완료된 겁니다. 그때 상황은 아주 안정적으로 보였습니다. 그래서 프리 모드로 전환하고 창밖을 다시 봤는데 여전히 안정적이었고, 2번 연료통을 분사했습니다. 그런데 그 순간 두 기체 사이에 회전이 시작됐는데, 원인은 잘 모르겠습니다. 아마 추력 때문일 수도 있고, 아니면 그 전부터 진동이 있었는데 제가 미처 알아채지 못했을 수도 있습니다. 어쨌든 프로브가 후퇴하는 동안 기체가 좌우로 심하게 흔들렸습니다. 제 생각에는 약 15도 정도 흔들렸던 것 같습니다. 그래서 다시 조종간을 잡고 프리 스위치를 다시 자동 모드로 돌려서 흔들림을 줄이려고 했습니다. 닐도 마찬가지였을 겁니다. 닐의 이야기는 나중에 직접 들어보시죠. 저는 우리가 성공적으로 후퇴하고 도킹하지 못할 거라고 생각했습니다. 하지만 약 6초에서 8초 정도, 제가 듣기에
Нил, ты что-нибудь помнишь об 
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 
알겠습니다. 104. 2+15. GMTRC 01일 00시 52분 14초. 13+48. 그리고 현재 RETRB를 사용할 수
沃利，误差在4度以内。它
जिस ब्लॉक में "सौर कोरोना और
Теперь положение при отстыковке и положение при выполнении маневра разделения должны быть одинаковыми, поэтому я буду использовать обновленное положение для выполнения маневра разделения. Разница составляет около 7 граду
हे फ्र
ジャッ
रॉ
— около 70 
आगे बढ़
Die Markierung am Pitchmarker zeigt leicht nach oben und stimmt daher
Vous 
D'accord, Jack. Je vais te le lire, puis ajouter quelques commentaires et nous en discuterons un peu. Cela devrait se produire peu après. Après la remise en service à 49 heures, si le temps le permet, nous aimerions que l'équipage vérifie s'il existe un angle de roulis permettant d'observer
Ricevuto. Tieni pr
Roger. Votre signal est faible mais très clair. Ça s'améliore. Pourriez-vous confirmer que le radiateur est branché sur FLOW, l'adaptateur bande C sur CONTINUOUS et la bande C de rentrée sur 
रॉजर। क्या आप कृपया मिलन पूरा होने तक अपने टी/एम स्विच को रियल
1
Roger. Pourriez-vous nous donner un numéro de faç
好的。就水资源而言，我们目前的情况仍然
Compris. Plage à parcourir: 13084 359
맞습니다. 그리고 지난번 덧셈 연습 문제에서 보셨던 것처럼, 그 페이지에 "재확립"이라는 부분
주변을 둘러보니, 전반적인 명암 대비는 햇빛에 드리워진 그림자 때문에 완전히 나타납니다. 아주
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 델타 채널로 연락이 닿았습니다. 브라보 채널로 가시죠. 잠시 쉬겠습니다. 염소 소독이 끝
Uno
わかりました
好的。请注意，
Roger, Jim. Wir würden gerne erneut einen Speic
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. كرة نارية حقيقية ف
Хорошо, у меня всё ещё устан
Ok. Imbar
Gémeaux 4, ici RKV Surgeon. Vous recevez un bilan progressif de votre tension artérielle. Pourriez-vous vérifier que vos paramètres sont bien réglé
分かりました。それで、お持ちのパッドはいつ頃発送される予定
Bonne relecture. 
نحن نتقدم بشكل جيد. 
わかった、ジャック。あの水、袋入りの水は残っている
ठीक है। पैनल 250 पर लगे दोनों सर्किट ब्रेकर खुल जाएंगे; पैनल 275 पर लगे दोनों सर्किट ब्रेकर
Non, nous sommes
Хорошо. Теперь оно снизилось — опустилось до 0,
فريد
هل
Roger. Mi dispiace disturbarti, Columbia. Due cose: ti chiediamo di selezionare una zona morta di 10 gradi nella tua checklist, in conformità con le procedure di Foxtrot 9 7; e in secondo luogo, vorremmo lasciare un display sul quale non si verifichino cicli, ma che venga costantemente aggiornato. Una volta ampli
气
맞습니다, 짐. 이는 배터리를 다시 연결할 
Ja, sie sin
यहां एक दिलचस्प खबर है जिसे सुनकर अच्छा लगा। ऐसा लगता है कि मिशिगन के एन आर्बर में एक नया युवा गिरोह पनपा है। इसका नाम गिलनेट गिरोह है। यह गिरोह एन आर्बर की गलियों में छुपकर घूमता है और कभी-कभी कानून को भी दरकिनार कर देता है। वे खुद को 'गुरिल्ला फॉर गुड' कहते हैं। उन्होंने कुछ कारनामे किए हैं, जैसे कि एक पुल पर अश्लील बातें लिखी हुई थीं, जिसे उन्होंने एक ही रात में रंग दिया। एक जर्जर मकान, जो आस-पड़ोस के बच्चों के बीच लोकप्रिय तो था, लेकिन खतरनाक भी था, उसे बंद कर दिया गया। शहर के बीचोंबीच स्थित गमले, जो इस बात पर बहस के कारण खाली पड़े थे कि इसके लिए कौन जिम्मेदार है (व्यापार या सरकार), फूलों से भर दिए गए। एक व्यस्त चौराहे पर लगी झाड़ी, जिसे दृष्टि बाधित करने वाला माना जा रहा था, उसे काट दिया गया, जिससे मालिक नाराज हो गया। ह्यूरन नदी के किनारे पड़ा कचरा भी उठा लिया गया। गिरोह के सदस्य गुमनाम किशोर हैं जो किसी भी तरह की पहचान नहीं चाहते। उनका मकसद लालफीताशाही को खत्म करना और अपने हिसाब से अच्छे काम करवाना है। इस संगठन में धार्मिक भावना की झलक भी मिलती है। मिशिगन विश्वविद्यालय के एक सहायक प्रोफेसर, जो इस गिरोह के विचारों के लिए अनौपचारिक सलाहकार की भूमिका निभाते हैं, ने कहा, "यह एक तरह का सर्वधर्म समूह है।" इसका नाम सेंट पीटर, यानी मछुआरे के जाल से लिया गया है। और यह इतना दूरस्थ है कि इसे किसी विशेष चर्च से नहीं जोड़ा जा सकता। उनके शिक्षक, जो अपना नाम गुप्त रखना चाहते हैं, ने कहा, "इसमें रॉबिन हुड की झलक मिलती है।" उनकी कई गतिविधियाँ गैर-कानूनी हैं। जब व्यवस्था ठप हो जाती है, तो वे लालफीताशाही के चक्कर लगाने के बजाय सीधे भलाई का काम करते हैं। इस गिरोह में लगभग 55 हाई स्कूल के लड़के-लड़कियाँ हैं, और 40-50 ऐसे भी हैं जो स्नातक होने से पहले इस गिरोह का हिस्सा थे। गिरोह बनाने का विचार डेट्रॉइट के एक झुग्गी बस्ती क्षेत्र
Housto
Il est indiqué d'effectuer les tâches de rangement, de ranger les casques et les sacs de rangement; de sortir le miroir, la liste de contrôle et le kit de mise au rebut. Ranger le kit de rangement provisoire, le sortir et le configurer pour une utilisation en 16 millimètres, HC-EX, f/4, 500, infini, 6 images par seconde. C'est tout ce qui est indiqué sur cette page. Nous en sommes là pour le moment. La prochaine étape aura lieu dans 
Oui. Pour 
روجر، نود أن نسألك عما إذا كنت قد ضغطت على زر الإدخال (ENTER) لنقل متجه الحالة من الفتحة إلى الفت
أفهم. تجاهل التمرين في الوقت الحالي. هل يمكنك إخباري بم
ठीक है, वैंस,
좋습니다. 162번 패널, 변경 없음. 163번 패널, 변경 없음. 이제 201번 패널에서 '음식 보온기'를 '끄기'
इस समय मेरे सूट का तापमान 68 डिग्री है। मुझे अभ
Wir haben eine weitere Sichtung der Trägerrakete. Sie scheint nahezu waagerecht zu uns und direkt vor uns zu s
Okay. One more note on the water, Jack. If you don't bleed the pressure off when you - don't take enough water to bleed the pressure off completely, the pressure that's left on there is going to drain away in a period of 1 to 3 hours. So it's a small amount of oxygen, but we might a
Okay, Charlie. It's not open very far. It's hard to give you a good reading without shunting it again, but the arrow is at about the one o'clock position. Now I reduce the flow, and I'll let it stabilize here. Right now our onboard reading is about 0.4, and that's with the arrow in the O2 valve at the two o'clock position. Wou
Хорошо, Водолей. Мы смотрим на ваш подвес и замечаем, что у нас загружен четырехструйный воздуховод, а на площадке у вас два. Но давайте будем использо
Джек, Хьюстон. Связь то улучшается, то ухудшается, и последнее сообщение, которое я скопировал, было «ПЕ
Abbiamo copiato i talkback del propellente primario e secondario sul quad Bravo 1 sul palo del barbiere durante la sepa
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы собираемся о
أنتظر أن أستلمه من جهاز ا
收到。Y
مر
Seven, this is Cap Co
不要
36651, 33627, минус 
네, 13번입니다. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 연료 전지 3번에서 산소 흐름이 원활하지 않은 것 같습니다. 연료 전지 3번의 REAC 밸브를 닫아주세요. 연료 전지 1번과 2
Gémeaux VI. Lisez-vous encor
さて、話をしながらこれをお見せしたいと思います。カメラのように使えます。ここに絞り（F値）コントロールがあり、f:22に設定します。もちろん、これは取り込む光量を最小限に抑えるものです。これは安全対策です。さて、後でf:22から離れた方が良いと思うようになるかもしれません。ズームの下にあります。ズームコントロール、見えますか？真ん中のボタンがズームで、真ん中の
Ihre
Roger, Frank. Vorremmo aggiornarvi sul
收到。信号干扰很大。危机海就在我们前方的地平线上，皮卡德陨石坑位于中间。我们现在正处于月球日出或航天器日落的阶段。这是太阳刚刚升起的月球区域。我们现在所在的这片月海表面斑驳，但陨石坑并不多，所以它应该比较新。这里是丰饶海，我们正接近一个大型陨石坑，属于三角洲边缘型；它的中心周围有一圈奇特的圆形裂纹。你
罗杰。我们想让你们俩都进入摄像机的拍摄范
이 기간 동안 타나나리브에서 이루어진 교신 녹음 파일은 현재 구할 수 없습니다. 타나나리브 통신 기술자는 휴스턴 관제소(CAP COM)에 77:54:27에 
Interruttore automatico TR-256 - chiuso
That switc
Le bracelet es
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मध्यमार्ग सुधार संभवतः 104 घंटे पर होगा, और हम केवल 4 से 6 फीट प्रति सेकंड के डेल्टा-वी की तलाश कर रहे हैं। ठीक है। यह पहला बिंदु है। अब, मैं आपको उपभोग्य सामग्रियों के बारे में जानकारी दूंगा। ठीक है। आपके पास 1498 - यानी 1498 एम्प-घंटे शेष हैं। इसका मतलब है कि 61 घंटों में आप - यह औसतन 24.5 एम्प
Veui
I say, where 
حسنًا يا فريد. ما سأشرحه لك هو في نهاية عملية فصل الطاقة عن كابل وحدة التحكم. وللعلم فقط، بعد إتمام هذه العملية بالكامل، وعندما تكون جاهزًا لنقل البيانات إلى وحدة التحكم، سيتم فص
로저. 콜럼비아호에 거주하시는 여러분께 알려드립니다. 오늘은 콜롬비아 독립기념일입니다. 어젯밤에는 필리핀의 글로리아 디아즈가 미스 유니버스에 선정되었습니다. 그녀는 60명의 경쟁자를 제치고 세계 최고의 미인으로 등극했습니다. 디아즈는 18세이며, 검은 머리와 눈을 가지고 있고, 신체 사이즈는 34.5인치(약 87cm)에 허리 23인치(약 61cm), 엉덩이 34.5인치(약 89cm)입니다. 2위는 호주, 3위는 이스라엘, 4위는 일본이 차지했습니다. 화요일 밤에 돌아오시는 길에 워싱턴에서 아메리칸 리그와 내셔널 리그 올스타전이 열립니다. 뉴욕 양키스의 멜 스토틀마이어가 아메리칸 리그의 선발 투수로 유력합니다. 내셔널 리그 선발 투수는 아직 정해지지 않았습니다. 현재 9명의 선발 투수가 명단에 올라 있습니다. 우주 프로그램의 연구는 분명히 큰 성과를 거두었지만, 연구가 항상 결실을 맺는 것은 아닌 것 같습니다. 10억 개 이상의 나무 스프링 쥐덫을 생산해 온 애니멀 트랩 컴퍼니 오브 아메리카의 모회사인 우드스트림 코퍼레이션은 더 나은 쥐덫을 만들었지만 세상은 그 덫에 관심을 보이지 않았다고 보고했습니다. 사실, 회사는 결국 구식 쥐덫으로 돌아가야
That's correct. And the next thing you will do will be to set the mission timer and what we've done is to only turn on the mission timer on the MD
フレッド、了解。次は灰色のテープをもう少し取って、青いノズル（コマンダーノズルとLMPノズル）の出口部分の半分を覆ってください。これは、キャニスターを外した状態でこのループを二次LiOHキャニスタ
Im Tunnel herrscht derzeit mehr Feuchtigkeit als jemals zuvor. Subjektiv konnten wir jedoch keine Veränderung oder Zunahme der Luftfeuchtigkeit feststellen. An anderen Stellen im Raumschiff scheint keine Feuchtigkeit vorhanden zu sein. Beispielsweise beschlagen die Fenste
Gemini VI, Gemini VI, Houston CAP COM. Wie 
The objects in the foreground are parts of the
حسنًا. كين، لقد وضعنا بعض التعليقات على الجزء الأخير من الشريط بعد أن سمعنا منك، ويتم الآن إعاد
D'accord, Houston, nous allo
我很容易就能从另一个星球飞过来，感觉自己仰面朝天，地球就在我的上方，但当你从分裂
Не могли бы вы проверить показания угла рыскания по сравнению с тем, что вы показали мне в 
Négatif. Mais nous avons 
로저, 
11, Houston, je vous donnerai un autre Mark à 33 minutes. Restez à l'écoute
我们看到助推器运行正常，飞行轨迹看起来不错，而且我们似乎也能保持接近预期的中段飞行轨迹。稍后我们会提供一些具体数
Ok, Vance. Hai ragione. Abbiamo telecamere praticamente configurate come hai detto. Per il modulo di comando, pensi che l'EL con obiettivo 250, pellicola CEX, f/8 a 250° sia la scelta migliore, e ora stai dicendo che pensi di vederlo dalla finestra 5? È co
Роджер. Из новостной ленты отдела по связям с общественностью: «Аполлон-11» по-прежнему доминирует в новостях по всему миру. Только четыре страны — коммунистический Китай, Северная Корея, Северный Вьетнам и Албания — еще не сообщили своим гражданам о вашем полете и высадке на Луну. Один журналист сказал, что у него закончились слова, чтобы описать ваш успех. Сегодня вечером президент Никсон планирует посмотреть бейсбольный матч всех звезд в Вашингтоне. После игры он отправится в район поиска и спасения в Тихом океане. В среду вечером он вылетит с острова Джонстон на вертолете на военно-морской корабль связи «Арлингтон». Затем в четверг утром он снова сядет в вертолет и полетит на «Хорнет» как раз вовремя, чтобы стать
로저, 15분 전입니다. 짐, 재진입 절차에 대한 일반적인 지침을 전달해 드리겠습니다. 63-1 업데이트와 자세한 내용은 거스에게서 다음 미국 
Vous l
نعم، هذا هو المكان الذي كنت أنظر إليه. كان الضوء ساطعًا لدرجة أنه أظهرها بوضوح. ما ذكّرني بها هو أنني أنظر الآن من النافذة وأرى جزءًا كبيرًا من حقل النجوم الجديد الذي خلقته لنا. هناك 
没错。
Ваше исследование также выполняется на 2 секунды быстрее. Ретроспективная последовательность для (зоны вос
Roger. Ich habe deine Rückblende nicht mitbekomm
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Технич
Négatif. Je vous informe simplement que mon 
Faccio un b
Ricevuto, Bill. Mentre fate le pulizie, potete darci un rapporto sulla situazione
Roger. Hawaii calling Gemin
Roger, tu as bonne mine. Passe une bonne 
D'accord, Bill. Je crois que je veux revenir sur mon dernier point concernant l'utilisation du vecteur d'état embarqué pour le point 4. Après l'avoir examiné plus en détail au sol, ils doivent commencer à fabriquer les fichiers et à effectuer tous leurs calculs. Plutôt que de reporter ou de refaire le travail, nous allon
Ich bezweifle, dass es in B1 auf den Helm passt. Das andere vielleicht – es könnte in die Schlafhalterung passen. Wir haben sie in unseren Helmtaschen, und ich denke, 
これに勝るものはない。よし
好
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地から昨夜の地質学に関する質問についてコメントをいただきます。私たちは、比較的滑らかなクレーター地帯に着陸しました。そこには細長い二次クレーター、つまり円形の二次クレーターが点在しており、そのほとんどには、大きさに関わらず、隆起した縁があります。これは必ずしも全てがそうではありません。周囲には、はっきりと縁が見えない小さなクレーターもいくつかあります。この地域全体の基質は、非常に細かい砂からシルトまでです。地球上でこれに最も近いのは、粉末状の黒鉛でしょう。この基質には、丸みを帯びたものや角張ったものなど、様々な形、大きさ、質感の岩石が埋まっており、多くの岩石の硬さは様々です。先ほども申し上げたように、私は単純な玄武岩や気泡玄武岩のようなものを見ました。結晶のないものや、小さな白い斑晶が1%から5%未満含まれているものもありました。そして、岩についてですが、私たちは岩場の中にいます。ここでは岩の大きさは大体2フィート（約60cm）ほどですが、それより大きいものもいくつかあります。岩の中には地表に出ているものもあれば、部分的に露出しているもの、あるいはかろうじて露出しているものもあります。地表を横切ってスコップで作業しているうちに、地表より下の岩
나침반이 뒤쪽에 있는 자세 계기와 자이로스코프의 영향을 너무 많이 받습니다. 그래서 나침반을 그 계기들에 너무 가까이 가져갈
روجر. تم التحقق من Canary وTS Plus 5. يعمل الوضع اليدوي بشكل جيد على جميع المحاور. يعمل كل من نظام التحكم الإلكتروني (Fly-by-wire) والوضع التلقائي بشكل جيد على جميع المحاور. يعمل نظام التخمي
罗杰，
В Американской лиге Детройт разгромил Кливленд со сч
Okay, und ich wer
Roger. 1, G&N: 38658, -054, +065, TIG 078 02 0345, +29180, +03779, -01325; roulis NA, tangage 041. Le reste du PAD est NA. Pulvérisation de deux réacteurs, 19 secondes. 4 PAD, G&N: 38658, -054, +065, TIG 084 29 5059, +31373, +03760, -00968; roulis NA, tangage 0
아폴로 8호
Inizia a misurare
11号，休斯
Roger, Frank. You could help us out if you would explain where you are relative to the booster. In other words,
Ricevuto. Pronti. La pressione in cabina è di 4,9 (psi), quasi 5. La temperatura in 
알겠습니다, 찰리. 밸브가 많이 열려 있지는 않네요. 다시 조정하지 않고 정확한 수치를 알려드리기가 
Okay, Jim. And I want to pass you up a short procedure for activating the S-band steerable antenna, which we'd like you to do after you complete the 90-degree yaw. A
Gemini, Canary. Stand by to copy new
यह सही है। अब हम जी एंड सी चे
Okay. Just
자이로스코프는 보호되어 있습니다. 제 기체는 초당 약 2도의 요(yaw)
Хорошо. Время 32 часа 00 минут. Инструкции по завершении маневра: крен 101,0, тангаж 090,0, рыскание 000,0. Верхний тангаж минус 23, рыскание 93. Используйте стандартные процедуры для снижения скоростей. После стабилизаци
I suspect this boulder field may have some of its origin with this large sharp edged rocky rim crater that we passed over at final descent. Now yesterday I said that was about the size of a football field, and I have to admit it was a little - little hard to measure coming in. But I thought that it might just fit in the Astrodome as we came by it. And the rocks in the vi
Роджер. И эт
はい
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Прочитываю пункт 382: клапан регулирования подачи воды во вторичном испарителе выключен, а клапан регулирования подачи воды в первичном испарител
Abbiamo alcune procedure in corso, e le ho viste, Fred. Credo che presto te le invieremo per specificare quali telecamere e impostazioni usare. Ma... sembra abbastanza vicin
Tranquility Base, Houston. Nous avons examiné la liste de vérification, et le seul changement que nous avons constaté pour
हां, मैं
了解です、ジム。もちろん、デテントから外れるとエラー針がリセットされ、姿勢基準が失われます。新しい姿勢基準を確立しますが、この時点では姿勢制御をしているので、必ずしもバーン姿勢とは限りません。さて、「ENTER」キーでスクラッチを始めましょう。「404プラスゼロ」まで全てスクラ
Roger, ich wollte nur mal nachfragen. Falls bei euch Probleme mit der Erdung auftreten, wäre es nett, wenn jemand m
روجر. ستكون زاوية ميلك 12 درجة، وزاوية ميلك 270 درجة، وزاوية انحرافك 0 درجة. زوايا هوائي الكسب العالي: ميلك +
Okay. Das war – das war deutlich zu verstehen. Wie Sie wissen, arbeiten wir gerade an den Anmeldeformalitäten. Ich habe vorläufige Kopien, aber wir können sie Ihnen noch nicht übergeben. Sie scheinen etwa 125.000 Meilen entfernt zu sein, die Sache nimmt langsam Fahrt auf, und die Astros haben gestern Abend gew
AP 통신에 따르면, 미국인들은 교황 바오로 2세가 이탈리아에서 집전하는 크리스마스 미사를 시청했고, 유럽인들은 지금까지 발사된 가장 강력한 통신 위성을 통해 아폴
ट्रैंक्विलिटी 
Und, Houston, Tranquility Base möchte Ihnen ein paar Anmerkungen zur geologischen Frage von gestern Abend geben. Wir befinden uns in einem relativ glatten Kraterfeld mit länglichen, kreisförmigen Sekundärkratern, von denen die meisten unabhängig von ihrer Größe einen Rand aufweisen. Das trifft jedoch nicht überall zu. Es gibt einige kleinere Krater, die keinen erkennbaren Rand haben. Der Boden in diesem Gebiet besteht aus sehr feinem Sand bis hin zu Schluff. Ich würde sagen, dass er auf der Erde am ehesten mit Graphitpulver vergleichbar 
روجر
जिम, जब आप अपना सामान व्यवस्थित कर लें और सुविधा हो जाए, तो हम बैटरी चार्जिंग को थोड़ी देर के लि
了解。今、そこにいます。それでは、MIDデッドバンドATTホールドにし
أرى بعض الرقائق ال
Выглядит ли это оттуда лучше, чем во время баллист
مرحباً، كولومبيا، هيوستن. نود منك البدء في تنفيذ قائمة التحقق الخاصة بالتخلص من الطائرة. نوصي بالاطلاع على الصفحتين F11 وF12، ونري
那是——那是我捡起一些漂浮在镜头前的
Je crois que nous répondons au numéro 9. Il me semble que c'était vers 
लगभग 179 मील पर हमारा लॉक-ऑन हो गया था, और रडार बोरसाइटेड लगभग 156 मील पर हो गया; और सुइयाँ अपेक्षाकृत स्थिर हैं; वे ठीक दिख 
Roger. À titre d'information, est-ce que la valeur du pé
フェイスプレートが閉まり、ロックされているか再確認してください。ヘルメットはロックされ、手袋は装着され、Y字型の入口と出口があり、ECSホースはフリーです。それから、コマンドパイロットスーツチェックを行います。これは既に実施済みです…フローをチェックします。ハッチロックは開いています。その後、他の項目もチェックしてください。実際に減圧モードを開始すると
Ok, Joe. Vediamo che inizia a muoversi. Tuttavia, non sembra che escano mol
Roger. Maintenant, en
ジェミニ4号、こちらカントン
입력 및 활성화를 
是的
Segna il 
Okay, sounds g
そう願って
Well, James, if you can't take any
याव बहुत अच्छे से जवाब दे रही है। रोल 
Достигая конца мертвой зоны, звук возвращается очень четк
いい感じですね。静止させ
Это «Дружба Семь». Я на
لقد أغلقناه؛ قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية المغلق - 
جيم، في وقت سابق من المساء، أبلغ فريدو عن وجود تسريب من النافذة رقم 1 في وحدة القيادة. كما أبلغ عن قطعة معدنية فضية اللون، مربعة الشكل تقريبًا، طول ضلعها حوالي 10 سم، تطفو في الهواء. كنا نحاول تحديد ما إذا كان هذا تسريبًا جديدًا أم أنه جزء من ا
रॉजर। आप कौन सा 
मैं डिटेंट 2 को ज़रू
روجر
罗杰。没错。第 11 步是“如果已启用，请将其关闭”，第 12 步（也是最后一步）是“接
Roger, 8. 010 689 260 Persei Zeta, giù 048, sinistra 05. Il resto non è applicabile. Sirio, Rigel, insieme
Das ist richtig. Jetzt erhalten Sie höchstwahrscheinlich die Meldung „37 ENTER 06 ENTER“ auf Ihrem Computer. Wir möchten den Computer in den Standby-Modus versetzen. Wenn die Meldung „37 06“ erscheint, müssen Sie „ENTER“ drücken, um den Code 62 zu erhalten. Sobald der Code 62 angezeigt wird, können Sie mit „PROCEED“ fortfahren, bis die Leerzeichen erscheinen. Denken Sie 
알겠
Attendere 20 second
К в
이글, 콜럼비아. 
ह्यूस्टन, वो 16 देगा, जैक। और ठीक है, मैंने
SÌ
我们现在看到的是 10
Ricevuto. Per... di Delta-V, è 42,
لا، أنا أفضل الموقف المواجه للأم
لا أ
تحقق من جهاز الإنذار ال
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है, हम एरिया होटल से मौसम का जायजा ले रहे हैं और वहां मौसम अच्छा
Вну
Oh, sì, lo
好的，面板
Ricevuto
ठीक है, समझ लीजिए कि आप चाहेंगे कि हम कुछ देर के लिए बैटरी चार्जिंग बंद कर दें और तापमान मापने के लिए CM TM चालू कर दें। जैक की चेकलिस्ट में कुछ बदलाव हैं, और जैसे ही जैक अपना काम पूरा कर लेगा, मैं उसे COMM का काम
روجر. إذا كنت تقرأني الآن، فأنا أستخدم الميكروفون المفتوح لأنني أستخدم خاصية الضغط للتحدث في نظام ICS، وخاصية خفض مستوى الصوت الاحتياطي.
Roger. Hai ricevuto la mia ultima risposta? Houston ti darà il via libera per uscire dalla navicella spaziale sopra Guaym
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 컴퓨터 작업이 완
他の
قراءتك 
أعلنت ألمانيا الغربية يوم الاثنين "يوم أبولو". مُنح طلاب المدارس في بافاريا عطلة رسمية. وشُجع مو
Here we g
了解しました。20のレンジは、GETが21.50.00の時で、プラス22.24でした。22プラス00プラス00のレンジは17.63でした。22プラス12プラス00のレンジは18.33でした。22プラス20プラス00のレンジは19.55でした。22プラス30の
سأتوجه إلى الرصيف للحصول على تذكرة المرور الليلي،
了解、11。PADS を 2 つ取得しました。30 と 31 です。30 SPS/G&N: 36691、マイナス 061、プラス 066 135 23 4156。NOUN 81: 32 - 補正値、プラス 32011、プラス 06818、マイナス 02650 181 054 014。遠地点は NA、近地点プラス 00230 3286 - 補正値、32836、燃焼時間 2 28 32628 24 1511 357。次の 3 行は NA です。名詞61: プラス1103、マイナス17237、11806、36275、195、04、52。設定星はデネブとベガ、242、172、012。2つのジェット機から16秒間のアレージ
프랭크, 저도 같은 생각입니다. 달 표면의 광활하고 고요한 공간은 경외감을 불러일으키고, 지구에 있는 우
ザンジバル・カプ・コム、フレンドシップ・セブンから
D'accord. Faites-le remonter à bord. Vous aurez la ligne de visée des Bermudes dans 
いいえ、再開する前に、それで何をしたか確認するのを待って
Howdy there, Mike. We're ready to go ahead and have you switch to your OMNI positions for your sleep period, and we would like the following high gain switch positions: your high gain anten
收到。
Roger, Jim. Quello che succede è che, ovviamente, impostiamo... quando si esce dal punto di arresto, si reimpostano gli indicatori di errore e si perde il riferimento di assetto. Si stabilisce un nuovo riferimento di assetto, e potrebbe non essere l'assetto di combustione, dato che, a questo punto, stiamo controllando l'assetto con... Ora, riprendiamo con "INVIO", cancella. Cancella tutto fino a "404 più zero" e vogliamo che tu esegua questi pa
-01594 +00000 +52885 178 155 000, 해당 없음, +00192 52909. 제 말 이해하시겠습니까? 아폴로 8호, 휴스턴
問題ありません。消耗品はすべて基準値を上回っています。水素タンクの問題ですが、水素タンク2のヒーターをOFFにす
Well, I hope t
로저. 45-1 101. 2+08. 12 37 50. 5+36. 10+33. 46-1 114. 2+25 14 12 47. 4+05. 9+33. 47-1 전후방 추진기 발사. 08 및 120. 0+14 및 2+30. 15 46 36. 3+17. 8+37. 48-1 전후방 추진기. 24 및 120. 0+40 및 230, 수정 2+30. 17 20 19. 2+42. 8+43. 49-4 111. 2+21. 20 06 48. 4+11. 9+46. 44 브라보, 전후방 추진기 14번과
Ricevuto. Bermuda in standby. Qui Friendship Seven. Carburante 103-101 [percento], ossigeno 78-100 [percento]. Tutti i voltaggi sopra 25, am
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हम चाहेंगे कि आप हाई गेन पर म
Ok, quello che ho qui fuori, Jack, è il LEVVA, che è già stato mostrato in precedenza. È un copricapo da indossare in superficie, e io... sto portando qui quello di Jim per mostrarvi un paio di MOD. Un problema precedente era che il cast dei personaggi in superficie non era ben distinto. Quindi, non solo la tuta di Jim ha delle strisce rosse, ma come potete vedere anche il suo LEVVA ha una... una striscia ros
Это «Дружба Семь». Всё по-прежнему в порядке. Капсула 
दरअसल, अगर आप इसे लगातार दो या तीन बार घुमा सकें, तो हम यह अनुमान लगा सकते हैं कि यह कहाँ जा रहा है और शायद जरूरत पड़ने पर इसे फिर से सेट
ठीक है। जैक, मैं इस पर आपके साथ चर्चा कर सकता हूँ, क्योंकि हमारी विभिन्न प्रक्रियाओं में इस चेकलिस्ट को दो-तीन बार लिखा जा चुका है। सबसे ऊपर वाली पंक्ति में, पहले दो खुले हैं, अगले तीन बंद हैं, और अब हम QUAD TCA के 1, 2, 3, 4 को खोलने जा रहे हैं; CROSSFEED बंद रहेगा, और TEMP/PRESS DISPLAYFLAG खुल जाएगा, और हम PQCS को खोलने जा रहे हैं, MAIN SOV बंद रहेगा, 
편안하게 느껴져요
음, 지금은 그
ठीक है। आप ज़
Finora il nostro problema prin
Okay. Ich verstehe nicht
जेमिनी 4, फिर से। मुझे रोशनी का वही घुमावदार आकार दिखाई दे रहा है, उत्तरी रोशनी की तरह, बस फर्क इतना है कि ये हमारे नीचे हैं। मैंने इन्हें पहले भी देख
Giusto. Stavo guardando l'orologio
没错。姿态：横滚0度，偏航2度（右），俯仰-33度。所有速率均为零。我目前处于工作状态。时钟仍设置为返航时间，逆行时间为04+32+28。我从百慕大收到的逆行时间正确。客舱压力稳定在5.7。客舱空气温度90华氏度。相对湿度30%。冷却剂用量68%。宇航服环境温度65华氏度。宇航服压力指示为5.8。宇航服蒸汽温度60华氏度。我感觉非常舒适。但是，我暂时不想调低温度。主氧气浓度78%；备用氧气浓度102%。主总线为24。1
Okay. I'm going to start braking down a little bit very shortly here because we'r
إليكم تقريرًا من هاري روزنتال من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في هيوستن. أضفى بابا نويلان البهجة على ليلة عيد الميلاد للطفل جيفري لوفيل، البالغ من العمر عامين. طرق الأول باب منزله وجلب الهدايا، بينما قام الثاني بتشغيل محرك أبولو 8 العائد من القمر. ارتدى الأول بدلة حمراء ولحية بيضاء، وأطلق صيحة "هو هو" بصوت عالٍ سُمع في آخر الشارع. أما الثاني، فكان محركًا ضخمًا ينفث اللهب خلف القمر، وكان الآلاف ينتظرون بفارغ الصبر خبر تشغيله. "يرجى العلم أن هناك بابا نويل" كانت أولى كلمات أبولو 8 بعد أن خرجت من الصمت اللاسلكي لتُعلم العالم القلق بعد 15 دقيقة من إتمام المحرك لمهمته الحاسمة. قال كين ماتينجلي من مركز التحكم بالمهمة: "لم يتوقع أحد منا أن يحصل على هدية عيد ميلاد أفضل من هذه". وجاء الرد من العقيد فرانك بورمان، قائد المركبة الفضائية: "نشكر كل من كان على الأرض نيابةً عنا. كما تعلمون، لم نكن لننجح لولاكم". في هذه اللحظة، أضاءت شجرة عيد الميلاد أمام شاشات التحكم في مركز المهمة، وقرأ رائد الفضاء هاريسون شميدت نسخة فضائية من قصة "زيارة من القديس نيكولاس" على الطاقم. بدأت القصة قائلة: "كانت ليلة عيد الميلاد، وفي أعماق الفضاء، فاز طاقم أبولو 8 للتو بسباق القمر". كان طاقم مركز المهمة قد أرجأ الاحتفال حتى عودة والد جيفري، الكابتن جيمس لوفيل من البحرية، برفقة الرائد ويليام أ. أندرس من القوات الجوية والعقيد بورمان، سالمين إلى ديارهم. في أي ليلة عيد ميلاد أخرى، كانت عائلات رواد الفضاء ستجتمع في الكنيسة لحضور قداس عيد الميلاد، لكن هذا العام كانوا جميعًا يتابعون بشغف عبر شاشات التلفزيون. كانت المنازل القريبة من مركز المركبات الفضائية المأهولة مزينة. اصطفت فوانيس على الطراز المكسيكي على المروج المحيطة بمنزل لوفيل وفي جميع أنحاء مجتمعه في تيمبر كوف، وعندما وصل أربعة من سكان لوفيل، توقفت سيارة تحمل رجلاً طويل القامة يرتدي زي بابا نويل ويحمل كيساً كبيراً على ظهره. صعد سانتا كلوز إلى الباب وطرق بقوة. فُتح الباب، وإذا بجيفري لوفيل، الذي سيبلغ الثالثة من عمره في الرابع عشر من يناير، يقف هناك. ارتد جيفري إلى الوراء عند رؤيته. حملته والدته، فتشبث بها جيفري وهو لا يزال يرتجف. قالت شقيقته باربرا، البالغة من العمر خمسة عشر عامًا: "في العام الماضي هرب باكيًا". في وقت سابق، اضطرت للركض خلفه لمنعه من إطفاء جميع الأضواء. شاهد طفلا لوفيل الآخران، جيمس البالغ من العمر ثلاثة عشر عامًا وسوزان البالغة من العمر عشرة أعوام، المشهد بمتعة كبيرة. أخيرًا، اختفى سانتا والأطفال في الداخل؛ ووُضعت الهدايا تحت الشجرة؛ ولن تُفتح حتى اليوم. أعدت السيدة لوفيل مشروب البيض والبسكويت للضيوف، وشاهدوا جولة تلفزيونية مدتها خمس وعشرون دقيقة على سطح القمر قدمها رواد الفضاء الثلاثة. لاحقًا، اصطحب الأصدقاء السيدة لوفيل وباربرا وجيفري في جولة في الحي المُضاء بأضواء عيد الميلاد. في سماء صافية، أضاء القمر في طوره الربع الأول بضوء ساطع، وتوقف رواد الفضاء الثلاثة، الذين رأوا ثمار الخلق أكثر من أي إنسان آخر، عن استكشافهم العلمي هناك ليبثوا إلى الأرض الكلمة الجليلة؛ من سفر التكوين. "وخلق الله الفلك والسماء
आप इ
了解。T2: 102 54 2900 103 51 5600 106 37 3500 109 10 0000、T2はプラス2126です。T3: 104 39 4100 001
जेमिनी VI, टेक्सास CAP COM। हम कमांड पायलट क
दोलन काफी अच्छे हैं। मुझे लगता है कि ASCS अब काम करना बंद कर चुका है। आपातकालीन ड्र
双子座，这里是休斯顿。这只是对OAMS使用情况的粗略估计。等金丝雀活动结束
알겠습
フライ・バイ・ワイヤで低高度を飛
Friendship Seven, this is Zanzibar Cap Com. Telemetry indicates all systems go. Medical status go,... reports same, we have a little bit of telemet
Это подтверждается. Добавьте это в начало страницы. Что мы на самом деле делаем... Давайте добавим это прямо перед "Активацией". Другая процедура вверху страницы относится к "Настройке регулировки подвеса", и мы просто пропускаем всю эту процедуру. Поэтому
Roger. Die bisherigen Probleme sind auf eine unbekannte Ursache zurückzuführen, wahrscheinlich auf eine Belastung Ihrer Zapfenzelle, die jetzt 91 beträgt und daher
Okay. Okay, Jack. Stavo per dire che, per pura coinciden
रॉजर। अपो
Roger. Selbst aus dieser Höhe können wir sehen, dass sie noch steil sind. Die Sonne wirft 
Roger. Stiamo ricevendo un sacco di interferenze. Il Mare delle Crisi è di fronte a noi all'orizzonte, e il cratere scuro Picard è visibile al centro. O
收到。3分钟即可穿越夏威
H
ठीक है। यह परफॉर्म है - प्रीहीट, और क्य
알겠습니다, 밴스. 그럼 좀 더 천천히 진행하도록 노
Мы хотели бы попросить вас выключить питание оптики до тех пор, пока она вам снова н
好，我们再来一次
Okay. Ich bin auf Panel 9. Empfangsbereit. Soll 
Bon, comme vous le savez, le mode de pilotage est configuré pour la dérive. Le mode sélectionné est normal, automatique, avec les gyroscopes bloqués. J'ai sélectionné l'attitude de rentrée atmosphérique. Je suis bie
And if you didn't see our resid
حسنًا. تحديث المواد الاستهلا
我这里有一些
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 말씀하
Okay. We're just about there in pitch and in... middle gimbal angle, 
700、150アップ。美しい。9000。PGNS
Роджер. 55 процентов. Могу я узнать температуру и давление? Сейчас мы отправим вам команду на под
Questo è affer
حسنًا. سنحاول الحصول على الوزن لك أيضًا يا بيل. الخزان رقم 1، نسبة الأكس
روجر، بيل. شكرًا لكما، هل يمكنكما تزويدنا بالقراءة متى ما سنحت لك
MARC
Roger. Wir zeigen Ihnen, dass es knapp eine Stunde bis zur zweiten
Okay. Step 1, "ATTITUDE CONTROL, three to PULSE"; 2, "Roll with the
C'est ma faute. 
रॉजर, माइक। ऐसा लगता 
نحن الآن في وضعية منخفضة للغاية، لدرجة أنني لا أعتقد أن المحطات الأرضية قادرة على رصدنا. لقد سمعنا عدة اتصالات متقطعة. سنبقى على هذه الوضعية لبعض الوقت لإبقاء الصاروخ المعزز في مجال رؤيتنا. لا يبدو أننا نحرز تقدمًا كبيرًا في الاقتراب منه حاليًا، إذ يبدو أنه لا يزال على نفس المسافة تقريبًا. خلال الرؤية الليلية عندما كان الصاروخ المعزز أسفلنا، بدا وكأن السماء مليئة بالنجوم. كان هناك الكثير من الدخان المتصاعد من الصاروخ إلى السماء، حتى أنني علّقت على ذلك قائلًا إنها بدت كنجوم. عندما تنظر عن كثب إلى الصاروخ المعزز في ذلك الوقت، يمكنك رؤية الوقود - في الواقع الأبخرة البيضاء المتصاعدة من مؤخر
Okay.
NIEDRIGER BETRA
The shutter doesn't go down and the doors, or whatever they call them, don't open again. That's the third set, about. We're t
Roger. Juste un petit rappel: n’oubliez pas de remettre à zéro les erreurs avant d’ac
자일로스 알약을 먹기 위해 잠시 바이저를 열었었어요. 제가 가지고 있는 나머지 음식들은 전부 부스러지거나 녹아서 먹을 수가 없네요. 그래서 자일로스 알약이 제 마지막 무중력 식사
了解、11番。放射線についてはコピーしました。それから、ちょっと変な感
알겠습니다.
Это Кэл. Сейчас я читаю тебя очень слабо, 
了解。もう一度言ってください。何も読ん
あなたが準備できれば、私たちもすべて準備完了です、マイ
알겠습니다. 비행 계획에 대한 자세한 내용을 알려드리겠습니다. 물론 -3이 없으므로 중간 코스 3 관련 내용을 모두 삭제해야 합니다. 특히 54시간 30분경에 언급된 부분은 나중에 다시 진행할 예정인데, 자세한 내용은 잠시 후에 알려드리겠습니다. 좋습니다. 이제 배터리 충전 시간을 약 3시간 앞당기겠습니다. 터널 벤트 밸브(DELTA-P) 위치도 3시간 앞당기겠습니다. 그런 다음 비행 계획의 57시간 지점으로 이동하여 숫자를 57시간에서 54시간으로 변경하고 진행하시면 됩니다. 비고란에는 "O2 연료 전지 퍼지 및 폐수 배출"이라고 되어 있습니다. 이전에 수행하지 않았다면 54시간 50분에 수행해 주십시오. 그러면 TV 통과는 55시간에 
D'accord, registre 1, plus 27218; registre 2, plus 35570; registre 3, plus 33010; et pour récupérer la bande morte étroite, nou
음, 우리는 현재로서는 방사형으로 위쪽으로 향하는 방향
アトランティック船、こちらフレンドシップセブン
Ricevuto. Tutti i sistemi sembrano a posto qui. È tutto ciò che abbiamo, a meno che tu non abbia altro da s
네. 그럼 이제 실내 조명(숫자
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। तस्वीर की स्पष्टता और बारीकियों से हम वाकई बहुत प्रभावित हैं। रंग भी बहुत अच्छे ह
Okay, Vance. We're pointed just a little ways off from looking directly at the Moon. Jim is holding the camera through window 3. The Sun is coming at about 40 degrees off our left side, and what we are going to show you in just a minute is about 30 seconds of waste water dump and just show you just what it lo
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。收到。你的点火正时为11秒；VGX为+0.2，VGY为-1.8，VGZ为-0.2
Eagle, Houston. Während des Ladevorgangs mussten wir die Integration abbrechen. Wir beginnen diesen Ladevorgang von vorn.
好吧，你
はい
了解。10、/: 45597、マイナス 040、プラス 157、プラス 35189、マイナス 01513、マイナス 00346 180 007 000、11 月のアルファ星、プラス 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253、照準星 Scorpii Delta (別名 Dzuba) 下 071、左 45、プラス 0748 マイナス 16500 12995 36300、主星 Sirius、副星 Rigel、129 155 010、4 つの四重連星、15 秒、アレージ、T マイナス 3 で地平線 2.9 の窓ライン上、マイ
Poussez tout ça par-dessus bord.
Fa
D'ac
いいえ、フランクはもう寝ています。邪魔にならないように片付けましょう。そ
ठीक है, जिम। अगर स्थिति में कोई 
رو
ورأيت ذلك أيضاً. لقد كانت بقعة ضوء 
好的。250号面板：CB BAT B 动力入口/着陆后，已关
어이, 버스 운행 중
Ok. Cercheremo di recupe
はい。
Qu'a-t-il dit à propos de cette brûlure sur ce… filet? C'est 4
Ошибки, связанные с от
Bene. Gli INVERTER BUS TIE stanno per e
ठीक है। लगभग 2 मिनट में फ
ठीक है। अब मैं अपने बाईं ओर स्थित चंद्रमा का उपयोग कर रहा हूँ, और यह इसके लिए एक अच्छा समाधान है। मैं एटीट्यूड इंडिकेटर को ढक देता हूँ और आप यॉ देख सकते हैं। मैं जायरो को फ्री कर रहा हूँ, इस समय फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड चुनने की कोशिश कर रहा हूँ। मैं पहले चंद्रमा को विंडो के केंद्र में रखूँगा - और रोल और पिच को दबाए रखूँगा और फिर चंद्रमा को उसकी सही जगह पर वापस रख दूँगा। इस समय चंद्
조, 딱 내가 예상했던 대로였어. REACQ 모드에서 수치를 최대한으로 설정해 놓고, 로테이션이 거의 끝나갈 무렵에 하이 게인으로 낮췄더니 바로 제대로 작
짐, 회로 차단기는 회로 차단기 작동 페이지에 입력됩니다. 우리가 여기에 도착해서 모든 변동을 억제하고 나면, S가 이 시점쯤에는 적정 온도에 도달할 것으로 예
Gli errori di atteggiamento sono tutti pari a zero
Man kann die Schwerelosigkeit auch nutzen, um viele Dinge zu demonstrieren, die wir alle in der Schule gelernt haben. Ich möchte kurz zeigen, wie einfach sich die Funktionsweise eines Gyroskops erklären lässt. Wenn ich diese Dose drehe, wissen wir laut den Bewegungsgleichungen, dass sie sich, sobald sie in Rotation versetzt ist und ihre Drehachse in diese Richtung zeigt, bei einem bestimmten Drehmoment – ​​ich übe dies aus, indem ich meine Hände so gegen sie drücke – tatsächlich in diese Richtung dreht. Mal sehen, wie gut 
यह सही है। ठीक है, अब ग्राउंड आपको -2 + 15 पर अपडेट देगा। यह वह समय है जब आपको टेलीमेट्री 
Okay. After that step on panel 275, strike out "CB MAIN A, BAT C; CB MAIN B, BAT C; and DC INDICATORS 
Сразу же прис
待会儿有空的时候，
はっきりと読
Gemini 4, Hawaii, stand by for an 8 minute mark to retrofi
Tranquillité, Houston. Nous avons relevé la te
حسنًا. أغلق صمام العزل، وأبقِ قواطع التيار المتردد مغلقة، وأغلق صمام التغذية المتقاطعة، وافتح الشاشتين التاليتين. أغلق صمام التحكم الرئيسي وقواطع الدفع، ويجب أ
Да, у него случайный дрейф. Никаких колебаний, которые я мог бы предсказать, нет. Леска, ведущая к шару, иногда натянута, иногда ослаблена — настолько ослаблена, что на ней образуются петли. Его поведение, насколько я могу судить, строго случайное. Шар тоже плохо надут. Там он имеет продолговатую форму, а не круглую; и я думаю, что когда на него светит солнце, ярко-оранжевый и серебристый цвета наиболее ярки. Это всё, что
Roger
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴
मुझे
11, qui Houston. Correzione di metà rotta numero 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, trim di beccheggio e imbardata NA, TIG 150 29 5453, meno 00048, più tutte le sfere, più 00001 075 159 328; HA è NA; HP più 00230 00048 011 00048; stella sestante 03 0908 382. Blocco stellare boresite, nessuno disponibile. Latitudine più 1102, meno 17204 11803 36275 195 03 33, allineam
了解しました。1行目の訂正、1行目のAC TAPE RECORDERの下の「DECA 
Роджер. 
알았다..
準備ができましたら、緊急音声チェックを行います。音量を変える必要がないよう、UH
Das ist negativ, Jim. Wir haben derzeit keine hoc
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। रीडबैक सही है। आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें कि गोल्डस्टोन लगभग 1 मिनट का एफएम डाउनलिंक कैरियर प्राप्त कर रहा है। हम आपसे एस-बैंड ऑक्स स्विच, एस-बैंड ऑक्स टेप स्विच को बंद करने और एस-बैंड ऑक्स टीवी स्विच को टीवी पर सेट करने की 
ヒューストン、アポ
أبولو 8، هيوستن. أعتقد أننا انحرفنا قليلاً عن الموضوع. زوايا الميل والانحراف التي طلبناها منك بخصوص الهوائي عالي الكسب كان
Roger. Wir haben gerade festgestell
Nein, Bruce. Gib mir einfach die Breiten- und Längengrade (zweimal
روجر. 
C'est exact. Flight souhaiterait égaleme
Okay. Bedienfeld 3: Batterieladung auf AUS stellen. Bedienfeld 5: Hauptbusverbindung BAT A/C auf BAT A/C stellen; CB-Batterieladegerät, BAT A-Ladevorgang öffnen; CB-Batterieladegerät, BAT B-Ladevorgang schließen. Als Nächstes: Bedienfeld 250: CB BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING schließen. Bedienfeld 5: Hauptbusverbindung, BAT B/C, aus. Bedienfeld 3: Batterieladung auf B stellen. Hinweis: Bitte warten. Jack, wir haben ein Rückfallverfahren dafür, das wir Ihnen aber später, in etwa zwei Stunden, vorlesen werden. Dieses Verfahren ist eine Änderung gegenüber dem ersten Ba
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend die Details erläutern. Okay. Der Eintritt in die Atmosphäre erfolgt um 142:40 Uhr; etwa 6,5 ​​Stunden vorher, also ungefähr, beginnen wir mit der Aktivierung der Heizleistung, indem wir die Temperaturen des Kommandomoduls überprüfen und dieses gegebenenfalls vorheizen. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies notwendig sein wird. Detaillierte Anweisungen dazu folgen später. Ungefähr 6 Stunden vorher beginnen wir mit dem Hochfahren der Heizleistung anhand der modifizierten 30-Minuten-Checkliste, die Sie bereits für den vorherigen Zwischenkurs verwendet haben. Kurz darauf, etwa 5 Stunden vorher, benötigen wir die Ausrichtung für die Körperachsenausrichtung mithilfe des Erdterminators, wie zuvor. Sobald wir das haben, führen wir -7 durch, was jetzt etwa einer Brenngeschwindigkeit von 2 Fuß pro Sekunde oder etwa 15 Sekunden entspricht. Mir wurde gesagt, dass sie jetzt bei 1,5 liegt, also deutlich innerhalb der Toleranz. Okay. Danach beginnen wir sofort mit dem Manöver zur Abwurfposition des Servicemoduls. Da wir es früher als üblich abwerfen, befindet es sich in der Flugebene. Wir benötigen und wollen keine Abweichung von der Flugebene. Das Servicemodul befindet sich also in der Flugebene und ist entlang des Radiusvektors nach außen gerichtet. Anschließend bereiten wir das Kommandomodul für den SEP des Servicemoduls vor, einschließlich der Überprüfung und des Heißlauftests. Etwa 4 Stunden und 30 Minuten vor dem geplanten Zeitpunkt werfen wir das Servicemodul ab. Wir werden die Maschine so lange hochziehen, bis wir das Servicemodul im Flug haben und versuchen, ein paar Fotos zu machen. Wir werden aber keine riskanten Manöver für Fotos durchführen, da wir den Flugbahnwinkel zu diesem Zeitpunkt nicht verändern wollen. Okay. Das gibt uns ungefähr zwei Stunden Zeit, um die Vorbereitungen abzuschließen, falls wir in Verzug geraten. Dann können wir die Checkliste durchgehen und das Hochfahren des Kommandomoduls vorbereiten. Wir werden das Kommandomodul etwa zweieinhalb Minuten vor dem Start vollständig hochfahren. Wir werden den Computer zuschalten, die Maschine hochziehen, die Statusvektoren übertragen und die Plattform des Kommandomoduls ausrichten. Spätestens nach etwa anderthalb Stunden, also mit einer Stunde Zeit für die Vorbereitungen am Kommandomodul, werden wir das Manöver zur Abwurflage einleiten. Anschließend beginnen wir mit dem Schließen der Abwurfzone. Natürlich ist unsere Lagerung noch nicht vollständig konfiguriert. Wir schließen die Luke, führen eine Druckdichtigkeitsprüfung durch und trennen die Landekapsel bei -1 Stunde bzw. 141 Stunden und 40 Minuten ab. Sobald das geschehen ist, können Sie das Manöver zur Eintrittsposition einleiten. Dort angekommen, führen Sie eine Sextanten-Sternprüfung durch, demontieren die Optik und erhalten dann Ihre endgültige Eintrittsplattform. Sie können das System initialisieren und befinden sich im Prinzip wi
Только самые новые элементы имеют четкую форму, и со временем они разрушаются под воздействием постоянной бомбардировки мелкими 
ठीक है। दरों को कम करने की पूरी प्रक्रिया यही थी - हालाँकि मैंने आपको केवल चरण 2 बताया था, पूरी प्रक्रिया यही थी। अब, पृष्ठ 29 पर छपी जानकारी पर आगे बढ़ते हैं - सुधार, एटीट्यूड कंट्र
Ricevuto. Basta non ag
और आपकी जानकार
Apollo 8. Eccoci qui per una manovra di sorvolo. Questa sarà una / 63087, meno 162, più 129, più 009 62, più 005 68, meno 020 77 000 000 000, Novembre Alfa, più 00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 31
Okay. Wir haben Ihre Zeitangabe überprüft, 16 ist korrekt. Sie erhalten zum geplanten Zeitpunkt eine aktualisierte Eingabe. Gleichzeitig aktualisieren wir Ihre Zustandsvektoren für die
Roger. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Soyez vigilant et prêt à intervenir immédiatement pour un transfert de
罗杰。然后在第 3 组星形图案之后，再次
ह्
Fr
好的。现在，根据我们为您制定的飞行计划，你们应该已经吃完饭了，你和杰克会值班，弗雷德则去睡觉。
Apollo 11, Houston. Concernant l'eau qui s'est infiltrée sur la cloison arrière, si la quantité est faible, nous vous recommandons de l'éponger puis de jeter les éponges dans le compartiment de rangem
SPS/G&N: 36639; your, minus 072, plus 051; your, 135 24 4000;, plus 32178, plus 06036, minus 01304, your
分かりました。ありがと
We 
Okay. Der westdeutsch
Roger. À votre convenance, nous souhaiterions vider la station d'épuration des eaux usées jusqu'à ce qu'il ne reste plu
Verstanden,
休斯
11日、ヒュース
मुझे यही लग
로저, 알겠습니다. 비행 계획에 따르면 지금쯤 FBW(Fly-by-Wire) 모드로 전환해야 하는데, 자동 모드라고 하더군요. 그래서 이대로 진행하실 건지 여쭤봤습니
अब हम 12 आगे बढ़ रहे हैं। 1 दाएं
ठीक है। सूट के तापमान के बारे में यही जानकारी है। लॉन्च के बाद से मैंने तापमान में दो बार 10-10 डिग्री की बढ़ोतरी की है। और अब लगभग लॉन्च मार्क से 15 डिग्री ऊपर है। मेरे स्टीम वेंट का तापमान 69 और 80 डिग्री दिखा रहा है। मैं फ्लो रेट बढ़ाकर
Je su
نرجو تزويدنا بقراءة كميات الوقود في وحدة الخدمة الخاصة بكم، وذلك في الو
Steelhead, ici C
Weather actually is fairly good here in location. I think on your next pass you might be able to see the typhoon. I'll give you a
عندما بدأنا في الاحتراق، كانت قراءة عدادات السرعة داخل السيارة 51 قدم/ثانية، وقمن
Okay. Ich habe noch etwa
Roger. Your quad temps look good from he
Okay. We got steps 6 through
Roger. Was that 2+
Okay, Jack.
لقد انقضت الآن 6+35 دقيقة، وأقوم بإيقاف تشغيل المركبة الفضائية بالكامل. كنا
Хорошо, Джим. Теперь нам нужно запустить процесс охлаждения салона. Это предполагает испарение, а я
D'accor
شكرًا ل
Je 
ठीक है। कंप्यूटर बढ़िया चल रहे हैं। उम्मीद है कि वे आ
Columbia, Houston, mit dem Plus 12 NOUN 84, wenn Sie bereit sin
收到。接
Okay. Beim Plus-35-Pass möcht
Wilco。你指的
Хорошо. Вы здесь, на земле, хорошо выглядите. Гот
Хорошо. При активации основного гликолевого контура, 
Roger, Amicizia Sette. Ti ho sentito forte e chiaro anche su
好的。杰克，我再强调一下，2.5 小时是我们最早可以开始准备那些强化道具的时间。其他的一切你都可以像往常一样做，尽可能地提前做好准备。但这 2.5 小时的时限是基于节省指挥模块消耗品的。如果你能做到这一点，我们就
Хорошо. Ду
一度、ここまで手を伸ばしてみたら…あなたがいると思った場所の写真が
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Подтвердите, что заряд батареи B немного ниже, и это связано с паразитными нагрузками, ко
Хорошо, хочу прокомментировать нашу еду. Пока что у каждого пакета с апельсиновым соком, у каждого пакета, в который я наливала воду с апельсиновым соком в любом виде, ананасовым или просто апельсиновым соком, протекал клапан подачи воды. Пока что протекал только один другой пакет, а мы уже
迈克，你为什么想用它做
로저, 버즈. 헬멧, 바이저, 
أوه، لديك بعض الأرقام الجيدة ال
Okay. Wir haben das Chlor hinzugegeben und das Wasser ist chloriert. Einen Mo
Хорошо, Эд. Вас принимаю
わかりました、ヴァンス。ここにあるか確認させてください。A-13でハッセルブラッド70ミリDCレンズ（80ミリ）を使いたいのですが、3400白黒フィルム
11, Хьюстон. Я осматривал ваш баллон
روجر. ٥٠٠٠ متفرق؛ رياح شمالية غربية ١٠؛ ارتفاع الموج ٣ أقدام؛ مقياس الارتفاع ٢٩٨٦؛ نداء قوات الإنقاذ: ناها RESCUE ١، الساعة ٠٢:٥٨ بتوقيت غرينتش؛ ناهي SEARCH ١، الساعة ٠٣:٤٤ بتوقيت غرينتش؛ المدمرة يو إس إس ماسون، لا يوجد وقت وصول متوقع؛ شروق
Apollo 8, mentre aspettiamo l'alto guadagno, continuerò il riepilogo della traiettoria. Possiamo ancora tornare alla linea del Pacifico centrale dal tredicesimo, e siete in viaggio dopo 138 secondi dall'accensione. Sono 138 secondi, e vi portano fuori dalla zona a farfalla. Consigliamo di non provare preaccensioni o riavvii dopo 20 secondi. Se si superano i 20 secondi, la traiettoria potrebbe superare la capacità di correzione, fino a un ritorno libero. Le condizioni meteorologiche nell'area di recupero sono buone. Abbiamo un seguito di 10 secondi e un ritorno senza 10 secondi. Durante l'accensione, potreste notare una leggera variazione nella pressione della camera di combustione e nella pressione del serbatoio, dovuta all'esaurimento del carburante nel serbatoio di stoccaggio e al suo passaggio nel serbatoio di raccolta. Questo potrebbe verificarsi tra i 2 e i 5 secondi dall'accensione. Ci sarà una piccola variazione di pressione in entrambi i sistemi. Per quanto riguarda i sistemi, tutti i sistemi sono in funzione. Vogliamo interrompere l'ebollizione dell'acqua dopo per motivi di traiettoria. La situazione dello scarico dell'acqua sembra buona; dovreste essere a posto o superiori. Cercheremo di ritardare lo scarico dell'acqua fino a dopo le 5. Nel frattempo, vorremmo mescolare la criogenia prima di... correzione. La prossima spurgo delle celle a combustibile avverrà approssimativamente alle 17:00, e sarà sia per la batteria a idrogeno A a 34,9, sia per la batteria B a 39,1, sia per Charlie a 38,5. Abbiamo la capacità criogenia a serbatoio singolo: osservando le prestazioni delle accensioni precedenti, si può prevedere che una no
I - I think we answer to number 9. We - at around, I think, was when we think the number 5 light came on in the S-II, and a def
水瓶座，休斯顿
Хорошо. Мы готовимся к смене смены, и я хотел бы обсудить несколько моментов. Сейчас скорость ветра, похоже, составляет максимум 0,3 фута в секунду, поэтому на шестом участке траектории маневра не будет. Седьмой участок немного больше, и мы примем решение по нему позже. Погода в месте посадки по-прежнему хорошая, прогн
Недавно я открыл забрало, чтобы взять таблетку ксилозы. Вся остальная еда на борту либо раскрошилась, либо растаяла. В нынешнем состоянии она непригодна для употребления, поэтому, думаю, таблетка ксилозы станет моим последним приемом пищи в условиях невесомости. Однако первый прием пищи, до того, как она раскрошилась, б
No, one-handed snap.... I'm in the center
イーグル、ヒュースト
Хорошо. Сде
Roger. Es gab hier einen kleinen Zwischenfall. Jim Lovell hat versehentlich eine Rettungsinsel zum Platzen gebracht, daher ha
아, 네. 저는
Houston, volevi che testassimo le telecamere nel... Me lo chiedevo. L'ho visto
Oh, beinahe hätte ich den ersten Sonnenuntergang verpasst, weil ich versucht habe, das rechte Kabinenlicht auszuschalten. Es geht ziemlich schnell, wie mir
Roger. Cape ist startbereit und ich bin startbereit. Die Kapsel ist in gutem Zustand. Treibstoff 103–102 Prozent, Sauerstoff 78–100 Prozent, Kabinendruck konstant bei 5,8, Stromstärke 26 Amp
«Аполлон
لا ينطبق هذا على كل مكان، لكن توجد بالتأكيد أماكن يبدو فيها انحدار نحو الشاطئ عل
रॉजर। क्रू की स्थिति रिपोर्ट इस प्रकार है: पानी उपलब्ध है, कमांडर ने 
Oui. Ça a été vraiment super, sauf de rares exceptions comme une mauvaise connexion OMNI juste avant le basculement. Dans ce cas, on a énorm
إيجل، هيوستن. 
حسنًا. لقد حصلت على قيم مضخمات الطاقة الآن
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Мы заметили, что давление криогенного раствора толь
ジム、もう一つのことは、ヨーを制御するために
Roger. Angolo di coppia di 0,25 gra
Roger. Vorrei anche che aumentassi la pressione in cabina a 5,4 psi utilizza
Okay, panel 11 configuration, top row: AC BUS B, I want the S-BAND ANTENNA, OPEN,, OPEN; AC BUS A, TAPE RECORDER, OPEN. Second row, under SYSTEM A, I want MAIN SOV through QUAD 1 TCA, all CLOSED. COMMANDER'S X-POINTER under FLIGHT DISPLAYS, OPEN;, OPEN;, RENDEZVOUS RADAR STANDBY HEATER, OPEN; LANDING RADAR HEATER, OPEN. ATTITUDE DIRECT breaker, CLOSED; ED: LOGIC POWER A, OPEN; UTILITY, OPEN. Under: SUIT FAN 1, CLOSED; AUTO TRANSFER, CLOSED. Under COMM: VHF B TRANSMITTER, OPEN; V
11, Houston. A little information to you there, CDR. We've all taken a momentary brief respite from out work here to have some special - to have a bite of special moon cheese that is - I understand it's been sent to us directly from Wa
我在这里
Роджер. Что в
روجر. سأ
Innanzitutto, un paio di domande sulle t
.
Voici Gemini VI.
كارنارفون، هل تريد باقي الكميات؟ قال الكاب إنه ليس من الضرور
夕焼けはなかなか印象的だ。眺めるのに時間を無駄にする必要はないと思う。とても興味深い。もう一つ魅力的なのは、目が慣れていないと黒く見えることだ。窓に確かにコーティングが見える。この時点で VOX に戻って UHF-hi で送信する。バイザーを開けて右のマイクを拭く。舐めてしまった。バイザーを閉じる。スーツの回路が機能するようにバイザーはすぐに密閉された。またそれで汚れたくない。スーツの吸気口は約 68 度で非常にうまく保たれている。そこでドームを再び上げる。今は 76、75 になっている。どうやらこの高い設定が我々が求めているものだ。今これに半マークを追加すればロックできるかもしれないと思う。ようやく少し涼しくなってきたので、設定をどこに持っていけばいいのかわかっている。スーツとコントロールレバーの冷却剤の量を 8.5 に設定しました。この時点でのドームの表示は 75 (度) です。スーツの吸気口は 68 (度) です。非常に快適です。顔に冷たい風が当たるのが感じられます。酸素量は非常に良好で、60 と 75 (psi、数百単位) です。250 のインバーターを監視しています。140 度に近づいており、150 のコントラストは約 100 度まで下がっています。スタンバイは約 100 (度) で、これはキャビン温度です。3 番目に、250 は苦しんでいるので、注意します。キャビンの熱交換器は間違いなく 40 度で安定しており、明らかに Frank 
We see you exercising. Is 
Ok, Jim. Riceviamo, e ora vediamo che siamo tornati. Ci risentiamo tra un 
好
Может быть, дело в нашем с
Хорошо, Джо. Я сейчас на 
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ
Roger, Canton. Ich war hier mit Manövern beschäftigt. Ich habe Ihnen Ihren Bericht noch nicht gegeben, da ich die Beleuchtung aufgebaut und alles für den Rückzündvorgang verstaut habe. Mein Brennstoffvorrat liegt bei 45-45 Pro
Je n'ai pas encore défini de taux de roulis. Je l'ajouterai 
Ici Texas Cap Com, Friendship Seven. Nous vous recommandons de laisser le système de rétro
أنا الآن في وضعية العودة إلى الغلاف الجوي. أستعد للدخول في الوضع التلقائي. نظام التحكم الإلكتروني يعمل بسلاسة تامة، تمامًا كما كان في جهاز التدريب. نتائج إيجابية للغاية من استخدام جهاز التدريب على الإجراءات. لا شك أن الوقت يمر
फ्रेंडशि
I thought we mi
Roger. Könntest du Eagle bi
OK, Jack. Dis-moi. On a besoin de savoir 
了解しました。世界のニュースでは、プエブロ号の乗組員が昨日午後00時にミラマー海軍航空基地に到着し、バルボア病院で家族と共にクリスマスを数日過ごす予定です。地元のニュースでは、小売商協会が今年のクリスマスプレゼント交換ポリシーを昨
ठीक है। हम आपके श्वसन संबंधी प्
Stasera abbiamo bevuto un po' di punch all'uovo da Charlie Duke. È passata Val A
FUNKTION, AUS; MODUS, STANDBY; GTA, unten; GTA-Deckung, sichern; AUSRICHTUNG; Skala, 5/5; AUSWÄHLEN, 1; QUELLE; AUSRICHTUNG EINSTELLEN; MANUELLE AUSRICHTUNG: ROLLEN
Und 11, Houston. Wir haben eine Bitte an Sie. Bezüglich des Sekundärtreibstoff-Druckventils des Servicemoduls: Sicherheitshalber bitten wir Sie, die vier Schalter kurz in die Position „GESCHLOSSEN“ zu betätigen und dann loszulassen. Wie Sie wissen, verfügen wir über keine technischen Daten oder Rückmeldeinformationen zu diesen Ventilpositionen, und es ist denkbar, dass einer der
Flight consiglia di tornare alla prima serie e di ripetere l'operazione in ogni modalità se durante la seconda serie di test si riceve l'indicazion
حسنًا. وقت الإشعا
र
아니요, 그렇지 않았습
わかりました。可能な時に車内に入って、以下のバルブを確認し、ここに記載した通りにしてください。パッケージバルブを再度押してオフ、緊急キャビン圧力バルブをオフ、ダイレクトO2バルブをオフ、デマンドレグをオフ、ウォーターアキュムレーターを両方ともオフ、メインレグAとBをオープン、グリコール水（正解）を水、そして
알겠습니다. 페이지를 찾고 있었는데, 이제 찾았습니
Apo
Нет -
Exactement. Pas de souci. John Aaron dit simplement qu'ils p
यह 2,000 फीट की ऊंचाई पर है और लगभग 35 फीट प्रति से
Роджер. Слышу, как оттуда доносятся смешки. А ещё у нас есть свежий репортаж о спорте. Сейчас идёт Матч всех звёзд. По итогам четвёртого иннинга Национальная лига лидирует в Американской лиге со счётом 9:3. Так что, судя 
Friendship Seven, 
سأبدأ الآن في تجهيز نسخ التقرير المرحلي. لن أضع الكاميرا بالكامل 
كيف حال
X या Y? शायद हमें इनमें से तीन से ही संतुष्ट हो ज
分かりました
روجر. منصة الصعود: TIG 124 22 00 00 00 اسم 76 55349 00322، بالإضافة إلى 0017؛ 47، بالإضاف
...облака. Они выглядят как слоистые, но, безусловно, оказывают умеренное воздействие
Roger. Per quanto ci riguarda, la navicella 
Apollo 8, préparez-vous à quelques bruits parasites pendant le changement de configuration au sol. Nous allons procéder au test 1; les lia
休斯顿，我们正在执行选项 1，就像选项 3 一样。我们一直收到 401 警报，提示所需的 RCTU 导致万向
西格玛七号，西格玛七号，这里是穆切亚·卡普·科姆，紧急语音。请听见了
否。阿波罗2号于17:19到达。位于轨
Die Lenkung der Trägerrakete scheint ei
Aquarius, Houston. Richiedi il passaggio da FUNZION
D'accord, 
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴
Roger. Sie sehen die Erde, so wie wir sie sehen, durch unser linkes Fenster – etwas mehr als die Hälfte der Erde. Wir blicken auf den östlichen Pazifik und die nördliche Hälfte des oberen Bildschirmbereichs. Dort sehen wir N
ジム、次に進めたいのは、コマンドモジュールMAIN Bに電力を供給してバッテリーの充電を開始することです。誰か他の人が立ち上がって手伝ってくれるようになったら、その作業に取り掛かるのが良いと思います。他の人を立ち上がらせる、あるいは誰かに手伝ってもらうことに決めたら、すぐに
Roger. L'image est bien meilleure maintenant; elle s'amé
ठीक है। मैं आगे बढ़ रहा हूँ और स्वीकार कर रहा
Roger, Jim. Grazie, e continuo a non capirvi. Ho contato alla rovescia da 5 a zero normalment
C'est exact. C'est l'un des rares exemplaires. Malheureusement, la vitre centrale est complètement embuée; on dirait une couche de givre ou un épais
罗杰。我们还有大约三分半钟的时间。现
अच्छा। 413020 183, शाउला, नीचे 064, बाएँ 06, प्लस 0747, माइनस 16410 12988 36301; उत्तर दिशा में तारामंडल, सीरियस और रिगेल, रोल 308, पिच 209, यॉ 357। टि
Ro
Хорошо. На мой взгляд, этот способ охлаждения основан на предположении, 
프렌드십 세븐, 무체아 컴 테크. 우리
मुझे कुछ सफेद परतें, बुलबुले, सफेद चीजें निकलती हुई दिख रही 
ठीक है। आप चेक
是的。
ठीक है। हम फिर से जुड़ गए हैं। आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ आ रही है। 
للعلم يا فانس، قبل حوالي نصف ساعة، لم نتمكن أنا وجاك من رؤية الأبراج والنجوم في بعض وضعيات المركبة الفضائية. كنا نرى برج العقرب والقوس، ونجوماً أخرى مثل النسر الطائر والنسر النسر وألفا قنطورس والنسر الواقع، وهي نجوم من هذا القدر، وقد توقف هبوب دخاننا، مما
रॉजर। 60 डिग्री रोल वाले अभिविन्यास से, 0.58 डिग्री जड़त्वीय रोल वाले अभिविन्यास तक। उच्च लाभ वाले एंटीना पर पिच +30 और यॉ 270 होगा
"0.1 फुट प्रति सेकंड।" बर्न टाइम को बंद करने का कारण यह है कि, चूंकि एएसए ब्रेकर इतने लंबे समय से बंद है, इसलिए हमें पूरा भरोसा नहीं है कि हमारे s सुपर-शार्प होंगे। इसलिए हम यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि हमें केवल बर्न टाइम मिले - ओवरबर्न नहीं; इसलिए हम बर्न टाइम से 1 सेकंड कम पर बंद कर रहे हैं। और फिर यह हमें प्लस-X ट्रांसलेशन की अनुमति देगा ताकि ट्रिम 470 ठीक लगे। अगर ओवरबर्न होता,
It isn't true everywhere, but there's certainly places where there seems to be a slope downwa
Pendant que j'étais dehors, j'ai remarqué sur la vitre de Jim une sorte de dépôt à l'extérieur. Une fois, en la frôlant avec mon épaule ou mon bras, le dépôt s'est étalé et a même taché le haut de son pare-brise, l'empêchant de voir. De mon côté, je vois qu'ell
Хорошо. Хорошо, примерно в 156:50 справа — ну, в правой половине страницы есть строка, в которой написано: «Визуальная цель 16, юг, 11, Гассенди, f:
必须——必须向中心靠拢，一直到中心。不，
"0,1 фута в секунду". Причина, по которой мы сокращаем время работы, заключается в том, что, поскольку автоматический выключатель ASA не работает так долго, мы не уверены, что наши характеристики будут идеально четкими. Поэтому мы хотим убедиться, что получим ровно такое время
جيم
Roger. You're seeing Earth, as we see it, out our left-hand window, just a little more than a half Earth. We're looking at the eastern Pacific Ocean, and the north half of the top half of the screen, we can see North America, Alaska, United States, Canada, Mexico, and Central America. South America becomes invisible just off beyond the terminator or inside the shadow. We can see the oceans with a def
알겠습니다
알겠습니다. 프랭크는 방금 잠자리에 들었고, 빌은
알겠습니다. 패널 3: 배터리 충전 스위치를 OFF로 설정하세요. 패널 5: 메인 버스 타이 배터리 AC를 배터리 AC에 연결하고, 차단기 배터리 충전기, 배터리 A 충전 스위치를 열림으로, 차단기 배터리 충전기, 배터리 B 충전 스위치를 닫으세요. 다음으로, 패널 250: 차단기 배터리 B 전원 입력/포스트랜딩 스위치를 
Хорошо. Мы с этим согласны, и у нас опоздавший в третьем ряду. Оставайтесь на св
新しい48-1 TRの時間と装填数についてお知らせいたします。予備のガイダンス数量は把握しております。コピー
ठीक है, जिम। हमें यह समस्या रुक-रुक कर आ रही है। हमें लगता है कि अगर आप पैनल 16 पर प्राइमरी पावर एम्पलीफायर सर्किट ब्रे
Ich glaube, du weißt ja, was bei euch alles los ist, und hier unten ist es ganz ruhig. Alle lächeln; d
Я только что снял кадры 3, 4, 5, 6 и 7 над Северной Африкой... (неразб
わかった。リゲル・
SPACECRAFT CONTROL,
और अब हम आपको लगभग 110 मील की ऊंचाई पर दिखा रहे हैं; और, निश्चित रूप से, जब विमान से उतरना शुरू होगा तब आप काफी नीचे ह
रॉजर। मुझे नहीं पता था 
Esatto. Ora, il pannello 8 del lettore dice
シグマ・セブン、こちらウォータータウン通信技術局。弱っていると読みました、
Родж
알겠습니
Apollo 11 découvre pour la première fois la zone d'atterrissage. Cette fois-ci, nous survolons le cratère Tarentius, et les photos et cartes rapportées
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。请开始，备用语
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Négatif. Un ordinateur de commande sur le site de Madrid e
Would you say one 
Questa è una risposta affermativa. Questa è la configurazione. La sinistra è CHI
好的。在面板 5 上，断开电源 1 和 2 号断路器。然后复位并释放电源开关。在面板 11 和面板 16 上，闭合跨月母线连接断路器。在面板 16 上，闭合上升 ECA 控制断路器。在面板 16 上，闭合下降 ECA 控制断路器。在
होला, मित्र, मेक्सिको से मित्रता और विशेष रूप से गुएमास से मित्र। डेसडे एल एस्पासिओ एक्सटीरियर, सु पाइस एस्टा क्यूबिएर्टो 
Gemelli 4, qui è il chirurgo di Canary. Lascia la sonda orale inserita, ma gonfia il bracciale della pressione sanguig
Très bien.
Voilà qui 
Roger. Rev 42，西经 31°，格林尼治标准时间 
حسنً
Ricevuto. Ricevuto. Traslazione della spinta - quattro getti - Coppia di bilanciamento - ON. Acceleratore - MINIMO. Acceleratore - AUTO CDR. Pulsante elica - RESET. Pulsante elica. Okay. ABORT/
Aq
Working good, Frank
Je pense que ça s'est plutôt bien passé, Houston, même si j'imagine avoir consommé plus de carburant qu'en simulateur. Lors de la manœuvre de demi-tour, j'ai utilisé la commande PITCH ACCEL COMMAND et j'ai commencé à cabrer. Puis, lorsque j'ai remis la commande MANUAL ATTITUDE PITCH en mode RATE COMMAND
そうです、それが私たちが持っているもので
Okay. The next one, two, three, four are unchanged. And then we want TRANSLATION CONTROLLER POWER to OFF, ROTATION CONTROL POWER NORMAL, two, to OFF; a
Houst
Ok. Potenza 6. Ok. La potenza 6 si
بدأ جيم يرى النجوم بوضوح في النهار مجددًا، ولديّ نجوم جيدة تدعمني
지금은 지평선이 아주 선명하게 보입니다. 하늘이 꽤 밝고, 지평선은 주로 구름으로 이루어져 있습니다. 구름 사이로 별들이 지평선 너머로 지는 모습이 보이지만, 구름 때문에 지평선이 더 밝게 보이는 것 같습니다. 비행 초반에는 구름 없는 지평선을 본 적이 있는데, 그때는 지평선이 훨씬 더 두껍고 대기광이 짙어서 별들이 그 사이로 지는 
روجر. تم الاستل
Okay. Das ist richtig. Ma
我们
كل شيء يبدو جيدًا، سأعطيك قراءة سريعة. نسبة الوقود 27-29%. ضغط المقصورة 5.5، درجة حرارة هواء المقصورة 88 درجة، الرطوبة النسبية 33%؛
两个冷却泵都已开启。宇航服风扇也已开启。高频发射接收器
获取 AB 03 47 34；速度增量 61.6；温度增量 01 加 22；偏航角为零，俯仰角向下 2
오늘 밤 잠자리에 드실 때까지 스위치를 AUTO 위치에 두시도록 요청하셨습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 다시 말씀드리지만, ON 위치에 두셔야 합니다. 다시 한번 말씀드리겠습니다. 오늘 밤 잠자리에 드실 때까지 OFF 위치에 두셔야 하는 이유는 3%의 불균형이 있어서 이를 균형 있게 맞추고 싶기 때문입니다. 따라서 잠자리에 
- - لإبقاء القمر في مجال ال
Ja, und früher
こんにちは
Et l'un des avantages, Jack, surtout pour un novice comme moi, c'est la facilité avec laquelle on se déplace ici. Comme tu le sais pour avoir travaillé dans le simulateur du module de commande, l'apesanteur est un atout considérable. À 1 g, on se sent vraiment à l'étroit, et c'est beaucoup plus facile dans cet environnement. Comme tu peux le voir, c'était plutôt propre. J'ai trouvé quelques rondelles qui se décollaient et un petit capuchon en plastique de la caméra de séquence qui s'était détaché et que j'ai retrouvé coincé près du panneau ED. Bon. Juste en dessous de Jim, il se tient sur ce qui ressemble à un conteneur. Et, pour que tout le monde soit bien placé, à l'intérieur de ce conteneur se trouve le moteur de remontée. J'espère que tu peux voir ma main posée dessus, le moteur qui nous permettra de quitter la Lune. Juste à côté du capot du moteur, j'ai la main sur un boîtier blanc, que l'on a déjà vu. Il s'agit du sac à dos de Jim, qui fournira l'oxygène et l'eau nécessaires à son refroidissement sur la surface lunaire. Nous espérons l'utiliser pendant 4 heures, voire 5 heures. Juste derrière, deux petits paquets carrés que je tiens en main, l'un ici et l'autre j
ロジャー、フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはカリフォルニア・コム・テックです。UHFではっ
Okay, Mike, unsere CDH-Zeit ist 126:17:45.58. Ende
Думаю, пора попробовать использовать тормозной конус. Выпустил его вручную на высоте 25 футов 
Что ты приготовил 
わかりました。右手にピレネー山脈が見えてきて、ちょうどメシエ山とピカリング山の上空を飛んでいるところです。最初の地点は、私たちの高度から簡単に見えます。境界線に近づくにつれて、かなりコントラストが強くなってきま
こちらヒューストンCAP COMです。血圧測定を開始してください。エアロメディ
현재 기수를 60°까지 낮추고
That's about like a pitch change rather
보통은 이런 음료를 5분에서 10분 정도 두는데, 빌은 지금 바로 마시려고 합니다. 그러고 나서, 그는 계속 진행하기 위해 다른 덮개를 잘라내고, 그러면 
Ich s
Sonnenaufgang. Ahhhhh! Was für wunderschöne, leuchtende Glühwürmchen! E
はい、PC と 2 つのパッドをモニ
Tranquility Base, this is Houston. Our telemetry shows the engine arm circuit breaker in the OPEN position at the present time. We want
두세 걸음, 많아야 네 걸음 정도 가볍
مرحباً ووميرا، أنا من فر
로저. 해당 페이지로 이동하여 '승인'을 클릭해 주시면, 값을 업데이트하는 파일을 보내드리겠습
Roger. I think I got it. I remembered a lot of it, and so I think with what you gave me and what I remember, 
Affermativo. Una volta che avremo allineato tutto e ottenuto un time hack, le brave persone qui saranno in grado di fornirci gli atteggiamenti 8
11, Houston. Ora siamo su OMNI Delta. Credo che possiamo leggerti megl
Nos mesures télémétriques indiquent une attit
太陽は構造物に反射します。望遠鏡が取り付けられていると、ほとんど役に立ちません。MPADが提供してくれた星図は、もし何らかの理由で望遠鏡を通して目印をつけなければならない場合に最も役立つと思います。星図をガイドとして使い、「あそこに見える明るい塊は、私たちが今いる位置だからあの星に違いない」と言えるでしょう。しかし今
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, this is, Com Tech. Do you 
Esatto, George. Lascerò la mascherina chiusa. Ho mangiato un pezzo del cibo di bordo. Si
F
Roger. 1, G&N: 62710, p
ن
네, 짐. 저희는 사령선에서 더 나은 별 관측을 위해 발사대 자세와는 다른 자세로 이동하는 것에 대해 이야기해 왔습니다. 저희가 부탁드리고 싶은 것은 다음과 같습니다. 지금 또는 곧 원하는 자세를 예측하여 그 자세로 이동하신 후, 해당 자세에 대한 대략적인 짐벌 각도를 계산할 수 있도록 도와주시겠습니까? 선택하신 자세로 이동하신 후, 
रॉजर, क्या तुम माइक, थोड़ा 
Sì, sono soddisfatto degli ultimi aggiornamenti che abbiamo ricevuto, sai, per quanto riguarda l'effetto sul nostro vettore di stato. Non sono ancora del tutto soddisfatto delle varie procedure. Se potessimo scegliere stelle all'interno di un intervallo più ristretto di angoli di trunnion, in modo da poter scegliere la propria manovra e raggiungere quel punto substellare e rendere visibile quella stella, mi sembrerebbe il modo più semplice e 
Ge
हां, मुझे 35 की उम
نعم، ألا
Роджер. Хирурги готовы измерить ваше арте
杰克，上面就是这么
سأبقى في الوضع OMNI B، إذا كنتم تريدون استعادة القيادة، فيمكنكم تركهم يتنقلون بين B و D. وكم عدد الخطوات 
Negative. Okay. I'd like to review with you this blood pressure. You are not going to have the adapter on until after you're on the water. Ed already has it on
Finde he
रॉजर। ध्यान दें कि आप अपनी निर्धारित गतिविधि की शुरुआत कर रहे हैं। प्रारंभिक ट्रैकिंग से ऐसा लगता है कि शुरुआती मध्यमार्ग में गति पहले अनुमान के अनुसार 4 फुट प्रति सेकंड से कम हो सकती है। हमने आपके बर्न डेटा को देखा है, और यह बिल्कुल वैसा ही सुचारू है जैस
D'acc
ठीक है, मास्टर आर्म
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 마이크, 그 용
- - lunar orbit and your plans for 
Je n'irai pas. Ah, au fait, pourquoi ne pas jeter un
Nun, ich fürcht
Ici Friendship Seven. J'ai désactivé le mode automatique en lacet pour me déplacer vers la gauche et admirer le coucher du soleil. Le mode automatique est de nouveau activé sur les trois axes; je le contrôle manu
残念ながら、数値はここには掲載されませんでした。フレッド・ヘイズが持っているチャートを見れば、11時の位置に1が表示されていて、これ
VHF 무전기를 켜면 '우우'
روجر، باز. نود منك ضبط مفتاح هوائي النطاق S متعدد الاتجاهات على وضع "برافو". اضبط مفتاح هوائي النطاق S متعدد الاتجاهات عل
And if John is ready to copy any of this maneuver loa
हम बस इतना चाहते हैं कि आप साइकिल चलात
Ok. Dopo aver letto il retro, leggo che il 65% è automatico e circa il 78% è manuale (carburante).
Ok. Immagino che te l'abbiano inviato questo pomeriggio. E quando giri pagina, alla pagina E-8, vedi che il controllo d'ingresso viene eseguito a meno un'ora, e sai che è un test breve. Non c'è davvero motivo di aspettare un'ora; potremmo anche f
여기는 우
La boussole est trop perturbée par les instruments d'assiette et les gyroscopes situés derrière
We done paid our debt to society; w
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Хотите, чтобы мы начали заряжать батарею А прямо сейчас
Okay. Mike, quello che è successo è che... sai, eri seduto lì a monitorare... e al passo 7 sei andato su NOUN 01 e hai digitato l'indirizzo e poi INFORMAZIONI INFORMAZIONI; e sull'ultimo INVIO di quel 35400 INVIO, subito dopo, sei tornato al 16. Poi, quando hai premuto INVIO, stavi davvero inserendo le informazioni nella CDU vera e propria; e quando hai inserito le due voci nei registri 1 e 2, c'è stato un... è stato un cambiamento is
No, this thing has, ah, practically no rates indica
D'ora in poi dipenderà tu
Voilà, c'est tout pour aujourd'hui. Nous vous souhaitons à tous un très joyeux Noël. On se retrouve demain, et on atterrira tôt vendr
안녕하세요, 카나리 캡 컴퍼니 오로
E anche su questo andrem
Roger. I understa
ठीक ह
了解しました。もう一度言ってください。エリア17-1のバンク角が00度の場合、RNからRPを引いた値はプラス107になり
बहुत बढ़िया। हमें केप टाउन से भी एक अनुरोध मिला है। कैलिफ़ोर्निया के ऊपर से आपकी अगली उड़ान के दौरान, और के 
기체가 약간 기울어진 자세에 기수가 상당히 높이
没错。
Cia
وهناك جان
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. В данный момент вы находитесь в пределах допустимого диапазона сканирования на высокочувствительной антенне; хотя у вас может быть выбрана узкая ширина луча, на самом деле вы наход
好
Хорошо, в разделе AC BUS B: S-диапазонная антенна, открыта;, открыта. В разделе AC BUS A: магнитофон, открыт. Во втором ряду в разделе SYSTEM A: MAIN SOV. Начиная с Quad TCA; все четыре закрыты. В разделе CROSS - Commander Cross-Pointer, открыт;, открыт;, открыт. В третьем ряду в разделе Rendezvous RADAR STANDBY, открыт; LANDING RADAR, открыт. В разделе STAB/CONTROL: ATTITUDE DIRECT CONTROL, закрыт. В разделе ED: LOGIC POWER A, открыт; и в разделе LIGHTING: UT
Аквариус, Хьюстон. Ч
Думаю, всё прошло довольно хорошо, Хьюстон, хотя, вероятно, я израсходовал больше топлива, чем обычно в симуляторе. Маневр разворота — я переключился на команду тангажа и ускорения и начал поднимать нос, а затем, когда я по какой-то причине вернул команду ручного управления тангажем в положение с регулировкой скорости, — скорость тангажа остановилась, и мне пришлось снова переключиться на команду ускорения и нажать, как мне показалось, дополнительную кнопку продолжения. В ходе этого мы немного отклонились от курса, чем я ожидал. Я рассчитывал оказаться примерно в 66 футах. Думаю, я был где-то в 100
बज़,
Ok, Acquario; Houston. Abbiamo ricevuto i dati e presumo che abbiamo COM
На
了解、カントン。私が逆回転中だったって読んだか？マニューバが
Ich glaube, dieses Gerät bräu
Этот полон и
— Да. Я ис
حسنًا. هذا آخر شيء أغفلته. وبينما ننتظر اتخاذ القرار، دعوني أتابع. النطاق المقبول للضغط يتراوح بين 660 و770 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة. بعبارة 
Okay. Du siehst echt gut aus. Wir halten uns hier zurück und s
وظيفة EMS لاختبار دلت
جيميني 4، مركز عمليات القيادة في هيوستن على أ
如果您近期有使用我
روجر. جيميني 8، هيوستن. نودّ إطلاعكم على آخر مستجدات الاتصال بينما لدينا بعض الهدوء هنا. سنكون في تاناناريف خلال دقيقتين؛ وسنلتقطكم فوق كارنارفون في وقت قريب؛ ثم 
حسنًا، ها هو بعض الكاكاو؛ سيكون لذيذًا. سأضيف إليه حوالي 15
Хорошо, Джо. Мы поместили баллон в пакет, две полоски пл
حسنًا. هناك أمر واحد يا جو، أر
君は5スクエアを通り抜けてきて、素晴らしい音を出している。僕たちを引きずり出す以外に何もできない
Was er tut, ist
罗杰。我们现在正在调整姿态
Roger, la température du dôme est actuellement d'environ 63 degrés et se maintient assez stable. Je la 
ठीक है। फिर डेल्टा-वी भी इसका एक हिस्सा था; मुझे उम्मीद 
Ha ha. J'imag
بسبب مسافة الفصل التي نر
Qui Sigma Seven. Un controllo HF di 30 secondi, a minuti, a partire da 10 s
Charlie, gibt es irgendwelche Bedenken hin
Роджер. Продувка кислородного топливного элемента в 113:30. Возвращение к номинальному времени в 121 час после пробуждения. Замена гидроксида лития номер 9 прямо сейчас. Обычная конфигурация спящего режима лунной связи, я сейчас в ней. Что касается того, я понял раньше, что вы хотели загрузить
Per essere un nuovo CM
Wie lange d
Roger. In attes
Bien que les Oilers n'aient pas brillé sur le terrain, leurs performances au guichet ont été excellentes. Bud Adams, Don Klausterman et Wally Lemm étaient ravis. D'ailleurs, ils étaient au Cap pour assister au spectacle. En 11 matchs à Houston, les Oile
Сейчас вам нужно 
حسنًا، ليس الأمر بهذه الفائدة؛ بل يبدو أنه ليس كذلك أبدًا. فبحسب
Sì, sono tornato al fly-by-wire e sto cercando
プラスXスラ
알겠습니다. 250번 패널에 CB BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLAN
ثبات الكبسولة ممتاز للغاية يا 
Роджер. 1, /: 62844 минус 161, плюс 129, минус 29840, плюс 02390, плюс 01053 000 200 005 01693,
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。FORW
Ciao, Muchea Com Tech. Sono Friends
हमें लगता है कि हमें इसका इस्तेमाल करना होगा। इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में पिच औ
और, वैंस, क्या आपने प्रक्षेप पथ के बारे में कोई अवलोकन 
جيميني 4، كارنارف
В 01:06:106 — через 1 минуту, 1 час и 7 минут — я превышаю шкалу и оцениваю
About two to three or maybe four easy paces can bring you to 
よく聞き取れなかっ
We are seeing about half of it. You moved in the wrong direction. Okay. It's coming back, a little more. Good, now a shade tow
好的。这段话献给罗德·罗斯和圣克里斯托弗教堂的教友们，实际上也献给全世界的人们。上帝啊，请赐予我们洞察力，让我们即便在人类的种种失败中，也能在世间看到您的爱。请赐予我们信心，让我们即便在无知和软弱中，也能信赖您的良善。请赐予我们智慧，让我们能够继续以
Roger. Notre premier point de contrôle est très proche du terminateur, et pendant que les optiques le suivaient, j'ai eu l'occasion d'observer le lever du soleil. Environ deux minutes avant le lever du soleil, le limbe commence à s'illuminer, prenant une sorte de fine brume blanche, 
Аполлон-8, Хь
Roger. Per quanto riguarda il Dow Jones Industrial, dalla chiusura di martedì pomeriggio 15 fino alle 13:05 circa, ora di Houston, di questo pomeriggio, l'effetto è stato un calo netto, ovvero meno 6 punti sulla media industriale. Dall'apertura, il Dow Jones Industrial è sceso di 11,05 punti, dopo essere salito di 1,5 punti poco dopo l'apertura. La performance odierna dei servizi di pubblica utilità è in calo di 1,63 punti, e quella delle 
Das ist Friendship Seven. Das stimmt. Es ist wieder abgedriftet. Dam
了解です。動詞37、
फ्लाइट सर्जन जिम जानना चाहते हैं कि क्या वे आपकी आंखों के बा
Sospetto che questo campo di massi possa avere origine in parte da questo grande cratere roccioso dai bordi affilati che abbiamo superato durante la discesa finale. Ieri ho detto che aveva più o meno le dimensioni di un campo da football, e devo ammettere che è stato un po' difficile da misurare all'inizio. Ma ho pensato che potesse entrare nell'Astrodome mentre lo superavamo. E le rocce nelle vicinanze del cratere roccioso sono molto
खैर, हम नहीं गए हैं। यह 940 पर ही स्थिर है। मुझे लगता है कि अब यह 950 तक पहुं
아직 그런 증상은 없지만, 지금껏 그 어느 때보다 그런 증상이 나타날 것 같은 느낌이 들어요. 아마 이 100% 산소 때문인 것 같아요. 숨을 들이쉬면 이렇게 목이 마른 적은 처음인 것 같아요. 살면서 가장 심한 감기에 걸렸을 때는 코로 숨을 쉴 수가 없어서 목소리가 엄청 쉬었거든요. 제 목소리가 마치... 쉬
알겠습니다. 페리신시안 플러스 2입니다. / 62871 11월 알파, 그리고 대기하세요. 좋습니다. 피치 트림과 요 트림은 적용되지 않습니다. 시간, -00468, +00254, +00181 173 101 027 11월 알파 +00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044, 하강 044, 좌측 45, +1100, -02500 12967 36198, 주 항성 시리우스
Roger, Jim. Nel tuo computer, vorremmo fare di nuovo un dump della memoria cancellabile, come abbiamo fatto l'altro giorno, e il motivo per cui vorremmo farlo è che, quando l'hai fatto circa 8 ore fa, e ti ricordi di aver impiegato quel tempo e di aver ottenuto quella cosa; vorremmo... Non pensiamo che ci sia niente di sbagliato al mondo. Pensiamo che tutto sia perfetto all'interno del computer, ma vorremmo fare un dump cancellabile com
Это основная батарея A, батарея C, Ча
Оно пролетело с моей стороны. Солнце светило прямо в окно. Я н
وسأذهب إلى قسم الهندسة الطبية الحيوية 
Ben
好的。没错，这位是吉姆·洛弗尔。我们今天想带大家简单了解一下阿波罗8号内部的生活。我们已经向大家展示了月球和地球的景象，现在我们想邀请大家走进我们的“家”。正如你们在仪表盘上看到的，这里至少已经是我们生活了4天。我们在仪表盘上标记了每一天。现在已经过去4天了，我们正在进行第5天的工作。当然，我们都非常期待周五的着陆。在飞船的下部设备舱里，总统的体能顾问吉姆·洛弗尔上尉正准备进行我们每天都要进行的锻炼。你们注意到他活动自如。他刚才不小心撞到了导航光学系统。他正在使用一种锻炼设备来保持肌肉状态。现在，我们飞船的另一个非常重要的功能是计算机。我想你们可能对这里的显示屏感兴趣，它能显示我们所有关于燃烧、导航以及地球轨道任务中重返大气层和反推阶段速度的信息。你们可以看到，它是由一个类似打字机键盘的装置控制的，输入输出的数据简直令人惊叹。它为我们出色地完成了任务，吉姆·洛弗尔（Jim Lovell）的操作也非常出色。现在，无论是在太空还是在地面，吃饭都是非常重要
Ici Friendship Seven. Veuillez patienter. Je ne suis pas encore prêt à enregistrer; je change la pellicule
Gémeaux 4, je vous reçois parfa
Nous avons l'intuition que le réglage est peut-être sur PEAK, m
Это подтверждает, Аполлон-11. 
Роджер. Для вашего адреса: 224, плюс 60267; 225, плюс 58148; 226, плюс 70312; 227
Roger, abbia
好的，11. 事实证明，到目前为止，本次任务中两次点火的发动机性能与发动机验收测试时的性能相同。机载电脑的读数是由于您实际燃烧室内的压力与仪表读数之间存在已知的校准系数造成的。我们预计单缸运行压力为90 psi，即仪表读数为90 psi，实际燃烧室压力为95 
Roger. Stand by one, please. On the Apo
Okay, Aquarius. Here's what we're going to do. We'd like you to point the X-axis either north or south. That's the positive X-axis. It appears to us that it would be closer to orient the plus X-axis toward the south. Do that with the powered up using the. After that, we propose to power down the to save some power. However, this means that we lose the use of the , and we'll have to control the spacecraft w
わかりました。DESCEN
रॉजर। अब तक आपको जो 
حسنًا. فهمت. نريد فتحة بقطر 1.5 بوصة هنا 
Bene. I successivi uno, due, tre, quattro, cinque, sei, sette sono uguali, e poi passiamo da ATTENZIONE/AVVERTENZ
C'est affirmatif, alors je vous suggère de diffuser l'information à l'aveugle si vous av
ويلكو، أبولو 8. أولاً، إذا كان بإمكانك توفير مبلغ إضاف
You say that you still show 
Negative. 
我々は全員..
杰克，你知道吗，我第一次来这里的时候
Итак, экипаж. Пожалуй, единственное, что я могу вам сейчас сообщить, это обновление информации о вашей стартовой площадке на 35-й час после старта. Это изменение по сравнению с площадкой, которую мы вам предоставили вчера. Причина обновления — избегание неблагоприятных погодных условий в районе посадки в центральной части Тихого океана на 70-м часу, что соответствует времени возвращения на эту площадку. И если у вас возникнут вопросы, мы не ожидаем никаких проблем в конце миссии. Неблагоприятные погодные условия наблюдаются в 20 градусах к югу от точки посадки в конце миссии, и, похоже, о
Roger, verstanden. Ich habe vier Updates erhalte
收到，
짐, 혹시 아직 이 내용에 대해 브리핑을 받지 못하셨을까 봐 당신과 프레드가 생각해 볼 만한 사항 하나를 알려드립니다. 현재 논의 중인 내용인데요. 보수적인 입장에서는 58시간 후에 있을 적응 훈련 때 SHe 탱크 압력을 측정해 보라고 요구하고 있습니다. 만약 중간 훈련 3차가 진행되지 않
Roger. P
حسنًا، يبدو جيدًا. لأنني لا 
Okay, Jack. Switch now on ASCENT number 2 O2
حسنًا. لقد ناقشنا هذا الأمر، ويبدو أن الجميع، قبل 12 ساعة من بدء البث، يعتقدون أننا لسنا بحاجة إلى القيام بذلك هناك. ولكن في الواقع، لا يبدو أن له أي تأثير على مسار الرحلة، وكما اقترحتم، يمكننا مراجعة قائمة التحقق الخاصة بالد
Indische Kommunikatio
That's affirmative. We got your TR and Gemini load in. Your clo
इसके लिए, क्वाड ए और बी को निष्क्रिय करने की सलाह दी
What's y
卡诺，你的意思很清楚了。把你的信息发
That's good. I wish we could have got that one lens working. I'd like to
알겠습니다. 다시 말씀드리겠습니다. 알파 22
휴스턴 CAP COM, 제미니 4. 계
Хорошо, Фрэнк. И ещё, когда у тебя будет возможность, мы хотели
Houston, Apollo 11. Ora guardo la stessa area e sembra riflettere un po' della luce cinerea. Non sono sicuro che sia stata calcolata una fase pari a zero... Beh, almeno c'è una parete del cratere che sembra essere più illuminata delle altre, e quella... se siamo allineati correttamen
Der Kabinendruck liegt k
حسنًا، التالي. كاميرا تلفزيونية بالأبيض وا
Покажите нам, что вы готовы – будьте на связи. 
On préférerait attendre un 
يا إلهي، لقد بدأت الأمور تسو
오늘 오후에 
計算によると――計算によると――月が見えるはずです。満月です。円盤の大部分が見えるはず
ああ、いや、いや、いや、曲がってい
や
Friendship Seven, Friendsh
좋습니
D'accord. Heure 
Pourriez-vous m'indiquer un angle de car
了解。外からの報告によると、こちらは雨が降っているとのこと。あなたはそちらの天気予報にかなり詳しいよ
휴스턴, 아
في هذه الأثناء، ولتحسين جهد خط التغذية الرئيسي A، قمتُ بتشغيل تيار متردد لربط ناقل التغذية الرئيسي. أم تفضل قبول جهد 25 فولت الذي نراه على خط الت
नहीं, कोई बात नहीं। मैं बस इसकी पुष्टि करना च
11, Houston. The definition is pretty good on our monitor here. The color is not too.., at least on this set. Could you describe what you
That's correct. Now, AC IN
Это подтверждается. Все очень довольны работой над горизонтом Земли; и, что касается нас, вы можете закончить с этим и просто до
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Это Х
Af
Houston, this is Apollo 8. I copied. I question the latitude and the 
Be
Houston, what you're seeing in the middle of the screen now is the crater Schubert and Gilbert U is in the center right now; and this comes up at about - a 
Okay. This is a pericynthian plus 2 for a fast return. This will be / 62871, minus 161, plus 129, plus 45224, minus 06216, minus 18712 001 287 351, November Alfa plus 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, earth up 010, right 37, plus 1475, plus 06500 13239 36913; primary star Sirius, secondary Rigel 129 155 010, no ullage, assumes execution of midcourse correction 4 and uses the same alignment. The time for 5 for GERU determination - that's Golf Echo Romeo Uniform - this will be a of; use NC-4, steps 1 through 10 and NC-8 steps 3 and 4. I say again, use November Charlie 4 steps 1 through 10 and November Charlie steps 3 and 4; velocity 400K for corridor c
了解、11番。了解しました。ここへ進むことをお勧めします。オプション1を推奨します。それから姿
Das ist be
برج الجوزاء 4، هيوستن، مركز الاتصا
RCS電源AとB-ACME、OAMS電源OFF、OAMS推進剤OFF。宇宙船を0、180、-30度に制御してください。マイナス180度ですが、
Роджер. Что касается вашего P57, мы немного поискали информацию, и, похоже, Сириус и Ригель, установленные на фиксат
네, 맞습니다. 네 번의 업데이트가 
اللقطة رقم 55 على كاميرا هاسيلبلاد لحظة وصولنا إلى أفريقيا. بدا أن هناك سلسلة سحابية رائعة على ارتفاعات عالية، لذا التقطت صورة
ロジャー：巻き
Jim, voi
نعم، سأ
D'accord, 8. Nous venons de recevoir les résultats concernant les motifs de test. Nous avions 25 motifs de test destinés aux essais au sol, et ce sont ceux que nous avons examinés. Il 
终于找到了月亮的位置，以及你当前的角度——如果你碰巧在经过时向右看一眼窗
आपके पास दबाव बनाए रखने के लिए पर्याप्त गर्मी है। और अगर आप चाहें तो यहाँ हाइट एडजस्टमें
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Я удерживал здесь контроль над МИНИМАЛЬНОЙ СКОРОСТЬЮ ДЕФЕДРАЦИИ 
Oh là l
Okay. Vorrei che tu
好的，肯。我们又回到态度测试的问题上了。你想让我们在第一
Хорошо. Отлично. Это был бак с высоким давлением, 
Ich schaue es mir jetzt a
T
Roger. Use the circuit br
Okay, Jack. We're going to bargain with you on this one. Instead of t
13番、ヒューストン。現在、大型アンテナの作業中ですので、高利得電
He may not be b
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세
D'accord. Trè
わかりました。FLOOD回路ブレーカーが3つとNUMERIC回路ブレーカーが3つあり、これら6
좋아요, DU
11, Houston. In order to improve the communications a little bit he
今プ
CB G&N, POWER,
D'accord, Vance. Les étapes suivantes 
姿态控制非常好。手动燃油似乎很充足。油量仍然在72%。此时俯仰的周期变距率非常稳定。偏航相当稳定；过载正在增加。太空舱非常稳定。可以看到绿色的气流——偶尔还会出现橙色的条纹。再入过程非常顺利。滚转速度很慢，这有点不寻常。过载正在增加到2g。速率控制的燃油充足。现在可以看到一
Хорошо, Джим. Поскольку переключение антенн довольно неудобно, мы уговорили их купить только половину данных. Если вам будет слишком сло
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston CAP COM. Wir sind bes
적절한 속도가 어느 정도
C'est exact. On vous donnera le
ठीक है। हमारे पास यहाँ तीन कैमरे हैं, जिनमें से दो का इस्तेमाल तस्वीर लेने के लिए किया जाएगा, और एक का इस्तेमाल नंबर 5 वाली खिड़की से किया जाएगा। सबसे पहले, मैं कैमरों के बारे में बताता हूँ। और जिस कैमरे का मैं अभी ज़िक्र कर रहा हूँ, उसे पहली प्राथमिकत
Okay, Joe. We are right now
Bon, tu étais un peu perturbé, Jim, mais je crois que ça va mieux. Nou
हाँ, बिल्कुल। इसका मतलब है कि अब से लेकर कोर
Хорошо. Либо я неправильно скопировал информацию о выключателе, либо... я не могу её прочитать. Он находится примерно на 20-
네. 모르시는 분들을 위해 
알겠습
Le panorama d'ici est exceptionnel. Dommage que la télé ne soit pas encore allumée, car la zone brune est maintenant plus sombre. Nous venons de survoler la Mer de la Fertilité, et la mer est plus sombre. La chaîne de montagnes offre un contr
Хорошо, Джек. Оно поступает, и оно прямо в центре нашего экр
Roger, Apo
Хорошо. Для управления двигателем перейдите в GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, ATTITUDE CONTROL. Переключатели будут ROLL PULSE, PITCH PULSE, YAW MODE CONTROL. Мы будем использовать управление тангажем и креном. ENGINE GIMBAL б
Roger. Bill hat seinen Kassett
Okay. Sono entro i tre centesimi. Credo che sia ne
ठीक है, एसी बस बी के अंतर्गत: एस-बैंड एंटीना, खुला; खुला। एसी बस ए के अंतर्गत: टेप रिकॉर्डर, खुला। सिस्टम ए के अंतर्गत पंक्ति 2: मुख्य सोव। क्वाड टीसीए से शुरू करते हुए; चारों बंद। क्रॉस-कमांडर क्रॉस-पॉइंटर के अंतर्गत, खुला; खुला; खुला। पंक्ति 3 के अंतर्गत रेंडेज़वस रडार स्टैंडबाय, खुला; लै
روجر. لقد ن
Ok. E solo una domanda. Sarebbe interessante sentire Jack per sapere se pensa che il bus principale B sia bu
罗杰。123加00，总计减7%，阿尔法减12%，布拉沃加4.5，查理减7，德尔塔减6.5。你的氢气
Assicurati che il tracciamento s
알겠습니다. 휴스턴, 13
알겠습니다. 데드밴드 
시그마 세븐, 시그마 세븐, 여기는 
Yes. The answer is don't turn it into AUTO fast. It 
阿波罗
Хорошо. У нас... возникли проблем
Joe, ho una bellissima vista della Te
Ro
ठीक है, जिम। हम अभी भी इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं, लेकिन कुछ बातों से हमें लगता है कि हम यह सुधार संभवतः 118 घं
알겠습니다. 혹시 뭐 있으
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。规避机动指令：G&N：63481，加095，减020；004 40 0100，加00051，加所有球，加00190；滚转可选，俯仰2
제미니 VI호, 카
はい。096 35
ठीक है। मैं आपको बताता हूँ कि अगर आप और कुछ 
Хорошо. Том, поч
-4. Okay, ich prüfe das hier. Sieht ungefähr richtig aus. Ic
- 
Es sieht so aus, als ob die Kabel vom Booster und nicht vom Raumschiff abgetrennt wu
Li
또 다른 지역 소식입니다. 헌츠빌 카운티 법원이 어제 새벽에 화재로 전소했습니다. 따라서 그 자리에 다시 건설 사업을 해야 할 것 같습니다. 한편, 귀환을 기다리는 가족들에 대한 소식도 전해드립니다. 앤 제임스 기자가 보도한 내용입니다. "우리는 달 뒷면에서 쉬고 있어요." 발레리 앤더스는 크리스마스 이브에 가족과 함께 아폴로 8호가 달 궤도를 벗어나 지구로 귀환하기를 기다리며 이렇게 말했습니다. 앤더스 씨는 화요일 새벽 0시에 도착했고, 이웃들이 아이들을 모두 데려가 우주선이 달 뒤편에 있어 통신이 두절된 동안 가족들이 편히 쉴 수 있도록 도와주었습니다. 프랭크 보먼 대령의 집은 야외에 커다란 상록수 화환 네 개가 걸려 있고, 고운 눈이 뿌려져 있으며, 빨간 리본으로 장식되
كيف يفترض أن يكون الأمر؟ - يفترض أن نكو
收到。请
... понял, Эд. Только не
ठीक है, जैक। अब तुम कोणों को कैसे देख रहे हो? हमने चंद्रमा को केंद्र में रखा था, और यह 8 बॉल पर मौजूद कोण के काफी करीब है, मुझे लगता है। किसी भी प
好的，吉姆。我们现在断断续续地有电。如果你能在16号面板上打开主功率放大器断路器，
罗杰。我们先来看世界新闻。随着这艘小型宇宙飞船绕月飞行，世界各地在平安夜向美国阿波罗8号宇航员致以赞扬，并寄予对太空探索领域国际合作的希望。即使在
Eh bien, je ferai des alle
Die Wände sehen t
We believe the crater, the large dark crater between the spacecraft and the Sea of Crises is Condorcet Crater. The Sea of Crises i
- - at that v
D'accord. Vous avez presque atteint la limite 
रॉजर। यह बहुत छोटा सा एपिसोड था। फ्रेड, जब भी मौका मिले, कृपया हमें पैन
Okay. We got steps 6 through 12, but step 7 is the same s
好的。我们建议停在 54°45′00″，这样应该能使你的横滚角大致合适。我们推荐的姿态是：横滚 26°3″，俯仰 90°，偏航 0°00″。这样，你就可以从指令舱的 1 号窗口看到地球，并且方便地将高增益天线放在窗口内观看电视。此外，阳光也会照射进来——或者说照射到舱门上，如果你放下遮光帘，应该能有一些阳光照射进来。我们建议使用宽死区天
Bene. Ricevuto. Sarà per Rev 57. Sequenza n. 16, alle 08:11 GMT. Imbardata 12°, beccheggio 30°, fotocamera da 16 mm. Rev 58, sequenza 12, GMT. 09:36 GMT, imbardata 3°, beccheggio 3
私たちは OMNI D を使用していますが、TM プラス 4 は
إذا زاد، فسيظل مرتفعاً من
返回 O
ها! أت
알겠습니다. 보조 라디에이터 입력 온도는 70도에서 약 72도 사이이고, 라디에이터 출력 온도는 약 30도입니다. 글리콜 증발기 온도는 약 65도이고, 증기 압력은 최대치이며, 글리콜 배출 압력은 약 9psi입니다. 보조 축압기 보호복 온도는 약 52도이고, 객실 온도는 약 58도입니다. 압력은 보호복이 4.1, 객실이 5입니다. 이산화탄소 분압은 1을 약간 넘는 약 1.1입니다. 건물 측면 온도는 72도이고, 헬륨은 3500, N2 A는 2300, N2 B는 약 2450입니다. 연료는 약 165이고, 연료 전지 1
Roger
ठीक है। मध्य प्रशांत क्षेत्र के लिए, सामान्य स्थिति अच्छी है। आप 2000 फुट की ऊंचाई पर बिखरे हुए बादलों, 10 मील की दृश्यता, 070 की गति से 12 की रफ्तार से हवा, 4 फुट की लहरों और 2974 के अल्टीमीटर की उम्मीद कर सकते हैं। सूर्योदय 10 ज़ुलू समय पर और पहली रोशनी 16:49 ज़ुलू समय पर होगी। जहाज यॉर्कटाउन होगा; विमान एयरबॉस नंबर 1 और 2, और रिकवरी विमान 1, 2 और 3 होंगे। जहाज तक पहुंचने का अनुमानित समय - यॉर्कटाउन लक्ष
네. 작전 수행 중 공이 그곳까지 도달하는
D'accord. Un voyant d'avertissement est allumé ici, indiquant que vous n'avez pas signalé le problème; il s'agit des préamplificateurs, probablement parce que nous n'avons pas encore installé le disjon
... इसेसे मु
Ich benötige e
11，休斯顿。我们很
신호기는 좀 미뤄두겠습니다. 전원을 켰을 때 시계가 대략 몇 시쯤 됐는지 기억이 가물가물한데, 아마 지금쯤이면 괜찮을 겁니다. 소모품은 더 이상 남지 않았네요, 존. 여기 정
نعم، هذا مفهوم. يمكنك استخدامها دائمًا إذا احتجت إليها. أعتقد أنه من الصعب جدًا الحصول على بدلات عمل إضافية
Columbia, Houston. You're about one by, I
ठीक
Okay. We'd like to have - 
Сейчас он стоит на сиденье. Его ноги опущены ниже прибор
好了，弗雷德，你现在状态不错。检查清单上有三处需要修改的地方，都是些小改动。我现在想把它们转交给你
Ehi, abbiamo... abbiamo avuto una bella discussione qui sul tuo tentativo di osservare la cometa, e questa riflessione 
Cavolo, mi dispiace dirlo guardando attraverso questo monocolo, ma c'è una macchia bianca
ठीक है, इससे संरचना स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई देने लगेग
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。VHFとSバンド
Уолли, здесь всё отлично выглядит. Ты хорошо справ
Роджер, CSQ... и спутник был близко к солнц
Are you going to start down on this pro
알겠습니다. 확인되었습
Roger. À titre d'information, est-ce que la
जैक, 15 घंटे में लगभग कितने एम्पीयर बिजली की खप
A
Отлично, отлично, Джим. Сегодня утром у вас всё хорошо. Мы хотели бы немного рассказать вам об этих звёздах. Как вы видите в плане полёта, у вас запланированы полёты к звёздам номер 33, Антарес, номер 34, Атриа, и номер 40, старый добрый Альтаир. Первая из них, Антарес, находится в плоскости полёта; две другие — вне плоскости. Как вы знаете, нам нужно сочетание полётов к звёздам в плоскости и вне её. Антарес, номер 33, находится близко к Солнцу, и мы предполагаем, что у вас возникнут трудности с измерениями на звёзде номер 33. Мы бы очень хотели, чтобы вы попробовали, но если у вас не получится, мы предлагаем использовать звёзду номер 42, Павлина, до дальнего лунного горизонта. Мы понимаем, что 
Wally, nous montrons également une position
Roger. We went through the charts and got exactly the same answer as you got. Looks like your procedure is very good; looks like it was real good head. You remembered to average out the velocity. We also went ahead and computed the problem to 
All that procedure for 
阿波罗 8 
D'accord. Je transmets ça à Jim. Ça fera 120 ampères-heures, ce qui nous ramène de 203 h
네, 필요하다고 생각하시는 건 다 하겠지만, 마지막 순간에 이것저것 바꾸느라 시간을 허비하고 싶진 않습니다. 저희가 정말로 신경 쓰고 있는 건 지휘 모듈을 제대로 작동하도록 만드는 겁니
Роджер. Я также хотел бы уб
Die Temperatur
네. 저희가 확인해본 결과, 쿼드 수량에 대해서는 말씀하신 것과 동일한 수치가 나오지만, 컴퓨터 프로그램과 모든 보정 계수를 적용해 보니 네 개의 쿼드 모두 매우 근접한 것으로 보입니다. 파운드 단위로 보면, 예를 들어 A 쿼드는 193파운드, B는 189파운드, C는 200파운드, Delta는 190파운드인 것 같습니다. 계기판에서 측정된 값의 차이는 모든 보정 계수가 적용되지 않았기 때문입니다. 지상 계산의 정
Roger. Très bien. N'oubliez pas de refermer votre visière. Pensez également à le faire avant de rentrer dans l'
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 다음으로, 다음 카메라 - 대기 1. 여기 노이즈가 있네요. 좋습니다. 다음 카메라는 16mm 렌즈를 사용할 예정이며, 이 사진들은 우선순위 3으로 분류됩니다. 좋습니다. 먼저 A-8에서 16mm 렌즈와 배터리 팩을 가져오세요. 10mm 렌즈를 분리하고, B-3에서 18mm 렌즈를 가져와 카메라에 장착하세요. 전원 케이블을 연결하고, 프레임 속도를 초당 12
20パーセント。いいか
Ah! Ah! Ho ancora i segni neri di sbandata sulle pinne dopo la tua fuga nella boscaglia. Okay, vedi che ho virato di nuovo a destra. Devo 
わかりました。0.
ジム、その通りだ。4行目のヒーターの欄は… 訂正：クアッドヒーターは全て
Now we have a Catch-Up Mode Check
Oh, das ist eine gute Angewo
ロー
На этом всё по маршрут
D'accord. Bien reçu, Fred. Merci. Nous vous demandons de bien vouloir couper le disjoncteur. Nous repasserons probablement dans 5 ou 6 
Eagle, qui Columbia. Houston vorrebbe che t
はい。これらは回路ブレーカーです。回転制御電源、直流、1と2、メ
D'accord. On lit 3 g, je pense qu'il va falloir laisser tomber le contrôle d'amortissement de rentrée cette fois-ci. On lit maintenant 4 g. La rentrée semble se dérouler correctement. Les vitesses affichées semblent être bien gérées par l'amortisseur auxiliaire. Je ne pense pas osciller beaucoup; on dirait que je roule juste autour de cette lueur, le ciel derrière. Le niveau de carburant est toujours à 14 % à 6,5 g. Les vitesses se maintiennent à 1,5 degré par seconde près, ce qui indique une vitesse de roulis d'environ 10 degrés par seconde. Le 
На самом деле, о
Alles sieht gut aus, hier eine kurze
Ich verste
로저. 고율 구간으로 
我们与它的 X 
Vielen Dank, Owen. Ich glaube, mein Garten könnte etwas Wasse
はい、わかりました。すべて完了しました。他の
لا، إنها في حدود الساعة التاسعة أو التاسعة
Roger. Ho attraccato in modalità AUTO e, come ho detto, non ero molto sicuro del momento del contatto. Ho continuato a controllare gli indicatori della sonda di attracco. Ho visto due pali di barbiere che indicavano che i tre fermi di cattura - non fermi di cattura, ma i tre... fermi - si erano attivati, e avevamo effettuato un attracco morbido. E in quel momento la situazione sembrava molto stabile. Così, sono passato alla modalità FREE, ho guardato fuori dal finestrino e sembrava ancora stabile; e ho acceso la bombola principale 2. E in quel momento, è iniziata una rotazione tra i due veicoli, non so bene a cosa. Forse la spinta o forse si stava accumulando prima, e non me ne ero 
Я сейчас стреляю на 250 
В любом случае, на
Well, we can't tell when you're in low b
Siehs
Roger. D'accord. Nous sommes prêts à copier v
Bis
Okay, Jim. We copied that. First of all, you want to go through the circuit by circuit breaker careful powered-up procedure for the next burn, and we're working on that. Secondly, you want a procedure for powering the command module up again when you have to re-enter i
Давайте посмотрим на мир спорта. Пока вы были заняты на днях, Джо Намат и комиссар футбола Пит Розелл объявили, что «Бродвейский Джо» согласился продать свою долю в ресторане Bachelors III и перейти в «Нью-Йорк Джетс». Джо прибыл сегодня в тренировочный лагерь «Джетс» и провел свою первую тренировку. Несколько других игроков «Джетс», которые вместе с Джо бойкотировали тренировки, также прибыли. А Дэви Хилл из Джексона, штат Мичиган, выиграл свой третий крупный турнир по гольфу за три старта на прошлой неделе. Он выиграл Philadelphia Classic. Хилл выиграл четыре турнира в этом году и является лидером по сумме выигрыша с внушительными 129 000 долларов. А в бейсболе западный дивизион Национальной лиги остается напряженной борьбой. Лос-Анджелес и Сан-Франциско отстают от лидера лиги, «Атланты», на одну игру. У «Астрос» 48 побед и 48 поражений, и сейчас они занимают пятое место, отставая на семь игр. Вчерашний матч между «Астрос» и «Цинциннати», в котором должны были сыграть два аута, был отложен из-за дождя. «Чикаго Кабс» по-прежнему занимают первое место в Восточном дивизионе. Они опережают «Нью-Йорк Метс» на четыре с половиной игры. А в Американской лиге «Балтимор» увер
Erinnert mich irg
Роджер. От 1-го отря
Хорошо, Фред, у нас возникли небольшие разногласия по этому поводу, но, кажется, ты сказал, что из резервуара было использовано 80 унций воды. Это верн
13, ह्यूस्टन। आपको फ्यूल सेल 1 को बंद करने की प्रक्रिया पूरी करनी होगी। जैसा कि आपने बताया, 
Okay, Houston. The moon is essentially gray, no color; looks like plaster of Paris or sort of a grayish deep sand. We can see quite a bit of detail. The Sea of Fertility doesn't stand out as well here as it does back on earth. There's not as much contrast between that and the surrounding craters. The craters are all rounded off. There's quite a few of them; some of them are newer. Many of
야, 너 A+ 받았
Yes, but 
Müssen wir irgendetwas am O2 ändern,
क्या आप अब अपने विज़र में से एक को नीचे करना चाहते हैं या उन्हें ऊपर ही र
Roger. Allez-y
Okay. Ich werde versuchen, Ihnen ein genaueres Update zu geben,
Вот интересная новость, которую приятно услышать. Оказывается, в городе Анн-Арбор, штат Мичиган, появилась новая молодёжная банда. Она называется «Банда Гилнет». Члены банды бродят по улицам Анн-Арбора, действуя тайно и иногда обходя закон. Они называют себя «Партизаны добра». Среди их действий: они разрисовали мост, который был весь в нецензурных выражениях. Они сделали это за одну ночь. Заколотили досками заброшенный дом, популярный среди соседских детей, но опасный. Цветы заполнили пустые клумбы в центре города, оставшиеся без цветов из-за споров о том, кто виноват — бизнес или правительство. Подстригли живую изгородь на оживлённом перекрёстке, которая, как считалось, мешала обзору, и это разозлило владельца. Убрали мусор вдоль части реки Гурон. Члены банды — анонимные подростки, которые не стремятся к личному признанию. Их цель — сократить бюрократию, добиться результатов — хороших, по их мнению, дел. Организация имеет слабый религиозный подтекст. Это своего рода экуменическая группа, — сказал доцент Мичиганского университета, который выступает в качестве неофициального советника для идей банды. Название происходит от имени святого Петра, рыбацкой сети. И она достаточно удалена от какой-либо конкретной церкви, чтобы не ассоциироваться
في قائمة التحقق الخاصة ب
मैं उच्च गुणवत्ता प्रदान कर सकत
1분 안에 준비 완료. 제 말
Gemini VI, Carnarvon
No, è tutto sbagliato. Ora capisco che devo essere stato capovolto. L'orizzonte sta iniziando a co
BUS TI
D'accord, je comprends que vous voulez qu'on interrompe la charge de la batterie pendant un moment et qu'on mette en marche le CM 
حسناً. لقد قمت بت
D'accord. La situation s
아직 명판을 읽어보지 못한 분들을 위해, 이 우주선 앞쪽 착륙 장치에 있는 명판 내용을 읽어보겠습니다. 먼저 지구의 두 반구를 각각 보여주는 두 개의 반구가 있습니다. 그 아래에는 "1969년 7월, 지구에서 온 인류가 이곳에 처음으로 달에 발을 디뎠습니다. 우리는 모든 인류를 위해 평화롭게 왔습니다."라고 적혀 있
ジャック、了解です。残りはすべて開きます。パネ
何をしていたんですか？
Roger. On my mark it wi
قيدوني هناك في الأسفل، أخزن الأشياء وأفرغها، وأخيراً أتيحت لي الفرصة لأنظر 
잠깐만 기다려 주세요. 좋아요. 이제 좀 더 가까이 접근해 볼게요. 예를 들어 제가 전방 추진기를 조금 작동시키고 싶다고 말씀드리고, 당신에게 "전방 추진기를 작동시킬 거예요"라고 말한 
Roger. Wir driften immer noch a
気分は良いで
Roger, Friendship Seven. Abbiamo segnalato chiaramente la tua parte di trasmissione tramite ATS e abbiamo c
5+23.
彼に会えない。もしあなたがそうし
We're doing fine. The Pilot went to sleep about half an hour ago and he'll be sleeping probably for another 5 or 6
로저, 03 더하기 0
Ok. Non c'è molto da dire stamattina. La situazione è piuttosto tranquilla. Credo che la notizia più importante sia il tasso di incidenti - le morti durante le festività - che non è certo una notizia piacevole, ma abbiamo avuto 233 vittime a livello nazionale, e 9 di loro a Houston la vigilia di Natale, e a Natale. Nei notiziari mondiali, le famiglie sono tornate a far notizia. Questo è "Le famiglie dell'equipaggio dell'Apollo 8 hanno inviato un messaggio di Natale al Comandante della Marina Lloyd Bucher, Capitano dell'equipaggio della USS Pueblo, diffuso questa settimana dalla Corea del Nord. Il messaggio, indirizzato al Comandante e alla signora Bucher, presso l'ospedale della Marina di San Diego, recita: "Siete stati nei nostri pensieri e nelle nostre preghiere. Il vostro ricongiungimento ha portato grande gioia nei nostri cuori in questo giorno di Natale. I nostri migliori auguri a voi personalmente e a tutte le famiglie sotto il vostro comando". Ed era firmato "Famiglie dell'equipaggio dell'Apollo 8". I funzionari spaziali hanno affermato che il messaggio 
이글, 컬럼비아. VHF 
Roger. Okay. Wir notieren den Ladezustand des Akkus, sobald wir dazu kommen
ただ、現時
반대 방향으로 돌리면 잠길 거예요. 저쪽, 그러니까 저쪽을 당기면 
알겠습니다. 그럼 다음번에는 모든 매개변수를
Wir sind no
Charlie, Apollo 11. I have a couple of questions on stopping the. It seems to me the easiest way to stop it would be - we're essentially, of course, at 0 degrees yaw and closing up 
Okay. Ihr Computer ist angemeldet und verifiziert. Sie können auf BLOCK gehen, wir sind in etwa 45 Sekunden hier. Ich fange trotzdem schon mal an. Zeitbasis 6P 24136, Rollwinkel 179, Nickwinkel 045, Gierwinkel 001, Brenndauer 5 plus 15, DELTA-VC Prime 105 196 VI 35569, Rollwinke
아폴로 11
Не могли бы вы 
オーケー、アポロ8号。テストの次の部分は昨日と同じです。アップリンクモードをアップリンクコマンドとレンジングに変更し、アップボイスは使用しません。このモードで約2分半、2つのテストメッセージを送信します。この間、アップリンクは使用されません。時間通
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。把
감사합
For those who haven't read the plaque, we'll read the plaque that's on the front landing gear of t
बहुत बढ़ि
そう願っています
ロジャー、待
看来这些扫描仪偶尔也需要休息一下。你
Si je comprends bien, Jack, vous êtes légèrement au-dessu
We can read the markings on the instruments for the glycol pressure,
أرى بوضوح ميلانًا لليمين بزاوية 5 درجات تقريبًا، ولاحظتُ أن المنظار مُظلم، مما يعني أننا ندخل الجانب المظلم. سأحاول رصد أي تغييرات من خلال المنظار. حاليًا، لا أرى شيئًا من خلال المنظار للمراقبة الليلية، على الأقل في هذا الوضع. لستُ متأكدًا حتى
그
Right. The only other thing I 
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। सबसे पहले, हम चाहते हैं कि पीछे की तरफ अपशिष्ट जल का निकास 10 प्रतिशत तक हो। दूसरा, अभी हमें विमान बदलने की आवश्यकता नहीं लग रही है, इसलिए हम कोई नया विमान अपलोड नहीं करेंगे। तीसरा, मैं चाहता हूँ कि आपके सभी क्रायो हीटर ऑटो मोड पर हों, और हम बैटरी चार्ज करने के लिए तैयार हैं, बैटरी ब्रावो; यह लगभग 7 घंटे चलेगी। यदि आप सोने जाते हैं, तो हम बैटरी चार्ज करना बंद कर देंगे, लेकिन अभी हम बैटरी ब्रावो को चार्ज करना शुरू कर सकते हैं। और अंत में, आपके विश्राम काल के लिए, रजिस्टर 1 के लिए 11111 है; रजिस्टर 2 के लिए 01100। और आपके ऑटो सेलेक्ट स्विच, क्वाड अल्फा, पिच जेट केवल चालू, क्वाड ब्रावो सभी चालू, क्
Les oscillations sont plutôt bonnes. Je pense que le système ASCS est
Okay. Lassen Sie uns unsere Vorgehensw
Bene. A pagina 1, l'
はい、お
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 
Yes. This is quite an apparatus hanging on to these hoses now. And that design engineer ... because it sure seems to
نعم. سأستعرض القائمة مباشرةً. قوة OAMS، والمن
로저. 연료 압력이 167, 보조 압력이 163으로 표시되고 있습니다. 연소 초기에 보조 연료 압력으로 인해 일시적인 경고등이 켜졌다가 압력이 상승하면서 정상적으로 정상화
I
Да, Джим, это верно. Тебе придётся повернуть на 90 гра
Roger, Fred-o. Now we aren't - also at minus 30 seconds, we aren't looking at an burn so you can scratch "ABORT pushbutton, push," and at DELTA-V equal to zero, scra
Gemini VI, your acceleromet
The horizon here is very, very stark. The sky is pitch black, and the earth - or the moon, rather, excuse me - is quite light; and the contrast between the sky and the moon is a vivid, dark line. Coming into the view of the camera now are some interesting old double ring craters, some interesting features that are quite common in the mare region and have been filled by some material the same consistency of the maria and the same color
D'accord. Procédez à la vérification selon l'étape 
ينبغي عليّ إيقاف تشغي
Retro-Modell, sehr 
ピッチダウンなので、前向きに考えています。どのくらいのレ
왼쪽으로 조금만 돌려
Да, п
D'accord, Jack. Nous obtenons la dernière
Дальше на север и чуть дальше на восток. Объект, который я вам 
おい、ジム、それはかなり広範囲だ。それを見つけて、半分く
Ora sto sorvolando il lato orientale dell'Africa. Ne vedo p
Affermativo, Jim. Il resto è già chiuso in questo momento, quindi 
러벨
D'accor
네. 28페이지 왼쪽 맨 아래쪽에 있는 "Photo target 5 nor
Хорошо, VY равно +
Ok, sono tre minuti e dieci secon
まだ気球を持っているのですね。展開位置まで行って、また
Нет. Знаете, вы же знаете, какие
わかりました。ヒューストン、今体重を見ていますね。まだ大丈夫ですか
Wha
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. لدينا بعض الإضافات الجديدة إلى قائمة التحقق الخاصة بخطة الطوارئ البديلة، إذا تفضلتم بشرحها. ان
Ok, va bene. Perché non so dove - quanto lontano ti ho perso. Ok, pannello 4; TELCOMM, GRUPPO 1, ad AC1. Sul pannello 5, chiudi quanto segue: GRUPPO PRESSIONE 1, PRINCIPALE B; GRUPPO PRESSIONE
-4. Okay, I'll check here. Looks about right. I could have come right a little bit more. Okay, that's about all I need for the night yaw checks, and, as far as I'm concerned, I'll go back and give the guys some more time. I don't see any reason to burn up 
ヒューストン、こちらはアポロ8号
ठीक है। समझ गया। अगर हो सके तो थर्मोस्टेट का इस्तेमाल करके केबिन की बाईं और दाईं दीवारों का तापमान पता कर लें।
Columbia, Houston. Vorremmo che interrompeste il flusso diretto di O2 e rimaneste in attesa e ACCETTASSE. Dovremo generare un nuovo carico a causa del ritardo. Pa
알겠습니다. 다시 읽어보세요
Oh, l'otturatore non si abbassava correttamente. Si abbassava in 
No, abbiamo perso l'elettrocardiogramma. Forse potresti premere su quei sensori. Ok, il chirurgo mi i
Auf der nächsten Seite können Sie, ungefähr bei [Uhrzeit einfügen], den normalen Flugplan wieder aufnehmen. Wir möchten eine Ergänzung vornehmen: Fügen Sie bei
現在進行中、あるいはまだ続いている作業の音から判断すると、今回の飛行は、おそらく地上でのシステムに対
Vérifiez que le disjoncteur du ventilateur de cabine numér
双子座4号
是的，迈克。我们现在就在 VERB 59
トランスポンダーはオフ。ACインバーター2をオフに。了解。次に、パネル250：CB BAT Bravo、POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDI
Début du test D-8 à
좋아요. 말
Roger, got th
Okay. Wir schlagen vor, dass sich der LMP ausruht, während CMP und CDR wach sind. Der LMP sollte gegen 63 Uhr schlafen gehen, das ist in 25 Minuten. Sie haben dann 6 Stunden Ruhezeit. Um 69 Uhr stehen Sie auf. Um 70 Uhr schlafen Kommandant und Pilot des Kommandomoduls 6 Stunden bis 76 Uhr. Um 70–76,5–77 Uhr führen wir einen 52-Sekunden-Test durch. Um 78:30 Uhr laden und richten wir die Triebwerke aus. Die Zündzeit für den zweiten Brennvorgang ist gleich, und wir haben in Kürze eine Landeplattform für Sie. Wir empfehlen Ihnen allen, nach dem Brennvorgang zu essen. Das ist um 81–82 Uhr. Lassen Sie CMP und CDR essen, während Sie schlafen. Und nehmen Sie so schnell
로저, 41 델타 (오버.) 83. 1+41. 06
もう1つあります。これをコピーして、リードバックで全部教えてください。わかりました。準備ができたら、ランプを使いたいので、CB 16 INVERTER 2を閉じ、CB 11 AC BUS A LAMPを閉じます。その後、CB 16 INVERTER 2を開き、CB 11 AC BUS A LAMPとAC BUS A BUS TIE INVERT
هيوستن، هل تريدون منا اختبار الكاميرات في الطائرة؟ كنت أتساءل عن ذلك. رأيت ذلك في خطة الرحلة، لكنني أتساءل فقط عما إذا كنتم تريدون القيام بذلك أثناء تشغيل المحرك، أم
Eigentlich ist nicht der Beutel mit dem Futter
아니, 제가 제대로 이해했는지 확인해 볼게요. 275번 패널로 가서 CB MAIN A, BAT BUS A, 그리고 CB MAIN B, BAT BUS 
मैं आपको बत
रॉजर। वह सचमुच बहुत जल्दी में 
बाईं ओर की खिड़की से दिखाई देने वाला क्षेत्र अपेक्षाकृत समतल मैदान है, जिस पर 5 से 50 फुट के आकार के कई गड्ढे हैं, और कुछ छोटी-छोटी पहाड़ियाँ हैं - मेरी राय में 20-30 फुट ऊँची, और आसपास हजारों छोटे-छोटे 1 और 2 फुट के गड्ढे हैं। हमें अपने सामने कई सौ फुट की दूरी पर कुछ कोणीय पिंड दिखाई देते हैं, जिनका आकार लगभग 2 फुट है और उनके किनारे कोणीय हैं। सामने एक पहाड़ी दिखाई दे रही है, जो लगभग हमारे सामने ज़मीन पर ही है। इसकी दूर
Okay. L'ultimo Joe è stato eseguito a -4 ore e mezza; eseguire una spinta di 0,5 piedi al secondo, capacità di ca
ヒューストン、こちらはアポロ…イーグル号です。アポロ11号がイーグル号に
बहुत बढ़िया। ठीक है, मुझे ईंधन की स्थिति देखकर खुशी हो रही है। म
アポロ8
Questo è negativo. Aspetta. Tutto quello che vogliamo fare, Jack, è dire BATTERIA IN CARICA SPENTA al momento. Completeremo la procedura non appena avra
아니요, 아직 준비가 덜 됐
Zanzibar Cap Com, Friendship Seven in HF. Vedo lunghe nubi striate in basso mentre ci spostiamo alla mia destra verso una sorta di sc
Der
मात्रा
Понял. Он должен полностью открыться, и с этого момента вы можете пр
روجر، يُرجى العلم بأنك ستطلب إجراء فحص ترددات عالية (HF) في جزيرة أسنسيون خلال هذه الرحلة. سيكون وقت هذا 
Va ben
좋아요, 아주 잘 됐네요. 이제 용기 바닥 쪽으로 비닐봉투가 몇 센티미터 정도 튀어나와 있을 거예요. 이 부분이 바닥 스크린에 닿아 빨려 들어가는 것을 방지하기 위해 가위로 잘라내 주세요. 그
로저, 마이크. 원
D'accord. Et à quelle heure vou
友
Вп
알았어. 들어봐, 아직도 네가
Ête
쌍둥이자리 4호, 당신의 궤도는 가로 87, 세
난 네가 그럴 줄 몰랐어. 15분이나 더 깨
Okay. You're saying that I will probably g
Okay, you called this about 3-1/2 minutes, but I guess the thing was slowly 
Roger, 11. Nous recevons les informations concernant les radiations. Et, nous nous demandons… cela nous paraît un peu étrange, alors nous envisageons d'arrêter et de recommencer. Nous serons avec vous dans que
ヒューストン、廃棄物タ
我们已经开始提供一些时间信息了。我们认为很快就能提供更准确的信息
看来地球真的在转动。
Vediamo, qu
यह
Он говорит совершенно серьезно: похоже, у вас больш
Roger, 11. This is Houston. At approximately 71 hours to 72 hours, we have you down for an eat period which I imagine is probably in progress already. 71 hours: O2 fuel cell purge; 72 hours GET: CO2 filter change number 6, secondary radiator flow check. And we'll send you up a block data on a 2 hour pass, pericynthion pass, return mode abort. At 73 hours 00 minutes: stop at approximately 0 degrees roll. That is, when you're coming up on 0 degrees roll angle around 73 hours, we'd like you to stop. And perform a option 3 remaining in the for a drift check. 73 hours, 20 minutes: we'll give you a update to the landing site, 1 state vector, and target load. 73 hours 30 minutes: maneuver to 000 roll, pitch, and yaw; high gain antenna 
Это «Дру
ああ、大丈夫。ここで退屈してるわけじゃないんだ。少し前にミッドウェー上空を飛んだ
G
E la tensi
嗯！嗯！……
Roger. AUTO
Roger. Your radiator is now FLOW. Stand by. A C-Band OFF..
11日、ヒューストン。ヘルメットバッグ（訂正：ハッチバッグ）に入っていた装備品については、取り外して右側のソファの下のスリープレストレイントに入れることをお勧めします。
로저. 지금쯤이면 화면에 37번 표시등이 깜빡이고 있을 겁니다. 깜빡이는 37번 표시등을 끄지
242，偏航角 20。收到
再说一
Still no joy. Th
알았어
Ok. So che stai cercando di stare zitto, quindi ti leggerò un po' di informazioni. Una delle cose che abbiamo appena scoperto e che potrebbe darti un po' di sicurezza è che se perdi la bombola di ossigeno criogenico, ti restano 36 kg a /. Il fattore limitante per il funzionamento con una sola bombola al momento è la bombola di idrogeno, che ha un margine positivo a /, supponendo che il n
52-دل
Et sur le, la vibration du véhicule lui-même n'était pas ce que... deuxièmement... vol motoris
Я не верю, что они тебя слышат, Майк. Ты что, сейчас начинаешь уст
روجر. لقد لاحظنا نفس الأرقام على درجات حرارة مخرج الماء لديك، واعتقدنا أن ذلك عطل في الحساس. نحن نراقب الجه
حسنًا. هل سنستخدم نفس الأساليب ال
Würden Sie Pu
D'accord. Nous pouvons maintenant nous occuper du sac. L'étape suivante consiste à préparer le tuyau rouge, celui du commandant ou celui du LMP (car nous aurons besoin des deux), pour le placer en haut du sac. Pour cela, vous devez d'abord vous assurer que le tuyau rouge est séparé du tuyau bleu. Je ne sais pas si cela a déjà été fait, mais si ce n'est pas le cas, vous devez couper la gaine extérieure en tissu Beta sur toute la
Okay. Die Datensicherung ist abgeschlos
حسنًا، لنعد إلى الصفحة ١٨. سنتابع كما هو عند ٣٠ ثانية، ١٠ ثوانٍ، ٧ ثوانٍ، نا
收到，阿波罗11号。既然你
Продолжая свой рассказ о начале полета, после того как мы вошли в темноту, на высоте, которую я считаю 1200 футов, я попытался удерживать позицию относительно ракеты-носителя, но единственным критерием, по которому я мог судить в тот момент, было расстояние между мигающими огнями. Время от времени они появлялись – не время от времени, а постоянно, – я видел один огонь, потом два, потом снова один, а иногда проходило много времени, прежде чем я видел два огня, что указывало на постоянное вращение ракеты-носителя. Я действительно не имел ни малейшего представления о том, в каком направлении она движется. Судя по расстоянию между огнями, когда я мог видеть оба, я чувствовал, что нахожусь в очень хорошем положении относительно ракеты-носителя, пока мы 
네. 13 바로 아래입니다. 참고로 말씀드리자면, 저희는 여러 가지 작업을 동시에 진행하고 있습니다. 곧 다가올 중간 단계에서 제어 시스템을 결정하고, 선택한 제어 시스템으로 어떻게 비행할지, 정렬은 어떻게 할지 등을 연구하고 있습니다. LMS(달 착륙 시스템)와 몇몇 팀이 이 작업을 위해 총력을 기울이고 있습니다. 또한, 대기권 진입 시 언제 어떻게 진입 장치를 작동시킬지, 그리고 시스템 상태 점검도 진행하고 있습니다. 내일쯤에는 메인 버스 B 점검이 있을 예정이라 많은 사람들이 열심히 작업하고 있습니다. 달 표면 카메라의 조리개 값 설정을 알려드리겠습니다. 1/250초 셔터 속도로 가능한 목표물을 촬영해 주십시오. 어떤 조리개 값이 가장 좋을지 정확히 알 수 없기
Was hast du verwendet,
好的，吉姆
Tr-10 back to normal. I've done that earlier. Okay, we got - got suit pressure. Go ahead and take a look at the inverters again here. 250 is 141 (degrees), 150 is about 107 (degrees). Well enough alone. Standby is... 7. Just about ambient. Negative, it's even a little.... The cabin pressure is about 5.3 (psi), which is perfect. Suit dome is 72 (degrees). Cabin dome is 45 and cabin is holding. Suit temperature is about 64 (degre
Warten Sie. Der Kommandant schläft; wir holen seine Da
Hallo, Houston CAP COM. Jetzt können wir euch al
네, 맞아요. 하지만 정장에 닿지는 않네요. 다시 한 번 쳐주세요
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston
حسنًا يا فريد. اعلم أن الخرطوم الأحمر الخاص بجهاز LMP فقط هو الموصول بكيس الحاوية. في هذه الحالة، نرجو منك اتباع الخطوات التالية لإدخال الخرطوم الأحمر الآخر في كيس الحاوية الآخر: قم بعمل فتحة مائلة في إحدى
わかりま
That's affirmative.
Bene. Q
Affermativo. Supponiamo che ci sia un
Roger. Il
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। तानानारिव पहुंचने में 1 मिनट बा
好了，万斯。吉姆醒了。你读什么
रॉजर, ट्रैंक्विलिटी। मिशन
Santo cielo,
제미니 4, 휴스턴 
Okay. For information, Fred was on COMM last night; and he was over in the left-hand seat, and if you want our radiation readings, we just goofed. We left them all in the suits which are now nicely tucked away. We are going to get out Jack
ल
D'accord. Voici mes observations concernant le bus principal B. Tout s'est passé très vite. On a d'abord entendu l'impact, l'explosion, ou je ne sais pas exactement ce qui l'a provoqué. Environ une seconde plus tard, une alarme générale s'est déclenchée: sous-tension du bus principal B. J'ai vérifié la tension, et elle était correcte à ce moment-là. Je suppose donc qu'il s'agissait d'une surtension. La pile à combustible 3 fonctionnait également bien, avec un bon débit. Fred, à ce moment-là, entrait dans le module de commande et s'installait à son poste. Peu après, le voyant du bus CA 2 s'est allumé. Il a regardé le bus principal B, et la tension était à zéro. Le débit des piles à combustible était également à zéro. Je me demande si nous n'avons pas un courant sur le bus principal B. Mais ce n'est qu'une supposition. Je n'ai pas essayé de le réinitialiser. Nous avions d'autres problèmes avec le bus principal A, notamm
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपको 64 नॉ
Roger, compris. Je devrai saisir manuellement 0,05 g lorsque cela se produira et régler la lu
Wir möchten Sie bitten, die Fluglage (Neigung 010
हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि जब तक आपको इनकी दोबारा आवश्यकता न हो, तब तक आप ऑप्टिक्स की पावर बंद रखें, और कृपया रिंग 1 औ
Numéro 12 6.2, 12
Okay, at 100,000 feet we get the Landing Arm ON. One thousand, get th
Хоро
Roger. We'd like you to place your Entry C-Band beacon to CONTINUOUS a
حسنًا. هذا تأكيد.
حسنًا. نتوقع، عند الوقت المُحدد لمنتصف مسارك التالي، أي عند نقطة الدخول ناقص ساعتين، احتراقًا بمعدل 1.4 قدم في الثانية، مما يُغير قيمة جاما عند نقطة الدخول بمقدار عُشر درجة. حاليًا، وبدون أي مناورات إضافية، تبلغ قيمة جاما -6.39 درجة، وسنزيدها قليلًا جدًا للوصول إلى منتصف خط الهدف، وستصبح بعد المن
好的。我们将在格林威治标准时间 02:15 发布新的
D'accord. 
Видишь, со мной не получится, Скотт? А теперь я измерил парциальное давление кислорода (PO2), которое при этом обнуляется. Ладно, Р. Кэл
Здесь, на месте, всё выглядит очень хорошо. Мы готовы к де
Ricevuto. Abbiamo rile
燃料残量は現時点で75～100パーセントです。窓は金星の遮蔽を示していますが、それは違います。金星は遮蔽していません。金星の遮蔽を測定するための機器を
了解。それで
ジム、写真に関する情報をお伝えしたいんです。先ほどフレッドと少し話したんですが、サービスモジュールの撮影でどのカメラとレンズを使うべきか、つまりどの写真を
それはホライズンスキャナーかもしれな
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。近西那翁点，发射后2小时。G&N：62710，+098，-019，点火时间077 46 2248，DELTA-VX，+32148，-00455，-1037
Jim, sobald du mit dem Umräumen fertig bist und es passt, würden wir den Batterieladevorgang kurz unterbrechen, um die Telemetrie hochzufahren und die Temperaturen wie gestern erneut zu überprüfen. Deine Batterien haben momentan 111 Amperestunden; wir hoffen, sie auf maximal 116 Amperestunden zu bringen. Wir können entweder die Prozedur, die das Hochfahren der Telemetrie beinhaltet, noch einmal durchlesen oder, falls Jack sie noch hat, seine Notizen verwenden – ich 
로저. 지금 사전 출시 단계에 있나
Roger. Sembra che il pressostato d
ठीक है, कोलंबिया। अपलिंक पूरा हो गया है; कंप्यूटर अब आपका है। आप ब्लॉक पर जा सकते हैं; हालाँकि, हम आपसे अनुरोध करते ह
Apollo 8, Houston. Die REACQ-Winkel sehen aus wie minus 45 Grad Nickwinkel, plus 90 Grad Gierwinkel und für die Zei
Roger
Pourriez-vous nous redonner le numéro de page? La page
2 minuti il ​​tempo;
11, Houston. L'autonomia esatta è di 125.200 miglia, e si viaggia a 4486 piedi al sec
Roger, Jack
여기는 HF 대역에서 방송하는 시그마 세븐입니다. 디크, 지금
Okay, Jack. Wir
Giusto. È un vero vantaggio in cabina di pilotaggio. Sei solo un po' al buio. Sembra che potrebbe essere utile ridurre il diaframma di circa un incremento. 
아주 좋습니다. 정말
كواد دلتا ٢٤٥، ٨١ بالمئة. تنصح شركة P&C بأن
了解。スーツ温度は62度、キャビン温度は101度です。血圧が上昇し始めています。マニュアルに従って
是的，杰克，我们还在。我们要跟着你的步骤操作，所以我们会使用高比特率进行传输。回答你的问题，如果出现问题，
オーケー、アポロ8号。良
Okay. One of the first things we want to do is charge the battery in, so we can get some power over there to do that, and we have procedures ginned up to do it. In regards to reentry, we're planning our last midcourse at 5 hours before entry interface, and, if we have to make one, that is. And then we'd like to jettison the serv
Okay. The CMP
Роджер. Мы наблюдаем за чем-то… довольно странным. Нас уже отнесло на 70 градусов по тангажу, и мы хотели бы узнать, были ли у вас какие-либо проблемы с вентиляцией или что-то подобное, что м
Hallo Columbia, Houston. Die
Okay. Your choice on that. As soon as Jack gets up, I'd suggest we go ahead and break up these lithium 
Si je ne dis pas plus, l'enregistrement en temps réel ne tardera pas. Il est clair que l'attitude que vous adoptez vo
Roger. Wir sind fast abfahrbereit. Ed hat gerade einen seiner Handschuhe wieder angezogen
もう一度言
Okay, BAT C ist 37, pyro
Хорошо. Майк, ты можешь выполнить маневр, чтобы занять исходное положение, как показано на странице 398 план
D'accord, Jack. Tu peux procéder à la configuration des interrupteurs. Nous allons te demander d'activer les interrupteurs du moteur MAIN BUS TIE un peu plus tard, simplement pour vérifier leur bon fonctionnement, car les batteries commencent probablement à refroidir. Nous
알겠습니다
Non sono sicuro che la navicella spaziale possa sopportare tutto
केन, आज हम सबने ज़्यादा से ज़्यादा द
D'accord. La première manœuvre sera une, une seule, et ce sera un / commençant par le poids, 63295 moins 163 plus 129 plus 001 36 moins 00 045 plus 002 02 345 188 343 999 99 plus 016 85 002 48 002 001 86 23 2013 164 012 vers le haut 276, à gauche 04, novembre Alfa pour le reste de cette colonne. Dans les étoiles du nord; 068 097 356, un départ sans tonneau, et une seule inclinaison sur le banc Alfa. Te
Neil, hier ist Houston. Das Sichtfeld ist in Ordnung. Wir möchten Sie bitten, die Kamera etwas
这是Sigma Seven的语音录音。我
ठीक है। चलिए देखते हैं कि मैंने सही समझा है या नहीं। 49 घंटे पर, 
تأكد من إغلاق وقفل لوحة الوجه. الخوذة مقفلة، والقفازات في مكانها، ووصلة المدخل والمخرج على شكل حرف "Y"، وخراطيم نظام التحكم الإلكتروني بالهواء (ECS) حرة. سأجري بعد ذلك فحصًا لبدلة الطيار، وقد انتهيت منه بالفعل... لننتقل إلى فحص التدفق. قفل الفتحة مف
Well, I'd rather have a timer going so that we - what are we going to put i
罗杰。我是飞行员。大约3小时前，我吃了第二天第二餐。我喝了大约4到5口水
そうでもないで
रॉजर। प्लस 25, / 63087, माइनस 162 प्लस 129, माइनस 00163, प्लस 00001, प्लस 52759 177 137 001, लागू नहीं, प्लस 00201 52759 623 52543 14 2347 337 023 ऊपर 195 बाएँ 1.7, प्लस 1145, माइनस 16500 12780 35890। उत्तर सेट 068 097 356, कोई उल
我们删除了一条；格林
Roger. Je comprends: 14 secondes, combustion à l'heure, attitude nominale, deux dixièmes de X, un dixième de Y et rien; moins un dixième de Y et rien de Z; et vous avez mis 6,2 dessus, et le compta
Roger. La série de fissures ou de failles qui la traversent plonge vers le sud en trois paliers environ. Le réseau de failles parallèles au nord présente une dépression centrale. J'espère que vous tous, sur Terre, comprenez ce que nous voulons dire lorsque nous affirmons que l'horizon est plutôt inquiétant, un endroit sombre et peu engageant. Nous survolons actuellement l'un de nos futurs sites d'alunissage, choisi dans cette région lisse appelée la Mer de la Tranquillité. Cette surface lisse facilitera les premières tentatives d'alunissage et nous évitera d'avoir à contourner
L'impostazione è -50 gradi. I giroscopi sono gratuiti. Mantenimento a -50 gradi. Pronto per il flare. Ro
Apollo 8, Houston. At 19, we're due for another cycle throu
はい、わかりました。今はOFFの状態です。16
Okay, Jack, nel riquadro 11 della riga in alto, vuoi davvero che ci siano i PROPULSION PQGS e gli ASCEN
速度增量为 42.5；持续时间 53 秒；偏航角修正 - 俯仰角向下 2 度；Core 25 为 00425；Core 2
好的。现在我想设置一下我
Ok. Poco prima delle 2 ore e 15 minuti, presumo che sia prima che mi dian
ठीक है। यह अच्छी जानकारी है और जब तक आप पिचिंग जारी रखते हैं, अगर कभी आपको लगे कि यह उपयोगी हो सकता है, 
Gemini VI, Gemini VI, Houston CAP COM. Bereit zum Einsat
We want DISPLAY, open; S-BAND ANTENNA, closed - to avoid a MASTER ALARM, CAMERA - SEQUENCE CAMERA, open; And under, we want DISPLAYs, open; DC BUS VOLT, closed; INVERTER 2, open; ASCENT ECA, closed; A
انظر إلى الرسم البياني. لكي يكون لدينا 25 لأسفل، يجب أن
Roger. D'accord. À 74 heures, lorsque vous commencerez cette manœuvre, le 5018 devrait ressembler à R1 de 2703 degrés, le tangage R2 est de 0903 et R3 de 2
جاك، هذا تأكيد
11, ह्यूस्टन। हमारा कहना यह है कि अगर लो गेट से पहले हम किसी एक अक्ष पर नियंत्रण खो देते हैं, तो हम उड़ान रद्द करने की सलाह देंगे। इस
D'accord, Apollo 8. Sur la télé, on va vous laisser monter le signal dès qu'on aura de nouveau accès à l'antenne à gain élevé. Je pense que ça 
Houston, Apollo 11. We've terminated direct O2, our cabin pressure is 57, and, as a matter of curiosity, when we turn the DIRECT O2 v
Roger. Je ne sais pas exactement ce qui s'est passé, Mike. J'étais en train de marquer les sites d'atterrissage avec le code, et j'avais sans cesse un gros message d'erreur pour l'OPTIQUE AUTOMATIQUE. Je voyais la cible, ou le site d'atterrissage, apparaître, alors j'ai tout
罗杰。对于 NSR 机动，燃烧 GET，03 加 47 加 37；Delta-VT，42.9；持续时间，54 秒；偏航 0，俯仰向下 3 度；核心 25，00429；26，000
マイナス Z 
よし、ジェミニ4号。地上の状況は良好だ。システムはまだ
فتحة ا
Do you have any specific comments on your balloon exper
J'ai reçu le
روجر. انطلق يا BFT في - BEF، بالأحرى، 
Eagle, Houston. È la discesa 2 carbura
- وصدمة الانفصال - صدمة نفخ الألعاب النارية عند الانفصال رفعت الرقم إلى 10
Роджер. Имейте в виду, что примерно в 50 лет я дово
لا أعرف. الشمس تُؤذي عينيك يا غاس بشدة. لا أعتقد أننا سنُجرب ذلك. حاول إد النوم وخوذته مرفوعة ث
Es dreht sich um 360°, wenn es mit dem sc
अब इंसर्शन चेकलिस्ट देख रहा हूँ। डीसी वोल्ट मुख्य है। रेट्रोमैनुअल फ्यूज स्विच बंद है। रेट्रोमैनुअल बंद है। सभी
Roger. J'ai écouté une partie de votre conver
VIII、CSQ。RCSはどれくらい使用しましたか
Ok. Ci proveremo sicuramente. Come ho detto, noi... Abbiamo delle stelle. Non sono... Non sono centrate con lo zero dell'albero e del perno. Dia
11, Houston. Aspettate un attimo finché non
ठीक है। जिम से अनुरोध है कि वे अपने पाँचों निशानों के बीच थोड़ा और अंतराल रखें। यदि संभव हो, तो हम उनमें से कुछ को शीर्ष बिंदु से आगे तक ले जाना चाहेंगे। हम पाँचों निशानों के बीच काफी तेजी से अ
Okay. Ich gebe Ihnen einen Zeit-Trick. Es sind 5
好的。另一个改动是关于经过的时间：我们希望增加这项
Wenn ich den Horizont finden könnte, hätte ich es geschafft. Ich hätte den Stern im Bild und den Blaufilter aktiviert. Er hätte alles außer meinem Stern ziemlich gut ausgeblendet. A
روج
わかりました、ジャック。バーンパッドを確認したところ、ジンバル
Роджер, Базз. Выберите режим Bravo, OMNI, HIGH-GAIN TRACK в ручном режиме; BEAM, WIDE
È il mio... proba
Хорошо. Исходя из вашего вектора, наземные расчеты показывают скорость 15,3 фута в секунду на среднем участке траектории, VEI 36221, гамма -6,51, так что, похоже, ваша программа довольно хороша. Однако, применив ваше решение к нашему вектору, мы получаем гамму -10,3
Notre position est la suivante: survol, /G&N; 63385; plus 0,97, moins 0,23; plus 0212,7, moins 0141,7, moins 0254,8; 148, 316, 050; NA, plus 0022,5; 0360,9, 0
Okay. Roger. We have no further queries. I
Хорошо, похоже, над южной оконечностью Африки видны освещенные участки. Я точно вижу го
حسنًا. في
D'accord. La grande nouvelle, relayée par les agences de presse, c'est que les 82 membr
Да, но это пр
روجر. للعلم فقط، لقد رفعتُ الضغط قليلاً. قراءاتي الآن 7 رطل/بوصة 
Con chi
Roger. Wir möchten die Kryotanks etwas ausbalancieren. Könnten Sie daher bitte den Heizungsschalter von Sauerstofftank 1 und den Heizungsschalter von Wasserstofftank 2 auf AUS stellen und alle anderen Kryo-Schalter unverändert lassen? Wir lassen das System dann einige Stunden 
Got it
안녕하세요, 버뮤다. 프렌드
Oh! Did you see that flash? Huh? Yes. A very bright flash right on the air glow. It was
여기는 우정 7입니다. 태양아, 해가 질 때 여기에 표시를 하고 싶어. 지금 태양이 지평선 위에 있고, 양쪽으로
Bene. Vi darò un breve riassunto dei sistemi. Fondamentalmente, tutti i sistemi sono a posto. Per quanto riguarda la vostra traiettoria di ritorno, possiamo ancora raggiungere la linea del Pacifico centrale aspettando fino al tredicesimo. Dopo 138 secondi di accensione,
D'accord, Jack. La mise à jour du plan de vol comporte quelques points, et le premier que nous 
Non. Il s
هذا ذكي. - أخيرًا تم إخراج غطاء مكتب الأرصاد الجوية. اللقطة الأولى غير 
ठीक है, जैक। मैं आपके द्वारा बताए गए चरणों को दोबारा पढ़
E nella riga 4, sotto SISTEMI A/B-2, RISCALDATORI QUAD, noterai che abbiamo chiuso quegli interruttori automatici, ma quello che vogliamo che tu faccia è: sul pannello 3, spegnere g
لا، ليس كذ
Confermiamo con la lettura 
Très bien. Bougez, roulez à gauche. OK. Vous êtes bien positionné. 
맞습니다. 1-13번 트랙에는
Good. Glad to see yo
これは私の昔のお気に入りのアルバムで、約20年前に作られた「Music Out of the Moon」とい
Tu as bien reçu les indicatifs d'appel et tout l
Al mome
... per liberarsi da un at
Cal Cap Com，这里是Sigma Seven。收到你的消息。你收到我的消息了吗
And, Aquarius. One thing, however, that we do not plan to do is
好的。我们正在排查之前发现的氧气流量的小故障
आगे बढ़ो, बरमू
나는 구해야 해..
Bene. Per il Pacifico centrale, le condizioni generali sono buone. Ci si possono aspettare basi nuvolose sparse di 2000 piedi, visibilità 10 miglia, vento 070 a 12, altezza delle onde 4 piedi, altimetro 2974. Alba 10 Zulu e prima luce 16:49 Zulu. La nave sarà Yorktown; gli aerei saranno Airboss numero 1 e 2 e i Recuperi 1, 2 e 3. Il tempo stimato per raggiungere la nave è di 15 minuti: la Yorktown è sul punto di destinazione, gli aerei Airboss saranno sul posto e il comandante. I Recuperi 1, 2 e 3 sono SH3 Alfa e vanno con la Yorktown, quindi sono sul punto di destinazione. Tutti hanno nuotatori a bordo. Se gli aerei di recupero non ricevono notizie dalla navicella spaziale; loro andranno avanti e metteranno i nuotatori in acqua e, se sei in buona forma e
Хорошо. Я сейчас кратко расскажу о состоянии систем. В принципе, все системы работают испр
比尔说打电话给瓦莱丽，让她把录音机
تبقى لدينا 13 درجة على الكرة، وأعتقد أن هذا صحيح تقريبًا. بالنظر إلى الظل وما إلى ذلك، ربما نكون - على الأرجح - حوالي 13 درجة إلى يسا
好的。在他脑袋正后方是我们的光学仪器，六分
ألفا/كمبيوتر إلى كمبيوتر؛ مؤشر إطلاق المركبة إلى GPI؛ ضبط ميل وانحراف محرك جيمبال إلى تلقائي؛ إعادة ضبط مؤقت الحدث، لأعلى؛ بدء مؤقت الحدث إلى إيقاف؛
मैं इसकी पुष्
짐, 방금 
لا أعرف من يملك 
11, Houston. Empfehlenswert i
Non credo, a meno che non premiamo
Вот репортаж Гарри Розенталя из Associated, Хьюстон. Два Санта-Клауса украсили сочельник для двухлетнего Джеффри Ловелла. Первый постучал в его входную дверь и принес подарки. Второй проводил его папу домой с Луны. Первый был в красном костюме и с белой бородой, и его крики «Хо-хо» были слышны за кварталом. Второй представлял собой огромный двигатель, извергающий пламя за Луной, и тысячи людей ждали известия о его запуске. «Пожалуйста, примите к сведению, что Санта-Клаус существует», — такими были первые слова «Аполлона-8», когда он вышел из радиомолчания, чтобы сообщить встревоженному миру через 15 минут после того, как двигатель выполнил свой критически важный запуск. «Никто из нас никогда не ожидал получить лучший рождественский подарок, чем этот», — сказал Кен Маттингли из Центра управления полетами. «Поблагодарите всех на Земле за нас. Вы знаете, что мы бы не справились без вас», — последовал ответ полковника Фрэнка Бормана, командира космического корабля. В этот момент перед пультами в Центре управления полетами загорелась рождественская елка, и астронавт Харрисон Шмидт прочитал экипажу космическую версию «Визита Святого
ゲイジング、オープンま
我向前走了4英尺，然后又向
And in the meantime, wh
حسنًا يا جاك، لا نستطيع فعل ذلك الآن. ضوء الشمس ينعكس عن المحركات النفاثة، وما زال الحطام الذي تناثر وقت الحادث موجودًا، مما يجعل رؤية النجوم صعبة، ولماذا - ما المقصود برؤية النجوم من النافذة - فقط للتحقق من مسار نظام
ह्यूस्टन, हम ओम्नी सी पर हैं और अब ब्रावो पर जा र
罗杰。巴兹，你这状态真棒。我们数到五了。现在数得很快，我们希望你答对一题。1、2、3、4、5；5、4、3
네, 잭. 배터리 충전 확보를 완료하신 걸로 알고 있습니다. 이제 복사할 준비가 되셨다면, 잭, 절차상 전원 켜기 과정에 필요한 두 가지 변경 
Wir fühlen uns heute recht gut. Beim Durchsehen des Flugplans ist uns aufgefallen, dass wir die Ruhepausen vielleicht etwas verkürzen und häufiger einlegen sollten. Das könnte besser funktionieren. Gestern sind wir da völlig aus dem Gleichgewicht geraten. Wir versuchen nun, wieder in einen normalen Rh
Sagen Sie es bitte noch einmal. Die Ve
Jim, regarding window 5, I have a drawing here; and, when you're docked, you have approximately a 60-degree angle between the Z-axes of the two spacecraft. It appears that peering out window 5, you would be looking at the rendezvous radar on top of the which would, if you pitched, more or less give you a view of the service module. That is, if you pitched, so - from - and I think that this has been run by quite a few folks here; so, offhand,
يا ج
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。もう一度言ってく
This is Friendship Seven. I still have very bright light along the horizon; orange at the bottom, y
Jim, puisque nous en parlons, je voudrais préciser une chose à Jack. Comme je l'ai dit, la procédure d'alignement que nous allons recomm
ठीक है, मैं इन्हें वैसे ही पढ़ूंगा जैसे मुझे दिख रहा है, न कि जैसे एसईडीआर (सर्विस इंजीनियरिंग डिपार्टमेंट रिपोर्ट) वाले पढ़ते हैं। मुझे फिर से वही पुरानी यादें सताने लगी हैं। लगता है जॉन को राहत मिली होगी। मैं 
알
D'accord, Fred. Tout d'abord, les préparatifs, en commençant par la liste de vérification des imprévus (page 24), sont recommandés. Nous serons ravis de recevoir vos commentaires à ce sujet. Deuxièmement: lorsque vous êtes en position de manœuvre, vous devriez voir le soleil tout en haut. Il séparera le curseur lorsque celui-ci est positionné à zéro. Attention cependant: la manœuvre peut se désengager très facilement, car elle est très sensible au roulis et au lacet. Sachez que la position est en cran 2, mais la manœuvre est très peu sensible à la durée et à l'attitude. Autrement dit, si nécessaire, nous pouvons la désengager en cas de problème, et l'attitude n'est pas un facteur critique. Cela nous amène au fait que nous n'avons qu'une seule règle de manœuvre: si la vitesse angulaire autour d'un axe atteint 10 degrés par se
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Ihr Weißes Team ist jetzt auf Sendung. Wir freuen uns auf einen spannenden Fernsehabend und einen Bericht vor dem 
Das stimmt, und auf dem Bild, das ich sehe
맞아요. 공을 놓치지 않고 꽉 
Okay. Joe. As I read that, at 74 hours we're going to do an Sun
안녕하세요, 프레드. 적어도 하나는 장착하셨을 거라고 짐작했어요. 압력이 1.8에서 0
好了。现在
11，休斯顿。我们希
Je n'ai pas encore défini de taux de roulis. Je l'ajouterai qua
Right. Nulling FDI's to aline platfo
Vous vou
À présent… une cible est alignée avec le centre de la ceinture d’Orion, approximativement au centre géométri
没错。这些就是所有的航班变更——航班计划的变更。肯现在会过来，稍后等我们安排妥当后他还会过来。我想，为了确保一切都安
Erwerb am,
О, мы немного у
휴스턴, 폐수 처리와 산소 연료 전지 퍼지 작업이 완료되었습
MDIU के ज़रिए कुछ भी करना नामुमकिन है। जब आपने इस
Okay. Du entscheidest. Sobald Jack aufgestanden ist, schlage ich vor, w
Роджер. Подтверждаю. И нет никакой возможности проверить, совпадает ли это. Я мешаю; может, мне удастся сюд
Was ich gerade mache, Jack, ist Folgendes: Ich neige mich jetzt nach rechts. Ich nehme einen anderen Stern ins Visier. Sirius war einfach zu w
Columbia, H
Also with respect to the TV test, I would think that we could probably get a pretty good handle on the operation just by taking red and blue and polarizing shots of the earth independent of the TV, but within the same time frame or at about the same range we had the T
आपको नहीं पता? ऐसा लगता है कि आप फ्लोरिडा के दक्षिणी छोर के ठीक दक्षिण-पूर्व में हैं। शायद 
ヒ
Das ist bestätigt, Mike
当然不
是的。右侧除了燃油量警告灯亮着之外，其他所有东西都在外侧。我把那个开关装在内
Хорошо, перейдём к резервному варианту подключения (DOWN VOICE BACKUP) и выключим автоматический выключатель
क्या आखिरकार बारि
Это подтверждается. Хорошо, теперь у нас осталось минус 3 часа, или следующее временное событие, и начинается маневр для достижения того, что мы называем положением для обзора Луны. Этот маневр пре
Nein, ich habe es nicht gesehen. 
Désolé pour
रॉजर. 21-4 आपका ΔV आगे और पीछे के बीच विभाजित होगा। 1 मिनट 32 सेकंड पर 56 फीट आगे। 2+30 पर 120 फीट/सेकंड पीछे। 01 दिन, 23 घंटे, 53 मिनट, 23 सेकंड। 2+
Die Sonnenuntergänge sind spektakulär.
Ensuite, nous aimerions que vous placiez la caméra contre la vitre, en la tenant de façon à ce que le nez du vaisseau ne soit pas dans le champ de vision. Nous souhaitons ensuite deux séries de photos. Vous devez être en mode Pulse et pointer le vaisseau directement vers la Terre. Je vous laisse le temps de démarrer. La prise de vue se fera en direction de la Terre, côté nuit. Effectuez une première impulsion vers le haut (inclinaison vers le haut) et prenez une photo avec l'obturateur grand ouvert en position pose longue. Puis, lorsque le vaisseau apparaît à l'horizon, prenez une autre photo avec une impulsion vers le bas (incl
休斯顿，阿波罗
لدي تسلسل، والكبسولة محكمة ومحكمة. لدي موقف أخضر. إنها جالسة هنا كالصخرة الص
チャーリー、ここでもう少し作業が残っています。荷物を全て移動させて、希望通りに収納し、明日のスケジュールを少しでも前倒しできるようにしたいと思っています。必要なら、あと
Ok, perché non la smettiam
Roger, Gemini VI. Understand radar lock-on and rendezvous test i
Хьюстон,
罗杰。在华盛顿，参议院财政委员会已批准延长所得税附加税，但目前看来参议院对该法案进行投票的可能性不大。在奥斯汀，休斯顿州众议员雷·莱蒙被提名为美国海洋学会国家
Ok, Houston. Sei pronto a parlare
Роджер. Мне пришлось переключиться на ВЧ-
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。ブラボーではどうやって読
Friendship Se
2시 2
Ricevuto. Pro
了解しました。33-1の積載は完了し
Also, wenn wir diese hier laden – wenn ich den Film einlege und ein oder zwei Fotos mache –, dann muss ich sie wieder rausnehmen; das ist das einzige Problem. Ich müsste es nicht, aber sie lässt sich dann nicht mehr so ​​ordentlich verstauen. Wenn es dir nich
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। आपका राशिफल 
Они н
Ricevuto. 5.000 sparpagliati; venti da nord-ovest 10; altezza onda 3 piedi; altimetro 2986; nominativo di chiamata delle forze di recupero Naha RESCUE 1, GMT 02:58; Nahe SEARCH 1, GMT 
好的。地球这次以26度角反向运行——从左到右。是
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo su Marte entro il 2000, ma i leader democratici hanno risposto che la priorità deve essere data alle esigenze sulla Terra. Agnew, alto funzionario governativo al decollo dell'Apollo 11 mercoledì, apparentemente parlava a nome suo e non necessariamente dell'amministrazione Nixon quando ha affermato: "A mio giudizio, dovremmo mandare un uomo su Marte entro la fine di questo secolo". Laredo, Texas, AP: I funzionari dell'immigrazione di Nuevo Laredo hanno annunciato mercoledì che agli hippy verrà negata la carta turistica per entrare in Messico, a meno che non facciano il bagno e si taglino i capelli. Huberto Cazaras, capo dell'immigrazione messicana a Nuevo Laredo, ha affermato che le autorità di Città del Messico, Acapulco e altre famose l
هذا صحيح. لقد أبلغت عن الأمر، وأعتقد أنني أبلغت عنه منذ ف
気温120度、高度1.7
Okay. They all look pr
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मध्यमार्ग सुधार संभवतः 104 घ
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Le tr
मैं गलत द
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। आपकी मित्रवत व्हाइट टीम आपको घर वापस छोड़ने तक आपका साथ देती रहेगी, और हम सभी को 
不，弗雷德还没有看到下降阶段的其他情况。据我了解，我们可以预期，储气
ジ
いいえ。こちら側では見かけないようです。カナベラルを出て前を向いた直後に少しだけ見えました。その時、粒子は私の方に向かってきていました。私は出発する途中だったので、カプセルから来たものではないことは分かっています。これまで、日の出のたびに大
いや、待って、待って。
हाँ, यह R-1 श्रेणी में होना चाहिए। 
Кстати, окна пришли в очень хорошем состоянии. Пятое окно выглядит очень чистым, так что я надеюсь, что продукция Hycon буде
Я надеюсь, что так и будет, потому чт
Gemini VI, Houston. Bitte prüfen Sie, ob der Stromkreis des Tonbandgeräts eingeschaltet ist. Der Steuerstromkr
هذا هو سيجما 7. فحص HF لمدة 30 ثانية، 
Wir sollen vier pro Tag für jeden M
ओह, बर
Cinquième cliché pris avec l'Hasselblad juste avant notre arrivée en Afr
Ok, Apollo 8. Quello che faremo in TV è di alzare il volume non appena torneremo all'antenna ad alto guadagno, e sembra che... immagino che sar
Раньше мне никогда не требовалась пом
你好，阿波罗1
Gemini 4, это центр управления воздушным движением Хьюстона. Мы обеспокоены тем, что давление в вашем источник
Les nombreux cratère
Okay. Do you have any landmark, any other 
Okay, very good. Under "Final stowage," the first thing that's listed on line 36, page 1-5, is "Optics." And if you want to get started on your stowage, we'd like to leave the optics out, because we'll have the star check coming up quite a bit after this. The rest of that stuff can be taken care of
面板已关闭。我短暂地打开了它，只是为了擦擦鼻子，并试图清理镜头，但我没能做到。已选择重新进入模式。相机已收起。我现在要关闭标准光源——我无法移动右舷的舱室灯；因此，我将关闭它作为持续参考。现在，它已
자이로스코프를 보호 장치 안에 가뒀습니다. 너무 중요한 장치거든요. 자이로스코프 없이 어
À Hou
了解。これはプラス90パッドです。/G&N、63825、マイナス1.54、プラス1.32、マイナス0491.7、プラス0000.1、プラス6634.0、180、228、001。HAはN/A。HPはプラス0017.9、6652.2、37、6626.5、26、155.4、15.7。照準星はい
不行，阿波罗8
وبعد ذلك، سنبدأ شحن البطارية، وسيتعين علينا معرفة متى سيبدأ هو 
Да, я действительно
Sprich für dich
J'utilise moins de mouchoirs. Et puis, ça me ma
今はゼロスリーモードで飛行中です。これで軌道復帰できる
环顾四周，整体对比度***完全是由太阳的阴影造成的***……非常浅的灰色，浅灰色，我的影子周围有一圈光晕，头盔的影子周围也有一圈光晕。然后，当我看向远处***时，对比度变得更加强烈，因为周围的颜色仍然相当浅。当你向下看向太阳***时，更大面积的***阴影区域朝向我们。周围的***颜色***对比度没有那么高。观察我们扬起的尘
Gemini VIII, Houston
了解、11番。お気づ
حسنًا. سأتابع الأمر. في الصفحة 12، ستزودنا بالتحديثات وبع
好的。这里有三台相机，两台用于从窗口拍照，一台用于从5号窗口拍照。首先，我来介绍一下相机。我现在提到的这台相机是首选，它
... wir sind hier gerade dabei, alles in Ordnung zu bringen. Wir sind eigentlich nicht darauf vorbereitet, einen Aero-Med-Pass zu beantragen, es sei denn, es 
Grazie, Signor President
Roger, ti ho sentito. Ora misuriamo
重力加速度开始增强了
非常感谢。这首诗写得很好；但是要想赢得比
لقد توصلتُ للتو إلى حلٍّ لتغيير خط طول الهبوط بمقدار 6 درجات شرقًا. أريد فقط مقارنة ذلك بما توصلوا إليه بناءً على نفس مدة الاحتراق، استنادًا إلى خط طول تأثير الانحراف المُحدد من البيانات، وهو خطأ. لقد أوضحتُ أنني
Okay. Dies ist ein allgemeiner Hinweis, der sich auf Situationen bezieht, in denen Sie zwischen verschiedenen Befehlen wechseln. Vermeiden Sie es, währenddessen einen erweiterten Befehl (z. B. `and`) aufzurufen. Dieser Hinweis steht auch in den Programmhinweisen und
حسنًا، سأفعل. أيضًا، اسمح لي أن أسألك سؤالًا. في هذه الحالة، ونحن في وضعية الرسو، علينا استخدام نظام التحكم في الميل والدوران. وإلى أي 
Apollo 11, Houston. We bel
O
Доброе утро, «Аполлон-8»! Это Дик. От имени всех сотрудников Центра управления, и я уверен, что и от всего мира, я хотел бы пожелать вам всем очень счастливого Рождества. Ни
吉姆·麦克迪维特：现在大约是T+3小时。我们在SECO时脱离助推器时，升温速率大约是每秒0.5度。我试图降低升温速率，最终在SECO+30秒左
रॉज
哈哈！哈哈！你上次去灌木丛里，我的脚蹼上还留着黑色的刹车痕迹呢。
حسنًا. ها هو ذا قادم يا كولومبيا. سنبقيك مشغولًا قليلًا هنا. بمجرد أن نحصل على بيانات الولاية، نود منك اختيار الخيار 3 في تصريح المرور الليلي هذا، وعندما تصل إلى الجانب الآخر، سنزودك ببعض معلومات تتبع المعالم 
Gemini VII, hier ist VI. Wenn Sie es schaffen, die Gierachse einen Moment lang zu halten, versuchen wir, näher heranzukommen und all diese Nahaufnahmen von Ihnen zu ma
जी हाँ। हमने सोचा कि इजेक्शन एनवेलप के लिहाज 
Il sole è davver
حسناً. لق
Ja. Wir werden in etwa 3 Minuten von Madrid auf Goldstone umschalten. Sie s
Hier spricht Friend
Sì, certo. Non ti rendi conto di quanto diventi fredda questa cosa quando è in modalità rallentamento, e ho 
Okay. Wir haben eine gültige orale Temperaturmessung. Entfernen Sie die Sonde. Wie lesen Sie die Tempe
— — По
Apollo 8, Houston. Sembra che ci stiamo allontanando parecchio sia in beccheggio che in imbardata. Il beccheggio è di circa 50 gradi e l'im
Okay, we're back on UHF-hi. They were definitely the fireflies th
यह ह्य
Уберите подлокотни
Okay. Just below 13. And just for your information, we've got people working on several subjects. We're working on the midcourse coming up to determine our control system and how to do it with the control system we select, what we should do about the alinement. We've got the LMS and a couple of crews cranked up working on that. And we're also working on our entry, how and when we ought to activate the. And we're working on the systems status. Tomorrow sometime we're going to have a MAIN BUS B checkout, so we've got a lot of people swinging pretty hard here and I've got some f-stop settings for you for the lunar-surface camera. At 1/250th, we'd like you to take targets of opportunity. Each picture use three f-stops, because we don't know exactly which one is going to work the best, so use 4, 5.6, and 8 and 1/250th for the surface
Zut! Maintenant, surve
駅より呼び出し中... 聞こえました。もう一
Ok, stavo per raccontarti del passaggio di consegne che abbiamo appena fatto, ma sono arrivato un po' in ritardo. Dato che siamo pieni di energia e vorremmo avere la banda S con te dopo il blackout, vorremmo... Vorremmo che cancellassi il passaggio dalla pagina 2-5 della tua checklist di ingresso, dopo "Inizia blackout", che dice "POWER PMP su OFF". Vorremmo che lo lasciassi attiv
そうだね。時計が間違ってて、も
क्या इसे डालते
How do you mean? We are going to make an alinement on the Moon and on the Sun; other than that - I didn't get any - I wasn't on the headset when the general information was passed up, so if the
로저. 복사 준
オーケー、アクエリアス、ヒューストン。LMの現在の電力は500アンペア時間
Roger，G
这是友谊七号的录音。窗户上有很多灰尘，是复古火焰造成的，这里还有很多东西，看起来，呃，我们可能在离开发射台的路上就碾死了一些虫子。窗户外面好像有血迹。这让情况变得很真实，当它们在向阳面活动
Да. Как только мы завернули за у
オーケー、アラインメント・ケージング・チェックを開始します。ピッチングマイナス10°、ヨーイングマ
ठीक है। जब आपकी दरें पर्याप्त रूप से कम हो जाएंगी, तब हम आपको कॉल करेंगे। फिलहाल हम यह अन
Ok. Traccia il punto di riferimento 130 usando, e per informazione, questo posizionerà c
«Аполлон-8», мы обязательн
Вот и наш 
Okay
Okay, Houston. Wir senden gerade ein Bild der Erde zur E
わかった。それではフル充電
Роджер. Игл. Мы согласны. Оставайтесь на связи по углам карданного подвеса. И ещё, Игл, хотя у нас там подключен кислородный модуль напрям
ठीक है। हमारे पास लगभग तीन बातें हैं। पहली बात यह है कि आपके पूरे बैच के दो अंक जांचे जा चुके हैं और - वाह, बधाई हो! बहुत बढ़िया लग रहा है; वे इससे बहुत खुश हैं। उपतारकीय बिंदु वाले पहलू में आप 4 आर्क-मिनट तक पहुंच गए हैं, और यह पहली बात है जिसका उल्लेख करना ज़रूरी है। दूसरी बात यह है कि जब तक आपको कोई ज़रूरत न लगे, मुझे नहीं लगता कि आपको सोलो बुक और उससे संबंधि
Well, we're just going to h
ऐसा लगता है कि आप OMNI Alfa का इस्तेमाल कर रहे हैं। क्या आप पुष्टि कर सकते हैं कि हम Bravo और Delta के बीच स्विच करने के लिए 
Установит
Roger, 11. Nous ne disposons pas de cette fonctionnalité. Pour un bon posit
لقد قمتُ للتو بتصوير الهدف 16-أ. إنه مطار البصرة، ويقع مباشرةً على الخليج العربي. التقطتُ صورةً للخليج العربي بزاوية 30 درجة تقريبًا، ثم خفضتُ مقدمة الطائرة والتقطتُ صورةً للبحيرة الواقعة شمال غرب الخليج. وبما أن البصرة تقع على البحيرات، وقريبة جدًا منها، يُمكنك ببساطة متابعة الطائرة والتقاط صورة للمطار مباشرةً. لذا، تمكنتُ من تصوير المطار قبل الوصول إلى الهدف بمسافة لا بأس بها، ثم بدأتُ بتتبعه. في الواقع،
هذه سفينة فريندشيب 
了解しました。了解しまし
J'ai ouvert la visière il y a peu pour prendre la pilule de xylose. Toute la nourriture que j'ai à bord s'est émiettée ou a fondu. Elle est inutilisable en l'état, donc je pense que la pilule de xylose sera mon dernier repas en apesanteur. Cependant, la première, avant que la nourriture ne s'émiette, était 
好的，弗雷
تفضل، أ
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 약 2분 후 골드스톤으로 통신을 넘기겠습니
... 推力を NORMAL に設定。DELTA-V 推力 2 を OFF。ピッチとヨーを AUTO に設定。ジンバル MOTOR
Negativ, Buzz. Es sieht immer noch nicht gut aus. Anscheinend gib
Das ist eine posit
Roger, A
이 조용한 시간이 현장의 많은 사람들에게 영향을 미치고 있을 것 같습니다. 여기에 데이터를 좀 더 추가해야 할 것 같네요. 데이터는 에서 수집되었습니다. 그리고 이맘때쯤이면 중간 보고서를 요구할 겁니다. 저희가
알겠습니다. 이 별들은 정확히 중앙에 위치하지는 않겠지만, 115도의 경사각에서 베가, 알타이르, 라살하구, 데네브가 모두 망원경 시야에 들어올 것으로 계산했습니다. 그리고 베가, 알타이르, 라살하구, 데네브는 91도 경사각에서도 시야에 들어왔으
당신 쪽에서 무슨 신나는 일들이 벌어지고 있는지는 잘 아시겠죠? 여기는 정말 조용해요. 모두가 웃
Bene. Ora, a questo punt
أجل. الآن وقد عرفنا مكان (غير مقروء)، سيكون الأ
Niente di particolare. Voglio comunque salutarti. Tutti i sistemi sono 
テープは
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्
네. 잠시 COMM 담당자와의 연
Tranquility Base, Houston. We've reviewed the checklist, and about the only change in order to advance the that we've found is that you
Si tr
रॉजर। जिम, यह अच्छी खबर 
它正在移开，弗兰克。它正在从我们电视屏幕上的三点
こんにちは、こんにちは、バミューダ。よく
알겠습니다. 승무원 정의 기동 항목에서 깜빡이는 0622는 저희가 알려드린 입력된 각도를 나타냅니다. 깜빡이는 5018도 각도를 나타내므로, 50
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Запрос на отключение режима измерения расстояния в S-диапазоне (NORMAL) и отключение режима измерения расстояния в S-диапазоне (NORMAL). Повторяю: режим измерения расстояния в S-диапазоне (NORMAL) — отключен; режим измерения расстояния в S-диапазоне (NORMAL)
रॉजर। टीवी पर वह तस्वीर बहुत अच्छ
100 英尺
Ho detto che i 
Ruhe bewahren. Verstanden. Empfangen. Bitte warten
Guten Abend. Ich möchte mit Ihnen einige der symbolträchtigeren Aspekte unserer Apollo-11-Mission besprechen. In den Gesprächen der letzten zwei, drei Tage an Bord unseres R
로저. 월리, 연락이 끊기는
저희는 연료 전지 1의 회로를 열어주시길 
Bene. Ci 
لنرى. في سبرينغفيلد، ميزوري، قرر ميكي أوين، لاعب البيسبول المخضرم لفريق بروكلين دودجرز، الذي دخل التاريخ بإسقاطه الضربة الثالثة التي قادت فريق نيويورك يانكيز للفوز على دودجرز في بطولة العالم عام 1941، أن يُخلّد اسمه بأكثر من مجرد إنجازاته الرياضية. فقد تبرع بخمسة وأربعين فتى وفتاة بمهور. طُلب من هؤلاء الصغار إرسال رسائل يخبرونه فيها كيف سيعتنون بالمهور. وعندما انهالت الرسائل، أضاف خمسة مهور إلى العشرين التي كان قد تبرع بها بالفعل؛ وتبرع آخرون بعشرين مهرًا إضافيًا. وقال ميكي أوين: "كنت أظن أنني سأتلقى حوالي 45 رسالة، لكنني انتهيت بحوالي 900 رسالة". والآن في الصفحة الرئيسية: في ويلينغتون، نيوزيلندا، جلس حوالي خمسين رجلاً لتناول الديك الرومي التقليدي مع صلصة التوت البري في القطب الجنوبي اليوم، لكن احتفالات عيد الميلاد كانت تحمل طابعًا شرقيًا أيضًا. تضمنت الرحلة تناول السوكيياكي الذي أعده أعضاء مجموعة يابانية كانت تعبر القارة القطبية الجنوبية، وتوقفت ليوم واحد في قاعدة البحرية الأمريكية القطبية. وفي سان دييغو، كاليفورنيا، تبرع طاقم سفينة الاستخبارات "بويبلو" التي تم الاستيلاء عليها بأول رواتبهم للعاملين في مستشفى بالبوا البحري في سان دييغو. وكان كل منهم قد حصل على عشرين دولارًا، وعندما وصلوا إلى سان دييغ
理解8
パネル 11 に進み、スー
Hey, Columbia. Houston. Mighty fine;
We have 1 minute to Tananariv
わかりました、ジム。2-107ページの「現状維持」という記述を削除することをお勧めします。あなたのプラットフォームは非常に優れ
Да уж, это так. Такое ощущение, что я возвращаюс
أجل، حسناً، لا أستطيع فعل الكثير من ذ
好的。查理，还有一个问题。我想知道你给我的关于抑制利率的说明是否在第29页其他信
Хотим отметить, что даже если по какой-то причине у нас закончится время или что-то в
Ti sento forte e chiaro. Mi è stato chiesto di chiederti di correlare le azioni delle particelle che circondano la tua navicella con le azioni dei tuoi getti di contro
... روجر، هيوستن. فيما يلي تقرير حالة الاحتراق: DELTA-TIG صفر؛ زمن الاحتراق 17؛ زاوية مرور قيم الوسادة، DELTA-VGX زائد 0.3؛ VGY ناقص 0.0؛ VGZ 
另外，我们再次监测了二氧化碳分压（P
Bene. Abbiamo completato il dump e il registratore è tornato a te. Puoi usarlo come preferisci. Potremmo volerlo scaricare di nuovo, e in tal caso andremo avanti e useremo le stesse informazioni, a meno che tu non abbia qualcos'altro che desideri specificamente aggiungere in seguito. Ascoltando la qualità della voce, sembra davvero buona. Stiamo arrivando a un midcourse 4 e al momento stiamo parlando di farlo in tempo, e puoi prevedere una masterizzazione di circa 3 piedi al secondo. Stiamo valutando e vorremmo che tu riflettessi sulla possibilità di eseguire questa masterizzazione utilizzando il vettore integrato e farci semplicemente aggiornare il vettore nello slot, in modo da avere il vettore integrato. Ma sembra che non avrà un grande effetto sui risultati della masterizzazione, e potrebbe rivelarsi interessante. Quindi, se ci pensi un po' e facci sapere se hai suggerimenti o i
Si votre vitesse orbitale dérive, nous vous suggérons de sélectionner
Okay, Jerry. We're through with PROGRAM 23. We're just going to roll here to get the 
نظام التحكم الإلكتروني لا يعمل في وضع الانعراج المنخفض إلى
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। मध्यमार्ग सुधार संख्या 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, पिच और यॉ ट
روجر. لقد أرسلنا إليك نسخة من الرسالة وقبلناها، وسنرسل إليك الآن معلومات ع
हैलो, कैंटन। हैलो, कैंटन। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। आपको साफ-साफ सुनाई दे रहा है, कैसे? ओवर
Gemini 4, CSQ. Könnten Sie bitte Ihre Hauptbatterien überprüfen und uns mitteilen, ob diese funktionieren? Für 
रॉजर, कैंटन। फ्रेंडशिप सेवन दोहरा 
双子座
قد تلاحظون بالنسبة للأشخاص في معهد ماساتشوستس للتكنولوجيا أن سلسلة النجوم التالية سيتم تصويرها بواسطة الملاح الرئ
Let's shoot for an hour if we can, Jack. How's t
Роджер. Пе
Je ne sais pas… J’ai failli craquer. J’ai vraim
저는 B롤과 D롤을 사용하고 있습니다
正
Nave dell'Oceano Indiano, Nave dell'Oceano Indiano,
Ora inizio a vedere l'alba nel periscopio. La prima luce nel periscopio durante questa particolare orbita è dovuta al lato notturno. È ovvio che il periscopio non ha alcuna funzione in retroattività sul lato notturno. La prima luce che vedo è proprio ora a un'altezza di circa 100 cm. L'alba sta arrivando piuttosto rapidamente attraverso il periscopio. Ho gli oggetti illuminati che John ha menzionato, e posso crearne alcuni staccandoli. Ho decisamente la sensazione che siano un campo e che le loro dimensioni varino da piccole a luminose. Il periscopio stesso mi sta accecando. Dovrò appoggiarci la mappa, così potrò vedere fuori dal finestrino. Sono in condizioni di retroattività in qualsiasi momento, quindi non ho altro da fare che guardare fuori da questo finestrino. Supponendo che il circuito della tuta sia soddisfacente. Quella mappa è di grande aiuto per nascondere quel maledetto periscopio. Un campo piuttosto ampio di questi oggetti. È definitivamente confermato che è possibile staccarli dal portello, come ha detto Scotty. E si allontanano, non c'è sicuramente alcun problema nel giudicare che si stiano allontanando dalla capsula, a una velocità diversa dalla tua. Stanno decisamente andando più 
Хорошо. Думаю, было бы лучше, если бы вы достали свой контрольный список на 97-м номе
ジェミニ4号、こちらカントン。ヒューストンに向けて待機してください
ठीक है। जैसा कि मैंने पढ़ा, हम ग्रे टेप लेते हैं और उसे इस तरह मोड़ते हैं कि उस
روجر. نعتقد 
你
Jim, ich kann dir die grobe Vorgehensweise für den Start des Kommandomoduls G&N erläutern. Das ist der aktuelle Vorschlag. Wir werden vielleicht einen besseren entwickeln, aber im Moment sehen wir uns Folgendes an: Zuerst planen wir, die Erde mit dem Visier anzuvisieren, genau wie beim Mittelkurs. Dann richten wir die Land
As we approach the burn, you want to go through the same check that we did for the la
रॉजर। कोलंबिया, आपको परेशान करने के लिए क्षमा करें। दो बातें: पहली, हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप अपनी चेकलिस्ट में फॉक्सट्रॉट 9 7 पर दिए गए निर
Роджер. Ваши системы по-прежнему хорошо работают. У меня есть для вас 10 ретро-обновлений. Дайте знать, когда 
Theta, 11,8; intervallo 68,90; Delta-V totale è 232; Delta-VI è 101,1; punto 
알겠습니다. 말씀하신 내용을 잘 들었습니다. 제가 다 이해했는지는 잘 모르겠습니다. S밴드 OMNI B, OMNI, 트랙은 MANUAL, 빔 와이드, 피치는... 다시 한번 말씀해 주시겠어요?
Она находится примерно на высоте 30 градусов. Только-только начинает появляться в поле зрения. Яркая и неподвижная. Я не могу... я вижу др
Copier. Sorti
Roger. Vorrei avere un'idea di quanto hai buttato. Così so se... tutte 
Roger. Poursuivons avec le Maroon Bugle. Le président Nixon a surpris vos épouses en les appelant de San Francisco juste avant d'embarquer pour venir vous rencontrer. Elles ont toutes été très touchées par votre allocution télévisée. Jan et Pat l'ont suivie depuis le centre de contrôle des missions. Le lancement d'Intelsat depuis Cap Canaveral a été reporté pour la quatrième fois hier soir. Le problème serait dû à un dysfonctionnement du régulateur d'azote du deuxième étage de Delta. Une nouvelle tentative de lancement aura lieu ce soir. Le sous-marin de recherche Ben Franklin, qui étudie le Gulf Stream, a établi un record en dérivant pendant 24 heures entre 3 et 30 mètres au-dessus du fond marin, par 400 mètres de fond au large des côtes de Géorgie. La mission est dirigée par Jacques Picard. Wally Schirra a été élu pour un mandat de cinq ans au conseil d'administration du Detroit Institute of Technology. Il siégera au comité de développement de l'Institut. Air Canada annonce avoir enregistré 2 300 réservations pour des vols vers la Lune ces cinq derniers jours. Il est à noter que plus d'une centaine de ces chansons ont été écrites par des h
罗杰，休斯顿
Возвращаемся к ретроспективному настрою. Возвращаемся к ретроспективному настрою; и вот хор
Roger. Roger, Frank. Quelques précisions sur la suite. L'ob
La température de
Ich glaube, dass wir bei dieser Tracking-Aufgabe mithilfe der Weltkarte und der kleinen Karte der Region Kairo-Alexandria den Flughafen von Kairo ausfindig machen konnten. Ich selbst habe ihn
Джерри, ты можешь делать это
Roger. We are watching your 
看来你已
Oka
Roger. Stiamo ricevendo un sacco di interferenze. Il Mare delle Crisi è di fronte a noi all'orizzonte, e il cratere scuro Picard è visibile al centro. Ora stiamo interrompendo l'alba della Luna o il tramonto d
收到。我们已经成功重新接收到高增益天线信
You have a valid load, and 
您好，Canton Com Tech、Canton C
Bene. Ora a pagina 32, in cima alla pagina, prima riga, cancella "." Terza riga, "MODE CONTROL:, ATT HOLD." A "Minus 6 minutes," cancella le righe 1, 2 e a "Burn Attitude," cancella "." Cancella le righe 2, 3 e 4. Ora a "Burn Attitude," vogliamo che tu faccia un "400 più 5" e poi un "VERB - un 400 più zero". E
はい。コックピット内は、エンジンを降りる時よりも戻る時
في تلك ا
حسنًا، ١٣؛ هيوستن. تصحيحًا لذلك. أنتم جاهزون لشهر سبتمبر في الموعد ا
Bene. Beh, abbiamo avuto una forte bufera di neve qui nel Midwest; non so se si vede da lassù o no. E a Houston, in effetti, sta diventando piuttosto freddo, circa 35 gradi. E vorremmo sapere chi tifate domenica prossima, Baltimora o Cleveland? La difesa di Baltimora è sembrata davvero formidabile ieri. Hanno fatto un'ottima pressione sui passaggi, e a CAP COM sembra che Haney stia cercando d
Роджер, ты прав, Джим. Мы будем на связи на всех этих удаленных объектах. Я просто позвоню тебе и скажу: «На связи», и если тебе станет одиноко и у тебя возникнут какие-либо вопросы, можешь подняться, а у нас
休
Apollo
Roger. Verstanden. EECOMM sagt, wenn da
Looking at the world of sports, let's see here. While you were busy the other day, Joe Namath and football Commissioner Pete Rozelle made the announcement that "Broadway Joe" had agreed to sell his interest in the Bachelors III restaurant and report to the New York Jets. Joe arrived at the Jets' training camp today and had his first workout. Several other Jet players who had held out along with Joe also reported. And Davy Hill, from Jackson, Michigan, won his third major golf in as many starts in the past week. He won the Philadelphia Classic. Hill has won four tournaments so far this year and is the leading money winner this year with a cool $129.000. And in baseball, the west division of the National League remains a tight race. LA and San Francisco are one game behind league leading Atlanta. The Astros have a record of 48 wins and 48 losses, and are now in fifth place, seven games out. A twin bill between the Astros and Cincinnati last night was postponed because of rain. The Chicago Cubs are still in first place in the East Division. They lead the New York Mets by four and one half games. And in the American League, Baltimore is breezing toward the Eastern Division title. They lead 
C'est exact. Juste à ma droite, je vois un grand faisceau de lumières, apparemment tout près de la côte. Je distingue les contours d'une ville et une lumière très vive juste au sud. Et je continue vers le
Yes. I 
알겠습니
지금은 추진기가 없어서 당신
In VOX record. I've just checked t
Sie haben eine Karte, damit wir uns 
あなたがこの S
야, 우리 여기서는 도망치면서
你听见我
事实上，我
现在屏幕中央的陨石坑就是韦伯望远镜。在它动力下降前大约6分钟，我们会从正上方俯视它。这个陨石坑底部相对平坦，在西侧（也就是现在离镜头最近的那面墙）底部可以看到两三个小陨石坑。在屏幕底部附近，我们可以看到一个凹陷的陨石坑，就在外侧。然后，再往屏幕底部左侧看，可以看到一系列的凹陷。正是这
حسنًا، الصفحة التالية، 16. هذا استكمال لنفس موضوع الهالة الشمسية. على الجانب الأيمن من الصفحة، بدءًا من أعلى 107:40 مباشرةً مع عبارة "المناورة إلى وضعية الهالة الشمسية"، و55 أسفل "استبدال الشريحة المظلمة"، كل هذا يند
هل تري
Bon, il y a une minute, alors que j'étais à l'étage, j'ai remarqué ce qu
Okay. I had a change in the background noises
Ich stelle jetzt auf niedrige Vergrößerung um. Korrektur:
好的。太阳半单位矢量
और अभी हमारी स्क्रीन के दाहिने हिस्से में, हम मेसियर अल्फा और ब्रावो को 
Oui, et ça fait peur, parce que ça veut dire qu'on recule, non? Voyons voir, si c'est à l'envers, on recule
ठीक है। क्या तस्वीर कुछ ज़्यादा ही धुंधली है, जैक? क्या आपको लगता है कि एफ-
نحن على أهبة الاستعداد لإجراء فحص جهاز إرسال القياس عن بعد الاحتياطي الخاص بك في الوق
Okay, place you
태도 오
أفهم أن
Und Houston, wir schauen gerade aus dem Fenster auf euch zu. Es sieht so aus, als ob sich gerade eine Wolkenzirkulation östlich von Houston über die Golfküsten- und Florida-Region verlagert hat. Gab es 
Сейчас убираем камеру. Сейчас переходим к процедуре извлечения гироскопа из клетки. Теперь управление по проводам. Гироскопы убираем в 
Okay. Also, Jim, wir würden Folgendes tun: Wir richten die Kardanwinkel grob aus, die du für uns halten wirst. Dann bauen wir die Plattform auf. Wenn du dann PICAPAR benutzt, ist der Stern wahrscheinlich noch nicht nah genug, um ihn im Sextanten zu positionieren. Aber wenn du einen hellen Stern in der Nähe siehst – und mit „in der Nähe“ meine ich etwa 2 bis 3 Grad vom Zentrum des Teleskops entfernt –, sodass du eine ungefähre Vorstellung hast, in welche Richtung du gehen musst, sollte die Identifizierung kein großes Problem darstellen. Sobald du den Stern im Sextanten hast, kannst du ihn wie j
11, Houston. Ora siamo su OMNI Delta. Credo che possiamo leggerti meglio. Hai ricevuto tutti i
罗杰，你是想让我们用高
Pilota coma
Als sich die Boosterstufe von uns trennte, konnte man sehen, wie der Treibstoff aus der Rolldüse spritzte. Während die Boosterstufe taumelte, größtenteils in einer Ebene senkrecht zur Längsachse des Raumschiffs, war der lange, fließende Schweif zu erkennen, der von ihr abging. Ich werde eine kleine Skizze davon in meinen Flugplan einzeichnen. Nach der Trennung des Raumschiffs lagen überall Trüm
Roger. La séparation est de 11 + 14 + 29; Delta-V, 9,0 pieds par seconde; durée, 0 + 15; lacet 0, tangage 0; Noyau 25, 90090; 26 et 
好的。输入端口如下：中太平洋，000152，000；，
우리는 전력을 전송하고 싶습니다. 먼저 여기서 
온도 조절 밸브 설
了解。フライ・バイ・ワイヤで低空飛行を部分的にコントロールしている。後退姿勢になったら制御する。問題ない。鳥は美
好
Voir u
了解。17-1
Okay, Ken. Pericynthian più 2, ritorno veloce / 62871, meno 161, più 129, più 45224,
Okay. Einen Moment bitte, ich gebe Ihnen 
D'accord. Nous poursuivons le suivi, et comme vous le savez, nous allons limiter les largages d'eau et autres opérations pendant les dernières heures, afin de faciliter l
Friendship Seven. On y va trop tôt. Ça b
좋아, 프레드. 잘했어. 6단계: 입력, 모든 공 추가, 28300 추가. 7단계: 움직임을 모니터링. 8단계: CB 11 랑데부 레이더 2, 열기. 잘 듣고 있어
И я устанавливаю защитную шторку, устанавливаю демпфер на шее, поднимаю ручку рециркуляции воздуха в кабине. Поднимаю ручку левого шноркеля, поднимаю ручку вентиляции кабины. Отключаю курок открывания люка. Убеждаюсь, что водонепроницаемое уплотнение опущено и закрыто. Прикрепляю страховочный трос, левый люк открыт. Убираю спасательное снаряжение пилота на правую сторону космического корабля. Весь спасательный круг... на правую сторону космического корабля.
わかりました、ロン。MIDPAC の場合: 000、152、001、194、46 06、267、プラス 1332、マイナス 16917、064、36194、649、14045、36275、195 03 06、0028、154、084、2240、180、400、02 13、00 17、03 51、09 02、45、0189、277、使用可能なものなし、ベクトルを上に持ち上げて、位置合わせ、ベガとデネブ、ロール 078、ピッチ 223、ヨー 340。nonexit を使用してください。マイナス30、地平線チェック
아니요, 그건 그가 녹음한 테이프에서 나온 거예요. 그와 짐이
Roger. Un instant
我们还需要一些项目，请在最终装载前尽可能晚些完成读数。我们还没有关于上次机组人员睡眠时间的任何数据。我想确认所有四个四联机的备用电源是否都已激活。
Wir haben immer denselben 
罗杰。他们故意
Fatto. CONTROLLO ROTAZIONE POT
Okay. L'unica proposta che sembra essere questa, se lasciassimo che Jim facesse la sua valutazione attraverso il telescopio, sarebbe di fare tutto esattamente allo stesso modo
Роджер, 11. Мы следили за вашей активностью там, и, выбрав другую важную программу с помощью клавиши ENTER и всего остального, мы видим, что вы сузили зону нечувствительности и снизили скорост
Высокие двигатели работают хорошо, точное сопровождение
R
Sigma Seve
अरे, एक मिनट रुको, जैक। तुमने पेरीस
Well, good. I guess maybe we probably slo
He was on UHF. We haven't hear
حسنًا. دعوني أبدأ من البداية. قد يكون هناك بعض التداخل، لكن للتأكد من أننا جميعًا على دراية بالموضوع، سنبدأ بمجموعة من إجراءات الجدول الزمني التي ستُعطينا - في النهاية - قائمة التحقق المعتادة. ستكون هناك بعض التغييرات في قائمة التحقق في الكتاب، لكن الجزء الأكبر مما سأقدمه لكم هو ما يتعلق بالجدول الزمني. ويبدأ هذا الجدول قبل 6 ساعات و30 دقيقة، ويفترض أننا نتلقى الطاقة إلى MAIN B في وحدة التحكم. أعتقد أن لديكم بالفعل أرقام لوحات التوصيل ولوحات وحدة التحكم؛ أقصد أنواع لوحات التوصيل التي سنقدم
数日前に水素と酸素について理解した人は、自分が何をしているのか分かっていたに違
Je pourrais certainement récupérer le c
रॉजर। फ्रेंडशिप स
알겠습니다. OAMS 연소 시작까지 5초 카운트다운을 드리겠습
Джо,
, Cape. Did you get 
收到。我也收到同样的信息了。你能再发一遍燃烧情况报告吗？我们复制了
Okay. Ed, just free-float around. Right now we're pointing just about
Veuillez patienter. Ceci
OK. Je suis en mode talkie-walkie, et l
Gemini 
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Подтверждаю. Мы вас хорошо и четко слышим по голосу, и у нас хорошее, четкое из
Ricevuto. Monitora la quantità di glicole nell'accumulatore secondario. Il passaggio 2 prevede l'immissione di glicole secondario nella valvola del radiatore, NORMALE per 30 secondi, poi BYPASS. Se non si verifica alcuna diminuzione nella quantità di glicole nell'accumulatore secondario, 
Хорошо, Джим
Chiunque abbia scoperto gli idrogeni e gli ossigeni un paio di giorni fa doveva sapere cosa st
ねえ、それは、私たちが射出されて驚かされるよ
हाँ। इसका प्रभाव 74 समुद्री मील के दायरे में पड़ा और निष्क्रिय भूकंपीय प्रणाली 
Aucun de nos costumes ne comporte de brassard de tens
H2O2を排出中です。スイッチヒューズをオンにしました。待機しています。リカバリーアームは「アーム」です。メインシュートを待機しています。スイッチは全て正しい位置にあります。手動燃料はほぼ空になりました。メインシュートも出ました。美しいですね。明るい青空です。リーフも解除され、まるでお菓子のパイのようです。自動燃料が排出されています。降下率は現時点で約35フィート/秒です。全く問題はありません。衝突に備えます。自動燃料が排出されています。キャビンの圧力は正常に上昇しています。全てのシステムは非常に良好です。私は涼しく、暑くはありません。メインシュートは良好です。降下率は35フィート/秒です。他に選択する理由はありません。ランディングバッグも出ました
«Аврора Семь» из Индийского командования. Ваше кровяное давление... довольно высокое, и вам следует, если это возможно, сообщить данные о кровяном давлении на борту корабля в Индийс
查理，我们离
네. 체크리스트를 읽어보니 몇 가지 의문점이 있습니다. 제가 이해하기로는 실제 작업 시에는 주 보일러와 보조 보일러 모두 작동 중인 상태여야 하는데, 체크리스트 어디에도 보일러를 켜는 항목이 없는 것 같습니다. 이 부분에 대한 확인을 부탁드리며, 체크리스트에 필요한 모든 스위치 작동 항목을 정확
А, получить. Б, выключи
حسنًا. هذه مجرد بنود تنظيف يا جاك. في الصفحة 2-3، يُذكر كيفية الفصل بين إدارة التغيير/التنسيق وما إلى ذلك، لذا، من الواضح أنه إذا كنا في الخطوة 5 بعد 43 دقيقة، ف
비행 초반 부스터에 대한 브리핑을 이어가겠습니다. 어둠 속으로 들어간 후, 제가 생각하기에 약 1200피트(약 366미터) 거리에서 부스
好的
दूसरे, हम आपके निर्धारित समय 121 घंटे और 12 मिनट पर वापस लौटेंगे। तैयारी के दौरान लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड कैनिस्टर बदलने का काम (नंबर 9) थोड़ा छूट गया था। हम चाहते हैं कि आप इसे अभी पूरा कर लें। सोने के लिए COMM सामान्य चंद्र COMM कॉन्फ़िगरेशन होगा। हम आ
روجر، أفهم. وأنا أيضاً أملك موقفك، وهو مختلف عن موقفك. سأعطيك
はい、右側のフードボックスにあり
Et l'un des avantages, Jack, surtout pour un novice comme moi, c'est la facilité avec laquelle on se déplace ici. Comme tu le sais pour avoir travaillé dans le simulateur du module de commande, l'apesanteur est un atout considérable. À 1 g, on se sent vraiment à l'étroit, et c'est beaucoup plus facile dans cet environnement. Comme tu peux le voir, c'était plutôt propre. J'ai trouvé quelques rondelles qui se décollaient et un petit capuchon en plastique de la caméra de séquence qui s'était détaché et que j'ai retrouvé coincé près du panneau ED. Bon. Juste en dessous de Jim, il se tient sur ce qui ressemble à un conteneur. Et, pour que tout le monde soit bien placé, à l'intérieur de ce conteneur se trouve le moteur de remontée. J'espère que tu peux voir ma main posée dessus, le moteur qui nous permettra de quitter la Lune. Juste à côté du capot du moteur, j'ai la main sur un boîtier blanc, que l'on a déjà vu. Il s'agit du sac à dos de Jim, qui fournira l'oxygène et l'eau nécessaires à son refroidissement sur la surface lunaire. Nous espérons l'utiliser pendant 4 heures, voire 5 heures. Juste derrière, deux petits paquets carrés que je tiens en main, l'un ici et l'autre juste en dessous, sont nos réserves d'oxygène d'urgence, suffisantes pour 40 à 45 minutes. Elles seront placées sur le
Okay, EMS
شربتُ كمية كبيرة من الماء وما زلتُ أشعر با
Okay. On page 6 1 of the entry out checklist down toward the bottom after "MAIN DEPLOY pushbutton," we have three additional steps we'd like you to accomplish. The intent of this is to reduce the oxygen pressure in your manifold and to eliminate the 
好的。8，/：45701，减 040，加 157，加 33195，减 01267，加 04716 179 008 001，NA，加 00187 33552 311 33355 42 09090 252，Dzuba 下 060，左 4.2，加 0773，减 16500 12982 36256；天狼星，参
Sti
Roger. The Hornet is on station just far enough off the target point to keep from getting hit. Recovery 1, or the chopper, is there; they're on station. And Hawa
これはオプション 1 として実行されます。コンピューター内に他のものが存在する唯一の理由は、フラグを設定するため
구름을 보고 있어요. 착륙 지점이네요. 아름다
ونحن نستمع إليك بوضوح تام وسنكون على أهبة الاستعداد لإجراء فحص التردد العالي الخاص بك في
Roger. Merci. Le bon de 4 que vo
Das Tonbandgerät funkt
ठीक है, जिम। हम आपसे प्रणोदक टैंक के तापमान की एक और जाँच करवाना चाहते हैं, जै
Chambe
네, 알겠습니다. 나중에 더 자세히 확인해 봐
Mais atte
Ce n'est pas si mal. Il fait un peu chaud ici. J'ai l'impression qu'il fait plus chaud quand je dors. Je ne sais pas pourquoi. Normalement, il devrait faire froid à ce moment-là, mais il semble se réchauffer. On a mis les deux venti
OK, panneau 7: NUMÉRO 2 P
Apollo 8, Houston. Per quanto riguarda l'aggiornamento televisivo, ti proponiamo di accendere la TV all'orario previsto per il piano di volo e di prolungare semplicemente l'ora
D'accord, Jim. À la page 2-107, nous vous recommandons de supprimer ce passage et de rester concentré sur votre objectif. Votre plateforme est excellente et nous ne penso
Est-c
حسنًا، دعني أعود إلى الإعدادات هنا. سأفعل ذلك الآن. ودخلت بدون أي محركات دفع عالية، على ما أعتقد. هل يمكنك التأكد من ذلك؟ وسأقيس
روجر. قادم إليك. 30، SPS/G&N: 36691؛ ناقص 061، زائد 067 135 23 4149؛، زائد 32020، زائد 06713، ناقص 02773 181 054 013؛، HA غير متوفر، زائد 00230 32833 228، دلتا VC 32625 24 1510 355. الخطوط الثلاثة التالية غير متوفرة. زائد 1103، ناقص - ناقص 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. نجومك هي ذ
Бедный старый LM загрязнен; он весь покрыт частицами мочи; и, судя по тому, как здесь светит свет, они выглядят желтыми. Знаете, эти маленькие – я 
Trasparente nella parte superiore della mia
Le suivi des gyroscopes semble se faire sans problème. Par contre, j'ai 
这里的束缚装置能很好地把我的裤
ठीक है। क्रू-डिफाइंड पैंतरेबाज़ी के अंतर्गत, चमकती हुई 0622 उन कोणों को दर्शाती है जो हमने आपको लोड किए हुए बताए थे। चमकती हुई 5018 वास्तव में कोणों को दर्शाती है,
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Dans environ 7 ou 8 minutes, lorsque vous passere
好的。这是加11，/。这是40减163，加129，减005，99，加00000，加47016，177143000十一月阿尔法，加001974702055146818121283257023，向上263，向左17，加119
We haven't got too many of them on this
Bien. 31816 302 31624 40 2699 396 033, bas 054, gauche 21, plus 0810 contrôle moins 16500 12968 36222; l'alignement reste le même; Sirius et Rige
60 секунд. Отметка 1 м
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den warte
收到。氧燃料电池将于113:30进行吹扫。121小时恢复正常唤醒时间。目前正在进行第9次氢氧化锂
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。我们现在看到的是非洲大陆
नहीं, नहीं, यह वहाँ नहीं है। अब उसमें वह अलमारी नहीं है। आखिरी बार जब मैंने इसे देखा था, यह एमडीसी पर था। मैंने इसे आप लोगो
Roger. We will start out with the world news. praise for America's Apollo 8 astronauts and hopes for international cooperation in space exploration with the worldwide Christmas Eve messages as the tiny spaceship orbited the moon. Even in the Communist world, there was enthusiasm for man's first voyage to the moon. I
Roger. Concernant le redémarrage survenu en orbite lunaire, pour rassurer les informaticiens et les chercheurs du MIT, nous avons une question: est-ce que le fait d'a
Oui, c'est exact, Jack; c'est assez simple. À mi-chemin de la procédure, nous avons une étape sur le panneau 3, intitulée « Amplificateur de puiss
Все режимы работы работают отлично. Темп
ठीक है। मैं फ्लाई-बाय-वायर 
Я п
यह कैल है। वॉली, अब तुम्हारी आवाज़ बहुत
One thing the world might be interested in knowing is what you do after the burn in the way of configuring switches back. We - We heard you go through the checklist. But, I guess right now, basically, you probably have all the switches back in position and you're in the mode to continue on with - Okay. What does the flight plans say? You're go
आपने कहा कि आपको वहां सब कुछ सही स
ОТМЕТКА
Okay. Wir führen die Nachführung noch durch, und wie Sie wissen, werden wir die Wasserabgabe und Ähnliches in den letzten
Au moment où le propulseur s'est éloigné, on pouvait voir le carburant jaillir de la tuyère de rotation. Tandis qu'il tournoyait sur lui-même, principalement dans un plan perpendiculaire à l'axe principal reliant le vaisseau au propulseur, on pouvait apercevoir la longue queue qui s'en échappait. Je vais en faire un petit schéma sur mon plan de vol. Il y avait des débris partout au moment de la séparation du vaisseau. Nous nous sommes retournés et il y en avait partout. En fait, avant d'avoir b
ОТ
Okay. I just got a MASTER ALARM and MAIN BUS A UNDERVOLT. And I'm starting to pow
Vous avez bénéficié d'un repos plus important lors des dernières phases de vol;
मुझे ऐसा ही लगता है, केन। यह बैंड एम-लाइन के समानांतर है, और मुझे लगता है कि इसका संबंध ऑप्टिक्स के डिज़ाइन से है, जहाँ बाहर से ऑप्टिक्स का वह शाफ्ट या आयताकार प्रवेश द्वार है। सूर्य के इस विशेष कोण पर, यह ठीक बीच से गुजरता है। मैंने देखा कि पृथ्वी और सूर्य दोनों ही स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप के साथ ऐसा ही करते हैं। सेक्स्टेंट में भी वही प्रकाश बैंड दिखाई देता है, हालाँकि यह सेक्स्टेंट के पूरे दृश्य क्षेत्र को कवर करता है। फिर भी, आवर्धन से तारे क
Bleibt weiterhin 
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。BIO
Okay.
We
أبولو 8، هيوس
بينما أنظر حولي في المنطقة، يكون التباين، بشكل عام، *** ناتجًا
罗杰。
Das ist richtig. Okay, dann gehen wir zurück zur Tunnelentlüftung und überprüfen den Druckunterschied (ΔP) in cm³, um sicherzustellen, dass der Druck gehalten wird. Anschließend wiederholen wir die Überprüfung der Lukendichtheit und die Prozeduren der Tunnelentlüftung. Als Nächstes möchte ich die Werte -1 +20 vorlesen. Wir gehen nun zu Punkt 1 „Leistung 
Роджер, мы будем его искать. Это действительно хо
Roger, Gemini 4. You look goo
Okay, 11. Es hat sich herausgestellt, dass die Triebwerksleistung bei beiden Brennvorgängen dieser Mission bisher der Leistung bei den Triebwerksabnahmetests entsp
Roger, cette page est NC-7. Je vais la relire. Ensuite, passez à la procéd
Joe, non abbiamo capito tutto. Abbiamo solo "Completa i passaggi 2, 
Okay. Understand; that's number
أعتقد أن الأمور سارت على ما يرام يا هيوستن، مع أنني أظن أنني استهلكت وقودًا أكثر مما كنت أستهلكه في جهاز المحاكاة. في مناورة الدوران، ضغطت على زر "PITCH ACCEL COMMAND" وبدأت في رفع مقدمة الطائرة، ثم عندما عدت إلى زر "MANAUAL ATTITUDE PITCH" ثم زر "RATE COMMAND" لسبب ما، توقف معدل رفع المقدمة، واضطررت للعودة إلى زر "ACCEL COMMAND" والضغط على ما ظننت أنه زر "PROCEED" إضافي. خلال ذلك، ابتعدنا قليلًا عن الهدف أكثر مما توقعت. كنت أتوقع أن نكون على بعد حوالي 66 قدمًا. أظن أنني كنت على بعد حوالي 100 قدم، ولذلك، أتوقع أنني استهلكت وقودًا أكثر قليلًا في طريق العودة. لكن، باستثناء اس
Nous sommes en mode attente pour Jim, et j'ai remarqué que par ma fenêtre je peux maintenant voir Orion très clairement, même si le soleil 
Gemini 4
Forza Buzz, non chiamarli grandi mad
鹰，休斯顿。你看起来不错
那是一千，170英尺，太棒了。140
فرانك، ربما قيل لك هذا من قبل، لكنك بدوتَ رائعًا على التلفاز اليوم. لكن هناك أمرٌ طريفٌ بعض الشيء. في منطقة إل لاغو، خطف سانتا كلوز الأضواء منك. فقد
Ok. Siamo quasi arrivati ​​al punto di beccheggio e... all'angolo centrale del gimbal, ma l'altro angolo d
Buongiorno. Mancano circa 2 minuti al no
Gemini
ठीक है। हम प्रक्रिया को आगे 
D'accord. J'ét
您能给我们提供一些REACQ方面的
DIRECT，2，
어디 보자. 아니, 그건 요, 피치, 그리고
روجر، ١١. تم الاستلام. ننصحك بالذهاب إلى هذا الخيار، 
जिम, कल और पिछली रात भर इंजन में थोड़ी गर्मी थी। खिड़कियाँ बंद करने से थोड़ी ठंडक हुई, और सूट का तापमान लगभग 40 डिग्री फ़ारेनहाइट और केबिन का तापमान 60 
Ok, Fred-o. Ti leggo 5-by. La procedura che ti leggerò è un controllo del Sole per vedere se avre
Okay. Er schaut sich die Batteriestromstärke an, die Sie uns vorhin genannt haben. Er möchte sie um etwa ein halbes bis ein Ampere senken. Bitten Sie Jack, die bisher angeschlossenen Sicherungen und Schalter zu überprüfen und sicherzustellen, dass keine zusätzlichen Verbraucher an Hauptleitung A angeschlossen sind; insbesondere die Flutlichtanlage, die Sicherungen fü
G
An
ठीक है। हम ASCENT ECA CONTROL क
Ok, Jack. Ce ne sono due. Stamattina sono stati posizionati un interruttore e un disgiuntore che vorremmo farti controllare. Correzione, solo l'interruttore. Pannello 5, controlla la tua traversina. BAT B/C CROCIERA PRINC
Sehr klein, ich würde sagen, sie sind etwa 1,5 Millimeter groß oder kleiner. Sie ziehen am Fenster vorbei und ich kann sie vor dem dunklen Himmel erkennen. Gleich zu Sonnenaufgang waren es buchstäblich Tausende. Es sah aus
بينما أنظر حولي في المنطقة، يكون التباين، 
双子座
휴스턴, 
У меня есть несколько снимков ракеты-носителя, может быть, 17 или 18, все вместе. Затем, двигаясь к горизонту, север плавно переходит в юг. Вот луна, как раз заходит. В это время я перематываю пле
حسنًا يا جاك، سأقرأها لك، ثم سأضيف بعض التعليقات وسنتحدث عنها قليلًا. من المفترض أن يحدث هذا ب
Forza Houston. Qui è l'Apollo 8. Accensione completata. La nostra orbita è 160,9
Хьюстон, на нашем нынешнем по
저기
रॉजर। समझ गया। ओम्नी चार्ली। माइक, आपको सूचित किया जाता है कि हमारे पास आपके लिए एक अपडेट है। हमारा अनुमान है कि वह लगभग 4 मील दूर गिरा है। आपके T1 समय अपडेट कर दिए गए हैं और आपके T2 भी, यदि आप क
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, ब
Apollo 8, Apol
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, पृष्ठ 12 खोलें। पृष्ठ के दाहिनी ओर, पृष्ठ के मध्य
Bene. Questo è un pericinzio più 2 per un ritorn
Nous prévoyons maintenant une avance de 5 secondes, à 
حسنًا. أولًا، انتقل إلى الصفحة 12. على الجانب الأيمن من الصفحة، بدءًا من منتصف الصفحة إلى أسفل، احذف كل ما هو موجود أسفل "Cycle 5 frames, Replace dark side or dark slide" حتى تصل إلى أسفل الصفحة حيث يوجد "Acquisition OMNI D"، ويجب أن يبقى هذا الجزء. كذلك، اترك "Remove window
Avez-vous remarqué la différence entre hier et aujourd'hui? Voici l'image la plus grande que nou
Roger. L'étoile de visée est à droite, 34. Et j'ai la tig
حسنًا. لنلقِ نظرة عليه.
Итак, как вы можете видеть, мы
يا جيم، جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بك يعم
Das ist für den Hintergrundpegel wirklich gut, Ken. Viell
Roger. Ich verstehe die Beschreibung. Und zum nächsten Thema: Wie unterschied sich die zum Sammeln der beiden Kernrohre benötigte Kraft im Vergleich? Gab
ما رأيك بالاتصال بهم وسؤا
Amicizia Sette, fai riferimento al tuo ultimo; affermativo, la ca
좋습니다. 10, /: 45597, -040, +157, +35186, -01512, -00520 180 007 000, 노벰버 알파, +00186 35223 318 35018 42 09
你想回到229年
يجب أن يكون صمام الأكسجين الثان
41 minutes. Nous passons au scanner principal sur Horizon Scan et il n'y a pas de différence notable dans le fonctionnement du sc
好的
Roger. Could you give me your cabin dome tempera
هذا خاتم جاء من مكان ما؛ أتساءل من أين (غن
随时准备进行加
E immagino che non vorrai che io tagli automaticamente 50
قلها م
Mann, ich habe k
Роджер. Понятно, что время
Итак, на 11-м положении у нас DECA POWER, DECA GIMBAL, OPEN. На 16-м положении у н
罗杰，布鲁斯…
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 종료까
In caso di
再说一
Нет. Мне всё равно. Ну, если это раздражает — по
好的，没错。在面板 5 上：断路器 BAT CHARGE，
아직도 저기 
Oui, je sais qu'il
حسنًا. اليوم، نود منك تحديد انحراف محور الدوران، قبل عمليات الرصد كما هو موضح في الإجراءات، ومرة ​​أخرى بعدها. هدفنا هنا هو التحقق من احتمال وجود تأثير حراري ما قد يُسبب أخطاءً في قراءة الزاوية في السدس. يجب تضمين الانحراف الذي تحصل عليه مسبقًا، أي المتابعة على NOUN 87 بعد الحصول على قياسين متتاليين متساويين في حدود 0.003 درجة. وبالطبع، حرك محور الدوران بضع درجات بين القياسين. من المفترض أن تكون الأرض أصغر بكثير في مجال رؤيتك اليوم. أنا متأكد من أنك أكثر تأهيلًا منا لإخبارنا بذلك، ولكن لضمان حصولك على قياس زاوية دقيق بين النجم وأفق الأرض، يجب أن يكون خط M في السدس، وهو الخط الذي يمر عبر العلامتين المائلتين ويكون عموديًا على خط R، موازيًا لأفق الأرض عند النقطة تحت النجم. وبعد ذلك، يمكن وضع النجم على الأفق في أي نقطة ضمن مجال رؤية السدس: أعلى، أسفل، أو على خط M. نوصي بوضع العلامات بأسرع ما يمكن بعد مناورة الوضع التلقائي. إذا شعرت أن الفترة الزمنية بين مناورة الوضع التلقائي والاستعداد لوضع العلامة طويلة جدًا، أو أنك لا تفضل وضعية الوضع التلقائي عند الاستعدا
여기는 프렌
D'accord, Fred-o. Pour le Solei
ठीक है, जिम। हम - हम इस बारे में बात कर रहे थे कि कमांड मॉड्यूल से बेहतर स्टार फील्ड विज़न के लिए आप पैड एटीट्यूड से अलग एटीट्यूड अपनाएँ, और हम आपसे यह करवाना चाहते हैं। यदि आप अभी या कुछ समय बाद यह अनुमान लगा सकते हैं कि आप उस समय कौन सा एटीट्यूड रखना चाहेंगे, और अभी उस एटीट्यूड पर जाएँ, तो हम आपके लिए कोर्स एलाइन गिम्बल एंगल की गणना कर सकेंगे। और हम ऐसा तब कर सकते हैं जब आप चुने हुए एटीट्यूड पर जाएँ, उसे बनाए रखें, एक ऐप खोलें, और हमें अपने गिम्बल एंगल बताएँ। हम उन एंगल्स का उपयोग करके कोर्स एलाइन गिम्बल एंगल की गणना कर सकते हैं, इस धारणा के साथ कि जब हम कोर्स एलाइन में वापस आएँगे, तो आप उसी चुने हुए ए
Kilo 0,9 e 6
ठीक है। हम कंप्यूटर को सभी मोड में चेक करना चाहते हैं। इस चेक के तीन चरण होंगे। सबसे पहले सभी IVI विंडो में 10 ft/sec की गति सेट करें। फिर मालफंक्शन रीसेट बटन दबाएं। इसके बाद स्टार्ट कंप बटन दबाएं और कंप्यूटर रनिंग लाइट के जलने का इंतज़ार करें। यह सभी मोड में करना है। अगर आपको कंप्यूटर के चलने का कोई संकेत नहीं मिलता है, तो आप एक और टेस्ट करेंगे। इस दूसरे टेस्ट में, आप सभी मोड में चेक करेंगे। आप कंप्यूटर को 2 सेकंड के लिए बंद करेंगे। कंप्यूटर को दोबारा चालू करने के बा
Während Buzz das macht, werde ich das Lithiumhydroxid austausche
Okay. Jetzt möchten Sie mir T-EPHEM, NOUN 01 ENTER ge
入場時の撮影についてですが、新品のカラー内部フィルムのマガジンを使用する場合は、以下の露出設定をお勧めします。f11、1/250秒、6
Хорошо, Фред. В строке 3 под COMM откройте DISPLAYS, а затем под ним открой
Ok,
Then after getting stabilized, we checked out our whole
这里有个挺有意思的小新闻，听起来挺不错的。密歇根州安娜堡市出现了一个新的青少年帮派，名叫吉尔内特帮（Gilnet Gang）。他们秘密地在安娜堡的街头游荡，有时甚至会绕过法律。他们自称“行善游击队”（Guerillas for Good）。他们做过的一些事包括：在一个晚上，他们把一座被污言秽语涂满的桥重新粉刷了一遍；把一栋被判定为危房的房子——虽然很受附近孩子欢迎，但其实很危险——用木板封了起来；把市中心那些因为争论是商家还是政府负责而空着的花坛重新种满了鲜花；修剪了繁忙路口的一丛被认为遮挡视线的树篱，这让树篱的主人很生气；清理了休伦河沿岸一段的垃圾。帮派成员都是匿名青少年，他们不求任何个人荣誉。他们的目标是打破官僚主义，把他们认为的好事办成。这个组织带有一丝宗教色彩。一位密歇根大学的助理教授说，这有点像一个跨教派的团体，他非正式地为这个团伙提供咨询。他们的名字来源于圣彼得和渔网。而且，由于地处偏远，他们与任何特定的教会都没有关联。他们的老师（同样不愿透露姓名）说，这个团体里贯穿着罗宾汉式的精神。他们的很多活动都游走在法律边缘。当正规机构运转不畅时，他们会直接行善，而不是走繁琐的官僚程序。这个团伙由大约55名高中生组成，男女都有，还有40到50名学生在毕业前就加入了这个团伙。这个团伙的构想源于一次底特律贫民窟之旅。当时，一个教会青年团体注意到了街头帮派的运作方
分
Похоже, я единственный, кто радиоа
必要なのは、地球の近い地平線上にある星 26 を 2 セット、地球の遠い地平線上にある星 16 を 1 セット、そして地球の遠い地平線上にある星 22 を 1 セ
RK
Affermativo. Assetto: rollio 0 [gradi], imbardata 2 [gradi] a destra, beccheggio --33 [gradi]. Le velocità indicano tutte zero. Sono in volo all'ora attuale. L'orologio è ancora impostato per il ritorno, per l'ora 
Trois cratères – trois cratères horizontaux que vous avez actuellement dans votre champ d
OK. Lancez les dés pour la situation 
कै
Okay. Das stimmt. Im letzten Satz des Updates steht, dass man den Kometen bei einem Rollwinkel von 45 Grad und 155 Grad erwarten kann. Jack, den Diagrammen zufolge, die man mir gezeigt hat, befindet sich der Komet etwa 10 Grad von der Sonne entfernt. Aufgrund der Geometrie des Kometen, der die Sonne beschattet, sollte es möglich sein, ihn mit dem Sextanten zu sehen, ohne dass die Sonne ihn zwischen Rollwinkeln von etwa 45 und 75 Grad blendet. Es scheint, dass bei einem Rollwinkel über 75 Grad zwar der Komet noch
Рассмотрели ли мы сейчас всерьез только са
Très bien. Je voudrais que vous me lisiez la pression et la quantité d'oxygène primair
Super. Écoute Ed, on veut modifier le plan de vol et on aimerait changer la période de sommeil pour que tu puisses te reposer. On aimerait que tu dormes au moins 4 heures maintenant, et Chris e
И снова 
准备好迎接那些价
هذا صحيح. G&
मुझे वापस जाकर 41-डेल्टा ∆V 83. 1+41. 06 30 09. 8+58. 15+01 को उठाना होगा। क्या आपको इस बार यह समझ आय
Ecco un piccolo articolo interessante che fa piacere sentire. Sembra che ad Ann Arbor, nel Michigan, abbiano una nuova gang giovanile. Si chiama Gilnet Gang. Si aggira per le strade di Ann Arbor, agendo in segreto e a volte aggirando la legge. Si fanno chiamare Guerillas for Good. Tra le cose che hanno fatto c'è stata quella di dipingere un ponte coperto di oscenità. L'hanno dipinto una notte. Una casa inagibile – popolare tra i bambini del quartiere, ma pericolosa – è stata sbarrata con assi di legno. Le fioriere del centro, rimaste vuote a causa di un dibattito su quale gruppo fosse responsabile, tra aziende o governo, sono state riempite di fiori. Una siepe, ritenuta ostruire la visuale, a un incrocio trafficato, è stata potata e il proprietario si è infuriato. I rifiuti lungo un tratto del fiume Huron sono stati raccolti. I membri della gang sono adolescenti anonimi che non chiedono alcun riconoscimento individuale. Il loro scopo è quello di eliminare la burocrazia, di ottenere risultati – buoni risultati, a loro avviso. L'organizzazione ha una vaga connotazione religiosa. È una sorta di gruppo ecumenico, ha detto un professore associato dell
अब आपकी आवाज साफ सुनाई दे रही है, चलिए पैनल 5 पर चलते हैं। हमें चाहिए फ्यूल सेल पंप AC 1, बंद; AC 2, बंद; और यही है फ्यूल स
好的。我给你提供几个参考时间。你有 2 
Mentre il booster si allontanava, si poteva vedere il carburante schizzare fuori dall'ugello di rollio. Mentre il booster ruotava, per lo più su un piano perpendicolare a una linea che passava per l'asse maggiore della navicella verso il booster, si poteva vedere la lunga coda fluente che ne usciva. Farò un breve disegno di questo sul mio piano di volo. C'erano detriti ovunque al momento della separazione della navicella. Ci siamo girati e c'erano cose dappertutto. In effetti, finché non abbiamo dato un'occhiata più da vicino al booster, non riuscivo proprio a capire cosa fosse. Le carenature si sono staccate proprio al punto di partenza senza problemi. Le carenature dello scanner dell'orizzonte
I was around shooting pictures of all the debris inside here, before we left, and I inadvertently changed the settings on the DC command module Re
了解
La temperatura di scarico dell'abitacolo torna a 
रॉजर। मुझे आश्चर्य है कि क्या आपके पास कोई ऐसा तारा है जो उस दिशा के थोड़ा करीब
ठीक है। कुछ चीज़ें हैं जिन्हें मैं ठीक करना चाहता हूँ। हम आपको बजट उपलब्ध करा देंगे। अभी हमारे पास एक सीमा है; हम आपके लिए कुछ और सटीक आंकड़े जुटाने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं, और वे थोड़ी देर में उपलब्ध हो जाएंगे। फिलहाल आपका उपयोग उड़ान योजना के अनुसार है, इसलिए सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है। हमें आपसे क्रू स्टेटस रिपोर्ट चाहिए। हम दो उड़ान योजनाओं के विचार को अंतिम रूप देना चाहते हैं; और आपकी सुविधानुसार, हम कमांडर और सीएमपी के लिए रीडिंग लेना चाहेंगे और फिर आपसे उन्हें आपस में बदलने के लिए कहेंगे। हम दोनों रीडिंग में विसंगतियों या 
Okay, t
了解。了解。マイク0.7と8
Oh, attendez une minute, voil
Ok. Pro
più 44, / 62970, meno 162, più 129, più 00197, più tutti zeri, più 60701 180 133 001, più 00203, più 60701 704 60451 12 1375 349; terra, giù 037, destra 2.2,
سيجما سبعة. عند إشارت
रॉजर। आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, अगर यह घटना आपकी ड्यूटी के दौरान नहीं हुई, तो मास्टर कॉशन सर्किट ब्रेकर अभी भ
كولومبيا، هذه هيوستن. نطلب هوائيًا عالي الكسب، زاوية الميل، زاوية الانحراف، - زاوية الميل 0، زاوية الانحراف 200. أي، زاوية الميل 0، زاوية الانح
سأعطيك واحدة فقط، وسأترك RKV يمرر الباقي، وسأمنحك فرصة للعودة إلى المسار
حسنًا يا برج الدلو، سنلغي وضع التحكم هذا. نريدك أن تعيد الطائرة إلى وضعها الأصلي، ثم سنفعّل وضع تثبيت الوضع، وبعدها علينا إبعاد الكرة عن خط البداية لتوفير الطاقة. وللحفاظ على تسخين متساوٍ، سنطلب منك كل 15 أو 30 دقيقة تحديد زا
Роджер. Серия трещин или разломов, пересекающих горизонт, спускается примерно в три этапа на юг. Параллельный разлом на севере имеет обрыв в центре. Надеюсь, все вы на Земле понимаете, что мы имеем в виду, когда говорим, что это довольно зловещий горизонт, очень темное и непривлекательное место. Сейчас мы приближаемся к одному из наших будущих мест посадки, выбранному в этом ровном регионе, называемом Морем Спокойствия, — ровном, чтобы облегчить первые попытки посадки и избежать необходимости уворачиваться от гор. Теперь вы можете видеть длинные тени лунного восхода. Мы приближаемся к лунному восходу, и для всех людей на Земле экипаж «Аполлона-8» хочет передать сообщени
- - हर हाल में और -
Votre (zone de récupération d
네, 36.8입니다. 감사합니
好的。电池A 38.3V，电池B 36.9V，电池C 38.5V。看起
Yes. That's what we're thinking about, too. You want me to do a qu
Roger. We understand that. We also are looking at the earth right now, and there is a spectacular long thin band of clouds. Looks like it may be a je
لا بد من وجود بعض ال
分かりました。まず、地球ではあなたたちがニュースを独占しているという事実から逃れることは不可能のようです。ロシアのプラウダ紙でさえ、このミッションを大々的に取り上げ、ニールを「宇宙船の皇帝」と呼んでいます。もしかしたら、彼らは間違ったミッシ
Ich habe das Lüftungsventil n
Roger. Non ho capito bene la domanda. Appena sveglio ho bevuto circa 5
هذا صحيح يا جاك. ما فعلناه هو وضع علامات على قائمة التحقق من إعدادات الإطلاق، وسنراجعها عندما يتس
안녕하세요, 물병자리 여러분. 휴스
Okay. "'Twas the night before Christmas and way out in space, the Apollo 8 crew had just won the moon race; The headsets were hung by the consoles with care, In hopes that Chris Kraft soon would be there; Frank Borman was nestled all snug in his bed, While visions of 's danced in his head; And Jim Lovell, in his couch, and Anders, in the bay, were racking their brains over a computer display, When out of the, there arose such a clatter, Frank sprang from his bed to see what was the matter. Away to the sextant he flew like a flash, To make sure they weren't going to crash. The light on the breast of the moon's jagged crust, Gave a luster of green cheese to the gray lunar dust, When what to his wondering eyes should appear, But a Burma Shave sign saying 'Kilroy was here.' But Frank was no fool; he knew pretty quick, That they had been first; this must be a trick. More rapid than rockets, his curses they came, He turned to his crewmen and called them a name. Now Lovell, now Anders, now don't think I'd fall For an old joke you've written up on the wall. They spoke not a word, but grinning like elves, And laughed at their joke in spite of themselves. Frank sprang to his couch, to the ship gave a
Penso che Jack abbia tirato via il pezzo di carta con tutto quello che c'era sopra. Perché non lo tieni finché Jack non ha fi
我们有张照
حسنًا. ما فهمته يا جاك هو أن الإجراء يفترض أن جميع بطاريات التبريد قيد التشغيل، وأن البطارية رقم 6 موصولة بمصدر الطاقة الرئيسي. الآن ننتقل إلى اللوحة رقم 5، ونأخذ مفتاح الطاقة 2، ثم المفتاح الرئيسي B، ونفتحه.
Nello scomparto A1, il caricatore da 16 millimetri sarà posizionato nella finestra numero 4 invece che nella 5. Distributori di fazzoletti; ne è rimasto solo uno. E nello scomparto U3, la staffa da 16 millimetri è nella finestra 4, e la borsa: aggiungi i CMP, più due LCG. E nello scomparto A8 elimina due LCG, aggiungi un PPK
D'accord. On aimerait… Le
ठीक है, जैक। ऐसा लगता है कि हम जा रहे हैं - यहाँ एक अजीब बात है, स्वर-लहर में बदलाव आ रहा है। मैं अभी जाँच करूँगा, लेकिन पिछली बार जब चंद्रमा घूमा था, तो वह कोण से बहुत ऊपर था और अब मैं पृथ्वी को घूमते हुए देख रहा हूँ जो काफी नीचे होगी। वे आगे-पीछे दोलन करते हैं, लेकिन हर बार वे केंद्र रेखा से थोड़ा और दूर होते जा रहे हैं। यद
我
Kanarienvogel, Zwillinge 4. Befinde ich mich gerade direk
أبولو 8، هيوستن. عند الساعة 84 درجة، كانت القراءة 80 درجة. سنلقي نظرة على الشريط ونرى ما إذا كان بإمكاننا معرفة ما كانت عليه القراءة على الجانب ا
Roger. Stiamo manovrando per posizionarci per la TV. Bill l'ha sistemata nella finestra di ritrovo di sinistra di Frank, e io sono al posto di Bill e guardo fuori dalla finestra di ritrovo di destra, e
好的。我再次强调，在我之前说过顺序并不关键的区域，即使你退出，顺序仍然不关键。现在我继续。好的，面板 4：电信，组 1，AC1，它不会是 AC1，而是会变成“关闭”。面板 5：该面板上所有已定位的断路器现在都会
जैक, यह बहुत आरामदायक है। हमने इसे कई बार चलाया है और वास्तव में, अभी भी इसे चलाया जा रहा है। हमने इसे ह्यूस्टन और केप दोनों जगह चलाया है। आपको बस प्लेटफॉर्म अलाइनमेंट के दौरान थोड़ा सतर्क रहने की ज़रूरत पड़ सकती है, जब आप काम पूरा करने की तैयारी कर रहे होते हैं। फिर कमांड मॉड्यूल में पहुँचने और उसे अलग करने के बाद, आप फिर से आरामदायक समय पर आ जाते हैं।
收到。好的。我们稍后会记录电池电量，以及光学校准姿态：滚
물병자리, 휴스턴입니다. 부정적인 의견입니다. 저희는 지금처럼 유지하고 싶지만, 귀하께서 하시는 작업을 저희가 진행할 시뮬레이터 작업과 연관시켜 보고 싶습니다. 창밖으로 어떤 별들이 보이는지 알려주시면, 그 상관관계를 파악하는 
了解。23時間経過時点で合計は1121、クワッドAは274、クワッドブラボーは286、クワッドチャーリーは274、クワッドデルタは287。クライオは以下の通り：H2タンク1、83%、H2タンク2、86%、O2タンク1、8
Ro
さあ、ジョ
Sì. Credo di sì. Ho pensato che forse fosse uno di quelli che non si potevano mai caricare, e forse lo è an
Versea
好的，休斯顿；13. 回答问题 1，噪声水平的变化主要发生在第一级和
No, it's not that.
S
177 143 000 NA, plus 00197, 47020 551 46818 12 128.3 257 023, up 263, left 17, 
わかりました。冗長コンポーネントのチェックを確認したところ、二次ループラジエーターの整合性をまだ確認していないようです。もし確認していな
わかりました、ありがとうございます。それでは少
Хорошо. Подождите минутку
Frank, what I kee
わかりました。これからドッキング解
حسناً. ا
Okay. You
ठीक है। मैं बस पुष्टि करना चाहता था - जब मैं 
Ci sono. Ho completato i controlli di imbardata con la finestra, ora proverò 
Continuando il mio debriefing sul booster, all'inizio del volo. Dopo essere entrati nell'oscurità, a quella che considero una distanza di 360 metri, ho provato a mantenerlo in posizione, ma l'unico modo per valutare la distanza dal booster in quel momento era la distanza tra le luci lampeggianti. Ogni tanto si accendevano - non occasionalmente, ma continuamente - vedevo una luce, poi due luci, poi una luce, e a volte passava molto tempo prima di vederne due, a indicare che il booster ruotava continuamente. Non avevo davvero la minima idea di quale direzione ste
ठीक है। GET B 9 44 
रॉजर। मेरे पास आपके लिए कुछ CLA और PLA अपडेट भी हैं। क्या आप इन्हें कॉपी करने
나는 맨눈으로 호주와 중국 본토를 볼 수 있지만, 한반
좋아, 닐, 거의 다 왔어
Quale sem
迈克，我们现在在220频道
ओह। जी हाँ। अगर वह उस स्थिति में तारे नहीं देख पा रहा है जिस स्थिति में आप SEP (सेकेंड टेम्
यह सकारात्मक है। जी एंड सी, प
はい、今はあなたの方がよく見えま
और अब ह
로저. 1차전 중간에 그만두셨다고 이해했습니
罗杰。我们有30，SPS/G&N：36691，减去061，加上067 1
Très bien, Joe, je suis prêt à commencer la configuration du commutateur du module de commande. C
أبولو 8، هيوس
La pom
I have selected aux damp and rate command at this. The wi
Circa un inte
, minus 29837, pl
ر
Роджер. Слышу вас отчет четко и ясно, готов к передаче информации о состоянии
Houston CAP COM, Gemini 4
Roger. Nous avons reçu une demande du Cap pour une prise de tension artérielle, car ils n'en ont pas eu lors
つる座の二重星が一列に並んで窓の真
अरे यार, इस धरती का नज़ारा बयान करना सचमुच मुश्किल है। मैं अपनी गोल खिड़की से बाहर देख रहा हूँ, जो धरती से भी बड़ी है। मुझे टर्मिनेटर साफ़ दिखाई दे रहा है। मुझे दक्षिण अमेरिका का ज़्यादातर हिस्सा, मध्य अमेरिका, युकाटन और फ्लोरिडा प्रायद्वीप तक सब कुछ दिख रहा है। पूर्वी तट के पास आसमान में एक बड़ा-सा भंवर सा बन रहा है, और फिर पूरब की ओर बढ़ते हुए, मुझे पश्चिमी अफ्रीका भी दिख रहा है, जिस
Это «Сигма Семь». На ВЧ. Вы меня с
Черно-белый снимок луны. С фильтром метеорологического бюро. Снимок номер 6. А когда луна будет садиться, попробуем еще один снимок с более короткой выдержкой. Стараемся держать камеру аккуратно. Это второй снимок луны в момент зах
Roger. Péricynthe plus 2, minimum / 62871, NA, NA, moins 00468, plus 00254, plus 00181 173 101 027, NA, plus 00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044, bas 044, gauche 45, plus 1100, moins 02500
Хорошо. Мы проверили ваше время, 16 в вашей за
Okay, der zweite befindet sich ebenfalls auf Feld 5. Leistungsschalter POWER-1, Hauptschalter A, offen; Leistungsschalter SENSOR SIGNAL, Hauptschalter B, offen. Okay, lesen Sie sich das bitte noch einmal durch, und ich gebe Ihnen dann die nächsten Schritte
Vous voyez ça
그리고 아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 사령선 모듈에 이산화탄소가 축적될 가능성이 있어 권장 사항을 하나 드리겠습니다. 사령선 모듈의 호스 중 빨간색 리턴 호스에 캡을 씌우고, 호스를 터널을 통해 최대한 위쪽으로 연장하여 공기가 빠져나갈 수 있도록 고정하는 방법을 찾아보시기 바랍니다. 그러면 파란색 호스 쪽에
ह्यू
还没结束呢。嗯，今天最好别出什么岔子。看看能不能按正常流程运
Je ne suis pas sûr que nous devrions filmer ça – ce que nous filmons ou ce po
Difficile de se prononcer sur la visibilité sans la visière relevée. Il fait sombre. L
Roger, Jim. Sur votre ordinateur, nous aimerions effectuer une nouvelle sauvegarde mémoire effaçable, comme l'autre jour. La raison est simple: lorsque vous avez effectué une opérat
لقد فتحت 
فهمت قصدك بو
好的，迈克，事情是这样的——
13，你
В данный момент срабатывает переключатель маневра, и я собираюсь вручн
Très bien, nous allons tous vous examiner ma
Хьюстон, Колумб
نحن الآن على مشارف الليل. قبة البد
いい質問ですね。今のところ、
Roger. Amic
没错。我们现在身处其中一环，试图
13, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, einige Sicherungsautomaten
알겠습니다. 전에 조, 당신이 저한테 400 더하기 3을 하라고 하셨고, 저는 그렇게 했습니
Trad
روجر
حسنًا، لا يمكننا ملاحظة الكث
Roger. Il s'agit de contrôler le niveau de liquide dans l'accumulateur secondaire. L'étape 2 consiste à faire circuler le glycol secondaire vers la vanne du radiateur, en mode NORMAL
Eagle, Houston. Nach OMNI, NIEDRIGER 
And I'm standing by for altimeter off the peg. Cape
さて、ス
حسنًا يا جاك. ارجع إلى إجراء شحن البطارية الذي شرحته لك. ولإيقاف الشحن، ما عليك سوى كتابة "فتح" أو "إيقاف" بجوار مفتاح الدائرة الذي أعطيتك إياه. في اللوحة 250، قاطع الدائرة الذي فتحته بالفعل؛ في اللوحة 275، طاقة العاكس 2 الرئيسية B، مفتوحة؛ اللوحة 5، مرحل البطارية BAT A، مفتوحة؛ وحدة الاستشعار AC BUS 2، مفتوحة، إشارة المستشعر AC2، مفتوحة؛ شاحن البطارية، الرئيسي B، مفتوح؛ طاقة التيار المتردد لشاحن البطارية، مفتوحة؛ شحن البطارية A لشاحن البطارية، مفتوح؛ وحدة التحكم في العاكس 2، مفتوحة؛ وحدة التحكم في العاكس 3، مفتوحة؛ لقد قمت بالفعل بربط ناقل التيار الرئيسي. ثم قم بضبط مفتاح شحن البطارية على AC 1. في اللوحة 3، قمتَ مسبقًا بإيقاف تشغيل محول التيار المتردد 2، ثم إيقاف تشغيل ناقل التيار المتردد 2 الخاص به، وإيقاف تشغيل إعادة ضبط ناقل التيار المتردد 2. كما قمتَ 
휴스턴, 
حس
كل شيء يبدو على ما 
Okay, Odyssey, Houston. Wir sind bereit für die Startaufstellung
سبعة، هذه كاليفورنيا
ああ！目
D'accord. Après PC + 2, il n'y a plus d'exigences de compensation; et,
好的
روجر. لقد استعدنا بنجاح إشارة الهوائي عالي الكسب. ما لم يكن لديك اتصال آخر معنا، أعتقد أ
コピー T1: 122 16 05。T2: 122 21 11、6 マイル北、NOUN 89 はプラス 01243、プラス 11844
حسنًا، هذا هو - روجر. هذا يشمل ال
Non credo che sarà un gra
حسن
Dovranno darti di nuovo l'aria condizionata e tu dovrai tirare il pulsante dell'interruttore. Beh, vediamo... Ho
إليوت... لقد قمت بتحديث كتابك. انتقلنا من مرحلة ما قبل الإطلاق إلى مرحلة اللحاق بالركب ثم عدنا إ
D'accord, nous allons e
罗杰，瓜伊马斯。IVI读数为：后方331，右侧105，上方4。正中心。沿线自动进
Je distingue à peine, sur le coin gauche de la Lune, les contreforts de la 
حسناً، كما قلت سابقاً، لا يمكننا تحديد موقع الأرض بشكل قاطع. أعتقد أننا أمامها وفوقها قليلاً - فوقها 
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। राष्ट्रपति के साथ विदेश मंत्री विलियम रॉजर और फ्रैंक बोरमैन भी होंगे। वे प्रशांत बलों के कमांडर एडमिरल जॉन सिडनी मैक्केन जूनियर के साथ राहत पोत के पुल से जलप्रपात देखेंगे। हॉर्नेट पर कुछ समय बिताने के बाद, राष्ट्रपति एशिया के अपने दौरे और रोमानिया की निर्धारित यात्रा के लिए रवाना होंगे। माना जा रहा है कि लूना 15 कल चंद्रमा के 52 चक्कर लगाने के बाद संकट सागर में गिर गया। सोवियत समाचार एजेंसी TASS ने बताया कि "चंद्रमा के निकट अंतरिक्ष में वैज्ञानिक अनुसंधान किया गया।" जोड्रेल बैंक वेधशाला के सर बर्नार्ड लवेल ने कहा कि लूना 15 लगभग 300 मील प्रति घंटे की गति से चंद्रमा की सतह से टकराया। हाल ही में वियतनाम में अपेक्षाकृत शांति रही है। गश्त पर तैनात सैनिकों को ट्रांजिस्टर रेडियो लिए हुए देखा गया, जिन पर आपकी उड़ान का प्रसारण चल रहा था। वियतनाम में सशस्त्र बलों के रेडियो और टीवी नेटवर्क ने मिशन का पूरा कवरेज किया। स्वेज नहर के किनारे मिस्र और इजरायल के बीच झड़पें अभी भी जारी हैं। वहां मौजूद संयुक्त राष्ट्र के पर्यवेक्षक कार्रवाई को रोकने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। वाशिंगटन में, हाउस वेज़ एंड मीन्स कमेटी ने 27.5 प्रतिशत तेल उपयोग भत्ते को घटाकर 20 प्रतिशत करने के लिए मतदान किया है। ह्यूस्टन क्षेत्र में कई बार
Можем ли мы сейчас немного отложить это... Прямо сейчас мы немного сбились с графика... Мы постараемся наверст
Roger. Mir ist gerade aufgefallen, dass der Mast, an dem die Lampe hä
ए
روجر. أود منك أيض
Non, non. Nous ne faisons aucun commentaire sur votre apparence, Fred. Je ne veux rien dire de dés
알겠습니다. 나
好的，看来我们没问题
I have Jupiter off on the 
디크, 거기 진짜 춥네. 오늘 밤 거기서 잘 수 있을지 모르겠어. 
收到，道奇。鹰号看起来不错。它保持着座舱压力，而且自从上
Gemini 4, Carnarvon C
Roger. We'll check this uplink on our voice. That transmission on the TV was - We'd like to get about 10 minutes 
이로 인해 가시성이 확실히 떨어졌습니다. 현재 MARK,T의 비율은 거
Хо
没错。我们这里有个比较繁琐的步骤；但简而言之，就是用塑料膜把整个装置包起来。在顶部加个加固的东
मैंने अभी-अभी अपने सामने से कुछ ही दूरी पर एक टूटते तारे की लकीर देखी, जो काफी नीचे जा
Roger. Siamo 
分かりました。マイクの野球チームに関するニュー
هذا هو كوكبة الصداقة السابعة. نعم. لديّ كوكبة الجبار في 
На старт! Гот
ह्यूस्टन, मुझे लगा कि सब ठीक-ठाक रहा, हालाँकि मुझे लगता है कि मैंने सिम्युलेटर में इस्तेमाल होने वाली ईंधन की तुलना में ज़्यादा ईंधन खर्च की। टर्नअराउंड पैंतरेबाज़ी के दौरान - मैंने पिच एक्सेलरेशन कमांड का इस्तेमाल किया और ऊपर की ओर पिच करना शुरू किया, और फिर जब मैंने मैनुअल एटीट्यूड पिच को रेट कमांड पर वापस किया, तो किसी कारण से इसकी पिच रेट रुक गई, और मुझे एक्सेलरेशन कमांड पर वापस जाना पड़ा और मुझे लगा कि मैंने एक अतिरिक्
Роджер. Мы бы хотели, чтобы вы уст
Bombola di ossigeno 
Hallo, 13; Houston. Laut und deutlich. 13, Houston liest laut und deutlich.
That is correct. My cont
روجر. ضغط دمنا جيد. يمكنك البدء 
Okay, I'm reading you loud and clear,
Mic
هذا صحيح 
Sotto, cancella "Controllo del veicolo 
Австралия, мы все к этому готовы, и... и дневная, и ночная станции... никаких трудн
ठीक है। समझ गया कि आपने अपशिष्ट निकास बंद कर दिया है, 
Columbia. This is Houston. Grid co
好的，乔。我们最后一次看到它发出正极光是弗雷德大约在5小时后看到它排气的时候。我们觉得后来可能也
حسنًا. في الصف 14، تحت نظام التدفئة A/B-1: افتح الدائرة الرباعية من 1 إلى 4؛ تحت مضخة الجليكول، التغيير الوحيد هو: أغلق التحويل التلقائي؛ تحت الاتصالات، التغيير الوحيد هو: افتح م
- - facciamo una foto
ठीक है। हमारे पास वह है। इस समय, हमें... र
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호 휴스턴입니다. 마이크, TEI 점화 시 과도 현상이 
Roger. L'asta del sestante è 202
Wir haben nur eine Frag
That looks... on one... I'
没错。请参考S/2-6。杰克，我们真正要说的是舱盖完
D'accord. Je vais rat
حسنًا. الخطوات التالية، من الثانية إلى الثامنة، متشابهة، ثم نريد إيقاف تشغيل ناقل الوقود الرئيسي A لخلية الوقود 2؛ وبعد تخطي خطوة، نريد 
BLOCCO, BLOCC
روجر. ما يقال يا جيم هو أنهم يريدون ضمان تركيز ال
روجر. الجوزاء 4
Чем-то напоминает "Т-Бёрд". Х
Ч
एक्वेरियस, 
了解。了解。セカ
D'accord. Bien reçu, Jim. Ensuite, dès que cela vous convient, nous aimerions que vous adoptiez cette attitude, aussi proche que possible, et q
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 주소는 모두 정상이었고, 소각은 제시간에 완료되었으며, 잔차는 0입
Я не знаю, табле
알았어. 알았어, 잭, 둘 다 합격이
रॉजर, फ्रेडो। अब हम - माइनस 30 सेकंड पर भी, हम किसी बर्न को नहीं देख रहे हैं, इसलिए
روجر، فهمت. للعلم فقط، ربما قرأتَها على الأرض. أجريتُ حساب ارتفاع نقطة الحضيض باستخدام متجه حالة النجم الذي استخدمناه في الملاحة، وحصلنا على ارتفاع 84.7 ميلًا بحريًا. ثم استخدمنا متجه حالتك الذي حدّثته لنا في المرة السابقة، فحصلنا على 64.2 ميلًا بحريًا. بعد ذلك، استخدمتُ متجه ح
Аполлон-11, Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон. Вы чи
Roger, 11. Das war ein guter Rückruf. Das waren die Blockdaten für die nächsten 12 Stunden. Wir möchten Ihnen das hier im Rahmen eines Flugplan-Updates nur kurz in Erinnerung rufen. Sie können die Punkte dann erledigen, wann es Ihnen passt, und anschließend, wenn Sie möchten, früher schlafen gehen. Wir haben sonst nichts geplant, möchten Sie aber noch einmal an den Filterwechsel und die Spülung der Sauerstoffzelle erinnern. Außerdem bitten wir Sie, ein / DELTA-P durchzuführen und die Checkliste vor d
了解。いい話だ。
حسنًا. سنتوقف الآن ونُجري مناورة للوصول إلى وضعية معايرة البصريات. في هذا الصدد، ما كنت أحاول إخباركم به بالأمس كان يدور حول هذا الأمر. خط M ليس موازيًا للأفق عند زوايا الدوران والانحراف والميل 
下一页，大约在[此处应填写具体位置]，您可以恢复正常的飞行计划。我们想补充一点：在[此处应填写具体位置]，添加一个废水排放点。虽然当时实际上并
كولومبيا، هيوستن. لقد تم تحميل الشحنة. يمكنك الع
쌍둥이자리 4호, RKV 외과의입니다
Капсула работает очень хорошо. 250 (инвертор) — 132 (градуса), 150 (инвертор) —... 5. В режиме ожидания (инвертор) — 120... двигатели... правый, более 100 (градусов) левый. Тангаж вниз (двигатель) — 105 (градусов). Тангаж вверх 
एक मिनट 
Tr
D'accord, Vance. Tu dis qu'on devrait commencer la procédure de préparation (PREP) du manuel de contingence vers [heure manquante]. J'en parle avec Jim dans une minute et on te recontacte. En position de manœuvre, on devrait voir le Soleil juste au-dessus de [distance manquante], et je suppose que c'est le cran numéro 2. Jim et moi en avons déjà parlé, et en observant le terminateur terrestre, on a estimé que le Soleil se situait à un angle d'environ 70 à 65 degrés, donc il sera bien au-dessus. On a une règle de manœuvre qui stipule que si la vitesse angulaire dépasse 10 degrés par seconde, il faut l'arrêter. Et, après l'ajustement, tu veux que je laisse le moteur 47
제 생각엔 이 제품에 시선 고정 기능이 있으면 좋
Questa è Friendship Seven. Ora in modalità fly-by-wire per manten
かつては、LOI 2 では制御不能であり、どのようなバーンや態度をとっ
Gli addetti allo stivaggio hanno provato l'idea di inserire una telecamera in bianco e nero nel B-6 e dicono che non rie
इसमें कोई बदलाव नहीं ह
휴스턴, 11. 575
क्या आपको लगता है कि 240 कंट्रोलर ग्लाइकॉल इवेपोरेटर
네. 색깔을 보면, 바다는 
C'est le contrôle 
少し前に雲層水平線だと勘違いしていたようです。地上層水
По многочисленным кратерам видно, что эта планета на протяжении тысячелетий подвергалась бомбардировке множеством мелких астероидов и метеороидов, которые усеивают ее поверхность на каждом квадратном д
Roger. Nous vous rappellerons lorsque vos taux auront suffisamment diminué. Pour le
Je ne sais pa
Okay, Houston. I finished up the maneuvers, the 
了解。エリア17-1のRNマイナスRPのアップデートがあります。コピーしていただけると
Sie befinden sich im Gep
I can't see any relationship
Roger
D'
Okay. Nur ein bisschen, Mik
スーツ回路リリーフバルブを「AUTO」に戻す必要があります。「C
13, Хьюстон. Попытки подать питание на топливные клапаны A и C бесполезны, поэтому мы просим вас отключить режим AUTO на Чарли. У нас есть процедура подачи пит
鹰，休斯顿。如
... hier ist Ihre Bewährungsp
في حوالي الساعة 16:03، عندما عبرنا في هذه الطلعة الأخيرة، عبر خليج كاليفورنيا، الجانب المكسيكي، كنا في وضعية مثالية للطائرة ذ
예. 나하 RESCUE 1,
खिड़की से बाहर देखकर मैं ऊंचाई का बिल्कुल भी अंदाजा नहीं लग
제미니 4호, 카나본 CAP C
Sarà interessante oggi, Jack. La Terra è molto più grande; la falce è molto più pronunciata di 
Go ahead, Hou
أبولو 8، هيوستن. نحن نفرغ الآن - يبدو أننا سن
Мы гори
هل فهم
了解しました。PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50、マイナス00021、182 287 000、プラス56919。中止、10分未満、105 12 30.00。中止、10分以上、103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00。プラス12なし: 102 44 27.00。プラス01223、マイナス全球、プラス01889 01520、プラス00110 02250、燃焼時間046 000 190、プラス01187、プラス全球、プラス01911。名詞11 103 31 07.00。 NOUN 37 105 12 
11. यहां टेल
Активация 11, пропустите шаг 1, выполните остально
Okay. Für einen einzel
Хорошо, Джек. Вот, собственно, и все заметки по хронологии, которые я для тебя подготовил. Не хочу тебя расстраивать, но мне также нужно внести пару исправлений в контрольный список. Это не исправления, а просто части контрольного списка
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. ٣٠ ثانية للوصول إلى خط الرؤية. المركبتان الفضائيتان ت
Roger. Was das Wasserproblem angeh
What
232를 굴리세요
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。今、パキスタン周辺の雲を六分儀で見ていますが、発達後期にある一つのセルのように見えます。もっと小さくて孤立した
نعم، هذا صحيح يا جاك؛ إنها بسيطة للغاية. في منتصف الإجراء تقري
Роджер. Из новостной ленты отдела по связям с общественностью: «Аполлон-11» по-прежнему доминирует в новостях по всему миру. Только четыре страны — коммунистический Китай, Северная Корея, Северный Вьетнам и Албания — еще не сообщили своим гражданам о вашем полете и высадке на Луну. Один журналист сказал, что у него закончились слова, чтобы описать ваш успех. Сегодня вечером президент Никсон планирует посмотреть бейсбольный матч всех звезд в Вашингтоне. После игры он отправится в район поиска и спасения в Тихом океане. В среду вечером он вылетит с острова Джонстон на вертолете на военно-морской корабль связи «Арлингтон». Затем в четверг утром он снова сядет в вертолет и полетит на «Хорнет» как раз вовремя, чтобы стать свидетелем вашего приводнения. Президента будут сопровождать государственный секретарь Уильям Роджерс и Фрэнк Борман. Они будут наблюдать за приводнением с мостика спасательного корабля вместе с адмиралом Джоном Сидни Маккейном-младшим, командующим Тихоокеанскими силами. После пребывания на борту «Хорнета» президент отправится в турне по Азии и запланированный визит в Румынию. Предполагается, что вчера «Луна-15» упала в Море Кризисов после 52 витков вокруг Луны. Советское информационное агентство ТАСС сообщило о проведении «научных» «исследований в окололунное пространство». Сэр Бернард Ловелл из обсерватории Джодрелл-Бэнк заявил, что «Луна-15» врезалась в поверхность Луны со скоростью около 300 миль в час. В последнее время во Вьетнаме относительно спокойно. Было замечено, что американские солдаты, патрулировавшие территорию, несли транзисторные радиоприемники, настроенные на ваш рейс. Радио- и телесеть Вооруженных сил Вьетнама обеспечила полное освещение миссии. Столкновения между египтянами и израильтянами вдоль Суэцкого канала продолжаются. Наблюдатели ООН пытаются остановить их. В Вашингтоне Комитет по бюджету и налогообложению Палаты представителей проголосовал за сокращение квоты на истощение запасов нефти с 27,5% до 20%. В районе Хьюстона несколько раз шли дожди. Сегодня облачно, ожидаются новые ливни. Что касается спорта, как мы уже упоминали, сегодня вечером состоится Матч всех звёзд. Вче
جيميني 4، ه
لديّ بعض المعلومات الأخرى. لن نتمكن من رصد مسارك بدقة قبل ساعتين تقريبًا. مع ذلك، بدا لنا أن الاحتراق كان جيدًا جدًا، ونحن ندرسه بدقة، وسنوافيك بالنتائج خلال ساعتين تقريبًا. نتوقع أيضًا أن يصل خزان الهيليوم-3 إلى حد انفجاره. نتوقع حدوث ذلك في أقرب وقت بعد 107 ساعات، أي بعد حوالي
Хорошо. PAD: 102 33 04.
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप बता सकते हैं कि अपशिष्ट भंडारण वेंट वाल्व बंद करने से पहल
不。我能感觉到它在翻滚；我猜平坦的一面不
Siamo nella posizione giusta per un guadagno ele
This is Friendship Seven. Having no trou
Ok,
Canari, c'est moi. Comment lis-t
はい。ジャックは手順通りに作業を進め、できるだけ多くの飲み物を注ぎ、1袋あたり約8オンス入りの袋を10袋作りま
로저. DELTA-VZ는 플러스 0
Magnifica desolazion
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نرجو منكم إبقاء التلفاز مفتوحاً لمدة عشر دقائق تقريباً، لنتمكن من الحصول على صورة واضحة للكاميرا. يمكنكم فعل ما تشاؤون على التلفاز: تصوير داخلي، خارجي، تقريب وتبعيد، أي
We all feel fine; we are going to fix it now so that we a
了
... garçon. Tu sais, la nour
साफ-साफ सुनो। मैं एसेन्ट बैटरी की जांच करने जा रहा हूँ। क्या आप मेरे बायोमेड की भी थोड़ी देर के लिए जांच कर
D'accord, Jim. Nous aimerions que vous vérifiiez à nouveau la température des réservoirs de propergol, comme hier. La procédure est la suivante: sur le panneau 16, coupez le disjoncteur PROPERGOL, AFFICHAGE/MOTEUR, COMMANDE/LOGIQUE. Ensuite, consult
Okay. magnitude 1600, abort 2450. Stand by just one. I have it; co
Gemini VI, Gemin
This is R
10分钟后
罗杰。电池电压：主电池 24V，一号电池 25V，
Aquariu
और यदि आप हमें अनुमति देते हैं औ
Aurora Seven, you are fading rapidly. You are fading. MCC [Mercury Control Center] is worried about yo
알았어, 잭. 그때는 62도였
We're scrubbing everything. I'll stay up and try and keep the spacecraft vertical and take some au
Роджер. А у в
मुझे आपका पिछला संदेश पसंद आया। उससे 
네, 알겠습니다. 이 밴드의 방향에 대해 좀 더 자세히 설명해 주시겠어요? 어젯밤에도 말씀하셨듯이, 가로
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Прежде чем открыть клап
Verstanden. Ich höre di
Джемини 4, Хьюсто
Хорошо. Мы получили ваше подтверждение о
了解しました。E-9ページのパイロ回路チェックの一番下のステップ39に、「パネル8、全ての回路ブレーカーが閉」というステップがあります。そし
Хорошо. Отлично. Похоже, это все 
Ok. Suggeriamo che l'LMP riposi mentre il CMP e il CDR sono svegli. L'LMP dovrebbe andar
Said it took 
吉姆
Завершающая фаза: время 1 + 29 + 17; время работы двигателя: 5 + 16 + 54; ΔV: 33,0; длительность: 41 секунда; Блок 25, 
Mike, tu seras peut-être intéressé de savoir que nous avons 
Bien reçu. Nous avons vérifié le vaisseau spatial et le système de guidage du lanceur. Tout semble en bon état. Nous estimons à plus de 99 % la probabilité d'une coupure du guidage du lanceur; la situation semble donc très stable. Pour i
هل قمتُ بالنسخ، أم فعلتَ
지금 45분이 지났습니다. 슈트 조절 손잡이를 아주 조금만, 4분의 
ロジャー、シドニーの明かりを見たって伝えてくれないか。点灯したかどうかは分からないけど、もし点灯していたら電気代がかなり上がっただろうね。前回の周回軌道で見たよ。シドニーの街の真上を通過したんだけど、すごく大きくてはっ
つまり、我々のエラーは無効に
Roger. Lo farò, Jack. E sto guardando ora a destra... No, il dente di arresto numero 
हेलो कोलंबिया, मैं ईगल हूं, सिंपलेक्स बी से। आप कैसे पढ
11 Uhr, Houston. Wir sind jetzt auf OMNI Delta. Ich g
Real fine, Jim. Can you see the kids out in the yar
R
روجر السادس
Apollo 13, Houston. Perderemo i dati da Carnarvon tra circa 1 minuto. Probabilmente avremo la comunic
RKV，我们需要更新之前未正确加载的
로
Roger. Wir benötig
Houston, Apollo 11. Bi
Roger. Ce voyage sur la Lune vous a peut-être paru simple, voire facile. Je tiens à vous assurer que ce n'était pas le cas. La fusée Saturn V qui nous a placés en orbite est une machine incroyablement complexe, dont chaque composant a fonctionné à la perfection. Cet ordinateur au-dessus de ma tête possède un vocabulaire de 38 000 mots, chacun ayant été soigneusement choisi pour son importance capitale pour nous, l'équipage. Cet interrupteur que je tiens en main a plus de 300 homologues rien que dans le module de commande. À cela s'ajoutent des myriades de disjoncteurs, de leviers, de tringles et autres commandes. Le moteur, notre imposant réacteur situé à l'arrière du module de service, a dû fonctionner sans le moindre problème, sans quoi nous serions restés bloqués en orbite lunaire. Les parachutes au-dessus de ma tête doivent fonctionner parfaitement demain, sinon nous nous écraserons dans l'océan. Nous avons toujours eu la certitude que tout cet équipement fonctionnerait, et fonctionnerait correctement, et nous restons convaincus qu'il en sera ainsi pour le reste du vol. Tout cela n'est possible que grâce aux efforts acharnés et au dévouement de nombreuses personnes. Tout d'abord, les ouvriers américains qui ont assemblé ces machines en usine. Ensuite, le travail minutieux accompli par les différentes équipes d'essais lors de l'assemblage et des tests ultérieurs. Enfin, le personnel du Centre des vols spatiaux habités, qu'il s'agisse de la direction, de la planif
네, 불규칙적으로 움직이고 있어요. 제가 예측할 수 있는 진동 같은 건 전혀 없어요. 풍선으로 연결된 줄이 어떤 때는 팽팽하고 어떤 때는 느슨해요. 너무 느슨해서 고리가 생기
오로라 세븐, 여기는 카나리 캡콤입니다. 귀하로부터 아무런 송신이 없었습니다. 카나리 아일랜드에서
Okay. Wir bräucht
ジム、カメラを設置
Ricevuto. 01 0688 259, Persei Zeta, giù 048, sinistra 05. Il resto non si applica. Sirio, Rigel, 129 155 010; ullage negativo. Finestr
Okay, Fred. Only - Only a minor point that we just picked up. At the very top, minus 6 hours, the title is "power
ستشاهد الشعر 
なるほど、それでは、私たちの座り方からすると、地球がすぐそこまで来ている様子が写真に撮れると思います。どう思わ
मैंने हाई-फायर पर किसी को भी, किसी को भी, यह बताने की कोशिश की कि हम वापस संपर्क में आ गए हैं, लेकिन मुझे कोई जवाब नहीं 
Повторите ещё раз. Вам нужна была темпе
罗杰。我明白你们
आपकी आवाज एकदम स्पष्ट 
아폴로 11호. 30초. 9
Okay. Ha
Houston, Apollo 8. Abbiamo trovato una differenza ina
Роджер. Сообщается, что при наземных испытаниях космических аппаратов GT-2 и GT-3 была обнаружена та же проблема, и, по всей видимости, она была вызвана слишком низкой температурой работы ком
罗杰。通知您，位于西德克萨斯州的麦克唐纳天文台的激光将于大约181小时30分
那相当于打开
ランドマーク追跡の結果も確認しました。マークはすべて非常に良好だったようです。また、各地点の高度に関するデータが1
你想自己手动导出，还是想让我们代为导出？完毕
حسنًا. قد يكون التسجيل موجودًا وقد لا يكون. استمر الأمر لمدة 44 دقيقة تقريبًا بعد بدء السير في الفضاء. كنت أنظر إلى مؤقت الأحداث الذي شغّلته عندما خرج إد من المركبة الفضائية. عند الدقيقة 44، لم نك
Gemini 
这是友谊七。我相信，我现在在白天的状态，也就是心
База Спокойствия, это Хьюстон. Можете ли вы рассказать, на каком этапе выполнения наземного контрольного списка вы сейч
罗杰，友
Abbiamo appena 
Я вижу показания около 12,5. Похоже, у нас проблема с датчиком... Только что сработала главная сигнализация, но индикатор предупреждения не загорелся;
Unter BELEUCHTUNG; ÜBERFLUSS, geöffnet; STRECKE, geöffnet. Unter ED LOGIK - Korrektur, unter E
Très bien, X moins 00011, Y plus
Genau. Sie geben die Lagewerte ein, die Sie von einem der Pads erhalten. Dies dient der Bestimmung der groben Anstellwinkel, wenn sich das Fluggerät in Mondbeobachtungsposition befindet. Sobald alle Werte korrekt eingestellt sind, teile ich Ihnen mit, dass die Lage stimmt; dann geht es m
Незначительно. Первые 5 сантиметров я мог забить без особых проблем, а потом, когда я забивал его изо всех сил, второй раз пришлось забивать молотком двумя руками, и я оставлял довольно заметные в
ठीक है। हीलियम का दबाव लगभग 37 है, मैनिफोल्ड का दबाव 182 है, और मात्रा 80 दिखा रही है। B का तापमान लगभग 112 है, हीलियम का दबाव लगभग 36.5 है, ईंधन का दबाव 180 है, और मात्रा लगभग
D'accord, vous parlez du livre
И, Нил, разве я не говорил
अपोलो 8, 
Понял. Всё слышно, Нил. И у нас есть планшет для ввода данных, 
로저, 마이크. 정말 감사합니다. 선미 격벽에 물이 더 
هذا صحيح. أرقام الرحلات التي أكملتها
روج
興味深いことに、私の姿勢は、ピッチアッププラス30度、ロール右130度、ヨー
Ich glaube, Jack hat den Zettel mit dem ganzen Text darauf mitgenommen. Könntest du
MAIN A, BAT C, Charlie
ど
Хорошо, Фред. Ты почти догнал нас. Мы всерьез рассматриваем возможность перекачки воды из бака для отходов командного модуля в резервуар, используя этот шланг, а затем слива ее из резервуара в бак подъема, и мы считаем, что это осуществимо; мы проверяе
确认一下。接下来的内容，也就是核实转账清单等等
E ora ti ho consigliato di cambiare l'orologio retrò. Sul tuo modello retrò, utilizzerai propulsori ad alta co
Roger. Conformément à la page 47, étape 1, le guidage était en mode PGNS et le mode de contrôle en PGNS AUTO. Les disjoncteurs des propulseurs n'étaient pas encore activés. Lorsque nous avons commencé la procédure DAP et poursuivi avec le numéro 46 (nous sommes maintenant sur le numéro 47), le voyant RCS TCA s'est allumé, ainsi que quatre des huit autres voyants rouges. Cela s'explique probablement par le fait que nous sommes en mode PGNS AUTO et que les propulseurs ne peuvent p
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP COM. Вам провели
分かりました。アドレスはすべて正常で、バーンも予
Oui, une seconde. Une seconde seulement! Votre MASTER est activé; votre INTERCOM est activé; votre VHF est activée; votre PAD COMM est désactivé; votre bande S est activée; et vous êtes en mode INTERCOM/APPUYER POUR PARLER, donc tout est prêt, sauf peut-être l
Amicizi
제 생각엔 큰 문제는 아닌 것 같아요. 자동 모드로 전환할 때 잠깐 튕기는 것뿐이죠. 진입에는 큰 문제가 없을 거라고 생각합니다. 저도 마찬
चलिए, जब तक हम यहां मौजूद हैं, अपोलो 8, हमने जो सर्विस मॉड्यूल की संख्या सूचीबद्ध की थी - हम उसे अपडेट करने की कोशिश करेंगे, अगर आप अपनी संख्या बताना चाहें तो। 
यह सही है। ठीक है, तो हम टनल वेंट पर वापस जाकर /CM DELTA-P की जाँच करेंगे और सुनिश्चित करेंगे कि यह दबाव बनाए रख रहा है। फिर हम वापस आकर हैच की अखंडता की जाँच और टनल वेंट की सभी प्रक्रियाओं को आपके साथ दोहराएँगे। अगली चीज़ जो मैं पढ़ना चाहता हूँ वह है -1 +20। हम नंबर 1 पर जाएँगे, पावर को वार्म अप करने 
Roger. Thank you, and it is centered very well. We get a very slight improvement with this, but in general, it is very good considering the distance. How about the moon, Frank?
Roger. Ormai hai circa tre anni, Buzz. Siamo soddisfatti di questa configurazione COMM. Restiamo dove siamo. Pass
부
Хорошо. Мы с этим согласны, и у нас опоздавший в третьем 
这里是友谊七号。我状态极佳。目前我已通过电传操纵系统控制飞船。控制燃料80-100%；氧气69-100%；电流22
Okay NSR 03 47 34; 61.6; 01 più 22; imbardata zero, beccheggio 23 gradi in basso; 25, 0
Джим, мы будем брат
Я сейчас ра
Да. Мы на некоторое время потеряли связь, Джим. Что ж, доброго дн
Et pendant que vous faites cela, mettons les commutateurs ATTITUDE CONTRO
さ
Is this all ready to go; I'm going to put it back over here. It's over here under your stuff. 
याद रखिए, यात्रा
ऑक्सीजन प्रेशर गेज कई मामलों में असं
こんにち
रॉजर। क्या आपको अभी भी बूस्टर दि
روجر، وايت يشرب كثيراً. أنا على وشك البدء ب
11, Houston. Nous passons le relais à Goldstone. Terminé. Correction: de Goldstone à Ho
Chissà cosa era quella cinghia laggiù? Perché sento che 
Gemini 4, êtes-vous prêt à copier la mise à jour CLA et PLA? Ter
タッチ
Esatto. Okay. Prossima: la prossima fotocamera - Stand by 1. Ho del rumore qui. Okay. La prossima - La prossima fotocamera per la sarà la 16 millimetri, e queste foto sono considerate di priorità 3. Okay. Uno, prendi la 16 millimetri e l'alimentatore da A-8. Prendi l'obiettivo da 10 millimetri e rimuovilo - rimuovi l'obiettivo da 10 millimetri e prendi l'obiettivo da 18 millimetri da B-3 e collegalo alla fotocamera. E collega il cavo di alimentazione al trasferimento, imposta il frame rate a 12 fotogrammi al sec
Ok. Ho appena ricevuto un
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。タナナリヴまで1分。カーナボン着 02:25
نعم، ست
Roger, Frank. We're picking som
Frank, when Bill wakes up, give me a hol
네. 알겠습니다. 좋습니다. 별 40에 몇 점을 기록하셨
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Ты скопируе
Ricevuto. Houston, Apollo 8. In attesa del via lib
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम यह भी चाहेंगे कि आप पुनः संपर्क स्थापित करने के प्रयास में एंटीना द्वारा अपनाए 
È stato davvero 
ハイゲインを外した方が
... so you can see, the same data that 
Роджер, «Дружба номер семь». Слышу 
フレッド、了解。LMPの赤いホースだけがキャニス
Oh,
Ceci est Friendship Seven. Carbur
收到。等您的升温速率降到足够低的水平后，我们会给您打电话。目前我们无法预测您上次尝试启动时应该看到的升温速率
알겠습니다. 짐, 확인했습
I believe so, Ken. This band is parallel to the M-line, and I think it has something to do with the design of the optics where we have that shaft or the rectangular entrance of the optics from the outside. At this particular sun angle, it cuts right across. Now I noticed that both the earth and the sun do this to the scanning telescope. In the sextant, the same light band is there, although it covers the entire sextant's field of view. However, the magnification brings out the stars quite well, and it is possible to mark on it. But the identification of the stars with the scanning telescope makes it very difficult. Now the attitude that I found the optics are best at are the attitudes which give the constellations Canis Major and Orion in the scanning telescope. At this, this particular attitude of the spacecraft, the band is gone; we're at a position whereby the sun is behind us, and I can see quite a few stars. Now yesterday I could also, after getting dark-adapted, see quite a few stars around the constellation Cassiopeia which at firs
जेमिनी VI, कार्नार्वोन। लगता है आपके टेप रिकॉर्डर में भी वही समस्या है जो VII में थी। अगर आप उस तक पहुँच सकते हैं, तो
Bene. Esatto, e l'ultima frase dell'aggiornamento è che ci si può aspettare che la cometa ruoti a 45 gradi e a 155 gradi. Ora, il punto, Jack, secondo i grafici che mi hanno mostrato, è che la cometa se
And, 13, you might also check for those pages in your launch checklist. They're emerge
حسنًا يا جاك، دعني أشرح لك الآن إعدادات المحركات النفاثة. المحركات Able 1 وCharlie 1 وAble 2 متوقفة. أما Charlie 2 وMAIN A، فجميع المحركات النفاثة التي أذكرها والمُشغّلة تعمل على MAIN A. المحرك Baker 1 متوقف. المحرك Dog 1 مُشغّل، المحرك Baker 2 متوقف، المحرك Dog 2 مُشغّل. المحركات Able 3 وCharlie 3 وAble 4 وCharlie 4 مُشغّلة. المحرك Baker 3 متوقف، المحرك Dog 3 مُشغّل، المحرك Baker 4 متو
沃利，当阳光照射到你的适配器上时，我们就把
我看到一些东西正在脱落，但看得不太清楚。现在到了0.05g，绿色区域。此时我完全放手。我处于速率控制模式，辅助阻尼也已开启。我已经启动了滚转速率控制。俯仰速率也略有变化，效果不错。不知何故，我终于能看到窗外的景色了。又一个长长的螺旋状装置消失了。在0.05g之后，我
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы подождать несколько минут? Чарли и Флайт ушли на метеорологический брифинг. Они скоро верн
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। मुझ
L'appareil photo est rangé. Le photomètre est suffisamment léger p
У
Gus, was das angeht – was auf dem Diktiergerät ist – sie sagen, wir hätten es ständig 
아니요, 저희는 발음할 수 없어요. 하지만 아마 좋아하실 거예
네, 8. 저희는 여기서 간단한 현장 테스트를 진행하여 테이프를 전송하고 음성 부분을 제때 휴스턴으로 가져올 수 있는지 확인하려고 합니다. 테이프를 전송한 후, 현장에서 전송 절차를 테스트하여 음성을 들어보겠습니다. 마지막 전송 이후에 덮어쓰기 녹음을 하지 않으셨다면, 테이프에 이미 내용이 녹음되어 있을 것으로 예상합니다. 확실히 하기 위해 간단히 몇 마디 말씀해 주시거나, 짧은 카운트다운을 해 주시거나, 그 외에 녹음하고 싶은 내용이 있으면 말씀해 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 마드리드를 떠나기 전 5분 안에 이 테스트를 진행할 예정입니다. 마드리드가 저희가 테스트할 장소이므로, 바로 시작하겠습니다. 전송하기 전에 알려드리겠습
はい、私のカードにも書
There's a whole lot coming by, right by my sid
Sie interessieren sich wahrscheinlich für die Kommentare Ih
ठीक है। उद्देश्य है और अवस्था सदिशों को पृथ्वी के क्रियामंडल 37 ENTER, 23 ENTER पर लाना। रजिस्टर 1, 2 और 3 में निम्नलिखित संख्याएँ दर्ज करें। रजिस्टर 1, 00002; रजिस्टर 2, पाँच गेंदें; रजिस्टर 3, 00210। चरण 3: आगे बढ़ें। चरण 4: आगे बढ़ें। 25. आगे न बढ़ें। 30 सेकंड प्रतीक्षा करें; फिर ENTER, 00 ENTER करें। प्रक्रिया समाप्त
Cen
D'accord. Tu m'avais
Okay, Jack. Lass uns kurz besprechen, wie ich die Lage erreiche und dann den Triebwerkszündvorgang durchführe. Ich spreche von den Steuerungstechniken. So wie es jetzt aussieht, versuche ich, das Raumschiff in der Gierachse zu stoppen, wobei die Erde aus meinem Fenster sichtbar ist. Dann befinden wir uns im Führungs- oder Steuerungsmodus; die Gierachse befindet sich im Steuerungsmodus. Anschließend steue
ऐसा लगता है कि मोनोक्युलर से स
Во-первых, у тебя это на бесконечности; позволь мне записать это зд
بعد فحص أ
Okay, Jim. Wir melden uns in ein paar Minuten nochmal bei dir, ob wir jetzt auf deine andere Kartusche umsteigen. Zweitens: Es könnte beim Einrichten helfen, wenn du dich zuerst auf die Rollbewegung konzentrierst und diese in Gang bringst. Sobald die
ठीक है
そのうち、この操作をち
逆噴射まであと約2分です。UHF-Hi、送信・録音、R/Tモードです。着陸スイッチのヒューズを除く全
बहुत बढ़िया
알겠습니다. 지상에서는 모든 시스템이 정상
Die Luftfeuchtigkeit bl
Всё верно, Джек. Хорошо, на этом всё. И я ду
D'accord. Et votre deuxième point était: on peut boire tout ce qui reste de cette e
Es war schwierig, die Klappe zu schließen, da sich in den Pyrolyseleitungen
Roger. Thank yo
了解。ちょっと考えさせてください。戻って
Дружба Семь. Подтвердите, пожалуйста, получение ретросеквенции времени 1 Дельта с Занзибара?
Roger. Voici le compte rendu du panneau: les fusibles du panneau de gauche sont tous dans la position indiquée précédemment. Le propulseur d'appoint est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le sélecteur de mode est en mode normal (auto) et le gyroscope est en mode normal. Toutes les poignées en « T » sont enfoncées. Le délai de rétrogradation est normal et les deux éclairages de cabine sont allumés. Les filtres rouges sont activés. La fréquence basse du télémètre est activée. Les aides au sauvetage sont en mode automatique. Tous les éléments du panneau de séquence sont normaux, sauf le coussin d'atter
نعم. 
रॉजर। आपकी ओर आ रहा हूँ। 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; माइनस 061, प्लस 067 135 23 4149;, प्लस 32020, प्लस 06713, माइनस 
Ok. Sono in modalità push-to-talk e i
これがチキンシチューだと信じられますか？ 必要なのはたったこれだけです。3オンスのお湯を5分から10分煮込むだけです。ここにある小さな蛇口からお湯を出します。この蛇口には飲料水に含まれるガスを除去するフィルターが付いています。この小さなチューブの先端を蛇口の先端に差し込み、トリガーを3回引いて3オンスのお湯を注ぎます。その後、チューブを潰して先端を切り落とすと、
然后，请您将相机贴在窗户上，并确保相机镜头不进入视野。接下来，我们需要两组照片。请您将相机设置为脉冲模式，并将相机镜头垂直向下对准地球。我会给您一些时间启动相机。相机镜头会对准夜侧的黑色地球。然后，请进行一次脉冲向上拍摄，并使用相机快门处于B门模式拍摄一张照片。当相机升至地平线以上时，请进行一次脉冲向下拍摄，同样使用相机快门全开模式拍摄另一张照片。之后，我们需要
Houston, Apollo 11. Ho lasciato correre più del dovuto. Potrei aver leggermente deteriorato il nostro vett
Хорошо. Давайте перейдем к
いやあ、無重力だと本当に景色が違って見えるんだ。今、ニールは前方ハッチに
제미니 4호, CSQ입니
还有，来自休斯顿的13号，如果你
هل يظهر القمر في المكان المناسب لك تقريبًا لتحقيق انحر
收到。您的适配器电池读数已显示。电压读数
わかりました、ジム。ここに、バッテリー3の回路図が約1アンペア分
تخيل 
That's correct, Apollo 8. And we'll have a couple more things for you before too long. We're working on a flyby at this time. And we're going to be talking some more to you about the problem of looking at stars in the sextant and telescope. And what we'd like to do as soon as the black team comes on the MOKR, while we have two teams here, we would like to get a rehash from you on exactly what you see and what you don't see and under what conditions, and see if we can define it so that everyone here understands what you've been telling us. And if you have any comments
起初，神创造天
Eagle, this is Houston. We're happy with all our data in all modes
روجر، هيوست
अब क्रायो प्रेशर लाइट जल रही है। H2 का स्तर न्यूनतम सीमा तक पहुँच गया है, तो क्
알겠습니다. 짐, 잘 들었습니다. 그리고 잭이 지금 바로
Apollo 8, Houston. Roger. I made one mistake; horizon wi
好的。我觉得那样做不会白费力气。我们正在努力得出确切的结论，这样飞行后就能获得一些真正有价值的数据，以便与我们在地面上所做的工作进行比较，为
روجر. زائد 90، /، 635 31 ناقص 164 زائد 129. هل أنت معي حتى الآن؟ انته
La zone visible par la fenêtre de gauche est une plaine relativement plate, parsemée de nombreux cratères d'environ 1,5 à 15 mètres de profondeur, et de quelques crêtes – petites, de 6 à 9 mètres de haut, je dirais – et de milli
- جهز الشريط ودعه يقوم بعمله؛ لا يزال أمام
Роджер. Вы видите Землю, как и мы, из нашего левого окна, чуть больше половины Земли. Мы смотрим на восточную часть Тихого океана, и в северной половине верхней половины экрана мы видим Северную Америку, Аляску, Соединенные Штаты, Канаду, Мексику и Центральную Америку. Южная Америка становится невидимой сразу за терминатором или внутри тени. Мы видим океаны с отчетливым синим оттенком, белые полосы крупных облачных образований по всей Земле, береговые линии, западную часть США, долину Сан-Хоакин, горный хребет Сьерра, полуостров Нижняя Калифорния, а также некоторые облачные образования над юго-восточной частью США. К юго-западу от Аляски есть один отчетливый слабый шторм, примерно в 500-1000 милях, и еще один очень слабый шторм, показывающий южную часть экрана, недалеко от экватора или далеко от него, вероятно, на 45 градусах или более южной широты. Коричневые оттенки в ландшафте довольно хорошо различимы. Зелёные участки плохо видны. Некоторые зелёные пятна видны вдоль северо-восточного и северо-западного
А если вы хо
Gemini 4، Canary CAP COM. يجب أ
회전식 핸드 컨
复制
好
はい
잠깐만요, 밴스. 무슨 말인지 모르겠어요. 34페이지에 있는 내용을
C'est exact, Jim. Une fois que vous avez trouvé l'orientation souhaitée, effectuez un alignement axial (400 + 5) autour du cor
Molto bene... Gemini 4, Houston. Ora puoi disattivare l'i
अच्छी शुरुआत, V
आमीन! ठी
Хорошо, Джек. Я сейчас тебе это прочитаю, потом добавлю несколько комментариев, и мы немного обсудим. Это должно произойти где-то после. После возобновления работы через 49 часов, если позволит время, мы хотели бы, чтобы экипаж исследовал, существует ли угол крена, при котором комету можно наблюдать для фотосъемки. Если есть, запишите оптимальный угол крена для возможной фотосъемки, прежде чем возобновить работу примерно в, когда ребята закончат, используйте планетарный режим и следующие полуединичные вект
Roger. Apollo 8, eure Daten von der Rückseite sind so gut wie unverständlich. Bill, wir schlagen vor, dass du die Position deines Mikrofons für die Übertragung von der Rückseite überprüfst und etwas lauter und deutlicher sprichst. Die letzte Übertrag
And 11, Houston, I've got an update for about four items on your entry P
罗杰。我其实没太关注这个问题。不过我注意到一点，就是你打开风扇的时候，风量显示会出现波动，这可能跟交流电的波动有关。下次我们或许可以检查一下交流电
Jerry
阿
巴兹，我们将在大约半小时后停
19:04. यह एक अच
روجر. أردتُ فقط التأكد من أنكم لم تعودوا إلى النوم مجدداً. ولديّ أيضاً بعض الأخبار العاجلة إذا كنتم ترغبون في معرفة ما حدث خل
此时，阳光照射在飞船的头部，将其完全遮蔽。左下方可以看到一些明亮的星星。我现在看到了猎户座腰带。所以天狼星在我们头部下方相当远的
Als sich die Boosterstufe von uns trennte, konnte man sehen, wie der Treibstoff aus der Rolldüse spritzte. Während die Boosterstufe taumelte, größtenteils in einer Ebene senkrecht zur Längsachse des Raumschiffs, war der lange, fließende Schweif zu erkennen, der von ihr abging. Ich werde eine kleine Skizze davon in meinen Flugplan einzeichnen. Nach der Trennung des Raumschiffs la
Molto bene. Confermiamo. Retros 1, 2 e 3. L'asset
Sì. Va bene, allora. Ieri sera alla base aerea di Walker sono morti cinque membri dell'
로저. 요한계시록 8장 11시 40분 41초를 이해했습니다. 동경 19.8
やあ、アミーゴス、メ
그리고 11번, 휴스턴. 이글, 참고로 말씀드리자면, 3시
I - I think we answer to number 9. We - at around, I think, was when we think the number 5 light came on in the S-II, and a d
Forse ti interesserà sapere, visto 
Non, ce n'est pas l
六分儀について少しコメントしたいと思います。狭い宇宙船内での使用は、特にヘルメットをかぶっていると非常に困難です。最終的に、ヘルメットをかぶったまま、要求されている星々の角度を測ろうとするのは無駄だと判断しました。そこでヘルメットを外しました。これにより、六分儀の使用範囲は多少広がりましたが、それでも宇宙船を操作せずに観測できる角度は20～23度程度に限られていました。星々が窓の上部に隠れてしまうのです。宇宙船をより頻繁に、そして自由に操作すれば、窓の長軸が追跡面に入るように操作できます。しかし、燃料の制限があったため、このような操作は選択しませんでした。パルスモードも使用しましたが、操作はあまりしませんでした。この実験で選ばれた星々は、地平線からかなり離れた角度にあるため、観測が非常に困難でした。最終的に、星を地平線にもう少し近づけることにしました。お気づきだと思いますが、カノープスと他のいくつかの星で試しました。青いフィルターは地平線を完全に遮っているように見えました。青いフィルターを使ったときは地平線がなかったからです。月明かりがあるときは、地平線の画像はそれほど良くないかもしれません。しかし、緑のフィルターを使うと、フィルターな
Sì, ti sei svegliato con circa 2 minuti di anticipo. Sembra che li stessi davvero segando
11번, 휴스턴. 지금 당신이 그것을 떼어내고, 접어서, 위에 올려놓는 모습이 보입니다. 계기판이 뒤쪽으로 보이
저는 자동 모드에서 수동 모드로, 그리고
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。太陽よ
11، هذه هيوس
Okay, Alinement Cage Check. Minus 10° Nickwinkel, 10° Gierwinkel und 10° Rollwinkel. CAGE-Position, Bugspitze nac
저희 눈에는 그 시스템이 정말 좋아 보입니
Molto, molto bene
ठीक है। गास्टा फ्लाइट डिस्प्ले और एसी बस ए ब
Go ah
好的。回头见。还有，告诉吉姆，迪克让他去
باز، هذه هيوستن. نرجو منك
Certaines de ces petites dépressions ont tendance à s'affaisser – d'environ 5 à 7 cm. Cela correspond exactement à ce que les photos du géomètre ont montré lorsqu'il a exercé une légère pression. Une force se transmet à travers la surface du sol et environ 12 à 15 cm de laurier se détachent et se déplacent comme s'ils étaient incrus
Oui. Alt
Ho disattivato il r
로저. 5,000명 분산; 북서풍 10노트; 파고 3피트; 고도계 2986피트; 구조대 호출 부호 Naha RESCUE 1, GMT 02:58; Naha SEARCH 1, GMT 03:44; 구축함 USS Mason, 도착 예정 시간 미정; 우주선 일출 시각: 경과 시간 10:08:40; 레트로파이어 시점의 지평선은 어둡고, 
रॉजर। कोलंबिया, फिलहाल ज्यादा कुछ नहीं हो रह
Hello, Muchea Com Tech,
네, 맞습니
ठीक है, जैक ने खुद को वापस नीचे कर लिया। 250 वोल्ट के बैट ए और बैट बी ब्रेकर लगाने के बाद, उसने बैट बस वोल्ट ए पर 32.3 और बैट बस पर 37.0 पढ़ा; फिर उसने 275 वोल्ट के ब्रेकर लगाए, जिससे बैटरियां बसों से 
ठीक
好的，杰克。现在打开上升段2
Ok, Vance. In sostanza, per quanto riguarda la cinepresa, quello che volevi usare è la nostra cinepresa per sequenze lunari, collegata al powerp
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हम अभी आपकी टेप को डंप करने की कोशिश करेंगे। वर्तमान कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में सर्किट मार्जिन ठीक नहीं हैं। हम 
حسنًا يا جاك، سنرتب الآن جدولًا منتظمًا للمراقبة والنوم. كان فريد مستيقظًا لفترة طويلة، لذا استيقظت مبكرًا قليلًا لأريحه. جاك وفريد ​​نائمان الآن، لذا سأتركهما ينامان قدر استطاعتهما، ثم سنتناول الطعام، وبعدها 
Oh là là! Ça a l'air 
C'est confir
Ah oui
Sospetto che questo campo di massi possa avere origine in parte da questo grande cratere roccioso dai bordi affilati che abbiamo superato durante la discesa finale. Ieri ho detto che aveva più o meno le dimensioni di un campo da football, e devo ammettere che è stato un po' difficile da misurare all'inizio. Ma ho pensato che potesse entrare nell'Astrodome mentre lo superavamo. E le rocce nelle vicinanze del cratere roccioso sono molto più grandi di quelle in questa zona. Alcune sono alte circa 3 metri e forse più grandi, e sono molto densamente popolate fino a circa un diametro del cratere oltre il bordo del 
Hello, Tranquility Ba
Roger, Jim. Abbiamo pensato che potesse interessarti sapere che, sulla base di 2 ore e mezza di traccia dopo l'ultimo midcourse, e guardando al futuro, prevediamo che la correzione a metà percorso sarà inferiore a 30 cm al secondo. E continua così fino all'interfaccia di ingresso meno 2 ore, prevediamo 60 c
ह्यूस्टन, ईगल। गियर एक्सटेंशन का कार्य सफलताप
Y
好了，休斯
그러니까,
Роджер. ПОЛУЧИТЬ RC 01 00 16; ВОЗВРАТ 400K, 15 плюс 21; ВОЗВРАТ RB, 20 пл
Retro Power ist ARM. Meine Greenwich-Uhr ist stehen geblieben. Die Hauptbatterien werden geladen. Überprüfen Sie, ob die RCS-Treibmittel A und B ei
제가 해보고 싶었던 건... 거기 피부색이 어두운가요
Роджер. Час до з
네, 퍼지 작업이 완료된 것으로 이해했습니다. 감사합니다. 그리고 극저온 
ف
G
我们知道有很多来自不同国家的科学家都在翘首以盼地等待着月球样本的到来，我们也觉得你们会很想亲眼看看它们现在的样子。这两个箱子是样本返回容器。它们是真空包装的，在月球表面真空密封后，被带入指令舱，装进这些玻璃纤维袋中，拉上拉链，再从外面重新密封，最后放置在指令舱侧面的这些容器里。这就是这两个箱子。我相信，我们一登上飞船，这些箱子就会立即被转移，并开始送往月球接收实验室。这些箱子里装着各种岩石样本、土壤基质、沙子和淤泥，以及用于太阳风实验的粒
Roger。激
Roger. Sie haben noch eine Minute bis zu den Kanarischen Inseln. An Bord des Raumschiffs läuft alles gut; wir sehen uns
…Mais nous sommes d
تقع مسؤولية هذه الرحلة أولاً على عاتق التاريخ ورواد العلم الذين سبقونا في هذا المسعى؛ ثم على عاتق الشعب الأمريكي الذي عبّر بإرادته عن رغبته؛ ثم على عاتق الإدارات الأربع المتعاقبة ومجالسها التشريعية لتنفيذها تلك الإرادة؛ وأخيراً على عاتق فرق الوكالة والصناعة التي بنت مركباتنا الفضائية: ساتورن، وكولومبيا، وإيجل، ووحدة EMU الصغيرة، وهي عبارة عن بدلة فضاء وحقيبة ظهر كانت بمثابة مركبتنا الفضائية الصغيرة على سطح القمر. نود أن نتوجه بالشكر الجزيل لجميع الأمريكيين الذين بنوا هذه المركبات، والذين قاموا بالبناء والتصميم والاختبارات، والذين بذلوا قصارى جهدهم وطاقاتهم فيها. لهؤلاء الأشخا
Хорош
C'est négatif, Mike. Si vous regardez le graphique, que nous vous mettrons de côté et que vous pourrez consulter après le vol, vous verrez qu'il a démarré immédiatement au premier tour et a formé une spirale jusqu'à environ 20 degrés d'inclinaison. Il semblait ensuite amorcer une spirale autour d'un point d'inclinaison décalé d'environ 20
La polé
ठीक है, अंतरिक्ष यान कमांडर,
We have about 450 ps
Gemini 4, ici Houston CAP COM. Vous m'ente
罗杰
알겠습니다. 그건 선택 사항입니
分かりました。a、ENTER; 06、ENTERと入力すると、3つのボール62が表示されますが、どちらで
ロジャー、フライトプランの修正があります。カナ
Houston, Apollo 13. Il / DELTA-P
了解、セブン、君の声が弱々しく聞こえるが、読める。この周波数を待
本当に大丈
Хо
Gibt es irgendeine Möglichkeit, dieses Ding mit dem Ein-/Ausschalter zu s
Не могли бы вы сообщи
Rog, t
I wi
Jim, quella differenza di 4 piedi al secondo equivale a 0,28 gradi sull'angolo della t
Оба варианта хороши для пов
क्या आपने 30 और 37 पर कोई नि
Я не знаю. Мне все еще жарко и я все еще потею, но особого дискомфорта нет. Я бы хотел... я бы хотел разобраться с проблемой температуры костюма. Насколько я понимаю
The crat
मैं नीचे देखकर पता लगा लेता हूँ कि तुम लोगों ने कुछ बत्तियाँ जला रखी हैं या नहीं। मैं अपना ब्लड प्रेशर कम करने वाला
74. Das ist bei 30 (
Roger. Ihr Bewohner der Raumstation Columbia interessiert vielleicht, dass heute in Kolumbien Unabhängigkeitstag ist. Gloria Diaz von den Philippinen wurde gestern Abend zur Miss Universe gekrönt. Sie setzte sich gegen 60 andere Mädchen durch und sicherte sich den Titel der Schönheitskönigin. Miss Diaz ist 18 Jahre alt, hat schwarze Haare und Augen und die Maße 88-58-88. Zweitplatzierte wurde Miss Australien, gefolgt von Miss Israel und Miss Japan. Während ihr am Dienstagabend zurückreist, spielen die Allstars der American und National League in Washington Baseball. Mel Stottlemyre von den Yankees wird voraussichtlich der erste Pitcher der American League sein. Wer der erste Pitcher der National League sein wird, ist noch unklar. Sie haben neun Pitcher im Kader. Auch wenn sich die Forschung im Raumfahrtprogramm sicherlich ausgezahlt hat, scheint Forschung nicht immer erfolgreich zu sein. Die Woodstream Corporation, Muttergesellschaft der Animal Trap Company of America, die über eine Milliarde hölzerne Federmausfallen hergest
Да, подтверждаю, подождем минут 10 или 5, а пото
それは肯定的で
Roger. Neil kommt wohl in fünf Minuten an, elf. Mike, wir sehen uns im Hintergrund. Die Bildschärfe ist wirklich hervorragend. Die Farben sind gut. Das ist ein richtig gutes Bild von Commander Armstrong. Wir – Buzz, wenn du die Kamera zum Fenst
私たちは、クアッド ブラボー 1 のプライマリおよ
لا. ليس في وحدة الأوامر في هذا 
حسنًا. الآن، بعد ذلك، عند حوالي 105:05، ه
11，这里是休斯顿。
好
Je suis effectivement ass
Ken, tu veux que j'utilise le gain élevé quand on passera, ou l'OMNI est suffisant? Ça m'est égal
Unser St
了解しました。お忙しいとは存じ上げておりますので、ご迷惑をおかけすることはございません。進捗
난 몰랐어... 라디오라니... 라디오를 본 적도 없
Роджер. Итак, начнём: 5, / 45701, минус 043, плюс 116, плюс 31171, минус 00767, минус 00214 180 017 001, NA, плюс 00188 31181 259 31003 40 2711 398 033, вниз 043, влево 23, плюс 0832, минус 16500, плюс 12956 36208. За
네, 확인했습니다. 
Okay, good. I am in; retroattitude; gyros are normal; the maneuver switch is off. I am warming up the Tr-10 bypass for the rate gyros. I stil
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। वहां
रॉज
로저. 안면 보
Roger. Votr
로저. 당신을 위해 AUTO optics - 
いいえ。これは宇宙船
보조 냉각 루프는 정말 좋아 보였습니다. 라디에이터도 꽉 조여져 있었고, 다른 모든 부품들도 성능 곡선에 맞춰 제대로 작동하고 있는 것 같았습니다. 점검 당시 메인 산소 조절기 두 개 모두 104psi로 채워져 있었습니다. 달 궤도를 고려하면 시간당 약 1파운드의 물을 끓여야 할 것으로 예상되는데, 
La traslazione dal fondo della paratia di poppa del modulo di comando deve essere di circa 5, 6 metri. Non è affatto disorientante, ma è molto interessante immaginare di part
... Schub auf NORMAL; DELTA-V-Schub, zwei, AUS; Nicken und Gieren auf AUTO; Kardanmotoren Nicken und Gieren AUS; DELTA-V/CG, /CSM; ELS-Logik, AUS; ELS 
Okay. Va bene. Lasciami... Lasciami aspettare che si alzino, o almeno che 
Allez-y
Roger. Tangage 212, la
Gemini 4,
다시 말씀해 주
罗杰。我们觉得现在应该设置好了。只是想再确
如果您方便的话，请告诉我们您使用它的频率
いいえ、発
그리고 지금 화면 오른쪽 부분에서 메시에 알파
休斯
Sobald Sie bereit sind, senden wir Ihnen ei
M
Okay. Mal sehen, ob ich alles verstanden habe. Für das Rendezvous-System muss zunächst CB 16 INVERTER 2 geschlossen und CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2 ebenfalls geschlossen sein. Anschließend muss auf Bedienfeld 14 überprüft werden, ob INVERTER 2 ausgewählt ist. Außerdem muss CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 geschlossen sein (beide Leistungsschalter). Danach muss der RENDEZVOUS RADAR-Auslösegriff gezogen werden. Auf Bedienfeld 3 muss RENDEZVOUS RADAR auf A ENTER mit Plus aller ZIP-Werte und Plus 28300 in den Registern 1 und 2 eingestellt werden. Anschließend wird die Bewegung mit dem 16 72 überwacht. Nach dem Parken muss CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 geöffnet und anschließend ENTER aktiviert werden. CB 16 INVERTER 2 muss ebenfalls geöffnet sein. Wenn es nun an der Zeit ist, die Lampe für die Ausrichtung zu aktivieren, ist CB 16, INVERTER 2 geschlossen, CB 11 AC BUS A LAMP geschlossen, und nachdem die Ausrichtung abgeschlossen ist, ist CB 16, INVERTER 2 geöffnet, CB 11 AC BUS A LAMP geöffn
Р
Siate consapevoli che, durante il mio ultimo passaggio MSC attraverso l'anomalia, non ho avuto la sensazione di avere un buon riferimento di imbardata per la parte piccola 
D'accord, Ken. Péricynthe plus 2, retour rapide / 62871, moins 161, plus 129, plus 45224, moins 06216, moins 18712 001 28 603 49118 112 038 296 t
아쿠아리우스, 휴
باز، هل أنت 
A
माफ़ कीजिए, फ्रेड; मुझ
分かりました。ありがとうござい
ह्यूस्टन, आपसे विदा लेने से पहले, ईडी बैट्स 4 मिनट पर मैदान में उतरने वा
Eh bien, nous avons vu l'Australie pour la première fois
로저. 랜딩백은 이미 꺼져 있었습니다. 제가 먼저 확인하고 보고했어요. 레트로매뉴얼도 꺼져 있고, 이제 모든 준비가 끝났습니다. 무중력 상태가 정말 편안하네요. 
11, Houston. I RETRO volevano sapere se potevate darci informazioni su eventuali bagagli non nominali che abbiam
Вперед, продо
रॉजर। हम वह सब कॉ
Oui. Yaw à gauc
조금 걱정됐습니다. 이분은 아직 대기 중인 예비 사령관입니다. 아직 명
Gemini 4, Gemini 4
Okay. Das i
جمي
يجب أن يكون المرشد المبتدئ موجودًا. إنه أ
Не слишком сильно. Я замечаю, что это отличается от то
D'ac
好的。如果我能
आप सभी को इसके बाद ब्लॉक कर दिया ग
그리고 
... ٤٢ بالمئة. حوالي ١٠٠ إلى ١٢٠ رطلاً ظاهرة. هذا لا يترك مجالا
Hier spricht Friendship Seven, d
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。ダウンボイスバックアップはOKです
Хорошо, плюс 00068, плюс 00000, плюс 46420 178 134 001, неприменимо, плюс 00202 46420 547 46211. Вы со мной? Кон
好的，对比阿波罗13号和阿波罗8号的飞行，起飞时的震动程度和阿波罗8号差不多，但在飞行初期，侧向晃动比阿波罗8号要小。阿波罗13号的S-IC分离感觉比阿波罗8号更剧烈，也许是因为我坐的位置不一样，我也不确定。在S-II点火之前，我们经历了大约三次剧烈的断电瞬变，以及几次巨大的爆炸声，我们被安全带向后甩动。当然，除
Jim, we don't want you 
Cabin is all set, I don't want to lower the dome any more. It's been very good. Checking on time 18 minutes. Okay on the clock. Thrusters - roll left auto is 119 (degrees). Roll right auto is 115 (degrees). Roll left manual is 100 (degrees). Cabin heat exchanger is 43 (degrees). Pitch up auto is 95 (degrees). Pitch down auto is 95
Roger. Verstanden. Knoten 07 04 46; Rev 5; 67,5 Ost; 15 plus 52, Rekt
أوه! ما زال أمامنا طريق
パワーダウン（判読不能）状態でも、まだ 11 アンペア弱しか消費していないようです。1 番機では 10 アンペア、2 番機では 11 アンペア弱です。テザー、つまり外側のハッチにあるテザーもしくは臍帯拘束具の位置のせいで、宇宙船前方での自由テザーの空気力学的制約による船外活動（EVA）作業はかなり困難でした。そのエリアで作業している時はいつでも、テザーが端に達すると私は引き戻され、その反動で宇宙船上方、アダプタ
D'accord. Et n'oubl
Ceci 
ठीक है। जिम, अब मैं आपकी बात सुन पा रहा हूँ। हमारा सवाल यह है कि क्या आप अंतरिक्ष यान को इस तरह से व्यवस्थित कर सकते हैं कि
了解。ブロックに戻り、再配置します。101 36 14.07から00758を引いて、すべてゼロを足し、00098 00572を足し、00085 00764 030 000 293を足し、000759を引いて、すべてゼロを足し、00090を足します。該当なし
Хорошо, Джек. Начнём сверху. Итак. Криогенные баки: H2 1 показывает 230, то же самое для 2. В нашем кислородном криогенном баке 1, похоже, еле держится на уровне 300. А в криогенном баке 2 H2 1 показывает 73, 2, 74. На кислородной стороне мы видим O2 1 в количестве 76; O2 зафиксирован на максимальной шкале. Температура радиатора на первичном входе около 55; на выходе около 30, а на вторичном выходе 52 градуса. Температура испарения 45, давление пара 0,17, на выходе гликоля 48. Компрессор костюма показыва
Хоро
ジェミニVI、カナリアCAP COM。どう聞こえますか？オ
好的。AGC 的电压降到了我所说的噪声水平，也就是
罗杰。请您点击“接受”，我们将向您发送一个包含状态
Jack,
프랭크, 제가 계속 상상하는 건, 만약 제가 다른 행성에서 온 외로운 여행자라면 이 고도에서 지구를 어떻게 생각할지, 그곳에 생명체가 살고 있을지 없을지 같은 거예
Roger. Advise, we are not locking up on your hig
11، هيوستن. تشير التوقعات الحالية إلى ظروف جوية مناسبة في منطقة تعافيكم: رياح متفرقة على ارتفاع 2000 قدم، ورياح متفرقة عالية، قادمة من اتجاه 70 درجة، بسرعة 13 عقدة، ورؤية تصل إلى 10 أميال، وارتفاع
罗杰。我用自动模式对接的，正如我所说，我不太确定接触的确切时刻。我一直在反复检查对接探针的指示器。我看到了两个旋转的指示灯，表明三个对接闩——不是三个，而是三个……闩——已经扣合，我们软对接成功。当时情况看起来非常稳定。于是，我切换到自由模式，回头看了一眼窗外，情况依然稳定；然后我启动了2号主气瓶。就在这时
Okay. Turning to th
حسنًا يا فانس...، زائد 0833.0، ناقص 0050.9، ناقص 0213.9، غير متوفر، زا
I say, clouds run a third of the way bet
Roger. Understand. Update ove
Ok. Ho alcuni dettagli sul piano di volo per voi, come segue. Naturalmente, dato che non c'è -3, cancellerete tutte le informazioni relative al 3 di metà percorso, incluso il - il, che viene chiamato a circa 54-1/2, e lo rimanderemo a più tardi, cosa che vi - cosa che vi dirò - cosa che vi dirò - co
لدي بعض كميات وحدات الخدمة إذا كنت
खैर, हम रुके और पहले मोटे तौर पर अलाइनमेंट किया, फिर बारीक अलाइनमेंट किया, और फिर एक जोड़ी चुनने के लिए कहा, कैपेला को चुना, लेकिन वह गाड़ी चलाती रही और कहीं नहीं पहुँच पाई
わかりました。ご都合の良い時にいつでもデ
आपको इसकी जांच करनी होगी। ओह, आप इसे उनके लिए छोड़
알겠습니다. 제 시계
2 다운이야, 월리. 알았어
Apollo 11, Houston. Anfordern und annehmen, und wir senden Ihnen Ihren Statusvektor und
A questo punto vorrei bere un po' d'acqua, ma preferirei tenere la visiera chiusa pe
حسنًا. لا يوجد الكثير من الأخبار هذا الصباح. الأمور هادئة نوعًا ما. أعتقد أن الخبر الأبرز هو معدل الحوادث - وفيات العطلات - وهو بالتأكيد خبر غير سار، فقد بلغ عدد القتلى على مستوى البلاد 233 شخصًا، وكان 9 منهم في هيوستن عشية عيد الميلاد ويوم عيد الميلاد. أما في الأخبار العالمية، فقد تصدرت عائلات رواد الفضاء عناوين الأخبار مجددًا. فقد نشرت كوريا الشمالية هذا الأسبوع رسالة تهنئة بعيد الميلاد من عائلات طاقم أبولو 8 إلى قائد البحرية لويد بوتشر، قائد طاقم سفينة يو إس إس بويبلو. وجاء في الرسالة، الموجهة إلى القائد والسيدة بوت
سمعتك تقول انظر إلى الحرق؛ عليك أن تقول ماذا عن ذلك مرة
Роджер. Хотел бы еще раз просмотреть этот 30-минутный о
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。手動での混合を続けてください。EVAP OUTを55
इस दौरान तानानारिव में हुई बैठक की वॉइस टेप फिलहाल उपलब्ध नहीं है। तानानारिव के कॉम टेक ने ह्यूस्टन के कैप कॉम को 77 54 27 पर रिपोर्ट दी कि उन्होंने जेमिनी 4 से संपर्क किया था और क्रू ने टेप प्लेबैक स्विच को कमांड और टी/एम स्वि
Okay, Vance. Das Ladegerät ist aus, und ich bin bereit, mit Ke
Да, подтверждаю. У нас достаточно полном
휴스턴, 여기는 컬럼비아입니다. 잘 들
Nun bin ich wieder beim Kreuz des Südens mit dem hellen, fleckenartigen Bereich – ich schätze, es sind viele sehr helle Sterne. Ich kann mich nicht erinnern, im Planetarium genau dasselbe gesehen zu haben. Alph
다시 말
Negative, have not yet. I want to get an alignment as soon as I get back in daylight and do just exactly that. I think my, I'm probably not--my scanners are
嘿，查理，你今天
ठीक है। मुझे लगा कि आप कॉल कर रहे हैं, लेकिन लगता है कि नीचे ग्राउंड स्विचिंग म
还有117个倒下
Boy, did we ever. We each used the defecation system one time and the urine system about four or five
Роджер. В соответствии с шагом 1, описанным на странице 47, управление наведением находилось в режиме PGNS и MODE CONTROL, PGNS, AUTO; и, конечно же, автоматические выключатели на двигателях еще не были включены, поэтому, когда мы начали проходить DAP и перешли к NOUN 46 — а 
En fait, ce n'est pas le sachet qui pose problème, mais la nourriture à l'intérieur. Elle est émiettée. Je n'ose pas ouvrir le 
アクエリアス、ヒューストン
إليكم تقريرًا من هاري روزنتال من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في هيوستن. أضفى بابا نويلان البهجة على ليلة عيد الميلاد للطفل جيفري لوفيل، البالغ من العمر عامين. طرق الأول باب منزله وجلب الهدايا، بينما قام الثاني بتشغيل محرك أبولو 8 العائد من القمر. ارتدى الأول بدلة حمراء ولحية بيضاء، وأطلق صيحة "هو هو" بصوت عالٍ سُمع في آخر الشارع. أما الثاني، فكان محركًا ضخمًا ينفث اللهب خلف القمر، وكان الآلاف ينتظرون بفارغ الصبر خبر تشغيله. "يرجى العلم أن هناك بابا نويل" كانت أولى كلمات أبولو 8 بعد أن خرجت من الصمت اللاسلكي لتُعلم العالم القلق بعد 15 دقيقة من إتمام المحرك لمهمته الحاسمة. قال كين ماتينجلي من مركز التحكم بالمهمة: "لم يتوقع أحد منا أن يحصل على هدية عيد ميلاد أفضل من هذه". وجاء الرد من العقيد فرانك بورمان، قائد المركبة الفضائية: "نشكر كل من كان على الأرض نيابةً عنا. كما تعلمون، لم نكن لننجح لولاكم". في هذه اللحظة، أضاءت شجرة عيد الميلاد أمام شاشات التحكم في مركز المهمة، وقرأ رائد الفضاء هاريسون شميدت نسخة فضائية من قصة "زيارة من القديس نيكولاس" على الطاقم. بدأت القصة قائلة: "كانت ليلة عيد الميلاد، وفي أعماق الفضاء، فاز طاقم أبولو 8 للتو بسباق القمر". كان طاقم مركز المهمة قد أرجأ الاحتفال حتى عودة والد جيفري، الكابتن جيمس لوفيل من البحرية، برفقة الرائد ويليام أ. أندرس من القوات الجوية والعقيد بورمان، سالمين إلى ديارهم. في أي ليلة عيد ميلاد أخرى، كانت عائلات رواد الفضاء ستجتمع في الكنيسة لحضور قداس عيد الميلاد، لكن هذا العام كانوا جميعًا يتابعون بشغف عبر شاشات التلفزيون. كانت المنازل القريبة من مركز المركبات الفضائية المأهولة مزينة. اصطفت فوانيس على الطراز المكسيكي على المروج المحيطة بمنزل لوفيل وفي جميع أنحاء مجتمعه في تيمبر كوف، وعندما وصل أربعة من سكان لوفيل، توقفت سيارة تحمل رجلاً طويل القامة يرتدي زي بابا نويل ويحمل كيساً كبيراً على ظهره. صعد سانتا كلوز إلى الباب وطرق بقوة. فُتح الباب، وإذا بجيفري لوفيل، الذي سيبلغ الثالثة من عمره في الرابع عشر من يناير، يقف هناك. ارتد جيفري إلى الوراء عند رؤيته. حملته والدته، فتشبث بها جيفري وهو لا يزال يرتجف. قالت شقيقته باربرا، البالغة من العمر خمسة عشر عامًا: "في العام الماضي هرب باكيًا". في وقت سابق، اضطرت للركض خلفه لمنعه من إطفاء جميع الأضواء. شاهد طفلا لوفيل الآخران، جيمس البالغ من العمر ثلاثة عشر عامًا وسوزان البالغة من العمر عشرة أعوام، المشهد بمتعة كبيرة. أخيرًا، اختفى سانتا والأطفال في الداخل؛ ووُضعت الهدايا تحت الشجرة؛ ولن تُفتح حتى اليوم. أعدت السيدة لوفيل مشروب البيض والبسكويت للضيوف، وشاهدوا جولة تلفزيونية مدتها خمس وعشرون دقيقة على سطح القمر قدمها رواد الفضاء الثلاثة. لاحقًا، اصطحب الأصدقاء السيدة لوفيل وباربرا وجيفري في جولة في الحي المُضاء بأضواء عيد الميلاد. في سماء صافية، أضاء القمر في طوره الربع الأول بضوء ساطع، وتوقف رواد الفضاء ا
Proseguiamo con i
Ja, das ist
Apollo 11, Houston. We're ready for the TV; we'r
Хорошо. Первой звездой будет 26, и мы проведем два набора измерений: на ближнем горизонте Земли, используя звезду 26. Затем мы хотели бы провести еще один набор измерений на звезде 16, используя дальний горизонт Земли. Если окажется, что 
ऑरोरा सेवन, इंडियन ओशन कैप कॉम। मैं आप
Joe, ça te dérangerait si on mettai
ठीक है, 11. यह ह्यूस्टन है। उड़ान योजना में लगभग 22:30 बजे, आपकी पोस्ट-स्लीप चेकलिस्ट और अन्य सभी पोस्ट-स्लीप चेकलिस्ट में, हम चाहते हैं कि आप "ऑटो जेट सेलेक्ट, 16 से ऑन" 
了解。上昇開始時刻：124 22 0000。TIG、もう一度言ってください、TIG：125 19 3470。TPIのTIG：126 57 0000。LMのCSI値は0532。つ
यह सही है। ठीक है, अब ग्राउंड आपको -2 
حسنًا. لقد ظهر لدينا ضوء "وحدة الخدمة ب" بسبب ارتفاع درجة حرا
了解、ヒューストン。2つのサーキットブレーカーが作動して
Ye
你好，阿波罗11
주낙하산이 녹색으로 접혀 있습니다. 
Un'altra piccola notizia locale: il tribunale della contea di Huntsville è andato a fuoco prima dell'alba di ieri, quindi sembra che riprenderanno i lavori di costruzione. Ho ricevuto un piccolo articolo sulle famiglie in attesa. Questo è di Ann James, giornalista del Post. "Ci riposiamo sul lato oscuro della Luna", ha detto Valerie Anders la vigilia di Natale, mentre lei e la sua famiglia aspettavano che l'Apollo 8 uscisse dall'orbita lunare e tornasse a casa. La signora Anders era arrivata alle 00 di martedì mattina, e i vicini avevano appena raccolto tutti i bambini perché la famiglia potesse riposare un po' mentre la navicella spaziale era dietro la Luna e non poteva comunicare. La casa del colonnello Frank Borman era addobbata con quattro grandi ghirlande di sempreverdi all'esterno, cosparsa di neve farinosa e decorata con fiocchi rossi. Un albero in soggiorno attende il suo ritorno sano e salvo, e la sua bella moglie bionda Sue e i suoi robusti figli, Frederick ed Edwin, hanno intenzione di rimanere a casa per il lancio di mezzanotte dall'orbita lunare. Di solito, avrebbero partecipato alle funzioni religiose di mezzanotte nella chiesa episcopale di San Cristoforo. I piani erano per la famiglia alle 00 del mattino. Dato che non ci sono bambini piccoli in casa Borman, i regali di Natale in famiglia aspetteranno semplicemente il ritorno del Colonnello Borman con il suo fantastico regalo di Natale: il volo sulla luna e ritorno. I quattro figli di Marilyn Lovell trascorreranno un Natale assolutamente normale per quanto riguarda i bambini, ha riferito l'indaffarata moglie del Capitano Lovell; ma parlare di regali era fuori luogo perché due di loro erano seduti proprio lì accanto a lei. "Non ho nemmeno avuto il tempo di cambiarmi i vestiti che indossavo ieri sera", ha detto la signora Lovell. Regali da adulto ad adulto, comunque, e l'albero di Natale sarà ancora lì quando Lovell tornerà a casa. Eccone uno interessante su Action Line. C'è una breve lettera al direttore di Action. Dice: "Ieri sera avevamo intenzione di farvi una visita a sorpresa con un disco volante, a voi terrestri. Ci siamo 
Ja, Rog
フレンドシップ・セブン、フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはテキサス・コム・テックです。
是的，我的确有这个
D'accord, Vance. On est légèrement décalés par rapport à la Lune. Jim tient la caméra par la fenêtre 3. Le Soleil arrive à environ 40 degrés sur notre gauche, et dans une minute, on va vous montrer un
Es besitzt eine ganz eigene, raue Schönheit. Es ähnelt einem Großteil der Hochwüste der Vereinigten Staaten. Es ist anders, aber sehr schön hier. Beachten Sie, dass viele der Gesteinsproben hier, insbesondere die Hartgesteinsproben, scheinbare Bläschen an der Oberfläche aufweisen. Ich betrachte gerade eine Probe, die anscheinend eine Art Einspreng
Okay. It'
罗杰。没
我也是。我不知道自己是向上、向下、向侧还是其他什么方向
アポロ
Оно было преимущественно белым, возможно, с желтоватым оттенком; и, насколько я помню, граница раздела Земли находилась ближе к горизонт
Non, je ne l'ai pas fait. Je l'ai signalé à la radio. Ça devrait être en
好的，杰克。你现在在读角
ठीक है। ठीक है। और दूसरी बात यह है कि हमने बाहर कुछ नए कण तैरते हुए देखे हैं, इसलिए संभवतः सर्विस मॉड्यूल फिर से
알겠습니다. 혹시 중간에 더 필요한 게
Ha! Ha! J'ai encore des traces de freinage sur mes palmes à cause de ton escapade dans la brousse. Bon, tu vois, j'ai encore viré à droite. Je dois… correction, j'ai viré à gauche. Je dois aller à droite, la lune est juste à l'horizon. Je vais la remettre sur la bonne voie, juste pour te montrer comme c'est facile. Il semblerait que mon niveau de carburant soit correct, alors je vais faire quelques essais. Bon, on est presque sur la bonne voie, et encore un peu à côté en roulis. Je vais la re
Très bien, et j'ai une procédure pour Jim que j'aimerais consulter. Elle consiste à amener les vecteur
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आपने वो टेप डंप कर दिय
ठीक है। अब ध्यान दें, यहाँ तैरते हुए अन्य छोटे तारों के कारण ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन करना बहुत मुश्किल है
알겠습니다. 지금처럼 소통이 원활하고 순조롭게 진행되고 있으니, 폭발 회로
Роджер. Майк, когда ты некоторое время назад экспериментировал с этим, и мы снова уменьшили мертвую зону, предполагалось, что мертвая зона центрирована вокруг нового положения, в котором мы находились в тот момент. С тех пор мы отклонились на пару градусов как по тангажу, так и по рысканию от этого положения, так что если бы мы выполнили процедуру, как мы тебе объяснили, — включили бы команду ускорения (ACCEL COMMAND), все п
D'accord. La prochaine fois, je 
Ricevuto. 
ビルさん、パネル3まで手を伸ばしていただければと
Falls ich etwas undeutlich klinge, liegt das daran, dass ich eine T
Bon, Bill, il suffit de relancer l'acquisition en mode AUTO. Ça semble être une solution. Mais si vous voulez nous parler de quoi que ce soit, si vous rencontrez d'autres prob
For analyzing these films - we're taking them at 04. We're taking them of the ocean and the cloud backg
Grazie mille. È insolito che
Ricevuto. Ra
Lo so, lo so: 295. Temperatura A: 87. Pressione A: 3000. Temperatura B: 82. Pressione B: 2650. Amperometro principale: 19. N. 2: 19,5. 1A: 4,5. 1B: 4,5. 1C: 4,2A: 5,2B: 4 3/4. 2C: 4 3/4. Volt CC: 23,5. S1: 29. S2: 29. C: 2
ああ、それは本当に素晴らしい
Хорошо. На боковой стороне дома находится панель 16. Соединительные клеммы для питания CB-радиостанции, две, разомкнуты; батарея 1, высокое напряжение, выключено/сброс; батарея 2, низкое напряжение, выключено/сброс, затем включено; батарея 2, вы
SP
يمكنك أيضًا التحقق مما إذ
そうです。手順は長くなりますが、簡単に言うと、全体をプラスチックで覆うということです。上部に補強材のようなものを取り付けて、プラスチックがLiOHの入口側に吸い付かないようにします。全体を接着するには灰色のテープが必要です。そして、出口側を塞ぐために底部に靴下のようなものを入れる必要があります。フレッド、カートリッジ内の流れはU字型になっています
オーケー。背中がバッグにくっついている。オー
नील, मैं यहाँ ऊपर जाकर पिच सेट करने ज
I
了解しました。720をコピーしました。ありがとう
من المفترض أن تكون القيمة 0
ケープ岬に着くのが待ちきれない。
Und noch etwas, Jack. Wenn es Zeit für meine 90-Grad-Gierbewegung ist, hatte ich vor, die NOUN 76-Position zu halten und einfach mehrmals zu pulsieren und zu gieren, bis die Gierbewegung beginnt, und zu hoffen, dass Nick- und Rollbewegungen innerhalb der Grenzen
نيل، هذه 
ヒューストン、水瓶座。地球は10度の線
Roger, Gemini 4. I just got up from a long... nap. I had a 4 1/2 hour nap. Out of that time, 
И ещё кое-что об «Аполлоне-13»: мы наблюдали, и вы, возможно, тоже это видите, небольшое колебание концентрации ТХЭ в топливном элементе №3. Это колебание составляет примерно от 152 до 160 в течение 37 секунд. Оно наблюдалось и в других п
로저
Apollo 8
Il est indiqué d'effectuer les tâches de rangement, de ranger le
さあ、
As best as I can tell you right now, you'll be able to accomplish practically all of the Flight Plan with the fuel that you have remaining at this time. We'll keep updating you in real time. Right now we want you to get some sleep. As far as your Apollo D-9 goes, it looks like you're going to be t
Ricevuto. Abbiamo caricato quei carichi e li abbiamo verificati; puoi tornare al tuo computer. E George Low dice che sta lavorando a quel pr
Okay, Tom. You got it all and here's what we'd
駅の
C'est vraiment bien pour un son d'ambiance, Ken. Tu pourrais peut-être ajouter des logs ici, ce serait parfait à ce niveau; pour le reste, il faudrait peut-être augmenter un peu le volume, mais c'est très bi
Рулон 177 144 00 NA плюс 00197 47253 554 47050 12 1278 26, исп
알겠습니다, 조. 지금 저희의 불안정한 관측 환경은 
Right. We underst
双子座八号，我有一些新的救援数据要发给你
임무 타이머를 설정하려면 
アポロ8号、最初のテストは終了しました。アップリンクモードを「アップリンク・コマンド＆レンジング」に変更し、アップボイスをオフにします。このモードは2分半続き、テストメッセージを送信します。コンピューターやパネルスイッチの設定には影響しません。ブレークロックに関連するSバンドノイズが見えるかもし
Give us the CSI
Weil
알겠습니다. 차단기를 사용하
Bene, Ja
그건 수동과 0, 즉 0과 
R
حسنًا، جاك. بهذا نكون قد أتممنا الإجراء، والآن سأشرح لكم كيفية العودة إلى وحدة التحكم وتزويد الحافلات الرئيسية بالطاقة مؤقتًا باستخدام مفتاح BUS. أولًا، نريد التأكد تمامًا من عدم وجود أي أحمال على الحافلات الرئيسية، وأننا فصلنا كل شيء وأن الحافلات تبدو سليمة. ثانيًا، نريد تزويد الحافلات الرئيسية بالطاقة باستخدام مفاتيح ربط الحافلات، ثم فصل الطاقة عنها بسحب قواطع الدائرة، مع ترك مفاتيح رب
Хьюстон, имейте в виду, ч
थोड़ी देर में पुनः प्रवेश की स्थिति में आ जाऊँगा। अभी ग्लव बॉक्स खुला रखने की कोई ज़रूरत नहीं है। मुझे प्रकाश का मानक स्रोत लाना होगा, शायद मैं ला सकूँ। इसे जल
Une légère hausse de votre tension artérielle. Un peu plus. Couper. À pleine échelle
Apollo 8, Houston. Ti mostriamo che l
好的。我们会继续执行断电操作。我想如果需要的话，我
11号，休斯顿。我
I'm jus
في الدوري الأمريكي، فاز ديترويت على كليفلاند بنتيجة 4-0؛ وسحق نيويورك واشنطن بنتيجة 5-0؛ وتفوق بالتيمور على بوسطن في عدد الضربات ليسجل 6 أشواط مقابل شو
Je le crois. Je vois quelques fissures sur le revêtement extérieur autour du tunnel. Quant à la c
Hello Sigma Seven, hello Sigma Seven this is Cal Cap Com, Cal Cap Com. Broadcasting in the blind. We have had a power failure on our receiver. I am broadcasting in the blind. Reset your clock for retrosequence at. This takes into account your clock error at last readout. You had last report had 27 seconds set in. This should be
That 
प्रोग्राम 52 को चलाने के दौरान, हमें प्रोग्राम अलार्म 401 मिला, जो यह दर्शाता है कि यदि हम जारी रखते हैं, तो हम इसे गिम्बल लॉक में ल
分かりました。次のページ、最後のページをご覧ください。ジム、34ページです。ページ上部の「470でDELTA-V
Voici le dôme de la suite. Le dôme de la cabine mesure 55 
로저.
Ja, und das macht einem dann Angst, denn das bedeutet ja, dass man rückwärts geht, richt
Roger. plus 90, G&N: 63481, minus 153, plus 132; 004 10 25 38;, minus 04761, plus 00001, plus 53361; roll 180 193 000; HA is NA; plus 00203 53573 633 5
Bene. Sul lato della casa, sul pannello 16, due morsetti di alimentazione della batteria CB aperti; BATTERIA 1, ALTA TENSIO
Et Houston, y
フレッドと一緒に降りて、仕組
ठीक है। मो
육분의에 대해 조금 말씀드리겠습니다. 좁은 우주선 안에서 육분의를 사용하는 것은 매우 어렵습니다. 특히 헬멧을 쓴 상태에서는 더욱 그렇습니다. 헬멧을 쓴 채로는 요구되는 별의 각도를 맞추는 것이 불가능하다고 판단하여 결국 헬멧을 벗었습니다. 헬멧을 벗으니 사용에 조금 더 유연성이 생겼지만, 우주선을 조종하지 않고는 여전히 20~23° 정도의 각도로만 측정할 수 있었습니다. 그렇게 하면 창문 윗부분에 별이 가려지는 문제가 발생했습니다. 하지만 우주선을 더 자주, 더 자유롭게 조종하면 창문의 긴 축이 추적면에 오도록 각도를 조절할 수 있습니다. 그러나 연료가 제한적이었기 때문에 그런 방식으로 조종하지 않았습니다. 또한, 많은
私の推測では、望遠鏡はおそらくほとんど役に立たないだろ
نعم. لقد كان الأمر رائعًا حقًا باستثناء حالات نادرة عندما 
Это утвер
حسنًا يا مايك. أعتقد أننا ما زلنا نرى - ما تقوله هو أنه ما زلنا ن
Okay. Jetzt nutze ich den Mond links von mir, und das hilft wirklich gut. Ich decke den Lagenanzeiger ab, damit ihr die Gierbewegung beobachten könnt. Ich deaktiviere die Kreiselsteuerung und versuche, jetzt den Fly-by-Wire-Modus für niedrige Flughöhen zu wählen. Ich positioniere den Mond zuerst in der Mitte des Sichtfelds – halte dabei Rollen und Nicken gedrückt und bringe den Mond dann wieder an seine ursprüngliche Position. Der Mond nähert sich jetzt der Mitte des Sichtfelds. Okay, ich halte ihn dort an und steuere das Rollen, um das auszugleichen. Okay, jetzt habe ich 0° Rollen. Ich habe den Mond überflogen und erfasse den Planeten Merkur, der schön hell ist und sich etwas weiter rechts befindet. Jetzt mache ich einen kurzen Check, um zu sehen, wie viele Grad Gierwinkel wir hier haben. Ungefähr 20, was für eine quantitative Überprüfung ausreicht. Wir bringen das Flugzeug jetzt zurück. Und ich muss dabei jedes Mal eine leichte Rollbewegung ausführen. Dadurch kann ich dem Horizont auf natürliche We
في الحقيقة، هو لا يريد الإفصاح عن الكثير من تلك المع
R Ca
Роджер. На этот раз им не понравилось значение 0,3. Мы 
Roger. Credo di aver capito.
好的，弗雷德。机动目标是PC+2，到目前为止，我们要飞到MPL。079, 27, 4013，加上08144，减去00443，减去0222
D'accord. Les
지평선에 보이는 분화구가 바로 위기의 바다입니다. 휴스턴, 지
No. No. Arriva proprio dal basso dell'orizzonte, attraverso lo strato di luminescenza atmosferica. Dalla prima volta che l'ho vista fino a quando ha raggiunto quella che consi
L'ordinateur est à nous. On est en mode BLOCK, et à quelle heure veux-tu qu'on monte le son 
Gemelli 4, CSQ. Accendi l'interru
Ti ho sentito forte e chiar
了
حسناً. هذا موافق
Okay, Vance. And one other slight distinction we'v
燃烧状态报告：按时燃烧；燃烧时间为 2 分 23 秒，VGX 的 7/10。姿态正常，残差为 VGX 的 5/10 加上 VGX 的
Genau. Siehe S/2-6. Worum es hier eigentlich geht, Jack, ist der Aufkleber zur Überprüfung der Lukendichtigkeit. Am einfachsten wäre es, we
Хорошо. И непосредственно перед передачей данных о последней менструации, мы хотели бы попросить вас добавить еще один шаг, Фр
広州コムテッ
You are v
الوضع يتحسن. أنت تمسكه عند الساعة الواحدة أو الثانية تقريبًا. الوضع يتحسن. وجّهه قليلًا في نفس الاتجاه. أنت الآن عند الساعة الثالثة. نرى نصف ما تراه تقريبًا. كثي
Ok, Apollo 8. Puoi dirci se hai fatto qualcosa con la tua acqua potabile? Abbiamo notato che la nostra lettura è scesa dal 100% al 56% negli ultimi
네, 맞습니다. 우선 주요 이벤트 시간을 간단히 훑어보고 나서 세부 사항을 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 좋습니다. 진입 인터페이스는 142시간 40분, 즉 약 6시간 30분 전에 시작합니다. 히터 전원을 켜고, CM/ 온도를 확인하고 필요하면 CM/을 예열합니다. 아마도 예열
Sigma Seven, ici Kano Com 
Ça 
V
わかった、ジャック。もう一度確認してみよう。地球を正面の窓の外に置いて、地球の中心を置きます。地球の中
ठीक है। आपको लगता है कि तब यह पूरी 
C'è più umidità nel tunnel ora che in qualsiasi altro momento. Soggettivamente non siamo stati in grado di rilevare alcun cambiamento o accumulo di umidità. Sembra che non ci sia umidità in 
はい、ヴァンス、飛行計画の3-122に
한번 시
و
双子座 4，休
Roger, Canary. Mon état est bon; l'état de la capsule est bon; mon mode de pilotage est automatique; les gyroscopes fonctionnent normalement; manœuvre désactivée. Carburant: 51-68 %, oxygène: 85-100 %. La 
आगे बढ़
Ja, ich weiß, was du meins
퓨즈 스위치를 더 단단하게 고정하여 하나의 퓨즈를 꺼도 인접한 퓨즈가
Roger. We have an attitude that we can get the Earth out of a window or the Moon. We're trying to look at - find one that we can get both, if that's what you'd l
ठीक है। 
我们又回到语音备份中
Die Kreisel sind deaktiviert. Meine Gierrate beträgt etwa 2 Grad pro Sekunde. Alle Kreisel zeigen Nullwerte an. Corvus befindet sich direkt über mir. Ich giere über den Scheitelpunkt hinaus. Ich habe das Gefühl, dass meine Fluglage – die Sichtlinie ist nahezu vertikal – nahe
つま
Je ne s
Voici Friendship Seven. On voit clairement derrière; une grande formation nuageuse se dessine au loin, en direc
- - Looks like we're in a good attitude to try this high-gain antenna on the COMM 
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Ti abbiamo perso nel rumore del collegament
База Спокойствия, это Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы пр
What do you have toda
Oui, nous prévoyons toujours cette activité si la longueur des cordes convient, et nous accepterons les attitudes que vous a
好的。今
Accidenti! Ora tieni gli occhi aperti, perché la zona che ho visto è prop
هيوس
मैं पानी गिरा रहा हूँ। फ्यूज चालू कर दिया है। तैयार हूँ। रिकवरी आर्म "आर्म" स्थिति में है। मुख्य पैराशूट के लिए तैयार हूँ। सभी स्विच सही स्थिति में हैं। मैनुअल ईंधन लगभग खत्म हो गया है। यह रहा और मुख्य पैराशूट खुल गया। यह - यह बहुत सुंदर तरीके से खुल गया। चमकीला नीला आसमान। और यह डीरीफ्ड है, और एक स्वीट पाई जैसा दिखता है। ऑटो ईंधन गिर रहा है। इस समय उतरने की दर लगभग 35 फीट प्रति सेकंड है। मुझे कोई समस्या नहीं दिख रही है। मैं प्रभाव के लिए तैयार हो रहा हूँ। ऑटो ईंधन गिर रहा है। केबिन का दबाव ठीक से बढ़ रहा है। सभी सिस्टम बिल्कुल ठीक लग रहे हैं। मैं शांत हूँ, मुझे गर्मी नहीं लग रही है। मुख्य पैराशूट बहुत अच्छा दिख रहा है। उतरने की दर 35 फीट प्रति सेकंड है। मेरे पास कुछ और चुनने का कोई कारण नहीं 
Roger. Continuiamo con il Maroon Bugle. Il Presidente Nixon ha sorpreso le vostre mogli con una telefonata da San Francisco poco prima di salire su un aereo per incontrarvi. Sono rimasti tutti molto colpiti dalla vostra trasmissione televisiva. Jan e Pat hanno guardato dal Controllo Missione qui. Il lancio di Intelsat da Città del Capo è stato rinviato per la quarta volta ieri sera. Si dice che il problema sia dovuto a un malfunzionamento del regolatore di azoto nel secondo stadio del Delta. Un nuovo tentativo di lancio verrà effettuato stasera. Il sottomarino di ricerca Ben Franklin, che studia la Corrente del Golfo, ha stabilito un record navigando alla deriva per 24 ore da 3 a 30 metri sopra il fondale oceanico a 400 metri di profondità al largo della costa della Georgia. La missione è guidata da Jacques Picard. Wally Schirra è stato eletto per un mandato di 5 anni nel consiglio di amministrazione del Detroit Institute of Technology. Farà parte del comitato per lo sviluppo dell'istituto. Air Canada afferma di aver accettato 2300 prenotazioni per voli verso la Luna negli ultimi 5 giorni. Si noti che più di 100 canzoni sono state scritte da uomini per le loro suocere. E infine, sembra che, invece di eliminare le canzoni romantiche sulla Luna, abbiate ispirato centinaia di cantautori. Nashville, Tennessee, che probabilmente ospita la più grande concentrazione di case discografiche e
Apollo 8, Houston. Ricevuto. Capito. 5C e 5D sono f
حسنًا. وبمجرد أن ت
Roger. Come ti sembran
Anche la pressione della camera a bordo era più alta quella volta. È tutto registrato sul 
और, 13, ह्यूस्टन। का कहना है कि बिट्स रीसेट हो गए हैं - बल्कि, स
알
Roger. They are having trouble verifying that the high gain is doing its thing. Like to verify that the pitch is minus 10, the Y is p
Kano Com Tech, ici Sigma Seven. Je vous r
روجر. أود أن تعلم أن هذا السعي وراء العلم قد تسبب في فقداني لبرنامج الذاكرة الخاص بي، إنه موجود هنا في مكان ما، لكنني 
Okay. One more note on the water, Jack. If you don't bleed the pressure off when you - don't take enough water to bleed the pressure off completely, the pressure that's left on there is going to drain away in a period of 1 to 3 hours. So it's a small amount of oxygen, but we might as well save it. So if you want to eliminate that problem you could completely drain the pressure off by putti
Roger. Das ist r
There w
昨日は素晴らしい時間を過
Okay. Configure - s
アポロ8号
Roger. Siamo scesi a 80.000 piedi. I miei indicatori indicano che siamo a cir
Okay, das ist bestätigt. Sie fliegen mit der Einwärtsdrehung (Yaw), und wir benachrichtigen Sie jedes Mal, wenn Sie die Drehrichtung ändern. Bitte deaktivieren Sie außerdem die niedrige Bitrate, die Sprachausgabe, den Leistungs
C'est un ga
Gemini 4, это RKV. Подтверждаю. Ес
Wir müssen warten, bis Sie wieder eine Verbindung 
Ok, ti ​​aiuteremo a sistemare le cose. Stavamo parlando del controllo dei componenti ridondanti e volevamo rimandarlo finché tut
Innanzitutto, sono in rientro automatico; sono in modalità automatica; i giroscopi sono normali; la manovra è disattivata; tutte le configurazioni sono in rientro; l'interruttore di bypass per i giroscopi di velocità è in modalità normale. Ti do un'indicazione del livello del carburante: il serbatoio automatico è al 90%, quello manuale è circa al 90%. Ti do un'indicazione della tuta, che ora è molto comoda. La temperatura della tuta è di 60°C. La mia cupol
This, this operation of has been very erratic. I have not been able to pin it down to any particular, one particular item. It went off one direction in yaw at one time; it went off the other the next time. I felt for a little while 
디스플레이는 열림, S-밴드 안테나는 닫힘(마스터 알람 방지), 카메라 - 시퀀스 카메라는 열림으로 설정해야 합니다. 그 아래에는 디스플레이는 열림, DC 버스 전압은 닫힘, 인버터 2는 열림, 상승 ECA는 닫힘, 상승 ECA 제어는 열림, 하강 ECA는 닫힘, 하강 ECA 제어는 닫힘, 횡단 버스 
分かりました。雑誌『タンゴ』
Роджер, Хьюстон. Это +90, как показано ниже: минус - вес составит +63531 минус 164 плюс 129 0
好的。感谢您的赞赏。弗雷德，我们这边正忙着研究各种新流程，进展非常顺利。
Okay, ich zeige Ihnen das gerne, während ich spreche. Es funktioniert wie eine Kamera. Die Blendensteuerung befindet sich hier, und Sie stellen sie auf f/22 ein. Dadurch wird natürlich die geringste Lichtmenge durchgelassen, was eine Sicherheit
Na gut, dann sollte ich wohl besser anfangen zu manövrieren; verdammt, ich bin irgendwie aus der Flugbahn geraten. Mal sehen, wir sind nach unten geneigt – wir wollen wieder hoc
Roger. Primo con il Sole; per X, più 45483; per Y, 
Во время полета я заметил, что оптика в автоматическом режиме не наводилась на выбр
Х
And, well, where you have the block in the middle of the page that says - the small block that says "Zodiacal light photos," just put
We have lost a
Tutte le batterie segnano circa 23,5 (volt) o più, l'amperometro è praticamente stabile a 20 ampere. Volevo co
हवाई, मिथुन
في الطابق الحادي عشر، لدينا رؤية جيدة للنافذة هنا
罗杰。我再说一遍，我刚才给你的指示最终应该会让摄像头朝向窗外，并且相对于你的正X轴向左偏转大约30度，所以我建议你尽早这样设置好摄像头；如果遇到任何问题，
我认为有两个角确实接触到了，因为它展开时，两个角
Friendship Seven
We'd like you to resume th
Do you log these numbe
Et Ken, si ton gars veut jouer au jeu OMNI-switch, on est sur Dog - Bravo pour le moment, enfin, sur Bravo mais aussi configuré p
कल रात
لقد تمكنا من إصلاح نظام تصر
Okay. Die Kabinentemperatur beträgt 100 Grad, die Temperatur im Kabinendach 40 Grad; der Wärmetauscher in der Kabine hat 42 Grad; die Einstellung an der Kabine ist 3 und bleibt über einen längeren Zeitraum konstant. Ich möchte das 
Roger. Loud and clear. An
알겠습니다. 47시간 동안 총 1096, 쿼드 알파 270, 브라보 278, 찰리 270, 델타 278, 그리고 H2 - H2는 76%로 표시되
Roger. À l'étoile 02: là où il est imprimé deux séries, nous aimerions n'en garder qu'une seule; et ensuite, nous aimerions ajouter l'étoile 11, horizon lunaire lo
Das scheint bisher für den gesamten Flug gu
Roger. Jim, au
我觉得
Apollo 8, this is Houston. I hadn't said anything at that time. We're digging some
Хорошо, звучит неплохо. Потому что я не знаю, где я — как далеко я тебя потерял. Хорошо, панель 4; ТЕЛЕКОММУНИКАЦИЯ, ГРУППА 1, к AC1. На панели 5 замкните следующие контакты: ГРУППА ДАВЛЕНИЯ 1, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ГРУППА ДАВЛЕНИЯ 2, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ТЕМПЕРАТУРА, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ПРЕОБРАЗОВАТЕЛЬ ВТОРИЧНОЙ ПЕТЛИ, ОСНОВНОЙ B; РАДИАТОР УПРАВЛЕНИЯ/НАГРЕВАТЕЛИ, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ШИНА РЕЛЕ АККУМУЛЯТОРА, АККУМУЛЯТОР B; ЗАРЯДНОЕ УСТРОЙСТВО АККУМУЛЯТОРА, АККУМУЛЯТОР B; УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ИНВЕРТОРОМ,
我拍了两张照片——45号和46号。我现在正飞
好的
Carnarvon, Gémeaux 4. Comm
... out of plane
これは熱帯収束帯
Sie bitten Sie, den Schalter bis zum Schlafengehen 
了解。約2秒遅れで
Eagle,
我们没有收到血压或口腔温度测
Rog
حسنًا. للعلم، كان فريد على جهاز الاتصال الليلة الماضية، وكان يجلس في المقعد الأيسر. إذا كنتم تريدون قراءات الإشعاع، فقد أخطأنا. تركناها
Roger, la pression en cabin
Houston, Tranquility
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. У нас нет возражений против сброса мочи. А что касается сброса сточных вод — по нашему графику, мы планируем отложить его примерно до, и это позволит вам довести уровень сточных вод в баке прим
好的。我们再试一次，这次居中效果更好一些。事实上，这是我们唯一能显示完整图像的另一张照片。现在我们处于前向定位点，也就是位置 2，你应该
There is a nice interesting horizon. The sun is off to the left about - oh I'd say 40 degrees. There's a dark line of the
Well, a minute ago, he said that to tell you that he was pacified now after your past comments on his trajectory and so forth, and he hadn't seen any waste water dumps or anything and he'
Roger, hast du in deinem Update 63-1 irg
Es ist nicht schon schlimm ge
罗杰。好的，那我
Roger. Und wie weit lässt sich die Ausbreit
Nous surveillons plusieurs températures po
ठीक है। और आप "फॉलो-अप" को भी भूल जाइए। ठीक है, पृष्ठ 17 पर, सभी प्रविष्टियाँ करें और 4 मिनट पर, हमें एक बदलाव मिला है। पहली पंक्ति, CB(16) इन्वर्टर 3, बंद करें; पंक्ति 2, "इन्वर्टर 1 चुनें" को काट दें। प
Apollo 8, 
아폴로 11호, 아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 무전 점검. 
Roger, compris. J'ai reçu quatre mises à jour. C'est bien ç
O
Итак, внизу, в самом низу окна проверки, вот здесь, в нижней строке написано: «РЕЖИМ в РЕЖИМ ОЖ
Frank und
Roger. Hey Jim, solange du wach bist und es schön ruhig ist, lass mich dir noch ein paar Dinge mitgeben, über die du nachdenken solltest. Eines ganz konkret. Ich weiß, keiner von euch schläft richtig, weil es so kalt ist, und ihr sollte
Okay; probably ok
OK, CB POWER 1, MAIN B, ou
Jim, just a reminder. Any waste water dumped at this point would really jiggle up the preparat
ठीक है। बिल्कुल सही। ये जिम लवेल हैं। आज हम आपको अपोलो 8 के अंदर के जीवन के बारे में थोड़ा सा दिखाना चाहते थे। हमने आपको चंद्रमा के दृश्य दिखाए, पृथ्वी के दृश्य दिखाए, और अब हम आपको अपने घर म
11, ह्यूस्टन। योजना बनाने के उद्देश्य से, आप चाहें तो मोनोक्य
よし
我现在要试试潜望镜。透过潜望镜看到的景象相当奇特。不过我得承认，没有
That's correct. Okay. Next: the next camera - Stand by 1. I've got noise here. Okay. The next - The next camera for the will be the 16-millimeter, and these photos are considered to be priority 3. Okay. One, get the 16-millimeter and powerpack from A-8. Get th
是的
Je suis maintenant en attitude de rentrée atmosphérique. Prêt à passer en mode automatique. Les commandes de vol électriques fonctionnent parfaitement, comme lors de l'entraînement. L'utilisation du simulateur de procédures a donné des résultats très positifs. Le temps passe vraiment vite, c'est indéniable. Retour en mode automatique. J'ai reçu un signal de piqué, une légère poussée des propulseurs, et tout semble correct. Il s'agissait probablement d'une légère erreur de correction. J'étais parfaitement précis, je crois, sur les trois axes. La logique de la capsule fonctionne très bien et la rentrée atm
Roger. Die Neigung war damals so, dass das schmale Ende hauptsächlich nach oben zu den Ste
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन से आपकी आवाज काफी कमजोर आ रही है। मैं स्टेट वेक्टर की जानकारी दोहराता हूँ। आपका स्टेट वेक्टर अब 5 घंटे से अधिक की ट्रैकिंग पर आधारित है। हम आपको 69.7 मील के पेरिसिंथियन पथ पर दिखाते हैं,
무체아 캡 컴. 시그마 세븐
了解。読み上げは良好です。では、続きです。6ページには何もなし、7ページにも何もなし。8ページと9ページにも何もなし。
过了本初子午线就
I'd like to comment a little on the sextant. Its use in a cramped spacecraft is very difficult, particularly with the helmet on. I finally decided it was going to be useless with your helmet on to try to take the angles that the stars, that were being called for, required. So I took my helmet off. This gave me a little more flexibility in using it, but still I was limited to angles of about 20 to 23° without maneuvering the spacecraft. What would happen is the star would be cut out by the upper part of the window. Now, by more frequent and liberal maneuvering of the spacecraft you could maneuver it so that you have the long axis of the window in your tracking plane. We were somewhat limited by fuel and we didn't choose to maneuver in this manner. We used Pulse Mode, too, without a lot of maneuvers. The stars that were selected for that run were ones that had rather high angles so the horizon and, therefore, were very difficult to get. We finally decided to go ahead and get the stars a little closer to the horizon
سأبدأ تشغيل ساعة التوقيت بتوقيت غرينتش وفقًا لحيلتك الزمنية. لقد أنجزت نصف
Okay. Wir sind fast soweit, das Di
11. В настоящее вре
Пока нет, Джек
روجر، 
Houston, Ruhe. Wir beginnen je
Sehr gut. Sind Sie bereit für eine 3-C-Retrospektive (Zeit) (Notfallwiederherstellun
Наступила темнота — скажем так — в 05:02. Мы потеряли визуальный контакт с «Агеной», и у меня сразу же включился индикатор ACQ. Дальность действия — 45 миль. Видно очень плохо, но, я бы сказа
Next time you bleed down your primary oxygen pressure, bring it all the way down to about 800 psi. We can't find much else that we can do about the thing. Just bring it down
Bien reçu. Laissez le système fonctionner en temps réel et effectuez une acquisition de cible j
Probabilmente non lo so; aspetta che entriamo nel vivo 
Wie
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Индийская комиссия по управлению воздушным движением. Ваше сообщение то появляется, то исчезает. Повторите, где вы находитесь.
मुझे सेकेंडरी लूप को एक्टिवेट करने के बारे में अभी भी थोड़ी उलझन है। आपने प्राइमरी इवेपोरेटर के चालू होन
हमें पता है कि कई देशों के बहुत से वैज्ञानिक चंद्र नमूनों को देखने के लिए उत्सुक हैं, और हमने सोचा कि आप भी इन्हें यहाँ देखना चाहेंगे। ये दो बक्से नमूने वापस लाने वाले कंटेनर हैं। ये वैक्यूम पैक्ड कंटेनर हैं जिन्हें चंद्रमा की सतह पर वैक्यूम में बंद करके सील किया गया था, फिर इन्हें अंदर लाकर इन फाइबर ग्लास बैगों में रखा गया, ज़िप लगाकर बाहर से फिर से सील किया गया, और कमांड मॉड्यूल के किनारे बने इन पात्रों में रखा गया। ये दो बक्से हैं। और जैसे ही हम यान पर पहुँचे
아마 아내분들이 어떤 말씀을 하셨는지 궁금하실 거예요. 닐, 제니는 어제 있었던 일에 대해 이렇게 말했어요. "저녁은 믿을 수 없을 만큼 완벽했어요. 남편, 승무원, 유인 우주선 센터, 미국 국민, 그리고 모든 인류와 함께 달 탐사의 시작이라는 장엄한 경험을 나눌 수 있어서 영광이고 특권입니다." 그러자 제니에게 달 착륙이 인생에서 가장 위대한 순간이었는지 물었더니, "아니요, 그건 우리가 결혼한 날이었어요.
ठीक है। क्षेत्र 27-2 96. 2+02. 08 27 55. 6+35. 10+58. क्षेत्र 28-2: ΔV 111. 2+20. 10 02 54. 4+50. 9+39. क्षेत्र 29-2: ठीक है, यह एक विभाजित ΔV है। आगे 66. पीछे 61. 1+48. 1+17. GMTRC 11 37 05. 3+43. 08+59. क्षेत्र 24-डेल्टा: ΔV 89. 1+53. 03 45 30. 11+03. क्षेत्र 25-डेल्टा: 86. 1+49. 05 19 09. 09+51. 26-BRAVO, क्षेत्र 26-BRAVO: विभाजित ΔV. 66 आगे 104 पीछे. 1+48. 2+10. 07 40 28. 8+54. क्षेत्र 27-DELTA: 98. 2+29. 08 27 54. 6+4
जिम, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपनी मौजूदा फ़ाइन अलाइन का ही इस्तेमाल करें और बाकी बातों को नज़रअंदाज़ करें। हम कुछ एलएमएस सिमुलेशन चलाकर यह देखने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं कि आपकी विंडो से जो जानकारी मिल रही है, उसकी तुलना एलएमएस विंडो से मिल रही जानकारी से की जाए, 
Got the scanners again, I guess. That's
음, 그 지역은 평평해 보이지만, 그를 
Вэнс, мы должны понимать, ч
Gemini 4, Canary CAP COM. Your systems look good, stand by for Surgeo
Apollo 11, Houston. Noch eine Minute. Los, 
لا. أود منك إبقا
네. 제 공은 여전히 ​​파워가 높은 상태이고 지금 270을 조금 넘는 속도로 던지고 있습니다. 롤과 피치에 약간의 오
जेमिन
Тог
Это подтверждается. 30 футов в секунд
休斯顿的奥德赛酒吧。如果你能先稍微理清思路，我们就
알겠습니다. 이번 항법 관측은 연기할 수 있습니다. 원래 예정 시간은 였는데, 연기하는 게 좋겠습니다. 수면 시간에
Хорошо. Мы получили ваш запрос. Мы готовы его отправить, и мы готовы передать вам ваш вектор состояния и в
अब तक हमारी सबसे बड़ी समस्या, 
Ferma la pressione sanguigna. Ok, faremo oscillare R cal un paio di volte nel tentativo
प्लस 59578, माइनस 00086, माइनस 05287, 012 080 018, लागू नहीं, प्लस 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, अर्थ अप 005, राइट 27, प्लस 0398, प्लस 06500 13215 36961; सीरियस रिगे
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Negativa, per ora mi sen
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Wart
マイク、
يبدو أن غالق كاميرا هاسلبلاد عالق في بعض هذه الصور. هذه هي
アクティベーション28の
Houston – Ici
حسنًا. إ
И теперь оно действительно начинает выглядеть немного крупнее. Некоторые детали можно довольно отчетливо разглядеть невооруженным глазом. И пока что, я думаю, я даже соглашусь с Джимом, что оно все еще выглядит довольно серым с белыми пят
Can you see us underneath the over at the
Roger, Jim. D'après nos calculs, Nunki devrait se trouver, au moment de la combustion, assez près du centre. Nous avo
Роджер. И ещё кое-что, Майк. Нам нужно отключить заряд батареи B, а также погода в районе нашей целевой точки посадки сильно ухудшается из-за разрозненных гроз. Мы не хотим с ними связываться, поэтому мы переместим вашу точку прицеливания — точнее, в сторону целевого участка, на расстояние 1500 морских миль, чтобы гарантировать контроль восходящих потоков. Новые координаты: 13 градусов 19 минут северной широты, 169 градусов 10 минут з
Aquarius, Houston
Okay, Fred. Wir werden versuchen, dich ab jetzt nicht mehr anzurufen, damit du vie
I can see them working on McDonnell now on this gain. I imagine there's fur flying. It's going to be when we get back. I'm going to hit them hard on it. I want to know
Verstanden, Jim. Wir arbeiten daran, die Abläufe so schnell wie möglich fertigzustellen und Ihnen zur Verfügung zu stellen. Sie s
ठीक है। यह सही है। फिर पैनल 275 पर
Cavolo! Non ci credo a questa palla 8. È completamente fuori strada. Guardala. È completamente fuori strada. Non c'è propri
Ok, va bene. Po
हाँ, यह अच्छा लग रहा है। मुझे नहीं 
سيجما سفن، سيجما سفن. هاواي كوم تك. على نطاق التردد العا
Roger. La capsule est en train de faire demi-tour et je peux voir le propulseur d'appoint pendant la manœuvre, à quelques centaines de mètres derrière moi. C'étai
双
D'accord, Jack. Tu te souviens que tout le monde a déjà mentionné avoir vu le coucher de la Lune quelques minutes avant le passage de la Lune? Ton horizon sera probablement sombre à ton arrivée, car tu entreras tôt le matin et, en venant de l'oues
レートは非常に安
ठीक है। हम पेज एक्टिवेशन 12 और 13, स्टेप 4 पर हैं, और डिसेंट टॉकबैक्स ग्रे को वेरिफाई कर रहे हैं, और वे बारबरपोल
Computer PRELAUN
吉姆，我们估计你目前已经使用了大约 5
Bene. Dopo Tommy Jacobs, abbiamo la notizia scottante di un'astrologa di Houston di nome Ruby Graham. Dice che tutti i segni sono adatti al tuo viaggio sulla Luna. Neil è intelligente, Mike ha un buon giudizio e Buzz sa risolvere problemi complessi. Dice anche che Neil tende a vedere il mondo attraverso lenti rosa, ma è sempre pronto ad aiu
Yes, we're real close on these data positions
Хорошо, я только что сказал, что Лу
Sigma Seve
11, Houston. Roger. Ihre Winkel sind 45 und 255 Grad. Verstehe ich
아폴로 8호, 고이득을 기다리는 동안 궤적 요약을 계속하겠습니다. 13번째 지점에서 태평양 중부선으로 복귀할 수 있으며, 연소 후 138초가 지나면 귀환이 시작됩니다. 138초면 버터플라이 영역을 벗어나게 됩니다. 20초 이후에는 조기점화나 재시동을 시도하지 않는 것이 좋습니다. 20초를 넘기면 궤적이 수정 범위를 벗어나 자유 귀환으로 이어질 수 있습니다. 귀환 지역의 날씨는 양호합니다. 추적 및 미추진이 가능합니다. 연소 중에는 저장 탱크와 섬프 탱크의 연료 소모로 인해 연소실 압력과 탱크 압력에 약간의 변화가 있을 수 있습니다. 이는 연소 시작 후 2~5초 사이에 발생할 수 있습니다. 두 시스템 모두 압력 변화가 미미할 것입니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동합
肯，你的声
Хо
Не знаю. Я ушёл наверх, сейчас я внизу, Джек. Думаю, когда Джек поднимется, он сможет посмотреть и сообщить мне. Хорошо, я подумаю о том, чтобы переключиться прямо сюда, в корму. Я вижу Луну, и Луна выглядит довольно хорошо, Джек, так 
جيميني 4،
फ्रेंडशिप सेव
Okay. Capisco cosa stai dic
罗杰，东82号。谢谢
plus 44, / 62970, minus 162, plus 129, pl
Okay. I'm within thr
حسناً. سخان
Sì, credo di sì. Aspetta un s
わかりました。彼はずっと前から知っていたと言っています。彼は、あなたが水を大量に捨てていることを非
هل ت
D'accord, Jim, nous venons de vérifier vos angles, et tout semble correct. Votre position est bonne. Nous ne pouvons pas encore expliq
Frank, probabilmente te l'hanno già detto, ma oggi eri in TV fantastico. Un piccolo dettaglio, però. Nella zona di El Lago sei stato messo in ombra da Babbo Natale. È arriv
حسنًا يا فانس. لقد اكتشفنا بعض الأشياء لتعديل الخرطوشة. أولها كيس الغبار الخاص الذي كنا سنستخدمه على حقائب الحمل، وهو سميك جدًا وغير مسامي؛ وصعدنا إلى المطبخ في الطابق العلوي وقمنا بتفريغ الماء عدة مرات أخرى، وصنعنا مجموعة كبيرة من أكياس المشروبات، مرة أخرى؛ ومن المخزن، أحضرنا علبة بلاستيكية كبيرة نوعًا
Ruhe bewahren, Houston. Die erste Frage lautet: Wie schätzen Sie die Gierrate im Vergleich zum nominalen V
罗杰。然后往左上方，或者说往北看，我们可
أبولو 8، هيوستن. اقتربنا من أربع دقائق. جميع الأنظمة
Роджер. Мы не х
Во время разъединения переместите переключатель ближе к себе
Нет. Мы не видели "Агену" с тех пор, как отс
Okay. plus 90: /G&N, 63825, minus 1.54, plus 1.32,, minus 0491.7, plus 0000.1, plus 6634.0, 180, 228, 001; N/A; plus 0017.9, 6652.2, 7:37, 6626.5, 26, 155.4, 15.7; Zeta Sag
You can see the sig
Sì, signore. Questa è la mappa. Ogni piega è contrassegnata con una lettera nell'angol
Роджер, CSQ. Ты провалил этот раунд, но всё ж
了解しまし
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8. ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8. आप
That's negative. Midcourse number 4 is not required. We were going to let you sleep in until
ठीक है
Okay. Batterie A 38,3, Batterie B 36,9, Batterie C 38,5. Das sieht gut aus. Es scheint, 
야, 찰리, 캘리포니아 산에 눈이 쌓인 게 보여. 그리고 LA는 오늘 스모그 문제가
روجر. إليك ما يلي: 5، / 45701، ناقص 043، زائد 116، زائد 31171، ناقص 00767، ن
Ge
我不太确定。它看起来是个相当大的
Apollo 8, Houston. Hai il VIA libera per
Und, James, das sieht nach einer Ausbeute von etwa 8 g au
Quello che abbiamo cercato di fare è stato spostare un po' la frequenza in modo da avere meno interfe
Da is
ジェミニ4号、ジェミニ4号、こちらRKV CAP C
Gemini 4, hier spricht d
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很神奇，就是眼睛还没适应的时候，周围一片漆黑。我确实能看到窗户上有一些涂层。现在要回到超高频VOX模式进行发射。打开面罩擦拭右侧麦克风。我舔了一下。关上面罩。面罩立刻密封，以便宇航服电路开始工作。我可不想再被它弄脏。宇航服进气口的温度稳定在68度左右。所以穹
네, 맞아요. 복숭아랑 초콜릿 
好的。我来快速总结一下系统情况。基本上，所有系统都运行良好。关于返航轨迹，我们最晚可以等到13号再返回，到达
ऐसा लगता है कि सेकेंडरी स्ट्रट पर थोड़ा थर्
彼の声が聞こえるように、Sバンドをオフにしなければなりませんでした。オーディオパネルのSバ
CB MAIN Baker，BAT Charli
罗杰。我想它还会变小的
아폴로 11
ठीक है। हमारे पास यहाँ तीन कैमरे हैं, जिनमें से दो का इस्तेमाल तस्वीर लेने के लिए किया जाएगा, और एक का इस्तेमाल नंबर 5 वाली खिड़की से किया जाएगा। सबसे पहले, मैं कैमरों के बारे में बताता हूँ। और जिस कैमरे का मैं अभी ज़िक्र कर रहा हूँ, उसे पहली प्राथमिकता दी जानी चाहिए। इसे सबसे अच्छे परिणाम देने वाला माना जाता है
11、了解。
你看，在这里我们根本不知道哪
Beh, ci stiamo lavorando ancora un po'. Non sono sicuro che sia tutto perduto. Sembra che il nostro problema sia che l'intensità luminosa rilevata dal nostro esposimetro rileva un campo medio molto più ampio del
你刚才给出的逆向发射的格林尼治标准
Да, похоже, Чарли. Всё так же, ка
물론이죠
Bene. Grazie, e comi
روجر. انتظر
حسنًا. التالي، الصفحة 
حسنًا يا بيل. قبل أن نقرأ التحديث المهم هنا، أود أن أشرح لجيم باختصار الإجراء ا
Sie können es zu BLOCK zurückbringen, und zu Bills Information: Die neueste Schätzung der Spannung am Hauptbus beträgt 2
嗯——巴兹，那个70毫米的容器里只有一盒黑白胶卷和一盒彩色胶卷——难道不应该是这
내 창문은 더 이상 빛이 들어오지 않는데도 별이 보이지 않아요. 만약 세상에 낮과 지평선에서 동시에 별을 볼 수 있는 가능성이 있다면, 지금 내가 바로 그럴 수 있는 위치에
Affermativo, 
13, Houston. Zu Ihrer Information
Apollo 8, Houston. Ihre Perizynth-Ortsgenauigkeit ist noch gut, plus/minus eine Minute, und wir werden sie auf eine feine Kartenmessung gen
Roger. Heure de décollage: 124 h 22 min 00 s. Votre soudage TIG, répétez: 125 h 19 min 34 s. Votre TIG ou TPI: 126 h 57 mi
Я не нашёл его с наступлением темноты. Он... он... он довольно сильно блуждает, Дик. Он не полностью надут и не натягивается на тросе так туго, как я ожидал. Он подпрыгивает и выпрыгивает, колеблется вверх и вниз, и в стороны. Пока нет
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अब उसी क्षेत्र को ऊपर से देखने पर ऐसा लगता है कि यह पृथ्वी की रोशनी को प्रतिबिंबित कर रहा है। मुझे पक्का नहीं पता कि इसे लगभग शून्य कलाय पर सेट किया गया था या नहीं - खैर, कम से कम क्रेटर की एक दीवार बाकी दीवारों से ज़्यादा रोशन दिखती है, और अगर हम पृथ्वी के साथ सही दिशा में हैं, तो वह दीवार लगभग शून्य कलाय पर लगती है। वह क्षेत्र निश्चित रूप से इस खिड़की से दिखाई देने वाली किसी भी चीज़ से ज़्यादा चमकीला है। मुझे पक्का नहीं पता कि मैं कोई फॉस्फोरेसेंस देख पा रहा हूँ, लेकिन यह निश्चित रूप से आसपास की किसी भी च
R كال
درجة حرارة فتحة تهوية البخار في المقصورة ١٠، ودرجة حرارة فتحة تهوية البخار في البدلة ٦٢. أرغب في زيادة طفيفة في درجة الحرارة، لكنني لا أستطيع تحقيق ذلك. درجة حرارة البدلة ٦٠ درجة، بينما درجة حرارة المقصورة ١٠٢ درجة. تبقى لدي ٢٢ دقيقة و٢٠ ثانية لإعادة تشغيل نظام الإطفاء. أعتقد 
Okay. Heute möchten wir, dass Sie vor den Beobachtungen, wie in den Verfahren beschrieben, und anschließend eine Zapfenabweichungsmessung durchführen. Wir möchten damit überprüfen, ob thermische Effekte die Winkelmessung im Sextanten verfälschen. Die zuvor ermittelte Abweichung sollte berücksichtigt werden. Fahren Sie mit Schritt 87 fort, sobald zwei aufeinanderfolgende Messungen innerhalb von 0,003 Grad übereinstimmen. Verstellen Sie den Zapfen zwischen den Messungen um einige Grad. Die Erde sollte heute in Ihrem Sichtfeld deutlich kleiner erscheinen. Sie können uns das sicherlich besser erklären als wir, aber um eine korrekte Winkelmessung zwischen Stern und Horizont zu gewährleisten, muss die M-Linie des Sextanten – die Linie, die durch die beiden Striche verläuft und senkrecht zur R-Linie steht – am Substellarpunkt parallel zum Horizont verlaufen. Die eigentliche Überlagerung des Sterns mit dem Horizont kann dann an jeder beliebigen Stelle im Sichtfeld des Sextanten erfolgen: oberhalb, unterhalb oder auf der M-Linie. Wir empfehlen, die Markierungen so schnell wie möglich nach dem AUTO-Manöver anzubringen. Falls Ihnen die Zeits
휴스턴의 Associated 소속 해리 로젠탈 기자가 쓴 기사입니다. 두 명의 산타가 두 살배기 제프리 러벨의 크리스마스 이브를 더욱 특별하게 만들어 주었습니다. 첫 번째 산타는 집 문을 두드리고 선물을 가져다주었고, 두 번째 산타는 아빠를 달에서 집으로 데려다 주었습니다. 첫 번째 산타는 빨간 옷에 하얀 수염을 기르고 "호호" 하고 큰 소리로 외쳐 멀리까지 들렸습니다. 두 번째 산타는 달 뒤편에서 불꽃을 뿜어내는 거대한 엔진이었고, 수많은 사람들이 엔진이 점화되었다는 소식을 애타게 기다리고 있었습니다. "산타클로스가 있다는 것을 알려드립니다." 아폴로 8호는 엔진이 중요한 연소를 성공적으로 마친 지 15분 만에 무선 침묵을 깨고 전 세계에 이 소식을 전하며 처음으로 이렇게 말했습니다. "우리 모두 이보다 더 좋은 크리스마스 선물을 기대한 적이 없습니다." 관제센터의 켄 매팅리는 이렇게 말했습니다. "지상에 계신 모든 분들께 감사를 전합니다. 여러분 없이는 불가능했을 겁니다." 우주선 사령관 프랭크 보먼 대령이 답했습니다. 바로 그때, 관제센터 콘솔 앞에 크리스마스트리가 환하게 빛났고, 우주비행사 해리슨 슈미트는 승무원들에게 우주 버전의 "성 니콜라스의 방문"을 읽어주었다. "크리스마스 이브 밤, 우주 저 멀리에서 아폴로 8호 승무원들은 달 착륙 경쟁에서 승리했습니다."로 시작하는 이 동화는, 제프리의 아버지인 해군 대령 제임스 러벨과 공군 소령 윌리엄 A. 앤더스, 그리고 보먼 대령이 무사히 귀환할 때까지 축하 행사를 미뤄두었다. 여느 때와 같은 크리스마스 이브라면 우주비행사 가
Roger. Ho una leggera imbardata di circa mezz
了解。すぐにもう一度、ここで通
알겠습니다, 조. 마지막으로 양성 반응을 확인한 건 프레드가 약 5시간 전에 가스가 분출되는 걸 봤을 때였어요. 나중에 다시 확인했을 수도 
Okay. Zunächst einmal wird die Kurskorrektur voraussichtlich nach 104 Stunden erfolgen, und wir streben lediglich eine Delta-v-Änderung von 4 bis 6 Fuß pro Sekunde an. Okay. Das ist der erste Punkt. Nun gebe ich Ihnen einen Überblick über die Verbrauchsmaterialien. Okay. Sie haben noch 1498 Amperestunden – das entspricht 14
Let's not read that 
حسنًا. يبدو أن الصوت العادي غير قابل للاختراق. في خزانات التبريد، لاحظنا تفاوتًا كبيرًا في توزيع الأكسجين، خاصةً، وهذا واضح أثناء دورات المروحة، لذا سنحرص على تقليب الأكسجين قبل التشغيل. يعمل النظام بسلاسة تامة. تشير بيانات التحكم والتوجيه إلى أن الكميات جيدة.
로저. 컬럼비아, 이글.
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 중간 항로 이후 관측 결과 감마 값은 -6.57로 나타났습니다. 이는 예비 수치이며, 추가 추적을 통해 정확한 항로를 찾아 착륙 경로로 진입할 수 있을 것으로 예상됩니다. 현재 항로의 거의 중앙에 위치해 있으며, 모든 것이 순조롭게 진행되고 있습니다. 두어 시간 후 취침 전에 착륙 지점 정보를 알려드리겠습니다. 공보실에서 전해드리는 소식입니다. 아폴로 11호의 비행 소식 외에도 몇 가지 주요 뉴스가 있습니다. 아폴로 11호는 여전히 뉴스의 중심을 차지하고 있습니다. 하지만 그 외에도 흥미로운 소식이 몇 가지 더 있습니다. 앞서 말씀드린 대로 올스타전이 비 때문에 취소되었습니다. 내일 경기가 열릴 예정입니다. 하지만 닉슨 대통령은 예정대로 
Ed u
Как ты
好的。第一个动作是机动，一，这将是一个/从重量开始，63295减去163加上129加上00136减去00045加上002023451883439999
Ok. Ti d
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Все обновлен
Bonjour, ou bon après-midi, ou peu importe. Le commandant est de retour à la salle de contrôle; il est retourné
Роджер, я так понимаю, ты видишь Пле
रॉजर। वे दिखाई तो देते हैं, लेकिन उन
Rog
이 기체를 가지고 놀 시간이 30분도 채 남지 않았다는 게 너무 슬프네요. 이제 플라이 바이 와이어 저고도 모드로 전환하겠습니다. 자이로스코프를 해제하고 더반 등대를 관측하기 위해 기체를 아래로 내리겠습니다. 자이로스코프 해제, 플라이 바이 와이어 저고도 모드, 수정, 이제 수동 비례 제어로 전환하겠습니다. 아직 요금을 청구하지 않았으니 이전 설정으로 돌아가겠습니다. 깔끔하네요. 요금 명령으로 이동합
Roger. Tieni presente che la combinazione mig
Roger. C'est ça. C'est ce que je voulais que tu vérifies pour moi pendant que j'étais à ta station, Scott. Merci. Donc, il semb
わか
Houston, Verseau. Odyssey essaie de v
姿勢
这里是友
Okay, and finally, four LiOH cans, the ones used in the, and those can go in the jettison bag in the. Okay,
Bill möchte den freundlichen Flugarzt um Erlaubnis bitten, ein Seconal einnehmen zu dürfen, damit er 
حسناً. الكابينة هنا ببساطة، سمينة، غبية، وسعيدة، لم أضطر لفعل أي شيء حيالها. الآن، هل كنت تراقب محول الطاقة الخاص 
分かりました。マイク、何が起こったかというと…ご存知の通り、あなたはそこに座って監視していました。ステップ7でNOUN 01に入り、アドレスとINFORMATION INFORMATIONを入力しました。そして、最後のENTERキー35400 ENTERを押すと、その直後に…16に戻ります。そしてENTERを押すと、実際にCDUに情報を入力したことになります。レジスタ1とレジスタ2に2つのエントリが入力されると、実際のCDUは瞬時に変化しました。そしてそれを見て、自分が持っていると思っていたものを確認しました。なんと、毎秒600度の速度でした。そして、その速度を取り除こうとジェットが作動したのです。そして、それが監視している速度フィルターは…ええ、監視している速度はフィルターされているので、物体が既に600度に達していない限り、実際の速度を感知できません。そして速度フィルターの読み取りを開始し、「実際には600度には達していなかった」と判断します。そこで装置を停止し、速度を落とそうとします。しかし、それが起こるまでにはある程度のタイムラグがあり、それが速度が上昇していた理由です。ジェットは作動しており、瞬間的に毎秒600度…おそらく600度に達する速度のため、
ठीक है। ये हैनी की प्रेस विज्ञप्ति। सुबह के अखबार में छपा है कि आप 5 दिनों तक नहीं जा रहे हैं। यह बात कल रात एक प्रेस कॉन्फ्रेंस में उठी थी और इस सवाल के जवाब में क्रिस ने कहा कि
Fantastico! Sarò felice di vederli. Ti mostriamo GO qui a terra e h
Okay. Vuoi aspettare di averlo prima di darlo vi
Не сейчас, Рон. Напомни мне 
ها! ها! ما زالت آثار الانزلاق السوداء على زعانف السباحة من رحلتك إلى الأدغال. حسنًا، كما ترى، انحرفتُ يمينًا مرة أخرى. أحتاج إلى العودة - تصحيح، انحرفتُ يسارًا. أحتاج إلى العودة يمينًا، فالقمر على الأفق. سأعيد ضبطها، فقط لأريك مدى سهولة ذلك. يبدو أنني أحافظ على الحد الأدنى من الوقو
알겠습니다. 다음으로, 고이득 안테나로 신호를 수신하고, 자동 추적 모드로 전환한 후
收到。我完全明白你的意思。你能告诉我们一下你的减压情况
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نحن على
Il tramonto è piuttosto suggestivo, non credo di dover perdere molto tempo a guardarli. Sono molto interessanti. L'altra cosa affascinante è quanto sia buio quando gli occhi non sono abituati. Vedo sicuramente un po' di patina sul finestrino. Torno a VOX a questo punto in UHF-hi per trasmettere. Apro la visiera per pulire il microfono destro. L'ho leccato. Chiudo la visiera. La visiera è stata sigillata immediatamente per consentire al circuito della tuta di funzionare al mio posto. Non voglio rovinarmi di nuovo. L'ingresso della tuta si mantiene molto bene a circa 20 gradi. Quindi la cupola tornerà di nuovo su. Ora è a 23, 24 gradi. A quanto pare questa impostazione più alta è quella che vogliamo. Credo che aggiungerò un altro mezzo segno e potremmo averla agganciata. Finalmente si sta raffreddando un po', quindi so dove voglio arrivare con l'impostazione. Ho impostato la quantità di refrigerante per la tuta e la leva di comando a 8,5. La lettura della cupola in questo momento è di 75 gradi. L'ingresso della tuta è di 68 gradi. Molto piacevole. Sento aria fresca che mi attraversa il viso. La quantità di ossigeno sembra davvero b
オーロラセブン、こちらはイン
はい、大丈夫です。キャニスターの底から2インチほど余分な袋がはみ出ていると思います。これが下の網に吸い込まれてしまわないように、ハサミで切り取ってください。切り取ったら、さらに12インチくらいの長さのテープを2本切り、縦に切って、長さ12インチ、幅1/2インチのテープを4本作ります。そして、その4本を使って、キャニスターの側面から袋の外側にテープを通し、キャ
रॉजर। 40 2711 398 033, नीचे 043, बाएँ 23, प्लस 0832 माइनस 16500 12956 36208; उत्तर दिशा में स्थ
好的。在零下 05:05，地球的晨昏线正在形成；在
- - 그것
Заглянув за границу, мы обнаружили, что первая
休斯顿，水瓶座；你如何解读
了解しました。NOUN 33から始めます。130 30 0000、プラス00020、プラス全てゼロ、プラス全てゼロ。ロールは全てゼロ、ピッチ230、ヨーゼロ。NA
この六分儀に
ठीक है। कृपया कुछ मिनटो
Родже
双子座4号，这里是休斯顿外科医生。我们已经测得您的口腔温度。
- نود إعلامكم بأنه لن تظهر أي مؤشرا
Yes. Okay. I'll put that on at minus 5, and I'll fire on the time -- on the count of zero. No delay o
नहीं। दरअसल, मैं काफी देर से फेसप्लेट खोलकर चारों ओर देख रहा था कि कहीं कोई नमी तो नहीं है। वास्तव में, यहाँ सापेक्ष आर्द्रता थोड़ी कम हो गई है और अंतरिक्ष यान म
ठीक है। यह मिडकोर्स-7 कॉरिडोर नियंत्रण है, N/A; 42, N/A; प्लस 0020.5; 0019.3। बर्न टाइम, 0:3
D'accord, Apollo 8. Nous aimerions
ちょっと面白い、ちょっと嬉しいニュースがあります。ミシガン州アナーバーに、新しい若者ギャングが誕生したそうです。ギルネット・ギャングという名前で、アナーバーの街を徘徊し、秘密裏に活動し、時には法の網をかいくぐっています。彼らは自らを「善のためのゲリラ」と名乗っています。彼らの活動の一つに、卑猥な言葉で埋め尽くされた橋をペンキで塗ったことがありました。ある夜、彼らはそれをペンキで塗りつぶしたのです。近所の子供たちに人気があるものの危険な廃屋は板で覆われました。企業と政府のどちらが責任を負っているのかという議論で埋め尽くされてしまったダウンタウンのプランターには、花が植えられました。交通量の多い交差点の視界を妨げていると考えられていた生垣が刈り込まれ、所有者は激怒しました。ヒューロン川沿いのゴミ拾いも行われました。ギャングのメンバーは匿名のティーンエイジャーで、個人として認められようとはしません。彼らの目的は、官僚主義を打破し、物事（彼らにとって良いこと）を成し遂げることです。この組織にはかすかな宗教的色合いがある。ミシガン大学の助教授は、ギャングの思想について非公式に意見交換する場を設けており、一種のエキュメニカルなグループだと語る。名前は聖ペテロ、漁師の網に由来する。また、特定の教会と結び付けられないほど人
Je suppose que les vibrations étaient présentes en permanen
Ci stiamo preparando a fornirvi una panoramica dei vostri sistemi. Analizzeremo tutti i passaggi finali e vi racconteremo cosa vediamo in termini di tra
Да. Я проверил разъемы с обоих концов. Не думаю, что 
कोलंबिया, अगली ब
Gem
Houston, Apollo 11. We're ready for the logic check whenever you are. We're standing by to arm the logic. We've got ELS logic on, ELS
Ricevuto. Ci aspettavamo un superamento dell'esame Aero-Med 
A, 
Jack, qui è Houston. Voglia
جيميني 6، كيف بدت عملية إعادة الدخول على العدادا
Аполлон-8, Аполлон-8, э
Роджер. Я подожду, пока вы заверш
罗杰。尼尔，我们觉
Хорошо, хор
ठीक है, स्कॉट। आपको शुभकामन
Wir werden alles tun, was Sie für notwendig halten, aber ich möchte nicht in letzter Minute noch Änderungen vornehmen müssen. Uns geht es vor allem darum, das Kom
新数据点 50.40 Theta，7.9；R，92.2
짐, 지금처럼 정밀한 관측을 유지하시고 다른 부분은 무시해 주세요. 저희는 LMS 시뮬레이션을 통해 당신의 창문에서 보이는 것과 LMS 창문에서 보이는 것을 비교하여 상관관계를 파악하려고 합니다.
Roger. Looks like you are gettin
Dovranno darti di nuovo l'aria condizionata e tu do
Bene. Il PAD di ingresso è l'area MIDPAC: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, più 1102, meno 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28; DL e VL, tutti e quattro non sono applicabili; DO, 4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380; la stella di puntamento è Scorpio Theta, in alto 314, a destra 34, vettore di risalita in alto. Commenti: i dati di ingresso presuppongono l'assenza di manovre a metà rotta. Il tuo ingresso sulla Terra: meno 30 minuti; controllo dell'orizzonte, 194 più 33 più 03. Il tuo passo è 29
11, Houston. During your burn as played back on tape down here, we've observed the nitrogen tank Bravo pressure in the system dropping a little bit more than we anticipated. It's holding steady right now. We'll continue to watch it a
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। 
روجر، ١١. ليس لدينا هذه الإمكانية. لكننا نشت
أسمعك جيداً. سأنتقل إلى: 1، 2، 
حسنًا. الأمر الوحيد الذي نرغب جميعًا أن تفهموه هو أننا لا نُصرّ على استخدام القمر والأرض؛ فإذا وجدتم نجومًا مناسبة، فلماذا تستخدمونها؟ مع ذلك، فإن هذا الت
好的。我们刚才似乎锁定了目标——大概一分钟前，“TUNE FOR MAX
一つあげますよ
Right. I'll try to give you a little 
了解しました。それから、クワッドの温度ですが、ボトルの上限は105度です。あなたはそれをはるかに下回っています。私たちはそれを監視していますが、追跡はしていますが、非常にゆっくりとしています。宇宙船を回転させると、温度の変動が少し鈍くなっているように見えますが、センサーが凍結しているわけではありません。それについてもう少しお話ししましょう。ジムに、次に光学部品、つまりトラニオンを扱う際に、ゼロ光学スイッチをリサイクル
ああ、ずれてる。そうだ、月は消えて、
なあ、まあ
Und die – Rückmeldeanzeigen an der, ich habe jetzt HELIUM 1, sind alle grau. HELIUM 2, sind alle grau. PRIMÄRTREIBSTOFF, alles grau. SEKUNDÄRTREIBSTOFF, ich habe zwei Barber-Pole-Anzeigen, und A ist Barber-Pole, B ist grau, C i
Et l'un des avantages, Jack, surtout pour un novice comme moi, c'est la facilité avec laquelle on se déplace ici. Comme tu le sais pour avoir travaillé dans le simulateur du module de commande, l'apesanteur est un atout considérable. À 1 g, on se sent vraiment à l'étroit, et c'est beaucoup plus facile dans cet environnement. Comme tu peux le voir, c'était plutôt propre. J'ai trouvé quelques rondelles qui se décollaient et un petit capuchon en plastique de la caméra de séquence qui s'était détaché et que j'ai retrouvé coincé près du panneau ED. Bon. Juste en dessous de Jim, il se tient sur ce qui ressemble à un conteneur. Et, pour que tout le monde soit bien placé, à l'intérieur de ce conteneur se trouve le moteur de remontée. J'espère que tu peux voir ma main posée dessus, le moteur qui nous
We expect that your water rate is going to drop off and at the time, DELTA will go up to 160 - 165 hours quite shor
Roger. Compri
Roger, Mike. Das ist wirklich nett, aber wenn es euch nichts ausmacht, solltet ihr damit lieber warten, bis wir diesen Tracking-Test abgeschlossen habe
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。ここでアポロ12号の飛行計画
- - हम चाहते हैं कि आप सीधे 060 पर जाएं और धूमकेतु बेनेट की फोटोग्राफी के लिए अपनी दरें शून्य कर दें। ऐसा करने के लिए, हम चाहते हैं कि आप क्वाड C और D को सक्रिय करें। इस प्रक्रिया के लिए, अपने सभी क्वाड का उपयोग करें। और ठीक 1 मिनट में, हम चाहते हैं कि आप बैटरी B की बैटरी चार्ज 
रॉजर. प्लस 90, जी एंड एन: 63481, माइनस 153, प्लस 132, 004 10 25 38, माइनस 04761, प्लस 00001, प्लस 53361, 180 193 000, लागू नहीं, प्लस 00203 53
Roger. plus 90, G&N: 63481, moins 153, plus 132, 004 10 25 38, moins 04761, plus 00001, plus 53361, 180 193 000, non applicable, plus 0020
アクエリア
Roger. Lo scopo principale di questo è, come ho detto, permetterci di controllare il tuo trasduttore di flusso di O2. Tuttavia, abbiamo ancora bisogno di circa 2 ore di arricchimento della cabina, quindi vorremmo mantenere attiva la ventola che installeremo a questo scopo. Bene. Vogliamo che installiate il connettore rapido della ventola della cabina che troverete nel compartimento R-6, ovvero Romeo 6, sul connettore per l'urina sul pannello 251. Una volta completata questa operazione, verificate che la valvola di sfiato dello stivaggio dei rifiuti sia chiusa, quindi aprite o posizionate lo scar
Allez-y, 11
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। ऐसा लगता है कि आप लोग हमसे बहुत तेज़ हैं, इसलिए हम जेटिसन टाइम को बढ़ाकर लगभग 130 
रॉजर। हमने सेकेंडरी वॉटर EVAP कंट्रोल वाल्व बंद कर दिया है, लेकिन हो सकता है कि उसने रिटर्न पंप चार्ट चेक के दौरान इवेपोरेटर बैक-प्रेशर वाल्व 
Okay. Molto bene. Quando vuoi, puoi darci i rapporti sulle radiazioni, immagino. Stiamo preparando un aggiornam
分かりました。それについてコメントさせてください。私たちがあなたに提示したロール角は、ピッチ角がちょうど90度になるように計算されたものだと思います。で
Понял. Прикрепите камеру к регулируемому кронштейну для телевизора и прикрепите кронштейн к точке крепления телевизора на стороне командира люк
रॉ
Beh, potresti dirlo. Non s
Roger, Bill. Vous pensez que vous allez pouvoi
いいえ。今のところは問題ありません。注視しており、この件については検討中であることをお知らせしたかっただけです。変更が必要だと感じる状
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Вы пов
알겠습니다. 그 다음, CB CTE, MAIN B를 눌러 닫습니다. 다음으로, 250번 패널: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2를 눌러 닫고, CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING을 눌러 닫습니다. 다음으로, 275번 패널: CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B를 눌러 닫
È stato davvero
여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. 기분이 정말 좋고, 드디어 슈트 제어를 마스터
Мы это обсуждали. Мы решили завтра заняться уходом за бородами и сд
Well, first of all, it's about the SPC Yaw Maneuver. I have some dope 
C'est exact, et nous serions également intéressés par tout commentaire concernant l'impact de ces différents rejets sur vos optiques, le cas échéant, et la durée de c
好的。你们都明白了
Roger. 4 überarbeitet: SPS/G&N: 38320, minus 055, plus 060 084 30 2749, plus 31380, plus 03475, minus 01032
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। अपोलो 11। ये लीजिए आपके लिए एक 
अंतरिक्ष यान के अंदर के लिए 16 मिमी सेटिंग वाला एक मूवी कैमरा भी ले लें। हमारे पास एक बड़ा बग आई कैमरा है, और हमने सोचा
Хорошо, Билл. Это будет на странице 2-22 вашего плана полета. Пилоту командного модуля — я уже говорил ему об этом — но вверху страницы, примерно, мы бы хотели, чтобы он выполнил выравнивание, а затем все должно быть сделано по расписанию. Эти четыре звезды: Процион, Регул, Альфард, и мы понимаем, что Альфард может быть не очень хорошей звездой, Регул находится примерно в 3 градусах над горизонтом, а Спика расположена под углом 48 градусов; поэтому, я думаю, мы говорим, что если у Джима возникнут трудности с выполнением одного набора наблюдений на каждой
Everyt
开始对齐之后，我一开始用的参考基准很差，因为我们当时正忙着完成MSC-10项目。大概花了15到1
सेवन, तुम तेजी से कमजोर
أبولو 
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. أنظمتكم جميعها تعمل بشكل جيد. تلقينا تحديثًا لخطة الرحلة في الوقت 96، يمكنكم حذفه. معدلات انحرافكم منخف
शुरुआत में, एक और बचाव पैंतरेबाज़ी के कारण, निर्धारित समय पर हमारी अवलोकन प्रक्रिया तुरंत शुरू नहीं हो सकी। इस प्रक्रिया के कारण क्षेत्र में बड़ी मात्रा में नकली तारे बन गए, जिससे ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन लगभग असंभव हो गया। हमने जो तरीका विकसित किया था, वह भी कारगर नहीं रहा। अंततः मैंने जो तरीका अपनाया, वह था सीरियस तारे तक जाना, जो हमारा सबसे चमकीला तारा था, वहाँ से शाफ्ट और ट्रनियन प्राप्त करना, और फिर अंतरिक्ष यान को सीरियस तक ले जाना ताकि उसका उपयोग ऑप्टिक्स के लिए किया जा सके, जो हमने बाद में किया। प्रकाश प्रकीर्णन के संबंध में, ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि हमारे निष्क्रिय तापीय नियंत्रण के दौरान लगभग किसी भी स्थिति में, स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में प्रकाश प्रकीर्णन हो रहा है। यह मुख्य रूप से स्कोप के केंद्र के ठीक पार शून्य से लगभग 10 डिग्री दोनों दिशाओं में प्रकाश की एक चौड़ी पट्टी के रूप में दिखाई देता है। इस क्षेत्र में तारों को देखना बहुत मुश्किल है। पुनः संरेखण सफल रहे हैं। मैंने सेक्स्टेंट में तारे को देखकर संरेखण तो कर लिया, लेकिन स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में रेगोर या मेनकेंट जैसे मामलों में उपयोग किए जाने वाले तारे की पहचान नहीं कर पाया। पृथ्वी का जो पहला तारा अवलोकन मैंने किया, उसमें क्षितिज बहुत धुंधला दिखाई दिया। लेकिन पृथ्वी के क्षितिज और वायुमंडल के बीच एक स्पष्ट रेखा दिखाई दी। लैंडमार्क लाइन-ऑफ-साइट फिल्टर ने इस क्षितिज को स्पष्ट करने में मदद की। अंतरिक्ष और वायुमंडल के ऊपरी भाग के बीच एक बहुत धुंधला और अस्पष्ट क्षितिज है, और इसका उपयोग करना बहुत मुश्किल है। जैसा कि मैंने पहले कहा, कभी-कभी सूर्य के निकट होने पर चंद्रमा को देखने पर, चंद्रमा के आसपास का क्षेत्र, चंद्रमा के आसपास का अंतरिक्ष अंधेरा नहीं होता, बल्कि हल्का नीला दिखाई देता है। और सूर्य के ऑप्टिक्स के आसपास होने पर तारे के साथ संरेखण के दौरान सेक्स्टेंट में देखने पर भी यही स्थिति होती है। हालांकि, मुझे सेक्स्टेंट में इन तारों को खोजने में कोई कठिनाई नहीं होती है। तारा क्षितिज माप के दौरान, मुझे सीरियस, प्रोसियोन या कैनोपस जैसे तारों को पृथ्वी के संदर्भ में देखने में कोई कठिनाई नहीं हुई। मैं पृथ्वी की पृष्ठ
Beh, non dice
是的，地
Roger, 13-BRAVO; 146, 03+32. 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 27 11. 56 46. 3+17, 8+36. 14-BRAVO: 04+07, 09+03. 15-BRAVO: 121, 02+34, 14 10 30, 8+35, 16-BRAVO: 096, 02+03, 15 50 26. 11+28. 158, 3+48, 16 28 28, 2+39, 08+22. 17-BRAVO: 087, 01+51, 17 26 03, 10
Eagle, liest 
Роджер. Мы сейчас эти
Nessuna gioia per i tuoi razzi. Non
はい、
Credo di sì, Ken. Questa banda è parallela alla linea M, e credo che abbia a che fare con il design dell'ottica, dove abbiamo quell'albero o l'ingresso rettangolare dell'ottica dall'esterno. A questo particolare angolo del sole, taglia completamente. Ora, ho notato che sia la Terra che il Sole fanno questo al telescopio a scansione. Nel sestante, la stessa banda luminosa è presente, sebbene copra l'intero campo visivo del sestante. Tuttavia, l'ingrandimento mette in risalto le stelle abbastanza bene, ed è possibile marcarle. Ma l'identificazione delle stelle con il telescopio a scansione rende il tutto molto difficile. Ora, l'assetto in cui ho scoperto che l'ottica è migliore è quello che mostra le costellazioni del Cane Maggiore e di Orione nel telescopio a scansione. In questo particolare assetto della sonda, la banda scompare; siamo in una posizione in cui il Sole è alle nostre spa
وجيم، بخصوص الإعداد، بعد إتمام عملية 400 + 5، يجب عليك إتمام 
Okay. Houston,
I'm feeling fine, continue flight. Machine working stable. I see Earth in the window, s
Vance，你如何解读VOX上的CM
Всё чётко и ясно. Я просто 
Friendship Seven, this is Kano Cap Com, I read you loud and clear. How do you read me? 
They sure did. They're about 5 minutes ahead o
हाँ, ठीक है। पंक्ति 4 के अंतर्गत, ग्लाइकोल पंप ऑटो ट्रांसफर के नीचे, बंद करें। यूपी डेटा लिंक के अंतर्गत, खोलें; वीएचएफ बी और वीएचएफ ए खुले होने चाहिए। / के अंतर्ग
PLA와 CLA 관련해서 현재 업데이트된 사항이 있으신가요
Roger. Sonnenuntergangsbeginn ist 18+13, AOS-Beginn 18+
罗杰，阿尔。我目前处于自动模式；逆向飞行模式；陀螺仪开关正常；机动模式已关闭。太空舱已准备好进行逆向飞行，但需要存放两张航图。我确信一切就绪。我的自动模式（燃料）完成度为 81%，手动模式（燃料）完成度为 80%，这与我
酸素高率チェック開始時の酸素量は65%
로저. 여러분 모두 자연스러운 TV 프로그
Хорошо, Хьюсто
L
बूथिल, ड्यूक द्वीप, साइडविंडर, मास्केलाइन डब्ल्यू को देखते हुए, यह यॉ राउंड चेकपॉइंट है, और टर्मिनेटर की ओर बढ़ते हुए। टर्मिनेटर पर आसमान राख जैसा और धूसर है। जैसे-जैसे आप टर्मिनेटर से दूर जाते हैं, रंग हल्का धूसर होता जाता है, और जैसे-जैसे आप उप-सौर बिंदु 
D'accord. En gros, c'est exact. Je vais vous l'expliquer rapidement, puis je vous détaillerai les étapes. Ce sera plus clair. Le principe est le suivant: on peut se diriger vers des angles de visée qui permettent de pointer les optiques vers la Lune. À tout moment, quelle que soit l'orientation du télescope, si vous parvenez à distinguer des constellations suffisamment nettes pour effectuer l'alignement vous-même, c'est à ce moment-là que nous vous laissons le soin de procéder. Cepend
يُطلب منا القيام بأعمال التنظيف، وتخزين الخوذات وحقائب التخزين؛ وإخراج المرآة وقائمة التحقق ومجموعة التخلص. ثم تخزين مجموعة التخزين المؤقتة، وإخراجها وتهيئتها للاستخدام مع عدسة 16 ملم، HC-EX، f/4، 500، لانهائي، 6 إطارات في الثانية. هذا كل ما هو مذكور في تلك الصفحة. هذا هو وضعنا الحالي. الخطوة التالية ستكون بعد ساعة من الآ
我要走了——我现在处于唯一记录的位置。我认为对于自主运动的最佳解释——就是根本没有自主运动。我没有注意到任何自主运动——而且我倾向于将水平线与我的头部对齐——在零重力下，水平线与你两眼之间的连线平行。我不明白自主运动是怎么回事。我不明白——等等，也许我开始明白了
好的。首先，您需要反转电池充电程序。为此，请在面板 3 上，关闭“电池充电”开关；关闭“交流逆变器 2”开关；在面板 5 上，打开“主母线连接电池 Alfa Charlie”开关；在面板 2
はい、その通りです。カウントダウン時間に関するもう一つのヒントを教えて
好的。我读了一遍：11，G&N：37200，减060，加047，加098，05 2422，加41448，加03719，减024
Aurora Seven, Ihre letzte Aufzeichnung war unleserlich. Ihre Verbindung lässt stark nach, wenn auch nur zeitweise. Ich werde die Zeitangaben im Rückblick lesen. Bereich 3 Delta, 04 12 32, 04
좋아요. 다 정리됐네요. 이제 물 호스를 연결해야겠어요. 어디 보
了解。まだ5000万人のテレビ視聴者の前では、
I'd like to comment a little on the sextant. Its use in a cramped spacecraft is very difficult, particularly with the helmet on. I finally decided it was going to be useless with your helmet on to try to take the angles that the stars, that were being called for, required. So I took my helmet off. This gave me a little more flexibility in using it, but still I was limited to angles of about 20 to 23° without maneuvering the spacecraft. What would happen is the star would be cut out by the upper part of the window. Now, by more frequent and liberal maneuvering of the spacecraft you could maneuver it so that you have the long axis of the window in your tracking plane. We were somewhat limited by fuel and we didn't choose to maneuver in this manner. We used Pulse Mode, too, without a lot of maneuvers. The stars tha
ठीक है। धन्यवाद। हमारा मिडनाइट डीवीए शो फिर से प्रसा
Juri Alexejewitsch, ich möchte Sie daran erinnern, dass es nach der letzten Minute der Bereitschaft zu einer sechsminü
I have set my suit circuit cooling valve to position number 8 just to precool a little bit, and it is 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 업데이트가 완료되었습니
ROT 제어 전원, 2번 - ROT 제어 전원,
न
C'est le moment,
Я только что спустила
Будьте готовы предоставить отчет о наличии еды и воды для вас обоих через C
罗杰。我们把轨道滚动参数放错位置了。我们会
المركبة الفضائية 0-90-0
아니, 짐, 
Sì, devo procurarmi la checklist di l
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 전선 형태나 열대성 폭풍 형태의 발달과 
48587 603 48383 06 2027
Jack, pourrais-tu éteindr
CSQ, 제미니 4
Roger. 40 2711 398 033, bas 043, gauche 23, plus 0832 moins 16500 12956 36208; l’ensemble d’étoiles au nord reste Sirius et Rigel; le roulis, le tangage et le lacet restent les mêmes angles: 129 155 010, le tonneau reste deux quadrangles pen
रॉजर, अपोलो 
Oui. Nous avons décidé d'utiliser un conteneur. Vous savez que le vêtement refroidi par liquide est entouré d'un sac que nous pensons pouvoir utiliser également, ou du moins dont nous sommes sûrs qu'il peut l'être. Nous l'avons testé. Il s'agit donc d'un sac à l'intérieur d'un autre, et à l'intérieur se trouve le vêtement refroidi par liquide. Le sac le plus proche du vêtement refroidi
Oui. De to
D'accord. À la fin de la procédure, après les étapes BAT 5 et 6, OFF, ajoutez les éléments suivants: disjoncteurs, panneaux - panneaux 11 et 16, ASCENT ECA CONTR
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Val
Билл вместе с Джимом отнесет камеру на нижний отсек с оборудован
您希望我的电
D'accord. L'événement aura lieu à l'heure indiquée. Nous devons manœuvrer pour adopter l'attitude suivante: roulis 101,0°, tangage 090,0°, lacet nul. Les angles de gain élevés seront le tangage -23° et le lacet 93°. Nous devons utiliser les procédures habituelles pour amortir le
Уотертаун. Сигма Севен вас пре
Commençons par récupérer votre horloge, puis nous récupérerons T-EPHE
D'accord. Voici le point important. Votre assiette est très bonne, sauf en roulis. Nous aimerions que vous procédiez comme suit: en mode MIN impulse, nous aimerions que vous corrigiez le tangage à zéro, ce qui correspond à votre position actuelle; le roulis à 0,08 degré, soit environ 16 degrés de moins que votre assiette actuelle; et le lacet à zéro, ce qui c
Na toll. Die Hasselblad ist weg. Findet die Mutter, bevor sie oder ich... Alle mal nach einer treibenden Hasselblad Aussc
알겠습니다. 현재 상황은 구
好的。我得写
Und wieder brauchen wir eine kleine Lagekorrektur. Unsere Erde verschwindet nach oben und rechts. Unsere Erde und deine Erde. In die falsche Richtung, in die falsche Richtung. Noch ein bisschen. Okay. Das ist gut, wenn du sie so halten kannst. Hoppla! Jetzt rutscht sie wieder ab. Okay. Noch ein bisschen weiter, noch ein bisschen weiter. Okay. Neunzig Grad in diese Richtung; das sind die falschen 90 Grad, in die andere Richtung. So. Noch ein bisschen. Nein, in die falsche Richtung, in die falsche Ri
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Haben Sie 
حسنًا، ها هو بعض الكاكاو؛ سيكون لذيذًا. سأضيف إليه حوالي 150 مل من الماء الساخن. هذه قطع صغيرة من بسكويت السكر، وبعض عصير البرتقال، وحساء الذرة، والدجاج مع المرق، ومنديل صغير لمسح يديك بعد الانتهاء.
Okay. Obwohl wir die gleichen Werte für die Quadcopter-Anzahl ablesen wie Sie, scheinen die Werte Ihrer vier Quadcopter, berechnet mit dem Computerprogramm und allen darin enthaltenen Korrekturfaktoren, sehr nahe beieinander zu liegen. In Pfund ausgedrückt: Quadcopter A wiegt 193 Pfund, B 189, C 200 und Delta 190. Die Abweichung, die Sie am Messgerät ablesen, ist darauf zurückzuführen, dass nicht alle Korrekturfaktoren berücksichtigt wurden. Diese Bodenberech
Okay. Der Grund, warum wir das im Flugplan berücksichtigt haben, ist folgender: Falls Sie versuchen möchten, sich zu drehen und mit dem Kopf voran zu fliegen oder Ähnliches, können wir Bill helfen, seine Fotografie zu optimieren, indem wir ihm neue Filmeinstellungen und dergleichen geben. Wir werden so etwas anbieten; falls Sie mit dem Kopf voran fliegen, haben wir die entsprechenden Werte, die wir für die Filmeinstellungen abrufen k
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मैं मुख्य घटनाओं के समयों पर संक्षेप में चर्चा कर लेता हूँ, और फिर हम कुछ विवरण भरेंगे। ठीक है। प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस 142 घंटे 40 मिनट पर है; लगभग 6-1/2 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम हीटर पावर लगाकर, CM/ तापमान की जाँच करके और आवश्यकता पड़ने पर CM/ को पहले से गर्म करके इस पूरी प्रक्रिया को शुरू करेंगे, और हमें लगता है कि हमें ऐसा करना पड़ेगा। इसके लिए विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ बाद में उपलब्ध होंगी। लगभग 6 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम संशोधित / 30-मिनट की चेकलिस्ट का उपयोग करके पावर चालू करना शुरू करेंगे, जिसका उपयोग आपने पिछले मध्यक्रम के लिए किया था। फिर कुछ ही समय बाद, लगभग 5 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम चाहेंगे कि आप बॉडी एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट के लिए सही स्थिति में हों, जैसा हमने पहले किया था, अर्थ टर्मिनेटर का उपयोग करके। और जैसे ही हमें वह मिल जाएगा, हम -7 का प्रदर्शन करेंगे, जो अब लगभग 2 फुट प्रति सेकंड की बर्न दर या लगभग 15 सेकंड
रॉजर। समझ गया। हम कूड़ेद
好的。现在我用左边的月亮做参照物，效果很好。我先把姿态指示器遮住，你们可以观察偏航角。我打算暂时关闭
收到。我把开
Okay, do you have an
حسنًا. سأضطر إلى قطع الاتصال هنا؛ سأترك جاك يحضر سماعة ا
रॉजर। बहुत बढ़िया। ब्रेक। लैंडिंग क्षेत्र में मौसम का पूर्वानुमान फिलहाल 2000 फीट की दूरी पर छिटपुट, तेज़ छिटपुट, 10 मील की दूरी प
حسنًا. أقل بقليل من 13. وللعلم فقط، لدينا فريق يعمل على عدة مواضيع. نعمل حاليًا على المرحلة المتوسطة القادمة لتحديد نظام التحكم وكيفية استخدامه مع النظام الذي نختاره، وماذا نفعل بشأن المحاذاة. لدينا نظام إدارة القمر (LMS) وفريقان يعملان بجد على ذلك. كما نعمل أيضًا على دخولنا، وكيف ومتى يجب تفعيله. ونعمل أيضًا على حالة الأنظمة. غدًا 
Ok. Ho appena indossato il visor
Позвольте мне посмотреть, смогу ли
Хорошо. Я включил запись — прокрутите 
Okay. Im Landegebiet im mittleren Pazifik ist das Wetter gut. Die Bewölkung beträgt 2000 Fuß (ca. 5,5 m), die Sichtweite 10 Fuß (ca. 3 m), der Wind weht aus 60° mit 10 Knoten (ca. 10 km/h), die Wellenhöhe liegt bei 4 Fuß (ca. 1,2 m) und der Höhenmesser zeigt 2986 Fuß (ca. 29,8 m) an, falls es Sie interessiert. Vereinzelt regnet es in weniger als 10 % des Gebiets. Die Bergungskräfte der Iwo Jima befinden sich am Aufsetzpunkt. Das Rufzeichen des Flugzeugs lautet „Recovery 1“, es ist mit Rettungsschwimmern an Bord vor Ort. Der Bereich für den Wiedereintri
Questa è Houston. Possiamo vedere la mano destra di Buzz. È un po' sfocata. Direi che ci stavamo concentrando su circa 20-30
D'accord, Houston, pour les valeurs de CDR: 0,07, CMP: 0,64, LMP: 0,80. Notez que les valeurs de CMP n'ont pas changé depuis le début et que celles du commandant sont restées quasiment inchangées. Nous
多久—
روجر، 2: SPS/G&N: 38320، زائد 166، ناقص 081 080 11 3603، ناقص 01408، ناقص جميع الك
...음정이 충분히 멀리 떨어지지 않았네. 음, 어쩌면 어떻게든 빼낼 
휴스턴, 귀하의 퀸다르 장비가 송신 중에 음성을 왜곡하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 점 
ジェミニ4号室 
Roger, das. Ich habe mich nur gefragt, wie schnell das Manöver beginnen würde, wenn das nic
로저, 시그마 세븐입니다. HF/UHF로 통신 확인했습니다. 하와이 지국 연락을 기다리겠습니다
Ok, Jim. Ricevuto. Lo faremo il più possibile. E sembra ragionevolmente fattibile. Per cominciare, nel modulo di comando, dovremo inviarti alcune sequenze separate per accenderlo un po' alla volta. Più ci avviciniamo all'ingresso, più 
Friendship Seven, qui Hawaii Cap Com, vi ricevo forte e chiaro. Qual è la vostra situaz
I might tell you that we're looking at right now, that round bag that's just behi
Ah, Roger, Zanzibar CapCom. Friendship Seven. Tous les fusibles sont inchangés; je n'en ai changé aucun. Le propulseur est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le système est en mode normal, automatique, gyroscopique normal. Toutes les poignées en « T » sont rentrées. Le délai de rétrogradation est normal. Le panneau de séquence est normal. Le sac d'atterrissage es
시그마 세븐, 여기는 카나리 컴 테크입니다. HF/UH
УВЧ
Вам, вероятно, интересны комментарии ваших жён. Нил, сказала Джен о вчерашних событиях: «Вечер был невероятно прекрасным. Для меня большая честь и привилегия разделить с моим мужем, экипажем,
روجر. يمكننا أن نرى ذلك؛ يبدو أنه أقل بقليل من نصف حافته ال
D'accord. Sur le panneau 7, nous voulons: ALIMENTATION, ARRÊT. ALIMENTATION SERVO 1 et 2, ARRÊT; ALIMENTATION /GPI, ARRÊT; et
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。OMNIに切り替える必要があり
ジェミ
حسنًا. وفانس، هل سبق لك أن حددت أوقات /AOS، ووقت بدء التشغيل لنتمكن من الانتق
Хорошо. Третий ряд, откройте следующие пять — поправка — Откройте первые пять слева, закройте HEATER, закройте SIG CONDITIONER 1. Закройте ATTITUDE DIRECT и откро
Okay. Das waren alle Änderungen auf der Checkliste. Ich habe noch ein paar allgemeine Anmerkungen, die 
了解。バッテリーの準備はできました。燃料電池
قاعدة تر
28ページの手順
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。昼間の状況、これら、そして態度に関して、今はより良い調整ができていると思う。おそらくま
Roger. It went past the caution warning limit to the scan or RF limit, as I understand it. And let me give 
Вчера «Браунс» разгромили «Даллас
مرحباً يا غوايماس، قناة فريندشيب 7 على 
ठीक है। ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8। हमें यह करना चा
حسنًا. بالنسبة لتتبعك الحالي، يبدو أن الوقت الذي حددناه لك الليلة الماضية لوصول المركبة إلى نقطة الح
알았어, 월
Это находится прямо 
Nous apprécions cela, Ron. Merc
로저. 확인했습니다. 추력 변환 - 제트 엔진 4개 - 밸런스 커플 - 켜짐. 스로틀 - 최소. 스로틀 - 자동 제어. 프로펠러 버튼 - 재설정. 프로펠러 버튼.
Okay
Roger, Friendship Se
Ed has most of the equipment on him right now. I've got the gun and the camera and the hatch fitting, the fitting to tie the two suit hoses together. Ed has all the other paraphernalia on him right now, but he's on the suit circuit. He's got the Repress valve OFF and we're just about all set to go. I think when we get a
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 컴퓨터 작업은 끝났습니
멋지다! 와, 대단해! OAMS 제어 
Это подтверждается, и нам также было бы интересно узнать ваше мнение о том, как эти различные сбросы по
Gemini VI, Gemini VI,
이것은 's 4/
C
Okay. Ich werde jetzt mit einer 
Well, okay, that's good. All this procedure that I am going to give to you here is relative to what we hope are fixes to
Dici che sta
好的。我们先来设置指挥官的软管配置，使其与LMP
Хорошо. Проверяем: команда телеметрии — выключена; УКВ AM B — центр; шумоподавление в S-диапазоне — выключено; клапаны топливных элементов — в нормальное положение; магнитофон — вперед, центр; движение ленты — рычаг; питание — центр; питание PMP — центр; инвертор переменного тока 1 — выключен; инвертор переменного тока 2 — выключен; инвертор 1 — AC 1 — выключен; сброс AC 1 — выключен; инверто
Хьюстон, Игл. Вам потребуется высокий коэффициент усиления, прежде чем вы сможе
ح
Der LMP-Wert beträgt 0,64; ich glaube, er war während des gesamten Fluges konstant. Der CMP-Wert beträgt 0,11, das er
我们现
Ok. 47 piedi/sec dal tuo fuoco in avanti. Questo fa 1+18. 120 piedi/sec da quello a poppa. Questo 
आप समझ गए... प्लेटफार्म। आप खिड़की से दे
気分
显然，你这种态度不太符合OMNI的理
Okay. Wir haben kein Wasser mehr im Trinkwassertank. Wir haben vor ein paar 
Vous pouvez observer l'
Meglio che essere sotto l'effetto di sostan
D'accord. Oui, c'est comme ça qu'on faisait avant. Je vais débrancher le disjoncteur de l'amplificateur de puissance, puis je retournerai au pr
Immagino che
Roger. Wir probieren einf
6.50 डिग्री। और, जिम, ह्यूस्टन। मुझे लगता है, आखिरी बात के तौर पर, हमें उम्मीद है कि आपकी चेकलिस्ट और समयसीमा को आज बाद में अपडेट करने में हमें लगभग एक घंटा लगेगा, और कृपया इसे ध्यान में रखें। म
Roger. I'm reading you loud and clear. I'll 3, 4, 5, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1. How 
Ciel bleu dégagé; 32 secondes; 9 000 pieds, carburant et oxygène stables; pression cabine de 15,1 psia (en baisse). 
Okay. Our recommendation is that you stay in for the JETT simply because we've thought it through. We've got the right dea
Х
Stand by Buzz. It looks pretty good as far as I could tell. We got the - a
Хорошо. «Аполлон-11» остается главной новостью, и весь мир ждет вашей высадки сегодня примерно в 11:49 утра по хьюстонскому времени. В Вашингтоне реформаторы налоговой системы Палаты представителей разработали положение, которое сделает невозможным для состоятельных лиц полное уклонение от уплаты подоходного налога посредством необлагаемых налогом инвестиций или специальных льгот. Согласно предложению, предварительно принято
Понял. Нам нужно выйти на 
没错。你觉得他们会共用一扇窗户吗？没
Non sono mai riuscito a controllare la polarizzazione dell'accelerometro sulla piattaf
好的，Vance。Fred 刚才告诉我他把它放在那里了，我们正在再次检查主位置的 PYRO BATTERY 
わかったよ、ヴァンス。君はちょっ
난 지금 그들과 
로저입니다. 제미니 4호입니다. 저는 사령관입니다. 방금 5시간 반 정도 낮잠을 잤는데, 마지막 3시간은 아주 잘 잤습니다. 처음 2시간 반은 좀 뒤척였습니다. 지금 4일차 두 번째 식사를 하고 있는데, 깨어난 후 물을 다섯 모금 정도밖에 마시지 않았
ठीक है, मैंने फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड चालू कर रखा है, और नॉर्मल मोड ऑटो पर है, जायरो केज्ड है, मैन्यूवर अभी भी बंद है। और बी
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। टीवी पर हम यही करेंगे कि हाई-गेन एंटीना पर वापस आते ही आप इसे बढ़ा लें। लगता है - मेरा अनुमान है - यह लगभग इतना ही होगा, औ
Okay. Zum Warmwasserboiler: Es i
네.
ダメだ。両方の場所を確認したが、何も
Voici une photo du pla
ロジャー、20,000フィート（約20,000メートル）まで降下します。シュノーケルを待機していま
Apollo 8, Houston. Ho a disposizione le quantità dei mod
Я
Ja, das stimmt; ich 
Roger，01 36 13 
Houston, 13. We'll be off C
好的。我们的氧
まあ、私は十分下まで降
Hou
Solo un commento casuale. Abbiamo guardato fuori e ci è sembrato di vedere l'orizzonte. Si è scoperto che era ovviamente un chiarore atmosferico. Potevamo 
是的，我明白了。罗恩本来要给我
كيف حا
Роджер. Сейчас мы работаем над герметизацией кабины, используя наклейку с указанием выравнивания давления CSM. Мы дошли до шага 13, где ждём, пока давление в кабине не дос
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 만약 이 중간 기착지를 확보하지 못
Roger
好
Ok, pericynthion più 2 nel MPL, 079, 27, 4013, più 08144, meno 00443, meno 00226, N/D, più 00205, 08455, 4 più 20, 268, 261, più 08155, meno 00443, meno 021, 2187, N/D. La GDA dovrebbe essere a posto così com'è, che si spera sia beccheggio 5,85, imbardata 6,74. Ullage a due getti per 10 secondi, manetta al 10% per 5 secondi, 40% per 21 secondi, 100% per il resto della combustione. E
地平線の写真がないんです
التقطتُ صورةً بكاميرا S-5 لتشكيل سحابي فوق المحيط الهادئ، متجهاً نحو منطقة كوستال سنتري كيبيك، عند الساعة 00:00 باستخدام فتحة عدسة f/11 وسرعة غالق 150. كانت الصورة رقم 28. ألتقط عدة صور لكاميرا S-5. أنا الآن في منطقة 
Sigma Seven。别忘了注意舱压和高度表。如果它们没有检查，请拉动减压阀或通气
وفي خبر آخر، وإن كان طفيفًا، اضطر مستكشف آخر، ثور هايردال، إلى التخلي عن محاولته الإبحار بقارب مصنوع من ورق البر
Roger, Friendship Seven. Il chirurg
알겠습니다. 같은 의견입니다. 다시 처음부터 설명드리겠습니다. "BALANCE COUPLE"을 "OFF"로 변경해야 합니다. 그 아래 "LMP"를 "JET"으로 변경해야 합니다. -2초 지점의 "400 + 1"을 삭제하고, -1초 지점의 "MASTER ARM, ON"도 삭제합니다. -10초 지점에 "MANUAL ULLAGE"를 추가하고, 점화 장치를 추가합니다. "시동이 걸리지 않으면 START 버튼을 누르십시오. 그래도 시동이 걸리지 않으면 DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE를 켜십시오."라는 설명을 추가할 수 있습니다. +5초 지점에서 "DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, ON"을 
Non credo, Jack. Questo è uno di quei casi in cui, quando arrivi a quel punto, se ottieni qualcos'altro, noi saremo lì ad aspettarti per vedere se te ne accorgi
НЕЙ
了解。バッテリーのマイナス。ブラボー。メインA、バ
Salut Ken, est-ce que quelqu'un aurait une bonne idée de pourquoi ce réservoir quadruple A chauff
연료량을 더 정확하게 측정하려면 손가락으로 78%를 확인해야 합니다. 역추진
Понял. Вот что я думаю о температуре ск
जिम, थोड़ा इंतज़ार कीजिए। हमें लगता है कि हमें सब कुछ मिल रहा है। हम अभी पुष्टि कर रहे हैं। जी हां, जिम। हमें जो भी जानकारी मिल रही है,
Oh, Vance, vuoi manten
In questo momento siamo proprio nel bel mezzo del tentativo di procurarci qualcosa 
Ap
分かりました、フレッド。熱伝達担当が確認する予
Okay. That's correct. The last steps are to get the back on descent batteries. The first step is BATs 1, 2, 3, and 4, HI VOLTA
ゴルドさん、ホライゾンスキャ
令人惊讶的是，这辆车周围没有任何
Ok, il
看看体育界，我们来看看。就在你前几天忙的时候，乔·纳马斯和橄榄球联盟主席皮特·罗泽尔宣布，“百老汇乔”已经同意出售他在“单身汉三号”餐厅的股份，并加入纽约喷气机队。乔今天抵达了喷气机队的训练营，并进行了首次训练。其他几位和乔一起罢训的喷气机队球员也都报到了。来自密歇根州杰克逊的戴维·希尔在上周赢得了他参加的三场高尔夫大满贯赛事中的第三场。他赢得了费城精英赛。希尔今年至今已经赢得了四场比赛，并以12.9万美元的奖金成为今年的奖金王。棒球方面，国家联盟西区的竞争依然激烈。洛杉矶道奇队和旧金山巨人队落后联盟领头羊亚特兰大勇士队一个胜场。休斯顿太空人队目前战绩为48胜48负，排名第五，落后七场。昨晚太空人队和辛辛那提红人队的双赛因雨延期。芝加哥小熊队仍然稳居东区榜首，领先纽约大都会队4.5个胜场。而在美联，巴尔的摩金莺队正朝着东区冠军稳步前进，领先第二名波士顿红袜队11个胜场。展望未来，全明星棒球赛定于明天举行。尼克松总统原计划观看比赛，并在赛后立即前往太平洋溅落区，之后再前往欧洲访问。今天的新闻大概就是这
Capisc
D'accord, Jim. Les experts aimeraient une autre mesure de l
在此期间，为了帮助提升主电源A的电压，我已开启了主母线连接电池交流电。或者您是否愿意接受目前主
Another little of local news: the County Court House at Huntsville burned down before dawn yesterday, so it looks like they will go in the construction business there again. On the got a little bit about the waiting
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。我们的烟
ठीक है। मैं यह को
Okay, Jack. I understan
Хорошо. В разделе «Маневр, определяемый экипажем», мигающий 0622 обознача
Apollo 11, Houston. Vuoi che Buzz si assicuri di f
Lasst uns ein b
ただ、振動はずっと大きかったとだけ言えま
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। फ्रेड-ओ, उस पर - उस जाँच को पास करने के लिए, सू
All g
Roger. Jus
Апо
حسناً يا باز، هل نحن مستعدون ل
फ्रैंक, वहां सब क
Почему вы не слышите эти три р
罗杰。你也知道，我对科学的追求导致我的E记忆程
Beh, considerando che 
Ora, c'è l'orizzonte: ecco cosa fa l'orizzonte. 
아폴로 8호
어두운 슬라이드는 저
حسناً، لقد 
मैं तो हैरान हूँ;
Apollo 8, Houston. Je vous reçois faiblement mais 
Das ist R
了解しました、ジム。了解しました。これで復旧
Роджер, Базз. Похоже, здесь возникла некоторая путаница с номерами 405 и 406. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы обнулили их перед отстыковкой, и после отстыковки вы можете это сделать — мы бы хотели, чтобы они оставались обнуленными. 
ね
Number 2 is really bad. It's got a bad bearing, and it whines like mad, so we 
Roger. 
Hier spricht Texas Cap Com, Friendship Seven. Wir empfehlen Ihne
네, 맞습니다. 수동 시동이라면 수동으로 시동을
Numero 12 6.2, 121.5
Roger. Normally, it is done automatically, Jim; and had you done the 's exactly as scheduled, it would have been, but there was some doubt was stopped about 7 minutes prior to the transition point and just to be absolutely s
VI, 하와
Se è così, l'unica cosa c
Вперед, продо
वह बंद है, और हमारे पास किसी भी बैटरी पर कोई चेतावनी नहीं है, लेकिन आप जमीन से नि
밴스, 우리가 한 가지 눈치챈 게 있
आज ह्यूस्टन में सबसे बड़ी खबर एस्ट्रोस से जुड़ी है। खेल जगत में, ह्यूस्टन एस्ट्रोस ने सिनसिनाटी में नौवें इनिंग में वापसी क
J'ai besoin d'un résultat dans
Прежде чем вы отправитесь в туалет, позвольте мне быстро рассказать вам к
是的，我们一开始确实遇到了很多无线电方面
Okay. To continue - to continue on - the same panel, panel 5: circuit breaker, BATTERY CHARGER, AC POWER, close; circuit breaker BATTERY CHARGER, BAT A CHARGE, close; circuit breaker INVERTER CONTROL 2, close; circuit breaker INVERTER CONTROL 3, cl
And the Domed Stadium rental controversy is still going on. Then, there's a nice st
Давайте посмотрим. В Спрингфилде, штат Миссури, Микки Оуэн, ветеран-кетчер «Бруклин Доджерс», вошедший в историю как игрок, пропустивший третий страйк и приведший «Нью-Йорк Янкиз» к победе над «Доджерс» в Мировой серии 1941 года, решил, что его запомнят не только по спортивному рекорду. Сорок пять мальчиков и девочек получили пони, которых он им предложил. Этих юных дарителей попросили прислать письма, в которых они бы рассказали, как бы они ухаживали за пони. Когда письма посыпались, он добавил пять пони к уже предложенным 20; и другие дарители добавили еще 20. И Микки Оуэн сказал: «Я думал, что получу около 45 писем, но в итоге их оказалось около 900». А теперь на главной странице: В Веллингтоне, Новая Зеландия, около пятидесяти мужчин сегодня за столом отведали традиционную индейку с клюквенным соусом на Южном полюсе, но Рождество также имело восточный колорит. В меню были сукияки, приготовленные членами японской экспедиции, пересекающей Антарктический континент и остановившейся на день на по
Odyssey, Houston. The two c
I'
Roger. Das könnte etwas schwierig werden. Wir sehen uns den Tunnel jetzt mal an. Es scheint, als ob sich zwischen den Erdschichten etwas mehr Feuchtigkeit im Tunnel angesammelt hätte. Der Tunnel war natü
إد، هذا مركز 
好的，那么我们来看夜间时段——分别是 17:31、17:38、17:48，以及你的高频（HF）——
Vogliamo sc
Roger. 68 p
«Аврора Семь», командование воздушного движения Гавайев. Вы мен
Roger. 027 44 5363, moins 16
हैलो, कैप कॉम। फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। ईंधन 62-60 [प्रतिशत]
Roger. Here is the format which
Ok. Vorremmo... i ragazzi della SPAN dicono che sembra... pensano che uno andrebbe sul casco che avrai in B
Компани
Хорошо. В контрольном списке G/8-2, в шаге 5, есть утверждение: «отключить все реактивные двигатели на двух соседних квадрокоптерах», и именно это мы имели в виду, когда сказали «отключить квад
D'accord. Nous aimerions avoir votre avis sur le plan de vol pour les prochaines heures. Veuillez nous indiquer les différentes contraintes possibles et l'ordre
这样好多了，
D'accord. On vous a encore perdu. Voici la configuration actuelle du chauf
Хорошо. Джек, сейчас мы не можем. Солнечный свет отражается от двигателей, и обломки, отделившиеся во время аварии, всё ещё находятся с нами, поэтому звёзды трудно разглядеть. 
오디세이, 휴스턴. 방
रॉजर। उड़ान
Подтверждаю, Джек, и все остальные открыты. Хорошо. Панель 227 — без изменений, а панель 229 — одно дополнительное устройство к тем автоматическим выключателям, которые нам нужно открыть, это 
さて、最後に教えていただいた 2 つの情報、ピッチ角とロー
追加の運動時間に参加します。フライトの正式な部分ではない運
Roger. Ich verstehe den allgemeinen Eindruck, dass das Material im 
阿波罗
Das ist ein tolles F
रॉ
Всё идёт по графику — сейчас отображается красный инд
你好，Cap Com。Freedom Seven。你读起
Questa è Frie
다시 말
こ
そうですか
Apollo 11, Houston. D'après nos observations depuis le milieu de la trajectoire, nous affichons un gamma de -6,57. Ce chiffre est préliminaire, et nous pensons qu'après quelques suivis supplémentaires, la trajectoire devrait se stabiliser et nous pourrons l'ajuster précisément dans le couloir d'atterrissage. Nous sommes quasiment au centre du couloir; tout semble bien se passer. Nous vous enverrons un plan d'entrée dans quelques heures, avant que vous n'alliez vous coucher. Et de la part de nos amis des affaires publiques, voici quelques informations, outre votre vol. Vous êtes toujours au centre de l'actualité. Cependant, il y a d'autres choses intéressantes pour vous. Comme je l'ai mentionné précédemment, le match des étoiles a été annulé en raison de la pluie. Il aura lieu demain. Cependant, le président Nixon ne pourra pas y assister comme prévu. Nous vous tiendrons informés des résultats. De plus, la météo sera clémente. Nos prévisions indiquent qu'elle se maintient pour la zone de récupération; il devrait faire très beau. Alors qu'il s'apprêtait à s'envoler pour vous accueillir à votre retour, le président Nixon a prédit que d'ici 31 ans, l'humanité aurait visité au moins une autre planète abritant une forme de vie. « En l'an 2000, nous, sur Terre, aurons visité de nouveaux monde
Zanzibar, qui è Friendship Seven. Hai ricevuto i miei carburanti quand
是的。它——除了利率之外，肯定也没
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 생물환경부(BIOMED)가 지휘통제센터(CDR)로 전환합니다. 
你开始适应夜间作
罗杰。比尔
Würden Sie Houston mitteilen, dass wir draußen waren... aber wir konnten die Küste von Texas ganz deutlich sehen und konnten sogar noch mehr sehen... draußen konnte man deutl
جي
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Nous avons perdu toutes les
Okay. Okay. First of all, general philosophy is that these rules should be similar to mode I abort with the tight limits. Now, I'll go through them one by one for you to copy. Okay. You should shut down, if any of the following happen. Thrust monitor readout, 77 percent or below; propellant tank pressure - that's the inlet pressure - onboard readout, 160 or below
هذا صحيح. هذا سيُهيئك. لاحظ أن قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية في هذه الدائرة يحد من التيار المتاح إلى 15 أمبير. مع ذلك، نعتقد أنه بإمكاننا فعل الكثير به. وسيكون السلك الموصول بالتيار الكهربائي موصولاً، ويمكن مراقبة جهد ناقل التيار الرئيسي باختيار "
Sounds l
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन, यह कानो कॉम टेक है, यूएचएफ/एचएफ प
10, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35186, m
Wir werden hier im Ko
Okay
这里是Sigma 
Houston, Co
Jack, concernant ta question sur la platef
ठीक है। अब मैं नौवें संस्करण त
그들은 어떻게 
알겠습니다. 펌프가 켜져 있는 것을 확인했습니다. GET B 03:19; 
Das ist bestätigt, Jim. Wir 
برج ال
حسنًا. حسنًا. أولًا، تنص الفلسفة العامة على أن هذه القواعد يجب أن تكون مشابهة لقواعد الإجهاض في الوضع الأول مع الحدود الصارمة. الآن، سأشرحها لكم واحدة تلو الأخرى لتتمكنوا من نسخها. حسنًا. يجب إيقاف التشغيل في حال حدوث أي مما يلي: قراءة جهاز مراقبة الدفع 77% أو أقل؛ ضغط خزان الوقود - وهو ضغط المدخل - القراءة الداخلية 160 أو أقل
フロリダの美しい景色が一望できます。岬の先端がち
罗
Роджер. Это значит, что моё сер
Ok. Un paio di cose, Jim. Una è che puoi usare il per manovrare, ma risparmierai un sacco di carburante se provi l'IMPULSO MINIMO. Qui
ああ、まあ、もう少
Allez
罗杰，11。我们希望在不久的将来，在您方便的时候在这里进行一次废水排放。没有具体时间安排。在进行第三次中途修正时（大约是53:55），我们将删除第三次中途修正及
Ich schätze, das wären 12 Stunden. Höchste Zei
了解。プラス25、/63087、マイナス162、プラス129、マイナス00163、プラス00001、プラス52759 177 137 001、該当なし、プラス00201 52759 623 52543 14 2347 337 023、上195、左1.7、プラス1145、マイナス16500 12780 35890。北セット068 097 356、アレージなし、7-700と7900
Which switches d
P
D'accord. Je crois que je me suis trompé. Ils ont copié… vous avez copié le signal VHF jusqu'à 20 km. On vérifie la liaison descendante en ce
Хорошо, Джим. Об этом мы тебя предупреждали некоторое время назад. Низкий уровень гелия — и никаких п
Roger. Je vous suis depuis un certain temps. J'ai essayé de vous conta
罗杰。不适用
まさにその通りだよ
जैक, 15 घंटे में लगभग कितने ए
好的，肯。近藤座加2，快速返回/62871，减161，加129，加45224，减06216，减18712 
Affermativo, F
11, Houston. La définition est plutôt bonne sur notre écran. La couleur n'est pas trop
Roger, Tranquility. We copy you on the gr
Hai detto loro la verità. Ti senti bene, sei di buon umore, pronto per ulterior
Roger, Jim. Nous pensions que cela pourrait vous intéresser: d'après 2 h 30 de vol depuis votre dernière correction de mi-parcours, et en prévision des prochaines étapes, nous estimons que la correction de mi-parcours sera inférieure à 30 cm par seconde. En maintenant cette correction jusqu'à l'interface d'entrée dans les 2 heures, nous prévoyons une correction de 60 cm par seconde à ce moment-là. 
D'accord. Nous avons un changement de d
ठीक है। हम एंटर दबा सकते हैं, और फिर R1 मे
Going to
Du hast jetzt ein gutes Exemplar, nicht wahr
Okay. Disable 
Il y en a un qui contient des règles de mission – mais je n'arrive pas à le situer – pour le moment, 
休斯顿鹰市。我们确定这是传感器问题。您可以将其设置为
रॉजर, फ्रेडो। अब हम - माइनस 30 सेकंड पर
Хорошо,.
Близнецы 4, Близнецы 4. Это связь с центром управления воздушным движением Хьюс
Майк, что ты 
네. 만약 프로그램이 잘 진행되고 궤도 자세를 잘 유지하는 것 같으면 그대로 두고 수동으로 제어하겠습니다. 그렇지 않고 자이로스코프가 조금 전처럼 기
Здравствуйте, Бермудская столичная комиссия, Fri
Il
ご存知のとおり、側面の窓が曇っているのは本当に残念です。な
小精灵想知
Roger. Pass the word to Jim that on these marks that are coming up, pretty important that he remember to record his DELTA-R and and trunnion. We are wor
나는
Stai utilizzando la logica di imbardata secondari
Dopo 22 ore riprenderemo il Piano di Volo. A quel punto saremo di
제가 알고 싶었던 건 2020년 7월 20일이 증기압력 페그가 처음 작동한 시점이
उसके नीचे, "Spacecraft control dash AUTO verify" को मिटा दें। उसके बाद कोष्ठक में लिखे "" और बाकी सभी अक्षरों को मिटा दें, जैसे "Minus 00507" इत्यादि। और उसके नीचे, "PRO to start pitch rate" को मिटा
Похоже, это одна из ваших грудинных связок, Билл
杰克，你为什么不仔细检查一下，确保那
わかりました、ありがとうございます。OMNIが機能していない限り、私た
Wenn ich nicht noch viel me
Yes, we could pu
Хантсвилл, коммуникационный центр. Это «Сигма 
Хорошо, никаких пре
Amicizia Sette, qui Kano. Quando vuoi, vorremmo 
D'accord, Apollo 8. Nous aimerions utiliser l'étoile 26, c'est-à-dire la 26; nous aimerions la placer près de l'horizon terrestre pour deux séries de points. Ensuite, nous aimerions utiliser l'étoile 16 loin de l'horizon terrestre pour une série de points. Si l'étoile 26 près de l'horizon terrestre n'est pas possible, nous utiliserons l'étoile 16 loin de l'horizon terrestr
Oh, the
收
2986
حسنًا يا غاس، أريد التحدث مع جون
Vuoi ch
Okay. Just to verify. It starts out panel 3, BATTERY CHARGE switch, OFF; AC INVERTER 2, O
Понял. Температура в 
Okay, that's correct. No
Sure it'll work. Anything in a pretty coc
見てみましょう。国内ニュースでは、新婚のデビッド・アイゼンハワーとジュリー・アイゼンハワー夫妻が秘密のハネムーンの隠れ家を出て、ニクソン次期大統領とその家族とクリスマスディナーを共にしました。ニュ
Bene. In pratica, è corretto. Lasciate che vi spieghi tutto in modo schematico per un minuto, poi vi leggerò i passaggi. Penso che sarà più chiaro. Lo schema prevede che la palla possa volare verso una serie di angoli che punteranno l'ottica verso la Luna. Ora, in qualsiasi momento, in qualsiasi posizione ci troviamo, se riuscite a guardare nel telescopio e a riconoscere le formazioni stellari a sufficienza da credere di poter effettuare un allineamento da soli, è qui che vorremmo interromperci e lasciarvi procedere con il vostro allineamento. Tuttavia, vi stiamo fornendo una procedura che vi darà ciò che sappiamo che potete vedere nel telescopio senza preoccuparvi di riflessi o cose del genere, e non è previsto che questa procedura debba essere seguita oltre il punto in cui siete certi di avere una buona definizione delle formazioni stellari nel vostro telescopio. Se devi proseguire, manovreremo, daremo un'occhiata alla Luna, faremo un segno lì, poi manovreremo di nuovo con gli angoli / e daremo un'occhiata al Sole, e prenderemo un altro segno sul Sole e questo completerà l'allineamento. Ora, lo schema di allineamento prevede che ti forniremo una serie di angoli attraverso i quali puoi allineare approssimativamente la palla quando la ti punta verso la Luna. Ora, questa serie di angoli coinciderà con la che hai come valore nominale. Puoi allineare approssimativamente a quella, impostare una bandierina di deriva e una bandierina REFSMMAT, e avrai una buona piattaforma e saremo entro un paio di gradi da un buon allineamento. E, se necessario, potremmo interromperci a questo punto e procedere con un ingresso; tuttavia, nel tentativo di ottenere una buona piattaforma, ti faremo poi fare un'opzione 1, e quello che troverai negli slot dell'opzione 1 è l'ingresso. Ti indicherai i valori, e intendiamo procedere ad allineare grossolanamente la palla all'assetto di ingresso, e poi procederemo a prendere i punteggi attraverso una sequenza normale. Quindi questo è lo schema generale che useremo. 
了解、ジム
रॉजर, टॉम। कोर 07, 35999; कोर 08, 40014; कोर 09, 12421; कोर 10, 02346; कोर 11, 29217। क्या
केबिन का दबाव थोड़ा सा बढ़ा लें, और मैं डायरेक्ट O2 वाल्व को खोल दूं
Okay. Joe, we are OMNI Charlie. We have little bit better signal stren
わかりました、ジム。姿勢をもう少し急に上げたところで、機体軸の直線化を行います。これは 400 プラス 5 です。この時点でボールが上がっていれば、ボールは 000 まで上がります。制御モードについては後で詳しく説明しますが、もちろん、ATTITUDE HOLD - ATTITUDE HOLD で行うことをお勧めします。YAW を MODE CONTROL に設定し、PITCH と ROLL は PULSE のままにして、姿勢を で制御します。ジンバルは使用しないので、ENGINE GIMBAL は OFF にします。これらのエンジ
이글 - 이글, 휴스턴. 수신했습니다. 항공편 변경 사항
मुझे लगता है कि इस सामान को रखने में सबसे ज़रूरी बात यह सुनिश्चित करना है कि यह टीईआई के दौरान लगने वाले गुरुत्वाकर्षण बल के लिए उपयुक्त हो और घर लौटते समय हम सब कुछ ठीक से व
阿波罗8号
Vedo chiaramente un andamento di imbardata nella finestra, nel periscopio, nel reticolo. La finestra stessa è soddisfacent
안
好的
روجر. في واشنطن، وافقت لجنة المالية في مجلس الشيوخ على تمديد الضريبة الإضافية على الدخل، لكن يبدو أن تصويت مجلس الشيوخ على مشروع القانون مستبعد حاليًا. في أوستن، رُشِّح عضو مجلس النواب عن ولاية تكساس، راي ليمون، من هيوستن، لمنصب المدير الوطني للجمعية الأمريكية لعلوم المحيطات. وقد اقترح ليمون دراسة إمكانية إنشاء معهد لعلوم المحيطات في تكساس، ليكون أول معهد من نوعه في غرب خليج المكسيك. في مينيابوليس، مينيسوتا، أشار مكتب الأرصاد الجوية، بعد استعراضه لأحوال الطقس اليوم التي تُظهر درجة حرارة عظمى تبلغ 88 درجة فهرنهايت وصغرى تبلغ 72 درجة فهرنهايت، إلى "انعدام تساقط الثلوج". من سانت بطرسبرغ، فلوريدا، ورد تقرير إذاعي من المستكشف ا
У меня то же самое. Я не знаю, нахожусь ли я в вертикальном, горизонтальном или каком-либо другом положении. Мне бы хотелось хотя бы знат
Houston, Columbia. I'm coming up on my time for the first pass when I may be able to see the LM. Do you have any topographical cue that might help me out here on - AUTO optics is tracking between two craters. One of them, as the LM sees it, would be long at 11 o'clock; the ot
Canary Systems は、すべてのテレメトリの読み取り値が良好である
휴스
알겠습니다. 아직 SLEW 모드라서 기체가 서서히 기울어지면서 조종이 어려워질 수 있겠네요. 지금 AUTO 모드로 다시 시도해보고 어떻게 되는지 보겠습니
ロジャー、Rev 12 RKVでPLAとCLAの時刻を更新します。Rev 13ではカナリア諸島にCバンドの航跡が残ります。また、軌道航法チェックランも行いま
Okay, das ist gut. Die gesamte Vorgehensweise, die ich Ihnen hier erkläre, bezieht sich auf die hoffen
मुझे लगता है हमारे पास कोई विकल्प नहीं है। ठीक है। हम ACME से कोशिश करेंगे और अगर यह काम करता है तो हम RCS पर RATE COMMAND पर जाएंगे। ठीक है
了解しました。高利得アンテナが必要になりますが、このモードでは通
Gemelli, CSQ.
जी 
알겠습니다. 지도책을 꺼내시기 전
Okay, Apollo 8. Es ist noch etwas früh, um konkrete Zahlen zur Kommunikationsleistung zu nennen. Sie scheint wie erwartet zu funktionieren, und alles andere läuft besser, dah
로저, 저희는 에 안테나를 다시 교체할 예정입니다. 잠시 동안 신호 끊김이 발생할 수 있으며, 수동 열 
로저, 지난번 보고 이후 상황에 변화가 없음을 이해합니다
Penso che sia un po' stretto; è circa un quarto di grado. Possiamo scostarci un po'. Pronti a partire. Fred, ti daremo una rispost
로저. 여기 인터스텔라 타임즈 12월 24일자 신문이 있습니다. 당신의 TV 프로그램은 대성공이었습니다. 오늘 아침 이웃 행성인 지구의 대부분 국가에서 시청했습니다. 유럽 전역, 심지어 모스크바와 동베를린까지 생중계되었고, 일본, 북미와 중미 전역, 그리고 남미 일부 지역에서도 방송되었습니다. 아프리카에서는 얼마나 방송되었는지 
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben ab etwa 155°30' optimalen Empfang. Sie können dann den Fernseher ei
Аполлон-8, 
ターゲット16-Aに向けて滑走しました。バスラの飛行場はペルシャ湾に面しています。ペルシャ湾を約30度の角度で捉え、機首を下げて湖を捉えました。ペルシャ湾の北西です。バスラは湖のすぐそば、湖のすぐ近くにあるので、そのまま滑走路を辿って飛行場をすぐに捉えることができます。つまり、ターゲットに着く前に飛行場をかな
Gemini 4, thi
La visibilité à travers le télescope est très mauvaise. Je dirais même pire qu'avec le simulateur actuellement. Cela nécessite de longues périodes d'adaptation à l'obscurité, ce qui est généralement très contraigna
好的，吉姆。等你把姿态调整得更陡一些之后，我们进行一次机身轴线校准，校准点在 400 加 5 的位置。如果此时球体向上，球体将移动到 000。我们稍后可以详细讨论控制模式，但我们建议你当然是在姿态保持模式下进行操作。将偏航设置为模式控制，俯仰和横滚保持
그리고 컬럼비아 항공에서 온 승무원 현황 보고서입니다. 제 생각엔 5시간 정도는 푹 잔 것 같은데, 여러분은 저보다 더 잘 
吉姆，你可以继续进行，不过请注意，电视播出时间仍固定在 55 小时，我们将随时准备支持你的参赛，稍后会回复你关于 O2 燃料电池吹扫和废水
オーロラセブン、カノ。念のためお知らせしますが、250のインバーターは
よ
Das ist richtig.
Aspetta. Affermativo, Eagle. Vor
حسنًا. أمرٌ مثيرٌ للاهتمام حقًا - جيم يرى ضوء النهار كاملًا من نافذته، بينما أرى الليل ينهمر من نافذتي. نحن ندور تدريجيًا نحو الأمام، ويبدو أن انعكاس الشمس على هذه اليراعات يجعلها تتوهج بشدة. هذا هو نوع ا
네. 알려주시면 좋겠어요. 제가 언제 잠자
Y a-t-il des ét
好的。第 14 页，a，加载，已更改为 31021。我假设
ر
Это командование воздушного движения Гавайев. Готов к работе. На земле всё 
Wir geben 16 Prozent für 
Ich nehme das zurück. Das wollte
Correction,
На самом деле, Вэнс, то, что ты видишь, — это твердые капли воды, которые появляются почти постоянно. Они освещают все небо вокруг Луны. Просто
Sembra che non ci siano difficoltà a muoversi come sospettavamo. Forse è persino più facile delle simulazioni a un sesto di gravità che abbiamo eseguito nelle varie simulazioni a terra. In realtà, camminare non è un problema. Oka
良好。413020 183，绍拉，向下 064，向左 06，正北 0747，负北 16410 12988 3
Houston, Apollo 11. We're completed in the. We're c
La vue à travers ce sextant est fantastique. Je peux voir l'Alaska juste au large, et je pointe actuellement le réticule le long de la côte californienne, de la côte ouest du Mexique, de la péninsule du Yucatan, en 
Хорошо. Сейчас
حسنًا. كانت 
黑白胶片的感光度读数为13（ASA 64）。感光度设置为13。使用滤镜拍摄第7张照片。由于天气原因，南美洲大陆很难拍摄。此时我将拍摄一张全景照片。拍摄时间接近8小时。实际上，
로저. 그랬었죠. 아니, 정정합니다. 되찾았습니다
حسنًا. اضبط وضعي
휴스턴, 여기는 13입니다. 잭의 소득세 환급금이 상승
खैर, मुझे लगता है कि हम यही कह 
Es ist das Jahr 1821. Kann ich das in den Rekorder einsprechen, Gu
Salut Jerr
Les deux bus sont opérationnels. Voyons voir… La batterie numéro d
Роджер, я на какое-то время потерял контроль, когда вернулся к настройке 3, но ненадолго. Определенно, должно быть примерно 7,5-8. Сейчас я в режиме автоматического ретроградного управления. Скоро перейду на электронное управление. До этого я использовал гироскопы в обычном режиме, а маневрирование было отключ
Esatto, l'orario del meridiano fondamentale è, e hai riavuto il tuo computer. Abbiamo un bell'aggiornamen
Okay. Im Grunde genommen bewirkt das also eine Druckprüfung – genauer gesagt, eine Überprüfung
青い帯についてご説明します。地球の表面に比較的濃い青い帯があり、次に明るい青い帯、そしてもう一つ濃い青い帯、そして大気の輝きである大きな白い帯があります。そして濃い黒の帯があり、灰色
Friendship Seven, questo chirurgo di Zanzibar. La tua pressione sanguigna era 136 su 80 prima dell'esercizio. Abbiamo un buon tra
Qui è Friendship Seven in HF. Le mie condizioni sono eccellenti. Tutto proce
エントリ パッドは次のとおりです: Mid-PAC、000153、000; 、178; マイナス 21.66、マイナス 165.37; 28。次の 4 つの列は N/A、DO は 4.00、Zebra Libra か何か、Beta Libra は下 08.8、左 0.4、リフト ベクトルは上、エントリは一直線、星は 31、33。ロール 041、ピッチ 045、ヨー 024。非終了パターンを使用します。月が沈むまでムーン チェック
Je viens d'apercevoir la traînée d'une étoile filante non loin devant nous, qui s'est consumée bien en dessous de notre niveau. Sa queue était assez longue, et se situait en fait sous notre a
Ciao, Hawaii Com Tech, Hawaii 
Verstanden. Ich hör
Et l'un des ava
Roger, Buzz. It sounds like a good idea for some of your surveying work there inside the coc
ठीक है, जैक, टीवी के दौरान, हम ऑटो ट्रैक, नैरो बीम विड्थ और प्राइमरी इलेक्ट्रॉनिक्स मोड पर थे। और हमारा 
ठीक है। ठीक है; पश्चिम जर्मनी के चांसलर विली ब्रांट, जिन्होंने कल केप आइलैंड से आपके विमान प्रक्षेप
로저입니다. 제미니 6호, 휴스턴 외과의입니다. 말씀
- -
Okay, Charlie. Mir scheint, dass das Fadenkreuz an dem Punkt, den du markierst, tangential zum Horizont verlaufen muss, sonst befindest du dich nicht am 
व
アポロ8号、ヒュースト
Okay. It's coming up now, Columbia. We're going to keep you a little busy here. As soon as we get the state vector in, we'd like you to go ahead and do a option 3 on this night pass, and then when you come on around the other side there, we'll give you some landmark tra
了解。すぐにもう一度、ここで通信を再開します。コピーをお待ちください。B 03 03 4
現在、飛行計画に大きく遅
我们认为是 45 英里
Das ist richtig. Jetzt erhalten Sie höchstwahrscheinlich die Meldung „37 ENTER 06 ENTER“ auf Ihrem Computer. Wir möch
Yes, 83 hours, an
ठीक है, फ्रेड। मुझे लगता है कि तुम समझ गए। मैंने तुम्हारी बात पूरी तरह से नहीं दोहराई, लेकिन यह इतना ही आसान है। हम बस नया कारतूस लगा रहे हैं - नए कारतूस के ऊपरी हिस्से को पुराने 
Eagle, H
Нет. Мы просто решили посмотреть, какие материалы у нас е
Roger. Noch etwa 2 Minuten bis zum Pass auf der US-Seite. Kanarienvögel bei 1 50 13. E
찰리, 정말 다양한 종류의 음식이 있어요. 여기 왼쪽 위에는 커피가 있고, 여러 가지 아침 메뉴, 한입 크기의 베이컨, 과일 음료 같은 음료수도 있고, 가운데에는... 아, 정말
Okay. On - These are just cleanup items, Jack. On page 2-3, it lists how you separate, from the CM/ SEP and all that, so, obviously, if we're on step 5 at 43 minutes down - that's all deleted. And that gets deleted all the way over onto page 2-4, up to the line where it says
了解。OAMSなしで18-1、17、56、03。7+47。15+3
你收到
好的，万斯。你说我们应该从应急手册的准备阶段开始，大概是……我一会儿和吉姆商量一下，马上回复你。在点火姿态下，我们应该能看到太阳正好在顶部，我猜这是第二个定位点。吉姆和我之前已经讨论过这个问题了，我们目测了一下地球上的晨昏线，估计太阳的角度大概在70度到65度之间，所以应该就在那里。有一条点火规则是，如果升力
짐, 우리는 당신이 계속 술을 마실 수 있어야 한다고 생각
روجر. ستكون زاوية ميلك 12 درجة، وزاوية ميلك 270 درجة، وزاوية انحرافك 0 درجة. زوايا هوائي الكسب العالي: 
Ricevuto. Sei a 107 più 23 più 03. A 108 più 09
好的，收到。吉姆，我们来看看还有什么数据。中段-2 的速度大约是每秒 23 英尺，大致逆行，按时到达。现在轨迹非常稳定。给你参考一下，不用记下来，因为数据还比较模糊，我们测得的落点大约在南偏 8.57 度，西偏 33.9 度，比飞行计划值略偏西偏南。落点大约在 7
C'est exact, à ma connaissance. Vérifions cela une dernière f
そうで
分かりました。ここからはみ出ている余分な部分を切り取ってほしいのですが、容器
Houston, Columbia est en OMNI C, Charlie, voix de retour. Et si vous avez un moment, pourriez-vous me donner les coordonnées de 130? J’ai des informations contradictoires entre ma fiche et mon plan de vol. J’aimerais
Questo è confermato. Inoltre, Jim, per informazione, abbiamo stimato il tempo trascorso. 67+40, ovvero circa 2 ore. A breve vi forniremo un piano di volo r
Хорошо. Джек, это довольно подробная процедура, займёт, наверное, две-три страницы. Она предполагает, что вы находитесь в штатной конфигурации, которая была вам предоставлена, или в конфигурации д
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Сейчас смотрю на ту же область, и кажется, что она отражает часть земного света. Не уверен, было ли это рассчитано примерно на нулевую фазу... Ну, по крайней мере, одна стенка кратера кажется освещеннее остальных, и эта — если мы правильно ориентируемся на Землю, — действительно, похоже, находится примерно на нулевой фазе. Эта область определенно светлее всего остального, что я мог видеть из этого окна. Я не уверен
Gemini 4, hier spricht 
تبدو بعض هذه 
Roger, 11. The magnitudes of the midcourse corrections were just for your information, but midcourse 4 was down around 2.0 feet
आर्
Houston, Apollo 11. Lors de notre prochain passage par le point de roulis 0, nous nous arrêterons, ce qui nous donnera une inclinaison de 90 degrés. Je comprends que vous souhaitez que nous passion
- - 17 と 1 秒のオー
Okay, Charlie. Crew status report follows: CDR 11023, CMP 10025, LMP 09027. Canister change 
Sette, Zanz
BATT Charlie 37
알겠습니다. 보조 라디에이터 입력 온도는 70도에서 약 72도 사이이고, 라디에이터 출력 온도는 약 30도입니다. 글리콜 증발기 온도는 약 65도이고, 증기 압력은 최대치이며, 글리콜 배출 압력은 약 9psi입니다. 보조 축압기 보호복 온도는 약 52도이고, 객실 온도는 약 58도입니다. 압력은 보호복이 4.1, 객실이 5입니다. 이산화탄소 분압은 1을 약간 넘는 약 1.1입니다. 건물 측면 온도는 72도이고, 헬륨은 3500, N2 A는 2300, N2 B는 약 2450입니다. 연료는 약 165이고, 연료 전지 1은 둘 다 닫혀 있고 압력이 0입니다. 피부 온도는 405도입니다. 응축기 배기가스는 낮은 스케일입니다. 연료 전지 2의 경우 현재 O2 또는 H2 유량은 0.13~0.14로 측정되고 있으며, O2 유량은 현재 최대 스케일 상한에 고정되어 있지만 추진기 작동에 따라 변동하고 있습니다. 이로 인해 메인 버스 A의 전압도 약 1.1의 안정적인 값에서 최대 스케일 상한까지 변동하는 현상이 나타나고 있습니다. TSKIN은 약 445이고 응축기 배기 17은 180입니다. 연료 전지 1은 0암페어이고, 2는 44에서 약 48 사이의 
روجر. نود أن نؤكد بخصوص هذا TPI أنك قمت بالنسخ بشكل صحيح مع الارتفا
हमारे टीवी मॉनिटर में कुछ क्षैतिज पट्टियाँ दिखाई दे रही हैं। क्या ये पट्टियाँ आपको भी दिखाई दे रही हैं, या आपको स्पष्ट तस्वीर 
アクエリアス、ヒュースト
7
ठीक है। जैक, यह एक लंबी प्रक्रिया है, इसमें शायद दो या तीन पृष्ठ लगेंगे। यह मानकर चल रहे हैं कि आप अ
ほら、このハンドコントローラーをシミュレーターみたいに叩くと、MINIMUM IMPULSEって言うんだけど、ただ叩くだけで、
Roger, le niveau de carburant est de
Ok. La temperatura nella cupola della tuta è di 21°C. La temperatura nella cupola dell
Okay. Copy that. Can you tell us something about the orientation of this band? You mentioned that last night also - that you also had a band about 10 degrees wide that ran across. Is there an orientation that we can tie tha
그것
Burn complete
Хорошо. Я толь
ठीक है। हम ऐसा करेंगे। जब आप सही स्थिति में आ जाएंगे, तो हम आपको बता देंगे कि हमें एंटीना स्
आपको इसे फेंकना
Vorremmo - In un test finale, quando avrai terminato il tempo a tua disposizione, ti chiederemo di rimuovere tutti i filtri e di farci vedere
Jim, bitte verwenden Sie Ihre aktuelle feine Li
Yeah, I think it is. I didn't want to rush into it, and I didn't get too hot. I know you are concerned. I'd rather come up on the right setting than dicker around going back
और हम लगभग 5 या 6 सेकंड में हवाई को प्रसारण सौंपने जा रहे हैं। कुछ क्षणों के
ठीक है। मैं चार्ट निकाल लेता हूँ
여기는 시그마 세
ठीक है, अब। आपक
أجريتُ ثلاثة اختبارات خلال عملية التسليم تلك. اثنان منها كانت نتائجهما أقل من -19.6، واثنان كانت نتائجهما أقل من -19.8، وواحد كانت نتائجه أ
Je viens de voir quelque chose. C'est peut-être… Ils ont dit que Borman… pouvait le voir; ils ne pouvaient pas l'entendre, mais ils le voyaient très b
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴
Tutto bene. Mi senti? Come ti sen
Roger. 
Okay. We're predicting at the nominal time of your next midcourse, which is entry interface minus 2 hours - we're predicting 1.4 foot per second burn which changes your gamma at entry interface by a tenth of a degree. Right now with no further maneuvers, your gamma is minus 6.39 degrees, and we're going to steepen it up very slightly to hit the c
Роджер. Я читаю ваши сообщения уже некоторое время. Пытался связаться с вами по КВ-диапазону, но безуспешно. Моё состояние хорошее; состояние капсулы хорошее; режим управления — электронное; гироскопы закрыты; маневрирование отключено. Уровень топлива 74-85 [процентов]. Кислород 87-100 [процентов]. Температура в кабине немного высоковата — 104 [градуса]. Температура пара в скафандре 
45 40 GET 세타, 7.5; 범위, 1000.01
Nous avons coupé les communic
Er hatte Schwierigkeiten, die Orientierung zu behalten, und mir schien, als orientierte er sich fortan am Raumschiff, ohne darauf zu achten, in welche Richtung es zeigte. Er konnte es tatsächlich recht schnell drehen, bis zu 2° pro Sekunde. Ich wollte diese Drehgeschwindigkeiten unter diesem Wert halten. Als er wieder ins Raumschiff einstieg, hatten wir erhebliche Probleme
Okay. Mi aveva detto che sarebbe potuto succedere, e aveva
حسنًا. هذه 
حسنًا. بعد ذلك، سيتجهون نحو القمر لالتقاط صورة له - عفواً، سيتجهون نحو القمر لالتقاط وحدة الخدمة وتصويرها، وسي
罗杰。我先去收拾行李，
... thrust to NORMAL; DELTA-V thrust, two, OFF; PITCH and YAW to AUTO; gimbal MOTORS PITCH a
Хо
Sì, anche la si
了解。了解しました、ディーク。ヨー方向にプラス80度、ピッチ方向にマイナス
Roger, 11. Vorremmo effettuare uno scarico delle acque reflue a vostro piacimento nel prossimo futuro. Non è previsto un orario specifico. In basso per la correzione di metà rotta 3, che è di circa 53 55, stiamo eliminando la correzione di metà rotta numero 3 e tutti gli elementi ad essa associati. Per vostra informazione, i
11，我们希望您目前切换到
Okay. You
阿波
D'accord. C'est beaucoup mieux. On suppose que votre problème de batterie était dû à un dysfonctionnement du commutateur thermique: un signal d'avertissement s'est déclenché une fois, puis une alarme générale s'est déclenchée à nouveau. On surveillera les batteries, puisqu'aucun sign
هي نفسها التي أعطيناها لك ق
Bene. Riprendendo con T 00014 00
- -
프렌드십 세븐, 잔지바르
美しい写真で
Roger. Now, that - the burn attitude will be coming up on a pad, but, basically, we're looking for a local horizontal retrograde burn, which means, using a, if you put the horizontal line on the on the horns of the Earth and then roll to place the X-axis in the direction of the Sun, we'll - that will put us in both burn attitude; and you can check that via the Sun which will be in the detent 2. Should lie right along the cursor at the top. We'll have some more words on that for you mom
एसीएस वाक
여
Хорошо, Вэнс. Ты говоришь, что нам следует начать подготовку по плану действий в чрезвычайных ситуациях примерно в это время, и я сейчас обсужу это с Джимом, и мы свяжемся с тобой. В положении для управления двигателем мы должны видеть Солнце прямо в верхней точке, и я предполагаю, что это фиксатор номер 2. Мы с Джимом уже говорили об этом, и, просто взглянув на терминатор на Земле, мы определили, что Солнце находится примерно под углом 70-65 градусов, так что это будет как раз там. У нас есть одно правило управления двигателем, которое гласит: если скорость превышает 10 градусов в секунду, нужно остановить двигатель. И после того, как мы отрегулируем двигатель, ты хочешь, чтобы я оставил 470 на некоторое время, чтобы вы все мо
여기서 당신의 태도는 괜찮아 보입
收到。收到，11。非常感谢。我们想问一
참고로 말씀드리자면, 3시 26분 33초 현재 하늘에 10개의 입자가 떠 있습니다. 제 눈에는 분명히 빛나 보이는 것 같습니다. 마치 작은 서리 조각처럼 
이건 13입니다. 
सेवन, यह कैलिफोर्निया है
हाँ। मैं उल्टा हो गया हूँ। अब म
كين، تأكد من الاتصال بي إذا لاحظتَ أن زوايا الكاميرا بدأت تقترب من حالة التثبيت أو أي شيء آخر. ما زلت أشعر ببعض النعاس. لا أريد أن ينتهي بي الأمر بمو
I tubi di pressione della tut
Das ist alles, was wir im Moment haben. Wir werden später im Fernsehen noch ein paar weitere A
11번, 휴스턴. 이제 아주 좋은 사진을 얻었습니다. 
好的。首先要确认交流电已接通，也就是面板 16 上的逆变器 2 断路器已闭合。然后，在面板 11 的“飞行显示”部分，我们需要确认 GASTA 和 C
Okay. Jetzt – das ist – das geht in Richtung Stationkeeping-Ei
ヒューストン、脱出準備をしていた時の窓の外の景色について話す時間はあまりありませんでしたが、その時までには北半球の明るい部分全体、北米、北大西洋、ヨーロッパ、北アフリカなどが見えてい
That's affirmative. And we want you to maneuver with a o
Roger. Bonne transmissio
瞄准器目
Okay, strike all that other stuff. It sounds to me like you've got a mechanical problem in the valve. Is
और, मैंने अब इन्सुलेशन ह
Das ist richtig. Nimm einfach BAT 6, Jack. In der nächsten Zeile standen BATTERIE 1 und 3. Mach daraus BATTERIE 1, 2, 3 und 4. Füge einfach BATTERIE 2 und 4 hi
बज़, हम देख रहे हैं कि आप वहां अपनी खिड़की पर गार्ड लगा रहे हैं, और अब वापस 
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। फ्यूल सेल की सफाई और अपशिष्ट जल का निपटान पूरा
Okay. Einen Moment
저는
Да, цена снова подн
Quello che vedi, Mike, è... Houston, quello che vedi è l'emisfero occidentale. Guardando... in alto c'è il Polo Nord; al centro - appena più in basso al centro c'è il Sud America - fino a Capo Horn. Vedo la Bassa California e la parte sud-occidentale deg
好的，万斯。我们现在离正对着月亮还有一点距离。吉姆正透过3号窗口拿着摄像机。太阳从我们左侧大约40度角照射过来，接下来我们要向你们展示大约30秒的污水排放画面，让你们看看它到底是
حسنًا يا جاك. لا نريد إزعاجك، لكن عليك التفكير - أو ما هي أفكارك - بشأن المناورة التالي
Всё в пор
罗杰，休斯顿。你读
D'accord. Conformément aux instructions sur l'
Утвердител
نعم. كانت أولى دوراتنا على المقود كالتالي: 007 للأمام، 005 لليسار، و007 للأعلى. أما الدورة الأخيرة فكانت: 004 للأمام، 006 لليمين، و003 للأعلى. وهذا يتوافق إلى حد كبير مع الرسم البياني. كنا أقل بقليل من الخط الا
페어링은
Indian Ocean Ship, Indian Ocean Ship, Sigma Seve
了解しました、ジム。手続きはできるだけ早く完成させて、皆さんにお届けできるように努めています。手続きは既に完了しています。現在、CMS/LMSで実行して統合し、参加者の姿勢が適切であること、タイムラインが適切でリラックスした雰囲気であることなど、あらゆる点を万全
Sagt ihnen, dass
دخلنا الغلاف الجوي بنفس الطريقة في أبولو 8 مع هيوستن، حيث قام باز بتشغيل سخانات وحدة القيادة وتركها تعمل. أطلقت أجهزة التشغيل صوت "أطلق!"، فتوقفت الخزانات تمامًا؛ لم يكن لدينا وقود. كان معدل الدوران بطيئًا جدًا... خرجنا إلى وحدة التحكم وبدأنا في جمع المعلومات، لكننا تركنا المركبة تعمل وراقبناها؛ ثم قامت المركبة بقفزة قصيرة، قفزة من الأسفل... لكن ليس كثيرًا، ثم قفزت قفزة طويلة... لكن - 
이게 
ठीक है, ऐसा ल
We'll update you on the final Height-Adjust over Hawaii. Also, we'd like you to check on your X axis... It's slightly out of tolerance. So don't press the START COMP until late for your Height-Adjust. We'll get a better hack 
Gus, sono Jim. Hai qualche mess
Stellen Sie Ihr
没关系，它们都很好——在我看
روجر، أسمعك بوضوح ت
我眼前出现了一些漂亮的星星，还有一些白色的小物体，它们似乎是从太空舱里飞出来的，然后飘散开来。如果它们是偏航指示器，那就太棒了。我怀疑我看到的那颗星是大角星。很有意思
RKV
ईगल, ह्यू
うまくいき
रॉजर। आपके P57 के लिए, हमने थोड़ी खोजबीन की, और ऐसा लगता है कि डिटेंट 6 पर सीरियस और रिगेल इसके लिए बहुत अच्छे रहेंगे। सीरियस पर सूर्य का कोण लगभग 43 डिग्री है, और रिगेल पर लगभग 55 ड
If you aline it in a 3-feet-per-second burn, if you are 10 degrees off on the Platform, it'd be hard for us to see it, as far as the Delta-V operation is. So why don't we - as we come upon the stage we'll put it in SEF for a little while. Well, 5 minutes before you're supposed to go to ORBIT RATE. Okay. I'll just put it in SEF COMP right now. Kin
La communication lors de cette conférence est excellente. Nous n'aurons pas 
Это «Сигма Семь». Сейчас я проверю работу высокопроизводительных двигателей с электрон
Здравствуйте, Guaymas Com Tech, Guaymas Com Tech. Это Friendship 
로저
那里的电
Houston, Apollo 11. Nous avons le continent africain face à nous, et bien sûr, tout rapetisse à mesure que le temps passe. La Méditerranée est parfaitement dégagée. Le soleil semble sur le point de se coucher près de Madagascar. La bande équatoriale africaine se détache nettement. On distingue un vert foncé, presque boueux, comparé aux teintes sableuses de la pointe sud de l'Afrique et, bien sûr, du Sahara au nord du continent. Un nuage assez remarquable apparaît près de la frontière entre l'Afghanistan et le Pakistan. Il est sur le point de disparaître à l'horizon. Il projette une ombre assez importante. Il est isolé. Il ne semble pas y avoir d'autres nuages… La bande nuageuse près de la zone de conve
Хорошо. Это должен быть Бэтмен Ч
روجر. ملاحظات: تشارلي بوبا 1، تشارلي ب
Ac
Roger. Sono Gemini 4. Sono il Pilota di Comando. Ho appena finito un pisolino di circa 5 ore e mezza, di cui le ultime 3 ore di sonno sono state piuttosto buone. Le prime 2 e mezza sono state piuttosto agitate. Sto consumando il secondo pasto del quart
Bien sûr. Côté sports, pas grand-chose à signaler. UCLA domine les deux classements de basket. Si vous avez une question sur un classement en particulier, n'hésitez pas à me le dire, et je vous confirmerai s'il figure dans le top 10. Concernant le match des étoiles universitaires du Nord, qui se déroule demain, le Nord est légèrement favori face au Sud. Ara Parseghian entraîne l'équipe du Nord, et il compte six joueurs de Notre Dame dans ses rangs; ils devraient donc être redoutables. L'entraîneur de l'équipe du Sud est 
Yes, I guess it's 5
Apollo
روجر. لن نف
هل تعتقد أ
好的。
Хорошо. Мы этого не сделали. Мы еще не завершили. Мы начнем.
Хорошо. Всё верно. Единственное, что у меня есть для тебя, Джек, это три дополнительных вопроса дл
Не знаю. Солнце действительно слепит глаза, Га
Houston, Apollo 11. L'option 3 est te
— И он пьёт свой восхитительный апельсиновый напиток. Может, мне следовало бы сказать, что он пьёт свой апельсиновый напиток. Обычно он не такой быстрый. Билл сегодня очень спешит. Ну, это то, что мы едим. Теперь ещё одна очень важная часть космического корабля — это навигационная станц
وجاك، هيوستن. للعلم فقط، يخبرني أننا في نطاق
Хорошо, оставайтесь на месте,
ठीक है। हम अंतरिक्ष यान के अंदर वापस आ गए हैं। हमने दबाव को 5 psi तक पुनः स्थापित कर लिया है। मैं फिर से दोहराता हू
रॉजर। मैं समझता हूँ।
Близнецы 4, это
Ok. Procederemo con lo spegnimento. Immagino che, se necessari
Roger, Houston. È quello che stiamo cercando di fare. Sto 
La responsabilità di questo volo ricade innanzitutto sulla storia e sui giganti della scienza che hanno preceduto questo sforzo; poi sul popolo americano, che ha espresso il suo desiderio attraverso la propria volontà; poi, su quattro amministrazioni e sui loro Congressi, per aver attuato tale volontà; e infine, sui team delle agenzie e dell'industria che hanno costruit
Bien reçu. Nous avons vérifié le vaisseau spatial et le système de guidage du lanceur. Tout semble en bon état. Nous estimons à plus de 99 % la probabilité d'une coupure du guidage du lanceur; la situation semble donc très stable. Pour information, nous avons reçu environ une minute d'image TV exploitable, le système fonctionne donc apparemment. Vous êtes à un peu plus d'une minute de Canary; Tananarive est à 2 heures
Frank, nous pensons que la procédure dont vous parlez n'est pas vrai
روجر. 7.4 وكان لدي حوالي 0.2 معروضة، 
Die Kabine ist bereit, ich möchte die Kuppel nicht mehr absenken. Es lief alles bestens. Zeitcheck: 18 Minuten. Alles in Ordnung. Schubdüsen: Rollen links (automatisch): 119 Grad. Rollen rechts (automatisch): 115 Grad. Rollen links (manuell): 100 Grad. Kabinenwärmetauscher: 43 Grad. Nicken (automatisch): 
Roger. Panel rundown follows: The fuse switches on the left panel are all as previously reported, without repeating them again. Squib is armed. Auto Retrojettison is off. Mode Select is normal, auto, gyro normal. All "T" Handles are in. The Retro Delay is normal, Cabin lights are on both. I have the red filters on, of course. The Telem low freq
Bene, in quell'ultimo passaggio abbiamo scattato circa 38 foto con il Synoptic Terrain Photography, partendo un po' a est di San Diego e fino a quando non abbiamo incontrato di nuovo la copertura nuvolosa. Abbiamo ripreso con immagini intermittenti non appena abbiamo iniziato a sorvolare la parte meridionale degli Stati Uniti, passando per l'Alabama e il Mississippi, fino ad arrivare in Florida. Abbiamo scattato alcune ottime foto del meteo in quella zona, poi abbiamo scattato alcune foto degli aeroporti intorno a Jacksonville. Abbiamo scattato un paio di foto di Cape Cod. Probabilmente una delle foto migliori che abbiamo scattato è stata quella scattata al ritorno, e abbiamo immortalato l'intera formazione meteorologica lungo la costa, partendo dalla Florida e risalendo fino al Texas. Una linea meteorologica molto ben definita che seguiva da vicino la costa. Poi abbiamo scattato alcune foto della formazione meteorologica nello Stato della Florida, intorno a Cuba e nella zona insulare, e nel golfo
좋아요, 17페이지로 가죠. 부하를 -4분으로 설정하세요. CB(11), 인버터 2, 닫기, 그리고 "인버터 1 선택"은 지우세요. 속도 스케일은 "초당 25도"로 변경합니다. "밸런스 커플"은 "끄기"로 설정할게요. 그리고 참고로, 감쇠율 지점에서 우리가 전에 나눴던 인수 관련 논의가 떠오르네요, 찰리
Where is 
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। 5 एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 37201, माइनस 060, प्लस 047; टीआईजी 086 09 3666. संज्ञा 81: प्लस 33521, प्लस 03441, माइनस 01458; रोल अ
로저. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 창문, 자세 표시기, 잠망경 모두 정상 작동합니다. 현재 제 뒤쪽 잠망경으로 적의 모습이 보입니다. 기내 압력은 5.5로 유지되고 있습니다. 기내 온도는 95도입니다. 상대 습도는 28%입니다. 냉각을 위해 기내-복장 온도 조절기를 물 온도 상승 위치
Хорошо. Мы не наблюдали уменьшения количества отходов, и, похоже, температура сопла указывала на то, что что-то происходит, и мы пытал
Roger. Inizieremo con le notizie dal mondo. Elogi per g
Continuo
حسنًا، تم إغلاق مضخم ال
Эй, Чарли, ты хочешь сказать, что на короткий промежуток времени он действительно загрузил какие-то ценные данные, помимо тех, которые считыва
收到。正在进行中。
Okay. For the mid-Pacific, the general condition is good. You can expect cloud bases 2000 foot scattered, visibility 10 miles, wind 070 at 12, wave heights 4 feet, altimeter 2974. Sunrise 10 Zulu, and first light 16:49 Zulu. ship will be Yorktown; the aircraft will be Airboss number 1 and 2, and Recoveries 1, 2, and 3. The estimated time to a the ship is - Yorktown is on the target point, Airboss aircraft 15 minutes and will be on-scene commander. Recoveries 1, 2, and 3 are SH3 Alfas, and they go with the Yorktown, so they are at the target point. All of them have swimmers aboard. If the recovery aircraft do not hear from the spacecraft; they will go ahead and put swimmers in the water, and if you are in good shape and give them a call, then they will hold off on dropping swimmers until s
إذا تمكنا من تشغيل ذلك الشيء مرة أخرى، فهل تريد منا أن نتركه ي
Хорошо, состояние сгорания: DELTA-TIG равно нулю, время сгорания 2 плюс 30. Углы PAD: DELTA VGX после триммирован
ええ、そうだと思います。G&Nがそう
रॉजर, 11. यह ओरिजिनल कैप कॉम है। शानदार काम के लिए बधाई। आप लोगों न
ठीक है। यह अच्छी बात है। मुझे लगता ह
À ce stade, nous avons une vitesse de lacet à droite de 1 degré par seconde, un tangage de 0 degré par seconde et un roulis à gauche de 0,75 degré par seconde. La quantité de carburant reste inchangée. Aucun fonctionnement des propulseurs n'est détectable. Nous effectuon
Okay, Sie könnten ihnen mitteilen, dass wir, falls sie noch nicht daran gedacht haben, eine Kamera für Mondoberflächensequenzen an Bord haben, die über einen eigenen Akku verfügt und mit der man eine ganze Reihe von Bildern aufnehmen kann, und die auch dafür verwendet werde
收到。这里是友谊七号。
Хорошо. Вы говорите, что в режимах 
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We recommend you accept the NOUN 
Во-вторых, мы вернемся к стандартному расписанию с запланированным временем пробуждения 121 час и 12 минут. Мы как бы упустили из виду замену 9-го баллона с гидроксидом лития во время подготовки. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы сделали это сейчас. Связь для сна будет осуществляться в стандартно
- - in cima al
Seven, this is Cape. The President will be talking to you and while he is talking I'll be sending
약 8초 만에 한 바퀴를 완전히 도는 것 같아요. 빙글빙글 돌고 있네요. 지금 보니 전보다 조금 더 멀리 나온 것 같습니다. 약간 벗어났어요. 대략 1.5마일, 아니면
好的，吉姆。看起来你的利率已经降到足够低了。建议你继续向下按回车键，然后稍等片刻，让我们再检
We need another small correction to bring it to our center screen. If you could maneuver toward the terminator, that is the part of it we
A
Okay. At of 147 plus 00, total minus 2.0 percent, which is about minus 14 pounds. Alfa minus 12.0, Bra
Roger. Thank you. Understand you were t
鹰，哥伦比亚。我听到你的声音很大很沙哑。尼尔的VOX信号不太好。请安静15秒
Roger bezüglich der Trägheitsnavigation. Und los geht's mit dem 2. PAD. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, plus 166, minus 081; TIG 080 11 3603. NOUN 81: minus 01408, minus alle Kugeln, minus 00743. Alle Kugeln rollen, 196 359 00657, plus 00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Sextant Stern 23 1160 138. Der Rest des PAD ist NA. Ausrichtung, Vega und Deneb 243 183 012. Füllstand, zwei Jets 19 Sekunden. Anmerkungen: Für Ihre Ladung wünschen wir einen R1 20101 anstelle des Wertes, der im Flugplan angegeben ist. Die Sextanten-Sternprüfung muss zwischen 79°30'10" (Aufgang des Sterns über dem Horizont) und 79°52'10" (Sonnenaufgang in Ihrer Region) erfolgen, da sich dieser Stern relativ nahe an der Sonne befindet. Die Brennrichtung ist: Kopf nach unten, re
L'incident s'est produit alors que nous étions dans la configuration Agena-vaisseau spat
Inszen
휴스턴, 테이프 돌려주
ठीक है, जिम। हम चाहेंगे कि आप पृष्ठ 24 खोलें, जो "30-मिनट सक्रियण" है, और यह मध्य-
حسنًا. لقد أبقينا سخان الأكسجين رقم 1 في وضع الإيقاف. أعتقد أن هذه كانت آخر تعليم
فتحتُ واقي الوجه قبل قليل لتناول حبة الزيلوز. أما باقي الطع
Okay, and, Jim, we wonder whether you've attempted to get drinking water out of the command module po-ti [sic] tank yet. It's - Is that going all right or do you have any questions on it.
In ogni caso
Вперед, продолж
Les murs ont vraiment l'air criblés de trous. Effectivement, et ils ne sont pas rebouchés. Creux, comme si quelqu'un avait peint en blanc verticalement sur les bord
そして13番、ヒューストン。約17秒後に回避
로저. 189 플러스 00: 총량 -1%; 알파 -11; 브라
खैर, मुझे नहीं पता। मैं अभी एक मिनट में यहाँ पूरी सावधानी से अलाइनमेंट करना शुरू क
Roger, Apollo 8. Il vostro Green Team si congederà tra pochi minuti e, prima di farlo, Charlesworth e tutti noi vorremmo dirvi che ci siamo divertiti e che non vediamo l'ora di rivedervi a Hous
روجر. سننتظ
Okay, Joe. Fai scivolare il sacchetto sopra il contenitore in modo che l'arco si
鹰，我觉得你的飞行器看起来很棒，尽管你现在倒
रॉजर, केप कंट्रोल। हम पैराशूट ख
Le volet ne se baisse pas et les portes, ou peu importe comment on les appelle, ne s'ouvrent plus. C'est la troisième série, à peu près. On les prend à exactement cinq minutes d'intervalle à partir de la première, et elles sort
كن
D'accord, Joe. Concernant les nouvelles, Jim préférerait attendre un peu avant de les diffuser, et je voudrais faire une demande au FAO, s'il le veut bien, dans la journée, lorsque nous recevrons une mise à jour du plan de vol avec les activités que nous avons convenu de rendre optionnelles pendant l'orbite lunaire et les quelques activités que nous allions supprimer. Je crois que
अब रेट्रोसीक्वेंस दिखाई दे रहा है, जिसका मतलब है कि आप इसे ठीक 1 मिनट आगे बढ़ा सकते हैं और वही 
Okay. Turning to the next page and the last page, Jim, 34. Top of the page, "Monitor DELTA-VX via 470." Scratch next two lines, "When propellant quantit
Voilà pour l'actualité internationale et nationale, ainsi que les reportages.
وقد اكتمل فحص التطهي
Okay. Während Jack im Funkverkehr war, habe ich hier durch das Dockfenster geschaut und konnte erneut einen starken Partikelschauer aus dem Servicemodul aufsteigen sehen. Diesmal scheint die Position auf der anderen Seite zu sein. Bisher haben wir sie immer aus Fenster 1 gesehen, und von hier aus sieht es so aus, als ob sie 
حسنًا. أعتقد - حسنًا. نحن نغادر النافذ
了解しました。よろしいでしょうか。SPANの担当者にその問題を確認して、明日の朝にお知らせします。もし今夜お電話をいただく必
Okay, die Lüfter lief
फिर, जब मैंने बोतल चलाई, और फिर, लगभग सब कुछ जो हुआ... जब से यह सब शुरू हुआ, मैं सीएमसी, ऑटो पर वापस चला गया,... मुझे परेशान कर रहा था। और लगभग उसी समय वे सब... हे भगवान, वे चमक... मुझे लगा कि
了解です。CB(16)のFred-o
Okay. Die wichtigste Neuigkeit, die derzeit in den Nachrichten verbreitet wird, ist, dass alle 82 Besatzungsmitglieder der Pueblo zurückgekehrt sind. Sie überquerte
…それで終わ
ジム、荷物の移動が終わって都合が良ければ、バッテリーの充電を少し中断してTMを起動し、昨日と同じように温度を再度確認したいと思います。現在、バッテリーの容量は111アンペア時間ですが、最終的にはピーク時で116アンペア時間くらいまで上げたいと思っています。もう一つ、テレメトリの起動手順をもう一
Credo di sì. Vedo delle crepe sul rivestimento
Houston, Apollo 11. Nous venons d'avoir
Всё отлично. — Подождите, я сообщу вам значение дельта-параметра — 3,0; мне нужно 3,5, прежде чем я с
这是Sigma Seven，展示的是日出时分倒飞，偏航角90度的效果。最直观的感受就是你的飞行方向，就像透过火车车窗向外看一样。你会看到地貌在你眼前掠过，各种
짐, 회로 차단기는 회로 차단기 작동 페이지에 입력됩니다. 우리가 여기에 도착해서 모든 변동을 억제하고 나면, S가 
حسنًا. BIOMED، مُطفأ؛ معدل بت منخفض؛ نسخ احتياطي للصوت المنخفض؛ مضخم الطاقة إلى وضع التشغيل الأساسي؛ قواطع الدائرة، اللوحة 16، قاطع دائرة مضخم الطاقة، مفتوح. مفتاح وظيفة الن
Non, non. J'e
分かりました。バッテリーの状態ですが、バッテリーAは39.32アンペア時間、バッテリーBは35.21アンペア時間、バッテリーCは38.46アンペア時間でした。残りのクライオ燃料量は前回お伝えした通り、酸素がタンク1つにつき180ポンド、水素がタンク1つにつき11ポンドです。現在、サービスモジュールのコンピューター値によると、クワッドAが45%、ブラボーが50%、チャーリーが58%、デルタが48%です。二次燃料タンクについては、実際の燃料残量の37%で燃料を投入する予定です。通信が途絶えたなどの事態に備えて、搭載されている計量計で50%の時点で二次燃料タンクを投入することを推奨します。しかし、独自の計算が使える限り、このままにしておくのも悪くありません。いずれにせよ、突入前に二次燃料タ
La temperatura della cupola si mantiene sui 21°C. La cupola della cabina è sui 10°C. L'ingresso della tuta è confortevole a 16°C. La pressione della tuta è costante a 5 psi. Formazione di nubi molto interessante per la foto 6b sul retro a colori. Bella collezione di nubi circ
Okay. Wir haben Ihre Daten erhalten. Wir sind bereit, Ihre Anfrage zu bearbeiten, und wir stehen bereit, Ihren Statusvektor und Ihre externen Daten hochzuladen, sobald Sie uns Ihr ACCEPT-Z
11, Хьюстон. Мы только что были готовы переключиться с OMNI Delta на вашу антенну с высоким коэффициентом усиления. Можете подтвердить,
Роджер. Хьюстон, это «Аполлон-8». Что мы делаем с отслеживанием контрольных точек — мне удалось найти точку -1 одновременно с попыткой найти точку -2 на этом обороте. Я обнаружил две метки, которые такие же маленькие, но более различимые, чем те, которые мне были даны. Я знаю, что могу повторить процесс и найти ту же маленькую точку на следующем обороте. Теперь я могу попытаться найти контрольные точки, которые записаны, но думаю, что
唉，唉。我只提前一个小时才准备好（笑）。迟到总比不到好；早
I understand the technique, Jack. We're burning to give us time to steepen our entry angle, and it will be perpendicular to our f
Aigle, Colo
ठीक है,
ठीक है... इस... वेक्टर पर। ठीक है, R1 प्लस 45498... ठीक
Le serrature della bandiera sono controllate. *** le serrature sono controllate, l
...hier... Wir sind bei Minute 38 und mir ist aufgefallen, dass die Triebwerke nur auf der rechten Seite feuern. Das könnte der Plattformmodus sein oder daran liegen, dass
Gémeaux 4, Hawaï CAP C
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. نود الآن إجراء فحص احتياطي للاتصالات الصوتية. اضبط ش
रॉजर। जाओ। क्या तुम्हारे पास समय
هيوستن، أبولو 11. هل يمكنك إطلاعي على آخر المستجدات بشأن
Circa - sul lato sinistro, circa a metà strada sotto la scritta ", manovra verso il bersaglio TOPO 54A", inserisci il commento "Il bersa
我们在阿波罗8号上也经历过类似的情况……当时休斯顿，老巴兹打开了指令舱加热器，然后就一直开着。激活器“嗖”的一声，两个燃料箱都启动了；我们没燃料了。速度非常慢……我们当时在控制台里开始汇报情况，但还是让指令舱继续运行，观察着它；结果这
Bene. In pratica, è corretto. Lasciate che vi spieghi tutto in modo schematico per un minuto, poi vi leggerò i passaggi. Penso che sarà più chiaro. Lo schema prevede che la palla possa volare verso una serie di angoli che punteranno l'ottica verso la Luna. Ora, in qualsiasi momento, in qualsiasi posizione ci troviamo, se riuscite a guardare nel telescopio e a riconoscere le formazioni stellari a sufficienza da credere di poter effettuare un allineamento da soli, è qui che vorremmo interromperci e lasciarvi procedere con il vostro allineamento. Tuttavia, vi stiamo fornendo una procedura che vi darà ciò che sappiamo che potete vedere nel telescopio senza preoccuparvi di riflessi o cose del genere, e non è previsto che questa procedura debba essere seguita oltre il punto in cui siete certi di avere una buona definizione delle formazioni stellari nel vostro telescopio. Se devi proseguire, manovreremo, daremo un'occhiata alla Luna, faremo un segno lì, poi manovreremo di nuovo con gli angoli / e daremo un'occhiata al Sole, e prenderemo un altro segno sul Sole e questo completerà l'allineamento. Ora, lo schema di allineamento prevede che ti forn
ええと、見てみましょ
알겠습니다. 전자식 엔
نعم سيدي، يبدو الأمر جيداً يا والي. سنراك في ال
面板 8 上的 B3 和 C4 都已关闭，我理解您想要什么 - 请再说一遍您想要在寄存
哦，太好了！灯光
I'm about as low as you can go, Joe. I'm s
Okay. I just checked getting back up to t
«Дружба Семь», это Muchea Com Tech. Вы 
Oka
Le point d'atterrissage est à peine dans l'obscurité. Ce cratère, dont vous aper
روجر. مايك، لدينا بعض الملاحظات حول أداء اليوم إذا كان لديك دق
Хорошо, на странице 17. Выполните загрузку за минус 4 минуты; это CB(11), ИНВЕРТОР 2, ЗАКРЫТЬ, и вычеркните «Выбрать ИНВЕРТОР 1». ШКАЛА СКОРОСТИ изменена на «25 градусов в секунду». «БАЛАНСИРУЮЩАЯ ПАРА» мы выключим; и, кстати, по поводу снижения скоростей, это возвращает нас к обсуждению, которое у нас уже было, Чарли, о поглощениях. Ты мог бы обсудить, во сколько нам обойдется изменение дельты V, если возникнет проблема с 
Ich habe die Plattform vollständig hochgefahren, und sie scheint ordnungsgemäß zu funkti
了解しました。承知しました。私たちも今地球を見ていますが、非常に長く細い雲の帯があります。ジェット気流のようです。本当に壮観です。地球をほぼ一周、いや半周
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. نحن على وشك الوصول إلى أقصى حدٍّ يمكننا فيه الحصول على أي نوع من الصورة على شاشات التلفز
1:30 बजे आसमान काफी काला हो रहा ह
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। पीछे की तरफ मौजूद बड़े क्रेटरों में से एक - मैंने बाहरी दीवार पर एक छोटा, गहरा धब्बा देखा और उस पर एक दूरबीन लगाई। मैं देख पाया - लगभग एक चौथाई मील व्यास का एक क्षेत्र। यह वास्तव में एक ताजा दिखने वाला गहरे रंग का गड्ढा था, और यह इन क्रेटरों की दीवारों पर दिखाई देने वाले अन्य सभी ताजा छोटे क्रेटरों या छेदों से बिल्कुल अलग था। इस विशेष गड्ढे के आसपास ऐसे दो या तीन गड्ढे दिखाई देते हैं - खासकर वह जिसने मेरा ध्यान खींचा। वाकई अद्भुत।
È davvero una vista fantastica attraverso quel sestante. Un minuto fa, durante q
रॉजर। फ्रैंक, हम अभी भी यहाँ स
حس
Es rollt ziemlich stark, hält aber innerhalb der Totzone. Es scheint eher bei plus/minus 8 als bei plus/minus 5 zu liegen – möglicherweise haben wir ein Problem mit dem Rolltriebwerk, aber falls ja, wird es dadurch außer Gefecht gesetzt. Es hat keinen Sinn, sich darüber Sorg
वाह, वाह। हाँ, यह - सुंदर है। यार, यह तो बहुत ही खूबसूरत है।
아
알겠습니다, 밴스. 기다리는 동안 참고로 말씀드리자면, 명령 모듈은 하셀블라드
حسنًا، سنجرب ذلك، وسنقوم بتشغيل بعض 
Weißt du was? Leg es einf
Радиостанция вызывает
切换到 OMNI Bravo 模式，我们再试一次 Bravo-
Roger, ci abbiam
Jim, je n'ai pas tout compris, mais je crois que vous vouliez savoir quand les pr
Roger. 10, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35189, minus 01513, minus 00346 180 007 000, November Alfa plus 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, boresight star Scorpii Delta (anothe
मुझे यकीन नह
OK, Houston. Nous avons fait tourner
Игл, Хьюстон. У нас есть углы затяжки гиромотора, если вы готовы их скопиров
D'accord. Lorsque nous avons basculé l'interrupteur d'alimentation de la prise IGS à la prise ACME (qui n'est pas censée alimenter l'ordinateur), le voyant de l'ordinateur s'est éteint. Lorsque le voyant de dysfonctionnement s'est allumé, le voyant de l'ordinateur s'est rallumé, mais le voyant de dysfo
Okay. We had the rendezvou
D'accor
Хорошо, Фред. Думаю, ты всё понял. Я не полностью скопировал твою реплику, но всё очень просто. Мы просто приложим новый картридж — верхнюю часть ново
On second thou
Bitte haben Sie etwas Geduld. Wir werden Sie auf d
알겠습니다. 모든 시스템 정상입
正解です。UP TELEMETRY、COMMAND RESET を RE
मुझे लगता है कि अब हम आखिरकार यहाँ पहुँच गए हैं, और मुझे लगता है
아폴로 8호, 휴
저는 바이콘 헬멧을 착용했고, 바이저는 닫혀 있습니다. 다른 모든 장비는 
Roger. Il tuo controllo dell'imbardata tramite ATS è stato buono. Il tuo controllo dell'imbardata quando eri in modalità fly-by-wire è s
Eagle, Columbia. P
Вы подождите, а я буду создавать нулевое смещение в течение 100 се
イーグル、こちらコロンビア。ヒューストンから高ゲインで再捕捉してほしいとの連絡がありました。データ
一切都很顺利。你听到我说话
燃焼ステータスレポートは次の通り: 燃焼は時間どおり、燃焼時間は 4 分 6 秒半、VGX マイナス 1.4、姿勢は標準、トリムなし、VGY はゼロ、V
是谁的蓝色毛巾？
Va be
ヴァンスさん、こんにちは。私たちは月を直接見るには少し距離を置いています。ジムが窓3からカメラを構えています。太陽は私たちの左側から約40度の位置から来ています。これから1分ほどで、約30秒間の廃水投棄の様子をお見せします。本当に素晴らしい
Tranquility Base, little less than 10 minutes here. Everything looks 
レートはほぼ正常、姿勢も正常、フライ・バイ・ワイヤに移行中、ジャイロも正常。およそ、チンパンジー形態に戻ります。バミューダで着地することを理解しています。次のステーシ
Rog
興味深いことに、ロールがドリフトしているように見えますが
Roger, George. La mia modalità di controllo è manuale. I giroscopi sono ingabbiati, la manovra è disattivata. Il carburante è al 45 e al 64 percento, un po' in anticipo rispetto al previsto. L'ossigeno segna tra l'82 e il 100 percento. La temperatura dello sfiato del vapore nella tuta sta scendendo leggermente. È di poco inferiore ai 21 gradi. La pressione in cabina è di 4,6 psia. La temperatura della tuta è scesa a circa 21 gradi. Tutta la potenza è buona, ed ec
Okay. HEATERS DISPLAY, DISPLAY OPEN. And I've long since ha
75시간 37분에 시간 조작을 해 드리겠습니다. 비
حسنًا، الآن ألقي نظرة على المحول والمعدات الموجودة هناك. أستطيع رؤية سطح الفصل؛ إنه نظيف تمامًا. المحركات النفاثة نظيفة أيضًا. الطلاء الحراري والشريط الحراري يبدوان بحالة جيدة. كذلك، يبدو شريط الفيلكرو الذي وضعناه بحالة جيدة بجوار الكاميرا. سأعود 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। रॉजर। हम इसे कूड़ेदान में ले
This is Friendship Seven. That's 
Roger, Apollo 8. Quelques remarques: concernant la prochaine étape, nous avons examiné vos vecteurs d'état et toutes vos informations. La plateforme semble correcte et, si vous le souhaitez, vous pouvez ignorer c
ただし、スーツの吸気温度は依然として
分かりました。ステップ1、BIOMEDをオフにします。ステップ2、LOW BIT RATEに切り替えます。ステップ3、DOWNVOICE BACKUPに切り替えます。ステップ4、POWER AMPをPRIMEに切り替えます。ステップ5、パネル16、POWER AMPのサーキットブレーカーを開きます。ステップ6、RANGE FUNCTI
Je vois maintenant les feux de propulsion clignoter. Alignement de la p
Another nice thing about this, is it's one we've done befor
حسنًا يا جيم. لقد توصلنا إلى توصية بشأن الاتصالات نأمل أن توفر بعض الطاقة عن طر
أودّ التعليق قليلاً على السدس. استخدامه في مركبة فضائية ضيقة أمرٌ بالغ الصعوبة، خاص
لا. لقد وضعنا الحرق - وضعنا الحرق في، وبعد الح
Roger, 11. Wir haben Ihre Beschr
Okay, Jack, mache ich. Jim und ich konnten durch die Fenster Sternbilder beobachten, wenn gerade keine Lüftungsanlage lief. Könntest du mir bitte etwas zu den Verbrauchsmaterialien sagen? Wofür sind si
로저, 조종사님께 전할 메시지입니다. 다저스 1
यह नकारात्मक है। मैंने इसे नहीं खोला। जब तक मैं ये रीडिंग पूरी नहीं कर लेता, तब तक मैं इसे नहीं खोलूंगा। फेक्डा अब मध्य में 1.7 पर विलुप्त हो रहा है, धुंध की परत और पृथ्वी के बीच मध्य स्थिति में। ठीक है, वूमेरा, मेरी स्थिति बहुत अच्छी है। सूट का तापमान काफी कम हो रहा है। स्टीम वेंट का तापमान ज्यादा कम नहीं हुआ है, लेकिन सूट का वात
तो हमें रडार रेंज और थीटा के बारे में पहले से ही जानकारी है। क्या आप हमें वास्तविक रेट्रो समय के बारे में अप
ठीक है। और अगर माइक के पास एक मिनट का समय हो, तो हम थोड़ी सी समस्या का निवारण करना चा
روجر. وأسعارك منخفضة. يبدو أنه يمكنك الب
... the Controller is off
Вот именно это я и имею в виду. Мы можем использовать эти вентиляторы и о
我们向右打
Tr-10 relay must have set in, although I have no clues - other than the rate gyros coming up and I can't bet on those sinc
정말 감사합니다. 목요일에 호넷에서 뵙기를 기대하고 있습니다. 저희 모두
١١، هيوستن. خلال الساعتين ال
वेंट वाल्व और ईसीएस ऑक्सीजन की मरम्मत बहुत चतुराई से की गई थी ताकि जॉन की इस शिकायत का समाधान हो सके कि ऑ
네, 조지 씨. 페이스플레이트는 닫아둘게요. 기내식을 한 조각 먹었는데, 너무 부스러져서 다 흘리고 싶지 않거든요. 그리고 그때
ठी
好的，比尔。我想就上次关于使用机载状态向量进行第 4 步操作的说法做个补充说明。经过地面进一步观察，他们必须开始进行相关计算，与其拖延或重复工
Я т
Хорошо, и у вас всё отлично получается. Приятно, что нет всего этого шума. Позвольте мне рассказать, что я хочу сделать, Джим. Как я уже сказал, мы не будем сейчас давать вам подробные инструкции. Вскоре мы предоставим вам инструкции в следующей форме. Во-первых, у нас будет временная шкала, своего рода план полета, на которой будут указаны время всех основных событий, а также любые конфигурации, настройки переключателей и так далее, которые являются специфическими для нашей конфигурации и кот
Хорошо. Кен, мы добавили несколько комментариев к последней части записи после того, как получили от тебя сообщение, сейчас её перематывают, и ты сможешь получи
Roger, 11. It's a pretty good picture on clarity here. We're having - can you tell us - It appear
Это наглядная демонстрация того, как экипаж взаимодействует с компьютером, общаясь с программами и всем тем, что у нас есть
Ricevuto. Dopo questo p
ठीक है। यहाँ एक निशान है। क्या आप इ
حسنًا يا جيم. هذا أقل عمقًا 
Be a good idea, M
وربما يكون الجمع بين الدقة والسرعة المتوسطة هو أفضل مزيج - مزيج من - السرعة المنخفضة منخفضة للغاية؛ لا يمكننا اللحاق بالهدف
D'accord, Jim. Donc, nous voulons que l'axe Y du vaisseau spatial soit parallèle au termi
Gib uns etwa
No, forse 
아
Roger, Jim. Nous envisageons pour l'instant, à titre expérimental, de commencer environ 45 minutes avant la b
Не думаю, потому чт
Кроме того,
Ok, Vance. Come si legge in banda 
أنا متأكد من أنني لا أستطيع. سأكون أسوأ حالاً لأنني سأكون متأخراً بدرجة كاملة عم
ठीक है। चलिए देखते हैं कि मैंने सब कुछ सही समझा है या नहीं। सबसे पहले, हमें CB 16 INVERTER 2 को बंद करना है, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2 को भी बंद करना है। फिर पैनल 14 पर, INV
Я определённо вижу следы рыскания в окне, в перископе, в прицельной сетке. Само окно работает удовлетворительно при угле обзора (-) 34 градуса, я закрыл гироскоп 
Хью
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। आज हम आपके लिए जो करने वाले हैं, वह है अंतरिक्ष यान ओडिसी से शुरू करना और आपको ओडिसी से सुरंग के रास्ते एक्वेरियस तक ले जाना। हम आपको लैंडिंग वाहन का थोड़ा सा हिस्सा दिखाएंगे
Roger. Hai provato a trasmettere o semplicement
收到。明白了，我会核实。稍
好的。今天早上新闻其实没什么特别的。一切都很平静。我想最大的新闻应该是事故率——也就是节假日死亡人数——这当然不是什么好消息，全国共有233人丧生，其中9人是在平安夜和圣诞节当天在休斯顿遇难的。国际新闻方面，遇难者家属再次成为新闻焦点。本周
أشعر وكأنني مليونير. حسناً، سنرفع الطائرة ونتجه يساراً. سأعود إلي
아폴로 8호, 아
نعم، أتفق معك يا جاك. صعدت أنا وجاك سويجرت إلى الطابق العلوي في وقت سابق، وأحضرنا كلانا علبة، وكنا نبح
Très bien. Nous en sommes au point où, selon le plan de vol que nous avons établi, vous auriez tous fini de manger et Jack et toi prendriez le relais pendant que Fred se reposerait. Donc, conformément au plan, vous vous êtes levés enviro
双子座六号，
Ok, confrontando il volo del 13 con quello dell'Apollo 8, il decollo ha avuto più o meno la stessa quantità di vibrazioni che ho notato sull'Apollo 8, ma all'inizio del volo c'era meno movimento laterale rispetto all'Apollo 8. La separazione dell'S-IC è stata più violenta sull'Apollo 13 che sull'Apollo 8, forse perché ero seduto in un posto diverso, non lo so. Ma ci sono stati circa tre bruschi transitori del cut-off e un paio di grandi scoppi in cui siamo stati sbalzati all'indietro longitudinalmente sulle nostre cinghie prima che l'S-II si spegnesse. E l'S-II era, ovviamente, altrettanto fluido sull'Apollo 13 che sull'Apollo 8, tranne che per il motore numero 5. E non abbiamo avvertito le vibrazioni che abbiamo avvertito sull'Apollo 8 verso la fine dell'accensi
Roger. Stiamo pensando di farlo. Mi chiedevo solo quanto ancora vogliam
Okay. One of the first things we want to do is charge the battery in, so we can get some power over there to do that, and we have procedures ginned up to do it. In regards to reentry, we're planning our last midcourse at 5 hours before entry interface, and, if we have to make one, that is. And then we'd like to jettison the service module at 4 hours and a half, roughly, before entry interface, and take the next 3 to 3-1/2 hours for taking pictures, cranking up the command module G&N, taking care of stowage, and other odds and ends. And we'd hang on to the until 1 hour before entry interface, and then we'd jettison that. And these procedures are going to be run integrated in the CMS and LMS tomorrow morning, and, hopefully, later on in the day, we'll do it again with Mission Control on the loop. A couple of one question is what do we do with the. The thought is that there is adequate O2 in the command module and that the represents high pressure source and a stowage problem, and people are thinking about leaving them in the. The other thing is that we think you might want to make this a suited entry, suiting up prior to jettison, because what we're doing is, when we jettison the, we're going to do it like we did in Apollo
Wir können Ihne
حسنًا يا فريد. هذه عملية لقراءة درجة حرارة خزان وقود الهبوط. لا توجد مشكلة كبيرة، لكن فريقنا يقول إن الجزء السفلي من مرحلة الهبوط ربما يبرد، ونريد فقط التأكد من أن خزان مياه الهبوط سيكون على ما يرام. حاليًا، يبدو أنه لن يتجمد إلا بعد عدة ساعات من تفري
Вы их види
The
Ja, alle haben sich gefragt, ob 
さて、サービスモジュールRCSとSCSを見
Retroattitudine automatica; retrazione automatica del mirino; interruttore di manovra disattivato; leva del periscopio sollevata; potenza UHF-Hi; trasmissione in UHF; segnale continuo; potenza VOX attivata per trasmissione e registrazione; tutte le batterie controllate. R
वै
21-4 백업 
Хорошо. И можете забыть про "Последующие действия". Итак, на странице 17 выполните все действия, и через 4 минуты у нас будет изменение. Первая строка: CB(16) ИНВЕРТОР 3, ЗАКРЫТЬ; строка 2: вычеркните "Выберите ИНВЕРТОР 1". Далее, после "МОНИТОР ПОЛОЖЕНИЯ", мы хотим, чтобы вы установили ШКАЛУ СКОРОСТИ на "25 градусов в секунду". Хорошо, еще через четыре строки до "БАЛАНСИРУЮЩАЯ ПАРА", мы хотим отключить "БАЛАНСИРУЮЩУЮ ПАРУ". Это нужно, чтобы
Довольно ярк
«Аполлон-8», Хью
He copies that. David's here; he says you've kept him so busy he hasn't had time to 
Roger, Jim. Wir gehen davon aus, das
हाँ, बिल्कुल। पैनल 5 पर अगला चरण: हमें मेन बस टाई एसी स्विच को बैट एसी स्थिति पर सेट करना है, मेन बस ए पर सही वोल्टेज की जाँच करनी है और बैट एसी पर एम्पियर मापना है ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके 
11番、こちらはヒューストンです。廃棄物管理排水管からの排気の結果、O2流量センサーが故障していることが判明しました。循環式貯水タンクの排水についてご説明いただいた際に、センサーは動いており、おそらく高い流量を示していると思われますが、十分な流量を示していないように思われました。この点と現在の流量から判断すると、トランスデューサーの故障と結論付けました。車両内のO2濃
OK, 13. Ici Houston. Il semble que nous ayons une perte de flux d'O2 au niveau de la pile à combustible 3. Nous vous demandons donc de fermer la vanne REAC de la pile à combustible 3. Les piles à combustible 1
Und, Fred-o, ich ha
了解。冗長コンポーネントのチェックを行っています
こんにちは、ケープ。フレンドシップセブ
Il n'y avait pas de vel
ठीक है। संज्ञा 26 का प्रयोग करें; तारे 26 और 33। तारा कोण का अंतर सभी गेंदों क
Bene. Stiamo prevedendo che, al momento nominale del tuo prossimo percorso intermedio, ovvero all'interfaccia di ingresso meno 2 ore, prevediamo una combustione di 1,4 piedi al secondo, che modif
Давай, Хь
まだそこにあります。今、まさに見ています。太陽がすぐ後ろにあって、キラキラ光るものが全部見えるんです。ええ、まるで天の川の真ん中にいるみたい。見渡す限り、何千もの小さなキラキラ光が、様々な距離に散らばっている
ロ
Okay. Wir bringen das sekundäre EVAP zum Sieden, die Temperatur hat sich stabilisiert, und deshalb werden wir das EVAP-Druc
わかりました。高ビットレートで続けるつもりです。違いが出るかどうかお聞きしようと思っていたのですが、お察し
روجر، جيم. اعلم أن ضوء الشمس يدخل إلى التلسكوب الماسح، مما يجعل الرؤية مستحيلة، وعليك الاعتماد على السدس فقط. هل 
Bene. Ora sposteremo l'uplink sul backup UpVoice per circa 2 minuti, e potrebbero volerci un paio di secondi prima che si senta la perdita dell'UpVoice. Quindi puoi impostare il tuo switch di up-telemetria sul backup UpVoice e, nel caso in cui tutto questo non dovesse funzionare, sto leggendo l'orologio e ci 
– – unten im Bild. Ich schätze, das ist die Stelle am Ro
저희는... 좋습니다. 최대한 빨리 별 데이터를 확보하겠습니다... 그 데이
Отлично. Завершено торможение двигателя в рамках операции «Смена самолета». Остат
はい。日の出は19:07で
قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية مغلق وفي وضع
네, 이번에는 예열을 해야 할 것 같아서요. 예열 시간이 20분을 넘지 않도록 주의해야
罗杰，我觉得你的血压不太正常。血压计的灯泡掉
There
Gemini VIII, this is
Надеюсь, всё наладится, а не ухудшится
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। जब आप 0 रोल पर रुकेंगे, तो आप लगभग 90 पिच, 0 यॉ और 0 रोल की स्थि
حسنًا، سأريك هذا أثناء حديثي. إنه يعمل مثل الكاميرا. يوجد زر التحكم بفتحة العدسة هنا، وتضبطه على f/22، مما يسمح 
Roger. Verstanden. Wir fliegen zuerst nach Antares und versuchen es dort. Wir haben es ja letztes Mal schon versucht, aber ich konnte nur ein Bild aufnehmen, bevor der Mond im weißen Dunst völlig verschwand. Ich versuche es noch einmal, und wenn es dann nicht klappt, fliegen wir nach Peacoc
You can fe
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Мы заметили некоторые странности в показаниях датчика расхода кислорода. У нас есть подозрение, что датчик… Мы ожидали увидеть высокий расход кислорода при открытии вентиляционного клапана для отработанного топлива в положение «ВЕНТ». Этого не произошло. Мы также заметили странные показания, когда вы закрыли вентиляционный клапан для отработанного топлива. Мы продолжим изучать это в течение ночи и свяжемся с вами утром с оценкой проблемы. Кроме того, м
Roger, you are fa
D'accord, Houston. La Lune est essentiellement grise, sans couleur; elle ressemble à du plâtre ou à une sorte de sable grisâtre et profond. On distingue assez bien les détails. La Mer de la Fertilité est moins visible ici que sur Terre. Le contraste avec les cratères environnants est moins marqué. Ces cratères sont tous arrondis. Il y en a un bon nombre; certains sont plus récents. Beaucoup d'entre eux, surtout les ronds, semb
わかりました。3行目のCOMMの下のDISPLAY（ディスプレイ）は開、SE AUDIO（SEオーディオ）は閉、VHF A TRANSMITTER（VHF Aトランスミッター）は開（これは変更点です）、VHF B RECEIVER（VHF Bレシーバー）は開、PRIMARY S-BAND（プライマリSバンド）POWER AMPLIFIER（パワーアンプ）は開、TRANSMITTER/RECEIVER（送信機/受信機）は閉、S-BAND ANTENNA（Sバンドアンテナ）は開、PMP（パワーアンプ）は閉、TV（テレビ）は開です。その下のDISPLAYS（ディスプレイ）は開、GLYCOL PUMP SECONDARY（グリコールポンプセカンダリ）は開、LOC PUMP（ローカルポンプ）は開、CABIN FAN CONTROL（キャビンファンコントロール）は開、CABIN REPRESS（キャビンリプレス）は閉、そして次の4つもすべて閉です。読み上げてく
Bonjour, Apollo 11. 
Roger. Capisco. Io... andremo prima ad Antares e proveremo. Sai, ci abbiamo provato l'ultima volta, ma ne ho preso uno prima di perdere completamente la luna nella foschia bianca. Ci rip
Вчера вечером мы с Фрэнком поужинали перед сном, выпили около 20 литров воды и хорошо выспались. Тольк
Houston, wir haben bei dir Stärke 4 und ein bisschen Kratzen festgestel
Okay. This is to Rod Rose and the people at St. Christopher's, 
एक सेकंड रुकिए, क
That's what we figu
حسنًا. الآن على الجانب. CB 11، اللوحتان 11 و16، أح
杰
صمام إعادة تدوي
Sigma 7, da
Аполлон-8, Хьюс
了解。バーンの起動開始時刻はまだ知りたいです
Sacré Malone! C'est… enfin, c'est vraime
D
Houston, qui è Tranquili
हाँ यह सही 
Je vais le mettre da
ठीक है
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। 8:30 बज
Siamo ancora in anticipo sui tempi, quindi prenditi il ​​tu
حسناً. لقد تحققت للتو من إمكانية الصعود إلى تلك الدرجة الأولى يا باز. إنها لي
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston, quelques mo
Neil, this is Houston. What's your stat
RKV,
Ich weiß wohl nicht, wie man es einsch
좋습니다. 제 오른쪽으로는 피레네 산맥이 보이고, 지금 메시에 봉과 피커링 봉을 거의 지나고 있습니다. 우리의 첫 번째 초기 지점은 이 고도에서 쉽게 보입니다. 명암 경계선에 가까워지면서 명
Roger, nous avons utilisé le contrôle d'impulsion au minimum; la cible numéro 12 était masquée par les nuages; j'avais bien noté l'heure et la position. J'aurais pu la suivre si je l'avais vue, je pense. La cible numéro 13 était dégagée et j'ai pu distinguer la ville d'Alexandrie. Quant à l'aéroport, je crois… mais je n'ai pas pu me concentrer sur sa recherche. J'aurais pu le repérer. J'ai donc utilisé la caméra et pris quelques photos en le survolan
Esatto. Pensi che condivideranno la finestra? Niente sapone. Potresti anche notare che l'ottica ha un'ottima visibilità; 
ठीक है। और आपको
.
Aurora Seven, utilisez un système de lâcher de ballons n
负责储物的人员已经尝试过把这台黑白电视摄像机装进B-6储物柜，他们说即使卸下镜头也放不进去。所以，我仍然建
Werd
Вот репортаж Гарри Розенталя из Associated, Хьюстон. Два Санта-Клауса украсили сочельник для двухлетнего Джеффри Ловелла. Первый постучал в его входную дверь и принес подарки. Второй проводил его папу домой с Луны. Первый был в красном костюме и с белой бородой, и его крики «Хо-хо» были слышны за кварталом. Второй представлял собой огромный двигатель, извергающий пламя за Луной, и тысячи людей ждали известия о его запуске. «Пожалуйста, примите к сведению, что Санта-Клаус существует», — такими были первые слова «Аполлона-8», когда он вышел из радиомолчания, чтобы сообщить встревоженному миру через 15 минут после того, как двигатель выполнил свой критически важный запуск. «Никто из нас никогда не ожидал получить лучший рождественский подарок, чем этот», — сказал Кен Маттингли из Центра управления полетами. «Поблагодарите всех на Земле за нас. Вы знаете, что мы бы не справились без вас», — последовал ответ полковника Фрэнка Бормана, командира космического корабля. В этот момент перед пультами в Центре управления полетами загорелась рождественская елка, и астронавт Харрисон Шмидт прочитал экипажу космическую версию «Визита Святого Николая». «Это бы
***底部紧凑*
Oh, on aura probablement besoi
Ici Houston. Roger. On vous reçoi
11, Houston. Il nostro consiglio per l'attrezzatura che hai nella bors
Seitlich 
Cape Ca
Ici Houston. Rép
素晴らしいですね。エド、フライトプランを修正して、睡眠時間を変更して、あなたに少し休んでもらいたいんです。今は少なくとも4時間は飛行してもらいたいですし、ジムもこの時間帯に眠くなってもクリスは全く問題ありません。ク
안녕하세요. 캘리포니아 컴텍, 오
아니요, 아직
好的。下一个，我们要把主总线 A 复位到关闭状态；跳过
In questo momento sto volando a tre zeri in moda
The Delta-V is 42.5; duration, 53 seconds; yaw - correction - pitch is down 2 degrees; Core 25 is 00425; Core 26
Apollo 8, qui Hous
Esatto. Bene, ora andr
معدل بت PCM منخفض. طاقة التحكم في الدوران، مباشر، اثنان منها، مط
Ricevuto. Abbiamo sentito il colpo quando abbiamo 
11, Houston. Stiamo per cambiare: stiamo pensando di spostare il nostro uplink vocale su un altro sito. Se 
11, Houston. Wir verstehen Sie nur sehr schwach, die Übertragung ist noch zu laut, um sie vollständig ab
Vorremmo un'altra conferma: quando abbiamo chiuso la 
太陽は構造物に反射します。望遠鏡が取り付けられていると、ほとんど役に立ちません。MPADが提供してくれた星図は、もし何らかの理由
Okay. Well, we - of course, in that attitude, you want to burn some upward and some to the left, and we are trying to be more precise than that. Frank, is it still
是的。显然他们在租金价格上无法达成
D'accord. Roger. Nous n'avons plus de questions. Si vous avez des commentaires, nous restons à v
すべての回路ブレーカーを確認して、正しいブレーカーがオンになっていて、正しいブレーカーがオフになっていることを確認していただければ幸いです
Si vous attendez, pe
Roger. Rapport d'équipage: eau, le commandant a parcouru envi
حسنًا يا جاك. لقد قمت بتوصيل قاطعَي الدائرة الكهربائية الرئيسيين، أحدهما للتيار المتردد والآخر للتيار المستمر، وقاطعَي الدائرة ا
يا فتى، لا يمكنك تفويت نقاط التفتيش تلك - تلك التي تحمل اسمي Diamond
आप कितनी जल्दी अनुकूलन कर लेते हैं, यह देखकर आश्चर्य होता है - अरे, मुझे तो बाहर चांद को गुजरते हुए देखना बिल्कुल भी अजीब नहीं लगता, जानते हैं
잊지 마세요, 여행에서 가장 중요한 부분은 이틀 후 복귀를 시작할 때입니다. 그러니 여러분 모두 충분히 휴식을 
Okay, Houston. Wir werden d
Roger. ΔV di 139. GMT di
नमस्कार, कु
Okay. We are in good shape n
好的
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스
好的。S波段关闭状态已恢复。这样就恢复到正常配置了，我们需要您提供一些信息。首先，请提供CMP和LMP状态报
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, Can
بالتأكيد. وإلا لكنت حصلت 
रॉजर, जेरी। समझ गया। मुझे एक अंतर नज़र आया। हमने 'वरीयता' का विकल्प चुना था। पहले वाले में हमें दिक्कत हुई; आखिरी वाला उम्मीद के मु
Elle monte assez haut. Elle prend la forme d'un éventail, co
Хорошо. А теперь мы переключимся на резервный канал upvoice примерно на 2 минуты, и может пройти несколько секунд, прежде чем вы услышите, как связь оборвалась. Так что вы можете перевести переключатель телеметрии upvoice в резервный режим upvoice, и если все это не сработает, я сейчас 
Ricevut
Okay. Aspetta un attim
友谊七号，友谊七号，请问您现在需要知
저기, 그 숫자들을 어떻게 처리했었지
没错。好的，现在距离下一个时
Très bien, vous devriez maintenant pouvoir 
是的，我们也在关注，弗兰克。
好的。我们首先要做的事情之一是给电池充电，这样我们才能获得足够的电力来完成这项工作，我们已经制定了相应的程序。关于再入大气层，我们计划在进入大气层界面前5小时进行最后一次中段飞行（如果需要的话）。然后，我们希望在进入大气层界面前大约4个半小时抛弃服务舱，并利用接下来的3到3个半小时进行拍照、启动指令舱的制导与导航系统、整理舱内物品以及其他一些零碎的工作。我们会保留指令舱直到进入大气层界面前1小时，然后再将其抛弃。这些程序将于明天早上在作战管理系统（CMS）和着陆管理系统（LMS）中集成运行，希望当天晚些时候，我们能再次与任务控制中心进行同步运行。其中一个问题是，我们该如何处理……我们的想法是，指令舱内氧气充足，而舱门代表高压源和存放问题，所以有人考虑把舱门留在里面。另外，我们认为你可能需要穿戴宇航服才能进入舱门，在抛弃舱门之前穿戴好。因为我们抛弃舱
روجر. بالت
とても静かです。私たちはただここに座って、スラスターの噴射が弱まるのを待っています。
R
Juri Alexejewitsch, wir verlegen den Radiosender jetzt in den Bunker. Daher herrscht fünf Minuten Sendepause. Nikolai Petrowitsch und Pawel Romanowitsch g
네, 맞습니다. 시계에 그렇게 맞춰져 있어요. 지평선은 눈부시게 푸른색입니다. 저기, 지금 망원경 끝으로 본토가 보이고, 창밖으로는 카나리아들이 보이는데, 창밖으로 보기 직전에 
罗杰，友谊七号。航空医疗部门想知道您是否已使用蹦极绳进行过训练。完
收到。电脑启动中
Фред, ты готов начать обучение в 
Ja. Jim wird gleich hochgehen. Fred-o schläft gerade. Wir versuchen hier auch etwas zu schlafen, und Jim schaut sich Spannung und Stromstärke an, sobald du
Il trim di beccheggio si mantiene poco sopra il 2; oscilla tra 2 e 2,4, all'incirca. Il trim di imbardata oscilla tra meno 0,5 e zero. Oscilla senza meta tra questi valori. I ratei di 
Roger. J'ai dix mises à jour r
了解しました。よろし
很好。别
This will give you a trim angle into the atmosphere, a roll rate,
Oka
차단기
هذا صحيح.
تقول إن لون المحركات النفاثة يوحي بأنها ل
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous avons revu la deuxième manœuvre
वॉली, हमारे 
Gemini 4，C
100 pi
Das stimmt. Auf der rechten Seite ist alles außenbords, außer der Tankkontrollleuchte, di
分かりました。そうしま
わかりました。1分間お待ちください
밴스, 참고로 말씀드리자면, 약 30분 전쯤 잭과 저는 특정 우주선 자세에서 별자리나 별을 볼 수 없었습니다. 전갈자리와 궁수자리, 그리고 알타이르, 아크룩스, 알파 센타우리, 베가 같은 밝은 별들은 볼 수 있었죠. 이제 가스 배출이 중단되어 입자와 별을 구분할 수 있게 되었습니
了解。あと2つ確認があります。メッセージが入ったディスクが計画通り地表に置かれたこと、そして飛行計画書に記載されていた物品がすべて投棄された
Okay. Hier herrscht Hochbetrieb. Wir versuche
ठीक है, कुंभ राशि। आप अच्छे दिख रहे हैं
Okay, Joe. Mi sono messo nei guai. Abbiamo caricato i vettori del pianeta, o della cometa di Bennett, nell'opzione pianeta e li abbiamo tracciati per tutto il p
Apollo 8, this is Houston. You are right; the is 2. The was determined out there before the last midcourse correcti
लाल वाला इतना बाहर आता ह
Bien, 11. Ici Houston. À environ 22 h 30 dans le plan de vol, dans votre checklist post-sommeil et dans toutes les autres checklists post-sommeil, veuillez supprimer la mention « AUTO JET SELECT, 16 à ON ». Nous allons reprendre cette procédure dans la pr
Какой вектор
Je suppose que le plus important concernant le rangement, c'est de s'ass
للعلم فقط، لدينا ما تحتاج إليه - يبدو أن العدد حوالي 150 ألفًا في الخا
Mi stai leggendo, 
Apollo 8, Houston. Porta i
Да. Всё было действительно здорово, за редкими исключениями, когда перед переключением возникали проблемы с OMNI. Тогда появлялось очень много фонового шума, но в целом всё было отлично, и мы оч
罗杰，11。给你两台PADS，30和31。30 SPS/G&N：36691
حسنً
좋아요. 이제 좀
ऑरोरा सेवन, यह केप कैप कॉम की आप
이것은 우
В данный момент угол рыскания приблизительно равен 0 - МАРК. Т. Я посмотрю - примерно 4 градуса влево. Корректирую тангаж, рыскание в поряд
Bon, on va activer l
지도 업데이트 소식을 전해드리겠습니
حسنًا يا قائد. لا نرى أي مشاكل حرارية نتيجة لهذا التغيير. إذا واجهنا أي مشاكل في الاتصالات، فقد نضطر إلى اتخاذ إجراء مخ
我们得问问
We're going to have to wait until we get the high-gain antenna locked on again to d
ठीक है। मुझे समझ आ 
了解、ジャック。O2タンク1
D'accord. Co
Примерно два-три, а может быть, и четыре неспешных
了解。1つ待機し
Roger, ici Gemini 4. Pilot s'est levé il y a environ 20 minutes et a dormi environ 3 heures et demie. Ce n'était pas un sommeil profond, plutôt un sommeil intermittent, mais il y a eu tout de même un peu de sommeil. Au petit-déjeuner, j'ai pris un peu de céréales, du jus d'orange, des bouc
双子座4号，CS
Хорошо. На четвёртом ряду. Открыть — Слева откройте первые пять — поправка — Закройте первые пять и откройте ВЕНТИЛЯТОР КАБИНЫ 1. Закройте три автоматич
هذه مركبة فريندشيب سفن، تبث من خلفها. لقد أشرقت الشمس خلفها في المنظار. كانت ساطعة في المنظار، حمراء زاهية وهي تقترب من الأفق وتشرق؛ وبينما كنت أنظر من النافذة، رأيت آلاف الجسيمات الصغيرة المضيئة تدور حول الكبسولة وتبتعد عني بسرعة تتراوح بين 3 و 5 أميال في الساعة. الآن وقد خرجتُ إلى ضوء الشمس الساطع، يبدو أنها اختفت. كان ذلك مع شروق الشمس. ما زلت أرى القليل من
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。万一我们没能成功进入中途航程，我们仍然会选择另一个航程，有人建议
11
キューカードには「ノー」と書いてある。プロと競う気は全くないんだ、信じてくれ。でも、ここはすごく快適だよ。幸せな家だよ。3人で座るには十分なスペースがあって、みんなお気に入りの小さな隅っこに座る場所を見つけようとしているんだ。無重力状態はとても快適だけど、しばらくすると、ガタガタと揺れたり、天井や床や側面にぶつかったりするのに疲れてくる。だから、どこか小さな隅っこを見つけて、膝
吉姆，我们目前的计划是不去纠正这个问题。我们会接受现状，并适应它。如果你在飞越地球和月球中心时，能够读取地球中心和月球中心的角度，我们就能更好地掌握情
Bien sûr. Côté sports, pas grand-chose à signaler. UCLA domine les deux classements de basket. Si vous avez une question sur un classement en particulier, n'hésitez pas à me le dire, et je vous confirmerai s'il figure dans le top 10. Concernant le match des étoiles universitaires du Nord, qui se déroule demain, le Nord est légèrement favori face au Sud. Ara Parseghian entraîne l'équipe du Nord, et il compte six joueurs de Notre Dame dans ses rangs; ils devraient donc être red
Una cosa, quando arrivi quassù, puoi vedere molto di più di quel montante s
D'accord. Nous nous préparons à la relève, et je voulais aborder quelques points avant. Pour l'instant, la vitesse du vent semble être d'au maximum 0,3 pied par seconde, il n'y aura donc pas de manœuvre de correction de trajectoire pour le segment 6. Le segment 7 est un peu plus important, et nous prendrons une décision à ce sujet plus tard. La météo sur le site d'atterrissage est toujours signalée comme bonne, avec des prévisions d'environ 2 000 pieds d'orages épars et 12 000 pieds d'orages fragmentés, soit à peu près les mêmes chiffres que ceux communiqués à Fra
네, 그런 것 같아요. 서두르고
Верно. Думаю, что вторая производная графика завис
يو
はい、2
Roger. Grazie per il bollettino meteo. Non riusciamo a vedere così lontano. Sembra che fuori si sia schiarito, stando a quanto dicono alcune persone che sono arrivate. Questa c
Di
わか
Роджер. Все эти процедуры сработают — 
هذا يبد
Роджер. Колумбия, это были команды "Браво" и "Дельта
友
حسنًا. لا يوجد الكثير من الأخبار هذا الصباح. الأمور هادئة نوعًا ما. أعتقد أن الخبر الأبرز هو معدل الحوادث - وفيات العطلات - وهو بالتأكيد خبر غير سا
友谊七号，
روجر، صوتك ضعيف ومتقطع. هل يمكنك قراءتنا؟ انتهى
D'accord, c'est juste une précaution, Jack. Si on positionne l'optique avec un angle de 90 degrés, les fentes seront alignées, ce qui optimi
잭, 몇 가지는
La cabina è pronta, non voglio più abbassare la cupola. È andata molto bene. Controllo in tempo: 18 minuti. Bene sull'oro
Ну,
हाँ
Das ist bestätigt; und danach, wenn Sie das als Profi abgeschlossen haben, erscheint eine blinkende 0
حسنًا. هذا سيكون لفتحة تهوية أخيرة في الخزان، لذا في أعلى الصفحة مباشرةً بعد INVERTER 1, CLOSE، أضف - حسنًا، بعد INVERTER 1, CLOSE، أضف PROP DESCENT HELIUM REG/VENT CLOSE، ثم بعد ST
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 추진체가 궤도 활공 모드로 설정되었습니다. 두 우주
Censé plonger directement dans l'obs
Altrimenti, si è comportato magnificamente nel passaggio da una modal
Vous pourriez garder
Wir haben erste Ergebnisse für Ihren ersten Stern, falls Sie diese hören möchten. Die restlichen Sterne erhalten Sie
روجر، أرجو أن تنقل تحياتي وأطيب تمنياتي وتمنيات أبناء و
ブラインド通信中
ठीक है, 13. हम चाहते हैं कि आप फ्यूल सेल 1 पर ल
Роджер. Последние п
هيوستن، هذا هو VIII. إضافةً إلى ذلك، ليس لدينا 
Хорошо, Джим. У меня есть обновление по плану полета. У вас проверка видимости звезды, и, похоже, Navi по-прежнему находится на нашей звезде, а связанные с этим числа: крен 102,6, тангаж 328,9, рыскание 346,3. Это дает вам нулевое значение вала и цапфы. И если вы думаете, что сможете что-то сделать с этим, мы бы хотели попробовать и посмотреть, сможем ли мы это проверить или, может быть, мы оба чему-то научимся, если проверим, можно ли это сделать с помощью 
Okay. I'm ready to co
Okay, Jim.
Roger, Friendship Seven, je comprends que vous êtes en mode automatique sur les trois axes, avec possibilité de passage en mode manuel. C'
罗杰。我们已经把水温稳定在53度
Anche ora stiamo ricevendo molto rumore di fondo. Se 
Everything I think you could dislodge, they forgot t
बहु
أرى بعض النجوم الجميلة، وأرى أيضًا تلك الأجسام البيضاء الصغيرة التي تبدو وكأنها تنبعث من الكبسولة نفسها وتنجرف بعيدًا. إذا كانت هذه الأجسام تُستخدم للتحقق من الانحراف، فهذا رائع. أظن أن النجم الذي أراه هو السماك الرامح. سيكون الأمر مثيرًا للاهتمام - ل
Roger. Kurzer Coun
Это
11, ici Houst
क्या आप फेसप्लेट बंद करने की कोशिश करन
Voici Friendship Seven. Les taux de dérive sont très difficiles à mesurer, pour une raison inconn
C
سيجما سبعة، سيجما سبعة، هذ
مرحباً، سفينة الأ
D'accord, je 
حسنًا يا فريد، الغرض من المناورة هو PC + 2، وهذه المرة، سننتقل إلى MPL. و، 079، 27، 4013، + 08144، - 00443، - 02226، نقطة الأوج غير متوفرة، نقطة الحضيض هي + 00205، 08455، 420، 268، 261، + 08155، - 00443، - 02187، غير متوفرة. يجب أن يكون GDA الخاص بك جيدًا كما هو من الاحتراق الأخير، ولكن يجب أن يكون الميل عند 5.85؛ في الدوران، هو 6.
Okay. Wir prognostizieren für den nominalen Zeitpunkt Ihres nächsten Mittelkurses, also zwei Stunden vor dem Eintritt in die Grenzfläche, eine Brenngeschwindigkeit von 1,4 Fuß pro Sekunde. Dadurch ändert sich Ihr Gammawert an der Grenzfläche um ein Zehntel Grad. Aktuell, ohne weitere Manöver, beträgt Ihr Gammawert -6,39 Grad. Wir werden ihn leicht erhöhen, um die Mitte der Ziellinie zu treffen
Salut Frank, 
了解。プラス3.3
Okay. 
罗杰。建议您继续操作至55小
Okay. Wir liegen
كولومبيا، هيوستن. نلاحظ انخفاض درجة حرارة مخرج التبخير لديك. يُرجى الانتقال إلى التحكم اليدوي في درجة الحرارة ورفعها. يمكنك م
13番、ヒューストン。さあ、トルクをかけて
Buzz, ici Houston. Avez-vous déjà 
Oui, 
मुझे इससे कोई फर्क नहीं पड़त
No, va bene. Una cosa interessante, però, è che l'ultima volta che hai scaricato l'acqua, hanno notato un cambiamento nel tracciamento della traiet
Questa è Friendship 
ما هو وضع أوضاع المنص
はい。わかりました
Ok. Non c'è molto da dire stamattina. La situazione è piuttosto tranquilla. Credo che la notizia più importante sia il tasso di incidenti - le morti durante le festività - che non è certo una notizia piacevole, ma abbiamo avuto 233 vittime a livello nazionale, e 9 di loro a Houston la vigilia di Natale, e a Natale. Nei notiziari mondiali, le famiglie sono tornate 
OK. COMMANDE DE GUIDAGE; COMMANDE DE MODE sur ATT HOLD. Effacement. OK. Il f
Vous l'avez allumé? Je dois alors remettre le disjonc
물론 좋은 소식이네요. 그런데 그분들께 간단
네가 바
罗杰。你是五驱的，迈克。我们希望 OMNI
रॉ
だいぶ良くなったようですね。バズ
Das könnte etwas später sein, aber mit ande
روجر. ال
了解、バズ。PAD、MPLのエントリです。ロール05、35から開始。訂正：359 152 001。194 46 03 267、プラス1102、マイナス17203、068、36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027、NOUN 69。4行ともNA。Dゼロから開始：400 02 09。ブラックアウトのRET：00 17 03 38 08 20。六分儀の星：02 0945 149。ボアサイト星はScorpii theta、つまりScorpii theta。上315、右35、リフトベクトルは上。コメント：この進入PADはミッドコース6を想定していません。参考までに、現在確認しているすべての追跡データに基づくと、その操作は1秒あたりわずか0.1フィートです。そのため、おそらくスキップします。詳細は後ほどお知らせします。了解。マイナス30分、194 33 03の地平線チェックで、ピッチ角は298度です。了解。バックアップアラインメ
Roger. The burn was on time. The residuals before nulling: minu
Well now, you j
That's right. No sweat. John Aaron's just saying that they may be hot. He's che
Vous pourriez demander à Houston s'ils seraient intéressés par une prise en
An
Bene. Il prossimo 
That's affirmative. The secondary radiato
Роджер, Чарли. Мы поменяли местами наш OMNI D - Delta, и у меня пропала последняя передача. Не могли бы вы повторить, пожалуйста? Меня конкретно интересует следу
Roger. Concernant la température du quadruple capteur, la limite supérieure est de 105 degrés sur la bouteille. Vous êtes bien en dessous. Nous l'avons surveillée, et elle suit la trajectoire, même si c'est très lentement. Lorsque vous faites pivoter le vaisseau, les variations de température semblent un peu lentes, mais le capteur n'est pas bloqué. Et pour en revenir à ce point, vous pourriez dire à Jim que la prochaine fois qu'il travaillera sur l'optique, lorsqu'il manipulera le tourillon, s'il pouvait réinitialiser l'interrupteur « Zéro optique », il éviterait le problème que nous avons rencontré avant la correction de trajectoire
روجر. اب
E dice che non appena mescoli il tuo crio, ti chiede di tornare in modalità AUTO
Roger. Wir
الآن، بعد دقائق قليلة يا فانس، أعتقد أننا سنرى كيف يعمل النظام الوحيد الذي لم نستخدمه بعد. أما 
रॉजर। आगामी दौड़ के लिए, मिडकोर्स 7
Apollo 11, Houston. Based on our sighting since the midcourse, we're showing a gamma of minus 6.57. This is preliminary, though, and we think that after some more tracking it should come on in, and we could tweak it right on into the corridor. It's just about in the center of the corridor; everything's looking fine. We'll have you an entry PAD in a couple of hours before you go to sleep. And from our friends in public affairs, a few headlines, other than your flight. You're still dominating the news. However, there are some other things of interest for you. As I mentio
D'accord. Tu as bonne mine ici, par terre. C
13, Houston. Wir würden gerne
تم الانتهاء من فحص الات
Roger. It's looking pretty good
Je pense que deux coins se sont touchés, car lors du déploiement, ils ne se sont pas ouverts simultanément. Le déploiement était légèrement irrégulier, et le terrain était un peu plus accidenté que je ne l'aurais souhaité. Je crois que deux coins se sont touchés sur une pro
روجر. ٥٠٠٠ متفرق؛ رياح شمالية غربية ١٠؛ ارتفاع الموج ٣ أقدام؛ مقياس الارتفاع ٢٩٨٦؛ نداء قوات الإنقاذ: ناها RESCUE ١، الساعة ٠٢:٥٨ بتوقيت غرينتش؛ ناهي SEARCH ١، الساعة ٠٣:٤٤ بتوقيت غرينتش؛ المدمرة يو إس إس ماسون، لا يوجد وقت وصول متوقع؛ شروق الشمس على متن المركبة الفضائية في الساعة ١٠:٠٨:٤
此时收起摄像机。此时进行陀螺仪
هذا تأكيد. التالي. ملف
Hier ist Friendship Seven. Ich kann die Plejaden von hier aus ganz klar sehen. Jetzt erkenne ich auch einige dieser Sternenkonstellationen. Die Sicht 
기내 압력이 약간 상승한
— — Оба логических блока питания отключены... срабатывает об
트랭퀼리티, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 관찰하신 내용, 즉 이번 임무 수행 중에 보신 것들과 관련된 질문 10가지 정도가 있습니다. 원하시는 시간에 오늘 저녁에 이
알겠습니다. 그럼 터널 안의 압력은 절대압으로 1
ठीक है, जैक। यहाँ एक सवाल है। अगर हम इस तरह से सत्ता हस्तांतरण करते हैं, 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। आपका बूस्टर सामान्य रूप से कॉन्फ़िगर किया गया है, और हमें ऑक्सीजन के उच्च प्रवाह से कोई चिंता नहीं ह
One definitely gets the illusion of looking way up above you at this attitude, and if there is no horizon, it's just a black sky. The amount of light in the cockpit is quite high. Once one gets adapted and it can be reduced, of course, by the cabin light. At this point, I am somewhat reluctant to reduce the light level in here, d
わかりました。ページ全体をもう
你好，加州首都通讯中心，友谊七号，超
好的。我将按下 EN
로저. 기본 스캐너라고 
سيجما سفن، سيجما سف
ठीक है। एजीसी का वोल्टेज स्तर घटकर उस स्तर पर आ गया जिसे हम नॉइज़ लेवल कहते हैं, यानी एजीसी पर मापा गया वोल्टेज स्तर - इंटीग्
सुनो, इसे
알겠습니다. 멜버른이
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend die Details erläutern. Okay. Der Eintritt in die Atmosphäre erfolgt u
روجر، هذه فريندشيب سفن. من النافذة، أرى بعض النيران عل
11, Houston. Zu Ihrem Sauerstoffdurchf
29
Roger. Bien re
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. لقد بدّلنا الهوائيات معكم مجدداً. أكرر أنه لا توجد لدينا أي تحديثات على سطح القمر - تحديثات للكتب في الوقت الحالي. نحن ن
ジェミニ4号
Die noch ausstehenden Daten, die wir benötigen, sind eine möglichst späte Ablesung vor der endgültigen Verstauung. Außerdem liegen uns keine Daten zur letzten Schlafenszeit der Besatzung vor. Ich möchte überprüfen, ob die Sekundärbeleuchtung an allen vier Quads aktiviert war. Darübe
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, हमारे पास टेलीमेट्री की पूरी जानकारी है और हमने आपके सभी सिस्टम की जांच कर ली है। जैसे ही आपका हमसे संपर्क टूटेगा, हम आपको प्री-डा
Ich glaube, ich sehe die Arbeitsleuchte noch im 
罗杰。船员状态报告如下：水量方面，指挥官今天至今已航行约50公里；CMP 43；LMP 44。我们今天已经吃了两顿饭。第三天的A餐和B餐；除了硬邦邦的一小块（没人喜欢）之外，大部分都吃完了。布丁非常美味。我们现在的航程增加了63英
わか
ठीक है। हम इस NAV अवलोकन को स्थगित कर सकते हैं। यह यहाँ निर्धारित था, और हम इसे स्थगित कर सकते हैं। आपकी नींद संबंधी टिप्पणियों
Роджер. Теперь, чтобы выполнить маневр до крена 0, тангаж 90 и рыскание внутрь — тангаж внутрь здесь, крен здесь. Рыскание — какое бы рыскание мы ни выбрали. Х
Yes. You want to aline it as good as you can. It says
Если, конечно, ты не предпочитаешь спать наверху, Базз; мне нравится... вам, ребята, стоит хорошенько выспаться, раз уж вы находитесь в этом чертовом лунном
Ça pourrait marcher si on n'avait pas le choix, Fred. Pour l'instant, on a un surplus d'eau confortable dans le sublimateur. On en a discuté ce matin: tu pourrais essayer le transfert d'eau du réservoir de remontée, mais on a décidé de ne pas le faire, ni de le recommander. On estime qu'il nous faudrait 30 heures pour vider un des réservoirs de remontée (ce qui est nécessaire pour l'alimenter en eau), et on pré
5時にお渡ししま
मुझे रेगिस्तान में नीचे एक काली आग दिखाई दे रही है। आग के स्रोत तक साफ़-साफ़ देखा जा सकता है। मैं ठीक से देख तो नहीं पाया कि वह क्या थी, लेकिन उसने ज़मीन पर एक बहुत ही स्पष्ट निशान छोड़ दिया है। 17 नंबर हाईवे पार करते समय मैंने S-5 से कई भू-भाग की तस्वीरें ली हैं। ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे मैगज़ीन नंबर 7 में कुछ गड़बड़ हो गई है। ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे कोई कैमरा फिल्म को ठीक से पकड़ नहीं पा रहा है या फिल्म रुक-रुक कर चल रही है। मुझे नहीं पता। मुझे नहीं 
Jim, dimostriamo ch
А 2 Бейкера, что равно 3 атомам кислорода, соответ
उन्होंने आपके लैंडमार्क ट्रैकिंग के परिणाम भी देखे हैं। सभी अंक स्पष्ट रूप से बहुत अच्छे थे, और हमारे पास विभिन्न साइट स्थानों की ऊँचाई से संबंधित डेटा का एक पूरा पृष्ठ है, जिसे मैं आपको पढ़कर नहीं सुनाऊँगा, लेकिन मैं आपको यह बताना चाहता था कि अंक स्पष्ट रूप से बहुत अच्छे रहे। मे
방금 16-A 표적을 촬영했습니다. 바스라 비행장은 페르시아만 바로 옆에 있습니다. 페르시아만을 약 30도 각도로 포착한 후, 기체를 아래로 기울여 페르시아만 북서쪽에 있는 호수를 포착했습니다. 바스라는 호수 바로 옆에 있어서, 호수를 따라가면 바로 비행장을 포착할 수 있습니다. 그래서 표적에 도달하기 훨씬 전에 비행장을 먼저 포착했고, 그 후 표적을 추적하기 시작했습니다. 수
Buzz, sei riuscito a far g
Sigma S
रॉजर, यह जेमिनी 4 है। पायलट लगभग 20 मिनट पहले उठा और लगभग साढ़े तीन घंटे आराम किया। गहरी नींद नहीं आई। रुक-रुक कर नींद आई, लेकिन नींद का कुछ अंश तो मिला ही। नाश्ते में मैंने थोड़ा सा सीरियल, संतरे का 
Wir haben die p
Понял. Уровень сигнала очень быстро упал до нуля; и примерно за 3 секунды угол тангажа и рыскания приблизился к 40 градусам та
Okay. Dobbiamo imbardare 
チャーリー、窓のブラインドを
Хорошо, Джим. После того, как вы немного подкорректируете ориентацию, мы выполним выравнивание по оси тела, которое будет находиться на отметке 
Wir möchten, dass DISPLAY geöffnet ist; S-BAND-ANTENNE geschlossen ist – um einen MASTER-ALARM zu vermeiden; CAMERA – SEQUENCE CAMERA geöffnet ist; und darunter möchten wir, dass DISPLAYs geöffnet sind; DC BUS VOLT geschlossen ist; INVERTER 2 geöffnet ist; ASCENT ECA geschlossen ist; ASCENT ECA CONTROL geöffnet ist; DESCENT ECA geschlossen ist; DESCENT ECA CONTROL geschlossen ist; TRANSLUNAR BUS TIE geschlossen ist; wir möchten, dass der CROSS TIE BUS geöffnet ist; die BAL LOADS geschlossen sind; BAT FEED TIEs geschlossen sind. Wie l
네. 찰리, 이전 연소 때보다 과도 현상이 더 두드러졌습니다. 저는 사령선 모듈이 가벼워서 그런 거라고 생각했는데, 연소 시작 후 20초 정도 지나니 롤 변동이 상당히 줄어들었습
No, va bene. Una cosa interessante, però, è che l'ultima volta che hai scaricato l'acqua, hanno notato un cambiamento nel tracciamento della traiettoria nel
D'accord. Je me permets de commenter cela. Je soupçonne 
Scott, ich denke, wir sind für mindestens eine weitere Erdumrundung in sehr guter Verfassung, und wir werden sehen, wie wir diese
알았어, 잭. 내가 알려준 배터리 충전 절차로 돌아가. 충전을 종료
Eagle and Columbia, about 1 minute till there on Columbia. It looks like we have about 51.5 for, and we tend to confirm your Y dot. And, break. For Eagle,
अब आप अंतरिक्ष यान के आगे क्षितिज 
Приготовьт
C'est exact. Si le démarrage est manuel, l'arrêt devra également être manuel. Pour un 
Un instant, je vous l'accorde; j'avais oublié
È un cratere molto più grande e mi venga un colpo se non sem
سيجما سفن، هاواي ك
और माइक, अगर आप लूप पर हैं, तो रेंज बढ़ाने और निरंतर ग्रीन रीएंट्री के लिए, मेरे पास एक छोटी स
Oui, je l'ai fa
Dobbiamo fare qualcosa al
Ricevuto. Esatto. Al passaggio 5, esegui il passaggio 5. In "Attivazione del ciclo primario del glicole", passaggio 1, riga 1, "CB(16): DISPLAY - CHIUDI". Questa è un'opzione per l'equipaggio;
Okay, Jack. What we want you to do is close the reactants valve on 
Charlie, Apollo 11. I have a couple of questions on stopping the. It seems to me the easiest way to stop it would be - we're essentially, of course, at 0 degrees yaw and closing up to 90 degrees pitch, so it's just a question of stopping at 260 roll, roughly, and - How about for a procedure going MANUAL ATTITUDE, three to RATE COMMAND and then, seeing as how our deadband has already 
Roger.
Роджер. Мы только что видели, как мимо пролетел Сте
Roger. Très bien. J'ai une mise à jour concernant l
Yes. That may be my first and last t
ठीक है, 11. अब तक आपके दोनों बर्न के दौरान इंजन का प्रदर्शन इंजन स्वीकृति परीक्षणों के समान ही रहा है। ऑनबोर्ड पीसी रीडिंग, चैम्बर में मौजूद वास्तविक दबाव और गेज पर दिखाई देने वाले दबाव के बीच गेज कैलिब्रेशन फैक्टर के कारण है। हम सिंगल बैंक ऑपरेशन में 90 psi की अपेक्षा करते हैं - यानी, गेज पर 90 psi और चैम्बर का वास्तविक दबाव 95 psi होगा। ड्यूल बैंक ऑपरेशन में, गेज पर चैम्बर का दबाव 94 psi औ
और मेरे पास 
Ja, ich habe gerade eins gemacht. Ich kann hier noch eins machen, wenn es ihm etwas besser geht. Es ist f
ठीक है। बिल्कुल सही। ये जिम लवेल हैं। आज हम आपको अपोलो 8 के अंदर के जीवन के बारे में थोड़ा सा दिखाना चाहते थे। हमने आपको चंद्रमा के दृश्य दिखाए, पृथ्वी के दृश्य दिखाए, और अब हम आपको अपने घर में आमंत्रित करना चाहते हैं। जैसा कि आप इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर देख सकते हैं, यह कम से कम
इसे चिह्न
제 생각에 이 암석 지대는 우리가 최종 하강 시에 지나쳤던 크고 날카로운 모서리를 가진 암석 테두리 분화구에서 유래했을 가능성이 있습니다. 어제 제가 그 분화구가 축구장 크기 정도라고 말씀드렸는데, 솔직히 말해서 실제로 측정하기는 조금 어려웠습니다. 하지만 우리가 지나갈 때 아스트로돔 안에 들어갈 수 있을 것 같다고 생각했습니다. 그리고 이 암석 테두리 분화구 주변의 암석들은 이 지역의 암석들보다 훨씬 큽니다. 어떤 것은 3미터 정도 되고, 어쩌면 더 클 수도 있습니다. 이런 암석들은 분화구 가장자리에서 분화구 지름만큼 떨어진 곳까지 매우 빽빽하게 분포되어 있습니다. 그 너머로는 암석의 밀도가 다소 줄어들고, 이 지역에서도 암석들
Roger, Houston. Abbiamo ottenuto 4/45695, meno 053 più 141, più 30627, meno 00625, più 00577 180 018 001, NA, più 00188 30639 256 30452 40 2730 396 033, giù 030, sinistra 19, più 0858, meno 16500, più 12960, più 36195; Sirio, Rigel, 129 155 010, due quadranti, 20 secondi B e D, orizzonte 2 grad
Roger, Friendship Seven. Il rollio è spostato di 20° a destra; l'imbardata sembra piuttosto buona. Hawaii. Pass
저 드로그 슈트, 또
ヒートシールドが
Gemini 4, Houston
ओह, हम सही रास्ते पर हैं, जिम। हम सब इस बात पर सहमत हैं कि आप लगभग सही रवैये में हैं, लेकिन पूरी तरह से नहीं, और हम बस आपको यह बताने की को
我们
Et CB - CB INVERTER 1, panneau 11, FERMÉ. CB panneau 16, CAPTEUR DE SIGNAL D'INSTRUMENT, FERMÉ. INVERTER 1, SÉLECTION. MONITEUR D'HÉLIUM à PRESSION SUPERCRIT
D'accord, Houston. En me basant sur la solution avec moins de MA, j'ai obtenu une longitude d'impact de -160,95. Je l'ai ajustée pour obtenir une latitude et une longitude d'impact de 163,75. Je voulais déplacer mon point d'impact de 30 degrés vers l'est et j'ai cherché à déterminer les paramètres de correction nécessaires. J'ai obtenu une correction X de -11,6, une correction C de +600 et une correction Y de 0. Cela a modifié ma correction X précédente, qui était de -50,2. Je voudrais simplement savoir si c
ठीक है। फ्रेड, अब तुम अच्छे से बात कर रहे हो। चेकलिस्ट में तीन छोटे-मोटे बदलाव है
Okay, real fine. And I've got the entry checklis
C'est exact. Appuyer sur ENTRÉE lance le transfert. Juste avant, on a vérifié q
Ваш голос немного прерывистый, но 
最も新しい特徴だけが明確に定義され
好的。CB，二，结束
Камера сейч
생리 기능 검사를 시작하려
Jim, c'est bien ça? Le disjoncteur s'enclenche sur la page d'activation. Donc, une fois que nous a
ठीक है। और चूंकि आपको हमारी अनुमानित स्थिति पता है, तो क्या आप मुझे दक्षिण दिशा और X दिशा में आपको ढूंढने के लिए कोई तरीका बता सकते है
Теперь они все 
Роджер. 
एक्वेरियस, पानी और बिजली के उपयोग के हमारे शुरुआती अनुमानों की तुलना करने पर, ऐसा लगता है कि पानी के उपयोग के मामले में हम बिल्कुल सही हैं, और हम अपने पहले विश्लेषण में अनुमान
Роджер, Билл. Вы знаете, что касается вт
Okay, Charlie. Thank you. We'll just hold right here in the pro
氧气流量高了大约两分钟，目的是把压力从上限降下来。现在读数是985，
Не на этой высоте, и это странно. Мне казалось, я мог бы это увидеть. На этой высоте преломление света в самих оптических приборах, вызв
Ricevuto. Ricevuto, hai bruciato tutto il residuo; la quantit
Итак, предварительный анализ данных показывает, что центральный двигатель S-II вибрировал с несколько большей амплитудой, чем мы наблюдали в предыдущих полетах, и это началось примерно через 160 секунд после начала работы двигателя S-II. В результате этих вибраций давление в камере сгорания двигателя снизилось до уровня, при котором два датчика тяги нижнего уровня, датчики тяги в норме, инициировали отключение центрального двигателя. Предварительная оценка данных показывает, что двигатель не получил повреж
Роджер. ΔV139. 15 55 47. 01
Roger, Frank, toutes vos relevés de température du circuit primaire sont corrects. Vos températures d'entrée EVAP sont normales et indiquent 
جيميني 6، ن
1
那正是加利福尼亚湾
그리고 난 
أتذكر الجزء ا
Das ist bestätigt. Wir haben es jetzt auf dem Eidephor. Der Fokus ist etwas unscharf. Wir sehen die Erde in der Mitte des Bildschirms. Unten in der Kamera ist anscheinend noch ein kleiner weißer Punkt zu sehen. Und wir sehen
N
Мы и здесь
حسنًا، بدء فحص محاذاة الطائرة. ناقص 10 درجات في الميل، و10 درجات في الانعراج، و10 درجات في الدوران. سأقوم بفحص ا
Okay. I might be calling up too fast. Okay. On the third, we got target 58 and 63 and 65. The training photography was accomplished, and it was done on magazine D, which now has - correction, that's magazine E - which now shows 95 exposures. Magazine D is fresh. Magazine K was also used for training ph
Роджер, Нил. Начнём: Весь день в Белый дом непрерывно поступают поздравительные сообщения от мировых лидеров по поводу миссии «Аполлон-11». Среди последних — телеграммы от премьер-министра Великоб
Apollo 8, this is Houston reading you with a great deal of noise in the background. Go ahead and rewind your tape and start it in low bit rate, and we will try to catch that
프랭크는 아직 전화 연결
Volts, 39.4; amps,
لقد عزفنا موسيق
减去 00014，加上所有零，加上 00001 000 304 000，不适用，加上 00191 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225 Shaula，向上 236 000，加上 0813，减去 16503 12202 36
짐, 저희가 도와드릴 일이 더 있을까요? 아니면 원하시
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 비행
Odyssey, Хьюстон. Пара автоматических выключателей для вас. На панели 276, на нашем блоке управления питанием контрольно-измерительных приборов, разомкните автоматические выключатели номер 
ジェミニ4号、弱気な様子ですね。OAMSなしの6-4アップデートをお届けします。01日、00 09 30、8+18
أما النقطة الأخيرة فهي موجهة 
很好，正如你可能知道的那样，我
Houston, Apollo 8. Houston, Apollo 8. Come
Ici Friendship Seven. Tout va bien. Je me sens bien. Te
Ok, Columbia. Abbiamo completato l'uplink; il computer è tuo. Puoi andare in BLOCK; tuttavia, ti preghiamo di rimandare l'allineamento dell'opzione 1 f
Ok. All'accensione, la riga - o il passaggio 2 - dice "3700 lampeggiante, INVIO". Il momento in cui lo useremo, Jack, sarà quando avrai appena acceso il computer e avrà un vettore di stato che risale a molte, molte ore fa. Quindi vogliamo premere INVIO per interrompere l'integrazione ed evitare che rimanga lì a gironzolare. E qu
Nur mal so als interessante Anmerkung zu dieser Do
我宁愿请你把它
Черт, там внизу какая-то ужасная область низкого давления. Как бы я хотел оказаться там!
D'accord. C'est la configuration souhaitée, et voici notre explication. Lorsque nous avons configuré le réservoir 1 en mode AUTO et le rése
로저. 배터리 A 충전을 시작했는데, 전압이 예상보다 훨씬 높게 나왔습니다. 40V에 약간 못 미쳤네요. 지금은 전압이 좀 떨어지는 것 같습니다. 어제 배터리 C를 충전할 때도 처음에는 높게 나왔다가 점점 낮아지는 것 같았거든요. 이상입니
Okay. We will need the high-gain antenna, and there should be no COMM
아시다
Роджер. На данный момент мы рекомендуем с вашего согласия начать встречу примерно в восемь часов вечера по хьюстонскому времени. Это примерно через 3 час
Apollo 8, 
好的。PAD：102 33 04.36，09 50，减去 00021 1
Frank, what we want to do is get a radial upward b
안녕하세요, 아폴로 1
Friendship Seven, this is 
휴스
D'accord
D'accord, Jack. Tu te souviens que tout le monde a déjà mentionné avoir vu le coucher de la Lune quelques minutes avant le passage de la Lune? Ton horizon sera probablement sombre à ton arrivée, car tu entreras tôt le matin et, en venant de l'ouest, tu auras toujours un horizon sombre. Alors, comme méthode de secours, tout comme tu utilises le suivi de l'horizon, nous allons te donner une orientation sur la plateforme pour que tu puisses observer directement la Lune. Il s'agit d'une orientat
15～20ステップくらいかな、ジャック。一部は中身が入って
C'est exact. Nous sommes sur un anneau, essayant de sauver l'autre. Nous avons commencé avec 
ठीक है। मुझे समझ आ गया: एसी बस ए के लिए और दोनों बसें नो-गो क
Roger, Buzz. Credo di aver capito. Hai detto che c'è poca differenza tra i due campioni e che in entrambi i casi sei sceso di circa 5 cm senza problemi e poi hai dovuto continuare a martellare con vigore per continuare a conficcarlo fino a una profondità totale di 20 o 23 cm, e anche a quel punto le aste non volevano rimanere verticali, e che tendevano a cadere addosso anche dopo aver martellato così a
अपोलो 11, ह्य
Es ist etwas chaotisch. Ich bin noch nicht lange dabei. Es ist so ähnlich wie früher
फ्रेंड
D'accord. Nous l'avons écrit comme r
Хорошо. Теперь вот эта — полная процедура входа в систему, если говорить о самом процессе. Се
罗杰，布鲁斯。你们有空的时候能不能跟我说说明天的活动
Roger. Non ci dai
Roger, wir verstehen Sie deutlich. Wir möchten hier einen Wobulatortest durchführen. Wir verwenden White 
Zaria-3, dp you 
- - これは新しいバズです
نحن بصدد إتمام عملية إعادة التخزين. وقد اكتملت عملية إعادة التخزين بشكل أساسي في
I say a late ball score there 
Okay, springe
罗杰，
इस समय सूट सेटिंग को 8 पर सेट कर रहा हूँ। यानी सूट में कूलेंट की मात्रा 8 पर सेट कर रहा हूँ। सूट का इनलेट तापमान अब 65 डिग्री है, जो आरामदायक है। दरअसल, मुझे पहले काफी ठंड लग रही थी, ले
عرض جيد. حسنًا، أنا سعيد بحالة الوقود. ل
उस समय MSC-1 चालू हो जाएगा, और यदि इससे कोई बाधा नहीं आती है तो आपको MSC-10 कर
Tenez ceci.
そこにブレーカーが 2 つあります。そ
Oh, is that rig
Okay. Also, wir – natürlich möchte man in dieser Position etwas nach oben u
ح
Wilc
Roger. Je vous ai bien compris. Comment ça,
Apollo 11, Houston. It appears to us that we're seeing a view from outside plus a little of the inside. It appears you've taken the camera away from th
Elles tournoient autour de la capsule et passent devant le hublot, toutes illuminées de mille feux. Elles sont 
Amplificatori 
Понял. Подтверж
わかりました
Feld 3: Leistungsverstärker auf AUS. Schreiben Sie das bitte auf ein Schmierblatt, während ich es vorlese. Später werde ich dan
अरे जिम। ह
わかりました。今日、世界中の教会が祈
그리고 잭, 폐수 처리장 히터를 껐습니다. 폐수를 더 버리실 
Sembra che sparino più a lungo di quanto pensassi. Immagino
Чарли, завтра мы переставим наши вещи, максимально приблизив их к штатным. Вот некоторые вещи, которые будут не соответствовать штатным: забрала были возвращены в командный модуль, и мы пока не нашли для них место. Мы сообщим вам, куда их деть. Кроме того, около 5 фунтов разного веса из отсека Able 8 займут место защитных шлемов LCG, которые мы перенесли из A 8 в чехол для костюма. Мы избавились от одного мешка с мусором, в основном старой упаковк
هيوستن، هذه 
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы только что прео
시리우스 위성 두 세트, 프로키온
Bene. Collegare i cavi ombelicali. Fase 2,
यह बिल्कुल सही है, अपोलो 8। यह
Beh, potrei farlo così, Owen. Quasi tu
好了，格斯，你可能要翻过山头了。你躺在地上看起来不错。下次再见
Держу пари. Держу пари, после 10 оборотов двигателя вы бы там почти разговаривали сами с с
حسناً. الأمر جارٍ. في أي وقت، اخلع خوذت
रॉजर। यहाँ सब कुछ बहुत अच्छा लग रहा है। आपकी आवाज़ भी बहुत अच्छी है, और लगता है कि 
Apollo 
Здесь
我得了9
मुझे ऐसा लगता है। हम इसे बर्न मॉनिटर के रूप में इस्तेमाल करेंगे। जलने की प्रक्रिया म
了解しました。プラス1197、マイナス16500、12681、35608、北を向いて星をセット、ロール068、ピッチ097、ヨー356、アレージな
روجر.
Roger. Apollo Run 4 i
ゲージ相関レポー
Okay. I'll turn off my S-band;
Ich habe die Ko
Okay. Good deal. We copy that, Fred. And to show you how relaxed we are about the entry, Ken is looking at - giving you guys a chance to - prior to going into entry, PREP to snap a few p
Верно, Джек. Это единственные изменения на панелях 1-3. Теперь перейдём к панелям 1-4. На оставшихся трёх переключателях панели 2 изменений нет. На панели 3 первые один, два, три, четыре остаются без изменений, а затем нам нужно выключить нагреватели топли
Roger. Sieht so aus, al
아마 이미 그 시기는 지났겠죠. 다음 기회에 다시 도전해 보
모든 요청에 ​​대
D'accord, Joe. Concernant les nouvelles, Jim préférerait attendre un peu avant de les diffuser, et je voudrais faire une demande au FAO, s'il le veut bien, dans la journée, lorsque nous recev
ओम्नी के बारे में 
S
D'accord. C'est parti pou
双子座4号，我们将在飞越美国上空一段时间后向您更新轨道计算
It's amazing wa
Wie ich gerade – Ja, sind Sie bereit zu übernehmen? Nun, er hat gerade gefragt – er meinte, ich würde schlafen. Und ich sagte ih
Хорошо. Время 22:25:06; отчёт о состоянии экипажа в Карнарвоне. На этом обновление завершено; это была всего лишь коро
Думаю, всё в порядке. Без проблем. Нам здесь больше нечего дела
روجر. سأحاول مرة أخرى الآن باستخدام نفس الجهاز مع MA. في المرة الأخيرة التي جربنا فيها ذلك، قبل آخر المشاهدات، حص
カメラの準備は完了。P52の撮影準備も万
Осталось 3
Ok. Mi pare di aver letto che eri pronto. Ho dimenticato... gli auricolari. Consiste semplicemente nel prendere un secondo paio di cartucce dal modulo di comando, mettere una striscia di nastro adesivo, quello grigio, con il lato adesivo rivolto verso l'esterno, attorno ai lati di ogni nuovo contenitore, vicino alla parte superiore, prendere un pezzo di cartoncino e tagliarlo in quattro quadrati di circa 5 o 7,5 cm di lato, piegarli ad angolo retto per formare un supporto angolare, attaccarli al nastro adesivo in modo che sporgano e si sovrappongano
नमस्कार, हवा
당신의... 아니, LMP 손잡이를 부러뜨려야겠네
ह्यूस्टन, क्या अब आप हमारे सामने खड़ी घोड़ी के शरीर पर फ्रैक्चर के निशान देख सकते ह
정확히는 모르겠습니다. 비행 계획선에 수직으로 약 5~6마일 정도 떨어진 곳에 있는 것 같습니다. 어쩌면 그보다 더 멀
Coupe
2-1 170. 3+40. 01 32 39. 2+18. 8+32. Over
문제는 그 빌어먹을 것들을 만드는 데 들어
수동 비례 제어 모드에서 수동 레버를 당기고 속도 명령을 선택한 상태에서 천천히, 하지만 확실하게 역추진 자세를 취하고 있습니다. 모든 축이 아주 잘 작동하
声音清晰响
Neil und Buzz, hier ist Hou
现在它们的数值都超过3.9了。非常感谢
Good deal. There is really quite a bit
You had your transmitter keyed, that's why we couldn't read
Okay, Vance. This is command module to: cabin fan filter and bag in the; decontamination bags, except for the ones we use for the TV camera, in the; two s in the; four LOiH [sic] cans in the JETT bag; and we'll secure
27 20 - 31 50 is when we
좋아요. 이제 거의 다 왔어요, 짐. 짐이 이해했어요. 자이로 
扫描仪
أما الخبر الأبرز في هيوستن اليوم فيتعلق بفريق أستروس. ففي عالم الرياضة، انتفض فريق هيوستن أستروس في الشوط التاسع أمام سينسيناتي ليُلحق الهزيمة بالريدز بنتيجة 7-4. لكن مع بداية الشوط التاسع، بدت الأمور قاتمة، حيث كان الأستروس متأخرين بنتيجة 4-3. ثم مع خروج لاعب واحد، سدد خيسوس ألو ضربة فردية إلى الملعب الأيمن. وسدد جون إدواردز ضربة فردية أخرى إلى اليمين، ثم سدد ساندي 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. هل 
11, Хьюстон. Хороший 
Roger, Jerry. Capisco. No
Я знаю. Джим накосячил с одной из этих программ. Он уже немного устал, и у нас произошла ПЕРЕЗАГРУЗКА и пара СИГНАЛОВ ПРОГРАММЫ. Я н
That's why I say not very 
D'accord, Jack, pendant la manœuvre télégraphique, nous étions en mode AUTO TRACK, avec un faisceau étroit et l'électronique principale activée. Le verrouillage était bon. Juste après le début de la manœuv
Well, Vance, I've been trying to use MINIMUM IMPULSE only attitude control to get my roll and yaw - the roll and pitch, rather. But, with the attitude control only in this configuration, I - I can't command these - the roll the way I want to. So, I had to go to to get my roll to build up towards zero, it was going - decreasing towards 270. I re
运行 2 开始时间 22:43:00，结束时间 23:22:00。使用计划筛选
我们刚才在那里放了
Lorsque vous aurez mis en place un système permettant d'obtenir un gain élevé, serait-il possible de faire entrer partiellement le soleil par l'une d
Houston, Apollo 11. Wir sind bereit für den Logiktest, wann immer Sie es sind. Wir stehen bereit, die Logik
Looks beautiful. You ent
And one of the nice things, Jack, particularly for a novice like myself, is the - the ease of moving around in here. It's, of course, as you know from working in the command module simulator, it's really quite a boon to have zero gravity as an aid. Because you get - pretty confining, really, at one g, to move around very much in there, and it's quite easy in this environment. The, as you can see, it looked pretty clean, I found a couple of loose washers about it and the - a little plastic cap off the sequence camera had come loose and I found it lodged over by the ED panel. Okay. Right under Jim, now, he's actually standing on a - what looks to be a can here. And, for the sake of all the people back there, housed inside this can is the - the ascent engine where, hopefully, you can see my hand resting on top of right now - the engine that we use to get off of the Moon. Immediately adjacent to the engine cover here, I have my hand on a white box now, which has been shown bef
了解しました。手順3は省略し、最後の行を除いて手順4を実行してく
D'accord, tout va bien. C'est 
오로라 세
Prima di visualizzare la lettura della batteria, vuoi che rimanga acceso o che inizi a speg
हाँ, नज़ारा बहुत
جيم، لقد عمل الكثير من الأشخاص على إجراءات الدخول، وسي
Okay. Das wird etwas anders sein. Wenn ich Ihnen ΔV vorlese, stehen die ersten beiden Zahlen 
Roger. Interfaccia di ingresso meno 4 or
أبولو 11، هيوستن. بناءً على رصدنا منذ منتصف المسار، يُظهر لنا مؤشر غاما -6.57. هذه بيانات أولية، ونعتقد أنه بعد مزيد من المتابعة، سيتحسن الوضع، وسنتمكن من توجيه المركبة بدقة إلى الممر. إنها تقريبًا في منتصف الممر؛ كل شيء يبدو 
Roger. My status is good; the capsule status is good; my cont
Okay
Хорошо. Мы рассмотрели все возможные варианты. Наихудший сценарий, который мы смогли придумать, — это расстояние ошибки 3 сигма — в худшем случае 70 морских миль. Это 70. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили маневр реверсирования OAMS; затем, конечно, будет ручное реверсирование без компьютера. Н
Très bien. Sous « Rangement final », le premier élément mentionné à la ligne 36, page 1-5, est « Optiques ». Si vous souhaitez commencer le rangement, nous vous conseillons de ne pas inclure les optiques pour le moment, car nous aborderons la vérification des étoiles un peu plus tard. Vous pourrez vous occuper du reste plus t
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。在你进行机动的同时，我们有一个关于ΔH
هذا استخدام
所有主电池的读数均为 9 安培和 23 伏，飞行员的血压计灯泡还插在里面。你想从他那儿拿一
Довол
Bright, bright blue horizon band as the sun gets lower and lower--the horizon band still glow
그건 우리가 폐수 처리장을 만들지 않았기 때문일 거예요
今、アフリカを横断中です。パルスモードです。[実験]D-9は、あまり成功しませんでした
Хорошо. Первый переключатель — режим S-диапазона NORMAL (голосовая связь), ВЫКЛ.; второй — режим S-диапазона NORMAL, ВЫКЛ.; третий — переключатель режима S-диапазона NORMAL (определение дальности) в полож
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 페리신시온 궤도 진입 2시간 후(PAD 기준). G&N: 62710, +0.98, -0.19, 점화 077 46 2248, DELTA-VX, +321
わかっ
Sigma Seven. Wie 
Das war's im Großen und Ganzen mit den Welt- und nationalen Nachrichten und Reportagen. Auf der Sportseite wurde Hank Stram von den Kansas City Chiefs zum AFL-Trainer des Jahres gekürt. Dies ist seine zweite Auszeichnung in drei Saisons. Die Wahl erfolgte durch ein Gremium der Associated Press, bestehend aus 30 Sportjournalisten und -ko
Si l'un ou l'autre de ces éléments fuit, n
Roger. Es be
Roger, Frank. Danke
10, /: 45597, -040, +157, +35186, -01512, -
好的，收到。请告诉我起
Ja, das wissen wir zu schätzen. Da
我们还有最新消
حس
Bon, il y a une minute, alors que j'étais à l'étage, j'ai remarqué ce qui semblait être une nouvelle ventilation provenant du module de service. Je l'ai vue par la fenêt
Friendship Seven, qui Kano Cap Com. Puoi darci la lettura della temperatura dei tuoi gas di 
Okay. Auf Panel 7 soll POWER, OFF sein
Roger. Wir haben jetzt übe
حسنًا، في تلك الطلعة الأخيرة، التقطنا حوالي 38 صورة باستخدام التصوير الجوي الشامل للتضاريس، بدءًا من منطقة شرق سان دييغو وحتى واجهنا الغطاء السحابي مجددًا. استأنفنا التصوير بشكل متقطع بمجرد أن بدأنا فوق الجزء الجنوبي من الولايات ا
ジム、おおよそその通りです。ジャックがその姿勢で粗調整を行います。そのために、君にはその姿勢まで操縦して
好的。时间32小时00分钟。完成操作后，进行以下姿态机动：滚转101.0，俯仰90.0，偏航000.0。高俯仰-23，偏航93。使用常规程序降低速率。飞行器稳定后，在螺旋桨启动前，拍摄贝内特彗星的照片。使用六分仪上的G型胶片盒。也就是说，使用高速黑白胶片，对吧？这是弱光胶片。拍摄三张照片，曝光时间分别为5秒、20秒和60秒。使用自动模式。参数值为：R1+34717，R2-08028；R3+35075。使用手动模式拍摄三张照片，曝光时间分别为5秒、20秒和60秒。轴将为 0.008 度，耳
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 2분 후면 86+
ठीक है, वैंस। मैंने बैट बेकर को चार्ज पर लगा दिया था; मुझे नहीं लगता कि यह पूरी तरह से स्थिर हुआ था। जब मैं वहां से निकला था तब
범위율은 얼마였
Das ist richtig. Okay, jetzt. Leistungsschalter TRANSD
- - for lookin
好的。现在飞机俯仰角已经偏离了大约25度。请你把飞机重新设置回俯仰角10度
他のシステムも点検中。どれもほ
オーケー、ヴ
酸素ですね。残りは44ポンドです。1時間あたり0.36ポンドの使用率で計算すると、酸素は120時間、つまり120時間使用できます。わかりました。次に、Aは6.2%、Bは6.2%です。2%しか使用されない見込みなので、問題ありません。次に、DELTA-Vです。残りは1190フィート/秒です。最後に、
13, Houston. Il est inutile d'essayer d'alimenter les vannes de propergol sur A et C, veuillez donc désactiver le mode AUTO sur Charlie. Nous avons une procédure pour l'alimentation
روجر. واضح تمامًا. واجهنا مشكلة في جهاز الإرسال خلال رحلتك السابقة. تلقينا للتو رسالة من كيب تاون... تدعو إلى ترشي
Avec au
バズ、こちらヒューストン。通信は非常に良好です。はっきりと聞こえています。マイクから、受信しており、
جيم، هيوستن. ليس لدينا قصة عن سبب خروج المحرك الداخلي مبكراً، 
Mike, nous avons analysé le dernier vecteur d'état dont nous disposons, et il indique que le péricynthien se situe à
Ok. Agena è al c
Roger. Le poids était de 12 onces. C'était le poids seul, sans le sac, et le poids de l'eau provenant des CDR était de
휴스턴 CAP COM, 제미
Bene. Siamo pron
Aurora Seven, Much
Okay, in the interim, Jack, I looked around again and I saw that we have a radar a
Here we go. Here, you want me to st
Vuoi di
T
Das glaube ich. Ich 
Roger, Muchea Com Tech. Friendship Seven.
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. ملاحظة حول تشغيل نظام التحك
음, 보세요. 여기에 필름을 넣고 사진 한두 장 찍고 나면, 다시 빼내야 할 거예요. 그게 유일한 단점이죠. 꼭 빼내야 하는 건 아니지만, 깔끔하게 보관하기가 어려워요. 카메라를 넣은 채로 동력 하강을 하는 게 괜찮으시다면, 아마 괜찮을 거예요. 아, 잠깐만요. 다른 카메라가 
好的。我们将从动力飞行的角度，对 8
-29837, +02390, +00994 000 200 005 01693, +00600 29949 402 29782 010 689 260, 페르세이 제타, 하강 048, 좌측 05. 나머지는 해당 없음. 시리우스, 
Okay. Wir sind 
不，我没意见。我只要重新调整好方向就行了
Flight advises that they have very good communications on this air-
Apollo 11, Houston. Il colore è migliore ora. St
Ich habe deine Z-Kalibr
Houston, wie liest man das Sternzeiche
Ich werde jetzt, wo ich Zeit habe, einen Orientierungstest durchführen. Ich greife nach dem Handgriff – und treffe ihn genau. Dann greife ich nach dem Gierhebel. Ich treffe ihn bei 20 Grad, genau 20 Grad. Ich greife nach dem Notgriff. Genau getroffen, negativ, der war etwas daneben, ich habe zuerst die Seite des Gehäuses berührt.
Gemini
وفريد، هيوستن. بعد قليل، سأشرح لك إجراءً أريدك أن تدونه لاستخدامه لاحقًا. إنه إجراء لفصل ناقل وحدة التحكم الرئيسي، ونعتقد أنه سيكون مفيدًا جدًا لاحقًا لأمور مثل إزالة بطاريات دخول وحدة التحكم، وربما أيضًا لتسخينها مسبقًا وتشغيلها قبل التخلص م
Zur Information, Vance: Vor etwa einer halben Stunde konnten Jack und ich in bestimmten Raumschiffpositionen keine Sternbilder oder Sterne mehr sehen. Wir konnten Skorpion und Schütze sowie Altair (auch bekannt als Kreuz des Kreuzes), Alpha Centauri und Wega – also Sterne dieser Helligkeit – erkenn
Roger. Entrée PAD: zone du Pacifique central, roulis 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 26
Apollo 8, Housto
...
Роджер. «Орёл» отстыковался. У
Jim, je peux te donner l'idée générale de la procédure proposée pour la mise en orbite du module de commande G&N. C'est la procédure actuellement envisagée. On pourrait en trouver une meilleure, mais voici ce qu'on étudie pour le moment. La première étape consiste à viser la Terre, comme lors de la phase intermédiaire. Ensuite, on effectuera un alignement sur l'axe du corps, à 40° + 5° sur l'ACS, pour placer la bille à 0°. On pourra alors te donner l'attitude de la bille à suivre pour pointer les optique
Кто-то сказал: «Мы вас подменим; и если у Джека есть какие-нибудь номера тел
روجر. الصداقة ا
Und – wir werden – wir geben Ihnen die Unterlagen morgen, aber grundsätzlich gehen wir davon aus, dass der 
Das ist ei
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很神奇，就是眼睛还没适应的时候，周围一片漆黑。我确实能看到窗户上有一些涂层。现在要回到超高频VOX模式进行发射。打开面罩擦拭右侧麦克风。我舔了一下。关上面罩。面罩立刻密封，以便宇航服电路开始工作。我可不想再被它弄脏。宇航服进气口的温度稳定在68度左右。所以穹顶又要升起来了。现在温度是76度，75度。看来这个更高的设置才是我们想要的。我想再往上加半格，应该就能锁定温度了。宇航服终于开始降温了，所以我知道该把温度调到什么程度了。我已经将宇航服和控制杆的冷却液量设定在 8.5。此时穹顶读数为 75 度。宇航服进气口温度为 68 度。非常舒适。我能感觉到凉爽的空气拂过我的脸庞。氧气量看起来也很好，分别为 60 和 75 psi（单位为百）。我一直在观察 250 逆变器。它的温度接近 140 度，而 150 对比度逆变器的温度已降至约 100 度。待机温度约为 100 度，也就是舱内温度。第三点，250 逆变器——它有点问题，我会密切关注。舱内热交换器的温度稳定在 40 度，这让我很头疼，因为我显然欠了弗兰克·萨蒙斯基 50 美分。我感到很惊喜。舱内燃料读数也略高。让我看看，我们现在的燃料压力是 5.5 psi。读数大约是5点，更正一下，5.3，对于这个舱室来说不算太高。外面天色渐暗，我想现在出去看看星星。左手手套上手电筒的电池盖有点松动了。只有开关那部分松
아니요. 오늘 
ل
로저. 비행 데이터 파일, 지상 점검 
Okay, Jack. Du erinnerst dich sicher, dass alle in der Vergangenheit berichtet haben, den Monduntergang nur wenige Minuten vor dem Eintreffen gesehen zu haben. Dein Horizont wird wahrscheinlich dunkel sein, wenn du dort ankommst; du landest früh morgens; und wenn du von Westen kommst, wirst du noch auf einen dunklen Horizont blicken. Als zusätzliche Methode, ähnlich wie beim Verfolgen des Horizonts, geben wir dir eine Ausrichtung auf der Landeplattform, sodass du direkt auf den Mond schauen kannst. Dies ist eine Trägheitsausrichtung; sie ändert sich nicht. Du richtest die 36-Grad-Fensterlinie auf den Mond aus und beobachtest ihn dann einfach. Kurz zuvor wird die Erde aufgehen und den Mond bedecken, und du kannst dann den Horizont gut überprüfen. Ich habe einige Zeiten, die ich dir später mitteilen werde. Wenn du dir das jetzt ansiehst, kannst du zu diesem Zeitpunkt die Ausrichtung oder was auch immer du möchtest einstellen. Du hast dann eine bekannte Ausrichtungsreferenz. Es ist genau wie eine Horizon
여기는 UHF 저고도 통신
За
रॉजर। मैंने अपने सूट
加
أعرف ذلك. لقد أخطأ جيم في أحد تلك البرامج. إنه متعب بعض الشيء، وقد تلقينا إعادة تشغي
جيد
Apollo 8
好的。你们有列出需要的设备吗？我
ASCSに問題があります。ASCSが正常に動作していないようです。ちょっと待ってください。緊急後退シーケンスと手動後退シーケンスが作動しています。ジ
5개 남
Okay. G
Да. Нам так и 
정말 감사합니다. 목
ビルは、眠るためにセコナルを服用する許可を親切な航空医官に求めた
حسنًا. شكرًا لكِ يا هاواي. ك
The t
Роджер. Время работы горелки установлено, углы 
Как бы мне хотелось сегодня вечером по
«Дружба Семь
Non, nous avions reçu une demande de surveillance et on nous a demandé si vous aviez entendu des bruits de battement d'ailes lors des pics de fréquence des capsul
हां, मेरा वाला पूरी उड़ान के दौरान मेर
11, Houston. Einige unserer Leute kamen gerade von draußen und sag
पहले कटर बार क
好的，休斯顿。收到吗
And, on the bottom row, Jack, I'm going to leave the HEATER DISPLA
로저. 체
Roger. Ho un 10-Charlie 123. 1+45. 01 giorni 05 13 47. 13+37. 11 DELTA: 087. 1+54. 01 giorni 07 10 46. 08
PCM
了解しました。コピーしたプラス11のマニューバ
روجر.
Ok, Deke. Tutti i finestrini del modulo di comando sono pesantemente ricoperti d'acqua in questo mome
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。ご参考までに、分
Roger. Preliminare 1 come
You can't beat a deal like that. How was Christmas at your ho
インバーターの設定は変えていません。
«Дружба Семь», ваша
Хорошо. Отлично. Джек, позволь мне упомянуть кое-что о проверке целостности люка. Ты будешь проветривать туннель, пока не достигнешь разности давлений в 3 psi. Это займет 9 ил
Houston, 13. We'll be off COMM; so i
罗杰，哥伦比亚。我们来了，11号。G&N：37200，减060，加047，098 05 2422，加41448，加03719，减02422。滚转不适用，俯仰020，其余PAD参数不适用。星形设
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 몇 가지 
好的。扭矩施加时间为5小时30分40
收到。另外，我们目前显示的海拔
Хорошо. Он 
Yes, sure can, Frank. Stand by
В Москве ТАСС процитировал слова космического инженера Анатолия Корицкого о том, что «Луна-15» может выполнить все то, что было сделано предыдущими космическими аппаратами серии «Луна». Пресса истолковала это как возможность исследов
Roger, Neil. Pour commencer: les messages de félicitations pour la mission Apollo 11 affluent à la Maison-Blanche depuis ce matin, envoyés sans interruption par les dirigeants du monde entier. Parmi les derniers en date figurent des télégrammes du Premier ministre britannique Harold Wilson et du roi des Belges. La presse internationale est entièrement consacrée à Apollo 11. Certains journalistes estiment que plus de 60 % des articles parus aujourd’hui dans les journaux du pays concernent votre mission. Le New York Times, qui, comme nous l’avons déjà mentionné, a connu un tel succès pour son édition du jour (malgré un tirage de 950 000 exemplaires), a annoncé qu’il republierait l’intégralité du numéro jeudi, à titre d’édition spéciale. Le Premier ministre Alexeï Kossyguine vous a adressé ses félicitations, ainsi qu’au président Nixon, par l’intermédiaire de l’ancien vice-président Humphrey, actuellement en visite en Russie. Les cosmonautes ont également publié un communiqué de félicitations. Humphrey a cité Kossyguine qui aurait décl
حسنًا. 
それが理由です.
トム、カーナボンが君に与えた概略的な指示と何も変わっていない。それを持っているか？それとももう一度渡したいの
Yes, all the fuse switches are still in the same position, Gordo. I haven't changed any of those. Squib is armed, Auto Retrojettison is off. I am on fly-by-wire, auto, and gyro normal. All "T" handles are in. The sequence panel is normal except for Landing Bag in the off position. The attitude indicator has been rather erratic, they drift 
ठीक है। जिम, हमें ठीक एक घंटे बाद कार्यभार सौंपना है; यानी डेढ़ मिनट में। ठीक एक घं
Going a few lines below that where you see "DAC ON for 4 seconds 
روجر دودجر. رحلة
Roger. No
Подождите, я сейчас вам принесу. Это значит, что у нас есть дополнительное топливо. Сейчас мы занимаемся отслеживанием целей и включением в ваш план полета других задач, о которых мы будем сообщать вам по мере необх
Stand by
Apollo 8, Houston. Où en êtes-vous avec vos no
Вы отлично выступаете в Five Square, и звучите великолепно. Вам ничего не о
Houston, Apollo 8. 1 manovre: / 63295 meno 163 più 129 più 00136 meno 00045 più 00202 345 188 343 tu
Hey, Jim. This is Tom. The only reason we're bringing up the is to have another reference system just to control the when you jettison the thin
That's affirm. We'll just run a little COMM check after you get done and se
안녕하세요, 
Oui. D'accord. Vous l'avez dev
好的，
इंज
Jawohl, Jack. Wir haben eine hohe Verstärkung eingestellt und es scheint uns, dass wir im Breitstrahlmodus sind – b
... ठीक से नहीं बज रहा। खैर, शायद मैं
Je pense que 
ربما لدينا غلاف جو
불빛을 전혀 못 봤으니 그쪽에서도 신호를 못 봤을 테니 모든 게 괜찮은 것 같
Uns allen geht es jetzt richtig
双子座 4、双子座 4、
Yes. I show it about maybe a third of a diameter to the le
It did the same thing that time, Ken. This time the voltage AGC did drop to full-scale low for several seconds, but the antenna does seem to have the capabilities to look right through the spacecraft, and I guarantee, the earth went
Roger, Frank
D'accord. Pouvez-vous ouvrir 
حسنًا، لا توجد لدينا أي مشكلة هنا فيما يتعلق بالانحراف. كل شيء على ما يرام. إنه أسرع مما كنا عليه سابقًا. أردنا فقط الوص
That's affirm
لهذا السبب أكلتُ كثيراً اليوم. لم يكن لديّ ما أفعله. لن يسمح لي بلمسه بعد الآ
Il n'y a rien
Okay. We'll get started on the fuel cell purge while we're eating. CO2 canister change number 6; 
Eh bien, j'ai confiance dans la trappe, du moment qu'elle s'in
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। आपको सूचित किया जाता है
Okay, Buzz, i
了解
いいえ、気にしません。こちらはジャック、
...Я хочу знать, у ко
That's affirmative, and the area around the entire moon now, both the sky and the moon itself, are all a milky white because of t
Роджер. Я вас прекрасно слышу. У меня есть для вас ретрос
Oh, the Greens are 
제가 당신
Мы достигли полной
Мы тоже это изучаем. Почему-то она постоянно от
Здесь, на
좋습니다. 엔터, 333, 엔터를 누르시고 레지스터 1을 읽어주세요. 레지스터 1의 값은 10,000이어야 합니다. 만약 10,000이 아니라면, 10,000으로 만드는 방법을 알려드리
रॉजर, जेमिनी 4. एक मिनट रुकि
في الصفحة 14، على الجانب الأيمن، بالقرب من الأسفل تحت "العلوم المدارية"، قم
Ici Columbia, 
一切正常。最后阶段
拍摄了一张黑白月亮照片。照片中已取出气象局滤镜。这是第六张照片。月亮落山时，我们将尝试用更低的快门速度再拍一张。尽量小心地
جميع الأوضاع تعمل بشكل ممتاز. درجة حرارة قبة بدلة الطيران حوالي 72 درجة، ودرجة حرارة مدخل البدلة حوالي 63 درجة، وهي تنخفض قليلاً. بالتأكيد هذا هو الإعداد الأمثل للطيران لهذه المركبة، حوالي 7.5 إلى 8. سأرفعه درجة أخرى إ
Capisco; vai avanti. Mike, vorremmo, se possibile, sincronizzare la TV con il passagg
I just took a picture on the Hasselblad, Frame 54. A pict
حسنًا. كيف ت
नहीं। फिलहाल यह कमांड मॉड्यूल में नहीं 
没错，高频3+20，其他一切正常。再看看那边那个圆顶。宇航
Okay. Wir sind bereit, Ihnen die Vorgehensweise zu erklären, die Ihren Computer etwas ausbremsen wird. Danach können wir
わかった。最後のはジャックに任せて、全
روجر. هل أبلغ أحدٌ عن احتمال سق
음
Jim, solo un'informazione: se
हमें दिखाओ कि क्य
クリフは今出番がありません。ジーン・
من المؤكد أن المرء يشعر وكأنه ينظر إلى أعلى من مستوى نظره عند هذه الوضعية، وإذا لم يكن هناك أفق، فستبدو السماء سوداء حالكة. كمية الضوء في قمرة القيادة عالية جدًا. بمجرد أن يعتاد المرء عليها، يمكن تقليلها بالطبع باستخدام إضاءة المقصورة. في هذه المرحلة، أتردد بعض الشيء في تقليل مستوى الإضاءة هنا، بسبب مشكلة في دائرة البدلة. أستخدم مصابيح أطراف أصابعي بكثرة. من الملاحظ أنه في الرحلات المستقبلية، يجب أن يكون لدينا جهاز تجميع يمكننا وضع الأشياء فيه، وتركها محصورة هناك لفترة من ا
روجر. بالمناسبة، لديك فرصة للدوران التالي إن ك
Fred, that may be a fun
Qui tutti gli atteggiamenti sono perfett
That's affirmative. Everybod
АТТ/ПЕР
分かりました。ジム、1分半後にハンドオーバーが始まります。1時間後にSバンド送信機/受信機のスイッチをOFFにし、5分後
That's right. And you'll put in the attitudes that you'll get from one of the pads, and this will b
Canary, Friendship Seven. Roger. Kontrollcheck abgeschlossen. Kapsel drin und hält. Ich habe die Booster
로저. 자, 이제 롤 0, 피치 90, 요우 인으로 기동하려면, 피치 인은 여기, 롤은 여기, 요우는 현재 요우 값대로 하면 됩니다. 알겠습니다, 밴
Ok. Vediamo se ho capito tutto. Per il rendezvous, prima di tutto vogliamo CB 16 INVERTER 2, chiuso, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2, chiuso. Poi, sul pannello 14, verifichiamo che INVERTER 2 sia selezionato. E CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 chiuso, entrambi gli interruttori. Poi dobbiamo tirare la leva di sblocco del RENDEZVOUS RADAR. Sul pannello 3, vogliamo quindi RENDEZVOUS RADAR. A ENTER con più tutti gli zip, più 28300 nei registri 1 e 2. GO su quello. Poi monitoriamo il movimento con il 16 72. Dopo che si è parcheggiato, CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 aperto, seguito da ENTER.
네, 맞습니다. 이제 제가 여러분이 그 곡선에 표
Okay, Jim. Hältst du einen Punkt für n
Это «Дружба Семь». Еда дается без проблем, очень вкусно. В перископе я вижу, как позади меня поднимается ярко-синий горизонт; приб
Okay. If they could ho
我想我最好试试减速伞。手动将减速伞在 25 英尺（1000 英尺）高度展开。它保持稳定，而且时间刚刚好。主展开保险丝开关现在已打开，指示高度为 21 英尺（1000
네, 산소입니다. 잔량은 44파운드입니다. 시간당 0.36파운
是的。我们无法将其调整到窄光束模式。我们尝试切换到自动跟踪或 REACQ 模式，但偏
Eh bien, vous commencez tous à apparaître. Je peux voir une partie de l'Amérique centrale, et le ciel y est plutôt dégagé. Les îles des Caraïbes commencent à se dessiner, avec quelques longues lignes de nuages. Il semble y avoir un système au large du Groenland, avec de grands filaments nuageux qui s'étendent vers le sud-ouest. La côte est des États-Unis commence à apparaître, et pour l'instant, le ciel n'a pas l'air trop mal. Nous aurons peut-être de très belles images plus tard 
Avions relais, avions 
D'accord. Très bien. Et ce
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Принято. Мы на
Okay. Oh, mal sehe
Ricevuto. 12:59:00 Contro
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. П
좋습니다. Comp-PUSH를 시작
حسنًا. ٢٤ قدم
तो फि
Bene, il l
了解、11。中間コース修正の値は参考までにお伝えしましたが、中間コース4は約2.0フィート/秒の速度低下でした。重ね
Es sind genau 96 Stunden. 96 Stunden und glei
Ja, wir befinden uns jetzt w
ठीक है। प्रविष्टि: मध्य प्रशांत क्षेत्र, 357 152 359 268, प्लस 0813, माइनस 16503 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028, चार बार 
네. 그 충격은
好的，很好。等你在美国各地考察完毕后，他们会更新你的
Okay. On the orientation test. - I touched the manual lever; I touched the clock, a rivet above the clock at about 10 30 just between the clock face and the yaw indicator. On the emerg
Okay. Minuspol an Batterie Bravo. Das ist MAIN A, BAT C
Questo atteggiamento non è proprio il massimo quando si tratta di fotografar
Okay. Jack erklärt Fred die Abl
지금
알겠습
好的。通信情况如下：S 波段天线 OMNI A 处于 Bravo 模式，S 
I've got nothin
좋습니다. 
Real
Roger, Roger, ho ricevu
أعتقد أن توم يجب أن يلقي نظرة فاحصة عليه
这里是友谊七号。我暂时偏离飞行计划，想更好地解决这个问题，我们现在偏航了
Houston, hier spricht Tranquilit
13、ヒューストン
روجر، فريد. قراءة جيدة. بدءًا من اللوحة 16. تحت شاشات العرض، الصف 1: مؤشرات التقاطع SE، مفتوحة؛ نظام Bravo - وحدات التحكم الرباعية 1، مغلقة؛ الرباعية 2، مغلقة؛ الرباعية 3، مغلقة؛ الرباعية 4، مغلقة. الصف الثاني، تحت الإضاءة: يمكنك اختيار الإضاءة الكاشفة. يمكنك استخدام إما: طاقة المنطق Bravo، مفتوحة؛ أو التحكم في تدفق البدلة، مفتوحة. الصف الثالث، الشاشة، مفتوحة؛ جهاز إر
Ok. Con una piccola modifica, il tuo... sarà di circa 77 ore, e questo è il periodo di buio. E il comandante e il CMP dovrebbero mangiare intorno alle 68-69 ore, e tu dovresti mangiare tra le 69 e le 70 ore, subito dopo esser
ちょっ
Houston, Jack aimerait savoir quelles constellations sont visible
Okay. Jetzt, g
D'accord, Vance. Je peux te le donner. Je l'ai lu juste après l'avoir lancé. La tension de la batterie A
了解、オーロラセブン、ケープ・キャップ・コ
هيوستن، أبولو 1
ギアを伸ばさない状態でも、かなり良い感じに
네, 알겠습니다. 제가 어디서부터, 어디까지 말씀이 딴 데로 흘렀는지 모르겠네요. 자, 4번 패널에서 TELCOMM, GROUP 1을 AC1에 연결하세요. 5번 패널에서는 다음 항목들을 닫으세요. PRESSURE GROUP 1, MAIN B; PRESSURE GROUP 2, MAIN B; TEMP, MAIN B; SECONDARY LOOP TRANSDUCER, MAIN B; RAD, CONTROL/HEATERS, MAIN B; BAT RELAY BUS, BAT B; BAT CHARGER, BAT B; INVERTER CONTROL, 2; INVERTER CONTROL, 1; SENSOR SIGNAL, AC1; SENSOR SIGNAL, MAIN B; SENSOR UNIT, AC1; WASTE/POTABLE H2O, MAIN B; INSTRUMENTATION, ESSENTIAL
Oh, Moment mal, Jack. Hast du Pericynthion oder
Continuando il mio debriefing sul booster, all'inizio del volo. Dopo essere entrati nell'oscurità, a quella che considero una distanza di 360 metri, ho provato a mantenerlo in posizione, ma l'unico modo per valutare la distanza dal booster in quel momento era la distanza tra le luci lampeggianti. Ogni tanto si accendevano - non occasionalmente, ma continuamente - vedevo una luce, poi due luci, poi una luce, e a volte passava molto tempo prima di vederne due, a indicare che il booster ruotava continuamente. Non avevo davvero la minima idea di quale direzione stesse andando. In base alla distanza tra le luci, quando riuscivo a vederle entrambe, sentivo di essere in una posizione davvero buona finché non arrivammo a Carnarvon. In quel momento mi sembrava di avvicinar
... it didn't look as strange from outside as it did from inside, from..
ठीक है, सर्किट ब्रेकर पैनल 11 अपडेट डेटा लिंक, बंद करें; प्राथमिक पावर एम्पलीफायर, पैनल 16, बंद करें; वॉयस फ़ंक्शन को वॉयस पर सेट करें; रेंज - रेंजिंग फ़ंक्शन
I have no oth
右に寝返りするたびにすべてが垂直に見えるのに、私は逆さまになっていることに気づき
보조 스캐너를
Nous avons effectué le verrouillage radar à environ 288 km et l'alignement radar a été réalisé à environ 251 km. Les aiguilles sont relativement stables et semblent correctes. L'aiguille de lacet oscille légèrement, d'environ ±1 degré. Il est à noter que notre problème réside dans l'élimination des résidus. Nous parvenons à réduire les résidus à une valeur faible, mais lors de la mesure suivante, ils augmentent, puis diminuent. Il est difficile de déterminer précisément quand nous atteignons un résidu nul. Le poste au sol indiquait l'absence de résidus. Le biais de l'ac
Sì. I transienti erano più evidenti rispetto alle accensioni precedenti, Charlie. L'ho semplicemente attribuito al fatto che avevamo un modulo di comando leggero, ma c'era una considerevole attività di rollio che si è attenuata dopo i primi 20 secondi, direi, dell'accensione; poi c'era anche un po' di attività di beccheggio e imbardata. Non credo fosse anormale, e sembrava che le bande morte fossero piuttosto nette in rollio più o meno 8 gradi da entrambi i lati della linea centrale; e dopo i p
Okay. On the water boiler: it's interesting that I get my own - I was going to say anytime you have our mike keyed, I can hear myself talk with about a 2-second time delay. With respect to the primary and secondary boiler checks, I think that is a good idea to make sure we got them both prior to entry and have the reservic
방향 제어, ASCS 및 플라이 바이 와이어가 정상적으로 작
رائع! كنتُ أكتب للتوّ أطروحة مطوّلة حول أسباب وجود 
حسنًا. فهمت. كنت أعلم أن لدينا عملية تنقية أخرى للأكسجين والهيدروجي
روجر. مايك. هل ما زلت 
嗯，我现在正透过右后方的瞄准镜观察，之前我在指令舱
Hier ein Bericht von Harry Rosent
좋습니다, 아폴로 8호. 모든 시스템이 정상 작동합니다. 이제 배터리 충전을 종료해도 된다고 알려
现在是45分钟。我打算稍微调高一下宇航服的温度调节旋钮，大概四分之一圈。我觉得我们基本控制住了局面。我已经把温度调节旋钮调到了6.25。此时穹顶温度是82华氏度
11, ह्यूस्टन। आपके तापमान की जाँच करने पर, ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि अंतरिक्ष यान पिछले 24 घंटों में शायद 2 या 3 डिग्री ठंडा हो गया है, औ
एक मिनट रुकिए; रुकिए। आपको चाहिए - रुकिए, जैक
Houston, Tranquillité. J'ai utilisé Capella lors de la dernière observation, et c'est assez près du bord. Assez loin du centre du cran 4. Je me demande s'il serait judicieux d'utiliser Alpheratz, étoile numéro 1. Ce serait peut-être un peu plus près. Cependant, cela retarderait u
你好，金丝雀
ロックされていないと理解しています。それで正し
Сейчас он т
ジェミニ4、RKV CAP CO
Wunderschön! Wow! OAMS CONTROL PROP-Leistungsschal
Alright. The last one is 2990, abort 5114. That is almost directly into the en
로저. 지금 드리프트 모드입니다.
好的，谢谢。稍等片
それは肯定的であり、彼がそこに到着したと
今天看起
Very good. I've been searching around a little bit for this. Okay, I'm going to hold that pitch still no
찰리, 아무래도 REPRESS를 AUT
FUNZIONE E
Avez
هذا صحيح. أريد فقط التحقق 
Vielleicht m
Scott, proviamo a spuntare alcune cose da questa lista retrospettiva prima che tu arrivi in ​​Californ
Роджер, мы получили ваши данные с земли. У меня для вас обновленная карт
Okay, Apollo 8. Vielleicht sollten wir das beim nächsten Mal nochmal versuchen. Die Sichtbarkeit des Suchteleskops ist im Flugplan für Stern 31 vorgesehen. Die Winkel sind: Rollen 184,7°, Nicken 23,4°, Gieren 14,3°, Well
حسناً يا جيم. مين إمبلس خيار 
了解しました
Roger. We have a 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, minus 061, plus 067 135 23 4149; plus 32020, plus 06713, minus 02773 181 054 013; NA, plus 00230, plus 32833 228 32625, 24 1510 355; NA three times, plus 1103, minus 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. Deneb and Vega 242 172 012, two jet ullage, 16 seconds; horizon 11 degree line at TIG minus 2 min
好了，还有 2 分钟，这次该死的地平线检查将会非常完美，你相信
Okay. Frank soll mir Beschei
Хорошо. Отлично, Фрэнк. Ещё один момент — ребята в задней комнате хотели бы посмотреть, какое будет значение разницы температур на телеметрии, когда все проснутся, — если ты включишь оба вентилятора в салоне примерно на 5 минут, — они хотели бы увидет
約200ヤード後ろのこの地点で、長方形の物体が転がっているのがかろうじて見えます。ちょっと待ってください、
Bonjour Cal Com Tech, Aurora Seven. 
Роджер. Понятно. Вскоре мы заменим фильтр, нагреватель линии продувки включен, вскоре начнётся продувка кислородом и водородом, а в 148 часов начнём зарядку батареи А, пока вы не сообщите нам подробности. В 150 часов сброс сточных вод составит 10 процентов. И мы с нетерпением ждём коррекции курса 5 примерно 
*** Les deux vannes d'isolement conviennent à la déc
Sì. Ques
यह आगामी परिक्रमा के दौरा
罗杰，明白了。48%。这次在加那利群
Wir befinden uns gerade bei 3+34. Es wird dunkel. Das Sonnenlicht schien fast mit dem schmalen Ende nach vorn auf die Spitze des Raumschiffs. Tatsächlich sind wir 30° links von der Geradeausrichtung, also mit dem schmalen Ende nach vorn.
È fuori, Gus, ed è davvero fantastico. Ascolta, il nostro VOX non funziona molto 
Roger. Would you please verify that your Antenna Select switc
わかりました。まず最初にやりたいことの一つは、バッテリーを充電することです。そうすれば、そちらに電力を供給できるようになります。そのための手順も準備されています。再突入に関しては、最終中間コースを大気圏再突入インターフェースの5時間前に行う予定です。もし再突入をしなければならないとしたらの話ですが。そして、大気圏再突入インターフェースのおよそ4時間半前にサービスモジュールを投棄し、その後3時間から3時間半かけて写真撮影、司令船の地上・地上監視システムの起動、収納作業、その他雑用を行います。そして、大気圏再突
Bene. Riga 3, sotto PROPELLENTE - propulsione: il RISCALDATORE DI STANDBY RENDEZVOUS sarà aperto e l'interruttore del RISCALDATORE DEL RADAR DI ATTERRAGGIO sarà aperto. Ho appena cambiato le antenne; e, proseguendo, l'ATCA sarà aper
I've got a comment about the point on the Earth where the Sun's rays reflect back up toward us. In general, the color of the oceans is mostly uniform and it's bright
罗杰。37伏，
نعم. لقد كنت أبحث في ذلك أيضاً
Хорошо, опять же, глядя в телескоп, я совершенно не могу определить, Нунки ли это, но я определил его местоположение с помощ
Okay, C
Apollo 11, Houston. I controlli logici sono corretti. Via liber
В
Non, la caméra macro est en dessous. Je vais devoir la ramasser avec la pince. Je ramasse plusieurs morceaux de roche très vés
Qu
यहां मौसम काफी अच्छा है। मुझे लगता है कि अगली बार जब आप यहां से गुजरेंगे तो आपको तूफान दिख सकता है। अगली 
布鲁斯要当
أجل، يمكنك رؤية الحركة النسبية يا غاس. يمكنك رؤ
私は今、ロッ
로저. 게깅, 4개, 시작
Friendship Seven, qui è il chirurgo di Zanzibar. Pressione sanguigna 136 sistolica dopo l'esercizio, buona, in calo a poco meno di 90 per la diastolica. Entrambi i tracciati sono di ott
Okay. Just be careful what you do with the tape recorder. Bill's a little sensitiv
نعم
Je comprends; passons à la 
1分钟——尼尔明白了。我们明白了，减去6.8。好的，EMS系统待命。巴兹，你的检查清单上还有
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपको बैटरी बी का चार
好的。这里月亮位置的检查点，和地平线位置的检查点不同，它始终位于36度窗口标记处。我
ठीक है। अब क्या? मैंने अभी-अभी फिर से 
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。約3分半です。まだ順調ですね。予測された打ち上げ終了時刻は、まさに
좋습니다. 다음 페이지와 마지막 페이지, 짐, 34번으로 넘어가세
... العودة إلى 
Aquarius
Сброс сточных вод, подождем 84 часа; возможно, они уже смоделировали вентиляционное отверстие или что-то в этом роде, поэтому я хочу оказаться
分かりました。北の星の並びを入れ替えるだけです。ナビ星の代わりにシリウス（15番）を、リゲルの代わりに（訂正します）、ポラリスの代
هل ترغب بالتحدث مع زو
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Как в
حسنًا. ينظر إلى شدة التيار الكهربائي للبطارية التي زودتنا بها سابقًا. يرغب في أن تكون أقل بنصف أمبير إلى أمبير واحد. نرجو منك أن تطلب من جاك فحص قواطع الدائرة و
로저. 제어 모드는 수동, 자이로스코프는 정상, 기동 스위치는 꺼져 있습니다. 연료는 45-45%, 산소는 70%, 아니, 정정하자면 산소는 80%와 100%입니다. 우주복 온도는 현재 68
और जैक, मेरे जैसे नौसिखिए के लिए एक अच्छी बात यह है कि यहाँ घूमना-फिरना बहुत आसान है। जैसा कि आप कमांड मॉड्यूल सिम्युलेटर में काम करने से जानते हैं, शून्य गुरुत्वाकर्षण का होना वाकई बहुत फायदेमंद होता है। क्योंकि एक गुरुत्वाकर्षण में वहाँ घूमना-फिरना काफी मुश्किल हो जाता है, लेकिन इस वातावरण में यह बहुत आसान है। जैसा कि आप देख सकते हैं, यह काफी साफ-सुथरा दिख रहा था, मुझे इसमें कुछ ढीले वॉशर मिले और सीक्वेंस कैमरे का एक छोटा सा प्लास्टिक का ढक्कन ढीला हो गया था जो मुझे ईडी पैनल के पास फंसा हुआ मिला। ठीक है। जिम के ठीक नीचे, वह वास्तव में एक डिब्बे जैसी चीज़ पर खड़ा है। और पीछे मौजूद सभी लोगों की जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, इस डिब्बे के अं
Sì, lo stiamo vedendo. Ci sfugge la porzione di Terra che si trova verso il terminatore. La parte scura della Terra è quella che non riusciamo a catturare. Stiamo ricevendo c
Roger. That 
Atlantikschiff, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich wünsche mir, dass Sie Kurs auf Cape Cod nehmen. Ich habe die Kapsel auf die 180°-Position treiben lassen und muss mic
Roger. Non sembra che il tubo rosso possa competere con i principali m
Certo che sì. Guarda, puoi vedere: sembrano tre cose c
Apollo 11, Houston. Accepteriez-vous notre offre? Nous avons une réponse pour v
चार्ली, क्या तुम माइक की दोनों आँखों को मुलाकात स्थल की खिड़की से बाहर झाँकते हुए देख सकते
11, Хьюстон. Подтвердите, пожалуйста, что мы получили данные автоматически, когда вы обошли этот участок для прохода. Конец 
درجة الحرارة الآن ثابتة عند 82 درجة، مع ضبط سائل التبريد على 6.5. 
OK. J'ai maintenant les amplificateurs de puissance, PC + 2 heures,; 38.030, + 08330, - 00509, - 02
로저, 버즈. 첫 번째 항목은 AC 버스 A 아
D'accord, Bill. Nous venons de recevoir votre enregistrement vocal et nous vous recontacteron
حسنًا. عليك أن تكون حذرًا جدًا في تتبع مكان مركز ثقلك. أحيانًا، قد تحتاج إلى خطوتين أو ثلاث للتأكد من 
Okay, fast zwei Minuten, und diese verdammte Horizontprüfung wird, man glau
Sì, lo ha
It's going past now, Bruce, but I scanned that area th
Ok. Tutto quello che dobbiamo fare è inviare i vostri vettori di stato e i carichi bersaglio, e dovremo aspettare un paio di minuti prima di essere pronti. E se siete pronti a copiare, posso darvi il pannello di manovr
D'accord. Écoute, et si j'allais dire
मुझे इसके बारे में और कुछ नहीं पता चला है, जिम। हम इ
...133시간보다 더 길어요... 아, 네, 그런 것 같아요. 네, 그는... 목요일 오후에 하강을 했어요. 그는 착수 지점까지 걸리는 시간을 계산해냈는데... 몇 시간, 그러니까 74시간이요. 그리고 우리는... 어떻게 이 
Aquarius, in comparing our initial estimates of water usage and electrical power usage, it appears that we're right on the money on water usage, and we're using a little less amperes than 
正在这里做一些授权委托书方
Ça fonctionne bien pour l'instant, Charlie. On en a instal
О. Это... Это подтверждается. Если он не сможет увидеть звёзды в том положении, в котором вы будете находиться на орбите, вам придётся сначала переместиться в положение, соответствую
روجر، هيوستن. -11، /: 45597، -040، +157، +36325، -01727، +01428 180 003 000، غير قابل للتطبيق
阿波罗8号
انطلقت المركبة الفضائية أجينا. انحرفت المركبة ودارت، وتم إيقاف نظام التحكم الآلي، وكانت 
Roger, je voulais juste prendre de tes n
分かりました。コンピュータをすべてのモードでチェックします。このチェックには 3 つの手順があります。まず、すべての IVI ウィンドウで 10 フィート/秒を入力します。次に、誤動作リセットを押します。次に、Start Comp を押して、Computer Running Light の表示を確認します。これをすべてのモードで実行します。繰り返しますが、コンピュータが動作しているという表示が得られない場合は、別のテ
Ich schaue gerade zu den Sternen hinaus. Es ist noch hell, nicht ganz dunkel. Das Fenster scheint wie ein Filter zu wirken, der die Sterne geringerer Helligkeit ausblendet. Ich sehe gerade den Großen Wagen und weiter unten Arktur und... und mir scheint, dass ich im Moment hauptsächlich Sterne zweiter und dritter Ordnung sehe. Die kleineren Sterne sind momentan kaum zu erkennen. Je weiter die Nacht fortschreitet, desto mehr werden sichtbar, aber man sieht defin
弗兰克，如
제리, 저기 장비실 아래쪽에 있는 온수/냉수
好的，杰克。他们希望你在49小时
控制系统运
켄, 우리 항로가 어
Und Mrs. Robert Goddard sagte heute, ihr Mann wäre überglücklich gewesen. „Er hätte nicht gejubelt oder 
Vorrei fare un piccolo commento sul sestante. Il suo utilizzo in una navicella spaziale angusta è molto difficile, soprattutto con il casco. Alla fine ho deciso che s
是的。好的，我现在要把它们关掉，看看会发
Okay, Vance. This is command module to: cabin fan filter and bag in the; decontamination bags, except for the ones we use for the TV camera, in the; t
Eh bien, eh bien, vous ne pouvez pas, vous ne pouviez pas le faire avec 
よく分かりました。準
And probably - Okay, DECA GIMBAL, and sooner or later, we're going to need DECA
こんにちは、カントン・コム・テック。フレン
Роджер. Конец орбитальной зоны. Гольф — это 3 часа плюс 00 минут плюс 39 сек
좋아요. 그리고 우리가 사용하는 건
Roger. Verst
روجر، هل ستخبرنا متى تريدنا أن ننحرف 90 درجة أخرى
私たちは本当に、そのエンジンの燃料消費量について文句を言うべきではありません。なぜなら、そのエンジンで 1 ガ
はい。フライバイとペリシンシアン、そして2時間ブロックのアップデートです。また、すべての窓の最新情報もお知らせください。月周回軌道上では、中央ハッチの窓の使用について代替案
Как продвигается работа с 
로저, 제미니 6호입니다. 우주선 7호가 당신의 고도보다 위에 있는지 아래에 있는지 알려
Okay, Jim. I didn't catch t
알겠습니다. 본토 상공에서 OFF 위치로 이동했을 때 무슨 일이 있었는지 간략하게 설명해
本当にそう言ったのか確認
吉姆，在我们等待他们是否还有其他问题的时候，我想给你读一下助推器
ケン、あそこに4つのブレーカーがありますね。パネル8とおっしゃったので、そちらのことをおっしゃっているのかと思いました。今はブレーカーが切れているとは思えませんが、ブレーカーを確
Да уж, эта штука везде разбросана, правда? Может
À ce moment-là, vous passerez la fonction Retro Power à ARM, mais no
好的。没错，这位是吉姆·洛弗尔。我们今天想带大家简单了解一下阿波罗8号内部的生活。我们已经向大家展示了月球和地球的景象，现在我们想邀请大家走进我们的“家”。正如你们在仪表盘上看到的，这里至少已经是我们生活了4天。我们在仪表盘上标记了每一
Roger. Guardando il piano di volo, hai un atterraggio previsto alle ore 10:00, e dovremo farne un altro alle 10:00 in preparazione per le 10:00. Ed è accettabile, con le procedure a terra, se desideri
Hous
Friendship Seven, this is Indian Cap Com. I have your retrosequence times. Are you prepared t
是的……实际上，由于舱内存在的偏航效应
حسنًا. لقد حصلنا على قراءة صحيحة لدرجة حرارة الف
Okay, I maneuver to the Moon check attitude; at which time I put the 36 window line on the Moon, and just prior to, the Earth wil
Ora sono nella posizione di record. Penso che la risposta migliore all'autocinesi sia che non ce ne sia. Non ne ho notata nessuna, e tendo ad allineare l'orizzontale con la testa: una linea orizzontale sotto gravità zero è una linea parallela alla linea tracciata tra i tuoi occhi
ジャック、しばらくの間、BAT電圧と充電器のアンペア値を10～15分ごとに測定する必要があるんだけど、君がコピーし
Jerry, une autre caractéristique d'identification: ces petits cratères d'impact présentent des taches sombres au centre, 
Не мог
Хорошо. Отлично. Теперь следующий шаг — вырезать диагональное отверстие в одном из «ушек» пластикового пакета возле дуги. Вы можете выбрать любой из них и вырезать отверстие примерно 1,5 или 2 дюйма по диагонали, достаточно большое, чтобы просунуть красный шланг. После этого просто просуньте красный шланг так, чтобы он доходил примерно до центра баллона. Это не критично, за исключением того, что отверстие должно быть направлено вниз, а затем приклейте пакет к шлангу скотчем так, чтобы он плотн
... Jack... Ehi, Jack; per il passaggio 3 ho attivato BAT 5
You're coming
Esatto. Okay. Avanti. Modalità - a - Quando sei in assetto, CONTROLLO MODALITÀ AUTO. Digita per monitorare le velocità; quando sono i
まあ、私には私が知っていることすべてを教えてくれた優秀な主力乗
Plus 1197, minus 16500 12681 35608 0506, correction north set 068 097 356, zero fast return,, 7
休斯顿的鹰牌（Eagle）先生，您有空的时候，请问您的LCG（可能是指
Oka
Хорошо. Мы выполним прогрев системы управления наведением (GUIDANCE CONTROL). И режим управления положением (MODE CONTROL) — удержанием положения (ATTITUDE HOLD). Переключатели управления положением будут установлены в положение ROLL — PULSE, PITCH — PULSE, а YAW — MODE CONTROL. Таким образом, они будут управлять рысканием, а вы будете использовать их для управления тангажем и к
さて、今か
Rog
Con questa posizione si ha sicuramente l'illusione di guardare in alto, e se non c'è orizzonte, è solo un cielo nero. La quantità di luce nella cabina di pilotaggio è piuttosto elevata. Una volta che ci si è adattati, può essere ridotta, ovviamente, dalla luce della cabina. A questo punto, sono un po' riluttante a ridurre il livello di luce qui dentro, a causa del p
这台相机的镜头坏了……那台也坏了……六分仪
هل هذا صحيح؟ لقد التقطت الكثير من الصور، لكنها ليست جيدة
It was Ve
ठीक है। हम आपको अपनी योजना के बारे में संक्षेप में बताना चाहेंगे। इस समय, हमारे पास पानी की बहुत कमी है। इसलिए हम जितना हो सके उतना कम उपयोग करना चाहेंगे। इसके लिए, हम 61 घंटे (यानी अब से 37 मिनट) पर 16 फीट प्रति सेकंड की गति से फ्री-रिटर्न पैंतरेबाज़ी करने की योजना बना रहे हैं। फिर हम इंजन बंद कर देंगे, और फिर 79 घंटे पर, हम एक और एबॉर्ट पैंतरेबाज़ी करेंगे ताकि जो ईंधन बचा है उसे निकाल सकें। लेकिन हम इसे जल्द से जल्द बंद करना चाहेंगे। यह मिडकोर्स क
Roger. Ti ho sentito forte e chiaro. Ti mando un altro... (pressione sanguigna), perché con l'ultimo mi sono spostato tr
Roger. Ich habe die Maschine erneut gewartet und den Wasser
«Аврора Севен», командование аэропорта Занзибар. 
Роджер, Майк. И наш подход к презентации немного неуместен. Если вы готовы
... bi
... 
ر
Buzz,
Хорошо. 2,1 мили, 45 футов в секунду - 49 футов 
Roger, Buzz. It sounds like a good idea for some of your surveying work there inside the cockpit. 
わかりました。チェックリストを読んでいて疑問に思ったことがありました。私の理解では、実際の入室時には主給湯器と副給湯器の両方がオンになっているはずですが、チェックリストには実際にオンになっている箇所がありません。確認させていただき、チェックリストに記載する適切なスイッチ類がすべて揃っ
Und 
了解。
ولديك 6 إطارات في الثانية، وهي ملونة؛ لديك ما يعادل 15 دقيقة - 6 إطارات في الثانية، f:8، لا نهائي، 
أنا على و
حسناً. 
لا، أنا أيضاً لا أحتاج إلى ذلك. نحتاج إلى مكان خاص لحفظ هذه الأشيا
Seule la partie la plus récente 
ठी
わかりました。待
제미니 4호, 휴스턴. 항공모함에서 약 40~50마일
Roger. 1A und 1B sind 6,5 Volt, genauer 
روجر، هل أنت مستعد للبدء في قائمة التحق
Sie könnten Colonel Coop
ठीक है। नील, क्या तुम इसे जल्दी से मेरी
Хорошо. На этом хронология событий заканчивается, Фред. Теперь, если есть возможность, вот контрольный список на случай непредвиденных обстоятельств
Я вас прекрасно понимаю. Роджер: за несколько минут до начала операций. Чувствую себя отлично, настроение приподнятое, всё хоро
11. Судя по показаниям телеметрии, все в
Okay. Instead of OFF/RESET p
Roger. Wir gehen davon aus, dass wir be
Siamo a vostra disposizione per i controlli d
它大部分是白色的，或
जेमिनी 4
罗杰。我们正飞越博尔曼火山口，安德
أنا عند أسفل السلم. لا تتجا
D'accord, Buzz. Premièrement, il semblerait que vos cartes obliques de site d'atterrissage ne soient pas correctement positionnées. Veuillez vérifier: nous pensons q
Aquarius さん、当初の水使用量と電力使用量の推定値を比較すると、水使用量については正確に予測されており、最初の分析で当初予測していたよりもアンペア数が少し少ないようです。つまり、その点では予測が正確か、あるいは少しだけ予測
Роджер. Похоже, Нил прибудет через пять минут, одиннадцать. Майк, увидимся на заднем плане. Четкость изображения просто потрясающая. Цвета хорошие. Получается очень удачное изображение командира Армстронга. Мы
That is about it as far as the world and national news and the features is concerned. On the sport page, Hank Stram of the Ka
No. It's down to a little under 2. 
برج الدل
Roger. Li vediamo,
好的，我们都
Sì, non puoi las
We
わかりました。チェックリストの「全てのジェット」が消されていて、「全ての軸でカップルを有効にする」と書いてあります。それで、これを再構築してステッ
Ok, Joe. Dalla finestra 5, ho appena ripreso l'oggetto che rotolava, quindi, di sicuro, doveva essere un pannello. Non credo che potremmo essere ancora 
جو، يبدو أن أفضل وضعية ممكنة لوضع النجوم هي إما رقم 2 أو 4. هوائي رادار الالتقاء يعيق الرؤية الآن. ربما تفكر في طريقة لإزالته بأقل قدر من الطاقة، وعندها قد 
D'accord. Bien reçu, Fred. Merci. Nous vous demandons de bien vouloir couper le disjoncte
روجر، سكوت. أنا في وضع الطيران الانسيابي، لكنني شغّلت ناقل التيار المتردد. وقد اتصل بالشبكة بشكل ممتاز. سأشغّل أجهزة الإرسال لاحقًا. وضع التحكم المُختار هو التحكم الإلكتروني، مع أنني لا أتحكم به حا
نحن
... Wolken. Sie sehen aus wie Stratuswolken, haben aber sicherlich einen mäßigen Einfluss darauf. Ich frage mich, ob die
Okay. Schalten Sie die EMS-Funktion aus – wie wäre es mit ATT DEADB
ああ、はい、通信回線はあります。あなたはとても騒がしいですが、大きな声でゆっくり
Okay. Understand. Start Retrofire,... sunrise 10 08 40. And
네, 그렇게 
そして、あなたが私たちに提供し、承認した場合、私たちは新しい状態ベクトル
Ganz s
了解しました。「アクティベーション」の項に、ASAサー
Tranquility, Houston. Richiedi l'appunta
Девяносто градусов высоты т
Hie
Qu'est-ce qu'on est censés y mettr
Pour voir le soleil, Vance. Il serait peut-être possible de voir le réticule même sans allumer
ठीक है। आरसी प्राप्त करें, 
Okay. How about making those all five digit readouts
Roger. E ho un paio di altre cose, Mike. Dobbiamo terminare la carica della batteria B in questo momento, e inoltre, il meteo sta mettendo a dura prova il nostro punto di atterraggio previsto a causa di temporali sparsi. Non vogliamo trovarci di fronte a uno di questi, quindi sposter
罗杰，一切都和你说的地面指示一样，
Это «Дружба Семь». Автоматический реверсивный сброс выключен. Селектор режимов работает нормально, управление скоростью, гироскоп в норме. Все Т-образные рукоятки включены, кроме ручного управления, которое выключено. В данный момент я управляю вручную. Переключатель посадочного мешка выключен. Панель управления работает нормально, за исключением этого. Топливо в системе управления 60-82 [процента]. В данный момент положение на ручном управлении: крен 5 [градусов] вправо, рыскание 15 [градусов] вправо, тангаж -34 [градуса] в орб
好的，肯。你的通讯信号非常弱——非
S band looks like it's holding good, Hou
Melden Sie Guaymas die Anzahl der Retrograde, die IV
Ro
세븐, 여기는 케이프입니다. 대통령께서 통화하실 예정이고, 대통령께서 통화하시는 
Okay. Sag mir Bescheid, Jerry, wann du es das nächste Mal ablädst. Ich verstehe, wir sind jetzt auf dem richtigen Weg. Hast du schon 
Okay, der zweite Schri
世界と国内のニュースと特集記事は以上です。スポーツ面では、カンザスシティ・チーフスのハンク・ストラムがAFLの年間最優秀コーチに選ばれました。彼にとっては3シーズンで2度目の受賞です。投票は、各都市から3人ずつ、合計30人のスポーツ記者とスポーツキャスターからなるAP通信の審査員団によって行われました。ストラムに最も近いのはウィーブ・ユーバンクでした。票を獲得した他のコーチは、サンディエゴのシド・ギルマンとデンバーのルー・セイビンです。昨日のシュライナーズ・カレッジ・オール
यह तो तुलनात्मक रूप से क
제미니 4, 스위치를 조금 더 오래 누르고 계세요. 전원이 
Clairement en dessous de moi. Je le suivais du regard depuis Carnarvon. Jusqu'à Carnarvon, il était en dessous de nous, puis il est monté jusqu'à l'horizon, avant de redescendre en dessous. On aurait presque dit qu'il était sur une orbite différente de la mienne. Son apogée et son périgée étaient différents des miens. Bref, j'ai tenté de le rattraper au lever du jour, dès que j'ai pu le localiser. Comme je l'ai dit, à ce moment-là, il se trouvait à un ou deux kilomètres devant moi, en dessous. Plus j'essayais de me rapprocher, moins je gagnais de terrain. Je tirais en rétrograde. J'utilisais mes propulseurs supérieurs de manière à réduire ma vitesse totale, et je tirais… simultanément. Je ne suis jamais vraiment parvenu à le rattraper, et il a continué à s'éloigner. Il m'est apparu évident qu'une fois arrivés à Hawaï, pour rattraper le lanceur à temps pour la sortie extravéhiculaire, nous épuiserions probablement tout le carburant embarqué. Or, le protocole aéroporté interdisait cette manœuvre. J'ai donc consulté le commandant de bord et nous avons décidé de ne pas poursuivre la 
Ok, stavo per raccontarti del passaggio di consegne che abbiamo appena fatto, ma sono arrivato un po' in ritardo. Dato che siamo pieni di energia e vorremmo avere la banda S con te dopo il blackout, vorremmo... Vorremmo che cancellassi il passaggio dalla pagina 2-5 della tua checklist di ingresso, d
Хорошо
203 に入ってください、
Okay. Jetzt nutze ich den Mond links von mir, und das hilft wirklich gut. Ich decke den Lagenanzeiger ab, damit ihr die Gierbewegung beobachten könnt. Ich deaktiviere die Kreiselsteuerung und versuche, jetzt den Fly-by-Wire-Modus für niedrige Flughöhen
हे, जो? क्या एफएओ तैयार है - क्या तुम तैयार हो - या क्या तुम मुझे वे आइटम देने के लिए तैयार हो ज
Okay, new subject. Like to break in to say that
ठीक है। आपके सेकेंडरी रेडिएटर इनपुट का तापमान लगभग 72 डिग्री है; रेडिएटर आउटपुट का तापमान लगभग 30 डिग्री है; ग्लाइकोल वाष्पीकरण तापमान लगभग 65 डिग्री है; भाप का दबाव उच्च स्तर पर है, ग्लाइकोल डिस्चार्ज दबाव लगभग 9 psi है। सेकेंडरी एक्यूमुलेटर सूट का तापमान लगभग 52 डिग्री है; केबिन का तापमान लगभग 58 डिग्री है; सूट का दबाव 4.1 है, केबिन का दबाव 5 है। CO2 का आंशिक दबाव 1 से थोड़ा अधिक, लगभग 1.1 है। घर के बाहरी हिस्से का तापमान 72 डिग्री है, हीलियम का दबाव 3500 है; N2A का दबाव 2300 है; N2B का दबाव लगभग 2450 है। ईंधन का दबाव लगभग 165 डिग्री है; ईंधन सेल 1, दोनों बंद हैं, उनमें कोई गतिविधि नहीं है। त्वचा का तापमान 405 डिग्री है; संघनन निकास निम्न स्तर पर है। ईंधन से
罗杰，你能更清楚地指出这颗泽塔星的位置吗？我们的星图上没有标出它。我们知道
잭이 수면
Houston, Eagle. Zurück auf PRIMARY, und ich bin bereit
حسنًا. 
不。我在这边好像没看到它们。
Tr-10 back to normal. I've done that earlier. Okay, we got - got suit pressure. Go ahead and take a look at the inverters again here. 250 is 141 (degrees), 150 is about 107 (degrees). Well enough alone. Standby is... 7. Just about ambient. Negative, it's even a little.... The cabin pressure is about 5.3 (psi), which is perfect. Suit dome is 72 (degrees). Cabin dome i
Ho abbassato il VOLUME 
روجر. تبدو رائ
Roger, Mike. Während wir darauf warten, dass das Raumschiff zum Mond manövriert, möchte ich anmerken, dass, je näher wir dem Mond kommen, das Sonnenlicht direkt in das Suchteleskop fällt und es dann unbrauchbar wird. Man muss sich allein auf den 
注意观察，以防
Not significantly. I could get down to about
Esatto. Quindi, sul pannello 250, aprire l'interruttore BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING e verificare la tensione del BUS PR
好的，杰克，我们得先退一步。
रॉजर। और फ्रेड को अब छुट्टी मिल रही है। वह आराम करने वापस चला गया है। यहाँ लवेल है, जिसे यह ज़िम्मेदारी सौंपी गई ह
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। डॉकिंग प्रोब को आगे बढ़ा दिया गया है और सभी संकेत सामान्य हैं। अब हम केवल पायरो आर्म पर
Хорошо. GMTB 15 43 23. ΔV 139. Продолжительность работы двигателя - 2 минуты 39 секунд. Ваш 15 55 24. Крен влево 55. GMTRB 16 05 28. Крен вправо 65. GMT 400 K 15 58 23. Ваш
Продувка 
Columbia, Houston. I can give you some REACQ angles for the high gain on the jettison attitude. Then you can go there whenever you wa
休斯顿，这里是阿
Vuoi che vada su HIGH GAIN, YAW, zero o - ripeti i
ويلكو، وربما تخبر جيم أن مركز التحكم عن بعد الخاص بنا بعيد بحوالي 4
알겠습니다.
- 육분의로
D'accord, Fred. Tout d'abord, les préparatifs, en commençant par la liste de vérification des imprévus (page 24), sont recommandés. Nous serons ravis de recevoir vos commentaires à ce sujet. Deuxièmement: lorsque vous êtes en position de manœuvre, vous devriez voir le soleil tout en haut. Il séparera le curseur lorsque celui-ci est positionné à zéro. Attention cependant: la manœuvre peut se désengager très facilement, car elle est très sensible au roulis et au lacet. Sachez que la position est en c
Роджер. Мы видим, что температура на выходе радиатора топлив
좋습니다. 괜찮으시다
Хьюстон, не могли бы вы подсказать нам углы наклона карданного подвеса, чтобы направить его на Луну? Я ни разу не видел её за всю поездку, и мне интересно, в каком направлени
حسنًا. هل 
이글, 휴스턴. 타임라인에 나와 있는 대로, 도킹 해제 전에 404, 405, 406 세 주소 모두의 값을 0으로 설정해 주십시오. 
Forse un po' spostati orizzontalmente verso - vediamo - Houston, per aiutarti, stiamo guardando proprio sopra con il sole - è sul lato destr
Roger. Es gibt da diesen
双子座4号，这里是休斯顿空中交
Okay. What we've got here is a couple of COMM checks. We'll be switching around to five different modes, and only one of them will interrupt your activities. In that case, we'll be switching to the uplink backup voice, and that's the one time that you might lose temporary uplink voice COMM. You'll have downlink voice COMM throughout the entire procedure, and it ought to take you, I guess, 10 to
मैं अभी ग्रस तारामंडल को देख रहा हूँ, और उसके तारे काफी स्पष्ट दिखाई दे रहे हैं, 
9번과 10
OK. Étape 7. Panneau de disjoncteurs 11, bus CA B, affichage hélium PQGS, fermé. Principal - Panneau 
Credo che sia stato dopo l'inserim
Роджер, Билл. Несколько часов назад у нас произошёл дамп стираемой памяти. Думаю, это случилось, пока ты спал, но в любом случае мы проверили стираемую память компьютера побитово
Tu l'as reçu to
Das stimmt. Ich habe das ja schon gesagt. Ich hatte wo
जी
Houston, Apollo 11. Could you o
تما
Хорошо, Джим. Прежде чем вы начнёте, есть один момент. То, что мы вам говорили раньше, мы по-прежнему считаем абсолютно верным. Единственное, что изменяется в памяти компьютера, — это W-матрица. Однако, в качестве дополнительной меры предосторожности, мы хотели бы сделать дамп памяти компьютера, проверить её побитово и убедиться, что всё в полном по
Ich glaube nicht, dass das so beabsichtigt war, Bill. Geplant war, dass der Wärmetauscher des Anzugs an beiden Kreisläufen angeschlossen ist. Falls es zu kalt wird, könnte man über die Bedienfeldsteuerung den primären Kreislauf durch den Wärmetauscher abschalten. So wäre der Wärmetauscher des Anzugs aber in jedem Fall immer mit Wärme versorgt. Mir ist bewusst, dass wir den sekundären Wärmetauscher vor dem Eintritt abschalten und dann wieder einschalten werden, aber die Idee war, dass sowohl der primäre als auch der sekundäre Kreislauf gleichzeitig am Wärmetauscher des Anzugs angeschlos
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。最初の燃料電池で約2分で
Je ne distingue plus qu'une forme rectangulaire qui to
Хорошо. Сейчас идёт процесс
지금 에어글로우 
لنفترض قيمة إضاءة معينة، وهذه القيمة هي 13 لفيلم 64 ASA. جيد جدًا. ساطع إلى حد ما... سأعطيها 13، وسنلتقط صو
네, 감사합니
ठीक ह
Понял. Мы снова можем управля
D'accord. Je l'ai déjà réinitialisé (COMMAND RESET), mais j'ai toujours un problème de grésillement sur la bande. Et 
Hallo Houston. Apollo 8. Wie lesen S
We have, as you probably know, several groups working on procedures from here on o
रॉजर, ईगल। बढ़िया रीड
Привет, Водолей. У меня есть для
Roger. Als Nächstes steht die Wasserabgabe a
हाँ, मुझे लगता है ऐसा हुआ था; खिड़कियों पर निशान प
Sto solo scherzando; di cosa hai bisogno? Dell'ora di 
Houston, bitte beachte die Rot/Blau-Filtertechnik am Fernseher. Die beiden Filter lassen sich nicht verschieben, solange sie an der Fernsehkamera befestigt sind. Daher schlage ich vor, wir verwenden zuerst Rot, 
罗杰。买
好的。现在我们按照你给我们的态度
मैं वहीं बैठा था। उबकाई! उबकाई! हा! हा! हा! तुम्हे
Я тебя не понимаю. П
Hallo Apollo
Voilà, ça a aidé. OK. Pas de changement pour les pages 29, 3
أما بالنسبة لعملية D-9 التابعة لسلاح الجو، فإن طري
Ich habe vor unserer Abreise hier drinnen Fotos von den Trümmern gemacht und dabei versehentlich die Einstellungen der Reseau-Kamera am DC-Komman
罗杰
حسنًا، أين نحن؟ نحن نهبط. يا للأسف، لا يمكننا التوقف هنا ومشاهدة الأرض وهي ترتفع. كما تعل
Это утвердите
Wie Sie wahrscheinlich wissen, arbeiten mehrere Gruppen an den weiteren Abläufen. Eine Gruppe befasst sich mit Kurskorrekturen, um das System, die Lageregelung, die Vorgehensweise, Ausrichtungstechniken usw. zu ermitteln. Eine andere Gruppe arbeitet am Wiedereintritt, einschließlich der Aktivierung. Eine weitere Gruppe überwacht den Systemstatus. In wenigen Stunden – also morgen, soweit wir das beurteilen können – werden wir eine Basiskonfiguration einstellen und einen Hauptbus-B-Check durchführen. Die Kommunikation ist momentan etwas schlecht, und ich kann Sie nicht gut verstehen. Ich möchte Sie aber über den aktuellen Stand informieren. U
Ici Friendship Seven. Je vais essayer de vous décrire ce qui se passe ici. Je suis au milieu d'un amas de particules minuscules, qui brillent d'une lumière intense, comme si elles étaient luminescentes. Je n'ai jamais rien vu de pareil. Elles s'arrondissent légèrement; elles passent près de la capsule et ressemblent à de petit
Elliot... updated your book. We moved out of PRELAUNCH to CATCH-UP and
Es ist heute Abend ziemlich bewölkt dort unten. Ich kann nur noch einen Teil Australiens und Koreas sehen, und es sieht so aus, als gehöre auch ein Teil Chinas dazu. Alles andere ist fast komplett von Wolken verdec
FLUG. Hast du d
你好。加州通信技术公司，奥罗拉七号。声音清晰。怎么
好的。明白你已加入并接受。请验证 OMNI C
Ok, va bene. Perché non so dove - quanto lontano ti ho perso. Ok, pannello 4; TELCOMM, GRUPPO 1, ad AC1. Sul pannello 5, chiudi quanto segue: GRUPPO PRESSIONE 1, PRINCI
네, 세계 뉴스부터 시작하겠습니다. 아폴로 8호 우주비행사들에 대한 찬사와 우주 탐사 분야에서의 국제 협력에 대한
माइक, एसईपी में आपकी प्रस्तुति का दृष्टिक
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous 
Ja, ich bin ru
Like you say, you might as w
Tout à fait, Apollo 8. Nous aurons d'autres informations à vous communiquer sous peu. Nous travaillons actuellement sur un survol. Nous allons également vous parler plus longuement des difficultés rencontrées lors de l'observation des étoiles au sextant et au télescope. Dès que l'équipe noire arrivera sur le MOKR (nous aurons deux équipes ici), nous aimerions recueillir un compte re
はい
닐, 당신
Carnarvon. Gemini VIII, si vous êtes prêts pour le test de 
OK. Vérifiez le fonctionne
どんな種類で
Мы собираемся записать вас на диктофон, чтобы весь мир смог это услышать по
よし、ジーン
Riesci a pensare a qualche fenomeno di sfiato normal
わかりました。E-MODのダンプはとりあえず飛ばして、アップリンク
좋아요. 카나리아 제도 너머로 
아니요, 하강에 대해 생각하고 있어요. 자, 여기 설정입니다. 16mm, HC-EX, f:4, 50
도움이 될 수 있다면 옴니 마이크에서 높
罗杰。现在是36分41秒
First off, I'm in auto reentry; I'm in auto; gyros are normal; maneuver is off; all configuration is of reentry; bypass switch for rate gyros is in normal. Give you a fuel readout, the auto tank is 90 (percent), manual is about 90 (perc
Roger. The next are ELS BAT A, BAT B, tw
حسناً. وأعطني الوقت مرة أخرى عندما يبدأ المطر با
नहीं, वे पीछे की तरफ है
他一定是位多才多艺的
«Спокойствие», Хьюстон. Первый вопр
알겠습니다. 궤도가 87, 147로 변경되었습니다. 공칭 M=4로 설정하여 진행을 시작하세요. 약간의 궤도면 변경이 있을 예정입니다. 자세한 내용은 나중에 알려드
好的。另外，需要说明的是，我们所有的数据都是基于14安培的电流计算的。而我们实际
هيوس
ジ
好的。我们预测，在您下一次中段飞行的预定时间（即进入界面前2小时），我们将以每秒1.4英尺的速度进行燃烧，这将使您在进入界面时的γ角改变十分之一度。目前，在没有进一步机动的情况下，您的γ角为-6
Когда ускоритель отделился от нас, было видно, как топливо разбрызгивается из сопла. Когда ускоритель вращался, в основном в плоскости, перпендикулярной линии, проходящей через главную ось космического аппарата к ускорителю, можно было увидеть длинный развевающийся хвост. Я нарисую небольшую схему этого на своем плане полета. В месте отделения космического аппарата повсюду были обломки. Мы развернулись, и там все было разбросано. На самом деле, пока мы толком не рассмотрели ускоритель, я не мог понять, что к чему. Обтекатели отделились прямо у места выброса обтекателей без проблем. Обтекатели сканера горизонта, похоже, отделились целыми, но я не мог
أبولو 8، هيوستن. ثلاثة أوضاع للمفاتيح. مفتاح مدخلات القياس عن بُعد إلى منخفض؛ وضع الصوت العادي لنطاق S إلى صوت؛ وضع الصوت العادي لنطاق S إلى. أكرر، مفتاح مدخلات القياس عن بُعد، منخفض؛ وضع الصوت العادي لنطاق S إلى صوت؛ وضع الصوت العادي لنطاق S إلى. انته
자,
D-ring covered. We don't want th
روجر، جيم. هذه المناورة الخامسة في منتصف المسار، وهي /، ورمزها 31700، غير قابل للتطبيق، غير قابل للتطبيق. هل تفهمان ما أق
11, Хьюстон. Ваша программа сейчас выходит в эфир в США. Мы вот-вот запустим спутник. После этого она будет транслироваться в другие стра
Lediglich die jüngsten Merkmale sind noch einigermaßen deutlich erkennbar, und schließlich werden auch diese durch den ständigen Einschlag kleiner Meteoriten abgetra
أسمعك بوضوح تام
Et sur la page suivante, à environ [heure manquante], vous pouvez reprendre le plan de vol normal. Nous aimerions ajouter une précision: à [heure manquante], un point de déversement des eaux usées. Même si ce n'est pas vraiment nécessaire à ce stade, nous préférons effectuer ce déversement afin de pouvoir vous suivre sans interruption, sans aucun déversement
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 이야기가 좀 딴 길로 샜던 것 같
Sto tirando fuori... e sto puntando verso sud e un po' più verso la parte posteriore che verso 
Are you worried about us getting between the sun and
Это подтверждает правильность д
Apollo 11, Houston. We believe we've tracked down the reacquis
Be
لا أعتقد
जिम, मैंने आपकी पूरी बात नहीं समझी, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि आप यह जानना चाहते थे कि प्रवेश संबंधी प्रक्रियाएँ कब उपलब्ध होंगी और आपको कब पढ़कर सुनाई जाएँगी। अगर ऐसा है, तो इसमें लगभग 120 घंटे लगेंगे। बैटरी A को चार्ज करने की बात करें तो, जैसे ही बाकी लोग आपकी मदद के लिए पहुँचेंगे, हम इसे चार्ज कर देंगे। हमने इस प्रक्रिया का कुछ हिस्सा आपको बता दिया है, और इसमें कुछ अतिरि
11、ヒューストン。ここで高利得アレイを使った運用を試してみたいと思
Mal sehen, ich möchte die Sicheru
Итак, сейчас будет команда изменения скорос
A
Roger. Verstanden. Phasenanpassung bei 02 18 26 49.3; 1 plus 07; Gie
ليس الأمر عاجلاً يا فريد، ولكن بما أن الجميع مستيقظون الآ
Roger, Jack. Da wir die Startposition hab
11番。結構です。さて、記録されているサンプル容器についてですが、テレビでは、その容器にサンプルが実際に提供されているように見えました。岩石そのものについて何らかの配慮がなされ、選別されているように見えました。これらのサンプルについ
فريندشيب سفن. روجر. جميع صمامات المفاتيح لا تزال في نفس الوضع. جهاز إطلاق الصواريخ مُفعّل. خاصية الارتداد التلقائي مُعطّلة. مُحدد الوضع طبيعي، أمر المعدل، الجيروسكوب، طبيعي. مقبض الوقود اليدوي مسحوب. الوقود التلقائي لا يزال مُفعّلاً. تأخير الارتداد طبيعي، حقيبة الهبو
"히터가 15분 동안 AUTO 모드에 있는지 확인하십시오." 이 절차의 첫 페이지에서 히터를 AUTO 모드로 설정하고 차단기를 내렸는데, 이제 15분 동안 쿼드 바이크를 예열한 후 작업을 
Roger. Können wir jetzt miteinander kommunizier
Хорошо, Эд. Вас прини
Votre pression d'oxygène (O2) est anormalement élevée. Il se peut qu'un problème de commutateur soit survenu, ou qu'un dysfonctionnement du système de télémétrie ait également
Ok
はい、はい。これでデータを
अरे यार... 14 डिग्री घूम जाओ। मैंने ऐसा क्यों नहीं किया? मैंने संख्या गलत 
Ok
Bene. I successivi uno, due, tr
And we're going to power down the voice subcarrier part of our upl
Apollo 11, Houston. Ich habe jetzt Ihre aktualisierte Basishöhe, falls Buzz bereit
Ok. Copiamo 39.3 e 1.20. E, Jim, ho un'altra informazione per te. Tra circa 45 minuti, si accenderà una spia di allerta quantità di H2O sul serbatoio di discesa. Ci aspettiamo che ciò accada. Si verifica al 16%. E non è un problema, perché intendiamo far funzionare il serbatoio a secco solo per 
現在、どのよう
Lasciami lavorare sulla schiena. Ascolta, con questa pistola fa tutta la differenza del
मेरा क्या? मे
了解しました。フライトプラ
Да. Я хочу убе
Sigma Seven. Je n'ai pas compris la dernière transmission, mais je suppose que vous avez lu que le commutateur UHF/DF devait être en position R/T. Je n'ai pas d'informations conc
Il manometro dell'O2
Ensuite, nous aimerions que vous placiez la caméra contre la vitre, en la tenant de façon à ce que le nez du vaisseau ne soit pas dans le champ de vision. Nous souhaitons ensuite deux séries de photos. Vous devez être en mode Pulse et pointer le vaisseau directement vers la Terre. Je vous laisse le temps de démarrer. La prise de vue se fera en direction de 
디텐트 2를 꼭 
حسنًا، سنؤجل ذلك. كان الإجراء بسيطًا من ثلاث خطوات، ينص على "إعادة تفعيل الصفحات 1 و1أ و2"، لكن كانت هناك خطوة أخرى غير مفهومة. لذا، ننصحك في هذه الحالة بإعادة الإجراء الذي ذكرناه لقراءة ضغط جهاز SUPER
Понял. Выключи к
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 테스트를 완료했습니다. 이제 업링크를 정상으로 
रॉजर। यह सही है। चरण 5 पर, चरण 5 का पालन करें। "प्राइमरी ग्लाइकॉल लूप एक्टिवेशन" के अंतर्गत, चरण 1, पंक्ति 1, "CB(1
答え
双子座 4，夏威
Roger. Solo alcune cose interessanti - ho appena fatto un NAV con la luna; il sole è proprio sulla mia traiettoria. Sono riuscito a ottenere un set su Antares e stavo lavor
우리는 불길을 피할 수 있어... 17. 그는 54로 설정했어
알겠습니다, 조. 제가 이해한 바로는, 74시간 후에 2번 위치에서 태양 점검을 할 예정인데, 이를 위해서는 랑데부 레이더를 치워야 합니다. 자동 기동을 사용하여 그 위치로 이동하거나, 적어도 그 각도를 확보할 것입니다. 만약 이 각도가 1도 이내로 오차 범위 안에 들어오면, 플랫폼이 기동에 적합하다고 판단되어 추가 점검이 필요 없게 되는 거죠. 하지만 문제가 없더라도, 어둠
Roger. E... mandalo pure. Ti interesserà sapere che ora non ho la luna. L'orizzonte è chi
Roger
أبقِ رائد الفضاء على اطلاع دائم بتقدم عملية التعافي؛ أبقِ رائد الفضاء على اطلاع دائم بتقدم عملية
你好，
了解。約3秒早いですね。TORF（逆噴射時間）は08 Volume 1 21で
Nun ja, allein die eine Probe hat mich überrascht – ich bin überrascht, dass nicht viel mehr Staub dabei war. Ich glaube, Sie haben 
تم
Хорошо, Джек. Я перечитаю шаги, которые ты мне уже дал. Панель 250 CB BAT A, ВВОД ПИТАНИЯ/ПОСТУПА, замкнуть; панель 275, ПИТАНИЕ ИНВЕРТОРА CB 2, ОСНОВНАЯ B, замкнуть; панель 5, ШИНА РЕЛЕ CB BAT, BAT A, замкнуть; БЛОК ДАТЧИКОВ CB, ШИНА ПЕРЕМЕННОГО ТОКА 2, замкнуть; СИГНАЛ ДАТЧИКА CB, ПЕРЕМЕННЫЙ ТОК 2, замкнуть; ЗАРЯДНОЕ УСТРОЙ
What Fred is opening up - is a drink bag that we place inside of our neckring that will allow us to drink whil
Это было гл
嘿，你如何通过S
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 지형에 관해 저희가 드릴 수 있는 최선의 조언은 불규칙한 모양의 분화구 서쪽을 살펴보시고, 그 남서쪽 방
There is a slight rate in yaw about ½ degree per second, it's almost impossible to take out without having to fly it out. This does look like an appropriate time to get ready for an HF check. Turning the VOX 
Houston, 13. Are you still plannin
好的
罗杰
ロジャー。マルーン・ビューグルの続きです。ニクソン大統領は、あなた方に会いに行く飛行機に乗る直前に、サンフランシスコから電話をかけ、奥様たちを驚かせました。奥様方は皆、あなた方のテレビ放送に感動していました。ジャンとパットはここミッションコントロールから見ていました。ケープカナベラルからのインテルサットの打ち上げは昨夜、4度目の延期となりました。デルタ衛星の第2段にある窒素調整器の故障が原因とされています。今夜、新たな打ち上げが試みられる予定です。メキシコ湾流を調査している調査潜水艦ベン・フランクリンは、ジョージア州沖の水深1300フィートで、海底から10フィートから100フィートの高さを24時間漂流するという記録を樹立しました。このミッションはジャック・ピカールが指揮しています。ウォーリー・シラーがデトロイト工科大学の評議員に5年の任期で選出されました。彼は同大学の開発委員会に所属します。エア・カナダは、過去5日間で月行きのフライトの
أبولو 11، هذه هيوستن. نود منك محاولة التقاط الإشارة باستخدام الهوائي عالي الكسب عند زاوية ميل سالبة 90 درجة، وزاوية انحراف 270 درجة. ان
Хорошо. Мы сократим всё до "404 плюс ноль" и выполним эти чет
了解、フランク。3つの燃料電池すべてに酸素パージを行う時間になり
本初子午線の後で切り取られていますね。分かり
Gemini 4, Guaymas CAP COM. Werden Sie Ihren Telemetrieschalter auf Echtzeit u
أبولو 8، أبولو 8، هيوستن. فهمنا رسالتك بوضوح. لقد راجعنا مشكلة كمية المياه الصالحة للشرب لديك، ويبدو أنها مشكلة في جهاز الاستشعار. نقترح عليك إبقاء خزان المياه الصالحة للشرب معزولاً. لديك كمية كافية من المياه في خزان الصرف الصحي لمواص
收到。面板 16，第 2 行，STAB 控制
حسنًا، لا يمكننا تحديد متى يكون م
Roger. GMTRC 01 02 06 51. RET 400 K. 11+18. Did you copy
मैं आपको पढ़ नहीं पा रहा हूँ। दोबारा बो
Ich kann derzeit eine Rollbewegung nach rechts von etwa 5 Grad erkennen und habe bemerkt, dass das Periskop dunkel ist, was bedeutet, dass wir uns im dunklen Bereich befinden. Ich werde versuchen, die Veränderungen durch das Periskop zu beobachten. Momentan kann ich durch das Periskop nichts für Nachtbeobachtungen sehen, zumindest nicht in dieser Position. Ich bin mir nicht einmal sicher, wann ich die geringe Vergrößerung eingestellt habe, außer der Position des Hebels. Das Fenster ist bewölkt. Jet
好的。仪表显示22%。我们没有任何偏航或横滚控制，也无法重新控制偏航推进器
저
휴스턴, 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 연소 상태 보고서를 확인하고자 합니다. VGX는 -1.4, VGY는 0, VGZ는 0.2, 즉 -0.2였습니
Apollo 11, Houston. Our recommendations on the activities for the next hour or so, as far as flight plan goes, are: Continue your familiarization as desired until a
تم التحقق من قبل CM
ठीक है, जिम। सूट फ्लो कंट्रोल खुला हो सकता है, और इंजन 
好的，待命
هل يمكن السماح للمسبار بتخم
13番、ヒューストン。もう少し拡大して見せてもらえ
……你的
Je ne crois pas. Qu
Questo è Gemelli VIII
रॉजर। तापमान लगभग 75 और 77 था, लेकिन हमारे यहाँ आर्द्रता लगभग 60 प
حسنًا يا هيوستن. 
На одном из снимков, сделанных в правой задней части космического аппарата, с видом на юбку посадочной ступени, видно довольно сильное потемнение цвета поверхности, незначительное количество радиации, травления или эрозии. Во время спуска мы оба отметили, что видим большое количество очень мелких частиц пыли, вылетающих наружу. Ранее сообщалось, что после выключения двигателей, вероятно, произойдет выброс газов с повер
रॉजर। हमें बहुत ज़्यादा स्टैटिक सिग्नल मिल रहे हैं। संकट सागर क्षितिज पर हमारे सामने है, और बीच में गहरा पिकाड क्रेटर दिखाई दे रहा है। हम अब चंद्रमा के सूर्योदय या अंतरिक्ष यान के सूर्यास्त के बीच से गुज़र रहे हैं। यह वह क्षेत्र 
Ricevuto, Buzz. È un PAD di ingresso, MPL, che inizia con il rullo 05, 35 - correzione - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, più 1102, meno 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, NOME 69, tutte e quattro le linee sono NA. Riprendendo con D zero: 400 02 09. RET del blackout, 00 17 03 38 08 20. Stella del sestante, 02 0945 149. La stella di puntamento è Scorpii theta, cioè Scorpii theta. Su 315, a destra 35, vettore di salita su. E i commenti: Questa voce PAD non presuppone alcuna rotta intermedia 6. E per tua informazione, guardandola ora, in base a tutto il tracciamento che abbiamo ottenuto, quella manovra sarebbe solo di un decimo di piede al secondo. Quindi, probabil
- -... تم إيقاف تشغيل نظام التحكم الآلي وتم تحق
休斯
休息了大约45分钟后，我来跟您确认一下情况。我们注意到您的高增益天线，如果您愿意，可以在偏航角为90度、俯仰角为-45度时，从全
E, Jim, puoi fare un 400 più tutti zeri ogni volta che vuoi; questo indica semplicemente che vuoi che controlli il tuo atteggi
Okay. Now pres
Okay, Fred, ich kann dich wegen der Hintergrundgeräusche nicht mehr verstehen. Ich nehme an – ich glaube, ich habe g
Wir können nichts sehen... Ich hoffe, sie
이해합니다. 그리고 당신도 그렇게 하려고 애
장갑을 꼈으니 괜찮
Roger. Vous n'avez pas m
Potrei facilmente arrivare da un altro pianeta e sentire di essere sulla
In questo momento vedo sicuramente un rollio a destra di circa 5 gradi e ho notato che il periscopio è scuro, il che significa che stiamo entrando nel lato osc
Apollo 8, qui H
제가 처리
D'accord. Nous pouvons reporter cette observation NAV. Elle était prévue à cette heure-ci, et nous pouvons la reporter. Vu vos commentaires concernant le sommeil, nous aimerions l'effectuer dès que possible, et pour l'instant, nous prévoyons de la décaler de deux heures. Nous la reporterons à la même heure, puisqu
Roger. The signal strength dropped very rapidly to zero; and the pitch and yaw, in about 3 seconds, moved toward 40 degrees pitch and 240 degrees yaw. Right now, they're sitting on about 15 degrees pitch and about 265 deg
Roger. Sieben. Ihre (Erholungsbereich) 2-1 Rücksequenzzeit ist.
Roger. Point suivant: le taux de montée en pression de l'hélium supercritique est nominal. Vous nous avez également interrogés sur l'activité de vos propulseurs lors de la dernière rotation. Nous comprenons maintenant: vous avez indiqué que le tangage était en mode ACCEL COMMAND et le lacet et le roulis en mode RATE COMMAND. Vous actionniez vos propulseurs de tangage. Cela couple les vitesses de rotation aux axes de lacet et de roulis, et – vous ne mainteniez alors qu'
अच्
Roger. Abbiamo ricevuto la stessa risposta nello stesso 
Хорошо, Джо, я готов приступить к настройке переключателей
حسنًا. الأمر بسيط للغاية. نرى أنك قد تم استدعاؤك بالفعل، لذا نريد منك، في وضع المناورة وتثبيت الوضع، استخدام... نريد منك، على كرة القائد، ضبط زاوية الميل إلى 267.5 درجة وزاوية الانحراف إلى -4.5 درجة. وعندما تفعل ذلك، على... يجب أن تقرأ +
休斯顿静谧基地
かなり落ちてきて
Oh, merde! ​​Ce pitch est nul; 32, hein? Le pitch 315, c'est celui-là! Bon. Ils n'arrêtent pas de dire « taux ORB » et cette petite attitude, là, et là, ça s'applique à t
बज़, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आपके पास बर्खास्तगी की कार्यवाही शुरू करने से 
انطلق يا آر 
好的。首先，我们有一个步
Ricevuto. Alla riga 1, correzione, riga 1, sotto A
In etwa 2 Minuten verlieren wir die Verbindung. Hawaii wird Ihren OAMS-Brennvorg
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हम इस टीवी अनुरोध पर एक बार फिर कोशिश करेंगे। हमें 10 मिनट का टीवी वीडियो चाहिए। और अगर आप हमें बाहरी दृश्यों पर एक विवरण दे
سن
Ro
You ought to check the flight plan, it doesn't mention the (laughter) probe or the drogue. It says I remove my hatch, and then I notify you that you're clea
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। आप यहाँ बिल्कुल सही द
콜
Роджер. Калибровка оптики: крен 330,5, тангаж 086,3, рыскание 000,0. Номинальное положение, записанное ручкой и чернилами, по-прежнему верное. Примерно в 25:30, после завершения работы, мы запрашиваем сброс сточных вод до но
HAUPTBUS
रॉजर, माइक। जब तक अंतरिक्ष यान चंद्रमा की ओर गति पकड़ता है, तब तक मैं यह बता
ठीक है। पृष्ठ 15 पर, हम "चेकआउट" शीर्षक को बदलकर "निम्नलिखित स्विच सत्यापित करें" कर देंगे, और वे स्विच हैं: "गाइडेंस कंट्रोल;" तीसरी पंक्ति, "एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल (3)" को अब "मोड कंट्रोल" मे
ठीक है। अपने पावर एम्पलीफायर स्विच को प्राइमरी पर रखें, ऑफ पर नहीं
O2 ホースを右
Ragazzi, non ci credereste mai: non ci sono altro che borse dal pavimento al soffi
罗杰
Я только что снял кадры 3, 4, 5, 6 и 7 над Северной Африкой... (неразборчиво) Кадры (неразборчиво)... 6... Аравийский полуостров, снято из... пря
確定です。パネル250の2つのブレーカーが開きます。パネル275の2つのブレーカーも開きます。パネル250のブレーカーは既に設定済みです。ACインバータ2も設定済みです。ACインバータ2のACバス
정말 아름답네요. 소리도 크고 선명하고 
روجر. الموضوع التالي، هل لامست أي من الألوا
네, 잘 들었습니다. 플랫폼에 대해 말씀하시던 중에 갑자
That is affirmative. I have the balloon on. However, I haven't seen it for some time. It wanders quite a bit and I do not have it in sight at thi
了解しました。理解できたと思います。大部分は覚えていましたので、あなたが教えてくれたことと私の記憶を合わせる
Questo è un pannello di manovra per monitorare il PC più 2. Sarà per lo più vuoto, tranne per il fa
This is Sigma Seven. I had a slight case of double authority here. I got very bo
速率基本正确，姿态也正确，正在切换到电传操纵系统，陀螺仪正常。大约现在
11، هيوستن. سأعطيك توقيتً
罗杰。
Dato che non lo siamo, non mi è chiaro se l'ultima volta non abbiamo dovuto affrontare fermate meccaniche per un po'. Questo potrebbe spiegare 10 minuti di quei 15 minuti, e non ha senso sfidare la sorte. Penso che dovremmo farlo: se inizia a calare di nuovo, dovremmo semplicemente rimetter
罗杰。友
Вопрос, Джо. Джим говорил мне о том, как мы собираемся это сделать в середине процесса, и некоторое время назад, когда мы проводили это включение питания, мы вывели из строя автоматический выключатель STAB/CONTROL ASA. Мне интересно, как он выглядел? В
Roger. Nous ignorons l'état de vos fenêtres. Pendant cette combustion, nous devrons regarder p
LTG. Y
في البداية، حالت العملية دون بدء عمليات الرصد فورًا كما خططنا، نظرًا لوجود مناورة مراوغة أخرى. تسبب تفريغ الحمولة في ظهور كمية هائلة من النجوم الزائفة في المنطقة، مما جعل معايرة البصريات شبه مستحيلة. لم تكن الطريقة التي ابتكرناها فعالة. أما الطريقة التي استخدمتها في النهاية، فكانت التوجه إلى نجم الشعرى اليمانية (سيريوس)، وهو ألمع نجومنا، والحصول على العمود والمحور، ثم توجيه المركبة الفضائية إلى سيريوس لاستخدامهما في البصريات، وهو ما فعلناه لاحقًا. فيما يتعلق بتشتت الضوء، يبدو أننا نتلقى تشتتًا ضوئيًا في التلسكوب الماسح الضوئي في أي وضع تقريبًا أثناء التحكم الحراري السلبي. يتخذ هذا التشتت شكل شريط ضوئي عريض يمتد عبر مركز التلسكوب بزاوية 10 درجات تقريبًا في كلا الاتجاهين من الصفر. من الصعب جدًا رؤية النجوم في هذه المنطقة. وقد كانت عمليات إعادة المحاذاة جيدة. تمكنتُ من تحديد النجم في السدس لإجراء المحاذاة، لكنني لم أستطع التعرف على النجم الذي استخدمناه في حالات مثل ريغور أو مينكنت في التلسكوب الماسح. أظهرت أول رؤية نجمية التقطتها للأرض أفقًا غير واضح المعالم. لكن بدا أن هناك خطًا واضحًا إلى حد ما بين ما بدا أنه أفق الأرض والغلاف الجوي. بدا أن مرشح خط الرؤية المرجع
Wir haben j
E che ne dite, ap
C'è un cratere molto scuro nel materiale di riempimento di questa valle di fro
Roger, Tranquility. And this baked appearance that you described, at least the suggestion is that it was due to the heat of the engine at any rate. Next subject, did 
أورورا سفن، استخدمي إطلاق بالون
Il casco e i guanti si trovano nella borsa del portello, la grande
И в
Fred, 
نعم. أتذكر أنني بدأتُ في البداية من الجانب المقطوع من المنطقة التي كانت كاميرا التلفزيون مُصوّبة عليها، وأخذتُ عددًا من عينات الصخور على السطح، وبعضها الآخر تحت السطح مباشرةً - على بُعد حوالي 20-15 إلى 20 قدمًا شمالًا. ثم تذكرتُ أن تلك المنطقة ربما تكون قد جرفتها عوادم محرك الهبوط جيدًا، لذا عبرتُ إلى الجانب الجنوبي من المنطقة، وأخذتُ عددًا من العينات من المنطقة المحيطة بالفوهة المزدوجة الطويلة التي علّقنا عليها، وعدة عينات أخرى أبعد من ذلك، وحاولتُ أخذ أكبر عدد ممكن من أنواع الصخور المختلفة التي استطعتُ رؤيتها بالعين المجردة في الوقت القصير المتاح لنا. كان هناك عدد من العينات الأخرى التي رأيتها سابقًا خلال جولتنا حول المنطقة، وكنتُ آمل أن أعود وألتقطها وأضعها في العينة الموثقة،
Хорошо, мы снова подключаем Вэнса
알겠습니다. 스로틀 점검을 하
了解です。はい。EC
ハワイ・キャップ・コム、シグマ・セブン。ハワイ・キャッ
This is Jim, Mike. Backup crew is still standing by. I ju
HF
I'm going to leave this thing ope
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴 관제탑. 옴니 찰리를 선
واحد فقط في المنتصف. سأحصل على التسمية الصحيحة من الطبيب. انتظر. يُسمى تخطيط القلب الكه
――そして彼はおいしいオレンジドリンクを飲みます。オレンジドリンクを飲んでいると言った方がいいかもしれま
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。テレビの更新についてですが、飛行計画の時刻にテレビを開始し、停止時間を数分延長することを提案します。現在、停止予定時刻は で、ターミネーター（約 ）までテレビをオンにしておきたいと考えています。
Roger. GET B 1 34 37; Delta-V, 2,9; durée de combustion, 0 + 05; lacet 0, tangage 0; adresse 25, 90029
Sto g
Lascia che lo metta qui. Portalo giù. Qui. Me
我们当时也在寻找猫爪，心想我们可能已经越过大V字
Bien sûr. Comme des trappes?... si vous prenez le temps
Роджер. Возможно, вам не придётся это распаковывать. Местоположение, которое я только что вам указал, находится немного западнее Западного кратера. Думаю, примерно в двух десятых километра к западу от него, и нам интересно, заметили ли Нил или Базз какие-либо дополнительные ориентиры во время спуска, пребывания на Луне или подъёма, которые могли бы подтвердить или опровергнуть это. Нас интересует один момент: если бы вы находились в этом месте, вы бы увидели «Кошачью лапу» во врем
こち
罗杰，弗兰克。如果你们能解释一下你们相对于助推器的位置，就能帮我们解决问题了。换句话说，相对于地球和地球半径，你们是在助推器的上方、下方还是侧面？或者说，助推器相对于你们的具体位置在哪里
Roger. Je n'aurais pas pu 
Ricevuto, ecco. Mi chiedevo solo a che velocità sa
Pretty reasonable already for a sta
Roger. Jims frühere Bemerkungen zur Helligkeit der Sterne am Sternenrand kurz vor Sonnenaufgang haben hier unten großes Interesse geweckt. Wir möchten ihn fragen, ob er, falls er dies noch einmal beobachten kann oder sich daran erinnert, Veränderungen im Erscheinungsbild der Sterne feststellen konnte. Hat er beispielsweise ein Funkeln bemerkt oder eine schmale Aufhellung am Sternenrand innerhal
Et l'un des avantages, J
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Вы немного опоздали. Наш маневр уже начался, поэтому нам потребуется примерно одинаковое количество топлива, чтобы его остановить, независимо от того, где мы остановимся, и мы можем смело продолжать
D'accord. Étape 1; test 1: attendez 5 secondes. 5 secondes. Mode automatique a
जैक, जब मैं पहली बार यहाँ आया था, तो मैंने एक बात गौर की थी कि कमांड मॉड्यूल में सीधे खड़े होकर एक्वेरियस में नीचे जाते समय, दिशा में थोड़ा सा बदलाव होता है, जो कि पानी के टैंक में एक बार अनुभव करने के बाव
Roger. Und was die Temperatur des Quadrocopters angeht – die Obergrenze liegt bei 105 Grad. Sie liegen deutlich darunter. Wir haben das beobachtet, und die Position wird gehalten, wenn auch sehr langsam. Beim Rollen des Raumschiffs scheinen die Temperaturänderungen etwas träge zu sein, aber der Sensor ist nicht eingefroren. Um noch einmal darauf zurückzukommen: Könnten Sie Jim beim nächsten Mal, wenn er an der Optik arbeitet, insbesondere am Zapfen
不，还没。如果我跟你失去联系，我可能会在下一站找回信号。我现在还是手动控制，用的是电传操纵系统
مرحباً يا هيوستن، مرحباً يا هيوستن؛ هذه أبولو 11،
روجر. راجعنا الرسوم البيانية وحصلنا على نفس الإجابة التي حصلت عليها. يبدو أ
Okay. Procedure's coming back in again. Multicopies f
Si e
Roger. Wir haben starke Störungen. Das Mare de Crises liegt vor uns am Horizont, und der dunkle Krater Picard ist in der Mitte zu sehen. Wir befinden uns gerade in der Mond- bzw. Raumschiff-Sonnenuntergangsphase. In diesem Gebiet ist die Sonne erst vor Kurzem aufgegangen. Das Mare, über dem wir uns befinden, wirkt gefleckt, ist aber nicht sehr stark verkratert, muss also relativ jung sein. Dies ist das Mare de la Fruiti, und wir nähern uns einem großen Krater, einem Delta-Randkrater; er weist e
Rog
Hey, you know I knew that White was a time hog, Jim, but I alwa
ヴァンスさん、当社の
好的。我们已经完成了过滤器更
네, 그리고 그는 지구를 유심히 보
روجر. أنا في منتصف الطريق، أستمتع بوقتي. أعتقد أ
Neil, hier ist Houston. Das Sichtfeld ist in Ordnung. Wir möchten Sie bitten, die Kamera etwas weiter na
私たちもそれに同意します、
Jim, se sta
In the beginning, God created the Heaven and the Earth. And the Earth was without form and void, and darkness was upon the face of the deep. And the spirit of God moved upon the face of the waters, and God said, "let there be light." And there was light. And God saw the light and that it
पायलट के लिए जीएमटी 02:17:43 पर आरकेवी मेडिकल डेटा पास संख्या 1। अनुरोध है कि पायलट अधिग्रहण से 3 मिनट पहले तापमान जांच यंत्र अपने मुंह में रखें। साथ ही, रिकवरी क्षेत्र 9-3 से 13-2 और 8-चार्ली से 12-ब्रावो के लिए वॉइस अपडेट भी दें। जीएमटी 02:30:59 पर डी-8 प्रयोग। कमांड पायलट का सोने का समय भी उसी समय शुरू होता है। एमएससी प्रयोग -2 और -3 03:00:00 पर बंद। क
Affirmatif. Sous « Activation et vérification VHF/bande S », supprimez l'étape 1. À l'étape 2, remplacez « DOWN VOICE BAC
Bien, retour à la page 18. Nous continuons ainsi: 30 secondes, 10 secondes, 7 secondes, moins 5 secondes. À « allumage », pas d’allumage, et nous ajouterons ici: « pas d’allumage, bouton START – appuyer; toujours pas d’allumage, C
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Könnten Sie uns 
- - quanto tempo dovrebbe volerci 
अपो
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ وضعية مُحاذاة محور الجسم، باستخدام خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار على الأرض كما فعلنا من
이게 전부입니다, 빌. 더 궁금한 점 
यहां 
Он находится
오디세이, 휴스턴
«Дружба Семь», мы только что про
You're loud and clear, Charli
理解
تخيل أن المكان قد أصبح خالياً قليلاً 
We asked him 
A
네, 맞습니다. 우선 주요 이벤트 시간을 간단히 훑어보고 나서 세부 사항을 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 좋습니다. 진입 인터페이스는 142시간 40분, 즉 약 6시간 30분 전에 시작합니다. 히터 전원을 켜고, CM/ 온도를 확인하고 필요하면 CM/을 예열합니다. 아마도 예열이 필요할 것으로 예상됩니다. 자세한 절차는 나중에 안내해 드리겠습니다. 약 6시간 전에는 이전 중간 점검 때 사용했던 수정된 30분 체크리스트를 사용하여 전원을 켜기 시작합니다. 그리고 약 5시간 전에는 이전처럼 지구 종단면을 사용하여 기체 축 정렬 자세를 취해야 합니다. 그리고 그게 준비되는 대로 -7 단계를 수행할 건데, 현재로서는 초당 약 2피트(약 60cm) 정도의 연소 속도, 즉 약 15초 정도 걸릴 것 같습니다. 지금은 1.5피트(약 3.8m)까지 내려
Кстати, Водолей, мы видим результаты с сейсмометра 12-го. Похоже, твой ускоритель только что достиг Луны, и она немного её раскач
Je n'ai pas bien compris votre dernier message, Fr
Okay. We are at the - the end of th
Roger. Wir verstehen. Wir sind gleich wieder bei Ihnen; bitte warten Sie einen
«Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это Мучеа Кап Ком, экстренная связь. 
Houston, Apollo 8. Nous vous recevons haut et for
D'accord. Nous aimerions que Jack vérifie que les PYROs dans LOGI
Houston, Apollo 8.
Hallo Columbia, Houston. Wir melden uns in etwa 1:30:30 Uhr mit einem kurzen Zwischenstopp, damit wir un
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 마크, 지금 이 순간에도 제 발아래에는 아직 구름이 조금 보이고, 일몰은 정말 아름다웠습니다. 순식간에 져버렸죠. 지평선
Ce n'est pas le vaisseau spatial qui est difficile à pointer, c'est la caméra. Le support est tellement flexible qu'il peut faire sortir la caméra du champ de vision lorsqu'elle est positionnée à trav
Questa trasmissione vi arriva approssimativamente a metà strada tra la Luna e la Terra. Siamo in volo da 31 ore e circa 20 minuti. Mancano meno di 40 ore alla Luna. Potete vedere che Bill ha qui il suo spazzolino da denti. Si è lavato i denti regolarmente. Per mostrarvi come le cose fluttuano in assenza di gravità. Sembra che giochi per gli Astros, per come cerca di catturare quelle cose. Vorrei tanto che potessimo mostrarvi la Terra. È una vista bellissima, con uno sfondo prevalentemente blu e enormi strati di nuvole bianche, in particolare un vortice molto forte vicino al terminatore. Davvero, davvero bellissima. Forse otterremo un po' di aiuto dalle persone a terra e saremo in grado di dissuadere, di dete
Ok, Joe. Ho creato u
E, tra l'altro, puoi usar
モニター上ではF値に関しては良好に見えました。そのため、ゴールドストーンでは問題ないと判
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 aft will be 42. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-1 84 aft will be 56. 2+20. 1+11. 16 08 16. 3+05. 8+53. 33-1 8
هناك
フレッドは今、光学装置を覗いています。これはプラットフォームの位置合わせをするための装置で、フレッドは今、どん​​な外の映像が撮れるか確認するために覗いています。テレビカメラを使って、この光学装置を通して司令船の外側を覗くことができるかもしれません。数分前、最初に入ってきたとき、光学装置を通して司令船の側面ハッチの
Хорошо, Май
Decisamente sotto di me. L'avevo seguito sotto di me da Carnarvon in poi. Fino a Carnarvon l'avevamo tenuto sotto di noi, poi fino all'orizzonte, e poi di nuovo sotto di noi. Sembrava quasi che fosse in un'orbita diversa dalla mia. Aveva un apogeo e un perigeo diversi dai miei. Comunque, ho tentato di avvicinarmi all'alba non appena ho potuto capire dove si trovava. Come ho detto, in quel momento era a un miglio o due davanti a me, sotto di me. Quindi, più cercavo di avvicinarmi, meno guadagnavo terreno. Stavo sparando retr
무체
好的。入轨点
Хорошо. На странице E-9, в шаге 39 внизу проверки пиротехнической цепи, есть шаг, где написано: панель 8, все автоматические выключатели ЗАМКНУТЫ, кроме одного, а затем перечислены пять напечатанных, один из которых был нарисован ручкой перед запуском. Там написано: автоматические выключатели цепи п
Oui M
حسنًا. وقد استعدت
Ok
好的。一些旁观电视行业的人对滤镜有一些想法，想看看他们想尝试哪些新方法。我想把他们的想法读给你们听，让你们思考一下；在接下来的10个小时里，你们可以决定这是否值得一试。基本上，他们想尝试使用一系列不同的
Apollo 8, ok; possiamo rimandare. Probabilmente ci servirà una stima di quando pe
알겠습니다. 우선, 기본적인 원칙은 이 규칙들이 엄격한 제한을 적용하는 모드 I 비상 정지 규칙과 유사해야 한다는 것입니다. 이제 하나씩 설명해 드릴 테니 잘 따라 쓰세요. 좋습니다. 다음 중 하나라도 발생하면 엔진을 정지해야 합니다. 추력 모니터 판독값이 77% 이하인 경우; 추진제 탱크 압력(흡입 압력)이 기체 내부 
好的。继汤米·雅各布斯之后，我们来看看休斯顿当地占星师露比·格雷厄姆的劲爆预测。她说，所有星座都预示着你们的月球之旅即将启程。尼尔很聪明，迈克判断力强，巴兹则擅长解决复杂问题。她还说，尼尔总是乐观向上，乐于助人。尼尔，你还应该拥有“能够感性地解读生活的直觉”，巴兹则非常善于交际，无法忍受孤独，并且拥有出色的批判能力。由于她不知道迈克的出生时间，所以她推测他要么拥有和尼尔
हां, इसमें आग लगी है
Хорошо, Джек. Через несколько минут мы предоставим вам планшет. Сейчас мы получаем данные отслеживания, и хотя мы предполагаем, что изменения по сравнению с вашим предварительным планшетом 
Und da wir die Checkliste so lange durchlesen müssen, sollten wir die Kommunikationsqualität verbessern. Da
हमें हवाई से बधाई मिली! क्या आपने सु
Roger. Und ich habe noch ein paar andere Dinge, Mike. Wir müssen jetzt den Ladevorgang von Batterie B beenden. Außerdem zieht das Wetter an unserem Ziellandepunkt wegen vereinzelter Gewitter auf. Wir wollen nicht in ein Gewitter geraten, deshalb verlegen wir den Zielpunkt nach vorne – Korrektur: nach hinten – auf 1500 Seemeilen, um die Aufwindkontrolle zu gewährleisten. Die neuen Koordinaten sind 13° 19' 
И мне кажется, у вас есть интересные данные о зависимости работы двигателей от уг
오로라 세븐, 무체아 캡콤입니다
أثناء الرحلة، لاحظتُ أن نظام البصريات التلقائي لم يتجه نحو النجم ا
好了，关于月亮就说到
В этот момент у меня опр
是的。那东西的可读性就像，你
Ruby Graham, un'astrologa qui a Houston. Ora controlliamo con 
أبولو 8
मेरे साथ भी यही हाल है। मुझे नहीं पता कि मैं ऊपर हूँ, नीचे हूँ, अगल-बगल हूँ या कुछ और। कम से कम म
D'accor
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, hier spricht Watertown Com 
Houston, sei riuscito a documentare il modo in cui sono stati prelevati i due camp
休斯顿，我觉得这次飞行还不错，虽然我估计实际用油比在模拟器里用得多。掉头的时候——我按了俯仰加速指令开始抬头，然后不知怎么的，当我把手动姿态俯仰指令改回速率指令时，俯仰速率就停了，我只好又按了加速指令，然后误以为是多按了一次前进指令。在这个过程中，我们偏离航线的距离比我预想的要远一些。我估计大概偏离66英尺，估计实际距离在100英尺左右；所以，我估计返航的时候用油比平时多一些。不
로저. 나도 여러 번 시도해 봤어
Наверное, это рекорд? Для 
Roger. We
Okay. We'll just start with business then, I'll give you a summary of your batteries; battery A, we calculate 38.3 am
わかりました。ACが機能していることを確認しましょう。パネル16のINVERTER 2が閉です。CB INVERTER 2も閉です。次に、パネル11のFLIGHT DISPLAYSの下にあるGASTAとCOMMANDERのブレーカーが閉です。さらに、パネル11のAC BUS AのGASTAとCOM
알
Soll ich diesmal die 
제가 광량을 측정해 보
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Запросите и ПРИМИТЕ, и мы вышлем вам вектор состояния и целевую нагрузку для входа. Конец свя
もう一度言ってく
Сейчас на стороне Джима дневной свет, а со своей стороны я всё ещё могу различить некоторые звёзды. Похоже, можно удерживать космический аппарат в таком положении, чтобы одна сторона была тёмной, а другая — дневной. Сторона Джима сейчас определённо находится на дневном свете, 
Привет, Билл, можешь рассказать, через какие углы это прошло? Построенная нами кр
नहीं, ऐसा नहीं है। मुझे लगता है कि हम मिडकोर्स करेक्शन से पहले वॉटर बॉयलर की जाँच करने पर विचार कर रहे हैं। कोल्डसोक प्रक्रिया में भी वॉटर बॉयलर का उपयोग होता है, लेकिन यह प्रवेश से ठीक पहले किया जाएगा जब ये चीज़ें ज़्
좋습니다, 이제 추가 추진기 분
Okay, Jack. We don't want to bug you, but you ought to be thinking - or what your thoug
Okay. Die Erde stand damals bei 62 Grad. Und die Gesamtzeit für die beiden Erdumdrehungen – ich hatte die Erdumdrehung vorher übersehen – betrug 
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Ho le Pleiadi in vista da qui, molto nitide. Ora sto notando alcune di quest
Oui, tout à fait. Nous vous avons mon
D'accord. Support de coude de vo
D'a
Хорошо. Когда вам будет удобно, мы предоставим вам материал, который необходимо бу
Non ci sono 
Ricevuto
지금 저는 MSC-2와 MSC-3가 남대서양 이상 현상을 통과하는 모습을 촬영하기에 아주 좋은 위치에 있습니다. 지금은 태양을 정면으로 바라보며 촬영하고 있어요... 렌즈
Könnten Sie bitte ein besonderes Auge auf den S
You might be interested in knowing, since you are already on the way, that a Houston astrologer, Ruby Graham, says that all the signs are right for your trip to the Moon. She says that Neil is clever, Mike has good judgment, and Buzz can work out intricate problems. She also says Neil
Ricevuto. Se imposti il ​​tuo su ACCETT
わかりました。8番です。地上でちょっとした訓練を行い、テープをダンプして音声部分をヒューストンにタイムリーに持ち帰れるかを確認したいと思います。皆さんのテープをダンプし、地上で持ち帰って聞いてみる手順を訓練します。前回のダンプ後に上書き録音していない限り、既にテープには何かが録音されているはず
Roger. Vor etwa einer Stunde hatten wir hier ein heftiges Gewitter. I
Roger... GET RC 25 15 58; RET 400K, 20 più 15; inversione di inclinazione, 26 più 38; inclinazio
Yes, I know; those numbers don't mean anything. They were 99-som
Roger. On va procéder avec l'accélérateur... vérifie si tu n'as pas 
了解。それにか
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, this is Houston, Hou
로저. 랜딩백은 이미 꺼져 있었습니다. 제가 먼저 확인하고 보고했어요. 레트로매뉴얼도 꺼져 있고, 이제 모든 준비가 끝났습니다.
حسنًا. يبدو أننا ما زلنا على بعد حوالي 80 قدمًا. ولدينا: الضوء الأحمر الرئيسي مُطفأ، والضوء الأخضر ال
Roger: Der
了解です。あと2ステップです。ステップ6、高利得アンテナをこのモードで2秒間オンにしてください。
Ok. 23 metri. Sembra una buona idea. Giù per metà, 6 in ava
不是最终版
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Abbiamo una configurazione i
Roger. I've been reading you for some time. I've tried to contact you on HF with no success. My status is good; the caps
こ
Мы находимся на расстоянии примерно 20 500 миль от Луны. Насколько это согласуется с вашими расчетам
यह 13 है। ह
ठीक है – ईएमएस फ़ंक्शन
À 
D'accord, je.
收到，吉姆。推力
आपको डायरेक्ट
Roger. Comme vous pouvez le constater, je suis un peu maladroit sur le roulis. Pas de problème. Je vais la mettre en position dès que je serai là-haut. OK. Elle est en rentrée atmosphérique pour ce qui est du roulis. OK
Roger. Alarme 120
Okay. Can you tell us anything about the venting, where it is coming from, wh
Roger. Se vuoi sca
इसलिए मैं
没错，阿波罗8号。如果你有空的话，想让我们帮你导出
한 가지 생각해 볼 점이 있습니다. 약 30분 안에 수면 시간 전에 아직 보내지 못한 패드를 생성할 수 있으므로, 원하시면 더 일찍 수면을 취하실 수 있습니다. 하지만 그 작업을 완료하는 데 30분이 걸립니다. 또 한 가지는, 복사할 준비가 되시면 제가 솔로 북 변경 사항을 읽어드릴 수 있습니
ヒューストン、着陸地
حسنًا
Роджер. Вот довольно краткое описа
オーケー、アポロ8号。部屋を見回すと、全てのシステムは極めて良好に見えます。クワッドセンサーによる燃料量の更新情報も取得済みなので、その情報は得られています。酸化剤供給ラインの温度と燃料温度はどちらも華氏73度です。クライオプロファイルはバッテリーAで稼働しており、計算では39.63アンペア時間です。バッテリーBは37.94アンペア時間、バッテリーチャーリーは38.46アンペア時間です。通信装置は、品質と回路マージンにおいて予測を上回る稼働を続けています。その他のシステムも極めて良好に見えま
ठ
제미니 4, 카나리 
روجر: سأنقل 
Okay. Ich habe die Checkliste für die Einfügung 
네, 맞습니다. 우선 주요 이벤트 시간을 간단히 훑어보고 나서 세부 사항을 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 좋습니다. 진입 인터페이스는 142시간 40분, 즉 약 6시간 30분 전에 시작합니다. 히터 전원을 켜고, CM/ 온도를 확인하고 필요하면 CM/을 예열합니다. 아마도 예열이 필요할 것으로 예상됩니다. 자세한 절차는 나중에 안내해 드리겠습니다. 약 6시간 전에는 이전 중간 점검 때 사용했던 수정된 30분 체크리스트를 사용하여 전원을 켜기 시작합니다. 그리고 약 5시간 전에는 이전처럼 지구 종단면을 사용하여 기체 축 정렬 자세를 취해야 합니다. 그리고 그게 준비되는 대로 -7 단계를 수행할 건데, 현재로서는 초당 약 2피트(약 60cm) 정도의 연소 속도, 즉 약 15초 정도 걸릴 것 같습니다. 지금은 1.5피트(약 3.8m)까지 내려갔다고 하니, 안전 범위 내에 있는 것 같습니다. 좋습니다. 그 후, 서비스 모듈 투하 자세로 즉시 기동을 시작할 겁니다. 평소보다 일찍 투하하기 때문에 평면 내 자세를 유지할 겁니다. 평면 이탈은 필요 없고, 원하지도 않습니다. 서비스 모듈은 반경 벡터를 따라 바깥쪽으로 향하게 평면 내 자세를 유지할 겁니다. 그런 다음 사령선 점검 및 실사격을 포함하여 서비스 모듈 투하 준비를 시작하고, 약 4시간 30분 전에 서비스 모듈을 투하할 겁니다. 서비스 모듈을 확보할 때까지 기체를 상승시키고 사진을 몇 장 찍겠지만, 사진 촬영을 위해 기체를 이탈시키는 기동은 하지 않겠습니다. 비행 경로 각도를 망칠 수 있기 때문입니다. 좋습니다. 이제 2시간 정도의 여유 시간이 생겼습니다. 만약 시간이 부족하더라도 체크리스트를 확인하고 사령선 모듈 전원 공급을 준비할 수 있습니다. 사령선 모듈은 2시간 30분 전에 최대 출력으로 가동할 예정입니다. 컴퓨터를 연결하고, 기체를 상승시키고, 상태 벡터를 전송하는 등의 작업을 시작하고, 사령선 모듈 플랫폼을 정렬합니다. 늦어도 1시간 30분쯤, 즉 사령선 모듈
わかりました、ジャック。残りの手順は、この装置を完全稼働させるための宇宙服ループの設定だけです。作業員たちは、君が作業しているキャニスターが7.6ミリメートル水銀柱に達するまで、この作業を保留にしたいと思っています。おそらくあと45分か1時間かかるでしょう。今は4.7ミリメートル水銀柱です。ですから、その間にやってほしいのは、2つ目の司令船キャニスターを、1つ目のキャニスターと同じように、船長のホースを使ってセットアップすることです。準備が整うと、おそらくその頃に切り替えのタイミングになるでしょう。参考までに、これが終わって朝食などを済ませたら、
Okay, I
Ты вер
Bon. Alors, c'est peut-être enregistré, peut-être pas. Ça a duré… je crois qu'on était à 44 minutes du début de la sortie extravéhiculaire. Je regard
네, 맞습니다. 패널 350, 변경 없음. 패널 351, 메인 조절 밸브 2개는 모두 닫힘(C
好的。用十字准星在月球上做标记，十字准星在中心。对
Ricevuto. Sembra che dovrai riposizionare il radar qui. 
أستطيع الوصول إلى 
こんにちは、ケープ・コム・テック。フレンドシップ・セブン。オーバー
알겠습니다. 알
ロ
Esatto. Fai riferimento a S/2-6. Questo - In realtà, Jack, quello di cui stiamo parlando è l'adesivo di controllo dell'integrità del portello. E penso che sarà più facile se 
Hey, Charlie, siehst gut aus! Das w
Houston, Apol
Ja. Ich gehe aber in die
Bien, tout en bas de la vérification d'entrée, 
Да. Этот толчок, должно быть, сдвинул датчик — смотрите теперь — количества кислорода 2. Он колебался в диап
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。終わったら、新しい姿勢で地球をもっとよく見ても
روجر، هل سنحت لك 
Hallo Houston. Hier spricht die Nummer 13
Der letzte Ausfall des Flugzeugs
CB G&N, COMPUTER, MAI
ठीक है, फ्रेड। पृष्ठ 16 पर, 
Houston, bezüglich der hohen Bitrate: Ich würde gerne Folgendes tun – falls Sie die letzte Aufnahme erhalten haben – ich würde sie gerne abspielen, zunächst mit niedriger Bitrate beginnen und dann bei Bedarf auf hohe Bitrate umschalten. Wie wäre d
مكان تثبيته بالمركبة الفضائية. لا يوجد شيء محدد للدفع عليه. الآن، دعونا نرى إن كان بإمكاني الحصول على دفعة جيدة. لو لم يكن معي المدفع، لكان بإمكاني فعل ذلك بشكل أفضل. ببساطة،
ठीक है, बिल। इस बार हम इस संगीत को एक अलग तरह के सिस्टम पर चलाने की कोशिश करेंगे। वॉइस कम्युनिकेशन बनाए रखने के लिए, जब आपको संगीत मिल जाए, तो कृपया हमें कॉल करके बता दें कि आपको संगीत मिल गया है और इसकी आवाज़ कैसी है या कुछ और। अगर मुझे आपका कॉल आता है, तो मैं आपको वापस कॉल करके बता दूंगा। और जब मैं आपसे बात करने लगूंगा, तो हम संगीत का लिंक डाल देंग
We'd like you to think about this control mode, Jim, and see if you think it might work from w
네, 008:00; 델타-VT, 7835; 경도 -1
Ja, da stimme ich zu. Aber wir haben beschlossen, sicherheitshalber alles in einwandfreiem Zustand zu entfernen, falls es irgendwelche Probleme geben sollte. Und i
好
Переключение передач прошло нормально, Майк
ENTERキーです。MODE 
031 إلى الأمام. هل كان 
但你还是回到你那边去吧。不过我第一
Роджер. Командование воздушного сообщения Гавайев находится в режиме ожид
Roger. Wir rufen dich 
Непло
Roger. On ne distingue pas grand-chose ici non plus, à l'horizon. Nous approchons maintenant des cratères See et Bas
ठीक है। और जिम क
حسنًا. سنمضي قدمًا في الإجراء كما لو لم يكن هناك أي انخفاض في
휴스턴 여러분, 다음은 집에 계신 아이들, 아니, 세상 모든 아이들을 위한 간단한 시범입니다. 숟가락으로 물을 어떻게 마시는지 보여드리려고 했는
…
The light band of stars seem to - the stars right around the Southern C
휴스턴, 제미니 4호. 읽기 스위치를 잠시 켜
もっと練習が必要
Roger
Roger. Ho attraccato in modalità AUTO e, come ho detto, non ero molto sicuro del momento del contatto. Ho continuato a controllare gli indicatori della sonda di attracco. Ho visto due pali di barbiere che indicavano che i tre fermi di cattura - non fermi di cattura, ma i tre... fermi - si erano attivati, e avevamo effettuato un attracco morbido. E in quel momento la situazione sembrava molto stabile. Così, sono passato alla modalità FREE, ho guardato fuori dal finestrino e sembrava ancora stabile; e ho acceso la bombola principale 2. E in quel momento, è iniziata una rotazione tra i due veicoli, non so bene a cosa. Forse la spinta o forse si stava accumulando prima, e non me ne ero accorto. Comunque, durante la RETRACT della sonda, ci sono state delle imbardate - le mie escursioni di imbardata di, direi, circa 15 gradi, e ho dovuto tornare indietro, prendere l'interruttore FREE e riportarlo in modalità AUTO, cercando di smorzarle; e immagino che Neil stesse facendo lo stesso. Lascerò che sia lui a raccontarvi la sua versione dei fatti. E pensavo che non saremmo riusciti a ottenere un RETRACT e un attracco rigido. Tuttavia, dopo circa - oh, credo 6 o 8 secondi, ho sentito - h
D'accord. Maintenant, je voudrais vérifier que, sous
And Vance, on that pi
J'ai la lune en vue. Voilà Vénus. La lune suit parfaitement sa trajectoire. Parfaitement alignée en lacet, en tangage e
Roger. Je faisais juste quelques enregistrements. La seule chose inhabituelle que j'ai remarquée est une couche de brume assez haute, à environ 7 ou 8 degrés au-dessus de l'horizon, côté nuit. Je peux voir les étoiles à travers, car elles descendent
Roge
了解しました。燃料圧力は167、補助圧力は163です。燃焼開始時に燃料補助圧力に関する一時的な警告が作動する可能性はあるでしょうか？加圧する機会
Gemini 4, Carn
11. Houston. Die aktuelle Vorhersage zeigt akzeptable Bedingungen in Ihrem Erholungsgebiet: vereinzelt Schneefall in 600 Metern Höhe, vereinzelt auch in höheren Lagen, Wind aus 70 Grad, 13 Knoten, Sichtweite 16 Kilometer und Seegang etwa 1,2 Meter. Die gestrige Vorhersage zeigte einen Tropensturm namens Claudia, etwa 800 bis 1600 Kilometer östlich von Hawaii. Die gestern Nachmittag aufgenommenen Satellitenbilder zeigten jedoch, dass sich Claudia auflöst, sodass dieser Sturm nun eine noch geringere Rolle zu spielen scheint als zuvor. Ihr Erholungsgebiet befindet sich nun vermutlich etwas nördlich der innertropischen Konvergenzzone, die Sie wahrscheinlich von Ihren Fens
Bereitmachen. Eagle, Houston.
レーダーによる確認では
안녕하세요. 오늘 저는 아폴로 11호 임무의 상징적인 측면 몇 가지를 여러분과 나누고자 합니다. 지난 2~3일 동안 우주선 안에서 일어난 일들을 논의해 본 결과, 이번 임무는 단순히 세 사람이 달에 간 것 이상의 의미를 지닌다는 결론에 도달했습니다. 정부와 산업계의 협력팀의 노력 그 이상이며, 심지
जेम
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. سنبدأ الإقلاع حوالي
Okay. Ich habe gerade die Erdhelligkeit gemessen, Houston. Sie beträgt 320 Lumen. Die Erde zeigt jetzt 320 Lumen an. Wenn du Jim Lovell mal aus der Nähe fotografieren könntest, Bill, könntest du allen zeigen, dass er uns im Bartwettbewerb schon längst abgehängt hat. Jim hat schon ein
すべて順調です。キャビンの圧力が抜けて、ハッチを開けるのに
Je s
चित्र के नीचे वाले हि
Apollo 8, hier 
Роджер. Понятно, что время получения сигнала (GET) — 03.07; GET R = 248 морских миль; GET точки сближения — 03.15; азимут — 0 градусов; угол места — 
और साथ ही, जितनी जल्दी हो सके रेट्रो एटीट
Roger. Ho seguito parte della tua conversazione alle Canarie e ho sentito i tuoi commenti sul meteo in Africa. Puoi darci un resoconto della situazione? Pass
总
روجر. لم نتمكن من تحميل جميع بيانات مراقبة العمليات الإحصائية بشكل صحيح فوق هاواي، ونريد إنهاء تحميل بي
はい、13番。こちらはヒューストンです。G&Cチェックリストのピンクの
アポロ8号、ヒューストン
Jack, tu es dans l'ombre en ce moment; nous avons un peu d'interférences à cause de 
Okay, Vance. Stai dicendo che dovremmo iniziare con la PREP nel manuale di emergenza a circa, e ne parlerò tra un minuto con Jim e poi ti risponderemo. Quando siamo in assetto di accensione, dovremmo vedere il Sole proprio in cima, e presumo che questo sia il fermo numero 2. Jim e io ne avevamo già parlato, e osservando il terminatore sulla Terra, abbiamo calcolato che il Sole si trovasse a un angolo di circa 70-65 gradi, quindi sarà proprio lì. Abbiamo una regola di accensione che dice che se le velocità sono superiori a 10 gradi al secondo, bisogna spegnerlo. E, dopo aver regolato, vuoi che lasci 470 per un p
收到。我明白了——用六分仪跟踪比用扫描望远镜更容易；它能提供更精细的控制，之后再说一
Roger. 28570 250 28401 42 0641 296, non applicabile tre 
روجر. لقد كنا نعمل على افتراض أن الأمر سيستغرق حوالي ساعة حتى يتلاشى التشويش الناتج عن مصب مياه الصرف الصحي إلى الحد الذي يسمح لك برصد النجوم بشكل معقول لتح
Ну что ж, давайте начнём. ОСНОВНОЙ, ОСНОВНОЙ, ВЫСОКИЙ, ГОЛОС, (кашель) PCM, ДИАПАЗОН, ВНИЗ, ГОЛОСОВОЕ РЕЗЕРВНОЕ КОПИРОВАНИЕ, AUX TAPE, ВЫКЛ; ТЕЛЕМЕТРИЯ в ДАННЫЕ; и ВВЕРХ, КОМАНДА ВРЕМЕНИ в НОРМАЛЬНЫЙ; VHF A и B, ВЫКЛ; ТОЛЬКО ПРИЁМ,...; PCM/АНАЛОГОВЫЙ, ЗАПИСЬ, ПЕРЕДАЧА, НОРМАЛЬНЫЙ, НОРМАЛЬНЫЙ - всё в порядке, НИЗКИЙ - ОСНОВНОЙ, ПРИЁМ и УЗКИ
Поворот по рысканию незначительный, примерно ½ градуса в секунду, вывести самолет из строя практически невозможно, не перелетев на нем. Похоже, сейчас самое время подготовиться к проверке КВ-связи. Переключаем VOX в режим "нажми и говори
D'accord, Houston. La Lune est essentiellement grise, sans couleur; elle ressemble à du plâtre ou à une sorte de sable grisâtre et profond. On d
우리가 정말로 하려는 것은 창문을 통해 지구가 들어오는 것을 볼 때, 그 움직임을 멈추고 지구를 창문에 담아둘 수 있도록 자세를 잡는 것입니다. 29페이지의 "PRESS" 아래에 있는 세 단계를 모두 지우세요. 30페이지의 "PRESS" 아래에 있는 4단계를 지우세요. 
لم نتمكن من التقاط صورة لك لأنن
Okay. Sometime when you get two
Roger. Inizieremo con le notizie dal mondo. Elogi per gli astronauti americani dell'Apollo 8 e speranze di cooperazione internazionale nell'esplorazione spaziale, con i messaggi della vigilia di Natale in tutto il mondo, mentre la piccola astronave orbitava attorno alla Luna. Persino nel mondo comunista, c'era entusiasmo per il primo viaggio dell'uomo sulla Luna. A Mosca, lo scienziato sovietico Anatoly Besaranov ricordò che il suo Paese e gli Stati Uniti avevano già condiviso le conoscenze spaziali e predisse che il volo dell'Apollo 8 avrebbe portato a una maggiore cooperazione. A Cuba, Radio Avana ritrasmise il programma Voice of America per raccontare agli ascoltatori il discorso dell'Apollo 8. I funzionari di Voice affermarono che era la prima volta che un programma delle agenzie statunitensi veniva trasmesso dalla radio dell'Avana. La Cecoslovacchia vide il volo sulla Luna attraverso un'ampia copertura televisiva; e a Budapest, in Ungheria, la gente non parla d'altro sui treni e sugli autobus. Nel mondo non comunista, impiegati e acquirenti natalizi trattennero il fiato mentre la navicella spaziale veniva preparata per il lancio verso la Terra. I francesi per strada hanno elogiato il know-how americano e l'impresa spaziale, e alcuni spettatori che guardano le foto lunari in TV esultano "Magnifique!". A Londra, orde di acquirenti natalizi si sono accalcate nei negozi e nei pub per guardare le foto televisive dei crateri lunari. Il più importante astronomo spaziale britannico, Bernard Lovell, che fino a poche settimane fa aveva criticato il progetto Apollo 8 sostenendo che gli strumenti avrebbero potuto svolgere il compito senza mettere a rischio la vita degli astronauti, ha chiarito di essere profondamente impressionato dal volo lunare. Papa Paolo VI ha reso omaggio a quei pionieri dell'estensione dell'intelletto e dell'attività umana. Ci sono stati solo pochi avanzi che hanno "sminuito" il viaggio di Natale, tuttavia. Il più noto è stato Samuel Sh
C'est une excellente affaire. Merci à tous. J'ai une rondelle ici. J'ai récupéré une rondelle et un petit morceau de métal, et ça ressemble à 
D'accord, Joe; Verseau
يبدو أن فيه ش
Хорошо, Фред-о. Хорошо. Это "Ввод, подготовка". Начинается за 6 часо
今度は雪の結晶のように見えた小さな物体が、カプセルか
Roger. Hi
好的。第二步：“平衡耦合器，关闭；死区，最小；姿态控制：俯仰和横滚设置为脉
알겠습니다. 수신했습니다. 새로운 궤도 종료 시간, 임무 
روجر. الجو مظلم قليلاً الآن
하나
짐은 
わかった。まだついて来
هيوستن كاب كوم، ج
잭, 거기 온도 어때? 따뜻하게 지내려고 장작
Oui, bien s
Gemini VIII, RKV CA
جيميني 4،
Je n'y suis pas encore. Je dirais environ 25 à 30 degrés. Je stoppe le lacet pour l'instant. Le périscope vérifie la visée avec la fenêtre et le réticule, et je vais bientôt faire un repère pour essayer de stabiliser tous les mouvements. Je suis presque en position rétrograde, et le lacet semble très net. Je vais m'éloigner un peu pour vérifier. Il y a environ 1 degré de lacet à droite – MARK.T. OK, je suis satisfait de ce contrôle de
انتظر يا باز، سأخبرك بالجديد
ठीक है... हम कमांड मॉड्यूल को प्रवेश के लिए सही ढंग से
Vance, Joe ha sollevato la questione dell'a
أستراليا، كلنا مستعدون لذلك و... سواء في المحطة ليلاً أو نها
Das ist 
Plus près de chez nous, à Memphis, dans le Tennessee, une petite fille
제 생각에는 저희는 9번으로 응답했던 것 같습니다. S-II에서 5번 표시등이 켜진 시점이 대략 그때였던 것 같은데, 일반적인 S-IV 연소 시 발생하는 고주파 진동과는 다른 확실한 
Gemini 4, this i
了解。ジョン、カットオフは素晴らし
Oka
D'accord. Vous avez presque atteint la limite avec le gain élevé. Vous pouvez essayer de l'enregistrer, mais la limite de balayage sera atteinte à tout
지
*** 제가 하겠습니다
حو
– Und wenn Sie diese dann in einer Reihe ausrichten, befindet sich Ihr Auge dann in der richtigen Positio
5시간 빼주세요. 중간 과정 7, 필요시. 입학 전 절차. 그리고 프레드, 입학 전
Okay. From Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Britain's big Jodrell Bank radio telescope stopped receiving signals from the Soviet Union's unmanned Moon shot at 5:49 EDT today. A spokesman said that it appeared the Luna 15 space ship "had gone beyond the Moon." Another Quote: "We don't think it has landed," said a spokesman for Sir Bernard Lovell, Director of the Observatory. Washington UPI: Vice President Spiro T. Agnew has called for putting a man on Mars by the year 2000, but Democratic leaders replied that priority must go to needs on Earth. Agnew, ranking government official at the Apollo 11 blastoff Wednesday, apparently was speaking for himself and not necessarily for the Nixon administration when he said, "We should, in my judgment, put a man on Mars by the end of this century." Laredo, Texas,
Con questa posizione si ha sicuramente l'illusione di guardare in alto, e se non c'è orizzonte, è solo un cielo nero. La quantità di luce nella cabina di pilotaggio è piuttosto elevata. Una volta che ci si è adattati, può essere ridotta, ovviamente, dalla luce della cabina. A questo punto, sono un po' riluttante a ridurre il livello di luce qui dentro, a causa del problema con il circuito della tuta. Sto usando liberamente le mie luci a portata di dita. Si è osservato che nei voli futuri dovremo avere un dispositivo di raccolta in cui poter infilare oggetti e tenerli intrappolati lì per un certo periodo di tempo. Sto insistendo sul problema della rondella e del piccolo pezzo di metallo piegato. Credo di essere finalmente riuscito a infilarli nella piccola borsa sul portello. La temperatura della tuta si mantiene da sola. Ho caldo e probabilmente dovrò abbassare l'impostazione. Sono sicuro di non capire perché il circuito 
Хорошо.
Okay, 8. Wir haben gerade eine Rück
Oh, sì, certo che 
حسنًا، أبولو
س
是的，我正在拉
Роджер. Эта тема привлекает много внимания, и позвольте мне попытаться получить какие-н
No, non possiamo, non sap
انتظر يا فرانك، سنبحث عنه. وبينما نحن نبحث عنه، بالنسب
Здравствуйте, Com Tech. Friendship Se
Okay. I think it would be better if you got your checklist out on 97, and we could walk you through it, 
13, ré
Jack, das war's. Falls du noch Fragen hast, warum, hoffen al
Ich wusste, sie würden mi
È molto interessante notare che il mio assetto, e il... è all'incirca di beccheggio più 30 gradi, rollio a destra di 130 gradi e imbardata a sinistra di 20 gradi. Il pallon
分かりました。そうし
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 승무원 수면 
Здравствуйте, командование ВВС Гавайев. Это 
D'accord. Actuellement, les vitesses de rotation du vaisseau spatial sont d'environ 1 degré/seconde en tan
好的。这是+90度的垫子。/G&N，63825，-1.54，+1.32，-0491.7，+0000.1，+6634.0，180，228，001；HA为N/A；HP为+0017.9；6652.2，37，6626.5，26，155.4，15.7。瞄准星是人马座ζ星；上，08.0；右，2.1；-22.81，-025.00，1140.7，34087，32
अपोलो 11, ह्य
Right. Okay. Next for th
Я надет на биконус, козырек закрыт. Все остальные
Cabin steam vent is 10; suit steam vent is 62. I would like to have a little bit more pad on the temperature, but I can't seem to get it. The suit temperature is 60 [degrees]; the cabin temperature continues at 102 [degrees]. I have 22 minutes an
아니요, 거기 없어요. 제 허리
А если вам пот
D'accord. Je vais activer le RCS et désa
네, 11. 휴스턴입니다. 알겠습니다. EECOMM은 당신이 준비되는 대로 논리 순서 확인을 위해 이 중요한 순간을 간절히
Roger. Okay, Jim, we decided that you've got a little bit of fuel left that we can play with here in the Flight Plan. We would like for you to go to the Horizon Scan Mode for the next 8 hours. That's at 30, and we want you to use the Primary Scanner. We don't want you to do any controlling in yaw, and if the scanner breaks lock, don't control in rol
Okay. I am in auto mode at this point. Everything is acting perfectly. The maneuver switch is off. The systems are all green. I'm practically using no auto fuel. My only problem area is the suit circuit, which I am 
Ricevuto. Capisco; ma quando passeremo ad un bit rate elevato, vuoi essere in
待機してくだ
ठीक है, जैक। जैसा मैंने पढ़ा, एलएमपी को लगभग 6 घंटे सोना है। इस दौरान सीडीआर और सीएमपी को कुछ खाने की कोशिश करनी चाहिए। मुझे 69 बजे जागना है। सीडीआर और सीएमपी 70 बजे सोएंगे और 76 बजे जागेंगे। और हमें अपना काम 76 बजे या उसके आसपास करने की योजना बनानी चाहिए। 78:30 बजे, हम एक
Сигма Семь
네, 아주 잘 돌아가
Roger, Houston. Ti leggo forte
Merci. 179 009 001, non appli
ठीक है। समय यह है - कार्यक्रम इस सम
アポロ11号、こちらヒ
GMTRC 17 56 03. 7+
Ich glaube, sie alle fin
You can get one of t
Ok, Jack. Sul pannello 3, CARICABATTERIE, spento, INVERTER CA 2, spento; sul pannello 5, 
قم بتسجيل قراءة مقياس ال
Jerry, 
حسنًا يا بيل. سيكون هذا في الصفحة 2، القسم 22 من خطة رحلتك. بالنسبة لقائد وحدة القيادة - لقد ذكرت ذلك له بالفعل - ولكن في أعلى الصفحة، في الواقع، نود منه أن يقوم بمحاذاة النجوم الأربعة، بروكيون، ريجولوس، ألفارد، وندرك أن ألفارد قد لا يكون نجم
Aquarius, Houston. We notice that the O2 pressure i
Columbia et Eagle, Houston. Environ 5 minutes. Votre temps de vol sera de 131 minutes plus 52 minutes. J'
ह्यूस्टन। अप
没错，弗
मैं नीचे देखकर पता लगा लेता हूँ कि तुम लोगों ने कुछ बत्तियाँ जला रखी
この方向を向いていると、側面の窓から太陽が流れていくのが見えます。そしてもちろん、今、窓の一つからは地球が見えます。そして、私の窓のすぐ後ろには、もちろん太陽があります。太陽が私たちの星図を照らしているからです。この線は黄道面を表し、これらの線、つまり垂直線は、宇宙船が現在使用している基準系を表しています。私たちが月に近づくにつれて、月は徐々に大きくなり、最終的には、私たち
Ok, arriviamo a O2
了解しました。マイク、少し前にあなたが をいじっていた時、デッドバンドを縮小したのですが、デッドバンドはその時の新しい姿勢を中心にしていると思い込んでいました。それ以来、ピッチとヨーの両方でその姿勢から数度ずれてしまったので、先ほどあなたに指示した手順、つまり「ACCEL COMMAND」に切り替え、「AUTO SELECT」スイッチをすべてオンにしてから「
Bien, 11. Tout d'abord, nos vérifications système se sont déroulées sans problème. Je tiens toutefois à vous rappeler que demain, il est possible que le voyant de pression d'ascension s'al
A pensarci bene,
好的。这是可选的。我们之前写第-1A页的方式，那都
Okay, Jim. Auf dem
Can you stand by just a second on that? At the present time we cannot confirm it OFF. We saw a current drop indicating tha
과이마스 캡 콤입니다. 월리
好的。他们说我刚才讲的这一步有点复杂。你最好提前按照我
罗杰。我们这里没热，如果你担心的是这
Durante il retrofire, utilizzare entrambi gli anelli. Dopo il retrofire, disattivare l'anello B e non utilizzarlo, utilizzare solo l'anello A, a meno
11番。今回のミッションにおけるこれまでの2回の燃焼におけるエンジン性能は、エンジン受入試験時と同じでした。搭載
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir w
Okay, Hous
कानो, ये ऑरोरा सेवन है। मैं तुम्हारी आवाज़ साफ़-साफ़ सुन पा 
Voglio dire, il... voglio dire, l'intero... voglio dire, il consumo di carburante sarebbe stato molto più alto di quanto avessi immaginato, capisci? Pensavo di poter eguagliare il simulato
Roger, Houston. L'Aigle
Ricevuto. Forse ti interesserà sapere che il finestrino centrale è parecchio appannato, ma gli altri quattro sembrano e
好的，阿波罗8号。我第一个看到的是
Ok, Jac
Okay. In den letzten drei Reihen befinden sich die Schutzschalter für Hochwasser und Gleis (Reihe 2, offen); Logikstromversorgung B, offen; Triebwerksüberbrückung (Sinken), offen; Anzug-Durchflusskontrolle, offen. In der dritten Reihe befindet sich das Display (offen); VHF A und VHF A Sender, offen; VHF B Empfänger,
मुझे लगता है तु
Roger. G&N: 62710, plus 098, moins 019, 077 46 2248, plus 32148, moins 00455, moins 10377, NA, 307, Vega et Deneb, 243 183 012, pas de cale, site d
Ро
روجر، فهمت أنك لم تقم بنسخنا أثناء أد
ええと、グラウンドは51.5、私たちも51.5。そう。
很好。
ここでお手伝いしま
We concur there. We still don't have any good ideas o
알겠습니다. 골드스톤에서 들어올 겁니다, 버즈. 
عند هذه النقطة، لدينا معدل انحراف يمين بمقدار درجة واحدة في الثانية، ومعدل ميل صفري في الثانية، ومعدل دوران يساري بم
Eh bien, j'ai confiance dans la trappe, du moment qu'elle s'installe et se verrouille sans problème; je ne vois pas pourquoi nous aurions besoin de combinaisons, et u
Jack, c'est ce que nous voulons obtenir au final, c'est 1,5 à 2 pouces dans ce tunnel, en fonctio
Joe, it appears that the best detent possibly to put the stars in the, would be either number 2 or 4. The rendezvous radar antenna is
Another one of the
Okay. I've got some details on the flight plan for you as follows. Of course, since there's no -3 you'll be deleting all the midcourse 3 stuff including the - the, which is called out at about 54-1/2, and we'll be slipping that until later, which I'll - which I'll tell - which I'll tell - which I'll tell you in a minute. Okay. Then you - we want to move the battery charge up 3 hours to about. And we want to move the - moving the tunnel vent valve to / DELTA-P up 3 hours to, and at that point you can simply go to the 57-hour point in the flight plan and change your number from 57 hours to 54 hours and start through that. In the remarks section at about it says, "O2 fuel cell purge and waste water dump," here. If not performed ear
네. 연소는 예정된 시간인 125 19 3470에 진행되었고, 연소 속도는 초당 51.5피트가 저희가 설정한 값입니다. 잔차
11, Houston. Nelle ultime due ore abbiamo visto un leggero aumento continuo della pressione parziale di CO2. Avete già sostituito la bombola di CO2 stamattina? Non è necessario farlo subito; vorremmo solo confermarlo tramite la nostra strumentazione: è in buone condi
Okay, Apollo 8. We're ready to go into the COMM check now, and it's your option. We can call out switches and let you position them, or we can command it from the ground. In either event, there will be a 
Eh bien,
吉姆，这足够进行两次触地复
15 度のオフセット姿勢を超えたようですので、ピッチとヨーで姿勢 HOLD
هذه هي المرة ا
नमस्
ジム、私は 63 と 64 をコピーしました。これは降下 1
他にも情報があります。軌道に関する情報は2時間ほど得られないはずです。燃焼状態は非常に良好だったように見えますが、現在詳細に調査中で、2時間後に結果をお知らせします。もう一つ予想しているのは、SHeタンクが爆発限界に達することです。最も早い予測時刻は107時間後、約25分後です。最も遅い予測時刻は110時間後です。これは非推進性
Я говорю, на этот раз я не вижу в сторону Австралии — она ориентирована вверх, к звездам — я получил от ва
Так. При таком низком положении солнца коричневого цвета нет и следа, он снова приобрел очень серый оттенок и, как говорит восьмерка членов экипажа, при таком угле наклона солнца он выгляд
Да уж, довольно масштабное дело, правда? Ладно, 
ठीक है। मु
收到。请问2号区域
아폴로 
Okay. Ich bin auf Panel 9. Empfangsbereit. Soll ich aus irgendeine
La
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, कैलिफोर्निया कैप कॉम। जॉन, मैंने आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप 
आप काफी अच्छा प्रदर्शन कर 
Ok, Houston. Basandomi sulla soluzione con MA meno, ho ottenuto una longitudine d'impatto di -160,95. L'ho modificata per ottenere una latitudine-longitudine d'impatto di 163,75. Volevo spostare il punto d'impatto di 30 gradi a est e ho cercato di determinare quali sarebbero stati i parametri di combustione per farlo, e ho ottenuto una combus
I took an S-5 picture of a cloud formation over the Pacific coming on the Coastal Sentry Quebec area at 00 using f/11 at 150. It was frame no. 28. I'm taking several pictures for S-5. I'm right in the area of the tropical storm Carla. It's very heavily overcast right now. I'll take a few of the cloud formations. They have some very interesting formations interlaced on the top of them. Perhaps the camera will pick them up. It's so bright I'm going to shoot 250 at 16. Those will be frames 28, 29, and I'll be shooting at least two more. Those will be 30 and 31. I should be passing righ
자
这是友谊七号。胶囊再次进入定向模式。我已经手动接管，目前正
航天器
ああ。いいえ。ラジオを外してないんです。つけっぱ
نعم. هذا تأكيد. كل
И, 13, Хьюстон. В качестве последнего предложения, мы хотели бы попросить вас включить вентиляторы во втором танке. Конец с
यह तो प्लेन
D
Und, Tranquility Base, das Weiße Team verabschiedet sich jetzt und üb
حسنًا، بدء فحص محاذاة الطائرة. ناقص 10 درجات في الميل، و10 درجات في الانعراج، و10 درجات في الدوران. سأقوم بفحص المحاذاة، مع توجيه الطرف الصغير للأمام، مع الحفاظ على وضعية الطائ
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। नियंत्रण प्रणाली के संचालन पर 
ここのCO2濃度計は0.2を示しており、皆大
मॉस्को में, अंतरिक्ष इंजीनियर अनाटोल कोरिट्स्की ने TASS को बताया कि लूना 15 वह सब कुछ कर सकता है जो पहले के लूना अंतरिक्ष यानों द्वारा किया जा चुका है। प्रेस ने इसका यह अर्थ निकाल
제가 아까 구름층 지평선이라고 잘못 말했던 것 같습니다. 확실히 지면 지평선
Roger.
Das ist Freundschaft Sieben. Es driftet etwa 20° nach rechts und erhält dann eine
Вероятно, это будет проверка с помощью секстанта, Джим. Всё действительно зависит от того, насколько хорошей окажется платформа, которую мы получим. А мы ожидаем, что она будет вполне доста
We can start
Okay. Der Vorschlag, der vielversprechend klingt, ist folgender: Wenn Jim seine Auswertung durch das Teleskop durchführt, machen Sie alles genau gleich, nur dass Sie sich um 180
ठीक है। आगे बढ़ने के लिए - उसी पैनल, पैनल 5 पर: सर्किट ब्रेकर, बैटरी चार्जर, एसी पावर, बंद; सर्किट ब्रेकर बैटरी चार्जर, बैटरी चार्ज, बंद; सर्किट ब्रेकर इन्वर्टर कंट्रोल 2, बंद; सर्किट ब्रेकर इन्वर्टर कंट्रोल 3, बंद; आपके लिए एक स्विच है, मेन बस टाई, बैटरी एसी, बंद; और एक और स्विच, बैटरी चार्ज से ए
好的。面板 5：断路器 EPS SENSOR SIGNAL、AC 1 和 2
Relay A
Roger. 027 44 5363, moins 165 0
Ro
로
알겠습니다. 15:57, 01:
Ok. La mia procedura, ora, dopo il modulo di servizio JETT sarà quella di inclinarmi verso l'alto, per cercare di fa
分かりました、
收到。这是车载定量读数。我这边
Ok. Ottima idea. Siamo... è... Abbiamo riflettuto a lungo sul tipo di manovre da consentirvi di fotografare, intendo il modulo di servizio. Lo consideriamo una priorità piuttosto bassa; la sensazione è che sarà davvero 
Последний номер, который вы мне зачит
Okay. Frank sagte, er würde sich auf den
Да, слишком высоко. Я никак не смогу его поднять, если не направишь на
Okay. Ora, se mi lasci la macchina fotografica, Ji
नहीं। यहाँ सब कुछ बढ़िया चल रहा है। लगता है मुझे छह के लिए प्रतिबद्ध
Houston, qui 
Houston, Apollo 
Мы сообщим вам о результатах окончательной регулировки высоты над Гавайями. Также просим вас проверить ось X... Она немного выходит за пред
Хорошо. 47 футов/сек и 1+18 при стрельбе вперед. 120 футов/сек и 2+31 при стрельбе назад, при 
GET of the burn 2 17 59; Delta-V, 63.4; burn time, 1 plus 20; yaw 0, pitch 0; Core 25, 00634; Cores 26 and 27, all zeros
ठ
Bien. Nous sommes de retour à bord du vaisse
Ok. Non l'abbiamo rimosso dal suo alloggiamento. L'abbi
Friendship Seven, this is Woomer
Okay. Jack, right now we're told that it's closer to 6, and - But they would like to track it some more. Looks like your next midcourse will be in the order of 2 to 3 foot pe
It's not bad enough not finding the right landing
Non, je vais simplement leur dire que cet entraînement a porté ses fruits. On a réussi à fermer l'écouti
好的。燃烧规则。如果推力监测器读数低于或等于 77%
E tornando a Washington, la Commissione per i Modi e i Mezzi della Camera ha approvato modifiche fiscali che riguardano compagnie petrolifere, banche e servizi pubblici, che potrebbero aggiungere quasi 2 miliardi all'anno alle entrate federali. E, sempre oggi, la NASA ha annunciato che lancerà un grande laboratorio orbitale nel 1972, con una versione ridotta del Saturn V. E le tue immagini televisive hanno suscitato molto interesse. 
Okay, 8. Wir haben gerade eine Rückmeldung zu den Testmustern erhalten. Wir hatten 25 Testmuster für Bodentests, die wir uns angesehen haben. Fünf weitere sind für Flugtests vorgesehen. Der einzige Unterschied besteht darin, dass die Flugmuster Anweisungen enthalten. Wenn wir uns also Testmuster
休斯顿，阿波
ठीक है, जैक। अब बचे हुए चरण बस सूट-लूप कॉन्फ़िगरेशन के चरण हैं ताकि इसे पूरी तरह से चालू किया जा सके, और हमारे लोग इसे तब तक रोक कर रखना चाहते हैं जब तक कि जिस कैनिस्टर पर आप काम कर रहे हैं उसका तापमान 7.6 मिलीमीटर मरकरी तक न पहुँच जाए, जिसमें शायद 45 मिनट या एक घंटा और लगेगा - अभी हम 4.7 पढ़ रहे हैं। तो इस बीच हम चाहते हैं कि आप दूसरे कमांड मॉड्यूल कैनिस्टर को उसी तरह सेट करें जैसे आपने पहले वाले को किया था, कमांडर की नली का उपयोग करके, और इसे पूरी तरह से तैयार कर लें और शायद तब तक स
좋습니다, 쌍둥이자리 4번. 혈압은 측정했습니다
Das ist 52. 52 soll
Ehi, per
روجر. نطلب تخفيض معدل تصريف مياه الصرف الصحي من 25 إلى 30% إلى 25%، وإليكم تحديث المواد ال
حسنًا. هذا يبدو جيدًا. كين، أعتقد أنك إذا قرأت هذا
두 탱크 모두 가압식이었잖아
صباح الخير يا أبولو 8، معكم ديك. أود أن أهنئكم جميعًا بعيد ميلاد مجيد نيابةً عن جميع العاملين في مركز التحكم، وأنا متأكد من أن الجميع حول العالم يتمنون لكم ذلك أيضًا. لم يتوقع أحد منا 
تشارلي، سأريك المنظر
Близнецы VIII
नहीं, मुझे माफ करना। मुझे यहाँ इतना काम है कि आपके सा
Okay. We are looking at a vacuum perigee right now of 23.6; flight path angle of minus 6.25; and if we decide we want to trim that up, we're looking at a midcourse of about 2 feet per second. Your consumables, of course, are getting bette
Okay, tu, tu pensi che sia tutto più o me
Хьюстон, база «Транквилити». Раз у
Houston, Apollo 11. Ich verstehe, dass Sie die Heizungen für Wasserstofftank 
好的。面板 4：电信，第 1 组，接 AC1。闭合以下断路器：，按下第 1 组，主 B；，按下第 2 组，主 B；，温度，主 B；，二次回路传感器，主 B；散热器，控制/加热器，主 B；电池继电器总线，电池 B；电池充电器，电池 B，充电 - 或接至 B，充电；逆变器控制，2；逆变器控制，1；传感器信号，AC1；传感器信号，主 B；传感器单元，交流总线 1；废水/饮用水，主 B；仪表，ESS，主 B；这
أ
罗杰。130 小时 30 分钟，DELTA-VX 2.0，横滚零度，俯仰 230，偏
Okay. Um das Freizeichen später zurückzugeben,, NOUN 01, ENTER; 3011
لقد فات الأوا
燃焼ステータスレポートは次の通り: 燃焼は時間どおり、燃焼時間は 4 分 6 秒半、VGX マイナス 1.4、姿勢は標準、トリムなし、VGY はゼロ、VGZ はプラス 0.2、C はマイナス 20.2、軌道
अभी के लिए बस इतना ही। टीवी पर आने वाले कार्यक्रम के बारे में हम आपको बाद में कुछ और जानकारी देंगे। मेरा सुझाव है कि आप इसके लिए पहले से ही तैयार रहें, और अ
रॉजर। जिम, यह एक अच्छी योजना लग रही है। तुम इसे क्यों नहीं अपना 
Roger
Там, в командном 
側面では、デッドバンドを最小のATT HOLD
Bon. J'imagine que tout le monde se représente le programme spatial comme un concentré d'électronique exotique, et c'est vrai qu'il en contient beaucoup. Mais je voulais vous présenter deux ou trois éléments. Après le premier, on obtient une mesure très précise de la quantité d'eau restante dans le réservoir. On va utiliser ce sac que je vous montre pour récupérer l'eau restante et
Хорошо, следующая страница, 16. Это продолжение той же темы солнечной короны. В правой части страницы, начиная чуть выше 107:40 со слов «маневр для ориентации в солнечной короне», 55 чуть ниже «Заменить темный слайд», все это находится в необязательной категории. Так что вы можете просто отложи
Che ne dici di allungare
Comp
، ناقص ٢٩٨٣٧، زائد ٠٢٣٩٠، زائد ٠٠٩٩٤ ٠٠٠ ٢٠٠ ٠٠٥ ٠١٦٩٣، زائد ٠٠٦٠٠ ٢٩٩٤٩ ٤٠٢ ٢٩٧٨٢ ٠١٠ ٦٨٩ ٢٦٠، بيرسي زيتا، لأسفل ٠٤
Джим, что касается окна 5, у меня есть
カナリー・コム・テック、カナリー - 訂正。ザンジバル、ザンジバル、こちらシ
Roger. Wir haben es verstanden
40フィート、50フィート。振り返って、そこからの視界がどうなっている
ジェミニVI
A quel punto imposterai Retro Power su ARM, ma lo 
Giusto. Ora abbiamo alcune istruzioni aggiuntive nel caso in cui questo non funzioni. Dicono 20 secondi pieni, Frank, su quell'ALC. Ci vogliono 20 secondi pieni senza interruzioni affinché l'ALC funzioni correttamente. Ora, se queste procedure che ti ho fornito non funzionano, te ne daremo altre, e riguardano altri filtri e varie combinazioni degli stessi. Quindi terrei a portata di mano il filtro polarizzatore e il porta
罗杰。迈克，你现在也五
我完全明白你的意思。请等待首都通讯部
13, t
Tranquility, Houston. Nous avons des indices laissant penser que l'échangeur de chaleur à l'hélium du carburant de descente est gelé, et qu'il y a du carburant piégé dans la conduite entre cet échangeur et les van
روجر، كين. شكرًا جزيلًا. نراكم في
時間をください。いつになるのか知
알겠습니다. 관측 일정이 완료되었고, 지금 
Wie viel Schlaf haben Sie zwischen dem Burnout und dem Ze
I believe so, Ken. This band is parallel to the M-line, and I think it has something to do with the design of the optics where we have that shaft or the rectangular en
حسنًا. يبدو الأمر بسيطًا بما فيه الكفاي
Okay. Schalten Sie bitte Ihren Computer ei
알겠습니다. 레트로 버전 기준으로 자동변속기 차량이 65%, 수동변속기 차량이 약 78% 정도라고 들었습니다. 수동변속기 레버도 장착되어 있네요. 저는 지금 그쪽에 관심이 있습
वे अभी इंस्टॉलर को हटा देंगे। क्या आप मेर
すべて正解です。もしご質問がございました
D'accord, Jim. Ça me paraît très bien. On voit que vous avez un lé
आगे बढ़ो। तुम जो च
Фред, я бы посоветовал тебе, когда твое окно снова окажется обращенным к Земле, сделать еще один снимок, и в то же время, тебе, вероятно, следует начать все сначала. Возможно, мы отправили тебе какую-то запутанную информацию. «Отключить два квадрокоптера» относится только к начальному этапу процедуры. Мы не имели в виду это для заключительной части процедуры, где есть утверждение «вклю
Роджеру 11 лет
Moment mal. Es wird nach der Gegenwart gefragt, und so schnell kann ich das nicht planen, Ke
Хорошо, Билл. Мы готовы попробовать эту музыку на другом типе оборудования. Чтобы обеспечить бесперебойную голосовую свя
रॉजर। हमें बहुत ज़्यादा स्टैटिक सिग्नल मिल रहे हैं। संकट सागर क्षितिज पर हमारे सामने है, और बीच में गहरा पिकाड क्रेटर दिखाई दे रहा है। हम अब चंद्रमा के सूर्योदय या अंतरिक्ष यान के सूर्यास्त के बीच से गुज़र रहे हैं। यह वह क्षेत्र है जहाँ चंद्रमा पर सूर्य अभी-अभी निकला है। जिस क्षेत्र के ऊपर हम अभी हैं, वह धब्बेदार दिखता है, लेकिन उसमें बहुत ज़्यादा क्रेटर नहीं हैं, इसलिए यह अपेक्षाकृत नया होना चाहिए। यह उर्वरता सागर है, और हम एक बड़े क्रेटर के पास पहुँच रहे हैं, जो डेल्टा रिम प्
Apollo 11, Houston. Potresti premere ERROR RESET sul, per fav
로저. 당신이나 
Meine Antenne ist ausgefahre
11号，休斯顿。目前的天气预报显示，您的灾后重建区域天气状况良好：2000英尺高度有零星云层，高空有零星云层，风向070度，风速13节，能见度10英里，海况约4英尺。昨天的预报显示，热带风暴克劳迪娅位于夏威夷以东约500至1000英里处。昨天下午地球卫星拍摄的图像显示，克劳迪娅正在消散，因此它的影响似乎比之前更小了。目前，您的灾后重建区域被认为位于热带辐合带以北不远处，您从窗户往外看应该就能看到。昨天还有报道称，更西边的地方出现了热带风暴维奥拉。它目前位于菲律宾以东约1000英里处，正向西北方向移动。热带风暴维奥拉一直在增强，预计将在未来12小时左右升级为台风；但是，届时它将位于您西部很远的地方。事实上，日出晨昏线尚未到达维奥拉。几
और, ह्यूस्टन, एक्
Подтверждаю. После этого мы хотели бы, чтобы вы проверили напряжение на о
В данный момент давление в кабине держится на уровне около 5,4. Похоже, оно остается на этом уровне. Именно на таком уровне оно было при взлете. Казалось, оно держалось некоторое время, а затем п
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम हाई गेन पर हैं। आ
روجر. مايك، عندما كنتَ تُجرّب النظام منذ فترة، وعندما قمنا بت
روجر. سيحاول زميلَ
I'll come back in, so we
Well, we're working on that some more. I'm not sure that the whole thing is lost yet. It appears that our problem is one where the light intensity which is sensed by our light meter in there is picking up an average field which is much larger than the earth, and so it's sensing a great deal of deep space environment which is dark, and we're suspicious that this is probably opening up the lens aperture as wide as it will go, and then when you point the camera at the earth while t
रॉजर। सिग्नल कमजोर होने के कारण हमें आपसे टेलीमेट्री डेटा नहीं मिल पा रहा है। सिग्नल वापस आ रहा है। केबिन के आकार और ड्रेन के छोटे आकार के कारण ऑक्सीजन प्रवाह
Bene. Ora prendi una delle bombolette di idrossido di litio e lasciami descrivere quale estremità è quale. È approssimativamente quadrata da una parte: una delle estremità piatte e ventilate ha la fascetta, e quell'estremità la chiamiamo superiore, mentre l'estremità opposta la chiamiamo inferiore. Chi
روجر. نحن نأخذ وقتنا 
페이지 오른쪽 절반에서 "궤도 과학 블록"을 지우고, 그 아래에 있는 "트랙 TR 남쪽의 시각 목표 1"을 지우세요. 그리고
क्या आपके पास हील
No. As soon as the carrier dropped off, why, it drifted over into those angles and stayed there. Then when it came back up again, why, it hunted around for a while, but it didn't get any further off. Gradually brought it on in to the angles where it is r
حسنًا. في الصفحة E-7 من قائمة التحقق من الإدخال وتحت الخطوة 34، طالما أن اللوحة 382 مفتوحة، فهذا وقت مناسب للمضي قدمًا وضبط عناصر التحكم في مياه المبخر، الأولية والثانوية، على الوضع ال
네. 11번 패널에서 회로 차단기를 닫아주세요. 그런 다음 활성화 25로 이
«Дружба Семь». Принято. Все п
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। आप डेल्टा पर हैं; आप ब्रावो पर जा सकते ह
Ti sento f
Okay. Now you'll back out fair
휴스턴 이글입니다. 404, 405, 406번 도로는 모두
我注意到，在我们留下近一英
А Джек, переключись в режим BYPASS на радиаторах и выключи гликол
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。プレアデス星団がこちらではっきりと
Roger. From the hot wires of the Public Affairs Office: Apollo 11 still dominates the news around the world. Only four nations, Communist China, North Korea, North Viet Nam, and Albania, have not yet informed their citizens of your flight and landing on the Moon. One newsman said that he has run out of ways to describe your success. Tonight, President Nixon is scheduled to watch the All Star baseball game in Washington. After the game, he will depart for the Pacific recovery area. Wednesday evening, he will fly from Johnston Island by helicopter to the Navy communications ship Arlington. Then on Thursday morning, he will reboard the helicopter and fly to the Hornet in time to witness your splash
Okay. ATTEGGIAMENTO MANUALE, tre
La prossima volta vorrei far partecipare Aldrin al con
좋습니다. 통신 상황을 설정해 주세요: S-밴드 안테나 OMN
알겠습니다. 그리고 다시 한번 말씀드리지만, 제가 순서가 중요하지 않다고 했던 부분은, 작업을 중단하더라도 여전히 중요하지 않습니다. 자, 이제 진행하겠습니다. 패널 4: 통신, 그룹 1, AC1은 AC1이 아니라 OFF로 전환됩니다. 패널 5: 해당 패널에 있는 모든 회로 차단
Хьюстон, очень интересно отметить, что когда я пинаю ногой *** здесь нет атмосферы, и есть гравитация *** они, кажется, улетают, и большинство из них имеют примерно одинаковый угол вылета и скорость. С того м
Ok, Jim. Le tue tariffe sembrano buone. Se vuoi, puoi ricomincia
알겠습니다. 마지막 세 줄에는 각각 FLOOD 및 TRACK 회로 차단기(2번째 줄)가 열려 있고, LOGIC POWER B, DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE, SUIT FLOW CONTROL이 열려 있습니다. 세 번째 줄에는 DISPLAY가 열려 있고, VHF A 및 VHF A 송신기, VHF B 수신기가 열려 있습니다. 그 아래에는 DISPLA
ACQ Aid Beacon is going OFF at 
और हम 40 सेकंड में जीएमटी को परखने जा रहे 
Нет, у нас есть переключатель на этом регуляторе давления... переключатель... выключ
हम अभी 3+34 पर हैं। बस अंधेरा छाने ही वाला है। अंतरिक्ष यान के अगले हिस्से पर सूरज की रोशनी पड़ रही है, छोटा सिरा आगे की ओर है। असल में, हम सीधे आगे की ओर होने से लगभग 30 डिग्री बाईं ओर हैं। और जिस तरह से सूरज बूस्टर के किनारे पर चमक रहा था... अंतरिक्ष यान से परावर्तन हो रहा था, मानो किसी न
Make sure tracking in AUTO, and then switch to AUTO
Kontr
Apollo
Roge
नहीं, मैंन
Than
你能读懂
Okay, Fred. Die Tempera
Wir dachten uns schon, dass Sie das fragen w
前
Okay, Jack. Ich habe den Ladevorgang von Batterie A abgebro
Okay, Vanc
휴스턴, 당신은 탈락했군요. 헬
Роджер, Джим. Принято к сведению. Кстати, маневр уклонения начнется примерно на 4 минуты позже. Пр
Okay. It's got us 152; it's 151; there's.., o
ابقَ ع
Potresti darci un c.e.t., hack, pe
イーグル、こちらコロンビア。オーバー
Yes... burning up... and what I saw went right into the air glow. There 
드디어 슈트 회로 온도 문제를 해결했습니다. 스콧이 왜 이 기록 위치에 대해서만 걱정했는지 알겠네요. 사이드 톤도 더 이상 없습니다. 현재 슈트 온도는 68도이고, 저는 아주 컨디션이 좋습니다. 슈트 돔 온도는 다시 72도 정도입니다. 온도가 변동하는 것 같은데, 지금은 야간 모드로 접어들고 있습니다. 슈트 회로는
收到。没错。我想确认一下，DELTA
Okay. Wir führen hier einige Kommunikationsprüfungen durch. Wir wechseln zwischen fünf verschiedenen Modi, und nur einer davon unterbricht Ihre Arbeit. In diesem Fall schalten wir auf 
110 - 110 - 110 degrees, 69 is 110 degree
Р
空気より軽いよ、相
C'est une coïncidence. C'est exactement ce que j'ai calculé avec la règle à calcul d
يبدو أن التنقل سهل كما توقعنا. بل ربما يكون أسهل من المحاكاة التي أجريناها على الأرض عند سدس قوة الجاذبية الأرضية. في الواقع، لا توجد أي مشكلة في التجول. حسنًا. لم يُحدث محرك الهبوط أي حفرة كبيرة. يبلغ ارتفاعه عن الأرض حوالي 30 سم. نحن في مكان مستوٍ تمامًا. أستطيع رؤية بعض آثار الأشعة المنبعثة من محرك اله
C'e
حس
わかった。いいぞ。
Just for informat
Houston, Apollo 8. Zeichnen Sie auf
ठीक है। और मैं समझता हूँ कि आप चाहते हैं कि हम P57 विकल्प 3 करें और फिर
Положение контейнера ЛМП: сей
ठीक है। चलिए मैं आपको कुछ पुराने समय के ब
이제 시작입니다. 헌츠빌 관제소 보고에 따르면 추진제 패드 사용 시간이 6초로, 3시그마 기준보다 3초 더 길기 때
जेम
حسنًا. الوظيفة، إيقاف، الوضع، وضع ال
لقد قطعت مسافة 0.7 ميل، وقد لحقت بك بسرعة 31 قدمًا في ا
Ok, Jack, lo farò. Jim e io siamo riusciti a individuare le costellazioni dalle finestre del velivolo quando non c'è
Знаете, 
Ok, e infine, quattro bombolette di LiOH, quelle usate nel, e quelle possono andare nella borsa di scarico nel. Ok, un paio di note. Dopo aver caricato il, consiglio di fissarlo al sistema di ritenu
Cape empfiehlt, diese Horizontprüfung durc
La bussola è troppo influenzata dagli strumenti di assetto e dai giroscopi retrostanti. Ecco perché non riesco ad avvicinarla troppo. La tengo a circa metà strada tra il cruscotto e il mio viso, in riferimento a 
Р
Houston, hier spricht Jim. Seit Fred in der Mondlandefähre war und 
Здесь очень тихо. Мы просто сидим здесь, давая двигателям немного поработать, чтобы снизить температуру. Когда они станут достаточно мощными, дайте нам знать, и 
Roger. Allez-y,
Columbia, c'est négatif. Ce 130, c'est le 
Gemini 
당신은 누구의 글을 읽을 수 
V
わかりました
시그마 
Вернее, Хьюстон. Джим, похоже, мы получили блокировку, что улучшит наш поток данных. Единственное, что нас беспокоит, это то, что мы, вероятно, будем терять данные и, возможно, голосовую связь во время 
好吧，没问
了解。ケープはゴー、私もゴー。カプセルは順調です。燃料103～102パーセント、酸素78～100パーセント、キャビンの気圧は5.8で安定、アンペアは26。全システムゴ
Well, I don't know if we're 60 miles or not
로저. 달과 같은 먼 거리에서 OMNI 장비를 사용해
罗
Beh, quello che stavamo pensando di fare in realtà era lasciarti dormire un po' di più perché imma
パワーダウン（判読不能）状態でも、まだ 11 アンペア弱しか消費していないようです。1 番機では 10 アンペア、2 番機では 11 アンペア弱です。テザー、つまり外側のハッチにあるテザーもしくは臍帯拘束具の位置のせいで、宇宙船前方での自由テザーの空気力学的制約による船外活動（EVA）作業はかなり困難でした。そのエリアで作業している時はいつでも、テザーが端に達すると私は引き戻され、その反動で宇宙船上方、アダプター セクションの方へ運ばれていました。そのため、窓の上方で操縦している間、私は視界から消え、その後宇宙船後方へと戻されていました。宇宙船の前部に出るために、私は絶えず自分自身を引き上げ続けなければなりませんでした。私は自分が撮っている写真に満足していませんでした。装着していたランヤードを固定するのはかなり困難でした。銃に装着していたランヤード、私が繋いでいたテザーとアンビリカルケーブル、その他様々なランヤードがぶらぶらと揺れていて、カメラの前に入らないようにするのが大変でした。写真では腕を素早く動かしているのがお分かりいただけると思います。写真を撮るために、腕をどかそうと何度も試みました。腕が目の前にあったのはおそらく50～60%くらいで、残りの時間は思ったほど良い位置にいられませんでした。おそらく12枚ほど写真を撮ったと思います。テザーが外に出ているだけでも、操作はかなり簡単そ
أمامن
收到。ACA脱离定位点没成功，因为模式控制开关是关闭的。请求引导控制先切换到另一个位置，然后再切换回来，这样就能
ロジャー、カーナボン。機体変更のため。GET 02+42+07、デルタV 31.7、継続時間 0+40秒、ヨー 右90度、ピッチ 00、コア 25, 26, 0、コア 27, 90317、後部スラスター、南
ロジャー、最初のメッ
아니요, 제 생각엔 그들이 나올 것 같
13, Houston. You're weak but clear; it will probably get better in a second. We're standing by for the burn repo
حسنًا يا كين، انتظر لحظة. سأفقدك ال
嘿，迈克，比赛是在辛辛那提举行的，我们觉得他们那边还在用克罗斯比球场。我记得那球场好像没
Apollo 8, Houston. Abbiamo completato lo 
इस समय सूर्य की किरणें अंतरि
わかった。パ
Roger, Canton. J'étais 
Хорошо, Водолей. А здесь мы перегруппировываемся, пытаемся поработать над режимами управления, настроить что-то для расходных материалов, а не над планом полета, и так далее. Как только мы получим всю эту информацию, мы передадим ее вам. Также 14 членов резервного экипажа нахо
D'accord. Nous pouvons mai
Роджер. 9-Чарли 137. 2+02.
प्रवेश फोटोग्राफी के लिए, य
RKV,
Bien
Okay, Fred. Nur zwei Anmerkungen zu dem, was wir dir eben gegeben haben. Die erste befindet sich ziemlic
ठीक है। हम समझ 
Odyssey, Houston. Un paio di interruttori automatici per voi. Sul pannello 276, sul nostro CONTROL
Jim, je te recommande de rester jusqu'à ce qu'on arrête la télé à 55 heures, au cas où tu 
Die Sta
13, al momento non c
Das ist bestätigt. Okay, wir sind jetzt bei -5 + 05. Und, Jack, das Kommandomodul nutzt diese Daten nur zur
收到
Здравствуйте, Сигма Семь, здравствуйте, Сигма Семь, это Кэл Кэп Ком, Кэл Кэп Ком. Веду трансляцию вслепую. У нас произошло отключение питания на приемнике. Я веду трансляцию вслепую. Перезагрузите часы для ретросеквенции. Это учитывает ошибку часов при последнем считывании. В вашем последнем отчете было установлено 27 секунд. По последней проверке, которую мы проводили с вами, должно быть 33. Кейп хочет, чтобы вы установ
और, 11, ऐसा नहीं लगता कि आपको ऊपर वाले ब्र
روجر، نود أن نعرف متى بدأت عملية مح
Roger, Bruce. Merci. Nous 
Atte
시그마 세븐, 시그
伦敦的BBC正在考虑一种特殊的无线电警报系统，以便在月球时间发生变化时提醒人们打
Okay. In relationsh
ठीक है। आगे बढ़ो, पृष्ठ 12 पर ज
好的，回到第18页。我们继续，分别在30秒、10秒、7秒、减5秒处进行。在“点火”处，没有点火，我们在这
Très bien. Dites-leur que je les remercie d'avoi
हाँ, बिल्कुल। मैंने इसे थोड़ी देर के लिए खुला रखा था; अब बंद कर दिया है। केबिन 
여러분 정말
Hai eseguito un allineamento del set terrestre nel simulatore con una configurazione ag
Sigma Seven，这里是夏威夷
Roger. I've had 10 swallows of water si
西格
وا
Главные новости сегодня в Хьюстоне касаются «Астрос». В спортивном мире «Хьюстон Астрос» в девятом иннинге в Цинциннати одержали победу над «Редс» со счетом 7:4. Однако перед началом девятого иннинга ситуация выглядела довольно безрадостной. «Астрос» проигрывали 4:3. Затем, при одном ауте, Хесус Алоу сделал сингл в правое поле. Джон Эдвардс сделал еще один сингл вправо, а Сэнди Вальдеспино сделал дабл, сравняв счет. Хулио
好的。我已经测到了穹顶温度。最高升到了大约 82 度。我已经把它调回了 81 度。宇航服进气口的温度升到了 80 度。我已经把它调回了 78 度。宇航服设置旋钮的设置又回到了接近 7
はい。まず、パネル3のBAT CHARGE（バッテリー充電）をオフにします。ACインバータ2をオフにします。パネル5のMAIN BUS TIE（メインバスタイ）でBAT A/Cをオンにします。パネル250のCB B
프렌드십 세븐입니다. 카노 캡 컴입니다
좋아
E, Houston, vedo che questa manovra ci dà un rollio di 27172, un beccheggio di 08301. È questo che ci
Роджер, 15 минут назад. Джим, я передам тебе общую процедуру входа в атмосферу. Ты получишь обновление 63-1 и подробности о твоем следующем пролете над Штатами от Гаса. Общая процедура после тормозного огня: развернись в нормальное положение, в положение с опущенной головой, для полного подъема до 400 К. Мы дадим тебе угол высоты, который нужно удерживать до 400 К, затем мы хотели бы, чтобы ты развернулся со скоростью 15 градусов/сек, пока высотомер не сойдет с отметки или пр
Вода на вкус нормальная, никаких проблем. И теперь нам удобнее спать под диваном. Я был здесь с Фрэнком и периодически засыпал п
네, 말씀하신 내용을 잘 들었습니다. 통신 두절
Gehen Sie weiter nach unten zu 114:16, strei
Я бы сказал, что дефлектор реактивных двигателей, установленный на квадрокоптере 4, кажется, имеет более морщинистую поверхность, чем тот, что установлен на квадрокоптере 1. В ц
Do you want to ta
Okay, the time of transfer to power was 57 hours, 11 minutes. For your information, we seem to be reasonably fat on power. In 
로저
Aurora Seven, Kano Cap Com. Assicuratevi di essere in m
रॉजर और जॉन सुझाव देते हैं कि आप उन कणों को देखने के लि
Хьюстон, это «Аполлон-8». Мы согласны. Сириус и Ригель — две звезды, которые были бы намного лучше, чем Нави и Полярная звезда. Однако я выполнил выравниван
また、VI、9月までの機動アップデートをこの
Et, Aquarius, Houston. Nous commençons à nous préoccuper de l'accumulation de CO2 dans le module de commande. Nous avons donc une recommandation: il vous est conseillé de boucher le tuyau de retour rouge des tuyaux du module de commande, puis de trouver un moyen de les fixer de manière à ce qu'ils soient gonflés en les faisant passer le plus loin possible dans le tunnel. Ainsi, un flux d'air sort
يعمل كما ينبغي. ا
لا، هذ
ヒューストン、
Мне так и 
रॉजर। हमारा केबिन ठीक चल रहा है। इसके बारे में हम कुछ खास नहीं कर सकते। टैंक का दबाव बढ़ जाता है, बस यही एक वजह है। हम अनावश्यक ऑक्सीजन बाहर 
Oh, è acceso; è un cen
ठीक है। आगे आ जाओ जहाँ मैं तुम्हें फिर से द
D'accord, Jack. 
Sette qui. Carburante a posto, 4g, cabina 5.5, ossigeno a posto
13, Хьюстон. Кстати, нам хотелось бы узнать, как работала фиксация антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления.
了解。了解し
Okay. Wir haben endlich die richtige Skala dafür gefunden. – Ich muss kurz in die VOX-Aufzeichnung. Die Skala für das Dosimeter stimmt – und es zeigt einen Wert von etwa 0,04 an, also weniger als 0,1. Ich setze das Dosimeter jetzt wieder auf die Luke – das ist der niedrigste M
रॉजर, समझ गया? ऑक्सीजन स्रोत को 930 और 960 psi के बीच नियंत्रित करने के ल
Quanto resta d
बिल्कुल। खेल पृष्ठ पर ज़्यादा हलचल नहीं है। बास्केटबॉल के दोनों सर्वेक्षणों में यूसीएलए शीर्ष पर है। अगर आपको किसी खास टीम के बारे में पूछना हो, तो मुझे बताएँ, मैं आपको बता दूँगा कि क्या वे दोनों सर्वेक्षणों में शीर्ष दस में हैं। जहाँ तक उत्तर की बात है - कल होने वाले कॉलेज ऑल स्टार गेम की बात है, उत्तर की टीम दक्षिण की तुलना में थोड़ी पसं
はい、気づきました。同じような影響は至る所で見られますが、
좋습니다. 페리신시온 + 2를 MPL에 넣고, 079, 27, 4013, + 08144, - 00443, - 00226, N/A, + 00205, 08455, 4 + 20, 268, 261, + 08155, - 00443, - 021, 2187, N/A. GDA는 이대로 괜찮을 것 같고, 피치는 5.85, 요는 6.74가 될 겁니다. 10초 동안 두 개의 제트 엔진으로 연료를 채우고, 스로틀은 5초 동안 10%, 21초 동안 40%, 나머지 연소 시간 동안 100%로 유지합니다. 이렇게 하면 142 + 47의 속도로 수면에 착륙
حسناً. لدينا العناو
असल में, मैंने वही जुगनू का रंग 
Ещё один момент, касающийся процедуры действий при неисправности. Вряд ли вам придётся беспокоиться об этом завтра, но в вашем списке неисправностей в разделе «Доковка» на странице F11 9 есть процедура действий при высокой скорости потока кислорода в верхней части — под туннелем в верхней части страницы 11 9. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы не использовали эту процедуру действий при высокой скорости потока кислорода, а вместо этого обратились в Хьюст
Roger. Bon, Frank vient de se coucher et Bill n'est pas encore levé. Je vais te dire ce que je vais faire: je v
«Дружба Семь», это Кано. В любое в
حسنًا. فيما يتعلق بالبطارية رقم 2، تعتقد أنه قد يكون عطلًا في المستشعر لأ
حسنًا. نريدك أن تعلم أن لدينا بعض زوايا عزم الدوران الجيروسكوبي لك. ونريدك أن تخبرنا عندما تحصل على التح
Okay, Houston; 13. We're a little bit ahead of ourselves
أقوم الآن بضبط إعدادات البدلة على 8. أي أن كمي
제미
Okay. Stern 2 Zapfenwinkel, erster 05245, zweiter 05243, nächster 05241; letzte 4 Zap
इस बार बर्फ के टुकड़े जैसी दिखने वाली वह छोटी सी वस्तु मुझे कैप्सूल से दूर जाती हुई साफ दिखाई दे रही है। बेशक, दोनों एक ही उड़ान पथ पर हैं। देखने में तो वह सफेद रंग के टुकड़े जैसी लग रही थी, लेकिन अब जो काला आकाश मुझे दिखाई दे रहा है, उसमें वह साफ दिख रही है... वो तारे जो हमसे दूर जा रहे है
I am going to manual proportional at
No room 
네
फिर
Oui. Nous sommes en train d'en discuter. Nous n'avons pas encore pris de décision
了解しました。それについては後回しにしておきます。「アクティベーションページ1、1A、2を繰り返す」という3ステップの簡単な手順だったのですが、その中に誰も理解できないステップがもう一つありました。ですから、その場合は、SUPERCRITの圧力を読み取るために先ほど省略した手順をもう一度実行することをお勧めします。必要であれば、後ほど詳しく説明し
Tut mir leid. Vo
Близнецы 4, Близнецы 4
Okay. GMTB 15 43 23. ΔV di 139. Durata della combustione: 2 minuti e 39 secondi. Il tuo 15 55 24. Rotola a 
كان ذلك هو الحرق الذي أحدثن
D'accord. Vous allez supprimer entre 2 et 15 heures à cet endroit, et vous allez l'ajouter, s'il y a du temps, seulement s'il y a du temps, à moins 1 heure, au moment de l'initia
了解。ちょっと待って、ジム。電波が少し弱
ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे पृथ्वी थोड़ी तिरछी हो गई है, लेकिन जितने घंटे हो चुके हैं... मुझे लगता है यह बहुत बढ़िया रहा है। तुम्हें पता है ये कैसे करते हैं? कैसे?... टर्मिने
जी हां, अब हम लगभ
Ricevuto. Controllo esperimento D-8 n. 1. Inizia a 57. Controllo n. 2. Inizia a 01:30. Elemento n. 4, Rev 50, nodo ascendente 102° 26. Elemento n. 5: se possibile, foto S-6 della tempesta tropicale al largo della costa occidentale di Elimina Apollo Landmark Run n. 7. L'area è troppo nuvol
النسر، هيوستن. بعد الدوران حول المحور، الزواي
روج
Ох, я не знаю. Она где-т
罗杰. 224，加上60267； 225，加上58148； 226，加上
明白了。我们船上已有的区块
제미니 8호, 하
Хорошо, Базз. Что касается пунктов вашего плана полета, сначала несколько обновлений. Мы отменили промежуточный заход номер 6. Оставайтесь на месте. Я дам вам немного больше времени сегодня утром. Второй пункт плана полета: мы готовы зарядить батарею B в любой момент, когда вы захотите это сделать; и третий пункт: на этот раз мы хотели бы сбросить сточные воды немного по-другому. Мы хотели бы сделать это на наших метках с земли. Трасса немного неровная, и мы хотели бы сбросить воду в такое время, когда, как нам кажется, она сохранит свою правильную конфигурацию, чтобы у нас была подходящая возможность приб
Bene. Sul pannello 7 vogliamo POWER, OFF. SERVO POWER 1 e 2, OFF; /GPI
森林火災は本当に彼らを追い
Oui, il aurait dû s'agir d'un lace
わかり
아주 좋습니다. 곧 서서히 줄
好的。是的
Donc, je dois pous
그 안에 눈이 내리고 있
Хорошо, Джек. Панель 3, инвертор переменного тока 2, главный B; инвертор 2, шина переменного тока 2, включен; кнопка сброса шины переменного тока 2, чтобы сбросить и установить в центральное положение; зарядное устройство для аккумуляторов к A, индикатор переменного тока, выберите зарядное устройство для аккумуляторов. Сообщайте показания силы тока и напряжения каждые 10 минут в т
Ok. Pannello 5: RISCALDATORE CB G&N, PRINCIPALE A e PR
Хор
좋아. 그들은
Там написано: выполнить уборку, убрать шлемы, мешки для хранения; достать зеркало, контрольный список и устройство для утилизации. Убрать промежуточное устройство хранения, достать и настроить для использования 16-миллиметровый объектив, HC-EX, f:4, 500, бесконечность, 6 кадров в секунду. Вот и все, что написано на этой странице. На этом этапе мы сейчас н
Я их наст
コンパスは、その背後にある姿勢制御計とジャイロの影響を受けすぎています。そのため、コンパスを近づけることができません。計器盤と顔のちょうど中間あたり、グローブボックスとパックの中間の線を基準にコンパスを構えています。CE（安全確認）時には、コンパスは前方ハッチのクランプラインをまっすぐ指していま
しばらくの間、私たちのお供となっている宇宙船内でのエンターテイメン
Da Washington: "Questo Natale, il mondo è illuminato dalla speranza della pace. Quando arriverà, quando la speranza si trasformerà in realtà e le armi torneranno a tacere, ar
Et, Houston, Apollo 11. Comprenez-vou
Хорошо. Думаю, мы это п
카나본, 질문이 하나 있습니다. 연료 보급 라인으로 복귀
كولومبيا، هيو
Здравству
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 중간 항로 수정 
Roger, copy and standing
Neil, this is Houston. We seem t
ठीक है, चार्ली। मेरे पास आकस्मिक योजना क
हाँ, मुझे लगता है कि आप पान
이거 다 준비됐어? 여기 다시 놓아둘게. 네 물건 밑에 있어. 자, 버즈가 카메라를 위로 띄우고 싶어하는 것 같은데, 내가 해야
Nous tournons pendant moins de 5 minutes
放在你那边
حسنًا، برج الدلو؛ هيوستن. ك
Как там дела, Фрэнк? Вы все трое сегодня утром чувс
Let t
La lampe frontale de la main gauche, placée au bout des doi
OK. Roger. Je capte aussi le signal. 
15, 16 और 17 तारीख को होने वाले कुछ उत्तरी रोशनी जैसे प्रभाव के साथ रात के 
تم
لا، ل
네, 
Je photographie actuellement de grands bancs de nuages 
알겠습니다. 특별한 이유라도
알겠습니다, 짐. 전문가들이 전압과 전류를 다시 측정해 달
Roger, Jim. Conte
Роджер. Мы готовим для вас обновление плана полета. Мы все еще рассчитываем параметры вашего следующе
Negative. We don't need 
燃料 102-1
没关系。我还
ठीक है। जैक, अपनी अगली सूची पर
——然后他喝了他那杯美
Do you have any
روجر. يبدو أن محول التيار 250 لا يرتفع كثير
バ
Похоже, у тебя получится э
D'accord. À 1 h, nous avons photographié la cible 90 et le terminateur côté sud. À partir de 2 h, nous avons photographié la cible 12 et les cibles 10, 14, 16, 19, 20, 21 et 23. Malheureusement, nous avons eu un problème de sensibilité: j'ai utilisé la pellicule haute vitesse quelque part, et je pense que les cibles de 250 mm étaient en haute sensibilité. Nous avons changé de pellicule et avons commencé à Tex Crater, au Texas, avec les cibles 28, 31, 40 et 36, ainsi que plusieurs cibles d'opportunité qui ont été enregistrées, mais apparemment perdues. Avez-vous pu 
نعم يا جيم. بمعنى آخر، سنترك لك مهمة تبديل الهوائي، وبع
Okay. We appreciate your appre
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات فور دخولنا المدار، انطلاقاً من الولايات المتحدة. أعتقد أنه بإمكاننا فكّها دون المساس بإمكانية العودة الآمنة بنسبة
Понял. Продолжаю записывать. Продолжайте. Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон
अच्छा, अब तुम कैसे पढ़ते हो, जै
मैं आपसे वही कहने के लिए कह रहा था जो आपने 
分かりました。大丈
좋습니다. 잘 읽었습니다. 페이지를 계속 아래로 내려가겠습니다. "밸런스 커플" 스위치를 "밸런스 커플 끄기"로 변경합니다. 좋습니다. -2분 전 마지막 줄에 있는 "커맨더 스로틀, 최소; LMP에서 제트 엔진으로"를 확인합니다. -2분 지점에서 "400 + 1"을 지웁니다. -1분 지점에서 "마스터 암, 켜짐"을 지웁니다. -10초 지점에서 "수동 연료량"을 추가합니다. +5초 지점에서 "하강 엔진 명령 오버라이드, 켜짐"을 지우고 "40퍼센트"를 추가합니다. 좋습니다. "시동 시 시동이 걸리지 않으면 수동 시동 버튼을 누릅니다. 그래도 시동이 걸리지 않으면 하강 엔진 
DSKY é
Nu
We're thinking about them ri
D'accord. L'une de nos premières priorités est de recharger la batterie afin de disposer d'énergie pour effectuer cette opération. Nous avons d'ailleurs déjà mis au point des procédures à cet effet. Concernant la rentrée atmosphérique, nous prévoyons notre dernière manœuvre de mi-parcours 5 heures avant l'interface d'entrée, si nécessaire. Nous souhaitons ensuite larguer le module de service environ 4 heures et demie avant cette interface et consacrer les 3 à 3 heures et demie suivantes à la prise de photos, à la mise en marche du système de guidage et de propulsion du module de commande, au rangement du matériel et à diverses autres tâches. Nous conserverons le module de service jusqu'à une heure avant l'interface d'entrée, puis nous le larguerons. Ces procédures seront exécutées de manière intégrée dans les systèmes de gestion de mission (CMS) et de maintenance (LMS) demain matin et, si tout va bien, nous les répéterons plus tard dans la journée avec le contrôle de mission en boucle. Une question se pose: que faisons-nous ensuite? On pense qu'il y a su
很好。全部都正确，我这里
Хорошо, Водолей. Теперь ты 
حسنًا، يا هيوستن؛ برج الدلو
Voilà l'adaptateur — l'adaptateur
好的。我来告诉你它们在哪里。正如你所说，它们的罐底都暴露在空气中，一个就在面板旁边——LMP的就
いずれにせよ、
अंतरिक्ष यान के पिछले हिस्से में मैंने जो देखा, वह काफी गहरा दिखाई दिया; ज़ाहिर है, पिछले हिस्से से देखने पर, उन पर सीधे सूर्य की रोशनी पड़ रही थी। ऐसा लग रहा था मानो पदार्थ थोड़ा पक गया हो और गोलाकार रूप से बाहर की ओर बिखर गया हो, लेकिन उस विशेष क्षेत्र में, यह विशेषता इंजन के निचले हिस्से से लगभग
Roger, Eagl
نعم. كنت أفكر أنه ربم
जी हां।
Роджер. Дава
S-6はかなりの数を保有しています。S-5も散発的に目撃されており…写真も撮っていますが、少
그들은 우리를 어느 정도 파악했어요.
Ap
Х
Nur z
11, this is Houston. As a result of our venting through the waste management drain, we've concluded that your O2 flow rate sensor is, in fact, malfunctioning. I mentioned when y
Okay. Gut gelesen. Weiter geht's auf der Seite. Schalter „BALANCE COUPLE“, „BALANCE COUPLE OFF“. Okay, weiter zur letzten Zeile vor -2 Minuten: „COMMANDER THROTTLE, MINIMUM; LMP to DETS“. Bei -2 Minuten: „400 plus 1“ streichen. Bei -1 Minute: „MASTER ARM, ON“ streichen. Bei -10 Sekunden: „MANUAL ULLAGE“ hinzufügen. Bei +5 Sekunden: „DESCENT ENGINE COMMA
Actually, we worked out up here on Lovell's slide rule and got 183.25 ro
D'accord. Passez au suivant, et nous voulons: ÉCLAIRAGE NUMÉRIQUE, ÉCLAIRAGE PROJECTEUR, ÉCLAIRAGE ÉTEINT; e
아니요. 
찰리, 방금 261도 롤 각도를 정확히 맞췄는
布鲁斯，我应该提一下，当我把水流到二次水分离
D'accord. À 1 minute, on gratte « MASTER ARM ». À 35 secondes, on gratte les deux premières lignes. « Manual Ullage » commencera à 9 secondes; on gratte les blocs à 2 secondes; et la l
حسنًا. لقد حصلنا أخيرًا على المقياس المناسب لهذا. - عليّ الذهاب إلى تسجيل الصوت. لقد حصلت على المقياس الصحيح لجهاز قياس الجرعات - وهو يُشير إلى قراءة أقل من 0.1، تحديدًا 0.04. سأعيد الآن تركيب جهاز قياس 
Columbia, Houston. Vous êtes tellement rapides que nous envisageons d'avanc
Et ce que je voulais souligner, je ne sais pas si c'est évident, mais… pour montrer l'avantage de faire tous les rejets 
It's in. That's how it triggers the - Okay, Jack. I'm going to push in on
了解です。次の3つは変更ありません。そしてイベントタイマー
罗杰。我知道我们计划使用那台相机，以及其他一些相
프렌드십 세
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. Any special attitude you'
Не знаю, делал ли Эд такой или нет; я сделаю. Тебе 
夏威夷，双子座 VI。新
わかった、ジャック。これが君に渡したタイムラインのメモだ。言いたくないのだが、入国チェックリストにいくつか訂正がある。訂正というよりは、私が書いた内容に対応する入国チェックリストの一部だ。君がいつでもその内容について説明できる。それから、ヴァンスから、君はもう下降水域に入って飲料水として飲んでいいと
이것은 우정 7입니다. 저는 지평선을 통제하는
阿
The way the horizon looks is a very orange band. Just as the sun goes down and extends way off either side, probably 45° each side of the sun, comes up into a lighter yellow, then a very deep blue, then a very light blue, on up to the black
分かりました。先ほどお伝えした気象情報を確認したところ、目標地点で
了解。遡及シーケンス時間をコピーする準備はできましたか
...н
Okay. That's good information and during the time that we see you'r
روجر. 54-دلتا 86. 01+49. 03 02 14.
जी हाँ। यह तीसरा पृष्ठ होग
は
Okay. On - These are just cleanup items, Jack. On page 2-3, it lists how you separate, from the CM/ SEP and all that, so, obviously, if we're on step 5 at 43 minutes down - that's all deleted. And that gets deleted all the way over onto page 2-4, up to the
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 짐 다 실었습니다. 블록으로 돌아
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 재정렬 작업은 잘 진행되었습니다. 저는 육분의로 별을 찾아 정렬하는 데는 성공했지만, 스캐닝 망원경에서 레고르나 멘켄트 같은 별을 관측할 때는 그 별을 식별할 수 없었습니다. 처음 지구를 관측했을 때는 지평선이 매우 흐릿하게 보였습니다. 하지만 지구의 지평선과 대기 사이에는 뚜렷한 선이 있는 것처럼 보였습니다. 랜드마크 시선 필터를 사용하니 지평선이 더 선명해졌습니다. 우주와 대기 상층부 사이에는 매우 흐릿하고 불분명한 지평선이 있어서 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 앞서 말씀드렸듯이, 태양이 가까이 있을 때 달을 관측하면 달 주변이 어둡지 않고 밝은 파란색으로 보입니다. 태양이 광학계 근처에 있을 때 육분의로 정렬할 때도 마찬가지입니다. 하지만 저는 육분의에서 이러한 별들을 찾는 데는 어려움이 없습니다. 별과 지평선 측정을 하는 동안 시리우스, 프로키온, 카노푸스 같은 별들을 지구를 배경으로 찾는 데는 전혀 어려움이 없었습니다. 세 별 모두 지구를 배경으로 선명하게 보였습니다. 하지만 나비는 그다지 밝지 않아서 북쪽 별을 이용한 백업 정렬은 매우 어려울
Roger. Area 55-DELTA 82. 04 34 10. 9+57. Area 55-3 split burn, 55 a poppa, 109 a prua. 1+31. 2+17. 05 15 40. 02+33. 08+47
रॉ
Roger, Houston. For RETRO, I have the anticipated location of all the e
Roger. We're not going to use the telepho
अरे जेरी, मैं फ्रैंक बोल रहा हूँ। क
罗杰，11号。你的信号断了。迈
حسنًا. أولًا، في اللوحة رقم 11، أغلق قاطع دائرة هوائي النطاق S. ثم انتقل إلى قسم التفعيل، الصفحة 28، تفعيل الهوائي الق
Here is a feature by Harry Rosenthal of Associated from Houston. Two Santas brighten the Christmas Eve for 2-year-old Jeffrey Lovell. The first one knocked on his front door and brought presents. The second started his daddy home from the moon. The first wore a red suit and a white beard and ho, ho'd loud enough to be heard down the block. The second was a huge engine spitting flame behind the moon, and thousands of people were awaiting word that it had fired. "Please be informed that there is a Santa Claus" were the first words from Apollo 8 as it emerged from radio silence to inform an anxious world 15 minutes after the fact that the engine had performed its critical burn. "None of us ever expect to have a better Christmas present than this one," said Ken Mattingly of Mission Control. "Thank everyone on the ground for us. You know we couldn't have done it without you," came the reply from Col. Frank Borman, the spacecraft commander. At this point, a Christmas tree came aglow in front of the consoles in Mission Control, and Astron
Почему бы нам им не поз
Хорошо. Это общее замечание, которое относится ко всем случаям, когда вы работаете или переключаетесь между ними, и вам следует быть осторожными, чтобы не использовать расширенный глагол в это время. Это указано в примечаниях к прог
أعتقد أن الاهتزاز كان موجودًا طوال الوقت على الرغم من أنه بدا وكأنه يزداد بالنسب
And I won't bother you with those calls anymore, unle
알겠습니다. 제가 제대로 이해했는지 확인해 볼게요. 잭이 같은 자세로 앉아 있어야 짐벌 위치가 같아져서 자세 제어에 어려움이 없다는 말씀이시죠? 네, 이해했습니다
हम अभी प्रति सेकंड 60 आगे, 22 बाईं ओर और 4
Il Capo mi ha consigliato di spegnere l'interruttore dell'elica e d
Roger. Ripetimi l'orario dell'alba e dell
Roger. Die bisherigen Probleme sind auf eine unbekannte Ursache zurückzuführen, wahrscheinlich auf eine Belastung Ihrer Zapfenzelle, die jetzt 91 beträgt und daher nicht mehr Ihren tatsächlichen Zapfenwinkel widerspiegelt. Wir gehen jedoch nicht davon aus, dass diese Belastung die Zuverlässigkeit Ihres Systems beeinträchtigt. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, den Schalter „OPTICS NERO“ vor jeder Verwendung der Optik einmal aus- und wieder einzuschalt
Demandez-vous combien de gallons de carburant nous avons
Roger. On the adapter. How d
알겠습니다. 패널 작업은 다 제대로 하신 것 같네요. 가운데 패널을 확인해 볼게요. 네. 전원을 끄시고 저를 두고 나가셨죠. 말씀해 주세요. 제가
Хорошо, Джо. Время затяжки составит 23 часа 47 минут 30 сек
Hey, hast du meine Erg
分かりました。少し後で試してみまし
बज़, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आपके पास समाप्ति की कार्यवाही शुरू करने के लिए लगभग 3 मिनट का समय
Es sieht so aus, als würde das Band noch laufen, und die rote Kontrollleuchte leuchtet noch nicht. Das ist wirklich unbefriedigend – die Position der Kontrollleuchte am Kassettenrekorder. Der ganze Kassettenrekorder – genau, die gesamte Funktionsweise ist fehlerhaft
ロジャー…ハリケーンか台風のエリアの上空…カーラの真上…あれは…あれは何だったかな。ハッセルブラッドでいくつ
В данный момент срабатывает переключатель м
Roger, Kano Cap Com. Aurora Seven versteht Sie deutlich. Wie geht es m
Kano Cap Com, this is Sigma seven,
Yes
Roger, Tranquility. We understand. Must be a beautif
Роджер. Тогда в
C'est Roger. J'ai fait pas mal de vol 
... إيقاف تشغيل جهاز ا
Good morning. Are you planning a midcourse correction 4 this
Das stimmt, Jim. Wir haben noch kein Bild davon. Es befindet sich im oberen Bereich – Korrekt
Пох
Negative. I won't be able to hold still for it now. I've
Родже
उस बेहतरीन ब्रेड का एक टुकड़ा है जिस पर
그는 자신이 알타이르를 볼 수 있는 것 같다고 말
Сколько эт
Хорошо, а если вы перевернёте страницу на Power 8, то увидите оставшиеся для вас функции космического аппарата. У нас есть TM с низкой скоростью передачи данных. Однако у нас нет УКВ-связи. Есть. У нас есть гликолевые насосы. У нас есть вентиляторы для скафандров. У нас есть система подавления шума в кабине, и жди
그들이 우리 장비, 그러니까 VABABR이나 VABD라고 부르는 장비
جيد، بالإضافة إلى 00068، بالإضافة إلى 00000، بالإضافة إلى 46420 178 134 001، غير قابل للتطبيق، بالإضافة إلى 00202 46420 547 46211. هل أنت معي
네. 챔버 압력은 아주 안정적으로 
Vous faiblissez un pe
Gemini 4, RKV. Négatif 
Хорошо. Наверное, я что-то перепутал. Они скопировали — вы скопировали УКВ-сигнал на ра
Хорошо. Думаю, если у вас нет ещё каких-либо комментариев на эту тему, может быть, нам стоит дать этим ребятам возможность поспать, а я пока отдохну здесь. 
حسنًا. فيما يتعلق بالبطارية رقم 2، تعتقد أنه قد يكون عطلًا في المستشعر لأنك لم تلا
Roger, okay. Wir werden das tun
In realtà, non vuole divulgar
일단 그게 제대로 작동되면, 그 다음에 전
わかりました。次はMAIN BUS AのRESETをオフにします。一つ飛ばして、FUEL CELL 1 MAIN BUS Bのトークバッ
Well - Okay - Well, this morning, let's just see how close it comes to being parallel to the M-line. Before we started marking for the first time, it appeared that the computation of - of those three angles was somewhat off, and that I was wasting a lot of gas by going to those three angles and then having to make
Ricevuto. Nel rappo
FM 볼륨을 좀 높여도 괜찮을
Capisco che vorresti sapere quando a
分かりました。全部理解できたか確認しましょう。ランデブーのために、まずCB 16 インバータ2を閉じ、CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE インバータ2も閉じます。次にパネル14でインバータ2が選択されていることを確認します。そしてCB 11 ランデブーレーダー2が閉じ、両方のブレーカーが閉じていることを確認します。次にランデブーレーダー解放ハンドルを引きます。パネル3で、ランデブーレーダーをA ENTERですべてのジップをプラスし、レジスタ1と2に28300をプラスします。GOを押します。次に16 72で動き
Роджер, я понял. Мы всё ещё испытываем это периодическое состояние, которое набл
分かりました。その後、CB CTE、MAIN Bを「閉」にします。次に、パネル250：CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2を「閉」、CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDINGを「閉」にします。次に、パネル275：CB MAIN B、BAT BUS Bを「閉」、CB INVERTER POWER 2、MAIN Bを「閉」にします。分かりました。ところで、これまでお伝えしたことは順番は特に重要ではありませんが、これからは順番に行うようにしてください。必ず指
Semb
حسنًا. في اللوحة 5، نريد فتح قاطعي الطاقة 1 و2. ثم إعادة ضبط مفتاح الطاقة. في الل
Ensuite, page 15, colonne de gauche, ou plutôt côté gauche, vers le bas, là où il est écrit « Configurer les caméras et la bande » et descend jusqu'à « Remplacer le cache noir », ajoutez simplement le commentaire suivant: « La couronne solaire est optionne
Housto
好的，那就好。让我——让我等到他们起床，或者至少等杰克起床。他应该比弗雷德起得早。然后我们再尽量恢复正常作息。不过，如果他们还在睡觉，我真不想现
Ich bin gerade mitten in meiner ersten Vorspeise, der Suppe, und soll danach noch einen kleinen Hühner
حسنًا يا جيم، لد
D'a
로저,
Роджер
D'accord, Jim. Nous vérifions 1
45 と 46 の 2 枚の写真が撮れました。今はアフリカ上空を通過して、サハラ砂漠を見下ろ
Affermativo. Okay. Sotto la riga 4, sotto: TRASFERIMENTO AUTOMATICO POMPA GLICOLE, chiudi. Sotto COLLEGA
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। चंद्रमा मूल रूप से धूसर है, रंगहीन; प्लास्टर ऑफ पेरिस या गहरे भूरे रंग की रेत जैसा दिखता है। हम काफी बारीकियाँ देख सकते हैं। उर्वरता सागर यहाँ उतना स्पष्ट नहीं दिखता जितना पृथ्वी पर दिखता है। इसके और आसपास के गड्ढों के बीच उतना अंतर नहीं है। सभी गड्ढे गोल हैं। ऐसे 
ठीक है। सुन
D'accor
제리, 전원을 켜서
무게를 바꿀 수는 있겠지만, 그건 TLI에 90을 더한 금액이니까 시간은 충분
Friendship Seven, this 
よし、
Chiudere, sul pannello 11, l'interruttore autom
Apollo 8, Houston. Votre enregistreur a un fa
Да, там есть и камни. Их можно потрогать, но увидеть нел
Giusto. È un vero vantaggio in cabina di pilotaggio. Sei solo un po' al buio. Sembra che potrebbe essere utile ridurre il diaframma di circa un incr
Je ne sais pas pourquoi, après avoir resse
पूरे 96 घंटे हो गए हैं। पूरे 96 घंटे और अब 40 सेकंड 
D
네. 470
Хорошо. Я просто подумал на
ठीक है। टॉमी जैकब्स के बाद, हमारे पास ह्यूस्टन की एक स्थानीय ज्योतिषी रूबी ग्राहम की ओर से एक बेहद महत्वपूर्ण खबर है। उनका कहना है कि चंद्रमा की यात्रा के लिए सभी राशियाँ अनुकूल हैं। नील चतुर है, माइक का निर्णय लेने की क्षमता अच्छी है, और बज़ जटिल समस्याओं को सुलझाने में माहिर है। उनका यह भी कहना है कि नील दुनिया को गुलाबी चश्मे से देखने की प्रवृत्ति रखता है, लेकिन वह हमेशा पीड़ित या परेशान लोगों की मदद करने के लिए 
Roger. più 90, G&N: 63481
哥
罗杰。还有一点要补充：由于这个问题在数据优先级会议上引发了很多争议，看来向上倾斜10度是获得地平线的最佳姿态，这样你就可以沿着地标向下扫描望远镜。如果向下倾斜角度再大一些，即使完全抬起轴颈也无法获得地平线，而地平线对于引导你到达控
Okay. Am Sicherungsautomaten in Feld 16: Batteriezuleitungen, zwei Anschlüsse, offen. Achten Sie nun genau auf die Spannungsschwankungen: Batterie 1, hohe Spannung
알겠습니다. 일몰
انطلق يا أبولو
了解しま
Roger. Continuing with the Maroon Bugle. President Nixon surprised your wives with a phone call from San Francisco just before he boarded a plane to fly out to meet you. All of them were very touched by your television broadcast. Jan and Pat watched from Mission Control here. The launch of Intelsat from the Cape was postponed for the fourth time last night. The problem was said to be a malfunctioning nitrogen regulator in the second stage of Delta. A new attempt 
Привет, Бермуды. Дружба Семь. Теперь ваша очередь. Ко
我不知道为什么
ヒュースト
Qu
はい。明るさはまだ十分です。1～2段絞りを開けても大丈夫です。自動光
Okay. Okay, circa - al minuto 156:50 sulla destra - beh, nella metà destra del
ハッ！ハ
了解、バズ。PAD、MPLのエントリです。ロール05、35から開始。訂正：359 152 001。194 46 03 267、プラス1102、マイナス17203、068、36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027、NOUN 69。4行ともNA。Dゼロから開始：400 02 09。ブラックアウトのRET：00 17 03 38 08 20。六分儀の星：02 0945 149。ボアサイト星
了解、アクエ
ठीक है। ब्लॉक करने जा रहा ह
そ
Okay. Le
كنا نتابع المواقف مع فريد سابقاً، وبدا أن ما كنا نفعله ي
ガス、アメリカ
자, 잭. 위에서부터 시작해 볼까요? 좋습니다. 극저온 탱크를 보면, H2 1은 230, 2도 마찬가지입니다. O2 극저온 탱크 1은 300으로 간신히 유지되고 있는 것 같습니다. 극저온 탱크 2는 H2 1이 73, 2가 74를 나타내고 있습니다. O2 쪽은 O2 1의 수량이 76으로, 최대치에 도달했습니다. 라디에이터 온도는 1차 입구가 약 55도, 라디에이터 출구가 약 30도, 2차 출구가 52도입니다. 증발기 출구 온도는 45도, 증기 압력은 0.17, 글리콜 배출량은 48입니다. 보호복 압축기는 0을 나타내고 있습니다. 축적량은 30, 폐수량은 약 34입니다. 음용수 압력은 약 98도, 보조 라디에이터 입
Роджер. Как читать надпись BI
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
Roger. I'm not sure I caught all of that. Go ahead w
هل أنت مستعد لتفريغ شريط التسج
أفعل ذ
جيم، ما نريده منك هو الاستمرار في استخدام خطك الدقيق الحالي وتجاهل ما سبق. ما نحاول فعله هو تشغيل بعض محاكاة LMS لربط ما نحصل عليه من نافذتك بما نحصل عليه من نافذة LMS لنرى إن كان ذلك سيساعدنا. لذا، عندما تتمكن من رؤية بع
Quest
This is Friendship 
Эт
Die Kamera wird jetzt verstaut. Die Gyrosensoren werden nun aktiviert. Fly-by-Wire-Steuerung. Die Gyrosensor
Direi che l'amplificatore fotoelettrico per l'allarme principale è un buon dispositivo. Funziona molt
لديّ أمران نرغب أن يقوم بهما جاك في وحدة التحكم لتخفيف الحمل على الدائرة الرئيسية A. أولهما هو التحقق من مفتاح سخان CM/RCS أو إيقافه. لقد انتهينا من ذلك، وعلى الرغم من فصل قواطع الدائرة، فقد تسحب المفاتيح تيارًا كهربائيًا ضئيلاً. أما الأمر الثاني فهو إيقاف تشغيل LOGIC POWER 2/3؛ لسنا بحاجة إليه الآن
11 Uhr, Houston. Auf dem Fernseher war unser Kommentar – der Monitor, auf den ich schaute, hatte eine Verzögerung von etwa 12 bis 15 Sekunden, da das Bild unseren Farbkonverter durchlaufen musste. Wahrscheinlich – Sie dachten, ich spinne, aber wir sah
Wi
Oh, sono bellissimi, davvero ottimi. Ogni modalità di controllo ha funzionato perf
روجر. بعض من "أكثر الناس حظاً" يظهرون في الخلفية. لقد قمنا بنس
Отлично. На странице E-9, когда вы готовитесь перейти в положение командного модуля, если вы хотите избежать запуска двигателей в результате коррекции ориентации, вы можете перевести ручные переключатели ориентации в положение AC
За окном слева виднеется относительно ровная равнина, испещренн
Roger. That's affirmative. We're standing by here for 
Roger. Étoiles 25 et 42; différence d'angle 5 balles;, plus 00165, plus 00186, 
アクエリアス、ヒ
Gemini VIII. Qui è Houston. Non sei o
«Дружба Семь», это связь с командным пунктом Занзибара, читаем вас слабо, но разборчиво. У нас надежная телеметрическ
Was für eine Aussich
こんにちは、カナリア・キャップ・コム。オーロラ・セブン。はっきりと聞
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입
Roger, Joe. Merci b
गुआयमास, यह मिथुन राशि का चौथा अंक है। हमें तुरंत यह तय करना होगा कि आप चाहते हैं कि मैं इस आखिरी काम को पूरा करने के लिए वाकई में बहुत मेहनत करूं या 
了解しました。11です。その説明は理解しました。アフガニスタンとパキスタンの間に雲の影が落ちているのが見えると思いますが、その影の長さはどれくらいだと思い
了解しました。パッドは、月と太陽の観測時の姿勢測定のための粗い直線角度です。進入時の粗い直
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。ロール0度で停止すると、ピッチ角約90度、ヨー角0度、ロール角0度になります。その姿勢から、最初のオプション3を実行してください。その後、0度への移動前か移
Роджер. Ему эти схемы на самом деле
حسنًا
로저
Well, we're working on that some more. I'm not sure that the whole thing is lost yet. It appears that our problem is one where the light intensity which is sensed by our light meter in there is picking up an average field which is much larger than the earth, and so it's sensing a great deal of deep space environment which is dark, and we're suspicious that this is probably opening up the lens aperture as wide as it will 
Кажется, у меня получается лучше. Сейчас я касаюсь только этих 
了解。アポロランドマークNo.15 
Très bien, Jack. On peu
وفي الصفحة التالية، 
はい。平均ですね。小さな黄色い埃の塊が目の前を漂っていまし
روجر. كما ترى، أنا لستُ دقيقًا تمامًا في الدوران. لا داعي للقلق. سأُدخلها في وضعية الدخول فور وصولي إلى هنا. حسنًا. هي الآن في مرحلة العودة من حيث الدوران. حسنًا. المنظار يُ
はい、11番で
Ich glaube nic
你的手表呢？你的秒表带了吗
Aurora Seven, ici Indian Cap Com. Je n'ai pas entendu l'intégralité de votre transmission, mais la partie que j'ai écoutée était parfaitement 
C'est confirmé. La communication était excellente 
Rog
Roger. Wally, I think we're losing you. Will you stand by for
C'est à peu près pareil de toute façon, 
Bon, i
Роджер. 9-Чарли 137. 2+02. 01 день 03 часа 40
11, Houston. Abbiamo notato che, mentre
わかりました。コピーする前に、ここで全部読んで、私たちが何を話しているのか理解してもらいましょう。この短い手紙のタイトルは「テレビと映画写真の相関実験」です。彼らがやりたいのは、望遠レンズを取り付けたテレビカメラをブラケットに取り付け、ランデブーウィンドウに設置し、赤と青のフィルターを通して地球のテレビ画像を撮影することです。フィルター1つにつき1分、つまり赤と青のフィルターを個別に撮影します。次に、赤色フィルター（この場合は25アルファフィルター）と偏光フ
Gemi
Хорошо. Надеюсь, когда вы отправи
Friendship Seven, Guaymas. J'ai dit que j'avais une indication de rétraction de la lunette. Vous dites que votr
Roger, Mike. Vorrei fare qualche commento sui dati. La manovra automatica è stata piuttosto precisa. Sembra che abbiamo individuato un punto substellare nella manovra; l'ottica automatica ha posizionato Canopus esattamente dove dovrebbe essere; il controllo dell'impulso minimo ha funzionato
네, 제 생각
Roger. Understand. Everything is fine. We should have a helo to you in about 5 or 10 minutes after 
Roger. Bitte warten. Ich gebe einen Statusbericht. Ich befinde mich in der Orbitlage für Ihre Verfolgung. Statusbericht folgt: Alle Sicherungen sind auf Position 1, außer der für die Trennung des Turms auf Position 2. Notfall-Rücklaufsequenz, Notfall-Rücklauf und Notfall-Bremsfallschirm befinden sich in der Mittelstellung „Aus“. Der Zünder ist scharf. Automatischer Rücklauf ist deaktiviert. Gyroskop normal. Alle T-Griffe befinden sich in der Position „Ein“. Rücklaufverzögerung normal. Kabinenbeleuchtung ist auf beiden Seiten eingeschaltet. Fotolichter sind weiterhin an. Telemetrie-Niederfrequenz ist eingeschaltet. Rettungshilfen sind auf Automatik. Ah, die Lichter für den Abwurfturm und die Trennungskapsel sind aus. Der Druckregler befindet sich weiterhin in der Position „Ein“. Die Startkontrolle ist eingeschalt
わかってるよ。ジムがプログラムの一つで失敗
Вероятно, мы также получим обратный отсчет с земли. Будет н
侧面，我们处于最小死区姿态保持状态；接触时，我加大了推力 X；不久之后，姿态出现了明显的振荡，推进器也开始点火，所以
휴스턴 트랭퀼리티 기지. 제가 알리는 신호에 맞춰 이벤트
그들에게는 가장 최근에 형성된 특징만이 뚜렷하게 보이며,
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。話が逸れてしまいましたね。高利得アンテナのピッチ角とヨー角は、ビルからの要請に応えて、自動再捕捉（AUTO REACQ）位置としてどのような位置を設定できるかを尋ねたものです。同時にオムニアンテナを使用したくないという制約は依然として残ります。現在、自動再捕捉（AUTO REACQ）位置にいますが、どちらか一方にする必要があります。ですから、試してみたいのであれば、この情報を使ってください。そうでなければ、これまで使用してきた
ジム、分かりました。ヨー、ピッチ、ロールと読み上げましたが、レジスタ1、2、3を渡すべきだった
Фред, с этим самодельным контейнером для гидроксида лития в командном модуле нам придётся сделать как минимум два и использовать по два за раз — по одному на каждый комплект шлангов. Мы подключим один из этих самодельных блоков к красным фитингам, воздух будет всасываться через гидроксид лития, а затем выдуваться через синий фитинг. Также, когда мы это сделаем, мы снимем конте
Роджер. Я включил платформу в 11:50, как и было запланировано, но еще не в
Al momento è su CLOSED, e io ero all
حسنًا، لا أشعر بالملل هنا. لقد حلّقتُ فوق ميدواي منذ قليل، وألقيتُ نظرةً جيدةً عليها. أنا الآن أتجه نحوكم جميعًا، شمالكم بالطبع
다음번에 산소 공급 장치의 압력을 낮출 때는 800psi 정도까지 완전히 낮추세요. 저희가 할 수 있는 다른 방법은 없는 것 같습니다. 압력을 더 낮춰서 더 넓은 범위의 산소를 공급하도록 하
Roger, 8. 마이너스 29837, 더하기 02390, 더하기 00994 000 200 005 0169
Okay. Die zweite Aufnahme, die nach 32 
È incredibile osservare queste piccole goccioline congelate muoversi. Sembrano andare in tutte le direzioni, ma alla fine, dopo aver preso una certa direzione, si stabilizzano e sembrano viaggiare tutte nella s
双子座4号，夏威
わかりました。4行目です。開ける - 左から5つ開ける - 訂正 - 最初の5つを閉じ、CABIN FAN 1を開けます。GLYCOL PUMPの回路ブレーカー3つを閉じます。COMMANDER'S AUDIOを除くすべてのCOMMブレーカーを開け、COMMANDER'S AUDIOを閉じます。すべてのブレーカーを開ける - 訂正 - 最初の3つのブレーカーを開き、/、STANDBY、OPERATE
अभी मैं बेहतर तरीके से पैंतरेब
Ah, Jack Schmitt's working w
Tranquillité, Houston. Roge
D'accord, Joe. Comprends bien que l'attitude du JETT sera similaire à celle d'un largage normal du module de service, c'est-à-dire vers le haut et hors du plan, et dès que j'aurai terminé la manœuvre pour adopter l'attitude JETT gauche, je me précipiterai pour fermer l'écoutille, en m'assurant que la soupape de v
Roger, Jim. Ho una breve procedura che vorrei leggerti e vorrei spiegarti di cosa si tratta. La tua matrice W condivideva alcune posizioni di memoria con; quindi, la matrice W che hai adesso non è buona, e non vorremmo che continuassi i tuoi avvistamenti con quella matrice. Quindi la procedura che ti darò farà sì che la matrice si reinizializzi prima del prossimo, quando entrerai. E questo ti riporterà al valore della matrice W che hai caricato dopo, ricordi, quel 3303. E se questo dovesse avere ulteriori effetti sul piano di volo, stiamo risolvendo la questione
Roger. Point suivant: le taux de montée en pression de l'hélium supercritique est nominal. Vous nous avez également interrogés sur l'activité de vos propulseurs lors de la dernière rotation. Nous comprenons maintenant: vous avez indiqué que le tangage était en mode ACCEL COMMAND et le lacet et le roulis en
So, da haben wir's. Übrigens, wir haben allerlei Neuigkeiten für euch bekommen. Wir haben Baseball- und B
Ich werde deine Idee zur 
Громк
Ehi! Li ho visti andare nella direzione oppost
네.
네, 맞습니다. 스위치에 전
Negative. I would like you 
唯一の問題は、ここ
एक
로저, 휴스턴. 여기는 아폴로 8호입
我们觉
Roger, got that time hack, and am standing by for the Δ
Хорошо. В тот мом
للعلم يا فانس، قبل حوالي نصف ساعة، لم نتمكن أنا وجاك من رؤية الأبراج والنجوم في بعض وضعيات المركبة الفضائية. كنا نرى برج العقرب والقوس، ونجوماً أخرى مثل النسر الطائر والنسر النسر وألفا قنطورس والنسر الواقع، وهي نجوم من هذا القدر، وقد توقف هبوب دخاننا، مما يسم
짐은 다시 낮 시간대에 관측하기 시작했고, 저도 다시 꽤 좋은 별들을 볼 수 있게 됐어요. 지금 제 바로 앞에 독수리자리가 보이
حسنًا، نعم. لم نُهيّئ حلقة البدلة بالكامل لضمان تدفق كامل، وهي جيدة كما هي. أنصحك بتجهيز الكيس الخاص بالقائد، ولكن لا تُدخل الخرطوم حتى نطلب
أعود إلى هنا. أمام النافذة. أمام لوحة العدادات. سأنزل إلى الأرضية. إذا احتجتَ إليّ في أي تجربة... D-8 مُطفأ حاليًا. اكتملت هذه الج
سنقوم بحذف المرحلة الثالثة من الدورة، وقد رفعنا موعد الدخول إلى
Roger. I think it's got X-ray ey
好的，谢谢。机上读数显示，四轴飞
Tranquility Base, Houston.
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. AFT OMNI와 연결하고 싶습니다. 추적을 다시 설정하는 동안 약 1분간 통신이 끊길 예정입니다. 최신 데이터에 따르면 달에 가장 가까이 접
ठीक है। 200 दर्ज करने के बाद, हम PRO मोड चालू करते हैं। हमें 0688 की एक चमकती हुई छवि दिखाई देगी। फिर हम 74 घंटों के 
Да, 
はい。 はかな
Tu sais, j'ai regardé en bas. J'ai cru voir mon anneau en D qui dépassait. Mais je le sens maintenant, il est dans s
يبدو أن أداء المحركات الربا
ठीक है, इससे संरचना स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई देने लगेगी, और मैं इसे अनंत तक ले जाऊंगा और
Okay. Wir möchten, dass Jack bestätigt, dass die Pyrolysegeräte in LOGIC sicher sind, und wir möchten ihn daran erinnern, bis minus 2 plus 30 keine weiteren 
D'accord, nous revoilà sur la bande UHF. C'étaient bien les lucioles que vous avez décrites au le
Понял. В космическом корабле всё готово. Всё и
मुझे नहीं पता। धूप आँखों में चुभती है, गस। मुझे नहीं लगता कि हम ऐसा करेंगे। एड ने हेलमेट ऊपर करके और फिर नीचे करके सोने की कोशिश की है और अभी उसने उसे थोड़ा ऊपर कर लिया है। उसे धूप से परेशानी हो रही है। मैंने भी कोशिश की, पर मैं नहीं
Ok. Inizia a meno 6 ore e mezza. Dovrai ricomprare assorbenti e assorbenti, e non so se vuoi copiarli o no. Questa è una cosa che posso leggerti. Passo. Senza che tu copi a meno che tu non lo voglia 
Voyons voir. À Springfield, dans le Missouri, Mickey Owen, l'ancien receveur des Dodgers de Brooklyn, entré dans l'histoire en laissant échapper une troisième prise qui a permis aux Yankees de New York de remporter la victoire contre les Dodgers lors des Séries mondiales de 1941, a décidé de laisser une trace indélébile dans les mémoires, au-delà de ses exploits sportifs. Quarante-cinq garçons et filles ont reçu un poney grâce à son geste généreux. Ces jeunes étaient invités à lui écrire pour lui expliquer comment ils prendraient soin d'un poney. Face à l'afflux de lettres, il a ajouté cinq poneys aux vingt qu'il avait déjà offerts; d'autres donateurs ont également contribué à en offrir vingt autres. « Je pensais recevoir une quarantaine de lettres, mais j'en ai finalement reçu près de 900 », a déclaré Mickey Owen. Passons maintenant à 
Nun ja, es ist gerade im Orientierungsmodus und verbraucht dadurch unnötig Treibstoff. Ich muss es vielleicht im Giermodus abstellen, ich weiß es nicht. Im Moment sch
मुझे उस झिलम
हवाई, हम सब अब साफ-सुथरे हैं और हमारा पुनर्प्रवेश के प्रति सकारात्म
Ok. Questa è l'ultima cosa che ho tralasciato. E mentre aspettiamo di decidere, lasciatemi continuare. La banda morta considerata accettabile è compresa tra 660 e 770 psi. 
Apollo 8, Houston.
إنها عبارة "التأكد من أن السخانات تعمل على وض
This is Sigma Seven. I read you loud and clear. How do you read me? Over
ठीक है। अगर आप पेज E6 1 पर अपनी एंट्री चेकलिस्ट निकाल लेंगे, तो मैं वहां विभिन्न ऊंचाइयों के लिए
Vediamo se il farmaco antidroga riesce a trat
一切都准备好了吗？我要把它放回这边。它就在你东西下面。现在，我觉得如果巴兹想让他的相机向上
ठीक है। ज़रा रुकिए। मैं आपको इसक
GMT - von 28, die kommt gleich, die habe
제미니 4호, 하와이 CAP 
11番、こちらヒューストン。了解。アップリンク
네, 맞습니다. 착륙장을 드리겠습니다. 추적이 안정화되면 두 시간쯤 후에 여기로 올라오겠습니다. 몇 가지 단계를 더 따라해 주시면, 연소 시간에서 1초를 뺀 시점에 종료하려는 이유를 설명해 드리겠습니다. "DELTA-VX - -"
Ты достато
好的。我想你需要准备的设
我在飞船尾部看到的那些看起来颜色要深得多；当然，从尾部看，它们正好被太阳直射。这些物质似乎被烘烤过，并且呈放射状向外扩散，但在那个特定区域，这种特征从发动机裙边延伸的
रॉ
Roger, 11. Per la calibrazi
네. 여기서는 몇 가지 통신 점검을 진행할 겁니다. 다섯 가지 모드로 전환할 건데, 그중 하나만 일시적으로 통신이 중단될 수 있습니다. 그 경우는 업링크 백업 음성 모드로 전환되는 것인데, 이때만 업링크 음성 통신이 일시적으로 끊길 수 있습니다. 다운링크 음성 통신은 전체 과정 동안 계속 유지되며, 최대 10분에서 15분 정도 소요될 겁니다. 단, 고이득 안테나를 사
Ро
了解しました。今のお話からすると、3周目の軌
عيون جيدة جداً، حسنا
ジム、サイト
确认无误。请翻到第 27 页，激活，第 16 栏。在 SYSTEM Bravo 下：ASCENT FEED 1，PQGS 应打开；
Okay. That's what we're going to do. We're going to wait until the people get theirs, and then we're going to discuss it and coordinate things here, and make sure that - that we don't have any interface problems. And, if we have any more questions, 
यह अपोलो 11 है। र
罗杰。我刚
حسنًا. لقد انقطع صوتك في البداية، لذا يُرجى إعادة تشغ
يبدو أنني مررت فوق بعض جزر مارشال في الأسفل. كانت واضحة تمامًا، ويمكنك ر
わかった。受け
Хорошо, 
D'accord. Sur le panneau 225, l'affichage sera identique,
알았어, 잭. 절차는 괜찮았고, 그다음에 다시 돌아가서 뭔가를 해야 했어. 첫 번째 줄은 괜찮아. "BAT 5 and 6 OFF"를 
Jerry, A
Roger, Houston. Nous allons BLOQUER
ジェミニ4号、こちらはヒューストン・サ
イーグル、ヒューストン。ダウンリ
Okay, Jack. This is Jim. I just want to make sure that you're filtering the changes to the checklist that come up to make sure that they're absolutely essential. When we learn our procedures, we can only do it one time, and we can't make changes at the last minute. We'd like to do the best, the safest way possible, but unless the c
프레드, 약
Apollo 8, ici Houston. La batterie B devrait être chargée d'ici 2 à 3 heures. Tous vos systèmes sont opérationnels; votre consommation actuelle est d'environ 60 livres, soit 60 livres de plus que
간단한 실험 삼아 객
ええ、私もです。きっともっとひどいでしょうね。レト
बज़, आपने व
Roger. That's good readback. Now, we got one more procedure for you; and, right now, we got the rendezvous radar stowed and we won't be able to
Stiamo scattando qu
حسنًا
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입
تمام
いつでもコピーできる 5 つを用意してい
ह्यू
Die Temperatur beträgt etwa 65, der Druck e
रॉजर। ऑक्सीजन हीटर को ऑटो मोड पर रखें, या आप उ
Einstellungen interessieren mich überhaupt nicht. Ich weiß, das
Bene. 
Чарли, на обратном пути мы будем вращаться примерно на 270 град
Bene. Vorremmo ricevere da te un aggiornamento sul piano di volo per le prossime due ore, qui
ठीक 
ظهرت لي سرعة حوالي 30 قدم/ثانية على نافذت
We're on SIMPLEX A, but we're not due over Tananarive for another c
You might advise Houston that as far 
Selbst bei Ihrem aktue
Сесил Б. де Олдрин ожидает у
And, Fred, on this jerry-rigged command module lithium hydroxide canister, what we're going to do is we're going to have to make at least two up and use two at a time - one on each set of hoses. What we'll do is we'll connect one of these jerry-rigged boxes to the red fittings and air will be sucked through the lithium hydroxide and then blown out the blue fitting. And we're also going to, when we do this, remove the lithium hydroxide canister from the suit loop, either 
Roger. We've got some noise somewhere in the system do
Yo
मैंने अभी तक ऐसा
好了，
केबिन का तापमान बढ़ रहा है। सूट का तापमान भी बढ़ता हुआ प्रतीत हो रहा है। मैं इसे रात 2:25 
Hola, amigos, felicitaciones a Mexico y especialmente a mi amigos de Guaymas. Desde el espacio exterior, su pais esta cubierto con numbes--and es-
휴스턴에서 진행될 향후 기동은 저속 자동 기동 모드로 진행될 예정입니다. 기본적으로 연료를 절약하기 위해 11101을
알겠습니다. 그럼 현재 위치는 이 큰 분화구에서
Ja, da sind auch ein paar Steine ​​drin. Man kann sie fühlen, aber nicht sehen; s
알겠습니다. 휴스턴, 33번에서 세 세트를 얻었고, 이제 3
지금 카메라를 수납합니다. 지금 자이로스코프 케이지 해제 절차를 진행합니다. 이제 플라이 바이 와이어 
好的。这是我最后要说的。在我们等待您做出决定的这段时间里，让我继续说下去。可接受的死区范围是 660 到 770 psi。换句话说，任何上升时间，只要压力值在这个范围内，就能保证在大约 103 小时后压力低于临界值。所以，我们预期读数会在这个范围内，如果确实如此，就不会有问题。如果读
In fact, I can see clear down, see all the islands clear down that whole chain from up here,... I can see way beyond them and area H
Roger. J'ai quelques points à clarifier. Nous allons vous établir un budget. Nous avons déjà une première estimation; nous travaillons à obtenir des chiffres plus précis et nous vous les communiquerons sous peu. Votre utilisation actuelle correspond exactement au plan de vol prévu, donc tout semble correct. Nous souhaitons recevoir un rapport sur l'état de l'équipage. Nous aimerions confirmer l'idée des deux plans de vol; et, à votre c
कुल 
了解。システ
好的，迈克。当然，这是在G&
ठीक है। हीलियम का दबाव लगभग 37 है, मैनिफोल्ड का दबाव 182 है, और मात्रा 80 
Хорошо. Джим, я тебя теперь понимаю. И вот наш вопрос: есть ли способ сориентировать космический аппарат так, чтобы служебный модуль находился между Землей и Солнцем, чтобы можно было распознавать созвездия из иллюминатора? И во-вторы
Zwillinge 4, ich lese dich schwach. Ich habe ein neues 6-4-Update ohne OAMS für dich. Es
迈克，我们认为你得到的这些较大
객실 내 스팀 온
Хорошо. Попробуем угадать, Ча
휴스턴 이글. 4분
네. 프레드의 창밖을 보고 있어요. 저 멀리 많은 
로저, 프
Bene. Un
Amicizia Sette, non provo alcuna sensazione di assenza di peso, se non molto piacevole. Nessun effetto collateral
Right, sending TX now. And we confirm your TR — i
Я не 
分かりました。ただ一つだけコメントがありましたが、状況が悪化し、今
Wir sind noc
罗杰
И если вы сможете его найти, то обязательно отследите его местоположение или з
Et ce que je voulais souligner, je ne sais pas si c'est évident, mais… pour montrer l'avantage de faire tous les rejets juste avant la combustion, nous ob
Columbia, ici Houston. Veuillez confirmer. Nous avons une charge pour vous. Pause. E
포인트 알파. 41 06. 그리고 그게 전부였습
Yes, that's pretty straightforward. Okay, I see the Earth so I've very wise
了解。あ
Roger. Nota che stai iniziando con la tua, che è l'ultima attività programmata. Il tracciamento iniziale sembra indicare che la velocità iniziale a metà rotta potrebbe essere inferiore a 4 piedi al secondo, a prima vista. Abbiamo esaminato i tuoi dati di combustione e tutto è fluido come hai detto; tutto sembrava davvero nominale. I sistemi ora sembrano a posto; sembra che, in assetto, dovremmo essere in grado di cambiare le antenne OMNI per te, se lo desideri. Stavamo avend
Eagle, Houston. 
अपोलो 8 में, हम इन कोणों के साथ जो करना चाहते हैं, वह पैनल 2 पर ऑटो रिसेप्शन मोड में सेट करना है, जो हाई-गेन एंटीना के ट्रैकिंग के अंतर्गत है, और इसकी निचली स्थिति में रिसेप्शन लिखा होगा, और पोजीशन डायल
,. Be advised I sent TX twice. I've had spa
Aurora Seven. 
And how about the ASCENT ECA
Вэнс, ты сказал мне удерживать правый угол рыскания или хочешь, чтобы я начал его сейч
프렌드십 세븐,
지금처럼 바쁘지 않을 때 조종 능력 테스트를 진행하겠습니다. 수동 핸들을 잡는 것, 정확히 그 위치에 놓았습니다. 요(yaw) 자세를 조절하는 핸들을 잡는 것. 정확히 20도로 맞췄습니다. 
Boresight star is 
Alle Systeme hier vor Ort sind in Ordnung. Wir bekomme
알겠습니다, 잭. 기체가 피치와 롤 방
Roger. Area 36-4 4 40 and 120; 1+06. 2+31. 23 Hours, 38:08. 2+48. 8+44. 36-4 without maneu
Ken, bei diesem Manöver 7, werden wir die Daten, die wir vor einiger Zeit gesammelt haben, verwerfen, oder steht ein neues Manöver an, oder was ist in dieser Hins
C'è una foto scattata nella parte posteriore destra della navicella, che mostra la gonna dello stadio di discesa, e mostra un notevole oscuramento del colore della superficie, con una quantità piuttosto minima di radiazio
Très bien. Désactivez la fonction EMS. Que diriez-vous de passer en mode ATT D
このデータの
مرحباً، أبولو 11. هيوستن. نود منك أن تب
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。请您停止直接供氧，并等待您的确认
Apollo 
没错
Du kannst ihm sagen, dass es uns gut gefällt. Sie waren sogar mit den vorherigen zufr
Понятно, хорошо. С
J'en ai probablement trop dit. Et
Roger. On the food and water report, both Pil
गुंबद का तापमान 70 डिग्री पर स्थिर है। केबिन का गुंबद 50 डिग्री पर है। सूट का प्रवेश द्वार 62 डिग्री पर आरामदायक है। सूट का दबाव 5 psi पर स्थिर है। रंगीन 
Écoute, je ne me raserai pas. Je sui
रॉजर। पहले ह
Ok, Jim. È ora
حسنًا. أعتقد أنني قرأت أنك جاهز. نسيت... سماعات الأذن. الأمر بسيط، كل ما عليك فعله هو إخراج زوج ثانٍ من الخراطيش من وحدة التحكم، ووضع شريط لاصق رمادي اللون، مع توجيه الجانب اللاصق للخارج، حول جوانب كل خرطوشة جديدة بالقرب من الأعلى، ثم أخذ قطعة من ورق مقوى وتقطيعها إلى أربعة مربعات، طول ضلع كل منها حوالي 5 إلى 7.5 سم، وثنيها بزاوية قائمة لتشكيل دعامات الزوايا، ولصقها بالشريط اللاصق بحيث تبرز وتت
Voici un reportage d'Harry Rosenthal, de l'Associated Press de Houston. Deux Pères Noël ont illuminé la veille de Noël du petit Jeffrey Lovell, âgé de deux ans. Le premier a frappé à sa porte et lui a apporté des cadeaux. Le second a ramené son papa sur la Lune. Le premier portait un costume rouge et une barbe blanche, et son « ho, ho! » résonnait si fort qu'on l'entendait à plusieurs kilomètres. Le second était un énorme moteur crachant des flammes derrière la Lune, et des milliers de personnes attendaient la confirmation de son allumage. « Sachez qu'il y a un Père Noël », furent les premiers mots d'Apollo 8, sortant du silence radio pour annoncer au monde entier, quinze minutes après les faits, que le moteur avait réussi sa combustion critique. « Aucun d'entre nous ne s'attend à recevoir un plus beau cadeau de Noël que celui-ci », déclara Ken Mattingly, du centre de contrôle des missions. « Remerciez de notre part tous ceux qui sont restés sur Terre. Vous savez que nous n'aurions rien pu faire sans vous », répondit le colonel Frank Borman, commandant du vaisseau. À ce moment précis, un sapin de Noël s'illumina devant les consoles du centre de contrôle des missions, et l'astronaute Harrison Schmidt lut à l'équipage une version spatiale du conte « La visite de Saint Nicolas ».
Je veux dire, la consommation d'essence était bien plus élevée que ce que j'avais imaginé. Je pensais pouvoir égaler le simulateur… et je n'y suis pas arrivé. Je
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。REACQ角度は、ピッチでマイナス45度、ヨーでプラス90度、そして
好的，吉姆。我们替你做决定；这是我们一直想跟你讨论的话题。我们一直在考虑这个问题，我们的想法是——当然，最终决定权在你，但就我们权衡利弊来看，你刚才提到的优点显而易见。我们在发射前一小时左右会进行舱门完整性检查，如果舱门损坏，你很难迅速钻进宇航服。另一方面，穿宇航服的缺点是，它们可能会大大降低你的速度，这还不包括穿宇航服的时间。甚至有人非常担心，穿宇航服一段时间后，你可能会感到太热，到时候我们可能不得不启动宇航服循环系统来通风，而我们并不想这样做，因为这会消耗大量的电力。因此，我们的建议是你不要穿那套防护服，因为我们没有理由相信完整性检查会显示除
好的，杰克。收到。没错，我会
- - 谢
نحن ع
Bien. Aujourd'hui, nous vous demandons de déterminer le biais du tourillon avant et après les observations, comme indiqué dans la procédure. L'objectif est de vérifier si un effet thermique peut induire des erreurs dans la lecture angulaire du sextant. Le biais mesuré au préalable doit être pris en compte: appuyez sur PROCEED sur NOUN 87 après avoir obtenu deux mesures consécutives à 0,003 degré près. Déplacez ensuite le tourillon de quelques degrés entre les deux mesures. La Terre devrait apparaître beaucoup plus petite dans votre champ de vision aujourd'hui. Vous êtes sans doute bien plus qualifié que nous pour nous renseigner à ce sujet, mais pour garantir une bonne mesure de l'angle entre l'étoile et l'horizon terrestre, la ligne M du sextant (la ligne passant par les deux graduations et perpendiculaire à la lig
Bene. Eccoci qui. -2, /G&N: 63634; più 0,96, meno 0,23;; meno 0021,7, meno 0001,7, meno 0008,0; 080, 164, 326; N/D, N/D; 0023,2, 0:03,5 - Vi diamo mezzo secondo sul tempo di combustione perché è così breve - 0018,5; 44, 135,9, 28,1; e il resto è N/D. Imposta ste
Okay, Jack. Geh zurück zur Batterieladeprozedur, die ich dir gegeben habe. Um den Ladevorgang zu beenden, musst du einfach „Offen“ oder „Aus“ neben den entsprechenden Schalter schreiben. Also, auf Panel 250 hast du den Sicherungsautomaten bereits geöffnet; auf Panel 275 ist INVERTER POWER-2 MAIN B geöffnet; auf Panel 5 sind BAT RELAY BUS BAT A geöffnet; SENSOR UNIT AC BUS 2 geöffnet; SENSOR SIGNAL AC2 geöffnet; BATTERY CHARGER, MAIN B geöffnet; BATTERY CHARGER AC POWER geöffnet; BAT A CHARGE geö
这里是休斯顿。我收到一条呼叫休斯顿的语音信息；其他信号都断断续
Fr
앗! 핸들을 꺾기가 무서웠어. 분명히 정지선
等我们打
アポ
ターゲット16-Aに向けて滑走しました。バスラの飛行場
안녕하세요, 아폴로 1
是的，
Роджер. Я стыковалс
25-48은 부하에 포함된 값이고, 48.3은 부
Okay, we just finished doing that a little while ago. About half-way around on the night side the h
了解しました。21秒間に40%、というのが読み上げられた通りだと思います。残り
초점은 무한대에 맞춰 놓으세
روجر، هل
透过这台
إن شدة انعكاس الشمس في هذه المنطقة تجعل من الصعب علينا تمييز السمات التي نراها على السطح، وأظن أن الأمر أصعب على شاشة التلفزيون، ولكن مع اقترابنا من خط ال
ジェミニ4号、ジェミニ4号、こちらヒュ
На снимке, сделанном в Хьюстоне, земное свечение примерно соответствует ожиданиям. Конечно, деталей не так много, как при солнечном свете, но крупные кратеры видны довольно отчетливо, и границы альбедо тоже. А еще — хорошо виден трехмерный вид краев крупных
Lo pensi d
好的。这是一条通用提示，适用于您在循环或切换程序时，务必注意不要调用扩展动词。这段内容在程序说明中，仅作提醒。如果我们进入了扩展动词（例如 `and` 或 `an`）会发生什么？我们可能会卡在 `and` 中，不得不反复循环才能得到 63。这两种显示方式通常都不使用，这只是一个良好的编程习惯。我们只
Хорошо. Вот такая конфигурация нам нужна, и вот что мы обдумываем. Когда мы переключились на режим «Бак 1 — АВТО, бак 2 — ВЫКЛ.», мы обнаружили, что в цикле нагревателя давление в баке 1 составляло около 233 psi, что значительно выше предельно допустимого уровня, и если мы переключимся на эту конфигурацию для сна, то избежим загорания индикаторов «ПРЕДУПРЕ
कोलंबिया, ह्
It's hard saying what
Penso che sia andata abbastanza bene, Houston, anche se immagino di aver usato più gas di quanto abbia usato nel simulatore. La manovra di virata: ho premuto il comando di accelerazione e beccheggio e ho iniziato a picchiare, poi quando ho riportato l'assetto manuale di beccheggio su comando di velocità, per qualche motivo, ha smesso di beccheggiare e ho dovuto tornare al comando di accelerazione e premere quello che pensavo fosse un extra di velocità di propulsione. Nel corso di questa manovra, ci siamo allontanati leggermente di più dal di quanto mi aspettassi. Mi aspettavo di essere a circa 20 metri. Immagino di essere a circa 30 metri; quindi, immagino di aver usato un po' di più al rientro. Ma, a parte il fatto di aver usato un po' più di gas - e sarei interessato ai tuoi numeri a rigu
Хорошо. Это последнее, что я упустил. И пока мы ждем решения, позвольте мне продолжить. Допустимый диапазон мертвого давления составляет от 660 до 770 psi. Другими словами, любое время нарастания, которое обеспечит давление в пределах этих двух значений, позволит поддерживать давление ниже критического уровня примерно через 103 часа. Таким образом, мы ожидаем, что показания будут находиться в этом диапазоне, и если это так, проблем не будет. Если показания будут в пределах от 770 до 800 psi, мы попросим вас проверить давление еще раз примерно через 59 часов, и я расскажу о подробных процедурах через минуту. Если давление равно или превышает 800 psi, нам придется перейти к более подробным процедурам; мы попытаемся, например, получить данные от PCM. Возм
D'accord, et Ed a-t-il dormi combien de temps ces dernières heures
حسنًا. لقد تلقينا عددًا من الأفكار المثيرة للاهتمام حول هذا الموضوع، وآخر فكرة سمعتها هي تشغيل المنصة ومواءم
फ्रेड, फोकस इतना अच्छा है कि हम तस्वीर के ऊपरी हिस्से में बड़े इंजन के आपके चार बॉल वाल्वों की स्थिति देख सक
Acquario, Houston
제미니 VI호, 휴스턴. 곧 북극성
Wir möchten noch einige weitere Tests durchführen, und der allgemeine Konsens ist, dass wir kein besonderes Problem vermuten. Wir würden gerne die Ergebnisse von vier oder fünf weiteren Tests auswerten. Zuvor möchten wir einen dieser Null-Bias-Tests durchführen. Da wir keine Möglichkeit haben, diese Vorgänge im Downlink zu überwachen, bitten wir Sie, uns jeden einzelnen Schritt beim Umschalten und bei verschiedenen Reihenfolgen 
No, I 
Джерри, я также хотел бы узнать дальность и скорость нашего движения во время 
Okay, wir stellen das für Sie zusammen. Wir sprachen gerade über die Prüfung auf redun
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
こちらフレンドシップ7号、無人機
画面の右端にある明るく鋭い縁取りのクレーター、センサリヌス T。現在、パワー降下中の 1 分ポイントを通過しています
再び空を飛んで
大丈夫です。どうぞ。307、354、そして19.5まで移動し
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP
Okay, Vance. Wir haben – oh, ungefähr 8 Unzen Wasser – entno
Okay. (Sigh) Hold on a minute. Let - Let us go
Bis jetzt funktioniert alles gut, Charlie. Wir haben einen an der Wasserpistole und den anderen am Wasserhahn unten installie
위쪽
जेमिनी 4, सीएस
Roger. I reserviced it, put it to AUTO 
Not really, Jim. It has to do with this W-matrix. You remember
أبولو 13، هيوستن. م
Vance, si
वाह, चार्ली, तुम लोग हम पर बहुत अच्छे से नजर र
ठीक है। हालांकि, मुझे इस बात
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, ici Zanzibar Com Tech, transmission sur HF/UHF. Veuillez ac
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 추진체가 궤도 활공 모드로 설정되었습니다. 두 우주선 모두 상태가 좋습니다.
Хорошо. Я собирался сказать это дальше. На третьей странице мы просто вычеркнем пункт 1. А пункт 2 я уже включил обогр
# tuttavia
Il mio propulsore superiore ha un sacco di buchi marroni nell'ugello di 
روجر، ١١. بخصوص سؤالك عن شحن البطارية، نعتقد أن الأمر قد يختلف بين البطاريات الفردية؛ ويبدو أن المشكلة قد اختفت كحالة عابرة عند بدء التشغيل. من العوامل الأخرى التي قد تؤثر على ذلك درجة حرارة البطارية، وما شابه. يبدو أن شركة EECOMM تعتقد أن النظام يعمل ضمن حدود التصميم الطبيعية. انته
不对，迈克。如果你看一下图表（我们会
是的，
Neil
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We're wondering if you've started into th
Boy, that rate command's a delight
هذا صحيح يا جاك. وأغلق صمام التفاعل في
I guess the world really
巴兹，从你左肩那边看进去的视野非常好，我们可以看到上升发动机罩、上面的魔术贴，这就是
Absolument. Ils ont environ 5 minutes d'avance sur 
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في جهاز المحاكاة، إن لم يكن بنفس السهولة. لذا أكملنا المهمة حتى النهاية. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون، كنت قد قررت أننا لن نتمكن من الوصول، لكنني فكرت في الاستمرار قليلًا. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون - أو قبل مغادرتنا لها بقليل - كان واضحًا لي أننا لن نتمكن من تخفيض الضغط. طلبتُ الانتقال إلى المدار التالي. ثم... استعدنا أنفاسنا لمدة 20 دقيقة تقريبًا وحاولنا ترتيب الخردة المتناثرة في قمرة القيادة. ثم أخرجتُ قائمة التحقق، وراجعناها بتفصيلٍ دقيق للتأكد من عدم إغفال أي شيء في عجلة من أمرنا. بدأنا عملية السير خارج المركبة، وحصلنا على إشارة البدء فوق كارنارفون. كنا على أ
أبولو 8، هيوستن. ماذا عن تحويل مفتاح BIOMED إلى الي
Zunächst einmal: Ich bin im automatischen Wiedereintrittsmodu
Roger. Falls noch nicht geschehen, führen Sie nach etwa 148 Stunden einen CO₂-Filterwechsel durch und schalten Sie die H₂-Spülleitungsheizung 20 Minuten vor der O₂- und H₂-Spülung ein. Wir bitten Sie außerdem, nach 148 Stunden den Ladevorgang der Batterie Alfa zu starten (statt erst nach 151 Stunden) und ihn bis zu unserer weiteren Benachrichtigung fortzusetzen. Nach 150 Stunden sollte der Abwasserstand auf 10 % reduziert werden. Wir planen, die Kurskorrekt
왜 높은 곳으로 올라가 
收到。这里是友谊七号。以下是三十分钟报告：头部活动没有引起任何恶心或不适感。我惊讶地发现自己可以如此近距离地看向太阳；此时阳光直射我的脸，我只需用眉毛遮挡一下即可。所有保险丝开关的状态与之前报告的左侧面板一致。模式选择正常，自动，陀螺仪正常：点火器已准备就绪，自动反推装置已关闭。除手动模式外，所有“T”型手柄均已就位，手动模式已拉出，以便在发生进一步故障时可以立即切换到手动模式作为备用。救援辅助设备正常。着陆气囊已关
ठीक है। यह तैयार है, और अब दू
Abbiam
Нет, я здесь. Мы сейчас начнём выполнять навигацию по окололунной орбите, Билл си
Okay. Another thing to keep in mind is that we haven't seen the moon - we didn't see all the way out, and we rarely see it going back. We have 
S
好的。
صب
حسنًا، لنقل أنه عندما غادرت جاك، جاء فريد وتناولنا الطعام لمدة ساعة ت
That's why we didn't read you up 
A
Roger. Wenn Sie es auf AUTO stellen, kann es sein, dass es bis zu 19 bis 2
オーケー、バズ。飛行計画について、まずいくつか最新情報をお伝えします。6番目のミッドコースはキャンセルしました。そのまま待機してください。今朝は少し時間をあげます。飛行計画の2つ目の項目は、いつでもバッテリーBの充電ができるように準備していることです。3つ目の項目は、今回は少しやり方を変えて廃水排出を行いたいということです。地上からマークした地点で行います。機体が少し荒れているので、適切な状態を保てると思われるタイミン
不，我觉得太阳照到它们的时候，就
Coming upon 4 minutes. 
हम आपको हवाई के ऊपर अंतिम ऊंचाई समायोजन के बारे में अपडेट देंगे। साथ ही, कृपया अपने X अक्ष की जांच कर लें... यह थोड़ा सा टॉलरेंस से बाहर है। इसलिए ऊ
Apollo 8, Houston. Non abbiamo obiezioni a procedere con lo scarico delle urine ora. E per vostra informazione, lo scarico delle acque reflue... il nostro programma prevede di posticiparlo fino a circa il 90%, e questo vi porterà a circa il 90% nel serbatoio delle acque reflue. È un po' più alto del normale, ma vol
**
こちらはフレンドシップ・
روجر. أستقبلك بشكل أفضل الآن يا والي. ممتاز. نسبة الوقود 62%، والأكسجين 62-95%، والتيار 25 أمبير. جميع الأنظمة تعمل بشكل سليم. واجهتُ بعض المشاكل في التشغيل. قمتُ بإغلاق وفكّ القفل في الجانب الليلي، ويبدو أنه يعمل بشكل جيد الآن، مع أنني كنتُ أعاني من انزلاق 
Houston, potremmo anche lasciare i nostri TCA
Vergewissere dich
Afferma
صباح الخير يا
부스터가 분리될 때, 롤 노즐에서 연료가 분사되는 모습이 보였습니다. 부스터가 회전하면서, 우주선의 장축과 부스터의 장축을 잇는 선에 수직인 평면을 따라 움직이는 동안, 길고 유려한 꼬리 부분이 뻗어 나오는 것이 보였습니다. 비행 계획서에 그 모습을 간단하게 그려 넣어야겠습니다. 우주선 분리 시점에는 사방에 파편이 흩어져 있었습니다. 우리가 방향을 바꿔 보니 온통 파편뿐이었습니다. 사실, 부스터를 제대로 
That's the way
好的。在16号配电盘的断路器上，电池馈线（BAT FEED TIES）两个断开；现在你要仔细听高低电压的声音，电池1（BATTERY 1）高电压断开/复位；电池2（BATTERY 2）低电压断开，然后电池2（BATTERY 2）高电压断开/复位，再接通；电池1（BATTERY 1）高电压接通；然后1
ठीक है धन्य
출발 준
罗杰，你可以转告我我们看到了悉尼的灯光。我不知道他们有没有开灯，但如果开了，那电费肯定飙升了。我在最后一圈轨道上看到了。我们正好飞过悉尼市区上空，灯光非常
Bene. Avevo appena visto qualcos'altro qui con me, ma proprio quando mi stavo avvicinando abbastanza per scattare una bella foto, il sole si è messo di mezzo e l'ho 
Ich beschreibe das blaue Band. Direkt an der Erdoberfläche befindet sich ein relativ dunkles blaues Band, dann ein helles, dann noch ein dunkles, dann ein breites weißes Band – das Leuchten der Atmosphäre – und schließlich ein tiefschwarzes, das von einem gräulichen Blau in ein sattes Schwarz übergeht. Der Übergang vom blauen Band zur völligen Dunkelheit sieht fast aus wie unter einer Regenwolke. Ich leuchte jetzt mit meinen Fingerspitzen. Merkur steht direkt am Hori
...TVC 광고로 
Roger. The word we have is that you can't make a maneuver to the jettison attitude because those are angles we gave you, they don't correspond to the gimbal angles for
ロジャー、GOだ。TR
حسنًا. ضع مفتاح ربط نا
Credo che sia giusto. Aspetta uno.
ठीक है। हम फिलहाल पैसिव थर्मल कंट्रोल को स्थगित रखना चाहेंगे और इस बीच, पहले तारे से शुरू करके, तीन-तीन के दो सेट में जितने हो सके उतने और निशान प्राप्त करना
Да. Это вполн
Et si vous êtes d'humeur à recopier, j'ai — croi
Roger. Non sapevo che si potesse sentire l'odore da così lo
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. AELD 제어 회로 차단기입니다. DECA GIMBAL AC -
로저. 롤링 재진입을 위한 절차 양식을 보내드리겠습니다. OAMS 연소에 필요한 ∆V와 ∆T, GMTRC, 그리고 0.05g의 RET 값을 알려드리겠습니다. 또한, 드로그, 주낙, 착륙 시의 RET 값도 함께 제공됩니다. 절차는 다음과 같습니다. 역추진 시 기수를 아래로 향하게 한 상태에서 최대 양력을 발생시키십시오. 0.05g의 RET 값에 도달하면 15°의 롤링 속도로 진
Roger. We copy your burn status report. And the spacecraft is looking go
مرحباً يا إيجل، معكم هيوستن. لدينا تشويش في
Roger. Mighty fine. Break. The weather 
Ok. Per quanto riguarda le questioni più banali, ora che abbiamo lasciato la Luna, vorrei ripercorrerle un po' per voi *** gli sviluppi che hanno avuto luogo nel reparto alimentare. Sono sicuro che avete già *** un contenitore per bevande. Un po' più tardi, Mike vi mostrerà come funziona la pistola ad acqua con il suo nuovo filtro per estrarre l'idrogeno. In sostanza, questa pistola ad acqua viene inserita in questa estremità e riempie questa sacca d'acqua, e la bevanda si dissolve nell'acqua, e questa estremità del *** fuoriesce. Allo stesso modo, abbiamo altri alimenti di natura più solida. Probabilmente potete vedere questo pasto a base di cocktail di gamberi. *** questo pomeriggio mentre noi due mangiavamo insalata di salmone. *** un altro sviluppo iniziale è stato l'uso di cibo i
Riesco a malapen
Roger. Neil, it looks like your steera
Okay. Houston, DECA POWER ist
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюс
ठीक है, हमने - हमने स्थानांतरित कर दि
नहीं। मैं चाहूंगा कि जब तक मैं आपका
アポロ8号。
好的。我可能
नहीं, मै
やってみました。うまくいかなかっただけです。これでトレースは綺麗になりま
Wir sprechen jetzt da
कोलंबिया, 
D'accord. C'est co
Roger. Canary, TS plus 5 vérifié. Commande manuelle satisfaisante sur tous les axes. Commandes électriques et automatiques satisfaisantes sur tous les
好的……我们的下一个时间线
The responsibility for this flight lies first with history and with the giants of science who have preceded this effort; next with the American people, who have through their will, indicated their desire; next, to four administrations, and their Congresses, for implementing that will; and then, to the agency and industry teams that built our spacecraft, the Saturn, the Columbia, the Eagle, and the little EMU, the space suit and backpack that was our small spacecraft out on the lunar surface. We would like to give a special thanks to all those Americans who built the spacecraft, who did the construct
एसी1/मुख्य
Roger. Potresti non dover dilungarti troppo. 
好的。由于噪声干扰，我们漏掉了
Bon, là, je commence à distinguer toutes ces particules, elles sont vraiment très loin. J'en vois certaines à une trentai
Okay. Very good. Tell them I thank them
Roger, hai capito? "Potenza p
고출력 
Roger, Houston. Crew status report here. We're behind on water and food, and we don't seem to have too much of an appetite. We're trying to stay up with the water, but the food is - not that there's anything wrong with 
シグマ・セブン、
अन्य संख्याएँ क्या 
하와이,
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. الخطوة التالية هي أخذ
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any tim
ठीक है, मैं एलएम 
La combustio
Mi 
استكمالاً لما كنتُ أُقدّمه من معلومات حول الصاروخ المُعزِّز، في بداية الرحلة. بعد دخولنا الظلام، على مسافة تُقدّر بـ 1200 قدم، حاولتُ الحفاظ على موقعي بالنسبة له، لكنّني لم أكن أملك سوى المسافة بين الأضواء الوامضة لتقدير المسافة بيني وبين الصاروخ في ذلك الوقت. كنتُ أرى ضوءًا واحدًا، ثم ضوءين، ثم ضوءًا واحدًا، وأحيانًا أخرى، كان يمرّ وقت طويل قبل أن أرى ضوءين، مما يُشير إلى أن الصاروخ كان يدور باستمرار. لم يكن لديّ فكرة واضحة عن اتجاه دورانه. بناءً على المسافة بين الأضواء، عندما كنتُ أراها بوضوح، شعرتُ أنني في وضع جيد بالنسبة له حتى وصلنا إلى كارنارفون تقريبًا. في ذلك الوقت، بدا لي أنني أقترب منه بسرعة، مع أنني لم أكن متأكدًا من ذلك تمامًا. كانت جميع قيم ΔV التي جمعتها حتى ذلك الوقت في اتجاه الصاروخ ال
Okay. Se no
क्या आप मुझे कोई स्थलाकृत
저는 VOX에 
Was Fred da auspackt, ist ein Trinkbeutel, den wir in unseren Halsring stecken, damit wir auf der Mondoberfläche trinken können. Pete und Al hatten so etwas auf Apollo 12 nicht und litten deshalb großen Durst. Wir hoffen, diese Situation zu verbessern, indem wir unseren eigenen kleinen Wasserbeutel haben, aus dem w
你想要
收到，巴兹。你的地面检查清单有几处改动，总的
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, 
E ci è stato riferito che l'uso del
Il est tout à
Riporta il colore alla normalità. Ho preso una lettura del valore di luce del continente sudamericano all'inizio, ma devo cambiare il valore ASA. Il v
好
बिल्कुल था। मुझे लगा कि यह शायद एक से दो मील के बीच होगा, और मैं ठीक से
いいえ。
아시다시피, 시뮬레이터에서처럼 최소 충격
罗杰，吉姆。我们刚想到一件事；那就是，我们最好尽快把氢氧化锂罐从
كلا هذين الشيئين موجو
ओह। ठीक है। उनका कहना है कि उन्होंने आपको आधे फुट प्रति सेकंड की सटीकता से पकड़ लिया है;
그리고 저
Non, les déchets seront là - nous 
버즈, 그 사람 어때 보여? 나한테 
D'accord, Van
Okay. Right now, Houston, the voltage is - is looking good. And 
R
很难说怎样的速度才算合理。我觉得我现在的速度就挺合适的——跑几百圈之后会比较累，但这可能跟这身宇航
We believe the crater, the large dark crater between the spacecraft and the Sea of Crises is Condorcet Crater. The Sea of Crises is amazingly smooth as far as the horizon and past this rather rough mountainous region in front of the spacecraft
حسنًا. حسنًا. أولًا، تنص الفلسفة العامة على أن هذه القواعد يجب أن تكون مشابهة لقواعد الإجهاض في الوضع الأول مع الحدود الصارمة. الآن، سأشرحها لكم واحدة تلو الأخرى لتتمكنوا من نسخها. حسنًا. يجب إيقاف التشغيل في حال حدوث أي مما يلي: قراءة جهاز مراقبة الدفع 77% أو أقل؛ ضغط خزان الوقود - وهو ضغط المدخل - القراءة الداخلية 160 أو أقل؛ فرق ضغط الوقود إلى الأكسجين (DELTA-P) أكبر من 25 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة - وهذا يستدعي اتصالًا أرضيًا - خطأ في الوضعية زائد أو ناقص 10 درجات، باستثناء مرحلة بدء التشغيل؛ حدود معدل تغيير الوضعية زائد أو ناقص 10 درجات في ال
好的。RN，RP
Камера установлена ​​на кронштейне, а я храню её на дополнительно
बज़, मैंने यहाँ 39.5 वोल्ट डाल दिए हैं; ये बैटरी चेक के लिए एक रिमाइंडर है - दीवार पर एकदम 
收到。
Okay. Jack, das ist ein ausführliches Verfahren, das wahrscheinlich zwei oder drei Seiten dauern wird. Es setzt voraus, dass Sie sich in Ihrer Standardk
Apollo 8, Houston. Ricevuto. Inizia con X: meno 29840, più 02390, più 01053 000 200 005 01693, più 00600 29954 402 29788. Ricevut
Nur zu, C
Okay. Während der Aktivierungsphase geben wir viele gleichzeitige Eingaben (ENTERS) durch, lesen Ihnen die Winkeldifferenz vor und liefern dann die Winkel nach dem Anziehen, um die Plattform fein auszurichten. Planen Sie etwas Ähnliches ode
Je range d'abo
Хорошо, Фред. Следующий шаг — просто перевести переключатель датчика температуры и давления топлива в положение «Спуск 1», считать показания температуры топ
네, 
Roger. Wilco. Lo far
उन्हें तुम्हें भूलने मत द
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। ऑक्सीजन फ्यूल सेल को खाली करने के बारे में हमारी क्या स्थित
Roger, Houston. Gémeaux 4. J'ai bien reç
Guardandolo ora, proprio ora. È un... triangolo. Riesco a vedere tutte e tre le costellazioni,
フレッド、了解。機動目標はPCプラス2、今回はMPL（高度制限）です。そして、079、27、4013、プラス08144、マイナス00443、マイナス02226、遠地点はN/A、近地点はプラス00205、08455、420、268、261、プラス08155、マイナス00443、マイナス02187、はN/Aです。GDAは前回の燃焼からそのままで問題ありませんが、ピッチは5.85、ロール時は6.74です。アレ
ああ、
아폴로 8호
Base Tranquility, Houston. À vos marq
حسنًا. بعد تومي جاكوبس، لدينا الآن تحليل مثير من عالمة فلك محلية من هيوستن تُدعى روبي غراهام. تقول إن جميع الأبراج مناسبة لرحلتك إلى القمر. نيل ذكي، ومايك يتمتع بحكمة، وباز قادر على حل المشكلات المعقدة. كما تقول إن نيل يميل إلى رؤية العالم بنظرة متفائلة، لكنه دائمًا على استعداد لمساعدة المحتاجين أو المنكوبين. نيل، من المفترض أيضًا أن تتمتع بـ"حدس يمكّنك من تفسير الحي
Хорошо. Я сейчас скажу вам, где они находятся. Оба расположены, как вы и сказали, так, что дно ко
Похоже, вы пр
比尔，我们完全收到你的信号了。霍尼萨克尔上空的问题出在地面。你的航天器设备一切正
Это Близнецы 4. Кто з
Ого! Ух ты! Сделайте ещё 
रॉजर। क्या मुझे पृष्ठभूमि म
清晰响亮。
로저입니다. 11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 12개의 잠금장치가 잠
Es ist j
Okay. Wir sind bereit, Ihnen die Vorgehensweise zu erklären, die Ihren Computer etwas ausbremsen wird. Danach können wir Ihnen vielleicht weitere Informationen geben. Sind Sie bereit, zuzuhören? Beginnen Sie in der Mitte der Seite mit 
Apollo 8, while we are waiting for the high gain, I will continue the trajectory summary. We can still get back to the mid-Pacific line in from the thirteenth, and you are on your way after 138 seconds of the burn. That's 138 seconds, gets you clear of the butterfly region. We recommend not trying preignitions or restarts after 20 seconds. If you go beyond 20 seconds, this may get the trajectory beyond the correction - correction capability to a free return. The weather in recovery area is good. We have an following of and an without of. During the burn, you may notice a slight change in cha
아, 혈압
我说，我觉得那台电脑是在
Und die Notabschaltung, Neil, beträgt plus 10 Sek
わかりました。飲
Bene. Jack ha spento l'ANELLO 1 che era su MAIN A e continua a
我在外面的时候注意到吉姆的车窗外侧好像有一层东西。有一次我的肩膀或胳膊蹭到它，那东西就蹭到车窗上了，挡风玻璃的上半部分也沾满了，挡住了他的视线。我从这边往外看，发现车窗上厚厚地
Aqu
नील, हमा
Хорошо. Ваши полеты по орбитальной навигации 9 и 10 должны быть выполнены в соответствии с планом по
شكراً لك
इन खिड़कियों क
Sì. Hai proprio cap
好的。面板 250 上的两个断路器将恢复断开状态；面板 275 上的两个断路器将恢复断开状态；电源入口/落地后断路器，我
Yes, 
Я дам тебе только один шанс, а остальные отдам RKV, и ты получишь возможность вернуться на т
알았다
それは何か役に立ちますか
Je regarde par le hublot 5 ce qui me semble être le [nom du satellite manquant], et j'aperçois ce qui ressemble à des panaches doubles, formant deux bandes très étroites d'environ 3 degrés qui s'en é
Ce sera probablement un test d'observation des étoiles au sextant, Jim. Tout dépendra de la qualité de la plateforme que nous aurons. Et nous pensons 
Roger, 11. Wir haben
रॉजर। सिर्फ 9 सेकंड क
حسناً. متجهات نصف الوحدة للشمس: R1 زائد 45483، R2
Bitte warten Sie 2 M
... il controller è
罗杰，弗兰克，A区那个氦气罐——看来我们可能在这件事上不必要地打扰到你们了。据我们所知，它似乎没什么问题。我们召集了一些人讨论过，现在情况已经好
착륙 지점은 간신히 어둠 속에 가려져 있습니다
يا إلهي! هذا شيء، حسن
रॉजर, जिम। मैरिलिन ने कहा, क्रिसमस की सुबह आपके घर में थोड़ी शांति
That's affirmative, Jim. We'd like to - stand by one, and I
Ich sehe gar nichts, Gus. Die Sauerstoffmenge war am Ende der Hochrateprüfung auf 62 
それ
好的，13。这张照片拍得
रॉजर। 40 वर्ष की आयु में, कमांड के लिए सी-रीएंट्री, निरंतर के लिए सी-एडैप्टर और मेंढक के 
It's about 30 degrees of t
안녕하세요, 
Gut. Ich kopiere 0,04, 
रॉजर। फ्लाईबाई एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 62815, प्लस 097, माइनस 020 070 54 5944, माइनस 00028, प्लस 00023, प्लस 00069, 269 149 312 एनए, प्लस 00221 00078 001 00034, 01 2185 227 एनए, माइनस 0265, माइनस 16500 11899 36228 144 56 47, डेनेब और वेगा, 
Roger, ich bin bere
D'accord. Je me demandais simplement combien de temps il nous reste d'u
허리를 숙이는 건 꽤 쉬웠습니다. 이 과정에서 제 
रॉज
Oui, malheureusement, il semble que ce soit 
روجر، هذا صحيح. مفتاح سخان الأكسجين في نظام التح
Roger. Empfange dich jetzt viel besser, Wally. Sehr gut. Treibstoff: 62-62 Prozent, Sauerstoff: 62-95 Prozent, Stromstärke: 25 Ampere. Alle Systeme funktionieren weiterhin. Ich hatte einige unregelmäßige Flugmanöver. Ich habe den Käfig auf der Nachtseite ein- und wieder ausgebaut, und es scheint jetzt recht gut zu funktionieren, obwohl ich vorhin wieder in die Rollbewegung abgedriftet bin. Es scheint sich aber von selbst korrigiert zu haben, ohne dass ich den Käfig erneut einbauen musste
페이지 중간 부분에 비상 전원 차단 기능이 시작되는데, 그 
रॉजर। मुझे अभी भी एक P76 पैड चाहिए, और 
收
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Мы заме
네, 그랬어요
نعم، 
ومرة أخرى، نحتاج إلى تعديل بسيط في الوضع. أرضنا تختفي للأعلى ولليمين. أرضنا وأرضك. الاتجاه خاطئ، الاتجاه خاطئ. قليلاً بعد. حسنًا. لا بأس إن استطعتَ تثبيتها هنا. أوه! الآن تنزلق للخلف مجددًا. حسنًا. استمر في الاقتراب قليلاً، قليلاً بعد. حسنًا. تسعون درجة في ذلك الاتجاه؛ هذه التسعون خاطئة، الاتجاه الآخر. ها نحن ذا. قليلاً بعد. لا، الاتجاه خ
Roger You have plenty of time; you have abo
ठीक है। शुर
That's it, I think, the
저기 있긴 한데, 육분의 정중앙에 있지는 않네요. 아마 0.02 정도 어긋나 있을 거예요. 자, 이제 VERB 37, ENTER를 누르고… ENTER, 그리고 광학 영점 
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. ملاحظة حول تشغيل نظام التحكم: يبدو أنه كلما انتقلت إلى الوضع اليدوي، أو التحكم الإلكتروني، وقمت بالمناورة لفترة طويلة، فإننا نتسبب بطريقة ما في أخطاء كبيرة في نظام الجيروسكوب. أحصل على جميع أنواع الأوضاع. على سبيل المثال، في تلك المرة، عندما انحرفت حوالي 180 درجة، وثبتت على هذا الوضع لفترة وجيزة، ثم عدت، كانت هناك أخطاء بمقدار 30 درجة في الدوران، و35 درجة في الانعراج، و40 در
शुभ संध्या, जेर
——如果你把这些都对齐，那么你的眼睛对
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Nous avons perdu votre signal à cause des interférences sur la liaison COMM, au moment où vous décriviez la formati
बहुत बढ़िया
ठीक है, जैक। मुझे देखने दीजिए कि क्या मुझे समझ आ गया है। हम क्या करते हैं, जैसे हमने मध्यमार्ग के लिए किया था, वैसे ही पृथ्वी की ओर इंगित करते हैं, और फिर हम बॉडी-एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट करते हैं। फिर आप हमें उड़ान भरने के लिए एक बॉल एटीट्यूड देते हैं, और फिर हम चंद्रमा की ओर इंगित करते हैं। फिर आप अपडेट करते हैं - हमें कुछ स
... هذه خدعة. حسناً، فهمت. سأضيف ثانية أخرى. لديّ 08 زائد 51 زائد
Ripeti, Fra
حسنًا. لقد قاطعني أحدهم للحظة. عاد بوب هوب إلى فيتنام مع قواته، ويؤدي عمله على أكمل وجه كعادته. أحد الأسماء المذكورة في هذا الخبر هو اسم حاملة الطائرات الأمريكية "نيو جيرسي". مازح بوب هوب من أعلى برج مدفع ضخم يوم أمس - أو الأربعاء - لإسعاد 1500 رجل على متن البارجة "نيو جيرسي" في عيد الميلاد العشرين الذي قضته في الترفيه عن القوات الأمريكية في الخارج. قام هوب وفرقته المكونة من 27 فردًا بتسلية بحارة "نيو جيرسي" بعد حضورهم قداس عيد الميلاد على متن حاملة الطائرات "هانكوك"، وكلاهما قبالة سواحل فيتنام. قال هوب للبحارة: "لا بد أن هذه أكبر سفينة حربية من طراز كريس كرافت في العالم. إنها تشبه جزيرة ويك مع دفة". وأضاف مازحًا: "أعتقد أنه كان من اللطيف منهم إخراج السفينة من التخزين فقط ليطلقوا عليّ 21 طلقة تحية". مازح هوب وهو يقف على أحد أبراج مدافع السفينة عيار 16 بوصة. أُعجب البحارة بشكل خاص بمجموعة من ال
D'accord, Charlie. Merci. On va faire ça tout de suit
No, non credo che tu l
Roger. Auf mein Zeichen ist es 19:04 Uhr. 3,
専門家によると、それが不具合の原因ではないとのことです。層状化によって
Très bien. Les d
جيميني 4، كارن
ह्यूस्टन, कुंभ राश
Donc, pas de problème. Vos niveaux de consommables sont supérieurs aux valeurs nominales. Concernant le problème du réservoir d'hydrogène, nous vous demandons de suivre une procédure: il suffit de couper l'alimentation des deux réchauffeurs du réservoir pour le moment. Nous souhaitons vérifier si cela résout le problème de surpression qui déclenche les alertes. Nous allons examiner la situation ainsi pendant quelques 
И, Джо, напоминаю, раз уж ты об этом заговор
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston CAP COM. Wie Sie sehen, haben wir die orale Temperatur gemessen. Der Pilot k
يا فريد، نحن نحقق نتائج أفضل قليلاً فيما يتع
Roger. Grazie, Bruce. Un'altra cosa su quel numero 2, noi tutti... prima di partire, e speriamo di avere un'altra 
कैनरी क
Okay, Vance. While we're waiting, just for your information, the command module has 
रॉजर। सर्विस मॉड्यूल JETT के बारे में एक बात जो आपको जाननी चाहिए, वह यह है कि हम पुश-पुल प्रक्रिया की सलाह दे
कैप कॉ
对于S-5任务，飞越美国上空时将使用第32版火箭，而不是第3
Wie steht es um dein Gedächtnis, Ch
ロジャー。マルーン・ビューグルの続きです。ニクソン大統領は、あなた方に会いに行く飛行機に乗る直前に、サンフランシスコから電話をかけ、奥様たちを驚かせました。奥様方は皆、あなた方のテレビ放送に感動していました。ジャンとパットはここミッションコントロールから見ていました。ケープカナベラルからのインテルサットの打ち上げは昨夜、4度目の延期となりました。デルタ衛星の第2段にある窒素調整器の故障が原因とされています。今夜、新たな打ち上げが試みられる予定です。メキシコ湾流を調査している調査潜水艦ベン・フランクリンは、ジョージア州沖の水深1300フィートで、海底から10フィートから100フィートの高さを24時間漂流するという記録を樹立しました。このミッションはジャック・ピカールが指揮しています。ウォーリー・シラーがデトロイト工科大学の評議員に5年の任期で選出されました。彼は同大学の開発委員会に所属します。エア・カナダは、過去5日間で月行きのフライトの予約を2300件受け付けたと発表しました。注目すべきは、義理の母への男性からの予約が100件以上あったことです。そして最後に、月をテーマにしたロマンチックな歌が消え去るどころか、何百人ものソングライターにインスピレーションを与えたようです。おそらく全米で最も多くのレコード会社と音楽出版社が集まるテネシー州ナッシュビルには、
알았어, 잭. 그 절차를 따라 해봤더니, 그 압력 속에서 음료 10잔을 만들 수 있었어. 대
انتظر قليلاً، سأحضره لك. هذا يعني أن لدينا وقودًا إضافيًا. لذا، نحن بصدد إضافة بعض مهام التتبع الأخرى، وبعض ال
Dopo aver tracciato l'asse del corpo, possiamo dirvi quale assetto assumere sulla palla per 
आपको यह जानकर शायद दिलचस्पी होगी कि मुझे नहीं लगता कि हमें एक-छठे जी के अनु
今日は雲
Okay. Wir beheben gerade eine kleine Störung, die wir vor einiger Zeit bei der O2-Durchflussrate 
Leggevo solo 
11,
OK, les gyroscopes sont verrouillés, le c
Okay. And in line 05, column B, change from 11000 
请
いいえ、そ
Roger. Keiner dieser Sterne wird genau zentriert sein, aber bei einem Neigungswinkel von 115° hatten wir berechnet, dass Wega, Altair, Rasalhague und Deneb alle im Sichtfeld des Teleskops liegen würden. Die ersten drei waren auch bei einem Neigungswinkel von 91° sichtbar, sodass er mindestens ei
Okay, Houston. Sono d'accordo. Sto guardando il 14 e l'angolo è quasi centrato. È a sud di Crisium
Роджер, инерциальная система. И вот мы на 2-м ПАД. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, плюс 166, минус 081; TIG 080 11 3603. СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 81: минус 01408, минус все шары, минус 00743. Все шары, 196 359 00657, плюс 00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Секстант 23 1160 138. Остальная часть ПАД недоступна. Выравнивание, Вега и Денеб 243 183 0
Ricevuto. 
Volevo solo assicurarmi che fosse proprio quello che avevi detto
是的。其实快慢都行，我觉得。嗯，是慢。
Secondo i nostri orologi, la combustione è durata 1 
حسنًا. لديّ بعض الأمور التي أودّ توضيحها. سنُعدّ لك ميزانية. لدينا الآن خطّ تعديل واحد؛ ونسعى للحصول على أرقام أكثر دقة، وسن
Следующий кратер, приближающийся ко дну, — это остров Дьюк, а слева — кратер Маскелайн У., самый большой из кратеров в центре снимка. Это проверка положения во время снижения приме
Und in Houston wollen wir sicherstellen, dass wir uns 
没错。好
هذا ما أقصده - هناك أوقات يبدو فيها الأم
मैं अभी
روج
Майк, ты хочешь, чтобы
ठीक है, जैक। बस जिज्ञासावश पूछ रहा हूँ, क्या आपके
Yes. That is right. We are
जैक, प्रक्रिया शुरू करने से पहले, हम यह बताना चाहेंगे कि बैटरी A पूरी तरह चार्ज है और बढ़िया स्थिति में है। हम बैटरी B को थोड़ा और चार्ज करना चाहते हैं। इसे दो घंटे और चार्ज होने दें। हमारे पास ल
Нет. Сейчас всё в порядке. Мы следим за ситуацией и просто хотели сообщить вам, что мы изучаем этот вопрос. Если мы окажемся в ситуации, когда нам потребуется что-то изменить, мы вернёмся к прежнему варианту или 
ええ、私たちは全員とても元気です。ジムは昼食の準備で忙しくしています。ビルは今カメラマンをやっていて、私は地球の
Columbia
Apollo 8, Sie haben a
Джек, тебе нужно измерить напряжен
Another thing, Jim, is while you're maneuvering to that attitude using to control your 
Roger. C'est bien, Fred-o. Cela vous amène à l'étape 8, et vous obtenez un clignotement de 5018 lorsque vous activez le mode PRO. D'accord. À 5018, nous allons effectuer une manœuvre AUTO pour atteindre l'assiette. Il suffit donc d'activer le mode PRO avec les touches GUIDANCE CONTROL, PNGS; MODE CONTROL, PNGS, AUTO; et nous allons atteindre cette assiette. Cela va nous placer à l'assiette pour la vérification du Soleil. Nous avons une zone morte de 1,4 degré dans ce programme en configuration stationnée; donc, pour vous aider, vous pouvez appeler le GPS pour que vos aiguilles passent par zéro et, lorsque les aiguilles atteignent le point mort dans cette zone morte, vous regardez à quelle distance du Soleil se trouve l'appareil. Nous voulons une distance d
Roger. Je vous l
نعم، لقد
Wir können die Markierungen auf den Instrumenten für Glykoldruck, -menge und PCO2 a
Alright. And I'm gonna - you bug me when you get over 50 degrees of yaw, so I'll probably be watching that number pretty closely. We'd like to have the BIOMED switched to the right the fuel
जिम, यहाँ निय
This is Friendship Seven. I'll try to describe what I'm in here. I am in a big mass of some very small particles, that are brilliantly lit up like they're luminescent. I never saw anything like it. They round a little; they're coming by the caps
Roger, Guaymas. Wir haben den Booster noch. Wir sind jetzt ziemlich weit davon entfernt, und er verbraucht etwas mehr Treibstoff als erwartet. Aktuell haben wir 61 Einheiten im vorderen und hinteren Bereich in Richtung Heck, 37 links und 36 oben. Im Moment scheinen wir uns gerade noch so behaupten zu können. Das sollte s
Roger. I'll start a temperature for you and then work on a blood pressu
ठीक है। बहुत बढ़िया। अच्छा, हम तब तक इंतजार करेंगे जब तक वह यहाँ अपन
了解。LM重量、33627、CSM重量、36651、ピッチトリム、00470、ロー
デケ、それは 51 か 50 くらいだと思います。コマンドモジュ
肯，我相信是这样。这条光带与M线平行，我认为这与光学系统的设计有关，也就是我们从外部进入光学系统的那个通道或矩形入口。在这个特定的太阳角度下，它正好穿过M线。我注意到，地球和太阳都会对扫描望远镜造成这种影响。在六分仪中，也存在同样的光带，尽管它覆盖了整个六分仪的视野。然而，六分仪的放大倍率使星星清晰可见，并且可以在上面做标记。但是，用扫描望远镜识别星星就非常困难。我发现，光学系统的最佳姿态是在扫描望远镜中能够看到大犬座和猎户座的姿态下。在这个特定的航天器姿态下，光带消失了；我们处于太阳在我们身后的位置，我可以看到很多星星。昨天，在适应了黑暗环境之后，我看到了仙后座周围不少星星，而一开始我什么也看不到。但现在，这条暗
了解、フレ
Pensavo che sarebbe st
はい。あそこにLMP側の画像が写っています
Friendship Seven, Fri
还有，13号，休斯顿
D'acc
Dennoch dasselbe: Das Ziel ist extrem hell, und es ist sehr schwie
يا إلهي، لا بد أننا نقترب كثيرا
조, 내 수치는 거의 
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 분리 준비 완료. 시스템 권고 사항은 두 개
13; Roger. Allez-y pou
罗杰。我们完全同意。在你开始操作的时候，我先读一下这些笔记。如果出现程序警报 5.6，距离大于 40
了解しました。はっきりと聞き取れました。念のためお伝えしておきますが、通信機が失われた場合、7ポイントを消費するのは避けてください。現在のエントリーは問題ありません。着陸地点は、
아! 한 가지 아시겠지만, 저는 여기서 당신에게 아무런 도움도 주지 않았
了解。30、SPS/G&N：36691、マイナス061、プラス067 13
ジェミニ4、CSQ。アップデートするにはコ
Okay. Danach CB CTE, MAIN B, schließen. Als Nächstes Bedienfeld 250: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2 schließen; CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING schließen. Als Nächstes Bedienfeld 275: CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B schließen; CB INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B schließen. Okay. Übrigens: Alles, was ich Ihnen bisher gesagt habe, war nicht sequenzkr
プ
समझो। सूट सेटिंग में तुम 
Good night. Wish e
Roger. 33-
Understand you're ready. Area 9-Bravo. That's GET RC, 13:19:36; 400K is 20 plus 25; reverse bank is 26 plus 13; all of these bank angles, for all these updates, will be 90 degrees: GET RC, 14:17:0
收到，友谊七号。我们会在一旁
はい、確かにそうです
Роджер, и мы хотели бы сделать это в ручном р
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Вы готовы к разделению. Наша рекомендация по системам 
Под нашим домом висит табличка с
I understand you are reading us loud and clear; we are barely reading you. Would you go to in ACCEPT, please? We are going t
Forza, Hawaii. 
Houston, Apollo 11. Comment lisez-vous sur Brav
好的，杰克，这是一个比较复杂的操作流程，大概需要两三页纸。它假设你处于正常配置状态
Ok, Jack. Il passo successivo è prendere la scheda segnaletica e usarla per formare un arco sopra la parte superiore del contenitore; basta infilare un'estremità corta sotto una sporgenza in alto e l'altra contro la sporgenza dall'altro lato in modo da formare un arco arrotondato sopra la parte superiore del contenitore. Vedi, Jack, quello che faremo è infilare il sacchetto sop
Ja, ich denke schon. Ich dachte, vielleicht war das einer dieser Werte, die man nie laden konnte, und vielleicht war er nur kurzzeitig geladen, und dann, als die Zähler di
EVA が載って
That's affirm, Jack. We request that you go ahead and finish out the backout completely until you get to square 1. 
يا هيوستن، ربما بدت تلك المرحلة النهائية طويلة جدًا. كان نظام التوجيه التلقائي يقودنا مباشرةً إلى فوهة بحجم ملعب كرة قدم، مع عدد كبير من الصخور الكبيرة والضخمة على امتداد قطر الفوهة تقريبًا، وقد تطلب الأمر است
好的。所以我们开启了PRO模式，最终显示闪烁的5018；这里你需要的是自动机动，而不是手动操作，所以我们开启了PRO模式，选择GUIDANCE、PNGS；模式控制，选择AUTO。我们设置了1.4度的死区，这样指针就能归零。这时我观察了一下，如果像阿波罗11号的太阳检查那样，我
Bon, on devrait s'occuper de ce problème de roulage que j'avais signalé, maintenant que les scanners sont de nouveau opérationnels. Le rend
Roger.
双子座4号，CSQ。请检查一下你们的主电池，并
ठीक है, मैंने फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड चालू कर रखा है, और नॉर्मल मोड ऑटो पर है, जायरो केज्ड है, मैन्यूवर अभी भी बंद है। और बीकन भी बंद 
收到。我
حسنًا. ممتاز. ومع هذا الاحتياط، أعتقد أننا نستطيع المو
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Сейчас у нас низкая скорос
Roger. Ich lese dich gerade etwas schwach
Роджер, Джим. У меня есть краткая инструкция, которую я хотел бы вам зачитать, и я хотел бы объяснить, что это такое. Ваша W-матрица использовала некоторые общие ячейки памяти; поэтому т
休斯顿宁静基地。收到。非常
Понял. Земля на 24. И, похоже, уровень CO2 у вас поднимается приме
よし。日の
Извините, что это не что-то боле
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Во-первых, нам бы хотелось, чтобы уровень сточных вод на задней части самолета составлял 10 процентов. Во-вторых, похоже, что на данный момент нам не потребуется менять самолет, поэтому мы не будем связываться с новым оператором. В-третьих, я бы хотел, чтобы все ваши криогенные обогреватели были в автоматическом режиме, и мы готовы к зарядке аккумулятора, аккумулятор BRAVO; его хватит примерно на 7 часов. Если вы ляжете спать, мы прекратим зарядку аккумулятора, но на данный момент мы можем начать зарядку аккумулятора на аккумуляторе Bravo. И последнее, что касается вашей конфигурации на
जेमिनी VIII, हवाई 
다시 말씀해 
...지금 여기 별들은 너무 높이 떠 있어서... 눈으로 직
Friendship Seven, vous
기내 항법 시스템에 
OK, on ​​e
わかった…少しだけ、ほ
Ok, proviamo. Posso confermare una cosa anche a te, Ed? Quando eri in EVA, abbiamo ricevuto una trasmissione che diceva che non c'era stato alcun di
Molto bene. Era
네,
ठीक है। आपके अपडेट का बाकी हिस्सा यह था कि अगर प्रेशर 660 से 770 psi के बीच है तो ठीक है। अगर यह 770 से ऊपर है, तो आप हमसे 59 घंटे बाद वापस
Roger Zanzibar. Ti ho sentito forte e chiaro; come
罗杰。关于你这次的航向：我们希望你使用滚转角 096，螺距 356，偏航角 018。这样你就能得到六分仪星形 01，轴 253.8，轴
Конечно, сделаю. И, давайте пос
Gemini 4，Canary CAP CO
了解。チャーリー・デュークがスターチェックについてお話したいそうです。通信をスムー
Se può esserti utile, potrei fornirti un bit rate elevato sull
了解しました。疑似着陸地点でのAUTO OPTICSの使用を中止していただきますようお願いいたします。コンピュータに保存されている値を更新するために、再度ご連
收到。返回 BLOCK 和 D
그리고 찰리가 알려준 재정비 기동을 받아 적고 있어요. 5단계는 "각도가 초당 0.05도 미만일 때, 자세 제어 장치(ATTITUDE CONTROL)를 펄스(PULSE)로 전환하라"였죠. 그런데 어떻게 하면 각도를 초당 0.05도까지 낮출 수 있을까요? 제 기체의 각도 표시기는 아무리 좋아도 0.1도밖
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。9
Okay. Möchtest du das mit denjenigen besprechen, die möglicherweise
그건 아닙니다. 출시 당시 5.8 
Okay. Das ist richtig. Primäres Verdunstungswasser-Regelventil auf AUTO s
Okay. Ihr Zustandsvektor basiert nun auf etwa 5 Stunden Tracking. Si
Это верно. Температура в куполе в данный момент составляет приблизительно 77 градусов. Я оставлю её на уровне 5 как минимум на 10 минут
ठीक है। समय 32 घंटे 00 मिनट। निर्देश: पूरा होने पर, निम्नलिखित स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी करें: रोल 101.0, पिच 090.0, यॉ 000.0। हाई पिच माइनस 23, यॉ 93। दरों को कम करने के लिए सामान्य प्रक्रियाओं का उपयोग करें। वाहन के स्थिर होने के बाद, और स्पिनअप से पहले, धूमकेतु बेनेट की तस्वीरें लें। मैगज़ीन G के साथ सेक्स्टेंट पर इसका उपयोग करें। यानी, बहुत तेज़ गति वाली ब्लैक-एंड-व्हाइट फिल्म, है ना? यह डिम-लाइट फिल्म है। तीन तस्वीरें लें, एक-एक 5, 20 और 60 सेकंड के समय एक्सपोज़र पर। ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग करें। मान R1 प्लस 34717, R2 माइनस 08028; R3 प्लस 35075 हैं। मैनुअल ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग करके तीन तस्वीरें लें, एक-एक 5, 20 और 60
Right now the pressure in the cabin is holding about 5.4. It seems to hold up there. That's where she went at lift-off. It seemed to hold there for a while and then it gra
روجر. نواجه تشويشًا كبيرًا. بحر الأزمات يمتد أمامنا في الأفق، ويمكن رؤية فوهة بيكارد المظلمة في المنتصف. نحن الآن نقطع شروق الشمس على سطح القمر أو غروبها على سطح المركبة الفضائية. هذه منطقة أشرقت عليها الشمس مؤخرًا على سطح القمر. تبدو السهول القمرية التي ن
हम आपको आपके सिस्टम के बारे में पूरी जानकारी देने की तैयारी कर रहे हैं। हम सभी अंतिम चरणों पर चर्च
Okay, du meinst also, es handelt sich im Grunde nur um eine Anomalie, die durch das Umlegen eines Schalters entsteht, und wenn du dich an die 
plus 35, / 63023, mi
모든 곳이 그런 것은 아니지만, 분명히 바다에서 해안선 쪽으로 경사가 완만하게 내려가는 곳들이 있습니다. 다시 말해, 바다에서 해안선까지 내리막 경사가 있다는 것은 용암류의 흔적일 가능성
Roger, Jim. We thought you might be interested in knowing, based on 2-1/2 hours worth of track after your l
Roge
Температу
Gemini VI, siamo interessati ai Delta-V sull'avvio della fase terminale e sulla frenata,
Roger. In Washington hat der Finanzausschuss des Senats die Verlängerung des Einkommensteuerzuschlags genehmigt, eine Abstimmung im Senat über den Gesetzentwurf scheint jedoch derzeit unwahrscheinlich. In Austin wurde der Abgeordnete Ray Lemmon aus Houston zum Nationaldirektor der Amerikanischen Gesellschaft für Ozeanographie ernannt. Lemmon hat eine Studie zur Möglichkeit der Gründung eines ozeanographischen Instituts in Texas vorgeschlagen. Dies wäre das erste Institut dieser Art am westlichen Golf von Mexiko. In Minnea
ठीक है। मेरे पास आपके 
閉まって
지구는 여기서 정말 점점 
알았어, 잭. 내가 제대로 이해했는지 확인해 볼게. 우리가 할 일은 중간 지점에서 했던 것처럼 지구를 향하게 하고, 기체 축 정렬을 하는 거야. 그런 다음, 달을 향해 비행할 수 있도록 구형 자세를 입력해 줘. 그리고 나서... 달을 향하게 하고... 그다음에... 별이나 달, 지구를 향해 대략적인 정렬과 정밀한 정렬을 할 수 있도록 CDU를 입력해 주면 돼. 잠시만 기다려. 알았어. 잭, 또 마스터 알람이 울렸어. 배터리 표시등 외에는 아래쪽
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 배터리 B의 전압이 약간 낮아진 것
Роджер. На звезде 02: Там, где напечатано два набора, мы хотели бы сделать только один набор; а
현재 MSC 지역 상공에 비구름이 끼쳐 있습니다. 약 10분 전부터 비가 내리기 시작했고, 마지막 보고에 따르면 상당히 많은 비가 내리고 있습니다. 이상, 오늘 오후 아
收到。这里先传个下行链路信号，检查一下我们的甚高频（VHF）信号：
Okay. In Reihe 1 sind AC BUS A: TAPE RECORDER
네. 찰리, 이전 연소 때보다 과도 현상이 더 두드러졌습니다. 저는 사령선 모듈이 가벼워서 그런 거라고 생각했는데, 연소 시작 후 20초 정도 지나니 롤 변동이 상당히 줄어들었습니다. 그 후에는 피치와 요 변동도 있었습니다. 비정상적인 현상은 아니었던 것 같고, 중심선을 기준으로 좌우로 약 8도 정도까지는 롤 방향으
Und wenn Sie sich nun auf den Rückweg vorbereiten, wieder in den Vorsichts- und Warnmodus wechseln und die Funktion AKTIVIEREN, möchten wi
2、/：46427、マイナス053、プラス141、マイナス01350、プラス0000、プラス0000 000 175 358 00607、プラス00606 01350 009 01265 02 3112 197
Oh and I think 
Roger. Be advised we are presently in steam pressure MANUAL, and we're in H2O flow AUTO, and are now in
ロジャー。ジム、君が起きていて、周りが落ち着いている間に、他に考えておくべきことをいくつか教えてあげよう。一つは特に。君たちみん
Roger. Vorrei completare l'aggiorname
Verseau, Houston. Nous avons reçu une partie de votre transmission. Nous comprenons que la situation s'est considérablement détériorée et que vous s
ठीक है, फ्रेड। इसी के साथ डेल्टा का समापन होता 
我只是有点好奇，迈克；我以
नहीं। मैंने अभी तक वह काम 
इंटेलसैट 63 देशों का एक अंतरराष्ट्रीय संचार संघ है; यह पहले वैश्विक संचार नेटवर्क का चार्ट प्रदान करता है। नए उपग्रह की पूर्ण वाणिज्यिक सेवा 2 जनवरी से शुरू होने वाली है, जो शुरू में उत्तरी
هذا هو
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। कुछ समय पहले हमने स्कैन सीमा का पता लगाया और उच्च गेन पर ऑटो ड्राइव को निष्क्रिय कर दिया। हम चाहते हैं कि आप एंटीना को पिच 30 और यॉ 270
了解。ノーズスタブアンテナに戻していただけます
مايك، هناك عدد هائل م
嘿，弗雷
罗杰。02:3
Roger. Ami
Il ne me semble pas, pour le tapis que nous avons, que nou
حسنًا. سأشرح لك ما لديّ - أعتقد أنه سيكون من الأسهل شرحه. في الصف ا
... tous ces personnages l
わかりました。皆さんに理解していただきたいのは、私たちは月と地球を使う
Die Kamera ist verstaut. Das Photometer ist leicht genug, um es herauszunehmen und liegen zu lassen. Ich überprüfe hier noch einmal ein kleines Gerät, bevor wir Schluss machen. Der Wert ist um etw
W
上
Okay. On panel 16 circuit breaker,, BAT FEED TIES, two, open; and n
Okay. Let me get some... to you, Ed. I ought to b
ठीक है। समझ गया कि वे चाहते हैं कि हम जहाँ भी भूभाग दिखाई दे, उसके हिस्से की तस्वीरें लें, और आखिरी दिन तक इंतज़ार न करें। लेकिन आपको बता दें कि हम कुछ फिल्म बचाकर रखना चाहते हैं, ताकि कल जब हमें दक्षिण-पश्चिमी संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के ऊपर से गु
MITの写真をたくさん撮っています。カプセル経過時間03時38分38秒。これが唯一のチャンスです。フィルムを使い
쌍둥이자리 4호
Je vous informe également qu'un test SPADATS aura lieu sur la révision 34 au-dessus d'Antigua. Votre capteur ES devrait être activé de 19 h 20 à 19 h 35. Vous avez bien reçu? T
क्या आपको ईंधन और ΔV की स्थिति समझ में आ ग
00시 17분 30초는 4분간의 접촉 시간입니다. 방위각 99.5도, 고도 90도입니다. 반향음은 밝은 곳에서,
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。2月3日の地図更新、変更なし
好的。我们还要对之前向您介绍的流程进行一些小小的补充，这涉及到从……到……的功
迷惑だからできない
Интересно, однако. Падения, как я мог заметить, так и не усилились в скольк
Okay, Jack. Notice you've secured from that, and that was going to be our recommendation, anyway. We're going to have the guys in the back room look at it and see if they can come up with some - with some better numbers based on the cone angle that - that yo
给电池 A. Roger 
알았어, 조
Джим, я не знаю, насколько детально вы 
아니요. 당신은...을
जी हाँ। दाईं ओर, ईंधन की मात्रा की चेतावनी वाली लाइट को छोड़कर बाकी सब कुछ बाहर की ओर है, वह लाइट जल रही है। मैंने ऑडियो बंद करने के
D'accord. Je la remettrai sur OMNI 
روجر. بناءً على آخر تحليل لحالة الوقود، يبدو 
Ricevuto, Jack. Daremo un'occhiata e vi faremo sapere non appena se
Che furbo. - Il retro dell'ufficio meteorologico è finalmente uscito. Il primo scatto non vale la pena di essere usato, quindi lo cambierò. - Okay. Abbiamo tirato fuori il cursore. Filtro mete
好了，这样应该能
अच्छा। वे दोनों सो गए हैं; क्यों न आप मुझे कुछ खबरे
콜럼비아, 휴스턴. 저희가 운반할 화물이 있습니다. 받아주시겠
안녕하세요, 머큐리 복구팀 여러분. 혹시 오로라 세븐 읽어보
حسنًا يا فريدو. في أسفل الصفحة، نريد الخطوة 1، على الشاشة الوامضة 0406، نريد الخيار 3، وهذا سينقلنا إلى الخطوة 6؛ وعلى جهاز 5
Roger. Nous n'avons pas pu effectuer correctement toute la charge SPC au-dessu
Aquarius, Houston. Wir möchten die Anzahl der Gierimpulse, die wir Ihnen zuvor mit 21 angegeben haben, auf 12 reduzieren. Zwölf Impulse drehen das Flugzeug nach rechts, und das dauert etwa 3 Sekunden, wenn Sie nicht mitzählen mö
Roger. The series of cracks or faults across they drop down in about three steps to the south. The parallel fault pattern to the north has a drop down in the center. I hope all of you back down on earth can see what we mean when we say that it is a rather foreboding horizon, a very rather dark and unappetizing 
روجر. ما زلت أعمل وفقًا لتوقيت ما قبل الإطلاق 04 + 
S-5用のものを手に入れました。もう一度言ってください、アポロ4
نقوم
好的。现在，在飞掠机动的页面上，在你北极星下方，我有一些新的数字，因为我们把北斗七星和北极星换成了天狼星和参宿七。你还记得吧？——顺便说一下，这也是检查清单的更新，我稍后会给你——但是关于那个机动，我用天狼星和参宿七给你提供了三个新的角度，准备好之
Ricevuto. Dopo questo primo P57, vuoi un dump del
Это подтверждает правильность наших действий. Наш первый курс был 007 вперед, 005 влево и 007 вверх. Финальный промежуточный курс был 004 вперед, 06 вправо и 003 вверх. Это в значительной степени соответствует графику. В этот момент мы находимся немного ниже номинальной линии графика. При торможении мы набрали 27 футов в секу
ठीक है। हमने इस बारे में पहले ही सोच लिया है। हमने खेल की शुरुआत में ही इस पर विचार कर लिया था। हम इवेंट पैक को वापस पहिए
Квадратная дельта 245, 81 процент. P&C сов
We think the alinement's going to be okay, so we don't have to do this fullup alinement. We think the check is going to be okay
Sembra che oggi la vista sia davvero bella, con poca coper
Roger, I r
Okay. Man sieht, wie er mit der Schere das Plastikende von einer kleinen Düse abschneidet, in die er die Wasserpistole stecken wird. Die Wasserpistole gibt pro Klick einen kleinen Wasserstrahl ab. So, jetzt hat Bill sie drin, und das Wasser läuft. Ich hoff
Принято. Мы получили со
Be', non ne avevo parlato. Potremmo..
جيميني 4، كارنارفون كاب كوم. انت
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11। ह्यूस्टन।
حسنًا، من الم
알겠습니다. 지금쯤이면 VHF 통신이 연결되셨을 겁니다. VHF 통신은 약 40분 15초 후에 시작될 예정입니다
こんにちは、トランクウィリティ
不，我没看到。你可能误会我的意思了。我什么建筑物都没看到。你或许可以转告澳大利亚人，他们肯定电费飙升了。我们最后一次飞过时，我能看到。我清楚地看到了悉
It looks like a rain storm with rain
मैं वह नजारा देखना चाहूंगा। आप हमें उसका टीवी प्रसारण क्यों
明らかに、もし発射するなら、極軌道ではないはずです。ああ、少し傾いています
로저, HF 점검은 05:15에 진행될 예정입니다. 어센
罗杰。我们正在显示 N2
1A，9.5；1B，10.0；
Spero che la telecam
Roge
D'accord. J'utilise maintenant la lune, qui est à ma gauche, et c'est un bon point de repère. Je vais masquer l'indicateur d'assiette pour que vous puissiez observer le lacet. Je passe en mode gyroscopique libre, en essayant de sélectionner le mode de commandes de vol électri
Speriamo, Bruce, che la nostra pellicola da 16 mm funzionasse a quel punto della discesa e che saremo in grado di confermare la nostra posizione di atterraggio. Pensavamo che durante la salita saremmo riusciti a individuare alcuni oggetti riconoscibili vicino al sito di atterraggio, e abbiamo visto diversi piccoli crateri, file di crateri e cose del genere, 
Charlie, Apollo 11. Ich habe ein paar Fragen zum Anhalten. Mir scheint, der einfachste Weg wäre folgender: Wir befinden uns ja im Prinzip bei 0 Grad Gierwinkel und nähern uns 90 Grad Nickwinkel. Es geht also nur darum, bei ungefähr 260 Grad Rollwinkel anzuhalten. Wie wäre es mit folgendem Verfahren: Manuelle Lageregelung, dann 3 auf Richtflugregelung, und da unsere Totzone bereits zusammengebrochen ist, aktiviere ich die Triebwerke von Panel 8. Dann sollte das Flugzeug in der jeweiligen Lage anhalten. Und wenn ich das alles mache, während es 261 Grad Rollwinkel erreicht, sollten wir genau dort
Quelle vue magnifique nous avons aujourd'hui! On aperçoit un peu plus de la moitié de la Terre. On dirait l'Afrique et la mer Rouge; on n'en es
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. مرت للتو فوق إل باسو بحال
أبولو 8، هيوستن. فحص الاتص
Vance, is that with the s
Roger, Houston. Könnten Sie uns bitte noch einmal die Sextanteninformationen, die Sextantensterninf
حسنًا، أبولو 8. نبدأ الآن - نُجهّز لاختبار الاتصالات الأول. سيكون هذا اختبارًا للصوت في اتجاه الإرسال، وقياس المسافة، واستق
阿波罗8号，休斯
Hel
K
好的，迈克，事情是这样的——你知道，你当时坐在那里监控，在步骤 7，你进入了 NOUN 01，输入了地址，然后是 INFORMATION INFORMATION；在你最后一次按下回车键（35400 ENTER）之后，它就把你带回了步骤 16。然后当你按下回车键时，你实际上是在向实际的 CDU 输入信息；当你把这两个条目输入到寄存器 1 和 2 时，实际的 CDU 发生了瞬间变化，它查看了变化，看到了它认为它接收到的信息。我的天哪，我得到了每秒 600 度的速率。然后它启动了喷气发动机来试图消除这个速率。它所监测的速率滤波器——它监测的速率是经过滤波的，所以它实际上只有在温度达到一定值后才能感知到实际速率。然后它开始读取速率滤波器，并发现“实际上并没有达到600度”。于是它关闭了喷嘴并尝试降低温度。但在此之前，由于存在一定的延迟，这就是为什么温度会不断升高。喷嘴一直处于开启状态，并且由于瞬间达到的600度/秒的速率（疑似每秒600度），它们会一直保持开启状态。完毕
Et Jack, tu po
Armstrong says it's the hatch and - if we leave the probe and drogue there, we'll save us some time tomorrow
네, 맞습니다. 온도가 약간 낮게 측정되고 있네요. 슈트 온도는 현재 6으로 설정되어 있는데, 6.5로 올리려고 합니다. 그런데 별 진전이 없네요. 5분 전에 6.25까지 올렸었는데, 지금 슈트 온도 조절기를 6.5로 설정하려고 합니다. 돔 온
スーツの温度が下がっています。それは良いことで
Oui, je l'a
سيجما سفن، هذا مركز اتصالات واترتون كاب كوم على تردد HF. إذا كنت تسمعني، فإن قيادة كيب فلايت تطلب منك الانتقال إلى تردد UHF، ومحاولة الاتصال بطائرة الترحيل. أكرر، في ظل غيا
好的。删除“自动选择，16，关闭”。将“CB逻辑电源”更改为“逻辑推力电源 - CBS CS逻辑推力，4，关闭”。删除“DELTA-V CG”，向下移动到“信号调节器/驱动器偏置电源，1，AC 1；电源，1，开启”，其中是数字1。“电源至1；模式，3，速率1”，
経過時間は3
ठीक है, अभी हमारे पास उस प्रक्रिया के शुरू होने का कोई निश्चित
जी हाँ, जैक। मैं अब ये करूँगा कि हम कमांडर की खिड़की से पृथ्वी को नीचे की ओर देखते हुए रुकेंगे, और फिर मैं अंतरिक्ष यान को इस तरह से घुमाऊँगा कि पृथ्वी का प्रकाशित भाग खिड़की के ऊपर
了解。ちょっとしたレーザー視覚実験をあなたにお願いしたいのですが。もし、あ
Привет, Нил, ты хочешь продолж
...en descendant tout droit...
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。音声は明瞭に聞こえています。蒸発器の給水制御パネルのス
11号，休斯顿。目前的天气预报显示，您的灾后重建区域天气状况良好：2000英尺高度有零星云层，高空有零星云层，风向070度，风速13节，能见度10英里，海况约4英尺。昨天的预报显示，热带风暴克劳迪娅位于夏威夷以东约500至1000英里处。昨天下午地球卫星拍摄的图像显示，克劳迪娅正在消散，因此它的影响似乎比之前更小了。目前，您的灾后重建区域被认为位于热带辐合带以北不远处，您从窗户往外看应该就能看到。昨天还有报道称，更西边的地方出现了热带风暴维奥拉。它目前位于菲律宾以东约1000英里处，正向西北方向移动。热带风暴维奥拉一直在增强，预计将在未来12小时左右升级为台风；但是，届时它将位于您西部很远的地方。事实上，日
Un altro problema: in questo momento, Jack, sto guardando fuori dal finestrino destro ed è piut
Aquarius, 
Indica 
收到。地面
Не
Aurora Seven. Ici Ka
Frank, all indications are that there is absolutely no problem with anything in the computer mem
그건 좀 더 알아내기 어려울 것 같습니다. 마이크가 마지막
يا جاك، إنهم لا يرغبون
Хорошо. Лучше наклониться
... passe à la publicité 
つま
I'
حسناً. معدل نقل البيانات منخفض. قوة الإشارة لديّ 3.8. ان
Okay. Ja, warum isst du das nicht 
Okay. Übrigens, die Lichtgeschwindigkeit auf dem Mond war null, sie nimmt also wieder ab. Wir scheinen uns ziemlich genau in der Nähe von Censorinu
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。バズ、もし聞き取れなかったら、PADの読み上げは素晴らしかったです。時計の最新情報をサイトに配信でき次第、お知らせしま
Wenn es dir passt, Mike, bin ich
还有
알겠습니다. 안테나
Roger. Plus
Vier Ka
Fate intervenire gli interruttori automatici, gli interruttori automatici di controllo 
مع كل هذه الإجراءات الأخرى التي كنت تعمل علي
Хорошо. С
Второй агрегат в ужасном состоянии. У него неисправен по
La patina sugli involucri dei biscotti di pan di zenzero. Ha un sapore molto ceroso, come se... mi avesse ricoperto l'interno della bocca. È qualcosa di paragonabile a quello che c'era sui panini. Ne ho messo uno in bocca dopo averne mangiato 
Здесь очень тихо. Мы просто сидим здесь, давая двигателям немного поработа
ジャック、ヒューストン。君は良さそ
Nun, ich kann Ihnen zeigen, dass mein Herz noch 
Всё верно; это ну
تبقى لدينا 13 درجة على الكرة، وأعت
Conferma la tua tel
الرقم ثلاثة غير قابل للاستخدام تمامًا
Eh bien, c'est ce que nous voulions faire. Il semble que ce serait la chose la plus intéressante que nous puissions vous montrer, mais nous… vous savez, nous avons eu un problème avec l'obj
로저. 저희는 당신을 복잡한 절
« - - Lorsque DELTA-VX est égal à la valeur finale de DELTA-VX, » rayez cette ligne. Rayez «
Columbia, Houston. Potete sganciarvi quando volete, correzione, sganciarvi quando volete. Vorremmo che sganciaste Eagle e rimaneste in stazione - dentro e rimaneste in stazione, e vi proporremo
Roger. Veuillez me communiquer votre qua
Okay. We want to check the 
आपका यॉ 00 है; आपने य
रॉजर, 11. 31, एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 36691, माइनस 061, प्लस 066 137 22 3985, प्लस 32838, प्लस 06845, माइनस 02487, एनए, पिच 052. शेष पैड एनए है। आपके रीड
.16 à 3
还有一点要
روجر، من فريق الصداقة السابع. يجري فحصًا لمدة 30 دق
Roger. Bill has got his tape recorder back, and we noticed during that last dump, it was all in low bit rate. We wonder whether
Dovrebbero essere lì più o meno all'ora i
أثناء قيامك بذلك، لسنا متأكدين مما إذا كانت حقيبة الهبوط قد فُتحت أم لا. نعتقد أنه من الممكن العودة إلى الغلاف الجوي مع وجود حزمة الارتداد. لا نرى أي صعوبة في هذا الن
フレンドシップセブン、フレンドシップセブン、ムチ
Can you go to R
BEWE
... РЕЗЕРВНОЕ КОПИРОВАНИЕ ГОЛОСА... переключение с РЕЗЕРВНОГО КОПИРОВАН
Пола
로저, 20,000피트까지 내려왔습니다. 스노클 작동 준비 중입니다. 기내 압력이 상승하고 있습니다. 스노클을 작동시켜야 할 것 같습니다. 스노클 뚜껑이 터진 것 같습니다. 느껴졌지만 어쨌든 당겨보겠습니다. 비상용 압력계가 있습니다. 스노클 작동을 조금 앞
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。あと4分40秒です
Neil, I haven't been looking 
是的。我们认为您输入的应该是 37 06。如果是，请按回车键，这样应该会显示代码 00062，即备用请求。出现此代码后，请按“继续”键，直到出现空白为止
रॉजर, मैं 11-BRAVO, 11-BRAVO ΔV
मित्रता सात, भारहीनता से मुझे सुखद अनुभूति के अलावा कोई और अनुभूति नहीं हो रही है। कोई दुष्प्रभाव नहीं है, मैं बीमार नहीं हूँ; बिल्कुल ठीक महसूस कर रहा हूँ। मैंने
Roger, Guaymas. Gémeaux 4. La liste de contrôle TR-5 est
로저, 프랭
Манометр кислорода неудовлетворителен по многим параметрам. Мало того, что у него недостаточно шкалы, так в нашем случае он установлен настолько низко, что находится в пределах нормальн
At the tip of South America, there is a great swirl of clouds down there. It looks like a great storm. I wonder if you can see it
Ein strahlend blauer Horizontstreifen, während 
هذا صحيح. سيتم فصل قاطعي الدائرة في اللوحة 250؛ وسيتم فصل قاطعي الدائرة في اللوحة 275. حسنًا، لقد تعاملنا مع قواطع الدائرة في اللوحة 250 بالفعل. كما تعاملنا مع محول التيار المتردد 2. يجب الآن إيقاف تشغيل محول التيار المتردد 2، ناقل التيار المتردد 1. وتعاملنا
حتى الآن، يبدو كل شيء على ما ير
Roger. Wir haben Ihre Nachricht verstanden und Ihre Anmerkungen zur Kommunikation zwischen unserer Außenstelle und Ihnen zur Kenn
Une fois l'examen Aero-Med terminé, nous transmettrons d'autres données CLA et PLA. La température buccale du pilote 
And at the start of the O2 High Rate Check, O2 quantity was reading 65 percent. Cabin pre
रॉजर। और याद रखना, हम वहाँ कोई बॉल नहीं बजाने वाले हैं, इसलिए हम सीडीयू पर नज़र रखेंगे, और अगर हम इसे बंद कर देते हैं, तो वापस कहाँ जाना है यह पता लगाना काफी मुश्किल होगा; और, इसके अलावा
Un'altra cosa che potresti dare un'occhiata: mentre li guardi, alcuni vorrebbero sapere se riesci a vedere qualche effetto rilevabile sui finestrini sotto forma di appannamento. In particolare, il sole sembra variare l'intensità della nebbia, oppure la aumenta, la d
このビットビジネスから得られるものをコマンドモジュールの組み合わせに外挿することは非常に難しいと思います。なぜなら、燃料負荷が変わるだけで、宇宙船
Roger. Rouleau ter
자이로스코프는 보호되어 있습니다. 제
Apollo 13, Houst
Se riesco a raccogliere un po' del cibo di Bill qui intorno e a portarlo via... In questa zona si trova la cosiddetta stiva inferiore, dove abbiamo le nostre apparecchiature ottiche di posizionamento. Eseguiamo tut
Plus 59578, minus 00086, minus 05287, 012 080 018, nicht anwendbar, plus 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, Erde oben 005, rechts 27, plus 0398, plus 
Okay. W
Et, Houston, Apollo 13. Une chose que
Близнецы 4, Близнецы 4. Хьюстон C
في رينو، 
알겠습니다.
Установите таймер соб
Ok, Jack. Vediamo se ci sono riuscito. Quello che facciamo è puntare la sonda verso la Terra come abbiamo fatto per la rotta intermedia, e tracciamo un'allineamento dell'asse del corpo sulla... Poi ci dai un assetto della palla per volare verso... la..., e poi noi... puntiamo... la Luna. Poi aggiorneresti la... ci daresti delle unità di misura per un allineamento grossolano... fine... sulle stelle o sulla Luna o sulla Terra. Aspetta. Okay. Abbiamo avuto un altro ALLARME PRINCIPALE, Jack. Non vedo luci laggiù, tranne la spia della batteria che è ancora lì. Vuoi... - -... display. Okay. E la batteria numero 2 ha ancora una spia. Sospetto che
Questa è Friendship Seven. Sta di nuovo andando alla deriva. Indico
了解しました。わかりました。実行し
罗杰，弗兰克。我们监测的A单元氦气罐温度在你们进行的所有工作中只升高了1度，所以我们认为情况并不太严重。我们希望你们完成这项工作后，与其重新进行操作，不如直接将A单元翻转180度，使其处于较冷的一侧，并保持这种状态直到你们进行下一项操作，大约
حسن
Roger. Just a reminder here, we want to make sure you leave the rendezvous 
우리가 졌어 - 일찍 끝내는 유일한 장점은, 만약 우리가 출력을 줄일 수 있다면, 다시 줄일 수 있다는 거야. 일찍 끝내는 유일한 장점은 지금 크게 연소하고 중간 궤도를 돈 다음 출력을 줄일 수 있다는 거지. 그렇지 않으면, 달 주위를 돌 때까지 계속 출력을 높여둬야 해. 게다가 연소할 때는 실내에 있
わかりました。4行目です。開ける - 左から5つ開ける - 訂正 - 最初の5つを閉じ、CABIN FAN 1を開けます。GLYCOL PUMPの回路ブレーカー3
是的，
オ
Ok. Ho capito bene, Jim, e segue. Questa è la piattaforma per il decollo più 60. Il motivo dell'aggiornamento è per evitare condizioni meteo avverse nell'MPL alle ore 119. È la stessa che vi abbiamo superato ieri, e le condizioni meteo sono le ste
जिम, हम चाहते हैं कि आप इस कंट्रोल मोड के बारे में सोचें और देखें कि क्या आपको लगता है कि यह आपके मौजूदा ज्ञान के आधार पर काम करेगा। हमें थोड़ा संदेह है, लेकिन हम इसे आपके सामने रखना चाहते हैं। तो, एक बार जब आप अच्छी स्थिति में आ जाएं, तो मॉनिटर करें, न्यूनतम आवेग पर
On s'est 
억압했었지,
Roger, Frank. Potreste aiutarci se ci spiegaste dove vi trovate rispetto al booster. In altre parole, rispetto alla Terra e al raggio lì dietro, siete sopra, sotto o da un lato, o dove si trova esattam
Bene. Rive
Ricevuto
और, आपकी कि
了解。上昇開始時刻：124 22 0000。TIG、もう一度言ってください、TIG：125 19 3470。TPIのTIG：126 57 0000。LMのCSI値は0532。つまり、DELTA VXとDELTA VYは
Tranquility, Houston. We're looking at i
Weißt du, ich ha
अभी हम 104 घंटे के मध्य में 7 फुट प्रति सेकंड की गति की बात कर रहे हैं। और इसे प्रवेश से लगभग 8 घंटे पहले तक बढ़ाएँ। हमने आपको इसके लिए एक अनुमान दिया है - यह लगभग 19 फुट प्रति सेकंड है, इसलिए यदि इसमें बहुत अधिक परि
起初，由于需要进行另一次规避机动，我们无法按计划立即开始观测。抛射物在目标区域产生了大量的伪星，使得光学校准几乎不可能。我们之前研究的方法似乎不太奏效。我最终采用的方法是进入天狼星轨道（我们最亮的恒星），取回轴和耳轴，然后驾驶航天器飞向天狼星，利用它们进行光学校准，这项工作我们稍后完成。关于光散射，似乎在被动热控过程中，几乎在任何姿态下，扫描望远镜都会接收到光散射。它主要表现为一条宽阔的光带，横跨望远镜中心，位于零度两侧约10度范围内。在这个区域很难看到恒星。重新校准的效果不错。我已经能够用六分仪找到那颗星来进行校准，但我无法在扫描望远镜中识别出我们通常使用的星，例如雷戈尔星或门肯特星。我第一次观测地球时，地平线非常模糊。但地球地平线和大气层之间似乎确实存在一条非常清晰的分界线。地标视线滤镜似乎有助于确定地平线。太空和大气层顶部
로저. 항공모함 제미니 VI호에서 
如果你能检查一下所有的断路器，确保正确的断路器接通和断开，那就太
Aquarius, Houston. Ora puoi aprire l'interruttore 
That's affirmative. And we're trying to get power to that tank. Stand by; we'
好的，没问题，谢谢你
わかりました。最後のジョーは、マイナス4時間半の で実行されました。0.5フィート/秒のプッシ
痛い
حسنًا، أثناء قراءتي للعدادات، درجة حرارة المحرك 250 هي 145 درجة. هذا هو محول الطاقة 250. درجة حرارة محول الطاقة 150 هي 105 درجات، ودرجة حرارة مح
알겠습니다. 도킹 해제를 위해 이 값들을 0으로 설정할 예정입니다. 질문은 404
لقد قمت بتحميله بال
Водолеи, сейчас мы думаем о том, что если мы сможем сделать эт
Und Fred, Houston. Gleich werde ich Ihnen eine Vorgehensweise vorlesen, die Sie sich bitte für später notieren. Es handelt sich um eine Anleitun
Roger. Dieser Vog
Das ist be
रॉजर। व्हाइ
窓はすべてクリアです。ス
Хорошо. Это довольно н
Salut Nei
好的。使用 130 基准点进行跟踪，这样可以正确定位你的会合雷达应答器。T
Okay. PYRO B 
11, ह्यूस्टन। आप अभी बोर्ड पर OMNI Br
Okay. Under, we have a step, BAT 2, LOW VOLTAGE, OFF/RESET, than ON. Next we have a step BAT 2, HI VOLTAGE. OFF/RES
ठीक है। ईगल 
Ok, Bill. Ci stiamo avvicinando al momento degli avvistamenti, e c'è il timore che se ci limitiamo a passare direttamente all'assetto potremmo surriscaldare il quad Charlie. Quindi vorremmo che tu manovrassi per posizionare l'asse X negativo verso il sole ora. E ho qui per te alcuni angoli del gimbal. E se lo portiamo lì e puntiamo l'asse X negativo verso il sole tra ora e il momento
음, 제가 잭과 헤어지고 프레드가 와서 한 시간 정도 같이 밥을 먹고 잠자리에 들었다고 해볼게요. 그러니까 그때 시간이 얼마였든 간에, 아마
私の窓には毎秒約30フィー
تعطلت سحابات علبتي المناديل الورقية.
Roger. Unserer Ansicht nach verhält sich das System hinsic
حسنًا. قم بإيقاف تشغيل السخان المدمج في خلية الوقود رقم 1. سنتابع عملية الإيقاف، الروتين الفرعي الخاص،
रॉजर, समझ गया। मुझे सब पता है। क्या आप कृपया ह
T
我们还需要一些项目，请在最终装载前尽可能晚些完成
Kano Com Tech，这里是Sigm
Jim, I can give you the general idea of the proposed procedure for bringing the command module G&N up. It's the presently proposed one. We may come up with a better one, but here's what we're looking at right now. First thing we plan to do is to - using the, sight on the Earth with the just as we did in the midcourse. Then we'll do a body-axis aline, 400 plus 5 on the ACS, to put th
알겠습니다. 5번 패널
이봐, 짐. 저 부스터는 얼마나 빨리 돌아가는 거
Хорошо. 025:00, 5119, минус 165, 071:08; 035:00, 7733, минус 16
Хорошо. Подождите, я сейчас прине
جيميني 8، هذه هيوستن. كيف تسير عملي
确认无误。好的，接下来将进入抛射姿态的MAX死区姿
MAR
Bien, équipage. La seule au
Ok. Controllo assetto, comando velocità di rientro, scanner spento. Giroscopi della velocità di rolli
Хорошо. Тут особо нечего рассказывать. Ну, давайте начнём со спорта, какого черта. «Астрос» выстояли со счётом 8:7, «Брейвс» набрали пять или шесть очков в девятом иннинге, но им это удалось; а в другой важной игре дня матч «Кабс» был отменён из-за дождя. У меня есть все остальные результаты, можете сказать, если хотите. В Маниле и других районах острова Лусон произошли землетрясения. Было три толчка, и здания тряслись около получаса, магнитуда была примерно 5 по шкале Рихтера. Хорошо, давайте посмотрим. «Битлз» объявили, что больше не будут выступать как группа. Сообщается, что квартет заработал более полумиллиарда долларов за с
Джек, кажется, ты 
L'abbiamo fatto. Abbiamo chiuso la valvola di sfiato della gestione dei rifiuti, lì. O le valvole di stivaggio dei
Роджер, 11. Мы хотели бы в ближайшее время в удобное для вас время произвести сброс сточных вод. Конкретное время не запланировано. В момент коррекции траектории 3, примерно в 53:55, мы удаляем коррекцию траектории 3 и все связанные с ней элементы. Для вашей информации, расчетное значение скорости вращения для коррекции траектории 3 составило восемь десятых фута в секунду, то есть 0,8 фута в секунду. Если мы решим выполнить коррекцию траектории 4, то скорость вращения для коррекции траектории 4 составит 2,0 фута в секунду. В 53 часа у нас будет перенастройка. Мы просим вас сделать это во время нашей опе
Sembra una buona idea. I calcoli estern
ك
Apollo 8, we're che
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。完毕
أبولو 11، هذه هيوستن. لقد استعدنا للتو بيانات ال
Ici Sigma Seven. Passage en mode commandes de
기차 소리가 안 들려요. 여기 너무 시끄러워서 사람들 대화 소리만 들려
روجر. أعتقد أن الخبراء سيقولون إن البيانات استندت على الأرجح إلى عدد المشاهدات التي سجلتها. مع ذلك، أعتقد أن هذا الأمر س
システム的なものはどうですか - マシンをスリー
अ
Ihr (Notfallwiederhe
И 11, Хьюстон. У нас к вам просьба. Что касается клапана наддува вторичного топлива сервисного модуля: в качестве меры предосторожности мы просим вас на мгно
Roger. Peso LM, 33627; peso CSM, 36651; trim di beccheggio, 00470; trim di rollio
わかりました。もう一つ気づいた点があります。加圧した際に上昇タンク内の圧力が上昇したので、上昇フィードが閉じていることを確認してください。そのためには、パネル11のASCENT FEED 1と2の回路ブレーカーを閉じ、パーカーバルブ
Roger. Area 11-DELTA ΔT zero. GMTRC 01 days 07 48 58. RET 4
好的。那我问个问题。调整到一组观测月球的角度。好的，现在我要做的，对
Роджер. Принято, Базз. У меня есть пара изменений в вашем контрольном списке для надводного полета, и в целом, мы хотим, чтобы вы отслеживали командный модуль для последнего взлома вашего местоположения. И это будет — другими словами, P57, — а затем продолжайте выполнять контрольны
Роджер. Серия трещин или разломов, пересекающих горизонт, спускается примерно в три этапа на юг. Параллельный разлом на севере имеет обрыв в центре. Надеюсь, все вы на Земле понимаете, что мы имеем в виду, когда говорим, что это довольно зловещий горизонт, очень темное и непривлекательное место. Сейчас мы приближаемся
Ok. Ricevuto, Fred. Grazie. Vorremmo che tu staccassi l'interruttore automatico e probabilmente torneremo da te 
Okay. Bleiben Sie bei A
Каков ваш отчет о выбросе газов на этапе снижения? Происходил ли выброс газов? Что-нибудь еще происходило? Были ли еще выбр
ヒューストンさん、もし今後さらに遅れる可能性があれば、ぜひお知らせください。開始時間はほぼ維持するつもりですから。もし遅れるなら、私たちもそれに応じて遅れさせま
Die Steuerraten und die Fluglage stimmen nahezu, wir schalten auf Fly-by-Wire um, die Kreisel funktionieren normal. Wir befinden uns ungefähr wieder in der Affenkonfiguration. Ic
좋
حسنًا. الصورة جيدة إلى حد ما. نستطيع تمي
... Potenza di controllo, VELOCITÀ ORBITALE della piattaforma e stabili; Pressione RCS, Controllo d'assetto di nuovo attivo, BEF della pi
看
هذه فريندشيب سفن، نتفقد حالة الطقس من فندق إيريا، و
좋아요. 이제 소음이 없으니, 말씀하셔도
لا، لم أقم بذلك مؤخرًا. سأقوم بذلك الآن كجزء من هذا الفحص. لقد قمت بقي
罗杰。看来所有的日出都会对汤姆·斯塔福德有利，但你没办法——你改
Okay, Houston. Beim ersten Sinkflug betragen die Druckwerte für Treibstoff und Oxidationsmittel 10 psi; beim zweiten Sinkflug beträgt der Treibstoffdruck 10 psi und der Oxidat
Apollo 11, qui Houston. La spinta è buona; tutto 
When I look over 
Roger, Jim. Ho una breve procedura ch
अपोल
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。你上次飞越时收到的1和2号信号仍然有效。根据这些信号，你下一
Okay. Ich wollte Sie nur darauf hinweisen und Sie bitten, darüber nachzudenken und die möglichen Auswirkungen auf den Flugplan zu bedenken. Ich lasse Ihnen dann die Weitwinkelaufnahme und die Kommentare zum Mond vorab durchgehen und sehe, welche Abschnitte am besten geeignet erscheinen. Okay. Frank bat uns, die Reihenfolge der Eintrittsprofile auf der Bildrolle zu überprüfen. Das erste Profil ist mit „Nonexit Nummer 2“ beschriftet und stellt den Kurzstrecken-Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt dar. Das zweite Profil heißt „3500 Meilen“ und ist ebenfalls ein Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt, der jedoch für längere Eintrittsstrecken verwendet wird. Das dritte Profil ist „Nonexit Eintritt Nummer 1“, gefolgt von einem vierten, ebenfalls 3500 Meilen langen Eintrittsprofil. Es gibt also vier Eintrittsprofile. Die Nummern 1 und 3 sind die Kurzstrecken, die Nummern 2 und 4 die Langstreckeneintritte. Beim Kaltstart haben wir, glaube ich, schon
صحيح. أنا - لم أدخل - أعطيتُ - أعدتُ الجهاز للحظة. أعدتُ مفتاح الوضع من يدوي إلى وضع آخر بينما كنتُ أُحاول ضبطه، لكن الجهاز أخفى النجم عن الأنظار. لذا
好吧，我收回“非常”这个
نعم. ولا توجد رطوبة ظاهرة. ولا توجد رطوبة حول ورق
Und richte Glenn Parker unten am Cape
我一直在休息手臂
Хорошо, т
هيوستن، نتلقى الآن تحذيراً من
時計回りで確認完了。よし、二次TVCチェッ
로저. 네, 그랬습
Roger. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie während dieses Überflugs bei Ascension einen HF-Check durchführen sollen. Dieser HF-Check findet um 05:15 Uhr statt. Schalten Sie Ihren Sender in Sichtweite (LOS) ein, um einen kurzen Test durchzuführen, und führe
Roger. Compris. OMNI vers Baker et OMNI, M
짐, 저희 일정에 따라 진행하는 방법은 먼저 JETT 서비스 모듈 작업을 진행하고, 그 상태를 유지하는 것입니다. 그리고 저희가 계획한 일정에 따라 플랫폼을 이륙시켜야 할 시점이 되면, 조향각 작업을 진행하고, 그 다음
Да, Джим, подтверждаю. Переходим к стран
Ro
Итак, мы
अब अनडॉक एटीट्यूड और एसईपी एटीट्यूड एक समान होने चाहिए, इसलिए मैं अपडेटेड से
ये रॉजर है। मैं
أبولو 8، هيوس
Okay, Jack. Offhand, I can't imagine that since we got the platform powered down why we'd need to worry about the instantaneous control. But at any rate, we need 15-minutes warmup with the heaters before we can start
好的。我只是想让你们注意这一
よく分かります。
المظلة الرئيسية مفتوحة. المظلة في حالة جيدة، مناسبة للشعاب المرجانية على ارتفاع 10800 قدم، وهي مظلة رائعة. المظلة تبدو بحالة جيدة. أستخدم جهاز الأكسجين للطوارئ، وال
好的，吉姆。机动平台：目
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات لوصف نجاحكم. من المقرر أن يشاهد الرئيس نيكسون الليلة مباراة البيسبول في واشنطن. بعد المباراة، سيتوجه إلى منطقة عمليات الإنقاذ في المحيط الهادئ. مساء الأربعاء، سينتقل من جزيرة جونستون بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى سفينة الاتصالات البحرية أرلينغتون. ثم صباح الخميس، سيعود إلى الطائرة الهليكوبتر ويتجه إلى حاملة الطائرات هورنت في الوقت المناسب لمشاهدة هبوطكم في المحيط. سيرافق الرئيس وزير الخارجية ويليام روجرز وفرانك بورمان. سيشاهدون الهبوط من على متن سفينة الإنقاذ مع الأدميرال جون سيدني ماكين الابن، قائد قوات المحيط الهادئ. بعد إقامة الرئيس على متن هورنت، سينطلق في جولته الآسيوية وزيارته المقررة إلى رومانيا. يُعتقد أن المركبة لونا 15 قد تحطمت في بحر الأزمات أمس بعد أن دارت حول القمر 52 مرة. وذكرت وكالة الأنباء السوفيتية تاس أنه تم إجراء "أبحاث علمية" في الفضاء القريب من القمر. وقال السير برنارد لوفيل من مرصد جودريل بانك إن لونا 15 اصطدمت بسطح القمر بسرعة حوالي 300 ميل في الساعة. وقد ساد الهدوء النسبي مؤخرًا في فيتنام. وشوهد جنود أمريكيون يقومون بدوريات وهم يحملون أجهزة راديو ترانزستور مضبوطة على رحلة المركبة. وقامت شبكة الإذاعة والتلفزيون التابعة للقوات المسلحة في فيتنام بتغطية المهمة بشكل كامل. ولا تزال المناوشات مستمرة بين المصريين والإسرائيليين على طول قناة السويس. ويحاول مراقبو الأمم المتحدة هناك وقف العمليات. وفي واشنطن، صوتت لجنة الطرق والوسائل في مجلس النواب على خفض مخصصات استنزاف النفط من 27.5% إلى 20%. وقد هطلت الأمطار عدة مرات هنا في منطقة هيوستن. واليوم الجو غائم، ومن المتوقع هطول المزيد من الأمطار. على الصعيد الرياضي، وكما ذكرنا سابقًا، تُقام مباراة كل النجوم الليلة. لم تُجرَ أي مباريات أمس. وفي نيويورك الليلة الماضية، أعلنت رابطة كُتّاب البيسبول الأمريكية عن اختيار بيب روث كأعظم لاعب بيسبول على مر العصور، بينما نال جو ديماجيو لقب أعظم لاعب بيسبول على قيد ا
好的。在左侧定位点，我可以看到AO——或者说是会合雷达，然后我移动到前方定位点，这就是我能看到的全部了
11, Houston. Buzz, ti stai lasciando in modo disastroso. Puoi controllare il tuo VOX? P
Ich hoffe, wir haben gen
Roger. Pou
안녕하세요, 
È a circa 30 gradi di altezza. Sta
以及电
आसान - आसान 0.3, 7.6, लेकिन मैं... एक गड्ढे के ठीक दक्षिण-पश्चिम छोर पर। मुझे लगता है कि अगर वे ऐसी जगह पर होते तो उन्हें पता होता। ऐसा लगता है कि उनका ढला
हाँ। ऐसा लगता है कि 470 पर हमें -0.2 का पूर्वाग्रह था। ह
Okay, los geht's. Eintrittspunkt: Mittelpazifik, 000153; 000. Die nächsten beiden Zeilen geben die Monduntergangs- und die Mondcheck-Lage an;, 178; NOUN 61, minus 21,66, minus; 00:28. Die nächsten vier sind nicht verfügbar; DO ist 4,00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353,1, 29,9. Der Hauptzielstern ist Sigma Libra, 
I just made a run on Target 16-A. The air field at Basra, it's right at the Persia
Okay. Let's see if I got it all. For rendezvous first of all we want CB 16 INVERTER 2, closed, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2, closed. Then on panel 14, verify INVERTER 2 selected. And CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 closed, both breakers. Then we are to pull the RENDEZVOUS RADAR RELEASE handle. On panel 3, we then want RENDEZVOUS R
2分が
Хорошо, режим тяги DELTA-V, NORMAL, 
はい
Ok. E il controllo della Luna qui, a differenza
Houston, Apoll
그리고 맨 아래 줄에는, 잭, 전에 뽑아놨던 히터 디스플레이 차단기는 그대로 둘게요. 그런데, 규정대로 어센트 ECA 차단기는 설치해야 하는지 궁금
Jim, per quanto riguarda la tua batteria numero 2, pensiamo che sia probabilmente un guasto al sensore, un guasto al sensore di temperatura, a causare questo allarme, piuttosto che un vero e proprio surriscaldamento della batteria; il motivo è che non abbiamo riscontrato temperature più elevate nel circuito del gl
最大で..、平均 g を取得したいのですが、これは P00 - VERB 82 にあります
ठीक है। वैसे, मुझे नहीं पता कि हम इसे इतने लंबे समय तक जारी रख पाएंगे या नहीं, और 
ठीक है। हमने केबिन वेंट वाल्व खोल दिया है... केबिन क
Salut Ed, tu sais qu'on a toujours dit qu'on allait faire une rentrée en boucle ouverte. Je 
Housto
わかりました、ジャック。先ほど教えたバッテリー充電手順に戻ってください。充電を終了するには、先ほど教えた回路スイッチの横に「Open」または「Off」と書いてください。パネル250の回路ブレーカーは既に開いています。パネル275のINVERTER POWER-2 MAIN Bも開いています。パネル5のBAT RELAY BUS BAT Aも開いています。SENSOR UNIT AC BUS 2も開いています。SENSOR SIGNAL AC2も開いています。BATTERY CHARGER, MAIN Bも開いています。BATTERY CHARGER AC POWERも開いています。BATTERY CHARGER, BAT A CHARGEも開いています。INVERTER CONTROL 2も開いています。INVERTER CONTROL 3も開いています。MAIN BUS TIEも既に行っています。次に、BAT CHARGEスイッチをAC 1に切り替えます。パネル3では、AC INVERTER 2をO
わかりました。パネル4：TELCOMM、グループ1、AC1へ。次の回路ブレーカーを閉じます：、グループ1を押してメインB；、グループ2を押してメインB；、TEMP、メインB；、セカンダリーループトランスデューサー、メインB；RAD、コントロール/ヒーター、メインB；BATリレーバス、BAT B；BATチャージャー、BAT B、チャージ - またはBへ、チャージ；インバーターコントロール、2；インバーターコントロール、1；センサー信号、AC1；セ
That's affirmative. The folks here are evaluating the thermal
ठीक है। हम देख रहे हैं कि मिडिल गिम्बल एंगल थोड़ा ज़्यादा हो रहा है। ऐसा लगता है कि डेडबैंडिंग अपनी सामान्य स्थिति में ठीक है, लेकिन हम आपको बताना चाहते हैं कि हम इस पर
Хорошо, и Атрия там, в секстанте. Ну, знаете, она не прямо посередине секстанта. Конечно, я думаю... не знаю, что... Вы когда-нибудь слышали какие-нибудь прав
حسنًا. ما يدور في أذهانن
어제와 오늘의 차이점을 눈치채셨나요? 저희가 
罗杰。他们船尾有20艘，船
是的，没问题。这里
١١، هيوستن. هذا منظر رائع حقًا. لقد عدت الآن يا باز، ولاحظ أنك تنزل إحدى ستائر النو
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, Houston. Voici les
13，我们目前暂不考虑烧伤问题。还需要一段时间才会涉及到烧伤；但我们正在
That's good; I cou
是的，我的也是。我敢
I'm okay. Standby, I'm going back to. It's gotta hold me up (delay me.) The capsule - I'd like to straighten out this problem that you are - obv
射出座席の安全性向上 - Carnarvon GO - 
分かりました。はっきりと聞こえました。プラットフォームについて話している時に52時間くらい途切
Très bien. Êtes-vous prêt pour une rétrogra
रॉजर। 298 के पिच कोण पर पहला क्षितिज चेक 194 23 06, 31
프레드, 5분에서 10분 전에 그쪽에서 마스터 경보기가 울리는 
AS
Moment, Jack. 
한 가지 더 요청드릴 사항이 있습니다. 고이득 구성 설정
ठीक है, वैंस। हम सोलो बुक और फ्लाइट प्लान में किए गए बदलावों की कॉपी बनाने के लिए लगभग तैयार हैं, और जब आपके पैड तैयार हो जाएं, तो हम उन्हें ले लेंगे। और सोने का समय आगे बढ़ाने की बात हो रही है, तो ठीक है, लेकिन
罗杰。请注意，您正在执行最后一项预定活动。初步跟踪显示，初始中段速度可能低于第一次估计的每秒 4 英尺。我
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। हाई गे
टीआईजी वेल्डिंग में अब लगभ
了解。FUNCTIONスイッ
अंतरिक्ष यान के ठीक सामने अब एक रोचक जलधारा है, जो एक छोटे पहाड़ के किनारे-किनारे बहती है;
再次盖上潜望镜。待命，约翰会接应
地元ニュースを少しお伝えします。ハンツビルの郡庁舎が昨日未明に全焼したため、再び建設工事が行われるようです。記事では、待つ家族について少し触れています。これはポスト紙記者のアン・ジェームズによるものです。「私たちは月の裏側で休んでいます」と、ヴァレリー・アンダースさんはクリスマスイブに家族とアポロ8号が月周回軌道を外れて帰還するのを待ちながら言いました。アンダースさんは火曜日の午前0時に帰宅し、近所の人たちが子供たち全員を集めてくれたので、宇宙船が月の裏側で通信不能になっている間、家族は休むことができました。フランク・ボーマン大佐の自宅は、屋外に4つの大きな常緑樹のリースが飾られ、粉雪が舞い、赤いリボンで飾られていました。書斎の木が彼の無事の帰還を待っています。ブロンドの愛らしい妻スーとたくましい息子たち、フレデリックとエドウィンは、真夜中に月周回軌道から離脱するまで家にいる予定です。普段はセント・クリストファーズ・エピスコパル教会の真夜中の
Roger. We will have an attitude for you to maneuver to in a moment. And you should leave your FDAI up for that. The attitude is as follows if you a
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Вот несколько последних обновлений. В записи мы указывали, что на камере нужно установить расстояние в 50 футов. Оказалось, что максимальное значение на камере — 25 футов, п
*** Les deux vannes d'isolement conviennent à la déconnexio
프렌드십 세븐, 30분 보고서
Okay. 
了解しました。それでは、エントリーの準備をする時は、もう少しゆっくり進
Gemini 4, с геостационарным временем 47+00 минут (вставить экспериме
أبولو 8، هيوستن. سنسلم البث
لم أتمكن قط من الحصول على قراءة لمقياس التسارع للتحقق من المنصة. كنتُ أدفعها معظم الوقت، ولم أستطع تثبيتها لفترة طويلة. أعتقد أننا أغفلنا تسجيل بعض البيانات بسبب الوضع الغريب الذي كنا فيه. لم أتمكن من التواصل مع كارنارفون بشكل جيد في المحاولة الأولى. من المؤسف أننا لم نكن نملك كامير
للعلم يا جو، لقد عدنا جميعاً الآن إلى أماكن جل
好的。时间是——事件将在；我们需要机动到以下姿态：滚转角 101.0，俯仰角 90.0，偏航角全开。高增益角为俯仰角 -23，偏航角 93。我们将使用常规程序来抑制加速度。抑制加速度后，在启动前，我们将使用 G 型胶片盒将高速黑白胶片装入六分仪。然后，我们将使用自动曝光模式拍摄三张照片，曝光时间分别为 5 秒、20 秒和 60 秒。我们的参数值分别为：R1 + 34717
حسنًا، 13. نريد منك إيقاف تشغيل السخانات المدمجة في خلية الوقود رقم 1. ثم نريد منك اتباع إجراء إيقاف تشغيل خلية الوقود رقم 3
휴스턴, 제
اختب
进
收到。主席听到
Salut Jim. No
Bene. Esatto. Quindi, per riconfigurare questa configurazione, Jack, vogliamo che tu lasci gli interruttori MAIN BUS TIE in posizione ON ed estragga gli interruttori automatici nell'ordine inverso rispetto a quello in cui ti abbiamo chiesto di chiuderli. Passo; e vuoi
ヒューストン、オプショ
分かりました。それはローンチチェックリストに載っていましたよ、ジャック
11번, 휴스턴. 책 읽으세요
Frien
실수로 옮겨지는 걸 원치 않으셨겠죠. 하지만 괜찮아요, 짐. 전원이 꺼져 있든 안에 있든 상관없어요. 
Хорошо. Вот некоторые подробности плана полета. Конечно, поскольку нет -3, вы удалите все элементы, относящиеся к середине траектории 3, включая то, что указано примерно на 54,5, и мы перенесем это на более позднее время, о котором я вам расскажу через минуту. Хорошо. Затем мы хотим перенести заряд батареи на 3 часа раньше, примерно на 54 часа. И мы хотим перенести клапан вентиляции туннеля на 3 часа раньше, и в этот момент вы можете просто перейти к отметке 57 часов в плане полета, изменить число с 57 часов на 54 часа и начать с этого. В разделе примечаний примерно на указано: «Продувка кислородного топливного элемента и сброс сточных вод». Если это не было выполнено раньше, мы хотим, чтобы вы сделали это на 54 часах
好了，弗雷德。你快跟上我们了。我们正在努力研究如何用那根软管将指令舱废液箱里的水抽到上升舱，然后再从上升舱排入上升舱
D'accord. Très intéressant. On va essayer de dé
Apollo 8, Houston. You can go ahead and run that 37 and we're going to kind of watch that from the ground, too, and see how it works out. A couple of items that are just of general interest in the trajectory world. Looks like the uncertainty in position was about 12 miles. Your uncertainty in velocity is about a quarter of a foot per second. And the perigee altitude of uncertainty is 5 mi
Хорошо. В соответствии с инструкцией на наклейке, выполните уста
了
안녕하세요, 13번 휴스턴입니다. E-메모리 덤프를 받을 준비가 되었습
Всё по-прежнему выглядит хорошо.
Okay. I think we will make one last check there with the half-unit vectors for 74 hours before we leav
속도가 거의 완벽한 것 같네요. 확실히 앞으로 나아가고 있다는 게 느껴져요. 알고 계
Roger. Per una volta ho il mondo alla finestra e guardarlo attraverso il cannocchiale è davvero straordinario. Vorrei saperlo descrivere bene. Il tempo è ottimo. Il Sud America sta iniziando a comparire. Riesco a vedere quello che mi sembra l'orizzonte superiore, un punto che dev'essere vicino a Seattle, Washington, e da lì rie
分かりました、ジム。まだ手順を推奨する準備が整っていないので、その件についてはお話ししたくありませんでした。アンペア数が足りないため、通常の
Apollo 8, lorsque vous aurez l'occasion de vérifier dans le compartiment technique inférieur, il semble que vous utilisiez les projecteurs en position faible (position 2), or cette fonction est t
Ja, die Beleuchtung ist jetzt sehr schön, fast taghell; alles ist gut sichtbar. Es ist deutlich heller als v
电源/GPI，关闭。自动喷射选择，16 -
Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон. Перицинфион плюс 2 часа PAD. G&N: 62710, плюс 098, минус 019, зажигание 077 46 2248, DELTA-VX, плюс 32148, минус 00455, минус 10377, крен NA, тангаж 307, 
E Houston, Apollo 11. Queste manovre ottiche AUTO, o P23, manovre AUTO, non sembrano raggiungere il punto substellare. Riesci a
ठीक है, फ्रेड। पैंतरेबाज़ी का उद्देश्य पीसी प्लस 2 है, इस समय तक, हम एमपीएल पर जा रहे हैं। और, 079, 27, 4013, प्लस 08144, माइनस 00443, माइनस 02226, अपोजी उपलब्ध नहीं है, पेरिजी प्लस 00205, 08455, 420,
Apollo 11, ici Housto
罗杰。船员状态报告如下：水量方面，指挥官今天至今已航行约50公里；CMP 43；LMP 44。我们今天已经吃了两顿饭。第三天的A餐
Apollo 8, Houston. Trois positions de commutateur. Commutateur ENTRÉES TÉLÉMÉTRIE sur BAS; mode NORMAL ban
شكرًا جزيلًا. لقد كانت سيرتك الذاتية ممتازة. نحن الآن بصدد التخلص من
जी हाँ, हम अभी नक्शा देख रहे थे, और आप फ्लोरिडा के दक्षिण में हैं, इसलिए आप अभी ग्रामीण क्षेत्र में नहीं हैं। लेकिन हम जानना चाहते थे कि आपकी कार के नंबर प्लेट कहाँ हैं? क्य
Также приобретите 16-мм кинокамеру для съемки внутри космического корабля. У нас большой "глаз жука", и мы подумали, что могли бы сделать несколько снимков внутри, если бы у нас 
알겠습니다. PC + 2.; + 0819.2, - 0020.0, - 0218.9; 해당 없음; + 0020.9, 0848.2; 420, 274
Immagin
D'accord. On sait que vous êtes passés à 15 hier soir sur le réseau principal. On veut faire la transition aujourd'hui à 7,6. Je vais vé
रॉजर। 
Хорошо. Хорошо, напряжение БЭТ Чарли. Похоже, у нас разногласия — я не могу отличить БЭТ Чарли от БЭТ Дога
コロンビアです。こちらはヒューストンです。R2のロードでは、0と4つの1
Houston, Apollo 11. Nous sommes prêts pour le contrôle logique dès que vous
安全な投棄に必要な本質的な事柄だけを真剣に検討したでしょうか？ 検討していません。この物体が大気圏に突入する際に人々が見たいと思うであろうエンジニアリン
好的。除了你想打开的那些，其他都
제미니 6호, 러셀 랜
जिस क्षेत्र के ऊपर हम
Très bien
А земля, к тому же,
Roger. Et c
ロジャー、2
O
我看到一些东西正在脱落，但看得不太清楚。现在到了0
Roger. Eagle. Wir sind einverstanden. Bitte warten Sie auf die Kardanwinkel. Und Eagle, da wir die direkte Sauerstoffzufuhr zum Ko
Questa è l'Amiciz
알겠습니다. 실제로 기계식 정지점에 도달했는지 확실하지 않지만, 만약 도달했다면 담당자들이 최대 15분 동안은 손상 없이 정지점에 고정된 상태를 유지할 수 있다고 합니다. 그리고 현재 상태 그대로 한 번 더 테스트를 진행해 보고 싶습
Ok. Abbiamo esaminato tutte le possibili possibilità qui sotto. Il caso peggiore che siamo riusciti a trovare è la distanza di errore di 3 sigma, il caso peggiore è di 70 miglia nautiche. Sono 70. Quello che vorremmo che facessi è una manovra retrograda OAMS; poi avremo un fuoco retrogrado manuale, ovviamente, senza computer. Vogliamo un rientro in rollio a portanza zero. Questo è un rientro in rollio a portanza zero. Il motivo della decisione di usare un rollio rispetto a un 90-90 è ch
D'accord. Je c
Conservan
휴스턴, 테이프 덤프 완료했나요
Roger. Je vérifie ce s
400K 통화할 시간
Flightさんの提案に従って、設定をユニット3に下げて数分間試してみて、そ
Хорошо, Фред. Следующее, что я хотел бы, чтобы ты сделал, это взял еще немного серой ле
알겠습니다. 페리신시안 플러스 2입니다. / 62871 11월 알파, 그리고 대기하세요. 좋습니다. 피치 트림과 요 트림은 적용되지 않습니다. 시간
Roger. Sie sehen die Erde, so wie wir sie sehen, durch unser linkes Fenster – etwas mehr als die Hälfte der Erde. Wir blicken auf den östlichen Pazifik und die nördliche Hälfte des oberen Bildschirmbereichs. Dort sehen wir Nordamerika, Alaska, die Vereinigten Staaten, Kanada, Mexiko und Mittelamerika. Südamerika verschwindet knapp jenseits des Terminators oder im Schatten. Die Ozeane erscheinen deutlich blau, weiße Bänder großer Wolkenformationen ziehen über die Erde, und wir können Küstenlinien erkennen. Wir können den Westen der USA, das San Joaquin Valley, die Sierra Nevada, die Halbinsel Baj
Hey, Houston. I'm looking north up toward Aristarchus now, and I can't really 
Bene. Questo sarà il Pacifico centrale, 357 1
정말 좋네요! 저도 그 자료들을 볼 수 있으면 좋겠습니다.
11号，这里是休斯顿。由于我们进行了观察弹弓效应的操作，我想我们错过了抄录您的
È passato dalla mia parte. Il sole era proprio davanti alla
Им следова
نرجو منكم البدء بتصريف مياه الصرف الصحي في أقرب وقت 
Rog
休息一下。哥
알았어, 우리
你也听到
Sie scheinen überhaupt nicht aus der Kapsel zu ko
Okay. Wir möchten den Computer in allen Modi überprüfen. Diese Überprüfung besteht aus drei Schritten. Stellen Sie zunächst in allen IVI-Fenstern 10 ft/sec ein. Drücken Sie dann die Taste „Fehlerbehebung zurücksetzen“. Drücken Sie anschließend die Taste „Computer starten“ und achten Sie auf die Anzeige „Computer läuft“. Führen Sie diesen Test in allen Modi durch. Sollten Sie – ich wiederhole – keine Anzeige erhalten, dass der Computer läuft, führen Sie einen weiteren Test durch. Auch diesen Test überprüfen Sie in allen Modi. Schalten Sie den Computer für 2 Sekunden aus. Nachdem der Computer wieder eingeschaltet ist, drücken Sie erneut die Taste „Fehlerbehebung zurücksetzen“ und anschließend die Taste „Computer starten“. Leuchtet die Computeranzeige in einem der Modi auf, beenden Sie das Ausschalten für
了解。今は上昇傾向にあ
好的。我这里有一些关于飞行计划的细节，如下所示。当然，由于没有-3，你需要删除所有中途3阶段的内容，包括大约在54.5分钟处提到的-the，我们会把它推迟到稍后进行，我稍后会告诉你。好的。然后，我们需要将电池充电提前3小时。我们还需要将隧道通风阀/DELTA-P提前3小时，届时你可以直接跳转到飞行计划中的57小时点，将数字从57小时改为54小时，然后开始执行。在备注部分大约有一条“氧气燃料电池吹扫和废水排放”的提示。如果之前没有执行，我们希望你在54小时50分钟
ठीक है, ठीक है। आपको जो
रॉजर, माइक। हम पुष्टि करते हैं कि आपने अपनी पिच दर की दिशा
На самом деле нет, Джим. Это связано с этой W-матрицей. Ты помнишь, мы перезагрузили её на лунной орбите, затем работали над ней, когда ты возвращался к наблюдениям, и вот теперь мы перезагрузили её снова. И
罗杰，巴兹。这是 PAD、MPL 的入口，从第 05 行开始，35 - 修正 - 359 152 001。194 46 03 267，加上 1102，减去 17203，068，，36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027，NOUN 69，所有四行均为 NA。从 D 零开始：400 02 09。黑屏的 RET，00 17 03 38 08 20。六分仪星，02 0945 149。视轴星是天蝎座θ星，就是天蝎座θ星。向上 315，向右 35，升力矢量向上。备注：本次进场程序假设没有中途6号轨道机动。另外，根据我们目前掌握的所有跟踪数据，该机动速度仅为每秒十分之一英尺。因此，我们可能会跳过它。稍后会详
本当に素晴らしいですね。写真がうまく撮れるといいですね。また視界から外れそうな場所をぐるりと回
Die optimalen Anstellwinkel für die 
Джек, нам бы хотелось получить еще одно показание в вольтах и ​​ампера
好的。我现在拿到的这个是给我
Хорошо. Сегодня утром в новостях не так уж много новостей. Всё довольно тихо. Думаю, главная новость — это количество несчастных случаев, смертей в праздничные дни, что, конечно, не очень приятная новость, но по всей стране погибло 233 человека, 9 из них — в Хьюстоне в канун Рождества и на Рождество. В мировых новостях снова в центре внимания оказались семьи. Вот что говорится в сообщении: «Семьи экипажа «Аполлона-8» отправили рождественское послание командующему ВМС Ллойду Бучеру, капитану экипажа USS Pueblo, которое было 
ठीक है। पावर ऑन करते समय, लाइन - या स्टेप 2 में ल
Хьюстон, Спокойствие. В последнем наблюдении я использовал Капеллу, и она находится довольно далеко от края. Довольно далеко от центра фиксат
Roger. Oui. Bon, je passe en mode commandes de vol électriques, puis en mode amortissement auxiliaire, et là… les attitudes ne concordent pas. Cinq minutes pour la manœuvre de rétrogradation; le voyant est allumé. Ma vitesse de descente est d'envi
这样做是为
Bon, lors de ce dernier passage, nous avons pris environ 38 photos avec le système de photographie synoptique du terrain, en commençant un peu à l'est de San Diego et jusqu'à ce que la couverture nuageuse réapparaisse. Nous avons repris les prises de vue de manière intermittente dès que nous avons survolé le sud des États-Unis, en descendant vers l'Alabama et le Mississippi, puis en traversant jusqu'en Floride. Nous avons obtenu de très bonnes photos de la météo dans cette zone, puis des photos des aérodromes autour de Jacksonville. Nous avons pris quelques photos du Cap. L'une des meilleures photos que nous avons prises était probablement une photo prise en arrière, où l'on voit toute la formation météorologique le long de la côte, de la Floride jusqu'au Texas. Une ligne de temps très nette suivait la côte. Ensuite, nous avons pris des photos de la formation météorologique en Floride, autour de Cuba et de l'île, et dans le golfe… des amas de nuages, et nous avons pris quelques
로저. 그리고 첫 번째 레지스터 번호에
Apollo 8, Houston. We're showing quad A running a little bit warmer than the other quads. If you remember, I mentioned before that we were coming into a period of time here where we were going to spend a lot of time with no going. We'd like for you to try to favor quad A if you can in the shade, and do whatever you can to keep that temperat
双子座VIII，RK
不，我的意思是，还有其他重量或其他重量
Es kam hier heraus. 
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 카나리 캡콤입니다. 150볼트-암페어 인버터의 온도는 175°이며, 정상 작동 중입니
Роджер. У меня сейчас здесь находятся документы № 1 и 4. Я буду готов за
D'accord. Voici mes observations concernant le bus principal B. Tout s'est passé très vite. On a d'abord entendu l'impact, l'explosion, ou je ne sais pas exactement ce qui l'a provoqué. Environ une seconde plus tard, une 
収納でき
分かりました。
こちらはVHFとSバンドで放送されているア
أنت رائع بك
Wenn sie das schon ohne
Roger Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. I have an 11-BRAVO update. Are you ready
Okay. L'ultimo Joe è stato eseguito a -4 ore e mezza; eseguire una spinta di 0,5 piedi al secondo, capacità di carico a quattro getti; quindi eseguire SEP seguito da una trazione di 0,5 piedi al secondo, rispettando una nomenclatura sul; penso che abbiamo davvero bisogno di un aumento di 0,
Roger. Gut, Fred-o. Damit kommen wir zu Schritt 8. Beim Aktivieren von PRO blinkt 5018. Okay. Bei 5018 führen wir ein AUTO-Manöver durch, um die Fluglage anzupassen. Aktivieren Sie dazu einfach PRO mit GUIDANCE CONTROL, PNGS; MODE CONTROL, PNGS, AUTO; und wir nehmen diese Fluglage ein. Damit sind wir für die Sonnenprüfung in der richtigen Position. In diesem Programm haben wir in angedockter Konfiguration eine Totzone von 1,4 Grad. Um Ihnen zu helfen, können Sie die Zeiger ausrichten. Wenn die Zeiger den Nullpunkt erreichen und sich innerhalb dieser Totzone befinden, überprüfen Sie, wie nah die Sonne ist. Der Wert sollte innerhalb von plus/minus 1 Grad liegen. E
로저. 레이더 관측 잘했습니다. 줄리안이 함께하지 못해서 정말 아쉽습니다. 제어 모드에 대한 보고를 드리겠습니다. 우선 수동 모드와 플라이 바이
11, ici
Bonsoir. Ici le commandant d'Apollo 11. Il y a cent ans, Jules Verne écrivait un livre sur un voyage vers la Lune. Son vaisseau spatial, Columbia, décollait de Floride et amerrissait dans l'océan Pa
콜롬비아, 맞습니다. 그리고 T1 
イーグル、ヒューストン。ハイゲインを
好的。我们观察到云台中间角度有点高。虽然看起来姿态控制正常，但还是想让您知道我们会密切关注，如果角度过高，我们可能会建
مع حلول الليل، بدأت النجوم الأخرى بالظهور. أستطيع رؤيتها - أعتقد أنني أستطيع الرؤية حتى القدر الخامس تقريبًا الآن. مع ذلك، لا يزال المشهد أقل سطوعًا من ليلة صافية على ارتفاع 20 ألف قدم من قمرة قيادة طائرة. لقد خفّضت إضاءة طائرتي بشكل كبير، مما جعل المنظر أكثر روعة. في الواقع، يبدو أن النجوم تظهر تدريجيًا مع تأقلم عينيّ. أنظر ا
好的。正负 16500 12960 36195；北侧星群为天狼星和参宿七，横滚 129 度，俯
알겠습니다. R1 + 27210, R2 + 35570, R3 + 33010입니다. 두 번
Aquarius, delete the set, gimbal/t
You know what I thought - I think what we saw venting was the result of our DELTA-Vs stirring up things, popping the relief valve. Yes. We don't see anything venti
Дело не в космическом аппарате; сложно навести его не на космический аппарат, а на камеру. Кронштейн имеет достаточный прогиб, из-за чего камера может выходить из поля зрения при съемке через окно. И потребовалось много микронастроек и подсказок с Земли, чтобы установить её, э
Roger, die Wetterlage im Bergungsgebiet ist wie folgt: 0,5 % Bewölkung, 10 Meil
好的。杰克用的是带250毫米镜头的那台。那是标准的EL相机。我还有一台地面相机，我用它拍了几百张地月照片，就是1号相机。我们楼上还有一台Reseau相
حسنًا، ممتاز. الخطوة التالية هي تث
Oh, semb
제 주행 가
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हम आपको सलाह देते हैं कि आप अपने मास्टर अलार्म सर्किट ब्रेक
双子座VI
حسناً يا هيوست
放眼海外，我们发现韩国第一条超级高速公
Aurora Seven，这里是Muchea
13, Ho
J'ai Fred là-haut avec Jack pour les aider à mettre le système en marche, e
N'oublions 
Non lo so. Ho ancora caldo e sudo ancora, ma non mi sento poi così a disagio. Vorrei... vorrei risolvere il problema della temperatura della tuta. È... a tutti gli effetti, è incon
それ
Roger. Is this flying time or r
Ах, Роджер, «Дружба Семь». В каком режиме управления вы сейчас находитесь? К
जी हाँ। मेरे पास गुब्बारा है। हालाँकि, मैंने इसे कुछ समय से नहीं देखा है। यह काफी इधर-उधर भटकता रहता 
"초당 0.1피트." 연소 시간을 줄이는 이유는 ASA 차단기가 너무 오랫동
Bonjour, amis, félicitations au Mexique et particulièrement à mes amis de Guaymas. Depuis l'espace extérieur, su pais esta cubierto con numbes--
核心 03,33649；核心 04,64690；核心 65,01059；核心 66,
Rog
حسنًا. هذه هي طريقة شحن بطارية بيكر. اللوحة 3: شح
На шаре написано "минус 10° вниз". Нав
Okay, Jack. Der Mond durchlief diese Zei
После этого у меня ест
OK, Joe. J'ai créé une nouvelle page ici, -1A, point 6: Transfert vers l'alimentation. Vérification habituelle: le projecteur est éteint et le voyant « ATTENTION AVERTISSEMENT SOUS ALIMENTATION » est allumé. Je reçois un message de Jack, que je te transmettrai. Point 7: DISJONCTEUR TRANSLUNAIRE, ALIMENTATION, panneaux 11 et 16, FE
ह्यूस्टन स्थित एसोसिएटेड न्यूज़ एजेंसी के हैरी रोसेन्थल की एक रिपोर्ट यहाँ प्रस्तुत है। दो सांता क्लॉज़ ने 2 वर्षीय जेफ़री लवेल के लिए क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या को रोशन कर दिया। पहले सांता न
Je savais qu'ils 
Роджер. У меня не тератоидно-маточные выделения. Теперь они появляются пери
好的，11. 这里是休斯顿。在飞行计划中大约 22:30 的位置，在您的睡眠后检查清单以及所有其
ر
Да. Теперь перейдём к контрольному списку
계
Okay, Apollo 8. Der erste Test ist abgeschlossen. Wir schalten jetzt in den Uplink-Modus auf „UPLINK COMMAND AND RANGING“ um und deaktivieren die Sprachübertragung. Wir bleiben 2,5 Minuten in diesem Modus und senden Testnachrichten. Dies hat keine Auswirkungen auf Ihren Computer oder die Konfiguration Ihrer Bedienfeldschalter. Möglicherweise hören Sie das S-Band-Rauschen, das mit der Verbindungsunterbrechung zusammenhängt. Ihr Leistungsmesser sollte aber weiterhin ein gutes Signal anzeigen. Es handelt sich nicht um einen Signalverlust, sondern lediglich um einen Ausfall der Sprachmodulation. Ich markiere Ihnen kurz vorhe
इनमें से क
Wie sehen di
यह गिम्बल लॉक की ओर के
Right
흥미로운 소식이 하나 있습니다. 미시간주 앤아버에 새로운 청소년 갱단이 생겼다고 합니다. 이름은 길넷 갱(Gilnet Gang)인데, 앤아버 거리를 배회하며 은밀하게 활동하고 때로는 법망을 피해 다니기도 합니다. 스스로를 '선행을 위한 게릴라'라고 부릅니다. 그들이 한 일들을 몇 가지 예로 들자면, 외설적인 낙서로 뒤덮인 다리를 하룻밤 사이에 페인트칠했습니다. 동네 아이들에게 인기 있지만 위험한, 철거 예정인 집을 판자로 막았습니다. 기업과 정부 중 누가 책임져야 하는지를 두고 논쟁이 벌어져 방치되었던 시내 화단에 꽃을 심었습니다. 시야를 가린다는 이유로 번잡한 교차로의 울타리 나무를 다듬었는데, 주인은 이에 화를 냈습니다. 휴런 강변의 쓰레기도 수거했습니다. 갱단 구성원은 익명의 십대 청소년들로, 개인적인 신분 노출을 원하지 않습니다. 그들의 목표는 관료주의를 없애고, 자신들이 보기에 좋은 일들을 해내는 것입니다. 이 조직은 은밀하게 종교적인 색채를 띠고 있는 것으로 보입니다. 미시간 대학교의 한 조교수는 이 단체가 일종의 초교파적인 집단이라고 설명하며, 이 단체의 아이디어에 대해 비공식적으로 조언을 해주고 있다고 말했습니다. 단체 이름은 '어부의 그물'을 든 성 베드로에서 따왔습니다. 또한 특정 교회와 연관되지 않을 만큼 독립적인 단체입니다. 익명을 요구한 이 교수는 "이 단체에는 로빈 후드 같은 정신이 깃들어 있다"고 덧붙였습니다. 이들의 활동 대부분은 불법적입니다. 사법 시스템이 마비될 때, 관료주의적인 절차를 거치지 않고 직접 선행을 베풉니다. 단체는 약 55명의 고등학생 남녀로 구성되어 있으며, 졸업 전에 이미 단체에 속해 있던 40~50명이 더 있습니다. 이 단체가 결성된 계기는 디트로이트 빈민가를 방문한 교회 청소년 단체였습니다. 그곳에서 거리 갱단의 운영 방식을 보고 감명을 받
Et toi, Jack, Aquarius. Pendant que tu ré
Gemini VI, habe ich Sie richtig verstanden, dass 
Roger. Der Brennvorgang war
Okay. Schalten Sie INVERTER 2, AC BUS 2 auf „Ein“; und einen weiteren Schalter, AC BUS 2 RESET, auf „Reset“ und in die Mittelstellung; stellen Sie BATTERY CHARGE auf „Alfa“; wählen Sie mit dem DC INDICATOR „BAT CHARGER“ aus; und nun möchten wir, dass Sie in der ersten halben Stunde alle 
Roger. 
All right, that's the heater switch. Your waste valve Off. Your EVA bott
Apollo 8, die Kommandoübergabe von Guam an Honeysuckle erfolgt in etwa 2 1/2 Minute
انقضت 41 دقي
Roger. Je m'en occ
Okay, Jack. Do you want us to
حسناً. أنا أُدار بطريقة خاطئة؛ هذا م
ठीक है
Houston, Apollo 11. Pagina della checklist F9 7; Ho completato il passaggio 8 e vorrei sapere qual è, s
はい、大
Okay, Jim. Könntest du bitte auf dein externes Kabel drücken? Hey, wir haben den Eindruck, dass du etwa 57 Gramm mehr ver
吉姆，稍后我们会给你一个飞行姿态，建议你在调整到该姿态的过程中保持 FDAI 值。到达该姿态后，我们会让
알겠습니다. 구조 지역의 날
双子座4号，休斯顿 
로저. 대기하십시오. 상황 보고를 드리겠습니다. 추적을 위해 궤도 진입 자세를 취했습니다. 상황 보고는 다음과 같습니다. 타워 분리 장치 2번 퓨즈를 제외한 모든 퓨즈는 1번입니다. 비상 역추진 시퀀스, 비상 역추진 투하, 비상 드로그는 중앙 해제 위치에 있습니다. 스퀴브는 작동 준비 완료입니다. 자동 역추진은 꺼져 있습니다. 자이로는 정상입니다. 모든 "T" 핸들은 "켜짐" 위치에 있습니다. 역추진 지연은 정상입니다. 객실 조명은 양쪽 모두 켜져 있습니다. 사진 촬영 조명도 켜져 있습니다. 텔레메트리 저주파는 켜져 있습니다.
わかりました。104時間後、つまり今から約20時間後、18時間後に中間軌道修正を検討しています。風速は毎秒7フィートしかありません。もう一つの選択肢は、再び軌道に戻れない可能性があるため、現状維持して軌道修正を遅らせること
روجر
Roger, Ed. Vogliamo che riprendiate il vostro normale piano di volo. Lo basiamo sul fatto che riteniamo che abbiate ancora 205 piedi/sec di ΔV e 63 rivoluzioni, e che sarete ancora in un'orbita di 81.125,7. Questo ci lascerà abbas
尽量把它导出来，我会播放，必要时我
We really have the
रॉजर, मैंने तुम्हें 5 वर्ग, ओ
मैं इसे खाने के डिब्बे
이런 냄새가 나면 산소 고속 공급을 
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。ワイドビームで
E, giusto per curiosità, ci siamo sbarazzati del radar in modo impeccabile. È appeso proprio al centro del... la cifra anteriore è la luce di attracco sul modulo di comando. Ci credi? Non credo che danneggerà il nostro controllo del Sole, ma di sicuro
Your oxygen pressure, your O2 pressure, is off the high side of the scale. You may have had that switch failure in there. you may have had a telemetry failure in there that failed
नहीं, दरअसल हमने ऐसा नहीं किया है। पिछली बार जब हमने उस समस्या से छुटकारा पाया था, तब से उस इलाके में सूखा पड़ा हुआ है
Hawaii, this is Gemini VI. At 35 40 we have a data Theta, 6.4 degrees; range, 115.58; Delta-V total, 523; Delta-VI 24.8. Data plot looks completely nominal. 24:32 
أعتقد أنه ينبغي أن يكون لدينا 4 طائرات نفا
Roge
好的。1分钟时，“主控臂”，我们开始刮擦。35秒时，刮擦前两行。“手动调整空隙”从9秒开始；我们在2秒时刮擦音块；然后，在它下面的那行，
रॉजर। हमें लगता है कि जब आप हमसे बात 
रॉ
A
Hous
Fortunatamente, sei riuscito a prendere un po' di tutto. Voglio dire, le rocce erano... Voglio dire, come hai fatto... sei andato in giro e... hai semplicemente raccolto le rocce, le hai mes
Houston, Apollo 11. Vuoi riavviarlo? Hai qualche motivo per mantenere la posizione o qual è i
ロジャー、13-BRAVO。 146、03+32。 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 27 11. 56 46. 3+17, 8+36. 14-ブラボー: 04+07、09+0
いいえ。その通りです。分かりました。実際、30～34～36くらい
로저. 10, /: 45597, -040, +157, +35189, -01513, -00346 180 007 000, 노벰버 알파 +00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, 보어사이트 별 스콜피이 델타(다른 이름
Roger. Ich esse gerade. Zweite Mahlzeit am dritten Tag. Ich habe sechs Schlucke Wasser getrunken. Von den letzten fünf Stunden, in denen ich meinen Schlafrhyt
Roger. 1A e
Wenn ich er wäre, würde ich mich von 
Bon, Gene, je vais commencer par t'expliquer le fonctionnement de la combinaison pour que tout le monde soit tranquille. La température du dôme est de 72 degrés. L'entrée d'air est à 66 
تفضل. كنا ن
نعم، يمكنك إلقاء نظرة - إذا كنت تبحث عن شيء تفعله، يمكنك فقط إلقاء نظرة على اللوحة 
D'accord, Jim. Ça devrai
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Haben Sie meine letzte N
Okay, Joe. -7:, minus 0003.1, plus alle Kugeln, plus 0000.1, N/A, plus 0020.5, plus 0003.1, 0:23, 008 359; der Rest des Pads N/A. plus-X, vier Düsen,, Füllstand; das Gewicht, 25181; Gewicht, 62468.
रॉजर, 11. यह ह्यूस्टन है। लगभग 71 से 72 घंटे के बीच, हम आपको खाने के लिए बुला रहे हैं, जो शायद पहले से ही चल रहा होगा। 71 घंटे: O2 फ्यूल सेल पर्ज; 72 घंटे GET: CO2 फिल्टर परिवर्तन संख्या 6, सेकेंडरी रेडिएटर फ्लो चेक। और हम आपको 2 घंटे के पास, पेरीसिंथियन पास, रिटर्न मोड एबॉर्ट पर ब्लॉक डेटा भेजेंगे। 73 घंटे 00 मिनट पर: लगभग 0 डिग्री रोल पर रुकें। यानी, जब आप लगभग 73 घंटे पर 0 डिग्री रोल एंगल के करीब पहुंच रहे हों, तो हम चाहेंगे कि आप रुक जाएं। और ड्रिफ्ट चेक के लिए विकल्प 3 का पालन करें। 73 घंटे, 20 मिनट: हम आपको लैंडिंग साइट, 1 स्टेट वेक्टर और टारगेट लोड के बारे में अपडेट देंगे। 73 घंटे 30 म
Яркая, яркая голубая полоса на горизонте по 
Нет, это медленный проц
Aurora Seven, votre dernière transcr
자, 이제 당신 때문에 여기 비행팀이 CAP COMM에서 "딱 
收到，03+0
Sigma Seven, ici Zanzibar. Je ne reçois pas votre signal. Quel est votre moyen de transmi
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。回路ブレーカーのチェックリストのパネル11と16にあるように、パネルの設定をお願い
Итак, на данный момент таймером нашей миссии является компьютер, поэтому, активация таймера миссии 
ठीक है, 11. बहुत बढ़िया। अब, दस्तावेजी नमूना पात्र के संबंध में: टेलीविजन पर 
아, 그거 진짜 어렵
Roger, Mike. Couple of quick fl
حسنًا. فهمتُ الأمر يا جيم، وهذه هي نقطة الإطلاق. ه
黑白胶片的感光度读数为13（ASA 64）。感光度设置为13。使用滤镜拍摄第7张照片。由于天气原因，南美洲大陆很难拍摄。此时我将拍摄一张全景照片。拍摄时间接近8小时。实际上，拍摄时间将近8小时。MARKT，7、8、9张黑白照片。共拍摄10张黑白照片。拍摄参数为250 5.6（1/250秒，f/5.6），对焦无限远。拍摄第11张照片，向左看。此时我正横穿南美洲大陆。可以看到一条大河。拍摄一张照片，相机尽可能向下。我相信我把太空舱的窗口拍得很好。现在回到B-1。我已经拍摄了前12张照片。我在B-1上，拍摄云纹。我拍摄了B-2型相机，这些都是黑白照片，使用了气象局
أعرف (غير
अब बेहतर दिख रहा है। आप इसे लगभग 1 या 2 बजे क
Хьюстон, 11. Вы смотрите на это, а я продолж
まあ、
Bene. Questo sarà il Pacifico centrale, 357 152 359 268, più 0813, meno 16503 065 36221 645 12122 36301 0028. Il prossimo D0 400 02 12 0025 0334 08 14 16 0590 312; Zeta Persei, su 165, a destra 34, su. Usa schema di non uscita, allinea; stella primaria Sirio, secondaria Rigel
Et bien 
हम इसे खुद बदलने की कोशिश करे
Подтверждаем, 
रॉजर, फ्रेड। हमें दिख रहा है। तस्वीर बहुत अच्छी आ रही है, और आपका वर्णन भी बढ़िया है। हमें दिख रहा है कि जिम ने कैमरे को उसी तरह
Родж
.
Apollo 11, Houston. Environ 50 % du temps, nous 
罗杰，我……我在锻炼，而且我已经接上了血压计…
जिम, हम अभी इस बारे में चर्चा कर रहे हैं, और लगता है कि हमें ट्रैकिंग का इंतज़ार करना पड़ेगा। फिलहाल, चूंकि आप कॉरिडोर में हैं, तो इसे टाल
Nach dem Posten – viel
...débarrassez-vou
Dico che i tempi T1 e T2 rimangono invariati, affermativ
روجر. شكراً لك، وآمل أن تكون هذه ليلة سعيدة
彼は自分の向きを維持するのに苦労していました。そして、それ以降、宇宙船がどの方向を向いているかに関係なく、宇宙船から離れて向きを変えているように見えました。彼は実際には宇宙船に非常に高い回転速度、毎秒2度もの速度を与えることができました。私はその速度以下に抑えるつもりでした。彼が宇宙船に戻ったとき、ハッチの開閉にかなり苦労しました。まず、ハッチのラチェット部分を持ち上げてかみ合わせました。かみ合わせた後、ハッチを十分閉めることができませんでした。実際には、ドッグを外に出すためにロックハンドルを引き下げ始めました。それで、私たちはかなり興奮した時間を過ごしました。その様子は
In che modo volevi che disattivassimo quei propulsori plus-X? Semplicemente tirando gli interruttori TCA appropriati, o volevi
Gemini 4, you can t
كو
ठीक है। सुनिए। मैं आपको बता दूं कि मैं अभी-अभी अपने ECS O2 के छोटे से निजी प्लॉट का हिसाब रख रहा था, और पिछले कुछ घंटों में इस्तेमाल की गई मात्रा में मुझे कोई वृद्धि नहीं दिख रही है। ऐसा लगता है कि मेरा अनियमित प्लॉट अभी भी लगभग वैसा ही रहेगा जैसा कि हमें मिलने के तुरंत बाद द
Canary, soll diese Apollo La
Это подтверждается. Ук
D'accord. Houston a indiqué que si vous êtes dans l'i
네. 6단계, "전원 전환(투광등 꺼짐), 주의 경고 전원 주의 표시등 켜짐. 11번 패널, 회로 차단기 트라에슬루나 버스 타이, 닫힘. 16번 패널, 회로 차단기 트라에슬루나 버스 타이, 닫힘. 11번 패널, 조명 설비, 닫힘. 그리고 설비등을 작동시키십시오." 이상입니다. 그리고, 13번, 휴스턴. OMNI Bravo를 선택해 주십시오
Apollo 11, Hou
Apollo 11, this is Houston. Coming up on Canary; Tananarive at 37 04, Simplex
روجر. نقطة الدخول: المنطقة هي وسط المحيط الهادئ، الإحداثيات 000، 152، 001، 194 46 06، 267، خط العرض + 1332، - 16917، 064، 36194، 649، المدى المتبقي 14045، 36275، 195 03 06، 00 28، أقصى مسافة هبوط 154، 084، 22400، 18000، D0 400، 02 13، 00 17، 03 51، 09 02، نجم السدس 45 0189، 277، نجم محور الرؤية، غير متوفر، متجه الرفع للأعلى. ملاحظات: محاذاة، فيغا ودينيب، دوران 078، ميل 223، انحراف 340. ملاحظات إضافية: استخدم نمطًا غير خروجي، -30، فحص
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन
嘿，休斯顿，
卷号 177 144 00 NA 加 00197 47253
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。希望你们没事——我们没有打扰你们。请
不久前我打开了面罩，吃了木糖片。我船上其他的食物要么碎了，要么融化了。现在都
Apollo 
Ce n'était pas
Sieben hier. Treibstoff vorhanden, 4g, Kabinendruck 5,5, Sauerstoff vorh
——如果可以的话，最好在此之前进行 COMM 
奥様のコメントもきっと興味があるでしょう。ニール、ジャンは昨日の出来事についてこう言っていました。「信じられないほど完璧な夜でした。夫、乗組員、有人宇宙船センター、アメリカ国民、そして全人類と、月面探査の幕開けという素晴らしい体験を共有できたことは、光栄であり特権です。」それから、月面着陸が人生で最高の瞬間だったかと聞かれると、「いいえ、あれは私たちが結婚した日でした」と答えました。マイク、パットはただ「本当に素晴らしかった」とだけ答えました。バズ、ジョアンは、月面着陸がまだ信じられなかったようでした。「実際に人が動くまで、現実だとは思えませんでした。月面着陸の後、嬉しくて泣いてしまいました。」と彼女は言いました。しかし、彼女は付け加えました。「ミッショ
分かり
Gemini
Ok, Houston, Acquario. Come legg
Houston, what you're seeing in the middle of the screen
맞아요, 짐. 상승
这是友谊七号。之前非洲上空云层很厚，现在云层已经稀薄了很多。虽然我看不清大海，但月光很充足，反射在云层上。
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。もし1分ほどお時間が
О, мы оч
4개의 SPS/G&N만 해당: 38320
Houston, Columbia is in OMNI Charlie downvoice backup, and if you get a chance, would you look up the coordinates of 130 for me, please? I have been - conflicting information between my cue card and my flight plan. I'd like to know which coordinate values you 
请提供一些关于航班
알
알겠습니다. 목적은 근지점 + 2시간 후 중단입니다.:; +1633.0, -0014.5, -0751.5; 원지점은 적용되지 않으며, 근지점은 +0020.5입니다. 1797.7, 8:
Хорошо. Мы хотим, чтобы вы провели вентиляцию — туннельную вентиляцию до тех пор, пока не будет достигнуто з
D'accord.
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tempo per assistere al vostro ammaraggio. Ad accompagnare il Presidente ci saranno il Segretario di Stato William Rogers e Frank Borman. Assisteranno all'ammaraggio dal ponte della nave di recupero con l'Ammiraglio John Sidney McCain, Jr., Comandante delle Forze del Pacifico. Dopo la permanenza del Presidente a bordo dell'Hornet, partirà per il suo tour in Asia e la visita programmata in Romania. Si ritiene che Luna 15 si sia schiantata ieri nel Mare delle Crisi, dopo aver orbitato attorno alla Luna 52 volte. L'agenzia di stampa sovietica TASS ha riferito che sono state condotte ricerche "scientifiche" nello spazio vicino alla Luna. Sir Bernard Lovell dell'Osservatorio di Jodrell Bank ha affermato che Luna 15 ha colpito la superficie della Luna a una velocità di circa 480 chilometri orari. La situazione è stata relativamente tranquilla di recente in Vietnam. Soldati in pattuglia sono stati osservati con radio a transistor sintonizzate sul vostro volo. Le emittenti radiotelevisive delle Forze Armate in Vietnam hanno dato piena copertura alla missione. Le schermaglie continuano tra egiziani e israeliani lungo il Canale di Suez. Gli osservatori delle Nazioni Unite stanno cercando di fermare l'azione. A Washington, la Commissione per i Modi e i Mezzi della Camera ha votato per ridurre la tolleranza al depauperamento del petrolio dal 27,5% al ​​20%. Abbiamo piovuto diverse volte qui nella zona di Houston. Oggi è nuvoloso e sono previsti altri rovesci. Sul fronte sportivo, come accennato in precedenza, stasera si gioca l'All Star Game. Ieri non si è giocata nessuna partita. Ieri sera a New York, la Baseball Writers Association of America ha nominato Babe Ruth il più grande giocatore di baseball di tutti i tempi. Joe DiMaggio è stato nominato il più grande giocatore di baseball vivente. Frank Borman ha fatto gli annunci durante una cena in onore dei giocatori. Joe Namath ha trascorso un'intera giornata al training camp dei New York Jets. Cinque poliziotti hanno avuto difficoltà a trattenere circa 500 bambini che volevano 
Sono solo un po' curioso, Mike. Pensavo che
मैंने उन उपभोग्य सामग्रियों की सूची बना ली है, और मैं आपको हमारी मात्राएँ बता देता हूँ। हमें अल्फ़ा में 86 प्रतिशत, ब्रावो में 87
ठीक है। कोई बात नहीं। बस यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहता था कि ऑ
收到，吉姆。很高
أنت جاهز. المنطقة 9-برافو. هذا هو GET RC، 13:19:36؛ 400K هي 20 + 25؛ الانحناء العكسي هو 26 + 13؛ جميع زوايا الانحناء هذه، لجميع هذه التحديثات، ستكون 90 درجة: GET RC، 14:17:05؛ 400K، 20 + 32؛ الانحناء العكسي، 25 + 54. 11-2: GET RC، 52:
11、こちらはヒューストンです。中間軌道修正番号5、RCS/G&N: 26025、ピッチとヨーのトリムはNA、TIG 150 29 5453、マイナス00048、全てのボールはプラス、プラス00001 075 159 328。HAはNA、HPはプラス00230 00048 011 00048。六分儀星は03 
Nég
Удалите оставшиеся файлы, над которыми вы сейчас работаете, вернитесь к настройке положения в пространстве, а затем продолжите с того места, где это указано в плане полета, или, если хотите, сдвиньте время н
كولومبيا، هذه هيوست
水瓶座，休斯顿，我还有一些补充数据，跟我刚才读过
フレッド、ちょっとお知らせしたいのですが、セカンダリーキャニスターのCO2濃度のレッドラインに近づいています。あと30分ほどで到達
ठीक है, जिम। आपके वर्तमान कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में निम्नलिखित विशेषताएं हैं। हमने BAL LOAD सर्किट ब्रेकर के माध्यम से इलेक्ट्रिकल BUSES को आपस में जोड़ दिया है, और हमारे पास AUTO CABIN REPRESS है। अभी हम आपको एक अपलिंक देना चाहते हैं, इसलिए पैनल 11 पर UPDATA LINK सर्कि
مساء الخير. أودّ أن أناقش معكم بعض الجوانب الرمزية لرحلة مهمتنا، أبولو 11. فبينما كنا نناقش الأحداث التي جرت خلال اليومين أو الثلاثة الماضية على متن مركبتنا الفضائية، توصلنا إلى استنتاج مفاده أن هذه الرحلة كانت أكثر بكثير من مجرد رحلة ثلاثة رجال إلى القمر؛ بل وأكثر من جهود فريق حكومي وصناعي؛ وأكثر حتى من جهود دولة واحدة. نشعر أن هذه الرحلة تُجسّد فضول البشرية جمعاء الذي لا يشبع لاستكشاف المجهول. وأعتقد أن مقولة نيل قبل أيام، عند وطء قدمه سطح ا
了解。ヨースラスターの問題はどうなりましたか
了解しました。はっきりと理
Okay. 
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप हमें अपनी क्रू स्टेटस रिपोर्ट दे दें और यह पुष्टि कर दें कि 
罗杰。星体 02：这里印了两组，我们想把它改成一组；然后我们想加上星体 11，月球远景，两
دخلنا في الظلام عند الساعة 05:02 تقريبًا. فقدنا الرؤية على متن أجينا، وحصلت على ضوء نظام الاستحواذ على ال
Passing over the east side of Africa now. I see quite a few.
Roger. Allez-
C'est mon livre ou ton l
我的车载读数是 34%，我保持在 94
Это возвращает нас к некоторым проблемам, которые у нас были раньше: п
حسنً
we would like to ta
Это было 33 — разница примерно в 4 с
Dateci solo un po' di t
Roger. I
كل الأشياء تبدو بلون بني فاتح ورمادي، كما تعلم، هذا هو لونها. لكن عندما تقترب منها، عندما تراها، ستدرك أن هذا 
Hello, Tranquility Base. Houst
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Zanziba
Wir warten auf die Manöver
알겠습니다. 
Okay, Vance. We tried our AUTO OPTICS and couldn't pick it up there. We're pointing pretty much right into the Sun, and things are pretty well washed out. And I've gone to MANUAL OPTICS and I'm trying to get 0.8, 12.5 on the shaft an
Alpha/Pc к Pc; Индикатор запуска транспортного средства к GPI; Тангаж и рыскание карданного подвеса в режим AUTO; Сброс таймера события, вверх; Запуск таймера события, вниз; Минуты и секунды таймера события, в центр; Кла
여기도 모든 게 괜찮아
好的。等你忙完之后，我们会做一个简单
――どう読みますか？ 終わり
Di
休斯顿，加油
D'accord. Vous pouvez prendre le temps de trouver la meilleure attitude, et vous n'aurez pas à la maintenir jusqu'à ce moment-là, si vous vous y remettez simple
La squadra di ri
了解。燃料は1.0、酸化剤は0.25。OXアンバランスの値は減少傾向にあるが、これはあまり意
Хо
好吧，至
Okay. Wir haben Ihre Daten erhalten. Wir sind bereit, Ihre Anfrage zu bearbeiten, un
Und Houston, Apollo 11. Wir haben das O2-Ventil des REPRESS-Pakets in Schritt 13 kurzzeitig auf FILL gestellt und die Flaschen teilweise wieder aufgefüllt. Wie hoch ist der Druckw
Oh, è la sintesi delle opinioni di tutti i nostri espe
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это Занзибарский Капитолийский Коммодор.
Bene. Questo è un commento generale che si riferisce a qualsiasi momento in cui si sta lavorando o quando si passa da e, e si dovrebbe fare attenzione a non chiamare un VERBO esteso durante questo periodo. Questo è qui nelle note
هيوستن، كولومب
إغلاق حاجب الشمس. حسنًا. لنلقِ نظرة ونرى أين نحن. في هذه المرحلة، أجرينا فحصًا لمقياس الجرعات. سأخفض زاوية ميل المركبة 
روجر. مع هذه الرؤية الجيدة والاتصالات الممتازة، سنكتفي بوصف شفهي دون رؤية التلسكوب الماسح الآن. كانت زوايا المناورة نحو نجم السماك الرامح جيدة جدًا. لقد وضعتُ السماك الرامح في مركز التلسكوب الماسح. عند هذه الزاوية الشمسية، يوجد شعاع ضوئي يمر مباشرةً عبر مركز التلسكوب، بالإضاف
Они довольно часто издают булькающие звуки, не правда ли? Хотя
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM.
Tu es tr
好的。寄存器 1 读取到 1
로저, 휴스턴. 플러스 2, 기동 계획 / 61503, 마이너스 158,
برج الدلو، هل يمكنك الحصول على قراءة للأمبير والفولت من جهاز أو
سيكون ذلك جيداً. جهاز إرسال إشا
알겠습니다. E-11의 5단계에서 첫 번째 소제목은 헬멧과 장갑이고, 그 아래 항목들은 우주복 착용 여부에 따라 달라지지만 모두 완료해야 합니다. 우주복의 공기 배출 밸브는 우주복 차림일
Aufnahme 8 an einer Küste. Es müsste d
Okay. is looking at that battery amperage that you gave us awhile ago. He'd like to see it about a half an amp to an amp lower. Like you to ask Jack to just check the circuit breakers and switches that he's pulled in so far and make sure he doesn't have any extra loads on MAIN A; specifically, the FLOODLIGHT configuration, and his CAUTION AND WARNING circuit breakers, and his ESSENTIAL INSTRUMENTATION POWER circuit brea
알겠습니다. 확인했습니다. 해당 회로 차단기 두 개는 열어두고, 데이터 링크는 음성 백업으로 연결해 두겠습니다. 그리고 다음 회로 차단기 
Dovrai dirmi le altitudini perché non riesco a
Houston, 13. Are you still planning to have TV at the scheduled
Oh
Continual flashes.
Роджер, мы использовали Pulse Control в минимальном объеме; цель номер 12 была скрыта облаками; я дово
Okay. Ich habe die alte zweite Stufe. Sie dreht sich und sieht
मुझे लग
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि अंतरिक्ष कार्यक्रम को लगभग सभी ने अत्याधुनिक इलेक्ट्रॉनिक उपकरणों से भरा हुआ ही समझा है, और निश्चित रूप से, इसमें बहुत कुछ ऐसा ही है। लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि मैं यहाँ कुछ और चीज़ें भी दिखाऊँगा। पहली चीज़ से आपको टैंक में बचे हुए पानी की मात्रा का बहुत सटीक माप मिल जाता है। हम इस थैली का उपयोग करेंगे जो मैं अभी दिखा रहा हूँ, टैंक में बचे हुए पानी को इकट्ठा करने के लिए और यह देखने के लिए कि वास्तव में कितना पानी बचा है, और उम्मीद है कि भविष्य के मिशनों में, इन इकाइयों के लिए अनुमत समय को सुरक्षित रूप से थोड़ा और ब
11, vous avez une audience 
Gemini VIII, this is Houston. Put your Cryogenic Quantity switch to FUEL C
وفي الصف السفلي يا جاك،
알겠습니다. 이해했어요. 이 시
سيجما سفن، هذه شرك
ठीक है। यह सही है। अब मुझे आपको उस वक्र पर अंकित करने के लिए कुछ बिंदु भी देने होंगे। आपने जो वक्र बनाया है वह 60 मील के पेरिजी या पेरिलून पर आधारित है, और अभी आपके पास 62 मील का पेरी
Okay. Apollo 8. Looks like we're going to have to put this COMM test off because of some tracking requirements. We can do it in about an hour if this will not interfere with your present operations too much. It'll take maybe 15 to 20 minutes, and it will involve some conversa
Привет, Майкл, связь прервалась, и Билл нажал кнопку COMMAN
لإعادة ضبط الوقت الصحيح على
Nous sommes d'accord avec ça
了解、フレッド。読み上げは正解です。六分儀の星は26度、軸は15
ठीक है। आपके कंप्यूटर पर कुछ बेकार डेटा दिख रहा है। अगर आप 'त्रुटि रीसेट' बटन दबाएंगे, तो हम इस प्रोग्राम अलार्म को ह
C'est exact. Compris. Je les ai tous compris et ce so
That is negative, Bill. Not quite, on the OMNI's
مجر
문제없습니다. 모든 소모품 재고가 정상 수준입니다. 수소 탱크 문제에 대해
Близнецы VI, ваша орбита составляе
حسنًا يا جو. و
了解。了解。こちらでもキーキーと
Это «Сигма Семь». Я 
Jim, for tonight, request that you disable quads C and D. That's the opposite of last ni
Ho fatto un controllo elettrico. Abbiamo avuto problemi di comunicazione durante 
Oui, c'est possible. Ce couplage est très particulier: le délai est plus long qu'on ne le pens
The stowage people have tried out this black-and-white TV camera into B-6 idea and they say even with the lens off, they can't get it in. So, I still recommend that 
Pour le grand match des Astro Blue Bonnet, le classique du basket-ball suivi de la rencontre entre les Astro Blue Bonnet de SMU et d'Oklahoma, l'excitation est à son comble. On ne sait pas encore qui est favori. Je me renseignerai et vous tiendrai au courant. La Coupe Davis a débuté en Australie et les États-Unis espèrent reconquérir le titre. Apparemment, nous sommes favoris pour y parvenir aujourd'hui. Autre information: O.J. Simpson a été nommé joueur de l'année en football univ
友谊七号，这里是桑给巴尔首都公司……这里是桑给巴尔首都公司
З
روجر. فقط اترك الاتصال على REACQ. س
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait pas fonctionner correctement. La méthode que j'ai finalement utilisée consistait à entrer dans [nom de la zone manquante], à nous rendre à Sirius, notre étoile la plus brillante, à récupérer l'axe et le tourillon, puis à faire voyager le vaisseau spatial jusqu'à Sirius pour l'utiliser pour l'optique, ce que nous avons fait ultérieurement. En ce qui concerne la diffusion de la lumière, il semble que, quelle que soit l'attitude pendant notre contrôle thermique passif, 
听着，我就是不刮胡子。我现在这么漂亮，恐怕没人会再
D'accord. C'est bien lui. Il s'agit de Jim Lovell. Aujourd'hui, nous souhaitions vous faire découvrir un peu la vie à bord d'Apollo
Okay. After that, CB CTE, MAIN B, to close.
Apollo 8, Houston. Mentre ti prepari per la tua missione, abbiamo un aggiornamento per DELTA-H per te, se sei pr
收到。5000人分散；西北风10节；浪高3英尺；高度表读数2986；救援部队呼号为Naha RESCUE 1，格林尼治标准时间02:58；Nahe SEARCH 1，格林尼治标准时间03:44；“梅森”号驱逐舰，预计到达时间未知；航天器日出时间为10:08:40；Retrofir
D'accord, Jim. Je suppose que le point important est que vous n'avez pas remarqué la
रॉजर। आपको सूचित किया जाता है कि लगभग 50 - मुझे ये प्रतिध्वनियाँ अक्सर सुनाई देती हैं, और यदि आप संगीत बजाने की कोशिश कर रह
收到。将摄像机安装到可调节的电视支架上，并将支架安装到舱门
Beh, Houston, non abbiamo avuto molto tempo per parlarti della vista dal finestrino mentre ci preparavamo per l'espulsione; ma fino a quel momento avevamo l'intera parte settentrionale dell'emisfero illuminato visibile, inclusi il Nord Americ
I took an S-5 picture of a cloud formation over the Pacific coming on the Coastal Sentry Quebec area at 00 using f/11 at 150. It was frame no. 28. I'm taking several pictures for S-5. I'm right in the area of the tropical storm Carla. It's very heavily overcast right now. I'll take a few of the cloud formations. They have some very interesting formations interlaced on the top of them. Perhaps the camera will pick them up. It's so bright I'm going to shoot 250 at 16. Those will be frames 28, 29, and I'll be shooting at least two more. Those will be 30 and 31. I shou
Хорошо, PDI pad: 102:33:0
Non, je
Хорошо. Имейте в виду, что когда 
نقطتان أخريان يا فريد. أولاً، لا نتوقع أي خلل يُذكر في محاذاة محركك أثناء الاحتراق، لذا لا نتوقع أي تغيرات في معدلات الدفع طوال مدة الاحتراق، خاصةً مع انخفاض قوة الدفع. ث
好的。我们读到3g，看来这次可以不用再进行再入阻尼检查了。现在读到4g。再入过程似乎进展顺利。辅助阻尼器似乎能够应对目前的阻力变化。我觉得我的俯仰幅度不大；
现在把宇航服的设置调到8。也就是宇航服冷却剂的量调到8。宇航服进气口的温度现在是65度，感
Bene, grazie. Come funziona il contr
Джим, мы согласны с тем, что вы использовали два небольших кратера, которые вы можете неоднократно отмечать и находить на карте; а также, если вы сообщите нам ваши новые широты и долготы, мы сможем вычислить для вас время минимального сближения с этими точками при угле наклона космического аппарата на 10 градусов вверх. Конец 
А показания механического блока управления двигателем, похоже, составляют примерно 4/100 градуса ниже нул
Okay. 30 plus 15 for battery
역방향 지연은 정상입니다. 알겠습
迈克，你是想让我
Роджер, Колумбия. Сейчас 
Roger. Son
守った方がいいみたいですね。何をしてもデッドバンドが崩れてしまいそ
Allez-y, H
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 탑재된 벡터 데이터를 바탕으로 진행 상황을 분석한 결과, 매우 양호한 것으로 보입니다. 현재 추적 데이터는 
Roger. Ho finito 
結果は 5337.3、毎秒 
Ci vorrà un bel po'. Abbiamo un lungo per
Sì, ho controllato attentamente la mia tuta 
Affirmative. Under "VHF/S-band Activation and Checkout," scratch step 1. Under step 2, change "DOWN VOICE BACKUP" to VOICE. Scratch step 3. Under " turn on," scratch entire procedur
로저. 달 궤도에서 발생한 재부팅과 관련하여, 컴퓨터 전문가들과 MIT 관계자들의 안심을 위해 질문 하나 드리겠습니다. 깜빡이는 신호에 ENT
Ro
Roger. Für das NSR-Manöver: Brenndauer 03 + 47 + 37; Delta-VT 42,9; Dauer 
Итак, как вы можете видеть, мы движ
Ich g
टाइफाइड जैक यहाँ है, और हमारे
ठीक है। ऐसा लगता है 
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Я переключился на электронное управление, чтобы контролировать самолет точнее. Проблема началась сразу после прибытия в Гуаймас, и, похоже, самолет начинает отклоняться от курса вправо примерно на 1° в секунду. Он переходит в положение примерно на 20°, удерживает его, а когда достигает этой точки, переходит в режим ориентации и возвращается к нулю. В этом режиме он постоянно переключается туда-обратно. Сейчас я использую электронное управление и управля
Vi aggiorneremo sulla regolazione finale dell'altezza sulle Hawaii. Inoltre, vorremmo che controllaste l'asse X... È leggermente fuori tolleranza. Quindi non premete START COMP fino a tardi per 
햇빛은 창문 자체에 아무런 영향을 
Et, à Houston, Fred s'occupera de la caméra pendant que nous passerons en revue la liste de
सिग्मा सेवन। मैं इस ब्लैकआउट की समस्या को हल करने की उम्मीद में बात करता रहूंग
わかりました、アポロ8号。通信性能について具体的な数値を発表する
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 중앙 짐벌 각도가 상당히 
11, Houston. Buzz, on dit en coulisses qu'on peut effectivement charger le, mais qu'il ne fau
Что ж, Брюс, это отчасти утвердительный ответ. У нас есть два водородных фильтра, которые отлично работают, пока их не подключаешь к пакету с продуктами. Но через входное отверстие в пакет с продуктами возникает достаточное обратное давление, чтобы фильтры начали терять свою эффективность. Пару раз у меня возникало искушение провести процедуру просушки, но мы обнаружили, что, просто оставив фильтры в покое на пару часов, их эффективность, кажется, восст
罗杰。方便的话，我们希望将污水排放口的剩余量减少到5%
罗杰，我同意。我一直在找信号弹。你
VGX 栏目里应该
... for the hoses? Well, check the ends of
罗杰。我们现在正在进行第 21 号程序，确定我们之前未
Base Tranquility, Houston. Avez-vous réussi à joindre ces deux personnes au niveau des disjoncteurs de pr
わかりました。これは、先ほど述
로저. 페리신시안 플러스 2, 빠른 반환, / 61503, 마이너스 158, 플러스 131, 플러스 59578, 마이너스 00086, 마이너스 05287. 
Хорошо. Это замечательно. Думаю... нам следует вернуться к первоначальным процедурам, которые у нас 
Хорошо. Думаю, вы выбрали не т
Okay, Jack ist jetzt bei mir und ihr alle... Verfahren zur Herstel
우리가 
127 03 3082، زائ
Und die uralte Frage, die uns immer wieder gestellt wird, ist, wie wir flüssige Abfälle entsorgen. Diese Leitung, die Sie sehen – ich denke, Sie können sie jetzt erkennen –, führt direkt nach draußen, wo wir den Überbordabfluss
11、ここテ
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. نعم. نطلب تنظيف خلية الوقود بالهيدروجين والأكسجي
... 25 minutes... not wake him up at that time if he's still sleeping s
سيقومون بفكّ جها
Négatif. RET 400 K est 13+48.
2
어젯밤 잠든 직후에 종합 경보가 울려서 정말 깜짝 놀랐다는 게 흥미로울지도 모르겠네요. 그래서 조
Bene. Riga 3 sotto COMM. Aprire DISPLAY, chiudere SE AUDIO, ap
Okay.
अरे वाह, चार्ली! तुम तो कमाल लग रहे हो। बहुत बढ़िया जलाया है
休斯顿水瓶座。关于二氧化碳气瓶，顺便说一下，现在这里的二氧化碳分压读数是1.6。我们预计现有的两个气瓶至少还能用6个小时。
Ha! Ha! Ich habe immer noch schwarze Bre
休斯顿，阿波罗
Ri
Dovremo cominciare a pensare a come... riaddormentarci di nuovo perché 
लॉजिक पा
알았어, 잭. 내가 알려준 배터리 충전 절차로 돌아가. 충전을 종료하려면, 내가 알려준 회로 스위치 옆에 "열림" 또는 "꺼짐"이라고 적기만 하면 돼. 그러니까 250번 패널의 회로 차단기는 이미 열었고, 275번 패널의 인버터 전원-2 메인 B는 열림, 5번 패널의 배터리 릴레이 버스 배터리 A는 열림, 센서 유닛 AC 버스 2는 열림, 센서 신호 AC2는 열림, 배터리 충전기 메인 B는 열림, 배터리 충전기 AC 전원은 열림, 배터리 충전기 배터리 A 충전은 열림, 인버터 제어 2는 열림, 인버터 제어 3은 열림. 메인 버스 연결은 이미 했지. 그리고 BAT CHARGE 스위치를 AC 1로 설정하십시오. 패널 3에서는 이미 AC INVERTER 2를 OFF로, INVERTER 2 AC BUS 2를 OFF로, AC BUS 2 RESET을 OFF로 설정했습니다. 또한 BATTERY CHARGER 스위치를 OFF로
Une fois la vitesse de rotation suffisamment basse pour nous permettre de nous désamarrer en toute sécurité, nous avons procédé à la manœuvre et nous sommes éloignés de l'Agena à une vitesse de plusieurs mètres par seconde aussi rapidement que possible. Nous avions constaté une diminution de notre réserve de propergol de 50 % à moins de 30 %. Après avoir coupé l'OAMS et tout en co
हाँ, बिलकुल। लगता है मुझे बाइकोन के लि
グ
Индикатор сканера по-прежнему не гаснет. Вот он. Именно из-за него он погас в пр
ठीक है। जीएमटीबी 15 43 23. ΔV 139. जलने की अवधि - 2 मिनट 39 सेकंड. आपका 15 55 24. बाएँ रोल करें 55. जीएमटीबी 16 05 28. दाएँ रोल करें 65. जीएमटी 400 के 15 58 23. आपका पैंतरेबाज़ी भार: 6344257, 0444775, 0533348, 
Nous aimerions effectuer quelques tests supplémentaires, et le consensus général est qu'il ne semble pas y avoir de problème particulier. Nous aimerions examiner les résultats de quatre ou cinq tests supplémentaires. Auparavant, nous souhaiterions réaliser un test de biais nul. Comme nous n'avons aucun moyen de contrôler ces opérations sur la liaison descendante, je vous serais reconnaissant de bien vouloir nous décrire chaque étape, notamment 
Wel
Roger. Ich verste
Stand by. That was incorrect. Three minutes
좋아요. 한 명만 
오, 좋아요. 잘 읽었습니다. 하나, 둘, 셋, 넷, 다섯, 다섯, 넷, 셋, 둘, 하나. 제가 아직도 중간에 끊었다 들어갔다
로저, 
さて、あと 2 分で、DELTA-V THRUST、NORMA
ثانيًا، سنعود إلى الجدول الزمني المعتاد مع موعد استيقاظك المقرر بعد 121 ساعة و12 دقيقة. لقد أغفلنا تغيير علبة هيدروكسيد الليثيوم رقم 9 أثناء
... borsa esterna... la rimet
Ihr Chef sagt, es sei ungla
حسناً يا أرض. هذه 
سيجما سفن.
У нас сейчас есть 203-й проект, и, похоже, он требует
Okay. Unter Zeile 4: Unter HEIZUNGEN sollten Ihre QUAD-Heizungen – also alle vier – geschlossen sein. Öffnen Sie DISPLAYS, S-BAND-ANTENNE und SEQUENZKAMERA. Darunter: Öffnen Sie DISPLAYS, schlie
لا يمكن قراءة كلامك يا جاك. لدينا مقياس قوة 
네, 맞습니다. 충분한 분리감을 제공할 뿐만 아니라, 속
로저. 글리콜 온도는 50도로 설정했
11, hier spricht Houston. Basierend auf Ihrer letzten Aus
أبولو 8، هيوستن. 
ヒ
I'm also figuring that when we've got to go back in there, we'll... take the drogue and the food ... back here - take these - put these back in t
O
Sono passati 5 minuti e 15 secondi da quando abbiamo iniziato. L'atteg
e continuo a vedere alcuni effetti fiocco 
Ja. Oh, was ich gerne herausfinden würde, ist, wie viele – j
Vorremmo - In un test finale, quan
حسنًا. سنتحقق من وصلة الإرسال هذه عبر الصوت. كان الإرسال على التلفزيون - نود 
Это под
Comput
Okay. Hearing you 5 square now, Jim. And the question we have, is there some way you can orient the spacecraft so that the service module is between the and the Sun so you can recognize constellations out the window? And secondly, can you see anything o
Ich habe zwar noch keinen Schnupfen, aber ich fühle mich so nah dran wie nie zuvor. Ich glaube, es liegt an diesem verdammten 100-prozentigen Sauerstoff. Ich atme ihn e
حصلت على 
У нас то же самое. Мы выбрали вариа
네, 그렇습니다. 비상 계획서를 꺼내셔서 '전력' 6페이지를 펴주시면 됩니다. 이상
Bon, alors. Pensez-vous qu
告诉他，我希望他能解释一下
Джим, ситуация такова, чт
Lo dico perché sicuramente non l'
ठीक है, एसी बस बी के अंतर्गत: एस-बैंड एंटीना, खुला; खुला। एसी बस ए के अंतर्गत: टेप रिकॉर्डर, खुला। सिस्टम ए के अंतर्गत पंक्ति 2: मुख्य सोव। क्वाड टीसीए से शुरू करते हुए; चारों बंद। क्रॉस-कमांडर क्रॉस-पॉइंटर के अंतर्गत, खुला; खुला; खुला। पंक्ति 3 के अंतर्गत रेंडेज़वस रडार स्टैंडबाय, खुला; लैंडिंग रडार, खुला। स्टेब/कंट्रोल के अंतर्गत: एटीट्यूड डायरेक्ट कंट्रोल, बंद। ईडी के अंतर
是的，我确实这么做了。我想我确实
このビットビジネスから得られるものをコマンドモジュールの組み合わせに外挿することは非常に難しいと思います。な
Je suis presque à la verticale. Nous allons prendre des photos de cumulus. L'astuce du timing est… La photo sera en coule
짐, 우리
Ready
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯
هل كان 
로저. 층화 현상이 발생한 수소 탱크를 버리고 싶지 않으니, 2번 탱크의 팬
Verseau, Houston.
Houston, Apollo 8. 1 manovre: / 63295 meno 163 più 129 più 00136
Okay. One thing, Joe; I just want to doublecheck again. All the stuff that normally was going to start at 57 hours, which the first item was pressurize to 5.7 p
Bene. Ora, Fred, questo era corretto nella checklist. È tutto. Tra poco ti daremo la checklist per lo spegnimento e vorremmo chiederti se intendi usar
Acquario
そうだったかな？.
趁着 B
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Три положения переключателей. Переключатель «ВХОДЫ ТЕЛЕМЕТРИИ» в положение «НИЗКИЙ»; режим S-диапазона «НОРМАЛЬНЫЙ» — «ГОЛОС»; режим S-диапазона «НОРМАЛЬНЫЙ» — «ДОБАВИТЬ». Повторяю, переключатель «ВХОДЫ ТЕЛЕМЕТРИИ» — «НИЗКИЙ»; режим S-диапазона «НОРМАЛЬНЫ
प्रतीक्षा करें
Roger. Ecco un breve riassunto degli aggiornamenti che riceverai. Quello che 
... مباشرة من شاشات العرض الداخلية... بعد الاحتراق عند ا
استكمالاً لما كنتُ أُقدّمه من معلومات حول الصاروخ المُعزِّز، في بداية الرحلة. بعد دخولنا الظلام، على مسافة تُقدّر بـ 1200 قدم، حاولتُ الحفاظ على موقعي بالنسبة له، لكنّني لم أكن أملك سوى المسافة بين الأضواء الوامضة لتقدير المسافة بيني وبين الصاروخ في ذلك الوقت. كنتُ أرى ضوءًا واحدًا، ثم ضوءين، ثم ضوءًا واحدًا، وأحيانًا أخرى، كان يمرّ وقت طويل قبل أن أرى ضوءين، مما يُشير إلى أن الصاروخ 
네, 짐. 공의 전원을 켜둔
I'm going to track on the -- see that w
Okay. Than
حسنًا يا كين. نقطة الحضيض + 2، عودة سريعة / 62871، -161، +129، +45224، -06216، -18712 001 28 603 49118 112 038 296 الأرض لأعلى 010، يمين 37، +1475، +06400 1323 936 913، النجم الرئيسي سيريوس، النجم الثانوي ريجل 129 155 010، لا يوجد فراغ، افترض نفس المحاذاة 4، 5 تحديد GERU NC-4 من 0 إل
База Спокойствия, прошло чуть меньше 10 минут. Всё выглядит хорошо, и мы предполагаем, что управляемый транспорт находится в автоматическом режиме движен
11, Houston. Looks like the command module's in good
Voyons voir. Que contenait d'autre 
D'accord. Veuillez noter que la charge dans votre ordinateur est de 18:1, avec la charge de manœuvre. Votre temps de 
斯迈思海看起来不太像海。这片区域——几乎没
이글, 여기는 컬럼비아입니다. 휴스턴에서 또 연락이 끊겼어요. 고이득 수신 재시도를 요청하고 있습니다
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. لم أتحدث في ذلك الوقت. نحن نبحث في بعض الجوانب لمساعدتكم الآن. بالإشارة إلى سؤالكم السابق حول تنظيم دورات النوم، فإننا نتفق مع تعليقكم. نود العودة إلى خطة الرحلة فيما يتعلق بدورات النوم وما إلى ذلك بحلول وقت دخولنا مدار القمر. لذا، نود منكم استخدام تقديركم الشخصي لاختيار الطريقة الأمثل لتنظيم دورات النوم وتوزيعها بينكم. نود منكم إطلاعنا على مهام كل فرد وخططكم. لدينا مهمة تأخرت ساعتين، ونود إنجاز المهمة الأخرى. يمكننا أيضًا تعديل وقت المهمة الأخرى إذا كان هناك تعارض - أعتقد أن هذا يعني مهمتين إضافيتين. يمكننا تعديل وقت هاتين المهمتين إذا أبلغتمونا بتوقعاتكم الجوية لموعد تواجد جيم لأخذ بعض الملاحظات. إذًا، الرسالة الأساسية هي أننا نرغب في العمل بما يتناسب مع رغباتكم. إذا 
Это «Дружба Семь». Подтв
D'accord. Dans ce cas, je pense que je vais utiliser des disjoncteurs et vous laisser surveiller la situation
Die Sterne des Sternbilds Corvus sind jetzt gut sic
انخفاض من الغطاء الرئيسي... أرى الأرض... قوة الجاذبية ت
哦。我们的示意图显示你刚刚触及18万英里线。所以你
ちょうど今頃、オリオン座がよく見えています。美しい眺めですね。プレアデス星団とアルヴァグリンも見えます。アルヴァグリンを見て、何ができるか
로저. 1, G&N: 627
Stiamo per i
Gemini 4. Gemini 4. RKV C
Okay. In DISCESA 1, la temperatura del
いいえ、どうやら地球信
了
알겠습니다. 그리
Чт
わかった。ヴァンス、今すぐ窓から引き出さなきゃ。太陽は右側から昇ってく
ठीक है, चलिए शुरू करते हैं। इलेक्ट्रॉनिक्स पावर, बंद... पैनल 8। सभी 16 स्विच, बंद। इंटीरियर न्यूमेरिक्स लाइटिंग, बंद; इंटीरियर इंटीग्रल
Хорошо. Сначала откройте страницу 12. В правой части страницы, начиная с середины, все, что находится под заголовком «Рамки цикла 5, Заменить темную сторону или темный
도킹 프로브, 확장/해제
네. 음정은 
罗杰。关于服务舱喷射器，我觉得你应该知道一个细节：我们会建议你采用推拉式机动，也就是我刚才描述的那种姿态。我们希望你以每秒0.5英尺的速度前进，然后
Roger. Fly-by-Wire ist geprüft; alle T
Il nous reste 1 minute avant Tananarive; on se retr
分かりました。彼らは小型ボー
Sì, da qui sembra che tu e Fred dovreste dormire un po' e che dovreste mangiare tra circa 6 ore. E
एडाप्टर 
उन्हें यह देखने 
Roger,
Okay. And you are about ready for us to go to the a
Gemini 4. Flight хотел бы получить подтв
Roger. Ich denke schon, Buzz. Wir werden sie bitten, der Sac
Rép
D'accord. La charge de la batterie est e
Близнецы VII, Близнецы VI. 
Yes, it has a random drift. There is no oscillation that I can predict whatsoever. The--the line leading to the balloon sometimes is tight; sometimes is loose--loose enough, so that there are loops in it. Its--its behaviour is strictly random as far as I can tell. The balloon is not inflated well either. It's an oblong shape out there, rather than a round figure; and I believe when the sun is on it, the day-gl
Roger, Jim. Ich möchte mit euch über diese Sache mit der hohen O2-Nutzungsrate sprechen
Ricevuto. A EEP, la batteria A ha 38,95 ampere-ora; la batteria B ha 36,35 ampere-ora; la batteria C ha 38,46 ampere-ora. Il totale è 113,76 ampere-ora. A,
Хорошо, Джим. «Когда устройство находится в нужном положении, выведите стрелку ACA из положения фиксации в положение нулевой ошибки. Затем установите таймер событ
收
مرحباً يا فنيي الاتصالات في غوايماس، فنيي الاتصالات في غوايماس. هذه فريندشيب سفن. استقبلوا إشار
ローマでは、ヨハネ23世を聖人にする動きが進んでいるようです。100年ほどかか
D'accord. 
इस समय रक्तचाप पर चर्चा हो र
Давайте на
标
Хорошо, 
रॉजर। समझ गया। सब ठीक है। हमें आपके तापमान मिल गए हैं। आपका 150 इन्वर्टर, 152 डिग्री। आपका 250 इन्वर्टर, 167 डिग्री। समझ गए? 
收到
罗杰·弗
Пр
水瓶座，休斯
11, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अभी OMNI एंटीना कॉन्फ़िगरेशन पर स्विच करें। हम S बैंड एंटीना OMNI को Bravo
Calculé hors plan à environ 31 pieds par seconde
चार्ली, कल हम अपने सामान को यथासंभव सामान्य स्थिति में व्यवस्थित करेंगे। कुछ चीज़ें जो सामान्य स्थिति में नहीं होंगी, वे इस प्रकार हैं: विज़र को कमांड मॉड्यूल में वापस लाया गया है, और अभी तक हमने उनके लिए कोई जगह नहीं ढूंढी है। हम आपको बता देंगे कि वे कहाँ जाएंगे। इसके अलावा, एबल 8 कंपार्टमेंट से लगभग 5 पाउंड का अतिरिक्त सामान है, और यह एलसीजी की जगह लेगा, जिसे हमने ए 8 से सूट बैग में स्थानांतरित कर दिया था। हमने एक अतिरिक्त सामान से भरा बैग हटा दिया है, जिसमें ज्यादातर पुराने खाने के रैपर, पुराने अंडरवियर और सीएमपी का हेलमेट प्रोटेक्टिव विज़र था। हमने वह सब ईगल के पास छोड़ दिया है। और बस यही 
Хорошо, Джек. Следующий шаг — заткнуть обходное отверстие, то есть отверстие в центре дна канистры; нам нужно его заткнуть, потому что мы не хотим, чтобы поток воды перетекал; и я забыл сказать тебе, что нужно что-нибудь заткнуть в это отверстие. Мы рекомендуем исп
正常、NSR 03 47 34; 61.6; 01 プラス 22; ヨー ゼロ、ピッチ 23 度下; 25, 00567; 26, 00240; 27, 0000; スラスター後方; ポジグレード
كولومبيا، هيوستن. نلاحظ انخفاض درجة حرارة مخرج التبخير لديك. يُرجى الانتقال إلى التحكم اليدوي في درجة الحرارة ورفعها. يمكنك مراجعة الإجراءات في MAL 17. 
Roger. Fin de la combustion: 3 47 37; Delta-V: 42,9; durée de combustion: 54 secondes; lacet: 0; tangage: 3 degrés; Noyau 25: 00429; Noyau 26: 00023; Noyau 27: zéro; propulseur
استعدوا ل
로저. 더
Très bien. Je ne m'ennuie pas ici. J'ai survolé Midway il y a peu. J'ai eu une belle vue. Je remonte vers vous, au nord bien sûr. J'ai transmis mon
Bene. Faremo in modo che il progetto sia quell
I turned my S-BAND VOLUME down to get ri
Роджер. Угол крена 00 градусов; RN минус RP, плюс 107; угол крена 44 град
13، هيوستن. نعم. أنت جاهز لتشغيل ذراع إطلاق النار
了解、カントン。フレンドシップ・セブンの繰り返しです
ロジャー
Роджер. Эй, Джим, пока ты не сп
Anfangs verhinderte die Operation mit dem Treibstoffablass den geplanten sofortigen Beginn unserer Beobachtungen, da wir ein weiteres Ausweichmanöver durchführen mussten. Der Ablass des Treibstoffs verursachte eine enorme Menge an Pseudosternen in dem Gebiet, was eine optische Kalibrierung praktisch unmöglich machte. Die von uns entwickelte Methode erwies sich als wenig effektiv. Schließlich verwendete ich die Methode, in den Weltraum einzudringen, Sirius, unseren hellsten Stern, anzusteuern, die Achse und den Zapfen zu bergen und das Raumschiff dann zu Sirius zu fliegen, um diese für die optische Kalibrierung zu verwenden, was wir später auch ta
Дам вам 
ठीक है। अंतिम भंडारण के अंतर्गत चरण 34 पर, जो एक तरह का व्यापक क्षेत्र है, एक चरण है जिसमें रेडिएटर के लिए सेकेंडरी ग्लाइकॉल लिखा है, और उसमें बाईपास, सत्यापित करें लिखा है। जब हम इस क्षेत्र में हैं, तो हम पैनल 382, ​​जल नियंत्रण पैनल पर जाना चाहेंगे, और प्राथमिक और
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. لقد رأينا أبولو 26 مرة واح
Мертвое лицо, парикмахерский столб. Хорошо, на 11, автоматические выключате
Hervorragend. Wir suchen schon länger na
Sì. Questo è tut
Je crois bien. De 
ठीक है, जैक। पैनल 3 पर, बैटरी चार्जर, बंद, एसी इन्वर्टर 2, बंद; पैनल 5 पर, मेन बस टाई अ
इस तरफ से तो स
Okay. Das ist – das ist jetzt Fred. Ich versuche ihn gerade richtig herum zu drehen, für euch da hinten im Schlafsaal. Fred, könntest du bitte deine Hände so bewegen, dass die Leute zu Hause dich sehen kön
态度
روجر، فهمت. وفقًا لخطة الرحلة، من المفترض أن تنتقل إلى نظام التحكم الإلكتروني بالطيران (FBW) الآن، ويقول إ
Apollo. 8, this
정말이지, 이런 작은 원뿔형 분화구 안에 있는 것보다 더 황량한 곳은 없을 것
ヒ
Okay. You'll find that the area a
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। जिज्ञासावश, उन 70 मिमी कैमरों पर, हमने अनुमान लगाया कि हमने लगभग 300 तस्वीरें अंदर लीं और कमांड मॉड्यूल में लगभग एक हजार तस्वीरें लीं; और दोनों कैमरे - या सभी 70 मिमी कैमरे - बिल
Apollo 8, this i
减去 00014，加上所有零，加上 00001 000 304 000，不适用，加上 00191 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225 Shaula，向上 236 000，加上 0813，减去 16503 12202 36301，天狼星，参宿七，308 209 3
Ricevuto. Trasmissi
阿波罗8号。休斯
Columbia, Houston. Nous avons encore quelques vecteurs à vous envoyer. Ils arriveront sous peu et vous pourrez ensuite procéder. Terminé
मेरी चेकलिस्ट में एक और "कैप्चर लैच लगे हैं या नहीं, सत्यापित करें" वाला काम जुड़ गया है। मैंने प्रोब को पहले ही
罗杰。昨晚我们似乎错过了您提供的关于查理电池和阿尔法、布拉沃火控电池的机载读数。请问您能否提供一些最新的数据？完毕
Sì. Lo vedo da una parte della mia finestra. A quanto pare, quello
Potremmo ritrovarci con uno in più di quelli autorizzati: uno, due, tre, quattro, cinque. Sì, uno di questi verrà convertito in... In effetti, ne ho rubato u
E, Houston, la Tranquility Base vi darà qualche commento riguardo alla questione geologica di ieri sera. Siamo atterrati in un campo di crateri relativamente liscio, di crateri secondari allungati - crateri secondari circolari, la maggior parte dei quali ha bordi indipendentemente dalle loro dimensioni. Questo non è universalmente vero. Ci sono - Ci sono alcuni dei crateri più piccoli intorno ai quali non c'è un bordo visibile. La massa di terra in tutta l'area è composta da sabbia molto fine e limo. Direi che la cosa che più le assomiglia sulla Terra è la grafite in polvere. Immerse in questa massa di terra si trova un'ampia varietà di forme, dimensioni e consistenze rocciose, arrotondate e spigolose, molte con consistenze variabili. Come ho detto, ho visto rocce semplici - quello che sembrava essere basalto semplice e basalto vescicolare. Altre senza cristalli, alcune con piccoli fenocristalli bianchi, forse dall'uno a meno del 5 percento. E il masso... ci troviamo in un campo di massi dove i massi raggiungon
روجر. أورورا 7، القراءة جيدة. نشهد الآن بعض التذبذبات القوية، وقد نفد الوقود. يبدو من الشمس أن زاوية الميل قد تصل إلى حوالي 45 درجة. أوه، إنها ت
Хорошо, Фред, у меня есть для те
Houston, we're showing you something that came out of the Commander's checklist stowage packet. It's got a 16-m
What I'll do - let me repeat - Okay. Let me repeat it all back to you. REPRESS PACKAGE VALVE, off; EMERGENCY CABIN PRESSURE, off; DIRECT O2, off; b
Хорошо. Я не п
Laisse-moi te lir
ロジャー。いつか会いに行き
Esatto. Lo stiamo facendo per mantenere il nostro profilo di potenza al livello desiderato. E poi lo riaccenderemo un po' prima dell'ingresso. E il momento in cui accenderlo al
이산화탄소 분압이 4.2mm로 측
好的。我们要检查电脑在所有模式下的运行情况。这项检查分为三个步骤。首先，在所有 IVI 窗口中将速度设置为 10 英尺/秒。然后按下“故障重置”按钮。接着按下“启动电脑”按钮，观察电脑运行指示
13, al momento non ci occuperemo di un'ustione. 
Хорошо. Нам кажется, что, хотя мы считываем те же данные, что и вы, используя компьютерную программу и все поправочные коэффициенты, все четыре ваших квадрокоптера очень близки. В фунтах, например, у вас 193 фунта в квадрокоптере А, 189 в В, 200 в С и 190 в Дельте. А разница, которую вы видите на приборе, объясняется тем, что у вас не учтены все поправочные коэффициенты. Точность этого расчета на местности с
D'acco
다른 차단기는요? 카메라 설치는 다 됐어요. 나머지가 빠지지만 않으면 좋겠네요. 둘 
Kap
Roger. Abbiamo provato a mett
1
देखिए, अगर मेरा रेटिकल समानांतर नहीं है, तो मैं क्षितिज के लंबवत निशान नहीं लगा रहा हूँ और न ही उप-तारकीय बिंदु पर निशान लगा रहा हूँ। मैं
Balloon--I'll maneuver enough to get the balloon out in trail so I can photograph its departur
روجر. تف
Ricevuto. La visiera è chiusa e sigillata. La bomboletta della visiera della tuta è 
Роджер, Майк. Несколько быстрых обновлений по плану полета. Во-первых, мы хотели
分かりました。これらの一口サイズの物体は、機内に大量のパンくずが舞い上がるのを防ぐために設計されました。そのため、一度に口に運べる大きさになっています。これまでの経験から、地球で食べられるような食事よりもずっと進歩できると分かりました。実は、今回の飛行ではパンを持参していて、パンと一
Roger, Woomera. Ti leggo forte e chiaro anch
Certainly ni
방금 16-A 표적을 촬영했습니다. 바스라 비행장
现在应该能看到跟踪灯了——就是这样——看起来没有……但它并没有
1/200でF16。
罗杰，我们
سيجما سفن، ووميرا كاب كوم. بصوت ع
Мы завершаем процесс восстановления. В основном, на данный момент восстановление завершено. По сути, оно будет таким же, как и при запуске, или, п
- - e 12,5 è grandangolare. L'unica cosa che mi confonde è che dice per la ripresa da veicolo a veicolo: "Vogliamo usar
Roger. Understand. Frank, what we want on this burn is 8 feet per second now, 8 feet per second. We want it radially upward, and we want you to use whatever th
좋아요
Auf 1 stelle
こんにちは、トランクウィリティ基地。ヒュ
Columb
Ricevuto. Copiamo rollio 21 - 61, beccheggio 090, imbardata 000, beccheggio ad alto guadagno più 28, imbardata 271. E lo faremo con il DELTA-V che abbi
Roger. J'ai une mise à jour du pl
让你担心要在船上
Affirmative. Columbia en chœur (voix basse). Comment me lisez-
好的。接下来
फ्रें
रॉजर। आपके P57 के लिए, हमने थोड़ी खोजबीन की, और ऐसा लगता है कि डिटेंट 6 पर सीरियस और रिगेल इसके लिए बहुत अच्छे रहेंगे। सीरियस पर सूर्य का कोण लगभग 43 डिग्री है, और रिगेल 
You are fading now. Standby for Canton in a
ヒューストン、こち
أعتقد أنني سأتحقق من جهاز سانبورن بخصوص ذلك. سأنتقل الآن إلى نظام مراقبة ضغط الدم. جين، أنا راضٍ تمامًا عن د
Roger. I sure agree. We copy so far on the windows that 2 and 4 are in excellent shape and 1 and 5 are sort of mediocr
Houston, Columbia. Ich wiederhole: Ich habe
Вперёд, Хьюстон, Близнецы
Hier ist eine interessante kleine Neuigkeit, die man eigentlich ganz gut hören sollte. 
That's right. I - I haven't entered - I gave the - I gave it back to the computer for a second. I put the mode switch from MANUAL back to while I fooled with the, and the computer drove the star off out of sight. So the
Now you see wh
标记它
CB 센서 
आरकेवी, 
ठीक है;
Так написано в контрольном списке. Отметьте, что 
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Aufgrund von Hintergrundgeräuschen ist Ihre Verbindung nicht z
Roger, Jim. 
Roger, Jack; hier ist Tom. Ich wollte euch und Jim nur kurz Bescheid geb
बात यहीं ख
Sehr gut… Gemini 4, Houston.
ヒューストン、このブレーキ操作では、横方向のスラスターがかなり遠く
حسنًا. كما قرأتُ لك، نأخذ الشريط الرمادي ونط
ありがと
Understand station calling Steelhead i
ボタンを押します。まだ10分の8秒しかないので、これ以上時間を稼がないようにした
Снова Близнецы 4. Я вижу такую ​​же изогнутую линию света, как северное сияние, только оно находится ниже нас, и я видел его в другой раз, это были огромные длинные линии. Похоже, они идут примерно параллельно направлению нашего пол
了解しました、フレッド。いつものバッテリー2をコピーしました。しばらくは高ビットレートでお願いでき
Ok, siamo a 81 - 79 (percentuale di carburante manu
Okay, Jim. Ecco, abbiamo... Mostriamo che la batteria 3 assorbe solo circa un ampere e pensiamo 
हाँ। बहुत कम। अब तो बिल्कुल भी नहीं। म
Put you to FREE her
ヒューストン...ピッチとヨ
Gee,
分かりました。アルファ1号は着陸地点から500フィート
Tie
It looks like in our power-down (illegible) we're still pulling just a little less than 11 amps. We've got 10 on no. 1 and a little less than 11 on no. 2. The tether - the location of the tether or the umbilical restraint on the outside hatch made it rather difficult to do any EVA work as far as free tether aerodynamics out in front of the spacecraft. Whenever I'd be operating out in that area, the tether would - when it would come to its end would start me back and the reaction would carry me back up towards the - over the spacecraft and back toward the adapter section. That's why I kept going out of sight during my maneuvering out there up above the windows, and then drifting back toward the back of the spacecraft. I continually had to keep pulling myself to get out in the front part 
쌍둥이자리 4호, 여기는 캔톤입니다. 방금 하신 말씀을 잘 이해하지 못했습니다. 다시 말씀해 주시겠습니
写真を撮り損ね
Okay. Going 
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on your own, that's the place we'd like to break off and let you go ahead and take over with your own alinement. However, we are giving you a procedure which will give you things we know you can see in the telescope without worrying about any reflections or anything of that nature, and it's not intended that this procedure has to be followed past the point where you know you've got good definition of star patterns in your telescope. If you need to go on, we'll maneuver, take a look at the Moon, we'll take a mark there, and then we'll maneuver with the / angles again and take a look at the Sun, and get yourself another mark on the Sun and that will complete the alinement. Now, the alinement scheme is that we are going to give you a set of angles that you can coarse aline the ball through when the is pointing you at the Moon. Now, this set of angles 
好的，没问题。杰克，你准备
没错，巴兹；最后一点，我们确实需要您做一件事，即使我们并非在进行中途修正；我们建议您在废水倾倒作业完成后再处理此事。我们还有一份州级病毒载体更新报告
حسنًا. بيانات منصة الدخول كالتالي: منتصف منطقة التحكم، 000152، 000، 178؛ ناقص 21.
Хорошо. Вы можете приступ
休斯顿，水瓶座。在我看来，停靠在码头的粗线
रॉजर। और 
I have some pretty stars in sight, and also I have the little white obje
네, 알겠습니다. 제가 어디서부터, 어디까지 말씀이 딴 데로 흘렀는지 모르겠네요. 자, 4번 패널에서 TELCOMM, GROUP 1을
Okay. 2
네. 지금 보여드릴 수 있는 추가적인 이점은, 프레드의 소파 위에 있는 드로그입니다. 아쿠아리우스를 점검하는 동안 임시로 보관해 둔 것이죠. 소파 아래에는 프로브가 보관되어 있습니다. 꽤 크고 부피가 큰 장치인데, 곧 사진으로 보여드리겠
Roger, ich sagte doch, dass wi
Ok. Ci rivediamo tra qua
Roger
दूसरा वाला कहा
11번, 휴스턴. 샤프트와 트러니언을 준비했는데, 약간 조정이 필요할 것 같습니다. 샤프트는 141.5, 트러니언은 39.5입니다. 이상입
Roger. I concur. Believe I am a little bit steeper than 10 (degrees) left. I'll bring that out with the manual axes and then let her fly it again. An
Nous sommes en avance sur cette période de repas, mais en retard sur la p
Okay. Nach Tommy Jacobs haben wir jetzt die neuesten Infos von der lokalen Astrologin Ruby Graham aus Houston. Sie sagt, al
ج
غوايماس، جيميني 4 عل
धन्यवाद। यह 
روجر، جيم. لقد كنا نتفحص هذه النجوم التي خصصناها لكم هذه المرة. يبدو أن النجم الثاني، رقم 11، له زاوية دوران قصوى، حوالي 49.7 درجة. ونعتقد أنه من الأفضل أن ننتقل إلى 
好了，现在我开始能看到各种各样的粒子了，它们——它们离得很远。我能看到一些在100英
Andocks
그건 부정적이네요. 고르도, 제가 그들의 태도를 제
Houston, voici une vue de la Terre prise sous l'horizon lunaire. Nous allons suivre une trajectoire jusqu'au terminateur, où nous ferons d
روجر، قم بتغيير مفتاح محول النطاق C إلى وضع التشغيل المستمر عند الس
阿波
我们正在进行氯
알겠습니다. 그리고 계속 소식을 알려주셔서 감사
罗
Okay. Mir scheint, die vorgeschlagene Steckdose ist völlig ausreichend. Können Sie sie Ihrer M
CAP COM. Je voudrais un pira
Сейчас на стороне Джима дневной свет, а со своей стороны я всё ещё могу различить некоторые звёзды. Похоже, можно удерживать космический ап
حسنًا يا جيم، 
Ok, Jack. Ho capito che hai completato la carica della batteria. Ora, se sei pronto a co
Я смотрю прямо вам в 
Родж
六分儀について少しコメントしたいと思います。狭い宇宙船内での使用は、特にヘルメットをかぶっていると非常に困難です。最終的に、ヘルメットをかぶったまま、要求されている星々の角度を測ろうとするのは無駄だと判断しました。そこでヘルメットを外しました。これにより、六分儀の使用範囲は多少広がりましたが、それでも宇宙船を操作せずに観測できる角度は20～23度程度に限られていました。星々が窓の上部に隠れてしまうのです。宇宙船をより頻繁に、そして自由に操作すれば、窓の長軸が追跡面に入るように操作できます。しかし、燃料の制限があったため、このような操作は選択しませんでした。パルスモードも使用しましたが、操作はあまりしませんでした。この実験で選ばれた星々は、地平線からかなり離れた角度にあるため、観測が非常に困難でした。最終的に、星を地平線にもう少し近づけることにしました。お気づきだと思いますが、カノープスと他のいくつかの星で試しました。青いフィルターは地平線を完全に遮っているように見えました。青いフィルターを使ったときは地平線がなかったからです。月明かりがあると
罗杰。吉姆，你的六分仪星盘上，轴应该是 2027 - 2027。完毕
로저, 카나본. 항공기 교체를 위해. GET 02 + 42 + 07; 델타-V, 31.7; 지속 시간, 0 + 40초; 요, 오른쪽 90도, 피치 00; 코어 25, 26, 
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯
Jim, nous sommes prêts à remettre la batterie en service. Veuillez ouvrir le disjoncteur CROSS TIE BAL LOAD, panneau 16, puis remet
E, Ken, se il tuo amico vuole giocare a OMNI-switch, al momento siamo su Dog - Bravo,
加油，休
ما هو وضع 
نعم، هذا صحيح. عندما واجهتُ المشكلة لأول مرة، كان هناك خلل في خاصية الانعطاف المنخفض لليسار، والآن
अपोलो 8, अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है, ह्यूस्टन। समाप्त
- - 00166
هذا صحيح. الآن لدينا البطاريات 1 و2 و3 و4 و6 مُفعّلة، ولديّ ملاحظتان. أولاً، حدود حماية قاطع الدائرة - حدود حماية قاطع الدائرة - الآن الكابل الواصل بين وحدة التحكم ووحدة التحكم موصول بالتيار. ويمكن مراقبة جهد ناقل التيار الرئيسي عن طر
시그마 세븐. 무체아, 네 말 알아
А поверхность мелкая и порошкообразная. Я могу — я могу легко поднять её пальцем ноги. Она прилипает тонкими слоями, как древесный уголь, к подошве и бокам моих ботинок. Я захожу всего на долю дюйма, может быть, на восьмую часть дюйма, но я вижу следы своих ботинок и протекторы на мелких песчаных
- - 上部の 2 
نعم. من الجميل جداً التحدث إلى أشخاص أفهمهم. هذا لا ي
Роджер, Нил. Мы не пытаемся вас подтолкнуть. Мы просто хотим понять, что такое сброс воды и повторный запуск. Не торопитесь. Конец
Да. У нас снов
好的，迈克。当然，这是在G&N系统和发动机都出现故障，需要你进行恒载飞行的情况下进行的；我们想做的是将恒载飞行范围从1100英里扩展到1500英里。我们已经在模拟器中运行过这个程序，效果很好。基本上，我会讲解一遍——你先听一遍，如果有任何问题再回来。升力矢量保持不
अरे यार! हे गस, क्या तुमने यह पता लगाने की कोशिश की कि मैंने हवाई 
Показания напряжения холостого хода на приборах 2A, 2B и 2C вы
Houston, Wassermann. Wie liest du je
Правильно ли я понимаю, у вас... сейчас у вас под ногами пуповина, и вы будете держать её на коленях в
Sie interessieren sich wahrscheinlich für die Kommentare Ihrer Frauen. Neil, Jan sagte über die gestrigen Ereignisse: „Der Abend war einfach perfekt. Es ist mir eine Ehre und ein Privileg, mit meinem Mann, der Crew, dem bemannten Raumfahrtzentrum, der amerikanischen Öffentlichkeit und der gesamt
Le ciel s'assomb
Roger. Ho avuto un ciclo di accensione e spegnimento dei requisiti del riscaldatore RCS. Il primo era 47, ho acceso il riscaldatore e la spia era 54. Quello era l'anello
Ricevuto. Vorre
Bene. E l'ultimo è l'interruttore automatico per il GAGING, quattro di lor
حسنًا. أفهم أن الإبر 
روجر. أعتقد أن المشكلة ال
好的，弗雷德，请注意，您船上的二氧化碳读数比我们在地面上测得的略高，所以当您的读数达到 15 时，请切换到辅助模式。我们希望大约每 30 分钟了解一次您的状态——我们会打电话给您。但为了让我们知道我们仍然惦记着您，请您按照 BIOMED RIGH
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。ロール0度で停止すると、ピッチ角約90度、ヨー角0度、ロール角0度になります。その姿勢から、最初のオプション3を実行してください。その後、0度への移動前か移動中に新しいオプションをアップリンクします。その後、プラットフォームを回転させて2番目の
はい。それでは始めます。ありがとうございます
क्या आप इस पर क
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호가 몇 분 거리에 있습
No..
Il segnale di soccorso ACQ si spegnerà alle 13
वॉली, तुमने विमानवाहक पोत से लगभग 9,000
Houston, surveille
We'd l
बहुत बढ़िया, केन। एक छोटी सी समस्या है: हमारे चारों ओर कई चमकदार वस्तुएँ तैर रही हैं, और कुंभ राशि के एक हिस्से को घूरने से प्रकाश बहुत तेज़ी से परावर्तित हो रहा है। हम कोशिश कर सकते हैं। इसमें कोई दिक
Чарли, Г
كولومبيا، 
ठीक है। फ्रेड, समझ गया। ऑक्सीजन प्रवाह के बारे में, हमने स्पष्ट रूप से देखा कि डिमांड रेगुलेटर बंद होकर फिर से केबिन म
자, 아쿠아리우스. 다음 단계는 방금 잘라낸 안쪽 비
Okay. Okay, Jack. I was going to say, as luck would have it, the command module picked this time to star
저 아래부터는 "창문 블라인드 제거"와 맨 아래의 "OMNI D 구매"를 제
Роджер, Чарли. Это Базз. Как вы читаете? 1, 2, 
Roger, Roger. You're coming
«Дружба Семь», «Друж
Roger. Acceleromet
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. 
نعم، هذا جيد. هناك حل، وهو إعادة صيانته. إنها عملية شاقة نوعًا ما، ولهذا السبب نرغب في مراقبته عن كثب لنعرف قبل الدخول ما إذا كان بإمكاننا الاعتماد على وجود دورتين أو دورة واحدة. وهذا يقودنا إلى سؤالين نحاول الإجابة عليهما. أولًا، نود التأكد من أنك تخطط لاستخدام كلٍ من الغلايتين الأساسية والثانوية أثناء الدخول، ونبحث أيضًا عن طريقة لفحص الغلاية الأساسية للتأكد من أنها ليست جافة قبل الدخول. وهذا الأمر أصبح أكثر صعوبة مما تتوقع.
Okay. 
ठीक है, फ्रेडो। मैं आपको पाँच-बाई करके पढ़ रहा हूँ। मैं आपको जो प्रक्रिया बताने जा रहा हूँ, वह सूर्य की जाँच है - यह देखने के लिए कि हमें संरेखण की आवश्यकता होगी या नहीं। कृपया अपनी G&N डिक्शनरी निकालें और पृष्ठ 34
Ha! Ha! J'ai encore des traces de freinage sur mes palmes à cause de ton escapade dans la brousse. Bon, tu vois, j'ai encore viré à droite. Je dois… correction, j'ai viré à gauche. Je dois aller à droite, la lune est juste à l'horizon. Je vais la remettre sur la bonne voie, juste pour te montrer comme c'est facile. Il semblerait que mon niveau de carburant soit correct, alors je vais faire quelques essais. Bon, on est presque sur la bonne voie, et encore un peu à côté en roulis. Je vais la remettre en place et ce sera bon. Voilà le roulis qui va la redresser. On remonte en roulis… bon, j'arrête là. C'est le mieux que je puisse te donner. Un peu de roulis par-ci par-là. Voilà. C'est ce que je te donnerais. Bon, je vais remettre les gyroscopes en mode normal et les laisser revenir s
In the beginning, God created the Heaven and the Earth. And the Earth was without form and void, and darkness was upon the face of the deep. And the spirit of God mov
如果我知道结果会是这样，我就不会把瓶子烧到那种程度了。你知道，我习惯了，一接触到目标物，我就看看。如果看起来没
Ok, capisci che vorrai che in
Roger. Das war eine gute Rückmeldung. Wir haben noch eine letzte Anweisung für Sie. Das Rendezvous-Radar ist momentan eingefahren, und wir können aus Position 2 nichts sehen. Daher bitten wir Sie, das Radar auf 0283 zu positionieren. Dafür haben wir eine Anweisung. Bitte führen Sie diese Anweisung direkt
알겠습니다. 4단계는 "자세 제어: 요(Yaw
Votre première partie a été bloquée. Veuil
자, 휴스턴. 아폴로 8
रॉजर, जॉर्ज। मेरा कंट्रोल मोड मैनुअल है। जायरो बंद हैं, पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है। ईंधन 45 और 64 प्रतिशत
О, хорошо. Всё точно.
吉姆，我有很多信息要告诉你。首先，也是最重要的
Sì, ci sentiamo entrambi benissimo
この方向を向いていると、側面の窓から太陽が流れていくのが見えます。そしてもちろん、今、窓の一つからは地球が見えます。そして、私の窓
Что ж, вы дви
Joe, on that. I guess most of every time that PU shift occurred we
C'e
Близнецы, Близнец
ठीक है। आप इस बारे में सोच सकते हैं। आप
Oh God, look at that Moltke; he's my favorite... Look at that son of a bitch. You see all those roads - triangul
罗杰。你的A
Sto spegnendo l'autobus. Voglio sbarazzarmi di queste valvole del refrigerante che volevano quei ragazzi, andranno tutte a 0.
حسناً. من الأسهل عليّ المناورة يا جو، 
روجر، جيم. يبدو الوضع جي
Я тоже нет, ладно? Какого черта мы вообще сейчас что-то предпринимаем? Мы все еще выплескиваем эм
縦線についてもう一度言ってくださ
ヒューストン、先を越されたね
حسنًا. في قسم التشغيل، السطر الأول يقول "AUTO SELECT, 16, to OFF". حسنًا، يمكنك حذف هذا الجزء. في السطر الخامس، يقول "Circuit breaker LOGIC POWER"، وهو في الواقع "LOGIC BUS, four them, to closed". لا يهم DELTA-V CG لأننا لا نحرق المحرك. يسرد "SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER" "Two to AC 1". سنجعله واحدًا فقط؛ أي "SIGNAL CONDITION/DRIVER BIAS POWER, one, to AC 1". أما "POWER"، وهو السطر الثالث من الأسفل، فيقول "POWER, two, ON"؛ سنجعله واحدًا فقط. سنعرض الرقم 1، وسنكتب "POWER, 
Vielen Dank. Okay, ich lese d
Roger, 11 ans. Je vous ai lu quelque chose à propos de quatre par
أبولو
好的，确认
Нам нужно восстановить это д
Роджер. Наш полет на Луну, возможно, показался вам простым и легким. Хочу вас заверить, что это не так. Ракета «Сатурн V», которая вывела нас на орбиту, — невероятно сложная машина, каждая деталь которой работала безупречно. Этот компьютер над моей головой имеет словарный запас в 38 000 слов, каждое из которых было тщательно подобрано, чтобы иметь для нас, экипажа, максимальную ценность. Этот переключатель, который я сейчас держу в руке, имеет более 300 аналогов только в командном модуле, и это всего лишь один переключатель. Вдобавок к этому, здесь множество автоматических выключателей, рычагов, тяг и других связанных элементов управления. Двигатель, наш большой ракетный двигатель в кормовой части служебного модуля, должен был работать безупречно, иначе мы бы застряли на лунной орбите. Парашюты над моей головой должны сработать идеально завтра, иначе мы рухнем в океан. Мы всегда были уверены, что всё это оборудование будет работать, и работать 
L'O2 è rimasto alto per circa due minuti per far s
Ok. Capisco che hai fatto il. Il prossimo punto del piano di volo dovrebbe essere un test di visibilità con il telescopio a scansione, ed è lo stesso che era sul tuo piano di volo in precedenza alle, e controlleremo che il sole a 70 gradi sia su Arturo. Dopodiché, dobbiamo fare un controllo della polarizzazione del trunnion, e poi 
Neg. Aspe
Понимаете... Платформа. Из 
オーケー、アクエリアス、ヒューストン。君たちは1人ずつ順番に入ってきているね。最初の値とコメン
チャーリー、アポロ11号。停止についていくつか質問があります。一番簡単な方法は、ヨー角0度、ピッチ角90度まで接近しているので、ロール角約260度で停止させるだけだと思います。それから、マニュアル姿勢制御、レートコマンド3、そしてデッドバンドが既に崩壊しているのでパネル8のスラスタをオンにする手順はどうでしょうか。この時点で、機体は現在の姿勢で停止するはずです。そして、
No, non farlo
Um im Zeitplan zu bleiben: Ich sollte es in den nächsten paar Minuten
了解しました。RN、RP、プラス77、ピッチ角400フィート（公称値）。修正高度、400Kフィート（公称値）。RET 400Kフィート、22プラス02。ブラックアウト開始、24プラス43。ブラックアウト終了、30プラス01。ドローグシュート、31プラス37。メインシュート、32プラス58。リカバリー
알겠습니다. 짐이 망원경을 통해 평가를 진행하도록 하고, 당신은 모든 것을 똑같이 하되 180도 회전하여 머리를 위로 향하게
そうします - カナリア外科医があなたをカナリア CAP COM に
Ok, Jack. Torna alla procedura di carica della batteria che ti ho indicato. E, per terminare la carica, devi solo scrivere "Aperto" o "Spento" accanto all'interruttore di circuito che ti ho indicato. Quindi, sul pannello 250, l
Вам не кажется, что это положение, соответствующее уро
Это Хьюстон. Мы скопировали ваши процентные показатели, и есть ли у вас для нас отчет о состоянии с
आपके क्वाड A, C और D लगभग एक जैसे दिखते हैं। क्वाड B थोड़ा ठंडा चल रहा है, लेकिन बहुत मामूली अंतर है। तापमान के सभी आंकड़े सामान्य हैं, इसलिए थर्मल दृष्टिकोण से सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहा है। और ईंधन की खपत की बात करें तो, यह न्यूनतम है, लगभग वैसा ही जैसा हमने अनुमान लगाया था। क्या आपके पास इस बारे में कोई टिप्
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストンです。もう一度言っ
I do, 
Roger. Eagle sieht hier unten wirklich gut aus. Wir sind ziemlich sicher, dass wir die Position kennen. Es ist jedoch mö
降
收到。氧燃料电池将于113
Который сейчас ч
你给他们打过电话了吗？头盔摘下并收好……手臂约束带收
Roger. Capisco che il GET di ac
Okay, Jack, we just thoug
Je suppose que le m
تضخ
ठीक है। पायलट अब जाग गया है। हम मेडिकल अनुमति (फ्ला
Okay, Vance. Ich bin dran – Hö
Bene
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. للعلم، تحطمت المركبة إيجل بعد سبع ساعات. انته
بالتأكيد أستطيع. سيكون ذلك بعد ٢٩ د
Ricevuto. Vad
Le nostre valvole di propellent
Apollo 11, ici Houston. 1 minute avant l'atterrissage à Tanana
حسنًا. أعتقد أنني سأعود وأحاول إزالة الرطوبة من هناك.
إنها أعلى 
Veuillez noter que
أظن أنه ليس
تم ضبط زاوية الميل والانحراف
अब शु
Roger. Nous avons reçu des données de bande C négatives concernant Ascension. Nous aimerions co
एड ने सामान खोलना शुरू किया और जैसे ही हम उस स्थिति में पहुँचे जहाँ बूस्टर के साथ छेड़छाड़ करना संभव नहीं था, मैंने पूरी तरह से उसकी मदद करना शुरू कर दिया - कम से कम सामान पकड़कर उसे सही जगह पर रखना और उसे गायब होने से बचाना। जितनी तेज़ी से हम काम करते, उतना ही हम पीछे होते चले जाते। ऐसा इसलिए नहीं था कि हम चीज़ों को सही जगह पर नहीं रख रहे थे, बल्कि इसमें हमारी उम्मीद से कहीं ज़्यादा समय लग रहा था। जीरो ग्रेविटी में यह सिम्युलेटर की तुलना में ज़्यादा आसान नहीं था, हालाँकि उतना ही आसान था। इसलिए हमने पूरा चक्कर लगाया। जब तक हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे, मैंने मन बना लिया था कि हम वहाँ नहीं पहुँच पाएँगे, लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि थोड़ी देर और कोशिश करते हैं। जब हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे - या वहाँ से निकलने से ठीक पहले - मुझे स्पष्ट हो गया था कि हम दबाव कम करने की प्रक्रिया पूरी नहीं कर पाएँगे। मैंने अगली कक्षा में जाने के लिए स्लिप का अनुरोध किया। फिर... हमने लगभग 20 मिनट तक आराम किया और कॉकपिट में पड़े फालतू सामान को व्यवस्थित करने की कोशिश की। फिर मैंने चेकलिस्ट निकाली और हमने दोबारा विस्तार से चेकलिस्ट देखी ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि जल्दबाजी में हमसे कुछ छूट तो नहीं गया। एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट शुरू किया - कार्नार्वोन के ऊपर हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। हम सब तैयार थे और दबाव कम करने की हरी झंडी का इंतजार कर रहे थे। हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। दबाव कम करने का चक्र पूरा हुआ। कार्नार्वोन से निकलते ही हमें पूर्ण एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट (EVA) के लिए मंजूरी मिल गई। हम कैंटन या हवाई पहुंचे, और उस समय हमें - मुझे लगता है कि कैंटन या हवाई से ही हमें अंतरि
Camera should go down away from the terminator and to the 
Thank you much, Cha
짐벌 락 현상이 발생할 것 같으면 부하들에게 꼭 저에게 연락하라고 전해 주세요. 제가 지금 잠깐씩
Роджер. Принято, 11. Мы понимаем, что программа может предоставить вам практически бесконечное количество комби
بقي شيء واحد لنفعله في الخطوات. علينا أن ن
Okay, Jack. It lo
Okay. Non è poi così fastidioso. È tutto quello che stiamo facendo. Cercheremo di mantenere il passo. E finora 
프로그램 사무실에 전달할 수 있는 것, 또는 바로 실행해 볼 수 있는 것 한 가지는 바로 이것
I thought it went pretty well, Houston, although I expect I used more gas than I've been using in the simulator. The turnaround maneuver - I went PITCH ACCEL COMMAND and started to pitch up, and then when
Как я мог заб
Bene. Ora tocc
Okay, Jack. Die verbleibenden Schritte sind lediglich Konfigurationsschritte für die Anzugschleife, um das System voll funktionsfähig zu machen. Unsere Leute möchten damit warten, bis der Druck in der Kanisterflasche, an der du arbeitest, 7,6 Millimeter Quecksilbersäule erreicht hat. Das dauert wahrscheinlich noch 45 Minuten bis eine Stunde – wir messen jetzt 4,7 Millimeter. In der Zwischenzeit sollst du bitte die zweite Komm
Okay. Minus 3
과산화수소를 투하하고 있습니다. 퓨즈 스위치를 켜고 대기 중입니다. 회복 암은 "작동" 상태입니다. 주 낙하산을 펼칠 준비를 합니다. 모든 스위치가 정상 위치에 있습니다. 수동 연료가 거의 다 떨어졌습니다. 드디어 주 낙하산이 펼쳐졌습니다. 정말 아름답습니다. 하늘은 맑고 푸르네요. 낙하산도 풀렸고, 마치 달콤한 파이처럼 보입니다. 자동 연료 투하 중입니다. 현재 하강 속도는 약 35피트(fps)입니다. 아무 문제도 없어 보입니다. 충돌 준비를 하겠습니다. 자동 연료 투하가 계속되고 있습니다. 기내 압력이 정상적으로 상승하고 있습니다. 모든 시스템이 아주 좋아 보입니다. 시원하고 덥지 않습니다. 주 낙하산이 멋지게 펼쳐집니다. 하강 속도는 초당 3
로저, 제미니 4호입니다. 여기는 휴스턴 관제센터입니다. 비행 계획 업데이트입니다. 모든 시간은 그리니치 표준
Хорошо. Давайте посмотрим. Значит, мы снова потеряем
わかった。そうだ。案の定、指揮官の赤いホースがキャニスターバッグに挿入
Beim Hinausgehen gaben sie uns einige REACQ-Winkel, die wir benutzten, und sobald es die Verriegelung löste und sich neu positionierte, ging es zu den OMNIs und wartete, bi
Nous aimerions maintenant vous poser une question concernant l'alignement, etc. Nous voulions savoir si vous pouviez apercevoir des étoiles par la fenêtre. Nous voulions également savoir si vous pouviez utiliser le module de service pour projeter une ombre sur les vitres, puis regarder à travers 
فرانك، فيما يتعلق بزاوية الميل والانحراف الحرتين،
2마일. 100~206. 예상보다 조
ما ه
Molly? Brown, correggi 400.000 piedi. Sono le 19:01
कार्नरवॉन, जेमिनी
Как ты спал прошлой ночью
是的，我们做到了
……
Gemini 4，休
RKV のどれくらい前ですか? SPC
罗杰。这里一切看起来都不错
Хорошо. Я сейчас открою пара
わかりました。MODE CONTROLを両方
Ok
Okay. Und ich möchte Sie daran erinnern, die Optik in einem Wink
Okay. S-Band-S
ジョン、まさにあなたの色でしたね。とても的確な説明でした。明るい側で叩くと確かに白く見えます
로저
吉姆，我们刚才在讨论星火监测，我们很好奇你现在能否在第二档位看到努基。完
好的。接下来，关闭电池馈线连接、交叉连接平衡负载，并打开交叉连接总
能否请您简要回顾一下到目前为止的
... derze
ワシントンでは、下院歳入委員会が石油会社、銀行、公益事業に影響を与える税制改革案を承認しました。この案は連邦政府の歳入を年間約2
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। हमारे ट्रैकिं
D'accord, Charlie. Merci à toi et à toute l'équipe b
Bon, voilà… – Il me semble que c'est bon. N'oubliez pas, il va falloir régler l'ouverture sur f/22, peut-être pas – la mise au poin
Особой проверки на дриф
Okay, Fred. It's just beginning to cut off at the bottom, but it
We confirm ignition, and the thru
D'ac
알겠습니다. 'a'를 누르고 'ENTER'를 누른 다음 '06'을 누르면 세 개의 공과 숫자 62가 표시된 화면이 나오지만, 'PROCEED' 버튼을 누를 수 없고 'a'
네, 맞습니다. 짐, 잠깐 멈칫하셨네요. 이제 정확한 자세로 돌아가겠습니다. 좌우로 90도 회전하면서 피치와 요는 0으로 유지하세요. 자, 3단계입니다. "
Und wir zeigen Ihnen in Kürze den Meilenste
On 
好的。接下来是指令舱的照片。从指令舱可能不太容易看到服务舱，但如果能看到的话，应该可以通过5号窗口看
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Мы наблюдали за вашим испытанием подвеса, и оно нам показалось хорошим. Конец свя
Роджер. Мы проверили космический аппарат и систему наведения ракеты-носителя. Обе системы, похоже, в порядке. Мы оцениваем вероятность сбоя системы наведения ракеты-носителя более чем в 99 процентов, так что, судя по всему, всё работает очень хорошо. К вашему сведению, мы получили примерно 1 минуту пригодного 
Хорошо, Джек. Следующий шаг — взять карточку-подсказку и использовать её, чтобы сформирова
О да. В
而你现在所处的位置无
नील, ये ह्यूस्टन है। हम तस्वीर ले रहे हैं। अभी तुम तस्वीर में नहीं हो। लेकिन हमें वो बैग दिख रहा है जिसे बज़ हिला रहा है। अब तुम हमारे कैमरे के दायरे में
ニールがグリコールラジエ
Und während des Brennv
कहीं
Hello, Canary Cap Com.
네, 짐. 원하는 자세로 촬영 방향을 잡으신 후, 바디 축 정렬(400+5)을 하세요. 'ENTER'를 누르시면 볼이
吉姆，我大概半小时前把我们最新的那台平板电脑给了弗雷德。这是我们最新的。型号是P
Позвольте мне задать вам один вопрос. Вы хотите, чтобы перед коррек
Eagle, Hous
Roger. Wir haben die Diagramme überprüft und genau dasselbe Ergebnis erhalten wie du. Deine Vorgehensweise scheint sehr gut zu sein; es war wohl ein sehr guter Ansatz. Du hast daran gedacht, die Geschwindigkeit zu 
로저, 저는 몸 상태가 아주 좋습니다. 체크리스트 정리가 끝나는 대
Okay, Jack. I got another question on page 18. At 1 minute, I concur with MASTER ARM ON, but I wonder why I have to have the ABORT STAGE breaker in. W
Ok, credo di aver visto Denebola; fammi dare un'occhiata... Certo che sì. Ed è abbastanza buona nel telescopio; fammi controllare 
Roger. It's in progress. Anyt
यह सुनने में
13号，休斯顿。指导
قاعدة الهدوء، هذه هي
Roger, sei tornat
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。3分半で、まだ順調ですね。打ち上げ予
Roger. Es waren 0,1, aber wir haben kein Signal 
Je dois ch
ロジャー、ヒューストン。プラス 4。重量は同じまま、マイナス 164、プラス 129、マイナス 01594、プラス
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Если нам не удастся 
Hai impostato la cabina a 3,5. È 
The propellant quantity remaining is about 31 percent. Did yo
हाँ। मुझे सेक्स्टेंट में एक त
Funziona benissimo. Ho finito: un set era Sirio, tre st
O
I'm on VOX - correct, I am going to push-to-talk on
Hallo, 11. Houston. Die Goldstone-TV-Abteilung sagte, dass bei einer scharfen vertikalen Linie im Bild, wenn die horizontalen Streifen darüber verlaufen, das Bild leicht verzerrt wirkt. Genau wie bei Apo
50K이고 드로그는 
正方位角 00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013 上 048 右 37，正方位角 1418，负方
It's really a fantastic sight through that sextant. A minute ago, during that AUTO maneuver, the reticle swept across the Mediterranean. You could see all of North Africa, absolutely clear; all of Po
D'accord. Le prochain est le change
Roger. Wir sind in Echtzeit und ACQ-AID
わかり
ح
Columbia, hier spricht Houston. Wir möchten anhand Ihrer LAM-2-Karte das topografische Gebiet bestätigen, in dem Sie in der letzten Sichtungsperiode gesucht haben. I
جيم، نحن جاهزون لإعادة توصيل البطارية بالخط. نرجو منك فتح ق
This concerns the Zodiacal Light Experiment which is going to be on "5", and they want to find out if t
Vous serez sans doute intéressés par les commentaires de vos épouses. Neil, Jan a déclaré à propos des activités de la veille: « La soirée était absolument parfaite. C’est un honneur et un privilège de partager avec mon mari, l’équipage, le Centre spatial habité, le public américain et l’humanité entière l’expérience magnifique du début de l’exploration lunaire. » On lui a ensuite demandé si elle considérait l’alunissage comme le plus beau moment de sa vie. Elle a répondu: « Non, c’était le jour de notre mariage. » Et Mike, Pat a simplement dit: « C’était absolument merveilleux. » Buzz, Joan, a dit – visiblement incrédule –: « J’avais du mal à y croire avant que les hommes ne bougent. Après l’alunissage, j’ai pleuré de joie. »
D'a
嘿，吉姆，我有三件事要说。第一，电脑现在归你用了。第二，从现在到点火之前不需要任何操作，所以你可以直接保持点火姿态。第三，我们想退出刚才让你进入的更新链路程序，这意味着要把TM
ジェミニ4号、ジェミニ4号、こち
На самом деле, я думаю, лучше всего описать эту местность как бескрайнее пространство черно-белого цвета, а
जिम, स्थिति यह है कि फिलहाल 
Okay. To do it we go ENTER, 23 ENTER; and at the, we'll load in register 1, four balls 2; register 2, all balls; and register 3, two balls 210. We'll
Roger. Bien reçu. Le suivi est plus facile avec le sextant qu'avec le télescope de balayage; il offre un contrôle plus précis. À vous de jouer. Term
로저. 오버헤드 덤프 밸브가 닫혔습니다. 하지만 짐의 말이 맞을
Das sind
Ripeti, Kano
И проверка горизонта пройдена успе
Ricevuto. Conferm
Roger. You got that one, so th
还有11号，休斯顿。我们有个请求。关于服务舱二级推进剂燃料增压阀：作为预防措施，请您暂时将四个开关拨到“关闭”位置，
حسنًا يا بيل. نحن نقترب من موعد الرصد، وهناك بعض المخاوف من أن الانتقال مباشرةً إلى وضعية المحاذاة قد يؤدي إلى ارتفاع درجة حرارة المركبة الفضائية "تشارلي". لذا نود منك الآن توجيه المحور السيني السالب نحو الشمس. لديّ بعض زوايا الجيمبال هنا. إذا قمنا بتوجيه المحور السيني السالب نحو الشمس من الآن وحتى موعد بدء المحاذاة، فسوف نبرد المر
Okay. I tracked a bright star, and I believe that's out there in Aquila. In fact, I'm quite sure. I can see the two target stars. I've tracked it all the way up. It's almost to the top. It's going to go out of my view right now. I had
Gordo, hast du einen passenden Zeitpunkt für 
Permettez-moi de récapituler votre rubrique journalière en fin de colonne
मैं अभी ग्रस तारामंडल को देख रहा हूँ, और उसके तारे काफी स्पष्ट दिखाई दे रहे हैं, यहाँ तक कि चौथी और पाँचवीं परिमाण के छोटे तारे भी... शाम के इस समय और रात में, आकाश बिल्कुल काला होता है और त
D'accord, Jim. J'ai le module de
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्ट
Quel
Это Хьюсто
好的，然后跳到大约 159:28。划掉“机动到污染场摄影姿态”，以及它下面的所有行，直到“
Ho appena fatto un tentativo sul bersaglio 16-A. L'aeroporto di Bassora, si trova proprio sul Golfo Persico. L'ho individuato... ho individuato il Golfo Persico a circa... un angolo di circa 30°... Ho picchiato e poi ho individuato il lago... a nord-ovest del Golfo Persico. Bassora, essendo proprio sui laghi, molto vicino ai laghi, si può semplicemente seguire e individuare subito l'aeroporto. Quindi ho raggiunto l'aeroporto un bel po' prima di raggiungere il bersaglio, e poi ho iniziato a seguirlo. Ero effettivamente sul bersaglio quando ero ancora a 20° dalla verticale, direi - e l'ho seguito dalla pista fino a circa 40° oltre, e ho smesso di seguirlo. Avevo questo obiettivo da 75 mm sulla fotocamera da 16 mm con l'adattatore per sca
Я ухожу... сейчас я занимаю позицию, позволяющую только записывать происходящее. Думаю, лучший ответ на вопрос об автокинезе — это то, что его нет. Я его не заметил — и я обычно выравниваю горизонталь головой — горизонтальная линия при нулевой гравитации — это линия, параллельная линии, проведенной между глазами. Я не понимаю автокинеза. Я не понимаю... подо
여기에 카나본 LOS에서 곧 도착할 거라고 나와 있
Ro
ठीक है, और आप वाकई बहुत अच्छे हैं। यह - यह सब शोर न होना वाकई सुखद है। जिम, मैं आपको बताता हूँ कि मैं क्या करना चाहता हूँ। जैसा कि मैंने कहा, हम अभी आपको विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ नहीं देंगे। हम आपको जल्द ही प्रक्रियाएँ उपलब्ध कराने की कोशिश करेंगे, जो निम्नलिखित रूप में होंगी। सबसे पहले, हमारे पास एक समयरेखा होगी, एक तरह से उड़ान योजना जैसी, जिसमें सभी प्रमुख घटनाओं का समय और कोई भी कॉन्फ़िगरेशन, स्विच सेटिंग्स, इत्
Roger. Ihre Systeme sehen gut aus. Wir sind bereit für Ihren Aer
نعم، هذا هو المقطع الذي ظهر قبل 17 دقيقة. حسن
Роджер. Начнём с мировых новостей. Всеобщие поздравления американским астронавтам «Аполлона-8» и надежды на международное сотрудничество в освоении космоса сопровождались рождественскими посланиями, разосланными по всему миру, пока крошечный космический корабль вращался вокруг Луны. Даже в коммунистическом мире царил энтузиазм п
That's affirmed, Jim. We have you up to 10.6 now, and we're willing to go a little higher on that. We have another cartridge and we
はい、テレメトリコマン
再
いや、フレッド、違う。窓のあたりは明るい場所だ。残りの皆さんは半
لا، الأمر ليس سيئاً للغاية. لقد خزنّا معظم الأغراض الإضافية تحت أرجلنا خلف كعوبنا، وهي أغراض لا نستخدمها كثيراً على أي حال، لذا فهي ليست مزعجة. لكن الكاميرات والحقائب وأكياس القمامة مثبتة بإحكام في كل مكان بواسطة
로저. 제가 정정해 주시겠어요? 혈압을 올리기 시작하시겠어요? 저는 아직 T/M이
ठीक है। अब आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ स
Привет, Водолей! Как ты меня теперь
आपको पता है, यह वाकई बहुत बुरा है कि साइड की खिड़कियों पर ध
Хью
Sì. Oh, quello che v
Okay, next page, 16. This is a cont
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 중간 코스 때문에 통신 금지 패드는 더 이상 유효하지 않습니다
أبولو 8، هذه هيو
Okay. You can get those configures when you can. And the next order of business I
रॉजर। आपके प्राथमिक ऑ
Grazie a tutti quelli che sono sul campo per noi. È abbastanza chiaro che non saremmo da nessuna parte se non ci fossero loro a farlo o ad aiutarci 
You c
That's it, Jack. And another note
Neil und Buzz, der Präsident der Vereinigten Staaten ist jetzt in
알겠습니다. 저는 일반 모드이고, 전원 
我觉得主要是相机的
双子座4号，这里是休斯顿。你的信号断断续续。如果你正在接收信号，我们将更新你在德克萨斯州上空的6-4信号。请保持电脑
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven. Ici I.O.S. Com Tech sur HF et UHF. Vous recevez? 
... Computer einschalten und uns außerdem Ihre Mengenangabe mitteilen. Ausschalte
OK. GET B 9 44 00; Delta-V, 9 pieds par seconde; votre temps de combustion 0 plus 15; le lacet et le tangage sont à zéro; Noyau 25, 90090; Les noyaux 26 et 27 sont tous à zéro; propulseurs à 
Ok. Non abbiam
燃料電池 
Es ist auf HOCH ein
Хорошо. В центральной части Тихого океана общие условия хорошие. Ожидается облачность на высоте 2000 футов, рассеянная, видимость 10 миль, ветер 70 градусов со скоростью 12, высота волн 4 фута, показания высотомера 2974. Восход солнца в 10:00 по зулу, рассвет в 16:49 по зулу. Корабль будет «Йорктаун»; самолеты — Airboss № 1 и 2, а также спасательные самолеты № 1, 2 и 3. Расчетное время до корабля: «Йорктаун» — в целевой точке, самолет Airboss — 15 минут, и он будет командиром на месте. Спасательные самолеты №
我会绕过左边那个火山口。那里不是有一块平
POTENZA DI CONTROLLO DELLA ROTAZIONE, NORMAL
जेरी, मैं यह 
ما رأيك في تناول زبدة الفول
Alles sieht gut aus, hier eine kurze Zusammenfassung: Treibstoffstand 29–27 Prozent. Kabinendruck 5,5, Kabinenlufttemperatur 88 Grad, relative Luftfeuchtigkeit 33 Prozent; Kühlmittelmenge 58 Prozent, Temperatur 71 Grad, Anzugtemperatur 71 Grad, Anzugdruck 5,8,
Okay. Jack, right now we're not able to. The sunlight's reflecting off the thrusters an
네. 여기서는 몇 가지 통신 점검을 진행할 겁니다. 다섯 가지 모드로 전환할 건데, 그중 하나만 일시적으로 통신이 중단될
了解。エドのボトルに入
了解。私もそのやり方は賛成だ。もう少しおとなしいやり方だが、素早くやれば相手は固まってしま
迷ったらロングで着地し
Roger. Va bene. È quello che ci aspett
Ja. Okay, der Sauerstoffdruck ist jetzt auf 925 gesunken und wir beatmen seit 
Hou
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. نحن هنا نعيد تنظيم صفوفنا، ونعمل على تحسين أنظمة التحكم لديك، ونحاول إعداد شيء ما، ونلقي نظرة على المواد الاستهلاكية بدلًا من خطة الطيران، وما إلى ذلك. وبمجرد حصولنا على كل هذه المعلومات، سنبلغك بها. لدينا أيضًا طاقم الدعم المكون من 14 فردًا في أجهزة المحاكاة، يراجعون عمليات الاحتراق عند الرسو، ويحاولون أيضًا معرفة إجراءات المحاذاة التي يمكنهم ابتكارها لرؤية النجوم 
로
了解。左の窓から外を眺めている位置から、着陸エリア全体が見え
Non, je ne suis pas AUTO; j'arrive dans une minut
好的。读取以下设置：向上遥测命令关闭；甚高频调幅B，中心；S波段静噪关闭；燃料电池反应阀正常；磁带录音机前进，中心；磁带运动，旋转；电源，中心；PMP电源，中心；交流逆变器
Okay. That's right. That's Jim Lovell. What we thought we'd do today was just show you a little bit about life inside Apollo 8. We've shown you the scenes of the moon, the scenes of the earth, and we thought we'd invite you into our home. It's been our home at least for 4 days as you can see on the instrument panel. We mark off each day on the instrument panel. We're four down, and we're working on the fifth day. Of course, we're all looking forward to the landing on Friday. Down here in the part of the spacecraft that we call the lower equipment bay, we have the President's adviser on physical fitness, Captain Jim Lovell, about to undergo an exercise program that we do every day. You notice that he floats around very freely. He just bumped his head on the optics, used for our navigating. He's working with an exercise device that's designed to keep the muscles in shape. Now another very important function of our spacecraft is the computer, and I thought you might be interested in seeing what we have here, the displays that give us all the information about our burn, about navigating, and about the velocity that we use during entry and retrofire on earth-orbital missions. You can see it's controlled by a , or similar to a typewriter keyboard, and the things that go in and out of that are absolutely miraculous. It's done a fantastic job for us, and Jim Lovell has done an excellent job operating it. Now another very important thing whether you're in space or the ground is eating, and I've asked Bill Anders to sh
ठीक है। पंक्ति 4 पर, सिग्नल स
एक्व
調子はど
Okays Houston. Neither Neil nor Mike can see it. Incidentally, those shafts and trunnions just missed pointing at 
투구 각도가 115도네요. 저 공... 투구... 딱 그 정도면 
हवाई कॉम टेक, सिग्मा सेवन, आपका लोड और क्लिय
Когда будете готовы, 11, у меня есть пара небольших обновлений по плану полета, обновление по рас
알았다
짐입니다, 마이크. 지원팀은 
Das ist richtig, Jack. Wir haben die Verfahrensanweisungen – detaillierte Checklisten – soeben fertiggestellt und werden sie Ihnen zusenden. Das heißt, ein Zeitplan mit Bezug a
Роджер. Я дам вам
로저, 13. 산소 탱크 2의 양 센서 고장 때문에 냉동 산소량을 좀 더 면밀히 관리해야 해서, 원래 계획보다 조금 더 자주 냉동 산소 
रॉ
Roger, 11. Comme vous l'avez probablement constaté, votre angle de conicité en mode a considérablement augmenté suite à l'évacuation des eaux usées, à la purge de la pile à combustible et à un couplage naturel. Il semble donc que nous devions interrompre la transmission dans quelques instants. Nous aimerions savoir si 
Ricevuto. In qualsias
Roger. Wir haben es verst
Роджер. Мы не торопимся с переходом к новому положению; до Нави еще довольно далеко, а нам нужно другое положение. У меня есть поправка по поводу 20-го кадра — на Нави после адаптации к темноте: можно различить Кассиопею и саму Нави. Трудно увидеть, какие звезды находятся вокруг. У нас все еще довольно много частиц, которые плавают вместе с ко
위쪽에 약 3.5볼트 
Okay. Ich bin im Normalmodus und wähle für die Hochfahrzeit die Option „Wiedereintritts-Attitude Selec
On a l'air bi
Roger. 027 44 5363, moins 165 073 14 037 44 8016, moins 165 07
حسنًا. نظام التحكم في الوضع، أمر معدل العودة، الماسح الضوئي مُطفأ. جميع جيروس
शुभ संध्या। मैं आप सभी से अपोलो 11 मिशन की उड़ान के कुछ प्रतीकात्मक पहलुओं पर चर्चा करना चाहता हूँ। पिछले दो-तीन दिनों में अंतरिक्ष यान में घटी घटनाओं पर चर्चा करते हुए हम इस निष्कर्ष पर पहुँचे हैं कि यह केवल तीन मनुष्यों की चंद्रमा य
버즈, 이 정신 나간 대진표가 바로 여기야. 아마 네 앞길을 완전히 막고 있
هذا صحيح، أبولو 8. وسنوافيكم ببعض المعلومات الإضافية قريبًا. نعمل حاليًا على التحليق بالقرب من المركبة. وسنتحدث معكم بتفصيل أكبر عن مشكلة رصد النجوم باستخدام السدس والتلسكوب. وما نود فعله فور وصول الفريق الأسود إلى جهاز MOKR، مع وجود فريقين هنا، هو أن نستمع إلى شرحكم لما ترونه وما لا ترونه، وتحت أي ظروف، لنرى إن كان بإمكاننا توضيح ذلك ليفهمه الجميع. وإذا كانت لديكم أي ملاحظات بخصوص الجدول الزمني - مع العلم أننا انحرفنا عنه قبل عملية الاحتراق - أو أي ملاحظات حول طريقة العودة إلى ال
杰克，这里最棒的一点，尤其对我这样的新手来说，就是——在这里行动非常方便。当然，正如你在指令舱模拟器里工作时所了解的，零重力环境确实非常有利。因为在1g重力下，你在里面活动会非常受限，而在这个环境下就轻松多了。正如你所看到的，这里看起来很干净，我发现周围有几个松动的垫圈，还有序列摄像机的一个小塑料盖松了，卡在了ED面板旁边。好了。就在吉姆的正下方，他现在站在一个看起来像罐子的东西上。为了让后面的人都能看清楚，这个罐子里装的是上升发动机，希望你们能看到我现在把手放在上面——就是我们用来离开月球的发动机。紧挨着发动机盖的，我手上拿着一个白色盒子，之前已经展示过了。这是吉姆的背包，里面装着氧气和冷却水，用于在月球表面作业。我们希望这个装置能用上4个小时，最多可能达到5个小时。就在后面，我手上拿着两个小方包，一个在这里，一个在下面，是我们的应急氧气包，
没
飛行は続く。機体の混雑は増し
मुझे समझ आ गया। मैंने सोचा था कि यह एक द्वीप है - लेकि
56-BRAVO Split-Burn, 55 vorn, 106 achtern. 1+31. 2+15. 06 57 55. 6+42. Bere
罗杰。我不确定我是否完
100
प्रतीक्षा करें। रॉ
Хорошо. Я понял идею. Хорошо. Давайте я повторю это здесь. Возьмите карточку с подсказкой, сформируйте дугу сверху, подогнув её
エリア 3 デルタは 04 プラス 12 プラス 32 です。
ज़ान्ज़ीबार कैप
रॉजर। हमारे पास 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, माइनस 061, प्लस 067 135 23 4149; प्लस 32020, प्लस 06713, माइनस 02773 181 054 013; NA, प्लस 0
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 업링크가 완료되었
저는 객실 돔 설정을 5.5로, 정장 돔 설
У тебя получилось вставить предохранительную булавку
Say again your last trans
Eh bien, je suppose que c'est ce que nous voulons. Nous vo
أصبح وضع التحكم الخاص بي الآن يدوياً؛ تم تثبيت الجيروسكوبات، وسأسمح للكبسولة بالانجراف لفترة 
J'ai roulé trop lentement -
Noch 8 Minuten bis zum 
자세 제어가 아주 잘 되고 있습니다. 수동 연료도 충분한 것 같습니다. 아직 72% 정도 남았습니다. 피치 방향으로 사이클릭 레이트를 확실히 제어하고 있습니다. 요는 상당히 안정적이고, G가 증
P
रॉजर। स्वीकार करता
Это «Сигма Семь». Я вас прекрасно слышу. А как 
Верно. Теперь нам нужно выполнить включение питания в соотве
रॉजर। मुझे ठीक से याद नहीं
Okay, also, warum gehen wir n
프레드, 잠시 
После того, как я уменьшил те
كانا
はい、ジム、私たちはあなたの意見を聞きました
Gemini 4, Haw
أبولو 8، هيوستن. نحتاج إلى
Par ailleurs, et à titre d'information générale, le soleil devrait se trouver dans l
حسنًا. شغّل مفتاح INVERTER 2، AC BUS 2؛ وشغّل مفتاح AC BUS 2 RESET؛ وشغّل مفتاح BATTER CHAR
D'accord. 
حسنًا. اقتربنا من دقيقتين؛ الأمور تسير على ما يرام. هل أداء AGS 
D'accord. Question. Cette brève étape de mise en marche (étape 3) à la page 24 ne consiste qu'à activer le système A/B, deux quadrup
Ce l'a
没
、ケープは1
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, ogni volta che la tua combustione OAMS supera 
Ok, Jack. Su MDC 1, non c'è niente di anomalo. Tutti gli indicatori di velocità sono a zero. La sfera numero 2 è congelata, ovviamente; abbiamo perso il MAIN B. Ho... La sfera numero 1 sembra fu
D'accord, sur la carte de brûlure, la troisième ligne devrait STAB/CONTROL CBs tous FERMÉS
Okay. There is a note here that says use dovetail on top of camera, rather than the side dovetail. Use the dovetail on the top of the camera for mounting to bracket and place the ro
로저. 101 28번으로 전화 드렸습니다. 102 16번으로 전화 드렸습니다
Ка
روجر، اعلم أننا اضطررنا حتى الآن لتجنب... أي مي
अब हमारे शरीर का तापमान सामान्य 
이쪽으로
जिम से थोड़ा सा 
好
Canton Com Tech, hier spricht Sig
제가 한번 찾아보겠습니다. 물론 창문을 통해서도, 망원경으로
Ciao, Eagle. Sono Houston. Come si legge? Voce norm
Gemini VIII, RKV CAP COM. Könnten Sie bitte Ihren Encoder ausschalten? Wir möchten Agena mit einer neuen Software akt
罗杰。版本 57，序列 16，
روجر، فرانك، أنتما تستهلكان حاليًا 1.4 رطل من الوقود في الساعة مع تثبيت زاوية الميل والانعراج. يهمنا أن نرى ما 
ठीक है, 11. यह ह्यूस्टन है। जब आप उपयुक्त स्थिति में पहुंच
조언 
У меня снова слишком быстро появилось сообщение на восходящем канале, когда я отключил переключатель DATA — это происходит, кажется, примерно в трети с
Oka
好的，
Oh, yes, yes, we're no longer 139 
我们要拿起电缆，让埃德把它夹在两腿之间，大约
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 어떻게 읽으시나요? 이
罗杰。GMTRC 17
Roger. Je viens de prendre le sextant et je regarde le Texas. Le météorologue a raison, la journé
Houston, Apollo 8. Nous venons de terminer le change
Roger, Fran
Roger, Jim. Pause, Jack, wir möchten, 
当初は、別の回避操作があったため、予定通りの観測を直ちに開始することができませんでした。この操作によって、その領域に膨大な量の疑似星が発生し、光学系の較正が事実上不可能になりました。私たちが考案した方法はあまりうまく機能していないようでした。最終的に私が採用した方法は、最も明るい恒星であるシリウスに行き、シャフトとトラニオンを回収し、その後、宇宙船をシリウスまで飛ばして光学系の較正に使用するというものでした。これは後日実施しました。光の散乱に関しては、受動熱制御中のほぼどの姿勢でも、走査望遠鏡で光の散乱を受けているようです。これは主に、望遠鏡の中心を横切る幅広い光の帯として現れ、零点を中心に両方向に約10度の範囲に広がります。この領域では星を見るのは非常に困難です。再調整は順調に進んでいます。アライメントを行うために六分儀で星を
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호 휴스턴입니다. 친절한 화이트 팀이 첫 교대 근무를 시작했으니,
Okay. I'm right by
짐,
एक मिनट रुकिए। वैसे भी, ह
Хьюстон, Транквилити. Мы готовы начать проверку электрооборудования. Будем мо
Roger. Iniziando con NOME 33: 130 30 0000, più 00020, più 
Ja, das war er. Und jetzt
Итак, начнём. Интерес к полёту «Аполлона-11» остаётся высоким, но в районе Хьюстона также наблюдается конкурирующий интерес к смягчению правил полива. Мэр Луи Уэлч обещает отменить ограничения на полив газонов, если дожди продолжатся. В пятницу ожидается пере
الشيء الوحيد الذي يمكننا تجربته يا جيم هو تشغيل الجهاز يدويًا ومعرفة ما سيحدث. لا
シグマ・セブン、こちらはウォータータウン・キャップ・コム、HFです。聞こえるならUHFに
了解。マーク、
阿波罗
नहीं। हम ध्या
It's going to be interesting today, Jack. The Earth's a lot bigger; the crescent is a lot more pronounced
ठीक है। पिच 10 और यॉ 45 पर पै
Ok, ho u
Friend
Di
Vérification de connexion terminée. Vous me recevez? La position des commutateurs du panneau est par défaut. Globe en place, latitude nord 63°, longitude est 97°, correction 710, heure de division: 9 h 18 min 07 s; l’index de déplacement est par défaut (premier jour: 7). Pression cabine: 1 bar, humidité: 65 %, température: 19 °C, pression dans le compartimen
J'ai reçu le matériel pour S-5. Répétez l'Apollo n° 4. Est-ce la révision 3
컬럼비아, 휴스턴.
로저. 이 과학 탐구 때문에 내 E 메모리 프로그램을 잃어버렸다는 걸 알아줬으면 
Apollo 11. Dreißig Sekunde
Columbia, this is Hous
We copied your respiratory maneuver, and we have your
了解しました。宇宙船コロンビア号の住人の皆様、今日はコロンビアの独立記念日です。昨夜、フィリピンのグロリア・ディアスさんがミス・ユニバースに輝きました。彼女は世界美人の称号をかけて、他の60人の少女たちを破りました。ディアスさんは18歳で、黒髪黒瞳、スリーサイズは34.5インチ、23インチ、34.5インチです。準優勝はミス・オーストラリア、続いてミス・イスラエル、ミス・ジャパンでした。火曜の夜、皆さんがワシントンへ帰る間、アメリカンリーグとナショナルリーグのオールスターチームがワシントンで試合をします。アメリカンリーグの先発投手はヤンキースのメル・ストットルマイヤーが有力視されています。ナショナルリーグの先発投手は誰になるか、まだ誰も予想していません。ナショナルリーグには9人の先発投手がいます。宇宙計画では研究が確かに成果を上げてきましたが、研究が必ずしも成果を上げるとは限らないようです。 10億個以上の木製バ
Хорошо. Значит, вы уверены, что это сервисный модуль
ठीक है। हमें पता है कि कल रात प्राइमरी में आप 15 पर गए थे। ह
Hallo California Cap Com. Freundschaft Sieben. Vorbe
D'accord. Vous parlez bien 
收到。水瓶座，我们
Ce que vous voyez, ce sont les cratères croisés de la mer de Smyth, les cratères Castner et Gilbert, et ce que nous avons
Der Blick auf den Mond, den wir in letzter Zeit hatten, war wirklich spektak
У на
Bene. Esatto. Quindi, per riconfigurare questa configurazione, Jack, vogliamo che tu lasci gli interruttori MAIN BUS TIE in posizione ON ed es
Okay. Das werden wir t
Вы их уже получили
أبو
Actuellement, on parle d'une vitesse de 2,1 mètres par seconde en milieu de parcours, 104 heures avant l'entrée dans l'atmosphère. On extrapole cette valeur jusqu'à environ 8 heures avant la rentrée atmosphérique. On vous a donné une marge de sécurité: environ 5,8 mètres pa
Okay, das ist dein Blutd
ठीक है, बस मुझे उसके स्थान और निर्देशांक प्रणाली के बारे में अपना सर्वोत्तम अनुमान बता दीजिए, मैं इसे अपने मा
Это подтверждается, и мы также учитываем такие факторы, как траект
Roger, Colombie. Voici le 11. G&N: 37 200, -060, +047, 098 05 2422, +41 448, +03 719, -02 422. Roulis: NA, tangage: 020, le reste du PAD: NA. Étoiles de réglage: NA. Le ullage est de deux quadruples – correction, deux jets pendant 16 secondes; utiliser Bravo et Delta. Dans les commentaires, le présent non amarré – correction, ceci est pour – le 11 est non amarré. Le poids embarqué actuel est de 37 200 livres, environ 50 Alfa sur
자, 
휴스턴에서 제가 간격을 조정하는 동안 오른쪽 태양광 패널은 자동으로 펼쳐졌습니다. 왼쪽 패널은 맨 끝에 있는 막대를 수동으로 ***해야 했습니다
Merci de nous avoir incité
是的，我注意到了。你似乎怎么
Роджер. 
62970, minus 162, plus 129, plus 00
Apollo 8, Ho
منذ خفض صمام الماء في البدلة، ارتفعت درجة حرارة فتحة بخار البدلة قليلاً - أرفعها الآن من واحد إلى اثنين. من المفترض أن يؤدي هذا إلى خفض
روجر. في E-9 بالقرب من الأعلى تحت "إنهاء التسخين المسبق" وفي المنتصف هناك، بعد "إي
了解しました。マイク、ありがとう。何か助けていただけますか？これは奇妙ですね
はい、でも今は私たちはかなりうまくやっています
Roger. Concernant la température du quadruple capteur, la limite sup
Hey, good morning, Frank. We've been tracking you for about 18 minutes now, and we show your orbit 61 by 61-1/2.
Ok, diamo un'occhiata. Io ho questo
ठीक है। हम
Mentre ci avviciniamo alla fase di accensione, vogliamo ripetere lo stesso controllo che abbiamo fatto per l'ultima accensione. Cioè, vogliamo assicurarci che tutto sia alimentato... interruttore per interruttore, seguendo le vostre istruzioni. E per... dovremmo avere 
मैं आपको बताता हूँ - हम सभी को इसे करने में बहुत मज
ちょっと待ってください。
حسنًا. إنهم يواصلون استخدام فتحة التهوية غير الدافعة من خزان الأكسجين السائل. ستكون في الاتجاه المعاكس شعاعيًا. ويخبرني المعززون أنها نظام التهوية المستمر. كما أنهم يفرغون كمية صغيرة من الوقود في هذا
Ok, Bill. Prima di leggere il grande aggiornamento, vorrei spiegare brevemente a Jim la procedura. Quando si ripren
看看那东西。我不知道我们能拿这些到处飘来飘去的东西怎么办
Roger, Watertown. I read you loud and clear. Please make your transmissions to me in the blind, if I do not ackno
When you work up an attitude to get high gain, is there any w
我们正在把它们全部记
Okay. And your 
Роджер. Начнём с мировых новостей. Всеобщие поздравления американским астронавтам «Аполлона-8» и надежды на международное сотрудничество в освоении космоса сопровождались рождественскими посланиями, разосланными по всему миру, пока крошечный космический корабль вращался вокруг Луны. Даже в коммунистическом мире царил энтузиазм по поводу первого полёта человека на Луну. В Москве советский учёный Анатолий Бесаранов вспомнил, что его страна и Соединённые Штаты уже обменивались знаниями о космосе, и предсказал, что полёт «Аполлона-8» приведёт к дальнейшему сотрудничеству. На Кубе радио Гаваны ретранслировало программу «Голоса Америки», чтобы рассказать слушателям о речи «Аполлона-8». Представители «Голоса» заявили, что это был первый случай, когда программы американских агентств транслировались по радио Гаваны. Чехословакия наблюдала за полётом на Луну благодаря обширному телевизионному освещению; а в Будапеште, Венгрия, в поездах и автобусах почти ни о чём другом не говорили. В некоммунистическом мире офисные работники и покупатели рождественских подарков затаили дыхание, наблюдая за подготовкой космического корабля к старту. Французы на улицах восхваляли американские технологии и космический подвиг, а некоторые зрители, смотрящие по телевизору лунные фотографии, скандировали «Великолепно!». В Лондоне толпы покупателей, покупающих рождественские подарки, заполнили магазины и пабы, чтобы посмотреть телевизионные фотографии лунных кратеров. Ведущий британский астроном-космонавт Бернард Ловелл, который еще несколько недель назад критиковал проект «Аполлон-8» на том основании, что приборы могли бы выполнить эту работу, не подвергая опасности жизни астронавтов, ясно дал понять, что он был глубоко впечатлен полетом на Луну. Папа Павел VI отдал дань уважения этим пионерам расширения интеллекта и деятельности человека. Однако лишь немногие скряги «отмахнулись» от рождественского путешествия. Самым известным был Сэмюэл Шентон,
That's correct. Jack, what we're doing is we've ha
オーケー。ヒュース
يا رجل، يبدو أنك تستمتع حقاً. سأتركك لبضع ثوان
밴스, 말씀하세요.
休斯顿，阿波罗 8 号
Aquarius, Houston. Preparatevi ad aprire gli interruttori automatici per i display. Vi spieghere
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Всё в порядке; это
아니요. 그는 이미 오래전에 전성기를
Привет, Джек, это в процессе работы. И еще кое-что: сравнивая контрольный список Джима со своим, я обнаружил одно различие на отметке -02:30. В его контрольном списке мне нужно изменить - разомкнуть автоматический выключатель цепи СИГНАЛА ДАТЧИКА непосредственно перед отключением питания. Я хотел бы выяснить, какой ко
No changes to pan
好的，13. 我们确认一下
Ge
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, ici 12 Ec
아, 맞다. 아, 나도 알고 있었어. 내
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。三个开关位置。遥测输入开
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कि वहाँ पहुँचने से पहले मैं 90.0 तक पहुँच गया था। इस तरफ वाला तो लग गया
حسنًا. ألصق المرشح الأحمر على عدسة التقريب. هذا المرشح الأحمر هو مرشح 25A الأحمر، وليس ال
То, что ты видишь, Майк, это... Хьюстон, то, что ты видишь, это Западное полушарие. Вверху — Северный полюс; в центре — чуть ниже центра — Южная Америка — вплоть до мыса Горн. Я вижу Нижнюю Калифорнию и юго-западную часть Соединенных Штато
Roger, Buzz. Uns ist dasselbe aufgefallen. Es ist ganz ähnlich wie wenn man eine Billard- oder Bowlingkugel mit Licht anstrahlt. Man sieht einen hellen Fleck im blauen Wasser, und dadurch ersche
Okay, MARK. O2 
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। ईगल के साथ हमारा डेटा खो गया है। क्या आप कृपया उसे ओ
Du musst den Knopf drücken, während du sprichst, und ihn dann loslassen, damit ich sprec
Sigma Seven. Ich spreche weiter, in der Hoffnung, da
Roger, je comprends qu'il n'y a pas de propulseur inférieur droit sur 
It's done. ROTATION CONTROL POWE
시그마 세븐, 시그마 세븐입니다. 여기는 워터타운 통신기술국입
에드가 했는지 안 했는지는 모르겠지만, 내가 해볼게.
Le luci della città e poi all'orizzonte ci sono le luci lam
それは、すべての制御システムが正常に動作しているこ
Roger, Buzz. E pausa. Pausa. Columbia, qui Houston. Quando uscite dall'
何もしないよ、マイク。ただ彼女が我慢する
لا، لدينا مفتاح على منظم الضغط هذا... مفتاح... مفتاح الكبح... بحيث يكون رقم 1... وهذا هو التكوين الآن، رقم 1 قيد التشغيل ورقم 2 قيد ا
Gemin
Возможно, это сработае
分かり
Je peux vous dire que le sac rond que nous avons sous les yeux, juste derrière Fred, contient le tuyau de notre aspirateur spatial. Une fois à l'intérieur, nous le débrancherons de nos combinaisons. Il sera alors fixé à l'écoutille que nous ouvrirons pour aller sur la surface lunaire, puis pour revenir. L'écoutille devant laquelle nous nous trouvons est ronde; c'est l'é
Okay, very good. Under "Final stowage," the first thing that's listed on line 36, page 1-5, is "Optics." And if you want to get started on your stowage
로저입니다. 휴스턴, 이글입니다. 저희도 저런 
Roger.
Хьюст
Acqua
Hallo, Apol
关于光学系统还有一点需要说明。我们现在处于最佳状态。我们正经过——横滚角大约是182度；俯仰角大约是226度，偏航角
ああ、ジャック、4時間くらいかな。ちょっと待って
알겠습니다. Tango
Ok. Sto togliendo... ho tolto il grosso dorso; per ora registrerò solo. Ho tolto il grosso dorso dalla macchina fotografica e sto cercando di procurarmi altra pellicola del MIT. Il filtro è inserito. La cassetta... è nella macchina fotogr
ロジャー。マルーン・ビューグルの続きです。ニクソン大統領は、あなた方に会いに行く飛行機に乗る直前に、サンフランシスコから電話をかけ、奥様たちを驚かせました。奥様方は皆、あなた方のテレビ放送に感動していました。ジャンとパットはここミッションコントロールから見ていました。ケープカナベラルからのインテルサットの打ち上げは昨夜、4度目の延期となりました。デルタ衛星の第2段にある窒素調整器の故障が原因とされています。今夜、新たな打ち上げが試みられる予定です。メキシコ湾流を調査している調査潜水艦ベン・フランクリンは、ジョージア州沖の水深1300フィートで、海底から10フィートから100フィート
Да уж, эта штука везде разбросана, правда? Может, нам стоит сделать
Cambiare di nuov
I don't understand... Suit fan number 1 circuit breaker ope
صحيح. ربما كان ذلك أسفل 
रॉजर। आपके विकल्प संबंधी प्रश्न के बारे में: प्रोग्राम 40 पसंदीदा फ़्लैग को इस प्रकार सेट करता है कि अगला विकल्प 1 आएगा, उसके बाद के सभी संरेखण विकल्प 2 लाएंगे। स
È piuttost
Ich hab eine Batterie... Ich hab noch ei
नमस्कार, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस। ह्यूस्टन। मेरे
D'accord, Jack. Et c'est exac
Haben wir ein 
Да, я вижу почти до самого озера Салтон-Си на севере. Я вижу окрестности горы Уитни, но з
يبدو أننا ابتعدنا كثيراً عن منطق
روجر، ١١. هذ
了解しました、ジム。
It'd be kind of interesting to see some of this dump go on straight from polar orbit. Wonder how long it's going to ta
Roger, Bill. Nous avons effectué une sauvegarde de la mémoire effaçable il y a quelques heures. Je crois que c'était pendant que vous dormiez, mais en tout cas, nous avons vérifié la mémoire effaçable de l'ordinat
收到。收到。完毕
Ok. R1 più 27210, R2 più 35570, R3 più 33010. Secondo elemento, come sapete, dovuto alla manovra con un PROCEED e un PROCEED; e, dopo il vostro assetto, un promemoria che non vi riporterà a una banda morta stretta. Per tornare alla banda morta di 1,40 gradi, dovete usare la
केप कैप कॉम। मैंने आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से 
每
そうだ、ヒューストン。
In Carnar
और, जैक, हमने अपशिष्ट जल निथारने वाला हीटर बंद कर दिया है। अगर आपको और अपशिष्ट जल निथारने की ज़रूरत है, तो बेहतर होगा कि हम इ
프랭크, 시동까지 약 2분 30초 남았는데, 체크리스트대로 설정되지 않은 스위치가 몇 개 있습니다. 구체적으로, 레이트 LOW, 데드밴드 MINIMUM, 그리고 
罗杰。关于你这次的航向：我们希望你使用滚转角 096，螺距 356，偏航角 018。这样你就能得到六分仪星形 01，轴 2
Roger. Onboard calculations indicate tha
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8
That readback is correct, Frank, and we'd like to advise that the
我观测到了这些粒子。
Au centre de contrôle, vous pourriez vous joindre à nous pour souhaiter un joyeux anniversaire 
Mess
分かりました。ありがとう、ジ
Okay, I guess it's right
Ricevuto. Sigma Seven
Ok, Apollo 8. Vi aggiorneremo prima della combustio
좋습니다. 첫 번째는 기동입니다. 첫 번째는 무게로 시작하는 / 기호입니다. 63295 - 163 + 129 + 00
据塔斯社报道，莫斯科航天工程师阿纳托利·科里茨基表示，“月球15号”探测器能够完成此前所有“月球”系列探测器所完成的任务。媒体据此推断，“月球15号”可以探测月球引力场、拍摄月球照片，并降落到月球表面采集样本进行分
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हमारे परीक्षण का अगला भाग वैसा ही है जैसा हमने कल किया था; हम अपलिंक मोड को अपलिंक कमांड और रेंजिंग मोड में बदलेंगे, जिसमें अपवॉयस नहीं होगा। हम लगभग ढाई मिनट तक इस मोड में रहेंगे और दो परीक्षण संदेश भेजेंगे। इस दौरान, हमारे पास अपलिंक नहीं होगा। हम इस मोड में समय पर जाएंगे और इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन मे
몇 초 후 하와이에서 골드스톤으로 연결이 전환됩니다. 일시적으로 통신이 두절
Per quanto riguarda i libri, credo che dovremmo essere sicuri di prestare un po' più attenzione al tipo di anelli che usiamo. Abbiamo avuto difficoltà ad aprirli due o tre volte, e inoltre le pagine si strappano e non rimangono nel libro. Dovremmo cercare una sorta di rinforzo per i fori in cui si fissano gli anelli. Sulla pistola ad acqua, la piccola tettarella che sporge all'estremità per far uscire l'acqua rimane in posizione OUT, proprio come nel simulatore, e permette all'acqua di scorrere dopo aver rilasciato il grilletto. Di tanto in tanto, bisogna riposizionarla lì per evitare che 
हम जो करने की कोशिश करेंगे वह यह है कि प्रत्येक व्यक्ति के लिए छोटे-छ
-4. Хорошо, я проверю. Похоже, всё в порядке. Мог бы немного подправить. Ладно, этого мне вполне достаточно для ночных проверок рыскания, и, что касается меня, я вернусь и дам ребятам ещё немного времени. Не вижу причин расходовать слишком много топлива. А теперь я да
Let see. Elsewhere in the national news, the newlyweds, David and Julie Eisenhower, came away from their secret honeymoon hideaway to have Christmas dinner with President-elect Nixon and the family. In New York city, the world's busiest harbor was reduced to almost complete inactivity Christmas day, due to a 5-day old longshoreman strike and a rare hiatus in shipping schedule. No ships arrived or 
轴承 
... he's never been through a
Yes. We think that you're going to come up with a 37 06 already in the. If you do, do an ENTER and that should take you to the code 00062, which is the request for standby. And when you get that, hit PROCEED until the blanks. If you come up with something else, that's where we want to end up a
Your j
Ja
Ok. Valvola PRINCIPALE del REGOLATORE, due, su CHIUSO. VALVOLE DI REGOLAZIONE DELLA PRESSIONE D
네. 돌아올 때 조종실 온도가 나갈 때보다 더 높아진 것을 알아챘습니다. 나갈 때는 10핀 밸브를 수동으로 조절했는데, 
Il suo sistema di bloccaggio car
बिल्कुल सही। पहले वाले प्रारूप और अब वाले प्रारूप में बस इतना ही अंतर है कि 400,000 के RET के बजाय, जब आप रोल रेट शुरू करेंगे तो हम आपको 0.05 ग्र
아폴로
رو
ليس الأمر سيئاً بما فيه الكفاية ألا تجد مكان الهبوط المناس
Мы видим, как ты занимаешься спортом. Это
MSC-2 和 -3 将于 04
Roger. Ich habe wieder die Rückenwache. Wir wollen sichergehen, dass wir es mit den Sternenbeobachtungen nicht übertreiben und dadurch die Temperaturkontrolle vernachlässigen. Könntest du uns deshalb bitt
在完成机身轴线校准后，我们​​可以告诉您飞行器需要保持怎样的姿态才能将光学系统指向月球或某颗
Hast du heut
Ok, pannello interruttore automatico 11 AGGIORNA COLLEGAMENTO
Ok. BAT 2 e
Die Erde ist natürlich ziemlich hell, und der schwarze Himmel hat, anstatt schwarz zu sein, einen rosigen Schimmer. Der Stern, sofern er nicht sehr hell ist, geht wahrscheinlich in diesem Schimmer unter, ist aber einfach nicht sichtbar. Ich habe das Fadenkreuz deutlich über den Horizont positioniert, um sicherzustellen, dass der Stern nicht in der Helligkeit unterhalb des Horizonts untergeht. Doch selbst wenn ich das Fadenkreuz deutlich über den Horizont positioniere
Roger. O
Aspetta un attimo. Acquario, ti consigliamo d
У G
收到。夜侧光线充足，我甚至能
يوجد جدول مائي
了解。アンテナを交換していたようですね。待機してください。11番、了解です。こちらでアンテナを交換していました。要するに、非常に良好なプラットフォームで、ジャイロのドリフトもPIPAのドリフ
Sì, l'ho notato. Prima, manteneva meno di così; era insolitamente b
As long as you're reading me okay, Frank, I'll bring you up to date on a couple of things. The which we will be sending you is a state vector update going to the slot, and w
Хорошо. На шаге 34 в разделе «Окончательное размещение», который является своего рода общим разделом, есть шаг, где указано «вторичный гликоль в радиатор», и там написано «байпас, проверить». 
Friendship Seven, hie
Хьюстон, я это сделал, и я думаю, что подача кислорода идёт, но манометр просто зашкаливае
Роджер. Бе
Apollo 11, Houston. Bien 
अपोलो 8
没问题，我可以撑
盲区通讯。我们已建立视距。地面运行时间已到，4小时29分30秒。盲区通讯至Aurora Seven。请确保所有音调开关均已开启；警示灯已亮起；手动保险丝
直到高位闸门之前都是如此。你可以在“距离低位闸
브루스, "녹색
Für diese Spiels
Okay. -2,
चूंकि आप पहले से ही यात्रा पर हैं, इसलिए आपको यह जानकर शायद दिलचस्पी हो कि ह्यूस्टन की ज्योतिषी रूबी ग्राहम का कहना है कि चंद्रमा की आपकी यात्रा के लिए सभी संकेत अनुकूल हैं। उनका कहना है कि नील चतुर है, माइक में अच्छी समझ ह
알겠습니다. 그렇게 해
好的，万斯。你说我们应该从应急手册的准备阶段开始，大概是……我一会儿和吉姆商量一下，马上回复你。在点火姿态下，我们应该能看到太阳正好在顶部，我猜这是第二个定位点。
Roger. Ti sento forte e chiaro. Quando ti avverto, imposta il commutatore 
Bene. Stiamo prevedendo che, al momento nominale del tuo prossimo percorso intermedio, ovvero all'interfaccia di ingresso meno 2 ore, prevediamo una combustione di 1,4 piedi al secondo, che modifica il tuo gamma all'interfaccia di ingresso di un decimo di grado. In questo momento, senza ulteriori manovre, il tuo gamma è d
B
Auf Jims Seite ist es gerade hell, und von meiner Seite aus kann ich noch einige Sterne erkennen. Anscheinend
Hat der Kommandopilot seine Handschuhe ausg
ठीक है। 
Interruttori automatici, ROLL
好的，杰
D'accord. Merci. Nous espérons qu'en activant le module de commande demain, ou plus tard aujourd'hui, nous pourrons identifier plus précisément l'origine du problème. Cependant, les spécia
Хорошо. Думаю, было бы лучше, если бы 
Ricevuto. Ricevuto. Traslazione della spinta - quattro getti - Coppia di bilanciamento - ON. Acceleratore - MINIMO. Acceleratore - AUTO CDR. Pulsante elica - RESET. Pulsante elica. Okay. ABORT/ABORT STAGE - RESET. CONTROLLO ATT - tre di loro su CONTROLLO MODALITÀ. Okay, CONTROLLO MODALIT
लगभग 179 मील पर हमारा लॉक-ऑन हो गया था, और रडार बोरसाइटेड लगभग 156 मील पर हो गया; और सुइयाँ अपेक्षाकृत स्थिर हैं; वे ठीक दिख रही हैं। यॉ सुई आगे-पीछे हिल रही है, शायद प्लस या माइनस 1 डिग्री। और यहाँ एक बात ध्यान देने वाली है कि हमें अवशिष्टों को खत्म कर
E poi c'è la pompa secondaria de
جاك، بالإشارة إلى سؤالك
Okay. I was just wondering how everything is going at the home front. All the wive
잭, 내가 만든 수면 장치는 꽤 괜찮았어. 지휘 모듈에서 수면용 구속 장치 하나를 꺼내서 몸에 착용하고, 지퍼 맨 위에 있는 끈을 위쪽 해치 손잡이에 걸었지. 그렇게 하니까 몸이 고정되고, 터널 안에서 거꾸로 된 자세로 얼굴이 해치 쪽으로 향하게 
您好，Cape 
-30 音高
हमें वास्तव में इस बात का बेहतर रिकॉर्ड रखना चाहिए कि हम कहां हैं और हमारे जवाबी हमले के बिंदु 
Tout est prêt pour le marquage, X et Y. OK
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Bitte 
Es
Хорошо. Мы расположили Землю примерно в центре экрана, немного ниже, и казалось, что по ней одновремен
Roger, stai andando un po' debole. Se puoi, potresti darmi una velocità di rolli
Okay. L'ultimo Joe è stato eseguito a -4 ore e mezza; eseguire una spinta di 0,5 piedi al secondo, capacità di carico a quattro getti; quindi eseguire SEP seguito da una trazione di 0,5 piedi al secondo, rispettando una nomenclatura sul; penso che abbiamo davvero bisogno di un aumento di 0,5 e poi di un calo di
I got to vacuum up some water and dump the 
Vous comprenez que nous avo
Wenn du auf High Gain umsteigst, würdest du mir Bes
ロジャー、13歳です。O2タンク2の酸素量センサーが故障したため、クライオタンクの量をもう
D'accord, Jack, il va falloir revenir en arrière si l'on veut suivre la procédure ici, qui consiste à aller dans MODE CONTROL;, AUTO, il va falloir retirer les disjoncteurs TCA pour empêcher le déclenchem
मैं इसे स्ल्यू मोड में छ
ヒューストン、イーグル。コロ
खैर,
OK. Ça va en bas. On est dedans, il y a ass
Okay, on this thing here, 
كولومبيا، هذه هيوستن. نود منك تشغيل المر
Friendship Seven, qui Indian Cap Com. Abbiamo letto 95° 
Чарл
Okay. L'unica proposta che sembra essere questa, se lasciassimo che Jim facesse la sua valutazione attraverso il telescopio, sarebbe di fare tutto esattamente allo stesso modo, tranne che ti giri e ruoti di 180 gradi in modo da avere la testa alta, e lasci che Jim faccia il suo inseguimento attraverso il telesco
Вставьте между словами «ма
好的
Jim, die Totzone ist so, wie sie ist,
Okay. Understand that you've done the. 
네. 4번 위치, 오른쪽 후
Хорошо. Мы бу
PROCE
Roger. Dem stimmen wir zu. Und es sieht
The ti
햇빛은 창문 자체에 아무런 영향을 미치지 않지만, 햇빛의 입사각이 다르면 김 서림으로 인한 시야 방해 정
D'accord. À la page
Gémeaux VI, Gémeaux VI, 
ह्यूस्टन
罗杰，友谊七号。滚转指示右转 19 度，偏航指示左转 2 度，俯仰指示 22 
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। जवाब नकारात्मक है। हम यथास्थिति बनाए रखना चाहते हैं, लेकिन हम आपके कार्यों को अपने आगामी सिम्युलेटर कार्य से जोड़ना चाहेंगे। इसलिए, यदि आप हमें बता सकें कि खिड़की से आपको कौन-कौ
これは
Хорошо, я посмотрю ещё раз. Мне нужно уложить моего партнёра спать.
जैक का कहना है कि यह निश्चित रूप से सर्विस मॉड्यूल की ही
ジャイロはケージに収納され、VOXはオフになって
إيقاف تشغيل نظام ال
好的。在太阳半单位向量处，X，R1，是+0.45498，Y+19024，Z+
Okay. Okay. Then from "Cycle 5 frames, Replace
着陸地点の
아니요, 제대로 쉬고 있는 것 같지는 않지만, 그렇다고 많이 하는 것도 아니라서 그다지 
حسنًا. لا أعتقد أن ذلك سيُفسد الأمر.
Roger. The terrain here is, as you
Да. Хорошо, давление кислорода сейчас упало до 925, и мы находимся на высокой скоро
En fait, nous avons une vue plongeante sur le Cap. On distingue les complexes de lancem
了解。テーピングをしながら、スーツのフローバルブを一つずつ
はっきりと聞こえま
Celui-ci était beaucoup plus loin que celui qui nous était desti
Roger. Reading you, Keno, loud and clear. Blood 
了解しました、アポロ8号。いくつか注意点があります。これから
Ok, Jack. Mentre leggo, l'LMP deve dormire per circa 6 ore. Durante questo periodo, il CDR e il CMP dovrebbero cercare di mangiare qualcosa. Io devo svegliarmi alle 69. Il CDR e il CMP dormono alle 70 e devono svegliarsi all
这是个好问题。我认为目前大部分的决
جيميني 4، يُرجى العلم بأن الطيار يمكنه مسح بيان
Roger. We're getting low bit rate from you, rather than high, and 
11, Houston. Nous vous garderons environ 3 ou 4 minutes à travers 
D'accord. Mettez l'onduleur 2 (CA BUS 2) sur marche; mettez l'interrupteur de réinitialisation du CA BUS 2 sur la position centrale; sélectionnez Alfa pour la charge de la batterie; sélectionnez BATTERY CHARGE pour l'indicateur CC; puis, nous vous demandons de nous communiquer le courant et la tension du chargeur toutes les 10 minutes pendant la première demi-heure, puis toutes les 30 minutes. Nous nous en chargerons ensuite, Jack. Veuillez nous rappeler les régla
روجر، كارنارفون. لتغيير الطائرة. عند سرعة انتقال إجمالية 02 + 42 + 07؛ دلتا-في، 31.7؛ المدة، 0 + 40 ثانية؛ 
روجر
Deux choses, Jim. Nous voulons que tu saches qu'il y a des erreurs d'attitude assez importantes dans le système, donc si tu passes en mode AUTO, l'ordinateur va essayer de te faire tourner en rond, et l'autre chose est de ne pas boire d'eau di
केबिन का तापमान केवल 55 
助推器开始调整姿态。耗时5分钟，因此
जेमिनी VI, कार्
Okay. On the fourth row. Open - From the left, open the first five - correction - Close the first five, and open CABIN FAN 1. Close the three GLYCOL PUMP circuit breakers; open all the COMM breakers, except for COMMANDER'S AUDIO; close it. All the breakers, open - correction - Open the
Ricevuto. A EEP, la batteria A ha 38,95 ampere-ora; la batteria B ha 36,35 ampere-ora; la batteria C ha 38,46 ampere-ora. Il totale è 113,76 ampere-ora. A, la batteria A sarà completamente carica e avrà
了解。ありがとう。彼
ठीक है। हम अपडेट करना चाहेंगे। हम स्टेट वेक्टर, स्टेट वेक्टर
Ed started on unstowing stuff and as soon as we got to the position where it became no longer feasible to fool with the booster, I started full-time helping him - at least holding the things and stowing them away and trying to keep them from disappearing. The faster we worked the farther behind we got. Not because we weren't putting things the way they were supposed to, it just took a lot longer than we had anticipated. It really wasn't much easier at zero g than it was in the simulator, if as easy. So we worked all the way around. By the time we got to Carnarvon, I had made up my mind that we couldn't make it, but I thought we'd forge on a little longer. By the time we got to - or just before we even left Carnarvon it was clear to me that we could not make the depressurization. I called for a slip to the next orbit. We then... caught our breath for about 20 minutes and tried to sort out the junk I had laying around in the cockpit. Then I got the checklist out and we went through the checklist again in detail to make sure that we hadn't skipped anything in the rush. Started the extravehicular - got the GO over Carnarvon. We were all set to go and we were standing by for the GO to start depressurizing. We got it. Went through the depressurization cycle. As we left Carnarvon, we were cleared for the full EVA. We got to Canton or Hawaii, and at that time were given - I believe it was Canton or Hawaii that gave us the GO to actually exit the spacecraft and start the extravehicul
Et, Eagle, à mon signal, nou
フレッド、了解。機動目標はPCプラス2、今回はMPL（高度制限）です。そして、079、27、4013、プラス08144、マイナス00443、マイナス02226、遠地点はN/A、近地点はプラス00205、08455、420、268、261、プラス08155、マイナス00443、マイナス02187、はN/Aです。GDAは前回の燃焼から
훌륭
Gemini 4, Canary CAP COM. LOS-1. Hai 
11日、ヒューストン。1
قيمة الإضاءة للفيلم الأبيض والأسود هي 13 لحساسية ASA 64. ضبط قيمة الإضاءة على 13. التقاط الصورة رقم 7 باستخدام الفلتر. يصعب تصوير قارة أمريكا الجنوبية بسبب تقلبات الطقس. سألتقط صورة بانورامية الآن. سأبدأ بعد حوالي 8 ساعات. في الواقع، ستكون كذلك. MARKT، 7، 8، 9 صور بالأبيض والأسود. عشر صور بالأبيض والأسود. يتم التقاط الصور بسرعة
Отрицательно. Хорошо. Я хотел б
로저. 읽기 + 공 4개 7, + 공 2개 812, -16
Ricevuto. Fase 5: "Quando la velocità è inferiore a 0,05 gradi al secondo,
Roger, Bill. Avant d'essayer le méla
Das sind ungefähr 30 Grad Drehwinkel, Charlie, von der geschlossenen Pos
Inoltre, VI, riceverai
それはどこにあるの？どこかの水の
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。打ち上げは と予測してお
नहीं। उस तरह से नहीं। मैंने इसे पूरी तरह से अंदर धकेल दिया था। यह अंदर जाकर इस तरह अटक गया था। तो ये रहा "Y" कनेक्टर, अ
Wir haben Ihnen bereits einige Zeitangaben gemacht. Wir gehen davon aus, dass wir Ihnen bald genauere Werte nennen 
Roger, Co
Roger, Bill. On comprend que vous avez remué les cryostats. Lors de notre dernier contrôle, la température des conduites était excellente; elles étaient bien chaudes. On vous donne
5. 
好的。5号配电盘上的断路器全部打开
그리고 보조 S-밴드도 필
ما 
まだし
Roger, understand. Docking l
わかりました。ISOバルブ2個をSUIT
Hola, amigos, felicitaciones a Mexico y especialmente a mi amigos de Guaymas. Desde el espacio exterior, su pais esta cubierto con numbes--and es--also--se muy bello. Aqu
Roger. We're chec
아니, 무슨 말인지 모르겠어, 조
로저. 허용 가능한 피치 각도는 어느
Luckily, you were able to get a little bit of everything. I mean, were the rocks - I mean, how did you - did you go around and - just pick up rocks, put them in -
أوه، الشريط، على ما 
Okay, die Umschaltung auf Stromversorgung dauerte 57 Stunden und 11 Minuten. Zur Information: Wir scheinen über ausreichend Energie zu verfügen. Tatsächlich prüfen wir ein Verfahren, das wir Ihnen mögl
ロジャー、11番。こちらヒューストン。局を切り替えなければな
अपोल
了解。分かりました。まずはアンタレスに行って
Tiens-toi prêt, Jim. On travaille sur une procédure pour te
休斯顿，阿波罗13
Nous avons chargé votre système de navigation et vos périphériques externes, dans cet
Going down to 127:11, cross out "Verify ON." Beneath that a ways, cross out "127:14:20, star
الوضع يتحسن. أنت تمسكه عند الساعة الواحدة أو الثانية تقريبًا. الوضع يتحسن. و
En comparant le vol d'Apollo 13 à celui d'Apollo 8, le décollage a généré des vibrations similaires à celles que j'avais ressenties lors d'Apollo 8, mais en début de vol, les mouvements latéraux étaient moins importants. La séparation du module de commande et de vol (S-IC) a été plus brutale sur Apollo 13 que sur Apollo 8, peut-être parce que j'étais assis à un autre endro
بعض هذه المنخفضات الصغيرة تميل إلى الغرق - ربما بمقدار بوصتين أو ثلاث بوصات. وهذا يُشير تمامًا إلى ما أظهرته صور المساح عندما دفعوا التربة قليلًا. تنتقل قوة عبر السطح العلوي للتربة، وينفصل حوالي خمس أو ست بوصات من التربة 
Hawaii, unsere Anzugtemperatur lieg
धन्यवाद
ヒューストン、トランキリティ。確認中です。待機してください。ミッションタイマーのために、パネル11のブレーカーを引いてくだ
알았어, 잭, 쿼드 A의 패키지 온도, 즉 쿼
لا، نحن جميعًا نجلس هنا نت
Ro
Wir suchten auch nach dem Katzenpfotenkrater, da wir annahmen, uns jenseits des Großen V im Zielge
And, Jack, we'll be cha
すべて順調に進んでいます。今日の午後のショーは本当に楽しかった
J'avais pris quatre gorgées à peu près à la même heure lors de ma dernière orbite. Dès que la température de ma combinaison sera un peu plus stable, j'
Роджер. Ты отлично выглядишь здесь, на земле. Мне бы хотелось получить от т
Vedo le stelle doppie di Grus che formano una linea, puntando dritto al centro della finestra. Giove, ovviamente, è davvero luminoso. Vedo Ankaa e - correzione Al Naiir, e questo, questo doveva essere Peacock. Al Naiir è leggermente a destra della traiettoria di volo. Sto volando, ma deve essere lei. Giove appare nel
Okay. We're predicting that you still have more water than you need. And one thing we'd like for you to do is when you're going to sleep up there in the command module take a look throu
我想跟你谈谈你的飞行轨迹。看起来，第一次中途修正，预计到6小时后，速度只会增加7英尺/秒。所以，当然，你之后的任何
Roger, ich habe gute Neuigkeiten. Die Temperatur im Anzugdach beträgt jetzt 70 Grad. Die Temperatur am Anzugeinlass bet
여기 물총이 있습니다. 끝에 있는 원통형 부분은 여러 개의 막으로 이루어진 필터인데, 하나는 물은 통과시키지만 가스는 통과시키지 않고, 다른 하나는 가스는 통과시키지만 물은 통과시키지 않습니다. 따라서 물탱크에서 나오는 가스가 섞인 물을 이 필터를 통
明白了。你基本上完成了空军的要求。我们会分析飞行计划，争取
부스터가 자세 조정을 시작합니다. 5분이 소요되므로 에 도착합니다. 자세와 짐벌 각도는 양호한 상태를 유지합
- - أ
Roger. Pourriez-vous vérifier que votre commutateur T/M est bien
Bill wird
罗杰，弗兰克。第三阶段的飞行速度看起来只有每秒1英尺多一点，所以我们不建议你这么做。这样一来，第四阶段的飞行速度目前只有每秒3英尺左右。你的飞行轨迹看起来很不错。你到达环辛那提星时的高
Roger, Mike. Phase TIG 103 
로저. 1, G&N: 62710, +0.98, -0.19, 0.75 49 4965, -28897, -0.3944, -0.0686; 358 226 347; 0.1692, +0.0610; 29173 602 29108; 31 106.6 358. 
بعيدًا عن الشمس، عندها
ビル、これはどの角度を通過したのか教えていただけますか？プロットした曲線は、機械的な限界ではなく、どうやらRF限界のようです。AUTO REACQモードの機能についてですが、RF限界に達するとシフトするようになっているようです。これは、スキャン警告限界ではなく、ENTER（入力）の数値セットのはずです。もしその数値内に収まったとしたら、どのような数値まで行ったのか教えていただけますか
いいえ、4 ページほどやる必要はなく、おそらくそのくらいで十分で、操縦などに必要な追加の時間の差を埋め合わせられるだろうと考えていま
우리가 파악한 바로는, 여기
La température à l'entrée de la combinaison es
了解。了解し
Je suis content que tu l'aies fait — toi aussi, Neil; c'était une bonne idée, une sacrée bonne idée. 
C'est exact. Nous allons supprimer l'option « Configurer la caméra » qui se trouve en bas de l
صحيح. كنتُ مضطرًا للتحكم في آلية التعشيق على الفتحة في كل مرة أسحبها، لذا لم أتمكن من السحب بقوة كما اعتدت. لذلك كان علينا التنسيق فيما بيننا، وتحديد موضع السحب. كنتُ أُعطي جيم التعليمات للسحب بقوة في ذلك الوقت، وأعلم أنه كان يفعل. وبهذه الطريقة تمك
Ja. Jim schläft jetzt, und Jack und ich sind wach, und ich habe gerade erst wieder geschlafen, ich schätze so um die 5 od
아니요, 최근에 그런 검사를 한 적이 없습니다. 이번 점검의 일환으로 지금 바로 실시하겠습니다. 혈
D'accord. La lune est apparue au milieu du champ de vision du LMP, puis est passée à travers le cha
ठीक है। 5 चार्ली, 14.0; 5 डॉग्स, 3.7; 6 एबल, 3.5; 6 ब्रावो, 4.1; 6 चार्ली, 4.2; 6 डे
نحن نمر فوق جبل مارل
알겠습니다
Apollo 8, Houston. Mancano 4 minuti e 40 secondi. Vorrei una conferma del 
Roger, 2: SPS/G&N: 38320, plus 166, minus 081 080 11 3603, minus 01408, minus all balls, minus 00743, all zeros, 196 359 00657, plus 00537, 01592 017 01531 23 1160 138. Vega, Deneb 243 183 012, two jet 19 seconds,, R1 20101. Sextant star b
맞습니다. 회로 차단기
Роджер. Эй, Джим, пока ты не спишь и всё спокойно, позволь мне дать тебе ещё пару советов. Один конкретный. Я знаю, что никто из вас толком не спит из-за холода, и вам, возможно, стоит прилечь к 
Das stimmt, Jim. Wir haben noch kein Bild davon. Es befindet sich im oberen Bereich – Korrektur, im oberen Bereich des – der oberen Rastposition 2 und im oberen Bereich des – und sollte, wenn Sie genau auf die Sonne ausgerichtet sind, den Cursor teilen
Das ist ein guter Gedanke. Lass uns das mal ein bisschen weit
友谊七号，友谊七号，这里是Muchea 
Metterò solo un punto interrogativo qui, per non mostrare la nos
Comment vont les garçons de la 7e division? Sont-ils par
Roger, Tranquility. On arrive dans environ 6 minutes sur le cana
没错，吉姆。在
Bene. Ora vogliamo inviare le ANTENNE A SPIRALE 
ठीक है। मैं आपको मुख्य बस बी के बारे में अपने अवलोकन बताता हूँ। वहाँ सब कुछ बहुत तेज़ी से हुआ, और हमने सबसे पहले टक्कर या विस्फोट या जो भी कारण था, उसकी आवाज़ सुनी, मुझे पक्का नहीं पता। इसके लगभग 1 सेकंड बाद, एक मास्टर अलार्म बजा, जो मुख्य बस बी के अंडरवोल्टेज का संकेत था। मैंने वोल्टेज देखा, और उस समय वोल्टेज ठीक था, इसलिए मुझे लगता है कि यह अचानक वोल्टेज बढ़ने की वजह से हुआ होगा। फ्यूल सेल 3 भी ठीक था, उसमें सही प्रवाह था। हालाँकि, उसी समय फ्रेड कमांड मॉड्यूल में आ रहा था और अपनी सीट पर बैठ गया। उसी समय, उसके बैठने के कुछ ही देर बाद, एसी बस 2 की लाइट जल गई। उसने मुख्य बस बी को देखा और उसका मान शून्य दिखा रहा था। हालाँकि, फ्यूल सेल का प्रवाह भी शून्य था। मुझे कुछ-कुछ शक है कि शायद हमारे प
Bon, Bill, il suffit de relancer l'
हम यह जानना चाहेंगे कि जब आप प
没错。不过，我对此不予置评。你来说说你的看
Rog
了解。了
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Похоже, вы находитесь на вторичном маршруте. Мы хотели бы проехать по
Sigma Seven. Woomera Cap Com. Hast du gesagt, du würdest autom
حسنًا. هذا صحيح يا جيم. ما عليك سوى قص بطاقة التلقين، وهي قطعة ورق مقوى مناسبة الحجم، على بُعد بوصة ونصف تقريبًا من الحلقات. أي قص فتحات
And on the entry photography, if you are going to use a fresh magazine of color interior film, we recommend the following exposure settings: f11 at 1/250, six frames per second, focus on 7 feet for the fireball; f2.0, 1/60 of a second, six frames per second, focus on 50 feet when the chutes open. If you are using a magazine, p
了解しました。お忙しいとは存じ上げておりますので、ご迷惑をおかけすることはございません。進捗状況を確認しております。順調に進んでおり、システムもすべて順調です。
吉姆？你们俩目前状态都很好，心电图也一切正常。你们的饮水量也增加得不错，根据我上次的计算，你们俩的水分都补充得很充足，足以应对
ठीक है, जैक, और अभी हम जिस अजीब स्थिति में हैं, उसमें हैच लगा हुआ है,
Jerry, une autre caractéristique d'identification: ces petits cratères d'impact présentent des taches sombres au centre, là où il semble qu'ils se soient enfoncés
يجب أن تحرص على الميل في الاتجاه الذي ترغب بالذهاب إليه، وإلا ستكون في حالة
Ricevuto. Tutt
네, 빌, 여기까지는 동의합니다. 계속 
حسنًا. صفقة جيدة
Roger, Friendship Seven. Poursuivons avec les tensions des batte
好的。弗雷德，这张照片上我们看到的基本上只有隧道周围灯光照射出的亮点。舱门本身很
分かりました。ATTITUDE、スケール、5/5、選択1、ソース。ジョー、変更点だけ読んでください。私が
حسنًا يا جيم. في الصفحة 2-107، نوصيك بحذف ذلك والاكتفاء بالنهج نفسه. منصتك ممتازة، ولا نرى ضرورة لهذا التعديل. على أي حال، سيتم التطرق إليه مجددًا. وأيضًا، في الصفحة نفسها، نود حذف عبارة "بدء نقع المقصورة في البر
Quello che proverò a fare è inserire il
ठीक है। "क्रिसमस से एक रात पहले, अंतरिक्ष में बहुत दूर, अपोलो 8 के दल ने चंद्रमा की दौड़ जीत ली थी; हेडसेट कंसोल पर सावधानी से लटकाए गए थे, इस उम्मीद में कि क्रिस क्राफ्ट जल्द ही वहाँ होंगे; फ्रैंक बोरमैन अपने बिस्तर में आराम से लेटे हुए थे, जबकि उनके दिमाग में 'के सपने नाच रहे थे; और जिम लवेल, अपने सोफे पर, और एंडर्स, केबिन में, एक कंप्यूटर डिस्प्ले पर अपना दिमाग खपा रहे थे, तभी अचानक से ऐसी खड़खड़ाहट हुई कि फ्रैंक यह देखने के लिए अपने बिस्तर से उछल पड़े कि क्या हुआ है। वह बिजली की तरह सेक्स्टेंट की ओर भागे, यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि वे दुर्घटनाग्रस्त न हों। चंद्रमा की ऊबड़-खाबड़ सतह पर प्रकाश ने धूसर चंद्र धूल को हरे पनीर जैसी चमक दी, तभी उनकी आश्चर्यचकित आँखों के सामने क्या प्रकट हुआ, एक बर्मा 
Apollo 1
Понял. Это «Друж
了解。ニール、ミッションルールのNO 
Ade
Wally, how did it seem to track him with respect to stars on that reticl
أكرر، أنا أحب هذا النو
रॉजर। मुझे टी/एम नह
Roger. Wir sehen den Filter darüber. Apollo 8, hier ist Houston. Es sieht 
Это очень удивительно, такое удивительное отсутствие проникновения всех четырех подушечек лап. Я бы сказал, если бы мы попытались определить, насколько глубоко они проникли бы под поверхность, вы бы измерили, наверное, 3 дюйма, не так ли, 
Roger. Sobald diese Ü
Аполлон-8, это Хьюстон. 1, /: 462,
Sì, credo d
Punto dati Theta, 11,1 g
...Aber ich glaube, das liegt an dem 100-prozentigen Sauerstoff, den ich ständig aufgenommen habe. Ich vermute, dass meine Ohren und N
Okay
हे जिम, मेरे पास तीन बातें हैं। पहली बात, कंप्यूटर अब फिर से आपका है। दूसरी बात, बर्न होने तक आपको कोई फेरबदल करने की ज़रूरत नहीं होगी, इसलिए आप बस बर्न मोड में बैठे रह सकते हैं। और तीसरी बात, हम उस प्रक्रिया से बाहर निकलना चाहते हैं जिसमें हमने आपको अभी लिंक अपडेट करने के लिए
13, Houston. Tempo nominale del bracci
روجر. إذن
알겠습니다. 페이지 오른쪽 맨 위에 있는 "4초 동안 켜짐, 50프레임 속도 커버 렌즈"라는 줄을 지우세요. 그리고 그 오른쪽 아래에 있는 "잡지 비율"이라는 부분
了解しました。台風ベイブはまだ台湾沖にいます。6時頃になります。天気予報によると、新たに13時台に台風が来るそうです。もし写真があれば
Okay, there is SECO. The posigrade
Roger. Vous pourriez ajouter une petite note en bas de la page: « Remarque: – Ceci 
Okay. Da das direkte Sonnenlicht durch das Fenster derzeit außerhalb des Sichtfelds der Fernsehkamera liegt, möchten wir Sie bitten, die Blende um etwa eine Blendenstufe zu öffnen und, falls mögl
... خلال الس
और आ
你看到它朝我这边过
يا
ठीक है। हमें पता है कि कल रात प्राइमरी में आप 15 पर गए थे। हम आज 7.6 पर बदलना चाहते हैं। मुझे जाँच करने दीजिए कि हम तै
К
In answer to number 4, we got a pretty good look at the thermal shroud and the after taking the away, and from our viewpoint, the shroud was completely intact. I saw no loose particles 
そうだね。僕らがかっこよ
Flight 社では、
알겠습니다. 그리
روجر. عندما بدأنا، بدا كل شيء على ما يرام. الآن، بدأت الطائرة تنحرف بنمط غري
Хорошо. С 
We're not going to hack
50分でCATCH-UPに行きました。IVIは
मुझे खेद 
好的。我看看我理解得对不对。在49小时的时候，在光学系统归零之前，观察一下轴，同时调用16、91，看看轴和耳轴的角度，看看是否有抖动
Okay. Ich wollte Sie nur darauf hinweisen und Sie bitten, darüber nachzudenken und die möglichen Auswirkungen auf den Flugplan zu bedenken. Ich lasse Ihnen dann die Weitwinkelaufnahme und die Kommentare zum Mond vorab durchgehen und sehe, welche Abschnitte am besten geeignet erscheinen. Okay. Frank bat uns, die Reihenfolge der Eintrittsprofile auf der Bildrolle zu überprüfen. Das erste Profil ist mit „Nonexit Nummer 2“ beschriftet und stellt den Kurzstrecken-Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt dar. Das zweite Profil heißt „3500 Meilen“ und ist ebenfalls ein Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt, der jedoch für längere Eintrittsstrecken verwendet wird. Das dritte Profil ist „Nonexit Eintritt Nummer 1“, gefolgt von einem vierten, ebenfalls 3500 Meilen langen Eintrittsprofil. Es gibt also vier Eintrittsprofile. Die Nummern 1 und 3 sind die Kurzstrecken, die Nummern 2 und 4 die Langstreckeneintri
分かりました。はっきりと聞こえ
제
13, Houston. Prima di mettere al sicuro la TV, vorremmo sapere se era impostata al massimo zoom, sol
Ha! 
还有一份来自哥伦比亚号的机组人员状态报告。我估计自己睡了大约5个小时，不过你们可能比我更清楚
... Roger, Houston. Burn status report follows: DELTA-TIG zero; burn time, 17; angl
Frank, ce que nous voulons faire, c'est obtenir une poussée radiale ascendante; et tant que vous le pouvez, grâce aux optiques ou à un autre moyen d'observation par la fenêtre, déterminer la position de la Terre, puis utiliser les propu
ブルース、言っておきたいのですが、二次側、つまりウォーターセパレーターから二次側に行った時は、特に変化はありませんでした。しかし、15分か20分経つと水が出
Okay, 75 Fuß. Sieht gut aus; eine halbe. 6 vorwärts; Licht an. 6 – 60 Fuß runt
It's really a fantastic sight through that sextant. A minute ago, during that AUTO maneuver, the reticle swept across the Mediterranean. 
Bien reçu. Ce sera pour la révision 57, séquence n° 16, à 8 h 11 GMT. Lacet 12°, tangage 30°, caméra 16 mm. R
Yes, sir. We like - In case we don't get a manual ON - I mean, an AUTO ON, we're going to back up using the abort stage in the descent-engine command override at ignition plus 1 second. Bac
우리는 각자 평균 5시간 30분 정도 잠을 잤고, 수면의 질은 괜찮았다고 생각합
메인 A, 
Хорошо. Уровень АРУ упал до того уровня, который я называю уровнем шума, — это был уровень напряжения на АРУ, измеренный в момент возникновения шума (интегрированный). Это было примерно в положении «11 часов» на приборе, и казалось, что там происходит пер
Sono a metà della mia prima por
D'accord. Je cherchais la p
Lo so. Vogl
Aurora Seve
Okay. Apollo 13, Houston. Ich
こんにちは、ホーネット。こちらアポロ11号です。はっきりと聞こえています。
알겠습니다. 더 하실 말씀이 없으시면, 이분들이 좀 주무실 시간을 드리는 게 좋겠네요. 저는 여기서 잠
分かりました。ジム、1分半後にハンドオーバーが始まります。1時間後にSバンド送信機/受信機のスイッチをOFFに
Laden Sie die Datei mit
plus 35, / 63023, minus 162, plus 129, plus 00068, plus 00000, pl
Хорошо. Нам нужно нажать ENTER, 333 ENTER, а затем прочитать значение регистра 1. Мы ожидаем, что регистр 1 будет ра
मैं उन्हें कभी भी पूरी तरह से भर
«Аполлон
Posizion
Роджер. Я скопировал, и яйца морского ежа активировал
알겠습니다. 17 대 27, 117
はい。これは予備操縦のPCプラス2です。開始：;プラス0819.2、マイナス0020.0、マイナス0218.9;NA;プラス0020.9、0848.2;420、274、082;プラス
تبدو بعض هذه الحفر وكأنها فؤوس تضرب الخرسانة تاركة الك
Jim, potresti chiamare J
Non, le numéro 2 est manqua
好的。燃料电池 2 开路了。您需要我
Хорошо, в разделе AC BUS B: S-диапазонная антенна, открыта;, открыта. В разделе AC BUS A: магнитофон, открыт. Во втором ряду в разделе SYSTEM A: MAIN SOV. Начиная с Quad TCA; все четыре закрыты. В разделе CROSS - Commander Cross-Pointer, откры
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 재정렬 작업은 잘 진행되었습니다. 저는 육분의로 별을 찾아 정렬하는 데는 성공했지만, 스캐닝 망원경에서 레고르나 멘켄트 같은 별을 관측할 때는 그 별을 식별할 수 없었습니다. 처음 지구를 관측했을 때는 지평선이 매우 흐릿하게 보였습니다. 하지만 지구의 지평선과 대기 사이에는 뚜렷한 선이 있는 것처럼 보였습니다. 랜드마크 시선 필터를 사용하니 지평선이 더 선명해졌습니다. 우주와 대기 상층부 사이에는 매우 흐릿하고 불분명한 지평선이 있어서 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 앞서 말씀드렸듯이, 태양이 가까이 있을 때 달을 관측하면 달 주변이 어둡지 않고 밝은 파란색으로 보입니다. 태양이 광학계 근처에 있을 때 육분의로 정렬할 때도 마찬가지입니다. 하지만 저는 육분의에서 이러한 별들을 찾는 데는 어려움이 없습니다. 별과 지평선 측정을 하는 동안 시리우스, 프로키온, 카노푸스 같은 별들을 지구를 배경으로 찾는 데는 전혀 어려움이 없었습니다. 세 별 모두 지구를 배경으로 선명하게 보였습니다. 하지만 나비는 그다지 밝지 않아서 북쪽 별을 이용한 백업 정렬은 매우 어려울 것 같
मुझे नहीं लगता कि वहां नीचे ब
Okay. Und im Moment sieht es so aus, als ob... im Moment sieht es so aus, als ob das Kommandomodul 
ठीक है, फ्रेडो। हम स्टीयरेबल एंटीना का उपयोग करने की योजना नहीं बना रहे हैं, हालांकि हम हीटर चालू रखना चाहते हैं। इसलिए लगता है कि आपको COMM S-BAND ANTENNA खोलना चाहिए, लेकिन S-BAND ANTENNA HEATERS को बंद
التحكم بالمركبة الفضائية، CMC، تحق
ठीक है। यह सही है। फिर पैनल 275 पर वापस जाएं, CB MAIN B BAT BUS B को खोलें। अरे जैक, मुझे खेद है कि मैंने आपके लिए यही चरण छोड़ दिया था। मे
Okay. The one proposal that sounds like it if we let Jim do his evaluation through the telescope, you do everything exactly the same except you turn and roll over 180 degrees so that your head's up, and let Jim do his tracking through the telescope and you'll still be a yaw right when you go to pick up your TV and that type of thing. It looks like that probably will cover everything. We can do that or we can just go as is and just have to let some of that tracking evaluation go by. Another alternate would be to have Jim look
로저, 내가 3초 걸렸어. 내가
Земля здесь, наверху, де
휴스턴의 창문에 대해 말씀드리자면, 1번과 5번 창문에는 중간 정도의 흐릿함이 있습니다. 육안 관찰에는 문제가 없지만 사진 촬영에는 적합하지 않을 수 있습니다. 2번과 4번 창문은 깨끗합니다. 3번 창문은 거의 
Hornet. Roge
Roger. Standby, Will give status report. I am in orbit attitude for your tracking. Status report, follows: Fuses all number one except Tower Sep number two. Emergency Retrosequence, Emergency Retrojettison, and Emergency Drogue are in the center-off position, Squib is Armed. Auto Retrojettison is off. is normal, auto, gyro normal. All "T" handles are in the "in"-position. Retro Delay is normal. Cabin Lights are on both. Photo Lights are still on. Telemetry Low Frequency is on. Rescue Aids are on automatic. Ah, Jettison Tower, and Sep Capsule lights are out. The pressure regulator is still in the "in"-position. Lau
Вам, вероятно, интересны комментарии ваших жён. Нил, сказала Джен о вчерашних событиях: «Вечер был невероятно прекрасным. Для меня большая честь и привилегия разделить с моим мужем, экипажем, Центром пилотируемых космических аппаратов, американской общественностью и всем человечеством великолепный опыт начала исследования Луны». Затем её спросили, считает ли она высадку на Луну величайшим моментом в своей жизни. Она ответила: «Нет, это был день нашей свадьбы». А Майк, Пэт, просто сказала: «Это было фантастически чудесно». Базз, сказала Джоан, видимо
# 다음 두 줄은 편집상 뒤로 옮겨졌습니다. 
了解。Bの充電が十分終わったと思ったら、歌ってみ
रॉजर, 11. 31, एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 36691, माइनस 061, प्लस 066 137 22 3985, 
حسنًا، سأجرب ذلك باستخدام التلسكوب؛ وإذا لم 
W
Хорошо. Это всё ещё на 30-
Salu
Faccio davvero fatica a mantenere la posizione del m
أجل يا روجر، سأكون هناك خلال عشر أو خمس عشرة د
Stehen z
Son
روجر، هذا صحيح. مفتاح سخان الأكسجين في 
Роджер. У нас есть просьба к Джиму: чтобы он делал свои отметки, свои пять отметок, немного медленнее. Если возможно, мы хотели бы, чтобы пара из них проходила за зенит. Пять отметок мы делаем с довольно быстрым интервалом, и с точки зрения геометрии было бы лучше, если бы вы н
Okay, sounds good. Because I don't know where I - how far I lost you. Okay, panel 4; TELCOMM, GROUP 1, to AC1. On panel 5, close the following , PRESSURE GROUP 1, MAIN B; , PRESSURE GROUP 2, MAIN B;, TEMP, MAIN B; , SECONDARY LOOP TRANSDUCER, MAIN B; RAD, CONTROL/HEATERS, MAIN B; BAT RELAY BUS, BAT B; BAT CHARGER, BAT B; INVERTER CONTROL, 2; INVERTER CONTROL, 1; SENSOR SIGNAL, AC1; SENSOR SIGNAL, MAIN B; SENSOR UNIT, AC1; WASTE/POT
Roger. Und ich habe noch ein paar andere Dinge, Mike. Wir müssen jetzt den Ladevorgang von Batterie B beenden. Außerdem zieht das Wetter an unserem Ziellandepunkt wegen 
Decisamente sotto di me. L'avevo seguito sotto di me da Carnarvon in poi. Fino a Carnarvon l'avevamo tenuto sotto di noi, poi fino all'orizzonte, e poi di nuovo sotto di noi. Sembrava quasi che fosse in un'orbita diversa dalla mia. Aveva un apogeo e un perigeo diversi dai miei. Comunque, ho tentato di avvicinarmi all'alba non appena ho potuto capire dove si trovava. Come ho detto, in quel momento era a un miglio o due davanti a me, sotto di me. Quindi, più cercavo di avvicinarmi, meno guadagnavo terreno. Stavo sparando retrogrado. Stavo usando i miei propulsori superiori per sparare in modo da ridurre la mia velocità totale, e poi sparavo... contemporaneamente. Non ho mai veramente avvicinato, e continuava ad allontanarsi da me. Mi è diventato ovvio che quando siamo arrivati ​​alle Hawaii, avvicinarmi al booster in tempo per fare l'EVA con il booster avrebbe probabilmente consumato tutto il carburante che avevamo a bordo. Come regola generale avevamo concordato di non farlo. Così ho contattato il CAP COM e abbiamo deciso di non procedere con la parte della missione con il booster. Non so se l'ho detto, ma quando ci siamo staccati dal booster, sembrava che le nostre velocità di lancio fossero basse, nell'ordine di mezzo grado al secondo in beccheggio e imbardata. Ho cercato di smorzarle. Ho sparato un impulso in ogni direzione, poi mi sono concentrato sul distacco dal booster. Ci siamo staccati, e ci siamo staccati nello stesso modo in cui avevamo generato altre velocità. Alla fine ci siamo raddrizzati e ci siamo invertiti. Probabilmente circa un minuto e mezzo o due. Sembrava che il problema più grande fosse il tempo che avevo impiegato per allineare la piattaforma prima di entrare nel lato oscuro. Probabilmente eravamo arrivati ​​proprio sopra il booster all'istante. Se avessi ignorato la piattaforma, saremmo stati in grado di procedere e completarla. D'altro canto, volevo essere sicuro che avessimo un allineamento ragionevolmente buono prima di arrivare al nostro punto 2-1 GO-NO GO nel caso in cui q
I don't know. I wonder if they tried that in the simulator. I can't seem to get roll to go up. It goes down on me, no matt
Columbia, Houston. Ho sentito che hai parlato con Eagle? Immagino che ora tu a
Très bien. Sous « vérifications », la quatrième ligne indique « ATTITUDE MANUELLE, trois, à IMPULSION MINIMALE ». Nous de
Bene. Per quanto riguarda la prima TV, stiamo perdendo l'antenna ad alto guadagno, e sembra che l'unico modo per ottenere il pass per la prima TV fosse inviarlo a un sito remoto e analizzarlo lì. Quindi accantoneremo l'idea e riprenderemo con la TV programmata. I controlli COMM rimanenti sono del tipo dipendente dall'alto guadagno, e l
हैलो ह्यूस्टन, हैलो ह्यूस्टन, जेमिनी
我不知道……我差点就崩溃了。我当时想着干脆就顺着他们的意思……涂了点药
شكرًا جزيلًا. ل
...이것
Roger, on Rev 12 RKV will update your PLA and CLA time; Rev 13 Canary Islands will have a C-band track. And also there will be astro-orbital nav check-run. No propellant usage for ATTITUDE control. This is a g.e.t, of... or a G.m.t. time of 12 hours 16 minutes 00 second
L'horizon se présente comme une bande très orangée. Au coucher du soleil, s'étendant loin de part et d'autre, à environ 45° de chaque côté, il vire au jaune cla
No, non ho visto la messa in scena. C'era troppa
Aquarius, Houston. Nous constatons que la pression d'O2 dans la bouteille ASCENT O2 est légèrement élevée; nous allons donc en utiliser une partie. Fermez donc DESCENT O2 et ouvre
Je suis d'accord. Je pense que pour la rentrée atmosphérique, nous n'avons pas b
ما سأفعله - دعني أكرر - حسنًا. دعني أكرر كل شيء لك. صمام ضغط العبوة، مُغلق؛ ضغط مقصورة الطوارئ، مُغلق؛ الأكسجين المباشر، مُغلق؛ منظمي الطلب، مُغلقان؛ مُجمّعا الماء، مُجمّعا الماء والجليكول، مُغلقان؛ المنظمان الرئيسيان A وB، مفتوحان؛ مدخل ومخرج خزان الماء والجليكول، مفتوحان؛ بالنسبة للماء، اضغط خزان التمدد مؤقتًا
D'accord. C'est le dernier point que j'ai omis. En attenda
这里
Die verstrichene Zeit des Blutexperiments betr
ठीक है। चेकलिस्ट पढ़ने के बाद कुछ सवाल उठ रहे हैं। मेरी समझ से, प्राथमिक और द्वितीयक दोनों वॉटर बॉयलर चालू होने चाहिए, लेकिन चेकलिस्ट में कहीं भी यह नहीं लिखा है कि इन्हें चालू किया गया है। इसलिए हम इसकी पुष्टि चाहते हैं, और यह सुनिश्चित करेंगे कि चेकलिस्ट में डालने के लिए हमारे पास सभी आवश्यक स्विचिंग 
我想就
그녀는 이제
Bene. Ho una piccola notizia da darti, se vuoi. PAO mi ha appena consegn
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Когда у вас будет свободная минута, не могли бы вы предоставить нам бортовые показания бака N2 «Браво», пожалуйста? И мы хот
슈퍼크릿 탱크는 예상대로 193
仅供参考，我们在寄存器 1 中看到 3.0。我们从焊盘上读出的数据是 3.1。实际的 DELTA-V 是 3.05，他们之前就提醒过我可能
Roger, più 
What did you get out 
Les oreilles se
يبدو هذا رائعًا، أفهم الآن سبب إعجابك أنت وسكوت به. أنا أمارس خدعة الآن. أنظر إلى الولايات المتحدة وأبدأ بالارتفاع قليلًا مع هذا الانجراف. وأرى القمر، وأنا متأكد من أن لا أحد في الولايات المتحدة يستطيع رؤيته بوضو
تما
わかった。姿勢をきちんと整えるのに少し時間がかかった。MITフィルムであと3枚撮っておく。2枚目、3枚目
It's in R
Вы нас видите, Интреп
بدأ صوتك بالتلاشي بشكل مل
जिम, बैकग्राउंड के शोर के कारण मैं
Jim vorrebbe sapere se l'acqua di discesa sarà buona fino al momento dello s
F5.6। ये आखिरी चार तस्वीरें
In dieser Fluglage hat man definitiv den Eindruck, weit nach oben zu blicken, und wenn kein Horizont zu sehen 
Poi vorremmo che posizionaste la macchina fotografica contro il finestrino in modo che... e la teneste in modo che il muso non sia nel campo visivo. Poi vorremmo due serie di fotografie. Vogliamo che siate in modalità Impulso e che la navicella spaziale sia puntata direttamente verso la Terra. Questa sarà... vi darò il tempo di avviarla. Ma sarà rivolta alla Terra Nera sul lato notturno. E poi date un impulso in su... un impulso in su e otte
左侧窗外是一片相对平坦的平原，上面布满了数量相当多的陨石坑，大小在5到50英尺之间。此外还有一些小山脊，我估计大约20到30英尺高。周围还有成千上万个1到2英尺大小的小陨石坑。在我们前方几百英尺处，可以看到一些棱角分明的石块，大概有2英尺大，边缘也呈锯齿状。远处有一座小山，几乎
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven. This is Guaymas Cap Com. 
休斯顿，鹰。你是在复制VE
In compartment A1, the 16 millimeter magazine will be located in window number 4 instead of 5. Tissue dispensers; there is only one of them left. And compartment U3, the 16 millimeter bracket is on window 4, and the bag - add the CMP's, plus add two LCG's. And compartment A8 delete two LCG's, add one PPK, making a total of four, and add 10 pounds of miscellaneous equipment. We 
罗杰。您的散热器现在处于“流水”模式。请稍候。C波段已关闭……
ちょっと面白い、ちょっと嬉しいニュースがあります。ミシガン州アナーバーに、新しい若者ギャングが誕生したそうです。ギルネット・ギャングという名前で、アナーバーの街を徘徊し、秘密裏に活動し、時には法の網をかいくぐっています。彼らは自らを「善のためのゲリラ」と名乗っています。彼らの活動の一つに、卑猥な言葉で埋め尽くされた橋をペンキで塗ったことがありました。ある夜、彼らはそれをペンキで塗りつぶしたのです。近所の子供たちに人気があるものの危険な廃屋は板で
C'est exact, Jim. C'est celui qu'on t'a donné hier soir après le gros test, et on va l'utiliser avec quelques modifications. On l'a testé dans le simulateur et, bien sûr, sans ballottement ni rien de ce genre, mais ça a plutôt bien fonctionné en annulant les vitesses de tangage et d
Roger, Steelhead. Friendship Seven. 
Vance, you might be interested - the way we're - the way we got this thing arranged, we have one helmet attached to the COMM lin
Дружба Семь, Дружба Семь. Это Вумера Кэп Ком, слы
Sopra? Non ci h
了解。もし興味があれ
ठीक है। ईंधन की खपत को ध्यान में रखते हुए, हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप ATT HOLD मोड के बजाय उसी मोड पर वापस चले जाएं जिसमें आ
Roger... sopra l'area dell'uragano o del tifone... proprio sopra Carla e... quali erano. Credo di aver scattato delle belle foto con la Hasselblad
Roger. Voici le compte rendu du panneau: les fusibles du panneau de gauche sont tous dans la position indiquée précédemment. Le propulseur d'appoint est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le sélecteur de mode est en mode normal (auto) et le gyroscope est en mode normal. Toutes les poignées en « T » sont enfoncées. Le délai de rétrogradat
Нет, Чарли. Просто... у меня нет такого разрешения. Но чтобы дать тебе представление, я могу... на южном побережье Техаса я вижу... зная, что ищу, я вижу остров Падре. Я едва различаю, что там узкая полоска земли, а затем небольша
わか
わかりました。続きは、同じパネル、パネル5です。回路ブレーカー「バッテリーチャージャー、AC電源」を「閉」、回路ブレーカー「バッテリーチャージャー、バッテリーA充電」を「閉」、回路ブレーカー「インバーター制御2」を「閉」、回路ブレーカー「インバーター制御3」を「閉」。スイッチは「メインバスタイ、バッテリーA/C」を「オフ」、そしてもう一つ「バッテリ
现在如何通过 DOWN VOICE BACKUP 来解读水瓶
... جاك... مهلا
好的。通风窗畅通无阻。请从发动机盖上取下 LEVA 装置。确认电
قم بتشغيل خاصية
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, Houston. Sag es noch
Roger, ho osservato strati di foschia, ma non quelli separati dall'orizzonte che ci aspettavamo e che John ha segnalato. La prossima volta terrò gli occhi aperti e cercherò di vederli 
わかりました
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. OMN
就在刚才，我们经历了一次险情——宇航服断开阀脱落了
वैसे तो हमने अभी तक चंद्
ここは良さそうです
Да. Примерно так. Резкого изменения силы сопротивления не было. А ещё я заметил, когда снял кусочек, что материал был довольно плотно упакован, значительно темнее, и то, как он прилип к основной трубке,
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous ne parvenons toujours pas à vous capter avec l'antenne à gain élevé. Veuillez passer en mode MANUEL et sélectionner une large ouverture de faisceau. Les angles de tangage et de lacet indiqués dans votre liste de vér
Второй момент, конечно же, заключается в том, что когда вы отключаете пассивный терморегулирование, вы находитесь примерно под углом 90 градусов к линии Земли, поэтому при п
Not in 
حسنًا. هذا مسار بيريسنثيان زائد 2 لعودة سريعة. سيكون هذا / 62871، ناقص 161، زائد 129، زائد 45224، ناقص 06216، ناقص 18712 001 287 351، ألفا نوفمبر زائد 00187 49336 603 49118 112 03
Apollo 8, pouvez-vous patienter? Nous allons essa
下面有树和森林；看起来像是有树和森林之类的。看起来像雪和树。太棒了。我完全不知道我们朝哪个方向飞，也不知道我们往哪个方向走，什么都不知道，但这里是个美丽的低
11, Houston. Vorremmo provare a correlare il flusso di O2 nel trasduttore con la valvola di flusso che hai aperto. Quanto... Quanto diresti di avere aperto il REPRESS O2? Passo. Correzione, i
埃德开始拆卸东西，当我们到达无法再操作助推器的位置时，我便全心全意地帮他——至少帮忙拿着东西，把它们收好，尽量不让它们丢失。我们干得越快，进度就越落后。倒不是因为我们没按规矩来，只是比我们预想的要花更多时间。在零重力环境下操作其实并不比在模拟器里容易多少，甚至可能差不多。所以我们只能绕着轨道转一圈。到了卡那封轨道时，我已经认定我们无法完成任务，但我还是想再坚持一下。当我们到达卡那封轨道——或者说就在我们离开卡那封轨道之前——我清楚地意识到我们无法完成减压。我请求跳到下一个轨道。然后……我们喘了大约20分钟，试图整理我散落在驾驶舱里的杂物。然后我拿出检查清单，我们又仔细地核对了一遍，确保匆忙中没有遗漏任何步骤。舱外活动开始——在卡那封上空收到了启动指令。一切准备就绪，我们等待着开始减压的指令。指令到位了。我们完成了减压循环。离开卡那封时，我们获准进行完整的舱外活动。我们到达坎顿或夏威夷，当时——我记得是坎顿或夏威夷——收到了正式的舱外活动指令，可以离开飞船并开始舱外活动。我们按照之前录音机和语音通讯设备记录的指示完成了这些操作。我们继续前进，埃德出来了，我们开始拍照——就像我们通常那样……一开始我帮他固定住了飞船。后来他出来后，飞船似乎在空中漂浮，我无法追踪他的位置——起初，我们决定让它漂流。这
Die Kabine ist bereit, ich möchte die Kuppel ni
そうですね、エリア25-3
Roger, Houston. Je vous a
전에
«Аполлон-1
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous sommes vraiment impressionnés par la netteté et le niveau de détail de l'image. Les couleurs sont… c'est vraiment une excellente image, maintenant que je la regarde sur notre moniteur, environ 12 secondes avant sa diffusion par les chaînes de télévision, en raison de 
Bene, c'è stata una pi
एड, ये ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है। मैं आपकी बात नहीं समझ पा रहा/रही हूँ - मुझे कुछ समझ नह
Houston, rapporto sullo stato dell'equipaggio. Radiazioni: CDR 11017, CMP 10019, LMP 09020.
加22
ジェミニ4号、ヒューストン。機材を
环顾四周，整体对比度***完全是由太阳的阴影造成的***……非常浅的灰色，浅灰色，我的影子周围有一圈光晕，头盔的影子周围也有一圈光晕。然后，当我看向远处***时，对比度变得更加强烈，因为周围的颜色仍然相当浅。当你向下看向太阳**
Джо, фокусировка достаточно хорошая, ч
見てみましょう。国内ニュースでは、新婚のデビッド・アイゼンハワーとジュリー・アイゼンハワー夫妻が秘密のハネムーンの隠れ家を出て、ニクソン次期大統領とその家族とクリスマスディナーを共にしました。ニューヨーク市では、世界で最も忙しい港がクリスマス当日、ほぼ完全に活動を停止しました。5日間続いた港湾労働者のストライキと、船舶の運航スケジュールの異例の中断が原因です。港への入港も出港もあり
ヒューストン、トランキリティ。この問題を調査し、ミッションイベントの時間、
Мне бы хотелось узнать ваше мнение о вашем положител
Beh, non è stata una mia dec
The dome now i
Bien, 11. Ici Houston. À environ 22 h 30 dans le plan de vol, dans votre checklist post-sommeil et dans toutes les autres checklists post-sommeil, veuillez
Okay. As I read you we get the gray tape and fold it so that we get - the back sticks around the outside of the canisters, then we mount to that four sides of our... cards like our... cards; then we overlap those cards down around the base of the canister. Then we - then we... over the... at the top.... Then we take the towel from the old ones and put them in the 
D'accord, chef. On se voit là-bas. C'était un très
سيك
알
네
هل يمكنك إعادة هذه الأشياء إلى جانبك
— Для коррекции крена с целью получения высокого коэффициента усиления мы продолжаем выполнять вращение вокруг своей оси, чтобы в данный момент получить правильное положение для высокого коэффициента усиления. Мы отменим маневр по тангажу, запланированный после проверки ТВ-камеры, поскольку у нас уже ест
Сейчас мне кажется, что он действител
Okay, Jack, ora sto guardando fuori dalla finestra giusta, e non troppo lontano, puoi vedere l'obiettivo, e lo ingrandirò un po' per vedere se lo
That'
١٣، هيوستن. نود منك التح
ヒューストン、窓の外を見ています
Okay. Das ist erledi
太陽が再び視界の真ん中にきました... これが日没時の太陽の位置なので、おおよそこれが適切なヨ
حسنًا. الخطوات التالية، من الثانية إلى الثامنة، متشابهة، ثم نريد إيقاف تشغيل ناقل الوقو
Roger. Okay. Capi
سينقلونك بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى س
ठीक 
MESA
Roger. Wir gehen davon aus, dass wir die Stromver
Okay, sehr gut. Ich glaube, ich liefere Ihnen jedes dritte oder vierte Ma
हाँ, मैं वहीं देख रहा था। रोशनी ऐसी थी कि वह मुझे वहाँ दिखाई दिया। मुझे उसकी याद तब आई जब मैं अभी खिड़की से बाहर देख रहा था और मुझे नए तारों का वह समूह दिखाई दे रहा 
Et un compte rendu de l'équipage de Columbia. J'estime avoir bien dormi environ 5 heures, mais vous en savez sans doute plus q
そうです、ジム。宇宙船の光学機器がある奥の方、あるいはその隅で何をしているのか教えていただけると嬉しいです。これから数分間で、照準についてどのよう
रॉजर। समझ गया। फ्रैंक, हमें इस बर्न
Okay, ora, Neil, quando sent
और हम आपको दिखा रहे हैं कि आपके पास लगभग 68 प्रतिशत ऑटोमेटिक और 84 प्रतिशत मैनुअल ईंधन बचा है। मुझे लगता है कि हमारी रीडिं
Roger. Mise à jour DELTA-H comme suit:,, ENTRÉE 1354, ENTRÉE zéro, ENTRÉE 214 50 ENTRÉE. Comprenez qu’il s’agit de deux nom
收到。
मैंने कई बार धूप से छाया में जाते समय देखा है कि जैसे ही मैं अंदर जाता हूँ, मेरे चेहरे के प्रतिबिंब के साथ-साथ विज़र पर भी एक अतिरिक्त प्रतिबिंब पड़ता है, जिससे धूप से छाया में जाने के संक्रमण के दौरान दृश्यता बहुत खराब हो जाती है। मेरे विज़र पर इतनी चकाचौंध होती है कि हेलमेट पर छाया पड़ जाती है। फिर मेरी आँखों को प्रकाश की स्थिति के अनुकूल होने में थोड़ा समय लगता है। छाया क्षेत्र के अंदर, जैसा कि हमने पहले कहा, दृ
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. الآن، هذا يعي
지금 잠망경으로 일출이 보이기 시작합니다. 야간 쪽 때문에 이번 궤도에서 잠망경으로 들어오는 첫 번째 빛입니다. 야간 쪽에서는 역행 자세에서 잠망경이 전혀 작동하지 않는다는 것이 분명합니다. 제가 처음으로 빛을 받는 것은 바로 지금입니다. 일출이 잠망경을 통해 꽤 빠르게 들어오고 있습니다. 존이 언급했던 빛나는 물체들이 보이고, 그것들을 떼어내면 몇 개는 만들어낼 수도 있습니다. 분명히 그것들이 무리를 이루고 있고, 크기가 작은 것부터 밝은 것까지 다양하다는 느낌이 듭니다. 잠망경 자체가 제 눈을 부시게 합니다. 창밖을 볼 수 있도록 차트를 잠망경에 붙여야겠습니다. 언제든 역행할 수 있는 상태이므로, 이 창밖을 보는 것 외에는 할 일이 없습니다. 우주복 회로가 정상적이라는 가정하에 말입니다. 그 차트는 그 망할 잠망경을 가리는 데 큰 도움이 됩니다. 이 물체들이 꽤 넓게 퍼져 있습니다. 스코티가 말한 대로 해치에서 그것들을 떼어낼 수 있다는 것이 확실히 확인되었습니다. 그리고 그것들은 분명히 캡슐에서 멀어져 가고 있는데, 당신과는 다른 속도로 가고 있다는 것을 판단하는 데에는 아무런 
Хорошо, Джим. Ваши расце
هل رأيت 
11号，休斯顿
Okay. 5 C
알겠습니다. 첫 번째로 비행 계획을 보니 CDR은 이제 잠자리에 들어야 할 것 같습니다. 두 번째로, 연소 과정 요약입니다. 모든 시스템이 정상적으로 작동하는 것 같습니다. 궤적을 보니 69.67마일의 모드와 근일점 통과 시간으로 CPA가 설정되어 있습니다. 자유 
D'accord. POST-ATTERRISSAGE et ÉVENT POST-ATTERR
友情セブン。衝撃
मेरे पास एरिया 17-1 क
双子座4号，休斯顿。我们希望你们
Friendship Seven, ici Canton Cap Com. Pourriez-vous répéter, s'il vo
로저, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 여기는 잔지바르 캡 콤입니다. 30분 보고를 계속해 
Хорошо. Под надписью «НАЖМИТЕ» мы вычеркнем первую строку и напишем «РЕГУЛИРОВКА ГЕЛИЯ ПРИ СНИ
انهض مجد
Veuillez noter que les relevés MDI confirment le bon fonctionnement de votre 
Okay. Von hier aus sehen sie alle ziemlich g
Die Sprachaufzeichnungen des Überflugs in Tananarive während dieses Zeitra
جيم، بخصوص مشكلة البطارية، تأكدنا أنها ليست بسبب زيادة التيار أو عكس اتجاهه. نشك في أنها بسبب ارتفاع درجة الحرارة، لكننا لسنا متأكدين 
ठीक है, तापम
On di
I was in Computer Switch ON and A
Роджер, Чарли. Хочу проинформировать вас о текущем состоянии хлорирования. В отсеке B4 у нас есть один, два, три, четыре, пять, шесть, семь — точнее, восемь отсеков для ампул с хлором и буферным раствором
Vedo una stella luminosa lassù, dev'essere Venere. Ho dimenticato di memorizzare le immagini di John Mayer dalla finestra abbas
Ok, grazie. Questa è una 
チャーリー、アポロ11号。停止についていくつか質問があります。一番簡単な方法は、ヨー角0度、ピッチ角90度まで接近しているので、ロール角約260度で停止させるだけだと思います。それから、マニュアル姿勢制御、レートコマンド3、そしてデッドバンドが既に崩壊しているのでパネル8のスラスタをオンに
알겠습니다. 5번 패널의 CB 센서 신호 MAIN A와 MAIN B가
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Ricevuto. 1 /, 62844, meno 161, più 129. Ricevu
I'll look around, Jack. I was just trying to get a check on the Moon, again, to see if those angles were indeed true, and 
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。排気を停止してほしいときなどに情報をいただけ
回路ブレーカー - ピッ
Roger. Abbiamo me
في الوقت الحالي، لا يبدو أن هناك طريقة لنا للعثور على أي ن
Prévoyez également une caméra 16 mm pour filmer à l'intérieur du vaisseau. Nous avons un grand œil d'insecte et nous pensions prendre quelques photos de l'intérieur s'il nous restait un 
جيميني 4، هاواي C
Bon, donnez-moi simplement une estimation aussi préci
Il BRACCIO MOTORE si apre e immagino ch
Roger. Same o
你好，Canary Com Tech，我是Sigma Seven。我完全明白你的意思。
Roger. À 74 h 30, nous vous demandons de mettre en marche les ventilateurs des quatre cuves cryogéniques et de régler les résistances chauffantes des qua
रॉजर। आपके सिस्टम अभी भी ठीक लग रहे हैं। मेरे पास आपके लिए 10 रेट्रो अपडेट हैं। जब आप कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हों, तो मुझे ब
समझ लीजिए कि आप तैयार हैं। एरिया 9-ब्रावो। यानी GET RC, 13:19:36; 400K 20 प्लस 25 है; रिवर्स बैंक 26 प्लस 13 है; इन सभी अपडेट्स के लिए ये सभी बैंक कोण 90 डिग्री होंगे: GET RC, 14:17:05; 400K, 20 प्लस 32; रिवर्स बैंक, 25 प्लस 54। 11-2: GET RC, 52:02; 400K, 20 प्लस 11; रिवर्स बैंक, 25 प्लस 40। 12-2 GET RC, 17:25:40; 400K, 20 प्लस 03; रिवर्स बैंक, 25 प्लस 35; एरिया 13-2: GET RC, 19:01:21; 400K 19 प्लस 58 है; रिवर्स बै
네. 이제 이 방법이 효과가 없을 경우를 대비해 추가적인 지침을 드리겠습니다. ALC(알루미늄계 반사경)에 대해 말씀드리자면, 20초 동안 방해받지 않고 기다려야 합니다. ALC가 제대로 작동하려면 20초 동안 아무런 방해도 받지 않아야 합니다. 만약 제가 알려드린 절차가 효과가 없다면, 다른 필터와 다양한 조합을 사용하는 추가 방법을 알려드리겠습니다. 편광 필터와 빨간색 및 파란색 필터 홀더를 준비해 주세요. 이 방법이 효과가 
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich verstehe Sie, Indian Com Tech. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich fahre momentan im manue
정말 대단하네요. 전혀 떨어지지 않
Okay, Jack. Geh zurück zur Batterieladeprozedur, die ich dir gegeben habe. Um den Ladevorgang zu beenden, musst du einfach „Offen“ oder „Aus“ neben den entsprechenden Schalter schreiben. Also, auf Panel 250 hast du den Sicherungsautomaten bereits geöffnet; auf Panel 275 ist INVERTER POWER-2 MAIN B geöffnet; auf Panel 5 sind BAT RELAY BUS BAT A geöffnet; SENSOR UNIT AC BUS 2 geöffnet; SENSOR SIGNAL AC2 geöffnet;
はい。高ビットレー
Roger. Freundschaft Sieben. Treibstoff 64-54 [Prozent]
Okay. E puoi anche dimenticare il "Follow-up". Okay, a pagina 17, esegui tutti gli inserimenti e a 4 minuti, abbiamo una modifica. Prima riga, CB(16) INVERTER 3, CHIUDI; riga 2, cancella "Seleziona INVERTER 1". A - proseguendo nella pagina, dopo "MONITORAGGIO ATTEGGIAMENTO", vorremmo che impostassi la SCALA DELLA VELOCITÀ su "25 gradi al secondo". Okay, proseguendo per altre quattro righe fino a "COPPIA DI BILANCIAMENTO", vorremmo disattivare "COPPIA DI BI
Roger. Wir sehen den Erdmittelpunkt, aufgenommen von der Raumsonde im östlichen Pazifik. Die Hawaii-Inselkette konnten wir bisher nicht erkennen, aber die Westküste Nordamerikas ist deutlich zu sehen: die Vereinigten Staaten, das San Joaquin Valley, die Sierra Nevada, Baja California und Mexiko bis hinunter nach Acapulco sowie die Halbinsel Yucatán. Man kann weiter durch Mittelamerika bis zur Nordküste Südamerikas, Venezuela und Kolumbien sehen. 
Ja, Sir. Falls wir kein manuelles Einschalten – ich meine, kein automatisches Einschalten – erreichen, gehen wir zurück und verwenden die Abbruchphase der Triebwerkssteuerungsüberschreibung bei Zündung plus 1 Sekunde. Auf Seite 17, bei minus 4 Minuten, steht „CB(11) INVERTER 2“, e
네, 아시다시피 우리가 그 시간에 가지 않은 건 정말 영리한 전략
Hey, frag doch mal meine Chinchwanzen, wie es ihne
Gemini VI, Houston. Resteremo a dispo
Roger. Non useremo il teleobiettivo. Non credo che riusciremo a fotografare la Terra. Dovremo usare il terminatore, l
Пойду слушать запись VOX. Смотрю на окно, залитое солнечным светом. Это определенно дымчатый узор с полосами света. На нем пыль — часть имеет розовый, какой-то ро
Wait a secon
حسنًا. لقد خفضنا مستو
Ok. Sappiate che lascerò andare il booster e non l
ज
当你准备好复制时，我这里有你
Oui. Les coordonnées de latitude et de longitude 2 799 et 11 730 sont celles que j'ai utilisées. Mais ce qui m'intéresse, ce sont les coor
أنت لست مرتبكاً بشأن أي طرف ترسو، أليس
Roger. Just some interesting things on the - just done a NAV with the moon; the sun is currently right in the way. I managed to get one set on Antares and was working on the second set, and the rim of the moon just disappeared completely. The view through the sextant is a milky white, whether you're looking at black sky or the moon. The tint of the moon i
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。收到。我们语音通话清晰，电视画面也
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8. 1 युद्धाभ्यास: / 63295 माइनस 163 प्लस 129 प्लस 00136 माइनस 00045 प्लस 00202 345 188 343 सभी 9 प्लस 01685 000248 002 00186 23 2013 164 012, ऊपर 27-6, बाएँ 04 नवंबर शेष के लिए अल्फ़ा। उत्तर सेट तारे, रोल 068, पिच 097, यॉ 
면도 크림이 어디 있는지 아
आपके समय में कोई बदलाव 
我现在可以看到宽阔的蓝色地平线带。此时（时间：02:07:00），它看起来大约有太阳下方的直径。它的厚度似乎也与太阳的直径相同。向北和向南，它变得不太明显
صح
Да
... tourner vers - retourne
ठीक है। तो ठीक है। अगर - मतलब, इसे तुरंत करना ज़रूरी नहीं है, लेकिन अगर आप तब उठकर इसे कर लेते हैं, तो कोई
Apollo 8, Houston. Dies sollte eine
هذا صحيح يا جيم، وإذا لم ينجح أيٌّ من Antares أو Peacock، فسنكتفي بـ Atria و Alta
Merci, Monsieur le Président. C'est un grand honneur et un privilège pour nous d'être ici, représentant non seulement les États-Unis, mais aussi les hommes de paix de toutes les nations, et animés d'intérêt, de curiosité et d'une vision pour l'avenir. C'est un honneur pour n
Roger. S-6 è una formazi
स्थिति 6, परीक्षण के लिए पूर्ण
太阳本身似乎不会对窗户产生任何影响，但是太阳光线入射角度的不同会改变雾气造
Sie
OK, et j
タンク2にO2ファンを
ये है दोस्ती की सातवीं कड़ी। 
了解しました。だからこそ、最優先の案件をここに入れているんです。そちらの方が、通る可能性がずっと高いと
Franchement, j'ai du mal à le dire en regar
好的，休斯
わかりました。塩素を入れて水
罗杰。NA，NA，NA，加 1350，减 
Roger, Joe. Nous attendons ces d
كل شيء عل
Nous avons encore des nouvelles, mais nous vous recommandons fortement, à toi et à Jack, de dormir autant que 
D'accord. Réglez la bande S et l'amplificateur de puissance sur ÉLEV
Поездка была очень спокойной, лишь небольшое медленное покачи
Это нас под
Bene. Stiamo a
Columbia, ici Houston. Mike, nous ne voulons pas que vous transmettiez. Nous voulons simplement que vous restiez dans cette position au cas où vous souhaiteriez p
Ok. Sono stato interrotto per un minuto. Bob Hope è di nuovo in Vietnam con le sue truppe, e come al solito sta facendo un ottimo lavoro. Un piccolo nome nella notizia qui è della USS New Jersey. Bob Hope ha scherzato ieri – o mercoledì – dall'alto di un'enorme torretta per deliziare i 1500 uomini a bordo della corazzata New Jersey, in occasione del suo ventesimo Natale, intrattenendo le truppe statunitensi all'estero. Hope e i suoi 27 uomini hanno intrattenuto i marinai del New Jersey dopo aver partecipato a una messa di Natale a bordo della portaerei Hancock, entrambe al largo del Vietnam. "Questo dev'essere il Cris Craft più grande del mondo", ha detto Hope ai marinai. "Sembra Wake Island con un timone". "Penso che siano stati gentili a tirar fuori la nave dalla naftalina solo per salutarmi con 21 colpi di cannone", ha detto. Hope ha scherzato mentre era in
Klingt gut. Okay. Wir haben mit dem Modell eine Übung zu den Vorbereitungen vor der Einreise durchgeführt und dabei festgestellt, dass auf der Checkliste des LMP auf Seite S-12 beim Befüllen der Druckflaschen ein Druckfehler vorliegt; dort sollte „Füllventil“ statt „Druckventil“ stehen, und wir sollten die Position „FÜLLEN“ anstat
准备好
네, 하세요. 11번, 여기요
在 0 到 
查理，我们这儿还有些工作要做。我们要确保所有东西都搬过来，按我们想要的方式存放好，争取比明天的计划提前一些。如果需要的话，我想我们大概半小时左右
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호
Вперед, продол
That's affirm. I'm going to first of all just quickly run through the times of the major events, and then we'll go back and fill in some of the details. Okay. Entry interface is at 142 hours 40 minutes; 6-1/2 hours, roughly prior to that or at about, we'll start this whole thing going by applying HEATER POWER, by checking the CM/ temperatures and preheating the CM/ if required, and we suspect we'll probably want to do that. We'll have detailed procedures up for it later. At about 6 hours prior to or about, we will commence powering up the, powering up the, using the modified / 30-minute checklist, which you have used for the previous midcourse. Then shortly, just before 5 hours, prior to or at about, we'll want you in the attitude for a body axis alinement, using the Earth terminator like we did before; and as soon as we have that, we'll perform -7, which looks like, now, about a 2-foot-per-second burn or about 15 seconds of. And I'm told that it's down to 1-1/2 now, so it's comfortably within the margin. Okay. When we do that, we'll immediately start the maneuver to the service module jettison attitude, which will be in plane since we're jettisoning it earlier than we usually do. We don't need, and don't want, the out-of-plane component. So it'll be in plane with the service module pointed back out along the radius vector. We will then commence to get the command module ready for service module SEP, including command module checkout and hot fire, and at approximately 4 hours and 30 minutes prior to or, we'll jettison the service module. We'll pitch the up until we aquire the service module in the... and try and get some photographs, but we're not going to fool around with translation maneuvers for pictures because we don't want to screw up - foul up your flight path angle at that time. Okay. That gives us 2 hours to - of more or less open time here to finish up, if we're late on that, to go on over to checklist and prepare for powering up the command module. We're going to start the command module full powerup at minus 2 hours and 30 minutes or. We'll get the computer on the line, we'll get the up, we'll start uplinking your state vectors, and so forth, and alining the command module platform. At about 1 hour and 30 minutes at the latest, giving us an hour to do this command module stuff, we will start the maneuver to the jettison attitude. You'll then start to close out the . Of course, we don't have our stowage all configured way before this. We'll close the hatch, do a pressure integrity check, and at minus 1 hour, or 141 hours and 40 minutes, we'll jettison the. As soon as we do that, you can start the maneuver to the entry attitude. When you're there, do a sextant star check, take down the optics, and at that point we'll be giving you your fina
Hallo, Apollo 11. Houston. Melden Sie sich in A1, Mike, und sehen Sie nach, was Sie dort finden kö
Mi dispiace, si è
لا. هذا موجود في قائمة الت
Okay. R1 più 0,34
C'est une promenade très
알겠습니다. 상태 벡터에 대한 업데이트가 있습니다. 요청 및 수락 부탁
差不多了
哦，不，我们的饮用水很充足。我想——我不知道缓
설마 이 나침반이 작동하고 있다는 건 아니겠죠? 좀 더 설명해야겠네요. 제가 지금까지 해왔던 건 표준 광원
Tout se déroule correctement. Placez-vous en position de dépa
That is affirmat
Зде
はい、AE
罗杰：嗯，迈
Roger.
ニール、こちらヒューストン。了解です。新しい写真が撮れまし
没错，吉姆。我们还没拍到照片。它应该在顶部——更正一下，顶部，也就是定位销2的顶部，以及顶部，如果你正对着太阳，它应该能让光标分开，不过横滚角不是太关键；大概10度左右就行了。我们——但我认为——我们觉得你应该能拍得更好。在第31页的“烧录技巧”部分，由于万向节锁定，你可以刮擦小图下方的底
Questa è 
Roger. Questa fascia luminosa dell'orizzonte si estende per almeno 90° a nord e a sud rispetto alla posizione del t
This is a reading on Phecda in--in the Big Dipper prior to entry in the, the, into the haze layer. It occludes--it is extinct at roughly 2.5. T
收到。收到。那是给0
That's affirmative, B
하와이, 쌍둥이자리 4. 당신
روجر. نقطة التحكم الأولى لدينا قريبة جدًا من خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار، وبينما كانت العدسات
حسنًا. صحيح. هذا جيم لوفيل. ما فكرنا في فعله اليوم هو أن نُطلعكم على لمحة بسيطة عن الحياة داخل أبولو 8. لقد عرضنا لكم مشاهد القمر، ومشاهد الأرض، وفكرنا في دعوتكم إلى منزلنا. لقد كان منزلنا لمدة أربعة أيام على الأقل كما ترون على لوحة العدادات. نُعل
入口温度：
Okay. We're hearing a little bit of background noise, and I just wanted to make sure that we
Je pense que nous préférer
Мы зафиксировали цель на расстоянии около 179 миль, а на радаре определили точку пристрелки примерно на 156 милях; стрелки относительно стабильны, выглядят довольно хорошо. Стрелка рыскания колеблется взад-вперед, возможно, на плюс-минус 1 градус. Следует отметить, что проблема заключа
يا رجل، أكره أن أقول هذا بناءً على ما رأيته من خلال هذا المنظار، ولكن هناك بقعة بيضاء تشبه الفوهة - تبدو وكأنها كبيرة جدًا تحت هذه الفو
هيا 
Apollo 11, Houston. Would you have Buzz make sure he gives us th
Хорошо. Все главные заголовки, конечно, по-прежнему посвящены тому, что вы делаете, и особенно тому, что вы видели там вчера тот спутник. Кроме того, разгово
はい、その通りです。71時間
좋아요, 물병
روجر. ليلة سع
حسنًا يا جيم، لقد حللنا الأمر، وهو صحيح كما شرحناه لك في المرة الأولى. إذًا، R1 27100، وهذا هو الانحراف؛ R2 35500، وهذا هو 
Ricevuto. Pronto per il controllo aria
Okay. Dies ist ein Perizynth-Plus-2 für eine schnelle Rückkehr. Das ergibt / 62871, minus 161, plus 129, plus 45224, minus 06216, minus 18712 001 287 351, November Alfa plus 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, Erde oben 010, rechts 37, plus 1475, plus 06500 13239 36913; Hauptstern Sirius, Nebenstern Rigel 129 155 010, kein Luftvolumen, setzt die Durchführung der Kurskorrektur 4 voraus und verwendet dieselbe Ausrichtung. Die Zei
分かりました。すみません。ア
Warum höre ich – er – Sie nicht 
Ricevuto. Prima di farlo, vorrei impostare il radar di rendezvous su più
Roger. Danke. Auf
Ja, wir haben hier ziemlich viel zu tun. Er hat kurz geschlafen... Es ging ihm nur etw
पेरिस्कोप लॉन्च हो रहा है और बदलाव की शुरुआत हो चुकी ह
Bene. Va molto meglio, e imm
Wir sind 
罗杰。请您点击“接受”按钮，我们将向您发送一个加载项，该加载项将更新一个数值，随后会进行程序更改。吉姆，我们稍后会通知您；自动
아폴로 8호는 여건이 허락하는 대로 고이득 안테나를 설치하
休斯顿
Apollo 13, Hou
Просто хотел уточнить после примерно 45-минутного перерыва. Скажем так, мы заметили, что на вашей антенне с высоким коэффициентом усиления, если хотите, вы можете получить от неё немного больше пользы, переключившись на неё с всенаправленной антенны (OMNI), когда угол рыскания составляет 90 градусов, а угол тангажа -45 градусов. Мы заметили, что вы остаётесь на всенаправленной антенне на 10 минут дольше, что неплохо; но вы могли бы получить больш
Повторите, пожалуйста. Давайте. Нас 130. Повторите
Именно это я и хотел, чтобы вы сказали. Мы исп
我是罗杰。我认为我们的自动模式可能出了点问题。让我检查一下
Ну, если оно закипит, мы узнаем об этом раньше, чем ожидалось — и довольно скоро выяснится, что оно не закипит. Мы мало что можем с этим поделать, так почему бы нам не подождать, пока кто-нибудь еще не проснется? Фрэнк снова прос
좋아요, 휴스턴, 물병자리. 지금 우리를 어떻
Ganz genau. Wir befind
H
नहीं। हाँ, बिल्कुल सही। मुझे समझ आ गया। असल में यह लगभग 30
سيجما 
Le finestre di rendezvous sono buone. Le altre sono tutte più o meno uguali a quelle dell'ultima volta che abbiamo riferito. La prima e la quinta hanno una leggera foschia e un po' di neb
They've also looked at the results of your landmark tracking. The marks all apparently were very good, and we've got a full page of data here relative to the altitudes of the various site locations, which I won't read up to you, but I did want to let you know that the marks apparently went very well. I also have your consumable budgets, particularly your propellant quantities. They're Deltas from nominal if you should want them. Your worst quad is quad Charlie, which is 9 p
좋아요
Хорошо. Хорошо. Прежде всего, общая философия заключается в том, что эти правила должны быть похожи на правила аварийного прекращения работы в режиме I с жесткими ограничениями. Теперь я пройдусь по ним по порядку, чтобы вы могли их переписать. Хорошо. Вам следует выключить двигатель, если произойдет что-либо из следующего: показания монитора тяги 77 процентов или ниже; давление в топливном баке — это давление на входе — бортовые показания 160 или ниже; разница между топливом и кислородом (DELTA-P) более 2
روجر، هل يمكنك فحص قاطع دائرة اختبار ضوء المؤشر وإيقاف تشغيله لمعرفة ما إذا كان ذلك سيؤدي إلى إطفاء ضوء
D'accord. C'est affirmatif. Débranche
روجر. لقد ضبطت صمام التحكم في بدلة ا
Gemini, Canary. S
好吧，
Roger. Could you give me some ideas about the colors, and also, could you try a slight maneuver? It is disappearing. We're seeing about hal
Okay. Bene, per questo programma televisivo che andrà in onda tra un paio d'ore, potresti pensare a come vorresti che ci fermassimo, se lo fai, per ottenere la migli
Роджер. Вам удалось проверить освещение 
जेमिनी VI, जेमिनी VI, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम। मुझे आपके पी
Apollo 11, this is Houston. We see you in. When you c
Sch
استكمالاً لما كنتُ أُقدّمه من معلومات حول الصاروخ المُعزِّز، في بداية الرحلة. بعد دخولنا الظلام، على مسافة تُقدّر بـ 1200 قدم، حاولتُ الحفاظ على موقعي بالنسبة له، لكنّني لم أكن أملك سوى المسافة بين الأضواء الوامضة لتقدير المسافة بيني وبين الصاروخ في ذلك الوقت. كنتُ أرى ضوءًا واحدًا، ثم ضوءين، ثم ضوءًا واحدًا، وأحيانًا أخرى، كان يمرّ وقت طويل قبل أن أرى ضوءين، مما يُشير إلى أن الصاروخ كان يدور باستمرار. لم يكن لديّ فكرة واضحة عن اتجاه دورانه. بناءً على المسافة بين الأضواء، عندما كنتُ أراها بوضوح، شعرتُ أنني في وضع جيد بالنسبة له حتى وصلنا إلى كارنارفون تقريبًا. في ذلك الوقت، بدا لي أنني أقترب منه بسرعة، مع أنني لم أكن متأكدًا من ذلك تمامًا. كانت جميع قيم ΔV التي جمعتها حتى ذلك الوقت في اتجاه الصاروخ المُعزِّز، أي عكس اتجاهه. لسوء الحظ، كان جهاز التعزيز اللعين يتخذ وضعيةً تجعلني مضطرًا لاستخدام حركة دائرية أمامية للاقتراب منه، مما كان يُجبرني على الابتعاد عنه مجددًا بعد مرور بعض الوقت. ثم، مع 40-45 دقيقة من الظلام، واجهت صعوبة بالغة في تحديد مكاني. وعندما خرجنا من الظلام، كان جهاز 
Un attimo fa abbiamo avuto un momento di 
Va ben
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. I
阿
Roger, Friendship Seven. This is Z
48 feet and 
Ge
Der sekundäre Kühlkreislauf sah wirklich gut aus. Der Radiator scheint gut abgedichtet zu sein, und alle anderen Komponenten arbeiten einwandfrei. Die Hauptsauerstoffregler wurden bei unserer Überprüfung mit 104 psi befüllt. In der Mondumlaufbahn is
Ri
يا أ
Il est peut-être intéressant de noter que juste après nous être endormis hier soir, l'alarme principale a retenti et nous a fait très peur. Nous étions to
沟通突
अपोलो
На самом деле, сейчас мы смотрим прямо на мыс Доброй Надежды. Видно, что там расположены стартовые комплексы. Всё довольно хор
로저, 진. 지난 5시 보고 이후 제 상황에는 아무런 변화가 없
ठीक है, केन। मुझे लगता है कि - मुझे नहीं पता किसी और ने ध्यान दिया है या नहीं - उस स्टिकर में इस बात का ध्यान नहीं रखा गया ह
気分は最高で
I see your die marker, is very bright gr
공이 30° 정도 빗나간 것
Come
Roger. Alles normal hier. Sieht gut aus. 55 % automatischer Treibstoff. Durchfliege 70.000 Fuß, 65.000 Fuß. Die Fluglage ist sehr stabil. Nähere mich auf 60.000 Fuß. Die Steigrate funktioniert sehr gut. Nähere mich auf 50.000 Fuß. Sieht super aus. Nähere mich auf 45.000 Fuß. Ich habe nur noch etwa 1 g. Bereite mich darauf vor, bei 40.000, 41.000 Fuß Vollgas zu geben. Ich gebe Vollgas, und die Triebwerke sind aus. Man kann sie hören; ich kann sie wegen der Wolken nicht sehen. Die Fluglage hält gut. Der manuelle Hebel ist drin. Der Treibstoff geht ziemlich schnell. Ich kann die Triebwerke jetzt sehen. Sieht sehr gut aus. Ich werde die Zusatzdämpfung aktivieren. Brauche sie eigentlich nicht. Die Steigrate verbraucht sich selbst. Und die Zusatzdämpfung tut nichts, sie steht einfach nur da. Ich schal
好
मुझे भी अब काफी हद त
11-BRAV
接続を確認しています。聞こえま
Roger. Well you're doing a super job. We got a good view of the cross pointer, there. Had a 
Guaymas, qui è Gemini 4. Dobbiamo trovare subito una soluzione, che tu voglia che io faccia un grande sforzo per chiudere quest'ultima cosa o 
了解しました。月面からの距離でも、OMNIの音声ビットレートが
Molto bene. Questa è l'edizione del 23 dicembre dell'Interstellar Times alla Paul Haney. Vorremmo informarti che mancano solo due giorni di shopping a Natale. Dice che la tua trasmissione televisiva di ieri è stata un vero successo. Mickey Herskowitz sta facendo un doppio lavoro per il Post. Ha scritto un paio di articoli sul tuo lancio, oltre alle sue altre rubriche sportive, e, Jim, tua madre ha sicuramente apprezzato gli auguri di compleanno. Ven
Роджер, Аполлон-11. Давай, попробуй ещё раз, 
11, Houston. Nous pass
En fait, ça ne se passe pas très bien car, malheureusement, nous n'avons aucun moyen de couper la radio. Du coup, quand on parle comme ça, Ed peut nous entendre; même s'il a baissé le volume, je suis sûre qu'il nous entend. Et c'est vraiment exigu. On a embarqué tout ce matériel supplémentaire qu'on espérait jeter et c'est vraiment b
Roger, Sigma Seven. Könnten Sie mir bitte Ihren Standardbericht noch einmal vortragen? End
Roger, s
夜間捕捉のためにレチクルを十分に暗くすることができません。つる座、つまり窓の中の星々を再びマークしてください……。タウルス座がセンターラインをまっすぐ下ってきています。右に約5度ヨーイングすれば推測航法の条件を満たします。その後、左に約5度ロールしますが、これはかなり鮮明です。レトロスコープとしては、これは非常に良い配置のように見えます。月が明るく、夜明
Okay. Du hattest mich ja scho
ロジャー。彼は地上にいて、打ち上げをとても楽しんで見ていたと聞いています。私たちも本
わかりました。それでPROを回すと、5018が点滅します。ここでAUTO操作をしたいので、GUIDANCE、PNGS、MODE CONTROL、AUTOの順にPROします。1.4度のデッドバンドがあり、針をゼロインに合わせようとします。その時、私は針を覗き込みます。アポロ11号の太陽チェックのように、太陽がどこか、太陽のどこかを通過するときに、どこかにあるだけでいいのです。これで合っていま
D'accord. On n'a pas répondu
范斯，大概半小时前，我和杰克在某些航天器姿态下看不到星座和恒星。我们能看到天蝎座和人马座，也能看到牛郎星（或称南十
This is th
いいえ。全て順調です。どうやら6日間の契約を結んだようで、とても満足しています。
И оно снов
Хорошо. До начала осталось примерно 10 минут. Мы снова заберем вас в это время, и у нас будет вся информация от специалистов по телеви
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We've run the angles given in the flight plan for the attitude through the machines down here, and they come up the same thing every time. We think everything's going correctly, Mike, and we're wondering if the nonsymm
Über de
我
We've lost - The only adv
11, Х
로저. 그 차량
罗杰。我打算挪
मुझे यकीन नहीं है कि 
Salut Ken, comment as-tu fait pour assurer le service la 
Roger. Stai tornando un po' i
Li ha osservati, m
收到。你
Okay.
Navire de l'océan Indien, navire de l'océan Indien. Ici Sigma Seven. Je vous reçois. Comment me recevez-vous?
No
Souhaitez-vous 
알겠습니다. 영하 2도
У меня здесь всё 
रॉजर। हमें समझ आ गया, ईगल। ध
Okay. Come mi le
좋습니다.
D'accord. Déplacer la caméra vers la droite dé
Cape Cap Com Sigma Sev
こんに
비행 초반 부스터에 대한 브리핑을 이어가겠습니다. 어둠 속으로 들어간 후, 제가 생각하기에 약 1200피트(약 366미터) 거리에서 부스터와의 위치 유지를 시도했지만, 당시 부스터와의 거리를 가늠할 수 있는 유일한 방법은 깜빡이는 불빛 사이의 거리뿐이었습니다. 불빛이 간헐적으로, 아니 간헐적으로가 아니라 계속해서 하나, 두 개, 다시 하나로 바뀌고, 때로는 두 개의 불빛이 보이기까지 오랜 시간이 걸리기도 했습니다. 이는 부스터가 계속 회전하고 있음을 나타내는 것이었습니다. 부스터가 어느 방향으로 회전하는지는 확실히 알 수 없었습니다. 불빛 두 개가 모두 보일 때는 카나본(Carnarvon) 부근까지 부스터와 좋은 위치를 유지하고 있다고 생각했습니다. 그때
Roger, 8. Minus 29837, plus 02390, plus 00994 000 200 00
Essayons maintenant. Si vous pouvez parler plus fort, le bruit de 
سيجما سفن، هذا كانو كاب كوم.
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8। आप कैसे पढ़
Nein, Mike. Wir können jenseits der Terminatorgrenze weder mit noch ohne Fernglas etwas sehen. Die Erde ist einfach zu hell, und die Nac
हमारे ग्राउंड कंप्यूटरों पर हमने पुष्टि की है कि आपके द्वारा निर्धारित शाफ्ट और ट्रनियन कोण तारे की ओर इंगित कर रहे हैं। हालांकि, ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि शाफ्ट और ट्रनियन कोण संरचना की ओर भी इंगित कर रहे हैं, जिससे पृथ्वी का क्षितिज तो दिखाई देगा, लेकिन 
Verseau, veuillez désactiver votre bra
这里是穆切亚——建议你去伍默拉看看
Hast du das schon mit deinem Leitungsschutzschalt
로저. 잠시 두 분 모두
Are you saying fuel cel
Kommt auf dich 
Roger, Buzz. Ich bin bei minus 50 Grad u
알겠습니다. 아
I understand that you'll load us up with the 1 and we'll run through as far a
ठीक है। ह्यूस्टन, अगर आपके पास समय हो तो 
Roger, retour à 1,5 g. La tour a tiré; je n'ai pas pu la voir partir. J'ai vu la fumée passer par la fenêtre
Very good. On page E-9, when you are getting ready to transfer the to the command module position, if you want to avoid having the engines fire as a result of attitude correction, you might want to take the manual attitude switches to ACCEL COMMAN
रॉजर। इस समय मैं उड़ान योजना पर नज़र रख रहा हूँ। सच कहूँ तो मुझे लगता है कि ग्रहों की स्थिति का सटीक आकलन करने के लि
Les systèmes au sol semblent fonctionner normalement pour le moment. Les températures sont légèrement élevées, mais rien de critique n'est à signaler. Les derniers rapports indiquent que les onduleurs sont à environ 200 et 210 degrés; cela ne semble pas alarmant. Ils devraient tous se m
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on your own, that's the place we'd like to break off and let you go ahead and take over with your own alinement. However, we are giving you a procedure which will give you things we know you can see in the telescope without worrying about any reflections or anything of that nature, and it's not intended that this procedure has to be followed past the point where you know you've got good definition of star patterns in your telescope. If you need to go on, we'll maneuver, take a look at the Moon, we'll take a mark there, and then we'll maneuver with the / angles again and take a look at the Sun, and get yourself another mark on the Sun and that will complete the alinement. Now, the alinement scheme is that we are going to give you a set of angles that you can coarse aline the ball through when the is pointing you at the Moon. Now, this set of angles will agree with the that you have in as a nominal in you. You can coarse aline to that, set a drift flag and REFSMMAT flag, and you'll have a good platform and we'll be within a couple of degrees of a good alinement. And, if we have to, we could break off at this point and go ahead with an entry; however, in an attempt to get a good platform, we are going to have you then do a option 1, and what you are going to find in the option 1 slots is the en
我说我得了五分，
ईगल, कोलंबि
Affermativo. Una volta che avremo allineato tutto e ottenuto un time hack, le brave persone qui saranno in grado di fornirci gli atteggiamenti 8-ball per l'assetto di separazione del modulo di servizio, per l'assetto di allineamento del modulo di comando, che vi passeremo - un allineamento di tipo Luna/Sole. Avremo gli atteggiamenti 8-ball per quelli, e saremo in grado di effettuare l'uplink tramite il modulo di comando una volta che avremo il computer pronto, un assetto prefe
Apollo 8, Houston. Bitte versuchen
D'accord. Je vais vous donner directement ce que j'ai branché. Sur la rangée du haut, à la borne 11, nous avons les quatre disjoncteurs AC BUS TIE et le disjoncteur AC BUS VOLTS, branchés. C'est tout. Sur la deuxième rangée, nous avons les quatre disjoncteurs TCA, branchés. Nous avons le GASTA sous FLIGHT DISPLAYS et COMMANDER. De même, sous AC BUS A, nous avons un disjoncteur GASTA et un disjoncteur COMMANDER, branchés. C'est tout. Sur la rangée 3, nous avons un SIGNAL CONDITIONER 1. Nous avons l'ATCA (PGNS). Nous avons le disjoncteur ENGINE CONTROL, le disjoncteur ATTITUDE DIRECT CONTROL et, sous LIGHTING, le disjoncteur ANUN/DOCK/COMPONENT, branché. Et un autre, ED LOGIC POWER A, est éga
Ricevuto. E vediamo il lampeggio con un 651. Infatti, possiamo leggere i re
Roger. 9-C was 04 36 18. 7+59. 15+26. 10-Charlie 123. 1+45. 05 13 47. 13+37. 11 DELTA 087. 1+54. 07 10 46. 8+42. 12+35. 103. 06 
Tranquillité, Ho
आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, आपकी आवाज थोड़
알았어, 잭. -2시 30분부터 1시
يا جاك، ان
Roger, understand. You sa
Die Erde ist natürlich ziemlich hell, und der schwarze Himmel hat, anstatt schwarz zu sein, einen rosigen Schimmer. Der Stern, sofern er nicht sehr hell ist, geht wahrscheinlich in diesem Schimmer unter, ist aber einfach nicht sichtbar. Ich habe das Fadenkreuz deutlich über den Horizont positioniert, um sicherzustellen, dass der Stern nicht in der Helligkeit unterhalb des Horizonts untergeht. Doch selbst wenn ich das Fadenkreuz deutlich über den Horizont positioniere, sodass der Stern sich vom schwarzen Hintergrund
Appelez-nous lorsque vous pensez
Yes. That's when I 
Okay. Hast du Retrojet
Tranquillité, Houston. Nous vous demandons d
Roger. Just as a matter of curiosity for Bill, we can say a few words about the heaters for the cryo tanks, and also for the fans. We've noticed that the heaters are doing their thing normally, cycling on and off; and as time goes by, this cycle rate increases, indicating a little bit of stratification in the tanks. And then when we've been turning the fans on every 4 hours for a couple of minutes, this stirs things up and the heaters then cycling on and off again more slowly for awhile, until again a little bit of stratification occurs, and the cycling becomes slightly more rapid. This is, of course, normal; we just point it out as a curiosity to you. 
روجر، لقد استمعتُ إلى جزء من محادثتك حول جزر الكناري، وسمعتُ تعليقاتك على حالة الطقس في أفريقيا. هل يمكنك إطلاعن
Lors de votre prochain passage, Columbia, au lieu d'effectuer une recherche comme celle-ci, nous vous demandons de chercher aux alentours des coordonnées que nous vous avons fournies. Il s'agit de notre meilleure analyse basée sur la physique des cartes et la trajectoire. Nous avons également un autre ensemble de coordonnées à proximité duquel nous souhaiterions que vous effectuiez une recherche. Ces dernières sont basées sur l'interprétation des caractéristiques géologiques observées par l'équipe lors d
Roger. Can we have one more b
11, Hous
Ja, das sind
ジャック、BAT Cの電圧を読み取る必要があります。あの回路ブレーカーは開いているは
Apollo 8, this is Houston reading you fairly weak. I'll repeat the state vector information. Your state vector is now based on 5 hours, more than 5 hours of tracking. We show you on a peric
罗杰，非常感谢。我们查看了回放，发现启动时出现了一些问题。稍后我们会再跟您讨论这个问
आगे बढ़ो। कॉपी करने 
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. В тот момент я ничего не говорил. Сейчас мы пытаемся разобраться в ситуации. Что касается вашего предыдущего вопроса о согласовании циклов сна, мы согласны с вашим комментарием. Мы хотели бы вернуться к плану полета в отношении циклов сна и так далее к моменту выхода на лунную орбиту. Поэтому мы хотели бы, чтобы вы сами оценили наиболее эффективный способ согласования циклов сна и распределили их между собой. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы держали нас в курсе того, кто чем занимается и каковы ваши планы. У нас есть один полет, который мы перенесли на 2 часа. Мы хотели бы завершить второй. Мы также можем скорректировать время для второго, если это создаст конфликт — я думаю, это еще два «-а». Мы можем скорректировать время для них, если вы сообщите нам, какой у вас прогноз погоды на то время, когда Джим сможет провести наблюдения. Итак, главное, мы хотели бы работать в соответствии с вашими пожеланиями. Если вы нам сообщите, мы выберем несколько з
好的。开始。127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 度/秒 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-BRAVO: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58
Roger. La stessa direzione 
حسنًا. فهمت. دعنا نرى ما لدينا أيضًا يا جيم. يبدو أن مسار الهبوط الثاني (Midcourse-2) يتحرك بسرعة 23 قدمًا في الثانية تقريبًا، في اتجاه عكسي وفي الوقت المحدد. وهو ثابت تمامًا الآن. للعلم فقط، ولا داعي لتدوين هذا، لأنه لا يزال غير
Canary Cap Com, Sigma Seven. On UHF-lo. How do you 
Es sieht so aus, als hätten wir eine Zeit lang viele Störungen auf der Rennstrecke gehabt
Роджер. Вот время восхода и захода солнца. Восход солнца, первый оборот: 1 + 21 + 00. Восход солнца, второй оборот: 2 + 50 + 00. Во
Roger. Pourriez-vous régler votre commutateur T/M sur TEMPS RÉEL et ACQ et votre commuta
わかりました。「フォローアップ」も忘れてください。17ページ目のすべての項目を実行して、4分で変更点があります。1行目、CB(16) 
わかりました。もう一度、先ほど「順序は重要ではない」と言った部分ですが、戻っても順序は重要ではありません。では、先に進みましょう。パネル4：TELCOMM、GROUP 1、AC1ですが、AC1ではなくOFFになります
Nun, Gus. Wir – zumindest bekommen wir d
आगे बढ़ो
Apollo 11, Houston. Je ne suis pas certain que vous ayez reçu ma dernière transmission, 
أبولو 8، هذه
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। ईंधन 62-74 [प्रतिशत], ऑक्सीजन 64-98 [प्रतिशत
عندما يُعيد نيل مشعات الجليكول إلى الوضع الطبيعي، مؤقتًا، فإن
أفهمك جيداً
Близнецы 4, 
Roger, ich würde gerne deine 2-Alpha-Zeit an dich,
Да. Я всё ещё не доволен получаемыми фотографиями. У меня получилось всего три или ч
Roger. Nou
ここ
Das ist in Ordnung mit den Kardanaufhängungen, Fred. Sonst nichts auf Seite 14. 
Friendship
좋습니다. 대기하세요. 우주선을 롤 방향으로 정렬하세요
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। पाँच मिनट शेष। नाइट्रोजन बोतल के प्रीबर्न दबाव के बारे में आपके अनुरोध के संबंध में, बर्न से ठीक
了解、ジャック。メモ：回路ブレーカー保護により電流は15アンペアに制限されます。チューブ、つまり と の間のアンビリカルケーブルは高温で
알겠습니다. 1. 1-A와 2-B는 모두 24살이고, 모두 좋
D'accord, Vance.
吉姆，我的意思是
रॉ
Хорошо. Теперь возьмите один из баллончиков с гидроксидом лития, и позвольте мне описать, какой конец за что отвечает. Он примерно квадратный с одной стороны — на одном из плоских вентил
展開時に2つの角が同時に出なかったため、2つの角が接触していたと思います。展開の仕方が少し不均一で、もちろ
Ciao, buongiorno, Frank. Ti stiamo monitorando da circa
Chi se ne intende di obiettivi zoom? Questo obiettivo va da 12,5 millimetri a 75; presumo che sia la stessa no
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Мы готовы уложить вас спать и пожелать спокойной ночи, если вы предоставите нам отчет о состоянии экипажа и подтвердите, что только что заменили балло
Да, мы такие. И ещё кое-что, Эд. Просто будьте м
わかりま
Are th
Bon, on ne fait rien pour l'instant, Vance, on est juste curieux, on pourrait commencer les procédures d'entrée, tout mettre au point, et ensuite, quand le téléviseur arrivera à 
لقد أصبحنا جيدين للغاية... سأستخدم خاصي
로저. 흥미로운 점이 하나 있는데요
मेरी खिड़की पर अब रोशनी नहीं पड़ रही है, फिर भी मुझे तारे नहीं दिख रहे। अगर दिन के उजाले में और क्षितिज में एक साथ तारे देखने की कोई भी संभावना है, तो मैं अभी ऐसी स्थिति में हूँ जहाँ मुझे ऐसा करना
Конечно, сделаю. И, давайте посмотрим, мы просто хотели сообщить вам, что на этот раз у нас действительно хороший заряд батареи. Похоже, — выглядит точно так же, как в книге, — и я хотел бы узнать напряжение батареи C перед ва
Okay, Jim. Wie steht es jetzt um die Kommunikation? 
现在我们讨论的是飞行中期104小时时的速度为每秒7英尺。然后推算到进入大气层前大约8小时。我们给你留了个余地——那大约只有每秒19英尺，所以如果变化不大——我们就能得
أشعر أنني بخير. ماذا 
分かりました。ありがとう
نعم. إنها جميعها ضيقة للغاية. سأخبرك بشيء؛ سأخلعها وأعيد ارتدائها مرة أخرى لأرى إن كان ذلك سيحد
Ok. Qu
他のすべてが失敗した場合に備えて、あなたのハ
Хорошо, 11. Спасибо. На этом пока все наши вопросы заканчиваются, и мы вернем их в
よし、ヒーターはオ
Roger. Durante il mio ultimo periodo di sonno, ho dormi
كانتون كوم تك
Roger. Abbiamo esaminato i grafici e abbiamo ottenuto esattamente la stessa rispos
ج
Gemini 4, Canary CAP COM. Bitte auf UHF-Kana
سأصور هذه اللقطة التالية باتجاه الشمس، ولدي انعكاس على ا
Roger
D'accor
Apollo 8, Houston. S-Band-Aus
로저. 제 상태는 양호하고, 캡슐 상태도 양호합니다. 현재 수동 조종으로 드리프트 비행 중입니다. 자이로스코프는 안전하게 보호되고 있습니다. 연료는 45~42%, 산소는 79~100%입니다. 증기 배출구 온도는 현재 두 곳 모두 65도입니다. 우주복 온도도 많이 내려갔습니다. 현재
알
우리가 그렇게 
Okay. Jim, ich möchte diese anderen Objektive herausholen. Ich denke, wir können mit 
13, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 전력을 조금 더 줄이도록 하겠습니다. 2번 스위치를 끄
حسنًا. قرأنا Y على أنها
Houston, Apollo 11. We're completed in the. We're closing up the hatc
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Je n'avais rien dit à ce moment-là. Nous sommes en train de trouver des solutions pour vous. Concernant votre question précédente sur la gestion des cycles de sommeil, nous partageons votre avis. Nous souhaitons rectifier le tir en ce qui concerne les cycles de sommeil et autres aspects du plan de vol d'ici notre arrivée en orbite lunaire. Nous vous d
Roger. Vorremmo chiederti di interrompere l'uso dell'AUTO OPTICS sul sito di pseudo-atterraggio. È necessario che ti mandiamo un messaggio per aggiornare i 
ओह! ये तो कमाल है! मैं अब ऑटो 
Ci 
Oh, par intermittence
Okay. Weiter mit Schritt 1; Test 1: 5 Sekunden warten. 5 Sekunden. Automatikmodus. Okay – alle Kontrollleuchten
Утвер
Okay. Just ease it down now. Don't pull so hard on it. All rig
A
ठीक 
Okay. Und da ist noch etwas, von dem ich nicht weiß, ob Ihnen das bekannt ist. Wir haben in Panel zwei keine Lithiumhydr
오토 원, 여기는 시그마 
यूरी अलेक्सेयेव
よし。電力系統に切り替えて、問題なさそうだ。「CAUTION AND WARNING POWER」のランプと、すべて
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. TLI+1
아직 꽤 멀리 있
एक मिनट रु
Roger. À partir d'une assiette avec 
好的。由于噪声干扰，我们漏掉了大约 28 小时的 DELTA-
Хорошо. Вы хотите, чтобы я зачитал данные с MDC 3: напряжение батареи B, напряжение PYRO A, напряжение PYRO B, тем
了解。7​​分10秒くらいで着陸しました。サステイナーは私の頭上でとても安定しています。というか、地平線の上ですね。今はチンパンジーモードですが、
Roger. Wir würden gerne mit dem Hal
Abbiamo considerato seriamente solo gli aspetti essenziali necessari per effettuare un lancio sicuro? Non lo stiamo facendo - non credo che abbiamo il tempo di elaborare dati ingegneristici che la gente potrebbe voler esaminare mentre questo oggett
약 
ठीक है। और अगर आप चाहें तो, जब आप अपनी प्रविष्टियाँ दर
不，是那个东西——就是支撑着那些该死的挡板
रॉजर। फोटो के लिए, 
アクティベーション1からステップ3まで。了解
아폴로 8호, 아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 안테
That's negative. I did not open it. I won't open it until I get through with these readings. Phecda now extincts at 1.7 in the mid, in mid position between the haze layer and the earth. Okay, Woomera, my--my status is very good. The suit temperature is coming down substantially. Steam vent temperature is not down much, but the suit environment temperature is 60 [degrees]. I'm quite comfortable. Cabin temperature is 101 [degrees]; cabin is holding an indicated 4.8; oxygen is 75-100 [percent], all d-c power continues to be good, 20 Amps; both a-c busses are good; fuel reads 46 and 40 [percent]. I am in drifting flight. I have had plenty of water to drink. The visor is c
आगे ब
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie sind nicht empfangbar. Wir verzögern den Start, bis wir eine bessere Positionsbes
Nous avons atteint la l
收到。我们快要失去锁定了，所以
알겠습
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir werden die Landebahnen bei 25 übernehmen. Ich melde mich telefonisch bei Ihnen, sobald wir die n
बिल के लिए रॉजर। अब वह पानी में 
好的。这次飞掠是昨天那次飞掠的更新，请注意这是第二次。飞掠坐标为：62970，-162，+129，+00966，+00552，-02079。横滚、俯仰和偏航均为零，11月阿尔法星，近地点高度为+00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013，向上047，向右39，+1418 -16505 12904 36160，主星天狼
I did cycle out of AUTO into - I
Хорошо. Ваша посадка — погода в районе посадки, который находится примерно в 560 милях к югу от Самоа, по прогнозу, будет около 15:00, местами переменная, высокий, разбитый ветер. Высота волн составит 5 футов, ветер — 15 узлов, видимость — 20 миль, ливни ожидаются менее чем в 1
비행 계획에 따르면 여기서 물을 마
吉姆，为了方便我们进行这次简报，我们希望通信信号更好一些，而且我们完全可以腾出电力；所以请你到16号
Хорошо,
프레드, 배경 소음 때문에 더 이상 잘 안 들리네요. 잭이 통신 업링크 스퀠치에 대해 어떻게 할 건지 얘기한 것 같은데, 이제 알아들을게요. 자세를 확인할 수 없으니 안테나는 당신이 알아서 조절해 주세요. 신호가 올라오면 음성 확인을 해드리겠습니다. 신호가 
Roger. Bonne relecture. Bien, continuons. Rien à la page 6; rien à la page 7. Rien aux pages 8 et 9. Rien aux pages 10 et 11. À la page 12, nous voulo
Bene, nella colonna di sinistra sotto 108
Спокойствие, Хьюстон. Вы готовы к выравниванию и лунному вы
Odyssey, Hou
こちらが
제미니 8호입니다. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 아마 승천 중 위상 조정 기동에
Роджер. Пон
الآن، الشيء الذي سيكون من الجيد معرفته هو ما إذا كان - إلى أي مدى - سيعمل - فيلم 80 ملم - مع علبة الف
Up to.., and I want to get AVERAGE 
Roger. Danke für den Wetterbericht. So weit kö
Хорошо, давайте проверим, нет ли у н
收到。接下来，使用高增益天线进行
飞掠机动 / 62954，减 162，加 129 953 578 - 这些是 00953 和加 000578 - 减 02076 000 000 000，不适用，加 00202，0235
Actually, Mike, it's so easy to do it with the eight-ball within a reasonable sloppy limit that it's hardly worth the trouble to scootch way up in the seat to look out the, and it's enough light in the cockpit where the star really isn't too easy to see. So I'm kind of inclined to use the IFR techn
Roger, ripeto il
نعم، ما زلنا هنا يا جاك. نريد أن نتابع معك هذه العملية، لذا سنستخدم سرعة نقل بيانات عالية. وللإجابة على سؤالك، لإلغاء هذه العملية بسرعة في حال حدوث أي مشكلة، تأكد من عدم لمس مفتاح الطاقة 124 لأنه يحتوي على وضع إعادة ضبط. لإلغاء العملية،
Okay, Joe. Sembra fanta
좋습니다. 시작해 보겠습니다. -2, /G&N: 63634; +0.96, -0.23;; -0.021.7,
嗯，我更愿意那
Roger. We have a lock-on now,... at 21 50 we had a range of 22.24 nautical miles... at 22 plus 00 we had a range of 17.63 nautical miles and we still ha
Apollo 8, abbiamo finito con il computer. Puoi tornare al BLOCCO, e sembra che ora la tua finestr
E per quanto riguarda le
Хорошо, Джек. Следующий шаг — взять карточку-подсказку и использовать её, чтобы сформировать арку над верхней частью контейнера; просто заправьте один короткий конец под один выступ сверху, а другой — к выступу с другой стороны, чтобы получилась закругленная арка над верхней 
Housto
11번, 복사할 준비 되면, 비행 계획 업데
...जब ऐसा होता है तो वह ची
D'accord. Cela signifie que vous aurez une pression de 1,5 à 2 dans le tunnel, en valeur absolu
正如我所说，我看不见……如果你想让我
And
Vorbeiflugmanöver / 62954, minus 162, plus 129 953 578 - das sind 00953 und plus 000578 - minus 02076 000 000 000, nicht anwendbar, plus 00202, 02356 022 02280 03 0393 310 013, n
Roger. Merci, Gemin
我指的是德班极光。我没能看到它们。我看到地面上有一些光点——就在
Ich werde die Fenster öffnen und
Concernant les photos d'entrée en scène, si vous utilisez une cartouche neuve de film couleur d'intérieur, nous recommandons les réglages d'exposition suivants: f/11 à 1/250 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 2,1 m pour la boule de feu; f/2,0, 1/60 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 15 m lors de l'ouverture des parachutes. Si vous utilisez une cartouche dont une partie a déjà servi pour des prises de vue d'intérieur, nous recommandons: f/16 à 1/500 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 2,1 m pour la boule de feu; f/2,8, 1/60 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 15 m lors de l'ouverture des parach
わかりました。まず、パネル11のSバンドアンテナのブレーカーを閉じてください。次に、28ページの「アクティベーション」の「
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。話が逸れてしまいましたね。高利得アンテナのピッチ角とヨー角は、ビルからの要請に応えて、自動再捕捉（AUTO REACQ）位置としてどのような位置を設定できるかを尋ねたものです。同時にオムニアンテナを使用したくないという制約は依然として残ります。現在、自動再捕捉（AUTO REACQ）位置にいますが、どちらか一方にする必要があります。ですから、試してみたいのであれば、この情報を使ってください
Standby per un (area di recupero di emergenza)
Das ist Houston. 
로저, 짐. 저희
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 재정렬 작업은 잘 진행되었습니다. 저는 육분의로 별을 찾아 정렬하는 데는 성공했지만, 스캐닝 망원경에서 레고르나 멘켄트 같은 별을 관측할 때는 그 별을 식별할 수 없었습니다. 처음 지구를 관측했을 때는 지평선이 매우 흐릿하게 보였습니다. 하지만 지구의 지평선과 대기 사이에는 뚜렷한 선이 있는 것처럼 보였습니다. 랜드마크 시선 필터를 사용하니 지평선이 더 선명해졌습니다. 우주와 대기 상층부 사이에는 매우 흐릿하고 불분명한 지평선이 있어서 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 앞서 말씀드렸듯이, 태양이 가까이 있을 때 달을 관측하면 달 주변이 어둡지 않고 밝은 파란색으로 보입니다. 태양이 광학계 근처에 있을 때 육분의로 정렬할 때도 마찬가지입니다. 하지만 저는 육분의에서 이러한 별들을 찾는 데는 어려움이 없습니다. 별과 
Apollo 8, Houston.
Buzz, this is Houston. You have a
Roger. Ihre Ausweichausrichtung: Rollen 308, Nicken 209, Gieren
フレッド、この司令船の水酸化リチウムボンベを自作するんですが、少なくとも2個作って、一度に2個ずつ使います。ホースのセットごとに1個ずつです。この自作のボンベの1つを赤い接続部に繋ぎ、空気を水酸化リチウムボンベを通して吸い込み、青い接続部から吹き出します。それから、このボンベを宇宙服のループから取り外します。一次側か二次側のどちらかです。このボンベを簡単に作れるように、いくつか準備を進めているところです。おそらく2人必要になると思いますので、後で作るように計画した方がいいと思い
Roger, Frank. Abbiamo appena finito di discutere anche di questo. Siamo d'accordo con il vostro punto di vista. Credo che si tratti più di una c
わかりました。これが私たちがあなたにお願いしたい設定です。そして、私たちが考えていることは次のとおりです。タンク 1 を自動、タンク 2 をオフにしたところ、ヒーター サイクルでタンク 1 の圧力が約 233 psi であることがわかりました。これは注意
没错。再试一
좋아, 잭, 맨 위 줄 11번째 패널에 추진 PQGS와 상승 헬륨 조절기를 정말로 넣고 
What we are going to try to do is get back on the sleep cycle to those sleep periods just prior to by taking shorter cycles for 
Гот
इस समय सूर्य की किरणें अंतरिक्ष यान के अगले हिस्से से टकराकर वापस लौट रही हैं, जिससे उसका हर हिस्सा धुंधला हो रहा है। बाईं ओर और नीचे कुछ चमकीले तारे दिखाई दे रहे हैं। अब मुझे ओरियन की पेटी दिखाई दे रही है। तो सीरियस तारा हमारे अगले हिस्से से काफी नीचे है। यह 
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Rapport des trente minutes: les mouvements de tête ne provoquent ni nausées ni aucun malaise. Je suis surpris de pouvoir regarder le soleil d'aussi près; il brille directement sur mon visage et je n'ai qu'à me protéger les yeux avec mes sourcils. Tous les interrupteurs de fusibles sont toujours dans la position indiquée précédemment sur le panneau de gauche. Le sélecteur de mode est normal (auto), le gyroscope est normal: le dispositif anti-retour est armé, le rétrolâchement automatique est désactivé. Toutes les poignées en « T » sont en position basse, sauf la poignée manuelle, que j'ai tirée pour pouvoir passer immédiatement en mode manuel en cas de dysfonctionnement. Les aides au sauvetage sont normales. Le sac d'atterrissage est désactivé. Tous les autres éléments du panneau de séquence sont en position normale. Le niveau de carburant est de 68 à 100 % (répétition: 68 à 100 %). L'EPI indique ma position appro
كل
रॉजर। मैं फिर से कहता हूँ, आपका स्टेट वेक्टर बिल्कुल ठीक है; यह अभी भी थोड़ा-बहुत गड़बड़ है, और हम यहाँ इसलिए रुके हैं क्योंकि हम यह जाँच रहे हैं कि कहीं कोई जानकारी खो तो नहीं गई। यह पहला कारण है, और दूसरा कारण यह है कि आपका W-मैट्रिक्स
キャビンの温
알았어, 짐. 이륙 후 15분 경과: 015:00, DELTA-VT 562
, Ho i tuoi tempi di backup sugli angoli di inclinazione e sul tempo per invert
This is Friendship Seven. Have a lot of lightning under me at
वैसे, हम यहां आपके टीडी एंड ई के कार्यक्रम का रीप्ले देख रहे हैं और टीवी पर इसकी क्वालिटी काफी अ
Роджер. Через секстант изображение было намного чётче, чем через монокуляр, и можно было определённо определить, что это одна-единственная клетка на поздней стадии развития. Хотя, должно быть, она поднялась на высоту более 50 000 футов. Восточное Средиземное море феноменально чистое. Видны все озёра; Мёртвое море выделялось очень 
Мой
收到。D-8 实验检查 1。从 57 开始。检查 2。从 01:30 开始。项目 4，版本 50，升交点 102° 
But it's pattern is such that it sprays ou
Ne serve ancora un po'. È così che funziona; c
로저. 2번 기동, /: 46728, -0.53, +121 +28466 -0.0352. Z에 대한 502406을 얻지 못했습니다. 180 022
Близнецы VI, 
Je vois une étoil
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 패널 382의 EVAP 수분 제어가 AUTO로 설정되어 있는지 확인하십
علام
قد تلاحظون بالنسبة للأشخاص في معهد ماساتشوستس للتكنولوجيا أن سلسلة النجوم التالية سيتم تصويرها بواسطة الملاح الرئيسي وهو يرتدي خوذة فضائية وعدسات عينية ذات مسافة رؤية طوي
Roger. Hier die Geschichte zur Anzugtemperatur. Ich habe sie seit dem Start zweimal um 10 Grad erhöht. Jetzt bin ich etwa 15 Grad über dem Startwert. Die Temperaturen an den Dampfventilen liegen bei 69 un
Und, Houston, Tranquility Base möchte Ihnen ein paar Anmerkungen zur geologischen Frage von gestern Abend geben. Wir befinden uns in einem relativ glatten Kraterfeld mit länglichen, kreisförmigen Sekundärkratern, von denen die meisten unabhängig von ihrer Größe einen Rand aufweisen. Das trifft jedoch nicht überall zu. Es gibt einige kleinere Krater, die keinen erkennbaren Rand haben. Der Boden in diesem Gebiet besteht aus sehr feinem Sand bis hin zu Schluff. Ich würde sagen, dass er auf der Erde am ehesten mit Graphitpulver vergleichbar wäre. In diesem Boden finden sich Gesteine ​​unterschiedlichster Formen, Größen und Texturen – abgerundete und kantige –, viele mit unterschiedlicher Konsistenz. Wie bereits erwähnt, habe ich reinen Basalt und blasigen Basalt gesehen. Andere weisen keine Kri
罗杰。我们现在向您展示的是
알겠습니다, 빌. 이번에는 좀 다른 방식으로 음악을 틀어보려고 합니다. 음성 통신
Ладно, ладно, Карна
はい、一つありました。ランダムな動きで、中には前に進んでいるように見えるものもありました。外にも一つあります
ハワイでの最新情報についてですが、ハワイでのパスに関する記述、Re
रॉजर। मेरा कंट्रोल मोड फ्लाई-बाय-व
소변 처리 시스템을 정비하고 소변 봉투도 비웠으니 이제 상황은 꽤
嗯，我测得温
了解、ジャック。CBバットチャージャーをA
Wir sind da; wir haben die neue Einst
Видимость через телескоп очень плохая. Я бы сказал, даже хуже, чем сейчас в симуляторе. Требуется длительная адаптация к темноте, которая в большинстве случаев крайне неудобна; поэтому очень важно постоянно поддерживать работу платформы и настраивать её в соответствии с возможностя
맞습니
نعم، هذا صحيح. عندما واجهتُ المشكلة لأول مرة، كان
Bene, in quell'ultimo passaggio abbiamo scattato circa 38 foto con il Synoptic Terrain Photography, partendo un po' a est di San Diego e fino a quando non abbiamo incontrato di nuovo la copertura nuvolosa. Abbiamo ripreso con immagini intermittenti non appena abbiamo iniziato a sorvolare la parte meridionale degli Stati Uniti, passando per l'Alabama e il Mississippi, fino ad arrivare in Florida. Abbiamo scattato alcune ottime foto del meteo in quella zona, poi abbiamo scattato alcune foto degli aeroporti intorno a Jacksonville. Abbiamo scattato un paio di foto di Cape Cod. Probabilmente una delle foto migliori che abbiamo scattato è stata quella scattata al ritorno, e abbiamo immortalato l'intera formazione meteorologica lungo la costa, partendo dalla Florida e risalendo fino al Texas. Una linea meteorologica molto ben definita che seguiva da vicino la costa. Poi abbiamo scattato alcune foto della formazione meteorologica nello Stato della Florida, intorno a Cuba e nella zona insulare, e nel golfo... accumuli di maltempo, nuvole, e abbiamo scattato un paio di foto d
अगला आइटम: संतुलन बनाए रखने के उद्देश्य से हाइड्रोजन टैंक 1 के 
Très bien. Et puis, à environ trois mètres de là, se trouve un rocher encore plus gros, très arrondi. Ce rocher – le plus proche de
Roger, 13-BRAVO; 146, 03+32. 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 27 11. 56 46. 3+17, 8+36. 14-BRAVO: 04+07, 09+03. 15
Questa è Friendship Seven. Sto girando la tuta per a
حسنًا يا جيم. سنتواصل معك خلال دقيقتين لنقرر ما إذا كنا سننتقل إلى الأسطوانة
Hey, Jim, we're still going to pass you your
यह पुष्टि है। आगे जो बताया गया 
Roger. La tua pressione primaria di O2 è 960, dovre
C'était le - c'est le résidu 
好的，休斯顿。基于负MA值解算，我得到冲击点经度为-160.95。我调整了偏差，得到冲击点纬度-经度为163.75。我想把冲击点向东偏移30度，并尝试确定实现这一目标所需的燃烧参数，最终得到X轴燃烧值为-11.6，C轴燃烧值为+600，Y轴燃烧值为0。这改变了我之前的X轴燃烧值（-50.2）。我只想知道这样的
Роджер. Име
ठीक है। यदि सेकेंडरी एक्यूमुलेटर की मात्रा में कोई कमी नहीं होती है, तो रेडिएटर वाल्व में सेकेंडरी ग्लाइकोल को सामान्य स्थिति में रखें। अगला चरण, सेकेंडरी कूलेंट लूप पंप, AC 1 या AC 2। 3 मिनट बाद, सेकेंडरी ग्लाइकोल डिस्चार्ज का दबाव 39 से 51 psig के बीच सत्यापित करें। साथ ही, सेकेंडर
Columbia, Columbia, qui Houston. Vorremmo che ATTIVAS
시그마
14 45 00，各就
ठीक है। 7:30 बजे, हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप चारों क्रायो टैंकों में पंखों को चाल
Roger. Cela fa
Okay, Houston. Der Sextanten-Sternencheck ist bestanden
これにより、大気圏へのトリム角度、ロール率が得られ、その後、ドローグとメインの展開のために再び 100,000 で
रॉजर। मैं बस आपको याद दिलाना चाहता था कि जलने के बाद हमने टीवी पर कुछ नहीं देखा। और आपकी जानकारी के लिए बत
Уважаемая индийская комиссия по контролю за воздушным движением, позвольте мне сообщить вам о ситуации. Я на высоте 7000 футов, основной парашют в порядке, посадочная сумка включена (зеленый сигнал), перекись водорода закончилась, мое состо
حسنًا، باستثناء تلك الحفرة الكبيرة التي مررنا بها، أعتقد أنه لم تكن هناك حفر أخرى في منطقتنا. تجولتُ عائدًا بعد نصب جهاز EASEP، وبينما كان باز يُفرغ العينات الموثقة، توجهتُ إلى فوهة بركانية خلفنا، قطرها حوالي 70 أ
लोगों का रवैया सुचारू रूप से
Roger. You're seeing Earth, as we see it, out our left-hand window, just a
Ok, Fred-o. Impostalo in vertica
Avevi i dati sui nost
نعم، واحد للـ 18، وواحد للـ 75؛ أعتقد أنه طالما يبدو أنه خارج النافذة، فهذا هو الشيء الرئ
Roger. Bene, allora continuerò questa manovra con un 
Affirmative.
Absolument, Jack. Ça a c
برج الجوزاء 4، هذه هيوستن. أقول إنها 16+10. هل 
明白了。我把它提高到了100
Bene. Nel pannello 5, vogliamo che CB POWER 1 e 2 siano aperti. Quindi, l'interruttore POWER si resetti e si rilasci. Nei pannelli 11 e 16, gli interruttori X LUNAR BUS TIE siano chiusi. Nel pannello 16, il CONTROLLO ECA DI SALITA è chiuso; il CONTROLLO ECA DI DISCESA è chiuso. Nel pannello 14, l'alimentazione NORMALE della batteria BAT 5 è attiva, seguita dalle prese BASSA TENSIONE delle batterie BAT 1, 2, 3 e 4 sono attivate.
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地。まだ時間はたっぷりあるので、この
Род
Ok. Bene. Lo farò. E per quanto riguarda il sistema, il... Qualunque fosse il problema, sembra essere scomparso senza dover cambiare i sensori J52 o cose del genere. La temperatura di uscita dell'evaporatore del glicole è ora superiore a 50°C, e la cabina di pilotaggio è piuttosto confortevole; quindi ne pa
嗯，我跟你说，有很多东西要排出去。喷
잭, 아주 편안한 시간입니다. 이미 여러 번 시험 비행을 해봤고, 사실 지금도 다시 시험 비행 중입니다. 휴스턴과 케이프 커내버럴 모두에서 시험 비행을 마쳤습니다. 유일하게 시간을 미리 맞춰야 할 부분은 플랫폼 정렬 과정, 즉 착륙을 마무리할 준비를 할 때와 사령선에 탑승하여 장비를 분리하고 나면 다시 아주 편안한 시간으로 돌아올 때뿐입니다. 물론 저희가 계속
Los geht's, Fl
Les fournisseurs 
Okay, Houston. Wir werden die Secondary jetzt für 30 Sekunden komplett aushebeln, ich meine, die Secondary RAD
ठीक है। अब, जो, तुम्हें 12 इ
オーロ
了解。それでは
Not bad. I was amazed at the communication at the moon, too
ठीक
Хорошо. Я понял идею. Хорошо. Давайте я повторю это здесь. Возьмите карточку с подсказкой, сформируйте дугу сверху, подогнув её под этот край. Когда закончим, приклейте кусочек скотча с боков по верхнему
收到。滚转角 198.6，俯仰角 
Ok. Basta parlare della Luna, Charlie. Ora ci prepariamo per qualch
Roger. Ce lo aspettavamo. Ecco perché ti abbiamo fatto accendere la ventola. Ci stavamo avvicinando molto ai limiti di atten
わかりました。フライトプランでその点を考慮しているのは、もしロールオーバーしてヘッドアップ飛行などを試してみたい場合、ビルに新しいフィルム設定などを提供
Пойм
MSC-1は現在オフです。MSC-2と
ठीक है। मैं
حسنًا. أغلق صمام العزل، وأبقِ قواطع التيار المتردد مغلقة، وأغلق صمام التغذية المتقاطعة، وافتح الشاشتين التاليتين. أغلق صمام التحكم الرئيسي وقواطع الدفع، ويجب
ハッ！ハ
Хорошо. Блок датчиков CB, шины постоянного тока A и 
हमारा एक मल्टीप्लेक्सर खराब हो गया है और हम यहां जमीन पर कई तापमानों को माप नहीं पा रहे हैं। हम आपको इसकी जानकारी देना चाहते हैं। ये तापमान हैं केबिन का तापमान, बाएं सूट का नल का तापमान, दाएं सूट का 
Нет, я не компания AUTO; я буду 
Bene. Dopo Tommy Jacobs, abbiamo la notizia scottante di un'astrologa di Houston di nome Ruby Graham. Dice che tutti i segni sono adatti al tuo viaggio sulla Luna. Neil è intelligente, Mike ha un buon giudizio e Buzz sa risolvere problemi complessi. Dice anche che Neil tende a vedere il mondo attraverso lenti rosa, ma è sempre pronto ad aiutare chi è afflitto o in difficoltà. Neil, dovresti anche avere "un'intuizione che ti permette di interpretare la vita con sentimento", Buzz dovrebbe essere molto socievole e non sopportare la solitudine, oltre ad avere un'eccellente capacità critica. Non sapendo a che ora fosse nato Mike, ha concluso che o ha le stesse caratteristiche di Neil o è inventivo con un atteggiamento non con
了解。ニール、良い提案だ。
Okay. Eintrittspunkt (PAD) ist MIDPAC: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, plus 1102, minus 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28; DL und VL sind alle vier nicht anwendbar; DO, 4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380; Hauptzielstern ist Scorpio Theta, oben 314, rechts 34, Auftriebsvektor oben. Anmerkungen: Die Eintrittsdaten setzen keine 
Gemini VII
Ho degli aggiornamenti per te quando sarai pron
では、強調しておきますが、パワーアンプをオフにします。トランスポンダーをオフにします。ACインバーター2をオフにします。そして、パネル250の最後のCB BAT BakerのPOWER ENTRY/POSTLANDINGをオンにします。そして、指示された手順を逆の順序で実行して、元に戻します。MDC 3 UP TELEMETRYをオフにします。次にACインバーターのAC1 BUS 1をオフにします。次にACインバーター2をオフにします。ACインバーター2のMAIN Bをオフにします。元に戻したいのは、このような
はい、はい、でもこの方法なら、どの方向に動かせばいいのかがわかると思い
Qualcuno ha detto: "Noi... noi vi copriremo, ragazzi; e se Jack ha qualche numero di tel
Che ne dic
روجر. لديّ أوقات T1 وT2، بالإضافة إلى خط طول 
로저, 휴스턴. 플러스 4. 무게는 동일하게 유지, 마이너스 164 플러스 129 마이너스 01594 플러스 모든 볼 플러스 52885 
是的，我想他们现
Gemini 4，
حسناً يا فانس، لقد حص
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。您能接受吗？我们有个问题要
了解しました。EEPでは、バッテリーAは38.95アンペア時間、バッテリーBは36.35アンペア時
万斯，
Sì, e
जब हम पहली
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। लगभग 7 या 8 मिनट में जब आप अंधेरे में जाएंगे, तो मैं आपको आपके टीवी कैमरे के वाइड-एंगल लेंस के
Il semblerait que sur la dernière bobine, le voyant rouge ne se soit pas allumé à la fin. Nous étions en train de filmer à la fin de
No. It's a minu
引っ張ってるよ、ジム。 引っ張ってる
नहीं। मैं समय नोट करने की कोशिश कर रहा था, 16:65 मिनट का समय, और किसी तरह V
أنا أيضاً لا أ
E
そうだね。ところで、6号館の奴
また、レーダーの最高速度により、衛星が頭上を通過するときにロックが失われる可能性があると予想して
روجر ينهي
Hey, ich dac
好的，我会的。另外，我还想问你一个问题。在这种对接状态下，我们需要
Хорошо, Джек. Я подключил два автоматических выключателя Commander, переменного и постоянного тока, и два выключателя GASTA переменного и постоянного тока, а затем тебе нужно включить все нагреватели, создав дав
D'accord. Nous allons tester l'ordinateur dans tous les modes. Ce test se déroule en trois étapes. Commencez par régler la vitesse à 10 pieds/seconde dans toutes les fenêtres IVI. Appuyez ensuite sur le bouton de réinitialisation en cas de dysfonctionnement. Puis, appuyez sur le bouton de démarrage et vérifiez si le voyant « Ordinateur en marche » s'allume. Répétez cette opération dans tous les modes. Si vous ne voyez aucun voyant indiquant que l'ordinateur fonctionne, vous effectuerez un autre test. Lors de ce test, vous devrez également vérifier dans tous les modes. Éteignez l'ordinateur pendant 2 secondes. Une fois l'ordinateur rallum
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Гр
Voici la petite Couronne australe, que nous avons décidé d'utiliser comme référence. Elle est juste devant moi en
- - ठीक है, डेल्टा-वी थ्रस
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP C
OK. Je suis en mode automatique. Tout fonctionne parfaitement. Le commutateur de manœuvre est sur la position « arrêt ». Tous les systèmes sont au vert. Ma consommation de carburant est quasi nulle. Mon seul s
D'accord. L'image que Jim m'a donnée de sa vue à travers le disque montrait la Terre partielle, la partie éclairée se situant dans la moitié supérieure, la pointe se trouvant exactement sur la ligne Y-Y. Ainsi, toute la partie sombre de la Terre se trouvait dans la partie inférieure, à l'exception d'un très fin croissant 
Bene. Questo è un 9, /: 45597, meno 040, più 157, più 34188, meno 01353, più 00780 180 008 001, November Alfa, più 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, giù 131, sinistra 28, più 0758, meno 16500 12987 36277; stella primaria Sirio, seconda
أنا على أهبة الاستعداد للتحقق من وضعي في ال
١١، هذه هيوستن. تصحيح منتصف المسار رقم ٥، RCS/G&N: ٢٦٠٢٥، ضبط الميل والانحراف غير متوفر، TIG ١٥٠ ٢٩ ٥٤٥٣، ناقص ٠٠٠٤٨، زائد جميع الكرات، زائد ٠٠٠٠١ ٠٧٥ ١٥٩ ٣٢٨؛ HA غير متوفر؛ HP زائد ٠٠٢٣٠ ٠٠٠٤٨ ٠١١ ٠٠٠٤٨؛ نجم السدس ٠٣ ٠٩٠٨ ٣٨٢. كتلة نجم المو
حسناً، ممتاز. حسناً، سأقو
D'accord, Fred, je ne t'entends plus à cause du bruit de fond. Je suppose que… il me semble avoir entendu Jack te dire ce qu'on va faire concernant le réglage de la liaison montante. Tu t'occuperas des antennes, car on ne voit pas ton orientation. On fera un test voc
रॉजर। समझ गया, फ्रैं
روجر. هذا تقرير مدته 30 دقيقة. أجريتُ اختبار تحريك الرأس ولم ألاحظ أي تأثير. أجريتُ اختبار مدى الوصول ولم أواجه أي مشكلة على الإطلاق. اتجاهي جيد، ورؤيتي واضحة. لا يُسبب تحريك هدفي، أي النظر إلى بقعة ضوء ذهابًا وإيابًا، أي آثار سلبية. أجري اختبار الضوء حا
Ora sto nastrando le spie di avvertimento della quantità di carburante in preparazione al lato oscuro. Credo che nastrerò anche l'acqua in eccesso in cabina. Non è un sist
Okay, Fred-o. Ganz unten auf der Seite wollen wir Schritt 1. Bei der blinkenden 0406 wählen wir Option 3, dann gelan
Bene. Hai la valvola di i
こちらヒューストン。その計画は良いと思い
Si
Quad Bravo、そうです。プライマリ トークバックとセカンダリ トークバックの両方がバーバーポールになりました
Rog
Das sieht gut 
А Вэнс подумал, что нам стоит сфотографировать Джека, чтобы все девушки знали, что он всё
Роджер. На водородном баке: водородный бак 1 —
फ्रेंडशि
좋아요
Alpha/Pc to Pc; LAUNCH VEHICLE INDICATOR to GPI; GIMBAL DRIVE PITCH and YAW to AUTO; EVENT TIMER RESET, up; EVENT TIMER START to STOP; EVENT TIMER MINUTES, SECONDS to center; POSTLANDING VENT valve, push; PROBE EXTEND/RELEASE to OFF; EXTEND/RELEASE talkbacks, two of them, gray; DOCK PROB
Aprire TEMP/PRESS DISPLAY-FLAGS e PQGS/DISPLAYS
ठीक है। अब, अगला चरण सर्विस मॉड्यूल का पृथक्करण होगा
わかった
هذه فريندشيب سفن. هذه فريندشيب سفن، تبثّ مبا
Хорошо. Кажется, все уже оживились, так что, вероятно, 
Роджер. За 64 тысячи долларов мы все еще пыта
Charlie, we're going to rotate about pitch 270 degrees on the way home vice 1 - or 090 on the way out. Right
जिम, आप इसी पर काम कर रहे थे। अभी तक हमने आपको हाई गेन पर नहीं रखा है। ह
Okay. Eingabe: Gebiet Mitte-Pazifik, 357 152 359 268, plus 0813, minus 16503 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028, viermal nicht anwendbar, d. h. DL MAX, DL MIN, VL MAX und VL MIN – alle nicht anwendbar. 0590 312. Ihr Wirbelstern ist Zeta Persei, der sich auf halbem Weg zwischen Mirfak und Aldebaran befindet, 165° 
로저. 과이마스 상공의 중요한 테이프 덤프입니다
D'accord. On a perdu le verrouillage. On a changé d'OMNI. Juste pour ma propre information, pour mettre de l'ordre dans mes idées, j'aim
Hawaii Com Tech, Hawaii Cap Com, this is Sigma Seven. 
Deux questions jusqu'à présent concernant le chauffage du CM/. Nous supposons qu'il s'agit de puissance, et nous supposons que nous allon
Jim, just a reminder. Any wast
- 
Roger, Frank. Nous aimerions que vous repreniez le contrôle. La température de votre réservoir d'hélium se maintient à peu près correctement. Nous allons essayer de la stabilis
Mal sehen. In Springfield, Missouri, beschloss M
はい。トランスレーション ハンド コントローラーを反時計回り - 時計回りに
Roger. Merci beaucoup. Nous ne sommes pas aussi fatigués ce soir que la nuit dernièr
सुप
잘못 
Нет, Джек. Я думаю об отношении к размещению оборудования при входе в атмосферу. Стоит ли нам оставить что-то в «Аквариусе»? Оставить скафандры, а такие крупные предметы, как камеры Hycon, оставить в «Аквариусе».
그리니치 표준시도 제
«А
Voici un reportage d'Harry Rosenthal, de l'Associated Press de Houston. Deux Pères Noël ont illuminé la veille de Noël du petit Jeffrey Lovell, âgé de deux ans. Le premier a frappé à sa porte et lui a apporté des cadeaux. Le second a ramené son papa sur la Lune. Le premier portait un costume rouge et une barbe blanche, et son « ho, ho! » résonnait si fort qu'on l'entendait à plusieurs kilomètres. Le second était un énorme moteur crachant des flammes derrière la Lune, et des milliers de personnes attendaient la confirmation de son allumage. « Sachez qu'il y a un Père Noël », furent les premiers mots d'Apollo 8, sortant du silence radio pour annoncer au monde entier, quinze minutes après les faits, que le moteur avait réussi sa combustion critique. « Aucun d'entre nous ne s'attend à recevoir un plus beau cadeau de Noël que celui-ci », déclara Ken Mattingly, du centre de contrôle des missions. « Remerciez de notre part tous ceux qui sont restés sur Terre. Vous savez que nous n'aurions rien pu faire sans vous », répondit le colonel Frank Borman, commandant du vaisseau. À ce moment précis, un sapin de Noël s'illumina devant les consoles du centre de contrôle des missions, et l'astronaute Harrison Schmidt lut à l'équipage une version spatiale du conte « La visite de Saint Nicolas ». « C'était la veille de Noël, et très loin dans l'espace, l'équipage d'Apollo 8 venait de remporter la course vers la Lune », commençait le récit. L'équipe du centre de contrôle des missions avait retardé les festivités jusqu'à ce que le père de Jeffrey, le capitaine de la marine James
로저. 켄, 산소와 수소 퍼지가 필요해
收到。明白我们这里有点……刺激
ठीक है। अब मैं अपने बाईं ओर स्थित चंद्रमा का उपयोग कर रहा हूँ, और यह इसके लिए एक अच्छा समाधान है। मैं एटीट्यूड इंडिकेटर को ढक देता हूँ और आप यॉ देख सकते हैं। मैं जायरो को फ्री कर रहा हूँ, इस समय फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड चुनने की कोशिश कर रहा हूँ। मैं पहले चंद्रमा को विंडो के केंद्र में रखूँगा - और रोल और पिच को दबाए रखूँगा और फिर चंद्रमा को उसकी सही जगह पर वापस रख दूँगा। इस समय चंद्रमा विंडो के केंद्र के पास आ रहा है। ठीक है, मैं इसे यही
Роджер
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们
You are looking
Okay. Apollo 8. Es sieht so aus, als müssten wir diesen Kommunikationstest aufgrund einiger Tracking-Anforderungen verschieben. Wir könnten
Jim, siamo d'accordo con te sull'uso dei due piccoli crateri che puoi ripetutamente segnare e trovare sulla mappa; inoltre, se ci fornisci le tue nuove latitudini e longitudini, possiamo calcolare per te il momento del massimo avvicinamento a quei p
Kapstadt. Konnten Sie Ihre Experimente für die erst
Это подтверждается. Также, Джим, для информации, мы предварительно подсчитали прошедшее время. Это 67 + 40, что составляет
Roger. Taurus, Aida; I repeat, Taurus, Aida. Up 162, left 0
はい、そうです。チャーリー、君を捕まえるのに苦労していた時、ハイゲインのコントロールを確実に
أصبح وضع التحكم الخاص بي الآن 
Pourquoi
Хорошо. А вы хотите узнать, 
알겠습니다. 그리고 잭, 
わかりました。ヒューストン、今体重を見ていますね。
ठीक है। आज सुबह खबरों में ज़्यादा कुछ नहीं है। माहौल शांत है। मुझे लगता है कि सबसे बड़ी खबर दुर्घटना दर है - छुट्टियों के दौरान हुई मौतें - जो निश
حسناً
로저. 나도 여기서 
I noticed in the soft spots where we had footprints nearly an inch deep that the soil is very cohesive and it will retain a - will retain a slo
Houston, Verseau. Odyssey essaie de vous appeler. Pouvez-vous le
西格玛七号。请您按下血
Apollo 8, Houston. Procédez au mélange manuel. Il est conseillé de régler l'évap
Volerai con ACME
Хорошо, мы это для вас подготовим, и мы только что говорили о проверке дублирующих компонентов, и мы собирались отложить это до тех пор, пока все не выспятся. Мы стараемся, чтобы вам не пришлось садиться на диван 
Ja, wir haben hier ziem
حسنًا. بالتأكيد. نرجو منك تشغيل المروحة في خ
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे ऑप्टिक्स ट्रैकिंग सिस्टम के बारे में कुछ शब्द। मैंने पीछे की तरफ नियंत्रण बिंदु 1 और 2 के लिए ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग किया, और इसने बहुत अच्छा काम किया, मेरे लिए दोनों लक्ष्यों को ट्रैक किया। फिर मैं हमारे कक्षीय नियंत्रण पुस्तिका में निर्दिष्ट नियंत्रण बिंदु 3 पर गया, जहाँ मुझे अक्षांश और देशांतर दिए गए थे, और मैंने उस विशेष निर्देशांक प्रणाली को ट्रैक करने के लिए ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग किया, और यह वास्तविक ट्रैकिंग प्लॉट के
休斯顿，说
Okay. Das war's fürs Erste. Weiter geht's
Хорошо. Судя по предоставленной мной информации о погоде, на высоте 2000 футов в целевой точке может быть еще один слой с разрывами на высоте 6000 футов. В точке максимального подъема будет примерно то же самое, и показания альтиметра о
はい、フレッド。費
حسنًا. كل ما قلته هو أن جيم ليس لديه جهاز BIOMED الخاص به جاهزًا الآن، لذا سأعود إلى D
روجر. سويس وا
Roger, il tempo retrogrado è stato reimpostato a 
好的，吉姆。接下来我们要
دعون
روجر، نيل. إنها صورة رائعة حقاً
D'accord. L
Ich sah den ersten Stern bei 1°58' – Korrektur 2°58'30' – in der zweiten Umdrehung. Der Boden war g
好的。好的。首先，总体原则是这些规则应该类似于模式 I 中止，但限制条件更严格。现在，我逐条讲解，方便你抄写。好的。如果出现以下任何情况，你都应该关闭发动机：推力监控读数低于 77%；推进剂罐压力（即入口压力）机载读数低于 160；燃料与氧气压力差大于 25 psi（这需要地
Okay. Du willst die hohe Verstärkung gesichert haben und du willst OMNI auf OMNI Cha
36-4 40 前进，120 后，1+06。2+31
OK. La pression 
Très 
Roger. The light's working fine. I can't tell exactly how far it is though, I guess I'm probably a half a mile or so. The booster started tumbling right after we came off of it. I tried to dump the rates down, and I got them down till it looked l
Okays Houston. Neither Neil nor Mike can see it. Incidentally, t
D'accord. Je c
Jim, 
Roger, alles klar, Jim. Wir sind an allen Standorten vor Ort. Ich rufe dich kurz an und sage „Bereit“. Wenn du dich einsam fühlst oder etwas anmerken möchtest, kannst du gerne vorbeikommen. Wir haben hier auch ein paar persönliche Nach
쌍극자가 보이시나
아주 좋습니다. 이제 더 잘 이해되네요. 그리고 저희가 S 밴드 OMNI와 OMNI B를 
Roger. Je ne vois que des éclairs. On dirait que tu es complètement bloqué. Je reste ici un moment et je reviens bientôt. Il me s
ジム、おおよそその通りです。ジャックがその姿勢で粗調整を行います。そのために、君に
네, S밴드 안테나 OMNI 스위치를 현재 설정하신 대로 Bravo로 설정하고, S밴드 안테나 OMNI를 OMNI 위치로, 고이득 
了解しました。聞こえています。高度5,000フィートのメインシュートにいます。状況は良好です。救助隊とは連絡が取れていません。救助時間について何か情報はありま
わかりました。それから…​​ちょっと…記録しておきます。それ
아, 로저, 잔지바르 캡콤입니다. 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 모든 퓨즈는 이전에 보고된 대로 그대로입니다. 아무것도 변경하지 않았습니다. 스퀴브는 작동 준비 완료입니다. 자동 역추진은 꺼져 있습니다. 모든 "T" 핸들은 정상입니다. 역추진 지연도 정상입니다. 시퀀스 패널도 정상입니다. 착륙 백은 꺼져 있습니다. 연료는 90~98%입니다. EPI는 예정대로 거의 진행되고 있음을 나타냅니다. 제 자세는 좌측 5도, 우측 3도, 피치는 -33도입니다. 역추진 시간은 여전히 ​​04 + 32 + 28로 
Roger. Je vais les remettre à z
Flight 社では、2 回目のテスト中に Running Light の表示が出た場合は、最初のテストに戻って各モードで同じことを繰り返すこと
零重力是什么感觉？
Roger. Wir haben gerade festgestellt, dass es fehlt, und ja, wir würden es gerne beheben. Sie verstehen, dass wir Ihnen nicht vorschlagen,
사실 그렇지 않습니다. 저희는 중간 항로 수정 전에 온수 보일러를 점검하는 것이 적절하다고 생각합니다. 냉간 냉각 과정에도 온수 보일러가 사용되긴 하지만, 이는 진입 직전에 진행되므로 보일러가 그다지 민감하지 않은 상태
D'accord. Jim va prendre une photo de nous de
D'accord, Fred, je ne t'entends plus à cause du bruit de fond. Je suppose que… il me semble avoir entendu Jack te dire ce qu'on va faire concernant le réglage de la liaison montante. 
Хо
静海基地，这里是休斯顿。上行链路已完成。电脑现在归你用了
पाय
आगे बढ़ो, ह्
Roger. On dirait que Neil arrive dans cinq minutes, 11. Mike, 
... s
Привет, мыс. Дру
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Könnten Sie uns eine ungefähre Angabe machen, wie lange es n
ジェミニ4、
Хорошо. В р
了解。実験終了。MSC-2と-3の終了。翌
Roger. Bitte drei Mahl
ठीक है। मैं 1:19:02 बजे हूँ। कई बार पूरी तरह से दिशाभ्रमित हो गया हूँ। वहाँ, कैसियोपिया सीधे खिड़की के सामने है और मैं सूर्योदय की तस्वीरे
Okay. For colors, waters are all sort of a royal blue; clouds, of course, are bright white; the reflection off the earth is - appears much greater than the moon. The land areas are generally a brownish - sort of dark brownish to light brown in texture. Many of the vortices of clouds can be seen of the various weather cells. A long band of - it appears cirrus clouds that extend from the entrance to the Gulf of Mexico going straight out across the Atlantic. The terminator, of course, cuts through the Atlantic Ocean right now, going from north t
好了，Sigma Seven。这里是加州首都通讯站。你们现在还有
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Началось; выглядит неплохо, и мы буде
— — нужно иметь возможность это увидеть. Есть ли у вас как
Roger. Die einzige Änderung seit unserem letzten Gespräch besteht darin
١٣، لدينا عنصر آخر لك، عندما تسنح لك الفرصة. نود منك تحريك خزانات التجميد الخاصة بك. بالإضافة إلى ذلك، لدي عمود ومحور
Rog
Ich gehe jetzt die Checkliste für die Installation durch. Gleichspannung ist die Hauptspannung. Die Sicherung des Retromanuals ist ausgeschaltet. Das Retromanual ist ausgeschaltet. Alle Instrumente sind in Ordnung. Alle Batterien sind in Ordnung. Die Wechselstromversorgung ist gut. Mal sehen, wo ist der Booster? Da unten sind wunderschöne Wolkenformationen. Der Booster befindet sich vor einer großen Wolkenformation. Ich scheine viel näher an der Erde z
- -
Au-delà de mes capacités de calcu
Aquarius, Houston. Il va falloir mettre en marche la climatisation pour que vous puissiez prendre une mesure. Fermez les quatre disjoncteurs de l'onduleur de bus (panneau 11). Fermez le disjoncteur d
ठीक है। ठीक 
1마일, 
Ricevuto, Jim. Questa è la manovra di metà percorso numero 5, ed è una /, ed è 31700, non applicabile, non applicabile. Mi segui
Ich vers
Хьюстон, 
友谊七号，
Нет, у этой штуки, ах, практически нет показаний регулировки углов, Дик, но сейчас я, я бы сказал, перевернулся на 30 градусов влево. — Довольно близко к углу тангажа, и, конечно, в таких условиях довольно сложно определить уго
알겠습니다
さて、次のイベントはサービスモジュールの分離です。これはいくつかの手順ですが、何が起こっているのか理解していただくために、読み上げます。まず、毎秒0.5フィートの速度でプラスXを行
好
알겠습니다. 제가 다시 읽어보니 +00692, +1
Roger. Understand; that's JETT,. It's not that time critical, Ji
Apo
Хорошо, Базз. Цель — пролёт. SPS/G&N: 62815, плюс 097, минус 020 070 54 5944, минус 00028, плюс 00023, плюс 00069 029 149 312, апогей NA, плюс 00221 00078 001 00034, звезда секстанта 01 2385 227, звезда оси обзора NA NA NA. Широта минус 0265, минус 16500, 11899 36228, 144 56 47. В комментариях: ваши звёзды установки — Денеб и Вега, 007 144 068. Нет пус
他们也查看了你的地标追踪结果。所有标记点似乎都非常准确，我们这里有一整页关于各个站点海拔高度的数据，我就不一一念给你看了，但我想告诉你，标记工作显然非常顺利。我还拿到了你的消耗品预算，特别是推进剂用量。如果你需要的话，这是实际用量与标称值的偏差值。你最糟糕的是查理四象限，比标称值低了9%。除非你想看，否则我不会念其他四象限的数据。完
The lightning looks like a big blob, rather than a jagged streak we are use to seeing when earthbound. Just looks like a big - almost like a antiaircraft shot. A big blob of bright light, and then it fades out almo
로저입니다. 진행 상황을 기록하고 있습니다. 첫 번째 별을 완료하신 것 같은데, 두 번째 별을 완
ヒューストン、ジェミ
目前信号微弱且无法辨认。但我会尝试盲传。请检查您的面板是否已关
ご参考までに、ケープからの報告によると、ここでしばらく手動で操作を続けなければ、おそらくこの軌道を終了しなければならないだろうとのこと
حسنًا يا هيوستن. نحتاج إلى اتصال منك لتحديد 
了解。念のためお知らせしますが、ランデブーレーダーのサーキットブレーカーは引きっぱなしにしておいてください。ただし、ランデブーレーダーモードスイッチは、Surface 59と同様にオ
È molto interessante notare che il mio assetto, e il... è all'incirca di beccheggio più 30 gradi, rollio a destra di 130 gradi e imbardata a sinistra di 20 gradi. Il pallone in questo momento si muove proprio con me. Mantiene una direzione costante in ogni momento. Ecco di nuovo la fascia dell'orizzonte; questa volta dal lato illuminato dalla luna. Vediamo, con il filtro airglow, è molto difficil
Okay, Joe. Slip the
Roger. Nous avons observé quelques nuages ​​dans votre région à travers la monoculaire le long de la côte du golfe du Texas cet après-midi, et nous avons également remarqué la présence de nuages ​​a
روجر، يا فريندشيب سفن. أنتم ثلاثة في ثلاثة. توجه
제미니 4호, 카나본 CA
Friendship Seven, this is Canary Systems
I
저는 메인 경보기에 사용하는 광전지 증폭기가 좋은 장치라고 
मैं अब आपके प्लस 44 पर इनपुट देने और उस 44 घंटे के बर्न टाइम का उपयोग करने का प्रयास करूंगा। मैंने देखा कि प्रवेश वेग थोड़ा अधिक है। शायद हम सामान्य तरीके से काम 
알겠습니다. 약 1분 후면 항공기 통신 범위 내에 진입할 예정입니다. 이번에는 S밴드와 VHF 대역 모두로 업링크를 시도할 것입니다. 그러니 S밴드 볼륨을 높여주시면 감사하겠습니다. 앞으로 연소 작업 동
自由七号
加 59578，减 00086，减 05287，012 080 018，不适用，加 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160，332，地面向上 00
좋네요. 사진 좀 찍어주세요.
Ok. R1 più 27210, R2 più 35570, R3 più 33010. Secondo elemento, come sapete, dovuto alla manovra con un PROCEED e un PROCEED; e, dopo il vostro assetto, un promemoria che non vi riporterà a una banda morta stretta. Per tornare alla banda morta di 1,40 gradi, dovete usare la procedura che vi ho indicato, ovvero: NOUN 01, ENTE
Quell'altro aviatore che sta facendo il giro del mondo, Max Conrad con il suo aereo leggero - ha trascorso il giorno di Natale in Antartide, a Puento Aranes in Cile; sta aspettando il bel tempo per poter continuare il suo volo verso il Polo Sud. Spera di fare il giro del mondo. Farà il giro di entrambi i Poli, e volerà da Palmer a Byrd, da Byrd al Polo 
यह आपका 
로저. 사용량 관련 질문에 대해 답변드리겠습니다. 현재 체중이 정상 체중보다 18~20파운드 정도 적은 것 같습니다. 
로저. 이번 달 탐사가 당신 눈에는 간단하거나 쉬워 보였을지도 모르겠습니다. 하지만 결코 그렇지 않았다는 것을 말씀드리고 싶습니다. 우리를 궤도에 올려놓은 새턴 V 로켓은 엄청나게 복잡한 기계 장치이며, 모든 부품이 완벽하게 작동했습니다. 제 머리 위에 있는 이 컴퓨터는 38,000개의 단어로 이루어진 어휘
알겠습니다. 짐이 마
It looks like I just passed over some of the Marshall Islands down there. They were quite clear and you can see the atolls and stuff around the islands themselves. I tried to get a picture of them, but I caught t
Близнецы 4, Хьюстон, CAP COM. 
दाईं
حسنًا. لم أحصل على الملاحظات، لكن سأقرأ لك الخطوات كما هي الآن. الخطوة الأولى، البطاريات 1، 2، 3، و4... و
Beachten Sie, dass Ihr Automatikgetriebe einen Kraftstoffanteil von 80 Prozent, Ihr Schaltgetr
Difficile de trouver mieux! Comment s'est passé Noël chez vous au
И тут показалось, что всё видимое движение прекратилось, и мы, вероятно, сближаемся. Поэтому я развернул космический аппарат и попытался выровнять платформу. Тем временем ускоритель начал довольно заметно опускаться ниже нас. Поэтому я перестал пытаться выровнять платформу, чтобы направить её вниз к ускорителю, и слегка включил тормоза, чтобы замедлиться вместе с ним. Снова казалось, что скорость падения остановилась. Но к этому моменту мы отклонились примерно на 300 метров. Затем мы следовали за ускорителем над Африкой, направляя его вниз на протяжении всего пути. Мы довольно быстро приблизились к закату,
حسنًا. لقد انحرفنا الآن حوالي 25 درجة في زاوية الميل. أود منك إعادة ضبط الطائرة على زاوية ميل 10 وزاوية انحراف 45، ثم ضبطها على وضع التحكم، وخفض زاوية الميل إلى الحد الأدنى. أعطنا علامة عند ال
إيجل، هيوستن. نحن متأكدون أن هذه مشكلة في المستشعر. يمكنك تركه على الوض
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Исходя из решения с минус MA, я получил долготу удара -160,95. Я скорректировал его, чтобы получить широту удара - долготу 163,75. Я хотел изменить точку удара на 30 градусов к востоку и попытался определить параметры горения, необходимые для этого. В результате я получил значение X-горения -11,6, C +600 и Y = 0. Теперь это изменило мое предыдущее значение X-горения с -50,2. Я просто хочу узнать, соот
약실 압력이 예상보다 약간 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们现在就尝试导出您的磁带。在目前的配置下，电路裕量不太理想。我们会检查一下。如果失败，我
11号，休斯顿。如果您能配合，我们想看到您们脸上洋溢的笑容，如果您能给我
네, 세계 뉴스부터 시작하겠습니다. 아폴로 8호 우주비행사들에 대한 찬사와 우주 탐사 분야에서의 국제 협력에 대한 기대감이 전 세계에 퍼졌습니다. 작은 우주선이 달 궤도를 돌고 있는 동안, 전 세계는 크리스마스 이브 메시지를 통해 이러한 기대감을 전달했습니다. 공산주의 국가에서조차 인류 최초의 달 탐사에 대한 열기는 뜨거웠습니다. 모스크바에서는 소련 과학자 아나톨리 베사라노프가 미국과 이전에도 우주 관련 지식을 공유했던 것을 회상하며, 아폴로 8호 비행이 양국 간 협력 증진으로 이어질 것이라고 예측했습니다. 쿠바에서는 라디오 하바나가 미국의 소리(VOA) 프로그램을 재방송하여 청취자들에게 아폴로 8호의 연설을 전했습니다. VAA 관계자는 미국 기관의 프로그램이 하바나 라디오에서 방송된 것은 이번이 처음이라고 밝혔습니다. 체코슬로바키아는 대대적인 텔레비전 중계를 통해 달 착륙 장면을 지켜봤고, 헝가리 부다페스트에서는 기차와 버스에서 사람들이 거의 항상 아폴로 8호 이야기만 했습니다. 비공산권 국가에서는 직장인들과 크리스마스 쇼핑객들이 우주선이 지구로 향하는 발사 준비를 하는 동안 숨죽이며 지켜봤습니다. 거리의 프랑스인들은 미국의 기술력과 우주 탐사 업적을 칭찬했고, 일부 시청자들은 텔레비전으로 달 사진을 보며 "멋지다!"라고 외쳤습니다. 런던에서는 크리스마스 쇼핑객들이 상점과 술집에 몰려들어 달 표면의 분화구 사진을 텔레비전으로 시청했습니다. 불과 몇 주 전까지만 해도 우주비행사의 목숨을 위험에 빠뜨리지 않고도 관측 장비로 임무를 수행할 수 있다는 이유로 아폴로 8호 프로젝트를 비판했던 영국의 저명한 우주 천문학자 버나드 러벨은 달 탐사에 깊은 감명을 받았다고 밝혔습니다. 교황 바오로 6세는 인류의 
Pronti per POWER, ON, p
Hallo Sigma Seven. Cape Cap Tech. Wie
Zwillinge, hier spricht der Chirurg. Wir haben einen gültigen Blutdruckwert. 
आपको पता है, यह वाकई बहुत बुरा है कि साइड की खिड़कियों पर धुंध जमी हुई है क्योंकि हमें आमने-सामने की खिड़कियों से कभी सूरज की रोशनी नहीं दिखती, और
Je crois que le décalage vers le ciel s'accentue. La Terre arrive maintenant vraiment au niveau du haut de la fenêtre. Je dois me baisser presque jusqu'au plancher pour la voir. À l'inverse, la Lune est tout en bas, au bas de
قلت: ما زلت أحاول إقناع شريكي بالذهاب إلى الفراش
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। 5 एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 37201, माइनस 060, प्लस 047; टीआईजी 086 09 3666. संज्ञा 81: प्लस 33521, प्लस 03441, माइनस 01458; रोल अनुपलब्ध, पिच 032. शेष पैड अनुपलब्ध है। उलेज दो जेट, 16 से
Are al
Ciao Roger, Amicizia Sette. Vi ricevo forte e chiaro. Tutti i
Blood pressure is received. Standing by for your food and water report. We h
控制航天器姿态偏航180°，滚转170
Roger, retour en position orbitale. T
Apollo 11, this is Houston. Could you give us a - an AUTO optics check to a third star or a different star from the o
Сейчас я на высоте око
जैसे ही आपको पता चले कि टीआईजी तकनीक क्या होगी, कृपया मुझे फोन कर
لن نقوم بتمديد هوائي التر
ज
好的。听起来有
حسنًا يا فريد. وعندما تختار - عند استبدال الخرطوشة الأساسية، لا تعيد اختيار "أساسي". ابقَ على "ثانوي" حتى نستخدم ال
이건 
Et Jim McDivitt ajoute: « Oui, maintenant que vous le mentionnez, i
알겠습니다. 그리고 A를 부탁
Neil is now unveiling the plaq
ああ、最初の日没を見逃すところだった。右側のキャビンライトを消そうとして、かなり急激に沈むと聞いていたのに。でも、うまくできなかった。アークトゥルスがちょうど右側、本来ある
Questo è confermato. Gli 
こちらフレンドシップ7号、無人機で放送しています。日の出が潜望鏡の向こう
Bien reçu. E
I've seen an awful lot of North Africa... daylight -- know quite well. I've just completed D-9 Apollo Landmark run on Target 14. I had a very good pickup. I had seen the target before; I knew where it was. I got right on the thing about 30° below the horizon and got on the area, and picked up the specific target at a
Per favore
はい。ジム、機動して入りま
Roge
Хорошо. Верно. Это Джим Ловелл. Сегодня мы решили немного рассказать вам о жизни внутри «Аполлона-8». Мы уже показали вам виды Луны, виды Земли, и решили пригласить вас к нам домой. Это наш дом, по крайней мере, уже 4 дня, как вы можете видеть на приборной панели. Мы отмечаем каждый день на приборной панели. Мы уже отработали четыре дня и работаем над пятым. Конечно, все мы с нетерпением ждём посадки в пятницу. Здесь, в той части космического корабля, которую мы называем нижним отсеком оборудования, находится советник президента по физической подготовке, капитан Джим Ловелл, который собирается выполнить программу упражнений, которую мы делаем каждый день. Вы заметили, что он очень свободно перемещается внутри. Он только что ударился головой об оптику, используемую для навигации. Он работает с тренажером, предназначенным для поддержания мышц в форме. Ещё одна очень важная функция нашего космического корабля — это компьютер, и я подумал, что вам будет интересно посмотреть, что у нас здесь есть: дисплеи, которые предоставляют нам
Хорошо. Два выключателя — два автоматических выключателя на панели 250 — снова разомкнуты; два автоматических выключателя на панели 275 — снова разомкнуты; автоматический выключатель ввода/вывода питания, мы уже позаботились ранее; инвертор переменного тока 2, мы уже позаботились ранее; инвертор переменного тока 2 к шине переменного тока 1 — выключится; и инвертор переменного тока, 
하원 세입위원회는 어제 석유 회사, 은행, 공공사업체에 영향을 미치는 세제 개편안에 동의했는데, 이는 연방 정부 수입을 연간 최대 20억 달러까지 늘릴 수 있을 것으로 예상됩니다. 위원회는 또한 전화, 전기, 가스, 석유 파이프라인 회사의 회계 절차 변경과 상호저축대부기관의 세제 혜택 축소에 대해서도 잠정적으로 찬성표를 던졌습니다. 따라서 세제 개혁이 진행될 가능성
For
Howdy. The Black Watch
Ce cycle de sommeil… on va devoir improviser, je suppose. Je suis censé dormir, mais… enfin, je suis censé m'endormir bientôt, mai
I understand this is a maneuver
ا
Versea
Roger, Friendship Seven. The first part of your transmission was brok
क्या वहां से दृश्य किसी 
باز، لقد انتهينا - الشيء الوحيد الذي ينقصنا هنا هو فحص الانحراف. بعد أن ننتهي من تحميلنا، نود منك إجراء ف
ठीक है। हमने सभी से राय ली। हमें ज्यादा जानकारी नहीं है, लेकिन आपके उपभोग्य तत्व अच्छे दिख रहे हैं; आपका एंट्री गामा फिलहाल -6.01 है। हम 2.81 फुट प्रति सेकं
ठीक है।
好的，这基本一致。至于燃烧时间，我这里还是126
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, ici Houston, transmission à l'aveugle. Si vous recevez le signal, tentez la réception avec une antenne omnidirectionnelle. Tentative de réc
好的。这是近西那日加 2 秒，以便快速返回。这将是 / 62871，减 161，加 129，加 45224，减 06216，减 18712 001 287 351，十一月阿尔法星加 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296，地球向上 010，向右 37，加 1475，加 06500 13239 36913；主星天狼星，伴星参宿七 129 155 010，无空隙，假设执行中途修正 4 并使用相同的对准。确定 GERU（即高尔夫回声罗密欧统一体）的时间 5 将是；使用 NC-4 的第 1 至 10 步和 NC-8 的第 3 和 4 步。我再说一遍，使用 November Charlie 4 的第 1 至 10 步和 November 
Roger. Était-ce dû à la présence
ठीक है। वो आवाज़ एकदम साफ़ थी। जैसा कि आप जानते हैं, अभी हमारे पास ज़्यादा काम नहीं है, हम प्रवेश प्रक्रियाओं पर काम कर रहे हैं। मेरे पास शुरुआती प्रतियां हैं
VHF-A 수신기가 여
わかった、わかった。これで十分だ。外科
알겠습니
We're going to go 
로저, 2: SPS/G&N: 38320, +166, -081 080 11 3603, -01408, 모든 공 제외, -00743, 모두 0, 196 359 00657, +00537, 01592 017 01531 23 1160 138. 베가, 데네브 243 183 012, 두 개의 제트 19초, R1 20101. 육분의 별은 79 30 10과 79 52 10 사이에 있습니다. 자세는 머리를 아래로 향하고 있으며, 역행하며
हवाई कॉम टेक। सिग्मा से
Charlie, Apollo 11. J'ai quelques questions concernant l'arrêt du drone. Il me semble que la méthode la plus simple serait la suivante: nous sommes actuellement à 0 degré de lacet et nous approchons d'un tangage de 90 degrés. Il s'agit donc simplement de l'arrêter à environ 260 degrés de roulis. Que pensez-vous de la procédure suivante: passer en mode MANUEL D'ATTITUDE, puis en mode COMMANDE DE RATE, et ensuite, étant donné que notre zone morte est déjà réduite, activer les propulseurs du panneau 8. Le drone devrait alors s'immobiliser quelle que soit son attitude actuelle. Si je fais tout cela lorsqu'il atteint 261 degrés de roulis, nous devrions nous arrêter net. Est-
ठीक है। अब हम बैग के साथ काम शुरू कर रहे हैं, और अगला कदम है लाल सूट की नली (या तो कमांडर की या एलएमपी की, क्योंकि हम चाहेंगे कि आपके पास अंततः ये दोनों हों) को बैग के ऊपरी हिस्से में रखना। इसके लिए, सबसे पहले आपको यह सुनिश्चित करना होगा कि लाल नली नीली नली से अलग हो। मुझे नहीं पता कि यह पहले से किया गया है या नहीं, लेकिन अगर नहीं किया गया है, तो आपको नली की बाहरी बीटा-कपड़े की परत को पूरी लंबाई में काटना होगा और फिर उन रबर की डोरियों को भी काटना होगा जो दोनों नली को एक साथ बांधती हैं। नली
रॉजर। समझ गया। अब आपके सूट के भीत
سأشرب كمية صغيرة جداً من الماء، لكنني أخطط 
फ्रेडो, 
Wir möchten noch einige weitere Tests durchführen, und der allgemeine Konsens ist, dass wir kein besonderes Problem vermuten. Wir würden gerne die Ergebnisse von vier oder fünf weiteren Tests auswerten. Zuvor möchten wir einen dieser Null-Bias-Tests durchführen. Da wir keine Möglichkeit haben, diese Vorgänge im Downlink zu überwachen, bitten wir S
टेप रिक
まだパートナーを寝かしつけようとしているのですね。それ
आगे ब
Wally, ich kann sehen, dass deine seitlichen Triebwerke etwa 40 Fuß von uns entfernt feuern - visuell, von dem, was w
Okay. 
Apollo 8, 
Hello, Muchea. Friendsh
Хорошо. Мы просто хотим посоветовать вам использовать всю пленку. Это ваш последний эксперимент. Используйте всю имеющуюся у вас пленку по своему усмотрению. Джим здесь, и мы хотели бы немного обсудить с вами этот вход в атмосферу. Еще кое-что, Джим: мы увеличили срок службы ваших задних двигателей до 131 фута/сек, и у вас не будет расщепления пламени при ретроградном тормо
네. 제가 확인해 본 226개의 회로 차단기 중에서, 관련된 회로 차단기는 총 6개입니다. 패널 맨 아래 줄 왼쪽에서 두 번째부터 여섯 번째까지의 회로 차단기들이죠. 조명(LIGHTING) 항목 아래에 있습니다. 우리는 투광등(FLOOD) 회로 차단기 3개와 숫자/정수형 회로 차단기 3개를 모두 닫아야 합니다. (물론 완전히 닫는다는 의미가 아니라, 완전히 닫는다는 뜻입
맞아요. 그런 차는 몇 안 되죠. 그런데 가운데 창문이 심하게 뿌옇게 변해서 마치 얼음이
Родж
Ah! Ah! Ho ancora i segni neri di sbandata sulle pinne dopo la tua fuga nella boscaglia. Okay, vedi che ho virato di nuovo a destra. Devo tornare - correzione, ho virato a sinistra. Devo tornare a destra, la luna è proprio all'orizzonte. La rimetto a destra, giusto per mostrarti quanto è facile da acquisire. Sembra che io stia ritardando il mio minimo di carburante, quindi andrò avanti e ci giocherò un po' qui. Okay, siamo quasi a posto in imbardata, e ancora fuori in rollio. La schiaffeggio e ce la faremo. Arriva il rollio per raddrizzarla. Arriva il rollio - okay, mi fermo l
シグマセブン、シグマセブン、こちらムチア・キャップ・コム
Und noch eine kleine Neuigkeit: Ein weiterer Entdecker musste seinen Versuch, mit einem Papyrusboot de
यह सच है कि इतनी दूरी पर हमें रंगों की वह गहराई नहीं मिलती जो हमें 50,000 मील दूर से देखने पर मिलती थी। हालांकि, महासागर अभी भी स्पष्ट रूप से नीले हैं और महा
EMS 機能、DELT
حسناً يا جاك. أعطني الرقم التالي الذي تريدني أن أضبطه، وسأقوم بمحاولة 
好的，弗雷德。没错，只是我们正在研究的航线程序是地日航线，除此之外，你说的都对。顺便一提，这次TC+2机动看起来仍然会是每秒900英尺左右的速度，并
好的。
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。あと2
アポ
Prêt à copi
D'ac
네, 
حسناً، فريدو يتناول شيئاً ما، وجيم بد
下坡
C'est exact. Jack, ce que nous faisons, c'est que nous avons alimenté le bloc principal B, et nous y avons connecté toutes ces charges spécifiques, et nous nous préparons à sécuriser l'alimentation. Nous voulions donc nous assurer que les éléments essentiels comme l'ordinateur, la plateforme, etc., disposent d'alimentations protégées par dio
Ok. Abbiamo dato corrente e sembrava tutto a posto. Sto fissando una spia di ATTENZIONE E AVVERTENZA e tutti i segnali di allarme; e abbiamo entrambi gli interruttori X LUNAR BUS TIE INSERITI. L'interruttore dell'ILLUMINAZIONE DI SERVIZIO è INSERITO; poi il DISPLAY PQS ELIO BUS B CA; l'ILLUMINAZIONE NUMERICA BUS B CA e l'INVERTER 1 BUS B CA sono - BUS TIE CHIUSO. Poi ho chiuso l'interruttore dell'INVERTER 1 e ho selezionato, sul pannello 16, l'interruttore del SENSORE DI SEGNALE [sic] è INSERITO; ho selezionato INVERTER 1 e ho messo l'interruttore del MONITOR ELIO su SUPERCRITICO e non ho
13, Houston. suggère d'essayer MOYENNE si vous êtes en PÉRIODE DE POINTE pour voir si cela nous donn
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Вот несколько последних обновлений. В 
제 생각에는 이것들이 지금의 
とても
Ro
아니요. 굴러떨어지고 있다는 걸 알 수 있어요. 평평한 면이 저를 향하고 있을 뿐만 아니라 훨씬 더 밝아지고 크기
OK, vérification de l'alignement. -10° en tangage, -10° en lacet et -10° en roulis. Mi
Roger
패트릭
你好，休斯顿。你好，休斯顿
रॉजर, तैयार रहो। व
11，这里是休斯顿。我这里有你的 Pericynthion Plus 2 PAD，格式；准备好复制时即
Ah, quindi. Pensavo che mi sarei svegliato. E invece siamo svegli e stia
네, 맞습니다, 짐. 패널 11의 U
Хьюстон, Игл. Впер
روجر. درجة حرارة المقصورة 102
收到。步骤 6：“偏航角旋转速度达到每秒 0.3 度”，这大约需要 21 个脉冲。
안녕하세요, 카노 씨. 여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. 
Roger. Ci darai un aggiornamento per una manovra più 2 che non presuppone una
Did 
打ち上げ 16:41:00! 打ち
로저, 당신에게 다
こんばんは。私たちのミッション、アポロ11号の飛行における象徴的な側面についていくつかお話ししたいと思います。ここ2、3日、宇宙船内で起こった出来事について議論を重ねる中で、私たちは、これは単なる3人の月への旅以上のものであり、政府と産業界のチームの努力、さらには一つの国の努力をはるかに超えるものだという結論に達しました。これは、未知の世界を探求しようとする全人類の飽くなき探究心の象徴であると感じています。先日、ニール・ボルトンが初めて月面に足を踏み入れた際に述べた「これは人間にとっては小さな一歩だが、人類にとっては偉大な飛躍だ」という言葉は、まさにこの思いを的確に表していると思います。私たちは月へ行くという挑戦を受け入れました。この挑戦を受け入れることは避けられないことでした。ミッションを比較的容易に遂行できたのは、その受け入れがいかにタイムリーだったかを示すものだと私は考えています。今
You sound like you'd better protect it. It looks like
Apollo 8, Houston. Apollo 8, Houston im Blindflug. Wi
ठीक है। अब जब हम निशान लगाने की प्रक्रि
로저. 멋진 샷이었
I was wondering, do we need an A - do we need, possibly, in the - one of the AN
You're starting to get broken up, H
好了，75英尺。看起来不错；下降了半英尺。向前6英尺；灯
ठीक है। फ्रेड, मैं अपने मॉनिटर पर देख रहा हूँ कि आप चंद्रमा से 16214 मील दूर हैं और लगभग 4500 फीट प्रति सेकंड की गति 
Я вас хорошо слышу. Чувствую себя отлично, полет проходит хорошо. Я вижу Землю, полет продолжается, видимость хорошая, я все вижу четко, кое-что закрыто облаками, полет продолжается, все в поря
आपकी जानकारी के लिए, केप ने सूचित किया है कि यदि हम यहां काफी द
लीजिए
밴스, 저희는 그 시간에 가동을 시작할 계획인데, 괜찮을까요?
Le deuxième point, bien sûr, est que lorsque vous arrêtez votre contrôle thermique passif, vous êtes à environ 90 degrés par rapport à l'axe du sol. Par conséquent, lorsque vous effectuez un lacet à gauche, vous devrez continuer jusqu'à ce que l'angle de cardan central avoisine les 60 degrés. Vous obtiendrez les 30 degrés supplémentaires grâce au décalage entre la direction pointée par la caméra et votre axe X positif. La som
Vous avez raison. Il n'était pas en mode PRINC
よし、ケン。382番のプライマリとセカンダリのH2Oコントロールバルブを自動に設
Sono a metà della mia prima portata di zuppa e mi aspettano un 
关于书本，我认为我们应该更加注意所使用的环扣类型。我们已经遇到过两三次打不开的情况，而且书页也容易撕裂，无法固定在书里。我们应该考虑对环扣连接的孔洞进行加固。水枪末端的小喷嘴（用来出水的）会卡在“出”的位置，就像模拟器上那样，即使松开扳机，水也会流出来。实际上，你需要时不时地把它重新装回去，以防止从食物包装里取出水枪时，水从胶囊里流出来。还有一点，关于饮水软管，喝水的时候很容易把软
Okay. Stai decisamente
Honnêtement, nous ne l'avons pas fait
यहां सब कुछ सुचारू रूप से चल रहा 
هيوستن، 
알겠습니다. 제가
Okay, LOX dump about - I guess that'll make it a
Sì, tutti gli interruttori dei fusibili sono ancora nella stessa posizione, Gordo. Non ne ho cambiato nessuno. Lo Squib è armato, il Retrojettison automatico è disattivato. Sono su fly-by-wire, automatico e giroscopio normale. Tutte le manopole a "T" sono inserite. Il pannello di sequenza è normale, tranne il Landing B
अच्छा, मुझे देखने दो। मुझे समझ नहीं आ रहा कि दस्ताने पहनूँ या नहीं। वहाँ सब कैसा दिख रहा है? बुरा नहीं है, है ना? मुझे लगता है मैं बिना दस्तानों के ही कोशिश करूँगा। मुझे देखने दो। विज़र कहाँ है? मुझे लगता है तुमने ही मुझे दिया था, है ना? म
다
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。マニュアルモードです。ダークサイドにいる間、
Roger. Nous sommes entièrement d'accord. Pendant que vous vous y mettez, je vais lire ces notes. Appelez l'alarme de programme possible 5.6, portée supérieure à 400 milles nautiques, puis utilisez la procédure décrite au point 20. Choisissez l'option 1 dans NOUN
Roger. 
ठीक है, जिम। अब हम जो प्रक्रिया अपनाने जा रहे हैं, उसके बारे में थोड़ा बता दूं कि यह एक मैनुअल ब
제리, 온도가 좀 걱정되네요. 실내가 좀 더워지고 있고
D'accord, alors prenons la colonne de nuit: 17h31, 17
精彩的表
Ça te va si je commence ma présentati
Negative
Beh, a parte quello gran
Да, когда вы — когда вы выходите из номинальн
Ja, du meinst also, du hast da
Хорошо. И есть ещё один
Okay. Gleich sind es 88 Stunden. Ich gebe Ihnen eine
La capsule fonctionne parfaitement pour le moment. 250 (onduleur) correspond à 132 degrés, 150 (onduleur) à 5. En veille (onduleur), la température est d
메인 배터리는 모두 9와 22 1/
罗杰。我们更感兴趣的是，比如说，昨晚和前晚之间的相对
Roger. You can go ahead now and give you computer and g
Junge, diese Kontrollpunkte dürft ihr auf keinen 
…le
Роджер, я на какое-то время потерял контроль, когда вернулся к настройке 3, но ненадолго. Определенно, должно быть примерно 7,5-8. Сейчас я в режиме автоматического ретроградного управления. Скоро перейду на электронное управление. До этого я использовал гироскопы в обычном режиме, а маневрирование было отключено. Все системы работают в зелёном режиме. Однажды я резко сбросил около 2% ручного управления (топливо), нажав кнопку. Это была двойная регулировка
Верно. И мы хотим уда
分かりました。その通りです。では、その曲線上にプロットする点をいくつかお教えしましょう。現在描かれている曲線は、60マイルの近地点、つまり近月点に基づいています。そして今、62マ
Wir haben sowohl Lampen mit
Okay, Houston. Apollo 8
ओह, 
Bon, on a l'
في دائرة التبريد الثانوية، يبدو أن صمام الضغط العكسي مفتوح قليلاً. أنصحك بإعادة ضبط مفتاح نظام تبخير الوقود (EVAP) في دائرة التبريد الثانوية إلى وضع إعا
١٣
Хорошо. Автоматическ
Nur zu, Hous
Roger. Stiamo apportando una pic
और हम आपकी बात स्पष
Have to get my... and get a good... on getting out of the spacecraft. What we n
Вре
Das Herz meines Vaters tickt jetzt aber richtig los, das kann
Okay, Vance..., plus 0833.0, minus 0050.9, minus 0213.9, N/A, plus 00205, 08615, 4:24, 272, 081 and the rest N/A. Ullage two jets 10 seconds, weight 62480, weight 33452, throttle profile sam
Lasst uns in den Pl
नहीं, चार्ली। मेरे पास उतनी स्पष्टता नहीं है। लेकिन आपको थोड़ा अंदाज़ा देने के लिए, मैं टेक्सास के निचले तट पर देख सक
알겠습니다. 그때는 말씀하신 내용을 아주 또
Ci stiamo lavorando, Frank. Stiamo cercando di calcolare in termini ravvicinati cosa sarà rad
Decisamente sotto di me. L'avevo seguito sotto di me da Carnarvon in poi. Fino a Carnarvon l'avevamo tenuto sotto di noi, poi fino all'orizzonte, e poi di nuovo sotto di noi. Sembrava quasi che fosse in un'orbita diversa dalla mia. Aveva un apogeo e un perigeo diversi dai miei. Comunque, ho tentato
Verstrichene Zeit der Endphase: 1 + 29 + 17; Brenndauer: 5 + 16 + 54; Delta-V: 33,0; Dauer: 41 Sekunden; Kern 25: 00301; Kern 26: 90135; Kern 27: 00016; Delta-V: 32,9, 1,5, 1,5; Brenndauer: 4
OK
알겠습니다. CB - CB를 원하시는 거죠? 16번 스위치에 있는 ASCENT ECA CONTR
أيضًا، تجربة S-5. يطلب مركز التحكم في العمليات من الطاقم التقاط صور للتضاريس لأي مناطق مكشوفة على طول المسار الأرضي، 
11号，这里是休斯顿。通讯中的噪音似乎已经安静下
إن
Roger,
ああ、気付いたよ。以前はそれより低い数値を維持していた。異常に低かった。ブースト中に問い合わせようかと思ったけど、もういいやと諦めた。くそ、この光学系では視界
Affermativo, Jim. È quello che ti abbiamo dato ieri sera dopo la grande accensione, e lo useremo modificato da noi. Q
Okay. Bedienfeld 3: Batterieladung auf AUS stellen. Bedienfeld 5: Hauptbusverbindung BAT A/C auf BAT A/C stellen; CB-Batterieladegerät, BAT A-Ladevorgang öffnen; CB-Batterieladegerät, BAT B-Ladevorgang schließen. Als Nächstes: Bedienfeld 250: CB BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING schließen. Bedienfeld 5: Hauptbusverbindung, BAT B/C, aus. 
저희도 그
Okay. Einen Moment bit
好的
Die Lageregelung funktioniert sehr gut. Es scheint genügend manueller Treibstoff vorhanden zu sein. Ich bin noch bei 72 Prozent. Die Nickrate ist definitiv vorhanden. Die Gierachse ist recht stabil; die g-Kräfte nehmen zu. Die Kapsel ist recht stabil. Es gibt einen grünen Fluss – und hin und wieder orangefarbene Streifen. Der Wiedereintritt verläuft sehr gut. Ungewöhnlich langsame Rollbewegung. Die g-Kräfte nehmen zu. Ich habe genügend Treibstoff im Ratensteuerungs
我将要拍摄的全景照片距离地面大约有30到4
ТРАНСПОНДЕР, ВЫКЛ. ИНВЕРТОР ПЕРЕМЕННОГО ТОКА, 2, ВЫКЛ. Хорошо. Далее, панель 250: CB BAT Bravo, ОТКРОЙТЕ
Okay. At 4 minutes, "ENGINE GIMBAL" will be "OFF"; "MODE CONTROL" will be to ", 
А что если позв
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन है
सिग्मा सेवन। पिछला संदेश समझ नहीं आया, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि आपने पढ़ लिया होगा कि हमें UHF/DF
지금 오리온자리를 제대로 볼 수 있네요. 정말 아름다운 광경입니다. 플레이아데스 성
Roger. We confirm those quantities, Wally. Looks like you're in good shape. Di
निर्धारित डी-8 को निष्पादित करे
В люб
Ok. Hai letto i tuoi dati...
Хорошо, Вэнс. 
Ok, Hou
4-Aですか
أعتق
Roger. Elsewhere in the world news, the Pueblo crew landed at NAS Miramar yesterday afternoon 00, and they will spend a few days there in Balboa Hospital with their families celebrating Christmas. On the local scene here, the Retail Mercha
모든 것이 순조롭
ठीक है। आप इसे वापस एटीट्यूड मोड में ले जाकर रोल के लिए एटीट्यूड होल्ड मोड मे
Okay. Skip one, and we want FUEL CELL 2 MAIN BUS B talkback, gray; and, the next one, we want FUEL C
好的，弗雷德。只是——只是我们刚才发现的一个小细节。在最上方，倒数 6 小时，标题是“启动”，在“BA
Ты снова расстаешься, 
حسنًا يا فريد. مجرد ملاحظة بسيطة لاحظناها للتو. في أعلى الشاشة، 
11, hier spricht die Hornet. Wie hoch war der Fehler bei der Wasserung und in welchem ​​Zustand befin
哎呀，这时，这该死的狗粮袋出
Columbia, Houston. Your systems are looking good going over the hill. Approximately 7 
Okay, Jack. You remember everybody in the past has commented on seeing Moonset just a
Ита
转向前
嗨，弗兰克。博尔曼家的圣诞节早晨到了。孩
Roger, riceviamo. Radiazion
Понял. 
Jetzt scheint 
罗杰，弗雷德。我们看到了。画面很清晰，你们的描述也很到位。我们看到吉姆把摄像机调整
Здесь сложно сказать наверняка. Кажется, я вижу горизонт — там, вдалеке, но я... совсем не адаптирован к темноте; трудно определ
分かりました。まさにそ
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。この通信に応答する必要はありませんが、
Aa-ah. Think I'll g
Я ещё довольно далеко. Это определённо панель SLA — в этом нет никаких сомнен
13, Houston. Vorremmo che controllassi
وأغطي
看来得查一下桑伯恩血压计了。接下来是血压监测系统（BPMS）。吉恩，我现在对宇航服的温度非常满意，稳定在65华氏度。虽然穹顶显
Ok. Ci ho messo un po' a riordinare le idee. Alt
好的，阿波罗13号；休斯顿。月球一直在我们的屏幕上忽隐忽
Хорошо. Когда мы проведём четвёртый рейс «Аполлона»? Тот, 
Num
Roger, Neil. Starting off: Congratulatory messages on the Apollo 11 mission have been pouring into the White House from world leaders in a steady stream all day. Among the latest are telegrams from Prime Minister Harold Wilson of Great Britain and the King of Belgium. The world's press has been dominated by news of Apollo 11. Some newsmen estimate that more than 60 percent of the news used in papers across the country today concerned your mission. The New York Times which, as we mentioned before, has had such a demand for its edition of the paper today (even though it ran 950 000 copies) said it will reprint the whole thing on Thursday as a souvenir edition. And Premier Alexei Kosygin has sent congratulations to you and President Nixon through former Vice President Humph
J'ai quelques photos du lanceur, peut-être 17 ou 18, prises ensemble. Puis, en descendant vers l'horizon, du nord au sud. On aperçoit la lune, qui se couche à peine. Je remonte l'appareil photo à ce 
Roger
Roger. On dirait que tu as de très bonnes notes. On 
Roger, Jack. Die Entlüftung scheint wirklich... Wie ich bereits
알아요, 알아요 — 295. A 온도 — 87. A 압력 — 3000. B 온도 — 82. B 압력 — 2650. 주 전류계 — 19. 2번 — 19.5. 1A — 4.5. 1B — 4.5. 1C — 4. 2A — 5. 2B — 4 3/4. 2C — 4 3/4. 직류 전압 23.5V. S1 — 29. S2 — 29. C — 27. 1A
休斯顿，宁静号。我这里有你的上升点和数据PAD，准
Read you loud and c
Роджер. Да, это было на светлой стороне. Земля была освещена примерно на две трети, терминатор находился у горизонта. А теперь свет исходил с противоположного края Земли, солнечного края, примерно на четверть-треть радиуса от края. В целом, он располагался относительно линии, проведенной перпендикулярно терминатору и проходящей через центр. Конец
रॉजर। उन्होंने इसे अपलोड कर दिया और सत्यापित 
इस खरगोश के सूट में वो कसरत बहुत थकाने वाली होती है। मैं अब वो 
حسناً. فهمت. إذا أردت ا
«Дружба Семь», Канаверал Ком Тех
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। आपकी सर्किट ब्रेकर चेकलिस्ट में, पैनल 11 और 16 पर, हम चाहत
روجر، تبدو فكرة جيدة. ويقول لنا المسؤول على الأرض أن الطيار سيقوم بتشغيل سخان خط تنقية الهيدروجين، وسنس
どうぞ。ちょうど電池について話して
حسنًا. إليكم واحدة: دخل وقف إطلاق النار المقرر مسبقًا لمدة 72 ساعة من قبل الفيت كونغ حيز التنفيذ اليوم، قبل 17 ساعة من بدء الهدنة التي كان من المقرر أن تستمر
حسنًا. اللوحة 3: شحن البطارية، مُطفأ - لقد فعلت ذلك بالفعل يا جاك - التالي: مُحوّل التيار المتردد، اللوحة 5: توصيل ناقل التيار الرئيسي بين البطارية B
收到。吉姆，你的声音很清晰。我们想趁你起床的时候，把你的阅读内容抄写下来，我们建议你修改一下第
Shoot, yo
ठीक है। और एक्वेरियस, अब हमें आपको दूसरी वेबसाइट पर 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. يمكنك العودة إلى BLOCK باستخدام جهاز ال
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हमने टेप डंप का काम पूरा कर लिया 
वैंस, क्या तुम मेरे सा
Tranquility Base, this is Houston. You are GO for cabin depressu
ठ
Roger. Con una visibilità così buona o comunicazioni così buone, ti daremo solo una descrizione verbale senza vedere il telescopio a scansione in questo momento. I tuoi angoli di manovra per Arturo erano piuttosto buoni. Ho Arturo centrato nel telescopio a scansione. A questo angolo del sole, c'è un fascio di luce direttamente attraverso il centro del telescopio a scansione e... una banda di luce. Impedisce di vedere molte stelle intorno a noi, e anche se ho tenuto l'occhio incollato al telescopio per un po' di tempo, è molto difficile vedere qualsiasi schema stellare o altro. Non potrei riconoscerlo con Arturo a meno che... l'ottica non mi abbia semplicemente s
أبولو 11، هيوس
Роджер. Итак, что касается положения относительно траектории движения, информация об этом появится на планшете, но, по сути, мы ищем локальное горизонтальное ретроградное движение, что означает, что, используя ось X, если вы проведете горизонтальную линию на «рогах» Земли, а затем повернетесь, чтобы направить ось X в сторону Солнца, мы — это поместим нас в положение относительно траектории движения; и вы можете проверить это с помощью Солнца, которое будет находиться в точке 2. Оно должно располагаться прямо вдоль курсора вверху. Мы еще кое-что скажем об этом чуть поз
好的，吉姆。我想我们现在要问你的就这些了。如果你暂时没有其他问题了，我们希望你重新配置一下语音备份功能。具体操作是，像往常一样将语音功能开关拨到语音备份位置，但这次不要拉断电开关，而
روجر. جيميني 8، هيوستن. نودّ إطلاعكم على آخر مستجدات الاتصال بينما لدينا بعض الهدوء هنا. سنكون في تاناناريف خلال دقيقتين؛ وسنلتقطكم فوق كارنارفون في وقت قريب؛ ثم ستصلنا المركبة رقم 1 في حوالي الساعة 10:00 صباحًا؛ وبعد ذلك، سيتم تحويل الاتصال إلى ميركوري ثم
Let see. Elsewhere in the national news, the newlyweds, David and Julie Eisenhower, came away from their secret honeymoon hideaway to have Christmas dinner with President-elect Nixon and the family. In New York city, the world's busiest harbor was reduced to almost complete inactivity Christmas day, due to a 5-day old longshoreman strike and a rare hiatus in shipping schedule. No ships arrived or left the h
حسناً، أعتقد أن هذا ص
ह्यूस्टन, कु
हैलो, बरमूडा फ्लाइट। आपकी आवाज़ स
Esatto. Hai c
哥
Roger. Comme je l'ai mentionné, l'objectif principal est de vérifier votre capteur de débit d'oxygène. Cependant, nous avons encore besoin d'environ deux heures d'enrichissement en air de la cabine. Nous souhaitons donc maintenir la ventilation que nous allons installer en marche. Bien. Veuillez installer le raccord rapide de la ventilation de la cabine, situé dans le compartiment R-6 (Romeo 6), sur le connecteur d'urine du panneau 251. Une fois cette opération terminée, vérifiez que la vanne de ventilation du compartiment des eaux usées est fermée, puis ou
Okay. Einen Moment bitte; wir prüfen das. Können Sie
わかりました。これは、先ほど述べたように、すべての降下用バッテリーがオンライン
De na
Gemini 4, this is Houston CAP COM. I would like to update your Flight Plan for the next 4 hours. Are you ready to copy
Хорошо
また、ニクソン大統領は、月曜日に連邦政府職員全員の参加日を宣言しました。これは、皆さ
रॉजर। हमारे पास एक कैमरा बाहर है और सा
알겠습니다. 그러니까 5018용으로 알려주신 각도는 A 모델용이었기 때문에 5018에는 적합하지 않고, 따라서 폐기해야 한다는 말씀
الآن، الخطوة المهمة التالية، بعد التحقق 
روجر. كنا أكثر فضولاً بشأن كمية الرطوبة النسبية بين، على سبيل المثال، الليلة الماضية والليلة التي سبقتها، حيث كان من المفترض أن تح
بينما كنتُ بالخارج، لاحظ
Fred, wir haben dich jetzt auf der großen Goldstone-Antenne, und unsere Kommunikation ist viel bess
यह सच है कि इतनी दूरी पर हमें रंगों की वह गहराई नहीं मिलती जो हमें 50,000 मील दूर से देखने पर मिलती थी। हालांकि, महासागर अभी भी स्पष्ट रूप से नीले हैं और महाद्वीप आमतौर पर भूरे रंग के हैं, हालांकि यह सच है कि अब वे पहले की तुलना में अधिक धूसर 
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. До начала осталось 2 минуты, сейчас будет 86 + 28 + 
收到。现在月球表面温度是22度。上次我错过了地球
Das stimmt. Alle sind mit der Arbeit am Erdhorizont sehr zufrieden; und was uns betrifft, können Sie da
로저, 케이프 캡 컴퍼니 오토 원
프랭크, 빌이 깨어나면 나한테 연
Это верно
阿波
- - 약 70도 정도입니다
Ripeti Hou
रॉजर, लगभ
عليكِ الضغط ع
캘 오
Это 3,5. Вы в автоматическом режиме? Проверьте давление в салоне при 3,5 и установите давление в контуре корректора в диапазо
다른 한 가지 더 살펴보실 점은, 창문에 김 서림 현상이 나타나는지, 특히 햇빛이 김 서림의 강도에 어떤 영향을 미치는지, 혹은 햇빛에 따라 김 서림이 더 심해지거나 옅어지거나
プラス100からプラス101.
Roger. I say again, the instructions that I just gave you should end up having the camera looking out the window and about 30 degrees yawed left from your plus X-axis, so I suggest you get the camera set up that way early; and if there are an
わかった。少しだけだ
Когда дело доходит до такой степени, оч
そうです。その3分前に口腔内温度計を口に入れてください。グアイマス上空ではタイプ1
Rog
क्या आपको राहत क्षेत्र का मौसम प
알겠습니다. 컴
姿勢制御は良好です。手動燃料は十分なようです。まだ72%です。この時点で、ピッチの周期的なレートは確実に確保されています。ヨーはかなり硬く、Gが増加しています。カプセルは非常に安定しています。緑色の気流があり、時折オレンジ色の筋が見えます。再突入は非常
了解。もうすぐここに尿を捨てないといけないんだけど、
«Аполлон-8», пока мы ждём высокого усиления, я продолжу краткое описание траектории. Мы всё ещё можем вернуться к средней линии Тихого океана с тринадцатой позиции, и вы будете на пути после 138 секунд работы двигателя. Это 138 секунд, чтобы вывести вас из зоны «бабочки». Мы рекомендуем не пытаться использовать преждевременное зажигание или перезапуск после 20 секунд. Если вы превысите 20 секунд, это может привести к тому, что траектория выйдет за пределы возможностей коррекции и свободного возврата. Погода в районе посадки хорошая. У нас есть слежение за вами и без него. Во время работы двигателя вы можете заметить небольшое изменение давления в камере сгорания и в баках из-за истощения топлива в накопительном баке и его попадания в отстойник. Это может произойти примерно через 2-5 секунд после начала работы двигателя. Это будет небольшое изменение давления в обеих системах. Что касается систем, все они готовы к работе. После этого нам нужно остановить кипение воды для целей траектории. Ваша ситуация со сбросом воды выглядит хорошо; У вас должно быть достаточно воды, даже больше, чем ожидалось. Мы постараемся отложить сброс воды до 5. Перед этим мы хотели бы перемешать криогенные элементы — поправка. Следующая продувка топливных элементов произойдет примерно в, и это будет водородная батарея A (34,9), батарея B (39,1) и Charlie (38,5). У нас есть возможность использовать один криогенный бак: судя по результатам предыдущих запусков, можно ожидать, что обычный запуск займет примерно на 3,7 секунды больше, чем расчетные значения. Производительность двигателя выглядит номинальной, и все параметры остаются стабильными. Все выглядит хорошо; все четыре квадрокоптера, согласно компьютерным программам, имеют примерн
もちろんうまくいくよ。あんなにきれいなコックピットなら、何でもう
और हम आपको दिखा रहे है
Houston, A
Wi
알겠습니다. 획득 GET는 03:07, R의 GET는 248n
كيف كان ذلك - هل هذا هو الجزء الأول من فحص مقارنة 
Oh, no, there is a poss
حسنًا
This is Texas Cap
Gemini VI, Houston. Se ci state leggendo, siamo in attesa della vostra accensione e del conto alla rovescia. Abbiamo 4 mi
收到。确认操作
Okay. Im Wesentlichen möchten Sie, dass wir über die Schwingungssequenz während der frühen S-II-Abschaltung des mittleren Triebwerks sprechen und auch die Schwingungen beschreiben, die wir während 
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 다
Es ist etwa 5:25 Uhr, wir fliegen gerade über Südamerika. Dort unten tobt eine ganze Reihe von Gewittern, die so hell sind, dass sie di
谢谢
Roger. Un instant, s'il vous plaît. Lors de l
Роджер
罗杰。我有一张 10-Charlie 123 的星历表。1+45。01 天 05 13 47。13+37。11 DELTA：087。1+54。01 天 07 10 46。08+42。GMTRB 12+35。103。ΔV 0，01 天 06 08 44。09+06。17+59。
よし、ジャック。今読んでいる角度は？月を中央に配置したんだけど、8ボールの角度とかなり近いと思う。どんなエ
D'accord. Très bien. Disons qu'il y a aussi une cartouche primaire de rechange là-bas, n'est-ce pas? Donc, ça tient 
Einen Moment bitte; einen Moment bitte. Du brauchst den – Moment, Jack, ich brauche das andere Notizbuch,
Apollo 8, Ap
Descrivendo la fascia blu. C'è una fascia blu relativamente scura proprio sulla superficie terrestre, poi una fascia azzurra, poi un'altra fascia blu scura, poi una grande fascia bianca che è il bagliore dell'aria, e poi una nera profonda che va da un blu grigiastro a un nero denso. Sembra quasi di essere sotto una nuvola di pioggia, per quanto riguarda la transizione dalla fascia blu all'oscurità totale. E accenderò le luci della punta delle dita. E Mercurio è proprio all'orizzonte. Arturo dovrebbe essere in vista, ma immagin
नहीं, नहीं, एक मिनट रुकिए। इस पर लिखा है "डॉकिंग प्रोब, एक्सटेंड/रिलीज़, टू ऑफ", है
フ
わかりました。ENTERを押して、23 ENTERを押します。そして、レジスタ1にボール4個（2）、レジスタ2にすべてのボール、レジスタ3にボール2個（210）をロードします。次に
رو
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。还有一分钟，准
マーク。
オンボードマッ
Мы готовы к проведению ваш
ヒ
11, this is Houston. We're ready, except that we'd like to get the high gain antenna prior to this test. O
わかりました。今度は左側にある月を使っています。これでかなり良い修正ができました。姿勢指示器を隠して、ヨー角を確認してみましょう。ジャイロをフリーにして、今度はフライ・バイ・ワイヤの低高度を選択し
Ein paar Kleinigkeiten noch für Sie: Wir bitten Sie, das Laden von Batterie B jetzt einzustellen; außerdem benötigen wir eine Kryo-Umrührung für 2 Minuten an allen vier Stellen; und bitte stellen Sie Ihren UP TELEMETRY-Schalter auf BLOCK, dann sind Sie b
Increasing, h
11, Houston. On that TV, our commentary - The monitor I was looking at was delayed about 12 seconds, 12 to 15 seconds while it went through our color converter. It was probably - You thought I was crazy, but
了解。今、カノが血圧を測りたいと言っているのが聞こえます
It is not twice as thick. It's thinner, but it is located at a distance about twice as fa
Roger, Houston. Columbia… en haut. J’ai gardé les yeux rivés sur le sextant à ce moment-là, espérant apercevoir un reflet du miroir lunaire, mais je n’ai pu distinguer aucune des zones de balayage que vous m’
알겠습니다. 이제 달을 떠났으니 좀 더 일상적인 일들을 이야기해 볼까요? 음식 분야에서 어떤 발전이 있었는지 간단히 살펴보겠습니다. 아마 이미 보셨겠지만, 음료수 용기도 있습니다. 잠시 후 마이크가 수소를 걸러내는 새로운 필터가 장착된 물총의 작동법을 보여줄 겁니다. 기본적으로 이 물총을 이쪽 끝에 넣고 이 주머니에 물을 
Хорошо, Джек. Ты скопировал сообщение "Возврат газа в 
现在吉姆那边是白天，我这边还能看到一些星星。看来航天器可以调
Okay. Vance, preparati per il discorso pri
Ach, so schlimm ist es gar 
And, Jim, earlier in the evening, we thought there was a misunderstanding about the amount of potable water you can drink, but we want to advise yo
Okay. There's not a whole lot to it. Well, let's see, we'll start with the - Let's start with sports, what the heck. The Astros survived 8 to 7, the Braves got five or six runs in the - five runs in the ninth inning, but they just made it; and in the other important game of the day, the Cubs were rained out. I have all the rest of the scores, you can tell me if you want any of them. They had 
صحيح. إنها واحدة من القلائل التي تتمتع بهذه المي
Bene. Verso il minuto 114:10, tutto ciò che si trova sotto "Altitudine impostata uguale a 60 migli
はい、これが最後に見送った点です。ここで決定を待っている間に、続けましょう。許容範囲とされるデッドバンドは660～770psiです。言い換えれば、この2つの圧力の間の圧力になる立ち上がり時間であれば、103時間後あたりで臨界圧力を下回ることができます。ですから、その範囲内に収まると予想しており、もしそうであれば問題ありません。もし770～800psiの範囲であれば、59時間後に再度圧力を確認してください。詳細な手順
Die Kabinentemperatur steigt. Auch die Temperatur im Anzug scheint zu steigen. Ich lasse es bis 02:25:00 Uhr draußen, um zu sehen, ob die Temperatur dadurc
哥伦比亚，休斯顿，加上 12 个名词 84，如果你准备
Okay. Das ist erledigt. Als Nächstes wechseln wir zur primären CO2-Kartusche, entfernen die sekundäre Kartusche
——球……回到——好的。我想，我们现在想要的是范斯接下来的态度，我们会在控球的时候
了解。君たちをここで手続きに巻き込ませようとしているわけではない。もちろん、これは邪魔をしないという原則に基づ
Роджер. Я прослушал часть вашего разговора на Канарских островах и услышал ваши комментарии о погоде над Африкой. Не могли бы вы предос
Roger. Wir haben
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, hier spricht Zanzibar Com Tech, gesendet auf 
هذا صحيح يا فريد. ليس لدينا إجراءات محددة لذلك حتى
नहीं, जिम। हमारे पा
ठीक है। जैक, अभी हम ऐसा नहीं कर सकते। सूर्य की रोशनी थ्रस्टर्स से परावर्तित हो रही है और दुर्घटना के समय जो भी मलबा गिरा था, वह अभी भी हमारे साथ है, जिससे तारे देखना मुश्किल हो रहा है। और क्यों - आप हमसे खिड़की से तारे देखने के लि
待
En fait, c'est une correction, il n'est pas encore descendu. Il est juste en train d'arriver. Je vais vous donner un aperçu de mon mode de contrôle. Je suis en mode automatique, le commutateur de dérivation est normal, manœuvre désactivée. Le niveau de ca
मुझे समझ आ ग
散热器处于
테이프가 아직 돌아가고 있는 것 같은데 빨간불이 아직 안 켜졌네요. 테이프 레코더 표시등 위치가 정말 마
No, C and D are... 3, anywa
نعم. لا أعتقد أننا كنا نواجه صعوبة في رفع الرأس. شعرتُ أن لديّ مساحة كافية للرأس، واستطعتُ بالفعل... خفض الكلاب والتحكم بها. بدا أننا نبذل جهدًا أكبر قليلًا في الإغلاق 
Die Kapsel funktioniert momentan einwandfrei. 250 (Wechselrichter) entspricht 132 Grad, 150 (Wechselrichter) entspricht 5 Grad. Standby (Wechselrichter) entspricht 120 Grad... Triebwerke... rechts, über 100 Grad links. Neigu
Ther
روجر، فهمت. هل أ
Say again
不，不多。按照G&C检查清单
Roger. Du siehst vom 
Okay. Wir arbeiten noch an der Druck
Понял. Мы проверим этот канал связи. То, что показывали по телевизору, было... Мы хотели бы получить сигнал примерно на 10 минут в Голдстоуне, чтобы посмотреть качество изображения с камер здесь, в Хьюстоне, примерно на 10 минут, когда они снова соединят нас. Мы говорили о том, что можно снимать как внутри, так и 
Oui, j'ai accroché les punaises au mur de mon bureau. L'altimètr
Gemini VIII, Houston CAP COM. Noch ei
Roger. Wir haben wieder nur einen Ventilator. Ich denke, wir schalten den zweit
जेमिनी 4, सीएसक्यू कैप कॉम। क्या आपके 
कोलंबिया, यह ह्यूस्
Okay. Man muss wirklich im manuellen Modus sein, damit
了解しました、ヒューストン。
أبولو 8، هيوستن. ما نحتاجه ه
ठीक है, मैं जिम से बात
Bene. Ab
아니요. 사실, 저는 주변을 살펴보고 습기가 있는지 확인하기 위해 꽤 오랫동안 전면 패널을 열어둔 채로 작동시켜 왔습
ロケット誘導システムはどちらも良好な状態です。ロケット誘導システムが切断される確率は99%以上と推定されます。つまり、状況は非
Aspetta, 
रॉजर। मैं फिर से दोहराता हूँ, मैंने अभी जो निर्देश दिए हैं, उन
好的。
Nous ferions mieux de le fai
Okay
OK, 13; Houston. Le pilote indique que la purge de la poussée est terminée; les soupapes de décharge non propulsives sont maintenant ouver
Okay. Get - This won't be as long as - as the one T. K. read up, but you'll need several
لم ألمس وحدة التحكم اليدوية هنا منذ حوالي 20 دقيقة، ولم تتحرك خارج نطاق الصفر؛ لم أره
はい、ジャック。ちょっと質問があります。司令船のキャニスターはここでどれくらい持ちます
아름다운 별들이 보이고, 캡슐 자체에서 나와 떠다니는 듯한 작은 흰 물체들도 보입니다. 만약 그것들이 궤도 수정용이라면 정말 멋진 
Roger. I think the only problem I have is the suit circuit. I'll work on it for awhile and see
罗杰，阿尔。我还有——我还有30秒就到时
阿
로저. 1-4 01 00 16; RET RB, 20 + 08; 왼쪽으로 85를 굴리
حسنًا. مع تعديل بسيط، ستكون مدة نومك حوالي 77 ساعة، وهي فترة الظلام. يجب على القائد وفريق القيادة تناول الطعام بين الساعة 68 و69، وعليك تناول الطعام بين الساعة 69 و70 بعد استيقاظك مباشرة. تركنا ساعةً يستيقظ فيها الجميع معًا لمناقشة الأمور. تفض
Roger. Ich lese Ihre Frage zu „eins nach dem anderen“. Scheint, als hätten wir hier eine super Einstellung zur Stabilisierung gewählt. Wir lesen Sie jetzt in Hintergr
روجر. أعتقد أن الخبراء
हम प्रयोग डी-9 करने की तैयारी कर रहे हैं, और संभवतः हमारे पास आपके लिए कोई प्रसारण नहीं होग
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 3분 후에 안테나를 교체하겠습니다. 통신에 일시적인 문제가 발생할 수
Roger. Capisco. Stavo guardando dove l'ottica automatica stava tracciando, in media, e ho capito che 
Роджер. 4 пересмотрено: SPS/G&N: 38320, минус 055, плюс 060 084 30 2749, плюс 31380, плюс 03475, минус 01032; крен NA, тангаж 034. Остальная часть PAD NA. Заполнение двух реактивных дви
Okay. Ich schildere Ihnen meine Beobachtungen zum Hauptbus B. Dort ging alles ziemlich schnell. Zuerst hörten wir den Aufprall, die Explosion oder was auch immer es 
Да, мы перешли на адаптер, когда начали экспер
Roger.
روجر. هذا بالضبط ما كنت قلقاً ب
Sai
Roger. We're seeing the center of the Earth as viewed from the spacecraft in the eastern Pacific Ocean. We have not been able to visually pick up the Hawaiian Island chain, but we can clearly see the western coast of North America. The United States, the San Joaquin Valley, the High Sierras, Baja California, and Mexico down as far as Acapulco, and the Yucatan Peninsula; and you can see on through Central America to the northern coast of South America, Venezuela, and Colombia. I'm not sur
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. عند بدء تشغيلها، كانت تدخل في وضع التوجيه في محور الانعراج، مما يؤدي إلى اختلال المحاور الأخرى. استمرت على هذا الحال لفترة، حيث كانت تنحرف 
Да, подтверждаю, Одиссей. А ещё выклю
飛行序盤にブースターについてデブリーフィングしていた内容の続きです。暗闇に入った後、高度1200フィート（約360メートル）くらいでブースターとの位置関係を保とうとしましたが、その時ブースターとの距離を判断できるのは点滅灯の間隔だけでした。時折、点滅灯が1つ見え、次に2つ見え、また1つ見え、そして2つ見えるまでかなり時間がかかることもありました。これはブースターが常に回転していることを示していました。ブースターがどちらの方向に進んでいるのか、ほとんど見当もつきませんでした。2つの灯が見えた時の間隔から判断すると、カーナボン付近まではブースターとかなり良い位置にいると感じていました。その時は、かなり急速に接近しているように見えましたが、確信は持てませんでした。それまでに加算したΔVはすべてブースターの方向、つまり逆行方向だったのです。残念なことに、あの忌々しいブースターは、私が近づこうとすると正方向の姿勢を取らなければならないような位置に着いてしまい、しばらくするとまた離れてしまう羽目になりました。それから45分から40分ほど暗闇が続いたので、自分がどこにいるのか全く分からなくなってしまいました。暗闇
रॉजर। समझ गया। 
Okay. Die Informationen darunter, beginnend mit „Kamera-Erdschein-Fotos konfigurieren“ bis einschließlich „Dunkelheitsfilter erse
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। कैनरी पर आगे; 37:04 पर ताननारिव, सिम्प्लेक्स अल
Okay. Brennregeln. Wir sollten den Brennvorgang abbrechen, wenn der Schubmonitor 77 % oder weniger anzeigt; 2. wenn der Treibstoffdruck unter 160 psi liegt; 3. wenn das Verhältnis von Treibstoff zu Oxidator Δp ​​größer als 25 ist (dies führt zu einer Bodenwarnung); 4. wenn der Lagefehler ± 10 Grad beträgt (außer bei Anlaufvorgängen). Okay. Die Ratenbegrenzungen liegen bei ± 10 Grad pro Sekunde. Außerdem sollten die Kontrollleuchten für die Triebwerksaufhängung, ISS mit Programmalarm, CES DC und Inverter (falls nach dem Umschalten der Inverter noch leuchten) aufleuchten. Falls das Triebwerk während des Brennvorgangs abschaltet, wenn die NOUN 97 blinkt, sollten wir PRO aktivieren, manuell Treibstoff ablassen, den Startknopf drücken und die Triebwerkssteuerung für den Abstieg aktivieren. Wenn wir kein
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है, 3 प्लस 42 पर। हम लगभग जोहान्सबर्ग के ऊपर से गुजर रहे होंगे, इस दर्रे से मुझे दक्षिणी अफ्रीका का कुछ भी
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Я показываю — я попытался сбросить настройки, и топливные ячейки 1 и 3 показывают серые флажки, но при этом
好的。进入第一步；测试 
Lasst uns in
11番、こちらヒューストンです。操縦中にデルタPの測定値
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Indian Cap Com. Wir lesen 
مرحباً، شركة
Роджер. Этот ACA, вышедший из фиксации, не совсем сработал, потому что переключатели управления режимами были выключены. Запросите управление наведением, а затем вернитесь обра
That's affirm. I'm going to first of all just quickly run through the times of the major events, and then we'll go back and fill in some of the details. Okay. Entry interface is at 142 hours 40 minutes; 6-1/2 hours, roughly prior to that or at about, we'll start this whole thing going by applying HEATER POWER, by checking the CM/ temperatures and preheating the CM/ if required, and we suspect we'll probably want to do that. We'll have detailed procedures up for it later. At about 6 hours prior to or about, we will commence powering up the, powering up the, using the modified / 30-minute checklist, which you have used for the previous midcourse. Then shortly, just before 5 hours, prior to or at about, we'll want you in the attitude for a body axis alinement, using the Earth terminator like we did before; and as soon as we have that, we'll perform -7, which looks like, now, about a 2-foot-per-second burn or about 15 seconds of. And I'm told that it's down to 1-1/2 now, so it's comfortably within the margin. Okay. When we do that, we'll immediately start the maneuver to the service module jettison attitude, which will be in plane since we're jettisoning it earlier than we usually do. We don't need, and don't want, the out-of-plane component. So it'll be in plane with the service module pointed back out along the radius vector. We will then commence to get the command module ready for service module SEP, including command module checkout and hot fire, and at approximately 4 hours and 30 minutes prior to or, we'll jettison the service module. We'll pitch the up until we aquire the service module in the... and try and get some photographs, but we're not going to fool around with translation maneuvers for pictures because we don't want to screw up - foul up your flight path angle at that time. Okay. That gives us 2 hours to - of more or less open time here to finish up, if we're late on that, to go on over to checklist and prepare for powering up the command module. We're going to start the command module full powerup at minus 2 hours and 30 minutes or. We'll get the computer on the line, we'll get the up, we'll start uplinking your state vectors, and so forth, and alining the command module platform. At about 1 hour and 30 minutes at the latest, giving us an hour to do this command module stuff, we will start the maneuver to the jettison attitude. You'll then start to close o
罗杰。来自公共事务办公室的最新消息：阿波罗11号仍然是全球新闻的焦点。只有四个国家——共产主义中国、朝鲜、北越和阿尔巴尼亚——尚未向其公民通报您的登月飞行和登月。一位记者表示，他已经找不到合适的词语来形容您的成功。今晚，尼克松总统计划在华盛顿观看全明星棒球赛。赛后，他将前往太平洋回收区。周三晚上，他将从约翰斯顿岛乘直升机前往海军通信舰“阿灵顿”号。周四早上，他将再次登上直升机，飞往“大黄蜂”号，以便及时观看您的溅落。陪同总统的有国务卿威廉·罗杰斯和弗兰克·博尔曼。他们将与太平洋舰队司令约翰·西德尼·麦凯恩海军上将一起在回收舰的舰桥上观看溅落。总统在“大黄蜂”号上的停留结束后，将启程前往亚洲访问，并按计划访问罗马尼亚。据信，月球15号探测器在绕月飞行52圈后，于昨日坠入危机海。苏联塔斯社报道称，探测器在近月空间进行了“科学”研究。乔德雷尔班克天文台的伯纳德·洛弗尔爵士表示，月球15号以约300英里/小时的速度撞击月球表面。越南近来局势相对平静。巡逻的美国大兵被发现携带收音机收听你们的航班。驻越美军广播电视网对此次任务进行了全程报道。埃及和以色列在苏伊士运河沿线的冲突仍在继续。联合国观察员正在努力制止冲突。在华盛顿，众议院筹款委员会投票决定将27.5%的石油枯竭补贴削减至20%。休斯顿地区已经下了好几次雨。今天多云，预计还会有阵雨。体育方面，正如我们之前提到的，全明星赛今晚举行。昨天没有比赛。昨晚在纽约，美国棒球作家协会将贝比·鲁斯评为史上最伟大的棒球运动员，乔·迪马乔则被评为在世最伟大的棒球运动员。弗兰克·博尔曼在为球员举办的晚宴上宣布了这一消息。乔·纳马斯在纽约喷气机队的训练营进行了一整天的训练。大约500名孩子想要触摸“百老汇乔”，五名警察费了好大劲才控制住他们。他说自己感觉很好，如果教练威布·尤班克允许，他将参加8月1日的全明星赛。休斯顿油人队在克尔维尔的训练营昨天下雨了，但训练仍在继续。有一些轻微的伤病，但都不算严重。教练沃利·莱姆对目前的训练情况感到满意。油人队预计将有超过3万名观众观看与布法罗队的季前赛。显
Qual è la pres
Давай, Хьюстон. А
Roger, Fred. Readback correct. The sextant star is 26, and the shaft is 15.54. Over
罗杰
Apollo 13, Houst - Aq
फ्रैंक, यह हट रहा है। यह हमारे टीवी स्क
Shutdown, I'll get both DELTA-V THRUST, NORMAL switches,
قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية مغلق 
알겠습니다. 그럼 다음번에는 모든 매개변수를 특별
Да. Не забудьте указать меня как БЕСПЛАТНОГО участника, потому что, возможно, — ну, вы понимаете, — ничего не полу
네, 알겠습니다. 잠시
मैं कह रहा था कि, ह्यूस्टन, *** रुककर एक तस्वीर वगैरह ले लो और फिर बगल में चल
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات لوصف نجاحكم. من المقرر أن يشاهد الرئيس نيكسون الليلة مباراة البيسبول في واشنطن. بعد المباراة، سيتوجه إلى منطقة عمليات الإنقاذ في المحيط الهادئ. مساء الأربعاء، سينتقل من جزيرة جونستون بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى سفينة الاتصالات البحرية أرلينغتون. ثم صباح الخميس، سيعود إلى الطائرة الهليكوبتر ويتجه إلى حاملة الطائرات هورنت في الوقت المناسب لمشاهدة هبوطكم في المحيط. سيرافق الرئيس وزير الخارجية ويليام روجرز وفرانك بورمان. سيشاهدون الهبوط من على متن سفينة الإنقاذ مع الأدميرال جون سيدني ماكين الابن، 
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir möchten Ihr Band vor der Verbrennung entsorge
Atteggiamenti tutti entro i limiti. Non ho alcun problema a mantenere l'assetto con il fly-by-wire
Neil, schau dir die neg
Wir müssen unsere Arbe
はい、その通りです、CAP COM。中間航路での機動に関連する作業については、数時
नहीं, मुझे नहीं लगता कि यह सही है। मेरा विज़र खुला हुआ था; अब बंद है। मुझे 
こんにちは、イーグル。ヒューストン。待機しています。オーバー
罗杰。没错，吉姆。为了回答你的问题并纠正一点，偏航角应该是你当前的偏航角，不管它是多少，也就是横滚0度、俯仰角90度、当前偏航角。还有一点，你说的是禁用，但你没听清后面的内容。应该是禁用加X推进器。最后，在接近结尾的地方，
Houston, we're
ठीक है। "जब दरें 0.05 डि
몇 시간이나 
Похоже, пленка для командного м
看看我们是否
로저, 
11번, 귀하의 우주선에서 
네. 통합 버전으로 테스트
ह्यूस्
...ठीक
Confermiamo l'a
अगर आप उसे जगा सकते हैं, तो क्यों न आप उससे पिछल
了解、ジャック、ヒューストン。さあ、どうぞ。ENTER、
알겠습니다. 우선, 기본적인 원칙은 이 규칙들이 엄격한 제한을 적용하는 모드 I 비상 정지 규칙과 유사해야 한다는 것입니다. 이제 하나씩 설명해 드릴 테니 잘 따라 쓰세요. 좋습니다. 다음 중 하나라도 발생하면 엔진을 정지해야 합니다. 추력 모니터 판독값이 77% 이하인 경우; 추진제 탱크 압력(흡입 압력)이 기체 내부 판독값 기준으로 160 이하인 경우; 연료 대 산소 압력 차이가 25psi를 초과하는 경우(이 경우에는 지상 관제소에 보고해야 합니다); 시동 과도 현상을 제외하고 자세 오차가 ±10도인 경우; 자세 변화율 제한이 ±10도/초인
Это «Дружба Семь». Капсула, похоже, держится нормально, но, кажется, мы отклонились от курса. Подтв
了解しました。システムは基本的に問題なさそうです、ビル。あと数分でクライオファンサイクルが始まりますので、準備ができたら実行してくださ
حسنًا. الآن يا فريد، لقد كان ذلك جيدًا في قائمة التحقق. هذا كل ش
Ok, abbiamo il tuo carico Gemini. Non siamo riusciti a far entrare TR. Abbiamo ricevuto un rifiuto di un veicolo spaziale su TR, ed è entrato in questo momento. Vorrei darti un hack su TR
... بعد مرورها، 
是的，已设置
Roger. See you 
Вперед, 
Proce
네. 지금 15,000km 지점에 도달했으니, 곧 조금씩 자세히 설명해 드리겠습니다. 15,000km 안에 들어왔으니, 
了解。実験MSC-2とMSC-3のオンとオフ
Rog. Je ne sais pas exactement ce qui s'est passé quand on s'est approchés, mais je peux te dire une chose: je suis content qu'on ait passé autant de temps à s'entraîner à
जेमिनी 4, सीएसक्यू। हमारे पास बस 
Честно говоря, одним из самых красивых зрелищ, которые я видела, был вид на южную оконечность Флориды, остров Куба, Пуэр
好的。好的，BAT Charlie电
ठीक है। रडार पर हम
Ric
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन 
11日、ヒューストンです。朝のニュースにご興味があれば、PAOからの要約をこちらに
حسناً. انتظر
Okay, ich wollte Ihnen gerade von der Übergabe berichten, die wir eben hatten, aber ich war etwas s
Фре
了解。113時30分に酸素燃
O
Ich habe einige Bilder der Boosterstufe, vielleicht 17 oder 18, insgesamt. Dann geht es Richtung Horizont, von Norden na
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप नकल करने के लिए तैयार हैं, तो हमारे 
Okay. Going wide de
Хорошо, всё ещё на шаге 1-5, строка 37; время сейчас "минус 06:
Okay. Die Gewässer sind alle königsblau; die Wolken leuchten natürlich strahlend weiß; die Reflexion des Lichts von der Erde ist deutlich stärker als die des Mondes. Die Landflächen haben im Allgemeinen eine bräunliche Textur – von dunkelbraun bis hellbraun. Man kann viele Wolkenwirbel der verschiedenen Wetterzellen erkennen. Ein langes Band aus Zirruswolken erstreckt sich vom Eingang des Golfs von Mexiko quer über den Atlantik. Die Nord-Süd-Gr
Clean the el
Rog
حسنًا. سنفعل - ما سنفعله - سنكون ع
La macchina fotografica è riposta. Il fotometro è abbastanza leggero da poter essere estratto e rimosso. Prima di concludere, farò un altro controllo su un gadget a bassa quota. È salito di circa lo spessore di una linea. Ora segna 0,06, ovvero meno di 0,1. Tutti questi saranno ora riposti nel vano portaoggetti; erano sul portello, adiacenti alla mol
Хорошо. Вот и все. И, конечно же, Хьюстон попросит вас перейти к шагу 9, если давление меньше 770. Если давление находится в диапазоне от 770
आप ऐसा कैसे कर सकते हैं और तस
حسنًا. في قائمة ا
トランキリティ、ヒューストン。燃料とOXをもう一度排出
ا
ロジャー、私はすでにガスを持っ
그게 다야? 우리 
ठीक है। मैं प्रतीक्षा क
Roger, Frank. We have some data that was missed on your. We'd like you to
Ecco la nostra amica luna. A che ora dovremmo sorvolare Muchea? Allora, pr
역추진 중에는 두 개의 링을 모두 사용하십시오. 역추진 후에는 링 B를 끄고
是的。你记得我一开始是从电视摄像机拍摄的那一侧开始的，我采集了一些地表岩石样本，还有一些是在地表以下——大约在陨石坑北侧15到20英尺的地方——采集的。后来我想起来，那片区域可能已经被下降发动机的尾气彻底扫过，所以我就转移到了陨石坑的南侧，在我们之前提到的那个细长双陨石坑周围采集了一些样本，以及更远处的一些样本。在有限的时间里，我尽可能多地采集了各种类型的岩石
Also, ich sag's euch, ich hatte einen Riesenspaß daran, hier drinnen herumzuschweben, hin und her von einem Ort zum anderen. Es ist wie draußen zu sein
13، نطلب منك وضع قواطع الدائرة الكهربائية 
Apollo 8. Ric
ج
Le luci della città e poi all'orizzonte ci sono le luci lampeggianti... 
Das ist bestätigt. Der Grund, warum wir die Logik abschalten, Jack, ist die Energieeinsparung. Wir schalten sie also aus, und ich schalte sie wieder ein, wenn wir aussteigen; dann schalten wir sie wieder aus und vor dem Betreten wieder ein. Nur damit d
11, Houston. Nous vous suggérons de commencer par la première étape; no
Хорошо, 11. У нас есть
Ma, Joe, supponendo che sia ancora stabile, l'og
ठीक है। आप जानना चाहत
Das ist richtig. Wir zeigen minus 55 an, was bedeutet, dass wir beim Erreichen der Eintrittslage einen Sextanten-Sterncheck für Sie durchfü
ठीक है। धन्यवाद, नील। फिलहाल
المنصة، معدل الكر
Ответственность за этот полет лежит, во-первых, на истории и на гигантах науки, которые предшествовали этому начинанию; во-вторых, на американском народе, который своей волей выразил свое желание; затем, на четырех администрациях и их Конгрессах за реализацию этой воли; и, наконец, на командах агентств и промышленных предприятий, которые создали наши космические корабли: «Сатурн», «Колумбия», «Игл» и маленький EMU — скафандр и ранец, которые были нашим небольшим космическим аппаратом на лунной поверхности. Мы хотели бы выразить особую благодарность всем американцам, которые построили космические корабли, которые занимались их конструированием, проектированием, испытаниями и вложили в них свои сердца и все свои способности. Этим 
نقطة الدخول كالتالي: منتصف PAC، 000153، 000؛ ، 178؛ -21.66، -165.37؛ 28. الأعمدة الأربعة التالية غير متوفرة؛ DO هو 4.00، زيبرا الميزان، أو ما شابه، بيتا الميزان لأسفل 08.8، يسار 0.4؛ متجه الرفع لأعلى؛ الدخول محاذٍ، النجوم 31، 33. الدوران 041، الميل 045، الانحراف 024. يجب استخدام نمط عدم الخروج؛ حافظ على وضعية فحص القمر حتى غروب القمر. وإذا فُقد كل ش
Certains de ces cratères ressemblent à des pioches frappant du béton, laissant derrière elles une grande quantité de fi
حسنًا، لقد نسخت كل ذلك. سنريك الآن "انطلق" هنا على الأرض. كي
おはようございます、フランク。アポロ8号、こちらはヒューストンです。予備のアラインメントについてお伺いしたいのですが、ナビではなくシリウスとリゲルを使ってアラインメントを行う可能性についてご意見を伺いたいのですが。ナビは現在北緯40度に
वाष्पीकरण का तापमान कम
Nein, ich schwitze immer noch, Al. Ich glaube, ich klappe das Visier hoch und trin
سي
ठीक है। कर द
Roger, Jim. We copy that. Incidentally, the evasive maneuver will be about 4 minu
يم
ليس لدي خيار كبير. كل ما 
罗杰。189 加 00：总计减 1%；阿尔法减 11；布拉沃加 10；查理减 1；德尔塔减
It is unfortunate that we do not have - we can't make the other lens work here. I
That's correct, and th
私たちはそうしようと努力すると思いますが、そうはしません。これ
この飛行の責任は、まず歴史と、この努力に先んじた科学の巨人たちにあります。次に、意志をもってその願いを示したアメリカ国民にあります。次に、その意志を実行に移した4つの政権とそれぞれの議会にあります。そして、サターン、コロンビア、イーグル、そして月面に着陸した小型宇宙船EMU（宇宙服とバックパック）を製造した宇宙機関と産業界のチームにも責任があります。宇宙船を製造し、建造、設計、試験を行い、心血を注ぎ、あらゆる能力を注ぎ込んだすべてのア
Thank you, Jerry; 
了解しました。こちらがパイロットです。この機会に、
11, 휴스턴. 패치는 있습니다. 초점을 조금 더 개선해 주시
Finora non abbiamo avuto alcun pia
Sono girato nella direzione sbagliata e la mia manovrabilità è limitata a causa del livello del carburante. Vedo il te
네, 바로 저기 입력 확인 화면 맨 아래쪽에 "대기 모드(STANDBY)"라고 적혀 있죠. 그 바로 위에 "범위를 초기화하지 마십시오"라는 메모를 남겨두시는 걸 잊지 마세요.
Роджер. Они у меня
好了，杰克现在和我在一起，你们所有人……他会告诉我制
Bene. I successivi uno, due, tre, quattro, cinque, sei, sette sono uguali, e poi passiamo da ATTENZIONE/AVVERTENZA NORMALE a ACK, ATTENZIONE/AVVERTE
The t
حسنًا. أنت تتقدم بشكل جي
Bene. Quello che abbiamo qui sono un paio di controlli COMM. Passeremo a cinque diverse moda
はい、VII. 36
Okay, Jack. It looks like we've closed up the loose ends here. Amazingly enough, out of all that stuff, it looks like we only generated one question on t
A q
आप चाहते हैं कि मेरा कंप्यूटर स्विच ऑन हो जाए और एसीई ऑन
Звучит неплох
알겠습니다. 시그마 세븐,
まだ境界線を越えていない。だが、エド、君の向こうには地平線
روجر. 9-تشارلي 137. 2+02. 01 يوم 03 ساعات 40 دقيقة 03 ثوانٍ. 13+05. 93 0
यह अपोलो 8 है, जो आपको चंद्रमा से लाइव प्रसारण कर रहा है। हमें अब टीवी कैमरे बदलने पड़े हैं। हमने पहले आपको पृथ्वी का वह दृश्य दिखाया, जिसे हम पिछले 16 घंटों से देख रहे हैं। अब हम कैमरा बदल रहे हैं ताकि हम आपको चंद्रमा दिखा सकें, जिसके ऊपर हम पिछले 16 घंटों से 60 मील की ऊंचाई पर उड़ान भर रहे हैं। बिल एंडर्स, जिम लवेल और मैंने क्रिसमस से एक दिन पहले का दिन यहाँ प्रयोग करने, तस्वीरें लेने और अंतरिक्ष यान के
짐, 안녕하세요. 여기
Wir möchten gerne wissen, wie Ihre Pläne für heute Abend aussehen. In
사령선 모듈 도킹 표시등. 좋습니다. 잘 됐네요. 다
Ну что ж, мы почти г
Давай, Хьюст
첫째, 우리 지금 무슨 일이 있었던 거지, 짐
了解。重要なのは、ボイラー（温水ボイラー）が空
मुझे
Sì, sono tornato al fly-by-wire e sto cercando d
分かりました。ジャックは、我々は今月からどれくらい離
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। कोलंबिया..
Roger. Wir sind damit fertig und haben alles für die Zukunft geregelt. Gab es irgendwelche Einschränkungen, die Sie sich gewünscht haben, oder wollten Sie diese Ei
روجر. نعتقد أننا قمنا بتحميل البيانات، ونود منك تفعيل وحدات التحكم في وضعية المركبة الفضائية (SPC) والسماح لمركبة أجينا بالبدء في العمل. إذا واجهت أي مشكلة وتعطل نظام التحكم في وضعية المركبة أجينا، فأرسل الأمر 400 ل
Roger. Flyby SPS/G&N: 62815, più 097, meno 020 070 54 5944, meno 00028, più 00023, più 00069, 269 149 312 NA, più 00221 00078 001 00034, 01 2185 227 NA, meno 0265, meno 16500 11899 36228 144 56 47, Deneb e Vega, 007 144 068. Nessun 
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地。LOIO-LiOHの変更は、その後まで延期したいと思います。キャニスターを投棄する際に、キャニスターも投棄される可能性があります。
أستراليا، كلنا مستعدون لذل
Roger. Nous avons bien reçu vos informations concernant la mer. Il semble que vous nous ayez simplement montré le cratère Népéren, le grand cratère à gauche, et le
라디에이터가 FLOW 위치에 있
Okay, it
Хорошо. Это будет на CB(16), Фред-о, но ИНВЕРТОР 2 ОТКРЫТ. Х
नोड 01 12 08; रेव 1; 179 डि
Hai detto no
Джерри, меня немного беспокоит температура. У нас ту
프레드, 배경 소음 때문에 더 이상 잘 안 들리네요. 잭이 통신 업링크 스퀠치에 대해 어떻게 할 건지 얘기한 것 같은데, 이제 알아들을게요. 자세를 확인할 수 없으니 안테나는 당신이 알아서 조절해 주세요. 신호가 올라오면 음성 확인을 해드리겠습니다. 신호가 올라오는 데 3분에서 5분
O
Роджер. Я управляю самолетом частично по электронной системе на малой высоте. Захвачу самолет, когда войду в ретроградное положение. Ничего страшного, прост
Negative. We have quad Bravo and quad Delta which are getting right down, according to the calculated numbers, next to where we ought to be activating them. The numbers you are reading are going to be a little bit high, but 
그리고 저희가 원할 때 그 지시를 내릴 겁니다. 단, 전원을 끄라는 뜻은 아닙니다. 저희가 지시를 내릴 때까지 전원을 끄지 
Roger. How about fuel cell 2; is that looking all rig
سيجما سبعة، سيجما سبعة. تلقائي واحد. ه
마이크, 나머지 사람들이 잠들기
Roger, 11. We recommend you turn the O2 fans on manually and ensure that the O2 heaters a
Хорошо, Фред. Всё верно, за исключением того, что процедура выравнивания, над которой мы работаем, — это выравнивание Земли и Солнца, и в остальном всё правильно. Кстати, похоже, что этот маневр с тропическим циклоном плюс 2 будет 
That's AC, okay. Yes, that's good AC 
收到，吉姆。当然，当飞轮脱离定位点时，误差指针就会重置，你的姿态参考也会丢失。你需要建立一个新的姿态参考，但这可能不是燃烧姿态，因为此时我们正在用……控制姿态。现在，从“，ENTER”开始，划掉。把所有数字都划掉，
PRIMARY ACME 논리, PRIMARY BIAS 권력 등등에
حسناً. نظام التحكم لديّ هو التحكم الإلكتروني، والجيروسكوبات حرة، ومفتاح المناورة مُطفأ. نسبة الوقود تتراوح بين 75 و85 بالمئة، والأك
D'accord. Zone 7-3 GET RC, 10 04 47; RET, 400K, 22 plus 02; RET RB, 28 pl
Bene. Controllo 
马上
Dacci circa un giorno per trovare la vera anomalia, Jim, e vedere se possiamo davvero fare qualcuna di queste retroazioni OAMS. Per esempio, 6-4, non avevamo abbas
Roger. Ich bin bereit, die Situa
Ciao, Canarino. Ge
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Обновление карты 
حسنا
約 - 左側の「TOPO ターゲット 54A への操作」
Allez-y
ह्यूस्टन। रॉजर। बाहर
了解。燃焼状況報告は以下の通りです。DELTA-TIGゼロ、燃焼時間557、…VGX
그리고 아쿠아리우스님, 참고로 말씀드리자면, 저희 상수도 공급 상황은 전력 공급 재개 계획을 포함해도 현재 시점에서 18시간 동안
C'est confirmé. Et les deux lignes en dessous de « 30 secondes ». Et en fa
Roger: Prêt dans 10 minutes. Casque fermé. Tout est en ordre, je me sens super bien, prêt pour le décollage
Ok, Jack. Ho inserito due interruttori Commander, AC e DC, e i due interruttori GASTA in AC e DC. Poi dovrai accendere tutti i riscaldatori con il - pressur
Your COM
Esatto, perché la 
当然，我们现在处于非常高的
Ja. Wir benötigen d
ロジャー、11。コーヒーカップのスコアを記録しているときに、
أعتقد أن زاويتين تلامستا، لأنه عند فتحها، لم تخرجا معًا. انفتحت بشكل غير متساوٍ بعض الشيء، وبالطبع، لم تكن الأرض مستوية تمامًا كما كنت أتمنى. وأعتقد أن الزاويتين تلامستا بعمق بوصة تقريبًا - لا، ثلاثة أرباع إلى نصف بوصة؛ وربما على طول الجزء السفلي، ربما كان العمق حوالي ثلاث بوصات، تاركًا طبقة مثلثة صغيرة على زاويتين؛ وأعتقد أن هذه الطبقات موجودة على الزوايا
Gem
휴스턴, 여기는 VIII입니다.
Das ist b
Okay. The landing gear are down and locked, Jack, and looking ahead now at page 11, w
Bonjour, Cape Cap Com. Allez-
六分儀について少しコメントしたいと思います。狭い宇宙船内での使用は、特にヘルメットをかぶっていると非常に困難です。最終的に、ヘルメットをかぶったまま、要求されている星々の角度を測ろうとするのは無駄だと判断しました。そこでヘルメットを外しました。これにより、六分儀の使用範囲は多少広がりましたが、それでも宇宙船を操作せずに観測できる角度は20～23度程度に限られていました。星々が窓の上部に隠れてしまうのです。宇宙船をより頻繁に、そして自由に操作すれば、窓の長軸が追跡面に入るように操作できます。しかし、燃料の制限があったため、このような操作は選択しませんでした。パルスモードも使用しましたが、操作はあまりしませんでした。この実験で選ばれた星々
शांति। रॉजर। हमें कोई आपत्ति नहीं है, और हम मानते हैं कि मुख्य कैनिस्टर अभी भी
好的，杰克。我拍到你的偏航和滚转
Roger. Understa
——57，加上
ジェミニ VI、1アルファ時間は17プラス02です。あなたの意
Ora, come stiamo procedendo con la checklist? Assicuriamoci di non sbagliare e di dimenticare.
Я не против. Я напишу в том вариант
Nun ja, negativ. Ich brauche ein weiteres Manöver in Richtung Terminator. Er driftet aus dem Bild auf unsere 11-Uhr-Position. Wir brauchen offenba
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous allons tenter de récupérer votre bande immédiatement. Les marges de circuit sont assez faibles avec notre configuration actuelle. Nous allons examiner la situation. Si cela ne fonctionne pas, nous devrons peut-être réessayer avec une c
收到。即将进行信号弹测试。请稍候。标记 00 [加] 58 
J'ai les particules. J'étais dos au soleil au lever du soleil et je ne voyais pas les particules; en faisant un mouvement de rotation d'environ 
电池 C 37.1，PYR
准备去VOX录音。看着阳光洒满的窗户。那绝
Роджер. В 74:30 мы хотели бы попросить вас включить вентиляторы во всех четырех криогенных резервуарах и перевести нагреватели во всех четырех криогенных резервуарах в положение «АВТО». 
了解。LMPは090
मुझे एक या दो बार अगल-बगल गोली चला
알겠습니다. 1단계, "자세
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们已经回放了第二次着陆轨道点火。看起来非常好。所有系统运行正常。在有限的跟踪数据下，我们以65.4°的角速
حسنًا، أنا مستعد للذهاب إلى B DATA الآ
Okay, and you're real good. It's a - It's a pleasure not to have all that noise. Let me tell you what I want to do, Jim. As I said, we're not going to give you detailed procedures, now. What we expect to have for you shortly are procedures which we'll try and get up to you in the following form. First
Go ah
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Le réseau est conf
ठीक है। यह फ्लाईबाई कल दी गई फ्लाईबाई का अपडेट है, इसलिए कृपया ध्यान दें कि यह दूसरी फ्लाईबाई है। यह फ्लाईबाई /; 62970, माइनस 162, प्लस 129, प्लस 00966, प्लस 00552, माइनस 02079 होगी। रोल, पिच और यॉ सभी शून्य हैं, नवंबर अल्फा, पेरिगी ऊंचाई प्लस 00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013, ऊपर 047, दाएं 39, प्लस 1418 माइनस 16505 12904 36160, प्राथमिक तारा सीरियस, द्वितीयक तारा रिगेल, 136 310 340, कोई उलेज नहीं, पसंदीदा स्थिति में पुनः संरेखण की आवश्यकता है। इस बर्न से पेरिलून 550 मील ऊप
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous 
Okay. Ich zeige wieder auf den Boden..
Er war auf UHF. Wir haben ihn seit ein paar Minuten nicht mehr geh
了解
Хорошо. Понял. Давайте посмотрим, что еще у нас есть для вас, Джим. На втором участке траектории скорость составляет примерно 23 фута в секунду, приблизительно ретроградное движение, но по расписанию. И сейчас все держится очень хорошо. К вашему сведению (и вам не нужно это записывать, потому что все еще довольно слабое направление), но у нас есть точка приложения силы примерно 8,57 градуса южной широты и примерно 33,9 градуса западной долготы, что немного западнее и немного южнее значения, указанного в плане полета. У нас есть точка пр
좋아요, 49,000피트 고도에서는 초속 65피트가 나와야 해요. 우리 차트에 그렇게 적혀 있거든요. 그리고 시선속도는 0.1 정도여야 하는데, 대략 0.1
Roger. Der l
そういうことを聞きたいですね。私たち
تما
了解。私も同じです。次
D'accord. Les suivants, deux, trois, quatre, 
Roger. Ich stelle jetzt die Lage ein. Bereit für 0 Grad Gierwinkel, Nick- und
В один раз — в другой раз, когда я попытался это использовать, — в следующий раз у меня получилось довольно точное измерение. Используя без фильтра, я ориентировался на верхнюю границу свечения толстого слоя
わかりました、ジョー。ここに「-1A」という新しいページを作成しました。項目6「電源への転送」で、いつものように
अगर इससे क
Okay.
好的。在第 2 行，我们将打开 SYSTEM A 下的 ASCENT FEED 2 和 ASCE
دعني أركز على ظهري. اسمع، الفرق شاسع مع هذا المسدس. عندما كان ذلك المسدس يعمل، كنت أتحرك في 
マイク、彼らには聞こえていないと思うよ。寝
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. I'm going on fly-by-wire so I can control more accurately. It just started as I got to Guaymas, and appears to be it drifts off in yaw, to the right at about 1° per second. It will go over to an attitude of about 20°, and hold at that and when it hits
حسنًا. لكن انتظروا قليلًا لأننا قد نضطر إلى إعادة البدء م
네, 저도 도저히
尤里·阿列克谢耶维奇，我们遇到个问题：
好了，杰克。功率放大器关掉，恢复低比特率，我
Это хорошо. Слева у тебя достаточно места. Немного теснов
双子座 4，夏威夷
And I think you've got some interesting data on thruster firing versus pitch angle. It lo
روجر، وأو
알겠습니다, 잭. 몇 분 안에 패드를 보내드리겠습니다. 지금 추적 데이터를 받고 있는데, 초기 패드와의 차이가 매우 작을 것으로 예상되지만, 최종 패드를
好的。目前我们已经控制住了飞船。飞船处于缓慢漂移飞行状态——我们有一定的控制能力。RCS B 显示 1550 磅，RCS A 显示 240
네. ALC를 사용하는 모든 사진 촬영에서 카메라
Ce n'est pas déjà assez grave de ne pas trouver le bon endroit pour atterrir quand on n'
هل يمكنك تزويدنا ببيانات الأكسجين والهيد
11号，大
Roger. Inizieremo con le notizie dal mondo. Elogi per gli astronauti americani dell'Apollo 8 e speranze di cooperazione internazionale nell'esplorazione spaziale, con i messaggi della vigilia di Natale in tutto il mondo, mentre la piccola astronave orbitava attorno alla Luna. Persino nel mondo comunista, c'era entusiasmo per il primo viaggio dell'uomo sulla Luna. A Mosca, lo scienziato sovietico Anatoly Besaranov ricordò che il suo Paese e gli Stati Uniti avevano già condiviso le conoscenze spaziali e predisse che il volo dell'Apollo 8 avrebbe portato a una maggiore cooperazione. A Cuba, Radio Avana ritrasmise il programma Voice of America per raccontare agli ascoltatori il discorso dell'Apollo 8. I funzionari di Voice affermarono che era la prima volta che un programma delle agenzie statunitensi veniva trasmesso dalla radio dell'Avana. La Cecoslovacchia vide il volo sulla Luna attraverso un'ampia copertura televisiva; e a Budapest, in Ungheria, la gente non parla d'altro sui treni e sugli autobus. Nel mondo non comunista, impiegati e acquirenti natalizi trattennero il fiato mentre la navicella spaziale veniva preparata per il lancio verso la Terra. I francesi per strada hanno elogiato il know-how americano e l'impresa spaziale, e alcuni spettatori che guardano le foto lunari in TV esultano "Magnifique!". A Londra, orde di acquirenti natalizi si s
रॉजर। 1, G&N: 38658, माइनस 054, प्लस 065, TIG 078 02 0345, प्लस 29180, प्लस 03779, माइनस 01325; रोल NA, पिच 041. PAD का शेष भाग NA है। उलेज दो जेट, 19 सेकंड। 4 PAD
Gemini, CSQ. Bitte halten Sie sich bereit, um während dieser Um
Ok, aspetta uno. Voglio
好的。我再次强调，在我之前说过顺序并不
Houston, Tranquillité. Souhaitez-vous un recyclage sur le VERB 
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Vi leggo 
こちらフレンドシップセブン。理
D'accord. Étape 5: positionnez le contrôle de tangage et de lacet de l'antenne à gain élevé en fonction des angles d'élévat
D'accord. 
On peut aussi utiliser l'apesanteur pour illustrer de nombreuses notions apprises à l'école. J'aimerais vous montrer brièvement à quel point il est facile d'expliquer le fonctionnement d'un gyrosco
잠시 기다려 주
いいえ、まだです
J'ai de l'Alvagrine éteinte à mesurer. Cette expérience ne sera pas concluante; il me faut la lumière de la cabine pour y voir clair. Le photomètre d'extinction est vraiment difficile à trouver. Voyons si je peux y arriver. J'ai comparé l'Alvagrine, la source standard, dan
ちょっと待ってください
Канари. Имейте в виду, что за 15 секунд работы вы достигли скорости 12,6 ф
Et, Jack, nous n'avons pas entendu la phrase en 
हेल
फ्रेड, मेरा सुझाव है कि जब आपकी खिड़की फिर से पृथ्वी की ओर घूमे, तो आप ऐसी ही एक और तस्वीर खींच लें, और
Roger. Ti leggo forte e chiaro, Keno. L
I don't think that was the intent, Bill. What they had in mind, we have the suit heat exchanger on both loops; and if they got too cold, you could use the panel switching to shut down the primary loop through the heat exchanger. But in any event, you would always have something going to the suit heat excha
Apollo 8, Houston. Abbiamo tutti gli esperti che stanno esaminando i vostri dati in questo momento. L'analisi pr
Bien, et si vous tournez la page sur la puissance 8, vous trouverez les fonctions restantes du vaisseau spatial. No
저는 확실히 몸이 많이 
로저, Rev 33, 실행 4, 시작 시간 19시 43분 00초, 일몰 시간입니다.
わかりました。ENTER、333 ENTERと押して、レジスタ1を
...
没错。
Roger, navire de l'océa
Ok. Sembra che la cupola si s
Роджер. У меня есть для тебя 
Roger. Trente-sept volts, d'accord. Les quantités cryogéniques prévues sont les suivantes
알겠습니다. 연소 규칙입니다. 추력 모니터가 77% 이하이면, 추진제 여유압이 160psi 미만이면, 연료 산화제 델타-P가 25를 초과하면 (이 경우 지상 보고), 그리고 시동 과도 현상을 제외하고 자세 오차가 ±10도이면 엔진을 정지해야 합니다. 회전율 제한은 초당 ±10도입니다. 엔진 짐벌 경고등
Flight 社では、2 回目のテスト中に Running Light の表示が出た場合
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. LMP снова в
بما أننا لسنا كذلك - ليس واضحًا لي أننا لم نواجه توقفات ميكانيكية لفترة من الوقت في المرة السابقة. قد يفسر ذلك 10 دقائق من تلك الـ
今
Houston, this next is a little demonstration for the kids at home, all kids everywhere, for that matter. I was going to show you how you drink water out of a spoon, but I
Okay. Die Zeit ist – das Ereignis findet um statt; und wir sollen die f
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। हमें अलाइनमेंट और इनिशियलाइज़ेशन ठीक 
في 1
روجر. موشيا كاب كوم. واضح تمامًا. أخبر جيري وجاس ولويس وجميع الحاضرين أنني تواصلت مع "مرحبًا". جون ويتلر، إن رأيته، أخبره أن يُجهز بوتش. استراحة. هل غيومكم تسمح لي برؤية ضوء - أو
C'est confirmé. Je vais tout d'abo
Roger, Frank. Persei Zeta is just about exactly between
大家好，
Но переберись на свою сторону. А я свой первый маневр выполнил именно с этой стороны. Ты видел, 
Нил и Базз, к вашему сведению, ваши расход
مرحباً مايكل، لقد فقدنا القفل، وقام بيل بالضغط على زر إعا
Negativo, ho sentito molto debolmente, ma evidentemente non mi hai letto e non ho capito nulla di quello che hai detto. Ti informo che il Pilota di Comando sta andando a dormire. Dovrebbe dormire per 
アポロ
Als nächstes kommt
ठीक है। आगे बढ़ो
로저, 휴스턴입니
Roger, ich habe eine ganze Menge Dinge, die ich di
ارت
نود أن نسيطر على الأمر لفترة من الوقت
Si je comprends bi
좋
Мне всё равно... это видно по внешнему вид
Scommetti. Sulla pagina sportiva, non c'è molta attività. UCLA è in cima a entrambi i sondaggi di basket. Se ne vuoi sapere di una in particolare, fammelo sapere e ti dirò se è tra le prime dieci in entrambi i sondaggi. Per quanto riguarda il Nord, l'All Star Game universitario che si gio
我们现在能暂时搁置一下吗……目前我们进度有点乱……我们会努力调整进度
Okay
了解しまし
अगर मुझे पता होता कि आप यहां आने वाले हैं, तो मैं आपको प
罗杰，谢谢。请问您能
시그마 세븐입니다. 여기는 캘
Carnarvan, ich ver
了解しました。68度ですね。快適な温度で
D'accord, et vous avez
로저. 달 진입, MPL: 3
جيد جداً. أريد التأكد من أنها لم تكن خدعة خاصة م
Esatto, Joe; se tu fossi riuscito a scavare un cratere come il Cone
Roger. Mike, abbiamo alc
Кстати, окна пришли в очень хорошем состоянии. Пятое окно выглядит очень чистым, так что я надеюсь, что проду
昨晚我没能
सिग्मा सेवन आपकी बात साफ-साफ सुन रहा है। बाहर न
おそらくあと1
क्या आपको कु
روجر. فيما يتعلق بمؤشر داو جونز الصناعي، فمنذ إغلاق جلسة التداول يوم الثلاثاء المواف
Okay. We'd like to look at it for just a little while before we
这里是金丝雀帽公司
Okay. And, close BAT FEED TIES, CROSSTIE BAL LOAD, and open the CROSS TIE BUS. Close the next three; open ASCENT ECA CONTROL, ASCENT ECA, and INVERTER 1. Close DC BUS VOLT. Go
Je voudrais dire un mot sur le sextant. Son utilisation dans un vaisseau spatial exigu est très difficile, surtout avec le casque. J'ai finalement conclu qu'il serait inutile, avec le casque, d'essayer de prendre les angles requis pour les étoiles visées. J'ai donc retiré mon casque. Cela m'a donné un peu plus de liberté de mouvement, mais j'étais toujours limité à des angles d'environ 20 à 23° sans manœuvrer le vaisseau. L'étoile était alors masquée par la partie supérieure du hublot. En manœuvrant le vaisseau plus fréquemment et plus amplement, on pourrait aligner le grand axe du hublot avec le plan de visée. Mais, limités par le carburant, nous n'avons pas opté pour cette méthode. Nous avons également utilisé le mode pulsé, sans trop de manœuvres. Les étoiles sélectionnées pour cette campagne avaient des angles assez élevés, ce qui rendait l'horizon difficile 
E
Roger. Ein Fehler, Columbia, bei 
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous avons encore inversé les antennes. Je le répète, nous n'avons aucune mise à jour concernan
Mike, hier auf Seite 97 deiner Checkliste, wo wir die Einrichtung vornehmen, steht mit Bleistift: „20 Minuten warten, bis sich die Rate beruhigt hat. Nicht überwachen.“ Das bedeutet Folgendes: Wenn du 16 überwachst, musst du in Schritt 7 beim zweiten Ausführen von „a“ NOUN 01 neu laden, sodass es „NOUN 01, ENTER“
Roger. Deke, la brume est très brillante. Je di
V
コロ
다시 한번, 내 발밑에서 번
当
حسنًا يا جاك. لاحظ أنك قمت بتأمين ذلك، وكان هذا ما سنوصي به على أي حال.
Okay. Ich habe noch etwas mehr als eine Minu
Friendship Seven, Canton Com Tech. Wi
हेलो फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। यह इंडियन कॉम टेक है, एचएफ यूएचएफ पर। 
Хорошо, ладно. Следующий шаг — закрепить ленту. Для этого отрежьте от рулона примерно 60 см (2 фута) и разорвите его вдоль, чтобы у вас получилось две полоски длиной около 60 см (2 фута) и шириной примерно 1,2 см (полдюйма). Оберните их вокруг контейнера под прямым углом к ​​о
分
Okay. Stay right there if you c
アポロ
In the LM, th
ठीक है। बस उत्तर दिशा के इन तारों के समूह
Okay. You've about had it on the high gain. You might try to get it in, but it's going to hit the scan limit at any se
افهم. لقد انحرفت بزاوية 180 درجة لإجراء فحص التوا
Bitte wiederho
D'accord, Vance
ठीक है। वह आखिरी जो उस समय निष्पादित किया गया था जो -4-1/2 घंटे है; 0.5 फीट प्रति सेकंड का धक्का, चार-जेट उलेज निष्पादित करें; फिर एसईपी निष्पादित करें जिसके बाद 0.5 फीट प्रति सेकंड का खिंचाव हो, नामकरण के अनुसार; मुझे 
你给我们带来的这个新的 GMT 复古点火功能
Roger, Apollo 8. Esatto. Vorremmo ricontrollare un numero sui 90 minuti in più. Quando riesci a recuperarlo, faccelo sap
कु
Ha! Ha? Nein, ich will das Raumschiff
로저. 189 플러스 00: 총량 -1%; 알파 -11; 브라보 +10; 찰리 -1; 델타 -1; H2 총량 -0.76파운드
D'accord. Tenez-vous à côté de 
알겠
Buongiorno, non lo so. È... ti dico, non è un brutto modo di vivere, con quel divano lì... Io in un certo senso... oh, sì, sono d'accordo; possiamo metterne due sopra e uno sott
Слышу вас х
とても小さいですね。1/16インチかそれ以下くらいでしょう。窓のそばを漂い、暗い空に浮かぶのが見えます。ちょうど日の出の時には、文字通り何千個も見えました。まるで無数の星のようで
Роджер. Мне нужно очень точное местоположение,
Хорошо. Давай
حسنًا يا جاك. التالي عند -4 + 30. نريد التحقق من
Vous avez réu
И, Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Эти маневры автоматической оптики, или P23, автоматические маневры, похоже, н
Okay. Did you get all of that? Did you get the Quantity Read OFF and th
روجر على نظام القصور الذاتي. والآن ننتقل إلى لوحة التحكم الثانية. 2، SPS/G&N: 38320، زائد 166، ناقص 081؛ TIG 080 11 3603. NOUN 81: ناقص 01408، ناقص جميع الكرات، ناقص 00743. رمي جميع الكرات، 196 359 00657، زائد 00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. نجم السدس 23 1160 138. باقي 
네. 좋습니다. 제가 먼저 해야 할 네다섯 가지는 3번 패널의 BAT CHARG
了解、ジャック。これで手順は完了です。次に、コマンドモジュールに戻り、バスを使ってメインバスを
Megli
罗杰；哥伦比亚 OMNI 
और आप तैयार हैं। हंट्सविले की रिपोर्ट के अनुसार, आपके पास 6 सेकंड का प्रोपेलेंट पैड है, जो 3-सिग्मा केस से 3 सेकंड अधिक है; इसलिए उपभोग्य सामग्रियों की कोई कमी नहीं है। यह इतना अच्छा है कि हम इसे अपडेट नहीं करने जा रहे हैं। आपके लिए एकमात्र बदलाव चेकलिस्ट में है। 57 
روجر. أعتقد أنني كنت قد فهمت الأمر جيدًا قبل اتصالك. كنت أخطط له على الل
حسنًا. عند إخراج دفتر المناورات، ستجد أن المناورة
Fred, concernant ce module de commande 
Da ist ein ganz neuer, heller Einschlagkrater; er sollte jetzt im Sic
Высокие двигатели работают хорошо, точное сопровождение следует осуществлять только на низком положении по принципу «fly-by-wire». Следить за ускорителем на высоких высотах — сложная задача. Гироскопы довольно хорошо держатся в пределах допустимых значений. Прошедшее время — 
Hé, Buzz? Que
روجر. كل شيء يبدو جيداً من هنا باستثناء جهاز ا
Okay, and this is one time it looks like we might actually do the preheat, so that's the reason we want to make sure that we know that not more than 20 minutes of time on the preheat. We may not be able to watch it at that time because 
هذا صحيح يا جيم. لقد رفعنا مستوى النظام لديك إلى 10.6، ونحن على استعداد لرفعه قليلاً. ل
了解。03:0
عند العودة إلى الغلاف الجوي، ما لم يبقك نظام التحكم الآلي في الغلاف ا
Роджер. Зона 57-2 86. 1+49. 07 42 52. 7+12. 11+52. 58-2 94. 1+59. 09 16 42. 5+49. 10+41. Зона 58-BRAVO, раздельное торможение, 55 впер
جيمين
好的。看来可能无法破解正常的语音提示。低温储罐出现了相当严重的分层
यह सही है। औ
هيا 
Roger, Sigma Sept. Je n'ai pas lu v
好的。入轨点 PAD 位于 MIDPAC 区域：359 153 001 194 46 03 267，加 1102，减 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 19
さあ、始めましょう。プライマリ、プライマリ、高、ボイス、（咳払い）PCM、レンジ、ダウンボイスバックアップ、補助テープ、オフ。テレメトリをデータに、アップタイミングコマンドをノーマルに。VHF AとBはオフ。受信のみ…、PCM/アナログ、録音、転送、ノーマル、ノーマル（これでOK）、低、プライマリ、リアック、ナロー。さて、通
收到，百慕大，仍然能清晰地收到您的信号。
Похоже, у вас там наверху довольно тесно
잭, 당분간 10분에서 15분 간격으로 배터리 전압과 충전기 전류를 측정해야 하니, 당신이 필기하는 동안 다른 사람이 측정값을 읽어줄 수 있을까요? 이상
さて、その変換表が正しければ、最初の部分は正確に理解できたこと
Ja. Wenn die Programmierung und die Bahnlage 
حسنًا، فهمت. سأذهب إلى أنتاريس أولًا ونجرب. كما تعلم، جربنا ذلك في المرة الماضية، لكنني تمكنت من التقاط صورة واحدة قبل أن يختفي القمر تمامًا في الضباب الأبيض. سأحاول مرة أخرى، وإذا لم ينجح الأمر، فسنذهب إ
Хорошо. Давайте начнём сначала. Возможно, будет некоторое совпадение, но чтобы убедиться, что мы все понимаем друг друга, начнём с набора процедур, которые дадут нам в итоге обычный контрольный список. В книгу будут внесены некоторые изменения в контрольный список, но основная часть того, что я вам подготовил, — это
Yes. We'll look at it, Cha
Roger. I 
Roger, Jim. Uns ist gerade etwas eingefallen: Wir sollten die Lithiumhydroxid-Kanister wohl bald aus de
「照明」の下の「フラッド」、開いています。「トラック」、開いています。「ED LOGIC - Correction」の下の「ED: LOGIC」、開いています。「DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE」、開いています。「SUIT FLOW CONTROL」の下の「COMM: DISPLAY」、開いています。「VHF A TRANSMITTER」、開いています。「VHF B RECEIVER」、開いています。「DISPLAY」の下はクルーのオプションです。
Roger. Je viens de remarquer
ठीक है। एंटर दबाने पर, 06, एंटर दबाने पर तीन गेंदों वाला 62 डिस्प्ले तो आ जाता है, लेकिन मैं उस पर आगे नहीं बढ़ पा रहा हूँ और न ही यह का
알겠습니다. 2 더하기 56 더하기 37, 기동 시간과 SEP 시간을 포함하면 3 더하기 06 ​​더하기 2
Roger. Ihr Bewohner der Raumstation Columbia interessiert vielleicht, dass heute in Kolumbien Unabhängigkeitstag ist. Gloria Diaz von den Philippinen wurde gestern Abend zur Miss Universe gekrönt. Sie setzte sich gegen 60 andere Mädchen durch und sicherte sich den Titel der Schönheitskönigin. Miss Diaz ist 18 Jahre alt, hat schwarze Haare und Augen und die Maße 88-58-88. Zweitplatzierte wurde Miss Australien, gefolgt von Miss Israel und Miss Japan. Während ihr am Dienstagabend zurückreist, spielen die Allstars der American und National League in Washington Baseball. Mel Stottlemyre von den Yankees wird voraussichtlich der erste Pitcher der American League sein. Wer der erste Pitcher der National League sein wird, ist noch unklar. Sie haben neun Pitcher im Kader. Auch wenn sich die Forschung im Raumfahrtprogramm sicherlich ausgezahlt hat, scheint Forschung nicht immer erfolgreich zu sei
好的，杰克。我看看我有没有记下来。我们先像中途飞行时那样把目标指向地球，然后进行一次机身轴线对准。之后你给我们一个球形姿态，飞向……，然后我们……把目标指向……月球。然后你更新——给我们一些CDU（控制显示单元）来粗略对准……精细对准……恒星、月球或地球。稍等。好的。杰克，我们又收到一次主警报。我没看到下面有任何指示灯亮着，除了电池指示灯还在
Okay, Ken. Warte kurz. Ich verli
2 ベイカーは 0.6 と言い、もう 1 つを
अपोलो 
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。PADは聞こえます
Okay. Im Landegebiet im mittleren Pazifik ist das Wetter gut. Die Bewölkung beträgt 2000 Fuß (ca. 5,5 m), die Sichtweite 10 Fuß (ca. 3 m), der Wind weht aus 60° mit 10 Knoten (ca. 10 km/h), die Wellenhöhe liegt bei 4 Fuß (ca. 1,2 m) und der Höhenmesser zeigt 2986 Fuß (ca. 29,8 m) an, falls es Sie interessiert. Vereinz
了解。了解。アルファと
좋습니다. 이는 모든 하강 BAT가 온라인 상태이고, 상승 BAT 5와 6이
D'accord. Je vais crier "coup
Hello, Columbia. Houston. We'd like you to start down your jettison checklist. We recommend picking up page F11 - 12 and we'd like to jettison at 10 min
Right. Maybe that was down 
जो, तुम कैसे प
Vuoi farlo prima di rimanere troppo 
좋아, 프레드. 한 시간 동
Ganz genau, Jack. Ich werde Folgendes tun: Wir halten an, wenn die Erde im Kommandantenfenster unten ist, und dann manövriere ic
Хьюстон, Колумбия. Время прохождения первого
好的。没错，更新的最后一句话是，在45度和155度的倾斜角下，你可以看到这颗彗星。杰克，现在的情况是，根据他们给我看的图表，这颗彗星似乎距离太阳大约10度，由于它遮挡太阳的几何形状，在45度到75度左右的倾斜角范围内，你似乎可以通过六分仪看到这颗彗星，而不会受到太阳直射的影响。看起来，当翻滚角度超过75度时，虽然彗星仍在视野内，但太阳也会出现在视野中。如果您在45度到75度之间都没能拍到彗星，那么在75度到155度之间可能就拍不到了。如果您发现可以在45度到75度或80度之间看到彗星，请记下这个翻滚角度。如果条件允许，
罗杰。30，SPS/G&N：36691，减 061，加 066 135 23 4156，加 32011，加 06 818，减 02650，181 054 014；远地点 NA，加 00230 32836 228 32628 42 1511 357，NA 三线，加 1103，减 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52，天津四和织女星，242 172 012，两台喷气式
Dopo aver ridotto la velocità a un punto tale da ritenere di poterci sganciare in sicurezza, lo abbiamo fatto e ci siamo allontanati dall'Agena a diversi metri al secondo il più velocemente possibile. Avevamo visto la quantità di propellente scendere dal 50% a meno del 30%. Dopo aver disattivato l'OAMS e
आ
Quad Delta 245, 81 Prozent. P und C weisen darauf hin, dass diese Werte trotz der aktuellen Situation weiterhin gut sind. Der COMM-Test ist damit abgeschlossen.
معدلاتي الآن تقارب الصفر على المحاور الثلاثة. لا يزال لدي ضوء في المنظار، بالطبع. أنظر للأعلى مباشرةً، ومع ذلك
Sigma Seven. Hawaii Cap 
आपको सूचित किया जाता है कि आपके पास एक नया 48-1 टीआर समय और भार
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스
Jim is 
알겠습니다, 짐. 그리고 당신이 쓴 글의 절반 정도
알겠습니다. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 시야에 들어오지 않도록 하십시오. 아래쪽이
コロンビア
Oui. Je suppose qu'il est en phase de préchauffage d
CMC-geprüf
انتقل إلى حذف ما تبقى من الملفات التي تعمل عليها الآن، ثم ارجع إلى وضعية الطائرة، ثم تابع من حيث هو مذكور في خطة الطيران، أو إذا كنت 
Das Steuerungssystem funktioniert einwandfrei. Nur d
ジムも同じだと思います。彼の入力には気づいていませんで
أبولو 13، هي
Das stimmt. Wir haben ein gutes Bild von 
Там действительно круто
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। उड़ान योजना के अनुसार, अगले एक घंटे के लिए हमारी अनुशंसाएँ इस प्रकार हैं: लगभग 58 घंटे तक अपनी सुविधानुसार अभ्यास जारी रखें, फिर विमान में प्रवेश करें, हैच ब
और, ह्यूस्
Roger. GO for. Do you have and t
Ho una foto del montante a Y po
كانت الفروقات بينهما في حدود درج
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我这里有个比分。奥克兰41分，堪萨斯城6分，最终比分是41比6，奥克兰领先。我们正在努力帮你弄到一些新闻稿。我估计今天最大的新闻可能就是那场事先安
The... thruster went on at 1
Пойми это, Джек. Я бы хотел дать ему еще немн
接続チェックが完了しました。聞こえますか？パネルのスイッチの位置はデフォルト設定です。地球儀は設置済み、北緯63度、東経97度、補正番号710、目盛りは9時間18分07秒。移動インデックスはデフォルト位置（初日7）に設定されています。キャビン内の気圧は1、湿度65%、気温1
--写真を撮ってく
罗杰，双子座4
Okay. W
ええと、COAS（陸軍特殊部隊）のダストカバーも同じカテゴリーに入ると思いますよね？COASを入れるために移動させなければ
다른 시스템들을 점검해 보니 모두 비교적 안정적인 것 같습니다. 우주복 돔 온도는 여전히 약 71도, 우주복 통풍구 온도는 62도로, 이번에는 쾌적한 온도입니다. 기내 압력, 우주복 압력, 그리고 우주복 압력 게이지의 수치도 모두 약 0.1psi 
Roger. Nous pen
알겠습니다. 그 부분은 확인해 보겠습니다. 나머지 내용을 들으면서 기
로저, 버즈. 첫 번째 항목은 AC 버스 A 아래쪽에 있습니다. 선은 높은 게이트까지 쭉 이어집니다. 사실, 선은 'AC
嘿，你上次绕地球
罗杰。或许在你看来，我们这次登月之旅看似简单轻松。但我可以向你保证，事实并非如此。将我们送入轨道的土星五号火箭是一台极其复杂的机器，每一个部件都运转得完美无瑕。我头顶上的这台计算机拥有38000个词
Ci è sembrato di aver 
Я вас прекрасно понимаю. Я снова на переднем а
好的，Fred-o。在页面底部，我们需要执行步骤 1，在闪烁的 0406 上，选择选项 3，这将引导我们进入步骤 6；然后在 5025 上，按下回车键，这将显示闪烁的 0170，并加载 R1 20
제미니 4호, CSQ입니다. 메인 배터리를 점검해 주시고 메인 전원이 정상 작동하는지 여부를 알려주시겠습니까
Roger. Les nouvelles attitudes pour le Mode 1, roulis - pour le Mode 1, 5 heures, roulis 1,38, tanga
Джим, это подтверждается, с указанием следующих значений DELTA на шаге 3, а на странице 26 я приведу вам значения DE
Roger, 11. Ici Houston. Nous vous recev
È CO2, 
حسنًا، في الرقم 11، لدينا DECA POWER، DECA GIMBAL، مفتوح. في الرقم 16، ل
Роджер. Майк, ты говорил, что Star 14 был хорош примерно до этого 
Oh. Il nostro piccolo grafico mostra che stai appena toccando la linea delle 180.000 migli
おそらく、分かりません。態度について説明するま
你什
Apollo 8, this is Houston reading you with a great deal of noise in the background. Go ahead and rewind your tape and 
Ho appena avuto una bella visuale della Croce del Sud, di Alpha e 
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴입니다. 16번 패널에서 크로스 타이 볼 로드 차단기
التعليقان الإضافيان هما: أولاً، أنهما أدىا إلى تحيّز قيمة DELTA-VC بمقدار سالب 0.34 قدم في الثانية بناءً على قيم التحيّز الصفري لديك. هذه معلومة فقط. وثانياً، معلومة أيضاً، أن نقطة الحضي
... MASTERARM - 
Роджер. Главная шина — 24, одна — 25, 25, 25. Резервная — 25, 25. Изолированная — 29, и снова главная — 24. Вентиляторы 113, 113. Все предохранители переключателей справа включены, кроме Retrojetton и Retromanual, которые находятся в центральном положении «выкл». Все оста
في الواقع، أعتقد أن ما نقوله هو أن... [ال
ELRS BAT A と BAT B
자, 이제 
罗杰，第一次读数。55-DELTA 8
好的。我会随时向你汇报我们的进展。第一个测试是上行语音和测距，下行链路也完全覆盖
I plan to do a final trim - AUTO trim, and then a four-jet tr
Bene. Abbiamo messo il cloro e l'acqua è stat
Quella roba c
Roger, 11. Bien reçu. Nous avons également vérifié ces informations sur place. Une petite correction à mon d
加 59578，减 00086，减 05287，012 080 018，不适用，加 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160，332，地面向上 005，向右 27，加 0398，加
Okay, Bill. Ich möchte meine letzte Anmerkung zur Verwendung des Bordzustandsvektors für Punkt 4 zurücknehmen. Nach weiterer Prüfung vor Ort müssen die Berechnungen nun dringend durchgeführt werden. Anstatt dies zu verschieben oder doppelt durchzuführen, werden wir die bisher üblichen Verfahren anwenden. Was die Mondumlaufbahn betrifft, haben wir uns das genauer angesehen, und einige Kollegen – Jack Schmitt und seine Kollegen – un
휴스턴, 여기는 컬럼비아입니다. 잘 들립니다. 저희 세 명 모두 안으로 
Gemini 4, RKV standing by. We ha
Nice paint 
好的。我们希望你进行通风——隧道通风，直
우리가 있
أعتقد أن كل شيء يمكن إزالته، لقد نسو
好的。在面板 3 上：我们已
Hello, Naha RESC
저는 북아프리카를 아주 많이 봤습니다... 특히 주간에는요. 아주 잘 알고 있죠. 방금 D-9 아폴로 랜드마크 임무로 14번 표적을 완료했습니다
Роджер. Мы бы хотели, чтобы продувка кислородного топливного элемента и сбр
حسنًا. الخطوة التالية هي إعادة غاز المقصورة 
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Vorremmo... Le tariffe sembr
네, 저희는 바로 그 지평선을 향해 나아가고 있습
Roger. Nous sommes d'accord avec votre nouve
ठीक है। बहुत बढ
3点
Hallo Apollo 11, Hou
Ну, можно и так сказать. Я не совсем уверен, какой именно у меня крен или тангаж в сочетании с рысканием. Я только что видел, как Земля пролетела мимо иллюминатора
D'accord. Je regarde par la fenêtre de Fred. Je vois beaucoup de particules, mais une grande partie s'éloigne encore de nous, donc beaucoup scintillent dans les environs, et je ne distingue aucune constellation pour le moment, dans cette posit
C'è il rischio che questo possa aver danneggiato qualche altra parte della memoria coinvolta nell'inserimento o qualcosa del gen
There was no disorientation whatsoever. I felt that I could either look down at the ground - I felt perfectly at home looking down at it - and I could roll around on my back and look up and it was not disorienting me in any way. The spacecraft was my best reference. Any time I saw it I immediately had a good reference and, in fact at times near the end I was using my tether and actually walki
好的，杰克。听起来不错。接下来的步骤是——是套装循
Ok, ti ​
That's roughly correct, Jim. Jack will coarse aline at that attitude. This is what we're having you maneuver to the - to that attitude for. We're going to compute coarse aline gimbal angles and pass them up to him, and the first thing he'll do when he gets there, per his checklist, is to coarse aline his platform. Then he'll go into the, and, if he can't see stars, we will quickly pass up to you the - your angles to put him in the Moon-view attitude, 
Когда ускоритель отделился от нас, было видно, как топливо разбрызгивается из сопла. Когда ускоритель вра
今回のパスではMITの写真は完成しないと思う。ネガ、ネガ、問題は解決できる。フィルムがカートリッジから出すぎていたのが問題だった。今はフィルムがしっかり収まっている。小さなバックもこれで
로저, 알겠습니다.
哎，这水分离器也太不给力了吧。或许我们应该试试另一种方法
컴퓨터가 사전 준비 
5 सेकंड पर, मुझे एबॉर्ट स्टेज और इंजन आर्म की जानकारी मिलेगी। जब यह जानकारी मिल जाए
Roger. Veuillez noter que nous venons de réaliser un test HF (test 31) et n'avons reçu 
Okay; fine. I just wanted to make sure. Fred had written down some time ago, that - that our angle now was about 71 and we were going to do a midcourse of 7 feet per second because its a
こんにちは、アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。承認
Jim McDivitt. Right now it's about T+3 hours. When we came off the booster at SECO, we had rates of around half a degree a second. I tried to damp them out and finally came off around SECO + 3
它大约在上
OUT은 폐쇄되었습
我感
わかりました。SPS 
أتساءل. نسبة الرطوبة لدينا جيدة يا 
Houston, Tranquility Base. Since we'
Понял. Отключаем маяки, наземное
네. 누
أخبرني عندما أكون في ح
네. 굉장히 큰 문
रॉजर, 268 समुद्री 
Там бы
Ok
مرحباً يا نسر. هيوستن واضح تماماً. كولومبيا كان ضعيفاً جداً. 
Controlliamo se effettivamente si verifica un imbardata. Tendono a salire rispetto a me, piuttosto che allontanarsi verso poppa. Con questo tipo di illuminazione riesco davvero a vedere l'illusione di visibilità, dovuta al problema esterno del fumo sul pannello esterno. Sicuramente non sui pannelli interni. È abbastanza facile vedere, cambiando i pannelli tramite riflessi, che s
네, 알겠습니다. 아마 오늘 오후에 그 서류를 보내드렸을 겁니다. E-8 페이지를 보시면 입력 확인 작업이 1시간 후에 실행된
Right. We'll
هذه كولومبيا. تفضل. وأود أن أعرف المزيد عن هذا المنتج القادم. ه
Okay,... Questo è un altro gr
Ве
لم أتمكن قط من الحصول على قراءة لمقياس التسارع للتحقق من المنصة. كنتُ أدفعها معظم الوقت، ولم أستطع تثبيتها لفترة طويل
バミューダとムチアでは、フライ・バイ・
11番。まず、システムチェックはすべて順調でした。ただし、明日MC&Wを起動した際に上昇圧力警告灯が点灯す
في البداية، حالت العملية دون بدء عمليات الرصد فورًا كما خططنا، نظرًا لوجود مناورة مراوغة أخرى. تسبب تفريغ الحمولة في ظهور كمية هائلة من النجوم الزائفة في المنطقة، مما جعل معايرة البصريات شبه مستحيلة. لم تكن الطريقة التي ابتكرناها فعالة. أما الطريقة التي استخدمتها في النهاية، فكانت التوجه إلى نجم الشعرى اليمانية (سيريوس)، وهو ألمع نجومنا، والحصول على العمود والمحور، ثم توجيه المركبة الفضائية إلى سيريوس لاستخدامهما في البصريات، وهو ما فعلناه لاحقًا. فيما يتعلق بتشتت الضوء، يبدو أننا نتلقى تشتتًا ضوئيًا في التلسكوب الماسح الضوئي في أي وضع تقريبًا أثناء التحكم الحراري السلبي. يتخذ هذا التشتت شكل شريط ضوئي عريض يمتد عبر مركز التلسكوب بزاوية 10 درجات تقريبًا في كلا الاتجاهين من الصفر. من الصعب جدًا رؤية النجوم في هذه المنطقة. وقد كانت عمليات إعادة المحاذاة جيدة. تمكنتُ من تحديد النجم في السدس لإجراء المحاذاة، لكنني لم أستطع التعرف على النجم الذي استخدمناه في حالات مثل ريغور أو مينكنت في التلسكوب الماسح. أظهرت أول رؤية نجمية التقطتها للأرض أفقًا غير واضح المعالم. لكن بدا أن هناك خطًا واضحًا إلى حد ما بين ما بدا أنه أفق الأرض والغلاف الجوي. بدا أن مرشح خط الرؤية المرجعي قد ساعد في تحديد هذا الأفق. يوجد أفق ضبابي وغير واضح للغاية بين الفضاء وأعلى الغلاف الجوي نفسه، وهذا يصعب استخدامه. كما ذكرت سابقًا، في بعض الأحيان، عند النظر إلى القمر مع وجود الشمس في الجوار، لا تكون المنطقة المحيطة بالقمر مظلمة، بل فاتحة - تظهر كلون أزرق فاتح. وينطبق الأمر نفسه عند النظر في السدس أثناء المحاذاة مع النجم - مع وجود الشمس في مكان قريب من العدسات. ومع ذلك، لا أجد صعوبة في العثور على هذه النجوم في السدس. لم أجد صعوبةً في رصد النجوم التي استخدمتها، مثل الشعرى اليمانية والشعرى اليمانية والرأس السُّنُوب، على خلفية الأرض أثناء قياساتنا لأفق النجوم. أستطيع رؤية هذه النجوم الثلاثة بوضوح على خلفية الأرض. أعتقد أنه سيكون من الصعب جدًا إجراء محاذاة احتياطية باستخدام نجوم الشمال، لأن نجم نافي ليس ساطعًا جدًا. تمكنت من رصد مجموعات نجمية في التلسكوب الماسح إذا كانت ساطعة ومعروفة، مثل قيطس والجبار، وهي نجوم من هذا النوع. لم أتمكن من رصد مجموعات نجمية أخرى. هذ
There are some rather large pieces floating around. The flight plan is now out. Gyros are going to free at 12 33, and I'm going to fly-by-wire to track the booster. I will--this is not a 
No, ha detto che sarebbero 
रॉजर, 11. यह ह्यूस्टन है। हमें स्टेशन बदलना पड़ा। हम आपको गोल्डस्टोन के माध्यम से नहीं पढ़ पा रहे थे। हम आपको दिखा रहे हैं कि PYRO बस A सशस्त्र ह
Roger. Ich habe dich 
Il tramonto è piuttosto suggestivo, non credo di dover perdere molto tempo a guardarli. Sono molto interessanti. L'altra cosa affascinante è quanto sia buio quando gli occhi non sono abituati. Vedo sicuramente un po' di patina sul finestrino. Torno a VOX a questo punto in UHF-hi per trasmettere. Apro la visiera per pulire il microfono destro. L'ho leccato. Chiudo la visiera. La visiera è stata sigillata immediatamente per consentire al circuito della tuta di funzionare al mio posto. Non voglio rovinarmi di nuovo. L'ingresso della tuta si mantiene molto bene a circa 20 gradi. Quindi la cupola tornerà di nuovo su. Ora è a 23, 24 gradi. A quanto pare questa impostazione più alta è quella che vogliamo. Credo che aggiungerò un altro mezzo segno e potremmo averla agganciata. Finalmente si sta raffreddando un po', quindi so dove voglio arrivare con l'impostazione. Ho impostato la quantità di refrigerante per la tuta e la leva di comando a 8,5. La lettura della cupola in questo momento è di 75 gradi. L'ingresso della tuta è di 68 gradi. Molto piacevole. Sento aria fresca che mi attraversa il viso. La quantità di ossigeno sembra davvero buona, 60 e 75 psi, in centinaia. Ho tenuto d'occhio l'inverter da 250. Si sta avvicinando a 140 gradi, e quello da 150 è sceso a circa 100 gradi. Lo standby è di circa 100 gradi, che è la temperatura della cabina. Terzo, il 250 - quello sta soffrendo, e lo terrò d'occhio. Lo scambiatore di calore della cabina si sta sicuramente stabilizzando a 40 gradi, e mi sta dando del filo da torcere perché ovviamente devo 50 centesimi a Frank Samonski. Sono piacevolmente sorpreso. Anche il carburante in cabina è un po' alto. Vediamo, abbiamo 5,5 psi. La temperatura segna circa 5, correzione, 5,3, non è troppo alta per questa cabina. Sta diventando buio pesto, credo che a questo punto darò un'occhiata alle stelle. I
Попроси его спеть "Anchors Aweigh", ладно
Okay. Ganz unten, nach „Hauptauslöseknopf drücken; Sauerstoffzufuhrtank, aus; und Paketventil erneut drücken, aus, Direkter Sauerstoff, ein“
是的，先生。如果我们能早点检查清楚，就可以把
مرحباً يا
쌍둥이자리 4, 쌍둥이자리 4, 여기는 외과의사입니다. 읽으시나요? 이
ठीक है। बस एक बात याद दिलाना चाहता हूँ, हम 
Voici une lecture plus précise du carburant: si je peux atteindre le niveau exact, ce serait 78 % (avant la rétropropulsion). Je suis configuré pour effectuer la rétropropulsion: commandes automatiques. Après la rétropropulsion, je passerai en commandes de vol
And, Houston, it's doubtful right now whether we'll be able to see the stars in this configuration. The only way we could possibly get alinement is with the Earth and the terminator 
알겠습니다. 아주 흥미롭네요. 그게 당신과 비교해서 어디쯤에 위치하는지 알아볼게요. S-IV가 우리에게 미치는 영향에 대한 정보가 계속 업데이트되고 있어요. 최근 예상으로는 우리가 알려드린 경도와 거의 같은 위치에 영향을 미치지만, 위도는 0도에 가깝고 시기는 조금 늦어질 거라고 합니다. 그래도 당신
Okay. Hier spricht Ihr freundlicher COMM-Do-it-yourself-Kit mit einer empfohlenen Vorgehensweise im Fall von Lithiumhydroxid. Es sieht gut aus. Wir haben 1,8 Millimeter abgelesen, und Sie haben ausreichend Flüssigkeit für den Rest des Fluges. Sicherheitshalber möchten wir jedoch einen weiteren Satz Kommandomodul-Kanister verwenden, um mögliche Probleme mit dem Hauptkanister zu vermeiden. Ich habe eine vereinfachte Anleitung da
Хорошо. На четвёртом ряду. Открыть — Слева откройте п
分かりました。それでよろしいでしょうか
Jack, tu as observé l'ordinateur de guidage d'interruption de vol dans l'atelier de Fred
Roger. I've been having a cycling on and off of the requirements of the RCS heater. The first one was 47, and I put the heater 
罗杰，杰瑞。明白了。我注意到一个区别。我们做了优先股。第一个出了点问题；
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Fin
مرحباً، أبولو 11، هيوس
Роджер. Насколько ценными, по-вашему, являютс
我们建议不要丢弃改装套件，我再说一遍，不要丢弃。这意味着您需要手动解除0.05g的切换，预计大约在4分1
Apollo 8, Houston. Veuillez changer v
I'd like to comment a little on the sextant. Its use in a cramped spacecraft is very difficult, particularly with the helmet on. I finally decided it was going to be useless with your helmet on to try to take the angles that the stars, that were being called for, required. So I took my helmet off. This gave me a little more flexibility in using it, but still I was limited to angles of about 20 to 23° without maneuvering the spacecraft. What would happen is the star would be cut out by the upper part of the window. Now, by more frequent and liberal maneuvering of the spacecraft you could maneuver it so that you have the long axis of the window in your tracking plane. We were somewhat limited by fuel and we didn't choose to maneuver in this manner. We used Pulse Mode, too, without a lot of maneuvers. The stars that were selected for that run were ones that had rather high angles so the horizon and, therefore, we
알겠습니다. 7시 15분부터 11시 15분까지 조종사가 잠을 잡니다. 8시 35분에 RKV가 PLA와 CLA
네, 맞습니다. 짐, 잠깐 멈칫하셨네요. 이제 정확한 자세로 돌아가겠습니다. 좌우로 9
ठीक है, केन। 382 न
好的，杰克。这里有个问题。如果我们在设置电源时遇到任何问题，最快的解决方法是不是恢复到正常配置，就像我通常的做法一样，只需将 LM POWER 开关拨到 RESET 
गुंबद का तापमान अभी भी 78 डिग्री पर स्थिर है। मुझे लगता है कि मैं इसे थोड़ी 
حسنًا. الجانب الأيمن 
Bonjour, ou bon après-midi, ou peu importe. Le com
Apollo 8, en attendant le gain maximal, je vais poursuivre le résumé de la trajectoire. Nous pouvons encore rejoindre la ligne du Pacifique central à partir du treizième point, et vous êtes en route après 138 secondes de combustion. Ces 138 secondes vous permettent de sortir de la zone de correction. Nous recommandons de ne pas tenter de pré-allumage ni de redémarrage après 20 secondes. Au-delà de 20 secondes, la trajectoire pourrait dé
Roger, wir haben dich dabei. John, ich zähle dir die Zeit bis zum Retro-Sequenz-Start r
वैंस, हमें यह समझना होगा कि हमें यहाँ काम और आराम का एक नियमित चक्र स्थापित करना होगा, इसलिए हम यहाँ बैठकर हर समय प्रक्रियाओं को पढ़ते नहीं रह सकते। हमें उन्हें यहाँ लाना होगा, उनकी जाँच करन
Rog
Okay. Schritt 8 lautet: „In den Hal
了
Okay. Tell me what to write in
收到
13,
ジャックは昇る直前だと言っていました。今
Roger, we copy them and we'd like to build up t
And we're 23 - w
Ich habe die 0
로저, 현장에서 확인
Okay, Jim. Die aktuelle Konfiguration verbraucht mehr Treibstoff aus System B, als uns lieb ist. Wir bitten Si
收到，
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette, che si avvicina 
जी
チェッ
Mein Gott, sieh dir diesen 
حسنًا. نقترح أن يرتاح قائد وحدة القيادة (LMP) بينما يكون قائد وحدة القيادة (CMP) وقائد الوحدة (CDR) مستيقظين. من المفترض أن يخلد قائد وحدة القيادة إلى النوم حوالي الساعة 63، أي بعد 25 دقيقة. وستحصلون أنتم على 6 ساعات راحة. تستيقظون الساعة 69. عند الساعة 70، ينام القائد وطيار وحدة القيادة لمدة 6 ساعات حتى الساعة
Фрэнк, не могли бы вы, когда у вас будет возможность, показать нам раку
Ciao! Jim, noi... Abbiamo calcolato gli angoli di allineamento grossolani del gimbal basandoci sulla tua posizione in assetto SEP del modulo di servizio nel momento in cui Jack avvia il computer e... e gli angoli di allineamento grossolani. Cioè, diamo per scontato che tu sia a rollio 0; beccheggio 091; imbardata 0; e, se sei d'acco
好的，杰克
ठीक 
좋습니다. 아래쪽 메인 회로 상태는 여전히 매우 양호해 보이므로, 전반적으로 괜찮은 것 같습니다. 배터리 B 충전은 대략 이쯤에 완료될 것으로 예상되며, 배터리 A는 초기 충전 시 38암페어시(Ah) 정도의 용량이 남아 있을 것으로 보이므로 충전을 시도하지 않
В этом районе довольно сильная облачность. Я вижу, чт
예상보다 적게 사용하셨으니 목표량보다 훨씬 앞서 나가실
Хорошо, Джо. Снова проверяется индикатор высокого потока кислорода? Мы еще не начали пр
双
ここは独特の美しさを持っています。アメリカの高地砂漠の多くに似ています。少し違いますが、とても美しい場所です。ただし、ここにある岩石サンプル、特に硬い岩石サンプルの多くには、表面に気泡のようなものが見られるので、ご注意ください。また、今見ている岩
好的。看起来那片云的影子长度
わかった。この郵便受けにどんな素材を使うつもりだったか教えてくれ。ジャックと二人で作ってみるよ。宇宙時代の梱包用ワイヤーか、グ
Okay. Zum Warmwasserboiler: Es ist interessant, dass ich mein eigenes Mikrofon habe – ich wollte gerade sagen, dass ich mich selbst mit etwa zwei Sekunden Verzögerung höre, sobald unser Mikrofon aktiviert ist. Was die Überprüfung des primären und sekund
Ganz genau, Fred. Und falls du irgendwelche Fragen zur Ausrichtung hast, lass es uns bitte wissen. Wir beantworten sie dir gerne, genau wie die Ausrichtung auf der Erde, wie bereits beschrieben. Außerdem solltest du wissen, dass die Neigung beim Brennen d
Okay. Er sagt, er habe es die ganze Zeit gewusst. Er sagt, er
ठीक है। क्या एजेना के साथ
杰瑞，另一个识别特
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 알
D'accord. À -4 h 30, configurez pour la séparation. Premièrement, activez le couplage d'équilibrage. Deuxièmement, remettez les compteurs à zéro: 404, 405, 406, +0; lisez 470. Troisièmement, convertissez +X en 0,5 pied par seconde. Quatrièmement, CM/séparation. Cinquièmem
Roger. Comando Rate
John wollte dich nur daran erinnern, dass der schwierigste Teil erst kommt, nachdem du wie
Stanno, stanno mostrando in questo momento 12,3 ampere. La loro analisi si basa su 14, quindi sono in una p
Roger Loud a
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, this is Zanzibar Com Tech, transmitting
नहीं, मुझे कोई जल्दी नहीं है। ठीक है, सब कुछ पैक कर लो; मुझे कुछ सूट बाहर रखना पसंद नहीं है। अगर आप इसे थोड़ी देर हवा लगने देना चाहते हैं, तो प
收到。副本。哥伦比
Roger. Ich verstehe. Ungefähr zwei Minuten vor Sonnenaufgang breitet sich ein feiner weißer Dunst hinter 
Хорошо, на TIG минус 17 удалите CB (11). Шина AC A, РАДАР СХОДА, ЗАКРЫТЬ, подождите 30 секунд; удалите PGNS: РАДАР СХОДА,
Das ist ein kleiner Schritt für einen Menschen, aber
Let's see.
D'accord, je vous comprends parfaitement, moi aussi. Je vous co
Хорошо. Для информации, Фред был вчера вечером на связи; он сидел слева, и если вам нужны наши показания радиа
좋아
Roger. Vous allez me laisser 
Ich sage Ihnen, wenn
インド洋艦隊、こちらシグマ・セブン。はっきりと聞こえました。どうです
Right. We're doing that to keep our power profile where we want it. And then we're going to be turning it back on sometime prior to entry. And the time to turn it on in entry, of course, isn't specified because as you turn it on, the voltages show that they can h
알겠습니다. 몇 시간 후에 방송될 TV 프로그램 촬영을 위해
アポロ8号、ヒ
Houston, Apollo 11. How about comin
للعلم فقط يا هيوستن، أثناء - قبل الدوران حول القمر مباشرة، رأينا الكثير من الحطام الذي كان يطفو بجانبنا، بما في ذ
Vous avez largement le temps. Prenez votre temps pour que les comma
Okay. Non avevo una risposta quando sono entra
休斯顿，你拿到录像带
Très bien. 
迈克，我是弗兰
わかりました、チャーリー。まだあまり開いていません。もう一度シャントさせないと正確な数値を出すのは難しいです
Громко и ясно: «Апо
我们想知道，在过去的24小时里，有没有人出现过类似弗兰克的症状？我们还想知道——你知道，前几天我们告诉过你，可以随意服用马雷津——我们想知道有没有人服用过其他药物，然后我们想和你们聊聊甜面包、水之类的东
네. 먼저 빠르게 읽어 드릴게요. 대략적인 내용을 파악하실 수 있도록요. 패드, 서비스 모듈 JETT 자세, 달 관측 자세, 태양 관측 자세
了解。見えました
हाँ, बिल्कुल। लेकिन मैं इस पर कोई राय नहीं देना चाहता। आप ही ब
조명이 환하게 켜져 있고, 기분도 좋고, 활기찬 분위기입니다. 객실 매개변수: 기압 1, 습도 65, 온도 20, 1번 구획 내부 압력, 1차 자동 155, 2차 자
D'accord. On y a déjà pensé. On y a pensé très tô
EMS und 
Roger. Un altro commento: nonostante abbia suscitato molte polemiche durante le riunioni sulla priorità dei dati, sembra che un'inclinazione di 10 gradi verso l'alto sia la posiz
Das ist die falsche Aussage; wir haben das richtige Raumschiff. Ich verrate Ihnen: Wenn es noch zwei Tage so weitergeht, haben wir nicht nur das ric
Это верно, и мы обязательно обсудим 
Negative, Buzz. It still looks kind of bad. Apparently, when you move around, i
हाँ, वैंस, बिल्कुल सही। सेक्स्टेंट पूरी तरह से धुंधला है और इसके ज़रिए दिखाई देन
휴스턴, 시스템이 괜찮아 
Ho
そして、先ほどここで少し操作すると、目的地よ
Ja, warum sagen wir nicht einfac
यह तो नकारात्मक है। मुझे डर है
حسنًا، بدأت الحرارة ترتف
Je vais co
Roger. J'entends Kano demander à ce qu'on vérifie sa tension. Je vais la lui donner tout de suite. Voyon
Apollo 8, ici Houston. 2, /: 46427, moins 053, plus 141 moi
Stand by on that. Aquarius, we recommend drivin
いいえ、そうではありませ
アポロ11号、
ठीक है। कैमरों के लिए, हम चाहेंगे कि आप इसे उस दिन करें जब आपके पास पूरी शक्
Nein. Ich denke, alles läuft zieml
了解。私たちのモニターにも
아폴로 8호, 아
Wenn wir die Triebwerksstufe mit 3 Fuß pro Sekunde ausrichten und 10 Grad Abweichung von der Plattform haben, ist das für uns im Hinblick auf die Delta-V-Operation schwer zu erkennen. Warum schalten wir sie also nicht – sobald wir die Stufe erreichen – kurz in den SEF-Modus? Nun ja, 5 Minuten bevor die Orbitrate erre
Clear blue sky; 32 seconds; 9,
好的。您现在需要我们
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। 2, /: 46427, माइनस 053, प्लस 141 माइनस
No, it doesn't. This is Jack, Joe. Fred... It doesn't bother me at 
Okay, Bill. Ich möchte meine letzte Anmerkung zur Ver
지금 바로 앞에 있어요. 총이 없
Да, ты их дейс
ठीक है
D'accord. La purge est terminée. Merci. Concernant votre système cryogénique, il semble que nous aurons 82 kg dans chaque réservoir d'oxygène et 5 kg dans chaque réservoir d'hydrogène. Vous dépassez largement la capacité
D'accord. On va le graver 
Это «Сигма С
알겠습니다. 입문 점검표 E-
Apollo 8, Houston. Siamo a 42 minuti dall'atterraggio e abbiam
रॉजर। काम प
Dein Film über das Kommandomodul scheint ja ganz gut zu funktionieren, Charlie, wenn man bedenkt, wie viel wir mitgenommen haben. Es sieht so aus, als hätten wir genau 
Roger. Une chose que vous pourriez vérifier, nous avons eu un petit... Voulez-vous pre
नहीं, मुझे तो यह भी पक्का नहीं पता कि हम ऐसा करेंगे या नहीं, माइक। अगर मैं कर पाऊं तो - ऐसा लगता ह
是的，
Коррекц
外科医生，这里是指挥
ठीक है। "गाइडेंस कंट्रोल" के नीचे, तीसरे चरण को मोड कंट्रोल में बदल दिया जाना चाहिए, दोनों को ATT होल्ड पर सेट किया जाना 
Nel circuito di raffreddamento secondario, sembra che la valvola di contropressione sia leggermente aperta. Ti consiglio di portare l'interruttore EVAP del circuito di raffreddamento secondario 
Roger. Volevo solo farvi sapere che, visto che avete superato di un'ora e mezza la vostra 
تم تثبيت الجيروسكوبات، وتم إ
拍摄一张照片，感光度为 64 ASA，感光度值为 1
休斯顿，宁静。DELTA-VY 为负数，DELTA-
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。收到。你
了解、ジム。燃費向上のため、MIN IMPUS（最小インパルス）までトリムアップしてもらいたいんだけど、トリムアップは実際にはほとんど必要ないし、あとはそのま
And one of the nice things, Jack, particularly for a novice like myself, is the - the ease of moving around in here. It's, of course, as you know from working in the command module simulator, it's really quite a boon to have zero gravity as an aid. Because you get - pretty confining, really, at one g, to move around very much in there, and it's quite easy in this environment. The, as you can see, it looked pretty clean, I found a couple of loose washers about it and the - a little plastic cap off the sequence camera had come loose and I found it lodged over by the ED panel. Okay. Right under Jim, now, he's actually standing on a - what looks to be a can here. And, for the sake of all the people back there, housed inside this can is the - the ascent engine where, hopefully, you can see my hand resting on top of right now - the engine that we use to get off of the Moon. Immediately adjacent to the engine cover here, I have my hand on a white box now, which has been shown before. This happens to be Jim's, or the backpack which'll supply oxygen and water for cooling while on the lunar surf
Roger, je ne vous reçois pas. Je n
아폴로 8호, 약 2분 30초 후에 괌에서 허니서클 기지로 지
LMPは0.64です。飛行中ずっとこ
로저. 99라는 숫자 마음에
네, 맞습니다. 마지막 단계는 배터리를
現時点ではすべてのシステムが非常に良好に見えます。これは誰もが想像できるほどタイトな
रॉजर, मैं 11-BRAVO, 11-BRAVO ΔV शून्य पर वापस जाऊ
D'après les calculs, vous devriez voir la Lune. Ce sera la pleine lune. Vous devriez voir la majeure partie du disque lun
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. FIDO 요원들이 데이터를 분석하고 있습니다. 아직 정확한 결과를 말씀드리기는 어렵지만, 현재까지는 매우 순조롭게 진
حسنًا، ١١. أولًا، في فحوصات أنظمتنا، سارت الأمور على ما يرام. مع ذلك، أودّ تذكيرك بأنه غدًا قد ترى ضوء مؤشر ضغط الصعود عند تفعيل نظام MC&W. لا ينبغي أن تكون هناك مشكلة. لقد ل
알겠습니다. 현재 시점에서 진공 근지점은 23.6도이고 비행 경로 각도는 -6.25도입니다. 이는 중간 기착 없이 계산한 값입니다. 그는 진입 5시간 전에 중간 기착-7 기동을 하는 방안
Roger, 11. Copy those, and we've checked them here on the ground, also. One correction to my last transmission. We would like that prior to the waste water dump, which is coming 
그건 부정적입니다. 저는 열어보지 않았습니다. 이 측정값을 다 확인할 때까지 열어보지 않을 겁니다. 페크다는 현재 안개층과 지표면 사이의 중간 위치인 1.7에서 멸종했습니다. 좋습니다, 우메라, 제 상태는 아주 좋습니다. 우주복 온도가 상당히 내려가고 있습니다. 증기 배출구 온도는 많이 내려가지 않았지만, 우주복 내부 온도는 60도입
Hier spricht
Das ist bestätigt, Jim. Ziehen S
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы действительно впечатлены четкостью и детализацией изображения. Цвета — сейчас, когда я смотрю на него на нашем мониторе, это действительно 
Roger. 
No, ora sono tutto eccita
双子座六号，卡那封。
Primo pasto a 1 più 56. Ho visto molte bolle d'aria nell'acqua
ठीक है। नहीं, मेरे पास 31 और
Роджер. Ты 
Я бы предпочёл даже не вдаваться в подробности. Наконец-то достал один дозиметр, придётся повесить его на люк, а это... дайте-ка я 
로저. 현재 위치는 107 + 23 + 03입니다. 다음 추적 구간은 
Hey Jerry. Wann willst du denn endl
Hé
1、2、3、4、5。怎么样
了解。バズ、この調子で君は素晴らしい。5点ずつ読んでいる。短いカウントで来
Die
Buzz, this is Houston. If you're still in the vicinity of the, could y
Muchea Cap Com, ici Sigma Seven. Sur UHF. 
Mentre questi altri guardano la luna, voglio assicurarmi che abbiamo un buon rapporto. Che ne dici di far
هل بدأتَ ب
La cabine est un peu plus chaude que 
好了，吉姆。现在应该差不多了。我们已经复制了你对第9题的回
OAMS는 어
로저, 버즈. 피치 마이너스 50, 빔 와이드에서 분해했습니다. 
Хорошо. У нас есть три момента. Во-первых, все ваши результаты — 
좋습니다. 2단계: "밸런스 커플, 끔; 데드 밴드, 최소; 자세 제어: 피치 및 롤은 펄스로; 요는 다이렉트로;
Voyons v
77:50 
بمجرد أن أضبط رمية النرد، لا أعتقد أن الأمر سيكون سيئاً للغا
Apollo 8, stavamo ottenendo quello ch
Je prends des photos en g
The walls actually look pockmarked. Sure enough, and they're not filled in. Pockmarked and it looks like somebody's painted white paint vertic
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我想我们可能有点跑题了。我们之前向你们提供的高增益天线的俯仰角和偏航角数据，是应比尔的要求，他想知道在自动响应模式下，天线应该设置哪些位置。如果我们不想同时使用全向天线，限
ハッセルブラッド、ワイン
Carnarvon, 
ठीक है। एक तैयार रखो, हम तुम्हें वह पृथ्वी वाला दिल
Una cosa che potrebbe interessare al mondo è cosa fai dopo la masterizzazione, ovvero come riconfigurare gli interruttori. Noi... Ti abbiamo sentito controllare la checklist. Ma, immagino che ora, in prat
حسناً يا غاس. على الأقل حصلنا على بعض الوقود ه
네. 기억하시겠지만, 저는 처음에 TV 카메라가 있던 분화구 쪽에서 시작해서 표면의 암석 샘플을 여러 개 채취했고, 분화구 북쪽으로 약 6~6미터(20~15~20피트) 깊이의 암석 샘플도 몇 개 채취했습니다. 그런데 그 지역이 하강 엔진의 배기가스에 많이 노출되었을 것 같아서 분화구 남쪽으로 건너가서 우리가 언급했던 길쭉한 이중 분화구 주변과 그 너머 지역에서 샘플을 채취했습니다. 주어진 짧은 시간 동안 눈으로 확인할 수 있는 최대한 다양한 종류의 암석 샘플을 채취하려고 노력했습니다. 이전에 분화구 주변을 걸으면서 봤던 다른 샘플들도 몇 개 있었는데, 다시 가져
हाँ। आपने ऐसा क
11, Houston. Nous vous recommandons de désactiver Bravo et Charlie; sélecti
わかりました。しばらくバッテリーの充電を中止し、CM TM を始動させて温度を表示してほしいとのことですね。それから、ジャックのチェックリストにいくつか変更点があります。ジャックが作業を完了し次第、COMM をジャックに引き渡します。それでは、それで進めて
それ
That's affirmative. That completes that card. The rest of the updates are just really for your information based on our 58 hour platform - look at the platform. We are really good shape. Your GYRO's have almost no drift in them since - plotted update we were looking at X of a minus 2.24... Y of point plus 0.87, Z of minus 0.11. Since the update, which was based 
Plus 37746, minus 03299, plus 00844 179 346 357, nicht anwendbar, plus 00176 37
Fred, in etwa 4 Minuten werden wir Sie an eine andere Kommunikationsstelle weiterleiten, und es wird ungefähr eine Minute dauern, bis wir die Uplink-Ver
Okay. Das heißt dann DÜSEN für und DREHMOMENT 
Roger. D-8 at 06 plus 35 plus 0
Roger. Copied for the Height-Adjust GET of burn, 03 plus 03 plus 19; Delta-V, 0.8, duration, 0 plus 01; yaw 0
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. على هذا النجم، تعمل مناورة الوضع التلقائي بشكل ممتاز. أنا الآن ع
- - e questa
Well, 
ठीक है। आप चाहते हैं कि मैं अपने पुर
알겠습
확인 완료. P22: T1, 시간 82:37:35; T2, 82:42:50. 목표 지점은 북쪽으로 7마일입니다. 
Well, COMM's good. Son of a bitch might 
收到，一切
كان بالتأكيد أسفل مني. كنت أتابعه أسفل مني منذ كارنارفون تقريبًا. حتى كارنارفون تقريبًا، كان أسفلنا، ثم ارتفع إلى الأفق، ثم عاد أسفلنا مرة أخرى. بدا وكأنه في مدار مختلف عن مداري. كان له أوج وحضيض مختلفان عن مداري. على أي حال، حاولت الاقتراب منه عند الفجر حالما تمكنت من تحديد موقعه. كما قلت، في ذلك الوقت كان على بعد ميل أو ميلين أمامي - أسفل مني. لذا، كلما حاولت الاقتراب منه، قلّت المسافة التي قطعتها. كنت أطلق الصواريخ عكسيًا. كنت أستخدم محركات الدفع العلوية لإطلاقها بطريقة تقلل من سرعتي الإجمالية، ثم أطلقها... في الوقت نفسه. لم أتمكن من الاقتراب منه أبدًا، واستمر في الابتعاد عني. أصبح من الواضح لي أنه بحلول الوقت الذي نصل فيه إلى هاواي، فإن الاقتراب من الصاروخ المعزز في الوقت المناسب للقيام بالنشاط خارج المركبة معه سيستهلك على الأرجح كل الوقود الموجود على متن المركبة. اتفقنا في القواعد الأساسية على عدم القيام بذلك. لذا تواصلت مع مركز قيادة المركبة الفضائية، وقررنا عدم المضي قدمًا في جزء الصاروخ المعزز من المهمة. لا أدري إن كنت قد ذكرت ذلك، ولكن عندما انفصلنا عن الصاروخ المعزز، بدا أن معدلات دوراننا عليه منخفضة، حوالي نصف درجة في الثانية في كل من الميل والانعراج. حاولتُ تخفيف هذه المعدلات. أطلقتُ نبضة واحدة في كل اتجاه، 
알겠습니다. 그럼 저희가 예상하는 대로 그 작
रॉजर। यह क्रांति 41 है। प्रा
收到。您需要在自动选择开关上启用 Alfa 和 Bravo 四轴飞行器。禁用 Charlie 和 Delta 四
我们还没有主线。正在经过 130
Die Temperaturen sehen gut aus. Hat es irgendwelche Aus
Okay, Wassermann; un
Хорошо. И верхний ряд указан верно. Во втором ряду нам нужно, чтобы были закрыты QUAD TCA с 1 по 4. В третьем ряду нам нужно, чтобы был закрыт ATCA (PGNS). В четвертом ряду нам нужно, чтобы были закрыты
Ok, 11. Sembra che le prestazioni del motore durante entrambe le accensioni di questa missione siano state
Houston
إذا كان الأمر كذلك، فكل ما يقلقني هو أن يتم ترتيب كل شيء. قبل ذلك بوقت طويل... أريد أن يكون كل شيء في مكانه. جميع أغراض التخزين مُزالة، وكل... جاهزين للانطلاق ومعرفة ما يجب فعله بالضبط... حتى نتمكن من ال
나는 열등감
Okay. Unter „Einschalten“ steht 
今日は雲がほとんどなく、本当に素晴らしい景色が見られたよう
Dopo 22 ore riprenderemo il Piano di Volo. A quel punto saremo di nuovo 
알겠습니다, 빌. 4번 항목에 온보드 상태 벡터를 사용하는 것에 대한 제 의견은 이제 마무리 짓겠습니다. 현장에서 좀 더 살펴본 결과, 's'를 만들고 모든 계산을 진행해야 하는데, 미루거나 두 번 하는 것보다는 지금까지 사용해 온 절차대로 진행하는 것이 좋겠습니다. 달 궤도 관련해서는, 잭 슈미트를 비롯한 몇몇 사람들이 창문이 미치는 영향을 검토하고 있습니다. 기본적으로 2번 항목에 영향을 줄 수 있는 두 가지 옵션이 있는 것 같습니다. 하나는 물론 당신과 짐이 자리를 바꿔서 짐이 밖을 내다보고 SAM을 조준하는 것이고, 다른 하나는 기체를 돌려서 짐이 광학계를 최대한 앞으로 향하게 하고 망원경으로 SAM을 조준하는 것입니다. 창문을 어떻게 활용할 수 있을지 여러분의 의견을 듣고
أنا أنظر إلى النجوم الآن. ليس الظلام دامسًا تمامًا، فالضوء ليس ساطعًا. يبدو أن النافذة تُعطي مرشحًا يُقلل من ظهور النجوم ذات القدر الظاهري المنخفض. أنظر الآن إلى الدب الأكبر، وصولًا إلى نجم السماك الرامح، ويبدو لي أن ما أراه الآن هو في الغالب نجوم من الدرجة الثانية وما دونها. النجوم الأصغر حجمًا غير ظاهرة تقريبًا في الوقت الحالي. مع حلول الليل، أعتقد أن المزيد م
Роджер. Всё выглядит нормально. Думаю, они просто пытаются смотреть впер
13, Houston. Nous aimerions que vous vérifiie
了解。DELTA-VZはプラス00190、オプションロール、ピッチ213 357、NAです。DELT
わかりました。そのページのすべての下に、以下の項目を追加してください。「エントリー、準備」チェックリストに戻って
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. أعتقد ذلك. لديّ فوكس
ठीक है। एक शब्द म
左侧窗外是一片相对平坦的
없으시면 언제든지 제가 드릴 수 있어요. 저희는 언제든지 만
150볼트 인버터의 온도는 189°이
Apollo 8. Torniamo alla batte
That's affirmative on the gimbals, Fred. Nothing else on page 14. Proceed to page 15, and under " CHECKOUT," we'd like to scratch that wording and just say "Verify the following switches: GUIDANCE CONTROL,;" step 3 - correction - it's line 3, 
Siamo in INERZIALE,
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir fragen uns, ob Sie schon mit dem Start begonnen haben.
Négatif. 
Ich ha
La rép
Хорошо. В д
Jim, vorhin dachten wir, es gäbe ein Missverständnis bezüglich der Menge an Trinkwasser, die Sie trinken dürfen. Wir möchten Ihnen aber versichern, dass Sie so viel Wasser trinken können, wie Sie möchten. Der Trinkwassertank fasst 38 Pfund, und das reicht völlig aus. Die Ärzte empfehlen Ihnen außerdem, so viel Fruchtsaft zu trinken, wie Si
알겠습니다.
Хорошо. Мы также заметили, что Университет Хьюстона вчера вечером проиграл свой пе
صحيح. الفرق الوحيد بين الصيغة السابقة هو أنه بدلاً من قيمة العائد المتوقعة البالغة 400,0
準備ができましたら
На 
सिग्मा सेवन, यह कैल कैप कॉम है। ब्लाइंड में दोहराया जा रहा प्रसारण। केप सलाह देता है कि अपनी घड़ी को 33 सेकंड पर र
Roger, 11. Nella colonna A a pagina F2-20, riga 5, riga 05, i nuovi dati sono 01042; riga 07, i nuovi dati sono 00256. Saltiamo alla riga 11, 00070; la riga 12 è 00042; la riga 13 è 77730. Nella colon
VI，夏威夷
Perché non lo metti lì, così? È tutto
Das ist ein alter Favorit von mir, ungefähr 20 Jahre alt – ein Album namens „Music Out of the Moon“, das vor etwa 20 Ja
हाँ, ब्रूस, यह बात कुछ हद तक सही है। हमारे पास ये दो हाइड्रोजन फिल्टर हैं, जो तब तक ठीक काम करते हैं जब तक आप उन
MASTERALARM überprüfen
Roger. That's why we have the top priority stuff in the. We figure you've got a much
जेमिनी VI. हम आपको 17-1 के लिए हरी झंडी देते हैं। साथ ही, आपके दांव-पेच के बारे में मेरे पास एक अपडेट है। क्या आप नकल 
水瓶座，休斯顿
ジム、プラッ
查理，对不起，你总是断断续续的。我们只听到你说“你可以做任何事”，之后就什么也听不见了，我们
收到。我们希
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。准备复制您的更
Je suis content que tu l'aies fait — toi aussi, Neil; c'était une bonne idée, une sacrée bonne idé
- 約3秒
The reason that we think that that would work is that it worked on Apollo 10. It made the constellations all recognizable when 
罗杰
わかった。次は君の
D'accord. C'est exact. La dernière phrase de la mise à jour indique que l'on 
아폴로 
ठीक है। कुछ चीज़ें हैं जिन्हें मैं ठीक करना चाहता हूँ। हम आपको बजट उपलब्ध करा देंगे। अभी हमारे पास एक सीमा है; हम आपके लिए कुछ और सटीक आंकड़े जुटाने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं, और वे थोड़ी देर में उपलब्ध हो जाएंगे। फिलहाल आपका उपयोग उड़ान योजना के अनुसार है, इसलिए सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है। हमें आपसे क्रू स्टेटस रिपोर्ट चाहिए। हम दो उड़ान योजनाओं के विचार को अंतिम रूप देना च
Продолжим,
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह ज़ांज़ीबार कॉम टेक से एचएफ यूएचएफ सिग्नल आ रहा है। आपकी आवाज़ कमज़ोर और अस्पष्ट आ रही है, कमज़ोर और
نحصل الآن على صورة جميلة من الأسفل، 11. الألوان تظهر بوضوح تام، ويمكننا رؤية الأفق وسواد الفضاء النسبي، ودون الخوض في مسأ
Roger. I'd like t
I'v
2+40 是 OAMS Ret
रॉजर। हमने सेकेंडरी वॉटर EVAP कंट्रोल वाल्व बंद कर दिया है, लेकिन हो सकता है कि उसने रिटर्न पंप चार्ट चेक के दौरान इवेपोरेटर बैक-प्रेशर वाल्व के पूरी तरह बं
أبولو 8، هيوستن. قدرة OMNI على نقل البيانات بمعدل بتات عالٍ مشوشة، لكنها قابلة للاستخد
चार्ली, अपोलो 11। मुझे इसे रोकने के बारे में कुछ सवाल हैं। मुझे लगता है कि इसे रोकने का सबसे आसान तरीका यह होगा - हम अभी 0 डिग्री यॉ पर हैं और 
روجر، يا صديقي السابع. لقد سمعتك بوضوح تام على جها
Я могу обеспечить вам высокую скорость переда
روجر، ديك. أقرأك بصوت عالٍ وواضح، بصوت طوا
Nun ja, das ist nicht das, was Sie erwarte
Okay. Ich war nur neugierig, wie viel
如果您需要任何帮助，我们
I don't know. Your time
コピーします
Водолей, Хью
Roger, 11. It's a pretty good picture on clarity here. We're having - can you tell us - It appears to us 
알겠습니다. 이해했
好的，如果您愿意的话——事实上，我们希望您把所有的 2 类
Okay. Okay, Jack. Ich wollte gerade sagen, dass das Kommandomodul, wie es der Zufall so will, genau jetzt wieder angefangen hat zu belüften, sodass ich wahrscheinlich keine guten 
Роджер. Мы учли ваше мнение, что вам не удастся 
Wally, ich habe 
호라이즌 체크리스트를 제시
Хорошо. Не могли бы
D'accord. En consultant les prévisions météo que je vous ai fournies, il semble que la couche nuageuse dispersée à 600 mètres d'altitude au point cible soit surmontée d'une couche instable de 1800 mètres. Au point de portance maximale, la situation sera sensiblement la même, et l'altitude restera inchangée sur toute la zone de déc
好的。Fred-o，这应该在 CB(16) 上，但是是逆变器 2 打开。好的，关于任务定时器激活。执行步骤 1，更正第 1 行和第 2 行。省略“set m
휴스턴, 아
你知道，如果我调整偏航角
في الحقيقة، شعرت بجوع
ポケットが
حسنًا، أبولو 8. لقد راجعنا جميع أنظمتكم. لديكم الموافقة على الانطلاق. من الأمور التي نود القيام بها فور خروجكم من الجانب الآخر هو فحص ضغط الهيليوم. سنقوم بمقارنة الضغط الأخير
Se così fosse, sarebbe fantastico, non
C'est exact. Ensuite, sur le panneau 250, ouvrez le disjoncteur BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING 
I say I'm sure glad we
座舱已准备就绪，我不想再降低穹顶了。一切都很顺利。检查时间，18分钟。时间正常。推进器——自动左滚转119度。自动右滚转115度。手动左滚转100度。座舱热交换器43度。自动俯仰95度。自动俯仰95度。自动左偏航80度。自动右偏航100度。250安培逆变器，哦，真不错，低于160度。150安培逆变器——110度。备用温度125度。转向座舱热
好的，第二个故障也在面板 5 上。断路器 POWER-1，主 A 断路器，断开；断路器 SENSOR SIGNA
ठीक है, जिम। हम प्रक्रियाएँ जल्द से जल्द पूरी करके आपको उपलब्ध कराने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। वे तैयार हैं। अभी हमारे कर्मचारी उन्हें CMS/LMS में चलाकर एकीकृत कर रहे हैं, ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि सभी प्रक्रियाएँ सही हैं, समयसीमा सुचारू और आरामदायक है, और बाकी सब ठीक है। इस प्रक्रिया को पूरा होने में अभी कुछ घंटे और लगेंगे। हालांकि, हमें उम्मीद है कि इससे पहले हम आपको एक समग्र समयसीमा 
ठीक है।
روجر
Tranquility Base, Hous
D'accord. Avant de commencer la copie, cette procédure consiste simplement à activer le manomètre à hélium supercritique pour que vous puissiez effectuer la lecture. Le problème est que cette pression d'hélium supercritique n'atteigne pas 1 800 psi d'ici 103 heures, auquel cas nous risquerions de rompre le disque de rupture lors de l'activation. Or, en se basant sur la pression au lancement et sur un temps de montée nominal d'environ 6,5 psi par heure 
ठीक है। 2 मिनट पूरे होने में 20 सेकंड बाकी हैं
ठीक है। हम आपको पावरअप समय के बारे में सूचित करेंगे और यदि आप कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हैं, तो 
Bene. Nel controllo del circuito secondario, quand
К вашему сведению, мы вас оповестили — похоже, сейчас в прода
Роджер
Roger. Deke, die Dunstschicht ist sehr hell. Ich würde sagen, sie liegt 8 bis 10 Grad über dem Horizont. Und ich würde sagen, sie ist etwa doppelt so hoch über dem Horizont wie das helle blaue Band bei Sonnenuntergang; sie ist doppelt so dick. Sterne werden verdeckt, wenn wir durch diese Dunstschicht fliegen. Ich habe gerade eine gute Auswahl an Sternen, die ich
रॉजर, समझ गया। दूसरा प्रयास
はい、そうしてください。さて、宇宙船を正
बैटरी C 37.1
Checking out d-c volts at this 
Контрольный список после посадки. Шлем — снять и убрать. Думаю, нам не стоит этого
알겠습니다. 컬럼비아의 
Roger. Voice update recovery areas durin
اسمع. أود منك أن تخفف من استخدام واقي الشمس الخاص بك من 
रॉजर, जैक। यह सही है; और अगर आपके पास अभी समय हो, तो मेरे पास कॉमेट बेनेट की खोज के लिए उड
はい。BAT C 37、PYRO BAT A 37、PYRO BAT B 37、A 
음, 케이프타운에 도착할 날이 너무 기다려져요. 그냥 저게 사라지는 걸 지켜봐야 할 것 같네요. 이미 충
휴스턴, 말씀하세요. 이글입
Houston, Apollo 11. J'observe actuellement ce nuage autour du Pakistan au sextant, et il semble s'agir d'une seule cellule en phase finale de développement
Nous comprenons que cel
C 电池电
ठीक है।
حسناً. أعتقد أننا حصلنا على المبلغ المطلوب ولدينا ح
Ok, Ho
素晴らしい。本当に素晴らしい
了解。了解しました
O
11, ह्यूस्टन। पिछले दो घंटों में हमने CO2 के आंशिक दबाव में थोड़ी-सी लगातार वृद्धि देखी ह
Ruhe bewahren, Housto
È davvero una vista fantastica attraverso quel sestante. Un minuto fa, durante quella manovra AUTO, il reticolo ha attraversato il Mediterraneo. Si vedeva tutto i
我们在
はい、オフ
Хорошо, я понял. Вы хотите, чтобы я дал команду «Вперед», прежде чем я… я… Конечно, я только что сделал 
Okay. Go ahead
Roger, Mike. SEP PAD, RCS/G&N: und sind NA,, 100 395 000, ist NA, Rolle 00
了解。血圧についてはもう放送で伝えた
حسنًا. نقترح وقت البدء ووقت التوقف، وستكون في الوضع أ. نطلب معدل دوران يساري، والذي لاحظنا أنك تفضله، وهو معدل دوران يساري دورة واحدة في الساعة، وهذا في وضعك الحالي (أي، زاوية ميل 10 درجات، وزاوية انحراف 10 درجات، وزاوية انحراف 45 درجة). الخطوة 1: توقف عند زاوية دوران 150 درجة؛ الخطوة 2: احصل على البيانات في الوضع اليدوي؛ الخطوة 3: انتقل إلى وضع الشعاع الضيق التلقائي؛ الخطوة 4: تأكد من التتبع في الوضع التلقائي ثم انتقل إلى وضع إعادة 
没错。好的。下一个。模式 - 当姿态稳定后，选择“模式控制自动”。按下此键监控速率；当速率小于每秒 0.1 度时，调整所有轴的速率，然后禁用 X 轴推进器。好的
你已经
ठीक है, जैक। ज़रा रुको। मैं भूल गया था कि रियोस्टैट ANUN/NUM पर पूरी तरह से नीचे सेट
この方向を向いていると、側面の窓から太陽が流れていくのが見えます。そしてもちろん、今、窓の一つからは地球が見えます。
جاهز لل
أورورا سفن، كانو. للعلم فقط، محول الطاقة 250 يعمل الآن على درجة
È successo mentre erava
Р
That's affirmative. I've never had more than about, of, I would say about 3/4 of a degree per second in any one direct
Хорошо. Начнём заделыва
ロジャー、ニール。まず始めに。アポロ11号ミッションに対する祝辞が、世界各国の首脳からホワイトハウ
Наш монитор показывает довольно хорошее, четкое изображение под этим углом. Я уже нашел кронштейн под углом 90 
分かりました。もう中間コースが必要かどうか
Роджеру 11 лет. Мы смотрим сейчас, и на телевизоре по-прежнему всё прекра
알겠습니다. 현재 시간 32시간 00분. 완료 후 지시사항: 다음 자세로 기동하십시오. 롤 101.0, 피치 090.0, 요 000.0. 최고 피치 -23, 요 93. 감속은 일반적인 절차를 따르십시오. 기체가 안정화된 후, 스핀업 전에 베넷 혜성을 촬영하십시오. G 매거진이 있는 육분의를 사용하십시오. 즉, 초고속 흑백 필름, 맞죠? 저조도용 필름입니다. 5초, 20초, 60초 노출로 각각 한 장씩 총 세 장의 사진을 촬영하십시오. 자동 광학계를 사용하십시오. 값은 R1 + 34717, R2 - 08028, R3 + 35075입니다. 수동 광학계를 사용하여 5초, 20초, 60초 노출로 각각 한 장씩 총 세 장의 사진을 촬영하십시오. 샤프트는 000.8도, 트러니언은 약 50프레임을 제거합니다. 즉, 첫 번째 프레임 이전과 마지막 프레임 이후에 각각 2초씩, 초당 24프레임 속도로 촬영합니다. 다시 말해, 첫 번째 프레임 이전과 마지막 
روجر، جيم. ع
ドリフト能力もまだ残っ
Endlich haben wir das Problem mit der Anzugstemperatur gelöst. Ich verstehe jetzt, warum Scott sich nur wegen dieser Rekordposition Sorgen gemacht hat. Auch das Mithörgeräusch ist weg. Die Anzugstemperatur beträgt – MARK.T – 68 Grad und ich fühle mich großartig. Die Anzugkuppel hat wieder etwa 72 Grad. Offenbar schwankt sie, und wir befinden uns gerade in der Nacht. Ich glaube, wir haben die Anzugstemperatur gut im Griff. Ich schalte wieder auf VOX-Push-to-Talk um. In 25 Minuten ist Muchea dran. Ich muss unbedingt noch einen Sonnen
Je dois effectuer une poussée translationnelle en deux 
いいでしょ
Roger. Mir ist aufgefallen, dass Sie mit Ihrer letzten geplanten Aktivität beginnen. Die anfängliche Nachführung deutet darauf hin, dass die anfängliche Mittelkursgeschwindigkeit möglicherweise unter den ursprünglich geschätzten 4 Fuß pro Sekunde liegt. Wir haben Ihre Brenndaten geprüft, und alles verläuft so reibungslos, wie Sie beschrieben haben; alle Werte scheinen im Normalbereich zu liegen. Die Systeme sehen gut aus; auch die Lageregelung scheint in Ordnung 
ठीक है, जिम। वहाँ पैनल 11 पर, टेप रिकॉर्डर के अलावा, आप रेंडेज़वस हीटर ब्
プラスXスラスターとは何かご存知です
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。オ
了解
Роджер, основное давление кислорода составля
그렇게 해주시면 정말 좋겠지만, 저희는 짐벌 각도를 감시할 직원을 매장에 한 명 배치할 예정입니다. 하지만 OMNI 카메라를 교체해 주실 수 있다면 많
Okay, what I have out now, J
正如“奥列·列昂诺夫”所说，（字迹模糊）在
收到。我们明白。我们现在也在观察地球，那里有一条壮观的细长云带。看起来像是喷射气
ठीक है, X माइनस 00011, Y प्लस 0002, Z माइनस 0002, रो
حس
Roger. Je ne 
Roger. Hier spricht Gemini 4, der Kommandopilot. Ich habe gerade ein etwa fünfeinhalbstündiges Nickerch
Нам это кажется 
A powdery surface when the sun hits. *** they split up all
Assi
Okay. The same comments. I'll start at the top again here. Okay. "BALANCE COUPLE" should be changed to "OFF." Under, it should be "LMP " to "JET." Scratch "400 plus 1" at minus 2; scratch "MASTER ARM, ON" at minus 1. Add at minus 10 seconds "MANUAL ULLAGE"; add ignition - can add the comment about "If no start, START pushbutton, push; still no start, DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, ON." At the plus 5-second point, scratch "DESCENT E
Роджер. Из новостной ленты отдела по связям с общественностью: «Аполлон-11» по-прежнему доминирует в новостях по всему миру. Только четыре страны — коммунистический Китай, Северная Корея, Северный Вьетнам и Албания — еще не сообщили своим гражданам о вашем полете и высадке на Луну. Один журналист сказал, что у него закончились слова, чтобы описать ваш успех. Сегодня вечером президент Никсон планирует посмотреть бейсбольный матч всех звезд в Вашингтоне. После игры он отправится в район поиска и спасения в Тихом океане. В среду вечером он вылетит с острова Джонстон на вертолете на военно-морской корабль связи «Арлингтон». Затем в четверг утром он снова сядет в вертолет и полетит на «Хорнет» как раз вовремя, чтобы стать свидетелем ваш
वो देखने में... एक तरफ... मैं ज
Der sekundäre Kühlkreislauf sah wirklich gut aus. Der Radiator scheint gut abgedichtet zu sein, und alle anderen Komponenten arbeiten einwandfrei. Die Hauptsauerstoffregler wurden bei unserer Überprüfung mit 104 psi befüllt. In der Mondumlaufbahn ist mit einem Wasserverdampfungsbedarf von etwa 1 Pfund pro Stunde zu rechnen. Dies ist jedoch nur eine Schätzung; die Angaben zum Wasserverdampfungsbedarf variieren stark, von sehr viel bis gar keinem Wasserverdampfungsbedarf. Die nächste Wasserabgabe erfolgt im Anschluss, sodass Sie sich bis dahin keine Sorgen machen müssen. Die Kommunikationsprognosen sehen gut aus, möglicherweise sogar etwas besser als erwartet. Wir erwarten, mit unserer 210-Fuß-Antenne in Goldstone eine hohe Bitrate über OMNI-Antennen zu erreichen. Dies wird für die ersten paar Umdrehungen funktionieren, danach wechseln wir den Standort und nutzen wieder OMNI-Antennen für hohe Bitraten. Die Sprachqualität ist gut. Ihre Treibstoffzellen haben
Джон Аарон в эф
Hier ist eine interessante kleine Neuigkeit, die man eigentlich ganz gut hören sollte. In Ann Arbor, Michigan, gibt es anscheinend eine neue Jugendgang. Sie nennt sich Gilnet Gang. Sie zieht durch die Straßen von Ann Arbor, agiert im Verborgenen und umgeht dabei manchmal das Gesetz. Sie nennen sich selbst die „Guerillas für das Gute“. Zu ihren Aktionen gehörte unter anderem, eine mit Obszönitäten beschmierte Brücke übermalt zu h
C'est exact. Je répète, nous avons copié plus X 7,7, un dixième en 
Wir haben dort unten viel Hilfe
Итак, мы начинаем работу с 11-м блоком кинопленки. Только что закончили с 9-м. Кажется, на этом блоке загорелся индикатор. Лучше проверим, ес
How do you read
Let's see. In Springfield, Missouri, Mickey Owen, the old-time catcher for the Brooklyn Dodgers who made the record books by dropping a third strike that led the New York Yankees to a victory over the Dodgers in the '41 World Series, decided that he would be remembered by more than just his sports record. Forty-five boys and girls have been the recipients of ponies that he offered. These youngsters were requested to send letters in telling him how they would care for a pony. When the letters poured in, he added five ponies to the 20 he already offered; and other donors pitched in 20 more. And said Mickey Owen, "I thought I'd have about 45 letters, but I ended up 
但愿如此，克里斯。
साथ ही,
ロジャー、フライトプラン
برج الدلو، هيوستن. سنحتاج إلى تشغيل مكيف الهواء حتى تتمكن من قراءة الكرة. أغلق قواطع دائرة محول ربط ناقل البيانات، جميعها الأربعة في اللوحة 11. أغلق قاطع دائرة جهد ناقل 
好的。025:00，5119，减去165，071:08；035:00，7733，减去165，070:36；045:00，6208，减去165，52；060:00，5993，减去165，118:5
안녕하세요, 짐입니다. 지금 부스터와의 거리를 파악하는 데 어려움을 겪고 있습니다. 두 개의 불빛이 간헐적으로 깜빡이는 것만 보
夕焼けはなかなか印象的だ。眺めるのに時間を無駄にする必要はないと思う。とても興味深い。もう一つ魅力的なのは、目が慣れていないと黒く見えることだ。窓に確かにコーティングが見える。この時点で VOX に戻って UHF-hi で送信する。バイザーを開けて右のマイクを拭く。舐めてしまった。バイザーを閉じる。スーツの回路が機能するようにバイザーはすぐに密閉された。またそれで汚れたくない。スーツの吸気口は約 68 度で非常にうまく保たれている。そこでドームを再び上げる。今は 76、75 になっている。どうやらこの高い設定が我々が求めているものだ。今これに半マークを追加すればロックできるかもしれないと思う。ようやく少し涼しくなってきたので、設定をどこに持っていけばいいのかわかっている。スーツとコントロールレバーの冷却剤の量
Roger, j'ai réussi à modifier l'heure, et j'attends la montée en
스포츠 소식을 살펴볼까요? 여러분이 바쁘셨던 며칠 전, 조 네이머스와 미식축구 커미셔너 피트 로젤은 "브로드웨이 조" 네이머스가 자신이 소유한 배첼러스 III 레스토랑 지분을 매각하고 뉴욕 제츠에 합류하기로 합의했다고 발표했습니다. 네이머스는 오늘 제츠 훈련 캠프에 도착해 첫 훈련을 소화했습니다. 네이머스와 함께 훈련에 불참했던 다른 제츠 선수들도 합류했습니다. 그리고 미시간주 잭슨 출신의 데이비 힐은 지난주에 출전한 세 번의 메이저 대회에서 모두 우승을 차지하며 세 번째 메이저 골프 대회 우승이라는 쾌거를 달성했습니다. 그는 필라델피아 클래식에서 우승을 거머쥐었습니다. 힐은 올해 벌써 네 번의 메이저 대회 우승을 기록하며 총상금 12만 9천 달러로 시즌 선두를 달리고 있습니다. 야구에서는 내셔널리그 서부 지구의 치열한 경쟁이 계속되고 있습니다. LA 다저스와 샌프란시스코 자이언츠는 선두 애틀랜타 휴스턴에 한 경기 차로 뒤쳐져 있습니다. 휴스턴은 48승 48패로 현재 5위에 올라 있으며, 선두와는 7경기 차입니다. 어젯
روجر. هانتسفيل، هذا سيجما سف
Das ist richtig. Gehen Sie zu Seite 1-9 und überspringen Sie auf Feld 100
Gemini 4, your cuff is full
Ici Friendship Seven. C'est une bonne question. J'aimerais bien le savoir aussi. Ces erreurs ont été intermittentes tout au long du vol. J'ai verrouillé et déverrouillé les gyroscopes. Je suis de retour en orbite, mais ce n'est pas le cas: les indicateurs d'assiette le confirment. En regardant l'horizon, je suis à environ 20° à droite en roulis et à 20° trop haut en ta
我们正在密切关注几个温度指标。您已关闭加热器电源。我们正在检查这些指标，包括S、ASA、四联装温度以及推进剂（推进剂除
Und übrigens kann man
Ricevuto.
そうですね。確認したかったのですが、以前お話した時は受信状態が悪かったんです。先ほど太陽のチェックをされたのが良かったのを、そしてそれが今回の乗る基準になっているのを、ご理解いただけたでしょうか。以前、左前方の窓
알겠습니다. 
Bene, va
Roger. Wir werden Ihnen, gla
コピーしなかった場合、400K の RET は 
分
О
ちょうど今頃、オ
罗杰，弗兰克。我们现在正在做的是这样的。我们很想进行地平线校准。我们总共需要15个标记；你知道，一颗星上做三组标记，另一颗星上做两组标记。另一方面，我们也在权衡这和您需要立即前往目的地之间的需求，我们不会忘记这一点。所以，如果您能再耐心等待几分钟，我们正在考虑是请您回去继续完成一些工作
Roger. Before I do that I would like to designate the rendezvous radar up to plus-X
Вперед, п
3B 영역과 3C 영역의 역행열 시간은 명목
Roger, Jim. Jack, nous vous demandons de rester dans la zone morte où vo
सूर्यास्त का नज़ारा काफ़ी मनमोहक है, मुझे नहीं लगता कि मुझे इसे देखने में ज़्यादा समय बर्बाद करने की ज़रूरत है। यह बहुत दिलचस्प है। दूसरी बात, यह देखना भी दिलचस्प है कि जब आँखें इसके अनुकूल नहीं होतीं तो यह कितना काला दिखता है। मुझे खिड़की पर कुछ परत साफ़ दिखाई दे रही है। इस समय मैं UHF-hi में VOX पर वापस जा रहा हूँ ताकि ट्रांसमिट कर सकूँ। दाहिने माइक्रोफ़ोन को पोंछने के लिए विज़र खोल रहा हूँ। मैंने इसे चाट लिया था। विज़र बंद कर रहा हूँ। सूट सर्किट को काम करने के लिए विज़र को तुरंत सील कर दिया गया। मैं इसे दोबारा गंदा नहीं करना चाहता। सूट का इनलेट लगभग 68 डिग्री पर बहुत अच्छे से स्थिर है। इसलिए डोम को फिर से ऊपर उठाना पड़ेगा। यह अभी 76, 75 पर है। ज़ाहिर है, यही ऊँची सेटिंग हमें चाहिए। मुझे लगता है कि मैं अब इसमें आधा अंक और बढ़ा दूँगा और शायद हम इसे लॉक कर पाएँगे। यह आख़िरकार थोड़ा ठंडा हो रहा है, इसलिए मुझे पता है कि मुझे सेटिंग कहाँ रखनी है। मैंने सूट और कंट्रोल लीवर के लिए कूलेंट की मात्रा 8.5 पर सेट कर दी है। इस समय डोम का तापमान 75 डिग्री है। सूट का 
كولومبيا، هيوستن. مفهوم. واضح 
Хорошо. На планшете написано следующее, а затем я повторю углы, чтобы вы могли их скопировать. Затем -7, выполни
Okay. V
Okay. Es dauert nur noch ein oder zwei Minuten.
حسنًا. بالنسبة لهذا البرنامج التلفزيوني الذي سيُعرض خلال ساعتين، قد تفكرون في كيفية توقفنا، إن كنتم ستتوقفون، للحصول على أفضل زاوية تصوير؛ وسيكون من الجيد أيضًا لو استطعتم إيقافنا عند زاوية تسم
Okay, we'll take an electrical check. Main bus is 24 (volts) - Isolated bus is - clicking because of the clock, of course
わかりました
燃焼は完了しました。
Ok, Houston. Sembra che ora vada tutto bene. Abbiamo leggermente cambiato atteggiamento, ho una stella e sto manovrando per po
Роджер. Стэн обеспокоен тем, что наша нынешняя процедура, показанная в контрольном списке, на самом деле не обеспечивае
Gemi
Okay. Bedienfeld 3: Batterieladung auf AUS stellen. Bedienfeld 5: Hauptbusverbindung BAT A/C auf BAT A/C stellen; CB-Batterieladegerät, BAT A-Ladevorgang öffnen; CB-Batterieladegerät, BAT B-Ladevorgang schließen. Als Nächstes: Bedienfeld 250: CB BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING schließen. Bedienfeld 5: Hauptbusverbindung, BAT B/C, aus. Bedienfeld 3: Batterieladung auf B stellen. Hinweis: Bitte warten. Jack, wir haben ein Rückfallverfahren dafür, das wir Ihnen aber später, in etwa zwei Stunden, vorlesen werden. Dieses Verfahren ist eine Änderung gegenüber dem ersten Batteriel
罗杰
Roger. Ich verstehe dich laut und deutlich.
Ci stiamo avvicinando al terminatore e spero che presto potremo mostrarvi il contrasto variabile del bianco man mano ch
D'accord. À l'étape
الساعة الآن الثانية والنصف. الجميع نائمون. سأتس
ジンジャーブレッドの皮
هذا أمر سلبي.
알았어. 찰리, 1번만 기다려. 짐이 좀 찾아보고 스콜피오가 있는지 확인해 볼 거야. 짐은 스콜피오
Oui, nous sommes toujours là, Jack. Nous allons vous accompagner tout au long de cette procédure, et pour cela, nous allons utiliser une connexion haut déb
전원 전환 시간은 95분 54초입니다. 이상
روجر، جيم. خطرت لنا فكرة؛ وهي أنه من الأفضل إخراج عبوات هيدروكسيد الليثيوم من وحدة القيادة في أقرب وقت ممكن للتأكد من عدم بقائها
Das st
Negativo. Ho cercato di non farlo. Se riesco ad abbassare un po' la temperatura del
阿
And, Jim, our current plan is to not correct the . We're going to take whatever we get and live with it. And we can kind of keep track of what's going on a little better if when you swing past the Earth and swing past the center of the Moon, if you could read off the angles for the center of the Earth and the center of the Moon. Ov
سيجما سفن، كوم تك، هاواي. ك
Да. Вот, возьми этот... ещё несколько минут..
좋습니다. 
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। रॉजर। सही। मैं दो
Il vous faut un segm
ठीक ह
Хорошо
حسناً. انتظر وا
만남 장소 창문은 상태가 좋습니다. 나머지 창문들은 지난번 보고했을 때와 거의 동일합니다. 1번과 5번 창문 안쪽에는 약간의 흐릿함과 안개가 있
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。アップリンクは完了しました。コンピューターはそちらのものです。ブロックに
حسنًا، الآن. جاك، دعنا نراجع
Ok. Questa è l'ultima cosa che ho tralasciato. E mentre aspettiamo di decidere, lasciatemi continuare. La banda morta considerata accettabile è compresa tra 660 e 770 psi. In altre parole, qualsiasi tempo di salita che vi dia una p
Oui, je croi
Roger. Downlink data shows that on 
حسنًا، أبولو 8. دعوني أخبركم بموضوعنا الأول، وهو مراجعة جميع إجراءات الدخول والمعلومات ذات الصلة، وسنراجع قائمة التحقق الخاصة بالدخول. لا يزال فري
حسنًا. اقرأ
Oui. Nous pensons que vous allez déjà voir apparaître 37 06. Si c'est le cas, appuyez sur ENTRÉE; vous devriez alors voir le code 00062, qui correspond à la demande de mise en attente. Une fois ce code affiché, appuyez sur CONTINUER jusqu'à ce que le champ soit vide. Si vous obtenez un autre code, c'est de toute façon le r
イーグル、ヒューストン。電源を入れた時刻と、グリコールポンプ1が稼働していることを確認
아, 이런. 그들이... 음, TLI 착륙장, TLI 비상착륙장, 그리고 P37 착륙장을 보내줘야겠군.
Roger. Par simple curiosité pour Bill, nous pouvons dire quelques mots sur les résistances chauffantes des cuves cryogéniques, ainsi que sur les ventilateurs. Nous avons constaté que les résistances fonctionnent normalement, s'allumant et s'éteignant par cycles. Au fil du temps, la fréquence de ces cycles augmente, ce qui indique une légère stratification dans les cuves. Lorsque nous mettons les ventilateurs en 
Ich arbeite gerade mit dem Knopf am Bedienfeld. Jetzt mit dem Knopf am Dreh
बी; डेल्टा-वी, 13.5. ऊँचाई समायोजन; डेल्टा-वी, 59.5. चरण समायोजन:; डेल्टा-वी, 31.3. दक्षिण की ओर तल परिवर्तन:; डेल्टा
مرحباً بيل، هل يمكنك إخبارنا بالزوايا التي مرّ بها الجهاز؟ يبدو أن المنحنى الذي رسمناه يمثل حد التردد اللاسلكي وليس الحد الميكانيكي؛ وبالحديث عن وظيفة وضع الاستجابة التلقائية، يبدو أنه من المفترض أن يتغير عند الوصول إلى حد التردد اللاسلكي، وهو ما يجب أن يكون مجموعة الأرقام التي تريد إدخالها وليس حد تحذير المسح. 
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。
Gemini, hier spricht Houston. Das ist nur eine grobe Schätzung der OAMS-Nutzung. Genauere Daten erhalten wir nach den Canaries. Du siehst weiterhin gut
एड ने सामान खोलना शुरू किया और जैसे ही हम उस स्थिति में पहुँचे जहाँ बूस्टर के साथ छेड़छाड़ करना संभव नहीं था, मैंने पूरी तरह से उसकी मदद करना शुरू कर दिया - कम से कम सामान पकड़कर उसे सही जगह पर रखना और उसे गायब होने से बचाना। जितनी तेज़ी से हम काम करते, उतना ही हम पीछे होते चले जाते। ऐसा इसलिए नहीं था कि हम चीज़ों को सही जगह पर नहीं रख रहे थे, बल्कि इसमें हमारी उम्मीद से कहीं ज़्यादा समय लग रहा था। जीरो ग्रेविटी में यह सिम्युलेटर की तुलना में ज़्यादा आसान नहीं था, हालाँकि उतना ही आसान था। इसलिए हमने पूरा चक्कर लगाया। जब तक हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे, मैंने मन बना लिया 
Roger. Wir fangen von vor
我在交接
نعم، كنتُ كذلك. كنتُ أستخدم الحبل لسحب نفسي للأسفل باتجاه المركبة الفضائية، وكنتُ فوقها تمامًا. في ا
Ok, devo averlo fatto... il
Хорошо, Водолей. Теперь ты можешь установить низкую скорость передачи данных, усилитель мощности, выключение и понижение уровня резервного копирования голоса. Напряжения и токи на батарее 2 выглядят нормально, поэтому 
مروحة البدلة، أوقف
Я вполне мог бы прилететь с другой планеты и почувствовать, что лежу на спине, а Земля надо мной, но примерно так же чувствуешь
아폴로 8호. 상
روجر. هذه إحدى تلك المناسبات النادرة التي
Das ist Freundschaft Sieben. Es dr
L'abbiamo appena tirato fuori. Abbiamo appena cercato di liberare tutta la nostra roba, e non siamo davvero preparati a fare un Aero-Med Pass
प्रतीक्षा कीजिए, मैं आपके लिए लाता हूँ। इसका मतलब है कि हमारे पास कुछ अतिरिक्त ईंधन है। इसलिए हम अभी कुछ अन्य ट्रैकिंग का
- - okay, SPINTA DELTA-V A, NORMALE; in attesa di un malfunzionamento, non c'è. Molto be
روجر. بالنظر إلى خطة الطيران، لديك موعدٌ قادمٌ في الساعة أ، وسنضطر لإجراء موعدٍ آخر في الساعة ب استعدادًا لذلك. ومن المقبول، 
D'accord, Aquarius. Nos données de suivi indiquent que depuis le déversement d'hélium, notre angle d'entrée est resté inchangé à 6,24°. On a calculé qu
ठीक है। वे कहते हैं कि यह अच्छा दिखता है
Bene. L'immagine che Jim mi ha dato della sua visione attraverso la Terra era all'interno della - parte della Terra, la parte illuminata si trovava nella metà superiore della Terra con la cuspide che si trovava proprio sulla linea Y-Y. E quindi - L'intera parte scura della Terra si trover
알겠습니다. 첫 번째 별은 15시 12분, 정확히는 15시 12분 52초에 나
VAI in orbita e il 
Okay. In etwa einer St
Ora stiamo entrando. Non riesco a capire bene chi sia
Ce
Okay. Ich habe einige Wetter- und Einsatzkräfteinformationen sowie ein paar letzte Punkte, die ich Ihnen gerne durchgehe
我们已经——好的。我们会尽快获取星体数据……我们可
R
حسنًا يا جيم. نحن نحاول إنجاز الإجراءات وإرسالها إليك بأسرع وقت ممكن. هي موجودة بالفعل. ما يجري
Хорошо. Единственное замечание заключалось в том, что ситуация ухудшилась, и теперь Луна проходит через верхнее стыковочное окно на части каждого прохода, и примерно в
Vas-y, Chèvrefeuill
Im Moment scheint es kei
Quella era la Squadra 
Indica che l'inte
Well, we might
你想休息一会儿吗
分かりました。いいですね。それでは、全体のタイムラインを教えていただけますか
好的，吉姆。我们正在密切关注情况。弗雷德一直在给我们提供一些角度的信息，因为我们正掠过地球中心——月球中心。我们注意到通讯信号稍微减弱了一
VIII, qui Houston. Imposta l'interruttore di riproduzione del nas
休斯顿，我觉得俯仰和横滚基本都调好了。我让偏航稍微漂移了一
了解。素晴らしい。それから
캘리포니아 캡콤, 프렌드십 
Friendship Seven, this is Zan
周波数の問題があり、あなたの時間をアップリンクすることはできません。ですが、ミッションタイマーで設定する時間とマークをお知らせし
روجر. 11، /: 45597، 0 - تصحيح - هذا ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 36325، ناقص 01727، زائد 01428 180 003 000، نوفمبر ألفا، زائد 00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254؛ سكوربي دلتا، لأسفل 103، يسار 48، زائد 0742، ناقص 16500 13005 36327؛ سيريوس وريجل، 129 155 010، أربع مجموعات، 15 ثانية؛ الأفق على خط 2.9 درجة عند T ناقص 2؛ إجراء عالي السرعة مع ناقص 
Okay. Im Mittleren Westen werden einige LKW-Fahrer bestreikt, und in Minneapolis haben die Lehrer die Arbeit
好的
Ich möchte es nicht hier oben haben;
Okay. Im Rest Ihres Updates hieß es, dass ein Druck zwischen 660 und 770 psi in Ordnung sei. Liegt er über 770 psi, bitten Sie uns, nach 59 Betriebsstunden erneut vorbeizuschauen und entweder das PCM zu aktivieren oder Ihnen anhand der Messwertänderungen die entsprechenden Informationen mitzuteilen. Sie erwähnten auch eine extreme Maßnahme. Wir müssen möglicherweis
Нам придётся начать думать о том, как снова уложить его спать, потому что — я знаю — я — я почти совсем не спал прошлой ночью
Roger. 
Do
La station appelle Gem
रॉजर,
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 
अपोलो 8, 
好吧，我们试试再入速率命令。我本来就打算这么做，后来觉得因为
휴스턴,
Роджер. Мы хотели бы попросить вас прекратить использование функции AUTO OPTICS на псевдопосадочной площадке. Необходимо отправить вам запрос на обновление значений, хранящихся в компьюте
Okay. We are getting ready to have a shift turnover, and I wanted to go over a few items before right now, that looks like it is at most 0.3 a foot per second, so there will be no burn for midcourse number 6. Midcourse number 7 is a little larger, and we'll make a decision on that later. Your weather in landing site still re
Okay. For colors, waters are all sort of a royal blue; clouds, of course, are bright white; the re
Affermativo. La nostra prima rotta era 007 avanti, 005 a sinistra e 007 in alto. La rotta intermedia finale era 004 avanti, 06 a destra e 003 in alto. Questo è più o meno in linea con il grafico. Siamo un po' al di sotto della linea nominale del grafico 
यहा
Okay. That's wh
Roger. Ho una leggera imbardata di circa mezzo grado al secondo. Sto registrando oltre che trasmettendo, naturalmente, e sembra che stia imbardando esattamente all'angolo corrett
Jim sta iniziando a uscire di nuovo dal lato illuminato, e di nuovo ho delle stelle pi
はい。理解できる人と話せるのはとても嬉し
Близнецы 4, РКВ. Я читаю, что вы очень слабы. T/M сломан. Отмен
جيميني 4، سي إس كيو كاب كوم. هل ستشغل جهاز ال
Okay. Sonnenaufgang – zuerst zeige ich euc
Roger. N
Okay, Jim. Falls wir dich brauchen, alarmieren wir die 
We got a beautiful view of the side of the command module out of th
Merci beaucoup. D'accord, je vais vous lire ces quantités. Il était 17 h 16 GMT au départ. Quantité de propergol: 60. Température cabine: 92. Température de la combinaison: 58. Pression cabine: 5,6. CO₂ de la combinaison: 0,75 mmHg. Bouteille d'O₂ secondai
There is a very dark crater in the filling material in this valley in front of us now. It is rather unusual in that
네, 질문은 "라인에 ASCENT BATTERY BAT 6이 하나만 연결되어 있어야 한다"는 것이고, 바로 이어서 DESCENT 
Ну, это результат недавнего увеличения потока. Я думаю, что... я попроб
Oh, per l'
1
好的
حسنًا. GMTB 15 43 23. ΔV 139. مدة الاحتراق - دقيقتان و39 ثانية. 15 55 24. انع
DEAD FACE, barber pole. Okay, on 11, DESCENT ECA and DESCENT ECA CONTROL circuit breakers, OPEN. J
水瓶座，休斯顿。我们收到了您部分传输的信息。我们了解到信号已经严重受损
D'accord. À la page E-7 de la liste de contrôle d'entrée et à l'étape 34, tant que le panneau 382 est ouvert, c'est le moment idéal pour régler les com
了解しました。T2までお待ちください。あり
당연하죠
Houston e gli altri due assi spaziali sono in campo ora, 
Просто мимоходом, 
了解しました、フレッ
통신 및 원격 측정 품질을 개선하기 위해 일시적으로 연
О, не очень хорошо, Джек; предлагаю для связи здесь перейти к выводу автома
ह्यूस
Je crois que nous allons bientôt voir le soleil se
Большое спасибо. Хорошо, я зачитаю эти значения. Время по Гринвичу, когда 
Ok. C'è qualcuno di questi nel piano di volo? Il radiatore s
Sehen 
Roger. Mein Steuermodus ist manuell; Gyroskope deaktiviert; Manöver aus. Bitte warten. Mein Status ist gut, der Kapselstatus ist gut. Ich möchte ein paar Fotos vom 
コロンビア、コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。
لا أعتقد ذلك يا فريد
スーツの吸気温度は72～72度（華氏）です。キャビンの温度は98～98度（華氏）です。仲間たちが来たら
C'est bie
١١، هيوستن. بعد التحقق من درجات الحرارة، يبدو أن المركبة الفضائية قد انخفضت درجتين أو ثلاث درجات خلال الـ ٢٤ ساعة الماضية، وهذا يتوافق مع تقري
光っているように見えるものもあるけど、実際には光っていないと思う。ただ太陽の光だからね。写真を撮ってみるよ。すごく綺麗だね。測光器で9まで光るん
Хорошо. Правила работы двигателя. Мы должны выключить его, если показания монитора тяги составляют 77 процентов или ниже; пункт 2, если давление топлива в свободном пространстве меньше 160 psi; пункт 3, если дельта-параметр 
Роджер. Мы оцениваем ваш уровень читабельности на 5, читабельно
Sì, credo. E interromper
لا، لا نعتقد ذلك يا أبولو ١١. نعتقد أن هذا قد يكون بسبب بعض الت
Okay, ich gehe zu O2 High Rat
Roger, ich empfange dich auf Kurzwelle (HF) mit v
Die Se
इसे सही 
Ok, allora voglio spegner
Roger
罗杰。
Роджер. Послушай, Чарли Дьюк хочет поговорить с тобой — с тобой о проверке звезд; и, чтобы у нас была хорошая связь, я хотел бы перенастроить автоматическую цепь усилителя мощности, а переключатель функции голосовой связи — в положение «Голос», и заодно переключатель функции определения дальности — в положение «Определение даль
알겠습니다. 수신했습니다. T/M 스위치를 실시간/ACQ-AID로 설정해 주시겠습
فهمت يا والي. لنبدأ. هل أنت مستعد لتكرار (مناطق الاستع
结
Roger. Ho provato a resettarlo di
This little tape recorder has been a big benefit - has been a big benefit to us in passing some of our time away on our transit to the Moon, and it's rather odd to see it floating like 
No problem, Jim. 
Let's see. In Springfield, Missouri, Mickey Owen, the old-time catcher for the Brooklyn Dodgers who made the record books by dropping a third strike that led the New York Yankees to a victory over the Dodgers in the '41 World Series, decided that he would be remembered by more than just his sports record. Forty-five boys and girls have been the recipients of ponies that he offered. These youngsters were requested to send letters in telling him how they would care for a pony. When the letters poured in, he added five ponies to the 20 he already offered; and other donors pitched in 20 more. And said Mickey Owen, "I thought I'd have about 45 letters, but I ended up with about 900." Now on the feature page: Wellington, New Zealand, about fifty men sat down to the traditional turkey and cranberry sauce at the South Pole today, but the Christmas had an Oriental flavor, as well. It included Sukiyaki cooked by members of a Japanese party who are 
Schwer zu
3, 2, 1. ПОСЛЕД
RCS Power A 和 B
追加の運動時間に参加します。フライトの正式な
ठीक है। पहली दो पंक्तियाँ ठीक हैं। CB - तीसरी पंक्ति, CB(11) और (16): STAB/CONTROL
青い帯についてご説明します。地球の表面に比較的濃い青い帯があり、次に明るい青い帯、そしてもう一つ濃い青い帯、そして大気の輝きである大きな白い帯があり
Rog
Secondo l'Associated Press, i residenti della costa 
روجر، الهدوء. T8، 114 30 57؛ T9، 11
D'accord, Joe
네. 그들은 그 데이터를 얻었고, 객실이 쾌적하고 따뜻하며 온도계가 높은 온도를 가리킬 때 델타 함수가 반대 방향으로 어
حسنًا يا جيم. في
We'll proceed. Here's our 
D'accord. Panneau 3: ONDU
ヒューストン、冷凍庫は攪拌されましたが、ラ
T
هذا صحيح. كانت نسبة الاستجابة 100%، وسننتظر 
You're probably interested in the comments your wives have made. Neil, Jan had said about yesterday's activities, "The evening was unbelievably perfect. It is an honor and a privilege to share with my husband, the crew, the Manned Spacecraft Center, the American public, and all mankind; the magnificent experience of the beginning of lunar exploration." She was then asked if she considered the Moon landing the greatest moment in her life. She said "No, that was the day we were married." And Mike, Pat said simply, "It was fantastically marvelous." Buzz, Joan said - apparently couldn't quite believe the on the Moon. She said, "It was hard to think
Roger. And I have a flight plan 
음, 경기장은 51.5이고, 우리도 51.5예요. 네. 우리가 의견 일치를 본 건 이번이 처음이
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Мы показываем вам перицинфическую точку на расстоянии 64 морских миль. Ваша следующая точка на 28-й орбите будет иметь скорость менее 1 фута в секунду. М
收到。复述得很详细。好的，继续。第6页什么都没有；第7页什么都没有。第8页和第9页什么都没有。第10页和第11页什么都没有。在第12页
Apollo 13, Houston. It looks like maneuver will just take you right through there. Y
Okay. After the step BAT 5 and 6, OFF, step 3 will be circuit breakers panels 11 and 16 
ジェミニ4、CSQ CAP CO
Roger. Jim, you're going to be live as 
حسنًا. الآن، هذا يدخل في مرحلة الحفاظ 
Apollo 11, this is 
Okay. Alles klar. Bist du jetzt bereit für den Ein
حسنًا، حدة بصري جيدة. لا أجد أي صعوبة في قراءة لوحات فحص النظر، ولا أعاني من أي مشكلة في الاستجماتيزم. كما أنني لا أواجه أي صعوبة في الحفاظ على 
रॉजर। आप पृथ्वी को देख रहे हैं, जैसा कि हम इसे अपनी बाईं खिड़की से देख रहे हैं, पृथ्वी का लगभग आधा हिस्सा। हम पूर्वी प्रशांत महासागर को देख रहे हैं, और स्क्रीन के ऊपरी आधे हिस्से के उत्तरी भाग में, हम उत्तरी अमेरिका, अलास्का, संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका, कनाडा, मैक्सिको और मध्य अमेरिका को देख सकते हैं। दक्षिण अमेरिका टर्मिनेटर के ठीक बाहर या छाया के अंदर अदृश्य हो जाता है। हम महासागरों को स्पष्ट नीले रंग में देख सकते हैं, पृथ्वी पर फैले प्रमुख बादल संरचनाओं की सफेद पट्टियाँ देख सकते हैं, और तटरेखाओं को देख सकते हैं, पश्चिमी अमेरिका, सैन जोकिन घाटी, सिएरा पर्वत श्रृंखला, बाजा कैलिफोर्निया प्रायद्वीप को पहचान सकते हैं, और हम दक्षिणपूर्वी अमेरिका के ऊपर कुछ बादल संरचनाओं को देख सकते हैं। अलास्का के दक्षिण-पश्चिम में एक स्पष्ट हल्का तूफान है, जो लगभग 500 से 1000 मील की दूरी पर प्रतीत होता है, और एक और बहुत छोटा तूफान स्क्रीन के दक्षिणी छोर पर भूमध्य रेखा के पास या उससे काफी दूर, संभवतः 45 डिग्री या उससे अधिक दक्षिणी अक्षांश पर दिखाई दे रहा है। भू-आकृतियों में भूरे रंग को अच्छी तरह से पहचाना जा सकता है। हरे रंग बहुत अच्छी तरह से दि
你好，哥
Berechnungen zufolge sollten Sie den Mond sehen. Es wird Vollmond sein. Sie sollten den größten Teil der Mondscheibe sehen können, und er sollte sich etwa auf Ihrer vertikalen Linie befinden, wahrscheinlich bei etwa 14 auf der Skala. So unge
しばらくし
वो क्या थ
That is affirmative. Area Hotel is four hours,
Grazie per l'o
Roger. Nous sommes entièrement d'accord. Pendant que vous vous y mettez, je vais lire ces notes. Appelez l'alarme de programme possible 5.6, portée supérieure à 400 milles nautiques, puis utilisez la procédure décrite au point 20. Choisissez l'option 1 dans NOUN 06 et utilisez le mode sans mise à jour. Le radar de rendez-vous se verrouillera à environ 25 degrés d'élévation au-des
Ich habe ei
Roger. Quanto sono grandi queste parti
Sun must b
阿波罗11
好的。来自英国乔德雷尔班克天文台，美联社报道：英国乔德雷尔班克大型射电望远镜于美国东部时间今天下午5点49分停止接收来自苏联无人登月探测器“月球15号”的信号。一位发言人表示，“月球15号”飞船似乎“已经飞越月球”。另一则消息称：“我们认为它没有着陆，”天文台台长伯纳德·洛弗尔爵士的发言人说道。华盛顿合众国际社报道：副总统斯皮罗·T·阿格纽呼吁在2000年前将人类送上火星，但民主党领导人回应称，必须优先考虑地球上的需求。阿格纽是周三阿波罗11号发射时在场的最高级别政府官员，他当时说“依我之见，我们应该在本世纪末之前将人类送上火星”，显然他当时是在代表自己，而不是代表尼克松政府。德克萨斯州拉雷多，美联社报道：新拉雷多的移民官员周三宣布，除非嬉皮士洗澡理发，否则将被拒绝发放旅游签证入境墨西哥。新拉雷多墨西哥移民局局长胡贝托·卡萨拉斯表示，墨
Роджер, Чарли. Это Базз
没错。然后在 250 号面板上，断开断路器 BAT B POWER ENTRY
At main chute deploy if you get a chance, will you shut off your three water controls to help out the data reduction 
Mann, das ist ja ein echt übler Tiefdruck da unten. Ich wünschte,
Nur zu
Roger, Friendship Seven. Canton sta
Okay. Das erfordert lediglich einige Änderun
로저.
Ok, pilota. Credo che preferirei restare a bordo
알겠습니다. 확인했습
ठीक है। आप यहाँ बहुत अच्छे दिख रहे
يرغب برنامج 
Affermativo. Ho un RKV Medical 
ليس الأمر بالغ الأهمية، إنها مجرد طريقة عمل. لقد قارنتُ عمليات فحص الانحراف الليلي فوق موتشيا ووميرا، وأنا راضٍ تمامًا عن النتائج. مع الأجرام السماوية المعروفة، لا توجد أي مشكلة على الإطلاق في تحديد الانحراف. إض
Credo di sì, Ken. Questa banda è parallela alla linea M, e credo che abbia a che fare con il design dell'ottica, dove abbiamo quell'albero o l'ingresso rettangolare dell'ottica dall'esterno. A questo particolare angolo del sole, taglia completamente. Ora, ho notato che sia la Terra che il Sole fanno questo al telescopio a scansione
Roger. Le cose stanno andando molto bene. Le mie condizioni sono ottime. Le condizioni della capsu
Джек, в ответ на ваш вопрос о том, что во время последнего полного оборота Солнце сначала появилось в самом верхнем правом углу окна LMP, за
Non. On a fait la brûlure - on a fait la brûlure, et après la brûlure, ça contin
Et voilà, Tranquility Base, la mes
Ich erhöhe jetzt meine Anzugseinst
Bene, bene, Jim. Stamattina stai bene. Vorremmo darti un piccolo riassunto di queste stelle. Come puoi vedere dal piano di volo, abbiamo 
حسناً يا هيوستن، تفضلوا ببناء ال
Ich war in keiner Weise desorientiert. Ich konnte entweder auf den Boden schauen – und fühlte mich dabei völlig wohl – oder mich auf den Rücken rollen und nach oben schauen, ohne dass mich das in irgendeiner Weise desorientierte. Das Raumschiff war mein bester Bezugspunkt. Jedes Mal, wenn ich es sah, hatte ich sofort einen guten Anhaltspunk
جميع الأنظمة تعمل الآن بشكل ممتاز. أودّ أن أطلعكم على تفاصيل أنظمة التحكم. نظام التحكم الإلكتروني (Fly-by-wire) ممتاز. كان التحكم اليدوي بطيئًا بعض الشيء ولكنه جيد جدًا. الكبسول
روجر. أفاد
Батареи имели е
Хорошо. 75 футов. Всё выглядит неплох
Now, in answer to Question 2, there was, of course, a vibration transient in the second stage that - due to the number 5 engine going out - w
13, ह्यूस्टन। मैंने आपका संदेश पढ़ लिया है। लूप पर अभी भी काफी श
Да, острота зрения хорошая. У меня нет проблем с чтением таблиц, с астигматизмом тоже всё в порядке. У меня также нет проблем с удержанием позиции. Я всё ещё использую электронное управление. Сейчас я в обычном ре
무슨 이유인지
일몰이 정말 멋지네요. 오래 볼 필요도 없을 것 같아요. 정말 흥미롭습니다. 또 하나 신기한 건, 눈이 어둠에 적응하지 않았을 때는 모든 게 얼마나 새까맣게 보이는지입니다. 창문에 뭔가 코팅이 되어 있는 게 확실히 보이네요. 이제 다시 VOX로 돌아가서 UHF-hi 모드로 송신해야겠습니다. 바이저를 열어서 오른쪽 마이크를 닦았습니다. 핥았네요. 바이저를 닫고 바로 밀봉해서 슈트 회로가 제대로 작동하도록 했습니다. 다시는 문제가 생기지 않도록 해야죠. 슈트 공
分かりました。最後に、プラットフォーム解放までの月面視姿勢を保つための機動とATT HOLDについて説明がありました。お読み
Okay. Wir überlegen, ob wir einen Teil davon mit 12 Bildern pro Sekunde aufnehmen sollten. Ich denke, wir können alles von 0,5 auf 0,5 g reduzieren; das ergibt nur etwa 7,8 Minuten Laufzeit und... Bilder... das Doppelte. Ich schätze
Come probabilmente saprai, abbiamo diversi gruppi che lavorano sulle procedure da qui in poi. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sulle correzioni di metà rotta per determinare un sistema, gli assetti, come eseguirle, le tecniche di allineamento e così via. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sull'ingresso, incluso come e quando attiveremo il. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sullo stato del sistema e tra poche ore - più tardi domani, da dove lo vediamo, passeremo a una configurazione di base sul e condurremo un controllo del MAIN BUS B. In questo momento il COMM è un po' in degrado e non riesco a sentire molto bene quello che stai per dire. Ma voglio solo tenerti aggiornato su come stanno andando le cos
そうです、ジャック。これからやることは…地球を船長の窓、つまり下から見た状態で停止します。そして宇宙船を操縦して、地球の明るい部分が窓の
Ricevuto. Ti do un Mark a 13 minuti e 30 s
짐, 약간 지연이 있습니다. 그 내용을 읽어드리려면 몇 분 정도 걸릴 것 같습니다. 비상시 점검 목록 
ठीक है। फिलहाल अंतरिक्ष यान हमारे नियंत्रण में है। हम धीमी गति से बहते हुए उड़ान भर रहे हैं - थोड़ा-बहुत नियंत्रण हमारे पास है। RC
ठीक है। पैनल 3: बैटरी चार्जिंग को बंद करें। पैनल 5; मेन बस टाई बैट एसी को बैट एसी से कनेक्ट करें; सीबी बैटरी चार्जर, बैट ए चार्जिंग को खोलें; सीबी बैटरी चार्जर, बैट बी चार्जिंग को बंद करें। अगला, पैनल 250; सीबी बैट बी पावर एंट्री/पोस्टलैंडिंग को बंद करें। पैनल 5; मेन बस टाई, बैट बी/सी, बंद करें। पैनल 3; बैटरी चार्जिंग को बी पर सेट करें। कृपया प्रतीक्षा करें। जैक, कृपया ध्यान दें कि हमारे पास इसके लिए एक बैकआउट प्रक्रिया है, लेकिन हम इसे आपको लगभग 2 घंटे बाद पढ़कर सुनाएंगे। और यह भी कि यह प्रक्रिया आपकी पहली ब
روجر. كيف حال ال
...
13, Хьюстон. Впе
コピーする準備がで
Роджер, это «Дружба Семь». Я нахожусь примерно на 180-градусной отметке. Я смотрю в направле
- - be able to s
한 15~20걸음 정도 될 거예요, 잭. 그중 일부는 짐이고, 나
Yuri Alekseyevich, vorrei ricordarti che, dopo l'ultimo minuto di preparazione, ci saranno 6 minuti di ritardo prima del volo effettivo. Non preoccuparti, per
罗杰，吉姆。布雷克，杰克，我们希望你保持现在的死区设置，等电视节目结束后我们会进行调整。另外，我们希望你检查一下高增益表上的
Ricevuto. Pronto, vi darò un rapporto sullo stato. Sono in orbita per il vostro tracciamento. Rapporto sullo stato: Fusibili tutti al numero uno tranne la Torre di Scarico numero due. Retrosequenza di Emergenza, Retrogetto di Emergenza e Drogue di Emergenza sono in posizione centrale-off, Squib è Armato. Retrogetto Automatico è spento. è normale, automatico, giroscopio normale. Tutte le maniglie a "T" sono in posizione "in". Retro Delay è normale. Luci della cabina sono entrambe accese. Luci Foto sono ancora accese. Telemetria a Bassa Frequenza è attiva. Aiuti di Soccorso sono in automatico. Ah, le luci della Torre di Scarico e della Capsula di Scarico sono spente
Roger. Normalmente, Jim, viene fatto automaticamente
コロンビア、ヒューストン。データを入手しました。それでは…
Okay. Da es einen deutlichen Unterschied zwischen den von Ihnen 
好的。现在信号好多了。我想确认一下，侧舱盖上的舱盖夹可以
रॉजर। हम आपको 21-4 
Roger, Houston. What we're going to do is, we're going to get rid of Fred's suit here. Fred's suit has been right in the commander's slot here for the last
Оно внутри. Вот как это запускает... Ладно, Джек. Я
Okay, Jack. 
Sie führen ordentliche Bücher; das ist alles
ジム、3つほどお願いがあるんだ。まず、コンピューターは君のものだ。2つ目、これからバーンインするまで操作は不要だから、バーンイン姿勢で待機していればいい。3つ目、今からデータリンクを更新するため
Apollo 8, torniamo indietro e confermiamo sul 
Ну, есть
わかりました。2行目では、SYSTEM Aの
確定です。パネル250の2つのブレーカーが開きます。パネル275の2つのブレーカーも開きます。パネル250のブレーカーは既に設定済みです。ACインバータ2も設定済みです。ACインバータ2のACバス1はOFFになっているはずです。パネル3の残りの2つのスイッチも設定済みです。
好的。我只是想让你知道你
Sigma Seven, это Kano Com Tech. Передача на КВ. Вы
حسناً
يبدو هذا رائعًا، أفهم الآن سبب إعجابك أنت وسكوت به. أنا أمارس
Родж
لا يبدو أن ذلك يُجدي نفعاً
C'est exact. Nous affichons -55, 
... Мы выставили 
Я думаю, что взрыв, насколько я мог видеть, Джо, оставил на нем пятна. Не знаю, вызвал ли он ка
11番、ヒューストン。パッチは入手しました。もう少しフォーカスを改善してい
E, Houston, la Tranquility Base vi darà qualche commento riguardo alla questione geologica di ieri sera. Siamo atterrati in un campo di crateri relativamente liscio, di crateri secondari allungati - crateri secondari circolari, la maggior parte dei quali ha bordi indipendentemente dalle loro dimensioni. Questo non è universalmente vero. Ci sono - Ci sono alcuni dei crateri più piccoli intorno ai quali non c'è un bordo visibile. La massa di terra in tutta l'area è composta da sabbia molto fine e limo. Direi che la cosa che più le assomiglia sulla Terra è la grafite in polvere. Immerse in questa massa di terra si trova un'ampia varietà di forme, dimensioni e consistenze rocciose, arrotondate e spigolose, molte con consistenze variabili. Come ho detto, ho visto rocce semplici - quello che sembrava essere basalto semplice e basalto vescicolare. Altre senza cristalli, alcune con piccoli fenocristalli bianchi, forse dall'uno a meno del 5 percento. E il masso... ci troviamo in un campo di massi dove i massi raggiungono generalmente i 60 cm di altezza, con alcuni anche più grandi. Ora, alcuni massi giacciono in superficie, altri sono parzialmente esposti e altri ancora sono appena espost
友情七号，信号微弱但可辨认。目前所有系统运行正常。血压读数为125/90。大约2分30秒后将进行心力衰竭检查，
And, Odyssey, re
是的，……可以选择…
そうだ、ビル。それは君に買収させるためだった
11、
Roger. Restez près de l'un d'eux, et nous l
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。エントリーパッド
先ほど動かしたのと同じ方
Verstanden, Jim. Wir arbeiten daran, die Abläufe so schnell wie möglich fertigzustellen und Ihnen zur Verfügung zu stellen. Sie sind bereits vorhanden. Aktuell werden sie von unseren Kollegen im CMS/LMS-System geprüft und integriert, um sicherzustellen, dass die Einstellungen korrekt sind und der Zeitplan reibungslos verläuft. Dieser Durchlauf wird noch einige Stunden dauern. Wir gehen jedoch davon aus, Ihnen bis dahin einen Gesamtzeitplan und 
Okay. Go ahead with th
Apollo 8, Houston. 
Ok. Questo dovrebbe tenerli contenti laggiù. Non ti manderemo un carico. Il tuo TR 
And Fred, Houston. In a little while here, I'm going to have a procedure that I want to read up to 
Okay. Ich fange mal ganz von vorne an. Nur zur Sicherheit: Es gibt vielleicht ein paar Überschneidungen, aber wir wollen ja sic
Il secondo punto è, ovviamente, che quando si interrompe il controllo termico passivo, ci si trova a circa 90 gradi rispetto alla linea di terra, quindi quando si effettua quell'imbardata a sinistra, si dovrà imbardare a sinistra finché l'angolo centrale del gimbal non si av
Sembra che il tuo 
맞습니다. 이제 A
Почему бы тебе не 
يبدو أن أداء المحركات الرباعية A وC وD متطابق تقريبًا. المحرك الرباعي B يعمل بدرجة حرارة أقل قليلًا، ولكن بفارق طفيف جدًا. جميع قر
Если у в
알겠습니다. 여기 튀어나온 부분을 다듬어 드릴까요? 용기 가장자리만 다듬어 드릴까요?
Apollo 11, Houston. Proveremo ancora una volta a rispondere a questa richiesta televisiva. Vorremmo 10 minuti di riprese. E v
Roger. Könntest du uns die Position von Zeta Persei etwas genauer erklären? Wir 
Friendship Seven, Friendship Sev
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 제 조종
Okay. For today, we'd like you on to make a trunnion bias determination, prior to sightings as called out in procedures, and also one afterwards. Our intent here is to check out the possibility that some sort of thermal effect may be giving you errors in the angular read-out in the sextant. The bias that you get beforehand should be incorporated, that is a PROCEED on NOUN 87 after you get two consecutive measurements equal to within 0.003 degrees. And, of course, move the trunnion off a couple of degrees between the measurements. The Earth should be a lot smaller in your field of view today. I'm, sure you're a lot more qualified to tell us about that than we are, but to ensure that you're getting a good angle measurement between the star and the Earth horizon, the sextant M-line, which is the line that runs through the two hash marks and is perpen
オーケー、SECOだ。ポジグラードが作動した。無重力状態になり、フライ・バイ・ワイヤによる
Gemin
Хорошо, теперь я снова осматриваю адаптер и оборудование там, сзади. Вижу разделительную плоскость; она довольно чистая. Двигатели чистые. Термокраска, термоизоляционная лента выгляд
Ich verstehe Sie gut. Puls – 64, Atmung – 24. Alles in Ordn
Vous voulez le sais
Roger. Sono Gemini 4. Sono il Pilota di 
فريندشيب سفن، هذا ستيلهيد. نعم، تبدو الكبسولة جيدة من هنا. لا أستطيع، لا أستطيع تمييز أي ضرر بالعين المجردة.
Ti dico che il lavo
Friendship Seven, ici ATS Cap Com. Comment me recevez-vous? À vous. Quel est votre mode de co
Roger. Questo è il rapporto dei prossimi 30 minuti. 
Roger. Da hast du völ
Apollo 8
3分钟时。
하지만 저는 나가서 좋은 사진을 찍고 싶어요. 이 정도로는 만족할 수 없어요. 좋아요, 저는 지금 우주
ロジャー、今のところ、キャビン周辺に水が浮かぶのを避けるようにしているんだ。今のところは、順
我们稍后会详细介绍周围的情况，但这里看起来几乎囊
05:5
ठीक है। हमसे वह
Okay, we're standi
好的。第三排，推进剂下方：下降氦气调节器/排气阀应打开。交会雷达待机，打开；着陆雷达，打开。稳定器/控制下方：ATCA，打开。
そうでしょう
Хорошо. Вот что нам нужно сжечь. Мне нужно заменить кассету с пленкой. Камера настроена на 
Okay, Jim. Wir haben darüber gesprochen, dass Sie für eine bessere Sicht auf das Sternenfeld vom K
好了，就
Ok. Ho seguito una stella luminosa, e credo che sia lassù nell'Aquila. Anzi, ne sono abbastanza sicuro. Vedo le due stelle bersaglio. L'ho seguita fino in cima. È quasi in cima. Ora sta per scomparire dalla mia visuale. L'ho seguita dal basso, e ci sono voluti 3 minut
D'accord. Et c'est exactement là où j'étais. MODULE DE COMMANDE PROPERGELLANT 2, centre, marche, haut; retours PROPERGELLANT, deux, gris; MODULE DE SERVICE PRESSION DE CARBU
Ja, das Licht geht aus und dann nach ein paar Sekunden wieder 
没
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. У меня есть данные с 1 и 2. Телеметрии пока нет; ожидайте получить их в ближайшее время. Коне
D'accord, Jack. C'est exact. Allez à la page 1-7. ALIMENTATION ÉLECTRONIQUE, ARRÊT; CONDITIONNEUR DE SIGNAL/POLIANT DE PILOTE 1 et 2, ARRÊT; ALIMENTATION, le
حسنًا، نحن نرى الأرض بأكملها ال
或者更确切地说，是休斯顿。吉姆，看来我们已经锁定了信号，这将改善我们这里的数据流。唯一的问题是，在每次轮换期间，我们可能会丢失部分数据，也可能丢失部分语音。所以你应该预料到这一点。另外，如果有人有BIOMED设备，请将你们的BIOM
Roger. Come 
Oh, beinahe hätte ich den ersten Sonnenuntergang verpasst, weil ich versucht habe, das rechte Kabinenlicht auszuschalten. Es geht ziemlich schnell, wie mir gesagt wurde. Ich schaffe es nicht, da ist Arcturus genau auf der rechten Seite, wo er h
Roger, è a
Concernant les photos d'entrée en scène, si vous utilisez une cartouche neuve de film couleur d'intérieur, nous recommandons les réglages d'exposition suivants: f/11 à 1/250 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 2,1 m pour la boule de feu; f/2,0, 1/60 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 15 m lors de l'ouverture des parachutes. Si vous utilisez une cartouche dont une partie a déjà servi pour des prises de vue d'intérieur, nous recommandons: f/16 à 1/500 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 2,1 m pour la boule de feu; f/2,8, 1/60 s, 6 images/s, mise au point à 15 m lors de
로저. 트렁크를 열어놨어요. 좌석에
Belles form
Джерри, мы получаем поток водорода, но у нас нигде нет никаких частиц пара. Некоторые начинают появляться прямо сейч
روجر، سبع دقائق. أفهم أنك ستضع الرجال في الماء مع 
यह देखना बहुत दिलचस्प है कि मेरी स्थिति लगभग पिचअप प्लस 30 डिग्री, रोल राइट 130 डिग्री और यॉ लेफ्ट 20 डिग्री है। इस समय गुब्बारा मेरे साथ-साथ चल रहा है। यह हर समय एक स्थिर दिशा बनाए रखता है। क्षितिज पट्टी फिर से दिखाई दे रही है; इस बार चांदनी वाली तरफ से। चलिए देखते हैं, एयरग्लो फिल्टर के
さて、
Contrassegnalo come *
На следующей странице, в отсеке B1, мы предполагаем, ч
आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें, हम अब आपको वीनस कहकर बुलाएंगे। पिछली 
How big are the rocks that you just scurried around and picked up with the tongs? Good gravy! Beautiful! Just crack those guys open and get 
لقد فقدنا جهاز إرسال الإشارات المتعددة، ولذلك لا نستطيع قراءة عدة درجات حرارة هنا على الأرض. نود إبلاغكم بذلك. هذه الدرجات هي درجة حرارة المقصورة، ودرجة حرارة صنبور البدلة اليسرى، ودرجة حرارة صنبور البدلة اليمنى، ومعدل تغير 
Bene. Ecco la storia principale. Il tuo assetto sembra davvero ottimo, tranne che in rollio, e vorremmo che tu facessi quanto segue. In impulso MIN, vorremmo che tu trimmassi a zero beccheggio, che è più o meno dove ti trovi ora; a 008 gradi in rollio, che è circa 16 gradi rispetto al tuo attuale assetto di rollio; e a zero gradi in imbardata, che è più o meno dove ti trovi ora. Poi vorremmo che tu facessi la linea dell'asse del corpo
分かりました。それについてコメントさ
ジャック、いくつかはそのままにしておきます。SUIT FAN 1もまだIN、SYSTEMもまだIN、TCAも。ATTITUDE DIRECT CONTROLも
ठीक है, यह अच्छी बात है। वह प्रोग्राम अलार्म सामान्य है; जब ट्रनियन 50 डिग्
Très bien. Compte tenu de cette p
吉姆，还有大约 2 分半钟，
…1時間に1回で
少な
地質学の観点から見ると、
Okay. Stand by 1, Jack, and we'll give you an indication of how that water situation on
इस शून्य-लिफ्ट पुनःप्रवेश प्रणाली से हम आपके प्रवेश बिंदु का अनुमान लगा सकेंगे और आपके पहुंचने से लगभग 15 मिनट पहले ही बचाव दल को 
Итак, аудиозапись № 2 для записи. Второй фанат костюм
이글, 잠시 기다려 주시겠습니까? 통신 점검을 진행하기 전에 
わかった。私も自分の責任を果たそうと努力するよ。クローズドループは絶対に作らないって言っ
ما يكشف عنه فريد هو كيس ماء نضعه داخل طوق العنق، مما يس
ああ、彼は円熟してきているに違いな
Okay. We're 
而且，
À ce moment-là, si je me souviens bien, vous aviez 6 secondes de plus que la combustion nominale, qui était 3 secondes de plus que la combustion basse B-sigma, et vous étiez également prêt pou
11, ह्यूस्टन। पैनल 11 का हमारा दृश्य यह है - पहले रोशनी तेज होती है, फिर धुंधली हो जाती है। क्या आप एफ-स्टॉप में कोई बदलाव कर रहे हैं
سأظ
Charlie, Apollo 11. Ich habe ein paar Fragen zum Anhalten. Mir scheint, der einfachste Weg wäre folgender: Wir befinden uns ja im Prinzip bei 0 Grad Gierwinkel und nähern uns 90 Grad Nickwinkel. Es geht also nur darum, bei ungefähr 260 Grad Rollwinkel anzuhalten. Wie wäre es mit folgendem Verfahren: Manuelle Lageregelung, dann 3 auf Richtflugregelung, und da unsere Totzone bereits zusammengebrochen ist, aktiviere ich die Tr
... मैंने इसे छोटे सिरे के ऊपर देखा, जो मुझे लगता है कि पूर्व दिशा की ओर इशारा 
यहां से दृश्य श
オーケー。48-1 142。3+08。17 20 00
イギリス、ジョドレルバンク発、AP通信経由：英国の大型ジョドレルバンク電波望遠鏡は、本日東部夏時間午後5時49分、ソ連の無人月探査機からの信号の受信を停止した。広報担当者は、ルナ15号宇宙船は「月面を越えた」ようだと述べた。また、「月面に着陸したとは考えていない」と、同天文台長のバーナード・ラベル卿の広報担当者は述べた。ワシントンUPI通信：スパイロ・T・アグニュー副大統領は、2000年までに人類を火星に送るべきだと主張したが、民主党指導部は地球上のニーズを優先すべきだと反論した。水曜日のアポロ11号打ち上げで政府高官を務めたアグニュー氏は、「私の判断では、今世
Хорошо, оба клапана регулирования потребности в кислороде выключен
了解。BANK Bを投
ठीक है। समझ गया। और जिम, हमें एक घंटे में आपके साथ प्रवेश सम
罗杰。你
入りました。今のところ寒いようですが、入場するずっと前からスーツを着ることになる
Houston, lest ihr
ठीक है। यह प्लस 11 है, /। यह 40 माइनस 163, प्लस 129, माइनस 005, 99, प्लस 00 00 0, प्लस 47016, 177 143 000 नवंबर अल्फा, प्लस 001 97 47 020 5 51 468 18 12 12 83 257 023,
Контроль отношения, прямой контроль или что-то еще, что вы соб
... und es ist mir sehr peinlich zuzugeben, dass sie eine Hasselblad verloren
نعم. يبدو أنه سيكون جيدًا جدًا على المحول أيضًا، لذا قد يساعد ذلك كثيرًا
— И он пьёт свой восхитительный апельсиновый напиток. Может, мне следовал
CONTROLLER DELLA TRADU
はい、平らに折りたたむことができます。これで
Хьюстон, Аполл
تما
阿波罗8号，我们正在和跟踪人
Aquarius, Houston. Die 5018 Winkel, die wir um 74 Uhr hatten, Fred, basierten auf dieser Lage und sind für die Z
Y
イー
ठीक है, चलिए - उफ़, ज़रा आराम से। ज़रा आराम
जेमिनी 4, कार्न
Maybe it'll make the.
En plus, nous av
Roger,
알겠습니다. 업데이트를 진행하겠습니다. 업데이트 순서는 상태 벡터, 상태 벡터, 그리고 외부 변수 순입니다. 시간이 되시면 
Roger. Well, I'll continue this maneuver then to roll 82, pitch 218, yaw zero, if that's okay with you, and do a in that attitude. And that'll be a sl
روجر. كاناري ك
지금 짐 쪽은 완전히 대낮이고, 제 쪽 창밖으로는 아직 별들이 조금 보입니다. 우주선은 한쪽은 어둡게, 다른 쪽은 밝게 유지할 수 있도록 방향을 조절할 수 있는 것 같습니다. 지금 짐 쪽은 확실히 대낮이고 제 쪽은 어둡습니다. 비행 초반에 부스터에서 반짝이는 작은 반딧불이들을 보면서 주변이 얼마나 어두운지 감탄했던 게 가장 놀라웠던 점 중 하나입니다. 짐을 보니 그는 완전히 대낮처럼 
まだです。かなりフリックしています
Хорошо, Джо. Я создал здесь новую страницу под назва
И продолжаем. Если во время работы двигателя он остановится, и у вас будет мигать NOUN 97, вам следует ПРОДОЛЖИТЬ, затем заполнить бак, ЗАПУСТИТЬ ДВИГАТЕЛЬ, чтобы СТУПИТЬ, и ВКЛЮЧИТЬ ПЕРЕКЛЮЧЕНИЕ ДВИГАТЕЛЯ СНИЖЕНИЯ. Хорошо. Теперь общая информация. Если вы не использовали PC+2, то, вероятно, P - P+4 будет самым ранним. Он будет возвращаться в реж
Ещё бы. На спортивной странице не так уж много активности. UCLA лидирует в обоих баскетбольных рейтингах. Если у вас есть какой-то конкретный вопрос, дайте мне знать, и я скажу, входят ли они в десятку лучших в каком-либо из рейтингов. Что касается Севера — завтра состоится студенческий матч всех звёзд, —
Jim, es ist wieder Zeit für die Messwerte zum Batterieladevorgang. Bitte die Span
我感觉我
Ed started on unstowing stuff and as soon as we got to the position where it became no longer feasible to fool with the booster, I started full-time helping him - at least holding the things and stowing them away and trying to keep them from disappearing. The faster we worked the farther behind we got. Not because we weren't putting things the way they were supposed to, it just took a lot longer than we had anticipated. It really wasn't much easier at zero g than it was in the simulator, if as easy. So we worked all the way around. By the time we got to Carnarvon, I had 
Okay. Du hast immer noch ordentlich Power. Wir zeige
जानकारी क
Ok,... ne ho uno di 
- - con quell'angolazione molto bassa
I've got retro correction thrusters on - normal instead of low. I'm going to switch to HF antenn
Jack ha detto
إذا كان لديك وقت، فلدينا واحد آ
जैसे ही इस गुंबद के तापमान के प्रवाह में उलटफेर होगा, मुझे लगता है कि हम इसे हल कर
Sì. È molto bello parlare con perso
По данным Associated Press, жители западного побережья — Сиэтла (штат Вашингтон), Портленда (штат Орегон), Ванкувера (Британская Колумбия) и Сан-Франциско — план
Muc
好的。在225号面板上，我们需要断开
Roger. Looks like to us
يوري أليكسييفيتش، سننقل محطة الراديو هذه إلى الملجأ الآن. لذا، سيكون
はい、O2 タンク 1 の
Okay. Mike, quello che è successo è che.
Roger, dacci de
不。天哪，你还记得他们跟我们说要
Roger. Continuiamo con il Maroon Bugle. Il Presidente Nixon ha sorpreso le vostre mogli con una telefonata da San Francisco poco prima di salire su un aereo per incontrarvi. Sono rimasti tutti molto colpiti dalla vostra trasmissione televisiva. Jan e Pat hanno guardato dal Controllo Missione qui. Il lancio di Intelsat da Città del Capo è stato rinviato per la quarta volta ieri sera. Si dice che il problema sia dovuto a un malfunzionamento del regolatore di azoto nel secondo stadio del Delta. Un nuovo tentativo di lancio verrà effettuato stasera. Il sottomarino di ricerca Ben Franklin, che studia la Corrente del Golfo, ha stabilito un record navigando alla deriva per 24 ore da 3 a 30 metri sopra il fondale oceanico a 400 metri di profondità al largo della costa della Georgia. La missione è guidata da Jacques Picard. Wally Schirra è stato eletto per un mandato di
On verra ce qu'on peut faire, Jack. On va conta
ठीक
روجر. ريف 42،
E
أف
저는 저공비행 각도를 따라할 준비가 되
यहां एक दिलचस्प खबर है जिसे सुनकर अच्छा लगा। ऐसा लगता है कि मिशिगन के एन आर्बर में एक नया युवा गिरोह पनपा है। इसका नाम गिलनेट गिरोह है। यह गिरोह एन आर्बर की गलि
네, 맞습니다. ATCA를 열어
Roger. Indirizzo 03, 38549; Core 04, 61388; Core 05, 07513; Core 66, 65384; Core 07, 35999; Core 08, 40014. Mi stai
Zanzibar Com Tech,
休斯顿 CAP COM，这里
D'accord. Encore quelques minutes, Jim. Tout semble bien se présenter. Ton séjour à Carnarvon devrait se dérouler comme prévu. Nous n'avons pas encore déterminé avec précision la cause de l'arrêt prématuré du moteur inboard, si ce n'est qu'il s'agissait apparemment d'un problème moteur et non d'un dysfonctionnement du sélecteur. Mais nous sommes certains que tu 
Отлично; в
Il ripetitore UHF è buono. Mi capi
分かりました。最初の追加質問ですが、元の質問に戻りましょう。この質問には「項目2についてより具体的に」とありますが、項目2には「単段動力飛行中に騒音振動レベルに大きな変化はありましたか？」とあります。具体的には、S-IIセ
Buon complea
Okay. ANZUG-STROM, AUS; Bedienfeld 10, STROM und ANZUG-S
Apollo 8, this is Houston. If you should decide that you want to roll heads up on 2
现在别打哈
لا توجد بطاقات تذكير. صدقوني، ليس لدينا أي نية لمنافسة المحترفين. مع ذلك، نشعر براحة كبيرة هنا. منزلنا سعيد. هناك متسع كبير لنا نحن الثلاثة، وأعتقد أننا جميعًا نتعلم إيجاد ركننا المفضل للجلوس فيه. انعد
That's spectacular out there - Looks like you're flying right
ठीक है। मैं टीवी क
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि अंतरिक्ष कार्यक्रम को लगभग सभी ने अत्याधुनिक इलेक्ट्रॉनिक उपकरणों से भरा हुआ ही समझा है, और निश्चित रूप से, इसमें बहुत कुछ ऐसा ही है। लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि मैं यहाँ कुछ और चीज़ें भी दिखाऊँगा। पहली चीज़ से आपको टैंक में बचे हुए पानी की मात्रा का बहुत सटीक माप मिल जाता है। हम इस थैली का उपयोग करेंगे जो मैं अभी दिखा रहा हूँ, टैंक में बचे हुए पानी को इक
Géme
أبولو
奥德赛，你地面上的表现看起来不错
螺距不要超过 
コロンビア、ヒューストン
Negativo. Non crediamo, Apollo 11. Pensiamo che questo sia probabilmente dovuto ad alcune dispersioni, e probabilmente è accettabile. Quindi accettatelo pure. In ogni caso, rientra nei nostri criteri: se 
Könnten Sie uns bitte die Werte für
Ricevuto.
わかっ
Cavolo, quelle finestre sono davvero rovinate. Ho dato un'occhiata alla tua finestra, Wally. È davvero s
Roger, hier spricht Sigma Seven. Ich habe dich verstanden, Gene. An me
Ich habe nicht gel
음, 우리가 지나온 큰 분화구 하나를 제외하면,
حسنًا. ينظر إلى شدة التيار الكهربائي للبطارية التي زودتنا بها سابقًا. يرغب في أن تكون أقل بنصف أمبير إلى أمبير وا
Beide 
프레드, 지금 골드스톤 대형 위성 안테나에 연결됐고 통신 상태도 훨씬 좋아졌습니다. 괜찮으시다면 저
わかりました。私たちもそうしたいのですが。ちょっと待ってください、ジム
सिग्मा सेवन, वूमेरा ने आपका आखिरी संद
Ok
العدسة معطلة في هذه الصورة... ومختلة في تلك... والجهاز السدسي معطل. الكاميرا ذات العدسة 16 ملم لا تعمل إلا في نصف الوقت تقريبًا. ر
네, 휴스턴
3، 2، 1، يح
रॉजर। क्या इस समय CO2 के स
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous aur
अपोलो 8, अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है, ह्यूस्
يستم
क्राइस्ट ने अभी-अभी च
Okay. Wir haben VERB 48 in, VERB 83, ORDEAL set und SEQ
E prima di iniziare a lavorarci, fatecelo sapere, perché abbiamo qualche DELTA
روجر. أنا في 
Okay. Verstanden. Und noch eine letzte Sache: Wir 
Роджер, Хьюстон. Мы поста
Lorsque l'antenne - lorsque l'antenne est revenue en place, elle est passée à un lacet de 60, un tangage de moins 5, avec une lecture de plus 67 pour le lacet
هل يجب أن يكون ذلك
Хорошо. Авиашоу GASTA и автобу
그리고 페리신트 무늬
-- Wir haben - Mike, wir haben hier den genauen Einsatzbefehl für dich und einen Bericht über den Brandst
로저, 11시. 가까운 시일 내에 편하신 시간에 폐수 배출을 진행하고자 합니다. 특정 시간은 정해져 있지 않습니다. 중간 항로 수정 3(약 53시 55분) 시점에 하강 기류
Unfortunately, the chart doesn't agree with it, because the range rate at 36 minutes was off t
好的。还有一件事我们注
Поня
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Ich verst
Хорошо. Сначала комментарий. В середине страницы заканчивается информация о зодиакальном свете, чуть ниже. А затем, если вы прокрутите страницу 
Würdest
Understand. Some grits, h
Игл, это Колумбия. Хьюстон просит
5 1/2 डाउन, 9 फॉरवर्ड। यह अच्छा 
Bill sagte, ich solle Valerie anrufen und sie bitten, den Tonbandrekorder – seinen Tonbandrekorder zu Hause – zurückzuspul
Verseau, Houston. Il y a eu du bruit dans les communications, et je veux m'assurer que nous avons les bons chiffres, alors je vous prie de les
こちらアポロ8号、月から生中継でお送りしています。テレビカメラを切り替える必要がありました。まずは、過去16時間にわたって地球の様子をお伝えしました。次は
أستطيع الآن رؤية الجسم الصغير الذي يشبه ندفة الثلج، وهو يبتعد عن الكبسولة. يسير في نفس مسار الرحلة، با
D'accord. L'azote sur le 1 et l'oxygène sur 
Roger th
Ehi, Vance, aspetta
Ok. Hai provato a rimettere un po' di quella roba nel
了解。パースから光が見える気がします
了解です。R1に27210、R2に35570、R3に33010を加えます。2つ目の項目は、ご存知の通り、「
ジェミニ4、RKV C
Okay. Wie wäre es, wenn wir die Idee umsetzen, dass Jim seine Polarisation durch das Teleskop durchführt? Denn wenn wir unsere Haltung ändern müssen, möchten wir uns gleich
다우존
हाँ। मुझे ऐसा लगता है। मुझे लगा था कि शायद यह उन चीज़ों में से एक है जिन्हें आप कभी लोड नहीं कर सकते, और शायद अभी भी कर सकते हैं। हो सकता है कि यह थोड़े समय के लिए ही लो
Eh bien, dès que nous serons arrivés ici, nous l'arrêterons avec 
ええ。まあ、私たちの視点から見ると、もうすぐ晴れそうです。天気の西端は、あなたの西側からそ
Roger. Non ho capito
ठीक है। मैं इसे हटा दूंगा, और कृपया मुझे बता देना कि
Roger. Grazie, è centrato molto bene. Abbiamo ottenuto un lievissimo miglioramento, ma in generale è molto buono considerando la distanza. Che mi dici della luna, 
Nous venons de terminer le lacet de l'Agena à 090° et le lacet était précisément de 1,5 degré par seconde lors de la manœuvre de lacet. Il a fallu… secondes pour atteindre 90 degrés. La plateforme Gemini a – peut-être – dérivé excessivement depuis notre dern
OK, clair et net. 
Roger, Jim. Vorremmo riprendere il controllo del nastro per qualche minuto per assicurarci di aver registrato tutto l'ultimo video.
布鲁斯，我应该提一下，当我把水
Роджер. Подождите, пожалуйста. Во время 4-го заезда «Аполлона-9» мы наблюдали Антарес и Скорпиона. Мы совершили длинный заезд и короткий. Мы также совершили заезд к Антаресу и звезде третьей величины в созвездии Скорпиона. Мы не обнаружили никаких звёздных точек, относящихся к ускорителю «Аполлона». Мы совершили три заезда на D-9 ВВС. Хьюстон, «Дже
Небольшая задержка, Джим. Потребуется пара минут, прежде чем
Paracadute principale in verde. Il paracadute è fuori uso, in condizioni di barriera corallina a 10.800 piedi e il paracadute è splendido. Il paracadute sembra in buone condizioni. In emergenza O2 e il paracadute sembra in ottime condizioni. La velocità di discesa è scesa a circa 42 piedi al sec
Rog
了解しました。ジェミニ8号、ヒューストンです。少し時間が空いているので、通信状況の最新情報をお伝えします。あと2分でタナナリヴに到着します。カーナボン上空で皆さんをお迎えします。その後、1号機が到着予定です。その後、マーキュリー、ハワイ、ゴー
好
로저. 혹시 지금부터 비행 종료 시간 사이에 일출 시간에 맞춰 오실 기회가 있다면,
Apollo 8, Houston. Cinq minutes, tous les systèmes sont opérati
Хорошо
是的，我打开过。但是食物都碎成渣了；我都不敢再打开包装了，怕碎屑弄得胶囊里到处都是。我可以保证，像我们这次航班上准备的这种一口大小的食物，吃起来完全没问题。即使是碎屑状的食物，吃起来
Roger. And I understand he was down there and really enjoyed watching the
ठीक है, ओवेन। हम आपके इशारे का इंतज़ार कर रहे हैं, और परिणाम आने 
Roger. Capisco. OMNI Charlie. Mike, sappi che abbiamo un aggiornamento per te sul volo. Stimiamo che sia a
Vous pouvez lui donner un bulletin météo d'Apollo 8. Le pôle Sud a été particulièrement touch
Okay. Ma credo che quello che volevo davvero chiedere è se avresti delle obiezioni forti se riempissimo due sacche 
Хорошо. Битрейт установлен на низкий битрейт. Голос, переключатель функций в положение «Вниз», резервное копирование голоса. Усилители мощности CB открыты; переключатель функций диапазона в пол
11-ブラボー 1
Okay, Fred. We recommend that you push your MASTER ALARM circuit breaker in so you'll have audio and visual on that, and, also, we medical types are getting to feel left
Это D-9, запуск 2. Используйте настройки фильтра по расписанию. Вы скоп
わかりました。グリコ
C'e
لا تنظر من النافذة رقم 1. إذا كنت - إذا كان المنظر يشبه ما أراه من ال
Apollo 8, Houston. Four minutes to. 
わかりました。他のものは全部消してくださ
Okay. Jack, lascia che ti legga anche le procedure del modulo 
저기 있는 것 중에 더 
Okay. Sin
네, 곧 그렇게 할 거예요
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。燃焼中にPUGSの酸化剤
私の現在の数値は 
休斯顿，这里是第八区。而且，我们还没
حسنًا. إنها تنزل. ما هذا؟ حسنًا، أعتقد أنه من الأفضل أن آكل شيئًا. مهلاً، هذه تحتوي على بعض من ذلك الجيلي المُحلى... كما تعلم، لقد مرّ وقت طويل جدًا دون أن ننام. قلتُ إننا مرّ وقت طويل جدًا دون أ
Très bien, al
Вперё
自动模式控制，均为自动；下降发动机指令超控，关闭；发动机启动，关
Gemini
Roger. Ging es dabei um das Auftreten von W
روجر. بخصوص مشكلة المياه، لا يمكننا إضافة أي شيء آخر، باستثناء حقيقة أن 
ジャック、あなたの言うことはは
네. 현재 휴스턴의 전압은 양호한 상태입니다. 그리고 저기에 경고등이 켜졌을 때 꽤 큰 폭발음이 들렸습니다. 제가 기억하기로는, 메인 B 회로에서 이전에 전류 스파이크가 발생한 적
Роджер. Имейте в виду, что в настоящее время уровень 
네, 맞습니다, 프랭
非常感谢。查理，我们马上就要在这个光学校准仪上做标记了。我已经把它放在六分仪上了，现在准备分
لا، ل
Итак, когда я был наверху, всего минуту назад, я заметил что-то похожее на новые вентиляционные отверстия в сервисном модуле. Я увидел это через окно №1, а также кусок металла — рыхлый металл размером пример
Je vous 
다섯 칸을 읽어보세
L'ave
ठीक है। मैं बस यह जानना चाहता था कि क्या हमें बीच 
Ok. Mancano circa 10 minuti. Vi verremo a prendere di nuovo alle 10:00 e avremo tutte le informazioni necessarie per la TV. Nel caso in cui la situazione si ripeta, per la precisione del puntamento, se vedo qualcosa che assomigli a un Terminator o qualcosa d
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。如果你们有空，我想问登月宇航员几个
好的。中太平洋时间，000152，000；，178；你还记得那是月落时间，需要检查月相姿态。NOUN 61，减去 21.66，减去 165.37；30；接下来的四个不适用；DO 是 4.00，02:20；1
Хьюстон, Игл. Вы ко
罗杰。PQGS 测试结果为阴性。ASCENT HELIUM REG 测试结果为阴性，CROSS-POINT
알겠습니다. 시작 시간과 종료 시간을 알려주시면 됩니다. 현재 자세(피치 10도, 요 10도, 요 45도)에서 좌회전 속도를 시간당 1회전으로 설정하겠습니다. 선호하시는 좌회전 속도를 요청드립니다. 1단계: 롤 각도 150도에서 정지합니다. 2단계: 수동 모드로 수신합니다. 3단계: 자동 협대역 모드로 전환합니다. 4단계: 자동 모드에서 추적이 제대로 되는지 확인한
Hier spri
S
냉
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地から昨夜の地質学に関する質問についてコメントをいただきます。私たちは、比較的滑らかなクレーター地帯に着陸しました。そこには細長い二次クレーター、つまり円形の二次クレーターが点在しており、そのほとんどには、大きさに関わらず、隆起した縁があります。これは必ずしも全てがそうではありません。周囲には、はっきりと縁が見えない小さなクレーターもいくつかあります。この地域全体の基質は、非常に細かい砂からシルトまでです。地球上でこれに最も近いのは、粉末状の黒鉛でしょう。この基質には、丸みを帯びたものや角張ったものなど、様々な形、大きさ、質感の岩石が埋まっており、多くの岩石の硬さは様々です。先ほども申し上げたように、私は単純な玄武岩や気
Roger. Nous 
ロジ
調子はどうですか、フ
حسنًا. اضغط على مفتاح الإدخال، ثم اضغط على 333 ثم اضغط على مفتاح الإدخال مرة أخرى، ثم اقرأ قيمة السج
इतनी ऊंचाई तक जाने की कोशिश करें कि आपको क्षितिज पर तारे दिखाई द
Roge
罗杰。迈克，你之前摆弄那个装置，我们把死区缩小的时候，你假设死区是以我们当时所处的新姿态为中心的。从那以后，我们的俯仰角和偏航角都偏离了那个姿态几度，所以如果我们按照之前跟你说的步骤操作，按下加速指令，打开所有
Понял. Проверьте по
Correction - Make that for the next orbit. 
알았어. 좋아. 자, 이제 시술 
好吧，我
समझ गया, और इसे मेरी चेकलिस्ट में नोट कर लिया गया
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. سنسلمكم الإشارة من مدريد إلى غولدستون في تمام الساعة ١٥١. إذا فقدتم الاتصال بالهدف ذي الكسب العالي في هذا الوقت، فقد تحتاجون إلى زاوية ميل سالبة ٤٥ درجة، وان
Джим, мы согласны с тем, что вы использовали два небольших кратера, которые вы можете неоднократно отмечать и находить на карте; а также, если вы сообщите н
Das ist der Recorder – er kommt ins Kommandomodul; es wird empfohlen, ihn in R-13 zu verstauen. 
Très bien. Ligne numéro 7. I
Esatto, Jack. Okay, a pagina 2-5. La riga in alto, dove c'era "Controllo dell'orizzonte", ora è il "Controllo del tramonto della luna" e l'ora è approssimativamente 57:37. E questo è 
D'accord, on y est, N
S-6はかなりの数を保有しています。S-5も散発的に目撃されており…写真も撮っていますが、少なくともアメリカ上空を1回は飛行させたいと思っています。そして、もし可能であれば北アフリカ上空をもう1回飛行させた
Верно. Единственное, что еще приходит мне в голову, когда я смотрю на это через призму, это то, что, похоже, источник излучения находится в одной точке; но это единственное отличие, хотя я не могу определить, откуда именно он исходит, потому что это находится за пределами кривизны командного модуля. Но, похоже, излучение может исходить не только и
यह ह्यूस्टन है। हमार
よし、アクエリア
Roger. La vapeur de la combinaison est à 69 degrés et la cabine à +11. Cette température a chuté brutalement lorsque le voyant d'excès d'eau cabine s'est allumé. Je pense que je 
Roger. Rileggendo 8-C. ΔV 166. 3+35. 01 02 06 51. Ripeti le ultim
Roger, tout se passe bien ici. Nous mettons un peu de temps 
好的
ジム、パネル 16 インチ上の POWER AMPLIFIER
Орел, Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы кратко о
Doctor, be advised, I'm having a lot of trouble with this blood p
ठीक है, जैक। औ
Roger. It came through a lot clearer through the sextant than with the monocular, and you could
Okay. Un'altra domanda, Charlie. Vorrei sapere se la nota
하와이, 쌍둥이자리 4. 당신의 성향을 알 수 없네요
わかりました。ピッチ姿勢を91度では
Bien reçu. En attente, je vous ferai un compte rendu. Je suis en orbite pour votre suivi. Voici le compte rendu: tous les fusibles sont en position 1, sauf celui de la tour de largage, en position 2. La rétroséquence d'urgence, le largage d'urgence et le parachute de secours sont en position centrale d'arrêt. Le dispositif anti-retour est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le système est normal (automatique et gyroscopique). Toutes les poignées en « T » sont en position « entrée ». Le délai de rétroséquence est normal. Les deux éclairages de cabine sont allumés. Les projecteurs photo sont toujours allumés. La télémétrie basse fréquence est activée. Les aides au sauvetage sont en mode automatique. Les lumières de la tour de largage et de la capsule de séparation sont éteintes. Le régulateur de pression est toujours en position « entrée ». Le contrôle de lancement est activé. Tous les panneaux de séquence sont en position normale, sauf le coussin d'atterrissage qui est désactivé. Vous recevez? Term
휴스턴. 저는 기본 전력 증폭기, 끄기, 낮은 
ठी
No, I'm in no rush. Go ahead - go ahead and get everything all packed away; I hate to have – a couple of suits out. If you want to air it for a while, go ahead and get the hose to it, and - I'm in no rush. I'll take this thing off after you guys ar
나침반이 뒤쪽에 있는 자세 계기와 자이
로저. 1, G&N: 62710, +0.98, -0.19, 0.75 49 4965, -28897, -0.3944, -0.0686; 358 226 347; 0.1692, +0.0610; 29173 602 29108; 31 106.6 358
Apollo 13, Houston. L'ordinateur e
Роджер, Том. Скопировал их все
जी हां, सही है। ये सभी उड़ान संबंधी बदलाव हैं - उड़ान योजना में बदलाव। केन अभी आ रहे हैं और बाद में, जब सब कुछ ठीक हो जाएगा, तब वे आपसे बात करेंगे। 
روجر. جيم، ماذا تفعل هنا؟ جيم يُحضّر الحلوى. إنه يُجهّز كيسًا من بودنغ الشوكولاتة. يمكنك رؤيته يطفو. بيل قادم من حجرة المعدات السفلية. من المؤسف أن عدسة التقريب هذه لا تعمل. أرهم العدسة المُسببة للمشكلة يا جيم. يبدو أن هذه العدسة ل
Roger. Je suis content que tu sois prêt à recopier le numéro 6. J'ai une dernière remar
Hello, Hor
Sigma Seven Sigma
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन; एक्वेरियस। मैं इसे वापस उसी दिशा में उड़ा रहा हूँ जहाँ आपने म
Ja, ich befand mich in einer Rechtsdrehung und bin jetzt in einer Linksdrehung; und z
Okay, Jack. CB BAT CHARGER to AC POWER, close. Stand by. Okay. I had to get a light here. CB BAT CHARGER, BAT A CHARGE, close; CB INVERTER
卡纳文 CAP 
11, ici Houston. Termin
翻訳制
Ты хочешь сказать, что после всей этой работы по подсчету цифр ты собираешься свести все к нулю
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ وضعية مُحاذاة محور الجسم، باستخدام خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار على الأرض كما فعلنا من قبل. وبمجرد حصولنا على ذلك، سننفذ -7، وهو ما يبدو الآن وكأنه احتراق بمعدل قدمين في الثانية أو حوالي 15 ثانية. وقد أُبلغتُ أنه انخفض إلى قدم ونصف الآن، لذا فهو ضمن الحدود الآمنة. حسنًا. عند القيام بذلك، سنبدأ فورًا المناورة للوصول إلى وضعية إطلاق وحدة الخدمة، والتي ستكون في مستوى الطائرة لأننا نُطلقها أبكر من المعتاد. لسنا بحاجة، ولا نرغب، في وجود عنصر خارج مستوى الطائرة. لذا ستكون في مستوى الطائرة مع توجيه وحدة الخدمة للخارج على طول متجه نصف القطر. سنبدأ بعد ذلك في تجهيز وحدة القيادة لوحدة الخدمة SEP، بما في ذلك فحص وحدة القيادة وإطلاق النار الساخن، وقبل حوالي 4 ساعات و30 دقيقة من الإطلاق، سنُطلق وحدة الخدمة. سنرفع الطائرة حتى نحصل على وحدة الخدمة في... ونحاول التقاط بعض الصور، لكننا لن نُجري مناورات تحويلية لالتقاط الصور لأننا لا نريد إفساد زاوية مسار الطيران في ذلك الوقت. حسنًا. هذا يُعطينا ساعتين تقريبًا من الوقت المتاح هنا للانتهاء، إذا تأخرنا في ذلك، للانتقال إلى قائمة التحقق والاستعداد لتشغيل وحدة القيادة. سنبدأ التشغيل الكامل لوحدة القيادة قبل ساعتين ونصف. سنُشغّل الكمبيوتر، ونرفع الطائرة، ونبدأ في إرسال بيانات الحالة، وما إلى ذلك، ومحاذاة منصة وحدة القيادة. 
Roger. Lies dir fünf vor, Buzz. Wie geht's? 1, 2, 3,
Ja. Si
Und 13, Houston. Wenn Sie möchten, können wir Sie etwa alle zwei M
ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस, ह्यूस्टन। आपके सभी उपभोग्य सामान बढ़िया हैं। आप हर लिहाज से बेह
Well, that pisses me off. Hasse
D'accord. C'est bon. Il faut les fermer pour que vous puissiez lire les tensions et les ampères. Prochaine étape: sur le panneau 250, il faut fermer les disjoncteurs BAT A POWER ENTRY et POSTLANDING et BAT B POWER ENTRY et POSTLANDING. Te
好的。有几件事我想确认一下。我想确认一下，如果可以的话，你们在滑道上的时候会把舱口安全带取下来。如果不行，
Okay - continuing on now - okay,... 32.9; burn time, 40 seconds forward 1.5; 04 seconds up and down; Address 81, 1.5 04 seconds to the left; yaw zero, pitch 26.8 degrees; range 139; range rate 32.69. On the range and range rate,
ロジャー、あと3つ…あと3つ
ठीक है। गोल्फ की दुनिया में, हाल के वर्षों में कम ही प्रतिस्पर्धा करने वाले टॉमी जैकब्स ने कल फिलाडेल्फिया गोल्फ क्लासिक में
Columbia, ici Houston. Vo
Columbia, this is Houston. We'd like you to cy
Roger, Fred. We had an for a minute and we lost our TV picture. It looks like - yes, we Ju
Okay. Down at the bottom, you've got "10,000 feet MAIN PARACHUTE DEPLOY, MAIN DEPLOY pushbutton, PUSH w
로저. 달 진입, MPL: 359 152 001 194 46 03 267, +1102, -17203 068 36194 656 11894 
我们必须等到再次锁定高
Retro Power RCS，
मैं आपकी बात अच्छे से सुन पा रहा हूँ। सब ठीक है, उड़ान सुचारू रूप से चल रही है। मुझे पृथ्वी दिखाई दे रही है, उड़ान जारी है, दृश्यता अ
Vi aggiorneremo sulla regolazione finale dell'altezza sulle Hawaii. Inoltre, vorremmo che controllaste l'asse X... È leggermente fuori tol
أنا أنظر من النافذ
Роджер, плюс 00953, пл
रॉजर. नई मात्राएँ 3-1 167. 3+
ठीक है। तो हो सकता है यह टेप पर रिकॉर्ड हो और हो सकता है न हो। यह सिलसिला लगभग 44 मिनट तक चला, जब हमने ईवीए शुरू किया था। मैं अपने इवेंट टाइमर को देख रहा था, जिसे मैंने एड के अंतरिक्ष यान से बाहर निकलते ही चालू कर दिया था। 44 मिनट बाद भी हैच बंद नहीं हुआ था। हम सब कुछ शांत और संयमित तरीके से करने की कोशिश कर रह
好的，杰克。我要
收到。这是30分钟报告。我已进行头部运动测试，没有任何不适。我也进行了触及测试，一切正常。我的定向力良好，视力清晰。我来回注视一个光点，移动目标测试也没有任何不
Ok. Lascia che ti spieghi di nuovo tutto. I primi quattro saranno chiusi. I successivi sette - otto saranno - i successivi nove saranno aperti da LOGIC POWER B fino a DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE. E qu
Houston, Apoll
आपको यह भी सूचित किया जाता है कि 
...식사... 가방.
そうです。それが私がやろうとしていることです
알
रॉजर। हमें वो 99 नंबर 
Houston, Eagle. Vous pouvez - Les angles de co
双子座7号，这里是双子座6号。我们发现了一个物体，看起来像一颗卫星，正从北向南飞行，可能在极地轨道上。它的轨道非常低，
ठीक है, हम 7:40 बजे
不，绝对不行，沃利
...уметь выяснить, в каком
5 सेकंड प
वोल्ट, 39.3; 
알겠습니다. 제가 지금
Gemelli 4, abbiamo ricevuto la tua pressione sanguigna. Siamo in atte
Houston, qui è Apollo 8. Siamo d'accordo. Sirio e Rigel sarebbero due stelle molto migliori di Nav
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Kurskorrektur Nr. 2. SPS/G&N 63059, +097, -020, Zündung 02644 5792, 
Bene. Al
Ok, Acquario. Ecco cosa faremo. Vorremmo che puntassi l'asse X a nord o a sud. Questo è l'asse X positivo. Ci sembra che sarebbe più corretto orientare l'asse X positivo verso sud. Fallo con il. Dopodiché, ti proponiamo di spegnere il per risparmiare energia. Tuttavia, questo significa che perderemo l'uso del, e dovr
D'accord. 7 minut
好的。我们会密切关注
And in exchange for that, the surgeon would like to have a rough number of hours each of you slept and a qualitative verb t
感觉当速度降到110左右的时候，你
ええ、それが私の質問です。16インチと20インチのボールが、このエイトボールと一致していません。S ONにしましたが、ボールが完全にパワーアップしていま
我想我看到了心宿
……
حسناً، أنا مستعد تماماً ل
3プラス47。大体そんな
Roger. Read you loud and clear. I have the retro information for you. Are you prepared to
Je vais vous expliquer comment je procède. Sélection du mode de commande électrique. Passage en mode gyroscopes bloqués. Évaluation
Alpha/Pc 至 Pc；发射载具指示器至 GPI；万向节驱动俯仰和偏航至自动；事件计时器重置，向上；事件计时器启动至停止；事件计时器分钟、秒至中心；着陆后通风阀，推；探测器伸出/释放至关闭；伸出/释放对讲机，两个，灰色；对接探测器收回，主探测器和副探测
حسناً، لا بأس. قد تعاود المحاول
Ricevuto. Toro, Aida; ripeto, Toro, Aida. Su 162, a sinistra 01, il resto non
Okay. Batterieladung: Aus; Wechselrichter 2: Aus; Hauptbusverbindung: Batterie B/C ein. Bedienfeld 250: Batterie A, Stromeingang u
好的。我们要关闭的两个处理器是序列器 A 和序列器 B
네. 5번 패널에서 전원 1번과 2번 회로 차단기를 엽니다. 그런 다음 전원 스위치를 리셋하고 놓습니다. 11번 패널과 16번 패널에서 초월 버스 타이(TRANSLUNAR BUS TIE) 회로 차단기를 모두 닫습니다. 16번 패널에서 상승 ECA 제어 회로 차단기를 닫습니다. 16번 패널에서 하강 ECA 제어 회로 차단기도 닫습니다. 14번 패널에서 배터리 5 정상 공급선을 <binary data, 5 bytes>니다. 배터리 1, 2, 
D'accord, Jack. Gardons l'eau;
Roger, Wass
ロジャー、ふたご座4です。長い…昼寝から起きたと
Ok. Lo stiamo riprendendo alle 3 in punto 
روجر. لقد ضبطنا لك 
रॉजर। हवाई से जेमिनी 4 को कॉल कर रहा हूँ। आपको याद दिलाना चाहता हूँ कि आपके पास गुआयमास के ऊपर एक महत्वपूर्ण टेप डंप है। 20 25 03. क्या आपने सुना?
وذلك بافتراض عدم وجود أي حدث في منتصف المسار هنا في ا
Potrei dirt
您好，宁静基地，休斯顿。关于
..
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ وضعية مُحاذاة محور الجسم، باستخدام خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار على الأرض كما فعلنا من قبل. وبمجرد حصولنا على ذلك، سننفذ -7، وهو ما يبدو الآن وكأنه احتراق بمعدل قدمين في الثانية أو حوالي 15 ثانية. وقد أُبلغتُ أنه انخفض إلى قدم ونصف الآن، لذا فهو ضمن الحدود الآمنة. حسنًا. عند القيام بذلك، سنبدأ فورًا المناورة للوصول إلى وضعية إطلاق وحدة الخدم
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴
Мы сообщим вам о результатах окончательной регулировки высоты над Гавайями. Также просим вас проверить ось X... Она немного выходит за пределы допустимых значений. Поэтому не нажимайте кнопку START COMP до позднего этапа регулировки высоты. Мы с
Okay
नहीं। केप ने बताया है कि आपका सीधा प्रसारण अमेरिका में होगा। रेडियो और टीवी प
हम इसकी पुष्टि करते हैं। पृष्ठ 1
Ну, я об этом не говорил. Возможно, мы
ح
تما
待機してください。ロジャー、いい荷物が届
Right-o. Okay. Next, at - Under the section of " minus 1 hour and 45 minutes" - No, change tha
تُشير قراءة درجة حرارة الوقود إلى 64 درجة مئوية أثناء الهبوط، بينما تُشير قراءة درجة حرارة ا
로저. 육분의로 보니 단안경보다 훨씬 선명하게 보였고, 발달 후기 단계의 단일 세포라는 것을 확실히 알 수 있었습니다. 5만 피트(약 15,000미터) 이상 높이까지 올라간 것 같습니다. 동부 지중
わかりました。私たちが作成した飛行計画によると、皆さんが食事を終え、フレッドが就寝している間、あなたとジャックが当直を担当することになります。つまり、計画通りだと、あなたは3～4時間早く起きることになります。そして、次に休憩時間として取れるのは96時間後、つまり今から7時間後です。そしてその1時間前、例えば95時間後には、3人全員が食事をし、その後、あなたとジャックが再び就寝し、フレッドが102時間まで当直を担当することにな
Roger. We'll be coming within range of the aircraft coverage, h
11، هيوستن. باز، الخبر من الغرفة الخلفية هو أنه يمكنك بالفعل تحميلها، ولكن لا ين
로저. 잠시 기다려 주십시오. LOX 덤프 시작 시간을 알려드리겠습니다. 5시 3분 7초에 시작해서
Si Jack écoute, dites-lui que l'optique fonctionne peut-être bien, mais que l'œil a un peu de mal à voir à travers toute cette buée sur les vit
分かりました。デュプレックスモードに関しては、影響はないはずです。分かりました。アポロ8号、私が呼び
네. 보셨어요
Roger, Be
Bermuda
«Дружба Семь», мы получили сообщение на земле в сегменте 51 о готовност
अपोलो 8, क्या आप हाई गेन पर नैरो बीम मोड का इस्तेमाल
D'accord, Jim. Nous avons évoqué la possibilité d'adopter une attitude différente de celle du pas de tir pour une meilleure visibilité du champ stellaire depuis le module de c
Ricevuto. Abbiamo intenzione di interrompere la ricarica della batteria B tra circa 5 minut
私がやることは…もう一度言います…わかりました。もう一度繰り返します。パッケージバルブを押し下げてオフ
Right. Well, we are seeing the entire earth now including the termina
Роджер. И помни, что мы там не собираемся устраивать бал, поэтому нам придётся следить за CDU, и если мы его сорвём, будет довольно
Хорошо, Джим. Наша рекомендация для этого маневра такова: сначала выполните маневр, чтобы занять исходное положение для маневра, в режиме минимального импульса, затем выполните выравнивание по оси тела, 400 плюс 5, затем 400 плюс 0,
Continuez, il ne s'est rien
ठीक है, बिल। मुझे लगता है कि मैं 4 के लिए ऑनबोर्ड स्टेट वेक्टर का उपयोग करने के बारे में अपनी आखिरी बात को टालना चाहता हूँ। ज़मीन पर इसका और अधिक अध्ययन करने के बाद, उन्हें 's बनाने और अपनी सभी गणनाएँ करने में जुट जाना होगा, और इसे टालने या दो बार करने के बजाय
等它升上去之后，我们也得把它搬到
Jim, in that control mode, that sounds like the best way to go. The only thing you'll have to do is to get ATTITUDE HOLD in the, and so before you start to maneuver, you'll have to bring the up, and get a 400 plus all zeros in there, and then will respond in yaw when you go to MODE CONTROL. That is, will control your yaw in MODE CONTROL and your pitch and roll can be taken care of in PULSE with a. After you get in attitude, then, you'll have to re-do an body axis aline which is 400
Roger, Ed. Vogliamo che riprendiate il vostro normale piano di volo. Lo basiamo sul fatto che riteniamo che abbiate an
Écoutez, on ne se soucie pas du réservoir d'eau potable, mais on s'inquiète pour le réservoir d'eaux usées. Alors, au cas où il y
立ち上がるときには、電源を入れたら、おそらく 37 という数字が点滅して現れると思いますが、ここで VERB 96 と入力して ENTER キーを
Je n'ai pas pu identifier la dernière station qui a émis sur les ondes HF. Le signal était très clair et devrait être en
Super, super. Oui, c'est magnifique. Waouh, c'est magnifique. Ça ne change rien au fait que… et tout ça, enfin, vous savez, ils ont cartographié la zone
Roger. We had one little incident here. Jim Lovell inadvertently popped one liferaft, so we've got one full 
…
برج ا
Roger. Pour votre adresse: 224, plus 6
Хорошо. Итоговый счет: «Кольтс» — 24, «Викинги» — 14. Это обеспечивает им победу в Западной конференции, так что, п
네. 그게
Джек, это Хьюстон. Мы хотим, чтобы ты держал двигатель включенным, чтобы было видно, что внутри, и выключил батарею — батарею А, а в подходящее время мы включим ГЛАВНЫЙ двигатель А. И мы будем держать двигатель включенным, чтобы м
Bene. Vogliamo ottenere sia l'ossigeno che
Yes. I will be glad to. Shaft 
わ
جيم، في وضع التحكم هذا، يبدو هذا الخيار الأمثل. كل ما عليك فعله ه
Columbia, Houston.
SEF-Aline. SEF-Aline nach 2 Stunden und 46 Minuten, und wir haben den
Okay, Fred. Ich empfehle dir, den BIOMED-Schalter auszuschalten. Wir hatten nie Probleme mit BIOMED, ​​und das könnte 
All'inizio, l'operazione con 
ह्यूस्टन। कोलंबिया ने डेल्टा
في رينو، نيفادا، ولأن منزله يفتقر إلى مدفأة، كتب طفل صغير إلى بابا نويل 
Roger. Moins 6 minutes. Je crois que vous êtes presque prêt à activer les moteurs de la nacelle et tout le reste. D'accord. On voit l'ordinateur maintenant, en haut au mi
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはザンジバル・カプ・コムです。テレメトリによると、全シ
Okay. Das war ein guter Rückblick. Damit ist das Verfahren in 
据称，82名男子花了大约30分钟才穿过“不归桥”，这座桥连接着朝鲜半岛南北两国。他们上午30点出发，大约
제미니 8호, CSQ CAP COM. Com 확인. 어
حسناً، نحن متقدمون 
Повторите ещё раз, Hou
그것으로는 어떻게 할 수 있을지 모르겠네
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストンです。その時は何も言っていませんでした。現在、いくつかの角度から検討を進めています。先ほど睡眠サイクルの調整についてご質問がありましたが、その点についてはご指摘の通りです。月周回軌道に入るまでに、睡眠サイクルなどを考慮した飛行計画を再開したいと考えています。そのため、睡眠サイクルを最も効率的に調整し、各自で調整す
روجر. لا بأس. سنقول لك المزي
Роджер. И у нас есть наблюдение, которое вы можете сделать, если у вас будет немного времени там, наверху. Сообщается о некоторых лунных транзитных явл
Los geht's, Hawaii. Hier spricht Apollo 8. W
نعم، هذا صحيح. بدأنا نتلقى إشارة غير منتظمة على الجهاز الأساسي، فانتقلنا إلى الجهاز الثانوي، وكانت الإشارة غير منتظمة أيضاً، فظننتُ أنها قد تك
好的，休斯顿。我们显示
Вы потратили 100 футов в сек
On va man
D'accord. Nous avons le feu
Ты имеешь в виду начало игры, когда ты 
Okay, ic
Houston, Apollo 8. We're maneuvering to the ang
夕焼けはなかなか印象的だ。眺めるのに時間を無駄にする必要はないと思う。とても興味深い。もう一つ魅力的なのは、目が慣れていないと黒く見えることだ。窓に確かにコーティングが見える。この時点で VOX に戻って UHF-hi で送信する。バイザーを開けて右のマイクを拭く。舐めてしまった。バイザーを閉じる。スーツの回路が機能するようにバイザーはすぐに密閉された。またそれで汚れたくない。スーツの吸気口は約 68 度で非常にうまく保たれている。そこでドームを再び上げる。今は 76、75 になっている。どうやらこの高い設定が我々が求めているものだ。今これに半マークを追加すればロックできるかもしれないと思う。ようやく少し涼しくなってきたので、設定をどこに持っていけばいいのかわかっている。スーツとコントロールレバーの冷却剤の量を 8.5 に設定しました。この時点でのドームの表示は 75 (度) です。スーツの吸気口は 68 (度) です。非常に快適です。顔に冷たい風が当たるのが感じられます。酸素量は非常に良好で、60 と 75 (psi、数百単位) です。250 のインバーターを監視しています。140 度に近づいており、150 のコントラストは約 100 度まで下がっています。スタンバイは約 100 (度) で、これはキャビン温度です。3 番目に、250 は苦しんでいるので、注意します。キャビンの熱交換器は間違いなく 40 度で安定しており、明らかに Frank Samonski に 50 セント借りがあるので苦労しています。嬉しい驚きです。キャビンの燃料も、少し高い値を示しています。今見てみましょう。5.5 psi を運んでいます。約5ポイント、訂正：5.3。このキャビンにしてはそれほど高くない。外はすっかり暗くなってきたので、そろそろ星空を眺めてみよう。左手袋の懐中電灯の電池
Il m'en faut un peu plus. C'est comme ça; continuez. Il m'en faut un peu plus… C'est comme ça, continuez – allez-y encore un peu – allez-y – allez-y – d'accord, stop. D'accord, j'ai compris maintenan
Roger, Apollo 8. D
Roger. J'y suis. Allez
Roger. Non appena avrai la possibilità di dare un'occhiata dalla tua posizione, vorremmo sapere se
さて、今、私が見ているものの半分は明るく、残りの半分は暗い。つまり、スモールエンドフォワードの方に少し横道に逸れているが、エ
... 90 Grad in die
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। ऐसा लगता है कि आप लोग
Je ne crois pa
阿波罗8号，休
Roger. / - this is for 3 - 46427, minus 053, plus 141, 
휴스턴, 이글입니다. 다시 PRIMARY 모드로 돌아왔고, 이제 조종 가능한 안테나 활성화를 진
Хорошо. Первый дополнительный вопрос, и позвольте мне уточнить исходный вопрос, потому что в нем говорится: «Более конкретно по пункту 2», а пункт 2 гласит: «Были ли какие-либо существенные изменения уровня шума и вибрации во время одноступенчатого полета с работающим двига
ठीक है। चलिए मैं आपको पैनल 225 फिर से बताता हूँ। CB FLIG
Una cosa che potrebbe interessare al mondo è cosa fai dopo la master
रॉजर। म
D'accord, Jim. Le problème persiste par intermittence. Nous pensons pouvoir stabiliser l'alimentation et améliorer les marges du circuit si, en plus, vous pouviez ouvrir le disjoncteur de l'amplificateur de puissance principal sur le 
了解、トランキリティ。大丈夫だ。何
एक्वेरियस, 
Roger, Apollo 11. Abbiamo un laser che... È un laser blu-verde che faremo lampeggiare a una frequenza di accensione per un secondo, spegnimento per un secondo. Proviene dall'Osservatorio McDonald vic
Roger. In Washington, the Senate Finance Committee has approved extension of the income tax surtax, but a Senate vote on the bill currently seemed remote. In Austin, State Representative Ray Lemmon of Houston has been nominated as the National Director of the American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon has proposed a study of the possibility of establishing an institute of oceanography in Texas. This would be the first such institute on the western Gulf of Mexico. In Minneapolis, Minne
Okay. The time is - The event will be at; and we're to maneuver to the following attitude; roll 101.0, pitch 090.0, yaw all zips. High gain angles will be pitch minus 23, yaw 93. And we're to use normal procedures to damp the rates. And after damping the rates and before spinup, we're to put the on the sextant with the magazine G, very high-speed black and white film. Then, we're to take three photos, one each at 5-, 20-, and 60-seconds' time exposure using audio - AUTO optics. Our values R1 plus 34717, R2 minus 08028, R3 plus 35075.
Roger. Il faudrait avo
14時53分21秒 GMT。GETは25時15分55秒。ジェミニVI、ヒューストン。聞
Ho
了解、ジャック。ヨー
Roger. Pour l'étoile numéro 40 que vous suivez actuellement, le plan de vol ne prévoit qu'une seule série de marques. Vous en avez demandé deux, et c'est à votre discrétion. Une seule est
لا أعتقد أن هذا كان القصد يا بيل. ما كان يدور في أذهانهم هو أن
罗杰。从 NOUN 33
حسنًا. سنقدم مقارنة بين الرقمين 8 و 13 فيما يتعلق ب
Roger. Wir haben einen Funkcheck 
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन। 
Verseau, tous vos modules seront opérationnels dans enviro
Questo è negativo. A questo punto, a questa combustione, non si raggiunge il 37%, quindi non credo che dovremo eseguire quel passaggio. Lo verificheremo per voi. Okay. Un altro: "Allo spegnimento motore, se avvio manuale, a 9 metri al secondo dalla fine, accelerare al 40%. A DELTA-V uguale a zero, premere il pulsante di arresto, premere"
フレッド、了解。待機してください。ACSで検査を受ける可能性について話し合っ
Un petit cratère d'im
هيا يا هي
Gemini 4, Canary CAP COM. LOS-
Roger. Darin enthalten sind 215 Pfund nutzbares Wasser. Das entspricht einem Durchschnitt
Roger. Voici le compte rendu du panneau: les fusibles du panneau de gauche sont tous dans la position indiquée précédemment. Le propulseur d'appoint est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé. Le sélecteur de mode est en mode normal (auto) et le gyroscope est en mode normal. Toutes les poignées en « T » sont enfoncées. Le délai de rétrogradation est normal et les deux éclairages de cabine sont allumés. Les filtres rouges sont activés. La fréquence basse du télémètre est activée. Les aides au sauvetage sont en mode automatique. Tous les éléments du panneau 
Мы начали предоставлять вам некоторые данны
11番、こちらヒュー
There wasn't very much debris in the command module or the. We found very few loose particles of bolts, nuts, and screws and l
Ok
好的，Vance。好的。我们刚刚更换了这里的OMNI传感器。我说，如果你能从我们这
좋습니다. 이것은 플러스 90 패드입니다. /G&N, 63825, -1.54, +1.32, -0491.7, +0000.1, +6634.0, 180, 228, 001; HA는 해당 없음; HP는 +0017.9; 6652.2, 37, 6626.5, 26, 155.4, 15.7. 보어사이트 별은 제타 궁수자리입니다. 위쪽, 08.0; 오른쪽, 2.1; -22.81, -025.00, 1140.7, 34087, 32:14. 설정 별은 
दोस्तों, आज का दिन वाकई बहुत बढ़िया था। म
这是否定的。在这个燃烧阶段，我们
لا ينبغي أن تكون صورة سيئة. لماذا لا
Apollo 11, qui Housto
네, 아쿠아리우스님. 다음 단계에 대해 논의 중입니다. 그동안 전력 소모가 큰 장비 몇 가지를 일시적으로 중단해 드리겠습니다. 11번 패널에서 DECA POWER와 DECA GI
ये अभी थोड़
Understand. We insert with
Apollo 11, Houston. Könnten Sie bitte einen Moment warten?
프렌드십 세븐, 우메라
ثم بدا وكأن كل حركة ظاهرة قد توقفت، وأننا على الأرجح نقترب. لذا أدرتُ المركبة الفضائية وحاولتُ محاذاة المنصة. في هذه الأثناء، بدأ الصاروخ المعزز بالهبوط أسفلنا بسرعة ملحوظة. فتوقفتُ عن محاولة محاذاة المنصة لأتمركز وأدفع نحو الصاروخ المعزز، وخفضتُ سرعة الدفع قليلاً لأبطئ معه. مرة أخرى، بدا وكأن سرعتنا قد توقفت. ولكن بحلول ذلك الوقت، كنا قد ابتعدنا إلى حوالي 1000 قدم. ثم تتبعنا الصاروخ المعزز فوق أفريقيا موجهين نحوه طوال الطريق. 
休斯顿。不过，我仍然对0.7的利率（其中包含0.2
Oh. Das ist – das ist richtig. Wenn er in der SEP-Position, di
Роджер, Нил. Это действительно отличная фотография. У нас есть ACA, ваш ACA, фотография дроссельной заслонки, кронштейн на 90 градусов. Мы видим ваши ручки, а теперь переходим к к
Okay. Nu
Yes, why don't we just 
ठीक है। और मैं आपको याद दिलाना चाहता हूं कि ऑप्टिक्स को शाफ्ट से 90 डिग्री क
마크, 1분. 기내 압력은 정상입니다. 연료와 산소는 24암페어로 안정적이며, 모든 전원이 양호합니다
Ap
Bene, sono tornato indietro e sono rimasto 
Okay. Understand. You want me to go a half a foot per second plus-
C'est exact. Ensuite, sur le panneau 250, ouvrez le di
좋아요. 이제 다시 돌아가서 가능하면 기상청 사진 몇 장 찍어 볼게요. 나머지 사진들은 가볍게 찍어 주세요. 저건
好的。向前推进 24 英尺/秒，需要 40 秒；向后推
انطلق - أو هيوستن، هذه أبولو 8. 3 مع 2. / 45810، ناقص 053، زائد 141، زائد 30128، ناقص 00540، زائد 01911 180 019 001، غير متوفر زائد 00188 30193 255 30008 40 2742 396 033، لأسفل 021، لليسار 18، زائد 0888، ناقص 16500 12955 36185؛ لا تغيير، لا تغيير درجة واحدة في ارتفاع الاشتعال ناقص ث
أعتقد أنني نظرت إلى الأرض من كل زاوية مم
그리고 우리는 번역된 것에 X를 더했습니다. 캡
Roger. Iniziando con NOME 33: 130 30 0000, più 00020, più tutti zeri, più tutti zeri. Rollio tutti zeri, beccheggio 230, imbardata zero. è NA. 
धीमी गति से घूमने पर यह अब काफी स्थिर प्रतीत 
了解しました。すべてコピーしました。順調に進んでいると思います。ASCSが現時点でどのような状況になっているかは分かりません
Je te comprends beaucoup mieux, Bill. Et toi, c
Buzz, forget 
알았어, 조, 한 76시간 정도 됐는데, 네가 오해한 것 같아. 내 질문은 내가 처음 건너와서 전력을 공급받기 시작했을 때의 상황이 어땠냐는 거야. 우리가 지금 거기에서 살고
Guten Abend. Hier spricht der Kommandant von Apollo 11. Vor hundert Jahren schrieb Jules Verne ein Buch über eine Reise zum Mond. Sein Raumschiff Columbia startete in Florida und landete nach dem Flug zum Mond im Pazifik. Es erscheint uns angebracht, Ihne
हमें यहाँ वाकई एक शानदार तस्वीर मिल
了解。私のG.m.t.と予備のG.m.t.はG.m.t.と同期して
제미니 4, 휴스턴 CAP COM
To reestablish. Go ahead
Хорошо. Мы сидим примерно в 60 сантиметр
阿波罗
わかりました…コマンドモジュールを入口に向けて正しく配置
मुझे चक्कर आ रहे हैं, गोल-
いいえ、まだですが、そうするつもり
로저. 혈압 측정 시작. 지금 풍선이 제 아래쪽에 안정적으로 위치해 있고, 흔들리지 않네요. 
好的，阿波罗8号。现在给出通信性能的具体数据还为时尚早。看起来它运行得和预期的一样好，其他方面似乎也在不断改进，所以通信性能可能也会更好。
了解しました。燃焼時間は予定通り
к терминатору, что, вероятно
هيوستن، إيجل. هل ستحتاج إلى تح
क्या
Хорошо. Этот маневр приблизит вас к пределам сканирования для антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления, поэтому во время выполнения маневра следите за индикаторами. Если загорится индикатор предела сканирования, у вас еще есть 15 градусов для маневра. Но
Bene, il tuo orologio sembra funzionare benissimo, penso che 
아폴로 11호, 아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 저희는 전광판 방송을 하고 있습니다. 저희 방송을 들으신다면
我现在要收起相机，去检查一下
Actuellement, nous volons à très basse altitude, si bien que je ne pense pas que les stations au sol puissent nous localiser. Nous avons entendu plusieurs communications intermi
最后一个在垃圾袋里。哦，我想——如果你想要一个……，你就得用氢氧化锂
Ricevuto, Tranquility. Que
네, 감
ठीक है, फ्रे
Zwillinge VI
Okay, Jack. Die Vorgehensweise ist in Ordnung, aber wir mussten noch etwas ändern. Die erste Zeile ist in Ordnung, streichen Sie „BAT 5 und 6 AUS“ durch und löschen Sie das.
Ключевой параметр ус
Okay. I ha
La fonction de rétroaction s'affiche, ce qui signifie que vous pouvez avancer d'une minute précise pour obtenir l'heure exacte. Vous pouvez le faire à tout momen
D'acc
Понял. Дай мне, пожалуйста, топливо
समर्थन 
음, 좋습니다. 오늘 아침에 M선과 얼마나 평행한지 확인해 보겠습니다. 처음 마킹을 시작하기 전에, 세 각도의 계산이 다소 정확하지 않은 것 같았고, 그 세 각도를 측정한 후 M선을 평행하게 맞추기 위해 큰 자세 변경을 해야 해서 연료 낭
ठीक है। जिम, मुझे यह यहीं मिल गया है, और यह आगे है। यह लिफ्ट-ऑफ पैड प्लस 60 है। अपडेट का कारण 119 घंटे पर MPL में खराब मौसम से बचाव है। यह वही है जो हमने आपको कल बताया था, और मौसम भी वैसा ही है, लेकिन हमें मिशन के अंत में किसी समस्या की उम्मीद नहीं है। समय 060:00, डेल्टा-VT 6079, देशांत
Come mai vuoi t
了解です。カメラの右側は逆行を向いています。現在、ヒュースト
Okay, Skipper. Wir hab
روجر. فهمت. المنطقة 7-3 احصل على RC،
Ok, è corretto, Jack. Andiamo a pagina 1-8. Nella seconda riga
Nég
अपोलो 8, अपोलो 8। जमीनी आंकड़ों से संकेत मिलता है कि प्राथमिक वाष्पीकरण यं
Roger. Nous sommes prêts à
Ora siamo in modalità attesa di Jim e ho notato che dalla mia finestra riesco a vedere Orione molto chiaramente, anche se il sole splende dall'altra fine
जब हमने जलना शुरू किया तो मेरे आईवीआई की रीडिंग 51 फीट/सेकंड थी, और हमने उन्हें तब तक जलाया जब तक उनकी रीडिंग 2 फीट/सेकंड नहीं
그런 것 같
تحمل البطا
Rog
Оставьте 
아, 방금 식사를 마치고 뒷정리를 좀 했어요. 짐은 지금 모든 급수 호
Gemini 4, 
罗杰。电压 39.2 伏；电流 1.4 
نعم، هذا صحيح - الطريقة التي كان يعمل بها 
روجر. ما حدث هو أن جهاز هيدروكسيد الليثيوم الخاص بنا علق في صمام تخفيف الضغط الخاص بالبدلة. وهو مغلق 
Tu l'as mis et tu 
Роджер. плюс 3
Roger. Ora, per manovrare a rollio 0, beccheggio 90 e imbardata in entrata - e beccheggio 
Apollo 8, Houston. Vous êtes actuellement dans la limite de balayage de l'antenne à gain élevé; même si la largeur de faisceau sélectionnée est étroite, vous êtes en mode large. Pour améliorer la situation, il faudrait incliner l'antenne vers le bas et la gauche v
हमने इग्निशन की पुष्ट
لقد استمعن
Roger. Ti ricevo molto meglio ora, Wally. Molto bene. Il carburante è al 62-62 [percento], l'ossigeno al 62-95 [percento], gli ampere sono 25. Tutti i sistemi funzionano ancora. Ho avuto qualche anomalia. Ho ingabbiato e sganciato il velivolo sul lato notturno e ora sembra funzionare abbastanza bene,
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。中間コース7で毎秒プラス2.8フィートの修正がある
OAMS Puissance - MANŒUVR
حسناً، إذا كنت تعتقد أن جيم سيستيقظ في غضون ساع
Роджер. А по
ठीक है। हमने खुद से लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड का कनस्तर बदल लिया है। जो, बस एक
Ora ruoterò gli angoli del 
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette, c
Housquin - Houston, Tranquility. Можете показать конфигурацию автоматического выключателя на рычаге двигателя? Конец связи. Я спрашиваю потому, что его конец, кажется, сломан. Думаю, мы сможем вставить его обратно. 
ジェミニ4、ヒューストン
Roger, 11. Ici Houston. Entre 71 et 72 heures environ, vous atterrirez pour une période de repos, probablement déjà en cours. 71 heures: purge de la pile à combustible O2; 72 heures: changement du filtre CO2 n° 6, vérification du débit du radiateur secondaire. Nous vous enverrons ensuite les données de vol après un passage de 2 heures, un passage de péricynthion et une interruption du mode retour. À 73 heures 00 minutes: arrêt à environ 0 degré de roulis. Autrement dit, lorsque vous approchez de 0 degré de roulis vers 73 heures, nous vous demandons de vous arrêter. Effectuez ensuite l'option 3 restante pour une vérification de dérive. 73 heures 20 minutes: nous vous communiquerons les informations relatives au site d'atterrissage, au vecteur d'état 1 et à la charge cible. 73 heures 30 minutes: manœuvrez pour ramener le roulis, le tangage et le lacet à 0°; les angles de l'antenne à gain élevé seront tangage 0° et lacet 335°; effectuez ensuite l'option 1 en utilisant le nouveau si
Roger. Read you well, lou
Okay. PAD: 102 33 04.36, 09 50, minus 00021 182 287 000, plus 56919. less than 10: 105 12 30.00. greater than 10: 103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00. No plus 12 abort:
Роджер. Мне нужны показания напряжения и тока от ваших адаптерных 
यदि हमारे पास एक इवेंट टाइमर होता तो प्रयोग 11:04 पर ट्रै
حسنًا. هذا ما نود أن يقوم به، كما ذكرت، بمجرد انتهائه من المسلسل الذي
Roger, nous avons bien reçu votre message et pris note de vos remarques concernant la possibilité pour notre site distant de communiquer avec vous. Une partie de nos di
Ce
이글, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 컬럼비아와의 음성 및 데이
ジェミニ 6 号
잭이 듣고 있다면, 안경 자체는 괜찮은데, 눈알이 창문에 묻은 얼룩 때
罗杰，马克，现在来测一下张力计读数。这
저 산소통은 아직 
알겠습니
여기는 프렌드
Roger. Je comprends votre message. Pourriez-vous me restituer votre rapport de gravure? Nous avons noté les résidus et la durée de la gravure, et c'est to
我确认一下时间，进入再入姿态时是1秒06分50秒。星星很容易看到，数量不少，但大量的红光让我有些困扰。现在，我要花
On vous a bien compris que le g
Ruhe bewahren, Houston. Nachdem Sie diese P57-Aufgabe erledigt haben, benötigen wir einen Speicher
この六分儀を通して見る景色は素晴らしいです。アラスカが真上まで見渡せます。そして今、十
シグマ・セブン。あなたのアタック、つまりモードはレトロだ
Роджер. 5 SPS/G&N: 37201, минус 060, плюс 047 086 09 3666, плюс 33521, плюс 03441, минус 0145 458, NA, 032. Остально
Roger. Jim, 
Esatto. Un'altra cosa che abbiamo fatto è stata quella di staccare gli interruttori del DISPLAY EPC e così via. Ma abbiamo lasciato accesi i vostri indicatori di ATTENZIONE e AVVERTENZA. Quindi, se ricevete messaggi di tipo - o ATTENZIONE e AVVERTENZA, dovrete accendere quegli indicatori con gli interruttori del DISPLAY. E stiamo monitorando per voi le vostre temperature, la vostra TEMP ASA, le temperature del propellente, tranne il propellente, e stiamo monito
Roger. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Fenster, Lageanzeiger und Periskop funktionieren einwandfrei. Ich sehe im Periskop hinter mir die dunkle Seite aufsteigen. Der Kabinendruck beträgt 5,5 und wird gehalten. Die Kabinentemperatur liegt bei 95 Grad. Die relative Luftfeuchtigkeit beträgt 28 Prozent. Ich habe die Kabinentemperaturregelung – die Wasserkühlung meines Anzugs – auf die erhöhte Stufe gestellt, um die Kühlun
ゴー、ハワイ
हाँ
로저, 카나리. 제미니. 저희는 다시 정규 비행 계획에 따라 진행하고 있지만, 현재 비행 계획에는 구체적인 시간 정보가 부족합니다. 휴스턴에 저희가 실험을 시작하는 데 도움이 되도록 비행 계획을 구체적인 시간 정보로 업데이트해 달라고 전달해 주시겠습니까? 휴스턴도 저희와 동일한 비행 계획을 가지고 있습니다. 비행 계획을 최신 정보로 업데이트하고 시간을 조정하고 
Как же грустно, что осталось чуть меньше получаса, чтобы поиграть с этим. Сейчас я перейду на низкое управление по проводам. Гироскутеры свободны, чтобы опустить нос и понаблюдать за маяком в Дурбане. Гироскутеры свободны, низкое управление по проводам, поправка, на этом этапе я перейду на ручное пропорциональное управление. Я еще не брал никаких сборов, поэтому вернусь к исходному режиму. Чис
Поймите, вы всё 
Управление космическими ап
罗杰，你感
继续——或者休斯顿，这是阿波罗8号。3，2./45810，减053，加141，加30128，减00540，加01911 180 
Okay. We'll give that a try
もう一つ、誰かに見てもらってもいいもの - 上の階の人たちに迷惑をかけたくないのですが - 司令船にある排水ホースを に接続できるかどうか調べられるでしょうか。接続できれば、少なくとも後
这是对北斗七星进入薄雾层之前的观测结果。它在大约2.5度时消失。十字线在5.5度时消失。TM标记表示薄雾层中间的时间。角宿
우리가 실수로 마이크 버튼을 누르지 않는 한 그
روجر، 1
B3 et C4 sont tous deux désactivés sur le panneau 8 et je compre
هذا هو كوكب الصداقة السابع. لا يزال لدي ضوء ساطع للغاية على طول 
Apollo 8, Houston. Potete tornare al BLOCCO. Abbiamo caricato l'aggior
Jim, nous démontrons que 
알겠습니다. 잭, 이건 그냥 정리 항목들이에요. 2~3페이지에 CM/SEP 등을 어떻게 분리하는지 나와 있는데, 5단계에서 43분 아래에 있다면 그 부분은 전부 삭제되는 거죠. 그리고 그 부분은 2~4페이지의 "15분"이라고 적힌 줄까지 쭉 삭제됩니다. 그 시점부터 다시 시작하면 되고요. 15
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Zanzibar Cap Com. Bitte kommen
Aurora Seven, Auro
रॉजर, समझो - रवैया नियंत्रण नहीं है। क्या
Platform blunt-end-forward. Attitude Control, PULSE, null FDI's (Ha! Ha!) and al
और जैक, मेरे जैसे नौसिखिए के लिए एक अच्छी बात यह है कि यहाँ घूमना-फिरना बहुत आसान है। जैसा कि आप कमांड मॉड्यूल सिम्युलेटर में काम करने से जानते हैं, शून्य गुरुत्वाकर्षण का होना वाकई बहुत फायदेमंद होता है। क्योंकि एक गुरुत्वाकर्षण में वहाँ घूमना-फिरना काफी मुश्किल हो जाता है, लेकिन इस वातावरण में यह बहुत आसान है। जैसा कि आप देख सकते हैं, यह काफी साफ-सुथरा दिख रहा था, मुझे इसमें कुछ ढीले वॉशर मिले और सीक्वेंस कैमरे का एक छोटा सा प्लास्टिक का ढक्कन ढीला हो गया था जो मुझे ईडी पैनल के पास फंसा हुआ मिला। ठीक है। जिम के ठीक नीचे, वह वास्तव में एक डिब्बे जैसी चीज़ पर खड़ा है। और पीछे मौजूद सभी लोगों की जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, इस डिब्बे के अंदर एसेंट इंजन है, जहाँ आप शायद अभी मेरा हाथ देख सकते हैं - वह इंजन जिसका उपयोग हम चंद्रमा से उड़ान भरने के लिए करते हैं। इंजन कवर के ठीक बगल में, मेरा हाथ अब एक सफेद बॉक्स पर है, जिसे पहले भी दिखाया जा चुका है। यह जिम का बैकपैक है, जो चंद्रमा की सतह पर ऑक्सीजन और ठंडक के लिए पानी की आपूर्ति करेगा। हम इस उपकरण का उपयोग लगभग 4 घंटे और संभवतः 5 घंटे तक करने की योजना बना रहे हैं। इसके ठीक पीछे, मेरे हाथ में पकड़े हुए कुछ छोटे चौकोर पैकेट हैं, एक यहाँ और एक ठीक नीचे। ये हमारे आपा
Okay, Jim. Um Sprit zu sparen, wäre es uns lieber, wenn du die Trimmung auf MIN IMPULSE einstellst. Es 
Roger, Columbia. Bien reçu. Parfait. Pourriez-vous nous fournir un r
मुझे आपकी आवाज़
Columbia, Houston. Ci vediamo alle 10:28 per voi alle 10
了
알겠습니
Okay. Ich lese es nochmal durch. Anzugkompressor 1 und 2, AUS; Br
Gemini 4,
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호입니다. 어떻게 읽으시나
روجر. إنها T13، 12
로저, 11, 5대5로 진
ठीक है, हमारे पास अच्छा T/M है। एक मिनट रुकिए। मैं फ्लाइट से बात करना च
Nun, Houston, wir hatten nicht viel Zeit, Ihnen von unserer Sicht aus dem Fenster zu berich
أسمعك جيداً
Ed è proprio lì che ne hai uno. Si muoveva davvero forte lì quando a
RKV、データポイントを入手しました。準
ठीक है। तारा 2 ट्रूनियन कोण, पहला 05245
تم حسابها خارج المستوى 
Вначале работа с системой не позволила нам немедленно начать наблюдения, как мы планировали, поскольку нам предстоял очередной маневр уклонения. Сброс системы вызвал огромное количество псевдозвезд в этой области, что сделало калибровку оптики практически невозможной. Разработанный нами метод, похоже, работал не очень хорошо. В итоге я использовал метод, заключавшийся в том, чтобы спуститься в систему, добраться до Сириуса, нашей самой яркой звезды, взять вал и цапфу, а за
예
Okay. Roll 180, pitch 228, yaw 001; N/A; plus 0017.9, 6652.2, 7:37, 6626.5 and I missed sextant shaft; - trunnion - trunnion, 15.7, Zeta Sagittarius
Bitte teilen Sie uns mit, ob Sie HF mit
では、白黒、カラー、250、それとも80
D'accord. Je ne veu
ठीक है। अब हम लगभग 2 मिनट के लिए अपलिंक को अपवॉइस बैकअप पर स्विच करेंगे, और अपवॉइस लॉस की आवाज़ आने पर कुछ सेकंड का समय लग सकता है। इसलिए आप अपने अप-टेलीमेट्री स्विच को अपवॉइस बैकअप पर सेट कर सकते हैं। अगर
रॉजर। अभी-अभी आप हमारे पास पहुंचे हैं। डीकंप्रेशन की आपकी स्थिति क्य
ठीक है। आपके पास के दौरान हम यूएचएफ जांच करना चाहेंगे। मैं आपसे विशेष अनुरोध करता हूं - कम से कम ईंधन का उपयोग करें, बिल्कुल कम से कम। अपने यूएचएफ एंटीना सेलेक्ट 
31 minutes. Now we are se
ヒューストンのアソシエイテッド社ハリー・ローゼンタールによる特集記事です。2歳のジェフリー・ラベルくんのクリスマスイブを、2人のサンタが明るく彩ります。1人目は玄関をノックしてプレゼントを持ってきました。2人目は月からお父さんを家まで送り届けました。1人目は赤い服と白いひげを生やし、「ホー、ホー」と叫び、その声は街の向こうまで聞こえました。2人目は月の裏で巨大なエンジンが炎を吐き出し、何千人もの人々がエンジン始動の知らせを待ちわびていました。「サンタクロースがいます」。エンジンがクリティカル噴射を完了してから15分後、無線沈黙から目覚めたアポロ8号から最初に届いた言葉は、不安な世界に告げるものでした。「これ以上のクリスマスプレゼントは期待していません」とミッションコントロールのケン・マッティングリーは語りました。「地上の皆様に感謝します。皆さんがいなければ、私たちは成し遂げられませんでした」と、宇宙船の船長フランク・ボーマン大佐は返事をしました。ちょうどその時、ミッションコントロールのコンソールの前にクリスマスツリーが灯り、ハリソン・シュミット宇宙飛行士が乗組員たちに「聖ニコラスの訪問」の宇宙版を読み上げました。「クリスマス前夜、はるか宇宙の彼方で、アポロ8号の乗組員が月面レースに勝利したばかりでした」と始まります。ミッションコントロールの乗組員は、ジェフリーの父親である海軍大佐ジェームズ・
حسنًا. ما هو
Negativo. Okay. Vorrei rivedere con te questa misurazione della pressione sanguigna. Non indosserai l'adattatore finché non sarai in acqua. Ed ce 
Ri
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호
さあ、ヒュ
Apollo 11, Houston. 30 secondi alla LOS. Entrambe le navicelle sembrano in buone condizioni mentre sorvolano la colli
Ça devrait l'être. Impossi
Роджер. Майк, когда ты некоторое время назад экспериментировал с этим, и мы снова уменьшили мертвую зону, предполагалось, что мертвая зона центрирована вокруг нового положения, в котором мы находились в тот момент. С тех пор мы отклонились на пару градусов как по тангажу, так и по рысканию от этого положения, так что если бы мы выполнили процедуру, как мы тебе объяснили, — включили бы команду ускорения (ACCEL COMMAND), все переключатели автоматич
收到
你好，宁静基地，休斯顿。你们说的休斯顿时间八点是指打开舱门还是开始准备工
Okay. Ich wollte nur mal frag
罗杰。横跨这片区域的一系列裂缝或断层向南呈阶梯状下降，大约有三级。北面的平行断层则在中心处向下倾斜。我希望地球上的各位都能明白我们所说的“令人不安的地平线，一个非常黑暗、令人倒胃口的地方”
好的。不如你给我们提供REACQ角度，我
- -... riduce l'acceleratore. Meglio d
11, ह्यूस्टन। वर्तमान पूर्वानुमान के अनुसार, आपके राहत क्षेत्र में मौसम अनुकूल है: 2000 फुट की ऊंचाई पर छिटपुट बादल, 70 डिग्री से 13 समुद्री मील की हवा, 10 मील की दृश्यता और समुद्र की लहरें लगभग 4 फुट ऊंची हैं। कल के पूर्वानुमान में हवाई के पूर्व में लगभग 500 से 1000 मील की दूरी पर स्थित उष्णकटिबंधीय तूफान क्लाउडिया को दिखाया गया था। कल दोपहर पृथ्वी के उपग्रहों द्वारा ली गई तस्वीरों में क्लाउडिया को कमजोर होते हुए दिखाया गया है, इसलिए अब इसका प्रभाव पहले से भी कम प्रतीत होता है। आपका राहत क्षेत्र अब अंतर-उष्णकटिबंधीय अभिसरण क्षेत्र के ठीक उत्तर में माना जा रहा है, जिसे आप शायद अपनी खिड़कियों से बाहर देखते समय देख सकते हैं। कल पश्चिम में स्थित एक और उष्णकटिबंधीय तूफान वियोला की भी सूचना मिली थी। यह वर्तमान में फिलीपींस के पूर्व में लगभग एक हजार मील की दूरी पर स्थित है और उत्तर-पश्चिम की ओर बढ़ रहा है। उष्णकटिबंधीय तूफान वियोला तीव्र हो रहा है और अगले 12 घंटों के भीतर इसे टाइफून श्रेणी में शामिल कर लिया जाएगा; हालांकि, यह आपके पश्चिम में काफी दूर होगा। दरअसल, सूर्योदय का अंतिम बिंदु अभी तक वियोला तक नहीं पहुंचा है। कुछ घंटों बाद जब यह वहां पहुंचेगा, तो आप शायद 
Да. Думаю, мы уже как
प्रतीक्षा करें। ASCENT ECA ब्रेकर पर नकारात्मक प्रतिक्रि
アポロ13号、ヒュース
罗杰
Roger. Das sollte der zweite Schritt in diesem Verfahren sein. Um 22:40 Uhr, oder sobald Sie soweit sind, möchten wir mit dem Laden von Batterie A beginnen. Und um 24:10 Uhr haben wir die aktualisierten Ein
Bene. La prima domanda extra è, e lasciatemi rispondere alla domanda originale, perché questa domanda dice: "Più specificamente sul punto 2", e il punto 2 dice: "Ci sono stati cambiamenti significativi nel livello di vibrazione del rumore durante il singolo stadio del volo a motore?". Nello specifico, descrivi le tue osservazioni durante lo spegnimento iniziale del motore centrale dell'S-II e, circa 90 secondi prima del cut-off, hai segnalato una forte vibrazione nel. Vorremmo che descrivessi l'ac
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे पास आपके लिए माल है। क्या हम 
Роджер, Джон. Только что вышли из режима пониженного энергопотребления, когда инвертор был выключен. Он хорошо поднялся и теперь будет включен до ко
يوجد جدول مائي مثير للاهتمام مباشرة أمام المركبة الفضائية ا
Houston, Apollo 13
Ok. Lasciatemi partire dall'inizio. Potrebbe esserci qualche sovrapposizione, ma per essere sicuri
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। हम यही करने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। मैं ऑप्टिक्स के लिए 15 प्राप्त करने का प्रयास कर रहा हूँ। पृथ्वी की तेज़ रोशनी के कारण ऐसा तारा ढूँढना बहुत मुश्किल हो रहा है जिसे हम सेक्स्टेंट में देख सकें। मैं ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग करके तारे को देखने का प्रयास कर रहा हूँ। अब हमारे पास वह है; हम अंतरिक्ष यान को इस तरह से संचालित करने का प्रयास कर
C'est affirmé, et en d
रॉजर। आपके एडाप्टर बैटरी के रीडिंग आ रहे हैं। वोल्टेज के हि
My control mode is now manual; gyros are caged,
ठीक है, हम कहाँ हैं? हम नीचे की ओर जा रहे हैं। क
Bene. Questo è il pad più 90. /G&N, 63825, meno 1,54, più 1,32, meno 0491,7, più 0000,1, più 6634,0, 180, 228, 001; HA è N/D; HP è più 0017,9; 6652,2, 37, 6626,5, 26, 155,4, 15,7. La stella di puntamento è Zeta Sagittarii; in alto, 08,0; a destra, 2,1; meno 22,81, meno 025,00, 1140,7, 34087, 32:14. Stelle impostate: Arturo, Denebola; rollio 044; beccheggio 012, imbardata 025; nessun ullage
ठीक है। ऊपर वाले कमरे म
روجر. لقد حان
沃特敦指挥中心
Мы еще не пробов
いいえ、見えませんでした。誤解されているかもしれません。建物は全く見えませんでした。オーストラリアの人たちには、電気代がかさんでいると伝えてあげてください。この最後の通過では、シドニーの明かりがはっきりと見え
Хорошо. Прежде чем вы начнете копировать, позвольте мне прочитать вам все это целиком, чтобы вы поняли, о чем мы говорим. Название эт
We'll have to give them pic
Gemini 4, CSQ. Ich bin in der Goddard-Schleife hängengeblieben. Sie sagen, Sie hätten keine Zeitangabe für das Schließen der Luke erhalten. Haben Sie eine 
Apollo 11, Houston. Bien reçu. J'ai vos informations sur les consommables, si vous ê
そこにブレーカーが 2 つあります。
没错，杰克，这样就完成了入场检查清
Im schlimmsten Fall ja. Die Y-fö
D'accord. Les deux que nous voulons fermer sont le SÉQUENCE
了解。全ての機器は収納済みです。セカンダリ
And would you keep a special eye on the purge tank and cryo O2 tank 1 for us since our flowmeter is pegged out, we got no warning on O2 high fl
مرحباً جيم. الأمور تسير على ما يرام. كيف حالك هناك؟ هل نمت جيداً الل
ठीक है। घूर्णी शक्ति सामान्
प्लस 35, / 63023, माइनस 162, प्लस 129, प्लस 00068, प्लस 00000, प्लस 46420 178 
是的。我们
罗杰。请注
Ok, vorrei mostrartelo mentre parlo. Funziona come una macchina fotografica. Ha il 
Roger. Una correzione. Pensiamo che il modo più economico per cambiare assetto sia con l'ACA
Роджер. Мы здесь, внизу, готовимся 
Верно. CB G&N, POWER, AC1 
D'accord. C'est bien lui. Il s'agit de Jim Lovell. Aujourd'hui, nous souhaitions vous faire découvrir un peu la vie à bord d'Apollo 8. Après vous avoir montré des images de la Lune et de la Terre, nous voulions vous inviter dans notre vaisseau. Nous y vivons depuis au moins quatre jours, comme vous pouvez le voir sur le tableau de bord. Nous y marquons chaque jour. Nous en sommes au quatrième jour et nous entamons le cinquième. Bien sûr, nous attendons tous avec impatience l'alunissage de vendredi. Ici, dans la partie du vaisseau que nous appelons la soute inférieure, le conseiller du Président pour la condition physique, le capitaine Jim Lovell, s'apprête à commencer son programme d'exercices quotidien. Vous remarquerez qu'il se déplace avec une grande aisance. Il vient de se cogner la tête contre les optiques utilisées pour la navigation. Il utilise un appareil de musculation conçu pour maintenir ses muscles en forme. Une autre fonction essentielle de notre vaisseau spatial est 
Wir müssen unsere Rendezvous-Radar-Schutzschalter auf jeden Fall aktivieren, um Ihre Verbindun
روجر. ما زلتُ أستلم الرسالة. تفضل. أبولو 11، هذه هيوستن. لقد استلمتُ رسالتك بخصوص البكرة 277، تفضل من البكرة 277.
Roger; w
А вот ещё одна новость, и она была, — ещё один исследователь: Тор Хейердал был вынужден отказаться от своей попытки пересечь Атлантику на лодке из папируса. Повреждённая штормом лодка была брошена примерно в 650 милях от Бермудских островов. Скорость судна снизилась до 25 миль в день, и Хейердал сказал, что целью путешествия не было испытание на в
Roger, ça me rassure. On 
好
Отлично! Буду рад это увидеть. Мы покажем вам GO здесь, на земле, и я получу обновле
Sì
Okay, Vance. Te lo posso dare. L'ho letto subito dopo averlo acceso. La tensione della BAT A era 3
سماء زرقاء صافية؛ 32 ثانية؛ 9000 قدم، الوقود والأكسجين مستقران؛ ضغط المقصورة 15.1 رطل/بوصة مربعة؛ ويتناقص. اهتزاز طفيف 
알겠습니다. 패널 3: AC 인버터 1에서 메인
我买了一条三角裤
रॉजर। मैं बिल्कुल स
Yeah, not bad, is it? See, the O2 pressure is coming down now. Okay, the mains coming on the line, in case
了解しました
Houston, Apollo 11. How about coming up with some roll, pitch, and yaw angles in which to sto
Roger. On est prêts
मैं इससे छह फीट दूर खड़ा हूँ, चार
हाँ, बिल्कुल। अच्छा रहा। अब तक मैं काफी व्यस्त रही हूँ। मुझे दोप
Gemini VI, H
Je vais appuyer sur le bouton. Comme il ne reste que huit dixièmes, je ne veux pas que 
रॉजर, ल
2C는 6 1/2인치와 24인치입니다. 그
Ok. Sto usando il fly-by-wire basso per raggiungere l'assetto di
ठीक है, जिम, तुम थोड़े परेशान लग रहे थे, लेकिन मुझे लगता है अब सब ठीक हो रह
बज़, ये ह्यूस्टन से है। संचार व्यवस्था बहुत अच्छी है। आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है, और माइक ने सबको बता दिया है कि वो आपकी बात स
ピッチとヨー、つまりピッチとロールの両方が指定値に向かって進んでいます。ピッチ
روجر. أنا على وشك الدخول. لستُ 
Nous avons une pellicule 16 mm couleur 1000 ISO pour intérieur. Nous pensions la filmer lors de l'entrée, par la fenêtre numéro 4, sur un support. Vous devriez recevoir le guide de la caméra d'ici quelques jours et nous do
And that o
대기하세요. 좋습니다. 배트 C 37, 파이로 배트 A 37, 배트 B 37, A 51, B 63, C 62, D
Они имели в виду, что по возм
VIA, VIA. Bello spe
11, this is Houston. I'm ready wit
रॉजर, कैनरी कैप कॉम। आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है; एचएफ। म
そろそろ涼しくなってきているは
हाँ। 
Близнецы 4, у нас ос
ठीक है। अब... यह... यह ईडीए के लिए स्टेशनकीपिंग
Watertown, qui Sigma Seven. Sono in HF - correzione, sono in UHF - ciao. Vi ricevo in HF forte e chi
Je vous entends très faiblement, il y a une indication de transmission de lumière et de son sur le panneau. De toute évidence, il s'agit d'un enregistrement 
Роджер. Некоторые из предыдущих комментариев Джима о яркости края диска Солнца перед восходом вызвали здесь большой интерес. И мы хотели бы спросить его, если у него будет во
ランニングライトはもう付いています
أفهم أن أحد أسبابكم لدخول المركبة ببدلة هو أن فتحة وحدة القيادة... لم تكن جيدة. لا يبدو أنها مختلفة، ولكن من ناحية أخرى... فتحتنا ليست أفضل 
Тот сам
さて、これは私にとって1日目のB食です。あなたのも入っていると思いま
Yes, that's all. That's the only one that's got a scanner converter. We'
Roger. Volevo solo ricordarti che non abbiamo notato sul TM il dopo-ustione. E per tua informazione, abbiamo riprodotto la registrazione televisiva ieri sera, credo, dopo che vi siete 
ठीक है, हम डाउन वॉइस बैकअप पर जाएंगे और पावर एम्प्लीफायर सर्किट ब्रेकर को बंद कर देंगे, और अगर कोई समस्या
Запись следующая: середина Тихого океана, 357 152 359 268, плюс 08:13, минус 165 03 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028, NA 4 раза, с TO 400 0207 0025 0333 08:16 16 0590 312, Zeta Persei, вверх 165, вправо 34, вверх. И примечания: используйте шаблон без выхода. А Zeta Persei находится между Мирфаком и Альдебараном, и Фрэнк все равно никогда не сможет ее 
Roger. P76: 84 est moins 00758, toutes les balles, plus 00098, à 101 36 1400; plus 01223, moins toutes les balles, plus 01889, 102 44 2700; temps de combustion 4
روجر. سنبدأ بأخبار العالم. شهدت ليلة عيد الميلاد إشادة واسعة برواد فضاء أبولو 8 الأمريكيين، وتعبيرًا عن الآمال في تعاون دولي في استكشاف الفضاء، وذلك مع بث رسائل التهنئة العالمية بينما كانت المركبة الفضائية الصغيرة تدور حول القمر. حتى في العالم الشيوعي، كان هناك حماس كبير لأول رحلة بشرية إلى القمر. في موسكو، استذكر العالم السوفيتي أناتولي بيسارانوف كيف تبادلت بلاده والولا
我说，这些事情开
Okay, Jack. Ho un'altra domanda a pagina 18. Al minuto 1, sono 
حسناً. إنه يضع الخوذات في صناديق الطعام. لحظة من فضلك، سأطلب منه أن يفعل ذلك
Roger. Quand est-ce qu'on aura les manœuvres ici? Je vais sur la piste 23, je les enregis
ヒューストン、コロンビアは高ゲインで再捕捉するために、テレメトリ コマンドを UP、RES
ठीक है - अब आगे बढ़ते हैं - ठीक है,... 32.9; बर्न टाइम, 40 सेकंड आगे 1.5; 04 सेकंड ऊपर और न
Okay, Jack. Starting at the top. Okay. The CRYO TANKS; H2 1 is reading 230 and the same for 2. Our O2 CRYO TANK 1 is - looks like it's barely holding its own at 300. And, CRYO TANK 2 is H2 1 is reading 73, 2, 74. On the O2 side, we're reading O2 1 at quantity, 76; O2 pegged to full scale high. RAD TEMPs PRIMARY INLET, we're reading about 55; RAD OUT is reading about 30, and the SECONDARY OUTLET is reading - reading 52 degrees. And the EVAP OUT TEMP is 45, STEAM PRESSURE 0.17, and GLYCOL DISCHARGE 48. SUIT COMPRESSOR is reading zip. The ACCUM is reading 30; H2O WASTE is reading about 34; POTABLE's reading about 98; SECONDARY RAD INLET is reading about 71; and the RAD OUT is about 30; GLYCOL EVAP TEMP is reading 65, STEAM PRESSURE pegged full scale hi
Roger. Sie erhalten während des RKV-Durchgangs auch Sprachnachrichten zu 
Sigma Seven, this is Hawaii, th
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Отлично! На задне
Roger
わかりました、ジョー。最後に確認したのは、フレッドが約5時間後にガス放出を見た時です。もしかしたらもっ
素晴らしいですね。さらに南の内陸部に行くと、もっと光が見えます。その辺
D'accord. Nous allons couper le disjoncteur de fonctionnement, vous ne pourrez donc pas voir notre orientation. Par conséquent, vous ne nous in
Ok, Jerry. Abbiamo finito con il PROGRAMMA 23. Ora andremo qui pe
Okay. Bene, per questo programma televisivo che andrà in onda tra un paio d'ore, potresti pensare a come vorresti che ci fermassim
حسناً. لدينا ذلك. في 
Ладно, я прекращаю этот замер давления. Вот это да! Слежение стало очень удобным. Стейнер очень стабилен. Он вообще не колеблется. Я не вижу никаких 
Wir haben die Trägerrak
Jim, nur zur Erinnerung: Jegliches Abwasser, das jetzt eingeleitet wird, würde die Vorbereitung erheblich stören. Wir bitten Sie daher, es erst da
잠시만 기다려
Gemini VI, siamo interessati ai Delta-V sull'avvio della fase terminale e sulla frenata, e anche diversi milioni di persone sono interessate a una descrizione più dettagliata della frenata e del mantenimento della posiz
Houston CAP COM. Géme
रॉजर। ब्लड प्रेशर शुरू करो, नॉब। मेरी स्थिति ठीक है। कैप्सूल की स्थिति ठीक है। फरल 99-98 प्रतिशत है। ऑक्सीजन 89-100 प्रतिशत है। केबिन ठीक है। डीसी पावर ठीक है। एसी पावर भी ठीक है, 22 एम्प्स। सब कुछ ग्रीन है और आपको ब्लड प्रेशर
알겠습니다. 출력을 높이고 전면전 태세로 전환하기보다는 지금처럼 계속하는 게 낫겠습니다. 하와이 상공에서 그 비를 맞혔을 때 저는 출력을 높이고 전면전 태세로 전환했었죠. 지금은 자유 드리프트 모드를 유지하
Roger. Ich habe im AUTO-Modus angedockt, und wie gesagt, ich war mir des genauen Kontaktzeitpunkts nicht sicher. Ich habe die Anzeigen der Andocksonde ständig überprüft. Zwei „Barber Poles“-Symbole zeigten an, dass die drei Verriegelungen – nicht die Verriegelungen, sondern die drei Ver
يا أصدقاء سبعة
로저, 짐. 고맙습니다. 그런데 아직도 잘 이해가
11, Хьюстон. Мы сейчас на OMNI Delta. Думаю, мы вас лучше понимаем. Вы получили все три пункта из обновления вашего пл
Je vous entends bien. Que
حسنًا. العنوان هو: "إزالة الطاقة من الحب
Okay, Jack. The switches all remain in their present position, which is center, but we - Because we have no power on the bus, the bottom row of talkbacks will be spring loaded to the barber pole position and that's 
On aimerait bien pouvoir vous apporter une bonne tasse 
Nachdem wir die Körperachse ausgerichtet haben, können wir Ihnen die Fluglage der Kugel mitteilen, um die Optik auf den Mond oder einen Stern auszurichten. Anschließend können wir Ihnen, da wir die Ausrichtung der Optik kennen, die entsprechenden CDU-Winkel zur Verfügung stellen, um die Plattform zu verdr
حسنًا. في الجانب الأيسر من الصفحة 28، في الأسفل تمامًا، اشطب عبارة "الهدف 5 شمالًا، 5.6، 215، ما لا نهاية"، وما إلى ذلك. انقل كل ذلك الخط إلى الشريط العمود
حسنًا. يبدو أننا ما زلنا على بعد حوالي 80 قدمًا. ولدينا: الضوء الأحمر الرئيسي مُطفأ، والضوء الأخضر الرئيسي مُشغل، وجهاز التسليح مُطفأ، والضوء الثانوي العالي مُشغل، والض
Roger. 1, G&N: 38658, -054, +065, TIG 078 02 0345, +29180, +03779, -01325; roulis NA, tangage 041. Le reste du PAD est NA. Pulvérisation de deux réacteurs, 19 secondes. 4 PAD, G&N: 38658, -054, +065, TIG 084 29 5059, +31373, +03760, -00968; roulis NA, tangage 034. Le reste du PAD est NA. Pulvérisation de deux réacteurs, 19 secondes. Ces deux PAD sont pour une manœuvre au décollage. Le 4 PAD
حسنًا. لقد انتهينا من تغيير علبة هيدروكسيد الليثيوم بأنفسنا. جو، الشيء الوحيد المختلف هو أن القوس الموجود على قطعة الكرتون هذه ليس كبيرًا بما يكفي لوضع الخرطوم الأحمر مع توجيه المدخل للأسفل، والمدخل - المدخل ال
Das ist richtig, Jack. Das sind die einzigen Änderungen an Schalter 1-3. Jetzt zu Schalter 1-4. An den verbleibenden drei Schaltern auf Be
الجوزاء
D'
吉姆，休斯顿。我们一定会把那
Okay. I'll come in and take a look at yo
أحتاج إلى هذا الفيلم ا
알겠습니다. 세 번째 줄, COMM 아래에 DISPLAY, 열림; SE AUDIO, 닫힘; VHF A TRANSMITTER, 열림 - 이건 변경되었네요. VHF B RECEIVER, 열림; PRIMARY S-BAND, POWER AMPLIFIER, 열림; TRANSMITTER/RECEIVER, 닫힘; S-BAND ANTENNA, 열림; PMP, 닫힘; TV, 열림. DISPLAYS 아래에는 GLYCOL PUMP SECONDARY, 열림; LOC PUMP, 열림; CABIN FAN CONTROL, 열림; CA
.
ठीक है। यही आखिरी चीज़ थी जो मुझसे छूट गई थी। और जब तक हम यहाँ निर्णय लेने का इंतज़ार कर रहे हैं, मैं आगे बताता हूँ। स्वीकार्य डेडबैंड 660 और 770 psi के बीच है। दूसरे शब्दों में, कोई भी राइज़ टाइम जो आपको इन द
Близнецы 4, Канарски
حسنًا... هذه مشكلة كبيرة أخرى.
Apollo 8, 
D'accord. Il y a une note ici qui indique d'utiliser la queue d'aronde située sur le dessus de la caméra, et non celle sur le côté. Utilisez la queue d'aronde du dessus de la caméra pour la fixer au support et placez l'écrou de blocage d
Apollo 8, Houston
أبولو 8، كنا نحصل على نفس الصورة التي عرضتها لنا باستخدام عدستك العادية، ولكننا لم نحصل على أي شيء باستخدام العدسة المقربة. نعمل على حل هذه المشكلة الآن. يبدو أن إحدى المشكلات تكمن في أن هذه العدسة مصممة للإضاءة المن
Roger, wir haben die Pulssteuerung nur minimal eingesetzt; Ziel Nummer 12 war durch Wolken verdeckt; Zeit und Position waren ziemlich genau bestimmt. Ich hätte das Ziel verfolgen können, wenn ich es gesehen hätte, glaube ich. Ziel Nummer 13 war klar zu erkennen, und ich konnte die S
알겠습니다. 저희는 한 시간 전에 그 작업을 하는 것에 대해 이야기하고 있는데요, 사전 점검에서 저희가 전원
Le capot d'assiette à l'atterrissage est ouvert. J
Хорошо. Подождите... подождите, давайте посмотр
روجر. يمكنك 
Roger. I'll get out the flight pla
Хорошо, 36-DELTA 84 вперед, 43 назад, 2+19. 0+
...белые штаны. Там на
रॉजर। वे तरल ऑक्सीजन टैंक से गैर-प्रणोदन वेंटिलेशन जारी रख रहे हैं। तो यह त्रिज्या के विपरीत दिशा में होगा। और बूस्टर मुझे बता रहे हैं कि यह निरंतर वें
分かりました。4つのヒーターは閉じます。ディスプレイは開きます。Sバンドアンテナは閉じます。カメラシーケンスは開きます
好的。我们准备
Раньше считалось, что на уровне LOI 2 невозможно контролировать ситуацию; что любой жест, любое поведение было безопаснее обычного, но сейчас
Negative, Gemini 4. And be advised on the D-9 of the Apollo
Говори
Und einer der Vorteile, Jack, besonders für einen Neuling wie mich, ist die Bewegungsfreiheit hier. Wie du ja vom Kommandomodul-Simulator weißt, ist die Schwerelosigkeit ein echter Segen. Denn bei 1 g ist die Bewegungsfreiheit ziemlich einges
Apollo 8, Houston. Tra un paio di minuti camb
ح
Houston, Acqua
Bon, j'ai 70 degrés. Je ne sais pas trop comment faire baisser la température, la vanne d'eau de ma combinaison est réglée au-delà du repère. Ça ne semble pas fonctionner, et même en la mettant en négatif, ça ne change rien. C'est faux. La cabine était déjà au-delà du rep
Roger, F
わか
Roger. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 - 5, 4, 3, 
Houston, qui Gemini VI. Suggerisco... di st
स्कॉट, मुझे लगता है कि हम कम से कम एक और परिक्रमा के लिए बहुत अच्छी स्थिति में हैं, और हम देखेंगे
是的，我们买不
How about reaching over there on your right-hand si
Roger
로저. 여기
是的，我想是这样。这有点像是直接传递ORB速率，因为，你
Roger, H
友谊七号，
罗杰。您的 GET 燃烧 02 18 25；Delta-V，50.6；Delt
Okay. Will do. And 
Aspetta, Vance, non capisco. Vogliamo cancellare tut
Apollo 8, wir werden jetzt mit einem Kommunikationstest begin
水瓶座，如果你能让杰克放松下来，我有一些步骤要他写
Sì, ho la netta impressione che la parte superiore della mia finestra sia mol
Ro
Здесь все соответствует действительнос
飞船看起来真的像是在释放气体，因为每当有一小
क्या अ
D'accord. C'est exact. Retournez ensuite à 275, CB MAIN B BAT BUS B pour ouvrir. Hé, Jack, c'est l'étape que j'ai omise, je le crains. Avant de vérifier la tension du bus principal, vous devez, s
罗杰，比尔。你知道辅助锅炉——实际上，两种维修程
コロンビア、ヒューストン。101番28時に出発します。102番15時に出発します。以
Fred, ich empfehle dir, sobald dein Fenster wieder zur Erde zeigt, ein weiteres Foto zu machen und gleichzeitig von vorne zu beginnen. Wir haben dir möglicher
Actuellement, nous volons à très basse altitude, si bien que je ne pense pas que les stations au sol puissent nous localiser. Nous avons entendu plusieurs communications intermittentes. Nous allons toutefois maintenir cette position un moment afin de garder le lanceur en vue. Il ne semble pas que nous progressions beaucoup vers lui pour le moment. Il semble rester à peu près à la même distance qu'auparavant. Lors 
알겠습니다, 빌. 시간 되시면 고이득 안테나에 대해 이야기
네. 또 하나, 입대 전에 살펴볼 부분이 있는데, 바로 일반적인 입대 시험 패턴입니다. 현재 체크리스트에 약 1시간 정도 소요되는 절차로 명시되어 있습니다. 지금 위에 있는 두루마리
좋아요. 충분합니다. 언제든 복사할 준비가 되면 패드 블록 데
لمن لم يق
Roger. Könnten Sie uns bitte unsere Entfernung – Korrektur – unsere Geschwindigkeit und
यह सिग्मा सेवन है, जो सूर्योदय के समय उल्टी दिशा में उड़ने का अनुभव दिखा रहा है, 90 डिग्री यॉ के साथ। आपके लिए सबसे स्पष्ट बात यह है कि आपकी उड़ान की दिशा क्या है। जैसे रेलगाड़ी की खिड़की से बाहर देखना। आप अपने सामने से गुजरते हुए भूभाग को देख सकते हैं। हर तरह के बादल हैं। मैं
मेरा कहना है कि क्वाड 4 पर लगा जेट डिफ्लेक्टर क्वाड 1 पर लगे डिफ्लेक्टर की तुलना में अधिक झुर्रीदार प्रतीत होता है। कुल मिलाकर, नीचे का हिस्सा काफी हद तक सुरक्षित रहा है
Несколько дополнительных замечаний: пожалуйста, прекратите зарядку батареи B на данный момент; т
我得先拿到一些通
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 지금 투하 준비를 하고 있습니다. 투하 시작 후 약 3분 20초 정도 소요될 예정입니다.
الشمس ساطعة جداً من
حسنًا، يمكنك إخبارهم، إذا لم يكونوا قد فكروا في ا
Nous avons l'impression d'être obligés de l'utiliser. Les gains en tangage et en roulis ne sont pas très bons dans cette configuration. Cela permet de maintenir la stabilité en lacet, ma
13，休
저 TVC 짐벌 드라이브가 전력을 많이 잡아먹는 건가요
Привет, Джек, у меня один вопрос по поводу командного модуля. Правильно ли я сейчас настроил шир
Roger. Stand by. Contingency Power 6. Get the book over here.
L'area che stiamo sorvolando in questo momento suggerisce un possibile accenno di attività vulcanica, anche se al momento non riesco a valutarla a occhio nudo per determinarla con certezza. Ci sono alcuni crateri e accumuli che sugge
...パワーアップしまし
Роджер, Джон. Только что вышли из режима пониженного энергопотребления, когда инвертор был выключен. Он хорошо поднялся и теперь будет включен до конца полета. Показания ампер и вольт соо
Affermativo. Quello che vogliamo fare, se otteniamo un avvio manuale, è che dovremo spegnere manualmente e, per otte
Ok. Quello che abbiamo in mente è che stiamo esaminando alcuni degli obiettivi che avete a bordo per le fotocamere, e vedremo se uno di questi può
Siamo nella posizione giusta per un guadagno elevato; ci chiedevamo se voleste fare una prova e ved
Нет, Майк. Мы ничего не видим за терминатором ни в бинокль, ни без него. Земля слишком яркая, и это снижает способность к н
我不确
정말 멋진 하루였어요, 여러분.
Cape Cap Com, Sigm
रॉजर। मुझे नहीं लगता कि मैं समय पर काम
Nun, Fred-o holt sich gerade etwas zu essen, und Jim fängt an, müde zu werden, deshalb übernehme ich hier die Kommunikation, bis Fred ferti
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Я только что читал некоторые стенограммы сегодняшнего разговора о нашей предыдущей попытке, и когда вы нажали клавишу Enter и дважды перевели её, всё заработало. Кажется, у нас есть репортаж об этом, е
Roger. I had it pretty well figured out, I think, before you called up. I've been plotting it on the board up here, and it looks like if we get to the en
C'est négatif. Cependant
ヒューストンCAP COM、こちら
罗杰。或许在你看来，我们这次登月之旅看似简单轻松。但我可以向你保证，事实并非如此。将我们送入轨道的土星五号火箭是一台极其复杂的机器，每一个部件都运转得完美无瑕。我头顶上的这台计算机拥有38000个词汇，每个词汇都经过精心挑选，对我们宇航员来说至关重要。我手中的这个开关，仅在指令舱内就有超过300个相同的开关，而这仅仅是一个开关的设计。除此之外，还有无数的断路器、操纵杆、连杆和其他相关控制装置。我们服务舱尾部的大型火箭发动机也必须运转完美，否则我们就会被困在月球轨道上。我头顶上的降落伞明天也必须完美无缺，否则我们将坠入大海。我们始终坚信所有这些设备都能正常运转，并且我们仍然相信它们在剩余的飞行过程中都能如此。这一切都离不开许多人的辛勤付出。首先，是工厂里组装这些机器的美国工人。其次，是各个测试团队在组装和后续复测过程中一丝不苟的工作。最后，是载人航天中心的全体人员，包括管理人员、任务规划人员、飞行控制人员，以及最重要
Um vorübergehend die Spannung an MAIN A zu stabilisieren, habe ich MAIN BUS TIE BAT AC eingeschaltet. Oder möchten Sie die aktuell 
罗杰。首先是太阳；
D'accord. Faites pivoter le vaisseau vers la gauche pour avoir une bonne vue de la Terre et de votre deuxième fenêtre de rendez-vous. Vous devrez peut-être aussi effectuer un léger tangage, mais principalement une manœuvre de lacet vers la gauche pour avoir une bonne vue de la Terr
Nein. Ich würde nicht sagen, dass es sich unbedingt um freigelegtes Mate
잭, 좋은 생각입니다. 우리가 있는 이 위치에서 태양과 달의 위치를 ​​알 수 있으니, 기수 
FDAI 评分，50/
جيميني 4، كاناري 
Roger. And Fred is being relieved now. He's - went bac
ठीक है। हम 100 पर हैं 
セカンダリー ストラットのようですね。こ
はい、準
우주선의 자세를 0°
Bene. Abbiamo un altro input qui, l'11, secondo cui i dati erano riconoscibili come un'immagine, 
す
Ich verstehe, was du meinst. Ich habe vorhin etwas geschlafen und bin daher recht ausgeruht. Ich möchte sichergehen, dass Frank hier vor dem Eintritt noch ein gutes Nickerchen machen kann. Das wäre vielleicht ein guter Zeitpunkt, dein
어떤 걸 선택하셨어요? 60? 60은 선택하셨고, 80
收到。我明白了。向
友情七号，这里是卡普空公司的金丝雀。您的医疗
알겠습니다. 마지막 말씀은 우리가 시작한 
Roger. Comprenez que les de
Okay. On " Activa
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. خمس دقائق متبقية. وبخصوص طلبكم لمعرفة ضغط أسطوانات النيتروجين قبل الاحتراق، قبل الاحتراق مباشرةً، كان الضغط ٢٢٧٠ رطلاً لكل بوصة مربعة على أسطوانة ألفا و٢٣٥
Eagle, Columbia. Se preferisci, vorrei pas
Роджер. В тот момент угол наклона был таким: узкий конец был направлен преимущественно вверх, к звездам, и мы находились в свободном дрейфе. Тупо
Besteht die Gefahr, dass dadurch auch andere Speicherbereiche, die mit dem 
And now, Houston, do you still think 
Роджер. Ниже приведено описание работы панели: предохранители на левой панели работают так же, как и сообщалось ранее, без повторения. Пирогаситель активирован. Автоматическое реверсирование выключено. Выбор режима в обычном режиме, авто
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्
好的，吉姆。我本来不想谈这个，因为我们还没准备好推荐具体流程。由于电流不足，我们无法按照正常的电源检查清单启动CM/。或许我们需要你一次预热一个线圈，我们正在考虑这个方案。另一种可能是，
On est en train de régler 
Friendship Seven, qui Zanzibar Cap Com. Abbiamo un contatto telemetrico affidabile, seg
Ottima GT-3. Ci vediamo al prossimo viaggio, l'anno pros
了
您的右侧辅助氧通道应打开，左侧辅
네, 밴스. 지금 우리는 달을 정면에서 바라보는 것과는 약간 다른 방향으로 카메라를 향하고 있습니
Roger. Und was die Temperatur des Quadroco
मैं बस यही टिप्पणी कर रहा था - मैं यहाँ क्वाड 1 और 4 के थ्रस्टर्स को देख रहा था। बैरल के बाहरी ह
Sigma 7, das ist Ca
Если я больше ничего не скажу, то запись на диктофоне в реа
Нет. Это показания купола костюма — 75.
Okay. Sicherungsautomaten, Vertei
Das alte weiße Team hat heute Abend woh
...ここからこの水を全部取り除くために、何とか
フォーカスは無限遠です。そのまま無限遠にしておくべきです。間違いありません。さて、ズームについては、地平線や陸地などを少しズームインして
少し右に
こんにちは、カナリ
Roger. During your pass we would like to perform a UHF check. I would like to stress - use minimum fue
حسنًا. وما يحمله جيم الآن هو قلمٌ في يده، قمنا بت
啊，罗杰，桑给巴尔地面通讯中心。友谊七号。所有保险丝状态与之前报告的相同，未做任何
حسنًا. دعنا نتأكد من فهمي الصحيح. عند الساعة 49، قبل الخروج من وضع الصفر في نظام البصريات، راقب العمود، ثم استدعِ الإحداثيات 16 و91، وانظر إل
Sie alle haben eine Punktzahl von 90, außer B, das über 9
飛行中に、自動光学系が選択した星の位置まで移動しないことに気づきました。例えば、一度アルフェラッツを選択したものの、そこへは移動せず、星のない場所まで移動してしまいました。そこで、プログラムを再選
الجوزاء الثامن، هاواي، لجنة شؤون القبائ
Merci beaucoup. D'accord, je vais vous lire ces quantités. Il était 17 h 16 GMT au départ. Quantité de prop
I'll bet you any money that city my left, and was Port E
로저. 
了解。こちらフレンドシップセブンです。窓、姿勢指示器
هيوستن، أبولو 11. ماذا عن ابتكار أسلوب تواصل جيد نتبعه بين الآن ووقت المناورة
Хорошо. Мы сделаем там е
Okay, Jack. Die Vorgehensweise ist in Ordnung, aber 
Хорошо, Джо. Мы поместили баллон в пакет, две
حسنا
04 32 39, R
好的。请问有什么快
我们会试着把
19:04。这是一次不错
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯
Cape は、18 時 57 分 23 秒にバックアップ数量を渡すことを推奨しています。左に 55 回
Роджер, Вумера. Я вас т
Columbia, Ho
Роджер, это «Дружба Семь». Топливо: 90-98%. Кислород: 78-100%. Давление в кабине в данный момент 5,6. В капсуле совсем немного пы
Bitte geben Sie uns eine Markierung, wenn er das Gebäude
Роджер, Базз. Отличный кадр, теперь, когда мы види
分かりまし
Здесь все стоят на гол
Schau mal. Es deckt ein weites Gebiet ab. Mann, diese dunkl
吉姆，我们这儿
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन 
Хорошо. Имейте в виду, что калибровка оптики о
Sì, siamo molto vicini su queste posizioni dei dati, W
Хорошо. А на панели 3 у меня для вас переключатель. AC INVERTER 2 к M
- - aber ich konnte den Bereich 
알겠습니다. 그
रॉजर, जैक ने मुझे बताया कि यह सब एक ही सर्किट ब्रेकर है, और अगला वाला लाइटिंग: न्यूमेरिक्स/इंटीग्रल,
Сейчас над районом MSC нависли дождевые тучи. Дождь начался здесь примерно 10 минут назад, и, по последним данным, у нас был довольно сильный ливень. На этом новости на сегод
알겠습니다. 전자 장치 전원 끄기; 신호 컨디셔너/드라이버 바이어스 전원 끄기; 전원 2개 모두 끄기;
Ci stiamo preparando a fornirvi una panoramica dei vostri sistemi. Analizzeremo tutti i passa
Gemi
Apollo 13, Houston. Perderemo i dati da Carnarvon tra circa 1 minuto. Probabilmente avremo la comunicazione vocale. Tutto procede a gonfie vele e vi asc
حسنًا، قد يكون ذلك صعبًا بعض 
分かりました。電話に戻りましたが、ジャックは本当に…二階の寝室に戻ってしまいました
Хорошо... Сразу же прис
J'ai compris. Faisons en sorte que ce soit une bon
R
Thank you, Apollo 11. I'm sure that, if they didn't hear that, they'll get the word through the news, surel
Roger. Tu vois? Là-bas, dans le coin 
Хорошо. Это замечательно. Думаю... нам следует вернуться к первоначальным процедурам, которые у нас есть, и внести в них измене
Aquarius, Houston. Fred, concernant les angles de 50° que nous avions à 74 heures, ils étaient basés sur cette attitude et seront incorrects pour les manœuvres sur deux axes; vous pouv
開けたよ。シュノー
ठीक
One other thing, Jack - You still with m
Roger, Gu
逆噴射ま
You might be interested in knowing, since you are already on the way, that a Houston astrologer, Ruby Graham, says that all the signs are right for your trip to the Moon. She says that Neil is clever, Mike has good judgment, and Buzz can work out intricate problems. She also says Nei
Columbia, Houston. Vos systèmes semblent bien positionnés
Yuri, everybody send you best wishes all the time, ask to tell you
В автомобиле на удивление нет никакого мусора. 
이송 시간은 꽤 잘 진행됐습니다, 
아래쪽으로 이어지는 다음 크레이터가 바로 듀크 아일랜드이고, 왼쪽에는 사진 중앙 부근에 있는 가장 큰 크레이터인 마스켈린 W가 있습니다. 이것은 하강 중 약 3분 39초에 실시한 위치 점검으로, 착륙 레이더를 포착하기 위해 기체를 위로 기울이기 전의 하강 및 횡단
그럼 제가 어떻게 켜는지 모르는 것 같네요
वे आपको हेलीकॉप्टर से समोआ ले जाएंगे। आप समोआ में एक रात बिताएंगे, फिर 141 नंबर की बस पकड़ेंगे और कुछ ही देर में एलिंग
Roger, Houston. Apollo 11 nous appelle d'environ 210 000 kilomètres. Nous allons zoomer lentement avec notre caméra pour obtenir l
Houston, hi
अब हमें नीचे से एक सुंदर तस्वीर मिल रही है, 11. रंग काफी स्पष्ट रूप से आ रहे हैं, और हम क्षितिज और अंतरिक्ष के सापेक
好的。准备好复制
ジェミニ4号、こちらヒューストンCAP
好的。时间32小时00分钟。完成操作后，进行以下姿态机动：滚转101.0，俯仰90.0，偏航000.0。高俯仰-23，偏航93。使用常规程序降低速率
여러 나라의 과학자들이 달 샘플을 보기 위해 대기하고 있다는 것을 알고 있습니다. 여러분께서도 샘플의 실제 모습을 보시면 흥미로워하실 것 같아 보여드립니다. 이 두 상자는 샘플 회수 용기입니다. 이 용기들은 진공 포장되어 달 표면에서 진공 상태로 밀봉된 후, 우주선 안으로 가져와 유리 섬유 백에 넣고 지퍼로 닫은 다음, 외부를 다시 밀봉하여 사령선 측면의 보관함에 넣었습니다. 이것이 바로 그 두 상자입니다. 저희가 우주선에 탑승하는 즉시, 이 상자들은 달 수신 연구소로 바로 옮겨져 운송될 것입니다. 이 상자에는 다양한 종류의 암석 샘플, 토양의 기
Gemini 4, Г
ठ
حسنًا، ممتاز. يمكنك إخباره عندما نصل إلى تلك النقطة، أن لدينا بعض النجوم بزوايا محاورها وزوايا ارتكازها لنقدمها له كنسخ احتياطية في حال لم يوجهه الكمبيوتر مباش
ठीक है। शुरू करो। 127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 डिग्री/सेकंड 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-शाबाश: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-शाबाश: 93. 1+58 14 45 02. 11+04. 6
わかりました。皆さんにはこの点について知っていただき、飛行計画にどのような影響があるか考えていただきたかったのです。広角で月についてコメントし、どのセクションが最も適切だと思うか確認します。さて、フランクはスクロールで、進入プロファイルが表示される順番を確認してほしいと言っていました。最初に表示されるプロファイルは「非退出番号2」と表示されており、これは短距離高速進入です。2番目に表示されるのは「3500マイル」と表示されており、これも高速進入ですが、長距離進入を行う場合に使用します。3番目のプロファイルは「非退出番号1」で、その後ろに3500マイルのプロファイルが続きます。つまり、4つの進入プロファイルがあります。1番と3番は短距離、2番と4番は長距離のスクロールです。コールドソークについては、そこで何をするか話し合ったと思いますが、1時間ほどでコールドソークの作業に入りたいと思っています。12時にやるつもりは絶対にありません。軌道計算担当者と話をしたところ、水が沸騰する現象についてどう思っていたかということですが、覚えておいてほしいのは、彼らは軌道図上で水が飛び散ったり沸騰したりする様子を見ているということです。これは、軌道が大きく変動しているという事実ではなく、彼らの計算スキームによるものだと思われます。ですから、もし水が沸騰するのであれば、軌道修正がどうなるかが分かっている中間軌道の直前に行うのが妥当かもしれません。中間軌道修正の直前に水が沸騰する現象を観測し、中間軌道修正後に軌道修正を再開することになります。ですから、もし誰かが、私たちが最も重要な時にデータを捨てているのでは
わかりました、ヴァンス。レジスタ1は33000、レジスタ2は35500、レジスタ3は27100になります
Ro
Roger. Wir möchten gerne wissen, ob Sie die Ihnen über CSQ mitgetei
……已
스미스 해는 바다처럼 보이지 않습니다. 분화구가 거의 없는 지역은 언덕이 많
Хо
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 당신의 글은 희미하지만 분명하게
Bene. Siamo pronti per procedere con la ripresa ravvicinat
मेरे बूटों का नीला रंग अब पूरी तरह से गायब हो गया है और उसकी जगह यह रंग आ गय
现在我们拥有了近乎完美的观星条件，月光的
好的，Fred-o，干得漂亮。第 4 行，从以下项目开始：SUIT FAN 1，关闭；GLYCOL PUMP AUTO TRA
Вы могли бы немного поработать зде
いいえ。私たちはバーンを入れました。バーンを入れた後も、まだカウントが続い
Tappa quel buco. Possiamo... possiamo metterci un po' di entrambe le cose. Tagliam
C'est 
Okay. Good deal. Jack, let me mention something about the hatch integrity check. You're going to vent the tunnel until you get a 3-psi DELTA-P. That should take 9 or 10 minutes, and it's our firm feeling that you don't have to wait another 10 minutes after that for a leak check. If it holds pressure for a minute
了解しました。今朝のアポロに関する大きなニュースの中に、大きなウサギを連れた愛らしい少女に注目してほしいというものがあります。古代の伝説によると、チャンオという名の美しい中国の少女が4000年前から月に住んでい
… 
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。迈克，请到A1区报到，看看
Et vous, Aquarius, Houston. Veuillez 
Роджер. У нас сильные помехи. Море Кризисов перед нами на горизонте, а посередине виден темный кратер Пикар. Сейчас мы видим восход Луны или закат космического аппарата. Это область, где солнце только что взошло на Луне. Море, над которым мы сейчас находимся, имеет пятнистый вид, но не сильно изрыто кратерами, так что, должно быть, оно относительно новое. Это Море Плодородия, и мы приближаемся к большому кратеру, дельтовидному; вокруг его серед
数量スイ
よし。DIYの水酸化リチウムボンベの交換は完了だ。ジョー、一つだけ違うのは、この段ボールのアーチが小さすぎて赤いホースの入口を下にして置けないことと、赤
Roger, Apollo 11. The way we gave it to you in the attitude we're in, it'll be just like the SEP burn that you had yesterday. You'll see - N
À Reno, au Ne
알겠습니다. 시스템 현황을 간단히 요약해 드리겠습니다. 기본적으로 모든 시스템은 정상입니다. 귀환 궤적과 관련해서는 13일까지 기다리면 태평양 중부선에 도달할 수 있습니다. 138초간 연소 후에는 귀환길에 오르게 됩니다. 귀환 지역의 날씨도 좋아 보입니다. 아폴로 8호, 연락
알겠습니다. 모드 1의 새로운 자세, 롤 - 모
نعم، ليسوا كذلك.
حسنًا
वहाँ सब कैसा चल रहा
Я думаю, что два угла соприкоснулись, поскольку при развертывании они не выдвинулись одновременно. Развернулось оно немного неровно, и, конечно, местность, на которой оно находилось, была немного — не совсем ровной, как мне бы хотелось. И я думаю, что два угла соприкоснулись примерно на 1 дюйм — нет, на три четверти или полдюйма в глубину; и, возможно, вдоль нижней части, может быть, на 3 дюйма, оставив небольшое треугольно
L'utilisation de la carte mémoire et la lecture des signa
好的。在第一步之后，第一行，划掉“And VHF-A”。第二行，划掉“SIMPLEX operation”。第三行，划掉“Prime”。它指的是主功率放大器，关闭。这个“PRIME”实际上应该替换成“OFF”。这是该行的第二个“Prime”。同样，第三行的最后一个词“OFF”应该划掉，并替换成“PCM”。第四行没问题。第五行，即“VHF VOICE, ON, OFF, OFF”，划掉。下一行“Lighting, FLOODS”应该写成“OFF”，但要加上“Or OVERHEAD/FORWARD prefer OFF”。好的。第二步保持不变；暂
吉姆，收到。我们刚刚计算出机动时间大约是15分钟，所以如果你从现在到接下来两分钟内的任何时间开始，就能完成姿态调整
Burn è completo. Hai letto? Burn è
ठीक है। बा
Hey, du bist jetzt laut und deutlich
नहीं, देर नहीं होगी। शा
जिम, बस एक जानकारी देना चाहता हूँ, अगर किसी कारणवश आपको थोड़ी देर के 
Yes. That would be fine. There is something you can do; you can reservice it. And it is kind of a tedious process, and that's the reason why we just want to kind of keep our eyes on it so we will have some idea prior to entry if we can count on having two loops or one. Which kind of leads us into another question we are trying to pin down, two questions, in fact. Number one, we would like to verify that you do plan to use both primary and secondary boilers during the ac
هذا صحيح بخصوص المحاور، يا فريد. 
Friendship Seven. Hier spricht Canton Cap Com. Alle Systeme am Boden scheinen betriebsbereit zu sein. Die T
Roger. Per Bill, la qualità della voce sul retro è estremamente scarsa. La consideriamo inutilizzabile e consigliamo di registrare a mano tutti i commenti p
Et encore une fois, une correction de réglage de l'appareil photo en haut de cette section que nous avons qualifiée d'optionnelle, où vous avez « bracket MIR f:0.9, 125 », barrez le « 125 » et insérez « 1 slash 60 ». Autrement dit, un soixantième. Terminé
انتظر دقيقة
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 90도 회전해 주세요. 짐벌 중앙 각도를 주의 깊게 살펴보세요. 짐벌 록에서 약 30도 정도 
플
임무 타이머가 화면 왼쪽 상단
क्या आप टैंक प्रेशर
ठीक है। समय यह है - कार्यक्रम इस समय होगा; और हमें निम्नलिखित स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी करनी है: रोल 101.0, पिच 090.0, यॉ पूरी तरह से शून्य। उच्च लाभ कोण पिच -23 और यॉ 93 होंगे। और हमें दरों को कम करने के लिए सामान्य प्रक्रियाओं का उपयोग करना है। दरों को कम करने के बाद और स्पिनअप से पहले, हमें मैगज़ीन G के साथ सेक्स्टेंट पर बहुत उच्च गति वाली ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म लगानी है। फिर, हमें ऑडियो-ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग करके 5, 20 और 60 सेकंड के समय 
Dateci solo un po' di tempo, per favore, perché vogliamo solo sapere quando sarà. Vorrei usare il Terminator, se possibile, e abbiamo un piccolo messaggio, e questo è t
아,
Wie 
ジョン、あなたの姿勢は 2° 以内
Oui, et nous n'avons pas les moyens d'acheter les amplificateurs nécessai
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन, हमने बिजली स्थानांतरित कर दी ह
자동 회로 차단기
没错。好的，现在地面会给你一个更新，时间是-2+15。这是你需要配置接收遥测数据的时间点。更新内容包括时钟增量、状态向量；他们会给你两个值，一个是实际值，一个是首选值；以及目标负载。如果你想复制这些信
Apollo 11, Houston. We have you stopped in the PTC; 
Вы помните какие-нибудь колебания параметров тела, которые наблюдались во время работы двигателей? Разве вы не говорили что-то про 0,4? Может быть, помните,
罗杰。我们什么都没有。这里
سأضطر إلى ترك الكاميرا تنفد بطاري
ロジャー、フランク。北緯7度38分、西経165度の着陸地点では、風速2000メートル、波高12000メートル、最高気温10度、東風12メートル、うねり4フィート、気温約82度です。このエリアの約10～30%でにわか雨が降り、最高気温は2000メートル前後になるでしょう。もし雷雨になった場合、最
Hey, Houston; Wassermann. Auf DOWN VOICE 
아폴로 8호, 고이득을 기다리는 동안 궤적 요약을 계속하겠습니다. 13번째 지점에서 태평양 중부선으로 복귀할 수 있으며, 연소 후 138초가 지나면 귀환이 시작됩니다. 138초면 버터플라이 영역을 벗어나게 됩니다. 20초 이후에는 조기점화나 재시동을 시도하지 않는 것이 좋습니다. 20초를 넘기면 궤적이 수정 범위를 벗어나 자유 귀환으로 이어질 수 있습니다. 귀환 지역의 날씨는 양호합니다. 추적 및 미추진이 가능합니다. 연소 중에는 저장 탱크와 섬프 탱크의 연료 소모로 인해 연소실 압력과 탱크 압력에 약간의 변화가 있을 수 있습니다. 이는 연소 시작 후 2~5초 사이에 발생할 수 있습니다. 두 시스템 모두 압력 변화가 미미할 것입니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동합니다. 연소 후에는 궤적 유지를 위해 물 끓임을 방지해야 합니다. 물 배출 상황은 양호해 보입니다. 그 이상은 괜찮을 겁니다. 5시 이후까지는 물 배출을 미루도록 하겠습니다. 그 전에 극저온 장치를 휘저어주고 싶습니다. (수정) 연료 전지의 다음 퍼지는 대략 에 이루어질 예정이며, 수소 배터리 A는 34.9, 배터리 B는 39.1, 찰리는 38.5가 될 것입니다. 저희는 단일 탱크 극저온 장치를 갖추고 있습니다. 이전 연소 성능을 보면, 정상 연소는 계산된 값보다 약 3.7초 정도 더 걸릴 것으로 예상됩니다. 엔진 성능은 정상
Wassermann, Houston. Nur z
يبدو الوضع جيداً من هذه الجهة. كيف كان ثبات الوض
Okay. I
The view of the Moon that we've been having recen
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。我有两种方法可以帮你们给舱内升
Okay.
سيستغرق الأمر بعض الوقت. نمر بفترة جفاف طويلة هنا. وسنحاول تركك وشأنك لتستريح. لديك تحديث 
アポロ11号、こち
これは上昇エンジンの下にあるもので、プローブが最初に衝突した場所です。マイナス Y プローブが最初に衝突した
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Nach dreieinhalb Minuten sieht es i
Хорошо, у нас пока нет точного времени н
«Сигма Семь», это Кантонский Капитолийский к
저는 그걸 저
मुझे इसे हाई पर
알겠습니다. 한 가지 정정할 점이 있는데요. 지금 LMP
Okay, Odyssey, Houston. Wir sind bereit für die St
Der Rollladen geht nicht
Роджер. Аврора Семь, показания в норме. Сейчас наблюдаются довольно сильные колебания, и у нас заканчивается топливо. Судя по
情况还是一
この岩塊は、最終降下時に通過した、この大きくて鋭い縁を持つ岩のリムクレーターに起源を持つのではないかと考えています。昨日、私はそれがフットボール競技場ほどの大きさだと言いましたが、実際、近づくにつれて測るのが少し難しくなりました。しかし、私たちが通り過ぎた時には、アストロドームにちょうど収まるだろうと思いました。そして、この岩のリムクレーター付近の岩は、この地域の岩よりもはるかに大きく、中には10フィートほど、あるいはそれ以上の大きさの岩もあり、クレーターの縁からクレーターの直径ほどの範囲
好的。现在完全明白了。只是想提醒您，如果通讯中断，我们不希望您浪费7点。您目前的记
ठीक है। समझ गया। और क्या आपने ध्यान दिया - क्या उड़ान भरते समय 
Roger, li co
Кроме того, президент Никсон
저는 저공비행 각도를 따라할 준비가 되었습
Bene. La prima domanda extra è, e lasciatemi rispondere alla domanda originale, perché questa domanda dice: "Più specificamente sul punto 2", e il punto 2 dice: "Ci sono stati cambiamenti significativi nel livello di vibrazione del rumore durante il singolo stadio del volo a motore?". Nello specifico, descrivi le tue osservazioni durante lo spegnimento iniziale del motore centrale dell'S-II e, circa 90 secondi prima del cut-off, hai segnalato una forte vibrazione nel. Vorremmo che descrivessi l'accumulo di questa vibrazione e il suo comportamento durante
Okay. Das gilt für den Vorbeiflug und das Perizynthium-Update (2-Stunde
Ich habe jetzt einen sehr klaren Horizont. Es ist ziemlich hell, und der Horizont besteht hauptsächlich aus Wolken. Ich kann die Wolken sehen – die Sterne, wie sie langsam in das Hauptglühen der Atmosphäre absinken –, aber die Wolken scheinen den Horizont heller zu machen. Früher im Flug hatten wir einen wolkenlosen Horizont gesehen, und der war viel heller – da war eine ziemlich dichte Schicht aus Luftglühen, und man konnte die Sterne sehen, wie sie hindurchgingen. In diesem wolkenartigen Horizont sind di
分かりました。そうし
Nous aimerions utiliser l'ordinateur maintenant si vous n'en avez p
L'aggiornamento sulla palla è stato positivo. Al momento dell'accensione, eravamo a circa 8 gradi. Abbiamo dovuto abbassare il pitch. L'imbarda
Avez-vous reçu cette information, Housto
L'angolazione migliore per fotografare il veicolo spaziale è quella di allontan
フランク、もう既に言われてるかもしれないけど、今日のテレビ、すごく素敵だったよ。でも、ちょっ
Roger. 
로저, 프랭크. 지금 여기서 하려는 작업은 이렇습니다. 수평선 보정을 해야 하는데, 총 15개의 표시가 필요합니다. 한 별에 3세트, 다른 별에 2세트씩 말이죠. 하지만, 바로 다음 단계로 넘어가야 한다는 점도 고려해야 합니다. 그래서 몇 분만 더 기다려 주시면, 지금 바로 다음 단계로 넘어가도록 할지 아니면 다시 돌아가서 작업을 더 진행하도록 요청할지 결정하려고 합니다. 
अच्छा, शायद हमें पहले वाले का उपयोग करना चाहिए
0.1度。GDCはおそらくそれよ
로저. 저희가 복사한 내용이 대략 5x2 
Davvero be
Immagino che siano... all'orizzonte, 
D'
ओह, अंधेरा हो गया है, यही हुआ है। यह एक अंधेरी धर
हम कैप्सूल के गुरुत्
알겠습니다. 거의 중간쯤에 있습니다. 추진제 양이 30%, 아니 정확히는 37%가 되면, 남은 시간이 10초가 되었을 
Willst du die 16-Millimeter, solange du 
Кроме того
Certo che sì,
Okay, Jack. 226 is 
了解しました。パイロット。体温は適切です
Das ist in Ordnung; stören
헬륨의 온도는 58도이고 
Questa è Friendship Seven, che trasmette nella capsula. L'alba è spuntata dietro il periscopio. Era brillante nel mirino, di un rosso brillante mentre si avvicinava all'orizzonte e sorgeva; e proprio mentre... mentre guardavo di nuovo fuori dal finestrino, ho visto letteralmente migliaia di piccole particelle luminose che turb
Wir vermuten, dass die Einstellung auf PEAK steht, empfehlen aber AVERAGE beim ALC, falls Sie diese nicht bereits eingestellt hab
11，这里是休斯顿。5 SPS/G&N：37201，减去 060，加上 047；TIG 086 09 3666。NOUN 81：加上 33521，加
At this point, I made a complete electrical check. All electrical systems are
ジェミニVI、カーナボン。君のテープレコーダーもVIIと同じ問題を抱えているようだ。もし手が届くなら、叩いてみよう。テープの動きを制御できるかもしれ
Сейчас, при медленном вращении, всё выг
Unser „Hier“ ist Roger. Unser „Hier“ war bisher nicht korrekt. 
罗杰，谢谢。我
Ok, Jim. La tua configurazione attuale presenta le seguenti caratteristiche. Abbiamo i BUS elettrici collegati tramite gli
ठीक है। क्या आप आगे बढ़
Итак, скорость. У нас... по всем трем осям скорость составляет примерно 0,1 градуса в секунду. Система APS постоян
هل يمكن
Okay. It looks like the is deteri
我知道……和你
सूर्योदय। आह्ह्ह्ह! उस समय कितने सुंदर जुगनू चमक रहे थे! उस समय सब कुछ बहुत ही चमकदार था। लेकिन ठीक है, वे—ठीक है, मेरे पास—अगर
没
Alright, TRAN
飛行計画はほぼ
了解。雷しか出ていない。君はもうすぐ凍りつくところみたいだね。しばらくここにいて、すぐに戻ってくる
अच्छा, जब आपको माल लाइट मिली, तब आप किस मूड 
Roger. Und die nächste Frage aus unserem Panel richtet sich an Buzz. Wir erinnern uns, d
Ricevuto. I Cowboys sono stati distrutti ieri dai Cleveland Browns. L'equipaggio del Pueblo dovrebbe essere rilasciato. E ora ho sentito dire che il nostro volo aria-terra ha un
Q
의사 선생님, 제가 지금 혈압계 때문에 애를 먹고 있다는 걸 알려드리고 싶습니다. 혈압계가 제 방호복에 제대로 고정되지 않고, 어쩌다 고정되더라도 공기가 잘 빠지지 않아요. 그래서 혈압이 불규칙적으로 올라가는 게 보이시더
روجر.
Okay, 13. Wir möchten, dass Sie die Inline-Heizun
Роджер. Ах да
그 하얀
Sono Roger. Ho fatto un bel po' di voli alla deriva 
Was
جيد. 413020 183، شاولا، لأسفل 064، لليسار 06، لأعلى 0747، لأسفل 16410 12988 36301؛ مجموعة النجوم الشمالية، سيريوس وريجل، دوران 
Negative, just the Comma
Houston, Apollo 11. Could you observe a difference in the N2 pressures before LOI? It seems to me as th
रॉजर, मैं तुम्हें पढ़ नहीं पा रहा हूँ। मैं तुम्हें पढ़ नहीं पा रहा हूँ। बहुत ही कमज़ोर। क्या तुम अब सूट कंट्रोल सेटिंग की रिपोर्ट करोगे, और तुम्हें कै
حس
रॉजर। आपका अधिकतम जी, 063; आपका गामा, 400K पर, 648; आपकी रेंज, 14033; और 
وأنا أنتظر قراءة مقياس الارتفاع. كيب، هل تسمعني الآن؟ مقياس الارتفاع قد ارتفع. 100 قدم، معدل الهبوط آخذ في الانخفاض، ضغط المقصورة جيد. ما زلت أفقد 
Ok
ह्यूस्टन स्थित एसोसिएटेड न्यूज़ एजेंसी के हैरी रोसेन्थल की एक रिपोर्ट यहाँ प्रस्तुत है। दो सांता क्लॉज़ ने 2 वर्षीय जेफ़री लवेल के लिए क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या को रोशन कर दिया। पहले सांता ने उसके घर का दरवाज़ा खटखटाया और उपहार लाए। दूसरे सांता ने उसके पापा को चाँद से घर भेजा। पहले सांता ने लाल सूट और सफ़ेद दाढ़ी पहनी थी और इतनी ज़ोर से 'हो-हो' की आवाज़ निकाली कि पूरे मोहल्ले में सुनाई दी। दूसरा सांता एक विशाल इंजन था जो चाँद के पीछे से आग उगल रहा था, और हज़ारों लोग इसके चालू होने की खबर का इंतज़ार कर रहे थे। "कृपया सूचित किया जाए कि सांता क्लॉज़ आ गए हैं," अपोलो 8 के पहले शब्द थे जब उसने रेडियो साइलेंस से बाहर आकर 15 मिनट बाद उत्सुक दुनिया को सूचित किया कि इंजन ने अपना महत्वपूर्ण बर्न पूरा कर लिया है। मिशन कंट्रोल के केन मैटिंगली ने कहा, "हममें से किसी ने भी इससे बेहतर क्रिसमस उपहार की उम्मीद नहीं की थी।" अंतरिक्ष यान के कमांडर कर्नल फ्रैंक बोरमैन ने जवाब दिया, "ज़मीन पर मौजूद सभी लोगों को हमारी ओर से धन्यवाद दें। आप जानते हैं कि हम आपके बिना यह नहीं कर सकते थे।" इसी समय, मिशन कंट्रोल के कंसोल के सामने एक क्रिसमस ट्री जगमगा उठा, और अंतरिक्ष यात्री हैरिसन श्मिट ने दल को "संत निकोलस की यात्रा" का अंतरिक्ष संस्करण पढ़कर सुनाया। "क्रिसमस की रात से ठीक पहले, अंतरिक्ष में, अपोलो 8 के दल ने चंद्रमा की दौड़ जीत ली थी," यह शुरू हुआ। मिशन कंट्रोल दल ने उत्सव को तब तक के लिए स्थगित कर दिया था जब तक कि जेफरी के पिता, नौसेना कप्तान जेम्स लवेल, वायु सेना के मेजर विलियम ए. एंडर्स और कर्नल बोरमैन सुरक्षित रूप से घर नहीं लौट आए। किसी भी अन्य क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या पर, अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों के परिवार क्रिसमस की प्रार्थना के लिए चर्च में होते, लेकिन इस साल वे सभी अपने टेलीविजन सेटों से चिपके हुए थे। मानवयुक्त अंतरिक्ष यान केंद्र के पास के सभी घर सजाए गए थे। लवेल के घर के आसपास और उनके टिम्बर कोव समुदाय में लॉन मैक्सिकन शैली के ल्यूमिनारियो से सजे हुए थे, और चारों लवेल 30. वे 00, एक कार आई जिसमें एक लंबा सांता क्लॉस अपनी पीठ पर एक बड़ा बोरा लिए बैठा था। वह दरवाजे तक आया और जोर से दस्तक दी। दरवाजा खुला और सामने जेफरी लवेल खड़ा था, जो 14 जनवरी को 3 साल का हो जाएगा। उसे देखकर जेफरी सहम गया। उसकी माँ ने उसे गोद में उठा लिया और जेफरी उनसे लिपट गया, फिर भी शरमाता रहा। उसकी 15 साल की बहन बारबरा ने कहा, "पिछले साल तो वह रोते हुए भाग गया था।" इससे पहले, उसे सारे लैंप बुझाने से रोकने के लिए उसके पीछे भागना पड़ा था। लवेल परिवार के दूसरे बच्चे, 13 साल का जेम्स और 10 साल की सुसान, बड़े मज़े से देख रहे थे। आखिर में, सांता और बच्चे अंदर चले गए; तोहफे पेड़ के नीचे रख दिए गए; ये तोहफे आज तक नहीं खोले जाने थे। श्रीमती लवेल ने मेहमानों के लिए एग नोग और कुकीज़ तैयार कीं और उन्होंने तीन अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों द्वारा आयोजित चंद्रमा की 25 मिनट की टीवी यात्रा देखी। बाद में, दोस्तों ने श्रीमती लवेल, बारबरा और जेफरी को क्रिसमस की रोशनी से सजे मोहल्ले की सैर कराई। उनके ऊपर साफ आसमान में, चौथाई चाँद चमक रहा था, और तीनों अंतरिक्ष यात्री, जिन्हों
迈克，你能告诉我一些关于
Роджер. Понял; номер 3 непригоден, а номер 5 скрыт. 
好的，双子座4号。我们的血压
هدوء، هيوستن. لقد رفعنا درجة الحرارة لديكم حوالي 4 درجات و
了解、ジャック。スイッチは全
素晴らしいショーだった。こ
Qui S
Roger, CSQ. Zwillinge lese
Und Columbia, Houston. Dasselbe gilt für euch. Ihr könnt kündigen
نعم. نعم يا جاك، 
Negativo. Alfa è al 53
了解。テレメトリで姿勢の測定
你可以接管指挥权；你可能还需要再次
Okay, Houston. We've got a whole bunch of noise, 
حسنًا. إليك التفاصيل. وضعية الطائرة جيدة جدًا باستثناء الدوران، ونود منك القيام بما يلي: في وضع الدفع الأدنى، نريدك أن تضبط زاوية الميل إلى الصفر، وهو الوضع الحالي تقريبًا؛ وزاوية الدوران إلى 0.08 درجة، أي حوالي 16 درجة من زاوية الدوران الحالية؛ وزاوية الانعراج إلى الصفر، وهو الوضع الحالي تقريبًا. ثم نريدك أن تجعل محور الجسم على خط مستقيم 400 + 5، 400 + 0. اضبط زاوية الميل والدوران على وضع النب
지금은 오른쪽에
下院歳入委員会は昨日、石油会社、銀行、公益事業に影響を与える税制改革案を承認しました。この改正案は、連邦政府の歳入を年間最大20億ドル増加させる可能性があります。委員会はまた、電話会社、電力会社、ガス会社、石油パイプラ
어디 보자. 미주리주 스프링필드에서, 1941년 월드시리즈에서 브루클린 다저스의 전설적인 포수이자, 삼진을 잡아내 뉴욕 양키스의 승리를 확정지은 미키 오웬은 스포츠 기록 이상의 것으로 기억되기를 바랐습니다. 그는 45명의 소년 소녀들에게 조랑말을 선물했습니다. 아이들은 그에게
روجر. هذه فريندشيب 7. النافذة، ومؤشرات الوضع، والمنظار كلها تعمل بشكل سليم. أستطي
네. 영국 조드렐 뱅크에서 AP 통신이 전한 소식입니다. 영국의 대형 조드렐 뱅크 전파 망원경이 오늘 오전 5시 49분(미국 동부시간)에 소련의 무인 달 탐사선 루나 15호의 신호 수신을 중단했습니다. 대변인은 루나 15호가 "달 표면을 넘어간 것으로 보인다"고 밝혔습니다. 또 다른 소식으로는, 버나드 러벨 천문대 소장의 대변인이 "착륙했다고 생각하지 않는다"고 말했다는 것입니다. 워싱턴 UPI 통신에 따르면, 스피로 T. 애그뉴 부통령은 2000년까지 화성에 사람을 보내야 한다고 주장했지만, 민주당 지도부는 지구의 필요에 우선순위를 두어야 한다고 반박했습니다. 수요일 아폴로 11호 발사 당시 정부 고위 관계자였던 애그뉴 부통령은 "내 생각에는 이번 세기 말까지 화성에 사람을 보내야 한다"고 말했는데, 이는 닉슨 행정부의 입장을 대변한 것이 아니라 개인적인 의견인 것으로 보입니다. 텍사스주 라레도, AP: 누에보 라레도 이민국은 수요일, 히피족에게 멕시코 입국 관광증을 발급하려면 목욕을 하고 머리를 잘라야 한다고 발표했습니다. 누에보 라레도 멕시코 이민국장인 우베르토 카사라스는 멕시코시티, 아카풀코 등 유명 관광지에서 히피족에 대한 불만이 접수되었다고 밝혔습니다. UPI 통신: 닉슨 대통령이 아폴로 11호 달 착륙 임무 참여를 기념하기 위해 연방 공무원들에게 월요일을 휴일로 지정한 것에 대한 초기 반응은 대부분 놀라움이었습니다. 로드니 비드너, AP 통신, 런던 AP: 유럽은 아폴로 11호 임무에 열광했습니다. 유럽 전역의 신문들은 지구와 달을 처음으로 연결하기 위해 발사되는 새턴 V 로켓 사진으로 지면을 가득 채웠습니다. 그리고 헤드라인 작성자들은 이 위업을 칭송할 단어를 찾기 위해 상상력을 총동원했습니다. 프랑스 신문 르 피가로는 "인류 역사상 가장 위대한 모험이 시작되었다"고 선언하며 케이프 케네디 소식과 임무 도표를 4페이지에 걸쳐 보도했다. 타블로이드 신문 파리 주르는 "전 세계가 그들에게 박수를 보낸다"고 전했다. 공산당 일간지 르 위마니테는 발사 사진을 1면에 싣고 뒷면 전체를 달 탐사 관련 기사로 채웠다. 기사에는 카운트다운과 발사 과정, 우주비행사들의 아내와 가족, 그리고 달 활동에 대한 배경 설명이 담겨 있었다. 뉴욕주 햄스테드: 조 네이머스는 수요일, 프로 미식축구 커미셔너 피터 로젤과의 의견 차이에 대해 팀 동료들과 비공개 회의를 가진 후, 호프스트라 대학교에 있는 뉴욕 제츠 훈련 캠프에 공식적으로 합류했다. 런던 UPI: 영국 상원은 수요일, 소형 미국 잠수함이 네스호 괴물을 "손상시키거나 공격하지 않을 것"이라는 확답을 받았다. 노메이 경은 네스호에서 잠수함을 운용하는 사람이 "호수에 서식할 가능성이 있는 생물에게 손상이나 공격을 가하지 않을 것"이라는 확신을 얻고 싶다고 말했다. 그는 잠수함이 발견한 괴물에게서 회수 가능한 마취총으로 조직 샘플을 채취하는 계획이 손상이나 교란 없이 수행될 수 있는지 문의했습니다. 그는 괴물이 발견되기 전까지는 1876년 동물 학대 방지법 위반 
Nein, soweit ich weiß, liegt das ganz an 
Roger. Die Wende hat begonn
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 그때는 아무 말도 하지 않았습니다. 지금 몇 가지 사항을 검토하고 있습니다. 앞서 수면 주기 조정에 대한 질문을 하셨는데, 저희는 그 의견에 동의합니다. 달 궤도에 진입할 때쯤에는 수면 주기 등을 고려한 비행 계획
Ja. Das ist der Notizblock, den wir Ihnen gegeben haben, aber wir können unsere Meinung später noch ändern. Wir möchten, dass
ジム、カメラを設置しに行き
我找遍了——我把这边所有地方都找遍了，就
ठीक है, फ्रेडो। इसे एकदम सीधा ऊपर की ओर सेट
さて、ヒュ
제가 그걸 제대로 느끼고 있는 게 아니라고 확신해요. 만약 그랬다면 지금쯤 하늘을 날아다닐 정도로 좋아했을 거예요. 저는 초당 0.5도 이상은 사용해 본 적이
우리는 바로 그 순간 메시에 크레이터들을 수직으로 내려다보며 관찰하고 있었는데, 메시에 A 크레이터 바닥에 꽤 큰 바위들이 보였습니다. 지금 우리의 고도가 얼마인지는 모르겠지만, 어쨌든 그 바위들은 상당히 큰 크
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. نعتقد أن هذه القراءات ضمن الحدود المسموح بها. أردنا فقط الحصول على موافقتكم قبل المضي قدمًا في وضع هذه ال
रॉजर। हमने बैटरी A को चार्ज करना शुरू कर दिया है, और वोल्टेज मेरी उम्मीद से काफी ज़्यादा था। यह लगभग 40 के आसपास था। अब बैटरी चार्ज होल्डर में वोल्टेज थोड़ा कम होता दिख रहा है। कल जब हम बैटरी C को चार्ज कर रहे थे, तब मुझे लगा था कि शुरुआत में वोल्टेज ज़्यादा था
还有，休斯顿，我们想确认一下，您需要在那里输入回
No, 
ठीक है। इंग्लैंड के जोड्रेल बैंक से, एपी के माध्यम से: ब्रिटेन की विशाल जोड्रेल बैंक रेडियो दूरबीन ने आज सुबह 5:49 पूर्वी मानक समय (ईएसटी) पर सोवियत संघ के मानवरहित चंद्र प्रक्षेपण से संकेत प्राप्त करना बंद कर दिया। एक प्रवक्ता ने कहा कि ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि लूना 15 अंतरिक्ष यान "चंद्रमा से आगे निकल गया है।" एक अन्य बयान: वेधशाला के निदेशक सर बर्नार्ड लवेल के प्रवक्ता ने कहा, "हमें नहीं लगता कि यह उतरा है।" वाशिंगटन यूपीआई: उपराष्ट्रपति स्पिरो टी. एग्न्यू ने वर्ष 2000 तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेजने का आह्वान किया है, लेकिन डेमोक्रेटिक नेताओं ने जवाब दिया कि पृथ्वी पर जरूरतों को प्राथमिकता दी जानी चाहिए। बुधवार को अपोलो 11 के प्रक्षेपण के समय उपस्थित वरिष्ठ सरकारी अधिकारी एग्न्यू ने स्पष्ट रूप से अपने लिए बोलते हुए कहा था, न कि निक्सन प्रशासन के लिए, "मेरे विचार में, हमें इस सदी के अंत तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेज देना चाहिए।" लैरेडो, टेक्सास, एपी: नुएवो लैरेडो में आव्रजन अधिकारियों ने बुधवार को घोषणा की कि हिप्पियों को मेक्सिको में प्रवेश के लिए पर्यटक कार्ड नहीं दिए जाएंगे, जब तक कि वे स्नान न कर लें और बाल न कटवा लें। नुएवो लारेडो में मैक्सिकन आव्रजन प्रमुख ह्यूबर्टो काज़ारास ने कहा कि मैक्सिको सिटी, अकापुल्को और अन्य लोकप्रिय पर्यटन स्थलों के अधिकारियों ने हिप्पियों के बारे में शिकायतें दर्ज की हैं। यूनाइटेड प्रेस इंटरनेशनल के अनुसार: राष्ट्रपति निक्सन द्वारा संघीय कर्मचारियों को सोमवार को छुट्टी देने पर शुरुआती प्रतिक्रिया, ताकि वे अपोलो 11 चंद्रमा लैंडिंग मिशन में भागीदारी के राष्ट्रीय दिवस का पालन कर सकें, ज्यादातर आश्चर्य की थी। रॉडनी बिडनर, एसोसिएटेड प्रेस, लंदन एपी: यूरोप अपोलो 11 मिशन से मंत्रमुग्ध है। पूरे महाद्वीप के समाचार पत्रों ने अपने पन्ने सैटर्न वी रॉकेट के पृथ्वी के प्राकृतिक उपग्रह से पहला संपर्क स्थापित करने के लिए उड़ान भरने की तस्वीरों से भर दिए हैं। और शीर्षक लेखकों ने इस उपलब्धि की प्रशंसा करने के लिए शब्दों की भरमार कर दी। फ्रांसीसी समाचार पत्र ले फिगारो ने घोषणा की, "मानव इतिहास का सबसे बड़ा साहसिक कार्य शुरू हो गया है," जिसने केप कैनेडी की रिपोर्टों और मिशन के आरेखों के लिए चार पृष्ठ समर्पित किए। टैब्लॉइड पेरिस जूर ने घोषणा की, "पूरी दुनिया उन्हें वाहवाही दे रही है।" कम्युनिस्ट दैनिक 'ल'हुमनाइट' ने प्रक्षेपण की तस्वीर को प्रमुखता दी और अपने पूरे पिछले पृष्ठ को चंद्रमा पर उत्साहपूर्ण रिपोर्ट के लिए समर्पित किया, जिसमें उलटी गिनती और प्रक्षेपण, अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों की पत्नियों और परिवारों, और चंद्र गतिविधियों की पृष्ठभूमि का वर्णन किया गया था। हैम्पस्टेड, न्यूयॉर्क: पेशेवर फुटबॉल आयुक्त पीटर रोज़ेल के साथ अपने मतभेदों पर अपने साथियों के साथ एक बंद कमरे की बैठक के बाद, जो नामथ ने बुधवार को हॉफस्ट्रा विश्वविद्यालय में न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स प्रशिक्षण शिविर में आधिकारिक तौर पर रिपोर्ट किया। लंदन यूपीआई: बुधवार को हाउस ऑफ लॉर्ड्स को आश्वासन दिया गया कि एक छोटी अमेरिकी पनडुब्बी लोच नेस मॉन्स्टर को "नुकसान या हमला" नहीं करेगी। लॉर्ड नोमे ने कहा कि वह यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि लोच में पनडुब्बी चलाने वाला कोई भी व्यक्ति "इसमें र
Répétez, s'il vous plaît. Allez-y
Apollo 8, 
罗杰。33-1 39 前进，1+04。120 后退，2+30。GMTRC 
ह्य
Roger. Houston, this is Apollo 8. What we are doing on the control point tracking - I managed to look for a -1 at the same time we were trying to do a -2 on this rev. I picked up two marks which are
Tranqui
ロジャー、
Yes, I was. I was using the tether to pull myself down toward the spacecraft and I was right on top of it, as a matter of 
Okay. We'd like the S-BAND
Nous avons aperçu un autre satellite vers 2 h 38 du matin. Il était beaucoup plus éloigné que le précédent. J'ai essayé de 
了解し
자동 녹음이나 수동 녹음 모두 작동하지
Gemini 4, Gemini 4. This is Houst
D'accord, Jim. La chance est avec toi. Le suivi indique que ton angle d'entrée est passé à -6,24. Ce calcul est basé sur toutes les données collectées entre le milie
ठीक है, हम विद्युत जाँच करेंगे। मुख्य बस 24 (वोल्ट) है - पृथ
I'd like to comment a little on the sextant. Its use in a cramped spacecraft is very difficult, particularly with the helmet on. I finally decided it was going to be useless with your helmet on to try to take the angles that the stars, that were being called for, required. So I took my helmet off. This gave me a little more flexibility in using it, but still I was limited to angles of about 20 to 23° without maneuvering the spacecraft. What would happen is the star would be cut out by the upper part of the window. Now, by more frequent and liberal maneuvering of the spacecraft you could maneuver it so that you have the long axis of the window in your tracking plane. We were somewhat limited by fuel and we didn't choose to maneuver in this manner. We used Pulse Mode, too, without a lot of maneuvers. The stars that were selected for that run were ones that had rather high angles so the horizon and, therefore, were very difficult to get. We finally decided to go ahead and get the stars a little closer to the horizon. I ran a couple on Canopus and a couple of others, as you'll notice. The blue filter seemed to block out the horizon totally; I didn't have any horizon when I used that. Our horizon image probably is not as good when there is moonlight. The green filter, though, gave me what I would consider a little clearer horizon than I had with no filter at all. I felt there was not a difficulty in making these measurements with either the green or clear filter. Still, the horizon is not very well defined and you have to kind of standardize yourself and measure on the same part of the horizon that you did before to get some type of a standard measurement. To me it was easier to measure with no filter to the top of the airglow. With 
Okay. Aristarchus befindet sich auf Ihrer ATO-Karte im Winkel Echo 9. Er liegt etwa 394 Seemeilen nördlich der Bahn. In Ihrer aktuellen Höhe von etwa 167 Seemeilen sollte er jedoch bereits über Ihnen sein – also in
0,01,
Ok. Riquadro 162, nessuna modifica. Riquadro 163, nessuna modifica. Ora aggiungi, nel riquadro 20
阿波罗13号，休
Хорошо. И еще одно изменение: вскоре после этого, при настройке на сброс, мы закрыли как передний, так и верхний сливной клапаны. Мы не хотим оказаться в таком заблокированном положении, поэтому один из способов обойти это — после закрытия переднего сливного клапана перекры
Bene, abbiamo b
تبدو الأنظمة على الأرض طب
Okay. Ich befinde mich jetzt in der ATT-HOLD-Phase. Und verstehen Sie meine Argumentationsl
收到。你复制航天器请求
哥伦比亚号，如果你不介意的话，我们希望你保持清醒，直
嘿，吉姆，我们有一些照片方面的信息要跟你汇报。之前跟弗雷德
Great, great
알겠습니다. 이 점을 알려드리고 비행 계획에 어떤 영향을 미칠지 생각해 보시길 바랐습니다. 달에 대한 광각 영상과 설명을 다시 보여드리고 어떤 부분이 가장 적절할지 의견을 들어보겠습니다. 네. 프랭크는 진입 프로필이 표시되는 순서를 확인해 달라고 했습니다. 첫 번째 프로필은 "비출구 2번(Nonexit Number 2)"으로, 단거리 고속 진입 프로필입니다. 두 번째는 "3,500마일(The 3,500 Mile)"로, 역시 고속 진입 프로필이지만 장거리 진입 시 사용하게 됩니다. 세 번째 프로필은 "비출구 1번(Nonexit Entry Number 1)"이고, 그 뒤에 네 번째 3,500마일 프로
体調は良好です。飛行を続けてください。機体は安定しています。窓に地球、空
ठीक है। और आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें कि हमारे सभी आंकड़े 14 एम्पियर की खपत पर आधारित हैं। जबकि हम केवल 12.3 एम्प
Roger. Nous vous serions reconnaissants de bien 
Vorrei fare un piccolo commento sul sestante. Il suo utilizzo in una navicella spaziale angusta è molto difficile, soprattutto con il casco. Alla fine ho deciso che sarebbe stato inutile con il casco per cercare di catturare gli angoli richiesti dalle stelle. Così mi sono tolto il casco. Questo mi ha dato un po' più di flessibilità nell'uso, ma ero comunque limitato ad angoli di circa 20-23° senza manovrare la navicella. Quello che succedeva era che la stella veniva tagliata fuori dalla parte superiore della finestra. Ora, con manovre più frequenti e libere della navicella, si poteva manovrarla in modo da avere l'asse longitudinale della finestra nel piano di inseguimento. Eravamo in qualche modo limitati dal carburante e non abbiamo scelto di manovrare in questo modo. Abbiamo usato anche la modalità a impulsi, senza molte manovre. Le stelle selezionate per quella prova avevano angoli piuttosto elevati rispetto all'orizzonte e, quindi, erano molto difficili da ottenere. Alla fine abbiamo deciso di procedere e di avvicinare le stelle un po' di più all'orizzonte. Ne ho eseguiti un paio con Canopus e un paio con altri, come noterete. Il filtro blu sembrava bloccare completamente l'orizzonte; non avevo orizzonte quando l'ho usato. La nostra immagine dell'orizzonte probabilmente non è altrettanto buona quando c'è la luce della luna. Il filtro verde, invece, mi ha dato quello che considererei un orizzonte un po' più nitido rispetto a quello che avevo senza filtro. Ho pensato che non ci fossero difficoltà nell'effettuare queste misurazioni né con il filtro verde né con quello trasparente. Tuttavia, l'orizzonte non è molto ben definito e bisogna in un certo senso standardizzarsi e misurare sulla stessa parte dell'orizzonte che si era usata prima per ottenere una misurazione standard. Per me è stato più fac
好的。你给他们打个电话；你知道他们
В Хьюстоне все про
مفهوم يا نيل. الموضوع التالي، كما أشرتَ بعد الهبوط مباشرةً إلى وجود تلٍّ غربًا على طول المحور Z الموجب. هل توجد أي صخور كبير
ミッションルールが含まれているものがありますが、
Ja, ich kann im Norden fast bis zum Saltonsee sehen. Die Gegend um den Mount Whitney kann ich erkennen, aber die schneebedeckten Gipfel, die jetzt am Horiz
أب
و11، هيوستن. لدينا طلبٌ لكم. بخصوص صمام ضغط وقود الدف
We've been looking at that, too. It keeps wandering off in pitch for some reason more than yaw. I was just about ready to go back to it again. I had to go back one time, and I was just seeing how far she would drift. I thought it would drift out a ways and come back by itself, but it is not 
रॉजर। फ्रैंक, हमने आपके
ठीक है। अब हमें थोड़ा
हम तैयार है
로저. 더 진행하기
Ich bin nur etwas neugierig, Mike; ich dachte, das wäre schon erledigt. Ich dachte, der Co
휴스턴 아쿠아리우스, 전력
No, è il
छ
C'est négatif, Apollo 8. Nous aimerions d'abo
알겠습니다, 잭. 그 절차는 완료되었고, 다음으로 명령 모듈로 
Bene. La procedura sarà INVIO, 333 INVIO e leggerà il registro 1. Poi 10.000 - la memoria - il computer scaricherà la memoria due volte, come correttamente configurato. In caso contrario, dobbiamo caricare 10.000, e lo facciamo premendo INVIO, 333 INVIO, 10.000 INVIO e INVIO. Ora,
你的声音很清晰
시리우스 아니면
Ok. Sta scendendo. Cos'è? Beh, credo che sia meglio mangiare qualcosa. Ehi, questo ha un po' di quella gelatina candita... sai, siamo stati un sacco di tempo senza dormire. Ho detto che siamo stati un sac
开始——把计时器调到3分钟。你做
알겠습니다. 가능한 시간에 해
- -
네, 알겠습니
Warte
D'accord, Jack. Je vais te le lire, puis ajouter quelques commentaires et nous en discuterons un peu. Cela devrait se produire peu après. Après la remise en service à 49 heures, si le temps le permet, nous aimerions que l'équipage vérifie s'il existe un angle de roulis permettant d'observer la comète pour la photogra
No, sono piuttost
밴스, 책 
لا يوجد أي تغيير، 
알겠습니다. 제 기체는 초당 약 0.5도 정도의 미세한 요잉(yaw) 현상이 있습니다. 송신과 녹음을 동시에 진행하고
요우가 왼쪽으로 갔습니다. 7번이나 8번
休斯顿，11. 在这
Ricevuto. Potresti andare s
Bene. Sembra che stiamo scendendo sul modulo
Jim, de Houston. Je crois que vous venez d'appeler, mais je ne
That is about it as far as the world and national news and the features is concerned. On the sport page, Hank Stram of the Kansas City Chiefs was named as the AFL coach of the year. This is the second time for him in three seasons. The voting was done by an Associated Press panel of 30 sports writers and sportscasters, three from each city. The nearest one to him was Weeb Ewbank. Other coach's that received votes were Sid Gilman of San Diego, and Lou Sabin of Denver. As for the Shriners College All Star game yesterday, the North cooled the South 3 to 0. Michigan State's Dick Berlinsky booted a 23 yard field goal in the first quarter and it was al
Tape playback is on CONTINUO
Okay. We're considering a midcourse correction at 104 hours - about 20 hours from now - 18 hours from now, and it's only 7 feet per second. The other option is to keep up, since we may not be able to get back into it again, and delay it. So, that's the type of thing we're thinking about, but - just wanted to let you know that you're pretty much right in the middle of the fairway there and our present tracking, with no midcourse, has you - with a Gamma of 7.11, as opposed to 6.51. So, you're already in the corridor. You're just a half a degree between the center a
Подождите секунду. В данный момент мы не можем это подтвердить. Мы заметили падение тока, указывающее на то, что несколько двигателей подвеса вышли из строя. Мы вернемся к вам ч
تفضل
If I can get on an aircraft carrier, I 
Перек
Charlie, what
Coder は終了しました。
روجر، سكوت. أنا في وضع الطيران الانسيابي، لكنني شغّلت ناقل التيار المتردد. وقد اتصل بالشبكة بشكل ممتاز. سأشغّل أجهزة الإرسال لاحقًا. وضع التحكم المُختار هو التحكم الإلكتروني، مع أنني لا أتحكم به حاليًا. مفتاح الوضع التلقائي مضبوط على الوضع التلقائي، ومفتاح الجيروسكوب لا يزال مغلقًا. تم اختيار وضعية العودة إلى الغلاف الجوي، والمناورة مُعطّلة. جميع المؤشرات ضمن النطاق الأخضر. درجة حرارة البدلة حوالي 60 درجة. أشعر براحة تامة معها. مؤشرات الكهرباء والتيار المتر
Questo è il tempo trascorso dalla capsula. Ora copieremo il rapporto intermedio manuale e posso f
Apollo 8, en attendant le gain maximal, je vais poursuivre le résumé de la trajectoire. Nous pouvons encore rejoindre la ligne du Pacifique central à partir du treizième point, et vous êtes en route après 138 secondes de combustion. Ces 138 secondes vous permettent de sortir de la zone de correction. Nous recommandons de ne pas tenter de pré-allumage ni de redémarrage après 20 secondes. Au-delà de 20 secondes, la trajectoire pourrait dépasser la capacité de correction pour un retour libre. Les conditions météorologiques dans la zone de récupération sont bonnes. Nous avons un suivi et un sans. Pendant la combustion, vous pourriez remarquer une légère variation de pression dans la chambre et les réservoirs en raison de l'épuisement du carburant dans le réservoir de stockage et de son transfert vers le r
Хорошо. Цель состоит в том, чтобы перенес
Apollo 8, Houston. You are cleared with entry attitude at
Roger. Okay, Jim, abbiamo deciso che ti è rimasto un po' di carburante con cui possiamo giocare qui nel Piano di Volo. Vorremmo che tu passassi alla Modalità Scansione Orizzontali per le prossime 8 ore. Sono 30, e vogliamo che tu usi lo Scanner Primario. Non vogliamo che tu controlli l'imbardata e, se lo scanner perde
收到。复述得很详细。好的，继续。第6页什么都没有；第7页什么都没有。第8页和第9页什么都没有。第10页和第11页什么都没有。
ठी
En fait, nous avons une vue plongeante sur le Cap. On distingue les complexes de lancement en cont
로저, 이글. 상태 벡터를 드렸습니다. 상태
네.
ठीक है, स्कॉट, यहाँ सब कुछ बढ़िया चल रहा है। कूलेंट सिस्टम को ठीक करने की कोशिश करूंगा, और आपकी बात बिल्कुल सही थी। अगर किसी के पास स
र
好的。偏航角为零；俯仰角为-20，高增益
好的。接下来将按照飞行计划进行；
안녕하세요, 물병자리 여러분.
Stiamo esaminando attentamente i profili di consumo d'acqua e al momento le cose stanno andando verso il lasciare acceso e spegnere l'acqua, ma vi daremo maggiori informazioni a breve. E vi consigliamo di lasciare una persona di guardia per dormire. Vi consigliamo di non fare scarichi di urina se potete, perché peggiorerebbe il problema dei detriti di quanto non sia or
아폴로 11호,
로저. 저 그림자 너머의 작은 언덕에는 길쭉한 분화구 두 개가 있는데, 둘을 합치면 길이가 약 4
阿波罗13号，休斯顿。大约1分钟后，我们将失去来自卡纳冯的数据
了解しました。最後の追加質問ですが、その間のボールの様子はどうでしたか？ご存知の通り、設定のアップデ
Roger, Jim. Rechnen Sie einfach damit, dass ein
Роджер. Одна деталь, которую, как мне кажется, вам следует знать о сервисном модуле JETT, заключается в том, что мы будем рекомендовать маневр "тяни-толкай", то есть в том положении, которое я описал. Мы хотим, чтобы вы двигались со скоростью полфута в секунду плюс X, затем сбросили сервисный модуль, а затем двигались со скоростью полфута в секунду минус X, что займет меньше времени, по
Хорошо. Я понимаю, Вэнс. Гораздо проще управлять стрелками, если шарик под
Guaymas
Roger. We'll check this uplink on our voice. That transmission on the TV was - We'd like to get about 10 minutes worth of signal at Goldstone so we can look at the camera quality back here at Houston for about 10 minutes or so when they patch it back into us. What we were saying was that you can
D'accord, Fred. On attendra que la situation soit stabilisée avant de se prononcer. On a une procédure à vous proposer, et on espère qu'elle sera efficace. Je la consulter
我们知道有很多来自不同国家的科学家都在翘首以盼地等待着
Хорошо, Джек. Дай мне проверить, есть ли у меня это. Мы направляем дрон на Землю, как и на средний курс, и выравниваем его по оси тела. Затем ты задаешь нам положение шара, к 
大概30度左右，弗兰
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы готовы перейт
네, 맞습니다,
В тот раз давление в каме
يبدو جيداً. في ذلك الوقت تقريباً، كان بيل
로저. 월리, 이제 훨씬 잘 들리는 것 같네. 아주 좋아. 연료는 62-62%, 산소는 62-95%, 전류는 25A야. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동 중이야. 작동에 약간 문제가 있었어. 야간 조종석 쪽을 껐다 켰는데, 지금은 꽤 잘 작동하는
你想让我给你读些笑话
मुझे लगता है कि इस सामान को रखने में सबसे ज़रूरी बात यह सुनिश्चित करना है कि यह टीईआई के दौरान लगने वाले गुरुत्वाकर्षण बल के लिए उपयुक्त हो और घर लौटते समय हम सब कुछ ठीक
现在我的地平线非常清晰。天色比较亮，地平线主要由云层构成。我能看到云层——星星开始落入大气层，但云层似乎让地平线显得更明亮。这和我们之前看到的无云地平线截然不同——当时的地平线被
ठीक है। उपभोग्य सामग्रियों का अपडेट 46 प्लस 00 के लिए: माइनस 5.5 प्रतिशत, माइनस 6.5 
Roger. Potrebbe essere un po' difficile. Ora diamo un'occhiata al tunnel. Sembra che, tra la terra, ci fosse un 
ठीक है, चार्ली। यह ज़्यादा खुला नहीं है। इसे दोबारा शंट किए बिना सही रीडिंग देना मुश्किल है, लेकिन तीर लगभग एक बजे की स्थिति में है। अब मैं प्रवाह कम करता हूँ, और इसे यहीं स्थिर होने देता ह
... Glas hier, mal sehen, ob
はい、その通りです。軌道調整とタイムハックが完了すれば、こちらにいる優秀なス
スラスタを発射するたびに、S1とS2の電圧が低下します。まあ、珍し
Okay, Jim. The way I thought it might be best to do it would be to have you gather the equipment and let us talk you through your procedure while you do it. Now, maybe you could give Jack the headset and - and - get the equipment together, and we'll talk you through the pro
Nos mesures télémétriques indiquent une attitude de tan
Okay, Jack. Das ist richtig. Gehen Sie zu Seite 1-7. ELEKTRONIK-STROMVERSORGUNG AUS; SIGNALKONFORMATIER/TREIBER-BIASIS 1 und 2 AUS; und STROMVERSORGUNG, beide AUS; und DIREKTES O2-
11番、こちらヒュース
Usually ju
휴스
L'Apollo 11 sta osservando per la prima volta l'avvicinamento. Questa volta sorvoleremo il cratere Taruntius, e le immagini e le mappe riportate dagli Apollo 8 e 10 ci han
알았어. 짐이 아쿠아리우
好吧，我认
Roger. De retour en mode AUTO, et 29 degrés est la température la 
ذراع المحر
At 3 minutes. Fuel and oxygen are still steady; cabin is holding 5.8 [psia]. Power still looks good; my status i
حسنًا. لم أكن متأكدًا من أننا كنا في صف واحد. شكر
Apollo 11, this is Houston. We would like you to terminate charging on 
لا، لا أراها هنا في هذا الجانب. رأيتُ القليل منها فقط بعد مغادرتي قاعدة كانافيرال مباشرةً واستدارتي للأمام. كانت تقترب مني حينها. كنت
Apollo 13
Here is a feature by Harry Rosenthal of Associated from Houston. Two Santas brighten the Christmas Eve for 2-year-old Jeffrey Lovell. The first one knocked on his front door and brought presents. The second started his daddy home from the moon. The first wore a red suit and a white beard and ho, ho'd loud enough to be heard down the block. The second was a huge engine spitting flame behind the moon, and thousands of people were awaiting word that it had fired. "Please be informed that there is a Santa Claus" were the first words from Apollo 8 as it emerged from radio silence to inform an anxious world 15 minutes after the fact that the engine had performed its critical burn. "None of us ever expect to have a better Christmas present than this one," said Ken Mattingly of Mission Control. "Thank everyone on the ground for us. You know we couldn't have done it without you," came the reply from Col. Frank Borman, the spacecraft commander. At this point, a Christmas tree came aglow in front of the consoles in Mission Control, and Astronaut Harrison Schmidt read a space version of "A visit from Saint Nicholas" to the crew. "Twas the night before Christmas, and way out in space, the Apollo 8 crew had just won the moon race," it began. The Mission Control crew had delayed the celebration until Jeffrey's daddy, Navy Captain James Lovell, along with Air Force Major William A. Anders and Col. Borman were safely on their way home. Any other Christmas Eve, the families of the astronauts would have been in church for Christmas services, but this year they were all glued to their television sets. The homes all near the Manned Spacecraft Center were decorated. The lawns around the Lovell home and throughout his community of Timber Cove were lined with Mexican style luminarios, and the four Lovell 30. They 00, a car drove up carrying a tall Santa Claus with a large sack on his
了解。その通り。エンジンを切った時はカウントアップしていました。前回見た時は6.9でした。フランクがファンクションスイッチを入れたまま再びAUTOにしたところ、0.6秒上がりました。2回目に試してみたら、0秒のままだった
Stiamo 
물병자리
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다.
D'a
Хо
Хорошо. Отличная идея. Мы много размышляли над тем, какие маневры вам разрешить выполнить для фотографирования, я имею в виду, сервисного модуля. Мы считаем это довольно низким приоритетом; есть ощущение, что получить фотографии сервисного модуля было бы очень полезно, но они не требуются для нашей программы поиска и устранения неисправностей. Что касается управления ориентацией и так далее, мы сообщим вам более подробную информацию позже; мы работаем над этим. Похоже, что использование ACA вместо JETT после сервисного модуля обеспечит вам отличное управление 
Roger. Je vois que
收到。休斯顿，阿波罗11
That was in the 009° attitude. 10 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। रीड
Sì. I transienti erano più evidenti rispetto alle accensioni precedenti, Charlie. L'ho semplicemente attribuito al fatto che avevamo un modulo di comando leggero, ma c'era una considerevole attività di rollio che si è attenuata dopo i primi 20 secondi, direi, dell'accensione; poi c'era anche un po' di attività di beccheggio e imbardata. Non credo fosse anormale, e sembrava che le bande morte fossero piuttosto nette in rollio più o meno 8 gradi da entrambi i lati della linea centrale; e dopo i primi due - oh, dopo i primi 20 secondi circa, i gimbal erano silenziosi, e beccheggio e imbardata erano relativamente silenziosi. Prima 
休斯顿，
Да. Он будет находиться примерно на терминаторе REV 20, поэтому сфотографировать его вы сможете только на позднем этапе вашей работы на лунной о
どうぞ.
你确实坐在最显眼的
हाँ, सही है। मैं इस पैराशूट पर बिल्कुल भी नहीं चल पा रहा हूँ। ठीक है, मैंने वो बेकार सा विज़र होज़ नि
加油
그쪽이 맞는 방향이야. 계속
हवाई। आपकी आवाज़ टूटी-फूटी आ रही है। मैं आपको पढ़ नहीं पा रहा 
Хорошо, Джим. А как насчет 61 часа и 30 минут? Это через час и 
रॉजर। हर बार जब मैंने इसकी सर्विसिंग की, तो भाप का दबाव लगभग 0.07 से 0.1 तक बढ़ गया; लेकिन जैसे ही भाप और पानी को ऑटो मोड पर सेट किया गया, भाप का दबाव तुरंत वा
好
阿波罗8号，
ل
Ja, dieses Wasserstoffproblem – ich bin mir nicht sicher, aber ich glaube, es liegt am Gegendruck. Sobald auch nur ein kleiner Gegendruck entsteht, zum Beispiel wenn der Beutel angeschlossen ist, sinkt die Durchflussrate langsam auf fast null. Man wartet und wartet und wartet auf den letzten Tropfen. Man denkt, man hat ihn, entfernt den Beutel und sieht dann sehr schnell einen Tropfen, etwa so
最近見た月の景色は本当に壮観です。ハッチの窓の4分の3ほどが月で覆われていて、一部は完全に
रॉजर। आपकी बात कमजोर है, लेकिन आप बहुत स्पष्ट हैं। स्थिति बेहतर हो रही है। क्या आ
हेलो ह्यूस्टन, 
Und einer der Vorteile, Jack, besonders für einen Neuling wie mich, ist die Bewegungsfreiheit hier. Wie du ja vom Kommandomodul-Simulator weißt, ist die Schwerelosigkeit ein echter Segen. Denn bei 1 g ist die Bewegungsfreiheit ziemlich eingeschränkt, und hier ist es viel einfacher. Wie du siehst, war alles recht sauber. Ich habe ein paar lose Unterlegscheiben gefunden, und eine kleine Plastikkappe der Sequenzkamera hatte sich gelöst und lag neben dem ED-Panel. Okay. Direkt unter Jim steht er auf etwas, das wie eine Dose aussieht. Und für alle da hinten: In dieser Dose befindet sich das Aufstiegstriebwerk, auf dem hoffentlich meine Hand ruht – das Triebwerk, mit dem wir vom Mond absteigen. Direkt neben der Triebwerksabdeckung liegt meine Hand auf einem weißen Kasten, den wir schon einmal gezeigt haben. Das hier ist Jims Rucksack, der uns auf der Mondoberfläche mit Sauerstoff und Wasser zur Kühlung versorgt. Wir hoffen, ihn 
سنقدم المزيد من ا
هل تريد معرفة ما يجري في العالم؟ حسناً، فاز فريق أستروس على سينسيناتي بنتيجة 8-3. وسجل راستي ستاوب ضربة هوم رن. وفي فريق الأولاد، فاز فريق هوكس على فريق فالكونز بنتيجة 3-2. حصل مايك على قاعدتين مجانيتين، وبقي على القاعدة مرة واحدة، وأُجبر على الخروج - وأُجبر على الانتقال إلى القاعدة الثانية في المرة ا
好的。我们已经考虑了所有可能的情况。我们能想到的最坏情况是你的3σ误差脱靶距离——最坏情况是70海里。没错，就是70。我们希望你进行一次OAMS反推机动；然后我们会进行手动反推，当然，不使用电脑。我们希望
D'accord, les deux vannes de régulation de la demande d'oxygène sont OFF et la vanne de reto
罗杰。我
١١، هيوس
हाँ, मुझे पता है; उन संख्याओं का कोई मतलब नहीं 
Hawaï, la température de notre maillot de bain est d'environ 59 degrés. Ça a 
Apollo 8,
هذا ك
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはイン
Roger, Neil. Per iniziare: messaggi di congratulazioni per la missione Apollo 11 sono arrivati ​​alla Casa Bianca a fiumi per tutto il giorno dai leader mondiali. Tra gli ultimi, i telegrammi del Primo Ministro Harold Wilson di Gran Bretagna e del Re del Belgio. La stampa mondiale è stata dominata dalle notizie sull'Apollo 11. Alcuni giornalisti stimano che oltre il 60% delle notizie pubblicate oggi sui giornali di tutto il paese riguardasse la vostra missione. Il New York Times, che, come abbiamo già detto, ha avuto una tale richiesta per la sua edizione odierna (nonostante la tiratura di 950.000 copie), ha dichiarato che ristamperà l'intero articolo giovedì come edizione ricordo. E il Primo Ministro Alexei Kosygin ha inviato congratulazioni a voi e al Presidente Nixon tramite l'ex Vicepresidente Humphrey, in visita in Russia. Anche i cosmonauti hanno rilasciato una dichiarazione di congratulazioni. Humphrey ha citato Kosygin: "Voglio che diciate al Presidente e al popol
Aujourd'hui, à Houston, l'actualité sportive est marquée par la victoire des Astros. Dans le monde du sport, les Astros de Houston ont renversé la situation en neuvième manche à Cinci
Джим, две вещи. Мы
了解しました。もう一度言います。アルファ225、74%。ブラボー240ポンド、79%。チャーリー236、78%。デルタ238、19%。テレビでお
Roger. Point suivant: le taux de montée en pression de l'hélium supercritique est nominal. Vous nous avez également interrogés sur l'activité de vos propulseurs lors de la dernière rotation. Nous comprenons maintenant: vous avez indiqué que le tangage était en mode ACCEL COMMAND et le lacet et le roulis en mode RATE COMMAND. Vous actionniez vos propulseurs de tangage
Das ist bejahend. Das Fahrwerk ist ausgefahren und
Je m'e
روجر، جيم. نريد أن نعيد إنشاء نسخة احتياطية قابلة للمسح من ذاكرة جهازك، كما فعلنا قبل يومين. السبب هو أنك عندما قمت بذلك قبل حوالي ثماني ساعات، تتذكر أنك خصصت هذا الوقت وحصلت على تلك النتيجة؛ نريد - لا نعتقد أن هناك أي مشكلة في ذلك. نعتقد أن كل شيء على ما يرام داخل الجهاز، لكننا نريد إنشاء نسخة احتياطية قابلة للمسح كما فعلنا قبل يومين؛ لنفحصه
नमस्कार,
...딱 맞는 종류의 영화
Okay. Try it again, now, Ja
هناك إكليل الشمس الجنوبي الصغير، الذي قررنا استخدامه كمعيار للمعايرة. إنه أمامي الآن، ويصل سطوعه إلى النجوم من الرتبة الخامسة، ويمكنني رؤية نجوم ذات قدر ظاهري أقل بكثير من نجوم إكليل الشمس 
D'accord. Nous pouvons reporter cette observation NAV. Elle était prévue à cette heure-ci, et nous pouvons la reporter. Vu vos commentaires concernant le sommeil, nous aimerions l'effectuer dès que possible, et pour l'instant, nous prévoyons de la décaler de deux heures. Nous la reporterons à la mê
了解、グアイマス。ブースターはまだ残っています。かなり離れた場所
Хьюстон, не могли бы вы подсказать нам углы наклона карданного подвеса, чтобы направить его на Луну? Я ни разу не видел её за всю поездку, и мне интересно, в каком направлении она сейчас находится от 
Д
Das hat uns den 
鹰，休斯
看来我们已经基本脱离台风区域了。我再往外走
네, 여기 정말 믿기 힘들 정도로 큰 무스가 있어요. 지금까지 본 것 중에 제일 큰 녀석이에
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Vorremmo che selezionaste la modalità REACQ sull'antenna ad alto guadagno. Sembra che
ر
ثم نود منك وضع الكاميرا على النافذة بحيث يكون مقدمتها خارج
フレンドシップセブン、あなたの最後の通信は中断さ
حسنًا. نريد منك الضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER)، ثم 333 ثم ENTER، وبعد ذلك نريد منك قراءة السجل رقم 1. نتوقع أن تكون قيمة السجل رقم 1 هي 10000، وإذا كانت هذه القيمة تساوي 10000، فهذا يعني أن الكمبيوتر سيقوم ب
휴스턴, 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. VHF 무전기로
D'a
Bei E mi - 02:30, während der Trennung von der Stromversorgung über die Versorgungs
Водолей, Хьюстон. Громко и я
Роджер, Нил. Начнём: Весь день в Белый дом непрерывно поступают поздравительные сообщения от мировых лидеров по поводу миссии «Аполлон-11». Среди последних — телеграммы от премьер-министра Великобритании Гарольда Уилсона и короля Бельгии. Мировая пресса была полностью посвящена новостям об «Аполлоне-11». По оценкам некоторых журналистов, более 60 процентов новостей, опубликованных сегодня в газетах по всей стране, касались вашей миссии. «Нью-Йорк Таймс», которая, как мы уже упоминали, столкнулась с таким высоким спросом на свой сегодняшний выпуск (несмотря на тираж в 950 000 экземпляров), заявила, что перепечатает его целиком в четверг в качестве памятного издания. А премьер-
Хьюстон, если вашим клиентам понадобится дополнительная помощь, просто скажите им, чтоб
罗杰。不适用，加上 00202、02356 022 02280 03 0393 310 013，向上 048，向右 35 - 我
Roger. Ti capi
Roger. Je vous suis depuis un certain temps. J'ai essayé de vous contacter par HF sans succès. Mon état est bon; l'état de la capsule est 
コロンビア、ヒューストン。コピーの準備ができたら、最
Columbia, Houston. Nous vous communiquerons une mise à jour sur la situation des vecteurs de transmission un peu plus tard. Nous ne sommes pas encore prêts. Par ailleurs, depuis la base Tranquility, ils sont prêts à lancer leurs opérations DEPRESS plus tôt que 
Bene,
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Вы летите на луч
I - clip it to that - clip up 
はい。すべて順調そうで
私
Okay, sie wollen, dass du ihn weckst, damit er dir bei MSC-1 hilft, wenn du ihn brau
Ok, 13; Houston. Correzione. Si parte per SEP all'ora nominale e - o più tardi. Non vogliamo che 
حسناً. لا
D'accord. De plus, Jack, étant donné que nous avons u
Non, je n'ai rien vu. J'ai examiné le joint torique et je ne pense pas que le problème vienne de là. Je crois que c'est… J'ai remarqué, lors de mo
Roger, zurück auf 1,5 g. Der Turm feuerte; ich konnte den Turm nicht un
Роджер. Зона 57
حسنًا. يا إلهي، لم نستخدم سوى القليل من الفيلم. بالطبع يوجد 130 قدمًا ب
남
Do yo
好的，弗雷德。请注意，只有LMP的红色软管实际连接到了集尘袋上。在这种情况下，请按照以下步骤将另一根红色软管插入另一个集尘袋：在集尘袋的一个角上剪一个斜口。看看另一个集
لم يت
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。現在HFです。通信が安定していれば、UHFに切り替
Gemi
D'accord. Vous le déplacez maintenant vers le centre de l'écran, et la Terre se tro
Tant mie
Okay, Jim. Once again I hear you talking back ther
一切正常，我来快速汇报一下。燃油量为29-27%。舱压为5.5，舱内空气温度为88华氏度，相对湿度为33%；冷却液量为58%，舱内温度为71华氏度，宇航服温度为71华氏度，宇航服压力为5.8，宇航服内蒸汽温度为53华氏度，主供氧量
Okay, Jim, that concludes our powerdown procedure, and we're waiting for 
好的，杰克
Roger. Houston, doppelte 
Ricevuto. 18:
你可以在这里运行一段时间。哦，你只是想留一些空间用
了解。しばらく前から連絡を取っています。HFで連絡を取ろうとしましたが、繋がりませんでした。私の状態は良好です。カプセルの状態も良好です。操縦モードはフライ・バイ・ワイヤ、ジャイロはケージド、マニューバはオフ
Хорошо. И ещё кое-что на заметку: вы сейчас находитесь на маршруте 137 915, а разогнали только 4883. Возможно, сто
Apollo 11, Houston. Cinq minutes avant. Concernant votre demande de pression des bouteilles d'azote avant la mise à feu, juste avant l'allumage, nous avions 2 270
わかった。ジェリー、次にいつ捨てるのか教えてくれ。
Hallo Muchea Com Tech. Roger. Ic
Je le ferais s'il y avait de la plac
Хорошо, Джек. Давайте обсудим, как я буду определять положение аппарата, а затем выполнять маневры. Я говорю о методах управления. Сейчас я пытаюсь остановить космический аппарат по рысканию, когда Земля находится за окном, затем мы переходим в режим наведения или управления; мы будем находи
了解、グアイマス。こちらはジェミ
Хорошо, Фред. На этом мы заканчиваем обзор дельта-факторов. И, возможно, вы слышали, что наши гамма-факторы по-прежнему составляют минус 6,03, а н
Tr
Bene. E vorrei il quadrato della griglia di questo cratere 130 primo. Passo
Nein. Wir haben nichts ge
Вы когда-нибудь со
Hello, Tr
ठीक है। मैंने एक चमकीले तारे का पीछा किया, और मुझे लगता है कि वह एक्विला तारामंडल में है। वास्तव में, मुझे पूरा यकीन है। मैं दोनों लक्ष्य तारों को द
जिम, आप स्थानीय समयानुसार लगभग 8 बजे समोआ से लगभग 560 मील दक्षिण-पूर्व में उतरेंगे। क्षेत्र के लिए मौसम का पूर्वानुमान अच्छा है; 1500 फीट ऊंची, छिटपुट, टूटी-फूटी लहरें, 10 मील की दृश्यता। समुद्र में 5 फुट ऊंची लहरें और 15 नॉट की गति होगी, और आप नाव और/या विमान से समोआ जाएंगे। आप या तो नाव पर या समोआ में रात बित
Vou
Jack affirme qu'il pense pouvoir
Fas
Ok. Siamo ancora in buone condizioni per qua
Хорошо. Автоматические выключатели 16, автоматический выключатель усилителя мощности
就中间那根导联。我去问医生正确的术语。稍等。
Roger. Understand they want us to take areas of terrain wherever it is visible, and not to wait until the last day. Be advised we would like to save some film, though, until we get the opportunity to make a pass across the Southwester
Да, это так. Но оно не
Ok
Giusto. Ti ho preso. Nodo 01 07 13; Rev 1, 159.1; 16 più 00, ascensione rett
Bene. E chiudi i collegamenti di alimentazione della batteria, il carico di bilanciamento del crosstie e apri il bus del crosstie. Chiudi i tre successivi; apri il controllo dell'ECA di salita, l'ECA di salita e l'INVERTER 1. Chiudi la t
Warum tust
Okay. Im Rest Ihres Updates hieß es, dass ein Druck zwischen 660 und 770 psi in Ordnung sei. Liegt er über 770 psi, bitten Sie uns, nach 59 Betriebsstunden erneut vorbeizuschauen und entweder das PCM zu aktivieren oder Ihnen anhand der Messwertänderunge
Ok. Abbiamo avuto alcuni problemi con i nostri display e credo che ora siano risolti, ma potresti doverci tenere informati se dovessimo superare i limiti nel caso in cui dovessim
はい。太陽がレンズに入ってきそうなので、カメラを少し離す
रॉजर। गुब्बारा लगभग 100 डिग्री के चाप में दोलन कर रहा है। य
من واشنطن: "في عيد الميلاد هذا، يُشرق العالم بأمل السلام. وعندما يتحقق، عندما يتحول الأمل إلى واقع وتهدأ البنادق من جديد، سيأتي ذلك لأنكم سعيتم إليه بشجاعة ومه
로저. 저희는 더 이상 우주선에서 방출되는 입자가 보이지 않습니
どうしてそこにある
はい、わかりました。こちらではサーマル状況を
프렌드십 
È molto impegnato in rollio, ma si mantiene nella sua zona morta. Sembra che si mantenga invece di più o meno 5, più simile a più o meno 8. È possibile che abbiamo un problema al propulsore di rollio, ma se così fosse, lo sta eliminando. Non ha senso preoccu
提示卡是没有的。相信我，我们没想过要和专业人士竞争。不过，我们在这里感觉很舒服。我们就像住在一个温馨的家。这里空间足够我们三个人住，而且我觉得我们都在慢慢找到自己最喜欢的小角落。零重力环境很舒服，但时间长了，你就会
Et Ken, si ton gars veut jouer au jeu OMNI-switch, on est sur Dog - Bravo pour le moment, enfin, sur Bravo mais aussi configuré pour D - corr
Roger. Qui sembra andare un po' megli
Роджер. Ниже приведено описание работы панели: предохранители на левой панели работают так же, как и сообщалось ранее, без повторения. Пирогаситель активирован. Автоматическое реверсирование выключено. Выбор режима в обычном режиме, автоматический, гиромотор в обычном режиме. Все Т-образные рукоятки выдвинуты. Задержка реверсирования в обычном режиме, освещение кабины включено. Красные фильтры, конечно, включены. Низкочастотный телеметр включен. Система помощи при аварийном восстановлении в автоматическом режиме. Все элементы панели управления работают нормально, за исключением посадочного меш
mode NOR
ठीक है। जैक, हम आपको जल्द ही अपडेट भेज देंगे
구름을 보고 있어요. 착륙 지
La loro efficienza varia da quasi perfetta a pessima, a seconda delle caratteristiche individuali dei sacch
알겠습니다. 
Давление кислорода там, сзади, п
まあ、前回 10 分ほど機械的な停止に遭遇したかどうかは定かではないので、今回それを実行するのは
Tout à fait. Notre chirurgien so
ठीक है। मैं टीवी पर नकल करने के
هذا صحيح، ل
わかった。容器を持ってきた
هل أنت مستعد
روجر. منظر الأرض من هنا رائع حقاً. نستطيع رؤية باجا كاليفورنيا، ومكان سان دييغو
はい、CTE、2、オープン
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We switched the antennas on you again. Would you ple
أوه، ما زال أم
아폴로 8호, 데이터는 확보했습니다
لم ألاحظ أي خلل في الهيكل. تبدو وحدات التحكم بحالة جيدة. الدعامات الرئيسية والثانوية بحالة جيدة. جميع الهوائيات مثبتة في مكانها. لا يوجد أي دليل على وجود مشكلة أسفل الهيكل بسبب عادم المحرك أو أ
Роджер. Я на связи с OMNI, Ча
Okay. coarse aline
D'accord. Pourquoi ne pas remettre le véhicule en position d'attente et le remettre en mode maintien d'attitude pour le roulement? Nous allons ensuite réexaminer les exigences. Il semble que les résultats soient sensiblement les mêmes à chaque fois, d'après une analyse rapide. Nous allons donc vérifier à nouveau s'il est
罗杰。我们检查和重新核对入境清单所花的时间比我想象的要长一些
罗杰。版本 57，序列 16，08:11，偏航角 12°，俯仰角 30°，16 毫米相机。版本 58，序列 12，09:36，偏航角 3°，俯仰角 3
尼尔，我们完成的时候显示
あ
了解。待機してください。電圧と
Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили поворот на 90 градусов. Внимательно следите за углом наклона центрального карданного подвеса. Вы примерно в 30 градусах от фиксации карданного подве
حسنًا. بالنسبة للألوان، تبدو المياه زرقاء ملكية تقريبًا؛ أما السحب، فهي بيض
Хорошо. «Аполлон-11» остается 
Weiter nördl
अगर हमें कोई समस्या आती है, ठीक वैसी ही समस्या, जो पीछे की तर
Die Bewohner von Seattle (Washington), Portland (Oregon), Vancouver (British Columbia) und San Francisco an der Westküst
Molto bene, mol
글이 좀 끊어져 있지만 읽을 수
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। राष्ट्रपति के साथ विदेश मंत्री विलियम रॉजर और फ्रैंक बोरमैन भी होंगे। वे प्रशांत बलों के कमांडर एडमिरल जॉन सिडनी मैक्केन जूनियर के साथ राहत पोत के पुल से जलप्रपात देखेंगे। हॉर्नेट पर कुछ समय बिताने के बाद, राष्ट्रपति एशिया के अपने दौरे और रोमानिया की निर्धारित यात्रा के लिए रवाना होंगे। माना जा रहा है कि लूना 15 कल चंद्रमा के 52 चक्कर लगाने के बाद संकट सागर में गिर गया। सोवियत समाचार एजेंसी TASS ने बताया कि "चंद्रमा के निकट अंतरिक्ष में वैज्ञानिक अनुसंधान किया गया।" जोड्रेल बैंक वेधशाला के सर बर्नार्ड लवेल ने कहा कि लूना 15 लगभग 300 मील प्रति घंटे की गति से चंद्रमा की सतह से टकराया। हाल ही में वियतनाम में अपेक्षाकृत शांति रही है। गश्त पर तैनात सैनिकों को ट्रांजिस्टर रेडियो लिए हुए देखा गया, जिन पर आपकी उड़ान का प्रसारण चल रहा था। वियतनाम में सशस्त्र बलों के रेडियो और टीवी नेटवर्क ने मिशन का पूरा कवरेज किया। स्वेज नहर के किनारे मिस्र और इजरायल के बीच झड़पें अभी भी जारी हैं। वहां मौजूद संयुक्त राष्ट्र के पर्यवेक्षक कार्रवाई 
ヒューストン、ハッチの整合性検査は合格しま
收到。目前，我们……而且断断
Поскольку мы этого не делаем — мне не ясно, не сталкивались ли мы с механическими препятствиями в прошлый раз. Возможно, это объясняет 10 минут из тех 15, и нет смысла испытывать судьбу. Думаю, если сигнал снова 
프렌드십 세
Ah, les
우리가 보기에, 아직 실행 중인 시스템에 진입하기 전에 지울 수
ठीक है, जैक।
쿼드 브라보, 맞습니
Okay, Odyssey; Houston.
Je pense que lors de cette mission de suivi, en utilisant la carte du monde et la carte détaillée de la région du Caire-Alexandrie, nous avons pu repérer l'aér
وهذا غير صحيح أيضاً. الجيروسكوبات تعمل بشكل جيد، لكنها في وضع الاستعداد 
之前一直都是这样，但这次我猜我太累了，所以就没戴
Your command module film seems to be working out pretty well, Charlie, the amount we carried. Lo
Okay. Das ist gut. Ich warte kurz, bis sie aufstehen, oder zumindest Jack. Er sollte vor Fred a
Quello che sta facendo è cercare di darvi un'altra foto della Luna, e in questo momento sto impostando la piattaforma di man
Okay. You can get those configures when you can. And the next order of business I've got for you is a p
كانت ACS تسير ع
Bon, je ne peux pas me placer derrière pour voir l'écran. Je vais faire
जी हां। एक मिनट रुकिए; हम 6.13 और 4.80 की बात कर 
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 혹시 작
是的。好的，我现在要把它们关掉，看看会发生什么。好的。主电源已关闭。在我们开启高流量氧气供应的七分钟里，它一直开着。好的，三个小时
오로라 세븐, 몸은 어떠세요? 체온이 약
Ricevuto. Capisco, nessun problema. A 6 metri di distanza. Uso le luci di 
Это утвердител
着陸後のチェックリスト。パラシュート
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 잔지바르 콤 테크입니다. HF UHF 대역에서 송신 중입니다. 들리십니까?
Roger, Seven. Per la terza orbita ti consigliamo di usare i giroscopi come preferisci, normali o li
了解しました。AC電源が供給されていることを確認してください。つまり、INVERTER 2が選択され、BUS TIE INVERTER 2 AC BUS Aが閉じていることを確認してください。FLIGHT DISPLAYS、GASTA、COMMANDER、CLOSEDの状態
Всё это 
Ora hai proprio ragione, Fran
원래 그렇게 들리도록 만들어진 거예요
さて、新しい話題に移ります。PTTの再初期化をお願いしたいのですが…なぜ
上公交车后，我把它关掉，电压显示为0伏。
Bene, fan
Salut Ed, tu sais qu'on a toujours dit qu'on allait faire une rentrée en boucle ouverte. Je suis bien plus cont
Attitudes are of no concern to me whatsoever. I know I'm drifting freely. The mo
Roger. Rapport de situation. Je vous ai envoyé un test sanguin. Tous les systèmes sont opérationnels, sauf le circuit de la combinaison, sur lequel je travaille avec précaution. Je suis en rétroposition; gyroscopes normaux; manœuvre désactivée. Je travaille sur le circuit de la combinaison. Je maintiens t
はい
حسناً. ممتا
Ok. Tra poco vi darò un aggiornamento sui materiali di consumo, e più tardi avrò un piccolo aggiornamento su
로저. CMP가 잠시 휴식을 취하고 있으며, LMP도 곧 하락할 예정이니 참고하시기 바랍니
रॉज
了解。回復の見込みはどれくらいで
Houston, Apollo 11. L'ho fatto e, ovviamente, 
良い
Сложно сдел
Residuals on the burn were 80 - were all zeros. 81 at one-tenth and 82 at one-tenth, 
Ok, Fred, non riesco più a sentirti a causa del rumore di fondo. Immagino che... credo di aver sentito Jack dirti cosa faremo riguardo alle COMUNICAZIONI. UPLINK SQUELCH, spento. Tu ti occuperai delle antenne perché non possiamo vedere il tuo assetto. Ti faremo un controllo vocale quando salirai. Ci vorranno dai 3 ai 5 minuti per salire. E per renderl
네. 모드 
Apollo 11, ici Hou
Votre TR est en cours de décompte. Le nôtre est en cours de 
Q
Ох, вот незадача, я сейчас оказался в перевернутом положе
रॉजर। यहाँ फैली दरारें या भ्रंश दक्षिण की ओर लगभग तीन चरणों में नीचे उतरती हैं। उत्तर में समानांतर भ्रंश पैटर्न के बीच में एक ढलान है। मुझे आशा है कि पृथ्वी पर मौजूद आप सभी समझ 
알겠습니다. 실제로 기계식 정지점에 도달했는지 확실하지 않지만, 만약 도달했다면 담당자들이 최대 15분 동안은 손상 없이 정지점에 고정된 상태를 유지할 수 있다고 합니다. 그리고 현재 상태 그대로 한 번 더 테스트를 진행해 보고 싶습니다. OMNI 장비는 고비트 전송률 기능을 지원하므로, 동일한
إيجل، هيوستن. هل يمكنك أن تعطينا فكرة عن مكان
Okay, here we come. Entry pad: Mid-Pacific, 000153; 000. The next two lines will be the of moonset and the Moon-check attitude; , 178; NOUN 61, minus 21.66, minus ; 00:28. The next four are N/A; DO is 4.00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353.1, 29.9. Boresight star is Sigma Libra, down 08.8, left 0.4; lift vector up. for entry alinement
Bene. Ora siamo al lavoro con la borsa, e il prossimo passo da compiere è prepararsi a mettere il tubo rosso della tuta, quello del comandante o quello dell'LMP perché... vorremmo che alla fine li abbiate entrambi preparati, nella parte superiore della borsa, e per farlo, prima di tutto, dovete assicurarvi che... che il tubo rosso sia separato da quello blu. Non so se questo è già stato fatto, ma se non lo è, quello che dovete fare è tagliare la guaina esterna in tessuto Beta per tutta la lunghezza dei tubi e poi tagliare anche le fascette di gomma che li tengono insieme, e i t
D'accord. Nous recopions les points 39.3 et 1.20. Jim, j'ai une dernière information pour toi. Dans environ 45 minutes, le voyant d'avertissement de niveau d'eau s'allumera sur le réservoir de descente. C'est normal. Cela se produit à 16 %. Ce n'est pas un problème, car nous allons vider le réservoir à titre d'exercice. Pour réinitialiser le voyant, sur le panneau 2, il suffit de régler le contrôleur de niveau d'eau sur la p
그리고 제가 새로운 짐을 드리겠
否定的
Вскоре 
로저. 027 44 5363, 마이너스 165 073 14 037 44 8016, 마이너스 165 072 46; 046 44 6141, 마이너스 165 097 03 055 44 8209, 마이너스 165 096 42. 다시 
Ok. Questa è l'ultima cosa che ho tralasciato. E mentre aspettiamo di decidere, lasciatemi continuare. La banda morta considerata accettabile è compresa tra 660 e 770 psi. In altre parole, qualsiasi tempo di salita che vi dia una pressione compresa tra queste due, vi manterrà al di sotto della pressione critica a circa 103 ore. Quindi, ci aspettiamo che la lettura sia compresa in quella banda e, se così fosse, non ci saranno problemi. Se la lettura è
حسناً. تم الانتهاء من عمليات التحقق من الضوابط، وتم الانتهاء من قائمة التحقق من الإدخال أي
Solo un commento casuale. Abbiamo guardato fuori e ci è sembrato di vedere l'orizzonte. Si è scoperto che era ovviamente un c
Okay, Jack. Das spielt keine Rolle. Wir werden den Tu
Oka
- - なぜなら、
जड़त्वीय पर रॉजर। और अब हम 2 पैड पर चलते हैं। 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, प्लस 166, माइनस 081; TIG 080 11 3603. संज्ञा 81: माइनस 01408, सभी गेंदों को घटाकर, माइनस 00743. सभी गेंदों को रोल करें, 196 359 00657, प्लस 00537. डेल्टा-VT 01592 017 01531. सेक्स्टेंट तारा 23 1160 138. पैड का शेष भाग अनुपलब्ध है। संरेखित करें, वेगा और डेनेब 243 183 012. उलेज, दो जेट 19 सेकंड। टिप्पणी: आपके लोड पर, हम उड़ान योजना में दिखाई देने वाले मान के बजाय R1 20101 चाहते हैं। सेक्स्टेंट स्टार चेक करते समय, यह 79:30:10 के बीच किया जाना चाहिए, जिस समय तारा क्षितिज के ऊपर आता है, और 79:52:10 के बीच, जो आपके स्थानीय सूर्योदय का समय है क्योंकि यह तारा सूर्य के अपेक्षाकृत निकट है। आपका बर्न ओरिएंटेशन हेड डाउन है, रेट्रोग्रेड, स्थान
You're about 1,100 f
We're going to run our first real S-6 now, rather S-5, which will be a series of 35 photographs on the 32nd Re
コロンビア、ヒューストン。これらの座標については、既に読み込まれている
Bon. Voilà p
リアデテントでは、レーダーはプラスXを向いています。私は右後方を使います。大丈夫です
Und in Houston wollen wir sicherstellen, dass wir uns genügend Zeit nehmen, um die richtige Einstellung für den Brennvorgang zu erreichen, damit wir die richtige Einstellung herstellen können und den Brennvorgang
おそらく広角
Bermuda again shows high thruster action o
Ich gehe jetzt – ich bin jetzt in der Position, nur noch die Aufzeichnung zu machen. Ich glaube, die beste Antwort auf die Frage nach der Autokinese ist, dass es keine gib
了解。了解、トランクウィリティ。重力調整は良さそうだね。リサイクルしてるのが見
Ihre Manschette is
わかりました。普通の声に戻ります。もしかしたら…それとも
D'accord, Jim. Pour économiser du carburant, on préférerait que tu réduises l'accélération au minimum (MIN IMPULSE), et il n'y a vraiment pas grand-chose à faire; fais-le. On est sur la conso
Если у вас его нет, я могу дать вам в любое время. Мы изготавливаем и
Okay, Vance. Vorgehensweise: FÜHRUNGSSTEUERUNG,; MODUSSTEUERUNG, ATT HOLD;, EINGABE; Manöver in die richtige Lage; Rollen 0, Nicken 90, Gieren 0; mein Ball ist jetzt natürlich außer Betrieb, also muss ich das noch einstellen. Die 5 ist MODUSSTEUERUNG, AUTO; 6:,, Raten überwachen; Raten unter 1 Grad pro Sekunde in jeder Achse, deaktivieren, und ich habe den letzten Teil nicht gehört. Die nächste war,, EINGABE; 1257, EINGABE; 252, EINGABE; 1, EINGABE;, EINGABE;, EINGABE; 22110, FORTFAHREN;, EINGABE;,, EINGABE; Raten überwachen. Raten unter 0,01 Grad pro Sekunde in allen Achsen, EINGABE; MODUSSTEUERUNG, ATT HOLD; dann 30 Klicks Rechtsgieren zum Stoppen
रॉजर, क्या आपक
자
Adresses 25
यह सही है। अब रीडर पैनल 8, यह आपको बताता है कि "सभी
Roger, Mike. E qui il nostro approccio al pitch è un po' sbagliato. Se 
Roger. Qui è Friend
수치가 12.5 정도로 나오네요. 게이지에 문제가 있는 것 같아요... 방금 마스
Хорошо. Мы 
맞습니다, 짐. 이는 배터리를 다시 연결할 수 없게 되는, 아주 드문 가능성이지만, 단일 지점 고장을 방지하기 위한 것입니다
حسنًا. كنتُ أؤجل هذا الأمر نوعًا ما. نحن نتخلص الآن من كمية ق
Х
로저, 여기는 모든 게 순조롭게 진행되고 있습니다.
ठीक है, बज़। पहली बात तो ये है कि हमें संकेत मिले हैं कि आपके लैंडिंग साइट ऑब्लिक सही जगह पर नहीं हैं। अगर आप जाँच करेंगे, तो हमें लगता है कि इंटरमीडिएट स्केल लैंडिंग साइट ऑब्लिक लूनर लैंडमार्क बुक में रखा है।
罗杰。嗯，至少有那么多人与你同在，精神上也与你同在。我们今天11点的
この時点で、電気系統の完全なチェックを行いました。すべての電気系統は緑色です。
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们即将关闭上行链
Hope that stops it. now we've got i
انتظر يا ماي
2 番目の訂正: 2 プ
Gemini VI, Houston. Verstanden. Ha
حسنًا. لقد انقطع صوتك في البداية، لذا يُرجى إعادة تشغيل 
يا برج الدلو، نحن نرصدك بدقة الآن. ويبدو
アポロ8号、ヒ
ठीक है। अगर आप चाहें तो मेरे पास आपके लिए एक छोटी सी खबर है। पीएओ ने अभी-अभी मुझे एक प्रेस विज्ञप्ति सौंपी
一切都已倒带；你准备好放
Roger. Wir beraten uns gerade ü
更正。极光七号，更正 1
Roger, Eagle. Hier ist ein PAD: 101 36 14.07, minus 00758, 
استمري يا هيوس
11, 휴스턴. 온도를 확인해 보니 우주선 내부 온도가 지난 24
Да, Джим, подтверждаю. Это тот вариант, который мы тебе дали вчера вечером после большого заезда, и мы будем использовать его в модифицированном нами виде. Мы протестировали это в симуляторе, и, конечно, никаких проблем не возникло, но, похоже, это неплохо 
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP COM. Termin
弗雷德，关于这个临时搭建的指令舱氢氧化锂罐，我们至少需要做两个，每次使用两个——每组软管上各一个。具体做法是，我们将其中一个临时罐连接到红色接头上，空气会被吸入氢氧化锂罐，然后从蓝色接头吹出。同时，我们还要将氢氧化锂罐从宇航服回路中移除，无论是主回路还是副回路。我们正在整理相关资料，以便更方便地搭建这个装置，看起来可能需要两个人，所以，我
Well, we might have b
Хорошо, Водолей. 
Forse sarebbe meglio rimandare il controllo COMM a dopo la metà del percorso, perché sareb
はい。イベントタイマーのカウントダウンが始まりま
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। अब हम आपको साफ-साफ सुन पा रहे हैं। कृपया अपने इवेपोरेटर वॉटर कंट्रोल पैनल स्विच को ऑटो म
Roger, qui è Friendship Seven. Carburante, 90-98 [percento]. Ossigeno, 78-100 [percento]. La pressione in cabina al momento è di 5,6. C'è pochissima sporcizia che gall
D'accord, Fred
여기는 아폴로 8호입니
罗杰。将氧气加热器设置为自动模式，或者您可以将其
好的，吉姆。我们正在密切关
Ça a disparu par ma fenêtre maintenant, Jim
好的。吉姆，有几件事。第一，你可以用机动来操作，但如果你尝试最小冲程模式，就能节省很多燃料。所以，这可能是个更好的建议。第二，在你关闭正向X推进器之前，以及在你执行“
Au fait, les fenêtres sont arrivées en excellent état. La fenêtre 5 est impeccable, 
Mike, eigentlich ist es mit der Acht-Kugel so einfach, innerhalb eines vernünftigen Toleranzbereichs zu würfeln, dass es sich kaum lohnt, sich im Sitz nach vorne zu schieben, um hinauszuschauen. Außerdem ist es im Cockpit hell genug, sodass der Stern ohnehin nicht gut zu erkennen ist. Daher neige ich dazu, hier die IFR-Technik anzuwe
コロンビア、ヒューストン。OMNI D - OMNI Delta 
अपोलो 
Хорошо, Базз. Что касается пунктов вашего плана полета, сначала несколько обновлений. Мы отменили промежуточный заход номер 6. Оставайтесь на месте. Я дам вам немного больше времени сегодня утром. Второй пункт плана полета: мы готовы зарядить батарею B в любой момент, когда вы захотите это сделать; и третий пункт: на этот раз мы хотели бы сбросить сточные воды немного по-другому. Мы хотели бы сделать это на наших метках с земли. Трасса немного неровная, и мы хотели бы сбросить воду в такое время, когда, как нам кажется, она сохранит свою правильную конфигурацию, чтобы у нас была подходящая возможност
Ok. Vediamo se ci capisco qualcosa. Chiamiamo e, sullo 0406 lampeggiante, di
جيميني 4، هذه غرفة عمليات هيوستن. إذا كنتم تسمعون، لدينا درجة الحرارة عن طريق الفم. يمكن للطيار إ
Verseau, Houston. Une autre façon de réchauffer rapidement l'intérieur est d'allumer les radiateurs de fenêtre lorsque vous 
Je tiens à saluer les autres habitants de notre région. Le fait que nous formions deux hémisphères unis es
And we show you coming up on landma
R
And just as a reminder, don't forget our stowage problem. We - We still have to do quite a bit of stowage of the drogue and pr
わかりました。それでは、完全にロック、アンロックでき
ठीक है। अच्छी जानकारी के अनुसार, वर्तमान समय में निर्वात पेरिगी 23.6 है और उड़ान पथ कोण माइनस 6.25 डिग्री है। यह बिना किसी मध्यमार्गी हस्तक्षेप के है। वह प्रवेश से 5 घंटे पहले मध्यमार्गी हस्तक्षेप-7 करने के विचार पर विचा
로저. 휴스턴, 이글. 너도 정말 멋지구나. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5; 5, 4, 3, 2, 1.
伯恩斯完结了。你读了吗？伯恩斯
आप अभी हमारे प्रोब को देख रहे हैं, जो ओडिसी के अगले हिस्से पर लगा हुआ है। यह काफी भारी है, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि शून्य गुरुत्वाकर्षण में इसका वजन न के बराबर होता है और इसे इधर-उधर ले जाना बहुत आसान होता है। दरअसल, फ्रेड और जैक दोनों ने, जैसा कि पहले भी कई लोगों ने कहा है, इस बात पर टिप्पणी की कि वास्तविक उड़ान में अंतरिक्ष यान कितना बड़ा दिखाई देता है, क्योंकि इसमें हिलना-डुलना इतना आसान होता ह
D'accord. Très bien. Je m'en occupe. 
ザンジバル・キャップ・コム、シ
لا، لقد كانت السابعة التي أعطي
Okay. Ich habe Sie jetzt verstanden. Ich wollte Sie nur daran erinnern, dass Sie im Falle eines Kommunikationsausfalls nicht 7 Punkte verbrauchen sollen. Ihre aktuelle Eingabe ist korrekt. Wir aktualisieren Ihre Landepunkte gleichzeitig mit dem Zeitpunkt, zu dem Sie 7 Punkte erhalten hätten, und ich würde mich üb
روجر. عندما بدأنا، بدا كل شيء على ما يرام. الآن، بدأت الطائرة تنحرف بنم
알았어. 좋아. 저기 뒤에 예비용 기본 카트리
はい。ステップ7
좋습니다, 휴스턴. 연료 전지 퍼지 및 폐수 배출이 완료되었습
ठी
心配しないでくだ
नहीं। मैं बता सकता ह
콜럼비아, 휴스턴. 잠시
Okay. Ich füge es jetzt gleich zur Arbeit hinzu und melde mich dann wieder, um den Rest – nun ja, nicht den Rest – alles zu kopier
حسناً. أطلق ال
了解、11。ピッチマイナス35、ヨー0。オ
Rog
फ्रैंक, वायरिंग केबल अभी भी लटकी हुई है। तुम्हारे अपकेंद्रीय बल के कारण अब यह लगभग सीधी हो गई है। लगता है एडाप्ट
Э
Ich sage Ihnen, mir gefällt es hier drinnen besse
ठीक है, जैक। ऊपर से शुरू करते हैं। ठीक है। क्रायो टैंक; H2 1 का तापमान 230 है और 2 का भी। हमारा O2 क्रायो टैंक 1 - ऐसा लगता है कि यह मुश्किल से 300 पर टिका हुआ है। और, क्रायो टैंक 2 में H2 1 का तापमान 73, 2 का तापमान 74 है। O2 की तरफ, हम O2 1 का तापमान 76 देख रहे हैं; O2 पूरी तरह से उच्च स्तर पर है। रेडिएटर का तापमान प्राथमिक इनलेट पर लगभग 55 है; रेडिएटर आउटपुट पर लगभग 30 है, और द्वितीयक आउटलेट पर 52 डिग्री है। वाष्पीकरण आउटपुट तापमान 45 है, भाप का दबाव 0.17 है, और ग्लाइकोल डिस्चार्ज 48 है। सूट कंप्रेसर का तापमान शून्य है। संचय 30 है; H2O अपशिष्ट का मान लगभग 34 है; पीने योग्य पानी का मान लगभग 98 है; द्वितीयक रेडिएटर इनलेट का मान लगभग 71 है; और रेडिएटर आउट का मान लगभग 30 है; ग्लाइकोल वाष्पीकरण तापमान 65
いや、正確にはヒューストン。ジム、ロックオンに成功したようです。これでデータフローが改善されるはずです。ただ、ロール中はデータだけでなく音声も途切れる可能性が高いです。これは予想して
了解。電
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन, हवाई कॉम टेक।
어디 보자. 미주리주 스프링필드에서, 1941년 월드시리즈에서 브루클린 다저스의 전설적인 포수이자, 삼진을 잡아내 뉴욕 양키스의 승리를 확정지은 미키 오웬은 스포츠 기록 이상의 것으로 기억되기를 바랐습니다. 그는 45명의 소년 소녀들에게 조랑말을 선물했습니다. 아이들은 그에게 조랑말을 어떻게 돌볼 것인지 편지를 보내달라는 요청을 받았습니다. 편지가 쏟아지자, 그는 이미 제공했던 20마리에 5마리를 더 추가했고, 다른 기부자들도 20마리를 더 보태주었습니다. 미키 오웬은 "45통 정도 받을 줄 알았는데, 900통이나 받았어요."라고 말했습니다. 이제 특집 기사입니다. 뉴질랜드 웰링턴에서는 오늘 남극에서 약 50명의 남성들이 전통적인 칠면조와 크랜베리 ​​소스를 곁들인 식사를 즐겼는데, 이날 크리스마스는 동양적인 분위기도 감돌았습니다. 여기에는 남극 대륙을 횡단하다 미 해군 극지 기지에 하루 동안 정박한 일본인 일행이 직접 요리한 스키야키가 포함되어 있었습니다. 캘리포니아주 샌디에이고에서는 나포된 첩보선 푸에블로호의 승무원들이 첫 급여를 샌디에이고 발보아 해군 병원 직원들에게 기부했습니다. 그들은 모두 20달러씩 받았는데, 샌디에이고에 도착했을 때 자신들을 따뜻하게 맞아준 사람들에게 감사
吉姆，今天傍晚早些时候，弗雷德报告说指令舱1号窗口有气体排出。他还报告说看到一块大约4英寸见方的银色金属碎片漂浮着。我们正在努力确定这究竟是新的排气口，还是之前问题的残留排气。你还有什么要补充的吗？另外，弗雷德当时正在拍照，我们授权他使用1号月球表面相机拍摄一些机会目标，快门速度
J'ai une vue magnifique sur la mer et la Terre d'ici. J'essaierai de p
ठीक है। इससे आपको प्लेटफ़
Würden Sie Houston mitteilen, dass wir draußen waren... aber wir konnten die Küste von Texas ganz deutlich sehen und konnten sogar noch mehr sehen... draußen konnte man deutlich mehr sehen... die Küstenlinie von Texas bis hinauf nach Louisiana... als wir über den südlichen Teil Flo
Houston, come interpreti l'
Ho notato che hai saltato l'allineamento per circa 1 minuto perché stavamo ancora dormendo. Vuoi includerlo di nuovo o ritieni che sia n
了解、フランク。重要なのは、今のところコンピューターは問題ないように
好的，我觉得它们表现不错，艾尔。我觉得它们挺好的。我没法告诉你它们哪里出了问题，因为陀螺仪
Oh, wir machen gerade eine Bestandsaufnahme, wie viel wir da habe
D'accord. Le CAG a chuté à ce que j'appelle notre niveau de bruit, c'est-à-dire
حس
Okay. I've got the mission rul
Ricevuto. La pressione alla sorgente è 2450. La temperatura alla sorgente è 8
Ok. Molto bene, Jack. Il passo successivo è separare fisicamente entrambi i tubi blu a una bu
水
您好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们注意到氧
Friendship Seven, Steelhead. Ma vitesse est maintenant de 10 nœuds, j'entame mon approche. 
正在进行中
ठीक है, अगर आप बता सकें तो मुझे जीएमटी टाइम ह
操縦制御
We
Ripetilo, per favore, Neil. Noi... voi vi stavate lasciando. Non
Оно летело вниз, в ту сторону, где о
ठीक है। मै
Хорошо. Правила работы двигателя. Мы должны выключить его, если показания монитора тяги составляют 77 процентов или ниже; пункт 2, если давление топлива в свободном пространстве меньше 160 psi; пункт 3, если дельта-параметр окислителя топлива превышает 25, и это будет сигналом тревоги на земле; пункт 4, если ошибка ориентации составляет 
这叫做同时准
CM/LAUNCH VE
Bon, comme nous ne sommes pas sûrs qu'il ait atteint la butée mécanique pendant une dizaine de minutes la dernière fois, je ne pense pas qu'il soit très judicieux de 
了解しました。了解しました。可能であれば、サーモスタットを使ってキャビンの左右の壁の温度を測ってください。また、目に見える湿気があれば報告してくださ
جيميني 4، هاواي CAP
Négatif. Nous… Roger. Nous sommes curieux de savoi
ठीक ह
Tranquilli
また
Apollo 11, this is Houston. When you stop at 0 roll, you will be in approximately 90 pitch, 0 yaw, and 0 roll. We'd like you to run the first, that is, the option 3, from that attitude. Then we'll uplink you a new, either before or while you are maneuvering to
In questo momento vedo alcune luci che brillano sulle nuvole sotto di m
أتعرف، أنا سعيد نوعًا ما لأنني ارتديت واقي ال
Vous êtes maintenant parf
Хорошо. Вы имеете в вид
了解。廃水を背面の10%​​まで捨てる。以前のものを使用し、クライオヒーターをAUTOに設定し、バッテリーBを寝るまで充電する。11111、01100。クワッドAのピッチのみオン、CとDをすべて
मैं अंधेरे
了解。久しぶりに窓の外に世界が広がり、単眼鏡を通して眺めると、本当に素晴らしい。うまく言葉で表現できればいいのだが。天気はとても良い。南米が視界に入ってきた。地平線の
Okay. Oka
Va b
はい。奥様方がいらっしゃいます
サービス モジュール ヒーター、QUAD Charl
حسناً. بعد ذلك، أوقف التحكم الحراري السلبي عند زوايا جيمبال التالية: 
了解です。R1に27210、R2に35570、R3に33010を加えます。2つ目の項目は、ご存知の通り、「PROCEED」と「PROCEED」の指示による操縦によるものです。姿勢制御の後は、狭いデッドバンドに戻らないようにするための注意事項です。1.40度のデッドバンドに戻るには、私がお教えした手順、つまり「NOUN 01、ENTER」、3011、「ENTER」、そして
すべての装備を出した状態で、
Perth devrait apparaître, et ça devrait être… oh, quel beau contrôle de lacet! C'est à environ 10 degrés à gauche de la trajectoire. Mieux vaut corriger à environ 12 degrés. Juste au bord de la fenêtre, et ça devrait nous donner un lacet de 0 degré. Je ne vois rien d'utile à travers le périscope. C'est trop… c'est trop nuageux. Je reçois le signal VOX 1, 2, 1, 2. Le signal VOX est maintenant
あと約1分
푸른 띠에 대해 설명드리겠습니다. 지표면 바로 위에는 비교적 짙은 파란색 띠가 
Ich wollte eigentlich Cadillac sagen, aber i
Хорошо, Джим. Мы бы хотели, чтобы ты сделал несколько фотографий, но просим тебя бер
— Майк, у нас есть для тебя точна
今天我们煮了三杯咖啡。最后一杯——你知道，就是所有管道都预热好了，氢气枪什么的都用上了之后——是三杯里最热的。我不知道是谁喝的——尼尔，是你喝的吗？你的咖啡怎么样？你是不是后来才
알겠습니다. 6단계는 "요(yaw) 방향으로 초
11, Houston. Ti abbiamo trovato:
This is Jim. I just took two pictures on the Hasselblad Back no. 7 and Frame nos. 11 and 12. Took two pictures of a sunset that just came up and we were approachi
今天没看到有
Okay. Ich merke, dass du das gerade hinter dich gebracht hast, weil Jim gerade erst aus der Schleife au
Quad B 76 Prozent, 233 P
探していたけど、見つけられなかった。見えなかった。もし時間をかけて下を見ていれば、もっとたくさん見えたのに。宇宙船の外からの方が、中より
Roger. First with the Sun; for X, plus 45483; for Y, plus 19053; for Zebra, plus 08262; Earth half-unit vector at 75 hours, plus 3
ジム、VOXからクリッピング音が聞こえ
أجل. يا إلهي! لقد لطخت كل شيء. ربما نشدها 
Pas définitivement, Mike. Garde juste un peu de temps ici pendant que Charlie teste l'outil spécial de l'appareil
はっきりと
아니요, 아니요, 거기에 없어요. 그 옷장은 더 이상
네.
لا أعرف إن كنت ستراه. إنها تمطر بغزارة هنا. لا أعرف إن كان الجو صافياً فوق ملبورن أم ل
هل فهمت معنى كلمة "ulage"
Roger. Mir ist aufgefallen, dass Sie mit Ihrer letzten geplanten Aktivität beginnen. Die anfängliche Nachführung deutet darauf hin, dass die anfängliche Mittelkursgeschwindigkeit möglicherweise unter den ursprünglich geschätzten 4 Fuß pro Sekunde liegt. Wir haben Ihre Brenndaten geprüft, und alles verläuft so reibungslos, wie Sie beschrieben haben; alle Werte scheinen im Normalbereich zu liegen. Die Systeme sehen gut aus; auch
了解しました。うまく整理されているようですね。収納方法も検討してみてはいかがでしょうか…そして、
Nun, abgesehen von dem einen großen Krater, über den wir geflogen sind, gab es in unserer Gegend wohl keine weiteren. Nachdem ich das EASEP aufgestellt hatte, machte ich einen kleinen Spaziergang zurück, und während Buzz die dokumentierten Proben auspackte, ging ich zu einem Krater hinter uns, der etwa 20 bis 25 Meter im Durchmesser und 5 bis 6 Meter tief war, und machte ein paar Fotos davon. Am Grund lagen ziemlich große Steine, deutlich größer als alle, die wir an der Oberfläche gesehen hatten, aber es gab kein Grundgestein – wir waren anscheinend mit etwa 5 Metern Tiefe noch nicht unter den Regolith vorgedrungen. Wir konnten in dieser Tiefe praktisch kein Grundgestein zeigen, zumindest nicht an den Krat
Yes. They're all about as tight as can be. I tell you what; I'll take them off and put them back on again and see if that makes any diff
Roger, Houston. Manovra evasiva G&N
Ricevuto. Sol
Ok
好的，Fred-o，复述得不错。在+15秒处，划掉“主臂 - 关闭”；然后继续向下到“发动机切断时”，在
Роджер. 02 + 08 + 52. Будет прямо перед вами на высоте +80° на расстоянии 190 миль. Это будет непосредственно перед наступлением темноты. Должно быть очень светло. Продолжайте движение, чтоб
D'accord. Quand cela
आखिरकार हमने सूट सर्किट के तापमान की समस्या हल कर ली है। अब समझ में आ रहा है कि स्कॉट को इस रिकॉर्ड स्थिति की ही चिंता क्यों थी। कोई साइड टोन भी नहीं है। इस समय सूट का तापमान - मार्क टी - 68 डिग्री है और मैं बहुत अच्छा महसूस कर रहा हूँ। सूट का गुंबद लगभग 72 डिग्री है। जाहिर है, इसमें उतार-चढ़ाव होता रहता है, और अब रात होने वाली है। मुझे ल
Roger, plus 28466, minus 00350, plus 02406 180 022 002, no
मुझे उड़ान भरने का एहसास हो रहा है। घड़ी शुरू हो चु
11, это Хьюстон. У нас осталось примерно 6 минут, и чтобы мы могли н
ठीक है। अब, यह बिल्
And, Fred, on this jerry-rigged command module lithium hydroxide canister, what we're going to do is we're going to have to make at least two up and use two at a time - one on each set of hoses. What we'll do is we'll connect one of these jerry-rigged boxes to the red fittings and air will be sucked through the lithium hydroxide and then blown out the blue fitting. And we're also going to, when we do this, remove the lithium hydroxide canister from the suit loop, either the primary or the secondary, and we're getting the words together to make it easy to build one of these things, and it looks like it will probably take two
Könnten Sie uns bitte die aktuellen Werte Ihrer Gimbal-Winkel mitteilen
迈克，关于你正在进行的这次分离行动，还有什么新的进展
ईगल, अब हमने तुम्हें पकड़ लिया है। स
여기를 좀 더 따뜻
Bene. Il centro della Lu
Okay, I'
好的。我会一次读三四条，有些内容相同，有些内容有所更改，你可以每走几步就读一遍。功能设置为“关
Итак, переходим к карданному приводу. Вверх, вниз, ноль. Вверх, вниз, ноль. Хорошо, ждём подтверждения для оси P-AX, ВЫКЛ., и о
わかりました。さあ、
C'est exact, Apollo 8. Et j'ai aussi 
Звучит как отличный вид спорта, я понимаю, почему вам с Скоттом это нравится. У меня се
Роджер, Хьюстон. Единственная проблема в том, что Солнце находится в пятом, закрытом конусе. И, похоже, оно также находится достаточно близко к шестому фиксатору, чтобы светить на дальнюю сторону конуса. И оно полностью закрывает шесто
Ro
Для использования в связи с пересечением нулево
了解しました。6万4千ドルで、トランクウィリティ基地の着陸地点の位置をまだ特定中です。LAM2のチャートでジュリエット0.5と7.8にあると思われます。そのチャートはまだ船内に保管されていますか？オー
(판독 불가)라는 점을 알아차리셨을
ठीक है, मैं ब्लड प्रेशर मापने का काम बंद कर रह
Schon wieder Gemini 4. Ich sehe dieselbe Art von Lichterbogen, ähnlich den Nordlichtern, nur dass sie unter uns 
收到。稍等。休斯顿宁静号。请按
Okay. Battery A 38.3, 
吉姆，我们同意你使用地图上可以反复标记和找
Smyth Sea doesn't look much like a sea. It - The area which is devoid of craters, of which there's not very much, is sort of a hilly looking area. I
Хорошо. Панель 276: У
Roger. Tout va bien; le carburant est à 51 % et à 69 %; l’oxygène est à 84 % et à 100 %; la pression cabine est stable. L’alimentation électrique (CC et CA) est bonne. Le seul point à signaler concernant le plan de vol est que le niveau de carburant est inférieur aux prévisions. Je suis actuellement en mode de pilotag
연소 상태 보고서: 예
네, 프랭크, 지금은 이 정도입니다. 통신망에서 나오는 대로 전해드리겠다고 약속했던 소식이 몇 가지 더 있습니다. 특히 푸에블로 석방 소식이 가장 흥미로웠습니다. 닉슨과 아이젠하워의 결혼식 소식은 이미 들으셨겠지만요. 그리고 날씨 소식도 전해드리자면, 여기는 꽤 맑습니다. 구름이 많이 껴 있긴 하지만요. 
This 
네, 프레드. LMP의 빨간색 호스만 캐니스터 백에 연결되어 있다는 것을 이해하셨죠? 그렇다면 다른 빨간색 호스를 다른 캐니스터 백에 연
알겠습
발사체 유도 시스템 모두 양호한 상태인 것으로 보입니다. 발사체 유도 차단 확률은 99% 이상으로 예상됩니다. 따라서 모든 것이 매우 잘 유지되고 있는 것 같습니다. 참고로 MLA는 약 1분간 사용 가능한 TV 
यह मैनुअल और शून्य है - श
D'accord, Jim. Je pensais que le mieux serait que tu rassembles le matériel et qu'on te guide pendant que tu réalises la procédure. Tu pourrais peut-ê
Roger. Nous vous recommandons d'utiliser la manœuvre de séparation, car nous souhaitons obtenir le poids approprié avant d
프리덤 
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다.
阿波罗8号
ええ、その通りです。大丈夫です。あと
क्या आप क
Okay. Kann ich bei der Telemetrie nach
Okay. +90: /G&N, 6
*** Я вот-вот потеряю равновесие в одном направлении, но восстановление происходит совершенно естественно и очень легко.
Bene. Vi darò un breve riassunto dei sistemi. Fondamentalmente, tutti i sistemi sono a posto. Per quanto riguarda la vostra traiettoria di ritorno, possiamo ancora raggiungere la linea del Pacifico centrale aspettando fino al tredicesimo. Dopo 138 second
Aquarius, check your MASTER A
好的，弗雷德。ASA封装温度看起来不错，大约98度，我
Apollo 8, Ho
そうですね、前回はカナリア諸
Okay. Wir raten Ihnen, den gesamten Film zu verwenden. Dies ist Ihr letzter Versuch. Nutzen Sie nach Möglichkeit den gesamten Film. Jim ist hier und wir möchten den Wiedereintritt kurz mit Ihnen besprechen. Noch etwas, Jim: Wir haben die Lebensdauer Ihrer Hecktriebwerke auf 131 ft/sec erhöht, und Sie werden beim OAMS-
नहीं - ठीक है। मैंने VOX र
حسنًا يا جاك. ستبقى جميع المفاتيح في وضعها الحالي، وهو الوضع الأوسط، ولكن - نظرًا لع
매
了解
了解、セブン。マニュアル燃料計の数字が聞き取れなかった。少し切れたみたいだけど、教えてもらえるか
了
Roger. Weiter bei -1 Minute, „MASTER ARM, ON“ streichen. Bei -35 Sekunden die ersten beiden Zeilen streichen. Bei -10 Sekunden in „Minus 9 Sekunden“ ändern; bei „Minus 9 Sekunden“ steht dann „Manuelles Entleeren“. Bei 2 Sekunden „MODE, FREE“ und „ACA
حسنً
Roger, Houston. -1: potresti ripetere la latitu
If it increa
И, Хьюстон, база «Транквилити» собирается дать вам несколько комментариев по поводу геологического вопроса, заданного вчера вечером. Мы приземлились в относительно ровном кратерном поле вытянутых вторичных – круглых – вторичных кратеров, большинство из которых имеют края, независимо от их размера. Это не всегда так. Есть 
ठीक है। मैं यही कहने वाला था। पृष्ठ 3 पर, हम आइटम 1 को छोड़ देते
Beh, diavolo, Jack. Tutto quello che fai... non ne usi uno molto buono... Solo se vai... al tuo riferimento di assetto per... e il backup del g-meter. Perché, davvero, puoi 
알겠습니다, 잭. 연료 전지 2의 반응물 
Okay. Wir beginnen mit der Brennstoffzellenentleerung, während wir essen. CO2-Kanisterwechsel Nummer 6; Durchflussprüfung des Sekundärkühlers; einige Bremsbeläge kopieren. Außerdem: Nach 72 Stunden den Nulllauf bei 73 Stunden stoppen; Option 3 durchführen
हम उस पर भी गौर कर रहे हैं। पता नहीं क्यों, यह यॉ की तुलना में पिच में ज्यादा भटक रही है। मैं लगभग दोबारा इस पर काम करने के लिए तैयार था। मुझे एक बार फिर जाना पड़ा, और मै
C'est fascinant d'observer ces petites gouttelettes gelées se déplacer. Elles semblent partir dans tous les sens, mais finalement, après avoir parcouru une certaine 
Nous sommes maintenant directement au-dessus de notre premier point initial pour P-1. Il est pratiqu
Sono abbastanza sicuro di sì, perché me ne sarei accorto piuttosto rapidamente. Finora ho fatto un'unica grande applicazione di spinta durante il volo, passando dal controllo manuale proporzionale al fly-by-wire e ho dimenticato di spostare l'interruttore del comando di velocità su automatico. Avevo una funzione di beccheggio e lo sai benissi
F
Der sogenannte Känguru-Hüpfer f
En fait, il ne souhaite pas divulguer trop d'informations. Il veut les conserver et rédiger un article à son
लक्ष्य रेटिकल के ठीक पिच पर और आधा डिग्री दाईं ओर
Занзибар, это «Сигма
«Дружба Семь», это Кантон. Наш аэромедик хотел бы услышать ваши к
そ
ठीक है
좋아요, 이제 다음 단계는 테이프를 고정하는 것입니다. 테이프 롤에서 약 60cm(2피트) 길이로 자른 다음, 세로로 찢어서 약 60cm(2피트) 길이와 약 1.2cm(0.5인치) 너비의 두 조각을 만듭니다. 이 조각들을 용기에 직각으로, 기존에 붙인 테이프와 거의 같은 각도로 감아줍니다. 즉, 위쪽과 아래쪽을 가로지르도록 감아주는 거죠. 위쪽과 아래쪽을 가로지르는 부분은 중앙 구멍 바깥쪽으로, 그리고 필터망 사이의 융기 부분 위로 넘어가도록 위
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. مايك، نود أن نبدأ عملية
أرى نجوم الكركي المزدوجة تشكل خطًا مستقيمًا، وتتجه مباشرةً إلى منتصف النافذة. كوكب المشتري، بالطبع، ساطعٌ جدًا. أرى عنكة، وتصحيحًا، الناير، وهذا، لا بد أنه كان الطاووس. الناير يقع قليل
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 잔지바르 캡 컴입니다. 원격 측정 시스템에 따르면 모든 시스템이 정상입니다. 의료 상태도 정상
47.1은 델타-VI이고,
네, 제
D'accord. À la page E-7 de la liste de contrôle d'entrée et à l'étape 34, tant q
——如果你把这些都对齐，那么
Roger. Inclinaison moins 30, lacet 180, pour Col
Roger. TIG's follow: phasing 103 40, less tha
उस समय आप रेट्रो पावर को एआरएम पर सेट करेंगे, लेकिन हम इसे शुरुआत में ही कर रहे ह
Кнопка 
Хорошо. Кажется, у м
Apollo 8, Houston. Le vecteur est entré; en cours de 
Toujours à peu près pareil, Bill. Le terrain est assez lumineux. On ne
Lorsque vous vous êtes approchés de n
Хорошо. Присылайт
分かりました。フレッド、了解しました。ありがとうございます。38.9と1.9ですね。バッテリーにどれだけのアンペアを戻しているのかを確認するために、できるだけ滑らかなグラフを作成しているだけです。だから30分間隔で測定してほしいのです。も
周囲を見渡すと、コントラストは全体的に、太陽の影のおかげで生じています。非常に薄い灰色、薄い灰色、自分の影の周り、ヘルメットの影の周りの光輪。次に、横に目を移すと、周囲の色はまだかなり明るいため、コントラストが最も強くなります。太陽を見下ろすと、より広い範囲の影の部分がこちらを向いています。周囲の全体的な色のコントラストはそれほど大きくありません。私たちが蹴り上げた埃っぽいエリア全体を調べると、質感がかなり暗くなっています。今、私
Mi puoi dare una lettura dei nuclei 25, 26 e
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। दिक्कत ये है कि सूर्य पांचवें नंबर पर है, जो बंद वाला है। और ऐसा लगता है कि ये डिटेंट 6 के काफी करीब है, जिससे शंकु के दूसरी तरफ भी इसकी रोशनी पड़ रही है। और ये डिटेंट 6 को पूरी तरह से ढक रहा है। मै
मुझे लगता है कि इस बार मैं एमआईटी की तस्वीरें पूरी नहीं कर पाऊंगा। नहीं, नहीं, मैं समस्या ठीक कर सकता हूँ। फिल्म डिब्बे से
크고 또렷하
Roger. Wir sind f
당신은 파이브 스퀘어를 통과하고 있고, 정말 훌륭하게 연주하고 있어요. 
Понял. Канопус толь
好的。金星的
好的。太平洋中部地区总体情况良好。预计云底高度2000英尺，云量分散，能见度10英里，风向70度，风速12英里/小时，浪高4英尺，气压2974英尺。日出时间为祖鲁时间10:00，黎明时间为祖鲁时间16:49。救援船将是约克城号；救援飞机将是1号和2号空中指挥机，以及1号、2号和3号回收机。预计到达救援船的时间是——约克城号已到达目标点，空中指挥机将在15分钟内到
ठीक है। एक और बात जो प्रवेश से कुछ समय पहले होती है - और जिस पर हम च
Roger. Aufgrund der geringeren Last bei ausgeschaltetem Rendezvous-Radar möchten wir jetzt die Batterien 5 u
Подтверждаю. Следующий шаг на панели 5: нам нужно перевести переключатель MAIN BUS TIE A/C в положение BAT A/C, проверить правильность напряжения на MAIN BUS A и измерить ток на BAT A, чтобы убедиться в о
フレッド、了解。LMPの赤いホースだけがキャニスターバッグに差し込まれていることを理解してください。その場合、もう一方の赤いホースをもう一方のキャニスターバッグに挿入する手順は次のとおりです。バッグの片隅に斜めの穴を開けます。もう一方のバッグを
짐은 이제 나
Roger. Apparently we missed getting your onboard readouts on battery Charlie and PYRO batteries Alfa and Bravo 
Anda
Sto guardando le nuvole. Il luogo dell'atterr
罗杰。向他们致以亲切的问候。我正在听乌特索夫的歌。为了
Je ne sais pas
これはフレンドシップセブン、再突入姿勢をとるとい
Хорошо, Водолей; Хьюстон. Я рекомендую вам прекратить сотрудничест
罗杰。谢谢你，哥
Ja. Es war ein gut
了解、11です。84時間後に廃水を25%まで減らし
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 인디언 컴 테크입니
Bonjour, 11. Houston. Goldstone TV a indiqué que lorsqu'une ligne verticale nette apparaît sur l'image, au niveau des bandes horizontales, cela semble la courber lég
Meiner ist wieder auf EMU eingestellt. Das habe ic
Похоже, у всех юных игроков есть часы Midwatch
Можете подтвердить, что ориентация, система ASCS и система управления по проводам работают
好的。那
Roger, Neil. We just wanted a narrative such that we can - When we get the playback, we can sort of correlate what we're s
Okay. Understand. I'm going to go
Okay. Als Erstes wollen wir die Batterie laden, damit wir dort Strom haben. Die entsprechenden Prozeduren sind bereits vorbereitet. Was den Wiedereintritt angeht, planen wir unseren letzten Kursanstieg 5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt in die Atmosphäre – falls wir überhaupt einen durchführen müssen. Das Servicemodul möchten wir dann etwa 4,5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt abtrennen und die nächsten 3 bis 3,5 Stunden für Fotos, die Inbetriebnahme des Kommandomoduls (G&N), die Verstauung der Ausrüstung und sonstige Kleinigkeiten nutzen. Das Servicemodul würden wir bis 1 Stunde vor dem Eintritt 
روجر
よし、ヒュ
That's affirmative, we completed the. We'll give you the data from it in just a second. We passed our sextant star check at entry attitude, and right now we're maneuvering to ou
Ты
Sì, ne sono cert
S
左
– Genau. Um wie viel 
PNGS を揃えるのと同じ
Va ben
Natürlich interessiert uns nur noch, welche Geschwindigkeitsänderu
По показаниям наши
Если у вас есть время, пожалуйста, подключите передатчик KB и говорите, посчитайте до 20. Если у вас есть время и вы сейчас не заняты, дайте мне знать. Вы меня слышите? Юрий,
尼尔，这里是休斯顿。我们听得很清楚。暂停，暂停。
ठीक है। यह सही है और अपडेट का आखिरी वाक्य यह है कि आप धूमकेतु को 45 डिग्री और 155 डिग्री के कोण पर देख सकते हैं। अब, जैक, जो चित्र उन्होंने मुझे दिखाए हैं, उनके अनुसार धूमकेतु सूर्य से लगभग 10 डिग्री द
Bien reçu. Mode de pilotage manuel; gyroscopes désactivés; manœuvres désactivées. Veuillez patienter. Mon état et celui de la 
Okay. Für den mittleren Pazifik sind die Bedingungen im Allgemeinen gut. Sie können mit einer Wolkenuntergrenze von 2000 Fuß (aufgelockert), einer Sichtweite von 10 Meilen, Wind aus 070° mit 12 Knoten, Wellenhöhen von 4 Fuß und einem Höhenmesser von 2974 rechnen. Sonnenaufgang ist um 10:00 Uhr UTC, erste Dämmerung um 16:49 Uhr UTC. Das Raumschiff ist die Yorktown; die Flugzeuge sind Airboss 1 und 2 sowie Recoveries 1, 2 und 3. Die geschätzte Zeit bis zum Eintreffen des Raumschiffs beträgt 15 Minuten. Die Yorktown befindet sich am Zielpunkt, die Airboss-Flugzeuge sind vor Ort. Die Recoveries 1, 2 und 3 sind SH3 Alfas und begleiten die Yorktown, befinden sich also ebenfalls am Zielpunkt. Alle haben Rettungsschwimmer an Bord. Falls die Bergungsflugzeuge keinen Kontakt zum Raumschiff herstellen können; Sie werden die Schwimmer ins Wasser lassen, und wenn Sie in guter Verfassung sind und sie anrufen, dann werden sie mit dem Abse
Безопасность катапультируемого кресла в... - Car
자, 휴스턴. 아폴로 
रॉजर। समझ गया। वहाँ कुछ बत्तिय
Qui è Friendship Seven. Ho imbardato di 165 [gradi], mantenendo l'assetto or
Roger. Ich habe
Роджер. Подождите, пожалуйста, один из них. Вы знаете, к какому реги
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 여러분의 
Уолли, с включенным фонариком я едва вижу
Okay. In reference the early TV, we're losing the high-gain antenna now, and it looks like the only way we would have gotten the early TV pass in anyhow was to send it to remote site and look at it there. So we're going to scrub that idea and we'll just pick up with the scheduled TV. The COMM checks that are remaining are the high-gain dependent type, and we'll put those off unt
大西洋之舟，这里是友谊七号。希望您能飞越卡纳维拉尔角。我让太空舱漂移到180°位置，现在正在重新调整姿态。
Bene, sotto la quarta fila, abbiamo tutti gli interruttori del riscaldamento QUAD IN, VENTOLA TUTA 1. Sotto, GLICOLE 1 e 2; e sotto COMM, abbiamo COMMANDER AUDIO IN, e s /, STANDBY, OPERATE, e questo è tutto. Bene, nella fila in basso, abbiamo il collegamento di alimentazione della batteria entrambi IN
C'est affirmat
Das geht jetzt schon seit etwa 1:15 Uhr so. Vor
Роджер, Севен. Ты... ты... п
Oh, che sport! Mi sa che c
ジョー、機内に予備の機内着があるとは思わなかったのですが、今
아, 제
Перейти только к записи VO
Восход солнца. Ах! В тот раз светились прекрасные светлячки. Было
S-5では、アメリカ上空ではRev 33ではなくRev 32になります。パスは17+40か
Ici Friendship Seven. Tout est en ordre. La capsule est en parfait état. Pression de mainti
وهل يمكنك مراقبة خزان التطهير وخ
फिर से 
Okay, Fred-o. Reading you 5-by. The procedure I'm going to read up to you is a Sun check for the - to see if we're going to need an alinement or not. If you'll get out your G&N di
This is Friendship Seven. It's blinding through the scope on clear. It's started up just as I gave you that mark; I'm going to the dark filter to watch it c
Roger. Ce voyage sur la Lune vous a peut-être paru simple, voire facile. Je tiens à vous assurer que ce n'était pas le cas. La fusée Saturn V qui nous a placés en orbite est une machine incroyablement complexe, dont chaque composant a fonctionné à la perfection. Cet ordinateur au-dessus de ma tête possède un vocabulaire de 38 000 mots, chacun ay
当他在你的应答器上发
Ich werde mit der Auswahl noch eine Weil
2، /: 46427، ناقص 053، زائد 141، ناقص 01350، زائد 0000، زائد 0000 000 175 358 00607، زائد 00606 01350 009 01265 02 3112 197؛ برج الثور، عايدة، لأعلى 16.2، لليسار 0.1، القراءة الثابتة غير قابلة للتطبيق؛ سير
रॉजर। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है, फ्लाई-बाय-वायर सिस्टम पर मैन्युअल रूप से नियंत्रित हो रही है, नियंत्रण में कोई परेशानी नहीं है। बहुत सहज और आसान; नियंत्रण बहुत बढ़िया है। बाएँ पैनल पर फ्यूज अभी भी वही हैं। स्क्विब चालू है, स्क्विब सक्रिय है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। फ्लाई-बाय-वायर सिस्टम स
Roger. We figur
Хорошо, 
这台小型录音机帮了我们很大的忙——在我们前往月球的途中，它帮我们打发了不
Houston, is there anything else you need on th
गुंबद का तापमान 7
ت
The ones that I saw back in the aft end of the spacecraft a
Es sieht nun so aus, als würden wir Ihre Plattform etwa 45 Minuten früher als im Flugplan vorgesehen in Betrieb nehmen. Die 
Roger. Sigma Seven. Guaymas Cap Com. Forte e chiaro. Hanno avuto un'interruzione di corrente lungo la California. Stiamo leggendo il tuo tempo di retrosequenza corretto. Al mio segnale, vediamo, il tempo trascorso dalla tua capsula è in questo momento 4 second
私も同じです、ロン。とても良さそうです。思ったほど音は出
D'accord, très bien. Vous pourrez lui dire, le moment venu, que n
オーケー、アポロ8号。部屋を見回すと、全てのシステムは極めて良好に見えます。クワッドセンサーによる燃料量の更新情報も取得済みなので、その情報は得られています。酸化剤供給ラインの温度と燃料温度はどちらも華氏73度です。クライオプロファイルはバッテリーAで稼働して
Roger, Houston. Wir liegen immer noch bei etwa 52 Prozent, und wir hatten unsere Abfallumstellung vorgenommen, daher wissen wir nicht, ob der Wert von einem hö
Okay, Vance.
罗杰。俯仰角减去 2.5 度，就对了；没问题
Okay. Auf Panel 3: Die ersten drei 
わかりました。もう一度、先ほど「順序は重要ではない」と言った部分ですが、戻っても順序は重要ではありません。では、先に進みましょう。パネル4：TELCOMM、GROUP 1、AC1ですが、AC1ではなくOFFになります。パネル5
Houston, Eagle. The hot 
كولومبيا، هيوستن. لدينا تحدي
오, 방금 닐 암스트롱 씨가 저희 본부 통신 콘솔 옆에 서서 경계 태세를 갖추
はい、ここまでは私も
Damit es sich überhaupt
罗
Roger, Bill. On comprend que vous avez remué les cryostats. Lors de notre dernier contrôle, la température des conduites était excell
Okay. Non so se riesco a rileggere tutto. Oka
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Пока рано говорить о каких-либо конкретных цифрах по работе вашей связи. Похоже, она работает так же хорошо, как и предсказывалось, и всё остальное, кажется, работает лучше, так что, возможно, и здесь всё будет лучше. После того, как мы проведём следу
Das ist richtig, und wir messen momentan einen Strom von 11 Ampere
ठीक है। पहले चरण से शुरू करते हैं; परीक्षण 1: 5 सेकंड प्रतीक्षा करें। 5 सेकंड हो गए। ऑटो मोड में जा रहा हूँ। ठीक है - सभी इंडिकेटर लाइट बंद हैं; रेंज शून्य है। अब मैं हेयरलाइ
Хорошо. Отлично. Мы закрыли доступ солнечного света через другие окна в космический аппарат, поэтому он смотрит через окно номер 1, и теперь нет отраженного света. Так что, должно получиться довол
لديّ الكثير م
收
Yeah. That's what they said it'd do, didn't they? Okay, 10 seconds to go, and been holding the manual heater switch in for the last minute. It's keeping the pressure up 
Okay. Verstanden. Alle Adressen waren nominal, der Brennvorgang war termingerecht und die Restwe
Okay. We recommend stopping at of 54 45 00, and th
«Аполлон-8», пока мы ждём высокого усиления, я продолжу краткое описание траектории. Мы всё ещё можем вернуться к средней линии Тихого океана с тринадцатой позиции, и вы будете на пути после 138 секунд работы двигателя. Это 138 секунд, чтобы вывести вас из зоны «бабочки». Мы рекомендуем не пытаться использовать преждевременное зажигание или перезапуск после 20 секунд. Если вы превысите 20 секунд, это может привести к тому, что траектория выйдет за пределы возможностей коррекции и свободного возврата. Погода в районе посадки хорошая. У нас есть слежение за вами и без него. Во время работы двигателя вы можете заметить небольшое изменение давления в камере сгорания и в баках из-за истощения топлива в накопительном баке и его попадания в отстойник. Это может произойти примерно через 2-5 секунд после начала работы двигателя. Это будет небольшое изменение давления в обеих системах. Что касается систем, все они готовы к работе. После этого нам нужно остановить кипение воды для целей траектории. Ваша ситуация со сбросом воды выглядит хорошо; У вас должно быть достаточно воды, даже больше, чем ожидалось. Мы постараемся отложить сброс воды до 5. Перед этим мы хотели бы перемешать криогенные элементы — поправка. Следующая продувка топливных элементов произойдет примерно в, и это будет водородная батарея A (34,9), батарея B (39,1) и Charlie (38,5). У нас есть возможность использовать один криогенный бак: судя по результатам предыдущих запусков, можно ожидать, что обычный запуск займет примерно на 3,7 секунды больше, чем расчетные значения. Производительность двигателя выглядит номинальной, и все параметры остаются стабильными. Все выглядит хорошо; все четыре квадрокоптера, согласно компьюте
继续我之前对助推器飞行初期情况的汇报。进入黑暗区域后，大约在1200英尺（约366米）的距离，我尝试与助推器保持位置，但当时我唯一能判断与助推器距离的方法就是观察两盏闪光灯之间的距离。它们会不时地——不是偶尔，而是持续不断地——出现一盏灯、两盏灯、再一盏灯的交替闪烁，有时甚至要过很久才能再次看到两盏灯——这表明助推器一直在旋转。我完全无法确定它的旋转方向。根据两盏灯之间的距离，当我能看到它们时，我感觉与助推器保持着非常有利的位置，直到我们到达卡那封附近。那时，我感觉自己正在迅速接近它，尽管我无法确定。到目前为止，我积累的所有速度变化量（ΔV）都是
क्या यह सब तैयार है? मैं इसे वापस यहाँ रख देता हूँ। यह तुम्हारे सामान के नीचे है। अब, मुझे लगता है कि अग
حسنً
حسنًا. جميع العناوين الرئيسية، بالطبع، لا تزال تدور حول ما تفعله، وخاصةً حول رؤية ذلك القمر الصناعي في السماء أمس. كما أن الحديث مع
Well, I'm reading 70 [degrees]. I'm really a little at a loss as to how to get it down, my suit---water valve is set now past the marks. This doesn't seem to being it down, and neither
Roger. Mein Status ist betriebsbereit. Ich konnte al
Роджер, 11. Принято. Рекомендую перейти сюда, предпочтительнее вариант 1, а затем перейти к настройке положения. Конец связи. Затем мы наладим связь. Когда вы перейдете к настройке положения, это будет тангаж 90, рыскание 0 на высо
Columbia, Houston. Nous avons reçu les données. Nous aimerions un. 
꽤 잘하게 됐어... 안타레스까지 자동 비행으로 가야겠어. 그렇게 하
حسنًا، سأقر
Вперёд, Хью
Хорошо, я как раз собирался рассказать вам о передаче дел, которую мы только ч
يمكنك أن تشعر بذلك هنا عندما يكون دواسة الوقود منخفضة؛ إنه أفضل من جهاز 
Roger
それがかなり良さそうかどうか確認してください - 六分儀を通し
是下方面板上的那个阀门——左下角；就是那个。对，就是那个；把它调到“排放”模式。排放很简单，没问题；设
Роджер. Мы согласны. Мы просто хотели убедиться, что у нас с вами н
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 맞습니다. 높은 비트 전송률을 사용하고 계셔서 디스크 굽기 
Roger. La série de fissures ou de failles qui la traversent plonge vers le sud en trois paliers environ. Le réseau de failles parallèles au nord présente une dépression centrale. J'espère que vous tous, sur Terre, comprenez ce que nous voulons dire lorsque nous affirmons que l'horizon est plutôt inquiétant, un endroit sombre et peu engageant. Nous survolons actuellement l'un de nos futurs sites d'alunissage, choisi dans cette région lisse appelée la Mer de la Tranquillité. Cette surface lisse facilitera les premières tentatives d'alunissage et nous évitera d'avoir à contourner des montagnes. Vous pouvez maintenant apercevoir les longues ombres du lever de soleil lunaire. Nous approchons du lever de soleil sur la Lune, 
任务规则禁忌卡上有三项内容，如果你准备好了，可以抄写一下
Roger. Aus den Nachrichten des Pressebüros: Apollo 11 beherrscht weiterhin die Schlagzeilen weltweit. Nur vier Nationen – das kommunistische China, Nordkorea, Nordvietnam und Albanien – haben ihre Bürger noch nicht über Ihren Flug und Ihre Mondlandung informiert. Ein Journalist sagte, ihm seien die Worte ausgegangen, um Ihren Erfolg zu beschreiben. Heute Abend wird Präsident Nixon das All-Star-Baseballspiel in Washington besuchen. Im Anschluss reist er zum Bergungsgebiet im Pazifik. Am Mittwochabend fliegt er mit dem Hubschrauber von Johnston Island zum Marine-Kommunikationsschiff Arlington. Am Donnerstagmorgen steigt er wieder in den Hubschrauber und fliegt rechtzeitig zur Hornet, um Ihre Wasserung mitzuerleben. Den Präsidenten begleiten Außenminister William Rogers und Frank Borman. Sie werden die Wasserung von der Brücke des Bergungsschiffs aus zusammen mit Admiral John Sidney McCain Jr., dem Befehlshaber der Pazifikstreitkräfte, verfolgen. Nach seinem Aufenthalt an Bord der Hornet tritt der Präsident seine Asienreise und seinen geplanten Besuch in Rumänien an. Luna 15 stürzte vermutlich gestern nach 52 Mondumrundungen ins Meer. Die sowjetische Nachrichtenagentur TASS berichtete von „wissenschaftlichen“ Untersuchungen im erdnahen Weltraum. Sir Bernard Lovell vom Jodrell-Bank-Observatorium gab an, dass Luna 15 mit einer Geschw
Okay, on comparing the flight of 13 to Apollo 8, lift-off was about the same amount of vibration as I noticed on 8, but at the beginning of the flight, there was less of the sideways motion than we experienced on Apollo 8. The S-IC separation felt more violent on 13 than it did on 8, maybe that's because I was in a different seat, I don't know. But there was about three sharp transients of the cut-off and a couple of big bangs where we were thrown backwards longitudinally on our straps before the S-II went off. And the S-II was, of course, just as smooth on 13 as 8 except for the number 5 engine. And we did not experience the vibration that we experienced on 8 towards the end of the S-II burn. And the
أنت تراقب وتتحقق مما إذا كنا سنشهد أي إطل
نعم. ولا توجد رطوبة ظاهرة. ولا توجد رطوبة حول ورق التجفيف. للأسف، غطيتَ الجدران فلا أستطيع قياس درجة الحرارة، لكن أسوأ درجة حرا
Hey Ken, hat irgendjemand eine Ahnung, warum der Quad-A-Tank s
Роджер. Сейчас мы работаем над герметизацией кабины, используя наклейку с указанием
D'accord. 
Roger, type 1 au-dessus de Guaymas. Quel est mon AOS à Guaym
Esatto. 
Это «Дружба Семь», вещание вслепую. Восход солнца уже появился в перископе. В перископе он был великолепен, ярко-красного цвета, 
RHC вооруж
Roger, je comprends qu
罗杰。弗兰克，是时候对所有四个风扇进行低温风扇循环了，就像你之前做的那样，每个风扇都短
حس
बहुत बढ़िया। पृष्ठ E-9 पर, जब आप कमांड
Batteria C 37
Impossibile attenuare sufficientemente il reticolo per un'acquisizion
Houston,
روجر، فهم
Non ho visto luci, quindi loro non hanno v
Apollo 8, können Sie uns sagen, aus welchem ​​Fenster Sie schauen? Und da is
確かに私の真下です。カーナボンあたりからずっと真下を追っていました。カーナボンあたりまでは真下、そして地平線まで上がり、そして再び真下まで来ました。まるで私の軌道とは違うように見えました。遠地点と近地点も私の軌道とは違っていました。とにかく、位置がわかるとすぐに、日が暮れてから接近を試みました。先ほど言ったように、その時は私の1、2マイル先、真下にいました。つまり、接近しようとすればするほど、実際には接近できなくなっていったのです。私は逆噴射していました。上部スラスターを使って総速度を落とすように噴射し、そして…同時に噴射していました。実際には接近できず、ブースターは私から遠ざかり続けました。ハワイに着く頃には、ブース
Okay. Und die Telemetriedaten werden von DATA auf DATA übertrag
了解。フレンドシップ・
حسنًا. انقطع اتصالنا بك لفترة وجيزة بسبب عدم قدرتك على استقبالنا. جاك، نود الانتظار حوالي خمس دقائق. سيستمع إلينا المزيد من الأشخاص، وقد تطلب الأ
فريندشيب سفن، لاحظنا إشارة على أرضية القطاع 51، وهي "نشر أكياس الهبوط". نعتقد أن هذه إ
はい、わかりました。タンクに電
Okay, Joe. The - the DELTA-V no bias test prior to, we had a 0.8, and post-, it w
我们确认这
Roger. Aux alentours de 148 heures, si ce n'est déjà fait, veuillez procéder au changement du filtre à CO2 et à la mise en marche
ठीक है। एक SEP पैड से 1 घंटा पहले, निम्नलिखित स्थितियों में पैंतरेबाज़ी करें: रोल, 130; पिच, 125; यॉ, 012.4। सं
और परमेश्वर ने कहा, “आकाश के नीचे का सारा जल एक स्थान पर एकत्रित हो जाए। और सूखी भूमि प्रकट हो जाए।” और ऐसा ही हुआ। परमेश्वर ने उस सूखी भूमि को पृथ्वी कहा। और जल के एकत्रित होने को समुद्र कहा। और परमेश्वर ने देखा कि यह अच्छा है। और अपोलो 8 के दल की ओर से, हम शुभ रात्रि, शुभकामनाएँ, क्रिसमस की हार्दिक शुभकामनाएँ और आप सभी को - इस अच्छी पृथ्वी पर रहने वाले सभी लोगों को - ईश्
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。聞こえますか？オーバー
了解。リードバックは以下の通りです。TIG 124 22 0000 55349 00322、プラス0017、プラス37104、マイナス70470、プラス58604、プラス56936。重量10837。T14、126 2
حسناً. لكن بدون البدلات الرسمية، لن يفيدنا ذلك 
Das ist beim Perizynthion korrek
روجر، فه
रॉजर. 033 0000, बाएँ 17, प्लस 0883, माइनस 16500 12955 36185; सीरियस, रिगेल 129, 155 010, उलेज दो जेट, 20 सेकंड, क्वाड्स ब्रावो और डेल्टा। प्रज्वलन पर 24 डिग्री रेखा पर क्षितिज माइनस 3 मि
Danke. Er kann sein Radio nicht einschal
こちらフレンドシップセブン、現在軌道姿勢、
Che ne dici di passare dai ragazzi d
Okay, mache ich. Und noch eine Frage: In di
Je ne sais pas, nous av
Buzz, hier ist Houston. Ich habe gehört, dass Sie beide Solaranlagen erfolgreich installiert haben
Take y
Хорошо. Мы только что видели, как вы проверяли систему предупреждения и оповещения в левой части панели нашего телевизора. Видите, все ин
Роджер, Игл. Тебе пять.
検
ご存知のとおり、側面の窓が曇っているのは本当に残念です。なぜなら、待ち合わせ場所の窓からは太陽の光がまったく見えず、曇った窓からは
塔
Lo configurerò... 
... bl
ロジャー、はっきりと聞こ
Хорошо. «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и в открыто
안
La riproduzione del nastro
روجر، من فريق الصداقة الس
我要关闭总线了。我要拆掉那些家
제가 다시 읽어드리겠습니다. RN에서 RP를 뺀 값에 77을 더한 값; 400K의 피치(공칭); RET 400K, 22 + 02; ETO, 24 + 43; 최종 정전, 30 + 01; 드로그, 31 + 37; 메인, 
Хорошо. Позвольте мне поделиться своими наблюдениями по главной шине B. События развивались довольно быстро, и сначала мы услышали удар, взрыв или что-то ещё, я не уверен. Затем, примерно через секунду, сработала главная сигнализация, указывающая на пониженное напряжение на главной шине B. Я проверил напряжение, и в этот момент оно было в норме, поэтому я подозреваю, что это был ск
알겠습
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Noch eine Minute; alle Systeme startklar. End
ठीक है। जैक, उस सूची में से हमें कमांडर के थ्रॉटल को थ्रॉटल और मिन प
分かりました。「400プ
بعد أن ننتهي من هذه الخطوات التالية، سأرى ما سيقدمه لنا برنامجنا. ما هو ذلك المسار الأوسط الذي يكاد
Roger. Von dort kommen ein paar Lacher. Und wir haben hier auch noch einen aktuelle
Und ich installiere den Spritzschutz, den Nackenschu
11号，这里是休斯顿。在你循环蓄能器冲程期间，我们使用的是低比特率数据，因此没有接收到氧气流量参数。我们预
Und Eagle, Houston. Ihre steuerbaren Antennenwinkel f
O
Fase preliminare. Interm
잭, 특히 저 같은 초보자에게는 이곳의 좋은 점 중 하나는 움직이기가 매우 편하다는 것입니다. 물론, 사령선 시뮬레이터에서 일해 보셨겠지만, 무중력 환경은 정말 큰 도움이 됩니다. 1g에서는 움직이기가 상당히 제한적인데, 이곳에서는 훨씬 수월합니다. 보시다시피, 내부가 상당히 깨끗해 보입니다. 헐거워진 와셔 몇 개와 시퀀스 카메라의 작은 플라스틱 덮개가 떨어져서 ED 패널 근처에 끼어 있는 것을 발견했습니다. 자, 짐 바로 아래에 있는, 캔처럼 보이는 물체 위에 서 계신 분이 있습니다. 뒤쪽에 계신 분들을 위해 설명드리자면, 이 캔 안에
わかりました。3行目、推進剤（PROPELLANT）の下の「STANDBY RENDEZVOUS HEATER（スタンバイ・ランデブー・ヒーター）」と「LANDING
ठीक है। बहुत बढ़िया। जब आपको फुर्सत मिले, तो आप हमें विकिरण रिपोर्ट दे सकते हैं। हम आपके लिए उपभोग्य सामग्रियों की जानकारी और कुछ अन्य छोटी-मोटी बातें तैयार कर रहे हैं, जब आप बात करने के लिए
Okay. ATTITUDE,; scale, 5/5;, select 1; SOURCE. Hey, what you do is just read the ones that have the changes, Joe, and I'll read back to yo
Tutto que
로저, 여기는 제미니 4호입니다. 조종사는 약 20분 전에 일어나서 3시
هل يمكنك وضع طوق الأمان علينا باستخدام ا
Okay. Odyssey is completely powered down, according to the procedure that you read to 
Внизу наблюдалось множество гроз. Кажется, мы движемся примерно вбок и перевернуты вверх ногами. Очень,
Через MDIU невозможно ничего ввести. Когда вы попытались его выключить, индикатор функции Ma1 снова загоре
우리가 잘못된 방향으
Roger, Friendship Seven. We're reading your blood pressure, what kind of result on you
稍等。好
Do you
أواجه
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि जिम इसे अभी पकड़े हुए है और - यह - ठीक है, यह लगभग f:22, अनंत पर होना चाहिए, और मुझे लगता
Et vous, Verseau, Houston. Pour votre alignement, pourriez-vous poursuivre immédiatemen
Ton sourire indique que tu gagnes 5040 d
짐
ええ、ただ、ある意味、同時にたくさんの ENTER を実行した上で、
알겠습니다. 전원 공급을 시작하는 시점 또는 그 약 2시간 30분 전에 전원이 차단될 것으로 예상합니다. 확정된 시간은 아니며, 추후 다시 안내드리겠습니다. JETT 자세로 전환하는 것은 완전히 허용됩니다. 지휘 모듈에 전원이 공급되고 플랫폼이 안정적인 상태가 되면 즉시 전환할 수 있습니다. 재미 삼아 최대 1시간의 여유 시간을 
Il y 
로저. 정렬 상태는 변경 없음, 적재량도 변경 없음, 수평면은 점화 후 3
Et sur la figure, là où vous
Al controllo dei propulsori, il fuoco è rosso a strisce. Quando i propulsori di imbardata si attivano, cancellano definitivamente l'orizzonte. Riesco 
Houston, la Base Tranquillité va vous donner quelques précisions concernant la question géologique
रॉजर। ज़मीन से देखने पर आप अच्छे लगते हैं। थ्री-ब्रावो टाइम्स क
На это уходит гораздо больше времени. Мне пр
我々が見た限りでは。音声ループで1分ほどテレビ信号を受信したという報告があり、ゴールドストーン氏からは1分ほど変調信号は受信した
시그마 세븐, 케이프 콤 테크
好的。很简单。我们看到你已经升空了，所以我们要你进行机动和姿态保持操作
ठीक है। अब पृष्ठ 32
布鲁斯，你在下面说话的声音真
... drinking my last... 25 gu
Ja, das hatten wir schon besprochen, Joe. 
Аполлон-13, Хьюс
Ha! Ha? No, I want to get the spacecraft o
13, Houston. You're coming through. We still
ضع علامة 
Что ж, у нас было мало времени, Хьюстон, чтобы рассказать вам о видах из окна, когда мы готовились к вылету; но до этого момента была видна вся северная часть освещенного по
Понял. Продолжаю записывать. Продолжайте. Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон. Я записал ваше сообщение о рул
Du meinst die Trie
ピッチは良さそうで
Родже
Полагаю, вы слышали, что моя прицельная сетка для определения угла рыскания раб
Gemini 4, qui Hawaii, trasmissione in zona cieca. Imbardata - 0°, beccheggio - 60°, leggermente a destra, prua a 300 miglia nautiche. Ripeto ancora. In zona cieca, Hawaii, trasmissione, 01:39:00, Pegasus, Imbardata - 0°, beccheggio - 60°, legger
Хорошо. Мы оставим это здесь на два отрезка,
저희는 S-6 위성을 꽤 많이 보유하고 있습니다. S-5 위성도 간간이 목격되고 사진도 몇 장 찍었지
Hai già mangiato
क्या आप इसे अप
Do
ومن الأمور الرائعة يا جاك، خاصةً بالنسبة لشخص مبتدئ مثلي، سهولة الحركة هنا. وكما تعلم من عملك في محاكي وحدة القيادة، فإن انعدام الجاذبية يُعدّ ميزةً كبيرة. لأنك تشعر بضيق المساحة عند مستوى جاذبية واحد، 
알겠습니다. 저희 계획에 대해 간략히 설명드리겠습니다. 현재 저희는 물이 매우 부족한 상황입니다. 따라서 가능한 한 물을 적게 사용하고 싶습니다. 이를 위해 61시간 후, 즉
أشعر فعلاً أنني أبرد.
А Билл предложил, если водонагреватель работает по основному к
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很神奇，就是眼睛还没适应的时候，周围一片漆黑。我确实能看到窗户上有一些涂层。现在要回到超高频VOX模式进行发射。打开面罩擦拭右侧麦克风。我舔了一下。关上面罩。面罩立刻密封，以便宇航服电路开始工作。我可不想再被它弄
Аполлон-8, Аполлон-8. Можешь 
아폴로 8호
Frank, what we want to do is get a radial upward burn; and as long as you can, thro
Fred, wegen dieser improvisierten Lithiumhydroxid-Kanister für das Kommandomodul: Wir müssen mindestens zwei davon bauen und jeweils zwei gleichzeitig verwenden – einen an jedem Schlauchsatz. Wir verbinden einen dieser improvisierten Kästen mit den roten Anschlüssen, dann wird Luft durch das Lithiumhydroxid gesaugt und durch den blauen Anschluss wieder ausgeblasen. Anschließend entfernen wir den Lithiumh
Quello che voglio dire, Jim, è che i ragazzi che stanno lavorando su questa situazione di atteggiamento per le ustioni non hanno ancora tratto le loro conclusioni definitive, ma nel frattempo vogliamo trovare qualcosa che puoi usa
Et au fait, Houston, notre antenne s'est bien rétractée
क्या आपको यह समतल लग र
Plus 37746, minus 03299, plus 00844 179 346 357, nicht anwendbar, plus 00176 37900 336 37705 42 1279 309, dreimal nicht anwendbar, plus 1350, minus 16500 13050 36389; Sirius, Rigel, 129 155 010, Leerlauf zwei Düsen, 20 Sekunden, Quads B und D, Horizontfenster X-Achse auf
嘔吐
Répète. Vous 
우리는 당신이 평균 g 값을 얻고 완전히 소모할 때까지 계속 자전거를 타시기를 바랄 뿐
감사합니다
Bene. Come st
Да, Майк, подтверждаю. Время примерно номинальное. Мы рассматривали вариант ускорения, но не думаем, что этот трек с ускорением будет хорош, так как мы уже сделали заез
حسنًا، الصفحة التالية، 16. هذا استكمال لنفس موضوع الهالة الشمسية. على ا
스포츠 소식을 살펴볼까요? 여러분이 바쁘셨던 며칠 전, 조 네이머스와 미식축구 커미셔너 피트 로젤은 "브로드웨이 조" 네이머스가 자신이 소유한 배첼러스 III 레스토랑 지분을 매각하고 뉴욕 제츠에 합류하기로 합의했다고 발표했습니다. 네이머스는 오늘 제츠 훈련 캠프에 도착해 첫 훈련을 소화했습니다. 네이머스와 함께 훈련에 불참했던 다른 제츠 선수들도 합류했습니다. 그리고 미시간주 잭슨 출신의 데이비 힐은 지난주에 출전한 세 번의 메이저 대회에서 모두 우승을 차지하며 세 번째 메이저 골프 대회 우승이라는 쾌거를 달성했습니다. 그는 필라델피아 클래식에서 우승을 거머쥐었습니다. 힐은 올해 벌써 네 번의 메이저 대회 우승을 기록하며 총상금 12만 9천 달러로 시즌 선두를 달리고 있습니다. 야구에서는 내셔널리그 서부 지구의 치열한 경쟁이 계속되고 있습니다. LA 다저스와 샌프란시스코 자이언츠는 선두 애틀랜타 휴스턴에 한 경기 차로 뒤쳐져 있습니다. 휴스턴은 48승 48패로 현재 5위에 올라 있으며, 선두와는 7경기 차입니다. 어젯밤 예정됐던 휴스턴과 신시내티 레즈의 더블헤더 경기는 비로 인해 연기되었습니다. 시카고
Apollo 13, Hous
好的，11. 事实证明，到目前为止，本次任务中两次点火的发动机性能与发动机验收测试时的性能相同。机载电脑的读数是由于您实际燃烧室内的压力与仪表读数之间存在已知的校准系数造成的。我们预计单缸运行压力为90 psi，即仪表读数为90 psi，实际燃烧室压力为95 psi。双缸运行压力下，仪表读数为94 psi，实际燃烧室压力为99 psi。机载仪表
र
It seems like I always find myself upside-down in whatever I'm doing around he
Roger, j'ai quelques questions à te poser. D'
Cavolo, ci sti
好的。前向射速 47 英尺/秒，即 1+18。后向射速 120 英尺/秒，即 2+31。时间分别为 17:42:53、2+4
Okay, dann scha
Входная таблица следующая: Mid-PAC, 000153, 000;, 178; минус 21.66, минус 165.37; 28. Следующие четыре столбца N/A; DO 4.00, Зебра Весы или что-то подобное, Бета Весы вниз 08.8, влево 0.4; вектор подъема вверх; вход выровнен, звезды 31, 33. Крен 041, тангаж 045, рыскание 024. Неиспользуемый шаблон выхода; по
Roger. Ihr Bewohner der Raumstation Columbia interessiert vielleicht, dass heute in Kolumbien Unabhängigkeitstag ist. Gloria Diaz von den Philippinen wurde gestern Abend zur Miss Universe gekrönt. Sie setzte sich gegen 60 andere Mädchen durch und s
残り2分20
君がいるぞ
Forse le
Und ich glaube, wir haben einige Vermutungen bezüglich der Außentemperatur des Brennstoffzellen-2-Kühlers festges
मुझे लगता है कि इंजन के ठीक नीचे ही वह जगह हो सक
Roger. À -1 minute, rayez « MASTER ARM, ON ». À -35 secondes, rayez les deux premières lignes. À -10 secondes, remplacez par « -9 secondes »; à « -9 secondes », ce sera donc « Manual Ullage ». À 2 secondes, rayez « MODE, FREE » et « ACA out of detent ». Après « IGNITION », à +1 seconde, rayez 
Ro
We're getting a beautiful picture in down there now, 11. The color's coming in quite clearly, and we can see the horizon and the relati
Аврора С
Columbia, qui Hou
खैर, अभी मुझे यह दिख
Friendship Seven, this is Kano. Read you loud and c
Kano, hier spricht Sigma Seven
R
わかりました。燃焼状態: DELTA-TIG はゼロ、燃焼時間は 2 + 30 でした。PAD 角度: トリム後の DELTA VGX は 0.1、VGY は 0.9、VGZ は 0.1 でした。DELTA-VC
ジム、こちらはCAP COMです。パイロットが目を覚ましたら、ジムがここにいること、
Okay. In order for us to handle the antenna switching, I 
吉姆，我们准备把电池重新接通电源。请你打开16号配电盘上的“交叉连接平衡负载”断路器，然后把2
Roger, Mike. J'aimerais vous faire part de quelques commentaires sur les données. La manœuvre automatique était très précise. Il semble que nous ayons atteint un point substellaire lors de la manœuvre; l'optique automatique a placé Canopus exactement où il devait être; le contrôle d'impulsion minimal a fonctionné comme prévu. Aux altitudes auxquelles j'ai commencé les observations, on observe une bande de brume bien distincte. Le filtre donne à la Terre une lueur, une sorte de lueur orangée. Il est très difficile de dét
Okay. We can do a, ENTER, and then put an R1, minus 
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。あと4分。今、あなたはコントロールしています。
Th
... 
이렇게
Это должно быть на широком
ठीक है, दूरबीन से देखने पर मैं बिल्कुल नहीं बता सकत
Хорошо, Джим. Вот что мы видим: батарея №3 потребляет всего около ампера, и мы думаем, что пора её отключать; батарея №3 — ВЫКЛ/
否定的です...そのすべては
आपको यकीन नहीं होगा, लेकिन अब मैं कमान संभाल रहा हूँ। ठीक है। वैंस, मैं शायद इकलौता सीएमपी हूँ जिसने चढ़ाई 
Roger. La prossima volta che ci do un'occhiata, vedrò cosa... stiamo man
13، هي
روجر، هذه رحلة جيميني 4. استيقظ الطيار قبل حوالي 20 دقيقة، وحصل على قسط من الراحة لمدة ثلاث ساعات ونص
Nein, ich versuche es noch ein
확인됐습니다. 출발! 잭, 지금 우리가 하는 일은 우주선이 이 모드로 표류하면서 지구를 다시 포착하도록 하는 겁니다
태도는 매우 긍정적이었습니다
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo s
了
روجر. فهمت يا فرانك؛ تفضل متى شئت - فقط أعطنا فكرة عن متى فعلت ذلك وك
好
了解。これから物事がうまくいくと分かりました。ジェリー、ブ
Houston, Apollo 11. Stiamo manovrando per ra
로저, 트랭퀼리티. 수산화리튬 용기는 가능한 한 나중에 사용하시길 바
Понял. Примерно через 10 секунд у нас должна произойти реверсивна
それはいい
ああ、それは最低基準ですね。3.4、4.1。そして4-Aまで一気に進めてもい
CSQ, 제미니 VIII이 또 다른
わかりました。AC インバーター 1 から AC バス 2 を
Canton Com 
جيم، ليس لدينا أي بيانات عن تحركاتك حاليًا. كيف يبدو أن هذه العملية ستسير على ما يرام فيما يتعلق بتحديد الوضعية، وهي المرحل
Хорошо. Остальная часть вашего сообщения заключалась в том, что всё в порядке, если давление находится в диапазоне от 660 до 770 psi. Если оно выше 770, вы попросите нас рассмотреть возможность повторного осмотра через 59 часов и либо запустить PCM, либо просто подождать и сообщить вам об 
ブロック、ブロック。宇宙船管制からSCS
瞧，你瞒不过我，对吧，斯科特？现在我测出了氧分压（P O2），你这么一测，它就
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿，你们的信号比较弱。我再重复一
I'll be glad to sleep over there, alright? I don't think it'll affect that; I'd rather sleep, I'd rather sleep with the probe and drogue than have to dick with it in the morn
Роджер. / - это для 3 - 46427, минус 053, плюс 141, плюс 28960, минус 00456, плюс 00720 180 021 002, NA, плюс левый 17, плюс 00883, минус 16500 12955 361
分かりました。ジムが見せてくれた地球の一部の写真は、地球の一部で、明るい部
Jim, bisher haben wir nur einen Punkt übersehen; wir bitten dich, ihn et
किसका
よし、フレッド。その前に、つまりマイナス1時間前に、機体を以下の角度に操縦しろ。ロール130°、ピッチ125°、ヨー0.12.4°。対応するジンバル角度は、ロール291°、ピッチ196°、ヨー0.45°。これでパッドだ。以上だ。コンピ
了解。推奨姿勢はロール307.0、ピッチ354.0、ヨー019.5です。LOX
是的。这应该是你最喜欢的。在顶部附近写着“录音机，快进
それで
好的。我们交接班了，但那是大约半小时前的事了，我没打电话给你。我问问他
L'altitudi
ट्रैंक्विलिटी, ह्यूस्ट
١١، هيوستن. هل يمكنك وصف الغطاء السحابي القطبي من وجهة نظرك؟ يبدو لنا أنه يمتد على طول الساحل الغربي لأمريكا الشمالية. هل يمكنك تقدي
Роджер, 11 лет. Хьюстон. Ты слишк
Je voudrais vous donner une solution rapide au cas où Jim a
Roger. Continuiamo con il Maroon Bugle. Il Presidente Nixon ha sorpreso le vostre mogli con una telefonata da San Francisco poco prima di salire su un aereo per incontrarvi. Sono rimasti tutti molto colpiti dalla vostra trasmissione televisiva. Jan e Pat hanno guardato dal Controllo Missione qui. Il lancio di Intelsat da Città del Capo è stato rinviato per la quarta volta ieri sera. Si dice che il problema sia dovuto a un malfunzionamento del regolatore di azoto nel secondo stadio del Delta. Un nuovo tentativo di lancio verrà effettuato stasera. Il sottomarino di ricerca Ben Franklin, che studia la Corrente del Golfo, ha stabilito un record navigando alla deriva per 24 ore da 3 a 30 metri sopra il fondale oceanico a 400 metri di profondità al largo della costa della Georgia. La missione è guidata da J
Okay, Jack. The next step is to get the cue card and use it to form an arch over the top of the canister; just tuck on
没错，巴兹；最后一点，我们确实需要您做一件事，即使我们
好的，杰克。现在剩下的步骤只是宇航服回路的配置步骤，目的是让这套系统全面投入运行。我们的人员希望等到你正在操作的那个气瓶压力达到7.6毫米汞柱后再进行配置，这大概还需要45分钟到1个小时——我们现在读数是4.7毫米汞柱。所以，在此期间，我们希望你用指挥官的软管，以同样的方式设置第二个指挥舱气瓶，并做好一切准备。大概到那时，就
Okay. Genau. Das ist Jim Lovell. Wir dachten, wir zeigen Ihnen heute einfach ein bisschen was vom Leben an Bord von Apollo 8. Wir haben Ihnen bereits Bilder vom Mond und von der Erde gezeigt und möchten Sie nun in unser Zuhause einladen. Wie Sie auf dem Instrumentenbrett sehen können, ist es nun schon seit mindestens vier Tagen unser Zuhause. Wir markieren jeden Tag auf dem Instrumentenbrett. Wir haben vier Tage hinter uns und arbeiten am fünften. Natürlich freuen wir uns alle auf die Landung am Freitag. Hier unten, im unteren Geräteraum des Raumschiffs, befindet sich der Fitnessberater des Präsidenten, Captain Jim Lovell, der gerade sein tägliches Trainingsprogramm absolviert. Sie sehen, wie er sich ganz frei bewegt. Er hat sich gerade den Kopf an der Optik gestoßen, die wir zur Navigation verwenden. Er trainiert mit einem Gerät, das die Muskeln in Form hält. Eine weitere sehr wichtige Funktion unseres Raumschiffs ist der Bordcomputer. Ich dachte, Sie wären vielleicht daran interessiert, die Anzeigen hier zu sehen, die uns alle Informationen über unsere Triebwerkszündung, die Navigation und die Geschwindigkeit beim Eintritt in die Erdumlaufbahn und beim Bremsen liefern. Sie sehen, dass er über ein Tastenfeld, ähnlich einer Schreibmaschinentastatur, gesteuert wird. Die Eingaben und Ausgaben darüber sind wirklich erstaunlich. Er hat uns fantastische Dienste geleistet, und Jim Lovell hat ihn hervorragend bedient. Ein weiterer wichtiger Punkt, ob im Weltraum oder auf der Erde, ist die Ernährung. Ich habe Bill Anders gebeten, Ihnen zu zeigen, wie wir hier oben im Flug essen. Entschuldigen Sie die Bildstörungen, während wir uns hier bewegen und die Kameras wechseln. Unsere Nahrung ist dehydriert und in Vakuumbeuteln verpackt. Sie sehen, dass Bill sie nur loslassen muss, damit sie an Ort und Stelle bleibt. Abgesehen von den Luftströmungen im Raumschiff würde sie vollkommen still liegen. Er holt seine praktische Schere heraus und schneidet den Beutel auf. Das Essen ist abwechslungsreich und im Allgemeinen recht gut. Wenn das nicht gerade nach einer überschwänglichen Empfehlung klingt, dann ist es das auch nicht, aber trotzdem: Es ist wirklich gutes Essen. Man merkt, dass Bill sehr geschickt ist. Er arbeitet schnell. Die Beutel mit dem Essen kleben übrigens zu
J'ai l'impre
Roger, your is set, you're in wide d
百慕大，这里是友谊七号。现在能收到信号吗？
알겠습니다. 두 가지 말씀드리겠습니다. 첫째로,
Fuel i
세상에! 바로 저기 만을 
D'accord. Concernant le chauffe-eau: c'est
Going over the insertion checklist now. D-c volts is main. Retromanual fuse switch is off. Retromanual is off. All instruments are. All batteries okay. The a-c power is good. The, let's see, where's the booster? There's some beautiful cloud patterns down there. The booster is in fron
Ora siamo in OMNI D; dobbiamo aspettare di tro
もうそのカメラで遊ぶつもりはないで
D'accord, je m'en occupe. J'ai aussi une question à vous poser. Dans cette configuration, à quai, nous devons utiliser les commandes pour contrôler le tangage et le roulis. Mais dans quelle mesure pouvons-nous les utiliser sans modif
우리는 그러지 않아요. 그냥 거기 놔두세요
哦，真抱歉。对了，弗雷德，如果你觉得每隔几分钟就切换一次 OMNI 很烦人，可以
What did we do? Burn down an—give me a
Nein, nein. Sie sind sehr langsam; sie entfernen sich nicht mehr als
Gemini 4, ici Houston. Votre connexion est très intermittente. Si vous nous écoutez, nous allons mettre à jour votre signal 6-4 au-de
48피
카나리 외과의입니다. 비행 중 메스꺼움을
Wie wäre es, wenn Sie uns einige REACQ-Aspekte nennen würden
Камеру бу
Ok. E solo una domanda. Sarebbe interessante sentire Jack per sapere se pensa che il bus principale B sia buono. Se ha qualche idea di come, se sia buono o meno, que
Roger, Frank. The cust
로저. 버즈, 이 모습 정말 멋지네요. 5초 카운트를 읽고 있습니다. 짧은 카운트로 시작하는데,
Ja. Es scheint, als ob die Taumelbewegung in die andere Richtung geht, Jack, denn die Erde steigt jetzt auf und der Mond beginnt, im Zeitfenster tief
Nun ja,
分かりました。背景の雑音が多いので、ゆっくり話してください。最初の90度ヨー操作は完了しましたか？まだの方は、ぜひお試しください。以上です
मुझे आपक
Es geschah, als wir uns in der Agena-Raumschiff-Konstellation 0°, 180°, 0° befanden u
Die von uns übertragene SPC-Last enthält den Agena-Takt-Reset. Wir legen große
건구온도는 대략 72도에서 79도 사이였습니다. 그 직전 그룹은 75도에서 77도 사이였고요. 습구온도는 마지막 그룹이 57도에서 61도 사이였고, 
Роджер. Ваша орбита изменена на 87, 147. Вы готовы к запуску при номинальном значении M, равном 4. Произойдет небольшое изменение плоскости. Мы сообщим вам эту информацию позже, и мы понимаем, что... температура была выше нормы, и мы напоминаем вам 
It's taken just a little - a
いいえ、大丈夫です。ただ、ちょっと興味深いのは、前回あなたが水を撒いた時、彼らは同時に軌道追跡に変化があったことに気づき、それを相関関係にまで調べたということです。すると、ノズルの特性とあなたが撒いた水の量を熟知していると思い込んでいる人
Aspetta un attimo, Jack. Lascia che ti 
Thats wonderful. Moscow just asked about your mood and how are you doing there. We replied that
Verseau, Houston. J'ai ton bloc-notes 
Oui monsieur. Je suis ravi de cet appareil. Je suis en mode automatique, attitude rétro, gyroscopes en mode normal, manœuvres désactivées, tous les systèmes sont au vert. Comme vous le savez sans doute, le circuit de la combinaison est sous contrôle, et voici un compte rendu
컴퓨터가 켜져 있는
Th
좋아, 이 패드에서 걔네들이 어디에 있지? 어디 보자, 
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We didn't have a chance to get a good check for you. We're going to ru
알겠습니다. 당신 말
D'accord, vous parlez du livre de mises à j
Roger, Houston. Qualc
ठीक है। मैं इस पर काम शुरू कर देता ह
这次飞行的成功，首先要归功于历史，归功于那些为我们铺路的科学巨匠；其次要归功于美国人民，他们用自己的意志表达了渴望；再次要归功于四届政府及其国会，感谢他们落实了这一意志；最后要归功于建造我们飞船的各个机构和工业团队，包括土星号、哥伦比亚号、鹰号，以及小型月球表面探测器——宇航服和背包。我们要特别感谢所有参与飞船建造、设计、测试，并倾注了全部心血和能力的美国人。今晚，我们向他们致
VHF인 것 같아
오른쪽으로 몸을 돌릴
روجر. فهمت قصدك جيداً. هل يمكنك أن تعطيني بعض المعلومات عن كيفية سيطرتك على شمال أفريقيا، وكم عدد عمليات النبض التي ق
Если я больше ничего не скажу, то запись на диктофоне в реальном времени займет совсем немного времени. Совершенно очевидно, что вам на самом деле в
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमने
11, Хьюстон. Мы собираемся проверить возможность автоматического повторного захвата в S-диапазоне, и для этого нам нужно зафиксировать нашу восходящую несущую примерно на 30 секунд. Затем мы снова включим её и посмотрим, сможет ли оборудование космического аппарата автоматически повторно захватить сигнал. Поэтому, если вы не получите от нас звонок в течение примерно 3 минут, это означает, что нам не удалось повторно захватить сигнал, и мы запр
好的，吉
حسناً. 
درجة حرارة الكاميرا 
Okay. J
자, 그럼 피치를 180, 285, 그리고 0으로 설정해 보겠습니다
طالما أ
你做那些读数
ما رأيك في أجواء اللي
Значение DELTA-H составляет минус 2900. Земля видна прям
बीच में ही आपका कनेक्शन ब्लॉक हो गया था। क्या आप दोबारा
ヒューストン、アポロ 11 号。チェックリスト ページ F9 7; ステップ 8 は完了しましたが、そのページのステップ 8、ステップ 9、ステップ 10 の間の理想的なタイミングはどれぐらいだと思
हमने मुचे
Bene. Passaggio 6, "Trasferimento alla corrente (fari spenti), ATTENZIONE AVVERTENZA ALIMENTAZIONE ATTENZIONE spia ACCESA. Segnalare a. Pannello 11, INTERRUTTORE AUTOMATICO CONGIUNZIONE BUS TRAESLUNAR, CHIUSO. Pannello interruttore automatico 16, CONGIUNZIONE BUS TRANSLUNAR, CHIUSO. Pannello interruttore automatico 11, ILLUMINAZIONE, CHIUSO. E attivare le luci di servizio." Passo. E, 13, Houston. Selezionare OMNI Bra
ええと、あの紐、つまり宇宙船の形をした紐が、ずっと私をここに留めてくれていたんです。
अब 
우
Roger, 11. Concernant votre question sur la charge de la batterie, nous pensons qu'il s'agit probablement d'une différence entre les batteries elles-mêmes; et il semble que ce phénomène ait disparu, comme une phase transitoire au démarrage. D'autres facteurs, tels que la température de la batterie, pourraient également avoir une influence. EECOMM estime que le systèm
किसी के शरीर पर वो छोटा 
روجر. أود أن يكون لديّ درجة 
Roger. Pericynthian plus 2, Minimum / 62871, NA, NA, minus 00468, plus 00254, plus 00181 173 10
Und, James, das sieht nach einer Ausb
D'accord, Jac
Это Gemini VI, приближается первый этап регулировки высоты, ведётся запись. Конец связи.
Here are the gimbal angles. Com
RKV 의료 데이터 패스 1번, 조종사 대상, 지상 시간
D'accord, Fred. Voici la procédure pour relever la température du réservoir de propergol de descente. Ce n'est pas un problème majeur, mais nos équipes indiquent que le bas de l'étage de descente est probablement en train de refroidir, et nous voulons simplement vérifier que le réservoir d'eau de descente ne risque pas de geler. Pour l'instant, il semble qu'il ne gèlera pas avant plusieurs heures après avoir été vidé, mais nous aimerions que vous nous communiquiez ces températures afin de vérifier la fiabilité de nos prévisions. La procédure est la suivante: sur le pa
Wally, hast du sch
حسنًا. ونفكر في تشغيل بعض ذلك بمعدل 12 إطارًا في الثانية. وأعتقد أنه بإمكاننا خفض كل شيء من 0.5 إلى 0.5g؛ وهذا سيستغرق حوالي 7.8 دقائق فقط... وإطارات... ضعف ذلك. أعتقد أن تشغيل 12 إطارًا في
11, Houston. Könnten wir b
那肯定不行。他们一旦接触到人工智能
ठीक है। आपमें से जो लोग नहीं जानते, यह वह जगह है जहाँ हम प्रत्येक युद्धाभ्यास के लिए अपना अधिकांश डेटा दर्ज करते हैं, और हमारे पास इस तरह का एक और कार्ड है जो टाइमलाइन बुक है जिसे डेटा डिस्प्ले क
O
Ну, кроме одного большого, который мы проехали, кажется, в нашем районе их не было. После установки EASEP я прогулялся обратно, и пока Базз начал распаковывать задокументированные образцы, я прошёлся к кратеру позади нас, диаметром примерно 70 или 80 футов и глубиной 15 или 20 футов, и сделал несколько фотографий. На дне были камни 
我已
खैर, मुझे नहीं पता कि हम 60 मील दूर हैं या नहीं, 
Okay. Apollo 8, we'd like to update your clock. This is not to correct errors which we have now but just to make up for some effects that we're going to have in lunar orbit. And what we'd like to have you do is go to and ACCEPT and let u
Хорошо. Д
Nous avons enregistré 
حسنًا. لدي 
Roger. Nous en sommes à l'étape où nous allons prendre des photos météorologiques de la Terre. Si vous êtes à proximité, j'ai l'appareil photo pointé vers la Terre et je vous indiquerai le point de repère lorsque je p
مرحباً أبولو ١١، هيوستن. لاحظنا بعض الأمور الغريبة في مُحوّل مؤشر تدفق الأكسجين. لدينا شكوك حول المُحوّل - كنا نتوقع أن نرى تدفق أكسجين مرتفعاً عند فتح صمام تهوية تخزين النفايات على وضع "التهوية". لكن هذا لم يحدث. لاحظنا أيضاً بعض المؤشرات الغريبة عند إغلاق صمام تهوية تخزين النفايات. سنواصل فحص هذا الأمر طوال الليل، وسنوافيك بتقييم للمشكلة صباحاً. أيضاً، نود أن نسأل تحديداً، عند فتح صمام تهوية تخزين النفايات على وضع "التهوية"، هل يتطابق السهم مع موضع التو
짐이 숨을 쉴 수 있도록 터널 안쪽으로
Roger, 11. We copy your word description on that. I understand you can see a shadow being cast by that cloud over between Afghanistan and Pakistan. Any estimate on how
هذا مؤكد. ستكون هذه الحروق تحديداً عمودية على مسار رحلتنا وعلى الشمس، مما
D'accord. Nous avons un système d'alignement de télescope si vous voulez essayer. Votre étoil
Je pense que c'est l'heure de manger pour moi, 
مايك، ما تأث
ठीक है। हमने परीक्षण का 
Oddio, ce ne eravamo dimenticati, ma vo
Gemini VIII, это Хьюстон. У нас загорелись фары Delta-P, что не было чем-то необычным на GT-7,
알겠습니다. 그리고 밴스, 혹시 AOS 시간이나 저희가 이
아니요, 이것은 수동 
Хорошо. На 1 минуте — «ГЛАВНЫЙ РЫЧАГ», мы у
أبو
Very fine. On down farther to the south and inland, I can see more lights. There are two, actually 
Okay. Nach dem Abschalten rechnen wir mit einem Wasserverbrauch von 3,2 bis 2,7 Pfund – das entspricht einer Stromaufnahme von 14 Ampere pro Stunde. Hinweis: Der hier angegebene Wasserverbrauch beinhaltet nicht die Kosten für Wasser und Heizung; diese kommen noch hinzu. Weiter geht es mit LiOH. Mit den Dos
目覚めに「With Their Eyes on th
Houston - Tranquility Base here. The Eagle has lande
मेरे हाथ भरे हुए थे;
네. 첫 번째 단계로, 저희가 드린 기본
休斯顿，加油
روجر. إنهم يبدون رائعين، وعلى حد علمنا، كل شيء على ما يرام من هنا. انته
Да, я мало что м
Роджер. В
Il sera là
चार्ली, हमने अभी-अभी 261
Fred, de Houston. Nous aimerions essayer de régler la télévision sur la qualité moyenne pendant une minut
صحيح. لا داعي للقلق. جون آرون ي
ठीक है। हमारे पास टेलीमेट्री की सुविधा नहीं है, इसलिए अगर आपने अपना ब्लड प्रेशर बटन दबाया है तो उससे हमें कोई
휴스턴, 또 한 가지 질문이 있
Роджер. Вы видите Землю, как и мы, из нашего левого окна, чуть больше половины Земли. Мы смотрим на восточную часть Тихого океана, и в северной половине верхней половины экрана мы видим Северную Америку, Аляску, Соединенные Штаты, Канаду, Мексику и Центральную Америку. Южная Америка становится невидимой сразу за терминатором или внутри тени. Мы видим океаны с отчетливым синим оттенком, белые полосы крупных облачных образований по всей Земле, береговые линии, западную часть США, долину Сан-Хоакин, горный хребет Сьерра, полуостров Нижняя Калифорния, а также некоторые облачные образования над юго-восточной частью США. К юго
Ouais, je n'arrive pas à comprendr
जेमिनी 4, कार्नार्वोन सीएपी कॉम। आप यहां जमीन पर
D'accord. Sur le côté de la maison, sur le panneau 16: le
Хорошо, Джим. Мы разобрались, и всё правильно, как мы тебе и объяснили в первый раз. Итак, R1
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. I'm going on fly-by-wire so I can control more accurately. It just started as I got to Guaymas, and appears to be it drifts off in yaw, to the right at about 1° per second. I
Роджер. Температура пара в скафандре 69 градусов, а в кабине +11. Она резко упала, когда загорелся индикатор избытка воды в кабине. Думаю, я попробую еще раз увеличить
알겠습니다. 볼륨 조절 스위치가 켜졌습니다. 마지막 요청을 다시 말씀해 주시겠어요? 알
Friendship Seven, Canaveral Com Tech. Read you loud and 
Температура скафандра в данный момент медленно понижается. Сейчас она 
52-DELTA 115. 2+2
Gémeaux 4, chirurgien RKV. Votre t
了解しました。もうあなたのことは終わりです。それから、ノードと…チェックの最
D'accord, Buzz. Concernant votre plan de vol, quelques mises à jour tout d'abord. Nous avons annulé la manœuvre de mi-parcours numéro 6. Restez simpl
Я знаю
Roger. Das System meldet, dass die Temperatur Ihres Anzugs über der Station um 2 Grad gesunken ist, fal
D'accord, Bill. Je crois que je veux revenir sur mon dernier point concernant l'utilisation du vecteur d'état embarqué pour le point 4. Après l'avoir examiné plus en détail au sol, ils doivent commencer à fabriquer les fichiers et à effectuer tous leurs calculs. Plutôt que de reporter ou de refaire le travail, nous allons procéder comme d'habitude. Concernant l'orbite lunaire, nous avons étudié la question et plusieurs personnes – Jack Schmitt et son équipe dans l'arrière-salle – analysent l'impact des hublots. Il semble que deux options aient un impact sur le point 2. La première consiste à ce que Jim et toi échangiez vos places et que Jim puisse observer et utiliser son SAM de cette façon. La seconde consiste à faire basculer le satellite et à laisser Jim orienter les optiques le plus loin possib
Хорошо. Время 32 часа 00 минут. Инструкции по завершении маневра: крен 101,0, тангаж 090,0, рыскание 000,0. Верхний тангаж минус 23, рыскание 93. Используйте стандартные процедуры для снижения скоростей. После стабилизации аппарата и перед началом вращения сделайте фотографии кометы Беннета. Используйте секстант с магазином G. То есть, очень светочувствительную черно-белую пленку, верно? Это пленка для съемки в условиях низкой освещенности. Сделайте три фотографии, по одной с выдержкой 5, 20 и 60 секунд. Используйте автоматическую оптику. Значения R1 плюс 34717, R2 минус 08028; R3 плюс 35075. Сделайте три фотографии, по одной с выдержкой 5, 20 и 60 секунд, используя ручную оптику. Вал будет повернут на 0,8 градуса, цапфа. Снимите примерно 50 кадров, то есть 2 секунды со скорос
أنا أتقن الأمر الآن، 
我们想再确认一下，当我们把隧道通风阀关回/DELTA-P时，读数大约是1
Habe ich da etw
13，我们有个姿态建议给你。建议你滚转285度，尝试俯仰角90度
هل يمكن أن يكون ذلك، بأي حال من الأحوال، بسبب قيامي بتحديث مفتاح وصلة
रॉजर सेवन, मेरा सुझाव है कि आप कम से कम ईंधन का उपयोग करते हुए पुनः प्रवेश स्थिति के करीब पहुंचें और दरें विकसित होने तक फ्लाई-बाय-वायर मोड में रह
我刚用哈苏7号
روجر. ماذا عن 
Хорошо. У нас есть приспособление для юстировки телескопа, если хотите попробовать. Ваша звезда в секстанте по-прежнему в порядке, но если у вас были с этим проблемы, 
Apollo 8, Houston. Vous pouvez lancer le vol 37 et nous allons suivre la mission depuis le sol pour voir comment elle se déroule. Voici quelques points d'intérêt général conce
मैं 
그리고 아쿠아리우스님, 그 방향으로 생각해 보시도록 말씀드리자면, 저희가 꽤 철저한 분석을 진행한 결과, 인버터와 볼을 끄고 전원을 켜두는 것이 더 저렴하다는 것을 알게 되었습니다. 이렇게 하면 1암페어의 전력 소모와 물 사용량을 줄일 수 있으므로, 이 방법을 사용할 예정입니다. 또한
アジェナを090度までヨーイングさせる
ええ、そうですね。スポーツ面は、あまり
Roger. Il lato notturno è abbastanza illuminato; riesco pe
Houston, abbiamo avuto un momentaneo flusso elevato di O2, ma pensiamo che sia dovuto a tutto lo spurgo delle
Roger. Abbiamo avuto un piccolo incidente qui. Jim Lovell ha inavvertitamente fatto salta
Warten Sie au
Роджер. Продолжаем с «Марун Бугл». Президент Никсон удивил ваших жён телефонным звонком из Сан-Франциско незадолго до того, как сел на самолёт, чтобы встретиться с вами. Все они были очень тронуты вашей телепередачей. Джен и Пэт наблюдали за происходящим из Центра управления полётами. Запуск спутника Intelsat с мыса Канаверал был отложен в четвёртый раз прошлой ночью. Причиной, как сообщается, стала неисправность регулятора азота во второй ступени ракеты Delta. Новая попытка запуска будет предпринята сегодня вечером. Исследовательская подводная лодка «Бен Франклин», изучающая Гольфстрим, установила рекорд, дрейфуя 24 часа на высоте от 3 до 30 метров над дном океана на глубине 400 метров у побережья Джорджии. Миссию возглавляет Жак Пикар. Уолли Ширра избран на пятилетний срок в попечительский совет Детройтского технологического института. Он будет работать в к
L'ultimo num
Итак, мы достигли 
لا يُمكنك أن تج
That tra
Eines ist sicher: An der Stelle, wo diese Leine befestigt ist, kann 
Oui. C'était une nuit très calme. Ici, l'ancienne équipe noire se plaint de n'avoir pas pu effectuer de 
现在俯仰角和偏航角（或者说俯仰角和横滚角）都朝着指定角度移动，俯仰角已经超过 23 度，横滚角也超过了 321 度。我正在放开这个方向的控制，当俯仰角达到 90 度、横滚角为 0 度时，我会切
Et, Aquarius, nous vous suivons de très près. Il semble que vous soyez légèrement hors du couloir. 
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Noch 1 Minute bis zum Zielort Tananarive; Ankunftspunkt Carna
Il sigillo dell'acqua è chiuso. Alimentazione CA 
好的，阿波罗8号。我们接下来要做的就是，等我们重新连接到高增益天线后，就把电
Roger. Stavo giusto regist
月の勢力圏から離
Columbia, this is Houston. The best we
बी
わかりました。OMNI を切り替えるだけです。わかりました。ジョー、1 ～ 4 ページの変更点を読んでみると、燃料電池ヒーター 3 がオフで、燃料電池 1 メイン バス A の中央に下りてきて、メイン バス A をオフにします。メイン バス - 燃料電池 2 をメイン バス A にオフにします。燃料電池 3 をメイン バス
Are they moving, J
كولومبيا، هيوستن. أولًا، نود أن تصل نسبة تصريف مياه الصرف الصحي إلى 10% في الجهة الخلفية. ثانيًا، لا يبدو أننا سنحتاج إلى أي تغيير في الطائرة في الوقت الحالي، لذلك لن نقوم بربط أي بيانات جديدة. ثالثًا، أود ضبط جميع سخانات التبريد على الوضع التلقائي، ونحن جاهزون لشحن البطارية، بطارية برافو؛ ستدوم حوالي 7 ساعات. إذا قررتم النوم، فسنتوقف عن شحن هذه البطارية، ولكن في الوقت الحالي، يمكننا البدء 
로저. 명사 42에 대한 HA 65.
ठीक है। हमें एक एंटर, 333 एंटर चाहिए, और फिर हम चाहते हैं कि आप हमें रजिस्टर 1 पढ़कर सुनाएँ। हम उम्मीद करते हैं कि रजिस्टर 1 10,000 होगा, और यदि रज
هذا مؤكد. ستكون 
D'accord, Frank, on dirait que ça arrive tout dro
جيميني 4. قائد الطائرة مستيقظ الآن. سنكون على أهبة الاستعداد للمهمة الطبية لإ
Oka
Роджер, у меня также есть для тебя
Roger. Alors je ferai 
알겠습니다. 지금 TV 위치를 조정하고 있어요. 빌이 프랭크의 왼쪽 창문에 TV를 설치했고, 저는 빌의 자리인 오른쪽 창문에서 밖을 보고 있는데, 지구가 제 창문으로 지나가고 있어요. 크기는 제 
こちらフレンドシッ
我正在将返回舱停在再入姿态。开始滚转。偏航角为零；滚转角正在减小。我想捕捉到这个轨迹，然后观察。滚转角看起来不错。俯仰角和偏航角都在减小。速率和姿态都很好……稍微微调一下推进器，效果非常好。我会预热一下TR-10陀螺仪，这对它们有好处。望远镜开始有点亮了，虽然
Roger，Mike。SEP PAD，RCS/G&N：和 NA
Okay, Jack. Du erinnerst dich sicher, dass alle in der Vergangenheit berichtet haben, den Monduntergang nur wenige Minuten vor dem Eintreffen gesehen zu haben. Dein Horizont wird wahrscheinlich dunkel sein, wenn du dort ankommst; du landest früh morgens; und wenn du von Westen kommst, wirst du noch auf einen dunklen Horizont blicken. Als zusätzliche Methode, ähnlich wie be
好的。断路器传感器单元，直流母线A和B，关闭
로저. 잘했어, 프레드. 이제 8단계로 넘어갈 거야. PRO 버튼을 누르면 5018이 깜빡이는 걸 볼 수 있어. 좋아. 5018이 나오면 자세를 자동(AUTO)으로 조정해야 해. PRO 버튼을 누르고 유도 제어(GUIDANCE CONTROL), PNGS,
لا، في
حسناً. في أي كتاب ستعطيني بعض الكلمات يا ت
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 지금 옴니 함선의 제어권을 넘겨받아 B동과 
Хорошо, 11. Прежде всего, проверка наших систем прошла успешно. Хочу напомнить, что завтра при активации MC&W может загореться индикатор давления при подъеме. Однако проблем быть не должно. Вы отметили, что давление во вспомогательном баке составляло всего 111 psi, что на данном этапе является н
फ्रेड, आंकड़ों में कुछ गड़बड़ी हो सकती है। दर सामान्य हो गई है; और हम इस पर नज़र रखेंगे, लेकिन हमें
हाँ, गस, तुम सच में सापेक्ष गति देख सकते हो। तुम उन्हें खिड़की
Okay. Startzeit ist 18:13 Uhr. Okay, dann gehen wir 20 Punkte am Tag zu
Tr-10 torna alla normalità. L'ho già fatto prima. Ok, abbiamo... la pressione della tuta. Dai un'altra occhiata agli inverter qui. 250 è 141 (gradi), 150 è circa 107 (gradi). Abbastanza bene da solo. Lo standby è... 7. Quasi ambiente. Negativo, è anche un po'... La pressione in cabina è di circa 5,3 (psi)
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, qui Ho
Roger. It's going to be real tight 
Wally, comment le suivi par rapp
ठीक है। हम इस दौरान आपके कंप्यूटर में आई खराबी 
Roger. Si vous voulez procéder ainsi, démarrez le mo
Okay. Ich bin wieder bei meiner alten Einstellung und warte ab, bis sich di
Verseau, Houst
هذا هو النوع الأفضل يا ب
Tranquility, this is Houston. We also have a set of about 10 questions relating to observations you made, things you may have seen during the. You can either discus
好的。Vance，我以为你们都在列一个清单，上
收到，迈克。这真
E una delle cose belle, Jack, soprattutto per un novizio come me, è la facilità di muoversi qui dentro. È, ovviamente, come sai dal lavoro nel simulatore del modulo di comando, avere la gravità zero come aiuto è davvero una manna. Perché ti senti piuttosto limitato, a un solo g, e ti muovi molto lì dentro, ed è piuttosto facile in questo ambiente. Come puoi vedere, sembrava piuttosto pulito, ho trovato un paio di rondelle allentate e un piccolo tappo di plastica della telecamera di sequenza si era staccato e l'ho trovato incastrato vicino al pannel
नहीं, ईकेजी काम नहीं कर रहा था। शायद आप उन सेंसरों को दबा सकते हैं। ठीक है, सर्जन ने मुझे बताया कि ईकेज
VOX रिकॉर्डिंग के लिए जा रहा हूँ। खिड़की से सूरज की रोशनी
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。通知你们，鹰号飞船在运行7小时后坠
D'accor
ठीक है। हमारे पास 2 डिग्री का एक पृ
11, hier spricht Houston. Aufgrund unserer Entlüftung über den Abwasserablauf haben wir festgestellt, dass Ihr O2-Durchflusssensor tatsächlich defekt 
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはザンジバル・カ
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
Eh bien, vous ne voulez pas… Vous ne voulez pas que la nacelle et la sonde soi
ठीक है, जिम। और मैं आपको एस-बैंड स्टीयरेबल एंटीना को सक्रिय करने की एक छोटी सी प्रक्रिया बताना चाहता हूँ, जिसे आपको 90 डिग्री यॉ पूरा करने के बाद करना है।
Зат
जी हां। फ्लाइट यह भी जानना चाहेगी कि आपके आरसीएस हीटर स्विच की स्थिति क्या है और इंडिकेटर लाइट की 
제 생각엔 아닌 것 같아요, 프레드. 당신보다 수백 마일 뒤쪽에 있어요. 700마일 정도라고 들었어요. 그리고 항로 조정팀이 중간에
Roger, Houston. Qui il rapporto sullo stato dell'equipaggio. Siamo in ritardo con acqua e cibo, e non sembra che abbiamo molto appetito. Stiamo cercando di stare al passo con l'acqua, ma il cibo... non che ci sia qualcosa che non va nel cibo, ma semplicemente non 
好的，弗雷德。稍等。我们一直在讨论是否让你在ACS（血管介入治疗）下进行手术。目
Довольно сильно к
Et, 13, nous aimerions vérifier que les deux s sont éteints, s'il vous plaît
Okay, wir haben zwei Sätze am 26. und einen
はい、∆Tを送ってください。大丈夫
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジ
हाँ, बिल्कुल। हमें लगता है कि ऐसा ही ह
حسنًا. لقد فه
Bon, on y va. PRIMARY, PRIMARY, HIGH, VOICE, (tousse) PCM, RANGE, DOWN VOICE BACKUP, AUX TAPE, OFF; TELEMETRY sur DATA; et UP TIM COMMAND sur NORMAL; VHF A et B, OFF; RECEIVE seulement,...; PCM/ANALOG, RECORD, FORWARD, NORMAL, NORMAL - c'est bon, LOW - P
जेमिनी 4, सीएसक्यू। हमारे पास बस यही जा
Okay, Bill. Das kommt auf Seite 2, Strich 22 deines Flugplans. Für den Kommandomodul-Piloten – ich habe es ihm ja schon gesagt – möchten wir, dass er oben auf der Seite, ungefähr bei [Zeitangabe fehlt], eine Ausrichtung durchführt. Danach sollte die Navigation wie geplant erfolgen. Die vier Sterne sind Pro
حسنًا. لا تدعهم ي
Роджер. Не могли бы вы сообщить нам нашу поправку на дальность, нашу скорость 
नहीं, अगर आपने
Позвольте мне сначала повернуться к вам спиной
क्य
아폴로 11호입니다. 여기는 휴스턴입
Ami
साथ ही, एस-5 प्रयोग। एमसीसी ने क्रू से अनुरोध किया है कि वे ग्राउंड ट्रैक के साथ क
此
알았어, 조. 내가 제대로 받았는지 다시 한번 확인해 볼게. 그 후, 우리 동안 육분의를 이용해 베넷 혜성을 관측하고, 혜성이 보인다면 롤 각도를 기록하라는 거지? 혜성은 이상적으로는 45도에서 75도 사이에서 
Roger. I'd like to give you a little briefing what we came up with for the terminal reentry maneuver. Are you
——已初始
ロジャー、Rev 12 RKVでPLAとCLAの時刻を更新します。Rev 13ではカナリア諸島にCバンドの航跡が残ります。また、軌道航法チェックランも行います。姿勢制御には燃料は使用しません。これはG.E.T、つまりG.M.T.の時刻で
Hai qualche lettura sul fluss
MARK
Воспроизведение ленты осущест
저는 부스터를 향해 초속 약 5피트(약 1.5m)의 추력을 가했습니다. 분리 연소는 대략 6~7초 정도 걸렸습니다. 부스터를 향해 초속 약 5~6피트(약 1.5~1.8m)의 추력을 가한 후, 분리되는 모습을 지켜봤습니다. 다시 초속 약 5피트(약 1.5m)의 추력을 가했습니다. 분리가 시작되는 
Ja, wir haben den Adapter verwendet, als wir mit dem HF-Check angefangen haben, und ihn einfach so gelassen. Und er scheint genauso gut zu funktionieren wie 
- - Okay, Jo
Tentatively, midcourse correction at is zero; and in ab
Sounds good. Ge
지금 계획을 세우고
Okay, Houston. Die Dockingsonde wurd
Ich prüfe gerade die Gleichspannung. Hauptbus 24 V, isolierter Bus 27,5 V, Anschluss 1: 25 V, Anschluss 2: 25 V, Anschluss 3: 25 V. Standby-Anschluss 1: 25 V, Standby-Anschluss 2: 25 V, isolierter Anschluss: 28 V. Zurück zum Hauptbus: Lüfter 1 und 2: jeweils 115 V. Stromaufnahme: 20 A. Restsauerstoffdruck: 50 psi (primär), 75 psi (seku
はい、いいですね。コンポーネントライトはH2O SEPは表示しません。そのすぐ下のCB(16)の「HEATER DISPLAY, CL
On y travaille, Fran
Ты... прост
Vielleicht ein wenig horizontal verschoben in Richtung – mal sehen – Houston. Um Ihnen zu helfen: Wir schauen genau über uns, mit der Sonne auf der rechten Seite und auf unserer linken Seite – sie komm
わかりました。いいですね。1、スタン
HFアンテナを引き込んだほうがいいかもしれません
Джим, Х
いや、正直に言うと、窓の外が見えるミッション
好的，吉姆。在第二行，系统 A 下：上升馈线 2 和上升馈线 1 应该打开。任务定时
자, 아쿠아리우스. 다음 단계는 방금 잘라낸
Stand by 1, Fr
No, there isn't anything in it. i
… Alimentation de contrôle, vitesse orbitale de la plateforme stable; pression RCS, contrôle d’attitude réactivé, plateforme BEF. Le temps BIT est de 15 minutes – le temps BIT indiqué par la vanne d
C'est à 
Pareil pour moi. Je ne sais pas si je suis en haut, en bas, sur le côté, ou autrem
Sì. Il CMP è pronto per la segnalazione. 
さあ、ヒュ
Roger. Hawaii was trying to give me some type of update concerning the fuel consumed when we had LOS. Do yo
جيميني 4
53-델타 100. 2+07. 01 26 56. 11+36.
سينقلونك بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى ساموا. ستقضي الليلة في ساموا، ثم تستقل طائرة من طر
我想今天也是加利福尼亚州的生日，我记得他们有200年历史了，我们祝他们生日快乐。我想今
2番はひどい状態です。ベアリングが壊れていて、ものすごい音を立てているので、電源を入れるの
Jim, je peux te donner l'idée générale de la procédure proposée pour la mise en orbite du module de commande G&N. C'est la procédure actuellement envisagée. On pourrait en trouver une meilleure, mais voici ce qu'on étudie pour le moment. La première étape consiste à viser la Terre, comme lors de la phase intermédiaire. Ensuite, on effectuera un alignement sur l'axe du corps, à 40° + 5° sur l'ACS, pour placer la bille à 0°. On pourra alors te donner l'attitude de la bille à suivre pour pointer les optiques vers la Lune. Et si tu peux voir des étoiles, on pourra aussi les utiliser. Ensuite, on te donnera un ensemble équivalent d'angles CDU à appliquer pour incliner la plateforme. L'alignement grossier est maintenant terminé. On effectuera ensuite un alignement fin en visant la Lune, puis le Solei
تفضل ي
Das stimmt. Ich habe meine Handschuhe ausgezogen, seitdem... ich meine Ärmel nach den ersten 
روجر. سأقوم بتقليل درجة حرارة المقصورة، فهي لا تزا
Sono... proprio in cima alla fila. 1
了
はい、そうです。まだ自動操縦です。もうすぐフライ・バイ・ワイヤ
Der Landeanflug war ziemlich anstrengend. Als wir hinausschauten, konnten wir die beiden Zwillinge-Sterne rechts von Zwillinge VI – Korrektur – VII – erkennen. Sie standen alle in einer Lin
了解です。時刻は - イベントは - で、姿勢はロール101.0、ピッチ090.0、ヨーは全開です。高ゲイン角度はピッチマイナス23、ヨー93です。通常の手順で速度を減衰させます。速度を減衰させた後、スピンアップする前に、超高感度白黒フィルム（Gマガジン）を六分儀に装着します。次に、オーディオ自動光学系を使用して、5秒、20秒、60秒の露出時間でそれぞれ1枚ずつ、計3枚の写真を撮影
Jack, why don't you get the othe
我必须向我们同一地区的其他人民致以问候。我们虽然身处两个半球，但
알겠습니다. 대략적인 정렬 각도는 다음과 같습니다. 롤(ROLL) + 298.95, 피치(PITCH) + 27
حسنًا. عن
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस। सीडीआर का मान 11014
Okay. Houston, Apollo 8.
第 20 点 7.4、101.07、155、216.9
जब आपका काम पूरा हो जाए, तो आप मुझे वह R - R-3 में मौजूद चे
좋아요
게인을 '높음'으로 낮추자마자 신호 강도가 올라
OK. Ça va en bas. On est dedans, il y a assez de lumière. Ma
شكراً لك يا مايكل. من باب الفضول، هذه النوافذ الجانبية ضبابية للغاية لدرجة أنه عندما تسطع عليها الشمس، فإنها بالكاد تسمح بالرؤية - إنها سيئ
ठीक है। पैनल 5: सीबी जी एंड 
嘿，它停了——它停了。他们——他们把
11, Houston. On your O2 flow, fuel cell 3: apparently it 
This is Friendship Seven. I have ha
Эй, Фред, говори четко и ясно. Понимаю, ты занимался весенней уборкой, переставлял 
Roger. You got a big fat GO from us. It looks gr
이글, 휴스턴. 이 모드에서 간단한 카운트
Roger. Die „Black Bugle“ ist soeben eingetroffen mit einigen morgendlichen Kurznachri
Okay, Vance. Stai dicendo che dovremmo iniziare con la PREP nel manuale di emergenza a circa, e ne parlerò tra un minuto con Jim e poi ti risponderemo. Quando siamo in assetto di accensione, dovremmo vedere il Sole proprio in cima, e presumo che questo sia il fermo numero 2. Jim e io ne avevamo già parlato, e osservando il terminatore sulla Terra, abbiamo calcolato che il Sole si trovasse a un angolo di circa 70-65 gradi, quindi sarà proprio lì. Abbiamo una regola di accensione che dice che se le velocità sono superiori a 10 gradi al secondo, bisogna spegnerlo. E, dopo aver regolato, vuoi che lasci 470 per un po' così potete dargli un'o
ثيتا،
C
了解。こ
了解。86.8×
Хорошо, звучит неплохо. Потому что я не знаю, где я — как далеко я тебя потерял. Хорошо, панель 4; ТЕЛЕКОММУНИКАЦИЯ, ГРУППА 1
Okay – Okay, klin
D'accord
REACQ와
ठीक है, जैसा कि आप जानते हैं, कंट्रोल मोड ड्रिफ्टिंग के लिए सेट किया गया है। चुना गया मोड नॉर्मल, ऑटो, जायरो केज्ड है। मैंने रीएंट्री एटीट्यूड चुना है। मैं अभी फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड में हूँ। मैन्यूवर स्विच बंद है। मैं आपको ईंधन और ऑक्सीजन की मात्रा बता देत
Aurora Seven, qu
जिम, क्या आप हमें पीसीएम से हाई बिट रेट में बदलने का विकल्प दे सकते हैं? हमें ल
Ich würde jetzt gern etwas trinken
Ok. Ho appena ricevuto un ALLARME PRINCIPALE e una SOTTOTENSIONE SUL BUS PRINCIPALE A. E ora sto iniziando a 
Wir ha
こんにちは！ジム、ジャックがコンピューターを起動した時のサービスモジュールSEP姿勢に基づいて、ジンバルの粗調整角
Hab
好的，Vance，你做完后告诉我们，这样我们
Ich glaube, was wirklich passiert, ist Folgendes: Wir rollen und dadurch ändert sich der Winkel, a
Sì, è proprio quell
ठीक है। 134 17; कुंजी रिलीज़; आगे बढ़ें... यह होना चाहिए था - 124 01. एक और। लक्ष्य
रॉजर। 04 प्लस 32 प्लस 38। मेरे पास एक सुधार है, प्लस 37; मेरी घड़ी मे
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। लगभग 2 मिनट में हनीसकल को कमान सौंपी जा रही है।
रॉजर। आप सभी से मुझे इससे बेहतर व्यवहार नहीं मिल सकता 
Okay. I'll select SECONDARY and swa
This is Friendship Seven. I had a lot of cloud cover coming off 
杰克，在最下面一行，我打算把之前拔掉的“加热器显示”断路器和“显示”
روجر. قادم إليك. 30، SPS/G&N: 36691؛ ناقص 061، زائد 067 135 23 4149؛، زائد 32020، زائد 06713، ناقص 02773 181 054 013؛، HA غير متوفر، زائد 00230 32833 228، دلتا VC 32625 2
クワッド 4 に搭載されているジェット デフレクターは、表面がクワッド 1 のものよりしわが寄っているように見えます。一般に、の下部は、*** にかなりよく耐えているように見えます。後部で写真を撮れば、前面で
GMT
Roger. Non ci sarà la televisione durante lo sga
ジム、今のところあなたの動きに関するデータはありません。手順の最初の部分である姿勢調整に関しては、この手順はどのよう
نعم. أعتقد أن السؤال الأساسي هو مقارنة الكرات هنا ومن النافذة، ولا يبدو الأمر غير معقول للغاية، وأعتقد أن جيم يقول إن الانحراف والدورا
물병자리 여러분, 지금 우리가 
ठीक 
Roger. Hier kommt eine CSI-Aufgabe: NOUN 11, 105 35 3700, 107 11 3000, 0538
Okay, Jim. Looks like what we have to do is - In order to maintain even heating, we just have to yaw the whole machine about 90 degrees per hour in increments. So we'll give you a call when it'
Ok, Acquario. Elimineremo questa modalità di controllo. Vorremmo che riportassi la macchina all'assetto originale, e noi passeremo alla modalità ATTESA, e poi dovremo staccare la palla dalla linea per risparmiare energia. E poi, per mantenere un riscaldamento uniforme, ogni 15 o 30 minuti ti chiameremo 
そのア
Questo è tutto per quanto riguarda le notizie mondiali e nazionali e gli approfondimenti. Nella pagina sportiva, Hank Stram dei Kansas City Chiefs è stato nominato allenatore dell'anno della AFL. Questa è la seconda volta in tre stagioni. La votazione è stata effettuata da una giuria dell'Associated Press composta da 30 giornalisti e telecronisti sportivi, tre per ogni città. Il più vicino a lui era Weeb Ewbank. Altri allenatori che hanno ricevuto voti sono stati Sid Gilman di San Diego e Lou Sabin di Denver. Per quanto riguarda l'All Star Game dello Shriners College di ieri, il North ha raffreddato il South per 3 a 0. Dick Berlinsky del Michigan State ha calciato un field goal da 23 yard nel primo quarto ed è stato tutto ciò di cui il North ha avuto bisogno per battere il South mercoledì, nell'All Star Game dello Shriners College. Vediamo, immagino che le cose interessanti siano che i primi down, North 19, South 16; le corse, North 214, South 169; Il passaggio era Nord 96, Sud 109. Quindi, tutto sommato, sembra che fossero alla pari. A quanto pare Parseghian e i suo
Je suis de retour en émission VOX. Tu me reçois, Deke? J'ai réussi une belle inclinaison de 90 degrés vers la gauche. Que
ジョー、もう一つ質問があります。サービスモジュールを切り離した後、コマンドモジュールのフルパワーアップが少し早まったら、早めにJETT姿勢制御に移行して、その部分をきちんと整えて、JETTの1時間前までしばらく待機したいと思っています。ところで、その時間まで電力は使用するのでしょうか？トンネルを登る途中で2本のケーブルを外さな
줌 렌즈에 대해 아는 사람 있나요? 이 렌즈는 12.5mm에서 75mm까지 조절이 가능한데, 카메라에서 
Хорошо. Первое, что нужно учесть, это то, что план полета показывает, что CDR должен быть готов к посадке. Второе, краткое описание вашего управления. Все ваши системы выглядят исправными. Траектория показывает, что у вас есть CPA с режимом 69,67 миль, а время перисинтеза равно. У вас есть захват на хорошем свободном возврате. Пока рано полностью оценивать траекторию для управления коридором. Обновления данных блока +11 не будет. После просмотра кривых, похоже, что давление вентиляционного отверстия батареи фактически равно нулю при 0,2–0,3 вольт, так что — мы с вами согласны, и вы можете продолжить сброс воды. Нам еще предстоит провести проверку связи, как только мы займем хороший уг
هذ
हम आपको खूब पानी पीने की सलाह देना चाहते हैं। हमें लगता है कि आप कम पानी पी रहे हैं। हमने आपके डोज़ीमीटर की रीडिंग ले ली
振動は良好です。ASCSはこの時点で故障したようです。緊
Gemini VIII, Guayma
... se
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. على هذا النجم، تعمل مناورة الوضع التلقائي بشكل ممتاز. أنا الآن عند نقطة ما تحت النجم. كل شيء يبدو رائعًا باستثناء عدم وجود نجم ف
Хорошо.
Хорош
C'est une bonne façon de le décrire. Il me semble que le si
알겠습니다. 조종 모드는 수동, 자이로스코프는 정상, 기동은 꺼져 있습니다. 연료는 45~50%입니다. 풍선은 꺼졌습니다. 산소는 81~100%입니다. 제 상태는 양호합니다. 캡슐 상태도 양호하지만, 우주복 증기 배출 온도를 적절하게 
ठीक है। अब, जो, तुम्हें 12 इंच लंबी और 1/2 इंच व्यास की चार पट्टियाँ काटनी हैं। उन्हें बैग के बाहरी किनारों पर पसलियों के ऊ
I was just commenting - I've been looking here at the thrusters on quads 1 and 4. We've got a slight discoloration on the outside of the barrel. The nozzles look like they hadn't eve
अरे फ्रैंक, क्या तुम्हें खबर मिली कि फ्रेड का चयन ऑल-डिस्ट्रिक्ट फुटबॉल ट
Хорошо. Если вы включите компьютер, мы вам обновим информа
كما أن هذا يعتمد على كمية الوقود المستهلكة في مدارك ال
هذه جبال الهيمالايا
Roger. Since you're on OMNI D (Dog) at this time,
روجر، لديّ بعض المعلومات التي سنناقشها بعد التمرين التالي. نريدك هذه المرة أن تجرب وضع
戈尔多，
그때는 눈송이 하나밖에 못 
Ro
Okay, Jim. Wir haben noch etwas mehr als 2 Minuten bis
Hello, Apollo 11, Houston. We've pl
非常
... Wir haben in 76 Meilen Entfernung etwas, das wie Agena aussieht, und außerdem ein weiteres Objekt im Blick, das sich 
알겠습니다. 다시 말씀해 주시겠어요? 17-1 구역에서 경사각이 0도일 때, RN에서 RP를 
यह 130 फीट लंबा है - मतलब 
了解。ミッショ
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We'd like you to do a, option 1 preferred, and establish as listed in the flight plan at 12 hours. We'd like you to commence th
네, 에드 씨, 지금 혈압 측정기를 꺼내지 않으신 걸로 알고 있습니다. 그럼 혈압계 커프에 공기를 넣어주시고, 혈압 측정기는 사용하지 않겠습니다.
Okay. E immagino, Charlie, che tu non abbia... Hai una modalità di mantenimento ATT in beccheggio 
Très bien. Je suis prêt à commencer la procédure. Lorsque vous me répondrez, parlez fort dans le microphone, car la liaison descendante est assez bruyante. La première chose à faire, et nous allons le faire sur une cartouche, puis vous répéte
わかった。そのままにしておきましょう（ポンプ2つ）。そういえば、もし機会があれば、これ
罗杰，弗兰克。我们现在正在做的是这样的。我们很想进行地平线校准。我们总共需要15个标记；你
ただその件であなたを捕まえようとしているだ
好的，我们
D'accord, Jack. Reprenons la procédure de charge de la batterie que je t'ai donnée. Pour interrompre la charge, il te suffit d'écrire « Ouvert » ou « Arrêt » à côté de l'interrupteur que je t'ai indiqué. Sur le panneau 250, le disjoncteur que tu as déjà ouvert; sur le panneau 275, INVERTER POWER-2 MAIN B, ouvert; panneau 5, BAT RELAY BUS BAT A, ouvert; SENSOR UNIT AC BUS 2, ouvert, SENSOR SIGNAL AC2, ouvert; BATTERY CHARGER, MAIN B, ouvert; BATTERY CHARGER AC POWER, ouvert; BATTERY CHARGER, BAT A CHARGE, ouvert; INVERTER CONTROL 2, ouvert; INVERTER CONTROL 3, ouvert; tu as déjà effectué le raccordement du bus principal; puis, mets l'interrupteur BAT CHARGE sur AC 1. Sur le
روجر. هذه فريندشيب سفن. نسب
Prêt
Ro
알겠습니다. 그리고 여기 시간표와 관련해서 말씀드리자면, 빌과 짐을 좀 더 재우고 
Сейчас она начнет разря
是的，我们已经完
자, 이제 해볼
好的，谢谢。我们希望明天启动指令舱后——或者今天晚些时候——能够更准确地确定泄漏源头。但是，制导人员表示，他们的数据中没有发现任何泄漏痕迹，而且即使是极少量的泄
哈哈！哈哈！你上次去灌木丛里，我的脚蹼上还留着黑色的刹车痕迹呢。好了，你看，我又向右偏航了。我得往右偏——更正一下，我向左偏航了
- - 모든 항목을 닫고 나머지 항목을 지운 다음, 기존 항목을 모두 지우고 싶습니다
Odyssey, Houston. Wir benötigen einen Befehl zum Zurücksetzen Ihres COMM-Geräts. Anschließend möchten wir Sie bitten, das Gerät herunterzufahren, die Heizungen auszuschalten, aber Batterie 
Roger. Ich verstehe dich laut und
You're going right d
Very fine. Thank you very much. You don't have any word to pass on? Can you say anything in Spanish to the fellows down h
रॉजर। अब हमें थर्मल समस्या बिल्क
Okay. Turn the En
روجر، ١١. تم الاستلام. ننصحك بالذهاب إلى هذا الخيار، الخيار ١ هو الأفضل، ثم انتقل إلى وضعية الطائرة. انتهى. بعد ذلك سنحصل على بعض الاتصالات. عندما تصل إلى وضعية الطائرة، ستكون درجة الصوت ٩٠
Okay. Joe, schneide jetzt vier Streifen zu, jeweils 12 Zoll lang und 1/2 Zoll im Durchmesser. Klebe diese dann außen an den Rippen des B
Oui, tout à fait. Pur
E ora stiamo osservando quello che chiamiamo Boot Hill, che si verifica 20 secondi dopo l'inizio della di
Ha! Tu vois comme c'est to
了解。ハンドルを前後に引くと、2つのギアが回転します
Sie haben sich auch die Ergebnisse Ihrer Landmarkenverfolgung angesehen. Die Markierungen waren anscheinend alle sehr gut, und wir haben hier eine ganze Seite mit Daten zu den Höhen der verschiedenen Standorte. Ich werde sie Ihnen jetzt nicht vorlesen, wollte Ihnen aber mitteilen, dass die Markierungen anscheinend sehr gut funktioniert haben. Ich habe auch Ihre Verbrauchsmaterialien, insbesondere Ihre Treibstoffmengen. Die Angaben beziehen sich auf die Abweichungen vom Sollwert, falls Sie diese benötigen. Ihr schlechtester Quad ist Quad Charlie, der um 9 Prozent unter dem Sollwert liegt. Die anderen Werte lese ich Ihnen nur vor, wenn 
Cosa 
Роджер. У всех здес
Да, я очень доволен всем. Я всё бросил, чтобы раздобыть схему 
جاك 
फ्रेड, आप
それは決してあなたの目に留まら
Roger. We're working on the
Mark MIT pictures to 3 35 36, crank two by--at infin
Ok. Ottimo affare, Frank. L'altra cosa è che i ragazzi nella stanza sul retro vorrebbero un po' di tempo quando tutti sono svegli: se accendessi entrambe le ventole della cabina per circa 5 minuti, vorrebbero vedere qual è la temperatura DELTA sulla telemetria quando si elimina la stagnazion
11, Houston. Die Bildqualität auf unserem Monitor ist ziemlic
Ro
Et Mme Robert Goddard a déclaré aujourd'hui que son mari aurait été si heureux. « Il n'aurait pas crié, rien. Il aurait simplement rayonné. » Elle a ajouté: « C'était son rêve, envoyer une fusée sur la Lune. » Part
POTENZA DI CONTROLLO DELLA ROTAZIONE, DIRETTA, due di loro, SPE
Zwillinge 4, hier spricht
هل يمكن أن يكون ذلك، بأي حال من الأحوال، بسبب قيامي بتحديث مفتاح وصلة ا
Okay. D
네, 맞습니다. 16번 회로의 차단기를 확인했는데,
ولا داعي للقلق بشأن مياه الشرب. اشرب ما تشاء، فهي متوفرة بكثرة. يوجد
Одиссей, Хьюстон. Вы можете обратиться в UP TEL BLOCK. (Далее следует текст, не относящийся к тексту, не относящийся к те
Хорошо. Ну, у нас здесь, на Среднем Западе, была сильная метель; не знаю, видно ли это оттуда или нет. А в Хьюстоне, кстати, становится довольно прохладно, около 35 градусов. И мы хоте
Ро
Роджер. Да, это было на светлой стороне. Земля была освещена примерно на две трети, терминатор находился у горизонта. А теперь свет исходил с противоположного края Земли, солнечного края, примерно на четверть-треть радиуса от края. В целом, он располагался относительно линии, проведенной перпендик
Jim, wir
Хорошо. Похоже, мы пришли к согласию по этому вопросу, и, думаю, 
Roge
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다
Okay. There's not a whole lot to it. Well, let's see, we'll start with the - Let's start with sports, what the heck. The Astros survived 8 to 7, the Braves got five or six runs in the - five runs in the ninth inning, but they just made it; and in the other important game of the day, the Cubs were rained out. I have all the rest of the scores, you can tell me if you want any of them. They had earthquakes in Manila and other areas of the island of Luzon. There were three tremors and they kept t
أتمكن من رؤية كوكبة الجبار 
로저, 빌. 보조 보일러, 아니 사실 두 가지 정비 절차 모두 고장 수리 책자에 나와 있는데, 주 
E ci aspettiamo di perdere l'aggancio quando passa sopra la nostr
Хьюстон, Близнецы 4. Я понял, что
ठीक ह
Roger. Vous devriez maintenan
يا أهل هيوستن، ستُقدم لكم قاعدة ترانكويليتي بعض التعليقات بخصوص سؤال الجيولوجيا الذي طُرح الليلة الماضية. لقد هبطنا في حقل فوهات بركانية ناعم نسبيًا، يتكون من فوهات ثانوية مستطيلة وأخرى دائرية، معظمها ذو حواف مرتفعة بغض النظر عن حجمها. هذا ليس صحيحًا دائمًا، فهناك بعض الفوهات الصغيرة التي لا تظهر لها حواف واضحة. تتكون الكتلة الأرضية في جميع أنحاء المنطقة من رمال ناعمة جدًا إلى طمي. أظن أن أقرب ما ي
11, Houston. Veuillez l
أخشى أنني لم أنقل ذلك
Roger. Ich werde die Werte für das Abdocken auf Null setzen. Meine Fra
Roger. And T/M down here is saying that the Fuel Cell O
Not significantly. I could get down to about the first 2 inches without much of a problem, and then as I would pound it in about as hard as I could do it, and the second one took two hands on the hammer, and I was putting pretty good dents in the top of the extension rod, and it just wouldn't go much more than - I think the total depth might have been about 8 or 9 inches. But even there, it didn't - For some reason it didn't seem to want to stand up straight. In other words, I'd keep driving it in and it would dig some sort of a hole but it wouldn't - just penetrate in a way t
Rea
네, 프레드. 앞으로 몇 시간 동안 진행할 몇 가지 작업에 대해 말씀드리겠습니다. 원활한 통신을 위해, 그리고 잠시 거리 측정을 위해, 16번 패널의 파워 앰프 회로 차단기를, 음성 기능 스위치를 음성(VOICE)으로, 거리 측정(RANGING) 
Siamo sicuri (illeggib
केबिन का गुंबद लगभग 57 डिग्री सेल्सियस है। केबिन का तापमान 90 डिग्री सेल्सियस है। सूट का इनलेट 62 डिग्री सेल्सियस है। प्राथमिक ऑक्सीजन 50 psi और द्वितीयक ऑक्स
Clairement en dessous de moi. Je le suivais du regard depuis Carnarvon. Jusqu'à Carnarvon, il était en dessous de nous, puis il est monté jusqu'à l'horizon, avant de redescendre en dessous. On aurait presque dit qu'il était sur une orbite différente de la mienne. Son apogée et son périgée étaient différents des miens. Bref, j'ai tenté de le rattraper au lever du jour, dès que j'ai pu le localiser. Comme je l'ai dit, à ce moment-là, il se trouvait à un ou deux kilomètres devant moi, en dessous. Plus j'essayais de me rapprocher, moins je gagnais de terrain. Je tirais en rétrograde. J'utilisais mes propulseurs supérieurs de manière à réduire ma vitesse totale, et je tirais… simultanément. Je ne suis jamais vraiment parvenu à le rattraper, et il a continué à s'éloigner. Il m'est apparu évident qu'une fois arrivés à Hawaï, pour rattraper le lanceur à temps pour la sortie extravéhiculaire, nous épuiserions probablement tout le carburant embarqué. Or, le protocole aéroporté interdisait cette manœuvre. J'ai donc consulté le commandant de bord et nous avons décidé de ne pas poursuivre la partie de la mission concernant le propulseur. Je ne sais pas si je l'ai mentionné, mais lors de la séparation du propulseur, nos mouvements semblaient faibles, de l'ordre d'un demi-degré par seconde en tangage et en lacet. J'ai tenté de les atténuer. J'ai émis une impulsion dans chaque direction, puis je me suis concentré sur la séparation du propulseur. Nous nous sommes séparés, et ce, de la manière dont nous avions généré d'autres mouvements. Nous nous sommes f
Okay. Jack. Are you happy with 
네, 필요한 게 있으시면 저희가 여기 땅바닥
네. 배터리 충전, 벤트 밸브
ここのハッチから、かなり良い写真を撮るこ
ああ。その通りです。もし彼が、あなたが保持
알겠습니다. 손잡이를 
로저. 여기는 정상인 것 같네요. 모든 게 좋아 보입니다. 자동 연료는 55% 남았습니다. 70,000피트를 지나 65,000피트까지 도달했습니다. 자세는 매우 안정적입니다. 60,000피트에 가까워지고 있습니다. 레이트 커맨드도 아주 잘 작동합니다. 50,000피트에 가까워지고 있습니다. 아주 좋아 보입니다. 45,000피트에 가까워지고 있습니다. G는 약 1g까지 떨어졌습니다. 40,000,000피트에서 스로틀을 당길 준비를 하고 있습니다. 스로틀을 당기니 스로틀이 빠졌습니다. 소리는 들리지만 구름 때문에 보이지는 않습니다. 자세는 잘 유지되고 있습니다. 수동 레버는 들어가 있습니다. 연료가 꽤 빨리 소모되고 있습니다. 이제 스로틀이 보입니다. 아주 좋아 보입니다. 보조 감속 장치를 작동시키려고 했는데, 사실 필요 없네요. 레이트 커맨드가 거
وفي هيوس
Du fäh
Vous pouvez ma
Sigma Seven, hier spricht Canton Com Tech. Ich lese Sie in D
لا، يا برج ال
好的。顺便一提，月球上的LPD值是零
Roger. Pendant ce petit incident, est-ce que la tension est
收到。稍等。你的下行链路性
Holding agai
Friendship Seven, qui Indian Cap Com. Il chirurgo vor
Esatto, CAP COM, è molto facile manovrare con la mitragliatrice. L'unico problema che ho è che non ho abbastanza carburante. Ho esaurito il carburante e sono riuscito a manovrare intorno alla parte anteriore della navicella, indietro e fino alla cima dell'adattatore. Sono quasi... tornato nel campo visivo di Jim. L'unica cosa che vorrei è averne di più. Questa è l'esperienza più bella che abbia mai fatto... è semplicemente fantastica! In questo momento sono a testa in giù, guardo in basso e sembra che ci stiamo avvicinando alla costa della Calif
केप, यह स्टीलहेड है; आपसे अनुरोध है कि सिफारिश करने के
Okay. If we could try the high gain and maybe we can get started on this COMM check. I'd also like to verify that you've got the LMP and the CMP trying to get some slee
Voilà notre amie la lune. À quelle heure devons-nous survoler Muchea? Préparez-vo
Mist! Schau jetzt gut aus dem Fenster, denn der Bereich, den ich gesehen habe, ist jetzt in deinem Fenster – dort, wo ich den 
«Аполлон-11», это
Hallo Quito. Hier spricht Sigma Seven. Kö
Eine Sache, die ihr wahrscheinlich alle schon in Betracht gezogen habt: Welche schweren Gegenstände können wir dort unten lagern, wo normalerweise die S-La
아폴로 8호; 휴스
ヒュースト
- - 볼 수 있을까요? 제가 찾는 데 도움이 될 만한 지형적 단서가 있을까요? 자동 광학 장치가 두 개의 크레이터 사이를 추적하고 있습니다. 제 시야에서 하나는 11시 방향으로 길게 뻗어
روجر، ١١. يبدو أن هناك تحيزًا. يبدو أن لديه عتبة عالية نسبيًا قبل أن يبدأ في الإشارة. مع ذلك، يبدو أن EECOMM يعتقد أنه لأغراض معدل التدفق العالي، سيظل يعطيك مؤشرًا نس
Apollo 11, Houston. We're ready at Goldstone for the TV. It'll be recorded at Goldstone and
Gemini 4，Canary CAP
Gemini VIII, qui Houston. L'aggiornamento del bias dell'accelero
Friendship Seven, hier spricht California Cap Com. Ich verstehe Sie laut und deut
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। पृष्ठभूमि में शोर के कारण आपकी आवाज सुनाई नहीं दे रही है। स
哇，现在的地平线真美。
PYRO は、4 つのブレーカーがオ
알겠습니다. 지구를 찾게 되는 
로저. 참고로 말씀드리자면, 압력을 아주 약간 높였습니다. 현재 슈트와 객실 압력 측정값은 각각 7 psia입니다. 디크, 인버터 온도와 스러스터 라인 온도는 어떤가요?
是
हमने अपने सिस्टम टेस्ट में बैटरी वेंट प्रेशर पर गौर किया कि जब हमने बैटरी वेंट वाल्व खोला, तो प्रेशर
Bien reçu. Je suis en mode automatique, en attitude de rentrée atmosphérique. Les gyroscopes sont normaux, la manœuvr
نعم. ما زلت غير راضٍ عن الصور ال
D'accord. On arrive dans environ 10 minutes. On vous reprendra à [heure] et on aura toutes les informations techniques de la chaîne TV sous la main. Si jamais la situation se complique à nouveau, pour des raisons de précision de pointage, si je vois quelque chose qui ressemble à un Terminator ou à un 
Okay, Mike, falls da irgendwo Datentaschen herumliegen – ich habe vielleicht ein oder zwei in meinem provisorischen Stauraum –, dann könnten wir sie zusätzlich zu den anderen normalen Taschen verwenden
Friendship Seve
ठीक है। अभी भी आपकी बिजली की खपत बहुत ज़्यादा है। हम आपको पानी में 30 एम्पियर से ज़्यादा बिजली खपत करते हुए दिखा रहे हैं। अगर आप किसी मुश्किल में फंस जाते हैं औ
Сейчас бы мне хотелось попить воды, но я бы предпочел держать козырек закрытым, чтобы система продолжала охлаждаться. 
Это был Gemini VII, и я уверен, что они видели их с такого расстояния. Мы тож
그
로저, 8.
Okay, Fred. Good show. Step 6: ENTER, plus all balls, plus 28300. Step 7: Monitor movement with. Step 8: CB
Aurora Seven, Aur
Veuil
Forse è scesa solo un pochino. Ora è circa
네. 색깔을 보면, 바다는 전체적으로 진한 파란색이고, 구름은 당연히 밝은 흰색입니다. 지표면에 반사된 빛은 달빛보다 훨씬 더 크게 보입니다. 육지는 대체로 갈색을 띠는데, 어두운 갈색에서 밝은 갈색까지 다양합니다. 여러 기상 현상으로 인해 생긴 소용돌이 모양의 구름들이 많이 보입니다. 멕시코만 입구에서 대서양을 가로지르는 긴 권운 띠도 보입니다. 명암 경계선은 지금
Подтверждаю, Седьмой
Okay. Sie meinen also, wenn man sich die Katzenpfote ansieht, dann befindet sie sich ungefähr auf Höhe des Mittelfingers, 
Roger. Von einer Lage mit 60 Grad Rollwinkel zu einer Lage mit 058 Grad Rollwinkel (Trägheitswinkel). Das wären Nic
Eagle, Houston. Vous êtes en attent
우정 7호, 카노입니다. GMT 15:53:02. (카노
Apollo 11, hier spricht Housto
لسوء الحظ، لدينا نافذة واحدة فقط تطل على الأرض وهي مليئة بكاميرا التلفز
Gut. Also, wir hatten hier im Mittleren Westen einen heftigen Schneesturm; ich weiß nicht, ob man den von da oben sehen kann. Und in Houston ist es übrigens ziemlich kühl geworden, so um die 35 Grad. Und wir würden gerne wissen, wen ihr nächsten Sonntag favorisiert, Baltimore oder Cleveland? Die Verteidigun
Alpha/Pc к Pc; Индикатор запуска транспортного средства к GPI; Тангаж и рыскание карданного подвеса в режим AUTO; Сброс таймера события, вверх; Запуск таймера события, вниз; Минуты и секунды таймера события, в центр; Клапан вентиляции после посадки, нажать; Выдвижение/отпускание зонда в положение ВЫКЛ; Выдвижение/отпускание двух кнопок обратной связи, серые; Втягивание док-зонда, основной и вспомогательный, выключены; Выдвижение габаритных огней/фар EVA, выключены; Выдвижение габаритных огней - свет сближения, выключены - нужно получить - вот - свет туннеля, выключен; Индикатор питания, выключен; Сервисный модуль Гелий, четыре, в центр; Обратная связь HELIUM 1, четыре, серые; ВВЕРХ МОДУЛЬ УПРАВЛЕНИЯ ТЕЛЕМЕТРИЕЙ и БЛОКИРОВАТЬ; ДАВЛЕНИЕ В МОДУЛЕ УПРАВЛЕНИЯ, выключено; ИНДИКАТОР СЕРВИСНОГО МОДУЛЯ, КОЛИЧЕСТВО ТОПЛИВА; СЕРВИСНЫЙ МОДУЛЬ Гелий 2, четыре, центр; ГЕЛИЙ 2
Okay, Jim. Wir überlegen noch, wie wir die Korrektur durchführen können, aber einige unserer Überlegungen lassen uns vermuten, dass wir sie bis zu 118 Stunden nach Landung ohne nennenswerte Delta-V-Einbußen vornehmen können. Wir werden den Kurs anschließend noch ausreichend überwachen, um sicherzustellen, dass wir alles richtig gemacht haben und Sie für eine spätere Landung vorbereiten können, falls nötig – was aber unwahrscheinlich ist. Wir sind mit dem aktuellen Modus zufrieden und arbeiten z
프렌드십 세븐, 과이마스 캡 콤. 다시 말씀해 주
Pour reprendre mon compte-rendu concernant le propulseur, au début du vol. Après notre entrée dans l'obscurité, à environ 1200 pieds (365 mètres) de distance, j'ai tenté de maintenir ma position, mais le seul repère dont je disposais pour évaluer la distance qui me séparait du propulseur était l'écart entre les feux clignotants. De façon intermittente – et non pas intermittente, mais continue – je voyais un feu, puis deux, puis un seul, et parfois il s'écoulait un long moment avant que je n'en voie deux à nouveau, indiquant que le propulseur tournait constamment. Je n'avais aucune idée de sa direction. En me basant sur l'écart entre les feux, lorsque je pouvais les voir tous les deux, j'estimais être en bonne position par rapport au propulseur jusqu'à notre arriv
글쎄요, 저희 입장에서는 그건 전혀 
لقد كان إطلاقاً رائعاً، ون
जी हाँ। जी जैक, मैं अभी तुम्हारे सवाल का जवाब दे देता हूँ, लेकिन जैक की पहली प्रतिक्रिया यही है कि यह उस दुर्घटना के तुरंत बाद जित
क्या आपको क्रिस
はい、ジャック。ちょっと質問があります。司令船のキャニスターはここでどれくらい
Grazie. Ha
로저: 5분 
G
Q
إنه مغ
알겠습니다, 잭. 질문 하나만 드리겠습니다. 전원 설정에 문제가 생기면, 가장 빠른 해결 방법은
Eigentlich ist nicht der Beutel mit dem Futter das Problem, sondern der Inhalt. Er ist zerbröselt. Ich traue mich nicht, den Beutel zu öffnen, aus Angst, 
حسنًا، أبولو 8. بعد دقيقتين سنكون جاهزين لإجراء فحص الاتصالات. وللعلم، يبدو أن قوة الإشارة أفضل من المتوقع بمقدار 3 إلى 4 ديسيبل في وضع ا
Si vous optez pour un débit binaire élevé, nous ne prendrons pas la pei
休斯顿，我们现在正处于搅
أجل. ربما يكون من الأنسب تركيب الأريكة
T
Jack, we'd like you to check two high 
Роджер, а следующий матч закончился со счетом 
Okay. Und können wir weite
حسناً. لقد تجاوز الحد المسموح به للتحذير، ودخل في نطاق المسح أو حد التردد
Roger. Copying you loud and clear... your foot on the ground. Be advised to go to a heads-up position, heads-up
Роджер. Понятно, что время получения сигнала (GET) — 03.07; GET R = 248 морских миль; GET точки сближения — 03.15; азимут — 0 градусов; угол места — 7 градусов; GET восхода солнца — 05.37.00 плюс-м
마지막으로 잭에게 드리는 말씀입니다. 잭, 현재로서는 해외에 거주하는
Хорошо. Сейчас идёт процесс зарядки аккумулятора, и идёт работа по сбросу сточных вод. 3-й этап отменён. Скорость должна была составлять 0,8 фута в секунду. 4-й этап теперь выглядит примерно 
अगर ओवरबर्न हो जाता, तो हम उसे ठीक करने के लिए अपने कमांड मॉड्यूल पर
지금
Columbia, Houston. Nous avons per
Apollo 8, Houston. Cela fait deux tours de plus, soit un ret
لهذا السبب
Nur zu, Houst
Frie
わかりました。いいですね。タンクの圧力が高くなっていましたが、圧力スイッチが閉じてヒーターサイクルを開始するのを待っている間に、タンク1の圧力がさらに少し下がり、注意と警告が出たようです。タンク2のヒーターをオフにして、タンク1の
是的，先生，而
SPENTO
Queste amache, tra l'altro, sono molto comode. Quando ne abbiamo sentito parlare per la prima volta nel progetto Apollo, pensavamo che non fo
Хорошо. Продолжаем с середи
友
사실, 음식 봉투 자체는 문제가 아니고, 그 안에 든 음식이 문제예요. 완전히 부스러졌어요. 부스러기가 캡슐 안으로 들어갈
Ok, Aquarius. I nostri dati di tracciamento mostrano che, dopo lo scarico di elio, il nostro angolo di ingresso non è cambiato rispetto al suo valore di 6,24 e qualcuno ha calcolato che se avessimo avu
Dép
Gemini 4, Houston CAP 
कॉपी कर ली 
Torno nel campo gravitazionale. E l'assetto sembra molto stabile. Sto rotolando proprio all'orizzonte. A questo punto fermerò la pressione sanguigna, mi sie
알겠습니다. 로저. Rev 57용입니다. 시퀀스 번호 16, 지상 표준시 8시 11분, 요 12°, 피치 30°, 16mm 카메라 사용. Rev 58, 시퀀스 12, 지상 표준시 9시 36분, 요 3°, 피치 30°, 16mm 카메라 사용.
روجر. ديك، وضع التحكم لديّ يدوي؛ الجيروسكوبات مثبتة في قفص؛ مفتاح المناورة مُطفأ. نسبة الوقود 45 و42 بالمئة؛ نسبة الأكسجين 76 و100 بالمئة؛ درجة حرارة فتحة البخار 68 درجة على البدلة، وظهر لي ض
좋습니다. 저희 중서부 지역에는 큰 눈보라가 몰아쳤습니다. 위쪽에서도 보이실지 모르겠네요. 휴스턴은 사실 꽤 쌀쌀해져서 지금 섭씨 1.7도 정도입니다. 다음 주 일요일에는 볼티모어와 클리블랜드 중 어느 팀이 이길 것 같으신가요
Roger, Buzz. It's an entry PAD, MPL, starting with roll 05, 35 - correction - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, plus 1102, minus 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, NOUN 69, all four lines are NA
ジャック、了解です。残りはすべて開きます。パネル227は変更なし、パネル229は開きたいブレーカーを1つ追加します。そして、タイマー、メインAとメインBの2つを開きます。
We transmitted to the spacecraft as
Roge
好的。先提供一些信息。我们正在制定一套操作流程，以便您使用指令舱的氢氧化锂罐连接到您的软管——也就是出口软管，这样随着任务的进行，您就可以持续净化大气。这需要改装一个套件，以便您将软管连接到氢氧化锂罐上。所以，我们会在某个时候
11番、ヒューストン。シャフトとトラニオンを用意しましたので、少し調整していただけます。シャフト
سأقوم بتركيبها لاستخدامها قبل أن ننط
MARK, 20 se
Nous allons mettre le film
حسنًا. في وحدة الخدمة الخاصة بك، تظهر درجة حرارة حزمة وحدة الت
ठीक है, बिल। इस बार हम इस संगीत को एक अलग तरह के सिस्टम पर चलाने की कोशिश करेंगे। वॉइस कम्युनिकेशन बनाए रखने के लिए, जब आपको संगीत मिल जाए, तो कृपया हमें कॉल करके बता दें कि आपको संगीत मिल गया है और इसकी आवाज़ कैसी है या कुछ और। अगर मुझे आपका कॉल आता है, तो मैं आप
네, 잔차는 0.1, 3.9, 그리고 - -였습니다
Tu les uses prématurément. Tu les utilises t
좋습니다, 아프리카 최남단 상공에 불빛이 보이는 지역이 있는 것 같습니다. 확실히 도시가 시야에 들어왔고, 여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. 송신 시에는 음성 녹음만 했습니다. 아프리카에 있는 도시가 확실히 보입니다. 처음 나타난 건 몇 초 전입니다. 불빛이 아주 선명하게 보입니다. 현재 제 위치를 알려드리기 위해 후방 
没错。现在，我们需要添加一些内容来替换之前删除的部分。请稍等1；COMM出错了。你读
C'es
Aspetta un attimo, Frank; lo cercheremo e, mentre lo facciamo, per Bill la qualità della voce ad alto bit rate è molto buona, quindi se vuole usare l'altoparlante ad alto bit rate per un periodo di tempo limitato per registrare cose importanti, gli suggeriamo di farlo. Vorremmo che aspettasse 20 secondi dopo averlo 
Cabin exhaust temperature is climbing back up to 19
짐, 그
— Для коррекции крена с целью получения высокого коэффициента усиления мы продолжаем выполнять вращение вокруг своей оси, чтобы в данный момент получить правильное положение для высокого коэффициента усиления. Мы отменим маневр по тангажу, запланированный после проверки ТВ-кам
了解。アルフ
...sono pronti per iniziare. Sì
罗杰。T8，114 30 57；T9，116 29 10；T10，118 27 23；T11，120 25 36
The very bright feature
نعم،
查理，关于这一点，我
Хорошо. Что касается всенаправленных антенн по сравнению с антеннами с высоким 
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। हमने ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन किया; हमें हर बार शून्य मान मिलता है
ठीक है, TIG माइनस 17 पर, CB (11) को हटा दें। AC बस A, रेंडेज़वस रडार, बंद करें, 30 सेकंड प्रतीक्षा करें; PGNS: रेंडेज़वस रडार, बंद करें को हटा
Theta, 1
자이로스코프 추적에는 전혀 문제가 없는 것 같습니다. 다만, 오른쪽 객실 조명을 빨간색으로 낮추는 데 큰 어려움을 겪었습니다. 소지품 
제가 한 번만 드리고 나머지는 RKV가 처리하게 해서 당
Канари, какая у меня сейчас орбита? Ты зна
그냥 장난치는 거예요. 뭐가 필요하세요? AOS 시간이라도요? AOS는 음, 어디 보자... 82시 30분쯤 될 거예요. 한 15분 후
Roger. Nous en discutons, soit tout de suite, soit juste après l'expérience MSC-10, qui 
Хорошо, продол
それで、私の LEVA
Примерно два-три, а может быть, и четыре неспешных шага позволят вам практически плавно остановить
Apollo 11, Houston. Concernant l'eau qui s'est infiltrée sur la cloison arrière, si la quantité est faible, nous vous recommandons de l'éponger puis de jeter les éponges dans le compartiment de rangement des déchets. Si la quantité est importante, veuillez suivre la procédure décrite dans la liste de 
好的，杰克。操作步骤在我手边。大概有18个步骤，之所以这么长，是因为我们要从之前给你的基本配置开始。当然，这涉及到电池A的充电，也就是我们电量最低的那块电池。准
Okay, Mike, unsere CDH-Zeit ist 126:17:45.58. End
ठीक है। हम विश्व समाचारों से शुरुआत करेंगे। जब छोटा सा अंतरिक्ष यान चंद्रमा की परिक्रमा कर रहा था, तब क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या पर दुनिया भर में अमेरिकी अपोलो 8 अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों की प्रशंसा और अंतरिक्ष अन्वेषण में अंतर्राष्ट्रीय सहयोग की आशाओं के संदेश प्रसारित हुए। यहां तक ​​कि कम्युनिस्ट देशों में भी चंद्रमा की पहली यात्रा को लेकर उत्साह था। मॉस्को में, सोवियत वैज्ञानिक अनातोली बेसरानोव ने याद दिलाया कि उनके देश और संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका ने पहले भी अंतरिक्ष संबंधी ज्ञान साझा किया था और भविष्यवाणी की कि अपोलो 8 की उड़ान से और अधिक सहयोग को बढ़ावा मिलेगा। क्यूबा में, रेडियो हवाना ने अपने श्रोताओं को अपोलो 8 के भाषण के बारे में बताने के लिए वॉयस ऑफ अमेरिका कार्यक्रम का पुनः प्रसारण किया। वॉयस के अधिकारियों ने कहा कि यह पहली बार था कि किसी अमेरिकी एजेंसी का कार्यक्रम हवाना रेडियो पर प्रसारित किया गया था। चेकोस्लोवाकिया में व्यापक टेलीविजन कवरेज के माध्यम से चंद्रमा की उड़ान देखी गई; और हंगरी के बुडापेस्ट में, ट्रेनों और बसों में लोग इसी विषय पर चर्चा कर रहे थे। गैर-कम्युनिस्ट देशों में, कार्यालय कर्मचारी और क्रिसमस की खरीदारी करने वाले लोग सांस रोककर बैठे थे क्योंकि अंतरिक्ष यान को पृथ्वी की ओर लॉन्च के लिए तैयार किया जा रहा था। सड़कों पर चल रहे फ्रांसीसी लोगों ने अमेरिकी तकनीक और अंतरिक्ष में हासिल की गई इस उपलब्धि की खूब तारीफ की, और कुछ दर्शकों ने टेलीविजन पर चंद्रमा की तस्वीरें देखकर खुशी से "शानदार!" कहा। लंदन में क्रिसमस की खरीदारी करने वालों की भीड़ दुकानों और पबों में उमड़ 
Et, Houston, Apollo 11. Ces manœuvres optiques automatiques (ou manœuvres P23) ne semblent pas atteindre le point substellaire. Pourriez-vous calculer les angles de roulis, de tangage et de lacet pour atteindre ce point sur cette éto
E se si inverte l'
Roger, B
अब आप जिन 's पर काम कर रहे हैं, उनके शेष भाग को हटा दें, एटीट्यूड पर वापस जाएं, और फिर फ्लाइट प्लान में जहां लिखा है, वहां से अपने काम को फिर से शु
और हम आपको दिखा रहे हैं कि आपके पास लगभग 68 प्रतिशत ऑटोमेटिक और 84 प्रत
रॉ
了解。フレンドシップ・セブンです。ジャイロのラインアップはまずまず、かなり良い状態だと思います。夜側のチェックでは問題なかったのですが、また流れてしまいました。しかも、どうやらかな
Roger. Une dernière remarque: ce sujet ayant suscité de nombreuses controverses lors des réunions sur les priorités de données, il semble qu'une inclinaison de 10 degrés vers le haut soit optimale pour obtenir l'horizon et pouvoir suivre le point de repère à travers le télescope de balayage. Si l'inclinaison est davantage dirigée vers le bas, le tourillon relevé au maximum ne permettra 
Das ist richtig, Apollo 11. Und Mike, es ist ähnlich wie das SEP-Manöver vor dem Flug nach dem Abkoppeln. Du solltest dann auf Reg
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 타나나리브까지 1분 남았습니다. 카나본 기지 도착
Bene. Se non c'è diminuzione nella quantità di liquido accumulatore secondario, glicole secondario alla valvola del radiatore su NORMALE. Passaggio successivo, pompa del circuito di raffreddamento secondario, AC 1 o AC 2. Dopo 3 minuti, verificare che la pressione secondaria di scarico del glicole sia compresa tra 39 e 51 psig. Verificare inoltre che la temperatura di uscita EVAP secondaria sia 
Хорошо. Включите датчик MAIN BUS TIE A/C и измерьте ток и напряже
الذهاب إلى مطعم جيروس سيجند. مطاعم الجي
了解しました。それから出てくるときには、デッドバンドが潰れているという警告が出るかもしれませんので、チェックリストの項目に従ってください
Gli elementi di cui abbiamo ancora bisogno saranno letti il ​​più tardi possibile, prima dello stivaggio finale. E non abbiamo dati sull'ultimo periodo di sonno dell'equipaggio. Vorrei verificare ch
Yes. I think - I think somebody said that when you are
D'accord. Van
जेमिनी 4, हवाई कैप
Non importa, abbiamo due ore su quel 
हाँ, आपको इसे प्राप्त कर लेना चाह
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 현재 고이득 안테나의
알
음, 끓으면 우리가 미리 알게 될 거예요. 끓지 않을 거라는 걸 알아내는 데는 오래 걸리지 않을 겁니다. 우리가 할 수 있는 일은 별로 없으니, 다른 사람이 깨어날 때까지, 프랭크가 다시 깨어
روجر. فريندشيب 7. جميع الأنظمة في الكبسولة تعمل بشكل سليم. ما زلت أرى بعض هذ
Apollo 8, Houston. Looks like you're on th
हमें उम्मीद है कि आपके पानी के बिल म
Хорошо, Джек, у нас есть маневренная площадка, средний курс для свобод
了解。現在の高度はどれ
Non l'ho più trovato da quando si è fatto buio. È... è... si muove parecchio, Deke. Non è completamente gonfio e non si allunga sulla corda come mi aspettavo. Rimbalza dentro e fuori e oscilla su e giù e di lato. Non ho ancora b
Houston, Apollo 8. O
يا إلهي، لقد فعلنا ذلك بالفعل. استخدم كل منا نظام الت
Хорошо. Наш маневр завершен, и в этом положении линия М находится ровно на 90 градусов в противофазе. Она направлена ​​точно вдоль вектора к
Я бу
Аполлон-11, Х
D'accord. Votre heure de début est… ça me convient parfaitement. Ça nous laissera largement le temps de nous organiser, notamment pour l'organ
Было 0,1, но мы не п
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы показываем, что температура в квадранте А немного выше, чем в остальных. Если помните, я уже упоминал, что у нас наступает период, когда мы будем долгое время без движения. Мы бы хотели, чтобы вы, по возможности, находились в тени квадранта А и дела
Si
네, 아폴로 8호입니다.
你喜欢待在
그리고 13번, 휴스턴입니다. 원하시면 지구가 창문에 들어오기 약 2분 전에 알려드릴 수 있습니다. 이제 시간을 꽤 정확하게 맞췄으니, 그렇게 자주 찾아보실 필
そうです、
Houston, Apollo 8. Nur zur Information: Nach Abschluss der Mission habe ich die Erde mit dem Sextanten beobachtet. Ein beeind
لنرى. أين المحطة التالية التي سنصل إ
好的，如果一切顺利
はい。衝突は74海里離
わかりました。もしジャックに大まかな等高線角度を伝えた後、この姿勢で星が見えない場合、私たちがジンバル角度を読み上げてジャックの目標
Und nur z
Go ahead H
That's affirm. And the,
Ok, Joe. Fred ha estratto la cartuccia secondaria. Ora torniamo a quella 
H
Roger. Wann bekommen wir die Manöv
Okay. Die Temperatur am Sekundärradiator (Einlass) beträgt ca. 70–72 Grad; die Temperatur am Radiator (Auslass) liegt bei ca. 30 Grad; die Glykol-Verdampfungstemperatur beträgt ca. 65 Grad; der Dampfdruck ist im Vollausschlag, der Glykol-Auslassdruck liegt bei ca. 9 psi. Der Sekundärakkumulator zeigt für die Anzüge ca. 52 Grad an; die Kabine ca. 58 Grad; die Drücke betragen für die Anzüge 4,1 und für die Kabine 5. Der CO₂-Partialdruck liegt bei etwas über 1, ca. 1,1. An der Hauswand beträgt die Temperatur 72 Grad, der Heliumdruck 3500; N₂ A 2300; N₂ B ca. 2450. Der Brennstoffdruck liegt 
지금은 1821
صباح الخير يا فرانك. يبدو أننا فقدنا مستشعر درجة حرارة مخرج المبرد الرئيسي. نعرض قراءة مرتفعة خارج النطاق. مع ذلك، تبدو بقية الدائرة سليمة تمامًا. عندما ي
Got
Sono contento che tu l'abbia fatto, anche tu, Neil; è stata una buona idea, un'idea davvero buona. Non r
Oddio, guarda qu
Okay. Von 147 plus 00, Gesamt minus 2,0 Prozent, was ungefähr minus 14 Pfund entspricht. Alpha m
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया में ईगल सिग्नल किसी भी एंटीना या
收到，哥伦比亚。这里是休斯顿。通过OMNI Charlie
Ciao, Houston. Ciao, Houston. Qui è l'Apollo 11. Ti sento forte e 
Pendant que j'étais dehors, j'ai remarqué sur la vitre de Jim une sorte de d
Okay, dan
私たちの…とは何だった
نحن متقدمون في فترة تناول ال
好的。我们一定试试。正如我所说，我们有一些星形标记。它们没有——它们没有与轴和耳轴零点对齐。让我们快速查看一下105螺距、轴和耳轴零
١١، نتفق على أن وجودك في الأعلى قد يكون له تأثير على بدء التشغيل. يبدو أن هذا سيعطي - دع الكمبيوتر يعمل بمعرفة زوايا وحدة 
रॉजर। ईंधन के लिहाज से कोई समस्या नहीं है। बस दिक्कत यह है कि P22 की संख्या और खोजे जा सकने वाले ग्रिड वर्गों की संख्य
Ok. Capito. Se può esserti d'aiuto alla guida, abbiamo calcolato che, guardando fuori più X nel finestrino o appena fuori dal finestrino, dovresti essere puntato dritto verso Acrux quando sei in perfetto assetto di guida. Non sappiamo se questo ti sia d'aiuto o meno, ma abbiamo pensato che potresti provare un modo altern
了解。時刻 12:15:00 ホライゾンスキャナーの月没チェ
Roger. Allez-y a
Нет. Это хо
الآن، أصبحتُ أتحكم في كلٍّ من الميل والانحراف - أو الميل والدوران - باتجاه القيم المحددة، حيثُ تجاوزتُ 23 درجة في الميل، وتجاوزتُ 321 درجة في الدوران. سأتركُ التحكم في هذا الاتجاه، وعندما أصلُ إلى 90 درجة في الميل وصفر في الدوران، سأنتقلُ إل
收到，好的
Roger. Wir würden Bills gerne mal zum Toilettengang mitnehmen. End
Roger. Nous vous serions reconnaiss
On a toujours la même vision floue à travers laquelle regarder. Les fenêtres de rendez-vous sont correctes, mais elles sont tellement petites et, jusqu'à pré
Si alza parecchio. Assume una forma a ventaglio, a differenza d
好的。稍
Fühlt sich für mich angeneh
روجر. أنت تقوم بعمل رائع. لقد حصلنا على رؤية جيدة لمؤشر التقاطع، هناك. كما حصلنا على رؤية 
मिथुन राशि 4, बोलते रहो। यह काम कर र
Ich habe TX zweimal gesendet. Die Raumsonde hat die Anfrage abgelehnt. Ich versuche es erne
No. We're not getting any. Could you give us some course align gimbal angles to move the to, and then we will a
That's a Roger, Jim. What happens is, of course, we set - when you go out of detent, you reset the error needles
Sì, temo che sia... Siamo quasi a più Z verso 
Роджер, Колумбия. Идентификатор ориентира: лунный модуль — точнее, база «Транквилити»; P1, 112 25 08; P2, 112 30 17, 4 морские мили к югу. Время максимального сближения: 112 31 52; вал 357.051, цапфа 047.432, крен 0, тангаж 250, рыскание 0. Подтверждение. Конец
Ces orages rendraient l'arrivée vraiment difficile. Tu sais
Roger, Jack. Nous sommes... oui, nous le faisons en ce moment
迈
أقوم حاليًا بالتقاط صور عامة - بعدسة عادية - للماء والسحب باست
Ja
حسناً. نحن جاهز
Amicizia Sette,
알겠습니
알겠습니다,
... ENTE
أحب الرقم 7. ه
इससे पहले कि आप इसे शौच के लिए ले जाएं, मैं आपको संक्षेप में कुछ जानकारी दे दूं - अगर आप चाहें तो इसे शौच के लिए ले जाने से पहले मैं आपको संक्षेप में कु
그건..
Indian Cap Com.
Sì, siamo passati all'adattatore quando abbiamo iniziato a giocare con
E
よし。ステップ
アポロ8号
了解。それでも、あなたはG.E.T.で1秒遅いと表示していますが、私たちはレトロタイムで表示して
روجر، وايت يشرب كثيراً. أنا على وشك البدء بتناول وجبتي الثاني
요우가 왼쪽으로 갔습니다. 7번이나 8번일 겁
I still hea
Хорошо, у меня включено электронное управление на низкой скорости, а также обычный режим, автоматический, гироскопы заблокированы, маневр по-прежнему отключен. И маячки — и проблесковые маяки — вы
You mean on my voice onboard tape
Gemelli 4. Chirurgo RKV. Abbiamo una buona pressione sanguigna. Siamo pronti
Nein.
Логическая шина, четыре,
Sì, capisco cosa inte
रॉजर। जैसा कि मैंने बताया, इसका मुख्य उद्देश्य आपके ऑक्सीजन प्रवाह ट्रांसड्यूसर की जाँच करना है। हालाँकि, हमें अभी भी लगभग 2 घंटे के लिए केबिन में ऑक्सीजन की आपूर्ति बनाए रखनी है, इसलिए हम इस उद्देश्य के लिए जो वेंट लगाने जा रहे हैं उसे चालू रखना चाहेंगे। ठीक है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप केबिन वेंट क्विक डिस्कनेक्ट को स्थापित करें, जो आपको कंपार्टमेंट R-6, यानी रोमियो 6 में मिलेगा, पैनल 251 पर मूत्र कनेक्टर पर। जब यह पूरा हो जाए, तो सुनिश्चित करें कि अपशिष्ट भंडारण वेंट वाल्व बंद है, और फिर अपशिष्ट प्रबंधन ओवरबोर्ड ड्रेन को खोलें या उसे 
네, 짐. 세 가지 항목이 있습니다. 하나는 기동 훈련용 패드이고, 다른 하나는 
Ricevuto. Ci penso io. Lasceremo aperti quei due interruttori automatici e attiveremo il collegamento dati UP per il backup vocale; e apporteremo le modifiche appropriate sulla seguente scheda di stato de
They - they're all 90 except B, whic
Gemini 4, Gemini 4. Houston 
네. 자, 제 기억이 맞다면, 바로 토크를 가하면 되는 걸로 알고 있습니다. 토크를 가하는 시간을 알려드리
कंपन तेज हो रहा है, शोर धीरे
알겠습니다. 시작 시간과 종료 시간을 알려주시면 됩니다. 현재 자세(피치 10도, 요 10도, 요 45도)에서 좌회전 속도를 시간당 1회전으로 설정하겠습니다. 선호하시는 좌회전 속도를 요청드립니다. 1단계: 롤 각도 150도에서 정지합니다. 2단계: 수동 모드로 수신합니다. 3단계: 자동 협대역 모드로 전환합니다. 4단계: 자동 모드에서 추적이 제
Ich auch. Okay, es k
Ok, 11. Sembra che le prestazioni del motore durante entrambe le accensioni di questa missione siano state le stesse dei test di accettazione del motore. La lettura del PC di bordo è dovuta a un fattore di calibrazione noto tra ciò che si ha effettivamente nella camera e ciò che si legge sul manometro. Ci aspettiamo che il funzionamento a bancata singola sia di 90, ovvero 90 psi sul manometro con una pressione effettiva nella camera di 95 psi. Nel funzionamento a bancata doppia, la pressione nella camera è di 94 psi sul manometro con una pressione effettiva di 99 psi. 80 psi sul manometro di bordo corrispondono a 83 psi effettivi. E consigliamo di attenersi a un segnale di
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. انتظروا لحظة. سنوافيكم بالإجابة بعد قليل. انتهى
はい。既に37 06という数字が表示されていると思います。もし表示されているなら、ENTERキーを押してください。すると、スタンバイ要求のコード00062が表示されます。そのコードが表示され
Ok. Poco sotto i 13. E solo per tua informazione, abbiamo per
बहुत बढ़िया। दरें स्थिर नहीं है
Ich habe nicht viel Wahl. Ich kann nur essen, 
ロジャー、最初のものは11番で、G.m.t.は10 16 51でした。南
Il a été exc
我不知
11号，休斯顿。我们又被锁住了。你能给我们汇报
Joe, à ce sujet. Je crois que presque à chaque fois que ce changement de rapport s'est produit, nous jetions tous un coup d'œil au voyant moteur.
Okay. We've got the Main Chute out. It's dereefed; we have the single-point
حسناً
حسنًا يا جاك. لدي سؤال واحد هنا. إذا واجهنا أي مشاكل في إعداد الطاقة، فهل أسرع طر
L'eau a bon goût, aucun problème. On préfère dormir sous le canapé maintenant. J'étais ici avec Frank et je me suis assoupi par intermittence ces dernières heures. Frank est maintenant
こ
Роджер. Я поспорил
好了，吉姆。现在应该差不多了。我们已经复制了你对第9题的回答
好
另外，当航向角为 +96 度时，Agena 将进入飞行控制模
Okay. I just took a picture of two thunderstorms that look like big pancakes, with a lot of cirrus running out around to the side of the
R
Водолей, Хьюсто
Je t
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们收到你们的光学系统已归零，现在
Nein, wir haben einen Schalter an diesem Druckregler... Schalter... Unterbrechungsschalter hat... so dass Nr. 1... und das ist die aktuelle Konfiguration, Nr.
Li vuoi... per pri
Ich möchte meine Grüße an die anderen Menschen unserer Region übermitteln. Dass wir zwei miteinander verbundene Hemisphären sind, beweist sich heute schon dadurch
No. T
お知らせ
알겠습니다. 입력: 태평양 중부 지역, 357 152 359 268, +0813, -16503 068 36221 651 1
जेरी, तुम मुझे कभी-कभार फोन कर देना, बस यह बताने के लिए कि तुम अभी भी यहीं हो, जब हम एंटेना बदल रहे हों
حسناً، فهمت. لديّ نتيجة أخرى لك عندما تكون مستعداً للنسخ. هل أنت مست
روجر... هذا هو 01 12 08؛ ريف 1؛ 179 درجة غربًا؛ 08:28:42، الصعود المستقيم. هل لديك موعد حرقنا ال
わかった。300分の1以内だ。これなら一緒に
حسناً. لدينا قراءة أرض
Отлично. Время выбрано идеально, Уолли. Я начну обратный отсчет до начала обратного хода, а ты активируешь пиротехническ
- - RKV. Vorremm
ठीक है। पीने के पानी की टंकी में अब पानी नहीं बचा है। हमने कुछ मिनट पहले थोड़ा पानी निकालने की कोशिश की थी, लेकिन 
एक्वेरियस, अपलिंक का काम पूरा हो गया है। कंप्
मैंने आपकी बात साफ़-साफ़ सुन ली, हवाई, मैं कैसा हूँ? मुझे लगता है मैंने उस समय मिडवे देखा था। थोड़ी
Ricevuto, Buzz. Ho rotto a passo meno 50 alla 
Roger. A Washington, la Commissione Finanze del Senato ha approvato l'estensione della sovrattassa sull'imposta sul reddito, ma un voto del Senato sul disegno di legge sembrava al momento remoto. Ad Austin, il deputato statale Ray Lemmon di Houston è stato nominato Direttore Nazionale dell'American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon ha proposto uno studio sulla possibilità di istituire un istituto di oceanografia in Texas. Sarebbe il primo istituto del genere nel
我真的做
मुझे पटाखे हटाने दी
Gemini VIII, Хьюстон, CAP COM. Если у вас будет в
ヒューストン、アポロ11号です。アフリカ大陸が今、私たちの方を向いています。そしてもちろん、時間の経過とともにすべてがどんどん小さくなっていきます。地中海は完全に晴れています。太陽はマダガスカルあたりに沈もうとしているようです。アフリカの赤道地帯は非常にはっきりとしています。アフリカ南端や、もちろんサハラ砂漠の北岸の砂っぽい色と比べて、濃い
わかりました、ジョー。返して、ここに書いてあるか確認しましょう。その後、六分儀を使ってベネット彗星を観測してもらいます。もし見えるようであれば、ロール角を記録してください。45度から75度の
아폴로 11호, 
Jim aus Houston. Er soll uns mitteile
Okay, the fans have been cycled 2 minutes each and they are back off
Roger, Jack. Wir sehen das. Natürlich ist es stark bewölkt, und ihr seht es deutlicher als wir, 
혈압은 정확하게 측정됐지만 체온은... 혈압은
Più 38. Ricevuto. Cape vuole che imposti l'ora attual
نعم. نعم، وعندما تمر النجوم من خلالها، تُحجب قليلاً؛ ثم تبرز من الجانب الأيسر، ويمكنك رؤيتها بوضوح وهي
감사합니다. 한 
Ok, Apollo 8. Corretto, con una sola
昔の毘翅目が美しく見えています。ヌンキも見えています。南半球の毘翅目も見えています。ヌ
在雾
비교해보고 싶으시면 제가 T
Роджер. Наш полет на Луну, возможно, показался вам простым и легким. Хочу вас заверить, что это не так. Ракета «Сатурн V», которая вывела нас на орбиту, — невероятно сложная машина, каждая деталь которой работала безупречно. Этот компьютер над моей головой имеет словарный запас в 38 000 слов, каждое из которых было тщательно подобрано, чтобы иметь для нас, экипажа, максимальную ценность. Этот переключатель, который я сейчас держу в руке, имеет более 300 аналогов только в командном модуле, и это всего лишь один переключатель. Вдобавок к этому, здесь множество автоматических выключателей, рычагов, тяг и других связанных элементов управления. Двигатель, наш большой ракетный двигатель в кормовой части служебного модуля, должен был работать безупречно, иначе мы бы застряли на лунной орбите. Парашюты над моей головой должны сработать идеально завтра, иначе мы рухнем в океан. Мы всегда были уверены, что всё это оборудование будет работать, и работать должным образом, и мы продолжаем быть уверены, что оно будет работать так до конца полёта. Всё это стало возможным только благодаря крови, поту и слёз множества людей. Во-первых, американских рабочих, которые собирали эти механизмы на заводе. Во-вторых, кропотливой работе различных испытательных групп во время сборки и повторных испытаний. И наконец, сотрудников Центра пилотируемых космических аппаратов, как в управлении, так и в планировании миссий, управлении полёто
Хорошо. Что ж, этот подход, который мы вам продемонстрировали, не совсем соответствует образу Терминатора, и приготовьтесь к неожиданн
अरे, आप कुछ चीज़ें पहले से ही साफ़ करना चाहते हैं। आप अपने एफडीआई 
Ja. Sie sitzen alle so eng wie möglich. Wissen Si
Вы види
... मुझे लगता है कि मुझे दो की 
ठीक है। शायद मैंने बात उलटी समझ ली है। वे कॉपी करते हैं - आप लोगों ने वीएचएफ सिग्नल को 20 किलोमीटर तक कॉपी किया। हम अभी उस सिग्नल के डाउनलिंक की जाँच कर रहे हैं। 
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 13단계에서 REPRESS 패키지의 O2 밸브를 잠시 FILL 위치로 설정했고, 산소통을 
Apollo 8
Okay. And I 
Okay,
하강 중 연료 온도는 64도이
안개층 한가운데에서는 페크다
Okay. Wir raten mal, Charlie, und versuchen, einen entsprechenden Betrag anzugeben. Oh, es ist C
Okay. Be advised that when we got to ACME the... for just a short time, very dimly. Then it goes ou
È
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 5번 숫자에 김이 서린
سيجما سبعة، سيجما سبعة، هذه زنجبار.
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, hier spricht H
नहीं - नही
Joe, 
Ok. La pressione dell'elio è circa 37, la pressione del collettore è 182 e la quantità è 80. B ha una temperatura di circa 112, la pressione dell'elio di circa 36,5, la pressione del carburante di 180 e la quantità è circa 77. C ha una temperatura di 140 - tra l'altro, quelle altre temperature avrebbero dovuto essere 120 invece di 110; stavo guardando la calibrazione sbagliata qui. La pressione è 37, la pressione del collettore è circa 182 e la quantità è 80. La temperatura su D è 115, la pressione è 37, la pressi
Ken, ich – ich habe es nicht verstanden. Wir mussten die OMNI-Geräte erneut wechseln. Könntest du es sag
收
Wie Sie wahrscheinlich wissen, arbeiten mehrere Gruppen
Vedo piccoli cristalli di ghiaccio, sono 
Да, сэр. Нам нравится... На случай, если нам не удастся включить его вручную — то есть, автоматически, — мы будем использовать этап прерывания в команде управления двигателем при снижении на зажигании пл
И Колумбия, Хьюстон. Мы ожидаем, что вы потеряете высокий
Число 
Okay. First line, "ATTITUDE CONTROL, three to PULSE"; line 2, "Roll with the until attitude is roll, plus or minus 90; pitch, 0; yaw, 0." O
Здравствуйте, 11. Хьюстон. В Goldstone TV сказали, что когда на изображении появляется резкая вертик
Rog
83시간 전
7、テレメトリのピッチ姿勢は約マイ
That's affirmative
روجر، ووم
Wir sollten die Nacht hier verbringen und einfach fotografieren – Sichtungen festhalten, ohne eine bestimmte Absicht zu verfolgen. Ziel ist es, gleich zu Beginn ein paar bekannte
استعدوا لزيارة هاواي (غير
좋아요, 잭. 제가 어떻게 자세를 잡고 엔진을 연소시킬지, 즉 제어 기술에 대해 이야기해 보죠. 지금으로서는 지구를 창밖으로 내다보며 우주선을 요(yaw) 방향으로 정지시킨 다음, 유도(GUIDANCE) 모드 또는 제어(CONTROL) 모드로 전환할 겁니다. 요 방향은 모드 제어(MODE CONTROL) 상태가 되겠죠. 그런 다음, 피치(pitch)와 롤(roll)을 제어하는 ​​데 사용할 겁니다. 이 조합을 제어하는 ​​데 이 
그건 확언이에요. 그리고 그 아래 두 줄, "30초" 부분도요. 그리고 사실 네 번째 줄의 일
Хорошо, Джек. Мы хотим, чтобы ты оставил конфигурацию авт
Cape Cap Com, Sigma Seven UHF-hi. How do y
Okay. Understand; and do you want 
حسنًا. لقد حصلت على قيم مضخمات الطاقة
Chiamami quando è il momento di smettere di caricare la batteria, pe
Sì, lo è. Sono sicuro c
ठीक है। 
Okay. Das wird auf CB(16), Fred-o, sein, aber es ist INVERTER 2 OFFEN. Okay, zur Missionstimer-Aktivierung. Führen Sie Schritt 1, Korrektur, Zeilen 1 und 2 durch
Jack, per un po' avremo bisogno di letture dei volt della batteria e degli ampere del caricabatterie ogni
حسناً
双子座 VI，休斯顿。
オーケー、ドーク。速報です。昨日（火曜日）、フアン・カルロスがフランコ将軍の後継者、スペイン国家元首、そして最終的には国王に正式に指名されました。フアン・カルロスは本日、法とスペイン唯一の合法的な政治組織である国
रॉजर। पैनल का संक्षिप्त विवरण इस प्रकार है: बाएँ पैनल पर फ़्यूज़ स्विच पहले बताए अनुसार ही हैं, इन्हें दोबारा नहीं बताया जा रहा है। स्क्विब सक्रिय है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। मोड सेलेक्ट सामान्य, ऑटो, जाइरो सामान्य है। सभी "T" हैंडल लगे हुए हैं। रेट्रो डिले सामान्य है, केबिन की दोनों लाइटें जल रही हैं। मैंने लाल फ़िल्टर चालू कर रख
Okay. Now, the next event is going to be the separation of the service module, and these are some steps, but so that you will know what is going on, I'll read t
Même à votre rythme actuel, vous 
버즈, 혹시 위층에서 자는 게 더 좋으신가요? 저는 여러분들이 그 지
Роджер. Нас до сих пор мучает вопрос с антенной, и если — раз уж кто-то будет на связи, — мы б
好的。第二个任务是在32小时后观测贝内特彗星——我们希望在航天器达到最佳稳定性后再进行拍摄。稳定性要求非常高。我们不确定您是否理解了我们刚才传达的信息。此外，照片可能无
はい。では、それでは。昨夜、ウォーカー空軍基地でKC-135が着陸時に墜落し、乗組員5名が死亡しました。残りのニュースのほとんどはこの飛行に関するもので、そこで何が起こっているかは皆さんもよくご存知だと思います
Hauptarm an. Kümmere dich um... Ich kümmere mich
روجر. لديّ موقف غريب حقًا في هذه اللحظة، سأخبرك. ها ها، أنا أنظر إلى الأرض من الأعلى. أنا قا
ヒュース
... PRELAUNCH
Wally, wie schien es dir, ihn im Hinblick auf die Sterne auf diesem Fadenkreuz zu verfolgen
알겠습니다. 캡슐이 방향을 바꾸고 있는데, 제 뒤쪽으로 불과 몇 백 야드 떨어진 곳에서 추진체가 방향을 바꾸는 모습이 
Okay. Ti ho appena visto qui alla luce
Да. Н
Rog
Okay. Was den Mittelkurs angeht, denke ich, dass wir uns im Allgemeinen einig sind, dass wir ihn wie bisher durchführen. Nun zu den Fenstern: Die mittleren Fenster 
I can't hear it, but it
Хорошо. Кажется, нам удалось зафиксировать положение на протяжении последней минуты — примерно минуты, стрелки TUNE FOR MAX колебались вверх и вниз, стрелки тангажа и рыскания тоже, но, похоже, сейчас все стабилизировалось само собой. Мы как раз заканчиваем заправку — продувку топливного элемента. Водород в третьем топливе будет испо
Und es sieht so aus – ich vermute, der Erdschein erzeugt diesen dreidimensionalen Effekt. Ich kann Tycho ziemlich deutlich sehen – zumindest, wenn ich richtig herum sitze. Ich glaube, es ist Tycho im Mondschein – ich meine, im Erdschein
روجر، أفهم أنك لا 
了解、フレンドシップ・セブン。眼球運
D'accord, Gus. J'ai juste une question à te poser avant que tu ne sois hors de portée. Comment se passe le vo
맞아요. 둘이 같은 창문을 쓸 거라고 생각하세요
حسنًا. انتظر لح
Ich höre dich, Fred. Allerdings gibt es viele Hintergrun
هيا يا هيوست
좋아요. 좋습니다. 시작해 봅시다. 어쩌면 모든 게 잘 풀려서 제가 질문이 하나도 없
내 생각엔 너도 
حسنًا. اتفاق ممتاز يا فرانك. أما الأمر الآخر فهو أن الشباب في الغرفة الخلفية يرغبون في تشغيل مروحتَي المقصورة لمدة خمس دقائق تقريبًا عندما يكون الجميع مستيقظين، ليروا فرق درجة الحرارة على جها
Five by, 
Ich weiß nicht, warum, nachdem ich das gespürt
Apollo 11, Houston
D
Houston, qui Apollo 8. Sappiate che dubi
もう一つの可能​​性が浮かびます。全部袋と凝縮缶に詰め込んだので、全部吹き飛ばせるかもしれません…昇華装置が廃水にどう作
C'est exact. Ajoutez cela en haut de la page. En fait, nous allons l'ajouter juste avant « Activation ». L'autre procédure en haut de la page concerne « Réglage du trim du cardan », et
네. 색깔을 보면, 바다는 전체적으로 진한 파란색이고, 구름은 당연히 밝은 흰색입니다. 지표면에 반사된 빛은 달빛보다 훨씬 더 크게 보입니다. 육지는 대체로 갈색을 띠는데, 어두운 갈색에서 밝은 갈색까지 다양합니다. 여러 기상 현상으로 인해 생긴 소용돌이 모양의 구름들이 많이 보입니다. 멕시코만 입구에서 대서양을 가로지르는 긴 권운 띠도 보입니다. 명암 경계선은 지금 대서양을 남북으로 가로지르고 있습니다. 남반구는 거의 완전히 구름으로 덮여 있고, 북극 부근에도 구름이 꽤 있습니다. 텍사스 남서부와 미국 남서부는 
जब आप ऊपर आएंगे, तो मुझे लगता है कि आप - एक बार पावर चालू हो जाने के बाद, आप शायद आगे बढ़ रहे होंगे - आप एक चमकती हुई 37 में दिखाई देंगे, और यदि
はい。少しロールを入れて
11, Хьюстон. Ваша ситуация на местности выглядит неплохо, и мы сейчас предполагаем, что сброс воды будет происходить примерно вдоль трассы 171 плюс 40; и мы хотели бы, чтобы вы сбросили воду на 45 процентов. Это должно позволить вам прибыть к границе раздела зем
Non ricordo. Solo che il Kapton e altre parti del velivolo erano sparse per tutta la zona, per lunghe distan
शुभ रात्र
Ja. Ich werde in den Platin-Modus wechseln. Genau da
Okay, Houston, der / DELTA-P-Wert ist konstant. Wir fah
了解。10、/: 45597、マイナス 040、プラス 157、プラス 35189、マイナス 01513、マイナス 00346 180 007 000、11 月のアルファ星、プラス 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253、照準星 Scorpii Delta (別名 Dzuba) 下 071、左 45、プラス 0748 マイナス 16500
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。申し訳ないのですが、この作業を中止してやり直したいと思います。この奇妙な構成、奇妙なパターンのままでは、スリープ期間を乗り切れる保証はありません。今すぐ停止して、ピッ
Территория закрыта, и у нас нет никаких предупреждений о состоянии батарей, но вы
Ok. Riprendendo a metà pagina, quel blocco "CMS riprendere controllo assetto", cancella. Cancella la riga successiva: "PRO VE
물병자리 여러분, 모든 패드는 약 3시간 30분 후인 영하 6시 30분에 작동을 시작할 예정입니다. 그리고 한 가지 중요한 점을 다시 한번 말씀드리겠습니다. 지휘 모듈 연결선에서
Houston, il
Dobbiamo escogitare un metodo per utilizzare quelle 
आगे बढ़ो, कुंभ राशि वालो
Pas une m
RKV에서
...хорошо,... береги
Columbi
ロジャー、私はすでにガスを持っています
Con i pesi sei libe
... م
좋아요. 이제 다시
हम अभी 3+34 पर हैं। बस अंधेरा छाने ही वाला है। अंतरिक्ष यान के अगले हिस्से पर स
Everything appears 
好的。第一行，交流总线A：录音机和DECA万向节将打开。其余部分如图所
Ricevuto. Tifone Babe, G.m.t. 07:56, 
هذه هي الصداقة السابعة. لا. لم آكل
罗杰，11号。这里是休斯顿。我们换了台。我们之前在戈德斯通那边
Roger. La sect
क्या आप
Boy, you're not kidding
Nach nochmaliger Überlegung, da die
Okay. Um alle zufrieden zu stellen, können wir eine Schätzung der Schlafdauer der Personen verw
네, 밴스. 자동 광학 모드로 측정해 봤는데도 포착이 안 되네요. 태양을 거의 정면으로 향하고 있어서 그런지 관측이 너무 어렵습니다. 
Listen, we a
Roger. I got you now. I fed in those angles for the S-band, and I couldn't get a lockon; it appears as though the antenna would have to be looking through the LM in order to reach the e
ऑक्सीजन प्रवाह के बारे में हमारी रीडिंग पहले जैसी ही है। इसके इतना अधिक होने का कारण केबिन में गैस का बदलाव है। अपोलो 7 के अनुसार, यदि आपका डेटा भी उनके डेटा जैसा 
Hallo, 
罗杰，你收到“
Non. Nous n'en recevons aucun. Pourriez-vous nous indiquer les angles d'alignement du cardan à utiliser pour déplacer le dispositif, puis nous l'alignerons sur le dispositif. T
لا،
يا إلهي، ا
네가 
Okay. Stavo per dire che non lo faccio. Difficilmente portiamo con noi un m
Sie können auch das Kommando übernehmen, wenn Sie möchten. Möglicherweise müssen Sie es später noch einmal
تما
Ge
Помедленнее. Мы только что пос
Хорошо. Я
罗
알겠습니다
Okay. We want you to go in when you can and verify the following valves and leave them as we outline here. REPRESS PACKAGE valve, off; EMERGENCY CABIN PRESSURE, off; DIRECT O2, off; DEMAND REG, off; both WATER ACCUMULATORS, off; MAIN REG A and B, open; WATER GLYCOL - correction - WATER and then GLYCOL TANK INLET and OUTLET, both. Now if you want to get some water, we recommend that you momentarily turn the SURGE TANK on to pressurize the system and then turn it
Apollo 8, Houston al buio. L'imbardata è di 42 gradi. Si 
I suspect this boulder field may have some of its origin with this large sharp edged rocky rim crater that we passed over at f
ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि गुरुत्वाकर्षण प्रवणता प्र
罗杰，杰克。排气情况似乎真的……我之前报告过，我也看到那块大碎片经过，在我们……燃烧之前……你现在看到的排气量要大得多……切换到暗光模式后，你可以很容易地分辨出星星，而且没有明亮的物体，我这里
عندما تظهر، أعتقد أنك ستفعل - بمجرد تشغيل الجهاز، من المحتمل أنك ستفعل - ستظهر لك 37 وامضة، وإذا قمت ف
Ok. Prendi un l
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। मेरे
... ऊपर। हमने अंत
네, 방금
I don't think it's any great big deal, because the antenna s
Für alle, die die Gedenktafel noch nicht gelesen haben: Wir lesen die Inschrift auf der vorderen Landeplattform. Zuerst sieht man zwei Hemisphär
Stand by
好的，机动平台，目的：飞掠，/G&N；63385；正负0.97；正负0.23；正负0212.7，负负0141.7，负负0254.8；148，316，050；NA，正负0022.5；0360.9，0:53，0356.3；33，352.7，15.0；NA，NA，NA。起始纬度为-23.26，
알겠습니다. 이글호 상태가 좋아 보입니다. 기내 압력
Okay. Got you in CATCH-UP
ठीक है। स्क्रीन के दाहिनी ओर इस समय एक तिहरा गड्ढा है, जिसमें पहले और दूसरे गड्ढे के बीच एक छोटा गड्ढा है; और स्क्रीन के नीचे वाला गड्ढा शुबर्ट वाई है। ज़ूम करके देखें; शुबर्ट वाई में एक केंद्रीय शिखर है। वास्तव में, ऐसे कई शिखर हैं, और आप उन्हें और स्क्रीन के नीचे के किनारे व
Questo è il momento gius
了解。スロットルの調整を進めます…ジンバルドライブのチェックをお願い
Noch ein Hinweis zum Stö
Peculiar thing, Owen, on the platform alignment is that when I really take my time and do a very slow, careful, precise job of marking. I'm getting about the same 
D'accord. On vous montre bien ici, au sol. On vous don
네. 3
Charlie, Apollo 11. J'ai quelques questions concernant l'arrêt du drone. Il me semble que la méthode la plus simple serait la suivante: nous sommes actuellement à 
알았다. 224에 60267을
罗杰。我们这儿现在几乎没人了。我们稍微放松一下。上面有人作伴感觉怎么样
حسناً يا جاك. على اللوحة 3، شاحن البطارية، مطفأ، محول التيار المتردد 2، مطفأ؛ على اللوحة 5، ربط ناقل التيار الرئيسي ألفا تشارلي، قيد التشغيل؛ اللوحة 250، بطارية CB A،
もしそれがプレシャスが望むことなら、ここで慣性中立にして地平線上に留まること
Roger, Houston. Columb
Certo che sì. Stiamo sor
Аквариус, Хьюстон. Что касается баллончиков с CO2, кстати, сейчас здесь PCO2 показывает 1,6. Мы ожидаем, что сможем использовать еще 6 часов с двумя им
情况怎么样？一切都好，我们正在准备。准备工作没有延误，
알겠습니다. 1, G&N: 38658, -0.54, +0.65, TIG 0.78 02 0.345, +29180, +0.3779, -0.1325; 롤 NA, 피치 0.41. 나머지 PAD는 NA입니다. 연료 탱크 용량은 제트기 2대, 소요 시간은 19초입니다. 4 PAD, G&N: 38658, -0.54, +0.65, TIG 0.84 29 5.059, +31373, +0.3760, -0.0968; 롤 NA, 피치 0.34. 나머지 PAD는 NA입니다. 연료 탱크 용량은 제트기
Bien, équipage. La seule autre information que j'ai à vous communiquer pour le moment concerne la mise à jour de votre zone de décollage à +35 heures. Il s'agit d'une modification par rapport à la zone que nous vous avons attribuée hier. Cette mise à jour vise à éviter les conditions météorologiques défavorables dans la zone d'atterrissage du Pacifique central à 70 heures, soit l'heure de retour prévue pour cette zone. Si jamais vous vous posez la question, nous ne prévoyons aucun problème dans cette zone pour la fin de la mission. La zone météorologique se situe à 20 degrés au sud de votre point d'atterrissage final et semble se dépla
好的。
Роджер. Ваш режим работы двигателя GET: 02 1
了解。我々が得た情報では、投棄姿勢への操縦は不可能だ。これは我々が指示した角度で​​あり、積荷のジンバル角度と一致していないた
Hier entsteht jet
알겠습니다. 알겠습니다. 턱걸이인지 팔굽혀펴기
Je suis en mode gratuit maintena
Okay. Wir haben hier drei Kameras. Zwei davon sind für Aufnahmen durch das Sichtfenster Nr. 5 gedacht, die dritte für Aufnahmen durch das Sichtfenster Nr. 5. Zuerst schalte ich die Kameras ein
Roger, 8. 010 689 260 Persei Zeta, down 048, left 05. The remainder is not applicable. Sirius, Rigel, set of stars for align, 1
Fert
يا إلهي، دعني أستعيد تلك الكامي
ठीक है। हमें ऐसा लग रहा है कि हालांकि हम क्वाड की मात्रा के बारे में वही पढ़ रहे हैं जो आप पढ़ रहे हैं, कंप्यूटर प्रोग्राम और उसमें मौजूद सभी सुधार कारकों का उपयोग करके, ऐसा लगता है कि आपके चारों क्वाड लगभग एक जैसे हैं। पाउंड में, उदाहरण के लिए, क्वाड A में 193 पाउंड, B में 189, C में 200 और डेल्टा में 190 पाउंड हैं। और गेज पर जो अंतर आप पढ़ रहे हैं, वह इ
进来了。听着，你几
Сейчас у нас, на мой взгляд, почти идеальные условия для наблюдения за звёздами, причём влиян
Okay, Fred. Uns ist aufgefallen, dass ihr etwa ein Kilo weniger Wasser trinkt. Habt ihr in letzter Zeit etwas getrunken oder wiss
네, 맞습니다. 얼마나 많은 테이프를 버렸는지 확인되면 자세히 알려주세
हा हा! मुझे यकीन है कि पिछले दो दिनों में आपको इतना मजा कभी नहीं आया ह
Okay. Schritt 1 überspringen, und wir wollen INVERTER 2 AC 2 auf AUS stellen; und Schritt 1 überspringen, und wir wollen AC 2, BUS auf RESET 
Oh, attends un peu, Fred. On
नमस्कार, मुचेआ कॉम टेक। मैं फ्
نعم. لا نستطيع ضبطه على الوضع الضيق. حاولنا التبديل إلى وضع التتبع التلقائي أو REACQ، لكن زاوية الانحراف تتراوح بين 270 و0، وزاوية الميل تتراوح بين 6 و90 درجة تقريبًا. أحاول ضبطه يدويًا الآن بالزوايا ا
आप पू
Ehi, Charli
Хорошо. 4
Roger. Understand the description there. And the next subject, on the two core tubes which you collected, how
Gemini VI, Houston. Si vous lisez ceci, nous sommes prêts à recevoir votre sign
왼쪽 창문을 통해 여전히 지구가 보이고, 왼쪽에는 투광등이 보이는 것 같기도 하고, 아니면 해치 창문
好的，Vanc
फ्लाइट सर्जन जिम जानना च
Houston, come fai a leggere Columbia su high gain ades
Bene. Per prima cosa, vai a pagina 12. Sul lato destro della pagina, partendo dal centro verso il basso, tutto ciò che si trova sotto "Ciclo 5 fotogrammi, Sostituisci lato scuro o diapositiva scura" dovrebbe essere eliminato fino ad arrivare in fondo alla pagina, dove c'è "Acquisizione OMNI D", che dovrebbe rimanere. Lascia anche "Rimuovi le tende della finestra", che si trova circa alla terza riga da dov
Ca
D'accord. Sur la rangée 1, sous AFFICHAGES DE
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Индийская комиссия по управлению воздушным движением. Ваше сообщение то появляется, то исчезает. 
D'a
Ok, Jim. È stata una 
빌, 이제 H2 퍼지 라인 히터
D'accord. Attendez. Ça vous c
Columbia, ici Houston. Pendant que je vous 
Роджер. Напоминаем, что вы должны оставить выключатели цепи радара сближения в выключенном состоянии. Однако переключатель режима радара сближ
هذا صحيح يا مايك. نتوقع وقتاً قياسياً تقريباً. فكرنا في زيادة السرعة قليلاً، لكننا لا نعتقد أن هذا المسار س
Il
まさにその通りです
收到。关于您的P57望远镜……我们稍微查了一下，看起来
Okay. I'll get back with you on your question in a minute, Fred. New, 
Итак, «Ястребы» выиграли свою лигу среди юниоров со счетом 3-2. Они обыграли «Соколов». «Ястребы» набрали 3 очка, сд
Okay. "'Twas the night before Christmas and way out in space, the Apollo 8 crew had just won the moon race; The headsets were hung by the consoles with care, In hopes that Chris Kraft soon would be there; Frank Borman was nestled all snug in his bed, While visions of 's danced in his head; And Jim Lovell, in his couch, and Anders, in the bay, were racking their brains over a computer display, When out of the, there arose s
А ваш небольшой маневр,
Роджер, Cape Com Tech. Дружба
Questo
И, пункт 13, м
로저, g는 최고 6.3을
रॉजर। 64 हज़ार डॉलर के लिए, हम अभी भी आपके लैंडिंग साइट, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस, के स्थान का पता लगाने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। हमें लगता है कि यह LAM 2 चार्ट पर जूलियट 0.5 और 7.8 पर स्थित है। क्या आपके पास अभी भी वे चार्ट मौजूद 
حسناً. هذا 
روجر. فهمت، وهذه قراءات شاشتنا: ألفا، *** ٢ با
روجر. نريد التحدث معك بشأن ذلك. مايك، يمكننا - حسب رغبتك - القيام بذلك بأي طريقة. إما أن ندعك تقوم 
انتظروا قليلاً. لدينا مشكلة صغيرة هن
Ja, ganz bestimmt! Es ist ein großer 
13, Houston. Il nous faut installer davantage d'instruments. Veuillez connecter l'onduleur 1 a
Clairement en dessous de moi. Je le suivais du regard depuis Carnarvon. Jusqu'à Carnarvon, il était en dessous de nous, puis il est monté jusqu'à l'horizon, avant de redescendre en dessous. On aurait presque dit qu'il était sur une orbite différente de la mienne. Son apogée et son périgée étaient différents des miens. Bref, j'ai tenté de le rattraper au lever du jour, dès que j'ai pu le localiser. Comme je l'ai dit, à ce moment-là, il se trouvait à un ou deux kilomètres devant moi, en dessous. Plus j'essayais de me rapprocher, moins je gagnais de terrain. Je tirais en rétrograde. J'utilisais mes propulseurs supérieurs de manière à réduire ma vitesse totale, et je tirais… simultanément. Je ne suis jamais vraiment parvenu à le rattraper, et il a continué à s'éloigner. Il m'est apparu évident qu'une fois arrivés à Hawaï, pour rattraper l
ASA 64 흑백 필름의 노출값은 13입니다. 노출값을 13으로 설정하고 필
Houston, Aquarius. Ha
और, वैंस, क्या आपने प्रक्षेप 
I believe I got them al
Roger. Für Fenster Nummer 5. Das heißt – jedes Mal, wenn Sie 230 Grad Rollwinkel überschreit
제미니 씨,
... Sacco di atterraggio
Roger. Sigma Seven. Guaymas Cap Com. Parfait. Il y a eu une panne de courant du côté californien. Nous lisons correctement votre temps de rétroséquence. À mon signal, voyons voir, le temps écoulé de votre capsule est actuellement en avance de 4 secondes, Wally. Ceci prend en com
حسنًا يا جاك، شكرًا لك. ويا برج ا
シェフに賛
Хорошо. Чуть ниже 13. И просто для вашей информации, у нас есть люди, работающие над несколькими вопросами. Мы работаем над промежуточным этапом, чтобы определить нашу систему управления и как это делать с выбранной системой управления, что нам следует делать с выравниванием. У нас есть LMS, и несколько бригад работают
Кен, пожалуйста, кратко объясните мне суть вашего маневра, о котором я 
Roger, Buzz. Bi
Okay. Einen Moment bitte, ich gebe Ihnen ein
Rog
जी हाँ। मैं इस विमान से बहुत खुश हूँ। मैं ऑटो मोड में हूँ, रेट्रो एटीट्यूड पर हूँ, जायरो नॉर्मल पर 
ROT CONTROL
ठीक है, फ्रेड। आखिरी बात में तुम कुछ ज़्यादा ही कमज़ोर पड़ गए। मैं स
أنا متأكد من أنني لا أستطيع. سأكون أسوأ حالاً لأنني سأكون متأخراً ب
रॉजर। 
好的，弗雷德。我们还是用你那老朋
大丈夫ですよ
夏威夷网络G
申し訳ありません、ジャック。もう一
Aurora Seven, votre dernière transcription était illisible. Votre signal s'affaiblit fortement, bien que de façon intermittente. Je vais lire les heures de la rétroséquence à l'aveugle. Zone 3 Delta, 04 12 32, 04 12 32; Écho 04 22 27; 3 Écho 04 22 27; et le dernier… que nous avons est 04 32 26… maintenant, et l'horloge de votre capsul
Only to say that it was much higher - I couldn't real
收到。雷达显示良好。非常遗憾我们的朋友朱利安不能和我们一起。我想向你汇报一下控制模式的情况。首先，手动和电传操纵低空模式都很棒；辅助阻尼器也工作得很好。我现在处于自动模式；反向姿态。姿态保持得非常好
Okay. Obwohl wir die gleichen Werte für die Quadcopter-Anzahl ablesen wie Sie, scheinen die Werte Ihrer vier Quadcopter,
Stiamo discutendo di due argomenti, ma al momento non li abbiamo ancora pro
はい。コックピット内は、エンジンを降りる時よりも戻る時の方が暖かくなっていることに気づきました。エンジンを降りる際に10ピンバルブを手動で調整したのを
حسنًا. لدينا الخرطوم الأزرق الخاص بوحدة الإنزال البرمائية (LMP) بجوار نافذة الوحدة، وبالطبع، يفصل الخرطوم الأحمر مسافة حوالي 1.2 متر. حسنًا، سنقوم الآن بـ... والخرطوم الآخر... مزود بوصلة تمديد. خرطوم وحدة القيادة الأزرق، بالطبع، مزود بوصلة تمديد، وهو يضخ الهواء عاليًا داخل وحدة القيادة. أما الخرطوم الأحمر فهو... أوه، إنه عند حلقة التثبيت حيث توجد المزاليج الزرقاء، لذا هناك فرق حوالي 1.2 إلى 1.5
好的，
D'accord... D'accord. Vous voulez ces chif
好的。阿波罗8号。看来由于一些跟踪要求，我们不得不推迟这次通信测试。如果这不会对你们目前的操作造成太大影响，我们可以在大约一个小时后完成。这可能需要15到20分钟，并且需要飞船上的宇航员进行一些通话。所以，如果这会影响你们的睡眠等等，那就先这样吧，我们会优先处理这些
Ici Jim. J'ai beaucoup de mal à évaluer la distance qui me sépare du relais. Je vois les
Roger. GET B 1 34 37; Del
في مباراة "أسترو بلو بونيت" الكبرى، التي تلتها مباراة كرة السلة الكلاسيكية بين فريقي إس إم يو وأوكلاهوما، وصل الفريقان. يستعدان بحماسٍ شديدٍ له
Houston, al momento non siamo in Allineamento. Volevi, per 
阿波罗11号
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Stiamo
Wir arbeiten noch daran. Ich bin mir nicht sicher, ob das Problem schon ganz aussichtslos ist. Es scheint, als ob unser Belichtungsmesser ein durchschnittliches Feld erfasst, das viel größer ist als die Erde. Dadurch wird ein großer Teil des dunklen Weltraums gemessen, und wir vermuten, dass dies die Blendenöffnung maximal öffnet. Wenn man die Kamera dann auf die Erde richtet, füllt die Erde nur etwa 3 Grad des Kegelwinkels aus, während die Linse 9 Grad erfasst. Es sieht also so aus, als ob die
Well, I can't get behind to see the monitor. I'll bring the focus in, but we're going to be looking down past one of the quads and one of th
我现在正在录制语音。我听到夏威夷在呼叫，哈哈，夏威
Hawaii, q
26, 전부 0입니다. 알겠습니다. 27, 전부 0입니다. 추진기는 전진, 기동은 후퇴. 들으
휴스턴, 지금 당장 저 멀리 지평선을 보고 싶은 건
Roger. Nous avons actuellement 
飞行
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। यह अपोलो 8 
Mensch, du bist schwach; aber ich verstehe dich. Du bist lesbar. Bist du a
100 pieds, 3,5 en dessous
Columbia, Houston. Vous n'avez pas besoin d'en faire d'autre, sauf si vous le souhaitez. Pause. Et Columbia, dès que vous en aurez l'occa
अंतरिक
よし、
好
Родж
Hast du das gleiche Er
हाँ, यह सही है। हम यह ज
540 Fuß, unten 
你想让我给
Я пытался уговорить Фрэнка поехать со мной в ту же по
روجر. المنطقة 11 - دلتا ΔT صفر. GMTRC 01 يوم 07 48 58. RET 400 K، 15
ओम्नी चार्ली। ठीक 
了解。テレビの開始時間と終
알겠습니다. 시
順調に進んでいるようだ。メッカの街が見えるかもしれない。私のいるエリアにあるはずだ。もしかしたら、上空を横切るかもしれない。アラビア半
रॉजर। आरोही नोड देशांत
It is not twice as thick. It's thinner, but it is located at a distance 
Sicher hast du das – du hast deine Checkliste hier, n
What does it s
好的。你有没有试着把那些东西放回A
Tranquility Base, this is Houston. We'd like to verify your steerable antenna
The main batteries are all 9 an
로저. 켄, 산소와
Sigma Seven, Sigma Sev
Роджер, Вумера. Спасибо
在太空里不太好用
هل ستطلب من بيت كونراد أن يُ
नहीं
रॉजर। फिर से
B
さて、姿勢を投棄する操作を行うと何が起こるかを考
Хорошо. Мы сейчас примерно там, где будем записывать данные BLOCK плюс четыре и плюс одиннадцать. Данные плюс четыре, которые мы вам предоставили 
好的，吉姆。看来我们需要做的是——为了保持均匀加
रॉजर। जैक तो पहले ही उठ चुका है। 
레트로팩을 켜둔 채로 두는 것에 대한 고려 사항이 있으며, 텍사스에서 관련 내용을 알려줄 것입
R
बस इतना ही, जैक
Аполлон-
Ihr Signal verblasst. In wenigen Minuten geht es weiter nach Canton. Hier spricht Woomera Cap Com, Ende der Durchsag
ROT CONTROL POWER, NOR
क्या आपको यकीन है कि आपने कनवर्टर को गलती से OFF स्थिति में नहीं 
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 잠시 기다려 주십시오. 아직 복사할 준비가 안 됐습니다. 카메라 필름을 교체하는 중입
Ja. Gut, ich schalte sie jetzt ab und schaue, was passiert. Okay. Die Hauptversorgung ist aus. Sie war sieben Minuten lang an, während wir mit hohem Sauerstoffdurchsatz betrieben haben. Okay, nach drei Stunden haben wir noch 62 Prozent. Wir liegen zwei Prozent unter dem Sollwert. Das sollte für ein paar Erdumrundungen reic
Впере
ヒューストン、
잭, E-메모리 덤프에서 1번으로 대기해.
D'accord. En attendant, voici de quoi te 
すべてのデルタスラスタをメインAに、すべてのブラボ
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Принято, вы сейчас находитесь в позицион
- حوالي 3 ثوا
A Houston, il sismometro passivo è stato instal
오로라 세븐... 95. 착륙 지점은 200마일 
罗杰。我们希望你去睡觉。至少睡四
Avanti, Hawaii. Geme
انتظر ي
D'accord. Nous avons observé le comportement de votre système et nous disposons des données nécessaires pour l'analyser. Nous allons y 
Sei a grandezza naturale - Belli
Ok. Apollo 8. Sembra che dovremo rimandare questo test COMM a causa di alcune esigenze di tracciamento. Possiamo farlo in circa un'ora, se questo non interferisce troppo con le vostre attuali operazioni. Ci vorranno forse 15 o 20 minuti e richiederà un po' di conversazione da parte del personale a bordo della navicella. Quindi, se questo interferirà con il vostro sonno e tutto il resto, perché non farlo? Ci rimandiamo a questo e riprendiamo quest
제미니, CSQ. 모니터링 
Ciao H
好的。第三行，打开接下来的五个——更正——打开左边的前五个，关闭 HEATER，关闭 SI
Verstanden. Und falls Sie bequem au
Bene. Sulla riga 4, apriremo tutti e quattro i riscaldatori
Я почти уверена, что это Гималаи, так как видела фотографию, которую сделал Гордо. Она получ
لم يتبق لدينا سوى دقيقة تقريبًا؛ هل أنتم مستع
OK. Sur la puissance 5, coupure d'urgence. Point 1, première ligne: je supprime « Et VHF-A ». Deuxième ligne: « Fonctionnement SIMPLEX ». Troisième ligne: je remplace le deuxième accent circonflexe (amplificateur de puissance) par « OFF », et le dernier mot de cette ligne, « OFF », par « PCM ». Quatrième ligne: OK. Cinquième ligne: je supprime toute la ligne. Éclairage: n
حسنًا. ستكون هذه آخر مجموعة من عمليات رصد النج
了解。了解。
أنا متأكد تمامًا أنني لا أفهم الأمر، لأنه لو كنت أفهمه حقًا لكنت أقفز في كل مكان
わかりました、ジム。姿勢をもう少し急に上げたところで、機体軸の直線化を行います。これは 400 プラス 5 です。この時点でボールが上がっていれば、ボールは 000 まで上がります。制御モードについては後で詳しく説明しますが、もちろん、ATTITUDE H
إذا 
أوه، تشارلي. 
ठीक है। और 
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Manuelles Ventil an Bedienfeld 382 erneut prüfen, Verdampferwasserregelung AUTOMATISCH. En
好的。您在“接受”选项中已确认。这是更新后的着陆点 RESFMM
जैसे-जैसे रात गहरी होती जा रही है, बाकी तारे दिखने लगे हैं। मैं उन्हें देख पा रहा हूँ - मुझे लगता है कि अब मैं लगभग पाँचवें परिमाण त
Tout d'abord, je suis en rentrée automatique; les gyroscopes sont normaux; la manœuvre est désactivée; toute la configuration est en mode rentrée; le commutateur de dérivation des gyroscopes de vitesse est en position normale. Voici le niveau de carburant: le réservoir automatique est à 90 %, le réservoir manuel à environ 90 %. Voici un aperçu de la combinaison, qui est maintenant très confortable. La température de la combinaison est de 60 degrés. La température de mon dôme est descen
로저. Rev 57, 시퀀스 16, 08:11, 요 12°, 피치 30°, 16mm 카메라. Rev 58, 시퀀스 12, 09:36, 요 3°, 피치 30°, 16mm 카메
4:06 
لنفترض قيمة إضاءة معينة، وهذه القيمة هي 13 لفيلم 64 ASA. ج
좋아요, 10도
سخان RCS مفصول. قا
Okay, Ja
Roger, ich habe eine Korrektur zum Flugplan. Die Bandenablage er
Ok
आग
حسناً، يبدو الأمر جيداً جداً هنا عل
Compris. Vous voulez un temps de recharge,
О, это з
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 요
Charlie, meintest du, d
Хорошо. И еще один вопрос. Было бы интересно узнать мнение Джека о состоянии основной шины B. Е
Okay. That's about the MAX volume we can take down here; so if you want to talk to us, you may have to call us once or twice. You're ju
没错
罗杰。修正第二个错误后的 Alpha 值为 03 加 11 
Ce n
Our status is GO. We did bring the ECS O2 bac
حسنًا. افتح اللوحة 250 BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING، ثم تحقق من جهد ناقل ا
Apollo 8, Houston. We would like to get an approximate of your ma
지금 짐을 기다리면서 방송을 보고 있는
Gemini 4，RK
哎
了解。写真撮影では、おそらく姿勢を改めて整えなければならないでしょう。そして、再び窓から入ってき
Hello, Friendship Seven, Woomera Cap Com. 150 volt inverter 
यह सही
Привет, Джим. Не мог бы ты рассказать, каково было соотношение использования твоих двигателей: сколько ты использовал задни
Wir können den Neigun
번호가 
ठीक है, ऐ
11. Houston. Die aktuelle Vorhersage zeigt akzeptable Bedingungen in Ihrem Erholungsgebiet: vereinzelt Schneefall in 600 Metern Höhe, vereinzelt auch in höheren Lagen, Wind aus 70 Grad, 13 Knoten, Sichtweite 16 Kilometer und Seegang etwa 1,2 Meter. Die gestrige Vorhersage zeigte einen Tropensturm namens Claudia, etwa 800 bis 1600 Kilometer östlich von H
还有，水瓶座，休
خل
13번, 휴스턴. 11분 남았을 때, 시작! 예상 종료 시간입니다
Ji
Ok, e sul pannello 9
Okay. In dieser Konfiguration werden folgende Onboard-Messwerte benötigt: Batteriespannung C, Pyro-Batteriespannung A, Pyro-Batteriespannung B, Heliumdruck, Einspritzdüsentemperaturen (Positionen 5 Charlie, 5 Delta, 6 Alfa, 6 Bravo, 6 Charlie, 6 Delta) und der Ladedruck der 
ठीक है। और एक और बात है जिसके बारे में मुझे नहीं पता कि आपको जानकारी है या नहीं। पैनल दो में अभी हमारे पास लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड के कोई कंटेनर नहीं हैं। इसलिए जब हम बिजली चा
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. В удобное для вас время переведите переключатель БИОМЕД справа, и вам не нужно буде
Roger, 11. J'ai deux PADS pour toi, 30 puis un 31. 30 SPS/G&N: 36691, moins 061, plus 066 135 23 4156. NOUN 81: 32 - correction, plus 32011, plus 06818, moins 02650 181 054 014. Apogée: NA, périgée: plus 00230 3286 - correction, 32836; durée de combustion: 2 28 32628 24 1511 357. Les trois lignes suivantes sont NA. NOUN 61: +1103, -17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. Les étoiles du c
D'accord. Peut-être que cela nous donne un peu plus confiance en nous, que si nous devions faire des choses sur le chemi
Al tuo prossimo passaggio, Columbia, invece di eseguire un'operazione vera e propria, vorremmo che guardassi nelle vicinanze delle coordinate che ti abbiamo fornito, che rappresentano la nostra migliore analisi basata sulla fisica della mappa e sulla traiettoria, e abbiamo anche un altro set di coordinate che vorremmo che cercassi nelle vicinanze. Quest'ultimo si basa su tutte le interpretazioni delle caratteristiche geologiche che sono state vist
Apollo 8, hier spricht H
Джим, это одна из возможных причин, которую мы рассматрив
Bon, je vais me laisser déri
... Schub auf NORMAL; DELTA-V-Schub, zwei, AUS; Nicken und Gieren a
О, это уже сл
Моторы подвеса, тангаж 2 и рыскание 2, включены
Roger. We copy that. But there's a greater duty cycle on - There's a good 15 percent duty cycle on the ascent program there, so just go ahead and leave it off.
Make sure tracking 
罗杰，休斯顿。6，/：45701，减 040，加 157，加 31776，减 00823，减 01365 180 016 001，NA，加 00188 31816 302
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 현재 고이득 안테나의 스캔 한계에 도달했습니다. 빔 폭을 '좁음'으로 설정하셨더라도 실제로는 '넓음'으로 설정되어 있습니다. 상황을 개선하려면 기체를 아래로 기울이고 왼쪽으로 요를 조정해 보십시오. 확인 후 필요한 경우 조정 각도를 알려드리겠습
आगे 
يبدو الأمر جيداً يا هيوستن. كانت الرحلة سلسة للغاية. مع ذ
Это подтверждается. Мы думаем, что это обеспечит вам достаточное расстояние, а также темп будет дос
Хорошо, конфигурация панели 11, верхний ряд: Шина переменного тока B, я хочу, чтобы S-диапазонная антенна была открыта; Шина переменного тока A, магнитофон, открыт. Второй ряд, под СИСТЕМОЙ A, я хочу, чтобы основной к
わかりました。閉じたいのはSEQ
음, 저런 별자리라면 얘기가 다르죠. 정말
Ricevuto. Ha superato il limite di attenzione, arrivando al limite di scansione o RF, a quanto ho capito. E lasciatemi spiegare brevemente cosa ha 
Okay. Verstanden, Fred. Unsere Thermikexperten werden sich das ansehen. Wir sprechen unter anderem darüber, die Kurskorrektur nicht vor dem Bersten des Schwefelwasserstofftanks durchzuführen, falls dieser ausfällt, um Probleme beim Wiederherstell
Ich weiß nicht, ob Sie es erkennen können, aber im Meer der Fruchtbarkeit gibt es eine Reihe von Krate
روجر، مايك. أودّ التعليق على البيانات. كانت المناورة الآلية دقيقة للغاية. يبدو أننا رصدنا نقطةً دون نجمية أثناء المناورة؛ فقد وضعت البصريات الآلية كوكبة كانوبوس في مكانها الصحيح؛ وعمل نظام التحكم بالدفع الأدنى كما هو مُعلن. عند الارتفاعات التي بدأتُ عندها عمليات الرصد، يظهر خطٌ ضبابي واضح. يُضفي المرشح على الأرض توهجًا، نوعًا ما توهجًا برتقاليًا. من الصعب تحديد موقع النجم بدقة، ولكن يبدو أن هنا
Roger
Ici Canton Cap Com. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Pourriez-vous commencer votre bref rapport, s'il 
Riesco a vedere sul monitor la cosa di cui parlavi, ma in questo momento non rie
今、画面中央に見えるクレーターがウェッブ・クレーターです。パワー降下開始の約6分前に、私たちはウェッブ・クレーターを真下から見下ろしていたはずです。クレーターの底は比較的平らで、西側の壁、つまりカメラに最も近い壁に、2つか3つのクレーターが見えます。画面下部近くには、外側に窪みのあるクレ
GE
제 보조 산소 공급관이 열려 있
收
Okay. Understand. All nominal on the add
杰克收拾睡袋的时候，我想带你看看这个有趣的小角落。这里有个临时储物袋，我们每次吃完饭后都会把废纸和其他杂物都放进去。它就在右边角落，靠近我们的垃圾倾
Yes, they're crying in Dallas. Basketball scores: Houston didn't do so good this weekend. Illinois beat Houston 97 to 84. And North Carolina took the Owls. The score was 85 to 77. We had a couple of words in the paper, Frank, on the Oilers. The Oilers voted George Webster their most valuable player and - although Houston didn't make anybody on the All Offensive Team this year, t
Deke, I finally got a grasp on this thing. I'm beginning to feel a little cooler. And the suit inlet te
البالون - سأقوم بالمناورة بما يكفي لإخراج البالون في مساره حتى أتمكن 
Je ne crois pas. Je pense qu'il est venu 
11, Хьюстон. Мы видим перегородку для подачи электроэнергии, и теперь мы снова прикрепили липучки к системам. Мы видим разметку на счетчиках, зе
현재 02시 19분 13초에 기수가 약간 상승하고 있습니다. 지금 바로 0으로 조정하겠습니
에드, 여기는 휴스턴 CAP COM입니다. 무슨 말씀인지 잘 안 읽히는데요. 당신은 제 말을 읽을 수 있는 것 같군요. 산소
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। माइक,
Roger, Jim. In regard to your evaporator, we feel that if you do have a similar problem next time on the back side in sunlight, check the evaporator outlet temperature, and if it gets above 60, we concur that it would be a good idea to bring
로저
气压还在下降。现在开始上升了。好
了解、フレッド。プライマリカートリッジを交換する際
OK, Houston. On est en mode brûlure. Jim vérifie l'
이제는 우리를 
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. В данный момент вы находитесь в пределах допустимого диапазона сканирования на высокочувствительной антенне; хотя у вас может быть выбрана узкая ширина луча, на самом деле вы находитесь в широком диапазоне. Для улучшения ситуации потребуется немного уменьшить угол наклона и н
Okay. FORWARD DUMP valve, 
罗杰。或许在你看来，我们这次登月之旅看似简单轻松。但我可以向你保证，事实并非如此。将我们送入轨道的土星五号火箭是一台极其复杂的机器，每一个部件都运转得完美无瑕。我头顶上的这台计算机拥有38000个词汇，每个词汇都经过精心挑选，对我们宇航员来说至关重要。我手中的这个开关，仅在指令舱内就有超过300个相同的开关，而这仅仅是一个开关的设计。除此之外，还有无数的断路器、操纵杆、连杆和其他相关控制装置。我们服务舱尾部的大型火箭发动机也必须运转完美，否则我们就会被困在月球轨道上。我头顶上的降落伞明天也必须完美无缺，否则我们将坠入大海。我们始终坚信所有这些设备都能正常运转，并且我们仍然相信它们在剩余的飞行过程中都能如此。这一切都离不开许多人的辛勤付出。首先，是工厂里组装这些机器的美国工人。其次，是各个测试团队在组装和后续
好的。听着。请注意，我一直在监测ECS O2的个人曲线，过去几个小时里，我没看到消耗量有任何增加。看来我那条参差不齐的曲线最终还是会和我们刚开始监测时差不多
Роджер, Понимаю
Okay. On panel 5: CB CENTR
جيميني 6، كارنارفون. يمكنك تحويل مفتاح التبريد
बिल, अब मैं तुम्हारी ब
, say ag
この小さなテープレコーダーは、私たちにとって大きな助けとなりました。月への旅の途中で時間を潰すのに、本当に助かりました。『オデッセイ』で「2001年宇宙の旅」のテーマ曲を流しながら、このテープレコーダーがこうして浮かんでいるのを見るのは、ちょっと不思議な感じで
क्या आप ह्यूस्टन को बता देंगे कि हम... के ऊपर से निकल गए थे, लेकिन हम टेक्सास के तट को काफी स्पष्ट रूप से देख पा रहे थे और वास्तव में... बाहर आप काफी अधिक देख सकत
收到。我
Роджер. Мы 
내 건 켜져 있어요. 당신이 일어나자마자 당신 건
Ah! Ah! Ho ancora i segni neri di sbandata sull
11, ici Houston. Nous ne recevons 
Th
D'accord. Tout doit être en ordre ici. Jusqu'à présent, nous n'avons pas encore regardé dans le cockpit. N
A
The only thing is all the engineering that went into those damn thing
क्या हम आपका रक्तचाप जांच सकते हैं? अपना बटन दबाएं, फिर बंजी कॉर्ड को हिलाएं, फिर से रक्तचाप जांच शु
双子座4号，双子座4号，任何时候你的OAMS点火速度超过12
Хорошо. У меня изменился фоновый шум
11日、ヒューストン。シフト交代時間で
روجر. لم نتلقَّ تأك
- - clockwise - that's verified
Roger. Je suppose qu'on changeait d'antennes. Un instant. C'est exact, 11. On procédait à un échange d'antennes. En résumé, on a une excellente plateforme, une dérive
Ce n'est pas vrai par
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Non avevo ancora detto nulla. Stiamo cercando di capire come procedere. In riferimento alla tua precedente domanda sulla gestione del ciclo del sonno, concordiamo con il tuo commento. Vorremmo tornare al piano di volo per quanto riguarda i cicli del sonno e così via, prima di entrare in orbita lunare. Vorremmo quindi che tu usassi il tuo giudizio per trovare il modo più efficiente per gestire i cicli del sonno e ripartirli tra di voi. Vorremmo che 
휴스턴의 Associated 소속 해리 로젠탈 기자가 쓴 기사입니다. 두 명의 산타가 두 살배기 제프리 러벨의 크리스마스 이브를 더욱 특별하게 만들어 주었습니다. 첫 번째 산타는 집 문을 두드리고 선물을 가져다주었고, 두 번째 산타는 아빠를 달에서 집으로 데려다 주었습니다. 첫 번째 산타는 빨간 옷에 하얀 수염을 기르고 "호호" 하고 큰 소리로 외쳐 멀리까지 들렸습니다. 두 번째 산타는 달 뒤편에서 불꽃을 뿜어내는 거대한 엔진이었고, 수많은 사람들이 엔진이 점화되었다는 소식을 애타게 기다리고 있었습니다. "산타클로스가 있다는 것을 알려드립니다." 아폴로 8호는 엔진이 중요한 연소를 성공적으로 마친 지 15분 만에 무선 침묵을 깨고 전 세계에 이 소식을 전하며 처음으로 이렇게 말했습니다. "우리 모두 이보다 더 좋은 크리스마스 선물을 기대한 적이 없습니다." 관제센터의 켄 매팅리는 이렇게 말했습니다. "지상에 계신 모든 분들께 감사를 전합니다. 여러분 없이는 불가능했을 겁니다." 우주선 사령관 프랭크 보먼 대령이 답했습니다. 바로 그때, 관제센터 콘솔 앞에 크리스마스트리가 환하게 빛났고, 우주비행사 해리슨 슈미트는 승무원들에게 우주 버전의 "성 니콜라스의 방문"을 읽어주었다. "크리스마스 이브 밤, 우주 저 멀리에서 아폴로 8호 승무원들은 달 착륙 경쟁에서 승리했습니다."로 시작하는 이 동화는, 제프리의 아버지인 해군 대령 제임스 러벨과 공군 소령 윌리엄 A. 앤더스, 그리고 보먼 대령이 무사히 귀환할 때까지 축하 행사를 미뤄두었다. 여느 때와 같은 크리스마스 이브라면 우주비행사 가족들은 교회에서 크리스마스 예배를 드렸겠지만, 올해는 모두 텔레비전에 시선을 고정하고 있었다. 유인 우주선 센터 근처의 집들은 모두 크리스마스 장식으로 꾸며져 있었다. 러벨 가족의 집 주변과 팀버 코브 마을 곳곳에는 멕시코풍의 등불이 줄지어 설치되어 있었고, 러벨 가족 네 식구들은... 그때, 커다란 자루를 멘 키 큰 산타클로스가 탄 차가 도착했다. 그는 "호호" 하고 웃으며 문 앞에 서서 큰 소리로 노크했다. 문이 열리자 1월 14일에 세 살이 되는 제프리 러벨이 서 있었습니다. 제프리는 그 모습을 보고 움찔했습니다. 어머니가 그를 안아 올렸지만, 제프리는 여전히 겁에 질려 어머니에게 매달렸습니다. "작년에는 울면서 도망쳤어요." 15살 누나 바바라가 말했습
أورورا
D'acco
Ok, Bill. Credo di voler concludere con un ultimo appunto sull'uso del vettore di stato di bordo per il 4. Dopo averci pensato
ठीक है, जैक। आपको याद होगा कि पहले सभी ने चंद्रमा अस्त होने से कुछ मिनट पहले उसे देखने की बात कही है, और जब आप वहाँ पहुँचेंगे तब तक क्षितिज शायद अँधेरा होगा; आप सुबह जल्दी प्रवेश कर रहे हैं; और पश्चिम से आने पर भी आपको अँधेरा क्षितिज ही दिखाई देगा। तो, एक बैकअप तकनीक के तौर पर, जैसे आप क्षितिज को ट्रैक करते हैं, हम आपको एक एटीट्यूड देंगे जो पैड पर होगा ताकि आप सीधे चंद्रमा को देख सकें। यह एक इनर्शियल एटीट्यूड है; यह बदलेगा नहीं, और आप 36-डिग्री विंडो लाइन को चंद्रमा पर रखेंगे, और फिर बस वहीं बैठकर उसे देखेंगे। और ठीक पहले, पृथ्वी ऊपर आएगी और उसे ढक लेगी, और तब आपको क्षितिज का अच्छा अवलोकन मिल जाएगा। मेरे पास कुछ समय हैं, जो मैं आपको बाद में बताऊँगा। और अगर आप अभी इस चीज़ को देखें, तो उस समय आप सेटिंग कर सकते हैं या जो चाहें कर सकते हैं। और आपके पास एक ज्ञात
حسنًا. مساء الخير. هذا طاقم أبولو 8. كيف تسير الأمور الآن يا هيوست
Roger. I have two Apollo Landmark updates
双子座4号，CSQ
afferma di poter capire perché ciò possa a
Gemini 4，Gu
世界が知りたいと思うことの一つは、スイッチの設定を元に戻した後、何をするのかということです。チェックリストを確認されたと聞きました。でも、今は基本的に全てのスイッチを元の位置に戻して、そのまま飛行を
Houston, Base Tranquility. Il DSKY è tuo e aggiorna 
वह चीज़ सचमुच वहाँ से बाहर निकलने की कोशिश कर रही ह
وشكراً لكم على إتاحة الفرصة لي للمشاركة في
Чарли, с обложкой не получится взлома
Un po'
それが私がやろう
좋습니다, GDC가 정렬되
Wir befinden uns in der Trägheitsphase, ni
MSC-1 è spento ora. MSC-2 e -3 - Li ho appena spenti. Ora cambierò i registratori biomedi
まあ、最終的には、それは
रॉजर। प्लस 90, जी एंड एन: 63481, माइनस 153, प्लस 132; 004 10 25 38;, माइनस 04761, प्लस 00001, प्लस 53361; रोल
Переключатель функций... Всё ещё много фон
Sai, dovr
Roger
D'accord. Très bien; merci, Joe. Qu'en 
이해되셨
هذا صحيح يا فريد. لقد تم طرح هذا الس
All right, Buzz. It's - flyby is the purpose. SPS/G&N: 62815, plus 097, minus 020 070 54 5944, minus 00028, plus 00023, plus 00069 029 149 312, apogee is NA, plus 00221 00078 001 00034, sextant star 01 2385 227, boresight star is NA NA NA. Latitude is minus 0265, minus 16500, 11899 36228, 144 56 47. In the comments: your set stars are Deneb and Vega, 007 144 068. No ullage. It's a docked burn using the.
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы распознали вашу оптику, она прист
Хорошо. В разделе «Активация» 
Apollo 8, Houston. The voice quality on your tape was just fair-to-middling; we were able to monitor your
Apollo 11, Houston. I nostri consigli sulle attività da svolgere nella prossima ora circa, per qu
Das zeigt die 8-
بعضهم يكاد يطفو
OK. Je suis en mode automatique. Tout fonctionne parfaitement. Le commutateur de manœuvre est sur la position « arrêt ». Tous les sys
15 секунд на выполнение последов
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आपको राज्य के
حسنًا. الخطوة 2: "مُوازن الاقتران، مُطفأ؛ النطاق الميت، الحد الأدنى؛ التحكم في الوضع: ال
इस स्थिति में, ऊपर आसमान की ओर देखने का भ्रम ज़रूर होता है, और अगर क्षितिज न हो, तो बस काला आसमान ही दिखाई देता है। कॉकपिट में रोशनी काफी तेज़ है। एक बार अभ्यस्त हो जाने पर, केबिन लाइट से इसे कम किया जा सकता है। फिलहाल, सूट सर्किट की समस्या के कारण मैं रोशनी कम करने में थोड़ा हिचकिचा रहा हूँ। मैं अपनी उंगलियों की रोशनी का भरपूर इस्तेमाल कर रहा हूँ। ऐसा लगता है कि भविष्य की उड़ानों में, हमारे पास क
نعم بالتأكيد يا باز. نستطيع أن نرى قدميك تبرزان من
Хорошо. Справа от меня поднимаются Пиренейские горы, и мы уже почти над Мессье и Пикерингом. Наша первая точка хорошо видна с нашей высоты. По мере приближения к терминатору мы видим довольно сильный контраст. Вид кажется хорошим, солнце не отражается в глазах; похоже, видимость в этом 
الرقم 21 7.0، 98.50، 154، 207.4، 
Nein, ich habe k
Jim McDivitt. Es ist jetzt etwa T+3 Stunden. Als wir bei SECO die Boosterstufe abkoppelten, hatten wir eine Änderungsrate von etwa einem halben Grad pro Sekunde. Ich habe versucht, sie zu dämpfen und bin schließlich 
ジェミニ4、カーナボンCAP COM。地上では順調ですね。何か必要なことがあれば、い
はい、そうです。最高の制
We want to verify if you're off the long umbilical and 
Ihr MAN ATT, PITCH, zum ACCEL COM
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Non avevo ancora detto nulla. Stiamo cercando di capire come procedere. In riferimento alla tua precedente domanda sulla gestione del ciclo del sonno, concordiamo con il tuo commento. Vorremmo tornare al piano di volo per quanto riguarda i cicli del sonno e così via, prima di entrare in orbita lunare. Vorremmo quindi che tu usassi il tuo giudizio per trovare il modo più efficiente per gestire i cicli del sonno e ripartirli tra di voi. Vorremmo che ci tenessi informati
Cabin pressure, cabin altimeter agree on altitude. Should be 13,000 [feet] now. Mark 10; I see the main is out, and reefed, and it looks good to
ठीक है, 11. बहुत बढ़िया। अब, दस्तावेजी नमूना पात्र के संबंध में: टेलीविजन पर हमें ऐसा प्रतीत हुआ कि उस पात्र के लिए नमूने वास्तव में चट्टानों को ध्यान में रखते हुए चुने जा रहे थे। हम जानना चाहते हैं कि क्या आप इन नमूनों के बारे में, और जिस सामग्री या सतह से इन्हें लिया गया था, उसके संदर्भ में, अप
Neil und Buzz, ich spreche mit Ihnen telefonisch aus dem Oval Office des Weißen Hauses, und dies ist mit Sicherheit das historischste Telefongespräch aller Zeiten. Ich kann Ihnen gar nicht sagen, wie stolz wir alle auf das sind, was Sie für jeden Amerikaner g
Immagino che il mondo giri da
Хорошо. Мы завершили наш маневр. Мы находимся в широкой
팔 회전 제
Ok, Jim. Stiamo ancora raccogliendo le nostre idee, ma alcune considerazioni ci dicono che possiamo effettuare quella correzione probabilmente anche dopo 118 ore, senza penalità significative per il DELTA-V e con un monitoraggio approfondito in seguito per assicurarci di aver fatto la cosa giusta e per prepararti a una correzione tardiva se ne avessimo bisogno, cosa che probabilmente non accadrebbe. Siamo soddisfatti della modalità in cui ti trovi ora e, anche se stiamo elaborando una modalità da utilizzare dopo la correzione di metà rotta, vorremmo che tu la mantenessi per un po' perché le cose stanno andando bene. Stiamo esaminando le condizioni meteo nella zona di atterraggio. Non pensiamo che avremo problemi, ma le stiamo controllando molto attentamente e, se c'è qualche cambiamento che vogliamo apportare, vogliamo inserirlo in questa correzione di metà rotta. E per ragioni come queste, stiamo valutando la possibilità di posticipare la correzione di metà rotta da 104 ore a un periodo compreso tra quell'ora e le 118. Vorremmo sapere cosa ne pensi. Pa
Questa è Friendship Seven in UHF. Mentre sorvolavo l'area di recupero, ho visto una scia, quella che sembrava una lunga scia nell'acqua. Immagino che siano le navi nell
Roger, Bill. Danke
好的。你们有什么吗？休斯顿？我
Vérification des onduleurs. Ils semb
Okay. 
Oh, oka
Oui, c'est exact. Conformément au plan de vol, nous demandons l'horizon lunaire proche. Or, nous constatons que vous
バックグラ
——而我一
Роджер. 1, G&N: 38658, минус 054, плюс 065, TIG 078 02 0345, плюс 29180, плюс 03779, минус 01325; крен NA, тангаж 041. Остальная часть PAD — NA. Заполнение двух двигателей, 19 секунд. 4 PAD, G&N: 38658, минус 054, плюс 065, TIG 084 29 5059, плюс 31373, плюс 03760, минус 00968; 
حسنًا. نحن... لدينا بعض المشاكل في الاتصال الأرضي، ونستقبل إشارتك ضعيفة لكنها واضحة. نحن جاهزو
思っていたよりずっと長くて、しかも下の方から始ま
Aqua
こんにちは、カリフォルニア・コムテック。フレンドシップ
Roger. Fühlt sich
好的。PAD：102 33 04.36，09 50，减去 00021 182 287 000，加上 56919。小于 10：105 12 30.00。大于 10：103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00。无加 12 中止：102 44 27.00，加上 01223，减去所有零，加上 01889 0
B；速度增量，13.5。高度调整；速度增量，59.5。
Well, it's not very restful. This radio feeds through into the other helmet, he 
What you're seeing, Mike, is a - Houston, what yo
Seriously
Acq
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston, wir senden blind. Wenn Sie uns empfangen können, versuchen Sie es bitte über OMNI-Antennen. Versuchen Sie es bitte über OMNI-Antennen, falls Sie uns empfange
ठीक है। और अगर आप इस बार इ
Apollo 11, ici H
是的。那是巴兹的两张星图，他现在正用它们来遮挡右侧
Ricevuto. COMM S-BAND è APERTO, l'interrutt
E naturalmente, quando vi preparate a rientrare, tornate in stato di cautela e allerta, ABILITATE, e
이건 푸시 투 토크 기능을 사용하는 거예요. 1, 2, 3
J'aimerais savoir com
Джо, передай нашим друзьям из Crew Systems, что лунные ботинки отлично подходят в качест
好的。所以我们开启了PRO模式，最终显示闪烁的5018；这里你需要的是自动机动，
Okay. Eintrittspunkt (PAD) ist MIDPAC: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, plus 1102, minus 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28; DL und VL sind
ठीक है। चलो
君は5ス
हाँ। इससे कुछ बढ़ोतर
分かりました。状態ベクトルを送
दक्षिणी गोलार्ध में ब्राजील के दक्षिण-पूर्व में एक प्रतिचक्रवात 
Amicizia Sette, qui Steelhead. Mi pare
... どう読むんですか？ 
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We'd l
阿波罗-哥伦比亚号，这里是休斯顿。你们在LAM 2星图上的坐标是十进制
ちょっと待っ
わかりました、ヴァンス。も
Хорошо
ठीक है। फिर आपके दूसरे टीवी पास के अंत में, या यहाँ से अनुरोध किए जाने पर, हम चाहेंगे कि आप होल्डर से उस लाल फ़िल्टर को हटा दें और थोड़ी देर के लिए उसे उसी स्थिति में रखकर ट्रांसमिट करें, फिर अंतिम 
Envie de réessayer
알겠습니다. 저희가 처리 중입니다. 마지막으로 통화하
13、ヒューストン。X軸オーバーライドを使用します。手動操作になりますが、AUTOモードに
잠시 기다려 
Nous avons relevé 65° sur le manuel de température du carburant. Term
Roger. Nessun cambiamento nella lettur
Роджер.
11日、ヒューストンです。音声アップリンクを別のサイトに変更することを検討し
نعم. نحن نفهم أنه لا يوجد المزيد من الماء في خزان المياه الصالحة للشرب، لكننا
로저가 당신의 약하지만 분명한 목소리를 읽었습니다. 우리는 당신이 땅에서부터 초록색이
روجر. نحن نناقش ذلك، إما فورا
حسنًا. سيكون النجم الأول هو 26، وسنجري مجم
了解。2990。分かり
Хорошо. Джо, мы — OM
Roger. 3: / 45810, minus 053, plus 141, plus 30128, minus 00540, plus 01911. 180 019 001. Kopieren
O
Okay, Jack. On your entry checklist, on page 2-5. Down ther
Gemini 4，请尝试使用 
アポロ8号。フライバイ操作を開始します。/63087、マイナス162、プラス129、プラス009 62、プラス005 68、マイナス020 77 000 000 000、11月のアルファ、プラス0
Индикатор сканера по-прежнему не гаснет. Вот он. Именно из-за него он п
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 버뮤다 캡 
그렇
ठीक है। जेटिसन एटीट्यूड तक पहुंचने के लिए पैंतरेबाज़ी चल रही है और मैं बस पैंतरेबाज़ी पर नज़र रखता हूँ और अगर जिम 
好的。而且我们也
我们认为这是因为你绕过了轴颈检
자동 경광등. 경광등이 현재 켜져 있
は
Roger. If you're free for a minute, I've got some updates to the PAD
Der Kabinendruck liegt konstant bei 5,5. Die Kabinentemperatur beträgt 100 Grad. Die Luftfeuchtigkeit in der Kabine beträgt 25 Prozent. Der Kühlmittelstand beträgt 67 Prozent. Die Umgebungstemperatur im Anzug beträgt 62 Grad. Einlassdruck. Einlasstemperatur,... Der Druck im Anzug beträgt 5,8. Die Dampftemperatur beträgt 57 Grad und sinkt, seit ich sie reduziert habe. Der Sauerstoffgehalt lie
Roger. We have your T/M solid. All systems look good on the ground. I have a map update fo
ठीक है। पैनल 5 पर, सर्किट ब्रेकर पावर 1 और 2 को खोलें। फिर पावर स्विच को रीसेट करके छोड़ दें। पैनल 11 और पैनल 16 पर, ट्रांसलूनर बस टाई करें। दोनों सर्किट ब्रेकर बंद करें। पैनल 16 पर, सर्किट ब्रेकर एसेन्ट ईसीए कंट्रोल को बंद करे
罗杰，看来氧气瓶上的压力开关坏了。你最好把氧
Al centro dello strato di foschia
Gemini 4，这里是休斯顿CAP COM。如果您正在发送信号，我们无法接收
ठीक है। जब आप तैयार हों तो मेरे पास आपके लिए उड़ान य
はい
मैंने हाई-फायर पर किसी को भी, किसी को भी, यह बताने की कोशिश की कि हम वापस संपर्क में आ गए हैं, ल
再说回离我们更近的地方，田纳西州孟菲斯市，一位体重8磅2盎司的小姑娘被她的父母埃迪·李·麦吉夫妇取名为“模块”（Module）。“这不是我的主意，”麦吉太太说，
نعم. ربما لن أفعل ذلك عندما تدخل
OK. On a enfin trouvé la bo
Нет... у нас какое-то вр
Per informazione, Vance, circa mezz'ora fa, credo,
Apollo 11, Houston. Start in 8 M
Wollt ihr, dass wir
はい。パネル5
네, 저도 동감이에요, 잭. 잭 스위거트랑 저는 아까 위층에 올라가서 각각 통을 하나씩 가져왔어요. 재료를 찾다가 그걸 어떻게 활용할지 생각했죠. 사실 마실 물을 다 만들 때도 그 통이 들어있던 플라스틱 용기가 필요해서 그걸 꺼내 썼어요. 거기에 재료도 좀 넣고, 쓰레기 처리용으
...저기 뒤에 있
Roger. À partir 
जैक, तुम अभी परछाई में हो; तुम्हारी खिड़की से थोड़ी रोशनी आ रही है, जो बहुत तेज है, इसलिए हम ठीक से देख नहीं पा रहे हैं - मुझे लगता है 
Okay. 25 minutes
收到。下一个问题，
Columbia, Houston. Ihr müsst keine weitere Messung durchführen, es sei denn, ihr wollt. Pause. Und Columbia, wenn ihr die Gelegenheit dazu habt, 
Антенна выбрана для входа в атмосферу, и она у
Voici le livr
没错，查理。有时
Buzz, we've got - The only thing we're missing here is the drift check. After we finish our load, we'd like you to do the drif
Ich schaue gerade aus dem Fenster. Die Lichter im Ra
Mi stavi leggendo tramite r
Good morning, Frank. Ap
جاهزون لتقرير الساعة
Можно ли перевести ваш переключатель Real Time T/M Swit
Roger. Genau deshalb versuchen wir, das zu überprüfen. Al
Okay. "'Twas the night before Christmas and way out in space, the Apollo 8 crew had just won the moon race; The headsets were hung by the consoles with care, In hopes that Chris Kraft soon would be there; Frank Borman was nestled all snug in his bed, While visions of 's danced in his head; And Jim Lovell, in h
Il fait un peu froid dans la cabine. On a un ventilateur en marche, le chauffage est à fond et la température est légèrement inférieure à 21 °C. Ça pourrait être une piste à expl
버즈, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 통신 상태가 아주 
Die Rücklesung ist korrekt, Frank, und wir möchten darauf hinweisen, dass die
क्या आ
Und Apollo 13, Ho
माइक, यहाँ थोड़ी नमी हो रही है - हमें प्लेबैक मिल रहा है, माइक। यहाँ थोड़ी नमी हो रही है। केबिन से कुछ नमी निकालने के लिए 
حسنًا، توقفنا ومررنا بخيارات المحاذاة الخشنة، ثم المحاذاة الدقيقة، واخترنا زوجًا من سماعات كابيلا، لكنها قادت السيارة ولم تصل إلى أي مكان. لم أختر كابيلا، ولا أستطيع التعرف على أي منها الآن. هل يمكنني إعادة تدويرها هنا والعودة لاختيار زوج
Ja. Wir werden es uns ansehen, C
Хорошо. Мы получаем периодические сигналы за
오늘 아침에 승무원 현황 보고서를 받지 
ह्यूस्टन, 13. हम नकल करने के लिए तैयार ह
Roger
Хорошо, Джим. Я не хотел об этом говорить, потому что мы пока не готовы рекомендовать какую-либо процедуру. Мы не можем включить CM/ согласно стандартному контрольному списку питания, потому что у нас недостаточно ампер. Возможно, нам потребуется, чтобы вы прогревали — проводили предварительный нагрев каждого кольца по отдельности, и мы рассматриваем этот вариант. Другой вариант — мы можем отключить питание на некоторое 
D'accord. Nous en avons discuté, et à 12 heures de l'événement, il semble que tout le monde pense que ce n'est pas nécessaire. Mais à court terme, cela ne semble pas avoir d'incidence
嘿，休
Роджер. Зона 56-ДЕЛЬТА 81.
Esatto, Jack. Bene, è tutto. E credo che saremo quasi pronti per iniziare
Роджер, Майк. Хотел бы прокомментировать 
알겠습니다. 전원을 연결했는데 괜찮아 보였습니다. 그런데 전원 경고등과 모든 위험 신호가 켜져 있고, X 루나 버스 타이 차단기 두 개가 모두 켜져 있습니다. 유틸리티 조명 차단기도 켜져 있고, AC 버스 B 헬륨 PQS 디스플레이, AC 버스 B 숫자 조명, 그리고 AC 버스 B 인버터 1은 버스 타이가 닫힌 상태입니다. 그런 다음 인버터 1 차단기를 닫고, 16번 패널에서 신호 센서 차단기를 선택한 후, 인버터 1을 선택하고 헬륨 모니터 스위치를 슈퍼크릿으로 설정했는데 아무
로저. 역전
Хорошо, 11. Это Хьюстон. Примерно в 22:30 в плане полета, в вашем контрольном списке после сна и во всех других контрольных списках после сна мы хотели бы, чтобы вы удалили утверждение «AUTO JET SELECT, 16 в положение ON». Мы здесь берем это из процедуры выхода, которая есть в вашем контрольном списке. А в контрольном списке на странице Foxtrot 9-8: если вы хотите обратиться к нему, мы хотели бы изменить порядок шагов.
माइक, आप जो देख रहे हैं, वह ह्यूस्टन, पश्चिमी गोलार्ध है। ऊपर की ओर उत्तरी ध्रुव है; केंद्र में - केंद्र से थोड़ा नीचे दक्षिण अमेरिका है - और यह केप हॉर्न तक फैला हुआ है। मुझे बाजा कैलिफोर्निया और संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका का दक्षिण-पश्चिमी भाग दिखाई दे रहा है। उत्तर-पूर्व की ओर बादलों का एक बड़ा और लंबा समूह है, जो मैक्सिको की खाड़ी के बड़े हिस्से को ढके हुए संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के पूर्वी भाग तक फैला हुआ है। ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि पूर्वी तट प
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 중앙 패널의 A 표시기를 보고 있습니다. 패키지 온도는 약 180도이고, 헬륨 압력은 3900입니다. 연료 압력은 약 180이고, 연료 잔량은 약 85% 정도입니다. B 표시기도 거의 비슷하지만, 패키지 압력은 190도입니다. C 쿼드도 패키지 온도는 100도이고, D 쿼드는 패키지 온도가 160도입니다. 다른 모든 표시기는 거의 같습니다
Apollo 11, Houston. J'ai un PAD avec TLI et 1
10초. 5, 4, 3, 2, 
休斯顿，你能提供一些云台角度让我
لا أعرف. لقد صعدت
Rechts
حسناً، يبدو ج
阿波罗8
わかりました。電子機器の電源はオフ、信号コンディショナー/ド
क्या यह आपके कहे हुए श
Roger. Pour information, le laser de l'observatoire McDonald, dans l'ouest du Texas, sera actif à parti
ما فائدته؟ يعني، لا ت
Roger. Ich sehe, du bist immer noch bei
收到。关于速度增量（Delta-V）
Роджер. Понял,
로저. 플러스 25, / 63087, 마이너스 162 플러스 129, 마이너스 00163, 플러스 00001, 플러스 52759 177 137 001, 해당 없음, 플러스 00201 52759 623 52543 14 2347 337 023 위 195 왼쪽 1.7, 플러스 1145, 마이너스 16500 12780 35890. 북쪽 설정 068 09
D'accord. Et je serai prêt à mettre cela en œuvre dès que vous en
...전화드릴게
Sigma Seven。我没
Sie wurden bei der letzten Übertragung nicht verstanden. Bitte wiederholen Sie d
Your MAN ATT
D'accord. Sous « manœuvre définie par l'équipage », les indications clignotantes 0622 correspondent aux angles que nous vous avons communiqués et qui ont été chargés. Les indic
11, Houston. Q
네. 유일한 문제는 그
Ja. Frontplatten geschloss
Хорошо. Что касается коррекции на среднем участке траектории, мы хотели бы отложить её примерно до 25 футов в секунду. Причина задержки заключается в том, чтобы обеспечить лучшее отслеживание благодаря с
बिल्कुल। नहीं तो मुझे डेटा मि
नमस्
نعم، فعلنا ذلك. لم
À 
当时飞机姿态略微倾斜，机头抬得比较高……灯光值（设置）为 13
D'accord. Maintenant, nous sommes à moins 2 plus 30; le disjoncteur INSTRUMENTATION ESSENTIELLE, P
了解しました。ジムが以前、太陽が昇ろう
ドローグを試してみた方がいいかな。高度25[1,000フィート]で手動でドローグを出した。うまく保持されていて、ギリギリだった。
六分儀について少しコメントしたいと思います。狭い宇宙船内での使用は、特にヘルメットをかぶっていると非常に困難です。最終的に、ヘルメットをかぶったまま、要求されている星々の角度を測ろうとするのは無駄だと判断しました。そこでヘルメットを外しました。これにより、六分儀の使用範囲は多少広がりましたが、それでも宇宙船を操作せずに観測できる角度は20～23度程度に限られていました。星々が窓の上部に隠れてしまうのです。宇宙船をより頻繁に、そして自由に操作すれば、窓の長軸が追跡面に入るように操作できます。しかし、燃料の制限があったため、このような操作は選択しませんでした。パルスモードも使用しましたが、操作はあまりしませんでした。この実験で選ばれた星々は、地平線からかなり離れた角度にあるため、観測が非常に困難でした。最終的に、星を地平線にもう少し近づけることにしました。お気づきだと思いますが、カノープスと他のいくつかの星で試しました。青いフィルターは地平線を完全に遮っているように見えました。青いフィルターを使ったときは地平線がなかったからです。月明かりがあるときは、地平線の画像はそれほど良くないかもしれません。しかし、緑のフィルターを使うと、フィルターなしの場合よりも地平線が少しはっきりすると思います。緑と透明のどちらのフィルターを使っても、測定に難しいところはないと思いました。それでも、地平線はあまり明確に定義されていないので、ある程度標準化して、以前行ったのと同じ地平線の部分で測定して、何らかの標準的な測定値を得る必要があります。私にとっては、フィルターなしで大気光の上部を測定する
Laut und deutlich, Apollo 8. H
कार्नरवॉन, क्या आपके पास हमार
Это недвижущийся источник, но он довольно впечатляющий. Из него со всех сторон в
Ça s'améliore. Vous le tenez à environ 13h ou 14h. C'est mieux. Donnez-nous un peu plus 
Roger. C'est l'une de ces rares occasions où Bill a quitté son siège et où je suis maintenant assis à sa place. Pour la première fois, je peux voir la Terre. Je regarde à travers son mon
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 데이터가 아주 좋습니다. 현장에서 모든 데이터를 
Roge
Думаю, это здесь и появит
Мы хотели бы посоветовать вам пить много воды. Мы предполагаем, 
Bonjour, Canav
حسنًا. بعد تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بيومين، لا توجد متطلبات لضبط الطائرة؛ وإذا حدث توقف مفاجئ أثناء تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بيومين، فستكون المناورات اللاحقة في منتصف المسار مطلوبة - حسنًا، ستكون أقرب مناورة هي تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بأربعة أيام. إذا لم تقم بتجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بيومين، ولكننا ما زلنا نرغب في القيام بواحدة - فسيكون ذلك لاحقًا. عند تجاوز نقطة التحكم في المسار بأربعة أيام، ستكون الزيادة في دلتا-في، أو العقوبة، حوالي 24 قدمًا في الثانية، مع هبوط في منتصف المحيط الهادئ. الآن، يجب أن تتوقع 
Okay, Fred. Ich möchte überprüfen, ob Ihr DELTA-VR-Wert 0007,8 betr
네, 그렇습니다. 자세: 롤 0도, 요 2도 우측, 피치 -33도. 모든 수치가 0을 나타내고 있습니다. 현재 작동 중입니다. 시계는 여전히 복귀 시간으로 설정되어 있으며, 역행 시간은 04 + 32 + 28입니다. 버뮤다에서 역행 시간 정보는 정확합니다. 객실 압력은 5.7로 안정적으로 유지되고 있습니다. 객실 온도는 90도입니다. 상대 습도는 30%입니다. 냉매량은 68%입니다. 우주복 내부 온도는 65도입니다. 우주복 압력은 5.8을 나타내고 있습니다. 우주복 증기 온도는 60도입니다. 매우 편안합니다. 하지만 아직 출력을 
जिम, आज शाम को फ्रेड-ओ ने कमांड मॉड्यूल की खिड़की नंबर 1 से कुछ रिसाव होने की सूचना दी। उन्होंने यह भी बताया कि लग
واحرص أيضاً على اقتناء كتاب
Roger. Capisco. Ovviamente non ci hai let
R
Я понял. Я думал, это остров, а оказалось,
मुझे नहीं लगता कि इसमें ऐसा करने के लिए कहा गया है, ल
نعم، جميع مفاتيح الصمامات لا تزال في نفس الوضع يا جوردو. لم أغير أيًا منها. جهاز الإشعال مُفعّل، ونظام الارتداد التلقائي مُعطّل. أنا أستخدم نظام التحكم الإلكتروني، والوضع التلقائي، ونظام الجيروسكوب في الوضع الطبيعي. جميع مقابض "T" في مكانها. لوحة التحكم تعمل بشكل طبيعي باستثناء وضع حقيبة الهبوط الذي هو في وضع الإيقاف. مؤشر الوضعية غير منتظم نوعًا ما، فهو ينح
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। अब जीडीए की स्थिति क
Okay. We don't hav
Ora prendiamolo e lo spogliamo. Iniziamo a mettere.
Ну, мы
わかった、チャーリー。彼は今、正気を保っている。オプ
Jim, we've had 
ヒューストン、私たちは望ましい姿
알겠습니다. 이해
選択 - AFT と言いましたか、それと
The lightning looks like a big blob, rather than a jagged streak we are use to seeing when earthbound. Just looks like a big - almost like a antiaircraft shot. A big blob of bright light, and then it fades out almost instantly. It definitely looks like you are overcast. By th
Apollo 8, Housto
C'est exact. Je l'ai signal
Le
收到。没问题。吉姆，几分钟后我会给你讲一下明天早上的整体时间安排。你最好记一些笔记，虽然目前我
まあ、私たちは今そのモードに入っていると考
今のところ、カメラの付いた銃を持っていなかったら、もっとうまく操縦で
«Аврора Севен», «Аврора Севен», 
Okay, Fred. Recommend you go to OFF on the BIOMED switch. We never did get any BIOMED and it might clear up the
로저. 시간이 되시는 대로, 당신의 위치에서 살펴보시고 정렬 작업을 위
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。在陨石坑背面一个较大的陨石坑里，我注意到外壁上有一个小小的黑点，于是我用单筒望远镜观察了一下。我看到了——哦，大概有四分之一英里直径的区域。那是一个看起来很新鲜的深色坑，这与其他陨石坑壁上那些新鲜的小坑或孔洞形成了鲜明的对比。在这个坑周围似乎有两三个这样的坑——尤其是我注意到的那个。真是
- 언제든
Ремонт вентиляционного клапана и датчика кислорода ECS был очень искусно выполнен, чтобы устранить жалобу Джона на утечку кислорода через накипь. Теперь, конечно, кислород уходит вниз, образуя накипь, и, как всем известно, это создает немало проблем. Проблема по-прежнему зак
Jetzt ist es etwas höh
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。关于您的电视更新，我们建议您在飞行计划时间启动电视，并
Хорошо, Близнец
迈克，请代我向瓦莱丽和孩子们祝
好的，吉姆。飞行计划有更新。你做了星体可见性检查，目前看来，Navi 仍然是我们的目标星体，相关的数值是：横滚 102.6，俯仰 328.9，偏航 346.3。这得出轴和耳轴为零。如果你觉得可以——如果你觉得你能用这个数据做点什么，我们想试一试，看看能不能验证一下，或者如果我们验证了
比尔想请求友善的飞行外科医
마이크, 제
So ist die aktuelle Denkweise. Das kann sich bis morgen noch ändern, aber im Moment sieht es so aus, Jim. Wahrscheinlich wird 
そして
Да, это звучит вполне правдоподобно, Джим. Это примерно то же самое сообщение, которое мы получили от Фреда, но мы не смогли определить, что это может быть, и, вероятно, не сможем, пока не активизируем систему. Если в этом вопросе произойдут какие-либо изменения, мы просто хотим быть в 
حس
로저, 11. 확실히 편향된 것 같습니다. 표시를 시작하기 전에 상당히 높은 임계값이 있는 것 같네요. 하지만 EECOMM은 높은 유량의 경우 임무
로저. 계속 읽고 있습니다. 조금 피곤하네요. 30에서 제 상태는 양호합니다. 연료와 
알겠습니다. 저희도 기동을 시작했어요
Подожди минутку, Фрэнк. Мы заметили, что ты немного пр
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Я переключился на электронное управление, чтобы контролировать самолет точнее. Пр
There's nothing large, anyway, that's going to get in th
Bene. Bruciatura completata. Resi
알겠습니다. -2, /G&N: 63634; +0.96, -0.23,; -0.021.7, -0.001.7, -0.008.0; 0.080, 1.64, 3.26; 해당 없음, 해당 없음; 0.023.2, 연소 시간 0:03.5, 0.018.5; 44, 1.35.9, 2.81; 나머지는 해당 없음. 설정 별 31, 2.3; 롤 정렬 288,
Roger, Gemini 4. Hier s
Roger. Because of the lower load with the rendezvous radar off, we'd like to h
R
Okay. The decision is to keep the platform, power down the c
Roger, Jim. Wir kopieren die Datei, prüfen s
Quello che stavo dicendo è che vogliamo capire cosa sta succedendo con quell'accumulo di pressione nel sistema primario di O2. Vogliamo provare a trovare un modo per controllarlo senza che sia necessario scaricare la pressione in cabina ogni pochi minuti o ogni poche ore, quindi questo è il motivo per cui vogliamo che i
रॉजर, हमें यहाँ नीचे आपकी आवाज़ थ
حسنًا. الخطوة 7. لوحة قاطع الدائرة 11، ناقل التيار المتردد B، شاشة عرض الهيليوم PQGS، مغلقة. الرئيسية - لوحة قاطع ال
Ладно... Здесь всё выглядит довольно непл
Gemelli 4, Canary CAP COM. Non ci scavalc
حسنًا. هذا أفضل بكثير، ونعتقد أ
D'accord. Tu as maintenant 1685 sous les 
S
Игл, это Хьюстон, еде
机舱压力似乎稳定在 4.8 到 5.0 之间，正好在最低值。另外，左侧辅助氧气浓度也很高，看起来
Okay. Number one on the list of things is that the flight plan shows CDR should hit the sack. Number two, kind of a summary of your burn. All your and systems look GO. The trajectory shows that you have a CPA with a mode of 69.67 miles and the time of pericynthion is. You do have a capture on a good free return. It's a little bit early to completely evaluate the trajectory for corridor control. You'll have no update to the plus 11 blo
Je regarde les étoiles. Il fait clair, mais pas encore complètement noir. On dirait que le hublot fait office de filtre, atténuant la luminosité des étoiles de faible magnitude. Je regarde la Grande Ourse, puis Arcturus… et il me semble que je vois principalement des étoiles de
これのこ
Ehi. Gli Astros hanno bat
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. И я продолжу перечитывать отчёт о состоянии двигателей. VGX ноль, VGY ноль, VGZ 1.2, Чарли минус 20.2. Конец связи
Плат
ठीक है। हमें खुशी है कि आपने इसकी सराहना की। फ्रेड, हम यहाँ तरह-तरह की नई प्रक्रियाओं पर काम करने में बहुत आनंद ले रहे हैं। काम चल रहा है, और हमें उम्मीद है कि शनिवार या रविवार तक आपकी प्रवेश प्रक्रियाएँ यहाँ उपलब्ध ह
好的。在“检查”项下，第四行写着“手动姿态，3，最小脉冲”
シグマ・セブン、シグマ・セブン、こちらはHFのウォータータウン・キャップ・コムです。もし私にコピーしているのであれば、ケープ・フライトはUHFに切り替えて中継機との交信を試みるよう要求しています。もう一度言い
Roger, Frank. Dans 3 minutes, nous passons le
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴 관제탑. 옴니
प
Roger, Mike. Fünf vo
哦！我们还有很长的路
Et, Apollo 13, Houston. Nous aimerions modifier la bande S et la configuration d'antenne. Veuillez passer en mode omnidirectionnel Delta. Veuillez passer en mode manuel avec un gain élevé, un angle de tangage de -60 et un an
Rete Honeysuckle, CONFERENZA GOS
Ricevut
...остается сравнительно низким. Мы устанавливаем раз
نحن الآن عند 3+34. ندخل في الظلام. تسطع أشعة الشمس على مقدمة المركبة الفضائية، مع توجيه طرفها الصغير للأمام تقريبًا. في الواقع، نحن على بعد 30 درجة إلى اليسار من الوضع المستقيم، مع توجيه الطرف الصغير للأمام. وبسبب طريقة انعكاس أشعة الشمس على حافة الصا
你准备好迎接你的 2 Bravo 时刻
हाँ, बस... वहाँ बहुत क
Близнецы 4, Близнецы 4, это Хьюстон, CAP 
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आप चाहते हैं कि हम कैमरों का परीक्षण करें? - मैं इसी बारे में सोच रहा था। मैंने इसे उड़ान य
A happy new year? How c
Ok, Jack. Ora abbiamo 
ठीक है। माइक, हुआ ये कि - आप वहाँ बैठकर निगरानी कर रहे थे, और स्टेप 7 पर आप NOUN 01 में गए, और पता टाइप किया, फिर INFORMATION INFORMATION; और उसके ठीक बाद, जब आपने 35400 का आखिरी ENTER दबाया, तो आप वापस 16 पर आ गए। फिर जब आपने ENTER दबाया, तो आप असल में CDU में जानकारी दर्ज कर रहे थे; और जब आपने रजिस्टर 1 और 2 में दो प्रविष्टियाँ दर्ज कीं, तो CDU में तुरंत बदलाव हुआ, और उसने उसे देखा और पाया कि उसके पा
क्या आपको पता है कि वे केंद्र रेखा के बाईं ओर उतरे या दाईं ओर? बस थोड़ा सा 
Je descends à l'horizon maintenant, et on peut nettement distinguer les deux couches
Apollo 11, ici Hou
هذا صحيح. السبب في إيقاف تشغيل النظام يا جاك هو توفير الطاقة. لذا سنقوم بإيقاف تشغيله، وسأعيد تشغيله عند مغ
Похоже, что на вторичной стойке *
आरंभ में, परमेश्वर ने आकाश और पृथ्वी की रचना की। पृथ्वी निराकार और खाली थी, और गहरे जल के ऊपर अंधकार छाया हुआ था। परमेश्वर की आत्मा जल के ऊपर प्रकट हुई, और परमेश्वर ने कहा, "प्रकाश हो।" और प्रकाश हो गया। परमेश्वर ने प्रकाश 
ठीक है। हम आपको पांच-पांच करके सुना रहे हैं। 85 तक आवाज ठीक आ रही है; टेलीमेट्री भी 85 तक ठीक से आ-जा रही ह
もう一度言います、ジェミ
ठीक है। एटीट्यूड पिच 242 होगा; यॉ 020
D'accord. Nous reproduisons la largeur du golfe Persique, et je suppose que la seule donnée que je puisse vous fournir de première main est un seul point de données isolé: le ciel était dégagé ici à Houston ce matin. C'est une observation assez localisée. Suite à votre déversement d'eaux usées, il semble que le mode ait été quelque peu perturbé. Nous constatons actuel
Sigma Seven, Cape Cap Com, sendet Notruf. Ende
Хорошо, начнём с третьего прочте
روجر، نحن بانتظار تهانيكم بمناسبة
And, Fred, on this jerry-rigged command module lithium hydroxide canister, what we're going to do is we're going to have to make at least two up and use two at a time - one on each set of hoses. What we'll do is we'll connect one of these jerry-rigged boxes to the red fittings and air will be sucked through the lithium hydroxide and then blown out the blue fitting. And we're also going to, when we do this, remove the lithium hydroxide canister from the suit loop, either the primary or the secondary, and we're getting the words together to make it easy to b
맞아요, 짐. 태도는 제대로 잡았어요. 그리고 400점에 5점을 더한 다음에 400점에 5점을 
The gist of it was 
Ro
さて、ステップ番号、またはページ 2 で、ステップ 5 を実行し、ステップ 6 の 2 行
下面有树和森林；看起来像是有树和森林之类的。
In Moskau zitierte die Nachrichtenagentur TASS den 
Okay. I'm reading on my monitor here, Fred, that you're 16214 miles away from the Moon moving at about 4500 f
Роджер. Через 180 часов 50 минут мы хотели бы удал
मैं अपने हाथ को 
Повтори
Roger. Conform
吉姆，稍等片刻。我们还需要几分钟才能把那份文件读给你听。我们正在查看应急检查清单，它在第5页。在我们准备把它交
Houston, Wasserma
D'accord. Cela implique simplement des modifications. Regardez la troisième ligne où il est écrit « Vanne de ventilation du tunnel, ventilation du tunnel pendant 30 secondes; » barrez « 30 secondes
ठीक है, फ्रेड। इसे हम अभी रोक रहे हैं जब तक कि सब कुछ तय नहीं हो जाता। हमारे पास आपके साथ करने 
好
好的，Vance
अपना ब्लड प्रेशर रोकने वाला बटन दबाएं, हम अभी भी ब्लड प्
Хьюстон, то, что вы видите сейчас в центре экрана, — это кратер Шуберта, а кратер Гилберта находится в самом центре; это происходит примерно за 12 минут до начала снижения мощности.
Okay, die Umschaltung auf Stromversorgung dauerte 57 Stunden und 11 Minuten. Zur Information: Wir s
روجر، إد. نريد منك استئناف خطة طيرانك المعتادة. نستند في ذلك إلى تقديرنا بأن لديك 205 قدم/ثانية من فرق السرعة (ΔV) 
Хорошо. На четвёртом ряду. Открыть — Слева откройте первые пять — поправка — Закройте первые пять и откройте ВЕНТИЛЯТОР КАБИНЫ 1. Закройте три автоматических выключателя гликолевого насоса; откройте все автоматические выключатели связи, кроме аудиосистемы командира; закройте её. Все выклю
إنهم يعملون ب
我们得重
فريد، حوالي ربع شاشتنا مضاء، ومن المستحيل تحديد ما تنظر إليه 
C'était stupide. On passe en mode commandes de vol électriques à basse vitess
Nur zu, Houston. 
기내 압력은 4
Okay. Es gibt heute Morgen nicht viel Neues in den Nachrichten. Es ist ziemlich ruhig. Die wichtigste Nachricht betrifft wohl die Unfallzahlen – die Todesfälle an den Feiertagen –, was natürlich keine erfreuliche Nachricht ist. Landesweit kamen 233 Menschen ums Leben, neun davon in Houston am Heiligabend und an Weihnachten. In den Weltnachrichten sorgten die Familien erneut für Aufsehen. Nordkorea veröffentlichte diese Woche eine Weihnachtsbotschaft der Apollo-8-Besatzung an Kommandant Lloyd Bucher, Kapitän der USS Pueblo. Die an Kommandant und Frau Bucher im Marinekrankenhaus von San Diego adressierte Nachricht lautete: „Wir haben an Sie gedacht und für Sie gebetet. Ihre Wiedervereini
देखन
查理，唯一
Хорошо, Фред. У нас тут шумная связь; у меня уровень топлива DESCENT 1 66,5; подожди секунд
알겠습니다. 저희
Laut u
제미니 4호, 제미니 4호
Apoll
I don't know when we'll get a ch
عظيم
Вначале работа с системой не позволила нам немедленно начать наблюдения, как мы планировали, поскольку нам предстоял очередной маневр уклонения. Сброс системы вызвал огромное количество псевдозвезд в этой области, что сделало калибровку оптики практически невозможной. Разработанный нами метод, похоже, работал не очень хорошо. В итоге я использовал метод, заключавшийся в том, чтобы спуститься в систему, добраться до Сириуса, нашей самой яркой звезды, взять вал и цапфу, а затем поднять космический аппарат к Сириусу, чтобы использовать их для оптики, что мы и сделали позже. Что касается рассеяния света, то, похоже, почти в любом положении во время пассивного терморегулирования мы получаем рассеяние света в сканирующем телескопе. Оно принимает форму широкой полосы света прямо по центру телескопа, примерно на 10 градусов в каждом направлении от 
好的，水瓶座。我们正在研究下一步的计划。同时，我们需要断开一些高功率设备的供电，所以
Under the nose
زنجبار كاب كوم، فريند
Wenn Sie das Gefühl haben, dass mit dem RCS etwas nicht stimmt, melden Sie sich, un
Хорошо. В последних трех рядах у нас открыты автоматические выключатели FLOOD и TRACK, ряд 2; LOGIC POWER B, открыто; DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE, открыто; SUIT FLOW CONTROL, открыто. В третьем ряду - ряд, DISPLAY, откры
Good morning, Apollo 8; Deke here. I just would like to wish you all a very Merry Christmas on behalf of everyone in the Control Center, and I'm sure everyone around the world. None of us ever expected to have a better Christmas present than this one. Hope you get a good night's sleep from here on
ठीक है। समय यह है - कार्यक्रम इस समय होगा; और हमें निम्नलिखित स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी करनी है: रोल 101.0, पिच 090.0, यॉ पूरी तरह से शून्य। उच्च लाभ कोण पिच -23 और यॉ 93 होंगे। और हमें दरों को कम करने के लिए सामान्य प्रक्रियाओं का उपयोग करना है। दरों को कम करने के बाद और स्पिनअप से पहले, हमें मैगज़ीन G के साथ सेक्स्टेंट पर बहुत उच्च गति वाली ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म लगानी है। फिर, हमें ऑडियो-ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग क
छिहत्तर प्रतिशत
让我看看。在密苏里州斯普林菲尔德，布鲁克林道奇队的老牌捕手米奇·欧文（Mickey 
حسنًا. با
13, Хьюстон. Впере
बहुत बढ़िया
فريندشيب 
……已开放。是
रॉजर, फ्रेंड
쌍둥이자리 4호, 지난번 메시지를 받지 못했습니다. 다시 말씀드리지만, 기회의 별
Roger. Das wird deine Schlafkonfiguration se
P22 的所有操作似乎都很顺利。唯一有点奇怪的是
I ran back there to take a look and see what I could see in the - in the scanning telescope. It looks pretty grim back there right now. It mig
रॉजर। अभी थोड़ा अंधेरा हो गया है, 11. शायद एफ-स्ट
Che furbo. - Il retro dell'ufficio meteorologico è finalmente uscito. Il primo scatto non vale la pena di essere usato, quindi lo cambierò. - Okay. Abbiamo tirato fuori il cursore. Filtro
Ziehen Sie nicht daran. Geben Sie mir zuerst den – wir kommen gleich darauf zurück. Di
Ich glaube, wir haben festgestellt, dass es ziemlich einfach ist, *** das ist Ihnen allen
네, 
13, Х
Ci sono la Croce del Sud e Alpha e Beta C
了解、グアイマス、はっきりと。操縦モードはフライ・バイ・ワイヤになりました。ジャイロはケージド、操縦はオフです。すぐに自動モードに移行します。私の状態は良好です。カプセルの状態も良好です。燃料は69～69パーセント、酸素は88
नहीं, मेरे पास वे हैं। वे मुझे एक
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 연결이 너무 끊기네요. 다시 말씀해 주시겠어요? 이상
Это Sigma Seven.
Du côté du sport, voici quelques nouvelles. Pendant que vous étiez occupé l'autre jour, Joe Namath et le commissaire de la NFL, Pete Rozelle, ont annoncé que « Broadway Joe » avait accepté de vendre ses parts dans le restaurant Bachelors III et de rejoindre les Jets de New York. Joe est arrivé aujourd'hui au 
حسنًا يا جاك. التالي عند -4 + 30. نريد التحقق
और, एक्वेरियस, आपको इस दिशा में सोचने के लिए प्रेरित करने के लिए, हमने
好的，我假设在你列出的所有数字中，我们得到了一个 STATE VECTO
Perth and Rocki
아니요. 그럴 수가 없었어요. 연료
La pression en
Понял. Понимаю,
Okay. Frank, our pro
收到。明白了。所有系统正常。温度我
要不打几个哈
Ok, Fred. Ho copiato 2,5 ampere. Ripeti
会
روجر. تقرير متواص
알겠습니다. DELTA-H 업데이트는 다음과 같습니다., 1354를 입력하고, 0을 모두 입력한 다음, 214 50을 입력하고 다시 입력하세요. 이 두
Eve
Je pense que vous êtes au courant de tout ce qui se passe d'excitant chez vous, et ici, c'est le calme pl
내 선풍기 1 **
Скажу вам честно, нам придётся н
Soweit ich weiß, haben 
ممتاز. بقي لدينا و
Non posso dire molto sulla visibilità qui senza la visiera alzata. È buio. Sembra che ci sia una *** superficie di *
Доброе утро, «Аполлон-8»! Это Дик. От имени всех сотрудников Центра управления, и я уверен, что и от всего мира, я хотел бы пожелать вам всем очень счастливого Рождества. Никто из нас не ожидал получить лучшего рождественского подарка, чем этот. Наде
Houston. Apollo. How do yo
알겠습니다. 다른 의견 
是的。他们终于给了我一扇可以向外看
Roger. Adapterbatte
Okay. Stromkreis 6. Okay. Stromkreis 6 bezieht sich auf Verteilerkasten 11. Sie sollten sich an die Tabelle halten, mit Ausnahme der von mir genannten Schutzschalter. Die erste Zeile ist in Ordnung. Oder sagen wir, die erste Reihe. Zweite Reihe: QUAD 4, TCA, geschlossen; QUAD 3, TCA, geschlossen; QUAD 2, TCA, geschlossen; und QUAD 1, TCA, geschlossen. Der Rest dieser Reihe ist in Ordnung. Reihe 3, etwa in der Mitte: ATCA (PGNS), geschlossen. Okay. Der Rest dieser Reihe ist in Ordnung. Vierte Zeile: HEIZUNG – Standby. Okay. Diese Reihe ist komplett in Ordnung, mit 
Bon, on y travaille encore. Je ne suis pas sûr que tout soit perdu. Il semble que notre problème vienne du fait que l'intensité lumineuse captée par notre posemètre mesure un champ moyen beaucoup plus grand que la Terre. Du coup, il détecte une grande partie de l'environnement sombre de l'espace profond, et on soupçonne que cela ouvre l'objectif au maximum. Ensuite, quand on pointe la caméra vers la Terre, celle-ci n'occupe qu'environ 3 degrés d'angle de cône, alors que l'objectif en capte 9. On dirait donc que le tube est saturé. On
+ 44، / 62970، - 162، + 129، + 00197، + أصفار، + 60701 180 133 001، + 00203، + 60701 704 60451 12 1375 349؛ الأرض، لأسفل 037، لليمين 2.2، + 1068، - 165 12856 36118؛ سيريوس وريجل. مر
Ciao Houston, siamo chiar
로저. 여기 모
Das ist r
Роджер. А здесь, внизу, T/M сообщает, что во время прохождения Тихого океана сработал автоматический выключатель цепи нагревателя кислорода и водорода топливного элемента, и мы хотели бы уз
わかりました。3行目のCOMMの下のDISPLAY（ディスプレイ）は開、SE AUDIO（SEオーディオ）は閉、VHF A TRANSMITTER（VHF Aトランスミッター）は開（これは変更点です）、VHF B RECEIVER（VHF Bレシーバー）は開、PRIMARY S-BAND（プライマリSバンド）POWER AMPLIFIER（パワーアンプ）は開、TRANSMITTER/RECEIVER
Okay, thank you. And in reference to your question about the, 8750, that's the nu
好的。中西部一些货运线路
太好了。
Roger. La vanne du compartiment des déchets est en position VENTilation depuis... oh, je dirai
わかった。私がどう思っているか、分かるよね？喜んでやる
시그마 세븐, 커뮤니케이션 테크, 하와
ジェミニVI、ヒューストン。テープレコーダーの電源回路ブレー
你肯
سنقوم بحذف المرحلة الثالثة من الدورة، وقد رفعنا موعد الدخول إلى الساعة 55. لذا سنتبع جميع الإجراءات التي تسب
你看，在这里我们根本不知道哪里是“上”。上下颠倒都一样。
माइक, हमें समय-समय पर बताते रहना कि वहां तुम्हारा हाल कैसा चल र
Хорошо. Наведи
I understand the technique, Jack. We're burning to g
Apollo 11, Houston. D'après nos observations depuis le milieu de la trajectoire, nous affichons un gamma de -6,57. Ce chiffre est préliminaire, et nous pensons qu'après quelques suivis supplémentaires, la trajectoire devrait se stabiliser et nous pourrons l'ajuster précisément dans le couloir d'atterrissage. Nous sommes quasiment au centre du couloir; tout semble bien se passer. Nous vous enverrons un plan d'entrée dans quelques heures, avant que vous n'alliez vous coucher. Et de la part de nos amis des affaires publiques, voici quelques informations, outre votre vol. Vous êtes toujours au centre de l'actualité. Cependant, il y a d'autres choses intéressantes pour vous. Comme je l'ai mentionné précédemment, le match des étoiles a été annulé en raison de la pluie. Il aura lieu demain. Cependant, le président Nixon ne pourra pas y assister comme prévu. Nous vous tiendrons informés des résultats. De plus, la météo sera clémente. Nos prévisions indiquent qu'elle se maintient pour la zone de récupération; il devrait faire très beau. Alors qu'il s'apprêtait à s'envoler pour vous accueillir à votre retour, le président Nixon a prédit que d'ici 31 ans, l'humanité aurait visité au moins une autre planète abritant une forme de vie. « En l'an 2000, nous, sur Terre, aurons visité de nouveaux mondes où existera une forme de vie », a-t-il déclaré à 2 000 étudiants étrangers en échange universitaire à la Maison-Blanche. Avant son départ pour ce voyage d'une semaine, le p
روجر. افهم أن المقاس 87 × 140 يتطلب تعديلًا خارج
Bonjour Eagle. Ici Houston. Nous avons des interférences lors de la réception sur l
روجر، جيم. خطرت لنا فكرة؛ وهي أنه من الأفضل إخراج عبوات هيدروكسيد الليثيوم من وحدة القيادة في أقرب وقت ممكن للت
もし人々に目標エリアの周囲にあの旗の一つを広げさせれば、私たちはそれを破壊して、楽々と突破しよ
Роджер. Для предстоящего забега используйте время прохождения средней траектории 7. И ещё одно небольшое замечание: тр
Ok. Abbiamo provato entrambe le cose. Se l'interruttore è inserito quando resetto il dispositivo, metto il dispositivo in
Roger, Frank, in questo momento state brucia
मतलब, मतलब, कुल मिलाकर, ईंधन की खपत मेरी उम्मीद से कहीं ज़्यादा होगी, है ना? मुझे लगा था कि मैं सिम्युलेटर के बराबर ही कर लूँगा... और म
أوه، ها هو الشعار المضاد! تقدم يا جيم. اخفض مقدمة السيارة. يجب أ
ページの真ん中、9行目の「Activate VHF for COMM checks（VHFを有効化して通信チェックを行う）」と10行目の「Verify the（検証する）」を削除します。VHFの有効化と同
再
그리고 - 토크백에서, 지금 헬륨 1은 모두 회색입니다.
Schalten Sie es für eine Weile wieder in den 
Хорошо. И последн
Li metterò in f
По
Roger, Frank. Persei Zeta si trova esatta
Род
حسنًا. العنوان الرئيسي هو "الدخول، التحضير لوحدة الهبوط القمرية، قبل 6 ساعات". أولًا، تشغيل التغذية العادية للبطارية 5؛ ثانيًا، استخدام قائمة التحقق المعدلة للتفعيل لمدة 30 دقيقة. بعد ذلك، يكون الوقت قبل 5 ساعات، أو 7 ساعات إذا لزم الأمر. الآن، لدينا إجراء ما قبل الدخو
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। टेलीविजन दर्शकों के लिए बता दें कि हमने
夏威夷
أنا أمزح فقط؛ ماذا تحتاج - وقت AOS؟ سيكون وقت AOS - حسنًا، دعنا نر
इसे बताने का यह एक 
Roger. Hawaii Cap Com, ici Sigma Seven. Comment recevez-vous 
Хорошо. Управление орие
D'accord, je vois Mercure traverser la lueur atmosphérique. On verra si elle reste visible. Quand j'ai dit « Je vois », c'était le début. Remarquez le premier changement de couleur, qui est maintenant bleu clair. Et elle est encore visib
ठीक है। वैसे, हम नहीं चाहत
罗杰。友谊七号。燃料为 60 45 [百分比]，氧气为 60 
D'accord. Vérifiez que l'alimentation secteur est bien branchée, c'est-à-dire que l'onduleur 2 est sélectionné et que le bus AC A est fermé. Dans le menu « Affichages de vol », activez GASTA et « Comm
ロジャー、ジャックは、これらがすべて 1 つの回路ブレーカーであり、次のものは LIGHTING: NUMERICS/INTEGRAL、AC2、LMDC-AC1、および RMDC-AC1 が閉じられており、こ
Ricevuto. Il range a 20 - al nostro GET di 21,50,00 più 22,24. Il range 22 più 00 più
好的。他正在查看你之前提供的电池电
حسناً. حسناً. نحن ننق
वाह, यह तो बहुत ही सुंदर है। धन्यव
스포츠 소식입니다. 휴스턴 오일러스는 커빌에서 진행 중인 프리시즌 훈련에서 열정적인 모습을 보여주고 있으며, 월리 렘 감독은 훌륭한 신인 선수단에 깊은 인상을 받았다고 전했습니다. 어제(목요일) 내셔널 리그 경기 결과는 다음과 같습니다. 세인트루이스 11, 필라델피아 3
D'accord. Je voulais simplement vous en informer et vous inciter à réfléchir à ses implications sur le plan de vol. Je vous présenterai ensuite une vue d'ensemble et commenterai la Lune afin de déterminer les sections les plus appropriées. Frank souhaitait que nous vérifiions l'ordre d'apparition des profils d'entrée. Le premier profil affiché est intitulé « Non-sortie n° 2 » et correspond à l'entrée rapide à courte portée. Le deuxième profil, intitulé « 3 500 mill
روجر. علينا إعادة تركيب جهاز ACME. يجب أن نخرج باستخدا
Je ne sais pas pourquoi j'ai perdu mon... Je suis 
Roger. Die Zeitschrift, die wir morgen für den Eintrag verwenden werden, ist die Zeitschrift 
सूर्यास्त का नज़ारा काफ़ी मनमोहक है, मुझे नहीं लगता कि मुझे इसे देखने में ज़्यादा समय बर्बाद करने की ज़रूरत है। यह बहुत दिलचस्प है। दूसरी बात, यह देखना भी दिलचस्प है कि जब आँखें इसके अनुकूल नहीं होतीं तो यह कितना काला दिखता है। मुझे खिड़की पर कुछ परत साफ़ दिखाई दे रही है। इस समय मैं UHF-hi में VOX पर वापस जा रहा हूँ ताकि ट्रांसमिट कर सकूँ। दाहिने माइक्रोफ़ोन को पोंछने के लिए विज़र खोल रहा हूँ। मैंने इसे चाट लिया था। विज़र बंद कर रहा हूँ। सूट सर्किट को काम करने के लिए विज़र को तुरंत सील कर दिया गया। मैं इसे दोबारा गंदा नहीं करना चाहता। सूट का इनलेट लगभग 68 डिग्री पर बहुत अच्छे से स्थिर है। इसलिए डोम को फिर से ऊपर उठाना पड़ेगा। यह अभी 76, 75 पर है। ज़ाहिर है, यही ऊँची सेटिंग हमें चाहिए
Okay, real fine. Everybody wanted to ask if you wouldn't try and get some sack time here before we go i
Sì, è quello che imma
わかりました、ジャック。先ほど教えたバッテリー充電手順に戻ってください。充電を終了するには、先ほど教えた回路スイッチの横に「Open」または「Off」と書いてください。パネル250の回路ブレーカーは既に開いています。パネル275のINVERTER POWER-2 MAIN
Apollo 8, 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 이 데이터를 기록하기 위해 고
D'accord. Je pensais que c'éta
そして、今はセカンダリー、つまり 2 番目のポンプを使っています。ここで 2 秒ほど押し
Roger. Okay. The other thing is the post-landing. We still - just to reaffirm - you would like no more than 
Okay. Als Erstes wollen wir die Batterie laden, damit wir dort Strom haben. Die entsprechenden Prozeduren sind bereits vorbereitet. Was den Wiedereintritt angeht, planen wir unseren letzten Kursanstieg 5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt in die Atmosphäre – falls wir überhaupt einen durchführen müssen. Das Servicemodul möchten wir dann etwa 4,5 Stunden vor dem Eintritt abtrennen und die nächsten 3 bis 3,5 Stunden für Fotos, die Inbetriebnahme des Kommandomoduls (G&N), die Verstauung der Ausrüstung und sonstige Kleinigkeiten nutzen. Das Servicemodul würden wir bis 1 Stunde vor dem Eintritt behalten und dann abtrennen. Diese Prozeduren werden morgen früh in CMS und LMS integriert ausgeführt, und hoffentlich können wir sie später am Tag mit der Missionskontrolle wiederholen. Eine Frage ist, was wir mit dem Servicemodul machen. Man geht davon aus, dass im Kommandomodul ausreichend Sauerstoff vorhanden ist und dass die anderen Komponenten eine Hochdruckquelle und ein Stauproblem darstellen. Daher wird erwogen, sie dort zu belassen. Außerdem halten wir es für sinnvoll, den Wiedereintritt mit Raumanzug durchzuführen und sich vor dem Abtrennen des Raumschiffs anzulegen. Denn wenn wir die anderen Komponenten abtrennen, werden wir es wie bei Apollo 10 handhaben – wir lassen sie einfach los. Ohne Raumanzug wären wir da
Хорошо, Фред. Цель маневра — PC + 2, на этот раз мы переходим к MPL. И 079, 27, 4013, плюс 08144, минус 00443, минус 02226, апогей N/A, перигей плюс 00205, 08455, 420, 268, 261, плюс 08155, минус 00443, минус 02187, N/A. Ваш GDA должен быть в 
우리가 공격할 때, 저는 대기하고 있을 겁
Gemini 4, Houston. Wie lesen Sie 
ねえ、チャーリー、もっと写真を
Très bien. L'étape suivante consiste à initialiser le syst
こ
了解。燃焼時間は2+40です。GMTRCは16 56 01で
Roger. On te donne le départ pour un score de 21-4, et on 
こちらはムチェアで
カプセルは現時点では、チンパンジー設定になっています。かなりマニュ
好的。我们会购买您那里的电池，我们想先进
Хорошо. И ещё, Джек, поскольку у нас четыре струи в режиме заполне
ठीक है। टीवी उद्योग को करीब से देखने वाले कुछ लोगों के मन में फ़िल्टरों के इस्तेमाल को लेकर 
...조리개는 대략 f:4 정도인데, 이 정도면 충분히 밝을 거라고 생각했어요. 하지만 좀
罗杰。在74:30，请您将所有四个低温储罐的风扇循环运转，并将所有四个低温储罐的加热器设置为自动模式。我们提前这样做是为了确
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, ici Houston, Houst
हाँ, बिल्कुल
Bene. La prima domanda extra è, e lasciatemi rispondere alla domanda originale, perché questa domanda dice: "Più specificamente sul punto 2", e il punto 2 dice: "Ci sono stati cambiamenti significativi nel livello di vibrazione del rumore durante il singolo stadio del volo a motore?". Nello specifico, descrivi le tue osservazioni durante lo spegnimento iniziale del motore centrale dell'S-II e, circa 90 secondi prima del cut-off, hai segnalato una forte vibrazione nel. Vorremmo che descrivessi l'accumulo di questa 
Amitié Sept,
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। दिक्कत ये है कि सूर्य पांचवें नंबर पर है, जो बंद वाला है। और ऐसा ल
休斯顿，Gemini 4。湿度读数为干球湿度 79，湿球湿度 62
육분의에 대해 조금 말씀드리겠습니다. 좁은 우주선 안에서 육분의를 사용하는 것은 매우 어렵습니다. 특히 헬멧을 쓴 상태에서는 더욱 그렇습니다. 헬멧을 쓴 채로는 요구되는 별의 각도를 맞추는 것이 불가능하다고 판단하여 결국 헬멧을 벗었습니다. 헬멧을 벗으니 사용에 조금 더 유연성이 생겼지만, 우주선을 조종하지 않고는 여전히 20~23° 정도의 각도로만 측정할 수 있었습니다. 그렇게 하면 창문 윗부분에 별이 
Sugges
Roger, Fred. We had an for a minute and we lost our TV picture. It
И вот, Игл. Я прочитал адреса 404, 405 и 406, и я полагал, что 405 и 406 будут сплошными нулями, и я бы предложил, возможно, обнулить их. Я понимаю, 
알겠습니다. 저희 계획에 대해 간략히 설명드리겠습니다. 현재 저희는 물이 매우 부족한 상황입니다. 따라서 가능한 한 물을 적게 사용하고 싶습니다. 이를 위해 61시간 후, 즉 37분 후에 초속 16피트의 속도로 자유 귀환 기동을 할 계획입니다. 그런 다음 엔진 출력을 낮추고, 79시간 후에 남은 연료를 사용하기 위한 또 다른 비상 탈출 기동을 할 것입니다. 하지만 가능한 한 빨리 엔진 출력을 낮추고 싶습니다. 이는 중간 지점 이후에 이루어질 것입니다. 37분 안에 초속 16피트의 속도로 연료를 연소하는 것에 
チャーリー、その件についてですが、私たちはここで20分間、スラスターの活動が落ち着くのを待っています
로저, 11. 중간 항로 수정의 크기는 참고용으로만 알려드린 것이며, 중간 항로 4는 초당 약
よし
Okay. Und
Okay. We want
좋습니다. 이번에는 두 명 모두 
水瓶座，休斯顿。我们收到了您部分传输的信息。我们了解到信号已经严重受损，您想知道该如何处理。是这
Okay. in about a minute or a minute and a half; in entry attitude, we'd like OMNI Charl
Acquario, Houston. Afferma
ह्यूस्टन, अब हम आपको टेलीफोटो लेंस के माध्यम
하와이 통신기술대학교, 하와이 캡콤, 여기는 시그마 세븐입니
Хорошо, мне нужно кое-что уточнить, а потом мы оставим вас на некоторое время. Во-первых, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы подтвердили, что ваш экспонометр им
Okay, Jack. Der nächste 
Bien. Lorsque vous sortirez votre manuel de manœuvres, la dernière manœuvre que nous vous avons indiquée pour le survol reste valable. Nous tenons simplement à préciser que l'angle d'entrée, le gamma, est légèrement plus prononcé que ce que nous considérons comme idéal, mais il reste dans les limites de notre capacité de prédiction a
Роджер. Мы видели, как вы появились на горизонте, и, похоже, у вас работал лазер. Могли бы в
E, Joe, Jack mi ha appena passato alcune temperature degli iniettori, se
وأنا كذلك يا رون. شكراً لك
Roger, Gemini VI. Tu recevras les dernières nouvelles de 
Base Tranquility, ici Houston. Nos données télémétriques indiquent que le disjoncteur du bras moteur est actuellement OUVERT. Veuillez le laisser ouvert jusqu'à l'heure prévue de son insertion, qu
좋아
はい、3つ目の星だと思います。チェックリストのどこかに書いてある
الهدوء، هذه هي هيوستن. نعم، بالفعل. لقد كان ع
好的。请给我大约 10 秒钟时间，
ठीक है। अब हम 0.3 पाउंड प्रति घंटे की स्
Okay, während ich die Klebearbeiten durchführe, werde ich das entsprechende Anzug-Durc
こんにちは、ヒューストン。水瓶
D'accord. Vas-y. Il
Friendship Seven, qui è Cape Com Tech, Cape Com Tech. Mi s
Ich sehe da draußen einen hellen Stern, das muss die Venus sein. Ich habe leider vergessen, mir John Mayers „Blick aus dem Fenster“ so gut einzuprägen, dass ich mit Sicherheit sagen kann, ob es die Venus ist oder nicht, aber sie ist auf jeden Fall he
Negat
Роджер. Напоминаем, что вы должны оставить выключатели цепи радара 
Gémeaux 4, Canari CA
150 - Sie sollten nicht zu viele davo
هذا ما كان لدينا تقريبًا في ز
Хорошо. Удалим "начал
С так
好的。在326号面板上，我们需要关闭减压阀、氧气供应阀和缓冲罐
रॉजर।
उस उपकरण के साथ वहां तस्वीरें लेना मुश्किल था,... फिर भी ठीक था। हमने वहां कुछ तस्वीरें लेने की कोशिश क
إذ
알겠습
好的，乔。一切顺利。我们正按计划稳步推进。我
حسنًا. نقط
Фред, с этим самодельным контейнером для гидроксида лития в командном модуле нам придётся сделать как минимум два и использовать по два за раз — по одному на каждый комплект шлангов. Мы подключим один из этих самодельных блоков к красным фитингам, воздух будет всасываться через гидроксид лития, а затем выдуваться через синий фитинг
Okay, Fred-o. Dies ist Manöverpad-Monitor-PC plus 2 Stunden; alles N/A 
杰克，你知道吗，我第一次来这里的时候就注意到一件事，就是从指令舱里直立行走到进入水瓶座舱，方向会略有变化，虽然我在水箱里经历过一次，但仍然感觉很不寻常。现在
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。没反应。马德里站的一台指令计算机出了故障。我们不得不暂时切换到阿森松站。现在我们已经恢复通过马德里站远程控制，计算机也恢复了，我们已准备好恢复对你们OMNI系统的控
Sag Chris, dass mir das Herumexperimentieren langweilig wurde und ich ihm einfach seine automatische Rückwärtsfahrt verpasst habe. Eigentlich meine automatische Wiedereintrittshaltung. E
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. لا. تعطل جها
Ok. Qu
밴스, 내가 먼저
... 저는 그걸 몰랐네요. 그건 당신이 뭉툭한 끝부분에 부딪힐 확률이 50%를 
네, 저희가 드릴 말씀은 없습니다. 저희가 걱정하는 건 혹시라도 누군가를 깨우실까 봐
Affermativo. Aggiungilo in cima alla pagina. Quello che stiamo facendo in realtà... mettiamolo subito prima di "Attivazione". L'altra... l'altra procedura in cima alla pagina appartiene 
كما
Под нашим домом висит табличка с надписью "Мен
Хорошо. Ладно, Билл, я буду связываться с тобой примерно каждые 30 минут, просто чтобы убедиться, что мы по-прежнему можем 
Aq
알겠습니다. 방송국 인수인계
約45分の静かな休憩の後、ちょっと様子を見に伺います。ところで、高利得アンテナについてですが、ヨー角90度、ピッチ角マイナス45度の時にOMNIから高利得アンテナに切り替えることで、もう少し
Roger. Here is the format which we'll send up to you for a rolling reentry. We'll give you the ∆V and ∆T for your OAMS burn. We'll give you the GMTRC. We'll give you a RET of.05g. And then you will also get the RET of drogue, of main, and of landing. Your procedure will be at retro to go to full lift, heads down. At the RET of.05g you will go into a 15° roll rate. When you reach 100,000, when the altimeter comes off the peg, go to full lift. How does that sound to you, 
Und 
Боль
ठीक है। मैं इसे हाई गे
C'est pour le roulis et le tan
زائد 00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013 أعلى 048 يمين 37، زائد 1418، ناقص 
Canton Com Tech, qui Sigma Seven. Ti sento forte e 
해치와 모든 난간이 보이네요. 지휘 모듈의 은빛
سنحتاج إلى قراءة البيانات في أقرب وقت ممكن قبل التخزين النهائي. ولا توجد لدينا أي بيانا
Хорошо, Фред. Поймите, что в мешок с канистрой подключен только красный шланг от LMP. В таком случае, мы просим вас выполнить следующую процедуру для вставки другого красного шланга в другой мешок с канистрой: вырежьте диагональное отверстие в одном углу мешка. Посмотрите на другой мешок и сравните, как это сделано. Вставьте шланг примерно на 15 сантиметров. Постарайтесь опустить выходное отверстие вниз, если это возможно, или же расположить его боком, а затем
Подождите 1, Водолей, Одиссея. Мы просим вас перейти на ПРЯМОЕ соединение и отложить все свои нынешние планы до тех пор, пока система не включится. Вперед, 
Forse tirerei fuori quel pezzo
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, ici Houston. Nous vous recevons un son clair (3/5).
P
13
حسنًا. بالنسبة لتحديث PLA وCLA الخاص بك، المنطقة 40-3، هذا حرق مجزأ. 56 للأمام، 120 للخلف. 1+34. 2+30. 05 38 10. 2+56. 8+52. ا
रॉजर, राहत क्षेत्र में मौसम की जानकारी इस प्रकार है: 0.5 बादल छाए हुए हैं, दृश्यता 10 मील है, हवा की गति 3 नॉट है और यह उत्तर दिशा से 360 डिग्री की दिशा में चल रही है। समुद्र में लहरें 3 फीट ऊंची हैं और बहुत शांत हैं। बैरोमी
Ciao Bill, puoi dirci quali angoli ha attraversato? La curva che abbiamo tracciato è apparentemente il limite RF piuttosto che il limite meccanico; e parlando della funzione della modalità AUTO REACQ, sembra che dovrebbe spostarsi quando raggiunge il limite RF, che è il tuo set di numeri ENTER, anziché il limite di avviso di scansione. E se è entrato in quel numero, potresti dirci a 
Okay. Non dirglielo. Non lasciare che si taglino le mani su qualcosa qui: fallo con nonchal
Nous a
OK. Je suis de ret
好的，11. 事实证明，到目前为止，本次任务中两次点火的发动机性能与发动机验收测试时的性能相同。机载电脑的读数是由于您实际燃烧室内的压力与仪表读数之间存在已知的校准系数造成的。我们预计单缸运行压力为90 psi，即仪表读数为90 psi，实际燃烧室压力为95 p
جيميني 4، نبث في وضع عدم الرؤية. لقد عدنا. تم إعا
Das klingt nach einem tollen Sport, ich verstehe, warum er dir und Scott gefällt. Ich zeige euch gerade etwas. Ich schaue auf die Vereinigten Staaten und beginne, mich mit dieser Driftgeschwindigkeit leicht nach oben zu neigen. Und ich sehe den Mond, den, da bin ich mir sicher, niemand i
Копия, 
Potresti 
Roger. Êtes-vous s
通常の睡眠サイクルに戻ろうとしているところですが、少し前に目が覚めたばかりなので
الآن أصبح صوتك واضحًا، ولننتقل إلى اللوحة رقم 5. نريد إيقاف تشغيل مضخة خلية الوقود AC 1؛ وإيقاف تشغيل AC 2؛ وهذا يعني إيقاف تشغيل مضخة خلية الوقود 1 AC 1؛ وإيقاف تشغيل مضخات خلية الوقود 2 AC 2؛ وإيقاف تشغيل مضخات خلية الوقود B AC 2؛ وإيقا
私も同じよう
手动展开LR立方拨片时，需
Cape Cap Com, avanti. Cape Cap Com, qui Sigma Seven. Ti sento forte
Go ahead, Apollo
रॉजर। मैं इस समय ऑटो मोड में हूँ; पुनः प्रवेश की स्थिति में हूँ; जायरो सामान्य हैं; पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है; सभी सिस्टम ठीक हैं। ऑटो मोड में ईंधन 89 प्रतिशत है, मैनुअल म
11号，休斯顿。你们地面情况
ठीक है। समझ गया। मध्यमार्ग पर दर्शनशास्त्र के अनुसार, इसे एसएचई टैंक को खाली करने से पहले किया जाना है, जिसका अर्थ है कि हम इसे लगभग 105 घंटे बाद करेंगे, या शायद, और इसलिए यदि अंतरिक्ष यान में कोई गड़बड़ी होती है तो मेरे पास उस
حسنًا. يبدو أن الصوت العادي غير قابل للاختراق. في خزانات التبريد، لاحظنا تفاوتًا كبيرًا في توزيع الأكسجين، خاصةً، وهذا واضح أثناء دورات المروحة، لذا سنحرص على تقليب الأكسجين قبل التشغيل. يعمل النظام بسلاسة تامة. تشير بيانات التحكم والتوجيه إلى أن الكميات جيدة. أنت تستخدم نفس الكمية المتوقعة لـ و لمحاذاتك. سنخبرك أنه يمكنك استخدا
TON
Okay. We've already thought about it. We
Игл, Хьюстон. Вы бы выбрали S-диапазон голосовой связи для VO
11، هيوستن. لدينا 
Das ist rich
روجر، فهمت أنك لم تقم بنسخنا أثناء أدائنا ل
Okay. Più
هيوستن، الجوزاء 4. لا أتلقى رسالة السا
Okay, Fred-o. Reading you 5-by. The procedure I'm going to read up to you is a Sun check for the - to see if we're going to need an alinement or not. If you'll get out your G&N dictionary and o
了解しました。燃焼時間は予定通り、約2秒でした。残差は4.4Xです。0.2まで燃焼させました。姿勢は公称値です。残差を取り除く前のCはマイナス2.4でした。状態ベクトルを
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호 휴스턴입니다. 편향 
Houston, Apollo 11. Ich möchte auf S-Band OMNI C umschalten. Habe ich gerade vor einer Minute getan und einen Verlust der Signalstär
Давай! Ложись спать! Слушай, через час ты проснёшься. У тебя будет 5 или 6 часов, чтобы посидеть и поиграть с камерой. А теперь отложи её и ложись
Я дам Джеку гарнитуру на некоторое время, и он пере
ठीक है, जिम। हमें कुछ म
حسنًا يا جو. لقد أنشأتُ صفحةً جديدةً هنا باسم -1A، البند 6، التحويل إلى الطاقة، والت
Хорошо. Запускае
1時
D'accord. Je vais bientôt commencer à détailler un peu plus car nous sommes à 15 000 km. Nous sommes en dess
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Un'osservazione sul funzionamento del sistema di controllo: sembra che ogni volta che passo in modalità manuale o fly-by-wire e manovro per un periodo di tempo prolungato, in qualche modo induciamo errori considerevoli nel sistema giroscopico. Mi capita di assumere ogni tipo di assetto. Quella volta, ad esempio, quando ho imbardato di circa 180°, ho mantenuto la posizione per un po' e sono tornato indietro, ho avuto errori di 30° in rollio, 35 [gradi] in imbardata e più di 40 [gradi] in 
好的。跳过 1，我们希望将逆变器 2 AC 2 关闭；再跳过 1，我们希望将 AC 2 总线复位 - 将
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к 2000 году, но лидеры демократов ответили, что приоритет должен быть отдан потребностям на Земле. Агню, высокопоставленный правительственный чиновник, присутствовавший на запуске «Аполлона-11» в среду, по-видимому, говорил от своего имени, а не обязательно от имени администрации Никсона, когда сказал: «На мой взгляд, мы должны отправить человека на Марс к концу этого столетия». Ларедо, Техас, AP: Иммиграционные власти Нуэво-Ларедо объявили в среду, что хиппи будут отказывать во въезде в Мексику по туристическим картам, если они не примут ванну и не подстригутся. Уберто Касарас, начальник мексиканской иммиграционной службы в Нуэво-Ларедо, заявил, что власти Мехико, Акапулько и других популярных туристических мест получили жалобы на хиппи. По сообщению United Press International: Первоначальная реакция на решение президента Никсона предоставить федеральным служащим выходной в понедельник, чтобы они могли отметить национальный день участия в лунной миссии «Аполлон-11», была в основном удивлением. Родни Биднер, Associated Press, Лондон, AP: Европа поражена миссией «Аполлон-11». Газеты по всему континенту заполняют свои страницы фотографиями ракеты «Сатурн V», стартующей для установления первой связи Земли с ее естественным спутником. И авторы заголовков напрягали воображение, чтобы подобрать слова, чтобы восхвалять этот подвиг. «Величайшее приключение в истории человечества началось», — заявила французская газета Le Figaro, посвятив четыре страницы репортажам с мыса Кеннеди и схемам миссии. Таблоид Paris Jour провозгласил: «Весь мир говорит им „браво“». Коммунистическая ежедневная газета L'Humanite начала с фотографии запуска и посвятила всю последнюю страницу восторженному репортажу о Луне, описывающему обратный отсчет и запуск, жен и семьи астронавтов, а также справочную информацию о лунной деятельности. Хемпстед, Нью-Йорк: Джо Намат официально прибыл в тренировочный лагерь New York Jets в Университете Хофстра в среду после закрытой встречи со своими товарищами по команде по поводу разногласий с комиссаром профессионального футбола Питером Розеллом. Лондон, UPI: Палата лордов получила в среду заверения, что американская миниатюрная подводная лодка не «повредит и не нападет» на Лох-Несское чудовище. Лорд Намат заявил, что хочет быть уверен, что любой, кто управляет подводной лодкой в ​​озере, «не подвергнет никаким существам, которые могут его населять, повреждению или нападению». Он попросил, чтобы план подводной лодки по взятию образца ткани с помощью извлекаемого дротика у любого обнаруженного монстра был в
حسنًا. فرانك، لدينا صورة للطقس هنا. تشير التوقعات إلى سماء صافية متفرقة على ارتفاع 2000 قدم، وسماء صافية متقطعة على ارتفاع 4000 قدم مع غيوم كثيفة. قد تلاحظ ذلك أثناء مرورك عبرها، وارتفاع الأمواج 4 أقدام، وسرعة الرياح حوالي 70 عقدة عند الساعة 12، مع رؤية تصل إلى 10 أميال، وربما بعض زخات المطر المتفرقة في المنطقة، وهذه التوقعات ليوم 27
Привет, Джерри. Мы тут как раз проверяли контрольный список при въезде, 
オーロラセブン、こちらはインディアン・カプ・コムです。通信を全て読んだ
Gemini 4, C
收到。您的留言几乎无法辨认。我们建议您告知我们您的睡眠时间，以及您是否感觉睡眠充足
Ehi, forse è meglio che chiami Lou e gli dica che potremmo arrivare un po' in ritardo per ce
रॉजर। और मुझे कुछ और बातें पता हैं, माइक। हमें इस समय बैटरी बी का चार्ज बंद करना होगा, और साथ ही, छिटपुट गरज-चमक के कारण हमारे लक्षित लैंडिंग पॉइंट पर मौसम बहुत खराब है। हम उनमें से किसी एक में फंसना नहीं चाहते, इसलिए हम - आपका लक्ष्य बिंदु आगे की ओर 
Roger. Wir verschieben das erst einmal. Es war eine kurze, dreistufige Anleitung: „Aktivierung Seiten 1, 1A und 2 wiederholen“. Allerdings gab es noch einen weiteren Schritt, den niemand versteht. Daher empfehlen wir in diesem 
«Аполлон-8», давайте вернёмся назад — переключитесь на передачу телеметрических данных 
التسجيل الصوتي من مرور المركبة في تاناناريف خلال هذه الفترة غير متوفر حاليًا. أفاد فني الاتصالات في تاناناريف إلى مركز اتصالات هيوستن على الرقم 77 54 27 بأنه تواصل مع جيمي
好的，我给你报一下数据。宇航服舱顶温度80
खैर, मुझे लगता है कि उन्होंने शायद सोचा होगा कि मैंने जो कण देखे हैं वे शायद वहीं से आए होंगे, लेकिन ये तो हजारों की संख्या में हैं, और ये मुझसे हर दिशा में मीलों तक फैले हुए हैं और यहाँ से बहुत धीरे-धीरे गुजर रहे हैं। मैंने इन्हें प
バッテリーの読み取り値を示す前に、電源を入れたままにしておきますか、それ
जेमिनी 4, जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्
Roger. 
आगे ब
Roger, 11. Correction de mon message précédent. À 73°20', nous vous transmettons la nouvelle configuration. À 73°30', nous vous demandons de manœuvrer pour obtenir une position neutre (roulis, tangage et lacet nuls) avec l'ancienne configuration. Ensuite, effectuez
Хорошо. Это примерно максимальный объем звонков, который мы можем принять здесь; поэтому, если вы хотите с нами поговорить, вам, возможно, придется позвонить нам один или два раза. Вы едва справляетесь
Verstanden. Das ist zufriedenstelle
Хьюстон, Ап
حسنًا. ثلاثة إلى وضع التحكم، فاصلة، النطاق الميت إلى الحد الأ
Хорошо. Вот такая конфигурация нам нужна, и вот что мы обдумываем. Когда мы переключились на режим «Бак 1 — АВТО, бак 2 — ВЫКЛ.», мы обнаружили, что в цикле нагревателя давление в баке 1 составляло около 233 psi, что значительно выше предельно допустимого уровня, и если мы переключимся на эту конфигурацию для сна, то избежим загорания индикаторов «ПРЕДУПРЕЖДЕНИЕ» во время сна. Хорошо. Чтобы это было комфортно, мы хотим, чтобы остаток дня мы использовали больше H2 из бака номер 2, чтобы создать дисбаланс в пользу бака 1, и к концу сна все выровнялось. Именно поэтому сейчас у вас включен режим «Бак 1 — ВЫКЛ., бак 2 — АВТО». Мы ожидаем, что за следующие 10 часов дисбаланс составит около 3 процентов; и перед сном мы позвоним вам, чтобы вы снова 
알겠습니다, 밴스. 카트리지 개조에 필요한 몇 가지 물품을 찾았습니다. 하나는 토트백에 사용하려고 했던 특수 먼지 방지 백인데, 꽤 두껍고 구멍이 없는 재질입니다.
आपने फिर से कनेक्शन काट दिया
Sie stellen dort lediglich sicher, dass die Sicherungen Ihrer Heizung geschlossen s
Also, as a matter of general interest, the Sun should be in - at th
I know all of us here want to thank all you guys down there for the very fine job you di
حسنًا. ستجعلك هذه المناورة قريبًا جدًا من حدود المسح الخاصة بهوائي الكسب العالي، لذا أثناء قيامك بها، تحقق من الأضواء. إذا أضاء ضوء حد المسح، فلا يزال لديك 15 درجة للعمل. ولكن الرسالة الوحيدة هي أنه في حال 
Roger. We'd like to do a little CRYO tank balancing. So, if you could position the oxygen tank number 1 he
Flyby / 63087, minus 162, plus 129
Sì, Houston, mi chiedevo se stai tenendo conto del fatto che sono un po' fuori di testa, e ho
Con tutta questa luce solare, non riesco a vedere le stelle. Il sole è alla mia sinistra e mi sto avvicinando al tramonto, circa alle 49, ora prevista. È proprio il momento giusto. Mi sto avvicinando alle 49 e le luci della cabina sono accese di bianco. Ora le accenderò di rosso. E spegnerò quella maledetta luce de
Хорошо. Полагаю, оттуда открывается дово
Хорошо, Джек. Мы хотели бы получить и принять ваш конечный вектор состо
네. 하지만 왜 그런 추력이 나오는지 모르겠네요. 아마도
ठीक है, पीडीआई पैड: 102:33:04.36; 09:50; माइनस 0002.1; 182, 287, 000; प्लस 56919. पीडीआई 10 से कम: 105:12:30.00. पीडीआई एबॉर्ट 10 से अधिक: 103:40:00.00, 107:11:30.00. कोई पीडीआई प्लस 12 एबॉर्ट नहीं: 102:44:37.00; प्लस 0122.3, सभी शून्य घटाएं, प्लस 0188.9; 0152.0, प्लस 0011.0, 0225.0, 0:4
ジム、
Frank, nous pensons que la procédure dont vous parlez n'est pas vraiment nécessaire et vous fait perdre votre temps. Une fois celle-ci terminée, nous devrons vous en envoyer une nouvelle, et vous de
Oh. Das ist – das ist richtig. Wenn er in der SEP-Position, die Sie einnehmen, keine Stern
D
水瓶座，休斯
네. 조, 길이가 얼마나 되나요? 아주 긴 건가요, 아니면 짧은 건가요, 아니면 중간 크기인가요? 페이지 수는 몇 장 정도
前
はい、11番です。こちらはヒューストンです。フライトプラン、就寝後チェックリスト、そしてその他すべての就寝後チェックリストの22時30分頃、「AUTO JET SEL
لننتظر ونرى. وفي أخبار أخرى، عاد العروسان ديفيد وجولي أ
حسناً. معدل نقل البيانات منخفض. قوة الإشارة لديّ 3
Roger. If you'd like to take some pictures, we recommend using magazine Uniform which is loaded with high speed black and white film, interior lights off, electric Hasselblad with the 80 millimeter lens. And you're going to have to hand hold us, I guess. We're recommending an f stop of 2.8, and we'd like to get a sequence of time expos
Фотоаппарат убран. Фотометр достаточно лёгкий, чтобы его можно было достать и оставить. Перед завершением я ещё раз проверю одно небольшое устройство. Показания поднялись примерно на толщину одной линии. Теперь оно показывает 0,06, что меньше 0,1. Все это теперь будет убрано в бардачок; до этого они лежали на люке, рядом с пружиной, удерживающей люк, ближайшей к аварийной ручке регулировки скорости. В вертикальной плоскости, параллельной сумке, в которой хранятся дополнительные вещи, которые нельзя запи
कोलंबिया, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपसे एक और ऑपरेशन करने का अनुरोध करते हैं। हम चाहते हैं कि आप ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स को ट्रैकिंग का काम सौंप दें और आप अपनी ऊर्जा चंद्रमा की सतह पर मौजूद निशानों को खोजने में लगाएं। अगर आप उन्हें ढूंढ पाते हैं, तो। हम उस पर निशान ढूंढ रहे हैं; लेकिन भौगोलिक विशेषताओं की ट्रैकिंग से हमें ज़्यादा फ
휴스턴 CAP COMM, 골
嗯，如果我——如果我能把所有事情都做完，我会尽量睡，但
Роджер. Серия трещин или разломов, пересекающих горизонт, спускается примерно в три этапа на юг. Параллельный разлом на севере имеет обрыв в центре. Надеюсь, все вы на Земле понимаете, что мы имеем в виду, когда говорим, что это довольно зловещий горизонт, очень темное и непривлекательное место. Сейчас мы приближаемся к одному из наших будущих мест посадки, выбранному в этом ровном регионе, называемом Морем Спокойствия, — ровном, чтобы облегчить первые попытки посадки и избежать необходимости уворачиваться от гор. Теперь вы можете видеть д
Okay. And, Jack, how do you read from Aquariu
Gemini VIII, hier spricht Houston. Wir stellen Ihr
5 チャーリー、4.2; 5 ドッグ、4.6; 6 アルファ、4.3; 6 ブラボー、4.3; 6 チ
Falsc
ジェミニVI
로저. CB 필수 계측 전원, 메인 B입
好的。回答你的问题，乔，答案是否定的。我一直都在检查舱室。从定性上看，当我们切换到这种配置时，频率或宇航服风扇的噪音似乎
안녕하세요, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 프렌드십 세븐, 
ठीक है। इंग्लैंड के जोड्रेल बैंक से, एपी के माध्यम से: ब्रिटेन की विशाल जोड्रेल बैंक रेडियो दूरबीन ने आज सुबह 5:49 पूर्वी मानक समय (ईएसटी) पर सोवियत संघ के मानवरहित चंद्र प्रक्षेपण से संकेत प्राप्त करना बंद कर दिया। एक प्रवक्ता ने कहा कि ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि लूना 15 अंतरिक्ष यान "चंद्रमा से आगे निकल गया है।" एक अन्य बयान: वेधशाला के निदेशक सर बर्नार्ड लवेल के प्रवक्ता ने कहा, "हमें नहीं लगता कि यह उतरा है।" वाशिंगटन यूपीआई: उपराष्ट्रपति स्पिरो टी. एग्न्यू ने वर्ष 2000 तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेजने का आह्वान किया है, लेकिन डेमोक्रेटिक नेताओं ने जवाब दिया कि पृथ्वी पर जरूरतों को प्राथमिकता दी जानी चाहिए। बुधवार को अपोलो 11 के प्रक्षेपण के समय उपस्थित वरिष्ठ सरकारी अधिकारी एग्न्यू ने स्पष्ट रूप से अपने लिए बोलते हुए कहा था, न कि निक्सन प्रशासन के लिए, "मेरे विचार में, हमें इस सदी के अंत तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेज देना चाहिए।" लैरेडो, टेक्सास, एपी: नुएवो लैरेडो में आव्रजन अधिकारियों ने बुधवार को घोषणा की कि हिप्पियों को मेक्सिको में प्रवेश के लिए पर्यटक कार्ड नहीं दिए जाएंगे, जब तक कि वे स्नान न कर लें और बाल न कटवा लें। नुएवो लारेडो में मैक्सिकन आव्रजन प्रमुख ह्यूबर्टो काज़ारास ने कहा कि मैक्सिको सिटी, अकापुल्को और अन्य लोकप्रिय पर्यटन स्थलों के अधिकारियों ने हिप्पियों के बारे में शिकायतें दर्ज की हैं। यूनाइटेड प्रेस इंटरनेशनल के अनुसार: राष्ट्रपति निक्सन द्वारा संघीय कर्मचारियों को सोमवार को छुट्टी देने पर शुरुआती प्रतिक्रिया, ताकि वे अपोलो 11 चंद्रमा लैंडिंग मिशन में भागीदारी के राष्ट्रीय दिवस का पालन कर सकें, ज्यादातर आश्चर्य की थी। रॉडनी बिडनर, एसोसिएटेड प्रेस, लंदन एपी: यूरोप अपोलो 11 मिशन से मंत्रमुग्ध है। पूरे महाद्वीप के समाचार पत्रों ने अपने पन्ने सैटर्न वी रॉकेट के पृथ्वी के प्राकृतिक उपग्रह से पहला संपर्क स्थापित करने के लिए उड़ान भरने की तस्वीरों से भर दिए हैं। और शीर्षक लेखकों ने इस उपलब्धि की प्रशंसा करने के लिए शब्दों की भरमार कर दी। फ्रांसीसी समाचार पत्र ले फिगारो ने घोषणा की, "मानव इतिहास का सबसे बड़ा साहसिक कार्य शुरू हो गया है," जिसने केप कैनेडी की रिपोर्टों और मिशन के आरेखों के लिए चार पृष्ठ समर्पित किए। टैब्लॉइड पेरिस जूर ने घोषणा की, "पूर
收到，迈克。T1，104 32 18；T2，104 37 28。距离目标地点以南4英
마지막 건 55-델타입니다. 55-델타. 들리십니까? 제미니 
Хьюст
هيوستن،
프레
Oui. Dites donc, on ferait mieux de ranger ça
ジェミニ4
Dico che qu
阿波罗8号，看来在那
Roger. It's in NORMAL. I've had the COMMAND RESET since we broke lock there, and I have to get back and control the OMNI's
12 miles ou
アポロ13号、ヒュー
Хорошо, давайте... Ладно, теперь у нас есть кое-ка
Roger. Grazie mille. O
Roger. Il carburante scarseggerà, Gus. Or
इस शांत समय का असर ज़मीनी 
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन से। माइक, हमें अभी भी आपके इंपीडेंस न्यूमोग्राफ में फ्लैट ट्रेस मिल रहा है। आज शाम सोने 
Okay. One thing, Joe; I just want to doublecheck again. All the stuff that normally was going to start at 57 hours, which the first 
了解、カントン。で
我们又需要稍微调整一下姿态。我们的地球正在向上向右移动。我们的地球，还有你们的地球。方向错了，方向错了。再往下一点。好的。如果能保持住就行。哎呀！它又滑回去了。好的。再往下一点，再往下一点。好的。向那个方向转90度；这是错误的90度，方向反了。对了。再往下一点。不对，方向错了，方向错了；对不起。继续向那个方向转。不，它已经向上移动到我们12点钟的位置了。对了，它又下来了。对了，它又下来了，又下来了。再往下一点
रॉजर। मुझे स्थिर रोशनी दिखाई दे रही है। वैसे,
好的，吉姆。在第2-107页，我们建议你删除“保持这种态度”那部分。你的平台已经很好了，我们觉得没必
11, Хьюстон. Мы готовы к ваш
The reason that we think that that would work is that it worked on Apollo 10. It made the constellations all 
Why don't you take one of the Southern Cross stars, then
Осталось 60, 
Ok. Abbiamo tagliato i riassunti del com
حسنًا. سيعود المفتاحان - قاطعا الدائرة الكهربائية في اللوحة 250 - إلى وضع الفتح؛ وكذلك قاطعا الدائرة الكهربائية في اللوحة 275؛ وقاطع دائرة مد
حسنًا، من المفترض أن نبدأ بشح
카나리, 제미니
Просто
Honeysuc
好的，继续。在“燃烧时间减 1 秒
Roger, ti ho sentito forte e chiaro. Ho un aggiornamento sul piano di volo e se sei troppo impegnato per co
Which way are you maneuvering 
맞아요, CAP 
Trying to come down hill a little bi
Nicht so wie in diesem Schwerelosigkeitsflugzeug, oder?... "Ac
حسنًا. في الصف الثاني، أغلق أول ستة صمامات على اليسار من خلال صمام العزل وافتح جميع الصم
ジェミニVI、ちょっと逆さまにな
إذا كانت لديكم أي تعليقات على هذا الاقتراح، فلماذا لا ترسلونها إلينا
Hallo, Canton Com
Roger. Capito. Ti darò le impostazioni, la correzione, gli assetti per il primo
알겠습니다, 선장님. 따뜻하게 지낼 방법을 알아냈습니다. 지금부터 전원을 공급하기로 했는데요, 먼저 준비 체크리스트를 꺼내서 맨 위에 "BAT 5 일반
هذه زوايا الكاميرا. وحدة التحكم: 356.69، 1
알았어, 잭. 내가 제대로 이해했는지 확인해 볼게. 우리가 할 일은 중간 지점에서 했던 것처럼 지구를 향하게 하고, 기체 축 정렬을 하는 거야. 그런 다음, 달을 향해 비행할 수 있도록 구형 자세를 입력해 줘. 그리고 나서... 달을 향하게 하고... 그다음에... 별이나 달, 지구를 향해 대략적인 정렬과 정밀한 정렬을 할 수 있도록 CDU를 입력해 주면 돼. 잠시만 기다려. 알았어. 잭, 또 마스터 알람이 울렸어. 배터리 표시등 외에는 아래쪽에 불이 들어오는 게 없어. 디스플레이를 보고 싶은 거지? 알았어. 그리고 2번
Роджер, 11. У тебя тут небольшие помехи, Нил. Твои сигналы громкие, но иногда прерываются. С земли твой космический аппарат выглядит нормально. Мы заметили, ч
Tutti i
Der Schutzschalter wird auf der Seite zur Aktivierung des Schutzschalters eingeschaltet, Jim. Wenn wir also hier ankommen und die Raten alle gedämpft sind, gehen wir davon aus, dass der S bis dahin die Betriebstemperatur erreicht hat und wir ihn jetzt einschal
ठीक है, स्कॉट, यहाँ सब कुछ बढ़िया चल रहा है। कूलेंट सिस्टम को ठीक करने की कोशिश करूंगा, और आपकी बात बिल्कु
好的。首先，翻到第12页。在页面右侧，从中间开始向下，删除“C
Okay. And top row is correct as is. Second row we want the QUAD TCAs 1 through 4 closed. On the third row, we want the ATCA (PGNS), closed. On the fourth row we want the, STANDBY, OPERATE, all closed, and you're saying the bot
Je crois avoir obs
रॉजर। मैंने TIG 124 22, 125 19 3
ठीक है, अभी मेरे पास सफेद रंग के कुछ टुकड़े हैं जो इधर-उधर 
حسنًا. تم إيقاف تشغيل خلايا الوقود رقم 3 REACs، هيوستن
わかりまし
Roger. Je comprends. Écoutez, si vous pensez que c'est si important, on
D'accord. Sur notre liste de vérification, l'option « tous 
알았어, 프레드. 네 말이 맞는 것 같아. 네
D'accord. Jack, 
And now while Fred's taking his hammock down and restowing it, I might give you some idea of what sort of confusion of attitudes since there is no up or down, and I'm situated on top of the ascent engine just at the entrance to the tunnel. I'll reverse the camera 180 degrees and go from Fred, look thr
D'accord. Avez-vous une liste de matériel? Je vais le prendre et le lui 
Roger, got that. Some fogging on the w
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston
صحيح، لأن القراءة منخفضة قليلاً. على البدلة، أنا الآن عند 6 وسأرفعها إلى 6.5. لا أحرز تقدماً كبيراً. وصلتُ إلى حوالي 6.2
다음. CB, POWER 2
Nous longeons ici des crêtes abruptes. Le bord d'anciens cratères photographiés par Apollo 10; et ces
Questo è stato a B-2. Mi sto avvicinando a B-3. Picchiate a questo punto a circa 10 gradi. L'errore di rollio che si è sviluppato durante il periodo in cui avevamo gli scanner spenti è scomparso. A questo punto, aumenterò il flusso della tuta a circa... giusto un po' per aumentare il raffreddamento per il rientro. Vedo se riesco ad abbassarlo ancora un po'. L'assetto è quasi perfetto. L'imbardata è buona. Il beccheggio è un po' brusco. È chiaro che il reticolo
Eagle, Columbia. Sono pronto a supportarti durant
अपशिष्ट जल डंप के लिए, हम 84 घंटे तक इंतजार करेंगे; हो सकता है कि वे वेंट का मॉडल बना रहे हों या क
Roger. 7,5, 7,5 und 6,5. Und ich habe hier noch ein pa
Хорошо. Я знаю, вы стараетесь молчать, поэтому я просто зачитаю вам кое-какую информацию. Одна из вещей, которую мы только что обнаружили и которая может придать вам уверенности: если вы потеряете кислородный криогенный бак, у вас останется 80 фунтов на /. Ограничивающим фактором при работе с одним баком сейчас является водородный бак, у которо
Хорошо. Дайте мне 16... По всей видимости... панель 
... Cape Cap Com
はい
로저. 잠시만 기다려주세요. 좋습니다. 서경 150도 자오선을 통과하는 시간은 77분 5
When plat
अभी हम कुछ नहीं कह सकते। हम बहुत करीब है
Roger. D'accord. L'autre point concerne l'après-atterrissage. Nous le réaffirmons: vous ne devez pas rester plus d'une heure dans le vaisseau. Vous pouvez retirer vos combinaisons, à votre discrétion, si le vaisseau est étanche. L'ouverture de l'écoutille est entièrement à votre discrétion. La zone de récupération semble bien adaptée pour le moment. Souvenez-vous de l'exercice de pompage que nous avons fait lors de l'examen médical; il est préférable d'avoir les pieds surélevés. Avez-vous d
罗杰。副本，VI
ठीक है। प्रक्रिया इस प्रकार है:,, एंटर; 1331, एंटर; 7, एंटर; और एंटर। स्पष्टीकरण इस प्रकार है। इस दौरान, एक बार ऐसा हुआ जब ऑप्टिक्स ज़ीरो स्विच को ज़ीरो पर करने के लगभग 16 सेकंड बाद कंप्यूटर में दर्ज किया गया। यह 
Okay. I'm reading you loud and clear. I understand you have contact with the spacec
杰克，我正透过
Dovrei lavare q
阳光这么强，我根本看不到星星。太阳在我左边，差不多快到日落时间了——计划时间是49点。时间差不多准。我快到49点了，机舱灯是白色的。我要把机舱灯换
Родж
Я ещё не достиг цели. Я бы сказал, примерно 25-30 градусов, сейчас я останавливаю рыскание. Перископ сверяется с окном и прицельной сеткой, и я скоро поставлю отметку, чтобы попытаться остановить все отклонения. Сейчас я почти в ретрог
好的。你的二级辐射输入温度，我给你的是70到72度左右；辐射输出温度大约是30度；乙二醇蒸发温度读数大约是65度；蒸汽压力满刻度高，乙二醇排​​放压力大约是9磅/平方英寸。二级蓄能器（宇航服）显示大约52度；舱室大约58度；压力，宇航服读数4.1，舱室读数5。二氧化碳分压略高于1，大约1.1。在房屋侧面，温度是72度，氦气读数3500；氮气A读数2300；氮气B大约2450。燃料读数大约是165；燃料电池1，两个都关闭了，它们没有反应；皮肤温度405度；冷凝器排气量程较低。燃料电池 2 - 目前氧气或氢气流量读数在 0.13 到 0.14 之间，氧气流量目前处于满量程高位，但会根据推进器活动而波动，这也导致
SLEW 모드로 남겨둘게요. 우
Roger, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Draußen
Apollo 
好的。我们将执行“制导控制”和“模式控制”的启动，并将“姿态
本日はこれでおしまいです。私たち一同、皆様にメリー
D'accord, Ap
Houston, Columbia. Bitte wiederholen Sie die Angabe der benötigten Daten für 
휴스턴, 물
ああ、フレッドが来た。まるで投げ縄を持ってチェックリスト
Новые данные: 50,40 Тета, 7,9; R, 92,22; общее изменение скорости, 376; изменение напряжения, 175,1. Похоже, переключатель
休斯顿，哥伦比亚。你得了名词49分。五分优
Ok. Lo ripeterò un p
मैं
Okay. And it'll be a few mi
로저. 저희가 레이저를 이용한 간단한 시각 실험을 해 주시면 좋겠습니다. 혹시 창문이나 망
C'est bon. Nous avons bien reçu votre TR et votre Gemini. Vos compteurs sont en ordre, tout est prêt. À bientôt pour un prochain v
E non ne ho ancora uno, ma mi sento più vicino ad averlo ora che in qualsiasi altro momento. Credo sia questo maledetto ossigeno al 100%. Lo respiro e non credo di essere mai stato co
ठीक है, मैं इसे ढूंढता हूँ, बज़। मुझे ये ऑप्टिक्स हैंडल लाने दो। मुझे लगता है कि मैंने जो कहा, उसका मेरा मतलब वो नह
Когда мы толь
- - अब क्यों नहीं कोशिश करते? फ्रेड, अब तुम्हारी आवाज़ साफ़ स
Okay. Thank you much. Our biggest drift on the GYRO's is 0.03 degrees per hour with - on the X-GYRO. On the PIPA's, the Y-PIPA's the biggest and it's 0.006 feet p
वह पकड़े हुए है - वह पकड़े हुए है -... अच्छी लग रही ह
हम प्रयो
하지만 우리는 지금 흔들리고 
11, Хьюстон. Считываю ваши данные, они очень слабые, я все еще слишком глубоко в шуме, чтобы заверш
كين، اقرأ لنا ما يجب قراءته في حال لم تتمكن من إ
Okay. Mach ich. Ich gebe Ihnen die Gewichte i
了解。こち
알겠습니다. 제 설정 정보를 알려드리겠습니다. 자동 역추진 모드이고, 자이로스코프는 정상입니다. 기동 스위치는 꺼져 있고, 모든 소모품은 양호한 상태입니다. 전기 장치도 아주 잘
روجر. نحن ن
فريندشيب سفن، لا أشعر بأي إحساس
我的意思是，把灯打开……陀螺
ロジャー、君はそこに
ب؛ دلتا-في، 13.5. تعديل الارتفاع؛ دلتا-في، 59.5. تعديل الطور؛ دلتا-في، 31.3. تغيير المستوى باتجاه الجنوب؛ دلتا-في، 44.3. مسار بيضاوي مشترك؛ دلتا-في، 33.7. بدء الطور النهائي؛ دلتا-في، 42.5. نهاية الطور النهائي. 
Verseau, pour le moment, nous avons décidé de laisser les appareils allumés et d'éteindre ceux qui ne sont pas essentiels. Nous établ
Да, я тян
피치 트
OK. CB POWER-2, MAIN B, ouvert; CB POWER-1, MAIN A, ouvert; CB SENSOR SIGNAL, MA
好的，我
了解しました。ブースターに近づいてきました。夜が明け始めているのがお分かりいただけると思います。光ははっきりと見えており、現在ブースターから4分の3マイルほど離れていると推定され
Nein, das is
收到。您的轨道坐标已更改为 87
«Аполлон-8», Хью
乔，我
لا، لا بأس. لكن الأمر المثير للاهتمام هو أنه في آخر مرة قمت فيها بتفريغ الماء، لاحظوا تغيراً في مسار التتبع، وبعد تحليل البيانات، وجدوا شخصاً يعتقد أنه يعرف خصائص الفوهة وكمية الماء التي يتم تفريغها، وبدا أن تقديراته لتأثير ذلك على المسار تتطابق مع نتائج التتبع. لذا أعتقد أنه عليك الانتباه إلى بعض ه
了解。外からの報告によると、
Apollo 8, Houston. Quel +2 
Хорошо. Одно из предложений, которое звучит многообещающе, заключается в том, чтобы позволить Джиму проводить оценку через телескоп, при этом вы делаете все точно так же, за исключением того, что поворачиваетесь на 180 градусов так, чтобы ваша голова была направлена ​​вверх, а Джим отслеживает вас через телескоп, и вы все равно будете немного отклоняться от курса,
روجر، كل شيء يسير على ما يرام هنا. نتأخر قليلاً في ا
حسنًا، لنرى هذا الصباح مدى قربها من التوازي مع خط M. قبل أن نبدأ التحديد لأول مرة، بدا أن حساب تلك الزوايا الثلاث غير دقيق، وأنني كنت أهدر الكثير من الوقود بالوصول إلى تلك الزوايا الثلاث ثم الاضطرار إلى إجراء تغييرات كبيرة في وضعية الطائرة بعد ذلك لجعل خط M موازيًا. في بعض الحالات، بدا الأمر وكأنه مجرد وضعية مقبولة مطلوبة، وأنتم جميعًا قلتم إنه غير ضروري. لذلك كنت أحدد في ب
Intelsat, un consortium international de communications regroupant 63 pay
Ça pourrait marcher si on n'avait pas le choix, Fred. Pour l'instant, on a un surplus d'eau confortable dans le sublimateur. On en a discuté ce matin: tu pourrais essayer le transfert d'eau du réservoir de remontée, mais on a décidé de ne pas le faire, ni de le recommander. On estime qu'il 
、
差不多就是这样了。准备好收听早间新
حسنًا، ها هو SECO. تم تفعيل أنظمة الدفع الموجبة. أنا الآن 
حسنًا يا فريد. سنحاول الامتناع عن الاتصال بك من الآن فصاعدًا، حتى تتمكن من أخذ قسط من الراحة. سنستطلع آراء الجميع أولًا، لنرى إن كان لدى أحد أي تعليقات لك، 
ロジャ
...ci ucciderebbe. Tienilo lì. Okay. Lascia 
Поворот 
Canary, préparez-vous à démarrer le chronomè
Ok. Ora, Ken, vorremmo ch
嘿，詹姆斯。我是助理外科医
Понял. Электронное управление, ручное управление включено. Утв
Okay. Procedure's coming back in again. Multicopies for distribution. And Ken
أبولو ١١، أبولو ١١، هذه محطة هيوستن تبث بشكل غير مباشر. إذا كنت تقرأ، فحاول التقاط الإشارة باستخدام هوائي متعدد الاتجاهات. حاول التقاط الإشارة باستخدا
C'est exact. CB POWER-1 et -2, ouvert
Хорошо, 25 футов/сек вперед, 41 сек 120 назад, 2+32. В 23+16+02. 
Roger. 224, plus 602
了解しました。大丈夫
罗
आपको क्या लग
Измерительный прибор SPOT находится в маленькой коробочке с едой слева. Сможете ли вы его достать
केबिन क
Okay, J
Роджер, Cape Co
حسنًا. أنا على وشك فعل ذلك. عندما تكون مستعدًا للتخلي عنه، أخبرني
ロジャー：ザンジバル。はっきりと聞こえます。オーロラ・セブンは
알겠습니다. 찰리, 좋은 생각입니다. 해당 단계에 도달하면 로드할 짐벌 각도 
Al momento, i sistemi a terra se
嘿，弗兰克，不如你跟大家分享一下你的健
자, 페이지 중간쯤 9번째 줄에 있는
التقطتُ صورةً جويةً بواسطة جهاز S-6 عندما كنا بالقرب
Roger. We're not getting telemetry data from you right 
Quand ça devient vraiment trop difficile de 
Роджер, «Дружба Семь». Крен отклонен на 20° вправо; рыскание выглядит неплохо. Гавайи. Кон
Отсюда открывае
알겠습니다, 빌. 이 내용은 비행 계획서 2페이지 22번째 줄에 있습니다. 사령선 
Apollo 8, Houston. Bien reçu. Nous vous recommandons d'
끈적끈적하네요. 종이가 잘 안 떨어질 정도로
يا جو، أخبرني جاك أن هناك الكثير من الجسيمات لا تزال عالقة في الجو، وهو - لا يستطيع تمييز أي كوكبة يعرفها حتى الآن. لكن ربما ينقشع الغيم هنا بعد قليل
حسناً. ان
Ricevuto. Abbiamo
ねえ、ニール、これを
아폴로 8호, 고이득을 기다리는 동안 궤적 요약을 계속하겠습니다. 13번째 지점에서 태평양 중부선으로 복귀할 수 있으며, 연소 후 138초가 지나면 귀환이 시작됩니다. 138초면 버터플라이 영역을 벗어나게 됩니다. 20초 이후에는 조기점화나 재시동을 시도하지 않는 것이 좋습니다. 20초를 넘기면 궤적이 수정 범위를 벗어나 자유 귀환으로 이어질 수 있습니다. 귀환 지역의 날씨는 양호합니다. 추적 및 미추진이 가능합니다. 연소 중에는 저장 탱크와 섬프 탱크의 연료 소모로 인해 연소실 압력과 탱크 압력에 약간의 변화가 있을 수 있습니다. 이는 연소 시작 후 2~5초 사이에 발생할 수 있습니다. 두 시스템 모두 압력 변화가 미미할 것입니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동합니다. 연소 후에는 궤적 유지를 위해 물 끓임을 방지해야 합니다. 물 배출 상황은 양호해 보입니다. 그 이상은 괜찮을 겁니다. 5시 이후까지는 물 배출을 미루도록 하겠습니다. 그 전에 극저온 장치를 휘저어주고 싶습니다. (수정) 연료 전지의 다음 퍼지는 대략 에 이루어질 예정이며, 수소 배터리 A는 34.9, 배터리 B는 39.1, 찰리는 38.5가 될 것입니다. 저희는 단일 탱크 극저온 장치를 갖추고 있습니다. 이전 연소 성능을 
Roger. From the hot wires of the Public Affairs Office: Apollo 11 still dominates the news around the wo
Tranquility Base, Houston. We've reviewed the checklist, and about the only change in order to advance the that we've found is that yo
Da geht 
Роджер. Похоже, мы всё ещё находимся примерно в 80 футах от берега. У нас горит основной красный сигнал: ВЫКЛ.; основной зелёный сигнал: ВКЛ.; сигнал вооружения: ВЫКЛ.; вторичный с
로저. 차트를 검토해 보니 당신과 똑같은 답이 나왔습니다. 당신의 절차가 아주 훌륭해 보입니다. 속도 평균값을 고려한 것도 잊지 않으셨네요. 저희도 차트를 검증하기
Роджер, спа
Roger. You got a big fat GO 
どうなるか分かっていたら、ボトルであんなに遠くまで行くことはなかったでしょう。接触したらすぐに確認するのが習慣だったんです。大丈夫そうなら、すぐにボ
أنا الآن في وضع مثالي لتصوير رحلتي MSC-2 و MSC-3 عبر ظاهرة جنوب المحيط الأطلسي. أصور مباشرة 
そして、スプラッシュカーテンを取り付け、ネックダムを取り付け、キャビンエアーリサーキュレーションハンドルを上げます。左のシュノーケルハンドルとキャビンベントハンドルを上げます。ハッチリリーストリガーを離します。ウォーターシールが下がって閉じていることを確認します。ランヤードを取り付け、左のハッチを開きます。司令パイロットのサバイバルギアを宇宙船の右側に収納します。リカバリーループ全体は...宇宙船の右側です。サバイバルキットを持って左席に移動します。パイロットのサバイバルギアをリカバリーループの上の左ハッチに投げます。メイウエストを膨らませ、宇宙船の右側にあることを確認します。パイロットを壊します...あなた次第です。左ハッチからサバイバルギ
Roger, Houston. Tranquility Base. We're in the process of using up what film we have, and I'm just getting r
Das stimmt. Wir hatten heu
Ricevuto. La mia modalità di controllo è manuale; giroscopi ingabbiati; mano
我离得还挺远的。那肯定
حسنًا يا نيل، أنا جاهز تمامًا لحرق SEP، ويبدو أن
Gemelli 4, Can
रॉजर। क्या आप 
नहीं, सच में। दिलचस्प बात यह है कि अब हम मानचित्र पर देख सकते हैं कि आप गुआम और हवाई के बीच में हैं और थोड़ा उत्तर की ओर हैं, और आप 
У меня есть 
Это умно. — Наконец-то вытащили заднюю крышку метеорологического бюро. Первый снимок не стоил того, чтобы его использовать, так что я его исправлю. — Хорошо. Вытащили слайдер. Вставлю метеорологический фильтр, если получится. С этой стороны
로저. 당신이 
You got a Chinese band going up 
好了，杰克，现在你读得
Роджер. Это было связано с тем, что
شربتُ كمية كبيرة من الماء وما زلتُ أشعر بالعطش. في الحقيقة، أعتقد أن هناك تسريبًا في المبولة، أنا متأكد
House Ways and Means Committee also has agreed yesterday to tax changes affecting oil companies, also banks and utilities, which could add as much as 2 billion dollars per year to the federal revenue. The committee als
هيا يا
Ricevuto. PAD di ingresso: l'area è il Pacifico centrale, rollio 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, latitudine più 1332, meno 16917, 064, 36194, 649, distanza da percorrere 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 00 28, DL max 154, 084, 22400, 18000, D0 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02, stella sestante 45 0189, 277, stella di puntamento, nessuna disponibile, vettore di risalita in alto. Commenti: alli
Apollo 8, qui Hou
Deux autres points, Fred. Premièrement, nous ne prévoyons pratiquement aucun désalignement de votre moteur pendant la combustion, donc nous ne nous attendons pas à des variations de régime moteur significatives, d'autant plus que la poussée est très faible. Deuxièmement, veuillez 
Roger. E abbiamo un'osservazion
जेम
Dite loro di guardare la roba che hann
Donnerwetter! Du bist
Rev 62 longitude 
ओह, दो-चार
지금 잠망경으로 일출이 보이기 시작합니다. 야간 쪽 때문에 이번 궤도에서 잠망경으로 들어오는 첫 번째 빛입니다. 야간 쪽에서는 역행 자세에서 잠망경이 전혀 작동하지 않는다는 것이 분명합니다. 
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ وضعية مُحاذاة محور الجسم، باستخدام خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار على الأرض كما فعلنا من قبل. وبمجرد حصولنا على ذلك، سننفذ -7، وهو ما يبدو الآن وكأنه احتراق بمعدل قدمين في الثانية أو حوالي 15 ثانية. وقد أُبلغتُ أنه انخفض إلى قدم ونصف الآن، لذا فهو ضمن الحدود الآمنة. حسنًا. عند القيام بذلك، سنبدأ فورًا المناورة للوصول إلى وضعية إطلاق وحدة الخدمة، والتي ستكون في مستوى الطائرة لأننا نُطلقها أبكر من المعتاد. لسنا بحاجة، ولا نرغب، في وجود عنصر خارج مستوى الطائرة. لذا ستكون في مستوى الطائرة مع توجيه وحدة الخدمة للخارج على طول متجه نصف القطر. سنبدأ بعد ذلك في تجهيز وحدة القيادة لوحدة الخ
Die Erde wird in 1 bis 2 Minuten wi
안녕하세요, 11번 휴스턴입니다. 골드스톤 TV ​​측에서는 화면에 선명한 수직선이 나타날 때, 수평 띠가 가로질러 나타나면서 화면이 약간 휘어지는 것처럼 보인다고 했습니다. 아폴로 10호에
Роджер, ты меня слышишь или нет, 
Да, у меня сложилось отчетливое впечатление, что верхняя часть моего окна намного грязнее нижн
Okay. We got the chlorine in and the water has been chlorinated and just a minute I will check with them on their slee
…Quand j’y serai, je baisse
Gli atteggiamen
نعم. توضع أسفل الكمبيوتر، وكلما زاد وزن الأشياء الموجودة هناك، زادت نسبة الحمل إلى العمق (L/D). ليس لدينا أي أجهزة تخزين، لذا كنت أتساءل عن الأشياء الثقيلة التي يمكننا وضعها هناك - ربما يمكننا وضع بعض الكاميرات، كاميرات التلفزيون، وما شابهها من الأشياء التي عادة ما تكون ثقيلة - في خزانتنا. لا، لا يمكننا وضع الأجهزة في خزانتنا، ولكن يمكننا وضعها في تلك الحاوية الموجودة هناك، مما سيساعد في تقليل نسبة الحمل إلى العمق. أي شيء آخر يخطر ببالك سيكون موضع تقدير كبير لأننا لا ن
Okay, Jack. What I just gave you now on the backout is the only thing that's order critical. From here on, you can go to the steps for initiating
Хорошо, на странице 1-2. За два часа до истечения времени есть пункт «Проверка логическ
Roger. What kind of temperature ar
В авиакомпании предупреждают, что если вы слишком заняты, мы не будем измерять
罗杰。我明白他们希望我们尽可能多地拍摄可见的地形，不要等到最后一天才开始。不过，我们也想节省
Gemini 
La tua trasmissione è piu
收到。这时我听到卡诺喊着要量血压。我现
嘿，迈克。麻省
了解。ジーン、それをやっ
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. نحن هنا نعيد تنظيم صفوفنا، ونعمل على تحسين أنظمة التحكم لديك، ونحاول إعداد شيء ما، ونلقي نظرة على المواد الاستهلاكية بدلًا من خطة الطيران، وما إلى ذلك. وبمجرد حصولنا على كل هذه المعلومات، سنبلغك بها. لدينا أيضًا طاقم الدعم المكون من 14 فردًا في أجهزة المحاكاة، يراجعون عمليات الاحتراق عند الرسو، ويحاولون أيضًا معرفة إجراءات المحاذاة التي يمكنهم ابتكارها لرؤية النجوم من النافذة. لذا، إذا تمكنت ي
Kann man auf diesem Bild jetzt irgendwelche Details erkennen, oder blockie
チャーリー、今のところ順調だよ。一つは水鉄砲に、もう一つは
Ok. Vorremmo... i ragazzi della SPAN dicono che sembra... pensano che uno andrebbe sul casco che avrai in B1, e potresti mettere l'altro sul casco di Mike, che sarà nella cintura di sicur
吉姆，今天傍晚早些时候，弗雷德报告说指令舱1号窗口有气体排出。他还报告说看到一块大约4英寸见方的银色金属碎片漂浮着。我们正在努力确定这究竟是新的排气口，还是之前问题的残留排气。你还有什么要补充的吗？另外，弗雷德当时正在拍照，我们授权他使用1号月球表面相机拍摄一些机会目标，快门速度设置为1/250秒。由于不确定应该使用哪个光圈值，我
Wir suchten auch nach dem Katzenpfotenkrater, da wir annahmen, uns jenseits des G
Ende des Stromausfalls, 30 plus 01; Drogue, 31 plus 37; Main, 32 plus 58; und Sonnenaufgang 1 Minute n
Y
로저. 여기 있는 사람들 얼굴이 
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, ici Canary Cap Com. Com
جيميني 8، هاواي. نود الحصول على قراءة وقود نظ
Roger. Approche au plus près d'Apollo Landmark, révision 28, GMT 10 h 16 min 51 s. 45 km au sud. Manœuvre n° 12: GMT 10 h 21 min 50 s. 10 km au sud. Manœuvre n° 13: GMT 10 h 25 min 30 s. 2,4 km au nord. Manœuvre n° 18: GMT 10 h 30 min 15 s. 45 km au nord. Aucun contrôle d'atti
Okay. Für den mittleren Pazifik sind die Bedingungen im Allgemeinen gut. Sie können mit einer Wolkenuntergrenze von 2000 Fuß (aufgelockert), einer Sichtweite von 10 Meilen, Wind aus 070° mit 12 Knoten, Wellenhöhen von 4 Fuß und einem Höhenmesser von 2974 rechnen. Sonnenaufgang ist um 10:00 Uhr UTC, erste Dämmerung um 16:49 Uhr UTC. Das Raumschiff ist die Yorktown; die Flugzeuge sind Airboss 1 und 2 sowie Recoveries 1, 2 und 3. Die geschätzte Zeit bis zum Eintreffen des Raumschiffs beträgt 15 Minuten. Die Yorktown befindet sich am Zielpunkt, die Airboss-Flugzeuge sind vor 
Gemini 
Je travaille actuellement sur la vér
Bene. E poi, più avanti, a circa 3 metri, c'è una roccia ancora più grande, molto arrotondata. Quella roccia è circa..
알겠습니다. 
Gémeaux 4, Houston CAP C
好的，阿波罗8号。我们已经完成了第一次测试，现在要将上行链路模式切换到“上行链路指令和测距”模式，并且不使用语音功能。我们将保持这个模式2分半钟，并发送测试信息。这不会影响您的电脑或面板开关的配置。您可能会看到与断路锁定相关的S波段噪声。但是，您的功率计应该仍然显示良好的信号。这不是信号丢失，只是语音调制功能暂时失效。
Ok, Apollo 8. Questo completa il nostro test COMM. Grazie per la colla
阿波罗8号，休斯顿
ハワイ通信工科大学。シグマ・セブン。
मुझे लग
Ed pense que vous devez… contrôler le vaisseau sp
浮き上がるのを感じます。時計が
ジェミニ4、ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCA
Нам нужно, чтобы дисплей был открыт; антенна S-диапазона закрыта — чтобы избежать срабатывания главной сигнализации, камера — последовательная камера открыта; а ниже нам нужно, чтобы дисплеи были открыты; напряжение шины постоянного тока закрыто; инвертор 2 открыт; ASCEN
터널을 통과하는 건가요, 마
Je crois qu'on les a perdus. Laissons l'
D'accord. Nous avons préparé plusieurs sachets de jus, prêts à l'emploi. Nous avons essayé de vider le réservoir d'eau du module de commande il y a une vingtaine de minut
रॉजर। तारा संख्या 40 पर, जिस पर आप अभी काम कर रहे हैं, उड़ान योजना के अनुसार केवल
Apollo 11, this is Houston. If you will give us 
Roger, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Tre
这里是友谊七
Apollo 8, Houston. You are in the scan limit right now on the high-gain antenna; although you may have NARROW beam wid
Roger. Aurora Seven, reading okay. Getting some pretty good oscillations now and w
John, die Aeromeds sind sehr zufrieden mit dir; du siehst da oben
알겠습니다, 프레드. 거의 다 오셨네요. 저희는 지휘 모듈
我仍然能听到那个声音。听起来像是有人在后面的房间里
ロジャー、13歳です。O2タンク2の酸素量センサーが故障したため、クライオタンクの量をもう少し厳密に管理したいとのことです。そのため、当初の予定よりも少し頻繁に全てのクライオタンクを攪拌していただくようお願いする予定です。最初の攪拌は今です。今後は睡眠中や活動量が多い時間帯を除いて、5～6時間ごとにご連絡いたします。今すぐ攪拌していただければ幸い
Роджер, Гуаймас. Это «Близнецы 4». Пилот всё ещё не спит. Сейчас он тоже
دعني أقرأ هذه لك مرة أخرى. RN ناقص RP، زائد 77؛ درجة حرارة 400 كيلو أوم، اسمية؛ RET 400 كيل
No. No. Arriva proprio dal basso dell'orizzonte, attraverso lo strato di lumin
哎呀，这时，这该死的
了解しました。
...non c'è niente da guardare
Okay, Vance. Wir gehen wieder hoch – wir haben jetzt Spannung – und wi
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। ह
Ok. Non abbiamo problemi. Vai avanti e usa il tuo D-9. Ora, sul punto di riferimento Apollo n. 2, saremmo a 19. E il punto di riferimento sarà 16 miglia a nord della rotta, e dovresti essere inclinato di circa -30° in quel momento. E vorremmo che lo seguissi il più vicino possibile e che scattassi alcune foto usando la fotocamera da 16 mm con 
هذه أبولو 8، ننقل لكم البث المباشر من القمر. اضطررنا لتغيير كاميرات التلفزيون الآن. عرضنا لكم أولاً منظراً للأرض كما كنا نراقبها خلال الـ 16 ساعة الماضية. والآن ننتقل لنعرض لكم القمر الذي كنا نحلق فوقه على ارتفاع 60 ميلاً طوال الـ 16 ساعة الماضية. أمضينا أنا وبيل أندرس وجيم لوفيل اليوم الذي يسبق عيد الميلاد هنا نجري تجارب، ونلتقط صوراً، ونشغل محركات مركبتنا الفضائية للمناورة. ما سنفعله الآن هو تتبع المسار الذي كنا نتبعه طوال اليوم، ونأخذكم في رحلة إلى غروب الشمس على سطح القمر. القمر يمثل شيئاً مختلفاً لكل واحد منا. أعتقد أن لكل منا انطباعه الخاص عم
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Potresti darci un'idea di quant
Sembra che per un po' di 
أمامك أربع دقائق؛ هذا وقت كافٍ، ال
Le système d'éjection automatique est activé. Je dois interrompre la transmission car je dois constamment regard
チャーリー、ここは問題なさそうだね。0.7の部分だけがまだ説
알겠습니다. 사전 발사 단계로 넘어가서, 연료 전지 퍼지를 이 시점에 진행하길 원한다고 말씀하셨죠
지구가 떠오르는 모습을 보고 
Okay, Houston. We are standing
Роджер. Все батареи адаптера показывают 2 ампера и 24 вольта
मैं अब VOX ट्रांसमिट पर वापस आ गया हूँ। क्या तुम सुन रहे हो, डीके? मैंने बाईं ओर एक शानदार 90 डिग्री का रोल बनाया है। वाह, क्या बढ़िया आठ-पॉइंट रोल है! अब HF 
روجر، جيم. ظننا أنكما قد ترغبان في معرفة أنه بناءً على ساعتين ونصف من التدريب على المضمار بعد منتصف مساركما الأخير، وبالنظر إلى المستقبل، نتوقع أن يكون 
हम पानी के उपयोग के पैटर्न का बारीकी से विश्लेषण कर रहे हैं, और फिलहाल हमारा रुख यही है कि एक को चालू रखा जाए और दूसरे को बं
Роджер. У меня е
Oui. D'accord
- - Sono riuscito a identificare la Zampa di Gatto e la coppia di crateri proprio alla fine, ma non sono riuscito a distinguere bene la V rovesciata né i tre piccoli crateri curvi su un lato - 
分かりました。ステップ8は「緊急時対応チェックリストのパワー5に従ってパワーダウン」ですが、
D'acco
Frank, sei proprio come pensavamo prima. La luce del tuo dock oscura completa
Это Канаверал Кэп Ком, тестирую КВ-диапазон. GMT 15 52 0
휴스턴 사람들, 여기서 듣는 말을 
是的。我们会查看这里的数据，并在接下来的30分钟左右
是的，我觉得你说得对。哎呀，确实能看出塌陷了。大部分——你可以看到它们都聚集在底部角落里；你知道，在边缘——很多白色的东西都滴了下来——显然过一段时间后，它们会被一层颜色较深的东
रॉजर। समझ गया कि अभी तक आपका लॉक-ऑन नहीं हुआ है और आप 270 भेजने से 
حسناً. كيف تقرأ الآن
확
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフランク・ボーマンが同行します。彼らは太平洋軍司令官ジョン・シドニー・マケイン・ジュニア提督と共に、回収艦のブリッジから着水を見届けます。大統領はホーネット号での滞在後、アジア歴訪と予定されていたルーマニア訪問に出発します。ルナ15号は昨日、月を52周した後、「危機の海」に墜落したとみられています。ソ連の通信社TASSは、「月近傍空間における科学的」「研究」が行われたと報じました。ジョドレルバンク天文台のバーナード・ラベル卿は、ルナ15号が時速約300マイル（約480キロメートル）の速度で月面に衝突したと述べました。ベトナムでは最近、比較的静穏な状況が続いています。パトロール中の
了解。あと数分でジム。すべて順調そうだ。カーナボンでの君の時間はきっと素晴らしいものになるだ
Okay. 8, /: 45701, meno 040, più 157, più 33195, meno 01267, più 04716 179 008 001, NA, più 00187 33552 311 33355 42 09090 252, Dzuba giù 060, sinistra 4.2, più 0773, meno 16500 12982 3625
了解、コロンビア。11号機が到着しました。機体番号：37200、マイナス060、プラス047、098、05、2422、プラス41448、プラス03719、マイナス02422。ロールはNA、ピッチは020、その他のPADはNA。星座はNA。アレージは
Beh, ne abbiamo discusso a lungo. Abbiamo pensato di prenderci cura della nostra barba dom
알겠습니다. 14페이지에서 'a', 'load'가 31021로
Attends Buzz. Ça a l'air plutôt bien, d'après ce que je vois. On a la ligne de convergence tropicale là-bas. Il y a quelques nuages ​​sur la carte météo que je regarde, mais rien d'important. Pour l'instant... Attends. Voyons voir, là, à mi-hauteur... oui, à MPL... on a 3000 pieds de nuages ​​épars, visibilité 10 pieds, vagues de 3 pieds, c'est la météo actuelle. Je ne pense pas qu'il y ait de prévisions importantes. Il y a quelques... FLIGHT vient de m'informer que ce que je viens de te donner était les prévisions. Il y a quelques tempêtes tropicales dans le... enfin, pas dans la
収
RETRO-ROCKET 爆破弹，安
Eh bien, on dirait qu'elles ont été conçues p
Roger. Ihre Systeme sehen von hier aus gut aus. Bitte warten Sie. Wir möchten, dass Sie den Piloten aufwecken. Wir werden in diesem Anflug einen Aero-Med-Pa
约翰，我从来没有直接看到它们朝我飞过来，但它们
حسنًا. سأضغط على زر الإدخال مع
네. 지금 보여드릴 
Oh, è vero. Oh, lo sapevo. Non ci s
– – Sie sind gewissermaßen nicht
Р
Окей, Скотт, дела здесь идут отлично. Собираюсь разобраться с системой охлаждения, и твой комментарий был очень кстати. Если есть время, обычно можно и 
Ok, pericynthion più 2 nel MPL, 079, 27, 4013, più 08144, meno 00443, meno 00226, N/D, più 00205, 08455, 4
Houston, Apollo 8
네. 제 생각에 기본적인 질문은 여기 있는 공과 창밖으로 보이는 공을 비교해 보면 그다지 이상해 보이지 않는다는 것입니다. 짐은 기체가 눈으로 봤을 때보다 약간 요(yaw)와 롤(roll) 방향으로 기울어져 있다고 말하지만, 공기압 게이지는 롤과 요 모두 왼쪽 최대
没错。接下来你要做的就是设置任务计时器，我们现在只在MDC上启用了任务计时器。你可能需要在这里等他们完成上行链路连接，这样你
Итак. После Томми Джейкобса у нас есть сенсационное мнение местного хьюстонского астролога по имени Руби Грэм. Она говорит, что все знаки зодиака верны для вашего путешествия на Луну. Нил умён, Майк обладает хорошим чутьём, а Базз способен решать сложные проблемы. Она также говорит, что Нил склонен смотреть на мир сквозь розовые очки, но всегда готов помочь стр
حسنًا. هذا ما سنفعله. سننتظر حتى يحصل الناس على أجهزتهم، ثم سنناقش الأمر وننسق الأمور هنا، ونتأكد من عدم وجود أي مشاكل في واجهة المستخدم. وإذا كانت لدينا أي أسئلة أخرى
Roger, j'ai eu un petit moment de flottement en rep
그리니치 표준시 기준 16시 45분에 테
早
了解。プラス1418、マイナス16505、12904、36160。シリウスとリゲルの星座と一直線。137、311、339
这跟我们之前零分时的音调态度差不多，不是吗
Думаю, вы все об этом задумывались, но какие тяжелые предметы мы можем хранить там, где обычно ра
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया। 11 की प्रतिलिपि बनाने के लिए तैया
Sigma Se
Роджер. Зде
Okay. Wir haben I
로저, 여기는 제미니 4호입니다. 조종사는 약 20분 전에 일어나서 3시간 반 정도 잤습니다. 깊은 잠은 아니었고, 깼다 깨다를 반복하는 형태였지만, 어쨌든 잠을 자긴 했습니다. 아침으로는 시리얼, 오렌지 주스, 베이컨과 계란, 그리고
Хорошо. И у нас есть небольшое дополнение к процедуре, о которой мы вам зачитывали ранее, которое касается перед
На странице 28, шаг 4, выполните следующие изменения в состоянии индикаторов предупреждения. Под индикаторами предупреж
Ora accendiamo la
Стены выглядят изрытыми ямками. И это неудивительно, ведь они не заделаны. Изрытые ямками, они выглядят так, будто кто-то вертикально
Хорошо, Джек. В обновлении плана полета есть несколько пунктов, и первым из них мы хо
Okay
Questo 
아주 좋습니다. 현재 
Good evening. This is the Commander of Apollo 11. A hundred years ago, Jules Verne wrote a book about a voyage to the Moon. His spaceship, Columbia, took off from Florida and landed in the Pacific Ocean after completing a trip to the Moon. It seems appropriate to us to share with you some of the reflections of the crew as the modern day Columbia completes its rendezvous with the planet Earth and the same Pacific Ocean tomorrow. First, Mik
Cavolo! È quasi impossibile vedere fuo
彼に「Anchors Aweigh」を歌ってもらうように頼んでみま
Vedete Castor
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们预计充电将在45分钟内完成。完
Negative. We don't believe so, Apollo 11. We think 
本当に、私が見た中で最も美しい光景の一つは、下を見下ろしてフロリダの南端、キューバ島、プエルトリコ、そしてサンタドミンゴ島を眺めた時でした
Roger. Wir haben
رجّه
Canary CAP COM. Nous n'avons plus rien. Nous reston
Roger. Vers
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。大约有50%的时间，当您在
Pour votre information, Columbia, vous approchez de la limite de portée de communication V
好的。一些旁观电视行业的人对滤镜有一些想法，想看看他们想尝试哪些新方法。我想把他们的想法读给
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Sole, voglio lasciare un segno qui quando tramonterà il sole. Il sole è all'orizzonte in questo momento, un blu brillante da entra
Oka
Хорошо. Фрэнк, наша процедура заключается в выборе платформы и выполнении выравнивания. После этого мы вышлем вам 
E tornando a Washington, la Commissione per i Modi e i Mezzi della Camera ha approvato modifiche fiscali che riguardano compagnie petrolifere, banche e servizi pubblici, che potrebbero aggiungere quasi 2 miliardi all'anno alle entrate federali. E, sempre oggi, la NASA ha annunciato che lancerà un grande laboratorio orbitale nel 1972, con una versione ridotta del Saturn V. E le tue immagini televi
بشكل عام، لا يبدو أن قضاء الوقت في الظل له أي تأثيرات حرارية داخل البدلة. بالطبع، هناك فرق في الإشعاع والخوذة. لذا أعتقد أن هناك ميلًا للشعور ببرو
This isn't recommended with... glo
Ora si mantiene a 82
Vediamo, queste cose sono nel modulo di comando, non è ver
알겠습니다. 
Buzz, ich habe hier 39,5 Volt eingestellt; das ist eine Erinnerung an den Batterietest – gut sichtbar an der Wand. Okay, Nei
側面では、デ
D'accord. Nous voulons que vous régliez le minuteur de votre événement sur 15 minutes et RKV effectuera le comptage pour vou
रॉजर। समझ गया। ह
كما تعلم،
いつかMOCR全体を持ち運べるようになるといいな。アンテナ切り替えの手間が省けるから
OAMS를 별도로 분리하시겠습니
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Один из больших кратеров на задней стороне — я заметил небольшую темную точку на внешней стенке и навел на нее монокуляр. Мне удалось увидеть — ну, область диаметром примерно в четверть мили. Это была действительно свежая, темная яма, и это, кажется, контрастирует со всеми другими свежими маленькими кратерами или отверстиями, которые можно заметить на стенках любого из этих кратеров. Вокруг этого конкретного кратера, кажет
Neil, dov'è il
分かりました。チャーリー、今のこの設定では、ピッチ＆ロールのATTホールドモードは使える
Now we've got what I would consider darn near perfect star-seeing conditions
Roger. Un dernier p
Ok, abbiamo appena finito di farlo poco fa. A circa metà strada, sul lato nottur
Roger. Going back on. Yaw check okay. Can pick up yaw fairly well in the scope. It's a little 
بدأت علاق
好的，吉姆。飞行计划有更新。你做了星体可见性检查，目前看来，Navi 仍然是我们的目标星体，相关的数值是：横滚 102.6，俯仰 328.9，偏航 346.3。这得出轴和耳轴为零。如果你觉得可以——如果你觉得你能用
네, 맞습니다, 잭. 이제 1-6페이지로 가보죠. 페이지 아래쪽 3분의 1쯤에 "Panel 275 CB MAI
नही
Roger, verstehe die Rückkehr zur Umlaufba
لم ننتهِ بعد. ما زال أمامنا 100 ألف ميل. كما تعلم، نشعر وكأن كل شيء
Ro
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。迈克，你的阻抗呼吸仪读数仍然很平坦。今晚睡觉前，你可以试试在传感器上涂
로저. 
마이크, 실내가 좀 습해지는 것 같아요. 재생음이 들리네요. 실내가 꽤 습한 것 같습니다. 실내 온도 조절 장치를 자동 모드로 다시 설정하는 게 좋을 것 같아요. 글
Нет, я не тако
はっきり聞
Esatto, Buzz; e l'ultimo punto qui, ti chiediamo di fare una correzione, anche se non stiamo effettuando una correzione 
现在我的三个轴向运动速率都接近于0。当然，潜望镜里仍然有光。我正直视上方，然而此时此刻，我的姿态——让我先坐到沙发上吧。我实在无法准确判断，我现在几乎是倒立的，鼻子都高于地平线了。因此，我注意到这些粒子始终相对于我向后移动
음, 여
로저. 47페이지 1단계에 따라
로저. 13-2 120. 2+33. 01 10 10 
ジェミニ4号、こちらRKVです。聞こえますか
حسنًا. نلاحظ أن زاوية ال
11, Houston. We see the - still see the banding along the intratropical convergence. I guess the most predominate one now is around the - up in the - around the equator or slig
Хорошо,
我在这里什么也想不
C4 est éteint; B3 est éteint. Le transpondeur est sur CHAUFFAGE, ce qui revient à être éteint, et mes réacteurs de roulis sont de nouveau opér
オートワン、こちらシグマセブン。聞こえま
Yes, I think so. Stand by 1 second and I'll see if FLI
И, Хьюстон, Водолей. Я не уверен, что если я буду следовать за стрелками
ロジャー、11。こちらはヒューストンです。お
了解、ヒューストン。アポロ11号が約13万マ
This is Friendship Seve
水尝起来没问题，一切正常。我们现在觉得睡在沙发底下更舒服。之前几个小时我一直和弗兰克待在这儿，
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo su Marte entro il 2000, ma i leader democratici hanno risposto che la priorità deve essere data alle esigenze sulla Terra. Agnew, alto funzionario governativo al decollo dell'Apollo 11 mercoledì, apparentemente parlava a nome suo e non necessariamente dell'amministrazione Nixon quando ha affermato: "A mio giudizio, dovremmo mand
로저, 케이프. 추진제 스위치를
जी हां। पैनल 11 पर सर्किट ब्रेकर 
Lassen Sie die Gyroskope bei Bedarf in der freien Position arbeiten
Apollo 8, Houston. Roger. Verstanden. 5C und 5D sind auf Hochspannung; 6A und 6D sind auf Hochspannung; 6
Es liegt eigentlich nicht am Manometer selbst. Es liegt daran, dass der Entlüftungsdru
Autre information utile pour l'équipe en charge des systèmes de l'équipage: dites-leur qu'il est inutile d'installer le réfrigérateur à bord. Je viens de sortir des hot-dogs, et ils s
了解しました。点火への進入経路に近づいています。これは点火の13分前に相当し、
Qu'avez-vous retiré du P30 en te
هل تتذكر أي 
इनमें से कुछ छोटे गड्ढे धंस जाते हैं - लगभग 2 या 3 इंच तक। सर्वेक्षकों द्वारा ली गई तस्वीरों में जो दिखाया गया था, ठीक वही स्थिति है। मिट्टी की ऊपरी सतह से बल संचारित होता है और लगभग 5 या 6 इंच की मिट्टी टूटकर अलग हो जाती है और ऐसे हिलती है जैसे सतह पर जमी हो, जबकि वास्तव में ऐसा 
わかりました。では、できる限り私たち
휴스턴 이글입니다. 시간 되시면 LCG 연결해 
로저, 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 저는 지금
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. Thirty-minute report follows: Head movements cause no nausea or no bad feelings at all. I am surprised that I can look as close to the sun as I can; the sun is shining directly on my face at present time, and all I have to do is to shade my eyes with my eyebrow. All fuse switches are still as previously reported on left panel. Mode Select is normal, auto, gyro normal: Squib is armed, Auto Retrojettison is off. All "T" handles are in except manual and I have it pulled so that I can immediately go to manual as a backup in case the malfunctions further. The Rescue Aids are normal. Landing bag is off. All other sequence panel items are in normal position. Control fuel is 68-100 [percent], repeat, 68-100. EPI is indicating my approxima
ح
... rufe
好的，吉姆，还有几分钟。一切看起来都很顺利。你在卡那封的时间应该没问题，至于舷内机为什么提前熄火，我们目前还不太清楚，只知
ठीक है।
Go
谢
जैक, ऐसा लगता है कि जब हम इस कोण पर 239 डिग्री के आसपास पहुंचे, तो यह किसी
Это «Дружба Семь». Похоже, ч
Neil, this is Housto
As you might know, Joe, I've got the center seat, again and I can't see a thin
好的，乔
しかし、あなたに連絡する必要がある場合
Roger, Frank. La température du réservoir d'hélium que nous surveillons sur le quad A n'a augmenté que d'un degré pendant toute cette intervention. Nous ne considérons donc pas cela comme trop préoccupant
- - 
C
Très bien. Ceci est une remarque générale qui s'applique à chaque fois que vous travaillez avec des instructions `and` ou que vous passez d'une instruction `and` à une autre. Il est important de ne pas appeler de verbe étendu pendant ce temps. Cette information figure dans 
ठीक है। यह तेज़ वापसी के लिए एक पेरीसिंथियन प्लस 2 है। यह / 62871, माइनस 161, प्लस 129, प्लस 45224, माइनस 06216, माइनस 18712 001 287 351, नवंबर अल्फ़ा प्लस 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, पृथ्वी ऊपर 010, दाएँ 37, प्लस 1475, प्लस 06500 13239 36913 होगा; प्राथमिक तारा सीरियस, द्वितीयक रिगेल 129 155 010, कोई उलेज नहीं, मध्यमार्ग सुधार 4 के निष्पादन को मानता है और उसी संरेखण का उपयोग करता है। GERU निर्धारण के लिए 5 का समय - यानी गोल्फ इको रोमियो यूनिफॉर्म - यह होगा; एनसी-4 के चरण 1 से 10 और एनसी-8 के चरण 3 और 4 का उपयोग करें। मैं फिर से कहता हूँ, नवंबर चार्ली 4 के चरण 
حسناً
حسنًا. لقد واجهنا بعض المشاكل مع شاشات العرض لدينا، وأعتقد أنها قد تم حلها الآن، ولكن قد يتعين عليك إبلاغنا إذا نفدت حدود ا
Roger. D
نعم. لوحة المخططات لدينا تُظهر رقماً مما
On capte beaucoup de bruit de fond en ce moment. Si vous pouviez patienter une
지금 짐 쪽은 완전히 대낮이고, 제 쪽 창밖으로는 아직 별들이 조금 보입니다. 우주선은 한쪽은 어둡게, 다른 쪽은 밝게 유지할 수 있도록 방향을 조절할 수 있는 것 같습니다. 지금 짐 쪽은 확실히 대낮이고 제 쪽은 어둡습니다. 비행 초반에 부스터에서 반짝이는 작은 반딧불이들을 보면서 주변이 얼마나 어두운지 감탄했던 게 가장 놀라웠던 점 중 하나입니다. 짐을 보니 그는 완전히 대낮처럼 밝은 창밖을 보고 있더군요.
Quanto sono grandi le pietre che hai appena rac
等等。刚才那个操作是在ATT HOLD模式下
Zwei psi. Hast du das verstanden, Ed? Wir schließen jetzt das Entlüftungsventil und überprüfen d
سيتم وضع أكمام بدلة إد والملابس السميكة الإض
यह सही ह
Вперед, про
Okay. There's no hurry on that. Just wondered if you had done it; we will 
彼は、真剣に言うと、おそらくもう何も残らないだろう
हाँ। ठीक है। लेकिन मुझे याद नहीं आ रहा था कि क्या..
はい。そ
Here is an interesting little feature item that is kind of good to hear. It seems that up in Ann Arbor, Michigan, they have a new youth gang. It's called the Gilnet Gang. It roams the streets of Ann Arbor, acting in secret, and sometimes bypassing the law. They call themselves the Guerillas for Good. Some of the things they have done is, painted a bridge that was covered with obscenities. They painted it one night. A condemned house with - it's popular with neighborhood children, but dangerous, was boarded up. Downtown planters unfilled because of a debate over which group was responsible, business or government, were filled with flowers. A hedge, thought to be hampering vision, at busy intersection was trimmed, and the owner was angered. Trash along a portion of the Huron River was picked up. Members of the gang are anonymous teenagers who ask for no individual recognition. Their aim is to slice red tape, to get things - good things in their opinion - done. The organization has a faint religious overtone. It's sort of an ecumenical group, said an assistant professor at the University of Michigan who acts as an informal sounding board for the gang's ideas. The name is from St. Peter, the Fisherman's Net. And it is remote enough not to be identified with any particular church. There is a thread of Robin Hood running through this thing, said their teacher, who also prefers to remain anonymous. A lot of their activities are extra-legal. When the system bogs down, they directly administer good, rather than go through the red tape channels. The gang is made up of about 55 highschool k
نحن نمرّ فوق سلسلة فوهات ميسييه الآن، وننظر إليها عموديًا من الأعلى، وفي فوهة ميسييه أ نرى كتلًا كبير
ठी
Вчера Комитет по бюджету и налогообложению Палаты представителей также согласовал изменения в налогообложении, затрагивающие нефтяные компании, а также банки и коммунальные предприятия, которые могут увеличить федеральные доходы на 2 миллиарда долларов в год. Комитет также предварительно проголосовал за изменение процедур бухгалтерского учета для телефонных, электроэнергетических, газо- и нефтепроводных компаний и за сокращение налоговых льгот для взаимны
ジェミニVI。MDIUの量をご確認いただけ
खेल जगत की बात करें तो, चलिए देखते हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों में जब आप व्यस्त थे, तब जो नामाथ और फुटबॉल कमिश्नर पीट रोज़ेल ने घोषणा की कि "ब्रॉडवे जो" ने बैचलर्स III रेस्टोरेंट में अपनी हिस्सेदारी बेचने और न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स में शामिल होने पर सहमति जताई है। जो आज जेट्स के ट्रेनिंग कैंप में पहुंचे और उन्होंने अपना पहला अभ्यास सत्र किया। जो के साथ कई अन्य जेट्स खिलाड़ी भी शामिल हुए, जिन्होंने पहले विरोध किया था। और जैक्सन, मिशिगन के डेवी हिल ने पिछले सप्ताह अपने तीसरे मेजर गोल्फ टूर्नामेंट में जीत हासिल की। ​​उन्होंने फिलाडेल्फिया क्लासिक जीता। हिल इस साल अब तक चार टूर्नामेंट जीत चुके हैं और 129,000 डॉलर की शानदार जीत के साथ इस साल सबसे ज्यादा पुरस्कार जीतने वाले खिलाड़ी हैं। बेसबॉल की बात करें तो, नेशनल लीग के पश्चिमी डिवीजन में कड़ी टक्कर जारी है। लॉस एंजिल्स और सैन फ्रांसिस्को लीग में शीर्ष पर चल रही अटलांटा से एक गेम पीछे हैं। एस्ट्रोस का रिकॉर्ड 48 जीत और 48 हार का है और वे अब पांचवें स्थान पर हैं, सात गेम पीछे। कल रात एस्ट्रोस और सिनसिनाटी के बीच होने वाला मैच बारिश के कारण स्थगित कर दिया गया था। शिकागो कब्स अभी भी पूर्वी डिवीजन में पहले स्थान पर हैं। वे न्यूयॉर्क मेट्स से साढ़े चार गेम आगे हैं। और अमेरिकन लीग में, बाल्टीमोर पूर्वी डिवीजन का खिताब जीतने की ओर तेज़ी से बढ़ रहा है। वे दूसरे स्थान पर मौजूद बोस्टन से 11 गेम आगे हैं। आगे की बात करें
Questa è Friendship Seven, che trasmette nella capsula. L'alba è spuntata dietro il periscopio. Era brillante nel mirino, di un rosso brillante mentre si avvicinava all'orizzonte e s
C'est exact, Jack. Nous avons annoté la liste de vérification de la configuration au décollage et nous la passero
Es funktioniert nicht wirklich,
了解。プラス11をコピーする準備ができま
Ну, она простирается по всей длине секстанта. На самом деле, я мог видеть, как мы приближаемся, когда двигались в этом направлении, потому что полоса света в сканирующем телескопе пересекала область, где находилась Луна, и перемещалась в этом районе. Я думаю, это вызвано преломлени
Roger. J'ai tout mangé sauf le jus d'orange, et je l'ai perdu
А
Versea
Canary Cap Com, ici Sigma Sept. UHF. Vous m
Rog
Neg
Ich habe es bereits geladen. Ich glaube nicht, dass das einen großen Unter
Apollo 8, Houston. Pronti per il passaggio di consegne da Carnarvon a Guam al
ठीक है। आप कुछ समय लेकर सबसे 
حسناً. هذا ص
ठीक है। और क्या हम ओम्नी सिस्टम से काम करना जारी रख पाएंगे, जैक? तो क्या मैं एस-बैंड एंटीना
わかりました、ヴァンスさん。手順は
Roger. 10
Sembrano tutte le comodità d
Neil, this is Houston
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправи
로저, 그 부분은 저희가 확인하겠습니다. 존, 레트로 시퀀스 시작 카운트다운을 알려드리겠습니다. 아주
好的。安装好 BATTERY B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING 之后，我想把面板 275 MAIN B 上的 - 推到 BAT BU
قاعدة ترانكويليتي، هذه هيوستن. في مخطط الرحلة، نوضح أن قاطع دائرة التحكم في الاس
À cet instant, les rayons du soleil se réfléchissent sur le nez du vaisseau, l'obscurcissant complètement. Quelques étoiles brillantes sont visibles à gauche et en dessous. Je distingue maintenant la ceinture d'Orion. Sirius se trouve donc bien en dessous de notre axe de vision. Je ne reconnais pas cette
Ok. Rileggo: monitorare la quantità nell'accumulatore secondario; valvola secondaria del radiatore del glicole, NORMALE per 30 secondi, poi in BYPASS. Se non diminuisce la quantità nell'accumulatore secondario, glicole secondario alla valvola del radiatore in NORMALE. Pompa del circuito del refrigerante secondario, AC 1 o 2. Dopo 3 minuti, verificare la pressione di scarico secondaria del glicole da 39 a 51 psig. Verificare che la temperatura di uscita dell'evap
Okay. We are getting ready to have a shift turnover, and I wanted to go over a few items before right now, that looks like it is at most 0.3 a foot per second, so there will be no bur
هذه مركبة فري
크고 
好的，Vance。我已连接，准备
Это Тананарив на КВ. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10 - 9, 8, 
好的，弗雷德。我建议你把BIOMED开关关掉。我们之前一直没
罗杰。PAD：TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50，减 00021，182 287 000，加 56919。中止，少于 10 分钟，105 12 30.00。中止，大于 10 分钟，103 40 00.00 107
Что касается вашей ситуации с водой, Джек, то в ближайшие несколько часов у нас будет довольно активная работа по её восстановлению, и мы рассчитываем, что вы сможете наполнить свои баки самостоятельно, прежде
Einstellungen interessieren mich überhaupt nicht. Ich weiß, dass ich frei treibe. Der Mond ist erst vor Kurzem am Fenster vorbeig
Zut! Je vais avoir la
روجر. عادةً ما يتم ذلك تلقائيًا يا جيم؛ ولو كنت قد نفذت الخطوات كما هو مُجدول تمامًا، لكان الأمر قد تم، ولكن كان هناك بعض الشك، فتوقفنا قبل حوالي 7 دقائق من ن
Roger. On my last slee
好的，供电转换时间为57小时11分钟。据我所知，我
ジェミニ4、カナリアC
好的。好的。现在来填——你现在是82……80、81、82都下去了。你应该走了。是
حسنًا. البطارية أ 38.3، البطارية ب 36.9، البطارية ج 38.5. يبدو الوضع جيدًا. يبدو أننا أع
ठीक है; जिम, बढ़िया। पंक्ति 2 में, सिस्टम A के नीचे: एसेन्ट फीड 2 और एसेन्ट फीड 1 खुले होने चाहिए। मिशन टाइमर खुला होना चाहिए; गास्टा खुला होना चाहिए; एसी बस A के नीचे: गास्टा खुला होना चाहिए। बाकी सब 
Bonjour Houston. Quel e
Понял. И если управляемая антенна не совсем справится с взлетом, похоже, передняя всенаправленная антенна будет работать еще примерно 30-60 секунд после старта. А затем задняя всенаправленная антенна будет работать до конца по
Flight advises that if you do get a Running Light indication during the second set of tests, then go bac
Хорошо, Джек. Зарядка батареи B прекраще
Houst
- - N slash A in the، وأعطيتني زوايا GDA لزاوية ميل 5.86، وتر
Houston CAP COM, 
मैं इसे शून्य के जितना करीब ला सकता हूँ, उतना करीब ला रहा हूँ। 02:17:49 पर, मेरी दरें शून्य हैं और दृष्टिकोण शून्य प्लस हैं, या शून्य, माइनस 3, माइनस 48 पर हैं। इन्हें थोड़ी देर के लिए स्थिर रहने दें, और मैं 
Хорошо. Я вам расскажу. Я буду проходить по очереди и ждать вашего подтверждения, прежде че
맞습니다. 좋습니다. 다음으로, 모드 - 자세 설정이 완료되면, 모드 제어 자동(MODE CONTROL AUTO)을 누르십시오. 회전율을 모니터링하려면 키를 누르십시오. 초당 0.1도 미만이면 모든 축의 회전율을 모니터링하고, 플러스-X 스러스터를 비
收到，鹰。我们五分钟就到。真漂亮。
Okay, sounds good, we'll giv
CB MAIN Baker，BAT 
روجر. هذه هي الصداقة 
Ed iniziò a stivare le cose e, non appena arrivammo al punto in cui non era più possibile armeggiare con il booster, iniziai ad aiutarlo a tempo pieno, almeno tenendo le cose, stivandole e cercando di evitare che sparissero. Più velocemente lavoravamo, più eravamo indietro. Non perché non stessimo sistemando le cose come dovevano essere, ma ci volle molto più tempo del previsto. In realtà non era molto più facile a gravità zero che nel simulatore, seppur altrettanto facile. Quindi lavorammo a tutto campo. Quando arrivammo a Carnarvon, avevo deciso che non ce l'avremmo fatta, ma pensavo che avremmo continuato ancora un po'. Quando arrivammo a Carnarvon, o poco prima ancora di partire, mi fu chiaro che non potevamo superare la depressurizzazione. 
알
روج
Okay. Ich verstehe dich 
C'est exact. On a commencé à avoir une indication erratique sur le signal principal, alors on est passés au secondaire, et c'était encore erratique. J'ai pensé que ça pouvait être un problème de capteur. Mais c'est r
当我们把推进速率降到我们认为可以安全脱离的程度后，我们便脱离了对接，并以每秒几英尺的速度尽快远离了阿金纳空间站。我们一直密切关注着推进剂的剩余量，它从50%下降到了30%以下。在关闭了OAMS系统后，我们仍然保持偏置功率，所有发动机阀门都已关闭，飞船仍在滑行；我们启动了RCS系统。没有发生ACME（加速、加速、减速和减速）故障，我们缓慢地在DIRECT模式下重
ठीक है, जिम। मेरे पास बस आखिरी तीन ब्लॉक बचे हैं। अक्षांश, माइनस 021.62; देशां
ठीक है। अगर वे यहाँ कुछ घंटों के लिए रुक सकते हैं, अगर उनके पास कुछ भी हो, तो बस उन्हें बता दें कि मैं ज़िंदा हूँ, और मैं अपना काम खत्म करके यहाँ सबको सबक सिखाऊँगा। मैं तो दुनिया को यह भी बता दूँगा कि मुझे पता ही नहीं चला कि उनके छोटे एम्पलीफायर 
Да. Похоже, если мы будем отслеживать эти факторы, то, очевидно, не буде
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 잔지바르 캡 콤입니다. 
Сейчас мы находимся в позиции "резервуара для отходов", и мы сбрасываем отходы в первый резервуар UCD
好的，很好。接下来我们要做的就是初始化，这在录入清单第 2-1
フライ・バイ・ワイヤのときに、姿勢が保
Man sollte sich dringend darum kümmern, diese Fenster zu reparieren. Die drei Fenster – die Dachluke und die beiden Seitenfenster – sind wirklich fast unbrauchbar, weil
Это подтверждено. Давайте вернемся к с
Nos 
Roger, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich gebe Ihnen meine Zeit durch: Die verstrichene Zeit in meiner Kapsel beträgt 4 + 31 + 35. Auf mein Ko
Während wir in diese Richtung nach oben blicken, sehen wir durch unsere Seitenfenster die vorbeiziehende Sonne und natürlich durch eines unserer Fenster die Erde. Direkt hinter meinem Fenster befindet sich die Sonne, da sie die Sternenkarten beleuchtet, die wir sehen. Diese Linie stellt die Ekliptik dar, und diese vertikalen Linien repräsentieren unser Bezugssystem, das das Raumschiff derzeit verwendet. Wenn wir uns dem Mond nähern, wird dieser allmählich größer und schließlich die Sonne verdecken, während wir uns dem Ei
Well, I'm reading 70 [degrees]. I'm really a little at a loss as to how to get it down, m
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Veuillez repasser en mode RÉENTRÉE. Vous avez bien reçu
휴스턴 트랭퀼리티 기지. 334를 추천하며, 그러면 제한 범위 내에 들 것입니
Roger. Seems nominal here. Everything looks good. Got 55 percent auto fuel. Passing through 70,000 feet, 65,000. Attitudes are very stable. Coming up on 60 (thousand). Rate command doing very well. Coming up on 50 (thousand). She looks like a sweety. Coming up on 45,000. I'm down to about 1 g. Preparing to punch the, at 40, 41 (thousand). I'm punching, and the is out. You can hear it; I can't see it because of the clouds. Attitudes are holding well. Manual lever is in. fuel is going p
Okay, Jack. Lass mich mal sehen, ob ich es richtig verstanden habe. Wir richten das Fluggerät wie beim Mittelkurs auf die Erde aus und führen eine Ausrichtung entlang der Körperachse durch. Dann gibst du uns die Fluglage vor, und dann richten wir das Fluggerät auf den Mond aus. Anschließend aktualisierst du die Anzeige – gibst uns CDUs für die Grob- und Feinausrichtung – auf Sterne, Mond oder Erde. Bitte warten. Okay. Wir hatten einen weiteren Hauptalarm, Jack. Ich sehe da unten keine Lichter, außer der Batterieleuchte, die noch leuchtet. Du willst – – … Anzeige. Okay. Und die zweite Batterie hat immer noch eine Leuchte. Ich vermute, es ist dasselbe Problem 
イーグル、ヒューストンはブラインド。低ビット
It does keep 
الانحراف لليسار ليس جيداً. لنرَ ما لدينا
Pictures of whirls taken, just east of Bermuda, now the balloon li
ヒューストン、アポ
Sì. Abbiamo deciso di usare un contenitore e, come sapete, l'indumento raffreddato a liquido è circondato da una sacca che pensiamo di poter usare anche noi, o che sappiamo di poter usare. Ci abbiamo provato. Quindi quello che abbiamo è una sacca dentro un'altra sacca e al suo interno c'è l'indumento raffreddato a liquido. La sacca più vicina all'indumento raffreddato a liquido è quella che ci serve, e ne abbiamo due. E poi, ovviamente, dobbiamo usare del nastro adesivo e, come dici tu, uno d
रॉजर। बस यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि चांद की लाल और नीले फिल्टर वाली तस्वीरें लेने की लालसा इस टीवी परीक्षण में न आ जाए। हमने चांद की लाल और नीले फिल्टर वाली तस्व
Yes, I've got to get the launch checklist. And we're going to 
I still hear it. It sounds like somebody bangi
Das war der Brand, den wir gerade verursacht haben. Hast du zwischen dem Brand und dem Zeitpunkt, als du für diese Wache aufgestanden bist, überhaupt geschlaf
Je le sais, je le sais — 295. Température A — 87. Pression A — 3000. Température B — 82. Pression B — 2650. Ampèremètre principal — 19. N° 2 — 19,5. 1A — 4,5. 1B — 4,5. 1C — 4. 2A — 5. 2B — 4,75. 2C — 4,75. Tension continue 23,5. S1 — 29. S2 — 29. C — 27. 1A — 24. 1B — 24. 1C — 24. Temps moyen de G
حسن
300 Fuß tiefer, 3,5, 47 vorwärts. Steigung – 1 pro Minute, 1,5 abwärts. Be
أيضًا، سبعة. في الساعة، والتي من المتوق
Vance, have you al
E, Jim, il nostro piano attuale è di non correggere il... Prenderemo tutto quello che avremo
我们——我们会尝试自己切换
C'est exact. Le contrôle d'étanchéité
Okay, 
Odyssey, H
Roger. Hallo Capcom, Friendship Seven. Wie 
好的。请再告诉我一下什么
I say we're starting to stow the spacecraft and get all squared away and then be sleeping and eating. We'll be al
ठीक ह
VI, 복사할 준비
Apollo
休斯顿，阿波罗11
1시
이 함선은 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 망원경으로 보나 창밖으로 보
Итак, экипаж. Пожалуй, единственное, что я могу вам сейчас сообщить, это обновление информации о вашей стартовой площадке на 35-й час после старта. Это изменение по сравнению с площадкой, которую мы вам предоставили вчера. Причина обновления — избегание неблагоприятных погодных условий в районе посадки в центральной части Тихого океана на 70-м часу, что соответствует времени возвращения на эту площадку. И если у вас возникнут вопросы, мы не ожидаем никаких проблем в конце миссии. Неблагоприятные погодные условия наблюдаются в 20 градусах к югу от точки посадки в кон
O
C'est bon. Nous avons bien reçu votre TR et votre Gemini. Vo
好的，如果您愿意的
Einen Moment bitte, Frank. Wir haben bemerkt, dass du etwas gereizt bist, und ich werde mir deine To
好的。4号面板：电信，1组将关闭。我们之前合上的所有
Right in this area I don't think t
Okay. On the 226 circuit breakers that I read up, they are - there are six circuit breakers in
قواطع الدائرة، درجة الصوت 1، الانحراف 1، درجة الصوت
Ein paar Zeilen weiter unten, wo „DAC ON for 4 seconds at
C'
好吧，没问题。你可能大约两
휴스턴,
Okay, Fred. maneuver purpose is PC plus 2, to this time, we're going to the MPL. And , 079, 27, 4013, plus 08144, minus 00443, minus 02226, apogee is N/A, perigee is plus 00205, 08455, 420, 268, 261, plus 08155, minus 00443, minus 02
Okay. Ich fange mal ganz von vorne an. Nur zur Sicherheit: Es gibt vielleicht ein paar Überschneidungen, aber wir wollen ja sichergehen, dass wir alle vom Gleichen sprechen. Wir beginnen mit einer Reihe von Zeitleistenverfahren, die uns schließlich zur normalen Checkliste führen. Es wird einige Änderungen an der Checkliste im Handbuch geben, aber der Großteil dessen, was ich für Sie habe, betrifft die Zeitleiste. Sie beginnt 6 Stunden und 30 Minuten vor dem eigentlichen Zeitpunkt und setzt voraus, dass wir MAIN B im Kommandomodul mit Strom versorgen. Ich denke, Sie kennen bereits die Nummern für die Pads und die P
Okay, e sei davvero bravo. È un... È un piacere non avere tutto quel rumore. Lascia che ti dica cosa voglio fare, Jim. Come ho detto, non ti daremo procedure dettagliate, ora. Quello che ci aspettiamo di avere per te a breve sono procedure che cercheremo di farti avere nella forma seguente. Innanzitutto, avremo una timeline, una sorta di piano di volo, che conterrà gli orari di tutti gli eventi principali e qualsiasi configurazione, impostazione degli interruttori e così via che siano peculiari della nostra configurazione e che, quindi, non troverai nella checklist. Questo, ad e
Exactement, ça sonne b
没错。这套装置现在还真挺复杂，就靠这些软管支撑着。还有那位设计工程师……因
D'acc
हाँ। 
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. End
きっとそうだったと思います。だって、私ならすぐに気付いていたはずですから。これまでの飛行で一度だけ、大きな推力をかけてしまったんです。手動プロ
로저, 11. F2-20페이지 A열 5번째 줄의 새 데이터는 01042이고, 7번째 줄의 새 데이터는 00256입니다. 11번째 줄은 00070, 12번째 줄은 00042, 13번째 줄은 77730입니다. 브라보 열의 3번째, 4번째, 5번째 줄은 현재 비어 있는데, 3번째 줄은 0, 4번째 줄은 20017, 5번째 줄은 2
告诉你，我们现在完全颠倒了。我猜，即使我头朝下，你也
好的。我可以确认所有加热器都已关闭。杰
मुझे नहीं लगता कि उनका इरादा यही था, बिल। उनका विचार यह था कि सूट हीट एक्सचेंजर दोनों लूपों पर काम करे; और अगर वे ज़्यादा ठंडे हो जाएँ, तो पैनल स्विचिंग का इस्तेमाल करके हीट एक्सचेंजर के ज़रिए प्राइमरी लूप को बंद किय
그건 확
Thanks a bunch. Okay, I'll read these quantities off. The GMT was 1716 when we started. 
रॉजर, जैक। कॉपी। बहुत
जब ये बाकी लोग चांद को देख रहे हैं, मैं ये सुनिश्चित करना चाह
नहीं, नहीं। हम आपकी शक्ल-सूरत पर कोई टिप्पणी नहीं कर रहे हैं, फ्रेड। हमारा मतलब कुछ भी अपमानजनक कहना नह
休斯顿，您好。我们
よし。電力系統に切り替えて、問題なさそうだ。「CAUTION AND WARNING POWER」のランプと、すべての赤信号が点灯しているのをじっと見ている。X系統のLUNAR BUS TIEブレーカーは両方とも「IN」になっている。「UTILITY LIGHTING」のブレーカーも「IN」になっている。「AC BUS B HEL
안녕하세요, 카나리 캡 통신사, 오로라 세븐입니다. 잘 들립니다. 
This is Friendship Seven still o
Okay. BAT CHARGE, OFF; AC INVERTER 2 to OFF; MAIN BUS TIE, BAT B/C 
रॉजर, समझ गया। जब ऐसा होगा तो मुझे मैन्युअल रूप से 0.05 ग्राम दर्ज करना होगा और स्कोप को मैन्युअल रूप से लाना होगा। क
Через 25 минут перейду к о
Wir sehen, dass Sie die Abdeckung der Abbruc
Похоже, в S-диапа
Вы пробовали использовать функцию Aux Damp в режиме электронного управления дроссельной з
ठीक है। हमें समझ आ गया। हम आपको एक स्टेट वेक्टर भेज रहे है
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 방금 들으신 음성 백업을 또렷하게 들었습니다. 남은 교신 시간 동안
Bene. Apollo 13, Housto
乔，杰克告诉我他还是看不清光学设备。我打算再往前挪一点，看看他能不能看清暗区
D'accord, Vance. On a trouvé deux ou trois choses pour la modification de la cartouche. D'abord, le sac anti-poussière spécial qu'on comptait utiliser sur les sacs fourre-tout; il est assez épais et non poreux. Ensuite, on est montés à la cuisine à l'étage, on a vidé l'eau plusieurs fois et on a préparé plein de sachets pour les boissons. Enfin, 
アポロ8
Хьюс
Reg
Хорошо. Мы будем переключаться между системам
Sembra che B non ce l'abbia
Fred, nous venons de perdre d
نعم، حينها يمكنك رؤيت
心配しないで
收到，阿波罗11号。我们已经将你的飞船调整到正向姿态，现在我们需要你——这次点火将使用负X推进器，速度大约为每秒2到3英尺，我们为你准备了载
Я вижу, как двойные звёзды созвездия Грюнберга выстраиваются в линию, сходясь прямо в центре окна. Юпитер, конечно же, очень яркий. Я вижу Анкаа и — поправка — Аль Наир, и это, должно быть, Пикок. Аль Наир находится немного пра
Jim, pour ce soir, je te demande de désactiver les quads C et D. C'est l'inverse 
Roger. Avant d'aller plus loin, nous aimerions voir, essentiellement avec le contrôle de l'évaporateur secondaire, ce que nous avons obtenu lors du co
أوه، لديك بعض الأرقا
这是正确的
Quello che vedi, Joe, è che il comandante ha rimosso il
No, that wire's really gouging me in the hand. I wonder -- if I be
갑자기 조용
Gemini 4，正在发射 UHF 1 号信号。1、2、3
एक्वेरियस, फिलहाल हमारा फैसला है कि हम बाकी चीजों को चालू रखेंगे, बाकी चीजों को बंद कर देंगे और बाकी गैर-जरूरी चीजों को भी बंद कर देंगे। जैसे ही हमें और सटीक चेकलिस्ट 
Roger. Il semble que nous puissions tenter une deuxième orbite, car tout semble al
कृपया ध्यान दें कि आपके टीपीआई और
그리고 
Roger. On that 2O flow transducer down here on telemetry, our values are agreeing pretty well with what you read out onboard, and the EECOMM's have been noticing this cycle, but it still looks like the indicated rate is lower than what we would expect. We're still working on the
阿波罗8号，休
了解しました。これまで発生していた問題は、何らかの原因、おそらく何らかの原因でトラニオンセルに負荷がかかっているため、現在91度になっているため、実際のトラニオン角度を反映していないと考えられます。この負荷の問題は、お客様の機器の信頼性を低下させるものではありません。この問題を回避する最善の方法は、光学機器を使用する前に、OPTICS ZERO
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन CAP COM। अपनी क्
How is it going? Everything is fine here, we are preparing. There is no delay in preparation, nothing 
Find the flight plan, too, while up there
Se avete tempo, siate pronti a fornire il resoconto di cibo e acqua a entrambi duran
好的，收到。代码是 AUTO OPTICS，没有地标。我会继续前进，而不是继续走 89 号公路——或者我会走 34 号公路，而不是继续走
是的。查理，这次的瞬态现象比之前的几次点火更明显。我一开始以为是因为指令舱太轻，但确实出现了相当大的横滚运动，我估计在点火开始后的前20秒左右就减弱了；但之后又出现了一些俯仰和偏航运动。我认为这并不异常，而且横滚运动似乎在中心线两侧约8度的范围内有相当明显的死区；在最初的20秒左右，万向节就停止了运动，俯仰和偏航也相对平静。在此之前，虽然有一些振荡，但主要只是速率上的波动。总姿
ठीक है। जो कचरा दाहिनी ओर वाले खाने के डिब्बे में नहीं आएगा, उसे या तो बाईं ओ
Близнецы 4, у нас хорошее кровяное давление. Не могли 
Роджер. Нужно учесть пару моментов, касающихся плана полета
Den Schubregler-Check h
حسنًا. قبل أن نبدأ هنا، اطلب البيانات وسنقدم لك بعض المتجهات
초당 3피트의 속도로 연소시
كين، هذا فرانك. أريد أن أتأكد من شيء واحد. هذه هي البيانات التي سنستخدمها للحرق،
Roger. You do have your visor closed at th
좋아요. 아래쪽은 괜찮네요. 안으
Amicizia Sette. Ricevuto. Temperatura di scarico, 
是的。我想部分原因是因为你的位置比较偏远。我们只是
Jim, it's been a little warm in the machine throughout yesterday and last night during the. It cooled off somewhat with the windows buttoned up, and we've seen suit temperatures of about - the high 40's
こんにちは、マーキュリー回復部隊の皆さん。オー
いいえ、寝る直前まで何も食べていま
Let me know when it's lunch time, w
好的
トランキリティ、こちらはヒューストンです。観測結果、つまりミッション中に見たものに関する10個ほどの質問があります。今晩少
Nous serons prêts pour le prochain passage du médecin l
Okay, Houston. Per quanto tempo ancora v
Pour information, Joe, nous avons tous repris nos places habituelles, si vous 
और सतह एकदम महीन और पाउडर जैसी है। मैं इसे अपने पैर के अंगू
이해
Хо
了解しました、ジム。COMMの推奨事項を作成しました。うまくいけば、パワーアンプの電源を切ることで電力を節約できるはずです。手順を読み上げて少し考えていただきたい
This is Friendship Seven. This is Friendship Seven, broadcasting in the blind to the Mercu
はい。ブラボー1とブラボー2を有効
Houston, Apollo 8. Stiamo preparando il pasto 4, giorno - cor
Va b
هيوستن، إيجل. لقد اكتمل الحريق. كيف شاهدته؟
Okay. We're suggesting that the LMP rest while the CMP and CDR are awake. LMP ought to hit the sack at about 63 hours, coming up in 25 minutes. And you get to rest for 6 hours. You get up at 69 hours. At 70 hours, the commander and the command module pilot sleep for 6 hours until 76 hour
了解。HFチェック
ठीक है, और मे
Oka
Reticle brightness... I don't know anything about that....
알겠습니다. 저
ठी
That's the way they want you to do it. They want to see if there's any change in the IVI windows as you run through t
Roger. Questa è Friendship Seven. La sfacciataggine dei sistemi di controllo era perfetta. I controlli dei sistemi di controllo eran
Eh bien, c'est tout à fait exact! Super
Okay, meine Sehschärfe ist gut. Ich kann die Sehtafeln problemlos lesen, und auch der Astigmatismus bereitet mir keinerlei Probleme. Auch das H
753 at 09 - 11:09 - Sun right on the horizon. We haven't had much success with the photo-event indicator on the Hasselblad. We have it. Puts the shutters in the - what 
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous avons 
Und, Houston, Tranquility Base möchte Ihnen ein paar Anmerkungen zur geologischen Frage von gestern Abend geben. Wir befinden uns in einem relativ glatten Kraterfeld mit länglichen, kreisförmigen Sekundärkratern, von denen die meisten unabhängig von ihrer Größe einen Rand aufweisen. Das trifft jedoch nicht überall zu. Es gibt einige kleinere Krater, die keinen erkennbaren Rand haben. Der Boden in diesem Gebiet besteht aus sehr feinem Sand bis hin zu Schluff. Ich würde sagen, dass er auf der Erde am ehesten mit Graphitpulver vergleichbar wäre. In diesem Boden finden sich Gesteine ​​unterschiedlichster Formen, Größen und Texturen – abgerundete und kantige –, viele mit unterschiedlicher Konsistenz. Wie bereits erwähnt, habe ich reinen Basalt und blasigen Basalt gesehen. Andere weisen keine Kristalle auf, einige haben kleine weiße Einsprenglinge, vielleicht ein bis weniger als f
जी हाँ, जैक। ठीक है, पृष्ठ 2-5 पर। सबसे ऊपर वाली पंक्ति जहाँ "क्षितिज जाँच" लिखा था, अब वह "चंद्र अस्त जाँच" है और समय लगभग 57:37 है। और यह -02:23 है। और पुस्तक में जो कोण 177 दिया गया है, वह वास्तव में 2 मिन
Мы начинаем четвертый тест. Вам нужно перевести переключатель TELEMETRY INPUT в п
Okay. Sei di nuo
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 재정렬 작업은 잘 진행되었습니다. 저는 육분의로 별을 찾아 정렬하는 데는 성공했지만, 스캐닝 망원경에서 레고르나 멘켄트 같은 별을 관측할 때는 그 별을 식별할 수 없었습니다. 처음 지구를 관측했을 때는 지평선이 매우 흐릿하게 보였습니다. 하지만 지구의 지평선과 대기 사이에는 뚜렷한 선이 있는 것처럼 보였습니다. 랜드마크 시선 필터를 사용하니 지평선이 더 선명해졌습니다. 우주와 대기 상층부 사이에는 매우 흐릿하고 불분명한 지평선이 있어서 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 앞서 말씀드렸듯이, 태양이 가까이 있을 때 달을 관측하면 달 주변이 어둡지 않고 밝은 파란색으로 보입니다. 태양이 광학계 근처에 있을 때 육분의로 정렬할 때도 마찬가지입니다. 하지만 저는 육분의에서 이러한 별들을 찾는 데는 어려움이 없습니다. 별과 지평선 측정을 하는 동안 시리우스, 프로키온, 카노푸스 같은 별들을 지구를 배경으로 찾는 데는 전혀 어려움이 없었습니다. 세 별 모두 지구를 배경으로 선명하게 보였습니다. 하지만 나비는 그다지 밝지 않아서 북쪽 별을 이용한 백업 정렬은 매우 어려울 것 같습니다. 고래자리나 오리온자리처럼 밝고 잘 알려진 별자리는 스캐닝 망원경으로 관측할 수 있었습니다. 그 외의 별자리는 관측하지 못했습니다. 현
D
조명이 필요
Giusto. Azzero gli IDE per allineare la piattaforma. È quello 
Итак, Земля должна появиться в по
休斯顿，阿波罗8号
Хорошо, Фрэнк. И ещ
अपोलो 1
ジム、サーキットブレーカーはサーキットブレーカー
Я останусь в OMNI B, если вы все хотите вернуть себе контроль, и вы можете позволить им перемещаться между B и D. И 
Легкие наушники неудобны в ношении. Они обладают хорошими ха
Il semblerait que nous ayons plusieurs problèmes de communica
Roger, Fred. I would like to confirm that you are getting drinking water out of, potable water out of the command module and,
今回のパスではMITの写真は完成しないと思う。ネガ、ネガ、問題は解決できる。フィルムがカートリ
Bene. E c'era un dato di volo di cui avevamo bisogno, ma questa volta non l'ab
로저. 저희가 여전히 음성 통화가 가능하다는 것을 알려드리고 싶었습니다. 그리고 아침 뉴스도 준비되어 있습니다. 지금 바로 들려드릴 수도 있고, 나중에 들려드릴 수도 있습니다. 편하신 대로 하세요
حسنًا. لقد تشتت انتباهي هنا. في اللوحة 225: حافلة رحلات CB، الرئيسية B، إغلا
برج
没错。之前我的飞机左舷低位偏航推力失效，现在左舷低位偏
Хорошо. После -7 нам нужно выполнить маневр по крену, 000; тангажу, 
Хорошо. У вас по-прежнему очень большой запас мощности. Мы показываем, что у вас на воде более 30 ампер. Если вы попадете
दरअसल, यह एक सुधार है, यह नीचे नहीं आया है। यह बस वहाँ जा रहा है। मैं आपको अपने नियंत्रण म
13번, 휴스턴. 아주 좋아 보입니다. 궤적, 방향 모두 
クロスポインターにかなりの平面外速度が表示されています、マイク
बहुत अच्छा...
Хорошо. 413020 183, Шаула, вниз 064, влево 06, плюс 0747, минус 16410 12988 36301; северная группа звезд, Сириус и Риге
Bill è l'unico che può veder
Jim, Houston. Deine Kommunikat
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Correction de trajectoire n° 
ठीक है। यह 9, /: 45597, माइनस 040, प्लस 157, प्लस 3
D'accord. Il semble que nous ne parviendrons pas à déclencher les évaporateurs primaires, je vais donc commence
Хорошо. Вы собираетесь п
Mâcher un peu de chewing-
ठीक है। और अभी कुछ मिनट और लगेंगे, जिम। हम अभी भ
Tranquillité, Houst
11, Houston. Riusciamo a distinguere le scritte sul pannello. Leggiamo: SISTEMA 
Bene, 11. Questa è Houston. Ora
Stand-by
11, это Хьюст
Bene. Nel pannello 5, interruttori POWER 1 e 2, APRI. Quindi interruttore POWER, resetta e rilascia. Nel pannello 11 e nel pannello 16, CONNETTORE DI BUS TRANSLUNARE. Entrambi gli interruttori si C
Хорошо. Рассмотрим пункт 1: второй пункт — это 12-часовая холодная выдержка по Кельвину, и в ходе обсуждений, которые я здесь проводил, и перед полетом, я думаю, было решено, что мы не хотим проводить холодную выдержку. Поэтому мы удалим этот шаг 2. Суть в том, что, я думаю, мы хотим провести холодную выдержку, и мы, безусловно, хотим проверить водонагреватели перед входом в атмосферу, чтобы убедиться, что ни один из них не высох, как это было до этого. Мы работаем над некоторыми процедурами для этого, и мы вернемся к ним чуть позже, и мы постараемся сделать это когда Билл будет на связи, чтобы все могли быть в курсе событий одновременно. Мы хотели бы добавить шаг между 8 и 9, или как часть шага 8. Все это находится на странице E-1, где мы переключаем УКВ на симплекс A на минус 4 часа 35 минут. Теперь это будет за пределами зоны действия двусторонней УКВ-связи, но это гарантирует, что мы включим связь в момент приема сигнала. Нам удалось достичь 20 000 миль с нисходящей связью, и мы проверяем восходящий сигнал. Поэтому, если мы включим связь сейчас, мы будем знать, что она включена задолго до того момента, когда мы сможем выйти
알겠습니다. 이해했어요. 그게 8번 맞죠
Do
Hoffentlich denkst du daran, nach ob
わかりました。1時間で大丈夫です。タイムラインの中で時間
Jim, la batterie A est maintenant chargée. Tu p
حسنًا. إذا لم ينخفض ​​مستوى سائل التبريد الثانوي، اضبط صمام الجليكول الثانوي إلى الرادياتير على الوضع الطبيعي. الخطوة
了解。25時30分に廃水を排出し、公称
確認しました。16番のブレーカーを使
حسناً، جيميني 8. لدينا اتصال قوي بين الأرض والمسار. وضعك جيد على الأرض. هيا
Credo di sì. Vediamo, la partecipazione alla stagione regolare è stata circa l
ヒュー
Rog
여
Gleich sind es 15 Sekunden
把这些东西寄给你并不着急。只是，在你开始自己组装
알겠습니다. 마이크, 무슨 일이 있었냐면, 당신은 모니터링을 하고 있었는데, 7단계에서 NOUN 01로 들어가서 주소를 입력하고 INFORMATION INFORMATION을 입력했죠. 그리고 35400 ENTER를 마지막으로 누르는 순간, 바로 16으로 돌아갔습니다. ENTER를 누르는 순간, 실제로 CDU에 정보가 입력되는 거였고, 레지스터 1과 2에 두 항목이 입력되자마자 CDU가 즉시 변경되었습니다. 그리고 CDU는 그걸 보고 "세상에, 초당 600도라는 속도가 나왔네!"라고 판단하고는 그 속도를 낮추려고 제트 엔진을 가동시킨 겁니다. 그리고 그 장치가 확인하는 속도 필터는... 음, 그 장치가 확인하는 속도는 필터링되어 있어서, 이미 온도가 상당히 높아진 후에야 실제 속도를 감지합니다. 그런 다음 속도 필
好的。天线
हाँ, बिल्कुल। पैनल 5 पर अगला चरण: हमें मेन बस टाई एसी स्विच को बैट एसी स्थिति पर सेट करना है, मेन बस ए पर सही वोल्टेज की जाँच करनी है और बैट एसी पर एम्पियर मापना है ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि कोई शॉर्ट सर्कि
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir möchten die Fernsehübertragung beenden. Wir glauben, wir haben eine wirklich gute Aufzeichnung. Die anderthalbstündige Sendung war hervorragend. Und wir mö
좋습니다. 413020 183, 샤울라, 하강 064, 좌회전 06, 플러스 0747, 마이너스 16410 12988 36301; 북쪽 별자리, 시리우스와 리겔, 롤 308, 피치 209, 요 357. 비고: 마이너스 MA를 사용한 고
Аполлон-8, Хью
كم 
А поверхность мелкая и порошкообразная. Я могу — я мо
네. 첫 번째 지시 사항은 "OPERATE 모드에서 5분 
मुझे लगता है कि यह ज्यादातर कैमरे की वजह से है। यह - कम से 
هيوستن
네, 레트
Houston, pour information, les deux derniè
了解。こ
좋습니다. 12 1383 327 023 위쪽 172 왼쪽 22, 더하기 1293, 빼기 16500, 12905 36180. 의견: 시리우스와 리겔 별을 기준으로, 롤 010, 피치 294, 요 320, 여유 공간 없음. 기타: 첫째, 빠른 복귀, 7821과 같음, MTL
ठीक है, बाईं ओर के हाशिये में, 105 घंटे के ठीक
Roger. Je comprends que l'heure d'acquisition est 03:07; l'heure de départ (R) est de 248 nm; l'heure de rendez-vous est 03:15; l'azimut est de 0 degré; l'élévation est de 7 degrés; l'heure du lever du soleil est 05:37:00, à ±1 heure près pour le TPI. Avez-vous les informations concernant les 
11号，休斯顿。目前的天气预报显示，您的灾后重建区域天气状况良好：2000英尺高度有零星云层，高空有零星云层，风向070度，风速13节，能见度10英里，海况约4英尺。昨天的预报显示，热带风暴克劳迪娅位于夏威夷以东约500至1000英里处。昨天下午地球卫星拍摄的图像显示，克劳迪娅正在消散，因此它的影响似乎比之前更小了。目前，您的灾后重建区域被认为位于热带辐合带以北不远处，您从窗户往外看应该就能看到。昨天还有报道称，更西边的地方出现了热带风暴维奥拉。它目前位于菲律宾以东约1000英里处，正向西北方向移动。热带风暴维奥拉一直在增强，预计将在未来12小时左右升级为台风；但是，届时它将位于您西部很远的地方。事实上，日出晨昏线尚未
Okay. We had a dropout there 
你好，印度通信技
了解しました。1A は 3-24、1D は 3 1/2 と 24、1C は 3 1/2 と 24 1/2、2A は 2 1/2 と 25、2D は 2 1/2 と 25、2C は 2 1/
हाँ, मुझे पता है। आप जानते ही हैं कि उस चीज़ के साथ कैसा होता है - शून्य-गुरु
阿波
كين، بخصوص هذه المناورة، رقم 7، هل ستقومون - هل سنقوم 
Roger, Seven. I did no
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। हमें
Okay. We're - we're in 
연소 시험에
आप इस समय 2,200 फीट की ऊंच
음, 제가 잭과 헤어
了解。TR-4で点数をつけ
Der Treibstofffüllstand beträgt 83 Pr
جيم، لدينا بعض الأخبار. اختار الرئيس نيكسون قاضياً من مينيسوتا لمنصب قاضٍ مشارك في المحكمة العليا. كما أقرّ مجلس النواب مشروع قانون يمنح الموظفين الفيدراليين زيادة 
Okay. Roger that
コロンビア、ヒューストン。君が望まない限り、これ以上のことはする必要はない。休憩。それからコロンビア、機会があれば、BATT CとPYROの読み出し
Stai fermo, Cha
알겠습니다, PDI 패드: 102:33:04.36; 09:50; -0002.1; 182, 287, 000; +56919. PDI 10 미만: 105:12:30.00. PDI 중단 10 초과: 103:40:00.00, 107:11:30.00. PDI 12 이상 중단 없음: 102:44:37.00; +0122.3, 모든 0 제외, +0188.9; 0152.0, +0011.0, 0225.0, 0:46; 000, 190; +0118.7,
Да
रॉजर, कॉपी कर लिया। इस समय 
오, EECOMM은 만족해하고 있습니다. 설정이 완료되면 EECOMM에서 제공하는 간단한 절차를 통해 차량 내 산소 유량과 산소 유량 센서를 점
रॉजर। मुझे नहीं लगता कि आपका रक्तचाप सही है। बल्ब निकल गया
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous vous serions reconnaissants de bien vouloir laisser la télévision allumée pendant une dizaine de minutes afin de pouvoir comparer les images 
Ok, Apollo 8. La prossima parte del nostro test è come quella di ieri; cambieremo le modalità di uplink in comando di uplink e ranging senza upvoice. Resteremo in questa modalità per circa 2 minuti e mezzo e invieremo due messaggi di prova. Durante questo periodo, non avremo uplink. Passeremo a questa modalità alle 10:00 e torneremo in questa configurazione
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。迈克
Das Fadenkreuz lässt sich für die Nachtsicht nicht ausreichend abdunkeln. Markieren Sie also erneut die Sterne im Sichtfeld. Thaurus kommt genau durch die Mittellinie. Eine Gierbewegung um etwa 5 Grad nach rechts würde für die Koppelnavigation ausreichen. Anschließend eine Rollbewegung um etwa 5 Grad nach links, was recht deutlich sichtbar ist. Für die Rückwärtsnavigation sieht das nach einer sehr guten Konfiguration aus. Bei hellem Mondlicht, das dem Morgengrauen entspricht, sollte die Fluglage hier überhaupt kein Problem darstellen. Gelegentlich kann man, insbesondere e
圧力がパルス モードになり、プラットフォームが
रॉजर। 
The shutter doesn't go down and the doors, or whatever they call them, don't open again. That's the third set, about. We're taking the
당신은 지금 우리의 시야에 들어왔
Si tratta di "Verificare che i riscaldatori siano stati in modalità AUTO per 15 minuti". Tornando alla prima pagina di questa procedura, hai impostato i riscaldatori in modalità AUTO e hai inserito gli interruttori, e vorremmo che riscaldassero i quadri per 1
हेलो, मु
هاواي، جيم
カプコンさん、今はどう読み
J'ai reçu ta liste
Hey Wa
तो, हम यह जानना चाहेंगे कि पिछले 24 घंटों में क्या किसी को फ्रैंक जैसे लक्षण महसूस हुए हैं? हम यह भी जानना चाहेंगे - जैसा कि हमने आपको कुछ दिन पहले बताया था कि आप मारेज़िन अपनी इच्छानुसार ले सकते हैं - हम यह भी जानना चाहेंगे 
よし、これで理解できたようだ。これがVER
ठ
रॉजर. क्षेत्र 36-4 4 40 और 120; 1+06. 2+31. 23 घंटे, 38:08. 2+48. 8
ジョー、ミッ
ऐसा लगता है कि हमने खान
了解、ガス。スーツサーキットについて
巴兹，这里是休斯顿。请你拉下16号配电盘上DELTA P断
ठीक है। पैनल 3 पर: हमने पहले तीन चरणों का ध्यान रखा; मोड, वॉयस, से वॉयस; पावर, ऑफ; पावर PMP से ऑफ; और एस-बैंड ओम
Mike, wir liegen innerhalb von 3 Fuß pro Sekunde au
Charlie, wir warten h
Okay. Now we talked that over with, and at 12 hours out, everyone seems to think that we don't need to do it there. But in close, it doesn't seem to have any effect on the trajectory, and what's been suggested if you'd like - we can do over the entry checklist and just kind of walk through it on the air with all the 
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, hier spricht California Com Tech, Californ
罗杰。LMP（最低月面压力）从起飞
Sospetto che questo campo di massi possa avere origine in parte da questo grande cratere roccioso dai bordi affilati che abbiamo superato durante la discesa finale. Ieri ho detto c
रॉजर। आपकी मुख्य बैटरियों की
バズ、彼はどう見え
我们今天感觉还不错。看了飞行计划，我们觉得或许应该缩短休息时间，增加休息频率。这样
حسنًا. الآن، عند استخدام هذا التكوين، يلزم قراءة البيانات التالية من الجهاز: جهد البطارية C، جهد بطارية العادم A، جهد بطارية العادم B، ضغط الهيليوم، ودرجات حرارة الحاقنات (
好的，弗雷
Ok
Im DIRECT-Modus funktioniert alles. Wir haben den RCS noch nicht wirklich gründlich geprüft
没错，吉姆。还有，13
Хорошо, Майк. Конечно, это на случай, если G&N выйдет из строя, и вам придётся летать в режиме постоянной перегрузки; а мы пытаемся увеличить дальность полёта в режиме постоянной перегрузки с 1100 до 1500 миль. Мы запускали эту процедуру в симуляторе, и она работает отлично. В общем, я всё объясню — просто объясню, а если возникнут вопросы, зада
ठीक है। स्क्रीन पर यह एक चमकदार धब्बे के रूप में दिखाई दे रहा है। यह बताना मुश्किल है कि हम क्या देख रहे
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Мы просим вас продолжить
Questa, questa operazione è stata molto irregolare. Non sono riuscito a ricondurla a un elemento specifico. Una volta ha deviato in una direzione di imbardata; la volta successiva ha deviato nell'altra. Per un po' ho avuto la sensazione che il beccheggio stesse andando alla deriva. A un certo punto sembrava che avesse una piccola spinta bloccata nel
OK. Zone 27-2: 96. 2+02. 08 27 55. 6+35. 10+58. Zone 28-2: ΔV 111. 2+20. 10 02 54. 4+50. 9+39. Zone 29-2: OK, il s'agit d'un ΔV divisé. Avant 66. Arrière 61. 1+48. 1+17. GMTRC 11 37 05. 3+43. 08+59. Zone 24-DELTA: ΔV 89. 1+53. 03 45 30. 11+03. Zone 25-DELTA: 86. 1+49. 0
Das ist bestätigt. Bevor ich mit den Pads beginne, noch eine Anmerkung. Die allgemeinen Hinweise, die wir Ihnen zuvor bezüglich der Position der Sonne im Sichtfeld des Kommandanten 
Tout semble bien se dérouler au niveau primaire. Nous vérifierons probablement le niveau secondaire apr
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。次のミッションに向けて現在移動中です
Jim, per quanto riguarda la finestra 5, ho un disegno qui; e, quando si è attraccati, si ha un angolo di circa 60 gradi tra gli assi Z del
了解。プラス90、G&N: 63481、マイナス153、プラス132、004 10 25 38、マイナス04761、プラス00001、プラス533
Ok. Riquadro 229: CB TIMER, PRINCIPALE A, chi
Roger, 
Möglicherweise musst du einiges davon wiederholen, James. Wir haben gerade jemanden, de
Hello
هيوستن، لقد بد
자, 휴스턴, 시
……他表现非常出色，但我认为他无法看穿任何人的意图。所以我得负责转达。这把枪非常好用。他能够灵活机动——一会
やあ、アクエ
太陽が出てくると、本当に暖かいで
好的。我们观察到云台中间角度有点高。虽然看起来姿态控制正常，但还是想让您知道
और यह भी सही नहीं है। जायरो... ठीक हैं; लेकिन ASCS स्टैंडबाय मोड में हैं। शायद ओरिएंटेशन की समस्या 
Voglio che tu mandi un mess
روجر. أقرأ لك صوتك. 
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une de l'actualité mondiale. Seuls quatre pays, la Chine communiste, la Corée du Nord, le Nord-Vietnam et l'Albanie, n'ont pas encore informé leurs citoyens de votre vol et de votre alunissage. Un journaliste a même déclaré être à court de mots pour décrire votre succès. Ce soir, le président Nixon assistera au match des étoiles de baseball à Washington. Après le match, il se rendra dans la zone de récupération du Pacifique. Mercredi soir, il se rendra en hélicoptère de l'île Johnston au navire de transmissions de la Marine, l'Arlington. Jeudi matin, il reprendra l'hélicoptère pour rejoindre le Hornet à temps pour assister à votre amerrissage. Le président sera accompagné du secrétaire d'État William Rogers et de Frank Borman. Ils observeront l'amerrissage depuis la passerelle du navire de récupération en compagnie de l'amiral John Sidney McCain Jr., commandant des forces du Pacifique. Après son séjour à bord du Hornet, le président entamera sa tournée en Asie et sa visite prévue en Roumanie. On pense que Luna 15 s'est écrasée dans la mer des Crises hier après avoir effectué 52 orbites autour de la Lune. L'agence de presse soviétique TASS a rapporté que des « recherches scientifiques » avaient été menées dans l'espace proche de la Lune. Sir Bernard Lovell, de l'observatoire de Jodrell Bank, a déclaré que Luna 15 avait percuté la surface lunaire à une vitesse d'environ 480 km/h. La situation est relativement calme ces derniers temps au Vietnam. Des soldats américains en patrouille ont été aperçus avec des radios à transistors branchées sur votre vol. Le réseau de radio et de télévision des forces armées vietnamiennes a couvert l'intégralité de la mission. Des escarmouches se poursuivent entre les Égyptiens et les Israéliens le long du canal de Suez. Les observateurs de l'ONU sur place tentent de mettre fin aux hostilités. À Washington, la commission des voies et moyens de la Chambre des représentants a voté pour réduire de 27,5 % à 20 % le quota d'épuisement des réserves de pétrole. Il a plu à plusieurs reprises dans la région de Houston. Aujourd'hui, le ciel est nuageux et d'autres averses sont attendues. Côté sport, comme mentionné précédemment, le match des étoiles a lieu ce soir. Aucun match n'a eu lieu hier. Hier soir à New York, l'Association des chroniqueurs de baseball d'Amérique a désigné Babe Ruth comme le plus grand joueur de tous les temps. Joe DiMaggio a été nommé le plus grand joueur vivant. Frank Borman a fait ces annonces lors d'un dîner en l'honneur des joueurs. Joe Namath a passé une journée complète au camp d'entraînement des Jets de New 
I think we'll try to do that, but I don't - this is one of the things that we'll work out when we get ther
嗯，最终确实如此——它显示了……——你可以看
Eh bien, nous aimerions savoir si, au cours des dernières 24 heures, quelqu'un a présenté des symptômes similaires à ceux de Frank. Nous aimerions également savoir – vous savez, nous vous avons dit l'autre jour de prendre de la Marezine comme vous le souhaitez – si quelqu'un a pris des médicaments, et ensuite nous aime
Houston, wir versuchen, den Schlauch des Kommandanten mithilfe
Ap
Columbia, Houston. Sagen Sie noch einmal ungefähr 13
罗杰。现在是36分41秒。请
Ja, es ist wirklich schlimm.
Roger, Bill. Wir haben vor ein paa
如果那个换算表是正确的，那么我
わかりました。コンピュ
알았어요
마이크, 지금 보고 계신 것은 서반구입니다. 위쪽에는 북극이 있고, 가운데 바로 아래쪽에는 남아메리카가 있으며, 아래쪽으로는 혼 곶까지 보입니다. 바하 캘리포니아와
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это Кантонский коммерческий технический институт. Вы меня слышите? Конец свя
शरीर अक्ष को संरेखित करने के बाद, हम आपको बता सकते हैं कि चंद्रमा या किसी तारे की ओर प्रकाशिकी को इंगित करने के लिए गेंद को किस अभिविन्यास में उड़ाना चाहिए। और फिर, प्रकाशिकी के इंगित होने की स्थिति को जानकर, हम आपको प्लेटफ़ॉर्म को टॉर्क देने के लिए समतुल्य सीडीयू कोणों का एक सेट दे सकते हैं
Et 29 à l'arrière. À dro
ठीक है। हम आपको पहले से सूचित करने की सोच रहे हैं। कृपया ध्यान दें कि हमारे पास व्यायाम उपकरण उपलब्ध नहीं है; इसलिए हम आपको टाइप 1 परीक
Sure hate to tug on that thing. Alternativ
Nous indiquons une portée de 158 miles et 
Eagle, Houston. Die Last ist da – wir haben P00 erneut ausgewählt; Ihre Integration läuft wieder; der Computer ist wieder für Sie da. Wir möchten jetzt den Drift-Check
All right. A very interesting thing - Jim's got full daylight out his window, and I have full night out of mine. We're gradually yawing around to blunt-end-forward, and it looks like the reflection of the sun on these fireflies causes them to glow very brightly. That was the type of stars that we saw on our first dar
ठीक है, वैंस। हमारा /
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Вы нажали кнопку COMMAND RESET пр
А Джо, как ты ч
حسنًا.
«Аполлон-8», это 
I read you lou
Jack, je me suis tellement habitué à cette posture de vol avec le... qu
西格玛七号。你们如何
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 5 SPS/G&N: 37201, -060, +047
Как же грустно, что осталось чуть меньше получаса, чтобы поиграть с этим. Сейчас я перейду на низкое управление по проводам. Гироскутеры свободны, чтобы опустить нос и понаблюдать за маяком в Дурбане. Гироскутеры свободны, низкое управление по проводам, поправка, на этом этапе я перейду на ручное пропорциональное управление. Я еще не брал никаких сборов, поэтому вернусь к исходному режиму. Чисто. Переключаюсь на управление скоростью. Ручное пропорциональное управление 
मैं यहाँ से काफी दूर जाना चाहता हूँ, जो। उसे गिम्बल लॉक में जाने से रोकने के लिए, मैंने यॉ को लगभग 50 डि
ओह, जी हाँ, कोई बात नहीं। चिंता मत कीजिए - मुझे पता था कि आप कॉल कर रहे हैं; बस आपकी बात समझ नहीं आई। और अब से जब भी आप कॉल करेंगे, हम संगीत बंद कर देंगे और मै
알겠습니다. 122 15를 
落ち着いて、エ
Обнаружил проблем
रॉजर। क्या आप चाहते हैं कि मैं अपना प्लेटफॉर्म
Всё верно, Джим. И, 13, 
Aquarius, Houston. Vi preghiamo di aprire
네, 프레드. 우선, 이 
罗杰。明白了
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम ऑन एचएफ। क्या आप स
私たちは
Jack, it is very comfortable. We've run it several times now and, in fact, it's being run right now, again. And we've run it both here at Houston and at the Cape. The only place where you might find that you need to stay ahead of things is during the platform-alinement period, when you're getting ready to close out the and then once you get into the command module and jettison the, why you're back on a very comfortable time. And, of course, we'll be watching and anything we can do, like keeping track of time for you, we'll remind you of tha
OK, Houston. Apollo 
ठीक है। पैनल 3: बैटरी चार्ज, बंद - जैक, तुमने यह पहले ही कर दिया है - अगला एसी इन्वर्टर, पैनल 5: मेन बस टाई बैट बी/सी टू बैट बी/सी। हैं? हाँ, यह ऊपर है - ऊपर की स्थिति में। सर्किट ब्रेकर, बैट ए पा
좀 정신없네요. 제가 이 일을 한 지 얼마 안 됐거든요. 스페인 사람들이 투우장에서
Hier spricht Woomera Cap Com, Seven. Der Chirurg meldet, dass alle Systeme hier unten in
А в Хьюстоне таймер нашей миссии
Давление в камере сгорания держалось на уровне около 100. В заключительной части процесса сгорания оно начало немного колебаться и опустилось чуть ниже 1
"Y"자형 커넥터가 필요하세요? 제
١١، هيوستن. نود محاولة ربط تدفق الأكسجين في المحول بصمام التدفق المفتوح. ما مدى فت
罗杰。我们的舱室目前还算
Mi fa male il lato destro della testa, perché continuo a strofinare i capelli nel verso sbagliato quando cerco di girare la testa dentro il casco per guarda
Apollo 11, Houston. Good mor
On aperçoit enfin une planète. Bien reçu. Jupiter. Je vois une série d'étoiles: Grus, et notre bon vieux Formalhaut, là, dans le coin supérieur. Grus descend au centre. Et Formalhaut, pile au 
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ وضعية مُحاذاة محور الجسم، باستخدام خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار على الأرض كما فعلنا من قبل. وبمجرد حصولنا على ذلك، سننفذ -7، وهو ما يبدو الآن وكأنه احتراق بمعدل قدمين في الثانية أو حوالي 15 ثانية. وقد أُبلغتُ أنه انخفض إلى قدم ونصف الآن، لذا فهو ضمن الحدود الآمنة. حسنًا. عند القيام بذلك، سنبدأ فورًا المناورة للوصول إلى وضعية إطلاق وحدة الخدمة، والتي ستكون في مستوى الطائرة لأننا نُطلقها أبكر من المعتاد. لسنا بحاجة، ولا نرغب، في وجود عنصر خارج مستوى الطائرة. لذا ستكون في مستوى الطائرة مع توجيه وحدة الخدمة للخارج على طول متجه نصف القطر. سنبدأ بعد ذلك في تجهيز وحدة القيادة لوحدة الخدمة SEP، بما في ذلك فحص وحدة القيادة وإطلاق النار الساخن، وقبل حوالي 4 ساعات و30 دقيقة من الإطلاق، سنُطلق وحدة الخدمة. سنرفع الطائرة حتى نحصل على وحدة الخدمة في... ونحاول التقاط بعض الصور، لكننا لن نُجري مناورات تحويلية لالتقاط الصور لأننا لا نريد إفساد زاوية مسار الطيران في ذلك الوقت. حسنًا. هذا يُعطينا ساعتين تقريبًا من الوقت المتاح هنا للانتهاء، إذا تأخرنا في ذلك، للانتقال إلى قائمة التحقق والاستعداد لتشغيل وحدة القيادة. سنبدأ التشغيل الكامل لوحدة القيادة قبل ساعتين ونصف. سنُشغّل الكمبيوتر، ونرفع الطائرة، ونبدأ في إرسال بيانات الحالة، وما إلى ذلك، ومحاذاة منصة وحدة القيادة. بعد ساعة ونصف تقريبًا كحد أقصى، مما يُعطينا ساعة للقيام بهذه الأمور المتعلقة بوحدة القيادة، سنبدأ المناورة للوصول إلى وضعية التخلص. ثم ستبدأ في إغلاق... بالطبع، لم ن
收到。以下是您将收到的更新的简要概述。您目前收到的关于完成-8飞掠机动后+2的更新仍然
D'acc
그건 그렇고, 서비스 모듈 RCS 수량은 어
حسنًا. هذا الدعاء موجه إلى رود روز وأهل كنيسة القديس كريستوفر، بل
我们这里
ह्यूस्टन
أورورا 
Roger. Je crois qu'on devrait abandonner, Gus. Ça n'arrête pas de tomber, c'est probablement à cinq ou six kilomètres,
D'accord. Nous allons maintenant basculer la liaison montante sur la connexion de secours UpVoice pendant environ deux minutes. Il se peut que vous entendiez la coupure du signal UpVoice pendant quelques secondes. Vous pouvez donc basculer votre commutateur de télémétrie montante sur la connexion de secours UpVoice. Si tout cela ne fonctionne pas correctement, je consulte ma montre et nous nous retrouverons avec notre configuration actuelle au plus tard à [heur
我们在那
Jerry, abbiamo clor
ठीक है, ईएमएस का कहना है
わかりました。次の3つは同じです。それから、PROPELLANT DUMPをCOMMANDに、ENGINE OUTをOFFに、LAUNCH VE
صفقة جيدة. الصورة تحتوي على الكثير م
它给我留下了一条很细的带子。而且很难从
Okay. Jack's got the one with the 250-millimeter lens on i
それを私のために取って
This is Friendship Seven. For the record, number, the number two film that I'm putting in the camera is the number f
Je n'ai pas besoin de faire de l'exercice. Je n'en ressens vraiment pas le besoin. J'aura
जिम, एक कोशिश के तौर पर, आप जैक से रिंग 1 के ऑटो कॉइल्स को बंद करने के लिए कह सकते हैं, जो शायद मेन ए पर हैं। उसे उन्हें बंद करने के लिए कहें और रीडिंग देख
You know one th
알겠습니다. 복사했습니다. 그대로 두세요
Близнецы 4, у нас хорошее кр
Мы ещё вернёмся к подробностям о том, что здесь находится, но, похоже, здесь собрано практически всё разнообразие форм, угловатости, зернистости, все виды горных пород, какие только можно найти. Цвета — ну, они сильно различаются в зависимости от того, как вы смо
Im Folgenden möchten wir klären, ob Sie nur die Kontrollpunkte 1, 2 und 3 entfernen und den Pseudo-Landeplatz bearbeiten möchten oder ob Sie 
11号，休斯顿。我们又被锁住了。你能给我们汇报一下天线的运
खैर, ऐसा नहीं कर सकते। मैं सीधे उसमें घुस जाऊंगा
Okay. PAD: 102 33 04.36, 09 50, minus 00021 182 287 000, plus 56919
Роджер, выключатель телевизион
And, your reports on manual proportional, just abo
收到。发射前一小时准备就绪。一
아니요, 괜찮습니다. 그런데 흥미로운 점은 지난번 물 투하 작업 때 궤적 추적에 변화가 있었는데, 그 시점에 상관관계를 분석해 보니 노즐
Je trouve que l'amplificateur à cellule photoélectr
好了，杰克，把氢氧化锂罐拿出来。把它们绑好，或者类似的东西……指挥
Okay. J
مهلاً، نجم النسر الطائر موجود هناك. دعنا نرى، هذا ا
Okay, Jack. Du kannst die Schalterkonfiguration einrichten. Wir besprechen, dass du die Motorschalter der Hauptbusverbindung etwas später aktivierst, um ihre Funktion zu überp
Знаешь, Джек, когда я впервые сюда попал, я заметил одну вещь: когда я начинаю стоять вертикально в командном мод
Sehr gut. Dies ist die Ausgabe vom 23. Dezember der Interstellar Times à la Paul Haney. Wir möchten Sie darauf hinweisen, dass es nur noch zwei Einkaufstage bis Weihnachten sind. Er sagt, Ihre Fernsehübertragung sei gestern ein voller Erfolg gewesen. Mickey Herskowitz arbeitet für die Post in doppelter Funktion. Er hat neben seinen anderen Sportkolumnen auch zwei Artikel über Ihren Start geschrieben, und Jim, Ihre Mutter hat sich sicherlich über die Geburtstagsgrüße gefreut. Einundzwanzig Häftlinge sind gestern aus einem Gefängnis in New Orleans au
Хорошо. Ладно. И э
Hast du dort angerufen? Helm abgenommen und verstaut... Armlehnen verstaut, Becke
D'accord. J'ai dû inte
哇，瞧那边那大家
네. 이제 여러분께 전달해 드릴 정보가 꽤 많습니다. 잠들어 있는 조종사는 안면 보호대를 열어두고 장갑을 벗은 상태로 있어
Роджер.
로
Bene.
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमने फिर से आपके साथ एंटीना बदल दिए हैं। मैं फिर से दोहराता हूँ कि हमारे पास इस सम
Le suivi des gyroscopes semble se faire sans problème. Par con
好的。您的四核涡轮组件温度在 85 度到 44 度之间。喷油器温度在 44 度到 21 度之间；隔热罩在
Pendant ce temps, nous ne sommes pas c
たぶんそれはただあなたの動き、つまり外に出る動きだったの
서독은 월요일을 '아폴로의 날'로 선포했습니다. 바이에른 주의 학생들은 휴교령을 받았고, 우체
D'accord, mon plan 
Bon, Jack s'est simplement... remis en place. Après avoir installé les disjoncteurs 250 BAT A et BAT B, il a mesuré la tension du bus BAT: 32,3 V sur A et 37,0 V sur B. Il a ensuite installé les disjoncteurs 275 BAT, qui ont relié les batteries aux bus, et a alors mesuré la tension du bus A: 32,0 V sur A et 0 A sur B, ainsi
ह्यूस्
そして、そのページの半分の一番下の行、「114:29:56、OFF、S
알겠습니다. 관제탑에서 컴퓨터가 정상 작동하려면 몇 번의 궤도 비행이 필요할 수 있다고 합니다. 컴퓨
Ok. E c'è un'altra cosa di cui non so se sei a conoscenza. Al momento non abbiamo più bombole di idrossido di litio nel pannello due, quindi quando saremo pronti per l'accensione, dovrai ricordarci 
알겠습니다. 별 2개, 롤 195.
알겠습니다. ACME를 다시 장착해야 합니다. HF/DF 모드로 나가야 하고, 똑바로 
Роджер. Понимаю. Пока все очень хорошо. Мы оценим этот вариан
और अब हम सेकेंडरी CO2 कैनिस्टर प
Roger.
अपोल
حسنًا. فيما يخصّ ذلك، لدينا ما يكفي من الأكسجين في المركبة الفضائية... لنتمكن من المرور. ليس لديّ... وحدة قيادة... حلقة بدلة الفضاء قبل الدخول. كنت أبحث عن... مصادر الأكسجين... أيضًا في - في مقدمة ح
روجر. حالتي جي
Va bene. Bene, questo atteggiamento che ti abbiamo trasmess
不。我又把
了解しました。了解しました。機内表示は、アルファが2%、ブラボーが54%、ココア
Roger. N
Roger. Beh, potresti ripetere questo durante la narrazione televisiva, e vorremmo che, se possibile, tu dessi una descrizione il più dettagliata possibile dei vari colori e dimensioni di qu
Apollo 11 CDR, this is
هل أصبح الكمبيوتر ملكي الآن ي
はい、そうです。Flightは、RCSヒータースイッチの位置とインジケーターライトの状態も知りたいと考えていま
我现在正看着窗外。飞船里的灯都关了
Возможно, нам лучше отложить проверку связи до середины курса, потому что, если мы хотим сгореть к 9, нам лучше получить здесь увольнение в 10 ч
حسنًا يا جو، ل
हाँ। 
MSC-10のフライトプラン時間を使用してください。新し
10, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35186, 
D'accord. Vous n'avez donc pas reçu la charge 6-4. La charge 18-1 GMTRC si vous êtes prêt à 
わかった。コックピットを確認して、みんなを困らせないようにする。ガス、
よし、ヴァンス。少しフォーカスを絞ってみ
了解。ビルが席を離れて私が座っているという珍しい機会の一つで、初めて
ठीक है, जिम। ईंधन बचाने के लिए, हम चाहेंगे कि आप इसे न्यूनतम गति पर सेट करें, वैसे तो इसमें बहुत कम से
Even though we're g
Apollo 8, 
Roger. Nous sommes en vol, et je me demandais pourquoi le signal sortait de la zone morte; maintena
쌍둥이자리 4, 카나본. 어떻
Привет, Бермуды. Дружба Семь. Теперь ваша очередь. Конец свя
Ehi, abbiamo... abbiamo avuto una bella discussione qui sul tuo tentativo di osservare la cometa, e questa riflessione non è inaspettata. E dacci un altro minuto, e torneremo con te su qualcosa a ri
Роджер. Когда вам будет удобно, мы хотели бы довести объем сточных вод до 5 процентов. После завершения этой операции следующая сточна
了解、マイク。マニュアルアティチュードスイッチをアクセルコマンドに切り替えてください。次にオートセレクトスイッチをオンにし、レートコマンドに切り替えてください。そうすれば、ジェットが連結されてい
자, AELD 회
J'ai d'autres informations. Nous ne devrions pas avoir de données précises sur votre trajectoire avant environ deux heures. La combustion nous a semblé très réussie, et nous l'analysons de près. Nous vous recontacterons d'ici deux heures. Autre chose à prévoir: le réservoir de SHe devrait atteindre sa limite d'éclatement. Nous estimons que cela se produira au plus tôt à 107 heures, soit environ 25 minutes. Le plus tard probable est à 110 heures. Il s'agirait d'une décompression non pro
Ent
Apollo 13, Houston
Okay. CB-Bedienfeld 16, ASCENT E
حسناً. قال فرانك إنه سينطل
이륙은 어땠나요? 이륙할 
Хорошо, Водолей. Следующий шаг — возьмите внутренний пакет, который вы разрезали, и наденьте его на верхнюю часть баллона. При этом расположите его так, чтобы «ушки» пакета, то есть углы, торчали с закрытого конца, — они были направлены вдоль открытых 
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हमारी प्रक्
11, Хьюстон. У нас есть для вас вал и цапфа, которые могут немного подкорректировать результат.
Je parie une tasse de caf
맙소사! 8번 공이 맞기
रॉजर। टेलीमेट्री पर नीचे लगे उस 2O फ्लो ट्रांसड्यूसर पर, हमारे मान आपके द्वारा ऑनबोर्ड पढ़े गए मानों से काफी हद तक मेल खा रहे हैं, और EECOMM इस चक्र को देख रहा है, लेकिन फिर भी ऐसा लगता है कि संकेतित दर हमारी अपेक्षा से कम है। हम अभी भी सम
Non sembra troppo freddo. Semb
Columbia, hier spricht Houston. Wir bitten Sie, eine weitere Messung durchzuführen. Überlassen Sie die Nachführung der automatischen Optik und konzentrieren Sie sich darauf, die Objekte auf der Mondoberfläche zu finden. Falls Sie sie
フレンドシップ・セブン、テレメトリは正常で、システムもすべて正常です。連絡が途絶え次第、ダークサイド発
Il cuscino di atterraggio è disattivato. La retrosequenza di emerg
罗杰。Star 02
Роджер. Понимаете общее впечатление от влажности, так как материал был упакован в керновую трубку? Следующий вопрос: мы с
Jerry, in doing these 's, we were just about over Africa most of th
Gemini 4, Hou
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티 기지에서 어젯밤 지질학 질문에 대해 몇 가지 답변을 드리겠습니다. 우리는 길쭉한 원형의 2차 분화구들이 흩어져 있는 비교적 평평한 분화구 지대에 착륙했습니다. 대부분의 분화구는 크기에 상관없이 융기된 테두리를 가지고 있습니다. 하지만 모든 분화구가 그런 것은 아닙니다. 작은 분화구 중에는 테두리가 뚜렷하게 보이지 않는 것도 몇 개 있습니다. 이 지역의 지표면은 매우 고운 모래에서 실트에 이르는 입자로 이루어져 있습니다. 지구에서 이와 가장 유사한 것을 꼽자면 분말 형태의 흑연이라고 할 수 있겠습니다. 이 지표면에는 모양, 크기, 질감이 매우 다양한 암석들이 흩어져 있는데, 둥근 모양과 각진 모양, 그리고 다양한 경도를 가진 암석들이 있습니다. 말씀드렸듯이, 결정이 없는 현무암과 기포가 있는 현무암도 보았습니다. 결정이 전혀 없는 암석도 있고, 작은 흰색 반정이 1%에서 5
Отлично. Четыре хороших часа из пятичасового цик
Ricev
Davvero ecceziona
Bene. Esatto, e l'ultima frase dell'aggiornamento è che ci si può aspettare che la cometa ruoti a 45 gradi e a 155 gradi. Ora, il punto, Jack, secondo i grafici che mi hanno mostrato, è che la cometa sembra essere a circa 10 gradi dal Sole e, a causa della geometria dell'ombra che proietta sul S
そして、ヒューストンのアポロ13号。O2燃料電池のパージと廃棄物および水の排出について私が見逃したこ
Nach Überprüfung der Systeme des Raumschiffs stellten wir fest, dass Triebwerk Nummer 8 anscheinend derzeit nicht geöffnet ist. Dies könnte auch zum Zeitpunkt des Vorfalls der Fall gewesen sein, wir können dies 
C'est Roger. Je crois que nous rencontrons un problème avec le mode automatique. Je vais vérifier
حسنًا. هذا هو البيريسينثيان زائد 2. / 62871 نوفمبر ألفا، وانتظر لحظة. حسنًا. سنستأنف مع ضبط الميل وضبط الانح
好的，你做得很好。没有那些噪音真是太好了。吉姆，让我告诉你我想做什么。正如我所说，我们现在不会给你详细的操作步骤。我们预计很快会给你一些操作步骤，我们会尽量以以下形式提供给你。首先，我们会有一个时间表，有点像飞行计划，上面会列出所有主要事件的时间，以及我们配置特有的任何设置、开关设置等等，这些内容在检查清单中找不到。例如，我们启动指令舱的方式就是如此；其次，当然，我们会对检查清单进行任何必要的修改，以便你可以在需要时参考检查清单来执行某些功能，而时间
Верно. Следующий шаг: подождать 30 минут для п
Okay, Going dump and it's down to 4.2, 4.
وهذا هو فريق الدعم الودي الخاص بكم. نتمنى لكم رحلة موفقة، ولا ت
冷却水バルブの設定は 7 番です
진입 패드는 다음과 같습니다: Mid-PAC, 000153, 000;, 178; -21.66, -165.37; 28. 다음 네 열은 해당 없음(N/A)입니다. DO는 4.00, Zebra Libra 또는 이와
我刚才说的是
Roger, Bill. Wir haben eure Aufnahme erhalten, und die Sprachqualität ist sehr gut. Wir brauchen ungefähr 20 Minuten, um sie nach Houston zu 
Спасибо. И, кажется, нам еще предстоит провести криогенную обработку, мы проверили ваше тройное смещени
Nein, die beiden können wir hier lassen. Nein, ich möchte keinen von beiden. Nein,
你
罗杰：嗯，迈克，我现在能从中间的窗户看到整个地球了。我能看到佛罗里达、古巴、中美洲，实际上，整个中美洲北部，一直到
ठीक है, जो। जैसा कि मैंने पढ़ा, 74 घंटे बाद हम डिटेंट 2 पर सूर्य की जाँच करेंगे, जिसके लिए रेंडेज़वस रडार को रास्ते से हटाना होगा। और हम वहाँ पहुँचने के लिए ऑटो मैन्यूवर का उपयोग करेंगे, या कम से कम उसके कोणों को पार करने के लिए। यदि यह 1 डिग्री के भीतर पास हो जाता है, तो आप कह रहे हैं कि प्लेटफ़ॉर्म मैन्यूवर के लिए ठीक है, और हमें आगे की जाँच की आवश्यकता नहीं होगी। लेकिन अगर यह ठीक
Хорошо. Угол тангажа 10
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। इस समय आपको शौच करने की अनुमति है, और मुझे पता है कि यह लंबे समय त
ل
У меня такое чувство, что я каким-то образом должен был это сдел
ठीक है। यहाँ हमें कुछ संचार जाँच करनी है। हम पाँच अलग-अलग मोड में स्विच करेंगे, और उनमें से केवल एक ही आपकी गतिविधियों को बाधित करेगा। उस स्थिति में, हम अपलिंक बैकअप वॉइस पर स्विच करेंगे, और यही वह समय है जब आप अस्थायी रूप से अपलिंक वॉइस संचार खो सकते हैं। पूरी प्रक्रिया के दौरान आपके पास डाउनलिंक वॉइस
फिर से
시그
好的。我
11, Houston. In order to improve the communications a little bit here, we'd like to try to get you on the high gain antenna. We're recommending a pitch angle of 0, yaw 355 - I say again 355,
Roger. Wir haben die Diagramme überprüft und genau dasselbe Ergebnis erhalten wie du. Deine Vorgehensweise scheint sehr gut zu sein; es war wohl ein sehr guter Ansatz. Du h
Columbia, Houston. Innanzitutto, vorremmo uno scarico delle acque reflue al 10% sul retro. In secondo luogo, non sembra che dovremo cambiare aereo in questo momento, quindi non ne collegheremo uno nuovo. Terzo punto, vorrei che tutti i vostri riscaldatori CRYO fossero impostati su AUTO e siamo pronti per una carica della batteria, la batteria BRAVO; durerà circa 7 ore. Se doveste andare a dormire, interromperemo la carica BATT, ma al momento possiamo procedere e avviare la carica BATT su BATT Bravo. E un ultimo punto, per la vostra configurazione per il periodo di riposo, il registro 1 per il è 11111; il regi
Ora G.m.t., siamo quasi alle 13:36:
रॉज
收到。很好，Fred-o。这样就进入第 8 步了，当你按下 PRO 键时，屏幕上会闪烁 5018。好的。在 5018 位置，我们要进行一次
О, должно быть, это был
Roger. Iniziando con NOME 33: 130 
Гораздо лучше. Теперь вы прошли через эстафету Г
ठ
好的，
गस, अब तक पूरी उड़ान के दौरान यह तरीका काफी अच्छा काम
Okay. Das ist bestätigt. Die Änderungen links davon betreffen die 
吉姆，
لنلقِ نظرة على عالم الرياضة. بينما كنتم منشغلين بالأمس، أعلن جو ناماث ومفوض كرة القدم بيت روزيل أن "برودواي جو" قد وافق على بيع حصته في مطعم باتشيلورز 3 والانضمام إلى فريق نيويورك جيتس. وصل جو إلى معسكر تدريب الجيتس اليوم وخاض أول تدريب له. كما انضم عدد من لاعبي الجيتس الآخرين الذين كانوا قد امتنعوا عن اللعب مع جو. أما ديفي هيل، من جاكسون بولاية ميشيغان، فقد فاز ببطولة الجولف الكبرى الثالثة له في ثلاث مشاركات خلال الأسبوع الماضي، حيث فاز ببطولة فيلادلفيا كلاسيك. وقد فاز هيل بأربع بطولات حتى الآن هذا العام، وهو صاحب أعلى رصيد من الأرباح هذ
Sigma Seven, Sigma S
मुझे लगता है, बज़, अगर आप हाई गेन को मैनुअल पर सेट कर दें और पिच 20 - यॉ 360 - पिच माइनस 20 कर दें, 
Ro
حسنًا. اللوحة 3: أوقف شحن البطارية. اللوحة 5: اربط ناقل التيار المتردد الرئيسي بالبطارية A/C؛ افتح شاحن بطارية قاطع الدائرة، شحن البطارية A؛ أغلق شاحن بطارية قاطع الدائرة، شحن البطارية B. بعد ذلك، اللوحة 250: أغلق مدخ
한 시
Roger. 1. 1-A and 2-B are 24, and they all l
Индикато
Friendship Seven, M
로저. 모든 게 아주 잘 진행되고 있습니다. 제 상태도 아주 좋습니다. 캡슐 상태도 아주 좋습니다. 제어 모드도 정상입니다. 자동 자이로스코프도 정상이고 기동은 꺼져 있습니다. 연료는 72~100%, 산소는 8
एक लक्ष्य - कौन सा लेंस? 18 
Okay. And on the - your tracking that we have now, it still looks li
Say, Fred, sometime when you're not too busy chewing on that beef, 
Stai rallentand
Roger. Compris 68 [degrés].
好的。我们已经讨论过了，现在距离起飞还有12个小时，大家似乎都认为我们不需要在那里进行操作
Houston, it's been a real change for us. Now we are able to see stars again and recognize constellations for the first time on the trip. It's - the sky is full of stars. Just like the nightside of Earth. But all the way here, we have only been able to see stars occasionally and perhap
Acquario, Houston. Richiedi FORWARD OMNI. Come leg
Siam
E la valvola di flusso EVAP, che ora è aperta, ho sganciato i tubi della mia tuta e ho aperto le valvole di flusso del
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। अफ्रीका से आते समय आसमान में घने 
मुझे समझ आ गया है कि आपको S-5 पर एक और बार काम करने की जरूरत है और
Хорошо, Вэнс. И еще одно небольшое отличие, которое мы отметили, заключается в том, что поток водорода и кислорода в топливном элементе №
Okay. Consumables update for of 46 plus 00: minus 5.5 percent, minus 6.5 percent, minus 2.5 percent, minus 7.5 percent, minus 5.0 percent, minus 2 pounds hydrogen, plus 1 pound oxygen, and that minus 5.5 percent on the total corresponds to minus 66 pounds. 
좋아, 지구가 올 때까지 이 필름으로는 더 이상 사진을 찍지 않는 게 좋겠어. 이
Роджер
روجر، لدي هذه الجسيمات تنجرف للخلف مرة أخرى، لكنها لا
وها هو إيجل هنا. لقد قرأتُ عنواننا في الأرقام 404 و405 و406، وكنتُ أعتقد أن الرقمين 405 و406 سيكونان أصفارًا، وكنتُ أقترح إعادة ضبطهما إلى الصفر. أدركتُ أن الرقم 404 يجب أن يكون سالبًا، وهو
作为交换，外科医生希望了解你们每个人的大致睡眠时间
ヴァンス、ジャックが話している間に、電源を切る場合、この中間コースをどうやってやるつも
ところで、アメリカ全土のテレビやラジオで生放送される前に、私に伝えたいことはあり
Ricevuto. Ti stavano avvisando di evitare di pa
その件についてはサンボーンをチェックする必要があると思う。BPMSの話に移る。ジーン、スーツの温度には本当に満足している。65度
Wir befanden uns auf 1200 Fuß und nähert
역추진 장치를 작동시켰는데, 저속이 아닌 정상 속도로 설정했습니다. 현재는 U
11번, 휴스턴. 현재 예보에 따르면 복구 지역의 기상 조건은 양호합니다. 고도 2000피트, 산발적 강풍, 풍향 70도, 풍속 13노트, 시야 10마일, 파고 약 4피트입니다. 어제 예보에서는 열대성 폭풍 클라우디아가 하와이 동쪽 500~1000마일 해상에 있다고 했습니다. 어제 오후 지구 위성 사진에서 클라우디아가 소멸하는 모습이 확인되어 이전보다 영향이 더욱 줄어든 것으로 보입니다. 현재 복구 지역은 열대 수렴대 바로 북쪽에 위치해 있으며, 창밖으로 보시면 열대 수렴대를 보실 수 있을 겁니다. 어제 서쪽으로는 열대성 폭풍 비올라가 발생했다는 보고도 있었습니다. 현재 비올라는 필리핀 동쪽 약 1000마일 해상에서 북서쪽으로 이동하고 있습니다. 열대성 폭풍 비올라는 세력이 강해지고 있으며, 향후 12시간 이내에 태풍으로 발달할 것으로 예상됩니다. 하지만 태풍의 영향권은 휴스턴에서 훨씬 서쪽에 위치할 것입니다. 사실, 일출 경계선은 아직 비
好的
터널 작업은 모두 완료됐습니다. 드로그, 프로브, 해치 모두 제자리에 다시 설치됐
Roger, Eagle. On vous a eu cinq minu
Okay. Die gleichen Kommentare. Ich fange hier nochmal ganz oben an. Okay. „BALANCE COUPLE“ sollte in „OFF“ geändert werden. Darunter sollte „LMP“ in „JET“ geändert werden. „400 plus 1“ bei -2 streichen; „MASTER ARM, ON“ bei -1 streichen. Bei -10 Sekunden „MANUAL ULLAGE“ hinzufügen; Zündung hinzufügen – der Kommentar „Wenn kein Start, START-Taste drücken; 
Закат довольно впечатляющий, думаю, не стоит тратить много времени на его созерцание. Он очень интересный. Ещё меня поражает, насколько темно, когда глаза не адаптированы. Я определённо вижу какое-то покрытие на окне. Возвращаюсь к VOX в диапазоне UHF-hi для передачи. Открываю визор, чтобы протереть правый микрофон. Я его лизнул. Закрываю визор. Визор сразу же загерметизировался, чтобы схема скафандра могла начать работать. Не хочу снова с ней возиться. Вентиляционное отверстие скафандра держится очень хорошо, около 68 градусов. Так что купол снова поднимется. Сейчас он поднят на 76, 75. По-видимому, это более высокое значение — то, что нам нужно. Думаю, добавлю ещё полбалла, и, возможно, мы её зафиксируем. Наконец-то становится прохладнее, так что я знаю, какое значение выбрать. Я установил количество охлаждающей жидкости для скафандра и рычага управления на 8,5. Показания на дисплее купола в данный момент составляют 75 градусов. На входе в скафандр — 68 градусов. Очень приятно. Я чувствую, как прохладный воздух обдувает мое лицо. Показатель кислорода выглядит очень хорошо, 60 и 75 (psi, в сотнях). Я слежу за инвертором 250. Он приближается к 140 градусам, а контраст с 150 снизил
視準星は地球、下 037、右 22、プラス 10 68、マイナス 165 00 128 56 361 18。位置合わせの星：主星はシリウス、副星はリゲル 010、29
わかりました。ピッチが下がり、ロールもほ
Ой! Поторопился с выводами
了解。ジョン・グレン氏は、無数の粒子が最初に現れる日の出の時間にカプセルの側面を軽く叩いて、彼のお気に入り
了解
Roger, Houston. Pourriez-vous no
Okay. Mein Fenster ist frei.
Okay, Jack. We'd like the E
Roge
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम बदलाव करने जा रहे हैं - हम अपनी वॉइस अपलिंक को किसी दूसरी साइट पर बदलने के बारे में सोच रहे हैं। अगर आप थोड़ा इंतज़ार करेंगे, तो हम देखेंगे कि क्या हम गुणवत्ता 
了解
يا تشارلي، هل هناك 
알겠습니다. 배경 소음 속에서 큰 소리로 말씀하시는 걸 들었습니다. OMNI Del
Хьюстон, С
我安装了防溅帘和颈部挡板，舱内空气循环手柄向上。左侧呼吸管手柄向上，舱内通风手柄向上。舱门释放扳机处于关闭状态。确认水封已向下并关闭。系好安全绳，打开左侧舱门。将指挥官飞行员的救生装备收纳到飞船右侧。整个回收环……都在飞船右侧。你要做的就是带着你的救生包移动到左侧座位。把飞行员的
Keep an eye on tha
Окей NSR 03 47 34
Okay. And directly behind his head are our optical instruments, 
わかりました
No
Roger, Houston. Ti informiamo che il CMP è 
아니요, 우주선 내부 어디
Хорошо. Еще один момент, который мы рассмотрим перед началом проверки — и мы это сделаем — это стандартный шаблон проверки входа, и в настоящее время он указан в контрольном списке как то, что мы делаем примерно через час. Мы хотели бы проверить, можете ли вы прочитать число на прокрутке, чтобы мы могли видеть, на каком этапе проверки мы находимся. Мы рассматриваем возможность проверки одного из этих шабло
11, Houston. Potresti descrivere, dal tuo punto di vista, la calotta polare? Ci sembra che si estenda lungo la costa
Хорошо. Мне нужно выяснить,
روجر. إليك تحليلًا جنائيًا: الاسم 11، 105 35 3700، 107 11 3000، 0538، ناقص جميع الأصفار. غير متوفر، 0937
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आप चाहते हैं कि हम कैमरों का परीक्षण करें? - मैं इसी ब
CSQ, Gemini 
Je parle des aurores boréales. Je n'ai pas pu les voir. J'aperçois des lumières au sol, au milieu de la fenêtre, juste au moment où les aurores boréales
Это должно 
حسنًا، ما هو ال
Хорошо. И еще, ваш вектор состояния теперь основан примерно на 5 часах отслеживания. Мы определили, что вы находитесь на перисинеи в 69,7 милях с возможностью свободного возвращения. Угол вашей траектории захода на посадку выглядит примерно как минус 14. Вам потребуется 
Gemini 4, Gemini 4. This is Houston. I will give you a 27-BRAVO update if you can read. It is a split burn. Forward 76. Aft 94. 2+07. 1+58. 09 12 06. 9+30. Did you co
あなた方はその後全員ブロックアウトされまし
Ok, bene. La spia del compo
Okay. Jim is going to take a shot of us from the lower equipment bay, and then we
هناك منطقة
Хорошо. Собираюсь нажать «ПРИНЯТЬ», и тут у меня возникла необъяснимая активность кре
Et si vous lisez, donnez-moi
Хорошо. Думаю, все представляют космическую программу как сплошную экзотическую электронику, и, конечно, многое из этого так и есть. Но я подумал, что стоит показать здесь пару приборов. После первого прибора вы получите очень точное измерение количества оставшейся воды в контейнере. Мы собираемся использовать этот мешок, который я сейчас показываю, чтобы собрать оставшуюся воду и посмотреть, сколько её у нас действительно осталось, и, надеюсь, в будущих миссиях мы сможем безопасно ув
Roger. Prima di tutto, Frank, i ragazzi qui alle con
Bene. Quello che possiamo mostrarvi ora, un piccolo vantaggio aggiuntivo, è che abbiamo il farmaco sul divano di Fred nel modulo di comando in questo momento. Lo abbiamo stivato temporaneamente mentre controlliamo l'Aquarius e sotto il suo divano abbiamo stiva
음, 우리는 호주를 처음으로 낮에 봤어요. 먼저 바스라를 지나 인도 섬들을 가로
Roger, 11. Und wir haben noch etwa 14 Minuten bis
わかりました。試してみたいときは教えて
好的，没问题。
G
Roger. Disabled. And down here, we see that your hydrogen and oxygen on the fuel cell are exactly matched, so we su
里面有个彩色的——我没想
Okay, mal sehen. Trennen Sie die V
VOX 녹음 중입니다. 방금 비행 중 스틱을 움직여서 반응 속도가 증가하는지 확인해 봤는데, 전
Okay... zu diesem... Vektor. Okay, R1 plus 45498... Okay, plus 190... plus 08256. Okay, jetzt zeigen wir die Postleitzahlen a
苦情は聞いていませ
Roger, Houston. minus 11, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 36325, minus 01727, plus 01428 180 003 000, nicht anwendbar, plus 00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254; Scorpii Delta, down 103, left 48, plus 0742, minus 16500 13005 36327; Sirius, Rigel, 129 155 010; vier Qua
Да. Эти "Астрос" действительно ловят мух с 
روجر. وأنا كذلك يا باز. ورقم 11، الزوايا بالنسبة لك هي 1978 للدوران، و1285 للميل، و340
你的信号弹没反应。
哦，那是——那是最低要求。3.4，4.1。如果——你可
Р
네. 책 내용을 대부분 검토했고, 재진입 구역에 들어가기 전에 보일
Roger. Je reçois vos horaires d'inclinaison sous pe
Roger, Buzz. Ich bin bei minus 50 Grad 
しかし、今のところ、飛行計画より約45分早くプラットフォームの電源を入れること
好的，
Okay, on comparing the flight of 13 to Apollo 8, lift-off was about the same amount of vibration as I noticed on 8, but at the beginning of the flight, there was less of the sideways motion than we experienced on Apollo 8. The S-IC separation felt more violent on 13 than it did on 8, maybe that's because I was in a different seat, I don't know. But there was about three sharp transients of the cut-off and a couple of big bangs where we were thrown backwards longitudinally on our straps before the S-II went off. And the S-II was, of course, just as smooth on 13 as 8 except for the number 5 engine. And we did not expe
11，休斯顿。我们仍然可以看到热带辐合带的带状结构。我猜现在最主要的带状结构
Roger. Je voulais juste m'assurer que vous n'aviez pas déjà rendormi. J'ai aussi quelques dernières nouvelles si vous souhaitez savoir ce qui s'est passé ces dernières 12 à 14 heures. À
Bon, pour le moment, notre m
밴스, 당신은 글을 어떻게 읽
Ok, ora metà di quello che vedo è chiaro e l'altra me
ठीक है। सबसे नीचे, आपको "10,000 फीट मुख्य पैराशूट तैनात करें, मुख्य तैनात बटन, 1 सेकंड के भीतर दबाएँ" लिखा
روجر. الوزن 366
ठीक है, पृष्ठ के मध्य में, पंक्ति 9 पर, ह
エントリ パッドは次のとおりです: Mid-PAC、000153、000; 、178; マイナス 21.66、マイナス 165.37; 28。次の 4 つの列は N/A、DO は 4.00、Zebra Libra か何か、Beta Libra は下 08.8、左 0.4、リフト ベクトルは上、エントリは一直線、星は 31、33。ロール 041、ピッチ 045、ヨー 024。非終了パターンを使用します。月が沈むまでムーン チェック姿勢を維
Okay. Have him tell us what he's - wha
패널 8에서 B3와 C4가 모두 꺼져 있고, 레지스터 2에서 무엇을 원하
罗杰。今天早上关于阿波罗计划的新闻头条中，有一条提醒大家留意一位带着大兔子的美丽少女。古老的传说中，一位名叫嫦娥的美丽中国少女已经在月球上生活了4000年。据说她因为偷了丈夫的长生不老药而被流放到月球。你也可以
こちらフ
好的。那是第 20 颗星和第 27 颗星
ठीक है। यह पेरिसिंथिय
Das ist bestätigt. Einen Moment bitte; wir sprech
Va bene. Vorrei leggere ad alta voce i dati relativi alla
Well, I hate to run out, you know, after only 3 days
D'accord. Ensuite, panneau 3: TRANSPONDEUR, PRIMAIRE; AMPLIFICATEUR DE PUISSANCE, sur PRIMAIRE (vérification); AMPLIFICATEUR DE PUISSANCE, ÉLEVÉ; MODE, VOIX, sur ARRÊT; PUISSANCE, sur NORMAL; PMP, sur NORMAL; ANTENNE BANDE S, OMNI D (Delta). D'accord, pouvez-vou
لدي مشكلة في نظام التحكم الآلي للطوارئ (ASCS). أعتقد أن النظام لا يعمل بشكل صحيح. دعني... تم تفعيل نظام الرجوع للخلف في حالات الطوارئ، وتم تفعيل نظام الرجوع اليدوي. عليّ تقييم هذه المشكلة في نظام التحكم الآلي للطوارئ، يا جيم، قب
Роджер. Предыдущее сообщение у тебя есть, 14:54:00 Horizon Scanner Sunset Ch
La pressione del vapore sta 
ठीक है। आपके वेक्टर के आधार पर, ज़मीन मध्यमार्ग पर 15.3 फीट प्रति सेकंड की गति, VEI 36221 और गामा -6.51 की गणना करती है, इसलिए लगता है कि आपका प्रोग्राम काफी अच्छा है। हालाँकि, आपके समाधान को हमारे वेक्टर पर लागू करने पर, हमें गामा -10.32 मिलता है। हमें उम्मीद है कि थोड़ी और ट्रैकिंग और पृथ्वी क्षितिज के कुछ दृश्य प्राप्त करने के बाद ये द
Ricevuto. E assetto d
Nun ja, 
Ja, Joe, es sinkt. I
이글, 휴스턴입니다. 고비트 전송률이 끊겼습니
육분의에 대해 조금 말씀드리겠습니다. 좁은 우주선 안에서 육분의를 사용하는 것은 매우 어렵습니다. 특히 헬멧을 
Roger, Bill. Ihr könn
Ok. Aspetta un attimo e ti f
شكرًا لك
아폴로 8호, 
Anfangs verhinderte die Operation mit dem Treibstoffablass den geplanten sofortigen Beginn unserer Beobachtungen, da wir ein weiteres Ausweichmanöver durchführen mussten. Der Ablass des Treibstoffs verursachte eine enorme Menge an Pseudosternen in dem Gebiet, was eine optische Kalibrierung praktisch unmöglich machte. Die von uns entwickelte Methode erwies sich als wenig effektiv. Schließlich verwendete ich die Methode, in den Weltraum einzudringen, Sirius, unseren hellsten Stern, anzusteuern, die Achse und den Zapfen zu bergen und das Raumschiff dann zu Sirius zu fliegen, um diese für die optische Kalibrierung zu verwenden, was wir später auch taten. Bezüglich der Lichtstreuung scheint es, dass wir in fast jeder Lage während unserer passiven Temperaturregelung Lichtstreuung im Scannenden Teleskop messen. Sie äußert sich hauptsächlich in Form eines breiten Lichtbandes quer durch die Mitte des Teleskops, etwa 10 Grad in beide Richtungen von Null. Es ist sehr schwierig, Sterne in diesem Bereich zu sehen. Die Neuausrichtungen verliefen erfolgreich. Ich konnte den Stern im Sextanten für die Ausrichtung anvisieren, aber ich konnte den Stern, den wir beispielsweise in Fällen wie Regor oder Menkent im Sucherfernrohr verwendeten, nicht identifizieren. Die erste Sternbeobachtung der Erde zeigte einen sehr undeutlichen Horizont. Es schien jedoch eine recht scharfe Linie zwischen dem vermeintlichen Erdhorizont und der Atmosphäre zu geben. Der La
分かりました。ジャック、宇宙ステーションや宇宙ステーションについて、どのような計画や考えがあるのか​​、LiOHキャニスターを使うのか、それとも司令船に積んで持ち帰るのか、あるいはあなたの計画はどうなってい
좋습니다. 새로운 마음가짐을 갖췄습
了
네, 그게 저희가 하고 싶었던 거예요. 여러분께 보여드릴 수 
了解。残差はマイナス0.1、マイナス0.2、マイナス0.7です。DELTA-VZにはNOUN 86を使用しまし
Oui. C'est exact. En fait, effectuer cet alignement sur Terre cette fois-
不，没关系，万斯。我想在我们担心这件事之前，我们还有另一场初试
Хорошо. PAD: 102 33 04.36, 09 50, минус 00021 182 287 000, плюс 56919. меньше 10: 105 12 30.00. больше 10: 103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00. Нет плюс 12 прерывание: 102 44 27.00, плюс 01223, минус все нули, плюс 01889 01520, плюс 00110 02250 046 000 190, плюс 01187, плюс 00000, плюс 019011 103 31 07.00 105 12 3
حسناً، ه
如
Roger. Forty percent for 21 seconds, I believe is what you read back. And all the rest is correct. Now, fo
रॉजर। नील, दूरी के हिसाब से तो तुम ठीक लग रहे हो। पैनोरमा पूरा करने के बाद हम तुम्हें फिर से लाइन में लगा देंगे। अभी तुम पैनोरम
Ok, ho la visiera
Также можно использовать невесомость для демонстрации многих вещей, которые мы все изучали в школе. Я хотел бы кратко показать, как легко объяснить работу гироскопа. Если я раскручу эту банку, то, согласно уравнениям движения, мы ожидаем, что после того, как ей будет придано вращение и ось вращения будет направлена ​​в эту сторону, если мы приложим к ней определенный крутящий момент (я сделаю это, надавливая на нее руками таким обр
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Калифорнийский коммерческий технологический институт, Калифорн
Und noch eine Frage; ich nehme an, die ist für Jack. Haben wir eine Ahnung, warum wir die Spannung am Hauptbus B vor einiger Zeit nicht ablesen konnt
حسنًا. لديّ خبرٌ خاصٌّ من هاني. تقول أحدث طبعةٍ من صحيفة "إنترستيلر تايمز" إنّ رحلة القمر تحتلّ مكانةً بارزةً في الصحف والتلفزيون
शांति,
هذا صحيح. ما نريده، إذا كان لدينا تشغيل يدوي، فسيتعين ع
지금 슈트 설정을 8로 조정했습니다. 즉, 슈트 냉각수량을 8로 설정한 것입니다. 슈트 흡입구 온도는 현재 65도(화씨)로 쾌적합니다. 사실 전에도 꽤 시원했지만, 다시 시원해지고 싶습니다. 그리고 돔 내
You ought to give those guys a chance to go back
Хорошо. Для управления двигателем перейдите в GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, ATTITUDE CONTROL. Переключатели будут ROLL PULSE, PITCH PULSE, YAW MODE CONTROL. Мы будем использовать управление тангажем и креном. ENGINE GIMBAL будет ВЫКЛ.; мы будем использовать 10-процентную тягу; мы будем запускать и останавливат
Понял. Обратите вн
Ja, 
मुख्य फेयरिंग से नीचे उतरना... मुझे पृथ्वी दिखाई दे रही है... गुरुत्व
Хорошо, дайте мне попробо
C'est exact. Je vi
友谊七号，这里是印度
ठीक है, लीडर। आपसे वहीं मिलेंगे। पिछली राइड बहुत ही शानदार रही; यह इंजन सबसे स्
كل ما علي فعله هو تحريك مرفقي إلى اليمين، وسأضر
Okay. Ich habe ein paar N
弗兰克，我的想法和你很相似。月球上这无垠的寂静令人敬畏，也让你更加意识到地球上拥有的一切是多么珍贵。从这里看
حسنًا. نحن ن
Да. Мы думаем, что у вас уже появится код 37 06. Если это так, нажмите ENTER, и 
네. 또 하나 기억해 두셔야 할 점은 우리가 달을 제대로 보지 
Il booster si è allontanato molto rapidamente ed è passato sotto di noi, come se ci foss
हा हा। मुझे लगता है कि इस समय "ड्रिफ्टिंग एंड ड्रीमिंग" जैसा कोई पुराना गाना उपयुक्त रहेगा, लेकिन इस सम
Родже
좋습니다. 오늘은 절차에 따라 관측 전과 후에 트러니언 바이어스를 측정해 주시길 바랍니다. 이는 열 효과로 인해 육분의 각도 측정에 오차가 발생하는지 확인하기 위한 것입니다. 관측 전에 측정한 바이어스 값을 반영해야 합니다. 연속 두 측정값이 0.003도 이내이면 NOUN 87에 PROCEED 표시를 하십시오. 그리고 측정 사이에 트러니언을 몇 도 정도 움직여 주십시오. 오늘은 지구의 시야가 평소보다 훨씬 작을 것입니다. 
是的，差不多就是这样。阻力并没有发生剧烈变化。而且我注意到，当我取下那部分材料时，它被压得很紧实，颜色也深了很多，而
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्
D'accord, Joe. Concernant les nouvelles, Jim préférerait attendre un peu avant de les diffuser, et je voudrais faire une demande au FAO, s'il le veut bien, dans la journée, lorsque nous recevrons une mise à jour du plan de vol avec les activités que nous avons convenu de rendre 
了解。順調に進んでいる。
Привет, Бермуды, привет, Bermuda CapCom. Fri
네, 그렇습니다. 저희 팀에서 열 상황을 평가하고 있습니다. 상당히 오랜 시간 동안 접속이 어려울 것 같습니다. 그래서 별 관측 3회를 마치시는 대로 다시 접속을 시도해 주시도록 안내해 드린 것입니다
罗杰，巴兹。当你停止——或者更准确地说——当你终止操作时，我们观察到，你得到了一个导致死区缩小​​到 0.5 的信号。只要你不打开任何自动选择开关，我们就没
阴性。无需用药，外科医
Eh bien, non. Il me faut une autre manœuvre pour att
好的。我们想带你们欣
حسنًا، هذا هو مفتاح السخا
Bene. Poi il successivo, due, tre, quattro, cinque, sei sono uguali, e poi vo
11번, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 폐수 처리 배수구를 통해 환기 작업을 진행한 결과, 산소 유량 센서가 실제로 오작동하고 있는 것으로 확인되었습니다. 순환식 물
没错。好的。接下来：下一台相机——准备 1。这里有噪音。好的。下一台——下一台相机是 16 毫米镜头，这些照片的优先级为 3。好的。首先，从 A-8 取出 16 毫米镜头和电源组。取出 10 毫米镜头，然后从 B-3 取出 18 毫米镜头并安装到相机上。连接电源线，将帧速率设置为每秒 12 帧，之前给你的那条数据线这次读取
Ro
ジンバル角度の最新の測定値を教えていただけますか？プラスX軸
अपोलो 8. ह्यूस्टन. मेरे पास आपके लिए मैच का स्कोर है। अंतिम स्कोर 
Je ne vois pas où il est indiqué de faire cela, mais je suppose que ce n'est pas grave. Je pense que nous
Okay. Well, as I said, I was going to show you but I'm afraid I filled it too full and i
Roger. Je le répète. Nous l'avons vu dans l'obscurité, mais nous ne l'avons plus revu depui
Roger, 11. Per la calibrazione dell'ottica ho 346,5 per il rollio, 345,0 per il beccheggio e 0,07,8 per l'imbardata. Le correzioni d'assetto a penna e inchios
Ok, Joe. Siamo pronti a copiare un aggiornamento del piano di volo e i tuoi mater
아니요, 제가 그것들을 가지고
Ciao Hawaii, Gemelli
Hey, ich habe die Hül
روجر، باز. اختر Bravo، OMNI، HIGH-GAIN TRACK إل
わかりました。UP TELEMETRY COMMAND を OFF に読み戻します。VHF AM B は中央、S-BAND SQUELCH は OFF、FUEL CELL REACS VALVES は NORMAL、TAPE RECORDER FORWARD は中央、TAPE MOTION はバーバーポール、POWER は中央、PMP POWER は中央、AC INVERTER 1 はオフ、AC INVERTER 2 はオフ、INVERTER 1 を AC 1 にオフ、AC 1 RESET はオフ、INVERTER 2 を AC 2 にオフ、AC 2 BUS RE
你好，友谊七号，Woomera C
罗杰。你看到吗？在左边角落里，有
It's go
Come vanno i dati di tra
Roger. Une dernière remarque: ce sujet ayant suscité de nombreu
시그
Giusto. Questo vale per il sorvolo e il pericinto più un aggiornamento di 2 ore. Vorremmo anche ricevere un rapporto aggiornato su tutte le vostre finestre. Stiamo cercando di elaborare piani alternativi per l'utilizzo della finestra centrale quando siete in orbita lunare e vorremmo assicurarci di capire es
जेमिनी 4, जेमिनी 4, जब भी आपका OAMS बर्न 120 फीट/सेकंड से अधिक होगा, हम आपको स्प्लिट-बर्न देंगे, जिसमें 84 फीट आगे के 
Ich kann es je
У меня есть ещё кое-какая информация. В ближайшие 2 часа у вас вряд ли появятся какие-либо интересные данные о траектории. Однако нам показалось, что сгорание прошло очень хорошо, мы внимательно изучаем ситуацию и свяжемся с вами примерно через 2 часа. Ещё мы ожидаем, что бак с гексагональным литием достигнет предела разрыва. Самое раннее время, когда это произойдёт, по нашим прогнозам, — примерно через 107 часов, с точностью до 25 минут. Самое позднее вероятное время — 110 часов, и это, предположительно, будет недвигательный выброс, н
Okay. Now I've got quite a bit of information to pass up to you here. We would like for the Pilot, who is asleep, to leave his face-plate open and his gloves off. And then we would like for the Pilot that is awake to take off his helmet and gloves and use the light-weight headset for communications if he can. And we would like for you to continue this way up until about 3 hours prior to retrofire. Then, once in orbit, at your convenience
Va b
了解。古いクレーターの南側に、南縁に小さな明るいクレーターがあります。ある測量によると、彼は
了解。都合の良い時に、このパスでCRYOをかき混ぜてもらいたい。それから
자세 제어가 아주 잘 되고 있습니다. 수동 연료도 충분한 것 같습니다. 아직 72% 정도 남았습니다. 피치 방향으로 사이클릭 레이트를 확실히 제어하고 있습니다. 요는 상당히 안정적이고, G가 증가하고 있습니다. 캡슐은 상당히 안정적입니다. 녹색 흐름이 보이고, 가끔 주황색 줄무늬도 보입니다. 재진입도 아주 
温度も良さそうです。燃焼させると何
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। लगभग 1 मिनट में कार्नार्वोन 
D'accord. Nous 
Роджер. Я не совсем уверен, что тогда произошло, Майк. Я размечал места посадки, используя код, и у меня постоянно появлялся большой цапфовый узел для автоматической оптики. И я ви
नहीं। हमने तनाव कम 
... questo campo visivo è per lo più blu, c
Roger, Our next COMM test is ranging only test. I
Je peux bien voir les États-Unis. On vient de passer derrière moi la typique ceinture de br
Neil, hier ist Houston. Erwarten Sie aufgrund Ihrer bisherigen Erfahrungen mit dem Kameratransfer irgendwelche Schwierigkeiten bei der
로저, 이글. 이건 다운보이스 백업보다 낫습니다. 대
جيميني 4، CSQ. هل يمكنك فحص بطارياتك الرئيسية وإخبارنا إن كانت تعمل أم لا؟ لـ... أو الثام
Comprenez que 
حسنًا يا جاك. لاحظ أنك قمت بتأمين ذلك، وكان هذا ما سنوصي به على أي حال. سنطلب من الفريق المختص في الغرفة الخلفية مراجعة الأمر ومعرفة ما إذا كان بإمكانهم التوصل إلى أرقام أفضل بناءً على زاوية المخروط التي تمر بها، وما إذا كانت هناك أي زوايا دوران متاحة لك. وإذا كانت هناك زوايا دوران، وكان لدينا متسع من الوقت، 
여기는 프렌드십 세븐,
好的。杰克，我告诉你我们需要什么。尽量把这件事重新理顺。我们——看
も
روجر، اتصل بنا
알겠습니다. 밴스, 이해합니다. 달이 바로 여기에 있어서 눈키는 어차피 잘 안 보일 
Poco fa avevo la visiera aperta per la pillola di xilosio. Tutto il resto del cibo che ho a bordo si è sbriciolato o sciolto. È i
Also, ich lese 70 Grad ab. Ich bin echt etwas ratlos, wie ich die Temperatur senken soll. Mein Anzug – das Wasserventil ist jetzt über die Markierungen hinaus eingestellt. Das scheint nicht zu helfen, und auch eine negative Einstellung bringt nichts. Das ist falsch. Die Kabinentemperatur war über den Markierungen. Die Anzugtemperatur liegt beim Vorstartwert von etwa vier. Ich stelle jetzt auf plus 6 und schaue, ob das die Temperat
로저. 우리가 궤도를 아주 정확하게 알고, 별의 위치를 ​​아주 정확하게 알고, 별이나 행성이 지는 시간까지 아주 정밀하게 알고 있으니, 이것이 지평선의 고도를 측정하는 꽤 좋은 방법이 될 수 있을 것 같
로저. 이 내용을 녹음
Nous avons un bon nombre de S-6. Nous avons eu quelques observations éparses de S-5... des photos, mais nous avons besoin d'au moins un survol des États-Unis, et nous aimerions un autre au-dessus de l'Afrique du Nord si nous
我这就给他们打
わかっ
ジム、分解しな
本に関しては、使用するリングの種類にもう少し注意を払う必要があると思います。これまでに2、3回、開けるのに苦労しましたし、ページが破れて本から外れてしまうこともあります。リングを取り付ける穴の補強を検討する必要があります。水鉄砲は、水を出すために先端から突き出ている小さな乳首が、シミュレーターと同じように「OUT」の位置で固定されていて、トリガーを離しても水が流れ出てしまいます。実際には、食品パッケージから水鉄砲を引き抜いた際にカプセルから水が流れ
D'accord. Compris. L'idée, concernant la manœuvre de mi-parcours, est de la réaliser avant la purge du réservoir de superoxyde, ce qui signifie que nous le ferons aux alentours de 105 heures, je suppose. Ainsi, je garderai le contrôle du vaisseau spatial en ca
«Аполлон-8», Х
You'
फिर ऐसा लगा जैसे सारी हलचल रुक गई हो और हम शायद करीब पहुँच रहे हों। इसलिए मैंने अंतरिक्ष यान को घुमाया और प्लेटफॉर्म को सीधा करने की कोशिश की। इसी बीच, बूस्टर काफी तेज़ी से हमारे नीचे गिरने लगा। इसलिए म
Роджер. А теперь, вниз
पीछे से संक्रमण
네. 저게 8번 패널의 투광등입니다. 이제 5번 패널의 투광등 가변저항기를 '투광'으로 설정하고, 100번 패널의 투
Gemi
確かにしっかり固定されますよ。普通の
Roger. They're in the same position as the antenna right now; plus 15 degrees pitch and - no, now wait a minute. I got them - go
I'm saying all of them look clean again. I guess they've fired so clean that they don't seem to... at all.... different color,... copper, bronze, 
鹰，我在这里。我已经读取了地址 404、405 和 
時
알겠습니다, 버즈. 비행 계획 항목에 대한 몇 가지 업데이트 사항부터 말씀드리겠습니다. 먼저 6번 중간 코스는 취소했습니다. 대기하세요. 
محولات التيار الخاصة 
Roger. Danke. Auf Seite 2-
أوديسي، هيوستن. إلي
روجر، 11. زاوية الميل ناقص 35، زاوية الانحراف
Вне
Roger, io e te abbiamo trasmesso un c
O
Okay. Und ich hätt
आपको यह जानकर शायद दिलचस्पी होगी कि मुझे नहीं लगता कि हमें एक-छठे जी के अनुकूल होने में कोई कठिनाई महसूस होती है। इस वातावरण में चल
There's th
Roger. Vers
Da stimmen wir zu. Wir haben immer noch keine Ahnung, warum wir uns damals v
Okay. Die Zielerfassung war erfol
分かりました。全部理解できたか確認しましょう。ランデブーのために、まずCB 16 インバータ2を閉じ、CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE インバータ2も閉じます。次にパネル14でインバータ2が選択されている
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend die Details erläutern. Okay. Der Eintritt in die Atmosphäre erfolgt um 142:40 Uhr; etwa 6,5 ​​Stunden vorher, also ungefähr, beginnen wir mit der Aktivierung der Heizleistung, indem wir die Temperaturen des Kommandomoduls überprüfen und dieses gegebenenfalls vorheizen. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies notwendig sein wird. Detaillierte Anweisungen dazu folgen später. Ungefähr 6 Stunden vorher beginnen wir mit dem Hochfahren der Heizleistung anhand der modifizierten 30-Minuten-Checkliste, die Sie bereits für den vorherigen Zwischenkurs verwendet haben. Kurz darauf, etwa 5 Stunden vorher, benötigen wir die Ausrichtung für die Körperachsenausrichtung mithilfe des Erdterminators, wie zuvor. Sobald wir das haben, führen wir -7 durch, was jetzt etwa einer Brenngeschwindigkeit von 2 Fuß pro Sekunde oder etwa 15 Sekunden entspricht. Mir wurde gesagt, dass sie jetzt bei 1,5 liegt, also deutlich innerhalb der Toleranz. Okay. Danach beginnen wir sofort mit dem Manöver zur Abwurfposition des Servicemoduls. Da wir es früher als üblich abwerfen, befindet es sich in der Flugebene. Wir benötigen und wollen keine Abweichung von der Flugebene. Das Servicemodul befindet sich also in der Flugebene und ist entlang des Radiusvektors nach außen gerichtet. Anschließend bereiten wir das Kommandomodul für den SEP des Servicemoduls vor, einschließlich der Überprüfung und des Heißlauftests. Etwa 4 Stunden und 30 Minuten vor dem geplanten Zeitpunkt werfen wir das Servicemodul ab. Wir werden die Maschine so lange hochziehen, bis wir das Servicemodul im Flug haben und versuchen, ein paar Fotos zu machen. Wir werden aber keine riskanten Manöver für Fotos durchführen, da wir den Flugbahnwinkel zu diesem Zeitpunkt nicht verändern wollen. Okay. Das gibt uns ungefähr zwei Stunden Zeit, um die Vorbereitungen abzuschließen, falls wir in Verzug geraten. Dann können wir die Checkliste durchgehen und das Hochfahren des Kommandomoduls vorbereiten. Wir werden das Kommandomodul etwa zweieinhalb Minuten vor dem Start vollständig hochfahren. Wir werden den Computer zuschalten, die Maschine hochziehen, die Statusvektoren übertragen und die Plattform des Kommandomoduls ausrichten. Spätestens nach etwa anderthalb Stunden, also mit einer Stunde Zeit für die Vorbereitungen am Kommandomodul, werden wir das Manöver zur Abwurflage einleiten. Anschließend beginnen wir mit dem Schließen der Abwurfzone. Natürlich ist unsere Lagerung noch nicht vollständig konfiguriert. Wir schließen die Luke, führen eine Druckdichtigkeitsprüfung durch und trennen die Landekapsel bei -1 Stunde bzw. 141 Stunden und 40 Minuten ab. Sobald das geschehen ist, können Sie das Manöver zur Eintrittsposition einleiten. Dort angekommen, führen Sie eine Sextanten-Sternprüfung durch, demontieren die Optik und erhalten dann Ihre endgültige Eintrittsplattform. Sie können das System initialisieren und befinden sich im Prinzip wieder auf der Checkliste. Es gibt einen kleinen Unterschied zu Ihrem regulären Eintritt: Sie befinden sich etwas früher am Morgen, daher wird es Nacht sein, wenn Sie die Plattform erreichen. Glücklicherweise steht der Mond jedoch in einer perfekten Position für eine Horizontprüfung. Wir führen daher eine Mondprüfung anstelle einer Horizontprüfung durch, die Sie bis zum Monduntergang verfolgen können, der
何も見えないよ、ガス。O2ハイレートチェックの終わりに、残量は62%まで減っていた。最初は66%だったのに、最後は62%だった。太陽のせいで窓の外が何も見えないよ、ガ
로저. 전적으로 동의합니다. 그리고 당신이 그 작업을 시작하는 동안, 저는 이 메모를 읽어보겠습니다. 프로그램 경보 5.6, 범위가 400해리 이상일 경우, 20번 항목에 설명된 대로 진행하십시
Roger. Our cabin is holding at about 4.9. What else do you wa
نعم. نعتقد أن الأمر ضمن الحدود الطبيعية يا بروس. أردنا فقط الحصول على موافقتك قبل 
Houston, Tranquility wartet auf GO, um sich mit einer Mondphase 
Roger. Ho una di
거스, 
いいえ、あなたなら大丈夫で
Эй, Хьюстон, мы можем затягивать болты с нужным моментом? Вы правильно определяете углы з
هذه
アポロ11号、ヒューストン
Подтверждаем, мы завершили проверку. Мы предоставим вам данные через секунду. Мы успешно прошли проверку с помощью секстанта при 
Zwill
わかりました。FORWA
जब यह रोल के डेडबैंड के अंत तक पहुंचता है, तो यह वास्तव में बहुत ही साफ और सटीक तरीके से वापस आता 
Nous avons vérifié tous les raccords et je sais que je peux tout brancher à nos UCD. Donc, s'il n'y a pas de fuite, nous pouv
Not at this altitude, and that's strange. I thought I could see that. At this altitude, the refraction of the light in the optics themselves, due 
알겠습니다. 음, 배터리 2에 있는 온도 센서가 주기적으로 온도를 올리았다 내렸다 하는데, 그럴 때마다 마스터 알람이 울립니다
Roger. Understand. Just for information, perhaps you read it out on the ground. I ran our pericynthian altitude determination using
Roger. Kein Problem, Neil. Mach, wann immer d
Громко и четко. Скорость снижения 30 футов/сек. Пр
Columbia, Houston. We've lost data with Eagle. Will you please have h
हाँ। मैं सहमत हूँ, जैक। जैक स्विंगर्ट और मैं थोड़ी देर पहले ऊपर 
And, Apollo 8, you can do the first part of that now at your convenience to verify that register 1 is reading 10 000, 
알겠습니다. 수정 사항 업데이트와 지도 업데이
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。復唱は正確です。参考までに、ゴールドストーンは約1分間のFMダウンリンクキャリアを受信したと報告しています。SバンドAUXスイッチ、SバンドAUXテープスイッチをOFF、SバンドAUX TVス
好的。功能已关闭。模式：
Okay, Bill. Das kommt auf Seite 2, Strich 22 deines Flugplans. Für den Kommandomodul-Piloten – ich habe es ihm ja schon gesagt – möchten wir, dass er oben auf der Seite, ungefähr bei [Zeitangabe fehlt], eine Ausrichtung durchführt. Danach sollte die Na
わかりました。彼にも
ठीक है, बज़। इसका उद्देश्य फ्लाईबाई है। SPS/G&N: 62815, प्लस 097, माइनस 020 070 54 5944, माइनस 00028, प्लस 00023, प्लस 00069 029 149 312, अपोजी NA है, प्लस 00221 
罗杰。桑给巴尔。抱歉，我打错电话了。我要把宇航服冷却阀的设置调到5.5
휴스턴, 컬럼비아. 뒷면 플랫폼을 약
*** entrambe le valvole di isolamento sono adatte per la disconnessione SUIT
Хорошо. Это перицинфянское плюс 2 для быстрого возвращения. Это будет / 62871, минус 161, плюс 129, плюс 45224, минус 06216, минус 18712 001 287 351, ноябрь Альфа плюс 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, Земля вверх 010, вправо 37, плюс 1475, плюс 06500 13239 36913; главная звезда Сириус, вторичная Ригель 129 155 010, без зазора, предполагается выполнение коррекции на середине курса 4 и используется то же выравнивание. Время для 5 для определения GERU - это Golf Echo R
是的，乔。我得——
Мы ещё не пересекли терминатор. Но теперь у тебя есть гори
お返ししました。マイナス648のキャビンで、ガ
Era prevalentemente bianco, forse con una sfumatura giallast
Ok, Jim ha ragione. Dovremmo cancellare tutto questo, con un paio di eccezioni. La valvola di scarico anteriore, chiusa, il primo passaggio, dovrebbe rimanere. Tutti gli altri passaggi dovr
そうです
ठीक है। जिम, हम
حسنًا يا هيوستن. نر
समझ गया। बाएं से दाएं कॉपी करें: 0, 0.64, और 0.0
我们口腔检查结果良好。我们口腔
休斯顿。你如何解读阿波罗8
Fred-o, se pensi che sia pratico, siamo pronti a dartene un po': stiamo lavorando su alcune impostazioni della fotocamera per le foto della ventilazione. E, se hai una fotocamera pronta all'uso, facci sapere qual è, così possiamo ottenere le impostazioni per quella fotocamera. Co
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपको दिखा रहे है
私たちは、私たちは、
잠시
حسنًا. لدينا الآن نقطة حضيض في الفراغ تبلغ 23.6 درجة؛ وزاوية مسار طيران سالبة 6.25 درجة؛ وإذا قررنا تعديلها، فسنحصل على سرعة متوسطة تبلغ حوالي قدمين في الثانية. بالطبع، تتحسن المواد الاستهلاكية باستمرار؛ لدينا ما يكفي من الماء لمدة 163 ساعة، والأكسجين لمدة 230 ساعة، والطاقة الكهربائية لمدة 172 
حسنًا. انطلق. 127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 درجة/ثانية 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-برافو: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-برافو: 93. 1+58 14 45 02. 11+04. 62-برافو: 85. 1+47. 16 18 08. 10+29. 63-ب
ठीक 
Roger. Houston asks your status and asks if there's any change in your Flig
了解です。CB(16)のFred-oですが、インバータ2がオープンになっています。ミッション
Roger, Neil. Abbiamo un... Se ci fornite dei
Jim, pour info, j'ai la tablette d'entrée. J'ai le résumé météo de la zone d'atterrissage, que tu n'as probablement même pas besoin de recopier, mais que je te lirai quand tu seras prêt; et quelques étoiles pour Jack que je lui réserve pour
Ici D-9, exécution 2. Utilisez les paramètres de filtre programmés. Avez-vous copié? Ter
Well, hell, Jack. All you - you don't use a very good one... Just if you'll go... at your attitude reference for... and the g-meter backup. Because
11번, 휴스턴. 현재 예보에 따르면 복구 지역의 기상 조건은 양호합니다. 고도 2000피트, 산발적 강풍, 풍향 70도, 풍속 13노트, 시야 10마일, 파고 약 4피트입니다. 어제 예보에서는 열대성 폭풍 클라우디아가 하와이 동쪽 500~1000마일 해상에 있다고 했습니다. 어제 오후 지구 위성 사진에서 클라우디아가 소멸하는 모습이 확인되어 이전보다 영향이 더욱 줄어든 것으로 보입니다. 현재 복구 지역은 열대 수렴대 바로 북쪽에 위치해 있으며, 창밖으로 보시면 열대 수렴대를 보실 수 있을 겁니다. 어제 서쪽으로는 열대성 폭풍 비올라가 발생했다는 보고도 있었습니다. 현재 비올라는 필리핀 동쪽 약 1000마일 해상에서 북서쪽으로 이동하고 있습니다. 열대성 폭풍 비올라는 세력이 강해지고 있으며, 향후 12시간 이내에 태풍으로 발달할 것으로 예상됩니다. 하지만 태풍의 영향권은 휴스턴에서 훨씬 서쪽에 위치할 것입니다. 사실, 일출 경계선은 아직 비올라에 도달하지 않았습니다. 몇 시간 후에 도달하면, 아마도 여러분이 계신 곳에서 쉽게 구별할 수 있을 겁니다. 어쩌면 사진을 찍어보는 것도 재미있을 거예요. 몇 시간 후에 비올라를 볼 기회가 생기면 사진에 대해 이야기해 주세요. 이상입니다. 현재 여러분 지역의 날씨와 상
Nous espérons, Bruce, que notre pellicule 16 mm fonctionnait correctement lors de la descente et que nous pourrons confirmer notre point d'atterrissage. Nous pensions, durant
로저. 방금 7분 10초쯤에 진입했어요. 유지 장치가 제 머리
روجر. قد يهمّكم يا سكان المركبة الفضائية كولومبيا أن تعلموا أن اليوم هو عيد الاستقلال في كولومبيا. تُوّجت غلوريا دياز من الفلبين بلقب ملكة جمال الكون الليلة الماضية، بعد أن تفوقت على 60 فتاة أخرى لتفوز باللقب العالمي. تبلغ الآنسة دياز من العمر 18 عامًا، بشعر وعينين سوداوين، ومقاساتها 34.5-23-34.5. أما الوصيفة الأولى فكانت ملكة جمال أستراليا، تلتها ملكة جمال إسرائيل، ثم ملكة جمال اليابان. وبينما أنتم في طريق عودتكم مساء الثلاثاء، سيلعب نجوم الدوري الأمريكي والدوري الوطني البيسبول في واشنطن. من المتوقع أن يكون ميل ستوتلمير من فريق يانكيز هو الرامي الأول في الدوري الأمريكي. لم يُعلن بعد من سيكون الرامي الأول في الدوري الوطني، إذ يضم الفريق تسعة رماة. مع أن الأبحاث قد أثمرت نتائج إيجابية في برنامج الفضاء، إلا أن نتائجها لا تكون مضمونة دائمًا، على ما يبدو. أعلنت شركة وودستريم، الشركة الأم لشركة أنيمال تراب الأمريكية التي صنعت أكثر من مليار مصيدة فئران خشبية زنبركية، أنها صنعت مصيدة فئران أفضل، لكن لم يلقَ منتجها إقبالاً يُذكر. في ا
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Alle Systeme bereit. Wir werten die Dia
ジ
روجر. ناقل البيانات الرئيسي هو ٢٤، وواحد هو ٢٥، ٢٥، ٢٥. ناقل البيانات الاحتياطي واحد هو ٢٥، ٢٥. معزول ٢٩، والرئيسي ٢٤ مرة أخرى. المراوح ١١٣، ١١
روجر. 01 0688 259، بيرسي زيتا، هبوط 048، يسار 05. الباقي غير قابل للتطبيق. سيريوس، ريجل، 129 155 010؛ فراغ سلبي. نافذة الأفق، إشعال ناقص دقيقتين، 40 د
لم يتم التخلص من الأكسجين بعد
लेकिन आपको एटीट्यूड बाईपास और मैनुअल ओवरराइड 
Più o meno è corretto, Jim. Jack si allineerà grossolanamente a quell'assetto. Questo è il motivo per cui ti faremo manovrare verso quell'assetto. Calcoleremo gli angoli di allineamento grossolano del gimbal e glieli passeremo, e la prima cosa che farà quando arriverà lì, secondo la sua lista di controllo, sarà allineare grossolanamente la sua piattaforma. Poi entrerà e, se non riesce a vedere le stelle, ti passeremo rapidamente i tuoi angoli per metterlo nell'assetto di visualizzazione della Luna, e l
सच 
正在等待您的食
Oui, je l'ai fait, et Ed disait que son mal de tête avait disparu. Il
Und ich werde Sie mit diesen Anrufen nicht mehr belästigen, es sei denn, Sie wünschen sie ausdrückl
Houston, Apollo 11. Der Hauptalarm wurde nun dreimal ausgelöst. Nummer 4. Der Wert steigt auf etwa 1,4 und pendelt dann wieder auf e
Повторите 
D'accord. Panneau 3: CHARGE DE BATTERIE, ARRÊT – vous l'avez déjà fait, Jack – ensuite: ONDULEUR CA, Panneau 5: CONNEXION DU BUS PRINCIPAL BAT B/C À BAT B/C. Hein? Oui, c'est en position haute. Disjoncteur, BAT A ALIMENTATION/POSTLANDING, ouvert; disjoncteur, BAT B ALIMENTATION/POSTLANDING, ouvert, Panneau 5: CHARGEUR DE BATTERIE CB BAT B, ou
ア
روجر. 2500
阿
ठीक है। चेकलिस्ट G/8-2 के चरण 5 में, "दो आस
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। क
لا، لا. إنهم بطيئون للغاية؛ لا يبتعدون عني بأكثر من 3 أو 4 أميال في الساعة. إنهم يسيرون بنفس سرعتي تقريبًا. إنهم أقل من سرعتي بقلي
アポロ11号、ヒュー
訂
ठीक है। लगता है सामान्य आवाज काम नहीं कर पा रही है। क्रायो टैंकों में, ऑक्सीजन में काफी हद तक डीस्ट्रैटिफिकेशन हुआ है, खासकर ऑक्सीजन में, और आप इसे पंखे के चलने के दौरान देख सकते हैं, इसलिए हम सुनिश्चित करेंगे और आपको याद दिलाएंगे कि ऑक्सीजन को पहले हिलाते रहें। सब कुछ एकदम सही चल रहा है। जी एंड सी हमें बताता है कि मात्राएँ ठीक लग रही हैं। आप अपने और अपने अलाइनमेंट के लिए अनुमानित मात्रा का ही उपयोग कर रहे हैं। हम आपको बता दें कि आप चंद्र कक्षा में प्रति क्वाड 30 प्रतिशत का उपयोग कर सकते हैं। अब यह काफी ईंधन है, और आप 30 प्रतिशत को अपने पास मौजूद ईंधन में से घटा सकते हैं, और यह एक अच्छ
Okay, sie steuert wie eine Weltmeisterin; der Kammerdru
C'est
जैक, हम इसे अब और ब
39-3 83
Хорошо, Джим. Поскольку переключение антенн довольно неудобно, мы уговорили их купить только половину данных. Если вам будет слишком сложно переключать антенны, просто оставьте всё на одной антенне, и мы будем слушать 
Non credo che sia più difficile... di quan
Roger. Why don't y
请注意，我的氧气压力略高于 960。目前我不会使用高流量供氧，因为指挥飞行员睡得
Sure wil
R
오늘 휴스턴의 가장 큰 뉴스는 바로 휴스턴 애스트로스에 관한 것입니다. 스포츠계 소식으로는, 휴스턴 애스트로스가 신시내티 레즈와의 경기에서 9회말 극적인 역전승을 거두며 7-4로 승리했습니다. 하지만 9회초
ケン、あそこに4つのブレーカーがありますね。パネル8とおっしゃったので、そちらのことをおっしゃっているのかと思いました。今はブレーカーが切れているとは思え
Roger sur l'inertie. Et c'est parti pour le PAD 2. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, +166, -081; TIG 080 11 3603. NOUN 81: -01408, moins toutes les billes, -00743. Lancer toutes les billes, 196 359 00657, +00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Étoile du sextant 23 1160 138. Le reste du PAD est NA. Alignement, Vega et Deneb 243 183 012. Remplissage, deux jets 19 secondes. Remarques: Concernant votre charge, nous souhaite
حسنًا. نريد الخيار الأول، ولديك بعض زوايا الكرة للشمس والقمر. وحاليًا، وضع جيم الشمس
아, 우리가 얼마나 가져왔는지 확인하고, 어쩌면 일부를 아껴 써야 할지도 모르겠어요. 충분한 양이 
Хорошо, Хьюстон; 13. В ответ на вопрос 1, изменения уровня шума происходили главным образом между первой ступенью и остальными ступенями — уровень шума на остальных ступенях был примерно одинаковым, очень тихим, а первая ступень, конечно, вначале издавала довольно м
रॉजर। अपोलो 8, आपके बैकसाइड डेटा पर, यह लगभग समझ से बाहर है। बिल, हमारा सुझाव है कि आप बैकसाइड पास के लिए अपने माइक की स्थिति द
D'accord. Vous pensez que nous finirons par produire suffisamment d'ea
روجر، إنها القاهرة في السادس والعشرين من الشهر، الساع
好的。在第一次和第二次重新加压之间
休斯顿静海基地。关于发射前的会合雷达
Roger. Ich habe
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप सुन रहे हैं, तो बता दें कि यह 000 नंबर हमारे संचार के लिए बहुत ख
रॉजर। आप पृथ्वी को देख रहे हैं, जैसा कि हम इसे अपनी बाईं खिड़की से देख रहे हैं, पृथ्वी का लगभग आधा हिस्सा। हम पूर्वी प्रशांत महासागर को देख रहे हैं, और स्क्रीन के ऊपरी आधे हिस्से के उत्तरी भाग में, हम उत्तरी अमेरिका, अलास्का, संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका, कनाडा, मैक्सिको और मध्य अमेरिका को देख सकते हैं। दक्षिण अमेरिका टर्मिनेटर के ठीक बाहर या छाया के अंदर अदृश्य हो जाता है। हम महासागरों को स्पष्ट नीले रंग में देख सकते हैं, पृथ्वी पर फैले प्रमुख बादल संरचनाओं की सफेद पट्टियाँ देख सकते हैं, और तटरेखाओं को देख सकते हैं, पश्चिमी अमेरिका, सैन जोकिन घाटी, सिएरा पर्वत श्रृंखला, बाजा कैलिफोर्निया प्रायद्वीप को पहचान सकते हैं, और हम दक्षिणपूर्वी अमेरिका के ऊपर कुछ बादल संरचनाओं को देख सकते हैं। अलास्का के दक्षिण-पश्चिम में एक स्पष्ट हल्का तूफान है, जो लगभग 500 से 1000 मील की द
Ich war in keiner Weise desorientiert. Ich konnte entweder auf den Boden schauen – und fühlte mich dabei völlig wohl – oder mich auf den Rücken rollen und nach oben schauen, ohne d
Nel circuito di raffreddamento secondario, sembra che la valvola di contropressione sia leggermente aperta. Ti consiglio di portare l'interruttore EVAP del circuito di raffreddamento secondario in posiz
रॉजर। अल, मैंने सब कुछ तैयार कर लिया है, सिवाय स्क्विब
Меркурий? Громко и ясно. Я использовал Меркурий и Луну д
찰리, 네 말 알아듣겠어. 방금 하이 게인으로
Roger. Les nouvelles attitudes pour 
All right. This is midcourse-7 corridor control, is N/A; 42, N/A; plus 0020.5; 0019.3. 
准备复
오늘 밤 잠자리에 드실 때까지 스위치를 AUTO 위치에 두시도록 요청하셨습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 다시 말씀드리지만, ON 위치에 두셔야 합니
D'accord. Êtes-vous prê
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. لم أتحدث في ذلك الوقت. نحن نبحث في بعض الجوانب لمساعدتكم الآن. بالإشارة إلى سؤالكم السابق حول تنظيم دورات النوم، فإننا نتفق مع تعليقكم. نود العودة إلى خطة الرحلة فيما يتعلق بدورات النوم وما إلى ذلك بحلول وقت دخولنا مدار القمر. لذا، نود منكم استخدام تقديركم الشخصي لاختيار الطريقة الأمثل لتنظيم دورات النوم وتوزيعها بينكم. نود منكم إطلاعنا على مهام كل فرد وخططكم. لدينا مهمة تأخرت ساعتين، ونود إنجاز المهمة الأخرى. يمكننا أيضًا تعديل وقت المهمة الأخرى إذا كان هناك تعارض - أعتقد أن هذا يعني مهمتين إضافيتين. يمكننا تعديل وقت هاتين المهمتين إذا أبلغتمونا بتوقعاتكم الجوية لموعد تواجد جيم لأخذ بعض الملاحظات. إذًا، الرسالة الأساسية هي أننا نرغب في العمل بما يتناسب مع رغباتكم. إذا أخبرتنا بذلك، فسنختار بعض النجوم وبعض الزوايا
खिड़की के ऊपरी दाहिने कोने से सूरज की र
Okay. Bedienfeld 3: BATTERIELADUNG, AUS – das hast du schon gemacht, Jack – als nächstes der
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很神奇，就是眼睛还没适应的时候，周围一片漆黑。我确实能看到窗户上有一些涂层。现在要回到超高频VOX模式进行发射。打开面罩擦拭右侧麦克风。我舔了一下。关上面罩。面罩立刻密封，以便宇航服电路开始工作。我可不想再被它弄脏。宇航服进气口的温度稳定在68度左右。所以穹顶又要升起来了。现在温度是76度，75度。看来这个更高的设置才是我们想要的。我想再往上加半格，应该就能锁定温度了。宇航服终于开始降温了，所以我知道该把温度调到什么程度了。我已经将宇航服和控制杆的冷却液量设定在 8.5。此时穹顶读数为 75 度。宇航服进气口温度为 68 度。非常舒适。我能感觉到凉爽的空气拂过我的脸庞。氧气量看起来也很好，分别为 60 和 75 psi（单位为百）。我一直在观察 250 逆变器。它的温度接近 140 度，而 150 对比度逆变器的温度已降至约 100 度。待机温度约为 100 度，也就是舱内温度。第三点，250 逆变器——它有点问题，我会密切关注。舱内热交换器的温度稳定在 40 度，这让我很头疼，因为我显然欠了弗兰克·萨蒙斯基 50 美分。我感到很惊喜。舱内燃料读数也略高。让我看看，我们现在的燃料压力是 5.5 psi。读数大约是5点，更正一下，5.3，对于这个舱室来说不算太高。外面天色渐暗，我想现在出去看看星星。左手手套上手电筒的电池盖有点松动了。只有开关那部分松动，没问题，只是电池盖磨损得比较快。我一边想着，一边看了看手表，以防万一。更正一下，没错，没问题。情况还不错，这次旅行最好在穆切亚检查一下
Роджер. Понимаю. Пока все очень хорошо. Мы оценим этот вариант, как только сможем
SPINTA DELTA-V, NORM
Okay. And switch INVERTER 2, AC BUS 2 to on; and another switch, AC BUS 2 RESET, to reset and center; switch BATTERY CHARGE to Alfa; switch DC INDICATOR select BAT CHARGER; and then what we want you to do is to report the charger current and voltage to every 10 minutes for the first half hour, and then once every 30 minutes after that. And that'll be on our call, Jack. Read back the switc
Это «Сигма Семь» в режиме AT. Отсутствует рыскание
Роджер. На второй звезде, шестой отметке, м
- - non puoi farci niente 
알았어, 잭. 쿼드 
了解。ここは正常のようです。すべて順調です。自動燃料は55%です。高度7万フィート、6万5千フィートを通過。姿勢は非常に安定しています。高度6万フィートまで上昇中。レートコマンドは順調です。高度5万フィートまで上昇中。彼女はとても可愛いですね。高度4万5千フィートまで上昇中。1Gくらいまで減りました。4万フィート、4万1千フィートでエンジンを始動する準備をしています。エンジンを始動すると、エンジンが切れます。音が聞こえますが、雲で見えません。姿勢は安定しています。手動レバーは入っています。燃料はかなり速く減っています。エンジンが見えます。非常に良さそうです。補助ダンピングを使います。実はそれは必要ありません。レートコマンドが燃え尽きつつあり
Хьюстон, нам п
Не думаю. К
11, Houston. Ce n'est pas encore en service. Nous vous préviendrons d
ハワイ、こちらはジェミニVIです。35度40秒のデータです。シータ6.4度、範囲115.58度、デルタV合計523度、デルタVI24.8度。データプロットは完全に公称値に見えます
D'accord. La pression de l'hélium est d'environ 37, la pression d'admission est de 182 et la quantité est de 80. En B, la température est d'environ 112, la pression de l'hélium d'environ 36,5, la pression du carburant de 180 et la quantité d'environ 77. En C, la température est de 140; d'ailleurs, les autres températures auraient dû être de 120 au lieu de 110; je consultais le mauv
Das war echt ein toller Ta
D'accord. Je me deman
はい、了解です。それと、オデッセイさん、別の設定もご用意しました。16個のオー
Es sah genauso aus, wie ich es erwartet hatte, Joe. Ich hatte sie im REACQ-Modus mit den eingestellten Werten laufen, und sobald wir die R
जैसे-जैसे रात गहरी होती जा रही है, बाकी तारे दिखने लगे हैं। मैं उन्हें देख पा रहा हूँ - मुझे लगता है कि अब मैं लगभग पाँचवें परिमाण तक के तारे देख सकता हूँ। फिर भी, यह उतना शानदार नज़ारा नहीं है जितना किसी साफ़ रात में 20,000 फीट की ऊँचाई पर किसी विमान के ऊपर से दिखता है। मैंने अपनी लाइटें काफी कम कर दी हैं, जिससे बाहर का नज़ारा कहीं 
Andiamo al computer. L'orologio segna circa. Diremo. Dovremmo prendere Muchea, e anche fare un controllo dell'imbardata. Abbiamo 05:36 sull'a
13, ह्यूस्टन। अब आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ सुना
Отлично. Рад это слышать, Майк. Спа
ह्यूस
어떻게든 방
알았어, 짐. 그건 우리
आप उन्हें बता सकते 
分かりました。フ
And, Houston, Aquarius. I'm not sure that if I follow and null the needl
Nutzt du VOX, weil die Verbindung abbrich
حسنًا. تم أخذ عينة الطوارئ، والنتيجة ***. يبدو أن الحفر عبر القشرة الأرضية الأ
- - そして、それらを並べたら、他のすべてに対してあなたの目は
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 온도를 모니터링하고 있습니다.
ロジャー、約 5 psi 低い数値を示していたことがわかりまし
احصل على هذه المع
아, 로저, 잔지바르 캡콤입니다. 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 모든 퓨즈는 이전에 보고된
Roger. The DELTA- looked like it was right on. Burn time appeared to us to be about 2 seconds longer, 517. VGX was reading 95485 when we got it. The attitude was nominal. VI was reading 35452 at cut-off, H-dot 04552, and H is
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。这里的情况相当不错。看起来你们几乎已经成功将探测
حسناً، أعتقد أن أفضل خيار هو النافذة الوسطى، ألا تعتقد 
«Колумбия» и «Игл»: для обо
Nous aimerions savoir à quel momen
Et la côte 
네. 아, 이쪽은 켄이
Beh, q
Okay. The same comments. I'll start a
تذكروا، الجزء الأهم من الرحلة سيكون بعد يومين عندما نبدأ رحلة
Ricevuto. 
Forza RKV,
Il tempo di combustione
Roger, Houston. Could you give us t
Ich kann jetzt die 
लगभग 
Oh
여기는 프렌드십 세븐이에요. 저는 아주 덥네요. 아니, 그냥 여기 가만히 앉아서 최대한 시원하게 있으려고 하는 거예요. 지금 엄
D'accord. Avant de copier, laissez-moi vous lire le texte en entier pour que vous compreniez de quoi il s'agit. Ce petit document s'intitule « Expérience de corrélation entre la photographie télévisée et la photographie argentique ». L'objectif est de fixer une caméra de télévision équipée d'un téléobjectif sur un support, dans la fenêtre de rendez-vous, et de prendre une image de la Terre à travers les filtres rouge et bleu, une minute par filtre (chaque filtre étant utilisé séparément). Ensuite, il s'agit de prendre une autre image de la Terre à travers le filtre r
了解しました。ロードは完了したと思いますので、SPCを有効化してアジェナの通信を開始してください。万が
ठीक है। और यहाँ चंद्रमा की जाँ
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Понял. Можете продолжа
हमें हाई गेन मिलता है और साथ ही 
Roger,
يا إد، كما تعلم، لطالما قلنا إننا سنقوم بإعادة دخول مفتوحة الحلقة. أنا سعي
Роджер. Просто интересная особенность: на моем центральном окне, на котором уже образовался лед, он начинает таять
Вода на вкус нормальная, никаких проблем. И теперь нам удобнее спать под диваном. Я был здесь с Фрэнком и периодически засыпал последние несколько часов. С
Roger, Jack. Dato che 
これで十分です
In pratica, quello che ho visto era il colore della lucciola che aveva visto John, che in altri momenti avrei potuto riprodurre come bianco. Sono assoluta
अच्छा, तो... लगता है आपका काम हो गया। बस याद रखना, आपको एफ-स्टॉप को 22 से थोड़ा कम करना होगा, शाय
Roger. Volevo solo farvi sapere che, visto che avete superato di un'ora e mez
Ricevuto. La modal
13번, 휴스턴. 네. 폭발물 처리반 사용 허가합니다.
This is Friendship Seven. I read you okay, Indian Com Tech. This is Friendship Seven. I am on straight manual control at present time. I have 92 percent fuel. Over on, on manual, auto fu
Roger, Neil. Zunächst einmal: Den ganzen Tag über erreichten das Weiße Haus unaufhörlich Glückwunschbotschaften von Staats- und Regierungschefs aus aller Welt zur Apollo-11-Mission. Zu den jüngsten gehören Telegramme von Premierminister Harold Wilson aus Großbritannien und dem König von Belgien. Die Weltpresse war von den Nachrichten über Apollo 11 dominiert. Einige Journalisten schätzen, dass heute mehr als 60 Prozent der in den Zeitungen des Landes abgedruckten Artikel Ihre Mission betrafen. Die New York Times, deren heutige Ausgabe – wie bereits erwähnt – trotz einer Auflage von 950.000 Exemplaren eine enorme Nachfrage verzeichnete, kündigte an, den gesamten Artikel am Donnerstag als Sonderausgabe nachzudrucken. Ministerpräsident Alexei Kossygin übermittelte Ihnen und P
... जैक... अरे जैक; मैंने तीसरे चरण के लिए B
Ой, нет... они не хотят сбрасывать кислород из баллона ECS напрямую за борт. Они хотят сбрасывать его за борт через к
Джим, мы хотели бы, чтобы ты подумал об этом режиме управления и оценил, насколько он может сработать, исходя из того, что ты знаешь сейчас. Мы немног
Bene. Per il Pacifico centrale, le condizioni generali sono buone. Ci si possono aspettare basi nuvolose sparse di 2000 piedi, visibilità 10 miglia, vento 070 a 12, altezza delle onde 4 piedi, altimetro 2974. Alba 10 Zulu e prima 
نعم، هذا صحيح يا
Ok, vediamo anche delle piccole cose bianc
いくつか送っ
로저, 월리, 전국에서 생방송으로 시청하고 있는 모든
मुझे लगता है कि हमारे पा
रॉजर, 11. हमारे पास वह क्षमता नहीं है। अच्छे अंक प्राप्त करने के लिए हमें एम-लाइन का क्षितिज के समानांतर होना आवश्यक है। हमें लगता है कि कल आपने अपने पैंतरेबाज़ी के लिए जिस स्टेट वेक्टर जानकारी का उपयोग किया था, उसे थोड़ा अपडेट करने की आवश्यकता हो सकती है। और यदि आप एक पल प्रतीक्षा करेंगे, तो हम आपको आज ऑटो पैंतरेबाज़ी द्वारा प्राप्त 
रॉजर। मैं अभी लगभग 7 मिनट और 10 सेकंड
我无法识别最后一个在高频频段通话的电台。通话非常清晰，应该在太
看起来即使在断电状态下（字迹模糊），我们仍然消耗着略低于11安培的电流。1号机组是10安培，2号机组略低于11安培。系绳——或者说系绳或脐带式约束装置在外部舱门的位置——使得在航天器前方进行任何舱外活动（EVA）都相当困难，尤其是在自由系绳空气动力学方面。每当我在那片区域操作时，系绳末端会把我往后拉，反作用力会把我带回航天器上方，然后回到适配器部分。这就是为什么我在舷窗上方进行操作时，总是会超出视线范围，然后又漂回航天器后部的原因。我不得不不断地拉动自己才能回到航天器前部。我对拍摄到的照片并不满意。我身上系着好几根绳子，很难把它们都固定住……枪上的绳子、我身上系的缆绳、脐带缆绳，还有其他几根杂七杂八的绳子到处乱甩，很难不让它们挡住镜头。你可能会注意到，照片里我的手臂移动得很快。我一直在努力把它们移开，好让我能拍照。我估计它们大概有50%到60%的时间都在我前面；剩下的时间里，我的位置也不如我理想中那么好。我大概拍了十几张照片。即使只系着缆绳，操作起来似乎也很容易。我感觉不到任何撞到飞船的倾向。无论我以什么姿态返回，我都
E, Houston, la Tranquility Base vi darà qualche commento riguardo alla questione geologica di ieri sera. Siamo atterrati in un campo di crateri relativamente liscio, di crateri secondari allungati - crateri secondari circolari, la maggior parte dei quali ha bordi indipendentemente dalle loro dimensioni. Questo non è universalmente vero. Ci sono - Ci sono alcuni dei crateri più piccoli intorno a
-
lights are glow
He says that he had a battery A voltage drop of 2 volts, and he'll try to look at the test meter for
了解。ヒューストン、待機。CSをゲット、パッ
대기하세요. 좋습니다. 배트 C 37, 파이
O
D'accord. Merci. Et si vous y pensez, le moment venu, quand vous n'êtes pas en train de vous défouler, 
13, Houston. We've got a groovy TV pictu
11日、こちらはヒューストンです。昨夜、宇宙船内の気温が少し下がったという主観的な評価についてですが、先ほど、確かに前夜より約3度下がったと報告しました。振り返ってみると、ア
알겠습니다. 말씀하신 내용을 잘 들었습니다. 작업 보고서를 업데이트하고 기동 부하 정보를 전송해 드리겠
Die Anzeige signalisiert, dass der Schutzschalter für die Landebahnsteuerung geöffn
Das war dumm. Jetzt gehen wir in den Fly-by-Wire-Tiefflug. Ich hatte einen Fall von doppelter Befehlsgewalt und habe es total vermasselt. Aber besser Treibstoff sparen. Es ist viel zu leicht, in eine doppelte Be
休斯顿，哥伦比亚。我听得清清楚楚。怎么回事？
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. إليكم بعض التحديثات العامة في اللحظات الأخيرة. في التسجيل، نصحناكم بضب
좋아
Roger. Ce l'abbiamo fatta. Ed sta cercando di far u
R
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。現在、ゴミ捨て場への立ち入りは許可されています。ここはもうしばらく
휴스턴, 질문 
روجر. ينصحك الجراح بشرب 
휴스
Хорошо. Теперь прижмите пакет к клейким лентам, которые мы прикрепили по бокам контейнера. Если останется лишний материал, просто слегка сложите его складками, чтобы получилась достаточно плотна
Хорошо. Топливный элемент 1
지금은 태양이 너무 밝아서 동공이
アポロ8号、ヒ
Хорошо. Здесь нет данных по всем
Columbia, Houston. Unser Kommunikationspr
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, RK
ठीक है। मेरे पास इसमें से 5 घंटे कम हैं, ज़रूरत पड़ने पर -7 घंटे भी कम हो सकते हैं, और अब आप मेरे लिए एक 
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Mentre aspettate che la Luna si stabilizzi e che possiamo gu
收到。你刚才说错了。那是卡那
Roger. Es dauert sowieso ewig, sie do
Пер
友谊七号，瓜伊马斯指挥中心。地面出现瞄准镜缩
К западу от вашей станции я наблюдаю множество вихрей и завихрений облачных узоро
مرحباً يا جيم. ديك أندروود هنا. إنهم يُجهّزون عملية تحميض فيلمك عندما تعود، وهل يمكنك أن تُعطينا فكرة م
Roger. Sono contento che tu sia pronto a copiare il numero 6. Ho un ultimo commento per Jim prima che tu lo faccia. La correzione di cui stiamo parlando è quella che riceve dopo la correzione. Ci
我大概有 20 分钟都没碰过这个手控器，但它的指针一直停在零位；我以
D'accord. C'est exact. L'étape suivante consiste à mettre l'interrupteu
好的，确认无误。我们需要将它们闭合，以便您读取电压和电流。下一步，在 250 号配电盘上，我们需要将断路器 BAT A 电源入口和后部入口以及 
그리고 iOS 음성 기능이 사라진 후에는 해당 지역에서 
D'accord. Concernant la correction de trajectoire, nous allons la reporter à environ [heure manquante]. Il s'agira d'une combustion d'environ 7,6 m/s (25 pieds/seconde). C
Ok, torno alla checklist,
Основные батареи имеют емкость 
好的。同样的说明。我从头再说一遍。好的。“平
Oui, il y a un orignal ici, tu n'imagines même pas. C'est le plus gros que j'aie jamais vu. Mon Dieu, qu'il est énorme! Il est gigantesque! Il est tellement gros que je n'arrive même pas à le faire entrer par la fenêtre. Tu veux v
Okay. Die Behälter sind so angeordnet, wie Sie es wünschen, wobei der Boden d
您能否向粮农组织查询
أنا متأكد من أنني لا أستطيع. 
Arriva... nei tempi previsti - - in questo momento è rosso. Abbiamo appena inserito un... Cr
Okay. -2, /G&N: 63634; plus 0.96, minus 0.23,; minus 0021.7, minus 0001.7, minus 0008.0; 080, 164, 326; N/A, N/A; 0023.2, burn time 0:03.5, 0018.5; 44, 135.9, 28.1; and the rest 
双子座
Do you have an intermediate report for m
Okay, Jack. We're going to bargain with you on this one. Instead of two, would - wish that you would just get just one bag full. That shouldn't do any harm; howe
제미니 4, 제미니 4. 여기는 
For
了解。分か
로저. SPS/G&N 근접 비행: 62815, +0.97, -0.20 0.70 54 5944, -0.0028, +0.0023, +0.0069, 269 149 312 NA, +0.0221 0.0078 0.01
Пр
D'acc
Мы свяж
والسؤال القديم الذي يُطرح علينا دائماً هو كيف نتخلص من النفايات السائلة، وهذا الخط الذي ترونه، أعتقد أ
마음가짐을 바로잡고 있어요. 모든 게 괜찮습니다. 현재 적재 체크리스트의 일부는 완료했
看起来像是侧面的什
Des serviettes hygiéniques. Vous avez le dictionnaire 
休斯顿
जब मैं बाहर था, तो मैंने जिम की खिड़की पर ध्यान दिया - उसकी खिड़की के बाहरी हिस्से पर एक परत चढ़ी हुई है। एक बार जब मेरा कंधा या हाथ उससे टकराया, तो वह परत सीधे खिड़की पर फैल गई, और उसकी विंडशील्ड के ऊपरी हिस्से पर भी लग गई, जिससे उसे बाहर 
プラットフォーム上で加速度計のバイアスを確認することができませんでした。ほとんどの時間、推進力で追尾していたため、長時間安定させることができませんでした。特殊な姿勢だったため、テープダンプを数回スキップしたようです。最初の通過ではカーナボンとの通信があまり良好で
잔지바르, 여기는 시그마
E qui dentro sta
ठीक है। मध्यमार्ग सुधार संख्या 4: / 62888 नवंबर अल्फ़ा नवंबर अल्फ़ा माइनस 00012, माइनस 00011, प्लस 00012 031 008 323 नवंबर अल्फ़ा, प्लस 00618 00020 011 00020 17 2965 308 अल्फ़ा-सेंटौरी, ऊपर 073, बाएँ 34। तारों के लिए, यह प्राथमिक सीरियस, द्वितीयक रिगेल, 129 155 010 ह
Go ahead, Houston
Ok, come sai, la modalità di controllo è impostata per la deriva. La modalità selezionata è normale, automatica, giroscopi ingabbiati. Ho selezionato l'assetto di rientro. Sono ovviamente in modalità fly-by-wire low. L'interrutt
... नियंत्र
Sバンドは良好のようです、
انتظر
Roger. Ihre Systeme sehen von hier aus gut aus. Bitte warten Sie
캔턴 컴 테크, 여
रॉजर। लगता है नील पांच-बाई आ रहा है, 11। माइक, बैकग्राउंड में मिलते हैं। डिटेलिंग वाकई शानदार है। रंग अच्छे हैं। कमांडर आर्मस्ट्रांग की यह बहुत अच्छी तस्वीर है। बज़, जब आप कैमरा खिड़की की तरफ ले जाते हैं जहाँ से सूरज की रोशनी आ रही है, तो तस्वीर ध
알겠습니다. 같은 의견입니다. 다시 처음부터 설명드리겠습니다. "BALANCE COUPLE"을 "OFF"로 변경해야 합니다. 그 아래 "LMP"를 "JET"으로 변경해야 합니다. -2초 지점의 "400 + 1"을 삭제하고, -1초 지점의 "MASTER ARM, ON"도 삭제합니다. -10초 지점에 "MANUAL ULLAGE"를 추가하고, 점화 장치를 추가합니다. 
I'm seeing things come off, but I can't see them very clearly. There we go into 0.05, a green. I am hands off at this point. In rate command, in aux damp. And I have a roll rate started. A slight pitch rate, not bad at all. I can see out the window for some strange reason at last. There goes another long spiral like looking device. I will give another blood pressure at this point, subsequent to 0.05 g. All rates are very nominal. Rate command is w
Roger. E ho un paio di altre cose, Mike. Dobbiamo terminare la carica della batteria B in questo momento, e inoltre, il meteo sta mettendo a dura prova il nostro punto di atterraggio previsto a causa di temporali sparsi. Non vogliamo trovarci di fronte a uno di questi, quindi sposteremo il
Близнецы 4, это Хирург. Не могли бы вы предоставить информацию о вашем
Итак, «Аполлон-13»; Хьюстон. Луна то появлялась, то исчезала из поля зрения 
영, 영; 확인해 보는 게 
Well, we really don't know. There's usually two people in the cabin, and it's a lot - It seems to be a lot more c
وهذا في جوهره - نعم، هذا في جو
Here is an interesting little feature item that is kind of good to hea
Хорошо. На 1 минуте — «ГЛАВНЫЙ РЫЧАГ», мы удаляем. На 35 секунде удаляем первые две строки. «Ручная очистка» начинается на 9 секунде; мы удаляем блоки на 02 секунде; а строка ниже,
Gemini VIII, Gemini VIII, Houston CAP
Roger. Sauerstofftank Nummer 
What we're really trying to do is get you in a posture so that when you see the Earth come through the window, you can damp her 
We didn't do that intentionally. Stand by
ر
حسنًا، أرى عطارد يمر عبر وهج الهواء. سنرى إن كان سيصمد. عندما قلتُ "أرى"، كانت تلك البداية. مارك، أول تغيير في اللون، وهو الآن أزرق فاتح. ولا يزال مرئيًا. مارك، أزرق داكن. مرئي مارك، يتحول إلى اللون البرتقالي المصفر لسطح الأرض. كان هذا عطارد، وهو يهبط فوق ال
Es war definitiv unter mir. Ich hatte es seit etwa Carnarvon unter mir verfolgt. Bis Carnarvon war es unter uns, dann bis zum Horizont und dann wieder unter uns. Es sah fast so aus, als befände es sich in einer anderen Umlaufbahn als ich. Es hatte einen anderen Apogäum und Perigäum als ich. Jedenfalls versuchte ich, mich ihm bei Tagesanbruch anzunähern, sobald ich seine Position bestimmen konnte. Wie gesagt, zu diesem Zeitpunkt war es ein bis zwei Meilen vor mir – unter mir. Je mehr ich versuchte, mich anzunähern, desto weniger Abstand gewann ich. Ich zündete die Triebwerke in Richtung Gegengeschwindigkeit. Ich zündete meine oberen Triebwerke so, dass ich meine Gesamtgeschwindigkeit verringerte und dann gleichzeitig zündete. Ich konnte mich nie wirklich annähern, und es entf
रॉजर। अब तुम मुझे कैसे समझ रहे हो? 
Bon, Jack, pendant que Fred range mon casque, tu regardes maintenant du côté de son poste. Comment est cette photo? Elle est bien comme ça, ou je doi
嗯—
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Наши предварительные данные указывают на хорошее ограничение траектории. Примерно через полчаса мы предоставим вам более подробные данные
Ne hai 
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات لوصف نجاحكم. من المقرر أن يشاهد الرئيس نيكسون الليلة مباراة البيسبول في واشنطن. بعد المباراة، سيتوجه إلى منطقة عمليات الإنقاذ في المحيط الهادئ. مساء الأربعاء، سينتقل من جزيرة جونستون بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى سفينة الاتصالات البحرية أرلينغتون. ثم صباح الخميس، سيعود إلى الطائرة الهليكوبتر ويتجه إلى حاملة الطائرات هورنت في الوقت المناسب لمشاهدة هبوطكم في المحيط. سيرافق الرئيس وزير الخارجية ويليام روجرز وفرانك بورمان. سيشاهدون الهبوط من على متن سفينة الإنقاذ مع الأدميرال جون سيدني ماكين الابن، قائد قوات المحيط الهادئ. بعد إقامة الرئيس على متن هورنت، سينطلق في جولته الآسيوية وزيارته المقررة إلى رومانيا. يُعتقد أن المركبة لونا 15 قد تحطمت في بحر الأزمات أمس بعد أن دارت حول القمر 52 مرة. وذكرت وكالة الأنباء السوفيتية تاس أنه تم إجراء "أبحاث علمية" في الفضاء القريب من القمر. وقال السير برنارد لوفيل من مرصد جودريل بانك إن لونا 15 اصطدمت بسطح القمر بسرعة حوالي 300 ميل في الساعة. وقد ساد الهدوء النسبي مؤخرًا في فيتنام. وشوهد جنود أمريكيون يقومون بدوريات وهم يحملون أجهزة راديو ترانزستور مضبوطة على رحلة المركبة. وقامت شبكة الإذاعة والتلفزيون التابعة للقوات المسلحة في فيتنام بتغطية المهمة بشكل كامل. ولا تزال المناوشات مستمرة بين المصريين والإسرائيليين على طول قناة السويس. ويحاول مراقبو الأمم المتحدة هناك وقف العمليات. وفي واشنطن، صوتت لجنة الطرق والوسائل في مجلس النواب على خفض مخصصات استنزاف النفط من 27.5% إلى 20%. وقد هطلت الأمطار عدة مرات هنا في منطقة هيوستن. واليوم الجو غائم، ومن المتوقع هطول المزيد من الأمطار. على الصعيد الرياضي، وكما ذكرنا سابقًا، تُقام مباراة كل النجوم الليلة. لم تُجرَ أي مباريات أمس. وفي نيويورك الليلة الماضية، أعلنت رابطة كُتّاب البيسبول الأمريكية عن اختيار بيب روث كأعظم لاعب بيسبول على مر العصور، بينما نال جو ديماجيو لقب أعظم لاعب بيسبول على قيد الحياة. وقد أعلن فرانك بورمان عن هذه التكريمات خلال حفل عشاء أُقيم على شرف اللاعبين. أمضى جو ناماث يومًا كاملًا في معسكر تدريب فريق نيويورك جيتس. وواجه خمسة من رجال الشرطة صعوبة في السيطرة على نحو 500 طفل أرادوا لمس "برودواي جو". وقال إنه يشعر بحالة جيدة وسيشارك في مباراة كل النجوم في الأول من أغسطس، إذا سمح له المدرب ويب يوبانك بذلك. تعرض معسكر فريق أويلرز في كيرفيل للبلل أمس، لكن التدريبات استمرت. وحدثت بعض الإصابات الطفيفة، لكن لا شيء خطير. المدرب والي ليم راضٍ حتى الآن عن التدريبات. ويتوقع فريق أويلرز حضور أكثر من 30 ألف متفرج لمباراة ما قبل الموسم مع فريق بافالو. ويبدو أن إعلان دون ميريديث اعتزاله لن 
Va notato che l'amperometro segna 12 ampere come pubblicizzato: a quanto pare, qualcuno mi sta importunando con un R Cal sulla cabina 02. L'amperometro segna esattam
Роджер. Я вас прекрасно слышу. А как у
Roger. Passez ensuite à la procédure de contrôle de longi
E naturalmente, quando vi preparate a rientrare, tornate in stato di cautela e allerta, ABILITATE, e vorremmo dire da parte di tutti noi qui a Houston e in re
समझना
让我看看。在其他国内新闻方面，新婚夫妇大卫·艾森豪威尔和朱莉·艾森豪威尔结束了他们
Agena ステータス表示パネルの読み
阿
地元ニュースを少しお伝えします。ハンツビルの郡庁舎が昨日未明に全焼したため、再び建設工事が行われるようです。記事では、待つ家族について少し触れています。これはポスト
Роджер, командир индийского военного округа. Я вас прекрасно слышу. А как насче
好的。迈克，你可以按照飞行计划第398页所示的姿态进行机动，高增益角也符
貝殻のように、
Das ist bestätigt. Das wisse
好的，杰克。明白了。问个问题：如果你用望远镜看，能看
先ほどの引き継ぎについてお話ししようと思っていたのですが、少し遅れてしまいました。電力が十分にあるので、ブラックアウト後もSバンドを使えるようにしておきたいので、エントリーチェックリストの2-5ページにある
Roger. Copy. Radar test is valid. Standing by for your burn
Ein wunderschöner Horizont, schwer zu beschre
Amicizia Sette, Amicizia Sette, qui è Muchea Com Tech. Amicizia Sette, qui è Muchea Com Tech. Mi se
Absolument. C
참고로 산소는 잘 유지되고 있습니다. 정상적으로 작동하는 것 같고, 현재 수치도 정상입니다
Okay. Then it's stop
Okay, Jac
... ti ho escluso. Potresti ripetere la d
È a metà strada: si è s
Vérifi
제리
Ja. Gerade als wir um die Ecke kamen, Vance, sagten sie uns, dass es eingeschlagen war – ich erinnere mich jetzt nicht mehr an die genaue Stelle, aber es war ein... Einschlag... und sie haben ihn auf dem... Seis
Si vous avez le temps, veuillez connecter l'émetteur KB et parler, comptez jusqu'à 20. Si vous êtes disponible, faites-le-moi savoir. Vous 
No. None of 
حسنًا يا هيوستن. أبولو 11. إليكم رقم 
好的，休斯顿。月球表面基本上是灰色的，没有颜色；看起来像石膏或者某种灰蒙蒙的深沙。我们可以看到相当多的细节。丰饶海在这里不像在地球上那样显眼。它和周围的陨石坑之间的对比度不高。所有的陨石坑都是圆形的。数量相当多；有些是比较新的。许多陨石坑——尤其是圆形的——看起来像是被陨石或某种抛射物撞击形成的。朗格
SPS/G&N: 36639、あなたのマイナス072、プラス
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है 
Roger. Wir glauben, dass die Daten geladen sind und bitten Sie, die SPCs zu aktivieren und die Agena-Daten zu empfangen. Sollten Probleme auftreten und das Lageregelungssystem der Agena außer Kontrolle geraten, senden Sie einfach Befehl 400, um es abzuschalten und die Kontrolle über da
Sì, ha una deriva casuale. Non c'è alcuna oscillazione che io possa prevedere. La... la linea che porta al palloncino a volte è tesa; a volte è lenta... abbastanza lenta da formare degli anelli. Il suo... il suo comportamento è del tutto casuale, p
पेश है पि
Im Zusammenhang mit dem Nullmeridiandurchgang beträgt Ihre Umlaufzeit
気分はいいです、
Ja, er su
よし、ヴァンス。カートリッジMODのためにいくつかアイテムを発見した。一つは、トートバッグに使う予定だった特殊な防塵カバーバッグ。かなり
Wir s
Ab dem Zeitpunkt, an dem der Hauptkreislauf beginnt, können Sie überprüfen, 
감사합니다. 
Di
... turn to - return to "Entry, checkli
Okay. Aus Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Das große britische Radioteleskop Jodrell Bank empfing heute um 5:49 Uhr EDT keine Signale mehr von der sowjetischen Mondsonde Luna 15. Ein Sprecher sagte, es scheine, als habe die Sonde den Mond bereits hinter sich gelassen. Ein weiteres Zitat: „Wir glauben nicht, dass sie gelandet ist“, sagte ein Sprecher von Sir Bernard Lovell, dem Direktor des Observatoriums. Washington UPI: Vizepräsident Spiro T. Agnew forderte, bis zum Jahr 2000 einen Menschen auf den Mars zu schicken. Demokratische Politiker entgegneten jedoch, dass die Bedürfnisse auf der Erde Priorität haben müssten. Agnew, ranghöchster Regierungsbeamter beim Start von Apollo 11 am Mittwoch, sprach offenbar für sich selbst und nicht unbedingt für die Nixon-Regierung, als er sagte: „Meiner Meinung nach sollten wir bis zum Ende dieses Jahrhunderts einen Menschen auf den Mars schicken.“ Laredo, Texas, AP: Einwanderungsbeamte in Nuevo Laredo gaben am Mittwoch bekannt, dass Hippies keine Touristenkarten für die Einreise nach Mexiko erhalten, es sei denn, sie baden und lassen sich die Haare schneiden. Huberto Cazaras, Leiter der mexi
了解、トランクウィリティ。読み返しは順調ですね。コピーする
Roger… das i
11, this is Houston. On the basis of your last alignment, the platform looks li
Nicht, dass wir etwas gesehen hätten. Wir haben
Roger. Capisco. E ho anche il tuo stesso a
هيوستن، كولومبيا. أكرر: لم أرهما. وجّهت عدسات الكاميرا الآلية نحو نقطة قريبة 
Fred, je n'ai pas copié ce que tu voulais en f
Va bene
Je me sens plutôt reposé maintenant, même si je n'ai pas vraiment bien dormi. J'ai pris deux repas. J'ai déjeuné juste après notre exercice EVA, pendant qu'Ed dormait. Ensuite, j'ai pris le deuxième repas, le repas B. Au premier repas, je n'ai pas touché aux bouchées de bacon et d'œuf. Au deuxième, je crois que j'ai 
D'accord. Nous avons les étapes 6 à 12, mais l'étape 7 a la même longueur que la 6, et les étapes 8 à 12 sont courtes. Elles ne comportent qu'une seule ligne ch
Okay. Sei 
I got one more for you. You'll copy this and give me it all on the readback. Okay. Once you get the attitude and you want to use the - you want to get the
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다
पुराने रास्ते पर ही आ
Ho
Ok. Poi, nella stessa pagina, sotto "Imposta azionamento cardanico", 
알겠습니다. 로저. 저도 여기서 삐걱거리는 
Der Kammerdruck an Bord war damals auch höher. Alles ist auf dem Bordband aufgezeichnet, sowohl die Zeitangabe als auch de
Lumières allumées, je me sens bien, bonne humeur. Paramètres de la cabine: pression 1, humidité 65, température 20, pression dans le compartim
君たちはそこで気を
Ricevuto. Pronto a cop
Okay, very good. I think I give you a good one every third or fourt
Das ist sehr praktisch, denn die Bandbreite – da ist die Sonne … Die Breite des Horizontbandes entspricht genau dem X. Ich k
另外，S-5实验。
Okay
Okay, 11. First of all, on our systems checks, everything went fine. I would like to remind you, though, tomorrow you may see an ascent pressure light when you activate the MC&W. There should be no problem, however. You did note that the AUX tank pressure was only reading 111 psi, which is normal at this point, but below the le
اليوم الثا
That was sent thro
D'accord. On vérifie les projecteurs qu'on t'a donnés. En fait, Jack, tu devrais pouvoir les utiliser tout de suite. Inutile de rester
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Вы закончили фотографировать?
Zwillinge VI, ich verrate dir einen kleinen Zeittrick für deinen Zähltest: Plus 3 Minuten und etwa 15 Sekund
Okay. Roger that. And, Jim, we ought to have a - an entry time line to discuss with
आह, रॉजर, ज़ांज़ीबार कैपकॉम। फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। सभी फ़्यूज़ पहले की तरह ही हैं; मैंने उनमें से कोई भी नहीं बदला है। स्क्विब तैयार है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। सामान्य, ऑटो, जाइरो सामान्य पर है। सभी "T" हैंडल लगे हुए हैं। रेट्रो डिले सामान्य है। सीक्वेंस पैनल सामान्य है। लैंडिंग बैग बंद है। ईंधन 90-98 प्रतिशत है। EPI लगभग सही समय दिखा रहा है। मेरा एटीट्यूड 5 डिग्री बाएँ, 3 डिग्री दाएँ, पिच पर --33 डिग्री है। रेट्रोग्रेड समय अभी भी 04 प्लस 32 प
Хорошо, отлично. Теперь, вероятно, пара сантиметров лишнего пакета торчит вокруг дна контейнера. Чтобы он не прижимался к сетке, мы просим вас обрезать его ножницами, а затем отрезать еще две полоски скотча длиной около 30 см, разорвать их вдоль на четыре куска длиной 30 см и шириной 1,2 см, а затем использовать эти четыре полоски, чтобы закрепить пакет, пропустив полоски с боков контейнера наружу, вокруг дна контейнера и обратно вверх по другой стороне, и при этом, как и сверху, пропустите их наружу отверстия и между сетками. Коне
Sì, la luminescenza dell'aria è piuttosto debo
Hey, bist du – bist du a
E ci sono due cose che vorremmo che Jack facesse nel modulo di comando per alleggerire il carico sul MA
Gemini, CSQ CAP COM. Désactivez vo
نعم، حسناً، هذا عندم
收到。很好。Flight公司也建议，每次启动设备时，都请您向每个
حسنًا. بينما كان جاك يتحدث عبر جهاز الاتصال، كنت أنظر من نافذة الإرساء هنا، ورأيت وابلًا كثيفًا آخر من الجس
Du hast sie das schon gefragt und sie sagten, ich solle es nach 2 Minuten einsc
Ok. Stiamo leggendo 3 g, penso che dovremo lasciare andare il controllo dello smorzamento del rientro questa volta. Ora leggo 4 g. Il rientro sembra procedere bene. Le velocità lì sembrano essere gestite dall'Aux Damp. Non credo di oscillare troppo; sembra che stia rotolando proprio intorno a quel bagliore - il cielo dietro. Il carburante automatico segna ancora
제가 질문 하나 드리겠습니다. 추진제 음성 응답 장치, 네 개, 이발소 기둥
ठीक है। सुधार अंत में दिए गए टिप्
Roge
And in Italy, Pope Paul VI has arranged for a special color TV circuit at his summer resid
لم أستطع تحديد حجمه بدقة. بدا وكأنه جسم كبير نوعًا ما، وبدا أنني أقترب منه بسرعة كبيرة. من الصعب تقدير المسافة بدقة، لكنني أظن أنها حوالي
لا، ليس هناك
Celu
はい。最初のスティックコースは、前方007、左005
حسنًا. لقد تم ضبطنا على الوضع ا
Roger. Entschuldigung für die Störung, Columbia. Zwei Dinge: Wir bitten Sie, gemäß den Anw
罗杰，吉姆
نحن - 
रॉजर, बज़। अभी हम जिस स्थिति में हैं, वह शुरुआत के लिए सुविधाजनक है। हम इसी स्थिति से संतुष्ट रहेंगे। तो हम चाहते हैं कि आप क्वाड चार्ली और डेल्टा को निष्क्रिय कर दें; हम लगभग 5 से 10 मिनट प्रतीक्षा करेंगे, और फिर हम इसे स्थापित
ここの地平線は実に荒涼としています。空は真っ黒で、地球 ― 正確には月 ― は明るく、空と月のコントラストは鮮やかで暗い線となっています。カメラの視界に入ってきたのは、興味深い古い二重環状クレーターです。これは海域でよく見られる興味深い地形で、海と同じ粘稠度と色をした物質で埋め尽くされています。ここには、そうした興味深い地形が3つか4つあります。
알겠습니다. 디스플레이는 열려 있고, SE 오디오는 닫혀 있고, VHF A 송신기는 열려 있고, VHF B 수신기는 열려 있고, 파워 앰프는 열려 있고, 송신기/수신기는 닫혀 있고, S-밴드 안테나는 열려 있고, PMP는 닫혀 있고,
Хорошо. Что касается батарейки № 2, вы думаете, что это может быть неисправность датчика, потому что вы не замети
Vier Fuß pr
Okay, Jim. Es wäre an der Zeit, wenn du Zeit hast, die Spannung und Stroms
حسنًا. للإجابة على سؤالك يا جو، فالجواب هو لا. لقد كنت أتحقق من المقصورة باستمرار. من الناحية النوعية، عندما انتقلنا إلى هذا التكوين، لم يبدُ أن التردد أو ضوضاء مروحة البدلة قد انخفضا... أو انخ
अंतिम
로저. 참고로, 서부 텍사스에 있는 맥도널드 천문대의 레이저가 약 181시 30분부터 1시간 동안 켜져 있을 겁니다. 357도 방향을 지날 때마다 1번 창으로 지구를 볼 수 있을 거고, 그러면 서부 텍사스에 있는
मैं इस पर नजर रखूंगा
Роджер. Как
Ich fand, der heutige Tag lief ganz gut. Wenn morgen und übermorgen genauso verlaufen, sind wir auf der si
D'accord. Sur la liste de 
네, 맞습니다. 지금 저희가 하려는 것은 속도를 줄이고 정상으로 돌아올 수 있도록 여러분이 적절한 마음가짐을 갖도록 도와드리는 것입니다. 지금 제가 읽어드리는 설정이 바로 그 설정이고, 다음 여섯 줄에 걸쳐 속도를
ठीक है। यह र
E quella vecchia tuta laggiù ha una temperatura di 55°, b
了解。プ
Roger, Friendship Seven. Dann fangen wir bitte m
罗杰。哥伦比亚号飞船上的各位居民或许会感兴趣，今天是哥伦比亚的独立日。菲律宾的格洛丽亚·迪亚兹昨晚荣膺环球小姐桂冠。她击败了其他60位佳丽，摘得全球选美桂冠。迪亚兹小姐今年18岁，黑发黑眸，三围是34.5-23-34.5。亚军是澳大利亚小姐，以色列小姐和日本小姐分列第三和第四。周二晚上你们返回地球的时候，美国联盟和国家联盟的全明星队将在华盛顿进行比赛。预计洋基队的梅尔·斯托特尔迈尔将担任美国联盟的首发投手。目前还没有人预测谁会是国家联盟的首发投手。他们的名单上有九位投手。虽然太空计划的研究成果显著，但研究并非总能带来回报，这一点似乎已成定局。伍德斯特里姆公司（Woodstream Corporation）是美国动物捕鼠器公司（Animal Trap Company of America）的母公司，该公司生产了超过十
Rog
버즈가 그걸 잡을 수 있고, 당신은 모니터를 작동시킬 건데
알겠습
아, 한 12~15줄 정도 
Nein, Charlie. I
No, sta solo passando - meglio farlo più tardi; ci saranno momenti migliori. Se quella dannat
ठीक है। जिम के निशानों के बीच हम लगभग 30 सेकंड का अंतराल रखना चाहते हैं। आखिरी निशानों में हम लगभग 15 
我们目前距离月球大约有20500英里。这和你的
已
Хорошо. Крен 180, тангаж 228, рыскание 001; Н/Д; плюс 0017.9, 6652.2, 7:37, 6626.5, и я пропу
Okay. Sounds good. And how d
D'accord, êtes-vous prêt à copie
13，休斯
Gemini 4, Гавайи, связь с оператором. Если вы приняли сигна
How are our eight gray talkbacks; they sti
मार्क। 
Хорошо. Первое, что нам действител
Хорошо. Они очен
수동 비례 제어 모드에서 수동 레버를 당기고 속도 명령을 선택한 상태에서 천천히, 하지만 확실하게 역추진 자세를 취하고 있습니다. 모든 축이 아주 잘 작동하고 있습니다. 롤 자세를 잡고, 요 속도를 얻고, 쾅! 하고 자세를 잡습니다. 그리고 이 순간을 기념하기 위해, 플라이 바이 와이어 저고도 
Aveva difficoltà a mantenere l'orientamento, e da quel momento in poi mi è sembrato che si orientasse fuori dalla navicella senza prestare attenzione alla direzione in cui puntava. Riusciva effettivamente a imprimerle velocità piuttosto elevate, fino a 2° al secondo. Intendevo mantenerle al di sotto di quel livello. Mentre risaliva nella navicella, abbiamo avuto notevoli difficoltà con il portello. Per prima cosa abbiamo sollevato la parte a cricchetto del portello per agganciarlo. Dopo averlo agganciato, non siamo riusciti a chiuderlo abbastanza. In realtà, abbiamo iniziato a tirare verso il basso le maniglie di bloccaggio per far uscire i fermi. Quindi, ci siamo divertiti parecc
Roger, ich verstehe, dass die Uhre
حسنًا، الآن ألقي نظرة على المحول والمعدات الموجودة هناك. أستطيع رؤية سطح الفصل؛ إنه نظيف تمامًا. المحركات النفاثة نظيفة أيضًا. الطلاء الحراري والشريط الحراري يبدوان بحالة جيدة. كذلك، يبدو شريط الفيلكرو الذي وضع
Ich habe vor unserer Abreise hier drinnen Fotos von den Trümmern gemacht und dabei versehentlich die Einstellungen der Reseau-Kamera am DC-Kommandomodul verstellt, die wir für die Fotos des Servicemoduls benötigen. Ich frage mich, ob die FAO die Einstellungen – Blende und Belichtung
이쪽으로 다시 돌아왔습니다. P 창문 앞쪽
Хорошо. Сегодня мы хотели бы, чтобы вы определили смещение цапфы до наблюдений, как указано в процедурах, а также после них. Наша цель — проверить возможность того, что какой-либо тепловой эффект может вызывать ошибки в угловых показаниях секстанта. Полученное ранее смещение следует учесть, то есть ПЕРЕЙТИ к пункту 87 после получения двух последовательных измерений, равных с точностью до 0,003 градуса. И, конечно же, сместите цапфу на пару градусов между измерениями. Земля сегодня должна быть намного меньше в вашем поле зрения. Я уверен, что вы гораздо лучше нас в этом разбираетесь, но чтобы убедиться, что вы получаете правильное измерение угла между звездой и горизонтом Земли, линия M секстанта, которая проходит через две штриховки и перпендикулярна линии R, должна быть параллельна горизонту Земли в субзвездной точке. Затем фактическое наложение звезды на г
Очевидно, что если оно отклоняется в ту сторону, то оно на самом деле не находится на полярной орбите. Да, оно наклонено
حسنًا، ١١. نحن على وشك البدء. مع ذلك، أودّ أن أطلعكم على بعض زوايا الهوائي عالي الكسب. نرغب في العمل 
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हम अभी पानी गिरा रहे हैं - लगता है इसमें 5 या 10 मिनट और ल
你闻到
Эти валуны похожи на базальт, и в них, вероятно, содержится около 2 процентов белых минералов, белых кристаллов. А то, что я раньше называл пузырчатыми включениями, я б
ये रही। 6 - 5 - 4 — ये इसमें कैसे आ गई? मेरा रवैया
トンネルはすべて整備され、ドローグ、
好的。燃油浓度是1.0；氧化剂浓度是0.25；氧化剂不平衡读数在下降
Ok, in cima alle pagine 1-4, dove c'era scritto "1 ora e 15 minuti" accanto alla riga 32, lo cambieremo in "Men
Хорош
알겠습니다. 곰을 꽤 잘
On dirait bien que c'est la zone qui arrive, Jim. Voilà le Grand Virage. Je crois qu'on l'a
Roger. Sie sehen die Erde, so wie wir sie sehen, durch
Sono trascorse le 6+35 e sto spegnendo completamente la navicella. Avevamo spento la piattaforma e il computer in precedenza, dopo aver controllato con la Terra e 
Nous n'avons pas pu faire fonc
Nein
Tranquillité, Houston. Ça devrait être un peu plus ca
Думаю, да, Кен. Эта полоса параллельна линии М, и я думаю, это как-то связано с конструкцией оптики, где у нас есть этот вал или прямоугольный вход оптики снаружи. При этом конкретном угле наклона Солнца она пересекает его. Я заметил, что и Земля, и Солнце делают это со сканирующим телескопом. В секстанте та же световая полоса присутствует, хотя она покрывает все поле зрения секстанта. Однако увеличение позволяет довольно
알겠습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 바로
대부분 하락세를 보이고 있습니다. 규모가 클수록 하락폭이 더 크다는 건 누
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호입니다. 역압 밸브가 닫혀 
Apollo 11, Houston. Hier noch ein paar allgemeine Aktualisierungen in letzter Minute. Im Beitrag hatten wir Ihnen gesagt, Sie sollen die Kamera auf 50 Fuß einstellen. Es stellt sich heraus, dass der größte Messwert der Kame
ちょっと待っ
ヨー姿勢指示器に触れてみてください。ヨー姿勢指示器は270度表示です。手動緊急速度レバーに触れてみてください。そして、私はそこに手を置きます。
Okay, ma
Roger. Ogni volta che l'ho revisionata, la
Affermativo. Ho appena usato la luna per agganciarmi. Ti
Do
はい、維持する必要があります... いいえ、その通りです、6フィートの棒があれば、それを突
另外，还要准备一台16毫米胶片电影摄影机，用于在航天器内部拍摄。我们有一个大型
Et ils s'arrêtent brusqu
了解、マイク。ところで、我々の売り込み姿勢
Certo che funzionerà. Qualsiasi cos
Приготовьтесь. Г
我想这件事发生在
肯，我相信是这样。这条光带与M线平行，我认为这与光学系统的设计有关，也就是我们从外部进入光学系统的那个通道或矩形入口。在这个特定的太阳角度下，它正好穿过M线。我注意到，地球和太阳都会对扫描望远镜造成这种影响。在六分仪中，也存在同样的光带，尽管它覆盖了整个六分仪的视野。然而，六分仪的放大倍率使星星清晰可见，并且可以在上面做标记。但是，用扫描望远镜识别星星就非常困难。我发现，光学系统的最佳姿态是在扫描望远镜中能够看到大犬座和猎户座的姿态下。在这个特定的航天器姿态下，光带消失了；我们处于太阳在我们身后的位置，我可以看到很多星星。昨天，在适应了黑暗环境之后，我看到了仙后座周围不少星星，而一开始我什么也看不到。但现在，这条暗带遮挡了视线，除了
يا جيميني 7، هذا هو السادس، إذا استطعت تثبيته في وضع الانحراف لفترة قصيرة فقط، فس
ठीक है। आपको यहाँ से दूसरे चक्कर के लिए हरी झंडी मिल गई है, और अगर आप इंतज़ार करेंगे, तो मैं आपको 2-1 टीआर और जेमिनी लो
8
Близнецы 4, это Хьюстон. Ваш голос просто замечательный, увидимс
10 ti1
अपो
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड में सस्टेनर को बहुत आसानी 
Roger, Seven, ich verstehe dich zwar schwach, aber verständlich. Bitte bleib auf di
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Вариант 3 выполнен. Мы маневрируем
I
알겠습니다. 페르시아
MA
BAGING, qua
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8
D'accord, NOUN 01, ENTRÉE; 3011, ENTRÉE; 44, ENTRÉE. Voilà la procédure pour élargir la zone morte à 5 degrés. Plus tard, avant la gravure, vous ramènerez la zone morte à 1,4 degré.
罗杰。我有两点意见。第一，需要
Houston, Apollo 
Rog
So, ihr kommt jetzt alle langsam über den Rand des Sichtfelds. Ich kann Teile Mittelamerikas sehen, und dort scheint es recht klar zu sein. Die Karibikinseln kommen langsam ins Bild, zusammen mit einigen wenigen Wolkenbändern. Es sieht so aus, als gäbe es ein Tiefdruckgebiet vor Grönland, mit einigen großen Wolkenbändern, die sich bis nach Südwesten erstrecken. Die Ostküste der USA wird jetzt gera
حسنًا. لماذا لا تعيد نسخ
Eh bien, juste au moment où je disais ça, nous avons reçu une autre vague de données, donc je suppose que ça continue de 
F
И 11, Хьюсто
ロジャー、エド。通常の飛行計画に戻ってください。これは、ΔVが205フィート/秒残っており、63回転で81,125.7度の軌道を維持できると見て
Ce que je veux dire, Jim, c'est que les gars qui travaillent sur cette question d'attitude concernant les brûlures n'ont pas encore tiré leurs conclusions définitives, mais en attendant, nous voulons vous proposer quelque chose que vous pourrez u
Columbia, Houston. Wir sind mit dem Computer fertig. Sie können zu BLOCK
روجر. هذا صحيح
Нет. Я бы не сказал, что это обязательно был материал, который был обнаружен. Думаю, часть материала могла быть запечена или каким-то образом стать более связной и, возможно, слиться воедино, 
Prova il filtro verde. 
Roger. Bei Stern 02: Wo zwei Sätze abgedruckt sind, 
了解。パワーアンプを取得しました。PCプラス2時間、38.030、プラス08330、マイナス00509、マイナス02139、N/A、プラス00205、08615、4:24、272、081、残りN/A。アレージジェット2発、10秒、重量62480、重量33452。ス
Theta 59 minutes plus 10.0 degrees; range, 79.25; Delta-V tota
ठी
Esatto. Okay. Prossima: la prossima fotocamera - Stand by 1. Ho del rumore qui. Okay. La prossima - La prossima fotocamera per la sarà la 16 millimetri, e queste foto sono considerate di priorità 3. Okay. Uno, prendi la 16 millimetri e l'alimentatore da A-8. Prendi l'obiettivo da 10 millimetri e rimuovilo - rimuovi l'obiettivo da 10 millimetri e prendi l'
好的。步骤是：按回车键，按 333 
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Мы завершили маневр по наблюдению за положением в гравитационном положении, но ничего не видим — ни Земли, ни чего-ли
Bien, et si vous tournez la page sur la puissance 8, vous trouverez les fonctions restantes du vaisseau spatial. Nous avons une transmission TM à faible débit. Cependant, nous n'avons pas de VHF. Nous avons des pompes à glycol, des ventilateurs de combinaison et la dépressurisation de la cabine. Veuillez patienter dans le système de contrôle d'attitud
नमस्कार, ट्रैंक
Friendship Seven, qui Kano Cap Com, vi sento forte e chiaro. Co
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。收到。以X开头：减去29840，加上02390，加上01053 000 200 005 01693，加上00600 29954 402 2
Il nous
오른
रॉजर। क्य
- هي غير حاسمة نوعً
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다
بالتأكيد يمكنني الحصول على ساعة الإيقا
I also can see the light on my, on steam from the thruster when I operate
Apollo 8, résultat négatif. Nous n'avions pas 
我们主要感兴趣的是
ठीक है। पीने के पानी की टंकी में अब पानी नहीं बचा है। हमने कुछ मिनट पहले थोड़ा पानी निकालने की कोशिश की थी,
Water on, on cabin temperature i
С
बहुत बढ़िया। मैं इसे काफी समय से खोज रहा थ
Ich müsste den Mond jetzt eigentlich sehen können, kann ihn aber nicht. Deshalb 
Jim, are yo
不
Двигаясь прямо вн
로저. 말씀하신 내용을 읽었습니다. 고이득 영역에서는 다소 미미한 영향만 미치는
알겠습니다. 페이지 전
Je suis sur le canal interm
أقوم بتصوير الطقس ب
Roger. Weiter geht es mit dem Maroon Bugle. Präsident Nixon überraschte Ihre Frauen mit einem Anruf aus San Francisco, kurz bevor er ins Flugzeug stieg, um Sie zu treffen. Alle waren sehr gerührt von Ihrer Fernsehansprache. Jan und Pat verfolgten sie hier in der Missionskontrolle. Der Start von Intelsat vom Cape wurde gestern Abend zum vierten Mal verschoben. Das Problem soll ein defekter Stickstoffregler in der zweiten Stufe der Delta-Rakete gewesen sein. Heute Abend wird ein neuer Startversuch untern
जिम, हमारी समय-सीमा के अनुसार हम इसे इस तरह करेंगे क
이쪽 지평선이 많이 보이네요. 왼쪽으로 조
Впе
Хорошо, он будет позади меня. Это правил
On a v
Х
好的，我现在正在尝试使用宽光束或中等光
分かりました。4つのヒーターは閉じます。ディスプレイは開きます。Sバンドアンテナは閉じます。カメラシーケンス
Ich habe den Mond in die Mitte des Fensters gestellt, und er bew
र
जी हां, और अभी हम 11 एम्पियर 
땅콩버터
Okay, leader. We'll see you there. That was a very, very nice ride, that last one; this engine is the smoothest o
ठीक है, माइक। बेशक, यह उस स्थिति के लिए है जब G&N काम करना बंद कर दे और आपको लगातार g पर उड़ान भरनी पड़े; और हम जो करने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं वह है लगातार g की रेंज को 1100 से 1500 मील तक बढ़ाना। हमने इस प्रक्रिया को सिम्युलेटर में चलाया है, और यह ठीक काम करती है। मूल रूप से, मैं इसे समझा देता हूँ - बस इसे समझा दें, और फि
Okay. We wan
Хорошо, Джек. Я понял, как выполнить эту процедуру в обратном пор
حسناً. ثم ضع صمام تصريف مياه الصرف الصحي في وضعية الت
Good 
Yes. I just did a
我不知道，但我感觉我可能要崩
O
Ricevuto. Ricev
Okay, wir sehen B
نعم
On dirait que la Terre a pris un peu d'inclinaison, mais, pendan
Oui, malheureusement, il semble 
Oui. Nous allons y jeter un œil, Charlie, et nous vous tien
Könnten Sie b
阿波罗8号，在我们等待高增益期间，我将继续进行轨迹概要。我们仍然可以从13号返回太平洋中线，你们将在点火138秒后开始返回。138秒足以让你们脱离蝶形区。我们建议在20秒后不要尝试预点火或重启。如果超过20秒，轨迹可能会超出修正范围——修正能力足以让飞船自由返回。回收区的天气状况良好。我们有跟踪和无跟踪两种情况。在点火过程中，由于储罐中的燃料耗尽并流入集油箱，你们可能会注意到燃烧室压力和储罐压力略有变化。这可能发生在点火开始后的2到5秒左右。两个系统的压力变化都很小。所有系统都运行正常。为了确保轨迹，我们希望
ठीक है। तो सबसे पहले हमें सिस्टम A और B पर "ऑटो
Кейп. Наши наземные службы по загрузке памяти подтверждают, что ваши данные были верны, поэтому вы можете удалить
제가 어떻게 할 건지 다시 한번 말씀드리겠습니다. 네, 다시 한번 다 말씀드릴게요. 패키지 밸브 압력 해제, 비상 객실 압력 해제, 직접 산소 공급 해제, 수요 조절기 두 개 모두 해제, 물/글리콜 축
Ok. Abbiamo iniz
Ce n'est que la moitié. Le reste est caché. C'était plutôt intéressant de faire tout le travail de 
Ecco fatto. Ora ce l'abbi
Okay. Glielo sto mostrando e vorrei sapere se riescono a leggere ciò che viene mostrato e anche se riescono a veder
Roger. Certains pensent que vous êtes tous responsables 
제미니 4, 휴스턴 CAP COM. 
Roger. Sie lassen weiterhin Sauerstoff aus dem Flüssigsauerstofftank ab, der nicht für den Antrieb benötigt wird. Die Abluf
Abbiamo un altro avvistamento del booster. Sembra che sia praticamente in orizzontale rispetto a noi, proprio d
Molto bene, molto bene. Tutto sta andan
Подтверждаю. Я уже звонил вам по поводу определения расстояния по УКВ-радио. Оно не работает
روجر
Ich spreche 
풍선이 아직 당신과 함께 있다는 것을 이해하세요. 풍선을 펼치는 위치로 갔다가 다시 놓는 위치로 돌아가면 가능할 수도 있습니
روجر، مايك. لدينا تحديث بشأن خطوط الطول والعرض، إذا كنتم مستع
Gemini VIII, CAP COM on UHF. O
حسنًا. لقد راجعتُ التعليمات: راقب كمية المُجمِّع الثانوي؛ صمام مُشعِّع الجليكول الثانوي، اضبطه على
मुझे बिल्कुल भी पता नहीं है कि हम कहाँ अटक गए, वैंस। मैंने बस इतना कहा कि हमने प्रक्रिया को ठीक वैसे ही किया जैसे आपन
روجر. ولديّ بعض الأمور الأخرى يا مايك. نحتاج إلى إيقاف شحن البطارية "ب" الآن، كما أن الطقس يسوء في نقطة الهبوط المستهدفة بسبب عواصف رعدية متفرقة. لا نريد أن نصطدم بإحداها، لذا سننقل نقطة التصويب إلى الأمام. تصح
Roger. Avec une telle visibilité et des communications aussi bonnes, nous allons simplement vous donner une description verbale sans voir le télescope de balayage pour le moment. Vos angles de manœuvre pour Arcturus étaient excellents. J'ai centré Arcturus dans le télescope. À cet angle solaire, un faisceau lumineux traverse directement le centre du télescope, créant une bande de lumière. Cela empêche de voir beaucoup d'étoiles autour de nous, et même si j'ai gardé l'œil rivé sur le télescope pendant un certain temps, il est très difficile de distinguer des constellations. Je n'aurais pas pu identifie
Apollo 13, vous vous dirigez vers un blocage de carda
C
Die verbleibende Treibstoffmenge beträg
Merci. Je suppose qu'il nous reste encore une opération de cryogénisation à effectuer, et nous avons vérifié votre triple p
Ecco un piccolo articolo interessante che fa piacere s
Ricevuto. 63-1 16 ore 56 minuti 01
Ciao Jack, una domanda sul modulo di comando. Ho... ho la banda morta ampia in questo momento. Vuoi ch
……我们给你带了
Dort steht: Aufräumarbeiten durchf
Okay. That's all the changes we have for
Gemini VI, le biais de votre ac
Oui, je pense qu'on mettra les casques dans le compartiment à provisions; et tout ce qu'on devra en sortir, on
D'accord. Ce bain à froid part du prin
11, Houston. Cercheremo di verificare questa capacità di riacquisizione automatica sulla banda S, e ciò che vogliamo fare è proteggere la nostra portante di uplink per circa 3
Die Kapselstabilitä
Wund
확인 완료; 메인 버스 타이, 배트 알
Роджер. Обратите внимание, что вы начинаете свою последнюю запланированную операцию. Первоначальное отслеживание показывает, что начальная скорость на среднем участке траектории может быть меньше 4 футов в секунду, как предполагалось изначально. Мы также просмотрели ваши данные о работе двигателя, и всё так же плавно, как вы и сказали; всё выгля
You hoped there
好的。LMP的蓝色软管在LMP舷窗附近，当然，红色软管和蓝色软管之间隔着大约4英尺。好的。
Quando ho più tempo, guardo la Terra. La velocità in questo momento, dopo aver spento il motore a circa 0, è quasi 
Okay. The good gives us a vacuum perigee at the present time of 23.6 with a flight path angle of minus 6.25 degrees. That's without a m
그건 제가 예전부터 좋아하던 곡인데, 한 20
아마 전 그를 잊어버린 것 같아요. 그는
अपोलो 1
Cabin relative humidity is indicating 20 [percent]. Coolant quantity is 66 [percent]. Suit is 68 [degrees] on temperature, pressure 5.8 indicated, steam temperature, 50 [degrees] in suit circuit and comfortable. Oxygen is 65-100 [percent] a
ヴァンス、どこで切断したのか全く分かりません。おっしゃる通りの手順を実行したと言っただけです。SEPの重要な部分、つまり「最適なOMNIを選択」と言ったところまで来ています。しかし、メインバスBの電圧が読み取れません。ベイカーのBATバスBは36.5、チャーリーのBATバスBは37.0と読み取れ
这段信号是从月球和地球大约中间的位置传来的。我们已经飞行了31小时20分钟左右。距离登月还有不到40个小时。你们可以看到比尔的牙刷在这里。他一直在刷牙，为了演示在零重力环境下物体是如何漂浮的。他努力接住那些东西的样子，看起来就像是太空人队的队员。我真希望
Das ist positiv. Unser Chirurg möchte mit
Roger, Bermuda. Hear you loud and clear 
Got it. Yo
मुझे लगता है कि आज केबिन पहले से थ
Buzz, la vue à travers ton épaule droite-gauche e
الانحراف جيد. سأنتقل 
Vous êtes sur le qui-
Ok. Potrei ripassarlo con te, Jack, perché questa checklist è stata scritta due o tre volte sulle nostre varie procedure. Riga superiore, le prime due sono aperte, le successive tre sono chiuse
아
It's looking pretty go
Roger, Canary. Mein Status ist gut; der Kapselstatus ist gut; mein Steuermodus ist automatisch; Gyroskope normal; Manöver deaktiviert. Treibstoff 51–68 %, Sauerstoff 85–100 %; die Temperatur an meiner Kabinendampfentlüftung steigt jetzt auf etwa 19 Gr
Aspettatevi un Mark a TIG men
Okay. 47 Fuß/Sekunde aus dem vorderen Strahlrohr. Das sind 1+18. 120 Fuß/Sekunde aus dem hinteren Strahlrohr. Das sind 2+31. Bei 17 42 53. 2+48. 8+49. Und die 33-1-Z
11, ह्यूस्टन। मैं आपके बैंक ब्रावो नाइट्रोजन टैंक को देख रहा था। इसमें ज़रा भी रिसाव नहीं हुआ - सुधार - इस बार बिल्कु
로저, 11. 31, SPS/G&N: 36691, -061, +066 137 22 3985, +32838, +06845, -02487, NA, 피치 052. 나머지 PAD는 NA입니다. 다시 읽어주세요.
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। रॉजर। मेरे पास अपडेट हैं, 5/6 के लिए मैप अपड
了解。プローブのプリロード準備を進めています。ロールスラスターを全て停止します。私のロールとあ
了解。FORWARD OMNIをリクエス
好的，下一个。黑白电视摄像机，建议将其装在消毒袋中，放在A-7和A-11的顶部
ए
О, хорошо. Спасибо, я закончил. Мне нужно провести пр
بعض الأمور المتفرقة لك: نود منك التوقف عن شحن البطارية B
D'accord. Je ne suis pas pre
3 
Das ist bestätigt. Wir hier prüfen die thermische Lage. Es sieht so aus, als ob Sie für längere Zeit nicht verfügbar sein werden. Deshalb bitten wir Sie, den Beobachtungsflug wieder aufzunehmen, sobald Sie die drei Sternsichtungen abgeschlossen haben. Wir arbeiten noch an der weiteren Planung – etwa für die nächsten 10 Stunden
Это займет довольно много времени. У нас здесь дл
Roger. Das war eine gute Rückmeldung. Wir haben noch eine letzte Anweisung für Sie. Das Rendezvous-Radar ist momentan eingefahren, und wir können aus Position 2 nichts sehen. Daher bitten wir Sie, das Radar auf 0283 zu positionieren. Dafür haben wir eine Anweisung. Bitte führen Sie diese Anweisung direkt vor dem Einnehmen der
Sta
Int
روجر
रॉजर। नील, आपके 'नो गो' कार्ड के लिए मिशन नियमों में कुछ बदलाव हैं। एपीएस/ईंधन और तापमान दबाव कार्ड में एक छोटा सा बदलाव
Gol
좋아요, 이
Well, the area looks smo
로저, 당신의 51승 4패 기록을 알려드리겠습니다
음, 그때 저는 그걸 입 안에 넣
Okay. Ich gehe zur SSR-Seite. Soll ich den ganzen Vor
Oui, c'est à peu près ç
أورورا سفن، أورورا سفن. هذه كانتون كوم تك، كانتون كوم تك. هل تسمعون؟
उसने बिलकुल वैसा ही किया। टॉम ने कहा कि कल तुम्हारा दिन इतना लंबा था क
Roger. -1 latitude moins 06269; c'est la latitude; et pour la longitude 
わかりました。あと87時間35分です。あと30秒で到着します。87.35に設定してくだ
已
Sfortunatamente, il grafico non concorda con quanto detto, perché la velocità di a
Вы открываете внешний слой, вставляете внутренний, сжимаете его, и он ломается, затем нужно взять... и вставить его, и всё это
打扰一下，弗雷德；我想插一句。我们想把C-
罗杰，阿尔。我目前处于自动模式；逆向飞行模式；陀螺仪开关正常；机动模式已关闭。太空舱已准备好进行逆向飞行，但需要存放两张航图。我确信一切就绪。我的自动模式（燃料）完成度为 81%，手动模式（燃料）完成度为 80%，这与我的中期报告一致。这些参数没有变化。主氧气压力为 52 psi（单位：百巴），备用氧气压力为 75
ठीक है। और जब आपके पास कॉपी करने के लिए थोड़ा समय हो, तो मेरे पास एक एंट्री स्टोरेज लिस्ट है जो मैं आपको दे सकता हूँ, जिसमें यह बताया गया है कि पानी में उतरने से पहले कौन-कौन से उपकरण वाहनों 
正解です。スー
자, 여기요. 이
11, Хьюстон. Мы предлагаем в
Friendship Seven, this is Zanzibar Surgeon. Blood pressure 136 systolic after exercise, recording well and coming down now to just under 90 for diastolic. Both traces are of excellent quality. Your electro-cardiogr
まあ、彼は独身で控除を受ける権利がないことを考えると、そうです
So, da haben wir's. Übrigens, wir haben allerlei Neuigkeiten für euch bekommen. Wir haben Baseball- und Basketballergebnisse. Jemand meinte, es seien noch 220 Tag
MODE 
Аполлон-11, Аполлон-11, это Хьюст
Laut
わかりました、アポロ8号。星26番、つまり26番
참고로 여쭤보는 건
और आज श्रीमती रॉबर्ट गोडार्ड ने कहा कि उनके पति बहुत खुश होते। "वे चिल्लाते नहीं, बल्कि खुशी से झूम उठते।" उन्होंने आगे कहा, "उनका सपना था चांद पर रॉकेट भेजना।" अपोलो 11 मिशन को लेकर दुनिया भर के लोगों के पास खुश होने के कई कारण थे। इतालवी पुलिस ने बताया कि रविवार की रात साल की सबसे कम अपराध वाली रात थी। और लंदन में, एक लड़के ने सट्टेबाज से 5 
わかりました。これはタンク
Friendship Seven, Woomera Cap Com. Abbiamo 
Старый метод управления траекторией полета на среднем участке
아무래도 우리가 해
Ok, ora do un'occhiata all'adattatore e all'attrezzatura lì dietro. Vedo il piano di s
好的。由于封装温度过高，我们遇到了“服务模
Verseau, Houston. Vous remarquez quel
Ok
Okay. I haven't heard a word from those guys, and I thought I'd be hearing them through your
ठीक है; 
Хорошо, Джим. Настало время, когда тебе будет удобно, сделать еще одно измерение напряжения и силы тока на командном модуле. К твоему сведению, мы уже влили в батарею 6 ампер-часов, и осталось еще около 14. Все выглядит очень хорошо, и я только что получил известие, что погода для входа в атмосферу завт
ちなみに、今、あなたのTD&Eの番組の再放
今、下に美しい画像が映っています。11。色が非常に鮮明で、地
罗杰。我们预期飞行员会通过航空体检1型检
Très bien. Sous « Rangement final », le premier élément mentionné à la ligne 36, page 1-5, est « Optiques ». Si vous souhaitez commencer le ran
Okay, Wally, give me 
أوه، الجو مظلم، هذا ما حدث. إنه يواجه أرضًا مظلمة. غروب الشمس من F16 إلى F، حسنًا؛ سنبدأ بـ F16. في الشمال، قادم
알겠습니다, 잭. 위도는 -21.62이고 경도는 -165.37입니다. 이것은 당신이 우리에게 준 중간 지점 7번 패드와 관련이
Tranquility Base, Houston. Tutti i vostri materiali di consumo sono solidi. State andando bene sotto ogni 
इसमें कोई दिक्कत नहीं ह
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। नियंत्रण प्रणाली के संचालन पर एक अवलोकन: ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि जब भी मैं मैन्युअल या फ्लाई-बाय-वायर मोड पर लंबे समय तक पैंतरेबाज़ी करता हूँ, तो किसी न किसी तरह जाइरो सिस्टम में काफी त्रुटियाँ आ जाती हैं। मुझे तरह-तरह के अभिविन्यास देखने को मिलते हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, उस समय जब मैंने 180° का यॉ किया, थोड़ी देर के लिए उसी स्थिति
حسنًا يا جاك، فهمت. تريد منا توجيه المحو
휴스턴, 여기는 8입니다. 스캐닝 망원경으로 보고 있는데, 액체산소(LOX) 배출구가 갑자기 작동을 멈추면서
Да.
로저, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 선실 온도는 약 90도 정도로 안정적으로 유지되고 있습니다. 선실
Non, non, il n'y est pas. Il n
Okay. On 
ठीक है, फ्रेड। समझो, केवल एलएमपी की लाल नली ही कैनिस्टर बैग में लगी है। ऐसे 
Houston, Ve
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, इन निर्देशों में हमने चंद्रमा की तस्वीरें लेने के लिए कोई व्यवस्था नहीं की ह
Nous avons l'impression d'être obligés de l'utiliser. Les gains en tangage et en roulis ne sont pas très bons dans cette configurat
Nous av
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。ペリシンチオンプラス2のコ
VI，阴性。我们只是在看太
D'accord. On va maintenant prendr
Ho
わかりま
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tempo per assistere al vostro ammaraggio. Ad accompagnare il Presidente ci saranno il Segretario di Stato William Rogers e Frank Borman. Assisteranno all'ammaraggio dal ponte della nave di recupero con l'Ammiraglio John Sidney McCain, Jr., Comandante delle Forze del Pacifico. Dopo la permanenza del Presidente a bordo dell'Hornet, partirà per il suo tour in Asia e la visita programmata in Romania. Si ritiene che Luna 15 si sia schiantata ieri nel Mare delle Crisi, dopo aver orbitato attorno alla Luna 52 volte. L'agenzia di stampa sovietica TASS ha riferito che sono state condotte ricerche "scientifiche" nello spazio vicino alla Luna. Sir Bernard Lovell dell'Osservatorio di Jodrell Bank ha affermato che Luna 15 ha colpito la superficie della Luna a una velocità di circa 480 chilometri orari. La situazione è stata relativamente tranquilla di recente in Vietnam. Soldati in pattuglia sono stati osservati con radio a transistor sintonizzate sul vostro volo. Le emittenti radiotelevisive delle Forze Armate in Vietnam hanno dato piena copertura alla missione. Le schermaglie continuano tra egiziani e israeliani lungo il Canale di Suez. Gli osservatori delle Nazioni Unite stanno cercando di fermare l'azione. A Washington, la Commissione per i Modi e i Mezzi della Camera ha votato per ridurre la tolleranza al depauperamento del petrolio dal 27,5% al ​​20%. Abbiamo piovuto diverse volte qui nella zona di Houston. Oggi è nuvoloso e sono previsti altri rovesci. Sul fronte sportivo, come accennato in precedenza, stasera si gioca l'All Star Game. Ieri non si è giocata nessuna partita. Ieri sera a New York, la Baseball Writers Association of America ha nominato Babe Ruth il più grande giocatore di baseball di tutti i tempi. Joe DiMaggio è stato nominato il più grande giocatore di baseball vivente. Frank Borman ha fatto gli annunci durante una cena in onore dei giocatori. Joe Namath ha trascorso un'intera giornata al training camp dei New York Jets. Cinque poliziotti hanno avuto difficoltà a trattenere circa 500 bambini che volevano toccare Broadway Joe. Ha detto di sentirsi bene e che giocherà l'All Star Game del 1° agosto, se Coach Weeb Eubank glielo permetterà. Il training camp degli Oilers a Kerrville si è bagnato ieri, ma gli allena
वापस यहीं आ रहा हूँ। खिड़की के सामने। इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल के सामने। फर्श पर जा रहा हूँ। अगर कोई प्रयोग आता है जिसमें आपको मेरी ज़रूरत हो... डी-8 इस समय
A
Abbiamo notato, durante il test di sistema sulla pressione di sfiato de
西格玛七号，
我们有一卷16毫米的ASA 1000彩色室内胶片。我们打算用它拍
Хорошо. Контрольная точка 1, время получения изображения; контрольная точка 2, время получения изображения; контрольная то
好的。我们遇到了一些地面信号问题，虽然信号微弱但清晰可见。我们准备开始测试。我们将切换模式，切换过
И напоминаем, не забывайте о нашей проблеме с размещением. Нам по-прежнему приходится довольно много времени уделя
Très bi
Okay, WATER AN
Rollio, beccheggio e imb
こんにちは、
알겠습니다, 짐. 다음 목격 사례 이전에 필요할 것으로 예상되며, 저희는 그 시점에 배치할 것을 제안하고 있습니다. 곧 더 자세한 
わかった。その時は手
Ed s
And, Tranquility Base, Houston. W
로저. 저 두 개 가지고 있어요
Apollo 11 erhält die erste Ansicht des Landeanflugs. Diesmal fliegen wir über den Taruntius-Krater, und die von Apollo 8 und 10 mitgebrachten Bilder und Karten haben uns eine sehr gute Vorschau auf das gegeben, was uns hier erwartet. Es sieht den Bildern sehr ähnlich, aber es ist wie der Unterschied zwischen einem echten Fußballspiel und dem, das man im Fernsehen sieht. N
Roger. Pitch at that time was - th
好的。现在
यह कैप्सूल का बीता हुआ समय है। हम मैनुअल इंटरमीडिएट रिपोर्ट की प्रतिलिपि बनाएं
4段目には、QUAD HEATERのブレーカーIN、SUIT FAN 1があります。その下にはGLYCOL 1と2があります。COMMの下にはCOMMANDER AUDIO IN、s /
التأخير الرجعي أمر طبيعي. أكرر، 
Хорошо, ладно. У меня для тебя две новости, Джим. Первая касается процедуры поиска кометы Беннета примерно в это вр
Roger, Bill. Avant d'essayer le mélange manuel, nous vous suggérons d'essayer d'abord le mélange manuel en augmentant la température de l'habitacle. Ter
रॉजर, फ्रेडो। बढ़िया जवाब। अब, पृथ्वी 
Ok. Sembra che abbiamo appena ottenuto un aggancio solido per l'ultimo... oh, circa un minuto. L'ago ha oscillato su e giù, e gli aghi di beccheggio e imbardata hanno oscillato, ma sembra che ora si sia ristabilito da solo e saldamente. Stiamo appena terminando la pulizia delle celle a 
Хорошо, сейчас я попробую использовать
好的。在第 4 行的“乙二醇泵自动传输”下方，关闭。在“向上数据链路”下方，打开；VHF B 和 VHF A 也应打开。在“/”下方，打
소문에 따르면 그렇습니다. 찾으셨나
Roger, 
Houston, Apollo 11. und AC
Apollo 8, Ho
好的。我们一定试试。正如我所说，我们有一些星形标记。它们没有——它们没有与轴和耳轴零点对齐。让我们快速
Роджер. Интересно, есть ли у тебя звезда, которая находится немного ближе к тому направлен
わかりました。エントリーチェックリストのE-7ページ、ステップ34で、パネル382が開いている限り、蒸発器の一次側と二次側の水位制御を「AUTO」に、二次グリコール用のスーツ熱交
روجر. ينصحك الجراح بشرب أكبر قدر ممكن من الماء. اشربه كلما استط
يبدو أن ما عليك فعله حيال هذا هو عدم تثبيته على النافذة، 
Houston, zu Ihrer Information: Wir haben den Funkkontakt ge
Okay. Kein Problem. Benutzen Sie Ihre D-9. Beim Apollo-Landmark Nr. 2 würden wir auf 19 gehen. Das Landmark befindet sich 16 Meilen nördlich der Flugroute, und Sie sollten zu diesem Zeitpunkt einen Neigungswinkel von etwa -30° haben. Wir möchten Sie bitten, dieses Landmark so genau wie möglich zu verfolgen und mit der 16-mm-Kamera un
ठीक है। हम बस कुछ करने के लिए 
わかりました。それでは、サービスモジュールSEP姿勢に向かいます。その際にドッキングして
稍等片刻，让我仔细看
Я думал, мы будем достаточно близко, чтобы, выйдя на улицу, увидеть его край там, сзади, но не
是的，稍等一下。稍等一下——您的主控已开启；对讲机已开启；甚高频已开启；手持对讲机已关闭；S波段
And cross out the bottom block on that half of the page whic
Oui, c'est à peu près ça. Oh! J'ai des lumières là-bas. Qu'en pense
ठीक है। आपकी बैटरियों की स्थिति इस प्रकार है: बैटरी A की क्षमता 39.32 एम्प-घंटे, बैटरी B की 35.21 और बैटरी C की 38.46 एम्प-घंटे। आपके पास क्रायोचार्ज की शेष मात्रा वही है जो हमने आपको पिछली बार दी थी, यानी प्रति टैंक 180 पाउंड ऑक्सीजन और 11 पाउंड हाइड्रोजन। वर्तमान में, सर्विस मॉड्यूल के अनुसार, मात्राओं के लिए कंप्यूटर मानों का उपयोग करते हुए, आपके पास क्वाड A 45 प्रतिशत, ब्रावो 50 प्रतिशत, चार्ली 58 प्रतिशत और डेल्टा 48 प
एक्व
D'accord. Après les étapes BAT 5 et 6, OFF, l'étape 3 consistera à ouvrir les panneaux 
Okay, das ist richtig, Jack. Jetzt beginnen wir mit der Einschaltprozedur für den Hauptbus. Der erste Schritt befindet sich an Schalttafel 5. Dort müssen die Schutzschalter „BAT CHARGER BAT A CHARG
D'accord, Jack. Voyons si j'ai bien compris. On pointe le drone vers la Terre comme pour la phase intermédiaire, puis on effectue un alignement sur l'axe du corps. Ensuite, vous nous donnez une attitude de vol vers… la Lune, et ensuite on… pointe le drone… vers la Lune. Puis vous mettez à jour les données – donnez-nous des CDU pour un alignement grossier… un alignement fin… sur les étoiles, la Lune ou la Terre. At
Roger, Neil. Stiamo osservando alcuni aumenti di temperatura nell'esperimento sismico passivo leggermente superiori al normale e ci chiedevamo se poteste verificare la posizione di
Roger, Mike. Ich möchte ein paar Anmerkungen zu den Daten machen. Das automatische Manöver war recht genau. Anscheinend haben wir während des Manövers einen substellaren Punkt getroffen; die automatische Optik hat Canopus genau an die richtige Stelle gebracht; die minimale Impulssteuerung hat wie erwartet funktioniert. In den Höhen, in denen ich mit den Beobachtungen begonnen habe, ist eine deutliche, dunstige Bandlinie zu erkennen. Der Filter verleiht der Erde einen orangefarbenen Schimmer. Es ist sehr schwer zu bestimmen, wo genau der Stern zu finden ist, aber es scheint eine klare Linie zu geben, wo man den Horizont vermuten würde. Diese Linie erscheint durch den Dunst hindurch, dort, wo wir die Atmosphäre v
Charlie, Apollo 11. Ho un paio di domande sull'arresto. Mi sembra che il modo più semplice per fermarlo sarebbe: siamo essenzialmente, ovviamente, a 0 gradi di imbardata e in chiusura a 90 gradi di beccheggio, quindi si tratta solo di fermarsi a circa 260 gradi di rollio e... Che ne dici di una procedura che prevede l'ASSETT
क्या आप चाहेंगे कि ह
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Könnten Sie uns bitte be
알겠습
그리고 6번째 위치에서는 금성의 가장자리 부분을 포착할 수 있는 것 같
참고로 말씀드리자면, 3시 26분 33초 현재 하늘에 10개의 입자가 떠 있습니다. 제 눈에는 분명히 빛나 보이는 것 같습니다. 마치 작은 서리 조각처럼 보입니다. 하지만 어떤 입자들은 아주 멀리 떨어져 있습니다. 두 개는 100야드(약 91미터) 정도 떨어져 있는 것처럼 보입니다. 한동안 추진기를 작동시키지 않았습니다. 여기 더 가까이 있는 두 개가 있습니다. 가까이 있는 이 입자들의 밀도를 측정해 보니 5.5에서 소멸되었고, 경과 시간은 3시 27분 39초입니다. 현재 캄캄한 밤하늘에는 별이 보이지 않습니다. 하지만 이 작은 눈송이들은 선명하게 보입니
画面中央に持ってくるには、もう少し修正が必要です。ターミネーターの方に動かして
نحن الآن فوق نقطة البداية الأولى لـ P-1 مباشرة. من المستحيل تقريبًا تفويتها، ومن السهل جدًا تحديدها، ويمكننا النظر مباشرة إلى 
صحيح. ل
Main batteries - we tested them. They checked good. C is way up 
ठ
L'interruttore di alimentazione è chiuso
收到。血压数
Q
Est-ce que
Housquin - Houston, Tranquillité. Pourriez-vous me montrer la configuration du disjoncteur du bras moteur? Terminé. Je vous pose la question c
C'est l'avis général. Cela pourrait changer d'ici demain, mais pour l'instant, c'est com
Vous avez compris? Les IVI se sont propagés à 15 m/s vers l'arrière
Roger. The DELTA- looked like it was right on. Burn time appeared to us to be about 2 seconds longer, 517. VGX was reading 95485 when we got it. The attitude was nominal. VI was reading
アポロ8号、ヒュ
As a matter of fact, we might use 
Okay. You want me to go
로저. 카메라 아랫부분이 고장난 것 
D'accord. C'est bien lui. Il s'agit de Jim Lovell. Aujourd'hui, nous souhaitions vous faire découvrir un peu la vie à bord d'Apollo 8. Après vous avoir montré des images de la Lune et de la Terre, nous voulions vous inviter dans notre vaisseau. Nous y vivons depuis au moins quatre jours, comme vous pouvez le voir sur le tableau de bord. Nous y marquons chaque jour. Nous en sommes au quatrième jour et nous entamons le cinquième. Bien sûr, nous attendons tous avec impatience l'alunissage de vendredi. Ici, dans la partie du vaisseau que nous appelons la soute inférieure, le conseiller du Président pour la condition physique, le capitaine Jim Lovell, s'apprête à commencer son programme d'exercices quotidien. Vous remarquerez qu'il se déplace avec une grande aisance. Il vient de se cogner la tête contre les optiques utilisées pour la navigation. Il utilise un appareil de musculation conç
友谊七号。瓜伊马斯指挥中心。我们还有大约3分钟才能获取遥测数据。我会告诉你，我会告诉你2号区域Alpha
Houston, stiamo vedendo qualcosa sul radar, ma non 
로저. 롤링 재진입을 위한 절차 양식을 보내드리겠습니다. OAMS 연소에 필요한 ∆V와 ∆T, GMTRC, 그리고 0.05g의 RET 값을 알려드리겠습니다. 또한, 드로그, 주낙, 착륙 시의 RET 값도 함께 제공됩니다. 절차는 다음과 같습니다. 역추진 시 기수를 아래로 향하게 한 상태에서 최대 양력을 발생시키십시오. 0.05g의 RET 값에 도달하면 15°의 롤링 속도로 진입하십시오. 고도계 바늘이 100,000
Nous avons une seule question: la soupape de ventilation du tunnel. Nous nous demandons pourquoi nous procédons à la ventilation jus
好的，我明白了。是的，你说得对。当我们看向5号窗口时，可以看到
Hous
11, Houston. Wir empfangen Daten, aber es besteht dasselbe Problem wie bei Buzz' Signalaufbereiter. Anscheinend ist das Kabel defekt. Könnten Sie
ヨー1
罗杰，11岁。我觉得我们对此没什么控制权。看来你只能喝水
حسنًا. أنا الآن في 
没错……当时是11点30分，我已经睡了大约4个小时了
我们刚吃了一罐火腿沙拉，那真是一次难忘的经历
، رحلة. هل
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很
Und es sieht so aus, als könnte ich in Rastposition 6 Venus ganz am Rand
Ok, credo che l'unica domanda che ho sia nella prima parte, la primissima, che rigu
Mi senti? Trasmetto il prossimo messaggio di rapporto: 9:48, volo regolare. "Shutter-1" funziona bene. L'indice si muove. Pressione nell'unità di cabina 1, umidità 65, temperatura 20 °C, pressione nel compartimento 1.2, manuale 150, prima automatica 155, seconda automatica 155, bomb
Вы могли бы сообщить полковнику Куперу, что мы только что... сделали фотографии и сняли на видео самолет Gemini VII, пролетающий 
你
ठीक है। हमें आपसे उच्च बिट दर के बजाय निम्न बिट दर प्राप्त हो रही है, और
How is EECOMM today? Is he happy with all those good 
रॉजर। अब एकदम साफ सुनाई दे रहा है
Роджер, Джек. На этом процедура завершена, и следующее, что я вам предложу, — это процедура возвращения в командный модуль и временного включения питания на основных шинах с помощью BUS. Во-первых, нам нужно убедиться, что на основных шинах нет нагрузок, что 
Вы уже готовы вернуться дом
Hey, Houston - correction - Aquarius, Houston. We're satisfied with our present alinement. We don't want you to waste any more gas trying to do thi
태도라
أعتقد أن ا
روجر. ابقَ حتى
أبولو 13، هيوستن. ذراع استشعار مستوى ال
حسنًا يا جاك. فهمت أنك انتهيت من تأمين شحن البطارية. الآن، إذا كنت مستعدًا للاستماع يا جاك، أود أن أطلعك على التغييرين اللذين أج
Roger. Verstehe,
Beh, ho fiducia nel portello, finché entra e si chiude senza problemi; non vedo
네. 지금까지 음식은 아주 맛있었어요. 더할 나위 없이
حسنًا. شكرًا لك.
Roger, Joe. Ich dachte, wenn wir diesen Burn-In jetzt durchführen, sollte ich euch ein Update zu den Notfallplanseiten 32, 33 und 34 geben, denn als w
حسناً. في نظام المعلومات والترفيه الخاص بي، لدي سرعة 97 قدم/ثانية للأمام، أما 
Verify 
الليلة الماضية لم أستطع الوصول إلى هذا الحد 
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。37を走らせて、地上からも観測
Okay. Wir hat
Roger. There are two gears that we have that go around when you pull the handle back and forth. One of them is the gear that sort of acts as a ratchet, a little cylinder with a piston in it and a spike behind it that engages the ratchet. And we were having a little trouble with that before we got it open and after we got it open we had difficulty getting this ratchet to work. Also, we had a great deal of difficulty getting the hatch closed far enough so that we could even start latching it. Then, Ed had to push the ratchet in with his hand on every go until we got the thing started. And I was pulling on the thing until I thought probably I was
Roger. Um 74:30 Uhr bitten wir Sie, die Lüfter in allen vier Kryotanks ein- und auszuschalten und die Heizungen in allen vier Kryotanks auf AUTO zu stellen. Wir tun dies im Vorfeld, um 
Roger, ich verstehe, dass die Uhren auf Befehl gestellt werd
Okay, Bill. We are coming up on the and then the sightings, and there is some concern that if we just go directly to attitude that we are liable to overheat quad Charlie. So we would like to have you maneuver to place the minus X-axis towards the sun now. And I have some gimbal angles here for you. And if we take it over there and point the minus X at the sun between now and the time we have to start into the alignment, then the business - we will tend to coldsoak Charlie, and then we will be ab
If that's the case, all I'm worried about is having that all squared away. It's long before that... I want everything in its place. All the stowage cleared away, all the... ready to go and know exactly what to do and... so that we can do the midcourse, and... get into the command module... jettison the
C'
참고로 케이
了解。タイム7
どれくらい外出していま
如果我们能把这里的一些电线理顺，我们就能向你们演示在这里
كين، بينما نحن هنا نمضي الوقت فقط، لاحظنا بعض الأمور غير المعتادة. الجوارب، كما تعلم، الخاصة ببدلات العمل على متن الطائرة؛ جواربي تَ
ठीक है, जैक, मैं अब लाइन पर वापस आ गया हूँ। एस-बैंड पर,
了解。どうやら、今の状況だと、この
Roger. Understand, and also I take it for 4 you are going to give us a new alignment. Is that corre
了解しました。6番をコピーする準備ができてよかったです。その前に、ジムに最後に一言。「」、つまり訂正ですが、「」とは、彼が採点した後に得られるものです。「」は2つ
حسناً. شكراً 
Мы пытаемся вернуться к нормальному режиму сна, и
Ciao, Muchea Cap Com, Aurora Seven. Forte e chiaro. C
そのドローグシュート、つまりパイロットシュートは私たちの真上にあ
好的。还有两步。步骤 6，
안녕하세요, 하와이입니다
أبولو 8، هيوستن عبر 
فرانك، لدينا حوالي دقيقتين ونصف للتشغيل، وما زلنا نعرض بعض مفاتي
Roger, Neil. We're seeing some temperat
Ok, Jer
これはジェミニ 4 です。故障ランプが点灯したまま消えま
没
13, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपसे एमडीसी 1 और 2 पर अपने डिस
E Apollo 
Хорошо. Подожди, Чарли, в
好的
네, 잔차는 0.1, 3
음
P22 的所有操作似乎都很顺利。唯一有点奇怪的是 DAP 推进器出现了一些异常活动。我当时在 ACCEL COMMAND 指令中设置了俯仰控制，在 RATE COMMAND 指令中设置了滚转和偏航控制，不知何故，滚转和偏航控制突然活跃起来，DAP 推进器也开始频繁点火。我们在 CMS
13، هيوستن. ترقبوا المزيد من الإمكان
Okay. Row 3, under PROPELLANT - propulsion: the STANDBY RENDEZVOUS HEATER will be open and the LANDING RADAR HEATER circuit breaker will be open. I just changed antennas; and, keeping on do
Okay. The procedure is as follows:, , ENTER; 1331, ENTER; 7, ENTER; and ENTER. Explanation as follows. During the s, there was one time when was entered into the computer at about 16 seconds after the OPTICS ZERO switch was flicked to ZERO. This is a very uncommon anomaly in that, if you do this during - 0.4-second interval at around 16 seconds after you zero the optics, some OPT-mode bits are reset; and this would mean that, if you had a OCDU fail, it wouldn't be indicated; so all this procedure is doing is setting these three bits back again where they
C'est négatif, Mike. Si vous regardez le graphique, que nous vous mettrons de côté et que vous pourrez consulter après le vol, vous verrez qu'il a démarré immédiatement au premier tour et a formé une spirale jusqu'à environ 20 degrés d'inclinaison. Il semblait ensuite amorcer une spirale autour d'un point d'inclinaison décalé d'environ 20 degrés par rapport à 90 degrés. Mais nous ne voulions pas prendre le risque qu'il se stabilise à ce point. Nous pensions qu'il pourrait diverger, alors nous vous avons appelé et avons recommencé. C'est 
我当然很想试试 det
Ruf mich bitte an, wenn es Zeit ist, den Ladevorgang zu beenden
रॉजर। प्रतीक्षा करें, मैं स्थिति रिपोर्ट दूंगा। मैं आपकी ट्रैकिंग के लिए ऑर्बिट एटीट्यूड में हूं। स्थिति रिपोर्ट इस प्रकार है: टावर सेपरेट कैप्सूल (नंबर दो) को छोड़कर सभी फ्यूज नंबर एक पर हैं। इमरजेंसी रेट्रोसीक्वेंस, इमरजेंसी रेट्रोजेटिसन और इमरजेंसी ड्रोग सेंटर-ऑफ स्थिति में हैं, स्क्विब आर्म्ड है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। सब कुछ सामान्य है, ऑटो, जाइरो सामान्य। सभी "T" हैंडल "इन" स्थिति में हैं। रेट्रो डिले सामान्य है। केबिन लाइटें दोनों तरफ चालू हैं। फोटो लाइटें अभी भी चालू हैं। टेलीमेट्री लो फ्रीक्वेंसी चालू है। रेस्क्यू एड्स स्वचालित मोड पर हैं। जेटिसन टावर और सेपरेट कैप्सूल की लाइटें बंद हैं। प्रेशर रेगुलेटर अभी 
Just like they are supposed to
Okay. They say thi
ठीक है, वैंस। मैं देखता हूँ कि मेरे पास यह है या नहीं। मैं A-13 फॉर्मेट में 70 मिलीमीटर DC हैसलब्लैड 80 मिलीमीटर लेंस का
Alles klar. Brandneue Meldung: Juan Carlos wurde gestern – Dienstag – offiziell zum Nachfolger General Francos erna
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Un minuto al decollo; tutti i sistemi VA
Это «Дружба Семь» под углом 60° вправо, временно удерживаем по
لقد أغلقناه؛ قاطع ا
D'accord. Je me demandais juste si, au cas où on aurait un problème pour accéder au module de commande... il faut le rem
Roger. À Washington, la commission des finances du Sénat a approuvé la prolongation de la surtaxe sur le revenu, mais un vote du Sénat sur le projet de loi semble pour l'instant peu probable. À Austin, le représentant de l'État, Ray Lemmon, de Houston, a été nommé directeur national de la Société américaine d'océanographie. M. Lemmon a proposé une étude sur la possibilité de créer un institut d'océanographie au Texas. Ce serait le premier institut de ce type dans l'ouest du golfe du Mexique. À Minneapolis, dans le Minnesota, le service météorologique, après avoir dressé le bilan des températures du jour (maximum 31 °C et minimum 22 °C), a indiqué: « Aucune chute de neige. » De St. Petersburg, en Floride, un reportage radio de l'explorateur norvégien Thor Heyerdahl nous apprend que l'équipage de son bateau en papyrus, le Ra, rejoindra Bridgetown, à la Barbade, malgré les dégâts causés par la forte mer. L'équipage passera la nuit sur un navire d'escorte. Norman Baker, navigateur de l'expédition, a déclaré que l'équipage était à bord du Ra aujourd'hui pour réparer les dégâts causés par les tempêtes de la semaine dernière, qui ont fendu la base du mât. Une partie du mât brisé a été jetée par-dessus bord, et le navire se trouvait à 725 milles à l'est de la Barbade. « Il est possible, mais inconfortable, de dormir à bord du Ra », a déclaré Baker dans son rapport radio. « Mais le but de notre voyage n'est pas une épreuve de force ou d'endurance humaine. » C'est pourquoi l'équipage passait les nuits à bord du navi
네, 이제 최고 중력 가속도는 지
彼はまだケープから戻っ
ठीक है। धन्यवाद। यह जानकर खुशी हुई कि सिस्टम ठीक चल रहा है। क्या आपके पास मेरे लिए कोई सुझावित रवैया है? यह वाला ठीक लग रहा ह
我们一
何も。もう少し暑くなるまで、スーツの設定はこのままにしておきます。暑くなったら、ウ
Спасибо. У меня есть ваш бонус в виде 4-часового периода, когда вы будете готовы скопировать, а
Подтверждаю. Специалисты оценивают тепловую обстановку. Похоже, вы будете отсутствовать довольно долгое время. Именно поэтому мы просим вас 
يتم ربط NET 2 الخاص بك 
... दबाव ठीक है। 
빌이 
रॉजर। हमने देखा कि आवाज़ 
В
हमें उस दूसरे वेक्टर की कभी जरूरत नहीं पड
Ого, посмотрите на
Хорошо. Шаг 7. Панель автоматических выключателей 11, шина переменного тока B, дисплей Helium PQGS, замкнут. Главная - Панель автоматических выключателей 11, шина переменного тока B, цифровая подсве
Le tsar se brosse le
こちら
No, seriously. Very interestingly, we can see on the map now that you're between Guam and Hawaii and a little bit north, a
Tranquility Base, Hou
Je crois avoir compris, Buzz. C'est exac
Roger. Tutto sembra andare per il meglio qui. Sembri molto bravo, e sembra che tu possa 
حس
La pression cabine et l'altimètr
La première commande de chargement est valide
Oh
और आज श्रीमती रॉबर्ट गोडार्ड ने कहा कि उनके पति बहुत खुश होते। "वे चिल्लाते नहीं, बल्कि खुशी से झूम उठते।" उन्होंने आगे कहा, "उनका सपना था चांद पर रॉकेट भेजना।" अपोलो 11 मिशन को लेकर दुनिया भर के लोगों के पास खुश होने के कई कारण थे। इतालवी पुलिस ने बताया कि रविवार की रात साल की सबसे कम अपराध वाली रात थी। और लंदन में, एक लड़के ने सट्टेबाज से 5 डॉलर
Род
यह देखना बहुत दिलचस्प है कि मेरी स्थिति लगभग पिचअप प्लस 30 डिग्री, रोल राइट 130 डिग्री और यॉ लेफ्ट 20 डिग्री है। इस समय गुब्बारा मेरे साथ-साथ चल रहा है। यह हर सम
Looks like I'm stable on the water. The whip antenna is up. I can see it. I will switch to whip anten
Negli ultimi 4 giorni è
로저. 제 상태는 양호합니다. 연료는 51%와 69%이고, 산소는 84%와 100%입니다. 객실 압력도 안정적입니다. 직류와 교류 전원 모두 정상입니다. 비행 계획과 관련해서 보고드릴 사항은 연료량이 예상보다 적다는 것뿐입니다. 현재 조종 모드는 ASCS입니
Okay, Houston.
Roger. I can do that
否
좋아요, 괜찮아요. 거기 놔두세요. 어떻게 
انطلق - أو هيوستن
حسنًا، أبولو 8. الجزء التالي من اختبارنا مشابه لما فعلناه بالأمس؛ سنغير أوضاع الإرسال إلى وضعَي أمر الإرسال وتحديد المدى بدون صوت. سنبقى في هذا الوضع لمدة دقيقتين ونصف تقريبًا، وسنرسل رسالتَي اختبار. خلال هذه الفترة، لن يكون لدينا اتصا
D'accord, Aquarius. Nous travaillons sur
Roger, Jim. Nous vous recevons. A
شروق الشمس فوق الساحل الغربي. إنه لأمرٌ مُحبطٌ بعض الشيء، فالسماء مُغطاةٌ بالكامل تقريباً بالضباب الدخ
Roger. Le plan de vol prévoit le mai
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらは
Хорошо, 13; Хьюстон. Оператор ускорителя говорит, что сброс энергии от двигателя завершен; теперь у н
저희는 고객님의 수도 요금이 점차 줄어들 것으로 예상하며
좋아. "크리스마스 이브 밤, 우주 저 멀리 아폴로 8호 승무원들은 달 착륙 경쟁에서 막 승리했지. 헤드셋은 콘솔에 조심스럽게 걸려 있었고, 크리스 크래프트가 곧 도착하길 바랐어. 프랭크 보먼은 침대에 포근하게 누워 '킬로이가 여기 있었다'라는 환상에 잠겨 있었지. 짐 러벨은 소파에, 앤더스는 선실에서 컴퓨터 화면을 보며 머리를 싸매고 있었는데, 갑자기 요란한 소리가 나더니 프랭크는 무슨 일인지 보려고 침대에서 벌떡 일어났어. 그는 추락하지 않았는지 확인하기 위해 번개처럼 육분의로 달려갔지. 달 표면의 울퉁불퉁한 껍질에 비치는 빛은 회색 달 먼지에 초록빛 치즈 같은 윤기를 더했어. 그때 그의 눈앞에 나타난 것은 무엇이었을까? 바로 '킬로이가 여기 있었다'라고 쓰인 버마 셰이브 광고판이었지." 하지만 프랭크는 바보가 아니었다. 그는 곧 알아챘다. 그들이 최초였다는 것을. 이건 분명 속임수일 것이다. 로켓보다 더 빠르게 그의 욕설이 쏟아졌다. 그는 선원들을 향해 돌아서서 이름을 불렀다. "러벨, 앤더스, 내가 벽에 써놓은 낡은 농
Sure will. Is 
تعمل الكبسولة بشكل ممتاز في هذه المرحلة. 250 (العاكس) تساوي 132 درجة، 150 (العاكس) تساوي... 5. وضع الاستعداد (العاكس) 120... الدوافع... يمينًا، أكثر من 100 درجة يسارًا. زاوية الميل للأسفل (الدافع) تساوي 105 درجات. زاوية الميل للأعلى (الدافع) تس
Ok. Dopo il passaggio a OMNI, disattiveremo il POWER AMP e torneremo a DOWN VOICE BACKUP FTA e a disattivare il RANGING. La decisione 
새로운
是的，吉姆，那是罗杰。
Roger. Nos systèmes sont o
Hallo Sigma Seven, hier spricht Kano Cap Com. Ich
Okay. I've got this minus 5 hours, -7 if required, and now you're going to start me a new procedure called
Affermativo, Ac
TRANSDUCTEURS, GROUPE 1 et 2, PRINCIPAL A et PRI
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait pas fonctionner correctement. La méthode que j'ai finalement utilisée consistait à entrer dans [nom de la zone manquante], à nous rendre à Sirius, notre étoile la plus brillante, à récupérer l'axe et le tourillon, puis à faire voyager le vaisseau spatial jusqu'à Sirius pour l'utiliser pour l'optique, ce que nous avons fait ultérieurement. En ce qui concerne la diffusion de la lumière, il semble que, quelle que soit l'attitude pendant notre contrôle thermique passif, nous recevions de la lumière diffusée dans le télescope de balayage. Cela se présente principalement sous la forme d'une large bande de lumière traversant le centre du télescope, à environ 10 degrés de part et d'autre de zéro. Il est très difficile de voir les étoiles dans cette zone. Les réalignements ont été bons. J'ai pu repérer l'étoile dans le sextant pour effectuer l'alignement, mais je n'ai pas pu identifier l'étoile utilisée pour des observations telles que Regor ou Menkent avec le télescope de balayage. La première observation d'étoile que j'ai effectuée depuis la Terre a révélé un horizon très indistinct. Cependant, une ligne assez nette semblait se dessiner entre ce qui paraissait être l'horizon terrestre et l'atmosphère. Le filtre de visée à repères a semblé améliorer la définition de cet horizon. L'horizon entre l'espace et la haute atmosphère est très flou et indistinct, ce qui le rend difficile à utiliser. Comme je l'ai mentionné précédemment, il arrive que, lorsque le Soleil est proche, la zone autour de la Lune ne soit pas sombre, mais plutôt claire, apparaissant bleu clair. C'est également le cas lors de l'alignement avec une étoile dans le se
了解...Z Ca
Okay. Jack erklärt Fred die Abläufe. Wir wollen ihn damit vertraut machen und ihm zeigen, wie er eventuelle Proble
了解。良い読み上げです。それでは、もう一つ手順があります。
B
CB(11), ED PAVILLON
Lo
حسنًا. الاسم 61: خط العرض، -21.67، -165.37، 116
Они по возможности ни в коем случае не хотят упускать возможнос
حسنًا، الآن ألقي نظرة على المحول والمعدات الموجودة هناك. أستطيع رؤية سطح الفصل؛ إنه نظيف تمامًا. المحركات النفاثة نظيفة أيضًا. الطلاء الحراري والشريط الحراري يبدوا
Хорошо, Джим. У меня есть -7 клавиш, когда ты будешь готов переписыв
Ok, restate sinton
好的。我的舱内温度是100度，舱顶温度是40度；舱内热交换器温度是42度；舱内温度设定为3，并且长时间保持稳
А во время участка полета с высоким коэффициенто
아폴로 8호, 여기는
На следующей странице, в отсеке B1, мы предполагаем, что осталось около 15 процентов продуктов. В отсеке B2 мы вынули оттуда ППК и выбросили туда мусор. В отсеке B3 16-мил
알겠습니다. 3번 패널에서 처음 세 단계는
Okay. Roll 137. pitch 310, yaw 340. Ove
بدا وكأنه يتقلب بطريقة تذبذبية. كان يتقلب لفترة ثم يبدو، كما لو أنه، مع خروج الغازات أو تسرب الوقود أو ما 
了解。状況報告をお願いします。
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कि आपके फोन करने से पहले ही मैंने लगभग सब कुछ समझ लिया था। मैं ऊपर बोर्ड पर इसका खाका बना रहा था, और ऐसा लग रहा है कि अगर हम लगभग 135 अंक लेकर अं
ठीक है, टॉम। आपको सब समझ आ गया है और बर्न करने से पहले हम आपसे यह करने को कहेंगे। हम चाहते हैं कि आप स्पेसक्राफ्ट VII से 5 से 10 फ
罗杰。首先，弗兰
Это командование воздушного движения Гавайев. Готов к р
嘿，吉姆，我们估计此时助推器应该在
Nur mal kurz hallo. An der Schauglaslehre steht ungefähr – oh, es sieht so aus, als ob die weiße Markierung im Kolben etwa 6 bis 9 mm vom Rotpunkt
罗杰，11岁
Roger. Mes deux collègues vont essayer de se reposer un peu, alors surveillez bien les systèmes. Je vais passer de l'autre côté
好的。目的是将状态向量带到地球的动词37 ENTER，23 ENTER。在，在，将以下数字加载到寄存器1、2和3中。寄存器1，00002；寄存器2，
Es gibt ja auch noch die COAS-Staubschutzhülle, die meiner Meinung nach in dieselbe Kategorie fällt, od
Al
Ja. Wir können VERB 64 besorgen, 
Ho scattato la foto S-5 appena ho avuto il contatto con Houston e non sono riuscito a collegarla. Era una formazi
了解。前進24フィート/秒で40秒、後進120フィート/秒で17時20分00秒
C
Вы имеете в виду, что есть ещё что-то? Хорошо, на работе. ЗАРЯДНОЕ УСТ
I am now going to low mag. Correction high mag on the periscope see how it looks?... yawed right about 5 degrees. See how she matc
The view of the Moon that we've been having recently is really spectacular. It fills about three quarters of the hatch window, and of course, we can see the entire circumference, even though part of it is in complete shadow and part of it's in earthshine. It'
一番早いのは、入国チェックリストの最初の部分、地図が載っているページを1ページずつ確認していくことだと思います。L2とL3のコンパートメントがあるページから始めましょ
V
わかった、チャーリー。もし君が45番星の時に見せた態度だとしたら、レチクルがずれている、というかロー
هل يوجد ضوء نهار؟ لا أس
私が旅行中に使ったのはパ
ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस, ह्यूस्टन से। हम ट्रैक मोड स्ल्यू में आपके स्टीयरेबल एंटीना की जा
يا نيل، هل ت
Одна из возможных идей заключается в том, что если у нас низкое давление воды при спуске, мы 
了解。温度もね。ジ
ज़रा रुकि
Роджер. Ваш маневр +44 хорош, не требует обновлени
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. عند بدء تشغيلها، كانت ت
이 두 가지 중 하나라도 누출
नील और बज़, यह ह्यूस्टन है। मेर
はい。素晴らしい
Roger. On vous lit à voix haute. On dirait qu'on a choisi une super attitude pour la stabilisation. On vous lit maintenant
Плюс 59578, минус 00086, минус 05287, 012 080 018, неприменимо, плюс 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, земля вверх 005, вправо 27, плюс 0398, плюс 06500 13215 36961; Сириус Ригель 137 311 339, нет зазора, предполагается выполнение маневра пролета, используется стабильное выравнивание в качестве пролет
سيجما 7، هاواي كوم تك. كيف تقرأ؟ انت
ねえ、フランク、あなたの健康について、世間に向けて一言伝
마이크, 실내가 좀 습해지는 것 같아요. 재생음이 들리네요. 실내가 꽤 습한 것 같습니다. 실내 온도 조절 장치를 자동 모드로 다시 설정하는 게 좋을 것 같아요. 글리콜 온도 조절 장치를 
Il segno di inclinazione è leggermente verso l'alto e di conseguenza corrisponde alla
Eagle, Houston.
Роджер. Прежде чем мы продвинемся дальше, мы хотели бы посмотреть, что мы получили, в частности, после проверки вторичного испарителя, по результата
...を「ノーマル」に設定し
أوقف شحن البطارية ا
Оно — оно затягивае
لا تتوفر خدمة الشبكة 1 لدى مزودي التلفزيون في تلك المنطقة. نقترح استخدام ا
차단되었습니다. 다시 말씀해 주
그건 확언입니
مساء الخير. أودّ أن أناقش معكم بعض الجوانب الرمزية
最後のステップ7
계속하세
هناك في الأعلى؟ من المفترض أن نحصل على ميزة شروق الأر
الجوزاء 4. يرغب الأطباء في معرفة ما إذا كنت ستعود ببدلات الفض
Итак, какие альтернативы у нас есть прямо сейчас
알겠습니다. 저희는 지금 물 배출 작업을 잠시 중단하고 배터리 벤트 라인이 
好的，吉姆。X 和 Z 都正确，Y
아, 사실 우리는 그보
了解しました。
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben soeben beschlossen, die Sauerstoff-Brennstoffzellenspülung 
Il y a quelque temps, j'ai noté une longu
ニール、この景色が見える
好的。在左侧定位点，我可以看到AO——或者说是会合雷达，然后我移动到前方定位点，这就
了解。フレンドシップ・セ
Минус 00014, плюс все нули, плюс 00001 000 304 000, неприменимо, плюс 00191 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225 Шаула, вверх 236 000, плюс 0813, минус 16503 12202 36301, Сириус,
알겠습니다. 그는 처음부터 다 알고 있었다고 합
Ok. Diamo l'ultima cosa a Jack e io terrò tutto fuori. Ok? SISTEMA A. È dentro. I TCA stanno andando fuori. Perché hanno bisogn
哥伦比亚，这里是休斯顿。我们请求高增益天线，俯仰角，偏航
好的。杰克，你能把那个——那个断路器怎么样？我能把它拉下来吗？我们不需
罗杰。我们的热稳定性是否足够
Хорошо, я хотел бы приступ
좋아요... 이... 벡터에서. 좋아요, R1에 45498을 더하고... 좋아요, 190을 더하고... 08256을 더합니다. 좋아요, 이제 우편번
Die relative Luftfeuchtigkeit in der Kabine beträgt 20 %. Der Kühlmittelstand liegt bei 66 %. Der Anzug hat eine Temperatur von 68 °C, der angezeigte Druck beträgt 5,8 bar, die Dampftemperatur im Anzugkreislauf liegt bei 50 °C und ist angenehm. Der Sauerstoffgehalt liegt zwischen 65 % und 100 %. Die Stromstärke beträgt am Hauptanschluss 24, 25, 25, 25 Ampere; am Standby-Anschluss 25, 25 Ampere; isoliert 29 Ampere; und ist wieder am Hauptanschluss. Die L
收到，我们
Stand by Buzz. It looks pretty good as far as I could tell. We got the - along th
Да уж, в невесомости здесь совсем другая перспектива. Сейчас Нил стоит ногами на переднем люке, и он может дотянуться руками до всех пяти окон. Он может д
Mir geht es gut, Flug fortsetzen. Maschine läuft stabil. Ich se
وافقت لجنة الطرق والوسائل في مجلس النواب أمس على تعديلات ضر
Wir haben bei unserem Systemtest des Batterieentlüftungsdrucks festgestellt, dass der Druck beim Öffnen des Entlüftungsventils sofort ab
यहां एकदम सन्नाटा पसरा है। हम बस यहां बैठे हैं और थ्रस्टर फायरिंग के शांत होने का इंतजार क
Ok
等一下
尼
Okay, Apollo 8. We've finished the first test, and we're now going to change the uplink mode to UPLINK COMMAND AND RANGING, and we'll be going without upvoice. We'll be in this mode for 2-1/2 minutes and will be sending a test messages. It'll have no effect on either your computer or your panel switch configuration. What you might see will be the S-band noise that
Roger. Understand. I'll - 
왼쪽 창밖으로 보이는 지역은 비교적 평평한 평원인데, 5~50피트 크기의 분화구가 상당히 많고, 높이는 20~30피트 정도로 보이는 작은 능선들도 몇 개 있으며, 주변에는 1~2피트 크기의 작은 분화구가 수천 개나 흩어져 있습니다. 우리 앞쪽 수백 피트 떨어진 곳에는
Apollo 11, Houston. Potresti restare solo qualche min
37号星足以满足光学校准的需求。而且，在我们的状态矢量上行链路之后，我们还
आपको पता है, यह वाकई बहुत बुरा है कि सा
Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston CAP COM. Ich wiederhole: 05:56 bis 06:16 Uhr. Orbitalnavigationsprüfung ohne Treibstoff für die 
Houston, Columbia sur OM
Okay
Qui è tutto a posto. Stiamo solo aspettando che la pressione in 
没错
アポロ8号さん、もし使っていないのであれば、テ
Okay. We're - We see it just as a bright portion of the lunar disk, and it looks a lot like you see it
D'accord. Voici mes observations concernant le bus principal B. Tout s'est passé très vite. On a d'abord entendu l'impact, l'explosion, ou je ne sais pas exactement ce qui l'a provoqué. Environ une seconde plus tard, une alarme générale s'est déclenchée: sous-tension du bus principal B. J'ai vérifié la tension, et elle était correcte à ce moment-là. Je suppose donc qu'il s'agissait d'une surtension. La pile à combustible 3 fonctionnait également bien, avec un bon débit. Fred, à ce moment-là, entrait dans le module de commande et s'installait à son poste. Peu après, le voyant du bus CA 2 s'est allumé. Il a regardé le bus principal B, et la tension était à zéro. Le débit des piles à combustible était également à zéro. Je me demande si nous n'avons pas un courant sur le bus principal B. Mais ce n'est qu'une supposition. Je n'ai pas essayé de le réinitialiser. Nous avions d'autres problèmes avec le bus principal A, notamment une
分かりまし
Roger. Je comprends que nous recevrons une mise à jour du plan de vol au-dessus des États-
Водолеи, все ваши электроды поднимутся примерно через 3,5 часа, в минус 6:30. И еще одно напоминание: когда вы отключаете питание от кабеля управле
実
Ora vedo una legge
Voici Sigma Seven. Je me sens merveil
أرى
На некоторых из этих снимков кажется, что затвор на Hasselblad заедает. Это вторая серия фотографий, сделанных на S-6 над Атлантикой. Механизм перемотки 
Хорошо. Эти небольшие кусочки были разработаны для решения проблемы скопления крошек в салоне самолета, поэтому они были созданы определенного размера, чтобы все крошки можно было сразу положить в рот. Думаю, благодаря нашему опыту мы 
Before you take the for a dump, let me give you a quick - let me give you a quick
ह्यूस्टन, 
Ok, Jim. Mancano circa 9 minuti all'inizio dell'accensione del modulo di comando e volevamo solo dirti, a beneficio di Jack, che, sebbene le batterie sembrino in buone condizioni, nel caso in cui siano fredde e abbiano qualche difficoltà a gestire il carico all'inizio, vorremmo che monitorasse la tensione del bus principale a 24 volt o più durante la procedura di accensione e, se scende sotto questo valore, metteremo a sua disposizione un paio di interruttori automati
روجر. سأبقى على أه
حسنًا. ألقى جاك نظرة سريعة عبر العدسات - من خلال عد
11, 
Okay. Looking 
Мы 
فريندشيب سفن، هذا ستيلهيد. فهمت أنك تراني من خلال نافذتك. هل هذا صح
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हम जल्द ही किसी अन्य साइट पर कार्यभार सौंपने वाले हैं, इसलिए हो सकता है कि कुछ क्षणों के लिए आपकी साइट का लॉक
现在我们讨论的是飞行中期104小时时的速度
알겠습니다. 모든 시스템 정상입니다. 온도 정보도 확인했습니다. 150 인버터는 152도, 250 인버터는
Ehi, questo solleva una domanda. Ci chiedevamo dove pensate di 
चार्ली, सेकेंडरी लीक चेक के बारे में, इसे जैसा आप चाहते हैं, वैसे ही शब्दशः पढ़ लें, और मैं इसे सीधे फ्लाइट प्लान में कॉपी कर दूंगा और चेकलिस्ट के साथ कोई छेड़छाड़ न
هذا صحيح. سأبقيك هناك مع جهاز DAP، لضبط نطاق التوقف. عندما تستعد لإجراء 
MANETTE DE TRADUCTION armée. Armez votre MANETTE ROTATIVE. La mienne est déjà armée. D'accord, 
곧 대
वैं
Okay. Zu den Fragen zum Akkuladen: Ich schätze, er sollte um [Uhrzeit einfügen] vollständig geladen sein. Spiel das aber genauso wie die Entleerung des Abwasserkanals. Wenn du es früher machen willst, 
Okay. I've got a Haney special here for you. The Interstellar Times latest edition says the flight to the moon is occupying prime space on both paper an
Roger. Prüfen Sie, der 250-Watt-Wechs
Okay. Wir hab
죄송하지만 제가 그 부분을 녹음하지 못했습니다, 프레드. 제
उह-उह। मुझे उम्मीद है कि आप धरती के करीब नहीं जा रहे हैं। 
क्या आप नीचे उतरते समय सूट कंप्रेसर को चालू करने
Принято. Мы получили сообщение. Мы готовы измерить темпер
Итак, Базз, вот этот пункт здесь, на
روجر.
Что ж, мы продолжаем над этим работать. Я не уверен, что всё уже потеряно. Похоже, наша проблема заключается в том, что интенсивность света, регистрируемая нашим экспонометром, улавливает поле, которое намного больше, чем Земля, и поэтому он регистрирует большую часть тёмной среды глубокого космоса. Мы подозреваем, что это, вероятно, приводит к максимальному открытию диафрагмы объектива, и тогда, когда вы направляете камеру на Землю, Земля занимает всего 
Okay, Vance. Du meinst also, wir sollten mit der Vorbereitung im Notfallplan beginnen? Ich bespreche das gleich mit Jim und wir melden uns dann wieder. In der Brennposition sollte die Sonne genau oben stehen, und ich nehme an, das ist Rastpunkt 2. Jim und ich hatten das ja schon besprochen. Wir haben den Terminator an der Erde grob abgeschätzt und den Sonnenstand auf etwa 70 bis 65 Grad geschätzt. Das passt also genau. Es gibt eine Brennregel: Wenn die Anstellwinkel über 10 Grad pro Sekunde liegen, muss der Brenner abgeschaltet werden.
ريترو فاير - ريترو فاير أكثر متعة من الإطلاق. أنت تعلم أنه ل
Combien d'heures de som
Okay, Jack. 226 ist korrekt konfiguriert. Drei REACS- und drei RAD-Leistungssc
알겠습니다. 그리고 혹시 알고 계신지 모르겠지만 한 가지 더 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 현재 2.5번 패널에는 수산화리튬 용기가 하나도 없습니다. 전원을 켤 때, 언제 수산화리튬을 추가해야 하는
D'accord. Mike, voilà ce qui s'est passé: tu étais en train de surveiller, et à l'étape 7, tu as accédé à NOUN 01, tu as saisi l'adresse, puis INFORMATION INFORMATION. Au dernier appui sur ENTER (35400 ENTER), juste après, tu es revenu à l'étape 16. Ensuite, en appuyant sur ENTER, tu as réellement entré les informations dans l'unité de contrôle de la température (CDU). Une fois les deux entrées saisies dans les registres 1 et 2, il y a eu un changement instantané dans la CDU, qui a analysé la situation. « Mon Dieu, j'ai obtenu une vitesse de 600 degrés par seconde! » Et elle a activé les jets pour tenter de réduire cette vitesse. Et les filtres de vitesse qu'il analyse… enfi
로저, 과이마스 상공 1형 비행입니다. 과이마스에서의 제 AOS는 
Roger. Concern
Okay. Es ist ja noch nicht sehr lange her, dass
D'accord. 
Bitte lass deine Leute mich anrufen, falls es zu 
コピーの準備ができたら、いつで
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы хорошо загрузили гру
ああ
Ist es so? Na ja, ich sehe hier gerade wirklich etwas Schlechtes – einen schlechten
The star went out the top of t
Okay. Good thinking. We are - it's - There has been a lot of consideration of what kind of maneuvers to let you do to photograph the, I mean the service module. We consider it quite low priority; the feeling is that it will be real nice to get pictures of the service module, but they are not required for our troubleshooting program. As far as the - the attitude control authority, and so forth, we will get you more detailed word on that later; we are working it. It appears that using the ACA instead of the after service module JETT will give you
세븐, 침 삼키는 중간중간에 혈압 좀 재주시겠어
我刚用哈苏相机拍
로저. 모든 준
로저. / - 이것은 3 - 46427, -0.53, +141, +28960, -0.0456, +0.0720 180 021 002, NA, +왼쪽 17, +0.0883, -16500 12955 36185
ضغطتُ على الزر الخطأ مرتين. لم أحصل على صورة لقزحية العين
아주 좋습니다. 폴 해니 스타일의 인터스텔라
Stanno
ت
«Дружба семь». Влияние
Il TR che hai è in aumento. Quello che abbiamo noi è in diminuzione, quindi non preoccuparti. Verifica che il Modulo 4A s
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 중간 항로 수정 2번입니다. SPS/G&N 63059, +0.97, -0.20, 점화 02644 5792, +0.0118, -0.0003, +0.0177, 롤 277 355 0.15, BLOCK은 NA, DELTA-VT 00213 0.03 0.0168, 육분면 별 30 2082 3.70. 나머지 PAD는 NA입니다. 정렬: 베가와 데네브. 롤 정렬 0
1마일
حسنًا يا غاس. لأغراض تخطيط الرحلات، لم نتمكن من فعل الكثير بالطائرة D-9، لأننا لم نستخدم الوقود المخصص لها. ينبغي علينا توفير بع
好的，Buzz。这次飞行的目的是飞掠。SPS/G&N：6281
ठीक है। पहले चरण के बाद, पहली पंक्ति में से "And VHF-A" को काट दें। दूसरी पंक्ति में से "SIMPLEX operation" को काट दें। तीसरी पंक्ति में से "Prime" को काट दें। इसका मतलब है PRIME POWER AMP, OFF। इस "PRIME" को
Pas dans notre sphère habi
Gemini Net、Gemini Net、Gemini 4 在高频频段播出。有人在高频频段上收听
هذا صحيح. المحور السيني الموجب يشير نحو الشمس وعمودي على خط الفصل بي
ああ、よかった。君との連絡は完全に途絶えた。エリア6-1の正確な逆シーケンス時間は把握している。
收到。仍在接收。请继续。阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。我已收到您关于第277卷的传输，请从第277卷开始。
Another little of local news: the County Court House at Huntsville burned down before dawn yesterday, so it looks like they will go in the construction business there again. On the got a little bit about the waiting families. This one is by Ann James, Post reporter. "We rest on the backside of the moon," said Valerie Anders on Christmas Eve, as she and her family waited for Apollo 8 to get out of the moon orbit and head back toward home. Mrs. Anders had been 00 a.m. Tuesday, and neighbors had just collected all the youngsters so the family could get some rest while the spacecraft was behind the moon and out of communication. Colonel Frank Borman's home was decorated with four big evergreen wreaths outdoors and sprinkled with powdery snow and decorated with red bows. A tree in the den awaits his safe return, and his pretty blond wife Sue and husky sons, Frederick and Edwin, plan to stay home for the midnight blast out of moon orbit. Ordinarily, they would attend midnight services at St. Christopher's Episcopal Church. The plans were for the family 00 a.m. Since there are no young children in the Borman home, family Christmas gift giving will simply wait until Colonel Borman comes back with his fantastic holiday gift of the flight to the moon and back. Marilyn Lovell's four youngsters will have an absolutely normal Christmas as far as the kids are concerned, the busy wife of Captain Lovell reported; but talking about presents was out because two of them were sitting right there next to her. "I haven't even had time to change my clothes that I wore last night," Mrs. Lovell said. Adult-to-adult gifts, however, and the Christmas tree will still be right there when Lovell comes home. Here is a good one on the Action Line. There is a little letter to the Action editor. It says, "We intended to pay you Earthlings a surprise visit by a flying saucer last night. We got scared off by some crazy antics of a fat man and a sleigh and three guys in a rocket-powered bucke
Now, you might want to take into account wha
Roger. Verstanden, 11. Wir sehen das ganz deutlich
Copia. E - e pensiamo che questo sia probabilmente un'indicaz
Roger. Read yo
카메라는 수납했습니다. 광도계는 가벼워서 꺼내서 놓아둘 수 있습니다. 마무리하기 전에 저조도 측정 장치를 다시 한번 확인해 보겠습니다. 수치가 한 줄 정도 올라갔네요. 현재 0.06으로 0.1보다 낮습니다. 이 모든 장비는 이제 글로브 박스에 보관하겠습니다. 이전에는 트렁크 덮개, 비상 탈출 손잡이 근처의 트렁크 고정 
Houston, Apollo 11. Sto osservando quella nube at
제미니 VI, 어댑터 C-밴드를 COMMAND로 전환하시
Roger. Com
Ich wollte nur nachsehen, ob du noch da bist, Mike. Der 
12番と13番では燃料を節約できるとフ
Roger. Sono pronto a passare a un BIT RATE ALTO, se per 
Okay. We've had some problems with our 
是的。那场演出之后
D'accord, merci. C'est une des premières questions qui nous sont 
Roger. Statusbericht. Ich habe Ihnen Blutproben geschickt. Alle Systeme sind in Ordnung, außer dem Anzugsystem, an dem ich vorsichtig arbeite. Ich befinde mich in Rü
总有一天，我
Хорошо, конфигурация панели 11, верхний ряд: Шина переменного тока B, я хочу, чтобы S-диапазонная антенна была открыта; Шина переменного тока A, магнитофон, открыт. Второй ряд, под СИСТЕМОЙ A, я хочу, чтобы основной коммутатор через QUAD 1 TCA был закрыт. Указатель командира X под ПОЛЕТНЫМИ ДИСПЛЕЯМИ, открыт; открыт; Резервный обогреватель радара спуска, открыт; Обогреватель радара посадки, открыт. Выключатель ATTITUDE DIRECT, закрыт; ED: LOGIC POWER A, открыт; UTILITY, открыт. Под: ВЕНТИЛЯТОР КОМПЛЕКТАЦИИ 1, закрыт; АВТОМАТИЧЕСКАЯ ПЕРЕКЛЮЧЕНИЕ, закрыт. Под КОММУНИКАЦИЕЙ: ПЕРЕДАТ
C'est bon, c'est parti! Huntsville indique que votre chargeur de propergol a une autonomie de 6 secondes, soit 3 secondes de plus qu'un boîtier 3-sigma; vous n'avez donc pas de problème de consommables. Le réglage est tellement bon que nous n'allons pas le modifier. Le seul changement concerne la liste de vérification. À 57 minutes, lorsque vous avez réglé l'avance à 18 degré
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。您
オーロラセブン、カ
جيميني 4، كاناري كاب كوم. نحن في خط الرؤية. هل لديك أي شي
좋아요,
Ich habe Sie deutlich verstanden. Könnten Sie mir bitte Ihre Angaben zum Kraftstoffverbrauch bei der Überprüfung Ihrer Steuerungssysteme mitteile
Yes, he was. And as a matter of 
That is a D-9 Run no. 1. Stand by and I'll
Roger. Potresti darci l'ultima temper
Ok. Ok, ora hai l'INVERTER 1 su entrambi i BUS AC. E Jack, uno degli elementi che abbiamo spento erano tutte le pompe delle celle a combustibile. Ok, e potresti farci sapere quando la cella a combustibile 2 ha bisogno della sua pompa; dovremmo occ
I say, I can't see down toward Australia, this time - she's oriented 
ه
١١، هيوستن. رصدنا في بيانات القياس ع
11, это Хьюстон. Понял. Старт с земли на 7-й минуте. Положение руки с контролем уровня н
قلها مرة أخرى يا برج الجوزاء 4. أنت مح
Gemini 4, it's working. 
콜럼비아, 휴스턴. 잠시 후 주별 벡터 업데이트 소식을 전해드리겠습니다. 지금은 준비가 완료되지 않았습니다. 그리고 다른 소식으로, 트랭퀼리티 기지에서는 조기 작전 개시를 준비하고 있습니다
Roger. The moon is very bright and not too distinct in this area. I will give you a shot of the
罗杰，你可以转告我我们看到了悉尼的灯光。我不知道他们有没有开灯，但如果开了，那电费肯
Wie wäre es, wenn wir ihm die orale Temperat
I'm goin
रॉजर, बि
ठीक है, जब भ
Хорошо, VII. 36 процентов 
Эта проверк
On dirait une ombre. En rev
ヒューストン、こちらはトラ
ठीक है। अब हम डेल्टा जा रहे ह
अंधेरा होने के बाद से 
Et le matériel est plutôt bien rangé, sauf pour la partie où nous n'avons pas encore ramené la sonde et le dispositif de stab
Guardando al mondo dello sport, vediamo un po'. Mentre eravate impegnati l'altro giorno, Joe Namath e il commissario di football Pete Rozelle hanno annunciato che "Broadway Joe" aveva accettato di vendere la sua quota nel ristorante Bachelors III e di presentarsi ai New York Jets. Joe è arrivato oggi al campo di allenamento dei Jets e ha svolto il suo primo allenamento. Anche diversi altri giocatori dei Jets che avevano resistito insieme a Joe si sono presentati. E Davy Hill, di Jackson, Michigan, ha vinto il suo terzo torneo importante
我现在处于一个非常好的拍摄位置，可以拍摄穿越南大西洋异常区的MSC-
음, 여기서 우리가 듣는 말은, 그건 돌아올 때마다 재교육을 받
Roger. C'est exact. À l'étape 5, effectuez l'étape 5. Sous « Activation de la boucle glycolique primaire », étape 1, ligne 1, « CB
ああ。了
Dai numerosi crateri si può vedere che questo pianet
Friendship Seven, qui è il chirurgo di Zanzibar.
It made it really super. The lighting is excelle
Oui. Nous avons tenu le coup pen
حسنًا، هيوستن؛ أكواريوس. سأعيد توجيهها نحو الزوايا الأولية التي أعطيتني إياها وهي زاوية ميل 257. سأقترب من حزام
네. 이제 7.6을 얻으려면 +X를 더해야 한다는 말씀이
ठीक है। हम आपको सलाह देना चाहते हैं कि आप पूरी फिल्म का इस्तेमाल करें। यह आपका आखिरी प्रयोग है
كنتُ أستطيع سماعك طوال الوقت يا كين، لكنني لم أكن أسمع الموسيقى إلا عندما كنتَ تحاول الإرسال. وتساءلتُ إن كنتَ لاحظتَ تشغيل و
네, 저희가 준비해 드리겠습니다. 방금 중복 구성 요소 검사에 대해 이야기했는데, 모두가 잠을 좀 자고 난 후에 하려고 했었습니다. 왼쪽 소파로 
好的，没问题。您有空的时候可以给我们提供辐射报告。我们正在为您准备
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। अगर आप हमें यह समझा सकें कि बूस्टर
Вы не 
Apollo 
알겠습니다. A를 누르고 엔터를 누른 다음 R1에 -00088을 입력하고, R2에 -00059를 입력하고, R3에 -03274를 입력하면 
ओह, यह यहा
الساعة الحادية عشرة، هذا يعني انتهاء الأمور بالنسبة لنا على أرض الواقع، لهذا الم
Ich 
हमारे विशेषज्ञों का कहना है कि गड़बड़ी का कारण यह नहीं है। उनका कहना है कि स्तरीकरण के कारण कुछ समय के
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir werden um 15 Uhr von C
Aurora Sette, non ho s
Okay. I am going to have to pull it out the window now, Vance. The Sun's coming up
로저,
حسناً. سيكون في وضع الإحماء قبل ذلك الوقت، ويمكنك الانتقال إلى وضع
알겠습니다. 이 점에 대해 생각해 보세요. 아시다시피, 우리는 사령선 내부의 산소 압력이 떨어
Nein. Wir würden – Roger. Wir sind neugierig, wie Ihr Flug – Ihre Ausrichtung – verlaufen ist, da wir zusätzliche 2 Fuß pro Sekunde 
روجر، لقد قمنا بنسخها ونود زيادة الضغط في خزان الأكسجين رقم 1، لذا قم بتشغيل السخانات يدويًا؛ سنراقب
알겠습니다. 기능, 끄기, 모드, 대기, GTA, 끄기; 
Friendshi
很好。如果你把遥测输入开关调到低档，
Roger. Stiamo lavorando a un pr
دقيق
산소 탱크 - 2번 탱크의
45 40 GET Theta, 7,5; Bereich, 1000,01; Delta-V gesamt war 430; Delta-VI ist 
لا، أعتقد أن
أنت جاهز. المنطقة 9-برافو. هذا هو GET RC، 13:19:36؛ 400K هي 20 + 25؛ الانحناء العكسي هو 26 + 13؛ جميع زوايا الانحناء هذه، لجميع هذه التحديثات، ستكون 90 درجة: GET RC، 14:17:05؛ 400K، 20 + 32؛ الانحناء العكسي، 25 + 54. 11-2: GET RC، 52:02؛ 400K، 20 + 11؛ الانحناء العكسي، 25 + 40. 12-2 GET RC، 17:25:40؛ 400K، 20 + 03؛ الانحناء العكسي، 25 + 35؛ المنطقة 13-2
Très bien. OK, restez près de VI. Je va
こちらはシグマ・セブン。日の出の中、90度のヨー角で逆さまに飛行しているような映像です。自分の進路方向が最もはっきりと分かります。ま
Okay. This is a 9, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 34188, minus 01353, plus 00780 180 008 001, November Alfa, plus 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, down 131, left 28, plus 0758, minus 16500 12987 36277; primary star Sirius, secondary Rigel, 129 155 010; four quads, 15 second, ullage, horizons on 1.2-degree window line at T minus 3; use high speed procedure with minus Mike Alfa. After looking at the burn information from your previous burns, it appears that the engine performance should give
ど
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अगर आपको यह पसंद है, तो हम इस
ठीक है।
रॉजर। दुनिया भर की खबरों में, प्यूब्लो का दल कल दोपहर 00 बजे NAS मिरामार पर उतरा और वे क्रिसमस मनाने के लिए अपने परिवार के साथ बाल्बोआ अस्पताल में कुछ दिन बिताएंगे। स्थानीय खबरों की बात करें तो, रिटेल मर्चेंट्स एसोसिएशन ने घोषणा की है कि इस साल भी क्रिसमस उपहार विनिमय नीति पिछले साल जैसी ही रहेगी; यानी, बहुत उदार। दोस्तों, अगर आप कोई टू
أقول إن هناك نتيجة متأخرة للكرة
Roger. This is 30-minute report coming up. Have gone through head movements and I get no effect from that. Have gone through the reach test and have no problem with that at all. My orientation is good, vision is clear. My moving target, looking at a light spot back and forth 
Ok. Ora lo vediamo ch
Okay. First you want to reverse
Да. Ну, конечно, именно это мы и пытаемся сделать. Мы пытаем
حسنًا، نريد 10. لنبدأ - هل تريد التخلص م
Ho copiato il 250 millimetri, il Reseau è disponibile, ma no
はい。かなり早く届きました。ただ、今はヨー角が約240度、ピッチ角が約0度を
Warten Sie einen Moment, Jim; ic
시
了解。テープダンプを開始するために
了解。プラス 90、G&N: 63481、マイナス 153、プラス 132、004 10 25 38、マイナス 04761、プラス 000
了解しました。アダプターバッテリーはすべてアンペア2、ボルト24です。RCSリングは問題なく機能しています。セカンダリO2ボトルも問題なく機能しています。メインバッテリーは9、ボルトは約22.5～23です。制御
僕らはただ漂っているだけ。どっちを見ているのかも分からない
ठीक है, एक तरफ रुकिए। सुनिए, आप फ्लाइट को लैंडलाइन के ज़रिए बता सकते हैं कि हम इस काम में देरी कर रहे हैं। बहुत सारा काम है और हमें इन 
Aurora Seven, hier spricht IOS Com Tech auf
Okay. Wir haben die Breite des Pers
Et l'évaporateur sec
حسنًا. انتظر قليل
Okay, dieser Durchgang war um 17:47 Uhr abgeschlossen und wir sind zu Schalter Nummer 39 weitergelaufen.
रॉजर, बज़। पहली एंट्री एसी बस ए के नीचे वाली लाइन पर है। यह लाइन सीधे हाई गेट तक जाती है। असल में, लाइन इस तरह होनी चाहिए - और यह एसी बस ए के लिए नो-ग
Hous
حسنًا. وصلنا إلى نهاية التغييرات في كتاب الطيران الفردي، ولديّ صفحتان من التغييرات في خطة الطيران. وهما الصفحتان 3-122 و3-125. بينما تبحثون عنهما، سنُشرك كين للإجابة على سؤال
알겠습니다. 거의 중간쯤에 있습니다. 추진제 양이 30%, 아니 정확히는 37%가 되면, 남은 시간이 10초가 되었을 때 해당 줄을 다음과 같이 변경하고 싶습니다. 
Роджер. Спасибо. Я так понимаю, вы соб
أنا ا
わかりました。ク
Un'altra piccola notizia locale: il tribunale della contea di Huntsville è andato a fuoco prima dell'alba di ieri, quindi sembra che riprenderanno i lavori di costruzione. Ho ricevuto un piccolo articolo sulle famiglie in attesa. Questo è di Ann James, giornalista del Post. "Ci riposiamo sul lato oscuro della Luna", ha detto Valerie Anders la vigilia di Natale, mentre lei e la sua famiglia aspettavano che l'Apollo 8 uscisse dall'orbita lunare e tornasse a casa. La signora Anders era arrivata alle 00 di martedì mattina, e i vicini avevano appena raccolto tutti i bambini perché la famiglia potesse riposare un po' mentre la navicella spaziale era dietro la Luna e non poteva comunicare. La casa del colonnello Frank Borman era addobbata con quattro grandi ghirlande di sempreverdi all'esterno, cosparsa di neve farinosa e decorata con fiocchi rossi. Un albero in soggiorno attende il suo ritorno sano e salvo, e la sua bella moglie bionda Sue e i suoi robusti figli, Frederick ed Edwin, hanno intenzione di rimanere a casa per il lancio di mezzanotte dall'orbita lunare. Di solito, avrebbero partecipato alle funzioni religiose di mezzanotte nella chiesa episcopale di San Cristoforo. I piani erano per la famiglia alle 00 del mattino. Dato che non ci sono bambini piccoli in casa Borman, i regali di Natale in famiglia aspetteranno semplicemente il ritorno del Colonnello Borman con il suo fantastico regalo di Natale: il volo sulla luna e ritorno. I quattro figli di Marilyn Lovell trascorreranno un Natale assolutamente normale per quanto riguarda i bambini, ha riferito l'indaffarata moglie del Capitano Lovell; ma parlare di regali era fuori luogo perché due di loro erano seduti proprio lì accanto a lei. "Non ho nemmeno avuto il tempo di cambiarmi i vestiti che indossavo ieri sera", ha detto la signora Lovell. Regali da adulto ad adulto, comunque, e l'albero di Natale sarà ancora lì quando Lovell tornerà a casa. Eccone uno interessante su Action Line. C'è una breve lettera al direttore di Action. Dice: "Ieri sera avevamo intenzione di farvi una visita a sorpresa con un disco volante, a voi terrestri. Ci siamo spaventati per le folli gesta di un uomo grasso, una slitta e tre ragazzi su un carro armato a razzo che gareggiavano intorno alla Luna. È questo il modo di governare un pianeta?" Firmato dai ragazzi di Marte. Frank, sembra che le uniche persone qui intorno a non essere impres
Okay. Genau. Das ist Jim Lovell. Wir dachten, wir zeigen Ihnen heute einfach ein bisschen was vom Leben an Bord von Apollo 8. Wir haben Ihnen bereits Bilder vom Mond und von der Erde gezeigt und möchten Sie nun in unser Zuhause einladen. Wie Sie auf dem Instrumentenbrett sehen können, ist es nun schon seit mindestens vier Tagen unser Zuhause. Wir markieren jeden Tag auf dem Instrumentenbrett. Wir haben vier Tage hinter uns und arbeiten am fünften. Natürlich freuen wir uns alle auf die Landung am Freitag. Hier unten, im unteren Geräteraum des Raumschiffs, befindet sich der Fitnessberater des Präsidenten, Captain Jim Lovell, der gerade sein tägliches Trainingsprogramm absolviert. Sie sehen, wie er sich ganz frei bewegt. Er hat sich gerade den Kopf an der Optik gestoßen, die wir zur Navigation verwenden. Er trainiert mit einem Gerät, das die Muskeln in Form hält. Eine weitere sehr wichtige Funktion unseres Raumschiffs ist der Bordcomputer. Ich dachte, Sie wären vielleicht daran interessiert, die Anzeigen hier zu sehen, die uns alle Informationen über unsere Triebwerkszündung, die Navigation und die Geschwindigkeit beim Eintritt in die Erdumlaufbahn und beim Bremsen liefern. Sie sehen, dass er über ein Tastenfeld, ähnlich einer Schreibmaschinentastatur, gesteuert wird. Die Eingaben und Ausgaben darüber sind wirklich erstaunlich. Er hat uns fantastische Dienste geleistet, und Jim Lovell hat ihn hervorragend bedient. Ein weiterer wichtiger Punkt, ob im Weltraum oder auf der Erde, ist die Ernährung. Ich habe Bill Anders gebeten, Ihnen zu zeigen, wie wir hier oben im 
よし、デネボラが見えたと思う。見てみよう…確かに見えた。望遠鏡では十分だ。六分儀で確認し
Wir sind bereit und zählen bis 8 Minuten 
你干了什么，把血都流到座
Roger. Compris 03 47 35; 61.2; 01 plus 22; lacet zéro, tangage 21 degrés vers le bas; 25, 00570; 26, 0022
네, 잘 들립니다. 맥박
And Apollo 13, another item: something that we have observed and you might be seeing is a slight TCE fluctuation on fuel cell 3. This fluctuation has been going from about 152 to 160 over a 37-second period. It has been seen on other flights in the past. No 
حسناً يا جاك، إنها قادمة، وهي في 
了解、ジャック。CBバットチャージャーをAC電源に接続して、閉じる。スタンバイ。了解。ここに明かりをつけなきゃ。CBバットチャージャー、BAT A CHARGE、閉じる。CBインバーターコントロ
Okay. Now the RCS Check, and I guess you've done th
Ries
11, ह्यूस्टन। आप
물
Oui. Elles traversent juste au sud du sud du Mexique, probablement en passant par l'Amérique centrale. Il s'agit de la bande équatoriale que nous supposons être la zone de convergence intertro
روجر. نود منك التبديل إلى وضع OMNI Delta كم
キャッチアップ中です
Wir sahen viele Gewitter unter uns. Es sieht so aus, als würden wir uns quer zur Fahrtrichtung bewegen und auf dem Kopf stehen. Sehr, sehr heftiges Donnern und 
알겠습니다. 그
And the last change is on 
Okay. Dies ist d
13, ह्यूस्टन। ठीक है। हमने उ
Все положения тела, кажется, в порядке. Голова и спинка с разметочной линией работают. Моя прицельная сетка на этом этапе, быстрая 
Bene. Hai finito con il compu
ओह, ये तो बढ़िया रहेगा। मैंने लवेल को सोफे के नीचे भेज दिया है। यहाँ एक आदमी बाएं सोफे के नीचे सो रहा है - और एक आदमी हमारे दाएं सोफे पर स
Yes. Yes, and as the stars dro
हे जिम। मैं टॉम हूँ। हम इस बात 
Ja. Ziehen Sie beid
ヒューストン、アポロ8号
Хорошо. Джим, мы хотели бы сделать следующее: мы настроим приблизительные углы карданного подвеса, которые ты будешь для нас держать; мы поднимем платформу, и тогда, когда ты позвонишь и используешь PICAPAR, он, вероятно, не будет достаточно близко, чтобы поместить звезду в секстант, но если ты увидишь какую-нибудь яркую звезду в непосредственной близости — я имею в виду 2-3 градуса от центра телескопа, чтобы у тебя было хоть какое-то представление о направлении, — то проблема идентификации не должна представлять большой сложности. И как только 
没错。吉姆现在手里拿着的是一支笔，我们用绳子把它绑了起来，做成一个简易的加速度计。这次燃烧时间很短，我甚至不确定它能显示多少数据。但我
41分。Horizo​​n Scanでプライマリスキャナを起動しますが、プライマリスキャナとセカンダリス
AC 전원을 다시 공급해 줘야 하고, 차단기를 눌러야 합니다. 음
Cette transmission vous parvient à mi-chemin environ entre la Lune et la Terre. Nous sommes en vol depuis 31 heures et 20 minutes environ. Il nous reste moins de 40 heures pour atteindre la Lune. Vous pouvez voir que Bill a sa brosse à dents ici. Il se brosse les dents régulièrement. Pour illustrer comment les objets flottent en apesanteur. On dirait qu'il joue pour les Astros, à la façon dont il essaie d'attraper ces objets. J'aimerais tellement pouvoir vous montrer la Terre. C'est une vue magnifique, avec un fond majoritairement bleu et d'immenses nuages ​​blancs, notamment un vortex très puissant près du terminateur. Vraiment magnifique. Nous recevrons peut-ê
Roger. Ora puoi disattivare la lettura della quantità. Cerca nubi parassite intorno alle Canarie e all'isola di Madeira. Posizione a circa 200 miglia a sud e 300 miglia a nord della posizio
그럼 0.2초가 되겠네요. 지금으로서는 이 정도면 충분하다
Wenn Sie überlegen, ob Sie Retropack aktiviert las
지구와 달도 구분 못하는 전 세계 MOCR의 아이들
Je suis actuellement en mode VOX. Je vais passer en UHF pour les communications avec les avions relais dans la régio
11, ह्यूस्टन। हमें अभी-अभी खबर मिली है कि मै
만약 그 변환표가 정확하다면, 우리는 첫 번째 부분을 정확히 맞춘 셈입니
रॉजर। मैं समझता हूँ। आपकी तस्वीर अभी भी बहुत अच्छी तरह से केंद्रित है। हमें इसकी चमक में कुछ उतार-चढ़ाव नज़र आए। क्या आपने फ़िल्टर में कोई बदलाव कि
そうですね。あなたの態度は視覚的な
Roger. Wir sind bereit zu
それは否定的だ、ジャック。検
네, 맞는 것 
バミューダ・キャップ・コム、フレンドシッ
Quello che faremo, Charlie, domani, è rivedere e riconfigurare il nostro stivaggio il più possibile secondo le specifiche. Alcune cose che non saranno secondo le specifiche sono le seguenti: le visiere sono state riportate nel modulo di comando e non abbiamo ancora trovato una sistemazione per loro. Ti faremo sapere dove andranno. Inoltre, ci sono circa 2,2 kg di peso vario dal compartimento interno Able 8, che stanno prendendo il posto delle LCG che abbiamo spostato da A8 nella sacca delle tute. Ci siamo sbarazzati di un sacco della spazzatura vario, per lo più vecchi involucri di cibo, vecchia biancheria intima e quella visiera protettiva del casco del CMP. Abbiamo lasciato tutto questo c
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 카노 캡 콤입니다. 잘 읽히지 않는 것 
Okay. Jim wird uns jetzt von der unteren Gerätebucht aus fotografieren, und dann müssen wir wieder in den passiven Temperaturregelungsmodus schalten, damit sich eine Seite des Raumschiffs nic
La première fois que j'ai essayé, j'ai obtenu une mesure assez précise. Sans filtre, j'ai utilisé la lueur superficielle de l'épaisse couche de luminescence atmosphérique. C'est assez nébuleux; il faut se familiariser avec la mesure et essayer de viser toujours au même endroit. Ces mesures exigent u
Okay. Erstens: Der Flugplan zeigt, dass CDR abschalten sollte. Zweitens: Eine kurze Zusammenfassung Ihres Brennvorgangs. Alle Ihre Systeme scheinen in Ordnung zu sein. Die Flugbahn zeigt einen CPA mit einem Modus von 69,67 Meilen und dem Zeitpunkt des Perizynthions. Sie haben einen guten freien Rückflug. Es ist noch etwas früh, die Flugbahn für die Korridorsteuerung vollständig zu bewerten. Die Da
Roger. J'ai lu quelque chose comme 4 par 4. Pourriez-vous me donner un compte rapide, 
阀门和管路温度情况如
You're loud and clear now, and let's go to panel 5. We want FUEL CELL PUMP AC 1, OFF; AC 2, OFF; and that's the FUEL CELL 1 PUMP, AC
تم ا
그리고 아폴로 8호, 지금 편하신 시간에 레지스터 1이 10,
Dieu appela la lumière « Jour » et les ténèbres « Nuit ». Il y eut un soir, il y eut un matin: ce fut le premier jour. Dieu dit: « Qu’il y ait une étendue entre le
Просто для информации, Хьюстон, во время — непосредственно перед вращением вокруг Луны — мы видели много обломков, проплывавших мимо нас, в том числе один довольно большой кусок
Apollo 8, this is Houston. 
Это «Дружба номер семь». Привет, Занзибар, «Дружба номер семь». Вы принимаете сигнал? Конец свя
Apollo 8, Houston. Hai
Roger, Bill. Grazie, e se vi è comodo, potreste darci la lettura? E per quanto riguarda il resto, va benissimo per iniziare. Sembra che la vostra prima stella, che è la numero 14, dovrebbe andare 
«Аполлон-8», будьте готовы к небольшому шуму, пока мы меняем конфигурацию на земле. Мы переходим к первому тесту; у вас по-прежнему будет связь вверх и вниз, и мы будем в этом режиме 2 минуты, но вы можете услышать небольшой шум во время смены конфигураци
D'accord, Houston,
... le module de comma
D'accord. Le premier point, nous pouvons le rayer
わかりました、アクエリアスさん。これからやることを説明します。X軸を北か南に向けます。これがX軸の正方向です。X軸の正方向を南に向ける方が近いようです。電源を入れた状態で、を使って操作してください。その後、電力を節約するために電源を切ることを提案します。ただし、これは が使えなくなるため、ハンドコントローラーを使ってダイレクトモードで宇宙船を制御する必要があります。この2つの項目について、あな
الخوذة والقفازات موجودة في حقيبة الفت
Ici Houston. Bien reçu. Juste avant la fin de votre transmission, après avoir mention
我看到他们现在正在麦克唐纳公司处理这件事
ठीक है। हमें आपसे उच्च बिट दर के बजाय निम्न बिट दर प्राप्त हो र
D'accord. Pour le Pacifique central, les conditions générales sont bonnes. On prévoit des nuages ​​épars à 600 mètres d'altitude, une visibilité de 16 kilomètres, un vent de 70° à 12 nœuds, des vagues de 1,2 mètre et une altitude de 2974 pieds. Le lever du soleil est prévu à 10 h UTC et les premières lueurs du jour à 16 h 49 UTC. Le navire sera le Yorktown; les aéronefs seront les
了解。T8
わかりました。1行目の「そしてVHF-A」を消してください。2行目の「SIMPLEX動作」を消してください。3行目の「Prime」を消してください。これはPRIME POWER AMP
With 
11、ヒューストン。冗談抜きで、そ
आप अभी हमारे प्रोब को देख रहे हैं, जो ओडिसी के अगले हिस्से पर लगा हुआ है। यह काफी भारी है, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि शून्य गुरुत्वाकर्षण में इसका वजन न के बराबर होता है और इसे इधर-उधर ले जाना बहुत आसान होता है। दरअसल, फ्रेड और जैक दोनों ने, 
Unglaublich, oder? Hier sehen Sie Hühnereintopf! Alles, was Sie dafür brauchen, ist 90 ml heißes Wasser für 5 bis 10 Minuten. 
Houston, è stato un vero cambiamento per noi. Ora possiamo vedere di nuovo le stelle e riconoscere le costellazioni per la prima volta durante il viaggio. Il cielo è pieno di stelle. Proprio come il lato notturno della Terra. Ma per tutto il viaggio, siamo riusciti a vedere le stelle solo occasionalmente e forse attraverso il monocolo, ma non abbiamo riconosciuto alcuna formazione stell
알겠습니다, 조. 뉴
केबिन स्टीम वेंट 10 है; सूट स्टीम वेंट 62 है। मैं तापमान में थोड़ी और वृद्धि चाहता हूँ, लेकिन 
Ici Texas Cap Com, Friendship Seven. Nous vous recommandons de laisser le système de rétrocompatibilité activé pendant toute la rentrée atmosphérique. Cela signifie que vous devrez forcer l'activation du capteur 0,05 g, ce qui devrait se produire à ce moment-là. Cela signifie également que vous devrez rétracter manuellem
كولومبيا، لنبدأ التصوير في الساعة 06:
好了，杰克，我现在又连上电话了。在S波段，你
Да, вы это сделали. Мы подтвердили, что
Are you prepared t
他可
Ok, Apollo 8. Ancora un paio di minuti e saremo pronti per il nostro controllo COMM. E, per vostra informazione, sembra che la potenz
Tu veux faire quelque chose au fil
और, जैक, आपके प्लेटफ़ॉर्म से संबंधित प्रश्न के बारे में - अभी इसके बारे में चिंता करने की कोई आवश्यकता नहीं है। हम लगभग 79 घंटों तक प्लेटफ़ॉर्म का उपयोग नहीं करेंगे, इसलिए अभी के लिए प्लेट
まあ、それはそれだと
ジャック、キャニスター MOD が機能しているかどうかを
That's affi
Sigma Se
罗杰。谢谢你
Da draußen gibt es ein paar wunderschöne Glühwürmchen. Mensch, eine
Okay. On DESCENT 1, I get a fuel temp of 66.5 degrees, OX... on DESCENT 2, I get
로저. 여러분들이 다시 잠들지 않았는지 확인하고 싶었습니다. 그리고 지난 12~14시간 동안 
分かりました。ジャック、念のため言っておきますが、パワーアップ作業に取り掛かれるのは2時間半が最短です。それ以外は通常通り、ゲームをできる限り有利に進めてください。ただし、この2時間半という時間は、司令船の消耗品を節約した場合の計算です。そうすれば、我々が太っている理由が分かります。水上でファンを作動させる時間だって十分にありますから。つまり、これは早すぎる時間に始めるべきではない唯一の点です。入場チェックリストをあと数行、そして規約を2ページほど確認する必要があります。これで整理できると思
Yes. That f
Roger. Well, they we
さて、数時間前に送った銀河系ニュースの要約は届きましたか？休憩時間だったかもしれませんね。フットボールのスコ
Роджер. Прекрасно. Груз у нас есть. Если вы согласитесь и ПРИМЕТЕ, м
Affirmative; nous sommes nous a
53-डेल्टा 100. 2+07
――TPIアプ
Hey, Joe. I'm glad you brought that up, be
Roger, Wall
روجر. لقد اكتمل جدول ر
रॉजर।
Roger. Endlich habe ich die ganze Welt vor dem Fenster, und durch das Monokular zu schauen, ist wirklich beeindruckend. Ich wünschte, ich könnte es richtig beschreiben. Das Wetter ist herrlich. Südamerika kommt langsam in Sicht.
Le circuit de refroidissement secondaire était en excellent état. Le radiateur semblait bien étanche et tous les autres composants fonctionnaient parfaitement. Vos régulateurs d'oxygène principaux se sont remplis à 104 psi lors de notre vérification. Compte tenu de l'orbite lunaire, prévoyez une ébullition d'environ 450 grammes d'eau par heure, ce qui n'est qu'une approximation; les estimations des besoins en eau pour l'ébullition sont très variables, allant d'une ébullition importante à une ébullition nulle. La prochaine vidange d'eau aura lieu ensuite, vous n'avez donc pas à vous en soucier pour le moment. Les prévisions de communication sont bonnes, peut-être même un peu meilleures que prévu, et nous devrions obtenir un débit binaire élevé sur les antennes OMNI avec notre antenne de 64 mètres à Goldstone. Cela fonctionnera pour les premières rotations, puis nous changerons de site et nous utiliserons à nouveau les antennes OMNI pour un débit binaire élevé. La qualité vocale est bonne. Vos piles à combustible ont fonctionné au-dessus de leur capacité nominale pendant tout le vol et semblent bien stables. Il y a eu une légère d
OK, Houston. On commence. O
Один включе
Eagle, Houston – Houston, Eagle. Wie l
Ah, bene. Abbiamo perso ogni contat
Roger. Wir haben ein paar Änderungen an den Missionsregeln für deine „No Go“-Karte, Neil. Eine kleine Änderung betrifft die APS-/Treibstoff- und Temperaturdruckkarte. Außerdem gibt es ei
Roger, A
OK. Zone d'entrée: Mid-PAC, 000152, 000;, 178; -21,66, -165,37; 30; tous les
It's as stable as a 
खेल जगत की बात करें तो, चलिए देखते हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों में जब आप व्यस्त थे, तब जो नामाथ और फुटबॉल कमिश्नर पीट रोज़ेल ने घोषणा की कि "ब्रॉडवे जो" ने बैचलर्स III रेस्टोरेंट में अपनी हिस्सेदारी बेचने और न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स में शामिल होने पर सहमति जताई है। जो आज जेट्स के ट्रेनिंग कैंप में पहुंचे और उन्होंने अपना पहला अभ्यास सत्र किया। जो के साथ कई अन्य जेट्स खिलाड़ी भी शामिल हुए, जिन्होंने पहले विरोध किया था। और जैक्सन, मिशिगन के डेवी हिल ने पिछले सप्ताह अपने तीसरे मेजर गोल्फ टूर्नामेंट में जीत हासिल की। ​​उन्होंने फिलाडेल्फिया क्लासिक जीता। हिल इस साल अब तक चार टूर्नामेंट जीत चुके हैं और 129,000 डॉलर की शानदार जीत के साथ इस साल सबसे ज्यादा पुरस्कार जीतने वाले खिलाड़ी हैं। बेसबॉल की बात करें तो, नेशनल लीग के पश्चिमी डिवीजन में कड़ी टक्कर जारी है। लॉस एंजिल्स और सैन फ्रांसिस्को लीग में शीर्ष पर चल रही अटलांटा से एक गेम पीछे हैं। एस्ट्रोस का रिकॉर्ड 48 जीत और 48 हार का है और वे अब पांचवें स्थान पर हैं, सात गेम पीछे। कल रात एस्ट्रोस और सिनसिनाटी के बीच होने वाला मैच बारिश के कारण स्थगित कर दिया गया था। शिकागो कब्स अभी भी पूर्वी डिवीजन में पहले स्थान पर हैं। वे न्यूयॉर्क मेट्स से साढ़े
ATT 1/R
रॉजर। आपको सब समझ आ गया। अब यह ज़ीरो-लिफ्ट रोलिंग केवल आपके टर्मिनल युद्धाभ्यासों पर लागू होती है। आपके सभी CLA और 
Well, you could say that. I'm not too sure just what kind of pitch or roll I've got, coupled with the yaw. I just saw the Earth go by the LMP's window here, not too long ago a
रॉजर। लगता है नील पांच-बाई आ रहा है,
The
B3 und C4 sind beide auf Feld 8 ausgeschaltet un
好的。那我继续推进。三角形偏差是0.01，但在0.3倍率下有点困难。我需要使用中速未分辨模式，而
اللقطة رقم 55 على كاميرا هاسيلبلاد لحظة وصولنا إلى أفريقيا. بدا أن هناك سلسلة سحابية رائعة على ارتفاعات عالي
D'accord. Ici Fre
فهمت.
D'accord. Et le voyant TEMP n'est pas encore éteint. Voulez-vous que je l'allume
Нет. Кажется, я их здесь, на этой стороне, не вижу. Я видел несколько, совсем немного, сразу после того, как покинул Канаверал и повернулся лицом вперед. В тот момент они приближались ко мне. Я улетал, поэтому знаю, что они вообще не исходили из капсулы. До сих пор я видел огромное количество частиц на ка
रॉजर। हमारे पास टी है - रॉजर। हमारे पास टी
Alright. This is a general comment that refers to any time you're working around or when you're going between and, and you should be careful not to call an extended VERB during this time. This is here in the program notes, and it is just a reminder. What will happen if we get into an extended VERB such as an o
Okay. Das sind nicht z
ضغط الأكسجين لديك مرتفع بشكل ملحوظ. ربما حدث عطل في المفتاح، أو ربما حدث عطل في ن
C'est exact. Veuillez copier ce
Besser so, Jack. Zufriedenstellend. Hast du meine Begründung für das Hochfahren des Hauptbusse
Хорошо. Это звучит немного... немного за
저는 지금 
ठीक है, जो, लगभग 76 घंटे हो गए हैं और मुझे लग
نعم. يبدو أن التذبذب يسير في الاتجاه المعاكس يا جاك، 
ヒューストン、コロンビア、音声バックアップがダウン。聞
好的，Vance。你——你——你有没有照搬
... あなたには 100 時
D'accord. Et nous attend
ええと、私たちは睡眠姿勢で、高ゲインの角度をとっています。角度は良好のはずです。ロック
Roger. Compris, je vous ai lu. 1 170. 3+40. 01 32 34, 2
Okay. Will we be jettisoning at about this attitude? That's okay. I'll align the with the. You can te
रॉजर, जैक। यह प्रक्रिया पूरी हो गई है, और अब मैं आपको कमांड मॉड्यूल में वापस जाकर मुख्य बसों को अस्थायी रूप से चालू करने की प्रक्रिया बता रहा हूँ। सबसे पहले, हम यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि मुख्य बस
Circa 3 per 3. Stai arrivando più forte. F
Roger. Ich fürchte, Ed wird dann schon schlafen, aber könnten Sie mir diese Uhrzeit bitte noch einmal nenn
ठीक है। अभी आप बहुत कमजोर हैं। जब आप अभ्यास पैड 
了
В Москве ТАСС процитировал слова космического инженера Анатолия Корицкого о том, что «Луна-15» может выполнить все то, что было сделано предыдущими космически
제미니 4, 휴스턴 
नहीं, हमें वह जानकारी उसके टेप डंप से मिली; वह और ज
Okay. Sarà su CB(16), Fred-o, ma è INVERTER 2 APERTO. Okay, sull'attivazione del timer di missione. E
了解
닐, 저 똑똑
로저. 콜럼비아호에 거주하시는 여러분께 알려드립니다. 오늘은 콜롬비아 독립기념일입니다. 어젯밤에는 필리핀의 글로리아 디아즈가 미스 유니버스에 선정되었습니다. 그녀는 60명의 경쟁자를 제치고 세계 최고의 미인으로 등극했습니다. 디아즈는 18세이며, 검은 머리와 눈을 가지고 있고, 신체 사이즈는 34.5인치(약 87cm)에 허리 23인치(약 61cm), 엉덩이 34.5인치(약 89cm)입니다. 2위는 호주, 3위는 이스라엘, 4위는 일본이 차지했습니다. 화요일 밤에 돌아오시는 길에 워싱턴에서 아메리칸 리그와 내셔널 리그 올스타전이 열립니다
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हम आपकी बात समझ गए हैं,
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आपके
E un rapporto sullo stato dell'equipaggio da Columbia. Credo di aver dormito bene circa 5 ore, anche se probabi
हा ह
Okay. For the burn there will be go to GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, ATTITUDE CONTROL switches will be ROLL PULSE, PITCH PU
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Il y a quelque temps, nous avons a
Rien n'a changé, c'est parti pour la sortie extravéhiculaire! Nous avons les caméras, le fusil, tout l'équipement assemblé, nous terminons les derniers contrôles des combinaiso
الانحراف لليسار ليس جيداً. لنرَ ما لدينا. يظهر انحراف 
... possono prendere questo aggiornamen
わかりました、
... un
अब त
D'accord. Passez au suivant, et nous voulons que l'onduleur 1 AC 1 soit désactivé, pu
よし、ケン。ありがとう。3日目の食事Cが終わったので、これから解散して
下一页，B1
Я понимаю, что одной из причин
Eh bien, nous avons essay
로저. 제 상태는 양호합니다. 연료는 51%와 69%이고, 산소는 84%와 100%입니다. 객실 압력도 안정적입니다. 직류와 교류 전원 모두 정상입니다. 비행 계획과 관련해서 보고드릴 사항은 연료량이 예상보다 적다는 것뿐입니다. 현재 조종 모드는 ASCS입니다. 야간 비행 후 방향 감각을 잡으려다 연료를 너무 많이 소모했습니다. 비행 계획의 요구 사항들이 서로 충돌해서 그런 것 같습니다. 방향 감각을 먼저 잡고 나서 다른 작업을 했어야 했습니다. 자동 조종 모드를 유지하면 과도한 연료 소모를 막을 수 있을 것 같습니다. 그리고
了解しました。そして彼は、後にそれらが白い粒子のように見えるときに、あなたも同じようにすれば、それらが同じ粒子である
Ist unsere bisherige Einstellung für die näch
Но платформа
Командир
Ok. La mia procedura, ora, dopo il modulo di servizio JETT sarà quella di inclinarmi verso l'alto, per cercare di far entrare il modulo di servizio... per far sì che la finestra centrale sia in vista del modulo di servizio, e avremo qualcuno lì per fotografarla. Perché pensi che sarà la fines
워싱턴에 있는 미 해병대 사령관에게 메시지를 보내주세요. 제가 이번 달 필수 비행 시간 4시간을 채웠으니 비행 증명서를 발급해
Хорошо. У меня температура в салоне 100 градусов, температура купола салона 40 градусов; температу
Хорошо, Джек. Следующий шаг — взять карточку-подсказку и использова
지금 여기엔 두 명밖에 남지 않았
Vance, habt ihr euch schon überlegt, welch
はい。最後の写真を何枚か撮ってきました。入水チェックと一次水
That is for quantity reading. Correc
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒュ
... रडार की सुइयां सामान्य से 1 या 2 डिग्री अधिक लचीली हो
Если мы не будем продолжать работать, мы никогда этого не добьемс
D'accord, Jack. Joe Kerwin m'a transmis la procédure pour alimenter le... Es
Хорошо, Водолей; Хьюстон. Мы получили данные, и я предполагаю,
Hast du dir ein p
Jack, wie viele Ampere Leistung benötigt dieses Ge
How do you rea
حسنًا، في تلك الطلعة الأخيرة، التقطنا حوالي 38 صورة باستخدام التصوير الجوي الشامل للتضاريس، بدءًا من منطقة شرق سان دييغو 
Sì, stanno piangendo a Dallas. Risultati di basket: Houston non è andata molto bene questo fine settimana. L'Illinois ha battuto Houston 97 a 84. E la North Carolina ha vinto contro gli 
And we're going to translate plus X and hold
ठीक है। अब हम उस स्थिति में हैं जहाँ, आपके लिए बनाई गई उड़ान योजना के अनुसार, आप सभी खाना खा चुके होंगे और फ्रेड के सोने जाने के बाद आप और जैक ड्यूटी पर होंगे। तो, संक्षेप में, हमारी योजना के अनुसार, आप लगभग 3 या 4 घंटे पहले 
Oh, I really need these.., Buzz
यह पहली बार है जब बूढ़ा लोवेल लंबे समय ब
Neil, I haven't been looking out - My eyes aren
Oui, John a dit qu'il l'avait remarqu
没错，吉姆。我——你的态度是对的，你明白我
罗杰。燃烧结束
Roger. Ora, se superiamo il controllo, puoi semplicemente terminare lì e ti daremo un assetto per passare a un assetto di combustione, e da questo possiamo ottenere un controllo stellare. Se non lo superi, vorremmo che tu facessi un allineamento a 75 ore. E, se sei pronto a copiare, abbiamo alcuni vettori di unità di semisole e alcuni vettori di unità di semiterra 
और मैंने कॉपी कर लिया है कि आप 1 पै
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это Кантонский коммерческий те
Très bien. Je vais commencer ma manœuvre, mais sans réduire la z
Ja
मेरा 
हां, आप कर सकते हैं - ठीक है। पहले हम पावर बंद करते हैं, पैनल 11। ये सभी 
저희는 OMNI D를 사용하고 있는데, TM 플러스 포가 괜찮다는 말을 들었습니다. (그 이
알겠습니다. 잠시만 기다려
了解、カノ、はっ
جراح
برج الدلو،
Хорошо. Клапан ве
هذه مركبة فريندشيب سفن، تبث من خلفها. لقد أشرقت الشمس خلفها في المنظار. كانت ساطعة في المنظار، حمراء زاهية وهي تقترب من الأفق وتشرق؛ وبينما كنت أنظر من النافذة، رأيت آلاف الجسيمات الصغيرة 
Okay, und Houston, du – du 
了解。赤いホースは、大手掃除機ブランドに匹敵するほど
계획과 달라진 또 다른 점은 풍선을 분리하지 못했다는 것입니다. 풍선은 아직 붙어 있지
Роджер. 027 44 5363, минус 165 073 14 037 44 8016, минус 165 072 46 046 44 6141, минус 16
You can tell Cape Sir Jo
所有电池电压都在 23.5 伏或以上，电流表读数稳定在 20 安培。关机前想再检查一下，电压是 115 伏。风扇电压大约是 115
حسناً. تم تركيب
好的，迈克。
Возм
Roger. Minus 01713, and we 
Хорошо. И к вашему сведению, все наши расчеты основа
Roger. At
로저. 저는 55 45를 읽고 
Roger. Wenn ich mir den Flugplan ansehe, steht bei Punkt A ein weiterer Anflug an, und
..
पीसीएम बिट रेट कम हो रहा है। रोट कंट्रोल पावर, डायरेक्ट
Д
알겠습니다, 
Jack, du hast dir das – in Freds Werkstatt – angesehen und kannst den Abbruch-Navigationscomputer sehen. Dort drüben, in seiner Armlehne versteckt, liegt unsere Aktivierungscheckliste, die wir gleich verwenden werden. Oben am Fenster ist un
Родж
Хорошо, Джим. Текущая конфигура
了解。もう一度言います。05:56から06:16、軌道航法チェック、姿勢制御燃料は使用してい
Roger. Freundschaft Sieben. Ich werde den Blutdruck messen. G
了解しました。燃料状況の最新分析によると、飛行計画を完了し、その後もゲージの
Gemini VI. Ihr Computer wird aktualisiert un
105:00まで早めるべきで
I
罗杰。地址 72，25729；地址 94，00025；地址 97，0001
カプセルの経過時間です。中間報告書を
Bien. Nous avons ici trois appareils photo: deux pour la prise de vue depuis le hublot n° 5 et un pour la prise de vue depuis la fenêtre n° 5. Je vais commencer par les appareils photo. Celui dont je parle maintenant est prioritaire. C'est celui
ठीक है। हम आपको सलाह देना चाहते हैं कि आप पूरी फिल्म का इस्तेमाल करें। यह आपका आखिरी प्र
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait pas fonctionner correctement. La méthode que j'ai finalement utilisée consistait à entrer dans [nom de la zone manquante], à nous rendre à Sirius, notre étoile la plus brillante, à récupérer l'axe et le tourillon, puis à faire voyager le vaisseau spatial jusqu'à Sirius pour l'utiliser pour l'optique, ce que nous avons fait ultérieurement. En ce qui concerne la diffusion de la lumière, il semble que, quelle que soit l'attitude pendant notre contrôle thermique passif, nous recevions de la lumière diffusée dans le télescope de balayage. Cela se présente principalement sous la forme d'une large bande de lumière traversant le centre du télescope, à environ 10 degrés de part et d'autre de zéro. Il est très difficile de voir les étoiles dans cette zone. Les réalignements ont été bons. J'ai pu repérer l'étoile dans le sextant pour effectuer l'alignement, mais je n'ai pas pu identifier l'étoile 
Okay. Bevor ich darauf eingehe, möchte ich bestätigen, da
वह दहन स्थिति रिपोर्ट: यह समय पर जला; दहन समय 2 मिनट 23 सेकंड, सा
わかりました。パネル5のCB POWER 1と2を「開」にします。次にPOWERスイッチをリセットして離します。パネル11と16のX LUNAR BUS TIEブレーカーを閉じます。パネル16のASCENT ECA CONTROLとD
Et, 13, ici Houston. Dans le, nous aimerions avoir 12, étape 3, 
不用理会。好的。现在要我开始偏
Houston, sembra che ci sia pochissima diffe
听
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。オーバー
Bei E mi - 02:30, während der Trennung
继续我之前对助推器飞行初期情况的汇报。进入黑暗区域后，大约在1200英尺（约366米）的距离，我尝试与助推器保持位置，但当时我唯一能判断与助推器距离的方法就是观察两盏闪光灯之间的距离。它们会不时地——不是偶尔，而是持续不断地——出现一盏灯、两盏灯、再一盏灯的交替闪烁，有时甚至要过很久才能再次看到两盏灯——这表明助推器一直在旋转。我完全无法确定它的旋转方向。根据两盏灯之间的距离
À 01:06:106 (1 minute, 1 heure et 7 minutes
बोरसाइट तारा पृथ्वी है, नीचे 037, दाईं ओर 22, प्लस 10 68, माइन
نرى بوضوحٍ تامٍّ العلاقة بين الحبل السريّ والمقبض، يا ب
चल रहे और अभी भी जारी रहने वाले सभी कार्यों को देखते हुए, ऐसा लगता है कि यह उड़ान संभवतः जमीन पर म
了解しました。飛行計画が完全に予定通りかどうか
روجر، ما زلنا نتخلص من أشرطت
لنرى. في سبرينغفيلد، ميزوري، قرر ميكي أوين، لاعب البيسبول المخضرم لفريق بروكلين دودجرز، الذي دخل التاريخ بإسقاطه الضربة الثالثة التي قادت فريق نيويورك يانكيز للفوز على دودجرز في بطولة العالم عام 1941، أن يُخلّد اسمه بأكثر من مجرد إنجازاته الرياضية. فقد تبرع بخمسة وأربعين فتى وفتاة بمهور. طُلب من هؤلاء الصغار إرسال رسائل يخبرونه فيها كيف سيعتنون بالمهور. وعندما انهالت الرسائل، أضاف خمسة مهور إلى العشرين التي كان قد تبرع بها بالفعل؛ وتبر
Okay, I'm ready to
١١، هيوستن. نصيحتنا بخصوص المعدات الموجودة في حقيبة الخوذة - تصحيح، حقيبة الصندوق الخلفي - هي إخراجها ووضعها في حزام الأمان أسفل الأريكة اليمنى. السبب هو أن أحزمة حقيبة الصندوق الخلفي مصممة فقط لظروف انعدام الجاذبية، وربطها بإحكام أمر صعب للغاية.
Bien. Aujourd'hui, nous vous demandons de déterminer le biais du tourillon avant et après les observations, comme indiqué dans la procédure. L'objectif est de vérifier si un effet thermique peut induire des erreurs dans la lecture angulaire du sextant. Le biais mesuré au préalable doit être pris en compte: appuyez sur PROCEED sur NOUN 87 après avoir obtenu deux mesures consécutives à 0,003 degré près. Déplacez ensuite le tourillon de quelques degrés entre les deux mesures. La Terre devrait apparaître beaucoup plus petite dans votre champ de vision aujourd'hui. Vous êtes sans doute bien plus qualifié que nous pour nous renseigner à ce sujet, mais pour garantir une bonne mesure de l'angle entre l'étoile et l'horizon terrestre, la ligne M du sextant (la ligne passant par les deux graduations et perpendiculaire à la ligne R) doit être parallèle à l'horizon terrestre au point substellaire. Ensuite, la superposition de l'étoile sur l'horizon peut être effectuée en tout point du champ de vision du sextant: au-dessus, en dessous ou sur la ligne M. Nous recommandons de réaliser les marques le plus rapidement possible après la manœuvre AUTO. Si vous jugez le délai entre la manœuvre AUTO et le moment où vous vous apprêtez à marquer trop long, ou si vous préférez ne pas vous préparer à marquer après la 
Yes. Okay, I'
E, immagino, per quell'ultima fase intermedia, dovremmo iniziare a osservare la fase intermedia abbastanza presto, se ne abbiamo la possibilità, soprattutto per via del controllo dell'assetto. L'ultima volta è stato abbasta
حسنًا. بعد ذلك، سيتجهون نحو القمر لالتقاط صورة له - عفواً، سيتجهون نحو القمر لالتقاط وحدة الخدمة وتصويرها، وسيستخدمون نظام ACA للدوران من الآن فصاعدًا. وقد ترى النجم رقم 5 خارج النافذة في نفس الوق
Roger. C'est en mode NORMAL. J'ai réinitialisé la commande depuis qu'on a perdu le contrôle, et je dois retourner contrôler les OMNI. Pourquo
Ho
Роджер, Хь
Se notate qualch
Roger, Friend
धन्यवाद, माइकल। वैसे, इन साइड खिड़कियों पर इतनी धुंध छाई हुई है कि जब सूरज की रोशनी इन पर पड़ती है, तो ये देखन
Ok. I computer fun
روجر، مايك. SEP PAD، RCS/G&N: و غير متوفر، 100 395 
저희는 반사광 방식의 고효율 ACQ 램프를 모두 보유하고
Les Hawks ont remporté leur match de la ligue Pee-Wee 3-2. Ils ont battu les Falcons. Les Hawks ont marqué 3 points sur 2 coups sûrs, les Falcons ont marqué 2 points sur 3 co
D'accord. On remarque pour la première fois de l'eau à l'intérieur du module de 
Roger. G&N: 62710, plus 098, minus 019
Попробую сейчас немного повозиться с фотоаппаратом и сфотогра
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。我们已收到您的 NOUN 49；您可
無重力センタの感覚は素晴らしいです
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह इंडियन कैप कॉम है। मेर
Roger. Avec
ロジャー、君はは
هيا ي
रेट्रो जेट के लिए प्रतीक्षा कर रहा हूँ। मेरे पास रेट
ठीक 
是的，我想他们
ठीक है। यह गोल्डस्टोन में आ रहा है, बज़। जैसा कि ब्रूस ने कहा,
Ich glaube nicht, dass wir das habe
好的。
OK. Disjoncteurs ATCA installés. Oui. Je suppose que c'est pour l'alimentation de secou
とても静かです。私たちはただここに座って、スラスターの噴射が弱まるのを待
D'accord. Sur le panneau 326,
设置是-50度。陀螺仪已释放。保持在-50度。准备发射尾焰。滚转和偏航已锁定。我看到左侧有尾焰，但我觉得
Nous souhaiterions avoir l'autorisation d'activer le système BIOMED 
我们之前一直使用
Роджер. Напоминаю, что перед включением режима удержания положения после перехода в режим торможения необходимо обязательн
了解しました。航空医療検査（Aero-Med Type 1）の合格を期待していまし
알겠습
Muchea Cap Com, यह सिग्मा सेवन है। यूएचएफ पर। आप मुझे अब कैसे सुन रहे ह
Sì, è a
안녕하세요, 아폴로 
Roger. Like you to know this quest for science has caused me to lose my E memory program, it's in here somewhere, but I can't fin
Roger, nous approchons de la ligne de visée. C'est t
جيميني 4، جيميني 4. هذه هيوستن. سأقدم لكم تحديثًا من 27-برافو إذا كنتم تستطيعون القراءة. إنه احتراق متقطع. للأمام 76. للخلف 94. 2+07. 1+58. 09 12 06. 9+30. هل فهمت
أبولو 8، سنقدم لكم واحدة في المرة القادمة، وسنقوم بتحديثها إذا لزم الأمر في الن
了解。Z Cal 
Number
콜럼비아, 다음번 탐사에서는 기존 방식대로 수색하는 대신, 저희가 알려드린 좌
دورة النوم هذه - أعتقد أننا سنضطر إلى مراقبتها لحظة بلحظة. من المفترض أن أ
О нет. Я зн
静海基地，这里是休斯顿。请问您目前地面
مرحباً كولومبيا، هيوستن. سنُظهر لكم بعض التأهب ونقوم بحركة سريعة خلال حوالي 130 دقيقة حتى نتمكن من 
D'accord. On peu
你们看到了一点——是的，体育迷们好。你们看到
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 자동 역추진 장치는 꺼져 있습니다. 모드 선택기는 정상이고, 이륙률 명령, 자이로스코프도 정상입니다. 모든 "T" 핸들은 수동 모드를 제외하고 모두 작동 중이며, 수동 모드는 꺼져 있습니다. 현재 수동으로 조종하고 있습니다. 착륙 백 스위치는 꺼져 있습니다. 시퀀스 패널은 해당 스위치를 제외하고 모두 정상입니다. 제어 연료는 60~82%입니다. 현재 수동 조종 시 자세는 롤 5도(우측), 요 15도(우측), 피치 -34도(궤도 자세
Bene, in quell'ultimo passaggio abbiamo scattato circa 38 foto con il Synoptic Terrain Photography, partendo un po' a est di San Diego e fino a quando non abbiamo incontrato di nuovo la copertura nuvolosa. Abbiamo ripreso con immagini intermittenti non appena abbiamo iniziato a sorvolare la parte meridionale degli Stati Uniti, passando per l'Alabama e il Mississippi, fino ad arrivare in Florida. Abbiamo scattato alcune ottime foto del meteo in quella zona, poi abbiamo scattato alcune foto degli aeroporti intorno a Jacksonville.
Passeremo al fly-by-wire. Passeremo ai giroscopi in gabbi
Hey
Sig
Ok, Charlie. Puoi as
र
Et les pression
好的，
... 推力を NORMAL に設定。DELTA-V 推力 2 を OFF。ピッチとヨーを AUTO に設定。ジンバル MOTORS PITCH と YAW を OFF。DELTA-V/CG、/CSM。ELS LOGIC を OFF。ELS AUTO を MANUAL に設定。LOGIC OFF、下。推進剤ダンプを OFF。推進剤パージを OFF。ケージ
... إلى الوضع الطبيعي، وتحقق م
それ以外の場合、コントロール モードからコントロール モードへの移行時に美しくドロップしま
了解、フレッド。読み上げは順調です。パネル16から始めましょう。フライトディスプレイの1行目：SEクロスポインター、開；システムブラボー - クアッド1 TCA、閉；クアッド2、閉；クアッド3、閉；クアッド4、閉。2行目、照明：フラッドは任意です。ロジックパワーブラボー、開；スーツフローコントロール、開。3行目、ディスプレイ、開；VHF Aトランスミッター、開；VHF Bレシーバー、開；Sバンドアンテナ、開。4行目、ヒーター：ディスプレイ、開；インバーター2、開。
Хорошо. И еще раз, в той области, где я сказал, что порядок не критичен, он по-прежнему не критичен, даже если вы отступите. Но сейчас я продолжу. Хорошо, панель 4: TELC
やあ、ジム。こちらはトム。 を持ち出したのは、 を投棄するタイミングを制御するための別の参照システムを用意するためだけだ
Roger. Da sind zwei Zahnräder, die sich drehen, wenn man den Griff hin und her zieht. Eines davon ist so eine Art Ratsche, ein kleiner Zylinder mit einem Kolben und einem Stift dahinter, der in die Ratsche einrastet. Damit hatten wir schon Probleme, bevor wir die Luke überhaupt aufbekommen haben, und selbst nachdem wir sie aufbekommen hatten, war es schwierig, die Ratsche zum Laufen zu bringen. Außerdem war es extrem schwierig, die Luke so weit zu schließen, dass wir sie überhaupt verriegel
Bene, nella
好
P
Checked the dome temperature on the suit is 82 [degrees] and
قو
Roger. And then put the waste manageme
Bi
روجر. جميع الأنظمة تبدو جيدة هنا. هذا كل ما لدينا ما لم يكن لديك شيء آخر لتخب
请
Les gyroscopes sont bloqués. Ma vitesse de lacet est d'environ 2 degrés par seconde. Tous les gyroscopes sont à zéro. J'ai Corvus directement au-dessu
Houston. Apollo 11. La lumière cendrée qui entre par le hublot
Cambiamento del piano di monitoraggio più 2; meno 21,65 meno 165,00, 1163,5, 362
Sembra che non ci siano problemi nel tracciare i giroscopi. Il problema è stato piuttosto grosso nel cercare di abbassare la luce della cabina al rosso. È molto difficile da raggiungere a causa di quella borsa. Non ho nemmeno provato a usare la telecamera. Non ho intenzione di farlo finché non avrò il circuito della tuta so
10 feet per second off
C'est 
ठीक है। आप यहाँ से ईवीए के लिए तैयार हैं। डीकंप्रेशन के लिए तैयार रहें - सुधार, डिप्रेसराइ
أوه، فهمت. أنت تفكر في التخزين. ماذا سنترك وراءنا في أكواريوس عندما 
로저. 18:00에 시작되는 이벤트의 GET을 받지 못하신 것
D'accord, Joe. No
रॉजर। कैनरी, टीएस प्लस 5 सत्यापि
Хочешь, 
Ça comm
Roger. Starting with NOUN 33: 130 30 0000, plus 00020, plus all zeros, plus all zeros. Roll all zeros, pitch 230, yaw zero. is NA. DELTA-VP 00020, burn time 007, DELTA-VC 00020. We have - The rest of the PAD is N
Аврора Севен, это IOS 
Роджер. Мы просто сидим и ждём, когда же что-нибудь сделаем. Нам нужен вектор состояния, показания. И нам нужно
وقم أيضًا بتشغيل مفتاح قراءة الكمية لمدة 
— Et si vous pouvez effectuer cette vérification COMM avant cela, ce serait souhaitab
Ok. Vado fuori onda; metto su Fred-o. 
了解、グアイマス。ブースターはまだ残っています。かなり離れた
Okay,
네. 마지막 "400 더하기 0" 다음
Forza, Apollo 8.
Roger. Merci. Et pourriez-vous désactiver le réchauffeur de la sonde 
Хорошо. Фред, я вижу на своем мониторе,
로저, 에드. 원래 비행 계획을 재개해 주시길 바
Хорошо. следующим образом: /: 45597, минус 040, плюс 157, плюс 35189, минус 01513, минус 00346 180 007 000, неприменимо, плюс 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, Дельта Скорпиона (Дзуба), вниз 071, влево 45, плюс 0748 минус 16500 12995 36300; Сириус, Ригель, 129 155 010; четыре квадрупольных спутника, 15 секунд, линия окна 2,9 градуса на минус 3, высокоскоростная процедур
11，休斯顿。我们推荐一种 CRYO 开关配置方案，
Sì. Credo di sì. Ho pensato che forse fosse uno di quelli che non si potevano mai caricare, e forse lo è ancora. Forse è stato caricato solo per un breve periodo di tempo, e poi quando i contatori hanno letto gli angoli del gimbal, perché li hanno riportati a quelli reali? Ma nel frattempo, hanno visto questo nu
鹰号，休斯顿。我们已经掌握了角度信息。我来复述一遍。完毕。指令舱：1115
Jim, this has been tried in the simulator by Charlie and others, and what they recommend is that you null your 
D'accord. Maintenant, ça a baissé -
We'd better take - a - piece 
حسنًا يا فانس، أخبر
이것도 같은 차트에 넣어서 곡선을 다시 그
حسنًا. هل تريد الانتظار حتى تحصل عليه ق
Oh, we're taking stock of how much we got there,
हा
Ваша стр
Qui
Вперед, про
Houston, Apollo 8. The water is in the process of being chlorinated
Understand; star 31, roll 184 7, pitch 23 4, yaw 14 3, and star 
Roger. Müssen wi
حسنًا. إذن، هل زر الإيقاف هو الذي يُفعّل عند
네. 상황이 꽤 심각해요. 창문 
Joe. Okay, I
لدينا حدس بأن الإعداد قد يكون في وضع الذروة، لكننا نوصي بوضع المتوسط ​
ठीक है, अब मैं खाने के बारे में कुछ कहना चाहता हूँ। अब तक मैंने जितने भी संतरे के जूस के पैकेट देखे हैं, जितने भी पैकेट में मैंने पानी डाला है और जिनमें किसी भी रूप में संतरे का जूस, अनानास का जूस या सिर्फ संतरे का जूस था, उन सब में पानी का वाल्व लीक हो रहा था। 
हे जेरी, मैं फ्र
はい、時々物が飛
他们在我们的——他们测量了那个，我想你会称
Roger
13号，休斯
Ich glaube, du hast da eine kluge Ents
11番、ヒューストン。
收到并确认，4-1
11번, 휴스턴. 현재 예보에 따르면 복구 지역의 기상 조건은 양호합니다. 고도 2000피트, 산발적 강풍, 풍향 70도, 풍속 13노트, 시야 10마일, 파고 약 4피트입니다. 어제 예보에서는 열대성 폭풍 클라우디아가 하와이 동쪽 500~1000마일 해상에 있다고 했습니다. 어제 오후 지구 위성 사진에서 클라우디아가 소멸하는 모습이 확인되어 이전보다 영향이 더욱 줄어든 것으로 보입니다. 현재 복구 지역은 열대 수렴대 바로 북쪽에 위치해 있으며, 창밖으로 보시면 열대 수렴대를 보실 수 있을 겁니다. 어제 서쪽으로는 열대성 폭풍 비올라가 발생했다는 보고도 있었습니다. 현재 비올라는 필리핀 동쪽
ठ
Хорошо. До начала осталось примерно 10 минут. Мы снова заберем вас в это время, и у нас будет вся информация от специалистов по телевидению наготове. В случае, если ситуация повторится,
Das ist richtig. Jetzt stellen wir di
Ja. Jetzt, wo wir wissen, wo (unleserlich) ist, wird es beim nächsten Mal viel einfacher sein. Als wir das erste Mal nach Kairo – nach Kairo und Alexandria – gesucht haben, haben wir das (unleserlich) eine Weile gesucht. Ich habe den Flugplatz nie richtig gesehen. Ich habe nur die Gegend gesehen. Ich dachte, wenn ich die Kame
로저. 평온. 이 방 안뿐 아니라 전 세계 곳곳에 
هل يم
Здравствуйт
Plus 1197, minus 16500 
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。巴兹，如果你没听清，刚才在PAD上
Да, температура в костюме 58°, 
حان الوقت لكي يبدأ فريد بالبحث عن الأر
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 아닙니다. 마드리드 기지의 명령 컴퓨터에 문제가 생겨서 일시적으로 어센션 기지로 전환해야 했습니다. 이제 마드리드 기지를 통해 원격으로 다시 접속할 수 있게 되었고, 컴퓨터도 복구되어 OMNI 장비 제어 및 모든 통신을 재개할 준비가 되었습니다. 
Houston, i
哥伦比亚，这里是休斯顿。你听懂了吗
Роджер. Эй, вот заг
Да. Что ж, я сейчас их выключу и посмо
जी हाँ। मेरे ठीक दाहिनी ओर मुझे रोशनी का एक बड़ा पैटर्न दिखाई दे रहा है, जो स्पष्ट रूप से तट
OK. 24 pieds/sec
ありがとうございます。あと残っているのは通信
حسنًا يا جيم، حسنًا يا روجر. سنفعل ذلك بأقصى قدر ممكن. ويبدو الأمر ممكنًا إلى حد معقول. بدايةً، في وحدة الأوامر، سنرسل إليك بعض التسلسلات المنفصلة لتشغيلها تدريجيًا. كلما اقتربنا من نق
好的，杰克，完全正确。我们翻到第二页。从 alpha Pc 到 Pc，以及发射载具/指示器到 GPI 开
Fred, Houston. Ich verstehe, dass Sie die Anzahl Ihrer ersten Stromz
Ну, это меня бесит. Hasselblad пропал. Найдите эту мамочку, пока она или я не закончили... Все ищите п
Roger. It didn't like it 
لكننا لم نتمكن من رؤية الكثير من الولايات ال
روجر. بدأت تظهر أداة تثبيت الأرجوحة تحت الأريكة. إنها ال
Ja. Ich bin ziemlich zuversichtlich, dass die Plattform recht
わかりました。「マスターアーム - オフ」のプラス15と「モードコントロール：- ATT HOLD」の後の「エンジンカットオフ時」を削除し、「ENTER」と「ダンプ過剰率をY、Z変換で」を追加してください。それから、推進剤の量について質問ですが
Хьюстон, он собирается поставить 16, Джек. И лад
OK. BAT B, 37,0; pyro A, 37,0; pyro B, 37,0; pression d'hélium, 3400; et azote A et B – juste pour le plaisir, 2200 e
罗杰，格斯，我觉得我们应该停下来了。它一直
Okay, Houston, wir werden jetzt die Druckprüfung und den C
了
نعم سيدي. دعنا نرى - لحظة من فضلك - دعني أتحقق من هذه الفتحة وفحص سلامتها، ربما أستطيع إخبارك بشيء بخصوص ذلك. ولديّ إجابة على سؤالك بشأن الطاقة المتعلقة ب
좋아
Wir haben Ihre Ladu
そうです。私たちは常に電
分かりました。ありがとう、ハワイ。読み方
Il circuito di raffreddamento secondario sembrava davvero a posto. Sembra che il radiatore fosse ben a tenuta e che tutto il resto funzionasse correttamente, rispettando le curve di prestazione. I regolatori principali dell'ossigeno si sono riempiti entrambi a 104 psi durante il nostro controllo. Considerando l'orbita lunare, aspettatevi di far bollire l'acqua a circa 450 g all'ora, e questa è solo un'approssimazione; ci sono diverse stime sui requisiti di ebollizione dell'acqua, che potrebbero variare da un'ebollizione abbondante a nessuna ebollizione. Il prossimo scarico d'acqua avverrà dopo, quindi non dovete preoccuparvi di nulla finché non avrete completato il controllo. Le previsioni sulle comunicazioni sembrano buone, forse un po' migliori di quanto sperassimo, e sem
ठीक है। हमने दोनों तरीके आजमा लिए हैं। अगर सर्किट ब्रेकर रीसेट करते समय चालू रहता है, तो मुझे 902 04 40 मिलता है। अ
في الحجرة A1، سيتم وضع مخزن الذخيرة عيار 16 ملم في النافذة رقم 4 بدلاً من 5. موزعات المناديل الورقية؛ لم يتبق منها سوى واحدة. وفي الحجرة U3، يوجد حامل عيار 16 ملم ف
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。需要我们帮您关掉
حسنًا. لا يوجد الكثير من الأخبار هذا الصباح. الأمور هادئة نوعًا ما. أعتقد أن الخبر الأبرز هو معدل الحوادث - وفيات العطلات - وهو بالتأكيد خبر غير سار، فقد بلغ عدد القتلى على مستوى البلاد 233 شخصًا، وكان 9 منهم في هيوستن عشية عيد الميلاد ويوم
Roger. Hauptbus ist 24, 
We have a new hack on 
Roger. Apollo 8, Houston. Ich habe eine Aktualisierung für Apollo 3, 4 und eine Kartenaktualisierung für Apollo 3 und 4, di
ह्यूस्टन, आप अपशिष्ट टैंक को किस स्तर
Aurora Seven, Cap Com. Ripeti 
... get rid of this
هذا صحيح. كما نود إعلامكم بأن والي شيرا يحاول الاتصال بكم. رمز نداءه هو جيميني 7/6. وهو في طريقه إلى ه
M
حسنًا، إذا قلبت الصفحة على Power 8، ستجد وظائف المركبة الفضائية المتبقية لك. لدينا معدل بت منخفض ™. مع ذلك، ليس لدينا أي VHF. لدينا مضخات جلايكول. لدينا مراوح للبدلات. لدينا ضغط المقصورة ل
这辆车里的所有东西都挨得
Хорош
इ
Roger. And got a couple of items that I would like to clean up. We will get you an budget. We've got one redline now; we are trying to get some firmer numbers for you, and we will have those in a little bit. Right now your usage is right on the flight plan line, so everything looks pretty good there. We want to get a crew sta
로저입니다. 프레드는 이제 교대
Apollo 8, Houston. Drei Schalterstellungen. TELEMETRIEEINGÄNGE auf NIEDRIG; S-Band NORMAL-Modus VOICE auf VOICE; S-Band NORMAL-Modus auf. Ich wiederhole: TELEMETRI
Ich sage Ihnen, 
Okay. Nur zur Information: Alle unsere Zahlen basieren auf einer Stromstärke von 14 Ampere. Wir verwenden aber nur 12,3 Ampere, daher ist unsere Analyse etwa
……从那里往下看，已经拍了不少照
こんにちは、11番地、ヒューストン。画面右側
没错
わかった。よかった。みんなが起きるまで、いや、少なくともジャックが起きるまで待たせてもらう。彼はフレッドより先に起きるはずだ。それから、スケジュールを元に戻すようにする。でも、みんなが寝てる
わかりました。問題ありません。D-9を使ってください。さて、アポロ・ランドマーク2号では19です。ランドマークは航路から16マイル北に位置し、その時機首はマイナス30度ほど下がって
روجر، يست
了解です。燃焼ルールです。1. 推力モニターが77%以下の場合、2. 推進剤のアレージ圧力が160psi未満の場合、3. 燃料酸化剤のデ
रॉजर, मुचेआ कॉम टेक, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। आपकी बात साफ़-साफ़ समझ आ गई। मै
ジェミニ VIII、こちらはヒューストンです。テー
रॉजर। चूंकि आवाज़ की गुणवत्ता उतनी अच्छी नहीं है, तो चलिए मैं आपको फ़ोट
Roger. Molto bene. Pausa. Le previsioni meteo per l'area di atterraggio in questo momento sono 2000 raffiche sparse, alte e sparse, 10 miglia. Il vento è intorno ag
罗
오늘 다 
휴스턴
了解。も
..
Bene. Il primo è la modalità vocale NORMALE
ठीक है, धन्यवाद। और अब हम 
我得到了正
Ok. Vuoi sapere 
好的。我们建议的开始时间和结束时间，您将处于……状态。我们请求您使用左滚转速率，我们注意到您一直倾向于使用左滚转速率，即每小时 1 
-
完全
Bene. Eccoci qui. -2, /G&N: 63634; più 0,96
阿波罗
Okay, Buzz. Es ist ein Vorbeiflug. SPS/G&N: 628
ठीक है। आपमें से जो लोग नहीं जानते, यह वह जगह है जहाँ हम प्रत्येक युद्धाभ्यास के लिए अपना अधिकांश डेटा दर्ज करते हैं, और हमारे पास इस तरह का एक और कार्ड है जो टाइमलाइन बुक है जिसे डेटा डिस्प्ले कीबोर्ड के सामने टेबल पर रखा जाता है; और इसी 
Bien. Lors de cette dernière vérification, n
في البداية، حالت العملية دون بدء عمليات الرصد فورًا كما خططنا، نظرًا لوجود مناورة مراوغة أخرى. تسبب تفريغ الحمولة في ظهور كمية هائلة من النجوم الزائفة في المنطقة، مما جعل معايرة البصريات شبه مستحيلة. لم تكن الطريقة التي ابتكرناها فعالة. أما الطريقة التي استخدمتها في النهاية، فكانت التوجه إلى نجم الشعرى اليمانية (سيريوس)، وهو ألمع نجومنا، والحصول على العمود والمحور، ثم توجيه المركبة الفضائية إلى سيريوس لاستخدامهما في البصريات، وهو ما فعلناه لاحقًا. فيما يتعلق بتشتت الضوء، يبدو أننا نتلقى تشتتًا ضوئيًا في التلسكوب الماسح الضوئي في أي وضع تقريبًا أثناء التحكم الحراري السلبي. يتخذ هذا التشتت شكل شريط ضوئي عريض يمتد عبر مركز التلسكوب بزاوية 10 درجات تقريبًا في كلا الاتجاهين من الصفر. من الصعب جدًا رؤية النجوم في هذه المنطقة. وقد كانت عمليات إعادة المحاذاة جيدة. تمكنتُ من تحديد النجم في السدس لإجراء المحاذاة، لكنني لم أستطع التعرف على النجم الذي استخدمناه في حالات مثل ريغور أو مينكنت في التلسكوب الماسح. أظهرت أول رؤية نجمية التقطتها للأرض أفقًا غير واضح المعالم. لكن بدا أن هن
Questo è certo. Infatti, Fred-o, Jack ha lì la l
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi, poco prima delle 5 ore circa, o verso, vi vorremo in assetto per un allineamento dell'asse corporeo, usando il terminatore terrestre come abbiamo fatto prima; E non appena lo avremo, eseguiremo -7, che ora equivale a circa 60 cm al secondo, ovvero circa 15 secondi. E mi è stato detto che ora è sceso a 35 cm, quindi è comodamente entro i limiti. Bene. Quando lo faremo, 
잭, 저기를 보고 있는데 태양이 맨 위에 있고 커서에서 오른쪽으로 2
Okay. Es ist nicht ganz klar, ob der mechanische Anschlag tatsächlich erreicht wurde. Falls ja, können wir laut unseren Kollegen im Hintergrund maximal 15 Minuten lang ohne Beschädigung an diesem Anschlag arbeiten. Wir w
부스터가 분리될 때, 롤 노즐에서 연료가 분사되는 모습이 보였습니다. 부스터가 회전하면서, 우주선의 장축과 부스터의 장축을 
네. 250번 패널의 BAT A, POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING 회로 차단기를 닫으세요. 275번 패널의 INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B 회로 차단기를 닫으세요. 다음으로 5번 패널에 있는 몇 개의 회로 차단기를 닫으세요. BAT RELAY BUS, BAT A 회로 차단기, SENSOR UNIT, AC BUS 2 회로 차단기, CB SENSOR SIGNAL, AC2 회로 차단기, CB BATTERY 
阿波罗8号，夏威夷。休斯顿方面报告说，他们抄
阿波罗11号，阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。我
حسناً، الجيروسك
D'accord. Très bien, Joe... configuré pour c
Roger. Mi dispiace, stavo cercando di
Это «Аполлон-8», прямая трансляция с Луны. Нам пришлось переключить телекамеры. Сначала мы показали вам вид Земли, который мы наблюдали последние 16 часов. Теперь мы переключаемся, чтобы показать вам Луну, над которой мы пролетали на высоте 60 миль последние 16 часов. Билл Андерс, Джим Ловелл и я провели здесь день перед Рождеством, проводя эксперименты, фотографируя и запуская двигатели наших космических аппаратов для маневрирования. Теперь мы проследуем по следу, по которому шли весь день, и проведем вас к лунному закату. Луна для каждого из нас — это что-то своё. Я думаю, что у каждого из нас — у каждого — своё впечатление от увиденного сегодня. Моё собственное впечатление — это огромное, один
Для общей информации
了解です。R1に27210、R2に35570、R3に33010を加えます。2つ目の項目は、ご存知の通り、「PROCEED」と「PROCEED」の指示による操縦によるものです。姿勢制御の後は、狭いデッドバンドに戻ら
You're loud and c
매우 부드러운 
Aspetta un attimo, Jim. Stai arrivando di nuovo in modo co
And 11, Houston. We have a request for you. On the service module secondary propellant fuel pressurization valve: As a precautionary measure, we'd like you to momentarily cycle the four switches to the CLOSE position and then release. As you
Хорошо. Мы встанем, и вы пост
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 저희도 그걸 하려고 합니다. 광학계에 15개의 별을 맞추려고 하는데, 지구가 너무 밝아서 육분의에 들어갈 만한 별
了解。私たちの結果はプラス2.8だったようですが、あなたはマイナス2.5とか何
Понял. Позвони мне по UHF-адаптеру номер 1. Ты меня 
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। अपशिष्ट प्रबंधन नाली के माध्यम से
Если я больше ничего не скажу, то запись на диктофоне в реальном времени займе
Gemini, this is Haw
هيوستن،
Roger, comment m'interprètes-tu s
حسنًا، ما أعرضه الآن يا جاك هو LEVVA، وقد سبق عرضه أيضًا. إنه غطاء رأس يُرتدى على سطح الأرض، وأنا - أحضر غطاء جيم هنا لأعرض بعض التعديلات. إحدى المشاكل السابقة هي عدم القدرة على تمييز الشخصيات الموجودة على سطح الأرض بشكل جيد. لذا، ليس فقط بدلة جيم بها بعض الخطوط الحمراء، بل كما ترى، غطاء LEVVA الخاص به يحتوي أيضًا على خط أحمر. والآن يمكنك رؤية تعديل آخر هنا أيضًا يا جاك، لم أره ب
32 روجر. فهمت، 2 برا
Yes, it has a random drift. There is no oscillation that I can predict whatsoever. The--the line leading to the balloon sometimes is tight; sometimes is loose--loose enough, so that there are loops in it. Its--its b
ठीक है। इससे प्राथमिक जल बॉयलर को चालू करने का क
Das war es auf jeden Fall...
Ricevuto. Siamo pronti al comando. Prima non riuscivam
데이터를 어디에서 가져오시는지 알고 
D'accord. L'une de nos premières priorités est de recharger la batterie afin de disposer d'énergie pour effectuer cette opération. Nous avons d'ailleurs déjà mis au point des procédures à cet effet. Concernant la rentrée atmosphérique, nous prévoyons notre dernière manœuvre de mi-parcours 5 heures avant l'interface d'entrée, si nécessaire. Nous souhaitons ensuite larguer le module de service environ 4 heures et demie avant cette interface et consacrer les 3 à 3 heures et demie suivantes à la prise de photos, à la mise en marche du système de guidage et de propulsion du module de commande, au rangement du matériel et à diverses autres tâches. Nous conserverons le module de service jusqu'à une heure avant l'interface d'entrée, puis nous le larguerons. Ces procédures seront exécutées de manière intégrée dans les systèmes de gestion de mission (CMS) et de maintenance (LMS) dem
是的
Roger. Mein Status ist gut; der Treibstoffstand liegt bei 51 % und 69 %, der Sauerstoffgehalt bei 84 % und 100 %; der Kabinendruck ist stabil. Alle Gleich- und Wechselstromversorgungen funktionieren. Das Einzige, was ich zum Flugplan berichten kann, is
로저
罗杰，谢
أب
肯，我相信是这样。这条光带与M线平行，我认为这与光学系统的设计有关，也就是我们从外部进入光学系统的那个通道或矩形入口。在这个特定的太阳角度下，它正好穿过M线。我注意到，地球和太阳都会对扫描望远镜造成这种影响。在六分仪中，也存在同样的光带，尽管它覆盖了整个六分仪的视野。然而，六分仪的放大倍率使星星清晰可见，并且可以在上面做
De retour à Washington, la commission des voies et moyens de la Chambre des représentants a approuvé des modifications fiscales concernant les compagnies pétrolières, les banques et les services publics, susceptibles d'engranger près de 2 milliards de doll
ジェミニ4
そして、チャーリー、あなたはファンを循環させたい...そ
Inoltre, esperimento S-5. Il MCC chiede all'equipaggio di scattare foto del terreno di tutte le aree libere lung
13;
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. ن
좋습니다. 처음부터 다시 설명드리겠습니다. 내용이 겹치는 부분이 있을 수 있지만, 모두 같은 내용을 이해하고 있는지 확인하기 위해 말씀드리겠습니다. 먼저 일련의 시간 순서 절차부터 시작해서 일반적인 진입 체크리스트를 만들겠습니다. 책에는 체크리스트에 대한 몇 가지 변경 사항이 있겠지만, 제가 여러분께 드릴 주요 내용은 시간 순서에 관한 것입니다. 시작 시간은 출발 6시간 30분 전이며, 지휘 모듈의 
现在脱离对接姿态和单引擎推进器（SEP）姿态应该相同，所以我将采用他们给我的最
Non molto, però. Okay.
खैर,... जैसे ही यह बाहर निकलत
Okay, sie müsste bald in Afrika ankommen. Kipp sie um und schau, wie sie ohne Licht aussieht
没错。1月13日只有这
알겠습니다. 육분의 별은 26도 
Вы не поверите, но теперь я командую... Ладно. Вэнс, я, наверное, единстве
Здравствуйте, Bermuda CapCom, это Friendsh
카나본에서 시간 지연 테이프 재생
Hai
CB(11
J'ai l'impression d'être mal réglé, mais je pense que c'est à cause de cette satanée ligne d'horizon. Elle donne l'impressi
D'accord. B
В нашем контрольном списке указана низкая скорость передачи данных, Хьюстон. Если вам нужна высокая, вы можете е
알겠습니다. 
아직 암모니아는 없어요..
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. نعم. نقرأ صوتك بوضوح تام، ولدينا صورة تلفزيونية جيدة وواضحة، مع و
11、ヒューストン。OMNI Deltaにいます。
You've got to pitch
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich verstehe Sie, Indian Com Tech. Hier spricht Friendship Sev
D'accord. L'extension de 4 heures est correcte. Nous vous fournirons bientôt l'extension de 11 heures. Concernant la vérification de votre antenne à gain élevé, nous vous demandons de laisser le commutateur en position « Faisceau large », comme évoqué lors de no
Roger, Jim. Pausa, Jack, vorremmo che rimaneste nella banda morta in cui vi trovate ora, e faremo 
Мне нужно значение от 0,3 до 0,5, ближе к 3. Я бы его пол
Хорошо. Вот процедура зарядки аккумулятора Baker. Панель 3; ЗАРЯДКА АККУМУЛЯТОРА, ВЫКЛ.; панель 5; ГЛАВНАЯ ШИНА, АККУМУЛЯТОР A/C к A/C; CB ЗАРЯДНОЕ УСТРОЙСТВО АККУМУЛЯТОРА, ЗАРЯДКА АККУМУЛЯТОРА A, разомкнуто; CB ЗАРЯДНОЕ УСТРОЙСТВО АККУМУЛЯТОРА, ЗАРЯДКА АККУМУЛЯТОРА B, замкнуто. Панель 250; CB ВВОД ПИТАНИЯ АККУМУЛЯТОРА B и ПОСАДКА, замкнуто. Панель 5; ГЛАВНАЯ ШИНА, АККУМУЛЯТОР B/C, ВЫКЛ.; Панель 3; ЗАРЯДКА АККУМУЛЯТОРА к B. Это дельта-схема для первой процедуры зарядки аккумулятора;
يريد ديك أن تذهب إلى
Roger. We were expecting an Aero-Med Type 1 pass. W
Oh, ich habe deine Stimme dort n
جاك، لا أعتقد أننا أغلقنا قط CB POWER-1، MAIN A. لقد أغلقنا POWER-2، MAIN B، وPOW
357 
收到。明白
Oh, EECOMM ist zufrieden. Nachdem Sie alles eingerichtet haben, haben wir hier eine kleine Anleitung von EECOMM, um den O2-Durchfluss und
Okay. When was our lowest radiator OUT TEMP during the last couple of hours while w
Columbia, Houston. Avec une latitude/longitude supérieure à deux, mise à jour de la positi
RCSヒーターが外れています。スキャンヒー
罗杰，我同意。我觉得我左转的角度比10度略陡一些。我会用手动轴调整一下，然后再让她飞一次，看看情况如
好的，弗雷德。我们以后尽量不给你打电话了，这样你或许可以好好休息一会儿。我们先了解一下房间里的情况，看看有没有人想跟你说点什么，
रॉजर, मैं तुम्हें पढ़ नहीं पा रहा हूँ। मैं तुम्हें पढ़ नहीं पा रहा हूँ। बहुत ही कमज़ोर। क्या तुम अब सूट कंट्रोल सेटिं
Roger, Jim. Das ist Manöver Nummer 5 im Mittelkurs, und es ist ein /, und es ist 31700, nicht anwendbar, nicht anwendbar. Verste
11, qui Houston. Mancano circa 6 minuti e, per poter configurare le nostre linee di terra, vorremmo sapere se avete ancora intenzione di accendere la TV all'inizio del prossimo passaggi
रॉजर, लगभग 4 मिनट में कैनावेरल के ऊपर एक महत्वपूर्ण टेप डंप
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। दो मिनट बाकी हैं। आपका नंबर 80 33 21 है, और जब आप चंद्रमा के पी
هذا هيوستن. أقرأك بوضوح وأفهم أنك صعدت ثلاث طائرات من طراز D-9 تابعة لسلاح الجو، وهبطت على نجم قلب العقرب (أنتار
Roger. Y 001, NA, plus 00202 46420 547 46211 12 138
And, Neil, we g
Roger, Neil. Starting off: Congratulatory messages on the Apollo 11 mission have been pouring into the White House from world leaders in a steady stream all day. Among the latest are telegrams from Prime Minister Harold Wilson of Great Britain and the King of Belgium. The world's press has been dominated by news of Apollo 11. Some newsmen estimate that more than 60 percent of the news used in papers across the country today concerned your mission. The New York Times which, as we mentioned before, has had such a demand for its edition of the paper today (even though it ran 950 000 copies) said it will reprint the whole thing on Thursday as a souvenir edition. And Premier Alexei Kosygin has sent congratulations to you and President Nixon through former Vice President Humphrey who is visiting Russia. The cosmonauts have also issued a statement of congratulations. Humphrey quoted Kosygin as saying "I want you to tell the President and the American people that the Soviet Union desires to work
इस उड़ान की ज़िम्मेदारी सबसे पहले इतिहास और उन महान वैज्ञानिकों की है जिन्होंने इससे पहले यह प्रयास किया; इसके बाद अमेरिकी जनता की, जिन्होंने अपनी इच्छाशक्ति से अपनी आकांक्षा ज़ाहिर की; फिर चार प्रशासनों और उनकी संसदों की, जिन्होंने उस इच्छाशक्ति को साकार किया; और अंत में उन एजेंसियों और उद्योग जगत की टीमों की, जिन्होंने हमारे अंतरिक्ष यान - सैटर्न, कोलंबिया, ईगल और छोटे से ईएमयू
पेरिसिंथियन प्लस 2 - ठीक है, पेरिसिंथियन प्लस 2, पर; प्लस 1633.0, माइनस 
11، هيوستن. لدينا بعض الأعمدة والوصلات التي قد تُحسّن الأداء 
Das ist negativ. Ich habe es nicht geöffnet. Ich werde es erst öffnen, wenn ich diese Messwerte habe. Phecda erlischt jetzt bei 1,7 in der Mitte, in der Mitte zwischen der Dunstschicht und der Erde. Okay, Woomera, mein Zustand ist sehr gut. Die Anzugtemperatur sinkt deutlich. Die Temperatur am Dampfventil ist nicht viel gesunken, aber die Umgebungstemperatur im
よし、バズ。フライバイが目的だ。SPS/G&N：62815、プラス097、マイナス020 070 54 5944、マイナス00028、プラス00023、プ
- - そし
Okay. So it may be on tape and it may not. It went on for - I think we were 44 minutes after we started EVA. I was 
Affermativo. Okay. Una volta completato, manovreranno verso l'angolo di visione del Sole per l'assetto. E una volta arrivati ​​lì, si prende un segno sul Sole usando il filtro solare e il telescopio; e, di nuovo, stiamo segnando il ce
Apollo 8, mentre aspettiamo l'alto guadagno, continuerò il riepilogo della traiettoria. Possiamo ancora tornare alla linea del Pacifico centrale dal tredicesimo, e siete in viaggio dopo 138 secondi dall'accensione. Sono 138 secondi, e vi portano fuori dalla zona a farfalla. Consigliamo di non provare preaccensioni o riavvii dopo 20 secondi. Se si superano i 20 secondi, la traiettoria potrebbe superare la capacità di correzione, fino a un ritorno libero. Le condizioni meteorologiche nell'area di recupero sono buone. Abbiamo un seguito di 10 secondi e un ritorno senza 10 secondi. Durante l'accensione, potreste notare una leggera variazione nella pressione della camera di combustione e nella pressione del serbatoio, dovuta all'esaurimento del carburante nel serbatoio di stoccaggio e al suo passaggio nel serbatoio di raccolta. Questo potrebbe verificarsi tra i 2 e i 5 secondi dall'accensione. Ci sarà una piccola variazione di pressione in entrambi i sistemi. Per quanto riguarda i sistemi, tutti i sistemi sono in funzione. Vogliamo interrompere l'ebollizione dell'acqua dopo per motivi di traiettoria. La situazione dello scarico dell'acqua sembra buona; dovreste essere a posto o superiori. Cercheremo di ritardare lo scarico dell'acqua fino a dopo le 5. Nel frattempo, vorremmo mescolare la criogenia prima di... correzione. La prossima spurgo delle celle a combustibile avverrà approssimativamente alle 17:00, e sarà sia per la batteria a idrogeno A a 34,9, sia per la batteria B a 39,1, sia per Charlie a 38,5. Abbiamo la ca
هذا صحيح. انتقل إلى اللوحة رقم 382. لم يطرأ أي تغيير على الإعدادات من 1 إلى 4. نريد إيقاف صمام التحكم في ماء تبخير النظام الثانوي، وكذلك صمام ال
इसकी वास्तव में कोई आवश्यकत
Roger. 
Alles klar. Brandneue Meldung: Juan Carlos wurde gestern – Dienstag – offiziell zum Nachfolger General Francos ernannt – als Staatsoberhaupt Spaniens und späterer König. Er wird heute als designierter Nachfolger vereidigt, nachdem 
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。
好的。以上是关
Roger, Apollo 11. Vu la façon dont on te l'a présenté, dans l'état d'esprit actuel, ce sera exactement comme la brûlure SEP que tu as subie hier. Tu verras: NOUN 85 te donnera +2, puis tu brûleras simplem
تبلغ قرا
حسنًا. سأحتفظ بهذا وأض
写真用のサービスモジュールを取得するため
阿波罗11号，这里
了解。戻ります。ヨーチェックはOKです。スコープでヨーをかなりよく捉えています。予想していた表示とは少し違い
No. I don't believe so, I think
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया। डाउनलिंक पर आवश्यक डेटा के बारे में दोबारा बताएँ। मुझे बताएँ और मैं आ
물론이죠. 그리고, 이번에는 배터리 충전 상태가 아주 좋다는 걸 알려드리고 싶었어요. 설명서에 나온 것과 똑같아 보이네요. 전원을 
Хорошо. Когда вы возобновите свои занятия, у меня есть рекомендуемое положение, в котором я хочу, что
Roger. Area 55-DELTA 82. 04 34 10. 9+57. Area 55-3 split burn, 55 aft, 
Quello che voglio dire, Jim, è che i ragazzi che stanno lavorando su questa situazione di atteggiamento per le ustioni non hanno ancora tratto le loro conclusioni definitive, ma nel frattempo vogliamo trovare qualcosa che puoi usare nel caso in cui perdi
Хорошо. Здесь есть примечание, в котором говорится, что нужно использовать крепление типа «ласточкин хвост» сверху камеры, а не сбоку. Используйте крепление типа «ла
...당신을 위해 준비는 했지만, 우리는 여기를 정리하고 싶습니다. 그를 추적하는 것은 우리가 만날 수 있다는 것을 증명할 뿐이고, 우리는 이미 만났습니다. 조종석을 곧 정리하고 싶
ठीक है। म
حسنًا. النقطة الثانية هي أنك متقدم بن
Okay. Die guten Daten zeigen uns aktuell einen Vakuum-Perigäum von 23,6 mit einem Flug
लगता है, पृथ्वी पर 
8番について尋ね
Le tue temperature sono buone, Frank. C'
जी 
알겠습니다. 여기 카메라 측면 도브테일이 아닌 카메라 상단의 도브테일을 사용하라는 안내가 있습니다. 브래킷에 장착할 때는 카메라 상
알았다; 31021, 더하
Oui, je
Roger. Ich habe gerade
Roger. Panelübersicht: Die Sicherungsschalter auf der linken Seite sind wie zuvor beschrieben, daher keine Wiederholung. Der Zünder ist scharfgeschaltet. Die automatische Rückwärtsauslösung ist deaktiviert. Moduswahl: Normal, Auto, Kreiselkompass: Normal. Alle T-Griffe sind eingerastet. Die Rückwärtsverzögerung ist normal, Kabinenbeleuchtung ist an. Die Rotfilter sind natürlich aktiviert. Das Telemetrie-Niederfrequenzsignal ist eingeschaltet. Die Rettungshilfen sind auf Auto eingestellt. Alle Funktionen des Sequenzpanels sind normal, außer der Landesack-Funktion in der Mittelstellung „Aus“. Der Treibstoffstand beträgt 90–100 %. Die Lageanzeige zeigt 5° rechts, 3° links und 36° unten an. Das EPI-System zeigt derzeit fast über Woomera an. Die Zeit vom 
बस
네, 맞습니다. 우선 주요 이벤트 시간을 간단히 훑어보고 나서 세부 사항을 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 좋습니다. 진입 인터페이스는 142시간 40분, 즉 약 6시간 30분 전에 시작합니다. 히터 전원을 켜고, CM/ 온도를 확인하고 필요하면 CM/을 예열합니다. 아마도 예열이 필요할 것으로 예상됩니다. 자세한 절차는 나중에 안내해 드리겠습니다. 약 6시간 전에는 이전 중간 점검 때 사용했던 수정된 30분 체크리스트를 사용하여 전원을 켜기 시작합니다. 그리고 약 5시간 전에는 이전처럼 지구 종단면을 사용하여 기체 축 정렬 자세를 취해야 합니다. 그리고 그게 준비되는 대로 -7 단계를 수행할 건데, 현재로서는 초당 약 2피트(약 60cm) 정도의 연소 속도, 즉 약 15초 정도 걸릴 것 같습니다. 지금은 1.5피트(약 3.8m)까지 내려갔다고 하니, 안전 범위 내에 있는 것 같습니다. 좋습니다. 그 후, 서비스 모듈 투하 자세로 즉시 기동을 시작할 겁니다. 평소보다 일찍 투하하기 때문에 평면 내 자세를 유지할 겁니다. 평면 이탈은 필요 없고, 원하지도 않습니다. 서비스 모듈은 반경 벡터를 따라 바깥쪽으로 향하게 평면 내 자세를 유지할 겁니다. 그런 다음 사령선 점검 및 실사격을 포함하여 서비스 모듈 투하 준비를 시작하고, 약 4시간 30분 전에 서비스 모듈을 투하할 겁니다. 서비스 모듈을 확보할 때까지 기체를 상승시키고 사진을 몇 장 찍겠지만, 사진 촬영을 위해 기체를 이탈시키는 기동은 하지 않겠습니다. 비행 경로 각도를 망칠 수 있기 때문입니다. 좋습니다. 이제 2시간 정도의 여유 시간이 생겼습니다. 만약 시간이 부족하더라도 체크리스트를 확인하고 사령선 모듈 전원 공급을 준비할 수 있습니다. 사령선 모듈은 2시간 30분 전에 최대 출력으로 가동할 예정입니다. 컴퓨터를 연결하고, 기체를 상승시키고, 상태 벡터를 전송하는 등의 작업을 시작하고, 사령선 모듈 플랫폼을 정렬합니다. 늦어도 1시간 30분쯤, 즉 사령선 모듈 관련 작업을 할 수 있는 1시간 정도를 확보한 후, 투하 자세로 전환하는 기동을 시작합니다. 그런 다음 마무리 작업을 시작합니다. 물론, 이 전에 모든 적재물 배치를 완료하지는 않습니다. 해치를 닫고 압력 무결성 점검을 한 후, 1시간 전, 즉 141시간 40분에 모듈을 분리할 겁니다. 모듈 분리가 완료되면 바로 재진입 자세로 진입하는 기동을 시작할 수 있습니다. 재진입 자세에 도달하면 육분의를 이용한 항성 점검을 하고 광학 장비를 분리한 후, 최종 재진입 패드를 제공해 드립니다. 모듈을 초기화하면 기본적으로 체크리스트로 돌아가게 됩니다. 일반적인 재진입과 한 가지 작은 차이점이 있습니다. 평소보다 조금 이른 아침에 진입하기 때문에, 재진입 시점에는 밤이 될 겁니다. 하지만 다행히도 달이 지평선 점검에 최적의 위치에 있습니다. 지평선 점검 대신 달 점검을 해드릴 거고, 달이 지는 시점(약 3분 전)까지 추적할 수 있습
حسناً، كان الأمر كذلك يا تشارلي، ولكن عند الانتقال من مناورة آلية إلى أخرى، سيطرنا على الوضع وتجاوزنا قفل جي
Hören Si
Es ist mittlerweile fast vollständig ausgefallen. Es ist w
Auch da unten sieht alles recht gut aus. Die Tarnung scheint
ジェミニ4号、こちらヒューストンCAP COMです。繰り返しますが
نعم. سأنتقل إلى وضع البلاتينيوم. هذا م
هل ذكرت الاتجاه الذي من المفترض أن نبحث
네, 제가 설명하는 동안 이것을 보여드리겠습니다. 카메라처럼 작동합니다. 조리개 값 조절 장치가 여기 있고, f:22로 설정해 놓으면 빛이 가장 적게 들어오는데, 이는 안전을 위한 조치입니다. 나중에는 f:22보다 더 낮은 조리개 값으로 설정하고 싶을 수도 있
Apollo 8, en attendant le gain maximal, je vais poursuivre le résumé de la trajectoire. Nous pouvons encore rejoindre la ligne du Pacifique central à partir du tre
Bene. Ora siamo tornati alla questione della fascia ad
这就是放任安德斯自由行动的后果。他睡着了，所
... riferisci a Cape C
Okay. Nur zu. Verstand
Роджер. Запрос на пер
Non credo che sia più difficile... di 
हाँ, मुझे पता है समस्या क्या है। एक स्प्रिंग इसे पीछे ध
روجر. التل الصغير الواقع خلف الظل مباشرةً عبارة عن فوهتين بركانيتين مستطيلتين، يبلغ طولهما معًا حوالي 40 قدمًا وعرضهما 20 قدمًا، وع
Roger. Zurück zu BLOCK; und NEU AUSRICHTEN: 101 36 14.07 minus 00758, plus alle Nullen, plus 00098 00572, plus 00085 00764 030 000 293, minus 000759
Фред сейчас смотрит в наше оптическое устройство. Это прибор для выравнивания нашей платформы, и сейчас Фред смотрит в него, чтобы посмотреть, какую картину снаружи он сможет получить. Возможно, мы сможем использовать телекамеру, чтобы посмотреть чере
查理，等着。是的，我们要以263度的滚动速度出来，然后按照推荐的姿态进行
シグマセブ
ड
मैंने लगभग 20 मिनट से यहां के हैंड कंट्रोल क
로저, 프랭크. 현재
Roger, Houston. This is Apollo 8. Reading you loud and clear
حسنًا. ه
حسنًا، لقد خفضت مستوى التحكم الإلكتروني، والوضع العادي مُفعّل، والوضع التلقائي، وقفل الج
你
Хорошо. Возможно, это записано на пленку, а возможно, и нет. Это продолжалось, кажется, 44 минуты после
이제 X와 Y를 표시할 
Температура воздуха в скафандре составляет 72-72 градуса. Температура в кабине — 98-98 градусов
Я бы хот
C'est aff
जेमिनी 
收到。明白了。皮特让我告诉你，在经历了这场寒冷之后，你会在萨摩亚的海滩上待一段时间，
さて、最後の通過では、サンディエゴの少し東から雲に覆われるまで、シノプティック・テレイン・フォトグラフィーで約38枚の写真を撮影しました。アメリカ南部、アラバマ州とミシシッピ州付近からフロリダ州にかけて上空を飛行し始めるとすぐに、断続的に写真を撮影しました。その地域の天候を捉えた非常に良い写真がいくつか撮れました。その後、ジャクソンビル周辺の飛行場の写真も何枚か撮りました。ケープ岬の写真も数枚撮りました。おそらく最も良い写真の一つは、後方から撮影した一枚で、フロリダからテキサスまで続く海岸
카나리스, 멋진 경기
賢いアイデアだね。 - ようやく気象庁のバックが出てきた。最初の写真は使う価値がなかったので、変更する。 - よし。スライダーを出した。気象フィルターも入れる。うまくいけばね。レンズ側はこちら。ほら
11+18. RET 4
ठीक है। बैटरी चार्जिंग से संबंधित सवालों के जवाब में, मेरा अनुमान है कि यह पूरी तरह चार्ज हो जाएगी। लेकिन इसे वैसे ही इस्तेमाल करें जैसे अप
了解しました。君に渡した投光器を確認しているところです。実はジャック、君に渡した投光器はそのまま使えるはずだ。暗闇の中でじっとしている必要はない。MAIN Bから照明が来るはずで、今確認
Hey, Joe? Is FAO ready to - do you - or are you ready to give me those items that we made optional and deleted in the solo boo
على حد علمنا، فإن القمر الصناعي الوحيد الذي يمكن أن يكون هو بيغاسوس، بناءً على ما نلاحظ
Roger. L'équipe de vol conseille de reprendre le circuit d'essai normal jusqu'au prochain tour de piste. En
여기는 제미니 4호입니다.
Okay. Auf Panel 5 sollen die Leistungsschalter 1 und 2 (CB POWER 1 und 2) geöffnet sein. Anschließend den Netzschalter zum Zurücksetzen loslassen. Auf den Panels 11 und 16 sollen die X-LUNAR-BUS-TIE-Leistungsschalter geschlossen sein. Auf Panel 16 sollen die ECA-Steuerungen für Auf- und Abstieg geschlossen sein. Auf Panel 14 soll die normale Zufuhr von Batterie 5 eingeschaltet sein, gefolgt vo
哇，在零重力环境下，这视角真是不一样。现在，尼尔的脚踩在前舱盖上，他伸手就能看到全部五个舷窗，还能伸手到舷外排水口。他几乎可以伸手到
Pensi che l'auto
那东西可
Okay, Aquarius. You can go low bit rate, POWER AMP, OFF and DOWN VOICE BACKUP now. Voltages and currents look normal on battery 2; so ignore the battery li
मेरे 
Хьюстон, 11. У нас для вас отчет о состоянии бриг
... looking down there... sure looked like it was convex... Neil walked back a little later and it was right smack in the mid
Das glaube ich dir. Tut mir leid, dass ich deine Leuchtrak
They've also looked at the results of your landmark tracking. The marks all apparently were very good, and we've got a full page of data here relative to the al
हा
Innanzitutto, sono in rientro automatico; sono in modalità automatica; i giroscopi sono normali; la manovra è disattivata; tutte le configurazioni sono in rientro; l'interruttore di bypass per i giroscopi di velocità è in modalità normale. Ti do un'indicazione del livello del carburante: il serbatoio automa
Роджер, Фрэнк. Для района посадки в точке с координатами 7 градусов 38 минут северной широты и 165 градусов западной долготы прогнозируется 2000 баллов (разрозненные), 12000 баллов (прерывистые), высота облачности около 10 футов; ветер с востока 12 футов, волны высотой 4 фута, температура около 82 градусов. Ожидаются кратковременные дожди примерно на 10-30% территории, высота облачности около 2
Okay, a quanto pare è stato solo perché ho messo su OFF l'inter
Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы видим, что кислород в баллоне ASCENT O2 номер 2 снова накапливается, поэтому мы хотели бы использовать часть его, 
حسناً، فهمت. سيقوم برنامج إيجل بإيقاف تشغيل وحدة الاتصال، ونحن الآن على وشك الوصول إلى 27 فولت. يبدو أننا لن نحتاج 
水瓶座，我
11, Houston. On the, what we are saying is that if we lose control about one axis pr
さあ、フィルムテープパック11番を始めます。ちょうど9番が終わったところです。
好的。我划
D'a
Apollo 8, Ho
Roger. Ho alcune informazioni per te su questo argomento che approfondiremo subito dopo il prossimo esercizio. Vorremmo che questa volta provassi l'assetto muso nord, ovvero un beccheggio di 180° e un'imbardata di 315°, e vorremmo anche dare un'altra occhiata a questa modalità libera e
Jim, es wird hier unten immer lauter. Könntest du bitte die OMN
D'accord. Tu t'en sors bien, Fred. J'ai trois modifications à apporter à la liste
Хорошо. Вот и все. И, конечно же, Хьюстон попросит вас перейти к шагу 9, если давление меньше 770. Если давление находится в диапазоне от 770 до 800, мы попросим вас сделать сл
Фред, всё выглядит хорошо, но у них ещё не было возможности всё оценить. Вероятно, они закончат просмотр табло примерно через 15 минут, и после этого мы
Ok
Tja, das ist meine Frage. Wir sind nicht – unsere 16 20 passen nicht zu unserer Acht-Kugel. Wir haben auf s O
Roger. Bereich 57-2 86. 1+49. 07 42 52. 7+12. 11+52. 58-2 94. 1+59. 09 16 42. 5+49. 10+41. Bereich 58-BRAVO geteilter Brenner, 55 vorn, 51 achtern. 1+31. 1+54. 10 00 10. 9+03. Bereich 55-2 104. 2+12. 10 50
2개의 제트 엔
Just so Neil d
روجر، كانتون. حسنًا، سأقدم لك تقريرًا موجزًا. أنا 
Hey Jack. Die Checkliste dient nur zur Information für Jim. Sie soll ihm lediglich mitteilen
Acquario, Houston. Notiamo che la pressione dell'O2 nella BOMBOLA DI RISALITA è un po' alta, quindi vogliamo utilizzarne una parte. Quindi chiudiamo la BOMBOLA DI DISCESA e apriam
切り替えます。キャビンは正常に機能し
과이마스, 제미니 8호. T
Peu de lueur: à peine. 0,5 g. L'humidificateur auxiliaire semble bien fonctionner. J'espèr
알겠습니다. 글리콜 증발기 물을 자동 모드로 전
Dove sarebbe? Sarebbe proprio
D'accord. L'enregistrement est terminé et l'enregistreur vous est rendu. Vous pouvez l'utiliser comme bon vous semble. Nous pourrions l'enregistrer à nouveau, et si c'est le cas, nous utiliserons les mêmes informations, sauf si vous souhaitez y ajouter des données ultérieurement. La qualité de la voix est excellente. Nous approchons de la manœuvre de mi-parcours 4 et nous sommes en train de la réaliser dans les temps. La vitesse de la manœuvre devrait avoisiner les 90 cm/s. Nous envisageons la possibilité d'effectuer cette manœuvre en utilisant le vecteur embarqué. Nous pourrions simplement mettre à jour le vecteur dans le module, afin que vous l'ayez à bord. Cela ne semble pas avoir d'incidence majeure sur les résultats de la manœuvre, mais cela pourrait s'avérer intéressant. Réfléchissez-y un instant et
제미니 6호가 잠시 제미니 7호로 이동합니다. 곧 다시 소식을 전해드리겠
了解しました。バッテリーの充電、ベントバルブ、燃料電池のパージを実施し、55時間で停止しました。ロール姿勢は285度で、これは飛行計画通りです。高利得アンテナの角度は少し異なり、ピッチ23度、ヨー267度です。TVパスまでの時間は、標準的な起動方法ですが、SHeタンクの圧力を確認するための特別な手順をいくつかご紹介します。SHeタンクの
Хорош
You're in pretty good; your gimbals are 
Test della luce sequ
Roger. Copy, Buzz. Got a couple of changes to your surface checklist here, and in general, what we're going to want you to do is, tracking the command module for one last hack on your 
Хорошо, Джек. Мы попробовали эту процедуру, и при таком давлении у нас получилось приготовить 10 напитков. Это примерно 80 ун
Und was 
Roger. Quand es
了解しました、ジム。レートは再び良好になりましたので、この手順の残りを続けましょう。ENTERキーとMODE CONTROLキーを押し
ठीक है। हव
이 비행의 책임은 우선 역사와 이 노력에 앞서 나간 위대한 과학자들에게 있습니다. 다음으로는 의지를 표명해 주신 미국 국민들에게, 그리고 그 의지를 실행에 옮긴 네 개의 행정부와 의회에, 마지막으로 새턴, 컬럼비아, 이글, 그리고 달 표면에서 우리의 작은 우주선 역할을 했던 우주복과 배낭인 EMU를 제작한 기관과 산업체 팀들에게 있습니다. 특히 우주선을 제작하고 설계하고 시험하며 온 마음과 모든 능력을 쏟아부은 모든 미국인들에게 특별한 감사를 전하고 싶습니다. 오늘 밤, 그분들께 특별히 감사를 드리며, 오늘 밤 방송을 듣고 시청하시는 모든 분들께도 신의 축복이 있기
好的。第 14 页，a，加载，已更改为 31021。我假设如果需要任何更新的权重，您会提供给我们，之后是“，ENTER”。
Oui, Jerry, je vois le point lumineux. C'est… je suppose que c'est le point subsolaire. Il se situe au large de l'Amérique du Sud, il me semble. C'est une tache grisâtre qui contraste avec le bleu des eaux environnantes. Son diamètre est indéfini; en
好的，手动模式和自动模式（中等）。好了。他还在零度和-360度之间犹豫不决。好的，我们搞定了
ठीक है। जब भी आपको समय मिले, आप अंदर जाकर निम्नलिखित वाल्वों की जाँच कर लें और उन्हें यहाँ बताए गए अनुसार छोड़ दें। रिप्रेस पैकेज वाल्व, बंद; इमरजेंसी केबिन प्रेशर, बंद; डायरेक्ट ऑक्सीजन, बंद; डिमांड रेगुलेटर, बंद; दोनों वाटर एक्यूमुलेटर, बंद; मेन रेगुलेटर A और B, खुले; वाटर ग्लाइकोल - सुधार - पानी और फिर ग्लाइकोल टैंक का इनलेट और आउटलेट, दोनों। अब यदि आपको पानी चाहिए, तो हम सुझाव देते हैं कि आप सिस्टम को प्रेशराइज़ करने के लिए कुछ देर के लिए सर्ज टैंक को चालू करें और फिर उसे 
了解しました。今回の主な目的は、先ほど申し上げた通り、酸素流量トランスデューサーの点検です。しかし、キャビンのエンリッチメントにはまだ約2時間かかりますので、これから設置する換気口は稼働させておきたいと思います。了解しました。キャビン換気口のクイックディスコネクト（コンパートメントR-6、つまりロメオ6）をパネル251の尿コネクタに
알았어, 다시 데려다줄게
Houston, 1
Oh-
Да. Ты смотрел, Дже
よかっ
Хорошо. Внизу у вас есть «
Questo è Gem
Understand you are ready to copy the
Roger. Forty percent for 21 seconds, I believe is what you read back.
了解、よかった。ジェティソン・レトロに行く時間はある
由于燃料不足，我的飞行方向错误，机动性也受到限制。我能看到月光照射面和非
好的。接下来是指令舱的照片。从指令舱可能不太容易看到服务舱，但如果能看到的话，应该可以通过5号窗口看到，这里的人都这么认为。建议使用70毫米镜头。这些照片的优先级是2。所以这是70毫米EL镜头，上面装了
Roger. I'll give you a short count here on the adap
أنت تعرف شيئاً واحداً بخصوص هذا الأمر. من المكان الذي ربطنا فيه هذا الحبل، ل
…は開いています。
鹰，休斯顿。大家
روجر. سيتم الاستحواذ في غ
Roger. I took one about an hour ago. Just before I stowed the stuff, and I just to
Хорошо.
わかった。それを公表し
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это Кантонский коммерческий технический институт. Вы меня 
D'accord, Apollo 8. Il semble que vous puissiez maintenant arrêter vos ventilateurs cryogéniques. Nous vous laissons tranqu
Sì, prendo an
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir hören Sie laut und deutlich. Auch über S-Band Normalbetrieb sind Sie laut und deutlich zu hören. Wie geht es Ihnen? E
了
हाँ। यह
Ok
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 저기 보이는 물체가 시야에 들어왔습니다. 거리는 약 2마일 정도 되는 것 같습니다. 5번 관측창에서 보이고, 투하물은 
وجيم، بخصوص الإ
아직 그런 증상은 없지만, 지금껏 그 어느 때보다 그런 증상이 나타날 것 같은 느낌이 들어요. 아마 이 100% 산소 때문인 것 같아요. 숨을 들이쉬면 이렇게 목이 마른 적은 처음인 것 같아요. 살면서 가장 심한 감기에 걸렸을 때는 코로 숨을 쉴 수가 없어서 목소리가 엄청 쉬었거든요. 제 목소리가 마치... 쉬어버린 것처럼 들렸는데, 지금은 괜찮아요. 잠잘 때도 그랬거든요. 사실 잠자는 동안 코가 타는 듯이 아팠어요. 목소리도 엄청 쉬었고요. 당신 
저는 초당 32피트, 시속 
Вам кажется, что края окна представляют собой пр
我们现
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다
La lampe frontale de la main gauche, placée au bout des doigts, a finalement rendu l'âme. Elle n'offre vraiment pas la durabilité
Okay. Können Sie mir bitte den Batteriestand mitteilen? Wenn er in Ordnung ist, kann ich Ihnen 3-4 Flüge freigeben... und wir warten au
अपने इवेंट टाइमर को 36 मिनट के लिए सेट करें और लगभग ढाई मिनट में मैं आपको 
Roger, Fred. Wir sehen es. Das Bild ist wirklich gut, und eure Beschreibung ist gut. Wir sehen, dass Jim die Kamera so ausgerichtet hat, wie wir es ger
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। यह एक अच्छा सवाल है। काश मुझे भी पता होता। उड़ान के दौरान ये त्रुटियाँ रुक-रुक कर आती रही हैं। मैंने जायरो को बार-बार केज किया और फिर से केज किया। अब मैं ऑर्बिट एटीट्यूड में वापस आ गया हूँ, लेकिन ऐसा नहीं है। एटीट्यूड इंडिकेटर ऑर्बिट एटी
रॉजर। मेरी स्थिति ठीक है, कैप्सूल की स्थिति भी ठीक है। मैं मैन्युअल नियंत्रण पर ड्रिफ्टिंग कर रहा हूँ। जायरो बंद हैं। ईंधन 45-42 प्रतिशत है, ऑक्सीजन 79-100 प्रतिशत है। स्टीम वेंट का तापमान अब 65 डिग्री है; सूट का तापमान भी काफी कम हो गया है। अब यह 62 डिग्री है, और सारी शक्ति ठीक है। रक्तचाप अब बढ़ने लगा है
알겠습니다, 짐. 이제 두 부분으로 나눠서 설명해 드리겠습니다. 첫 번째는 사령선 모듈 장비 이송이고, 두 번째는 그 반대로 사령선 모듈에서 장비로의 이송입니다. 두 부분 모두 발사 시 적재 위치에서 변경된 사항들을 나타냅니다. 자,
Hallo, Apollo 11. Houston, noch ein paar Worte zu
はい、その通
Roger. Et Fre
So gut wie fertig, ko
Okay. Dies ist der LM-Manöverplatz, PC plus 2 Stunden, beginnend mit +0833,0, minus0050,9, minus0213,9, N/A, plus0020,5, 0861,5, 4:24, 272, 081, und der Rest ist N/A, außer den folgenden Kommentaren. Füllstand, zwei Düsen, 10 Sekunden; Gewicht, 62480; Gewicht, 33452 und das Gasprofil ist dasselbe wie zuvor, 5 S
Хорошо, давайте останемся на месте еще
了解、ジャック。パネル3、ACインバーター2、メインB、インバーター2、ACバス2、オン、ACバス2リセットでリセット、センター、バッテリーチャージャーをA、ACインジケ
알겠습니다. 저속으로 조종할 때는 왼쪽으로 회전이 가능하지만, 오른쪽으로 회전할 때는 제어
Auf den Stichwortkarten steht eine Nummer. Wir haben keinerlei Ambitionen, uns mit den Profis zu messen, glaubt mir. Wir fühlen uns hier oben aber sehr wohl. Wir haben ein richtiges Zu
ठीक है, प्रविष्टि चेकलिस्ट पृष्ठ 2-1, चरण 2 के अनुसार आ
Ja. 
रॉजर। आज दोपहर हम टेक्सास खाड़ी तट के किनारे आपके क्षेत्र में एक दूरबीन
好的，杰克。我同意。我觉得这样也行。我漏掉了一个步骤，你现在可以很方便地做一下，就是这个。你把毛巾塞进底部的旁通孔里，我们建议你剪几小段胶带，
حسنًا يا بيل. سيكون هذا في الصفحة 2، القسم 22 من خطة رحلتك. بالنسبة لقائد وحدة القيادة - لقد ذكرت ذلك له بالفعل - ولكن في أعلى الصفحة، في الواقع، نود منه أن يقوم بمحاذاة النجوم الأربعة، بروكيون، ريجولوس، ألفارد، وندرك أن ألفارد قد لا يكون نجمًا جيدًا، وريجولوس على ارتفاع 3 درجات تقريبًا فوق الأفق، وسبيكا بزاوية دوران 48 درجة؛ لذلك أعتقد أن ما نقوله هو أنه إذا واجه جيم صعوبة في إجراء مجموعة واحدة على كل من هذه النجو
Un altro commento sull'ottica. Siamo dentro adesso. Stiamo sorpassando il... abbiamo un rollio di circa 182°; siamo a circa 226° di becchegg
これからテープを連続再生します。ここにもう1本
आपके क्वाड A, C और D लगभग एक जैसे दिखते हैं। क्वाड B थोड़ा ठंडा चल रहा है, लेकिन बहुत मामूली अंतर है। तापमान के सभी आंकड़े सामान्य हैं, इसलिए थर्मल दृष्टिकोण से सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहा है। और ईंधन की खपत की बात करें तो,
Roger. Wir sind in Echtzeit und ACQ-AID. Es sieht so aus, als ob ich gerade fast senkrecht zur Sonne stehe. Ich versuche mich zu dre
D'accord. C'est parti. L'objectif est une correction de trajectoire pour un retour libre: -0021,3, +0004,1, -0031,2; HA et HP sont NA; 
Роджер. Я вас прекрасно понял. У меня есть для вас обновление по CLA и PLA, когда вы будете готовы к 
Oui,
Beh, questa è una risposta affermativa a intermittenza, Bruce. Abbiamo questi due filtri a idrogeno, che funzionano bene finché non li si collega a un sacchetto per alimenti. Ma il punto di ingresso nel sacchetto per alimenti presenta una contropressione sufficiente a far sì che i filtri inizino a perdere efficienza. Un paio di volte sono stato tentato di sottopormi a quella procedura di asciugatura, ma abbiamo scoperto che semplicemente lasciando i filtri in funzione per u
Roger, Jim. Comprenez bien que la lumière du soleil pénètre dans le télescope de balayage, ce qui rend toute observation impossible; vous devez donc vous fier
Ich bin... gerad
了解。Y 001、NA、プラス00202 46420 547 46211 12 1383 327 023 上172 左22、プラス1293、マイナ
Tr
알겠습니다. PLA와 CLA 업데이트입니다. 40-3 구역은 분할 연소입니다. 전방 56, 후방 120. 1+34. 2+30. 05 38 10. 2+56. 8+52. 41-DELTA 83 구역. 1+41. 06 30 09. 8+58. 15+
下降过程中燃油温度读数为 64，氧化剂（
ठ
Come mi leggi
Die Hälfte ist von Wolken bedeckt, die andere Hälfte ist trocken. Könntest
Родже
Es lässt sich sehr gut handhaben
로저. Rev 57, 시퀀스 16, 08:11, 요 12°, 피치 30°, 16mm 카메라. Rev 58, 시
Houston, 
Aucu
不，他们两个都应
हमारे पास लगभग एक मिनट का मार्गदर्शन है
あなたのTRはカウントアップしています。私たちのTRはカウントダウンしているので、心配しないでください。モジュール4Aがロードされていることを確認してくださ
Ok. Pos
Das i
انتظر لحظة يا جيم. حسناً يا جيم، على 
좋아요. 잠깐만요. 저기 아래쪽에 뭔가에 걸려있네
Gemini 4，RKV CAP 
Apollo 8, Houston. Vous n'êtes pas obligé de répondre à cette transmission, mais les médecins ont remarqué que certains de vos capt
Exactem
А 
휴스턴, 저희가 
嗯
Ok, probabilmente andrai oltre la collina, Gus. Stai bene qui a
حسنًا يا جاك. ارجع إلى إجراء شحن البطارية الذي شرحته لك. ولإيقاف الشحن، ما عليك سوى كتابة "فتح" أو "إيقاف" بجوار مفتاح الدائرة الذي أعطيتك إياه. في اللوحة 250، قاطع الدائرة الذي فتحته بالفعل؛ في اللوحة 275، طاقة العاكس 2 الرئيسية B، مفتوحة؛ اللوحة 5، مرحل البطارية BAT A، مفتوحة؛ وحدة الاستشعار AC BUS 2، مفتوحة، إشارة المستشعر AC2، مفتوحة؛ شاحن البطارية، الرئيسي B، مفتوح؛ طاقة التيار المتردد لشاحن البطارية، مفتوحة؛ شحن البطارية A لشاحن البطارية، مفتوح؛ وحدة التحكم في العاكس 2، مفتوحة؛ وحدة التحكم في العاكس 3، مفتوحة؛ لقد قمت بالفعل بربط ناقل التيار الرئيسي. ثم قم بضبط مفتاح شحن البطارية على AC 1. في اللوحة 3، قمتَ مسبقًا بإيقاف تشغيل محول التيار الم
Ok. Userò il VOX-push-to-talk il 
여기에는 물이나
와, 
This is Friendship 
他现在正在尝试再给你一次拍摄月球的机会，而我现在正在设置机动平台
收到。地
Dovremo 
حسنًا. في الصف 14، تحت نظام التدفئة A/B-1: افتح الدائرة الرباعية من 1 إلى 4؛ تحت مض
This is a reading on Phecda in--in the Big Dipper prior to entry in the, the, into the haze layer. It occludes--it is extinct at roughly 2.5. The reticle extincts at 5.5. TM mark for the ti
حسنًا يا فريد. قبل ذلك، أي قبل ساعة واحدة، قم بتوجيه الطائرة إلى الزوايا التالية: الدوران 130 درجة، والميل 125 درجة، والانعراج 12.4 درجة. ستكون زوايا المحور المقابلة هي: الدوران 291 درجة، 
Vous pouvez, nous avons bien dormi. Tout le monde a dormi au moins 7 heures hier soir, et nous venons de prendre le petit-déjeuner, de boire beaucou
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 원격 측정 입력 
見上げると、私は影の中に立ち、窓の外のバズを見上げている。そして
حس
Che ti
理解；星形 31，横滚 184 7，俯仰 2
Okay, Vance, sono pronto a copiare le modifiche apportate al libro in s
Ok, Jack. Non credo che tu debba rileggere tutti gli interruttori perché li abbiamo copiati man mano che procedevi. Se
Sorry, Jim, but we are only reading you ab
Pronti a sostenermi sul cronometr
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호. 체크리스트 F9 7페이지; 8단계는 완료했
النقطة الثانية، بالطبع، هي أنه عند إيقاف نظام التحكم الحراري السلبي، تكون الكاميرا بزاوية 90 درجة تقريبًا مع خط الأرض، لذا عند إجراء الانعطاف
Bene. Nell'angolo in basso a destra della pagina 2-22, l'assetto del controllo 
음, 괜찮네요. 명령 모듈에 있는 것만큼 기체 상태는 아니네
Odyssey, Houston, steht
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к 2000 году, но лидеры демократов ответили, что приоритет должен быть отдан потребностям на Земле. Агню, высокопоставленный правительственный чиновник, присутствовавший на запуске «Аполлона-11» в среду, по-видимому, говорил от своего имени, а не обязательно от имени администрации Никсона, когда сказал: «На мой взгляд, мы должны отправить человека на Марс к концу этого столетия». Ларедо, Техас, AP: Иммиграционные власти Нуэво-Ларедо объявили в среду, что хиппи будут отказывать во въезде в Мексику по туристическим картам, если они не примут ванну и не подстригутся. Уберто Касарас, начальник мексиканской иммиграционной службы в Нуэво-Ларедо, заявил, что власти Мехико, Акапулько и других популярных туристических мест получили жалобы на хиппи. По сообщению United Press International: Первоначальная реакция на решение президента Никсона предоставить федеральным служащим выходной в понедельник, чтобы они могли отметить национальный день участия в лунной миссии «Аполлон-11», была в основном удивлением. Родни Биднер, Associated Press, Лондон, AP: Европа поражена миссией «Аполлон-11». Газеты по всему континенту заполняют свои страницы фотографиями ракеты «Сатурн V», стартующей для установления первой связи Земли с ее естественным спутником. И авторы заголовков напрягали воображение, чтобы подобрать слова, чтобы восхвалять этот подвиг. «Величайшее приключение в истории человечества началось», — заявила французская газета Le Figaro, посвятив четыре страницы репортажам с мыса Кеннеди и схемам миссии. Таблоид Paris Jour провозгласил: «Весь мир говорит им „браво“». Коммунистическая ежедневная газета L'Humanite начала с фотографии запуска и посвятила всю последнюю страницу восторженному репортажу о Луне, описывающему обратный отсчет и запуск, жен и семьи астронавтов, а также справочную информацию о лунной деятельности. Хемпстед, Нью-Йорк: Джо Намат официально прибыл в тренировочный лагерь New York Jets в Университете Хофстра в среду после закрытой встречи со своими товарищами по команде по поводу разногласий с комиссаром профессионального футбола Питером Розеллом. Лондон, UPI: Палата лордов получила в среду заверения, что американская миниатюрная подводная лодка не «повредит и не нападет» на Лох-Несское чудовище. Лорд Намат заявил, что хочет быть уверен, что любой, кто управляет подводной лодкой в ​​озере, «не подвергнет никаким существам, которые могут его населять, повреждению
Здесь мы пролетаем мимо крутых хребтов. Края старых кратеров, сфотографирова
You bet. On the sports page, not too much activity. UCLA is tops in both basketball polls. If you got any particular one you want to ask about, let me know, and I'll tell you if they are in the top ten on either poll. As far as the North - the college All Star game that is going to be play
阿波罗11号，当我们失去S波段信号时，我们希望收到你们的OMNI Charlie信号。另外，更新一下我上次说的，77:04是阿里斯塔克斯星应该出现在你们地平线上的时
Roger. 10+5
로저.
तैयार रहो। 
罗杰。分离为 11 加 14 加 29；ΔV，每秒 9.0 英尺；持续时间，0 加 15；偏航 0，俯仰 0；核心 25，90090；26 和 
正
好的。燃烧规则。如果推力监测器读数低于或等
L'ho a
ロジャー、私は...運動して、血圧計のカフを装着しまし
बस एक पल। लगभग
حسنًا. بعد الرقم 1، في السطر الأول، اشطب "وVHF-A". في السطر الثاني، اشطب "تشغيل SIMPLEX". في السطر الثالث، اشطب "Prime". هذا يشير إلى مضخم الطاقة الأساسي، إيقاف. يجب استبدال "PRIME" بـ OFF. وهذا هو الشرط الثاني في ذلك السطر. أيضًا في السطر الثالث، يجب شطب الكلمة الأخيرة "OFF" واستبدالها بـ "PCM". السطر الرابع صحيح. السطر الخامس، وهو "VHF VOICE، تشغيل، إيقاف، إيقاف"، اشطبه. "Lighting، FLOODS"، وهو السطر التالي، يجب أن يكون "إيقاف"، ولكن أضف ما يلي: "أو OVERHEAD/FORWARD يفضل إيقاف". حسنًا. تبقى الخطوة 2 كما هي؛ لا تغيير في الوقت الحالي. انتظر. تخطى الخطوة 2. لا تفعل ذلك. انتقل مباشرة إلى الخطوة 3، وهي "تكوين قواطع الدائرة وفقًا للجدول". هذا يقودنا إلى الصفحة السادسة. لماذا لا تعيد قراء
远地点155.7度
Abbiamo - La configurazione che abbiamo or
ठीक है। आखिरी "400 प्लस ज़ीरो" के बाद, "ACA के साथ 
창문은 깨끗해졌나요?
罗杰。由于能见度和通讯状况都很好，我们现在不用看扫描望远镜，直接用口头描述一下情况。你调整到大角星的角度非常精准。我已经把大角星对准了扫描望远镜的中心。在这个太阳角度下，有一束光直接穿过扫描望远镜的中心，形成一条光带。这导致我们周围很多星星都看不见，虽然我一直盯着望远镜看了好一会儿，但还是很难看到任何星图或其他图案。除非光学系统把我引到那里，否则我根本无法辨认出大角星。现在，由于我的望远镜轴和耳轴都接近零位，轴的移动幅度相当大。每次轴移动，都会有更多的粒子离开光学系统，它们的亮度与周围的星星一样。它们混杂在星空中，根本无法分辨星图或星座。在这种特定角度下，光束无法辨认
हाँ, हमने ब
अरे यार; ये पिच त
Ok, Apollo 8. La prossima parte del nostro test è come quella di ieri; cambieremo le modalità di uplink in comando di uplink e ranging senza upvoi
嗯，最终确实如此——它显示了……—
Well, let's see, we may be offsetting slightly, the
Roger. Am Anfang sah alles gut aus. Jetzt driftet die Antenne mit einem seltsamen Muster ab, das wir so noch nie auf einem Flug gesehen haben. Wir versuchen gerade heraus
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호입니다. 배터리 B의 전압이 충전 후 값보다 다소 떨
Хорошо, Близнецы 4. Мы изме
好的。请您在开始
Хорошо. Что касается коррекции на среднем участке траектории, мы хотели бы отложить её примерно
W
好的。在高尔夫球界，近年来很少参赛的汤米·雅各布斯昨天在费城高尔夫精英赛上取得了领先。他第二轮的
هيو
Roger kommt mit einem Bericht über den Piloten. Se
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。復唱は正確です。参考までに、ゴールドストーンは約1分間のFMダウンリンクキャリアを受信したと報告しています。Sバ
Roger, 11. Si vous sortez votre liste de contrôle alternative et de contingence pour le
Mein einziges Exemplar ist etwa 1,80
Chamber pressure was hanging in there around 100. The latter par
Questa è l'affermazione sbagliata: abbiamo la navicella spaziale giusta. Ti do un i
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP COM. Falls Sie dies lesen, führt der Kommandant bitte die orale Temperatursonde in seinen Mund ein. Nicht bestä
روجر. إليك ملخصًا
了解しました。ワシントンでは、上院財政委員会が所得税付加税の延長を承認しましたが、上院での採決は現時点では難しそうです。オースティンでは、ヒューストン選出のレイ・レモン州議会議員がアメリカ海洋学会の理事に指名されました。レモン氏は、テキサス州に海洋学研究所を設立する可能性について調査することを提案しています。これはメキシコ湾西部で初めての海洋学研究所となります。ミネソタ州ミネアポリスの気象局は、今日の天気を最高気温88度、最低気温72度と発表した後、「降雪：なし」と発表しました。フロリダ州セントピーターズバーグからは、ノルウェーの探検家トール・ヘイエルダールからの無線報告が届きました。ヘイエルダールのパピルス船「ラー号」の乗組員は、荒波による被害にもかかわらず、バルバドスのブリッジタウンに入港する予定であるとのことです。ただし、乗組員は護衛船で就寝する予定です。探検隊の航海士、ノーマン・ベイカー氏は、乗組員が今日「ラー」号に乗り込み、先週の嵐でマストの土台が割れた損傷の修復作業を行っていると述べた。破損したマストの一部は海に投げ出され、船はバルバドスの東725マイルの海上にいた。「ラー号で眠ることは可能だが、快適ではない」とベイカー氏は無線で述べた。「しかし、私たちの航海の目的は、体力や人間の持久
好的。关于中途修正，我们想把它推迟到大约……，这次的加力燃烧速度大约是每秒25英尺。
收
好
Attendr
Yes, I think we lost lock. We'll stand by a minu
Roger. Wir möchten die Kryotanks etwas ausbalancieren. Könnten Sie daher bitte den Heizungsschal
Esatto, Jack. Sei pronto 
收到，休斯顿。我们要做的就是把弗雷德的西装收
저는 그 점에 있어서 그의
잭, BAT A의
جيميني 6، مركز قيادة تكساس. نود تذكير ق
Ok
Nein, das ist schon in Ordnung. Interessant ist allerdings, dass beim letzten Mal, als Sie das Wasser abgelassen haben, gleichzeitig eine Veränderung in der Flugbahn festgestellt wurde. Durch die Korrelationsanalyse fanden sie jemanden, der die Eigenschaften ei
Okay. We are looking at a vacuum perigee right now of 23.6; flight path angle of minus 6.25; and if we decide we want to trim that up, we're looking at a midcourse of about 2 feet per second. Your consumables, of course, are getting better all the time; we've got 163 hours of water, 230 hours of oxyg
Les données actuelles indiquent que
Roger. Vous avez donc 215 livres d'eau utilisables, soit 2 1/5 livres. Cela correspond à une moyenne de 3,5 livres disponibles par
Yes, that's affirm - affirm, Joe. Do you have any detail up in there at all? On the monitor it looks like I can - I can make out the drogue - the drogue a little bit, but not much el
了解しました。この辺りでは月がとて
アポロ13号、ヒューストン。今、私の声が
아폴로 패드가 뒤따릅니다. TIG 125 19 3470; TIG 
OK, patientez. L
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM
11, qui Houston. Abbiam
Okay, Jack. Ed è corretto. L'ho capito male.
네, 바로 저기 입력 확인 화면 맨 아래쪽에 "대기 모드(STANDBY)"라고 적혀 있죠. 그 바로 위에 "범위를 초기화하지 마십시오"라는 메모를 남겨두시는 걸 잊지 마세요. 입력 확인 화면을 거쳐 모든 과정을 실행한 다음 전원을 차단할 텐데, 전원을 다시 켜면 입력 매개변수가 초기화되어 버리기 때문에 미리 초기화하지 않도록 하기 위함입
ビルさん、BIOMEDデータはまだ少しおかしいようですね。BIOMEDハーネスの青い信号コンディショナーを確認してみてはどうでしょうか。コネクタが1つあります。センターパッ
62970, minus 162, plus 129, plus 00966, plus 00552, minus 02079. Die nächsten drei sind alle Nullen, NA, plus 00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013, nach oben 04,7, nach rechts 3,9, plus 1418, minus 16505, plus 12904, plus 36160. Sirius, Rigel, 136 310 340, keine, erfordert Neuausrichtung auf bevor
...일어서서 해치 개구부를 통해 밖
Это Хьюстон. Я приним
...
네, 짐. 이제 중간 단계에서 사용할 절차에 대해 설명드리겠습니다. 수동 연소 방식인데요, 자세 제어와 엔진 시동/정지가 모두 수동으로 이루어집니다. 현재 방향은 잘 잡혀 있는데, 진입 각도가 약간 완만합니다. 그래서 진입 각도를 좀 더 가파르게 조정해야 합니다. 지구의 뒷면을 통과하는 방식으로 진입할 예정이니, 더 가파르게 진입하려면
र
रॉजर। ध्यान दें कि आप अपनी निर्धारित गतिविधि की शुरुआत कर रहे हैं। प्रारंभिक ट्रैकिंग से ऐसा लगता है कि शुरुआती मध्यमार्ग में गति पहले अनुमान के अनुसार 4 फुट प्रति सेकंड से कम हो सकती है। हमने आपके बर्न डेटा को देखा है, और यह बिल्कुल वैसा ही सुचारू है जैसा आपने कहा था; सब कुछ सामान्य दिख रहा था। सिस्टम अब ठीक लग रहे हैं; ऐसा लगता है कि स्थिति के अनुसार, यदि आप चाहें तो हम आपके लिए ओम्नी को स्विच कर सकते हैं। हम जाते समय 
Das würd
アポロ1
Questa è l'Amicizi
Okay. Plus 35 PAD: Der DELTA-VT-Wert sollte 7992 statt 8016 sein. Plus 44
Roger, 11 anni. Houston.
わかりました。更新します。更新する順序は、状態ベクトル、状態ベクトル、そし
Ok. Jack, 1-A sta leggendo, scala inferiore, 0; 1-B sta leggendo 3,45. Ok. Vuoi solo le celle a combustibile
フレンドシップセブン
13, Хьюстон. Подтверждаю. Вы можете использовать пиротехническое устройст
ठीक ह
我一直在跟
حسنًا. انتظ
알겠습니다. 다시 말씀드리겠습니다. 알파 225, 
I'm okay. Standby, I'm going back to. It's gotta hold me up (delay me.) The capsule - 
Je pense que ç
Okay. We plan to stay in high bit rate. We were going to ask you if it made my
Juste i
रॉजर। धन्यवाद। 
C'est confirmé. Les deux disjoncteurs du tableau 250 vont s'ouvrir; les deux disjoncteurs du tableau 275 vont s'ouvrir également. Bien, les di
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Слышу вас громко и четко, обычный S-диапазо
Columbia, Houston. Haben Sie beim letzten Durchgang den Befehl "RES
还有，水瓶座，告诉你一下，
D'accord, Fred. Tout d'abord, les préparatifs, en commençant par la liste de vérification des imprévus (page 24), sont recomman
पहल
Роджер, Водолей. Мы читаем, что у вас примерно то же самое, приме
Esatto. Ora vogliamo
휴스턴 CAP COM, 제미니 VI입니다. VII이 당신에게 
スラス
Affermativo. Il tuo atteggiamento a 400 K dovrebbe essere... sulla palla... dovrebbe essere a 27° sopra l'orizzonte. E questo sareb
... вве
177 143 000 NA、プラス 00197、47020 551 46818 12 128.3 257 023、上 263、左 17、プラス 1195、マイナス 16500、プラス 126 23 35608、北セット、ロール 68、ピッチ 97、ヨー 356、アレージなし、高速、7900 インド洋、および MS の高速手順は必要ありません。1 
D'
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यू
R
Sì, solo
了解。ウォーリー、君の態度はとても良いようだ。それに時計も5秒進んでいる。 - 今の調子なら、時間通りに
あなた
双子座 4，夏
Mike
VI, Hawai
好的。我想我不用
नहीं, कोई बात नहीं। लेकिन एक दिलचस्प बात यह है कि पिछली बार जब आपने पानी डाला था, तो उन्होंने उसी समय ट्रैजेक्टरी ट्रैकिंग में बदलाव देख
Близнецы 4, Хьюстон. Мы бы хотели оставить его включенным. Подробности вд
Хорошо, Джек. С 
ठीक है, और आप वाकई बहुत अच्छे हैं। यह - यह सब शोर न होना वाकई सुखद है। जिम, मैं आपको बताता हूँ कि मैं क्या करना चाहता हूँ। जैसा कि मैंने कहा, हम अभी आपको विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ नहीं देंगे। हम आपको जल्द ही प्रक्रियाएँ उपलब्ध कराने की कोशिश करेंगे, जो निम्नलिखित रूप में होंगी। सबसे पहले, हमारे पास एक समयरेखा होगी, एक तरह से उड़ान योजना जैसी, जिसमें सभी प्रमुख घटनाओं का समय और कोई भी कॉन्फ़िगरेशन, स्विच सेटिंग्स, इत्यादि होंगी जो हमारे कॉन्फ़िगरेशन के लिए विशिष्ट हैं और इसलिए आपको चेकलिस्ट में नहीं मिलेंगी। उदाहरण के लिए, यह कमांड मॉड्यूल को चालू करने के तरीके पर लागू होगा; और दूसरा, ज़ाहिर है, हमारे पास चेकलिस्ट में सभी रेडलाइन होंगी ताकि आप जहाँ भी संभव हो, कार्यों को
रॉजर। चंद्रमा की हमारी यह यात्रा आपको शायद सरल या आसान लगी हो। मैं आपको आश्वस्त करना चाहता हूँ कि ऐसा बिल्कुल नहीं था। जिस सैटर्न वी रॉकेट ने हमें कक्षा में पहुँचाया, वह एक अविश्वसनीय रूप से जटिल मशीन है, जिसका हर एक पुर्जा त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्
لن يروا شيئاً الآن. ليس لدي
D'accord. Bon, elle va probablement te sauter dessus en rétroéclairage; mais je suis sûr que 
حسنًا. الآن، بدأنا العمل على الحقيبة، والخطوة التالية هي تجهيز خرطوم البدلة الأحمر، سواءً كان خرطوم القائد أو خرطوم المركبة، لأننا سنحتاج إلى تجهيز كليهما في النهاية، ووضعهما في الجزء العلوي من الحقيبة. وللقيام بذلك، عليك أولًا التأكد من فصل الخرطوم الأحمر عن الخرطوم الأزرق. لا أعرف إن كان هذا قد تم بالفعل، ولكن إن لم يكن كذلك، فما عليك فعله هو قص الغلاف الخارجي المصنوع من قماش بيتا على طول الخرطومين، ثم قص الأربطة المطاطية التي تربط الخر
... अभी भी पकड़े हुए हूँ..
Ça s'éloigne, Frank. Ça s'éloigne de notre écran de télé, il était 3 heures. Je 
不，我没有“哎哟”的意思。我很享
D'accord. Parfait. Vous pourrez nous faire part de vos rapports de radiation dès que vous aurez un moment. Nous préparons un point sur les consommables et quelques autres détails dès que vous serez prêt(e) à en parler. Le seul point i
わかった。君の判断に任せる。ジャックが起きたらすぐに、この水酸化
Ok, di nuovo, gu
안녕하세요, 인도 함선 사령부 오로라 7호입니다. 잘 들립니다. 저는
केन, इस पैंतरेबाज़ी, 7 के बारे में, क्या आप - क्या हम कुछ समय पहले 
ठीक है। हम फिलहाल पैंतरेबाजी क
Okay, Houston. There's a star angle difference with stars 36 a
我们第一次在白天看到了澳大利亚。先是经过巴士拉，然后横穿印度群岛。穿过印度到达马来西亚，再横穿澳大利亚……当然，到目前为止，我们只经过了大约一半的路
Das Periskop 
かな
Gemin
Полагаю, да. Он говорит, что оно в грязи; то есть мен
Okay. We'll take a guess
好的。
Houston, Apollo 11 is ready to go ahead with the - extend the docking probe, and read
13, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे पास एक शानदार टीव
호스를 연결하는 방향을 
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हमें लगता है कि हमने आपके बेहद व्यस्त कार्यक्रम में कुछ समय बचाने का तरीका ढूंढ लिया है। और वो तरीका है डॉक्ड कोर्स एलाइन का उपयोग करना, क्योंकि अब हम तैयार हैं। इससे आपके एक-दो पैंतरे बच ज
Okay, Jack. This is Houston. We'
ええ、そうでしたよ、フ
夕日を眺めるときに何を探せばいいか
Привет, Берму
Хорошо, Джим. Мы все еще обдумываем этот вопрос, но некоторые соображения подсказывают нам, что мы можем выполнить эту коррекцию, вероятно, даже через 118 часов, 
この時点では
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。我已清晰地读出你们
इसे बताने का यह एक अच्छा और तर्कसंगत तरीका है। मुझे ऐसा लगता है कि सुरंग में बैठकर सभी खिड़कियों को निहारने से फर्क पड़ता है; फर्क इस बात से
아폴로 11
Это не критично по времени, Фред, но если вы сейчас разбудили людей, то можете сделать это. Кстати, вы, наверное, знаете, но следующие несколько часов будут довольно спокойными с нашей точки зрения. Мы работаем над процедурами входа и будем готовы зачитать их вам примерно через 8 часов; а до этого момента ничего особенного происходить не будет, так что вы сможете 
Yes, f:8 at 1/250th. And after you get it
Хорошо, я как раз собирался рассказать вам о передаче дел, которую мы только что провели, но немного опоздал. Поскольку у нас много электроэнергии, и мы хотели бы иметь возможность использовать S-диапазон после отключения электричества, мы бы хотели, чтобы вы удалили пункт 2-5 в вашем контрольном списке, после «Начало отк
Et enfin, dernière nouvelle: les Cardinals ont finalement battu les Astros hier, 4-3. Il leur a
هذا صحيح. ما نريده، إذا كان لدينا تشغيل يدوي، فسيتعين علينا إيقاف التشغيل يدويًا، وللحصول على إيقاف تشغيل موجه أفضل عند سرعة 30 قدمًا في الثانية، نريدك أن تضغط على دواسة الوقود عند 40 قدمًا في الثانية، وي
血圧測定中です。終わり
메
ヒューストン、どう読む？ア
알겠습니다. 3번 패널에서: 트랜스폰더를 기본(PRIMARY)으로, 파워 앰프를 기본(PRIMARY)으로, 파워 앰프를 고(HIGH)로, 음성
罗杰。时间有点晚了，所
Роджер. И, Хьюстон, это 8.
Roger. You ar
روجر. ثم
Roger. Es sieht so aus, als wären wir 
好的。乔，你
Man! I don't believe this 
Houston, Eagle va passer à l'émetteur/récepteur secondaire et
Das gesamte Steuerung
D'accord, Jim. Il est temps, quand tu auras un moment, de prendre une nouvelle mesure de la tensi
Je ne crois pas que c'était l'intention, Bill. L'idée était d'avoir l'échangeur de chaleur de la combinaison sur les deux circuits; et si la température descendait trop bas, on pourrait utiliser le panneau de commande pour couper le circuit principal via l'échangeur. De toute façon, il y aurait toujours une alimentation vers l'échangeur de la combinaison. Je comprends qu'on va couper l'échangeur secondaire avant la rentrée atmosphérique, puis le remettre en marche juste avant, mais le but était d'avoir les circuits primaire et secondaire al
휴스턴, 전환 예상 시간을 알려주시겠
Okay
로저. 지금까지 발생한 문제는 알 수
جيميني 4، جيميني 4، هيوستن. لديّ بعض المعلومات عن حالة الطقس لتجربتك S-6. هل يمكنك الا
范斯，我们确实注意到了一件事。你知道现在流行留长发吗？在太空里，这种发
حسنًا. يقولون إن هذه الخطوة التي شرحتها لك للتو معقدة نوعًا ما. قد ترغب في إعداد الكاميرا
Okay, ich glaube, ich habe Denebola im Blick; lass mich mal nachsehen – und tatsächlich, da ist es. Und im Teleskop ist es gut zu erkennen; lass mich mal im Sextant
Роджер,
さて、マイナス 45 で、エントリ パッドと最終状態
Roger, Gemini 4. 
That is some of the w
Okay. Hier komm
И Колумбия, Хьюстон. Мы ожидаем, что вы потеряете высо
로저, 닐. 수동 지진 실험에서 평소보다 약간 높은 온도 상승이 관찰되고 있는데, 설치 위치를 확인해 주시겠습니까? 저희가 알기로는 
Bene. Questa è la configurazione che vogliamo per te, ed ecco cosa stiamo pensando. Quando siamo passati a serbatoio 1 AUTO, serbatoio 2 OFF, abbiamo
Preparatevi a 
알겠습니다. 감사합니다. 2-104페이지의 자세 정보는 
Toujours en assiette relativement horizontale. La commande de vitesse fonctionne bien. Content qu'elle tienne le coup. Elle se comporte très bien. Montée à 5,5 g. La commande d
好的。弗雷德，我稍后会回复你的问题。好了，现
わかりました。司令船に残すにあたっての唯一の懸念は、突入前に司令船の消耗品をどれくらい使い切らなければならないかということです。司令船にはファンと水酸化リチウムがあり…司令船システムを使用します。そ
Okay, Vance, let us know when you're thro
11, Houston. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, Bravo und Charlie zu deaktivieren; wählen Sie stattdessen die Quads Alfa und 
ええ。ええ、もちろん、それが私たちがやろうとしていることです。そこで何が起こっているのかをきちんと把握しようとして
Okay, I understand. I am going to update your comma
Buzz, hier ist Houston. Ihre Übertragung ist am Ende unterbrochen. Könnten Sie bitte etwas deutlicher ins M
Apollo 8, Houston.
Я знаю это, я знаю это — 295. Температура A — 87. Давление A — 3000. Температура B — 82. Давление
Ich hatte versucht, uns etwas früher wieder auf die Startrampe zu br
Wir werde
休斯顿静海基地。如果您尚未
Будьте готовы предоставить отчет о наличии еды и воды для вас обоих через CSQ, если у вас 
Звезда 37 отлично подойдет для калибровки оптики. И мы пока ничего не заметили 
Contrôle du flux du costume droit désa
La visibilità attraverso il telescopio è stata molto scarsa. Direi che è persino peggiore di quella attuale del simulatore. Richiede lunghi periodi di adattamento al buio, il ch
로저. 회로 차단기 경고음 8개 중 4개가 빨간색으로 표시되고 있습니다. 현재 회로 차단기는 여전히 꺼진 상태입니다. 
حسنًا. سيكون هذا منتصف المحيط الهادئ، 357 152 359 268، زائد 0813، ناقص 16503 065 36221 645 12122 36
好的。可能有些人还不知道，这里是我们记录每次操作大部分数据的地方。我们还有一张类似的卡片，上面是时间轴手册，放在数据显示
Roger, Fred-o. Now we aren't - also at minus 30 seconds, we aren't looking at an burn so you can scratch "ABORT pushbutton, push," and at DELTA-V equal to zero, scratch "A
J'ai 56 pour l'oxygène et
Roger. Understand; man
Полет проходит хорошо, все в порядке. Что вы можете мне ска
ह्य
네, 잘 들
Bene, aspettate. Immagino che non siamo ancora
Joe, war das die G&C-Checkli
わかった、ヴァンス。渡せるよ。読み始めてすぐに読んだんだ。BAT Aの電圧は39.4で、電
Roger. Vuoi darci la pressione sanguig
और यह हमारे 3 बजे के समय गायब हो गया। देखिए, अब यह वापस आ रहा 
Roger, temp
إيجل، هيوستن. نريد العودة الآن والتقدم للأم
रॉजर। 02 + 08 + 52। 190 मील की दूरी पर, 80° के कोण पर, ठीक सामने होंगे। यह अंधेरा होने से ठीक पहले का समय होगा। उस समय काफी उजाला रहेगा। आगे बढ
E, Tranquil
Oh, es schneit. Nein,
好的。我们会把它烧进去，然后用
Nun, wen
罗杰。LMP 暂时要休息一会
That'
ヒューストン、コ
Ciao, Columbia. Houston. Abbiamo caricato il carico. Puoi far
Sì, sembra buono. Non vedo come possa non andare a buon fine
OK. Magnitude 1600, annulation 2450. Un seul à proximité. Je
Ça a l'a
이 기체는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 몇 번이나 추진기가 부분적으로 고장났거나 기수를 아래로 내리는 방향으로만 작동하는 듯한 느낌
알겠습니다. 괜찮습니다. 알겠습니다
您的负载有效
ライト値は、白黒フィルムで ASA 64 の場合は 13 です。ライト値を 13 に設定しています。フィルターを使用して、7 番目の写真を撮影します。南アメリカ大陸は天候がさまざまなため、写真を撮るのが難しいです。今回はパノラマ写真を撮ります。ほぼ 8 時間後に開始します。実際、そうなるでしょう。MA
哦，太好了。我想我们最好过去
로저. 아제나 인수 관련 표시등이 켜졌습니다. 혹시 그 표시등
يبدو أن غالق كاميرا هاسلبلاد عالق في بعض هذه الصور. هذه هي المجموعة الثانية من صور S-6 فوق المحيط الأطلسي. من الواضح أن آلية تحر
Roger. Die Spanne um 20 Uhr – bei unserem GET von 21:50:00 plus 22,24. Die Spann
Гуаймас передает власть Тех
Фред, у нас уже есть для тебя эта история, практически полностью готовая. Мы сейчас её изучаем. И я хотел бы отложить этот вопрос на потом. В общем, мы просто выключим двигатель и будем использовать то, что есть, а у нас есть средняя траектория со скоростью примерно 
Хорошо, Хьюстон. У нас только что сработала главная сигнализация и загорелся индикатор. Я так понимаю, что причиной стало парциальное давление CO2 — да, именно это
И, Хьюстон, вам, возможно, будет интересно узнать, что из моего левого окна прямо сейчас открывается вид на весь континент Северной Америки, Аляску, а т
どこにあるのか
Apollo 11, i
这些窗户的视野怎么样？从这边看不
D'accord. Ça me va. Comment s'est passé 
Yeah, I can see just about as far as the Salton Sea north. I can see the Mt. Whitney area, but not much of it for the snow capped peaks that are just about on the horizon no
D'accord, Apollo 8. Il semble que vous puissiez maintenant arrêter vos ventilateurs cryogéniques. Nous vous laissons tranquille un moment pour vous permettre de rattraper votre retard. Concernant les opérations à bord, comme le test
In wenigen Mi
Ja. Wir sind ziemlich weit nach unten gerichtet. Wir werden nach obe
はい、28,
जिम, आज शाम को फ्रेड-ओ ने कमांड मॉड्यूल की खिड़की नंबर 1 से कुछ रिसाव होने की सूचना दी। उन्होंने यह भी बताया कि लगभग 4 इंच चौकोर, चांदी का एक ढीला धातु का टुकड़ा तैर रहा था। हम यह पता लगाने की कोशिश कर रहे थे कि क्या यह कोई नया रिसाव है या हमारी मूल समस्या के बचे हुए रिसाव का हिस्सा है। क्या आपके पास इस बारे में कुछ और जानकारी या टिप्पणी है? वह कुछ तस्वीरें ले रहे थे और हमने उन्हें तस्वीरें लेने की अनुमति दी थी। हमने चंद्र सतह कैमरा नंबर 1 का उपयोग करके अवसर के अनुसार तस्वीरें लीं और 1/250 सेकंड की सेटिंग का इस्त
嘿，我们刚才一直在热烈讨论你观测彗星的事，所以你的这种反应并不出乎意料
... 42 Prozent. Ungefähr 100–120 Pfund sind sichtbar. Das lässt keinen Spielraum. Wenn wir zu kurz zünden, bedeutet das, dass wir zu weit schießen.
わかりました。ここは時々断続的にロックが解
D'accord, Jack. Il semble que nous ayons réglé tous les détails. Étonnamment, parmi toutes ces questions, il semble que nous n'en ayons soulevé qu'une seule, et nous all
Bon, le virage est terminé. Je pique du nez. La lune est au centre du hublot et le propulseur est légèrement décalé s
يا إلهي، يا جاك. أنت - أنت لا تستخدم جهازًا جيدًا..
At this point we ha
Bereich 1 B ist
٤١ دقيقة. سننتقل إلى الماسح الضوئي الأساسي في مسح الأفق، ولا يوجد فرق ملحوظ في تشغيل الماسح الضوئي الأساسي أو 
폐수 처리장인데, 84시간 동안 
閉じていること、ロックピンが取り付
ठीक है। हमें आदेश प्राप्त करने की अनुम
휴스턴입니다. 아폴로 8호입니다. 제가 잘못 알고 있었네요. 윌리엄이 마레진 한 병을 가지고 있었어
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 이제 아제나
콜
Okay. 
Роджер
Roger, we are down at a minimum power-down configuration mos
알겠습니다. 그럼, 메인 A 회선의 부하를
11番、こちらヒューストンです。本来ならあと1時
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。还有30秒。两艘飞船状态良好，正飞越
Да, ваш голосовой чат постоянно был активирован, и мы не могли войти или сообщить вам, что ваше время истекло и вам нужно снова 
Ensuite, page 15, colonne de gauche, ou plutôt côté gauche, vers le bas, là où il est écrit « Configurer les caméras et la ban
톰, 카나
Devo effettuare una spinta traslazionale tra due min
क्या आप इस डेटा का शेष भाग प्राप्त करना चाहते है
Eagle, Houst
H
私たちがアジェナを追い
イー
حسنًا يا تشارلي. نحن نرسل الآن، ودعنا نرى ما إذا كنت ستحصل على أي إشارة تخطيط كهربية القلب على جهاز تسجيل بيانات الرحل
Et voilà, Tranquility Base, la mesure de la distance est terminée. Vous pouvez remettre le commutateur de fonction de la 
ठीक है, फ्रेड। समझो, केवल एलएमपी की लाल नली ही कैनिस्टर बैग में लगी है। ऐसे में, हम चाहते हैं कि आप दूसरी लाल नली को दूसरे कैनिस्टर बैग में डालने की प्रक
알겠습니다. 제 자이로들은 지금 케이지에 갇
좋습니다. 이것은 예비 결과이지만, 대략적인 방향을 제시해 줄 것입니다. 보정된 고도는 17 ± 4km로 나왔는데, ± 4km라는 오차 범위는 고도 측정에 있어 매우 일관성이 있다는 것을 보여줍니다. 유효 고도는 10 ± 12km입니다. 앞서 말씀드린 것처럼 지평선 선택에 있어서도 일관성이 유지되고 있다는 점을 말씀드리고 싶습니다. 항성 바로 아래 지점의 오차는 평균 15분각인데, 관측 속도를 최소화할 수 있다면 5분각까지 줄일 수 있을 것 같습니다. 이 외에는 드릴 말씀이 없습니다. 이상
Bien, nous y voilà. Zone d'entrée: Mid-Pacific, 000153; 000. Les deux lignes suivantes indiqueront le coucher de la lune et l'attitude de vérification lunaire;, 178; NOUN 61, -21,66, -; 00:28. Les quatre suivantes sont N/A; DO est 4,00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353,1, 29,9. L'étoile de visée est Sigma Libra, bas 08,8, ga
Columbia, hier spricht Houston. Wir bitten Sie, eine weitere Messung durchzuführen. Überlassen Sie die Nachführung der automatischen O
Per il momento non preoccuparti, Neil, sto armeggiando con le maniglie
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम एस बैंड पर स्वचालित रूप से पुनः प्राप्त करने की इस क्षमता की जाँच करने जा रहे हैं, और हम लगभग 30 सेकंड के लिए अपने अपलिं
Wir schließen die Wiedereinlagerung ab. Die Wiedereinlag
Oh, you've got some pretty good numbers on that that I sent up yesterday, and you had about. Well, I'll check that out, but you were fat on cryo. I've got some . You've got 33:20. You f
जी हाँ। जी जैक, मैं अभी तुम्हारे सवाल का जवाब दे देता हूँ, लेकिन जैक की पहली प्रतिक्रिया यही है कि यह उस दुर्घ
Joe, we had a dropout of signal the
로저. 우주선은 모든 게 정상입니다. 좋아 보입니다. 사령관은 지금 자고 
Sto guardando le stelle ora. Non è così... è chiaro, non completamente buio. Sembra che la finestra offra un filtro che riduce le stelle di magnitudine inferiore. In questo momento sto guardando il Grande Carro e giù fino ad Arturo e... e mi sembra che quello che vedo ora siano principalmente stelle di secondo e terzo ordine. Quelle più piccole sono praticamente escluse dall'immagine al momento. Man mano che si avanza nella notte, penso che ne usciranno di più, ma sic
这是Sigma Seven的语音录音。我已经恢复了
了解。ロール21～61、ピッチ090
Род
Merci. 179 009 001, non applicable, plus 00187 32870 307 32676 42 0880 253 033, bas 121, gauche 27, plus 0790 moins 16500 129 73 36238; même nord Sirius et Rigel, roulis 129, tangage 155, lacet 010, quatre quads pendant 15 secondes, horizon sur le repè
जिम, अगर तुम कुछ भेजने की कोशिश कर रहे हो, तो तुम्हारी आवाज़ बिल्कुल समझ में नहीं आ रही है। 
रॉजर। 130 घंटे 30 मिनट, डेल्टा-वीएक्स 2.0, रोल शू
Na gut. Mir ist hier oben nicht langweilig. Ich bin vorhin über Midway geflogen. Habe mir das gut angesehen. Ich bin jetzt auf euch zu – natürlich nördlich von
यहां सब बढ़िया है। हमारे ऑपरेशन शुरू होने से ठीक एक मिनट पहले, बस कुछ ही मिनट बचे हैं। क्या आप मुझे सुन रहे 
Auf mein Zeichen, es sind 85 Minuten und 45 Sekun
सभी बैटरियों का वोल्टेज लगभग 23½ (वोल्ट) या उससे अधिक है, एमीटर लगभग 20 एम्पियर पर स्थिर है। पावर बंद करने से पहले जाँच करना चाहता था, वोल्टेज 115 (वोल्ट) है। पंखे का वोल्टेज लगभग 115 (वोल्ट) है, स्टैंडबाय मोड 0 (वोल्ट) है। ठीक है, कॉकपि
روجر. تقرير متواصل. ضغط المقصورة 5.5 ويستقر بشكل جيد. درجة حرارة هواء المقصورة 95 درجة فهرنهايت؛ الرطوبة النسبية 20%؛ كمية سائل التبريد 67%؛ درجة حرارة البدلة 67 درجة فهرنهايت؛ الضغط 5.8؛ درجة حرارة البخار 50 درجة فهرنهايت وتنخفض ببطء. نسبة الأكسجين 70-100%؛ ال
روجر. اعلم أن زوجتيك موجودتان في هيوستن، وعندما تحصل على أفضل تغطية في 
Well, that's one of several. And we want to tell you something that I told Jim earlier, and that concerns control. Right now you have control in hardover if you need it, but when we go to some normal 
Gémeaux 4, Hawaï CAP
حسنًا. ماذا عن تجربة فكرة تغيير الوضع وجعل جيم يقوم بعملية الاستقطاب من خلال التلسكوب؟ لأنه إذا اضطررنا إلى تغيير الأوضاع، فنود أن نبدأ بالتفكير في التأثيرات التي سيحدثها ذلك على
حسناً، لننتقل الآن إلى تحديد ال
Acquario, Houston. Stai guardando i
हमें जल्द ही अधि
ठीक है। हम विश्व समाचारों से शुरुआत करेंगे। जब छोटा सा अंतरिक्ष यान चंद्रमा की परिक्रमा कर रहा था, तब क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या पर दुनिया भर में अमेरिकी अपोलो 8 अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों की प्रशंसा और अंतरिक्ष अन्वेषण में अंतर्राष्ट्रीय सहयोग की आशाओं के संदेश प्रसारित हुए। यहां तक ​​कि कम्युनिस्ट देशों में भी चंद्रमा की पहली यात्रा को लेकर उत्साह था। मॉस्को में, सोवियत वैज्ञानिक अनातोली बेसरानोव ने याद दिलाया कि उनके देश और संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका ने पहले भी अंतरिक्ष संबंधी ज्ञान साझा किया था और भविष्यवाणी की कि अपोलो 8 की उड़ान से और अधिक सहयोग को बढ़ावा मिलेगा। क्यूबा में, रेडियो हवाना ने अपने श्रोताओं को अपोलो 8 के भाषण के बारे में बताने के लिए वॉयस ऑफ अमेरिका कार्यक्रम का पुनः प्रसारण किया। वॉयस के अधिकारियों ने कहा कि यह पहली बार था कि किसी अमेरिकी एजेंसी का कार्यक्रम हवाना रेडियो पर प्रसारित किया गया था। चेकोस्लोवाकिया में व्यापक टेलीविजन कवरेज के माध्यम से चंद्रमा की उड़ान देखी गई; और हंगरी के बुडापेस्ट में, ट्रेनों और बसों में लोग इसी विषय पर चर्चा कर रहे थे। गैर-कम्युनिस्ट देशों में, कार्यालय कर्मचारी और क्रिसमस की खरीदारी करने वाले लोग सांस रोककर बैठे थे क्योंकि अंतरिक्ष यान को पृथ्वी की ओर लॉन्च के लिए तैयार किया जा रहा था। सड़कों पर चल रहे फ्रांसीसी लोगों ने अमेरिकी तकनीक और अंतरिक्ष में हासिल की गई इस उपलब्धि की खूब तारीफ की, और कुछ दर्शकों ने टेलीविजन पर चंद्रमा की तस्वीरें देखकर खुशी से "शानदार!" कहा। लंदन में क्रिसमस की खरीदारी करने वालों की भीड़ दुकानों और पबों में उमड़ पड़ी, ताकि वे चंद्रमा के गड्ढों की टेलीविजन तस्वीरें देख सकें। ब्रिटेन के अग्रणी अंतरिक्ष खगोलशास्त्री बर्नार्ड लवेल, जिन्होंने कुछ हफ़्ते पहले तक अपोलो 8 परियोजना की इस आधार पर आलोचना की थी कि उपकरण अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों की जान जोखिम में डाले बिना भी यह काम कर सकते हैं, ने स्पष्ट किया कि वे चंद्रमा की उड़ान से बहुत प्रभावित हुए हैं। पोप पॉल VI ने मानव बुद्धि और गतिविधि के विस्तार के इन अग्रदूतों को सम्मान दिया। हालांकि, कुछ ही लोग ऐसे थे जिन्होंने क
कैंटन कॉम टेक, यह सिग्मा सेवन है। आप मुझे कैसे 
저는 약 20분 동안 핸드 컨트롤러를 전혀 건
Je vous ai bien reçu. Je suis de 
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston.
यह कैप कॉम है। हम प्रती
حسنًا. سأعود إلى غرفة النوم. سنختار أفضل جه
Außerdem beschlagen hier in Houston die Fenster, neben anderen P
حسنًا يا فريد. وعندم
Columbia, Columbia, this is Houston. If you read
D'accord, Jack. À première vue, je ne vois pas pourquoi on devrait se soucier du contrôle instantané, vu que la plateforme est hors tension. Quoi qu'il en soit, il nous faut un préchauffage de 15 minutes avec les rés
حسنًا. لقد أخطأنا في مجموعة النسخ الاحتياطية. كانت في غير مكانها. يبدو أن البيانات الموجودة 
D'accord. J'ai presque 28 ans, Housto
Hawaii Com Tech, Cap Com, это Friendship Seven. Топливо 43-45 [процентов], кислород 60-90 [пр
هيوستن، أبولو 11. سأذهب إلى إعادة ضبط الأوامر وأشغل الشريط
Gemini 4,
O2
Sigma Seven, Canton Com Tec
Schalte den
ドッキングウィンドウ。了解。誰かが君の最新の消耗品ステータスレポートを渡してくれたんだけど、1時間あたり11～12アンペアを安定して使っていて、かなり良さそ
ه
Roger. Wir warten mit dem Scheck für die hohe
حسنًا. إذًا، نستخدم وضع PRO، وينتهي بنا الأمر بظهور وميض 5018؛ ونريد هنا مناورة تلقائية بدلًا من استخدام ، لذا نستخدم وضع PRO مع التوجيه، PNGS؛ والتحكم في الوضع، تلقائي. لدينا نطاق ميت 1.4 درجة، وسيعطينا المؤشر لمحاولة ضبطها، وفي ذلك الوقت أنظر من خلال ، وإذا كان الأمر مشابهًا لفحص الشمس في أبولو 11، فكل ما نحتاجه هو أن تكون الشمس في مكان ما في - هناك في مكان ما على الشمس أثناء مرو
吉姆睡着了
バッテリーは全て23.5ボルト以上を
Gemini 4,
मार
سيكون ذلك قبل الدخول. سأشرح لكم هذا الإجراء ب
رو
ニールは今、
Okay. We concur on that, and we have a late arrival i
11, Roger. Nous avons reçu des rapports indiquant que tous les résultats é
Да, мы только что посмотрели на карту, и вы наход
Хорош
라디에이터에서 냉각 효과가 
ठीक है, तो 
I don't know. I wonder if they tried that in the simulator. I can't seem to get roll to go up. It go
On va chercher l'ordinateur. L'horloge affiche environ 05:36. On dira 05:36. On devrait récupérer Muchea et faire un contrôle d
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। लगता है कि बैटरी A को चार्ज होने में लगभ
Gemini 4
La velocità standard 
खैर, मुझे यह अच्छी तरह से समझ आ गया था... जब मैं व
Roger. Ich gehe gleich re
نريد تأكيدًا آخر، عندما أغلقنا صمام تهوية النفق إلى / DELTA-P، كانت القراءة حوالي 1.7 - 1.75، ثم ارتفعت ببطء إلى حوالي - أوه، أقول أقل بقليل من 2.2. ويبدو أنها ثابتة عند هذا الحد - هل هن
알았어, 프레드. 16페이지에서 "도킹 번(PGNS)"을 수행해. 페이지 끝까지 전체 시퀀스를 그대로 따라 하되, "번 애티튜드 기동 후 자유" 부분은 지우
はい、以上です。そしてもちろん、圧力が770未満の場合は、
يا فتى، 
Хорошо. Мы будем ждать 2 минуты, чтобы получить указания 
Cela représente environ 80 heures, en fait 82 heures, pour les deux cartouches 
Und noch ein Punkt: Wir möchten Sie daran erinnern, dass dies im Blowdown-Modus sein wird und beide REGs B geschlossen sind, aber wir haben noch viele bei 10
रॉजर, 11. शुरू में समस्या यह थी कि हम वांछित प्रारंभिक अभिस्थिति को लोड करने में विफल रहे; इसलिए हमने इसे उस पुरानी अभिस्थिति में वापस लाने का प्रयास किया जिसमें हमने कुछ घंटों के लिए शुरुआत की थी। इसीलिए हमने अन्य अक्षों में दरें प्राप्त कीं। हम दरों को पुनः निकालने के लिए लगभग 20 मिनट तक इस अभिस्थिति में प्रतीक्षा करेंग
روجر، لقد لاحظتُ طبقات من الضباب، لكن ليس تلك المن
हवाई, ह्यूस्टन CAP COM। मैं वॉइस
우리는 
हमें पता है कि कई देशों के बहुत से वैज्ञानिक चंद्र नमूनों को देखने 
Термометр
Wir werden versuchen, wieder in den Schlafrhythmus der Schlafperioden unmittelbar davor zurückzuk
ロジャー、ジム
بعد التفكير ملياً، بما أن ذلك سيؤثر على مدى التغطية
We see you raised the cover
Could
잭은 눈앞에 별이 보인다고 불평하고
로저. 알겠습니다. 배터리 충전량은 확인되는 대로 기록하겠습니다. 
네. 오늘 아침 뉴스는 그
Okay, Jack. Es scheint, als ob wir – kurioser Exkurs, die Lage – in der Neigung. Ich überprüfe das jetzt, aber als der Mond das letzte Mal seine Bahn zog, war er weit über dem optimalen Winkel, und ich sehe, dass die Erde jetzt in einem ziemlich niedrigen W
I did. That is, Roger. I did se
둘 다 수
Ok. CARICA BATTERIA, SPENTO; INVERTER CA 2 su SPENTO; CONNETTORE BUS PRINCIPALE, BAT B/C su acceso, su. Pannello 250: BAT A, ING
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。完
Co
了解。65と1700、1725を取得
ه
こちらシグマ・セブン。スクイブ
我々が持っているのは45-1、16-1だけ
Понял. Эта последовательность диапазонов — явление, которое мы наблюдаем при резервном копировании голосовых данных; в этом режиме определение расстояния и передача голоса используют одни и те же каналы, поэтому нам приходится периодиче
我没太明
मुझे लगता है कि अब हम उन पर चर्चा कर सकत
Roger. Ich habe gerade eine SMS geschick
R
- - a partire da 108:00 sul lato sinistro, scrivere "Stop ORB rate at ORB science attitude". A - Scrivere nella colonna di sinistra il carico di "10101" e "11111". Scendendo a 10, aggiungere qua
わかりました。CBセンサーユニット、DCバスAと
Dort steht: Aufräumarbeiten durchführen, Helme und Stautaschen verstauen; Spiegel, Checkliste und Entsorgungsvorrichtung auspacken. Vorläufige Stauvorric
Sì, avevo l'interruttore acceso FUORI mentre passavo dal finestrino superiore. Potrebbe essere questo
네. 굉장히 큰 문제인 것 같네요. 별점 2번을 목록 맨 뒤로 옮기신 걸 확인했는데, 40번에 먼저 표시해야 할 것 같습니다. 혹시 그것 때문에 문제가
Aux Damp pulls it right in every time. No problem
네, 맞습니다. 그는 문이 열려 있는
Хорошо. Еще один момент, который мы хотим вам немного уточнить. Как мы уже говорили, положение SEP при подъеме было в плоскости, а положение JETT будет больше похоже на обычное положение SEP сервисного модуля, то есть оно будет направлено вверх, за пределы радиус-вектора и на 45 градусов вправо, вне плоскости, к
了解しました。2番を実行してください
저도 마찬
Roger, Canary. Je vais avoir une perte de signal avant de recevoir ces photos. Je veux en prendre. Demande à Muchea, ou plutôt à Kano, de me les envoyer dans cet ordre: coucher du soleil, lever du soleil, coucher du soleil
로저. 멋진 쇼였습니다. 만약 그곳까지 방영된다면 저희도 보고 싶네요. 
पृष्ठ 28 पर, चरण - चेतावनी लाइट की स्थिति में निम्नलिखित परिवर्तन करते हुए चरण 4 को पूरा करें। चेतावनी लाइटों के नीचे, संभवतः आपको ASCENT PRESSURE और एक
But although the Oilers didn't do so well out on the field, they did great in the box office. Bud Adams, Don Klausterman an
Roger, das wird genauso kommen wie bisher, und du wirst sie 
حسنًا، ها نحن قادمون. منصة الدخول: منتصف المحيط الهادئ، 000153؛ 000. السطران التاليان هما وقت غروب القمر ووضعية فحص القمر؛ ، 178؛ NOUN 61، ناقص 21.66، ناقص ؛ 00:28. الأربعة التالية غير متوفرة؛ DO هو 4.00، 02:04؛ 00:17، 03:22، 08:14؛ 33، 353.1، 29.9. نجم خط الرؤية هو سيجما الميزا
Apollo 11, qui Houston a 1 minuto. Traiettoria e guida sembrano buone, e anche la piattaforma è a po
11, Houston. Wir empfangen Daten, aber es besteht dasselbe Problem wie bei Buzz' Signala
違うんです。平行じゃないんです。片目の位置で
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM Si vous lisez ce
了解しました。LEVVAとヘルメットはハッチバッグに入れる予定です。その他の非標準の収納場所については、今晩中に
ठीक है, जैक। मुझे पृष्ठ 18 पर एक और प्रश्न है। 1 मिनट पर, मैं मास्टर आर्म ऑन से सहमत हूँ, लेकिन मुझे आश्चर्य है कि मुझे एबॉर्ट स्टेज ब्रेकर क्यों लगाना पड़ रहा है। हमें अभी किसी भी प
Et Houston, vous avez maintenant un débit binaire élevé avec nous, je crois? Nous sommes prêts à procéder 
네
Okay, Fred. The ASA package 
我应该说明一下，在凌晨 3 点 26 分 33 秒，我在天空中观测到了 10 个粒子。它们看起来确实在发光。它们看起来像是小霜粒。然而，有些粒子似乎离我很远。有两个粒子看起来可能在 100 码（约 91 米）远的地方。我已经有一段时间没有操作推进器了。这是两个更近距离的粒子。现在用密度计测量一下近距离的粒子。读数为 5.5，经过的时间为 3 点 27 分 
حسنًا. لقد حصلت على ثل
Tenez l'astr
Roger. 45-1 101. 2+08. 12 37 50. 5+36. 10+33. 46-1 114. 2+25 14 12 47. 4+05. 9+33. 47-1 Propulseurs de tir avant et arrière. 08 et 120. 0+14 et 2+30. 15 46 36. 3+17. 8+37. 48-1 Propulseurs avant et arrière. 24 et 120. 0+40 et 230, correction 2+30. 17 20 19. 2+42. 8+43. 49-4 111. 2+21. 20 06 48. 4+11. 9+46. 44 BRAVO Propulseurs avant et arrière 14 et 120. 0+24 et 2+30. 11 55 47. 11+10... 5 120. 2+30. 13 29 13. 11+42. 46 BRAVO 94. 1. 15 08 39. 11+30. 47 BRAVO 85. 1+48. 16 42 35. 10+36. 48 BRAVO 82. 1+45. 18 13 36. 10+05. Et c'est tout. Avez-vous
Jack, Houston. La communication est parfois meilleure, parfois pire, et la dernière que j'
Подождите. Подтверждаю, Базз. Выглядит неплохо. Это хороший результат для нас. Кон
太陽が当たると表面は粉状になります。*** 非常に小さな微細な多孔質がすべて分割されます *** 
헤드셋을 바꿀 거예요
Повтори ещё раз, Май
아쿠아리우
そして私は今のところ夜に適応し
Okay. Und auß
罗杰。我想我们得这么做了，因为我敢打赌——我不会打赌——但
据称，82名男子花了大约30分钟才穿过“不归桥”，这座桥连接着朝鲜半岛南北两国。他们上午
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。回路ブレーカーのチェックリストのパネル11と16にあるように、パネルの設定をお願いします
そうだね。もしかしたら、君の左側だっ
좋
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们现在不反对进行尿液排放。另外，关于废水排放——我们计划推迟到大约[时间待定]，
تفضل يا فان
ロジャー・ジェミニ4、こちらはRKV外科医です。まだ血圧がうまく測れていないようですが、次回試す前にフィッティングの端を点検し、Oリング
我很好，你呢
نعم. الخطوة التالية في اللوحة رقم 5: نريد ضبط مفتاح ربط ناقل التيار المتردد الرئيسي على وضع ناقل التيار المتردد للبطارية، والتحقق من الجهد الصحيح عل
Это отличная сделка. Конечно, спасибо всем. У 
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। स्क्विब बंद। तीन रेट्रो फ्यूज स्विच चाल
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन से होते 
D'accord, Jack. Lors de ce passage, la Terre est a
Roger. I say again, your state vector is just fine; it's still ticky-poo, and the reason we're holding here is that we're checking to see if any information was lost. That's reason one, and the second reason is that your W-m
好的。在MSC-2和-3
わかりました。ありがとうございます。最初に思い浮かんだ質問の一つです。クラ
약 179마일 지점에서 목표물을 포착했고, 약 156마일에서 레이더 조준을 맞췄습니다. 바늘은 비교적
Хор
Ich habe Ken gestern Abend nach der Trennung erzählt, dass wir einen schönen Knall von den Pyrotechnikern gehört haben und die Maschine mit über 100 Fuß
제 말
没什么大问题。我能很轻松地把它敲进大约两英寸深，
Jack è lassù 
Comment vous sentez-vou
Вы пробовали отключать наушники от крепления на шее,
了解です。25ページをご覧ください。25ページの手順3を省略
Muchea Cap
好的。第一排没问题。第二排，“航班展示”下方的
रॉजर। चंद्रमा की हमारी यह यात्रा आपको शायद सरल या आसान लगी हो। मैं आपको आश्वस्त करना चाहता हूँ कि ऐसा बिल्कुल नहीं था। जिस सैटर्न वी रॉकेट ने हमें कक्षा में पहुँचाया, वह एक अविश्वसनीय रूप से जटिल मशीन है, जिसका हर एक पुर्जा त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता है। मेरे सिर के ऊपर स्थित इस कंप्यूटर में 38,000 शब्दों की शब्दावली है, जिनमें से प्रत्येक शब्द को हमारे, यानी चालक दल के लिए अत्यंत महत्वपूर्ण होने के लिए बहुत सावधानी से चुना गया है। मेरे हाथ में जो स्विच है, उसके कमांड मॉड्यूल में ही 300 से अधिक समकक्ष हैं, इस एक स्विच डिज़ाइन में ही। इसके अलावा, असंख्य सर्किट ब्रेकर, लीवर, रॉड और अन्य संबंधित नियंत्रण उपकरण भी हैं। हमारे सर्विस मॉड्यूल के पिछले हिस्से में स्थित हमारा विशाल रॉकेट इंजन त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता रहा होगा, अन्यथा हम चंद्र कक्षा में ही फँस जाते। मेरे सिर के ऊपर लगे पैराशूट को कल भी पूरी तरह से काम करना होगा, अन्यथा हम समुद्र में गिर जाएँगे। हमें हमेशा से विश्वास रहा है कि यह सभी उपकरण काम करेंगे, और ठीक से काम करेंगे, और हमें शेष उड़ान के दौरान भी यही विश्वास बना हुआ है। यह 
Roger. È forte e chiaro, Bill.
E non so come descriveresti davvero il limite di risoluzione. Ci pen
Le soleil brille toujours – pour nous, tous les quarts de travail sont des quarts d
Our telemetry
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티 기지에서 어젯밤 지질학 질문에 대해 몇 가지 답변을 드리겠습니다. 우리는 길쭉한 원형의 2차 분화구들이 흩어져 있는 비교적 평평한 분화구 지대에 착륙했습니다. 대부분의 분화구는 크기에 상관없이 융기된 테두리를 가지고 있습니다. 하지만 모든 분화구가 그런 것은 아닙니다. 작은 분화구 중에는 테두리가 뚜렷하게 보이지 않는 것도 몇 개 있습니다. 이 지역의 지표면은 매우 고운 모래에서 실트에 이르는 입자로 이루어져 있습니다. 지구에서 이와 가장 유사한 것을 꼽자면 분말 형태의 흑연이라고 할 수 있겠습니다. 이 지표면에는 모양, 크기, 질감이 매우 다양한 암석들이 흩어져 있는데, 둥근 모양과 각진 모양, 그리고 다양한 경도를 가진 암석들이 있습니
友谊七号，钢头
Okay, Vance. Okay. Wir haben hier gerade die OMNIs gewechselt. Ich meine, wenn Sie Daten von uns erhalten, ist das das Wichtigste. Ich gehe jetzt nochmal hoc
Хорошо. В удобное для вас время я бы хотел увидеть продувку кислородного
Хорошо. Нам нужен... Извините (смех). Нам нужен дисплей. В
أبولو
Okay, Fred. Wi
حسناً، فهمت. يبدو أن لدي تسريباً. لا بد من و
로저. 이 
ठीक है, फ्रेडो, बढ़िया। पंक्ति 4 पर, शुरुआत करते हुए: सूट फैन 1, बंद; ग्लाइकोल पंप ऑटो ट्रांसफर, वीएचएफ बी ट्रांसमीटर, खुला; वीएचएफ ए रिसीवर, खुला। इसके नीचे: सिग्नल स्ट्रे
Примерно 3000 фунто
我们正在进行6分钟
は
لننتظر حتى
... hatte eine
This is D-9,
ジム、おおよそその通りです。ジャックがその姿勢で粗調整を行います。そのために、君にはその姿勢まで操縦してもらっているんです。粗調整用のジンバル角度を計算して彼に渡します。彼がそこに到着したら、まずチェックリストに従ってプラットフォームの粗調整を行います。それから彼は月面に入り、もし星が見えない場合は、すぐに君に角度を伝えて月面姿勢にします。彼は月面で調整を行い、その後君は太陽面で操縦し
Хьюстон, это «Аполлон-8». Хотел бы подтвердить данные о состоянии двигателей. VGX - -1,4, VGY - 0, VGZ -
Neil
罗杰，吉姆，这是个好消息
알
여기서는 모든 태도가 완벽하게 확인됐습니다. 
Роджер. -1 широта минус 06269; это широта; а для долготы, деленной на 2, -2, плюс 8
プラスX
Ok, Gus, la mia situazione è buona; la modalità di controllo è fly-by-wire; i giroscopi sono ancora ingabbiati; la manovra è disattivata. Il carburante è al 62 e al 68 percento. Un po' più avanti sul consumo di carburante; la spia
宁静。收到。收到。1号待命。还有，哥伦比亚，
रॉज
J'ai pris deux photos depuis le S-6, et je crois qu'elles ont été prises juste au niveau de la zone de convergence inter
हालांकि
Al tuo prossimo passaggio, Columbia, invece di eseguire un'operazione vera e propria, vorremmo che guardassi nelle vicinanze delle coordinate che ti abbiamo fornito, che rappresentano la nostra migliore analisi basata sulla fisica della mappa e sulla traiettoria, e abbiamo anche un altro set di coordinate che vorremmo che cercassi nelle vicinanze. Quest'ultimo si basa su tutte le interp
Roger. 5 Echo, Al. It's a r
Ricevuto. Ricevuto. Lu
嘿，好的，弗雷德。我们怀疑你至少
알
كولومبيا، هيوستن. مفهوم. نستقبل. يا إيجل، يبدو أن أفضل هوائي هو الهوائي الأمامي. فاصل. يا إيجل، لم نرَ تحميلك لملفات TIG وP32. هل يمكنك تأكيد
ठीक है। ठीक है। सबसे पहले, सामान्य सिद्धांत यह है कि ये नियम मोड I अबॉर्ट के समान होने चाहिए, जिसमें सख्त सीमाएं हों। अब, मैं आपको एक-एक करके समझाता हूँ ताकि आप इन्हें समझ सकें। ठीक है। आपको शटडाउन कर देना चाहिए, यदि निम्नलिखित में से कोई भी स्थिति उत्पन्न होती है: थ्रस्ट मॉनिटर रीडआउट 77 प्रतिशत या उससे कम; प्रोपेलेंट टैंक प्रेशर - यानी इनलेट प्रेशर - ऑनबोर्ड रीडआउट 160 या उससे कम; OX DELTA-P पर ईंधन 25 psi से अधिक - और यह आपके लिए ग्राउंड कॉल होना चाहिए - स्टार्ट ट्रांजिएंट को छोड़कर, एटीट्यूड एरर प्लस या माइनस 10 डिग्री; एटीट्यूड-रेट लिमिट प्लस या माइनस 10 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड। और आपको शटडाउन कर देना चाहिए यदि आपको निम्नलिखित में से कोई भी संकेत मिलता है: इंजन गिम्बल, ISS, प्लस प्रोग्राम अलार्म, CES DC, और यदि इनवर्टर स्विच करने के बाद इनवर्टर लाइ
좋은 생각이에요, 켄. 그런데 한 가지 작은 문제가 있어요. 우리 주변에 떠다니는 밝은 물체들이 너무 많고, 특히 물병자리 일부가 엄청나게 빛을 반사하고 있거든요. 그래도 한번 시도해 볼 수
시뮬레이터에서처럼, 기체가 한쪽으로 기
おっしゃることはよく分かります。先ほど少し寝たので、かなり休養が取れています。フランクが入室する前に、ここでぐっすり眠れるようにしたいと思っています。この機会にBGMを試してみて、何か良い効果があるか試して
気球は消えてしまいました（見えなくなりました）。どうや
スーツ
コピーする準備ができ
알겠습니다, 조. 마지막으로 양성 반응을 확인한 건 프레드가 약 5시간 전에 가스가 분출되는 걸 봤을 때였어요. 나중에 다시 확인했을 수도 있다고
자, 다음 페이지 16입니다. 이것은 태양 코로나 관련 내용의 연속입니다. 페이지
星をいくつ
Roger. Les piles de l'adaptateur sont toutes en bon état, à 24 V. Les piles princip
방호복 온도는 7
Okay. This is the plus 90 pad. /G&N, 63825, minus 1.54, plus 1.32,, minus 0491.7, plus 0000.1, plus 6634
Ti ho 
Sa
了解。コ
Roger. Mes gyros sont actuellem
휴스턴, 다시 말씀해
好的，阿波罗8号。看来你们现在可以关闭低温风扇了，我们会暂时离开，让你们处理一下后续工作。我们船上还有一些其他项目，比如你们列出的高增
لا أعتقد أنه
ロ
MSC-1 is OFF now. MSC-2 and -3 - I just turned those OFF. I'm going to 
Nein, ich habe es verloren. Es sah so aus, als ob da große Arme rausragten. Ich hatte es nur eine Minute. Ich habe ein paar Fotos mit einer Filmkamera und eins mit der Hasselblad gemacht; aber ich bin im freien Drift getrieben, und bevor ich die Kontrolle wiedererlangen konnte, bi
了解しました。わかりました。もう一つは着陸後のことです。改めて確認しますが、宇宙船内での滞在時間は1時間以内
자, 휴
Roger. Bien reçu. J'ai une mise à jour concernant les CLA et PLA pour vous lor
1 प्लस 56 पर पहला भोजन। पानी में बहुत सारे हवा के बुलबुल
Полёт прошёл хорошо. Ощущение невесомости отличное. Все устройства, вся система работают исправно
ठीक है, मैंने बैकग्राउंड के शोर के बावजूद आपकी बात समझ ली। मेरा मानना ​​है कि आप ह्यूस्टन से यह
Ok, Vance. Vediamo se ce l'ho qui. Per esempio, voglio usare l'obiettivo DC Hasse
وسأقوم الآن 
ठीक है, वैंस। उस कार्ट्रिज मॉड के लिए हमें कुछ चीज़ें मिली हैं। एक तो वो खास धूल से बचाने वाल
Ah, d'accord. Je pensais que vous aussi. Je croyais que vous aviez di
我们希望显示器打开；S波段天线关闭——以避免触发主报警；摄像机——顺序摄像机打开；下方，我们希望显示器打开；直流母线电压关闭；逆变器2打开；上升ECA关闭；上
1時間前に起きたとおっしゃっていますが、何時に寝ました
알았어. 좋아, 조. 하
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Пожалуйста, оставьте теле
Rog
रॉजर। आपके द्वारा लक्षित लोड बताने के बाद हम प्रोग्राम 30 पर जाएंगे, और मुझे नहीं लगा था कि इतने कम बर्न
Bestätigen. Unter „DRÜCKEN“, Schritt 1, Zeile 1, streichen. Zeile 4, „HELIUM ABGANG REG 1, Rücksprechfunktion“. Unter Schritt 2, streichen; Schritt 3, stre
ठीक है, जिम। क्या आप अपने बाहरी तार को दबाएंगे? और हमें संकेत मिला है क
좋습니다. 하니 특종 기사를 준비했습니다. 최신호 '인터스텔라 타임즈'에 따르면 달 탐사가 신문과 TV 모두에서 가장 중요한 뉴스로 다뤄지고 있다고 합니다. 워싱턴 포스트의 헤드라인은 "달, 그들이 간다!"입니다. 빌 앤더스가 오늘 북극에 사는 빨간 옷을 입은 노인과 비밀
حسنًا. يبدو أننا حصلنا على تثبيت محكم خلال الدقيقة الأخيرة تقريبًا، حيث كانت مؤشرات ضبط السرعة القصوى تتذبذب صعودًا وهبوطًا، وكذلك مؤشرات الميل والانعراج، ولكن يبدو أنها استقرت الآن تلقائيًا. نحن الآن بصدد تعبئة خزانات الوقود وإنهاء عم
Bon, ça ne m'étonnerait pas... tout ça à cause de ces foutues chos
로저. 흥미로운 점이 하
没错，比尔
ハッ！ハッ！君が藪に入っていったせいで、僕のフ
아폴로 8호, 레드스톤 회로를 통과하고 있습니다. 아주 좋아 보입니다. 주 루프와 보조 루프 모두 잘 유지되고 있습
Ok, eccoci qui. Blocco note: Pacifico medio, 000153; 000. Le due righe successive saranno quelle del tramonto della luna e dell'assetto di controllo della luna;, 178; NOUN 61, meno 21,66, meno; 00:28. Le quattro successive sono N/D; DO è 4,00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353,1, 29,9. La stella di puntamento è Sigma Libra, in basso 08,8, a sinistra 0,4; vettore di risalita in alto. Per l'allineamento di ingresso, stelle 31 e 23. L'allineamento di rollio 041, beccheggio 245, imbardata 024, usa un modello di non uscita. Mantieni l'assetto di controllo della luna fino al tramonto della luna; poi vai all'assetto di ingresso o traccia l'orizzonte con la finestra di 36 gradi; g costante l'ingresso è rollio a 
Roger. Wir haben das 
Roger, Jerry. Capisco. Noto una differenza. Abbiamo fatto delle scelte preferenziali. La prima volta abbiamo avuto problemi; l'ultima ha funzionato come previsto. Ho notato che per la prima volta, quando si è presentata l'opzione, si trattava di un'opzione nominale, mentre con la stessa procedura per quest'ultima mo
Diciamo che ne hai bec
ठीक 
«Дружба Семь», это Стилхед. Понимаю, что в
The AGS has 9.5 - 46.6
11, ici Houston. Correction de cap n° 5, RCS/G&N: 26025, correction de tangage et de lacet NA, TIG 150 29 5453, -00048, + toutes les billes, +00001 075 159 328; HA NA; HP +00230 00048 011 00048; étoile du sextant 03 0908 382. Bloc d'étoiles Boresite, aucun disponible. Latitude +1102, -17204 11803 36275 195 03 33, alignement, Den
حسنًا. بناءً على كلامك، علينا أن نكون متشككين بعض الشيء ف
ट्रनि
Хорошо. Н
ठीक है। अब, जब आप इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में हों, तो निम्नलिखित ऑनबोर्ड रीडआउट आवश्यक हैं: बैट सी वोल्टेज, पायरो बैट ए वोल्टेज, पायरो बैट बी वोल्टेज, हीलियम प्रेशर। और इंजेक्टर तापमान, ये पोजीशन 5 चार्ली, 5 डेल्टा, 6 अल्फा, 6 ब्रावो, 6 चार्ली, 6 डेल्टा हैं; और बैटरी मैनिफोल्ड प्रेशर, जो 4 अल्फा है। और रीड
BAT Charlie、37.0; pyro A、37.0; pyro B、37.0; ヘリウム圧力、3450; そして、ちょっと面白いことに、窒素A、2300; 窒素
네, 잭. 저는 짐입니다. 체크리스트 변경 사항을 검토하실 때, 꼭 필요한 사항만 검토해 주시길 부탁드립니다. 절차는 한 번만 숙달하면 되기 때문에 마지막 순간에 변경할 수는 없습니다. 저희는 최선의, 가장 안전한 방법을 선호하지만, 정말 필수적인 변경 사항이 아니라면 굳이 보내
11, this is Houston. The noise on the COMM seems to have quieted down now. I guess that we've rotate
Да, 
Хорошо. Меня прервали на минутку. Боб Хоуп снова во Вьетнаме со своими войсками, как обычно, отлично справляется со своей работой. В новостях упоминается одно имя, связанное с линкором USS New Jersey. Вчера — или в среду — Боб Хоуп, стоя на вершине огромной орудийной башни, пошутил, чтобы порадовать 1500 человек на борту линкора New Jersey в его 20-ю годовщину, когда он развлекал американские войска за границей. Хоуп и его отряд из 27 человек развлекали моряков New Jersey после посещения рождественской мессы на борту авианосца Hancock, оба корабля находятся у берегов Вьетнама. «Это, должно быть, самый большой Cris Craft в мире», — сказал Хоуп морякам. «Он похож на остров Уэйк с рулем». «Думаю, это было мило с их стороны — вытащить корабль из консервации, чтобы устроить мне салют из 21 орудия», — сказал он. Хоуп пошутил, стоя на одной из 16-дюймовых орудийных башен корабля. Моряки были особ
Стены выглядят изрытыми ямками. И это неудивительно, ведь они не за
Vorrei essere br
Okay, you try 
حسنًا، لم يكن لدينا متسع من الوقت يا هيوستن لنحدثكم عن المناظر التي رأيناها من النافذة أثناء استعدادنا للإقلاع؛ ولكن حتى ذ
روجر. شعرنا بالاهتزاز عندما قمنا بتشغيل B
Roger. Abbiamo provato a ottenere questo riallineamento. Abbiamo bisogno di... Hai una 
روجر، بيل. قبل أن ت
Vous avez dit vouloir que cette attitude soit adopt
В таком положении определенно создается иллюзия, что смотришь высоко вверх, и если горизонта нет, то это просто черное небо. Количество света в кабине довольно высокое. Конечно, после адаптации его можно уменьшить с помощью освещения салона. На данный момент я несколько не решаюсь уменьшать уровень освещения из-за проблемы с цепью скафандра. Я щедро использую фонарики на кончиках пальцев. Отмечается, что в будущих полетах нам понадобится какое-то универсальное устройство, куда можно будет запихивать предметы и удерживать их там в течение определенного времени. Я пытаюсь решить проблему с шайбой и маленьким обжатым кусочком металла. Я... кажется, наконец-то запихнул их в маленький мешочек на люке. Температура скафандра держится на уровне. Мне жарко, и, вероятно, придется уменьшить настройку. Я уверен, что не понимаю, поче
रॉजर। कंट्रोल मोड मैनुअल है, जायरो नॉर्मल है, पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है। ईंधन 45-50 प्रतिशत है। बैलून 
V
الجوزاء 4
안녕하세요, 로저 씨. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 저도 잘
예
相机姿态完美。非常适合气象局使用。我想我当时甚至还
Aprirò le finestre e vedrò come 
Die Sonne
Понял. Это «Дружба Семь». Топливо 
Obtenir 51 sur le 
Houston, the guys that said that we wouldn't be able to tell precisely where we are are the winners today. We were a little busy worrying about program alarms and things like
جيميني 4، كارنارفون CAP COM. أعطني قراءة عن اس
로저. 얼마나 버리셨는지 대략적인 양을 알고 싶습니다. 그래야 이 모든 것들이 제대로 자리 잡을지, 아니면 상황
我们将受到
Jim, könnten Sie bitte einen Hauptbatterie-
맞아요. 제가 입력을 안 했어요. 잠시 컴퓨터에 입력을 맡겼었죠. 제가 이것저것 만지작거리는 동안 모드 스위치를 MANUAL에서 다시 원래대로 돌려놓았는데, 컴퓨터
نعم سيدي. هذه هي الخريطة. كل طية تحمل حرفًا في الزاوية السفلية - أو العلوية اليمنى إذا كنت تتجه من الشرق إلى الغرب - والخرائط مُصنفة بالأحرف D و E و F، وستكون جميع الخرائط الفردية مُصنفة بالأحرف D و E، وتتغير هذه التصن
双子座 VIII，夏
روجر. بخصوص فريق ال
좋아요. 아주
Gemini
حسنًا. أنا - أنا غبي هذا الصباح يا فريد. لست متأك
アトランティック・シップ、こちらフレンドシップ7号です。ケープ岬へ行っていただけませんか。カプセルを180度
Хорошо. «Аполлон-8», позвольте мне зачитать вам четвертую поправку к траектории на 
네, 감사합니
Okay,
그리고 LR 큐브를 수동으로 펼치려면 줄 끝에 있는 작은 스프링을 당겨야 하는데, 제가 손을 뻗어 피크
هذا مؤكد. يمكننا المضي قدماً وستحصل على
Okay. S
Okay. Minus 10 Pitch, plus 350 Gierwinkel, breite Strahlbreite
जी हां, अपोलो 11। और माइक, यह यहां अनडॉक करने के बाद उड़ान से पहले SEP बर्न के समान है। और आपको रजिस्टर 1 - 2 पर दिखना चाहिए, और फिर आप माइनस X बर्न करते हैं जब तक कि 
Okay, Jack. Ich habe zwei Commander-Leistungsschalter (AC und DC) und die beiden GASTA-Leistungsschalter (AC und DC) angeschlossen. Als Nächstes scha
万斯，我们必须意识到，我们需要在这里建立起工作-休息的循环，所以我们不能一直待在这里，直到烧伤前才开始阅读操作规程。我们得把规程送上来，仔细查看，然后让大家休息。所以，在准备把垫子送上去的时候，要考虑到这一
フレッド、まず
Roger. Before I do that I would like to designate the rendezvous radar up t
पुनःप्रवेश 
لقد خسرنا - الميزة الوحيدة للقيام بذلك مبكرًا هي أنه إذا استطعنا استعادة الطاقة، فسنتمكن من الهبوط. الميزة الوحيدة للقيام بذلك مبكرًا هي أنه يمكنك القيام باحتراق كبير الآن ودوران متوسط ​​ثم الهبوط. وإلا، فسيتعين علينا إبقاء منطقة التشغيل خالية حتى نصل إلى القمر. بالإضافة إلى ذلك، ستكون المنطقة داخل منطقة الاحتراق. آمل فقط
Eagle, hier spricht Houston. Wir sind mit allen Dat
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다.
Roger.
罗杰，瓜伊马斯。助推器还
फ्रैंक, आपके तापमान ठीक लग रहे हैं। चारों भ्रूणों के तापमान में अभी भी थोड़ा अंत
حسنًا. سنقوم بتشغيل نظام التحكم في التوجيه. وسنضبط وضع التحكم على تثبيت الوضع. ستكون مفاتيح التحكم في الوضع لديك كالتالي: الدوران إلى النبض، والميل إلى النبض، والانعراج إلى وضع التحكم. سيتحكم نظام التحكم في التوجيه في الانعراج، وستستخد
Сейчас я использую фотометр, чтобы попытаться получить показания. Я видел... нет, это воз
Okay. Ich habe Ihre 33-1-Beladung. Ich habe auch die Backup-Führungsmengen für die 33-1, sobald Sie zum Kopieren bereit sind. Beim letzten Durchgang gab es ein kleines Problem. Ungefähr zwei Dritte
Ça 
Hier ein Bericht von Harry Rosenthal von Associated aus Houston. Zwei Weihnachtsmänner verschönern dem zweijährigen Jeffrey Lovell den Weihnachtsabend. Der erste klopfte an seine Haustür und brachte Geschenke. Der zweite holte seinen Papa vom Mond zurück. Der erste trug einen roten Anzug und einen weißen Bart und rief laut genug, um es bis zum Ende der Straße zu hören. Der zweite war ein riesiges Triebwerk, das hinter dem Mond Flammen spuckte, und Tausende warteten gespannt auf die Nachricht, dass es gezündet hatte. „Bitte beachten Sie, dass es einen Weihnachtsmann gibt“, waren die ersten Worte von Apollo 8, als die Funkstille 15 Minuten später endete und die besorgte Welt darüber informierte, dass das Triebwerk seine kritische Zündung durchgeführt hatte. „Keiner von uns erwartet jemals ein schöneres Weihnachtsgeschenk als dieses“, sagte Ken Mattingly von der Missionskontrolle. „Vielen Dank an alle auf der Erde. Sie wissen, dass wir es ohne Sie nicht geschafft hätten“, antwortete Oberst Frank Borman, der Kommandant des Raumschiffs. In diesem Moment erstrahlte ein Weihnachtsbaum vor den Konsolen in der Missionskontrolle, und Astronaut Harrison Schmidt las der Crew eine Weltraumversion von „Ein Besuch vom Nikolaus“ vor. „Es war die Nacht vor Weihnachten, und weit draußen im Weltraum hatte die Apollo-8-Crew gerade das Rennen zum Mond gewonnen“, begann sie. Die Crew der Missionskontrolle hatte die Feier verschoben, bis Jeffreys Vater, Marinekapitän James Lovell, zusammen mit Major William A. Anders und Oberst Borman von der Luftwaffe sicher auf dem Heimweg waren. An jedem anderen Heiligabend wären die Familien der Astronau
-- 그리고 지금 저는 P-1
好
Siamo d'accordo. Non ci saranno più riscald
أخبره أن يستمر في 
ملاحظة أخرى تهمّ فريق أنظمة الطاقم: أخبروهم أنهم ليسوا مضطرين لوضع الثلاج
Nein, Mike. Wir können jenseits der Terminatorgrenze weder mit noch ohne Fernglas etwas sehen. Die Erde ist einfach zu hell, und die Nachtanpassung ist zu schwach, um auf der dunklen Seit
यह सुनकर अच्छा लगा। डॉक्टर ने बस इतना कहा कि उन्हें आश्चर्य है कि कितने घंटे
Roger. Ci stia
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Bitte senden Sie Ihre Send
西格玛七号，这里是卡诺通信技术公司，使用超高频/高频
Bien. Si vous le voyez, vous pouvez sortir le sext
Okay. Brennende Einstellung fürs Fernsehen, deine Neigung und Gierwinkel NIEDERGABE minus 1 - minus 69, GIERWIN
Okay. Die Zapfenkalibrierungen waren alle auf Nu
わかった。十分近づい
Es ist nicht
Роджер. С этим разобра
Roger, Apollo 
Okay. Why don't we get th
Ich glaube schon, Jim, ab
Роджер. Что касается температуры квадранта — верхний предел для не
Vogliamo DISPLAY, aperto; ANTENNA BANDA S, chiusa - per evitare un ALLARME MASTER, TELECAMERA - SEQUENZA TELECAMERA, aperta; E sotto, vogliamo DISPLAY, aperto; TENSIONE BUS CC, chiuso; IN
Bene. A pagina 15, cambieremo l'intestazione "CHECKOUT" in "Verifica i seguenti interruttori", e quegli interruttori sono "GUIDANCE CONTROL," terza riga, "ATTEGGIAMENTO CONTROLLO (3)" i
了解。途中訂正その2。SPS/G&N: 63059、プラス097、マイナス020、02644、5792、プラス00118、マイナス
Apol
11, Houston. Siamo davvero stupi
わかりま
你想告诉
ठीक है। हमने रिकॉर्डिंग पूरी कर ली है, और टेप रिकॉर्डर आपको वापस दे दिया गया है। आप इसे अपनी इच्छानुसार इस्तेमाल कर सकते हैं। हो सकता है हमें इसे दोबारा रिकॉर्ड करना पड़े, और अगर हम ऐसा करते हैं तो हम उसी जानकारी का इस्तेमाल करेंगे, जब तक कि आपके पास बाद में कुछ और खास जानकारी डालने के लिए न हो। आवाज़ की क्वालिटी अच्छी है। हम मिडकोर्स 4 के करीब हैं और अभी हम इसे समय पर पूरा करने की बात कर रहे हैं, और आप अनुमान लगा सकते हैं कि बर्न रेट लगभग 3 फुट प्रति सेकंड होगा। हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं और चाहेंगे कि आप ऑनबोर्ड वेक्टर का उपयोग करके इस बर्न को करने की संभावना पर विचार करें और हम स्लॉट में वेक्टर को अपडेट कर दें, ताकि आपके पास ऑनबोर्ड वेक्टर हो। ल
いいえ、すぐ
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Vous pouvez activer le signal à tout moment
यह कोई बुरी तस्वीर नहीं होनी चाहिए।
ठीक है। और पैनल 5 
시그마 세븐,... 
11, Houston. Abbiamo ricevuto notizie poco fa che l'Osservatorio McD
Конечно. Как люки?... если вы не против выйти 
Le système de gu
Houston, Apollo 11. Ora guardo la stessa area e sembra riflettere un po' della luce cinerea. Non sono sicuro che sia stata calcolata una fase pari a zero... Beh, almeno c'è una parete del cratere che sembra essere più illuminata delle altre, e quella... se siamo allineati corret
好的，万斯。我们差不多可以把单人飞行手册和飞行计划的修改内容抄写下来了，等你的笔记
Ricevuto
Yes, there's th
ठीक है। पावरअप के नीचे, पहली पंक्ति में लिखा है "ऑटो सेलेक्ट, 16, टू ऑफ"। ठीक है। आप इस हिस्से
아폴로 11호, 여기는
Ende 
Roger. Wir hatten hier s
Frank, tu es invité à la conférence GOSS
收到。我们检查了您的耗材，一切正常。如果您同意，我们想将原本15分钟的等待时间延长。我们仍然会给Buzz 10分钟的等待时间作为补偿。您目前的
Roger, Eagle. Correzione: Roger, Columbia. Riceviamo. Siete velociss
हां, अभी तो यह सिर्फ 2 तक ही बढ़
أ
階段でやるべきことが一つ残っています。これを外さなければなりま
わかりました。まず最初にやりたいことの一つは、バッテリーを充電することです。そうすれば、そちらに電力を供給できるようになります。そのための手順も準備されています。再突入に関しては、最終中間コースを大気圏再突入インターフェースの5時間前に行う予定です。もし再突入をしなければならないとしたらの話ですが。そして、大気圏再突入インターフェースのおよそ4時間半前にサービスモジュールを
Vuoi riposarti un 
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन
Combien avant le RKV? Combien avant
Houston hat einen DELTA H-Wert von 1
*** नीचे से कॉम्पैक
Давай, Хьюстон.
휴스턴의 트랭퀼리티 기지요? 제가 그곳을 놓쳤네요. 다시 말씀해 주
You want one
روجر. من وضعية دوران بزاوية 60 درجة، إلى وضعية دوران بزاوية 058 درجة بالقصور الذاتي. ستكون زاوية ال
Alle
Mike, hier auf Seite 
Hello, Apollo 11. Hous
프렌드십 세븐입니다. 혈압
ブースターからの分離面で
हे जिम, मैं शेकी ब
Okay. You tell me - you tell me 
...لكنني لم أكن أحمل المسدس، وكان استخدام الحبل أكثر صعوبةً بعض الشيء بسبب 
R
Non abbiamo... Questo pass te 
درجة حرارة صمام الماء في بدلة السباحة 
了解しま
Wunderbar. Das Wetter hat sich g
우정 7, 마지막 질문을 참고하세요. 네, 캡슐이 여기서 좋아 보입니다. 
ケン、我々の軌道がどうなっているか、追跡がどうなっているかなどにつ
Houston, Apollo 11. As a matter of curiosity, our O2 flow meter is 
روجر، 11. انتظر
अपोलो 11, अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन से ब्लाइंड ब्रॉडकास्टिंग है। अगर आप सुन पा रहे हैं, तो ओम्नी एंटीना का इस्तेमाल करके संपर्क करने की कोशिश करें। यह ह्यूस
Guten Abend. Ich möchte mit Ihnen einige der symbolträchtigeren Aspekte unserer Apollo-11-Mission besprechen. In den Gesprächen der letzten zwei, drei Tage an Bord unseres Raumschiffs sind wir zu dem Schluss gekommen, dass dies weit mehr war als die Reise dreier Männer zum Mond; mehr als die Anstrengungen eines Regierungs- und Industrieteams; mehr sogar als die einer einzelnen Nation. Wir sehen darin ein Symbol für die unstillbare Neugier der Menschheit, das Unbekannte zu erforschen. Neils Worte, als er neulich als Erster den Mond betrat: „Dies ist ein kleiner Schritt für einen Menschen, aber ein großer Sprung für die Menschheit“, bringen diese Gefühle meiner Meinung nach sehr treffend zum Ausdruck. Wir haben die Herausforderung angenommen, zum Mond zu fliegen; diese Annahme war unausweichlich. Die relative Leichtigkeit, mit der wir unsere Mission erfüllen konnten, ist meiner Ansicht nach ein Beweis für die Rechtzeitigkeit dieser Annahme. Heute bin ich überzeugt, dass wir voll und ganz in der Lage sind, eine größere Rolle bei der Erforschung des Weltraums zu übernehmen. Rückblickend waren wir alle besonders zufrieden mit den Rufzeichen, die wir mit viel Mühe für unsere Raumschiffe Columbia und Eagle ausgewählt hatten. Besonders stolz sind wir auf das Emblem unserer Mission, das den amerikanischen Adler zeigt, der das universelle Friedenssymbol von der Erde zum Mond bringt: den Olivenzweig. Es w
Roger. During your pass we would like to perform a UHF check. I would like to stress - use minimum fuel, minimum fuel. Place your UHF Antenna Select Switch to
好的。从瞄准星开始，是天蝎座头部中心的那颗星——老祖巴星；它的方
Хорошо. Мы уже завершили один этап. Вы хотите, чтобы м
Bene. In pratica, è corretto. Lasciate che vi spieghi tutto in modo schematico per un minuto, poi vi leggerò i passaggi. Penso che sarà più chiaro. Lo schema prevede che la palla possa volare verso una serie di angoli che punteranno l'ottica verso la Luna. Ora, in qualsiasi momento, in qualsiasi posizione ci troviamo, se riuscite a guardare nel telescopio e a riconoscere le formazioni stellari a sufficienza da credere di poter effettuare un allineamento da soli, è qui che vorremmo interromperci e lasciarvi procedere con il vostro allineamento. Tuttavia, vi stiamo fornendo una procedura che vi darà ciò che sappiamo che potete vedere nel telescopio senza preoccuparvi di riflessi o cose del genere, e non è previsto che questa procedura debba essere seguita oltre il punto in cui siete certi di avere una buona definizione delle formazioni stellari nel vostro telescopio. Se devi proseguire, manovreremo, daremo un'occhiata alla Luna, faremo un segno lì, poi manovreremo di nuovo con gli angoli / e daremo un'occhiata al Sole, e prenderemo un altro segno sul Sole e questo completerà l'allineamento. Ora, lo schema di allineamento prevede che ti forniremo una serie di angoli attraverso i quali puoi allineare approssimativamente la palla quando la ti punta verso la Luna. Ora, questa serie di angoli coinciderà con la che hai come valore nominale. Puoi allineare approssimativamente a quella, impostare una bandierina di deriva e una bandierina REFSMMAT, e avrai una buona piattaforma e saremo entro un paio di gradi da un buon allineamento. E, se necessario, potremmo interromperci a questo punto e procedere con un ingresso; tuttavia, nel tentativo di ottenere una buona piattaf
了解しました。着陸地点の天気は、サモアの南約560マ
V
اعذ
Immagino che si
Gemini 4, this is RKV. Do you
Хорошо. Еще одно замечание по поводу воды, Джек. Если вы не сбросите давление, когда наберете достаточно воды, чтобы полностью сбросить давление, оставшееся давление исчезнет в течение 1-3 часов. Это небольшое количество кислорода, но мы можем его сохранить. Поэтому, ес
了解
Tu peux essayer. Si on
Quello che stiamo cercando di fare è metterti in una posizione tale che, quando vedi la Terra entrare dalla finestra, tu possa smorzarla e tenere la Terra nella finestra. Procedendo al resto di pagina 29, alla voce "PREMI", cancella tutti e tr
B; Delta-V, 13,5. Ajustement d'altitude; Delta-V, 59,5. Ajustement de phase:; Delta-V, 31,3. Changement de plan vers le sud:; Delta-V, 44,3. Co-elliptique:; Delta-V, 33,7. Début
... 뭐라도 
Ich verstehe dich ganz genau. Wie
That's affirmative, Jim. You're going to have to roll 90 degrees to point your plus X-axis at the Sun and put the crescent 
好的，比尔。这次我们准备用不同的设备来测试一下这段音乐。为了确保语音通信畅通，如果你方便的话，收到音乐后请给我们打个电话，告诉我们音乐播放完毕，并就音量大小或其他方面提出任何意见。如果我接到你的电话，我会回拨给你。通话时，我
Это «Дружба Семь». Все эти мельчайшие частицы; их тысяч
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, कृपया एक बार फिर रक्तचाप की जा
罗杰。西格
Jim. Those are not an
イーグル、ヒューストン。このモードでは210回線は良好です。データ選択を85フィートのアンテナに切り替えて
저도 
О, ты действительно умеешь причинить мужчине 
我不确定飞船能否承受这么多的额外重量。你做过任何
ええ、その通りです。桃とキューブ状の果物が
Bien, Apollo 8. Notre test de communication est terminé. Merci de votre coopération. J'ai une modification à apporter aux points de navigation qui s'afficheront à [heure manquante]. Nous souhaitons également modifier légèrement votre étoile. Êtes-vous prêt à rece
로저. 마룬 버글 소식을 계속 전해드리겠습니다. 닉슨 대통령이 여러분을 만나러 비행기에 오르기 직전 샌프란시스코에서 부인들께 전화를 걸어 깜짝 놀라게 해 드렸습니다. 모두 여러분의 TV 생중계에 매우 감동받으셨다고 합니다. 잰과 팻은 여기 관제센터에서 방송을 시청했습니다. 어젯밤 케이프 커내버럴에서 예정됐던 인텔샛 발사가 네 번째로 연기되었습니다. 델타 로켓 2단에 있는 질소 조절기 오작동이 원인으로 알려졌습니다. 오늘 밤 다시 발사를 시도할 예정입니다. 멕시코 만류를 연구하는 잠수정 벤 프랭클린호가 조지아 해안에서 수심 406미터(1300피트) 해저면에서 3미터에서 30미터(10피트) 높이로 24시간 동안 표류하며 신기록을 세웠습니다. 이 임무는 자크 피카르가 이끌고 있습니다. 월리 쉬라가 디트로이트 공과대학 이사회에 5년 임기로 선출되었습니다. 그는 대학 발전 위원회에서 활동할 예정입니다. 에어 캐나다는 지난 5일 동안 달행 항공편 예약이 2300건 접수되었다고 밝혔습니다. 100곡이 넘는 곡이 장모님을 위해
जी हां। मैं भी इस पर गौर कर रहा हूं, और हम यही जानने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं कि ऐसा क्यों है, और हम आपको
San
يبدو أن أحد هذه الماسحات الضوئية يحتاج إلى راحة بين الحين وال
روجر. كانت الساعة 05:36 ودرجة الحرارة 3 درجات غربا
稍等，我这就去拿。这意味着我们还有一些额外的燃料可以用。所以我们现在
전면 덮개를 닫아보시겠
Combien de temps faut-il pour atteindre RET? 400 000? 2 + 38? Ça paraît vraiment cour
कोलंबिया लिफ
Okay, we'll put that together for you and we were just talking about the redundant components check and we were going to put that off until everybody's had a chance to get some 
了解しました。備考欄に「マイナスMA手続きが必要」
はい。Power-7ページのパネル16です。一番上の行で変更するのは、SYSTEM Bの「P
Apollo 8
Ok. L'in
Roger, Canary. Gemini. We're back on our regular Flight Plan, but at this time our Fl
了
좋아요. 저희의 수산화리튬 자가 교체 작업이 완료되었습
わかった。わかった、
Sag mir Bescheid, wann du das machen m
ठीक है। फ्रैंक, हमारी प्रक्रिया है चयन करना, फिर आगे बढ़ना और प्लेटफ़ॉर्म
Apollo 8, H
وباز، ما زلنا لا نتلقى أي بيانات م
Okay. Wir zeigen im Moment etwa 5,2 a
알겠습니다. -4시간 30분에 SEP(출발점) 설정을 시작합니다. 첫째, 밸런스 커플(BALANCE COUPLE)을 켜십시오. 둘째, 카운터를 0으로 초기화합니다. 404, 405, 406에 0을 더하고 470을 읽어냅니다. 셋째, 플러스-X를 초당 0.5피트로 변환합니다. 넷째, CM/SEP를 설정합니다. 다섯째, SEP 후 470을 0으로 초기화합니다. 여섯째, 자세 제어(ATTITUDE CONTROL)를 3으로 설
Roger. Nous continuons le traitement de vos bandes. La qualité vocale en haute définition est excellente, vous pouvez do
Houston, qui è Apollo 8. Siamo d'accordo. Sirio e Rigel sarebbero due stelle molto migliori di Navi e Polaris. Comunque, ho fatto Cassiop
Beh, ci stiamo lavorando ancora un po'. Non sono sicuro che sia tutto perduto. Sembra che il nostro problema sia che l'intensità luminosa rilevata dal nostro esposimetro rileva un campo medio molto più ampio della Terra, e quindi rileva una grande quantità di ambiente dello spazio profondo che è buio, e sospettiamo che questo stia probabilmente aprendo l'obiettivo a
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन, एसेन्शन कैप कॉम ऑन एचएफ, क्या आप इ
Gr
أبولو ١١، ه
Mais, Joe, en supposant que l'objet soit toujours stable… L'objet que je regardais était clairement en train de tourner sur l
À 58 heures et 10 minutes, il y a environ une heure, vous avez dépassé la durée totale de tous les vols spatiaux habités 
أتذكر ذلك بوضوح في هذه اللحظة. نعم، أرى أفقاً
收到。请监测主氧气源压力，并将氧气流量调至高流量模式，使氧气源压力保持在 930 至 960 ps
はい、
إلى فريد. لقد كشف نظام التشغيل IOS [؟] عن وجود قيم متفاعلات خلية الوقود في حالة تثبيت مرة أخر
20 20 19.2；射程，43.52；总速度
不错。我先用月亮
أنا مستعد لأعطيك شرحًا مفصلاً واختصارً
क्या दोनों होज़ कमांड मॉड्यूल में ऊपर की ओर ज
Sì. Penso che questa sia una buona rappresentazione della nostra velocità laterale al momento dell'atterraggio
Wir verst
Zensie
Okay. You're moving it toward the center of the screen now, and the e
Ricevuto. La cella a combustibile 1 ha mostrato un flusso di H2 leggermente più elevato rispetto al fl
アポロ8号。フライバイ操作を開始します。/63087、マイナス162、プラス129、プラス009 62、プラス005 68、マイナス020 77 000
Roger. PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50, minus 00021, 182 287 000, plus 56919. abort, less than 10 minutes, 105 12 30.00. abort, greater than 1
Хорошо. Панель 16, она находится на странице Power-7. Верхний ряд, единственное изменение: в разделе SYSTEM B откройте PQGS/DISPLAY
11号，这里是休斯顿。由于我们通过废水处理排水管进行了排气，我们得出结论，您的氧​​气流量传感器确实存在故障。您之前向我们讲解循环蓄水器排放时，我提到过，虽然它一直在移动，可能表明流量较高，但似乎流量不够高；基于此以及我们
这里是Sigma Seven电台，正在用
Unter mir zieht ein ziemlich großes Gewittergebiet auf. Es muss sich weit erstrecken, denn ich sehe Blitze bis weit rechts am Horizont. Auch hier, fast direkt unter mir, sind sie zu sehen. Nachts leuchten sie hier im Dunkeln besonders hell. S
I got out - I got out of kilter here; 
Fred, Houston. Si je comprends bi
ジェミニ
Gemini VIII，休斯顿 CAP COM。请确认您的 TR 减
地球上で太陽光線が反射して私たちの方に戻ってくる地点についてコメントがあります。一般的に、海の色は地球の半径の8分の1ほどの領域を除いて、ほぼ均一で明るい青色から濃い青色になっています。この円形の領域では、海の青色が灰色に変化しています。太陽光線が反射して私たちの方に戻ってくるのは
حسناً... ولكن ليس ك
Houston, Verseau. La Terre traverse la ligne ou l'angle de 10 degr
Lo
حسنًا يا بيل. أعتقد أنني أريد أن أتراجع عن كلامي الأخير بخصوص استخدام متجه الحالة المدمج للرقم 4. بعد مزيد من البحث على الأرض، عليهم البدء في إعداد البيانات وإجراء جميع حساباتهم، وبدلًا من تأجيل ذلك أو القيام به مرتين، سنمضي قدمًا في الإجراءات التي كنا نستخدمها طوال الوقت. فيما يتعلق بمدار القمر، كنا نراجع الأمر، وقد كلفنا عدة أشخاص - جاك شميت ورفاقه في الغرفة الخلفية - بدراسة تأثير النوافذ. وبشكل أساسي، يبدو أن هناك خيارين سيؤثران على الرقم 2. أحد الخيارين، بالطبع، هو أن تتبادل أنت 
الآن لستَ مضطراً لطلب ذلك مني، بل
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات لوصف نجاحكم. من المقرر أن يشاهد الرئيس نيكسون الليلة مباراة البيسبول في واشنطن. بعد المباراة، سيتوجه إلى منطقة عمليات الإنقاذ في المحيط الهادئ. مساء الأربعاء، سينتقل من جزيرة جونستون بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى سفينة الاتصالات البحرية أرلينغتون. ثم صباح الخميس، سيعود إلى الطائرة الهليكوبتر ويتجه إلى حاملة الطائرات هورنت في الوقت المناسب لمشاهدة هبوطكم في المحيط. سيرافق الرئيس وزير الخارجية ويليام روجرز وفرانك بورمان. سيشاهدون الهبوط من على متن سفينة الإنقاذ مع الأدميرال جون سيدني ماكين الابن، قائد قوات المحيط الهادئ. بعد إقامة الرئيس على متن هورنت، سينطلق في جولته الآسيوية وزيارته المقررة إلى رومانيا. يُعتقد أن المركبة لونا 15 قد تحطمت في بحر الأزمات أمس بعد أن دارت حول القمر 52 مرة. وذكرت وكالة الأنباء السوفيتية تاس أنه تم إجراء "أبحاث علمية" في الفضاء القريب من القمر. وقال السير برنارد لوفيل من مرصد جودريل بانك إن لونا 15 اصطدمت بسطح القمر بسرعة حوالي 300 ميل في الساعة. وقد ساد الهدوء النسبي مؤخرًا في فيتنام. وشوهد جنود أمريكيون يقومون بدوريات وهم يحملون أجهزة راديو ترانزستور مضبوطة على رحلة المركبة. وقامت شب
Roger. Thank
You'r
Ja, das ist verständlich. Du kannst sie ja notfalls immer noch benutzen. Ich schätze, es ist ziemlich sch
我认为T1和T2时
Und als Nächstes gehen wir zu Panel 11, s
아
Apollo 
Хорошо. Внизу, после "Кнопка ГЛАВНОГО РАЗВЕРТЫВАНИЯ, НАЖМИТЕ; КИСЛО
No, it's just going by 
オーケー、ヒューストン。ドッキングプローブが伸長し、すべての兆候は正常です。パイロアームまで到達し、
嘿，这引出一个问题。我们想知道你们打算把探测器和减速伞放在哪里？我们想到一个办
Okay, es sieht so aus, als ob wir über der Südspitze Afrikas einige beleuchtete Gebiete sehen. Ich habe definitiv eine Stadt in Sicht, und – hier spricht Sigma Seven. Im Sendemodus habe ich nur VOX-Aufnahme. Ich habe definitiv eine Stadt in Afrika in Sicht. Sie tauchte zum ersten Mal nach wenigen Sekunden auf. Die Lichter sind sehr deutlich zu er
Roger, Houston. Eagle with a count. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5; 5, 4,
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हमें लगता है कि हमने आपके बेहद व्यस्त कार्यक्रम में कुछ समय बचाने का तरीका ढूंढ लिया है। और वो तरीका है डॉक्ड कोर्स एलाइन का उपयोग 
هل تري
罗杰，弗兰克。我们想问问你们接
تفضل يا ثامناً. هذه هي 
O
ठीक है, फ्रेड। यह सही है, सिवाय इसके कि जिस एलाइन प्रक्रिया पर हम काम कर रहे हैं वह पृथ्वी/सूर्य एलाइन है, और इसके अलावा बाकी सब सही है। वैस
Роджер. Танг
This is Friendship Seven, cutting yaw on automatic and I'll control that manually; it keeps banging in and o
Похоже, провода оторвал
Ehi, chied
Bene. Il tuo orizzonte sarà illuminato
ठीक है, वैंस। निम्नलिखित चरण क्रमानुसार हैं: CB BAT B पावर एंट्री/पोस्टलैंडिंग, बंद। यह BAT बेकर है। MDC 3, AC इन्वर्टर 
はい、オリエンテーションモードに入りました。オートマチックモードで燃料量警告灯が点灯しています。今のところ大丈夫です。カプセルは制御下に
रॉजर। हम पूरी तरह सहमत हैं। और जब आप इस पर काम शुरू कर रहे हैं, मैं ये नोट्स पढ़ लूँगा। संभावित प्रोग्राम अलार्म 5.6, रेंज 400 नॉटिकल मील से अधिक, कॉल करें और फिर 20 पर बताए अनुसार उपयोग करें। NOUN 06 में विकल्प 1 लें और नो अपडेट मोड का उपयोग करें। रेंडेज़वस रडार क्षितिज से लगभग 25 डिग्री ऊंचाई पर लॉक हो जाएगा। यदि 503 अलार्म आता है, तो इसे विफल घोषित करें। PROCEED कुंजी दबाएँ और रेंडेज़वस रडार को खोज करने दें। और टेप मीटर को स्टॉप तक जाने से रोकने के लिए रेंज एल्टीट्यूड मॉनिटर स्विच को एल्टीट्यू
分かりました、ジム。ご希望の時間を教えていただけませんか？ご希望の時間であれば、自由に帰還できる方法を検討いたしますので、ご希望の時間を教えてい
你的氧气压力（
रॉजर। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। सभी 
알겠습니다. 먼저, 중간 항로 수정은 아마 104시간쯤에 이루어질 것이고, 우리가 목표로 하는 것은 델타-V가 초당 4~6피트(약 1.2~1.8미터) 정도입니다. 네, 이게 첫 번째 항목입니다. 이제 소모품에 대해 간략하게 설명드리겠습니다. 네. 현재 1498암페어시(Ah)가 남아 있습니다. 즉, 61시간 동안 평균적으로 24.5암페어시를 사용하게 됩니다. 전원이 꺼진 후에는 시간당 1.4~14암페어시를
Das ist richtig. Nach Abschluss des siebten Mittelkurses wird das Flugzeug in eine Trennungsposition manövriert. Diese Position wird dann auf eines der Landepads, die Sie vor Beginn der eigentlic
了解。まず、フランク、コンソールにいるスタッフ一同は、素晴らしいテレ
Roger, Sigma Seven. Would you give me your standard report again. Over.
알았어, 프레
يا فريد، بخصوص علب
جيم، لدى تشارلي بعض الإجراءات التي يجب عليك قراءتها هنا؛ أعتقد أنك ستحتاج إ
Хорошо. Я так понимаю, если Джек не сможет увидеть звёзды в таком положении после того, как вы зададите ему приблизительные углы наклона, мы не будем просто зачитывать вам углы наклона карданного подвеса и просить вас определить целевой угол 
Okay. Pannello 3: CARICA B
Roger. Vitesses réd
休斯顿，你现在看起来
است
네, 프랭크. 지금 저희가 검토 중인 사항 중 하나입니다. 현재 영상 말미가 몇 분 정도인데, 터미네이터 장면을 포함하도록 몇 
Vogliamo DISPLAY, aperto; ANTENNA BANDA S, chiusa - per evitare un ALLARME MASTER, TELECAMERA - SEQUENZA TELECAMERA, aperta; E sotto, vogliamo DISPLAY, aperto; TENSIONE BUS CC, chiuso; INVERTER 2, aperto; ECA DI SALITA, chiuso; CONTROLLO ECA DI SALITA, aperto; ECA DI DISCESA, chiuso; CONTROLLO ECA DI DISCESA, chiuso; CONNESS
Roger, Fred. Lo vediamo. 
ठीक है
أبولو 8، بينما ننتظر الوصول إلى أعلى مستوى للارتفاع، سأواصل تلخيص المسار. لا يزال بإمكاننا العودة إلى خط منتصف المحيط الهادئ من النقطة الثالثة عشرة، وستكونون في طريقكم بعد 138 ثانية من بدء الاحتراق. هذه المدة (138 ثانية) تُخرجكم من منطقة الفراشة. نوصي بعدم محاولة الإشعال المسبق أو إعادة التشغيل بعد 20 ثانية. إذا تجاوزتم 20 ثانية، فقد يتجاوز المسار قدرة التصحيح، مما يؤدي إلى عودة حرة. الطقس في منطقة الاستعادة جيد. لدينا رياح خلفية ورياح خارجية. أثناء الاحتراق، قد تلاحظون تغيرًا طفيفًا في ضغط غرفة الاحتراق وضغط الخزانات نتيجةً لنفاد الوقود في خزان التخزين وانتقاله إلى خزان التجميع. قد يحدث هذا في غضون 2 إلى 5 ثوانٍ من بدء الاحتراق. سيكون تغيرًا طفيفًا في الضغط في كلا النظامين. جميع الأنظمة جاهزة للعمل. نريد إيقاف غليان الماء بعد ذلك لأغراض المسار. يبدو وضع تصريف الماء جيدًا. يجب أن تكون الأمور على ما يرام، بل وأكثر من ذلك. سنحاول تأجيل تفريغ الماء حتى بعد الساعة 5. في هذه الأثناء، نود تحريك المبردا
로저입니다. 프
Roger. Ho una differenza piuttosto consistente tra i volt della batteria sul 5 e sul 
Okay. Ich warte,
11, Houston. Su quella TV, il nos
Temo che dovrai aspettare ancora un pai
Friendshi
Okay. Wi
Amicizia S
로저, 알겠습니다
这里是休斯顿，11号台。戈德斯通报告说，他们收到了来自你们这边的电视画面，虽然有点雪花，但整体画面清晰。完毕
好的，
Autonomia
네, 짐.
ア
また、長時間のチ
Okay. Und Sie möchten wissen, ob Sie zusätzlichen Sauerstoff verwenden können, um das Kommandomodul auf 5,0 zu bringen und den Druckausgleich 
Хорошо. Теперь у меня есть довольно много информации, которую 
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Хотите, чтобы мы начали заряжат
ठीक है। इंग्लैंड के जोड्रेल बैंक से, एपी के माध्यम से: ब्रिटेन की विशाल जोड्रेल बैंक रेडियो दूरबीन ने आज सुबह 5:49 पूर्वी मानक समय (ईएसटी) पर सोवियत संघ के मानवरहित चंद्र प्रक्षेपण से संकेत प्राप्त करना बंद कर दिया। एक प्रवक्ता ने कहा कि ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि लूना 15 अंतरिक्ष यान "चंद्रमा से आगे निकल गया है।" एक अन्य बयान: वेधशाला के निदेशक सर बर्नार्ड लवेल के प्रवक्ता ने कहा, "हमें नहीं लगता कि यह उतरा है।" वाशिंगटन यूपीआई: उपराष्ट्रपति स्पिरो टी. एग्न्यू ने वर्ष 2000 तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेजने का आह्वान किया है, लेकिन डेमोक्रेटिक नेताओं ने जवाब दिया कि पृथ्वी पर जरूरतों को प्राथमिकता दी जानी चाहिए। बुधवार को अपोलो 11 के प्रक्षेपण के समय उपस्थित वरिष्ठ सरकारी अधिकारी एग्न्यू ने स्पष्ट रूप से अपने लिए बोलते हुए कहा था, न कि निक्सन प्रशासन के लिए, "मेरे विचार में, हमें इस सदी के अंत तक मंगल ग्रह पर मनुष्य को भेज देना चाहिए।" लैरेडो, टेक्सास, एपी: नुएवो लैरेडो में आव्रजन अधिकारियों ने बुधवार को घोषणा की कि हिप्पियों को मेक्सिको में प्रवेश के लिए पर्यटक कार्ड नहीं दिए जाएंगे, जब तक कि वे स्नान न कर लें और बाल न कटवा लें। नुएवो लारेडो में मैक्सिकन आव्रजन प्रमुख ह्यूबर्टो काज़ारास ने कहा कि मैक्सिको सिटी, अकापुल्को और अन्य लोकप्रिय पर्यटन स्थलों के अधिकारियों ने हिप्पियों के बारे में शिकायतें दर्ज की हैं। यूनाइटेड प्रेस इंटरनेशनल के अनुसार: राष्ट्रपति निक्सन द्वारा संघीय कर्मचारियों को सोमवार को छुट्टी देने पर शुरुआती प्रतिक्रिया, ताकि वे अपोलो 11 चंद्रमा लैंडिंग मिशन में भागीदारी के राष्ट्रीय दिवस का पालन कर सकें, ज्यादातर आश्चर्य की थी। रॉडनी बिडनर, एसोसिएटेड प्रेस, लंदन एपी: यूरोप अपोलो 11 मिशन से मंत्रमुग्ध है। पूरे महाद्वीप के समाचार पत्रों ने अपने पन्ने सैटर्न वी रॉकेट के पृथ्वी के प्राकृतिक उपग्रह से पहला संपर्क स्थापित करने के लिए उड़ान भरने की तस्वीरों से भर दिए हैं। और शीर्षक लेखकों ने इस उपलब्धि की प्रशंसा करने के लिए शब्दों की भरमार कर दी। फ्रांसीसी समाचार पत्र ले फिगारो ने घोषणा की, "मानव इतिहास का सबसे बड़ा साहसिक कार्य शुरू हो गया है," जिसने केप कैनेडी की रिपोर्टों और मिशन के आरेखों के लिए चार पृष्ठ समर्पित किए। टैब्लॉइड पेरिस जूर ने घोषणा की, "पूरी दुनिया उन्हें वाहवाही दे रही है।" कम्युनिस्ट दैनिक 'ल'हुमनाइट' ने प्रक्षेपण की तस्वीर को प्रमुखता दी और अपने पूरे पिछले पृष्ठ को चंद्रमा पर उत्साहपूर्ण रिपोर्ट के लिए समर्पित किया, जिसमें उलटी गिनती और प्रक्षेपण, अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों की पत्नियों और परिवारों, और चंद्र गतिविधियों की पृष्ठभूमि का वर्णन किया गया था। हैम्पस्टेड, न्यूयॉर्क: पेशेवर फुटबॉल आयुक्त पीटर रोज़ेल के साथ अपने मतभेदों पर अपने साथियों के साथ एक बंद कमरे की बैठक के बाद, जो नामथ ने बुधवार को हॉफस्ट्रा विश्वविद्यालय में न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स प्रशिक्षण शिविर में आधिकारिक तौर पर रिपोर्ट किया। लंदन यूपीआई: बुधवार को हाउस ऑफ लॉर्ड्स को आश्वासन दिया गया कि
알겠습니다. 지상에서 두
Roger. Das war ein sehr kurzer Auftritt. Fred, könntest du uns bei Gelegenheit einen kurzen Überblick über das Panel geben? Lass uns Jack und 
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। हम यहाँ फिर से संगठित ह
わかりました。ステータススイッチがオフになっていることを
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Проверк
ジムさん、今のところはこれですべてです。他にご質問がなくなったら、ダウンボイスバックアップの設定を行ってください。いつものようにVOICE FUNCTIONスイッチをDOWNVOICE BACKUPに切り替えてください。ただし、ブレーカーを落とす代わりに、POWER AMPスイッチをオフにしてくださ
روجر، هيوستن. 6، /: 45701، ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 31776، ناقص 00823، ناقص 01365 180 016 001، غير متوفر، زائد 00188 31816 302 3
Char
هذه ق
أما بالنسبة للتعر
हम सीधे नीच
알 길이 없겠군요
Mit di
我们现在正忙着——嗯，要么是做三文鱼沙拉，要么是做其他类似的事情。这可
حسناً، فهمت. شكراً ل
Lo cercavo, ma non sono riuscito a individuarlo. Non l'ho visto. Diciamo che se avessi potuto guardare in basso, avrei potuto vedere molto di più. Vedo molto di più dall'esterno della navicella che dall'interno. Le cose sono
Это подтверждает мою точку зр
这里是友谊七号。我在所有轴向上都出现了一些不稳定的指示。当我通过仪器将所有数据校准到轨道姿态时，我发现实际
好的，杰克。我知道你已经完成了电池充电。杰克，如果你准备好了，我想告诉
Quali switch vuoi che 
ईगल, कोलंबिया। आपके उच्च लाभ कोण हैं - संशोधित - ईगल, ह्यूस्
All systems
11, Houston. Sembra che stiamo raccogliendo qualche particella di polvere in più. Ora le ve
Ré
Ещё два момента, Фред. Во-первых, мы не ожидаем практически никакого смещения вашего двигателя во время работы двигателя, поэтому мы не ожидаем каких-либо изменений его характеристик на протяжении всего процесса работы, особенно учитывая очень низкую тягу. Во-вторых,
조, 우리가 마지막
双子座 4，夏威夷 CAP COM
روجر. بالنسبة لتعديل الارتفاع، فإن: دلتا-في، 14.0؛ المدة، 0 زائد 24؛ ال
알겠습니다. 다시 읽어 드릴게요. 슈트 컴프레서 1번과 2번, OFF; 연료 전지 펌프 1번, 2번, 3번, OFF; G/N 전원, OFF; 메인
了解。分かり
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आप सही हैं; यह 2 है। यह अंतिम
जेमिनी VI, जेमिनी VI, 
你可能对你妻子们的评论很感兴趣。尼尔，简谈到昨天的活动时说：“昨晚简直完美得难以置信。能与我的丈夫、宇航员、载人航天中心、美国公众以及全人类共同分享月球探索开端的壮丽体验，我感到无比荣幸。” 随后有人问她是否认为登月是她一生中最伟大的时刻。她说：“不，那是我们结婚的那天。” 迈克，帕特简单地说：“真是太棒了！” 巴兹，琼——显然她还不太相信自己真的登上了月
Plutôt lumineu
Okay, Jim. I heard you say perpendicula
डेव ने बताया कि न्यूक्लियर इमल्शन 23 मिनट पर
了解。アダプタの数字を短く数えます。1、2、3、4、5。アンテナ選択、再
ठीक है, जिम। थ्रस्ट अच्छा दिख रहा 
À Reno, au Nevada, faute de cheminée, un petit garçon a écrit au Père Noël par l'intermédiaire du journal local, lui suggérant d'utiliser la porte d'entrée. Il faudra peut-être donner un petit coup de pied en bas, car elle coince. À Little Rock, en Arkansas, les bébés nés à l'hôpital St. Vincent pendant la semaine précédant Noël et jusqu'au jour de Noël sont remis à leurs mères, à leur sortie, dans d'immenses chaussettes de Noël rouges. Voici un exemple de coopération œcuménique. À Indio, en Californie, le chef de la police a reçu un livre de prières le jour de Noël. Le rabbin Phillip H. Weinburg a pris la relève pour 
好的。我得切换一下全向天线。好的。乔，看看第1-4页的更改，燃料电池加热
R
Yes. I gather it's on its 24 minute war
Ich verstehe dich laut und deutlich, Jack. Ich habe 
罗杰。我了解到电流大约在 13 到 14 安
Хорошо. Транспондер для встречи телезрителей, автобус для связи с самолетом, открыт; передатчик S-диапазона/автобу
روجر، CSQ. شكراً جزيلاً لك. كل شيء على ما 
로저. 저도 6단계에서 거의 다 왔어요.
Alcune di queste piccole depressioni *** tendono ad affondare - oh, forse 5 o 3 pollici. *** suggeriscono esattamente ciò che le immagini del Surveyor mostravano quando si allontanavano un po'. Si verifica un
Roger, Houston. minus 11, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 36325, minus 01727, plus 01428 180 003 000, not applicable, plus 00186 36394 323
ठीक है, जिम। अब मैं इसे आपको दो भागों में समझाता हूँ। पहला भाग कमांड मॉड्यूल उपकरण
फ्रेड, अब आप गोल्डस्टोन के बड़े सर्वर
Mit diesem Wiedereintrittsmechanismus ohne Auftrieb können wir Ihren optimalen Landepunkt (IP) vorhersagen und die Bergungskräfte etwa 15 Minuten vor Ihrer Ankunft dort einsetzen. Wir 
알겠습니다. 그 다음, CB CTE, MAIN B를 눌러 닫습니다. 다음으로, 250번 패널: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2를 눌러 닫고, CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING을 눌러 닫습니다. 다음으로, 275번 패널: CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B를 눌러 닫고, CB INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B를 눌러 닫습니다. 좋
C'est exact. Et cela correspond à la même attitude inertielle que celle indiquée au verso de votre carte d'in
わかりました。まず、この説明書には月の写真撮影
Gemini 4, Guaymas CAP COM. L'équipe de vol indique vouloir économiser du carburant. Vous recevrez des in
मेरा कहना 
You did not get 
لقد التقطت صورة، صورة جيدة جداً، لمطار القا
Bene, vorremmo sapere se nelle ultime 24 ore qualcuno ha avuto sintomi simili a quelli di Frank. Vorremmo anc
Эти часы нельзя передвинуть, как некоторые другие. Попробую установить время на PDI...
ह
はい、わかりました。すべて完了しました。他の手順もコピーしたいとおっしゃいましたか
Roger. Je comprends, Bill. Tu m'as promis d'attendre trois jours avant de co
L'O2 secondario e il bus princi
سأجرب استخدام ال
Jim, Roger. Abbiamo appena calcolato un tempo di manovra di circa 15 minuti, quindi se iniziate in qualsiasi momento tra ora e i prossimi 2 minuti, vi mett
Apollo 8, Hous
ह्य
对，对。差不
Okay, Jack, while Fred is putting away my helmet, you are looking over into Fred's station n
VHF をオンにするまで待ってください。そうしたら、ウーウーという音
अच्छी
ああ、この乗り物、埃まみれだ。いやあ！でも、着陸
धन्यवाद, अपोलो 11। मुझे यकीन है कि अगर उन्हें यह खबर नहीं मिली, तो उन्हें समाचारों के माध्यम से पता चल जाएगा, इसके
Sì, è proprio così. Siamo sbandati ve
わかりました、ジョー。返して、ここに書いてあるか確認しましょう。その後、六分儀を使ってベネット彗星を観測してもらいます。もし見えるようであれば、ロール角を記録してください。45度から75度の間で見えるはずです。155度ロールで見えなくなるはずです。もし見えたら、写真に撮れるかどうか観察し、観測開始前か後かに撮影する写真のロール角を記
로저. 알겠습니다, 닐. 다음 질문입니다. 착륙 직후에 말씀하셨듯이, +Z축을 따라 서쪽에 언덕이 있습니다. 그 방향에 일몰 시 태양광을 가릴 만한 큰 바위가 있습니까? 해당 지역의 일몰 시간에 태양광을 가릴 만한 큰 바위가 있는지 확인
ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि गुरुत्वाकर्षण प्रवणता प्रयोग की तरह, वहां चंद्रमा के केंद्र की ओर नीचे की ओर खींचने की
Роджер. Меня подсказывают, и ты
ठीक है। सब ठीक लग रहा है। फ्लाइट विभाग चाहता है कि आप उपकरण रखने की जगह के बारे में सोचें। वे एक केंद्र बिंदु (सीजी) निर्धारित करना चाहते हैं। इस
ر
Показания счетч
Je comprends que vous souhaitez 
Und, Fred-o, ich habe ein paar Schnellleistungsschalter für dich auf Pane
Сигма Семь, Сигма Сем
Майк, мы сей
Mein Fehler. Hast du d
알겠습니다... 회로 -
Roger. I've been reading you for some time. I've tried to contact you on HF with no success. My status is good; the capsule status is good; control mode is fly-by-wire; gyros caged; maneuver is off. The fuel reads 74-85 [percent]. Oxygen is 87-100 [percent]. The cabin temperature is a bit high at 104 [degrees]. The suit--steam vent temperature is
휴스턴,
ठीक है। मैं प्रोब को प्रील
巴兹，这里是休斯顿。如果你还在附近，能不能拍一张球在水平位
يعتقد باز أنه يجب أن ي
ومبا
Боже, как же сложно описать, как выглядит Земля. Я смотрю в своё круглое окно, и сейчас оно больше, чем Земля. Я отчётливо вижу терминатор. Я вижу большую часть Южной Америки, вплоть до Центральной Америки, Юкатана и полуострова Флорида. У восточного побережья наблюдается сильное вихревое движение, а дальше на восток я всё ещё вижу Западную Африку, которая сейчас покрыта облаками. Мы видим всё вплоть до мыса Горн в Южной Аме
阿波罗8号，休
هذا جيد
Stiamo procedendo con la clor
わかりました。それでは、このクレーター130プライムのグリッドスクエアを
Хорошо, Фред. Мы этого не объясняли. Это делает последовательность клави
ठीक है। यहाँ एक नोट है जिसमें लिखा है कि कैमरे के ऊपर वाले डोवेटेल का इस्तेमाल करें, न कि साइड वाले डोवेटेल का। ब्रैकेट पर माउंट करने के लिए कैमरे के ऊपर वाले डोवेटेल का इस्तेमाल करें और रॉकिंग नट को ब्रैकेट पर नीचे की ओर रखें, और नीचे का मतलब है आपकी माइनस X दिशा
D'accord. La note indique que vous devriez pouvoir nous entendre. Si nous ne vous entendons toujours pas dans quelques minutes, veuillez couper le disjoncteur de l'amplificateur de puissance sur le panneau 16. N
Wir haben da ein paar ziemlich aufreg
Хороший
ह्यूस्टन, अ
복사할 준비가 되면 언제
On page 28, step - perform step 4 with the following changes in the warning light status. Under the warning lights, you wil
All'inizio, l'operazione con il telescopio a scansione ci ha impedito di iniziare immediatamente gli avvistamenti come avevamo programmato, a causa di un'altra manovra evasiva. Lo scarico del telescopio ha causato un'enorme quantità di pseudo-stelle nella zona, rendendo praticamente impossibile la calibrazione ottica. Il metodo che avevamo elaborato non sembrava funzionare molto bene. Il metodo che ho infine utilizzato è stato quello di andare verso Sirio, la nostra stella più luminosa, prendere l'albero e il perno di appoggio e poi far volare la navicella fino a Sirio per usarli per l'ottica, cosa che abbiamo fatto in un secondo momento. Per quanto riguarda la dispersione della luce, sembra che a quasi qualsiasi assetto durante il nostro controllo termico passivo, riceviamo dispersione della luce nel telescopio a scansione. Si presenta principalmente sotto forma di un'ampia fascia di luce proprio al centro del telescopio, a circa 10 gradi in entrambe le direzioni rispetto allo zero. È molto difficile vedere le stelle in quest'area. I riallineamenti sono stati buoni. Sono riuscito a individuare la stella con il sestante per effettuare l'allineamento, ma 
Nous allons faire le pari sans aucun contact avec les statio
Tranquility, Houston. We'd like your readout, and we have double checked your EM dump. It all looks okay
Ok. Sembra una buona idea se vuoi andare avanti e dare un'occhiata al 37. E siamo pronti a lavorare su COM
Roger. Ti mando un aggiornamento D-9 quando sarai pronto a copi
D'accord. La photo est-elle trop sombre, Ja
アポロ8号、はっきりと聞こえました。現在、問題を確認
E
로저, 그 일 때문에 모두가 한동안 걱정했지만, 
Это «Дружба Семь». Топливо: 62-54 [процен
좀 나아지고 있네요. 1시나
Roger. Und 
ठीक
There is a slight rate in yaw about ½ degree per second, it's almost impossible to take out without having to fly it out. This does look like an appropriate time to get ready for an HF check. Turning th
На са
حسناً. ستكون زوايا وحدة القيادة كالتا
Vorrei darti un'idea della tua traiettoria. Sembra che una correzione di rotta di livello 1, proiettata a più 6 ore, sarebbe di soli 2,1 metri al secondo. Quindi, ovviamente, qualsiasi ulteriore manovra tu faccia aumenter
Sì, non riesco proprio a capirlo
네, 알겠습니다. 준비되셨다고 읽은 것 같은데... 이어폰을 깜빡했네요. 간단히 설명드리자면, 커맨드 모듈에서 카트리지 한 쌍을 더 꺼내고, 회색 접착 테이프를 접착면이 바깥쪽으로 향하게 해서 새 카트리지 윗부분 양쪽에 둘러 붙입니다. 그런 다음, 큐 카드 한 장을 2~3인치 정도의 정사각형으로 네 조각 잘라서 직각으로 구부려 모서리 지지대를 만들고, 이 지지대를 접착 테이프에 붙여서 기존 카트리지 위로 겹치도록 합
ジンバルについてはOKです、フレッド。14ページには他に何も記載がありません。15ページに進み、「CHECKOUT」の文言を削除し、「以下のスイッチを確認してください：GUIDANCE CONTROL、」とします。ステップ3、訂正です。3行目の「ATTITUDE CONTROL (3)」を「MODE CONTROL」、「MODE CONTROL (BOTH)」を「AUTO」に変更してください。ACA PROP、LMP ENABLE、ACA/4 JET、LMP ENABLE、/TRANSLATION、LMP、ENABLEを確認してくだ
Ja.
No. Era il settimo ch
इंटेलसैट 63 देशों का एक अंतरराष्ट्रीय संचार संघ है; यह पहले वैश्विक संचार नेटवर्क का चार्ट प्रदान करता है। नए उपग्रह की पूर्ण वाणिज्यिक सेवा 2 जनवरी से शुरू होने वाली
रोजर, काहिरा, 26वें रेव. जी.एम.टी. 07 18 37. ट्रैक से 12 समुद्री मील उत्तर-पश्चिम
Okay, Fred. Ich verstehe Sie jetzt gut. Okay. Wir bereiten gerade ein Verfahren für Sie vor: Wir führen in etwa 74 Stunden, also in etwas über 3 Stunden, einen Sonnencheck durch. Das ist eine zweite Sperre. Wir stellen Ihnen in Kürze ein detailliertes Verfahren zur Verfügung, das eine Radar-Neuzuordnung für das Rendezvous beinhaltet, um die Sperre zu umgehen, und ein Manöver zur Ausrichtung. Wir gehen davon aus
저 거대한
Va bene. Non c'è alcuna difficoltà a ricontattare la navicella. È tutto molto morbido, soprattutto se ci si muove lentamente e con calma. Sono molto grato di aver fatto questa esperienza. È fantastico, Gus. In questo 
Hallo aus Houston. Ihre Zinssätze sehen sehr stabil aus. Es scheint, als wären Ihre Zinssätze hier vollständig gedämpft. Soweit wir das beurteilen können, wäre es in Or
Okay, Joe. The last time we saw the positively was when Fred saw it venting at about - at about 5 hours. We think we might have picked it up later on. We saw a particle or something out there that was tumbling which might have been the booster or one of th
آه، لم يكن الغالق ينزل بشكل صح
Okay. Area 27-2 96. 2+02. 08 27 55. 6+35. 10+58. Area 28-2: ΔV 111. 2+20. 10 02 54. 4+50. 9+39. Area 29-2: Okay, this is a split ΔV. Forward 66. Aft 61. 1+48. 1+17. GMTRC 11 37 05. 3+43. 08+59. Area 24-DELTA: ΔV 
I think I know
Roger, this is Friendship Seven. I'm around at the 180 [degree] point. I'm facing the direction I'm traveli
此时，我进行
Cela rejoint certains problèmes que nous avions auparavant; nous essayons de vérifier si les données logicielles que nous obtenons correspondent aux données mécaniques. À
ठीक है। मैं आपको मुख्य बस बी के बारे में अपने अवलोकन बताता हूँ। वहाँ सब कुछ बहुत तेज़ी से हुआ, और हमने सबसे पहले टक्कर या विस्फोट या जो भी कारण था, उसकी आवाज़ सुनी, मुझे पक्का नहीं पता। इसके लगभग 1 सेकंड बाद, एक मास्टर अलार्म बजा, जो मुख्य बस बी के अंडरवोल्टेज का संकेत था। मैंने वोल्टेज देखा, और उस समय वोल्टेज ठीक था, इसलिए मुझे लगता है कि यह अचानक वोल्टेज बढ़ने की वजह से हुआ होगा। फ्यूल सेल 3 भी ठीक था, उसमें सही प्रवाह था। हालाँकि, उसी समय फ्रेड कमांड मॉड्यूल मे
Ok, Fred. Questa è una procedura per ottenere una lettura delle temperature del serbatoio del propellente di discesa. Non è un grosso problema, ma i nostri addetti dicono che la parte inferiore dello stadio di discesa si sta probabilmente raffreddando e vogliamo solo verificare che il serbatoio dell'acqua di discesa sia a posto. Al momento, sembra che non si congelerà prima di diverse ore dopo essere stato svuotato, ma vogliamo che tu ci legga queste temperature così possiamo verificare l'accuratezza delle nostr
...그리고 현재 주변에 뇌우가 매우 많습
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम पढ़ नहीं पा रहे हैं। ह्यूस्टन में स्थिति स्पष्ट नहीं है। पायलट मेडिकल के ल
इस स
了解。デルタVの33-1番尾翼を除いて全て入手できま
コロンビア、ヒューストン。今、2回目の
रॉजर, हम इस समय प्रयोग डी-9 के बीच में हैं।
In fact,
... наши количественные п
विद्युतीय
Très bien. Voici l'édition du 23 décembre de l'Interstellar Times, façon Paul Haney. Nous tenons à vous informer qu'il ne reste que deux jours avant Noël pour faire vos achats. Il dit que votre émission télévisée a connu un franc succès hier. Mickey Herskowitz cumule les fonctions pour le Post. Il a écrit deux articles sur votre lancement, en plus de ses chroniques sportives habituelles, et, Jim, votre mère a certainement apprécié votre message d'anniversaire. Vingt-et-un détenus se sont évadés d'une prison de La Nouvelle-Orléans hier, et le président Johnson est rentré chez lui hier soir après avoir été hospitalisé à l'hôpital naval de Bethesda suite à sa grippe. Il vous adresse un message spécial – non pas un remède
هل يمكننا الآن تأجيل الأمر قليلاً؟... لقد تأخرنا قليلاً في... سنحاول استئنا
罗杰。自从上次我们讨论这个问题以来，唯一的变化就是
И к вашему сведению, Колумбия, вы приближаетесь к пределу пря
Et vous, comment lisez-vous m
Хорошо. До начала осталось примерно 10 минут. Мы снова заберем вас в это время, и у нас буде
Roger, Jim. I've got a short procedure I would like to read up to you on your, and I'd like to explain what it i
Stop right there. That is worse, Bill. Go back where you were. You made it disappear to our 3 o'clock. Now it's coming back
ジェミニ4号、カーナボンCAP 
حسنًا. تم ضبط وضع 
안녕하세요, Muchea Com Tech입니다. Friendship Seven입니다. 잘 읽었습
好的。翻到下一页和最后一页，吉姆，34。页面顶部写着“通过470监控DELTA-VX”。划掉接下来的两行：“当推进剂数量等于37时”和“下降氦气调
Roger. Deke, lo strato di foschia è molto luminoso. Direi dagli 8 ai 10 gradi sopra l'orizzonte reale. E direi che lo strato di foschia è circa il dopp
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호 휴스턴입니다. 정확한 점검을 해드릴 
Beh, questo mi fa
Okay, Houston. We'll be done with in just a couple o
Ok. Lasciate che vi dia le mie osservazioni sul bus principale B. Lì le cose sono successe piuttosto velocemente, e per prima cosa abbiamo sentito l'impatto o l'esplosione o qualu
Hallo aus Houston. Ihre Zinssätze sehen sehr stabil aus. Es scheint, als wären Ihre Zinssätze hier vollständig gedämpft. Soweit wi
Нет, данные должны за
Okay, Jack. Ich gebe dir jetzt die Triebwerkskonfiguration. Able 1, Charlie 1 und Able 2 sind aus. Charlie 2, MAIN A und alle von mir als eingeschaltet bezeichneten Triebwerke sind an MAIN A angeschlossen. Baker 1 ist aus. Dog 1 ist an, Ba
コロンビア、ヒューストン。投棄姿勢の高ゲインのためのREACQ角度をいくつかお教えします。そうすれば、いつで
Roger. Vorremmo che tu segnassi esattamente dove si trova ora, Mike, e vorremmo due serie di segni su questo. Pass
У
هيوستن، أبولو 8. هل 
आपके पास 19 मिनट 
Okay. 
Esatto. Ok, andiamo a pa
Eagle, Houston. Nous avons examiné la mémoire E. 
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, Х
D'accord. Mais
بحسب وكالة أسوشيتد برس، شاهد الأمريكيون البابا بولس الثاني وهو يحتفل بقداس عيد الميلاد في إيطاليا، بينما تلقى ا
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. الخطوة التالية هي تشغيل مفتاح ربط ناقل البيانات الرئيسي B/C وقراءة جهد ناقل 
समझो। फेस-प्लेट्स खुले हैं और दस्ताने उतरे हु
Sì. Sono d'accordo, Jack. Jack Swigert e io siamo andati di sopra prima e abbiamo preso entrambi un contenitore, e stavamo cercando del materiale e pensando di usarlo, ed è proprio per questo che abbiamo preparato tutta l'acqua da bere perché avevamo bisogno del contenitore di plastica in cui erano conservati nella dispensa, e lo avevamo pronto all'uso con del materiale più alcuni dei sacchetti porosi
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven. Hier spricht Canton 
D'accord. Bon, elle va probablement te sauter dessus en rétroécla
CMC 検証済み、
ठीक है। हम इसी व्यवस्था
이제 다른 일을 해야 하므로 잠시 T
هل تصدق أنك تنظر إلى يخنة دجاج؟ كل ما عليك فعله هو سكب 90 مل من الماء الساخن لمدة 5 إلى 10 دقائق. الآن، نأخذ الماء الساخن من صنبور صغير هنا مزود بفلتر لتنقية الماء من أي غازات قد تكون موجودة فيه، ثم ندخل طرف هذا الأنبوب الصغير في الصنبور ونضغط على الزناد ثلاث مرات للحصول على 90 مل من الماء الساخن، ثم نهرس اليخنة ونقطع طرف الأنبوب، وهكذا تصبح يخن
Okay. Die Vorgehensweise ist wie f
Je remarque qu'à 3 h 26 min 33 s, j'observe en permanence 10 particules dans le ciel. Elles me semblent luire. Elles ressemblent à de petits morceaux de givre. Cependant, certaines paraissent très éloignées. Deux d'entre elles semblent se trouver à une centaine de mètres. Je n'ai pas utilisé le propulseur depuis un certain temps. En voici deux plus proches. Voici une mesure densimétrique de ces dernières. Disparues à 5,5, l'observation a duré 3 h 27 min 39 s. Je ne distingue
罗
Roger, Al. Sono in modalità automatica; retrograda; gli interruttori del giroscopio sono normali; la manovra è disattivata. La capsula è pronta per la retrosequenza, ma per stivare due carte. Sono sicuro che andiamo. Ho l'81 percento in modalità automatica, (carburante) e l'80 percento in modalità manuale (carburante), che è lo stesso del mio rapporto intermedio. Non sono cambiati. Ho 5
*** circ
음, 그럼 그렇게 해야겠네요. 제 
Roger. The recovery is.5 cloud cover, 10 miles vis, 3 knots and 360 degrees from the north, seas are 3 feet and very light, baromete
Apollo 8, this is Houston reading you fairly weak. I'll repeat the state vector information. Your state vector is now based on 5 hours, more than 5 hours of tracking.
Mancano 5 minuti al passaggio alla luc
Роджер. С топливом будет очень туго, Гас. Я уже вижу горизонт. Стараюсь держать ст
Ich glaube, ich sehe die Arbeitsl
That's affirmed, Jim. We have you up to 10.6 now, and we're willing to go a little higher on 
好的。8，/：45701，减 040，加
Хорошо, 11. У нас есть изображение. Мы в
صحيح، على تردد HF عند 3 + 20، كل شيء آخر على ما يرا
没错。一旦我们完成对准并进行时间调整，地面上的专家就能为我们提供服务舱分离姿态和指令舱对准
ここで、古い月の
わかりました。これは、降下用BATがすべてオンライン状態、そして昇降用BAT5と6が通常フィード状態である
रॉजर। आगामी दौड़ 
Roger. We know you're busy so we are not goi
C'est exact. Notre première manœuvre de pilotage était: 007 en avant, 005 à gauche et 007 vers le haut. La manœuvre finale à mi-parcours était: 004 en avant, 06 à droite e
Frontalino chiuso. L'ho aperto momentaneamente, solo per pulirmi il naso e cercare di pulire una lente, cosa che non riesco a fare. Selezione rientro. La 
— Je peux voir… Auriez-vous un repère topographique qui pourrait m'aider? Le système optique AUTO effectue un suivi entre deux cratères. 
好的，没错。现在我还要给你几个点，让你在曲线上标出
ठीक है, शायद आपने नहीं किया। वैस
Чарли, на этот раз давление в салоне
알겠습니다. 요컨대, 저희가 논의해야 할 내용은 S-II
بكل وضوح. نحن بصدد التح
J'ai mis à jour votre horloge TR avec l'heure du 18-1; elle est entrée 
Très bien. Il y a probablement quelques centimètres de sac qui dépassent au fond du récipient. Pour éviter que cela ne se colle à la grille du fond, nous vous demandons de couper l'excédent avec des ciseaux. Ensuite, découpez deux autres bandes de ruban adhésif d'e
تظهر لي سرعة حوالي 30 قد
了解しました。私たちもその件については考えていますが、一つ問題があります。通信ケーブル
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आपने अभी तक ऑक्सीजन पर्ज बंद नहीं किया है, तो कृपया इसे बंद कर द
Negative. Friendship Seven. I'm in orbit attitude. I'll try and go back on and see if it wo
هذا هو نقل وحدة التحكم، و...؛ رقم 2: ملف بيانات الرحلة في R-1، R-2، R-3؛ ثلاثة 
हाँ, वो हाइड्रोजन वाली बात, मुझे पक्का नहीं पता, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि ये बैकप्रेशर की समस्या है। अगर किसी भी तरह का बैकप्रेशर होता है, जैसे कि जब बैग लगा होता है, तो फ्लो रेट धीरे-धीरे कम होकर लगभग
La risposta è a
Jim will give y
ठीक है। हम कंप्यूटर को सभी मोड में चेक करना चाहते हैं। इस चेक के तीन चरण होंगे। सबसे पहले सभी IVI विंडो में 10 ft/sec की गति सेट करें। फिर मालफंक्शन रीसेट बटन दबाएं। इसके बाद स्टार्ट कंप बटन दबाएं और कंप्यूटर रनिंग लाइट के जलने का इंतज़ार करें। यह सभी मोड में करना है। अगर आपको कंप्यूटर के चलने का कोई संकेत नहीं मिलता है, तो आप एक और टेस्ट करेंगे। इस दूसरे टेस्ट में, आप सभी मोड में चेक करेंगे। आप कंप्यूटर को 2 सेकंड के लिए बंद करेंगे। कंप्यूटर को दोबारा
... 
Tu veux que je prenne ta liste de contrôle, Mike, et que je
よし。操作は
Votre minuteur de mission apparaît sous la f
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ただいま投棄中です。あと5分か
了解。パルスコントロールは最小限しか使用しませんでした。12番のターゲットは雲に隠れていましたが、時間と位置はほぼ正確に把握していました。ターゲットが見えていれば追跡できたはずです。13番のターゲットは雲がなく、アレクサンドリアの街を捉えることができました。空港は… 空港を探すのに集中できませんでした。空港は見えていたはずです。カメラを操作して、上空を通過した際にいくつか写真を撮りました。呼び出したデータから、ターゲットの位置は満
Das ist ein Roger, Jim. Was passiert, ist Folgendes: Wenn Sie aus der Rastposition herauskommen, werden die Fehleranzeigen zurückgesetzt und 
알겠습니다. 나머지 업데이트 내용을 보니 압력이 660~770psi 사이면 괜찮다고 하셨고, 770psi 이상
मिथुन राशि 4, आप जमीन पर बहुत अच्छे दिखत
82:
Roger. Wir haben versucht, den anderen Rotfilter davorzusetzen, aber er schien 
केन, यहाँ दो बातें हैं जिनकी वजह से इस सूट हीट एक्सचेंजर का प्रवाह थोड़ा अलग है। एक तो यह कि हम कोल्डसोक नहीं कर रहे हैं, और दूसरी यह कि हम सेकेंडरी लूप को पहले ही बंद कर रहे हैं। और मुझे लगता है कि ऐसे में सूट हीट एक्सचेंजर को सिर्फ 
这个睡眠周期——我想我们只能随机应变了。我现在应该睡觉了，但显然——
Да, в моем контрольном списке этого нет. Думаю, это хорошая идея, потому что мы немного скептически относимся к нашим вентиляторам в каюте и
Мои находят
आप चाहें तो स्विच कर सक
알겠습니다. 알겠습니다. 네, 맞습니다. 스위치를 '열림' 위치로 옮겼더니 다시 회색으로 돌아갔습니다.
Roger. Le ni
अरे यार, डायमंडबैक और स
역행 시퀀스를 시작합니다. 역행 태도
Roger. Se Neil ha un minuto liber
I can't g
Хорошо. В левой части страницы 2
D'accord, Jim. C'était une très bonne émission. On pense qu'il est temps d'y mettre un terme. Qu'en penses-
わかりました。もう一度、いろいろ試してみます。捕捉できるか確認してみます。オリオン座は少し左の方に見えますが、かなり近いですね…ああ、ここに。シリウスも
रॉजर। मैं आ
瞄准镜已收回，我想你
Frank, wo wir gerade von der Checkliste für die Einreise sprechen, dieses Kaltbad – hast du dich schon entschie
了解しました、カナリア。ジェミニ。通常の飛行計画に戻りました
روجر. تقرير حالة الطاقم كالتالي: الماء متوفر، وقد قطع القائد حوالي ٥٠ ميلاً حتى الآن اليوم؛ نقطة القيادة المركزية 
Roger. We'd l
Frank, on te l'a sans doute déjà dit,
Bene. Il primo è la modalità vocale NORMALE della banda S, OFF; il secondo, la modalità NORMALE della banda S, OFF; il terzo, l'interruttore RANGING della modalità NORMALE della banda S su RANGING; e il quarto, l'interruttore AUX del nastro S-baud, OFF. Fine
是的，我算是
Charlie, quello che ti suggeriamo, prima di iniziare, è di spegnere entrambe le nostre tute e di collegare il suo cavo blu al mio condizionatore di segnale blu e vedere se riusciamo
Хорошо. Ка
ر
रॉजर। आपको सूचित किया जाता है कि मेरी खिड़की से हवाई द्वीप समूह का नज़ारा बहुत साफ़ दिख रहा है। मैं लगभग 30 सेकंड में उनके ऊपर से 
Oui, i
Apollo 
Ро
Р
Sigma Seven. Don't forget to watch your your cabin pressure and your altimeter.
Roger. Kopieren Sie den Missionstimer, der jetzt statisch ist.
थोड़ी देर 
11, 휴스턴. 여기는 교대 
ठीक है, टैंक 1, 75.97. टै
Die Greenwich-Zeit ist 03:1
D'accord, surtout ne l'appelez pas le frigo. D'accord. Aux alentours de -19 °C, on revient à la liste de contrôle d'entrée standard à la page 2-2, où elle commenc
ठीक है, मैंने कैमरा बंद कर दिया ताकि मैं इसे सेव 
Bon. Il n'y a pas grand-chose de nouveau dans l'actualité ce matin. C'est plutôt calme. Le principal sujet d'actualité concerne le nombre d'accidents – les décès survenus pendant les fêtes – ce qui n'est certainement pas une bonne nouvelle, mais on dénombre 233 morts à l'échelle nationale, dont 9 à Houston la veille et le jour de Noël. Du côté international, les familles ont de nouveau fait parler d'elles. Voici ce qu'on a appris: « Les familles des membres d'équipage d'Apollo 8 ont adressé un message de Noël au commandant de la Marine Lloyd Bucher, capitaine de l'USS Pueblo, dont l'équipage a été libéré cette semaine par la Corée du Nord. Le message, adressé au commandant et à son épouse, à l'hôpital naval de San Diego, disait: « Vous êtes dans nos pensées et nos prières. Vos retrouvailles nous ont remplis de joie en ce jour de Noël. Nos meilleurs vœux à vous personnellement et à toutes les familles sous votre commandement. » Il é
C'è un cratere in arrivo, Buzz? Proprio qui. Non so se riesci a vederlo o no. Se non lo vedi, fammi fare una foto perché è davvero... grosso... sul fondo. Non ha un bell'aspet
分かりまし
...чтобы "Настроение включилось", У
Ricevuto. Sull'idrogeno, serbatoio idrogeno 1 19,7; serbatoio
D'accord. Merci. Je suis ravi d'apprendre que le système fonctionne bien. Auriez-vous une suggestion d'attitude? Celle-ci me semble con
Ich melde mich nach einer etwa 45-minütigen Pause kurz. Uns ist aufgefallen, dass Sie Ihre Hochleistungsantenne optimal nutzen können, indem Sie bei einem Gierwinkel von 90 Grad und einem Nickwinkel von -45 Grad von der OMNI-Antenne auf diese umschalten. Sie nutzen die OMNI-Antenne derzeit etwa 10 Minuten länger, was in Ordnung ist. Mit dieser Vorgehensweise könnten Sie die Hochleistungs
يستمر ضغط غرفة الاحتراق؛ وقد وصل إلى حوالي 97 - 98 بالم
كم تعتقد أننا كنا على بعد عندما رأيناه لأول مرة؟ أعتقد أننا كنا على
Roger. Abbiamo messo il cartello sb
ठीक है। पावर 6। ठीक है। पावर 6 पैनल 11 को दर्शाता 
And tell Glenn Parker down at the Cape that he 
نعم، يمكنك إلقاء نظرة - إذا كنت تبحث عن شيء تفعله، يمكنك فقط إلقاء نظرة على ال
どう
Подтверждаем. Предполагаем, что у вас ош
هيوستن، لماذا لا يمكنني البقاء في وضع الانت
현재 이슬점 편차는 습구 온도 약 65°, 건구 온도 약 73° 정도입니다.
ロジャー。ビルさん、ちょっと興味があるので、クライオタンクのヒーターとファンについて少しお話しします。ヒーターは正常に作動しており、オンとオフを繰り返し
صباح الخير يا كسول. الأنظمة جاهزة ل
我想稍微谈谈六分仪。在空间狭小的航天器里使用六分仪非常困难，尤其是在戴着头盔的情况下。我最终意识到，戴着头盔去调整观测目标星体所需的角度是徒劳的。所以我摘下了头盔。这让我在使用六分仪时更加灵活，但即便如此，在不操纵航天器的情况下，我的角度仍然被限制在20到23度左右。这样一来，目标星体就会被观测窗口的上半部分遮挡住。当然，通过更频繁、更灵活地操纵航天器，你可以调整它，使观测窗口的长轴位于你的跟踪平面上。但由于燃料有限，我们没有选择这种操纵方式。我们也使用了脉冲模式，并且没有进行太多的机动。那次观测选择的星体角度都比较大，因此很难观测到地平线。我们最终决定让星星更靠近地平线一些。正如你所看到的，我拍摄了几颗老人星和其他几颗星。蓝色滤镜似乎完全遮挡了地平线；使用它时，我根本看不到地平线。在月光下，我们的地平线图像可能不太清晰。不过，绿色滤镜让
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait pas fonctionner correctement. La méthode que j'ai finalement utilisée consistait à entrer dans [nom de la zone manquante], à nous rendre à Sirius, notre étoile la plus brillante, à récupérer l'axe et le tourillon, puis à faire voyager le vaisseau spatial jusqu'à Sirius pour l'utiliser pour l'optique, ce que nous avons fait ultérieurement. En ce qui concerne la diffusion de la lumière, il semble que, quelle que soit l'attitude pendant notre contrôle thermique passif, nous recevions de la lumière diffusée dans le télescope de balayage. Cela se présente principalement sous la forme d'une large bande de lumière traversant le centre du télescope, à environ 10 degrés de part et d'autre de zéro. Il est très difficile de voir les étoiles dans cette zone. Les réalignements ont été bons. J'ai pu repérer l'étoile dans le sextant pour effectuer l'alignement, mais je n'ai pas pu identifier l'étoile utilisée pour des observations telles que Regor ou Menkent avec le télescope de balayage. L
Roger. La combustion s'est déroulée comme prévu (environ 2 secondes); le résidu est de 4,4 X. Nous l'avons entièrement br
Die Temperaturen der Oxidator- und Brennstoffzuleitungen liegen bei 75 Grad und bleiben konstant. Die Temperaturen des Servicemodul-Quad-Packages schwanken zwischen 120 und 140 Grad, und es sieht so aus, als ob die H
Qu'en pen
好的，谢谢。我们会尽力，但这确实有点难。你就像受制于星月，你只能指着那里
Ge
Ah, verstehe. Versuchen Sie, das Fadenkreuz ohne einge
रॉजर। चंद्रमा की हमारी यह यात्रा आपको शायद सरल या आसान लगी हो। मैं आपको आश्वस्त करना चाहता हूँ कि ऐसा बिल्कुल नहीं था। जिस सैटर्न वी रॉकेट ने हमें कक्षा में पहुँचाया, वह एक अविश्वसनीय रूप से जटिल मशीन है, जिसका हर एक पुर्जा त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता है। मेरे सिर के ऊपर स्थित इस कंप्यूटर में 38,000 शब्दों की शब्दावली है, जिनमें से प्रत्येक शब्द को हमारे, यानी चालक दल के लिए अत्यंत महत्वपूर्ण होने के लिए बहुत सावधानी से चुना गया है। मेरे हाथ में जो स्विच है, उसके कमांड मॉड्यूल में ही 300 से अधिक समकक्ष हैं, इस एक स्विच डिज़ाइन में ही। इसके अलावा, असंख्य सर्किट ब्रेकर, लीवर, रॉड और अन्य संबंधित नियंत्रण उपकरण भी हैं। हमारे सर्विस मॉड्यूल के पिछले हिस्से में स्थित हमारा विशाल रॉकेट इंजन त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता रहा होगा, अन्यथा हम चंद्र कक्षा में ही फँस जाते। मेरे सिर के ऊपर लगे पैराशूट को कल भी पूरी तरह से काम करना होगा, अन्यथा हम समुद्र में गिर जाएँगे। हमें हमेशा से विश्वास रहा है कि यह सभी उप
Le brassard est gonflé à bloc, on le relâche. OK, on ​​a une tension artérielle
Oh, you can go ahea
了解、ジム。前回よりほんの少し浅いですが、しっかりとしたトラッキン
还有，水瓶座，告诉你一声，我们现在的近地点距离太阳136英里。多普勒雷达已经确
Ho 0,7 miglia e ti ho preso a 31 piedi al secondo,... stai 
Apollo 1
ठीक है, मुझे
Okay. We want to check the computer in all modes. There will be three steps to this check. First put 10 ft/sec in all IVI windows. Then push the Malfunction Reset. Then press the Start Comp and watch for a Computer Running Light indication. You will do this in all modes. If you do not - I repeat - do not get an indication of computer running, then you will perform another test. In this other test, you will check in all modes. You will turn the computer OFF for 2 seconds - the Computer power OFF for 2 seconds. After the computer has been repowered, repress the manual Malfunction Reset and also Start Comp. If you get a Computer Running Light 
Und 11
Houston, zeigen Sie die - Houston, Apollo 
Прошло ровно 9
ジェミニ4号、こちらヒューストン。音は聞こえません。ヒューストンは視界不良です。パイロット、メディカルデータに備えよ。
結構です、ガスさん。副操縦士の血圧を測っていただきたいのですが、あ
Roger. J'ai reçu le DCS, régl
रॉजर। आप आगे बढ़ सकते हैं - आप पावर से उतरने की प्रक्रिया जारी रख सकते हैं। आप पावर से उतरने की प्रक्रिया जारी रख सकते हैं
ठीक है। क्या आप 
Fra
11, nous vous demandons de passer à une configuration d'antenne OMNI. Veuillez configurer l'antenne bande S en mode Bravo et l'antenne bande
罗杰。我想要知道舱内温度和舱
알았어. 그리고 잭, 기동에 사용하는 방법
Okay. Brennregeln. Wir sollten den Brennvorgang abbrechen, wenn der Schubmonitor 77 % oder weniger anzeigt; 2. wenn der Treibstoffdruck unter 160 psi liegt; 3. wenn das Verhältnis von Treibstoff zu Oxidator Δp ​​größer als 25 ist (dies führt zu einer Bodenwarnung); 4. wenn der Lagefehler ± 10 Grad beträgt (außer bei Anlaufvorgängen). Okay. Die Ratenbegrenzungen liegen bei ± 10 Grad pro Se
रॉजर। आपसे बात करके अच्छा लगा। स
はい。これは暫定的な結果ですが、ある程度の目安にはなるでしょう。補正高度は17±4キロメートルで、±4キロメートルという数値は、高度の判断が非常に一貫していることを示しています。実効高度は10±12キロメートルです。コメントとしては、先ほども申し上げたように、地平線の選択は一貫しているということです。恒星下点の誤差は平均15分角で、誤差を最小限に抑えることがで
ठीक है, वैंस। प्रक्रिया: मार्गदर्शन नियंत्रण,; मोड नियंत्रण, अभिवृत्ति बनाए रखें;, एंटर; अभिवृत्ति के लिए पैंतरेबाज़ी करें; रोल 0, पिच 90, यॉ 0; मेरी गेंद अब, ज़ाहिर है, काम नहीं कर रही है, इसलिए मु
Il est 17h21 GMT et je ne sais pas exactement dans quelle direction je pointe, mais il y a une multitude de rayons qui s'élèven
ठीक है। माइक, हुआ ये कि - आप वहाँ बैठकर निगरानी कर रहे थे, और स्टेप 7 पर आप NOUN 01 में गए, और पता टाइप किया, फिर INFORMATION INFORMATION; और उसके ठीक बाद, जब आपने 35400 का आखिरी ENTER दबाया, तो आप वापस 16 पर आ गए। फिर जब आपने ENTER दबाया, तो आप असल में CDU में जानकारी दर्ज कर रहे थे; और जब आपने रजिस्टर 1 और 2 में दो प्रविष्टियाँ दर्ज कीं, तो CDU में तुरंत बदलाव हुआ, और उसने उसे देखा और पाया कि उसके पास क्या है। हे भगवान! मुझे 600 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड की दर मिली। और उसने उस दर को कम करने के लिए जेट चालू कर दिए। और जिस दर को यह देख रहा है - वह दर फ़िल्टर की हुई ह
了解しました。コピーしたプラス11のマニューバについて質問があります。コメント欄に7
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। जायरोस सामान्य स्थिति में वापस 
Sigma Seven。我没听懂上次的通话内容，但我想您应该已经读懂
了解。ロールスキャ
रॉजर, आप
Okay, Jack. Now you can put the itself; that is, take it out of the inner bag, put it in the outer bag, and stow it some place; we 
Ok, Jim. Dopo aver ottenuto un orientamento un po' più ripido, eseguiamo una linea di deflessione dell'asse del corpo che si trova a 400 più 5 sul. Se la 
짐, 고이득이 확보되었는지, S-밴드 안테나가 무지향성 모드인지, 그리고 무지향성 B 안테나가 올바른 안
すべてのリクエストに GO をお願いします。そうでない場合は、ご指示に従っ
西格玛七号，这
Okay. Gehen Sie zu Bedienfeld 380, O2-Bedarfsreglerventil, AUS, und Anzugskreis-R
フラ
Roger. Der Einlass des Anzugs beträgt 78 Grad. Die Einstellung am 
Roger. Alle
罗杰。我们原本打算让你睡到大约190小时。
Хорошо. У меня есть гироскопы в обычном режиме, автоматическом режиме и в режиме с 
Jim, nous sommes prêts à remettre la batterie en service. Veuillez ouvrir le disjoncteur CROSS TIE BAL LOAD, panneau 16, puis remettre la batterie BAT 2 en serv
Non proprio, Jim. Ha a che fare con questa matrice W
好了。休斯顿，我刚测了一下地球亮度，是320。地球现在的亮度是320流明。比尔，如果你能拍到吉姆·洛弗尔的特写，就可以让大家看看，在胡子大赛上，他已
Okay. Klingt gut. Spannung: 39,1 Volt; Stromstärke: 1
了解。了解。位相調整は02 18 26 49.3、1プラス07、ヨー0、ピッチ0、25、004
Roger. Read you
روجر. في عملية تخفيض الضغط القادمة، يُمكنك استخدام صمام تفريغ فتحة السقف بالإضافة إلى صمام تفريغ فتحة السقف الأمامية أو بدلاً منه لتسريع عملية تخفيض الضغط داخل المقصورة. لديّ تحديث T13 لك،
पेगास
いつ出発できるか、クワッドの温度計のデータはありましたか？ タイムハックをしています。確認させていた
ऊपर उगते उस तारे को देखो—क्या तुम्हें वह दिखाई दे रहा है? या वह हमारा ही 
仅供参考，休斯顿，在绕月飞行期间——就在绕月飞行之前，我们看到很多碎片从我们身边漂浮，其中包括一些——一块相当大的碎片看起来像是某种绳索的包装物，
रॉजर। हमारी भंडारण सूची के अनुसार, लैंडिंग साइट ऑब्लिक ट्रांसफर बैग में होनी चाहिए। लेकिन बैकअप डेटा सेट में, इंटरमीडिएट स्केल ऑब्लिक चंद्र लैंडमार्क बुक म
好的。还有，当偏航角超过50度时，你要提醒我，所
收到。明白了，尼尔。下一个问题，就像你着陆后指出的那样，沿着Z轴正方向西边有一座小山。那个方
그건 좀 더 알아내기 어려울 것 같습니다. 마이크
ठीक है, आगे बढ़ते हैं। "बर्न टाइम माइनस 1 सेकंड पर शटडाउन" के बाद, हम अगली पंक्ति हटाते हैं; और हम "एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल: यॉ, टू पल्स" हटाते हैं; हम "वाई, जेड ट्रांसलेशन के माध्यम से अत्यधिक दरों को कम करें" हटाते हैं; हम "नल" त्रुटि सुई वाली पंक्ति जोड़ते हैं, ट्रिम करते हैं - त्रुट
حسناً يا جاك. لقد مرت الأرض للتو بزاوية 
안
حسناً، لدينا إشارة جيدة هن
はい、その通りです。これでカードは完了です。残りの更新情報は、58時間のプラットフォームに基づいた参考情報です。プラットフォームをご覧ください。非常に良好な状態です。ジャイロスコープは、プロットされた更新情報以降、ほとんどドリフトがありません。Xはマイナス2.24、Yはポイントプラス0.87、Zはマイナス0.11でした。52時間に基づいた更新情報以降、Xドリフトはプラス0.79、ヨーはプラス1.06、Zはプラス0.02となっています。52時間と57時間の調整の違いがわかります。ドリフトチェックに関する本当に良い
네, 맞습니다, 잭. 1-8페이지로 가죠. 두 번째 줄에 'SUIT POWER's OFF'라고 적혀 있습니다. 
Roger. E noi siamo pronti a fare il nostro allineamento preferito in questo momento.
そこ
Okay. Für den mittleren Pazifik sind die Bedingungen im Allgemeinen gut. Sie können mit einer Wolkenuntergrenze von 2000 Fuß (aufgelockert), einer Sichtweite von 10 Meilen, Wind aus 070° mit 12 Knoten, Wellenhöhen von 4 Fuß und einem Höhenmesser von 2974 rechnen. Sonnenaufgang ist um 10:00 Uhr UTC, erste Dämmerung um 16:49 Uhr UTC. Das Raumschiff ist die Yorktown; die Flugzeuge sind Airboss 1 und 2 sowie Recoveries 1, 2 und 3. Die geschätzte Zeit bis zum Eintreffen des Raumschiffs beträgt 15 Minuten. Die Yorktown befindet sich am Zielpunkt, die Airboss-Flugzeuge sind vor Ort. Die Recoveries 1, 2 und 3 sind SH3 Alfas und begleiten die Yorktown, befind
روجر. في المرة القادمة التي ألقي فيها نظر
Хорошо. Мы на странице активации 12 и 13, шаг 4, и проверяем, что сигналы обратной связи отображаются серым цветом, и они отображаются как «барбе
로저. 방금 도착
لا أعرف. لقد صعدتُ إلى الطابق العلوي، وأنا الآن في الأسفل يا جاك. أعتقد أنه عندما يصعد جاك، يمكنه إلقاء نظرة وإخباري. حسنًا، سأفكر في الانتقال إلى الخلف مباشرةً. أرى القمر، ويبدو القمر جميلًا يا جاك، لذا أعتقد أننا ما زل
Roge
わかりました。窓 1 から何か排気口が見えていて、4 インチ四方の銀色の金属片が見えました。排気口はまだ
Tr
알겠습니다. 그렇게 하겠습니다. 찰리, 여기에는 아무런 제약 조건이 없는 것 같은데요. 지난번에 8에서 
안녕하세요,
Ormai è qu
Rog
沃利，你能看到弗兰克的胡子
ह्यूस्टन
मुझे समझ नहीं आ रहा कि इस केबिन
ठीक है, चैनल पर - पृष्ठ 18 पर, ठीक नीचे तक, सब कुछ "इग्निशन" के बाद तक मान्य रहता है; "यदि इग्नि
Roger, I just
حس
Nur zu, 
Merci beaucoup. D'accord, je vais vous lire ces quantités. Il était 17 h 16 GMT au départ. Quantité de propergol: 60. Température cabine: 92. Température de la combinaison: 58. Pression cabine: 5,6. CO₂ de la combinaison: 0,75 mmHg. Bouteille d'O₂ secondaire gauche: 5100. Bouteille d'O₂ secondaire droite: 5050. Quantité d'O₂ 
로저, 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 4시 29분 10초에 또 다른 시간 해킹을 시도하
프레드, 높은 비트 전송률로는 잠금이 해제되지 
로저. 11, /: 45597, 0 - 수정 - 마이너스 0.40, 플러스 1.57, 플러스 36325, 마이너스 0.1727, 플러스 0.1428 180 0.03 0.00, 노벰버 알파, 플러스 0.0186 36394 323 36186 42 0.995 254; 스코르피이 델타, 하강 103, 좌측 48, 플러스 0.742, 마이너스 16500 13005 36327; 시리우스와 리겔, 129 155 0.10, 4개의 쿼드, 15초; T 마이너스 
बिल्कुल। खेल पृष्ठ पर ज़्यादा हलचल नहीं है। बास्केटबॉल के दोनों सर्वेक्षणों में यूसीएलए शीर्ष पर है। अगर आपको क
대기하세요. 좋습니다. 배트 C 37, 파이로 배트
ठीक है। चरण 2: "बैलेंस कपल, बंद; डेड बैंड, न्यूनतम; एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल: पिच औ
حسنًا. في هذه الأثناء، لنعد إلى نقطة البداية فيما
Aveva difficoltà a mantenere l'orientamento, e da quel momento in poi mi è sembrato che si orientasse fuori dalla navicella senza prestare attenzione alla direzione in cui puntava. Riusciva effettivamente a imprimerle velocità piuttosto elevate, fino a 2° al secondo. Intendevo mantenerle al di sotto di quel livello. Mentre risaliva nella navicella, abbiamo avuto notevoli difficoltà con il portello. Per prima cosa abbiamo sollevato la parte a cricchetto del portello per agganciarlo. Dopo averlo ag
РЕГУЛИРОВКА ВРАЩЕНИЯ, ПИТАНИЕ, ПРЯМОЕ, два и
이 모든 걸 청소
حسنًا. شكرًا لك. قم ب
와, 저 
제미니 4호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 재진입 구역, 즉 충돌 지점의 날씨
Хорош
Ein großes Lob an den Koch! Das Essen ist hervorragend. Diese Hühnercremesuppe verdient min
——然后他喝了他那杯美味的橙汁。或许我应该说他喝了他的橙汁。他平时没这么快。比尔今天真是赶时间。
I just took a picture. Frame no. 14 on the Contarex the same film pack we used for the EVA. There's the start of a long area of clouds. It appears to be cut-off between the desert area and the mountainou
Apollo 8, Houston. Si vous n'avez pas besoin de
कोलंबिय
روجر، متى قمت بإيقاف تشغيل جهاز
水素タンク 2 のヒーターは
さあ、ヒューストン、ジェミニ
11番、ヒューストン。カメラを動かすと、美しい虹が見
Hier spricht Jim. Ich habe große Schwierigkeiten, meine Entfernung zum Booster einzuschätzen. Die beiden Lichter blinken gelegentlich auf, und das ist das Einzige, was mir überhaupt meine Position – also die Entfernung 
Okay, Jim. Wir überlegen noch, wie wir die Korrektur durchführen können, aber einige unserer Überlegungen lassen uns vermuten, dass wir sie bis zu 118 Stunden nach Landung ohne nennenswerte Delta-V-Einbußen vornehmen können. Wir werden den Kurs anschließend noch ausreichend überwachen, um sicherzustellen, dass wir alles richtig gemacht haben und Sie für eine spätere Landung vorbereiten können, falls nötig – was aber unwahrscheinlich ist. Wir sind mit dem aktuellen Modus zufrieden und arbeiten zwar an einem anderen Modus für die Zeit na
Okay. The star check at the entry a
Привет, Джим. В
وسا
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Valerie Anders am Heiligabend, während sie und ihre Familie darauf warteten, dass Apollo 8 die Mondumlaufbahn verließ und zur Erde zurückkehrte. Frau Anders war am Dienstag um Mitternacht dort gewesen, und die Nachbarn hatten gerade alle Kinder zus
No, it - it was not uncomfortable at all but I was recalling the ride on 8, and the was more - much more
Und wieder brauchen wir eine kleine Lagekorrektur. Unsere Erde verschwindet nach oben und rechts. Unsere Erde und deine Erde. In die falsche Richtung, in die falsche Richtung. Noch ein bisschen. Okay. Das ist gut, wenn du sie so halten kannst. Hoppla! Jetzt ruts
昼食の時
रॉजर। ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8। बैकअप संचार जांच के लिए 
حسنًا. الآن أ
... Tasche
Vous avez une bonne puissance de signal en bande S maintenant, Housto
Roger, Guaymas, alles klar und deutlich. Mein Steuermodus ist jetzt Fly-by-Wire; die Gyroskope sind deaktiviert, ich bin drin – Manöver sind ausgeschaltet. Ich gehe direkt in den Automatikmodus. Mein Status ist gut; der Kapselstatus ist gut. Der Treibstoffstand liegt bei 69-69 Prozent, der Sauerstoffgehalt bei 88-100 Prozent. Die Temperaturanzeige am Kabinendampfventi
Rog
카나리
13、ヒューストン。クワッ
ハッセルブラッド
Okay. We
حسنًا يا جاك. في قائمة التحقق الخاصة 
D'accord. Je vais te prendre quelques photos, Ed. Je devrais pouvoir te faire d
I
Хорошо. Затем, когда 
好
روجر. هذه إ
Верно
حسنًا يا بيل. سيكون هذا في الصفحة 2، القسم 22 من خطة رحلتك. بالنسبة لقائد وحدة القيادة - لقد ذكرت ذلك له بالفعل - ولكن في أعلى الصفحة، في الواقع، نود منه أن يقوم بمحاذاة النجوم الأربعة، بروكيون، ريجولوس، ألفارد، وندرك أن ألفارد قد لا يكون نجمًا جيدًا، وريجولوس ع
마이크, 제가 당신의 체크리스트를 가져다가 대충 훑어보기만
Roger, Jim. Lorsque nous avons perdu notre antenne ici, nous avons interrompu l'enregistrement de votre bande, nou
هناك شيء و
Okay, 
Roger. Wir sind uns vollkommen einig. Während Sie damit beginnen, lese ich diese Hinweise. Rufen Sie den möglichen Programmalarm 5.6 auf, Entfernung größer als 400 Seemeilen, und verwenden Sie dann die unter Punkt 20 beschriebene Vorgehensweise. Wählen Sie Option 1 in NOUN 06 und verwenden Sie den Modus „Keine Aktualisierung“. Das Rendezvous-Radar erfasst das Ziel bei etwa 25 Grad Elevation über dem Horizont. Bei Alarm 503 wählen Sie „Fehler“. Drücken Sie die Taste „Proceed“ und lassen Sie da
ठीक है। मैं आपकी बात समझ गया, लेकिन आपक
Forza Houston. Apollo 8
C'est exact. Sachez également que Wally Schir
أخبرهم أنه ليس لدينا ما نفعله 
Jack, ils ne veulent pas donner de chiffre précis pour l'instant car ils disent que les réser
로저. 제 
If I can get him to keep his hands off my,
Okay. Jetzt sehen Sie im unteren Teil Ihres Bildschirms einen Thruster-
روجر. لديك بعض زوايا الميل والانحراف لحر
D'accord. La page 
حسنً
ス
オーケー。エリア27-2 96. 2+02. 08 27 55. 6+35. 10+58。エリア28-2: ΔV 111. 2+20. 10 02 54. 4+50. 9+39。エリア29-2: オーケー、これは分割ΔVです。前方 66. 後方 61. 1+48. 1+17。GMTRC 11 37 05. 3+43. 08+59。エリア24-DELTA: ΔV 89. 1+53. 03 45 30. 11+03。エリア25-DELTA: 86. 1+49. 05 19 09. 09+51。 26-B
よし。まず、赤フィルター、偏光フィルター、赤と青のフィルターホルダ
分かりました。ミッドコースについては、これまで通りのやり方で概ね合意が得られていると思います。窓については、中央の窓は基本的に使えません。両サイドの窓は観測には問題ないかもしれませんが、ランデブー用の窓はかなり小さいのが問題です。窓については、状況判断で臨機応変に対応するしかないと思っています。どのような機能を搭載できるか、まだよく分かっ
まだ何もないよ、フ
了解、マイク。ラン
...Я хочу знать, 
로저, 다시 말씀드리지만 RET 400 K 13+48입니다. 
C'est un peu chaotique. Je n'ai pas beaucoup d'expérience. C'est un peu le même système que celui utilisé par les Es
알겠습니다. 스퀜브 스위치 작동 완료; 자동 역추진 스위치 해제; 자이로스코프 정상 작동; 수동 핸들 풀림; 롤, 요, 피치 핸들 
Okay, Fred. Vorher, also eine Stunde vor dem Start, manövriere die Drohne auf folgende Winkel: Rollen 130°, Nicken 125°, Gieren 12,4°. Die entsprechenden Kardanwinkel sind: Rollen 291°, Nicken 196°, Gieren 45°. Das war
मैं केबिन का दबाव ब
那太好了。你觉
حسناً، أبولو 8. يبدو أن هذ
Погода в районе эвакуац
事实上
Roger, on va le chercher. C'est une excellente idée; on va le chercher, mais on consommera moins de carburant. On dirait que Jim est bien tranquille. Il n'a pas bougé depuis une heure 
حسنًا، ١١. ممتاز. الآن، بخصوص حاوية العينات الموثقة: بدا لنا على التلفاز أن العينات المخصصة لتلك الحاوية كانت تُقدم بالفعل - أي يتم اختيارها بناءً على د
Roger. Wir haben auch
Roger. Tu vois enc
ह्यूस्टन, एक्वेरियस। आप हमसे कौन सी किताब प्रकाशित करवाना चाहत
こちらがジェミニ4号です。約47時間経過した時点で、トランスレーション2-アルファ、ホライズンスキャンモードセットチェック、ホライズンスキャンスラスタプルームチェックを削除し、D-9を挿入して
حسنًا يا جاك. في قا
로저. 그리고 좋은 아침입니다, 제리.
العودة إلى المركز الأول على تردد UHF عند مرور 4
その Re
— — нужно иметь возможность это увидеть. Есть ли у вас какие-нибудь топографические ориентиры, которые могли бы мне помочь? Автоматическая оптика отслеживает пространство между двумя кратерами. Один из них, как видит наблюдатель, будет длинным, расположенным на 11 часах. Другой будет коротким и позади него, на 5 часах. Это о
正解です、ジャック。では、2-5ページをご覧ください。一番上の「地平線チェック」の行は、今は「月没チェック」になっています。時刻は約57分37秒で
Хорошо. Насколько мне известно, никто из нас не принимал никаких лекарств, и се
Okay, Fred. Ic
Ok
罗杰。迪克，这层薄雾非常亮。我估计它在地平线以上8到10度。而且，这层薄雾的高度大约是日落时那条明亮的蓝色光带的两倍，
روجر، جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بي يعمل، من المفترض أن يضيء مؤشر الكمبيوتر في غضون 10 ثوانٍ تقريب
جيم، هيوستن. هل ارتديت
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。您还有4分40秒到达。请再次确认您的S波段AUX开关是
حسنًا. سأخبرك بمكانهما. كلاهما موجودان، كما تقول، مع تعرض الجزء السفلي
Я со
روجر، فهمت. نحن في الوضع الذي يكون فيه ر
没错。吉姆现在手里拿着的是一支笔，我们用绳子把它绑了起来，做成一个简易的加速度计。这次燃烧时间很短，我甚至不确定它能显示多少数据。但我们会看看绳子末端的笔尖会不会
Okay. RN, RP, plus 77, pitch angle at 400
D'accord, Vance, et je suppose que je vais essaye
Roger, Eagle. Coming at you with a PAD: 101 36 14.07, minus 00758, plus all balls, plus 00098 plus 
حسناً. نطاق L في جهاز الإرسال وا
ठीक है। बैटरी चार्जिंग से संबंधित सवालों के जवाब में, मेरा अनुमान है कि यह पूरी तरह चार्ज हो जाएगी। लेकिन इसे वैसे ही इस्तेमाल करें जैसे अपशिष्ट निकास को। अ
Houston, did you g
如果你读懂了，请告诉我……来自低温测量仪……数量
Nun, es besteht kein Zweifel daran, dass dies etwas kleiner ist als die
Roger. Purge de la pile à combustible à oxygène à 113 h 30. Retour au calendrier nominal
Okay. That sounds good, Char
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。ダイレク
Apollo 11, qui Houston a 1 minuto. Traiettoria e guida sembrano buone, e anc
3
حسنًا. أعلم أنك تحاول التزام الهدوء، لذا سأقرأ لك بعض المعلومات. من بين الأمور التي توصلنا إليها مؤخرًا والتي قد تمنحك بعض الاطمئنان، أنه في حال فقدان خزان الأكسجين المبرد، يتبقى لديك 80 رطلاً عند /. العامل المحدد لتشغيل الطائرة بخزان واحد حاليًا هو خزان الهيدروجين
好的。昨
Okay. We have a - a couple of pads to give you and stand by. Let's - we'll 
제미니 4, 
À ce moment précis, il ne serait pas pratique pour nous de nous retourner ou de nous déplacer dans presque aucune direction pour éviter la lumière du soleil, alors que nous avons u
Tutto bloccato. Verificare che la valvola deviatr
क्या बात है? ऑक्सीजन हाई रेट चालू नहीं हो रह
네. 제가 계속 모니터링하고 있는데, 빌 씨 보기엔 아주 괜찮아 보입니다. 잠시만 기다려 주시면 전문가에게 확인해
少しだけ…はい、スポーツファンの皆さん、こんにちは。少しだけ私も映っています。それと、ニールが中央のソファに座っていて、バズがカメラワークをし
Хорошо, Майк. Я постар
حسناً. صفقة جيدة. انظر إلى شعاع الم
Questo è negativo. Aspetta. Tutto quello che vogl
Roger, Carnarvon. Gemelli
حسنًا. أولًا، يبدو أنه من المستحيل تجاهل حقيقة أنكم تتصدرون جميع الأخبار هنا على الأرض. حتى صحيفة برافدا الروسية تتصدر عناوينها 
Ricevuto. Ricevuto. Dieci o 15 secondi in discesa, quasi t
Ok. Durante la fase di attivazione, eseguiamo molti INSERIMENTI simultaneamente, leggendo la differenza negli angoli e poi forniamo gli angoli di post-torsione, per allineare ben
마이크, 지금 
Um auf meine Nachbesprechung zum Booster vom Anfang des Fluges zurückzukommen: Nachdem wir in die Dunkelheit eingetreten waren, in einer geschätzten Entfernung von 1200 Fuß, versuchte ich, die Position des Boosters zu halten. Zu diesem Zeitpunkt konnte ich meine Entfernung zum Booster jedoch nur anhand des Abstands zwischen den blinkenden Lichtern einschätzen. Gelegentlich – nicht gelegentlich, sondern ständig – sah ich ein Licht, dann zwei, dann wieder nur eines, und manchmal verging eine lange Zeit, bis ich wieder zwei Lichter sah. Dies deutete darauf hin, dass sich der Booster permanent drehte. Ich hatte keine Ahnung, in welche Richtung er flog. Anhand des Abstands zwischen den Lichtern, wenn ich beide sehen konnte, fühlte ich mich bis etwa Carnarvon in einer recht guten Position. Dort schien ich mich recht schnell zu nähern, obwohl ich mir dessen nicht sicher war. Die gesamte bis dahin akkumulierte Geschwindigkeitsänderung (Δv) hatte in Richtung des Boosters, also retrograd, gewirkt. Leider positionierte sich die verdammte Boosterrakete immer wieder so, dass ich, um sie aufzuholen, einen positiven Kurskorrekturflug einleiten musste, was mich dann wi
Ma non dev'essere stato un p
フ
Fred, nach ein paar Minuten könnten wir, wenn es dir passt, ein paar Innenaufnahmen machen, falls du Zeit ha
حسناً.
جيميني 4، هذه هيوستن. ليس لدينا أي شيء آخر. يمكنك إيقاف تشغيل جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص ب
了解しました。現時点では、月面図鑑に関す
空间少得
了解しました。1番がオン、2番がオフの設定になっています
휴스턴 트랭퀼리티 기지. 334를 추천
What? -- Well, I think when we finish
Ну что ж, хорошо. Сегодня утром давайте посмотрим, насколько близко линия М будет к параллельности. Перед тем, как мы начали разметку в первый раз, оказалось, что расчет этих трех углов был несколько неточным, и я тратил много топлива, пытаясь достичь этих трех угл
双子座 4，夏威
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 
और इससे आपकी समयसीमा थोड़ी ज्यादा व्यस्त हो सकती है, क्योंकि आपको अपने सूट आखिरी मिनट में, जैसे कि प्रवेश
로저. 우정 7. 저도 당신의 말을 좀 알아듣지 못했습니다. 제 상태는 좋습니다. 연료 5, 정정합니다. 연료 64-48
روجر. الصدا
ठी
كولومبيا، كولومبيا، 
私はスモールエンドフォワードで、彼らは前進していました
Roger. Attendez une minu
Roger, be advised that so far we've had to avoid... any water floating around
現在のデータによると、進入角はマイナス6.03度です。中間コースでのデルタVは
Et Fred, Houston. Dans quelques instants, je vais vous lire une procédure et vous demander de la noter pour une utilisation ultérieure. Il s'agit d'une procédure pour m
Houston, l'Apollo 8 è di nuovo in assetto, si legge ne
알겠습니다. 이번 관측에서 달은 LMP 창의 윗부분에 나타났고, 더 높이 떠 있었습니다. 짐은 각도를 -15도
رو
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. Goldstone says it - TV looks really gre
रॉजर। हमें वह
E, ogni tanto, sai, un pezzettino di qualcosa colpisce la... come si chiama quella... copertura? L'intero modulo lunare trema ogni 
알겠습니다. 원격 측정 데이
双子座
OK, vérification de l'alignement. -10° en tangage, -10° en lacet et -10° e
Anche questo è più 37. Esattamente 10
Hey Ken, hat irgendjemand eine Ahn
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन, यह वाटरटाउन कॉम टेक है। मैं आपको 3 बाय 3 पढ़ रहा हूँ। प्रतीक्षा करें, मैं आपको कॉम-कैप कॉम को स
Vance, to my calculations, we have taken about 10 Earth window photography pictures. I see nothing coming up here except
Roger, I'll let yo
D'accord. Utilisez la caméra de surface à 1/250e, f/4, f/5,6 et f/8. J'ai beaucoup photographié à deux de ces ouvertures, entre f/5,6 et f/8. J'ai aussi pris quelques photos à f/11, donc je 
这是友谊七。这是为什么呢？你有什
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。少しお待ちいただけますか？チャーリーとフライトは気象情報収集のため外出中です。すぐに戻りま
Roger. Hey Jim, solange du wach bist und es schön ruhig ist, lass mich dir noch ein paar Dinge mitgeben, über die du nachdenken solltest. Eines ganz konkret. Ich weiß, keiner von euch schläft richtig, weil es so kalt ist, und ihr solltet viell
حسنًا يا جاك، دعني أتأكد من فهمي. ما نفعله هو توجيه المركبة نحو الأرض كما فعلنا في منتصف المسار، ثم نقوم بمحاذاة محور الجسم. بعد ذلك، تُعطينا وضعية الكرة للطيران إلى... ثم نوجه المركبة نحو ا
खिड़की से तेज़ रोशनी आ रही है। मुझे सच में नहीं पता कि ये क्या है। इस समय तो सूर्यास्त होने वाला है। पेरिस्कोप पर अंधेरा छाया हुआ है। शायद मैं क्षितिज को आखिरी बार द
好的。接下来，关闭电路保护
Роджер. Эти параметры остаются неизменными: тангаж 224 градуса, рыскание 020 градусов. На следующей странице, стра
아, 거의 다 왔어요, 짐. 우리 모두 당신이 거의 올바른 태도를 보이고 있다는 데 동의하지만, 완전히는 아니에요. 이제 앞으로 어떻게 나아가야 할지에 대한 확실한 조언을 
जी हाँ, बिल्कुल। बहुत भीड़ है। हमारा
それは、電圧を読み取ることができるバッテリー充電回路ブレーカーでしたが、正確な名前はまだわかりません
روجر. دعني أساعدك في حساب التوقيت الرجعي الجديد من كيب كانافيرال. سيكون توقيتي من لحظة الإطلاق 04 + 28 + 45 عند علامتي. استعد، 2، 3، 4،
रॉजर। और मुझे कुछ और बातें पता हैं, माइक। हमें इस समय बैटरी बी का चार्ज बंद करना होगा, और साथ ही, छिटपुट गरज-चमक के कारण हमारे लक्षित लैंडिंग पॉइंट पर मौसम बहुत खराब है। हम उनमें से किसी एक में फंसना नहीं चाहते, इसलिए हम - आपका लक्ष्य बिंदु आगे की ओर ले जा रहे हैं। सुधार, यह आगे की ओर होगा, 1500 नॉटिकल मील की एंट्री के लिए, ताकि हम अपलिफ्ट कंट्रोल सुनिश्चित कर सकें। नए निर्देशांक 13 डिग्री, 19 मिनट उत्तर, 169 डिग्री, 10 मिनट पश्चिम हैं। उस क्षेत्र में मौसम बहुत अच्छा है। हमें 2000 और 8000 नॉटिकल मील की छिटपुट गरज-चमक मिल रही है, दृश्यता 10 मील है और समुद्र में 6 फुट ऊंची
罗杰，没
わかりました。もう一つ覚えておいていただきたいのは、私たちはまだ月を見ていないということです。月全体を見ていないし、帰る途中もほとんど見ていません。出発してから一度だけ月を見ましたが、視認姿勢から最短ルートへ移動する際に間違った操作をしてしまったのです。地球視点から月視点へ切り替えるには、かなりの時間がかかります
Apollo 11, Houston. Sembra 
حسنًا، النجم الأول: الارتفاع المصحح 15 كيلومترًا زائد أو ناقص 4؛ والارتفاع الفعلي 12 كيلومترًا زائد أو ناقص 7. أما بالنسبة للنقطة تحت النجمية، فالقيمة دقيقة قوسية - دقيقتان قوسيتان، 
好的，我会把这件事报告给海角
क्षितिज जल्द ही दिखाई देने लगेगा और शायद सूरज की रोशनी ह
... Gemelli 4, 
Apollo 11, Houston. Abbiamo preso il vostro vettore di bordo e lo abbiamo propagato in avanti, e sembra davvero a posto. Abbiamo solo circa 24 minuti di tracciamento. Davvero troppo presto per dir
ROT CONTROL POWER、番号 2 - 
उससे कुछ पंक्तियाँ नीचे जहाँ आपको "DAC ON for 4 seconds at about 50 frame rate cover
Stand by Buzz. It looks pretty good as far as I could tell. We got the - along the tropical convergence line there, there's a few clouds shown on the weather map I'm looking at here, but nothing of significance. Right now - Stand by. Let's see, right now in the mid - yes, at the MPL - we've got 3000 scattered, visibility 10, waves height 3 feet, is the present weather. I don't think there's anything forecast to be of significance. There are a couple of - FLIGHT just informed me that what I just gave you was the fore
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Ho le Pleiadi in vista da qui, molto nitide. Ora sto notando alcune di queste form
我认为，这片区域的表面颜色与我们从轨道上以大约
Roger. Copying you loud and clear... your foot on the ground. Be advised to go to a heads-up position, heads-up attitude for a test critical tape dump over Hawaii that's in about 5 or 6 minute
確かにそうでした。おそらく1マイルから2マイルくらい
ح
Хорошо, Водолей, Хьюстон. С учетом текущего количества энергии в вашем лунном модуле, которое составляет более 500 ампер-часо
زمن المرحلة النهائية المنقضي: 1
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Correction de trajectoire n° 2. SPS/G&N 63059, +097, -020, allumage 026
अपो
TR
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। क्या
حسنًا. لم يتناول أحد أي أدوية أخرى؛ لم يتناول أحد أي ماريزين؛ لا أحد مريض. تناول بيل حبة واحدة من تلك الحبوب، حبة سيكوينال منومة، ا
Отдайте им это по
慣性については了解しました。それでは2PADに進みます。2、SPS/G&N：38320、プラス166、マイナス081。TIG 080 11 3603。NOUN 81：マイナス01408、マイナス全球、マイナス00743。全球をロール、196 359 00657、プラス00537。DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531。六分儀の星 23 1160 138。その他のPADはNAです。アライン、ベガとデネブ 243 183 012。アレージ、2機のジェット機 19秒。備考：積載物については、フライトプランに記載されている値ではなく、R1 20101をお願いします。六分儀による星のチェックは、星が地平線上に出る79度30分10秒から、太陽に比較的近いため、地元の日の出となる79度52分10秒の間で行う必要があります。バーンの向きは頭を下向きにし、地元の水平線に対して逆行で28度上向きにします。NOUN 4
Я пока воздержусь от использования маяка. Часы показывают примерно то же время, что и при включении, так что они будут работать примерно в это же время. Расходных материалов у ме
Ok
ठीक है। मैं फिर से शुरू कर
Это Friendship Seven. Нет, не знаю; в этом районе слишком много облаков. Я заснял огни в Перте в хорошем состоянии; они были очень четкими, но я не заснял огни в Вумере; из
Al
Okay. Jim is going to take a shot of us from the lower equipment bay, and then we have to get back to our passive thermal control in the bar-b-que mode so that we don't get 
Und Fred
Neil, la communication est coupée. On ne vous comprend plus. Si je comprends bien, vous avez mentionné un conteneur d'échantillons de secours sur 
はい、1分ほどで夢中にな
난 그 말
हम आपको लगभग 2 मिनट में यहाँ 
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. تصحيح المسار رقم ٢. SPS/G&N ٦٣٠٥٩، زائد ٠٩٧، ناقص ٠٢٠، الإشعال ٠٢٦٤٤ ٥٧٩٢، زائد ٠٠١١٨، ناقص ٠٠٠٠٣، زائد ٠٠١٧٧، لفة ٢٧٧ ٣٥٥ ٠١٥، الكتلة غير 
Okay. Ich lese es hier nochmal vor
D'accord, Fred. L'image commence à être
Je suis d'ac
Er setzt s
ठीक है। अपोजी पर वापस जाना लागू नहीं होता; पेरिजी, प्लस 00191। और आपको
Нет, ещё нет. Наверное, ещё зима
Du m
حسنًا. نحن نستعد لتسليم المهام، وأردتُ مراجعة بعض النقاط قبل ذلك. يبدو أن سرعة الرياح لا تتجاوز 0.3 قدم في الثانية، لذا لن يكون هناك حرق للرياح في المسار المتوسط ​​رقم 6. المسار المتوسط ​​رقم 7 أكبر قليلًا، وسنتخذ قرارًا بشأنه لاحقًا. لا يزال الطقس في موقع الهبوط جيدًا، والتوقعات تشير إلى هطول أمطار متفرقة بنسبة 2000 وأمطار متقطعة بنسبة 12000، وهي نفس الأرقام التي أُعطيت لفرانك سابقًا. ستكون الرؤية حوالي 10 أميال، وارتفاع الموج حوالي 4 أقدام. وأعتقد أن هناك بعض العواصف الرعدية المتفرقة، بنسبة أقل من 5%، والتي يجب أن تقلقوا بشأنها. وتتراوح نسبتها بين 10 و30% عند هطول أمطار متقطعة بنسبة 2000، على عكس الأمطار المتفرقة؛ لذا يبدو الوضع جيدًا. 
Летает скорее как космический корабль, чем как симуля
अभी यह CLOSED स्थिति में है
أما بالنسبة لملف القرص المضغوط: فقد
Nein, ich habe nicht kopiert. Ich lese sie nu
了解、ビル。状態ベクトルの更新を受け入れる設定にしてくれないか？スロットにセットするから
ヴァンスさん、皆さんはどんなカメラを使いたいか考えましたか？今はハッセルブラッド250をセットアップして、私はハッ
Verseau, Houston. Négatif. Nous souhaitons rester tels quels, mais nous aimerions établir un lien entre vos observations et les simulations que nous allons effectuer. Si vous pouviez nous indiquer quelles étoiles vous apercevez par la fenêtre
Fantastico! Sarò felice di vederli. Ti mostriamo GO qui a terra e ho ricevuto un aggiornamento sulla manovra di settembre quando sarai pronto
Apollo
Roger. Du siehst hier unten gut au
Apollo 11, Houston. Ho un PAD TLI-plus-11-hour quando sei pr
Je vous mets ici en position GRATUITE, et je regard
OK, 13. Ici Houston. Il semble que nous ayons une perte de flux d'O2 au niveau de la pile à combustible 3. Nous vous demandons donc de fermer la vanne REAC de la pile à combustible 3. Les piles à combustible 1 et 2 s
Apollo 11, Houston. Non sono sicuro che tu abbia ricevuto la mia ultima trasmissione, dato che stavamo appena sostituendo gli OMNI. Vorremmo anticipare l'ora di scarico dell'acqua di circa 5 minuti. E ti daremo un'indicazione precisa sull'ora di inizio dello sc
Friendship Seven, this is Zanzibar Cap Com reading you wea
Ich weiß es nicht; der Ze
알겠습니다. 명사 46, 31021, + 25248 + 09050. 이
还没，一切似乎都很顺利。现在正在进行偏航检查。一切都按
Okay. PC plus 2.; plus 0819.2, minus 0020.0, minus 0218.9; NA; plus 
次に、BAT
ロジャー、ま
11, Houston. Die RETRO-Leute wollten fragen, ob Sie uns über jegliches nicht nomin
Roger, qui è G
好的，但我觉得
Roger. That is
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अगली बार जब हम रोल 0 से गुजरेंगे, तो हम रुकेंगे और इससे हमें 90 डिग्री का पिच मिलेगा। अब, मैं समझता हूँ कि आप चाहते हैं कि हम प्लेटफ़ॉर्म अलाइनमेंट के लिए 90 डिग्री पिच से 0 डिग्री पिच पर जाएँ, विकल्प 1। क्या यह सह
Bien. On a eu une grosse tempête de neige ici dans le Midwest; je ne sais pas si vous pouvez la voir d'ici. À Houston, d'ailleurs, il commence à faire assez frais, envi
ジム
짐, 제가 말씀드리는 건 화상 관련 태도 문제를 연구하는 사람들이 아직 최종 결론을 내리지 못했다는 겁니다. 하지만 
... breve re
روجر. قيمة RETRB لديك هي 16+10. أ
Okay. Dovrebbe essere B
Vuoi scattare delle foto qui? Forza, perché non prepa
ठीक है। हमने सभी से राय ली। हमें ज्यादा जानकारी नहीं है, लेकिन आपके उपभोग्य तत्व अच्छे दिख रहे हैं; आपका एंट्री गामा फिलहाल -6.01 है। हम 2.81 फुट प्रति सेकंड की मध्य गति की उम्मीद कर रहे हैं, जो लगभग 21 सेकंड की उड़ान हो
Хорошо, Джим, на этом наша процедура отключения питани
Préparez-vous à brûle
하원 세입위원회는 어제 석유 회사, 은행, 공공사업체에 영향을 미치는 세제 개편안에 동의했는데, 이는 연방 정부 수입을 연간 최대 20억 달러까지 늘릴 수 있을 
Что ж, насчет вашего я не уверен. Могу рассказать о своем, и отчет
C'est bon, c'est parti! Huntsville indique que votre chargeur de propergol a une autonomie de 6 secondes, soit 3 secondes de plus qu'un boîtier 3-sigma; vous n'avez donc pas de problème de consommables. Le réglage est tellement bon que nous n'allons pas le modifier. Le seul changement concerne la liste de vérification. À 57 minutes, lorsque vous avez réglé l'avance à 18 degrés, nous recommandons 20 degrés, et nous vous conseillons de viser 8 degrés au lieu de 6 à l'allumage. L'avance est actuellement à la limite supérie
情况不错，弗兰克。我们刚刚接收了另一批数据，正在处理中。初步看来，我们甚至不需要进行第二次中期分析。数据处理完毕后，我们会立即给你确认。整个过程大概需要15到30分钟
Pour
ジム、君が今持っているものと同じかそれ以上のものを手に入れる唯一の方法は、G&Nをガンガンに上げることだけだ。だが、我々は…そんなことはしたくない。だから、我々の計画は、この状況から得られるものを何でも受け入れることだ。そうすれば、君が燃え尽きる頃には、君が望む場所にたどり着いているかもし
Tranquility, this is Houston. We need a second set of readings so that we may establish a r
1 33
没关系。她简直太不可思议了
嗯，我
Rog
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们正在通过Honeysuckle接收您的数据，但比特率很
Roger, we'll stand
Houston, Jack sagte, er habe schon angefangen, und in einer weiteren Minute 
यह खुद को बंद करने की कोशिश कर रहा ह
That's cor
규모를 다시 한번 말씀해 주
Apol
Мы попытались немного сместить частоту, чтобы уменьшить помехи. Думаю, это прозвучит так: «Вам нужно включить кислород для снижения и выключить кислород для подъема. Конец связи. И запросить ВПЕРЕД, ВСЕОБЪЕМЛ
Ok, v
Okay. I'll go ahead 
Sie würden nie glauben, wie sehr an diesem Verfahren in den letzt
उसने अभी तक तुम्हें गोल्डफिंगर नहीं कहा
好的，我们看到你把相机移到镜头前，现在我们拍到了一张非常
شركة هاواي كوم تك. سيجما 7. صوت واضح ومسموع على نطاقي UHF/HF. انتهى
Роджер и Джим выясняют, что можно сделать с шу
Вперё
Ich würde jetzt gern etwas tr
كنت أظن أن تلك الأبخرة التي تتصاعد على
Read you loud and clear. Did you g
5.5 아래로,
D'accord, et si on utilisait le module de 
好的。下一步：调暗车
D'accord, Vance, nous avons effectué un autre test de biais nul et le résultat est passé d
Wenn Sie auf den Boden schauen, dann sehen Sie, dass in Carn
콜럼비아, 휴스턴. 산소 직접 공급을
Okay. I'll tell you. I'll go line at a time and wait for your verification before I go on to the next one. I have panel 8, FLOODLIGHTS, FIXE
アポロ8号、ヒ
알겠습니다. 이제 탱크의 마지막 벤트 설정을 하겠습니다. 페이지 맨 위에서 INVERTER 1, CLOSE 바로 다음에 PROP DESCENT HELIUM REG/VENT CLOSE를 추가하고, STABILIZATION/CONTROL AELD, CLOSE 다음에 PROP DISPLA
मैं आपसे वही कहने के लिए कह रहा था जो आपने कहा। जिम को लगभग 4 घंटे की नींद मिली, और बि
Früh am Morgen und wie immer viel los. Ich sa
रॉजर। मेरी स्थि
T
알겠습니다. 잠
Хорошо. Не могли бы вы еще раз проявить такое же отношение, и 
Roger. Stiamo lavorando alla pressurizzazione dell'abitacolo e stiamo lavorando sulla decalcomania con l'equalizzazione della pressione CSM. E siamo arrivati ​​al punto 13, dove aspettiamo che la pressione in cabina sia 5, o dovrebbe essere circa 5, prima di girare la valvola O2 del pacchetto REPRESS su FILL. Invece di 5, stiamo
lights are glowing, feeling fine, buoyant mood. Parameters of cabin: pressure 1, humidity 65, temperat
잭, 물 문제에 관해서는 앞으로 몇 시간 안에 상당히 빠른 속도로 물을 끌어올릴 예정이고, 이송
两个主唱头加起来差不多80——实际上是82个小时。这是两个人的用量。LC8用了44个小时，也就是88个小时。我们还有一个备用唱头。你说得
Roger. The problems you have run into so far are due to some unknown source, probably or the like loading your trunnion cell which is now 91, so it doesn't really represent your true trunnion angle. Now this loading problem we don't feel implies any decrease in the reliability in your at all. We think that the best way to circumvent the problem is to cycle the OPTICS ZERO switch first to OFF 
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. Coming up about 4 30. You're looking great on all your systems. Eagle is purring rig
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। हम चाहते हैं कि आप ओम्नी एंटीना पर जाएं, और फिर
你好，休斯顿。阿
और, ह्यूस्टन, हमने आपका UPDATA LINK सर्किट ब्र
Okay. Ich
Аврора Семь
روجر. ما هو وض
그 안의 모든 것이 제자리
Mancano 2 minut
Хорошо. Наши телев
روجر. في الخطوة الأولى - في الصفحة 47، 
休斯顿，这里是阿波罗8号。我们也想请
هذه شركة زنجبار كاب كوم، ز
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है। मैं आपको सुन नहीं पा रहा हूँ। मैं उड़ान 15 के अंतिम दो आइटम 11:15 से प्रसारित करूँगा। 15 से 11:15। यह ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है, ब्लाइंड ब्रॉडकास्टिंग में, उड़ान योजना 08:35 आरकेवी..
ऐसा
D'accord. Nous vous deman
هيوستن، أبولو 8. ان
Roger. Che ne dici di
एड, अगर तुम और ज्यादा खाओ
Du hast genug Hitze, um den Druck zu halten. Und ich habe hier diese Höhenve
आप अभी कहाँ हैं? क्या मैं थोड़ा सा धक्का दे सकत
好的，斯科特。我感觉很好。我
Sie haben ausreichend 
11, qui Houston. 5 SPS/G&N: 37201, meno 060, più 047; TIG 086 09 3666. NOUN 81: più 33521, più 03441, meno 01458; rollio
रॉजर। और बाद में, जब वे सफेद कणों की तरह दिखाई देते हैं, तो वह सुझाव देता है कि
Хорошо. 
Roger. Wh
맞아
さて、その間にジャック、もう一度周りを見回してみたら、レーダーと着陸レーダーのヒーターブレーカーが取り付けられている
알겠습니다. 육분의 별, 06 2007 250에서 시작하여 지구 중심은 아래쪽으로 123, 오른쪽으로 22 + 1123 - 03000 12313 34494 017 
Внизу наблюдалось множество гроз. Кажется, мы движемся примерно вбок и перевернуты вверх ногами. Очень, оч
Роджер. 1, G&N: 38658, минус 054, плюс 065, 078 02 0345, плюс 29180, плюс 03779, минус 0132
Roger. Wir haben jetzt ein leichtes Ra
잠시만 기다려 주세요. 그가 다시
네, 변동률을 말씀드리자면... 세 축
C'est exact. 
Хорошо, вы хотите это сделать? — Ладно, мы это по
वैंस, जो ने -2 प्लस 30
프
Водолей, Хьюстон. Извините, но из-за слишком большого фонового шума вас невозмо
SCS TVC，
弗兰克，看起来它好像是从两块材料（可能是玻璃纤维）的缝隙处伸出来的。它大约有10到15英尺长
Es sei darauf hingewiesen, dass
मुझे लगता है कि मैं इसे देख सकता हूँ, बिल्क
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们原本今晚要为您带来全明星赛，但因雨取消
Роджер, Аполлон-8. Несколько замечаний: мы рассмотрели ваши векторы состояния и всю предоставленную информацию. Платформа выглядит хорошо, и, похоже, вы можете обойти это ограничение, если хотите, ваша платформа останется работоспособной и при следующем проходе. Мы хотели бы получить ваши результаты, и, 
Okay. Gut, Bill, und ich melde mich ungefähr alle 30 Minuten bei dir, nur um sicherz
罗杰。比尔，出于好奇，我们可以简单说说低温罐的加热器和风扇的情况。我们注意到加热器工作正常，循环开关；随着时间的推移，循环频率增加，表明罐内出现了一些分层现象。然后，我们每隔4小时启动风扇几分钟，搅动一下罐内物质，加热器的循环频率就会降低一些，持续一
We're alined just abou
罗杰。稍等。11号，我们唯一担心的是你舱口袋里的东西。那些
Sembra proprio come... S
Roger. Nous avons terminé nos opérations cyclis
……大约在19分钟的时候，所有星空参照物都消失了。
Это корабль «Дружба Семь». Внутри пери
Da ist die kleine Corona Australis, die wir als Kalibrierungsstern verwenden. Sie befindet sich gerade vor mir, und man kann Sterne bis zur fünften Ordnung erkennen, die deutlich schwächer sind als die Sterne in 
...nous voyons
杰克是在床上还是和
Roger. Les données de liaison descendan
Аполлон-13, Хьюстон. Вы 
로저. 1, /: 62844 마이너스 161, 플러스 129, 마이너스 29840, 플러스 02390, 플러스 01053 000 200 005 01693, 플러스 00600 29954 402 29788 01 0688 259, 페르세이 제타, 하강 048, 좌측 05; 시리우스, 리겔, 129 155 010: 여유 공간 없음, 지평선 2
如果你把它
I don't have much choice. All I can do is eat, sleep, and look out the 
밴스, 짐은 
ठीक है। मैंने बस उसे कॉपी कर लिया है, और अब आ
Хорошо. Мы хотели бы немного понаблюдать за ним, прежде ч
Roger. Immagino che d
Джим, у нас ужасно много фонового шума. Можешь повторить,
看来我们最终还是赢了一
Ich war schnell
Ok. Sotto l'accensione, la prima riga dice "AUTO SELECT, 16, su OFF". Ok. Puoi semplicemente cancellare quella parte. Sulla quinta riga, dice "Interruttore LOGIC POWER", che in realtà è "LOGIC BUS, quattro di loro, su chiuso". Il CG DELTA-V non è importante perché non stiamo bruciando il motore. Il "SIGN
Apollo 8, Houston. Bien reçu. Nous vous recommandons d'utiliser un objectif grand angle pour cet
मैं लगभग सीधे नीचे जा रहा हूँ। हम कुछ क्यूमुलस बादलों की तस्वीरें ल
Houston,
روجر، باز. هذه إدخال PAD، MPL، يبدأ باللفة 05، 35 - تصحيح - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267، زائد 1102، ناقص 17203، 068، 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027، NOUN 69، جميع الأسطر الأربعة غير متوفرة. الالتقاط من D صفر: 400 02 09. نهاية التعتيم، 00 17 03 38 08 20. نجم السدس، 02 0945 149. نجم خط البصر هو العقرب ثيتا، هذا هو العقرب ثيتا. لأعلى 315، يمين 35، متجه الرفع لأعلى. والتعليقات: يفترض هذا الإدخال PAD عدم وجود مناورة في منتصف المسار. وللعلم، بالنظر إلى الوضع الحالي، وبناءً على جميع بيانات التتبع التي حصلنا عليها، فإن هذه المناورة ستكون بسرعة عُشر قدم فقط في الثانية. لذا، سنتجاوزها على الأرجح. سنُعلمكم بالمزيد عن ذلك لاحقً
Хорошо. Шаг 7. Панель автоматических выключателей 11, шина переменного тока B, дисплей Helium PQGS, замкнут. Главн
Роджер, я приближаюсь к отмет
Fred, in wenigen Minuten übergeben wir die Honeysu
Okay. Und ich bin... - verwende eine ATT HOLD-Konfiguration, u
11号，休斯顿。目前看来，那
でも、早くそのゴミをそこから出してくれたらいい
Хьюстонский центр управления возд
Apollo 8,
Хорошо. Он смотрит на тот показатель силы тока батареи, который вы нам предоставили некоторое время назад. Он хотел бы в
收到。我
روجر، استخدمنا نظام التحكم النبضي بأقل قدر ممكن؛ كان الهدف رقم ١٢ محجوبًا بالغيوم؛ كنتُ قد حددتُ الوقت والموقع بدقة. أعتقد أنني كنتُ سأتمكن من تتبعه لو رأيته. أما الهدف رقم ١٣، فكان واض
로저, 정장은 7.5, 객실은 1
حسنًا. احذف مهمتي أبولو لاند مارك رقم 2 و3. تلك المنطقة غائمة، ولمساعدتك في رحلتك، الوقت المنقضي 30 هو 05. حسنًا. تجربة D-9؟ قم بها أثناء الطيران الانسيابي إن قررت القيام بها. لا نعتقد أن
Wir haben lediglic
Warten S
Roger. Potresti non dover dilungarti troppo. La posizione che ti ho appena indicato è leggermente a ovest del Cratere Ovest. Immagino sia circa due decimi di chilometro a ovest, e ci chiedevamo se Neil o Buzz avessero osservato altri punti di rif
I'm not reading you very well, but right now I'm pointed sm
Bonjour Canton Com Tech. Friendship Seven. Comme
Roger. Si tu as envie d'essayer, c'est tout à fait normal, et tu peux toujours essayer. Je suis sû
हम शायद यह
Джим, Хьюстон. Ты отли
Хорошо, Оуэн. Хочу поблагодарить тебя и всю команду в фиолетово-бордовых тонах за отличную работу 
هذه مركبة فريندشيب 7. أتلقى 
Roger. Wir haben Ihre Nachricht verstanden und Ihre Anmerkungen zur Kommunikation zwischen unserer Außenstelle und Ihnen zur Kenntnis genommen. Ein Problem bestand bisher darin, die Verbindung zur Außenstelle herzustellen. Wir werden dies so bald wi
E 11, Houston. Abbiamo una richiesta per voi. Sulla valvola di pressurizzazione del propellente secondario del modulo di servizio: come misura precauzionale, vorremmo che portaste momentaneamente i quattro interruttori in posizione CHIUSO e poi
Das ist eins... I
いいえ、そうではありません。Oリングを見ましたが、Oリングではないと思います。私の…先日の朝、打ち上げ直前に検査を受けた時に、少し問題があったことに気づきました。血圧が変動するんです。スーツに問題があるようです。別のスーツをお渡ししましょう
말씀하신 대로, 이왕이면 일등석을 타는
꽤 멋있어 보이는 엔진
روجر. ما ه
O
了解しました。その件については、MSC-1
沃利，这里看起来真不错。你做得很好，我们期
Non in questo m
了解しました。最後の予定活動を開始されたようですね。初期追跡によると、最初の中間軌道は最初の推測で秒速4フィートを下回っている可能性があります。また、燃焼データを確認しましたが、おっしゃる通りスムーズで、すべて正常でした。システムも良好のようです。姿勢制御も完了し、ご希望であればOMNIの切り替えも可能
ठीक है, जैक। मैं स्विच के बारे में सोच रहा था। मु
弗雷德，我们没发现什么问题。比如，就我们目前
Roger. Neil si è costruito un'a
Roger. Nous allons modifier l'orientation de l'étoile du sextant afin d'am
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपको अंदर आते हुए देख रहे हैं। 
Roger. We have s
ठीक है। दो और सत्
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. استمتع بإطلالة رائعة على الساحل الأفريقي، سواء من خلال المنظار أو من النافذة.
एक सम
好了，阿波罗8号。你可以服用那颗药了。医生建
Ce
Okay, Joe. Mentre leggo, tra 74 ore farem
لا، 
谢谢你，阿波罗11号。我相信，即使他们没听到，也会通过新闻得知
Roger, Canary CAP COM. Read you loud and moderate background noi
Роджер. Именно 
はい、そうです。ランディングバ
Sigma S
هيوستن، أبولو 8. لقد توصلنا إلى اختلاف غير مقبول في نجومنا؛ سيتعين علي
友谊七号，友谊七号，我是桑给巴尔外科医生。您的血压曲线图
弗兰克，如果你用零号推进器，那就尽可能地增加X轴推进
Friendship Seven, questa Canary Cap Com. Potresti iniziare con il tuo resoconto della
We'd kind of like to hold off on the - start the venting again until we get the things - pumped back up inside here. Wonder if you might give us a call to
알겠습니다. ISOL 밸브를 닫고, TCA 차단기는 닫힌 상태로 유지하고, 크로스피드를 닫고, 다음 두 개의 디스플레이를 여세요. 세 개의 차단기가 모두 열려 있으면 MAIN SOV와 PROPULSION 차단기를 닫
Ricevuto. Ho cinque osservazioni. Numero uno, presuppone l'esecuzione della manovra di sorvolo; numero due, usa lo stesso allineamento del sorvolo; numer
حسنًا. وصلنا الآن إلى النقطة التي، وفقًا لخطة العمل التي وضعناها لكم، ستكونون قد انتهيتم جميعًا من تناول الطعام، وستتولى أنت وجاك المهمة بينما يخلد فريد إلى النوم. لذا، وفقًا للخطة، استيقظتم قبل الموعد بثلاث أو أربع ساعات. وستكون فترة الراحة التالية لكم بعد 9
分かりました。ええと、右側の156分50秒あたり、つまりページの右半分に「視標16、南、11、ガッサンディ、f:15」という行がありま
Проводится измерение артериального давления. Конец 
アポロ8
Roger. Capisco che il GET di acquisizione è 0
Ah oui, quelqu'un
Ach herrje, ich bin gerade zufällig in eine kopfüber liegende Position geraten. Aus irgendeinem Grund kann man se
Gemini VI, qu
로
Ken, während wir hier die Zeit totschlage
إن شدة انعكاس الشمس في هذه المنطقة تجعل من الصعب علينا تمييز السمات التي نراها على السطح، 
Apollo 8, Houst
حسنًا. صحيح. هذا جيم لوفيل. ما فكرنا في فعله اليوم هو أن نُطلعكم على لمحة بسيطة عن الحياة داخل أبولو 8. لقد عرضنا لكم مشاهد القمر، ومشاهد الأرض، وفكرنا في دعوتكم إلى منزلنا. لقد كان منزلنا لمدة أربعة أيام على الأقل كما ترون على لوحة العدادات. نُعلّم كل يوم على لوحة العدادات. لقد مرّت أربعة أيام، ونعمل على اليوم الخامس. بالطبع، نتطلع جميعًا إلى الهبوط يوم الجمعة. هنا في الجزء السفلي من المركبة الفضائية الذي نسميه حجرة المعدات السفلية، لدينا مستشار الرئيس لشؤون اللياقة البدنية، الكابتن جيم لوفيل، على وشك الخضوع لبرنامج تمارين نقوم به كل يوم. تلاحظون أنه يتحرك بحرية تامة. لقد اصطدم رأسه للتو بالبصريات، المستخدمة في ملاحتنا. إنه يستخدم جهازًا رياضيًا مصممًا للحفاظ على لياقة العضلات. من الوظائف المهمة الأخرى لمركبتنا الفضائية الحاسوب، وقد ظننت أنكم قد ترغبون في رؤية ما لدينا هنا، الشاشات التي تعرض لنا جميع المعلومات المتعلقة بعملية الاحتراق، والملاحة، والسرعة التي نستخدمها أثناء الدخول والخروج من مدار الأرض. كما ترون، يتم التحكم به بواسطة لوحة مفاتيح تشبه لوحة مفاتيح الآلة الكاتبة، والبيانات التي تُدخل وتُخرج منه مذهلة حقًا. لقد قام بعمل رائع، وقد أبدع جيم لوفيل في تشغيله. الآن، هناك أمر آخر بالغ الأهمية سواء كنا في الفضاء أو على الأرض وهو الطعام، وقد طلبت من بيل أندرس أن يُريكم كيف نأكل هنا في الرحلة. اعذروا الصورة أثناء تحركنا وتغيير الكاميرات. الطعام الذي نستخدمه مجفف بالكامل، ويأتي مُعبأً مسبقًا في أكياس محكمة الإغلاق. لاحظوا أن كل ما على بيل فعله لإبقائه في مكانه هو تركه. لولا تيارات الهواء داخل المركبة، لكان ثابتًا تمامًا. يُخرج مقصه العملي ويقطع الكيس. الطعام متنوع، وجيد عمومًا. إن لم يكن هذا مدحًا مُشجعًا، فهو كذلك، لكنه مع ذلك طعام جيد. من الواضح أن بيل ذكي جدًا، فهو يُنجز الأمور بسرع
Roger. Ground wird die Trenddaten auswerten und Sie später 
खैर, जैक, हमें थोड़ी सी चूक हो गई। यह एलएमपी की विंडो में ऊपर से शुरू होता है और सीडीआर 
Okay. Ich erkläre Ihnen zuerst die einzelnen Schritte. Diese müssen zuerst erledigt werden, und der erste Schritt
Roger. Wir hatten dir vorhin gr
حسناً. سهل. حسناً، اهدأ في الفت
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi, poco prima delle 5 ore circa, o verso, vi vorremo in assetto per un allineamento dell'asse corporeo, usando il terminatore terrestre come abbiamo fatto prima; E non appena lo avremo, eseguiremo -7, che ora equivale a circa 60 cm al secondo, ovvero circa 15 secondi. E mi è stato detto che ora è sceso a 35 cm, quindi è comodamente entro i limiti. Bene. Quando lo faremo, inizieremo immediatamente la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio del modulo di servizio, che sarà in piano, dato che lo sganciamo prima del solito. Non abbiamo bisogno, e non vogliamo, della componente fuori piano. Quindi sarà in piano, con il modulo di servizio puntato di nuovo verso l'esterno lungo il raggio vettore. Inizieremo quindi a preparare il modulo di comando per il SEP del modulo di servizio, incluso il controllo del modulo di comando e l'accensione a caldo, e circa 4 ore e 30 minuti prima dello sgancio, sgancieremo il modulo di servizio. Continueremo a lavorare finché non avremo il modulo di servizio... e cercheremo di scattare qualche fotografia, ma non ci impegneremo in manovre di traslazione per le foto perché non vogliamo sbagliare... rovinare l'angolo della vostra traiettoria di volo in quel momento. Okay. Questo ci dà 2 ore di tempo libero, più o meno, per finire, se siamo in ritardo, per passare alla checklist e prepararci all'accensione del modulo di comando. Inizieremo l'accensione completa del modulo di comando a meno 2 ore e 30 minuti. Metteremo il computer in linea, lo faremo partire, inizieremo a collegare i vostri vettori di stato e così via, e ad allineare la piattaforma del modulo di comando. Al massimo a circa 1 ora e 30 minuti, dandoci un'ora per completare questa parte del modulo di comando, inizieremo la manovra per l'assetto di sgancio. Poi inizierete a chiudere il... Naturalmente, non abbiamo configurato tutto il nostro stivaggio molto prima di questo. Chiuderemo il portello, effettueremo un controllo dell'integrità della pressione e a meno 1 ora, ovvero 141 ore e 40 minuti, sganceremo il velivolo. Non appena lo faremo, potrete iniziare la manovra per raggiungere l'assetto di ingresso. Una volta lì, eseguite un controllo delle stelle con il sestante, smontate l'ottica e a quel punto vi daremo il vostro pad di ingresso definitivo. Potete inizializzare il velivolo e, a quel punto, sarete di nuovo sulla checklist. C'è una piccola differenza rispetto al vostro ingresso nominale. Siete un po' prima al mattino, quindi andate... sarà notte quando arriverete. Tuttavia, siamo abbastanza fortunati da avere l
... liste de cont
Okay.
Хорошо. Те же комментарии. Начну сначала. Хорошо. "БАЛАНСИРУЮЩАЯ ПАРА" следует изменить на "ВЫКЛ". Ниже, "LMP" на "JET". Убрать "400 плюс 1" на отметке "минус 2"; убрать "ГЛАВНЫЙ РЫЧАГ, ВКЛ" на отметке "минус 1". Добавить на отметке "РУЧНАЯ УСИЛИТЕЛЬ" на отметке "минус 10 секунд"; добавить зажигание - можно добавить комментарий о "Если не заводится, нажмите кнопку СТАРТ, нажмите; если все еще не заводится, ОТКЛЮЧИТЬ КОМАНДУ СПУСКА ДВИГАТЕЛЯ, ВКЛ." На отметке "п
ア
こんにちは、トランキリティ。ヒューストン。登頂PADが到着しました。準備はいいですか？
Roger. T
지금 우리는 104시간째 중간 지점에서 초속 7피트의 속도에 대해 이야기하고 있습니다. 그리고 이를 진입
알겠습니다. 다시 말씀드립니다. 5시 56분부터 6시 16분까지, 자세 제어 연료를 사용하지 않고 궤도
Wer kennt sich mit Zoomobjektiven aus? Dieses Objektiv hat einen Brenn
Tranquillité,
Ricevuto. La pressione in cabina è 5,5 e si mantiene. L'aria in cabina è a 36 [gradi]. La spia dell'acqua in eccesso 
Roger, Aurora Seven, tout semble aller bien mainten
好的。你还有1小时20分钟的
نعم يا كين. لقد سمعت ب
로저. 고이득 안테나 신호를 성공적으로 다시 확보했습니다. 다른 통화가 없으시다면, 마이크 씨, 편히 주무시라고 인사드리고 편히 쉬시도록 하겠습
フレッド、了解。君がコンデンセート容器を使ったので、使用手順を教えてもらった。あまり読み上げるつもりはないが、容​​器を振りすぎたり、いっぱいに詰めすぎたりしないように少し注意するようにと書いてある。そうしないと通気弁が外れて、袋から少し漏れる可能性があるからだ
Je ne vois pas pourquoi dia
Molto ben
Никакой дезориентации не было. Я чувствовал, что могу смотреть вниз на землю — и мне было совершенно комфортно смотреть вниз — и могу переворачиваться на спину и смотреть вверх, и это нисколько меня не дезориентировало. Космический корабль был моим лучшим ориентиром. Всякий раз, когда я его видел, у меня сразу же появлялась хорошая точка отсчета, и, фактически, ближе к концу я использовал свой
I am not there yet. I'd say about 25 to 30 degrees, I'm stopping yaw at this time. The periscope checks with the window and the reticle and I
Хорошо, Джек. Мы хотим, чтобы ты закрыл клапан подачи реагентов на топливном элементе 2. Отключи инверторы. Отключи шину реле батареи. Сними клеммы батареи и выключи автоматическ
Хорошо. Это
Va ben
Нет, конечно, не могу, но думаю, это изменило наши взгляды — это измени
罗杰。明白了，加上 00523 和 1
И, Водолей. Однако мы не планируем преждевременно 
好的，休斯顿。杰克，我们想破解一下
حسنًا، ٢٥ قدمًا/ثانية للأمام، ٤١ ثانية ١٢٠ للخلف، ٢+٣٢.
ठीक है, मैं एआरएम बंद करने की तैयारी कर 
فريد، هل تلقيت أي إنذارات رئيسية هناك قبل حوالي 5 أو 10 دقائق؟ ظن الناس أنهم رأوا بعضها هنا وكانوا فضولي
Houston, nous faisons une OPTION 1 comme l'OPTION 3. Nous recevons constamment une ALARME 401, qui 
풍선은 꺼졌습니다. 어두운
你可能得稍微推迟一下午餐时间。你饿
Okay, Houston. Gleich sollen wir den S-Band-Sender/Empfänger ausschalten
Er hat das verstanden. David ist da; er sagt, du hät
Ja, das würde es. Man merkt gar nicht, wie kalt das Ding wird, wenn es langsamer fliegt. Ich habe gerade die Zyklen mit meinem... gemessen. Es sind jetzt etwa 11 bis 12 Minuten vergangen, und die Sonne steht senkrecht über uns, sodass sie nur auf die Triebwerksdüse des Servicemodul
Ja, da stimme ich dir zu, Jack. Jack Swigert und ich waren vorhin oben und haben uns beide einen Kanister geholt. Wir haben dann nach Material gesucht und überlegt, wie wir die Kanister verwenden könnten. Deshalb ha
罗杰。来自公共事务办公室的最新消息：阿波罗11号仍然是全球新闻的焦点。只有四个国家——共产主义中国、朝鲜、北越和阿尔巴尼亚——尚未向其公民通报您的登月飞行和登月。一位记者表示，他已经找不到合适的词语来形容您的成功。今晚，尼克松总统计划在华盛顿观看全明星棒球赛。赛后，他将前往太平洋回收区。周三晚上，他将从约翰斯顿岛乘直升机前往海军通信舰“阿灵顿”号。周四早上，他将再次登上直升机，飞往“大黄蜂”号，以便及
希望大家都喜欢我
わかりました。次のステップは、テープを固定することです。やり方は、ロールから約60センチの長さを切り取り、縦に裂いて、長さ約60センチ、幅約1.5センチのテープを2本作ります。これを、先ほどのテープに対してほぼ直角になるようにキャニスターに巻き付けます。上下を横切るよう
好的。有了新的态度
D'accord. Nous allons vous expliquer notre plan. Actuellement, nos réserves d'eau sont critiques. Nous souhaitons donc les économiser au maximum. Pour ce faire, nous prévoyons une manœuvre de retour libre à 16 pieds par seconde à 61 heures, soit dans 37 minutes. Ensuite, nous réduirons la puissance du moteur, puis à 79 heures, nous effectuerons une autre 
了解。レトロシーケンス前のチェッ
13، هيوستن. ما زلت تب
はい
जी हां, हम इस बात को लेकर आश्वस
And, Fred, that ma
حسنًا، هذا يبدو جيد
Gemelli VI, Leader della Terra Russa. Co
रॉजर, बज़। यह अच्छा रीडबैक है। इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में इन ओम्नी के साथ आप लगभग दो कदम पीछे हैं; जब तक हम इसे पूरा नहीं कर लेते, तब तक हमारा संचार ठीक से नहीं हो पाएगा। ओव
Ricevuto. Le MSC
R
هذه سفينة الصداقة رقم سبعة. يبدو أن الميلان منحرف بمقدار ٢٠ درجة تقريبًا. في الوقت الحالي، أشير إلى ميلان ٢٠ درجة إلى اليمين عندما أكون محاذيًا تما
至于你问的Vance的问题，要立刻把偏航角调到
正解です、ジャック。では1-6ページを見てみましょう。3分の
We are just lis
좋습니다. 이제 다시 업무에 복귀할 준비가 되었습니다. 다음으로는 전원 공급 절차를 계속 진행하겠습니다. 잭, 정렬에 대해 더
ジム、他に質問があるかどうか確認している間に、
यह तो एक रिकॉर्ड होगा? उनके लिए? मुझे नहीं लगता कि 
Roger, Canton. Ich war hier mit Manövern besc
Vous leur avez déjà posé la question et i
Хьюстон, «Аполлон-11» звонит вам на выс
OK. 
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 좋은 질문입니다. 저도 알았으면 좋겠네요. 이 오류는 비행 내내 간헐적으로 발생했습니다. 자
Okay, yes. I was going to say, understand we're going to go on t
はい、3分の1か6分の1くらいと
Да, а 
Roger. Questa fascia luminosa dell'orizzonte si estende p
Houston, could you give us
E con l'attivazione manuale del cubo LR, la piccola molla all'estremità della corda viene staccata dalla testa del plettro. Tutt
Affermativo. Ma abbiamo completato i cinque avvistamenti, tre
了解しました。キャビンの温度は92度です。インバーターを回します。スタンバイしてください。メインインバーターは、250度インバーターは約143度です。150度インバーターは102度です。スタンバイは約115度です
It's back behind
...लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि ऐसा इसलिए हुआ क्योंकि मैं लगातार 100 प्रतिशत ऑक्सीजन ग्रहण कर रहा था। मुझे संदेह है कि शायद मेरे कान और साइनस का तापमान हमेशा सामान्य तापमान से कम रहता है और मुझे
물병자리입니다. 휴스턴, 시작
ठी
Okay, Joe. The S
Ho appena visto una stella cadente scendere non troppo lontano davanti a noi e bruciare notevo
हमने उसकी नकल
Bene. Il titolo principale è "Entrata, PREPARAZIONE LM, meno 6 ore". Primo, BAT 5 ALIMENTAZIONE NORMALE, ATTIVA; secondo, utilizzare la checklist di attivazione modificata /, 30 
Nun, der REACQ funktionierte nicht wie erwartet. Es schien, als ob er über 
好的。接下来，二、三、四、五、六、
Lo
روجر، فريد. أود أن أؤكد أنكم تحصلون على مياه الشرب من وحدة التحكم، وإذا كان بإمكانكم تقديم أي 
Roger, 11. Wenn Sie Ihre Checkliste für Alternativen und Notfälle herausholen, haben wir ein Update zu
好的。这就是整个阻尼率调整流程，虽然我只告诉你了步骤 2，但这就是全部流程。现在，继续看第 29 页的内容——更正一下，你在“姿态控制”下的复述中有一处错误。应该是“俯仰和横滚”改为“脉冲”；“偏航”改为“直
Okay. You'll find that the area around the ladder is in a complete dark shadow so we're going to have some problem with TV, but I'm sure you will see the - You'll get a picture from t
Роджер. Время ввода в эксплуатацию минус 4 часа 
Roger. Thank you, and on page 2-104 the attitudes should read
كانوا يريدون هذه الإجابة. هل لديك تس
双子座八号，休斯顿 CAP COM。距离发射还有一分钟。我们将等待您的 
हम कॉपी करने के लिए तैय
Hast du d
Роджер. Мне бы тоже понравился такой способ, немного более покладистый,
فريندشيب سفن، فريندشيب سفن، 
알겠습니다
Солнечный свет проникает в верхний правый угол моего окна, едва заметно выглядыва
Apollo 8, en attendant le gain maximal, je vais poursuivre le résumé de la trajectoire. Nous pouvons encore rejoindre la ligne du Pacifique central à partir du treizième point, et vous êtes en route après 138 secondes de combustion. Ces 138 secondes vous permettent de sortir de la zone de correction. Nous recommandons de ne pas tenter de pré-allumage ni de redémarrage après 20 secondes. Au-delà de 20 secondes, la trajectoire pourrait dépasser la capacité de correction pour un retour libre. Les conditions météorologiques dans la zone de récupération sont bonnes. Nous avons un suivi et un sans. Pendant la combustion, vous pourriez remarquer une légère variation de pression dans la chambre et les réservoirs en raison de l'épuisement du carburant dans le réservoir de stockage et de son transfert vers le réservoir de décantation. Cela pourrait se produire entre 2 et 5 secondes après le début de la combustion. Il s'agira d'une légère variation de pression dans les deux systèmes. Co
罗杰。我们现在看到的是从东太平洋的航天器拍摄的地球中心景象。我们还没能直接看到夏威夷群岛，但可以清晰地看到北美洲西海岸。美国、圣华金谷、内华达山脉、下加利福尼
Хорошо.
Riporta il colore alla normalità. Ho preso una lettura del valore di luce del continente sudamericano all'inizio, ma devo cambiare il valore ASA. Il valore ASA è cambiato in 160. Il valore di luce 
Хорошо. Этот маневр приблизит вас к пределам сканирования для антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления, поэтому во время выполнения маневра следите за индикаторами. Если загорится индикатор предела сканирования, у вас еще есть 15 градусов для маневра. Но единственное предупреждение: если вы по
アポロ8号、こちらはヒューストンです。キャビンを暖めるには2つの方法があり
... भोजन..
Хорошо, Джек. Теперь оставшиеся шаги — это просто этапы настройки скафандра, чтобы привести его в полную работоспособность, и наши люди хотят отложить это до тех пор, пока давление в баллоне, с которым вы работаете, не достигнет 7,6 миллиметров ртутного столба, что, вероятно, займет еще 45 минут или час — сейчас мы показываем 4,7. Поэтому мы хотели бы, чтобы вы тем временем настроили второй баллон командного модуля так же, как вы только что настроили первый, используя шланг командира, и все это подготовили, и, вероятно, примерно в это время придет время — переключиться. К вашему све
Это подт
好的，吉姆。飞行计划有更新。你做了星体可见性检查，目前看来，Navi 仍然是我们的目标星体，相关的数值是：横滚 102.6，俯仰 328.9，偏航 346.3。这得出轴和耳轴为零。如果你觉得可以——如果你觉得你能用这个数据做点什么，我们想试一试，看看能不能验证一下，或者如果我们验证了你能用 Navi 做这件事，我们俩都能学到点
Zwillinge 4, hier spricht Cana
Ok. Andremo sulla magnitudo 1600, annulleremo 2450, due-quattro-cinque-z
这是友谊七
白を
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。バッテリーBの充電にはあと6時間かかるようです。充電率は地上の曲線よりも低い
Muchea Cap Com，这里是Sigma Seven，UHF频段。现在你们能收到我
제가 기억하기로 당시에는 일반적인 연소 시간보다 6초 더 길었고, 이는 B-시그마 
That's affirmative. Add that in to the top of the page. The - What we're really doing - Let's - let's put it in to right before the " Activation." The other - the other procedure on the top of the page belongs with
友谊七号，友谊七号，这里是桑给巴尔通信技术公司，正在使用高频/超
阿波罗8号，
---on reentry, unless ASCS holds you in re
好的
私たちは、... を再び眠らせることを考え始めなければなりません。なぜな
और इसमें बाईं ओर के हाशिये में, बिल्कुल शुरुआत में मौजूद "लोड" और उससे थोड़ा नीचे मौजूद "0.0507" औ
ठीक है, जो। मेरा एक और सवाल है। अगर हम सर्वि
그리고 아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 사령선 모듈에 이산화탄소가 축적될 가능성이 있어 권장 사항을 하나 드리겠습니다. 사령선 모듈의 호스 중 빨간색 리턴 호스에 캡을 씌우고, 호스를 터널을 통해 최대한 위쪽으로 연
आप चाहते हैं कि मेरा कंप्यूट
Okay
分かりました、ジャック。正解です。1-7ページへ進んでください
今は音声があまり良くなく、誘導部隊も全部は聞き取れませんでした。2、3分ほどお
Affermativo, Canary. Mi
Immer noch kei
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Valerie Anders am Heiligabend, während sie und ihre Familie darauf warteten, dass Apollo 8 die Mondumlaufbahn verließ und zur Erde zurückkehrte. Frau Anders war am Dienstag um Mitternacht dort gewesen, und die Nachbarn hatten gerade alle Kinder zusammengetrommelt, damit die Familie sich ausruhen konnte, während sich das Raumschiff hinter dem Mond befand und kein Kontakt mehr bestand. Das Haus von Colonel Frank Borman war draußen mit vier großen Tannenzweigen geschmückt, mit Puderschnee bestreut und mit roten Schleifen verziert. Ein Baum im Wohnzimmer wartet auf seine sichere Rückkehr, und seine hübsche blonde Frau Sue und seine kräftigen Söhne Frederick und Edwin planen, den Start von Apollo 8 um Mitternacht zu Hause mitzuerleben. Normalerweise würden sie den Mitternachtsgottesdienst in der St. Christopher's Episcopal Church besuchen. Die Familie hatte sich für Mitternacht verabredet. Da es im Hause Borman keine kleinen Kinder gibt, wird die Bescherung einfach warten, bis Colonel Borman mit seinem fantastischen Weihnachtsgeschenk – dem Flug zum Mond und zurück – zurückkommt. Marilyn Lovells vier Kinder werden, was die Kinder betrifft, ein ganz normales Weihnachtsfest erleben, berichtete die vielbeschäftigte Ehefrau von Captain Lovell; aber an Geschenke war nicht zu denken, da zwei von ihnen direkt neben ihr saßen. „Ich hatte noch nicht einmal Zeit, mich umzuziehen“, sagte Mrs. Lovell. Geschenke unter Erwachsenen gibt es aber, und der Weihnachtsbaum wird auch noch da stehen, wenn Lovell nach Hause kommt. Hier ist noch ein interessanter Artikel in der Rubrik „Action Line“. Es gibt einen kleinen Leserbrief an die Redaktion. Da steht: „Wir wollten euch Erdenbewohnern gestern Abend einen Überrasch
そのアイテムはあなたの CG をそれほ
جيميني 8، ق
네, 
So, ihr kommt je
了解。こ
ठीक है। और अंत में, अब जब आपने अंतरिक्ष यान को वहाँ पहुँचा दिया है, तो कैमरे को आवश
D'accord. Voici quelques détails concernant le plan de vol. Bien sûr, puisqu'il n'y a pas de -3, vous supprimerez tout ce qui concerne le palier intermédiaire 3, y compris le point mentio
分かりました。その件については話し合いましたが、12時間も前に出ている今、皆、そこでやる必要はないと考えているようです。しかし、実際には軌道には影響がないようです。もしよろしければ、エントリーチェックリストを改めて確認し、コンソール上の全員でオンエアで確認するという提案もいただきました。今、エントリーセッションを担当するチームが皆さんと一緒にいるので、チェック
Je vous recontacte après une pause d'environ 45 minutes. Nous avons remarqué que, concernant votre antenne à gain élevé, vous pourriez l'utiliser plus efficacement en passant de l'antenne OMNI à celle-ci lorsque l'angle de lacet est de 90 degrés et l'angle de tangage de -45 degrés. Nous constatons que vous restez 10 minutes de plus en mode OMNI, ce qui est normal; cependant, vous pourriez tirer davantage profit de l'antenne à gain éle
400 plus 5 and the "at burn attitud
रॉजर, 
收到。这里是友谊七号。以下是三十分钟报告：头部活动没有引起任何恶心或不适感。我惊讶地发现自己可以如此近距离地看向太阳；此时阳光直射我的脸，我只需用眉毛遮挡一下即可。所有保险丝开关的状态与之前报告的左侧面板一致。模式选择正常，自动，陀螺仪正常：点火器已准备就绪，自动反推装置已关闭。除手动模式外，所有“T”型手柄均已就位，手动模式已拉出，以便在发生进一步故障时可以立即切换到手动模式作为备用。救援辅助设备正常。着陆气囊已关闭。所有其他顺序面板项目均处于正常位置。控制燃油量为68-100%，重复，68-100。EPI指示我的大致位置。发射时间为02+06+30 MARK。 H区域的逆行时间仍设置为04+32+28
はい、V
Je crois que c'était vous qui transmettiez; c'était Jim qui transmetta
제가 당신의 말을 좀 알아듣
Ricevuto. Stiamo osservando il cratere a fossetta ora. Il picco centrale che vedia
Roger. Ti ho ricevuto quella volta. Spero che nel prossimo REV
आगे 
Affermativo. E vogliamo che tu manovri con una velocità di 0,2 gradi al secondo. Pass
로저, 제미니 4호. 호라이즌 체크는 어떻게 진행되고 있
هيوستن، كولومبيا. 
That old
133، يا
Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон. К вашему сведению, Матч всех звёзд только что закончился победой Национальной лиги над командой Амери
Good morning, Frank. Apollo 8, this is Houston. We're wondering about your backup align; we'd like your opinion on the possibility of doing this align using Sirius and Rigel rather than Navi, as it's in the north
这是友谊七号。头部运动没有任何感觉，感觉很好。触及测试显示，我可以精准地击中任何我想击中的位置。我够到旋钮没有任何问题，而且非常轻松地适应了零重力环境，比我想象
रॉजर, फ्रेड। बढ़िया रीडबैक। पैनल 16 से शुरू करते हैं। फ़्लाइट डि
روجر. تفضل يا ديك. أحاول فق
Je suis mal orienté et ma marge de manœuvre est réduite par mon niveau de carburant. Je peux voir la limite entre le 
Friendship Seven, habt ihr eure Ch
回到华盛顿，众议院筹款委员会同意对石油公司、银行和公用事业公司进行税收改革，预计每年可为联邦政府增加近20亿美元的收入。同样在今天，美国宇航局宣布将于1972年发射一个大型轨道飞行器，使
バーンアティチュードに何か問題があります。ボールの測定値が正しくなく、針は中央に表示されています。何が間
OK, les notes a-c et d-c sont toutes dans le vert. C'est pa
D'accord. Très bi
Понял, Джим. На этом валу температура на 4/100 ниже
Okay. These bite sized objects were designed to remove the problem of having so many crumbs floating around in the cabin, so they designed a particular size that would be able to go to the mouth all at once. I think since all of our experience, we've discovered that we could progr
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。尿の排出については、今のところ異論はありません。参考までに、廃水の排出については、私
Roger. Looks go
Je comprends que vous souhai
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Pu
That's a good, reasonable way of describing it. It appears to me as though it made a difference just sitting b
Eagle, Хьюстон. В кормово
A quel punto si è accesa la spia dell'acqua in eccesso in cabina. Dovrò tornare indietro e spegnerla. La tuta è ancora alta. L'indicatore dell'acqua in cabina segna pi
Okay. Nach Tommy Jacobs haben wir jetzt die neuesten Infos von der lokalen Astrologin Ruby Graham aus Houston. Sie sagt, alle Sternzeichen stehen günstig für deine Reise zum Mond. Neil ist clever, Mike h
Похоже, передвигаться не составляет труда, как мы и предполагали. Возможно, даже легче, чем в симуляциях при перегрузке в одну шестую g, которые мы проводили в различных наземных симуляциях. На самом деле, ходить здесь не составляет труда. Хорошо. Двигатель спуска не оставил после себя кратера сколько-нибудь значительного размера. Зазор на земле составляет около 30 см. Мы находимся практически на очень ровной местности. 
نعم، يبدو أنها وصلت 
Oui. De notre côté, le temps devrait s'améliorer très bientôt. La limite ouest de l
It looks like there are several layers to it. A very high cirrus layer... a little less cirrus ... take some pictures of a series of clouds. It looks like we've got a high cirrus layer with fair weather
Fuel 102-101 [percent], oxygen 78-101 [percent], amps 24. Sti
嘿，也许你验证了地球确实在自转，
Roger. Il sistema di controllo fly-by-
جيمي
我正在拍摄天气照片，几乎是竖着拍的。光线强度是 13.5。大致来说，快门速度是 1
Хорошо, теперь. Джек, давай ещё раз всё обсудим. Ты хотел, чтобы я попробовал управлять космическим аппаратом в реж
Sie verstehen schon... Bahnsteig. Man kann aus dem Fens
そうですね。これがうまくいかなかった場合のために、いくつか追加の指示があります。フランク、ALCは20秒間そのままにしておく必要があるそうです。ALCが正常に機能するには、20秒間そのままにしておく必要があります。さて、私がお伝えした手順がうまくいかなかった場合は、他のフィルターやそれらの様々な組み合わせに関する手順を改めてご案内します。この手順がうまくいかなかった場合は、赤色フィルターに加えて、偏光フィルターと赤色フィルターと青色フ
Joe, est-ce que notre modérateur a bien pris en compte ce problème? Ces cartouches de CO2 fonctio
Je n'ai pas encore reçu les mises à jour concernant le temps de déconnexion; j'en suis toujour
Okay. Schlagen Sie zunächst Seite 12 auf. Löschen Sie auf der rechten Seite, beginnend 
تما
로저. 잘 읽어봤어, 버즈. 그리고 마이크, 추천서 공개할 때까지 기다려 줘.
どうやら何層かあるようです。とても高い巻雲の層…少し低い巻雲の層…一連の雲の写真をい
네, 다 복사했습
3 pl
I'm going to go back and re-verify the whole stuff we'v
And Buzz, we're still not getting any data from your EKG. It looks like the only way that we're going to be able to get any is if, at your convenience, you would take your - change out your EKG le
ठीक है। लगता है गुंबद थोड़ा नीचे
も
हमारा स्कैनर फिर से रोशनी को अनदेखा कर रहा है। कहीं हम फिर से उन गेजों को खो तो नही
尼尔，我要上去把俯仰角调到加速度指令——手动调整俯仰角。那
حسنًا. نريد منك الضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER)، ثم 333 ثم ENTER، وبعد ذلك نريد منك قراءة السجل رقم 1. نتوقع أن تكون قيمة السجل رقم 1 هي 10000، وإذا كانت هذه القيمة تساوي 10000، فهذا يعني أن الكمبيوتر سيقوم بتفريغ ذاكرته القابلة للمسح مرتين. أي 10000 رقم، ضعف قيمة تفريغ الذاكرة القابلة للمسح. إذا لم تكن القيمة 10000، فسنطلب منك جعلها 10000 بالضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER)، ثم 333 ثم ENTER، ثم 10000 ثم ENTER. بعد ذلك، يكون أمر التفريغ هو ENTER، وهذا سيؤدي تلقائيًا إلى تفريغ الذاكرة القابلة للمسح بالكامل مرت
わかった。少し押し戻したんだ、チャーリー。今、NOUN 83、プラス4ボール4、マイナス4ボ
Да. Похоже, что и с адап
Okay, Vance. Okay - I don't think you've given me the backout procedure, have you, for 
11, qui Houston. Avete tutti "Change Lima"
デルタVは42.5、持続時間は53秒、ヨー補正ピッチは2度下向き、コア25は00425、コア26は0
D'accord. Jim reprend la ligne, je vais débrancher les appare
Ja.
Ho appena fatto un tentativo sul bersaglio 16-A. L'aeroporto di Bassora, si trova proprio sul Golfo Persico. L'ho individuato... ho individuato il Golfo Persico a circa... un angolo di circa 30°... Ho picchiato e poi ho individuato il lago... a nord-ovest del Golfo Persico. Bassora, essendo proprio sui laghi, molto vicino ai laghi, si può semplicemente seguire e individuare subito l'aeroporto. Quindi ho raggiunto l'aeroporto un bel po' prima di raggiungere il bersaglio, e poi ho iniziato a seguirlo. Ero effettivamente sul bersaglio quando ero ancora a 20° dalla verticale, direi - e l'ho seguito dalla pista fino a circa 40° oltre, e ho
Роджер. Оставьте их включенными до окончания пожара в 
Хорошо, дальше. Черно-белая телекамера, и рекомендуется разместить ее сверху на с
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. افتقدنا لحام دلتا-تيج الخاص بك، وكذلك وقت احتراق
ठीक है।
Роджер. Продувка кислородного топлив
了解です。まず主要なイベントの時刻を簡単に確認し、その後、戻って詳細を補足します。さて、進入インターフェースは142時間40分、つまり6時間半前です。そのおよそ6時間半前に、ヒーター電源を投入し、CM/の温度をチェックして、必要に応じてCM/を予熱することで、このプロセス全体を開始します。おそらくそうすることになるでしょう。詳細な手順は後ほど説明します。約6時間前頃に、前回の中間コースで使用した修正版/30分チェックリストを使用して、電源投入を開始します。その後、少し前、5時間前頃に、前回と同様に地球ターミネーターを使用して、体軸アラインメントの姿勢をとっ
Was scheint das Problem zu se
Looking overseas, we find South Korea's first super highway, linking Seoul with the Port of Inchon, has been named the Apollo Highway to commemorate your trip. I think we mentioned last night that President Nixon has already started on his round the world trip, and today he is in San Francisco on his first stop which will take him to the U.S.S. Hornet, from which he'll watch the re
ينعكس ضوء الشمس عن الهيكل. ومع وجود التلسكوب الملحق، يصبح عديم الفائدة تقريبًا. أعتقد
Okay. Weiter geht's – auf demselben Bedienfeld, Bedienfeld 5: Leistungsschalter, BATTERIELADEGERÄT, AC-STROM, geschlossen; Leistungsschalter BATTERIELADEGERÄT, BAT A LADEN, geschlossen; Leistungsschalter WECHSELRICHTERSTEUERUNG 2, geschlossen; Leistungsschalter WECHSELRICHTERSTEUERUNG 3, geschlossen; ich habe einen Schalter für Sie, HAUPTBUSVERBINDUNG, BAT A/C, AUS; und einen weiteren Schalter, BATTERIE LADEN zu AC
Хорошо. Вот такая конфигурация нам нужна, и вот что мы обдумываем. Когда мы переключились на режим «Бак 1 — АВТО, бак 2 — ВЫКЛ.», мы обнаружили, что в цикле нагревателя давление в баке 1 составляло около 233 psi, что значительно выше предельно допустимого уровня, и если мы переключимся на эту конфигурацию для сна, то избежим загорания индикаторов «ПРЕДУПРЕЖДЕНИЕ» во время сна. Хорошо. Чтобы это было комфортно, мы хотим, чтобы остаток дня мы использовали больше H2 из бака номер 2, чтобы создать дисбаланс в пользу бака 1, и к концу сна все выровнялось. Именно поэтому сейчас у вас включен режим «Бак 1 — ВЫКЛ., бак 2 — АВТО». Мы ожидаем, что за следующие 10 часов дисбаланс составит около 3 процентов; и перед сном мы позвоним вам, чтобы вы снова изменили конфигурацию. Единственный недостаток здесь в том, что в течение дня вы, вероятно, получите несколько предупреждений и предостер
Ok, Apollo 8. Siamo pronti per il controllo delle comunicazioni, e la scelta è tua. Possiamo chiamare gli interruttori e lasciarteli posizi
On a une légère distorsion horizontale due à des bandes sur notre écran. J
네. 대기권 재진입은 지구
알겠습니다. 저희는 후방 옴니(OMNI) 상태이고, S 및 C 엔진 제어 차단기가 닫혀 있습
ठीक है। अब आप बीईएफ जाना चाहते हैं या इसी के साथ
Ро
Bien sûr, pas de problème, je suis à votre dis
Esatto, ne p
いや、ちょうど終わりに近づいたところだと
Ricevuto. Circa 2 minuti per questo passaggio negli Stati Uniti. Canaries a 1:
好的
's 3/4: lever du soleil, méridien d'origine, coucher du soleil; point subsolaire, acquisition -1, acquisition -2. Pour -1 et 2, ces temps d'acquisition ACQ correspondent à des angles d'arbre et de tourillon égau
Я
Columbia, Houston. Nous av
Wir ha
좋아요, 마이크, 혹시 데이터 백이 근처에 있다면, 제 임시 보관함에 한두 개 정도 있을 텐데, 일반 가방 외에 추가로 데이터 백을 가져와서 이 데이터를 다시 담아두는 게 좋을 것 같
Roger. Mon statut est « actif ». J
ठीक है। अब हम एफएम को चालू करना चाहेंगे ताकि वहां की कुछ अंदर की तस्
알았어, 잭. 내가 말하려던 건, 공교롭게도 사령선이 하필 이 시점에 다시 가스를 배출하기 시작했다는 거야. 그래서 아마 망원경으
ठीक है। हमने इसे कुछ दे
지금 우리는 달의 영향도 거의 없이, 별을 관측하기에 거의 완벽한 조건을 갖추었습니다. 앞서 말씀드렸듯이, 별의 밝기는 코로나 오스트랄리스를 기준으로 7차 별, 혹은 그보다 아주 약간 낮은 차수까지 관측할 수 있을 것 같습니다. 제 바
ठीक है। थ्रॉटल कंट्रोल को
Ro
Oh, wait 
Bonne
Кстати, в 
Спаси
Nun, ich fürchte, das wird die letzte Mondmission für lang
ねえ、ジム、サービスモジュールがあなたと太陽の間
로저. 스로틀 점검을 계속 진행하겠습니다... 짐벌 드라이브 점검이 필요한지 
Go ahead, Guaymas - G
ठीक है। समय यह है - कार्यक्रम इस समय होगा; और हमें निम्नलिखित स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी करनी है: रोल 101.0, पिच 090.0, यॉ पूरी तरह से शून्य। उच्च लाभ कोण पिच -23 और यॉ 93 होंगे। और हमें दरों को कम करने के लिए सामान्य प्रक्रियाओं का उपयोग करना है। दरों को कम करने के बाद और स्पिनअप से पहले, हमें मैगज़ीन G के साथ सेक्स्टेंट पर बहुत उच्च गति वाली ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फि
Роджер, я получил этот Rev 41. 06 01 44 D-9. И как
Ok, qual era la domanda? Non ci sento mol
— А на другой фото
Okay. Ich habe lediglic
جيم، في وقت سابق من المساء، أبلغ فريدو عن وجود تسريب من النافذة رقم 1 في وحدة القيادة. كما أبلغ عن قطعة معدنية فضية اللون، مربعة الشكل تقريبًا، طول ضلعها حوالي 10 سم، تطفو في الهواء. كنا نحاول تحديد ما إذا كان هذا تسريبًا
E te li darò durante il debrie
Probably not, if everything holds t
좋습니다. 현재 자세는 피치 23.4, 롤 184.7, 요 14.3입니다. 이 자세로 정렬을 하는 이유는 다음 단계로 스캐닝 망원경 가시성 테스트를 진행할 예정이기 때문입니다. 이 테스트는 태양과 아르크투루스를 70도 각도로 맞추고 축과 트러니언을 0으로 설정한 상태에서 진행합니다. 그 후 트러니언 바이어스 조정을 하고, 이
हमें यहाँ गंभीर समस्याओं का सामना करना पड़ रहा है। हम यहाँ बुरी तरह से फँसे हुए हैं। हम एजेना नदी से अलग-थलग पड़ गए है
Да, я сейчас работаю над высоким коэффициентом усил
Aufgrund der extremen Helligkeit, die unsere
Okay, Jim. We're going to have to get back with you in a couple of minutes on whether or not we switch over at this time to your other canister. Second point, it might help in setting up this if you concentrate on roll first, and get that going; and then work on pitch,
Roger. Canton Cap Com, Friendship Seven. Carburante 62-75 [g
Es ist nicht schlimm. Es wird etwas warm hier drin. Es scheint warm zu werden, wenn ich schlafen gehe. Ich weiß nicht, warum. Eigentlich sollte es dann kalt werden, aber stattdessen wird es wa
收到。正在接收。30，SPS/G&N：36691；减 061，加 067 135 23 4149；，加 32020，加 06713，减 02773 181 054 013；，HA 不适用，加 00230 32833 228，DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355。接下来的三行不适用。加 1103，减 - - 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52。您的目标星是天津四和织女星，242 172 012。我们喜欢两台喷气发动机的空隙为 16 秒。地平线将在 TIG - 2 分钟时位于 11 度标记处。还有其他备注：你的六分仪星在134.50秒后
Ne ho un altro per te. Copialo e me lo darai tutto sul readback. Okay. Una volta che hai preso l'atteggiamento e vuoi usare il - vuoi prendere la lampada, dobbiamo andare su CB 16 INVERTER 2, chiudi; CB 11, AC BUS A LAMPADA, chiudi. Dopodiché, puoi aprire CB 16 INVERT
了解、セブン、分かりました。問題は、逆
Well, all we
Na toll! Ich kann den Beutel nicht aufreiße
了解です。PDIパッド：102:33:04.36; 09:50; マイナス0002.1; 182,287,000; プラス56919。PDIが10未満：105:12:30.00。PDIが10より大きい場合の中止：103:40:00.00、107:11:30.00。PDIなしプラス12中止：102:44:37.00; プラス0122.3、マイナ
حسنًا. ضغط الهيليوم حوالي 37، وضغط المشعب 182، والكمية 80. أما النقطة B، فدرجة حرارتها حوالي 112، وضغط الهيليوم حوالي 36.5، وضغط الوقود 180، والكمية حوالي 77. النقطة C درجة حرارتها 140 - بالمناسبة، كان من المفترض أن تكون درجات الحرارة الأخرى 120 بدلًا من 110؛ كنت أستخدم معايرة خاطئة. الضغط 37، وضغط المشعب حوالي 182، والكمية 80. أما النقطة D، فدرجة حرارتها 115، وضغطها 37، وضغ
È piuttosto più difficile cogliere la deriv
안녕하세요, 카나본
Roger, 11. J'ai deux PADS pour toi, 30 puis un 31. 30 SPS/G&N: 36691, moins 061, plus 066 135 23 4156. NOUN 81: 32 - correction, plus 32011, plus 06818, moins 02650 181 054 014. Apogée: NA, périgée: plus 00230 3286 - correction, 32836; durée de combustion: 2 28 32628 24 1511 357. Les trois lignes suivantes sont NA. NOUN 61: +1
Это примерно верно, Джим. Джек выровняется в этом положении. Именно для этого мы и просим тебя выполнить маневр — для достижения этого положения. Мы
ठीक है। किसी ने कोई और दवा नहीं ल
Ich verstehe dich s
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Ich hatte damals noch nichts gesagt. Wir arbeiten gerade an einer Lösung. Bezüglich Ihrer vorherigen Frage zur Koordination der Schlafzyklen stimmen wir Ihnen zu. Wir möchten den Flugplan bezüglich der Schlafzyklen etc. bis zum Erreichen der Mondumlaufbahn wieder einhalten. Daher bitten wir Sie, selbst zu entscheiden, wie Sie die Schlafzyklen am effizientesten untereinander aufteilen. Bitte halten Sie uns auf dem Laufenden, wer welche Aufgaben übernimmt und welche Pläne Sie haben. Wir haben den um zwei Stunden verschobenen Termin. Wir möchten den anderen Termin noch einplanen. Wir können den Zeitpunkt auch für den zweiten Termin anpassen, falls es zu Überschneidungen kommt – ich schätze, das wären zwei weitere Termine. Wir können die Zeiten auch dafür anpassen, wenn Sie uns m
好的。我们会给几家造纸公司打电话，看看
제미니 4, CSQ
Il primo comando load è valido. Il comando at Carnarvon lo ha i
わかりました。E-11のステップ5の最初のサブタイトルに「ヘルメットと手袋」とありますが、その下の項目はスーツを着用するかシャツの袖で入るかによって変わりますが、必ず実行する必要があります。スーツのリターンエアバルブは、シャツの袖で入る場合は実際には開いている必要があります。また、緊急キャビン圧力バルブと
Roge
了解です。今、私に任せているのですか？その前にパワーアップしておき
ह्यूस्टन, ईगल। क्या आप VERB 83 में रेंज और रेंज रेट के लिए बहुत बड़ी 
好的。吉姆，我明白了，情况如下。这是起飞后60分钟的发射
로저. 감사합니다, 휴스턴. 아폴로 8호
Non permetterò più a questi ragazzi di g
روجر. احصل ع
Роджер, плюс 00953, плюс 00578, 
حسنًا. بالنسبة لمنطقة وسط المحيط الهادئ، فالحالة العامة جيد
음
제가 아는 건 한쪽 
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Tous les systèmes son
Housquin - Houston, Tranquility. Do you have a way of showing the configuration of the engine arm circuit breaker? Over. The reason I'm asking is because the end of it appears to be broken off. I think we can push it back in again. I'm not sure we could pull it out if we pushed it in, though. Ov
D'accord. Ces petites bouchées ont été conçues pour éviter que des miettes ne se baladent dans la cabine. Leur taille a donc été spécialement étud
It is. Suit circuit's 
Сейчас начинает по
和..
और शाफ्ट मैकेनिकल सीडीयू लगभग शून्य से 4/100 नीचे रीडिं
Well, it's as I said before. We can't definitely
That's affirm. The two circuit breakers on panel 250 will go open; the two circuit breakers, panel 275, will go open. Okay, the circuit breakers on panel 250, we took care of already. AC INVERTER, 2, we took care of. AC INVERTER 2, AC BUS 1 should now go OFF. And the remaining two switches on panel 3 we took care of. And "Select best OMNI" remains the same. Okay. Read 
Mine is back to EMU. Already done
ジェミニ4、ジェミニ4、ヒュー
알겠습니다. 메인 버스 전압을 확인한 후, 메인 버스와 배터리 버스를 연결하여 메인 버스
13, Хьюст
La responsabilità di questo volo ricade innanzitutto sulla storia e sui giganti della scienza che hanno preceduto questo sforzo; poi sul popolo americano, che ha espresso il suo desiderio attraverso la propria volontà; poi, su quattro amministrazioni e sui loro Congressi, per aver attuato tale volontà; e infine, sui team delle agenzie e dell'industria che hanno costruito i nostri veicoli spaziali, il Saturn, il Columbia, l'Eagle e il
分かりました。マイク、何が起こったかというと…ご存知の通り、あなたはそこに座って監視していました。ステップ7でNOUN 01に入り、アドレスとINFORMATION INFORMATIONを入力しました。そして、最後のENTERキー35400 ENTERを押すと、その直後に…16に戻ります。そしてENTERを押すと、実際にCDUに情報を入力したことになります。レジスタ1とレジスタ2に2つのエントリが入力されると、実際のCDUは瞬時に変化しました。そしてそれを見て、自分が持っていると思っていたものを確認しました。なんと、毎秒600度の速度でした。そして、その速度を取り除こうとジェットが作動したのです。そして、それが監視している速度フィルターは…ええ、監視している速度はフィルターされているので、物体が既に600度に達していない限り、実際の速度を感知できません。そして速度フィルターの読み取りを開始し、「実際には600度には達していなかった」と判断します。そこで装置を停止し、速度を落とそうとします。しかし、それが起こるまでにはある程度のタイムラグがあり、それが速度が上昇していた理由です。ジェットは作動しており、瞬間的に毎秒600度…おそらく600度に達す
Ciao Houston, Acqua
Gemini 4, ici Houston CAP COM. Vous m'entendez?
Okay, Houston. The center panel - I'm looking at the indicator A. We have a package temp
उतारकर रख दिया ग
Okay. She's almost erect in the water at th
정말 좋네요. 감
좋습니다. 조준점을 기준으로 설명드리겠습니다. 전갈자리 머리 부분의 중심별인 주바(Dzuba)입니다. 위치는 아래쪽으로 060도, 왼쪽으로 42도, 위쪽으로 0773도, 아래쪽으로 16500도, 12982도, 36256도입니다. 북쪽 별은 시리
로저, 11
Ich schalte VHF-A jetzt
나는 네가... 가지고 있지 않다는 걸 알
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。ワイドビームで手
로저, 알. 저는 자동 모드, 역추진 모드입니다. 자이로 스위치는 정상이고, 기동 모드는 꺼져 있습니다. 캡슐은 두 개의 해도를 수납하는 것 외에는 역추진을 위한 준비가 완료되었습니다. 이제 출발할 수 있을 것 같습니다. 연료는 자동 81%, 수동 80%로 설정되어 있는데, 이는 중간 보고서와 동일합니다. 변경된 사항은 
Roger. Wally, I think we're losing you. W
Roger. 20 minutes se sont é
ACME बायस पावर, प्र
मैंने हाई-फायर पर किसी को भी, 
좋아요. PC 한 대와 그 위에 2대를 복사할 준비가 됐
No, I think it just drew to a close. We just can't see the stars in the daylight, and we can't carry on the daylight portion of it. We'll wait till we get back to the nighttime and do a li
Roger, Apollo 8. Un paio di appunti per te: per
जैक, मैं आपको सारे चरण पढ़कर सुना देता हूँ, और सुनिश्चित कर लेता हूँ कि हमने सब कुछ सही किया है... एसेन्ट ईसीए, दो, बंद। चरण 2 में अब बैट 6, नॉर्मल फीड, चालू होगा। चरण 3 में बैट 1, 2, 3 और 4, 
The Delta-V is 42.5; duration, 53 seconds; yaw - correction - pitch 
La temperatura varia tra i 52 e i 58 gradi. E devo a Frank Samonski, almeno finora, 50 cente
Okay 
Хорошо. Я тут подумал. Я пытаюсь запихнуть туда как можно больше груза. У нас нет резервуара для сточных вод, и, знаете ли, наш бак для отходов довольно сильно опустошен. Думаю, осталось около 40 процентов. Поэтому я стараюсь максимально увеличить объем сточных вод, и буду очень признателен, если
Ok. Per quanto riguarda i colori,
埃德开始拆卸东西，当我们到达无法再操作助推器的位置时，我便全心全意地帮他——至少帮忙拿着东西，把它们收好，尽量不让它们丢失。我们干得
Roger. Ich ka
Хорошо, Водолей. Мы работаем над 
제미니 4호
我感觉棒极了。好了，我们起飞，然后向左偏航
سيبقى الوضع خارج نطاق السيطرة بالنس
もう5時だ、バズ。オーバー
Apollo 8, 
Okay. I just wanted you to be aware of this and think about it and what
Okay, es sieht so aus, als ob wir über der Südspitze Afrikas einige beleuchtete Gebiete sehen. Ich habe
Хьюстон, это «Аполлон-8». Мы согласны. Сириус и Ригель — две звезды, которые были бы намного лучше, чем Нави и
لنتابع. إذا توقف المحرك أثناء الاحتراق، وظهر لك مؤشر NOUN 97 يومض، فعليك المتابعة، ثم ضب
ه
맞습니다. 다음으로, CB 패널 
これらの小さな窪みのいくつかは*** 沈下する傾向があります。ええ、おそらく5～7.5cmほどです。*** 測量士の写真で少し押し下げられた際に示されたものと全く同じです。土壌の表面を通して力が伝わり、約13～15cmのベイが剥がれ落ち、まるで表面に固まって
M
D'accord, Vance. On est presque prêts à recopier les modifications du livre solo et du plan de vol. Dès que tes blocs-notes seront prêts, on les prendra. Pour ce qui est d'avancer la période de sommeil, pas de problème. Si on ne dort 
没错，我们也想听听您对这些不同
알겠습니다. +25, 그리고 이것은 
ठीक है। 
अपोलो 
حسنًا. سأفعل ذلك. أما بال
Roger. Good burn. No residuals. Propellant quantity remaining is about 
Apollo 8, i
Ich denke, die beiden Dinge, die momentan noch etwas ungeklärt sind, sind, was mit dem [fehlender Text] und dem passenden Eintrag geschehen soll. Wir 
Roger. Die Neigung war damals so, dass das schmale Ende hauptsächlich nach o
Okay. Ich kann Sie gut und deutlich verstehen, und meine Spracheinstellungen sind a
Bene. Ora sposteremo l'uplink sul backup UpVoice per circa 2 minuti, e potrebbero volerci un paio di secondi prima che si senta la perdita dell'UpVoice. Quindi puoi impostare il tuo switch di up-telemetria sul backup UpVoice e, nel caso in cui tutto questo non dovesse funzionare, sto leggend
세븐
Хорошо, Джо. Наши колебания усилились там, где Луна находится довольно высоко в окне, а Земля довольно низко; поэтому я ожидаю, что на той стороне, где присутствует Луна, у нас возникли небольшие пр
Роджер. Вы вносили какие-либо изменения в конфигурацию петли скафандра после перехода из режима выхода в режим кабины после погружения? То есть, в частности, их интересует, помните ли вы, чтобы меняли пол
罗杰。45-1 101。2+08。12 37 50。5+36。10+33。46-1 114。2+25 14 12 47。4+05。9+33。47-1 前后推进器。08 和 120。0+14 
계산에 따르면, 그러니까 계산대로
تفض
이제 좀 
Ma lo abbiamo fatto, ma abbiamo identificato la zona di El Paso e ci è sembrato che ci fosse u
Roger. Thank you. We are sending the SPC l
Ric
أعطني وقتاً للتحم
और आखिरी बात जो हमने सु
LMの重量に変化
了解。アダプターバッテリー1は24.5ボルト、1A
Roger. Wir haben mit dem Laden von Batterie A begonnen, und die Spannung war anfangs viel höher als erwartet. Sie lag knapp unter 40 Volt. Jetzt scheint sie etwas zu sinken, der Batterieladeregler. Gestern, als wir das mit Batterie C gemacht haben, war es ähnlich: Die Spannung war anfangs auch höhe
罗杰。10，/：45597，减 040，加 157，加 35189，减 01513，减 00346 180 007 
Ну, я начал с 5 карандашей, и у меня ос
좋아요, 잭. 이제 본체를 넣으시
I do to
ठीक है। यह प्लस 11 है, /। यह 40 माइनस 163, प्लस 129, माइनस 005, 99, प्लस 00 00 0, प्लस 47016, 177 143 000 नवंबर अल्फा, प्लस 001 97 47 020 5 51 468 18 12 12 83 257 023, ऊपर 263, बाएँ 17, प्लस 11 95, माइनस 165 00 126 83 356 08, उत्तर तारे; 068 097 356, कोई उलेज नहीं। तेज़ वापसी के लिए, हिंद महासागर के लिए 7900, एमएस के लिए उच्च गति प्रक्रिया की आवश्यकता नहीं है। यह मध्यमार्ग सुधार 1 मानता है। समा
戦争。オートツ
حسنًا. خلال مرحلة التفعيل، نقوم بإدخال العديد من البيانات في وقت واحد، ونقرأ لك الفرق في الزوايا، ثم نزودك بزوايا ما بعد الالتواء، وذلك لضبط محاذاة المنصة بدقة. هل تخطط لشيء مماثل
Der Anblick durch diesen Sextanten ist wirklich fantastisch. Vor einer Minute, während des automatischen Manövers, strich das Fadenkr
...チェックリスト。以上
正常、NSR 03 47 34; 61.6; 01 プラス 22; ヨー ゼロ、ピッチ 23 度下; 25, 00567; 26, 00240; 27, 0000; スラスター後方; 
罗杰。我关注你一段时间了。我尝试用高频无线电联系你，但没有成功。我的状态良好；太空舱状态良好；控制模式为电传操纵；陀螺仪已锁定；机动功能已关闭。燃料读数在74%到85%之间。氧气读数在87%到
حسنًا. تم الاستلام يا فريد. وسيقوم فريقنا المختص بالحرارة بمراجعة
Roger,
Роджер. Я тебя хорошо понимаю, Майк, и я тебя понял и в прошлый раз, когда ты меня об этом спросил, так что, наверное, я
进入
Okay. 
Нет. Я спрашивал, довольны ли вы этим. Нас
Okay. There is really not a whole lot in the news this morning. Things are kind of quiet. I guess the biggest news is the accident rate - th
Eh bien, je ne sais pas. Je vais commencer à aligner aussi précisément que possible dans une minute et voir si les scanners le détectent et le corrigent pour que nous ayons une bonne orientation pour le rétroéclairage
आरसीएस हीटर बंद हो रहा है। स्कैन हीटर का सर्किट ब्रेकर खुला हुआ है। कंप्यूटर बंद है। प्लेटफ़ॉर्म - 
はい。新しいものの上部と古いものの下部を対比させます
30-1 109。2+19。13 00 13。4+52。9+40。31-1 84 後方は 42。2+20。9+54。14 34 22。3+54。9+18。32-1 84 後方は 56。2+20。1+11。16 08 16。3+05。8+53。33
Ok, Joe. Abbiamo messo il contenitore dentro il sacchetto, due strisce int
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. Your angles in the flight plan we feel are still good, 198.6 130.7, 340.0. Just sligh
Роджер. Мы это понимаем. Мы сейчас тоже смотрим на Землю, и видим впечатляющую длинную тонкую полосу облаков. Похоже, это может быть струйное течение. Это совершенно потрясающее зрелище — п
GO fürs Staging. Roger. Wir sind M
Roger. This is Friendsh
نعم،
Roger. Non ho ancora una risposta, ma il tuo atteggi
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ペリシンシアンはまだ±1分程度で大丈夫です。地図上で正確に測れる
Oui, monsieur. Voyons voir… un instant… laissez-moi vérifier cette trappe et son intégrité; je pourrai peut-être vous en dire plus. J’ai la réponse à votre question concernant l’alimentation des ombilicaux. Conformément aux procédures, les ombilicaux seront ho
わかりました。2番のバッテリーについては、変
जी हां। मैंने चंद्रमा का उपयोग करके लक्ष्य
Wie lang
रॉजर। के
ヒューストン、こちらアポロ8号です。こちらを見失いました。分離操作は少し遅れるかもしれませんが、そうでなければ、こちらを
Roger. T2: 102 54 2900 103 51 5600 106 37 3500
Роджер. Подождите, я предоставлю отчет о состоянии. Я нахожусь в орбитальном положении для вашего отслеживания. Отчет о состоянии: Все предохранители номер один, кроме второго предохранителя на башне разделения. Аварийная последовательность ретрореверса, аварийный ретрореактивный двигатель и аварийный тормоз находятся в центральном положении «выкл», пиропатрон активирован. Автоматический ретрореактивный двигатель выключен. Все рычаги управления находятся в нормальном положении. Задержка ретрореверса в нормальном положении. Освещение кабины включено. Фотоподсветка все еще горит. Низкочастотная телеметр
ウォビュレーターは
Es war so nett von dir, dan
Здесь, на земле, всё по-прежнему выглядит очень хорошо. У меня есть показания давления в кабине. Для вашей информации, это 4,8 [psia]. Это значительно подтверждает установленную тенденцию. Давлени
好的。5 Charlie，14.0；5 Dogs，3.7；6 Able，3.5；6 Bravo，4.1；6 Charlie，4.2；6 De
Хорошо, Джек. Сейчас мы
Okay. Hai visto un po' di ventilazione f
आगे बढ़ो, कैन
Eagle, Houston. Abbiamo gli angoli di coppia del giroscopio che ti servono, se sei 
正在按计划进行中——目前显示红色。我们刚刚添加了一个。我相信还有……让
我滑
我在这里
Roger, Tranquility. Vorremmo rimandare il più a lungo possibile la consegna della bomboletta di idrossido di litio. Se possibile, fa
分かりました。私の知る限り、誰も薬を飲んでいませんし、今のところ休息に
Du machst einen tollen Job. Jim, wir haben hier unten einen Hack an deinem Beschleunigungsmesser-Bias durchgeführt, und – während deine Plattform eingeschaltet war – sieht es für uns gut au
Houston CAP COM, Gemini 4. Ich
ठीक है। यह उस प्रक्रिया का 
Близнецы 4, у нас хорошее кровяное давление. Не могли бы вы рассказа
Завершающий этап был довольно сложным. Вы
ठीक है। जब आप सभी को थोड़ा समय मिले, तो मेरे पास आपके T8 से
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir haben
Cape Cap Com, hier spricht Sigma Seven. Ich verstehe Sie laut un
没错
Ok. Vediamo se ho capito tutto. Per il rendezvous, prima di tutto vogliamo CB 16 INVERTER 2, chiuso, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2, chiuso. Poi, sul pannello 14, verifichiamo che INVERTER 2 sia selezionato. E CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 chiuso, entrambi gli interruttori. Poi dobbiamo tirare la leva di sblocco del RENDEZVOUS RADAR. Sul pannello 3, vogliamo quindi RENDEZVOUS RADAR. A ENTER con più tutti gli zip, più 28300 nei registri 1 e 2. GO su quello. Poi monitoriamo il movimento con il 16 72. Dopo che si è parcheggiato, CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 aperto, seguito da ENTER. E CB 16 INVERTER 2 aperto. Ora, quando arriva il momento dell'allineamento per ottenere una lampada, CB 16, INVERTER 2 chiuso, CB 11 AC BUS A LAMPADA chiusa e, dopo che l'allineamento è completato su CB 16, INVERTER 2 aperto, CB 11 AC BUS A LAMPADA aperto, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVE
Vers 16h03, alors que nous atteignions le dernier point de pas
Roger. Zunächst einmal, Frank, möchten die Jungs hier an den Konsolen ihre Anerkennung für die hervorragende Fernsehproduktion aussp
D'accord, Jack, compris. Fermez les disjoncteurs de la vanne REAC de la pile à combustible 2. Mettez hors tension les onduleurs. Mettez hors tension le bus relais BAT. Raccordements BAT: OFF. Coupez l'alimentation et 
Chamber pressure was hanging in there around 100. The latter part, of the burn it started oscillating a litt
अभी हम बिल्कुल ज़मीन के करीब हैं, इस तरह कि मुझे नहीं लगता कि ग्राउंड स्टेशन हमें पढ़ पा रहे हैं। हमने कई बार कॉल कटते-कटते सुनी हैं। हम कुछ देर इसी स्थिति में रहेंगे ताकि बूस्टर हमारी नज़र में रहे। अभी बूस्टर के करीब आने में हमें कोई खास सफलता नहीं मिल रही है। ऐसा लग रहा है कि वो अभी भी उतनी ही दूरी पर है जितनी पहले थी। रात में जब बूस्टर हमारे नीचे था, तब ऐसा लग 
That's affirmative and they're all hooked together
그리고 측면에서는 최소 데드밴드 ATT HOLD 상태였고, 접촉 순간 저는 추력을 X축 방향으로 올렸습니다. 그 직후 상당한 자세 진동과 스러스터 작동이 발생하여 데드밴드를 최대로 열고 수동으로 기체를 조종하여 안정적인 자세를 유지한 후, 낙하산을 접었습니다. 그 후 스러스터는 OF
好的。面板 3：将电池充电开关关闭。面板 5：将主母线电池交流连接线连接至电池交流连接线；断开电池充电
Okay. Einen Moment
ठीक है, कुंभ राशि; ह्यूस्
现在我的地平线非常清晰。天
そうです。ジムが今持っているのは、紐に取り付けたペンです。簡易加速度計みたいなものです。この燃焼はかなり短い
D'accord. Je viens de vérifier si je peux remonter jusqu'à la première marche, 
अपोलो 8. अब हम एक फ्लाईबाई पैंतरेबाज़ी पर जा रहे हैं। यह / 63087, माइनस 162, प्लस 129, प्लस 00
Going down to 127:11, cross out "Verify ON."
罗杰。我们这里已经进行了两次数据提取，效果都非常好……网站
소리
太好了，太好了。是的，真
Aurora Seven, conferma di aver controllato il fly-by-wire e che tutti i pro
Роджер. Наш полет на Луну, возможно, показался вам простым и легким. Хочу вас заверить, что это не так. Ракета «Сатурн V», которая вывела нас на орбиту, — невероятно сложная машина, каждая деталь которой работала безупречно. Этот компьютер над моей головой имеет словарный запас в 38 000 слов, каждое из которых было
Nein. Ich habe einen wundersc
ATCA (PG
向左倾斜 45°。向右倾斜 55°。反转倾斜角度时间为 19:
ठीक है, मैं वापस चेकलिस्ट के पेज 6 पर आ गया हूँ। जैक, चालू करने और स्व-परीक्षण के नीचे। हमने इस पेज पर स्व-परीक्
روجر. نحن على وشك فقدان قفلنا؛ ولهذا السبب نبطئ قليلاً. نرى الآن
다음으로, 35페이지 오른쪽 부분을 보세요. "우주선 제어, 자동, 확인"부터 그 아래 모든 항목에 "황도광 사진 촬영은 선택 사항입니다."라는 주석을
تصحيح - اجعل ذلك للمدار التالي. لديك بالفعل قيمة AOS/ لهذ
Roger, Houston. A few words on our optics tracking system. I used AUTO OPTICS for control points 1 and 2 on the backside, and they worked beautifully, tracked both the targets for me. And I went to the control point 3 as designated in our orbital control book to see the latitude and longitude that was given to me and used AUTO OPTICS to track that particular coordinate system, and it was very close to the actual tracking plot. I picked the mark there where I did a final marking and recorded
لا بد أن مرحل Tr-10 قد تم تشغيله، على الرغم من أنني لا أملك أي أدلة - باستثناء ظهور الجيروسكوبات المعد
はい、わかりました
Well, you go ahead. I'll get you to give me a call when you get done, and I'll pass 
Sto controllando la mia cabina. Ci sono circa 15°C. Lascio 
Вы же его не прятали, 
Okay. At 23 hours the total is 1121, quad A is 274, quad Bravo is 286, quad Charlie is 274, quad Delta is 287, and the cryos are as follows: H2 tank 1, 83 perce
जेमिनी 4, 
Gemini 4, это св
Roger, Houston. minus 11, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 36325, minu
Okay. Knapp unter 13. Nur zur Info: Wir haben Leute, die an verschiedenen Themen arbeiten. Wir arbeiten an der bevorstehenden Mittellinie, um unser Steuerungssystem festzulegen und die Ausrichtung zu optimieren. Das LMS und mehrere Teams arbeiten intensiv daran. Wir arbeiten auch an unserem Wiedereintritt, wie und wann wir ihn aktivieren sollen. Außerdem überprüfen wir den Systemstatus. Morgen findet ein Test des Hauptbusses B statt. Viele Leute arbeiten h
إنها مهمة تابعة لسلاح الج
Die einzigen beiden Sicherungen in der
मैं अभी VOX रिकॉर्डिंग में हूँ। मुझे हवाई से आवाज़ आ रही है, हा हा, हवाई से आवाज
क्या तुमने आतिशबाजी कर
了
아주 좋아요. 부모님이 저를 자랑스러워하실까요? 제가 지금 엑
Roger. On l'a
بعد استراحة هادئة دامت حوالي 45 دقيقة، أردت فقط الاطمئنان عليك. لاحظنا، على سبيل المثال، أنه يمكنك تحسين أداء هوائي الاستقبال عالي الكسب لديك، إذا رغبت، بال
Я не уверен, что космический аппарат выдержит такой большой дополнительный 
켄, 저는 프랭크입니다. 한 가지 확실히 하고 싶은 게 있습니다. 이게 우리가 태워버릴 데이터
بالنسبة للرحلة S-5، ستكون الرحلة فوق الولايات الم
Ok,
... fo
Ne laissons pas cet
Да, я бы 
네. 짐이 아래쪽 장비실에서 저희 모습을 촬영할 예정이고, 그 후에는 우주선의 한쪽 면이 너무 오랫동안 과열되지 않도록 수동 열 제어 모드(바비큐 모드)로 돌아가야 합니다. 그럼 여기서 방송을 마치겠습니다. 곧 다시 뵙기를 기대합
Aurora Seven... 95. Il tuo punto di atterraggio è a 200 miglia di distanza. Ti faremo a
这里是友谊七号。太阳刚升起的时候，有一些闪闪发光
Roger, Neil. Stiamo osservando alcuni aumenti di temperatura nell'esperim
我跟你说
アポロ8号、最初のテストは終了しました。アップリンクモードを「アップリンク・コマンド＆レンジング」に変更し、アップボイスをオフにします。このモードは2分半続き、テストメッセージを送信します。コンピューターやパネルスイッチの設定には影響しません。ブレークロックに関連するSバンドノイズが見えるかもしれませんが、パワーメータ
双子座4号，休斯顿。我们希望你
收到，正在转
はい、そうしました。素晴らしい説明を受けて、この銘柄はずっと上昇傾向を続けると予想していたので、「上昇」から始めました。ところが、すぐにラインを
Ci stiamo preparando a rilegge
Джим, ранее вечером Фред-о сообщил о выбросе газов из окна № 1 в командном модуле. Он также сообщил о куске незакрепленного металла размером примерно 4 на 4 дюйма, серебристого цвета, плавающем рядом. Мы пытались выяснить, является ли это новым выбросом газов или частью остаточного выброса, возникшего в результате нашей первоначальной пр
Gemini 4, Carnarv
Apollo 8, quando avrai la possibilità di scendere nel van
Manuel.
네, 말
Oh ja, das werde ich. Ganz besti
और मैंने कॉपी कर लिया है कि आप
Ora, se vuoi t
그러면 여기에 쓰레기가 더 들어
Hai controllato le quantità MDIU mentre il comput
알겠습니다. 좋은 생각입니다. 저희는 서비스 모듈 사진 촬영을 위해 어떤 기동을 허용할지 많은 논의를 거쳤습
그리니치 표준시 00시입니다. 죄
D'accord. Je vais d'abord vou
Roger. Wir haben endlich Einigkei
はい、ジャック。
Il est impossible de faire transite
Astro. C'est le pilote suisse. Le 
Каков был мой геометрический темп в момент старта, ком
Questo è Gemini 4. Dopo circa 47 ore si desidera eliminare la traduzione 2-Alpha, il controllo della modalità di scansione dell'orizzo
Ich habe jetzt einen sehr klaren Horizont. Es ist ziemlich hell, und der Horizont besteht hauptsächlich aus Wolken. Ich kann die Wolken sehen – die Sterne, wie sie langsam in das Hauptglühen der Atmosphäre absinken –, aber die Wolken scheinen den Horizont heller zu machen. Früher im Flug hatten wir einen wolkenlosen Horizont gesehen, und der war viel heller – da war eine ziemlich dichte Schicht aus Luftglühen, und man konnte die Sterne sehen, wie sie hindurchgingen. In diesem wolkenartigen Horizont sind die Sterne allerdings schwerer zu erkennen; ich bemerke aber, dass einige der helleren Sterne beim Untergang durch ihn hindur
好的。从 T 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225 开始接收，Shaula，上升 236 000，正负 
بالنظر إلى الخارج، نجد أن أول طريق سريع في كوريا الجنوبية، الذي يربط سيول بميناء إنتشون، قد سُمّي طريق أبولو السريع تخليداً ل
قال جيم يا جاك إنه ليس مزعجًا. إنه مزعج ب
し
알겠습니다. 지휘관 위치에서 이해했습니다. 그리고 해치를 닫은 시간도 알려주시면 
D'accord. C'est bien lui. Il s'agit de Jim Lovell. Aujourd'hui, nous souhaitions vous faire découvrir un peu la vie à bord d'Apollo 8. Après vous avoir montré des images de la Lune et de la Terre, nous voulions vous inviter dans notre vaisseau. Nous y vivons depuis au moins quatre jours, comme vous pouvez le voir sur le tableau de bord. Nous y marquons chaque jour. Nous en sommes au quatrième jour et nous entamons le cinquième. Bien sûr, nous attendons tous avec impatience l'alunissage de vendredi. Ici, dans la partie du vaisseau que nous appelons la soute inférieure, le conseiller du Président pour la condition physique, le capitaine Jim Lovell, s'apprête à commencer son programme d'exercices quotidien. Vous remarquerez qu'il se déplace avec une grande aisance. Il vient de se cogner la tête contre les optiques utilisées pour la navigation. Il utilise un appareil de musculation conçu pour maintenir ses muscles en forme. Une autre fonction essentielle de notre vaisseau spatial est l'ordinateur de bord. Je pensais que vous seriez intéressés de voir les écrans qui nous fournissent toutes les informations concernant la manœuvre de propulsion, la navigation et la vitesse utilisée lors de la rentrée atmosphérique et de la rétropropulsion pendant les missions en orbite terrestre. Vous pouvez constater qu'il est contrôlé par un système similaire à un clavier de machine à écrire, et les données qui y entrent et en sortent sont absolument miraculeuses. Il a accompli un travail fantastique, et Jim Lovell l'a piloté avec brio. Un autre point très important, que l'on soit dans l'espace ou sur Terre, est l'alimenta
好的。在第 
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP COM. Bitte geben Sie m
うーん…いや、全部の代替案を試したわけではないんです。実は、一番は捨てないことなんです。UCDのこの接続か何かが関係しているんじゃないかな、と推測しています。普通の尿袋を捨てようとすると…すごく臭いので、手に取っていじり回すのは嫌なんですが、仕方ない
Okay. And I saw some of John's friends up here; I'm afraid to say, although I knock
肯，跟踪数
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Когда вы остановитесь в положении «0 крена», вы будете находиться примерно в положении 90 градусов по тангажу, 0 градусов по рысканию и 0 градусов по кре
Jerry, tra poco vorrei
Roger. Verstanden. GET burn 02 45 50; Delta-V, 26,2; 0 plus 35; Gierwinkel 90 rechts, Nickwinkel 0; 25 und 26 sind alle Nullen; 27, 90262; Heckstrahlruder; Manöve
Хорошо. Панель 3: ЗАРЯДКА АККУМУЛЯТОРА, ВЫКЛ. - ты это уже сделал, Джек - далее ИНВЕРТОР ПЕРЕМЕННОГО ТОКА, Панель 5: ГЛАВНАЯ ШИНА, СОЕДИНЕНИЕ АККУМУЛЯТОРА B/C С АККУМУЛЯТОРОМ B/C. А? Да, она в верхнем положении. 
ステータスレポートを渡す準備はできましたか? 
That's affirmative, Jim. After the hando
Wisst ihr, irgendwie schickt ihr mir jedes Mal, wen
同意，我们需要
了解です。これは9、/: 45597、マイナス040、プラス157、プラス34188、マイナス01353、プラス00780 180 008 001、11月のアルファ星、プラス00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033、下131、左28、プラス0758、マイナス16500 12987 36277です。主星はシリウス、副星はリゲル、129 155 010です。四重連星4個、15秒、アレージ、地平線はTマイナス3度で1.2度の窓線上にあります。マイナスのマイク・アルファ星で高速手順を使用
क्या
Roger. Ascension PAD: TIG 124 22 00 00 00 NOUN 76 55349 00322, plus 0017; 47, plus 37104, moins 70470, plus 58604, plus 56936. Votre poids 1083
ठीक है। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। यह चीज़ ओरिएंटेशन मोड में बार-बार आ-जा रही है और इस समय ईंधन बर्बाद कर रही है। मैं इसे मैन्युअल रूप से ऑर्बिट एटीट्यूड पर रखने की कोशिश करूँगा। ओवर। या फिर फ्ल
Roger. Würden Sie bitte Ihren Encode
On pense que c'est possible, Jack. On pense que ça pourrait être entre 15 et 20 secondes, et notre recommandation est que tu maintiennes le bouton PRO enfoncé pendant un bon moment, probablement une demi-minute ou plus, et que tu voies si les blanc
حسنًا. سنخت
حسنًا. وعلى أي حال، لم نحصل على تقرير طبي صالح لقياس درجة الحرارة عن طريق الفم، لذا سنحتاج إلى 
Джим, не могли бы вы перевести ваш коммутатор BIOMED в положение, противоположное текущему? Мы принимаем поднесущий сигнал, но данн
Noch 350. Bitte am
R
阿波
Ich habe Ihren letzten Satz nicht verstanden, Fred-o. Wi
Sobald Sie bereit sind, senden wir Ihnen ein Beschleunigungsmesse
बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। ठीक है, मैं ये मात्राएँ बता देता हूँ। जब हमने शुरू किया तब GMT 1716 था। प्रणोदक की मात्रा 60 थी। केबिन का तापमान 92 डिग्री सेल्सियस था। सूट का तापमान 58 डिग्री सेल्सियस था। केबिन का दबाव 5.6 डिग्री सेल्सियस था। सूट में CO2 की मात्रा 3/4 मिलीमीटर थी। बाईं ओर की सेकेंडरी ऑक्सीजन बोतल में 5100 डिग्री सेल्सियस थी। दाईं ओर की सेकेंडरी ऑक्सीजन बोतल में 5050 डिग्री सेल्सियस थी। ECS में ऑक्सीजन की मात्रा 62 
Vermutlich war es der Doppler-Effekt; wir fahren w
알겠습니다. 잘 들었습니다. 새로운 4-1 명령 로드와 TR을 보내드리겠습니다. 타이머를 34분으로 
알겠습니다. 아직 SLEW 모드라서 기체가 서서히 기울어지
Apollo 11, Houston. Il nostro consiglio è di riporlo sopr
ジャック、あなたは今影の中にいます。あなたの窓はとても明るい
Wie wäre es mit einer langfristigen Prognose, wie das Wetter am Freitag im Er
Okay. That concludes the powerdown of displays. And I have a pad 
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نحن جاهزون في غولدستون للبث التلفزيوني. سيتم تسجيل البث في غولدستون ثم يُعاد عرضه هنا، ن
로저. 색깔에 대해 몇 가지 아이디어를 주시겠어요? 그리
Roger. Aus den Nachrichten des Pressebüros: Apollo 11 beherrscht weiterhin die Schlagzeilen weltweit. Nur vier Nationen – das kommunistische China, Nordkorea, Nordvietnam und Albanien – haben
Ed a commencé à ranger le matériel et, dès que nous avons atteint un point où il n'était plus possible de manipuler le propulseur, je l'ai aidé à plein temps – du moins en tenant les objets, en les rangeant et en essayant d'éviter qu'ils ne disparaissent. Plus nous travaillions vite, plus nous prenions de retard. Non pas que nous ne rangions pas les choses correctement, mais cela prenait beaucoup plus de temps que prévu. En apesanteur, ce n'était pas beaucoup plus facile que dans le simulateur, si ce n'est tout aussi facile. Nous avons donc procédé ainsi. Arrivés à Carnarvon, j'étais convaincu que nous n'y arriverions pas, mais je pensais que nous allions persévérer encore un peu. Juste avant de quitter Carnarvon, il était clair pour moi que nous ne pourrions pas effectuer la dépressurisation. J'ai demandé un changement d'orbite. Nous avons alors… repris notre souffle pendant une vingtaine de minutes et essayé de ranger le bric-à-brac qui traînait dans le cockpit. J'ai ensuite ressorti la checklist et nous l'avons passée en revue une nouvelle fois en détail pour nous assurer de n'avoir rien oublié dans la précipitation. Nous avons commencé la sortie extravéhiculaire et reçu le feu vert au-dessus de
روجر، نود أن نعرف متى 
ठीक है। प्र
1، 2، 
로저, 11. TV 조종면은 롤 261, 피치 090, 요 000입니다. 고이득 각도는 피치 +28, 요 271입니다. 이렇게 하면 왼쪽 창이 지구를 향하게 됩니다. 업데이트된 절차를 체크리스트에 추가하고 종료하시기 바랍니다
ठीक है। और, साथ ही, आपका स्टेट वेक्टर अब लगभग 5 घंटे की ट्रैकिंग पर आधारि
Kabinendruck und Kabinenhöhenmesser stimmen in der Höhe ü
Okay. Some truck lines are being struck in the Midwest, and the school teachers have walked off 
Roger. Was den Dow Jones Industrial Average betrifft: Seit seinem Schlusskurs am Dienstagnachmittag, dem 15., bis etwa 13:05 Uhr Houstoner Zeit heute Nachmittag, war der Nettoeffekt ein Rückgang um 6 Punkte. Seit Handelsbeginn ist der Dow Jones Industrial Average heute um 11,05 Punkte gefallen, nachdem er kurz nach der Eröffnung um 1,5 Punkte gestiegen war. Die Versorger verzeichneten heute ei
D'accord, on a viré à droite. Je pense l
ठीक है। आगे
بحسب وكالة أسوشيتد برس، يعتزم سكان الساحل الغربي في سياتل، واشنطن؛ وبورتلاند، أوريغون؛ 
좋아요. 이제 다음 단계는 아치형 부분 근처의 비닐봉투 한쪽 끝에 대각선으로 구멍을 뚫는 것입니다. 어느 쪽이든 상관없으니 1.5인치 또는 2인치 정도의 대각선 구멍을 뚫어 빨간색 호스를 통과시킬 수 있도록
ر
Хорошо, Джек, теперь у меня есть инструкция, которую я могу вам зачитать. Прежде чем это сделать, я хочу упомянуть кое-что, что может заинтересовать Фреда. Мы наблюдаем повышение давления в баке с хладагентом и ожидаем, что он взорвется. Мы точно не знаем, когда это произойдет, где-то около 105 часов
Nous vous demandons
Roger
Nous lui avions demandé il y a longtemps s'il pouvait observer des étoiles à travers son télescope. Je crois que nous n'avons ja
C'est exact, 
احصل على RC 25 15 58؛ تقاعد 400 ألف؛ 20 زائد 15. تقاعد RB 26 زائد 38، الرصيد المتبقي
Yes. I'm monitoring them, and they look real good to me, Bill. Just a second and I will check with the experts. Yes, you
제
11、ヒュース
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston.
ठ
حسنًا، نقطة الحض
He was having difficulty maintaining his orientation, and it looked to me from then on he oriented off the spacecraft without regard to which direction it was pointing. He could actually impart quite high rates to it, as high as 2° per second. I in
Sì, sono appesi insieme
弗
Ok. La temperatura della cabina è di 92 gradi, e ti darò gli inverter. Stand-by. - L'inverter principale è, l'inverter da 250 è circa 1
잠겼어요, 잠겼어요
Loud and clear. I woke up about 30 or 40 minutes ago and then - actually I didn't wake up right then - just sort of sitting there resting. I really haven't been having much luck sleeping. I 
オーケー。21-4用の弾薬は確保できた
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हम आपकी बात समझ गए हैं, और पान
Ich habe das nicht ganz verstanden. Könnten Sie es 
알겠습니다. 이제 근접 비행 기동 페이지에서 북쪽 별자리 아래에 새로운 숫자가 있습니다. 이전에 나비자리와 북극성을 사용했던
こちらはフレンドシップ・セブンです。フライ・バイ・ワイヤを操作すると、フライ・バイ・ワイヤのスイッチから小さなパチパチという音が聞こえます。ヘッドセットから聞こえ
제미니 VI호, 휴스턴. 보시는 바는 알겠습니다만, 레이더를 말씀하시는 것 같네요. 육안으로는 확인
이제 저기 뒤쪽에서 
우리는 그렇게 해야 한다고 생각
Yes. We can get VERB 64 before we come 
まあ、いいでしょう。そのまま
ANZUGVEN
Le lacet est actuellement à envir
Ja, das könnte sein, Charlie. Warte hier
ऐसा लगता है कि मैं 
Je regarde les étoiles. Il fait clair, mais pas encore complètement noir. On dirait que le hublot fait office de filtre, atténuant la luminosité des étoiles de faible magnitude. Je regarde la Grande Ourse, puis Arcturus… et il me semble que je vois principalement des étoiles de deuxième et troisième ordre. Les plus petites sont quasiment invisibles pour le moment. Plus la nuit
알겠습니다. 7-3 구역 GET RC, 10 04 47; RET, 400K, 
Верно, потому что показания немного 
Нет, нет, нет
क्योंकि आज एक विशेष
D'accord. P
Gemini VI, Хьюстон. Мы будем готовы пре
Du kannst ihm sagen, dass es uns gut gefällt. Sie waren sog
Très
Попробую выложить файл, а я его во
好的，他会在我后
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्
روجر. قادم إليك. 30، SPS/G&N: 36691؛ ناقص 061، زائد 067 135 23 4149؛، زائد 32020، زائد 06713، ناقص 02773 181 
Apollo
حسنًا يا جاك. لنكمل، كل شيء على ما يرام حتى تصل إلى - في الصفحة التالية، ستجد "التحقق من مؤشر تدفق الأكسجين: لا زيادة". نريد حذف كل ما يلي ذلك، حتى الخطوة الأخيرة، وهي "إطفاء أضواء النفق". لذا، بدءًا من "قبل
프렌드십 
はい、おそらくそこ
Sehr gut. Auf Seite E-9, wenn Sie sich auf den Wechsel in die Kommandomodulposition vorbereiten, sollten Sie, um ein Zünden der Triebwerke infolge einer Lagekorrektur zu vermeiden, die manuellen Lageregelungsschalter auf „Beschleunigungsbefehl“ oder „Minimaler Impuls“ stellen. Und noch einmal auf Seite E-9 Alfa, Schritt 41 „Bravo“: Wenn Sie wieder in den Lageregelungsmodus zurückkehren möchten, stellen
Okay, Apollo 8. What we're going to do on the TV is to go ahead and let you crank it up as soon as we get back on the high-gain antenna, and it looks like - my guess is that this will be about, and we'll just use this to - as long as we have the coverage there. I have an update to your plus 
Prendi
ठीक है, धन्यवाद। और बस एक मिनट, मैं आपके साथ 's पर आ रहा हूँ। तीन प
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。ゴールドストーンでテレビを受信して
Das REACs-Ventil an Brennstoffzel
비행 일정에 포함되지 않은 추가 운동 시간에 참여하게 되었습니다
Okay. Wie weit, glauben sie, stehen wir im Bereich
रॉजर। यह स्विम 1, अपोलो 11 ह
了解
좋아요, 그럼 여러분의 태도는 어땠
Roger. We're at that attitude right now and looking through the scanning telescope. 
わかっ
了解しました。そして左手、つまり北の方角には、西インド諸島周辺の明るい海域が見え、フロリダも見えます。ビルの単眼鏡を覗いてみると、南アメリカ、そしてアメリカ合衆国の中央部と南部といった様
わかりました、ジャック。バーンパッドを確認したところ、ジ
Руби Грэм, астролог из Хьюстона. Мы связываемся с отделом управления полетами, чтобы узнать все знаки зодиака для нашей миссии, и, конечно же, н
Ночью нам следует просто фотографировать — делать снимки, не преследуя какой-ли
Bisogna sapere che s
And, Houston, could you
P
حسناً، فهمت. تنصح هيوستن بالترشيد في استهلاك الوقود. يقدرون استهلاك 10 أرطال من الوقود الدافع له
حسن
真是见鬼了。我现在用的是按键通话功能了
不，我只是好奇——我们还没收到
كانت دائرة التبريد الثانوية بحالة جيدة جدًا. يبدو أن لديك مشعاعًا محكمًا، وأن جميع المكونات الأخرى تعمل بكفاءة عالية. امتلأت منظمات الأكسجين الرئيسية لديك بضغط 104 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة أثناء فحصنا. بالنظر إلى م
Rog
그리고, 트랭퀼리티 베이스, 거리 측정이 완료되었습니다. S 밴
Хорошо. Перво
TVC GIMBAL DRIVE, PITC
저 아래를 내려다보고 여러분들이 불을 켜놓았는지 확인해 봐야겠어요. 혈압을 확
Хорошо. У меня для вас специальный репортаж от Хейни. В последнем номере Interstellar Times говорится, что полет на Луну занимает центральное место как на страницах газет, так и на телевидении; это ГЛАВНАЯ новость. Заголовок в Post
……应该从侧面过来。这样，吉姆，你就把我们带到正确的轨道上了。我们现在在正确的轨道上。我们已经对准了目标，接下来会再次跟随地球、月球和太阳继续前进
Gut.
ठीक है, जिम
BECO-Prüfung abgeschl
Hey, du hast jetzt eine neue Folge von CAPCOM mit der Black Crew am Start, und wir haben ungefähr drei Dinge für dich,
알겠습니다. 거기에 3.3을 더합니다. 그리고 우리는 
Нет
Roger. The series of cracks or faults across they drop down in about three steps to the south. The parallel fault pattern to the north has a drop down in the center. I hope all of you back down on earth can see what we mean when we say that it is a rather foreboding horizon, a very rather dark and unappetizing looking place. We are now going over 
Ok, VII. 36 p
एड ने सामान खोलना शुरू किया और जैसे ही हम उस स्थिति में पहुँचे जहाँ बूस्टर के साथ छेड़छाड़ करना संभव नहीं था, मैंने पूरी तरह से उसकी मदद करना शुरू कर दिया - कम से कम सामान पकड़कर उसे सही जगह पर रखना और उसे गायब होने से बचाना। जितनी तेज़ी से हम काम करते, उतना ही हम पीछे होते चले जाते। ऐसा इसलिए नहीं था कि हम चीज़ों को सही जगह पर नहीं रख रहे थे, बल्कि इसमें हमारी उम्मीद से कहीं ज़्यादा समय लग रहा था। जीरो ग्रेविटी में यह सिम्युलेटर की तुलना में ज़्यादा आसान नहीं था, हालाँकि उतना ही आसान था। इसलिए हमने पूरा चक्कर लगाया। जब तक हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे, मैंने मन बना लिया था कि हम वहाँ नहीं पहुँच पाएँगे, लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि थोड़ी देर और कोशिश करते हैं। जब हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे - या वहाँ से निकलने से ठीक पहले - मुझे स्पष्ट हो गया था कि हम दबाव कम करने की प्रक्रिया पूरी नहीं कर पाएँगे। मैंने अगली कक्षा में जाने के लिए स्लिप का अनुरोध किया। फिर... हमने लगभग 20 मिनट तक आराम किया और कॉकपिट में पड़े फालतू सामान को व्यवस्थित करने की कोशिश की। फिर मैंने चेकलिस्ट निकाली और हमने दोबारा विस्तार से चेकलिस्ट देखी ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि जल्दबाजी में हमसे कुछ छूट तो नहीं गया। एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट शुरू किया - कार्नार्वोन के ऊपर हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। हम सब तैयार थे और दबाव कम करने की हरी झंडी का इंतजार कर रहे थे। हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। दबाव कम करने का चक्र पूरा हुआ। कार्नार्वोन से निकलते ही हमें पूर्ण एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट (EVA) के लिए मंजूरी मिल गई। हम कैंटन या हवाई पहुंचे, और उस समय हमें - मुझे लगता है कि कैंटन या हवाई से ही हमें अंतरिक्ष यान से बाहर निकलने और एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट शुरू करने की हरी झंडी मिली थी। हमने इसे अपने टेप रिकॉर्डर और VOX पोजीशन के अनुसार पूरा किया। हम आगे बढ़े और एड बाहर निकल गए और हमने तस्वीरें लेना शुरू कर दिया - जैसे हम लेते हैं... मैंने शुरू में 
अब बेहतर दिख रहा है। आप इसे लगभग 1 या 2 बजे की दिशा में पकड़े हुए हैं। अच्छा दिख रहा है। हमें थोड़ा और इसी दिशा में दिखाएँ। अब आप 3 बजे की दिशा में हैं। हमें लगभग आधा ही दिख रहा ह
انتظر حتى أنتهي من إغلاق سحاب بذل
Хорошо, Фред. Во-первых, подготовку к этому, начиная с контрольного списка действий в чрезвычайных ситуациях, страница 24, мы рекомендуем начать именно с этого, и мы будем рады любым вашим комментариям по этому поводу. Во-вторых: когда вы находитесь в режиме управления двигателем, вы должны видеть Солнце в самой верхней точке. Оно будет разделять курсор, когда курсор установлен на нуле. Однако следует помнить, что оно очень легко выйдет из этого реж
Bene, allora è meglio che inizi a manovrare; accidenti, sono stato sbalzato fuori dall'aereo in qualche modo. Vediamo, siamo in picchiata - vogliamo tornare
Nein. Ich sehe sie hier auf dieser Seite nicht. Kurz nachdem ich Canaveral verlassen und mich umgedreht hatte, sah ich ein paar wenige. Sie kamen mir entgegen. Da ich in Bewegung war,
휴스턴
حسنًا. ممتاز إذًا. وفي المرة القادمة، سنُلقي نظرةً مُعمّقةً على جميع المعايير؛ سنُقدّمها لكم. 
好的，休斯顿。在下降阶段 1，燃料和氧化剂的压力读数为 10 psi；在下降阶段 2，燃料的压力读数为 10 psi；氧化剂的压力读数为 11 
Хорошо. Правила работы двигателя. Мы должны выключить его, если показания монитора тяги составляют 77 процентов или ниже; пункт 2, если давление топлива в свободном пространстве меньше 160 psi; пункт 3, если дельта-параметр окислителя топлива превышает 25, и это будет сигналом тревоги на земле; пункт 4, если ошибка ориентации составляет плюс-минус 10 градусов, за исключением переходных процессов при запуске. Хорошо. Ограничения скорости составляют плюс-минус 10 градусов в секунду. И индикатор ENGINE GIMBAL, индикатор ISS с PROGRAM ALARM, индикатор CES DC и индикатор инвертора, если он все еще горит после того, как мы попробовали переключить инверторы. Если во время работы двигателя он выключается, когда мигает NOUN 97, мы должны выполнить PRO, вручную увеличить давление топлива в свободном пространстве, нажать кнопку START и открыть DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE. Если мы не выполним PC-2, то следующий маневр будет выполнен на скорости PC-4, что добавит 24 фута в секунду. Мы приземлимся в середине PAC. Хорошо. Мы будем использовать резервную команду скорости или, я полагаю, демпфирование скорости. И бесплатный возврат, который у нас есть сейчас, если мы не выполним PC-2 или PC-4, приведет нас в 152:02:00 в Индийском океане. И никаки
And, Mike, that sure puts the CMP in a bad light, you kno
Ok. UTILIZZARE la valvola DEVIATRIC
友谊七号，这里是印度首都通信公司。我这里有你们的逆序时间序列
MOTORI GIMBAL, PITCH 2 e YAW 2, ON.
Vérifiez que le disjoncteur
D'accord. Nous constatons que l'angle du cardan central est légère
Хорошо. Вы хотите, чтобы я зачитал данные с MDC 3: напряжение батареи B, напряжение PYRO A, напряжение PYRO B, температура форсунок командного модуля: 5 Чарли, 5 Дог, 6 Альфа, 6 Б
이 주변 상황에 대한 자세한 내용은 나중에 살펴보겠지만, 모양, 각도, 입자 크기 등 거의 모든 종류의 암석이 모여 있는 것 같습니다. 색깔은... 음, 기준점을 기준으로 보는 각도에 따라 상당히 다르게 보입니다. 전반적으로 특정한 색깔은 없는 것 같습니다. 하지
روجر. مايك، عندما كنتَ تُجرّب النظام منذ فترة، وعندما قمنا بتقليص نطاق التوقف، افترضنا أن نطاق التوقف كان مُتمركزًا حول الوضعية الجديدة التي كنا عليها آنذاك. منذ ذلك الحين، انحرفنا درجتين تقريبًا في كلٍّ من الميل وا
«Аполлон-8», Хьюс
연결 점검 완료. 들
ठीक है। मैं आपको इसे 14:45:00 बजे 
吉姆，再说一遍。
C'est exact. Sur le panneau 3: Ondu
11号，休斯顿。目前的天气预报显示，您的灾后重建区域天气状况良好：2000英尺高度有零星云层，高空有零星云层，风向070度，风速13节，能见度10英里，海况约4英尺。昨天的预报显示，热带风暴克劳迪娅位于夏威夷以东约500至1000英里处。昨天下午地球卫星拍摄的图像显示，克劳迪娅正在消散，因此它的影响似乎比之前更小了。目前，您的灾后重建区域被认为位于热带辐合带以北不远处，您从窗户往外看应该就能看到。昨天还有报道称，更西边的地方出现了热带风暴维奥拉。它目前位于菲律
Si j'ai bien compris, elle a po
Roger. We have about 46 percent prop 
I had great chunks of that retropack breaking off all the way throu
Всё в порядке, Фрэнк. Отлично. В заключение мы хотели бы сня
네, 활성화 단계까
अच्छा, मैं थोड़ा सा नहाने का सोच रही हूँ, लेकिन आज रात वो एलसीजी नहीं लगाऊँगी। तुमने उनसे इसक
フレンドシップ・セブン、グアイマス・キャップ・コム。地上でスコープ格納表示を確認。地盤の不具合と思わ
Хорошо. Следующий шаг: панели 11 и 16 CB ASCENT ECA CONTROL, две, закрыть.
Roger. Alles sieht sehr gut aus hier. Du k
ठीक है। हम इस NAV अवलोकन को स्थगित कर सकते हैं। यह यहाँ निर्धारित था, और हम इसे स्थगित कर सकते हैं। आपकी नींद संबंधी टिप्पणियों को देखते हुए, हम इसे जल्द से जल्द प्राप्त करना चाहेंगे, और फिलहाल हमारी योजना इसे 2 घंटे आगे बढ़ाने की है। हम इसे उसी समय पर वापस लाएंगे क्योंकि यह इससे संबंधित है। इसलिए यदि यह आपके लिए सुविधाजनक समय है, तो हम उसी के अनुसार योजना बन
At this point, I made a complete electrical check. All electrical systems are green. The amps are about 19 amps. This is very 
كان يواجه صعوبة في الحفاظ على اتجاهه، وبدا لي منذ ذلك الحين أنه لم يعد يكترث لاتجاه المركبة الفضائية. كان بإمكانه بالفعل تغيير اتجاهها بمعدلات عالية جدًا، تصل إلى درجتين في الثانية. كنت أنوي إبقاءها دون هذا المستوى. عندما عاد إلى المركبة، واجهنا صعوبة كبيرة في فتح الباب. في البداية، رفعنا جزء الترس من الباب لتثبيته. بعد تثبيته، لم نتمكن من إغلاق ا
It may be awhile before your rates are settled down. We're still observing fairly high rates and deadbandi
So
Ricevuto. Abbiamo il modulo di comando. Richiedi OMNI C
Сейчас мы находимся на отметке 3+34. Начинаем погружаться во тьму. Солнечный свет падал на нос космического аппарата, причём небольшой конец был направ
रॉजर। मैं आपके फ़्लाइट प्लान का अपडेट पूरा करना चाहता हूँ। मैं यह पुष्टि करना चाहता हूँ कि आपको आइटम 2, MSC-2 और -3 मिल गए है
七，Cap 
Houston, ici Apollo 8. Sachez que nous doutions de pouvoir u
Okay. We're about - inside 10 minutes till. We'll be picking you up again at, and we'll have all of the TV types' information standing by. In the event that the situation develops again, for pointing accuracies, if I see anything that looks like a terminator or anything of that nature, I'm going to call the dark side of it 12 o'clock, and use that as a reference system, and we'll try that. If that doesn't dope out any problems with camera pointing, why I 
D'accord
알았어, 월리. 대기
ちょっと面白い、ちょっと嬉しいニュースがあります。ミシガン州アナーバーに、新しい若者ギャングが誕生したそうです。ギルネット・ギャングという名前で、アナーバーの街を徘徊し、秘密裏に活動し、時には法の網をかいくぐっています。彼らは自らを「善のためのゲリラ」と名乗っています。彼らの活動の一つに、卑猥な言葉で埋め尽くされた橋をペンキで塗ったことがありました。ある夜、彼らはそれをペンキで塗りつぶしたのです。近所の子供たちに人気があるものの危険な廃屋は板で覆われました。企業と政府のどちらが責任を負っているのかという議論で埋め尽くされてしまったダウンタウンのプランターには、花が植えられました。交通量の多い交差点の視界を妨げていると考えられていた生垣が刈り込まれ、所有者は激怒しました。ヒューロン川沿いのゴミ拾いも行われました。ギャングのメンバーは匿名のティーンエイジャーで、個人として認められようとはしません。彼らの目的は、官僚主義を打破し、物事（彼らにとって良いこと）を成し遂げることです。この組織にはかすかな宗教的色合いがある。ミシガン大学の助教授は、ギャングの思想について非公式に意見交換する場を設けており、一種のエキュメニカルなグループだと語る。名前は聖ペテロ、漁師の網に由来する。また、特定の
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。出発前に、新しい状態ベクトルをお渡しします。オ
Okay. Ich e
Roger. We have an update f
Ihr Reisebericht
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。必要以上に長く放置し
잔지바르 캡콤, 프렌드십 세븐(HF). 아래쪽으로 길고 줄무늬가 있는 구름이 보이고, 오른쪽으로는 일반적인 기상
Roger. Es dauert etwas länger als ich dachte, die gesamte Checkliste für die Anmeldung durchzugehen und erneut zu bes
13日、ヒューストン。ご参考までに、人工呼吸器の設置は
Okay. We are looking at a vacuum perigee right now of 23.6; flight path angle of minus 6.25; and if we decide we want to trim that up, we're looking at a midcourse of about 2 feet per second. Your consumables, of course, are getting better all the time; we've got 163 hours o
酸素流量は以前とほぼ同じ値を示しています。この値が高いのは、客室内のガス切り替えによるものです。アポロ7号によると、もしあなたのデータが彼らのデータ
알겠습니다. 저희는 기체를 아래로 향하게 하여 부스터를 추적하고 있었는데, 안타깝게도 당시 
Prova a rimetterlo davanti alla te
,। क्या आप पढ़ते हैं
रॉजर,
Voyons voir si la dérive va pouvoir la retenir toute
글쎄, 잘 모르겠어, 마이크. 내가 그랬
Apollo 11, ici Houston. À l'arrêt complet (0° de roulis), vous s
रॉजर
Okay. We have checked into your time, 16 on your entry is correct. We'll be giving you an updated entry on the scheduled time of. At the same time, we'll be giving you 
نفس الإنذار ويبدو أنه يظهر عندما يكون لدينا 16 68 قيد الت
Роджер. Я сейчас изуч
Gemini VI, siamo interessati ai Delta-V sull'avvio della fase terminale e sulla frenata, e anche diversi milion
B1のヘルメットに収まるかどうかは疑問です。もう1つは、もしかしたら…スリープレストレイントに入れるかもしれません。ヘルメットバッグに入れてあるので、ヘルメットはヘルメットバッグに、LEVVAはL
네, 16번 패널, 맨 위 줄, 비행 디스플레이: 시스템 엔지니어 크로스포인터, 열림; 시스템 쿼
좋습니다, 아폴로 8호. 마지막으로 널 바이어스 테스트를 한 번 더 실행해 보겠습
Интересно, однако. Падения, как я мог заметить, так и не усилились 
당신은 파이브 스퀘어를 통과하고 있고, 정말 훌륭
ما
알겠습니다. 실제로 기계식 정지점에 도달했는지 확실하지 않지만, 만약 도달했다면 담당자들이 최대 15분 동안은 손상 없이 정지점에 고정된 상태를 유지할 수 있다고 합니다. 그리고 현재 상태 그대로 한 번 더 테스트를 진행해 보고 싶습니다. OMNI 장비는 고비트 전
Roger. Wir sind auf UHF-Kanal 2. 
Bene. Accendiamo PRO dopo aver inserito il 200. Otterremo un 0688 lampeggiante. Carichiamo quindi i vettori unitari del Sole per 7
هيوستن، هذه أبولو 8. لقد فقدنا رؤية هنا. قد تتأخر مناورة ال
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस आपको पिछली रात के भूविज्ञान संबंधी प्रश्न के बारे में कुछ जानकारी देगा। हम अपेक्षाकृत चिकने गड्ढों वाले क्षेत्र में उतरे हैं, जिनमें ल
GET
Ich habe einen weiteren Punkt auf meiner Checkliste: „Überprüfen, ob die
Jerry, another ID feature: these small impact craters have dark spots in th
...И 
Sembra che ci siano dive
알겠습니다. 망원 렌즈는 사용하지 않을 겁니다. 지구 사진을 찍을 수 없을 것 같거든요. 달 표면, 즉 명암 경계선을 찍어야 할 겁니다. 지금도 지구를 보고 있는데, 그 기간 동안에는 다시는 지구
حسنًا. أعتقد أنني أستطيع التحكم 
Okay, Jim. These are gyro compensation terms. They've already been uplinked, and we're just updating your onboard charts now. In column A, number 11, change from 77646 to 00114; number 12, change from 
Okay. Unde
ओह,
Роджер. У нас есть 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, минус 061, плюс 067 135 23 4149; плюс 32020, плюс 06713, минус 02773 181 054 013; NA, плюс 00230, плюс 32833 228 32625, 
Apollo 8, Houston. Siamo sc
11, ह्यूस्टन। सीडीआर, आपके लिए एक छोटी सी जानकारी। हम सबने यहाँ अपने काम से कु
Stehen z
L'ENREGISTREUR VA COMMANDER UNE RÉINITIALISATION SUR LE DÉBIT BITS ÉLE
Eagle, Houston. Quand vous aurez un moment, vos LCG s
11, Houston. We get some data, but it's got the same problem that we had throug
Хорошо. Хорошо; канцлер Западной Германии Вилли Брандт, который вчера присутствовал на вашем запуске с мыса Доброй Надежды, и президент Никсон сегодня завершат свой раунд перегово
了解。私の低ビットレートをコピ
好的。约翰，刚才检查的是地球/太阳位置
로
Okay. Drei
BECO检查已
Could you give us those gimbal angles, Frank, when you have a ch
Roger. Gemini VIII, qui Houston. Ti leggo in mod
罗杰，查理。我们把 OMNI D 和 Delta 的配置互换了，我错过了上次的通讯。你能再说一遍吗？我特别想问的是，你之前说推进器数量是 -X，而 PAD 显示的是 +X。你是想让我
حسنًا. الصورة الثانية، بعد 32 ساعة من رصد مذنب بينيت، نريد التقاطها عندما تكون المركبة الفضائية في أقصى درجات استقرارها قبل بدء المهمة. متطلبات الاستقرار عالية جدًا. لم نكن متأكدين مما إذا ك
गैस के इस घनत्व और दबाव पर यह बताना मुश्किल है, लेकिन आराम का स्तर लगभग कमांड मॉड्यूल के बराबर
알겠습니다. 온수 보일러에 대해 말씀드리자면, 제 마이크가 켜져 있을 때 제 목소리가 들리는데 약 2초 정도 시간차가 있
了解。血圧計の球が穴に入らなくなったって言ったでしょ。Oリングか何
Okay. Unter Schritt 6, fast ganz unten – tatsächlich sind es drei Zeilen vom Ende von Schritt 6 – gibt es einen Abschnitt, der besagt, dass der Verdampfer des sekundären Kühlmittelkreislaufs zurückgesetzt werden muss, und es sollte ein Hinweis darauf stehen, 
एक्वेरियस, आपके सभी पैड लगभग साढ़े तीन घंटे में, -6:30 बजे चालू हो जाएंगे। और एक बात हम आपको याद दिलाना चाहते हैं, जब आप कमांड 
그 일은 우리가 아제나와 우주선이 0°, 180°, 0°의
로저. 들어보세요, 찰리 듀크가 스타 체크에 대해 당신과 이야
Подожди
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。話している間に、111 19 31;、11
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। समाप्त
Ich verstehe dic
Gemini VI, haben S
제미니 4호, 카나본 C
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。你们使用的是高增益天线
Ok, Fred. Prima, che è meno 1 ora, manovra il gimbal ai seguenti angoli: rollio, 130; beccheggio, 125; imbardata, 012,4. Gli angoli corrispondenti del gimbal saranno rollio, 291; beccheggio, 196; imbard
Roger, Neil. Non stiamo cercando di forzarvi. Stiamo solo
A
Wally, I can see you
यहीं रुक जाओ। ये तो और भी बुरा है, बिल। वाप
ن
四重摄氏度
इस समय एमएससी क्षेत्र में बारिश के बादल छाए हुए हैं। यहाँ लगभग 10 मिनट पहले बारिश शुरू हुई थी, और नवीनतम जानकारी के अनुसार, काफी तेज बारिश हो रही थी। तो, आज दोपहर की खबरों में बस इतना ही, अपोलो 11। समाप
我在凌晨 0 点，使用 f/11 光圈和 150 焦距，拍摄了一张太平洋上空云层的 S-5 照片，拍摄地点位于魁北克海岸哨兵区域。这是第 28 张照片。我正在拍摄多张 S-5 照片。我正处于热带风暴卡拉的区域内。现在天空阴云密布。我会拍摄一些云层。这些云层顶部有一些非常有趣的交错结构。也许相机能捕捉到它们。由于光线太亮，我打算使用 f/16 光圈和 250 焦距拍摄。这些照片将是第 28 和 29 张照片，我还会至少再拍摄两张。这
네, 프레드 씨. 경보음과 영상이 나오도록 메인 경보 회로 차단기를 내리시는 것을 권장합니다. 그리고 저희 의료진들이 소외감을 느끼고 있어서, 생체의학 장비(BIOMED)에 연결되어 있다면 위치를 알려주시면 음성 안내에 영향을 미치는지 확인해 보겠습니다. 이
レートコマンド、レートコマ
Роджер. Я уже несколько раз пытался перез
Аполл
Calif
좋아, 마스터 암, 켜짐. 
На этом, пожалуй, все мировые и национальные новости и статьи. На спортивной странице Хэнк Стрэм из «Канзас-Сити Чифс» был назван лучшим тренером года в AFL. Это уже второй раз за три сезона. Голосование проводилось группой из 30 спортивных журналистов и комментаторов Associated Press, по три человека из каждого города. Ближайшим к нему по результатам голосования был Уиб Юбэнк. Другие тренеры, получившие голоса, — Сид Гилман из Сан-Диего и Лу Сабин из Денвера. Что касается вчерашнего матча всех звезд колледжей Shriners, то Север одержал победу над Югом со счетом 3:0. Дик Берлински из Мичиганского государственного университета забил филд-гол с 23 ярдов в первой четверти, и этого было достаточно, чтобы С
好的。接下来是执行 -
रॉजर। टीवी में अब दिक्कत आ रही है। ठीक है। अब तस्वीर ठ
Apollo 11, Houston. Falls Sie die
双子座 VIII，双子座 VIII，休斯顿 CAP COM。
This is th
알겠습니다. 잭이 방금 돌아왔는데, 아직도 나오고 있다고 하네요. 지휘관 쪽에서만 나오고 있다고 합니다. 제가 봤던 창, 그러니
이산화탄소 분압이 4.2mm로 측정되었습니다. 분압이 15mm에 도달할 때까지 2차 밸브를 사용
13, Хьюстон. Нам ну
B
Ok, Jack. Capito. Solo una domanda: se guardi attraverso il telescopio, riesci a vedere la com
Хорошо, Джек только что сообщил, что в
أظن أ
11, hier spricht Houston. Wir können Sie aufgrund der Störgeräusche leider nicht gut verstehen. Könnten Si
D'accord. Jack est de 
Роджер. Мы успешно восстановили связь с высокочувствит
收到。我们正在这边准备进行第一次通信检查。我们将进行全向通信检查，这在您的飞行计划中已列出，模式为7.
프레드, 마지막 말씀을 못 들었네
Ok. Mancano circa 10 minuti. Vi verremo a prendere di nuovo alle 10:00 e avremo tutte le informazioni necessarie per la TV. Nel caso in cui la situazione si ripeta, per la precisione del 
はい、その通りです。これでカードは完了です。残りの更新情報は、58時間のプラットフォームに基づいた参考情報です。プラットフォームをご覧ください。非常に良好な状態です。ジャイロスコープは、プロットされた更新情報以降、ほとんどドリフトがありません。Xはマイナス2.24、Yはポイントプラス0.87、Zはマイナス0.11でした。52時間に基づいた更新情報以降、Xドリフトはプラス0.79、ヨーはプラス1.06、Zはプラス0.02となっています。52時間と57時間の調整の違いがわかります。ドリフトチェックに関する本当に良い、または完全に有効な更新情報を得るには時間が足りま
حسنًا، في تلك الطلعة الأخيرة، التقطنا حوالي 38 صورة باستخدام التصوير الجوي الشامل للتضاريس، بدءًا من منطقة شرق سان دييغو وحتى واجهنا الغطاء السحابي مجددًا.
रॉजर। नील, ये सब कॉपी कर लो। और अगर तुम
프레드, 잭이 아까 했던 질문을 명확히 하기 위해 한 가지 더
Понял. Сообщите, каков ваш текущий ст
Gemini 4, CSQ CAP COM. Hinweis: Wenn Sie Pegasus aufnehmen, überschreiten Sie nicht den Neigungswinkel von 45°. Es lieg
Okay
D'accord. Côté couleurs, l'eau est d'un bleu roi; les nuages, bien sûr, sont d'un blanc écla
罗杰，休斯顿。鹰牌已经检查过两台70毫米摄像机和两台16
D
イギリス、ジョドレルバンク発、AP通信経由：英国の大型ジョドレルバンク電波望遠鏡は、本日東部夏時間午後5時49分、ソ連の無人月探査機からの信号の受信を停止した。広報担当者は、ルナ15号宇宙船は「月面を越えた」ようだと述べた。また、「月面に着陸したとは考えていない」と、同天文台長のバーナード・ラベル卿の広報担当者は述べた。ワシントンUPI通信：スパイロ・T・アグニュー副大統領は
पिछली परिक्रमा के लगभग इसी समय मैंने चार घूंट पानी पिया था। जैसे ही सूट का तापमान 
أنا أهبط الآن على الأفق، ويمكنك بالتأكيد رؤية الطبقتين الواضحتين لتوهج الهواء، الطبقة السميكة جدًا في الأعلى،
Einen Moment bitte, Frank; 
ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP
ठीक है। अब हम सो
Хорошо, Хьюстон, мы хотим пере
그리고 우리는 1106
Хорошо, Джо. Можешь дать мне какие-нибудь звёзды, которые я
Vous vous tenez au c
Когда я туда зайду,
로저. 4, / 62888 NA, NA, 마이너스 00012, 마이너스 00011,
收到。正在接收关于单盘收尾的
阿波罗13号，休斯顿。卡纳冯号大约30秒后到达。整点播出金银花号，请确认您的S波段收音机已开启接收金银花号信
I confirm that that is the configura
Roger. Siamo appena entrati nell'oscurità della navicella spaziale. Fino ad allora, beh, non riuscivamo a vedere nulla sotto di noi. Ma ora, con la luce cinerea, la visibilità è piuttosto buona. Guardandomi indi
एक्वेरि
ठीक है। मैं पैनल 9 पर हूँ। रिसीव करने के लिए तैयार हूँ। क्या 
Bon. J'imagine que tout le monde se représente le programme spatia
另一则本地新闻：亨茨维尔县法院大楼昨天黎明前被烧毁，看来他们又要在那里开工建设了。接下来是一些关于等待返程的家庭的报道。这篇报道由《邮报》记者安·詹姆斯撰写。“我们就像在月球背面休息一样，”瓦莱丽·安德斯在圣诞夜说道，当时她和家人正在等待阿波罗8号脱离月球轨道，返回地球。安德斯太太周二凌晨0点就到了，邻居们刚刚把孩子们都接走，这样在飞船飞到月球背面、与外界失去联系期间，他们一家人就可以休息一下。弗兰克·博尔曼上校的家在户外装饰着四个巨大的常青花环，上面撒满了粉状的雪花，还系着红色的蝴蝶结。书房里的一棵圣诞树正等待着他平安归来，他漂亮的金色头发的妻子苏和两个健壮的儿子弗雷德里克和埃德温计划留在家里，等待午夜时分飞船脱离月球轨道。通常情况下，他们会去圣克里斯托弗圣公会教堂参加午夜弥撒。计划是凌晨0点开始。由于博尔曼家没有小孩，所以圣诞礼物交换只能等到博尔曼上校带着他那份神奇的节日礼物——登月往返之旅——回来之后再进行。洛弗尔上尉忙碌的妻子玛丽莲·洛弗尔说，就孩子们而言，她的四个孩子将过一个完全正常的圣诞节；但谈论礼物的事就
D'accord. Je suis pre
نعم. حسنًا. انتظر... حسنًا، أمامك 3 ث
そろそろUH
糟糕，我进去
Roger. Wir würden den ATTITUDE SET-Schalter gerne wieder auf die Au
アポロ8号
Роджер. Мы 
アポロ 8 号
Der Landeanflug war ziemlich anstrengend. Als wir hinausschauten, konnten wir die beiden Zwillinge-Sterne rechts von 
안녕하세요, 캘리포니아 공과대학교입니다. 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 잘 들립니
旗形锁已检查完毕。*** 锁已检查完毕，蓝色锁已检查完毕，锁锁，红色锁，吹扫锁；
로저. Rev 55, 그리고 1번, 시작 시간은 05:48:55
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к 2000 году, но лидеры демократов ответили, что приоритет должен быть отдан потребностям на Земле. Агню, высокопоставленный правительственный чиновник, присутствовавший на запуске «Аполлона-11» в среду, по-видимому, говорил от своего имени, а не обязательно от имени администрации Никсона, когда сказал: «На мой взгляд, мы должны отправить человека на Марс к концу этого столетия». Ларедо, Техас, AP: Иммиграционные власти Нуэво-Ларедо объявили в среду, что хиппи будут отказывать во въезде в Мексику по туристическим картам, если они не примут ванну и не подстригутся. Уберто Касарас, начальник мексиканской иммиграционной службы в Нуэво-Ларедо, заявил, что власти Мехико, Акапулько и других популярных туристических мест получили жалобы на хиппи. По сообщению United Press International: Первоначальная реакция на решение президента Никсона предоставить федеральным служащим выходной в понедельник, чтобы они могли отметить национальный день участия в лунной миссии «Аполлон-11», была в основном удивлением. Родни Биднер, Associated Press, Лондон, AP: Европа поражена миссией «Аполлон-11». Газеты по всему континенту заполняют свои страницы фотографиями ракеты «Сатурн V», стартующей для установления первой связи Земли с ее естественным спутником. И авторы заголовков напрягали воображение, чтобы подобрать слова, чтобы восхвалять этот подвиг. «Величайшее приключение
罗杰，弗兰克。
ど
Roger. Un altro commento: nonostante abbia suscitato molte polemiche durante le riunioni sulla priorità dei dati, sembra che un'inclinazione di 10 gradi verso l'alto sia la posizione migliore per ottenere l'orizzonte, in modo da poter seguire il punto di riferimento attraverso il telescopio a scansione. Se si inclina ulteriormente verso il basso, il perno completamente sollevato non riuscirà a raggiungere l'orizzonte, e l'orizzonte è di grande aiuto 
Привет, мыс. Дружба номер
Ric
Roger. Rapport d'équipage: eau, le commandant a parcouru environ 50 clics aujourd'hui; CMP 43; et LMP 44. Nous avons pris deux repas aujourd'hui
Dav
了解。ジャイロは正常です
Хо
안녕하세요, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 잠시 대기 중입니다. 현재 체크리스트가 조금 밀려있네요. 곧 따라잡겠습
الإشارة ضعيفة وغير مقروءة حاليًا. لكنني سأرسلها دون أن أتمكن من قراءته
Okay, Jack. Now the remaining steps are simply suit-loop configuration steps to get this thing into full operation, and our people want to hold off on that until the canister you're working on gets to 7.6 millimeters of 
Roger. Come me 
了解しました、ジェミニ4号機で
ケープ。通信実験
Okay, Houston. Wi
COMMANDE DE MODE - AUTO. DÉSACTIVATION DE
ब्लै
म
Okay, Vance. Wir sind ein kleines Stück vom Mond entfernt. Jim hält die Kamera durch Fenster 3. Die Sonne steht etwa 40 Grad links v
먼저 하시면 제가 절차를 확인해 보겠습니다. 
Les
扫描仪的指示灯还是没灭。它又灭了。上次就是因为你打开电源才
コロンビ
حسناً يا باز، إليك كاميرا هاسيلبلاد واحد
حسنًا. لدينا الآن بعض التعليمات الإضافية في حال لم تنجح هذه الطريقة. يقولون، يا فرانك، يجب ترك وحدة التحكم التلقائي في مستوى ا
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。如果你决定在2号轨道上进行正面转向，记住一点：务必向右偏航45度，以保持高增益天
알겠습니다, 짐. 그 부분은 저희가 당신을 위해 말씀드리는 겁니다. 당신과 꼭 상의하고 싶었던 주제였어요. 저희도 고려해 봤는데, 장단점을 따져봤을 때, 당신이 정확히 짚어낸 부분이 장점입니다. EI 시작 1시간 전에 해치 밀폐도 검사를 하는데, 만약 문제가 생기면 당신이 급하게 슈트를 입어야 하는 상황이 발생할 수 있습니다. 반면에 슈트를 입으면 움직임이 상당히 느려질 수 있고, (착용하는 데 걸리는 시간은 말할 것도 없고요) 또 어떤 사람은 슈트를 일정 시간 입고 있으면 너무 더워져서 슈트 환기를 위해 SUIT LOOP를 가동해야 할 수도 있다고 우려하고 있습니다. 그런데 그렇게 하면 전력 소모가 상당해서 저희는 원치 않아요. 따라서 저희는 당신이 슈트를 입지 않는 것을 권장합니다. 밀폐도 검사에서 누출률이 약간 증가하는 것 외에는 문제가 없을 거라고 생각하고, 그 정도는 충분히 해결할 수 있을 
罗杰，阿波罗1
It appears that we did a grave injustice to the food people. Just after our
Yes. Houston, I wonder if you're 
— Tu es en phase de
आप 
Доброе утро. Планируете ли вы с
먼저 몇 가지 물건을 넣어둬야겠
ठीक है। जैक का कहना है कि आपको लाल फिल्टर और फिल्टर होल्डर का
Mi fa male il lato destro della testa, perché continuo a stro
रॉजर, क्या आप
이 조
聞こえますか？音楽の送信は 2 番
了解。31、SPS/G&N: 36691 マイナス 061、プラス 
Esatto. Dovevo effettivamente manipolare i denti di trazione sul portello ogni volta che lo accarezzavo, quindi non riuscivo a tirare con la stessa forza del solito. Quindi dovevamo coordinarci e decidere dove avrei tirato in discesa. Jim... gli ordinavo di tirare forte in quel momento e so che lo faceva. In questo modo siamo riusciti a farlo partire. Una volta che i denti hanno iniziato a scendere, non ho più avuto problemi con il guadagno, ma ho dovuto effettivament
比如说，我们现在就待在这里，阿波罗8号，我们
روجر. نحن نقترب من الصاروخ المعزز الآن، ويمكنك أن ترى ضوء النهار يبدأ بالظهور. الأضواء واضحة تمامًا، وأُقدّر أننا على بُعد حوالي ثلاثة أرباع ميل من الصاروخ المعزز في هذه اللحظة. الأضواء سهلة الرؤية، والأفق واضح تمامًا في هذا الوقت. لقد أخرجنا جهاز كونتاكس، وكاميرا
TTC：そうですね。これはJETSに出演するべきだと思います。これは…それとも燃え尽きる
प्लस 00618 00020 011 00020 17 2965 308 अल्फ
ヒューストン、アポロ11号です。アフリカ大陸が今、私たちの方を向いています。そしてもちろん、時間の経過とともにすべてがどんどん小さくなっていきます。地中海は完全に晴れています。太陽はマダガスカルあたりに沈もうとしているようです。アフリカの赤道地帯は非常にはっきりとしています。アフリカ南端や、もちろんサハラ砂漠の北岸の砂っぽい色と
Okay. That's right. That's Jim Lovell. What we thoug
इसमें मेरे टाइम हैक की कोई खास जरूरत नहीं 
알겠
Frank und ich haben gestern
Si sta facendo buio. Vediamo. Un contatto con Muchea, q
Okay. Jack, ich möchte noch einmal betonen, dass wir frühestens nach 2,5 Stunden mit den Energie-Vorbereitungen beginnen können. Alles andere kannst du wie gewohnt erledigen und dich so weit wie möglich vorbereiten. Die 2,5 Stunden beziehen sich aber a
好的。这样吧，我让杰克去配置一下。他可以把那些东西抄下来，然后我们一起去拿
D'accord, Jim. Pourriez-v
好的。我想我们可以换个角度，如果可以的话，拍一些气象局的照片。把剩下的照片都拍完——剩下的这些照片，轻轻拍一下。这是A10，接下来是A11，左边有一片云。好的。我把底板装回去，把A点的照片保存下来。
はい。
هيوستن، يبدو أن مؤقت مهمتنا يعمل بشكل جيد. هل
ठीक है। एक सुधार
On peut maintenan
Mann, ich hasse es wirklich, das zu sagen, wenn ich nur durch dieses Monokular schaue, aber da ist ein weißer Fleck, der aussieht wie ein Krater – sieht aus w
It's pretty much the same with the eyeballs in here, and it looks a little bigger now. But the only way I could
حدد لي موعداً إن أ
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。OMNIの切り替えをお願いします。かな
Hallo, Freunde, Glückwünsche nach Mexiko und ganz besonders an meine Freunde aus Guaymas. Vom Außenraum aus ist es mit Zahlen gefüllt – und es ist auch s
अरे जिम
Quello era il RESET DEL BUS AC 2, vero? Ok. Salta il prossimo e, nel riquadro 4, vogliamo che GAGING sia su OFF; TELCOM GROUP 1 su OFF; TELCOM GROUP
Continuing with the report. No sequence panel lights showin
Роджер, Джим. Что касается вашего испарителя, мы считаем, что если в следующий раз у вас возникнет подобная проблема с обратной стороны, находящейся под солнечными л
حسنًا. هل هناك أي
It's sort of messy. I haven't been at this very long. It's sort of the same system that the Spaniards used to drink out of wineskins at bull fights, only I think t
안녕하세요, 칼입니다. 월리, 지금 목소리가 잘 안 들리네요. 처음 
D'accord. Côté couleurs, l'eau est d'un bleu roi; les nuages, bien sûr, sont d'un blanc éclatant; le reflet de la Terre est – semble – bien plus important que celui de la Lune. Les terres émergées présentent généralement une texture brunâtre, allant du brun foncé au brun clair. On distingue de nombreux tourbillons nuageux liés aux différentes cellules météorologiques. Une longue bande de cirrus semble s'étendre de l'entrée du gol
Roge
बस इतना ही। क्या आप सुबह की कुछ खबरें सुनन
Understand. We'll be looking. We're over some pretty good weather rig
Roger. Und Neil hat 66 Prozent Sauerstoff, keine Flaggen, minimale Kühlung und der Anzugdruck beträ
사진 촬영용 조명이 꺼졌습니다. 객실 조명이 이제 빨간색으로 바뀔 겁니다. 오, 존의 사진에서처럼 넓고 아름다운 빨간색 조명이네
D'accord. J'ai maintenant la page de mise à jour de la car
VGY meno 0,0, VGZ meno 0,1, DELTA-VC meno 5,2, car
알겠습니다. 번역 핸드 컨트롤러는 시계 반대 방향, 즉 시계 방향으로 
Okay, Jim. Wir wollen also die Y-Achse des Raum
أعتقد أن كل شيء يمكن إزالته، لقد نسوا وضع ش
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Логика выглядит неплохо. Вы можете активировать свои пиротехнические устро
क्या आपके 
Roger. Backup started and running good. I'll give you a hack at my 30 (seconds). Ah, she's ridin
Right, visual acuity is good. I have no problem reading the charts, no problem with the astigmatism at all. I am having no trouble at all holding a
Roger. MSC-Experimente Nr. 2 und 3, ABGEBROCHEN 
Хорошо. Первое, что нужно учесть, это то, что план полета показывает, что CDR должен быть готов к посадке. Второе, краткое описание вашего управления. Все ваши системы выглядят исправными. Траектория показывает, что у вас есть CPA с режимом 69,67 миль, а время перисинтеза равно. У вас есть захват на хорошем свободном возврате. Пока рано полностью оценивать траекторию для управления коридором. Обновления данных блока +11 не будет. После просмотра кривых, похоже, что давление вентиляционного отверстия батареи фактически равно 
Роджер. Пойм
मुझे 
D'
Ok. Hai OMNI Bravo e vorremmo che verificassi che il registratore sia spento, per favor
I'm now starting to see the sunrise in the periscope. First light in the periscope during this particular orbit as a result of the night side. It is obvious that the periscope has no function whatsoever in retroattitude on the night side. First light that I get is right now at a of practically. The sunrise is coming in rather rapidly through the periscope. I do have the lighted objects that John mentioned, and I can create s
好的。放不进右侧
Ok, lo faccio subito.
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Procedete con il controllo v
ジム、いい調子ですね。これらの星について少し説明しましょう。飛行計画書にあるように、33番のアンタレス、34番のアトリア、そして40番の旧アルタイルを観測する予定です。最初のアンタレスは太陽に近く、後の2つは太陽から外れています。ご存知のとおり、我々は太陽と太陽から外れた星の両方を観測したいと考えています。33番のアンタレスは太陽に近いので、33番でこれらの測定を行うのは難しいと予想して
OK, Jack. J'arrive ju
继续，金丝雀。双子座4号
그리고 마침내 잭이 나를 다시 오디세이에 태워줬고, 우리는 이 터널을 미
기온이 아
نعم
सचमुच, मैंने जितने भी खूबसूरत नज़ारे देखे, उनमें से एक था नीचे देखना और फ्लोरिडा के दक्षिणी छोर, क्यूबा द्वीप, प्यूर्टो रिको और सांता डोमिंगो द्वीप समूह को देखना। यह वाकई एक अद्भुत दृश्य था। नीले रंग के
Neil, this is Houston. We're getting a picture. You're not in it at the present time. We can see the bag on the being moved by Buzz, though. Here you come into our field o
हम अस्थायी रूप से लॉक तोड़कर और पुनः लॉक स्थापित करके संचार और टेलीमेट्री को बेहतर बनाने का प्रयास कर
And, 13, from Houston, it's okay with us if you want to mov
الطقس في منطقة التعافي جيد. هناك غيوم كثيفة؛ أمواج 
روجر. أعتقد أن الخبراء سيقولون إن البيانات استندت على ال
It's the "Verify that the heaters have been in AUTO for 15 minutes." Back on the first page of this procedure, you put the heaters in AUTO and you pushed the breakers in, and we'd like for them to warm up the quads for 15 minutes before we 
र
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Avez-vous reçu les mêmes consignes et le
All 
On préférerait attendre un peu avant de remettre en marche la ventilation, le temps que tout
En haut, il y 
आपने उन्हें सच बताया। अच्छा महसूस कर रहा हूँ, खुशमिजाज हू
Roger, Houston. Nur zur Info: Die CMP ist momenta
Роджер. Мы изучили данные вашей системы воспроизведения, и всё выглядит хорошо. В частности, всё выглядит хорошо. Однако я хотел бы напомнить вам о запросе на выполнение этого прогона только на шаровых клапанах блока А, и вы можете начат
Ich verstehe, dass Sie S-5 noch einmal durchla
Ich konnte dich die ganze Zeit empfangen, Ken, aber ich hörte die Musik nur, wenn du versucht hast zu senden. Und ich habe mich gefragt, ob du bemerkt hast, wie sich der Schalter an meinem Anzug ein- und ausschaltete, als du mich angerufen hast. Ich höre jetzt ei
روجر. مركز اتصالات كانتون كاب، فريندشيب 7. الوقود 62-75 درجة، الأكسجين 65-98%، التصحيح 65-100%، الأمبير 23. حالتي جيدة. تشرق الشمس حول الكبسولة الآن. انتهى
로저. 콜럼비아호에 거주하시는 여러분께 알려드립니다. 오늘은 콜롬비아 독립기념일입니다. 어젯밤에는 필리핀의 글로리아 디아즈가 미스 유니버스에 선정되었습니다. 그녀는 60명의 경쟁자를 제치고 세계 최고의 미인으로 등극했습니다. 디아즈는 18세이며, 검은 머리와 눈을 가지고 있고, 신체 사이즈는 34.5인치(약 87cm)에 허리 23인치(약 61cm), 엉덩이 34.5인치(약 89cm)입니다. 2위는 호주, 3위는 이스라엘, 4위는 일본이 차지했습니다. 화요일 밤에 돌아오시는 길에 워싱턴에서 아메리칸 리그와 내셔널 리그 올스타전이 열립니다. 뉴욕 양키스의 멜 스토틀마이어가 아메리칸 리그의 선발 투수로 유력합니다. 내셔널 리그 선발 투수는 아직 정해지지 않았습니다. 현재 9명의 선발 투수가 명단에 올라 있습니다. 우주 프로그램의 연구는 분명히 큰 성과를 거두었지만, 연구가 항상 결실을 맺는 것은 아
Okay, was hat
有一张照片是从航天器右后方拍摄的，拍摄对象是下降
हाँ यह सही ह
... 거기는 햇볕에 좀 태우기 좋은 곳이네요, 월리
مرحباً يا شركة كال
旗形锁已检查
もう一度
飞行员的RKV医疗数据通行证1号，格林尼治标准时间02:17:43。请飞行员在采集数据前3分钟将体温探头含在口中。另请更新9-3至13-2号恢复区以及8-Char
Roger. All the rest is co
네, 알겠습니다. 감사하다는 말씀 감사합니다. 저희는 지금 여기서 온갖 새로운 절차들을 개발하
ठीक है, जो। जैसा कि मैंने पढ़ा, 74 घंटे बाद हम डिटेंट 2 पर सूर्य की जाँच करेंगे, जिसके लिए रेंडेज़वस रडार को रास्ते से हटाना होगा। और हम वहाँ पहुँचने 
Très
よかった。それは素晴らしい。私たちは今朝食を食べている
Roge
Давайте включи
嗯，月亮几乎完全消失了。我们想知道你有没有可能从其他窗户往外看，看到月亮？嘿，它又出现了，比尔。好的。就保持这个姿势。这对你所在位置的地球来说刚刚好。如果你能保持这个姿势，
言っておくけど、自分の気持ちを伝え
吉姆，我们希望你继续使用你现在的观测路线，忽略其他设置。我们正在尝试进行一些LMS模拟，
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к 2000 году, но лидеры демократов ответили, что приоритет должен быть
Вчера Комитет по бюджету и налогообложению Палаты представителей также согласовал изменения в налогообложении, затрагивающие нефтяные компании, а также банки и коммунальные предприятия, которые могут увеличить федеральные доходы на 2 миллиарда долларов в год. Комитет также предварительно проголосовал за изменение процедур бухгалтерского учета для телефонных, электроэнергетических, газо- и нефтепроводных компаний и за сокращение налоговых льгот для взаимных сберегательн
Salve, tecnico Muche
रॉजर. 30, एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 36691, माइनस 061, प्लस 066 135 23 4156, प्लस 32011, प्लस 06 818, माइनस 02650, 181 054 014; अपोजी एनए, प्लस 00230 32836 228 32628 42 1511 357, एनए तीन लाइनें, प्लस 1103, माइनस 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52, डेनेब और वेगा, 242 172 012, दो जेट उलेज, 16 सेकंड, खिड़की से बाहर क्षितिज, 10 डिग्री, टीआईजी माइनस 2 मिनट,
Bene. Due passaggi più 
Ok, pagina successiva, 16. Questa è la continuazione della stessa cosa sulla corona solare. Sul lato destro della pagina, a partire da poco sopra 107:40 con ", manovra per assetto corona solare", 55 appena sotto "Sostituisci diapositiva scura", tutto questo è in una categoria facoltativa. Quindi potresti semplicement
了解。コ
L'orizzonte qui è molto, molto netto. Il cielo è nero pece e la Terra - o meglio la Luna, scusate - è piuttosto chiara; e il contrasto tra cielo e Luna è una vivida linea scura. Ora entrano nell'inquadratura alcuni interessanti vecchi crateri a doppio anello, alcune caratteristiche interessanti che sono abbastanza comuni nella regione del mare e sono state riempite da materiale della stessa consistenza dei mari e dello stesso color
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Это Аполлон-8. Признаю свою ошибку, у Уильяма был один «Марезин». Он мне о нём не сказал; он е
جيميني 4، جيميني 4، هذه غرفة عمليات هيوستن CAP. ا
さて、皆さんが自分たちを撮影した写真を楽しんでいただければ幸いです。ジム、今地球からどれくらい離れ
La vitesse de combustion standard est de 93 pieds/seconde. No
多数のク
D'accord. On pourrait peut-être y arriver...
那是什么？实时
روجر. أسمعك بوضوح. سبعة، كيب جاهز للا
N
रोजर. क्षेत्र 26-डेल्टा 86
はい、操作ヒーター回路ブレーカーが開いてい
Хорошо. Позволь мне подчеркнуть, Джек, что 2,5 часа — это самое раннее время, когда мы можем начать заниматься этими улу
Sì, quel maledetto "1" in questo computer, sai - l'angolo del perno, è lì; 
O
Turn the
Before we get away, would you ask FAO - something I did
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。NOUN 
알았어. 알았
5
حسنًا يا جو، لدي سؤال أخير. إذا قمنا بتشغيل وحدة التحكم بكامل طاقتها قبل الموعد المحدد بقليل بعد فصل وحدة الخدمة، فأود الانتقال إلى وضعية JETT مبكرًا، والتأكد من إتمام هذه المرحلة والبقاء هناك لفترة قبل بدء وضعية JETT التي تستغر
ヒ
Это не критично по времени, Фред, но если вы сейчас разбудили людей, то можете сделать это. Кстати, вы, наверное, знаете, но следующие несколько часов будут довольно спокойными с нашей точки зрения. Мы работаем над процедурами входа и будем готовы зачитать их вам примерно через 8 часов; а до этого момента ничего особенного происходить не будет, так что вы сможете наверстать упущенный сон. Кон
さて、ご説明いたしますと、スーツの吸気口の温度は現在約 
D'accord. Je pense que vous aurez besoin de deux cartouches d'hydroxyde de lithium pour module de commande, d'un rouleau de ruban adhésif gris, des deux sachets (car nous allons utiliser les sachets), et d'une fiche cartonnée que vous découperez à environ 4 cm du bord. Voilà, je crois q
ああ、ゲゲンシャインだ！前進、ジム。機首を下げろ。ゲゲンシャインはす
わかりました、ヒューストン。36番星と40番
Aquarius, Houston. Negativ. Wir möchten alles so lassen, wie es ist, aber wir wür
了解
Okay. Prüfen Sie, ob die Wechselstromversorgung (AC) funktioniert. Dazu mu
You know wh
캡슐은 현재 매우 잘 작동하고 있습니다. 250(인버터)은 132도, 150(인버터)은... 5
冗談じゃない！私も同感です。起こったことは、私たちが以前に
هل يمكنك إبلاغ قسم الاتصالات التقنية في كيب كانافيرال بأ
不，我当时正在尝试记录时间，16 65，但不知怎么的，在我输入 VERB 32 ENTER 之前，它就跳到了 622。我想在这里记录一下时间，然后我想知道您是否希望我继续调整扭矩角度，还是返回并重新输入后再调整扭矩。
Roger. Confirm you have control in low thrust to the left, but no control in 
रॉजर, 11. पृष्ठ F2-20 पर कॉलम A के अंतर्गत, पंक्ति 5 में, नया डेटा 01042 है; 
Ok, ben
,
Houston, qui Apollo 8. Vorrei confermare il rapporto sullo stato di combustione. VGX era -1,4, VGY 0. VGZ 0,2, cioè meno 0,2. C era 
Non sono... non sono paralleli? Riesci a vedere nella posizione co
Affi
Bene, ancora
好的。我们正在考虑或许可以把一部分视频以每秒 12 帧的速度播放。我觉得我们可以把所有 0.5 到 0.
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। राष्ट्रपति के साथ विदेश मंत्री विलियम रॉजर और फ्रैंक बोरमैन भी होंगे। वे प्रशांत बलों के कमांडर एडमिरल जॉन सिडनी मैक्केन जूनियर के साथ राहत पोत के पुल से जलप्रपात देखेंगे। हॉर्नेट पर कुछ समय बिताने के बाद, राष्ट्रपति एशिया के अपने दौरे और रोमानिया की निर्धारित यात्रा के लिए रवाना होंगे। माना जा रहा है कि लूना 15 कल चंद्रमा के 52 चक्कर लगाने के बाद संकट सागर में गिर गया। सोवियत समाचार एजेंसी TASS ने बताया कि "चंद्रमा के निकट अंतरिक्ष में वैज्ञानिक अनुसंधान किया गया।" जोड्रेल बैंक वेधशाला के सर बर्नार्ड लवेल ने कहा कि लूना 15 लगभग 300 मील प्रति घंटे की गति से चंद्रमा की सतह
アポロ11号、こちらはヒューストン。ペリシンシオンからPAD2時間。月周回軌道（G&N）: 62710、プラス098、マイナス019、点火装置: 077 46 2248、デルタVX、プラス32148、マイナス00
... not a very good attitude at all for COMM, an
حسنًا. وأود أيضًا أن أرسل لك ح
우
아니요. 테이프를 가지러 내려갔다가 다시 올라왔는데, 아무것도 못 찾았어요. 게다가 해가 거의 90도 각도로 떠 있었고, 
Роджер. Пожалуйста, повторите вашу высо
AGS和PGNS看起来非常接
Gemini 4, H
У меня болит правая сторона головы, потому что я постоянно тру волосы в неправильном направлении, когд
Roger. I have a 10-Charlie 123. 1+45. 01 days 05 13 47. 13+37. 11 DELTA: 087. 1+54. 01 days 07 10 46. 08+42. GMTRB 12+35. 103. ΔV 0, 01 day
Это Хьюстон. Мы вас слышим, и ближе к концу вашего сообщения, после то
로저, 프랭크. A 구역의 헬륨 탱크 온도가 여러분이 진행한 모든 작업 동안 단 1도밖에 오르지 않았기 때문에 심각한 문제는 아니라고 생각합니다. 이 작업을 마치는 대로, 다시 원래 위치로 돌아가는 대신, A 구역을 180도 돌려서 차가운 쪽으로 옮겨 놓고 다음 작업까지 그 상태를 유지하는 것이 좋겠습니다. 다음 
혹시라도 시간 부족 등의 이유로 문-썬 프로젝트를 완료하지 못하더라도, 잭은 참가작까지 이어지는 대략적인 플랫폼을 마련해 둘 것이
좋아요. 그를 다시 불러들이세요. 20초 안에 버뮤다 LOS
逆变器温度为：风扇反转时 205°，逆变器本身 190°
Das ist bestätigt. Schritt 8: „Stromabschaltung gemäß Leistungsstufe“ – Korrektur: „Stromabschaltung gemäß Notfall
Okay. Ich habe versta
Je le c
幅広の青い地平線が見えてきました。カプセルが通過した時刻が02 0700なので、太陽の下の直径とほぼ同じようです。太陽の下の厚さは太陽の直径と同じようです。南北では、帯は不明瞭になり、明るく
रॉजर। हमने सब कुछ बंद कर दिया है... बस एक
Хорошо, Фрэнк. При выполнении дополнительного маневра по отделению мы рекомендуем вам сделать радиальное включение двигателя, направить положи
D'accord. La première étoile sera la 26
سيتعين عليك الانتظار حتى تنتهي عملية التتبع هذه يا م
Хорошо. Вверху следующей страницы, где написано «Вторичный испари
了解。Rev 33、G.m.t. 18 51 4
Роджер. Если тебе захочется попробовать, это всё излишество, и ты можешь попробовать это в любое время. Я ув
ठीक है। एसी इन
罗杰，我们看到了，杰
إنها تعمل بشكل جيد للغاية. لقد انتهيت - مجموعة واحدة كانت سيريوس، بثلاثة نجوم، ومج
Это действительно хорошо дл
Roger, Mike.
حسنًا يا جاك. ارجع إلى إجراء شحن البطارية الذي شرحته لك. ولإيقاف الشحن، ما عليك سوى كتابة "فتح" أو "إيقاف" بجوار مفتاح الدائرة الذي أعطيتك إياه. في اللوحة 250، قاطع الدائرة الذي فتحته بالفعل؛ في اللوحة 275، طاقة العاكس 2 الرئيسية B، مفتوحة؛ اللوحة 5، مرحل البطارية BAT A، مفتوحة؛ وحدة الاستشعار AC BUS 2، مفتوحة، إشارة المستشعر AC2، م
La pressione in cabina sembra mantenersi tra 4,8 e 5,0, proprio sul fondo. Inoltre, il nostro livello di ossigeno secondario sinistro è piuttosto alto, sembra essere intorno ai 5400. È sempre stato così da quan
Et, Houston, Eagle. J'ai une lampe – une lampe à CO2. La pression partielle est d'enviro
針をゼロにして、私たちはその方向へ向かいます。そして立ち止まって
Oh, not very good, Jack; suggest that for communication here, we go to POWER AMPLIFIER circuit br
केन, बैकग्राउंड लेवल के लिए यह बहुत अच्छा है। शायद आप इसमें कुछ लॉगिंग जोड़ सकते हैं, जिससे यह उस लेवल पर और भ
En ce qui concerne le test télévisé, je pense que nous pourrions probablement nous faire une idée assez précise du fonctionnement en prenant des clichés de la Terre en rouge, en bleu et en polarisation, indépendamment du téléviseur, mais dans le 
نعم سيدي. لديّ خطة. أعتقد أننا ن
Mon niveau de carburant est actuellement entre 75 et 100 %. La fenêtre… Vénus est occu
네. 여기서 그의
روجر، إد. هل ستذهب إلى مركز O2 High Rat
ठी
ジャック、それは仕事中だよ。それから一つ、ジムのチェックリストと自分のチェックリストを比べて
了解、ジム。了解。我々は可能な限りそれを実行するつもりだ。そして、それはかなり実現可能に見える。まず、司令船から、少しずつパワーアップするための別々のシーケンスを送信
Apollo 11, Hou
了解しました。イーグルはここから見ても非常に順調に見えます。位置はほぼ確実に把握しています。ただし、機体が変わる可能性はあります。最悪の場合、速度
Nein. 
알겠습니다. 아
أقول، هل تبقى أوقات T1 و T2 دون ت
分かりました。
好的。这里应该会越来越大
Okay, die S-Band-Antenne OMNI A auf Bravo stellen, die Sie jetzt haben, und die S-Band-Antenne OMNI auf die OMNI-Position, und die High-Gain-Schiene auf die MANUAL-Position, und die Nick- und Gie
10
Okay. Als ersten Schritt möchte ich eine Änderung an der von uns vorgegebenen Grundkonfiguration vornehmen: Wir möchten zwei weitere Leis
Roger. Neben den anderen FAM-Sachen – und es ist noch nicht sicher, ob wir das wirklich machen wollen, es wird nur darüber gesprochen – da
Okay, Houston. Wir haben unsere Einstellung g
Certo. Qui tutto procede bene. Vi informiamo c
حسنًا، سأقرأها كما أراها بدلًا من طريقة فريق قسم هندسة الصيانة. بدأت ألاحظ 
حسناً، عند التفعيل، نكون قد انتهينا من الخطوة - لقد انتهينا من ذلك - أسفل تلك الصفح
Вы делали фотографи
オーロラセブン、オーロラセブン、こちらウーメラ
Ed sta bene. E quando andrà a dormi
마이크, 착륙 지점에 정말 많은 물체가 있네요. 잭 슈미트 장군이 보면 정말 좋아할 만한 광경입니다. 자동 광학 장치가 목표물을 완벽하게 추적하고 있고,
Bene, per ora è tutto, Frank. Abbiamo ricevuto altre notizie che avevano promesso di riportare non appena usciranno. L'unica cosa di vero interesse era... in particolare l'uscita di Pueblo. Credo che ti abbiano già parlato del matrimonio Nixon-Eisenhower. E l'unica altra cosa è il tempo, che da queste parti è piuttosto seren
Roger, 15 minuti fa. Jim, ti passo le procedure generali per il rientro. Riceverai l'aggiornamento 63-1 e
بدأ جيم يرى النجوم بوضوح في النهار مجددًا، ولديّ نجوم جيدة تدعمني. أرى نجم العقاب أمامي مباشرةً الآن. يبدو أنني أقرأ - أرى سطوعًا يصل إلى الدرج
Okay, los geht's. Eintrittspunkt: Mittelpazifik, 000153; 000. Die nächsten beiden Zeilen geben die Monduntergangs- und die Mondcheck-Lage an;, 178; NOUN 61, minus 21,66, minus; 00:28. Die nächsten vier sind nicht verfügbar; DO ist 4,00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353,1, 29,9. Der Hauptzielstern ist Sigma Libra, unten 08,8, links 0,4; Auftriebsvektor nach oben. Für die Eintrittsausrichtung die Sterne 31 und 23 verwenden. Rollachse 041, Nickachse 245, Gierachse 024, Nichtaustrittsmuster verwenden. Mondcheck-Lage bis Monduntergang beibehalten; dann in Eintrittslage gehen oder Horizont mit dem 36-Grad-Fenster verfolgen, konstanter g-Eintr
حسناً. لدينا فريق يعمل على ذلك، وبالمناسبة، من بين المعلومات التي يرغبون بمعرفتها أيّ حاويات هيدروكسيد الليثيوم في وحدة الق
저희는 D-9 실험을 준비 중이며, 아마도
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。请您稍等片刻，提供一下您机载氮气
Okay. So hatten wir es geplant. Jack macht sein
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich erhalte in allen Achsen unregelmäßige Messwerte. Nachdem ich die Instrumente zur Ausrichtung auf die Umlaufbahn verwendet habe, liege ich deutlich außerhalb meiner Sollposition. Ich b
Okay. come segue: /: 45597, meno 040, più 157, più 35189, meno 01513, meno 00346 180 007 000, non applicabile, più 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, Scorpii Delt
सभी पहलुओं में अच
أريد الانتظار حتى ي
Questo è tirare - tirare -
يا هيوستن، من المشكوك فيه حاليًا أن نتمكن من رؤية النجوم في هذا التكوين. الطريقة الوحيدة الممكنة لتحقيق المحاذاة هي مع الأرض وخط الفصل بين الليل والنهار، أو القمر وخط الفصل بين الليل والنهار الخاص به، وأودّ حقًا أن تنظروا إلى عملية إيقاف تشغ
D'accord, Charlie. L'ouverture est assez faible. Difficile de vous donner une mesure précise sans la modifier à nouveau, mais la flèche est à peu près à 1 heure. Je réduis le débit et je laisse la valeur se stabiliser. Actuellement, notre lecture embarquée est d'environ 0,4, avec la flèche de la vanne O2 à 2 heures. Préférez-vous une comparaison des débits d'oxygène ou une comparaison des positions de la v
撮影灯は消灯。客室灯は赤色に点灯します。ああ、ジョンの写真みたいに、幅広の、美しい、美しい赤色です。フライ・バイ・ワイヤになりま
That's negative, Mike. If you'll look at the plot, which we'll save for you and let you see it postflight, it started off immediately on the first REV and just spiraled out to about - oh 20 to - 20 degrees in pitch, and then it seemed to be setting up a spiral around an offset pitch point of about 20 degrees off from 90 degrees; but we didn't want to take a chance that it would become stable at that point. We thought it might diver
Plus 59578, moins 00086, moins 05287, 012 080 018, non applicable, plus 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, terre vers le haut 005, droite 27, plus 0398, plus 06500 13215 36961; Sirius Rigel 137 311 339, pas de marge, supposer l'exécution d'une manœuvre de survol, utilise un alignement stable pour le survol; temps de 5 pour la détermination du GERU; utiliser
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Вы отлично подходите для отделения. Колум
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Wir möchten je
네, 아쿠아리우스입니다. 휴스턴. ATT HOLD 모드에서는 와이드 데드밴드를 권장
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous sommes vraiment impressionnés par la netteté et le niveau de dét
Roger, j'ai transmis un signal de manœuvr
分かりました。
متابعة التقرير. لا توجد أضواء تحذيرية على لوحة التحكم. فقط وضع غير طبيعي. كيس الهبوط مُطفأ. مؤشر EPI يُشير إلى حالة جي
기내 환기량이 
Я сказала: «Я все еще пытаюсь уложить своего партнера спать, но,
Bene, avremo ancora u
هذا يبدو جيداً حقاً يا مايك. يبدو أننا حصلنا على زيادة في قوة الإشارة بمقدار
Хорошо. Панель 4: ТЕЛЕКОММУНИКАЦИИ, ГРУППА 1, будет отключена. Все автоматические выключател
سيجما سبعة، س
Hey, that brings up a question. We were wondering where you guys plan to stow the probe and drogue? It occurred to us that one possibility was to stow it in the, down about where the LMP norm
자, 
콜럼비아입니다. 여
Roger, 11. We copy your word description on that.
لا بد أن مرحل Tr-10 قد تم تشغيله، على الرغم من أنني لا أملك أي أدلة - باستثناء ظهور الجيروسكوبات المعدلة ولا يمكنني الاعتماد عليها لأنها موجودة على أي حال من خلال اختيار ال
Roger. Dernières nouvelles de Luna 15: l’agence TASS a annoncé ce matin que le vaisseau spatial a été placé en orbite près de la surface lunaire et que tout semble fonctionner normalement à bord. Sir Bernard Lovell a indiqué que le vaisseau se trouve sur une orb
休斯顿，鹰。齿轮延长工作已完
Ok. Poco sotto i 13. E solo per tua informazione, abbiamo persone che lavorano su diversi argomenti. Stiamo lavorando sulla rotta intermedia in arrivo per determinare il nostro sistema di controllo e come gestirlo con il sistema di controllo che selezioniamo, cosa dovremmo fare riguardo all'allineamento. Abbiamo l'LMS e un paio di equipaggi impegnati a lavorarci. E stiamo anche lavorando sul nostro ingresso, come e quando dovremmo attivarlo. E stiamo lavorando sullo stato dei sistemi. Domani a un c
25 en avant, 8 à gauche, 3 
Хорошо. В прошлый раз, когда они так делали, казалось, что они записывают с неправильной ско
Большое вам спасибо, и я с нетерпением жду – мы все с
Закат довольно впечатляющий, думаю, не стоит тратить много времени на его созерцание. Он очень интересный. Ещё меня поражает, насколько темно, когда глаза не адаптированы. Я определённо вижу какое-то покрытие на окне. Возвращаюсь к VOX в диапазоне UHF-hi для передачи. Открываю визор, чтобы протереть правый микрофон. Я его лизнул. Закрываю визор. Визор сразу же загерметизировался, чтобы схема скафандра могла начать работать. Не хочу снова с ней возиться. Вентиляционное отверстие скафандра держится очень хорошо, около 68 градусов. Так что купол снова поднимется. Сейчас он поднят на 76, 75. По-видимому, это более высокое значение — то, что нам нужно. Думаю, добавлю ещё полбалла, и, возможно, мы её зафиксируем. Наконец-то становится прохладнее, так что я знаю, какое значение выбрать. Я установил количество охлаждающей жидкости для скафандра и рычага управления на 8,5. Показания на дисплее купола в данный момент составляют 75 градусов. На входе в скафандр — 68 градусов. Очень приятно. Я чувствую, как прохладный воздух обдувает мое лицо. Показатель кислорода выглядит очень хорошо, 60 и 75 (psi, в сотнях). Я слежу за инвертором 250. Он приближается к 140 градусам, а контраст с 150 снизился примерно до 100 градусов. В режиме ожидания около 100 градусов, что соответствует температуре в салоне. В-третьих, 250 — он страдает, и я буду за ним следить. Теплообменник в салоне определенно стабилизируется на 40 градусах, и это доставляет мне немало хлопот, потому что я, очевидно, должен Фрэнку Самонски 50 центов. Я приятно удивлен. Показания уровня топлива в салоне тоже немного завышены. Давайте посмотрим, у нас 5,5 psi. Показания около 5,3, поправка, это не слишком много для этой каюты. На улице уже темнеет, думаю, я сейчас посмотрю на звезды.
Okay. And the left detent, I can see the AO - or the rendezvous radar, and I move to the forward detent and that's about all I've got. I'm loo
शानदार! पहली बार हमें एकदम सटीक क्षितिज जांच मिली है। हमने सिम्युलेटर में घंटों एक अवास्तवि
لكننا نفترض أ
Мне кажется,
لا أرى شيئًا يا غاس. انخفضت نسبة الأكسجين في نهاية فحص معدل الأكسجين المرتفع إلى 62%. بدأت عند 66% وانتهت عند 62%. لا أرى شيئًا من النافذة يا غاس، بسبب 
我刚才说的是我
그
Ap
我
And one of the nice things, Jack, particularly for a novice like myself, is the - the ease of moving around in here. It's, of course, as you know from working in the command module simulator, it's really quite a boon to have zero gravity as an aid. Because you get - pretty confining, really, at one g, to move around very much in there, and it's quite easy in this environment. The, as you can see, it looked pretty clean, I found a couple of loose washers about it and the - a little plastic cap off the sequence camera had come loose and I found it lodged over by the ED panel. Okay. Right under Jim, now, he's actually standing on a - what looks to be a can here. And, for the sake of all the people back there, housed inside this can is the - the ascent engine where, hopefully, you can see my hand resting on top of right now - the engine that we use to get off of the Moon. Immediately adjacent to the engine cover here, I have my hand on a white box now, which has been shown before. This happens to be Jim's, or the backpack which'll supply oxygen and water for cooling while on the lunar surface. This device we hope to make use of for - a planned 4 hours and possibly up to as much as 5 hours. Right - right behind the, a couple of little square packages I now have my hand on here, one here and one right below, are our s, which are, in essence, the emergency oxygen supplies, which are good for some 40 to 45 minutes. These are when we get ready to mount up and head outside, will be placed up 
Je veux que tu fasses un lacet, que tu piqu
哦，这边一切都
了解。はっきりと聞こえました、ガ
मिथुन
Roger, ich habe eine Korrektur zum Flugplan. Die Bandenablage erfolgt in der 13. Umdrehung über den Kanarische
ठीक है। ज़ीक थॉ
أعرف ذلك. حسنًا، يا برج الدلو؛ هيوستن. أوصي في أ
इंडियन कॉम टेक। जी हाँ। मैंने आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से सु
わかりました。OMNI を切り替えるだけです。わかりました。ジョー、1 ～ 4 ページの変更点を読んでみると、燃料電池ヒーター 3 がオフで、燃料電池 1 メイン バス A の中央に下りてきて、メイン バス A をオフにします。メイン バス - 燃料電池 2 をメイン バス A にオフにします。燃料電池 3 をメイン バス A にトークバック グレーにします。メイン バス A リセットをオフに
حسنًا. لماذا لا تعطيني علا
حسنًا. BAT
في البداية، حالت العملية دون بدء عمليات الرصد فورًا كما خططنا، نظرًا لوجود مناورة مراوغة أخرى. تسبب تفريغ الحمولة في ظهور كمية هائلة من النجوم الزائفة في المنطقة، مما جعل معايرة البصريات شبه مستحيلة. لم تكن الطريقة التي ابتكرناها فعالة. أما الطريقة التي استخدمتها في النهاية، فكانت التوجه إلى نجم الشعرى اليمانية (سيريوس)، وهو ألمع نجومنا، والحصول على العمود والمحور، ثم توجيه المركبة الفضائية إلى سيريوس لاستخدامهما في البصريات، وهو ما فعلناه لاحقًا. فيما يتعلق بتشتت الضوء، يبدو أننا نتلقى تشتتًا ضوئيًا في التلسكوب الماسح الضوئي في أي وضع تقريبًا أثناء التحكم الحراري السلبي. يتخذ هذا التشتت شكل شريط ضوئي عريض يمتد عبر مركز التلسكوب بزاوية 10 درجات تقريبًا في كلا الاتجاهين من الصفر. من الصعب جدًا رؤية النجوم في هذه المنطقة. وقد كانت عمليات إعادة المحاذاة جيدة. تمكنتُ من تحديد النجم في السدس لإجراء المحاذاة، لكنني لم أستطع التعرف على النجم الذي استخدمناه في حالات مثل ريغور أو مينكنت في التلسكوب الماسح. أظهرت أول رؤية نجمية التقطتها للأرض أفقًا غير واضح المعالم. لكن بدا أن هناك خطًا واضحًا إلى حد ما بين ما بدا أنه أفق الأرض والغلاف الجوي. بدا أن مرشح خط الرؤية المرجعي قد ساعد في تحديد هذا الأفق. يوجد أفق ضبابي وغير واضح للغاية بين الفضاء وأعلى الغلاف الجوي نفسه، وهذا يصعب استخدامه. كما ذكرت سابقًا، في 
좋아요, 5초 후에 오
Я снова в
That's right, CAP COM, it's very easy to maneuver with the gun. The only problem I have is that I haven't got enough fuel. I've exhausted the fuel now and I was able to maneuver myself around the front of the spacecraft, back, and maneuver right up to the top of the adapter. Just about... came back into Jim's view. The only thing I wish is that I had more. This is the greatest experience I've... it's just tremendous! Right now I'm standing on my head, and I'm looking right down, and it looks like we're
Roger, wir möchten
没错；之后，你按照说明操作，得到一个闪烁的0688，然后我们就得加载了。如果你准备好了，我这里有74小
휴스턴의 컬럼비아와 
ハワイでの最新情報についてですが、ハワイでのパスに関する記述、Rev 4とRev 5は、実際にはあなたに
わ
ठीक है। मैं बस आपको इस बात से अवगत कराना चाहता था और इस पर विचार करना चाहता था कि उड़ान योजना पर इसके क्या प्रभाव पड़ सकते हैं। मैं इस वाइड एंगल वीडियो को चलाकर चंद्रमा के बारे में टिप्पणी करूँगा और दे
Okay. Wir führen die Nachführung noch durch, und wie Sie wissen, werden wir die Wasserabgabe und Ähnliches in den letzten paar Stunden vo
罗杰，11岁。
大概——哦——大概——可能就一秒钟，就在这里……32。好
Ok. Siamo ancora dentro, quindi lo avrai solo per circa 10 o 15
休斯顿，宁静。您能展示一下发动机臂断路器的配置吗
जिम, थोड़ा इंतज़
そうしまし
حسنًا. بعد الرقم 1، في السطر الأول، اشطب "وVHF-A". في السطر الثاني، اشطب "تشغيل SIMPLEX". في السطر الثالث، اشطب "Prime". هذا يشير
आप अभी हमारे प्रोब को देख रहे हैं, जो ओडिसी के अगले हिस्से पर लगा हुआ है। यह काफी भारी है, लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि शून्य गुरुत्वाकर्षण में इसका वजन न के बराबर होता है और इसे इधर-उधर ले जाना बहुत आसान होता है। दरअसल, फ्रेड और जैक दोनों ने, जैसा कि पहले भी
そしてそれと引き換えに、外
フ
Oh, vediamo, 
حسنًا. أنا بخير تمامًا، وسأتجاهل بعض النصائح من طبيب الطيران الودود. يقول إنه يجب عليك تناول حبة لوم
Ja. Wir schl
Хорошо. Время 32 часа 00 минут. Инструкции по завершении маневра: крен 101,0, тангаж 090,0, рыскание 000,0. Верхний тангаж минус 23, рыскание 93. Используйте стандартные процедуры для сн
Это утвердительно. Наша цель — настроить вас на такой лад, чтобы вы могли снизить ставки и выйти из сложившейся ситуации. Вот конфигурация, которую я вам сейчас зачитываю, далее — в следующих шести строках — процед
…ici… Nous sommes à 38 minutes et 
了解、コロンビア。こちらはヒューストンです。OMNIチャーリーで、あなたの通信をはっきりと聞き取れました。トランクウィリティ基
Okay, Mike. Wir wurden gebeten, den gelben Stecker vom Signalaufbereiter zu trennen, ihn auf Beschädigungen zu p
Eagle, Columbia. Prévenez-moi quand vous passerez vos tests de feu
Joe, comptes-tu faire fonctionner tout ça sans 
روجر. كان المبرد يعمل بكامل طاقته ط
稍等
D'accord. Le 
Роджер. Сейчас у меня
Нам бы хотелось иметь много... характеристики управления относятся к командному модулю, и можем ли мы использовать контроллер управления ориентацией только для маневрирования комбинацией, чтобы 
Oui, c'est exact. Nous avons confirmé que
E se sei pronto a copiare, Charlie sarà qui tra un minuto con alcune modifiche consigli
Apollo 8, Houston. Die REACQ-Winkel seh
Хорошо, Фред. У нас пока нет окончательного ответа на вопрос, будет ли он протекать. Если он вам понадобится, можете им
Roger. Everything i
D'accord, nous revoilà sur la bande UHF. C'étaient bien les lucioles que vous avez décrites au lever du soleil. Je n'ai pas particulièrement observé les couchers de soleil ces derniers temps. Par exemple, maintenant, quan
――
Eh bien, les loquets d'amarrage sont aussi bien aujourd'hui qu'hier. Tout à l
Спасибо. 
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। मैंने एक स्टेशन सुना, आवाज़ बहुत 
Je comprends ce que tu veux dire. J'ai dormi un peu plus tôt, donc je suis bien reposé et je veux m'assurer que Frank puisse bien se reposer avant d'entrer. Ce serait peut-être le bon moment pour tester ta
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन सर्जन है। हमने आपका मौखिक तापमान ले लिय
알겠습니다, 빌. 그쪽에서 노란색과 파란색 전극선을 서로 바꿔서 연결해 보라고 하더군요. 그렇게 하면 폐활량 측정은 포기하고 심전도 검사만 볼 수 있을 거라
Va bene, lo cercherò, Buzz. Fammi prendere queste... impugnature ottiche. Credo di non aver davvero pensato quello che ho de
少
지금 우리가 있는 곳은 바로 여기입니다... 네, 
Okay, 
자, 잭. 입문 체크리스트 2-5페이지 9번 항목에 0.05g에서 152도 피치라고 적혀 있는데, 그 옆에 있는 S-밴드 파워 앰프를 
Jim, un petit délai s'impose. Nous allons vous lire le document dans quelques minutes. Nous consultons actuellement la liste de vérification des mesures d'urgence, qui se trouve à la page 5. Vous pouvez la préparer pendant que nous nous
좋아요. 레트로...
Votre minuteur de missi
휴스턴, 트
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। राष्ट्रपति के साथ विदेश मंत्री विलियम रॉजर और फ्रैंक बोरमैन भी होंगे। वे प्रशांत बलों के कमांडर एडमिरल जॉन सिडनी मैक्केन जूनियर के साथ राहत पोत के पुल से जलप्रपात देखेंगे। हॉर्नेट पर कुछ समय बिताने के बाद, राष्ट्रपति एशिया के अपने दौरे और रोमानिया की निर्धारित यात्रा के लिए रवाना होंगे। माना जा रहा है कि लूना 15 कल चंद्रमा के 52 चक्कर लगाने के बाद संकट सागर में गिर गया। सोवियत समाचार एजेंसी TASS ने बताया कि "चंद्रमा के निकट अंतरिक्ष में वैज्ञानिक अनुसंधान किया गया।" जोड्रेल बैंक वेधशाला के सर बर्नार्ड लवेल ने कहा कि लूना 15 लगभग 300 मील प्रति घंटे की गति से चंद्रमा की सतह से टकराया। हाल ही में वियतनाम में अपेक्षाकृत शांति रही है। गश्त पर तैनात सैनिकों को ट्रांजिस्टर रेडियो लिए हुए देखा गया, जिन पर आपकी उड़ान का प्रसारण चल रहा था। वियतनाम में सशस्त्र बलों के रेडियो और टीवी नेटवर्क ने मिशन का पूरा कवरेज किया। स्वेज नहर के किनारे मिस्र और इजरायल के बीच झड़पें अभी भी जारी हैं। वहां मौजूद संयुक्त राष्ट्र के पर्यवेक्षक कार्रवाई को रोकने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। वाशिंगटन में, हाउस वेज़ एंड मीन्स कमेटी ने 27.5 प्रतिशत तेल उपयोग भत्ते को घटाकर 20 प्रतिशत करने के लिए मतदान किया है। ह्यूस्टन क्षेत्र में कई बार बारिश हुई है। आज बादल छाए हुए हैं और और बारिश होने की संभावना है। खेल जगत की बात करें तो, जैसा कि हमने पहले बताया, ऑल स्टार गेम आज रात है। कल कोई मैच नहीं खेला गया। कल रात न्यूयॉर्क में, बेसबॉल राइटर्स एसोसिएशन ऑफ अमेरिका ने बेब रूथ को सर्वकालिक महानतम बेसबॉल खिलाड़ी घोषित किया। जो डिमैगियो को जीवित सर्वश्रेष्ठ बेसबॉल खिलाड़ी का खिताब मिला। खिलाड़ियों के सम्मान में आयोजित रात्रिभोज में फ्रैंक बोरमैन ने ये घोषणाएं कीं। जो नामथ ने न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स के प्रशिक्षण शिविर में पूरा दिन अभ्यास किया। लगभग 500 बच्चे ब्रॉडवे जो को छूना चाहते थे, उन्हें रोकने के लिए पांच पुलिसकर्मियों को काफी मशक्कत करनी पड़ी। उन्होंने कहा कि वह ठीक महसूस कर रहे हैं और अगर कोच वीब यूबैंक अनुमति देते हैं तो 1 अगस्त को ऑल स्टार गेम में खेलेंगे। केर्विल स्थित ऑयलर्स के शिविर में कल बारिश हुई, लेकिन अभ्यास जारी रहा। कुछ मामूली चोटें आई हैं, लेकिन कोई गंभीर चोट नहीं है। कोच वॉली लेम अब तक के अभ्यासों से संतुष्ट हैं। ऑयलर्स को बफ़ेलो के साथ होने वाले प्री-सीज़न मैच में 30,000 से अधिक दर्शकों के आने की उम्मीद है। जाहिर है, डॉन मेरेडिथ की सेवानिवृत्ति की घोषणा से उत्साह कम होने की उम्मीद नहीं है, खासकर ह्यूस्टन में। मारियो एंड्रेटी ने रविवार को 200 मील की ट्रेंटन ऑटो रेस जीत ली और अब वह यूएस ऑटो क्लब की पॉइंट रैंकिंग में सबसे आगे चल रहे रेस ड्राइवर हैं। ह्यूस्टन में आज दोपहर की खबरों का यह
Roger, George. Mein Steuermodus ist manuell. Die Gyroskope sind deaktiviert, Manöver sind ausgeschaltet. Treibstoffstand: 45/64 Prozent, etwas besser als geplant. Sauerstoffgehalt: 82–100 Prozent. Die Temperatur am Dampfauslass im Anzug sinkt leicht. Sie liegt etwas unter 70 Grad. Kabinendruck: 
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。これは正常なシステム動作だと考えています。ラジエーターは現在非常に冷えていると思われます。ご覧いただいた温
أسمعك جيداً. أشعر أنني بخير، والرحلة تسير على ما يرام. أرى الأرض، والرحلة مستمرة، والرؤ
هيوستن، أبولو 13. اتصل بي عندما تكون مستعد
C'est exac
좋습니다
인적이 드문 오지에 불시착하는 건 정말 싫을 것 같아
分かりました。パネル250の回路ブレーカーBAT A（POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING）は閉、パネル275の回路ブレーカーINVERTER POWER 2（M
わかりました。パネル 11 の構成、一番上の行: AC BUS B、S バンド アンテナをオープン、オープンにします。AC BUS A、テープ レコーダーをオープンにします。2 行目の SYSTEM A の下では、MAIN SOV から QUAD 1 TCA までをすべてクローズにします。FLIGHT DISPLAYS の下の COMMANDER'S X-POINTER をオープン、オープン、RENDEZVOUS RADAR STANDBY HEATER をオープン、LANDING RADAR HEATER をオープンにします。ATTITUDE DIRECT ブレーカーをクローズ、ED: LOGIC POWER A をオープン、UTIL
D
Houston, Apollo 11.
좋아요, 짐. 정말 재밌는 TV 프
好了，他们被拉走了
Esco e scatto al
こんばんは。私たちのミッション、アポロ11号の飛行における象徴的な側面についていくつかお話ししたいと思います。ここ2、3日、宇宙船内で起こった出来事について議論を重ねる中で、私たちは、これは単なる3人の月への旅以上のものであり、政府と産業界のチームの努力、さらには一つの国の努力をはるかに超えるものだという結論に達しました。これは、未知の世界を探求しようとする全人類の飽くなき探究心の象徴であると感じています。先日、ニール・ボルトンが初めて月面に足を踏み入れた際に述べた「これは人間にとっては小さな一歩だが、人類にとっては偉大な飛躍だ」という言葉は、まさにこの思いを的確に表していると思います。私たちは月へ行くという挑戦を受け入れました。この挑戦を受け入れることは避けられないことでした。ミッションを比較的容易に遂行できたのは、その受け入れがいかにタイムリーだったかを示すものだと私は考えています。今日、私たちは宇宙探査において、より広範な役割を担うことができると確信しています。振り返ってみると、宇宙船「コロンビア」と「イーグル」のために苦労して選んだコールサインには、皆が特に満足してい
Non, je ne l'ai pas f
Ricevuto. Questa sequenza di range è un fenomeno che si verifica durante il backup a bassa voce; in questa modalità, il range e la voce condi
ロジャー、アル。自動後退モードです。ジャイロスイッチは正常、機動はオフです。カプセルは後退シーケンスの準備はできていますが、チャート2枚を収納する準備はできています。準備は万端です。自動81%、手動80%（燃料）で、中間報告と同じです。変更はありません。主酸素は52（psi、10
11, Хьюстон. Мы говорим, что если мы потеряем управление по одной из осей до нижней точки взлетно-посадочной полосы, мы бы рекомендовали прервать посадку. Это потребует потери управления двумя отдельными дви
어이, 날씨가 좀 이상하네.
I had taken four swallows at approximately this time last
Columbia, Houston. We've lost them on the high gain again. Would you please - We recommend they yaw right 10 degrees and rea
فريندشيب 
Flight advises that if you do get a Running Light indication durin
ジェミニ逆噴射の影ですね、本当にそうでしょうか？（笑） - いいえ、ちょっと見てみましょう。モーターがこちらを向いていて、ガ
Мне так и не удалось посмотреть 
太陽の姿勢は機首から約40度上にあった。4つのシリーズ
What's the mat
روجر، هيوستن. هذا أبولو.
Okay, Joe, I'm ready to start on that command module 
Cavolo, è davvero difficile descrivere l'aspetto di questa Terra. Guardo fuori dal finestrino centrale, che è rotondo, ed è più grande della Terra in questo momento. Vedo chiaramente il terminatore. Vedo gran parte del Sud America, fino all'America Centrale, allo Yucatán e alla penisola della Florida. C'è un grande moto vorticoso appena al largo della costa orientale, e poi proseguendo verso est, riesco ancora a vedere l'Africa occidentale, che in questo momento ha qualche nuvola. Possiamo vedere fino a Cap
Roger. Se pensi che siamo più piccoli, ora sei a
حسناً. واضح تماماً. لم أصل إلى مبتغاك لفترة من ال
收到。牛仔队昨天被克利夫兰布朗队打得落花流水。普韦布洛机组人员预计可以获释。现在我听到我们的空地通信系统背景噪音很大。请稍等，我们将按照飞行计划第223页
Gemini 4. إذا لم تتم إعادة ضبط ضوء العطل في المرة الأولى، فا
It's a very quiet ride, just
... يجب أن أ
यह हमसे अपेक्
Houston, wir sind bereit fü
자, 이제 P63으로 갈 준비 됐나
Buonasera. Vorrei discutere con voi alcuni degli aspetti più simbolici del volo della nostra missione, l'Apollo 11. Mentre discutevamo degli eventi accaduti negli ultimi 2 o 3 giorni qui a bordo della nostra navicella spaziale, siamo giunti alla conclusione che questo è stato molto più di un viaggio di tre uomini verso la Luna; più, ancora, degli sforzi di un team governativo e industriale; più, persino, degli sforzi di una sola nazione. Riteniamo che questo rappresenti un simbolo dell'insaziabile curiosità di tutta l'umanità di esplorare l'ignoto. La dichiarazione di Neil l'altro giorno, quando ha messo piede per la prima volta sulla superficie della Luna: "Questo è un piccolo passo per un uomo, ma un grande balzo per l'umanità", credo riassuma molto bene questi sentimenti. Abbiamo accettato la sfida di andare sulla Luna; l'accettazione di questa sfida era inevitabile. La relativa facilità con cui abbiamo portato a termine la nostra missione, credo, è un omaggio alla tempestività di tale accettazione. Oggi, ritengo che 
Bleah, bleah. Mi sono preparato per questa cosa solo un'ora 
Sono d'accordo. Penso che per il rientro non sia necessaria una piattaforma davvero precisa, ma non l'ho d
Bene. Per quanto riguarda il test d
Roger. Good show. We'd like to see it if it'll reach that far. 
حسناً. لقد فهمت 
여기는 우정 7입니다.
Bene. E se siete pronti, lo siamo anche noi. Procederemo s
Ben
ええ、もちろんです、ビル。もし興味があれば、具体的な数字など何でも教えてくれ
В целом, я думаю, они неплохо справляются со своей работой, особенно на
Le panorama d'ici est exceptionnel. Dommage que la télé ne soit pas encore allumée, car la zone brune est maintenant plus sombre. Nous venons de survoler la Mer de la Fertilité, et la mer est plus sombre. La chaîne de montagnes offre un contraste plus m
Canary CAP COM입
ت
Okay. Zeile 7. Dort steht: „Manöver zur Horizontkontrolle“. Wir nennen das die „Mondkontrolle“, und genau die haben wir besprochen, Jack. Der Winkel von 265° stim
Ok, Bill, i nostri dati BIOMED sembrano ancora un po' instabili. Che ne dici di controllare il condizionatore di segnale blu sul tuo cablaggio BIOMED? Hai un connettore, dovrebbe essere il pacchetto centrale, con un connettore blu. Controllalo, e non so se hai cambiato i cavi del cablaggio BIOMED di recente
こんにちは、ヒューストン。こんにちは、ヒューストン。こちらはアポロ11号です。はっきりと
しばらくしたら
Bene. Stiamo procedendo verso una buona visuale della Terra, e non appena la raggiungeremo, ci fermeremo e vi lasceremo guardare fuori dal finestrino la scena che vediamo. Jim Lovell è giù nella stiva inferio
Ti informiamo che abbiamo ricevuto la tua pressione sangui
Роджер. Джим, продолжай откачивать воду, у н
Хьюстон, «Аполлон-11». Как читать текст 
Полёт продолжается, скопление людей увеличивается, вращение замедляется, всё в порядке. Через перископ я вижу Землю: она почти по
Roger. J'ai mis l'interrupteur sur OFF et rien ne s'e
Tranquility Base, hier spricht Hou
收到，弗雷德，你说得对。如果你拿出机动停机坪，我会给你一
Хорошо. Я подержу это и доба
روجر. كيف حالك يا جوردو؟ نحن بخير هنا. كل شيء يسير على ما يرام. ا
لنلقِ نظرة على ما حصلنا عليه. تم إيقاف تشغيل نظام
Non lo
별자리표의 번쩍거리는
C'est exact. C'est ce qui est indiqué sur l'horloge. L'horizon est d'un bleu éclatant. Là, j'ai le continent en vue à l'heure actuelle, pointant vers le haut sur le télescope, et j'aperçois des Canaries par la fenêtre; je les ai repé
जी हां, आप सही हैं। यह 
Mik
Tranquility, Houston. Per tua informazione, il circuito dell'interruttore del braccio del moto
好的。俯仰角减10，偏航角加350，光束宽度调到最大，然后进入自动模式
Das Fadenkreuz lässt sich für die Nachtsicht nicht ausreichend abdunkeln. Markieren Sie also erneut die Sterne im Sichtfeld. Thaurus kommt genau durch die Mittellinie. Eine Gierbewegung um etwa 5 Grad nach rechts würde für die Koppelnavigation ausreichen. Anschließend eine Rollbewegung um etwa 5 Grad nach links, was recht deutlich sichtbar ist. Für die Rückwärtsnavigation sieht das nach einer sehr guten Konfiguration aus. Bei hellem Mondlicht, das dem M
Danke. Okay. Und die Jungs sollen unsere Systeme genau im Auge behalten. Der alte Anders ist so damit beschäftigt, mit diesen Bildern herumzuspielen, dass – kaum etwas ander
天狼星和参宿
Bon, c'est ce qui s'est passé
Répét
わかりました。1番待機
11, Хьюстон. Роджер. Ваши углы — 45 и 255. Правильно ли я понимаю, что как только несущая частота отключилась, она перешла на эти углы; или же это произошло только после повторного включения восходящей несущей и начала повторного захвата антенны?
Okay. How big is it
Давайте посмотрим, что
— Если бы произошел пер
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमने आपके एंटेना फिर से चालू कर दिए हैं। क्या आप कृपया हमें /डेल्
The West Coast residents in Seattle, Washington; Portland, Oregon; Vancouver, British Columbia; and San Francisco all plan to make their areas visible to the three of you by lighting their lights between 9 pm and midnight tonight, according to the Associated Press. We do have clear weather predicted there, so you may be able to see Christmas lights, porch lights, store lights, and whatever may be
Bonjour, Apollo 11, Houston. Votre équipe blanche est à l'antenne. Nous vous attendons pour une soirée télévisée passionnante et un bulletin d'information ava
Go ahead, Carnarvon, 
ठीक है। समझ गया, जैक। हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं, और जैसे ही आप संतुष्ट होंगे, मैं आपको अंक दे
嗯，我现在正透过右后方的瞄准镜观察，之前我在指令舱里的时候，可以从1
Apollo 8, Ho
Ricevuto. PAD di ingresso: l'area è il Pacifico centrale, rollio 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, latitudine più 1332, meno 16917, 064,
Roger. 
Roger. Bien reçu. Nous sommes prêts à copier les r
Hello, Apollo 11, Houston. We'd like you to go back to star number 2 with an attitude as follows: roll 1952, pitch 1
Roger. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie während dieses Überflugs bei Ascension einen HF-Check durchführen sollen. Dieser HF-Check findet um 05:15 Uhr statt. Schalten Sie Ihren Sender in Sichtweite (LOS) ein, um einen kurzen Test durchzuführen, un
753 um 09:00 - 11:09 Uhr - Sonne direkt am Horizont. Wir hatten mit der Fotoereignisanzeige der Hasselblad wenig Erfolg. Wi
Okay. 5 
Beim nächsten Durchgang wäre 
... Ihr 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我想和你进行一次语
收到。我的控制模式是电传操纵，陀螺仪已释放，机动开关已关闭。燃油量在75%到85%之间，氧气量在88%到100%之间。等我把垫圈从空中捞起来再说。一切都很好。完毕
加那利群岛
안녕하세요
Hey, 
Apoll
E Boothill, Duke Island, Sidewinder, guardando Maskelyne W, che è il punto di controllo del giro di imbardata, e appena in prossimità del terminatore. Al ter
Non, je pense que tu te débrouilles bien. Ce que j'aimerais, c'est sortir complètement, Jim, et prendre une photo de l'ensemble du va
Какова была скорость изм
로저. 이번 달 탐사가 당신 눈에는 간단하거나 쉬워 보였을지도 모르겠습니다. 하지만 결코 그렇지 않았다는 것을 말씀드리고 싶습니다. 우리를 궤도에 올려놓은 새턴 V 로켓은 엄청나게 복잡한 기계 장치이며, 모든 부품이 완벽하게 작동했습니다. 제 머리 위에 있는 이 컴퓨터는 38,000개의 단어로 이루어진 어휘집을 가지고 있는데, 각 단어는 승무원인 우리에게 최대한 중요한 의미를 갖도록 매우 신중하게 선택되었습니다. 지금 제 손에 쥐고 있는 이 스위치는 사령선에만 300개가 넘는 동일한 스위치가 있습니다. 이 스위치는 단 하나의 설계로 만들어진 것입니다. 그 외에도 수많은 회로 차단기, 레버, 막대, 그리고 기타 관련 제어 장치들이 있습니다. 우리 서비스 모듈 후미에 있는 대형 로켓 엔진은 완벽하게 작동해야만 했습니다. 그렇지 않았다면 우리는 달 궤도에 고립되었을 것입니다. 제 머리 위에 있는 낙하산도 내일 완벽하게 작동해야 합니다. 그렇지 않으면 우리는 바다에 추락할 것입니다. 우리는 이 모든 장비가 제대로 작동할 것이라는 확신을 항상 가지고 있었고, 남은 비행 기간 동안에도 계속해서 그렇게 작동할 것이라고 확신합니다. 이 모든 것은 수많은 사람들의 피땀 어린 노력 덕분에 가능했습니다. 첫째, 공장에서 이 기계들을 조립한 미국 노동자들입니다. 둘째, 조립 및 조립 후 재시험 과정에서 여러 시험팀이 기울인 세심한 노력입니다. 마지막으로, 유인 우주선 센터의 관리자, 임무 계획 담당자, 비행 관제 담당자, 그리고 가장 중요한 승무원 훈련 담당자 모두에게 감사드립니다. 이 작전은 마치 잠수함의 잠망경과 같습니다. 여러분이 보는 것은 우리 세 명뿐이지만, 수면 아래에는 수천, 수만 명의 사람들이 있습니다. 그 모든 분들께 진심으로 감사드립니다
روجر. هذه فريندشيب 7. إليكم تقريرًا مدته ثلاثون دقيقة: لا تسبب حركات الرأس أي غثيان أو أي شعور سيئ على الإطلاق. أنا مندهش من قدرتي على النظر إلى الشمس عن قرب؛ فالشمس تسطع مباشرة على وجهي الآن
Ecco dove siamo arrivati... Sì, questa è la cosa più comoda che abbiate mai visto... si inserisce direttamente nel lato del casco, non esce più, e puoi afferrare qualsiasi cosa tu voglia,
わかった、教えてやるよ。全部持ってきて。今すぐ渡してくれ。ジャック、全部渡
观察室里有八个人，嗯，现在战壕里大概有六个
Non, Bruce. Donne-moi juste la latitude et la longitude sur 2, l'altitude et les coordonnées de
それ
Roger, Bill. Before you try the manual mixing, we'd like you to give it a whirl at the manual and increase on the cabin 
Roger. Let m
저희는 귀하의 녹음기
지금 45분이 지났습니다. 슈트 조절 손잡이를 아주 조금만, 4분의 1바퀴 정도 돌리겠습니다. 이제 거의 상황을 통제할 수 있을 것 같습니다. 슈트 조절 손잡이는 6.25로 설정했습니다. 현재 돔 온도는 82도이고, 슈트 흡입구 온도는 76도입
Le site d
네. 저 두 사람을 정말 주의 깊게 보셔야 해요. 참, 언제든 원하시면 비행 시뮬레이션용 패드
أبولو 8، هيوستن. اكتمل التحديث. يمكنك الآن حظر الكمبيوتر. يُرجى العلم أن ملف التفريغ القاب
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। सभी सिस्टम तैयार हैं। हम आपके बर्न
I have extincted Alvagrin to read at. Now this experiment isn't going to be valuable; I need cabin lights to see. It's awfully hard to find the extinction photometer. Let's see if I can do it now. Contrasted Alvagrin, the standard source, under the same lighting condi
Very good. We don't have any communications with the Cape at this time
Charlie, kannst du Mikes zwei Aug
Okay. Dies ist ein Perizynth-Plus-2 für eine schnelle Rückkehr. Das ergibt / 62871, minus 161, plus 129, plus 45224, minus 06216, minus 18712 001 287 351, November Alfa plus 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, Erde oben 010, rechts 37, plus 1475, plus 06500 13239 36913; Hauptstern Sirius, Nebenstern Rigel 129 155 010, kein Luftvolumen, setzt die Durchführung der Kurskorrektur 4 voraus und verwendet dieselbe Ausrichtung. Die Zeit für 5 zur GERU-Bestimmung - das ist Golf Echo Romeo Uniform - dies wird ein von sein; Ve
ठीक है। 39.3 और 1.25 कॉपी कर लिए हैं। जिम, क्या जैक ने तुम्हें बताया कि तुम्हारा प्रक्षेप पथ कैसा दिखता है? 
It looks like I just passed over some of the Marshall Islands down there. They were quite clear and you can see the atolls and stuff around the islands themselves. I tried to get a picture o
अपोलो 8, ह्
Начните понимать суть. Вы можете пого
제가 보기엔 항공편 운항 관리자들이 이 아이디어를 떠올
Роджер. Хорошо. Ваш следующий восход солнца будет 
Und dazu gehören im linken Randbereich die "Last" ganz am Anfang sowie die "0.0507"
로저, 
Non riesco a inse
Okay, Jack. I'm going to read it to you, and then add some comments and we'll talk a
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 연료 온도에 대한 정보가 있습니
了解。上
근접 비행 기동 / 62954, -162, +129 953 578 - 이는 00953 및 +000578입니다 - -02076 000 000 000, 해당 없음, +00202, 02356 022 02280 03 0393 310 013, 위쪽 048, 오른쪽 35, +1418, -165 05 12904 36160, 시리우스, 리겔 137
Roger. I am a
Roger. Wir möchten fragen, ob Sie ein ENTER verwendet haben, um den Zustandsvektor vom Slot in den Slot zu übertragen. Wir haben das hier n
Roger. Il pallone oscilla su un arco di circa 100 gradi. Spesso scompare dalla vista. In questo momento, è quasi verticale. Segna un passaggio costiero in questo momento... sembra... quello che sto cercando di dirti è che oscilla di 180 gradi
ここで高ビットレートを聞いて
Qui è Woomera Cap Com, Sette. Il chirurgo riferisce che tutti i 
谢谢。好的。还有，让伙计们密切关注我们的系统。老安德斯光顾着摆弄这些照
11, Хьюстон. Ба
Okay. In relationship to the midcourse correction, we'd like to put that one off until about, and it will be approximately a 25-foot-per-second burn. The reason we're delaying the burn time is to allow for better tracking as a result of the 7-1/2-foot per second you put in on the separation. We'd like to take a little more time to look at the tracking data. And the dispersions in your correction aren't going to be growing very fast here. What we'll do then is to del
Okay, Jack. Folgendes ist zu beachten: Der Leitungsschutzschalter begrenzt den Str
Roger. I'll read again 41 Delta, 41 Delta 83. 1+41. 06 30 09. 8+58.
请您核对您此时读到的偏航角读数与我读到的读数是
Хорошо, ладно. Мы летим над Штатами в 11-е по Гринвичу, и нас просят сделать несколько фотографий погоды. К северу от нас 
And CB - CB INVERTER 1, panel 11, CLOSED. CB panel 16, INSTRUMENT SIGNAL SENSOR, CLOSED. INVERTER
Okay, verstanden? Sie möchten, dass wir den Ladevorgang der Batterie für eine Weile unterbrechen und das CM™ hochfahren, um die Temperaturen auszul
فريندشيب سفن، هذه كيب كوم تك، كيب كوم تك. هل تس
Roger. It looks like I might have to do a couple more small maneuvers to stay away from the front of this, the way we are ending up now. Do you 
它们非常小，我估计只有十六分之一英
1C
रॉजर. 180 021 002, लागू नहीं, साथ ही 00188 28972 251 28793 40 
알겠습니다. 그
Хорошо. Тут особо нечего рассказывать. Ну, давайте начнём со спорта, какого черта. «Астрос» выстояли со счётом 8:7, «Брейвс» набрали пять или шесть очков в девятом иннинге, но им это удалось; а в другой важной игре дня матч «Кабс» был отменён из-за дождя. У меня есть все остальные результаты, можете сказать, если хотите. В Маниле и других районах острова Лусон произошли землетрясения. Было три толчка, и здания тряслись около получаса, магнитуда была примерно 5 по шкале Рихтера. Хорошо, давайте посмотрим. «Битлз» объявили, что больше не будут выступать как группа. Сообщается, что квартет заработал более полумиллиа
Okay, Vance. We tried our AUTO OPTICS and couldn't pick it up there. We're pointing pretty much right into the Sun, and things are pretty well washed out. And I've gone to MANUAL OPTICS and I'm trying to get 0.8, 12.5 on the shaft and trunnion, and I still can't pick i
Роджер. Передача н
ठीक है। लगभग 2 मिनट में फ्लेयर चालू
جيميني 4، هيوستن كا
네, 맞습니다. 지금 막 마무
네, 짐. 외부 리드를 눌러주시겠어요? 아, 그리고 저희가 예상보다 약 2온스 정도 더 많이 사용하고 계신 것 같습니다. 슈트 밴드 위치
Roger. Die Adapterbatterien zeigen alle 2 Ampere und 24 Volt an. Die RCS-Ringe funktionieren einwandfrei. Die Sauerstoffflaschen funktionieren ebenfalls einwandfrei. Die H
لدينا لفة واحدة من فيلم 16 ملم ملون داخلي ASA 1000. كنا نفكر في تصويرها أثناء الدخول، من النافذة رقم 4 باستخدام حامل، وقد ت
Non so quanti dettagli riesci a vedere, Jim, ma i
네, 마지막 촬영에서 샌디에이고 동쪽에서 시작해서 구름이 다시 짙어질 때까지 약 38장의 사진을 광역 지형 사진 촬영 장비로 찍었습니다. 미국 남부, 앨라배마와 미시시피를 지나 플로리다까지 이동하면서부터는 간헐적으로 사진을 찍기 시작했습니다. 그 지역의 날씨를 아주 잘 담은 사진들을 몇 장 건졌고, 잭슨빌 주변 비행장 사진도 몇 장 찍었습니다. 케이프 코드 사진도 몇 장 찍었고요. 아마도 가장 잘 나온 사진 중 하나는 뒤쪽을 향해 찍은 사진일 겁니다. 플로리다에서 시작해서 텍사스까지 해안선을 따라 이어지는 기상 현상 전체를 담은 사진이었죠. 해안선을 따라 뚜렷하게 형성된 기상대가 보였습니다. 그 다음에는 플로리다 주, 쿠바와 그 주변 섬 지역, 그리고
Lo è, ma sei comunque costretto a una posizione specifica, proprio come quando sei seduto sul sedile di un autobus. Anche se non ti siedi sul sedere, devi 
Je suppose que les vibrations étaient présentes en permanence, même si elles semblaient s'intensifier à mesure que la combustion progressait, bien que cela puisse être simplement dû à la diminution du p
好了，刚才被打断了一会儿。鲍勃·霍普又回到越南和他的部队一起演出了，一如既往地表现出色。新闻里提到的一个名字来自“新泽西”号战列舰。昨天——或者说是周三——鲍勃·霍普站在一个巨大的炮塔上开玩笑，逗乐了“新泽西”号战列舰上的1500名官兵，这已经是该舰连续第20年在海外慰问美军士兵过圣诞节了。霍普和他
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हमने आपके सभी सिस्टम की समीक्षा कर ली है। आपको उड़ान भरने क
よし
The ones that I saw back in the aft end of the spacecraft appeared to be a good bit darker; of course, viewed from the aft end, why, they did have the Sun shining directly on them. It seemed as though the material had been baked somewhat and also scattered in a radially outward direction, but in that particular area, this feature didn't extend more than about 2, 
알겠습니다. 캡슐이 방향을 바꾸고 있는데, 제 뒤쪽으로 불과 몇 백 야드 떨어진 곳에서 추진체가 방향을 바꾸는 모습이 보입니다
Ich würde gerne wissen, 
Tranquili
セシル・B・デ・オ
로저, 제미니 8호입니다. 그리고 의료 관련 업데이트입니다. 만약 우주선을 
ठीक है। इंतज़ार कीजिए। मुझे पहले इसे प्लग इ
Нам удалось привести в порядок мочеприемник, опорожнить мочеприемни
Roger, Jim. When the time is auspicious, would you shift the BIOMED switch over to left side
ठीक है। सबसे ज़रूरी बात यह है कि फ़्लाइट प्लान के अनुसार CDR को आराम करना चाहिए। दूसरी बात, आपके बर्न का संक्षिप्त विवरण। आपके सभी सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहे हैं। ट्रैजेक्टरी से पता चलता है कि आपके पास 69.67 मील के मोड वाला CPA है और पेरीसिंथियन का समय है। आपने एक अच्छे फ़्री रिटर्न पर कैप्चर किया है। कॉरिडोर कंट्रोल के लिए ट्रैजेक्टरी का पूरी तरह से मूल्यांकन करना अभी थोड़ा जल्दी है। आपको प्लस 11 ब्लॉक डेटा का कोई अपडेट नहीं मिलेगा। कर्व्स को देखने के बाद, ऐसा लगता है कि 0.2 से 0.3 वोल्ट पर बैटरी-वेंट प्रेशर व
공이 바로 아래로 떨어지는 피치는 아니었으면 좋겠
Подтверждаю. Специалисты оценивают тепловую обстановку. Похоже, вы будете отсутствовать довольно долгое время. Именно поэтому мы просим вас возобновить наблюдения примерно сразу после завершения этих трех наблюдений за з
حسناً. شكراً
ठीक है। हम यही करेंगे। हम तब तक इंतज़ार करेंगे जब तक लोगों को उनका सामान नहीं मिल जाता, और फिर हम इस पर चर्चा करेंगे और यहाँ समन्वय स्थापित करेंगे
罗杰，我们现在处于真空状态，右侧
I think we've got about the best configuration. We've been doing it
Okay, Jim. Das ist die, vor der wir dich vor ei
Nein. Haben wir nicht. Ich 
تُفيد إدارة الطيران بأنها تحتاج إلى تسجيل البيانات فوق محطة CSQ، لذا ي
好的。我们将保持这种配置大约 2 分钟，然后 COMM
ठीक है। शीर्षक है, "ना
さて、B DAT
मुझे लगता है कि उन शून्यो
سبعة، هذه شركة 
Vorrei fare un piccolo commento sul sestante. Il suo utilizzo in una navicella spaziale angusta è molto difficile, soprattutto con il casco. Alla fine ho deciso che sarebbe stato inutile con il casco per cercare di catturare gli angoli richiesti dalle stelle. Così mi sono tolto il casco. Questo mi ha dato un po' più di flessibilità nell'uso, ma ero comunque limitato ad angoli di circa 20-23° senza manovrare la navicella. Quello che succedeva era che la stella veniva tagliata fuori dalla parte superiore della finestra. Ora, con manovre più frequenti e libere della navicella, si poteva manovrarla in modo da avere l'asse longitudinale della finestra nel piano di inseguimento. Eravamo in qualche modo limitati dal carburante e non abbiamo scelto di manovrare in questo modo. Abbiamo usato anche la modalità a impulsi, senza molte manovre. Le stelle selezionate per quella prova avevano angoli piuttosto elevati rispetto all'orizzonte e, quindi, erano molto difficili da ottenere. Alla fine abbiamo deciso di procedere e di avvicinare le stelle un po' di più all'orizzonte. Ne ho eseguiti un paio con Canopus e un paio con altri, come noterete. Il filtro blu sembrava bloccare completamente l'orizzonte; non avevo orizzonte quando l'ho usato. La nostra immagine dell'orizzonte probabilmente non è altrettanto buona quando c'è la luce della luna. Il filtro verde, invece, mi ha dato quello che considererei un orizzonte un po' pi
Je crois que c'était après l'insertion, Bruce. Je ne me sou
Bene, Ken
好的。面板 4：电信，第 1 组，接 AC1。闭合以下断路器：，按下第 1 组，主 B；，按下第 2 组，主 B；，温度，主 B；，二次回路传感器，主 B；散热器，控制/加热器，主 B；电池继电器总线，电池 B；电池充电器，电池 B，充电 - 或接至 B，充电；逆变器控制，2
我不知道，大概一
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 achtern wird 42 sein. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-1 84 achtern wird 56 sein. 2+20. 1+11. 16 08 16. 3+05. 8+53. 33-1 84 achtern wird 68 sein. 2+20. 1+27. 17 42 15. 2+37. 8+49. 29-BRAVO 84. 50 achtern. 2+20. 1+03. 12 16 35. 12+08. 30-BRAVO 120. 2+32. 13 50 19. 12+29. 34-4 120. 2+32. 20 29 04. 3+33. 8+55. 31-BRAVO 95. 2+01. 15 30 09. 11+48. 32-BRAVO 86. 1+50. 17 05 0
我们从远处进行的定位检查显示我
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। शुर
모두가 그 노래를 듣고 펄쩍펄쩍 뛰었을 거라고 확
알았어, 짐. 태
收到。
Роджер.
350フィート、4 - 330 - 6.5インチの
好的，杰克。B电池
13, Houston. We're wor
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। मुझे लगता है कि हम विषय से भटक गए हैं। हाई-गेन एंटीना के लिए हमने आपको जो पिच और यॉ एंगल बताए थे, वे बिल के इस अनुरोध के जवाब में थे कि हम ऑटो रिएक्विजिशन (AUTO REACQ) पोजीशन के लिए कौन सी पोजीशन सेट कर सकते हैं। अगर हम साथ ही साथ ओम्नी एंटीना का इस्तेमाल नहीं करना चाहते हैं, तो यह शर्त अभी भी लागू है। हम ऑटो रिएक्विजिश
Roger. I ate every
نحن في حالة تأهب قصوى. لا عجب في 
了解。分かりました。…にいくつか明
Sigma Seven, qui Kano Cap Com. Tras
Roger. Alcuni dei precedenti commenti di Jim sulla luminosità del bordo mentre il sole stava per sorgere hanno suscitato molto interesse qui. E vorremmo chiedergli se avrà modo di notare di nuovo, o forse riuscirà a ricordare, se ci sono stati cambiamenti nell'aspetto delle stelle. Ad esempio, ha notato qualche scintillio mentre questo accadeva, e ha notato qualche leggero aumento di luminosità del bordo nei 10-20 secondi prima del sorgere del sole? P
Хорошо. GET B 9 44 00; Delta
Roger. Stavo giusto registrando qualcosa. L'unica cosa insolita che ho notato è uno strato di foschia piuttosto alto, che sembrerebbe essere di circa 7 o 8 gradi sopra l'orizzonte sul lato notturno. Riesco a vedere le stelle attraverso di esso mentre scendono verso l'orizzonte reale, ma è una singola banda o strato molto visibile, piutto
मैं भी यही कह
Bon, quand je mets le filtr
I guess the best way to terminate this is by going back to, is th
क्या आपको खराब
ठीक है। अगला एक, दो, तीन, चार, पांच, छह, सात, आठ एक समान हैं, और फिर हम फ्यूल सेल 2 मेन बस 
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota quattro e stiamo lavorando al quinto giorno. Naturalmente, non vediamo l'ora che arrivi l'atterraggio di venerdì. Qui sotto, nella parte della navicella che chiamiamo stiva inferiore, abbiamo il consigliere del Presidente per la forma fisica, il Capitano Jim Lovell, che sta per sottoporsi a un programma di esercizi che svolgiamo ogni giorno. Notate che fluttua molto liberamente. Ha appena sbattuto la testa contro il sistema ottico, usato per la nostra navigazione. Sta lavorando con un attrezzo progettato per mantenere i muscoli in forma. Un'altra funzione molto importante della nostra navicella spaziale è il computer, e ho pensato che potesse interessarvi vedere cosa abbiamo qui, i display che ci forniscono tutte le informazioni sulla nostra combustione, sulla navigazione e sulla velocità che utilizziamo durante l'ingresso e il retro-fuoco nelle missioni orbitali terrestri. Potete veder
Mancano ancora tre passaggi e poi u
मैं ठीक महसूस कर रहा हूँ। जिम वापस
Affermativo.
いいえ。フレッドは降下段から他に何も見て
로저입니다. 그리고 당연한 결과겠지만, 현재 근지점이 약간 높아서 다
I've got about 30 
Haben sie eine Vorstell
アポロ8号、ヒューストンからハンツビルま
والوضع على الكرة هو 18 درجة مع توج
E con ACCEPT andremo avanti e lavorer
MA
テキサス、はっ
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。19歳にな
水瓶座，休
로저 
是的
さあ、アクエリア
أفهم أنك تحتاج إلى مراجع
好的。步骤是：按回车键，按 333 回车键，读取寄存器 1 的值。然后输入 10000（内存地址），如果配置正确，计算机应该会将内存转储两次。如果配置不正确，我们需要加载 10000，方法是：按回车键，按 333 回车键，输入 10000 回车键，再按回车键。如果寄存器 1 读取到 10000，我们仍然需要
حسنًا
Morning, Frank. Looks like we have
了解。順調に進んでいる。私の状態は非常に良好
D'accord, Apollo 8. Il semble que vous puissiez maintenant arrêter vos ventilateurs cryogéniques. Nous vous laissons tranquille un moment pour vous permettre de rattraper votre retard. Concernant les opérations à bord, comme le test de l'antenne à gain élevé et celui du mode COMM que vous avez indiqués, nous les reporterons et les effectuerons lorsque vous serez prêt. C'est donc à votre convenance. Lors du test de gain élevé que nous avons effectué avec une antenne à large bande, nous obten
D'accord, Jack, pendant la manœuvre télégraphique, nous étions en mode AUTO TRACK, avec un faisc
Eh bien, je trouve que la journée s'est plutôt bien passée. Si demain et après-demain sont comme aujourd'h
Роджер, Гуаймас, я
ठीक है। अगल
收到。您的数据已导入。我已收到您
现在它与飞行路线
Oh nein,
혈압이나 구강 체온 측정값을
È un eu
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴.
Okay. Jack, im M
Roger. 88 and 8.5. W
You're taking your helmet off and the clear fi
ठीक है। हम इस समय एएफटी ओम्नी से अ
Roger. 1, G&N: 38658, minus 054, plus 065, 078 02 0345, plus 29180, plus 03779, minus 01325; roll NA, pitch 041; two jets, 19 seconds, undocked. 4: 38658, minus 054, plus 065, 084 29 5059, plus 31373, plus 03760, minus 00968; roll NA, pitch 034; two jets, 19 seconds, undocked; 
Okay, Ken. Pericynthian plus 2, fast return / 62871, minus 161, plus 129, plus 45224, minus 06216, minus 18712 001 28 603 49118 112 038 296 earth up 010, right 37, plus 1475, plus 06400 1323 936 913, primary Sirius, secondary Rigel 129 155 010, no ullage, assume 4 same alignment, 5 GERU determination NC-4 0 through 10 and copy NC-8, 3, and 4. Velocity a
Roger. Vous dites qu'il 
Okay, meine Ausweichlösung ist 2 Fuß pro Sekunde nach oben und 23 Fuß pro Sekunde nach vorne, wodurch wir diese Position erreichen. Wir nehmen einen geschlossenen Datenpunkt i
أقول، سيكون بيل جاهزاً في غضون دقيقة؛ إنه يركب الدراجة ذهاباً وإياباً تحت الأريكة محاولاً إخراج أغراض التلفزيو
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。请讲，弗
Roger, haben 36-4 mit und ohn
Questo è Charlie. Verificare la t
알았어. 밴스, 버즈나 닐이 근처에 있으면 11화
好的
제미니 4,
Ok, aspetta. Ripongo questa matita. Sono in configurazione scimpanzé. La capsula vola s
Roger, tutto ok. Ho capito come descri
I am switching - My
Roger
Now that's about all we have for today. I - each and every one of us wish each and every one of you a very Merry Christmas. And, 
了解。
鹰，哥伦比亚。
Oui, nous devrions viser les
我想我会——在你和坎顿之间——再尝试
We can just barely see those parts of the. They must be in a s
Роджер. Конец орбиты 01 28
Вы установили переключатель телеметрии в режимы РЕАЛЬНОГО ВРЕМЕНИ и ВРЕМЕНИ ВЫПОЛНЕНИЯ
Roger. Torniamo al peso: 45701, meno 040, più 157. Mi seguite? Pass
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben Sie im PTC angehalten; die Lage scheint in Ordnung zu sein. Mike, ich bräuchte einen Kommunikationscheck. Die letzten Funksprüche des Raumschiffs waren, insbesondere von Buzz, verfälscht. Könnten Sie beide bitte einen Kommunikationsc
Ok, Fred. Te l'avevamo detto un po' 
E Columbia, Houston. Ci aspettiamo di perdere il vostro elevato g
Okay. We're right at th
Роджер, Аполлон-8. Всё верно. Мы хотели бы пе
好的。我现在处于自动模式。一切运行
22は94.3です。それ
好的。我们这台
إيجل، هيوستن
حسنًا، لنعد إلى الصفحة ١٨. سنتابع كما هو عند ٣٠ ثانية، ١٠ ثوانٍ، ٧ ثوانٍ، ناقص ٥ ثوانٍ. 
그건 부정적입니다. 하나를
रॉजर। माइनस 2 समझ गए? 
Ok, è co
حسنًا، أنت رائع حقًا. من دواعي سروري عدم وجود كل هذه الضوضاء. دعني أخبرك بما أريد فعله يا جيم. كما قلت، لن نقدم لك إجراءات مفصلة الآن. ما نتوقع أن نقدمه لك قريبًا هو إجراءات سنحاول إيصالها إليك بالشكل التالي. أولًا، سيكون لدينا جدول زمني، أشبه بخطة طيران، يتضمن أوق
Roger, Neil. We're seeing some temperature rises on the passive seismic experiment that are a little higher than normal and were wondering if you could verify the deployed position. We understand it's about 40 feet from the in the eleven o'clock
D'accord. Je vais donc procéder à la poussée. La différence triangulaire est de 0,01, mais c'est asse
Wir sind jetzt bei Kar
ジャック、ど
ジム、君
Roger, Jim
Ripeti. P
Z Cal 现在
Это Роджер. К вашему сведению, компания Ascension скопировала вас во время вашего последнего прохода, и они го
그리고 지금 단열재를 제거했는데 상태가 좋아
좋
Roger, ich hatte kurzzeitig Probleme, als ich auf die 3er-Einstellung zurückgegangen bin, bin aber nicht lange dort geblieben. Der Wert sollte definitiv zwischen 7,5 und 8 liegen. Momentan nutze ich die automatische Rückwärtsneigungskorrektur. Ich werde gleich auf Fly-by-Wire umschalten. Die Gyroskope waren auf Normalbetrieb eingestellt, und das Manöver war deaktiviert. Alle Systeme funktionieren einwandfrei. Einmal habe ich versehentlich etwa 2 % der manuellen Steuerung (Kraftstoff) durch eine Berührung abgebrochen. Es war 
分かりました。AGC
Я предлагаю начать укладывать космический аппарат, привести его в порядок, а затем спать и есть. С этого момента мы все будем думать 
È quello che volevo dire. Non vedo a
こちら
不
And 11, Houston. Your state vector in the slots are - is good. Ov
У вас довольно плохая п
你好，阿波罗11号。休斯顿。巴兹，你把外科医生都吓得从椅子上站起来了。我们看到你在锻炼。
了解しました。次の点ですが、超臨界ヘリウムの上昇率は公称値です。また、前回のREV時のスラスタの作動状況についてもご質問をいただきました。ピッチはACCEL COMMAND、ヨーとロールはRATE COMMANDとご報告いただいたので、これで理解できたと思います。ピッチスラスタを噴射していました。これにより、ヨー軸とロール軸にスラスタの速度が連動します。そして…その時はデッドバンドを0.5度しか保持していませんでした。ヨー軸
私がやることは…もう一度言います…わかりました。もう一度繰り返します。パッケージバルブを押し下げてオフ、緊急キャビン圧力をオフに、ダイレクトO2をオフに、両方のデマンドレギュレーターをオフに、両方のH2Oアキュムレーターと水グリコールアキュムレーターをオフに、メインレギュレーターAとBを開け、水とグリコールタンクの入口と出口を開けます。水につ
Nous sommes en train de tomber sur Arist
Roger, Friendship Seven. Will be losing contact any minut
没
Roger. Unsere Mondreise mag Ihnen einfach erschienen sein. Ich kann Ihnen versichern, dass dem nicht so war. Die Saturn-V-Rakete, die uns in den Orbit befördert hat, ist eine unglaublich komplexe Maschine, deren einzelne Teile einwandfrei funktionierten. Dieser Bordcomputer über mir verfügt über einen Wortschatz von 38.000 Wörtern, von denen jedes einzelne sorgfältig ausgewählt wurde, um für uns, die Besatzung, von größtem Wert zu sein. Allein im Kommandomodul gibt es über 300 Gegenstücke zu diesem Schalter. Hinzu kommen unzählige Sicherungen, Hebel, Stangen und andere Bedienelemente. Das Triebwerk, unser großes Raketentriebwerk am Heck des Servicemoduls, musste einwandfrei funktionieren, sonst wären wir im Mondorbit gestrandet. Die Fallschirme über mir müssen morgen perfekt funkti
माइक, मैं फ्रैंक बोल रहा हूँ। क्या यह टीवी शो अभी भी निर्धारित समय प
明るい星が見える。きっと金星だ。ジョン・メイヤーが窓の外に見た景色をちゃんと覚えてなかったから、金星か
Bene. Il titolo principale è "Entrata, PREPARAZIONE LM, meno 6 ore". Primo, BAT 5 ALIMENTAZIONE NORMALE, ATTIVA; secondo, utili
네, 짐. 저희는 사령선에서 더 나은 별 관측을 위해 발사대 자세와는 다른 자세로 이동하는 것에 대해 이야기해 왔습니다. 저희가 부탁드리고 싶은 것은 다음과 같습니다. 지금 또는 곧 원하는 자세를 예측하여 그 자세로 이동하신 후, 해당 자세에 대한 대략적인 짐벌 각도를 계산할 수 있도록 도와주시겠습니까? 선택하신 자세로 이동하신 후, 해당 자세를 유지하시고, 저희에게 짐벌 각도를 알려주시면, 저희가 그 값을 바탕으로 대략적
يبدو أن هناك خللاً بسيطاً ه
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 저전압 탭을 끄고, 리셋한 다음 다시 켜주십시오.
ठीक है। खबर का सार यही है। ह्यूस्टन, प्रतीक्षा 
जिम, जब हम इस विषय पर बात कर ही रहे हैं, तो मैं जैक से एक बात कहना चाहता हूँ। जैसा कि मैंने बताया, हम जिस संरेखण प्रक्रिया की सलाह देने जा रहे हैं वह चंद्रमा/सूर्य पर आ
Columbia, Houston. 
ठीक है। अब पैनल 8 पर, मुझे आपको उन सर्किट ब्रेकरों की संख्या बतानी होगी जिन्हें हम खोलना चाहते हैं, इसलिए सीबी पैनल 8 को पूरी तरह बंद करके शुरू करें, सिवाय उन दो को छोड़कर जो हमारे पास पहले से हैं: सीएम/हीटर, खुला, और फ्लोट बैग, और निम्नलिखित जोड़ें। मैं उन्हें एक-एक करके पढ़ूंगा, और आप देख सकते हैं।
Роджер. Джи
回転制御
了解
Un'altra piccola notizia locale: il tribunale della contea di Huntsville è andato a fuoco prima dell'alba di ieri, quindi sembra che riprenderanno i lavori di costruzione. Ho ricevuto un piccolo articolo sulle famiglie in attesa. Questo è di Ann James, giornalista del Post. "Ci riposiamo sul lato oscuro della Luna", ha detto Valerie Anders la vigilia di Natale, mentre lei e la sua famiglia aspettavano che l'Apollo 8 uscisse dall'orbita lunare e tornasse a casa. La signora Anders era arrivata alle 00 di martedì mattina, e i vicini avevano appena raccolto tutti i bambini perché la famiglia potesse riposare un po' mentre la navicella spaziale era dietro la Luna e non poteva comunicare. La casa del colonnello Frank Borman era addobbata con quattro grandi ghirlande di sempreverdi all'esterno, cosparsa di neve farinosa e decorata con fiocchi rossi. Un albero in soggiorno attende il suo ritorno sano e salvo, e la sua bella moglie bionda Sue e i suoi robusti figli, Frederick ed Edwin, hanno intenzione di rimanere a casa per il lancio di mezzanotte dall'orbita lunare. Di solito, avrebbero partecipato alle funzioni religiose di mezzanotte nella chiesa episcopale di San Cristoforo. I piani erano per la famiglia alle 00 del mattino. Dato che non ci sono bambini piccoli in casa Borman, i regali di Natale in famiglia aspetteranno semplicemente il ritorno del Colonnello Borman con il suo fantastico regalo di Natale: il volo sulla luna e ritorno. I quattro figli di Marilyn Lovell trascorreranno un Natale assolutamente normale per quanto riguarda i bambini, ha riferito l'indaffarata moglie del Capitano Lovell; ma parlare di regali era fuori luogo perché due di loro erano seduti proprio lì accanto a lei. "Non ho nemmeno avuto il tempo di cambiarmi i vestiti che indossavo ieri sera", ha detto la signora Lovell. Regali da adulto ad adulto, comunque, e l'albero di Natale sarà ancora lì quando Lovell tornerà a casa. Eccone uno interessante su Action Line. C'è una breve lettera al direttore di Action. Dice: "Ieri sera avevamo intenzione di farvi una visita a sorpresa con un disco volante, a voi terrestri. Ci siamo spaventati per le folli gesta di un uomo grasso, una slitta e tre ragazzi su un carro armato a razzo che gareggiavano intorno alla Luna. È questo il modo di governare un 
是的，我们收
Pendant que vous êtes au téléphone
Ich verstehe Sie gut. Roger: Wenige Minuten vor Operationsbeginn. Mir geht es hervorragend, ich bin bester La
Fo
रॉजर। कैंटन कैप कॉम, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। ईंधन 62-75 डिग्री, ऑक्सीजन 65-98 प्रतिशत, करेक्शन 65-100 प्रतिशत, 
Sì
알겠습니다. MSC-2와 -3 소형 전방 추진 방식은 23시간 49분에 시작하여 Rev
阿
Ich habe jetzt einen Druck von 3,5 psid; ich werde in wenig
Gemini 4, Хь
Roger. È apparso molto più nitido con il sestante che con il monocolo, e si poteva sicuramente dire che si trattava di una singola cellula nelle ultime fasi di sviluppo. Deve essere arrivato a oltre 15.000 metri, però. Il Mediterraneo orientale è straordinariamente limpido. Si vedono tutti i laghi; il Mar Morto si distingueva piuttosto
水瓶座，休斯顿。抱歉，背景噪音太大，
Zu Ihrer Information: Wir werden Sie ab jetz
마이크, 착륙 지점에 정말 많은 물체가 있네요. 잭 슈미트 장군이 보면 정말 좋아할 만한 광경입니다. 자동 광학 장치가 목표물을 완벽하게 추적하고 있고, 두 개의 높은 봉우리가 아주 선명하게 보입니다. 정말 멋진 광경이에요. 첫 번째 봉우리는 지금 수직에 아주 가깝게 보이고, 두 번째 봉우리도 곧 나타날 것 같
11, 휴스턴. 버즈, 통신이 심하게 끊기네요. VOX 좀 확인해 주시겠어요? 이상
杰克，你
좋아요. 이제 빨간색 호스와 파란색 호스를 분리하
روجر. نظام التحكم الإلكتروني ممتاز. لديّ الآن معزز ال
Affermativo, Jack, e poi 
Wir möchten, dass DISPLAY geöffnet ist; S-BAND-ANTENNE geschlossen ist – um einen MASTER-ALARM zu vermeiden; CAMERA – SEQUENCE CAMERA geöffnet ist; und darunter möchten wir, dass DISPLAYs geöffnet sind; DC BUS VOLT geschlossen ist; INVERTER 2 geöffnet ist; ASCENT ECA geschlossen ist; ASCENT ECA CONTROL geöffnet ist; DESCENT ECA geschlossen ist; DESCENT ECA
Ich we
さあ、続けてください。まだま
Roger. Concernant le minuteur de mission, nous souhaitions couper le disjoncteur et laisser le système refroidir pendant une heure et demie à deux heures. Je crois que le disjoncteur est actuellement ouvert. Il était hors tension, veuillez donc réinitialiser le disjoncteur du minuteur de mission. Placez la commande du minuteur sur RÉINITIALISATION et maintenez-la enfoncée pendant 30 secondes, puis ajustez la durée selon
实际上，这个相对湿度
ब
11, Хьюстон. Роджер. Слушаю вас хорошо, и, похоже, автоматическая система REACQ сработала отлично, как только вы обошли ветку. Нам нужно обсудить с вами несколько мелочей, преж
يا برج الجوزاء، هذه هيوستن. هذا مجرد تقدير تقريبي لاستخدام نظام إ
全部揃ったと思うけど 
LMP想服用
네, 감사합니다. 탑승객 여러분, 현재 쿼드 알파 75%, 브라보 78%, 찰리 78%, 델타 
Хорошо. Управление ориентацией, сканирование горизо
我最后得到的比我的早了 3
지금 상황이 아주 좋아 보여요, 월
रॉजर। क्या आप अपनी प्री-रेट्रोसीक्वेंस चेकलिस्
11، هيوست
الجوزاء 4، ال
好的。他正在把头盔放进食物盒里。稍等一下，我让他帮你
ठीक है, 12:58 होराइजन स्कैनर
Ricevuto. 
حسنًا. سنوافق على ما قلته بخصوص وحدة التحكم الإ
不，我从上床睡觉前就没吃
짐, 난 그저 그들을 모두 내보내려고
이 작은 녹음기는 우리에게 큰 도움이 되었습니다. 달로 가는 동안 시간을 ​​보내는 데 아주 유용했죠. 오디세이호에서 이렇게 둥둥 떠다니면서 영화 "2001 스페이스 오디세이"의 주제곡을 틀어주는 모습을 보니 왠지 신기하네요. 그리고 물론, "아쿠아리우스"가 없으면 녹음이 완성
不行。友谊七级
映画のフィルムがた
Une fois l'examen Aero-Med terminé, nous transmettrons d'autres données CLA et PLA. L
That was 33 - that's about a 4 second d
الانحراف لليسار ليس جيداً. لنرَ ما لدينا. يظهر انحراف خمس
17
了解しました。8ボールへの姿勢がひどく崩れているのは承知しました。地上からGOです。4-1
Роджер. Экземпляр, Колумб
SEP 後、47
Und Jack aus Houston. Nur zur Information: Er teilt mir mi
जिम, क्या तुम बेडरूम में चिल्लाकर जैक को बता दोगे कि जब उसे अपने सिस्टम की रीडिंग मिल जाए, तो हम चाहते हैं कि वह वापस जाए - बैकआउट प्रक्रिया का उपयोग करे और
From 
了解しました。宇宙船コロンビア号の住人の皆様、今日はコロンビアの独立記念日です。昨夜、フィリピンのグロリア・ディアスさんがミス・ユニバースに輝きました。彼女は世界美人の称号をかけて、他の60人の少女たちを破りました。ディアスさんは18歳で、黒髪黒瞳、スリーサイズは34.5インチ、23インチ、34.5インチです。準優勝はミス・オーストラリア、続いてミス・イスラエル、ミス・ジャパンでした。火曜の夜、皆さんがワシントンへ帰る間、アメリカンリーグとナショナルリーグのオールスターチームがワシントンで試合をします。アメリカンリーグの先発投手はヤンキースのメル・ストットルマイヤーが有力視されています。ナショナルリーグの先発投手は誰になるか、まだ誰も予想していません。ナショナルリーグには9人の先発
Хорошо. 
好的，面板 11 配置，顶行：交流总线 B，S 波段天线，打开，打开；交流总线 A，磁带录音机，打开。第二行，在系统 A 下，主电源通过 QUAD 1 TCA，全部关闭。飞行显示器下的指挥官 X 指针，打开；交会雷达备用加热器，打开；着陆雷达加热器，打开。姿态直接断路器，关闭；
了解しました。パッシブサーマル制御は、それまでの間、できるだけ多くのマークを取得するまで保留にしたいと思っています。まず最初の星から始めて、それぞれ3つのマークを2セ
Bien. Maintenant, appuyez le sac contre les bandes adhésives que nous avons 
जब हमें और समय मिलेगा तो हम
了解。ロール完
好的，
Roger. Panel rundown follows: The fuse switches on the left panel are all as previously reported, without repeating them again. Squib is armed. Auto Retrojettis
रॉजर। 1, G&N: 38658, माइनस 054, प्लस 065, TIG 078 02 0345, प्लस 29180, प्लस 03779, माइनस 01325; रोल NA, पिच 041. PAD का
네, 맞습니다, 잭. 요청 사항은 다음과 같습니다. 전원을 끄기 전에
Roger. Ma
عندما نطور وضعية للحصول 
Roger. With respect to the Dow Jones industrials, since closing on Tuesday afternoon the 15th up to about 1:05 p.m. Houston time this afternoon, why, the effect has been a net drop; that is, minus 6 points on the industrial average. So far today since opening, the Dow Jones industrial average has gone down by 11.05 afte
Bonjo
Okay, Apollo
Хорошо. В принципе, это правильно. Позвольте мне немного пошагово объяснить, а потом я зачитаю вам этапы. Думаю, так будет понятнее. Схема такова: вы можете направить свой телескоп на заданный набор углов, которые направят вашу оптику на Луну. Теперь, в любой момент, в любом положении, если вы можете посмотреть в телескоп и распознать звездные узоры настолько хо
Muche
Roger. We would like in ACCEPT, please. We would like to 
شربتُ كمية كبيرة من الماء وما زلتُ أشعر بالعطش. في الحقيقة، أعتقد أن هناك 
حسنًا. ينبغي أن تكون هذه الخطوة الثانية في تلك العملية. في تمام الساعة 22:40، أو عندما تصل إليها، نود أن نبدأ شحن البطارية A. وفي تمام الساعة 24:10، لدينا تحديث لمعايرة العدسات والبصريات. ان
Роджер, Фрэнк. На третьем участке траектории скорость составляет чуть больше 30 см в секунду, поэтому мы не рекомендуем вам его использовать. Это приводит нас к четвертому участку траектории со скоростью всего около 90 см в секунду. Ваша траектория выглядит очень хорошо. Ваша высота в перицинфян
トランキリティ、
マイク、僕たちは小屋のあちこちに猿のようにいて、何かにぶつからないように気を付けたかったん
Хорошо. Мы завершили запи
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 다시 말씀해 주시겠
Эй, хочешь взглянуть на это B B и посмотреть, что из это
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Proprio mentre il sole sorgeva, c'erano delle particelle lum
Okay; good. Co
Okay
Roger. Die „Black Bugle“ ist soeben eingetroffen mit
Base Tranquillité, ici Houston. Pouvez-vou
Ro
Iwo Jima Control, hier spricht... Recovery. Sichtpeilung 190. End
Gemini 4, you
Du hast ihnen die Wahrheit gesagt. Fühlst dich gut, bist gut gelaunt und be
Nous avons en fait effectué le test Thruster ve
Хорошо, Джек. Начнём сверху. Итак. Криогенные баки: H2 1 показывает 230, то же самое для 2. В нашем кислородном криогенном баке 1, похоже, еле держится на уровне 300. А в криогенном баке 2 H2 1 показывает 73, 2, 74. На кислородной стороне мы видим O2 1 в количестве 76; O2 зафиксиро
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们希望您尝试手动在高增益下进行采集
ठीक है। नीचे दिए गए चरण में, BAT 2, लो वोल्टेज, ऑफ/रीसेट, फिर ऑन करें। इसके बाद, BAT 2, हाई वोल्टेज, ऑफ/रीसेट, फिर ऑन करें। हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि इन दोनों चरणों के बीच हमें आगे बढ़ने की अनुमति
Apollo 8, Houston. Looks like we'r
रॉजर। ओवरहेड डंप वाल्व, बंद। हालांकि, शायद जिम की बा
좋습니다. 10, /: 45597, -040, +157, +35186, -01512, -00520 180 007 000, 노벰버 알파, +00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253; 전갈자리 델타, 아래 069, 왼쪽 45, +0748, -16500 12994 36300; 주성 시리우스, 부성 리겔, 129 155 010; 4
Roger, 11. Copiamo la tua descrizione. Mi risulta che vedi
E
Хорошо, Фред. Мы копируем твой старый добрый друг, Battery 2. Не мог бы ты на некоторое время обеспечить нам высокую скоро
Roger, Buzz. Die jetzige Ausgangslage ist günstig für den Anfang. Wir wären damit zufrieden. Deaktiviert bitte die Quadcopter Charlie und Delta; wir warten dann etwa 5 bis 10 Minuten und stellen anschl
"- - When DELTA-VX equal to the final DELTA-VX," scratch t
وقالت السيدة روبرت غودارد اليوم إن زوجها كان سيشعر بسعادة غامرة. "لم يكن ليصرخ أو يفعل أي شيء، بل كان سيشعّ فرحًا". وأضافت: "كان ذلك حلمه، إرسال صاروخ إلى القمر". كان لدى الناس حول العالم أسباب كثيرة للفرح بمهمة أبولو 11. فقد أفادت الشرطة الإيطالية أن ليلة الأحد كانت الأقل جريمة هذا العام. وفي لندن، ربح صبي راهن بخمسة دو
Роджер. Зона 11-DELTA ΔT ноль. GMTRC 01 день 07 48 58. RET 400 K, 15+26. Зона 12-DELTA: ΔV 96. ΔT 2+05. GMTRC 01 день,
In the beginning, the operation with the precluded immediate starting up of our sightings as we had scheduled since we had another evasive maneuver. The dumping of the caused a tremendous amount of - of pseudo stars in the area which made an optics calibration practically impossible. The method which we had worked out did not seem to work too w
È il 
Okay, Apollo 8. The next portion of our test is like we did yesterday; We'l
スキャナーライトが当たると、一気に下降してしまいます
Okay. Du willst also mit Schritt 31 bis Schritt 7
Ja. Die A
네, 저도 알아챘습니다. 전에는 
11, Хьюстон. Похоже, в ближайшие пару часов здесь будет довольно спокойно. Мы, конечно же, вышлем вам PAD примерно на следующем REV и будем держать вас в курсе. Похоже, время в пути минимальное. Конец связи
さあ、ハワイ
Okay. Wir 
Let's give that stub antenna a try. If you d
Верно. Н
D'accord. En ce qui concerne le module de co
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. Com Tech Canton. Fuel 90-100 [percent], oxygen 73-101 [perce
YAW 2
لا يزال موجودًا. أنظر إليه الآن. أستطيع أن أرى الشمس خلفي مباشرةً، ثم تظهر كل هذه النقاط المتلألئة. نعم. يبدو الأمر كما لو أنني في منتصف مجرة ​​درب التبانة. هناك آلاف النقاط المتلألئة الصغي
最後の言葉をもう一度言ってくだ
좋아요, 알겠습니다. 그 시점에 도달하면 컴퓨터가 정확한 위치를 알려주지 못할 경우를 대비해 축각과 회전축각이 일치하는 별들을 백
알겠습니다, 짐. 39초 동안 초당 19.3피트의 속
Nous aimerions 
D'accord. Mon seul souci concernant le fait de laisser le et/ou le dans le module de commande est de savoir combien de temps nous devr
ジャック、あなたは今影の中にいます
Mal sehen, haben wir alles auf dieser C
هل تشعر بالا
ठीक है। हम ASCENT ECA CONTROL के बारे में आपकी बात मान लेत
経過時間約47
Sotto, cancella "Controllo del veicol
Roger. Nou
नीचे की ओर दिख रहा अगला क्रेटर ड्यूक द्वीप है, और बाईं ओर, तस्वीर के केंद्र के पास स्थित सबसे बड़ा क्रेटर मास्केलीन डब्ल्यू है। यह लगभग 3 मिनट और 39 सेकंड पर उतरने के दौरान की गई स्थिति की जाँच है, और लैंडिंग रडार प्राप्त करन
Я не знаю, какой именно. Да
シグマ・セブ
आगे बढ़ो ह्यूस्टन
好的。我猜它的速度
你的海拔高度
Puoi 
هذا سيجما سفن. على تردد HF. هذا سيجما سفن. على تردد HF. سأقوم بعدّ قصير. هذا للتحقق من تغطية HF ع
You might check that for us but that seems to be a rather late change and that's the configuration th
En regardant à l'étranger, on constate que la première autoroute de Corée du Sud, reliant Séoul au port d'Incheon, a été baptisée « Autoroute Apollo » en hommage à votre voyage. Je crois que nous avons mentionné hier soir que le président Nixon a déjà entamé son tour du monde et qu'il se trouve aujourd'hui à San Francisco, première étape de son périple. Il se rendra ensuite à bord de l'USS Hornet, d'où il assistera au retour de votre vaisseau spatial. Il prévoit de visiter sept pays, dont la Roumanie, au cours de ce voyage. Comme vous le savez sans dou
На этом, пожалуй, все мировые и национальные новости и 
I'm saying all of them look clean again. I guess they've fired so clean that they don't seem to... at all.... different color,... copper, bronze, color of the oxygen cell. They've been fired because I watched them fire. Okay.
Houston, Columbia. Copia il SOSTAN
Okay. You guys just tell me what sort of 
Okay. Ich lese sie hier zuerst schnell vor, damit Sie einen allgemeinen Überblick bekommen. Landeplatz, JETT-Lage des Servicemoduls, Mondbeobachtungslage, Sonnenbeobachtungslage und JETT-Lage. Die Landeplätze geben die groben Anflugwinkel für die Lage während der Mond- und Sonnenbeobachtung, die gr
了解。計画は立てま
ठीक है, बिल। इस बार हम इस संगीत को एक
Roger. Leave them on there probab
了解しました。アンテナ選択スイッチが「アダプタ」になっていることを確認してください。以上で
Roger. We will start out with the world news. praise for America's Apollo 8 astronauts and hopes for international cooperation in space exploration with the worldwide Christmas Eve messages as the tiny spaceship orbited the moon. Even in the Communist world, there was enthusiasm for man's first voyage to the moon. In Moscow, Soviet scientist Anatoly Besaranov recalled his country and the United States had shared space knowledge before and predicted the Apollo 8 flight would lead to more cooperation. In Cuba, Radio Havana rebroadcast the Voice of America program to tell its listeners of the Apollo 8 speech. Voice officials said it was the first time that any of the U.S. agencies' programs had been carried by Havana radio. Czechoslovakia saw the moon flight through extensive television coverage; and in Budapest, Hungary, people talk of little else on the trains and buses. In the non-Communist world, office workers and Christmas shoppers held their breath as the spacecraft was readied for the blast toward earth. Frenchmen in the street praised American knowhow and the space 
В данный момент текст слабый и неразборчивый. Но я буду передавать вслепую. Пожалуйста, убедитесь, что ли
Beh, non abbiamo problemi quassù per quanto riguarda l'imbardata. Tutto bene. È più veloce di quanto avessimo impostato prima. Volevamo solo entrare nel giusto
روجر. لدي فرق ملحوظ بين فولتية البطارية على الطرفين 5 و6؛ الطرف 6 يُظهر قراءة 33.5 فولت، بينما الطرف 5 يُظهر قراءة 36.5
Gemelli 4, ti leggo debole. Ho un nuovo aggiornamento 6-4 senza 
Das war reines Glück (Gelächter)
وباز، ما زلنا لا نتلقى أي بيانات من تخطيط القلب الكهربائي الخاص بك. يبدو أن الطريقة الوحيدة للحص
Friendship Seven. This is Canton Cap Com. All systems on the ground appear go. Your 150 volt-amp inverter temperature is presently 188° repeat 188°. Your clocks are in s
ठीक है। मैं बस आपको इस बात से अवगत कराना चाहता था और इस पर विचार करना चाहता था कि उड़ान योजना पर इसके क्या प्रभाव पड़ सकते हैं। मैं इस वाइड एंगल वीडियो को चलाकर चंद्रमा के बारे में टिप्पणी करूँगा और देखूँगा कि उनके अनुसार कौन से खंड सबसे उपयुक्त होंगे। ठीक है। स्क्रॉल पर, फ्रैंक चाहते थे कि हम प्रवेश प्रोफ़ाइल के क्रम की पुष्टि करें, और जो पहली प्रोफ़ाइल दिखाई देगी, उसे "न
Bene. E per quanto riguarda il tracciamento che abbiamo ora, sembra che il tempo che ti abbiamo dato ieri sera per il pericinzio sia ancora buono, 69 più 10 e in questo momento l'altitudine del tuo sorvolo terrestre del pericinzio è di 65,8. Se
好的，
罗杰。我也是，巴兹。还有，11，你的角度是：滚转 197
What would that take to use... use the command module or what? To loa
ر
और कृपया अपने डेल्टा-पी विमान के बारे में भी बताएं, जो 53 घंटे की उड़ान योजना में शामिल था। आपने उसे कितने तापमान पर उता
Je pense que nous allon
フレッドは今、光学装置を覗いています。これはプラットフォームの位置合わせを
Хьюсто
Roger. Je vais relire
收到。从
ええ、本
13, Houston. We need OMNI Charlie, plea
يمين
And under row 4, under SYSTEMS A/B-2, QUAD HEATER
ح
Sie sind bereit. Berei
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। अगर आप सुनना चाहें तो मेरे पास आपके लिए 
バズは頑張っていると思うよ。その
Ciao, 13; Houston. Forte e chiaro. 13, Houst
Sembra piutto
حسنً
ジョー、S バンド アンテナの近くの側面に、大量の破片がぶら下がっているように
Okay. I'll just give you - I think it'll be easier to give you what I got in. Okay, in the top row on 11, we have the four AC BUS TIE breakers IN and the AC BUS VOLTS breaker IN, and that's it. Second row, we have the four TCA breakers IN. We have the GASTA under FLIGHT DISPLAYS and CO
알겠습니다. 제가 이해하기
धन्यवाद
好的，休斯顿。基于负MA值解算，我得到冲击点经度为-160.95。我调整了偏差，得到冲击点纬度-经度为163.75。我想把冲击点向东偏移30度，并尝试确定实现这一目标所需的燃烧参数，最终得到X轴燃烧值为-11.6，
Ve
シグマ・セブン、こんにちは。シグマ・セブン、こちらはカル・キャップ・コム、カル・キャップ・コムです。ブラインド放送です。受信機に停電が発生しました。ブラインド放送です。逆シーケンスのために時計をリセットしてください。これは前回の読み出し時の時計の誤差を考慮した値です。前回の報告では27秒に設定されていましたが、前回の確認では33秒になっているはずです。ケ
D'accord. Fred va descendre et tenter de se glisser sous le poste 
Apollo 11, Houston. Ich habe gerade einige der Transkripte von heute Morgen gelesen, die sich mit unserem vorherigen Versuch befassen. Als Sie die Eingabetaste drückten und zweimal Enter drückten, ging es plötzlich los. Ich glaube, wir haben dazu 
أنا آسف. هذا قائد الطائرة. لقد... 
Roger, Houston. What we're going to do is, we're going to get rid of Fred's suit here.
आ
Sembra prop
Okay, Fred. Ich möchte dir kurz ein paar Dinge erklären, die wir in den nächsten Stunden erledigen wollen. Um eine gute Kommunikation zu gewährleisten und dir ein paar Minuten Zeit für die Entfernungsmessung zu geben, bitte ich dich, den Leistungsverstärker-Leistungsschalter in Feld 16
Oui, monsieur, ça a l'air bien, Wally. On se revoit dans l'Es
아
高度計が作動するまで待機しています。ケープ、聞こえますか？高度計が作動しました。高度100フィート（約1,000フィート）、降下率は低下傾向、客室気圧は…
最後の部分は、「125」を消して「1/
Okay. Bruce, ci stiamo avvicinando all'attività dell'accumulatore d'acqua, e sta salendo fino a 0,85, oh, circa 0,95 e lì ha raggiunto un picco e poi è gradualmente sceso fino a 0,6 ora, 0,4, e sembra che si sia stabilizzato di nuovo a 0
Donnez-nous juste l'heure, s'il vous plaît, on veut juste savoir quand c'est. J'
그리고 물병자리 여러분, 이
Aurora Seven, Kano. Per vostra informazione, 
D'accord. Je crois avoir compris que vous étiez prêt. J'avais oublié… les écouteurs. Il suffit de sortir une deuxième paire de cartouches du module de commande, de coller une bande de ruban adhésif gris (face collante vers l'extérieur) sur les côtés de chaque nouvelle cartouche, près du haut, de découper quatre carrés de carton d'environ 5 à 7 cm de côté, de les plier à angle dro
Ruhe bewahren, Houston. Falls noch nicht geschehen, können
बिल्कुल सही। वे किसी और अक्ष पर घूम रह
Хорошо. Отсюда они все выглядят 
Gemini VI, Houston, 
Теперь у нас 12 игроков впереди. 1 сп
يا برج الدلو، عند مقارنة تقديراتنا الأولية لاستخدام المياه واستخدام الطاقة الكهربائية، يبدو أننا دقيقون تمامًا فيما يتعلق باستخدام ا
그리고, s를 위한 공간이 필요하죠. 그래서, 이... 슈트 밸브를 가져와서... 거기에 넣
Gemini
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。请停止B电池充电，开
بدأ التسجيل. لدينا برنامج ل
Я понимаю, я понимаю, что время вашей ретросеквенции зак
D'accord. Nous allons y jeter un œil. S'il n'y a rien qui ait été enregistré précédemment en basse résolution, nous reviendrons dess
Andare 
로저. 정렬 상태는 변경 없음
Компьютер — ПРЕДЗАПУСК. Высокая часто
Ok, Jack. Lo riceviamo. Esatto, e lo aggiungerò alla nostra 
And we didn't get any crew status report from you this 
好的。现在开始睡前检查清单。关于船员状态报告，就用药情况而言，我们没有服用任何药物。我们感觉都很好。我已经把船上的读数都给你了。吉姆
Well, that's 
わかりました。この姿勢を離れる前に、74時間半単位ベク
알겠습니다, 조. 이참에 지금 이 부분을 연습해 볼 겸, 비상 계획서 32, 33, 34페이지에 대한 업데이트를 해드리는 게 좋겠다 싶
로저. 해당 마크를 수락하지 마십시오. 트러니언 바이어스 검사를 건너뛰었기 때문에 해당 레지스터에 여전히 큰 숫자가 남아 있습니다. 트러니언 바이어스 검사를 완료한 후에 진행하십시오. 
Okay, mal sehen, ob ich's richtig verstanden habe. Schritt 2: „BALANCE COUPLE AUS; DEFEKTBAND, MIN; LAGEKONTROLLE: PITCH und YAW IM 
Apollo 8, Houston. We are monitoring your temperatures. The quads all look good.
Ich kann die Buchstaben auf der Lukenabdeckung lesen. Es handelt sich um eine Entriegelung für die Ladeklappe; und der große gelbe Pfeil, der auf die Öffnung zeigt, ist die Stelle, an der Werkz
D'accord, vous avez le temps pour la brûlure; NOUN 81 était plus 0,1, plus 1,2, p
アクエリアス、
لن أضع القفص حتى أتخلص من البالون، وبعد ذلك يمكنني البدء في انحراف بطيء إلى
And, 13, Houston. If you would like, we can let you know ab
हम यह सत्यापित करना चाहते हैं कि आप लंबे समय से चल रहे उपचार के चरण से बाहर निकलकर
रॉजर, हम ऑनबोर्ड टेप रिकॉर्डर पर
ええ
カ
जैसा कि आप शायद जानते हैं, हमारे पास आगे की प्रक्रियाओं पर काम करने वाले कई समूह हैं। एक समूह मध्य-मार्ग सुधारों पर काम कर रहा है ताकि सिस्टम, उसकी स्थिति, उसे कैसे करना है, संरेखण तकनीकें आदि निर्धारित की जा सकें। एक समूह प्रवेश पर काम कर रहा है, जिसमें यह भी शामिल है कि हम इसे कब और कैसे सक्रिय करेंगे। एक समूह सिस्टम की स्थिति पर काम कर रहा है, और कुछ घंटों में - कल बाद में, जैसा कि हम देख रहे हैं, हम कुछ आधार कॉन्फ़िगरेशन पर जाएंगे और मुख्य बस बी की जाँच करेंगे। अभी संचार थोड़ा खराब है, और मैं आपकी बात ठीक से नहीं सुन पा रहा हूँ। लेकिन मैं आपको यहाँ की
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। अब हम संचार जाँच के लिए तैयार हैं, और यह आपकी मर्ज़ी है। हम आपको स्विच बता सकते हैं और आप उन्हें चालू कर सकते हैं, या हम
روجر. الضوء يعمل بشكل جيد. لا أستطيع تحديد المسافة بيني وبينه بدقة. أعتقد
Хорошо. Прежде чем начать копирование, поясню: эта процедура в основном заключается в
Okay. Houston, Apollo 8. Avremmo do
- - 저희가 사용하는 절차는 여러 곳에 명시되어 
分かりました。排気口について何か教え
Мы сейчас над этим работае
Friendship 7, Muchea Cap Com. Empfehlen Sie UH
罗杰，
Ok. Vorrei scattare qualche foto
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Wir
الآن، يسطع ضوء النهار على جانب جيم، ومن جانبي ما زلت أستطيع تمييز بعض النجوم. يبدو أنه بالإمكان توجيه المركبة الفضائية بحيث يكون أحد جانبيها مظلمًا، بينما الجانب الآخر مضاء بنور النهار. جانب جيم مضاء بنور النهار تمامًا الآن، بينما جانبي في الظلام. هذا من أكثر الأمور التي أدهشتني في بداية الرحل
罗杰，我们
जिम, बैटरी की समस्या के बारे में, हमने पता लगा लिया है कि यह ओवरकरंट या रिवर्स करंट की वजह से नहीं है। हमें शक है कि यह तापमान ज़्यादा होने की व
まあ、あまり役に立たないですね。いつも役に立たないように見えます。太陽の位置によっては、中心を横切るような帯状の模様が現れます。排水粒子のせいで
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。君の声が全く聞こえない。ダウン
저는 OMNI B에 남을
Un dixième, maintenant c'est moins un di
阿波罗8
Go ahead, Hou
Да, температура поднимется до 45-
روجر. في الساعة 21:50، لدينا مدى يبلغ 22.24
我现在正望着星空。天空并不像想象中那么黑暗——它很亮，但并非完全漆黑。这扇窗户似乎
了解しました。RCSの使用に
Gemini VI, Carnarvon CAP COM. Nous aurons bientôt la ligne de vue. Tout se passe bien sur le terrain. On 
ठीक है, अब हम 
Hawaii, Houston CA
Gémeaux 4, Carnarvon
Okay. Look it. Let's get the cameras squared away; let's get all set to burn. We got one ch
حسنًا، انتظر. سأضع هذا القلم جانبًا. أنا في وضعية الشمبانزي. الكبسولة تطير بشكل ممتاز. جميع المحركات تعمل بشكل جيد. مفتاح الجيروسكوب طبيعي. مفتاح المناورة مُطفأ. جميع الأنظمة تعمل بشك
好的。这样吧，我让杰克去配置一下。他可以把那些东西抄下来，然后我们一起去拿。稍
크고 또렷하게 들립
Sto bene. Pronto, torno indietro. Deve trattenermi (ritardarmi). La capsula... vorrei risolvere questo problema che ovviamente hai riscontrato sul circuito della tuta. Ho avuto pochissima for
네. +3195, -01267, +04716 179 008 001, 
Allez-y, Hous
わかりました、ジョー。ここに「-1A」という新しいページを作成しました。項目6「電源への転送」で、いつものように投光器が消灯していることと「注
Das stimmt. All
حسنًا يا فريد. إضافة واحدة، في الصف الثالث. مضخم طاقة النطاق S. أرجو منك فصل قاطع الدائرة الكه
حسناً. لقد تم تخزينها جميعاً. قم ب
حسنًا، ممتاز. التقطنا صورة جيدة لجيم هناك لدقيقة. لديّ منصة الإطلاق بلس ٨ يا فري
ठीक है। चेकलिस्ट के साथ आगे बढ़ो। मैं अब रेट्रोएटीट्यूड पर आ रहा हूँ और मेरा कंट्रोल मोड ऑटोमैटिक है और मेरा एटीट्यूड स्टैंडबाय पर है। एक मिनट रुको,
阿波罗8号，
ये कैसा लगा... (हंसी
好的。名词 61：纬度，-21.67，-165.37，1163.1，36292。回读一遍
Ok, Jim. Solo una sorta di introduzione alla procedura che useremo per la fase intermedia, che sarà un'accensione manuale. L'assetto sarà controllato manualmente; l'avvio/arresto del motore sarà controllato manualmente. Quindi ora abbiamo un vettore piuttosto preciso su di te, e a quanto pare stai procedendo in modo un po' troppo superficiale. Ciò significa che dovremo a
Ok. È ancora affermativo. Ti faremo pr
Bon
Houston, Apollo 8. Wir haben e
Vous faites du bon travail. L'image est vraiment stable. La netteté est excellente. Les c
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Ausweichmanöver G&N: 63481, plus 095, minus 020; 004 40 0100, plus 00051, plus alle Kugeln, plus 00190; Rollen ist Ihre Option, Nicken 213 357; ist nicht verfügbar; DELTA-VT ist 0019
Roge
Roger. Es ist die 41. Revolu
좋습니다. 아래쪽 메인 회로 상태는 여전히 매우 양호해 보이므로, 전반적으로 괜찮은 것 같습니다. 배터리 B 충전은 대략 이쯤에 완료될 것으로 예상되며,
フライバイ操作 / 62954、マイナス 162、プラス 129 953 578 - これらは 00953 とプラス 000578 - マイナス 02076 000 000 000、該当なし、プラス 00202、02356 022 02280 03 0393 310 013、上 048、右 35、プラス 1418、マイナス
Вы знаете, что это за
La risp
Roger, this is Friendship Seven. Fuel, 90-98 [percent]. Oxygen, 78-100 [percent]. Cabin pressure holding 5.6 at the present time. Have very little dirt floating around in the capsule, just a little bit and preferring to take xylose pill at present time. 
请稍等。我们目前对您的数据读取不够准确，所以我们会等到您获得
ठीक है। और अभी तो ऐसा लग रहा है... अभी तो ऐसा लग रहा है कि कमांड मॉड्यूल से हव
ジョ
Roger, Houston. -1 latitude moins 606269, longitude supérieure à 2, moins 78954, altitude plus 00152; pour -2 latitude moins 09638, longitude supérieure à 2, plus 81691, altitude moins 00007. J'ai essayé d'obtenir -3 au même passage, mais j'ai laissé tomber pour me pré
如果你觉得RCS有问题，就大声
Houston. La ventilati
つまり地平線がないということです
알았어, 잭. 내가 읽어보니, LMP는 약 6시간 동안 잠을 자야 해. 그 시간 동안 CDR과 CMP는 간단히 식사를 해야 하고. 나는 69시에 일어나. CDR과 CMP는 70시에 잠자리에 들고 76시에 일어나. 그리고 우리는 76시쯤에 작전을 수행할 계획이야. 78시 30분에는 연료를 적재하고 연료 라인을 연결할 거야. 두 번째 기동은 점화 시간에 맞춰 진행될 거야. 그리고
Это – это п
로저, 아폴로 8호입니다. 맞습니다. 그리고 +11점을
Hey, you got a couple up the
네, 알겠습니다. 감사하다는 말씀 감사합니다. 저희는 지금 여기서 온갖 새로운 절차들을 개발하느라 아주 즐겁게 일하고 있습니다, 프레드. 회의가 진행 중이고, 늦어도 토요일이나 일요일까지는 출입 절차를 마련해 드릴 수 있
Was ist so wichtig an diesen Müllha
نسخة
C'est exact. Nous souhaitons croiser les informations que nous recevons avec les vôtres afin de pouvoir, si possible, mettr
यह सकारात्मक है। मैं फिर से कहता हूँ, हमने प्लस X 
Vous ne l'av
يجب إغلاقه ا
D'accord. Je com
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह कैनरी सिस्टम्स है। आप कैसे पढ़ते हैं
أرى الآن شريط الأفق الأزرق العريض. ويبدو، في هذه اللحظة (بعد مرور 02:07:00 من وقت الكبسولة)، أن قطره يُقارب قطر الشمس أسفلها. ويبدو أن سمكه يُساوي قطر الشمس أسفلها. يصب
제미니 4호, RKV 
Roger. T
로저. 시스템 데이터 재생 결과를 검토했는데, 모든 것이 양호해 보입니다. 특히, 부분이 좋아 보입
क्या उन्होंने जैक को क
ヒューストン、ジェミニ4。どちらも取れませんでした。もう一度
...длинное окно. Окно с длинным... у кото
حسنًا، عند -30 ثانية، ستقوم بتجهيز المتفجرات، وعند -10 ثوانٍ، سأنتقل إلى خاصية الإرجا
Certo che si confondono parecchio, vero? Ma potrebbero ess
阿波罗8号，这里是休
わかりました、ジム。スーツ フロー コントロールを開いて、エンジン アーム - エンジン 
Roger. Nous vous avons vu apparaître à l'horizon et il s
Roger. We're getting near - we're going to need to dump some urine overboard here. I wonder if that's going to foul your trajectory up. Or can we go ahead and d
방금 전까지 B-2 고도에 있었습니다. 이제 B-3 고도에 접근 중입니다. 이때 기체를 약 10도 정도 아래로 내리겠습니다. 스캐너를 껐던 동안 발생했던 롤 오차가 사라졌습니다. 이제 재진입 냉각을 위해 우주복의 공기 흐름을 아주 조금 늘리겠습니다. 기수를 조금 더 낮출 수 있는지 확인해 보겠습니다. 자세는 거의 완벽합니다. 요(yaw)도 좋습니다. 피치는 약간 가파르게 내려갔습니다. 요 레티클은 야간 작업
Roger, je suis hors tension – toutes les lumières sont éteintes – il semble que je consomme environ 13 à 14 ampères
Droit
Мне кажется очень странным смотреть в окно со стороны Джима и видеть дневной свет, а в окно 
Хорошо. Далее, ниже, в поле «ПРОДОЛЖИТЬ», вставьте клавишу ENT
ジム、こちらは助手外科医のシェ
١١، نرجو منك التحويل إ
Roger.
――もう少し温かい方
はい、確かにそう
زمن المرحلة النهائية المنقضي: 1 + 29 + 17؛ زمن بدء الاحتراق: 5 + 16 + 54؛ دلتا-في: 33.0؛ المدة: 41 ثانية؛ النواة 25: 0
क्या आप चाहते
좋은 생각
了解。テープを捨てたら知らせてくれ。戻って追跡するよ
Okay. Hai intenzione di fare una chiamata su 
Nein, so stark habe ich den Geruch noch nie wahrgenommen. Wir haben echt Mist gebaut, als wir uns für diese Polsterung 
네, 11. 휴스턴입니다. 알겠습니다. EECOMM은 당신이 준비되는 대로 논리 순서 확인을 위해 이 중요한 순간을 간절히 
Alle 00:34:28, aumento la temperatura della valvola dell'acqua della cabina e della tuta a 6 [gradi]. La temperatura dello sfiat
أبولو 8، هي
Okay, Fred. Zunächst zu den Vorbereitungen, beginnend mit der Checkliste für Notfälle auf Seite 24. Wir empfehlen, dort zu beginnen, und freuen uns über Ihre Anmerkungen dazu. Zweitens: In der Brennposition sollte die Sonne ganz oben im Bild zu sehen sein. Sie teilt den Cursor, wenn dieser auf Nu
في رينو، نيفادا
Роджер. Принято, Нил. Базз верн
Okay. Wir wissen, dass Sie gestern Abend bei der Primärversion auf 15 umgeschaltet haben. Wir möchten heute bei 7.6 wechseln. L
了解、ビル。パ
I thought it went pretty well, Houston, although I expect I used more gas than I've been using in the simulator. The turnaround maneuver - I went PITCH ACCEL COMMAND and started to pitch up, and then when I put MANUAL ATTITUDE PITCH back to RATE COMMAND for some reason it -
また、あなたの軌道に関する新たな計算結
Roger. Verstand
È un orso entra
Okay. Your quad package temperatures range from 85 degrees to 44 degrees. Your injectors range from 44 degrees to 21; and your heat shield is well above i
Okay, Buster. Atteggiamento di rientro, cambio
Quad C è la temperatura 
我们已经开始提供一些时间信息了。我们认为很快就能提供更准确的信息。但看起来您的水质可以维持154小时，Takusan O2可以维持272
Pronti. Eagle, Houston. Il fuoco cald
Burning; we're looking go
रॉजर। मन पढ़न
わかった。（
Jack, Houston. Fang nochmal v
吉姆，休斯顿。你刚
In launch you have to be concerned abou
روجر، نيل. نلاحظ ارتفاعًا طفيفًا في درجة الحرارة في تجربة الرصد الزلزالي السلبي، وه
32 Fuß pro Sekunde vorwärts; 1,7 Fuß nach oben. Das sieht also gar nicht so schlecht au
로저. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 30분 보고입니다. 머리를 움직여도 메스꺼움이나 불편함은 전혀 없습니다. 태양을 최대한 가까이서 볼 수 있다는 게 놀랍습니다. 지금 태양이 제 얼굴에 직접 비추고 있는데, 눈썹으로 눈을 가리기만 하면 됩니다. 왼쪽 패널의 모든 퓨즈 스위치는 이전에 보고된 대로 정상입니다. 모드 선택은 정상(자동), 자이로 정상입니다. 스퀴브는 작동 준비 완료, 자동 역추진은 꺼져 있습니다. 수동 모드를 제외한 모든 "T" 핸들은 제 위치에 있으며, 수동 모드는 문제가 더 발생할 경우를 대비해 즉시 수동 모드로 전환할 수 있도록 당겨 놓았습니다. 구조 보조 장치는 정상입니다. 착륙 백은 꺼져 있습니다. 시퀀스 패널의 다른 모든 항목은 정상 위치에 있습니다. 제어 연료는 68~100%입니다. (반복, 68~100%). EPI는 대략적인 위치를 표시하고 있습
我们在阿波罗8号上也经历过类似的情况……当时休斯顿，老巴兹打开了指令舱加热器，然后就一直开着。激活器“嗖”的一声，两个燃料箱都启动了；我们没燃料了。速度非常慢……我们当时在控制台里开始汇报情况，但还是让指令舱继续运行，观察着它；结果这玩意儿跳了个跟跳，跳了个跟跳，从下面跳出来……但跳得不
Nicht wirklich, Jim. Es hat mit dieser W-Matrix zu tun. Du erinnerst dich, dass wir sie im Mondorbit neu initialisiert haben und dann 
Tutto questo... Dove l'hai ma
收
Noch nicht ganz, aber alles scheint in Ord
Aquarius, Houston. In regards to t
أبولو 11، هيوستن. هل يم
オーケー、アポロ8号。これで燃料
了解しました。発進誘導システムの推奨後、降下推進燃料ベントを開、降下推進酸化剤ベントを開、検証トークバックグレーを追加してください。以上
Gemelli 4, Houston
空军的D-9测试——由于其布局，运行起来很困难。不过，我们还是进行了几次测试，虽然顺序不同，
Könnten Sie feststellen, ob wir überhaupt eine Entleerung durchf
धुंध की परत के बीच में, फेक्डा दिखाई नहीं दे रहा है—मैं फोटोमीटर से भी इसकी रीडिंग नहीं ले पा रहा हूँ। फेक्डा अब क्षितिज के नीचे है, या लगभग 5 सेकंड पहले एक निश्चित बिंदु से नीचे था, अब यह धुंध की परत के सबसे चमकीले हिस्से से बाहर आ गया है। अब यह साफ़ दिखाई दे रहा है। वूमेरा, मेरी स्
Das ist richtig. Okay. Weiter: die nächste Kamera – Moment 1. Hier gibt es Rauschen. Okay. Die nächste Kamera ist die 16-mm-Kamera, und diese Fotos haben Priorität 3. Okay. Nehmen Sie di
Jack, it sounds good. I think from our position here, we k
Игл, Хьюстон. Эта грубая юстировка 
6.50도입니다. 그리고 짐, 휴스턴 씨. 마지막으로, 오늘 오후에 체크리스트와 일정표를 업데이트하는 데 약 한 시간 정도 걸릴 것으로 예상되니 참고해 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 모든 준비가 완료되려면 3~4시간 정도 소요될 것으로 예
11, Houston. Nous avons remarqué, lors de votre analyse du panneau 2 il y a un instant, que les deux boules 1 et 2 présentaient un léger désaccord. Le joueur de contr
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. أشعة الشمس 
Houston, wie lesen Sie? Hier spricht Apol
Roger. We're copying your progress. advises that it looks like you are finishing your first star, and we'll need one
Okay. Jack, im Moment können wir das nicht. Das Sonnenlicht wird von den Triebwerken reflektiert, und die Trümmerteile, die sich bei dem Zwischenfall gelöst haben, befinden sich immer noch in der
一般来说，在阴影里待一段时间似乎不会对防护服内部产生任何热效应。当然，辐射和头盔的情况有所不同。所以我认为在阴影
Ok. Capisco. La mia unica do
Ricevuto
네, 아시다시피 창문의 다른 위치로 고개를 돌리거나 다른 방향을 바라보면 보고 있는 것의 색깔을 바꿀 수
... مقياس الضغط فيما يتعلق بالضوضاء... احصل عل
يراقب جهاز المراقبة في المقصورة حاليًا ضغطًا يبلغ حو
روجر. هانتسفيل، هذا سيجما سفن. أسمعك بوضوح. هل لديك 
Okay. Wir beginnen mit Test Nummer 1. Könnten Sie bitte überprüfen, ob si
Oui. Nous vous enverrons les donnée
لقد
わかりました。レジスタ 1 に 27218 を加算し、レジスタ 2 に 35570 を加算し、レジスタ 3 に 33010 を加算します。狭いデッドバンドを復元するには、NOUN 01、ENTER、3011、ENTER、200 E
もう一つ、誰かに見てもらってもいいもの - 上の階の人たちに迷惑をかけたくないのですが - 司令船にある排水ホースを に接
نعم. حسناً. س
Bene. Quattro retro hanno sparato in AUTO RETROFIRE e 292, a pop
Zunächst einmal: Ich bin im automatischen Wiedereintrittsmodus; alles läuft auf Automatik; die Kreisel sind im Normalmodus; Manöver sind deaktiviert; alle Einstellungen sind auf Wiedereintritt ausgerichtet; der Bypass-S
Je vais rester OMNI B, si vous voulez reprendre le commandement et que vous pouvez vous charger de les faire tourner entre B et D. Et comb
D'accord. Nous somm
How far out do you think we were when we f
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन सीएपी कॉम। यदि आप पढ़ रहे हैं, तो केबिन का दबाव वापस सामान
Ricevuto. PAD di ingresso: l'area è il Pacifico centrale, rollio 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, latitudine più 1332, meno 16917, 064, 36194, 649, distanza da percorrere 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 00 28, DL max 154, 084, 22400, 18000, D0 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02, stella sestante 45 0189, 277, stella di puntamento, nessuna disponibile, vettore di risalita in alto. Commenti: allineamento, Vega e Deneb, rollio 078, beccheggio 223, imbardata 340. Commenti aggiuntivi: utilizzare uno schema di non uscita, meno 30, controllo dell'o
阿波罗8号
È... l'interruttore automatico si attiva s
わかりました。パネル5のCB POWER 1と2を「開」にします。次にPOWERスイッチをリセットして離します。パネル11と16
ヒューストン、アポロ8号がSバンドで放送中。聞こえれば、すべて
Houston, this is Apollo 8. We have a little piece of useful information if you're interested in deliberating 
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 
Je pense que lors de cette mission de suivi, en utilisant la carte du monde et la carte détaillée de la région du Caire-Alexandrie, nous avons pu repérer l'aéroport du Caire. Cependant
Unser Strom im heruntergefahrenen Zustand verbraucht knapp über 12 Ampere.
了解しました。それでは、この機動を続けて、ロール82度、ピッチ218度、ヨーゼロで、よろしければその姿勢でP52を
Роджер. ПАД. TIG из 125 19 3470; TI
11, H
Questo è tutto il gruppo. Abbiam
ترانكويليتي، هذه هيوستن. هذا حاسوبك. لقد تم ت
كواد دلتا 
Vous savez... costume.
هيوستن، أولئك الذين قالوا إننا لن نتمكن من تحديد موقعنا بدقة هم الفائزون اليوم. كنا منشغلين قليلاً بالقلق بشأن تنبيهات البرنامج وما شابه ذلك في الجزء من الهبوط ح
D'accord, Fred. On va essayer de ne plus t'appel
Roger. Keiner dieser Sterne wird genau zentriert sein, aber bei einem Neigungswinkel von 115° hatten wir berechnet, dass Wega, Altair, Rasalhague und Deneb alle im Sichtfeld des Teleskops liegen würden. Die ersten drei waren auch bei einem Neigun
Джим, мы хотели бы, чтобы ты подумал об этом режиме управления и оценил, насколько он может сработать, исходя из того, что ты знаешь сейчас. Мы немного скептически настроены, но хотим тебе это предложить. Итак, как только ты займешь достаточно хорошую позицию, следи за настройками, пе
Понял. А как сейчас обстоят дела с освещением внутри вашего
알겠습니다. 비
Roger. Riceviamo. Potresti darci il numero di telaio dell'ultima foto, per favo
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, अगर आप तैयार हैं, तो क्या
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन, हम हाई गेन पर आपको सिग्नल देन
Остановка измерения артериального давления. Хорошо, мы сейчас несколько раз попробуем скорректировать 
テープをダンプするには、
Okay. We're into the presleep checklist now. As far as the crew status report, as far as medication goes, we've had no medication. And we're all feeling really good. I've given you the onboard readouts. Jim is chlorinating the potable water now. I'm ready for an E-memor
Anche quello lo abbiamo osservato. Continu
روجر. الصعود 
لقد رأيت الكثير من شمال أفريقيا... في وضح النهار - أعرفها جيدًا. لقد أنهيتُ للتو مهمة D-9 أبولو لا
로저.
Roger. Nur aus Interesse für Bill: Wir möcht
休斯顿，哥伦比亚。能否至少单向启用从鹰城到哥伦比亚的S波
Okay. Dritte Reihe, öffnen Sie die nächsten fünf – Korrektur – öffnen Sie die ersten fünf auf der linken Seite, schließen Sie HEATER, schließen Sie SIG CONDITIONER 1. Schließen Sie ATTITUDE DIRECT und öffnen Sie den Rest in der dritten R
Мы можем предоставить вам угол наклона карданного подвеса в радиальном направлении, если это поможет. Он составляет
Jim, nous allons vous indiquer une position à adopter et vous recommander de maintenir votre FDAI élevé pendant la manœuvre. Une fois cette position atteinte, vous augmenterez la zone morte et passerez progressivement à
बज़ का मानना ​​है कि हमें कंप्यूटर में ए
روجر، هيوستن. هل يمكن
Хорошо. Мы завершили запись, и диктофон вернулся к вам. Вы можете использовать его как хотите. Возможно, нам понадобится сделать запись ещё раз, и если это пр
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, это Kano Com Tech, передаю сигнал в диапазоне
로저.
Why is the wide deadband on? Stand by. Is - Is Scorpi
Okay. And, Vance, did you ever have any /AOS times, and - and a startup time for us to
كما تعلمون على الأرجح، لدينا عدة فرق تعمل على الإجراءات من الآن فصاعدًا. لدينا فريق يعمل على تصحيحات المسار لتحديد النظام، والوضعيات، وكيفية القيام بذلك، وتقنيات المحاذاة، وما إلى ذلك. لدينا فريق يعمل على الدخول، بما في ذلك كيفية ووقت تفعيل النظام. لدينا فريق يعمل على حالة النظام، وفي غضون ساعات قليلة - غدًا، سننتقل، حسب ما نراه، إلى بعض التكوينات الأساسية وسنجري فحصًا للحافلة الرئيسية B. حاليًا، الاتصال ضعيف نوعًا ما، ولا أستطيع سماع ما ستقوله جيدًا. لكنني أردت فقط إطلاعكم على سير الأمور هنا. وتذكروا أنكم مسؤولون عن الهوا
알겠습니다. 좋습니
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。高利得アンテナではまだ受信できません。手動に切り替え、ビーム幅を広くしてください。チェックリスト
好的。我只是没看到A类产品出现同样
Stiamo seguendo la dieta OMNI D e abbiamo sentito dire che ti abbiamo perso dopo che la diet
Roger. Abbiamo finito con la Quantità let
了解。ドッキング解除の様子はテレビで放送しません。利用可能なウィンドウはすべて、顔かカメラで埋め尽くされていて、今は他の用事で忙しいんです
يبدو أنه أثناء إيقاف التشغيل (غير واضح)، ما زلنا نسحب أقل بقليل من 11 أمبير. لدينا 10 أمبير على المنفذ رقم 1 وأقل بقليل من 11 أمبير على المنفذ رقم 2. كان موقع الحبل - أو بالأحرى نقطة تثبيت الحبل السري على الفتحة الخارجية - يجعل القيام بأي نشاط خارج المركبة أمرًا صعبًا للغاية، نظرًا لديناميكية الهواء الناتجة عن الحبل الحر أمام المركبة الفضائية. كلما كنت أعمل في تلك المنطقة، كان الحبل - عند وصوله إلى نهايته - يدفعني للخلف، وتدفعني قوة رد الفعل لأعلى باتجاه المركبة الفضائية، ثم عائدًا نحو قسم المحول. لهذا السبب كنت أختفي عن الأنظار أثناء مناوراتي هناك فوق النوافذ، ثم أنجرف عائدًا نحو الجزء الخلفي من المركبة الفضائية. كان عليّ باستمرار أن أسحب نفسي للخروج إلى الجزء الأمامي من المركبة الفضائية. لم أكن راضيًا عن الصور التي كنت أحصل عليها. كان من الصعب نوعًا ما تثبيت أي من الحبال التي كنت أرتديها...
Ciao, Apollo 11. Qui Houston. Vi mostriamo l'arrivo del T
रॉजर, मेरे पास मैप का अपडेट है। यह GMT 10:17:49 बजे होगा। एसेंड
Роджер. Майк, когда ты некоторое время назад экспериментировал с этим, и мы снова уменьшили мертвую зо
Ok, Frank
يا إلهي، أنا آسف يا فريد. نحن لا نستطيع قراءتك الآن. ربما علينا الانتظار قل
Ok. In basso, hai "APERTURA PARACADUTE PRINCIPALE 10.000 piedi, pulsante di APERTURA PRINCIPALE, PREMERE entro 1 secondo". E dopo quest
Jim, puisque nous en parlons, je voudrais préciser une chose à Jack. Co
Okay, reach up a
Und man beachte, dass sich R
سيجما سفن، هذا كا
目前舱体运行良好。250（逆变器）温度为132度，150（逆变器）温度为……5。备用（逆变器）温度为120度……推进器
हो सकता है कि आप इसे गलत तर
Okay, Jack. Du kannst die Schalterkonfiguration einrichten. Wir besprechen, dass du die Motorschalter der Hauptbusverbindung etwas später aktivierst, um ihre Funktion zu überprüfen, da die Batterien wahrscheinlich etwas kühl werden. Wir melden uns mit einer genauen Anleitung und weiteren Erläuterungen, sobal
«Свобода С
好的，迪克。指令舱的所有窗户现在都积满了水。所以我不知道我们能拍出什么样的照片，但我会尽量把它们擦干净，然后用哈苏相机上的250毫米
في مكان أقرب قليلاً هنا، في ممفيس، تينيسي، أطلق والدا فتاة صغيرة، السيد والسيدة إيدي لي 
Hé, tu ferais peut-être mieux d'appeler Lou et de lui dire 
罗杰。金牛座，艾达；我重复一遍，金牛座，艾达。向上 162，向左 01，其余不适用。对齐天狼星，参宿七 129，155，010，负空隙，地平线窗口点火 -3 27 度，地平线向左。点火时，18 度，地平线向左；回读之前，配置接收任
Ce sont des étoiles filantes. On 
2, 4 대 1, 
Хорошо. "Проверьте автоматический выключатель ASA 16 в течение 10 минут"; и
罗杰。开始了：5，/ 45701，减 043，加 116，加 31171，减 00767，减 00214 180 017 001，NA，加 00188 31181 259 31003 40 2711 398 033，下 043，左 23，加 0832，减 16500，
هيا يا هيوستن. أبو
Roger. 
Très bien. Parfait. Nous chargeons actuellement la batterie A. Voulez-v
Das ist richtig. Damit sollte alles konfiguriert sein. Beachten Sie, dass der Leitungsschutzschalter in diesem Stromkreis den verfügbaren Strom auf 15 Ampere begrenzt. Wir sind aber zuversichtlich, dass wir damit einiges anfangen können. Die Versorgungsleitung wird unter Spannung stehen, und die Spannung des Hauptanschlusses kann über die Anzeige „Ha
Apollo 8, Houston. Abbiamo superato la vi
मुझे लगता है कि हम नंबर 9 पर जवाब देते हैं। लगभग उसी समय, मुझे लगता है, एस-II में नंबर 5 की लाइट जल गई थी, और एक तेज़ कंपन महसूस हुआ जो सामान्य एस-IV बर्न के दौरान होने वाले उच्च-आवृत्ति कंपन से कहीं अधिक था, और फिर लाइट जल गई। मैंने फोन करके समय देखा और पाया कि यह सुबह का समय था। फिर,
Нет, выглядит неплохо. Мы накопили немног
好的，吉姆。机动平台：目的是中段-7。是。不适用。HA 不适用。HP 为 +0020.
ヴァンス、君は興味があるかもしれな
알겠습니다. GMTB 15 43 23. ΔV 139. 연소 시간 - 2분 39초. 15 55 24. 왼쪽으로 55만큼 회전하세요. GMTRB 16 05 28. 오른쪽으로 65만큼 회전하세요. GMT 400 K 15 58 23. 기동 부하: 6344257, 0444775, 0533348, 664903.3, 67
Jim, this is CAP COM. You also might tell the Pilot when he
ケープ、
Ja. Das hier sollte Ihne
حسنًا. سأعطيك أرقام IVI. إنها 11 للأمام، 2 لليمين، 2 
Jim, qui è CAP COM. Potres
Okay. Ich glaube, ich habe gelesen, dass du bereit bist. Ach ja, Kopfhörer. Du brauchst dafür nur ein zweites Paar Kartuschen aus dem Kommandomodul. Dann klebst du an den Seiten jeder neuen Kartusche, nahe dem oberen Rand, einen Streifen Klebeband (das graue Klebeband mit der Klebeseite nach außen). Anschließend schneidest du ein Stück Pappe in vier Quadrate (ca. 5–7,5 cm Seitenlänge), biegst diese im rechten Winkel, um die Ecken zu stützen
حسناً يا تشارلي، شكراً لك. سنفعل ذلك 
Roger, Frank. Wir möchten euch über euren aktuellen Kurs informieren. Der geplante Mittelkurs erweist sich als sehr klein (0,7 Fuß pro Sekunde), und wir möchten ihn nicht durchführen. Unsere Daten sehen hervorragend aus, und die Hochrechnung zeigt, dass der vierte Mittelkurs in 8 Stunden vor dem Ziel etwa 4 Fuß pro Sekunde betragen würde. Derweil sieht die freie Rückkehrroute mit einem Auftreffpunkt vor der Küste Afrikas sehr gut aus. Ihr befindet euch also genau auf der alten 
That's affirmative. We'll give you the pad, be coming up here from in a couple of hours, I guess, when we stabilize out o
I had a very deep sleep and I woke up whe
제가
हाँ, मुझे लगता है आप सही कह रहे हैं। अरे वाह, आप तो साफ देख सकते हैं कि ये नीचे की ओर झुक रहा है। ज्यादातर जगहों पर - आप देख सकते हैं कि ये सब नीचे कोने में इकट्ठा हो गया है; मतलब किनारे पर - जहाँ से काफी सारा सफेद पदार्थ
Say again. You're br
15、16、17 では、オーロラのような効
ईगल, कोलं
Роджер, мы принимаем. Излучение 11005, 10006, 09007; без лекарств; 37.1, 37.1, 37.1, 82, 84, 85, 87. Конец связи
Actually, 
罗
Houston, Sie wurden herausgeschnitten. Könnten Sie bitte noch einmal etwas zum Heliumdruck sagen
Gyros are caged. I have about a 2-degree-per-second yaw 
Roge
VI, this is VII. I think it helpe
Okay, Houston. We cycled through the fans 2 minutes each, and we'll stand by for the call for battery
حسنًا. بالنسبة لبطاقة +35، التحديث الذي أريد تقديمه ل
ジェミニ
हां, हम शायद वहा
알겠습니다. 대기
ठीक है। मैं अब थोड़ी देर में थोड़ा ब्रेक लेना शुरू करूँगा क्योंकि हम 15,000 किलोमीटर पर हैं। हम 1
之
Хорошо. Сейчас идёт процесс зарядки аккумулятора, и идёт работа по сбросу сточных вод. 3-й этап отменён. Скорость должна была составлять 0,8 фута в секунду. 4-й этап теперь выглядит прим
هذا صحيح. سنق
네. 
Neil et Buzz, je vous parle au téléphone depuis le Salon Ovale de la Maison Blanche, et il s'agit sans aucun doute de l'appel téléphonique le plus historique jamais passé. Je ne saurais vous dire à quel point nous sommes tous fiers de ce que vous avez accompli pour chaque Américain. C'est assurément le jour dont nous sommes le plus fiers. Et je suis certain que le monde entier partage l'admiration des Américains pour cet exploit immense. Grâce à vous, les cieux font désormais partie intégrante du monde des hommes. Et tandis que vous nous parlez depuis la Mer de la Tranquillité, cela nous inspire à redoubler d'efforts pour apporter la paix et la sérénité sur Terre. Durant cet instant inestimable dans toute l'histoire 
प्लस 44, / 62970, माइनस 162, प्लस 129, प्लस 00197, प्लस सभी शून्य, प्लस 60701 180 133 001, प्लस 00203, प्लस 60701 704 60451 12 1375 349; पृथ्वी, नीचे 037, दाईं ओर 2.2, प्लस 1068, माइनस 165 12
الجوزاء 4، الكن
12.5くらいですね。ゲージの不具合だと思います… マスターアラームは鳴ったのに警告灯は点灯しませんでした。CO2が限界に近づいているからだろうとなんとな
了解。分かりました。気球の件ですが、マーキュリー・コン
Gemini 4, Houston. Können Sie un
好的，肯。我觉得这个方法挺好的；这是我们练习了很多次的。不过我们最好还是
わかりました。これは、先ほど述べたように、すべての降下用バッテリーがオンライン状態にあり、ASCENT BATTERY 6がNORMAL FEEDになっていることを前提としてい
حسنًا. نس
Avez-
13번, 휴스턴
Ora abbiamo circa 450 psi nel
حسنًا. ستكون السخانات الأربعة مغلقة؛ والشاشات مفتوحة؛ وهوائي النطاق S مغلق؛ وتسلسل الكاميرا مفتوح؛ والشاشة مفتوحة؛ وفولت ناقل التيار المستمر مغلق؛ والعاكس 2 مفتوح؛ ووحدة التحكم الإلكترونية للصعود مغلقة، ولكن وحدة التحكم الإلكترونية للصعود مفتوحة؛ ووحدة التحكم الإلكترونية للهبوط مغلقة؛ ووحدة التحكم الإلكترونية للهبوط مغلق
396 033, 아래 054, 왼쪽
Questo è il riquad
Yes, I think it'd probably be best, since we've done burn, to put it back over the instrument panel instead of putting it up over the on the recharge station. Would you care to comment on that one? We could do either
Хорошо, Хьюсто
로저. 지금 보고 계신 것은 우리가 왼쪽 창으로 보는 지구의 절반 정도입니다. 동태평양이 보이고, 화면 위쪽 절반의 북쪽에는 북미 대륙, 
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। पीछे तक साफ दिखाई दे रहा है; दूर तक केप की ओर बादलों का एक बड़ा समूह छाया
Okay. Ich habe es nicht eilig. Es sah so aus, als ob der Wert zwischen 0,14 und 0,8 lag, mit gelegentlichen Sp
سأبقى هنا على
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 심플렉스 알파 VHF 점검 
我会等到气球消失后再进行笼
We had a pitch-up at fairing jettis
Okay. Lassen Sie den Schalter Ihres Leistungsverstärkers auf PRIMARY anstatt AUS und stellen Sie den Rangierschalter auf RANGE anstatt AU
Oh là là! Je ne s
Там внизу деревья и лес; похоже на деревья и лес или что-то в этом роде. Похоже на снег и деревья. Фан
낮춰서 말하는 백업이나 그런 
フランク、もう既に言われてるかもしれないけど、今日のテレビ、すごく素敵だったよ。でも、ちょっとだけ家庭的なことがあってね。エル・ラーゴ地区ではサンタクロースに主役を奪われちゃった。サンタ
Jims Seite zeigt sich wieder im Tageslicht, und ich habe wieder sehr gute Sterne auf meiner Seite. Ich sehe gerade den Adler direkt vor mir. Es sieht so aus, als könnte ich Sterne bis zur fünften Größenkl
روجر. من بين العناوين الرئيسية المتعلقة ببرنامج أ
Affermativo. Area 3 Echo, Area 3 Echo è 4 ore, 22 minu
Quel est le problème? Le capteu
Roger. Houston, hier spricht Apollo 8. Was die Kontrollpunktverfolgung angeht – ich habe es geschafft, gleichzeitig mit der -2-Markierung bei dieser Umdrehung nach einer -1 zu suchen. Ich habe zwei Markierungen gefunden, die genauso klein, aber deutlich besser erkennbar sind als die vorgegebenen. Ich weiß, dass ich den Vorgang wiederholen und bei der nächsten Umdrehung denselb
सिग
Okay, ich habe keine DCS-Leuchte erhalt
さあ。トミー・ジェイコブスに続いて、地元ヒューストンの占星術師、ルビー・グラハムさんから、とびきりホットな言葉をいただきました。彼女は、あなたの月への旅はすべての星座が順調だと言っています。ニールは賢く、マイクは判断力があり、バズは複雑な問題を解決できます。また、ニールは世界をバラ色の眼鏡で見る傾向がありますが、苦しんでいる人や困っている人をいつでも助ける用意があるとも言っています。ニール、あなたは「感情を込めて人生を解釈できる直感」を持っていると言われています。バズは優れた批判力に加えて、とても社交的で孤独に耐えられないと言われています。彼女はマイクが何時に生まれたのか知らなかったので、マイクはニールと同じ性質を持っている
Джек, ваши правила эксплуатации каюты еще не отработаны, но сейчас вам нужно снова открыть вентиляционное отверстие для отвода отходов, и мы изменим время его закрытия на необходимое дл
قلها 
هذا صحيح. اضبط
عندما يصبح الأمر صعباً للغاية عند القيام بذلك بهذه الطريقة، فإننا ببساطة نغير المس
Regardez maintenant dans le cran d'arrêt arrière. All
好的。开始了。目的是进行中途修正以实现自由返回：-0021.3，+0004.1，-0031.2；HA 和 HP 不适用；DELTA-V 0038.0；031，120，298，-00213，
입력은 다음
아폴로 13호, 휴스턴발 과
わかりました。データは良さそうです。ええ、少し危
Roger. Es sieht so aus, als müsste ich noch ein paar kleinere Manöver durchführen, um nicht ganz an der Front zu landen, so wie es jetzt aussieht. Soll ich die mit u
Roger. Ora sei fort
これまで、私に助けを求める必要は一度もありませんで
Ро
埃德，你有血
Okay. Jetzt zu Schalttafel 8: Ich muss Ihnen die Anzahl der zu öffnenden Leistungsschalter vorlesen. Beginnen Sie mit Schalttafel 8, alle bis auf die beiden geöffneten CM/HEATERS und FLOAT B
حسنًا، لدي تحدي
Okay. Was
Ещё один момент, который следует учесть специалис
こんにちは、カントンコムテックです。オーロラセブンがは
로저. 쿼드 에이블 헬륨 탱크 온도가 아주 약간 떨어졌고, 지금은 상당히 양호
我能看
Du hast jetzt 83 Stunde
Ah! Da ist e
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Что касается сравнения: используя векторы, мы получаем минус 1,4 на средней траектории по сравнению с вашими 2,8. Мы обработали ваши решения на нашем компьютере и также получили 2,8, так что ваши результаты выглядят неплохо. Мы все еще работаем над векторами и с
13, Hous
نعم. أعتقد أن المشكلة تكمن في أن طولي حوالي قدمين، ولا ينخفض ​​إلى أقل من
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हम एएफटी ओम्नी से संपर्क करना चाहते हैं, और ट्रैकिंग स्थापित करने के प्रयास में लगभग एक मिनट के लिए आपसे संपर्क टूट जाएगा। हमारे नवीनतम डेटा 
Roger. I'm preparing to eat meal 3
Ich will nicht einfach planlos durch den Himmel rasen und hohe Strahlungsraten erzielen, denn ich habe nichts, woran ich die Raten ausgleichen könnte, bis die Erde wieder sichtbar ist. Sobald ich die Erde im Blick habe, gibt es keine Belastung mehr für die Strahlungsraten. Zumindest in diesem Bereich d
Roger, la risposta è a
로저. 33-1 39 전방 1+04. 120 후방 2+30. GM
Привет, Джек, у меня один 
ठीक है। आखिरी 4-आखिरी 5 के लिए, सीएलए में फिलहाल रिवर्स बैंक टाइम उपलब
Und du manövrie
जेमिनी VIII, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हमें 
بالضبط ع
应该
Okay, Houston. The CMP will
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات لوصف نجاحكم. من المقرر أن يشاهد الرئيس نيكسون الليلة مباراة البيسبول في واشنطن. بعد المباراة، سيتوجه إلى منطقة عمليات الإنقاذ في المحيط الهادئ. مساء الأربعاء، سينتقل من جزيرة جونستون بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى سفينة الاتصالات البحرية أرلينغتون. ثم صباح الخميس، سيعود إلى الطائرة الهليكوبتر ويتجه إلى حاملة الطائرات هورنت في الوقت المناسب لمشاهدة هبوطكم في المحيط. سيرافق الرئيس وزير الخارجية ويليام روجرز وفرانك بورمان. سيشاهدون الهبوط من على متن سفينة الإنقاذ مع الأدميرال جون سيدني ماكين الابن، قائد قوات المحيط الهادئ. بعد إقامة الرئيس على متن هورنت، سينطلق في جولته الآسيوية وزيارته المقررة إلى رومانيا. يُعتقد أن المركبة لونا 15 قد تحطمت في بحر الأزمات أمس بعد أن دارت حول القمر 52 مرة. وذكرت وكالة الأنباء السوفيتية تاس أنه تم إجراء "أبحاث علمية" في الفضاء القريب من القمر. وقال السير برنارد لوفيل من مرصد جودريل بانك 
RKV Medical Data Pass no. 1 at G.m.t. 02 17 43 for the Pilot. Request that the Pilot have the temperature probe in his mouth 3 minutes before acquisition. Also have the voice update for recovery area 9-3 through 13-2 and 8-Charlie through 12-BRAVO. D-8 experiment at G.m.t. 02 30 59. Command Pilot sleeping period begins at the same time. MSC E
Роджер. Прежде чем Билл уснет, мы хотели бы попросить его в люб
J'ai dormi profondément et je me suis réveillé quand le... est passé de deux à un, puis je l'ai remis à deux et je me suis rendormi pendant au moins deux heures et demie. Je
Are you ready, VII
Ha, ha. I suppose an old song "Drifting and Dreamin
Bei
حسنًا، لنبدأ. إيقاف تشغيل الطاقة الإلكترونية... اللوحة 8. إيقاف تشغيل جميع المفاتيح الستة عشر. إيقاف تشغيل الإضاءة الرقمية الداخلية؛ إيقاف تشغيل الإضاءة الداخلية المتكاملة؛ إيقاف تشغيل الإضاءة الداخلية الكاشفة. المنطق، اثنان، لأسفل ثم إيقاف التشغيل. ذراع الألعاب النارية، لأسفل ثم إيقاف التشغ
Je ne crois pas, Jack. Si jamais vous arrivez
Roger. Ça me paraît une bonne idée, Jim. Pourqu
はっきりと5を読み上げます。これらの追跡パスを記録するために、低ビットデータをコ
Well, you know, that's not what you expected it to be. I -- I don't have the lens on ri
E, Odyssey, Houston. Vi inviamo a
Okay. Es gibt nicht viel Neues. Also, fangen wir mit Sport an, warum nicht? Die Astros haben 8:7 gewonnen, die Braves haben fünf oder sechs Runs im neunten Inning erzielt, aber es hat gerade noch so geklappt; und im anderen wichtigen Spiel des Tages fiel das Spiel der Cubs wegen Regens aus. Ich habe alle anderen Ergebnisse, sag Bescheid, wenn du welche brauchst. In Manila und anderen 
알겠습니다
はい。4つのCRYOヒーターはすべてAUTOです。そして、4つのCRYOファ
لا يزال موجودًا. أنظر إليه الآن. أستطيع أن أرى الشمس خ
Houston, Eagle. Completed gear 
हे
Jetzt ist es ganz klar. Ich verstehe, dass das Update vom 6.4. um 00:09:30 Uhr, 5+18, erfolgte. Die letzte
روجر، هذه فريندشيب سفن. هل أنت م
मैंने तो अपना मामला दर्ज नहीं कराया। औ
汤姆，这跟卡纳冯教你的那套简易战术没变。你记住了
로저, 내가 시간
休斯顿，你们听着
حسنًا يا باز، سأضط
I'd like to comment a little on the sextant. Its use in a cramped spacecraft is very difficult, particularly with the helmet on. I finally decided it was going to be useless with your helmet on to try to take the angles that the stars, that were being called for, required. So I took my helmet off. This gave me a little more flexibility in using it, but still I was limited to angles of about 20 to 23° without maneuvering the spacecraft. What would happen is the star would be cut out by the upper part of the window. Now, by more frequent and liberal maneuvering of the spacecraft you could maneuver it so that you have the long axis of the window in your tracking plane. We were somewhat limited by fuel and we didn't choose to maneuver in this manner. We used Pulse Mode, too, without a lot of maneuvers. The stars that were selected for that run wer
D'accord, Houston; 13. En réponse à la question 1, les changements de niveau sonore se sont produits principalement entre le premier étage et les autres étages - les autres étages étaient à peu près au même niveau sonore, très silencieux, le premier étage, bien sûr, faisant pas mal de bruit au début, mais - qui s'est accumulé pendant le Q élevé, puis... est devenu silencieux juste après le Q élevé
D'accord. On lit 3 g, je pense qu'il va falloir laisser tomber le contrôle d'amortissement de rentrée cette fois-ci. On lit maintenant 4 g. La rentrée semble se dérouler correctement. Les vitesses affichées semblent être bien gérées par l'amortisseur auxiliaire. Je ne pense pas osciller beaucoup; on dirait que je roule juste autour de cette lueur, le ciel derrière. Le niveau de carburant est toujours à 14 % à 6,5 g. Les vitesses se maintiennent à 1,5 degré par seconde près, ce qui indique une vitesse de roulis d'environ 10 degrés par seconde. Le pic était toujours à 6,8 g. La lueur orange a disparu. On est sortis du pic de g. Le niveau de carburant est toujours à 14 %; retour à 5
Джим, ты как раз эти
Roger. We'd like to have you to put it in REACQ, and monitor. 
जी हाँ। प
알겠습니다. 잠시
ठीक है। अब चरण 3, सुधार, पृष्ठ 3, चेकआउट पर आगे बढ़ते हैं। चरण 1, चरण 1 करें। चेतावनी बत्तियाँ ASCENT PRESS, CES AC, और CES DC 
जी हां, और एक और सिस्टम आइटम यहां है - अपने क्रायो टैंकों को संतुलित करने के लिए, क्या आप अपने ऑक्सीजन टैंक 1 और अपने हाइड्रोजन
휴스턴에서 당신의 메시지를 읽고 있습니다, 제미니 VI. 메인
아
Roger. Et dans environ une heure, nous aurons des documents de lectur
Роджер, подожди. Мне нужно включи
罗杰。你目前
알겠습니다. 그럼 잠시 기다리겠습니다. 좋은 결과가 나왔으니, 입력해 주시면
Sono iscritto
わかりました。まだSLEWモードなので、徐々にピッチングオーバーしていくと、機体が遅れてしまう可能性があります。もう一
아니요, 못 봤어요. 오해하신 것 같은데요. 건물이 하나도 안 보였어요. 그리고
Na 
了解しました。それから、レジスタ1の最初の数値について訂正があります。プラス27210のはずです。それからもう一つコメントがあります。その姿勢で狭いデッドバンドに入った後、なぜヌンキがどこ
रॉजर। बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद, 11। यह एक अच्छा प्रदर्शन और
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रें
ठीक है, अभी 
아니요. 
フレッドは今、光学装置を覗いています。これはプラットフォームの位置合わせをするための装置で、フレッドは今、どん​​な外の映像が撮れるか確認するために覗いています。テレビカメラを使って、この光学装置を通して司令船の外側を覗くことができるかもしれません。数分前、最初に入ってきたとき、光学装置を通して司令船の側面ハッチの外側を覗くことができました。待機してください。ここで何ができるか試
こんばんは。私たちのミッション、アポロ11号の飛行における象徴的な側面についていくつかお話ししたいと思います。ここ2、3日、宇宙船内で起こった出来事について議論を重ねる中で、私たちは、これは単なる3人の月への旅以上のものであり、政府と産業界のチームの努力、さらには一つの国の努力をはるかに超えるものだという結論に達しました。これは、未知の世界を探求しようとする全人類の飽くなき探究心の象徴であると感じています。先日、ニール・ボルトンが初めて月面に足を踏み入れた際に述べた「これは人間にとっては小さな一歩だが、人類にとっては偉大な飛躍だ」という言葉は、まさにこの思いを的確に表していると思います。私たちは月へ行くという挑戦を受け入れました。この挑戦を受け入れることは避けられないことでした。ミッションを比較的容易に遂行できたのは、その受け入れがいかにタイムリーだったかを示すものだと私は考えています。
分かりました。了解しました。中間軌道の方針としては、SHeタンクの排気前に行うことになっています。つまり、105時間前後で実施するこ
收到。您的数据已导入。我已收到您的 21-4
Хьюстонская сеть, это Хо
Это подтверждается. На этом проверка завершается. Остальные обновления предназначены лишь для вашей информации и основаны на данных нашей 58-часовой платформы — посмотрите на платформу. У нас всё в порядке. Ваши гироскопы практически не показывают дрейфа с момента обновления графика, где мы наблюдали дрейф по оси X -2,24... по оси Y +0,87, по оси Z -0,11. После обновления, которое, как я полагаю, основано на 52-часовом графике, мы показали дрейф по оси X +0,79, по оси Y +1,06, по оси Z +0,02... Я вижу разницу между 52-часовым и 57-часовым выравниванием — у нас не хватило времени, чтобы получить действительно хорошее или полностью достоверное об
هيوست
ジェ
Роджер. Как только у вас появится возможность
D
Okay. Gut. Sag mal, da hint
저는 아주 
로저. 정말 감사합니다. 이제 괜찮습니다. 이상
روجر. عيد ميلاد مجيد من الأرض، أبولو 8، وشكراً جزيلاً على الجولة المصحوبة بمرشدين. لقد استمت
Я просто улечу, а когда останется 30, ты пост
«Аполлон-8», давайте вернёмся назад — переключитесь
Das ist 
Okay. Ich lese es nochmal durch. Anzugkompressor 1 und 2, AUS; Brennstoffzellenpumpen 1, 2 und 3, AUS; Erdung/Neutralstrom, AUS; Hauptbusverbindungen, AUS; Innenbeleuchtung, AUS; Innenraumbeleuchtung, AUS; dann weiter unten: Alle Sicherungen im Verteilerkasten geöffnet; Verteilerkasten 6, Stromzufuhr sollte AUS sein; Anzugstromv
Okay. The chamber pressure is holding steady as a rock. It's holding - it's building up a little bit, actually; it's up around 96 now. Gimbals are sure a little bit busier than I would have gues
卷帘门没放下来，门也打不开了。这大概是第三组了。我
好的
エドが荷物の出し入れを始め、ブースターをいじるのが不可能な位置まで来た途端、私は彼を手伝い始めた。少なくとも荷物を持ってしまい、しまい込み、無くならないようにするなど、手伝いは全力でやった。作業を速くすればするほど、遅れてしまった。荷物を正しい位置に置けなかったからではなく、予想していたよりもずっと時間がかかっただけだ。無重力状態では、シミュレーターでやるのと同じくらい簡単だったとはいえ、それほど楽ではなかった。だから、ぐるりと回って作業した。カーナボンに着いた頃には、もう無理だと心に決めていたが、もう少し頑張ろうと思った。カーナボンに着いた頃、いや、出発する直前には、減圧に間に合わないのは明らかだった。私は次の軌道へのスリップを指示した。それから…​​約20分間息を整え、コックピットに散らばっていたガラクタを整理しようとした。それからチェックリストを取り出し、慌てて何かを見落としていないか、もう一度細かく確認しました。船外活動を開始し、カーナボン上空でGO（開始指示）が出ました。準備は万端で、GOが減圧を開始するのを待ちました。GOは出ました。減圧サイクルも完了しました。カーナボンを出発すると、完全なEVAの許可が出ました。カントンかハワイに到着し、その時点で…確かカントンかハワイだったと思いますが、実際に宇宙船から出て船外活動を開始す
まだアップデートはありま
もうす
좋아요. 등을 가방에 기대세요. 잘 됐네요. 이제 가방 위에 올려놓았어요. 앞으로, 위로. 이제 괜찮아요. 제 쪽으로 조금. 아래로, 왼쪽으로 살짝. 공간 충분해요. 닐, 자세 잘 맞췄어요. 제 쪽으로 조금, 아래로. 좋아요. 이제 괜찮아요. 아래쪽 첫 번째 경첩에 걸리네
Cape Ca
하지만 봉투가 두 개밖에 없어서 다시 사용해야 
- - CB-3 と C
Roger
알겠습
지금 물을 좀 마시고 싶지만, 냉각 시스템이 계속 작동하도록 바이저를 닫아두는 게 좋겠습니다. 좀 시원해질 것 같네요. 기내 온도를 낮춰야 할 것 같습니다. 돔 온도가 45도까지 
Хорошо. Отлич
罗杰看穿了你的虚弱但清晰的
नहीं। उस तरह से नहीं। मैंने इसे पूरी तरह से अंदर धकेल दिया था। यह अंदर जाकर इस तरह अटक गया था। तो ये रहा "Y" कनेक्टर, अगर
네, 지금 현관 바로 앞에 서
Flight teilt mit, dass die Kommunikation über diese Fernsteuerung zwischen Flugzeug und Bodenstation sehr gut funktioniert und möchte, dass Sie das Problem mit dem Schließen der Luke noch einmal schil
Okay, Houston. On descent 1, fuel and oxidizer are reading 10 psi; and descent 2, fuel is reading 10 psi, oxidizer 11 
रॉजर, ईगल। यह
Лицевая панель закрыта. Открыл её на мгновение, просто чтобы вытереть нос и попытаться прочистить линзу, чего сделать не могу. Выбран режим повторного входа. Камера убрана. Теперь я выключу стандартный источник света — и не могу переместить свет в кабине с правого борта; поэтому я вык
60 cy
ما هي تلك ا
좋아요, 그럼 저는 다시 초
Хорошо, Водолей. Мы смотрим на ваш подвес и
مايك، الجو أصبح رطباً بعض الشيء - نسمع صوت تشغيل، مايك. الجو أصبح رطباً بعض الشيء هنا. قد يكون من الأفضل إعادة ضبط درجة حرارة سائل التبريد على الوضع التلقا
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Se avete un minuto libero, mi chiedo se potremmo chiedere a Mike di darci qualche chiarimento su cosa è successo più o meno al momento dell'attracco. Gli abbiamo copiato il messaggio che il contatto è stato molto fluido, quasi impercettibile;
了解。持続時間は53秒です。もう一度確認ですが、計画は03＋
रॉज
Ok. R1 più 27210, R2 più 35570, R3 più 33010. Secondo elemento, come sapete, dovuto alla manovra con un PROCEED e un PROCEED; e, dopo il vostro assetto, un promemoria che non v
Roger, 11. Copiamo la tua descrizione. Mi r
Ja. Ich beko
Acquario, qui Houston. Forz
Buona lettura. Andiamo a pagina 14, passaggio 2, e vogliamo che modifichiate il valore in 31021. Quindi, dopo il valore, inse
أرى بوضوح ميلانًا لليمين بزاوية 5 درجات تقريبًا، ولاحظتُ أن المنظار مُظلم، مما يعني أننا ندخل الجانب المظلم. سأحاول رصد أي تغييرات من خلال المنظار. حاليًا، لا أرى شيئًا من خلال المنظار للمراقبة الليلية، على الأقل في هذا الوضع. لستُ متأكدًا حتى من وقت انخفاض التكبير، باستثناء موضع الرافعة. النافذة مُغطاة بالغيوم. أتعرض لضوء الشمس الآن، وقد حجبها صاروخ برج الهروب، وإن لم يكن ذلك بشكل كبير. أرى ما يُسمى باليراعات تنجرف بشكلٍ ملحوظ. حاولتُ الاقتراب منها عدة
Какой от этого
रॉजर, 11. पृष्ठ F2-20 पर कॉलम A के अंतर्गत, पंक्ति 5 में, नया डेटा 01042 है; पंक्ति 7 में, नया डेटा 00256 है। पंक्ति 11 पर नीचे जाने पर, 00070; पंक्ति 12 में 00042; पंक्ति 13 में 77730 है। कॉलम ब्रावो में, पंक्तियाँ 3, 4 और 5, जो खाली हैं, पंक्त
I got another "Verify capture latches engaged" on my checklist. I've already preloaded the probe; it's sort of silly, but sort of your
Well, we're in sleep attitude, and I got the high-gain angles, and they should be good angles. And I'm locked on and I got about a half signal strength, and they can't
Roger, Frank. Wir glauben nicht, dass es irgendwelche Probleme oder Ungereimtheiten mit dieser Perigäumsvorhersage von -03137 gibt. Es handelt sich um
Okay. Und ich habe hier oben ein paar von Johns Freunden gesehen; ich m
Okay. Bezüglich der Kurskorrektur möchten wir diese bis etwa [Uhrzeit einfügen] verschieben. Es handelt sich dabei um einen Brennvorgang mit ungefähr 25 Fuß pro Sekunde. Wir verzögern die Brenndauer, um aufgrund der von Ihnen vorgenommenen Reduzierung des Abstands um 7,5 Fuß pro Sekunde eine bessere Nachführung zu ermöglichen. Wir möchten uns die Nachführungsdaten noch etwas genauer ansehen. Die Streuungen Ihrer Korrektur werden hier nicht sehr schnell zunehmen. Anschließend löschen wir die NAV-Sichtungen, die etwa [Uhrzeit einfügen] im Flugplan vorgesehen sind. Damit kehren wir zum normalen Flugplanablauf zurück. Wir werden
素晴らしい！ほぼ完
Ken, c'est Frank. Je veux… je veux être sûr d'une chose: c'est bien la charge que nous allons utiliser pour la combu
Hey, now it's gettin
로저. 한동안 당신의 메시지를 읽어왔습니다. HF 무전으로 연락을 시도했지만 실패했습니다. 제 상태는 양호하고, 캡슐 상태도 양호합니다. 제어 모드는 플라이 바이 와이어 방식이고, 자이로스코프는 고정되어 있으며, 기동은 꺼져 있습니다. 연료는 74~85%, 산소는 87~100%입니다. 객실 온도는 섭씨 40도(화씨 104도)로 다소 높습니다. 우
Esatto, Apollo 8. E tra poco avremo un 
أبولو 8، انتهينا من استخدام الكمبيوتر. يمكنك العودة إلى BLOCK، ويبدو أننا نرى انعكاسًا كبي
حسنًا. ماذا عن - هل أنت
アポロ8号
Ok. Un pannello di manovra su: scopo è a metà rotta 5,,, è N/D, HA è N/D, perigeo, più 0019,8, 0,007,8, 0,15, il resto è N/D. Spegnere il motore 1 secondo prima della fine del tempo di combustione. Spegnere manualmente a 14 secondi. L'ulige è di quattro getti per 1
Cap Com. If you read, go ah
Ricevu
Okay. He's 
Роджер. На водородном баке: водородный бак 1 — 19,7; водоро
Sì... bruciando... e quello che ho visto è andato dritto nell'ar
حسنًا. التغيير الآخر يتعلق بالوقت المنقضي: نود زيادة هذا العمل، التغيير الأو
Yes...
了解、オーロラセブン、ケープ・キャップ・コム、HFに復帰しました。報告をお願
Roger. Be advised, we just conducted an HF test 31 and had no returns from any stati
Bene. Nel riquadro 226, vogliamo che siano tutti aperti tranne; quindi cambiamo la parola "Chiuso" in "Aperto" e poi cancelliamo le tre righe successive perché vogliamo che
了解。
是的，我打开过。但是食物都碎成渣了；我都
吉姆，我们准备把电池重新接通电源。请你打开16号配电盘上的“交叉连接平衡负载”断路器，然后把2号电池
सूरज की रोशनी कैसी आ रही है? इस दिशा से आने वाली सूर
물병자리 여러분, 휴스턴, 이 글 읽고
알겠습니다. 관제센터는 어떻게 
And the last item's for Jack. Jack, the preliminary indications are that you can get a 60-day ext
Да. Я скоро обно
-- もう一度
Gemini 4, Houston. Avez-vou
아
알겠습니다. 마이크에게 전
네, 맞습니다. 그곳은 정말
فريدوم سفن، هذا هو 23، لديّ... إرسالات من
Roger. Juste quelques observations intéressantes: je viens de faire une navigation avec la Lune; le Soleil me gêne b
O
Роджер. Проблемы, с которыми вы столкнулись, вызваны каким-то неизвестным источником, вер
Roger, Jack. Vo
好的。这些方法我们之前都试过了，但都
I imagin
A
了解しました。捕捉のGETは3月7日、R = 248 nmのGET、ランデブーのGETは3月15日、方位角は
हाँ... असल में, मैं साल्टन सागर के उत्तर की ओर 
روجر.
Roger. Come mi senti adesso? Sono in modalità push-to-talk, HF. Pas
아주 좋습니다. 폴 해니 스타일의 인터스텔라 타임즈 12월 23일자입니다. 크리스마스까지 쇼핑할 수 있는 날이 이틀밖에 남지 않았다는 것을 알려드리고 싶습니다. 폴 해니는 어제 여러분의 TV 방송이 큰 인기를 끌었다고 하더군요. 미키 허스코위츠는 워싱턴 포스트에서 두 가지 일을 하고 있습니다. 기존 스포츠 칼럼 외에도 여러분의 발사에 대한 칼럼을 두 개나 썼고, 짐, 어머니께서 생신 축하 인사를 정말 좋아하셨다고 합니다. 어제 뉴올리언
죄송합
J
Ricevuto. Ricevuto, Buzz. Ho apportato un paio di modifiche alla tua checklist di superficie e, in generale, quello che vorremmo che facessi è tracciare il modulo di comando per un ultimo controllo della tua posizione lì. E questo sarà - in altre parole, P57, e poi proseguire con la checklist, e il resto sono un paio di piccole modifiche alla checklist. La principale è che non vogliamo che il radar di rendezvous sia acceso durante la salita, e pensiamo che questo risolverà alcuni dei problemi di
好吧。现在你如何理解我的意
자, 물병자리 여러분, 시작
Сигма Семь, Сиг
And where we sleep is down un
J
6-1입니다. 두 
Das werde ich sicher tun, und du könntest Frank ausrichten, dass s
ठीक है। ज़रा रुक
下
لا أستطيع إجراء المزيد من الاختبارات على النجوم في الوقت الحالي. سأعود الآن
もう一度
Roger, Jim. Christmas morning around your house was kinda quiet, says Marilyn. 
Roger. Verstanden. Nur zur Information, vielleicht lesen Sie es ja am Boden vor. Ich habe zunächst unsere Perizynth-Höhenbestimmung durchgeführt. Mit dem Sternvektor, mit dem wir navigiert haben, ergab sich eine Höhe von 84,7 Seemeilen. Anschließend haben wir Ihren Vektor 
Puoi prendere una delle carte e io inizierò a ta
네. 지금 가장 중요한 소식은 푸에블로호 승무원 82명 전
そして、今はセカンダリー、つまり 2 
Gemini VI, for your 
わかりまし
Roger.
रॉजर। कॉपी। थ्रस्ट ट्रांसलेशन - चार जेट - बैलेंस कपल - चालू। थ्रॉटल - न्यूनतम। थ्रॉटल - ऑटो सीडीआर। प्रोप बटन - रीसेट। प्रोप बटन। ठीक है। एबॉर्ट/एबॉर्ट स्टेज - रीसेट। एटीटी कंट्रोल - उनमें से 
حسنًا، ح
Bene. Ci sembra che, sebbene stiamo 
And the - talkbacks on the, I've got HELIUM 1 now are all gray. HELIUM 2 are all gray. PRIMARY PROPE
نعم، لقد
I think our wobble is growing worse. The Earth now is really up to the top of the window. I have to get way down almost to the
Okay. In the mid-Pacific landing area, the weather is good. The cloud cover is 2000, scattered; visibility, 10; winds 060 at 10; wave heights are 
Ici Gemini 4. Comprenez qu'après environ 47 heures, vous souhaitez supprimer la traduction 2-Alpha, la vérification du mode de balayage horizontal et la vérification du
Gémeaux VIII, on vous contactera via Ascension. L'heure d'acquisition d'Ascension est 09:52
收到。待命。舱内压力为 4.9 (psi)，接近 5。宇航服入口温度为 63。舱内温
네, 11번입니다. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 해당 위치를 통과하면서
О боже, верните мне камеру. Здесь огромный, великолепный кратер. Жал
यह क्षितिज स्कैनर हो सकता है, ह
はい。その通りです。5分を超え
Er steht 
R
我的体温
Roger, Frank. What we are doing down here is this. We'd really like the horizon calibration. We would like a total of 15 marks; you know, three sets on one star, two on the othe
私たちには優秀なナビ
- هي غير حاسمة نوعًا ما لأنني وضعت علامة 
了解、ジャック。今回の通過では、地球がLMPの窓の左上隅に
众议院筹款委员会昨日也同意对石油公司、银行和公用事业公司进行税收改革，此举每年可为联邦政府增加高达20亿美元的收入。该委员会还初步投票决定修改电话、电力、天然气和石油管道公司的会计程序，并削减互助储蓄
Ok. Regole di accensione. Dovremmo spegnerci se il monitor di spinta è al 77% o meno; numero 2, se la pressione di riempimento del propellente è inferiore a 160 psi; 3, se il DELTA-P dell'ossidante del carburante è maggiore di 25, e questo sarà un avviso di terra; 4, se l'errore di assetto è di più o meno 10 gradi, tranne che per i transitori di avvio. Ok. I 
Non, je pense que la gradation de cette substance gluante qui la recouvre, quelle qu'elle soit, semble se situer à peu près ici et plus haut - semble se situer à peu près au-dessus de la
أبولو 8، هيوستن. يجب أن يكون هذا الخيار الأول مثل الخيار ا
짐, 당신이 그녀를 잘 다루고 있
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, qui Kano Cap Com. Se mi senti, potr
روجر. مايك، أعتقد أننا نستطيع شرح معدل السبعة أعشار. في المرة الأولى، كما تعلم، لم نتمكن من المرور عبر النظام، لذا كان لدينا خطأ كبير بين وحدة التحكم الفعلية ووحدة التحكم المطلوبة في الدوران. في هذه الحالة، ستتحرك المركبة - أو بالأحرى ستناور - بمعدل مُحمّل مسبقًا، وهو ثلاثة أعشار زائد أربعة أعشار، وستتو
Понял. Ты с
Okay. I'm going ove
Roger, Fred. Gut gelesen. Beginnen wir mit Panel 16. Unter FLUGANZEIGEN, Zeile 1: SE-KREUZZEIGER, GEÖFFNET; SYSTEM Bravo - QUAD 1 TCA's, GESCHLOSSEN; QUAD 2, GESCHLOSSEN; QUAD 3, GESCHLOSSEN; QUAD 4, GESCHLOSSEN
إليكم تقريرًا من هاري روزنتال من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في هيوستن. أضفى بابا نويلان البهجة على ليلة عيد الميلاد للطفل جيفري لوفيل، البالغ من العمر عامين. طرق الأول باب منزله وجلب الهدايا، بينما قام الثاني بتشغيل محرك أبولو 8 العائد من القمر. ارتدى الأول بدلة حمراء ولحية بيضاء، وأطلق صيحة "هو هو" بصوت عالٍ
로저, 여기 좋아 보
꽤 잘하고 계세요. 짐벌이 예상보다 조금 더 바쁘게 작동하는 것 같지만, 모든 게 
حسنًا، إليك نقطة الأوج - نقطة ا
Роджер. Мы исходим из принципа "предупреждаем заранее". Имейте в виду, что тренажера у нас нет, поэтому мы не сможем провести вам тест 
네, 참고로 말씀드리자면, 구름 크기는 5/10이고 포트모르즈비 북쪽으로 1/8 정도 떨어져 있습니다.
여러분이 보고 계신 것은 바로 스미스 해(Smyth's Sea)입니다. 스미스 해는 캐스트너(Castner)와 길버트(Gilbert) 분화구이며, 특히 지구에서는 볼
Ro
Bene. Se non c'è diminuzione nella quantità di liquido accumulatore secondario, glicole secondario alla valvola del radiatore su NORMALE. Passaggio successivo,
أبولو 8، هيو
Kano, sono A
Let's not 
Хорошо. Первой звездой будет 26, и мы проведем два набора измерений: на ближнем горизонте Земли, используя звезду 26. Затем мы хотели бы провести еще один набор измерений на звезде 16, используя дальний горизонт Земли. Если окажется, что измерения на ближнем горизонте Земли на звезде 26 невозможны, то мы хотели бы провести один набор
Ich schaue aus Fenster 5 auf
Okay, Joe. Zur Bestä
قمت بنسخ الوقت، 22:43 و 23:22. ما هي التجربة
Abbiamo - La configurazione che abbiamo ora è - Riscaldatori a idrogeno: abbiamo 1 AUTO, 2 OFF. Riscaldatori a ossigeno: 1 OFF, 2 AUTO. E abbiamo tu
Fort et clair, Apo
Gemini 4, Houston CAP COM. Dimmi il tuo sta
了解しました。RN、RP、プラス77、ピッチ角400フィート（公称値）。修正高度、400Kフィート（公称値）。RET 400Kフィート、22プラス02。ブラックアウト開始、24プラス43。ブラックアウト終了、30プラス01。ドローグシュート、31プラス37。メインシュート、
अरे यार, मुझे 
फ्रेंडशिप से
Hey, Jim, I have about three things. First thing, the computer is yours again. The second thing, no maneuvering will be required from now until burn, so you can just sit in the burn attitude. And the third thing is we'd like to back ou
حسنًا، لنبدأ. إيقاف تشغيل الطاقة الإلكترونية... اللوحة 8. إيقاف تشغيل جميع المفاتيح الستة عشر. إيقاف تشغيل الإضاءة الرقمية الداخلية؛ إيقاف تشغيل الإضاءة الداخلية المتكاملة؛ إيقاف 
لا أستطيع إخراج لوحة الرسم التخطيطي
Ora, in risposta alla domanda 2, c'era, ovviamente, una vibrazione transitoria nel secondo stadio che, a causa dello spegnimento del motore numero 5, si è verificata p
Roger. Can you comment again on this, the attitude system with respect to the, respect to the visual reference,
Gémeau
好的，乔，我现在要
Nous aimerions que vous reveniez à… Choisissez l'attitude qui vous semble la 
Verify closed; locked
روجر، درجة حرارة مدخ
저 못
별을 몇 개 더 모아야 하고, 그 후에 시도해 볼 거
Quello a cui stiamo pensando adesso, Jerry, è raggiungere quell'angolo di inclinazione, circa 2 gradi, il limite. Quando torneremo indietro, la T
ठीक है, और हम इसके लिए प्रक्रियाओं पर काम कर रहे हैं। केन प
좋습니다. 380번 패널로 가서 O2 수요 조절 밸브를 OFF로, 그리고 슈트
알겠습니다. 지금 플랫폼을 정렬하고 있는데, 왼쪽 아래로 향하고 있습니다. 잠시 후 그쪽으로 내
أحضر ال
Roger. Mar
ومن الأفضل رفع مستوى دقة جهاز الاتصال خلال هذه ال
00 17
Okay. 
Okay, Buzz. Zu den Punkten in deinem Flugplan, zunächst ein paar Aktualisierungen. Wir haben den Mittelkurs 6 gestrichen. Bleib einfach auf Kurs. Ich gebe dir heute Morgen etwas mehr Zeit. Zweitens: Wir sind bereit für eine BATT-B-Ladung, wann immer du sie einsetzen möchtest. Drittens: Wir hätten diesmal eine etwas andere Idee für die Abwasserentsorgung. Wir möchten sie an unseren Markierungen vom Boden aus durchführen. Die Flugba
D'accord, Jim. Une fois l'orientation corrigée, inclinez légèrement l'appareil. Nous effectuons un alignement sur l'axe du fuselage, à 400 + 5°. Si la bille est en haut à ce moment-là, elle reviendra à 000°. Nous aborderons plus en détail les modes de contrôle ultérieurement, mais nous recommandons d'effectuer cette man
هيوستن، أبولو 
बहुत बढ़िया, बहुत बढ़िया, जिम। आज सुबह आपकी आवाज़ अच्छी लग रही है। हम आपको इन तारों के बारे में थोड़ी जानकारी देना चाहेंगे। जैसा कि आप उड़ान योजना में देख सकते हैं, हमने आपके लिए 33 नंबर (एंटारेस), 34 नंबर (एट्रिया) और 40 नंबर (अल्टेयर) का कार्यक्रम तय किया है। इनमें से पहला तारा, एंटारेस, समतल में है; बाकी दो समतल से बाहर हैं। जैसा कि आप जानते हैं, हम समतल में और समतल से बाहर दोनों तरह के तारों का मिश्रण प्राप्त करना चाहते हैं। एंटारेस, 33 नंबर, सूर्य के निकट है, और हमें लगता है कि आपको 33 नंबर के तारों का माप लेने में कठिनाई होगी। हम चाहेंगे कि आप कोशिश करें, लेकिन यदि आप 33 नंबर का माप नहीं ले पाते हैं, तो हम सुझाव देते हैं कि आप 42 नंबर (पीकॉक) का उपयोग करें, जो चंद्रमा के सुदूर क्षितिज पर स्थित है। हम जानते हैं कि पीक
Okay, Joe. We're ready to copy a fli
Je savais que s'il persistait assez longtem
حسنًا يا برج الدلو، سنلغي وضع التحكم هذا. نريدك أن تعيد الطائرة إلى وضعها الأصلي، ثم سنفعّل وضع تثبيت الوضع، وبعدها علينا إبعاد الكرة عن خط البداية لتوفير الطاقة. وللحفاظ على تسخي
Sper
अपोलो
Das 
अच्छा, मैं नहीं कर सकता— क्या आप आवाज़ थोड़ी कम कर सकते हैं ताकि
Ganz genau, CAP COM, die Kanone lässt sich super einfach manövrieren. Mein einziges Problem ist der Treibstoffmangel. Ich habe jetzt den ganzen Treibstoff verbraucht und konnte mich um die V
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 통신 점검을 또
好的，水瓶座。我们正在研究下一步的计划。同时，我们需要断开一些高功率设备的供电，所以在11号面板上，打开DECA电源开关和DECA万向节开关。在16号面板上，打开ATCA
Ehi, sei... sei al tuo interruttore
버즈 씨, 아직 심전도 데이터가 나오지 않고 있습니다. 데이터를 얻으려면 편하신 시간에 심전도 전극(파란색 핀에 연결된 가운데 전극)을 교체해 주셔야
Meine Reichweitenra
D'accord. J'utilise maintenant la lune, qui est à ma gauche, et c'est un bon point de repère. Je vais masquer l'indicateur d'assiette pour que vous puissiez observer le lacet. Je passe en mode gyroscopique libre, en essayant de sélectionner le mode de commandes de vol électriques basses. Je vais d'abord centrer la lune dans le champ de vision, en contrôla
Okay, Jack. Understand. You want us to point the X - plus X-axis to the south using the with the powered up. Then, by powering down the, we'll lose a. I wasn't too successful in controlling the spacecraft i
알았어, 조. 산소 유량 높음 표시등이
ठीक है, माइक। बेशक, यह उस स्थिति के लिए है जब G&N काम करना बंद कर दे और आपको लगातार g पर उड़ान भरनी पड़े; और हम जो करने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं वह है लगातार g की रेंज को 110
好的。在右侧，
लगभग 40 फीट दूर - मेरा अनुमान है कि अग
Noi - Abbiamo solo una domanda, la valvola di sfiato del tunnel. Ci chiedi
了解。睡眠については、私たちはそれぞれ2回ずつ
Da
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。请问你们的备用应急预案清单上新增了一些内容
Sì. Dite alla gente della Terra del Fuoco di indossar
짐, 오늘 저녁 일찍 프레드가 사령선 1번 창문에서 가스가 새어 나오는 것을 목격했다고 보고했습니다. 또한 약 4인치 정사각형 크기의 은색 금속 조각이 떠다니는 것도 봤다고 했는데, 우리가 확인하려는 것은 이것이 새로운 가스 누출인지 아니면 기존 문제의 잔여 가스 누
خسر جون ياردلي رهانه. وصلت درجة حرارة المقصورة إ
알겠습니다. 두 가지 더 확인이 필요합니다. 메시지가 담긴 디스크가 계획대로 수면에 투하되었는지, 그리고 비행 계획에 나열된 모든 물품이 투하되었는지 확인
That'll be with f
نعم. ه
جيميني 4، هيو
D'accord. Premièrement, la correction de trajectoire aura probablement lieu après 104 heures, et nous visons simplement un delta-V de 1,2 à 1,8 mètre par seconde. Voilà pour le premier point. Maintenant, je vais vous donner un aperçu des consommables. Il vous reste 1 498 ampères-heures. Cela signifie qu'en 61 heures, vous consommerez en moyenne 24,5 ampères. Nous prévoyons qu'après la mise 
Okay. Nach Nummer 1, erste Zeile, streichen Sie „And VHF-A“. Zweite Zeile, streichen Sie „SIMPLEX operation“. Dritte Zeile, streichen Sie „Prime“. Das bezieht sich auf PRIME POWER AMP, OFF. Das heißt, „PRIME“ sollte durch OFF ersetzt werden. Und das ist das zweite Mal, dass Sie diese Zeile streichen. Auch in der dritten Zeile sollte das letzte Wort „OFF“ durch „PCM“ ersetzt werden. Die vierte Zeile ist in Ordnung. Die fünfte Zeile, „VHF VOICE, ON, OFF, OFF“, streichen Sie. „Lighting, FLOODS“, die nächste Zeile, sollte „OFF“ lauten, aber fügen Sie Folgendes hinzu: „Or OVERHEAD/FORWARD prefer OFF“. Okay. Schritt 2 bleibt unverändert; vorerst keine Änderung. Warten Sie. Überspringen Sie Schritt 2. Tun Sie es nicht. Fahren Sie direkt mit Schritt 3 fort, „Konfigurieren Sie die Schutzschalter gemäß der Tabelle“. Das führt uns zu Seite 6 (Stromversorgung). Fred-o, könnte
那辆车的操控性能像玛莎拉蒂吗
美しい、
他照做了。大卫来了
Hier spricht Cal. Ich verstehe dich sehr schwach, Wally. Nach der ersten guten Übertragung ist deine Stimme abgefallen. Ich habe verstanden, dass du die Glühwürmchen gesehen hast, aber dann ist deine Beschreibung 
Джим, у нас есть пара новостей. Президент Никсон выбрал судью из Миннесоты на д
È 
إنهم يطلقون النار، ألي
さ
네. 5번 패널에서 전원 1번과 2번 회로 차단기를 엽니다. 그런 다음 전원 스위치를 리셋하고 놓습니다. 11번 패널과 16번 패널에서 초월 버스 타이(TRANSLUNA
Игл, ты
好的，阿波罗8
罗杰：我会转达你的请求。正在倒带。灯亮
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Во-первых, нам бы хотелось, чт
Questa è Friendship Seven. Si vede chiaramente dietro di sé; un grande schema di nuvole in lontananza, verso il Capo. Una vista meraviglio
Not much light up in that area, but apparently the TV set's a
Gemini 4, RKV CAP COM. RKV è pronto. Se riesc
Amen! D'accord. Pour le match d'hier, je ne sais pas si vous avez le score. Les Browns de Cleveland affrontai
तुम ग
好的。我们现在看到的真空近地点是23.6度；飞行路径角是-6.25度；如果我们决定进行微调，中段速度大
Apollo 8, Ho
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, this is Houston broadcasting in the blind. If you read, attempt contact using OMNI antenna, usin
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地から昨夜の地質学に関する質問についてコメントをいただきます。私たちは、比較的滑らかなクレーター地帯に着陸しました。そこには細長い二次クレーター、つまり円形の二次クレーターが点在しており、そのほとんどには、大きさに関わらず、隆起した縁があります。これは必ずしも全てがそうではありません。周囲には、はっきりと縁が見えない小さなクレーターもいくつかあります。この地域全体の基質は、非常に細かい砂からシルトまでです。地球上でこれに最も近いのは、粉末状の黒鉛でしょう。この基質には、丸みを帯びたものや角張ったものなど、様々な形、大きさ、質
ठीक है। जिम से अनुरोध है कि वे अपने पाँचों निशानों के बीच थोड़ा और अंतराल रखें। यदि संभव हो, तो हम उनमे
了解、バズ。PAD、MPLのエントリです。ロール05、35から開始。訂正：359 152 001。194 46 03 267、プラス1102、マイナス17203、068、36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027、NOUN 69。4行ともNA。Dゼロから開始：400 02 09。ブラックアウトのRET：00 17 03 38 08 20。六分儀の星：02 0945 149。ボアサイト星はScorpii theta、つまりScorpii theta。上315、右35、リフトベクトルは上。コメント：この進入PADはミッドコース6を想定していません。参
Capire; stella 31, rollio 184 7, beccheggio 23 4, imbar
Roger. The first one was 1
نعم يا جيم. ستحتاج إلى تدوير المركبة 90 درجة لتوجيه محورها السيني الموجب نحو الشمس، ووضع الهلال - أي نقاط الهلال - على المحور الصادي. ستتولى نقاط الهلال على المحور الصادي، مع توجيهها نحو مركز الأرض
Et, Verseau, pour votre information, en ce qui concerne notre approvisionnement en eau, y compris 
मुझे लगता है कि दो कोने आपस में छू गए थे, क्योंकि जब इसे लगाया गया था, तो दोनों एक साथ नहीं निकले थे। यह थोड़ा असमान रूप से खुला, और ज़ाहिर है, जिस ज़मीन पर यह था, वह थोड़ी समतल नहीं थी - जैसा मैं चाहता था। और मुझे लगता है कि दो कोने लगभग 1 इंच तक - नहीं, तीन चौथाई से आधा इंच तक - आपस में छू गए थे
س
11, ici Houston. Goldstone signale qu'ils peuvent lire les chiffres sur l'écran. Ils peuvent également lire VERBE, NOM, PROGRAMME et voir le voyant ACTIVITÉ 
فريندشيب سفن، هذه كانتون. هل لديكم كل ما تحتاجونه من ذكريات الماضي؟ 
Abbiamo visto che hai sollevato il coperchio nella fase di interruzione. Non
情况差不多。问题是，它几乎是
ठीक है। जिम, कुछ बातें हैं। पहली बात त
حسنًا يا جاك،
待機してください。
Roger. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich steuere Fly-by-Wire, in der Gegen
了
E nella parte destra del nostro schermo, in questo momento, possiamo vedere Mess
휴스턴, 알겠습니다. 이글호가 궤도로 복귀했습니다. 트랭퀼리티 기지를 떠나면서 아폴로 11호 패치
روجر، لقد حصلت على تلك الأرقام، لكنني لم أحصل على 17-1 من قبل
如果你累了
Итак, пе
쌍둥이자리 4호, 당신
那里的电压看起来不错
休斯顿，阿波罗11号
네, 만나서 이야기 나누고 고향 소식을 들을 수 있어서 좋았습니다. 휴스턴 상공을 지나갈 때, 바깥 풍경이 정말 잘 보였어요. 비행기 밖으로 나가보니 멕시코만과 갤버스턴 만이 보였고, 클리
Roger. Okay. L'altra cosa è il post-atterraggio. Noi continuiamo - giusto per ribadire - a non voler rimanere più di un'ora nella navicella. Toglietevi le tute, a vostra discrezione, se la navicella non presenta perdite. La parte del portello aperto è una vostra decisione. Al momento, sembra che nell'area di recupero sia adatta a questo scopo. Ricor
I don't believe so unless we inad
そして、表面は細かく粉状になっています。つま先で軽く拾うことができます。まるで炭粉のように、ブーツの底と側面に細かい層になって付着しています。ほんの数センチ、おそらく8分の1センチほどしか拾えませんが
Да, я пытаюсь убрать крен. Крен до нуля. Просто доведите до нуля, я сейчас включу режим ATT HOLD. Тогда рыскание исчезнет, ​​тангаж останется таким, какой есть; затем
飞船看起来真的像是在释放气体，因
Сфотографировать Землю с помощью Hasselblad несложно, потому что камера время от времени пролетает мимо Земл
बहुत बढ़िया। यह पॉल हैनी के अंदाज़ में छपा इंटरस्टेलर टाइम्स का 23 दिसंबर का अंक है। हम आपको बताना चाहते हैं कि क्रिसमस आने में खरीदारी के लिए सिर्फ़ दो दिन बचे हैं। उनका कहना है कि कल आपका टीवी प्रसारण बहुत हिट रहा। मिकी हर्शकोविट्ज़ पोस्ट के लिए दोहरी ज़िम्मेदारी निभा रहे हैं। उन्होंने अपने अन्य खेल लेखों के अलावा आपके लॉन्च पर भी दो कॉलम लिखे हैं, और जिम, आपकी माँ को जन्मदिन की शुभकामनाएँ बहुत
هذ
वै
네, 그다지 독창적이지는 않지만 목적은 달성할 수 있습니다
أما الآن، في إجابة على السؤال الثاني، فقد كان هناك بالطبع اهتزاز عابر في المرحلة
OK. Magnitude 160
ठीक है। यह आपका आसान DIY (डू-इट-योरसेल्फ) कमांड मॉड्यूल कमांड मॉड्यूल है, जिसमें लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड की स्थिति में एक सुझाया गया तरीका बताया गया है। सब ठीक है। हमने 1.8 मिलीमीटर पढ़ा है, और आपके पास पर्याप्त मात्रा में लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड है... जो आपकी बाकी उड़ान के लिए काफी होगा। हालांकि, सावधानी बरतते हुए, हम प्राथमिक कमांड मॉड्यूल में संभावित समस्याओं से बचने के लिए एक और कमांड मॉड्यूल कैनिस्टर का सेट इस्तेमाल 
रॉजर। बा
Jack, c'est très confortable. Nous l'avons déjà testé plusieurs fois, et d'ailleurs, il est en cours de test en ce mome
6-1 è. Rileggili entrambi e fammi un resoconto st
Bene,
ああ、その通り。言い忘れてました。そ
क्षितिज को उसमें बनाए रखना होगा
您上次进行主氧饱
ちょっとコメントし
5時23分にブラックアウト開始。9時21分にブラックアウト終了。高度5万キロフィート、10時55分。メインシュート12時33分。スプラッシュ17時10
Хорошо. Я на девятой панели. Готов к приему. Вы хотите, 
C'est l'Amitié Sept. Affirmative. J'ai Orion pile au milieu de la fenêtre en ce moment, ce qui est parfait pour mai
Roger. Ihr Bewohner der Raumstation Columbia 
옴니
As a matter of fa
Okay, vielleicht habe ich einen schwachen Daumen. Könntest du bitte die Ärzte fragen, ob ich dieses Trainingsgerät benu
了解しました。はっきりと聞き取れました。念のためお伝えしておきますが
好的，吉姆。我们这里有四个步骤，可以帮助你请求回到“DOWN VOICE BACKUP”状态，如果你准备
充電が終わったら
Yes. They're all about as tight as can be. I tell 
, have y
अपोलो 8, ह
好的，在最后一次飞行中，我们使用地形同步摄影仪拍摄了大约38张照片，从圣地亚哥以东一点开始，直到再次遇到云层覆盖。当我们飞越美国南部，沿着阿拉巴马州和密西西比州一路南下到佛罗里达州时，我们开始断断续续地拍摄。我们拍到了一些该地区天气状况非常好的照片，然后又拍了一些杰克逊维尔附近机场的照片。我们还拍了几张科德角的照片。其中一张可能是我们拍到的最好的照片，它记录了从佛罗里达州一直延伸到德克萨斯州的整个海岸线的天气变化。一条非常清晰的天气带紧贴海岸线。之后，我们拍摄了一些佛罗里达州、古巴及其周边岛屿地区以及墨西哥湾的天气变化
Okay. Sie können mit einer Brennstoffzellenspülung rechnen, und wir sollten kurz darauf mit dem Laden von Batterie A fertig sein; dann dürfte die Batterie fast voll sein. Wir rufen Sie an, sobald
Capire in 3 secondi velocem
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। टेप रिकॉर्डर आपको वापस
Je l'ai déjà chargé. Je ne pense pas que ça changera 
एलएम में, कैमरे के लिए यह कवर है। ज़रा सोचिए - मैंने इसे लोड कर लिया है, और मुझे
拍摄一张照片，感光度为 64 ASA，感光度值为 13。非常好。相当明亮……我给她 13 分，因为第一张拍得不好，所以我们快速拍几张。第一张
आज रात आसमान में काफी बादल छाए हुए हैं। मुझे बस ऑस्ट्रेलिया और कोरिया का कुछ हिस्सा ही दिखाई दे रहा है और लगता है चीन का भी कुछ ह
And we expect that we may lose lock when it passes overhead 
Roger. La température du réservoir d'hélium de Quad Able a très légèrement baissé et nous s
Это у
ヒューストン、アポ
Okay. Ich wollte nur wissen, ob sie an sind – ich will deine Checkliste nicht infr
好的。这次飞掠是昨天那次飞掠的更新，请注意这是第二次。飞掠坐标为：62970，-162，+129，+00966，+00552，-02079。横滚、俯仰和偏航均为零，11月阿尔法星，近地点高度为+00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013，向上047，向右39，+1418 -16505 12904 36160，主星天狼星，伴星参宿七，136 310 340，无空隙，需要重新调整至最佳位置。这次点火将使近月点高度
Actuellement, nous volons à très basse altitude, si bien que je ne pense pas que les stations au sol puissent nous localiser. Nous avons entendu plusieurs communications intermittentes. Nous allons toutefois maintenir cette position un moment afin de garder le lanceur en vue. Il ne semble pas que nous progressions beaucoup vers lui pour le moment. Il semble rester à peu près à la même distance qu'auparavant. Lors de l'observation nocturne, lorsque le lanceur était en dessous de nous, le ciel paraissait presque entièrement étoilé. Les émanations du lanceur étaient si nombreuses qu'elles projetaient des traînées lumineuses dans le ciel. J'ai d'ailleurs fait remarquer que ces émanations ressemblaient à des étoiles. En observant attentivement le lanceur à ce moment-là, on pouvait voir le carburant – plus précisément les vapeurs blanches qui s'échappaient de son extrémité arrière – et je suppose que c'est ce qui dispersait ces petites lucioles tout autour. C'était tellement intense que cela recouvrait toute la zone vis
Хорошо. Верно. Это Джим Ловелл. Сегодня мы решили немного рассказать вам о жизни внутри «Аполлона-8». Мы уже показали вам виды Луны, виды Земли, и решили пригласить вас к нам домой. Это наш дом, по крайней мере, уже 4 дня, как вы можете видеть на приборной панели. Мы отмечаем каждый день на приборной панели. Мы уже отработали четыре дня и работаем над пятым. Конечно, все мы с нетерпением ждём посадки в пятницу. Здесь, в той части космического корабля, которую мы называем нижним отсеком оборудования, находится советник президента по физической подготовке, капитан Джим Ловелл, который собирается выполнить программу упражнений, которую мы делаем каждый день. Вы заметили, что он очень свободно перемещается внутри. Он только что ударился головой об оптику, используемую для навигации. Он работает с тренажером, предназначенным для поддержания мышц в форме. Ещё одна очень важная функция нашего космического корабля — это компьютер, и я подумал, что вам будет интересно посмотреть, что у нас здесь есть: дисплеи, которые предоставляют нам всю информацию о работе двигателя, о навигации и о скорости, которую мы используем во время входа в атмосферу и торможения на околоземных орбитальных миссиях. Вы видите, что он управляется с помощью клавиатуры, похожей на пишущую машинку, и то, что происходит на ней, — это просто чудо. Он проделал для нас фантастическ
ठीक है। दाईं
Я почти уверен, что это так, потому что я бы заметил это довольно быстро. За время полета я один раз использовал большую тягу, когда переключался с ручного пропорционального управления на электронное, и забыл перевести переключатель управления скоростью в
Okay. I
好的
알겠습
Okay. Ich habe hier eine besondere Haney-Nachricht für Sie. Die neueste Ausgabe der Interstellar Times berichtet, dass die Mondlandung sowohl in den Zeitungen als auch im Fe
收到。我们现在能更清楚地接收到你的信号了。吉姆可以继续向导航部队发送信息了。在他开始之前，他们还有一个问题。他
Houston CAP COM, Gemin
收到。我现在就给你布置一份校准后的练
안녕하세요, 이글입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 제 말 들
Ha! Ha! Ich habe immer noch schwarze Bremsspuren an meinen Schwimmflossen von deinem Ausflug ins Buschland. Okay, du siehst, ich bin schon wieder nach rechts gegiert. Ich muss – Korrektur, nach links gegiert. Ich muss nach rechts, der Mond steht direkt am Horizont.
F
रोजर. 224, प्लस 60267; 225, प्लस 58148; 226, प्लस 70312; 22
Très bien, allons-y. ALIMENTATION ÉLECTRONIQUE, ARRÊT… panneau 8. Les 16 interrupteurs, ARRÊT. ÉCLAIRAGE NUMÉRIQUE INTÉRIEUR, ARRÊT; ÉCLAIRAGE INTÉRIEUR INTÉGRAL, ARRÊT; PROJECTEUR INTÉRIEUR, ARRÊT. LOGIQUE, deux, abaisser et ARRÊTER. BRAS PYRO, abaisser et ARRÊTER. Ensuite, pa
Sta arrivando più o meno allo stesso
알겠습니다, 잭. 상승 신호를 확보했으니, 그 정보를 이용해 도킹 대략적인 정렬을 잡아주고, 서비스 모듈 분리 자세로 전환한 다음, 전원을 켤 때까지 기다렸다가 도킹 대략적인 정렬을 잡고, 좋은 별들을 골라 정확한 정렬을 제공할 겁니다. 서비스 모듈 분리 자세에서 찾을 수 있는 태양에서 멀리 떨어져 있는 별들을 몇 개 고를 수 있을 것 같네요. 이렇게 
收到。复
Die Sonne selbst hat keinen Einfluss auf die Fenster, aber die unterschiedlichen Einfallswinkel der Sonnenstrahlen verändern das relative Ausmaß der durch den Beschlag verursach
रॉजर। क्या आपने अपने जायरोस को पिंजरे में बंद करके दोबारा खड़ा करने की कोशिश की 
هذه طائرة إ
우리가 해야 할 일이 또 뭐가 있지? 스캐너는 보조 모드로 전환해야 해. 이제 18
Хорошо. Далее, ниже, в поле «ПРОДОЛЖИТЬ», вставьте клавишу ENTER после
Er hat sich vorhin ras
了解しました、ヒュー
罗杰，谢谢
休斯
Roger. Je m'en doutais. Sache 
Okay. Das ist r
Have you completed your M-3
罗杰。/ - 这是 3 - 46427，减 053，加 141，加 28960，减 00456，加 00720 180 021 002，NA，加左 17，加 00883，减 16500 12955 36185；天狼星，参宿七 129，155，01，双喷气发动机，2
罗杰，弗雷德。我有一张服务模块SEP（单引擎程序）的垫片，上面有姿态参数。你不需要专门的垫片，
分かりました。電源5
D'accord. Vance, je crois comprendre que vous aviez dressé une liste de choses à récupérer plus tard, des éléments que no
Roger. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, meno 061, più 066 135 23 4156, più 32011, più 06 818, meno 02650, 181 054 014; apogeo NA, più 00230 32836 228 32628 42 1511 357, NA tre linee, più 1103, meno 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52, Deneb e Vega, 242 172 012, due jet ullage, 16 secondi, orizzonte fuori dalla finestra, 10 gradi, TIG meno 2 minuti, stella sestante a 1
روجر، لقد حصلنا على درج
Cabin pressure seems 
我们正在看电视上的天气预报，看起来和广告上
罗杰，休斯顿，你有没有哥伦比亚的高增益角
アポロ
Okay. I've got a few good words for you. The erasable memory has been taken completely apart and looked at, and it looks like it's all okay. Your didn't have any effect. The one thing that might be questionable is if you used a when you get to the display, you may find that one to be unreliab
Ok, ora, è normale che la pressione di scarico scenda così in basso? Pensi che si
ह्यूस्टन, ईगल। मुझे लग
Perth should be coming into view and it should be - oh, what a beautiful yaw check this is, and it's approximately 10 degrees left of path. Better make that about 12 degrees left to path. Just on the edge of the window, and that should give us 0 (degrees) yaw. I cannot see anything through the periscope that would help me. It is too - it is too cloudy. I'm coming out on VOX 1, 2, 1, 2. V
Zanzibar Cap Com, Friendship Seven на КВ. Вижу длинные полосатые облака внизу, справ
Понял. Скопировал. Таймер ва
Я передала тебе сообщение, пока ты спал. Валери сказала, чтобы ты знал, что она и дети с не
Sie sind auf Aufnahme. Wir sind im Dauer
And that might make your time line a little too crowded, getting your suits on there at the last m
9, 8, 7, 6, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1. Br
알겠습니다. 휴
67; 산화제는 63; 하강 탱크 1...은 64; 산
キャビンの温度はかなり下がり、スーツの設定は 7 
रॉजर। मैं आपके लिए एक सीएसआई लेकर आया हूँ: संज्ञा 11, 105 35 3700, 107 11 3000, 0538, सभी शून्य घटाने 
هدوء، هيوستن. لقد رفعنا درجة 
D'accord. Je pense qu'il serait préférable que vous sortiez votre liste de vérification sur
- - gefäl
Apollo 11 en mode 
Lasciami fare prima questo, poi ti darò 
네. 여기, 제가 가져온 곳에 다시 
음, 지금 기체가 방향 전환 모드에 들어갔다 나왔다 하면서 연료를 낭비하고 있어요.
日没直前のこの瞬間、白い粒子が次々と現れ始めました。青い空に現れ、地平線がもうすぐ見えてきます。そし
انتقل إلى حذف ما تبقى من الملفات التي تعمل عليها الآن، ثم ارجع إلى وضعية الطائرة، ثم تابع من حيث هو مذكور في خطة الطيران، أو إذا كنت تفضل تأجيل ذلك الوقت لبضع ساعات، إذا كنت ترغب في الحصول على بعض الراحة في
Ricevuto. Ha fun
That sounds pretty good. We're really getting in there
今、地中海上空を飛んでいます。とても分かりやすいですね。数隻の大型船が見えま
双子座4号，双子座4号。这里是休斯顿首都通讯中心。完
Remember, the most important part of the trip occurs in two days when we start back. So you 
Okay. Number one on the list of things is that the flight plan shows CDR should hit the sack. Number two, kind of a summary of your burn. All your and systems look GO. The trajectory shows that you have a CPA with a mode of 69.67 miles and the time of pericynthion is. You do have a capture on a good free return. It's a little bit early to completely evaluate the trajectory for corridor control. You'll have no update to the plus 11 block data. After looking through the curves, it looks like the battery-vent pressure is actually ze
Suggest that you back the fuel control back to yo
Okay. Mi 
Roger. Verstanden; das ist angeblich eine nicht-propulsive Entlüftung. D
Хорошо. На отметке 1 мы сделали фотосъемку мишени 90 и терминаторной съемки на юге для ближнего терминатора. Начиная со отметки 2, у нас мишень 12 и мишени 10, 14, 16, 19, 20, 21 и 23. К сожалению, мы попали в зону высокой скорости — я где-то попал в зону высокоскоростной пленки, и, кажется, эти 250-миллиметровые мишени были с
Roger. Tu 
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Мы заметили некоторые странности в показаниях датчика расхода кислорода. У нас есть подозрение, что датчик… Мы ожидали увидеть высокий расход кислорода при открытии вентиляционного клапана для отработанного топлива в положение «ВЕНТ». Этого не произошло. Мы также заметили странные показания, когда вы закрыли вентиляцион
Хорошо. Прежде чем начать копирование, поясню: эта процедура в основном заключается в активации манометра сверхкритического гелия, чтобы вы могли считать показания. Проблема в том, чтобы давление сверхкритического гелия не достигло 1800 psi к 103 часам, после чего существует вероятность разрыва разрывной мембраны при активации манометра. Исходя из давления при запуске и номинального времени повышения примерно на 6,5 psi в час, показания давления должны составлять около 710 psi. Подождите, пока у нас н
No, è tutto
不
Houston, Apollo 11. Quando superi
Что касается съемки при входе в атмосферу, если вы собираетесь использовать новый магазин цветной фотопленки для интерьерных съемок, мы рекомендуем следующие настройки экспозиции: f11 при 1/250 секунды, шесть кадров в секунду, фокусировка на расстоянии 7 футов для огненного шара; f2.0, 1/60 секунды, шесть кадров в секунду, фокусировка на расстоянии 50 футов, когда раскрываются парашюты. Если вы используете магазин, часть которого уже использована для интерьерных съемок, мы рекомендуем f16 при 1/500 секунды, шесть кадров в секунду, фокусировка на расстоянии 7 футов для о
휴스턴, 휴스턴, 안녕하세요. 여기는 아폴로 1
Okay. You can take some time figuring out the best attit
البوصلة تتأثر بشدة بأجهزة تحديد الاتجاه والجيروسكوبات الموجودة خلفها، لذا لا أستطيع تقريبها منها. أمسكها في منتصف المسافة تقريبًا بين لوحة العدادات ووجهي، مع الإشارة إلى خط في منتصف المسافة بين صندوق القفازات وحقيبة الأمتعة. عند وقت الفحص، تشير البوصلة مباشرةً إلى خط تثبيت الباب الأمامي. يبدو أن هذا هو وصلة تثبيت ال
D'accord, Jim. Pourriez-vous appuyer sur votre câble externe? Au fait, nous avons l'impression que vous utilisez environ 57 ml de plus que ce que nous estimons. Nous nous demandons quelle est la position de votre ceinture, ou si vous portez autre chose
Okay. Yes, copy all that. I th
Okay. Der primäre 
没错。你现在对我有什么看法？我
我已经系好了肩部安全带、腰部安全
一つ興味深い点があります。最初の数回の録音では、使えないと思っていた低速の情報を聞きました。今ははっきりと聞こえるので、接地の問題だっ
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호. 이
إليكم خبرًا طريفًا ومثيرًا للاهتمام. يبدو أن هناك عصابة شبابية جديدة في آن أربور، ميشيغان، تُدعى "عصابة جيلنت". تجوب هذه العصابة شوارع آن أربور، وتعمل سرًا، وتتجاوز القانون أحيانًا. يُطلقون على أنفسهم اسم "مقاتلو الخير". من بين أعمالهم: طلاء جسر كان مُغطى بعبارات بذيئة في إحدى الليالي. كما قاموا بإغلاق منزل مُهدم - كان يحظى بشعبية بين أطفال الحي، ولكنه خطير - بألواح خشبية. وملؤوا أحواض الزهور الف
글쎄, 잘 모르겠네. 음, 적어도 액체산소(LOX) 배출은 꽤 오래전에 시작했어야 할 텐데. 아마 완료됐겠지. 왜 물
了解。了解
جيد جداً. 
Roger. Juste un petit rappel: nous voulons nous assurer que vous laissez les disjoncteurs du radar de rendez-vous tirés. Cependant, nous voulons que le commutateur de mode du radar 
اسمع. أود منك أن تخ
ちょっと待って。ビル、それはもっとひどい。元の位置に戻れ。3時の方
كان الهدف محاذيًا تمامًا لزاوية الشبكة، وبنصف درجة إلى اليمين، لذا تم ضبط مؤشرات الرادار على الصفر بمقدار نصف درجة. أفضل
不，不。这里是个幸福的家。有人作伴当然更好。事实上，要是能有几亿美国人来
...nous en avons e
It's working good so fa
Хорошо. Попробуем другой, он немного лучше центрирован. На самом деле, это единственный другой снимок, на котором видна вся карт
로저, 프레드. 잘 읽었습니다. 16번 패널부터 시작합니다. 비행 디스플레이(FLIGHT DISPLAYS) 아래 1번째 줄: SE 크로스 포인터(SE CROSS-POINTERS), 열림; 시스템 브라보 - 쿼드 1 TCA(SYSTEM Bravo - QUAD 1 TCA), 닫힘; 쿼드 2, 닫힘; 쿼드 3, 닫힘; 쿼드 4, 닫힘. 두 번째 줄, 조명(LIGHTING) 아래: 투광 
Ok, Aquarius, ti consigliamo di eseguire il test di settaggio e di gimbal/acceleratore come da checklist. Selezi
Okay. S
फ्रेड, फोकस इतना अच्छा है कि हम तस्वीर के ऊपरी हिस्से में बड़े इंज
了解。あの時は真似しました。次のREVでは、お
Ok. Per quanto riguarda questo, abbiamo abbastanza ossigeno nella navicella... per arrivare fino in fondo. Non ho... modulo di comando... anell
आपको आपका मिल गय
Hey, Houston, that may have seemed like a very long final phase. The AUTO targeting was taking us right into a football field size - football field sized crater, with 
ハミング音のせいで、まるで電車か何かの乗り物に乗っているような錯覚に陥り、まるで線路の
Ich kann im Sichtfenster, im Periskop und im Fadenk
روجر، فريندشيب سفن. هل تسمع أي صوت اصطدام بالكبسول
잠시만 기다려 주세요. 그가 다시 차트를 
Okay. Your computer is in and verified. You can go to BLOCK, and we're going to have here in about 45 seconds. I'll start on the anyway. Time base 6P 24136, roll 179, pitch 045, yaw 001, burn time 5 plus 15, DELTA-VC prime 105 196 VI 35569, roll 357, pitch 091; plus 10 minutes; abort attitude is 199 degrees, and I don't believe you've got
11, Хьюстон. Текущий прогноз показывает приемлемые условия в вашем районе восстановления: местами 2000 футов, местами высокие ветры, ветер с 70 градусов, 13 узлов, видимость 10 миль, волнение моря около 4 футов. Вчерашний прогноз указывал на тропический шторм Клаудия, находящийся примерно в 500-1000 милях к востоку от Гавайев. На снимках со спутников, сделанных вчера днем, Клаудия рассеялась, поэтому, похоже, она представляет собой еще меньшую угрозу, чем раньше. Считается, что ваш район восстановления сейчас находится немного севернее межтропической зоны конвергенции, которую вы, вероятно, можете увидеть, выглянув в окно. Вчера также сообщалось о тропическом шторме Виола, расположенном западнее. В настоящее время он находится примерно в тысяче миль к востоку от Филиппин и движется на северо-запад. Тропический шторм Виола усиливается и должен перейти в категорию тайфуна в течение следующих 12 часов; однако это будет далеко к западу от вас. На самом деле, восход солнца еще не достиг Виолы. Когда это произойдет через несколько часов, вы, вероятно, сможете легко различить его со своей точки з
Ich kann es sehen. Haben Sie topografische Anhaltspunkte, die mir hier weiterhelfen könnten? Die automa
D'accord, Jack. Cela va consommer 120 ampères-heures, ce qui équivaut à 10 h
Roger. Evaporator NORMAL and Secondar
罗杰。哥伦比亚号飞船上的各位居民或许会感兴趣，今天是哥伦比亚的独立日。菲律宾的格洛丽亚·迪亚兹昨晚荣膺环球小姐桂冠。她击败了其他60位佳丽，摘得全球选美桂冠。迪亚兹小姐今年18岁，黑发黑眸，三围是34.5-23-34.5。亚军是澳大利亚小姐，以色列小姐和日本小姐分列第三和第四。周二晚上你们返回地球的时候，美国联盟和国家联盟的全明星队将在华盛顿进行比赛。预计洋基队的梅尔·斯托特尔迈尔将担任美国联盟的首发投手。目前还没有人预测谁会是国家联盟的首发投手。他们
ठीक है, अभी थोड़ी देर पहले जब मैं ऊपर था, तो मैंने देखा कि सर्विस मॉड्यूल के नीचे से कुछ नया रिसाव हो रहा है। मैंने खिड़की नंबर 1 से यह देखा, और साथ ही धातु का एक टुकड़ा भी देखा - लगभग 4 इंच चौकोर ढीला धातु का टुकड़ा जो इधर-उधर लुढ़क रहा था - चांदी के रंग का, और ऐसा लग रहा था कि यह
О, у вас есть довольно неплохие цифры, которые я вам вчера отправил, и у вас было примерно... Ну, я проверю, но вы явно перебор
D'accord, vous voulez le donner? – D'accord, 
Bene. Abbiamo un altro input qui, l'11, secondo cui i dati erano riconoscibili come un'immagine, ma non abbiamo alcuna valu
GDAは現状のま
Okay. Es sie
حسنًا، النجم الأول: الارتفاع المصحح 15 كيلومترًا زائد أو ناقص 4؛ والارتفاع الفعلي 12 كيلومترًا زائد أو ناقص 7. أما بالنسبة ل
La réponse est oui, nous prévoyons d'utiliser les deux. Avant de nous occuper de la pompe du chauffe
Hallo, Apollo 11. Houston. Wir möchten Sie bitten, zu Stern 45 
لا، لا. إنهم بطيئون للغاية؛ لا يبتعدون عني بأكثر من 3 أو 4 أميال في الساعة. إ
双子座4号，双子座4号，休斯顿
روجر. فهمت. كيف حا
ठीक है। चार्ली, बस एक पर रुको। जिम इधर-उधर द
منذ خفض صمام الماء في البدلة، ارتفعت د
D'ac
Okay, back to page 18. We'll continue on as is at 30 seconds, 10 seconds, 7 seconds, minus 5 seconds. At "ignition," no ignition and we'll add here, "no ignition, START pushbutton - push; still no
Хьюстон, Аполлон-13. П
터널 작업은 모두 완
Roger, wir haben die Anweisungen verstanden und möchten den Druck in O2-Tank 1 erhöhen. Schalten Sie daher bitte die Heizungen manuell ein; wir behalten den Druck für Sie im Auge
是的
Okay. D-8 06 35 00; Überholvorgang bei Hawaii; Rev 4. D-8 10:00; Überholvorgang bei Hawaii; R
Ricevuto. Passo a pagina 33. Meno 4 minuti. Okay. Scendendo nella pagina, sono circa alla riga 7, a "MOTORE GIMBAL": "MOTORE GIMBAL, OFF". Scendo a "MODE CONTROL", scrivi "MODE CONTROL:, ATT HOLD", e poi cancella "MONITORAGGIO QUANTITÀ P
Gemini VIII, Gemini VIII, this is Houston CAP COM. Standing by for any Rendezvous remark
Seven. All systems are still perf
ठीक है, वे चाहते हैं कि जब आपको एमएससी-1 की आवश्यकता हो, तो आप उसे जगाएं ताकि वह आप
Lors de mon dernier passage MSC à travers l'anomalie, je n'ai pas pu établir une bonne référence de lacet (
Es war definitiv unter mir. Ich hatte es seit etwa Carnar
Roger. Stavamo controllando gli orari precisi di inizio e
ठीक है। और एक उड़ान संबंधी डेटा ऐसा था जिसकी हमें ज़रूरत थी, लेकि
مرحباً يا جيم. هل يمكنك أن تعطيني فكرة عن مقدار استخدامك للمحركات النفاثة - ما هي نسبة استخدامك ل
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। राष्ट्रपति के साथ विदेश मंत्री 
好的。我查看了之前给你的天气情况——目标点附近2000英尺的散落云层上方可能存在6000
它——它会在足够晚
Gemini 4, Houston CAP CO
لقد رأيت الكثير من شمال أفريقيا... في وضح النهار - أعرفها جيدًا. لقد أنهيتُ للتو مهمة D-9 أبولو لاند مارك على الهدف 14. كان الرصد ممتازًا. كنت قد
ठी
Gemini 4。故障
13, 휴스턴
Sigma Seven，Sigma Seven，这里是 Mu
버즈, 여기는 휴스
嘿，埃德，你夜间过来的时候，真的
わかった。スーツがな
分か
罗杰，我们会向
Спасибо от всех нас, детей со
ठीक है
يا جيم، 
بما أنك في طريقك بالفعل، قد يهمك أن تعلم أن عالمة الفلك روبي غراهام من هيوستن تقول إن جميع الأبراج مناسبة لرحلتك إلى القمر. تقول إن نيل ذكي، ومايك يتمتع بحكمة، وباز قادر على حل المشكلات المعقدة. كما تقول إن نيل يميل إلى رؤية ال
Roger. Der
좋습니다. 이글
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11. क्
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 
Okay. Er schaut sich die Batteriestromstärke an, die Sie 
カプセルは現時点で非
Майк, сейчас мы видим дальний горизонт на частоте 220 Гц. Я еще раз проверю
«А
了解しました。問題はスキャナー
ニール、
أنا بخير. أنا مستعد لإنزاله الآن. ما 
Ricevuto. Tutto ok. La mia era a 2
조, 안녕. 2시간 12분에 산소 유량 높음(O2 FLOW HIGH) 표시등이 켜졌는데, 그 이후
네, 맞습니다. 주간에 롤 각도를 확인하고 싶습니다. 피치와 요는 아주 정확
여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 달에서 생중계로 전해드립니다. 방금 TV 카메라를 전환했습니다. 지난 16시간 동안 관측해 온 지구의 모습을 먼저 보여드렸습니다. 이제 지난 16시간 동안 고도 60마일(약 96km)에서 비행하며 관찰해 온 달의 모습을 보여드리겠습니다. 빌 앤더스, 짐 러벨, 그리고 저는 크리스마스 이브인 오늘, 달에서 실험과 사진 촬영, 그리고 우주선 엔진을 가동하여 기동하는 작업을 했습니다. 이제부터는 오늘 하루 종일 따라온 궤적을 따라가며 달의 일몰까지 보여드리겠습니다. 달은 우리 각자에게 다른 모습으로 다가옵니다. 오늘 본 달에 대
我觉得，就我们拿到的这个垫子而言，我
No, the refuse will be - we're planning to have a big dump back there into the 
收到，吉姆。无论如何，在你们进一步指示之前，我都会一直开着
たぶん彼をブロックしてしまったんだと思う。彼は高す
思っていたほ
Повторю ещё раз про углы
Roger. 10, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35189, minus 01513, minus 00346 180 007 000, November Alfa plus 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, Hauptstern Scorpii Delta (auch Dzuba genannt) unten 071, links 45, plus 0748 minus 16500 12995 36300; Hauptstern Sirius, Nebenstern Rigel, 129 155 010; vier Quads, 15 Sekunden, Füllstand
Хорошо, Базз. Во-первых, у нас есть данные о том, что ваши наклонные карты посадочной площадки расположены неправильно. Если вы проверите, мы предполагаем, что наклонная карта посадочной площадки среднего масштаба хранится в книге с лунными ориентирами. Мы предполагаем, что наклонная карта посадочной площадки большого масштаба хранится в конце книги с картами лун
And for our information, we've been watching a PCO2 again. Did you change a lithium hydroxi
휴스턴, 테이프 돌려주셨나요? 이상
ठीक है। जैसा कि हमने पहले बताया, यह मानकर चल रहे हैं
罗杰，救援区域的天气情况是：云量0.5，
Apollo 11, Houston. 
알겠습니다. 이제 RCS로 
Bene, vediamo, potremmo esserci un leggero sfasamento, il Sole sembra essere un po' più alto ora. Ecco la Terra che passa e sembra più o meno dalla stessa prospettiva. Dovrò 
Nous n'avons rien pour vous. Je vais me rensei
Oui, c'est certain. On ne se rend pas compte à quel point il fait froid ici quand le système ralentit. Je viens de compter les cycles… Il est environ 11 à 12 minutes maintenant, et le Soleil est au zénith; il éclaire donc la tuyère du module de service sans atteindre le va
D'accord. À l'étape 6, presque tout en bas (en fait, il s'agit de trois lignes avant le bas de l'étape 6), il y a une section qui indique « Réinitialiser l'évaporateur du circuit de refroidis
Okay. plus 90: /G&N, 63825, minus 1.54, plus 1.32,, minus 0491.7, plus 0000.1, plus 6634.0, 180, 228, 001; N/A; plus 0017.9, 6652.2, 7:37, 6626.5, 26, 155.4, 15.7; Zeta Sagittarius; up, 08.0; right 2.1; minus 22.81, minus 025.00, 1140.7, 34087, 32:14. Set starts: Arcturus, Denebola; roll 0
アジェナは好調のようです。TDAは外れました。リジッド化も完了しました。TDAのウィスカーは予想通り突き出ています。ダイポールも立ち上がり、エンジンも調子が良いようで
That's affirmative, Jack. What we have done is mar
ठीक है, 12:22 अपोलो यॉ ओरिएंटेशन ना
5 時 42 分には到着するはずでした。到着したのは 5 時 58 分だったの
Okay. This maneuver is going to put you very close to your scan limits for the high-gain antenna, so while you are making the maneuver, check your lights. If your scan limit light comes on, you still have got 15 degrees to play with. But the only message is, should you break lock, then you are going to have to go back and reacquire and do that maneuver over again, because you are going to be very close to t
मैं कहूंगा कि स्थानीय सतह का रंग लगभग वैसा ही है जैसा हमने सूर्य के इस कोण (लगभग 10 डिग्री) पर कक्षा से देखा था। यह लगभग रंगहीन है। यह धूसर है, और शून्य चरण रेखा की ओर देखने पर यह बहुत सफेद, चॉक जैसा धूसर दिखता है; और सूर्य से 90 डिग्री दूर देखने पर यह काफी गहरा धूसर, राख जैसा धूसर दिखता है। रॉकेट इंजन के धुएं से क्षतिग्रस्त या विचलित हुई कुछ सतही चट्टानें बाहर से हल्
로저, 이해했습니다. 18시부터 22시까지요. RKV 상공에서 Rev 12에 PLA와 CLA 업데이트를 받을 겁니다. Canary 상공에서 Rev 13에는 C-밴드 트랙을 받을 거고요. GMT 12시 16분에 연료 소모가 없는 궤도 항법을 할 수 있습니다. Rev 13에는 Carnarvon 상공에서 테이프 덤프를 받고, 그 이후
了解。それから、あそこでは楽しいことは何もないってことを覚えておいてください。CDUの監視をすることになっていて、もしそれがうまくいかなかったら、どこに飛んで戻ればいいのか判断するのがかなり難しくなるでしょう。それに
Jim, regarding window 5, I have a drawing here; and, when you're docked, you have approximately a 60-degree angle between the Z-axes of the two spacecraft. It appears that peering out window 5, you would be looking at the rendezvous radar on top of the whi
收到。如果尼尔有空的话，我们想问他一两个关
Okay, Jim. Dein Glück hält an. Die Tracking-Daten zeigen, dass dein Eintrittswinkel auf -6,24 gestiegen ist. Das basiert auf allen Daten, die wir zwischen der Kursmitte und dem Zeitpunkt des Einsatzes des SHe
我在这次飞行的黑暗面看到了 RCS 加热
Roger. Puoi misurarci la pressione sanguig
如果我能把比尔留下的一些食物收拾干净，然后收起来——这片区域叫做下层设备舱，我们的光学定位设备就在这里。我们所有的导航都是通过观测星星以及月球或地球的地平线来完成的。在这里，我们可以精确地确定我们在太空中的位置、方向和速度。正如弗兰克提到的，我们的计算机接收这些信息，并告诉我们如何机动才能安全返回。我负责操作扫描望远镜和六分仪，偶尔，如果太忙
저는 함선 분리 시간 업데이트를 받지 못했어요. 여전히 100시간 15분 정도 남아있는 것 같아요,
मुझे आपका नोड अपडेट 20 42 09;
Leider blicken Sie auch durch einen leichten Dunst auf den 
11番、ヒューストン。待機。まだ迎え
双子座八号，这里是休斯顿。你们的信号无法
Роджер. 45-1 101. 2+08. 12 37 50. 5+36. 10+33. 46-1 114. 2+25 14 12 47. 4+05. 9+33. 47-1 Передние и задние подруливающие устройства. 08 и 120. 0+14 и 2+30. 15 46 36. 3+17. 8+37. 48-1 Передние и задние подруливающие устройства. 24 и 120. 0+40 и 230, поправка 2+30. 17 20 19. 2+42. 8+43. 49-4 111. 2+21. 20 06 
弗兰克，如果你想展现勇气，那就来参加GOS
La pression cabine et l'altimètre cabine indiquent la même altitude. Elle devrait être de 13 000 pieds. Mark 10; je vois que la voile principale est sortie et réduite, et tout me semble correct. Le parachute principal est déployé. Le sac d'atterrissage est en mode automatique. La voile de freinage s'est détachée. Je vois un parachute parfaitement déployé, la visière est ouverte. La tempé
Gem
眼前这片小月海里有一个轮廓清晰的小撞击坑，看起来很新，而且另一个撞击坑正在靠近。探测器朝北。从我们的航迹来看，我们正向左横
Roger, Tranq
尼尔，这里是休斯顿。我们听得很清楚。
Oka
냉각수 펌프 두 개 모두 작동 중입니다. 우주복 팬도 두 개 모두 작동 중입니다. HF 송수신기는 재진입 모드입니다. 새로운 오디오 모드는 HF입니다. 지금은 그렇게 할 수 없습니다
अब हमें फ्लोरिडा का एक खूबसूरत नजारा दिख रहा है। हम केप को देख सकते हैं, बस उसका एक छोटा सा 
ठीक है, वैंस। डिसेंट वॉटर वाल्व बंद;
अच्छा दिख रहा है। ओह, अभ
That burn status report: it burned on time; burn time 2 minutes 23 seconds, seven-tenths VGX. A
Okay, Jack. The time line between minus 02:30 and 1 hour is real crowded, so you're really going to have to hustle, and we've decided to delete the entry check at minus 02:30. That'll give you a little more time in there. What we've decided to do with it is wait until after minus 1, just before you initialize the. If you have time, and only if you have time, do the entry check. Otherwise, forget it and go right on into initialization. You und
Ok, 11. Sembra che le prestazioni del motore durante entrambe le accensioni di questa missione siano state le stesse dei test di accettazione del motore. La lettura del PC di bordo è dovuta a un fattore di calibrazione noto tra ciò che si ha effettivamente nella camera e ciò che si legge sul manometro. Ci aspettiamo che il funzionamento a bancata singola sia di 90, ovvero 90 psi sul manometro con una pressione effettiva nella c
Domani mattina
حسنًا. معدل البت، منخفض؛ وظيفة الصوت، 
Sor
Bei
Apollo 8, Houston. Die 2 
Sogar die Kinder im Ferienlager gerieten in die Schlagzeilen, als Mike Jr. auf die Frage, ob sein Vater in die Geschichte eingehen würde, mit „Ja“ antwortete. Nach einer kurzen Pause fragte er dann: „Was ist Geschichte?“ In Washington plant Präsident Nixon, die Interstate Comm
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。現在は完全に手動操縦中です。これは、主にレトルト射撃後のヨーイングで、まだオリエンテーションモードのオンオフを繰り返し
ヒューストン、こちらはアポロ8号です。読んでいただければコピーする準備は
Apollo 11, this is Houston. Do you read?
रॉजर। लगता है हम एंटेना बदल रहे थे। प्रतीक्षा करें। जी हां, 11। हम यहां नीचे एंटेना बदल रहे थे। संक्षेप में, हमारे पास एक बहुत अच्छा प्ले
أجل، أعلم؛ تلك الأرقام لا تعني شيئًا. كانت حوال
Grazi
Хорошо. Теперь давайте рассмотрим несколько сантех
शांति, ह्यूस्टन, हम नकल करत
रॉजर। दोबारा कहिए। क्षेत्रफ
No,
Tranquility Base, Houston. We'd like some esti
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 382번 항목을 다시 읽어보니, 보조 증발
Wie wäre es mit einer Sauerstoffspülu
네, 잠깐만요. 잠깐
Voici Friendship Seven. Au démarrage, il passait en mode d'orientation en lacet, ce qui désorientait les autres axes. Il a continué ainsi un certain temps, dérivant lentement vers la droite, sans correction possible jusqu'à atteindre environ 20° d'écart. Il revenait alors rapidement sur ses roues et se corrigeait de son attitude de 20° à droite, avant de repasser en mode d'orientation sur la gauche.
Я зафиксировал время: 22:43 и 23:22. В ч
रॉजर। हम इसे
Джек, у нас много фоновых помех. Ты в гряз
روجر، لقد راهنت مع زوجتك على أنك ستصل إلى مسا
अपोलो 11,
- - 그리고 12.5는 광각이에요. 제가 헷갈리는 건 차량 간 촬영 시 12.5로 확대하라는 말인데, 아마 상대 차량이 화면에 제대로 나오는지 확인하라는 뜻이겠죠
好的。我们刚才似乎锁定了目标——大概一分钟吧。指针一直在上下摆动，俯仰和偏航指针也一直在晃动，但现在似乎已经自行稳定下来了。我们正在完成燃料电池的吹扫。3号氢气罐是最后一个关闭的，马上就要关闭了
Apollo 11, Houston. Se non l'hai ricevuto, Buzz, è stata una bella lettura sul PAD. Abbiamo un aggiornamento dell'orologio per te che ti faremo sapere non appena potremo pubblicarlo sul sito. Stiamo consegnando il tutto a Honeysuckle,
ठीक है। हमने डी-8 प्रयोग
Bien, Apollo 8. Tous les systèmes, après un rapide coup d'œil, semblent fonctionner parfaitement. Nous disposons d'une mise à jour complète des quantités, donc cette information est disponible. La température de la conduite d'alimentation en comburant et celle du carburant sont toutes deux à 73 degrés. Le profil cryogénique est actif: batterie A (nos calculs indiquent 39,63 ampères-heures), batterie B (37,94) et batterie Charlie (38,46). Le système de communic
了解しました。レトロディレイスイッチが通常の位置にあるかど
罗杰，我们照办，我们想提高 1 号氧气罐的压
Okay. I have a t
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11
자, 여기요. 이건 치워두고, 이제 본격적으로 레트로 준비 체크리스트를 하나씩 살펴볼 거예요. 절대
バズ、了解。最初のエントリはACバスAの下側にあります。線はハイゲートまでずっと伸びています。実際には、線は「NO-GO ACバスA」と書くべきで、その地点でACバスAは通行禁止になります。その地点以降は両方のバスが通行禁止になります。つまり、ハイゲートから両方のバスを鉛筆で書き込めば、その線は正しいことになり
Roger, Jim. Veuillez noter que nous commençons à vous entend
이미 35단계에서 이 내용을 확인하셨을 수도 있습니다. UP TELEMETRY를 BLOCK, VERIFY로 설정하고, 바로 다음 단계에서 명령 모듈 히터를 회로 차단기에 CLOSED로
よく分かり
Ok. Volevo solo che ne foste consapevoli e che ci pensaste e che ci rifletteste sulle possibili implicazioni per il piano di volo. Poi vi mostrerò questo grandangolo e il commento sulla Luna e vedrò quali sezioni ritengono più appropriate. Ok. Sulla pergamena, Frank voleva che verificassimo l'ordine in cui poteva aspettarsi di vedere il profilo di ingresso, e il primo profilo che appare è etichettato "Nonexit Numero 2" e si tratta dell'ingresso a corto raggio e ad alta velocità. Il secondo profilo che apparirà è intitolato "The 3500 Mile" che è anche un ingresso ad alta velocità, ma è quello che usereste nel caso in cui dovessimo raggiungere distanze di ingresso più lunghe. Poi il terzo profilo sarà "Nonexit Entry Numero 1", seguito da un quarto da 3500 miglia. Quindi avete quattro profili di ingresso. I numeri 1 e 3, man mano che li incontrate, sono i brevi raggi, mentre i numeri 2 e 4 sono i raggi a lungo raggio. Per quanto riguarda il coldsoak, credo che abbiamo parlato di cosa faremo lì, ma da qualche parte entro un'ora circa, vorremo entrare nel vivo della questione. Di certo non vo
Are they ever. It feels like I'm going back toward 
D'accord, à votre convenance, nous vous demandons de bien vouloir effectuer un relevé de température cabine et de le consigner dans votre carnet de vol après le vol. Nous souhaiterions connaître les températures ambiantes (bulbe sec et bulbe humide) de la cabine, ainsi que les températures à l'entrée d'air de la combinaison (bulbe sec et bulbe humide). Retirez la buse bleue et effectuez le relevé directement au niveau du flux d'oxygène. Si possible, nous aimerions également connaître la température de la surface de l'écoutille et celle de la paro
Это же большой М
Okay,
Хорошо. Нам бы хотелось немного понаблюдать за развитием событий, прежде чем давать рекомендации. Однако нам потребуется ваше мнение по э
加油，
Roger. Wir möcht
了解。グアイマス上空で重要なテープダンプ。取得時刻は20時
Roger, 11. We don't have to worry about it any more. The altimeter out there is now standard, 29.92; but basically what it means is that if I give you a plus 10 feet, for instance, that means that you will 
11, Houston. We'd like to try the same procedure once more. We'll leave the carrier a little
はい。暗闇の中で、77時間ほどで終わ
是的，如果你愿意的话，你可以获得正交
نعم،
Okay. "'Twas the night before Christmas and way out in space, the Apollo 8 crew had just won the moon race; The headsets were hung by the consoles with care, In hopes that Chris Kraft soon would be there; Frank Borman was nestled all snug in his bed, While visions of 's danced in his head; And Jim Lovell, in his couch, and Anders, in the bay, were racking their brains over a computer display, When out of the, there arose such a clatter, Frank sprang from his bed to see what was the matter. Away to the sextant he flew like a flash, To make sure they weren't going to crash. The light on the breast of the moon's jagged crust, Gave a luster of green cheese to the gray lunar dust, When what to his wondering eyes should appear, But a Burma Shave sign saying 'Kilroy was here.' But Frank was no fool; he knew pretty quick, That they had been first; this must be a trick. More rapid than rockets, his curses they came, He turned to his crewmen and called them a name. Now Lovell, now Anders, now don't think I'd fall For an old joke you've written up on the wall. They spoke not a word, but grinning like elves, And laughed at the
What's t
Roger, on Rev 1
Gemini 4, 
了解。ロッドと会って、今夜の教会の礼拝のために少し祈りを捧げるつもりだったんだ。それ
Roger. Okay, Jim, abbiamo deciso che ti è rimasto un po' di carburante con cui possiamo giocare qui nel Piano di Volo. Vorremmo
Concernant les livres, il faudrait vraiment veiller à choisir des anneaux plus robustes. Nous avons ren
네. 최종 보관 단계인 34단계에서, 라디에이터로의 2차 글리콜 공급 및 바이패스 확인 항목이 있습니다. 이 부분을 확인하는 김에, 382번 패널, 즉 냉각수 제어 패널로 이동하여 증발기 냉각수 제어 밸브(1차 및 2차)를 모두 '자동(AUTO)'으로 설정하겠습니다. 영하 12시간 동안 저온 냉각을 했다면 당연히 해야 했을 작업이지만, 이번에는 
Roger. Die Lichter
우주선의 자세를 요(yaw) 180°, 롤(roll) 170°로 제
وفي المقابل، يرغب الجراح في الحصول ع
我要
Roger. Un altro commento: nonostante abbia suscitato molte polemiche durante le riunioni sulla priorità dei dati, sembra che un'i
この収納で最も重要なことは、TEI 中に受けるであろう衝撃に耐えられることを確認することであり、帰宅途中
Roger. Before we get too far along, we'd like to see, essentially with the secondary evaporato
Le drapeau ou les lettres sont... On dirait qu'ils sont brûlés autant au décollage qu'au retour de la 
حسنًا. أعتقد أن ما سنفعله هنا هو، إذا رأيت أن ا
Bonjour, Hou
알았어, 프레드. 마지막 부분은 너무 불분명해. 연결을 끊고
روجر. 11، /: 45597، 0 - تصحيح - هذا ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 36325، ناقص 01727، زائد 01428 180
Fred, dopo la masterizzazione, ti invieremo le istruzioni per lo spegnimento o le modifiche alla checklist. Allo stesso tempo,
ジェミニ4号、こちらはヒューストンCAP COMです。コンピュータのスイッチ
Gemini 4,
Sigma Seven。Auto One Cap Com。你读过
Und meine einz
Okay, Manöverplattform, Zweck: Vorbeiflug, /G&N; 63385; plus 0,97, minus 0,23;; plus 0212,7,
好的，确认无误。下一步是将主总线连接开关 B/
Okay, crew. About the only other thing I've got for you right now is an update to your pad for lift-off plus 35. This is a change to t
Ce
ठीक है,
ठीक है। प्लस 1197 माइनस 16500 12681 35608, उत्तर दिशा संरेखित करें, तारे सेट करें, रोल 068, पिच 097, यॉ 356, उलेज शून्य; अन्य: एक, तीव्र वापसी,
了解。分
Merci beaucoup. Il est rare que Mike Collins cherche à être serviable, m
हाँ, चार्ली, यह बिल्कुल सही है। कभी-कभी यह हमें बातें बताता है और कभी-कभी हम इसे बातें बताते हैं, और ज्यादातर यह हमसे बातें 
D'acco
嘿
시동을 걸 때, 기동을 끄고 자이로스코프를 대략 0에 가깝게 설정한 후, 마침내 자이로스코프를 정상 상태로 되돌렸습니다. 고출력 전환은 없었습니다. 그런데 0에 가깝게 설정한 후, 재진입 선택 자세에서 고출력 전환이 발생했습니다. 하지만 
你好，瓜
Roger. Ti ho letto circa quattro per quattro. Potresti darmi un breve conteggio, per
わかった、チャーリー。今すぐ数インチでやってみるよ。数字はプラス04511、プラス09021、プラス3598
روجر. حوالي ١٠٨ ساعات. سنوافيك بتحديث حول هذا الموضوع لاحقا
从这个角度看，我们的显示器画面非
جيميني 4، كارنارفون. إذا قرأت، هل يمكن للطيار أن يضع مقياس ا
전압 39.
알겠습니다. 이제 약 2분 동안 업링크를 업보이스 백업으로 전환하겠습니다. 업보이스 연결 끊김 소리가 들리는 데 몇 초 정도 걸릴 수 있습니다. 업 텔레메트리 스위치를 업보이스 백업으로 설정해 두시면 됩니다. 만약 이 과정이 잘 진행되지 않으면, 제가 지금 시
ठीक है, जैक। प्रक्रिया ठीक है, और फिर हमें वापस जाकर कुछ करना पड़ा। पहली पंक्ति ठीक है, "BAT 5 और 6 OFF" को काट दें, उसे हटा दें। और अगली पंक्ति भी हटा दें, जिसमें लिखा है "पैनल 11 से 16 ASCENT ECA CONTROL, खुला।" फिर हमा
Хорош
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. كل هذه الجسيمات الصغيرة؛ هناك ال
바꿔. 좋아. 임무 타
Это хороший вопрос. Думаю, сейчас за рул
حسناً. لقد دفعت للخلف - دفعت للخلف قليلاً نحوها يا تشا
13，休斯顿。顺便问一下，我们想知道高增益天线锁定效果如何。我们的信号强
여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 달에서 생중계로 전해드립니다. 방금 TV 카메라를 전환했습니다. 지난 16시간 동안 관측해 온 지구의 모습을 먼저 보여드렸습니다. 이제 지난 16시간 동안 고도 60마일(약 96km)에서
Okay; real fine. We had a good picture of Jim there for a minute. I have the lift-off plus 8 pad
ठीक है। मेरे पास इसका एक समाधान है। 4.5 की गति 
...Осматриваемся
Apollo 11, this is Houston. We have not noticed any change in the signal coming
روجر. لقد وضعنا بكرة التسجيل على الجانب الخطأ. سنستمر في تدويرها حتى نحصل على مس
저분은 로저입니다. 참고로, 어센션 측에서 지난번 접속 시에 귀하의 접속 내용을 확인했
أبولو 8، هذه 
Ich gehe jetzt – ich bin jetzt in der Position, nur noch die Aufzeichnung zu machen. Ich glaube, die beste Antwort auf die Frage nach der Autokinese ist, dass es keine gibt. Ich habe keine bemerkt – und ich neige dazu, die Horizontale mit meinem Kopf auszurichten – eine horizonta
أرج
Bene. Mostriamo
Roger. Tut mir leid, dass es so schnell ging, aber wir hatten hier eine St
ما هو م
هذا سلبي. لقد تمت الإجابة على هذا ال
지금은 당신 속마음을 잘 
我们现在准备好了。我们正在做这件事。
Roger. Non vogliamo che tu accetti quei voti. Questo perché, bypassando il controllo del trunnion bias, hai ancora numeri grandi in quei registri, quindi procedi quando... dopo aver eseguito il controllo del trunnion bias. Quei numeri diventeranno piccoli in seguito, ma non accet
La
我々は、おそらくビッグVの向こう
D'accord. Votre radiateur secondaire est à environ 70 degrés (72 degrés); la sor
시간이 되시면 CSQ를
你好，Sigma Seven，Cal
六分
좋아요. 월리, 태도가 아주 좋아 보이고, 시계
Hier spricht Sigma Se
알겠습니다. 배터리 잔량 좀 알려주시겠어요? 배터리 상태가 괜찮으면 3
Ja. Die Transienten waren deutlicher spürbar al
Apollo 
ええ、
시야 확보가 안 된 상태에서 송신합니다. 가시선 확보가 되었습니다. 지상 경과 시간은 제가 표시한 대로 4시간 29분 30초입니다. 오로라 세븐에게 시야 확보가 안 된 상태에서 송신합니다. 모든 톤 스위치가 켜져 있는지, 경고등이 밝게 켜져 있는지, 역추진 수동 퓨즈 스위치가 켜져 있는지, 역추진 퓨즈 스위치가 꺼져 있는지 확인하십시오.
We have star 0
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 피치는
روجر. لقد قمنا بتشغيل مضخة الوقود الاحتياطية "ب". هل
Roger, Seven. Wir empfehlen, für die dritte Umlaufbahn die Gyroskope nach Belieben zu verwenden, entweder im Normal- oder im Freilaufmodus. Sollten die Scanner vor dem Bremsmanöver in der dritten Umlaufbahn nicht korrekt programmiert
روجر. نسبة الوقود
Roger, 11. The problem on that initially - starting up the was we failed to do the which - and load the desired initial attitude; so the tried to take it back to the old attitude that we had started up in number of hours to go. That's why we picked up the rates in the other axes. We're going to wait in this attitude for about 20 minutes to dump out the rates again, and than we'll proceed with the and load our attitude that we have a
极光七号，这里
روجر، هيوستن. هذا ما نحاول فعله. أحاول ضبط زاوية الرؤية على 15 درجة. كان من الصعب جدًا، مع سطوع الأرض، إيجاد نجم مناسب لوضعه في السدس. أحاول استخدام نظ
收到，双
Привет, это Карнарвон. Вы можете отк
Okay. Another thing to keep in mind is that we
Hier ein Bericht von Harry Rosenthal von Associated aus Houston. Zwei Weihnachtsmänner verschönern dem zweijährigen Jeffrey Lovell den Weihnachtsabend. Der erste klopfte an seine Haustür und brachte Geschenke. Der zweite holte seinen Papa vom Mond zurück. Der erste trug einen roten Anzug und einen weißen Bart und rief laut genug, um es bis zum Ende der Straße zu hören. Der zweite war ein riesiges Triebwerk, das hinter dem Mond Flammen spuckte, und Tausende warteten gespannt auf die Nachricht, dass es gezündet hatte. „Bitte beachten Sie, dass es einen Weihnachtsmann gibt“, waren die ersten Worte von Apollo 8, als die Funkstille 15 Minuten später endete und die besorgte Welt darüber informierte, dass das Triebwerk seine kritische Zündung durchgeführt hatte. „Keiner von uns erwartet jemals ein schöneres Weihnachtsgeschenk als dieses“, sagte Ken Mattingly von der Missionskontrolle. „Vielen Dank an alle auf der Erde. Sie wissen, dass wir es ohne Sie nicht geschafft hätten“, antwortete Oberst Frank Borman, der Kommandant des Raumschiffs. In diesem Moment erstrahlte ein Weihnachtsbaum vor den Konsolen in der Missionskontrolle, und Astronaut Harrison Schmidt las der Crew eine Weltraumversion von „Ein Besuch vom Nikolaus“ vor. „Es war die Nacht vor Weihnachten, und weit draußen im Weltraum hatte die Apollo-8-Crew gerade das Rennen zum Mond gewonnen“, begann sie. Die Crew der Missionskontrolle hatte die Feier verschoben, bis Jeffreys Vater, Marinekapitän James Lovell, zusammen mit Major William A. Anders und Oberst Borman von der Luftwaffe sicher auf dem Heimweg waren. An jedem anderen Heiligabend wären die Familien der Astronauten zum Weihnachtsgottesdienst in der Kirche gewesen, aber dieses Jahr saßen sie alle gebannt vor ihren Fernsehern. Die Häuser in der Nähe des bemannten Raumfahrtzentrums waren alle festlich geschmückt. Die Rasenflächen rund um das Haus der Lovells und in seiner ganzen Gemeinde Timber Cove waren mit Lichterkette
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन से बैटरी की
Ok, ho preparato il carico, hai il nuovo orario TR. Siamo in attesa dell
Comment ont-ils fait pour
In the beginning, the operation with the precluded immediate starting up of our sightings as we had scheduled since we had another evasive maneuver. The dumping of the caused a tremendous amount of - of pseudo stars in 
Это Хьюстон. Я вас прекрасно понимаю и знаю, что вы совершили три 
C'est juste en dessous
Why don't you - why don't you take a rest for awhile, you'v
알겠습니다. 몇 초 정도 차이가 날 수도 있
Давайте посмотрим,
了解。ハワイCAP COMが待機
क्या आप VOX का उपयोग कर रहे हैं, क्य
Ici Friendship Seven sur UHF. En survolant la zone de récupération, j'ai aperçu un sillage, ce qui semb
我说我已经习惯了用平移控制来控制飞
Und weiter geht's. Falls das Triebwerk während des Brennvorgangs ausfällt und die Anzeige NOUN 97 blinkt, sollten Sie mit PROCEED fortfahren, dann den Leerlauf erhöhen, TRIEBWERKSSTART auf PUSH stellen und den Sinkflug mit TRIEBWERKSÜBERREGUNG EIN angehen. Okay. Nun zu den allgemeinen Informationen. Falls Sie PC-2 nicht gezündet haben, wäre P-P-4 wahrscheinlich der frühestmögliche
ジェミ
हमें 5:42 बजे वहाँ पहुँच जाना चाहिए था। हम 5:58 ब
Роджер. Игл. Для X минус 00060, Y плюс 00620
好的。我们
네. 지금 열려 있는 구역을 알려드리겠습니다. FLOOD, MAIN 
ああ、これは手先の器用さのテ
Well - Okay - Well, this morning, let's just see how close it comes to being parallel to the M-line. Before we started marking for the first time, it appeared that the computation of - of those three angles was somewhat off, and that I was wasting a lot of gas by going to those three angles and then having to make large attitude changes after that to get the M-line parallel. In some cases it appeared to be just an accepted attitude required, and you all
Roger. We've got an awful lot of these stars to mark on now, Mike, and they were havin
Das ist natürlich so. Anscheinend muss ic
У нас точные измерения артери
Je roule mai
La c
Innanzitutto, sono in rientro automatico; sono in modalità automatica; i giroscopi sono normal
حسنًا
And, Eagle, here. I have read out address in the 404, 405 and 406, and I had believed that 405 and 406 would both be all zeros, and I would propose maybe that I reset them to zero. I realize that 404 should be a negative number, and it is minus 1
はい、ジャック。私たちはリフトオフ設
Cela est c
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 제가 여기 있는
宝贝，我希望比正
Sehr, sehr gut. Wir hätte
どういう意味ですか？月と太陽の直線上の一直線を作るということですが、それ以外
Okay. Ich gebe Ihnen einfach, was ich habe. In der obersten Reihe 11 befinden sich die vier AC-BUS-TIE-Leistungsschalter und der AC-BUS-VOLTS-Leistungsschalter. Das war's. In der zweiten Reih
En regardant à l'étranger, on constate que la première autoroute de Corée du Sud, reliant Séoul au port d'Incheon, a été baptisée « Autoroute Apollo » en hommage à votre voyage. Je crois que nous avons mentionné hier soir que le président Nixon a déjà entamé son tour du monde et qu'il se trouve aujourd'hui à San Francisco, première étape de son périple. Il se rendra ensuite à bord de l'USS Hornet, d'où il assistera au retour de votre vaisseau spatial. Il prévoit de visiter sept pays, dont la Roumanie, au cours de ce voyage. Comme vous le savez sans doute, il a dû manquer le matc
罗杰。不适用，另加 00188 
잠시 기다려 주세요
मैं... रवैये के बारे में बात करना चाहता हूँ, एड, और मैं चाहता हूँ कि 
Bien reçu, Guaymas. Mon mode de pilotage est maintenant en commandes de vol électriques; les gyroscopes sont désactivés, je suis en vol – la manœuvre est désactivée. Je passe directement en mode automatique. Mon état est bon; l’état de la capsule est bon. Le carburant est à 69 %, l’oxygène à 88-100 %. La température de la vapeur de la cabine est montée à +10 °C, je pense qu’il s’agit d’une erreur de mesure, et la température de la vapeur de la combinaison redesce
Okay. I heard you say something about using the Hycon camera 
Roger. Danke, 
还
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We've been noting some funnies on the O2 flow indicator transducer. We've kind of got a suspicion that the transducer - We expected to see an O2 flow pegged high with the waste stowage vent to VENT. It was not. We also noted some funny indications when you closed the waste stowage vent valve. We're going to continue to take a look at this through the night, and we'll be with you in the morning with an assessment of the problem. Also, we'd like to ask specifically, when you place the waste stow
أبولو 8، هيوستن. ض
Сейчас буду только записывать, пока не переключусь обратно н
Pourriez-vous – peut-être – vous retourner et me passer cette clé rapideme
Côté nourriture: nous en sommes au deuxième jour, deuxième repas. Nous avons tous les deux consommé les boissons réhydratantes, les jus et environ
La pression en cabine est actuellement d'environ 4,8 psi. La combinaison est apparemment à environ 4 psi, et le manomètre de la combinaison ind
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 버뮤다 캡 콤
Frie
Roger, ich verstehe, dass d
外は真っ黒な空なのに、窓に光が反射しているんです。あなたはどうですか
イーグル、ヒューストン。データがあれば、いくつか
아폴로 11호,
收到，休斯顿。声音洪亮清晰
Je vous donnerai (zone 
And, Eagle, Houston. We'll be standing by in this mode for a minute or so
OK. 134 17; LIBÉRATION DE LA CLÉ; CONTINUER… ça aurait dû être - 124 01. E
Right. And another thing we've
Ok, sarà la sequenza n. 14 alle 
روجر. نحن نرى مركز الأرض كما يُرى من المركبة الفضائية في شرق المحيط الهادئ. لم نتمكن من رؤية سلسلة جزر هاواي، لكننا نرى بوضوح الساحل الغربي لأمريكا الشمالية. الولايات المتحدة، ووادي سان جواكين، وسلسلة جبال سييرا نيفادا، وباخا كاليفورنيا، والمكسيك وصولاً إلى أكابولكو وشبه جزيرة يوكاتان؛ ويمكنك الرؤية عبر أمريكا الوسطى إلى الساحل الشمالي لأمريكا الجنوبية، وفنزويلا، وكولومبيا. لست متأكدًا م
收到。正在切
रॉजर। आप पृथ्वी को देख रहे हैं, जैसा कि हम इसे अपनी बाईं खिड़की से देख रहे हैं, पृथ्वी का लगभग आधा हिस्सा। हम पूर्वी प्रशांत महासागर को देख रहे हैं, और स्क्रीन के ऊपरी आधे हिस्से के उत्तरी भाग में, हम उत्तरी अमेरिका, अलास्का, संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका, कनाडा, मैक्सिको और मध्य अमेरिका को देख सकते हैं। दक्षिण अमेरिका टर्मिनेटर के ठीक बाहर या छाया के अंदर अदृश्य 
D'acc
フレッド、この司令船の水酸化リチウムボンベを自作するんですが、少なくとも2個作って、一度に2個ずつ使います。ホースのセットごとに1個ずつです。この自作のボンベの1つを赤い接続部に繋ぎ、空気を水酸化リチウムボンベを通して吸い込み、青い接続部から吹き出します。それから、このボンベを宇宙服のループから取り外します
ह
Роджер. То
收到。是两个断路器，
روجر، رحلة أبولو الأولى
Roger. I have a slight change in your Catch-up Maneuver update when you are ready to copy
وأنا كذلك يا إد! لم يكن ا
지금 바로 
ジェミニ7号、こちらジェミニ6号。物体を発見しました。衛星のような物体で、北から南へ、おそらく極軌道を周回してい
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. لقد أطلق جهاز الإنذار الرئيسي ثلاث مرات حتى الآن. ها هو الإ
D'accord. Nous allons gratter les blocs, puis gratter « PRO VERB 96 »; ens
Okay. Dies ist ein 9, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 34188, minus 01353, plus 00780 180 008 001, November Alfa, plus 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, down 131, left 28, plus 0758, minus 16500 12987 36277; Hauptstern Sirius, Nebenstern Rigel, 129 155 010; vier Quads, 15 Sekunden, Gasfüllung, Horizonte auf der 1,2-Grad-Fensterlinie bei T minus 3; Hochgeschwindigkeitsverfahren mit minus Mike Alfa verwenden. Nach Durchsicht der Brenndaten Ihrer vorherigen Brennvorgänge scheint die Triebwerksleistung eine Brenndauer von 3 Sekunden zu ermöglichen, länger als die, die Sie bisher gemessen haben. Die Zahl sollte mit dem Ergebnis des Computers übereinstimmen. Daher haben wir dies in den Vergangenheitsdaten nicht berücksichtigt; Sie können jedoch davon ausgehen, dass der Motor im Normalbetrieb eine Brenndauer von 3 bis 3,7 Sekunden länger als die berechneten Zeiten aufwe
शुरुआत में, एक और बचाव पैंतरेबाज़ी के कारण, निर्धारित समय पर हमारी अवलोकन प्रक्रिया तुरंत शुरू नहीं हो सकी। इस प्रक्रिया के कारण क्षेत्र में बड़ी मात्रा में नकली तारे बन गए, जिससे ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन लगभग असंभव हो गया। हमने जो तरीका विकसित किया था, वह भी कारगर नहीं रहा। अंततः मैंने जो तरीका अपनाया, वह था सीरियस तारे तक जाना, जो हमारा सबसे चमकीला तारा था, वहाँ से शाफ्ट और ट्रनियन प्राप्त करना, और फिर अंतरिक्ष यान को सीरियस तक ले जाना ताकि उसका उपयोग ऑप्टिक्स के लिए किया जा सके, जो हमने बाद में किया। प्रकाश प्रकीर्णन के संबंध में, ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि हमारे निष्क्रिय तापीय नियंत्रण के दौरान लगभग किसी भी स्थिति में, स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में प्रकाश प्रकीर्णन हो रहा है। यह मुख्य रूप से स्कोप के केंद्र के ठीक पार शून्य से लगभग 10 डिग्री दोनों दिशाओं में प्रकाश की एक चौड़ी पट्टी के रूप में दिखाई देता है। इस क्षेत्र में तारों को देखना बहुत मुश्किल है। पुनः संरेखण सफल रहे हैं। मैंने सेक्स्टेंट में तारे को देखकर संरेखण तो कर लिया, लेकिन स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में रेगोर या मेनकेंट जैसे मामलों में उपयोग किए जाने वाले तारे की पहचान नहीं कर पाया। पृथ्वी का जो पहला तारा अवलोकन मैंने किया, उसमें क्षितिज बहुत धुंधला दिखाई दिया। लेकिन पृथ्वी के क्षितिज और वायुमंडल के बीच एक स्पष्ट रेखा दिखाई दी। लैंडमार्क लाइन-ऑफ-साइट फिल्टर ने इस क्षितिज को स्पष्ट करने में मदद की। अंतरिक्ष और वायुमंडल के ऊपरी भाग के बीच एक बहुत धुंधला और अस्पष्ट क्षितिज है, और इसका उपयोग करना बहुत मुश्किल है। जैसा कि मैंने पहले कहा, कभी-कभी सूर्य के निकट होने पर चंद्रमा को देखने पर, चंद्रमा के आसपास का क्षेत्र, चंद्रमा के आसपास का अंतरिक्ष अंधेरा नहीं होता, बल्कि हल्का नीला दिखाई देता है। और सूर्य के ऑप्टिक्स के आसपास होने पर तारे के साथ संरेखण के दौरान सेक्स्टेंट में देखने पर भी यही स्थिति होती है। हालांकि, मुझे सेक्स्टेंट में इन तारों को खोजने में कोई कठिनाई नहीं होती है। तारा क्षितिज माप के दौरान, मुझे सीरियस, प्रोसियोन या कैनोपस जैसे तारों को पृथ्वी के सं
Bien reç
D'une manière générale -
Jack dice che è sicuramente il modulo di servizio che era... e q
ऐसा लग रहा था मानो वह दोलन करते हुए लुढ़क रहा हो। वह थोड़ी देर लुढ़कता और फिर ऐसा लगता जैसे जैसे उसमें से गैस 
80, माइनस 0004; 81 00001 था; 82
Der Finanzausschuss des Repräsentantenhauses hat gestern Steueränderungen für Ölkonzerne, Banken und Versorgungsunternehmen beschlossen, die den Bundeseinnahmen jährlich bis zu zwei Milliarde
Roger. Beautiful. We've got the load. If you'll give us and ACCEPT, we'll send you 
ठीक है। मैं तीन स
हाँ, चलिए शुरू 
Нет. Скорее всего, нет, но в любом случае, это довольно интере
好了。范斯，我
Ricevuto. Area 36-4 4
मैं दाईं ओर मुड़ने वाला 
Ro
アル・ビーンのために
C'est exact. Nous avons remarqué la vibration, mais elle n'était pas suffisamment forte pour que nous pensions qu'une catastrophe allait se produire; elle a simplement commencé à vibrer, puis le voyant EN s'est allumé, puis la vibration a disparu e
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。由于比特率较低，我们无法监测您是否已开始燃料电池吹扫。如果您尚未开始，我们可以现在就开始；如果您可以，请在吹扫过程中随时
向左滚动，
Bene, in quell'ultimo passaggio abbiamo scattato circa 38 foto con il Synoptic Terrain Photography, partendo un po' a est di San Diego e fino a quando non abbiamo incontrato di nuovo la copertura nuvolosa. Abbiamo ripreso con immagini intermittenti non appena abbiamo iniziato a sorvolare la parte meridionale degli Stati Uniti, passando per l'Alabama e il Mississipp
略有偏航振
Gemini 4, reading you loud and clear 
Роджер. Понял. Я дам этом
Роджер. Понятно. Фазовая регулировка 02 18 25; Дельта-V, 50,6; 1 плюс 08; 
سننتقل إلى تجربتك، ث
アポ
Роджер, спасибо. Рад виде
لقد قمنا بمقارنة تأثير السطح الحر للسائل على مركز ثقل
Роджер. Кажется, всё в порядке. Всё выглядит хорошо. Автоматический режим заправки заполнился на 55 процентов. Пролетаю 70 000 футов, 65 000. Положение самолёта очень стабильное. Приближаюсь к 60 (тысячам). Система управления скоростью работает отлично. Приближаюсь к 50 (тысячам). Выглядит отлично. Приближаюсь к 45 000. Перегрузка упала примерно до
حسنًا يا جيم. لدينا أربع خطوات هنا لنقدمها لك لطلب العودة إلى وضع النسخ الاحتياطي للصوت المنخفض، إذا كنت مستعدًا للنسخ
Okay, Fred. Der nächste Schritt ist ganz einfach: Stellen Sie den Schalter für die Treibstofftemperaturanzeige auf Sinkflug 1, lesen Sie die Treibstoff- und Sauerstofftemperaturen ab, stellen Sie ihn auf Sinkflug 2, lesen Sie erneut d
Должно быть, это будет оч
R-dots, all the way through, looked fairly nominal and the one backup solution that I did get for the mid-co
好的。在第 4 行：在“加热器”下方，您的四个四路加热器应关闭，打开“显示器”，打开“
Хорошо. Эт
Убедитесь, что переключатель ACS STATUS находится в положении ВЫКЛ.
पहले ऐसा होता था कि आप LOI 2 पर नियंत्रण नहीं पा सकते थे; कि कोई भी बर्न, क
Okay. Drücken Sie ENTER, 333 ENTER und lesen Sie dann Register 1 aus. Der Wert von Register 1 sollte 10.000 sein. Falls nicht, kann ich Ihnen Anweisungen geben, wie Sie ihn auf 10.000 bringen. Wenn er wie erwartet 10.000 ist, drücken Sie ENTER. Das führ
네. 이제 이 방법이 효과가 없을 경우를 대비해 추가적인 지침을 드리겠습니다. ALC(알루미늄계 반사경)에 대해 말씀드리자면, 20초 동안 방해받지 않고 기다려야 합니다. ALC가 제대로 작동하려면 20초 동안 아무런 방해도 받지 않아야 합니다. 만약 제가 알려드린 절차가 효과가 없다면, 다른 필터와 다양한 조합을 사용하는 추가 방법을 알려드리겠습니다. 편광 필터와 빨간색 및 파란색 필터 홀더를 준비해 주세요. 이 방법
Oka
केबिन प्रेशर और केबिन अल्टीमीटर ऊंचाई पर एकमत हैं। अभी ऊंचाई 13,000 फीट होनी चाहिए। मार्क 10; मुझे दिख रहा है कि मेन पैराशूट खुल गया है और समेटा हुआ है, और मुझे सब ठीक लग रहा है। मेन पैराशूट खुल गया है। लैंडिंग बैग अब ऑटो मोड में चला गया है। ड्रोग पैराशूट नीचे गिर गया है। मुझे एकदम सही पैराशूट दिख रहा है, वाइज़र खुला है। इस समय केबिन का तापमान केवल 110 डिग्री है। हेलमेट की नली हटा दी गई
- - po
Роджер. Понял. Фрэнк, нам нужно, чтобы при этом вращении двигателя скорость составляла 8 футов в секунду, 8 футов в секунду. Мы хотим, чтобы он двигался радиально вверх, и 
这是Sigma Seven，展示的是日出时分倒飞，偏航角90度的效果
네. 전원 6번입니다. 전원 6번은 11번 패널을 말합니다. 제가 부르는 차단기를 제외하고는 차트대로 하시면 됩니다. 첫 번째 줄은 괜찮습니다. 첫 번째 행이라고 하겠습니다. 두 번째 행은 QUAD 4, TCA, 닫힘; QUAD 3, TCA, 닫힘; QUAD 2, TCA, 닫힘; 그리고 QUAD 1, TCA, 닫힘입니다. 나머지 행은 괜찮습니다. 세 번째 행의 중간쯤에 있는 ATCA(PGNS), 닫힘입니다
Okay, meine Sehschärfe ist gut. Ich kann die Sehtafeln problemlos lesen, und auch der Astigmatismus bereitet mir keinerlei Probleme. Auch das Halten der Fluglage ist kein Problem. Ich nutze noch Fly-by-Wire. Im Nor
Bon, on s'est arrêt
Хорошо, Вэнс. В точке R1 указана наша высота в десят
One gets the illusion that you're on a train or some other vehicle, due to the humming, and you feel that you should be on a track of some kind and you'
Je vous ai bien compris, Houston. Commen
Roger. Soweit ich weiß, soll das die Rückseite in Buzz' Checkliste für den
あなたは今あ
没错。——在这种低角度的阳光下，棕色完全消失了，取而代之的是一片灰蒙蒙的，就像8号机组人员说的
रॉजर। चूंकि आप इस समय ओम्नी डी (डॉग) पर हैं, इसलिए हाई-गेन लॉक एं
注
Rates are just about
Bene. Hai eseguito l
Хьюстон, и два других
मैं अब इन लोगों को अपने साथ खेलने न
روجر. 
Sai dove si trova la 
Roge
Gemini 4，休斯顿 CA
알겠습니다. 마지막 
रॉजर, कोल
ह्यूस्टन, तैयार रहो। ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। लगता है हमने सिर्फ Z ही रिकॉर्ड नहीं किया। हमने C भी रिकॉर्ड किया है, जो 
Bene. Questo sorvolo è un aggiornamento di quello che vi abbiamo dato ieri, quindi potreste voler notare che questo è il secondo. E sarà un sorvolo /; 62970,
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. З
아주 좋습니다. E-9 페이지에서 사령선 위치로 이동할 준비를 할 때, 자세 보정으로 인해 엔진이 점화되는 것을 방지하려면 수동 자세 제어 스위치를 ACCEL COMMAND 또는 MINIMAL IMPULSE 위치로 설정하는 것이 좋습니다. 그리고 E-9 페이지 41단계 Bravo에서 자세 유지 상태로 돌아가려면 수동 자세 제어 스위치를 RATE 위치
На панели 275: автоматический выключатель FLIGHT/POSTLANDING, MAIN A и MAIN B,
حسنًا. نحتاج إلى قراءة 
Amicizia Sette. Ricevuto. Tutti i fusibili degli interruttori sono ancora nella stessa posizione. Squib è armato. Auto Retrojettison è disa
Va bene.
H
जी हाँ। यह उन कुछ चुनिंदा कारों में से एक है। दुर्भाग्य
Come va con l'atteggiamento di 
鹰，休斯顿。我们看
了解しました。VIIを照らすためにVIにライト
你好，朋友们，墨西哥的祝福，特别是瓜伊马斯的朋友们。 Desde el espacio 外部，su pais esta cubierto con numbes-and es-al
यह सही है। मैंने कभी भी किसी भी दिशा में लगभग 3/4 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड से अधिक का
Vogliamo DISPLAY, aperto; ANTENNA BANDA S, chiusa - per evitare un ALLARME MASTER, TELECAMERA - SEQUENZA TELECAMERA, aperta; E sotto, vogliamo DISPLAY, aperto; TENSIONE BUS CC, chiuso; INVERTER 2, aperto; ECA DI SALITA, chiuso; CONTROLLO ECA DI SALITA, aperto; ECA DI DISCESA, chiu
Das ist 
إيجل - إيجل، ه
अपोल
네, 맞습니다. 초당 0.2도의 속도로 조종해 주시길 바랍니
حسنًا. هذا 
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्
Roger. 11, this is
Okay, 11. Es hat sich herausgestellt, dass die Triebwerksleistung bei beiden Brennvorgängen dieser Mission bisher der Leistung bei den Triebwerksabnahmetests entsprochen hat. Der Messwert des Bordcomputers ist auf einen bekannten Kalibrierungsfaktor des Manometers zurückzuführen, der zwischen dem tatsächlichen Brennraumdruck und dem angezeigten Wert liegt. Wir erwarten im Einbankenbetrieb einen Brennraumdruck von 90 psi – das heiß
分かりました。確認を進めてもいいですか
ठीक है। जलने के लिए -30, "ABORT पुशबटन, पुश" लिखा हुआ है, और जब DELTA-V शून्य के बरा
Aspetta. Okay, 
Roger, Houston. Eagle ha controllato sia le fotocamere da 70 millimetri che quelle da 16 millimetri, e funzionano tutte corret
正解です。回路ブレーカー OPTICS、MAIN A および MAIN 
أعتقد أن زاويتين تلامستا، لأنه عند فتحها، لم تخرجا معًا. انفتحت بشكل غير متساوٍ بعض الشيء، وبالطبع، لم تكن الأرض مستوية تمامًا كما كنت أتمنى. وأعتقد أن الزاويتين تلامستا بعمق بوصة تقريبًا - لا، ثلاثة أرباع إلى نصف بوصة؛ وربما على طول الجزء السفلي، ربما كان العمق حوالي ثلاث بوصات، تاركًا طبقة مثلثة صغيرة على زاويتين؛
로저. 6분 남았습니다. 짐벌 모터 등을 작동시킬 준비가 거의 다 
로저. 잠시 기다려 주시면 금성의 소멸 여부를 확인해 보겠습니다. 금
로저. 아직 당신의 말을 잘 읽지는 못하지만, 전보다 더 또렷해졌어
Ok, ti ​​aiuteremo a sistemare le cose. Stavamo parlando del controllo dei componenti ridondanti e volevamo rimanda
자일로스 알
Это показания прибора Phecda в Большой Медведице перед входом в слой дымки. Она окклюдируется — её свечени
Zunächst ein paar Fragen zu Ihrem allgemein
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Запрос на определение дальности в режиме NORMAL S-диапазона. Повторяю: определение дальности в режиме NORMAL S-диапазона
ठीक है, जो। इसमें 
Roger, Mike. Vous êtes en communication bidirectionnelle sur l'a
Ici Woomera Cap Com. L'allumage de la fusée éclairante aura lieu dans 1 minute et 20 second
그리고
Sigma Sev
わかりました。レジスタ 1 に 27218 を加算し、レジスタ 2 に 35570 を加算し、レジスタ 3 に 33010 を加算します。狭いデッドバンドを復元するには、NOUN 01、EN
알겠습니다. 다음은 "회로 차단기 패널 16, 계측 신호 센서, 닫힘. 그다음 인버터 1, 선택. 그다음 헬륨 모니터에서 초임계압
发射！发射 13
Sì. Non credo che avessimo effettivamente difficoltà con lo spazio per la testa. Sentivo di avere abbastanza spazio per la testa e potevo effettivamente... abbassare e
わかりました。5018はR1に27
罗杰。巴兹，你这状态真棒。我们数到五了。现在数得很快，
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Примерно полторы минуты до конца. Вы отлично 
Roger. And on that quad temperature - the upper limit of that thing is 105 degrees on the bottle. You are well below that. We have been watching it, and it is tracking, although it is tracking very slowly. As you roll the spacecraft, the temperature excursions seem to be a little sluggish, but it isn't a frozen sensor. And talking a little bit more abo
Très bien. Nous sommes mainte
11, hier spricht Houston. Aufgrund unserer Entlüftung über den Abwasserablauf haben wir festgestellt, dass Ihr O2-Durchflusssensor tatsächlich defekt ist. Ich hatte bereits erwähnt, als Sie uns die zyklische Entleerung des Wasserspeichers erklärten, dass
Okay. Nessuno di noi, che i
你知
ロジャー、フランク。軌道について最新情報をお伝えします。この中間コースは、毎秒0.7フィートと非常に小さいため、実施しないことにします。データは非常に良好で、これを外挿すると、マイナス8時
Хорошо. Панель 5: CB G&N, КОМПЬЮТЕР, ОСНОВНОЙ
他们希望您在 10:50:00 启动并
पंक्ति 4 के अंतर्गत, सिस्टम A/B-2, क्वाड हीटर के अंतर्गत, आप देखेंगे कि हमने उन सर्किट ब्रेकरों को 
ところで、ヴァンスさ
حسنًا يا بيل. نعتقد أنه سيكون من المفيد للغاية معرفة كيفية عمله في وضع الاستجابة التلقائية، ونقترح إجرا
Ce
حسناً؛ 
Вэнс, я пытался использовать управление ориентацией
Sembra tutto molto chiaro, marrone chiaro e grigio, sai, è proprio questo il
저는 운동할 필요가 없어요
알았어, 잭. 스위치인 것 같은데. 나도 저게 회로
— donc il ne consomme aucun cou
Okay, Charlie. Se l'atteggiament
Ricevuto. Il tiro è completo. Hai ricevut
لا، أعتقد أن كل شيء يسير على ما ي
Bo
La première fois que j'ai essayé, j'ai obtenu une mesure assez précise. Sans filtre, j'ai utilisé la lueur superficielle de l'épaisse couche de luminescence atmosphérique. C'est assez nébuleux; il faut se familiariser avec la mesure et essayer de viser toujours au même endroit. Ces mesures exigent une maîtrise parfaite de l'attitude. Impossible de les effectuer sans carburant. La fenêtre de visée est très réduite: il faut repérer l'étoile et la ramener vers l'horizon en gardant l'horizon et l'étoile dans le champ de v
Du drückst dich nicht ganz klar aus, 
रॉजर। हमें इंटरस्टेलर टाइम्स का 24 दिसंबर का अंक मिल गया है। आपका टीवी कार्यक्रम बहुत सफल रहा। आज सुबह आपके पड़ोसी ग्रह, पृथ्वी 
D'accord, Vance. Je peux te le donner. Je l'ai lu juste après l'a
You got a lot of
यह ह
Хорошо. А что, если я буду 
Gemini 4, CRO. Do you read? It looks like we're losing some power leads. Will you push them down on your che
أنا الآن في منتصف طبق الحساء الأول، ومن المتوقع أن أحصل على القليل من سلطة الدجا
是的，我们这么做了。根据您非常精彩的简报，我原本预期它会一直保持增长趋势，所以我们一开始就把它设置成了“增长”。我发现我们很快就越过了临界点，开始落后大约 6% 或 7%，所以我仍然预期它会继续上升，然后我把它调成了“完
Okay, Aquarius. We're looking at your gimbal and we notice that we got a four-jet ullage loaded in the and we gave you two jets on the pad. But, let's go with what we've got loade
Okay. To return the deadband lat
알겠습니다. E6 1페이지에 있는 참
Apollo 11, Houston. Cinq minutes avant. Concernant votre demande de pression des bouteilles d'azote avant la mise à feu, juste avant l'allumage, nous avions 2 270 livres par pouce carré sur la bouteil
Ricevuto
Et, Jim, vous 
أكد سكوت
हाई गेन प्राप्त करने के लिए रोल करेक्शन किया जा रहा है, और हम इस समय हाई ग
D'accord. Laissez votre commutateur POWER AMPLIFIER sur PRIMARY au lieu de OFF et mettez votre commutateur R
你好，哥伦比亚。休斯顿。你们会读吗？
Хорошо. Кен, мы добавили несколько комментариев к последней части записи после того, как получили от тебя сообщение, сейчас е
Okay. Very interesting. We'll see if we can figure out where that's relative to you. They keep updating the S-IV impact on us a little bit. The last guess we had was that it will impact about the s
अरे, वेंस, काम पर जाने से पहले हमारे पा
로저. 색깔에 대해 몇 가지 아이디어를 주시겠어요? 그리고 약간 방향을 바꿔 보시겠어요? 사라지고 있어요. 절반 정도만 보이네요. 12시 방향으로 가다가 이제는 3시 방향으로 가네요. 그쪽
Роджер. Воздушный шар колеблется по дуге примерно в 100 градусов. Он часто исчезает из поля зрения. В данный момент он почти вертикальный. Отметьте прибрежный пролив в это время — похоже, так и есть — я 
Ap
Roger, Jim. Nel tuo computer, vorremmo fare di nuovo un dump della memoria cancellabile, come abbiamo fatto l'
알겠습니다. 저희는 지금 물 배출 작업을 잠시 중단하고 배터리 벤트
알겠습니다. 내부에서 출력이 나오는 것을
ر
알겠습니다. OMNI 스위치를 끄고 PO
Maneuver [switch] is going off at this ti
네. ALC를 사용하는 모든 사진 촬영에서 카메라가 최소 10초에서 20초 동안 안정화되도록 기다리는 것이 중요합니다. 그래야 ALC가 제대로 작
꽤 많이 흔들리네요. 
Roger. Bien reçu. Mike 0.7 et 8.0. Le seul problème, c'est que mon meilleur outil de recherche est le sextant, et si je dois le régler au maximum, autant le lâcher
Houston, Apollo 11. Nous nous sommes arrêtés. Nous sommes en position
네. 맨 처음 부분에서 화면이 흐려졌으니 다시 한번 들어주세요. 메인 B에서는 아
ジェミニ4号です。また同じ曲線状の光が見えました。オーロラのような感じですが、私たちの真下にあります。以前も見ましたが、とても長くて長い線でした。私た
네, 밴스, 저희가 또 다른 널 바이어스 테스트를 진행했는데, 100초 만에 100.0에서 101.
ठीक है। हीटर डिस्प्ले, डिस
Roger. Non vogliamo che tu accetti quei voti. Questo perché, bypassando il controllo del trunnion bias, hai ancora numeri grandi in quei reg
Думаешь, ты сможешь дотянуться до этого крюка, который висит вот здесь? Возможно, тебе стоит подумать о том, что
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。復旧に向けた天気予報はいつで
你刚才用钳子捡起来的那些石
Go ahead, J
ये है दोस्ती सात। तैयार रहें। मैं अभी कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार नहीं हूँ; मैं कैमरे में फिल्म बदल रहा हूँ। स
Roger. Non credo che tu abbia una buona pressione sanguigna. La pompet
로저. 프
OK, 008:00; DELTA-VT, 7835; longitude, moin
Molto bene, molto bene. Tutto sta andando piuttosto bene. Se
Apollo 8, this is
好的。再往
I've got a reject on my TR. What is your status, Molly Bro
네. 전원 6번입니다. 전원 6번은 11번 패널을 말합니다. 제가 부르는 차단기를 제외하고는 차트대로 하시면 됩니다. 첫 번째 줄은 괜찮습니다. 첫 번째 행이라고 하겠습니다. 두 번째 행은 QUAD 4, TCA, 닫힘; QUAD 3, TCA, 닫힘; QUAD 2, TCA, 닫힘; 그리고 QUAD 1, TCA, 닫힘입니다. 나머지 행은 괜찮습니다. 세 번째 행의 중간쯤에 있는 ATCA(PGNS), 닫힘입니다. 좋습니다. 나머지 행도 괜찮습니다. 네 번째 행은 히터 - 대기 모드입니다. 좋습니다. 이 행은 마지막 세 개의 회로 차단기, 즉 STANDBY와 OPERATE 아래에 있는 세 개의 회로 차단기를 제외하고는 모두 괜찮습니다. 이 세 개는 적어도 당분간은 닫아 두어야 
哦，这是你的
はい。基本的にはその通りです。少しだけ手振りで説明させてください。その後、手順を読み上げます。もっと分かりやすくなると思います。仕組みとしては、望遠鏡を一定の角度まで飛ばして、光学素子を月に向けます。さて、いつでも、どんな姿勢であっても、望遠鏡を覗いて星のパターンを十分に認識し、自分でアライメントできると確信できる場合は、ここで一旦中断して、ご自身でアライメントを進めていただくことになります。ただし、ここで提示しているのは、反射などを気にすることなく望遠鏡で見えるものを確認する手順であり、望遠鏡で星のパターンがはっきりと確認できた時点で、この手順を必ず実行しなければならないというものではありません。必要であれば、操作して月を見て、そこにマークを付けます。次に、/ 角度で操作して太陽を見て、太陽にもう一つマークを付けます。これでアラインメントが完了します。アラインメント計画とは、が月を指しているときにボールを大まかにアラインメントできる角度のセットを提供するというものです。この角度のセットは、あなたが公称値として持っている と一致します。それに大まかにアラインメントし、ドリフトフラグと REFSMMAT フラグを設定すれば、良好なプラットフォームが得られ、良好なアラインメントから数度以内に収まります。必要に応じて、この時点で中断して進入に進むこともできますが、良好なプラットフォームを得るために、オプション1を実行してもらいます。オプション1のスロットに進入が表示されます。数値を決めて、まずはボールを進入姿勢に大まかに合わせ、その後、通常
아폴로 8호에서, 이 각도들을 가지고 하고 싶은 것은 패널 2에서 고이득 안테나 추적 기능 아래에 있는 '자동 재접수(AUTO REACQ)' 모드로 설정하는 것입니다. 
우리는 5시 42분에 도착했어야 했는데, 5시 58분에 도착했으니 늦
आ
ジム、君のバーンの準備をしています。その時間に合わせてパッドな
ठीक है, अच्छा लगा। क्योंकि मुझे नहीं पता कि मैं कहाँ - कितनी दूर आपसे बिछड़ गया। ठीक है, पैनल 4; टेलीकॉम, ग्रुप 1, AC1 से कनेक्ट करें। पैनल 5 पर, निम्नलिखित को बंद करें: प्रेशर ग्रुप 1, मेन B; प्रेशर ग्रुप 2, मेन B; टेम्परेचर, मेन B; सेकेंडरी लूप ट्रांसड्यूसर, मेन B; रेडिएटर, कंट्रोल/हीटर, मेन B; बैटरी रिले बस, बैटरी B; बैटरी चार्जर, बैटरी B; इन्वर्टर कंट्रोल, 2; इन्वर्टर कंट्रोल, 1; सेंसर सिग्नल, AC1; सेंसर सिग्नल, मेन B; सेंसर यूनिट, AC1; अपशिष्ट/पीने योग्य पानी, मेन B; इंस्ट्रूमेंटेशन
आपको इस पर थोड़ी सी महिला वेल्
К вашему сведению, Эд, у нас осталось всего 48 процентов ки
Roger
Elliot... ho aggiornato il tuo libro. Siamo passati dalla fase PRE-LANCIO a qu
没错，我们一
مفهوم. سنقوم بتغيير الفلتر قريبًا، وسخان خط التنقية يعمل الآن، وسيتم تنقية الأكسجين والهيدروجين قريبًا، وعند الساعة 148 سنبدأ شحن البطا
Okay, Apollo 8. 
ええと、ほんの少し前に2階にいた時、サービスモジュールの下の方から何か新しい通気口のようなものが見えました。窓1の外から見て、金属片も見えました。10センチ四方くらいの金属片が
ОТМ
C'è una foto scattata nella parte posteriore destra della navicella, che mostra la gonna dello stadio di discesa, e mostra un notevole oscuramento del colore della superfic
Très bien. Pouvez-vous me donner l'état de la batterie? Si tout est bon, je peux vous don
是的，
Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы рассматриваем возможность проведения промежуточного этапа, если т
로저, 트랭퀼리티입니다. 108분 중 약 6분이 남았습니다. 이벤트 타이머를 시작하시려면 
...Eh bien, on devrait en avoir quelques-uns p
제미니, 휴스턴 CAP COM입니다
알겠습니다
了解。了解、
روجر، يبدو أن قراءتك متقطعة بعض الشيء. يبدو أن مستشعر تدفق الأكسجين لدينا قد تدهورت حالته بشكل ملحوظ. لقد فحصته للتو أثناء دورة تجميع الماء الأخيرة، وبالكاد سجل قرا
Okay, bitte warten. Ich verstaue den Stift. Ich bin im Affenmodus. Die Kapsel fliegt einwandfrei. Alle Triebwerke funktionieren. Der Gyroschalter steht normal. Der Manöverschalter ist aus. Alle Systeme leuchten auf Grün; und ich überwache
Хорошо, Марк. Четыре минуты на проверку высокой скорости подачи кислорода. Теперь перейдём к пер
좋습니다, 톰. 모든 걸 다 이해하셨고, 이제 연소 작업을 시작하기 전에 다음과 같은 작업을 해 주시면 좋겠습니다. 우주선 7호에서 북쪽으로 5~10피트, 뒤쪽으로 약 50피트 정도 이동해 주십시오. 이는 연소 작업을 시작하기 전에 해야 할 일입니다. 이렇게 하는 이유는
Roger. J'ai effectué 
रॉजर। रेडिएटर फ्लो पोजीशन में है। पूरी सर्विस के दौरान यही स्थिति र
رأيتُ للتو قمراً صناعياً عالياً جداً،... رُصد من بعيد كالنجم على الأرض عندما يمرّ. كان على مسافة بعيدة جداً.
Ok. Un'altra cosa da ricordare è che quando inizia un blackout,
ठीक है। चरण 1, "रवैया नियंत्रण, तीन से पल्
नमस्कार, कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। हम
Roger. Anche da quassù la situazione sembra buona. L'ossigeno rimane sui 940, 
لدينا 
음, 끓으면 우리가 미리 알게 될 
了解、フレンドシップ・セブン。キャビンの温度は約90度で安定し
De plus, j'ai parfois essayé d'observer les étoiles sous différents angles solaires, mais à cette 
Роджер. 
ठीक है, जैक। ज़रा रुक
Хорошо, Джек. Как я понял, LMP должен лечь спать примерно на 6 часов. В течение этого периода CDR и CMP должны попытаться перекусить. Я должен проснуться через 69 часов. CDR и CMP спят через 70 часов и должны проснуться через 76 часов. И мы должны запланировать наши действия через 76 
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्ट
Sunset is rather striking, I don't think that I need to waste much time looking at them. They are very interesting. The other thing, it's fascinating is how black it is when your eyes are not adapted. I definitely can see some coating on the window. Going back to VOX at this point in UHF-hi to transmit. Opening visor to wipe off the right microphone. I licked it. Closing visor. Visor was sealed immediately for the suit circuit to go to work for me. I don't want to get fouled up with it again. The suit inlet is holding very nicely at about 68 (degrees). So the dome again is going to go back up. It's now up at 76, 75 . Apparently this higher setting is the one we want. Think I'll put in another half a mark on that now and we may have her locked. She's getting kinda cool at last so I know where I want to go with the setting. I have set the coolant quantity for the suit and control lever at 8.5 at The readout the dome at this time is 75 (degrees). The suit inlet is 68 (degrees). Very pleasant. I can feel cool air crossing my face. The oxygen quantity looks real good, 60 and 75 (psi, in hundreds). I have been watching the 250 inverter. It is approaching 140 degrees, and the 150 contrast is down to about 100 degrees. Standby is about 100 (degrees) which is cabin temperature. Thirdly, the 250 - that one's suffering, and I will keep an eye on it. Cabin heat exchanger is definitely settling out at 40 degrees, and its given me a hard time because I obviously owe Frank Samonski 50 cents. I'm pleasantly surprised. Cabin fuel too, is reading a little high. Let me see now, we're carrying 5.5 psi. it's reading about 5 point, correction, 5.3, that's not too high for this cabin. It's getting nice and dark out, I think I'll take a peek out at the stars at this point. The cover for the battery for the flashlight o
Roger. E poi l'atteggiamento
Go ahead, Houston. Gemi
Wir empfeh
Roger. Wir haben über Ascension ein
Ja. Das war's
ねえ、そこは美しいで
13, Houston. You'd b
DELTA-V-SCHUB, NORMAL, A, is
这是友谊七号。胶囊再次进
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن، إشارتك ضعيفة نوعًا ما.
D'accord. Votre consommation d'oxygène au cours des dernières 24 heures – correction – au cours des 2 ou 3 dernières heures
저는 0.8
At last we have solved the suit circuit temperature problem. I can see why Scott was concerned about this record position only. There is no side tone as well.
ل
ヒューストンのアソシエイテッド社ハリー・ローゼンタールによる特集記事です。2歳のジェフリー・ラベルくんのクリスマスイブを、2人のサンタが明るく彩ります。1人目は玄関をノックしてプレゼントを持ってきました。2人目は月からお父さんを家まで送り届けました。1人目は赤い服と白いひげを生やし、「ホー、ホー」と叫び、その声は街の向こうまで聞こえました。2人目は月の裏で巨大なエンジンが炎を吐き出し、何千人もの人々がエンジン始動の知らせを待ちわびていました。「サンタクロースがいます」。エンジンがクリティカル噴射を完了してから15分後、無線沈黙から目覚めたアポロ8号から最初に届いた言葉は、不安な世界に告げるものでした。「これ以上のクリスマスプレゼントは期待していません」とミッションコントロールのケン・マッティングリーは語りました。「地上の皆様に感謝します。皆さんがいなければ、私たちは成し遂げられませんでした」と、宇宙船の船長フランク・ボーマン大佐は返事をしました。ちょうどその時、ミッションコントロールのコンソールの前にクリスマスツリーが灯り、ハリソン・シュミット宇宙飛行士が乗組員たちに「聖ニコラスの訪問」の宇宙版を読み上げました。「クリスマス前夜、はるか宇宙の彼方で、アポロ8号の乗組員が月面レースに勝利したばかりでした」と始まります。ミッションコントロールの乗組員は、ジェフリーの父親である海軍大佐ジェームズ・ラヴェル、空軍少佐ウ
Okay, Jack. What we want you to do is close the reactants valve on fuel cell 2. Power down your inverters. Power down your battery relay bus. Battery ties, off, and pull your entry circuit breakers
わかりました、フレッド。その数字をコピーして、どうもありがとう。うまく
حسنًا، أبولو 8. لقد انتهينا من الاختبار الأول، وسنغير الآن وضع الإرسال إلى "أوامر الإرسال وتحديد المدى"، وسنعمل بدون صوت الإرسال. سنبقى في هذا الوضع لمدة دقيقتين ونصف، وسنرسل رسائل اختبار. لن يؤثر ذلك على جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بك أو إعدادات مفاتيح اللوحة. قد تلاحظ بعض التشويش في نطاق S المرتبط بقفل الإيقاف. مع ذلك، يجب أن يظل 
こんにちは、キト。こちらはシグマ・セブン。ケープに、私がはっきりと読み上げたことを伝
セブン、こちらケープ。大
बिल्कुल। खेल पृष्ठ पर ज़्यादा हलचल नहीं है। बास्केटबॉल के दोनों सर्वेक्षणों में यूसीएलए शीर्ष पर है। अगर आपको किसी खास टीम के बारे में पूछना हो, तो मुझे बताएँ, मैं आपको बता दूँगा कि क्या वे दोनों सर्वेक्षणों में
Ok.
ठीक है, वैंस, हम नकल करने के लि
ठी
Charlie,
请注意，怀特为
Roger, Houston. The only trouble is that t
好的，杰克。他们希望你在49小时的时候做以下操作：他们观察到光学轴角度有轻微的抖动，大约在正负0.2度左右。在你离开光学零位之前，也就是开始时，他们希望你观察一下轴的读数，看看抖动是否出现在你的直接读数中。另
और परमेश्वर ने प्रकाश को दिन और अंधकार को रात कहा। और संध्या और सूर्योदय पहला दिन था। और परमेश्वर ने कहा, “जल के बीच में एक आकाशमंडल हो। और वह जल को जल से अलग करे।” और परमेश्वर ने आकाशमंडल बनाया और उसके नीचे के जल को आकाशमंडल के ऊपर के जल से अलग किया। और ऐसा ही हुआ। और परमेश्वर ने आकाशमंडल को स्वर
Roger
로저. PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50, -0002
Okay, Mike. Ready to go. Now
いや
わかった。そう
로저. 회로 차단기 경
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हमें आपके संदेश का कुछ अंश प्राप्त हुआ। समझ में आया कि स्थिति काफी बिगड़ गई है और आप जानना चाहते हैं कि इसके बारे में क्या किया जाए। क्या यह 
Роджер. Мы полностью со
रॉजर। और बिना बर्न
Jim, richiedi di verificare che l'inter
I'm working 
Roger. Nur z
Ça s'annonce bien, Frank. Nous venons de recevoir un nouveau lot de données et nous sommes en train de les traiter. Il sem
わかりました、ジョー。-7:、マイナス 0003.1、プラスすべてのボール、プラス 0000.1、N/A、プラス 00
حسنًا يا مايك. بالطبع، هذا في حال تعطل نظام التوجيه والتوجيه (G&N) واضطررتَ للطيران بتسارع ثابت (g). ما نحاول فعله هو زيادة نطاق التسارع الثابت من 1100 إلى 1500 ميل. لقد جر
Je voudrais dire un mot sur le sextant. Son utilisation dans un vaisseau spatial exigu est très difficile, surtout avec le casque. J'ai finalement conclu qu'il serait inutile, avec le casque, d'essayer de prendre les angles requis pour les étoiles visées. J'ai donc retiré mon casque. Cela m'a donné un peu plus de liberté de mouvement, mais j'étais toujours limité à des angles d'environ 20 à 23° sans manœuvrer le vaisseau. L'étoile était alors masquée par la partie supérieure du hublot. En manœuvrant le vaisseau plus fréquemment et plus amplement, on pourrait aligner le grand axe du hublot avec le plan de visée. Mais, limités par le carburant, nous n'avons pas opté pour cette méthode. Nous avons également utilisé le mode pulsé, sans trop de manœuvres. Les étoiles sélectionnées pour cette campagne avaient des angles assez élevés, ce qui rendait l'horizon difficile à atteindre. Nous avons finalement décidé de les photographier un peu plus près de l'horizon. J'ai effectué quelques mesures sur Canopus et quelques autres télescopes, comme vous le remarquerez. Le filtre bleu semblait masquer complètement l'horizon; je ne voyais aucun horizon avec ce filtre. La qualité de notre image de l'horizon est probablement moins bonne en présence de lune. Le filtre vert, en revanche, m'a permis d'obtenir un horizon légèrement plus net qu'avec l'absence totale de filtre. Je n'ai rencontré aucune difficulté pour effectuer
ロジャー。マルーン・ビューグルの続きです。ニクソン大統領は、あなた方に会いに行く飛行機に乗る直前に、サンフランシスコから電話をかけ、奥様たちを驚かせました。奥様方は皆、あなた方のテレビ放送に感動していました。ジャンとパットはここミッションコントロールから見ていました。ケープカナベラルからのインテルサットの打ち上げは昨夜、4度目の延期となりました。デルタ衛星の第2段にある窒素調整器の故障が原因とされています。今夜、新たな打ち上げが試みられる予定です。メキシコ湾流を調査している調査潜水艦ベン・フランクリンは、ジョージア州沖の水深1300フィートで、海底から10フィートから100フィートの高さを24時間漂流するという記録を樹立しました。このミッションはジャック・ピカールが指揮しています。ウォーリー・シラーがデトロイト工科大学の評議員に5年の任期で選出されました。彼は同大学の開発委員会に所属します。エア・カナダは、過去5日間で月行きのフライトの予約を2300件受け
Bon courage; on 
了解です。燃焼ルールです。1. 推力モニターが77%以下の場合、2. 推進剤のアレージ圧力が160psi未満の場合、3. 燃料酸化剤のデルタPが25を超える場合（地上呼び出し）、4. 姿勢誤差が始動時の過渡現象を除きプラスマイナス10度の場合、エンジンを停止します。了解です。速度制限は毎秒プラスマイナス10度です。エンジンジンバルランプ、ISSのプログラムアラーム、CES DC、そしてインバータランプ（インバータの切り替えを試しても点灯している場合）も点灯します。燃焼中にNOUN 97が点滅してエンジンが停止した場合は、PRO（プログラム）を実行して手動でアレージを行い、STARTボタンを押して、DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE（エンジン降下コマンドオーバーライド）を開きます。 PC-2を実施しない場合、次の噴射はPC-4で、速度が毎秒24フィート増加します。着陸地点はPACの中間地点です。わかりました。バックアップのレートコマンド、あるいはレートダンピングを使用します。そして、現在行っているフリーリターンでは、PC-2またはPC-4を実施しない場合、152:02:00にインド洋に着陸します。今回の噴射ではトリム調整は必要ありません。
حسنًا. معلوماتك ضعيفة جدًا. نوص
برج الجوزاء 4، هاواي، مركز الاتصالات
Mike, i miei p
收到。迪克，我的控制模式是手动；陀螺仪已锁定；机动开关已关闭。我的燃料读数分别为 
了解。システムに変更はありません。すべて順調です。今すぐクライオを始動さ
جيميني 6، 
قاعدة الهدوء، قاعدة الهدوء،
ヒュ
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। आपके सभी सिस्टम तैयार हैं, और हम आपको बताने ही वाले
روجر. المنطقة 55-دلتا 82. 04 34 10. 9+57. ال
Esatto. Okay. Prossima: la prossima
Roger.
Хорошо. Центр Земли только что прошел в точке, равной 
17ページです。負荷はマイナス4分で行います。CB(11)、インバータ2、CLOSE、そして「Select INVERTER 1」を消します。RATE SCALEは「25 degrees a second」に変更します。「BALANCE COUPLE」は「OFF」にします。ちなみに、減衰率の点ですが、チャーリー、以前テイクオーバーについて話し合ったことを思い出しますね。制御に問題が発生した場合、エンジンを停止して30分かけて適切な手動燃焼を行うと、DELTA
Roger. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich kann den Nachthorizont prob
11、ヒュースト
قواطع الدائرة الكهربا
了解、ト
أتساءل عما إذا كان المكان الذي أصابته فيه المسبار يقع أس
我们拥有
ठीक है, कुंभ रा
Ok, Jack... s
そしてそれが私の外
Okay. Bei 1 Minute wird „MASTER ARM“ gescratcht. Bei 35 Sekunden werden die ersten beiden Zeilen gescratcht. „Manu
هذه هي فري
Ich fange erst s
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。ロン、今回のデルタHについて海軍としてきちんと説明してもらえません
Sì, dovrebbe essere in R-1. Un libro e
Va b
13，休斯顿。我们将在3
Roger, Houston. C'est exactement ce que nous essayons de faire. J'essaie d'obtenir 15 secondes d'arc pour l'optique. Avec la luminosité de la Terre, il est très difficile de trouver une étoile que nous pouvons viser avec le sextant. J'essaie d'utiliser l'optique automatique pour la repérer. C'est chose faite; nous essayons maintenant de manœuvrer le vaisseau spatial pour ramener le tourillon à zéro et obtenir ainsi la ligne de visé
Très bi
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Загруженные вами координаты — это, как мы видим, — это точка 130. Вы согла
了解。燃焼は予定通り、11秒、VGXが0.2、VGYが1.8でした。つまり、VGZがマイナス1.8、マイナス0.2で
자, 짐, 말씀하
Roger, 11. Correction on my last. At 73 20, we uplink you the new. And at 73 30, we'd like you to maneuver to 0 roll, 0 pitch, 0 yaw in the old. And then torque around to the new and run your option 1 in that sam
여기는 
ठीक है, करूँगा। और हाँ, मुझे आपसे एक सवाल पूछना है। इस स्थिति में, डॉक किए जाने पर, हमें पिच और रोल को नियंत्रित करने के लिए इसका उपयोग करना होगा। 
ह्यूस्टन, ह्यूस
Wir benötigen die Erlaubnis, das BIOMED-System einzuschalten, um den Modus „Heißes Mikrofon“ zu deaktivieren. Ich glaube nicht, dass wir es jetzt benötigen, wenn die große Satellitenschüssel e
罗杰。我以为我们已经给
好的，收到
Jack dice che è sicuramente il modulo di servi
Ha, 
Gemini
네, 맞습니다. 마지막 변경 사항은 CT
了解しました。それから、クワッドの温度ですが、ボトルの上限は105度です。あなたはそれをはるかに下回っています
我这边视野很
텍사스 상공에서 볼 수 있는
はい、11番。そろそろ開始です。高利得アンテナの角度をいくつかお教えします。REACQモードで運用したいのですが、スピンアップは正方向ですか、負方向ですか？ オーバー
Да. По
71. 是 30.6。是 30.6；是 30.6……现在我们再往前走一点，然后再
Ok, lasciami tornare alla configurazione. Lo farò ora. E lei è entrata senza propulsori potenti, credo. Puoi ricontrollar
燃料含量为 52-45%，氧气含
Хорошо. «Альфа-1» находится на высоте 500 футов над мест
В городе Рено, штат Невада, из-за отсутствия камина в доме, маленький мальчик написал Санта-Клаусу в местную газету и предложил: «Пожалуйста, воспользуйтесь входной дверью. Вам придётся немного пнуть её снизу, потому что она заедает». В Литл-Роке, штат Арканзас, младенцев, родившихся в больнице Святого Винсента в течение недели перед Рождеством и до самого Рождества, выписывают матерям в огромных красных рождественских чулках. Вот ещё один пример экуменического сотрудничества. В Индио, штат Калифорния, начальник полиции в Рождество был вооружён молитвенником. Раввин Филипп Х. Ва
回到华盛顿，众议院筹款委员会同意对石油公司、银行和公用事业公司进行税收改革，预计每年可为联邦政府增加近20亿美元的收入。同样在今天，美国宇航局宣布将于1972年
Gemini VI, Хьюстон, обновление смещения акселерометра завершено. Вы можете вернут
ロジャ
انتظر يا هيوستن. حسناً يا هيوستن. يبدو أننا لم نسجل حرف Z فقط. لقد
로저. 저는 자동 모드로 도킹했는데, 말씀드렸다시피 접촉 순
أبولو 11، هذه هيوس
簡単に言うと、ピッチとロールを制御するには、練習したように を使います
안전하게 도킹 해제를 할 수 있다고 판단되는 수준까지 속도를 낮춘 후, 도킹을 해제하고 가능한 한 빨리 초당 수 피트의 속도로 아제나에서 멀어졌습니다
刚才那是 AC 2 总线复位
Okay. The one proposal that sounds like it if we 
うちのウォータージェットのどれか一つが… よし、制御しよう。他に何をそこに
Rog
제미니
Roger. We will start out with the world news. praise for America's Apollo 8 astronauts and hopes for international cooperation in space exploration with the worldwide Christmas Eve messages as the tiny spaceship orbited the moon. Even in the Communist world, there was enthusiasm for man's first voyage to the moon. In Moscow, Soviet scientist Anatoly Besaranov recalled his country and the United States had shared space knowledge before and predicted the Apollo 8 flight would lead to more cooperation. In Cuba, Radio Havana rebroadcast the Voice of America program to tell its listeners of the Apollo 8 speech. Voice officials said it was the first time that any of the U.S. agencies' programs had been carried by Havana radio. Czechoslovakia saw the moon flight through extensive television coverage; and in Budapest, Hungary, people talk of little else on the trains and buses. In the non-Communist world, office workers and Christmas shoppers held their breath as the spacecraft was readied for the blast toward earth. Frenchmen in the street praised American knowhow and the space feat, and some viewers watch television lunar photos cheer "Magnifique!". In London, swarms of Christmas shoppers crowded into shops and pubs to watch television photographs of the moon's craters. Britain's foremost space astronomer, Bernard Lovell, who until a fe
Allez-y, Apol
それを外す
Perché non aspetti ancora un po'
Okay, Buzz. Zu den Punkten in deinem Flugplan, zunächst ein paar Aktualisierungen. Wir haben den Mittelkurs 6 gestrichen. Bleib einfach auf Kurs. Ich gebe dir heute Morgen etwas mehr Zeit. Zweitens: Wir sind bereit für eine BATT-B-Ladung, wann immer du sie einsetzen möchtest. Drittens: Wir hätten diesmal eine etwas andere Idee für die Abwasserentsorgung. Wir m
Sept, tu faiblis rapidement. Je vais diffuser cette fois
Well, that's a pretty good error. I 
अच्छा, तब तक इंतज़ार करो जब तक हम उस अवरोहण चरण क
로저, 11. 광학계 보정값은 롤 346.5, 피치 345.0, 요 0.07.8입니다. 책에 적힌 펜과 잉크로
حسنًا، لديّ بعض الأمور التي أودّ توضيحها لك، ثم سنتركك وحد
قلت إنني اعتدت كثيراً على التحكم في وضعية الطيران باستخدام التحكم الانتقالي، ولن أتمكن من فعل ذلك باستخدام نظام التحكم الآلي 
罗杰，我把设置调回3的时候，飞机有点
Roger. 2
Pendant la rétrocompatibilité, utilisez les deux anneaux. Après la rétrocompatibi
C'est exact. Bien, nous allons donc terminer la vérification de l'évent du tunnel et nous assurer que le /CM DELTA-P est sous pression. Nous reviendrons ensuite sur toutes les procédures de vérification de l'intégrité de l'écoutille et de l'évent du tunnel. Je vais maintenant vous lire -1 +20. Nous allons passer à l'étape 1: mise en m
D'accord. Je distingue très peu de choses: des terres agricoles, des pâturages en contrebas. Je vois des champs, des rivières, des lacs, des routes,
Roger, Jim. We just thought of something; namely, that we probably should get the lithium hydroxide canisters out of the command module reasonably soon just to make certain that they don't stay in there and possibly swell up until they'd be hard to
Gemini VIII, это Houst
Roger, Fred. Ci siamo persi per un minuto e abbiamo perso l'immagine TV. 
Houston, indiquez-nous simplement le moment où nous pouvons commencer, et nous attendrons votre acc
ト
Hey, Charlie, I can see the snow on the mountains 
Rog
阿波罗11号，这里是
This is Sigma Seven. A 30 second HF check, at minutes commencing at 10 seconds after that. Th
收到。刻录完成后
窓に閃光が走った。一体何なのか、さっぱり分
还有
로저,
로저. 랜딩백은 이미 꺼져 있었습니다. 제가 먼저 확인하고 보고했어요. 레트로매뉴얼도 꺼져 있고, 이제 모든 준비가 끝났습니다. 무중력 상태가 정말 편안하네요. 아주 좋은 느낌만 들어요.
In effetti,
हां, मैंने किया। और हमें लगभ
Ricevuto. Auto Uno. Leggere Warfare 
Sto scattando anche alcune
좋
Bien. Dans la zone d'amerrissage du Pacifique central, la météo est bonne. La couverture nuageuse est de 2000 pieds, avec des nuages ​​épars; la visibilité est de 10 pieds; le vent souffle à 60 nœuds à 10 nœuds; la hauteur des vagues est de 4 pieds et l'altitude est de 2986 pieds. Des averses éparses sont prévues sur moins de 10 % de la zone. Les forces de récupération de l'Iwo Jima seront au point d'amerrissage; l'indicatif d'appel de l'appareil sera « Recovery 1 », en position avec des nageurs de sauvetage à bord. La zone de rentrée atmosph
Roger. We know you're
Обогреватель выключен. Мы не проверяли обогреватель. Ну и ладно. Он нам все равно не понадобился. Температура была очень высокой. Диагностика показала, ч
Theta, 11,8; intervallo 68,90; Delta-V totale è 232; Delta-VI è 101,1; punto dati era 05:40. Dati 12,5 Theta; intervallo 63,75; Delta-V totale, 199; 
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमने LOI 2 बर्न का वीडि
Und die No
Роджер. Ред. 33. Врем
待機す
यह सुनकर बहुत अच्छा लगा, लेकिन क्या आप उन्हें कुछ शुभकामनाएँ दे सकते हैं? उन्हें बहुत खुशी होग
Forza, Canarino. Gemel
Ho un piccolo orizzonte.
Exactement. C'était ça. Le Cap l'a demandé. Nous avons quatre secondes de retard s
Okay. Credo di aver capito l'atteggiamento, il modo in cui la Terra dovrebbe apparire nel cielo, e tu mi darai qualche parola su come apparirebbe il Sole nel cielo. È corret
そこの回路ブレーカーの設定はど
यहां से दृश्य शानदार है। काश टीवी अभी भी चल रहा होता, क्योंकि भूरा क्षेत्र अब और भी गहरा दिख रहा है। हम अभी-अभी उर्वरता सागर के ऊपर से गुजरे हैं, और घोड़ी का रंग गहरा हो गया है। सूर्य के कोण के कारण पर्वत श्रृंखला में अधिक कंट्रास्ट आ गया है। बिल ने हमारे लिए 16 मिमी का कैमरा लगा रखा
罗杰，休斯顿，哥伦比亚……那段时间我一直盯着六分仪，希望能看到反射光
Спокойствие, подтверждаю. Попробуйте снова навести прицел, и вы потеряете его при
ظننتُ 
角，这里是虹鳟鱼；请您在推荐
Да уж, этот водоотделитель работает никудышно. Может, попробуем друго
Das ist bestätigt. Wir haben Sie allerdings im Schatte
Roger. These - None of these stars will be exactly centered,
Okay. Dies ist ein 9, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 34188, minus 01353, plus 00780 180 008 001, November Alfa, plus 00187 34223 313 34021 42 08
Je comprends que vous nous lisez parfaitement; nous avons du mal à vous lire. Pourriez-vous
روجر. هذه النجوم - لن يكون أي منها في مركز مجال الرؤية تمامًا، ولكن عند زاوية ميل 115 درجة، حسبنا أن فيغا، والنسر الطائر، ورأس الحوت، وذنب الدجاجة ستكون جميعها ضمن مجال رؤية التلسكوب، وكانت النجوم الثلاثة الأولى مرئية 
Gemini 4, это центр управления воздушным движением Хьюстона. Мы обеспокоены т
Roger. È apparso molto più nitido con il sestante che con il 
Напряжение всех ба
터널에 발가락으로 매달려 거꾸로 된 
誰が一番近づくか賭けてみませんか
जी हां। ठीक है। जब यह पूरा हो जाएगा, तो वे सूर्य को देखने के लिए उपयुक्त कोण पर आ जाएंगे। और जब वे वहां पहुंच जाएंगे, तो आप सन फिल्टर और टेलीस्कोप का उपयोग करके सूर्य पर एक निशान लगाएंगे; और फिर से
ジョー、それは G&C チェックリストの 9-2 ページですか
Okay. Zunächst einmal wird die Kurskorrektur voraussichtlich nach 104 Stunden erfolgen, und wir streben lediglich eine Delta-v-Änderung von 4 bis 6 Fuß pro Sekunde an. Okay. Das ist der erste Punkt. Nun gebe ich Ihnen einen Überblick über die Verbrauchsmaterialien. Okay. Sie haben noch 1498 Amperestunden – das entspricht 1498 Amperestunden. Das bedeutet, dass Sie über 61 Stunden – das wären durchschnittlich 24,5 Amper
Seven
Eagle, Houston. Non li avevamo sul do
ブルース、それはもう通り過ぎましたが、私はあなたが話しているそのエリアを非常に注意深くスキャ
双子座4号，双子座4号，休斯顿。我这里有
مرحباً، كانو. أورورا سفن. واضح تماما
No, quello che succede è che ogni tanto ci avvicin
分かりました。残りの報告では、660～770psiであれば問題ないとのことでしたが、
私たちは廃水について考えているだけではなく、宇宙船から排出しなければならない他
Okay
Oka
Хорошо. Я просто хотел узнать, включены ли они в ваш список — я не ставлю под сомнение его, прос
ウォーリー、機会があれば
قل مرة أخرى عن
了解しました。T 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225、シャウラから受信。上236 000、プラス0813 マイナス16503 12202 36301。北の星座、シリウスとリゲル、ロール308、ピッチ209、ヨー357。備考：近
趁我在线而且不太忙，就做个方向测试。伸手去够手动操纵杆——正好够到。伸手去够偏航姿态杆。我按到了20度，右20度。伸手去够紧急制动操纵杆。正好够到，
В спорте команда «Хьюстон Ойлерз» демонстрирует большой энтузиазм на своих первых
11, Хьюстон. Мы так и 
了解しました。確認のため、発言全体を読み上げます。NC-4の手順1～11に従ってください。その後、NC-7ページのCOMMなし手順の経度制御に進みます。コリドー管制チャートのVictor 400Kの平均値は36253です。GERUが07990未満の場合は、中止後にマイナスMA手順を実
Nous vo
Okay. Die Wetterprognose für Ihren Landeplatz, etwa 560 Meilen südlich von Samoa, lautet: Windstärke ca. 1500, vereinzelt, hohe, brech
Fortfa
Roger. Ci stiamo avvicinando alla LOS. Ci prover
로저. 목표 장전량을 알려주시면 프로그램 30으로 진행할 예정인데, 이렇게 작은 연소에 큰 변화가 있을 거라고는 생각하
Спускаемся вни
Roger, Frank. Vorremmo aggiornarvi sulla vostra traiettoria. Questa rotta intermedia in arrivo risulta essere molto piccola, 0,7 pied
提前一点关
フライバイ / 63087、マイナス162、プラス129、プラス00962、プラス00568、マイナス02077、000 000 000、NA。ここまでおわ
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। समझ गए। और हम समझते हैं कि 
Roger, Tranquility. Siamo tra circa 6 minuti su 108. Se vuoi far partire il timer dell'evento, possiamo darti un suggerimento al minuto 1
Apollo 8, Houston. Wenn Sie Ihren Polarisationsfilter vor die Kamera halten können, ohne etwas anderes zu beeinträch
Et en dessous de moi? Vous le voyez n'importe où en desso
Роджер. Далее следует подтверждение. TIG 124 22 0000 55349 00322, плюс 0017, плюс 37104, 
Roger. Deke, la mia modalità di controllo è manuale; i giroscopi sono bloccati; l'interruttore di manovra è spento. Il livello del carburante è 45 e 42 [percento]; l'ossigeno è 76 e 100 [percento]; le temperature dello sfiato del vapore sulla tuta sono 68 [gradi] e ho appena ricevuto una spia luminosa per l'acqua in eccesso in cabina; l'ago è sceso a 20. Reimposta l'acqua in cabina a circa 6 e in questa capsula sembra che le impostaz
アポロ8号、こちらヒュース
D'accord. Vance, va
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Stiamo raccogliendo dati di base, e rimarremo in questa modalità per un altro paio di minuti,
Roger.
Gemini 4，RKV CAP 
Looks like your cohort woke
D'accord. Et au cas où cela ne fonctionnerait pas, nous restons prêts avec le plan initial, un ensembl
Ok. E c'è un'altra cosa di cui non so se sei a conoscenza. Al momento non abbiamo più bombole di idrossido di l
好的。我现在用的是窄光束高增益模式。你用
그는 방금 체온계를 입에 넣었다가 커프를 빼내고 
Роджер. Хочу напомнить, что проверку двигателей системы Horizon Scan не следует начинать, пока вы не подтвердите наличие сигнала AOS на 
54% 이
Nein. Es befindet sich ungefähr auf der Position neun oder
여기서 널 자유롭게 해 줄게. 그러면 우리가 역추진 로켓을 발사하는 
Apol
«Дружба Семь», это «Стальной Голова». Имейте в виду, что, согласно показаниям моего поверхностного прибора, вы находитесь в 6 милях
Bon, on y va. PRIMARY, PRIMARY, HIGH, VOICE, (tous
D'accord, Bill. Je crois que je veux revenir sur mon dernier point concernant l'utilisation du vecteur d
And, Fred, on this jerry-rigged command module lithium hydroxide canister, what we're going to do is we're going to have to make at least two up and use two at a time - one on each set of hoses. What we'll do is we'll connect one of these jerry-rigged boxes to the red fittings and air will be sucked through the lithium hydroxide and then blown out the blue fitting. And we're also going to, when we do this, remove the lithium hydroxide canister from the suit loop, either the primary or the secondary, and we're getting the words together to make it easy to build one of these things, and it looks like it will probably take two guys, so, I think we probably ought to plan to do that later. In addition, we have to go up and get a couple of canisters out of the command module, so it looks like maybe a smart idea would be to delay a little bit
Eagle, Hous
Houston, Columbia is in OMNI Charlie downvoice backup, and if you get a chance, would you look up the coordinates of 130 for me, please? I have been - conflicting information between my cue card and my flight plan. I'd like to kno
Roger. Vanne de purge supérieure fermée. Jim n'a
ジャックは…そのまま降りていきました。そして、250BAT AとBAT Bのブレーカーを入れた
What
Okay. Damit wir die Antennenumschaltung übernehmen können, sollten wir wohl den AUX-Tape-Schalter und den Tape-Forward-Schalter ausschalten; und wir werden zwischen OMNIs Bravo und Delta umsch
١١، هيوستن. الوضع أفضل بكثير على خريطة النجوم الآن. يمكننا تمييز مستوى مسار الشمس والكواكب والشمس والقمر كما كانت في مواقع مختلفة على طول هذا المستوى. انت
Vous voulez simplement éteindre vos rad
Roger. Pericynthian plus 2, Minimum /
再次提醒，在前面我们称之为可选部分的顶部附近有一个相机设置校正，其中有“包围曝光 MIR f:0.9, 125”，请划掉“125”，然后输
Go a
そこに現れる星があ
알겠습니다
Buzz, bist du bereit für - 
ठीक है। बहुत बढ़िया। हमने अंतरिक्ष यान में अन्य खिड़कियों से आने वाली सूर्य की रोशनी को 
That's affirmative. Now you're going to come up with a 37 ENTER 06 ENTER most likely on the computer. And what we want to do is to put the computer to standby; if you come up with a 37 06, you'll have to do an ENTER in order to get the code 62. If it's got 62 on i
Je vo
分かっています、ジム。その点は重々承知しています。5分ほどで
ج
收到。高增益模式已经锁定，我相信现在也已开
Ho mo
У меня тут проблема с ASCS. Думаю, ASCS работает неправильно. Позвольте мне... Аварийная последовательность ретроактивного упра
Хорошо. Если я правильно понял, Джо, маневр состоял из 2 плюс 56 плюс
حسنًا. لنرى إن كنت قد فهمت كل شيء. للالتقاء، أولًا، نريد أن يكون قاطع الدائرة 16 (INVERTER 2) مغلقًا، وكذلك قاطع الدائرة 11 (AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2). ثم على اللوحة 14، تأكد من تحديد INVERTER 2. وقاطعي الدائرة 11 (RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2) مغلقين. بعد ذلك، نسحب مقبض تحرير رادار الالتقاء. على اللوحة 3، نريد تشغيل رادار الالتقاء. اضغط على زر الإدخال (ENTER) مع جميع الرموز البريدية، بالإضافة إلى 28300 في السجلين 1 و2. ثم اضغط على زر المتابعة (GO). بعد ذلك، نراقب الحركة باستخدام 16 72. بعد أن يتوقف، افتح قاطع الدائرة 11 (RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2)، ثم اضغط على زر الإدخال (ENTER). وافتح قاطع الدائرة 16 (INVERTER 2). الآن، عندما يحين وقت محاذاة المصباح، يتم إغلاق قاطع الدائرة 16، العاكس 2، وقاطع الدائرة 11 AC BUS A LAMP، وبعد اكت
罗杰，准备好复述了吗
Okay, Fred. Zwei, drei Dinge. Erstens: Wir brauchen so schnell wie möglich eine Überprüfung des Andockwinkels. Zweitens: Du darfst so viel Wasser trinken, wie du will
قيمة الإضاءة للفيلم الأبيض والأسود هي 13 لحساسية ASA 64. ضبط قيمة الإضاءة على 13. التقاط الصورة رقم 7 باستخدام الفلتر. يصعب تصوير قارة أمريكا الجنوبية بسبب تقلبات الطقس. سألتقط صورة بانورامية الآن. سأبدأ بعد حو
بكل وضوح. استيقظتُ قبل حوالي ٣٠ أو ٤٠ دقيقة، ثم - في الحقيقة لم أستيقظ فورًا - كنتُ جالسًا أس
D'accord. Compris. Ma seule question, Joe, concerne le fait que les indicateurs de roulis et de lacet ne se soient pas mis à zéro lors d'une manœuvre automatique. J'ai essayé de régler manuellement
En ce moment, il fait jour du côté de Jim, et de mon côté, je peux encore distinguer quelques étoiles. Il semblerait qu'on puisse orienter le vaisseau de façon à ce qu'un côté soit dans l'obscurit
Alle
로저. 여기
Chirurgo RKV. Roger. CAP COM ha qualcosa per
- - e 12,5 è grandangolare. L'unica cosa che mi confonde è che dice per la ripresa da veicolo a veicolo: "Vogliamo usare lo zoom a 12,5". Immagino che vogliano solo assicurarsi di avere l'altro veicolo inquadrato. 
سأضع مقياس ا
रॉजर। समझ गया; नंबर 3 अ
Finora non ho vist
तैयार। बस 
罗杰。我们这里有两个齿轮，拉动把手来回转动时它们会跟着转。其中一个齿轮有点像棘轮，它是个带活塞的小圆筒，后面有个尖头，用来啮合棘轮。在打开舱门之前，我们遇到了一些麻烦，打开之后，这个棘轮也很难运转。而且，我们费了好大劲才把舱门关到足够
ठीक है। समझ गया। क्या आप हमें इस पट्टी की दिशा के बारे में कुछ बता सकते हैं? आपने कल रात भी इसका ज़िक्र किया था - कि 
रॉजर। मैंने अब आपकी बात सुन
ジェミニ、こちらヒューストン。OAMSの使
Roger. Mir ist aufgefallen, dass Sie mit Ihrer letzten geplanten Aktivität beginnen. Die anfän
Roger, Mike. Quelques précisions rapides sur le plan de vol. Tout d'abord, nous souhaiterions effectuer une purge de la pile à combustible à oxygène à 1 h 13 mi
알겠습니다. 제가 
收到，哥伦比亚。收到。很好，
Apollo 8, Houston. Votre péricynthien est encore précis à une minute près, et nous allons l'affiner pour obt
حسنًا. بعد 23 ساعة، أصبح المجموع 1121، والرباعي A هو 274، والرباعي Bravo هو 286، والرباعي Charlie هو 274، والرباعي Delta هو 287، أما نسب التبريد فهي
Ok, in fondo al controllo di ingresso, proprio lì dove siamo, la riga in basso ora dice "MODE a STANDBY". Bene, appena sopra, vorrei ricordarti di aggiungere un'osservazione: "Non inizializzare l'intervallo da raggiungere". Questo perché quando 
ठीक है। जिम से अनुरोध है कि वे अपने पाँचों निशानों के बीच थोड़ा और अंतराल रखें। यदि संभव हो, तो हम उनमें से कुछ को शीर्ष बिंदु से आगे तक ले जाना चाहेंगे। हम पाँचों निशानों के बीच काफी तेजी से अंतराल रख रहे हैं, और ज्यामिति की दृष्टि से, 
Okay. Did, it
Ora è in piedi sul sedile. Le sue gambe sono so
Non c'era il velcro sulla fotoca
ठीक है। आपके सवाल का जवाब, जो, नहीं है। मैंने केबिन को लगातार चेक किया। गुणात्मक रूप से, जब हमने इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन को बदला, तो ऐसा नहीं लगा कि फ़्रीक्वेंसी या सूट के पंखे का शोर... कम हुआ हो... थोड़ा कम हुआ है, लेकिन मैं आपकी प्रक्रिया का पालन करूँगा। आप चाहते हैं कि मैं REG A लूँ, क्लोज़ में जाऊँ और
이글
आप उम्मीद कर सकते हैं कि कोण में 10 डिग्री का अंतर होगा; हालांकि, यह उड़
네, 복사
Okay. Bitte wa
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है, जिसे मै
ठीक है। हमारे पास आपके लिए यहाँ और कुछ नहीं है। क्या 
Okay. Mir fällt eine 
Roger. Noch zwei Überprüfungen. Können Sie bitte bestätigen, dass die Diskette mit den N
Ok, Houston. Pannello 276, STRUMENTAZIONE fuori e reset -
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Steelhead. Wir haben Sie im Bild. Ich schalte jetzt ab. Die Wieder
Je me deman
حسنًا. فريد سينزل الآن إلى هناك، وسيحاول الدخول أسفل منصة النوم على جانبه حيث يوجد حزام تثبيت النوم. والهدف من ذلك هو... وضع الجسم بين - بين أسفل المركبة الفضائية - حتى لا يرتفع 
Welche Einstellung hat Ihr Komfortregelv
D'accord, Jack. Ic
أبولو 13، هيوستن. من المفترض أن يكون نظام OMN
Oh là
Alpha/Pc から Pc、LAUNC
안녕하세요, 캔톤 컴 테크, 캔톤 컴 테크, HF의 오로라 세븐입니다.
अभी हम बिल्कुल ज़मीन के करीब हैं, इस तरह कि मुझे नहीं लगता कि ग्राउंड स्टेशन हमें पढ़ पा रहे हैं। हमने कई बार कॉल कटते-कटते सुनी हैं। हम कुछ देर इसी स्थिति में रहेंगे ताकि बूस्टर हमारी नज़र में रहे। अभी बूस्टर के करीब आने में हमें कोई खास सफलता नहीं मिल रही है। ऐसा लग रहा है कि वो अभी भी उतनी ही दूरी पर है जितनी पहले थी। रात में जब बूस्टर हमारे नीचे था, तब ऐसा लग रहा था मानो पूरा आसमान तारों से भरा हो। बूस्टर से इतनी ज़्यादा भाप निकल रही थी कि आसमान में फैल रही थी। मैंने तो यहाँ तक कहा था कि वो तारे जैसे दिख रहे थे। उस 
Also, das Stadion hat 51:5, und wir haben 51:5. Ja. Das erste Mal, dass wir uns überhaupt in irgendet
حسنًا. بالنسبة لـ CB 11، أعطني معلومات عن قواطع رادار RENDEZVOUS، مع نطاق زمني مدت
نعم. للعلم يا جيم، لا أعرف إن كنت قد سمعت هذا من قبل، لكن تلك الفترة الزمنية من 2.5 إلى 1 بوصة قد تم تكرارها حوالي ثلاث مرات، وهي ضيقة جدًا، لذا حاولنا استبعاد ما استطعنا، وهو ليس بالكثير، لكن أعتقد أن الرسالة الأخرى التي قد ترغب في إيصالها إلى جاك عندما تبدأ في محاذاة تلك المنصة، هي ألا يحاول أن يجعلها مثالية للغاية. ليس من الضروري أن
Das ist negativ; nur T
التحكم الإلكتروني بالطائرة على ارتفاع منخفض، ثم رفع المقدمة للوصول إلى وضعية العودة إلى الغ
これ以上話さなければ、このテ
Th
オーケー、ヴァンス。
هيوستن، أبولو 11. اكتمل شحن البطارية، وتقرير حالة الطاقم كالتالي: الإشعاع، CDR 11002، CMP 1000
Die Kabinentemperaturregelu
了解しました。テレビでもそう映っていたと思います。では最後の質問です。ニールさん、着陸地点への進入時に、フットボール場ほどの大きさのクレーターを通過したとのことですが、そこにはおそらく3メートルから4.5メートルほどのかなり大きな岩塊がありましたね。現在の位置から、このフットボール場ほ
好的，Fred-o。这是机动垫显示器 
وإذا قرأت، فأعطني.
Houston, Apollo 11. Par curiosité, sur ces caméras 70 mm, nous estimons avoir exposé environ 300 fois dans le module de commande et environ un millier dans le module de commande; et les deux caméras - ou toutes les cam
Bien, le transfert d'alimentation a duré 57 heures et 11 minutes. Pour information, nous disposons d'une réserve d'énergie suffisante. Nous envisageons d'ailleurs une procédure, que nous pourrions vous recommander ultérieurement après la mise en marche, consistant à alimenter l'un des bus principaux du module de commande via le câble ombilical. Cela nous permettrait éventuellement de recharger les batteries du mod
わかりました、ジ
물론이죠, 프
ठीक है, फ्रेड। बढ़िया। चरण 6: एंटर करें, साथ ही सभी गेंदें, साथ ही 28300। चरण 7: गतिविधि पर नज़र रखें। चरण 8: CB 11 रेंडेज़वस रडार 
ا
- - Спасиб
是的，他们当然可以，比尔。如果你感兴趣，他们可以
はい、30
ジェミニVIII、ヒューストン。レトロファイア後、当方との連絡はできません。ブラックアウト後、CSQ経由で連絡が取れる可能性があります。スプラッ
Сигма Семь. Вы мне это дадите, HF,
嘿，休斯顿，最后阶段可能看起来非常漫长。自动瞄准系统把我们直接带到了一个足球场大小的陨石坑里，周围大约一到两个陨石坑直径的范围内都是大量的巨石和岩石，我们不
Роджер, «
١١، هذه هيوستن. بالإشارة إلى تقييمك الشخصي بأن الجو كان أبرد داخل المركبة 
꽤 높이까지 올라갑니다. 지구의 일출처럼 대기의 영향을 받지 않고 부채꼴 모양으로 퍼지는 것이 아니라, 마치 안개처럼 주변 지역 전체
Да. Всё довольно плохо. Мы заметили... что некоторые видят сквозь окна. С этой стороны всё оч
RCS B Att
حسنًا. قبل أن نبدأ هنا، اطلب البيانات وسنقدم لك 
Vorrei fare un piccolo commento sul sestante. Il suo utilizzo in una navicella spaziale angusta è molto difficile, soprattutto con il casco. Alla fine ho deciso che sarebbe stato inutile con il casco 
你穿上
ठीक है। चलिए, मैं शुरू से बताता हूँ। हो सकता है कुछ बातें मिलती-जुलती हों, लेकिन यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि हम सब एक ही बात समझ रहे हैं, हम समय-सीमा प्रक्रियाओं के एक सेट से शुरू कर रहे हैं जो हमें सामान्य प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट तक ले जाएगा। चेकलिस्ट में कुछ बदलाव होंगे, लेकिन मुख्य रूप से समय-सीमा से संबंधित जानकारी है। यह 6 घंटे 30 मिनट पहले से शुरू होता है और यह मानकर चलता है कि कमांड मॉड्यूल में मेन बी को बिजली मिल रही है। मुझे लगता है कि आपके पास पैड और कमांड मॉड्यूल पैड के नंबर पहले से ही हैं; मेरा म
建议您此时
알겠습니다, 잭. 저희도 그렇게 봅니다. 물론 구름이 많이 껴서 잭 씨가 저희보다 더 선명하게 보시는 거지만, 달이 아니라 
Passo. Ricevuto. La pressione dei booster
Roger, verstanden. Sind Sie ber
罗杰，我们明白了。约翰，我会给你倒计时，
Okay. Le prime due righe sono ok. CB - terza riga, CB(11) e (16): STAB/CONTROL, tutti CHIUSI tranne CB(11), APE
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. P76 PAD,
Roger. Standby, Will give status report. I am in orbit attitude for your tracking. Status report, follows: Fuses all number one except Tower Sep number two. Emergency Retrosequence, Emergency Retrojettison, and Emergency Drogue are in the center-off position, Squib is Armed. Auto Retrojettison is off. is normal, auto, gyro normal. All "T" handles are in the "in"-position. Ret
알겠습니다. 오렌지 주스 빼고는 다 먹
Хорошо, сейчас же возьмём вол
여기는 우정 7입니다. 부정적입니다. 시야나 창밖으로 아무것
أبولو 11، هذه هيوستن. أنا جاهز بجهاز الإجهاض الخاص بك (TLI+90 
Okay, Jim. Credo di aver capito che l'antenna radar del rendez-vous è d'intralcio e vorresti una 
Roger, Roger. Stai arrivando forte e chi
Roger. Die Dampftemperatur im Anzug beträgt 69 Grad, in der Kabine sind es +11 Grad. Die Temperatur ist abrupt gesunken, als die Warnleuchte für zu viel Kabinenwasser aufleuchtete. Ich denke, ich werde d
And the snorkel's (ou
D'accord. Nous allons essayer, et dites-nous si la température de sortie d
روجر. بقي ملاحظتان
Wir nehmen hier die 6er-Serie. Fotos
Roger. In Schritt 5 lassen wi
지금 모니터링 중이신
D'accord. C'est bien. Je vais attendre qu'ils se lèvent, ou au moins que Jack se lève. Il devrait se lever avant Fred. On essaiera ensuite de reprendre le programme. Je n'ai vraim
Non so se riesci a distinguere
रक्तचाप दर्ज किया
Okay. Wir fahren jetzt zu einer guten Aussichtsplattform, und sobald wir diese erreicht haben, halten wir an und lassen Sie aus dem Fens
Der Sonnenuntergang ist wirklich beeindruckend, ich glaube nicht, dass ich viel Zeit damit verschwenden muss, ihn anzusehen. Er ist sehr interessant. Faszinierend ist auch, wie schwarz es ist, wenn sich die Augen nicht daran
好吧，我想，在地球毁灭之前
안녕하세요, 
कंप्यूटर लेने जा रहे हैं। घड़ी में लगभग इतना समय ह
हमें नहीं 
Apollo 8, Houston. At 19, we're due for another cycle through on th
Звучит ка
Roger. Prossimo passo, passo 4: "CONTROLLO ASSETTO su IMBARDATA" - Correzione: "CON
네,
Roger. A Washington, la Commissione Finanze del Senato ha approvato l'estensione della sovrattassa sull'imposta sul reddito, ma un voto del Senato sul disegno di legge sembrava al momento remoto. Ad Austin, il deputato statale Ray Lemmon di Houston è stato nominato Direttore Nazionale dell'American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon ha proposto uno studio sulla possibilità di istituire un istituto di oceanografia in Texas. Sarebbe il primo istituto del genere nella parte occidenta
रॉजर। लागू नहीं है, साथ ही 00202, 02356 022 02280 03 0393 310 013, ऊपर 048, दाएँ 35 - मैं दोहराता हूँ, दाएँ 35। समझ ग
ちなみに、現時点では、潜望鏡の中にそれ
로
わかりました。下の方に、BAT 2、低電圧、オフ/リセット、そしてオンのステップがあります。次のBAT 2、高電圧、オフ/リセット、そしてオンのステップがあります。この2つのステップの間には、GOを出すまでお待
+44, / 6
分かりました。それでは、私たちが持っているものを読み上げましょう。彼らの飛行計画に記載されていたものはすべて持っていますが、もし飛行計画から変更されていた場
It's looking good, Frank. We just 
알겠습니다. BAT C에서 전압이 전혀 측정
Giusto. Volevo solo verificare: avevamo una scarsa ricezione quando ti ho parlato prima. Volevo verificare che tu capisca che il controllo del Sole che hai fatto prima era buono, ed è su questo che ci basiamo. Qualsiasi cosa ti abbiamo detto in passato riguardo all'osservare il Sole dal finestrino anteriore sinistro o le stelle, come Nunki attraverso il... beh, vog
Eagle et Columbia, Houston. Roger. Bien r
もっと詳しく知ることができたら、地球を見ます。この時点では、約0.5度でパワーダウンしたため、ピッチングレートはほぼ0です。ピッチングレートはごくわ
You want to check that. Oh, you're just going to leave that for 
Non, Frank. Il se
هذا صحيح. أنا أبحث عن بعض
减去 29837，加上 02390，加上 00994 000 200 00
वह "1" इतनी दूर खिसक जाता
Roger. 
Roger. On my mark it will be
Роджер. Теперь, что касается вашей пер
로저, 휴스턴. 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 하나
Negativo, non ho mangiato da quando ho preso 
はい。プッ
Аврора Севен, ваша последняя запись была нечитаемой. Ваше состояние ухудшается, хотя и с перебоями. Я прочитаю время ретросеквенции вслепую. Зона 3 Дельта, 04 12 32, 04 12 32; Эхо 04 22 27; 3 
Bene. Molto bene allora. E la prossima volta, beh,
Roger. Nous avons pris votre température buccale. Veuillez augmenter votre tension ar
Хорошо. На панели 250 замыкается автоматический выключатель BAT A, ВВОД/ПОСТУПАЮЩЕЕ ПИТАНИЕ; на панели 275 замыкается автоматический выключатель INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B. Далее на панели 5 находятся несколько автоматических выключателей: автоматический выключатель BAT RELAY BUS, BAT A, замыкается; автоматический выключатель SENSOR UNIT, 
Ok, Acquario.
هيوستن كاب كوم، غولدس
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। मुझे त
جيم، لدى تشارلي بعض الإجراءات التي يجب عليك قراءتها هنا؛ أعتقد أنك ستحتاج إلى قائمة التحقق الخاصة بالتفعيل، إذا كا
Il semblerait que la couche nuageuse descende légèrement en dessous de l
Il TR che abbiamo sta aument
Apollo 8, Houston. I tuoi dati sembrano davvero buoni. Si tra
حسناً. إنها مناورة
*** About to lose my balance in one direction and recovery is a quite natural and very easy *** And, moving yo
はい、その通りです。軌道調整とタイムハックが完了すれば、こちらにいる優秀なスタッフが、サービスモジュール分離姿勢とコマンドモジュールの軌道調整姿勢のための8ボール姿勢を提供できるようになります。これは月と太陽を模した軌道調整で
好的。阿波罗11号，休
Okay. Wir würden gerne mit dem batteriebetriebenen Alfa beg
ठीक है। चार्ली और डेल
Roger. C'est ce que nous faison
Роджер. 1, G&N: 62710, плюс 098, минус 019, 075 49 4965, минус 28897, минус 03944, минус 00686; 358 226 347; 01692, плюс 00610; 29173 602 29108; 31 106.6 358. Выровнять Вегу и Денеб 243 183 012. Нет заполнения. Горизонт в люке за 2 м
밴스, 저는 최소 추진력만 사용하는 자세 제어로 롤과 요, 아니 정확히는 롤과 피치를 제어하려고 노력해 왔습니다. 그런데 이 설정에서 자세 제어만으로
Roger. +90, G&N: 63481, -153, +132; 004 10 25 38; -04761, +00001, +53361; rotation 180 193 000; HA est NA; +00203 53573 633 53349, étoile du sextant 33 1578 122.
相机安装在支架上，我
Vous nous lisez très mal, il y a beaucoup de
Oh, je ne sais pas. J'estimerais qu'il se trouvait probablement à un ou deux kilomètres e
Roger. Es sieht so aus, als hätten wir ein Plus v
좋습니다. 이제 가방은 준비됐고, 다음 단계는 빨간색 우주복 호스(지휘관용이든 LMP용이든 상관없습니다. 나중에는 두 호스 모두 준비해야 하니까요)를 가방 상단에 넣을 준비를 하
Roger. Ho preso una pillol
Okay. Dice che lo sa
Роджер. Время сгорания — 2+40. GMTRC — 16 
Roger. For the NSR maneuver GET of burn, 03 plus 47 plus 37; Delta-VT, 42.9; duration, 54 seconds; yaw 0, pitch-down 3 degrees; Core 25, 00429; 26, 00023; 27, all zeros; thruster
Columbia, Houston. Nous vous communiquerons une mise à jour sur la situation des vecteurs de transmission un peu plus tard. Nous ne sommes pas encore prêts. Par
로저. 이전 건, 14시 54분 00초 호라이즌 스캐너 
M
Ok. Siamo alla fine delle modifiche al libro in solitaria, e ho due pagine di modifiche al piano di volo. Sono le pagine 3-122 e 3-125. Mentre cerchi, passiamo a Ken per ris
Houston, Ap
오로라 세븐, 카노.
روجر. المنطق
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 고이득
Roger. Parfait. Nous prenons des phot
Qui la situazione è davvero bella, Wally. Stai facendo un ottimo lavoro e non vediamo l'ora di riv
حسنًا. هذا يبدو جيدًا. أيضًا، أثناء انتظارك لاستقرار المركبة، قد يكون من المفيد استخدام العدسة العينية للتأكد من أن عملية الاحتراق لم تشهد أي خلل على الإطلاق.
जी हां; और, चूंकि कल के बड़े बर्न के दौरान गिम्बल को ठीक से एडजस्ट किया गया था, इसलिए हमें सेंटर ऑफ़ ग्रेविटी (c.g.) पर स्थिर रहना चाहिए, और हम यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि जैक इस बर्न के लिए भी उसी स्थिति में बैठे जहां वह कल बैठा था। इस तरह, आपको एटीट्यूड को नियंत्रित करने में कोई परेशानी नहीं होगी। अब मैं पे
Так что проблем нет. У вас все расходные материалы в 
Фрэнк, я только что получил газету. Я просмотрю её и выберу для тебя новости
मैं आपकी बात अच्छे स
काश मैंने कल रात
아, 저기 있군. 수평선을 놓치고 있었어. 설마 보조 스캐너가 지금 꺼진 건 아니겠지? 그럴 리가 없어. 어떻게 되는지 보자. 이 구체는 완전히 
Il était de plus 100 
Vous avez sous les yeux notre sonde, la partie située à l'avant d'Odyssey. C'est un objet très lourd, mais j'imagine qu'en apesanteur, il ne pèse rien et qu'il est beaucoup plus facile à manipuler. D'ailleurs, Fred et Jack ont ​​tous deux fait remarquer, 
D'accord. Premièrement, ces instructions ne prévoient aucune disposition pour prendre des photo
هل يمكنك أن تع
休斯顿，13. 1 号氧气罐压力
Roger, c'est parti. Tout a l'air parfait
友情セブン、私はあ
لقد
Roger, Buzz. Es scheint hier ein Missverständnis bezüglich 405 und 406 zu geben. Wir bitten euch, diese Werte vor dem Abdocken auf Null zu setzen. Nach dem Abdocken könnt ihr da
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया। मैं फिर से कहता हूँ: मैंने उन्हें नहीं देखा। ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स ने आपके द्वारा दिए गए निर्देशांकों के बहुत करीब एक स्थान की ओर इशारा किया, इसलिए मैंने उस क्षेत्र में एक छोटा सा गड्ढा चुना और उस पर निशान लगा दिया, ताकि मेरे पास दोहराने योग्य डेटा हो सके, लेकिन फिर
Pour
Folge der Nadel; folge der Nadel...
罗杰，11。中途修正的幅度仅供参考，但中途4号弹道下降了约2.0英尺/秒。另外，关于气室压力，你的机载读数87磅/平方英寸与我们的遥测读数92磅/平方英寸相符，而你的机载读数89磅/平方英寸与我们的遥测读
لا، ربما لاحظتُ ذلك، في نهاية الجولة السادسة أو السابعة تقريبًا، شربتُ كمية كبيرة من الماء... وشعرتُ بتحسن. أتناول الطعام والشراب 
Улиц
这里是夏威夷空中交通管制中心。待命。地面一
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir bekommen kein gutes Signal. Könnten wir bitte überprüfen, ob wir im Automatikmodus auf de
正解です、ジム。そして13番、ヒューストン。コンピューターはあ
Ricevuto. Abbiamo caricato quei carichi e li abbiam
ランデブーレーダーのセルフテス
ليس لدينا ما نقدمه ل
よし。乗組員の状況は、昨夜は皆しっかり休息を取り、体調も良好です。ジムはちょうど目覚めたばかりで、ビルは最初の積み込み作業を始めて
نظام التحكم الإلكتروني في الهبوط ونظام
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend die Details erläutern. Okay. Der Eintritt in die Atmosphäre erfolgt um 142:40 Uhr; etwa 6,5 ​​Stunden vorher, also ungefähr, beginnen wir mit der Aktivierung der Heizleistung, indem wir die Temperaturen des Kommandomoduls überprüfen und dieses gegebenenfalls vorheizen. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies notwendig sein wird. Detaillierte Anweisungen dazu folgen später. Ungefähr 6 Stunden vorher beginnen wir mit dem Hochfahren der Heizleistung anhand der modifizierten 30-Minuten-Checkliste, die Sie bereits für den vorherigen Zwischenkurs verwendet haben. Kurz darauf, etwa 5 Stunden vorher, benötigen wir die Ausrichtung für die Körperachsenausrichtung mithilfe des Erdterminators, wie zuvor. Sobald wir das haben, führen wir -7 durch, was jetzt etwa einer Brenngeschwindigkeit von 2 Fuß pro Sekunde oder etwa 15 Sekunden entspricht. Mir wurde gesagt, dass sie jetzt bei 1,5 liegt
Ich sehe, wie sich Dinge lösen, aber ich kann sie nicht genau erkennen. Da sind wi
알겠습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 안테나를 교
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. فريقكم الأخضر الودود يغادر الليلة، وهذه هي المرة الأ
Roger. W
ハワイ
Tranquillité, ici Houston. Avez-vous reçu m
Si nous choisissons une date, il faudrait que ce soit une date qui nous permette, en cas de problème, de terminer le processus de chauffe, tout en nous laissant suffisamment de temps pour réparer – par exemple, bricoler 
حسنًا. فهمت؛ الشمس على الجانب الأيمن من النافذة رقم 1. وعندما تُعطينا هذه ا
Eagle, Columbia. I tuoi angoli di guadagno elevato sono - Corretto - Eagle, Houston. I tuoi angoli di guadagno elevato sono 165° di beccheg
أقرأ لك نفس الشيء. ترقبوا المزيد في مس
Wie weit draußen waren wir wohl, als wir es zum ersten Mal sahen? Ich denke, wir müssen mindestens 500 Fuß draußen gewesen sein, als wir uns dem Ziel nähert
이제 슬슬 다시 잠들 
고도 변
알겠습니다. 보조 라디에이터 입력 온도는 70도에서 약 72도 사이이고, 라디에이터 출력 온도는 약 30도입니다. 글리콜 증발기 온도는 약 65도이고, 증기 압력은 최대치이며, 글리콜 배출 압력은 약 9psi입니다. 보조 축압기 보호복 온도는 약 52도이고, 객실 온도는 약 58도입니다. 압력은 보호복이 4.1, 객실이 5입니다. 이산화탄소 분압은 1을 약간 넘는 약 1.1입니다. 건물 측면 온도는 72도이고, 헬륨은 3500, N2 A는 2300, N2 B는 약 2450입니다. 연료는 약 165이고, 연료 전지 1은 둘 다 닫혀 있고 압력이 0입니다. 피부 온도는 405도입니다. 응축기 배기가스는 낮은 스케일입니다. 연료 전지 2의 경우 현재 O2 또는 H2 유량은 0.13~0.14로 측정되고 있으며, O2 유량은 현재 최대 스케일 상한에 고정되어 있지만 추진기 작동에 따라 변동하고 있습니다. 이로 인해 메인 버스 A의 전압도 약 1.1의 안정적인 값에서 최대 스케일 상한까지 변동하는 현상이 나타나고 있습니다. TSKIN은 약 445이고 응축기 배기 17은 180입니다. 연료 전지 1은 0암페어이고, 2는 44에서 약
스타 37은 광학계 교
D'accord, Fred. On vous reçoit parfaitement. Bien. On prépare une procédure pour vous: un contrôle solaire sera effectué dans environ 74 heures, soit un peu plus de 3 heures. Il s'agira d'un cran d'arrêt 2. Nous vous fournirons une procédure détaillée sous peu
حسنًا. أريدك أن تذهب إل
了解
حسنًا. أمرٌ مثيرٌ للاهتمام حقًا - جيم يرى ضوء النهار كاملًا من نافذته، بينما أرى الليل ينهمر من نافذتي. نحن ندور تدريجيًا نحو الأمام، 
我们刚刚欣赏到了非常美
فريندشيب سفن، هذا جراح زن
Хорошо, и Атрия там, в секстанте. Ну, знаете, она не прямо посередине секстанта. Конечно, я думаю... 
Non credo che sia un gran problema, perché la commutazione dell'antenna non è affatto difficile e... è necessario che funzioni; se non funziona come pubblicizzato, almeno funziona in modo ragionevol
Okay. Bevor ich darauf eingehe, möchte ich bestätigen, dass Sie di
जी हाँ, जिम। होता ये है कि जब आप डिटेंट से बाहर जाते हैं, तो हम एरर नीडल्स को रीसेट कर देते हैं और आपका एटीट्यूड रेफरेंस खत्म हो जाता है। आप एक नया एटीट्यूड रेफरेंस सेट करते हैं, और हो सकता है कि वो बर्न एटीट्यूड न हो, क्योंकि इस सम
Yes. They cross just south of the lower part of Mexico, probably through Central America. That is the equatorial band which we assume to be the intertropical convergence zone. The other band, which stands about 30 south, correctly appears to join the equator at the far left, or just beyond the horizon on the left edge of Earth, or at least it looks like it's going to join it.
روجر. حمولة SPC التي نرسلها
Roger. Loud and c
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちら
يا مايكل، هل أنتم جميعاً
Хоро
Roger. È apparso molto più nitido con il sestante che con il monocolo, e si poteva sicuramente dire che si trattava di una singola cellula nelle ultime f
Roger. Il nostro rapporto da fuori dice che qui fuori sta piovendo e
روجر. سأعود إلى تردد U
मैं डिटेंट 2 को ज़रूर आज़माना चाहूंगा, लेकिन मु
不过，这
11号，休斯顿。我们对隧道里的画面质量感到非常惊
不，我觉得我们没怎么休息，但另一方面，我们也没什么事可做，所以其实也不太累。我想我们能顺利完成下一轮，然后埃德就
了解しました。フランク、今回の噴射で必要なのは毎秒8フィート、毎秒8フィートです。放射状上向きに
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven. Hier spricht Guaymas Com Tech, Guaymas Com Tech, gesendet au
Roger. Abbiamo finito co
Okay. Ready for
Esiste ancora quel campo 
Okay. Looks good. It's we
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。あと1
로저, 버즈. 지금 우리가 있는 이 분위기가 시작하기에 아주 좋은 분위기입니다. 이 분위기로 충분할 것 같습니다. 그러니 찰리와 델타 쿼드콥터를 비활성화해 주십시오. 5분에서 10분 정도 기다린 후 설
In breve, per controllare il beccheggio e il rollio, usa il, come abbiamo fatto pratica; per l'imbardata puoi us
있잖아요
非
روجر. لقد اكتمل جدول رصدنا، وأنا الآن أقوم بالمناورة للوصول إلى
그거 네가 받은 거야, 아니면 그가 너에게 준 거야
제가 
AP 통신에 따르면, 미국인들은 교황 바오로 2세가 이탈리아에
Okay. Das war's – das geht auf u
يبدو أنك تقترب من الحل. حسنًا. أعتقد أننا شطبنا السطرين الأولين في الصفحة 2-2. الآن، أسفل ذلك مباشرةً، مكتوب "قائ
Tranquility Base, hier spric
حسنًا. قرأتُ البيانات: 11، G&N: 37200، ناقص 0
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend die Details erläutern. Okay. Der Eintritt in die Atmosphäre erfolgt um 142:40 Uhr; etwa 6,5 ​​Stunden vorher, also ungefähr, beginnen wir mit der Aktivierung der Heizleistung, indem wir die Temperaturen des Kommandomoduls überprüfen und dieses gegebenenfalls vorheizen. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies notwendig sein wird. Detaillierte Anweisungen dazu folgen später. Ungefähr 6 Stunden vorher beginnen wir mit dem Hochfahren der Heizleistung anhand der modifizierten 30-Minuten-Checkliste, die Sie bereits für den vorherigen Zwischenkurs verwendet haben. Kurz darauf, etwa 5 Stunden vorher, benötigen wir die Ausrichtung für die Körperachsenausrichtung mithilfe des Erdterminators, wie zuvor. Sobald wir das haben, führen wir -7 durch, was jetzt etwa einer Brenngeschwindigkeit von 2 Fuß pro Sekunde oder etwa 15 Sekunden entspricht. Mir wurde gesagt, dass sie jetzt bei 1,5 liegt, also deutlich innerhalb der Toleranz. Okay. Danach beginnen wir sofort mit dem Manöver zur Abwurfposition des Servicemoduls. Da wir es früher als üblich abwerfen, befindet es sich in der Flugebene. Wir benötigen und wollen keine Abweichung von der Flugebene. Das Servicemodul befindet sich also in der Flugebene und ist entlang des Radiusvektors nach außen gerichtet. Anschließend bereiten wir das Kommandomodul für den SEP des Servicemoduls vor, einschließlich der Überprüfung und des Heißlauftests. Etwa 4 Stunden und 30 Minuten vor dem geplanten Zeitpunkt werfen wir das Servicemodul ab. Wir werden die Maschine so lange hochziehen, bis wir das Servicemodul im Flug haben und versuchen, ein paar Fotos zu machen. Wir werden aber keine riskanten Manöver für Fotos durchführen, da wir den Flugbahnwinkel zu diesem Zeitpunkt nicht verändern wollen. Okay. Das gibt uns ungefähr zwei Stunden Zeit, um die Vorbereitungen abzuschließen, falls wir in Verzug geraten. Dann können wir die Checkliste durchgehen und das Hochfahren des Kommandomoduls vorbereiten. Wir werden das Kommandomodul etwa zweieinhalb Minuten vor dem Start vollständig hochfahren. Wir werden den Computer zuschalten, die Maschine hochziehen, die Statusvektoren übertragen und die Plattform des Kommandomoduls ausrichten. Spätestens nach etwa andert
Roger
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。オーバー
روجر، أبولو 13. هذه عملية استعادة المرك
D'accord, Frank. Et le dernier point concerne l'étoile 
我这里视野很好，能看到地球的
了解しました。太平洋中部着陸エリアの天候は良好です。雲量は2000、点在雲、視程10、風速
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴
好的。下一页，电源7，面板16。第
Okay. Mach i
好的，吉姆。我们一直在讨论，为了更好地观察
क
Okay. Vorab: Diese Anleitung enthält keine
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, ici Watertown Com Tech. HF. Comment 
嗯，我够不着后面的监视器。我会把焦点对准它，但我们现在要越过其中一个四轴飞行器和一根天线，几乎是垂直向下看地面轨迹，也就是我们现在看到的这条轨迹。
请注意，您正在使用高增
अब आप पीछे लगे उन थ्रस्टर्स को चलते हुए देख स
罗杰。我们理解，我们已向下挖掘了3英寸，没有遇到
we would lik
Это фантастическое зрелище, Билл. 
روجر، ١١. لقد تم توجيهي للتو إلى شاشة أخرى، وبالفعل، تظهر درجات اللون البني 
えっと、ほら、これにフィルムを装填したら――フィルムを装填して、一枚か二枚撮ったら、また取り出さなきゃい
Jim, il prossimo passo che vogliamo intraprendere è trasferire un po' di energia al modulo di comando MAIN B in modo da poter ini
This is Sigma Seven, giving the
아니요. 
Eagle, Hou
Roger. Je comprends votre message. Pourriez-vous me restituer votre rapport de gravure? Nous avons noté les résidus et la durée de la gravure, et c'est tout. Merci de me renvoyer le rapport comp
좋습니다, 패널 11 구성, 맨 위 줄: AC 버스 B, S-밴드 안테나, 열림, 열림; AC 버스 A, 테이프 레코더, 열림. 두 번째 줄, 시스템 A 아래에서 메인 SOV부터 쿼드 1 TCA까지 모두 닫힘. 비행 디스플레이 아래의 지휘관 X-포인터, 열림; 랑데부 레이더 대기 히터, 열림; 착륙 레이더 히터, 열림. 자세 제어 차단기, 닫힘; ED: 로직 전원 A, 열림; 유틸리티, 열림. 아래: 슈트 팬 1, 닫힘; 자동 전환, 닫힘. 통신 아래에서: VHF B 송신기, 열림; VHF A 수신기, 열림. 신호 강도 표시, 열림; 작동, 닫힘. 맨 아래 줄: 크로
Хорошо, Билл. Думаю, я хочу повторить свой последний вопрос об исп
Houston, per quanto riguarda l'elevato bit rate, quello che vorrei fare è: se hai ricevuto l'ultimo passaggio, vorrei riprodurlo, farlo partire da un bit rate basso e poi aumentare quando necessario. Come sarebbe
Oh, ho quasi perso il mio primo tramonto cercando di accendere la luce giusta in cabina. È piuttosto rapido, come mi avevano detto. Non ci riesco, ecco che Arturo è proprio sul lato giusto, dove dovrebbe essere. Molto bello. Dovrei riuscire a vedere Muchea a b
Ну, вы можете вытянуться, устроиться поудобнее или вам дово
ロジャー、11。こちらは元CAP COMです。素晴らしい仕事ぶりですね、おめでとうございます。本当に素晴らしいショーを見せてくれました。そろそろパワーを落として少し休むべき時で
नमस्कार, बुध ग्रह से उ
حسنًا يا جاك. في MDC 1، لا يوجد ش
Хьюстон, это «Аполлон-8». Я принял сообщение
了解、ジョン。
Would you say a
그 사람들에게 다
Earth will be by over there in a minute
Roger. J'entends Kano demander à ce qu'on vérifie sa tension. Je vais la lui donner tou
قم بتنفيذ إطلاق
Okay. Entry PAD is area MIDPAC: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, plus 1102, minus 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28; DL and VL, all four are not applicable; DO, 4 00 02 10 00
Хорошо. 
休斯顿，我完全理
로저. 방금 휴스턴에서 연락이 왔습니다. 준비가 되시면 언제든 나오셔도 됩니다. 우주선에서 나오시면 
Okay, 13. Wir möchten, dass Sie die I
Roger, vou
هل يمكن قيادة
Nous allons
Vado - ho avuto finora qualche azione di spinta elevat
Okay, Joe. I've created a new page here called -1A, item 6, Transfer to power and the usual check that the floodlight's blank and that I've got the CAUTION WARNING POWER light ON; I get a from Jack, and I will pass that on down to you. Item 7, CIRCUIT BREAKER TRANSLUNAR BUS TIE, panels 11 and 16, CLOSED. Step 8, circuit breaker lighting and utility on panel 1, CLOSED, and turn on the utility lights. However, the lighting is such that I don't really need those. They are in stowage, ri
لم ألمس وحدة التحكم اليدوية هنا منذ حوالي
Ich möchte nun auf die Kommentare zur Navigation eingehen, so wie i
بيريسنثيون زائد 2 - حسنًا، بيريسنثيون زائد 2، عند؛ زائد 1633.0، ناقص 0014.5، ناق
Grande qua
Ok, Fred-o, bel colpo. Nella riga 4, iniziando con: VENTILATORE TUTA 1, CHIUSO; TRASFERIMENTO AUTOMATICO POMPA GLICOLE, TRASMETTITORE VHF B, APERTO; RICEVITORE VHF A, APERTO. Sotto: VISUALIZZAZIONE INTENSITÀ SEGNALE, APERTO; AZIONAMENTO, CHIUSO. Sotto, riga 5: BUS DI COLLEGAMENTO, AP
Beh, ti dico,
J'en suis encore à un bon moment. C'est clairement un panneau SLA, aucun doute là-dessus. On dirait bien un panneau. Ça vient de notre S-IVB. Tiens, regarde
أبولو 8، كنا 
- - e la guida del veicolo di lancio sembrano entrambe in buone condizioni. Stimiamo che ci sia una probabilità superiore al 99% di un'interruzione della guida sul veicolo di lancio. Quindi, a quanto pare, le cose stanno andando molto bene. Per tua informazione, MLA ha ricevuto circa 1 minuto di un'immagine TV utilizzabile; quindi, a quanto pare, il si
ठीक है, 13. यह ह्यूस्टन है। हमें लगता है कि फ्यूल सेल 3 से ऑक्सीजन का प्रवाह कम हो रहा है। इसलिए, हम चाहते हैं कि आप फ्यूल सेल 3 पर REAC वाल्व बंद कर दें। ऐस
रॉजर। बहुत बढ़िया। ब्रेक। लैंडिंग क्षेत्र में मौसम का पूर्वानुमान फिलहाल 2000 फीट की दूरी पर छिटपुट, तेज़ छिटपुट, 10 मील की दूरी पर है। हवा लगभग 080 डिग्री पर 18 नॉट की गति से चल रही है। आपको लगभग 3 से 6 फीट ऊंची लहरें मिलेंगी। आपका डेल्
正确
로저. 질문을 전부 이해하지
وق
11，休斯顿。相机的扫描让画面——现在好多了。由于电视的扫描，手电筒似乎在闪烁。我们看不
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。出发
Это наводит на ещё одну мысль. Теперь, когда мы всё это упаковали в мешки и ёмкость для конденсата, мы, вероятно, могли бы продуть 
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 다음으로, 다음 카메라 - 대기 1. 여기 노이즈가 있네요. 좋습니다. 다음 카메라는 16mm 렌즈를 사용할 예정이며, 이 사진들은 우선순위 3으로 분류됩니다. 좋습니다. 먼저 A-8에서 16mm 렌즈와 배터리 팩을 가져오세요. 10mm 렌즈를 분리하고,
Вы хотите, чтобы я что-нибудь запечатал? Я запечатаю только что отснятую пленку
コロンビア、準備がで
로저. 모든 게 좋아
फिर वो बुझ
짐, 지금까지 딱 한 가지만 놓쳤어요. 잠시
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。こちらフレンドシップ・セブ
好的。我们有一个要求，需要执行一个操作，
Хорошо. У меня
你能帮我修改一下MDC任务计时器吗
रॉजर। मुझे 3.8 मिला और O2 पर 54 मिला और कोई फ्लैग
Roger. C'est très f
حسنًا. نتوقع، عند الوقت المُحدد لمنتصف مسارك التالي، أي عند نقطة الدخول ناقص ساعتين، احتراقًا بمعدل 1.4 قدم في الثانية، مما يُغير قيمة جاما عند نقطة الدخول بمقدار عُشر درجة. حاليًا، وبدون أي مناورات إضافية، تبلغ قيمة جاما -6.39 درجة، وسنزيدها قليلًا جدًا للوصول إلى منتصف خط 
रॉजर। मुझे बताया गया है कि उस पैकेज के लिए तापमान 38 डिग्री रहेगा, और यह बर्निंग के लिए ठीक रहेगा। हम इस समय बर्निंग की विस्तृत प्रक्रियाओं पर काम कर रहे हैं और हमें उम्मीद है कि हम आपको जल्द ही एक बेहतरीन सेटअप उपलब्ध करा द
Roger. Wir haben hier unten ein kleines Antennenprob
D'accord Fred-o. Page 12, nous avons besoin des mises à jour. Nous avons des vecteurs et une tablette pour vous. Dès que vous aurez atteint cet état, nous vous indiquerons quand effectuer la liaison montante. D'accord. Sous « Activation et autotest », suivez la procédure complète. Page 13, sous « AGS Aline », effectuez l'étape 1; s
Хорошо, у нас просто немн
نعم، فعلت. تريد إزالة - تريد تشغيل كلا الناقلين، باستخدام مفاتيح ربط الناق
阿波罗11号，
ヒューストン、コ
Roger. Wir werden sie beobachten
Bei der Triebwerksprüfung leuchten die Flammen rot in Streifen. Wenn die Giertriebwerke zünden, verschwindet der Horizont vollständig. D
알겠습니
Und wenn Sie den ersten noch einmal lesen möchten, dann geb
بينما كان جاك يُ
わかりました。最初の星を2セット、2番目の
マイクはドッキングをスムーズに行ったに違いない。プローブ
Voyons voir, configuration lunaire normale. En fait, c'est un système 
في
حسنًا. كنت سأقول إنني لا أفعل -
是的。迈克
네, 알겠습니다. 저희도 지금 지구를 보고 있는데, 아주 길고 얇은 구름 띠가
Bene, con l'attivazione, abbiamo completato il passaggio, siamo arriva
Понял. Выключите питание, включите управл
アポロ8号、
Vorrebbero che tu dicessi qualcosa al pubblico televisivo i
Go ahead, 
केबिन की सापेक्ष आर्द्रता 20 प्रतिशत है। शीतलक की मात्
रॉजर, एड। क्या आप ऑक्सीजन हाई रेट पर जाकर केबिन का दबाव वापस सामान्य स्तर पर लाएं
أتعلم يا جاك، لاحظتُ شيئًا واحدًا عندما وصلتُ إلى هنا لأول مرة، وهو أنه عند بدء الحركة من وضعية الوقوف في وحدة القيادة والنزول إلى الأسفل في مركبة أكواريوس، يحدث تغيير طفيف في الاتجاه، ورغم أنني مررتُ به مرةً في خزان الماء، إلا أنه لا يزال غريبًا بعض الشيء. أجد نفسي الآن واقفًا و
لدي بعض البيانات الكمية لأشاركها معك. نحن على أتم الاستعداد لاستقبال إشارة التلفزيون عندما تحصل على 
Nous sommes prêts à partir. All
Il est pe
Ascent feed closed; pressure's holding good, cross fe
Roger. Noch eine Anmerkung: Da dies in den Datenpriorisierungsbesprechungen für viel Kontroverse sorgte, scheint eine Neigung von 10 Grad nach oben die beste Position 
Capito, 
حسنًا. أستطيع فعل ذلك. لست متأكدًا تمامًا مما إذا كان بإمكاني التحكم في الدوران أو الارتفاع في النبضة، لكن يمكنني التحكم في الانحراف في النبضة - الانحراف في النبضة عل
Sì s
Il segno di inclinazione è leggermente verso l'alto e di conseguenza corrisponde alla retroinclinazione, che in questo momento è di 30 gradi. Ora ho un'imba
15～2
Now, let's see, this burn's... to our back, I su
참고로 케이프 측에서는 우리가 여기서 한동안 수동 조종을 유지하지 않으면 이 궤도 비행을 종료해야 
Хорошо, Д
नहीं। हमारे पास क्वाड ब्रावो और क्वाड डेल्टा हैं, जो गणना किए गए आंकड़ों के अनुसार, उस बिंदु के ठीक पास हैं जहां हमें उन्हें सक्रिय करना चाहिए। आप जो संख्याएँ पढ़ रहे हैं वे थोड़ी अधिक हो सकती
짐은 다시 낮 
Pour
Bene. Prossimamente. BAT 2 è in linea. Abbiamo un ALLARM
माइक, यहाँ आपकी चेक
Роджер. 10, /: 45597, минус 040, плюс 157, плюс 35189, минус 01513, минус 00346 180 007 000, Ноябрь Альфа плюс 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, звезда оси наблюдения Дельта Скорпиона (другое название — Дзуба) вниз 071, влево 45, плюс 0748 минус 16500 12995 36300; главная звезда Сириус, вторичная, Ригель, 129 155 010; четыре квадру, 15 секунд, пустое пространство; горизонт на линии окна 2,9 на T минус 3; исполь
わかりました、ありがとうございます。OMNIが機能していない限り、私たちにとってはずっと簡単です。エイトボールでロールしてOMNIの数字を指し示すことで、全てがここで完了しました。あとは切り替えるだけです。もしお気になさらなければ、ずっと簡単
لم نتمكن من ذلك
Roger. NOUN 84: plus 01223, minus alle Nullen, plus 01889; NOUN 33: 102 44 2700, plus 12 Brenndauer ist 046, Brenndauer für ist 030. Bereit für 
了解、ジム。司令船356.65、163.42、346.67、アクエリアス302.26、345.92、
Apollo 11, Houston. Voici quelques dernières informations. Lors de la rentrée atmosphérique, nous vous avions indiqué d
Roger. Sei a malapena leggibile. Ti consigliamo di comunicarci i tuoi orari di sonno, indipendentemente dal fatto che tu ritenga di dormire a sufficienza o meno. Cercheremo di adattare il piano di volo in base alle tue ore di s
Acquario, Houston. Su quei 5018 angoli che avevamo a 74 ore, Fred, si basavano
N
Roger. Ecco il formato che ti invieremo per un rientro in rollio. Ti forniremo ∆V e ∆T per la tua accensione OAMS. Ti forniremo il GMTRC. Ti forniremo un RET di 0,05 g. E poi otterrai anche il RET della frenata, del principale e dell'atterraggio. La tua procedura sarà in retromarcia per raggiungere la massima portanza, a testa bassa. Al RET di 0,05 g entrerai in un rateo di r
그리고 저희 측정 결과에 따르면 자동변속
Et je suis revenu en arrière - OK, je suis revenu à la MOYENNE maintenant et... j
ठीक है
아니
我现在感觉休息得很好，虽然我没怎么睡好。我
Ciao
Oui, ça
Looking at the world of sports, let's see here. While you were busy the other day, Joe Namath and football Commissioner Pete Rozelle made the announcement that "Broadway Joe" had agreed to sell his interest in the Bachelors III restaurant and report to the New York Jets. Joe arrived at the Jets' training camp today and had his first workout. Several other Jet players who had held out along with Joe also reported. And Davy Hill, from Jackson, Michigan, won his third major golf in as many starts in the past week. He won the Philadelphia Classic. Hill has won four tournaments so far this year and is the leading money winner this year with a cool $129.000. And i
Это пункт "Убедитесь, что обогреватели находились в автоматическом режиме в течение 15 минут". На первой странице этой инструкции вы перевели обогреватели в автоматический режим и нажали на выключатели, и нам нужно, чтобы они прогрели квадроциклы в течение 15 минут
好的。我们已经考虑了所有可能的情况。我们能想到的最坏情况是你的3σ误差脱靶距离——最坏情况是70海里。没错，就是70。我们希望你进行一次OAMS反推机动；然后我们会进行手动反推，当然，不使用电脑。我们希望进行零升力滚转再入。就是零升力滚转再入。之所以选择滚转而不是90-90倾斜，是因为滚转能减少散布。散布会趋于平衡。我们认为这样可以更快地恢复。此外，这样做我们可以在你失去意识之前获得IP
さあ、ヒューストン、
هيوستن، كولومبيا. اقترب موعد مروري الأول حيث قد أتمكن من رؤية المركبة القمرية. هل لديك أي معلومات طبوغرافية قد تساعدني هنا؟ نظام الرؤية التلقائي يتتبع بين فوهتين. إحداهما، كما تراها المركبة القمرية، ستكون طويلة عند الساعة الحادية عشرة؛ والأخرى ستكون قصيرة وخلفها عند الساعة الخامسة. إنهما فوهتان كبيرتان قديمتان - منخفضت
Затем вы сообщит
C'est exa
맞아요, CAP COM, 총을 조종하는 건 정말 쉬워요. 유일한 문제는 연료가 부족하다는 거예요. 연료가 다 떨어져서 우주선 앞쪽으로 돌아서 뒤쪽으로 이동한
알겠습니다. 25%에서 30%로 폐수 배출량을 명목상 25%까지 줄여달라고 요청드립니다. 소모품 현황을 알려드리겠습니다. 22시간 후 현재 총 소모량은 -3.5%입니다. 알파 -3.5%, 브라보 -1.5%, 찰리 -5.0%, -4.0%, 수소 -2파운드, 산소 -4파
र
当我们进入清晰区域，完全超出扫描范围时，我会尝试手动和自动锁定序列，然后切换到 REACQ
روجر. تقرير حالة الطاقم كالتالي: الماء متوفر، وقد قطع القائد حوالي ٥٠ ميلاً حتى الآن اليوم؛ نقطة القيادة المركز
عندما يُعيد نيل مشعات الجليك
Хорошо. Мне просто нужно переключить OMNI. Хорошо. Читая изменения, Джо, на страницах 1-4: нагреватели топливных элементов три, ВЫКЛ., переходим к топливному элементу 1, центральная шина A - главная шина A в ВЫКЛ.; главная шина - топливный элемент 2 к главной шине A, ВЫКЛ.; топли
好的，杰克。回到我之前教你的电池充电步骤。要终止充电，你
... 3 
はい。既に37 06という数字が表示されていると思います。もし表示されているなら、ENTERキーを押してください。すると、スタンバイ要求のコード00062が表示されます。そのコードが表示されたら、空欄になるまでPROCEEDキーを押してください。もし何か他の数字が表示され
分かりました。PCプラス2以降はトリム要件はありません。PCプラス2中にシャットダウンが発生した場合、その後の中
スポーツ界に目を向けてみましょう。先日、皆さんがお忙しい中、ジョー・ネイマスとフットボールコミッショナーのピート・ロゼールは、「ブロードウェイ・ジョー」がバチェラーズIIIレストランの株式を売却し、ニューヨーク・ジェッツに所属することに同意したことを発表しました。ジョーは本日ジェッツのトレーニングキャンプに到着し、初ワークアウトを行いました。ジョーと共に出場を辞退していた他のジェッツ選手も数名参加しました。ミシガン州ジャクソン出身のデイビー・ヒルは、先週のメジャー大会で3勝目を挙げました。フィラデルフィア・クラシックで優勝しました。ヒルは今年これまでに4つのトーナメントで優勝し、12万9000ドルという高額賞金を獲得して今シーズンの賞金王に立っています。そして野球では、ナショナルリーグ西地区は依然として接戦が続いています。ロサンゼルスとサンフランシスコは、首位のアトランタに1ゲーム差をつけていま
Bene. Riga 3, sotto PROPELLENTE - propulsione:
ठीक है। हम इसे यथाशीघ्र करेंग
حسناً. فهمت. سرعة الدوران 012، زاوية الميل 270، زاوية الانحراف 0. هوائي عالي الكسب، زاوية
Notre système ECS fonctionne toujours bien. Il affiche toujours 50 %. On dirait qu
ACS STATUSスイッチ
水
Okay. BAT B, 37,0; Pyro A, 37,0; Pyro B, 37,0; Heliumdruck, 3400; und Stickstoff A und B – nur
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, ये 6 स्पैंगल 8 है। मैं 300 फीट की ऊंचाई पर परिक्रमा कर रहा हूं, यहां से सब कुछ
Ok. Pront
Roger. Non vogliamo che tu accetti quei voti. Questo perché, bypassando il controllo del trunnion bias, hai ancora numeri grandi in quei registri, quindi procedi quando... dopo aver eseguit
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 말씀하세요. 
음, 브루스, 그건 부분적으로만 맞는 말입니다. 저
Apollo 8, Houston. Come è andato il controllo del gimba
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 달은 기본적으로 회색이고 색깔이 거의 없습니다. 석고나 회색빛이 도는 깊은 모래처럼 보입니다. 꽤 많은 세부 사항을 볼 수 있습니다. 풍요의 바다는 지구에서만
حسنًا. كنتُ للتو - أتلقى إنذارات رئيسية كل بضع ثوانٍ، وأرى الآن بصيصًا من الضوء. في الوقت الحالي، لديّ... -..
好的，吉姆。我本来不想谈这个，因为我们还没准备好推荐具体流程。由于电流不足，我们无法按照正常的电源检查清单启动CM/。或许我们需要你一次预热一个
Cue cards have a no. We have no intertions of competing with the professionals, believe me. We are very comfortable up here, though. We do have a happy home. There's plenty of room for the three of us and I think we're all learning to find our favorite little corner to sit in. Zero g is very comfortable, but after a while you get to the point where you sort of get tired of rattling
हमारे केबिन में भी वेंटिलेशन नीचे की ओर है। केबिन में लगभग 4.8 या 9 लोग बैठ सकते हैं - सामान्
Роджер. Свет работает нормально. Я не могу точно сказать, как далеко я от него н
MARKI
알겠습니다. 전원을 끄신 후에는 시간당 3.2~2.7파운드의 물이 소모될 것으로 예상됩니다. 이는 시간당 14암페어의 전기 사용량을 기준으로 한 것입니다. 참고로, 여기서 말하는 '사용 가능한 
わかりました。AC BUS B の S-BAND ANTENNA は OPEN; 、 OPEN。AC BUS A の TAPE RECORDER は OPEN。2 行目の SYSTEM A の MAIN SOV。QUAD TCA から始めて、4 つすべてを CLOSED にします。CROSS - COMMANDER CROSS-POINTER は OPEN;、OPEN;、OPEN。3 行目の RENDEZVOUS RADAR STANDBY は OPEN、LANDING RADAR は OPEN。STAB/CONTROL の ATTITUDE DIRECT CONTROL は CLOSE。ED の LOGIC POWER A は OPEN。LIGHTING の UTILITY は OPEN。わかりましたか？
はい。BAT 2、BAT FAULT
作为交换，
Fred, circa un quarto del nostro sch
좋아요.
Houston, nous essaier
У меня есть для вас некоторые количественные данные. Мы полностью готовы принимать телевизионный сигнал, когда вы получаете высокий коэф
Roger. Nous avons essayé de transmettre, mais on aurait dit que votre micro était bloqué pendant un petit m
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストンです。ゴールドストーンが言っていま
收到。您的适配器电池读数已显示
Джим, мы х
そして11番、ヒューストン。念のためお知らせしますが、1
Roger. Nous souhaiterions que votre interrupteur de lecture de quantité soit activé et que nous ayons u
Да... шоу.
The balloon is partially inflated. It's not tight. I've lost it at thi
헬멧을 쓰고 창문을 통해 최대한 잘 보려고 고개를
Roger, George. My control mode is manual. The gyros are caged, maneuver is off. Fuel is 45 and 64 [percent], a little ahead of schedule. Oxygen reads 82-100 [percent]. Steam vent temperature in the suit is dropping slightly. It's a little bel
杰
حسنًا، هذا إذا كانت لديك المعلومات الجديدة؛ وإلا فسأستخد
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous aimerions que vous effectuiez 
Okay, Vance. Wir haben ein paar Dinge für die Cartridge-Modifikation gefunden. Zum einen den speziellen Staubschutzbeutel, den wir für die Tragetaschen verwenden wollten. Der ist ziemlich dick und porenfrei.
좋
了解しました。世界のニュースでは、プエブロ号の乗組員が昨日午後00時にミラマー海軍航空基地に到着し、バルボア病院で家族と共にクリスマスを数日過ごす予定です。地元のニュースでは、小売商協会が今年のクリスマスプレゼント交換ポリシーを昨年と同じ、つまり非常に寛大なものにすると発表しました。皆さん、
카나본. 제미니 8호, 가속도계 편향 점검을 위한 준비가 되셨나요? 그럼 카운트다운
Sieh dir das an; genau da soll es sein. Was hältst du davon? Ein bisschen niedrig. Wir werden es nicht – an
버즈에게
Okay. Geben Sie mir nun den digitalen Bereich für die verbleibenden 20 Sekunden a
Роджер. Радиатор 
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। फिलहाल सभी सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहे हैं। अब
Négatif. Nous n'aurons pas besoin d'
في البداية، حالت العملية دون بدء عمليات الرصد فورًا كما خططنا، نظرًا لوجود مناورة مراوغة أخرى. تسبب تفريغ الحمولة في ظهور كمية هائلة من النجوم الزائفة في المنطقة، مما جعل معايرة البصريات شبه مستحيلة. لم تكن الطريقة التي ابتكرناها فعالة. أما الطريقة التي استخدمتها في النهاية، فكانت التوجه إلى نجم الشعرى اليمانية (سيريوس)، وهو ألمع نجومنا، والحصول على العمود والمحور، ثم توجيه ا
Hier ist Friendship Seven. Ich flie
Laut und deutlich.
Roger, et 
रॉजर। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। खिड़की, स्थिति संकेतक और पेरिस्कोप सभी ठीक हैं। मैं पेरिस्कोप में अपने पीछे अंधेरा पक्ष ऊपर आता हुआ देख सकता हूँ। केबिन का दबाव 5.5 है और स्थिर है। केबिन का तापमान 95 डिग्री है। सापेक्ष आर्द्रता 28 प्रतिशत है। मैंने केबिन और अपने सूट के तापमान को अधिक शीतलन के लिए बढ़े हुए पानी की स्थिति पर सेट कर दिया है। भाप का तापमान इस समय 61 डिग्री दिखा रहा है। ऑक्सीजन 7
Roger, io e te abbiamo trasmesso un carico TR e Gemini per la tua manovra su Corpus. Confermia
Хорошо. Я сделаю ещё один хор
로저. 5분
Roger. Du machst hier am Boden einen sehr guten Eindruck. Ich hätte gern ein paar Mes
11, ici Hous
ठीक है। अगर आप हमें स्वीकार कर लें, तो हम आपको युद्धाभ्यास के लि
सिग्मा सेवन। केप
Apollo 8, stavamo ottenendo quello che ci hai mostrato con il tuo obiettivo normale, e non credo che abbiamo ottenuto n
了解し
Bene. Sei proprio sul bordo del portico
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Мы предоставим вам обновленную информацию о ситуации чуть позже. Сейчас мы к этому не готовы; и, что касается другой темы, с базы «Транквилити» они готовы начать свои операции по снижению интенсивности. Они о
Это утвердит
Roger. 
Заголовки гласят: «Эй, Эд, пожалуйста, вернись в космический корабл
Aquarius，休斯顿
ジェリー、もう少ししたら、マイナスMAに基づいたちょっとした演習を試してみたいと思います。一つだけ試してみて、地上から解を得て、比較して
أجل. لنطفئه أيض
阿波罗13号，休斯
로저. 스캐너 테스트가 문제였습니다. 그리고 롤은 예상대로 작동했습니다. 지금
嗯，我不确定
Т
정말 감사합니다. 진심으로 감
ठीक है। आपके क्वाड पैकेज का तापमान 85 डिग्री से 44 डिग्री के बीच है। आपके इंजेक्टर का तापमान 44 डिग्री से 21 डिग्री के बीच है; और आपकी हीट शील्ड सभी जगहों पर अपनी निचली सीमा से 
الطقس في منطقة التعافي جيد. هناك غيوم كثيفة؛ 
Roger. Nous venons d'avoir des nouvelles de Houston. Vous pouvez sortir dès que vous le souhaitez. Prévenez-nous quand vous au
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. 
，
Хорошо, Джим. Об этом мы тебя п
Ich habe das nicht ganz verstanden. Könnten Sie es bitte 
حسنًا. لنبدأ
Okay. Auf Bedienfeld 122 ist die einzige Änderung, dass die Zustands
जिम, मैंने लगभग 30 मिनट पहले फ्रेड को वो नया पैड दे दिया है। ये हमारा लेटेस्ट है। ये पीसी प्लस 2 है, और इसकी शुरुआत 79 घंटे 27 मिनट और 40.13 सेकंड से होती है। क्या तुम्हें ये समझ आया
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tempo per assistere al vostro ammaraggio. Ad accompagnare il Presidente ci saranno il Segretario di Stato William Rogers e Frank Borman. Assisteranno all'ammaraggio dal ponte della nave di recupero con l'Ammiraglio John Sidney McCain, Jr., Comandante delle Forze del Pacifico. Dopo la permanenza del Presidente a bordo dell'Hornet, partirà per il suo tour in Asia e la visita programmata in Romania. Si ritiene che Luna 15 si sia schiantata ieri nel Mare delle Crisi, dopo aver orbitato attorno alla Luna 52 volte. L'agenzia di stampa sovietica TASS ha riferito che sono state condotte ricerche "scientifiche" nello spazio vicino alla Luna. Sir Bernard Lovell dell'Osservatorio di Jodrell Bank ha affermato che Luna 15 ha colpito la superficie della Luna a una velocità di circa 480 chilometri orari. La situazione è stata relativamente tranquilla di recente in Vietnam. Soldati in pattuglia sono stati osservati con radio a transistor sintonizzate sul vostro volo. Le emittenti radiotelevisive delle Forze Armate in Vietnam hanno dato piena copertura alla missione. Le schermaglie continuano tra egiziani e israeliani lungo il Canale di Suez. Gli osservatori delle Nazioni Unite stanno cercando di fermare l'azione. A Washington, la Commissione per i Modi e i Mezzi della Camera ha votato per ridurre la tolleranza al depauperamento del petrolio dal 27,5% al ​​20%. Abbiamo piovuto diverse volte qui nella zona di Houston. Oggi è nuvoloso e sono previsti altri rovesci. Sul fronte sportivo, come accennato in precedenza, stasera si gioca l'All Star Game. Ieri non si è giocata nessuna partita. Ieri sera a New York, la Baseball Writers Association of America ha nominato Babe Ruth il più grande giocatore di baseball di tutti i tempi. Joe DiMaggio è stato nominato il più grande giocatore di baseball vivente.
حسنًا يا فريد، هذا صحيح، باستثناء إجراء المحاذاة الذي نعمل عليه وهو محاذاة بين الأرض والشمس، وبخلاف ذلك، فالأمر صحيح. بالمناسبة، يبدو أن مناورة TC + 2 هذه ستظل بسرعة 900 قدم في الثاني
Bien, Apollo 8. Le premier test est terminé. Nous allons maintenant passer en mode liaison montante « COMMANDE ET TÉLÉMISSION » et désactiver la modulation vocale. Nous resterons dans ce mode pendant deux minutes et demie et enverrons un message de test. Cela n'aura aucun impact sur votre ordinateur ni sur la configuration de votre panneau de commande. Vous pourriez observer le bruit de la bande S lié au verrouillage de la liaison. Cependant, le signal sur votre wattmètre devrait rester bon. Il ne s'agit pas d'une perte de signal, mais simplement d'une interruption de la mo
Apollo 8. Houston
And, while I've got you, 13, at your convenience, we'd like to h
好的。姿态为俯仰角10度，偏航
Ok, prendiamo quel d
हमने आपको कुछ समय बताया है। हमें लगता है कि हम जल्द ही आपको कुछ बेहतर समय बता पाएंगे। फिलहाल, ऐसा लगता है कि आपका पानी 154 घंटे तक ठीक रहेगा, और आपके पास 272 घंटे तक ताकुसा
جيم، معلومة بسيطة، إذا اضطررتَ لأي سببٍ
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. على اللوحة رقم 5: قاطع الدائرة BAT CHARGE، BATTERY A CH
Okay, Houston, wir wollen jetzt FM und Fernsehen für den Eigengebrauch e
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Rapport de 30 minutes: problème majeur, toujours en panne. Com
了解。それでも、あなたはG.E.T.で1秒遅いと表示していますが、私たちはレトロタイムで
حسن
Sta
أبولو 8، 
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. لديّ طريقتان لتدفئة المقصورة. الأولى سهلة التنفيذ لشخص واحد، وأفضل طريقة هي تشغيل مروحة واحدة أو كلتيهما في المقصورة ورفع درجة حرارة مبادل الحرارة إلى أقصى حد. ستكون عملية التدفئة بطيئة نوعًا ما، ولن تحصل على تدفئة كبيرة. أما الطريقة الثانية فهي ضبط درجة حرارة مخرج المبرد باستخد
रॉजर,
रॉजर। हम अपने वॉयस चैनल पर इस अपलिंक की जाँच करेंगे। टीवी पर जो ट्रांसमिशन था - हम गोल्डस्टोन में लगभग 10 मिनट का सिग्नल प्राप्त करना चाहेंगे ताकि जब वे इसे वापस हमारे
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह ज़ांज़ीबार कॉम टेक है, एचएफ यूएचएफ पर प्रसारित हो रहा है। क्या आप
了解。ケープからの逆行時間を計算してみます。打ち上げから私のマークまでの時間は04プラス28プラス4
दबाओ - चलो
ठीक है। यही तो है - इस प्रश्न के दूसरे भाग में वास्तव में हमसे यह पूछा जा रहा है कि हम इसे हैसलब्लैड कैमरे से करें, और फिर से हम लाल और नीले फिल्टर का उपयो
Okay, Charlie. Vielen Dank an dich und das gesamte White Team für die hervorragende 
Okay, Jim. We - We've been talking about your going to a different attitude than the pad attitude for better star field vision out the command module, and what we'd like to have you do is this. If you can predict now or sometime soon, what attitude it is that you would like to hold at that time, and go to that attitude now, we'd like to be able to compute the coarse aline gimbal angles for the, and we can do that if you go to the selected attitude, hold it, call up a , and read us your gimbal a
روجر. حسنًا، قد ترغب في تكرار ذ
Okay. Für die Lageregelungskoordinaten empfehlen wir die manuelle Steuerung. Acht
Roger, Bill. S
ठीक है। और स्वीकार करें। और, जैक, आप ऑप्टिक्स पावरअप के साथ आगे बढ़ सकते हैं। सम
다시
로저. 더하기 90, /, 635 31 빼기 164 더하기 129. 여기까지 이해
좋아요. 우리는 2도 각도의 지구를 가지고 있는
Ok. Ti darò solo - penso che sarà più facile darti quello che ho dentro. Ok, nella riga superiore, sulla 11, abbiamo i quattro interruttori AC BUS TIE INSERITI e l'interruttore AC BUS VOLTS INSERITO, e questo è tutto. Seconda riga, abbiamo i quattro interruttori TCA INSERITI. Abbiamo il GASTA sotto FLIGHT DISPLAYS e COMMANDER's. E allo stesso modo sotto AC BUS A, abbiamo un interruttore GASTA e un in
13, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, Brennstoffzelle 1 wieder an MAIN A und Brennstoffzelle 3 an MAIN B anzuschließen. Prüfen Sie, ob die Vierfach-Delta-Schaltung geöffnet is
Peu importe le nombre de fois où je range ces oculaires dans leur b
2 行目の [FLIGHT DISPLAYS] で、[THRUST]、[MISSION TIMER]、[RANGE/RANGE RATE]、[ALTITUDE/ALTITUDE RATE]、[AC BUS A RANGE 
Well, Vance, I've been trying to use MINIMUM IMPULSE only attitude control to get my roll and yaw - the roll and pitch, rather. But, with the attitude control only in this configuration, I - I can't command these - the roll the way I want to. So, I had to go to to get my roll to build up towards zero, it was going - decreasing towards 270. I really don't know what the combination is in the attitude 
私が左にいたその都市はポ
Je voudrais dire un mot sur le sextant. Son utilisation dans un vaisseau spatial exigu est très difficile, surtout avec le casque. J'ai finalement conclu qu'il serait inutile, avec le casque, d'essayer de prendre les angles requis pour les étoiles visées. J'ai donc retiré mon casque. Cela m'a donné un peu plus de liberté de mouvement, mais j'étais toujours limité à des angles d'environ 20 à 23° sans manœuvrer le vaisseau. L'étoile était alors masquée par la partie supérieure du hublot. En manœuvrant le vaisseau plus fréquemment et plus amplement, on pourrait aligner le grand axe du hublot avec le plan de visée. Mais, limités par le carburant, nous n'avons pas opté pour cette méthode. Nous avons également utilisé le mode pulsé, sans trop de manœuvres. Les étoiles sélectionnées pour cette campagne avaient des angles assez élevés, ce qui rendait l'horizon difficile à atteindre. Nous avons finalement décidé de les photographier un peu plus près de l'horizon. J'ai effectué quelques mesures sur Canopus et quelques autres télescopes, comme vous le remarquerez. Le filtre bleu semblait masquer complètement l'horizon; je ne voyais aucun horizon avec ce filtre. La qualité de notre image de l'horizon est probablement moins bonne en présence de lune. Le filtre vert, en revanche, m'a permis d'obtenir un horizon légèrement plus net qu'avec l'absence totale de filtre. Je n'ai rencontré aucune difficulté pour effectuer ces mesures, que ce soit avec le filtre vert ou le filtre transparent. Cependant, l'horizon reste mal défini et il est nécessaire de se standardiser et de mesurer au même endroit qu'auparavant afin d'obtenir une 
알겠습니다. TIG의 다음 단계는 다음과 같습니다: 103 40, 10 미만, 1
피치 스러스터 작동을 보시면 아시겠지만, 저는 여전히 피치다운에 최소 12번의 충격을 가했지만, 315로 복귀하기까지는 아직 멀
11. Nous convenons que le fait d'avoir activé le CDU a probablement eu un impact sur votre démarrage. Il semble que cela devrait permettre à l'ordinateur de fonctionner en connaissant les angles réels du CDU. Nous vous demandons d'effectuer une réinitialisation du CDU (appuyez sur ENTRÉE), puis de recommen
Roger. And on that quad temperature - the upper limit of that thing is 105 degrees on the bottle. You are well below that. We have been watching it, and it is tracking, although it is tracking very slowly. As you roll the spacecraft, the temperature excursions seem to 
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir gehen kurz aufs Klo
はい、
네, 맞습니다. 그냥 BAT 6으로 하세요, 잭. 그리고 다음 줄에는 BATTERY 1과 3이라고 적혀 있었는데, BATTERY 1, 2, 3, 4로 바꾸세요. BAT 2와 4를 추가하면 됩니다. 네 개의 BAT 모두 제대로 된 거죠. 그리고 30분 기다리라는 다음 두 줄은 지우세요. BATTERIES 2와 4 OFF/RESET이라는 다음 줄
ヒューストン、7.7+X+00001Yで噴射しました。Zはすべてゼロです。ジンバル角度は、ロール180、ピッチ310
目前航班计划没有太大变化。他们会
Sept, ici
ヒューストン、イー
Okay. LIGHTING: FLOOD, MAIN A; 
Affermativo, Jim. Andiamo a pagina 29. Abbiamo... A questo punto,
好的，谢谢。这是我们
好的，您可以继续保持当前的飞行姿态。但是，如果您启动任何推进器，系统会尝试将您调
रोजर. 3-1 171. 3+42. 18 19 03. 2+23. 8+42
We have sure enjoyed it, too, troops, and you guys have really done a good job. We reall
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. N
ह्यूस्टन, आज वही लोग विजेता हैं जिन्होंने कहा था कि हम ठीक-ठीक यह नहीं बता पाएंगे कि हम कहाँ हैं। उतरने के उस हिस्से में, जहाँ हम आम तौर पर अपना लैंडिंग स्पॉट चुनते हैं, हम प्रोग्राम अलार
Pour vous donner une idée, Mike, de ce que nous pouvons voir, je distingue la côte sud-ouest du golfe du Mexique 
Roger. I
간단히 말해서, 짐, 우리는 아무런 문제가 없을 것으로 예상하지만, 자세한 내용
Давай, РК
Карнарвон, Близнецы 4
Сколько часов? У м
Buzz, qui è Houston. È o
Okay.... at 15, 
双子座4号，夏威夷外科医生。请注意，我们的遥测数据出现中断，可能错过了您的第二次血压测量。您已经发送数
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 트랭퀼리티 기지입니다. 현재 필름을 거의 다 소진했고, 이제 막 메인 필름통
मैं इस
Bene. Per prima cosa, sul pannel
Wir haben Wasserstoffzufuhr, Jerry, aber wir sehen nirgends Dampfpartikel. Jetzt tauchen sie
어머! 요즘 차
Bien reçu, Apollo 8. Et merci pour ce magnifique spectacle. Nous avons une ma
Apollo 8. Hier beginnt ein Vorbeiflugmanöver. Dies wird ein / 63087, minus 162, plus 129, plus 009 62, plus 005 68, minus 020 77 000 000 000, November Alfa, plus 00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013 up 048 right 37, plus 1418, minus 16500 129 04 361 60. Polarste
حسنًا. سأذهب إلى أومني 
And, Eagle, Houston. We'll be standing by in this mode for a minute or so. We'll be
Gemelli 4, Guaymas C
Ich muss
Роджер. Y 001, NA, плюс 00202 46420 547 46211 12 1383 327 023 вверх 172 влево 22, плю
제미니 4호. 사령관 조종사가 깨어났습니다.
Ro
了解。35mm白黒またはカラーレンズをf/18、距離8フィートでバルブ位置を変えて、パルスアップとパルスダウンを理
Aspetta. Ci faremo sapere le ultime novità, J
D'accord. Su
Roger. Das sehen wir auch. Wir bestät
Roger. Es ist die 41. Revolution
了解しました。ワシントンでは、上院財政委員会が所得税付加税の延長を承認しましたが、上院での採決は現時点では難しそうです。オースティンでは、ヒューストン選出のレイ・レモン州議会議員がアメリカ海洋学会の理事に指名されました。レモン氏は、テキサス州に海洋学研究所を設立する可能性について調査することを提案しています。これはメキシコ湾西部で初めての海洋学研究所となります。ミネソタ州ミネアポリスの気象局は、今日の天気を最高気温88度、最低気温72度と発表した後、「降雪：なし」と発表しました。フロリダ州セントピーターズバーグからは、ノルウェーの探検家トール・ヘイエルダールからの無線報告が届きました。ヘイエルダールのパピルス船「ラー号」の乗組員は、荒波による被害にもかかわらず、バルバドスのブリッジタウンに入港する予定であるとのことです。ただし、乗組員は護衛船で就寝する予定です。探検
У меня не получается
حسناً. سنمضي قدماً في فحص DAP وفحص الخانق بما أنه
MAN
查理，我们明天要做的是重新整
好的。这是 9，/: 45597，-040，+157，+34188，-01353，+00780 180 008 001，十一月阿尔法，+00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033，下 131，左 28，+0758，-16500 12987 36277；主星天狼星，伴星参宿七，129 155 010；四组四边形，15 秒，空隙，地平线位于 1.2 度窗口线上，T - 3；使用高速程序，减去 Mike Alfa。查看您之前的燃烧数据后，发动机性能应该能提供3秒的燃烧时间，比您目前的数据要长。这个数
अब, चेकलिस्ट के हिसाब से हम कैसा कर रहे हैं? चलिए सुनिश्चित करते हैं कि हम कोई 
Ok, Jack. Nella tua checklist di ingresso, a pagina 2-5. Lì sotto, al punto 9, dove c'è scritto 152 gradi di pitch a 0,05 g, lì accanto, in modo che Recovery possa vederti meglio durante la discesa, vog
Okay. On - These are just cleanup items, Jack. On page 2-3, it lists how you separate, from the CM/ SEP and all that, so, obviously, if we're on step 5 at
로저. 우리는 그 일
D'accord. Puis-je passer à l'étape suivante, c'est-à-dire obtenir les éléments
रॉजर, इस समय मेरे पास क
Géme
Entrambe le pompe del refrigerante sono accese. Le ventole della tuta sono entrambe accese. I ricevitori trasmittenti HF sono in modalità Rientro. La nuova modalità audio è in modalità HF. Non potremo farlo. Lasciatela in modalità REGISTRAZIONE... Premi per parlare. Audio
D'accord. Une petite correction: le tuyau rouge
That's affirmative. We'll give you the pad, be coming up here
然后
يوصي كيب بأن أقدم لك كمياتك الاحتياطية عند الساعة 18:57:23.
Wie lautet Ihr Bericht zur Entlüftung in der Sinkphase? Gab es eine Entlüftung? Gab es sonst noch Auffälligkeiten? Gab es weiter
Bene. Ora siamo sicu
Давайте не будем читать это в R1, R2. Мне не нужно два
Ripetu
Хорошо. Мы сейчас как раз изучаем этот вопрос, Джек. На самом деле это не такая уж большая проблема, просто мы 
Das ist
Ausgleichsbehä
네, 맞습니다. 방금 제 시계를 봤는데, 딱 
Роджер, 8. 010 689 260 Персея Дзета, вниз 048, влево 05. Остальная часть неприменима. Сириус, Ригель, набор звезд для выравнивания, 129 155 010, отрицательны
A
Ok. Ok. Al momento sono su OFF. Tutti e 16 gli interruttori AUTO
윌코
吉姆，
Wir verfügen über eine beträchtliche Menge an S-6. Wir hatten einige vereinzelte Sichtun
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप
Apollo 8, während wir auf den maximalen Gewinn warten, setze ich die Zusammenfassung der Flugbahn fort. Wir können immer noch von der Dreizehnten aus die Mittelpazifiklinie erreichen, und Sie sind nach 138 Sekunden Brenndauer auf dem Weg. Das sind 138 Sekunden, damit Sie die Butterfly-Region verlassen. Wir empfehlen, nach 20 Sekunden keine Vorzündungen oder Neustarts mehr durchzuführen. Wenn Sie 20 Sekunden überschreiten, kann dies die Flugbahn außerhalb des Korrekturbereichs bringen – Korrekturmöglichkeiten bis hin zu einer freien Rückkehr. Das Wetter im Bergungsgebiet ist gut. Wir haben eine Folge von und eine ohne. Während der Brenndauer können Sie eine leichte Änderung des Kammer- und Tankdrucks aufgrund des Treibstoffverbrauchs im Vorratstank und des Umfüllens in den Sumpftank bemerken. Dies kann etwa 2 bis 5 Sekunden nach Brennbeginn auftreten. Es wird sich um eine geringe Druckänderung in beiden Systemen handeln. Alle Systeme sind betriebsbereit. Wir wollen verhindern, dass das Wasser nach dem Brennvorgang kocht, um die Flugbahn zu optimieren. Ihre Wasserablasssituation sieht gut aus; Sie sollten gut bis über 5 Sekunden sein. Wir versuchen, die Wasserabgabe bis nach 5 Uhr hinauszuzögern. Anschließend möchten wir die Kryokammern vor der Korrektur umrühren. Die nächste Spülung der Brennstoffzellen erfolgt ungefähr um 5 Uhr und betrifft sowohl die Wasserstoffbatterie A (34,9), Batterie B (39,1) als auch Charlie (38,5). Wir verfügen über die Einzeltank-Kryokapazität. Betrachtet man die Leistung der vorherigen Brennvorgänge, kann man davon ausgehen, dass ein normaler Brennvorgang etwa 3,7 Sekunden länger dauert als die berechneten Werte. Die Triebwerksleistung sieht normal aus, und alle Parameter sind stabil. Es sieht gut aus; alle vier Quads haben laut Computerprogrammen ungefähr die gleiche Kapazität. Sie haben eine gute Anleitung für Sie. Wir werde
카메라의 자동 조명 제어(ALC) 스위치가 IN 위치에 있
Il PROPELLENTE PRIMARIO e SECONDARIO B s
Сейчас я перейду к малому увеличению. Поправка: к большому увеличению на перископе, видите, как это выглядит?... Поворот вправо примерно на 5 градусов. Посмотрите, как она совпадает с перископом в этот момент. Допустим, ось поворот
Wir befinden uns auf 
Roger. Mike, hai detto che la stella 14 era buona
광학 장치의 전원을 다시 사용하실 때까지 꺼두시고, 링 1과 2의 온도를 
알겠습니다. 켄, 여기서 2초 동안
こちらヒューストン。了解しました。ニール、
휴스턴
是的
Роджер. Сегодня днем ​​мы наблюдали в монокуляре за несколькими облаками в вашем районе вдоль побережья Мексиканского залива в Техасе, и также заметили облака над Нижней Калифорнией, что неск
Roger. Oxygen fuel cell purge at 113 30. Return to the nominal timeline at 121 hours wakeup. Lithium h
Возможно, это к
Roger. Gemini 4 ici. Ici le pilote commandant. Je viens de faire une sieste d'environ cinq heures et demie, dont les trois dernières heures ont été très reposantes. Les deux premières heures 
Хорошо. Передайте Баззу, что
فهمت 
Роджер. Копируем вращение
Oui. Je m'en doutais un peu, Charlie. Page 16, « Docked BURN (PGNS) », mais passons sur la 
罗杰。我快到第三个控制点了。我试着在第二个和第三个控
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आप 2 के लिए पूरी तरह से तैयार हैं। मैं शौच के लिए जाना
Bene, guarderò di nuovo, Jack, ma con questa posizione, il Sole si riflette sul quad 4 così luminoso da rovinare qualsiasi visione notturna e abb
جيميني 4، هيوستن
E la grande notizia di oggi a Houston riguarda gli Astros. Nel mondo dello sport, gli Houston Astros si sono ripresi al nono inning a Cincinnati, battendo i Reds per 7 a 4. All'inizio del nono, tuttavia, la situazione sembrava piuttosto cupa. Gli Astros erano sotto per 4 a 3. Poi, con un out, Jesus Alou ha battuto un singolo sul campo destro. John Edwards ha battuto un altro singolo sul campo destro e Sandy Valdespino ha battuto un doppio per portare a casa il punto del pareggio. Julio Gotay ha ricevuto una base su ball e Joe Morgan ha perso un bunt per la giocata della v
Abbiamo un altro avvis
不过，我还
We'll check that, VIII. That doesn't soun
ジャック、プラットフォームについての質問ですが、今のところ心配する必要はあ
Ich schätze, in der Hitze des Gefechts habe ich vergessen, es dir zu geben. Warte 
396 033, bas 054, gauche 21, plus 08 10 moins 16500 12968 36222; même alignement; Sirius et Rigel, 129 155 010,
لم
Роджер. Принимаю отчет о 
روجر، كولومبيا. نستقبل الرسالة. هذا جيد، ونود الحصول على قراءة من جهاز TEP حول ال
了解。
L'horizon est ici d'une noirceur saisissante. Le ciel est d'un noir absolu, et la Terre – ou plutôt la Lune, pardonnez-moi – est d'une clarté remarquable; le contraste entre le ciel et la lune forme une ligne sombre et nette. Apparaissent maintenant dans le champ de vision de l'appareil photo d'intéressants cratères à double anneau, des formations typiques des mers lunaires, remplies d'un matériau de même consistance et de même couleur que les mers. En voici trois ou quatre. Plus loin à l'horizon, on aperçoit… Les montagnes qui se dressent maintenant sont fortement impactées par de nombreux cratères dont on distingue le sommet centra
아니요, 해안가만 안개가 꼈어요. 나머지 지역은 CAVU(시야 확보 양호)입니다. 시간이 나면 확인해 볼게요. 여기 비행 경로 바로 위에 있는 도로들이 몇 군데 보이는데, 제가 지금 존 씨와 한참 동안 이야기하고 있는 
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Центральная панель — я смотрю на индикатор А. Температура пакета около 18
Gem
يا جيم، نعتقد أن جهاز التعزيز يجب أن يكون على 
ヒューストン、コロンビアは漏れチェックを
How do you read, Joe
好的。第一件事是，飞行计划显示指挥官应该休息了。第二件事，简单总结一下你的燃烧情况。所有系统看起来都正常。轨迹显示你的近地点航迹（CPA）模式为69.67英里，近地点时间是……。你成功捕获了一条良好的自由返回路径。现在完全评估航迹以进行走廊控制还为时过早。你不会收到+11区块数据的更新。查看曲线后，电池排气
Хорошо, боль
O
Roger that. We've got a team working on that, 
Это Хьюстон. Роджер. Мы п
Хорошо, Д
Roger. Mein Status ist gut; der Kapselstatus ist gut; mein Steuermodus ist automatisch; die Gyroskope funktionieren normal; Manöver sind deaktiviert. Der Treibstoffvorrat liegt bei 51 % und 69 %; der Sauerstoffvorrat 
收到。尼尔用腰带给自己做了个很棒的吊床
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。これは正常なシステム動作だと考えていま
好的。
Wie lange haben Sie gebraucht, um die Plattform aufzuwärm
Friendship Seven,
둘째로, 예정된 기상 시간인 121시간 12분으로 정상 일정을 다시 진행하겠습니다. 준비 작업 중에 수산화리튬 용기 9번 교체를 슬쩍
Okays Houston. Neither Neil nor Mike can see it. Incidentally, those shafts and trunnions
알겠습니다. 창문 상태는 잘 모르겠습니다. 
ठीक है। मुझे नोट्स नहीं मिले, लेकिन मैं आपको अभी जो चरण याद हैं, उन्हें पढ़कर सुनाता हूँ। पहला चरण, बैटरी 1, 2, 3 और 4... और इस समय तक बैटरी 1, 2, 3, 4 और 6 चालू हो जानी चाहिए। क्या यह सही है
11, ह
Well, that's a res
Planen Sie, sich so zu ernähren, wie es von... vor
Okay. Gut. Wenn Sie zurück
هناك في الأعلى؟ من المفترض أن نحصل على ميزة شروق الأرض - من المفترض أن تظهر قريباً جد
알겠습니다, 밴스. 이것은 명령 모듈입니다. 객실 팬 필터와 백, 그리고 TV 카메라에 사용하는 것을 제외한 오염 제거 백, 두 개의 s, 그리고 JETT 백에 4개의 LOiH 캔을 넣습니다. 오른쪽 안전벨트 시스템에 고정하고, JETT 백을 바닥에 고정하겠습니
Okay. Die Antenne bewegte sich um et
روجر، 2: SPS/G&N: 38320، زائد 166، ناقص 081 080 11 3603، ناقص 01408، ناقص جميع الكرات، ناقص 00743، جميع الأصفار، 196 359 00657، زائد 00537، 01592 017 01531 23 1160 138. فيغا، ذنب الدجاجة 243 183 012، نفاثتان 19 ثانية، R1 20101. نجم السدس بين 79 30 10 و79 52 10. الوضعية: الرأس لأسفل، حركة تراجعية مائلة لأعلى 28 درجة. HA بعد الاحتراق - 
Ja, d
ठीक है, और अगर आप चाहें तो - दरअसल
Non dovrai
Okay. Rücklesen korrekt. Und, Aquarius; Houston. Wenn Sie möchten, dass ich Ihnen die Zusammenfassung des Landegebiets vorlese, mac
कमांड पायलट, कैनरी सीएपी कॉम। फ्लाइट जानना चाहती है कि क्या आप
11, Houston. Sie haben
39.2 e 1.4. 
أبولو 11، هيوستن في وضع غير مرئي. نظام مراقبة الحركة الجوية (AIR BOS
Ich habe zwei Foto
好的，我还有 f/8 的光圈
Ciao, C
D'accord. J'ai relu: surveiller le niveau dans l'accumulateur secondaire; vanne du radiateur de glycol second
Va bene se
रॉजर। ठीक है। दूसरी बात लैंडिंग के बाद की है। हम फिर से दोहराना चाहते हैं कि आप अंतरिक्ष यान में 1 घंटे से ज़्यादा स
ジェミニ VI、軌道は 87 x 141 です。さらに追跡します
フレンドシップセブン、日中の見
صباح الخي
Roger. Bitte beschädige
У нас есть старые мет
Ricevuto. Ripeto, il tuo vettore di stato è a posto; è ancora un po' instabil
Okay, Apollo 8. All the systems - giving a quick look around the room - look real fine. You've got an quad update on the quantity, so yo
Хорошо, Вэнс. По сути, то, что вам нужно было использовать в качестве кинокамеры, — это наша камера для съемки лунной последовательности, к
Gemini 4, Gem
Роджер, Эл. Я в автоматическом режиме; ретроград; переключатели гиромотора работают нормально; маневр отключен. Капсула подготовлена ​​для ретроградного движения, но для укладки двух карт. Я уверен, что мы готовы. У меня 81 процент автоматического режима (топливо), 80 процентов ручного (топливо), что совпадает с моим промежуточным отчетом. Они не изменились. У меня 52 (psi, в сотнях) на основном кислороде, 75 (psi, в сотнях) на дополнительном кислороде. Скафандр готов к пол
제미니 4, 휴스턴 
D'accord. Premièrement, le plan de vol indique que le CDR doit être arrêté. Deuxièmement, un résumé de votre manœuvre. Tous vos systèmes semblent opérationnels. La trajectoire montre un CPA avec
Oui. Et il semble que le soleil soit sur le point d'entrer dans le cham
Apollo 8, Houston. Das stimmt. Wir erzielten eine r
Roger. Et ê
Quella sarà la nostra casa per le prossime due ore e vogliamo prendercene cura al meglio. Okay. Sono sul gradino più alto e posso guardare giù, oltre le piattaforme del carrello di atterraggio. Saltare da un gradino all'altro è semplicis
休斯顿的鹰牌（Eagle）先生，您有空的时候，请问您的LCG（可能是指某种设
好的。这是油箱上最后一个通风口的设置，所以在页面顶部“逆变器 1，关闭”之后，添加“螺旋桨
Ro
Houston, benötigen Sie noch weite
Immer noch schlecht und ungefähr an derselben Stelle; etwas sch
E Houston
Okay, und auf der nächsten Seite, Seite 29, rechts oben, streichen Sie „Photo target 13, north a
And, Eagle, Houston. We'll be standing by in this 
Roger, 
حسناً، كنت منخ
收到。
Это верно. Температура в куполе в данный момент составляет приблизительно 77 градусов. Я 
Affermativo. Il controllo delle perdite del radiatore secondario è previsto nel piano di volo alle 71:20. La procedura è elencata nel vostro ma
弗雷德，闯进来。你
여기서 
我
روجر. لقد ر
我的读数现在是 2
Oka
रॉजर। धन्यवाद। हमारे पास कंप्यूटर है; हम ब्लॉक में
分かりました。前回は間違った場所を探して
That's affirmative; ours ha
रॉजर, मैंने तुम्हारी बात साफ़-साफ़ स
10秒。
حسنًا. R1 + 27210، R2 + 35570، R3 + 33010. 
Okay. Entry pad as follows: Mid-PAC, 000152, 000;, 178; minu
Ich verstehe dich laut und deutlich.
내가 스위치를 너무 세게 누르고 있는 
好的。从倒计时6个半小时开始。你要重新准备很多便签纸，我不知
Это свер
Ja, wir haben gut geschlafen. Alle haben ge
アポロ8号、ヒュース
सिस्टम से जुड़ी चीजों के बारे 
ضبط التوقيت بتوقيت غرينتش في هذا الوقت - نحن نقترب من الساعة 
हां, मैं इसे खींच रहा हूं, लेक
Apollo 8, da Houston a Tana
حسنًا يا جو. من النافذة رقم 5، التقطتُ الجسم ال
Roger. Ho
Hoffentlich landen wir auf dem blauen Te
Ici Friendshi
B
Roger. Veuillez préparer trois repas chacun, l'un avec 129 boissons de 15 ml et l'autre avec 113 boissons de 15 ml, respectivement pour le commandant de bord et le pilote. Pourriez-vous nous faire un compte rendu de vot
فريندشيب سفن، فريندشيب 
And, Aquarius, we are sett
进入轨道后，我们建议您使用CMC计算的角度进行自动机动，看看效果如何。如果这样无法使M线与地平线平行于星下点，我们会尝试获取一些地面计算的角度。
C'est exact, nous avons terminé. Nous vous communiquerons les données dans un instant. Nous avons réussi notre vérification d'étoile au sextant à l'attitude d'entrée, et nous manœuvrons actuellement pour atteindre notre première att
تفضلي يا كولومبيا.
了解。分かりました。でも、縦線は歪んでるように見えま
رو
Apollo 8, Houston im Blindflug. Wählen Sie OMNI Charlie
好的，请您留意，我们这里每小时都会进行一次换班，换班过程中可能会出现一些小故障。我们回来后我会给您打电
Nemmeno i
حسنًا. الآن سنقوم بتحويل وصلة الإرسال إلى وضع النسخ الاحتياطي لـ Upvoice لمدة دقيقتين تقريبًا، وقد يستغرق الأمر بضع ثوانٍ قبل أن تسمع صوت انقطاع Upvoice. لذا يمكنك إعادة ضبط مفتاح قياس البيانات على وضع ا
Roger, ti copio l'ora dell'a
Oka
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы взяли ваш бортовой вектор и проследили его вперед, и все выглядит очень хорошо. У нас осталось всего около 24 минут слежения. Слишком рано судить по радару. 
あの稲妻を見て！こ
Houston, Columbia. Wie 
そ
Bei der Triebwerksprüfung leuchten die Flammen rot in Streifen. Wenn die Giertriebwerke zünden, verschwindet der Horizont vollstä
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्
حسنًا،
Ich meine diesen 
इससे पहले कि आप इसे शौच के लिए ले जाएं, मैं आपको संक्षेप में कुछ जानकारी दे दूं - अगर आप चाहें तो इसे शौच के लिए ले जाने से पहले मैं आपको संक्षेप मे
We all only got about 2 hours sleep today MAX, Ken. We're going now 
아래로 내려
好的。所以我们开启了PRO模式，最终显示闪烁的5018；这里你需要的是自动机动，而不是手动操作，
No, no! That's - 05 13 13; 5 hours, 13 minutes and 13
Здесь мы
ジェミニ4号、こちら
G
Roger, Frank. La température du réservoir d'hélium que nous surveillons s
阿波罗11号，阿
Roger. Falls Sie zufällig bei Sonnenaufgang die Gelegenheit dazu haben, irgendwann zwischen jetzt und dem Ende des Fluges, könnten Sie beobachten, ob Sie in diesem Zeitraum welche auf sich zukommen sehe
インド
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. لم نلحظ أي تغيير في الإشارة الواردة على 
そして、表面の驚くべき特徴の 1 つは、ほとんどのクレーターが丸みを帯びていることです。ほとんどのクレーターは、鋭くギザギザし
Credo di sì, Ken. Questa banda è parallela alla linea M, e credo che abbia a che fare con il design dell'ottica, dove abbiamo quell'albero o l'ingresso rettangolare dell'ottica dall'esterno. A questo particolare angolo del sole, taglia completamente. Ora, ho notato che sia la Terra che il Sole fanno questo al telescopio a scansione. Nel sestante, la stessa banda luminosa è presente, sebbene copra l'intero campo visivo del sestante. Tuttavia, l'ingrandimento mette in risalto
C'est exact, Jim. Le reste est déjà fermé, il ne nous reste donc plus qu'à couper le
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 알겠습니다. 업데이트가 몇 가지
Roger, Guaymas. Tutto liscio. Attendi. Te lo
ठीक है, और इस बार ऐसा लग रहा 
I say, is it slee
Roger. All systems look good on the ground here. That's all we have unless you have something else to 
Ricevuto. L'abbiamo stabilizzata a circa 53 gradi e la lascerem
好的。今天早上新闻其实没什么特别的。一切都很
Роджер, 11 лет. Ты можешь различить Эдвардса на секстанте? Конец 
Okay. Mike, you can maneuver to y
سألقي نظرةً إلى الأسفل لأرى إن كان لديكم أضواء 
マリ
Roger. Breitengrad, plus 
ठीक है। मेरा सुझाव है कि आप इसे अनदेखा कर 
- そしてそれが私たちが持っていた唯一の
Io - credo che rispondiamo al numero 9. Noi - credo che sia stato più o meno quando si è accesa la spia numero 5 dell'S-II, e una vibrazione ben definita, più di una semplice vibrazione ad alta frequenza che si otteneva con la normale accensione dell'S-IV, e poi si è accesa la spia. Ho chiamato, ho guardato l'ora e mi sono reso conto che era presto. E poi, subito dopo l'accensione della spia, la vibrazione si è fermata e il motore o il boost
रॉजर। बिल्कुल स्पष्ट। जब मै
Хорош
Okay. Picking up in the middle of the page, that - a block "CMS resume attitude control," scratch. Scratch the next line; "PRO VERB 96." Scratch the third line; "PROPELLANT QUANTITY MONITOR, OF
रॉजर, दाईं ओ
La pression cabine se maintient à 5,5. La température cabine est de 100 degrés. L'humidité cabine est de 25 %. La quantité de réfrigérant est de 67 %. La température ambiante de la combinaison est de 62 degrés. Pression d'entrée. Température d'entrée… La pression sur la combinaison est de 5,8. La température de la vapeur est de 57 degrés et diminue depuis que je l'ai réduite. Le taux d'oxygène est de 74 à 101 %. Ampérage: 23. Vous me recevez toujo
د
罗杰。第 62 号跑道，东经 168°，16
Than
Roger. Goo
세상 사람들이 궁금해할 만한 것 중 하나는 연소 후 스위치를 다시 설정하는 과정일 텐데요. 체크리스트를 확인하셨다고 들었습니다. 하지만 지금쯤이면 모든 스위치를 제자리에 다시 연
Im zweiten Orbit über Sansibar
حسنًا. الآن يا كين، نريد أن نرتب كل شيء هنا. هل يمك
Absehenhelligkeit... Ich weiß nichts darüber... Stow Optics Okulare, okay, daran arbe
Just trying to be your
最後の星の値が変更されたか確認させてください。
分かりました。それと、いつかコピーする時間があれば
Sagen Sie das nochmal. Sie wollten die 
पृथ्वी की तस्वीरें खींचने के लिए यह रवैया वास्तव में सबसे अच्छा नहीं 
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Отслеживание очень хорошо совпадает с показаниями вашей бортовой навигацион
प्रतीक्षा
Roger. They are having trouble verif
Okay. This is very close to ignition point for power descent. 
Джек, мы могли бы попробовать, хотя я не знаю, насколько это будет успешно
Roger. Ti ho sentito forte e chiaro. Sembra che la comunicazione tra 
Parti
Ну что, вы получили межгалактический обзор новостей, который мы вам отправили пару часов назад? Возможно, это было во время вашего отдыха. Мы вам сообщили пару результатов футбольных матчей. Один из них, в частности, был – н
B
罗杰，
仍然可以看到一些雪花效应。250瓦逆变器
11. Houston. Die aktuelle Vorhersage zeigt akzeptable Bedingungen in Ihrem Erholungsgebiet: vereinzelt Schneefall in 600 Metern Höhe, vereinzelt auch in höheren Lagen, Wind aus 70 Grad, 13 Knot
Roger hat das Delta-V-Upda
إعادة الألو
罗杰。我正准备吃第四天的第三餐
Ok, Jack. Sono Jim. Voglio solo assicurarmi che tu stia filtrando le modifiche alla checklist che vengono presentate per assicurarti che siano assolutamente essenziali. Quando impariamo le nostre procedure, possia
هذا هو سيجما 7. اضطررت للتخلي عن هذه الدرجة ا
罗杰。我重新进行了维护，将水流量设置为自动模式，但蒸汽压力再次降至零。所以我第二次尝试维护一分钟，仍然没有效果。我现在正在手动关闭背压阀
ヒュース
请你转告卡纳维拉尔角通信技术中心，我已经
Да. Они же говорил
P
Friendship Seven, Steelhead. Медики готовы ока
Узнайте у группы наведения, 
BATT バス B は 3
알겠습니다. 제가 이해한 바로는, 잭, 이 절차는 모든 DESCENT 배터리가 켜져 있고, BAT 6이 정상 전원 공급 상태라고 가정합니다. 이
中心に向かって、ずっと中心まで来なき
이제 한 
ठीक है। हमें अभी भी आपको यह पुष्ट
حسنًا. جاك، قراءة الخلية 1-أ هي صفر، على المقياس السفلي؛ وقراءة الخلية 1-ب هي 3.45. حسنًا. أنت تريد فقط خليتي الوقود 1 و3. حسنًا. تجاهل قراءة الخلية 1-ب. قراءة الخلية 1-ج هي 3.4. الآن، قراءة الخلية 1-
كولومبيا، هيوستن. فريقكم الأبيض الودود سيبقى معكم حتى نوصلكم إلى منازلكم، ونود أن نهنئ الجميع عل
सुप्रभात
Roger. Donne-moi tout, Deke, ou seulement ceux qui arrivent. Donne-moi leve
Non abbiamo intenzione di rientrare con i completi elega
罗杰，一切
네, 밴스 씨. S-밴드 기능은 음성(VOICE)으로 설정되어 있고, 범위 조절(RANGING) 스위치는 범위 조절(RANGING)로 설정되어 있습니
2
알겠습니다. 1분 전에 "MASTER ARM, ON"을 지우세요. 35초 전에는 처음 두 줄을 지우세요. 10초 전에는 "Minus 9 seconds"로 바꾸세요. 그러면 "Minus 9 seconds"에는 "Manual Ullage"가 남게 됩니다. 2초 전에는 "MODE, FREE"와 "ACA out of detent"를 지
ठीक है, जैक। ये रहे वो टाइमलाइन नोट्स जो मैंने तुम्हारे लिए तैयार किए थे। मुझे ये बताते हुए बुरा लग रहा है, लेकिन मुझे एंट्री चेकलिस्ट में कुछ सुधार करने हैं। ये सुधार नहीं हैं, बस एंट्री चेकलिस्ट के वो हिस्से हैं जो मैंने तुम्हें पढ़कर सुनाए हैं, उनसे मेल खाएंगे। और मैं भी तैयार हूँ, जब तुम तैयार हो जाओ। और वैंस ने मुझे बताया है कि अब तुम पीने
Eine Sache, die die Welt vielleicht interessieren dürfte, ist, wie Sie nach dem Burnout die Schalter wieder konfigurieren. Wir haben gehört, wie Sie die Checkliste durchgegangen sind. Aber ich nehme an, dass Sie jetzt alle Schalter wieder in Position haben und bereit sind,
アポロ8号、ヒュー
In principio Dio creò il cielo e la terra. La terra era informe e deserta, e le tenebre ricoprivano l'abisso. Lo spirito di Dio aleggiava sulle acque e Dio disse: "Sia la luce!". E la luce fu. Dio vide che la luce era buona, e s
Indian Cap Com, vi faccio un resoconto. Sono a 7.000 piedi, il paracadute principale è in buone condizioni, 
Buzz, this is Houston. The COMM is very good. You are coming in loud and clear, and Mike passes on the word that he is receiving yo
D'accord, Jim. On constate que la batterie 3 ne consomme qu'environ un ampère et qu'il est probablement temps de la déconnecter; mettez la batterie 3 hors tension/réinitialisé
わかった。もう一度やってみて。もう少し
アポロ
休斯顿，我们将
Понял. Затем, в конце вашего второго телевизионного сеанса или по вашему запросу, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы сняли красный фильтр с держателя и ненадолго передали сигнал в таком положении, а затем сдвинули ег
ओडिसी, ह्यूस्टन। आपके लिए दो
Cape Cap Com, Sigma 
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हमने आपको पहले जो यॉ पल्स की संख्या 21 दी थी, उसे हम घटाकर 12 करना चाहते हैं। 12 पल्स से यॉ
一つ言えるのは、ここまで来ると、
Es ist etwas chaotisch. Ich bin noch nicht lange dabei. Es ist so ähn
收到。只是想告诉你，我们已经不再理你了。
Amicizia Sette, non provo alcuna sensazione di assenza di peso, se non molto piacevole. Nessun effetto collaterale negativo, non sto male; mi sento bene. Non ho avuto nessun problema, no, ho eseguito i controlli della testa, i movimenti della testa e non ho avuto problemi. Ho eseguito 
ठीक है। अगर पहली बार में रीसेट नहीं होता है, तो 5 से 1
알겠습니다. 지
Это произошло, кажется, вчера. Когда мы проводили обычную настройку. Первой была выбрана звезда Альферац, и программа не сработала; я запустил программу заново, и всё зар
Roger, lo 
Columbia, this is Houston
لدينا قراءة الرقم 2 وهي 3050، بينما قراءة الرقم 1 هي -3000، ثم تنخفض إ
这个装置很好，因
बैट 5, सामान्य फ़ीड, 
Grazie mille. E stiam
- - potrebbe vo
मैंने आपकी वॉटर बॉयलर की आउटलेट प
Хорошо. Джек, сейчас мы не можем. Солнечный свет отражается от двигателей, и обломки, отделившиеся во время аварии, всё ещё наход
Roger, 11. As you've probably noticed, your coning angle in mode is increased substantially as a result of the waste water dump, the fuel cell purge, and a natural coupling, so it looks like we are going to have to terminate here in a little while. And we'd like to get your feeli
ठीक है, जैक। लगता है हमने सारी अधूरी बातें सुलझा ली हैं। हैरानी की बात यह है कि इतनी सारी बातों के बावजूद, ऐसा लगता है कि सिर्फ़ एक ही सवाल सामने आया है, और हम उसी पर शोध करेंगे। आप खुद भी अंदाज़ा लगा सकते हैं कि वह सवाल क्या हो सकता है। अगर आपके मन में कोई सवाल 
इसलिए अगर आपको कोई अजीब आवाज सुनाई दे, तो संभवतः वह पेय पदार्थ के बैग की
现在是几奌
That's affirmative, and I've been u
이 녹음 파일을 듣고 계신 모든
I highly re
We are now going
老
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. На данный момент вам разреш
我会从坎恩那里买。
了解しま
ठीक है। पैनल 3: बैटरी चार्ज, बंद - जैक, तुमने यह पहले ही कर दिया है - अगला एसी इन्वर्टर, पैनल 5: मेन बस टाई बैट बी/सी टू बैट बी/सी। हैं? हाँ, यह ऊपर है - ऊपर की स्थिति में। सर्किट ब्रेकर, बैट ए पावर एंट्री/पोस्टलैंडिंग को 
Ist es das Buch, in dem Jack sie alle aufges
알겠습니다. RCS 직접 제어 방식으로 우
Apollo 8, this is Houston. You
حسنًا. لديّ بعض الاستفسارات بخصوص قائمة التحقق. فهمتُ أن سخاني المياه الرئيسي والثانوي سيكونان قيد التشغيل عند بدء
ठीक है, फ्रेड। यह डिसेंट प्रोपेलेंट टैंक के तापमान की रीडिंग लेने की प्रक्रिया है। इसमें कोई बड़ी समस्या नहीं है, लेकिन हमारे लोग कह रहे हैं कि डिसेंट स्टेज का निचला हिस्सा शायद ठंडा हो रहा है, और हम बस यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि डिसेंट वॉटर टैंक ठीक रहेगा। अभी तो ऐसा लग रहा है कि खाली होने के कई घंटों बाद तक यह जमेगा नहीं, लेकिन हम चाहते हैं कि आप हमें ये तापमान बताएँ ताकि हम देख सकें कि हमारी भविष्
بالوزن وليس كنسبة
没错。这张卡片就完成了。其余的更新只是基于我们58小时的平台数据，仅供您参考——请查看平台数据。我们目前状态非常好。您的陀螺仪几乎没有漂移，因为上次更新时，X轴漂移为-2.24，Y轴漂移为+0.87，Z轴漂移为-0.11。上次更新（我认为是基于52小时的数据）后，我们给出的X轴漂移为+0.79，
Roger. A questo punto, il nostro consiglio è di pianificare, con il tuo consenso, un incontro a partire dall
Okay. Und noch eine Änderung: Kurz darauf, wenn wir die Abwurfvorbereitungen treffen, schließen wir sowohl das vordere als auch das obere Ablassventil. Um eine Blockade zu vermeiden, gehen wir folgendermaßen vor: Nachdem wir das vordere Ablassventil geschlossen haben, schließen wir das Sauerstoffabl
ठीक है। और आप "फॉलो-अप" को भी भूल जाइए। ठीक है, पृष्ठ 17 पर, सभी प्रविष्टियाँ करें और 4 मिनट पर, हमें एक बदलाव मिला है। पहली पंक्ति, CB(16) इन्वर्टर 3, बंद करें; पंक्ति 2, "इन्वर्टर 1 चुनें" को काट दें। पृष्ठ पर नीचे की ओर बढ़ते हुए, "एटीट्यूड मॉनिटर" के बाद, हम चाहते हैं कि आप रेट स्केल को "25 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड" पर सेट करें। ठीक है, चार और पंक्तियों नीचे "बैलेंस कपल
Это всё ещё Friendship Seven. Я вижу там, внизу, пыльные бури, поднимающиеся над пустыней,
Tu pourrais m'appeler de temps en temps, Jerry, juste pour me dire que tu es toujours là, pendant qu'
Roger, ho detto che abbiamo avuto m
D'accord, Fred. Nous comprenons. 
好了，我们已经
कंप्यूटर का
晚安，查理。谢
また、ヒューストンのアポロ 13 号。可能であれば、廃水処理場を前倒しし、O2 燃料電池のパージももう少し早めに実施し
أهلاً هيوستن، هذا جيميني 4. لقد التقطنا للتو صورنا -
Non, Buzz. Ça a toujours l'air pas terrible. Apparemment, quand tu bouges, ça coupe et ça revient. As-tu vérifié le petit connecteur électrique qui se branche sur le conditionneur de s
Hey, could you say again the TD&E fuel? We've 
No, non proprio. Più grande, ma c'è ancora molta st
Gemini 4，RKV 外科医生。我们
没错。还剩每秒30英尺
حسنًا يا جو. لقد
Ro
और
日出。啊！那时的萤火虫真漂亮。那时的光线真好。不过，好吧，
Das ist richtig. Okay. Weiter: die nächste Kamera – Moment 1. Hier gibt es Rauschen. Okay. Die nächste Kamera ist die 16-mm-Kamera, und diese Fotos haben Priorität 3. Okay. Nehmen Sie die 16-mm-Kamera und den Akku von A-8. Nehmen Sie das 10-mm-Objektiv und entfernen Sie es. Nehmen Sie das 18-mm-Objektiv von B-3 und setzen Sie es an die Kamera. Schließen Sie das Stromkabel an, stellen Sie die Bildrate auf 12 Bilder pro Sekunde ein, und die gleiche Datenleitung, die ich Ihnen zuvor gegeben habe, hat diesmal folgenden Inhalt: /DAC/18/CEX, Akku (f/8 und 1/250 Sek.). Okay. Wenn Sie sich diese beiden Kameras ansehen, wird empfohlen, die 16-mm-Kamera für die ersten 2,5 Minuten zu verwenden und dann zur 70-mm-Kamera zu wechseln.
Apollo 8, hier ist Houston mit einer aktualisierten Karte. Sind Sie bereit zu e
The O2 pressure gage is unsatisfactory in many respects. Not only does it not have enough
روجر. وقيل لي أن دينيبولا وريغولوس قري
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Запрос принят, и мы передадим данные на другой государственный вектор. Конец связ
ठी
Ok. Ho appena ricevuto un ALLARME PRINCIPALE e una SOTTOTENSIONE SUL BU
D'accord. Nous aimerions que vous procédie
Roger. My status is good; the suit temperature has reduced considerably; steam vent temperatures now read 69 [degrees] on cabin and suit, suit
Совершенно верно, абсол
Роджер, Нил. Начнём
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous vous demandons de bien vouloir accepter. Nous 
Это «Дружба Семь». Хороший вопрос. Я бы тоже хотел знать ответ. Эти ошибки возникали периодически на протяжении всего полета. Я то включал, то выключал гироскопы. Сейчас я снова на орбите, но это не так, индикаторы положения показывают орбиту, но это не так. Глядя на горизонт, я вижу, что крен примерно на 20° вправо, а тангаж — на 20° больше нормы. По визуальным наблюдениям, тангаж примерно на 55° вниз, а крен — примерно на 20° вправо. Р
시그마 세븐. 하와이 캡 콤. 제
Columbia, Houston. 
고마
Alpha/PC vers PC; INDICATEUR DE LANCEMENT DU VÉHICULE vers GPI; INCLINAISON et LAYAUGLEMENT DE LA CARROSSERIE sur AUTO; RÉINITIALISATION DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS, vers le haut; DÉMARRAGE DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS sur ARRÊT; MINUTES ET SECONDES DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS au centre; Valve de ventilation POST-ATTERRIS
罗杰，休斯顿。宁静基地。我们正在用完手头的胶卷，
حسنًا. ليس هناك الكثير. لنبدأ بالرياضة، لم لا؟ فاز فريق أستروس بنتيجة 8-7، وسجل فريق بريفز خمسة أو ستة أشواط في الشوط التاسع، لكنهم فازوا بصعوبة. وفي المباراة المهمة الأخرى في ذلك اليوم، تم تأجيل مباراة فريق كابس بسبب الأمطار. لديّ جميع نتائج المباريات الأخرى،
Okay, Vance. What we'll do is, when we get to attitude, we'll disable the quads and do like we did last night; we'll let and you people down there tell us when you think we are stable enough; then we'll do all this work with the on the sextant, first; and then when we get that done, we'll go back and put the sextant eyepiece back 
了解しました。これからその点について確認していきます。光に敏感なのは、先ほど使っていたレンズです。明るいもの
D'accord. C'est bon. Il faut les fermer pour que vous puissiez lire les tensions et l
Роджер. Копируем вращение 21 - 61, тангаж 090, рыскание 000, тангаж с высоким коэффициентом усиления + 28, рыскание 271. И нам это понравится с DELTA-V, который у нас е
ठीक है। पहले चरण से शुरू करते हैं; परीक्षण 1: 5 सेकंड प्रतीक्षा करें। 5 सेकंड हो गए। ऑटो मोड में जा रह
Okay. What we'd like to do, Jim, is - We'll go ahead and get the coarse aline 
روجر. سأنتقل إلى الصفحة 33. بقي 4 دقائق. حسنًا.
Apollo 11, hier ist Houston. Noch etwas über zwei Minuten. Alle 
你收到
Très bien. Nous avons dé
Sehr klein
It looks like the tape's 
여기 엉킨 전선들을 좀 풀면, 여기서 푸시업이 얼마나 쉬운지 보여드리겠습
太平洋の雲域を2度目に通過した際に、S-6の写真を撮
Два набора на Сириусе, один набо
Tu as enfin réussi à le mettre à niveau, hein? C'était quoi déjà, ce truc que tu disais être conca
جيميني 4، جيمي
加油，休
D'accord. Bonne idée. Nous avons longuement réfléchi aux
Ah, d'accord
わかりました。8番です。地上でちょっとした訓練を行い、テープをダンプして音声部分をヒューストンにタイムリーに持ち帰れるかを確認したいと思います。皆さんのテープをダンプし、地上で持ち帰って聞いてみる手順を訓練します。前回のダンプ後に上書き録音していない限り、既にテープには何かが録音されているはずです。念のため、少しお話しください。短いカウントやテープの内容、その他何か追加したいことがあれば教えてください。マドリードを
そして
ज्यादा चमक नहीं: बस थोड़ी सी। रीडिंग 0.5 ग्राम। सहायक नमी ठीक काम कर रही है। उम्मीद है मेरा ईंधन काफी देर तक चलेगा। 1 ग्राम
OK, Houston. On a le feu vert pour
увеличилась прим
好的，我们会把它输入到我们的飞行计划部分进
How's our range rate do
L'appareil MSC-1 est maintenant éteint. J'ai également éteint les appareils MSC-2 et -3. Je vais changer d'enregistreur biomédical. Ensu
Gémeaux, ici le chirurgien. Tension artérielle correcte. À vos marques, prêts
这是友谊七号。准备切换到线控飞行。手动模式的进度已经降到15%左右了
This is Friendship Seven. Just as the sun came up, there were some brilliantly-lighted particles that looked luminous, that were swirling around the capsule. I don't have any in sight right now; I did have a couple just a moment a
ठीक है। जेमिनी, यह सही है। फ्लाइट
No, the closeup camera's underneath the. I'll have to pick it up with the prong. I'm picking up sev
Affermativo. A tuo piacimen
瞧瞧，覆盖范围真广。天哪，那片乌云……像两道飞机
Хорошо, Фред. Раз уж ты воспользовался контейнером для конденсата, мы подготовили инструкцию по его использованию. Я не буду тебе её зачитывать, разве что там есть предупреждение о том, что не
分かりました。了解しました。つまり、毎秒0.5フィートプラスXで進み、サービスモジュールをJETTし、毎秒0.5フィートマイナスXで進むということで
시그마
로저, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 여기는 잔지바르 캡콤입
Ok, ci riprovo. Devo mandare 
80 Grad weniger in 7 Minu
好了，杰克。地球已经开始回落了。
Roger. Abbiamo provato a ottenere questo riallineamento. Abbiamo bisogno di... Hai una manovra per ottenere angoli di gimbal adeguati, in modo da non bloccarlo quando otteniamo l'allineamento desidera
Roger, Buzz. À partir de T2, TIG: 102 54 2900 103 51 5600 106 37 3500 109 10 0000. Remarque: T2 se produit à +2126. Temps T3 - correction T3, TIG: 104 39 4100 001 58 1500 001 58 5400. NO
그것도 정확하지 않습니다. 자이로스코프는... 괜찮습니다. 다만
रॉजर। हमने आपके सिस्टम के प्लेबैक डेटा की जाँच की है, और सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है। विशेष रूप से, यह ठीक लग रहा है। हालाँकि, मैं आपको याद दिलाना चाहूँगा कि बैंक A के केवल बॉल वाल्व
Итак, я добрался до панели автом
रॉजर। डेके, धुंध की परत बहुत चमकदार है। मेरा अनुमान है कि यह वास्तविक क्षितिज से 8 से 10 डिग्री ऊपर है। और मेरा अनुमान है कि यह धुंध की परत क्षितिज से लगभग दोगुनी ऊंचाई पर है, जितनी सूर्
当然会，比尔。你
わかりました、ヒューストンさん
Poi ricominceremo con il
Ora ho un orizzonte molto limpido. C'è abbastanza luce e ho un orizzonte composto principalmente da nuvole. Riesco a vedere le nuvole: le stelle che inizia
حسنًا. أولًا، عليك عكس عملية شحن البطارية. للقيام بذلك، في اللوحة 3، أوقف تشغيل شحن البطارية؛ أوقف تشغيل محول التيار المتردد 2؛ في اللوحة 5، شغّل مفتاح ربط ناقل الطاقة الرئيسي للبطارية ألفا تشارلي؛ في اللوحة 250، افتح قاطع الدائرة للبطارية ألفا، مدخل الطاقة، ومحطة ال
功能，关闭；模式，待机；GTA，向下
Rog
نعم، لقد مررنا ببعض اللحظات المثير
近
알겠습니다, 잭. 상황이 좀 이상하게 흘러가는 것 같네요. 잠깐 다른 얘기가 나왔는데, 자세, 특히 음높이가 문제인 것 같습니다. 지금 확인해 보겠습니다. 지난번에 달이 공전했을 때는 각도보다 훨씬 위에 있었는데, 지금 지구가 공전하고 있는 걸 보니 상당히 낮게 위치하고 있네요. 두 천체가 앞뒤로 진동하는데, 매번 중심선에서 조금씩 더 멀어지는 것 같습
रॉजर। माइक, जब आप कुछ समय पहले इसके साथ खेल रहे थे और हमने डेडबैंड को वापस नीचे गिरा दिया था, तब हमने मान लिया था कि डेडबैंड उस समय की हमारी नई स्थिति के आसपास केंद्रित था। तब से, पि
حسنًا يا جاك. كما تتذكر، لاحظ الجميع سابقًا رؤية غروب القمر قبل دقائق قليلة من الغروب، وربما يكون أفقك مظلمًا عند وصولك؛ فأنت تدخل في الصباح الباكر، وقادمًا من الغرب، ستظل ترى أفقًا مظلمًا. لذا، كإجراء احتياطي، وكما تفعل عند تتبع الأفق، سنمنحك وضعية ثابتة على المنصة لتتمكن من النظر مباشرة إلى القمر. هذه وضعية ثابتة، لن تتغير، وستضع خط نافذة 36 درجة على القمر، ثم تجلس هناك وتراقبه. وقبل الغروب مباشرة، ستشرق الأرض وتحجبه، وعندها ستتمكن من فحص الأفق جيدًا. وقد رأيت ذلك في بعض الأحيان، وسأخبرك به لاحقًا. إذا نظرت إلى هذا الآن، يمكنك ف
아, 이건 우정 7이군요. 1 브라보는
Roger. Ça nous a u
जिम, यहाँ बहुत शोर हो रहा है। क्या 
다음은 돌려가면서 먹어볼 차례인가 보네요. 우리는 이걸 시도하
Let's see. In Springfield, Missouri, Mickey Owen, the old-time catcher for the Brooklyn Dodgers who made the record books by dropping a third strike that led the New York Yankees to a victory over the Dodgers in the '41 World Series, decided that he would be remembered by more than just his sports record. Forty-five boys and girls have been the recipients of ponies that he offered. These youngsters were requested to send letters in telling him how they would care for a pony. When the letters poured in, he added five ponies to the 20 he already offered; and other donors pitched in 20 more. And said Mickey Owen, "I thought I'd have about 45 letters, but I ended up with 
予定より10度ほど進んでいるけど
केबिन का तापमान 90 डिग्री
よし。これで作業に戻る準備ができました。次はパワーアップ手順を続行します。ジャック、その調整について他に何か質問
알겠습니다. 빠른 복귀를 위한 근일점 플러스 2입니다. 이것은 / 62871, 마이너스 161, 플러스 129, 플러스 45224, 마이너스 06216, 마이너스 18712 001 287 351, 11월 알파 플러스 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, 지구 상승 010, 우측 37, 플러스 1475, 플러스 06500 13239 36913입니다. 주성 시리우스, 부성 리겔 129 155 010, 여유 공간 없음, 중간 코스 수정 4 실행을 가정하고 동일한 정렬을 사용합니다. GERU(Golf Echo Romeo Uniform) 결정을 위한 5의 시간은 다음과 같습니다. NC-4의 1단계부터 10단계까지, 그리고 NC-8의 3단계와 4단계를 사용하십시오. 다시 말씀드리지만, November Charlie 4의 1단계부터 10단계까지, 그리고 November Charlie의 3단계와 4단계를 사용하십시오. 회랑
Je ne sais pas si nous voulons nous livrer à des contorsions incro
Negative, it's a slow 
Vous avez déjà eu de l'eau à boire
우주선과 아제나 장비가 결합되어 이륙했습니다. 요잉과 롤 조정을 마친 후, ACS를 끄고 7시간 
روجر، تشارلي. أودّ إطلاعكما على آخر مستجدات عملية الكلورة. في الحجرة B4، لدينا 8 جيوب لأمبولات الكلور والمحلول المنظم، منها - دعني أصحح ذلك. لدينا 7 جيوب، واحد منها فارغ وكان كذلك دائمًا، مما يترك 6 جيوب متبقية. على الجانب الآخر هناك في B7، لدينا حاوية أخرى بها 7 جيوب، أي أن لدينا 7 بالإضافة إلى 6، وهذه مملوءة بـ 6 أمبولات كلور و7 أمبولات محلول منظم. الآن، كنت أستخدم أمبولة كلور واحدة وأمبولة محلول منظم واحدة يوميًا، وهو ما يترك لي، قبل عملية الكلورة التي سأقوم بها، أمبولة 
Wi
अभी हम बिल्कुल ज़मीन के करीब हैं, इस तरह कि मुझे नहीं लगता कि ग्राउंड स्टेशन हमें पढ़ पा रहे हैं। हमने कई बार कॉल कटते-कटते सुनी हैं। हम कुछ देर इसी स्थिति में रहेंगे ताकि बूस्टर हमारी नज़र में रहे। अभी बूस्टर के करीब आने में हमें कोई खास सफलता नहीं मिल रही है। ऐसा लग रहा है कि वो अभी भी उतनी ही दूरी पर है जितनी पहले थी। रात में जब बूस्टर हमारे नीचे था, तब ऐसा लग रहा था मानो पूरा आसमान तारों से भरा हो। बूस्टर से इतनी ज़्यादा भाप निकल रही थी कि आसमान में फैल रही थी। मैंने तो यहाँ तक कहा था कि वो तारे जैसे दिख रहे थे। उस समय बूस्टर को ध्यान से देखने पर आपको ईंधन दिखाई 
쌍둥이자
حسنًا. لا توجد صعوبة في إعادة الاتصال بالمركبة الفضائية. كل شيء سلس للغاية، خاصةً طالما أنك تتحرك ببطء ودقة. أنا ممتن جدًا لهذه التجربة. إن
حسنًا يا جاك. لنبدأ من الأعلى. حسنًا. خزانات التبريد؛ قراءة الهيدرو
分かりました。ミッドコースにつ
了解しました。その通りです。Lバンドレーダーがオフに
Roger, un
في الحقيقة، أنا في 
好的。我们建议的开始时间和结束时间，您将处于……状态。我们请求您使用左滚转速率，我们注意到您一直倾向于使用左滚转速率，即每小时 1 转，这是在您当前姿态下（即俯仰角 10 度，偏航角 10 度，偏航角 45 度）的要求。步骤 1，在滚转角 150 度处停止；步骤 2，手动模式下进行捕获；步骤 3，切换到自动窄波束模式；步骤 4，确保自动模式下跟踪正常，然后切换到自动重新捕获模式；步骤 5
分かりました、ジャック。どうやら、マイナス2時間より前にコマンドモジュールを起動するのは避
OK, Fred. On est dans une zone de communication bruyante; j'ai reçu le carburant DESCENT 1 à 66,5
ケン、ここで時間をつぶしてる間に、いくつか異常に気づいたんだ。機内着のブーツ、知ってる？ 僕のはひどく擦り切れて、脱がなきゃいけなかった
Не
好的，我
그
Ok. La pagina successiva è identica, tranne per un piccolo appunto: dalla R1 abbiamo la checklist di ingresso. A parte questo è iden
側面では、デッドバ
हम फिलहाल इस पर रोक लगाना चाहेंगे और कुछ और जानकारी जुटाना चाहेंगे। हम आपको जल्द ही इस बारे 
Und, Neil, wir haben
Va bene. D
حسنًا، ١٣. هذا مركز التحكم في هيوستن. يبدو لنا أننا نفقد تدفق الأكسجين
ठीक है, पहले तारे की बात करते हैं: सही ऊंचाई 15 किलोमीटर (प्लस या माइनस 4); प्रभावी ऊंचाई 12 किलोमीटर (प्लस या माइनस 7)। उप-ता
Roger. / - this 
スキャナーが無視された。何が原因だろ
好的。第 8 步说：“保持”。第 9 步
こちら外科医です
E nella pagina successiva, verso le 10:00, potete riprendere il normale piano di volo. Vorremmo fare un'aggiunta: aggiungere uno scarico delle acque reflue. Anche se al momento non è strettamente necessario, vorremmo eliminarlo in modo da potervi seguire senza interruzioni, visto che ci stiamo avvicinando alla correzione di metà rotta
아니요, 선풍기는 켜지 않지만 창문에 블라인드를 달았어요. 효과가 있는 것 같아요. 이렇게 하니까 오두막
로저. T13, 124 22
好的。1号O2设备
지금은 그리니치 표준시로 17시 21분입니다. 정확히 어느 방향을 가리키고 있는지는 모르겠지만, 땅에서 하늘을 향해 뻗어 올라가는 여러 줄기의 빛줄기가 보입니다. 아마도 일출인 것 같습니다. 빛줄기는 실제로 수직으로 뻗어 올라가고 있어서 콘타렉스 카메라로 두 장의 사진을 찍었습니다. 오로라와 매우 비슷
マークしてください
こちらフレンドシップセブン。理由は？何か理由がある
ロジャー、注意してください...コマンドパイロットは睡眠サイクルを開始し、私はちょうど終わったとこ
Роджер. Мы собираемся провести последовательность измерений расстояния; если мы сможем на пару ми
Roger. Abbiamo alcuni da
오늘은 컨디션이 꽤 좋습니다. 비행 계획을 다시 검토해 보니 휴식 시간을 조금 줄이고 더 자주 쉬는 게 좋을 것 같습니다
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. Coming up about 4 30. You're looking great on all your systems. Eagle is purr
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। अब किसी भी मिनट संपर्क टूट सकता है, आपको पुनः प्
로저. 알겠습니다. 배터리 충전량은 확인되는 대로 기록하겠습니다. 광학계 CAL의 자세는 롤 330.5, 피치 086.3, 요 모두 0입니다. 비행 계획서의 
Roger. Außerdem, Satz Nummer 2, Satz Nummer 2, Sternnummer 11 in Sternnumm
Questa è una bella domanda. È for
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。您的州矢量更新已完成并验证。您可以将计
La température d'entrée de votre combinaison est proche d
मुझे नहीं लगता कि उनका इरादा यही था, बिल। उनका विचार यह था कि सूट हीट एक्सचेंजर दोनों लूपों प
了解しました。寄り付き直後の1.
बिल्
西格玛七号，海角指挥中心，正在发送紧急语音。
हवाई, जेमिनी VI। हमारे पास आपके डेटा पॉइंट हैं और बदले में, हम यह जानन
Хорошо, Майк, если у вас
कोलंबिया, कोलंबिया, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप ब्रावो 1 और ब्रावो 2 में थ्र
أهلاً يا هيوستن. كيف
O
好的。主回路看起来状态仍然很好，所以你的情况应该没问题。你的B电池应该差不多已经
حسنًا. احذف "AUTO SELECT, 16, OFF". غيّر "CB LOGIC POWER" إلى "LOGIC THRUST POWER - CBS CS LOGIC THRUST
حسنًا. أنا الآن في وضع "الاندفاع الأدنى"
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Diverse volte ho avuto la sensazione di avere un propulsore parzialmente bloccato o che funzionava solo parzialmente in picchiata e proprio in quel momento stavo iniziando a picchiare e all'improvviso ho sentito una spinta verso il basso e il propulsore ha picchiato verso di me. Di nuovo, si è ripetuto anche questa volta, quindi credo di 
了解。コピーの準
バイ
Roger. Ungefähr 108 Stunden. Wir
Probabilmente è dovut
11, Houston. Nous allons tester la capacité de réacquisition automatique sur la bande S. Pour cela, nous allons sécuriser notre liaison montante pendant environ 30 secondes. Ensuite, nous la réactiverons et vérifierons si l'équipement du satellite effectue une réacquisition automatique. Si vous ne recevez pas d'appel de notre par
روجر
알겠습니다. 내림차
آمل ألا يخيب
Okay. Obwohl wir die gleichen Werte für die Quadc
Roger. A questo punto ho un atteggiamento davvero strano, ti do un indizio. Ah, ah, sto guardando la Terra dall'alto. Sto venendo verso di te a testa in giù
他们有没有估算出我在对接
Roger, Columbia. Ich verstehe, dass
Хорошо. На панели 250 замыкается автоматический выключатель BAT A, ВВОД/ПОСТУПАЮЩЕЕ ПИТАНИЕ; на панели 275 замыкается автоматический выключатель INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B. Далее на панели 5 находятся несколько
I know it, I know it — 295. A temperature — 87. A pressure — 3000. B temperatu
알겠습니다. 그리고 메인 버스 전압도 모니터링하
حسنًا. بعد صدور توصية نظام التوجيه، أضف "فتح صما
يا جيم، في وقت سابق من المساء، 
Ah, Roger, Zanzibar CapCom. Friendship Seven. Tous les fusibles sont inchangés; je n'en ai changé aucun. Le propulseur est armé. Le largage automatique est désactivé
रॉजर। 5,000 बिखरे हुए; हवाएँ उत्तर-पश्चिम 10; लहर की ऊँचाई 3 फीट; अल्टीमीटर 2986; बचाव बलों का कॉल साइन नाहा रेस्क्यू 1, GMT 02 58; नाहे सर्च 1, GMT 03 44; यूएसएस मेसन विध्वंसक, कोई ETA नहीं; अंतरिक्ष यान का सूर्योदय
D'accord. Merci, Bru
빌, 잠시 기다려. 빌, 아니오. 두 번
コンピュ
Хорошо. Правила работы двигателя. Мы должны выключить его, если показания монитора тяги составляют 77 процентов или ниже; пункт 2, если давление топлива в свободном пространстве меньше 160 psi; пункт 3, если дельта-параметр окислителя топлива превышает 25, и это будет сигналом тревоги на земле; пункт 4, если 
모드 3 짐벌 각도는 다음과 같습니다: 롤 18
발사 1시간 전 준비 완료. 기기 점검을 계속하십시오. 제 
좋습니다. 꽤 간단해 보이네요. 일정한 g 백업 절차를 이해하고, 최대 g까지 상승 벡터를 올린 다음 하강 벡터를 올립니다. 그런 다음 g 도트가 0이 될 때까지 뱅크 각도를 조절합니다. 준원형이 될 때까지 g 도트를 0으로 유지하고, 45도 회전한 후 드로그 작동 시간까지 유지합니다
ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP C
알겠습니다, 찰리. 밸브가 많이 열려 있지는 않네요. 다시 조정하지 않고 정확한 수치를 알려드리기가 어렵지만, 화살표는 대략 1시 방향을 가리키고 있습니다. 이제 유량을 줄이고 이 위치에서 안정될 때까지 기다리겠습니다. 현재 기체 내 측정값은 약 0.4인데, 이는 산소 밸브의 화살표가 2시 방향을 가리킬 때의 값입니다. 산소 유량 측
네. 5번 패널에서 전원 1번과 2번 회로 차단기를 엽니다. 그런 다음 전원 스위치를 리셋하고 놓습니다. 11번 패널과 16번 패널에서 초월 버스 타이(TRANSLUNAR BUS TIE) 회로 차단기를 모두 닫습니다. 16번 패널에서 상승 ECA 제어 회로 차단기를 닫습니다. 16번 패널에서 하강 ECA 제어 회로 차단기도 닫습니다. 14번 패널에서 배터리 5 정상 공급선을 <binary data, 5 bytes>니다. 배터리 1, 2, 3, 4 저전압 탭을 <binary data, 5 bytes>니다. 배터리 5 정
لقد التقطت للتو الصور 3 و4 و5 و6 و7 فوق شمال
はい。日の出は17時10分（ズールー時間）、初光は49分（ズールー時
Roger, ça a l'ai
收到。你这边声音很好。请稍等片刻，我这就
Dacci circa un giorno per trovare la vera anomalia, Jim, e vedere se possiamo davvero fare qualcuna di quest
很好
J
Censur
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। क्वाड ए पर हम जिस हीलियम टैंक के तापमान की निगरानी कर रहे हैं, वह आपके द्वारा किए जा रहे इस पूरे काम में केवल 1 डिग्री बढ़ा है, इसलिए हम इसे बहुत गंभीर नहीं मानते। जैसे ही आप यह काम पूरा कर लें, हम यह करना चाहेंगे कि वापस जाने के बजाय, क्वाड ए को 180 डिग्री घुमा दें और उसे ठंडी तरफ रख दें, और अगली गति
Houston, qui Columbia. Vi leggo forte e chiaro. Siamo tutti e tre di nuovo dentro; il portello è installato. Stiamo eseguendo un controllo della pressione e delle perdite. Tutto procede
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Подтве
Houston CAP COM, Gemini 4. Veuillez répéter. Vous avez été bloq
スキャナーの無視
D'accord. Comment me li
Итак, это три минуты и десять секунд работы аппарата с высокой скоростью подачи кислорода. Не хочется оставаться на этом уровне пять минут. Думаю, это больше, чем человек может выдержать. Температура на входе в скафандр по
了解しました。はっきり
Roger, Mike. NOME 80 - correzione, NOME 84: meno 00758, più tutt
नियंत्रण बहुत अच्छा है। लगता है मैनुअल ईंधन पर्याप्त है। मैं अभी भी 72 प्रतिशत पर हूँ। इस समय पिच में चक्रीय दर बिल्कुल सही है। यॉ काफी स्थिर है; गुरुत्वाकर्षण बढ़ रहा है। कैप्सूल काफी स्थिर है। एक हरा प्
Good air-t
5 1/2 вни
रॉजर, माइक। उड़ान योजना में कुछ त्वरित अपडेट हैं। सबसे पहले, हम 113:30 बजे ऑक्सीजन ईंधन सेल को खाली करना चाहेंगे। आप
Houston, ici Apollo 8. Je souhaite confirmer le rapport d'état des manœuvres. VGX: -1,4, 
वाह, य
Roger. Systems segnala che la tem
Devi rifer
是的，先生；我在您的图表簿里有几张图表，我需要填写一些数字，其中一张是震级与中止的图表
很好。现
ठीक है। ये रहा। मास्
双子座4号，CAP C
Просто хотел уточнить после примерно 45-минутного перерыва. Скажем так, мы заметили, что на вашей антенне с высоким
分かりました。了解しました。何も言わ
Это не критично по времени, Фред, но если вы сейчас разбудили людей, то можете сделать это. Кстати, вы, наверное, знаете, но следующие несколько часов будут довольно спокойными с нашей точки зрения. Мы работаем над процедурами входа и будем готовы зачитать их вам примерно через 8 часов; а до этого момента 
Roger. I docked in AUTO, and as I said, I wasn't really sure of the moment of contact. I kept cross checking the docking probe indicators. I got two barber poles indicating that the three capture latches - not capture latches, but the three... latches had made, and we were soft docked. And at that time the situation looked very stable. So, I went to FREE, glanced back out the window and it still looked stable; and I fired primary 2 bottle. And at that time, a gyration began between the two vehicles due I'm not sure to what. Perhaps the thrusting or perhaps it was building up prior, and I hadn't noticed it. But anyway, during the RETRACT of the probe, there were yaw - my yaw excursions of, I would guess, around 15 degrees, and I had to come back on, take the FREE switch and throw it back to AUTO, and try to damp them out; and I guess Neil was doing the same in the. I'll let him tell you about his side of it. And I though that we were not going to get a successful RETRACT and hard dock. However, in about - oh, I guess 6 or 8 seconds, I did hear - could see the situation damping out, and then we heard the noise indicating the docking latches had fired; and later on when I got
खैर, अब मैं दक्षिणी क्रॉस के आसपास वापस आ गया हूँ, जहाँ हल्के धब्बेदार क्षेत्र में बहुत सारे हल्के तारे दिखाई दे रहे हैं। मुझे तारामंडल में ऐसा ही नजारा याद नहीं आ रहा। अल्फा सेंटौरी और बीटा साफ दिखाई दे रहे हैं। अभ
回復担当にあなたの状態を伝えました。体調
Interrupteur de fonction...
罗杰。您能否给我们提供一下关于
Giusto. Beh, ora stiamo
افهم الأمر الأول يا فانس، ولا أحد يفهمه في أي مجال من مجالات الطب
حسنًا. تخطَّ الخطوة التالية، ونريد إيقاف تشغيل محول التيار المتردد رقم 1، 
알겠습니다. 식사하시는 동안 연료 전지 퍼지 작업을 시작하겠습니다. CO2 캐니스터 6번째 교체, 보조 라디에이터 유량 점검, 패드 복사도 하겠습니다. 그리고 72시간에 0번 롤 정지, 73시간에 옵션 3 실행, 착륙 지점 업링크 연결, 그리고 0
Okay, on that last pass we took about 38 pictures on the Synoptic 
لقد توصلتُ للتو إلى حلٍّ لتغيير خط طول الهبوط بمقدار 6 درجات شرقًا. أريد فقط مقارنة ذلك بما توصلوا إليه بناءً على نفس مدة الاحتراق، استنادًا إلى خط طول تأثير الانحراف المُحدد من البيانات، وه
Sì, stanno piangendo a Dallas. Risultati di basket: Houston non è andata molto bene questo fine settimana. L'Illinois ha battuto Houston 9
Roger, Canary. Mon état est bon; l'état de la capsule est bon; mon mode de pilotage est automatique; les gyroscopes fonctionnent normalement;
रॉजर. लैंडमार्क आईडी, एलएम: टी1, 110 26 56; टी2, 110 32 06. तीन मील दक्षिण; 
7、こちらはザンジバルです。5まで読んでください
Okay. I think I read that you were ready. I forgot... earphones. This simply consists of getting a second pair of cartridges out of the command module, putting one band of sticky tape, that is the gray tape, with the sticky side out, around the sides of each new canister near the top, taking a piece of cue card and cutting it into four squares about 2 or 3 inches on a side, bending those at a right angle to form corner support, attaching them to the sticky tape, so that they'll stick up and overlap the old canister, and then simply putting the old canister next to the new canister and taping it up real good so it sticks tog
Okay. Will do. I don't see any constraint here, Charlie. I was just checking to make sure, because last time, I went from 8 to 9 to 10 to 11 a little 
حسنًا. لديّ بعض الأمور التي أودّ توضيحه
Okay, Jim. X und Z sind richtig und Y is
시그마 세븐, 시그마 세븐, 여기는 워터타운 통신기술센터입니다. 3대
좋아, 짐. 아이템 브라보가 필요하다고
ロジャー、70歳。気分は最高、飛行を続けます、重力加速度は増加しています、すべて
روجر، 
Роджер. Мы стабилизировали температуру примерно на 53 градусах и оставим её на этом уровне, но вернёмся в автоматический ре
Хорошо. Мы ничего не можем вклю
تأكد من أن 
ねえ、ジェリー、昨夜ジムが2000マイルくらい離れたところでVHFシンプレ
다른 모든 방법이 실패할 경우를 대비해 당신의 콧노래 소리를 백업 거리 측정에 
11番、
Вторичный контур охлаждения выглядел 
わかりました。通信能
Well, that's one of several. And we want to tell you something that I told Jim earlier, and that concerns control. Right now you have control in hardover if you need it, but when we go to some normal control modes, since we have the quad heaters off. We want to hav
Non vedo nulla che possa rappresentare 
روجر. حالتي جاهزة. 
Roger. In questo momento, il fluido è tutto raccolto attorno al tubo di livello; il tubo di livello sembra pieno e il fluido all'esterno è circa a
收到。关于RCS，还有什么需要补充说明的吗？哦，收到。
Houston, Ap
حسنًا. تم إيقاف تشغيل خلايا الوقود ر
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo su Marte entro il 2000, ma i leader democratici hanno risposto che la priorità deve essere data alle esigenze sulla Terra. Agnew, alto funzionario governativo al decollo dell'Apollo 11 mercoledì, apparentemente parlava a nome suo e non necessariamente dell'amministrazione Nixon quando ha affermato: "A mio giudizio, dovremmo mandare un uomo su Marte entro la fine di questo secolo". Laredo, Texas, AP: I funzionari dell'immigrazione di Nuevo Laredo hanno annunciato mercoledì che agli hippy verrà negata la carta turistica per entrare in Messico, a meno che non facciano il bagno e si taglino i capelli. Huberto Cazaras, capo dell'immigrazione messicana a Nuevo Laredo, ha affermato che le autorità di Città del Messico, Acapulco e altre famose località turistiche hanno ricevuto lamentele nei confronti degli hippy. Di United Press International: La reazione iniziale alla concessione di un lunedì di vacanza da parte del presidente Nixon ai dipendenti federali, in modo che potessero celebrare una giornata nazionale di partecipazione alla missione di allunaggio dell'Apollo 11, è stata per lo più di sorpresa. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, Londra AP: L'Europa è stata colpita dalla missione Apollo 11 sulla Luna. I giornali di tutto il continente riempiono le loro pagine di immagini del razzo Saturn V in decollo per stabilire il primo collegamento della Terra con il suo satellite naturale. E i titolisti hanno messo a dura prova la loro immaginazione per trovare le parole per celebrare l'impresa. "La più grande avventura nella storia dell'umanità è iniziata", ha dichiarato il quotidiano francese Le Figaro, che ha dedicato quattro pagine ai resoconti da Capo Kennedy e ai diagrammi della missione. Il tabloid Paris Jour ha proclamato: "Tutto il mondo dice loro bravo". Il quotidiano comunista L'Humanité ha pubblicato in anteprima la foto del lancio e ha dedicato l'intera ultima pagina a un entusiasta resoconto sulla Luna che descriveva il conto alla rovescia e il lancio, le mogli e le famiglie degli astronauti e le attività lunari di base. Hempstead, New York: Joe Namath si è presentato ufficialmente al cam
Comp
Roger. Abbiamo disattivato la valvola di controllo dell'evaporatore secondario dell'acqua, ma p
D'accord. À l'étape 6, presque tout en bas (en fait, il s'agit de trois lignes avant le bas de l'étape 6), il y a une section qui indique « Réinitialiser l'évap
मैं इस समय ओरिएंटेशन टेस्ट करूँगा, जब मैं काम पर हूँ और ज़्यादा व्यस्त नहीं हूँ। मैनुअल हैंडल को पकड़ने की कोशिश की - और ठीक से पकड़ लिया। यॉ एटीट्यूड को
D
Vor uns befindet sich in diesem Tal ein sehr dunkler Krater im Füllmaterial. Er ist insofern ungewöhnlich, als er zwar scharf abgegrenzt
Okay. Wir können n
रॉजर। कैप्चर लै
जी हाँ। हमें लगता है कि आपके पास पहले से ही 37 06 होगा। अगर ऐसा होता है, तो एंटर दबाएँ, इससे आप कोड 00062 पर पहुँच जाएँगे, जो स्टैंडबाय के लिए अनुरोध है। जब आपको यह कोड मिले, तो खाली जगह तक PROCEED बटन दबाते रहें। अगर आप
에드, 우리 항상 개방 루프 재진입을 시도하겠다고 했잖아. 컴퓨터가 고장 나서 다행이지, 그렇지 않았으면
ठीक है। जब आपको यह म
Okay. The reason we want a radial burn is to increase your midcourse correction so we c
罗杰，除了这些问题之
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。Sバンドのノーマルモードからレンジ
Хорошо. Мы тут спешим. По
Она движется вверх, к отметке 1 час, и внутрь
罗杰，救援区域的天气情况是：云量0.5，能见度10英里，风速3节，风向360度偏
Roger. Jim, nous avons remarqué que vous êtes passé de AUTO à FERMER sur la valv
حسنًا، في هذه الوضعية يا جاك، ونحن نتأرجح، لا يمكنني استخدام ال
알겠습니다. 다시 
أسفل ذلك، امسح 
फ़ंक्शन, बंद; मोड, स्टैंडबाय; जीटीए, नीचे; जीटीए कवर, सुरक्षित; एटीट्यूड,; 
Columbia,
Я буду с
Хорошо, Джим. Мне показалось, что лучше всего
जेमिनी 4, आरकेवी कैप कॉम। आरकेवी तैयार है। अगर आप अप
Okay. Im Wesentlichen möchten Sie, dass wir über die Schwingungssequenz während der frühen S-II-Abschaltung des mittleren Triebwerks sprechen und auch die Schwingungen beschreiben, die wir während
Roger. Da Houston a Honeysuckle. Vi sentiamo forte 
Roger, ich habe den Zeit-Hack bekommen und warte gespannt auf den ΔV-U
برج الدلو، هي
And e
그게 확증입니다. 다음으로, 비행 데이터 파일입니다. 이건 R-1, R-2, R-3에 들어갑니다. 다음으로, A-8에 PPK 3개를 넣습니다
Okay. Zum Warmwasserboiler: Es ist interessant, dass ich mein eigenes Mikrofon habe – ich wollte gerade sagen, dass ich mich selbst mit etwa zwei Sekunden Verzögerung höre, sobald unser Mikrofon aktiviert ist. Was die Überprüfung des primären und sekundären Boilers angeht, halte ich es für eine gute Idee, sicherzustellen, dass wir beides vor dem Betreten de
はい、大丈夫です。再整備という方法があります。これは少し面倒な作業ですが、だからこそ、入港前に2つのループで済むか1つのループで済むか、ある程度の見当をつけておきたいのです。これは、私たちが明確にしたいと思っている別の質問、実際に
13, Houston
RCS は良好、フラグなし。D
Хорошо. Да, всё скопировано. Кажется, у вас на измерителе мощности четыре или пять отметок, в
Sì, li od
حسنًا، سنواصل القيام ببعض الأمور ا
また、VI、9月まで
Roger, Bill. Wir würden gerne einmal, wenn Sie Zeit haben, über Ihre Hochleistungsantenne spreche
... - हमारा - एलसी
Roger, da bin ich, und ich werde die Gram
Ce fait de ne pas avoir réussi à nous séparer de ce qui nous a un peu perturbés nous a mis dans l'e
Friendship Seven, hier spricht ATS Cap Com. Bitte lesen Sie nur den letzten Teil Ihrer Über
روجر. لقد استلم
罗杰
Okay, Apollo 8. Auf Sei
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 무체아 콤 테크입
Окей, выгодное предлож
أوديسي، هيوستن. كل ما عليك فعله هو إغلاق صمام REACs في خلية الوقود رقم
Rog
Et ce n'est pas correct non plus. Les gyroscopes sont… fonctionnent correctement; m
Der Horizont ist sehr klar. Roll- und Nickbewegungen sehen sehr gut aus. Gieren sieht gut aus. Ich glaube, wir haben jetzt eine ganze Reihe von Ster
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Последнее сообщение я не скопировал. Сейчас мы отправляем в
«
C'est confirmé. Je vais tout d'abord passer rapidement en revue les horaires des événements principaux, puis nous reviendrons sur les détails. Bien. L'interface d'entrée est prévue à 142 heures et 40 minutes; environ 6 heures et demie avant, nous commencerons la procédure en appliquant la puissance de chauffage, en vérifiant les températures du module de commande et en le préchauffant si nécessaire. Nous pensons d'ailleurs que nous devrons probablement le faire. Nous vous fournirons des procédures détaillées ultérieurement. Environ 6 heures avant, nous commencerons la mise sous tension en utilisant la liste de contrôle modifiée de 30 minutes que
I guess I don't know how to turn
收到。如果您能回复“接受”，我们将向您发送机动状
- - 다 이해하셨죠? 좋아
Roger, Jack. Grazie. Ri
알겠습니다. 그럼 어떤 버스 구성을 원하시나요? 어떤 
यह
Quelle vue magnifique nous avons aujourd'hui! On aperçoit un peu plus de la moitié de la Terre. On dirait l'Afrique et la mer Rouge; on n'en est pas tout à fait sûrs à cause des nuages, mais même à
*** Les deux vannes d'isolemen
Ho un bel po' di informazioni da darti, Jim. Prima di tutto, la prima cosa che devi fare è il tuo tempo 48-1. Fammi sapere non appena sei pronto a copi
17 17 罗
No, that's not correct, Fred. What we wait to do is leave everything the way it is on 34, and add this one comment I'm g
Das ist bejah
阿波罗11号，这
Das i
Здравствуйте, Занзибар, эт
هل أفهم من ذلك أننا مخولون باستخدام الوقود ف
ठीक है। O2 फ्यूल सेल पर्ज के बारे में क्या ख्याल है? क्या आपको अभी इसकी ज़रूर
11, 휴스턴입니다. 안테나가 재신호를 포착하기 
さあ、ヒューストン
والي، سأعطيك العد 
Yes, that is affirmative, CAP COM. We want to do that a couple of hours when it is related to the maneuver, 
D
好的。继续——继续操作同一个面板，面板 5：断路器，电池充电器，交流电源，闭合；断路器，电池充电器，电池充电
La rispos
Ouais, c'est plein à
네. 사진 속 누군가가 거꾸로 되어 있네요. 물론 우주에서는 정확히 똑바로 된 방향이나 거꾸로 된 방향이 없다
Apollo 11, Hou
Es klingt so, als ob Ihre Kommentare im Wesentliche
Un peu plus vers le terminateur et dans la même direction qu'aupa
我觉得这不算什么大问题；只是切换到自动模式时它会跳一下。我不认为这会影响我们参赛。我——我也在做同样的事情
Хорошо, Джек, повтори это еще раз... что касается отк
这里是Sigma Seven电台，正在用高频广
友谊七号，友谊七号，这里是通
Können Sie nicht einen etwas weiter entfernt
Yes it
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। ट्रैकिंग आपके ऑनबोर्
了解。残り時間
罗杰·塞文，建议你接近再入姿态，尽可能少用燃料，并保持电传操纵系统待命，直到出
روجر، باز. في عمود الضغط، انزل إلى البند الرابع، ستجد أن الضغ
Okay. Es heißt, manövrieren Sie in ATT HOLD für die Mondsicht-Haltung bis zur Freigabe der Pl
Giust
Ну, сейчас, после установки этого устройства, показания вернулись к 0,35. До этого мы считывали показания на 
터널 내부의 습도가 이전 어느 때보다 높습니다. 하지만 주관적으로는 습도의 변화나 증가를 전혀 감지할 수 없었습니다. 우주선 내 다른 곳에서는 습기가 전혀 없는 것으로 보입니다. 예를 들어 창문에는 김이 서리지 않았고
PCM 비트 전
هل هناك أي شيء
حسنًا يا جين، سأشرح لك موضوع البدلة أولًا حتى لا يضطر أحد للإجابة. درجة حرارة قبة البدلة 72 درجة. درجة حرارة مدخل البدلة 66 درجة، وإعدادات البدلة مضبوطة على 8، وأنا راضٍ تمامًا عن دائرة
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आपकी आवाज़ वाकई बहुत अच्छी है, और 
好的。我去PULSE是
Sigma Seven, per favore, potresti darci la temperatura dello
C'est négatif, Mike. Les réchauffeurs du réservoir d'hydrogène numéro 2 sont éteints et les réchauffeurs du réservoir d'oxygène numéro 1 sont étei
所有这些操作似乎都进行得很顺利。唯一有点奇怪的是，推进器出现了一些异常活动。我把俯仰控制放在加速指令（ACCEL COMMAND）里，
Базз, ты меня слыш
Interessanterweise liegt die Abweichung zwischen der Zielerfassung und der Computermessung auf eine Ent
मैंने अभी-अभी उत्तरी अफ्रीका और अरब के ऊपर से गुजरते हुए हैसलब्लैड कैमरे से 29वें फ्रेम तक की शूटिंग पूरी की है। अब, मुझे लगता है कि हम ईरान के ऊपर से
حسنًا. انتظر لحظة يا جاك. كنتُ 
Хорошо, Джек.
알겠습니다. 표면 점검 목록으로 돌아가서 45페이지의 통신 ​​재구성 부분으로 가시면 S 밴드에서 거리 측정 기능을 활성화해 주십시오. 즉, S 밴드 설정 화면에서 "주의" 및 "경고: 전자 장
روجر. كلنا نست
Ok, Fred. Questa è una procedura per ottenere una lettura delle temperature del serbatoio del propellente di discesa. Non è un grosso problema, ma i nostri addetti dicono che la parte
Il ret
Je l'accroche 
De c
D'accord. Nous sommes revenus sur la ceinture
They said th
Roger; das ist richtig, Fred. Wenn du einen Manöv
١١، لديك جمهور كبير جدًا. يُبثّ مباشرةً في الولايات المتحدة، وسيُبثّ أيضًا في اليابان، وأوروبا الغربية، وجزء كبير من أمريكا الجنوبية. الجميع يُشيد بجودة الألوان الممتازة. شكرًا جزيلًا 
रेट्रो सेप, और एड कहता ह
И, Аполлон-8, не могли бы вы предос
잠깐 이 주변을 비행해 보고
Okay, ich erledige das während de
١١، هيوستن. بعد التحقق من درجات الحرارة، يبدو أن المركبة الفضائية قد انخفضت درجتين أو ثلاث درجات خلال الـ ٢٤ ساعة الماضية، وهذا يتوافق مع 
ठीक है। मैं इसे
Роджер, «Дру
حسنًا. في الصف الرابع: تحت قسم السخانات، يجب أن تك
ठीक है, मैंने सिस्टम टेस्ट मीटर को 4-
알겠습니다. 비행 계획에서 그 부분을 검토했던 이유는, 만약 기체를 뒤집어서 정면 비행을 시도하거나 그와 비슷한 방식으로 비행하신다면, 빌 씨의 사진 촬영을 좀 더 효과적으로 도와드릴 수 있기 때문입니다. 예
Ok, Jack. Te lo leggerò, poi aggiungerò qualche commento e ne parleremo un po'. Questo dovrebbe avvenire dopo... Dopo il realline a 49 ore, se il tempo lo permette, vorremmo che l'equipaggio verificasse se c'è un angolo di rollio in cui la cometa può essere osservata per delle foto. In tal caso, registrate l'angolo di rollio ottimale per eventuali fotografie, prima di riavviare a circa... quando i ragazzi hanno finito, usate l'opzione pianeta e i seguenti vettori semiunitari per tracciare la cometa Bennett a circa... Siete pr
أليس هذا أمراً ضخ
わかりました。我々の部隊は、システムテストメーターに行ってインジェ
Плюс 59578, минус 00086, минус 05287, 012 080 018, неприменимо, плюс 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, земля вверх 005, вправо 27, плюс 0398, плюс 06500 13215 36961; Сириус Ригель 137 311 339, нет зазора, предполагается выполнение маневра пролета, используется стабильное выравнивание в качестве пролета; время 5 для определения GERU составляет; используйте шаги 1–10 NC-4, шаги 3 и 4 NC-8. Средняя V 400K для контрольной кар
Хорошо
Muchea Cap Com. Предостав
Okay, Fred. And you're loud and clear down here now. Okay. What we're getting a procedure ready for you is to do an Sun check at approximately 74 hours or in just a little over 3 hours. That will be a detent 2; we'll have a detail procedure up shortly and it will include a rendezvous radar redesignation to get it out of the way and a maneuver to the attitude. It's our feeling that if that checks out within 1 degree that your platform will be okay for the burn without a subsequent. If it's not within 1 degree, we are working up an Earth/Sun ali
Ciò che cercheremo di fare è ripristinare il ciclo del sonno, tornando ai periodi 
Say again, Bill. You're
Roger. Nous aimerions procéder à un équilibrage des réservoirs cryogéniques. Pourriez-vous mettre l'interrupteur du chauffage du réservoir d'oxygène n° 1 sur OFF et celui du réservoir d'hydrogène n° 2 sur OFF, en laissant tous les autres interrupteurs cryogéniques inchangés? Nous laisserons le système fonctionner ainsi penda
Повторите ещё раз п
Gemini 4, Houston CAP
...Ладно
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आप चाहते हैं कि हम कैमरों का परीक्षण करें? - मैं इसी बारे में सोच रहा था। मैंने
わかりました。完了したと理解しました。飛行計画の次の項目は走査望遠鏡による視程試験です。これは前回の飛
没错。请参考S/2-6。杰
Ok. Il motivo per cui lo stavamo esaminando nel piano di volo è che, se vuoi provare a virare e volare a testa alta o qualcosa del genere, possiamo aiutare Bill a ottenere
네. 방금 말씀하신 건 맞지
Okay. Nach dem Ereignis den Ereignistimer einstellen, er ist, EINGABE; 1257, EINGABE; 252 EI
Okay. Aft
سنتوجه إلى غوايماس، عل
Roger. Mike, nous serons en ligne dans environ 11 minutes à 83 44. Il est 84 30. Avant cela, nous aimerions que vous configuriez la bande S en mode « gain élevé » pour le suivi REACQ et le faisceau à gain élevé pour le mode « NARROW ». Essayons cela pour voir si nous pouvons obtenir une REACQ automatique.
Okay, gut.
Ich möchte meine Grüße an die
Apollo 8, Houston. Le chargement du vecteur d'état est 
Хорошо. Сегодня мы хотели бы, чтобы вы определили смещение цапфы до наблюдений, как указано в процедурах, а также после них. Наша цель — проверить возможность того, что какой-либо тепловой эффект может вызывать ошибки в угловых показаниях секстанта. Полученное ранее смещение следует учесть, то есть ПЕРЕЙТИ к пункту 87 после получени
حسنًا. ه
지금은 꽤 개운하지만, 사실 제대로 잠을 자지는 못했어요. 두 끼를 먹었거든요. EVA 훈련을 마치고 에드가 자는 동안 아침을 먹었고, 그 후에 두 번째 식
Roger. Nous transmettons ces informations. Je vous donne mainten
रॉजर। मु
Okay, Houston. Damit ist alles erledigt. Wir haben den dritten Stern mit Antares veri
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Примерно через 2 минуты мы передадим эстафету Голдстоуну для передачи сигнала. Возможно, произойдёт кратковременное прерывание связи. Конец связ
Immagino che questo sia ciò che a
Ich steck
That is Aquarius. We're getting an awfu
现在，您可能需要考虑一下在进行姿态抛
好的，吉姆说得对。除了几个例外，我们应该把其他所有步骤都划掉。第一步“前向卸料阀关闭”应该保留。其他所有步骤
기장이 잠들어 있다
Houston, abbiamo avuto un
알겠습니다. 수동 모드, 자이로스코프 해제
不用
Хорошо, Джим. Старт плюс 15 секунд до стартовой площадки: 0
Je suis presque à la verticale. Nous allons prendre des photos de cumulus. L'astuce du timing est… La ph
Okay. Ich habe die Temperatur in der Kuppel bereits gemessen. Sie stieg auf etwa 82 Grad. Ich habe s
Hey, Joe? Is FAO ready to - do you - or are you r
大丈
لا يزال لدينا الصاروخ المعزز... كان هو الصاروخ المعزز. أستطيع رؤية أضوائه تومض الآن. إنه يمرّ على الأفق. وقبل أن يغيب عن الأنظار، ينعكس ضوء الشمس عليه، مُشكّلاً صورةً شديدة السطوع. هذا هو الجسم الذي رأيته سابقاً. يبدو
Friendship Seven, Steelhead. L'hélicoptère est en route. Ils devraient arriver dans environ 8 minute
Ok. Un'altra nota sull'acqua, Jack. Se
حسناً. أنا الآن شبه مقلوب رأساً على عقب. زاوية
400K, 20
Roger. Salut Jim, pendant que tu es levé et que tout est calme, laisse-moi te donner deux ou trois autres choses à considérer. Une 
알겠습니다, 빌. 
広州通信技術局、こちらシグマ・
خا
Okay. Gut gelesen. Weiter geht's auf der Seite. Schalter „BALANCE COUPLE“, „BALANCE COUPLE OFF“. Okay, weiter zur letzten Zeile vor -2 Minuten: „COMMANDER THROTTLE, MINIMUM; LMP to DETS“. Bei -2 Minuten: „400 plus 1“ streichen. Bei -1 Minute: „MASTER ARM, ON“ streichen. Bei -10 Sekunden: „MANUAL ULLAGE“ hinzufügen. Bei +5 Sekunden: „DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, ON;“ hinzufügen: „, 40 Prozent“. Okay, „Wenn der Motor beim Starten nicht anspringt, manuellen Startknopf drücken; springt er immer noch nicht an, DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, ON.“ Die gleichen Hinweise gelten für das Abschalten beim manuellen Start. 
D'accord. On vérifie les projecteurs qu'on t'a donnés. En fait, Jack, tu devrais pouvoir les utiliser tout de suite. Inutile de rester dans le noir. I
Hearing you loud and clear, Fred. O
こちらカル。ウォーリー、君の声が弱々しく聞こえている。最初の通信は
أبولو 11، هذه هيوستن ع
罗杰……43-2 101. 2+06. 09 40 59. 5+14. 10+36. 44-2 114. 2+22. 11 15 26. 3+51. 9+13. 你抄了最后两道
設定は-50度。ジャイロはフリー。-50度で待機。フレアに備えます。ロール
Хорошо. Поверните космический аппарат влево, что
Хорошо, 13. Это Хьюстон. Нам кажется, что поток кислорода через топливный элемент 3 ослабевает. Поэтому мы просим вас закрыть клапан REAC на топливном элементе 3. Похо
Хорошо. Я яростно трясу головой во все стороны, с закрытыми глазами, вверх и вниз, тангаж, крен, рыскание. Ничего в животе; ничего нигде. Теперь есть… я попробую нажать кнопку «ноль», кнопку «обнуление времени». Ну, я ее пропустил. Я немного дезориентирован относительно того, где именно все находится, не совсем понимаю, чего вы хотите этим добиться, но проблем с ориентацией нет. Ваши… ваши… ваши… внутренние уши и ваша мысленная оценка горизонтальности… вы просто адаптируетесь к этой среде, как… как будто родилис
- - some particles jumping around on your screen. That's just dust particles that are being ill
Exécuter S-6 à 00:15
Well, it extends the full length of the sextant. Actually, I could see us coming as we moved across, because the band of light in the scanning telescope cut across where the moon was, and it moved in this area. I believe it's caused by
फिलहाल, मेरी यॉ दर ½ डिग्री प्रति सेकंड दाईं ओर, पिच दर ½ डिग्री प्रति सेकंड ऊपर और र
はい。Retro をチェックしてく
هذا صحيح. يقوم فريقنا هنا بتقيي
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन।
声音清晰响
रॉजर, सिग्मा सेवन। मैंने आपके संद
알겠습니
रॉजर। मुझे ठीक से याद नहीं कि उस समय क्या हुआ था, माइक। मैं कोड का इस्तेमाल करके लैंडिंग साइट्स को चिह्नित कर रहा था, और मुझे ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स के लिए बार-बार एक बड़ा ट्रनियन दिखाई दे रहा था। और मैं देख सकता था कि लक्ष्य, य
हम चाहते हैं कि आप जल्द से जल्द अपशिष्ट जल का निपटान शुरू क
Близнецы 4, Гавайи, CAP COM. Вы меня сл
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 수동 혼합을 계속 진행
А как насч
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь», и сейчас, когда начинается восход сол
पहला अपडेट 
Roger. Wir haben eine Fernsehmentalitä
Eagle, Houston. N
Roger. Ça a l
Хорошо. Мы постараемся вести себя потише. Только я не знаю, как. Ла
특정 시점에 나타나는 별이 있습니다. 그게 무엇인지 알아내려면 시간이
ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP COM。水上に出る頃には
Okay. Strom 5, Notabschaltung. Punkt 1, erste Zeile: Ich streiche „And VHF-A“. Zweite Zeile: „SIMPLEX operation“. Dritte Zeile: Ich ersetze den zweiten Vorzeichen (Verstärker) durch „OFF“ und das letzte Wort „OFF“ durch „PCM“. Vierte Zeile ist in Ordnung. Fünfte Zeile: Ich streiche die gesamte Zeile. Beleuchtung: Wir haben
PCM BIT RATE 
Bien reçu. Ici Friendship Seven. Mon statut: je suis en ligne, mais la connexion n'est pas stable. Mon problème de lacet s'est inversé. Au début du vol, lorsque j'ai rencontré des difficultés au-dessus de la côte 
비행 디스플레이 > 임무 타이머에서 
إذن، سي
मैं अब पुनः प्रवेश की स्थिति में हूँ। स्वचालित मोड में जाने के लिए तैयार हूँ। फ्लाई-बाय-वायर ट्रैकिंग बिल्कुल सटीक है, ठीक वैसे ही जैसे ट्रेनर में थी। ट्रेनर की प्रक्रियाओं का उपयोग करने से बहुत सकारात्मक परिणाम मिले हैं। इसमें कोई संदेह नहीं है कि समय बहुत तेजी से बीतता है। स्वचालित मोड में वापस जा रहा हूँ। मुझे पिच डाउन सिग्नल मिला, थ्रस्टर थोड़ा कम है, और सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है। शायद सही रीडिंग में थोड़ी सी गलती हुई थी। मेरा मानना ​​है कि तीनों अक्षों पर मेरी ट्रैकिंग बिल्कुल सही थी। कैप्सूल का लॉजिक बहुत अच्छे से का
الصداقة سبع
罗杰，我们看到
Roger, ti sento forte e chiaro. Ora vorrei che tu ti fa
We would like to look at a couple more tests on the, and the general consensus is that we don't think there is any particular problem. We'd like to go ahead and take a look at what you get by running four or five more tests. And prior to that, we'd like to run one 
こちらはシグマ・セブン。日の出の中、90度のヨー角で逆さまに飛行しているような映像です。自分の進路方向が最もはっきりと分かります。まるで列車の窓から外を眺めているようです。目の前を通り過ぎる地形が見えます。さまざまな種類の雲があります。機体の縦軸に対して-90度の90度平面で、雲が私のそばを流れていくのが見えます。ヨー角が非常に鮮明に映し出されています。今、旋回すると、機体は逆さまですが、鈍角
Ich kann jetzt am linken
И мы полу
ठी
حسنًا. ما زلتُ أستخدم طاقة الكرة، وأتجاوز حاليًا سرعة 270 ميلًا في الساعة. هناك انحراف طفيف بين زاوية الميل وزاوية الدوران. مؤشر زاوية الدوران في منتصف الارتفاع تقريبًا، ومؤشر زا
Houston CAP COM, Gemini 4. Say again, 
やあ、すごい
Okay. About all we have to do is to send up your state vectors and target loads, and that will have to wait
Roger, Jim. Ihr könnt zur
收到。时间不
ठीक है, जिम। हम इस विषय पर आपसे बात करना चाहते थे। हम इस पर विचार कर रहे हैं, और हमारा मानना ​​है कि - बेशक, यह आप पर निर्भर करता है, लेकिन इसके फायदे और नुकसान को देखते हुए, आपने फायदे पर ध्यान दिया है। हम EI माइनस 1 घंटे से ठीक पहले हैच की अखंडता की जांच करते हैं, और अगर यह खराब हो जाता है, तो आपको सूट पहनने में काफी मुश्किल होगी। दूसरी ओर, सूट पहनने के नुकसान यह हैं कि इससे आपकी गति काफी धीमी हो सकती है, सूट पहनने में लगने वाले समय को तो छोड़ ही दें, और किसी को यह भी चिंता है कि इतने समय तक सूट में रहने के बाद आपको बहुत गर्मी लग सकती है, और हमें सूट को हवादार बनाने के लिए सूट लूप को चालू करना पड़ सकता है, और हम ऐसा नहीं करना चाहते क्योंकि इसमें काफी बिजली खर्च होती है। इसलिए, हमारी सलाह यह थी कि आप सूट न पहनें, क्योंकि हमारे पास यह मानने का कोई कारण नहीं है कि अखंडता जांच में हमें रिसाव की दर में मामूली वृद्धि के अलावा कुछ और पता चलेगा, और हम निश्चित रूप से इसे हैक कर सकते
怎么回事？O2 高速充电功能打不开。看来
Ricevuto. S
로저. 여기 인터스텔라 타임즈 12월 24일자 신문이 있습니다. 당신의 TV 프로그램은 대성공이었습니다. 오늘 아침 이웃 행성인 지구의 대부분 국가에서 시청했습니다. 유럽 전역, 심지어 모스크바와 동베를린까지 생중계되었고, 일본, 북미와 중미 전역, 그리
Einen
Roger. You residents of the spacecraft Columbia may be interested in knowing that today is Independence Day in the country of Colombia. Gloria Diaz of the Philippines was crowned Miss Universe last night. She defeated 60 other girls for the global beauty title. Miss Diaz is 18, with black hair and eyes, and measures 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. First runner up was Miss Australia, followed by Miss Israel, and Miss Japan. While you're on your way back Tuesday night, the American and National League Allstars will be playing ball in Washington. Mel Stottlemyre of the Yankees is expected to be the American League's first pitcher. No one is predicting who will be first pitcher for the National League yet. They have nine on the roster. Even though research has certainly paid off in the space program, research doesn't always pay off, it seems. The Woodstream Corporation, parent company of the Animal Trap Company of America which has made more than a billion wooden spring mousetraps, reports that it built a better mousetrap but the world didn't beat a door to its path - didn't beat a path to its door. As a matter of fact, the company had to go back to the old-fashioned kind. They said, "We should have spent mor
Ro
ठीक है। दो और चरण। चरण 6, इस मोड में दो सेकंड के लिए हाई-गेन एंटीना पर बने रहें। इन दो सेकंड के दौरान कभी भी OMNI मोड पर स्विच न करें, और वॉइस और डेटा की मोड कॉन्फ़िगरेशन बनाए रखें। हमें उम्मीद है कि ट्रैक लॉस प्रति सेकंड 15 मिनट
روجر، كولومبيا. ها نحن قادمون مع المركبة رقم 11. إحداثيات G&N: 37200، ناقص 060، زائد 047، 098، 05، 2422، زائد 41448، زائد 03719، ناقص 02422. زاوي
ठीक है, जिम। अब हमारे चेकलिस्ट में केबिन कोल्डसोक शुरू करने का काम शामिल है। इसमें वाष्पीकरण शामिल ह
Das ist bestätigt; das Fahrwerk ist ausgefah
जी हां। हम आपको बता रहे हैं कि आपकी 
١١، هيوستن. نحن الآن جاهزون للتحويل من هوائي OMNI D
Roger. The Cowboys we
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。很抱歉打扰你们，但我们想请
罗杰。迈克，大概三点钟方向。背景噪音很大，现在好多了。休息一下。鹰报，休斯顿
حسنًا
十分之一，现在是负十分之一，又回到零；不，还没
네, 짐, 저희는 주 카트리지에 1시간 정도, 보조 카트리지에 6~7시간 정도 
حسنًا. لدينا ثلاث نقا
ठीक है। चरण 6, "पावर चालू करें (फ्लडलाइट्स बंद), चेतावनी: पावर लाइट चालू। पैनल 11, सर्किट ब्रेकर ट्रांसलूनर बस टाई, बंद। पैनल 16, ट
13번, 
Jim? Vous êtes tous les deux en excellente forme actuellement et vos électrocardiogrammes sont parfaits. Votre consommation d'eau a bien augmenté et, d'après mes derniers calculs, vous semblez tous les deux parfaitement hydratés pour 
好的，我给你报一下数据。宇航服舱顶温度80度，宇航服进气口温度75度，舱顶温度41度，舱内温度97
ジェミニ4、ハワイCAP COM。待機中。地上
क्या आ
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन; कुंभ राशि। आप डाउन वॉइस 
Bene. Al punto 6, quasi in fondo (in realtà, sono tre righe dalla fine del punto 6), c'è una sezione che dice di RESET dell'evaporatore del circuito di raffreddamento secondario, e dovrebbe esserci una nota che sono 58 secondi se lo s
Roger, mein Computer ist eingeschaltet, die COMP-LED sollt
Sotto, cancella "Continua osservazioni visive" e "Interrompi osservazioni". E sotto ancora, cancella "Foto bersaglio 56 su 8, 250, infinito, 5", eccetera, fino alla fine della ri
卫生巾。
11, это Хьюстон. В результате сброса сточных вод через сливную систему мы пришли к выводу, что ваш датчик расхода кислорода неисправен. Я упоминал, когда вы рассказывали нам о циклическом сбросе воды из аккумулятора, что, хотя датчик и двигался, вероятно, указывая на более высокий расход, он, похоже, не показывал достаточно высокий расход; и, исходя из этого и текущего расхода, мы пришли к выводу, что датчик неисправен. Мы хотели бы продолжить подачу кислорода еще примерно час, отключив ее примерно чер
One other thing you might have somebody look at - I don't want to bother the guys upstairs - the drain hose that we've got in the command module, I wonder if we can find out if it will plug into the and in which case we can keep transfer
Beh, in que
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। इंडियन कॉम टेक, मैं आपको ठीक से सुन पा 
हाँ, बिल्कुल। यहाँ एक लंबी प्रक्रिया है; लेकिन संक्षेप में, आपको पूरी चीज़ को प्लास्टिक से ढकना है। ऊपर की तरफ़ कुछ मज़बूती देने वाला पदार्थ लगाना है ताकि प्लास्टिक प्रवेश द्वार से चिपके नहीं। आपको पूरी चीज़ को चिपका
روجر، بروس. عندما يتوفر لديكما بضع دقائق، هل يمكنكما إخباري ببعض ا
Ok, vorrei mostrartel
C'è una foto scattata nella parte posteriore destra della navicella, che mostra la gonna dello stadio di discesa, e mostra un notevole oscuramento del colore della superficie, con una quantità piuttosto minima di radiazioni, abrasioni o erosioni superficiali. Durante la discesa, entrambi abbiamo notato che potevamo vedere una grande quantità di particelle di polv
好的。我们仍在进行跟踪，正如您所知，在最后几个小时的进出过程中，我们会暂停水倾倒等操作，以辅助跟踪程序。目前一切运行正常。您
Rog
Roger, Watertown. Ich verstehe Sie deutlich. Bitte senden Sie mir Ihre Nachrichten blind,
एड,
乗り心地はかなりスムーズです。ほんの少しガタガタしますが、スタッフォードのH-dotほどではありません。H-dotは見た目も素晴らしいです。これ以上の乗り心地は考えられま
了解。16番も同様
مع حلول الليل، بدأت النجوم الأخرى بالظهور. أستطيع رؤيتها - أعتقد أنني أستطيع الرؤية حتى القدر الخامس تقريبًا الآن. مع ذلك، لا يزال المشهد أقل سطوعًا من ليلة صافية على ارتفاع 20 ألف قدم من قمرة قيادة طائرة. لقد خفّضت إضاءة طائرتي بشكل كبير، مما جعل المنظر أكثر روعة. في
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Просим вас использовать OMNI Ch
Un paio di cose, Jim. La prima è che è l'ora di chiudere lo sfiato per lo stivaggio dei rifiuti. Se ti riposi prima di quell'ora, per quanto c
Колумби
Roger. Mighty f
Aurora Seven. Ici Canary Cap 
了
로
حسنًا، بالطبع، الأرض ساطعة جدًا، والسماء السوداء، بدلًا من أن تكون سوداء تمامًا، تبدو وكأنها متوهجة بلون وردي. النجم، ما لم يكن ساطعًا جدًا، ربما يكون مختفيًا في مكان ما في ذلك التوهج، لكنه ببساطة غير مرئي. لقد حركت الشبكة بشكل ملحوظ 
了
Okay. For those of you that don't know, this is where we log most of our data for each of the maneuvers, and 
了解、
Denkt daran, der 
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। ऑक्सीजन 72
«Аврора Семь», это Индийская служба управления воздушным движением. Все наши времена ретросеквенции номинальные. Хотите, чтобы 
Anfangs verhinderte die Operation mit dem Treibstoffablass den geplanten sofortigen Beginn unserer Beobachtungen, da wir ein weiteres Ausweichmanöver durchführen mussten. Der Ablass des Treibstoffs verursachte eine enorme Menge an Pseudosternen in dem Gebiet, was eine optische Kalibrierung praktisch unmöglich machte. Die von uns entwickelte Methode erwies sich als wenig effektiv. Schließlich verwendete ich die Methode, in den Weltraum einzudringen, Sirius, unseren hellsten Stern, anzusteuern, die Achse und den Zapfen zu bergen und das Raumschiff dann zu Sirius zu fliegen, um diese für die optische Kalibrierung zu verwenden, was wir später auch taten. Bezüglich der Lichtstreuung scheint es, dass wir in fast jeder Lage während unserer passiven Temperaturregelung Lichtstreuung im Scannenden Teleskop messen. Sie äußert sich hauptsächlich in Form eines breiten Lichtbandes quer durch die Mitte des Teleskops, etwa 10 Grad in beide Richtungen von Null. Es ist sehr schwierig, Sterne in diesem Bereich zu sehen. Die Neuausrichtungen verliefen erfolgreich. Ich konnte den Stern im Sextanten für die Ausrichtung anvisieren, aber ich konnte den Stern, den wir beispielsweise in Fällen wie Regor oder Menkent im Sucherfernrohr verwendeten, nicht identifizieren. Die erste Sternbeobachtung der Erde zeigte einen sehr undeutlichen Horizont. Es schien jedoch eine recht scharfe Linie zwischen dem vermeintlichen Erdhorizont und der Atmosphäre zu geben. Der Landmarken-Sichtlinienfilter schien die Horizontbestimmung zu erleichtern. Der Horizont zwischen dem Weltraum und der Obergrenze der Atmosphäre ist sehr verschwommen und undeutlich, und er ist nur schwer zu nutzen. Wie bereits erwähnt, erscheint der Raum um den Mond bei naher Sonne manchmal nicht dunkel, sondern hellblau. Dasselbe gilt für die Ausrichtung mit dem Sextanten, wenn sich die Sonne in der Nähe der Optik befindet. Ich habe jedoch keine Schwierigkeiten, diese Sterne im Sextanten zu finden. Ich hatte auch keine Schwierigkeiten, die von mir verwendeten Sterne, wie Sirius, Procyon und Canopus, während unserer Sternhorizontmessu
Roger, 11. Comme vous l'avez probablement constaté, votre angle de conicité en mode a considérablement augmenté suite à l'évacuation des eaux usées, 
Roger. Ich habe das verstanden. Wir lassen diese beiden Sicherungen offen und aktivieren die Datenverbindung zur Sprachsicherung; die entsprechenden Änderungen nehmen wir auf der folgende
Roger. Amicizia Sette. Il carb
Et la combinaison de résolution et de moyenne est peut-être la meilleure combinaison de - la faible vitesse est trop faible; nous ne pou
Yes. The readability of that thing is like, you know, half a frame one way or the other; so, 28, I thi
Roger
以上です。分かりました。2つ目の追加質問はジムさんへのものです。「今回の
शुभ संध्या। मैं आप सभी से अपोलो 11 मिशन की उड़ान के कुछ प्रतीकात्मक पहलुओं पर चर्चा करना चाहता हूँ। पिछले दो-तीन दिनों में अंतरिक्ष यान में घटी घटनाओं पर चर्चा करते हुए हम इस निष्कर्ष पर पहुँचे हैं कि यह केवल तीन मनुष्यों की चंद्रमा यात्रा से कहीं अधिक था; यह किसी सरकारी और औद्योगिक टीम के प्रयासों से कहीं अधिक था; यहाँ तक कि किसी एक राष्ट्र के प्रयासों से भी कहीं अधिक था। हमारा मानना ​​है कि यह अज्ञात को जानने की मानवता की अदम्य जिज्ञासा का प्रतीक है। नील ने कुछ दिन पहले चंद्रमा की सतह पर पहला कदम रखते हुए कहा था, "यह मनुष्य के लिए एक छोटा कदम है, लेकिन मानवता के लिए एक बड़ी छलांग है," मेरा मानना ​​है कि यह इ
E quello che volevo sottolineare, non so se è evidente, ma... per mostrare il vantaggio di fare tutti gli scarichi appena prima della combustione, stiamo osservando di nuovo la stessa scena sul quad 1, verso la Luna. E ora non si vedono più tu
了
아니, 짐, 상황은 이
了解しました。AUTOモードでドッキングしたのですが、先ほど言ったように、接触の瞬間はよく分かりませんでした。ドッキングプローブのインジケーターを何度も確認しました。2本のバーバーポールが、3つのキャプチャラッチ ― キャプチャラッチではなく、3つの…ラッチが接触したことを示しています。そしてソフトドッキングしました。その時、状況は非常に安定しているように見えました。そこでFREEモードに切り替え、窓の外を見るとまだ安定しているように見えました。そこでプライマリ2のボンベを噴射しました。するとその時、2機の機体の間に回転が始まりました。原因はよく分かりません。おそらく推進力によるものか、あるいはそれ以前に蓄積されていて私が気づいていなかったのかもしれません。とにか
Роджер. Мы отслеживаем ваш прогресс. Сообщаем, что, похоже, вы заканчиваете первую звезду, и нам понадобится еще один комплект для второй звезды. А этот 7-часовой срок не такой
سنراكم على الجانب الآخر يا ه
You're in RECORD and CONTINUOUS INTERPHONE-PUSH TO TALK. I'm on 
मेरे पास
戈德斯通，休斯顿 CAP C
네, 그렇습
D'accord, Jack. Voici la configuration des propulseurs: Able 1, Charlie 1 et Able 2 sont désactivés. Charlie 2 et MAIN A sont tous activés. Baker 1 est désactivé, Dog 1 est activé, Baker 2 est désacti
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات لوصف نجاحكم. من المقرر أن يشاهد الرئيس نيكسون الليلة مباراة البيسبول في واشنطن. بعد المباراة، سيتوجه إلى منطقة عمليات الإنقاذ في المحيط الهادئ. مساء الأربعاء، سينتقل من جزيرة جونستون بطائرة هليكوبتر إلى سفينة الاتصالات البحرية أرلينغتون. ثم صباح الخميس، سيعود إلى الطائرة الهليكوبتر ويتجه إلى حاملة الطائرات هورنت في الوقت المناسب لمشاهدة هبوطكم في المحيط. سيرافق الرئيس وزير الخارجية ويليام روجرز وفرانك بورمان. سيشاهدون الهبوط من على متن سفينة الإنقاذ مع الأدميرال جون سيدني ماكين الابن، قائد قوات المحيط الهادئ. بعد إقامة الرئيس على متن هورنت، سينطلق في جولته الآسيوية وزيارته المقررة إلى رومانيا. يُعتقد أن المركبة لونا 15 قد تحطمت في بحر الأزمات أمس بعد أن دارت حول القمر 52 مرة. وذكرت وكالة الأنباء السوفيتية تاس أنه تم إجراء "أبحاث علمية" في الفضاء القريب من القمر. وقال السير برنارد لوفيل من مرصد جودريل بانك إن لونا 15 اصطدمت بسطح القمر بسرعة حوالي 300 ميل في الساعة. وقد ساد الهدوء النسبي مؤخرًا في فيتنام. وشوهد جنود أمريكيون يقومون بدوريات وهم يحملون أجهزة راديو ترانزستور مضبوطة على رحلة المركبة. وقامت شبكة الإذاعة والتلفزيون التابعة للقوات المسلحة في فيتنام بتغطية المهمة بشكل كامل. ولا تزال المناوشات مستمرة بين المصريين والإسرائيليين على طول قناة السويس. ويحاول مراقبو الأمم المتحدة هناك وقف العمليات. وفي واشنطن، صوتت لجنة الطرق والوسائل في مجلس النواب على خفض مخصصات استنزاف النفط من 27.5% إلى 20%. وقد هطلت الأمطار عدة مرات هنا في منطقة هيوستن. واليوم الجو غائم، ومن المتوقع هطول المزيد من الأمطار. على الصعيد الرياضي، وكما ذكرنا سابقًا، تُقام مباراة كل النجوم الليلة. لم تُجرَ أي مباريات أمس. وفي نيويورك الليلة الماضية، أعلنت رابطة كُتّاب البيسبول الأمريكية عن اختيار بيب روث كأعظم لاعب بيسبول على مر العصور، بينما نال جو ديماجيو لقب أعظم لاعب بيسبول على قيد الحياة. وقد أعلن فرانك بورمان عن هذه التكريمات خلال حفل عشاء أُقيم على شرف اللاعبين. أمضى جو ناماث يومًا كاملًا في معسكر تدريب فريق نيويورك جيتس. وواجه خمسة من رجال الشرطة صعوبة في السيطرة على نحو 500 طفل أرادوا لمس "برودواي جو". وقال إنه يشعر بحالة جيدة وسيشارك في مباراة كل النجوم في الأول من أغسطس، إذا سمح له المدرب ويب يوبانك بذلك. تعرض معسكر فريق أويلرز في كيرفيل للبلل أمس، لكن التدريبات استمرت. وحدثت بعض الإصابات الطفيفة، لكن لا شيء خطير. المدرب والي ليم راضٍ حتى الآن عن التدريبات. ويتوقع فريق أويلرز حضور أكثر من 30 ألف متفرج لمباراة ما قبل الموسم مع فريق بافالو. ويبدو أن إعلان دون ميريديث اعتزاله لن يُؤثر على الحماس، خاصةً هنا في هيوستن. فاز ماريو أندريتي بسباق ترينتون للسيارات لمسافة 200 ميل يوم الأحد، وهو الآن سائق السباقات المتصدر في ترتيب نقاط نادي الس
Роджер. Сообщи мне время начала «Революции 4
Ok. Sto togliendo... ho tolto
「-- DELTA-VXが
ठीक है, जिम, अब हम आपको पढ़
Scatto alcune foto a F2.8 e posa B. Le foto di adesso, qui, una del pallone. Il sole è troppo luminoso ora. Ecco da dove provengono. Sono piccoli pezzettini bianchi di brina. Da questo deduco che l'intero lato della capsula debba essere ricoperto di brina
로저, 버즈. PAD, MPL 항목입니다. 롤 05, 35부터 시작합니다. 수정: 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, + 1102, - 17203, 068, 36194 656 11894 36
«Аполлон-8», Хьюс
Roger.
यह थोड़ा नीचे है। मैं दूसरा वाला ले आता
Похоже, что температура всё ещё всего на пару градусо
Okay. I'm 
मैं तुमसे बात नहीं कर सकता। मुझे पहले इसका हल निकालना 
ゆっくりと近づいてきて
最後まで言わせてください。わかりました。そう考えていました。BAT Charlie BAT CHARGE/2、閉。BAT
حسنًا يا جاك. لدينا دورة متوسطة 5: اسم 33،؛، غير متوفر؛ HA غير متوفر؛ بالإضافة إلى 0019.8، 0007.8، وقت الاحتراق 0.15، باقي المنصة، غير متوفر. إيقاف التشغيل يدويًا عند 14 ثانية، تفريغ 
Да, я очень доволен всем. Я всё бросил, чтобы раздобыть схему для костюма, и, каж
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्
Roger. Du fängst an, etwas
Nur zu, Guaymas, Z
11번, 휴스턴. 옆 콘솔의 의료진이 보고합니다. 땃쥐는 24시간마다 자기 몸무게의 6배에 달하는 양을 먹
Okay. Okay; West German Chancellor Willy Brandt, who witnessed your launch from the Cape yesterday, and President Nixon will complete their round of talks today. Brandt reportedly came to the U.S. to seek assurance from the President to go ahead with talks with the eastern European nations, especially East Germany, Poland, and Russia. Many air traffic controllers are still out, but reports indicate that they are slowly returning to work, and you'll 
Продолжая свой рассказ о начале полета, после того как мы вошли в темноту, на высоте, которую я считаю 1200 футов, я попытался удерживать позицию относительно ракеты-носителя, но единственным критерием, по которому я мог судить в тот момент, было расстояние между мигающими огнями. Время от времени они появлялись – не время от времени, а постоянно, – я видел один огонь, потом два, потом снова один, а иногда проходило много времени, прежде чем я видел два огня, что указывало на постоянное вращение ракеты-носителя. Я действительно не имел ни малейшего представления о том, в каком направлении она движется. Судя по расстоянию между огнями, когда я мог видеть оба, я чувствовал, что нахожусь в очень хорошем положении относительно ракеты-носителя, пока мы не приблизились примерно к Карнарвону. В тот момент мне казалось, что я довольно быстро сближаюсь с ней, хотя я не мог быть в этом уверен. Все ΔV, которые я суммировал к этому моменту, были в направлении ракеты-носителя, или ретроградном движении. К сожалению, этот проклятый ускоритель занимал такое положение, что для сближения с ним мне приходилось применять позёрство, что, в свою очередь, приводило к тому, что через некоторое время я снова от него отходил. Затем, в течение 45-40 минут
Roger. D'accord. Il y a du
No matter whe
네, 1분 14초입니다. 다시 읽어주시겠어
罗杰，我们现在处于真空状态，右侧潜水服的压力保持在4
Hello 
Houston, Jack said he's already started it, and he said that in 1 more minute, he'll be 
アポロ8号、ヒ
Well, we
अब मुझे पेरिस्कोप में सूर्योदय दिखने लगा है। इस विशेष कक्षा के दौरान पेरिस्कोप में 
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티 기지에서 어젯밤 지질학 질문에 대해 몇 가지 답변을 드리겠습니다. 우리는 길쭉한 원형의 2차 분화구들이 흩어져 있는 비교적 평평한 분화구 지대에 착륙했습니다. 대부분의 분화구는 크기에 상관없이 융기된 테두리를 가지고 있습니다. 하지만 모든 분화구가 그런 것은 아닙니다. 작은 분화구 중에는 테두리가 뚜렷하게 보이지 않는 것도 몇 개 있습니다. 이 지역의 지표면은 매우 고운 모래에서 실트에 이르는 입자로 이루어져 있습니다. 지구에서 이와 가장 유사한 것을 꼽자면 분말 형태의 흑연이라고 할 수 있겠습니다. 이 지표면에는 모양, 크기, 질감이 매우 다양한 암석들이
Non sappiamo se riuscite a vederla dallo schermo televisivo, ma la luna non è altro che un bianco lattiginoso, completamente vuota. Stiamo spostando le telecamere sul
دعني أضع هذا هنا ل
네. 그리고 터미네이터의 구조상, 달 전체가 보이는 게
Roger. aurait été une meilleure pr
حسناً. لقد أخر
हवाई, ये है दोस्ती सात। क्या हमें स्कैनर की अनदेखी का सामना करना पड़ रहा है? समाप्
好的。我们需要您按回车键，输入 333，再按回车键，然后读取寄存器 1 的值。我们预期寄存器 1 的值是 10000。如果寄存器 1 的值是 10000，那么计算机将对可擦除内存进行两次转储。也就是说，要转储 10000 个数字，两次，即 10000 个数字。如果读取的值不是 10000，我们需要您按回车键，输入 333，再按回车键，输入 10000，再按回车键，使
Okay, 1
حسناً، هذا صحيح. كنت أتساءل ف
حسناً،
好的。在“初始化”下，首先
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, hier spricht Houston C
Roger, Columbia. Excusez-m
My only problem is I'm going to come over here and grab a switch and arm this hand c
नमस्कार, अपोल
Roger, könntest du vielleicht ausrichten, dass wir die Lichter von Sydney gesehen haben? Ich weiß nicht, ob sie ein
جهاز ال
ठीक है। मेरे पास आपके लिए Rev 44 मैप का अपडेट भी
もし…ジャック、月の角度の大きさがす
Ok. La durata delle accensioni sarà probabilmente inferior
ठीक है। अब जब हम चंद्रमा से वापस आ गए हैं, तो मैं आपके लिए कुछ सामान्य बातों पर प्रकाश डालना चाहूँगा - खाद्य क्षेत्र में हुए विकास। मुझे यकीन है कि आप पहले से ही पेय पदार्थ के कंटेनर के प्रकार से परिचित होंगे। थोड़ी देर बाद, माइक आपको दिखाएगा कि हाइड्रोजन को निकालने के लिए नए फिल्टर के साथ वाटर गन कैसे काम करती ह
아니요, 그런 적은 없습니다. 캔턴 이후, 아니, 캔턴 이전에 재진입 자세를 취했던 적이 한 번
No, scatto con una mano sola... Ora sono 
C'est exact, Jim. Si ni Antares ni Peacock ne fonctionnent, nous nous contenterons d'Atria et d'Altaïr. Nous souhaiterions qu'ils augmentent le nombre de sets, en proposant trois sets Atria (le numéro 34) et deux sets Alt
Okay. Jack, this is a lengthy procedure, take probably two or three pages. It assumes that 
Ho appena scattato una foto con la Hasselblad, fotogramma 54. Una foto di strisce 
Non, ce
로저. 저희는 SEP OAMS
ठीक है.
我们的停机坪如下：飞越，/G&N；63385；加 0.97，减 0.23；；加 0212.7，减 0141.7，减 0254.8；148，31
Jim, was ich dir über dein Gedächtnis gesagt habe, stimmt nicht. Wir können dein Gedächtnis in diesem Du
أبولو 8، هيوستن. ليس لدينا أي اعتراض على المضي قدمًا في عملية تصريف البول الآن. وللعلم، بالنسبة لتصريف مياه الصرف الصحي، نخطط لتأجيله حتى حوالي الساعة [أدخل الوقت]، وهذا سيرفع مستوى خزان النفايات لديكم إلى حوالي 90%. هذه النسبة أعلى قليلًا من المعتاد، لكننا أردنا تأجيلها إلى ما بعد اكتمال عملية الاحتراق. ومن بين الأمور الأخرى التي ستُجرى قريبًا، تنظيف خلية وقود الأكسجين، وقد ذكرنا سابقًا حذف مواقع رصد النجوم. خصصنا من الساعة 10 إلى
D'accord. Parfait, Frank. L'autre chose, c'est que les gars de l'arrière aimeraient bien, quand tout le monde est réveillé, que tu mettes en marche les deux ventilateurs de cabine pendant environ 5 minutes. Ils aimeraient voir la température DELTA sur la télémétrie une fois la stagnation de l'air dissipée et le flux d'air rétabli. Si tu as la possibilité de faire ça, on aimerait bien le voir en même temps que tout le mo
حسنًا، كان ذلك جيدًا... هل ننتقل إلى وضعية المناورة، أقصد وضعية النوم - هل يع
إيجل، هيوستن. عندما تكون مستعدًا للنسخ، لديّ لو
- و12.5 هي زاوية واسعة. الشيء الوحيد الذي يُحيّرني هو أنه مكتوب "للتصوير من مركبة إلى أخرى" - نريد استخدام التكبير على 12
-
Близнецы 4, Гавайи, CAP COM, у меня есть для вас обновление D-9, когда вы бу
好的，迈克，事情是这样的——你知道，你当时坐在那里监控，在步骤 7，你进入了 NOUN 01，输入了地址，然后是 INFORMATION INFORMATION；在你最后
Ну, я пытался, но у меня не получилось. Я дума
ヒューストン、イーグル。CDRでBIOMEDを拾っているか教
Bonjour PCS, PCS. I
..
13번, 휴스턴. 전
休斯
いいえ、見えませんでした。誤解されてい
Bene. Tutti e quattro i riscaldatori CRYO sono in modalità AUTO.
Хьюстон, мы давно ото
Sorvolo 
Roger. We read you. 
روجر. الأمور تتحسن كثيراً الآن. ل
Jim, plus tôt dans la soirée, Fred-o a signalé une évacuation d'air par le hublot n° 1 du module de commande. Il a également signalé la présence d'un morceau de métal argenté d'environ 10 cm de côté, qui flottait à proximité. Nous essayions de déterminer s'il s'agissait d'une nouvelle évacuation ou d'un rési
了解しました。D-9実験がど
我是卡纳文。您可以关闭二级冷却
جيميني 4، هاواي CAP COM. نود إعلامكم بأن درجة حرارة سائل التبريد لديكم آخذة في الارتفاع، و
Das ist 26, alles Nullen. Verstanden. 27, alles Nullen. Schubdüsen vo
Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Пожалуйста, подт
Okay. Wir messen 3 g, ich denke, wir können die Überprüfung der Wiedereintrittsdämpfung dieses Mal aussetzen. Jetzt messen wir 4 g. Der Wiedereintritt scheint gut zu verlaufen. Die Raten, die die Hilfsdämpfung anscheinend bewältigt, scheinen in Ordnung zu sein. Ich glaube nicht, dass ich zu stark oszilliere; ich scheine mich um das Leuchten herum zu bewegen – der Himmel dahinter. Der automatische Treibstoffverbrauch liegt weiterhin bei 14 Prozent bei 6,5 g. Die Rat
——是的，是 6 
حسنًا يا فريدو. في الصفحة ١٢، نريد التحديثات. لدينا بعض المتجهات ولوحة تحكم. وعندما تصل إلى تلك المرحلة، سنخبرك متى نريد إرسال الإشارة. حسنًا. ضمن "التفعيل والاختبار الذاتي"، نفّذ الإجراء بالكامل. في الصفحة ١٣، ضمن
ر
フレンドシップ・セブンです。ドリフトレートの検出は、なぜか非常に困難です。正確なドリフトレートを測ることができていません
«Аполл
ठीक है, फिलहाल के लिए हमारा मिशन टाइमर कंप्
C'était vraiment une drôle de façon de tirer. Je sentais ces jets de lacet à chaque fois
気球は消えてしまいました（見えなくなりました）。どうやら手動燃料が切れたようです。この回転を止めるには、フライ・バイ・ワイヤに切り替
好的。明白了，由于中途调整，无通讯垫不再
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Valerie Anders am Heiligabend, während sie und ihre Familie darauf warteten, dass Apollo 8 die Mondumlaufbahn verließ und zur Erde zurückkehrte. Frau Anders war am Dienstag um Mitternacht dort gewesen, und die Nachbarn hatten gerade alle Kinder zusammengetrommelt, damit die Familie sich ausruhen konnte, während sich das Raumschiff hinter dem Mond befand und kein Kontakt mehr bestand. Das Haus von Colonel Frank Borman war draußen mit vier großen Tannenzweigen geschmückt, mit Puderschnee bestreut und mit roten Schleifen verziert. Ein Baum im Wohnzimmer wartet auf seine sichere Rückkehr, und seine hübsche blonde Frau Sue und seine kräftigen Söhne Frederick und Edwin planen, den Start von Apollo 8 um Mitternacht zu Hause mitzuerleben. Normalerweise würden sie den Mitternachtsgottesdienst in der St. Christopher's Episcopal Church besuchen. Die Familie hatte sich für Mitternacht verabredet. Da es im Hause Borman keine kleinen Kinder gibt, wird die Bescherung einfach warten, bis Colonel Borman mit seinem fantastischen Weihnachtsgeschenk – dem Flug zum Mond und zurück – zurückkommt. Marilyn Lovells vier Kinder werden, was die Kinder betrifft, ein ganz normales Weihnachtsfest erleben, berichtete die vielbeschäftigte Ehefrau von Captain Lovell; aber an Geschenke war nicht zu denken, da zwei von ihnen direkt neben ihr saßen. „Ich hatte noch nicht einmal Zeit, mich umzuziehen“, sagte Mrs. Lovell. Geschenke unter Erwachsenen gibt es aber, und der Weihnachtsbaum wird auch noch da stehen, wenn Lovell nach Hause kommt. Hier ist noch ein interessanter Artikel in der Rubrik „Action Line“. Es gibt einen kleinen Leserbrief an die Redaktion. Da steht: „Wir wollten euch Erdenbewohnern gestern Abend einen Überraschungsbesuch mit einer fliegenden Untertasse abstatten. Wir wurden aber von den verrückten Aktionen eines dicken Mannes mit einem Schlitten und dre
Roger. At of 74 30, we'd like you to cycle the fans in all four CRYO tanks and position the heaters in all four CRY
好的。请讲，卡
Good 
हाँ। चार्ली, पिछली बार की तुलना में ट्रांजिएंट्स ज़्यादा ध्यान देने योग्य थे। मैंने इसे हल्के कमांड मॉड्यूल की वजह से नज़रअंदाज़ कर दिया था, लेकिन रोल में काफ़ी हलचल थी जो शायद पहले 20 सेकंड के बाद कम हो गई; लेकिन फिर पिच और यॉ में भी कुछ हलचल हुई। मुझे नहीं लगता कि यह असामान्य था, और सेंटर लाइन के दोनों ओर
ジョー、私たちが何点取
Ci sto arrivando adesso
케이프 캡 컴, 시그마 세
Ora vediamo, otterrò una larghezza di
Houston, Apollo 11. Abbiamo appena avuto un'ottima visuale del sito di atterraggio
Роджер, Билл. Из-за этой истории с W-матрицей мы х
Roger. Je les ai tous reçus sauf un, quantité 33-1, le DELTA V 
هناك بعض اليراعات الرائعة. يا إل
One of the hydrogen filters - the one that we've got on the hot water - seems to keep flowing when you remove one
Ricevuto. 
Хорошо, 8. Мы хотим провести небольшую тренировку на месте, чтобы убедиться, что мы сможем вовремя перезаписать 
حسناً، هناك - أعتقد أن هناك أ
こちらフレンドシップ7です。全軸で不安定な表示が出ています。計器で軌道姿勢を全て合わせてみると、本来あるべき位置から
ه
好的。等你有时间抄写一下，我有一份进场装备清单，
Es ändert sich nicht sehr schnell,
알겠습니다. 롤 198.6, 피치 
Okay, Joe. We're ready to copy a flig
ألاحظ أن الدفع الأمامي ي
Вот интересная новость, которую приятно услышать. Оказывается, в городе Анн-Арбор, штат Мичиган, появилась новая молодёжная банда. Она называется «Банда Гилнет». Члены банды бродят по улицам Анн-Арбора, действуя тайно и иногда обходя закон. Они называют себя «Партизаны добра». Среди их действий: они разрисовали мост, который был весь в нецензурных выражениях. Они сделали это за одну ночь. Заколотили досками заброшенный дом, популярный среди соседских детей, но опасный. Цветы заполнили пустые клумбы в центре города, оставшиеся без цветов из-за споров о том, кто виноват — бизнес или правительство. Подстригли живую изгородь на оживлённом перекрёстке, которая, как считалось, мешала обзору, и это разозлило владельца. Убрали мусор вдоль части реки Гурон. Члены банды — анонимные подростки, которые не стремятся к личному признанию. Их цель — сократить бюрократию, добиться результатов — хороших, по их мнению, дел. Организация имеет слабый религиозный подтекст. Это своего рода экуменическая группа, — сказал доцент Мичиганского университета, который выступает в качестве неофициального советника для идей банды. Название происходит от имени святого Петра, рыбацкой сети. И она достаточно удалена от какой-либо конкретной церкви, чтобы не ассоциироваться с ней. Через всё это проходит нить Робин Гуда, — сказал их преподаватель, который также предпочитает оставаться анонимным. Многие их действия носят внезаконный характер. Когда система заходит в тупик, они напрямую занимаются благотворительностью, минуя бюрократические каналы. Банда состоит примерно из 55 старшеклассников, юношей и девушек, и ещё 40-50 человек состояли в банде до окончания школы. Идея создания банды возникла после поездки в трущобы Детройта, где церковная группа — молодёжная группа — обратила внима
هذا صحيح. سيتم فصل قاطعي الدائرة في اللوحة 250؛ وسيتم فصل قاطعي الدائرة في اللوحة 275. حسنًا، لقد تعاملنا مع قواطع الدائرة في اللوحة 250 بالفعل. كما تعاملنا مع محول التيار المتردد 2. يجب الآن إيقاف تشغيل محول التيار المتردد 2، ناقل التيار المتردد 1. وتعاملنا أيضًا مع المفتاحين المتبقيين في اللوحة 3. ويبقى خيار "تحديد أفضل اتجاه" كما هو. حسنًا. راجع ما 
Теперь о
罗
Okay. Copy that, Fred. On the O2 flow thing, we clearly saw the DEMAND REGULATOR go to OFF and back to CABIN. thinks that it's no big thing that you've seen a little change
You say the Moon 
네, 맞습니다,
Nein, das habe ich nicht. Die Warnleuchte für eine Störung leuchtete auf, als ich die Wechselstromversorgung von IGS auf ACME
Si vous souhaitez mettre en place un système de vérification des communications ou un appel à intervalles réguliers, par exemple toutes les 30 minutes pendant les périodes de faible activité, cela n
I don't know; that could have come und
حسناً. 
フロリダ上空は雲に覆われています。東海岸付近では0.
أما الطيار الآخر الذي يجوب العالم، ماكس كونراد بطائرته الخفيفة، فقد قضى يوم عيد الميلاد في القطب الجنوبي، وتحديداً في بوينتو أرانيس ​​في تشيلي، وهو ينتظر تحسن الأحوال الجوية ليتمكن من مواصلة رحلته إلى القطب
사실, 방금 그건 정정입니다. 아직 내려오지 않았어요. 그냥 그쪽으로 가고 있는 중입니다. 제 제어 모드에 대해 간략하게 설명드리겠습니다. 자동 모드이고, 바이패스 스위치는 정상이며, 기동은 꺼져 있습니다. 연료는 녹색 범위 안에 있고, 산소도 녹색 범위
Ich weiß nicht, warum ich meinen - ich bin bei - oh, hast
Oka
Roger. Sag Jim bitte, dass er bei den folgenden Markierungen unbedingt
ठीक है। क
जब आपका विमान 90 डिग्री के कोण पर घूमता है, तो यह बिल्कुल ट्रेन की खिड़की से देखने जैसा होता है - बस इतना ही। अभी मैं लगभग इसी स्थिति से ग
Роджер, Базз. К-фактор приближается: 90 0
ठीक है। 1 बजे, हमें फोटो टारगेट 90 और टर्मिनेटर फोटोग्राफी साउथ के नज़दीकी हिस्से के लिए मिली। 2 बजे से शुरू करते हुए, हमारे पास टारगेट 12 और टारगेट 10, 14, 16, 19, 20
रॉजर, बज़। समझ गया कि खिड़कियों से बाहर देखने प
यह यूएचएफ लो पर फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। आप मुझे कैसे सुन प
रॉजर डॉजर। ईगल की हालत ठीक है। केबिन का
ठीक है, 8. हमें
Ah
罗杰。好的，那我继续这个机动，滚转角82度，俯仰角218度，偏航角0度，如果你不介意的话，然后以这个姿态做一个P52机动。那将会是一个
Roger, Frank. Die Geschwindigkeit im Mittelkurs 3 liegt bei etwas über 30 cm pro Sekunde, daher raten 
分かりました、ジム。了解しました。まず、次回の噴射に向けて、回路ブレーカーごとに慎重に電源投入手順を確認したいとのことですが、現在作業中です。次に、コマンドモジュールに再突入して電源を入れなければならない場合の手順についても検討中です。これについては現在検討中で、作成中です。どちらも
これを読み上げます
Roger. Copy. 2
所有加热器设置为自动模式；风扇以74度30转/分钟的频率循环运转，大约25分钟后
تما
Apollo 8, this is Houston reading you fairly weak. I'll repeat the state vector information. Your state vector is now based on 5 hours, more than 5 hours of tracking. We show you on a pericynthian of 69.7 miles with a free return with entry path flight 
Columbia,
무슨 
حسنًا. يمكنك الحصول على هذه الإعدادات عندما يتوفر لديك الوقت. والخطوة التالية التي سأقدمها لك هي إجراء للتحقق من سلامة ناقل البيانات الرئيسي B. وبعد ذلك بقليل، سنقدم لك، لمعلوماتك المستقبلية، إجراءً لنقل الطاقة إلى وحدة التحكم.
Уолли, ты хочешь, чтобы я остался непод
Okay, gut gelesen, Fred-o. Bei +15 Sekunden streichen wir „MASTER ARM - OFF;“ und weiter bis „At Engine Cut
よし。4回目の更新は / 45695、マ
네, 감사합니다. 계속 읽고 계셨나요? 저희
روجر. 
«Аполлон-8», эт
Oui. Ro
Vous pensez que c'est le changement de vitesse du gr
我没得到纬
Okay, I di
La vecchia stella numero 30 sembra trovarsi pro
Roger. 28570 250 28401 42 0641 296, not ap
11. Nous convenons que le fait d'avoir activé le CDU a probablement eu un impact sur votre démarrage. Il semb
बज़, ये ह्यूस्टन है। अगर आप अभी भी आसपास हैं, तो क्या आप गेंद की एक तस्वीर ले सकते हैं? 
GMT를 기준으로 2시 1분 15분 55초 47을 읽고 있습니다. GMTRB는
了解です。アポロ・ランドマーク・ラン2と3を削除してください。
네, 문제가 발생했을 때 제대로 감지되지 않으면, 다시 시도해보고 그래도 안 되면 OMNI로 연락드리거나 저희가 직접 위치를 확인해서 다시 한번 이야기해 보고 2회 
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Ti abbiamo perso nel rumore del collegamento COMM qui, più o meno quando d
分かりました。これがBAT Bakerの充電手順です。パネル3：BAT充電、オフ。パネル5：メインバス接続、BAT A/CからA/Cへ。CB BATチャージャー、BAT A充電、開。CB BATチャージャー、BAT B充電、閉。
Ро
روج
了解です。ジャイロはノーマル、オート、ジャイロケージに設定しています。電源を入れて、それから（訂正）フライ・バイ・ワイヤで起
ह्यूस्टन, मैंने आपकी बात साफ-साफ 
Это «Дружба Семь». Я выключил автоматическое управление по рысканию, чтобы повернуть влево и полюбоваться закатом. Сейчас управление снова автоматическое п
Gemini VIII，RKV CAP 
— — У нас там наве
いいえ。そうではありません。カントンの後（訂正します、その前ですが）再突入姿勢に入ったことが一度ありましたが、これはウーメラの後、夜に星を確認するためでした。その時
ロジャー、Rev 12 RKVでPLAとCLAの時刻を更新します。Rev 13ではカナリア諸島にCバンドの航跡が残ります。また、軌道航法チェックランも行います。姿勢制御には燃料は使用しません。これはG.E.T、つまりG.M.T.の時刻で、12時間16分00秒です。Rev 13のテープダンプはカーナボン上空で行います。カーナボン通過後は、変更が必要な場合を除き、通常のフライトプランに従っ
호주, 저희는 모든 준비를
Хьюстон, «Аполлон-11» находится в паре минут от этого поворота вправо на 40 градусов: крен 122, тангаж 229, рыскание 0. Конец 
워터타운 캡콤, 여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. UHF, 잘 들립니다. 이상
Columbia, ici Houston. Copiez la différence 
分かりました。R1プラス0.
Ho la Luna in vista. C'è Venere. La Luna sta tracciando magnificamente. Pr
スーツの設定を8にしました
Oui, 
روجر. كلامك واضح تماماً
わかりました。しばらくバッテリーの充電を中止し、CM TM を始動させ
Wir benötigen für jede Bitte ein „GO“; andernfalls w
收到。关于“月球15号”的最新消息——塔斯社今早报道，该探测器已进入
Ricevuto. È l'interruttore del ri
Nous avons l'étoile 01 qui arrive, c'est peut-être la raiso
好的。我现在要来这里查看一下
フランクさん、このテープレコーダーは現在停止しています。もし録音をご希
Roger. Tra poco potresti vedere delle luci laggiù. Vuoi dare un'occhiata
Hier spricht Gemini 4, Canary. Nu
Apollo 8, Houston. Bien reçu. Nous
我可以告诉你们，我们现在看到的，弗雷德身后的那个圆形袋子里装着我们的真空软管；当我们回到舱内时，我们会把真空软管从宇航服上取下来，它就连接在舱门上，我们会打开这个舱门前往月球表面，
حول - على الجانب الأيسر تقريبًا في منتصف الطريق أسفل "، مناورة إلى الهدف TOPO 54A
रॉजर। हमारे पास दो गियर हैं जो हैंडल को आगे-पीछे खींचने पर घूमते हैं। उनमें से एक गियर रैचेट की तरह काम करता है, ए
Понял. Мы находимся в режиме 7–10, а тестовый режим связи находится на странице 223. Конец с
As a matter of interest, I appear to be drifting in my roll;
कॉपी
I don't think that was the intent, Bill.
알겠습니다. 33-1 탑재량 정보 확인했습니다. 수신 준비되시면 33-1 백업 유도량 정보도 준비해 두겠습니다. 지난번 비행 때 작은 문제가 있었습니다. 비행
خبر محلي آخر: احترق مبنى محكمة مقاطعة هانتسفيل قبل فجر أمس، ما يشير إلى عودة أعمال البناء هناك. ثم ننتقل إلى خبر آخر عن العائلات المنتظرة. هذا التقرير بقلم آن جيمس، مراسلة صحيفة "بوست". قالت فاليري أندرس عشية عيد الميلاد، بينما كانت هي وعائلتها ينتظرون خروج أبولو 8 من مدار القمر وعودتها إلى المنزل: "نرتاح على الجانب الخلفي من القمر". كانت السيدة أندرس قد غادرت المنزل في تمام الساعة 12:00 صباحًا من يوم الثلاثاء، وقد جمع الجيران جميع الأطفال الصغار حتى تتمكن العائلة من الحصول على قسط من الراحة بينما كانت المركبة الفضائية خلف القمر ومنقطعة عن الاتصالات. زُيّن منزل العقيد فرانك بورمان بأربعة أكاليل كبيرة من أغصان دائمة الخضرة في الخارج، ورُشّ بالثلج الناعم، وزُيّن بشرائط حمراء. تنتظر شجرة في غرفة المعيشة عودته سالمًا، وتخطط زوجته الشقراء الجميلة سو وابناه فريدريك وإدوين للبقاء في المنزل لمشاهدة لحظة خروج المركبة من مدار القمر عند منتصف الليل. في العادة، يحضرون قداس منتصف الليل في كنيسة القديس كريستوفر الأسقفية. كانت الخطة للعائلة أن تبدأ في تمام الساعة 12:00 صباحًا. وبما أنه لا يوجد أطفال صغار في منزل بورمان، فإن تبادل هدايا عيد الميلاد سيؤجل ببساطة حتى عودة الكولونيل بورمان بهديته الرائعة للعطلة، وهي رحلة إلى القمر والعودة. أفادت مارلين لوفيل، الزوجة المشغولة للكابتن لوفيل، أن أطفالها الأربعة سيقضون عيد ميلاد طبيعيًا تمامًا من وجهة نظر الأطفال؛ لكن الحديث عن الهدايا كان مستحيلاً لأن اثنين منهم كانا يجلسان بجانبها. قالت السيدة لوفيل: "لم أجد حتى وقتًا لتغيير ملابسي التي ارتديتها الليلة الماضية". ومع ذلك، ستظل الهدايا بين البالغين وشجرة عيد الميلاد موجودة ع
Ok, Acquario. L'ultimo blocco che ho per te in questo momento è il 
Nun, wenn es kocht, werden wir es v
Va bene
В общем, 25 —
روجر، سبعة. أواجه بعض الصعوبة. ابدأ بتقر
そうだ、彼女はまだその
Okay. Ho letto 
本期杂志编号为
オレン
D'accord, Jim. Je crois que je com
Frank, tutto indica che non ci sono assolutamente proble
حسنًا. أردتُ فقط إطلاعكم على هذا الأمر والتفكير فيه وفي تداعياته المحتملة على خطة الطيران، وسأعيد عر
푸른 띠에 대해 설명드리겠습니다. 지표면 바로 위에는 비교적 짙은 파란색 띠가 있고, 그 아래에는 밝은 파란색 띠, 또 다른 짙은 파란색 띠, 그리고 대기광으로 인한 커다란 흰색 띠가 있습니다. 그 다음에는 짙은 검은색 띠가 있는데, 회색빛이 도는 파란
V
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Конец свя
D'accord, ça marche. Parce que je ne sais pas où je vous ai perdu. Bon, panneau 4; TELCOMM, GROUPE 1, vers AC1. Sur le panneau 5, fermez les éléments suivants: GROUPE DE PRESSION 1, PRINCIPAL B; GROUPE DE PRESSION 2, PRINCIPAL B; TEMP, PRINCIPAL B; TRANSDUCTEUR DE BOUCLE SECONDAIRE, PRINCIPAL B; RAD, CONTRÔLE/RÉCHAUFFAGES, PRINCIPAL B; BUS
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। क्या आप ऑटो 
Да, шариковая ручка. Вот она. Точнее, фло
ジム、夕方、フレッド・オが司令船の窓1番から何かが噴出していると報告しました。また、約4インチ四方の銀色の金属片が漂っているのも報告しました。私たちが確認しようとしていたことの一つは、これが新たな噴出なのか、それとも当初の問題で発生した噴出の一部なのかということです。他に何かコメントはありますか？彼がやっていたことの一つは、写真撮影でした。私たちは月面カメラ1番を使って、機会目標として1/250秒の設定で写真を撮ることを許可し
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Ich hat
Давай, Дж
这里是双子星6号，即将进行第一次高度调整点火，正在记录。完毕。点火将在1小时34分2秒进行。尾部速度为每
Cant
Хорошо. Мы по-прежнему движемся к центральной части Тихого океана, 357 152 359 267, плюс 08:13, минус 16503 066 36221 647 12166 36301 00:28, следующий блок — Ноябрь Альфа, V0 400 02:10 00:25 03:35 08:16 160590 312; Зета Персей, вверх 165, вправо 34, вверх по схеме без выхода; Сириус и Ригель, крен 308, тангаж 209, рыскание 357, никто не участ
ح
休息了大约
Negativ, aber sehr knapp. Ich habe es zurückgesetzt und parallel 
कैमरा पैक कर दिया गया है। फोटोमीटर इतना हल्का है कि इसे निकाला जा सकता है और छोड़ा जा सकता है। काम खत्म करने से पहले मैं यहाँ एक छोटे से उपकरण की जाँच कर लूँगा। और यह एक लाइन की मोटाई जितना ऊपर चला गया है। अब रीडिंग 0.06 है जो 0.1 से कम है। ये सभी अब ग्लव बॉक्स में रखे जाएँगे; ये हैच पर, इमरजेंसी रेट हैंडल के सबसे पास वाले हैच डिटेंशन स्प्रिंग के बगल 
좋아
はい、もしご希望であれば、実際のところ、タイプ 2 の医療パスをすべてタイプ 1 に更新していただければと思います。そうすれば、少
11, Houston. Present forecast shows acceptable conditions in your recovery area: 2000 foot scattered, high scattered, wind from 070 degrees, 13 knots, visibility 10 miles, and sea state about 4 feet. The forecast yesterday showed a tropical storm, Claudia, some 500 to 1000 miles east of Hawaii. The - the pictures from Earth satellites taken yesterday afternoon - afternoon showed Claudia dissipating, so this appears to be even less a factor than it was before. Your recovery area is now believed to be just a little ways north of the i
Roger. You got all of that. Now this zer
Bene. Qui sei in fase 
Comprenez que vous êtes prêt
알겠습니다. 저희는 기체를 아래로 향하게 하여 부스터를 추적하고 있었는데, 안타깝게도 
يا إلهي! هل تصدق أ
Hai aperto il tuo - solo per curiosità - Hai aperto il tuo armadietto del cibo subito dietro il f
Roger. Thank you much.
Das ist bestätigt. Wir denken, dass Ihnen das ge
किसी कैमरामैन के ल
好的
설마 이 나침반이 작동하고 있다는 건 아니겠죠? 좀 더 설명해야겠네요. 제가 지금까지 해왔던 건 표준 광원을 꺼내는 거였어요. 지금 캡슐 안에서, 그리고 제가 똑바로 위를 보고 있는 제 얼굴 쪽에서는 나침반이 롤 축 평면에서 실제로 회전하고 있는 것처럼 보입니다. 북쪽이 제 오른쪽 팔꿈치를 가리키고 있어요. 제가 움직일 때 나침반이 확실히 흔들리
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Readback corretto. Per vostra informazione, Goldstone segnala di aver ricevuto circa 1 minuto di portante FM in downlink. Ci stavamo preparando a chiede
Хорошо. Отлично. Вы
Okay, Vance. Stai dicendo che dovremmo iniziare con la PREP nel manuale di emergenza a circa, e ne p
О, громко и 
نعلم أن هناك العديد من العلماء من مختلف الدول ينتظرون بفارغ الصبر رؤية عينات القمر، ورأينا أنكم سترغبون برؤيتها على حقيقتها. هذان الصندوقان هما حاويات إعادة العينات. إنهما حاويات مُعبأة بتفريغ الهواء، أُغلقت في بيئة مفرغة من الهواء على سطح القمر، ثم نُقلت إلى داخل المركبة ووُضعت داخل أكياس من الألياف الزجاجية، وأُغلقت بسحّاب، وأُعيد إغلاقها من الخارج، ووُضعت في هذه الحاويات على جانب وحدة القيادة. هذان هما الصندوقان. وبمجرد صعودنا إلى المركبة، أنا متأكد من أنه سيتم نقل هذين الصندوقين فورًا وبدء عملية التسليم إلى مختبر استقبال العينات القمرية. يحتوي هذان الصندوقان 
不，我认为覆盖在上面的这种粘稠物的渐变，不管它是什
Okay. Die Vorgehensweise ist: ENTER, 333, ENTER, Register 1 auslesen. Dann 10000 – der Speicherwert. Der Computer liest den Speicher dann zweimal aus, sofern er korrekt konfiguriert ist.
Der Computer gehört dir, 
Roger, Fred. Good readback. Starting with panel 16. Under FLIGHT DISPLAYS, row 1: SE CROSS-POINTERS, OPEN; SYSTEM Bravo - QUAD 1 TCA'
Oh, the Greens are in good shape. The 
Roger. Wir haben immer n
Ici Sigma Seven, enregistrement VOX uniquement. J'ai réactivé le mode automatique en mode normal, sans action sur les propulseurs. Actuellement, le mode automatique est à 85 %, le mode manuel à 90 %. Maintenant que je suis en vol, je peux enfin faire des expériences que je ne pouvais pas faire auparavant. Je vais maintenant piquer du nez avec les commandes de vol électriques au minimum. Je vais d'abord vérifier que si j'active mes balises, personne ici ne pourra me contacter. Si quelqu'un en Amérique du Sud a émis une balise, il mérite de l'entendre. Les balises son
كيف أتجاوز هذه 
よし、アポロ8号だ。次回もう一度試してみよう。走査望遠鏡による星の視程は飛行計画では3
ATT IND - 拥有外国
आगे हम यह स्पष्ट करना चाहेंगे कि क्या आप केवल नियंत्रण बिंदु 1, 2 और 3 को मिटाकर छद्म लैंडिंग साइट बनाना चाहते हैं; या क्या आप छद्म लैंडिंग साइट के चिह्नों को भी
좋
Роджер, Эл. Я в автоматическом режиме; ретроград; пере
अटलांटिक शिप, यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। आशा है आप केप की ओर बढ़ेंगे। मैंने कैप्सूल को 180° की स्थिति में घूमने दिया है और इस समय मुझे पुनः दिशा निर्धारित करनी पड़ रही है। जब इयान क्षितिज और पेरिस्कोप के साथ पूरी तरह से संरेखित हो जाता है, तो मेरे अभिविन्यास संकेत अब बहुत गलत हैं। मेरा रोल 30° द
13, al momento non ci occuperemo di un'ustione. Ci vorrà del tempo prima di riuscirci; ma stiamo lavorando ad altre procedure da fornirvi, che ci consentiranno d
Привет, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон 
最后，我们想了解您的进港舱位存放配置是否符合标准。我们这边的后勤人员急于为您计算出一个
أرى بوضوح ميلانًا لليمين بزاوية 5 درجات تقريبًا، ولاحظتُ أن المنظار مُظلم، مما يعني أننا ندخل الجانب المظلم. سأحاول رصد أي تغييرات من خلال المنظار. حاليًا، لا أرى شيئًا من خلال المنظار للمراقبة الليلية، على الأقل في هذا الوضع. لستُ متأكدًا حتى من وقت انخفاض التكبير، باستثناء موضع الرافعة. النافذة مُغطاة بالغيوم. أتعرض لضو
Okay, Jim. Wir planen, dies in der SEP-Lage des Servicemoduls durchzuführen, wobei die Optik von der Sonne weggerichtet ist. Das sollte also e
了解。それで、送信してください。ちなみに、今は月が見えていないので、ちょっと興味があるかもしれません。現在位置から地平線がはっきり見えます。経過時間00:54:44です。月が見えていない
Roger. Minus MA procedure okay for abort whe
友谊七号，这里是科德角通信技术学院，科德角通信技术
了解。斜距離268海里です
Oui, mon pote. Beau spe
Спокойствие, Хьюстон. Если вы этого еще н
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आप लोग चाहें तो हमारे पास कुछ खबरें हैं, जिन्हें आप प
Okay. Der westdeutsche Bundeskanzler Willy Brandt, der gestern Ihren Start vom Cape aus verfol
Roger, j'ai eu un petit moment de flottement en repassant au réglage 3, mais je n'y suis pas resté longtemps. Il devrait être entre 7,5 et 8. Actuellement, je suis en rétroassistation automatique. Je vais bie
阿波罗8
好了，杰克。最后一步，关闭5号和6号电池。完
Роджер. Хорошо, Джим, мы решили, что у тебя осталось немног
هذا صحيح. لقد أبقيته مفتوحًا لفترة وجيزة، وهو مغلق الآن. ضغط المقصورة ج
짐이 방금 또 다른 인공위성을 봤어요. 전에 봤던 것처럼 아직 자세히 
Allez-y Houst
Hai riposato di più nell'ultimo passaggio o giù di 
312, ge
제리, 짐
우리가 졌어 - 일찍 끝내는 유일한
J'ai poussé vers le propulseur à environ 1,5 m/s. La ma
Affir
शुरुआत में, एक और बचाव पैंतरे
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन से। जब आपके पास थोड़ा समय हो, तो क्या आप हमें अपने एन2 टैंक ब्रावो का ऑनबोर्ड रीडआउट दे सकते हैं? कृपया। और हम यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि आप समझें कि जब 
ठीक है। हम आपको यहाँ ज़मीन पर अच्छे से दिखा रहे हैं। हम आपके रेडिएटर को चालू करने की अनुमति दे रहे हैं। अपने इवेपोरेटर क
आगे 
ر
Roger. Wir wären an einer Schätzung interessiert, wie
Кроме того, Хьюстон хотел бы узнать — завершили 
Vas-y, Carnarvon. Gém
Houston, Colombie. Je le répète: je ne les ai pas vus. L’optique automatique pointait vers un endroit très proche des coordonnées que vous m’avez 
الجوزاء 4، هاواي، كابي كوم
そうですね、彼らが写真を入手したときに、私たちが接触したときに何があったのかを示す
了解、CSQ。こちらはジェミニ4です。また最新情報をお願いします。コンピューターが完全に起動して
روجر، استخدمنا نظام التحكم النبضي بأقل قدر ممكن؛ كان الهدف رقم ١٢ محجوبًا بالغيوم؛ كنتُ قد حددتُ الوقت والموقع بدقة. أعتقد أنني كنتُ سأتمكن من تتبعه لو رأيته. أما الهدف رقم ١٣، فكان واضحًا، وتمكنتُ من تحديد مدينة الإسكندرية. أعتقد أنني... لكنني لم أتمكن من التركيز على الب
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. До прямой видим
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉ
Roger. Noch ein Punkt: Die von Ihnen angegebenen Kontrollpunktzeiten weichen etwas ab, und beim Verg
Okay, on page 17. Do the load at minus 4 minutes; it's CB(11), INVERTER 2, CLOSE, and scratch "Select INVERTER 1." RATE SCALE changed to "25 degrees a second." "BALANCE COUPLE," we'll turn "OFF;" and, incidentally, on the dampen rates point, it 
Negativ. Wir glauben nicht, Apollo 11. Wir gehen
हाँ, हमने किया, ज
瞧那影子，真漂亮！上升速度每秒 26 
아니, 제가 제대로 이해했는지 확인해 볼게요. 275번 패널로 가서 CB MAIN A, BAT BUS A, 그리고 CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B를 엽니다. 그런 다음 250번 패널로 가서 CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING과 BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING을 뽑고, 5번 패널로 가서 SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN A, SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN B, BATTERY CHAR
हाँ, अब इनकी संख्या घटकर 5 रह गई है... हम काफी समय से एक ही पंखे पर काम चला रहे हैं। दूसरा दिन... हम खाने-पीने में पीछे चल रह
روجر، هل أنت مستعد لت
刚刚拍到了一些雷暴雨积
正解です。次に、パネル250の回路ブレーカーBAT B POWER
هيوس
好的，很好。我接下来要讲的所有步骤都是为了调整镜头，以便你能透
ヒューストンさん、水瓶座をどう読みますか
Хорошо. И позвольте мне рассказать, что мы собираемся сделать, поскольку сегодня днем ​​мы рассказали вам другую историю об этом туннеле. Мы фактически собираемся 
로
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, this 
Lo so, lo so: 295. Temperatura A: 87. Pressione A: 3000. Temperatura B: 82. Pressione B: 2650. Amperometro principale: 19. N. 2: 19,5. 1A: 4,5. 1B: 4,5. 1C: 4,2A: 5,2B: 4 3/4. 2C: 4 3/4. Volt CC
रोग, एस-5 और एस-6 के 
Roger. Zone 55-DELTA 82. 04 34 10. 9+57. Zone 55-3, combustion divisée, 55 arrière, 109 avant. 1+31. 2+17. 05 15 40. 02+33. 08+
アポロ8号、ヒ
알겠습니다. 지난번에 굴리셨
Ri
予想通り、移動に支障はないようです。地上での様々なシミュレーションで行った6分の1Gのシミュレーションよりも、もしかしたら楽か
Это приемлемо, Фред, а пока, когда вы будете готовы к копированию, у нас есть для вас планшет с показателе
روجر. إليك تقرير حالة الاحتراق. دلتا-تيج صفر، زمن الاحتراق 5
わかりました、ジョー。そ
Tanto vale... l
ロールをオフにしま
Do you have some updates for us
روجر، أسمعك. أنا على 
Роджер. Подтверждаю. И нет никакой возможности проверить, совпадает ли это. Я мешаю;
एड ने सामान खोलना शुरू किया और जैसे ही हम उस स्थिति में पहुँचे जहाँ बूस्टर के साथ छेड़छाड़ करना संभव नहीं था, मैंने पूरी तरह से उसकी मदद करना शुरू कर दिया - कम से कम सामान पकड़कर उसे सही जगह पर रखना और उसे गायब होने से बचाना। जितनी तेज़ी से हम काम करते, उतना ही हम पीछे होते चले जाते। ऐसा इसलिए नहीं था कि हम चीज़ों को सही जगह पर नहीं रख रहे थे, बल्कि इसमें हमारी उम्मीद से कहीं ज़्यादा समय लग रहा था। जीरो ग्रेविटी में यह सिम्युलेटर की तुलना में ज़्यादा आसान नहीं था, हालाँकि उतना ही आसान था। इसलिए हमने पूरा चक्कर लगाया। जब तक हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे, मैंने मन बना लिया था कि हम वहाँ नहीं पहुँच पाएँगे, लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि थोड़ी देर और कोशिश करते हैं। जब हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे - या वहाँ से निकलने से ठीक पहले - मुझे स्पष्ट हो गया था कि हम दबाव कम करने की प्रक्रिया पूरी नहीं कर पाएँगे। मैंने अगली कक्षा में जाने के लिए स्लिप का अनुरोध किया। फिर... हमने लगभग 20 मिनट तक आराम किया और कॉकपिट में पड़े फालतू सामान को व्यवस्थित करने की कोशिश की। फिर मैंने चेकलिस्ट निकाली और हमने दोबारा विस्तार से चेकलिस्ट देखी ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि जल्दबाजी में हमसे कुछ छूट तो नहीं गया। एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट शुरू किया - कार्नार्वोन के ऊपर हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। हम सब तैयार थे और दबाव कम करने की हरी झंडी का इंतजार कर रहे थे। हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। दबाव कम करने का चक्र पूरा हुआ। कार्नार्वोन से निकलते ही हमें पूर्ण एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट (EVA) के लिए मंजूरी मिल गई। हम कैंटन या हवाई पहुंचे, और उस समय हमें - मुझे लगता है कि कैंटन या हवाई से ही हमें अंतरिक्ष यान से बाहर निकलने और एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट शुरू करने की हरी झंडी मिली थी। हमने इसे अपने टेप रिकॉर्डर और VOX पोजीशन के अनुसार पूरा किया। हम आगे बढ़े और एड बाहर निकल गए और हमने तस्वीरें लेना शुरू कर दिया - जैसे हम लेते हैं... मैंने शुरू में उनके लिए अंतरिक्ष यान को स्थिर रखा। फिर जैसे ही वह बाहर निकले और ऐसा लग रहा था कि व
Это Тананарив на КВ
Хорошо, ладно. Следующий шаг — закрепить ленту. Для этого отрежьте от рулона примерно 60 см (2 фута) и разорвите его вдоль, чтобы у вас получилось две полоски длиной около 60 см (2 фута) и шириной примерно 1,2 см (полдюйма). Оберните их вокруг контейнера под прямым углом к ​​основной ленте так, чтобы она проходила сверху и снизу; расположите её так, чтобы она выступала за центральное отверстие и постаралась перекинуть её через один из выступов между сетками, чтобы она не блокировала поток. Понят
जेमिनी VI,
Not any large ones. There 
11, Houston. Abbiamo un PAD preliminare da 30, 
No. Sento che sta rot
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。没错。我们获得了相当不错的高比特率，只
Что написано на этом план
네. 영국 조드렐 뱅크에서 AP 통신이 전한 소식입니다. 영국의 대형 조드렐 뱅크 전파 망원경이 오늘 오전 5시 49분(미국 동부시간)에 소련의 무인 달 탐사선 루나 15호의 신호 수신을 중단했습니다. 대변인은 루나 15호가 "달 표면을 넘어간 것으로 보인다"고 밝혔습니다. 또 다른 소식으로는, 버나드 러벨 천문대 소장의 대변인이 "착륙했다고 생각하지 않는다"고 말했다는 것입니다. 워싱턴 UPI 통신에 따르면, 스피로 T. 애그뉴 부통령은 2000년까지 화성에 사람을 보내야 한다고 주장했지만, 민주당 지도부는 지구의 필요에 우선순위를 두어야 한다고 반박했습니다. 
È bello sedersi qui e guardare
कल बीच रास्ते में मुफ
Роджер, запис
*
Oui, il faut continuer.
Nous travers
Schauen wir uns die Sportwelt an. Während Sie neulich beschäftigt waren, gaben Joe Namath und Football-Commissioner Pete Rozelle bekannt, dass „Broadway Joe“ zugestimmt hat, seine Anteile am Restaurant Bachelors III zu verkaufen und zu den New York Jets zu wechseln. Joe traf heute im Trainingslager der Jets ein und absolvierte sein erstes Training. Auch einige and
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11.
حسنًا، لا بأس. لديّ تحديثان لك يا جيم. الأول يتعلق بإجراءات البحث عن المذنب بينيت في حوالي الساعة 10:00 صباحًا، وسأنتظر حتى يستيقظ جاك قبل أن أُطلعك على التفاصيل. أما التحديث الثاني فيتعلق بالدخول قبل ثلاث ساعات من الموعد المحدد، وأعتقد أن فانس ذكر لك الليلة الماضية أن هذا احتمال وارد، وأننا نرغب في فحص ضغط خزان الوقود مبكرًا. وبما أننا لن
And they also report you appear to have panned the camera over to another lo
もう一度言います
Okay. Ogni volta che trasmetti, Jack, l'AGC inizia 
ठीक है, आप उन्हें बता सकते हैं कि, अगर उन्होंने इसके बारे में नहीं सोचा था, तो हमारे पास एक चंद्र-सतह अनुक्रम कैमरा है जिसम
मुझे 
Gemini 4, CSQ. Не могли бы вы проверить свои основные батареи и сообщить
你好
अच्छा, क्या आप कुछ चीजों म
كانت
收到。电脑开关关掉。交流电源开关拨到IGS位置。然后电脑开
D'accord. Puissance 6. D'accord. Puissance 6 correspond au panneau 11. Suivez le schéma, à l'exception des disjoncteurs que j'ai indiqués. La première ligne est correcte. Ou plutôt, la première rangée. Deuxième rangée: QUAD 4, TCA, fermé; QUAD 3, TCA, fermé; QUAD 2, TCA, fermé; et QUAD 1, TCA, fermé. Le reste de cette rangée est correct. Troisième rangée, à peu près au milieu: ATCA (PGNS), fermé. D'accord. Le reste de cette ligne est correct. Quatrième 
D'accord, Jim. Nous avons évoqué la possibilité d'adopter une attitude différen
Très bien. 
Bene. Meno di 4 minuti, meno 4 minuti, aggiungi di nuovo MODE CO
어제 정말 즐거운 시간을 보내신 것 같
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे ऑप्टिक्स ट्रैकिंग सिस्टम के बारे में कुछ शब्द। मैंने पीछे की तरफ नियंत्रण बिंदु 1 और 2 के लिए ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग किया, और इसने बहुत अच्छा काम किया, मेरे लिए दोनों लक्ष्यों को ट्रैक किया। फिर मैं हमारे कक्षीय नियंत्रण पुस्तिका में निर्दिष्ट नियंत्रण बिंदु 3 पर गया, जहाँ मुझे अक्षांश और देशांतर दिए गए थे, और मैंने उस विशेष निर्देशांक प्रणाली को ट्रैक करने के लिए ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग किया, और यह वास्तविक ट्रैकिंग प्लॉट के बहुत करीब था। मैंने वहाँ एक निशान चुना जहाँ मैंने अंतिम मार्किंग की और अक्षांश और देशांतर रिकॉर्ड किए। अब मैं लैंडिंग साइट के पास पहुँचने वाला हूँ और यह देखने के लिए कोडेड इनपुट मे
Neil, schau dir die negative Y-Strebe an, di
アポロ8号、ヒ
알겠습니다. 그렇게 할게요. 나머지 리딩
Ja. Ja, und während die Sterne hindurchfallen, werden sie kurzz
Tu n'y arrives pas? Tu n'arrives pas à l'enle
Wir können warten
Ну, на этом пока всё, Фрэнк. Мы получили ещё кое-какие новости, которые обещали прислать, как только они поступят из информационных каналов. Единственное, что
Роджеру 11. И у нас осталось около 14 минут. 86:30, час езды. Мы хотели бы узнать, планируете ли вы, чтобы к этому времени бодрствовал только один человек, или вы все хотели бы поспать в течение следующего часа? Кон
Bie
알겠습니다. 그 이야기를 끝내기 전에, 당신이 그 절차를 따라 이동했
そして、すべての見かけの動きが止まり、おそらく接近し始めたように見えました。そこで宇宙船を旋回させ、プラットフォームを一直線に並べようと試みました。その間に、ブースターはかなりの速度で私たちの真下に降下し始めました。そこで、プラットフォームを一直線
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴
Ok. Ho disattivato POWER AM
قل يا فريد، في وقت ما عندما لا تكون مشغولاً جداً بمضغ ذلك اللحم البقري، ما
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. هل يمكنك أن تُري الناس شعارك على شارة دورة أل
好了，查理，我现在能清楚地看到这颗星了，所以我最好在这颗星上多做几个标记，以便准确地计数地平线上的星星
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。你们怎么阅
下面的情况
极光七号，
음, 2분 22초가 지났네요. 카나본
Okay. My only concern about leaving the and/or th
Roger. La valeur moyenne de V 400K pour la carte de contrôle du coulo
Eh bien, ce câble de sécurité – qui épouse la forme du vaisseau spatial – me maintenait en l'air en permanence. Je sortais et la dynamique du câble me ramenait à la surface. Ensuite, je reprenais mes opérations ici. On n'y avait pas
Roger. Your attitude will be roll 12 deg
了解。こちらフレンドシップセブンです。窓、姿勢指示器、潜望鏡はすべて正常に作動しています。現在、後方の潜望鏡からダークサイドが上昇しているのが見えます。客室気圧は5.5で安定しています。客室温度は95度（華氏）、相対湿度は28パーセント（パーセント）。冷却効果を高めるため、客室（スーツの温度）を加水位置に設定しました。蒸気温度は現在61度（華氏）を示しています。酸素濃度は75～100パーセント（パーセント）
Columbia, Houston. Our COMM problem was traced to a grou
ह्यूस्टन, कमांडर-इन-वन तैयार हैं और कमान संभाले हुए हैं। हम संचार वाहक पोत बदलने जा रहे हैं। हम थोड़ी देर के ल
Bon, d'accord, laissons-le allumé et voyons ce que ça donne. S'il nous faut une ou deux impul
Two other points, Fred. One is that we don't expect hardly any misalinement of your engine for the burn, so we don't really expect any rates throughout the length of the burn, especially since it's at very low thrust. Second point, request you verify that your suit temperature rheostat's in FULL COLD. That - if it - If it were in FULL COLD, that might help your cabin temperature situation. It might bring the temperature 
Null Nickwinkel 
11
حسناً،
Роджер. Температура в куполе скафандра 68 градусов. Температура в салоне 48 градусов. Настройка скафандра 7,5. Настройка сало
はい、その通りです。これでカードは完了です。残りの更新情報は、58時間のプラットフォームに基づいた参考情報です。プラットフォームをご覧ください。非常に良好な状態です。ジャイロスコープは、プロットされた更新情報以降、ほとんどドリフトがありません。Xはマイナス2.24、Yはポイントプラス0.87、Zはマイナス0.11でした。52時間に基づいた更新情報以降、Xドリフトはプラス0.79、ヨーはプラス1.06、Zはプラス0.02となっています。52時間と57時間の調整の違いがわかります。ドリフトチェックに関する本当に良い、または完全に有効な更新情報を得るには時間が足りませんでした。ジャイロスコープの状態には大変満足しています。PIPAの状
好的，8. 我们刚刚收到了测试图案的回复。我们之前以为是这样的——我们有25个测试图案分配给了地面测试，这些就是我们一直在查看的。另外还有5个分配给了飞行测试，这些图案与地面测试图案的唯一区别在于飞行测试图案上写有实际的说明；所以如果我们查看的是第8个测试图案，那就意味着我们仍在处理分配给地面测试的那些图案，所以这方面没有问题。我会告诉你我们应该使用哪个图
Ok, li leggerò come li vedo io, invece che come li fanno i ragazzi del SEDR (Service Engineering Department Repor
Ok. Volevo solo che ne foste consapevoli e che ci pensaste e che ci rifletteste sulle possibili implicazioni per il piano di volo. Poi vi mostrerò questo grandangolo e il commento sulla Luna e vedrò quali sezioni ritengono più appropriate. Ok. Sulla pergamena, Frank voleva che verificassimo l'ordine in cui poteva aspettarsi di vedere il profilo di ingresso, e il primo profilo che appare è etichettato "Nonexit Numero 2" e si tratta dell'ingresso a corto raggio e ad alta velocità. Il secondo profilo che apparirà è intitolato "The 3500 Mile" che è anche un ingresso ad alta velocità, ma è quello che usereste nel caso in cui dovessimo raggiungere distanze di ingresso più lunghe. Poi il terzo profilo sarà "Nonexit Entry Numero 1", seguito da un quarto da 3500 miglia. Quindi avete quattro profili di ingresso. I numeri 1 e 3, man mano che li incontrate, sono i brevi raggi, mentre i numeri 2 e 4 sono i raggi a lungo raggio. Per quanto riguarda il coldsoak, credo che abbiamo parlato di cosa faremo lì, ma da qualche parte entro un'ora circa, vorremo entrare nel vivo della questione. Di certo non vogliamo farlo a mezzanotte. Parlando con gli addetti alla traiettoria - cosa ne pensano dell'ebollizione dell'acqua - una cosa da tenere a mente è il fatto che vedono i tuoi scarichi d'acqua e l'acqua che bolle sul tuo grafico della traiettoria. Sembra che sia una funzione del loro schema di calcolo piuttosto che una funzione del fatto che la traiettoria venga perturbata così tanto. Quindi sembra che una volta che prenderemo in considerazione, se faremo parte di questa ebollizione dell'acqua, potremmo farlo appena prima del midcourse, dopo che tutto il tracciamento si sarà stabilizzato e loro sapranno quale sarà la correzione di midcourse. Poi in quel periodo appena prima del midcourse potremo farlo, e loro riprenderanno il loro tracciamento dopo la correzione di midcourse. Quindi s
D'accord. L'une de nos premières priorités est de recharger la
Okay, Houston. N
清除
66.1 गुणा 54.4; इससे बेह
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अभी हमारे सामने अफ्रीका महाद्वीप है, और ज़ाहिर है, समय के साथ सब कुछ छोटा होता जा रहा है। भूमध्य सागर बिल्कुल साफ़ है। ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे मेडागास्कर के आसपास सूरज डूबने वाला है। अफ्रीका की भूमध्यरेखीय पट्टी साफ़ दिखाई दे रही है। हमें गहरा हरा या मटमैला हरा रंग दिख रहा है, जबकि अफ्रीका के दक्षिणी छोर और सहारा के उत्तरी तट पर रेतीले रंग हैं। अफ़गानिस्तान और पाकिस्तान की सीमा के पास एक उल्लेखनीय बादल दिखाई दे रहा है। यह अब सूर्यास्त की ओर बढ़ रहा है। इस
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप हमें सामान देंगे
로저. 방금 휴스턴에서 연락이 왔습니다. 준비가 되시면 언제든 나오셔도 됩니다. 우주선에서
And I won't both
क
Ricevuto. Ora resta in 
General Kraft is still somewhat concerned about auto fuel. Use as little auto; use no auto fuel unless you have to pr
……
休斯顿，哥伦比
ठीक है। ज़रा रुकिए। 11, हमारी एकमात्र चिंता आपके हैच बैग में रखे सामान को लेकर है। आपके और A8 के बीच काफी ज़्यादा सामान है, और हम उसे स्लीप रिस्ट्रेंट में स्थानांतरित करने के बारे में बात करना चाहेंगे। कृपया 
Roger. Dernières nouvelles de Luna 15: l’agence TASS a annoncé
È negativo. Non l'ho aperto. Non lo aprirò finché non avrò completato queste letture. Phecda ora si estingue a 1,7 gradi a metà, in posizione intermedia tra lo strato di foschia e la Terra. Okay, Woomera, la mia... la mia situazione è molto buona. La temperatura della tuta sta scendendo notevolmente. La temperatura dello sfiato del vapore non è scesa di molto, ma la temperatura ambiente della tuta è di 60 gra
로저. 우리가 그걸 드
Roger, Jim. Als wir hier unten unsere Antenne verloren haben, haben wir eure Tonbandaufzeichnung unterbrochen. Wir sind gerade dabei, einiges zurückzuspulen und die Aufzeichnung fortzusetzen, falls Bill sich fragt, was
My onboard reading i
ठीक है, 49,000 फीट की ऊंचाई पर, हमारी गति 65 फी
Nous avons presque une minute de
रॉजर। मैं आपको टर्मिनल रीएंट्री पैंतरेबाज़ी के लिए हमने जो योजना बनाई है, उसके बारे में थोड़ी जानकारी देना चाहता हूँ। क्या आप मेरी ब
روجر. للعلم، سيعمل الليزر من مرصد ماكدونالد في غرب تكساس لمدة ساعة واحدة، بعد حوالي 181 ساعة و30 دقيقة. ستتمكن من رؤية الأرض من النافذ
Okay. I'm going to c
Mi assicurerò di
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 약 2분간 업링크를 업보이스 백업으로 전환할 예정이며, 전환 연결에 몇 
フライバイ操作 / 62954、マイナス 162、プラス 129 953 578 - これらは 00953 とプラス 000578 - マイナス 02076 000 000 000、該当なし、プラス 00202、02356 022 02280 03 03
الخطوات التالية، واحد، اثنان، ثلاثة، أربعة، هي نفسها، ونريد إيقاف تشغيل S-BAND SQUELCH، وضبط صمام مُفاعل خلية الو
ठीक 
Ich bin mir sicher, dass sie etwas schrift
Verse
지금쯤이면 달이 보여야 하는데 보이지 않군. 그러
Autre chose, Jim: pendant que vous manœuvrez pour atteindre cette attitude en utilisant le contrôle du lacet, si vous vous apercevez en route que le lacet n’est pas tout à fait celui que vous souhaitiez, vo
我听到了一些声
收到。55区-DELTA 82。04 34 10。9+57。55区-3号区域分火燃烧，55号在后方，109号在前方。1+31。2+17。05 15 40。02+33。08+47
Okay. Now I want to set up my cl
2つ目はパネル5にあります。サーキットブレーカー、POWER-1、MAIN Aがオープン、サ
अपोलो 8, जब तक हमें उच्च लाभ नहीं मिल जाता, मैं प्रक्षेप पथ का सारांश जारी रखूंगा। हम तेरहवें बिंदु से मध्य-प्रशांत रेखा पर वापस आ सकते हैं, और 138 सेकंड के बर्न के बाद आप अपने मार्ग पर होंगे। 138 सेकंड में आप बटरफ्लाई क्षेत्र से बाहर निकल जाएंगे। हम 20 सेकंड के बाद प्रीइग्निशन या रीस्टार्ट न करने की सलाह देते हैं। यदि आप 20 सेकंड से आगे जाते हैं, तो इससे प्रक्षेप पथ सुधार से परे हो सकता है - जिससे आपको बिना किसी सहायता के वापस लौटना पड़ सकता है। रिकवरी क्षेत्र में मौसम अच्छा है। हमारे पास एक फॉलोइंग है और एक विदाउट है। बर्न के दौरान, स्टोरेज टैंक में ईंधन की कमी और उसके सम्प टैंक में जाने के कारण आपको चैम्बर प्रेशर और टैंक प्रेशर में थोड़ा बदलाव दिखाई दे सकता है। यह बर्न शुरू होने के लग
We've got a be
घर के स
D'accord, Jack. La 
Esatto, Jack. Quello che farò è... Ci fermeremo con la Terra nella finestra del comandante, verso
제미니 4호, 여기는 HF 대역
Roger. Canary, j'ai reçu votre me
On panel 2
अच्छा, 
Okay. Es gibt eine Frage zur Checkliste. Meinem Verständnis nach müssen sowohl der primäre als auch der sekundäre Warmwasserboiler beim Betreten des Gebäudes eingeschaltet sein. Ich finde jedoch keinen entsprechenden Eintrag in der Checkliste. Wir bitten daher um eine Bestätigung und stellen sicher, dass alle erforderl
わかりました。可能な時に車内に入って、以下のバルブを確認し、ここに記載した通りにしてください。パッケージバルブを再度押してオフ、緊急キャビン圧力バルブをオフ、ダイレクトO2バルブをオフ、デマンドレグをオフ、ウォーターアキュムレーターを両方ともオフ、メインレグAとBをオープン、グリコール水（正解）を水、そしてグリコールタンクの入口と出口を両方ともオンにしてください。水を取り出したい場合は、サ
Neil, hai ancora quel distributore di fazzoletti, 
好的。这是机组人员状态报告。辐射情况：CDR​​ 11017，CMP 10019，LMP 090
روجر. في حالة التحذير، سيكون لدينا ضغط الصعود
Fred, per quanto riguarda le
Non stai 
Это оче
Apollo 8, Houston. La caric
Okay. We have a bunch of fil
Going to do this O
ロジャー。 3. / 46427、マイナス 053、プラス
알겠습니다. 그리고 저는... - ATT HOLD 설정을 사용하여 자세를 유지하고 - J
अब, आपने फ्लाइट को यहाँ कैप कॉम पर "गॉट या" प्राप्त करने का कारण ब
حسنًا يا مايك، أنا الآن عند النقطة شبه النجمية 33. لا أعرف مكان الشمس بالضبط من هناك، لكن هذه هي الزاوية تقريبًا. نحن - العدسات موجهة مباشرة نحو القمر 
...눈으로 훑어보고 수다를 떨고 있네. 화재 상황 보고서 받았어? 그게 다야
Хорошо. Это перицинфян плюс 2. / 62871 Ноябрь Альфа, и подожди. Хорошо. Мы продолжим с триммером тангажа и триммером рыскания, к
吉姆，我们这里有一套很长的启动和打开仪器的程序，以便我
Friendship Seven, Friends
ओह, इस बारे में आप अपने विवेक का इस्तेमाल कर सकते हैं, जैक
Командование Кантонской столичной территории, подождите, я сейчас д
Roger. The Pilot just woke up, he had meal 2
अब हम हेलमेट रखने वाला बैग देख स
Tout est très calme
좋습니다.
休斯顿，我想说，沿着黄道线
جيميني 8، هذه هيو
Roger, Canary. Il mio stato è buono; lo stato della capsula è buono; la mia modalità di controllo è automatica; giroscopi normali; manovra disattivata. Carburante 51-68 [percento], ossigeno 85-100 [percento]; la temperatura dello sfiato del vapore
That's the Earth, and we have a very good view of it today. There are a few more cloud bands on t
Apollo 11, Houston. Abbiamo avuto molto rumore sul downlink. Potresti provare il tuo guadagno elevato
G
さあ、ケープ。フレンドシ
Danke. Ich vermute, es hing
Игл, 
노드
Sag mir, wie nah wir d
Bene. Quelle erano le stelle 20 e 27 e la differenza di angolo tra le stel
Хьюстон, Игл.
تأكد من أن قاطع الدائرة الكهربا
わかり
Settantadue gradi per la stufa retr
等你回来我们
Roger. How's our thruster firing activity? We're about ready to crank up if you
Ok, Jack. Ce ne sono due. Stamattina sono stati posizionati un interruttore e un disgiuntore che vorremmo farti controllare. Correzione, solo l'i
لا أعرف ما الذي أفعله مع تش
Gemini VI, wir interessieren uns für Delta-V-Werte beim Einleiten der Endphase und beim Bremsen, und außerdem sind mehrere Millionen Menschen an einer etwas genaueren Beschreibung des Bremsvorgangs und Ihrer Positionsregelu
알
Роджер. В следующий раз, когда я посмотрю, я увижу, что... мы сейчас маневрируем к Луне. Посмотрим, сможе
Похоже, мы сильно обидели производителей продуктов питания. Сразу после нашей телепередачи Санта-Клаус принес нам по обеду из готового блюда, который был восхитителен: индей
Хорошо. Когда вы достанете свой... прежде чем достанете свой справочник карт, специалисты по связи из Хьюстона придумали небольшое слово для обозначения бывшего сотрудника CAP COMM. Они говорят, что считают вас сотрудником, работающим НЕ 
Je suis d'accord, ce serait bien de le documenter
فهمت. بعض العصيدة، أليس ك
13，休斯顿。
하나 더 드릴게요. 이걸 복사해서 전부 다시 읽어주세요. 알겠죠? 램프를 사용하려면, 먼저 CB 16 인버터 2를 닫고, CB 11 AC 버스 A 램프를 닫아야 합니다. 그런 다음 CB 16 인버터 
네. 메인 버스 B에 대한 제 관찰 결과를 말씀드리겠습니다. 상황이 매우 빠르게 진행됐습니다. 먼저 충격이나 폭발음 같은 게 들렸는데, 정확한 원인은 잘 모르겠습니다. 그로부터 약 1초 후에 메인 버스 B 전압 강하를 나타내는 마스터 경보가 울렸습니다. 제가 전압을 확인해 보니 당시에는 정상이었기 때문에 순간적인 전압 스파이크였을 가능성이 높습니다. 연료 전지 3도 정상적으로 작동하고 있었습니다. 그런데 그 시점에 프레드가 지휘실로 들어와 자리에 앉았습니다. 그가 자리에 앉자마자 AC 버스 2 표시등이 켜졌습니다. 프레드가 메인 버스 B를 확인했는데, 전압이 0으로 표시되고 있었습니다. 연료 전지의 전류도 0이었습니다. 제 생각에는 메인 버스 B에 전류가 흐르고 있는 것 같습니다. 하지만 이건 단지 추측일 뿐입니다. 리셋을 시도해 보지는 않았습니다. 메인 버스 A에 전압 강하
로저. 패널 점검 결과는 다음과 같습니다. 왼쪽 패널의 퓨즈 스위치는 이전에 보고된 내용과 동일하며, 다시 말씀드리지는 않겠습니다. 스퀴브는 작동 준비 완료입니다. 자동 역추진은 꺼져 있습니다. 모드 선택은 정상, 자동, 자이로 정상입니다. 모든 "T" 핸들은 제자리에 있습니다. 역추진 지연 시간은 정상이며, 객실 조명은 양쪽 모두 켜져 있습니다. 물론 빨간색 필터도 켜져 있습니다. 텔레메트리 저주파는 켜져 있습니다. 구조 보조 장치는 자동입니다. 착륙 백이 중앙 꺼짐 위치로 설정된 것을 제외하고 모든 시퀀스 패널 항목은 정상입니다. 연료는 90~100%입니다. 자세 표시기는 오른쪽 5도, 왼쪽 3도, 아래쪽 36도입니다. EPI는 현재 우메라 상공을 거의 가리키고 있어 상당히 정확한 정보를 보여주고 있습니다. 이륙 후 제 목표 지점까지의 시간은 58분 15초입니다. 대기-MARK. 역추진 시간은 여전히 ​​04분
Я ответил
ठीक है, 
حسنًا. سنقوم بفصل قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية، لذا لن تتمكن من رؤية وضعنا. لذلك، ل
Хорошо. Насколько я понимаю, Хьюстон, нам нужно поворачивать машину по оси Y, и вы бу
Okay
Apollo 8. Here we go on a flyby maneuver . This will be an / 63087, minus 162, plus 129, plus 009 62, plus 005 68, minus 020 77 000 000 000, November Alfa, 
Roger. Aktuelles zu Luna 15: TASS meldete heute Morgen, dass die Raumsonde in eine Umlaufbahn nahe der Mondoberfläche gebracht wurde und alles an Bord normal zu funktionieren scheint. Sir Bernard Lovel
Хорошо. Теперь, похоже, погода на горизонте... облака, облака на горизонте слева на снимке, я вижу облака примерно до середины, и в середине они, кажется, расходятся, а затем есть какие-то разрозне
음, 우리는 수면 모드이고, 고이득 각도를 확보했는데, 이 각도들이 좋을 겁니다. 그리고 저는 목표물을 포착했고 신호 강도는 절반 정도인데, 상대방은 제 목소리를 듣지 못합니
助推器还在……
Oui. Je crois… je crois que quelqu’un a dit que lorsqu’on est hors de son pays, on bénéfici
D'accord, Jim. La chance est avec toi. Le suivi indique que ton angle d'entrée est passé à -6,24. Ce calcul est basé sur toutes les données collectées entre le milieu du parcours et le moment où le réservoir de super-résistance a été utilisé. Nous allons donc continuer à analyser la situation pour voir si le réservoir a eu un impact. Donc,
昨天还不是这样的——肯定是因
Roger. Pareil pour nous. Nous sommes encore en train de discute
Чьи
알겠습니다, 
一つだけ疑問があります。トンネルの通気弁についてです。トンネルを開けて、その後圧力をかけるのに、なぜデルタVが1.7を超えるまで
Gemini VII, qui Gemini VI. Abbiamo un oggetto, sembra un satellite che viaggia da nord a sud, probabilmente in orbita polare. È su una traiettoria molto bassa, viaggia da nord a sud e ha un tasso di salita molto alto. Sembra 
ह्यूस्टन, ईगल। क्या आप रें
ठीक है, आपको ट्रैकिं
Das ist ungef
... コントローラーの電源がオフになってから
Très bien. C'est une bonne restitution, Jack. Maintenan
罗杰。对于你即将进行的跑步训练，请使用中途7分钟的成绩
جا
로저. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5; 5, 4, 3, 2,
ठीक है। इससे आपके 
Okay. Der Fernseher ist jetzt eingeschaltet, und wir vers
Хьюстон, «Аполлон-1
通用卡夫公司仍然对汽车燃料有些担忧。尽量少用汽车
Bene, state appena iniziando a superare il limite. Riesco a vedere parti dell'America Centrale, e sembra che lì sia abbastanza limpido. Le isole dei Caraibi stanno iniziando ad apparir
收到。我们请求将废水排放量从25%降至名义上的
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, ici Watertown Com Tech. Je vous
Согласен. Я собираюсь обнулить крен и попытаться обнулить рыскание, а как только эти два параметра будут достаточно 
分かりまし
«Свобода Семь» по-прежнему в действи
Верно, Джек. Хорошо, на странице 2-5. Верхняя строка, где у нас было «Проверка горизонта», теперь это «Провер
- - نعم، إنها ست لقطات بسرعة 15؛ أقترح عليك أن تزيد السرعة قلي
Questo è tutto per quanto riguarda le notizie mondiali e nazionali e gli approfondimenti. Nella pagina sportiva, Hank Stram dei Kansas City Chiefs è stato nominato allenatore dell'anno della AFL. Questa è la seconda volta in tre stagioni. La votazione è stata effettuata da una giuria dell'Associated Press composta da 30 giornalisti e telecronisti sportivi, tre per ogni città. Il più vicino a lui era Weeb Ewbank. Altri allenatori che hanno ricevuto voti sono stati Sid Gilman di San Diego e Lou Sabin di Denver. Per quanto riguarda l'All Star Game dello Shriners College di ieri, il North ha raffreddato il South per 3 a 0. Dick Berlinsky del Michigan State ha calciato un field goal da 23 yard nel primo quarto ed è stato tutto ciò di cui il North ha avuto bisogno per battere il South mercoledì, nell'All Star Game dello Shriners College. Vediamo, immagino che le cose interessanti siano che i primi down, North 19, South 16; le corse, No
Роджер. Начальная точка PAD: область — центральная часть Тихого океана, координаты: 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, широта: плюс 1332, минус 16917, 064, 36194, 649, дальность полета: 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 00 28, максимальная дальность DL: 154, 084, 22400, 18000, D0 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02, звезда секстанта: 45 0189, 277, звезда оси визирования: отсутствует, вектор подъема вверх. Комментарии: выравнивание, Вега и Денеб, крен 078, тангаж 223, рыскание 340. Дополнительные комментарии:
ところで、ジャッ
حسناً يا جو. ضع الكيس فوق العلبة بحيث يكون القوس
From Washington: "This Christmas, the world is brightened with the hope of peace. When it comes, when hope turns 
了解しました。セカンダリーアキュムレーターの量をモニターしています。ステップ2は、ラジエーターバルブへのセカンダ
わか
好的。我们没有观察到废料量减少，而且
Friendship Seven, Muchea Com Tech. Ti legg
Gus, riguardo
روجر، فرانك. لدينا بعض البيانات التي لم تُذكر في تقريرك. نرجو منك قر
Durch die Zeitkorrelation ist zu viel rotes Licht im Cockpit. Ve
ケン、君の通信はずっとコピーできたん
ठीक है। मैं यही कहने वाला था। पृष्ठ 3 पर, हम आइटम 1 को छोड़ देते हैं। और आइटम 2 के लिए, मैंने हीटर पहले ही चालू कर दिए हैं। और मुझे नहीं पता कि मैंने आपको समय बताया था या आपने
Frank, all indications are that there is absolutely no problem with anything in the computer memor
Roger. Es waren 0,1, aber wir haben kein Si
宇宙船自体のせいではありません。カメラの向きを変えるのが難しいのです。ブラケットには十分なたわみがあり、窓からカメラを設置すると視界から外れてしまうことがあります。カメラを設置するには、地上からの指示
حسناً يا ف
D'accord, Joe. Tu regardes? Tu jettes un œil à ce qui se passe i
わかりました。ACMEポジションのRCSの評価は実施しました
よし、理解できたか確認しよう。ステップ2は「バランスカップルはオフ。デッドバンドは最小。姿
これに何らかのパッ
分かりまし
Apollo 8, Houston. Falls Sie den Computer nicht benötigen, ruf
توجد صورة التُقطت من الجهة الخلفية اليمنى للمركبة الفضائية، تُظهر حافة مرحلة الهبوط، وتُشير إلى اسمرار ملحوظ في لون السطح، مع وجود قدر ضئيل من الإ
Roger. Falls du kurz Zeit hast, ich habe ein paar Aktualisierungen zu den PADs, die wir dir gestern Nachmittag weitergeleitet haben. Aufgrund der zweiten Kurskorrektur hat sich das erforderliche Delta
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。どうぞ。オー
Аполлон-8, 
알겠습니다. 음, 어디 보자, 냄새 하나는..
51-DELTA 55 前，
Ok. Regole di accensione. Dovremmo spegnerci se il monitor di spinta è al 77% o meno; numero 2, se la pressione di riempimento del propellente è inferiore a 160 psi; 3, se il DELTA-P dell'ossidante del carburante è maggiore di 25, e questo sarà un avviso di terra; 4, se l'errore di assetto è di più o meno 10 gradi, tranne che per i transitori di avvio. Ok. I limiti di rateo sono di più o meno 10 gradi al secondo. E una spia ENGINE GIMBAL, una ISS con un PROGRAM ALARM, un CES DC e una spia dell'inverter, se è ancora accesa dopo aver provato a cambiare inverter. Se, durante l'accensione, il motore si spegne quando il NOUN 97 lampeggia, dovremmo PRO, eseguire il riempimento manuale e il pulsante START, premere e DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, aprire. Se non eseguiamo un PC-2, la nostra prossima accensione sarà a PC-4 per altri 24 
いいえ、発音できません。きっと気に入っていただけると思います。彼らは素晴らしいチーズブ
Это подтверждается. Из-з
R
11, Houston. Die Studienberatung beschäftigt sich mit den Themen NOUN 40–49. Wir sind gleich wieder für Sie da. En
Gemini 4, Guaymas. Sind Sie bereit für Ihren HF-Ch
FLIG
Хорошо. Что касается всенаправленных антенн по сравнению с антеннами с высоким коэффициентом усиления, похоже, мы можем использовать всенаправленные антенны еще несколько часов, если вы хотите отказать
D'accord. Jim va prendre une photo de nous depuis la baie d'équipement in
자, 잭, 지금 제가 꺼내놓은 건 레바(LEVVA)인데, 전에도 보여드린 적이 있죠. 이건 지상에서 착용하는 머리 보호구인데, 짐의 레바를 가져와서 몇 가지 개조 사항을 보여드리겠습니다. 이전에는 지상에 있는 등장인물들을 잘 구분하기 어려웠던 문제가 있었죠. 그래서 짐의 슈트에 빨간 줄무늬가 있는 것처럼, 보시다시피 그의 레바에도 빨간 줄무늬가 있습니다. 그리고 잭, 제가 전에는 제대로 보지 못했던 또 다른 개조 사항도 보이시죠? 12호에서 피트와 A1이 햇
可惜的是，这些数据一直没录入到这里。如果你看一下弗雷德·海斯的那张图表，你会发现11点钟位置有一个数值，代表噪音水平。我不记得电压是多少了，不过我的系统手册里可
D'accord, Houston. La Lune est essentiellement grise, sans couleur; elle ressemble à du plâtre ou à une sorte de sable grisâtre et profond. On distingue assez bien les détails. La Mer de la Fertilité est moins visible ici que sur Terre. Le cont
…明日
パワーダウン（判読不能）状態でも、まだ 11 アンペア弱しか消費していないようです。1 番機では 10 アンペア、2 番機では 11 アンペア弱です。テザー、つまり外側のハッチにあるテザーもしくは臍帯拘束具の位置のせいで、宇宙船前方での自由テザーの空気力学的制約による船外活動（EVA）作業はかなり困難でした。そのエリアで作業している時はいつでも、テザーが端に達すると私は引き戻され、その反動で宇宙船上方、アダプター セクションの方へ運ばれていました。そのため、窓の上方で操縦している間、私は視界から消え、その後宇宙船後方へと戻されていました。宇宙船の前部に出るために、私は絶えず自分自身を引き上げ続けなければなりませんでした。私は自分が撮っている写真に満足していませんでした。装着していたランヤードを固定するのはかなり困難でした。銃に装着していたランヤード、私が繋いでいたテザーとアンビリカルケーブル、その他様々なランヤードがぶらぶらと揺れていて、カメラの前に入らないようにするのが大変でした。写真では腕を素早く動かしている
روجر. نوصي الآ
Et, Joe, Jack dit que toutes les températures des injecteurs, il vient de les revéri
Rog
この臍の緒にたどり着くには、少し前にかがま
D'accord. Les ventila
Rog
Хорошо. На странице 6.1 контрольного списка для выхода из самолета, внизу, после кнопки «ГЛАВНОЕ РАЗВЕРТЫВАНИЕ», есть три дополнительных шага, которые мы хотели бы, чтобы вы выполнили. Цель этого — снизить давление кислорода в вашем коллекторе и исключить утечку кислорода через резервуары с питьевой и сточной 
ロジ
ठीक है। इसके बाद, CB CTE, MAIN B, बंद करें। अगला, पैनल 250: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2 बंद करें; CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING बंद करें। अगला, पैनल 275: CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B, बंद करें; CB INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B, बंद करें। ठीक है। वैसे, अब तक मैंने आपको जो कुछ भी बताया है, वह क्रम के हिसाब से ज़रूरी नहीं है, लेकिन अब से यह ज़रूरी होगा - आपको इसे हमारे दिए गए क्रम में ही करना होगा। जैक, इसे ए
मौसम ठंडा
Это подтверждается. На панели 2: ПРЕДУПРЕЖДЕНИЕ И ПРАВО ПРЕДУПРЕЖ
收到。现在可以关闭平台和计算
नहीं। मैंने पुष्टि कर ली है कि सहायक डैम्प सिस्टम संतोषजनक ढंग से का
晚上好。我是阿波罗11号的指挥官。一百年前，儒勒·凡尔纳写了一部关于登月之旅的小说。他的宇宙飞船“哥伦比亚号”从佛罗里达州起飞，完成登月之旅后降落在太平洋。今天，随着现代版的“哥伦比亚号”明天也将与地球和太平洋完成对接，我们觉得与大家分享一些宇航员的感想正合时宜。首先，请听迈克·柯林斯的发言
Vie
Ic
Okay, das ist gut. Dieser Programmalarm ist normal; er tritt ein, wenn der Zapfen un
Was die Fenster betrifft, Houston: Die Fenster 1 und 5 weisen einen leichten Schleier auf. Für die visuelle Beobachtung ausreichen
Хейни следит за вашей траекторией, так что всё в порядке. Он говорит, что вы находитесь в 10 минутах от сферы вли
ジェミニ4、ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP C
收到。休斯顿，阿波罗8号。收到，非常清楚。计划24136 179 045 001 515 105196 35569 35
로저, 당신 말이 맞나요? 스코티, 당신의 2 알파 시간을 당신에게 넘겨주고 싶습니다
مبدئياً، التصحيح في منتصف المسار يساوي صفرًا؛ وفي غضون ساعة ونصف تقريبًا، 
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। हमार
ठीक है। और अगर आप वो भी हासिल नहीं कर पाते, तो फिर, ज़ाहिर है, जितना
Ok, Jack. Ora i passaggi rimanenti sono semplicemente la configurazione del circuito della tuta per rendere questo dispositivo pienamente operativo, e
Roger, resta in at
रॉजर। मुझे वीएचएफ पर आपकी आवाज सुनाई नहीं दे रही 
OK. Sortie extravéhiculaire autorisée. Préparez-vous à la décompress
Mir hat Ihr Beitrag neulich gefallen. Er war hilfr
ठीक है। यहीं रुकि
そうですね、背景の雑
Roger. Bereit. Stellen Sie sicher, dass der Notfall-Fallschirm ausgefahren und die Not-Hauptsicherungen ausgesch
Mon travail consiste à mainte
... اضغط للدخول. حسنً
Apollo 11, Houston. Would you give us and ACCEPT? W
待機
그게 확언입니다. 5초 후에 다시 시
Ok, abbiamo completato questa serie alle 17:47 e s
حوا
Well, what 
收到，然后认真瞄准，紧紧跟随目标。用你的瞄准镜十字线
Roger Gemini 4, qui è il chirurgo RKV. La pressione non è ancora buona, ma prima di riprovarci la prossima volta, controlla che il raccordo non abbia residui o altro all'
그리고 6을 더
そうだね、ジョン、ここにいるとまた家に帰ってきたような気分だ
Bene
ठीक है। ये छोटे-छोटे टुकड़े केबिन में इधर-उधर उड़ने वाले टुकड़ों की समस्या को दूर करने के लिए बनाए गए थे, इसलिए इन्हें एक खास आकार में बनाया गया ताकि इन्हें एक ही बार में मुंह में डाला जा सके। मुझे लगता है कि अपने अनुभव से हमने पाया है कि हम पृथ्वी पर मिलने वाले कुछ प्रकार के भोजन से भी कह
杰克，我现在正在取出的是另一件新的硬件，这次我们带上它，是因为有人对阿波罗 12 号飞行发表
안녕하세요. 통화 기록 시스템이 작동을 멈출
Roger. Navigation cislunaire accomplie. Nous avons effectué deux séries de mesures sur l'étoile 16, deux séries s
아니요, 저는 연속 인터폰, 즉 푸시 투 토크 
... VGX माइनस 0.1
Роджер. Копируем вращение 21 - 61, тангаж 090, рыскание 000, тангаж с высоким коэффици
收到。非常清
鹰，休斯顿。我们觉得那条粗略的直线看起来不
روجر. نطلب تخفيض معدل تصريف مياه الصرف الصحي من 25 إلى 30% إلى 25%، وإليكم 
ठीक है। अगला, पैनल 3: ट्रांसपोंडर, प्राइमरी; पावर एम्पलीफायर, प्राइमरी पर, यह सत्यापित करें; पावर एम्पलीफायर, हाई; मोड, वॉइस, ऑफ पर; पावर, नॉर्मल पर; PM
E poiché sarà troppo tardi per fare qualcosa riguardo al controllo di integrità del portello se fallisce, vuoi che indossiamo 
네, 그렇습니
Вы не знаете? Похоже, вы находитесь примерно к юго-востоку от южно
Итак. В мире гольфа Томми Джейкобс, который в последние годы редко принимал участие в соревновани
Tu... prends une photo, tout simplement en regardant p
Bien. Tout d'abord, rendez-vous à la page 12. Sur la droite, en partant du milieu, suppri
Okay. Now, Joe, you want to cut four strips, 12 inches long each, 
كل شيء يبدو جيدًا، سأعطيك قراءة سريعة. نسبة الوقود 27-29%. ضغط المقصورة 5.5، درجة حرارة هواء المقصورة 88 درجة، الرطوبة النسبية 33%؛ كمية سائل التبريد 58%، درجة الحرارة 71 درجة، درجة حرارة البد
À 00:43:02, je p
ح
日落。备注：B-1 减 1，现在我还有四个时间点要告诉你——也就是各种
لا أرى أين ينص على ذلك،
新し
अपोलो 8, हमारा डेटा इस समय काम नहीं कर रहा है; कृपया सुनिश्चित करें कि आपने टेप र
네, 방금 전에 연락이 끊기기 전에 마지막으로 말씀드리려고 했던 건 연료를 현명하게 사용하는 것에 관한 것이었습니다. 그들은 당신이 비행 계획을 모두 완료하기에 충분한 연료를 가지고 있다고
Bene. Abbiamo ricevuto diverse idee interessanti al riguardo e l'ultima che ho sentito è quella di potenz
Ich könnte sehr leicht von einem anderen Planeten ko
Okay. REICHWEITE FUNKTIONEN Sc
बहुत बढ़िया, शानदार। एक मिनट की तैयारी के बाद कुछ काम करने होंगे। मैं
Up until last night it was - if anything, a l
크고 넓게 펼쳐진 지형이에요. 오른
Real good. It looks like you're approaching 1
네, 알겠습니다. 확인했습니다. 짐, 다른 정보가 있는지 볼까요? 미드코스-2는 초속 약 23피트로 예상되며, 역행 방향으로 예정대로 이동하고 있습니다. 현재 매우 안정적인 상태입니다. 참고로, 아직 확정된 수치가 아니니 받아 적으실 필요는 없지만, 영향 지점은 남위 약 8.57도, 서경 약 33.9도로 예상됩니다. 이는 비행 계획 값보다 약간 서쪽, 남쪽으로 치우친 수치입니다. 속도는 약 77에 51을 
Bene. Quelli successivi, nel riquadro 1, sono invariati, e nel riquadro 2, vai fino ai dialoghi del propellente, e tra parentesi cancella "otto", e metti "quattro al grigio", e poi traccia una riga a
Роджер, Фрэнк. Мы только что это тоже обсуждали. Мы согласны с вашей точкой зрения. Думаю, это скорее вопрос лю
Ok. Lasciatemi partire dall'inizio. Potrebbe esserci qualche sovrapposizione, ma per essere sicuri che siamo tutti sulla stessa lunghezza d'onda. Iniziamo con una serie di procedure di timeline che ci forniranno... finiremo con la normale checklist di ingresso. Ci saranno alcune modifiche alla checklist nel libro, ma il grosso di ciò che ho da offrirvi riguarda la timeline. E inizia a 6 ore e 30 m
Tranquility, Houston. We have indication that we've frozen up the descent fuel helium heat exchanger, and there's some fuel trapped in the line between there and the valves; and
Роджер. У нас ост
In questo mo
Capisco 
هاواي، درجة حرارة ملابس الس
Okay. We still owe you confirmation that you can expect yo
Roger. Die Spanne um 20 Uhr – bei unserem GET von 21:50:00 plus 22,24. Die Spanne um 22:00:00 plus 00 betrug 17,63. Die Sp
이걸로 멈추길 바라
宇宙船の私の側は日光を浴びて
我现在可以看到宽阔的蓝色地平线带。此时（时间：02:07:00），它看起来大约有太阳下方的直径。它的
ठीक है। जैक लुस्मा
Ho notato diverse volte, passando dalla luce del sole all'ombra, che proprio mentre entro, vedo un ulteriore riflesso del sole, oltre al riflesso del mio viso sulla visiera, che rende la visibilità molto scarsa proprio nel passaggio dalla luce del sole all'ombra. In pratica, ho così tanto riverbero sulla visiera che *** ombra *** il casco in realtà cattura l'ombra. Poi ci vuole un po' di tempo perché i miei occhi si adattino alle condizioni di luce. *** all'interno della zona d'ombra, la visibilità, come abbiamo detto prima, non è molto buona, ma entrambe le visiere s
Sept, notre attitude de tangage télémétrique indique environ 27 (degrés) moins et la sortie de votre sc
Роджер. Хорошо, давление в кабине по-прежнему держится на уровне 5,5. Оно такое с тех пор, как мы улетели. Температура в кабине 90%, относительная влажность снова поднялась примерно до 36%, количество охлаждающей жидкости тоже немного уменьшилось, возможно, где-то была небольшая утечка воды, так как влажность так сильно повысилась, ведь она была около 20%. Однако количество охлаждающей жидкости сейчас уменьшилось примерно на 62%. Температура скафандра на входе 70 градусов; давление в кабине скафандра 5,8. Температура пара 4,5 гр
Хорошо. Сейчас справа на экране находится тройной кратер, между первым и вторым — небольшой кратер; а тот, что внизу экрана, — это кратер Шуберта Y. Приблизьте изображение; у него есть цент
Ok, riquadro 7: NUMERO 2 POTERE DI RISCALD
Salut Jim, nous avons des informations concernant les photos à te tra
Buongi
Nein... all das geschah bei der Durchreise
रॉजर। यह कमांड पायलट है। मैं लगभग 30 मिनट पहले जागा। फिर मैंने द
Roger. Reading you kind of weak now, 
자, 이제 내려가자. 좋
대기자 1
روجر. سيتم الحصول 
Roger. Vorremmo una valutazione dei commenti vocal
حسناً، هذا كل ما هو معقول، دون أن يصبح الجو حاراً
Roger, sta ruotando len
Aquarius
정말 감사합니다. 네, 수치를 읽어 드리겠습니다. 이륙 당시 GMT는 17시 16분이었습니다. 추진제량은 60이었고, 객실 온도는 92도, 우주복 온도는 58도, 객
D'accord. La première étoile sera la 26, et nous effectuerons deux séries de mesures: une depuis la Terre, près de l'horizon, en utilisant l'étoile 26; puis une autre depuis la Terre, 
了解。はっきり聞こえます。
Rog
Roger. Sachez que je vois maintenant Antares et Nunki dans le, et je voulais juste savoir si vous voulez 
Anche quando m
D'accord. Voyons si j'ai tout compris. Pour le rendez-vous, il faut d'abord fermer le disjoncteur CB 16 INVERTER 2, ainsi que le disjoncteur CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2. Ensuite, sur le panneau 14, vérifiez que l'INVERTER 2 est sélectionné.
R
Мы сообщим вам, когда вы верне
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон, и я обновил карту. Вы готовы п
Роджер. Я тебя прекрасно слыш
你好，宁静
Guardando oltreoceano, scopriamo che la prima superstrada della Corea del Sud, che collega Seul al porto di Inchon, è stata chiamata Apollo Highway per commemorare il vostro viaggio. Credo di aver accennato ieri sera che il Presidente Nixon ha già iniziato il suo giro del mondo e oggi è a San Francisco per la sua prima tappa che lo porterà alla U.S.S. Hornet, da cui assisterà al ritorno della vostra navicella spaziale. Ha in programma di visitare sette nazioni, tra cui la Romania, durante questo via
11, du hast ein ziemlich großes Publikum. Die Sendung wird live in den USA übertragen.
Ok. Non c'è molto da dire stamattina. La situazione è piuttosto tranquilla. Credo che la notizia più importante sia il tasso di incidenti - le morti durante le festività - che non è certo una notizia piacevole, ma abbiamo avuto 233 vittime a livello nazionale, e 9 di loro a Houston la vigilia di Natale, e a Natale. Nei notiziari mondiali, le famiglie sono tornate a far notizia. Questo è "Le famiglie dell'equipaggio dell'Apollo 8 hanno 
はい、ランダムに揺れます。予測できるような振動は全くありません。風船
좋아, 아폴로 8호. 난 11대 가지고 있
Apollo 8, Houston. Reading you loud and clea
好的。2号水箱的风扇关掉了。好的。现
Je vais simplement adopter une configuration Small-End-Forward, éliminer mon lacet, et me mettre dans l'état d'esprit que j'adopterai
Ja. Wir denken schon, und es würde Ihnen an einem Ort, an dem viel los sein wird, eine Menge Zeit
Wir nähern uns
Помните, что самая важная часть поездки приходи
OK, configuration du panneau 11, rangée du haut: BUS CA B
Okay. Das sind gute Informationen, und während wir sehen, dass Sie weiterhin pitchen, und falls Sie jemals in eine Situation geraten, in der Sie
Ame
ठीक है। चलिए सरफेस 60 पर चलते हैं, और फिर पेज के बीच में, लॉन्च गाइडेंस सिस्टम की सिफारिश के बाद, मैं वहां स्वि
Нет, сначала мне нужно привести себя в порядок ради тебя, Гас. Та
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。アップリンクの音声変調を停止します。遅くとも復旧までには復旧
Okay, thank yo
我还有一些其他信息。大约两个小时后，我们才能掌握你飞行轨迹的准确数据。不过，从燃烧情况来看，燃烧效果非常好，我
카나리 씨, 라디에이터 온도 정보를 가지고 
मुझे व्य
एड के पास इस समय लगभग सारा सामान है। मेरे पास बंदूक, कैमरा और हैच फिटिंग है, सूट की दोनों होज़ को जोड़ने वाली फिटिंग भी है। एड के पास बाकी सारा सामान है, लेकिन वो सूट सर्किट म
रॉजर. / - यह 3 - 46427, माइनस 053, प्लस 141, प्लस 28960, मा
你注意到有任何潮
Bene. Questo è il pad più 90. /G&N, 63825, meno 1,54, più 1,32, meno 0491,7, più 0000,1, più 6634,0, 180, 228, 001; HA è N/D; HP è più 0017,9; 6652,2, 37, 6626,5, 26, 155,4, 15,7. La stella di puntamento è Zeta Sagittarii; in alto, 08,0; a destra, 2,1; meno 22,81, meno 025,00, 11
로저, 프랭크. 이 근지점 예측값인 -03137에 문제나 이상한 점은 없는 것 같습니다. 케플러 궤도 예측이라서 정확도가 아주 높지는 않습니다. 이제 다운링크에서 받은 벡터를 가상의 외부 기동을 통해 시뮬레
The dome (temperature) is holding at 70 degrees. Cabin dome is 50 degrees. 
И, Фред, компьютер уже загрузил нужн
What you're seeing, Mike, is a - Houston, what you are seeing is the Western Hemisphere. Looking - at the top is the North Pole; in the center - just lower to the center is South America - all the way down to Cape Horn. I can see Baja California and the southwestern part of the United States. There is a big long cloud bank going northeast, covers a lot of 
そうです。ハッチをストロークするたびにゲインドッグを操作しなければならず、いつものように強く引くことができませんでした。そのため、私たちが連携を取り、私がどこでストロークダウンするかを調整する必要がありました。ジムは、その時強く引くように指示していましたし、彼がそうして
प्रत्
Neil, hier spricht Houston. Sobald Sie die Kernröhren und den Sonnenwind haben, ist alles andere, was 
حسنًا، سأكمل هذه ال
Roger. Merci. Je crois comprendre que vous deviez percevoir des droits d'auteur. Comment
Solo negli sca
لا تزال الطائرة في وضع أفقي نسبيًا. يعمل نظام التحكم في معدل التسارع بشكل جيد. أنا سعيدٌ بثباتها. إنها تسير على ما يرام. تقترب من 5.5 جي. لا يزال نظام التحكم في معدل التسارع ثابتً
还不错。就是有点热。感觉我一睡觉就热起来了。
हाँ, जो; अगर तुम कोन क्रेटर जैसा गड्ढा खो
Neil, hier spricht Houston. Falls Sie das lesen, empfehlen wir Ihnen, eine Antenne auszuklappen,
Okay. First thing, we've made no provisions in these instructions for taking pictures of the moon. If you get some moon shots after it's all over by looking out a different window or by making some small maneuver, of course, we would be happy to have
Bene. Il nostro st
ठीक है, अंतरिक्ष यान कमांडर, यह वूमेरा सिस्टम्स है।
Nun, man
We'd like to hold off on the and get some more information. We'll have some more details of that for you s
Das i
ジャック、BAT A の電圧
ठीक है। मध्य प्रशांत महासागर में उतरने वाले क्षेत्र में मौसम अच्छा है। बादल 2000 फीट (लगभग 10 किमी/घंटा) के हैं, दृश्यता 10 किमी/घंटा; हवा की गति 0.60 किमी/घंटा (लगभग 10 किमी/घंटा); लहरों की ऊँचाई 4 फीट है, और अल्टीमीटर 2986 किमी/घंटा (यदि 
Ho qualche aggiornament
حسنًا. الإجراء يعود مجددًا. نسخ متعددة للتوزيع. وكين عاد. إنه خبير محلي في ه
Roger, Houston. Ausweichmanöver G&N: 63481, plus 095, minus 020 004 40 0100, plus 00051, plus alle Nullen, plus 00190, Roll Crew Option, 213 357, NA, 00197 003 00152, kein Leerlauf
Qu'est ce que c'e
जब तक कि इसका संबंध उस
روجر. نح
不。我们不需
Apollo 13, Ho
是的。显然他们在租金价格上无法达成一致。巴
드로그를 사용해 보는 게 좋겠군. 25피트(1,000피트)에서 드로그를 수동으로 내렸어. 잘 고정되고 있고, 정말 아슬아슬했어. 주 낙하산 전개 퓨즈 스위치를 켰고, 지
Je pense que c'est un peu serré; il manque environ un quart de degré. On peut légèrement augmenter la marge. Fred, restez à l'écoute, on vous donne la réponse. Et si vous restez à l'écoute, on
ठीक है। चरण 7. सर्किट ब्रेकर पैनल 11, एसी बस बी, हीलियम पीक्यूजीएस डिस्प्ले, बंद। मुख्य - सर्किट ब्रेकर पैनल 11, एस
D'accord. Pour information, il semble que votre lecture de 87 psi corresponde à notre lecture TM corrigée d
Apollo 8. Dies ist Houston, mit einem Vorbeiflug und
Roger. In the event of the possibi
आपके पास क्या है? बैटरी A में कितनी ऊर्जा बची है? ठीक है। काश मुझे पता होता कि वे इस समय क्या सो
Roger. Per Bill, la qualità della voce sul retro 
Roger. We've been looking at your systems data on playback, and everything is looking good. In particular, the looks good. I would like to remind you, though, of a request to perform this burn on the bank A ball valves only, and you are
了解
沃利，我
我现在开始从潜望镜里看到日出了。这是这次轨道飞行中，由于夜侧的原因，潜望镜里出现了第一束光。很明显，在夜侧进行逆向姿态调整时，潜望镜完全不起作用。我看到的第一束光几乎就在……。日出正迅速地透过潜望镜照射进来。我确实看到了约翰提到的那些发光物体，而且我可以敲掉一些。我明显感觉到它们像一片光斑，大小不一，从小到亮都有。潜望镜本身太刺眼了。我得把海图盖在上面，这样才能看清窗外。我随时可以进行逆向姿态调整，所以除了看着窗外，我别无他事可做。前提是宇航服电路运行正常。那张海图真是帮了大忙，可以遮住那该死的潜望镜。这些物体分布范围相当大。正如斯科蒂
...こち
Я не думаю, что это большая проблема; она возникает только при переходе в автоматический режим. Не думаю, что это помешает нам на этапе регистрации. Я делаю то же самое; я просматриваю свой контрольный список для регистрации. Одна из первых вещей, которые я вижу здесь, — 
Роджер, Фред. Мы видим. Изображение очень хорошее, и ваше описание тоже верное. Мы видим, что Джим расположил камеру так, как
カナリア・キャップ・コム、こちらシグマ・セブン。UHF。聞こえますか
버즈 씨, 아직 심전도 데이터가 나오지 않고 있습니다. 데이터를 얻으려면 편하신 시간에 심전도 전극(파
Roger. Wir haben Ihre Nachricht verstanden und Ihre Anmerkungen zur Kommunikation zwischen unserer Außenstelle und Ihnen zur Kenntnis genommen. Ein Problem bestand bisher darin, die Verbindung zur Außenstelle herzust
일출 시간 04 
为什么我的VHF-A
المشكلة الوحيدة يا تشارلي هي أن ه
مرحباً، كارنارفون. الج
A
Во-первых, я в режиме автоматического входа в атмосферу; я в автоматическом режиме; гироскопы работают в обычном режиме; маневр отключен; все настройки соответствуют режиму входа в атмосферу; переключатель обхода для угловых гироскопов в нормальном положении. Показываю уровень топлива: в автоматическом баке 90%, в ручном — около 90%. Показываю темпе
And, Aquarius; Houston. Roger that. And we're standing by for your body-axis aline and your zeroing 404, 4
De retour à Washington, la commission des voies et moyens de la Chambre des représentants a approuvé des modifications fiscales concernant les compagnies pétrolières, les banques et les services publics, susceptibles d'e
네, 맞습니다. 그럼 간단히 설명드리자면, 먼저 전원을 켜고 8볼을 올린 다음, 자세를 설정하고, 앞쪽 창에 표시를 하고, 유도 제어는 당연히 작동시키겠습니다. 하지만 수동으로 우주선의 방향을 조정해서 지구 중심이 Z축 바로 위에 오도록 하세요. 그런 다음 Z축을 중심으로 회전해서 
Wir können Ihnen auch die Uhrzeit in unserem Sy
По мере приближения к запус
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Ваш ускоритель сконфигурирован нормальн
好的。它应该——它应该指向——
Apollo 11, Houston. Se lo vedete, dovrebbe essere in arrivo, o almeno così sembra, tra le nuvole. McDonald riferisce
نود
是的。好的，我前面四五项是：面板 3 上的 BAT CHARGE 开关关闭；AC INVERTER 2 关闭；面板 5：MAIN BUS TIE，BAT A/C 打开；面板 250：CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POST
Roger. Understand. Just for information, perhaps you read it out on the ground. I ran our pericynthian al
وكانت بلونك يا جون. كان وصفًا دقيقًا جدًا. مع ذلك، في الجانب المشرق، إذا نقرت عليها، فإنها تبدو بيضاء تمامًا. أ
好的，杰克。回到我之前教你的电池充电步骤。要终止充电，你只需要在我给你的电路开关旁边写上“打开”或“关闭”。所以，在25
알겠습니다. 기온은 영상 5도
Houston, a queste angolazioni so
好了，我要去放松
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven. Qui è B
أبولو 8، هيوستن. نعلم أنك تحاول التجسس علينا. بينما نحاول إعادة الاتصال بك، ه
Good evening. I'd like to discuss with you a few of the more symbolic aspects of the flight of our mission, Apollo 11. As we've been discussing the events that have taken place in the past 2 or 3 days here on board our spacecraft, we've come to the conclusion that this has been far more than three men on a voyage to the Moon; more, still, than the efforts of a government and industry team; more, even, than the efforts of one nation. We feel that this stands as a symbol of the insatiable curiosity of all mankind to explore the unknown. Neil's statement the other day upon first setting foot on the surface of the Moon, "This is a small step for a man, but a great leap for mankind," I believe sums up these feelings very nicely. We accepted the challenge of going to the Moon; the acceptance of this challenge was inevitable. The relative ease with which we carried out our mission, I believe, is a tribute to the timeliness of that acceptance. Today, I feel we're fully capable of accepting expanded roles in the exploration of space. In retrospect, we have all been particularly pleased with the call signs that we very laboriously chose for our spacecraft, Columbia and Eagle. We've been particularly pleased with the emblem of our flight, depicting the U.S. eagle bringing the universal symbol of peace from the Earth, from the planet Earth to the Moon; that symbol being the olive branch. It was our overall crew choice to deposit a replica of this symbol on the Moon. Personally, in reflecting on the events of the past several days, a verse from Psalms comes to mind to me. "When I consider the heavens, the work of Thy fingers, the moon and the stars which Thou hast ordained, what is man that Thou art
Voilà pour l'actualité internationale et nationale, ainsi que les reportages. Côté sport, Hank Stram, des Chiefs de Kansas City, a été nommé entraîneur de l'année de l'AFL. C'est la deuxième fois en trois saisons qu'il reçoit cette distinction. Le vote a été effectué par un panel de 30 journalistes et commentateurs sportifs de l'Associated Press, trois par ville. Le candidat le plus proche de lui était Wee
Вы действуете в полную силу
Okay. BIOMED, off; LOW BIT RATE; DOWNVOICE BACKUP; POWER AMP to PRIM
ドッキング
Roger. Un instant. 
他说，为了让MSC-1恢复运行，他们需要关闭ACQ辅助信
암말
罗杰，瓜伊马斯。助推器还在。我们现在离它相当远，而且消耗的燃料比我们预想的要多一些。目前，前后方向的窗口有61个燃料，左侧37个，上方36个。看起来我们目前勉强能跟上它。当然，随着我们继续前进，
Friendship Seven, this is Steelhead. Hold you in the water. What is your condition?
11, ह्यूस्टन। सब कुछ बहु
이 테이프들은 어때
电源，恢
Roger. We'd like to get both of you in the field of view of the ca
这是友谊七号在盲区进行录音。东非大部分地区都被云层覆盖，是那种飘渺的高空卷云。除了云层本身，几乎什么都看不见。偶尔能瞥见下面的地
11，休斯顿。请您确认一
Ok, Jack. La Terra ha ricominciato a scendere. L'hac
Êtes-vous sûr d'avoir activé l
Ja, 
No, not really
Avez-vous réussi à voir quelque chose au-dessus des États-Unis malgr
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Sonne, ich möchte hier eine Markierung setzen, wenn die Sonne untergeht. Die Sonne steht gerade am Horizont, ein strahlendes
We're thinking about 
И, Джим, когда у теб
एस्ट्रो ब्लू बोनेट के बड़े मैच के लिए, जो कि एक बड़ा बास्केटबॉल क्लासिक है, एस्ट्रो ब्लू बोनेट एसएमयू और ओक्लाहोमा की टीमें मैदान में उतर चुकी हैं। वे बड़े मुकाबले के लिए पूरी तरह से तैयार हैं। यहाँ यह नहीं बताया गया है कि कौन सी टीम प्रबल दावेदार है।
Vas-
Roger. I think the o
Ok. La prima cosa da fare è che il piano di volo indica che il CDR dovrebbe andare a dormire. La seconda, una specie di riassunto della tua combustione. Tutti i tuoi sistemi sembrano a posto. La traiettoria mostra che hai un CPA con una modalità di 63,67 miglia e il tempo di pericinto è... Hai una cattura su un buon ritorno libero. È un po' presto per valutare completamente la traiettoria per il controllo di corridoio. Non avrai aggiornamenti sui dati del blocco più 11. 
分かりました。私の考えは正しかったです
ठीक है, मुझे समझ आ गया, मैंने बिल से इ
알겠습니다. 1번 항목을 보면 두 번째 항목으로 12시간 켈빈 저온 유지(콜드 소크)가 있는데, 여기 논의와 비행 전 점검에서 저온 유지는 하지 않는 것이 좋겠다는
मुझे लगता है कि हम इसे... से...
Yuri Alekseyevich, abbiamo un problema: dopo aver chiuso il portello, uno dei contatti non si è colle
埃德开始拆卸东西，当我们到达无法再操作助推器的位置时，我便全心全意地帮他——至少帮忙拿着东西，把它们收好，尽量不让它们丢失。我们干得越快，进度就越落后。倒不是因为我们没按规矩来，只是比我们预想的要花更多时间。在零重力环境下操作其实并不比在模拟器里容易多少，甚至可能差不多。所以我们只能绕着轨道转一圈。到了卡那封轨道时，我已经认定我们无法完成任务，但我还是想再坚持一下。当我们到达卡那封轨道——或者说就在我们离开卡那封轨道之前——我清楚地意识到我们无法完成减压。我请求跳到下一个轨道。然后……我们喘了大约20分钟，试图整理我散落在驾驶舱里的杂物。然后我拿出检查清单，我们又仔细地核对了一遍，确保匆忙中没有遗漏任何步骤。舱外活动开始——在卡那封上空收到了启动指令。一切准备就绪，我们等待着开始减压
396
那应该很有
Non. Je me posais juste la question: nous n’avions pas encore su si nous all
नहीं। नहीं। यह क्षितिज के निचले हिस्से से, वायु की चमक वाली परत से होते हुए सीधे ऊपर आया। जब मैंने इसे पहली बार देखा, तब से लेकर वायु की चमक वाली परत के शीर्ष तक पहुँचने में मुझे 3 मिनट और
유리
0.1 डिग्री। संभवतः जीडीसी का अनुमान इससे
ما سأفعله - دعني أكرر - حسنًا. دعني أكرر كل شيء لك. صمام ضغط العبوة، مُغلق؛ ضغط مقصورة الطوارئ، مُغلق؛ الأكسجين المباشر، مُغلق؛ منظمي الطلب، مُغلقان؛ مُجمّعا الماء، مُجمّعا الماء والجليكول، مُغلقان؛ ا
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, Option 1 zu wählen und sich wie im Flugplan angegeben nach 12 Stunden in Position zu bringen. Beginnen Sie bitte sofort damit, Mike. Wir haben eini
Houston, Apollo 11. Hey, Ron, I wonder if you coul
मैक्स कॉनराड, जो एक और विमान चालक हैं और अपने हल्के विमान से दुनिया का चक्कर लगा रहे हैं, उन्होंने क्रिसमस का दिन अंटार्कटिका में बिताया - चिली के पुएन्टो अरनेस में; वे अच्छे मौसम का इंतजार कर रहे हैं ताकि वे अपनी उड़ान जारी रखते हुए दक्षिणी ध्रुव तक जा सकें। उन्हें दुनिया का चक्कर लगाने की उम्मीद है। वे दोनों ध्रुवों के चारों ओर चक्कर लगा रहे हैं, और वे पामर से बर्ड तक, बर्ड से दक्षिणी ध्रुव तक उड़ान भरेंगे, और फिर न्यूजीलैंड, ऑस्ट्रेलिया और हवाई होते हुए संयुक्त राज्य अमेर
نعم، آسف، أوقف تشغيلها. محركات الدفع الخاصة بنظام OAMS Power Attitude تعمل بشكل جيد. قراءة ا
我最后一枪的射击角度大约是向下90度，向
ठीक है। मैं आपको बस इतना बता देता हूँ - मुझे लगता है कि जो मेरे पास है उसे बताना आसान होगा। ठीक है, 11 नंबर की पहली पंक्ति में, हमारे पास चार AC BUS TIE ब्रेकर IN और AC BUS VOLTS ब्रेकर IN हैं, बस इतना ही। दूसरी पंक्ति में, हमारे पास चार TCA ब्रेकर IN हैं। FLIGHT DISPLAYS और COMMA
नहीं, अभी नहीं। अगर आपसे संपर्क टूट जाता है, तो शायद अगले स्टे
Meno 00014, più tutti zeri, più 00001 000 304 000, non applicabile, più 00191 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225 Shaula, su 236 000, più 0813, meno 16503 12202 36301, Sirio, Rigel, 308 209 
Das ist richtig. Wir müssen sie schließen, um die Schalter mit Strom zu versorgen. Als Nächstes müssen wir 
और, एक्वेरियस, इससे पहले कि
Voyons voir. Je ne sais pas si je dois mettre mes gants. Comment ça se présente là-bas? Pas mal
Roger. E ho un paio di cose che vorrei sistemare. Ti faremo avere un budget. Ora abbiamo una linea rossa; stiamo cercando di fornirti dati più precisi, e li avremo tra poco. Al momento il tuo utilizzo è proprio sulla linea del piano di volo, quindi tutto sembra a posto. Vogliamo ricevere da te un rapporto sullo stato dell'equipaggio. Vorremmo confermare l'idea 
Carnarvon. Gemini VIII, wenn Sie bereit für den Beschleunigungs
Sigma Seven, Cape Com Tech U
Nous discutons de deux points, mais 
Apol
Prenez quelques gros plans de ces gros rochers asse
了解。キャビンの圧力は6ps
네. 아, 제가 알고 싶은 건 몇 개인지, 그리고 이 차량에 있어야 할 두 개의 작은 중간 코스는 
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Alle Systeme funktionieren einwandfrei, wir sehen uns auf der anderen Seite. End
객실 압력 방출 밸브. 객실 압력 방출 밸브가 
제미니 4, 제미니
プログラムオフィスに伝えて、すぐにでも取り組んでみ
アポロ8号、ヒューストン
맞습니다. 회로 차단기 센서 유닛 
Vas-y, Steelhead. 
视轴星为地球，向下 037°，向右 22°，正北 10°68′，负北 165°00′128″56″361″18″。校准星：主星为天狼星，副星为参宿七 (Rigel) 010°，正北 294°，正北 320°，无空隙，路径返回，8750°。此航向通往印度洋，需要高速程序，即缺少 Mike Alfa，请参阅您的清单页面“11 月 C
Близнецы 4, Канарс
Bene, faremo tutto ciò che ritieni essenziale, ma non voglio dover cambiare le cose all'ultimo minuto. Quello a cui sti
حسنًا. الخطوة 2: "مُوازن الاقتران، مُطفأ؛ النطاق الميت، الحد الأدنى؛ التحكم في الوضع: الميل والدوران إل
Okay, it's pitching up slightly. Going up above zero. I don't have a scanner light. man, is it dark
Okay, Fred-o. Okay. Das ist „Einstieg, VORBEREITUNG“. Beginnt 6 Stunden vor dem Start. Dann schalten Sie das ACS ein. Ich gebe Ihnen jeweils eine Zeile vor, und wenn Sie das bestätigt haben, gehe ich zur
Aquarius, Houston. Après avoir actionné le commutateur OMNI, veuillez désactiver 
حسنًا، لم أطرح هذا الم
जेमिनी 4, कार्नार्वोन कैप क
Roger. Ora, se superiamo il controllo, puoi se
好的。您的服务模块四极管 Bravo 组件的温度显示略
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Mike, stiamo ancora 
11، هيوست
Okay.
いいえ、予想
L'horizon est ici d'une noirceur saisissante. Le ciel est d'un noir absolu, et la Terre – ou plutôt la Lune, pardonnez-moi – est d'une clarté remarquable; le contraste entre le ciel et la lune forme une ligne sombre et nette. Apparaissent maintenant dans le champ de vision de l'appareil photo d'intéressants cratères à double anneau, des formations typiques des mers lunaires, remplies d'un matériau de même consistance et de même couleur que les mers. En voici trois ou quatre. Plus loin à l'horizon, on aperçoit… Les mont
ओह, कंप्यूटर को अभी बहुत कु
了解
Ich glaube, da ist nichts geklapp
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはインディアン・キャップ・コム。君たちの逆再生タイ
Abbiamo notato la familiare pulsazione nelle tute quando avevamo il RECIRC completame
Bene. Al punto 6, quasi in fondo (in realtà, sono tre righe dalla fine del punto 6), c'è una sezione che dice di RESET dell'evaporatore del circuito di raffreddamento secondario, e dovrebbe esserci una nota che sono 58 secondi se lo si tiene premuto RESET prima di spe
That's affirmative, Jim. We haven't got a picture of it yet. It's going to be in the top part of the - Correction, top part of the at the top of the - the top of detent 2 and the top part of the, and it should, in attitude, if you're right on the Sun, should split the cursor, though that roll angle is not too critical; if we're in about 10 degrees, we'll be okay. We - but I think - we th
А ч
Roger. Wir konnten einen Ruck spüren, als wir BANK B einsetzten, nicht wirklich einen Ruck
क्या पृथ्वी ऊपर आ 
Вы собираетесь начать с этой процедуры или с этой 30
VI,
Ti ho sentito f
マーク
Gemini 4, Houston
हाँ।
Roger. Das ist ein VOGAA-Signal, das 
햇빛에서 그림자로 들어갈 때, 그림자 속으로 들어가는 순간 얼굴에서 반사된 빛과 함께 헬멧 바이저에도 추가적인 반사광이 생겨 시야가 매우 나빠지는 것을 여러 번 목격했습니다. 햇빛에서 그림자로 바뀌는 바로 그 순간, 바이저에 너무 많은 눈부심이 들어와 헬멧 자체가 그림자에 가려지게 됩니다. 그러다가 눈이 주변 조명에 적응하는 데 시간이 좀 걸립니다. 그림자 안쪽에서는 앞서 말했듯이 시야가 좋지 않지만, 양쪽 바이저를 모두 올려서 발자국이나 지면 상태 등을 확인할 수 있습니다. 햇빛 아래에서 잠시 있다가 다시 시야가 트이면... 조심해, 닐! 닐,
제미니 4, RKV. 지휘 조종사
Tolle Vorst
Okay. We can put off this NAV sighting. It was scheduled here at, and we can put it off, Judging from your comments about sleeping, we would like to get it as soon as we can, and right now, our pla
Gemini VIII, Houston CAP COM. Si vous avez le temps, faites-nous part de votre e
Ho detto che pensavi di dorm
好的
わかりました。まず、お渡しした基本設定に一つ変更があります。サーキットブレーカーを2つ追加で開きます。パネル225ですね。書き留めていただけます
알았어. 프레드
네, 기본적으로는 맞습니다. 제가 간단히 설명드린 후 단계별로 안내해 드리겠습니다. 그러면 더 이해하기 쉬울 겁니다. 이 방법은 망원경으로 달을 관측할 수 있도록 특정 각도로 이동하는 것입니다. 어떤 자세에서든 망원경으로 별의 무늬를 충분히 식별하여 스스로 정렬할 수 있다고 판단되면, 그 시점에서 이 절차를 중단하고 직접 정렬을 진행하도록 하시면 됩니다. 하지만 저희는 반사나 기타 요인에 대한 걱정 없이 망원경으로 관측할 수 있는 조건을 충족하는 방법을 알려드리는 것이며, 별의 무늬가 충분히 선명하게 보인다면 그 이후에는 이 절차를 굳이 따라야 할 필요는 없습니다. 계속 진행해야 한다면, 기동을 하면서 달을 살펴보고 거기에 표시를 하겠습니다. 그런 다음 다시 각도를 조정하여 태양을 살펴보고 태양에 또 다른 표시를 하면 정렬이 완료됩니다. 정렬 방식은 다음과 같습니다. 저희가 달을 가리키는 동안 구체를 대략적으로 정렬할 수 있는 각도 세트를 제공해 드릴 것입니다. 이 각도 세트는 여러분이 공칭값으로 설정한 값과 일치합니다. 이 각도 세트에 맞춰 대략적으로 정렬하고, 드리프트 플래그와 REFSMMAT 플래그를 설정하면 좋은 플랫폼을 확보하고 정확한 정렬에서 몇 도 이내의 오차 범위 내에 있게 됩니다. 필요하다면 이 시점에서 중단하고 진입을 시도할 수도 있지만, 좋은 플랫폼을 확보하기 위해 옵션 1을 진행하도록 하겠습니다. 옵션 1 슬롯에는 진입 정보가 있습니다. 값을 계산해 주시면, 공의 진입 자세를 대략적으로 조정한 다음 일반적인 순
杰克，对接隧道指数为
Апо
우리가 바로 그 위를 지나갔는데. 분명히 보일 텐데. 그냥 불빛 몇 
وهنا في الأسفل، أظ
I didn't think you were. I let you overshoot 15 minutes worth. I was doing D-8, and there wasn't any re
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, ici Kano
そして、5番目の質問の答えになったと思います。動力飛行中に通信に関する問題
Roger, Bruce. Merci. Nous attendons la télévision. Tout est branché. Nous ne l'avons pas encore allumée. Nous sommes prêts à 
रॉजर। पिछली बार जब हमने इस पर चर्चा की थी, तब से केवल एक ही बदलाव आया है कि हम.05
Je ne 
Apollo 8, Houston. Par ailleurs, concernant le plan de vol, nous souhaiterions que vous procédiez à une purge d'oxygène des piles à com
Poursuiv
Okay, just a second. Let me get the 
알겠습니다, 프랭크. 여기 체크리스트에 KG-1, E-1 페이지에 명시된 대로, 일반적
로저, 브루스. 시간 되시면 
الوضع جيد الآن يا هيوستن، فيما يتعلق بعدم وج
Houston, coming through
わかりました。それでは、星11の代わりに星1、月の遠い地平線の代わりに月の近
Okay. Brennregeln. Wir sollten den Brennvorgang abbrechen, wenn der Schubmonitor 77 % oder weniger anzeigt; 2. wenn der Treibstoffdruck unter 160 psi liegt; 3. wenn das Verhältnis von
اقرأ
好的，开始吧。我们希望TM保持运行5到10分钟，以便查看CM的数据；看看温度等等。之
This is Friendship Seven, having no trouble controlling on fly-by-wir
休
알겠습니다, 우주선 사령관님. 여기는 우메라 시스템입니다. 우메라와 무체아 상공을 지나는 동안 고출력 추진 
حسنًا، في القناة - في الصفحة 18، ​​مباشرةً بعد ذلك، كل شيء يبقى على حاله حتى بعد "الإشعال"؛ "إذا لم يكن هناك إشعال، اضغط على زر التشغيل - اضغط؛ إذا لم يكن هن
حسنًا. 10، /: 45597، ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 35186، ناقص 01512، ناقص 00520 180 007 000، نوفمبر ألفا، زائد 00186 35223 318 35018 42 09
Aquarius, we're r
Bon, une fois que tout sera r
Приготовьтесь к первому р
Roger. Capisco. Giusto per informazione, forse l'hai letto a terra. Ho eseguito la nostra determinazione dell'altitudine pericinzia usando prima di tutto,. Il vettore di stato stellare con cui abbiamo navigato, abbiamo 
Apollo 13, Houston. 
マイク、彼らが展開したレーザー反射光線からの反射を我々は取得しており、少し後にそこから何らかの情報を得ることができるかもしれな
로저. 저희는 
11番、ヒュ
Down 80 degrees in 7 minutes, that's - let's see, about 1
Columbia, this is Houston. We request that you perform another. We'd like you to let the AUTO o
حسنًا. وقم بوضع علامة عن
सुन
Un po' più in basso. Lo tolgo da
Phase terminale: temps écoulé 1 + 29 + 17; fin de la manœuvre: 5 + 16 + 54; Delta-V: 33,0; durée: 41 secondes; Noyau 25: 00301; Noyau 26: 90135; Noyau 27: 00016; Delta-V: 32,9, 1,5, 1,5; temps de combustion: 40 s vers l’avant, 4 s vers le bas, 4 s vers la gauche; lacet: zéro, tangage: 26,8; portée: 
Yes, I've been trying to get roll out. Roll to zero. Just go ahead to zero, I'm going to put it in ATT HOLD. Then it'll take out yaw, leaving pitch the way it is; then we're going to pit
Roger
Rog
ROTATIONAL HAND CONTROL
Хьюстон. Ка
The last station that talked on HF I could not identify. It came in very clear and should be recorded aboard the capsule at approximat
По многочисленным кратерам видно, что эта планета на протяжении тысячелетий подвергалась бомбардировке множеством мелких астероидов и метеороидов, которые усеивают 
وفي واشنطن، وافقت ل
네. 오늘 아침 뉴스는 그다지 특별한 게 없네요. 좀 조용합니다. 가장 큰 뉴스를 꼽자면 연휴 기간 사고 사망자 수인데, 물론 유쾌한 소식은 아니지만 전국적으로 233명이 사망했고, 그중 9명이 크리스마스 이브에 휴스턴에서 발생했습니다. 세계 뉴스에서는 또다시 유가족 소식이 화제가 되었습니다. 북한이 이번 주에 공개한 아폴로 8호 승무원 가족들이 USS 푸에블로호 함장 로이드 
D'accord, Jim. Pourriez-
Haben Sie die 
जी हाँ। फ्रैंक, हम लगभग दो घंटे म
いや、いや。地平線の底から、大気の輝きの層を突き抜けて、まっすぐに上がってきたんだ。最初に見た時から、私が大気の輝きの層の最上部だと思ってい
Sogar die Kinder i
わかりました。もう一度、先ほど「順序は重要ではない」と言った部分ですが、戻っても順序は重要ではありません。では、先に進みましょう。パネル4：TELCOMM、GROUP 1、AC1ですが、AC1ではなくOFFになります。パネル5：この
Der erste Befehl zum Laden i
Roger. Würde 
Wir sehen, dass Sie die Abdeckung der Abbruchphase hochgeklappt haben. Das em
Okay. C'è un atteggiamento particolare che vorresti c
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。你们看起来很适合进行
吉姆，这件事我暂时保密。我不知道
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। ईगल वापस कक्षा मे
오
没错。特别是这些燃烧将垂直于
그리고 복사할 준비가 되셨다면, 찰리가 잠시 후 여러분의 다음 번
इस समय मुझे लगभग 5 डिग्री का दायाँ घुमाव साफ़ दिखाई दे रहा है, और मैंने द
Et, sur la rangée du bas, Jack, je vais laisse
Не на этой высоте, и это странно. Мне казалось,
わか
好的。在面板 5 上，断开电源 
Хорошо. Следующая страница, питание 7, панель 16. В перв
Okay. Löschen Sie „AUTO SELECT, 16, OFF“. Ändern Sie „CB LOGIC POWER“ in „LOGIC THRUST POWER - CBS CS LOGIC THRUST, four, to closed“. Löschen Sie „DELTA-V CG“. Weiter unten steht „SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER, one, AC 1; 
Okay, chamber pressure's falling off a little bit; now it's going
알겠습니다. 해당 페이지의 모든 내
Apoll
Okay. We have been operating with the face-plate open and gloves off now for about the last 12 hours, but mostly 
حسناً يا جاك. هل تريد منا أن نتابع
Roger. Thank you, Gemini 4. Back ove
Nun, Frank, es scheint an der Trennstelle zwischen – es könnte das Fibergla
حسنًا. هذا أفضل بكثير، ونعتقد أن خلل البطارية لديك كان مجرد تنبيه من المفتا
了解しました。ビルが寝る前に、都合の
Это «Дружба Семь». Она снова дрейфует
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Судя по нашим наблюдения
네. 아주 밝은 분화구네요. 크기는 크지 않지만 엄청나게 밝습니다. 아주 최근에 생긴 것 같고, 제 생각에는 충돌 분화구인 것 같은데, 사방으로 빛이 뻗어 나가고 있어서 제가, 아니, 정정하자면, 지금 거품바다가 그 위로 다가오는 게 잘 보일 겁니다. 크레이터 캠프는 거
В тот момент, когда вы сообщали нам положение ваших переключателей, мы находились в прямой видимости над Гавайями. Мы распозна
1/
Ich h
早上好，阿波罗8号！我是迪克。我谨代
1, G&N: 62710, плюс 098, минус 019, зажигание 075 49 4965, минус 28897, минус 03944, минус 00686. Крен 358, шаг 226, 347; 01692, плюс 00610; 29173 602 29108; секстант 31 1066 358. Остальная часть PAD — NA. Вы
카노 콤 테크, 여기는 시그마 세
Roger, Amicizia Sette. Qui è Canto
了解。リードバックは以下の通りです。TIG 124 22 0000 55349 00322、プラス0017、プラス3710
حسنًا. ش
알겠습니다, 짐. 이해했습니다. 저희가 그걸 복사했는데, 혹시 다시
Hallo. Roger, Frien
Bon, pour répondre à la question nu
Die Raten... Ja, d
Très bien. Nous avons bloqué la lumière du soleil qui entrait par les autres fenêtres du vaisseau spatial; l'image est donc prise par la fenêtre numéro 1, et 
よし
저희는 지난 24시간 동안 프랭크 씨와 비슷한 증상을 겪으신 분이 있는지 알고 싶습니다. 또한, 
जैक, ह्यूस्टन। फिर से शुरू करो। मैं उसकी नकल नहीं कर रहा 
Хорошо. Что касается 226 автоматических выключателей, о которых я читал, то их шесть, и все они — первые шесть слева в нижнем ряду панели. Они находятся в разделе ОСВЕЩЕНИЕ. 
Ich habe den Auslass Ihres Warmwasserboilers genau im Blick... sieht klein au
А что, если вы заденете дно – заденете дно под этой крышкой? Это по
D'accord. Nous reproduisons la largeur du golfe Persique, et je suppose que la seule donnée que je puisse vous fournir de première main est un seul point de données isolé: le ciel était dégagé ici à Houston ce matin. C'est une observation assez
Ganz genau, CAP COM, die Kanone lässt sich super einfach manövrieren. Mein einziges Problem ist der Treibstoffmangel. Ich habe jetzt den ganzen Treibstoff verbraucht und konnte mich um die Vorderseite des Raumschiffs herummanövrieren, nach hinten und bis ganz nach oben zum Adapter. Fast... bin ich wieder 
D'accord. Est-il bien clair que vous avez besoin du trempage à froid? Nous avions prévu de le fair
Roge
Fred-o, we've got one more change we'd like to give you to clarify a question that 
هاواي. كل شيء يبدو على م
알겠습니다. 짐, 통화
알겠습니다. 드로그 전개 및 착수까지 걸리는 시간을 5
Devinez quoi
Capire; stel
Okay, Jack. What you're reading now the angles? We had the Moon centered, and it's pretty close to what we have on the 8 ball, I gue
ठीक है, फ्रेड। अगले कुछ घंटों में हम कुछ काम करने वाले हैं, जिनके बारे में मुझे आपसे कुछ बातें करनी हैं। इसके लिए और रेंजिंग के कुछ मिनट देने के लिए, मैं चाहता हूं कि आप पैनल 16 में पावर एम्पलीफायर सर्किट ब्रेकर को चालू करें, वॉइस फंक्शन
没错。还有下面两行“30秒”。实际上
Roger. We copy. I'm looking back in the 
अपोलो 8,
네, 그럴 수도 있겠네요. 아주 특이한 결합 방식인데, 예상보다 반응 시간이 길고 반응도 예상
ठीक
네. 이
D'accord. Merci. À bord, nous avons les relevés suiv
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴에
Ok. Il tuo 
रॉजर, बिल। अब हम आपकी बात साफ़-साफ़ सुन पा रहे हैं। यहाँ हमारे एंटीना 
わかりました。フレッドさん、参考までに、機内でのCO2濃度の測定値は地上で測定している値より少し高いので、メーターが15になったらセカンダリーに切り替えてくだ
하와이
Quo
Ricevuto. Capito; si suppone che si tratti di uno sfiato non propulsivo. 
लेकिन तुम्हारे पास उस सामान से भरा एक थैला कहीं यहीं पड़ा था.
Sì. Ci ha
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। लगता है अच्छा समय बीतेगा। एक घंटा पहले प
Z 칼로리 끄기
罗杰。我快到第三个控制点了。
Okay, Joe. Since we're ahead of the time line, can I proceed 
On ouvre le récipient extérieur, on y insère 
この辺りのビルの食べ物を片付けて、どこかへ持っていくことができればいいのですが。このエリアの下には「下部機器ベイ」と呼ばれている場所があり、ここには光学測位機器があります。私たちはここで星や月か地球の地平線を視準して、すべてのナビゲーションを行っています。そして、ここで私たちが宇宙のどこにいるのか、どの方向に、どのくらいの速さで移動しているのかを正確に把握します。そして、フランクが言ったように、私たちのコンピューターが情報を受け取り、安全に帰還するための操縦方法を教えてくれます。私は走査望遠鏡
음, 좋습니다. 오늘 아침에 M선과 얼마나 평행한지 확인해 보겠습니다. 처음 마킹을 시작하기 전에, 세 각도의 계산이 다소 정확하지 않은 것 같았고, 그 세 각도를 측정한 후 M선을 평행하게 맞추기 위해 큰 자세 변경을 해야 해서 연료 낭비가 심했습니다. 어떤 경우에는 허용된 자세만 필요해 보였는데, 여러
حسنًا. نحتاج إلى - عفواً (ضحك
이제 저희는 S-6, 정확히는 S-5라고 해야 할 첫 번째 실제 S-6 촬영을 진행할 예정입니다. 이는 미국 서부 상공을 지나는 제32
And Boothill, Duke Island, Sidewinder, looking at Ma
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。中間軌道からの観測に基づき、ガンマはマイナス6.57です。ただし、これは暫定的な値です。もう少し追跡すれば、軌道に乗れるようになり、軌道上に調整できると考えています。軌道のほぼ中央に位置しており、状況は良好です。就寝の数時間前に進入PADをお送りします。広報担当から、あなたの飛行に関するニュース以外の見出しをいくつかお伝えします。あなたは依然としてニュースを独占していますね。しかし、他にも興味深いニュースがあります。先ほどもお伝えしたように、オールスターゲームは雨天中止となりました。明日開催されます。しかし、ニクソン大統領は予定通り観戦することはできません。結果については、引き続きお知らせします。それから、天気予報も皆さんにとって良い天気になるでしょう。私たちの予報では、回収エリアの天気は良好のようです。外はきっと晴れるでしょう。ニクソン大統領は、皆さんの帰還を迎えるために出発の準備を進める中で、31年以内に人類は少なくとも一つの惑星を訪れ、そこに何らかの生命が存在するだろうと予測しました。「2000年には、この地球に住む私たちは、生命が存在するであろう新しい惑星を
还有，13
Roger. Nei
好了，各位机组人员。我现在唯一要告诉你们的就是起飞后35小时的发射台位置更新。这是我们昨天给你们的发射台位置的变更。更新的原因是为了避开太平洋中部着陆区在70小时的天气状况，因为70小时是该发射
Mit diesem Wiedereintrittsmechanismus ohne Auftrieb können wir
روجر، حالة الطقس في منطقة التعافي هي: غطاء سحابي بنسبة 0.5%، مدى الرؤية 10 أميال، سرعة الرياح 3 عقد، قادمة من الشمال بزاو
はい、その通りです。夜通し、半径
이제 저희는 S-6, 정확히는 S
I susp
分かりました。デカールのステップ13に関するご質問ですが、REPRESS O2のパッケージの中身を使い切ったとのことですが、その時点では5
收到。请
Roge
Хорошо. После PC + 2 требований к триммированию нет; и, если во время PC + 2 произойдет выключение двигателя, последующие маневры на среднем у
음, 타나나리브
Хорошо. Шаг 7: "Панель автоматических выключателей 11, шина переменного тока B, дисплей подачи гелия PQGS, замкнут. Автоматический выключатель 11, шина переменного тока B, цифровая подсветка, замкнут. Автоматический выключатель 11, шина переменного тока B, инвертор 1, замкнут. Панель автоматических выключателей 11, инвертор 1, замкнут. П
Um auf meine Nachbesprechung zum Booster vom Anfang des Fluges zurückzukommen: Nachdem wir in die Dunkelheit eingetreten waren, in einer geschätzten Entfernung von 1200 Fuß, versuchte ich, die Position des Boosters zu halten. Zu diesem Zeitpunkt konnte ich meine Entfernung zum Booster jedoch nur anhand des Abstands zwischen den blinkenden Lichtern einschätzen. Gelegentlich – nicht gelegentlich, sondern ständig – sah ich ein Licht, dann zwei, dann wieder nur eines, und manchmal verging eine lange Zeit, bis ich wieder zwei Lichter sah. Dies deutete darauf hin, dass sich der Booster permanent drehte. Ich hatte keine Ahnung, in welche Richtung er flog. Anhand des Abstands zwischen den Lichtern, wenn ich beide sehen konnte, fühlte ich mich bis etwa Carnarvon in einer recht guten Position. Dort schien ich mich recht schnell zu nähern, obwohl ich mir dessen nicht sicher war. Die gesamte bis da
Это Sigma 
Apollo 11, Houston. Noch dreißig Sekunden. Beide Raumschiffe seh
Beweg
Jawohl, Jack. Wir haben eine hohe Verstärkung eingestellt und es scheint uns,
Es war definitiv unter mir. Ich hatte es seit etwa Carnarvon unter mir verfolgt. Bis Carnarvon war es unter uns, dann bis zum Horizont und dann wieder unter uns. Es sah fast so aus, als befände es sich in einer anderen Umlaufbahn als ich. Es hatte einen anderen Apogäum und Perigäum als ich. Jedenfalls versuchte ich, mich ihm bei Tagesanbruch anzunähern, sobald ich seine Position bestimmen konnte. Wie gesagt, zu diesem Zeitpunkt war es ein bis zwei Meilen vor mir – unter mir. Je mehr ich versuchte, mich anzunähern, desto weniger Abstand gewann ich. Ich zündete die Triebwerke in Richtung Gegengeschwindigkeit. Ich zündete meine oberen Triebwerke so, dass ich meine Gesamtgeschwindigkeit verringerte und dann gleichzeitig zündete. Ich konnte mich nie wirklich annähern, und es entfernte sich immer weiter. Mir wurde klar, dass wir, um die Boosterstufe rechtzeitig für den Außenbordeinsatz (EVA) in Hawaii anzunähern, wahrscheinlich unseren gesamten Treibsto
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie können die 37er-Marke heben, wir werden das Ganze vom Boden aus beobachten und sehen
Vediamo. A Springfield, Missouri, Mickey Owen, il ricevitore storico dei Brooklyn Dodgers che è entrato nel libro dei record segnando un terzo strike che ha portato i New York Yankees alla vittoria sui Dodgers nelle World Series del '41, ha deciso che sarebbe stato ricordato per qualcosa di più del suo record sportivo. Quarantacinque ragazzi e ragazze hann
روجر
حسنًا. انخفض مستوى التحكم التلقائي في الكسب (AGC) إلى ما أسميه مستوى الضوضاء، وهو مستوى الجهد المقاس ع
了解。
好的，刚才的问题是什么来着？我听不太清楚
嘿，你现在
Sigma Seven this is Woomera Cap Com. Your transmis
एंट्री पैड इस प्रकार है: 
Indi
روجر. أنبوب التصريف ممتلئ بالسائل. وصل السائل إلى منتصف الجزء الخارجي من الأنبوب - وهو عبارة عن سطح هلالي ك
アクエリアス、ヒュースト
休斯顿，
제 생각엔 그럴 것 같은데, 다시 확인해 볼게요. 아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 네, 맞습니다. 원하시면 서
이 함선은 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 망원경으로 보나 창밖으로 보나 아프리카 해안의 아름다운 경
हाँ, चार्ली, यह बिल्कुल सही है। कभी-कभी यह हमें बातें बताता है और कभी-कभी हम इसे बातें बताते हैं, और ज्याद
你的声音清晰响
रॉजर, मैंने धुंध की परतें तो देखीं, लेकिन वैसी नहीं जो क्षितिज से अलग थीं, जैसा हमने सोचा था और जिसके बारे में जॉन ने बताया था। अगली बार मैं ध्यान से देखूंगा और सूर्यास्त के बाद उन्हें देखने की कोशिश करूंगा। प्रकाश की ओर, चमकीली, इंद्रधनुषी नीली परत के अलावा और कुछ नहीं है, जो वास्तविक क्षितिज को अंतरिक्ष के गहरे काले रंग से अलग करती है। समाप्
收到。这里是友谊七号，手动电传操纵，操控一切正常。非常平稳轻松，操控性极佳。左侧面板上的保险丝位置不变。点火装置已启动。自动反推装置已关闭。电传操纵、自动和陀螺仪功能均正常。所有燃油和“T”型手柄均已就位，反推延迟功能正常。现在透过舷窗可以看到美丽的海岸线景色。刚刚起飞。可以看到佛
सीबी सीटीई, मेन ए और 
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston, ein Blindensender. Falls Sie lesen könn
रॉजर, बिल। आपके दृष्टिकोण के आधार पर, हम पिच कोण शून्य का अनुरोध कर रहे हैं, और हम आपको लगभग 27 डिग्री पिच दिखा रहे हैं और यह बढ़ रहा है। ओव
Хорошо. Правила работы двигателя. Мы должны выключить его, если показания монитора тяги составляют 77 процентов или ниже; пункт 2, если давление топлива в свободном пространстве меньше 160 psi; пункт 3, если дельта-параметр окислителя топлива превышает 25, и это будет сигналом тревоги на земле; пункт 4, если ошибка ориентации составляет плюс-минус 10 градусов, за исключением переходных процессов при запуске. Хорошо. Ограничения скорости составляют плюс-минус 10 градусов в секунду. И индикатор ENGINE GIMBAL, индикатор ISS с PROGRAM ALARM, индикатор CES DC и индикатор инвертора, если он все еще горит п
और, ह्यूस्टन, आपको शायद यह जानकर दिलचस्पी होगी कि अभी मेरी बाईं ओर की खिड़की से, मैं पूरे उत्तरी अमेरिका महाद्वीप, अलास्का और ध्रुव के ऊपर से लेकर युकाटन प्रायद्वीप, क्यूबा, ​​दक्षिण अमेरिका के उत्तरी भाग तक देख सकता हूँ, और फिर खिड़की का हिस
12.5くらいですね。ゲージの不具合だと思います… マスターアラームは鳴ったのに警告灯は点灯しませんでした。CO2が限界に近づいているからだろうとなんとなく思っていました。もしかしたら、ここでは
Buzz, ici Houston. F/2 - 1/160e de seconde pour la prise de vue en ombres chinoises avec l
ठीक है, अपोलो 13 की उड़ान की तुलना अपोलो 8 से करने पर, टेक-ऑफ के दौरान लगभग उतना ही कंपन हुआ जितना मैंने अपोलो 8 में महसूस किया था, लेकिन उड़ान की शुरुआत में, अपोलो 8 की तुलना में पार्श्व गति कम थी। S-IC पृथक्करण अपोलो 13 में अपोलो 8 की तुलना में अधिक तीव्र लगा, शायद इसलिए कि मैं अलग सीट पर बैठा था, मुझे नहीं पता। लेकिन S-II के चलने से पहले कट-ऑफ के लगभग तीन तीव्र क्षणिक झटके आए और दो बड़े धमाके हुए जिनमें हम अपनी पट्टियों के बल पीछे की ओर उछल गए। और S-II, नंबर 5 इंजन को छोड़कर, अपोलो 13 में भी उतना ही सुचारू था जि
Il volo avvisa che se sei troppo im
Hell
Okay, Jim. We're seeing the tape recorder now, and just -
D'accord. Je les ai laissés tourner sans problème et nos températures se si
أرجئ آخر تحديث لي. لقد تراجعت قوتها إلى 
Un anello di uno dei nostri libri si è staccato. Sembra che sarebbe un bel problema se si staccassero tu
Oui. Faites-le vous-
Р
ठीक है, वैंस, मैं आगे बढ़ने के लिए तैयार ह
वैंस, क्या आप सभी ने इस बारे में सोच लिया है कि आप कौन से कैमरे इस्तेमाल करना चाहते हैं? अभी 
フランク、ビルが起きたら声をかけて
ジム、あなたの話の全ては聞き取れませんでしたが、入港時の手順がいつ公開され、あなたに読み上げられるようになるのかを知りたかったのだと思います。もしそうなら、それは120時間くらい
范斯，据我计算，我们已经拍摄了大约10张地球窗口照片。除了过一会儿要关闭这里的废物储存通风口之外，我想这里没什么事了。我打算
Roger, Houston. We got a 4 / 45695, minus 053 plus 141, plus 30627, minus 00625, plus 00577 180 018 001, NA, plus 00188 30639 256 30452 40 2730 396 033, down 030, left 19, plus 0858, minus 16500, plus 12960, plus 36195 ; Sirius, Rigel, 129 155 010, two quads, 20 seconds B and D, horizon 2 degre
في الحجرة A1، 
Bene, ora sono tornato alla Croce del Sud con la zona leggermente punteggiata di - credo un sacco di stelle molto chiare... Non ricordo di aver visto esattamente la stessa cosa nel planetario. Alfa Centauri e Beta sono piuttosto nitide. Sono ancora lì - sta iniziando a fare luce e riesco ancora a vedere parecchie stelle. Credo che ora s
Correzione, R
Quei ragazzi laggiù nella sala stampa hanno fatto un ottimo l
حسنًا، ممتاز. الخطوة التالية هي تثبيت الشريط، والطريقة المطلوبة هي قصّ قطعة بطول قدمين تقريبًا من اللفة، ثم تمزيقها طوليًا للحصول على شريطين بطول قدمين وعرض نصف بوصة تقريبًا. لفّ هذين الشريطين حول العلبة بزاوية قائمة تقريبًا على الشريط الموجود لديك، بحيث يمرّ عبر الجزء العلوي والسفلي. عند الانتهاء، ضع الشريط بحيث 
حسنًا. الطاقة الدورانية العادية رقم 2،
アポロ8号、ヒュース
ア
わかりました。そこに押し込んでいる観測データを削除してください。そして45分後（訂正）に、各星に
友情七号，这里是卡诺Ca
Okay. Apollo 11, Houston. We've got the picture back no
毎秒44フィートですが、これについては別
Controllo dell'assetto: utilizzerai il comando di velocità o il comando di velocità d
D'acc
현재 비행
لا، لم أفعل ذلك - لم أنم منذ كل ما حدث في الليلة السابقة، وذهبت للنوم لمدة أربع ساعات تقريبً
Hal
Roger. Mike, je pense que nous pouvons expliquer ce taux de sept dixièmes. Lors de notre premier essai, nous n'avons pas réussi à effectuer le test, ce qui a entraîné une erreur importante entre le CDU réel et le CDU souhaité en roulis. Dans ce cas, le véhicule effectuera une manœuvre à un taux calculé à partir du taux initial, soit trois dixièmes plus quatre
نعم، هذا ما كنت أتحدث عنه قبل قليل. من الصعب تصديق أن هذا بركاني وتشكل نتيجة صدع ما، أليس كذلك؟ 
알겠
11, Houston. Roger. Ihre Winkel sind 45 und 255 Grad. Verstehe ich das r
ジム、おそらく六分儀で星を確認
제미니 4호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. D-9 임무의 성과에 대한
我理解您想要在40号星空（地平线附近的月亮）处拍摄两组照片。
알겠습니다. 말씀하세요
Roger, Fred-o. Il nous reste une dernière procédure, et nous pourrons tout arrêter. Il s'agit de récup
لقد فات الأوان؛ لق
इस समय, मेरे पास तीन अक्ष लगभग प्रतिगामी अभिवृत्ति पर हैं। रेटिकल के माध्यम से यॉ को आमतौर पर एक दर के रूप में देखा जाता है और अब मैं यॉ में अभिवृत्ति में परिवर्तन की जाँच करने का प्रयास कर रहा हूँ। मैं देखता हूँ कि एक बादल भी तुरंत अभिवृत्ति को संदर्भ के रूप में बता देता है। यह कैप्सूल के भीतर मेरे द्वारा किए जा रहे वास्तविक अवल
Negativo. La domanda ha già ricevu
لونه بني؛ لونه
SPS/G&N: 36639؛ معدلك، ناقص 072، زائد 051؛ معدلك، 13
التقطتُ للتوّ الصورة رقم ٢٩ بكاميرا هاسيلبلاد خلال رحلة عبر شمال أفر
罗杰，你收到
알겠습니다. 델타-V 바이어스는 0.34
好的。LMP的蓝色软管在LMP舷窗附近，当然，红色软管和蓝色软管之间隔着大约4英尺。好的。我们接下来要——另一根软管——它带有延长管——指挥官的蓝色软管当然带有延长管，它一直延伸到指挥舱内。红色
Sigma Seven, это K
ये रही। 6 - 5 - 4 — ये इसमें कैसे
좋습니다, 주요 버스 연결선이 연결됩
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。
अरे, हम यहाँ धूमकेतु को देखने के आपके प्रयास पर काफी चर्चा कर रहे हैं, और यह प्रतिक्रिया अप्रत्य
Die Wettervorhersage für Ihr Landegebiet ist weiterhin gut: 2000 Knoten vereinzelt, hoher verein
Это «Дружба Семь». Она ослепительно светит в прицел на чистом изображении. Она начала подниматься как раз в тот момент, 
ठीक है। ये प्रारंभिक परिणाम हैं, लेकिन इनसे आपको कुछ अंदाजा मिल जाएगा। सही की गई ऊंचाई 17 प्लस या माइनस 4 किलोमीटर आ रही है, और यह प्लस या माइन
Salut Vance, pourrais-tu suivre nos taux et nous donner u
罗杰。在 E-9 程序顶部附近，“终止预热”下方，中间位置
Okay, Jack. Das war der letzte Eintrag auf dieser Seite. Geh zurück zur Checkliste und schau dir die AUTO SELECT-S
Sì. Perché non me lo fai sapere? Ho perso la cognizione del tempo, è successo quando sono andat
D'accord. Le
Хорошо. Вам п
Okay. Wir sehen uns die Zwischenprüfung zum letzten Mal an und haben eine Frage zur aktuellen Position eines Schalters. Es handelt sich um den Statusschalter an Bedienfeld 6. Wir möch
روجر، هيوستن، أبولو 
اللقطة رقم 55 على كاميرا هاسيلبلاد لحظة وصولنا إلى أفريقيا. بدا أن هناك سلسلة سحاب
Roger. It's fine with us, Neil. Go ahead anytime you wish
Мы внимательно изучаем профили потребления воды, и сейчас ситуация склоняется к тому, чтобы оставлять питание включенным, а питание отключать, но мы скоро сообщим вам подробности. Мы рекомендуем оставлять одного человека на дежурстве во время сна. По возможности, не оставляйте мочу, так как это только усугубит проблему с мусором. У нас есть несколько предметов, которые вы можете перенести в туалет: 
印度洋船，印度
わかりました、ヴァンス...、プラス 0833.0、マイナス 0050.9、マイナス 0213.9、N/A、プラス 00205、08615、4:24、272、081、残りは
我们目前在距离月球 22500 英里处追踪到你，并以每秒 4400 英尺的
宇航服冷却
I can't see it
好吧，我还是
Хорошо. На панели 225 показания будут такими же, за исключением того, что нам нужно разомкнуть еще три автоматических выключателя, и я буду проверять их по одному. Первый — S-диапазонный FM-передатчик, группа 1, 
11, 여기는 휴스턴
그 페이지
Roger, Frank. We're ready with the 1
أعتقد أننا على و
L'impostazione è -50 gradi. I giroscopi sono gratuiti. Mantenimento a -50 gradi. Pronto per il flare. Rollio e imbardata mantengono. Vedo il flare alla mia sinistra, il che è un po' sbagliato, credo. Credo di aver
稍等片刻
Хорошо, спасибо. Мне было 
렌즈는 바로 여기 있어요
Roger, Carnarvon. Th
Okay, Jack. Du erinnerst dich sicher, dass alle in der Vergangenheit berichtet haben, den Monduntergang nur wenige Minuten vor dem Eintreffen gesehen zu haben. Dein Horizont wird wahrscheinlich dunkel sein, wenn du dort ankommst; du landest früh morgens; und wenn du von Westen kommst, wirst du noch auf einen dunklen Horizont blicken. Als zusätzliche Methode, ähnlich wie beim Verfolgen des Horizonts, geben wir dir eine Ausrichtung auf der Landeplattform, sodass du direkt auf den Mond schauen kannst. Dies ist eine Trägheitsausrichtung; sie ändert sich nicht. Du richtest die 36-Grad-Fensterlinie auf den Mond aus und beobachtest ihn dann einfach. Kurz zuvor wird d
Okay, Jack. The Earth has started back do
ठीक है... हम कमांड मॉड्यूल को प्रवेश के लिए सही ढंग से कैसे
Roger. *** purge de l
さて、では、DAP を変更したいのですが、それがやり
आपकी अंतरिक्ष, अंत
रेट्रो पावर ARM है। मेरी ग्रीनविच घड़ी बंद हो गई 
Сейчас я нахожусь в режиме входа в атмосферу. Готов к переходу в автоматический режим. Электронное управление ориентацией работает безупречно, точно 
جيميني 
자, 맨 위쪽의 목적은 모니
أثناء عملية إعادة التشغيل العكسي، استخدم كلا الحلقتين. بعد إعادة التشغيل العكسي، أوقف تشغيل الحلقة B 
J'imagine que non, si 
로저. 정말 좋은 생각인 것 같습니다. 조종사로서 카나리아 제도에 대한 의료 통행증을 가지고 계시죠. 다음 개정판에는 1종 의료 통행증이 포함될 예정이며, 대략적인 기간은 다음과 같습
제미니 4호, RKV
Yes
हेलो सिग्मा सेवन, हेलो सिग्मा सेवन, यह कैल कैप कॉम है। कैल कैप कॉम। ब्लाइंड ब्रॉडकास्टिंग। हमारे रिसीवर में बिजली गुल हो गई है। मैं ब्लाइंड ब्रॉडकास्टिंग कर रहा हूँ। कृपया रेट्रोसीक्वेंस के लिए अपनी घड़ी रीसेट करें। यह पिछली रीडिंग में आपकी घड़ी की त्रुटि को ध्यान में रखता है। आपकी पिछली र
Ciao Roger, Amicizia Sette. Vi ricevo forte e chiaro. T
Allons-nous en rester là, ou allons-nous le corriger pour le
Ricevuto.
Okay. Ich komme jetzt herein und schaue Sie 
Was ich tun werde – ich wiederhole es noch einmal –
أورور
Bene. Al momento, gli angoli del nostro gimbal sono circa: il rollio è di circa 190°, i
Ok, Jack. Quello che vogliamo che tu faccia è chiudere la valvola dei reagenti sulla cella a combustibile 2. Spegnere gli inverter. Spegnere il bus relè della batteria. Spegnere i collegamenti d
Ich weiß nicht, ob wir uns irgendwelche verrückten Verrenkungen ausdenken wollen, um es zu finden – müssen wir viell
알겠습니다. 다음은 연소에 필요한 전력 공급인데요. 전원 공급 시
最
रॉजर, 11. यह ह्यूस्टन है। लगभग 71 से 72 घंटे के बीच, हम आपको खाने के लिए बुला रहे हैं, जो शायद पहले से ही चल रहा होगा। 71 घंटे: O2 फ्यूल सेल पर्ज; 72 घंटे GET: CO2 फिल्टर परिवर्तन संख्या 6, सेकेंडरी रेडिएटर फ्लो चेक। और हम आपको 2 घंटे के पास, पेरीसिंथियन पास, 
... حزمة الأفلام رقم 11 على كاميرا
Auf welche Weise sollten wir die Plus-X-Triebwerke deakti
Roger. Los geht's – Sie können den motorisierten Sinkflug fortsetzen.
Vance, potrebbe interessarti: per come siamo organizzati, abbiamo un casco 
13، هيوستن. نلاحظ اقترابك من مشكلة قفل الكاميرا. نرجو منك رفع جميع وحدات الكا
Ваш передатчик был ак
We have sure enjoyed it, too, troops, and you guys have really done a good job. We really do ap
罗杰，我们全都收
Gemin
I took an S-5 picture of a cloud formation over the Pacific coming on the Coastal Sentry Quebec area at 00 using f/11 at 150. It was frame no. 28. I'm taking several pictures for S-5. I'm right in the area of the tropical storm Carla. It's very heavily overcast right now. I'll take a few of the cloud formations. They have some very interesting formations interlaced on the top of them. Perhaps the camera will pick them up. 
Okay. Und Ihr Wiedereintrit
— pour garder la l
روجر. لا نتلقى بيانات القياس عن بُعد منك بشكل صحيح بسبب ضعف الإشارة. ها هي تعود. أتوقع أن يستغرق الأمر من 15 دقيقة إلى نصف ساعة تقريبًا لرؤية زيادة في تدفق الأكسجين نظرًا لحجم المقصورة، وبالطبع صغر حجم ف
了解。燃焼後の軌道は
حسنًا. R1 + 27210، R2 + 35570، R3 + 33010. العنصر الثاني، كما تعلم، بسبب المناورة باستخدام أمر PROCEED مرتين؛ وبعد وضعك، تذكير لن يعيد
Dies ist eine Kartenaktualisierung für den 4.5.: Sonnen
收到。正在接收。30，SPS/G&N：36691；减 061，加 067 135 23 4149；，加 32020，加 06713，减 02773 181 054 013；，HA 不适用，加 00230 32833 228，DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355。接下来的三行不适用。加 1103，减 - - 17237 1180
...아래를 내려다보니... 분명 볼록해 
Нет, это, пожалуй, самый сильный запах, который я когда-либо чувствовал. Мы действительно облажались, к
Okay, pericynthion plus 2 into the MPL, 079, 27, 4013, plus 08144, minus 00443, minus 00226, N/A, plus 00205, 08455, 4 plus 20, 268, 261, plus 08155, minus 00443, minus 021, 2187, N/A. GDA should be 
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait pas fonctionner correctement. La méthode que j'ai finalement utilisée consistait à entrer dans [nom de la zone manquante], à nous rendre à Sirius, notre étoile la plus brillante, à récupérer l'axe et le tourillon, puis à faire voyager le vaisseau spatial jusqu'à Sirius pour l'utiliser pour l'optique, ce que nous avons fait ultérieurement. En ce qui concerne la diffusion de la lumière, il semble que, quelle que soit l'attitude pendant notre contrôle thermique passif, nous recevions de la lumière diffusée dans le télescope de balayage. Cela se présente principalement sous la forme d'une large bande de lumière traversant le centre du télescope, à environ 10 degrés de part et d'autre de zéro. Il est très difficile de voir les étoiles dans cette zone. Les réalignements ont été bons. J'ai pu repérer l'étoile dans le sextant pour effectuer
ठीक है, यह अच्छा है। मैं अभी भी फ्लाई
Tutto quello che
La tonalité semble cor
Houston, Apollo 8. Ci dar
حسنًا. انتظر لحظة يا جاك. كنتُ أقصد أن أنادي جاك لينزل. لستُ على دراية بالنقاش السابق
Je pense que je vais devoir marquer le temps pour la lecture du tensiomètre su
أخبرتهم الحقيقة. أشعر أنني بخير، ومزاجي جيد، ومستعد
D'accord, sur le canal - à la page 18, tout droit sur la ligne, tout est maintenu jusqu'après « allumage »; « si 
Roger. Wir
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Péricynthion + 2 heures PAD. G&N: 62710, +098, -019, allumage 077 46 2248, DELTA-VX, +32148, -00455, -10377, roulis NA, tangage 307, le reste du PAD est NA. Alignement des étoiles Vega et Deneb. Roulis 243 183 012, pas de zone d'atterriss
حسنًا. بعد ذلك، في قسم "ناقص ساعة و45 دقيقة" - لا، عدّل ذلك. التصحيح: "ناقص ساعة و35 دقيقة"، راجع القسم، وقد تم
비행 일정에 포함되지 않은 추
好的，吉姆。我们替你做决定；这是我们一直想跟你讨论的
هذا صحيح يا جيم. لم نحصل على صورة له بعد. سيكون في الجزء العلوي من - تصحيح، الجزء العلوي من - أعلى نقطة تثبيت 2 والجزء العلوي من، ويجب أن يقسم المؤشر إذا كنتَ في الوضع الصحيح على الش
이
Okay. Wir verstehen. Halten Sie einfach fest, was Sie bei sich haben, und wir sind gleich bei Ihnen
こんにちは、ムチア・カプ・コム、ムチア・カプ・コム、フレンドシ
了解しました。メンテナンスのたびに蒸気
يراقب جهاز المراقبة في المقصورة حاليًا ضغطًا يبلغ حوالي 4.8 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة. ويبدو أن ضغط البدلة حوالي 4 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة، ويشير مقياس ضغط البدلة إلى قراءة 4.9 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة. هذا هو مقياس ضغ
ありがとう
クライオ圧力が下がるまでそれをオフにする必要があります
Роджер. Вот в чем дело. Именно это я и хотел, чтобы ты проверил для меня, пока я был на твоем посту, Скотт
И, Игл, Хьюстон. У нас произошёл сбой в пер
わから
On peut le faire des deux façons. J'avais prévu le scénario 
Roger. Wir 
Близнецы VII и VI, не могли бы вы продолжить описание вашей работы в качестве наблюдател
Bene. L'alba è alle 17:10 Zulu e la 
엔진 암에서 대기하세요. 90, 좋
Okay, Gemini VI. Will you put your Quantity Re
네, 잭. 스위치는 모두 현재 위치인 중앙에 그대로 있지만, 버스에 전원이 공급되지 않기 때문에 맨 아래쪽 토크백 스위치는 스프링으로 고정되어 이발소 기둥 위치로 올라갈 겁니다. 참고로 말씀드립니다. 이
حسنًا. أعتقد إذًا أنه ينبغي أن نسمح لك بأكثر من ذلك بقليل، أ
轴
Tranquility 
フランク、もう既に言われてるかもしれないけど、今日のテレビ、すごく素敵だったよ。でも、ちょっとだけ家庭的なことがあってね。エル・ラーゴ地区ではサンタクロースに主役を奪われちゃった。サンタクロースは消防車に乗って、ちょうど君たちが来た頃に来てたんだ。だから、小さな生き物たちはほとん
플랫폼 전원을 모두 켰는데 제
Commandant de bord indien, je vous fais un rapport. Je suis à 7 000 pieds, le parachute principal est en bon état, le sac d'atterri
Ricevuto. Abbiamo quattro segnalazioni di allarme su otto con interruttori automatici che indicano il rosso. Al momento, gli int
Okay. That's the last thing I passed up. And while we're waiting for to decide here, let me continue. The deadband that is considered acceptable is between 660 and 770 psi. In other words, any rise time that'll give you one - a pressure between those two, will keep you below the critical pressure at 103 hours or so. So, we expect it to read in that - in that band and if it does, there will be no problem. If it reads between 770 and 800 psi, we will want you to check the pressure again at about 59 hours, and I'll get the detailed procedures in a minute. If the pressure is equal to or greater than 800 psi, we're going to have to go into some more detailed procedures; we're going to try to - to get PCM data on it, for one thing. We may have to have you sit there and stare at the gage for a while to find out when it clicks up and get an accurate rise time on it, and then in extreme case, we are even thinking about a burn, but we don't really think that will happen. Now, if you are ready to copy, what I ha
Si je comprends bien, Jack, vous ête
Roger. Wir haben e
Понял. Это «Дружба Семь». Окно, индикаторы положения и перископ в полном порядке. В данный момент я вижу, как в перископе позади меня поднимается тёмная сторона. Давление в кабине 5,5 и держится. Температура в кабине 95 градусов. Относительная влажность 28 процентов. Я переключил температуру в каби
Die Kreisel sind deaktiviert un
Ok. Devo solo cambiare gli OMNI. Ok. Leggendo le modifiche, Joe, alle pagine 1-4, RISCALDATORI A CELLE A COMBUSTIBILE tre, SPENTO, in discesa verso FUEL CELL 1 BUS PRINCIPALE A centro - BUS PRINCIPALE A su SPENTO; BUS PRINCIPALE - FUEL CELL 2 su BUS PRINCIPALE A, SPENTO; FUEL CELL 3 su BUS PRINCIPALE A, talkback, grigio; RESET BUS PRINCIPALE A su SPENTO; FUEL CELL, 1 su BUS PRINCIPALE B talkback, grigio; FUEL CELL 2 su BUS PRINCIPALE B talkback, grigio; FUEL
क्या आप हमें केबिन का तापमान और सूट का तापमान 
ह्यूस्टन, ये कोलंबिया है। आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है। हम तीनों अंदर आ गए हैं; हैच लगा दिया गया है। हम प्रेशर और लीक की जाँच कर रहे हैं। सब ठीक चल
마크. 부스터 사진 한 장. 지금 송신 및 녹화 시작. 2, 3
알겠습니다. 잠시 
好的。在 PC+2 之后，没有配平要求；而且，如果在 PC+2 期间发生发动机故障，后续的中段机动——最早的一次是在 PC+4。如果您没有进行 PC+2，但我们仍然想进行一次——稍后。在 PC+4 时，速度增量​​（DELTA-V）的增加，或者说惩罚，大约为每秒 24 英
Roger, and I'd like to advise you that any MSC-10 films that you have lef
Ich stehe am Fuß der Leiter. Die Trittflächen sind nur etwa zwei bis fünf Zentimeter tief in die Oberfläche eingedrü
Роджер.
Könntest du kurz zu
Kano Cap Com, hi
ठीक है। जब मैं इसे दूरबीन से देखता हूँ तो मुझे बस एक 
और
रॉजर। माइक, मुझे लगता है कि हम उस सात-दसवें दर को समझा सकते हैं। जब हम पहली
أشعر أنني بخير، فلنكمل الرحلة. الآلة تعمل بثبات. أرى الأرض في النافذة، والسماء، والأفق. الرحلة تسير على ما يرام. هل تسمعن
Ricevuto. La pressione alla sorgente è 1950. La temperatura alla sor
रॉजर। स्थिति रिपोर्ट। मैंने आपको रक्त परीक्षण भेजा है। सभी सिस्टम ठीक हैं, सिवाय सूट सर्किट के, जिस पर मैं सावधानीपूर्वक काम कर रहा हूँ। मैं प्रतिगामी अवस्था में हूँ; गाइरोस्कोप सामान्य; पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद। मैं सूट सर्किट
Rog
यह कहाँ है? पा
Gemini 4, Houston
На этом, пожалуй, все мировые и национальные новости и статьи. На спортивной странице Хэнк Стрэм из «Канзас-Сити Чифс» был назван лучшим тренером года в AFL. Это уже второй раз за три сезона. Голосование проводилось группой из 30 спортивных журналистов и комментаторов Associated Press, по три человека из каждого города. Ближайшим к нему по результатам голосования был Уиб Юбэнк. Другие тренеры, получившие голоса, — Сид Гилман из Сан-Диего и Лу Сабин из Денвера. Что касается вчерашнего матча всех звезд колледжей 
Хорошо. Я знаю, вы стараетесь молчать, поэтому я просто зачитаю вам кое-какую информацию. Одна из вещей, которую мы только что обнаружили и которая может придать вам уверенности: если вы потеряете кислородный криогенный бак, у вас остан
Vous êtes juste au-dessus de qu
هاواي، جيميني السادس. نقطة بيانات جديدة 6.4 درجة؛ 110.41 ميل بحري؛ إجمالي د
로저 오로라 세븐, 케이프 
... Und worauf wir warten, sind 54 Minuten auf unserem Zähler oder 20, was mi
Houston, Apollo 8. How are you reading on O
你好，瓜伊马斯通信技术
罗杰。好的，吉姆，我们决定你还剩一点燃料，我们可以在飞行计划里做一些调整。我们希望你在接下来的8小时内使用地平线扫描模式。也就是30秒，并且使用主扫描器。我们不希望你进行任何偏航控制，如果扫描器失去锁定，也不要进行横滚或俯仰控制。我们想看看——如果失去锁定，它是
Роджер. А Фре
نعم، وأ
알았어, 잭. CB 배터리 충전기
Houston, Apoll
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह मुचेआ कॉम टेक है। क्या आप स
そうだね。でも、ジャック、あれは最初で最後かもしれない
很好。在E-9页，准备切换到指令舱位置时，如果您想避免因姿态修正而导致发动机点火，可以将手动姿态开关拨到“加速指令”或“最小脉冲”位置。同样，在E-9页Alfa步骤41 Bravo中，如果您想返回姿态保持状态，请将手动姿态
Freundschaft Sieben. Die Sonne geht jetzt wieder unter. Ich fahre nicht mehr automatisch auf Gieren und dr
Roger. Conformément à la page 47, étape 1, le guidage était en mode PGNS et le mode de contrôle en PGNS AUTO. Les disjo
حسنًا يا جيم، بالنسبة لقواطع الدائرة الكهربائية الأربعة الخاصة بسخانات QUAD، نريدك أن تتركها مغلقة.
Roger. GET der Akquisition 3 + 07; GET von R = 248 nm; GET Rendezvous, 3 + 15; Azimut, 0 Grad; Elevation, 7 Grad; GET Sonnenaufgang bei TPI 05 37 00, plus/mi
Роджер. В соответствии с шагом 1, описанным на странице 47, управление наведение
Va bene. Abbia
حسنًا. لم ن
시그마 세븐, 여기는 워
Подождите. Понял. Нам нужен широкоформатный режим, и вы можете настроить его пря
Roger. Ecco un breve riassunto degli aggiornamenti che riceverai. Quello che hai ora per più 2 dopo una manovra di sorvolo a meno 8 è ancora valido. Non verrà aggiornato. Il prossimo aggiornamento che riceverai sarà il 4. Dopodiché, riceverai due manovre più 2, che presuppongono il completamento di 4. U
Хорошо. Все они уложены. Подсоединим водяной шланг. Посмотрим; сейчас с
B; デルタV、13.5。高度調整; デルタV、59.5。
わかりました。今回手に取って
Roger, Houston. Qualche parola sul nostro sistema di tracciamento ottico. Ho usato AUTO OPTICS per i punti di controllo 1 e 2 sul retro, e hanno funzionato benissimo, hanno tracciato entrambi i bersagli per me. Sono andato a
여기는 UHF 무전으로 보고하는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 당시 수색
맞습니다. 저희도 진동을 감지했지만, 뭔가 심각한 일이 일어날 거라고 생각할 정도는 아니었어요. 그냥
Roger, Jim. Compris. Nous avons copié ça et nous étions juste curieux de savoir si, en le revoyant, vous remarquez des étoiles scintil
حسنًا. ه
了解。フライ・バイ・
了解。良さそ
Riuscivo a sentirti sempre, Ken, ma sentivo la music
알겠습니다. 그럼 지휘 모듈의 산소량을 5.0까지 올리고 산소 평형을 유지하기 위해 추가 산소를 사용해도 되는지 여쭤보시는 거죠? 이상입니
Roger. Verstanden. Die Beleuchtung de
هذا صحيح. الآن،
فريندشيب سفن، هاواي كاب كوم. هل يمك
نستمع عبر نطاق التردد العالي جدًا (VHF) بتقنية الاتصال المبا
Ricevuto. E intorno alle 00:40, il 
Ricevuto. Vogliamo ancor
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы готовы к трансляции по телевидению в Голдстоуне. Трансляция будет записана здесь, в Голдстоуне, а затем показана здесь,
روجر. قمتُ بالالتحام في وضع التشغيل التلقائي، وكما ذكرتُ، لم أكن متأكدًا تمامًا من لحظة التلامس. ظللتُ أُراجع مؤشرات مسبار الالتحام. ظهر لي مؤشران يُشيران إلى أن مزاليج التثبيت الثلاثة - ليس مزاليج التثبيت، بل المزاليج الثلاثة - قد أغلقت، وأننا كنا في حالة التحام سلس. وفي ذلك الوقت، بدا الوضع مستقرًا للغاية. لذا، انتقلتُ إلى وضع التشغيل الحر، وألقيتُ نظرةً خاطفةً من النافذة، وبدا الوضع لا يزال مستقرًا؛ ثم أطلقتُ أسطوانة الغاز الرئيسية الثانية. وفي ذلك الوقت، بدأت حركة دوران بين المركبتين، ولا أعرف السبب تحديدًا. ربما بسبب قوة الدفع، أو ربما كانت تتراكم مسبقًا ولم أُلاحظها. على أي حال، أثناء سحب المسبار، حدث انحراف - انحرافات في انحرافي، أُقدّرها بحوالي 15 درجة - واضطررتُ إلى إعادة تشغيل الجهاز، وأخذ مفتاح التشغيل الحر، وإعادة الجهاز إلى وضع التشغيل التلقائي، ومحاولة تقليل الانحراف؛ وأظن أن نيل كان يفعل الشيء نفسه. سأترك له المجال ليخبركم برأيه. كنتُ أظن أننا لن نتمكن من إتمام عملية السحب والالتحام بنجاح. ولكن، بعد حوالي ست أو ثماني ثوانٍ، كما سمعت، بدأت الأمور تهدأ، ثم سمعنا صوتًا يدل على تفعيل مزاليج الالتحام؛ وعندما دخلتُ النفق 
حسنًا. كما يلي: /: 45597، ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 35189، ناقص 01513، ناقص 00346 180 007 000، غير قابل للتطبيق، زائد 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253، دلتا العقرب
休斯顿，那些说我们无法精确定位的人今天赢了。在通常应该选择着陆点的下降阶段
Ok. Ricevuto. Puoi dirci qualcosa sull'orientamento di questa fascia? Lo hai detto anche ieri sera, che c'era una fascia larga circa 10 gradi che la attr
Apollo 8, hier ist Hou
Roger, ho avuto quei 3 secondi. Sono più veloce di t
Jack, c'est tout. À
阿波罗8号，休斯
Okay. We're going to pull the OPERATE circuit breaker, so you won't be able to see our attitude. Therefore, you won't tell us how to switch antennas and we'll enable th
मेरा मतलब डरबन लाइट्स से है। मैं उन्हें देख नहीं पाया। मुझे खिड़की के बीचोंबीच ज़मीन पर कुछ रोशनी दिखाई दे रही है - इस समय - जो लगभग डरबन लाइट्स के समय की बात 
Перед нами небольшой, хорошо различимый, совсем новый кратер в этом маленьком море, и еще один приб
ठीक है, वैंस। एस-बैंड फ़ंक्शन वॉयस मोड पर है और रेंजिंग स
रॉजर। सीबी बैट ए, पावर ए
ठीक है। हमें समझ आ गया। और आखिरी बात: हम आपको IRIG का अपड
F
नहीं। हम जानना चाहते हैं - रॉजर। हमें यह जानने में दिलचस्पी है कि आपकी उड़ान - आपका अलाइनमेंट कैसा रहा, क्योंकि हमें 2 फीट प्रति सेकंड की अतिरिक्त गति मिली, जो हमारी ट्रैकिंग के अनुसार आवश्यक थी, और यह देर से आई,
好的。你们的再入轨道位于地球的暗面附近，由于我们进入大
फिलहाल, ऐसा कोई तरीका नहीं दिख रहा है जिससे हम दिन के उजाले में कोई
Роджер. Получение данны
Jim, we'll take a look at that fuel usage bit. Right now, the trend looks like it is ge
Roger, je le répète. De 5 h 56 à 6 h 16, vérification de navigation orbitale, sans consommation de carburant d'
알겠
مرحباً سيجما سفن، مرحباً سيجما سفن، معكم كال كاب كوم، معكم كا
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir benötigen einige Daten Ihrer bisherigen Leistungen. Uns fehlen ein paar Angaben, also legen Sie diese bitte nicht weg. Sobald Sie die nächste A
月の影響が小さいので、ほぼ完璧な星空観測条件が整ったと言えるでしょう。先ほども申し上げましたが、星の等級は、南冠星のキャリブレーションを使えば7等級、あるいはそれよりほんの少し下まで見ることができるよ
Con questo rientro a zero decollo, saremo in grado di prevedere il tuo IP e di far sì che le forze di recupero si dirigano al punto di atterraggio circa 15 minuti prima del tuo arrivo. Riteniamo che
Мы можем прочитать отметки на
了解。了解しました
Roger. Friendship Seven getting ready for 1 plus 44 check
D'accord. Je voulais simplement vous en informer et vous inciter à réfléchir à ses implications sur le plan de vol. Je vous présenterai ensuite une vue d'ensemble et commenterai la Lune afin de déterminer les sections les plus appropriées. Frank souhaitait que nous vérifiions l'ordre d'apparition des profils d'entrée. Le premier profil affiché est intitulé « Non-sortie n° 2 » et correspond à l'entrée rapide à courte portée. Le deuxièm
هل تسير في الاتجاه الصحيح بالنسبة لتلك الخراط
Muchea Com、修正 
确认无误。我们准备就绪。杰克
حسنًا، ونجم أتريا موجود في السدس. كما تعلم، ليس في منتصف السدس تمامًا. بالط
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir sehen uns jetzt. Es kann ein paar Minuten dauern, bis Sie die von uns angegebenen Vektoren integriert haben. Wenn Sie nicht WIG-schweißen, ist die Empfindlichkeit recht gering. Sie können die Temperatur einfach auf WIG hochfahren lassen, und sobald der Wert Null erreicht ist, können Sie mit de
Хорошо, Джим. И мы хотели бы, 
Okay. 
... en panne et
우리가 보유한 TR은 계
제 하셀블라드에는 사진이 세 장 
AOT LA
Bene. Il passaggio successivo, sul pannello 5, CB POWER-1 MAIN B e POWER-2 MAIN B, en
Bene. Imbarda la navicella verso sinistra per avere una buona visuale della Terra e della finestra di rendezvous numero 2. Potresti anche dover inclinare leggermente l'asse, ma per avere una buona visuale della Terra è fondamentale una manov
Alright. Wh
没错，Gemini 4 号。他们希望在没有超高频传输的情况下，关闭 ACQ 辅助信标进行大约 5 分钟的
아주 쉽게 찾을 수 있어요. 여기서 분화구 가장자리 전체가 보이고, 물론 반대편에는 햇빛을 받아 하얀 초승달 모양이 보입니다. 그림자가 꽤 길어졌네요. 마스켈린 B(잠의 늪) 분화구에는 그림자가 많이 드리워져 있지만, 알아볼 수는 있습니다. 마스켈린 B 바로 서쪽부터는 명암 경계선으로 향하기 시작합니다. 명암 경계선은 
로저. 저희에게는 약 3분 30초 정도의 시간이 있습니다. 이제 모든 권한을 귀하께 넘겨드리겠습니다. 폐수 탱
Okay. Houston, hier spricht Apollo 8. Ich s
Gemini VI, Car
Bene. Guardando la voce 1: il secondo elemento riguarda la fase di cold soak Kelvin di 12 ore, e nelle discussioni che ho avuto qui e prima del volo, credo che si sia concordato che non vogliamo effettuare la fase di cold soak. Quindi elimineremo il passaggio 2. In pratica, credo che vogliamo effettuare la fase di cold soak, e certamente vogliamo testare i boiler ad acqua prima dell'inserimento per assicurarci di non averne uno asciutto, nello stesso modo in cui ne avevamo uno asciutto prima. Stiamo lavorando su alcune procedure per questo, e dovremo tornare da voi con quelle un po' più ta
Добрый вечер. Это командир «Аполлона-11». Сто лет назад Жюль Верн написал книгу о путешествии на Луну. Его космический корабль «Колумбия» стартовал из Флориды и приземлился в Тихом океане после завершения полета на Луну. Нам кажется уместным поделиться с вами некоторыми размышлениями экипажа, поскольку современная «Колумбия» завтра завершит свою стыковку с планетой Земля и тем же Тихим о
Мы 
分かりました。分かりました。まず第一に、これらのルールは厳しい制限のあるモード I の中止と同様であるべきというのが基本的な考え
الطاقة القديمة معطلة. توقفت ساعتي غرينتش. البطاريات الرئيسية تعمل. تأكد من تشغي
これは「5」で行われる黄道光実験に関するもので、姿勢制御スラスターによるフィルムの曇りの有無を調べたいとのことです。35mmコンタレックスカメラをご使用ください。白黒フィルムでもカラー
Hier ist Friendship Seven. Ich fliege momentan komplett manuell. Das Flugzeug war noch im Orientierungsmodus und hat hauptsächlich beim Gieren nach dem Rück
了解です。BATチャージ、オフ。ACインバータ2、オフ。メインバスタイ、BAT B/C、オン、アップ。パネル250：BAT A、パワーエントリおよび着陸後、開。CB、BAT B、パワーエントリおよび着陸後、開。パネル5：CB、B
지금 삽입 체크리스트를 다시 한번 확인해 보겠습니다. DC 전압이 주 전원입니다. 레트로매뉴얼 퓨즈 스위치는 꺼져 있습니다. 레트로매뉴얼도 꺼져 있습니다. 모든 계기가 꺼져 있습니다. 모든 배터리도 괜찮습니다. AC 전원도 양호합니다. 자, 어디 보자, 부스터는 어디 있지? 저 아래에 아름다운 구름 무늬가
Хорошо. Питание костюм
好的，吉姆。我们一直在讨论，为了更好地观察指令舱外的星空，你需要调整到与发射台姿态不同的姿态。我们希望你这样做：如果你现在或不久的将来能够预测出你希望保持的姿态，并立即调整到该姿态，我们就能计算出粗略的航向轴万向节角度。具体来说，如果你调整到选定的姿态并保持住，调用一个程序，然后告诉我们你的万向节角度，我们就可以根据这
로저, 빌. 정리하시는 동안 승무원 현황 보고
5초 후에 '중단 단계'와 '엔진 시동' 메시지가
Роджер. 16 17 00
打开 TEMP/PRESS DISPLAY-FLAGS 和 PQ
罗杰。在华盛顿，参议院财政委员会已批准延长所得税附加税，但目前看来参议院对该法案进行投票的可能性不大。在奥斯汀，休斯顿州众议员雷·莱蒙被提名为美国海洋学会国家主任
Negativo. Sono salito e ho provato a ripressurizzare il serbatoio di compensazione e a fare un'altra iniezione d'acqua, e sono riuscito a r
짐
Apoll
هذ
Negative. It's c
لديّ ضوء ألفاغرين المنطفئ لأقرأ عليه. الآن، لن تكون هذه التجربة ذات قيمة؛ فأنا بحاجة إلى إضاءة المقصورة لأرى. من الصعب جدًا العثور على مقياس الضوء المنطفئ. دعونا نرى إن كان بإمكاني القيام بذلك ال
Roger. Die Erde ist auch da; und, Jim, es ist wi
Okay. Es gibt eine Frage zur Checkliste. Meinem Verständnis nach müssen sowohl der primäre als auch der sekundäre Warmwasserboiler beim Betreten des Gebäudes eingeschaltet sein. Ich finde jedoch keinen entsprechenden Eintrag in der Checkliste. Wir bitten daher um eine Bestätigung und stellen sicher, dass alle erforderlichen 
好的。接下来我们要进行几项通信检查。我们会切换到五种不同的模式，其中只有一种会中断您的操作。在这种情况下，我们会切换到上行备份语音模式，您可能会暂时失去上行语音通信。整个过
المل
好的。接下来将按照飞
Vediamo. A Springfield, Missouri, Mickey Owen, il ricevitore storico dei Brooklyn Dodgers che è entrato nel libro dei record segnando un terzo strike che ha portato i New York Yankees alla vittoria sui Dodgers nelle World Series del '41, ha deciso che sarebbe stato ricordato per qualcosa di più del suo record sportivo. Quarantacinque ragazzi e ragazze hanno ricevuto i pony da lui offerti. A questi ragazzi è stato chiesto di inviargli delle lettere in cui spiegavano come si sarebbero presi cura di un pony. Quando le lettere sono arrivate a fiumi, ha aggiunto cinque pony ai 20 già offerti; e altri donatori ne hanno aggiunti altri 20. E Mickey Owen ha detto: "Pensavo di ricevere circa 45 lettere, ma alla fine ne ho avute circa 900". Ora, nella pagina pr
B-2でのことでした。B-3に近づいています。この時点でピッチを約10度下げてください。スキャナーをオフにしていた間に発生したロールエラーは解消されました。この時点で、スーツの風量を約…ほんの少しだけ増やして、再突入時の冷却効果を高めます。もう少し下げられるかどうか試してみます。姿勢はほぼ完璧です。ヨーは良好です。ピッチは少し急激に下がっています。ヨーレティクルは夜間作業には適し
Have you tried u
في القياس الأول الذي أجريته، لم 
रॉजर. 9-सी 04 36 18. 7+59. 15+26. 10-चार्ली 123. 1+45. 05 13 47. 13+37. 11 डेल्टा 087. 1+54. 07 10 46.
روجر. منتصف المسار رقم 5، RCS/G&N: 26025، الميل والانحراف غير متوفرين، 150 29 5453، ناقص 00048، زائد جميع الأصفار، زائد 00001 075 159 328، غير 
Wir hatten einen wunderschönen Blick auf die Seite des Kommandomoduls, als wir durch di
わかりま
Хорошо. Насколько я понимаю, цель этой процедуры — вернуть векторы состояния и в сферу влияния Земли; 
روجر. هل أجريت أي تغييرات على إعدادات حلقة البدلة بعد انتقالك من وضع الخروج إلى 
好了，杰克，把氢氧化
ただの
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Ich verstehe Sie laut und deutlich. Wie ist I
جاه
好的。氦气压力约为 37，歧管压力为 182，流量读数为 80。B 点的温度约为 112，氦气压力约为 36.5，燃料压力为 180，流量
분명 불편할 
알았어. 잘 읽어줬어, 잭. 1번부터 4번까지만 틀렸어. 네 말을 정확히 이해하진 못했지만, SENSO
I can't tel
यह सही है। मैं दिन के उजाले में इस रोल क
Sembra an
D'accord. Vous pourrez obtenir ces configurations dès que possible. Ensuite, je vais vous expliquer comment vérifier que le bus 
Понимаете? Вам нужно время для восс
حسنًا يا جيم. في الوق
Verseau, tous vos modules seront opérationnels dans environ 3 heures et demie, à -06h30. Nous tenons à vous rappeler, lorsque vous couperez l'alimentation du module de commande via le câble ombilical, de bien ouvrir les deux disjoncteurs du circuit POWER MAIN B avant de manipuler les interrupteurs et les disjoncteurs. Suivez la procédure
Siete pronti per uno o due motori car
ठीक है। मूलतः, यह सही है। चलिए, मैं इसे संक्षेप में समझा देता हूँ, फिर मैं आपको चरण बताऊँगा। मुझे लगता है कि इससे आपको बेहतर समझ आएगा। योजना यह है कि आप कुछ ऐसे कोण पर उड़ सकते हैं जो आपके ऑप्टिक्स को चंद्रमा की ओर इंगित करेंगे। अब, किसी भी समय, किसी भी स्थिति में, यदि आप दूरबीन में देखकर तारों के पैटर्न को पर्याप्त रूप से पहचान सकते हैं और आपको लगता है कि आप स्वयं संरेखण कर सकते हैं, तो हम यहीं रुकना चाहेंगे और आपको अपना संरेखण स्वयं करने देंगे। हालाँकि, हम आपको एक ऐसी प्रक्रिया बता रहे हैं जिससे आप दूरबीन में उन चीजों को देख सकेंगे जिन्हें आप बिना किसी परावर्तन या ऐसी किसी भी चीज की चिंता किए देख सकते हैं, और यह आवश्यक नहीं है कि इस प्रक्रिया का पालन तब तक किया जाए जब तक आपको यह पता न चल जाए कि दूरबीन में तारों के पैटर्न स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई दे रहे हैं। यदि आपको आगे बढ़ना है, तो हम पैंतरेबाज़ी करेंगे, चंद्रमा पर एक नज़र डालेंगे, वहाँ एक निशान लगाएंगे, और फिर / कोणों के साथ फिर से पैंतरेबाज़ी करेंगे और सूर्य पर एक नज़र डालेंगे, और सूर्य पर एक और निशान लगाएंगे, जिससे संरेखण पूरा हो जाएगा। अब, संरेखण योजना यह है कि हम आपको कोणों का एक सेट देंगे जिसके माध्यम से आप गेंद को मोटे तौर पर संरेखित कर सकते हैं जब चंद्रमा की ओर इंगित कर रहा हो। अब, कोणों का यह सेट आपके पास मौजूद नाममात्र के साथ मेल खाएगा। आप उसके साथ मोटे तौर पर संरेखित कर सकते हैं, एक ड्रिफ्ट फ्लैग और REFSMMAT फ्लैग सेट कर सकते हैं, और आपके पास एक अच्छा प्लेटफॉर्म होगा और हम एक अच्छे संरेखण से कुछ डिग्री के भीतर होंगे। और, यदि आवश्यक हो, तो हम इस बिंदु पर रुक सकते हैं और प्रवेश के साथ आगे बढ़ सकते हैं; हालाँकि, एक अच्छा प्लेटफॉर्म प्राप्त करने के प्रयास में, हम आपको विकल्प 1 करने के लिए कहेंगे, और विकल्प 1 स्लॉट में आपको प्रवेश मिलेगा। 
Roger. Die MSC-2 und -3 Small-End-Forward-Beobachtungen beginnen bei 23 Stunden 49 Minuten und enden bei 15 Minu
Вперед. Готовы к к
Fred, recommend 
Bene. E dopo aver spento la batteria, prevediamo che utilizzerai acqua a un ritmo compreso tra 3,2 e 2,7 libbre, ovvero a un consu
Roger
أبولو 8، لقد فهمت 
Roger, 11. On n'a plus à s'en soucier. L'altimètre est maintenant
Не в
Роджер, наша следующая проверка связи — это проверка только дальности. У меня есть четыре переключателя, которые я хотел бы, чтобы вы переключили, из-за чего голосовая связь пропадёт примерно на 3 ми
Die Sonde ist gut zu sehen, und auch seine H
- - जो मैं स
バズ、もし君が上の階で寝たいなら、そうするよ。君
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。
О
روج
Negativ. Der durchschnittlic
P
OK, Houston. Le deuxième survol. V
姿态正常。正在
हाँ। यह एक बहुत चमकीला गड्ढा है। यह बड़ा तो नहीं है, लेकिन बेहद चमकीला है। यह हाल ह
Je ne pense pas que ce soit un gros problème; ça saute juste quand on passe en mode AUTO. J
Apollo 11, Houston. Könnten Sie uns bitte mitteilen, ob
ジャックが、あれこれ書いてある紙を引っ張り出したと思う。ジャックがバッテリーの充電
자, 시작해
뭐 좀 드릴까요...? 마
Propellant quantity remaini
阿波罗8号，这里
A. Tra poco passerò all'assetto di rientro. Non c'è motivo di tenere aperto il vano portaoggetti in questo momento. Devo procurar
Okay, Joe, bevor ich ins 
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Wir übergeben um 15:51 Uhr von Madrid an Goldstone. Sollten Sie zu diesem Zeitpunkt die Verbindung zum Hochgeschwindigkeitsflug verlieren, benötigen Sie möglicherweise einen An
Bene. Grazie. Il nostro programma
Il y a beaucoup moins 
Роджер, 11. Если вы достанете свой запасной и резервный контрольный список, то знайте, что на странице F2-20
Roger
13, abbiamo un altro oggetto per te, quando ne avrai la possibilità. Vorremmo che tu rimescolassi i tuoi contenitori criogenici. Inoltre,
罗杰，休斯顿。-11，/: 45597，-040，+157，+36325，-01727，+01428 180 003 000，不适用，+00186 36394 323 36
Roger, Z Cal 
いい
Ok. Sembra che abbiamo appena ottenuto un aggancio solido per l'ultimo... oh, circa un minuto. L'ago ha oscillato su e giù, e gli aghi di beccheggio e imbardata hanno oscillato, ma sembr
わかりました。次の3つは同じです。それから
Я несколько раз замечал, что при переходе из солнечного света в тень, как только я вхожу, помимо отражения от моего лица на визоре, появляется дополнительное отражение, что значительно ухудшает видимость именно в месте перехода из солнечного света в тень. По сути, на мой визор падает столько бликов, что шлем фактически оказывается в тени. Затем моим глазам требуется некоторое время, чтобы адаптироваться к условиям освещения. Внутри затененной зоны видимость, как мы уже говорили, не очень хорошая,
حسنًا. بالنسبة لتحديث PLA وCLA الخاص بك، المنطقة 40-3، هذا حرق مجزأ. 56 للأمام، 120 للخلف. 1+34. 2+30. 05 38 10. 2+56. 8+52. المنطقة 41-دلتا 83. 1+41. 06 30 09. 8+58. 15+
حسناً. وأفترض أن الاتصالات كانت على ما يرا
给
हम बस इतना चाहते हैं कि आप साइकिल चलाते हुए औसत जी प्राप्त करें और उसे जल
덧붙여 말씀드리자면, 저희는 지금 TD&E 방송 재방송을 보고 있는데 TV 화질이 꽤 괜찮네요. 저희 중 몇몇은 이번이 처음으로 볼 수
केप कैप कॉम, सिग्मा सेवन यूएचएफ-हाई में। आगे बढ़
알겠습니다. 마스터 제목은 "진입, LM 준비, 6시간 전"입니다. 첫째, BAT 5 정상 급유, 켜짐. 둘째, 수정된 / 30분 활성화 체크리스트를 사용합니다. 다음은 5시간 전, 필요한 경우 7시간 전입니다. 이제 사전 진입 절차가 있습니다. 첫째, 서비스 모듈 SEP 자세로 기동합니다. 둘째, 핫파이어 설정을 합니다. 그 아래에서 데드밴드 최대화, 자세 제어, 3을 펄스로 설
正解です！
You
Die Position des LMP-Kanisters - Der
초당 3피트의 속도로 연소시키면서 발사대에서 10도 정도 어긋나더라도 델타-V 작동 측면에서는 알아채기 어려울 겁니다. 그러니 발사대에 접근하는 대로 잠시 SEF 모드로 전환해 보겠습니다. 궤도 진입 5분 전쯤에요. 좋습니다. 지금 바로 SEF COMP 모드로 전
बूस्टर अभी भी हमारे सामने है... हाँ, वही बूस्टर था। मुझे अभी भी उस पर बत्तियाँ चमकती हुई दिख रही हैं। वह क्षितिज पर बस गुजर रहा है। जैसे ही अंधेरा छाने लगता है, बूस्टर पर सूर्य की रोशनी पड़ने से एक बहुत ही चमकदार छवि बन जाती है। वही वस्तु मैंने पहले देखी थी। ऐस
표면 색깔은 우리가 궤도에서 태양 각도
Tu veux baisser une de tes visièr
Да. Я так понимаю, сейчас идёт 24-
Хорошо, Хьюстон. У нас только что сработала главная сигнализация и загорелся индикатор. Я так понимаю, что причиной стало парциальное давление CO2 — да, именно это и вызвало сраб
Houston, Tranquility. I
Okay, and you're real good. It's a - It's a pleasure not to have all that noise. Let me tell you what I want to do, Jim. As I said, we're not going to give you detailed procedures, now. What we expect to have for you shortly are procedures which we'll try and get up to you in the following form. First, we'll have a time line, sort of a flight plan thing, which will have the times of all the major events and any configurations, switch settings, and so forth which are peculiar to our configuration and which, therefore, you won't find in the checklist. This, for instance, will be true of the way we power up the command module; and second, of course, we'll have an
D'accord. C'est le dernier point que j'ai omis. En attendant votre décision, je vais poursuivre. La plage de pression acceptable se situe entre 660 et 770 psi. Autrement dit, tout temps de montée en pression permettant d'atteindre une valeur comprise entre ces
13، لدينا اقتراح لك بخصوص الوضعية. نقترح عليك أن تذهب إلى لفة 285 وتجرب زاوية ميل 90 درجة وانحراف 0 درجة. انته
友谊七号，坎顿通信技术学院。我也清楚地听到了你们的
केन, वैसे तो हम यहाँ बस समय बिता रहे हैं, लेकिन हमें कुछ अजीब बातें नज़र आई हैं। जैसे, फ्लाइट में पहने जाने वाले ओवरऑल के बूट; मेरे बूट बहुत बुरी तरह से फट गए थे, इसलिए मुझे उन्हे
알겠습니다, 짐. 저기 11번 패널에서 테이프 레코더 외에도 랑데부 히터 차단기
Acquario, Houston. Ricevuto. Anche da noi c'è rumore; restate in attesa mentre ci 
TR-5 회로 차단기가 닫혔습니다
皆さんにはお分かりいただけるか分かりませ
Sigma Seven，这里是沃特敦通信技术中心。我收到你
わかりました。まず、お渡しした基本設定に一つ変更があります。
Apollo 11, Houston. Ungefähr in 50 Prozent der Fälle erhalten wir ei
Roger. Nous n'utiliserons pas le
كواد دلتا ٢٤٥، ٨١ بالمئة. تنصح شركة P&C بأن هذه الأرقام لا تزال جيدة رغم مرور الوقت. وبذلك نكون قد انتهينا من اختبار الاتصالات. يمكنك الآن استخدام هوائيك عالي ا
了解。やっと分かりました。Sバンドの角度を入力しましたが、ロックオンできませんでした。どうやら地球に届くには、アンテナがLMを透過している必要があ
शुभ संध्या। मैं आप सभी से अपोलो 11 मिशन की उड़ान के कुछ प्रतीकात्मक पहलुओं पर चर्चा करना चाहता हूँ। पिछले दो-तीन दिनों में अंतरिक्ष यान में घटी घटनाओं पर चर्चा करते हुए हम इस निष्कर्ष पर पहुँचे हैं कि यह केवल तीन
Закат довольно впечатляющий, думаю, не стоит тратить много времени на его созерцание. Он очень интересный. Ещё меня поражает, насколько темно, когда глаза не адаптированы. Я определённо вижу какое-то покрытие на окне. Возвращаюсь к VOX в диапазоне UHF-hi для передачи. Открываю визор, чтобы протереть правый микрофон. Я его лизнул. Закрываю визор. Визор сразу же загерметизировался, чтоб
알겠습니다. 버즈가 제미니 X에 하나 가지고 있
حسنًا. البطارية أ 38.3، البطارية ب 36.9، البطارية ج 38.5. يبدو الوضع جيدًا. يبدو أننا أعدنا تركيب جميع الأجزاء التي أزلناه
روجر. 012 080 018، 
Houston, Apollo 11. Wenn ich jetzt in dieselbe Gegend schaue, scheint sie tatsächlich etwas Erdlicht zu reflektieren. Ich bin mir nicht sicher, ob die Phasenlage auf Null berechnet wurde – nun ja, zumindest scheint eine Kraterwand heller zu sein als die anderen, und
Hey, vielleicht können wir die Tatsache, dass du nachgewiesen hast, dass sich die Erde tats
Bene. Siamo molto vicini al punto di accensione per la discesa di potenza. Stiamo appena superando il Monte Marilyn, quella montagna di forma triangolare che vedete al centro dello schermo in questo momento, con il cratere Secchi Theta 
Sì. Jim farà un salto lassù. Fred-o sta dormendo adesso. Stiamo cercando di dormire un po' qui, e Jim correrà su a controllare tensione e corre
わかった。エ
Wir haben Ihre Ladung nun ge
오른쪽으로 13도나 기울였다고요? 정상적인 각도는 얼마인
- 検証
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, Cap Com. Cape Flig
Roger. Compris. Tu va
わかりました。次の1、2、3、4、5、6、7、8は変更せず、ELS AUTOスイッチ
Ricevuto, Jack. La latitudine è -21,62; la longitudine è -165,37, e questo va di pari
Roger, es scheint kein Problem zu geben, wenn du
حسنًا يا جيم، بما أننا في وضع معدل بت منخفض الآن، لا يمكننا مراقبة تنبيهات ال
Tout semble toujours très bien se dérouler ici au sol. J'ai une mesure de la pression cabine. Pour information, elle est de 4,8 psia. Cela casse considérablement la tendance observée. La 
D'accord. Il s'agit de préchauffer, et pourriez-vous répéter tout 
好的。我们检查了其余部分，
Хорошо. Итак, мы используем режим PRO, и в итоге получаем мигающий 5018; а здесь нужен режим AUTO, а не использование, поэтому мы используем режим PRO с наведением, PNGS; режим управления, AUTO. У нас есть мертвая зона в 1,4 градуса, которая позволит нам навести стрелки на цель, и в этот момент я смотрю через, и, если это похоже на проверку поло
في هذه اللحظة، أقوم بتغيير إعدادات جهاز التسجيل الطبي من وضع الإيقاف (1 OFF) إلى وضع التشغيل (1 ON) ثم وضع الإيقاف (2 OFF). حان وقت نوم جي
Attitudes are controlling very well. Seems to be plenty of manual fuel. I'm still
我这么问是因为我假设
أما الآن، في إجابة على السؤال الثاني، فقد كان هناك بالطبع اهتزاز عابر في المرحلة الثانية - بسبب تعطل المحرك رقم 5 - والذي حدث قبل تعطل المحرك بقليل، وبعد ذلك بقل
D'accord. Je vais te prendre quelques photos, Ed. Je devrais pouvoir te faire de superbes clichés. Je 
알았어, 짐. 우리가 상의해 볼게. 잠시만 기다려
Roger. 4, / 62888 NA, NA, me
Роджер. Джим, что ты здесь делаешь? Джим готовит десерт. Он делает пакетик шоколадного пудинга. Видно, как он проплывает мимо. Билл под
我
Houston, 
Fred-o, 
Ricevuto. Omettere il passaggio 3; eseguire il passaggio 4, tranne l'ultima riga. Interruttore 16, I
플러스 37746, 마이너스 03299, 플러스 00844 179 346 357, 해당 없음, 플러스 00176 37900 336 37705 42 1279 309, 세 번 해당 없음, 플러스 1350, 마이너스 
روجر، سبعة. نوصي في المدار الثالث باستخدام الجيروسكوبات كما تشاء، سواءً في الوضع العادي أو الحر، حتى
Ça fait qu
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। अपोलो 11 आ
Okay. Brennregeln. Wir sollten den Brennvorgang abbrechen, wenn de
Votre altitude est de 9 413; votre vitesse est de 6 072; le roulis est de 1 degré,
好的，休斯顿；水瓶座。我们已经完成能量补充，楼上一切正常。我们可以开始电池充电
حسنًا. دعني أؤكد لك يا جاك، أن ساعتين ونصف هي أقرب وقت يمكننا فيه البدء في تجهيز تلك المعدات. يمكنك فعل كل شيء آخر بالطريقة المعتادة، حيث تتقدم في اللعبة قدر الإمكان. لكن مدة الساعتين والنصف تعتمد على توفير مواد وحدة القيادة. وإذا فعلت ذل
حسنًا. بالنسبة للألوان، تبدو المياه زرقاء ملكية تقريبًا؛ أما السحب، فهي بيضاء ناصعة؛ وانعكاسها عن الأرض يبدو أكبر بكثير من انعكاس القمر. أما اليابسة، فملمسها بنيّ عمومًا، يتراوح بين البني الداكن والفاتح. ويمكن رؤية العديد من دوامات السحب الناتجة عن مختلف الخلايا الجوية. كما يمتد شريط طويل من السحب الرقيقة، على ما يبدو،
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tempo per assistere al vostro ammaraggio. Ad accompagnare il Presidente ci saranno il Segretario di Stato William Rogers e Frank Borman. Assisteranno all'ammaraggio dal ponte della nave di recupero con l'Ammiraglio John Sidney McCain, Jr., Comandante delle Forze del Pacifico. Dopo la permanenza del Presidente a bordo dell'Hornet, partirà per il suo tour in Asia e la visita programmata in Romania. Si ritiene che Luna 15 si sia schiantata ieri nel Mare delle Crisi, dopo aver orbitato attorno alla Luna 52 volte. L'agenzia di stampa sovietica TASS ha riferito che sono state condotte ricerche "scientifiche" nello spazio vicino alla Luna. Sir Bernard Lovell dell'Osservatorio di Jodrell Bank ha affermato che Luna 15 ha colpito la superficie della Luna a una velocità di circa 480 chilometri orari. La situazione è stata relativamente tranquilla di recente in Vietnam. Soldati in pattuglia sono stati osservati con radio a transistor sintonizzate sul vostro volo. Le emittenti radiotelevisive delle Forze Armate in Vietnam hanno dato piena copertura alla missione. Le schermaglie continuano tra egiziani e israeliani lungo il Canale di Suez. Gli osservatori delle Nazioni Unite stanno cercando di fermare l'azi
Хорошо. Я пр
A terra ci sono
좋아요, 전진 25피트/초, 후진 41초 120, 2+32. 23+16+02에서. 
Bene. Vorremmo avere qualche commento da parte tua prima di concludere riguard
빌, 제가 당신 말을 또렷하게 알아듣지는 못했어요. 몇 
자, 닐, 우리가 접촉하는 걸 느끼
Okay. And you might look for them in the telescope if they're not in the sextant
이렇게 본 
Ici 
Что ж, многие
Bonjour, Com T
吉姆，既然说到这个话题，我想跟杰克提一件事。正如我刚才所说，我们推荐的校准程序是月/日校准，而且我们备有太阳滤镜；它们存放在R-1隔间里；当然，这些滤镜仅供望远镜使用，不能用于六分仪。一个用于长眼距目镜，另一个用于普通目镜。如果他对此有
ठीक है, दृष्टि क्षमता अच्छी है। मुझे चार्ट पढ़ने में कोई समस्या नहीं है, दृष्टि दोष से भी कोई परेशान
Roger. Bien reçu. Translation de poussée - quatre réacteurs - Couple d'équilibrage - ON. Manette des gaz - MINIMUM. Manette des gaz - AUTO CDR. Bouton d'hélice - RÉINITIAL
अपोलो 
आगे
由于嗡嗡声，你会产生
As usual, in the real
Sigma Seven, ici Kano Cap Com. Vous m'entend
Ricevuto. Mi risulta che riceveremo un aggiornamento sul piano di volo sopra gli Stati Uniti. Sembra che saremo piuttosto impegnati lassù a quell'ora. Saremo in allineam
알겠습니다. 휴스턴에서 과이마스 상공에서 우주선에서 탈출해도 좋다는 승인을 내
收到，夏威夷。明白了。获取 B 燃烧，01 34 37；Delta-V，2.9；持续时间，0 加 0
مرحباً يا تشارلي، أستطيع أن أرى الثلج على الجبال ف
Хорошо. После этого заблокируйте оба конт
そし
Roger, Jim. Vous pouvez retourner à BLOCK; nous avons reçu et vérifié l'entrée. Il s'agissait d'une mise à jour du vecteur d'état pour le créneau ho
फ्रैंक, इस फ्री पिच और यॉ में से अगर इनमें से कोई भी मान सामान्य मानो
Und, nun ja, wo Sie den Block in der Mitte der Seite haben, der besagt – den kleinen Block mit der Aufschrift „Zodiakallichtfotos“ –, fügen Sie einfach auch in diesem Titel „Option
Affer
Aquarius, Houston. Go a
ヒュー
Roger, Neil. Das nächste Thema betrifft die Strahlen, die vom Brennraum des Triebwerks ausgehen. Wir fragen uns, ob die Strahlen unterhalb des Triebwerks dunkle
그리고 휴스턴,
लगता है हम तूफान वाले इलाके से काफी हद तक बाहर निकल च
Okay, Jack. On your entry checklist, on page 2-5. Down there on step 9, where it says 152 degrees pitch at.05g, adjacent to that, so that Recovery can see you better on
알겠습니다. 컴퓨터 스위치를 끄세요. AC 전원 스위치를 IGS로 
实际上，那是更正，它还没下降。它只是往那边去了。我想向您简要介绍一下我的控制模式。我处于自动模式，旁通开关正常，机动功能关闭。燃油表显示正常。氧气表显示非
아니요. 그런 상황에 휘말리지 않으려고 노력했
Es ist nicht zeitkritisch, Ihnen das hier hochzubringen. Bevor Sie aber selbs
जेमिनी VI, क्या आप अपने एडाप
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호입니다. 지금 트러니언 바이어스 점검을 진행 중이며, 점검이 끝나면 다음 
Wir werden in Houston zukünftige Manöver in einem langsameren, automatisierten Manövermodus durchführen. Im Wesentlichen werden wir den Tank mit 11101 beladen, um Treibstoff z
Roger. C'est bien ça. J'ai encore deux petits commentaires à faire, mais je voudrais attend
Ricevuto. Okay. Prendiamo nota della carica della batteria non appena possibile, e dell'assetto per il CAL dell'ottica: rollio 330,5, beccheggio 086,3 e imbardata tutti a zero. L'assetto per il piano di volo è corretto; e ti copio la carica della batteria. Rapporto sullo stato dell'equipaggio come segue. Sleep CDR 7, CMP 7, LMP 5,5. E abbiamo completato la checklist post-sleep. In attesa di un aggiornamento sui materiali di 
내 창문은 더 이상 빛이 들어오지 않는데도 별이 보이지 않아요. 만약 세상에 낮과 지평선에서 동시에 별을 볼 수 있는 가능성이 있다면, 지금 내가 바로 그럴 수 있는 위치에 있어야 해요. 게다가 태양
And the cabin vents at about 
ठीक है। अगर आप हमें स्वीकार कर लें, तो हम आपको युद्धाभ्यास के लिए एक स्टेट वेक्टर और 
はい、イオン化層を放出してい
تبلغ سرعتها 10 أقدام/ثانية مع القذا
वह कहता है, "मज़े के लिए VH
Les deux pompes de refroidissement sont en marche. Les 
روجر، هل ستزودنا بتحديث بشأن منا
Es sind 7 vorwärts, 5 l
And back in Washington, the Hous
It says observe the lunar
알겠습니다.
この姿勢では、はるか上を見上げているような錯覚に陥ります。地平線がなければ、ただの黒い空です。コックピット内の光量はかなり多いです。慣れてしまえば、もちろんキャビンライトで照度を下げることができます。今のところ、スーツ回路の問題があるので、ここの照度を下げるのは少々気が進まないです。指先で光るライトを多用しています。将来の飛行では、物を詰め込んで一定時間閉じ込めておくことができる万能装置が必要になると言われています。ワッシャーと小さな圧着金属片の問題です
了解。
Хорошо, Джо. Что касается новостей, Джим хотел бы немного подождать, и я хочу обратиться к ФАО с просьбой, если он согласится, в течение дн
Ich denke, wir belassen es dabei, oder möchten Sie das Thema weiterverfo
Okay. This is a pericynthian plus 2 for a fast return. This will be / 62871, minus 161, plus 129, plus 45224, minus 06216, minus 18712 001 287 351, November Alfa plus 00187 49336 603 
जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन सीएपी कॉम है। हम पायलट के लिए 6 घंटे और 12 मिनट के अंतराल पर मेडिकल डेटा पास (टाइप 1) प्राप्त करना चाहते हैं। यह टेक्सास के 
Okay.
让我说完。好的。我就知道是这样。BAT Charlie BAT CHARGE/2，关闭；BAT Baker POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING，关闭。275号面板：CB MAIN B，BAT BUS B，关闭；CB INVERTER POWER
Retrofire - retrofire's more fun than launch. You know nothing's going to stop it - it just 
Okay, we see you moving the camera up to the lens, and we got a rea
알겠습니다. 14페
我们复制了 - 四联 Bravo 1
Okay, Vance, come fai a leggere ora su DOWN VOICE BACKUP
Думаю, да. Мы будем использовать это как монитор
ロジャー、11。それについては
रॉजर।
Apoll
로저, 여기 아
ठीक है। दो को छोड़ दें, और फिर हमें फ्यूल सेल 3
알겠습니다. 오늘 아침 아폴로 관련 주요 기사들 중에, 커
روجر، يا صديقي السابع. لقد أوضحنا ذلك بشكل جليّ في رسالة الاتصال ع
Ok, sono a mezzo secondo da te. Credo di non dovermi preoccupa
База «Транквилити», это Хьюстон. Наша телеметрия показывает, что в данный момент автоматический выключатель цепи управления двигателем находится в положении «РАЗОМКНУТО». Просим вас оставить его в открытом положении до запланированной даты ввода двигателя в эксплуата
روجر، جيميني 6. ستتلقى تحديثات جيش التحرير الشعبي عبر CSQ في هذه الثورة إذا
रॉजर। जि
Это наводит на ещё одну мысль. Теперь, когда м
आप जानते हैं, 5 दिन के बाद जा
Apollo 8, Houston. Affermativo, Frank. Ci stiamo preparando a chiederti di fare un dump cancellabile. Ci stiamo pr
I'm seeing things come off, but I can't see them very clearly. There we go into 0.05, a green. I am hands off at this point. In rate command, in aux damp. And I have a roll rate started. A slight pitch rate, not bad at all. I can see out the window fo
هيوستن، هذه أبولو 8. نود إعلامكم بأننا شك
Acqua accesa, la temperatura della cabina è impostata al numero 2. L'impostazione della temperatura della tuta è oltre il s
Roger. È apparso molto più nitido con il sestante che con il monocolo, e si poteva sicuramente dire che si trattava di una singola cellula nelle ultime fasi di sviluppo. Deve essere arrivato a oltre 15.000 metri, però. Il Mediterraneo orientale è straordinariamente limpido. Si vedono tutti i laghi; il Mar Mo
Einen Moment bitte, Gus, ich versuche gerade, diesen Wasserschlauch
我还用16毫
Okay, Apollo
ठीक
Al momento niente musica, ma spe
Roger. We have four out of eight circuit breaker talkbacks indicating red. We still have the circuit breakers out as
Я, наверное, увидел какой-то другой ремешок. Черт, я чуть не... когда это сделал.
그건
41 Minuten. Wir wechseln zum primä
J
宁静基地，测距完毕。您可以将S波段功
D'accord. Marquez la
D'accord. Je suppose que le plus petit objet que l'on pourrai
Okay, Fred, let's g
Ce n'est qu'une estimation approximative. Avez-vous également trouvé d'autres indices concernant ce problème de capteur sur
很好。嘿，埃德，你刚才说要在飞船上行走。你真的在上面行走
نقطة البيانات 10 4.8، 126.65، 156، 290.8، 604. يبدو أننا متأخرون حوالي 5 دقا
Это подтверждается. Причина, по которой мы отключаем логику, Джек, — экономия электроэнергии. Поэтому мы их выключ
Okay. Now I'm using the moon which is to the left of me, and it's a real good fix for it. I'm just gonna go ahead and cover up the attitude indicator and you can watch the yaw. I'm going to gyros free, 
C'è un modo per darmi un rapido controllo della mia orbita? Questa cosa è molto più
收到，特兰奎利特。地面收到。你们那边有好几个人都快吓死了。我们
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿
Quelle est la t
وبوثيل، وجزيرة ديوك، وسايدويندر، وبالنظر إلى ماسكلين غربًا، تلك هي نقطة تفتيش الدوران حول نقطة التحول، ونحن نقترب من خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار. عند خط الفصل، يكون اللون رمادي
情况依然不错。虽然这并没有
أبولو 8، هيوستن. نعم؛ أ
好了，刚才被打断了一会儿。鲍勃·霍普又回到越南和他的部队一起演出了，一如既往地表现出色。新闻里提到的一个名字来自“新泽西”号战列舰。昨天——或者说是周三——鲍勃·霍普站在一个巨大的炮塔上开玩笑，逗乐了“新泽西”号战列舰上的1500名官兵，
À 58 heures et 10 minutes, il y a environ une heure, vous avez dépassé la durée totale de tous l
로저, 복구 지역의 날씨는 구름 0.5인치, 시야 10마일, 풍향 3노트, 북풍 360도입니다. 
Roger. Understand service modul
收到，没错，Fred
我刚才好像飞越了马绍尔群岛的部分海域。海面非常清晰，可以看到岛屿周围的环礁和
Ok, Jim. E vorrei passarti una br
इस समय डीसी वोल्ट की जाँच की जा रही है। मुख्य ब
了解しました。アドレス24、53、54はすべて正
Хорошо. Хьюстон, В
그것이 바로 확언입니다. 적절한 시기에
Oui. Nous vous surveillons aussi, vous s
Итак, во время последнего пролета мы сделали около 38 снимков на синоптическую съемку местности, начиная немного восточнее Сан-Диего и до тех пор, пока снова не столкнулись с облачностью. Мы продолжили съемку с перерывами, как только начали пролетать над южной частью Сое
大丈夫です。どうもありがとうございます。何か伝える言葉はないのですか？こ
C'est une fenêtre horrible. C'est dommage qu'on doive tirer à travers celle-ci, mais… Oh là là, on pourrait passer une vie entière à étudier la géologie de ce seul cratère, t
Gemini 4, this 
そうだと思います。トンネル周辺の外装にひび割れが見られます。遮熱カバーについては
Houston, Wa
I
Houston, Apollo 11. Looking up at the same area now and it does seem to be refle
- - نعم. استخدمت قلم Pentel الخاص بي وحولت تلك الب
Okay. This is preliminary results, but it will give you some indication. Corrected altitude is turning out to be 17 plus or minus 4 kilometers, and the fact that it's plus or minus 4 kilometers indicates that you're being very consistent in judging the altitude. The effective altitude is turning out to be 10 plus or minus 12 kilometers. Comments are that, as I said before, you're being consistent on the horizon selection. The substellar point error is averaging 15 arc-minutes and if you could hold the rate
Geht hier irg
And, Jim, Houston. We really are going to get those checkl
رو
ジェミニ4
了解。本当にありがとう
ジェミニ4、カーナボンC
ठीक है। अब मैं आपको बताता हूँ कि हम क्या 
Sì. La rispos
Looks like Houst
Aspetta un attimo, Joe, se non t
이글, 휴스턴. 타임라인에 나와 있는 대로, 도킹 해제 전에 404, 405, 406 세 주소 모두의 값을 0으로 설정해 주십시오. 도킹 후에는 현재 값으로 다시 로드할 수 
Bien, John. On va tout vérifier. Je voudrais te donner les températures de l'onduleur. Tes ventilateurs sont à 215 degrés et ton onduleur à 198 degrés. O
आपको क्या लगता है कि जब हमने इसे पहली बार देखा तो हम कितनी दूर थे? मुझे लगता है कि जब ह
Nous venons de terminer le lacet de l'Agena à 090° et le lacet était précisément de 1,5 degré par seconde lors de la man
When you feel up to copying, 11, I've got a couple of small items in the w
Il 
Игл, ты читал Колумбийский универси
ठीक है। मैं प्रसारण बंद कर रहा हूँ; मैं फ्रेडो को प्र
Роджер, Фрэнк. Мы что-то
では、パネル250に戻りましょう。C
Okay. You want us to OMNI Delta and MANUAL on the high gain 
And the d
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴입니다
ठीक है। क्
Okay. Dies sind vorläufige Ergebnisse, aber sie geben Ihnen einen ersten Anhaltspunkt. Die korrigierte Höhe beträgt 17 ± 4 Kilometer, und die Abweichung von ± 4 Kilometern deutet darauf hin, dass Sie die Höhe sehr genau bestimmen. Die effektive Höhe beträgt 10 ± 12 Kilometer. Wie bereits erwähnt, wählen Sie den Horizont konsistent. Der Fehler des substellaren Punktes beträgt durchschnittlich 15 Bogenminuten. Wenn Sie die Fehlerrate minimieren könnten, wäre ein Wert von 5 Bogenmi
Roger, Gemelli 4. Mi sono appena alzato da un lungo... pisolino. Ho dormito 4 ore e mezza. In quel tempo, probabilmente ho dormito 3 ore e mezza. Da quando mi sono alzato, ho bevuto 3 sorsi d'acqua. Ho finito il mio... prima di andare a letto ho consumato il pasto A del secondo giorno e mi sto preparando a consumare
로저
Apollo 11, Houston. Sind Sie sicher, dass sich niemand sonst mit I
Sigma Seven，Sigma Seven，这里是亨茨维尔通
실수로 옮겨지
罗杰。000 175 358 00607，
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। हमें लगता है कि ये रीडिंग सामान्य सीमा के भीतर हैं। इन स्टिकर्स को लगा
세상 돌아가는 일 궁금하세요? 휴스턴 애스트로스가 신시내티를 8 대 3으로 이겼어요. 러스티 스타웁
أبولو 11، هذه هيوستن. نراكم. عندما تجيبون بـ "موافق"، سيكون لدينا متجه الحالة 
Gémeaux 4. Chirurgien RKV. Nous avons une bonne tension artérielle. Nous nous occupons de vos repas, de votre hydratation et de votr
제미니 4, RKV CAP COM. 수신했습니까
Et bien sûr, lorsqu
D'accord, Mike. Bien sûr, ceci est prévu pour l
如果我知道结果会是这样，我就不会把瓶子烧到那种程度了。你知道，我习惯了，一接触到目标物，我就看看。
À ce stade, j'ai un taux de 
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호. 뒷면에 있는 큰 크레이터 중 하나
Okay. Penso che sarebbe meglio se tu pubblicassi la tua lista di controll
ठीक है। अब तुम कैसे पढ़ते हो,
هذا 3.5. هل أنت في وضع التشغيل التلقائي؟ تحقق من ضغط المقصورة عند 3.5 وضغ
I know what you mean. I had a littl
わかりました。18ミリから75
В таком положении определенно создается иллюзия, что смотришь высоко вверх, и если горизонта нет, то это просто черное небо. Количество света в кабине довольно высокое. Конечно, после адаптации его можно уменьшить с помощью освещения салона. На данный момент я несколько не решаюсь уменьшать уровень освещения из-за проблемы с цепью скафандра. Я щедро использую фонарики на кончиках пальцев. Отмечается, что в будущих полетах нам понадобится какое-то универсальное устройство, куда можно будет запи
Bene. Oggi, le funzioni religiose in tutto il mondo menzionano l'Apollo 11 nelle loro preghiere. Anche la funzione religiosa del Presidente Nixon alla Casa Bianca è dedicata alla missione, e il nostro collega astronauta, Frank Borman, è ancora lì a proporre e leggerà il brano della Genesi che è stato letto sull'Apollo 8 lo scorso Natale. Il Gabinetto e i membri del Congresso, con particolare attenzione alle commissioni spaziali del Senato e della Camera, sono stati invitati, insieme a diversi altri ospiti. Buzz, tuo figlio Andy ha visitato ieri l'MSC. Tuo zio Bob Moon lo ha accompagna
Apollo 8, Houston. Sembra che servano ancora circa 3 ore per caricare la batteria A. P
والآن، نود أن نطرح عليك سؤالاً بخصوص المحاذاة وما شابه. أردنا أن نعرف ما إذا كان بإمكانك رؤية أي نجوم من خلال النافذة. كما أردنا أن نعرف ما إذا كان بإمكانك استخدام وح
Roger. Hey, would you check your ACQ aid circuit breaker and make sure it's ON
Understand. Sure like to keep this vehicle in 
Oh, merde! ​​Ce pitch est nul; 32, hein? Le pitch 315, c'est celui-là! Bon. Ils n'arrêtent pas de dire « taux ORB » et cette petite attitude, là, et là, ça s'applique à tout le reste de cette page, à toute 
Gemini 4, CSQ. Pourriez-vous vérifier vos batteries principales et nous indiquer si elles sont opérationnel
Okay. We will go ahead with t
मुझे बर्फ के छोटे-छोटे क्रिस्ट
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस। क्या आपके पास हमारे लिए अद्यतन वजन है?
Bien reçu. Cap vous demande de corréler les mouvements des particules entourant l
Хорошо. Хорошо, примерно в 156:50 справа — ну, в правой половине страницы есть строка, в которой написано: «Визуальная цель 16, юг, 11, Гассенди, f:15». Про
맞습니다. 배터리 릴레이 버스 회로 차단기, 배터리 A와 B가 
Привет, отлично. Хорошо, панель 225: 
That's affirm. Next. flight data file. Tha
Понял. Нам приш
ठीक है। मैंने दोबारा पढ़ा: सेकेंडरी एक्यूमुलेटर की मात्रा की निगरानी करें; सेकेंडरी ग्लाइकोल रेडिएटर वाल्व को 30 सेकंड के लिए सामान्य स्थिति में रखें, फिर उसे बाईपास कर दें। यदि सेकेंडरी एक्यूमुलेटर की मात्रा में कोई कमी नहीं होती है, तो सेकेंडरी ग्लाइकोल रेडिएटर वाल्व को सामान्य स्थिति में रखें।
D'accord. La proposition qui me semble la plus plausible est la suivante: si on laisse Jim effectuer son évaluation au télescope, vous procédez exactement de la même manière, sauf que vous pivotez de 180 degrés pour avoir la tête en l'air, et vous laissez Jim effectuer son suivi au télescope. Vous serez toujours légèrement en lacet lorsque vous irez chercher votre téléviseur, etc. Cela devrait suffire. On peut procéder ainsi, ou
终点前的冲刺阶段相当艰难。我们向外望去，可以看到双子座的两颗星从双子座六号星（更正：是七号星
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि अंतरिक्ष कार्यक्रम को लगभग सभी ने अत्याधुनिक इलेक्ट्रॉनिक उपकरणों से भरा हुआ ही समझा है, और निश्चित रूप से, इसमें बहुत कुछ ऐसा ही है। लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि मैं यहाँ कुछ और चीज़ें भी दिखाऊँगा। पहली चीज़ से आपको टैंक में बचे हुए पानी की मात्रा का बहुत सटीक माप मिल जाता है। हम इस थैली का उपयोग करेंगे जो मैं अभी दिखा रहा हूँ, टैंक में बचे हुए पानी को इकट्ठा क
Мы собираемся 
सदन की वेज़ एंड मीन्स कमेटी ने कल तेल कंपनियों, बैंकों और बिजली कंपनियों को प्रभावित करने वाले कर परिवर्तनों पर सहमति व्यक्त की, जिससे संघीय राजस्व में प्रति वर्ष 2 अरब डॉलर तक की वृद्धि हो सकती है। कमेटी ने टेलीफोन, बिजली, गैस और तेल पाइपलाइन कंपनियों के लिए लेखांकन प्रक्रियाओं में बदलाव करने और पारस्परिक बचत एवं ऋण संस्थानों के कर लाभों को कम करने के लिए भी अस्थायी रूप से मतदान किया। इसलिए, 
जैक, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप लाइट चालू रखें ताकि आप अंदर देख सकें, और बैटरी बंद रखें - बैटरी A बं
حسنًا. لقد عدنا إلى 
了解しました。それでは、この機動を続けて、ロール82度、ピッチ218度、ヨー
ऐसा क्यों है कि मुझे - उसे इंट
Understand you still have the balloon with you. It's poss
로저. REACQ 모드로 
ठीक है, एक तरफ खड़े हो जाओ, मैं पें
Wir würden – Bei einem abschließenden Test, wenn Ihre hier zugeteilte Zeit fast abgelaufen ist, möchten wir Sie bitten, alle Filter zu entfernen und uns zu zeigen, wie es ohne Filter aussieht. An
Okay. We're stopping now and maneuvering to our 
ठीक है। हमने नहीं किया है। हमने इसे पूरा नहीं किया है। हम शुरू करेंगे। हम चाहते
极光七号，极光七号，这里是桑给巴尔资本通讯公司。您的报告虽然简短，但勉强能读懂
Roger. Amicizia Sette. Ora sto p
حسنًا، سنعيد فانس إلى مكانه. انتظر
Okay. Überspringen Sie auf Feld 6 d
Здравствуйте, Zanzibar Com Tech. Zanzibar Com Tech, Friendship Seven. Получе
Что ж, я надеюсь, чт
Gemini 4, Хьюстон, CAP COM. Оставьте переключатель 
En fait, Mike, c'est tellement facile de le faire avec la boule noire, dans une certaine mesure, qu'il n'est pas vraiment utile de se contorsionner pour regarder dehors. De plus, la luminosité dans le cockpit est suffisante pour que l'étoile soit difficilement vi
로저. 버즈, 이 모습 정말 멋지네요. 5초 카운트를 읽고 있습니다. 짧은 카운트로 시작하는데, 1초만 돌려주시면 됩니다. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5; 5, 4, 3, 2
Nous 
Хорошо. Скоро загорится индикатор нулевого давления в пе
وانتب
Водолей, Хьюстон. Вы
请代我转告你，非常感谢你
Alcune di queste piccole
Хорошо. На подготовку у нас уйдёт
好的。删除阿波罗里程碑飞行2和3。
Das ist bestätigt, Gemini 4. Bezüglich des Experiments MSC-1 bitten wir Sie, Ihr ACQ-Hilfsfeuer während des Experiments MSC-1 für etwa 5 Minuten auszuschalten. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, dies zwischen Kano und Carnarvon in diese
Roger. Könnten Sie uns bitte unsere Entfernung – Korrek
여기는 우정 7입니다. 아주
로저. 정확히 맞
Je pense que n
네. 그 물건들은 컴퓨터 아래쪽에 들어가는데, 거기에 무거운 물건들을 넣을수록 L/D 비율이 높아집니다. 저희는 쓰레기통이 없어서 어떤 무거운 물건들을 넣을 수 있을지 궁금했습니다. 카메라나 TV 카메라처럼 무거운 것들을 그 안에 넣을 수 있을까요? 저희 쓰레기통에는 쓰레기통을 넣을 수는 없지만, 아래쪽에 있는 컨테이너에 넣으면 L/D 비율을 줄이는 데 도움이 될 것 같습니다. 저희는 쓰레기통조차 없어서 L/D 비율이 꽤 높은 편인데, 다른 
I'm taking some general - normal 
はい。ジム、少しの間、鍵が見当たらなくなっていました。では、こんにちは。バッテリーAの電圧と、バッテリー充電器の電流値を教えてく
आसान 
我希望那台相机不会掉下来
ठीक है, आखिरी बार जब हमने सिनॉप्टिक टेरेन फोटोग्राफी का इस्तेमाल किया, तो हमने सैन डिएगो के थोड़ा पूर्व से शुरू करके बादलों के घेरे में आने तक लगभग 38 तस्वीरें लीं। जैसे ही हम संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के दक्षिणी भाग, अलबामा और मिसिसिपी के आसप
ठीक है। मैं इन्हें पहले जल्दी से पढ़ लेता हूँ ताकि आपको एक सामान्य जानकारी मिल जाए। पैड, सर्विस मॉड्यूल JETT एटीट्यूड, मून व्यूइंग एटीट्यूड, सन व्यूइंग एटीट्यूड और JETT एटीट्यूड। पैड चंद्रमा और सूर्य के अवलोकन के दौरान एटीट्यूड के लिए मोटे एलाइन कोण, प्रवेश के लिए मोटे एलाइन कोण और JETT के लिए प्रवेश 
그건 아닌 것 같군요, 잭. 제가
아폴
休斯顿，哥伦比亚。我即将迎来第一次飞越的时间，届时我或许能看到登月舱。您能否提供一些地形线索，帮助我确定登月舱的位置？目前自动光学系统正在两个陨石坑之间追踪
Ist das 
バズ、準備はいい
Roger, Roger. Nous n'avons pas reçu ces mises à jour. Pourriez-vous y aller doucemen
물병자리, 휴스턴입니다. 부정적인 의견입니다. 저희는 지금처럼 유지
Mann
Wie meinen Sie das? Wir werden eine Ausrichtung auf den Mond und die Sonne vornehmen; darüber hinaus – ich habe nichts mitbekommen – ich hatte das Headset nicht auf, als die allgemeinen Informationen weitergegeben wurden, also falls es noch mehr gab, habe ich es nicht mitbek
لا يمكننا رؤية أي ضوء أرضي أ
... verstehst du, Ed? Mach es bloß n
ठीक है, जिम। मुझे लगता है कि अभी के लिए हमारे पास आपके लिए बस इतना ही है। जब आपको लगे कि अभी आपके पास कोई और सवाल नहीं है, तो कृपया डाउन वॉइस बैकअप के लिए कॉन्फ़िगरेशन को फिर से सेट करें। इसके लिए आपको हमेशा की तरह वॉइस फ़ंक्शन स्विच को डाउनवॉइस बैकअप पर सेट करना होगा, लेकिन सर्क
로저. NA, NA, NA, +1350, -16500 13050 36389; 시리우스, 리겔, 129 155 010, 2개
حسنًا. في اللوحة 3: الخطوات الثلاث الأولى التي قمنا بها؛ الوضع، الصوت، إلى الصوت؛ الطاقة،، إيقاف التشغيل؛ طاقة PMP إلى إيقا
11, Houston. On your O2 flow, fuel cell 3: apparently it was flowing a little higher than the other two during purge, but the flow rate is acceptable. O
Er hat das verstanden. David ist da; er sagt, du hättest ihn so 
Roger. GM
Pouvez-vous m'expliquer pourquoi ils
Sunri
4시 30분, 시계 기준. 연료와 산소는 안정적이며, 중력 가속도는 3.5g
그리고 우리는 결국 그 소식을 듣지 못했어
できないんです
月面サンプルを見るために多くの国から多くの科学者が待機していることは承知していますので、実際のサンプルをご覧いただければ興味深いと思い、ここに掲載しました。この2つの箱がサンプルリターンコンテナです。真空パックされたコンテナは、月面で真空状態にして密閉され、その後、宇宙船内に持ち込まれ、グラスファイバー製の袋に入れられ、ジッパーで閉じられ、外側も再び密閉された後、司令船側面の容器に
In diesem Moment werden die Sonnenstrahlen von der Spitze des Raumschiffs reflektiert und lassen es dadurch vollständig verschwinden. Links und unten sind einige helle Sterne zu sehen. Ich erkenne nun den Oriongürtel. Sirius befindet sich also deutlich unterhalb unserer Nase.
على المنظار. ي
Bene. In cima alla pagina successiva, dove c'è scritto "Evaporatore secondario ad acqua", tenete presente che non prevediamo di utilizzare gli evaporatori secondari a meno che quello primario non si guasti. Alla riga 35 a p
Okay. Another thing is to remember when we begin blackout, which is around 05g, and you can write this in your checklist wherever it's convenient; once we've lost COMM, we're going to go 
阅读量 6000
了解。上昇 PAD: TIG 124 22 00 00 00 NOUN 76 55349 00322、プラス 0017; 47、プラス 37104、マイナス 70470、プラス 58604、プラス
D'accord, nous sommes à 1000 pieds,
Роджер. TLI: 23514 179 071 001, время работы двигателя 547 104356 35575. Бр
Okay, die Lüfter liefen jeweils 2 Minuten u
Abbiamo un ALLARME PROGRAMMATO, Vance. 11
Buzz, qui Houston. Mi risulta che hai 
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь». Это Guaymas Cap Com. Сейчас вы немного невнятно говори
Ok. Fammi sapere quando pensi di mollarlo la prossima volta, Jerry. Ho capito che ora siamo in azione.
알겠습니
わかりました。OMNI を切り替えるだけです。わかりました。ジョー、1 ～ 4 ページの変更点を読んでみると、燃料電池ヒーター 3 がオフで、燃料電池 1 メイン バス A の中央に下りてきて、メイン バス A をオフにします。メイン バス - 燃料電池 2 をメイン バス A にオフにします。燃料電池 3 をメイン バス A にトークバック グレーにします。メイン バス A リセットをオフにしま
पुष्टि करें। "प्रेस" के अंतर्गत, चरण 1, पंक्ति 1, मिटा दें। पंक्ति 4, "डिसेंट हीलियम रेग 1, टॉकबैक बार्बर पोल।" चरण 2 के अंतर्गत, मिटा दें;
ロジャー、Rev 12 RKVでPLAとCLAの時刻を更新します。Rev 13ではカナリア諸島にCバンドの航
रॉजर, यॉ में 180° पर स्
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 저희 컴퓨터를 사용해서 상태 벡터를 업데이트하
ठीक है, वैंस, आप कुंभ र
Oui, cela nous convient. Vous pouvez effectuer une révision. C'est un processus assez fastidieux, c'est pourquoi nous souhaitons le surveiller de près afin de savoir, avant l'entrée dans l'atmosphère, si nous aurons besoin de deux boucles ou d'une seule. Ce qui nous amène à une autre question, ou plutôt deux, que nous cherchons à résoudre. Premièrement, nous souhaitons vérifier que vous prévoyez bien d'utiliser les chaudières primaire et secondaire lors de l'entrée dans l'atmosphère. Deuxièmement, nous cherchons un moyen de contrôler la chaudière primaire afin de nous assurer qu'elle n'est pas à sec avant l'entrée dans l'atmosphère. Cela s'avère plus
好的。我本来想说我们没有——我们几乎不携带维修模块
E-MEMOR
Roge
네,
Okay. Die Spannung im Obergeschoss beträg
チャーリー、明日は荷物を整理して、できるだけ標準に近づけるように再構成します。標準から外れるものとしては、まずバイザーを司令船に戻しましたが、まだ置き場所が決まっていません。置き場所は後ほどお知らせします。さらに、エイブル8のコンパート
Роджер. Понимаю
好的。我把它设在负五秒，然后准时开火——数到零的时候就开火
Housto
はい、13 です。まず、ジャックの次の予定について、ちょっとした手続きの変更
Yes, I think it'd probably be best, since we've done burn, to put it back over the instrument panel instead of putting it up over the on t
Okay. We have some notes on that. Listen, I think on the 33rd Rev, if at all possible I'd like to take those... shots across the Southwestern United States on Rev. 5
알겠습
Okay. Alfa 1 befindet sich 500 Fuß über dem Landeplatz
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。如果可以的话，我
हाँ, है। लेकिन यह आपके सूट से नहीं टकरा रहा है। इसे एक बार फिर से मारो। अंदर की तरफ थोड़ा
휴스턴, 제미
망원경을 통한 관측이 매우 좋지 않습니다. 시뮬레이터보다도 더 나쁘다고 할 수 있겠습니다. 장시간 암순응이 필요한데, 이는 대부분의 경우 매우 불편합니다. 따라서 플랫폼의 전원을 
मैं आपको बता
Allez-y Houston, Apollo 
D'accord. M
Ich kopi
Хорошо. Давайте я еще раз проверю, а 
Ok, Fred. Lo scopo della manovra è PC più 2, per ora stiamo andando all'MPL. E 079, 27, 4013, più 08144, meno 00443, meno 02226, l'apogeo è N/D, il perigeo è più 00205, 08455, 420, 268, 261, più 08155, meno 00443, meno 02187, è N/D. La tua GDA dovrebbe essere a posto così com'è dall'ultima accensione, ma il beccheggio dovrebbe essere a 5,85; in rollio, è 6,74. Il tuo ullage sarà di due getti per 10 secondi. La tua manetta sarà al 10% per 5 secondi, al 40% per 21 secondi e il resto a piena manetta. E per tua infor
收到。明白了
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。稍后我们会为您带来州级疫情的最新情况。目前我们还没有准备好；另外，来自静海基地的消息称，他们已做好提前启动防暴行动的准备。他们预计
Houston, nur so nebenbei: Wir können Ihnen wahrscheinlich einen Cursor-Spiralwinkel für Nunki und möglicherweise Antares oder höchstwahrscheinlich Sha
حسنًا. +90: /G&N، 63825، -1.54، +1.32، -0491.7
Roger, Jim. 
Ricevuto. Prima che Bill si addormenti, vorremmo che ci desse un r
Roger, Buzz. That's a good readback. You're about two by with these OMNI's in this configuration; we won't have very good COMM until we get thr
Wir erreichen nun 
Das war in etwa das, was wir vorher in Bezug auf die Pitch-Ein
了解。前進36-
J'ai de l'Alvagrine éteinte à mesurer. Cette expérience ne sera pas concluante; il me faut la lumière de la cabine pour y voir clair. Le photomètre d'extinction est
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी। हमें यकीन नहीं है कि हमने दूसरे
收到。还有，275号配电盘上的所有断路器
Это же прямо от самой оконечности Калифорнийского залива, не та
アポロ8
В средн
Okay, 13. We've got lots and lots of people working on this; we'll give you some do
गिम्बल अच्छे दिखते हैं
了解しました。飛行士からの報告によると、コンピューターがオ
Эт
Potresti riferire a Houston che a quanto pare abbiamo una lampadina fulminata nel finestrino di poppa del sestante? E se hanno altre istruzioni da darci. Forse abb
Ok. È piuttosto buio qui all'ombra e faccio un po' fatica a vedere se ho un buon
D'accor
Publ
D'accord. Les suivants, sur la case 1, restent inchangés, et sur la case 2, descendez jusqu'aux signaux de retour du propergol, et entre parenthèses, rayez « huit », et écrivez « quatre à gris », puis tracez au crayon « signaux de retour du pr
ठीक है। 6/7 के लिए आपका मानचित्र अपडेट: सूर्योदय, प्रधान मध्याह्न रेखा। क्या आप मे
11, Houston. On a une belle vue depuis le point 
不。我们几分钟前才刚讨论过这个问题。湿度一直很低，大概在 60% 到 63% 之间，而且没有明显的潮
Va bene, Van
Das ist bestätigt. Ich halte dich mit dem DAP fest und messe die Totzone. Wenn du bereit bist, die AGS-Kalibrierung durchzuführen, werde ich die Triebwerkszündung etwas dämpfen und hoffen, sie dann ganz abstellen zu können, aber ich glaube nicht, dass das reichen w
16:03 頃、私たちがカリフォルニア湾のメキシコ側を横切る最後の通過時
यह Muchea Cap Com है। वे अगले 3 मिनट तक आपस
Bene. E lasciate che vi spieghi cosa faremo, visto che questo pomeriggio vi abbiamo raccontato una storia diversa su questo tunnel. In realtà, sfiateremo il tunnel verso il basso in modo da ottenere una pressione assoluta compresa tra 1,5 e 2 psi. Questo ci darà un DELTA-P
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. سنشحن البطارية "ب" حتى فترة السكون. سنتوقف عن الشحن حينها. أيضاً، في حوالي الساعة ١٢:٢٥ من خطة
好了，乔，在我睡觉之前，我只想确认一下——你还在计划10
पहली बार तो हमें 
Роджер. Компьютерная проверка всех режимов. Вставьте 10 футов/сек во все IVI, нажмите на индикатор неисправности и нажмите кнопку запуска компьютера... это... выключите компьютер на 2 секунды, включи
좋아요, 아주 잘 됐네요. 이제 용기 바닥 쪽으로 비닐봉투가 몇 센티미터 정도 튀어나와 있을 거예요. 이 부분이 바닥 스크린에 닿아 빨려 들어가는 것을 방지하기 위해 가위로 잘라내 주세요. 그런 다음, 테이프를 약 30cm 길이로 두 개 더 잘라주세요. 그리고 세로로 찢어서 30cm 길이, 1.2cm 너비의 테이프 네 조각을 만드세요. 이 네 조각을 이용해서 비닐봉투를 고정해 주세요. 용기
À 01:06:106 (1 minute, 1 heure et 7 minutes se sont écoulées), je dépasse l'éche
カプセルを再突入姿勢で停止させています。ロールアウト中です。ヨーはゼロ、ロールアウトが始まっています。これを捕捉して、その後観察したいと思います。ロールは良好です。ピッチングが始まっており、ヨーも始まって​​います。速度と姿勢は良好です。…少し低スラスターを調整しましたが、非常に良好です。Tr-10とジャイロをウォーミン
아폴로 11호, 여기
그리고 O2 팬 2번이 작동 중입니다
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. You can terminate the exercise on the Laser. Our rates are steady enough now for - to
了解。6800年時点で、合計マイナス4.5%、つまり約マイナス53ポンドに相当します。アルファはマイナス6.0%、マイナス1.0%、マイナス7.0%、マイナス3.0%。水素は合計マイナス1.2ポンド、酸素はプラ
알았어, 알았어, 카나본
收到。我
Хорошо, Джим. Я не расслышал э
Хорошо. Я нажму ENTER, удерживая кнопку MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, а затем 30 ра
Sta
وأعتقد أنه في منتصف المسار الأخير، سنرغب في البدء بالنظر إلى منتصف المسار مبكرًا نسبيًا، إن أمكننا ذلك، وذلك أساسًا للتحكم في وضعية السفينة. ك
حسنًا يا جيم. نحن نناقش هذا الأمر معك؛ إنه موضوع أردنا طرحه عليك. لقد فكرنا فيه مليًا، ورأينا هو - بالطبع،
Jack, ils ne veulent pas donner de chiffre précis pour l'instant car ils disent que les réservoirs vont se réchauffer plus tard et que la consommation apparente diminuera. Mais c'était négligeable
아폴
没错。面板 1 上：旋转控制电源，正常。有两个，分别
Мы приближаемся к точке. Кон
わかりました。SバンドのNORMALモ
尤里·阿列克谢耶维奇，我们现在要把这个电台转移
宁静基地，到这里不到10分钟。一切看起来都不错，
A
オーケー。ヒューストン、地球の明るさを測ったところ、320ルーメンだった。地球は今320ルーメンを示している。ビル​​、ジム・ラベルのクローズアップを撮れば、彼がすでにヒゲ競争で私たちを追い抜いていることをみんなに見せることができるだろ
11, это «
80 millimetri saranno probabilmente altr
Ok, Fred. Prima, che è meno 1 ora, manovra il gimbal ai seguenti angoli: rollio, 130; beccheggio, 125; imbardata, 012,4. Gli angoli corrispondenti del gimbal saranno rollio, 291; beccheggio, 196; i
Mal sehen. In Springfield, Missouri, beschloss Mickey Owen, der legendäre Catcher der Brooklyn Dodgers, der Geschichte schrieb, indem er 1941 in der World Series den dritten Strike fallen ließ und so den New York Yankees den Sieg über die Dodgers bescherte, dass er nicht nur für seinen sportlichen Rekord in Erinnerung bleiben wollte. Fünfundvierzig Jungen und Mädchen erhielten von ihm angebotene Ponys. Die Kinder wurden gebeten, ihm Briefe zu schreiben, in denen sie ihm erzählten, wie sie sich um ein Pony kümmern würden. Als die Briefe eintrafen, fügte er den bereits angebotenen 20 Ponys fünf weitere hinzu; und andere Spender steuerten weitere 20 bei. Mickey Owen sagte: „Ich dachte, ich würde etwa 45 Briefe bekommen, aber am Ende w
알겠습니다. 사령관과 지휘관은 깨어 있는
Hav
あの一列に並んだクレーターを見てください。見えま
Ich
オーケー、ウォーリー。37個あ
حسنًا يا فريدو. لا نخطط لاستخدام الهوائي القابل للتوجيه، مع أننا نريد إبقاء السخانات قيد التشغيل.
यह मेरे पास यहीं है। इसमें लगभग एक रोल है 
ठीक है। जिम निचले उपकरण कक्ष से हमारी एक तस्वीर लेंगे, और फिर हमें अपने पैसिव थर्मल कंट्रोल को बारबेक्यू मोड में वापस लाना होगा ताकि अंतरिक्ष यान का एक हिस्सा एक ही समय में बहुत देर तक बहुत ज़्यादा 
Ich möchte, dass
जाइरोस्कोप बंद हैं। मेरी यॉ रेट लगभग 2 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड है। सभी जाइरोस्कोप शून्य पर सेट हैं। मेरे ठीक ऊपर कोरवस तारामंडल है। मैं 
R
لم أقرأ، لم أقرأ. قله
Okay, this is 13. W
了解しました。宇宙船とロケットの誘導装置を確認しました。どちらも良好な状態です。ロケット
11，这里是休斯顿。画面现在有点模糊了。你可
That's affirmative. Okay, now we're going to panel 5, and
あ
Comme vous le savez probablement, plusieurs groupes travaillent sur les procédures à suivre. Un groupe se concentre sur les corrections en cours de vol afin de déterminer le système, les attitudes, la méthode à suivre, les techniques d'alig
ठीक है, जिम। हमें समझ आ गया। प्रतीक्षा करें। एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हम मोड कं
쌍둥이자리
It looks like in our power-down (illegible) we're still pulling just a little less than 11 amps. We've got 10 on no. 1 and a little less than 11 on no. 2. The tether - the location of the tether or the umbilical restraint on the outside hatch made it rather difficult to do any EVA work as far as free tether aerodynamics out in front of the spacecraft. Whenever I'd be operating out in that area, the tether would - when it would come to its end would start me back and the reaction would carry me back up towards the - over the spacecraft and back toward the adapter section. That's why I kept going out of sight during my maneuvering out there up above the
Да. Видите эти крошечные точк
R
Oh. Our little plot shows you just touc
À que
네, 그 히
Und ab und zu trifft 
روجر. شكراً جزيلاً لك
روجر. نود الاطلاع على العنوان 470، ونعطيك إشارة البدء قبل البدء بالقص. ا
OK, Houston. J'essaie de réduire les tangages. Nous avons l'assiette et l'angle de ro
Okay. The master title, "Entry, LM PREP, minus 6 hours." First, BAT 5 NORMAL FEED, ON; s
ह्यूस्टन, को
In modalit
Ora riesco a vedere le luci pos
Roger. Jim, vous avez parfaitement compris. Nous aimerions con
Задержка в 7 часов связана с тем, что нам
Мы понимаем, что это подтверждается. Мы даже рады это слышат
Arrivo. Asco
Es dauert allerdings viel länger. Ich
好的。开始了。目的是进行中途修正以实现自由返回：-0021.3，+0004.1，-0031.2；HA 和 HP 不适用；DELTA-V 0038.0；031，120，298，-00213，+00041，-00312；不适用。
Gemini 4, RKV
Близнецы 4, это Хьюстон. Повторяю, забег
알겠습니다. 약
Не могли бы вы перед
켄, 저도 그렇게 생각합니다. 이 띠는 M선과 평행한데, 외부에서 광학 장치로 들어오는 직사각형 입구, 즉 광학 장치 설계와 관련이 있는 것 같습니다. 이 특정 태양 각도에서는 띠가 정확히 가로지릅니다. 지구와 태양 모두 스캐닝 망원경에 이런 현상을 일으킨다는 것을 알게 되었습니다. 육분의에서도 같은 빛 띠가 나타나는데, 육분의 시야 전체를 가리지만 확대율 덕분에 별이 아주 잘 보이고 표시도 가능합니다. 하지만 스캐닝 망원경으로는 별을 식별
알겠습니다, 마이크. 제 말은, 아직 눈에 보이는 물방울이 많이 남아있지만,
Well, we should have Tananarive. How about going - pr
Zwi
嗯，你知道，——嗯，就这一个样本来看，我很惊讶你那里没有更多
分かりました。それについてはいくつか興味深いアイデアがあり、最
जेमिनी 4, यह कैंट
ओह, ठीक है। ठीक है। मैं फिर से संगीत की आवाज़
نعم. لقد أجريت اختبار P21 للتو وحصلنا ع
Ok. Frank, abbiamo un'immagine meteo qui
حسنًا. فريد سينزل الآن إلى هناك، وسيحاول الدخول أسفل منصة النوم على ج
抱歉，我们
मुझे तो कैप्सूल काफी अच्छी स्थिति 
Roger, Jim. In your computer, we'd like to do an erasable memory dump again, like we did the other day, and the reason we'd like to do it is, when you did that about 8 hours ago, and you remember you put that time f
रॉजर। अब आपके उ
是的，…
아니요. 저희는 하나밖에 없어요. 1번은 아
알겠습니다. 그 다음, CB CTE, MAIN B를 눌러 닫습니다. 다음으로, 250번 패널: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2를 눌러 닫고, CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLA
Affirmative. We want this for one la
34分にプライマリスキャナーに戻ります。ウォームア
알겠습니다. 이해했어요
Right. Not much t
Bene. Abbiamo un altro input qui, l'11, secondo cui i dati erano riconoscibili come un'immagine, ma
حسنًا. الآن اضغط الكيس على الأحزمة اللاصقة التي وضعناها على جانبي العلبة. إذا كان هناك أي فائض من القماش، فقم بثنيه قليلاً لإحكام إغلاقه، ثم خذ شريطًا لاصقًا آخر بطول 90 سم ولفه حول الجزء الخارجي من الكيس المقابل للجزء السفلي - الحزام
Roger. Nous avons ici l'Interstellar Times, édition du 24 décembre. Votre émission a rencontré un vif succès. Elle a été regardée ce matin par la plupart des nations de votre planète voisine: la Terre. Elle a été diffusée en direct dans toute l'Europe, y compris à Moscou et à Berlin-Est, ainsi qu'au Japon, dans toute l'Amérique du Nord et centrale et dans certaines régions d'Amérique du Sud. Nous ignorons encore l'étendue de sa couvertu
Roger, Jack. Damit ist dieser Vorgang abgeschlossen. Als Nächstes zeige ich Ihnen, wie Sie über das Kommandomodul die Hauptbusse vorübergehend mit Strom versorgen. Zunäc
ठीक है, जैक। इस बार 
Okay. Looking on entry 1: the second item there is the 12-hour Kelvin cold soak, and in discussions I here and preflight, I think it is agreed that we don't want to do the cold soak there. So we are going to delete that step 2. And what it amounts to is, I think we do want to do a cold soak, and we certainly want to exercise the water boilers prior to entry in order to insure that we don't have one that is dried out, in the same manner that we had one dried out prior to. And we are working on some procedures for th
はい。行きま
좋습니다. 7번 줄을 보세요. "수평선 확인 자세로 기동"이라고 되어 있습니다. 이걸 "달 확인 자세"라고 부르겠습니다. 잭, 우리가 얘기했던 바로 그 자세죠. 각도 265도는 올바르지 않습니다. 내일 
双子星4号，这里是休斯顿。我们没有收
نعم يا جيم، ننتقل إلى الصفحة ٢٩. لدينا - في هذه المرحلة، هناك حاجة لكتابة نص. إنه حوالي ستة أو سبعة أسطر، وسأحاول أن أقرأ ببطء وأترك ​​لك حرية كتابته
Lo scanner s
了解。グアイマス上空で重要なテープダンプ。取得時刻は20時25分3
«
Хорошо. Джим снова выйдет на связь, я отключу 
Negativ, Gemini 4. Und seien Sie bezüglich der D-9 der Apollo-Landmarken vorsichtig. Vermeiden Sie jegliche Annäherung, die es Ihnen ermögl
Okay. Weiter mit dem Zielstern: Dzuba, der zentrale Stern im Kopf des Skorpions; seine Position ist 060° unten, 42° links, plus 0773°, minus 16500°, 12982° 36256°. Die nördlichen Sterne bleiben Sirius
うわー！そうだね、10人の
Okay. 
收到。明白了。OMNI Charlie。Mike，请注意，我们有一些关于……的最新消息。我们估计他降落在距离目标约4英里的地方。你的T1时间已更新，如果你准备好接收T2
*** 제가
알겠습니다. CDR은 0.06, CMP는 0.64, LMP는 0.64입니
Okay, nächste Seite, 16. Dies ist eine Fortsetzung des Themas Solar-Corona. Auf der rechten Seite, beginnend knapp über 107:40 mit „Manöver 
マーク、2
Gemelli, qui siamo alle Hawaii. Non ab
D'accord. C'est bien. Je vais attendre qu'ils se lèv
एक और अनुरोध है, कृपया अपने हाई गेन कॉन्फ़िगरे
Buzz, voici un article con
Oh, ich
Хорошо, СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 01, ВВОД; 3011, ВВОД; 44, ВВОД. Теперь это процедура расширения мертвой зоны до 5 градусов. Позже, перед прогревом, вы вернете м
로저, 2 알파의 시간은 01:36:13이고, 그리니치 표준시(GMT)는 14:21:30입니다. 이
Mir g
هيوستن. كيف سيلتقط مجال الرؤية هذا إشارة ميسا؟ *** من مسافة ب
자, 잭. 다음 단계는 큐 카드를 이용해서 용기 윗부분에 아치 모양을 만드는 겁니다. 큐 카드의 짧은 한쪽 끝을 윗부분의 한쪽 융기 아래로 넣고, 다른 한쪽 끝은 반대쪽 
Roger. Understand the
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। फ्रेड-ओ, उस पर - उस जाँच को पास करने के लिए, सूर्य की स्थिति - आधे डिग्री का चाप बनाएगी, इसलिए आप दो व्
알겠습니다. "점검" 항목에서 네 번째 줄에 "수동 자세, 3, 최소 임펄스
Okay. We had a dropout there for a few minutes. 
알겠습니다. 거의… 지고 있네요. 현재 대략 0, 0, 그리고 (
Хорошо. Я просто хотел с вами поговорить, похоже, у нас произошли некоторые изменения
11，休斯
Роджер. Мы их видим, Фред, и я тебя прекрасно слыш
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on your own, that's the place we'd like to break off and let you go ahead and take over with your own alinement. However, we are giving you a procedure which will give you things we know you can see in the telescope without worrying about any reflections or anything of that nature, and it's not intended that this procedure has to be followed past the point where you know you've got good definition of star patterns in your telescope. If you need to go on, we'll maneuver, take a look at the Moon, we'll take a mark there, and then we'll maneuver with the / angles again and take a look at the Sun, and get yourself another mark on the Sun and that will complete the alinement. Now, the alinement scheme is that we are going to give you a set of angles that you can coarse aline the ball through when the is pointing you at the Moon. Now, this set of angles will agree with the that you have in as a nominal in you. You can coarse aline to that, set a drift flag and REFSMMAT flag, and you'll have a good platform and we'll be within a couple of degrees of a good alinement. And, if we have to, we could break off at this point and go ahead with an entry; however, in an attempt to get a good platform, we are going to have you then do a option 1, and what you are going to find in the option 1 slots is the entry. You'll come up with the values, and we intend to go ahead and coarse aline the ball to the entry attitude, and then we'll go ahead and take marks through a normal sequence. So tha
Oui, absolument, Houston. Le test LOI 1 s'est déroulé sans pro
然后，看起来所有明显的运动都停止了，我们可能正在接近目标。于是我调转飞船方向，试图调整平台对准目标。与此同时，助推器开始以相当明显的速度向下坠落。所以我放弃了
Ich möchte kurz auf den Sextanten eingehen. Seine Verwendung in einem beengten Raumschiff ist sehr schwierig, insbesondere mit Helm. Schließlich entschied ich, dass es sinnlos wäre, mit Helm die für die Beobachtung der Sterne erforderlichen Winkel zu erreichen. Also nahm ich den Helm ab. Dadurch hatte ich etwas mehr Spielraum, war aber ohne Manöver des Raumschiffs immer noch auf Winkel von etwa 20 bis 23° beschränkt. Der Stern wäre dabei vom oberen Teil des Beobachtungsfensters abgeschnitten worden. Durch häufigeres und großzügigeres Manövrieren des Raumschiffs hätte man es so ausrichten können, dass die Längsachse des Fensters in der Beobachtungsebene lag. Da wir jedoch durch den Treibstoff begrenzt waren, entschieden wir uns gegen diese Manöverart. Wir nutzten außerdem den Pulsmodus mit wenigen Manövern. Die für diesen Beobachtungslauf ausgewählten Sterne hatten relativ hohe Winkel zum Horizont und waren daher sehr schwer zu erfassen. Schließlich beschlossen wir, die Sterne etwas näher am Horizont zu beobachten. Ich habe, wie Sie sehen werden, einige Messungen mit Canopus und anderen Geräten durchgeführt. Der blaue Filter schien den Horizont komplett zu verdecken; ich konnte damit keinen Horizont erkennen. Unser Horizontbild ist bei Mondlicht wahrscheinlich nicht so gut. Der grüne Filter hingegen lieferte mir einen, meiner Meinung nach, etwas klareren Horizont als ganz ohne Filter. Ich hatte keine Schwierigkeiten, die Messungen mit dem grünen oder dem klaren Filter durchzuführen. Dennoch ist der Horizont nicht sehr scharf definiert, und man muss gewissermaßen standardisieren und immer am selben A
어쩔 수 없겠네요. 좋습니다. ACME를 시도해보고, 성공하면 RCS에서 RATE COMMAND를 실행하겠습니다. 좋습니다. 
I know I can't. I'v
罗杰。这就是我们现场
Роджер, Cape Com Tech. Я вас прекрасно понимаю. А как насчет м
Bill, es gibt nichts Neues zu Brennstoffzelle Nummer 2. Wir gehen davon aus, dass mit der Brennstoffzelle alles in Ordnung ist. Es handelt sich
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。了解しました。戻ります。
Apollo 13, Houston
A
We can see the Moon passing by the window and it looks what I considered to 
Роджер. Мы наблюдаем за чем-то… довольно странным. Нас уже отнесло на 70 градусов по тангажу, и мы хотели бы узнать, были ли у вас какие-либо проблемы с вентиляцией или что-то подобное, что могло бы привест
It does k
I just saw one down th
एड ने सामान खोलना शुरू किया और जैसे ही हम उस स्थिति में पहुँचे जहाँ बूस्टर के साथ छेड़छाड़ करना संभव नहीं था, मैंने पूरी तरह से उसकी मदद करना शुरू कर दिया - कम से कम सामान पकड़कर उसे सही जगह पर रखना और उसे गायब होने से बचाना। जितनी तेज़ी से हम काम करते, उतना ही हम पीछे होते चले जाते। ऐसा इसलिए नहीं था कि हम चीज़ों को सही जगह पर नहीं रख रहे थे, बल्कि इसमें हमारी उम्मीद से कहीं ज़्यादा समय लग रहा था। जीरो ग्रेविटी में यह सिम्युलेटर की तुलना में ज़्यादा आसान नहीं था, हालाँकि उतना ही आसान था। इसलिए हमने पूरा चक्कर लगाया। जब तक हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे, मैंने मन बना लिया था कि हम वहाँ नहीं पहुँच पाएँगे, लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि थोड़ी देर और कोशिश करते हैं। जब हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे - या वहाँ से निकलने से ठीक पहले - मुझे स्पष्ट हो गया था कि हम दबाव कम करने की प्रक्रिया पूरी नहीं कर पाएँगे। मैंने अगली कक्षा में जाने के लिए स्लिप का अनुरोध किया। फिर... हमने लगभग 20 मिनट तक आराम किया और कॉकपिट में पड़े फालतू सामान को व्यवस्थित करने की कोशिश की। फिर मैंने चेकलिस्ट निकाली और हमने दोबारा विस्तार से चेकलिस्ट देखी ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि जल्दबाजी में हमसे कुछ छूट तो नहीं गया। एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट शुरू किया - कार्नार्वोन के ऊपर हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। हम सब तैयार थे और दबाव कम करने की हरी झंडी का इंतजार कर रहे थे। हमें हरी झंडी मिल गई। दबाव कम करने का चक्र पूरा हुआ। कार्नार्वोन से निकलते ही हमें पूर्ण एक्स्ट्रावेहिकुलर मूवमेंट (EVA) के लिए मंजूरी मिल गई। हम कै
Okay
روجر، هل أنت الآن في وضع الإضاءة العريضة
差不多
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Rapport des trente minutes: les mouvements de tête ne provoquent ni nausées ni aucun malaise. Je suis surpris de pouvoir regarder le soleil d'aussi près; il brille directement sur mon visage et je n'ai qu'à me protéger les yeux avec mes sourcils. Tous les interrupteurs de fusibles sont toujours dans la position indiquée précédemment sur le panneau de gauche. Le sélecteur de mode est normal (auto), le gyroscope est normal: le dispositif anti-retour est armé, le rétrolâchement automatique est désactivé. Toutes les poignées en « T » sont en position basse, sauf la poignée manuelle, que j'ai tirée pour pouvoir passer immédiatement en mode manuel en cas de dysfonctionnement. Les aides au sauvetage sont normales. Le sac d'atterrissage est désactivé. Tous les autres éléments du panneau de séquence sont en position normale. Le niveau de carburant est de 68 à 100 % (répétition: 68 à 100 
برج الدلو، هيوستن.
好的。面板 16，在 Pow
大丈夫だよ、ヴァンス。深刻なことでない限り、その件
Ожидайте изменения времени по Гр
जी हां, हम हैं। 1 पर प
Выглядит лучше. Вы держите его примерно на 1 или 2 часа. Выглядит лучше. Дайте нам еще немного в том же направлении. Сейчас вы находитесь на 3 часа. Мы видим примерно половину того, что видите вы. Слишком много. Оно исчезает на наших 5 часах. Теперь оно возвращается. Оно наполовину за пределами э
One definitely gets the illusion of looking way up above you at this attitude, and if there is no horizon, it's just a black sky. The amount of light in the cockpit is quite high. Once one gets adapted and it can be reduced, of course, by the cabin light. At this point, I am somewhat reluctant to reduce the light level in here, due to the problem with the suit circuit. I'm using my fingertip lights liberally. It is observed that in future flights, we must have some catch-all device that we can stuff objects into, and have them trapped there for a period of time. I'm driving at the problem of the washer and small crimped piece of metal. I... believe I finally got them stuffed into the little bag on the hatch. Suit temperature is just holding its own. I am hot, and probably will have to decrease the setting. I am sure I don't understand why the suit circuit takes so long to react. My cabin circuit works be
अरे, इससे एक सवाल उठता है। हम जानना चाहते थे कि आप लोग प्रोब और ड्रोग को कहाँ रखने की योजना बना रहे हैं? हमें एक संभावना यह सूझी कि इसे एलएमपी के ठीक नीचे, आईएस के नीचे रखा जाए - शायद आपके प
रॉजर। खैर, कम से कम इतने लोग तो भावना से आपके साथ थे ही। हमने आज सुबह 11 बजे समाचार में सुना कि कल रात - आपके उतरने के ब
R
Хорошо. На первом этапе спуска температура топл
Похоже, вы находитесь в системе OMNI Alfa. Можете подтвердить, что у нас н
Acquario, Houston. Notiamo che la pressione dell'O2 nella BOMBOLA DI RISALITA è un po' alta, quindi vogliamo utilizzarne una parte. Quindi chiudiamo la BOMBOLA DI DISCESA e apriamo la BOMBOLA DI RISALI
Hey Jack. Wir erklären dir jetzt die Vorgehensweise zum Zurücks
क
حسنًا. لنبدأ. لا يزال الاهتمام برحلة أبولو 11 كبيرًا، لكن ثمة اهتمامًا منافسًا في منطقة هيوستن يتمثل في تخفيف قيود الري. وعد رئيس البلدية لوي ويلش برفع قيود ري الحدائق إذا استمر هطول الأمطار. يوم الجمعة غائم جزئيًا، وهناك احتمال بنسبة 30% لحدوث 
مهلاً، نجم النسر الطائر موجود هناك. دعنا نرى، هذا الشيء الذي كنت أنظر إليه 
Repose-bras rangé. OK, repose-coude - rangé, ceinture abdominale -
Ab
ठीक है। अब चलिए सीबी 
Apollo
On ne voit pas le booster. Il fa
Wally, je vois que tes propulseurs latéraux sont déployés à environ 12 mètres de ce que nous pouvon
Roger, Bill. Grazie, e se vi è comodo, potreste darci la lettura? E per quanto riguarda il resto, va benis
Понял. Рет
좋습니다. 시작해 보겠습니다. -2, /G&N: 63634; +0.96, -0.23;; -0.021.7, -0.001.7, -0.008.0; 080, 164, 326;
ठीक है। R1 में 0.34202 जोड़ें, R2 में से 0.07374 घटाएँ, और R3 में
ええと、正直に言うと、ここをぐるぐる回って、あちこち行った
Die Anlagen am Boden sehen momentan recht normal aus. Die Temperaturen sind etwas erhöht, aber es gibt keine kritischen Anzeichen. Laut den neuesten Berichten liegen die Temperaturen der Wechselrichter bei etwa 200 und 
了解しました、ジム。現在の構成は以下のとおりです。電気バスはBAL LOAD回路ブレーカーを介してクロスタイされており、AUTO CABIN REPRESSも装備されています。今すぐアップリンクを確立したいので、パネル11のUPDATA LINK回路ブレーカーを直ちに閉じてく
はい、あなたの VOX はずっとキー入力されていて、私たちは入ることができませんでしたし、時間切れなのでもう一度入るようあなたに伝えることもできませんでし
Хорошо. GET B 9 44 00; Delta-V, 9 футов в секунду; время работы двигателя 0 плюс 15; рыскание и тангаж равны нулю; Core 25, 90090; Core 26 и 27 равны нулю; двигатели, направлен
D
Roger, Canton. Veuillez informer Cap que j'indique un roulis de 10° à d
Это «Дружба Семь». Проводится проверка Oculo. Никаких эфф
इस समय, मैंने हाई थ्रस्टर चेक पूरे कर लिए हैं। एक विलंबित रिपोर्ट। प्रत्येक अक्ष ने बेहतरीन ढंग से क
Half of my window is black and the other has a little sun shining on it. Sun shining on the nose of the spacecraft so I've got to look past a lighted object. I don't see a star, and I never have seen the stars in the daylight... much better at sunris
Ricevuto. Ho capito che sono stati colpiti sulla punta del ce
Okay, Edward, ich lasse den Rekorder
네. 첫 번째 추가 질문은, 원래 질문을 다시 확인해 보겠습니다. 질문에 "2번 항목에 대해 더 자세히"라고 되어 있는데, 2번 항목은 "동력 비행 단일 단계 동안 소음 진동 수준에 유의미한 변화가 있었습니까?"입니다. 구체적으로, S-II 중앙 엔진 정지 초기 단계에서 관찰한 내용을 설명해 주시고, 엔진 정지 약 90초 전에 높은 진동이 발생했다고 보고하셨습니다. 이 진동이 어떻게 발생하고 엔진 정지 전까지 어떻게 변화했는지 설명해 주시겠습니까? 이상
よし、エド、ここは良い場所のよう
क्या—उसने
알파/PC에서 PC로; 발사체 표시기에서 GPI로; 짐벌 드라이브 피치 및 요우를 자동으로; 이벤트 타이머 재설정
見てみましょう。軌道速度でピッチダウンし
Bill, se riesci a staccart
Okay, Joe. Wir haben das alles, und wie vergleichen wi
Подождите секунду. Сначала позвольте мне переместить 
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。如果方便的话，我们
로저. 잘했어, 프레드. 이제 8단계로 넘어갈 거야. PRO 버튼을 누르면 5018이 깜빡이는 걸 볼 수 있어. 좋아. 5018이 나오면 자세를 자동(AUTO)으로 조정해야 해. PRO 버튼을 누르고 유도 제어(GUIDANCE CONTROL), PNGS, 모드 제어(MODE CONT
Я имею в в
Compl
Senti, Jerry, ieri sera Jim diceva qua
Okay. Noch eine Minute warten, Jim
La mer d
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। मध्यमार्ग सुधार संख्या 2। SPS/G&N 63059, प्लस 097, माइनस 020, इग्निशन 02644 5792, प्लस 00118, माइनस 00003, प्लस 00177, रोल 277 355 015, ब्लॉक अनुपलब्ध है, डेल्टा-VT 00213 003 00168, सेक्स्टेंट तारा 30 2082 370। शेष पैड अनुप
ठीक है। और पैनल 5 पर लगे सभी सर्किट ब्रे
好的，好的。我准备开始操作了。回答我的时候，请对着麦克风大声点，因为我们的下行链路噪音比较大。首先，我们要你做的是，我们先在一个罐子上操作，然后再在第二个罐子上重复一遍。拿起其中一个罐子，沿着热封线剪掉外包装袋；小心点，尽量靠近热封线，因为如果损坏了内包装袋
Хорошо. Верхняя часть нового про
잔지바르, 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 제가 신고했을 때 연료는 받
罗杰，哥伦比亚。我们注意到你的配置了。
यह तो नकारात्मक है। सिव
Houston, Apol
Ok. Più 25, e questo sarà un /. 63087, meno 162, più 129, meno 001 63, più 00001, più 527 59 177 137 001, Novembre Alfa, più 00201 527 59 623 5
ヒューストン、トランキリティ
네. 제가 그걸 복사해서 이제 각 그룹의 비율을 알려드리겠습니다. 알파 82%, 브라보 84%, 코코아 85%, 델타 87%입니다.
Houston, Apollo 8
초점은 무한대에 맞춰 놓으세요. 그건 확실합니다. 줌 기능은, 지평선이나 풍경 등을 조금 확대해야 할 수도 있겠죠. 저는 광각 렌즈인 F12.5로 시작하고, 빛이 너무 많이 들어오는 것을 방지하
केबि
Friendship Seven, ici Hawaii Cap Com, je vous reçois parfaitement. Quel est votre 
Und für alle, die sich fragen, wo Jim schläft: Es ist etwas schwierig, seine Hängematte jetzt bei geöffneter Luke hier aufzuhängen, aber sie verläuft quer in Längsri
좋습니다, 패널 11 구성, 맨 위 줄: AC 버스 B, S-밴드 안테
Bene. Stiamo dando un'ultima occhiata alle procedure di metà percorso e abbiamo una domanda sulla posizione attuale di uno degli interruttori. L'interruttore è l'interruttore STATUS sul pannello 6. Vorremmo sol
- -... precis
Roger.
그거 참 재밌는 상황이었어요. 저는 충격을 전혀 못 느꼈고, 모든 게 꽤 안정적이라고 생각했죠. 그런데 후퇴 작업을 하러 갔을 때, 그때부터
알겠습니다. 시그
그는 블로우다운을 위해 짐벌 각도를 
Und die – Rückmeldeanzeigen an der, ich habe jetzt HELIUM 1, sind alle grau. HELIUM 2, sind alle grau. PRIMÄRTREIBSTOFF, alles grau. SEKUNDÄRTREIBSTOFF, ich habe zwei Barber-Pole-Anzeigen, und A ist Barber-
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। आपको इस संदेश का जवाब देने की आवश्यकता नहीं है, लेकिन डॉक्टरों का कहना है कि ऐसा लगता है कि आपके कुछ सेंसर ढीले हो गए हैं, इसलिए आप उन्हें थोड़ा दबाकर देख 
Oui, monsieu
让我把您当天的专栏文章最后一遍过一遍，确保我们理解正确
Apollo 1
了解しました、ヒューストン。マイナスMAの解に基づいて、着弾経度はマイナス160.95度になりました。バイアスをかけ、着弾緯度経度は163.75度になりました。着弾点を東に30度変更したかったので、そのために必要な燃焼パラメータを計算してみたところ、X軸の燃焼はマイナス11.6度、C軸はプラス600度、Y軸はゼロでした。これで、以前のX軸
Voilà du chocolat chaud; ça devrait être bon. J'y ajouterai environ 150 ml d'eau chaude. Il y a aussi des petits biscuits au sucre, du jus d'orange, de la soupe de maïs, du poulet avec sa sauce et une petite serviette pour s'essuyer le
Okay, Fred. Du
उस समय आप रेट्रो पावर को एआरएम पर सेट करेंगे, लेक
지금 저희는 얀스키 분화구 남쪽, 즉 남서쪽 지역을 보여드
रोजर, 01 36 13 2 अल्
이글, 휴스턴. 잠시 기다
Eagle, Houston. Potresti darci un'idea dell'orario in cui hai acceso
Wir bemerkten das altbekannte Pulsieren in den Anzügen, als wir das RECIRC-System
Okay. Bei den 226 Leitungsschutzschaltern, die ich mir angesehen habe – es handelt sich um sechs Leitungsschutzschalter, und zwar die ersten sechs von links in der unteren Reihe des Verteilerkastens. Sie sind unter „Beleuchtung“ zu finden. Wir wollen die drei Hochwasserschutzschalter und die drei numerischen/integralen Leitungsschutzschalter – ich meine nicht „ausschalten“, sondern „schließen“. Diese sechs sollen 
罗杰。45-1 101。2+08。12 37 50。5+36。10+33。46-1 114。2+25 14 12 47。4+05。9+33。47-1 前后推进器。08 和 120。0+14 和 2+30。15 46 36。3+17。8+37。48-1 前后推进器。24 和 120。0+40 和 230，修正 2+30。17 20 19。2+42。8+43。49-4 111。2+21。20 06 48。4+11。9+46。 4
カーナボン、
D'accord. 
यहां सब बढ़िया है। हमारे ऑपरेशन शुरू होने से ठीक एक मिनट पहले, बस कुछ 
Mike, wir liegen innerhalb
Alors, tu peux
Роджер. Мы с Родом собрались
休斯顿。低温风扇已经开启——
E, 13, Houston. Se vuoi, possiamo avvisarti ogni 2 minuti circa prima che la Terra entri nella tua finestra. Pensiamo di aver capito bene ora, e non dovrai più cercare cos
لا، ليس كثيراً. ماذا عن زيادة الط
मुझे पूरा यकीन है कि मुझे यह नहीं मिल रहा है, क्योंकि अगर ऐसा होता तो मैं खुशी से उछल-कूद कर रहा होता - अगर इस समय मुझे हाई मिल रहा होता तो मैं आसमान में उछल रहा होता। मैंने मुश्किल से आधा डिग्री प्रति सेकंड 
Хорошо. С н
ヒューストンのトランクウ
Aucun problème. Nous som
11, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आपको फ्रंटल प्रकार की कोई प्रमुख मौसम प्रणाली या उष्णकटिबंधीय तूफान प्रकार
Apollo 8, Houston. Sto trasmettendo in 
我现在可以看到宽阔的蓝色地平线带。此时（时间：02:07:00），它看起来大约有太阳下方的直径。它的厚度似
لقد حفظت رقمي - كان ذلك بالأ
これはかなり..
Хорошо. Затем следующие один, два, три, четыре, пять, шесть — те же самые, и затем мы хотим, чтобы S-диапазонный тр
没错，吉
Okay, Jack. Wir würden gerne demnächst die Kryo-Lüfter in Sauerstofftank 2 noch einmal durchlaufen lassen. Wir möchten sehen, ob wir den Sensor wieder zum Laufen 
我可以给
罗杰，金丝雀。我的状态良好；太空舱状态良好；控制模式为自动；陀螺仪正常；机动关闭。燃料51-68%，氧气85-100%；舱内蒸汽排放口温度正在上升，读数约为19度，宇航服蒸汽排放口温度仍为70度。我已经将其调回零并重新设置为
R
Très bien. Nous maintenons actuellement un débit stable de 0,3 livre par heure, et la pression en cabine est d'environ 54; je vais fermer la vanne un instant, puis la rouvrir dans cette position et vous indiquer la 
여보세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴. 버즈, 외과의사를 자리에서 벌떡 일어나게 했네요. 운동하는
Alright. 
了解しました。コピーしたプラス11のマニューバについて質問があります。
Хорошо, Вэнс. Это командный модуль для: фильтра и мешка вентилятора салона в;
شكرًا. 179 009 00
حسنًا. وحدة التحكم بالترجمة، باتجاه عقارب ا
Houston, Tranquility wartet auf GO, u
ヒューストン、こちら
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。我们刚刚看到了非常清晰的着陆点景象。
और हम अभ
分かりました。ゲインを高く設定してもらいます。バックグラウンドで聞こえるのはおそらくグリコールポンプの音だと思いますが、電源を
لقد حطمنا الرقم القياسي الأمريكي في مجال الفضاء. وكان ذلك في عام 2003. أعتقد أنه كان 
ジャイロは無料
로저, 11. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 약 71시간에서 72시간 사이에 식사 시간이 시작될 예정이며, 아마 이미 식사 중이실 겁니다. 71시간: 산소 연료 전지 퍼지; 72시간 GET: 이산화탄소 필터 교체 6회, 보조 라디에이터 유량 점검. 그리
كلها غيوم وماء، أليس
好的。埃德，我们知道你没有拿出血压计，所以请你先给血压计袖带充气，我们就不用血压计了。我们只测
我现在的压力是 3.5 psid；几
ま
हां। मुझसे जुड़ी सभी चीजें डोरियों की गति को धीमा कर
स्थिति बिल्कुल सटीक है। इसमें कोई शक नहीं। पेरिस्कोप से यॉ (ज्वालामुखी का झुकाव) देखा जा सकता है। और इस
And, Houston, Tranquility Base is going to give you a few comments with regard to the geology question of last night. We are landed in a relatively smooth crater field of elongate secondary - circular secondary craters, most of which have rims irrespective of their - raised rims irrespective of their size. That's not universally true. There are - There are a few of the smaller craters around which do not have a discernible rim. The ground mass throughout the area is a very fine sand to a silt. I'd say the thing that would be most like it on Earth is powdered graphite. Immersed in this ground mass are a wide variety of rock shapes, sizes, text
——我们所有的分析都是基于功率降至 14 安培的情况，但我们现在读到的是 12.3 安培，所
Oui. Peut-être que… peu
네. 다음 페이지, 전원 7, 패널 16번입니다. 첫 번째 줄
पायलट के लिए जीएमटी 02:
Roger. We have you GO on the gr
별 0
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. أنظر الآن
Ich habe eine Anmerkung zu dem Punkt auf der Erde, an dem die Sonnenstrahlen zu uns zurückreflektiert werden. Im Allgemeinen ist die Farbe der Ozeane größtenteils einheitlich, hell- bis dunkelblau, außer in einem Gebiet mit etwa einem Achtel des Erdradius im Durchmesser. In diesem kreisförmigen Bereich nimmt das Wasser einen gräulichen Farbton an, und ich bin mir sicher, dass genau dort die Sonnenstr
Nous sommes à court de qu
저도 그렇게 생각합니다. 터널 외벽 코팅에 균열이 몇 군데 보이네요. 단열 코팅의 균열은 구조적인 문제와는 관련이 없는 것 
그
Certo che sì. 
좋아, 하강 
了解。REP 
रॉजर। जिम, आपके सेक्स्टेंट स्टार पर शाफ्ट 2027 - 202
알겠습니다. 하강 단계에서 쿵 하는 소리와 함께 눈송이가 몇 개 보였다고 하셨죠. 아래쪽을 살펴보고 뭔가 있는지 확
Et la vanne de débit EVAP est ouverte maintenant, et j'ai défait les tuyaux de ma 
heater's off. We did not do that heater check. Oh, 
Ricevuto. Abbiamo bisogno della
روجر، أنت جاه
Основной желоб зар
لا، يمكننا إيجاد مصدر ضوء آخر. هذا يعني فقط أ
Negativo, questo è proporzionale m
Allez, dors! Écoute, tu seras rév
حسناً، كانت مدتها متفاوتة. هل من ال
我们已经加了水和乙二醇……关闭了……还需要加水吗？…
حسنًا. بعد صدور توصية نظام التوجيه، أضف "فتح صمام تهوية
Und wir werd
لا، لم يحدث ذلك. لديّ حالة واحدة دخلت فيها وضعية العودة إلى الغلاف الجوي بعد - تصحيح، قبل - كانتون، ولكن كان ذلك للتحقق من النجوم ليلاً بعد ووميرا. وشعرت حينها بوخزة، أعتقد أنه
Да, мы так и сделали. Основыва
所以没问题。
我给它配的是普通镜
Vogliamo provare a realizzare il parallelismo del
네. 승인(ACCEPT)에서 확인하셨습니다. 그리고 이것은 업데이트된 착륙 지점 RESFMMAT입
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Abbiamo la tua temperatura. Puoi iniziare a misurare la pressione sanguigna e attendere l'intervento del 
Okay, Jack. We'll have to go over what again. The will be out front window; we'll place the Earth in the center of the, and, let's see, the center of the Earth right now is parallel to the which is about paral
Alle Postleitzahlen, die wir im 
了解しました。話が進む前に、二次蒸発器の点検と冗長部品の点検で得られた結果を確認したい
ठीक है। जी हाँ, बिल्कुल सही। तो हमें नीले और लाल दोनों कमांडर 
자, CSQ, 제미니 4호를 시작하세요
Nein. Ich sehe sie hier auf dieser Seite nicht. Kurz nachdem ich Canaveral verlassen und mich umgedreht hatte, sah ich ein paar wenig
Roger. Mais je sais de quoi vous parlez. Roge
روجر. حالتي جيدة؛ حالة الكبسولة جيدة؛ وضع التحكم تلقائي؛ الجيروسكوبات طبيعية؛ المناورة معطلة. وقود التحكم ٥١٪ و٦٩٪؛ الأكسجين ٨٢٪ و١٠٠٪. هذا كل شيء تقريبًا، إلا 
コロンビア、ヒューストン、ブラインドで
Roger. As-tu reçu mon dernier message? Houston te donnera le feu ver
И, Фред, компьютер уже загрузил нужную вам величи
Amicizia Sette, Amicizia Sette, qui è il Chirurgo Zanzibar. Hai un buon tracciato della pressione 
Okay, Jack. Dieses Verfahren wurde z
弗雷德，我提前通知你一下，备用气罐的二氧化碳浓度快要达到极限
Dove hai mes
Roger. Sie sehen die Erde, so wie wir sie sehen, durch unser linkes Fenster – etwas mehr als die Hälfte der Erde. Wir blicken auf den östlichen Pazifik und die nördliche Hälfte des oberen Bildschirmbereichs. Dort sehen wir Nordamerika, Alaska, die Vereinigten Staaten, Kanada, Mexiko und Mittelamerika. Südamerika verschwindet knapp jenseits des Terminators oder im Schatten. Die Ozeane erscheinen deutlich blau, weiße Bänder großer Wolkenformationen ziehen über die Erde, und wir können Küstenlinien erkennen. Wir können den Westen der USA, das San Joaquin Valley, die Sierra Nevada, die Halbinsel Baja California und einige Wolkenformationen über dem Südosten der USA ausmachen. Südwestlich von Alaska zieht ein schwaches Gewitter auf, etwa 8
Okay, Jack. The Earth has started back down. The hack on the there was 1 degre
Сейчас убираем камеру. Сейчас переходим к процедуре извлечения гироскопа из клетки. Теперь 
제미니 VI호, 휴스턴. 이해했습니다.
एक सेकंड की गलती, यानी प
Are you ready for me to make
सूट के पानी के वाल्व को कम करने के बाद से, सूट के स्टीम वेंट का तापमान थोड़ा बढ़ गया है 
रॉजर, चार्ली। मैं आपको क्लोरीनीकरण की स्थिति के बारे में जानकारी देना चाहता हूँ। कंपार्टमेंट B4 में, हमारे पास क्लोरीन और बफर एम्प्यूल्स के लिए एक, दो, तीन, चार, पाँच, छह, सात - सुधार, हमारे पास आठ पॉकेट हैं, जिनमें से - मुझे इसे ठीक करने दीजिए। हमारे पास सात पॉकेट हैं, जिनमें से एक खाली है और हमेशा से खाली ही रही है, जिससे छह बची हैं। दूसरी तरफ, B7 में, हमारे पास सात पॉकेट वाला एक और कंटेनर है, इसलिए हमारे पास कुल सात प्लस छह हैं, और उनमें छह क्लोरीन और सात बफर भ
Partial 
حسنًا. لدينا بعض الفوط الصحية لنقدمها لك وننتظر. دعنا نتأكد مما إذا كان 
गुंबद का तापमान 70 डिग्री पर स्थिर है।
Ok. Inizieremo a configurare la configurazione del tubo del comandante, come quella del LMP. E otterrò - in
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, कैनावेरल कॉम टेक। आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से सुनाई दे रही है। कैप कॉम के लिए तै
You understand that your capsule elapsed time is running a
簡単 - 簡単 0.3、7.6ですが…クレーターの南西端にあります。もしこんな場所にいたら、きっと分か
Итак, Хьюстон. Для 
시그마 세븐입니다. 여기는 카노 콤 테크이고, UHF/HF 대역
Eins, zwei, drei, vie
Ok. Lasciatemi partire dall'inizio. Potrebbe esserci qualche sovrapposizione, ma per essere sicuri che siamo tutti sulla stessa lunghezza d'onda. Iniziamo con una serie di procedure di timeline che ci forniranno... finiremo con la normale checklist di ingresso. Ci saranno alcune modifiche alla checklist nel libro, ma il grosso di ciò che ho da offrirvi riguarda la timeline. E inizia a 6 ore e 30 minuti prima e presuppone che stiamo fornendo energia al MAIN B nel modulo di 
好了，我们来了。进场点：中太平洋，000153；000。接下来的两行是月落时间和月相检查姿态；，178；NOUN 61，减去 21.66，减去；00:28。接下来的四行不适用；DO 为 4.00，02:04；00:17，03:22，08:14；33，353.1，29.9。视轴星为天秤座 σ，向下 08.8，向左 0.4；升力矢量向上。进场对准星为 31 和 23。横滚对准
कैमरा पैक कर दिया गया है। फोटोमीटर इतना हल्का है कि इसे निकाला जा सकता है और छोड़ा जा सकता है। काम खत्म करने से पहले मैं यहाँ एक छोटे से उपकरण की जाँच कर लूँगा। और यह एक लाइन की मोटाई जितना ऊपर चला गया है। अब रीडिंग 0.06 है जो 0.1 से कम है। ये सभी अब ग्लव बॉक्स में रखे जाएँगे; ये हैच पर, इमरजेंसी रेट हैंडल के सबसे पास वाले हैच डिटेंशन स्प्रिंग के बगल में
我想稍微谈谈六分仪。在空间狭小的航天器里使用六分仪非常困难，尤其是在戴着头盔的情况下。我最终意识到，戴着头盔去调整观测目标星体所需的角度是徒劳的。所以我摘下了头盔。这让我在使用六分仪时更加灵活，但即便如此，在不操纵航天器的情况下，我的角度仍然被限制在20到23度左右。这样一来，目标星体就会被观测窗口的上半部分遮挡住。当然，通过更频繁、更灵活地操纵航天器，你可以调整它，使观测窗口的长轴位于你的跟踪平面上。但由于燃料有限，我们没有选择这种操纵方式。我们也使用了脉冲模式，并且没有进行太多的机动。那次观测选择的星体角度都比较大，因此很难观测到地平线。我们最终决定让星星更靠近地平线一些。正如你所看到的，我拍摄了几颗老人星和其他几颗星。蓝色滤镜似乎完全遮挡了地平线；使用它时，我根本看不到地平线。在月光下，我们的地平线图像可能不太清晰。
Möchtest du Klebeb
分かりました。電源ブレー
Okay, thank you. And in reference to your ques
我想我们现在终于看到了你，而且我觉
了解。もう3
ह्यूस्टन, एक्वेरियस। ओडिसी कॉल करने की कोशिश कर रहा है। क्या आप उन्हें सुन सकते हैं
Roger, 11. Wir haben Ihre Beschreibung dazu zur Kenntnis genommen. Ich verstehe, dass Sie einen Schatten sehen können, den diese Wolke zwischen A
如果万向节快要锁死了，一定要让你的队员给我打电话，好
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 船尾将是 42. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-1 84 船尾将是 56. 2+20. 1+11. 16 08 16. 3+05. 8+53. 33-1 84 船尾将是 68. 2+20. 1+27. 17 42 15. 2+37. 8+49. 29-BRAVO 84. 50 船尾
罗杰。
أو على الأقل قمتُ بضبط الإعدادات لذلك. لستُ متأك
I think it focused the second one a little bit better. I think it's be
I still have ample fuel. The capsule is tracking beautifully in auto, retro mode. I have 81 
Roger. I docked in AUTO, and as I said, I wasn't really sure of the moment of contact. I kept cross checking the docking probe 
База «Транквилити», это Хьюстон. Наша телеметрия 
Roger. Laut unserer Packliste sollte die Schräga
Добавлю, что мы видели ракету-носитель. Она продолжает кружить рядом с нами, но находится слишком далеко
Это «Дружба Семь». Я выключил автоматическое управление по рысканию, чтобы повернуть влево и полюбоваться закатом. Сейчас управление снова автоматиче
Роджер. Именно этим я и хоте
迈克，
わかりました、ジャック。上から始めましょう。わかりました。クライオタンク; H2 1は230を示し、2も同様です。私たちのO2クライオタンク1は- 300でかろうじて持ちこたえているようです。そして、クライオタンク2は、H2 1は73、2、74を示しています。O2側では、O2 1の量
알았다
キロ0.9と6.3ですね。ありがとうございます。このグリッドの1マスが、1回のスキャンでスキャンできる範囲のほぼ限
收到。我们这就把你转交给 C
Gemi
了解です、フレッド。電源オフ
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे ऑप्टिक्स ट्रैकिंग सिस्टम के बारे में कुछ शब्द। मैंने पीछे की तरफ नियंत्रण बिंदु 1 और 2 के लिए ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग किया, और इसने बहुत अच्छा काम किया, मेरे लिए दोनों लक्ष्यों को ट्रैक किया। फिर मैं हमारे कक्षीय नियंत्रण पुस्तिका में निर्दिष्ट नियंत्रण बिंदु 3 पर गया, जहाँ मुझे अक्षांश और देशांतर दिए गए थे, और मैंने उस विशेष न
K
로저, 네 맞습니다. 당신의 궤도는 대략 86.8 x 150
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम देख रहे हैं कि यहाँ सब कु
That's affirmative. The secondary radiator leak check is called out in the flight plan at 71 20. That procedure is listed in your launch ope
好的。我
Hawaï, Gémeaux VI. Nous avons vos données et, en échange, nous aimer
मैं अंदर आ गया हूँ... और ऐसा लगता है कि अभी जितनी ठंड है, उतनी ही ठंड हमें शायद प्रवेश करने से बहुत पहले
Мы удаляем этап midcourse-3 и переносим срок прохождения дистанции на 55 часов. Поэтому мы
Roger, 11. Qui è Houston. Tra le 71 e le 72 ore circa, vi terremo a terra per un periodo di prova che immagino sia già in corso. 71 ore: spurgo cella a combustibile O2; 72 ore GET: sostituzione filtro CO2 numero 6, controllo flusso radiatore secondario. E vi invieremo un blocco dati su un passaggio di 2 ore, passaggio pericynthion, interruzione modalità di ritorno. Alle 73 ore e 00 minuti: fermatevi a circa 0 gradi di rollio. Cioè, quando vi avvicinate a 0 gradi di rollio intorno alle 73 ore, vorremmo che vi fermaste. Ed eseguite un'opzione 3 rimanente per un controllo della deriva. 73 ore e 20 minuti: vi forniremo un aggiornamento sul sito di atterraggio, 1 vettore di stato e carico target. 73 ore e 30 minuti: manovra a 000 di rollio, beccheggio e imbardata; gli angoli dell'antenna ad alto guadagno saranno beccheggio 0, imbardata 335; ed eseguire l'opzione 1 utilizzando il nuovo si
Bon, je ne 
Roger. How do you read th
هل التقطت بعض ا
ضغطتُ على الزر الخطأ مرتين. لم أحصل على صورة لقزحية العي
لدي انطباع واضح يا تشارلي، أن تلك الفرس هناك تصعد فوق حافة الجبال عند ال
Und Sie haben 6 Bilder pro Sekunde, und es ist Farbe; Sie haben 15 Minuten Material - 6 B
لا تزال الطائرة في وضع أفقي نسبيًا. يعمل نظام التحكم في معدل التسارع بشكل جيد. أنا سعيدٌ بثباتها. إنها تسير على ما يرام. تقترب من 5.5 جي. لا يزال نظام التحكم في معدل التسارع ثابتًا، ومستوى الوقود لا يزال 70%، ويبدو منخفضًا. ت
继续。如果在燃烧过程中发动机停止运转，并且NOUN 97闪烁，你应该先执行PROCEED指令，然后执行ullage指令，接着执行ENGINE START指令，再执行PESH指令，最后执行DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE指令。好的。现在提供一些基本信息。如果你没有进行PC+2燃烧，那么最早的P-P+4燃烧时间可能就是P-P+4了。它会在速率故障模式下进行备份，你知道的。我们正在讨论的是星形检查。关于这一点，我稍后会再跟你确认。如果由于某种原因没有进行PC-2燃烧，你将拥有一个自由返回轨迹，着陆时间为152:02:00，这将在进行一次小型中段-5进
알겠습니다. 88시간 
حسنًا. الصف العلوي صحيح كما هو. في الصف الثاني، نريد إغلاق مفاتيح التحكم الرباعية (
アポロ11号、もう一度
Хорошо. И к
En observant les alentours, le contraste est globalement dû à l'ombre portée par le soleil: un gris très clair, un halo autour de mon ombre et de celle de mon casque. En regardant au loin, le contraste est maximal car la couleur environnante reste assez claire. En regardant vers le soleil, une plus grande zone ombragée nous fait face. La couleur générale de la zone environnante est moins contrastée. En examinant la zone poussiéreuse que nous avons soulevée, on constat
やあ、ジム、ブースターは現時点で君の約 32 マイル前方、5 マ
Хорошо. А за
Ok. 
Ist das zu viel Pitch-Up für Nu
罗杰，11。给你两台PADS，30和31。30 SPS/G&N：36691，减去061，加上066 135 23 4156。NOUN 81：32 - 更正，加上32011，加上06818，减去02650 181 054 014。远地点不适用，近地点加上00230 3286 - 更正，32836；燃烧时间2 28 32628 24 1511 357。接下来的三行不适用。名词 61：加
In
您对
アクエリアス、ヒュー
네, 맞습니다. 1분
ठीक है, फ्रेड। सबसे पहले, इसकी तैयारी, आकस्मिकता चेकलिस्ट (पृष्ठ 24) से शुरू करते हुए, हम सुझाव देंगे कि आप इसे शुरू करें, और इस पर आपके किसी भी सुझाव का हम स्वागत करेंगे। दूसरा बिंदु: जब आप बर्न एटीट्यूड में हों, तो आपको सूर्य बिल्कुल ऊपर दिखाई देगा। जब आपका कर्सर शून्य पर सेट होगा, तो यह कर्सर को विभाजित करेगा। हालांकि, एक बात का ध्यान रखें कि यह बहुत आसानी से डिटेंट से बाहर निकल जाएगा क्योंकि यह रोल और यॉ के प्रति बहुत संवेदनशील होगा। समझें कि यह डिटेंट 2 में है, लेकिन बर्न, बर्न टाइम और एटीट्यूड के प्रति बहुत कम संवेदनशील है। दूसरे शब्दों में, यदि आवश्यक हो, तो हम इसे किसी भी समस्या की स्थिति में, और एटीट्यूड बहुत महत्वपूर्ण न होने पर, स्लिप कर सकते हैं। तो इससे हम इस बिंदु पर आते हैं कि हमारे पास केवल एक ही वास्तविक बर्न नियम है; यानी, यदि किसी भी अक्ष के चारों ओर - दर 10 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड तक पहुँच जाती है, तो बर्न को रोकने की यही सीमा है। अगला बिंदु: जलाने का काम पूरा होने के बाद और छंटाई करने से पहले, आपसे अनुरोध है कि पता संख्या 470 को थोड़ी देर के लिए खुला छोड़ दें ताकि हम उसे देख सकें
روج
Хорошо. Фактическое количество оставшегося
जहां
Хорошо, Чарли. Он открыт не очень широко. Трудно дать вам точные показания, не перенаправляя поток снова, но стрелка находится примерно в положении «один час». Теперь я уменьшу поток и дам ему стабилизироваться. Сейчас показания бортового прибора составляют около 0,4, и это при стрелке кислородного клапана в положении «два часа». Вы бы предпочли сравнение показаний потока кислорода или сравнение положения клап
वो 25 40 था
ジェミニ、こちらは外科医です。CSQ 外科医からジ
أبولو 8، هيوستن. يب
روجر. شكرًا لك. ، تحت الشمس، -1، -2، وعند العم
アポロ11号、
また、そこに戻らなければならないときには
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Сейчас мы хотели бы провести резервную проверку связи по голосовой связи. Установите вспомогательную ленту S-д
نعم يا جيم. هذا هو الملف الذي أعطيناه لك الليلة الماضية بعد الحرق الكبير، وسنستخدمه بعد تعديله من قبلنا. جربنا هذا الملف في جهاز المحاكاة، وب
ठीक है। हम देख रहे हैं कि मिडिल 
रॉजर और जॉन सुझाव देते हैं कि आप उन कणों को देखने के लिए सूर्योदय के समय अंधेरे की ओर पीछे मुड़कर देखने का 
Gémeaux 4, chirurgien RKV. Votre tension 
D'accord. Cela permet de vérifier la tension du B
I'm readin
Questa zona appena a ovest del Mare delle Crisi è chiamata Palude del Sonno e a ovest di questa 
यह बस - 13 से थोड
罗杰。难得有机会能看到整个世界，用单筒望远镜观察，真是令人叹为观
Ricevuto. Sono circa a pagina 27 della checklist di Surface e stanno procedendo 
Fred-o, would say the che
जेमिनी VIII, यह ह्यूस्टन है। कृपया मुझे परिणाम 
알겠습니다. 5번 패널에서
はい。とても快適に過ごせることがわかりましたし、
아폴로 13호, 휴스턴
Did somebody in the background
Die Mit
ठीक है, जिम। हम प्रक्रियाएँ जल्द से जल्द पूरी करके आपको उपलब्ध कराने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। वे तैयार हैं। अभी हमारे कर्मचारी उन्हें CMS/LMS में चलाकर एकीकृत कर रहे हैं, ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि सभी प्रक्रियाएँ सही हैं, समयसीमा सुचारू और आरामदायक है, और बाकी सब ठीक है। इस प्रक्रिया को पूरा होने में अभी कुछ घंटे और लगेंगे। हालांकि, हमें उम्मीद है कि इससे पहले हम आ
알겠습니다. 조, 한 가지만 다시 한번 확인하고 싶습니다. 원래 57시간부터 시작하던 작업들, 예를
11, Houston. Un petit message pour vous, commandant. Nous avons tous fait une petite pause p
Apollo 8. Hier beginnt ein Vorbeiflugmanöver. Dies wird ein / 63087, minus 162, plus 129, plus 009 62, plus 005 68, minus 020 77 000 000 000, November Alfa, plus 00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013 up 048 right 37, plus 1418, minus 16500 129 04 361 60. Polarsterne 323 090 05
Да. Оглянитесь вокруг и посмотрите, не увидите ли вы Альтаира сбоку. Видите Аквилу, эти дв
ヒューストン、コロン
로저. 맞습니다. DELTA-VX 아래에 02127이 추가된 부분이 맞는지 확인하고 싶습니다. 거기서 
لا تزال الجسيمات مرئية. إنه
I don't believe so, Joe, right 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 4분 남았습니다. 당신은 지금 이 순간을 통제할 수 있고, 모든 시
Jim, bitte deaktiviere für
이봐, 잭
Роджер. Среди главных заголовков, касающихся Аполлона сегодня утром, есть один, в котором вас просят обратить внимание на очаровательную девушку с большим кроликом. Древняя легенда гласит, что прекрасная китайская девушка по имени Чанго жила там 4000 лет. По-видимому, она был
Думаю, Базз, если ты переведешь регулятор усиления в ручной режим и выст
Gemini VIII, Хьюс
收到，这是姿
好的，比尔。在我们阅读这里的重要更新之前，我想先给吉姆简要说明一下操作步骤。当他恢复意识后，请他按回车键。不要继续操作，这样他就不
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 저희도 그걸 하려고 합니다. 광학계에 15개의 별을 맞추려고 하는데, 지구가 너무 밝아서 육분의에 들어갈 만한 별을 찾기가 정말 어렵습니다. 자동 광학계를 사용해서 별을 찾으려고 하고 있습니다. 지금은 그 부분은 확보했고, 우주선을 조종해서 트러니언을 0으로 맞춰서 기준점의 시선을 맞추려고 합
Давай, Стальной Голова. Дружба Семь тебя читает
자, 시작해 볼까요? 아폴로 11호 비행에 대한 관심은 여전히 ​​높지만, 휴스턴 지역에서는 또 다른 관심사가 물 사용 규제 완화입니다. 루이 웰치 시장은 비가 계속 내리면 잔디밭 물 사용 제한을 해제하겠다고 약속했습니다. 금요일은 부분적
أنت تعزف بشكل رائع، وصوتك ممت
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Apro la visi
That's correct. On panel 3: AC INVERT
मैं सेक्स्टेंट के बारे में कुछ कहना चाहूंगा। तंग अंतरिक्ष यान में इसका उपयोग करना बहुत मुश्किल है, खासकर हेलमेट पहने हुए। मैंने अंततः यह निष्कर्ष निकाला कि हेलमेट पहने हुए तारों के लिए आवश्यक कोणों को कैप्चर करने का प्रयास व्यर्थ होगा। इसलिए मैंने अपना हेलमेट उतार दिया। इससे मुझे इसके उपयोग में थोड़ी अधिक सुविधा मिली, लेकिन फिर भी अंतरिक्ष यान को नियंत्रित किए बिना मैं लगभग 20 से 23 डिग्री के कोणों तक ही सीमित था। होता यह था कि खिड़की के ऊपरी हिस्से से तारा दिखाई नहीं देता था। अब, अंतरिक्ष यान को अधिक बार और अधिक नियंत्रित करके आप इसे इस प्रकार नियंत्रित कर सकते हैं कि खिड़की की लंबी धुरी आपके ट्रैकिंग प्लेन में आ जाए। ईंधन की कमी के कारण हमने इस तरह से नियंत्रण करना उचित नहीं समझा। हमने पल्स मोड का भी उपयोग किया, बिना अधिक नियंत्रण किए। उस प्रयोग के लिए चुने गए तारे क्षितिज से काफी ऊंचे कोण पर थे, इसलिए उन्हें कैप्चर करना बहुत मुश्किल था। हमने अंततः क्षितिज के थोड़ा करीब के तारों को कैप्चर करने का निर्णय लिया। मैंने कैनोपस और कुछ अन्य फिल्टरों पर कुछ परीक्षण किए, जैसा कि आप देखेंगे। नीले फिल्टर ने क्षितिज को पूरी तरह से ढक दिया; जब मैंने इसका इस्तेमाल किया तो मुझे क्षितिज बिल्कुल भी दिखाई नहीं दिया। चांदनी में क्षितिज की छवि शायद उतनी अच्छी नहीं आती। हालांकि, हरे फिल्टर से मुझे बिना फिल्टर के मुकाबले थोड़ा साफ क्षितिज दिखाई दिया। मुझे हरे या साफ फिल्टर दोनों से माप लेने में कोई कठिनाई नहीं हुई। फिर भी, क्षितिज पूरी तरह से स्पष्ट नहीं है और आपको एक मानक माप प्राप्त करने के लिए क्षितिज के उसी हिस्से प
Х
روجر، هيوستن. لقد عادت النسر إلى مد
حسنًا. العنوان الرئيسي هو "الدخول، التحضير لوحدة الهبوط القمرية، قبل 6 ساعات". أولًا، تشغيل التغذية العادية للبطارية 5؛ ثانيًا، استخدام قائمة التحقق المعدلة للتفعيل لمدة 30 دقيقة. بعد ذلك، يكون الوقت قبل 5 ساعات، أو 7 ساعات إذا لزم الأمر. الآن، لدينا إجراء ما قبل الدخول. أولًا، ننتقل إلى وضعية وحدة الخدمة SEP. ثانيًا، نضبط الإعدادات لإطلاق النار السري
रॉजर। क्षेत्र 55-डेल्टा 82. 04 34 10. 9+57. क्षेत्र 55-3 स्प्लिट बर्न, 55 पिछला, 10
تصميم كلاسيكي، سلس لل
확실히 그랬어요. 제 생각에는 아마 1마일에서 2마일 
آخر 
We're thinking about them right now. Did you say it yaw
此外，我偶尔会尝试在不同的太阳角度下观测星星，但在这个高度上，这非常困难。在扫描望远镜中，太阳和地球都非常明亮，如果我看着地球并试图
Ich kann dich nicht verstehen. Sa
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. توصياتنا بشأن الأنشطة خلال الساعة القادمة تقريبًا، فيما يتعلق بخطة الرحلة، هي: استمروا في التعرف
هذا أنا؛ أنا - أ
Loud and
روجر. كل شيء يبدو على ما يرام. أ
حسنًا. هذا صحيح، والجملة الأخيرة في التحديث هي أنه يمكنك توقع رؤية المذنب بزاوية دوران 45 درجة و155 درجة. الآن، يا جاك، وفقًا للرسوم البيانية التي عرضوها عليّ، يبدو أن المذنب يبعد حوالي 10 درجات عن الشمس، وبسبب هندسة حجب الشمس، يبدو أنه سيكون بإمكانك رؤية المذنب من خلال السدس دون حدوث انحراف ضوئي بسبب الشمس بين زاويتي دوران 45 درجة و75 درجة تقريبًا.
Roger. I just don't want to be the one that proves 
J'ai une question, Carnarvon: il semble que nous reprenions le ravitaillement en carburant et que nous suivions ensuite l
Okay, Jim. Bevor wir anfangen, noch eine Sache: Wir sind nach wie vor der Meinung, dass unsere vorherige Aussage absolut korrekt ist. Die einzige Änderung im Arbeitsspeicher betrifft die W-Matri
Okay. Die Temperatur am Sekundärradiator (Einlass) beträgt ca. 70–72 Grad; die Temperatur am Radiator (Auslass) liegt bei ca. 30 Grad; die Glykol-Verdampfungstemperatur beträgt ca. 65 Grad; der Dampfdruck ist im Vollausschlag, der Glykol-Auslassdruck liegt bei ca. 9 psi. Der Sekundärakkumulator zeigt für die Anzüge ca. 52 Grad an; die Kabine ca. 58 Grad; die Drücke betragen für die Anzüge 4,1 und für die Kabine 5. Der CO₂-Partialdruck liegt bei etwas über 1, ca. 1,1. An der Hauswand beträgt die Temperatur 72 Grad, der Heliumdruck 3500; N₂ A 2300; N₂ B ca. 2450. Der Brennstoffdruck liegt bei ca. 165 Grad; Brennstoffzelle 1 ist geschlossen, sie ist funktionslos; die Oberflächentemperatur beträgt 405 Grad. Der Kondensatorabgasstrom liegt im unteren Bereich. Brennstoffzelle 2 – aktuell haben wir einen O₂- oder H₂-Durchflusswert von 0,13 bis 0,14. Der O₂-Durchfluss liegt momentan am oberen Skalenendwert, obwo
One other item relative to a
Roger. The night side is light enough; I can even see 
好的。我们说
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. نحن ننظر إلى جهاز التثبيت الخاص بك، ونلاحظ أن لدينا نظام حقن رباعي الفوهات مُحمّلًا، وقد خصصنا لك فوهتين على المنصة. لكن دعنا نعتمد على النظام المُحمّل. سيكون نظام حقن رباعي ا
हम यहां आपके लिए थ
好的。这里是你们友好的自助维修工具包通讯员，为大家提供一份关于氢氧化锂情况的建议操作流程。目前情况良好。我们读取到液位为1.8毫米，足够你们完成剩余的飞行任务。但是，为了安全起见，我们建议再使用一套指令舱储液罐，以防主储液罐出现问题。我这里
ह्यूस्टन, हम आपको कमांडर की चेकलिस्ट के सामान रखने वाले पैकेट से मिली एक चीज़ दिखा रहे हैं। इसमें एक 16 मिलीमीटर का कैमरा है, और इसमें एक छोटा सा सिलेंडर भी है; और मु
आप उस ऑक्सीजन का कितना हिस्सा इस्तेमाल करने
Вот репортаж Гарри Розенталя из Associated, Хьюстон. Два Санта-Клауса украсили сочельник для двухлетнего Джеффри Ловелла. Первый постучал в его входную дверь и принес подарки. Второй проводил его папу домой с Луны. Первый был в красном костюме и с белой бородой, и его крики «Хо-хо» были слышны за кварталом. Второй представлял собой огромный двигатель, извергающий пламя за Луной, и тысячи людей ждали известия о его запуске. «Пожалуйста, примите к сведению, что Санта-Клаус существует», — такими были первые слова «Аполлона-8», когда он вышел из радиомолчания, чтобы сообщить встревоженному миру через 15 минут после того, как двигатель выполнил свой критически важный запуск. «Никто из нас никогда не ожидал получить лучший рождественский подарок, чем этот», — сказал Кен Маттингли из Центра управления полетами. «Поблагодарите всех на Земле за нас. Вы знаете, что мы бы не справились без вас», — последовал ответ полковника Фрэнка Бормана, командира космического корабля. В этот момент перед пультами в Центре управления полетами загорелась рождественская елка, и астронавт Харрисон Шмидт прочитал экипажу космическую версию «Визита Святого Николая». «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и далеко в космосе экипаж «Аполлона-8» только что выиграл лунную гонку», — начиналось чтение. Экипаж Центра управления полетами отложил празднование до тех пор, пока отец Джеффри, капитан ВМС Джеймс Ловелл, вместе с майором ВВС Уильямом А. Андерсом и полковником Борманом не отправятся домой. В любой другой сочельник семьи астронавтов были бы в церкви на рождественской службе, но в этом году все они были прикованы к своим телевизорам. Дома рядом с Центром пилотируемых космических аппаратов были украшены. Газоны вокруг дома Ловелла и по всему его поселению Тимбер-Коув были украшены мексиканскими фонариками, и четверо Ловеллов 30. Они 00, подъехала машина, в которой ехал высокий Санта-Клаус с большим мешком за спиной. Он подошёл к двери и громко постучал. Дверь открылась, и перед ним стоял Джеффри Ловелл, которому 14 января исполнится
मैं अंतिम ट्रिम करने की योजना बना रहा हूं - ऑटो ट्रिम, और फिर चार-जेट ट्
So-called kangeroo hop does work, but it seems that your forward mobility is not quite as good as - it is in the convent
Es hat
Come l
알겠습니다. 마음가짐을 제대로 가다듬는 데 시간이 좀 걸렸네요. 
어디
Gemini VI, 
यह चीज सही ढंग से संरेखित नही
Bene. Ora, a questo punto, hai già contrassegnato questa
そうです。再突入ロジックが組み込まれているかどうかを
Roger. I believe we have the in sight. I
أبولو 8، نحن نتح
Ciao! Jim, noi... Abbiamo calcolato gli angoli di allineamento grossolani del gimbal basandoci sulla tua posizione in assetto SEP del modulo di servizio nel momento in cui Jack avvia il computer e... e gli angoli di allineamento grossolani. Cioè, diamo per scontato che tu sia a roll
好的。区域 27-2 96. 2+02. 08 27 55. 6+35. 10+58。区域 28-2：ΔV 111. 2+20. 10 02 54. 4+50. 9+39。区域 29-2：好的，这是一个分裂的 ΔV。前向 66。后向 61。1+48。1+17。GMTRC 11 37 05. 3+43. 08+59。区域 24-DELTA：ΔV 89. 1+53. 03 45 30.
알겠습니다. 좋아요. 그렇게 할게요. 그리고 시스템상으로는, 무슨 문제였든 간에, J52 센서를 교체하거나 하는 것 없이 문제가 해결된 것 같습니다. 글리콜 증발기 출구 온도가 이제 50도 이상으로 올라가서 조종석도 아
بكل وضوح
L'interrutto
네. 그리고 또 하나 저희가 한 일은 EPC 디스플레이 차단기를 내렸다는 것입니다. 하지만 주의 및 경고 표시등은 계속 켜져 있습니다. 따라서 주의 또는 경고 표시등이 켜지면 디스플레이 차단기를 통해 해당 계기판에 전원을 공급해야 합니다. 저희는 고객님의 온도, ASA 온도, 추진제 온도(추진제 제외), 그리고 쿼드콥터 온도를
Restez à l'écoute, Verseau, Odyssey. Nous vous demandons de passer directement à l'action et de mett
로저. 12-브라보 160. 01 09 3
Il semble que lors de la coupure de coura
Sì. Vorremmo poterti inviare un kit, sarebbe un po' come assemblare un modellino di aeroplano o qualcosa del genere. A quanto pare, questo marchingegno sembrerà una casset
... genug Licht da unten, aber man findet keine einzige Stelle auf der Oberfläche, die nicht aussieht wie... 1-G
نعم. فقط البطارية رقم 6 يا جاك. وفي السطر التالي، كان لديك البطاريتان 1 و3. اجعلها الب
Ok, Jim. E abbiamo già apportato una modifica a quanto ti abbiamo appena detto. Sotto, chiudi il CABIN REPRESS e assicurati che l'ASA BREAKER sia chiuso so
Я думаю, сегодня также день рождения Калифорнии, и, кажется, им исполняется 200 лет, и мы поздравляем их с этим событием. И, кажется, сегодня ещё и день рождения доктора Мюллера, хотя, думаю, ему не так
रॉजर। ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8। आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से समझ रहा हूँ। योजना 24136 179 045 001 515 105196 35569 357 091 001; प्लस 10, पिच पर रवैया रद्द
Roger. Nur zur Info: Die Waffe ist draußen, verstaut und zusammengebaut, wir haben unsere Kameras dabei und werden
Роджер. Я стыковался в режиме AUTO, и, как я уже говорил, я не был уверен в моменте контакта. Я постоянно сверял показания стыковочного зонда. Я получил два сигнала, указывающих на то, что три защелки захвата — не защелки захвата, а именно три… защелки — сработали, и мы мягко пристыковались. И в тот момент ситуация выглядела очень стабильной. Поэтому я переключился в режим FREE, снова взглянул в окно, и ситуация по-прежнему выглядела стабильной; и я выстрелил из основного баллона №2. И
Houston, this is 13. Is it true that Jack's income tax return was going to be used to buy the ascent fu
يبدو أن غالق كاميرا هاسلبلاد عالق في بعض هذه الصور. هذه هي المجموعة الثانية من صور S-6 فوق المحيط الأطلسي. من الواضح أن آلية تحريك الفيلم تُسبب خللاً في عمل كاميرا ها
Gemini 4, CSQ. Хьюстон хотел бы узнать, какое у вас было относительное положение в момент наб
11, ह्यूस्टन। आपके स
Роджер, Майк. Фазирование TIG 103 40 0000, менее 10 105 12 3000, более 10 107 11 3000. Бол
弗雷德，你
이제 돌아가시겠죠
버즈, 우리
Der Sonnenuntergang ist wirklich beeindruckend, ich glaube nicht, dass ich viel Zeit damit verschwenden muss, ihn anzusehen. Er ist sehr interessant. Faszinierend ist auch, wie schwarz es ist, wenn sich die Augen nicht daran gewöhnt haben. Ich kann definitiv eine Beschichtung auf dem Fenster erkennen. Ich schalte jetzt wieder auf VOX im UHF-Hi-Modus, um zu senden. Ich öffne das Visier, um das rechte Mikrofon abzuwischen. Ich habe es abgeleckt. Visier zu. Das Visier wurde sofort abgedichtet, damit die Anzugselektronik ihre Arbeit aufnehmen konnte. Ich will damit nicht noch einmal Probleme haben. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hält die Temperatur sehr gut bei etwa 68 Grad. Also wird die Kuppel wieder hochgefahren. Sie steht jetzt bei 76, 75 Grad. Anscheinend ist diese höhere Einstellung die richtige. Ich denke, ich drehe sie jetzt noch eine halbe Markierung hoch, dann haben wir sie vielleicht fixiert. Sie kühlt endlich etwas ab, also weiß ich, in welche Richtung ich die Einstellung ändern muss. Ich habe die Kühlmittelmenge für den Anzug und den Steuerhebel auf 8,5 eingestellt. Die Anzeige in der Kuppel zeigt aktuell 75 Grad an. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs h
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Es sieht so aus, als ob wir die Verbindung bekommen; wir prüfen sie. Sie müssen den C
わかりました。ジャイロのトルク​​角をいくつか用意しましたので、お知らせします。姿
通过这种零升力再入方式，我们可以预
ठीक है, जिम। हम
ジェミニ4、C
रॉ
Cela ne rentre-t-il pas aussi dans ce grand contene
음, 그들이 추천하는 방법은 조리개 f/8, 셔터 속도 1/250초, 초점 거리를 무한대가 아닌 7피트(약 2.1미터)로 설정하는 것입니다. 이렇게 하면 무한대부터 
Ricevuto. Avvisa il Pil
Et Jim, lorsque vous aurez terminé cette procédure, nous aimerions également que vous mettiez les r
了解しました。はっきりと聞こえました。コンピューターの電源
罗杰，你是怎么阅读的
I have both eyes on your water boiler outlet... looks like a s
Meno 00014, più tutti zeri, più 00001 000 304 000, non applicabile, più 00191 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225 Shaula, su 236 000, p
Autre information locale: le palais de justice du comté de Huntsville a brûlé avant l'aube hier, et il semblerait que des travaux de construction soient à prévoir. On parle aussi des familles qui attendent. Cet article est signé Ann James, journaliste du Post. « Nous nous reposons sur la face cachée de la lune », a déclaré Valerie Anders la veille 
J'ai
Okay. Real fine then. And next time around, why, we'll take an extra special look at all of the parameters; we'll have our for you. And we'll use the last for a real good hack on all systems. I'll give you a rundown by system o
Роджер. Мы только что закончили — мы как раз заканчиваем
Водолей, Хьюстон. Хорошо.
Ricevuto. 
रॉजर, समझ ग
Понял. Эта последовательность диапазонов — явление, которое мы наблюдаем при резервном копировании голосовых данных; в этом режиме определение расстояния 
ロジャー、フラ
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Похоже,
I'm now starting to see the sunrise in the periscope. First light in the periscope during this particular orbit as a result of the night side. It is obvious that the periscope has no function whatsoever in retroattitude on the night side. First light that I get is right now at a of practically. The sunrise is coming in rather rapidly through the periscope. I do have the lighted objects that John mentioned, and I can create some by knocking them off. I definitely have a sensation of their being a field and varying in size from small to bright. The periscope itself is blinding me. I'll have to 
ウォーリー、最終段階でライ
Это подтверждается. Сначала я быстро пройдусь по времени основных событий, а затем мы вернемся и уточним некоторые детали. Хорошо. Вход в атмосферу запланирован на 142 часа 40 минут; примерно за 6,5 часов до этого мы начнем весь процесс, включив питание нагревателя, проверив температуру в модуле управления и предварительно прогрев его при необходимости. Мы предполагаем, что нам, вероятно, потребуется это сделать. Подробные инструкции будут опубликованы позже. Примерно за 6 часов до этого мы начнем включать питание, используя модифицированный 30-минутный контрольный список, который вы использовали для предыдущего промежуточного этапа. Затем, незадолго до 5 часов до этого, мы попросим вас принять положение для выравнивания по оси тела, используя терминатор Земли, как мы делали раньше; И как только мы это получим, мы выполним маневр -7, который, судя по всему, сейчас будет представлять собой примерно 2 фута в секунду или около 15 секунд работы двигателя. Мне сказали, что сейчас скорость снизилась до 1,5 фута в секунду, так что это вполне в пределах допустимых значений. Хорошо. После этого мы немедленно начнем маневр по сбросу служебного модуля, который будет в плоскости, поскольку мы сбрасываем его раньше, чем обычно. Нам не нужна и нежелательна внеплоскостная составляющая. Таким образом, он будет в плоскости, а служебный модуль будет направлен обратно вдоль радиус-вектора. Затем мы начнем подготовку командного модуля к запуску, включая проверку командного модуля и запуск двигателя, и примерно за 4 часа 30 минут до или мы сбросим служебный модуль. Мы будем держать самолет поднятым, пока не получим доступ к сервисному модулю... и попытаемся сделать несколько фотографий, но мы не будем возиться с маневрами перемещения для получения снимков, потому что не хотим испортить угол траектории полета в это время. Хорошо. Это дает нам примерно 2 часа свободного времени, чтобы закончить, если мы опоздаем, перейти к контрольному списку и подготовиться к включению командного модуля. Мы начнем полное включение командного модуля за 2 часа 30 минут до конца. Мы подключим компьютер, поднимем самолет, начнем передавать ваши векторы состояния и так далее, и выровняем платформу командного модуля. Примерно через 1 час 30 минут, самое позднее, у нас будет час на выполнение этих действий с командным модулем, мы начнем маневр по сбросу. Затем вы начнете закрывать... Конечно, у нас не все места для хранения будут сконфигуриров
أبولو 8، هيوستن. اطلب إيقاف وضع النطاق العادي لنطاق S، ثم ضبط وضع النطاق العادي لنطاق S على الوضع العادي. أكرر: إيقاف وضع النطاق العادي لنطاق S، ثم ضبط وضع النطاق العادي لنطاق S على الوضع ا
7 Stunden 22 Minuten... für eine Ent
11, это Хь
罗杰，明白了
How is it going? Everything is fine here, 
Хорошо. Так мы и поступим. Поставим Фреда дежурить, а мы с Джеком будем действовать осторожно, и если Фред скопирует обно
로저. 우리도
Non troppo. Noto che è diverso da quando sono andato a dormire. Ora siamo più angolati rispetto 
谢
Und Eagl
Sì, tutti gli interruttori dei fusibili sono ancora nella stessa posizione, Gordo. Non ne ho cambiato nessuno. Lo Squib è armato, il Retrojettison automatico è disattivato. Sono su fly-by-wire, automatico e giroscopio normale. Tutte le manopole a "T" sono inserite. Il pannello di sequenza è normale, tranne il Landing Bag in posizione di spegnimento. L'indicatore di assetto è piuttosto irregolare, a volte si sposta molto rapidamente. Soprattutto q
Bei der letzten Übertragung habe ich meinen linken Arm
了解しました。左手の窓から地球が見えています。地球の半分強です。東太平洋と画面上部の北半分には、北米、アラスカ、アメリカ合衆国、カナダ、メキシコ、中央アメリカが見えます。南米は境界線のすぐ先、つまり影の中に隠れています。海ははっきり
يبدو هذا رائعًا، أفهم الآن سبب إعجابك أنت 
VGY minus 0.0, VGZ minus 0.1, DELTA-VC minus 5.2, fuel 362, OX 364, unbalance plus 50, and our postburn now 94's, 66.1 by 
We don't like those heater
휴스턴, 
حسنًا. سنبقيه هنا لدقيقتين يا كين. فرانك و - فرانك وجيم نائمون، و.
...लेकिन मुझे लगता है कि ऐसा इसलिए हुआ क्योंकि मैं लगातार 100 प्रतिशत ऑक्सीजन ग्रहण कर रहा था। मुझे संदेह है कि शायद मेरे कान और साइनस का ताप
Eccezionale. Abbiamo cercato il loro las
로저. 자, 이 검사를 통과하면 바로 여기서 종료하시면 됩니다. 그러면 연소 자세로 전환하라는 지시를 드릴 거고, 거기서 항성 검사를 할 수 있습니다. 만약 통과하지 못하면
네. 이제 (알아볼 수 없는 부분)이 어디 있는지 알았으니 다음번엔 훨씬 쉬울 거예요. 처음 카이로와 알렉산드리아를 찾을 때는 (알아볼 수 없는 부분)을 찾는 데 꽤 애를 먹었어요. 비행장은 제대로 보지 못하고 그냥 주변만 봤죠. 카메라를 잘 맞추면 카이로 사진이 
Роджер, 11. Мы скопировали ваше описание. Я 
Roger. Compris. OMNI Charlie. Mike, nous avons des nouvelles concernant le… Nous estimons qu'il a atterri à envi
11, Houston. Lors de la combustion, dont l'enregistrement est diffusé ici, nous avons constaté une baisse de pression dans le réservoir d'azote Bravo, légèrement supérieure à nos prévisions. La pression est désormais stable. Nous c
Houston, Apollo 11. En regardant la même zone, on remarque qu'elle reflète la lumière cendrée. Je ne sais pas si le déphasage a été calculé à peu près à zéro… Enfin, une paroi du cratère paraît plus éclairée que les autres, et celle-ci, si notre alignement avec la Terre est correct, semble bien être à déphasage nul
And, Jack, because it will take quite a while to get back to the attitude, I think we ought to think about going th
Roger. Du hast wahrscheinlich noch keine aussagekräftige Referenz, o
Мы бы хотели, чтобы вы вернулись. 
لو كنت أعرف كيف ستتطور الأمور، لما ذهبتُ إلى هذا الحد مع الزجاجة. كنتُ معتاداً على ذلك، كم
我认为我失去高频通信的部分原因
Fr
نعم. أعتقد أن السؤال الأساسي هو مقارنة الكرات هنا ومن النافذة، ولا يبدو الأمر غير معقول للغاية، وأعتقد أن جيم يقول إن الانحراف وا
И мы предполагаем, что можем потерять захват цел
ジェミニVI、ヒューストン。REP RBの最新情報をお伝えします
Je comprends qu'il a fait un peu chaud pendant la journée et que la température a légèrement baissé lorsque vous avez ouvert les stores, mais vous avez e
C
지금 슈트 설정을 8로 조정했습니다. 즉, 슈트 냉각수량을 8로 설정한 것입니다. 슈트 흡입
60 ثاني
हम यहाँ की चीज़ों के बारे में विस्तार से बात करेंगे, लेकिन फिलहाल ऐसा लगता है कि यहाँ हर तरह के आकार, कोणीयता, कणिकता और हर प्रकार की चट्टानें मौजूद हैं। रंगों की बात करें तो, ये शून्य-चरण बिंदु के सापेक्ष देखने के नज़रिए के आधार पर बदलते रहते हैं। यहाँ कोई एक समान रंग नज़र नहीं आता। हालांकि
全世界可能都想知道，在点火结束后，你是如何重新配置​​开关的。我们——我们听到你检查了一遍清单。但是，我想现在，基本上，你可能已经把所有开关都恢复到位了，可以继续执行任务了——好的。飞
Мы прост
Okay. This is very close to ignition point for power desce
Der Flug geht weiter, die Besatzung wird dichter, die Rotationen sind langsam, aber alles läuft gut. Durch das Periskop seh
はい、い
D
罗杰。我们同
收到。阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我这里有3号、4号任务更新以及3号和4号任务的地图更新要读给你听。实际上，你机上已有的3号
रॉजर। आप पृथ्वी को देख रहे हैं, जैसा कि हम इसे अपनी बाईं खिड़की से देख रहे हैं, पृथ्वी का लगभग आधा हिस्सा। हम पूर्वी प्रशांत महासागर को देख रहे हैं, और स्क्रीन के ऊपरी आधे हिस्से के उत्तरी भाग में, हम उत्तरी अमेरिका, अलास्का, संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका, कनाडा, मैक्सिको और मध्य अमेरिका को देख सकते हैं। दक्षिण अमेरिका टर्मिनेटर के ठीक बाहर या छाया के अंदर अदृश्य हो जाता है। हम महासागरों को स्पष्ट नीले रंग में देख सकते हैं, पृथ्वी पर फैले प्रमुख बादल संरचनाओं की सफेद पट्टियाँ देख सकते हैं, और तटरेखाओं को देख सकते हैं, पश्चिमी अमेरिका, सैन जोकिन घाटी, सिएरा पर्वत श्रृंखला, बाजा कैलिफोर्निया प्रायद्वीप को पहचान सकते हैं, और हम दक्षिणपूर्वी अमेरिका के ऊपर कुछ बादल संरचनाओं को देख सकते हैं। अलास्का के दक्षिण-पश्चिम में एक स्पष्ट हल्का तूफान है, जो लगभग 500 से 1000 मील की दूरी पर प्रतीत होता है, और एक और बहुत छोटा तूफान स्क्रीन के
데이브는 핵유화액이 23분에 작동하기 
わか
Okay. Der Grund, warum wir das im Flugplan berücksichtigt haben, ist folgender: Falls Sie versuchen möchten, sich zu drehen und mit dem Kopf voran zu fliegen oder Ähnliches, können wir Bill helfen, seine Fotografie zu opti
ب؛ دلتا-في، 13.5. تعديل الارتفاع؛ دلتا-في، 59.5. تعديل الطور؛ دلتا-في، 31.3. تغيير المستوى باتجاه الجنوب؛ دلتا-في، 44.3. مسار بيضاوي مشترك؛ دلتا-في، 33.7. بدء الطور النها
Rog
ठीक है। पुष्टि हो गई। प्रतीक्षा कीजिए। आगे बढ़ने से पहले मैं बस यह सुनिश्चित कर लूँ कि मेर
Je suis dés
شكر
Okay. I'm showing just a little bi
А как
रॉजर, 13. ऑक्सीजन टैंक 2 के मात्रा सेंसर में खराबी के कारण, हम क्रायो मात्रा पर थोड़ा और बारीकी से न
休斯顿，哥伦比亚。我已经完成校准。我已经启动了
HIGH BIT, 8 minut
방금 사진을 찍었습니다. 콘타렉스 카메라의 14번 프레임인데, EVA 촬영 때 사용했던 것과 같은 필름 팩입니다. 길게 뻗은 구름 지대가 시작되는 부분이 보이네요. 사막 지대와 중국까지 뻗어 있는 산악 지대 사이에 고립된 것처럼 보입
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. لإعادة التهيئة من هذه الوضعية، يا جاك، نريدك أن تترك مفاتيح ربط ناقل التيار الرئيسي في وضع التشغيل، وأن تسحب قواطع الدائرة الكهربائي
잭, 난 네가 아무런 소란
分かりました。コンピュータをすべてのモードでチェックします。このチェックには 3 つの手順があります。まず、すべての IVI ウィンドウで 10 フィート/秒を入力します。次に、誤動作リセットを押します。次に、Start Comp を押して、Computer Running Light の表示を確認します。これをすべてのモードで実行します。繰り返しますが、コンピュータが動作しているという表示が得られない場合は、別のテストを実行します。この別のテストでは、すべてのモードでチェックします。コンピュータの電源を 2 秒間オフにします。コンピュータの電源を 2 秒間オフにします。コンピュータの電源が再投入されたら、手動の Malfunction Reset と Start Comp を再度押します。どのモ
ठीक है। अब 1 घंटा और 32 मिनट हो गए हैं। क्या हम 1 
... 私に渡
ヒューストン、コロンビア。コメントをお願いします。問題なく動作しました。私がマークしたク
Bene. 
Wir haben hier oben noch etwas zu tun, Charlie. Wir werden sicherstellen, dass alles umgeladen und so verstaut ist, wie wir es wollen, und versuchen, morgen etwas schnell
Roger. Meglio, Mike. Ti sentiamo ora verso le quattro. Prima non c'era voce. Restiamo in
لستُ متأكدًا من أنني نسختُ ذلك يا فريد. إذا سألتني إن كنتُ أملك إجراء التشغيل هذا، فليس لديّ ما أُخبرك به حتى الآن. انته
はい。ここには通信チェックが2つあります。5つの異なるモードに切り替えますが、そのうち1つだけが皆さんの活動を中断します。その場合、アップリンクのバックアップ音声に切り替えます。その時にアップリンクの音声通信が一時的に途切れる可能性があります。ダウンリンクの音声通信は手順全体を通して可能です。所要
Non preoccuparti di svegliarlo per noi. Aspet
第一天，B餐。我买这
Да. Я примерно
हाँ। मैं प्लेटिनम मोड में जाऊँगा। मेरा मतलब यही था
Fred, we have 
Laggiù sei alla luce del gi
فهم
11号，休斯顿。我们可以辨认出面板上的标记。上面写着：A系统
로저, 하와이, 오로라 세븐. 잘 들립니다. 저
Да, мы принимал
Jim, mi sembra la soluzione migliore. Lascia che ne parli con gli altri ragazzi qui 
في تمام الساعة 00:29:43، تمكنتُ لأ
ठीक है। -6 घंटे - या कहें 6 मिनट - पर, मोड कंट्रोल के अंतर्गत, एटीटी होल्ड (जिसे मिटा दिया गया था), डालें, एंटर करें, और तीन बार और एंटर करें। तो - य
アポロ11号、ヒューストン
Дайте-ка я посмотрю, сможет ли тормозной конус удержать его 
The thing is, with this sitting there, I 
جاهز
Roger. Quels réglages me conseillez-vous pour la couronne solaire? Le Soleil se trouve actuellement juste derrièr
Ist es an? Dann muss ich den Sicherungsa
左边还有6
아니요, 빌. 지금
La 
そうですよ
收到。我的情况良好；
أوه، نعم، كثيراً. نعم، واجهتُ الكثير من المشاكل مع
좋습니다. 다시 고이득 각도로
Forte e chi
本当に美味し
Роджер, Хьюстон. Вы получили 
Роджер, я
Wir haben außerdem d
Вы знаете, где эта
حسناً، لقد نظرت حولي، وقمت بشكل أساسي بالخطوات من 1 إلى 5 باستثناء الأضواء الكاشفة وأضواء المرافق، وأعتقد أننا 
알겠습니
Wir sind uns einig. Stern 34
Да. О, я бы хотел узнать, сколько... Да, что случилос
ऐसा लगता है कि पावर डाउन होने पर भी हम लगभग 11 एम्पियर से थोड़ा कम करंट खींच रहे हैं। नंबर 1 पर 10 और नंबर 2 पर 11 से थोड़ा कम करंट है। बाहरी हैच पर टेदर या अम्बिलिकल रिस्ट्रेंट की स्थिति के कारण अंतरिक्ष यान के आगे मुक्त टेदर एरोडायनामिक्स के लिहाज से EVA का काम करना काफी मुश्किल हो गया था। जब भी मैं उस क्षेत्र में काम कर रहा होता, टेदर जब खत्म होने वाला होता तो मुझे पीछे की ओर धकेल देता और प्रतिक्रिया के कारण मैं वापस अंतरिक्ष यान के ऊपर से होते हुए एडाप्टर सेक्शन की ओर चला जाता। इसीलिए खिड़कियों के ऊपर पैंतरेबाज़ी करते समय मैं बार-बार नज़र से ओझल हो जाता और फिर अंतरिक्ष यान के पिछले हिस्से की ओर बह जाता। मुझे लगातार खुद को खींचकर अंतरिक्ष यान के आगे वाले हिस्से में जाना पड़ता था। मुझे जो तस्वीरें मिल रही थीं उनसे मैं संतुष्ट नहीं था। मेरे पास जितने भी डोरी थे, उन्हें संभाल कर रखना काफी मुश्किल था... बंदूक पर डोरी थी, मेरे ऊपर लगा हुआ टेदर और अम्बिलिकल था, और कई तरह के दूसरे डोरी इधर-उधर लहरा रहे थे, और उन्हें कैमरे के सामने आने से रोकना मुश्किल था। आप शायद तस्वीरों में देखेंगे कि म
रॉजर ने सेक्शन 2 पर डबल पर्ज पूरा कर लिया 
Roger, qui tutto procede liscio. Abbiamo un po' di ritardo nel risponderti perché abbiamo acceso 
Я вполне мог бы прилететь с другой планеты и почувствовать, что лежу на спине, а
了解しました。この
Roger
Roger. Les batteries sont prêtes, et – prêtes à copier la pile à co
Roger. Sigma Seven. Guaymas Cap Com. Parfait. Il y a eu une panne de courant du côté californien. Nous lisons corre
了解。星25と42、角度差5球、プラス0016
Ой, извините, Фред. Мы сейчас вас не читаем. Возмо
रॉजर, माइक। T1, 104 32 18; 
好的。我们仍在进行跟踪，正如您所知，在最后几个小时的进出过程中，我们会暂停水倾倒等操
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven
ث
لا. نحن - روجر. نحن نتساءل كيف كانت رح
I am about ready to impact now. I'm j
Roger. Wir haben wohl die Antennen gewechselt. Bitte warten. Bestätigt, 11. Wir haben hier unten die Antennen getauscht. Im Grunde genommen haben wir jetzt eine sehr gute Plattform, sehr geringe Drift bei den Gyroskopen und sehr geringe Drift b
سيجما
يا إلهي، فريقنا الأبيض القديم لا يزال متيقظاً ونشيطاً. نحن دائما
いや、冗談抜きで。興味深いことに、地図を見ると
وافقت لجنة الطرق والوسائل في مجلس النواب أمس على تعديلات ضريبية تؤثر على شركات ال
Das scheint ungefähr h
Oui, je veux dire que nous avons fait le transfert un peu tard parce que... nous avons jou
로저. 정말 잘하고 있어요. 십자 포인터도 
以下是休斯顿联合通讯社记者哈里·罗森塔尔的报道。对于两岁的杰弗里·洛弗尔来说，两个圣诞老人点亮了他的平安夜。第一个圣诞老人敲响了他的家门，带来了礼物。第二个圣诞老人则从月球上接回了他的爸爸。第一个圣诞老人身穿红色圣诞老人套装，留着白色胡子，发出响亮的“嚯嚯”声，整个街区都能听到。第二个圣诞老人是月球背后喷吐火焰的巨型发动机，成千上万的人都在等待着它点火成功的消息。“请知悉，圣诞老人来了！”这是阿波罗8号打破无线电静默，向焦急的全世界宣布发动机完成关键点火15分钟后发出的第一句话。“我们谁也没想到会收到比这更好的圣诞礼物，”任务控制中心的肯·马丁利说道。“感谢地面上的所有人。你们知道，没有你们，我们不可能完成这项任务，”飞船指挥官弗兰克·博尔曼上校回应道。这时，任务控制中心控制台前的圣诞树亮了起来，宇航员哈里森·施密特为机组人员朗读了太空版的《圣尼古拉斯的来访》。故事开头是这样的：“圣诞前夜，在遥远的太空，阿波罗8号的宇航员们刚刚赢得了登月竞
我会让他们核实一下，但我凭直觉觉得应
Okay, Vance. On the power down, we go low bit rate; DOWN VOICE BACKUP, we
जी हाँ
روجر. احتراق جيد. لا توجد بقايا. كمية ال
Roger, Bill. Beim nächsten Einsatz im Sonnenlicht erwarten wir keine Probleme mit dem Hauptverdampfer. Sollte er dennoch a
Это отрицательный результат. Я его не открывал. Не открою, пока не закончу эти измерения. Фекда се
Приня
收到。
Электронное управление ру
ठीक है। बिल को जब भी समय मिले, हम बैटरी बी को चार्ज करना शुरू करना चाहें
D'accord, Jack. Commençons par le haut. Les réservoirs cryogéniques: H2 1 affiche 230 et 2, pareil. Notre réservoir cryogénique O2 1 semble à peine se maintenir à 300. Quant au réservoir cryogénique 2, H2 1 affiche 73, 2 et 74. Côté O2, nous lisons O2 1 en quantité, 76; O2 est au maximum. Températures du radiateur: entrée principale: environ 55; sortie du radiateur: environ 30; sortie secondaire: 52 °C. La température de sortie de l'évaporateur est de 45 °C, la pressio
단안경으로 안정적인 시야를 확보하는 가장 좋은 방법
罗杰。您的 GET 燃烧 02 18 25；Delta-V，50.
Для миссии «Аполлон-8» нам бы при 
Okay. Ich glaube, ich habe das falsch verstanden. Ihr habt das VHF-Signal bis 20 km kopiert. Wir prüfen gerade die Downlink-Verbindung. Aber in jedem Fall werd
حسنًا. لقد درسنا جميع الاحتمالات الممكنة هنا. أسوأ سيناريو توصلنا إليه هو خطأ مسافة الخطأ 3 سيجما - أي 70 ميلًا بحريًا. هذا صحيح. ما نود منك القيام به هو مناورة رجوع OAMS؛ ثم سنقوم بإطلاق نار يدوي عكسي، بالطبع، بدون استخدام الكمبيوتر. نريد دخولًا دوارًا بدون رفع. هذا هو الدخول الدوار بدون رفع. سبب اختيار الدوران بدلًا من الميل بزاوية 90-90 هو تقليل احتمالية التشتت. ستميل الصواريخ إلى التعادل. نعتقد أننا نستطيع تحقيق استعادة أسرع بهذه الطريقة. أيضًا، بهذه الطريقة يمكننا الحصول على نقطة دخول قبل فقدان الوعي، ومن المفترض أن تتعرض لقوة 8g تقريبًا عند الدخو
حسنًا. ملاحظة أخيرة بخصوص الماء يا جاك. إذا لم تُفرّغ الضغط تمامًا عند سحب كمية كافية من الماء، فسيتسرب الضغط المتبقي خلال ساعة إلى ثلاث ساعات. صحيح أنه كمية قليلة من الأكسجين، لكن من الأفضل 
今晚我们在查理·杜克家喝了点蛋奶酒。瓦尔·安德斯
ええ、ここに信じられないくらい大きなヘラジカがいます。今までで一番大きいんです。なんて大きいんだ！とてつもなく大きいんです！窓に収まりきらないほど大きいんです。見たい？今まで見た中で一番大きいヘラジカだ
Und ich glaube, der Grund, warum Sie keine Spannung ablesen, ist, dass es sich um einen Schut
Non appena avrò buttato via il mio nastro, mi rial
روجر. هي
알겠습니다. 100초, 
Ricevuto. Rapporto sullo stato. Ti ho inviato un campione di sangue. Tutti i sistemi sono verdi, tranne il circuito della tuta, su cui sto lavora
Secondo i calcoli, dovreste vedere la Luna. Sarà una Luna 
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, i
روجر، أنا 
Apollo 8, Apollo 8. I dati a terra indicano che l'evapor
Хорошо, «Аполлон-8». Мы закончили с компьютером. Вы можете использовать его для передачи данных, а у меня есть
こちらフレンドシップセ
Voici un reportage d'Harry Rosenthal, de l'Associated Press de Houston. Deux Pères Noël ont illuminé la veille de Noël du petit Jeffrey Lovell, âgé de deux ans. Le premier a frappé à sa porte et lui a apporté des cadeaux. Le second a ramené son papa sur la Lune. Le premier portait un costume rouge et une barbe blanche, et son « ho, ho! » résonnait si fort qu'on l'entendait à plusieurs kilomètres. Le second était un énorme moteur crachant des flammes derrière la Lune, et des milliers de personnes attendaient la confirmation de son allumage. « Sachez qu'il y a un Père Noël », furent les premiers mots d'Apollo 8, sortant du silence radio pour annoncer au monde entier, quinze minutes après les faits, que le moteur avait réussi sa combustion critique. « Aucun d'entre nous ne s'attend à recevoir un plus beau cadeau de Noël que celui-ci », déclara Ken Mattingly, du centre de contrôle des missions. « Remerciez de notre part tous ceux qui sont restés sur Terre. Vous savez que nous n'aurions rien pu faire sans vous », répondit le colonel Frank Borman, commandant du vaisseau. À ce moment précis, un sapin de Noël s'illumina devant les consoles du centre de contrôle des missions, et l'astronaute Harrison Schmidt lut à l'équipage une version spatiale du conte « La visite de Saint Nicolas ». « C'était la veille de Noël, et très loin dans l'espace, l'équipage d'Apollo 8 venait de remporter la course vers la Lune », commençait le récit. L'équipe du centre de contrôle des missions avait retardé les festivités jusqu'à ce que le père de Jeffrey, le capitaine de la marine James Lovell, ainsi que le major de l'armée de l'air William A. Anders et le colonel Borman soient rentrés sains et saufs. N'importe quel autre réveillon de Noël, les familles des astronautes auraient assisté à la messe de Noël à l'église, mais cette année, elles étaient toutes rivées à leur téléviseur. Toutes les maisons près du Centre spatial habité étaient décorées. Les p
Roger. Wenn Jim
ठीक है, जैक। मैं इसे तुम्हें पढ़कर सुनाता हूँ, फिर कुछ टिप्पणियाँ जोड़ता हूँ और हम इस पर थोड़ी बात 
هيوستن، يبدو أن مؤقت مهمتن
Okay, ich habe Sie über AC INVERTER 2, AC BUS 1 a
Roger, Charlie. Nous avons échangé notre OMNI D - Delta, et j'ai perdu la dernière transmission. Pourriez-vous répéter, s'il vous plaît? Ce qui m'intrigue, c'est que vous avez dit précédemment que cela correspondrait à -X propulseurs, alors que le PAD indique +X. Voulez-vous que je ramène cette valeur à zéro ou préfér
11号，
O
Вы опустили выключатель — внутри... функция автоматич
鹰，休斯顿。初始化看起来没问题。
Non credo, Joe, per ora. Dovremo guardare quelle linee temporali e 
J'ai une q
खैर, उन्होंने कहा कि एमएससी-1 प्राप्त करने के लिए उन्हें एसीक्यू एड बीकन को 5 मिनट के लिए बंद करना होगा। मतलब, आप कुछ देर के लिए
熱帯
Okay. We're thinking about rigging up the urine dump to the side hatch. We're thinking about rigging up the urine dump to the side hatch and save urine h
이제 X와 Y를 표시
يبدو أنني أتحسن. ما أتعامل معه هو هذه العناصر الثلاثة فقط، لكنني أقترب منها في كل مرة أحاو
Нет, я не видела площадку для подготовки. Было слишком туманно, но мы все равно видели ее на несколько миль
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन, यह कानो कॉम टेक है, यूएचएफ/एचएफ पर प्रसारित हो रहा है। क्या आप सुन रहे हैं? ओ
알겠습니다. 다시 03,33649; 04,64690; 65
هل أنت متأكد من أنك التقطت الصور بالزو
Гас, насчет этого — что записано на диктофоне
Vorre
Hier ist eine interessante kleine Neuigkeit, die man eigentlich ganz gut hören sollte. In Ann Arbor, Michigan, gibt es anscheinend eine neue Jugendgang. Sie nennt sich Gilnet Gang. Sie zieht durch die Straßen von Ann Arbor, agiert im Verborgenen und umgeht dabei manchmal das Gesetz. Sie nennen sich selbst die „Guerillas für das Gute“. Zu ihren Aktionen gehörte unter anderem, eine mit Obszönitäten beschmierte Brücke übermalt zu haben. Sie strichen sie in einer Nacht. Ein baufälliges Haus – beliebt bei den Kindern aus der Nachbarschaft, aber gefährlich – wurde verbarrikadiert. Blumenkästen in der Innenstadt, die leer standen, weil es Streit darüber gab, wer dafür verantwortlich war – die Wirtschaft oder die Regierung –, wurden mit Blumen bepflanzt. Eine Hecke an einer vielbefahrenen Kreuzung, die die Sicht behinderte, wurde gestutzt, was den Besitzer verärgerte. Müll entlang eines Abschnitts des Huron River wurde aufgesammelt. Die Mitglieder der Gang sind anonyme Teenager, die keine persönliche Anerkennung wünschen. Ihr Ziel ist es, bürokratische Hürden zu überwinden und Dinge – in ihren Augen Gutes – zu bewirken. Die Organisation hat einen leicht religiösen Beigeschmack. „Es ist eine Art ökumenische Gruppe“, sagte ein Assistenzprofessor der Universität Michigan, der als informeller Ansprechpartner für die Ideen der Gruppe fungiert. Der Name leitet sich von St. Peter, dem Fischernetz, ab. Und er ist so weit von einer bestimmten Kirche entfernt, dass er nicht da
ودعا الله النور نهارًا، والظلمة دعاها ليلًا. وكان مساء وكان صباح يومًا واحدًا. وقال الله: «ليكن فلك في وسط المياه، وليكن فاصلًا بين المياه والمياه». فصنع الله الفلك، وفصل بين المياه التي تح
Sì. Abbiamo deciso di usare un contenitore e, come sapete, l'indumento raffreddato a liquido è circondato da una sacca che pensiamo di poter usare anche noi, o che sappiamo di poter usare. Ci abbiamo provato. Quindi quello che abbiamo è una sacca dentro un'altra sacca e al suo interno c'è l'indumento raffreddato a liquido. La sacca più vicina all'indumento raffreddato a liquido è quella che ci ser
١١، هذه هيوستن. ٥ SPS/G&N: ٣٧٢٠١، ناقص ٠٦٠، زائد ٠٤٧؛ TIG
D'accor
سيجما 7 على التردد العال
로저. 저는 자동 모드로 도킹했는데, 말씀드렸다시피 접촉 순간을 정확히 기억하지 못했습니다. 도킹 프로브 표시기를 계속 확인했죠. 세 개의 캡처 래치, 아니, 그냥 세 개의 래치가 제대로 걸렸다는 
रॉजर। ठीक है, केबिन का दबाव अभी भी 5.5 पर बना हुआ है। जब से हम निकले हैं, तब से यही बना हुआ है।
जेमिनी 
أقترح أن نمضي قدمًا أثناء قيامك بذلك، ونجري تعديلًا هنا؛ وندعه يعمل تلقائيًا ونضبط هذا. اضطر جيم إلى استخدام نجمي ريجل وسيريوس، وهما متقاربان جدًا. وعلى الرغم من أننا حصلنا على فرق صفري في زاوية النجم، فقد لا يكون من السيئ ت
シグマセブン、シグ
ОТМЕТЬТЕ эт
Oh, you can use your judgment on that, Jack. We'd like at least one, and the recommendation that I got was to put them both up i
Ora avvio il cronometro G.m.t. seguendo il tuo trucco. Ne ho già fatto circa metà. Accendo le batterie principali. Verifico che i
Ich verstehe euch laut und deutl
Der Kabinendruck beträgt 5,7
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam 
य
Okay. Ich gebe Ihnen jetzt die offenen Bereiche durch. Wir möchten, dass FLÜSSIGKEIT, HAUPTFLÜSSIGKEIT A, HAUPTFLÜSSIGKEIT B und FLIGHT/POSTLANDING geschlos
لقد أصبحنا جيدين 
Roger. Ich bin mir nicht ganz sicher, 
好的。也没什么特别的。嗯，我们先从体育说起吧，管它呢。太空人队以8比7险胜，勇士队在第九局得了五六分，但他们最终还是赢了；当天另一场重要的比赛，小熊队因为下雨取消了。其他比赛的比分我都有，你要哪一场可以告诉我。马尼拉和吕宋岛其他地区发生了地震。发生了三次震动，建筑物摇晃了大约半个小时，震级大约是里氏5级。好的，我们来看看。披头士乐队宣布他们将不再以乐队形式演出。据报道，这支四人乐队在短暂的音乐生涯中赚了超过5亿美元。然而，关于他
好了，
हां। मुझे नहीं पता कि यह कंपन है या कु
D'accord. C'est la configuration souhaitée, et voici notre explication. Lorsque nous avons configuré le réservoir 1 en mode AUTO et le réservoir 2 en mode OFF, nous avons constaté que la pression du réservoir 1 pendant le cycle de chauffage était d'environ 233 psi, ce qui est largement supérieur au seuil d'alerte. En conservant cette configuration pour la nuit, nous éviterons l'allumage des voyants d'alert
여기는 프렌
Apollo 11 erhält die erste Ansicht des Landeanflugs. Diesmal fliegen wir über den Taruntius-Krater, und die von Apollo 8 und 10 mi
여기는 HF 통신 중인 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 제 상태는 최상입
Negative, Bruce. Just give me the latitude and longitude over 2, altitude, and the grid squares. Never mind the other. You're broken
奥德赛，休
了解しました。最後の予定活動を開始されたようですね。初期
T
노출값을 측정해 보니 64 ASA에서 13이 나왔네요. 아주 좋습니다. 상당히 밝
C'est exact, c'est exact, c'est exact. 2500 en A – un peu moins de 2500. B 
रॉजर, गुआयमास। हमारे पास अभी भी बूस्टर है। हम इससे काफी दूर आ चुके हैं, और इसमें अनुमान से थोड़ा ज्यादा ईंधन लग रहा है। अभी हमारे पास आगे और पीछे की दिशा में 61, बाईं ओर 37 और ऊपर की ओर 36 है। फिलहाल हम किसी तरह इसे संभाल पा रहे हैं। बेशक, जैसे-जैसे हम आगे बढ़ेंगे, हमें और बेहतर होना चाहि
أبولو 8،
Sono sufficienti queste posizioni diverse o
Sì. Sì, e mentre le stelle vi scorrono attraverso, si occultano un po'; poi emergono nella parte sinistra e si possono effettivamente vedere uscire completamente quando colpiscono il vero orizzonte 
3시간 48분 51초가 지난 지금, 저는 시원한 물을 벌컥벌컥 마시고 있습니다. 이번엔 정말 시원하네요. 다리도 살짝 쭉 펴봤습니다. 꽤 어둡네요. 저는 지금 표류 비행 중입니다. 아, 정말! 다리를 쭉 
Okay. Mike, was passiert ist – du saßest da und hast alles überwacht, und in Schritt 7 bist du zu NOUN 01 gegangen, hast die Adresse eingegeben und dann INFORMATION INFORMATION; und mit dem letzten ENTER-Klick auf 35400 ENTER, direkt danach, wurdest du wieder in Schritt 16 zurückgesetzt. Als du dann ENTER gedrückt hast, hast du die Informationen tatsächlich in die CDU eingegeben; und als du die beiden Einträge in Register 1 und 2 hattest, gab es eine sofortige Änderung in der CDU, und das System hat das überprüft und gesehen, was es da gemessen hat. Mein Gott, ich habe eine Temp
نعم، أتفق
Non. Non. Elle est apparue juste au-dessus de l'horizon, à travers la couche de lueur atmosphérique. De la première fois où je l'ai aperçue jusqu'à ce qu'elle atteigne ce que je considè
了解しました。そ
로저. T가 있어요. 로저. TV가 있어요..
क्या आपको यह कहीं चाहिए
Звезда 37 отлично подойдет для калибровки оптики. 
そうだね、ロジャー。閉じたままにしておく
حسنًا. ظهرك ملاصق للحقيبة. ممتاز. الآن هي فوقها. للأمام وللأعلى؛ الآن أنت حر. قليلًا نحوي. مباشرةً للأسفل، قليلًا إلى يسارك. مساحة واسعة. نيل،
Roger. Non riceviamo i dati di telemetria da te a causa della bassa potenza del segnale. Eccoli. Prevedo che ci vorranno dai 15 minuti a mezz'ora per vedere un aumento del flusso di O2, a causa delle dimensioni della c
휴
Bene. Sempre a pagina E-9 e al punto 39, in fondo al controllo del circuito pirotecnico, c'è un passaggio che dice pannello 8, tutti gli interruttori automatici CHIUSI t
Roger. Apollo 8, Houston. Your map update for 4/5:, sunrise, prime mer
باتجاه عق
방금 전까지 B-2 고도에 있었습니다. 이제 B-3 고도에 접근 중입니다. 이때 기체를 약 10도 정도 아래로 내리겠습
Ich würde sagen, ich war ziemlich gut ausgerichtet, 
では、確認してみましょう。「燃焼時間マイナス1秒でシャットダウン」の次の行を削ります。「姿勢
Хорошо, вопрос звучит так: «На линии только о
Roger. Nous vérifiions les horaires précis de début et de fin 
ठीक है; यह सब सही है। क्या यह पढ़ने की गति आपके लिए ठ
Beh, da qui in poi la sensazione è stata
Immagino che il momento migliore sia quando mostriam
الطريقة التي سنفعل بها ذلك 
Houston, Eagle. Gangverlängerung abgeschlossen
Okay, Jim.
저기, 마지막
Индийская команда по разведке местности. Проверьте, 
D'accord. Au niveau du cran de gauche, je vois le radar de rendez-vous (AO), puis je passe au cran avant et c'est tout. Je suis fa
Roger, Houst
Columbia, Houston. Ho sentito che hai parlato con Eagle? Immagino che ora tu abbia una comunicazione con
Okay. Sehr gut. 
حسنًا. الوقت هو - سيكون الحدث في؛ وعلينا المناورة للوصول إلى الوضعية التالية: دوران 101.0، ميل 90.0، انحراف صفري. ستكون زوايا الكسب العالي هي ميل ناقص 23، انحراف 93. وعلينا استخدام الإجراءات العادية لتخميد المعدلات. وبعد تخميد المعدلات وقبل بدء الدوران، علينا وضع السدس على جهاز السدس مع مخزن G، فيلم أبيض وأسود عالي السرعة جدًا. ثم، علينا التقاط ثلاث صور، واحدة لكل من أوقات التعريض 5 و20 و60 ثانية باستخدام البصريات الصوتية - التلقائية. قيمنا R1 زائد 34717، R2 ناقص 08028،
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, this is 
2+40 是 OAMS Retro
Okay. Lass sie nicht zu lange war
Foto del terreno molto interessanti. Ne scatterò una dell'orizzonte solo per i posteri. All'epoca, quella foto era A numero 12,
Okay. Auf unserem Monit
Pouvez-vous m'expl
- 
Роджер. Жду отве
알았다. 027 44 5363, 마이너스 165 073 14 037 44 8016, 마이너스 165 072 46 046 44 6141, 마이너스 165 097 03 055 44 8209, 마이너스 165 096 
おそらく、私が OMNI を
Das ist in Ordnung mit den Kardanaufhängungen, Fred. Sonst nichts auf Seite 14. Weiter auf Seite 15. Unter „PRÜFUNG“ möchten wir die Formulierung streichen und stattdessen schreiben: „Überprüfen Sie die folgenden Schalter: FÜHRUNGSSTEUERUNG;“ Schritt 3 – Korrektur – es ist Zeile 3. Änd
ठीक 
Negative. We Would like to stay on the high gai
Sappiamo che ci sono molti scienziati provenienti da diversi paesi che aspettano di vedere i campioni lunari, e abbiamo pensato che vi sarebbe piaciuto vederli così come sono realmente qui. Queste due scatole sono i contenitori per la restituzione dei campioni. Sono contenitori sottovuoto che sono stati chiusi sulla superficie lunare, sigillati e poi portati dentro e inseriti in questi sacchetti i
Ich habe über UHF geantwortet, aber keine Ant
रॉजर, संदेश इस प्रकार है: ईंधन 90-100 [प्रतिशत], ऑक्सीजन 73-100 [प्रतिशत], एम्प्स 22, केबिन 
하와이 통신 기술국입니다. 여기는 시그마 세븐입니
로저. 하와이에서 가시선 확보 당시 연료 소모량에 대한 업데이트를 보
好的，弗雷德。我们明白了，关
ه
Hey Jim. Wie sc
That's verified. We have a
わかった、ケン。分かった。もしCOMMが失われるなら、7を消費する必要はない。君が教えてくれ
Apollo 11, this is Houston. We are receiving your FM downlink now. We are sta
Р
Aquarius, Houston. La liaison montante est terminée. L'ordinateur est à vous. Nous allons couper l'alimentati
ठीक है, मैंने
ك
On a vraiment l'impression de regarder très haut dans cette position, et s'il n'y a pas d'horizon, le ciel est tout simplement noir. La luminosité dans le cockpit est assez forte. On s'y habitue vite et on peut bien sûr la réduire grâce à l'éclairage cabine. Pour l'instant, j'hésite un peu à baisser l'éclairage à cause du problème avec le circuit de ma combinaison. J'utilise beaucoup mes lampes de poche. Il semblerait que pour les prochains vols, nous devions prévoir un système de rangement pour les objets, afin de les y maintenir en sécurité pendant un certain temps. Je m'attaque au problème de la rondelle et du petit morceau de métal serti. Je crois que j'ai enfin réussi à les ranger dans le petit sac sur la trappe. La température de ma combinaison se maintient. J'ai chaud et je devrai probablement baisser le réglage. Je ne comprends vraiment pas pourquoi le circuit de ma combinaison met autant de temps à réagir. Mon cir
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。你可以这样
是啊，我想我最好把那个口袋——还有钱包——都拿走。这样吧，
Oh, I 
Roger, Houston. Eagle has checked out both 70 millimeter cameras and both 16 millimeter cameras
Gemi
Négatif, négatif. Ils sont très lents; ils ne s'éloignent pas de moi à 
Okay. Feld 162, ke
What are you going to do with your sleeves, Ed? You still want t
Apollo 11, Ap
Okay, Wassermann. Im nächsten Schritt nimmst du den aufgeschnittenen Innenbeutel und stülpst ihn über den Kanister. Achte dabei darauf, dass die Ecken des Beutels – also die Laschen – an der geschlossenen Seite nach außen zeigen und an den offenen End
जी हां, जिम। यही वो है जो हमने 
नहीं, मुझे पहले तुम्हारे लिए अपना रवैया सुधारना होग
了解しました、フレッド。マスターアラームのブレーカーを押し込んで、音声と映像が使えるようにすることをお勧めします。それから、医療従事者もここに来て疎外感を感じているので、BIOMED…の位置を教えていただけますか？もし接続してい
Ok. Abbiamo acceso
3つのクレーター。現在視界に入っている3つの水平クレーターは、地上の軌跡のすぐ下にあります。右側に見える
アポロ11号が着陸進入路を初めて撮影しました。今回はタルンティウス・ク
في غضون قدم و
Roger. Wir möchte
مفهوم. سنقوم بتغيير الفلتر قريبًا، وسخان خط التنقية يعمل الآن، وسيتم تنقية الأكسجين والهيدروجين قريبًا، وعند الساعة 148 سنبدأ شحن البطارية A حتى تُبلغنا با
विश्व और राष्ट्रीय समाचारों और विशेष लेखों के संदर्भ में बस इतना ही। खेल पृष्ठ पर, कंसास सिटी चीफ्स के हैंक स्ट्रैम को एएफएल कोच ऑफ द ईयर चुना गया। तीन सीज़न में यह उनका दूसरा पुरस्कार है। मतदान एसोसिएटेड प्रेस के 30 खेल लेखकों और कमेंटेटरों के एक पैनल द्वारा किया गया, जिसमें प्रत्येक शहर से तीन-तीन सदस्य शामिल थे। उनके सबसे करीबी वोटर वीब इवबैंक को मिले। अन्य कोच जिन्हें वोट मिले उनमें सैन डिएगो के सिड गिलमैन और डेनवर के लू सबिन शामिल थे। कल के श्राइनर्स कॉलेज ऑल स्टार गेम की बात करें 
そこで注意の配列を拾うことがで
क्या आप गर्म 
Okay. We recommend stopping at of 54 45 00, and this should put you at just about the right roll angle. The attitude we recommend is roll 263, pitch 090, yaw 000. This gives you the Earth out of window number 1 in the command module and places the high gain antenna in the window for TV at your convenience. You will also have the Sun shining in - or shining at the hatch on the, and if you take down
R
Okay. Lass uns das kurz besprechen, und wir sagen dir dann, 
अब हम प्रतिगामी दिशा दर्शा रहे हैं। हम इसके 
好的
我们也一直在观察这个问题。不知为何，它的俯仰角总是偏离正常值，偏航角
Мы получи
아
Vous ne pourriez pas ressentir les mêmes sensations fortes là-bas que nous ic
Итак, «Аполлон-8». 
जिम, क्या हम आपके लिए कुछ और कर सकते हैं, य
マイクさん、CDR の測定値は 4、
Questa volta l'ho avvistato. È proprio sotto di me, a circa 400 o 500 piedi. Ora 
انتظر. جاك
N
Ok. Per quanto riguarda la rotta intermedia, credo che sia general
जिम, अभी जो तुम्हारे प
روجر. نرى الشمس تشرق من خلاله خلفه وترسم خط الاستواء - التصحيح، ومستوى مسار الشمس، والنجوم الت
А как насчет того, чтобы выб
Okay. Wir bleiben einfach da
Ok, attiva l'evaporatore primario. Per tutto questo 
了解しました。バッテリー電圧の
ジェミニ4、ヒ
Fo
とても曇ってい
حسنًا. دعني أشاركك ملاحظاتي حول ناقل التيار الرئيسي B. حدثت الأمور بسرعة كبيرة هناك، وسمعنا أولًا صوت الاصطدام أو الانفجار أو أيًا كان السبب، لست متأكدًا. بعد ذلك - حوالي ثانية واحدة - انطلق إنذار رئيسي يشير إلى انخفاض جهد ناقل التيار الرئيسي B. نظرت إلى الجهد، وكان جيدًا في ذلك الوقت، لذا أظن أنه كان ارتفاعًا مفاجئًا. كانت خلية الوقود 3 جيدة أيضًا، مع تدفق جيد. مع ذلك، في تلك اللحظة، كان فريد يد
收到。21
よし、バズ。フライバイが目的だ。SPS/G&N：62815、プラス097、マイナス020 070 54 5944、マイナス00028、プラス00023、プラス00069 029 149 312、遠地点はNA、プラス00221 00078 001 00034、六分儀星は01 2385 227、照準星はNA NA NA。緯度はマイナス0265、マイナス16500、11899 36228、144 56 47。コメント欄に：設定した星はデネブと
D'accord, Jim. Nous avons évoqué la possibilité d'adopter une attitude différente de celle du pas de tir pour une meilleure visibilité du champ stellaire depuis le module de commande. Voici ce que nous aimerions que vous fassiez: si vous pouvez prédire, maintenant ou prochainement, l'attitude que vous souhaitez maintenir, et que vous vous y mettez dès maintenant, nous pourrons calculer les angles de cardan de l'alignement grossier. Pour cela, il vous suffit de vous positionner dans l'attitude choisie, de la maintenir, d'afficher une commande et de nous communiquer 
好的，老鹰队以3比2赢得了少年组联赛的冠军。他们击败
रॉजर। बस 1 स
Houston, Columbia. I'm coming up on my time for the first pass when I may be ab
收到。扫描仪已
ج
Ich frage mich, ob Neil irgendwelche Vorbereitungen
Хорошо. Я просто сделаю здесь пометку, и м
نعم، أعتق
네, 맞습니다. 일단 정렬이 완료되고 시간 조정이 끝나면, 여기 계신 분들이 서비스 모듈 분리 자세와 사령선 모듈 정렬 자세에 대한 8볼 자세 데이터를 제공해 주실 수 있을 겁니다. 사령선 모듈 정렬은 달/태양과 같은 형태의 정렬 방식입니다. 이 8볼
Джим, на сегодня прошу тебя отключить квадрокоптеры C 
That's correct, Fred. We don't have procedures for that yet, and we don't have any real expectation of 
حسناً.
حسناً. ساع
回溯延迟
Хо
달 궤도 잠자기; (기침) S-밴드
Роджер. Мы приближаемся к ускорителю, и вы видите,
你说得对。它之前不在主设置里，而是关掉了。现在已经打开了。
Okay. 30 se
Warum setzt du ihm nicht die Kopfhörer auf
Très bien. Il y a probablement quelques centimètres de sac qui dépassent au fond du récipient. Pour éviter que cela ne se colle à la grille du fond, nous vous demandons de couper l'excédent avec des ciseaux. Ensuite, découpez deux autres bandes de ruban adhésif d'environ 30 cm de long, puis déchirez-les dans le sens de la longueur pour obtenir quatre morceaux de 30 cm de long et 1,25 cm de large. Utilisez ensuite ces
Eagle, this is Houston. Are you call
0.01，我的天
D'accord. Je suggère soit 
分かりました。ページの真ん中あたりにある「CMS 姿勢制御再開」というブロックを消します。次の行も消します。「PRO VE
Ja. Sind Sie b
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。看来B电池的充电可能还需要6个小时。充电速率比我们地面观测曲线显示的要低，但仍高于阿波罗7号的曲线，目前看来充电状态良好。我想请您确认一下，从您的角度来看，
이 기체의 작동이 매우 불안정했습
分かりました。ジム、2つの最新情報があります。1つは、ベネット彗星を約1000kmで探査する手順についてです。ジャックが起きてから詳細を伝えます。もう1つは、3時間早く進入することについてです。昨夜、ヴァンスがあなたにその可能性について話していたと思いま
Roger, Houston. Colombie… J’ai gardé les yeux rivés sur le sextant à ce moment-là, espérant apercevoir un reflet, mais je
罗杰。2+40。16 56 01。2
제 시야각은 현재 세 축 모두 거의 0에 
分かりました。読み上げは順調です。ページを下へ進みます。「バランスカップル」スイッチ、「バランスカップルオフ」。さて、マイナス2分の前の最後の行まで進みます。「コマンダースロットル、最小；LMPをジェットに」。マイナス2分で、「400プラス1」を消します。マイナス1分で、「マスターアーム、オン」。マイナス10秒で、「手動アレージ」を消します。プラス5秒で、「降下エンジンコマンドオ
알겠습니다. OMNI Delta 모드와 MANUAL 모드를 고이득에서 -60에서 +90으로 설정하라는 말씀이시죠?
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप पृथ्वी को 
Oui. Je pense que le problème vient du fait que je mesure environ 60 cm et que la hauteur 
Gemini VI
س أ
Gemini 4, I'm reading you weak. I have a new 6-4 without OAMS update for you. It's 01 days, 00 09 30, 8+1
Roger, Seven, ti capisco. L'unico problema è che potresti non avere abbastanza tempo di illuminazione prima del t
Хьюстон, Игл. Вам потребуется вы
フレッド、焼き込みが終わったら、電源を切る手順やチェックリストの変更内容をお伝えします。同時に、消耗品の状態もお
अ
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон.
そこの次の小さな尾根の頂上
좋아요, 프레드. 합리적인 의사소통이 이루어졌네요. 다음 단계
谢谢
Houston, base Tranquility. Prêt
Avant de remettre cette machine en marche, il vaudrait mieux qu'ils t
C'est... c'est comme ça que je l'ai in
Sono abbastanza sicuro di sì, perché me ne sarei accorto piuttosto rapidamente. Finora ho fatto un'unica grande applicazione di spinta durante il volo, passando dal controllo manuale
حسنًا. لا أحد منا، على حد علمي، تناول أي أدوية، وفي الوقت الحالي، فيما يتعلق بالراحة، أعتقد أننا لسن
约翰，你注意到海岸线有什
Tutti i retro hanno sparato in automatico.
نعم. توضع أسفل الكمبيوتر، وكلما زاد وزن الأشياء الموجودة هناك، زادت نسبة الحمل إلى العمق (L/D). ليس لدينا أي أجهزة تخزين، لذا كنت أتساءل عن الأشياء الثقيلة التي يمكننا وضعها هناك - ربما يمكننا وضع بعض الكاميرات، كاميرات التلفزيون، وما شابهها من الأشياء الت
L'oxygénation à haut débit a duré environ deux minutes pour faire baisser la pression. Elle est mainte
He's off t
Qual è
Okay. In answer to the battery-charging questions, I calculate it should be fully charged at
E, 11, Houston. Per tua i
Bene. Ora ho un bel po' di informazioni da darvi. Vorremmo che il pilota, che sta dormendo, tenesse la visiera aperta e i guanti tolti. E poi vorremmo che il pilota sveglio si togliesse casco e guanti e utilizzasse le cuffie leggere per le comunicazioni, se possibile. E vorremmo che continuaste in questo modo fino a circa 3 ore prima del retrofire. Poi, una volta in orbita, quando vi è più comodo, vorremmo che effettuaste una lettura a bulbo umido e a bulbo secco e, in qualsiasi stazione, ci forniste un rapporto di cosa avete fatto e a che ora l'avet
Да, похоже. Нет, я имею в виду 
Houston, Eagle... hoher Gewinn.
세계 및 국내 뉴스, 그리고 특집 기사는 여기까지입니다. 스포츠면에서는 캔자스시티 치프스의 행크 스트램 감독이 AFL 올해의 감독으로 선정되었습니다. 3시즌 만에 두 번째 수상입니다. 투표는 AP 통신 소속 
了解しました
Il nous reste 13 degrés à gauche de la balle, et je pense que c'est à peu près correct. En regardant l'ombre, etc., on est probablement à environ 13 degrés à gauche 
저는 이걸 전부 여기에
जेरी, एक 
ケ
Was du siehst, Mike, ist – Houston, was du siehst, ist die westliche Hemisphäre. Ganz oben ist der Nordpol; in der Mitte – etwas tiefer – Südamerika – bis hinunter zum Kap Hoorn. Ich kann Baja California und den Südwesten der Vereinigten Staaten sehen. Eine große, langgestreckte Wolkenbank zieht nach Nordosten, bedeckt weite Teile des Golfs von Mexiko und reicht bis in den Osten der Vereinigten Staaten. Da die Ostküste nun bewölkt ist, kann ich Wolken über Teilen Mexikos sehen; Teile Mittelamerikas sind klar. Und wir können auch die weißen, hellen Flecken des 
आप किस विंडो से काम करना चाहते हैं, ताकि मैं मॉ
Okay. And we'll get busy getting those pads f
Hier ist Friendship Seven. Ich habe die Kapsel nur kurz vom automatischen Gieren abgeschaltet, um nach links zu fliegen und 
Хорошо. Вот процедура зарядки аккумулятора Baker. Панель 3; ЗАРЯДКА АККУМУЛЯТОРА, ВЫКЛ.; панель 5; ГЛАВНАЯ ШИНА, АККУМУЛЯТОР A/C к A/C; CB ЗАРЯДНОЕ УСТРОЙСТВО АККУМУЛЯТОРА, ЗАРЯДКА АККУМУЛЯТОРА A, разомкнуто; CB ЗАРЯДНОЕ УСТРОЙСТВО АККУМУЛЯТОРА, ЗАРЯДКА АККУМУЛЯТОРА B, замкнуто. Панель 250; CB ВВОД 
13, Хь
わかりまし
Sì. Questa sa
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। लगता है अब आप अपने क्रायो फैन बंद कर सकते हैं, और हम आपको कुछ देर के लिए अकेला छोड़ रहे हैं ताकि आप अपना काम पूरा कर सकें। हाई-गेन एंटीना चेक और COMM मोड चेक, जो आपने बताए हैं, उन्हें हम अभी रोक रहे हैं और जब आप तैयार होंगे तब
- -... Questo è quello che... 0,5, giusto? È... Mike, hai digitato u
月は6度、プラ
Роджер, 11. Что касается вашего вопроса о зарядке аккумулятора, мы считаем, что это, вероятно, разница между отдельными батареями; и, похоже, здесь это исчезло как своего рода пере
Ora mi sento abbastanza riposato, anche se non sono riuscito a dormire bene. Ho fatto due pasti. Ho fatto colazione sub
Okay. Stay rig
그럼
Notr
Хорошо. Понимаю, продувка завершена. Спасибо. Что касается вашей криогенной установки, похоже, в каждом кислородном баке будет по 180 ф
Roger, Apollo 11. Abbiamo un laser che... È un laser blu-verde che faremo lampeggiare a una frequenza di accensione per un secondo, spegnimento per un secondo. Proviene dall'Osservatorio McDonald vicino a El Paso, che dovrebbe essere proprio sul terminatore, o proprio all'interno del terminatore. Lo attiveremo tra poco. Potresti dare un'occhiata al telescopio e v
Okay. Ist es wirklich klar, dass Sie die Kaltwasserbehan
Okay. We have three cameras here, two of them to be used for picture taking from the, one to be used from the number 5 window of the. First, I'll hit the cameras. And this camera that I mention now has first priority. It's considered the one 
روجر. تم الاستلام. تحويل الدفع - أربعة محركات نفاثة - زوج التوازن - تشغيل. الخانق - الحد الأدنى. الخانق - ضبط تلقائي. زر المروحة
جيميني 6، هيوستن. هل كنت تنسخ إجابات جيميني 
D'accord, Vance. J'ai mis BAT Baker en charge; je ne pense pas que la charge soit encore stabilisée. Elle affichait 1,1 ampères et 39,6 
...tutto 
Роджер, понятно, с 18 до 22 часов. Во время полета Rev 12 над RKV я получу обновленную информацию о PLA и CLA. Во время полета Rev 13 над Canary будет указан маршрут в C-диапазоне. В 12:16 по Гринвичу я смогу выполнить орбитальную навигацию, если это не потребуе
当然だ。キャビン温度は92度。スーツ温度は58度。キャビン気圧は5.6。スーツCO2濃度は3/4。左のボトルは5100。右のボトルは5050。酸素量62。圧力は840。ソース温度は55度。ソース圧力は2000
ठीक है। दो ज़रूरी बातें: पहली, यह सुझाव दिया गया है कि मारेज़िन को असर दिखाने में कुछ समय लगता है, इसलिए आप विचार कर सकते हैं कि क्या आप अभी इसका सेवन करना चाहेंगे। और मेरे पास एक पोस्ट है जिसमें कुछ छोटे-मोटे अपडेट हैं, अगर आप चाहें तो उसे 
That is about it as far as the world and national news and the features is concerned. On the sport page, Hank Stram of the Kansas City Chiefs was named as the AFL coach of the year. This is the second time for him in three seasons. The voting was done by an Associated Press panel of 30 sports writers and sportscasters, three from each city. The nearest one to him was Weeb Ewbank. Other coach's that received votes were Sid Gilman of San Diego, and Lou Sabin of Denver. As for the Shriners College All Star game yesterday, the North cooled the South 3 to 0. Michigan State's Dick Berlinsky booted a 23 yard field goal in the first quarter and it was all the North needed to beat the South Wednesday, in the Shrine's College All Star football game.
Ge
जी हाँ। यह 
... لقد بدأت الأرض بالظهور بالفعل؛
Sono pronto per loro, 
Loud a
分かりました。それはいいですね
À la pointe de l'Amérique du Sud, il y a un grand tourbillon de nuages ​
쌍둥이자리이신 외과의사 선생님. 혈압은 정상입니다
Хорошо. Вэнс, будет ли лучше написать это на чистом листе
Roger. L'image était bien plus nette au sextant qu'au monoculaire, et on distinguait nettement une seule cellule à un stade avancé de développement. Elle a dû monter à plus de 15 000 mètres. La Méditerranée orientale est d'une clarté exceptionnelle. On voit tous les lacs; la mer Morte se déta
워싱턴발 메시지: "이번 크리스마스에 세상은 평화의 희망으로 밝아졌습니다. 그 희망이 현실이 되고 총성이 다시 멈추는 그 순간은 바로 여러분이 용기와 능력을 발휘하여 평화를 
では、ASCENT BATS をオンにします。バッテリー 
알겠습니다, 밴스. 비상 계획서에 있는 준비 단계를 대략 이쯤에서 시작해야 한다는 말씀이시죠? 짐과 잠시 상의해보고 다시 알려드리겠습니다. 연소 자세에서는 태양이 바로 맨 위쪽에 보여야 하는데, 아마 2번 디텐트일 겁니다. 짐과 저는 이미 그 부분에 대해 이야기했고, 지구의 명암 경계선을 육안으로 봤을 때 태양이 약 70도에서 65도 정도의 각도로 보인다고 예상했으니, 딱 그쯤에 있을 겁니다. 연소 규칙 중 하나는 각도 변화가 초당 10도 이상이면 엔진을 정지해
Attitude okay. Pitching back down to reentry attitude, correction retroattitude. No reason to stay at reentry attitude. No reason to stay at reentry attitude, when we can see so well in retroattitude. And this is truly the attitude we need to fly. Coming up on retroattitude. Roll checks out. Yaw checks out. Reentry attitude is on select. Stopping pitch shortly. (Pitc
Роджер. Версия 55, и № 1, время начала 05:48:55, и прои
حسنًا. الآن، إذا اجتزنا هذا الفحص، يمكنك إنهاء المهمة هنا، وسنعطيك إشارة للانتقال إلى وضعية الاحتراق، ومن ثمّ يمكننا إجراء فحص النجوم. إذا لم تجتز الفحص، فنريدك أن تُجري محاذاةً بعد 75 ساعة. وإذا كنتَ مست
All batteries are reading about 23½ (volts) or higher, ammeter is just about steady at 20 amps. Wanted to check before we power down, is 115 (volts). Fans is about 115 (volts), standby 0 (volts). Okay, the cockpit is clean. It's obvious that that damn antenna situation is no good. Just brought HF back in bicone
分かりました。宇宙服の中に水が入っていることに初めて気づいた時のことを、任
Автоматическое реверсирование; автоматическое убирание прицела; переключатель маневров выключен; рычаг перископа поднят; высокая мощность УВЧ; передача в режиме УВЧ; непрерывный сигнал маяка; питание VOX включено для передачи и записи; все батареи проверены. Вы принима
Cela fait 2, Bravo lit - oh, environ 0,
밸브 소리가 들리세
Roger, et Retropack a
Okay. Alles bestens. Und wir haben jetzt – es w
Die Kryo-Fans sind AUS und ha
Continuously increasing in a left roll
Ja, ich habe eine D
Я прочту это, когда вы будете готов
في جهاز Gemini 4، يمكنك إيقاف تشغيل المبرد، أو بالأحرى المضخة الثانوية. ال
D'accord. C'était un contrôle Terre/Solei
Apollo 8, Houston. Te
А еще Бутхилл, остров Дьюк, Сидвайндер, если посмотреть на Маскелайн W, это контрольная точка поворота, и мы как раз приближаемся к терминатору. На терминаторе все пепельно-серое. По мере удаления от терминатора цвет ст
È molto facile da individuare. Da qui si possono vedere tutti i bordi dei crateri, con, ovviamente, la mezzaluna bianca sul lato opposto, dove splende il sole. Le
Okay. One of the first things we want to do is charge the battery in, so we can get some power over there to do that, and we have procedures ginned up to do it. In regards to reentry, we're planning our last midcourse at 5 hours before entry interface, and, if we have to make one, that is. And then we'd like to jettison the service module at 4 hours and a half, roughly, before entry interface, and take the next 3 to 3-1/2 hours for taking pictures, cranking up the command module G&N, taking care of stowage, and other odds and ends. And we'd hang on to the until 1 hour before entry interface, and then we'd jettison that. And these procedures are going to be run integrated in the CMS a
حسنًا. ملاحظة أخيرة بخصوص الماء يا جاك. إذا لم تُفرّغ الضغط تمامًا عند سحب كمية كافية من الماء، فسيتسرب الضغط المتبقي خلال ساعة إلى ثلاث ساعات. صحيح أنه كمية قليلة من الأكسجين، لكن من الأفضل الاحتفاظ بها. لذا
कोलंबिया। यह ह्यूस्टन ह
Gemini VII, this is Gemini VI. We have an object, looks like a satellite going from north to south, probably in a polar orbit. He's in a very low trajectory traveling from north to south and has a very high climbing ratio. It looks like it might even be a... Very low. Looks like he might be going to reenter soon. Stand by one... Yo
알겠습니다. 이제 이해했어요, 
Хорошо. Мы поняли. Насколько открытым вы хотите сделать этот клапан прямого подачи кислорода в данный момент? Я так понимаю, вы
Va bene. Va bene. Penso... che dovremmo tornare alle procedure origina
نعم، لقد انتهينا من ذلك الآن
Jim, ici CAP COM. Tu pourrais aussi dire au pilote
बूथिल, ड्यूक द्वीप, साइडविंडर, मास्केलाइन डब्ल्यू को देखते हुए, यह यॉ राउंड चेकपॉइंट है, और टर्मिनेटर की ओर बढ़ते हुए। टर्मिनेटर पर आसमान राख जैसा और धूसर है। जैसे-जैसे आप टर्मिनेटर से दूर जाते हैं, रंग हल्का धूसर होता जाता है, और जैसे-जैसे आप उप-सौर बिंदु के करीब पहुंचते हैं, अपोलो 11 के अंतिम अवलोकन के अनुसार, जमीन पर भूर
わかりました。大丈夫です。225番の、もし手が届くなら、バズ、下から2
Non lo so. Sono uscito di sopra, ora sono giù, Jack. Immagino che quando Jack salirà potrà dare un
अब अनडॉक एटीट्यूड और एसईपी एटीट्यूड एक समान होने चाहिए, इसलिए मैं अपडेटेड सेपरेशन-बर्न एटीट्यूड के लिए दिए गए निर्देश का उपयोग करूंगा। यह लगभग 7 डिग
GIER 
Guaymas Cap
Roger, Fred-o. Maintenant, nous n'y sommes plus. De plus, à moins 30 secondes, nous ne constatons pas de brûlure, vous pouvez donc rayer « Bo
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호. 1 기동: / 63295 - 163 + 129 + 00136 - 00045 + 00202 345 188 343 모두 9 + 01685 000248 002 00186 23 2013 164 012, 상승 27-6, 좌측 04 N
... das Ergebnis des Ballb
Qui è Sigma Seven. In HF. Qui è Sigma Seven. In HF.
Ed fing an, die Ausrüstung auszuladen, und sobald wir an einem Punkt angelangt waren, an dem es nicht mehr möglich war, am Booster herumzuhantieren, half ich ihm tatkräftig – zumindest hielt ich die Sachen fest, verstaute sie und versuchte, sie vor dem Verschwinden zu bewahren. Je schneller wir arbeiteten, desto weiter gerieten wir in Rückstand. Nicht, weil wir die Sachen nicht richtig verstauten, es dauerte einfach viel länger als erwartet. In der Schwerelosigkeit war es kaum einfacher als im Simulator, wenn nicht sogar genauso einfach. Also arbeiteten wir uns die ganze Zeit durch. Als wir Carnarvon erreichten, hatte ich mich bereits entschieden, dass wir es nicht schaffen würden, aber ich dachte, wir könnten noch ein bisschen weiterfliegen. Als wir Carnarvon erreichten – oder kurz bevor wir es überhaupt verließen – war mir klar, dass wir die Dekompression nicht schaffen würden. Ich forderte einen Abstieg in die nächste Umlaufbahn an. Dann... kamen wir für etwa 20 Minuten wieder zu Atem und versuchten, den Kram zu sortieren, der im Cockpit herumlag. Dann holte ich die Checkliste heraus und wir gingen sie noch einmal detailliert durch, um sicherzugehen, dass wir in der Eile nichts übersehen hatten. Wir begannen den Außenbordeinsatz und erhielten das Startsignal über Carnarvon. Wir waren startbereit und warteten auf das Startsignal zur Druckentlastung. Wir bekamen es. Wir durchliefen den Druckentlastungszyklus. Als wir Carnarvon verließen
OK, sur cet appareil, on devrait lire 02:41:
Houston, Apollo 8. Entrée comme su
Laut und deutlich, Nelke. Zwillinge 4. Wie ge
로저. 모든 모드에 대한 컴퓨터 점검입니다. 모든 IVI에 10ft/sec의 유량을 주입하고, 고
Und, Houston, wir befinde
好的。接下来，面板 3：应答器，主；功率放大器，设置为主，这是确认；功率放大器，高；模式，语音，设置为关闭；功率，
Non, ce n'est pas exact, Fred. Ce que nous allons faire, c'est laisser tout tel quel sur la page 
أما الخبر الأبرز في هيوستن اليوم فيتعلق بفريق أستروس. ففي عالم الرياضة، انتفض فريق هيوستن أستروس في الشوط التاسع أمام سينسيناتي ليُلحق الهزيمة بالريدز بنتيجة 7-4. لكن مع بداية الشوط التاسع، بدت الأمور قاتمة، حيث كان الأستروس متأخرين بنتيجة 4-3. ثم مع خروج لاعب واحد، سدد خيسوس ألو ضربة فردية إلى الملعب الأيمن. وسدد جون إدواردز ضربة فردية أخرى إلى اليمين، ثم سدد ساندي فالدسبينو ضربة مزدوجة ليُحرز نقطة التعادل. وحصل خوليو جوتاي على قاعدة مجانية، ثم نفذ جو مورغان ضربة خاطفة ليحسم الفوز. وسمح رمي خاطئ إلى القاعدة الرئيسية بتسجيل نقطة أخرى، ثم سدد د
Okay, Houston. I'm showing - I 
Roger, Copied, Going into orbit a
Sembra che ora la temperatura corporea sia r
了解。21-4 ΔVは前方と後方に分割されます。1分32秒で前方56フィート。2+30で後方120フィート/秒。01日23時間
안녕, 짐
Houston, Apollo 11. Looking up at the same area now and it does seem to be reflecting some of the earthshine. I'm not sure whether it was worked out to be about zero phase to - Well, at least there is one wall of the crater that seems to be more illuminated than the others, and that one - if we are lining up with the Earth correctly, does seem to put it about at zero phase. That area is definitely lighter than anything else that I could see out this window.
حسنًا. سنتواصل مع فريق SPAN بخصوص هذه المشكلة ونُعلمك بالنتيجة صباحًا. إذا احتجتَ للاتصال بنا الليلة، نرجو منك استخدام وضع النسخ الاحتياطي للصوت. نحن بصدد إعداد النظام لهذا الوضع،
分かりました。次に変わるのは3つ下です。「MAN ATTITUDE PITCH to
2-1 170. 3+40. 
好的。您的四核涡轮组件温度在 85 度到 44 度之间。喷油器温度在 44 度到 21 度之间；隔热罩在各个位置的温度都远高于其下限。温度似乎会随着太阳
ठीक है, फ्रेड। सबसे पहले, इसकी तैयारी, आकस्मिकता चेकलिस्ट (पृष्ठ 24) से शुरू करते हुए, हम सुझाव देंगे कि आप इसे शुरू करें, और इस पर आपके किसी भी सुझाव का हम स्वागत करेंगे। दूसरा बिंदु: जब आप बर्न एटीट्यूड में हों, तो आपको सूर्य बिल्कुल ऊपर दिखाई देगा। जब आपका कर्स
Roger. Pour information, au cas où cela se serait produit pendant votre absence, le disjoncteur principal est toujours déclenché et nous constatons 
沃
D'accord. Pour info, Fred était aux commandes hier soir; il était ass
Roger, Canary. Mein Status ist gut; der Kapselstatus ist gut; mein Steuermodus ist automatisch; Gyroskope normal; Manöver deaktivi
시그마 세븐. 현재 송신 신호가 매우 불안정합니다. 당분간 연락을 드리지 않고 대기하겠습니다
L'horizon va bientôt se dessine
روجر. أفهم أنه عند ضبطه على الوضع التلقائي،
Roger. Neil, wir verstehen dich deutli
And on your HA, yaw right side, li
Ich habe aber gewartet, bis beim ersten Brennvorgang ein Aufwärt
Okay, hier ist – zur Verdeutlichung – die folgenden Einstellungen: Leistungsverstärker, AUS; Transponder, AUS; Wechselrichter 2, AUS; und die letzte Einstellung auf Panel 250, CB BAT Baker Stromversorgung Eingang/Nachlandung, offen. Führen Sie nun die Schritte in umgekehrter Reihenfolge aus, wie Sie sie mir genannt haben, und gehen Sie dann rückwärts vor. Ich würde also mit MDC 3 UP TELEMETRY, AUS – auf AUS beginnen; dann Wechselrichter – AC1 Bus 1 auf AUS; und dann Wechselrichter 2, AUS; Wechselrichter 2, Haupt-B auf AUS. Ist das die Re
Wir wollen versuchen, die Plattformparalle
OK, Ron, pour MIDPAC: 000, 152, 001, 194, 46 06, 267, plus 1332, moins 16917, 064, 36194, 649, 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 0028, 154, 084, 2240, 180, 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02, 45, 0189, 277, aucun disponible, vecteur de levage vers le haut, alignement, Vega et Deneb, roulis 078, tangage 223, lacet 340. Utiliser la non-sortie. moins 30
Apollo 8, Houston
また切れてるよ。もう一度言ってみ
Sono Houston. Ricevuto. Gra
Okay. From Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Britain's big Jodrell Bank radio telescope stopped receiving signals from the Soviet Union's unmanned Moon shot at 5:49 EDT today. A spokesman said that it appeared the Luna 15 space ship "had gone beyond the Moon." Another Quote: "We don't think it has landed," said a spokesman for Sir Bernard Lovell, Director of the Observatory. Washington UPI: Vice President Spiro T. Agnew has called for putting a man on Mars by the year 2000, but Democratic leaders replied that priority must go to needs on Earth. Agnew, ranking government official at the Apollo 11 blastoff Wednesday, apparently was speaking for himself and not necessarily for the Nixon administration when he said, "We should, in my judgment, put a man on Mars by the end of this century." Laredo, Texas, A
알겠습니다. 랜드마크 130 프라임을 추적하세요. 참고로, 이렇게 하면 랑데부 레이더 트랜스폰더의 위치가 정확하게 조정됩니다. T1은 122 + 16 + 05입니다. 아,
D'accord. Concernant le chauffe-eau: c'est intéressant que j'aie le mien; j'allais justement dire que dès que notre micro est activé, je m'entends parler avec un décalage d'environ deux secondes
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। प्रेशर इक्वलाइजेश
거기서 멈
سنقدم التقرير الأول عن الوضع 
你能转告休斯顿我们当时在……但是我们能够非常清楚
Roger. Haben Sie die aktuellste nominale IVI-Rate mit den Messwerten
मेरे पास 3:40 
Rog
आग
아니, 먼저 네게 좋은 인상을 주
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。あと5分です。燃焼前の窒素ボンベ圧力についてですが、燃焼直前、アルファボン
E questo pre
卡纳冯号，在我们等待期间，我们已经把所有这些设备都装进了飞船，我们正在努力按照某种合理的模式把它
रॉजर। मैं इ
अच्छा, ठीक है। मुझे यहाँ बिल्कुल भी बोरियत नहीं हो रही है। मैं अभी थोड़ी देर पहले मिडवे के ऊपर से उड़ा था। उसे अच्छे से देख लिया। मैं अब आप सबकी तरफ आ रहा हूँ, ज़ाहिर है, आपके उत्तर की ओर। मैंने जीन ड्यूरेट को अपनी बीच की 
로저, 그 페이지는 NC-7입니다. 다시 한번 읽어보겠습니다. 그런 다음 통신이 필요 없는 경도 제어 절차(NC-7)로 진행하십시오. 회랑 제어 차트의 평균 400k, V 400K는 36253입니다. 다시 말씀드리지만, 회랑 제어 차트의 평균 V 400K는 362
Джек, звучит неплохо. Думаю, с нашей позиции мы знаем, где находятся Солнце и Луна, и это будет исключительно маневр по тангажу. Но, думаю, мы сможем сэкономить т
아폴로
罗杰，迈克。TIG 相位 103 40 0000，小于 10，105 12 3000，大于 10，107 11 3000。结
Voilà, c'est tout pour le moment, Frank. On a reçu d'autres nouvelles qu'ils ont promis de nous transmettre dès leur arrivée. Les seuls sujets vraiment intéressants étaient la sortie de Pueblo. Je c
From the time the primary loop starts; this 
Houston, Apollo 8. Abbiamo acquisito manualmente 
S
地球を浮か
صحيح. إنها واحدة من القلائل التي تتمتع بهذه الميزة. لسوء الحظ، النافذة الوسطى مغطاة بالضباب تمامً
あなたのTRはカウントアップしています。私たちのTRはカウントダウンしているので、心配しないでく
Sì, il tuo VOX er
Nous avo
Okay, Aquarius. Wir schauen uns deinen Gimbal an und stellen fest, dass wir vier Düsen im Tank haben und dir zwei Düsen auf dem Pad zugewiesen haben. Aber wir verwenden die aktuell geladenen Düsen. Das ergibt vier Düse
ठीक है, और एट्रिया सेक्स्टेंट में है। खैर, आप जानते हैं, यह सेक्स्टेंट के बिल्कुल बीच में नहीं है। बेशक, मुझे लगता है - मुझे नहीं पता 
Okay, Jack. Ich habe noch eine Frage zu Seite 18. Bei Minute 1 stimme ich der MASTER ARM ON-Anweisun
Okay. I think I read that you were ready. I forgot... earphones. This simply consists of getting a second pair of cartridges out of the command module, putting one band of sticky tape, that is the gray tape, with the sticky side out, around the sides of each new canister near the top, taking a piece of cue card and cutting it into four squares about 2 or 3 inches on a side, bending those at a right angle to form corner support, attaching them to the sticky tape, so that they'll stick up and overlap the old canister, and then simply putting the old canister next to the new canister and taping it up real good so it sticks together. The only other procedure is to remove the towel plug from the old cartridges and put it in the bottom of the new cartridge. And that
로저, 2: SPS/G&N: 38320, +166, -081 080 11 3603, -01408, 모든 공 제외, -00743, 모두 0, 196 359 00657, +00537, 01592 017 01531 23 1160 138. 베가, 데네브 243 183 012, 두 개의 제트 19초, R1 20101. 육분의 별은 79 30 10과 79 52 1
休斯顿，请继续。这
双子座4号，你们可以进行舱外活动和减压了。除非你有几分钟时间，否则请暂时不要测量血压，如果有时间，请尽量帮
Columbi
Non. Tous le
Это доводит резул
Bien reçu. Mode de pilotage: manuel; gyroscopes normaux; int
C'est confirmé. Je vais tout d'abord passer rapidement en revue les horaires des événements principaux, puis nous reviendrons sur les détails. Bien. L'interface d'entrée est prévue à 142 heures et 40 minutes; environ 6 heures et demie avant, nous commencerons la procédure en appliquant la puissance de chauffage, en vérifiant les températures du module de commande et en le préchauffant si nécessaire. Nous pensons d'ailleurs que nous devrons probablement le faire. Nous vous fournirons des procédures détaillées ultérieurement. Environ 6 heures avant, nous commencerons la mise sous tension en utilisant la liste de contrôle modifiée de 30 minutes que vous avez utilisée pour la précédente inspection à mi-parcours. Puis, peu de temps avant, environ 5 heures avant, nous vous demanderons d'adopter l'attitude pour un alignement sur l'axe du corps, en utilisant le terminateur terrestre comme précédemment. Dès que nous aurons cela, nous effectuerons la manœuvre -7, ce qui correspond à une combustion d'environ 60 cm/s, soit environ 15 secondes. On m'indique que la vitesse est maintenant descendue à 45 cm/s, ce qui est largement dans la marge. Bien. Une fois cela fait, nous entamerons immédiatement la manœuvre d'évitement du module de service, qui sera dans le plan de la fusée puisque nous l'éjecterons plus tôt que d'habitude. Nous n'avons pas besoin, et ne voulons pas, de composante hors plan. Le module de service sera donc dans le plan de la fusée, pointant vers l'extérieur le long du vecteur radial. Nous commencerons ensuite à préparer le module de commande pour l'éjection du module de service, y compris la vérification et l'essai à feu du module de commande, et environ 4 heures et 30 minutes avant l'heure prévue, nous largons le module de service. Nous allons cabrer jusqu'à l'acquisition du module de service... et tenter de prendre des photos, mais nous n'allons pas nous aventurer dans des manœuvres de translation pour les photos afin de ne pas perturber votre trajectoire de vol. Bien. Cela nous laisse environ deux heures pour terminer, si nous sommes en retard, la checklist et la préparation de la mise sous tension du module de commande. Nous allons lancer la mise sous tension complète du module de commande à -2 h 30. Nous connecterons l'ordinateur, nous ferons décoller le module, nous commencerons la transmission de 
ठीक है। तो हम 50वें रोल पर रुकेंगे, और आपको बता द
收到。明白了。休斯顿会给你下达“可以”或“不可以”的指令，让你离开位于瓜伊马斯上空的航天器。收到吗
네. 무게중심이 어디에 있는
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니
And, Aquarius, Houston. We're starting to think about CO2 buildup up in the command module there so we've got a recommendation, and what we're recommending is that you take the commander's hoses in the and put a cap over the red return hose and then figure out a way to fasten those hoses so they blow up into the by extending them up through the tunnel as far as possible. And we'll get some flow out the blue side, circulate up and aro
रॉजर। समझ गया। और साथ ही, मुझे लगता है कि आप चौथे चरण के लिए हमें एक नया संरेखण देने वाले हैं। क्या
Okay. It's Rev 1 and a GE
Aquarius, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, eine 90°-Gierbewegung durchzuführen. Behalten Sie dabei den mittleren Gimbalwinkel 
روجر. 5 SPS/G&N: 37201، ناقص 060، زائد 047 086 0
I hear you well. Please talk a little bit lower. Do 
Easy - Easy 0.3, 7.6, but I... right on the southwest end of a crater. I think they would know it if they were in such a location. It looks like their would be pitched up quite a degree. It's on the southwest wal
روجر. وبالنسبة لدرجة حرارة هذا الجهاز الرباعي - الحد الأقصى المسموح به هو 105 درجات على الأسطوانة. أنت أقل بكثير من ذلك. لقد كنا نراقبه، وهو يسير في المسار الصحيح، وإن كان ببطء شديد. أثناء دوران المركبة الفضائية، تبدو تغيرات درجة ا
Roger
イーグル、ヒューストン。アライメントはGOです。私のマークに合わせて、イグニッションまで3
Le prese d'ari
さあ、ヒューストン。私たちの残余をコピー
잭, 당분간 10분에서 15분 간격으로 배터리 전압과 충전기 전류를 측정해야 하니, 당신이 필기하는 동안 다른 사람이 측정값을 읽어줄 수 있을까요
ठीक है, मास्टर आर्म चालू करो। डिसेंट वेंट का ध्यान 
12時間くらいかかると思う。そろそろロモチルを飲む
La risposta è afferm
哦，我知道是怎么回事了。是我的膝盖撞
Howdy there, Mike. We're ready to go ahead and have you switch to your OMNI positions for your sleep period, and we would like the following high gain switch positions: your high gain antenna in MANUAL, beam width WIDE, pitch is minus 50, and yaw is a plus 270. And just follow the flight plan for r
र
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。155度30分あたりで高利得の電波が届きます。その時にテレビをつけても構いませんので、50度ロールになるまで回転を続けてください。
Quindi facciamo una lista di 
كان الهدف محاذيًا تمامًا لزاوية الشبكة، وبنصف درجة إلى اليمين، لذا تم ضب
ロジャー、ヒューストン。六分儀の情報、六分儀の星の情報をもう一度教えていた
닐, 여기는 휴스턴입니다
好的。最下面是“10
Roger. plus 90, G&N: 63481, moins 153, plus 132, 004 10 25 38, moins 04761, plus 00001, plus 53361, 180 193 000, non applicable, plus 00203 53573 633 53349, 33 1578 122, non disponible, moins 0252, moins 02580 11887 34345 016 03 50. Vega et Deneb, 071 291 341. Pas de litre, non amarré
Vogliamo DISPLAY, aperto; ANTENNA BANDA S, chiusa - per evitare un ALLARME MASTER, TELECAMERA - SEQUENZA TELECAMERA, aperta; E sotto, vogliamo DISPLAY, aperto; TENSIONE BUS CC, chiuso; INVERTER 2, aperto; ECA DI SALITA, chiuso; CONTROLLO ECA DI SALITA, aperto; ECA DI DISCESA, chiuso; CONTROLLO ECA DI DISCESA, chiuso; CONNESSIONE BUS TRANSLUNARE, c
Roge
Okay, Vance. Wir haben ein paar Dinge für die Cartridge-Modifikation gefunden. Zum einen den speziellen Staubschutzbeutel, den wir für die Tragetaschen verwenden wollten. Der ist ziemlich dick und porenfrei. Wir sind dann noch 
Do you think we're sleeping too much? All 
시그마 세븐. 현재 송신 신호가 매우 불안정합니다. 당분간 연락을 드리지 않고 대기하겠습니다. 약 3분 후 우메라와 교신할 예정입니
Хорошо. Готов скопировать команду отключения питания с командно
아
هيوستن، أبولو 8. نحن نتحرك وفقًا للزوايا التي أعطيت
了解しました。台風ベイブはまだ台湾沖にいます。6時頃になります。天気予報によると、新たに13時台に台風が来るそうです。もし写真があればお願いします。燃料は使用していませ
Хорошо. Понимаете. Если это вам поможет в вождении, мы рассчитали, что, когда в
حسناً يا فريد. الخطوة التالية هي ببساطة تحويل مفتاح مراقبة ضغط درجة حرارة الوقود إلى وضع 
120
11, hier spricht Houston.
Okay. If you wa
जेमिनी 4, कार्नार्वोन सीएपी कॉम। यदि आप इसे पढ़ रहे हैं, तो कमांड पायलट कृपया अपने मुंह में ओरल टेम्परेचर प्रोब डा
そうだね、あのポケットと財布を持って行った方がいい
Bene. Ora siamo pronti per
无法将十字线调暗到足以进行夜间瞄
Ok, se preferisci, ti preghiamo di effettuare un'ispezione della temperatura della cabina e di registrarla nel tuo registro di volo per il post-volo. Vorremmo conoscere
Ok. Ascolta. Tieni presente che ho appena aggiornato il mio piccolo grafico personale di ECS O2 e non vedo alcun aumento nella quantità utilizzata nelle ultime ore. Sembra che il mio grafico frammentario continuerà a mostrare le stesse caratteristiche che avrebbe avuto sub
彼らにあなたを
What we're thinking about right now, Jerry, is hitting that wedge angle, about 2
Роджер. Теперь всё ясно
- - die
Ciao, Naha, RESCUE Naha, qui Ge
रॉजर। कृपया ईंधन के बारे
Un grand merci à tous ceux qui sont sur place. Il est évident que nous n'en se
Ici Sigma Seven. Je vous reçois. C'est plutôt… très confus. Je n'ai pas pu observer mes antennes HF lors du changement de position. Les portées étaient sans doute trop fai
Here we a
알겠습니다. 그걸 손에 넣으실 때까지 기다렸다가
了解
이
休斯顿，你读过
好
نعم. توضع أسفل الكمبيوتر، وكلما زاد وزن الأشياء الموجودة هناك، زادت نسبة الحمل إلى العمق (L/D). ليس لدينا أي أجهزة تخزين، لذا كنت أتساءل عن الأشياء الثقيلة التي يمكننا وضعها هناك - ربما يمكننا وضع بعض الكاميرات، كاميرات التلفزيون، وما شابهها من الأشياء التي عادة ما تكون ثقيلة - في خزانتنا. لا، لا 
That's - That's affirm, Jim. All we need is UPDATA LINK circuit breaker closed on panel 11, a
Bonjour, Bermuda Cap Com. Friendship Seven, HF. Vous me recevez? Terminé
Хорошо. Ваше потребление кислорода за последние 24 часа — т
Oh, I almost missed my first sunset trying to get the right cabin light off. It i
١١، هذه هيوستن. عند حدوث خلل في مُ
रॉजर। स्टैंडपाइप तरल से भरा हुआ है। तरल स्टैंडपाइप के बाहरी हिस्से पर आधे तक फैला हुआ है—लगभ
У меня всегда всё хор
Okay. 22 Grad, und es sieht so aus, als h
乾球温度はおよそ 72 から 79 です。その少し前は 75 から 77 でした。最後のグループの湿球温度は 57 から 61 でした。その前のグループは 60 から 6
नहीं, ये चक लुईस हैं। चार्ली ड्यूक अभी फ्लाइट के साथ मौसम की जानका
Ich halte die Kapsel in Wiedereintrittsposition an. Rollbewegung nach außen. Gieren ist null; Rollen nimmt zu. Ich möchte diese Position erfassen und dann beobachten. Rollen sieht gut aus. Nicken und Gieren nehmen zu. Auslöseraten und Lage sind gut,... eine kleine Anpassung der Schubkraft, und es läuft sehr gut. Ich werde den TR-10 vorheizen, um die Gyroskope zu aktivieren. Und langsam bekomme ich etwas Licht auf das Teleskop, g
Wei
يا مايك، نعتقد أن هذه القيم الكبيرة لـ DELTA-R، NOUN 49، التي تحصل عليها ذات دلالة بالغة، إذ لم نشهد تحديثًا لمتجه الحالة منذ فترة
Apollo 8, Houston. Abbiamo tutti gli esperti che stanno esaminando i vostri
收到。
好的。乔
피치 트림은 1.5도 정도에서 주기적으로 변동하는데, 이는 시뮬레이션 
ヒ
Я говорю, когда ваша самодиагностика радара сближения завершится, дайте мне знать, и я
Fred, wegen dieser improvisierten Lithiumhydroxid-Kanister für das Kommandomodul: Wir müssen mindestens zwei davon bauen und jeweils zwei gleichzeitig verwenden – einen an jedem Schlauchsatz. Wir verbinden einen diese
ジェミニ4号、ジェミニ4号、こちらヒュースト
Seven from Muchea. Would yo
Gli oggetti in primo piano
Gemini 4, попробуйте свой UHF-2 и к
Гуаймас. Ждите обновления 
غروب الشمس خلابٌ حقًا، لا أعتقد أنني بحاجة لإضاعة الكثير من الوقت في النظر إليه. إنه مثيرٌ للاهتمام للغاية. الأمر الآخر المثير للدهشة هو مدى سواد الظلام عندما لا تكون العينان قد اعتادتا عليه. أستطيع بالتأكيد رؤية بعض الطلاء على النافذة. سأعود الآن إلى وضع VOX على تردد UHF-hi للإرسال. سأفتح واقي الوجه لمسح الميكروفون الأيمن. لقد لعقته. سأغلق واقي الوجه. تم إغلاق واقي الوجه فورًا لكي تعمل دائرة البدلة. لا أريد أن أعبث بها مرة أخرى. مدخل البدلة يحافظ على درجة حرارة جيدة جدًا عند حوالي 68 درجة. لذا سأرفع القبة مرة أخرى. إنها الآن عند 76، 75. يبدو أن هذا الإعداد الأعلى هو ما نريده. أعتقد أنني سأضيف نصف علامة أخرى الآن وقد نتمكن من تثبيته. لقد بدأت تبرد أخيرًا، لذا أعرف ما أريد الوصول إليه في الإعداد. لقد ضبطتُ كمية سائل التبريد للبدلة وذراع التحكم على 8.5. قراءة درجة حرارة القبة حاليًا هي 75 درجة. مدخل البدلة 68 درجة. جوٌّ لطيف للغاية. أشعر بهواء بارد يمرّ على وجهي. تبدو كمية الأكسجين جيدة جدًا، 60 و75 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة. أراقب محوّل الطاقة 250. تقترب درجة حرارته من 140 درجة، وانخفضت درجة حرارة محوّل الطاقة 150 إلى حوالي 100 درجة. درجة حرارة وضع الاستعداد حوالي 100 درجة، وهي درجة حرارة المقصورة. ثالثًا، محوّل الطاقة 250 - هذا المحوّل يعاني، وسأراقبه. مبادل حرارة المقصورة يستقرّ بالتأكيد عند 40 درجة، وقد سبّب لي مشكلة لأنني مدين لفرانك سامونسكي بـ 50 سنتًا. أنا مندهشٌ بشكلٍ إيجابي. قراءة وقود المقصورة مرتفعة قليلاً أيضًا. دعني أتأكّد الآن، نحن نحمل 5.5 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة. القراءة حوالي 5.3، تصحيح، 5.3، وهذا ليس مرتفعًا جدًا لهذه المقصورة. الجو أصبح مظلمًا وج
了解。スタンバイ。状況報告をします。追跡のため軌道姿勢を保っています。状況報告は以下の通りです。タワー分離2番を除く全てのヒューズ1番。緊急逆噴射シーケンス、緊急逆噴射、緊急ドローグはセンターオフの位置、スクイブは作動中。自動逆噴射はオフ。正常、自動、ジャイロは正常。全ての「T」ハンドルは「イン」の位置。逆噴射遅延は正常。キャビンライトは両方とも点灯。フォトライトは点灯中。テレメトリ低周波はオン。レスキューエイドは自動。ああ、分離タワーと分離カプセルのライトは消えている。圧力調整器は「イン」の
Not yet, Jack. We're still in the 
-7:, meno 0003,1, più tutti zeri, più 00001, N/D, più 0020,5, 0003,1, 23, 008, 359; il resto è N/D. Osservazioni: più-X, quattro getti,; e i pesi per il carico: peso, 25181; peso, 62468. Olt
Сообщается, что всем 82 мужчинам потребовалось около 30 минут, чтобы пересечь Мост Невозврата, который разделяет Северную и Южную Корею. Они добрались до моста к 3
ロジャー、フランク。フライトプランの今後数時間についてお伺いしたいのですが。
プラスXを毎秒0.5フィートの速度で移動
好的，第二个故障也在面板 5 上。断路器 POWER-1，主 A 断路器，断开；断路器 SEN
روجر. لقد استلمنا التسجيل. نحن بانتظا
알겠습니다. 지금 
2C का माप 6 1/2 और 24 है। और वे अच्छे दिख रहे हैं। RCS A और B दोनों ठीक-ठाक
أعتقد أن هذا حدث
نعم. ولا توجد رطوبة ظاهرة. ولا 
ينظر فريد الآن عبر جهازنا ال
La prima cosa che faremo è allineare grossolanamente la piattaforma e renderla inerziale, in base a quella presente nello
मिथुन 4, कैनरी सर्जन। क्या आपकी पिछली रिपोर्टिंग अव
ठीक है। निर्धारित समय 125 19 3470 पर दहन हुआ, हमारा हल 51.5 फीट प्रति सेकंड था। अवशेषों का थोड़ा विश्लेषण करने के बाद, हमें -0.2, +0.7 और -0.1 प्राप्त हुए। और उस समय, हमारे पास +0.4, +0.
روجر. نود منك استلام ملف بيانات الرحلة، وقائمة التحقق السطحية، وبطاقة قواعد المهمة (ممنوع الدخول)، وبطاقة ا
Roger
잭, 특히 저 같은 초보자에게는 이곳의 좋은 점 중 하나는 움직이기가 매우 편하다는 것입니다. 물론, 사령선 시뮬레이터에서 일해 보셨겠지만, 무중력 환경은 정말 큰 도움이 됩니다. 1g에서는 움직이기가 상당히 제한적인데, 이곳에서는 훨씬 수월합니다. 보시다시피, 내부가 상당히 깨끗해 보입니다. 헐거워진 와셔 몇 개와 시퀀스 카메라의 작은 플라스틱 덮개가 떨어져서 ED 패널 근처에 끼어 있는 것을 발견했습니다. 자, 짐 바로 아래에 있는, 캔처럼 보이는 물체 위에 서 계신 분이 있습니다. 뒤쪽에 계신 분들을 위해 설명드리자면, 이 캔 안에는 상승 엔진이 들어 있습니다. 지금 제 손이 올려져 있는 것이 바로 달에서 이륙할 때 사용하는 엔진입니다. 엔진 덮개 바로 옆에 제가 지금 손을 얹고 있는 하얀 상자가 있는데, 이전에 보여드린 적이 있습니다. 이것은 짐의 배낭으로, 달 표면에서 산소와 냉각수를 공급하는 역할을
プラス 59578、マイナス 00086、マイナス 05287、012 080 018、該当なし、プラス 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160、332、地球が上 005、右 27、プラス 0398、プラス 06500 13215 36961、シリウス リゲル 137 311 339、アレージなし、フライバイ操
Et toi, Houst
En fait, c'est une correct
Okay. For the burn there will be go to GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, ATTITUDE CONTROL switches will be ROLL PULSE, PITCH PULSE, YAW MODE CONTROL. We'll use control for pitch and roll. ENGINE GIMBAL will be OFF; we'll be using 10-percent thrust; we'll start and stop manually, the... contr
了解、了解、イン
रॉजर। तो आपका अनुमान है कि आप इस विशाल गड्ढे से लगभग आधा मील पश्चिम में स्थित ह
Vous voulez encore de l'eau avant qu
Bien sûr. Nous configurons Goldstone; ce sera fait dans une minute. En attendant, je peux vous lire cet
Je sa
हाँ, जिम। आप कमरे को गर्म करने के लिए खिड़की से सूरज की रोशनी अंदर आने दे स
Ja, Sir; ich habe ein paar Diagramme in Ihrem Diagrammbuch, und ich muss einige Zahle
다시 중력장으로 진입합니다. 자세는 매우 안정적이네요. 수평선 바로 주변을 돌고 있습니다. 이쯤에서 혈압 계산을 멈추고 잠시 쉬면서 재정비해야겠습니다. 
Quello che vedi, Mike, è... Houston, quello che vedi è l'emisfero occidentale. Guardando... in alto c'è il Polo Nord; al centro - appena più in basso al centro c'è il Sud America - fino a Capo Horn. Vedo la Bas
Roger. Angesichts deiner aktuellen Verfassu
Nun ja, wir bräuchten zumindest eine Plattf
Yes. We can get VERB 64 before we come over the hill and 
Zut al
로저. 저희는 여전히 당신의 말씀을 또렷하게 듣
So if you hear an
D'accord, c'est bon. Pour le voyant du composant, nous n'aurons p
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Credo di avere un allineamento migliore ora, sul lato del giorno, su questi, sull'attegg
Ich möchte ihn fragen, warum all diese Schritte, nur um et
Хорошо, Фред. С активацией на странице 37 всё в порядке. Переходите к созданию давления, затем включите прерыватели TCA и п
Houston, 
Oui, il y a un orignal ici, tu n'imagines même pas. C'est le plus gros que j'aie jamais vu. Mon Dieu, qu'il est énorme! Il est gigantesque! Il est tellement gros que je n'arrive 
ठीक है। तो चलिए सीधे
Okay. Hört mal zu. Ich habe gerade meine eigene kleine Grafik zum ECS-O2-Verbrauch aktualisiert und konnte in den letzten Stunden keine Erhöhung der verbrauchten Menge 
冗談じゃない！私も同感です。起こったことは、私たちが以前に経験したことのないことではなく、事前に手順を練っていなかったことでもあります。私たちが
알겠습니다, 빌. 감사합니다. 첫 번째 문제는 E-7 페이지에 있
わかりました。「チェック」の下4行目に
نحن نناقش هذا الأمر الآن يا جيم، ويبدو أننا سننتظر نتائج التتبع. في الوقت الحالي، وبما أنك في ا
好的。让我把电脑模式切换到，比
了解。了解。フレンドシップ・
好的。我们仍然飞往太平洋中部，坐标为357 152 359 267，正负时间为0813，负时间为16503 066 36221 647 12166 36301 0028，下一个目标群是十一月阿尔法星，V0 400 0210 0025 0335 0816 160590 312；英仙座ζ星，上升165度，右转34度，非出
Roger
Понял. Еще две пров
연소 상태에 문제가 있는 것 같습니다. 볼에서 정확한 측정값이 나오지 않고 바늘도 중앙에 맞춰져 있는데, 뭐가 문제인지 잘 모르겠습니다. 절차를 다시 한번 확인해 보겠습
D'accord. C'est exact. La dernière phrase de la mise à jour indique que l'on peut s'attendre à voir la comète à un angle de roulis de 45 degrés et à un angle de roulis de 155 degrés. Or, Jack, d'après les cartes qu'ils m'ont montrées, la comète semble se situer à environ 10 degrés du Soleil. Compte tenu de la géométrie de l'ombre portée par le Soleil, il semblerait que l'on puisse l'observer au sextant sans être g
Apollo 8, Ho
ठीक है, ह्यू
CB，二
Cabin is all set, I don't want to lower the dome any more. It's been very good. Checking on time 18 minutes. Okay on the clock. Thrusters - roll left auto is 119 (degrees). Roll right auto is 115 (degrees). Roll left manual is 100 (degrees). Cabin heat exchanger is 43 (degrees). Pitch up au
Brings up another possibility. Now that we've got all of that stowed into the bags and the condensate can, we could probably blow all of that through the.., I wonder how the sublimator w
أبولو 8، هيوستن. تبدو في حالة جيدة هنا، على طول الخط الم
It appears that we have more than one communicati
Хорошо. В качестве первого шага я внесу одно изменение в базовую конфиг
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Wir empfangen Sie in schwacher Position. Ich wiederhole die Informationen zum Lagevektor. Ihr Lagevektor basiert nun auf fünf Stunden, also mehr als fünf Stunden Tracking. Wir zeigen Ihnen einen Perizynthus von 69,7 Meilen mit einer freien Rückkehr und einem Eintrittswinkel von -14 Grad an. Sie benötigen nur wenige Meter pro Sekunde in der Entfernung zum Mond, u
الت
另外，我还有一份航班
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कि मैं... मुझे लगता है कि हम पूरी ताकत से आगे बढ़ रहे हैं... चार दिनों के अंत तक, 
Хорошо. Исходя из вашего вектора, наземные расчеты показывают скорость 15,3 фута в секунду на среднем участке траектории, VEI 36221, гамма -6,51, так что, похоже, ваша программа довольно хороша. Однако, применив ваше решение к нашему вектору, мы получаем гамму -10,32. Мы ожидаем, что эти два решения сойдутся после более точного отслеживания и получения данных о наблюдении
Roger. Wally, tes
Хорошо. Хорошо, это предварительный маневр PC плюс 2. Начало:; плюс 0819.2, минус 0020.0, минус 0218.9; NA; плюс 0020.9, 0848.2; 420, 274, 082; плюс 0820.3,
हां। हमने ऐसा किया, 
Vous avez
रॉजर, कंप्यूटर। तुम्हारा लोड आ रहा है
रॉजर। आपको 5 स्क्वायर पढ़ रहा 
रॉजर। जिम
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हमने टेप डंप
Аполлон-11, Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон, вещание вслепую. Если вы нас слышите, попробуйте захватить сигнал с помощью всенапр
Хорошо, Джо. Звучит 
Будет ли протечка? О, да. Подожди
是的，先生。我们建议——万一手动启动失败——我是说，自动启动失败，我们将使用下降发动机指令覆盖中的中止阶段，在点火后1秒进行回退。回退到第17页，倒数4分钟处，您看到的是“CB(11) 逆变器2”，应该是“CB(16) 逆变器2”。完
Zanzibar Cap Com. In the blind. How do 
Sì. Lo stiamo guardando anche noi, Frank. Per ora va ancora bene e ne stiamo
أودّ مناقشة بعض الجوانب الفلسفية هنا. أخبرني فريد أنك أتيت إليه ذات مرة وأخبرته أن زاوية د
Roger, Charlie. We switched our OMNI D - Delta, and I lost that last transmission. Would you say again, please? The thing I'm wondering about specifically is that
私たちは今スミス海の
Houston, Apol
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Гро
جيميني 4،
알겠습니다. SEP 패드에서 1시간 전에 다음 자세로 기동하십시오: 롤 130, 피치 125, 요 012.4. 이에 해당하는 짐벌 각도는 롤 291, 피치 196,
E, Eagle, Houston. Vorremmo che scegliessi subito OMNI. Sarà un ben
没错
ठीक है, पैनल 11 कॉन्फ़िगरेशन, पहली पंक्ति: AC बस B, मुझे S-बैंड एंटीना चाहिए, खुला, खुला; AC बस A, टेप रिकॉर्डर, खुला। दूसरी पंक्ति, सिस्टम A के अंतर्गत, मुझे क्वाड 1 TCA के माध्यम से मुख्य SOV चाहिए, सभी बंद। फ़्लाइट डिस्प्ले के अंतर्गत कमांडर का X-पॉइंटर, खुला; खुला; रेंडेज़वस रडार स्टैंडबाय हीटर, खुला; लैंडिंग रडार हीटर, खुला। एटीट्यूड डायरेक्ट ब्रेकर, बंद; ED: लॉजिक पावर A, खुला; यूटिल
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, Хьюстон CAP CO
Gemelli 4, CSQ. È tutto ciò che abbiamo. Siamo in attes
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo su Marte entro il 2000, ma i leader democratici hanno risposto che la priorità deve essere data alle esigenze sulla Terra. Agnew, alto funzionario governativo al decollo dell'Apollo 11 mercoledì, apparentemente parlava a nome suo e non necessariamente dell'amministrazione Nixon quando ha affermato: "A mio giudizio, dovremmo mandare un uomo su Marte entro la fine di questo secolo". Laredo, Texas, AP: I funzionari dell'immigrazione di Nuevo Laredo hanno annunciato mercoledì che agli hippy verrà negata la carta turistica per entrare in Messico, a meno che non facciano il bagno e si taglino i capelli. Huberto Cazaras, capo dell'immigrazione messicana a Nuevo Laredo, ha affermato che le autorità di Città del Messico, Acapulco e altre famose località turistiche hanno ricevuto lamentele nei confronti degli hippy. Di United Press International: La reazione iniziale alla concessione di un lunedì di vacanza da parte del presidente Nixon ai dipendenti federali, in modo che potessero celebrare una giornata nazionale di partecipazione alla missione di allunaggio dell'Apollo 11, è stata per lo più di sorpresa. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, Londra AP: L'Europa è stata colpita dalla missione Apollo 11 sulla Luna. I giornali di tutto il continente riempiono le loro pagine di immagini del razzo Saturn V in decollo per stabilire il primo collegamento della Terra con il suo satellite naturale. E i titolisti hanno messo a dura prova la loro immaginazione pe
Roger, we're GO here. I
Passons à la suite. Caméra TV noir et blanc: il est recommandé de la ranger au-dessus des articles A-7 et A-11 dans le sac de décontamination. Ensuite: kit de signalisation, emplacement de rangement des sacs fécaux usagés, R
D'accord. Nous sommes prêts à vous donner la procédure qui vous permettra de réduire considérablement votre consommation d'énergie. Une fois cela fait, nous pourrons peut-être vous donner plus d'informations. Êtes-vous prêt à copier? En commençant au milieu de la pa
نحن نوفر كل 
Роджер, на Rev 12 RKV обновит ваше время PLA и CLA; на Rev 13 Канарские острова будут проходить по маршруту C-диапазона. Также будет проведена проверка астроорбитальной навигации. Расход топлива для управления положением не требуется. Это время GMT 12 часов 16 минут 00 секунд. Выгрузка данн
ठीक है।
Это мыс
حسناً يا جاك. على اللوحة 3، شاحن البطارية، مطفأ، محول التيار المتردد 2، مطفأ؛ على اللوحة 5، ربط ناقل التيار الرئيسي ألفا تشارلي، قيد ا
ठीक है। मैं अनडॉक करने के लिए इन्हें शून्य पर सेट करने जा रहा हूँ। सवाल
Après avoir vérifié les systèmes du vaisseau spatial, nous 
Because we don't want to u
Per quanto posso dirti ora, sarai in grado di completa
We are getti
Put that away and get 
تأكد من إغلاق وقفل لوحة الوجه. الخوذة مقفلة، والقفازات في مكانها، ووصلة المدخل والمخرج على شكل حرف "Y"، وخراطيم نظام التحكم الإلكتروني بالهواء (ECS) حرة. سأجري بعد ذلك فحصًا لبدلة الطيار، وقد انتهيت منه بالفعل... لننتقل إلى فحص التدفق. قفل الفتحة مفتوح. ثم عليك فحص باقي الأمور. عند بدء وضع تخفيف الضغط، يجب ضبط صمام تهوية المقصورة على 2 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة، ثم نغلق صمام التهوية. بعد ذلك، نقوم بتركيب سدادات مضخة ضغط الدم،
حسنًا يا جيم. في اللوحة رقم 11 هناك، يمكنك أيضًا ترك قاطع دائرة 
Верно. Теперь нажмите ENTER; 52, ENTE
Theta, 11.8; range 68.90; Delta-V tota
Die Schwingungen sind recht gut. Ich glaube, ASCS hat an diesem Punkt den Geist aufgegeben. Der Not-Schnellverschluss ist einge
That's for tomorrow mornin
Мне такой не нужен. Х
Хорошо
حسنًا، لا توجد لدينا أي مشكلة هنا فيما يتعلق بالانحراف. كل شيء على ما يرام. إنه أسرع مما كنا عليه سابقًا. أردنا فقط الوصول إلى وضع حراري مناسب، وسيستغرق الأمر مني 15 دقيق
收到。七号，请保持此频率待命，接收来自首都通讯的呼叫
Roger, Bill. Before you try the manual mixing, we'd like you to give it a whirl at
Привет, Кантон. Привет, Кантон
مرحباً، 13؛ هيوستن. نحن مستعدون لأخذ نس
जी हां, ह्यूस्
そして、マイク、あなたが私たちの目標である DELTA V を望
अरे जिम, मैं अभी दूरबीन से देख रहा हूँ, और सच कहूँ तो नज़ारा बहुत ही खूबसूरत है। अद्भुत। मुझे भूमध्य सागर के सारे द्वीप दिख रहे हैं। मेजरका, सार्डिनिया और कोर्सिका के कुछ बड़े और छोटे द्वीप। इटली के ऊपरी प्रायद्वीप पर हल्की धुंध है, ग्रीस के ऊपर कुछ कपासी बादल हैं। पूर्वी भूमध्य सागर में सू
好的。在面板 122 上，唯一需要更改的是将“状态指示灯
Right, Scott. I feel fine. 
... تقترح... نحن نستخدم سرعة غالق 1/250 عند 11 على قناتي CEX وCMAX لتصوير 
로저, 68세시군요. 
Понял. Используйте на всех них минимальное к
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir hatten leider keine Gelegenheit, eine genaue Überprüfung durchzuführen. Wir werden bis z
ロジャー、こちらシグマ・セブン。ジーン、はっき
さて、地球が今日、少し大きく見えます。大したことではありませんが、確かに少しは大きくなっていま
Liest hier irg
Houston, Eagle.... high
ठीक है, वैंस। आप सही कह रहे हैं। हमारे कैमरे लगभग वैसे ही कॉन्फ़िगर किए गए हैं जैसा आपने बताया। कमांड मॉड्यूल के लिए, क्या आपको लगता है
Okay. Oh, vediamo, un odo
Oui, 
ठीक है।
B はうまくハッキングできなかった
Roger. My status is good; the suit temperature has reduced considerably; steam vent temperatures now read 69 [degrees] on cabin and suit, suit temperature is 62 [degrees]
好的。大概需要10步，但很简单。好的。在CB 16上，关闭逆变器2。在CB 11上，关闭交流母线A母线与逆变器2的连接。在面板14上，确认逆变器开关2的状态。在CB 1
لا. كانت تلك قبة البدلة - قراءته
嘿，查理，你是说在很短的时间内，他实际上加载了一些除了CDU读取到的值
11号，这里是休斯顿。由于我们通过废水处理排水管进行了排气，我们得出结论，您的氧​​气流量传感器确实存在故障。您之前向我们讲解循环蓄水器排放时，我提到过，虽然它一直在移动，可
정
Ora sto scendendo all'orizzonte e puoi sicuramente vedere i due strati di aria che brillano, 
Une fois la vitesse de rotation suffisamment basse pour nous permettre de nous désamarrer en toute sécurité, nous avons procédé à la manœuvre et nous sommes éloignés de l'Agena à une vitesse de plusieurs mètres par seconde aussi rapidement que possible. Nous avions constaté une diminution de notre réserve de propergol de 50 % à moins de 30 %. Après avoir coupé l'OAMS et tout en conservant l'alimentation de secours (vannes des moteurs fermées), nous contin
我想，这时你们应该能注意到我们正在清理驾驶舱，
Und, Aquarius, nur zu Ihrer Information: Was unsere Wasserversorgung betrifft, einschli
Okay. Ich bin gleich auf de
أنا مستعد 
阿
C'est bien ça
नहीं। यह पूरी तरह अंदर नहीं गया है। इसे थोड़ा धक्का दीजिए। ब
Роджер.
こちらは8番です。はっきりと聞こ
That's right, Jim. It would be good to see what you are doing down in the or the far corner of the spacecraft where the optics are. Might be interesting to describe what you will do in the next few minutes in the wa
C'
Okay. The handle is off the *** in about 6 or 8 inches into the s
最好去再
Хорошо, Джо. Позвольте мне вернуть вам его и посмотреть, есть ли он у меня здесь. 
روجر. أكرر، التعليمات التي قدمتها لك للتو ستجعل الكاميرا موجهة نحو النافذة ومنحرفة بزاوية 30 درجة تقريبًا
У вас
过段时间我们会给您提供倾倒水的详细数据。目前看来，水量并没有
잭, 지금 창밖을 보니
Bie
D'accord. À l'étape 5 du formulaire E-11, le premier sous-titre est « Casques et gants ». Les éléments suivants dépendent du fait que vous portiez une combinaison ou une chemise, mais ils doivent tous être complétés. Les valves de retour d'air de la combinaison doivent être OUVERTES si vous entrez en chemise. Vous devez également tracer un trait au crayon indiquant que l'alimentation optique est OFF entre une soupape de pressurisation d'urgence
Débranchez les tuyaux d'entrée et de sortie du système ECS. Re
罗杰，弗兰克。如果你想使用长焦镜头，你应该使用你外出时使用的相
Columbia, 
Okay, Charlie. M
Okay. Yo
ええ、もちろんです、ビル。もし興味があれば、具体的な数字な
Ehi
OK. Je suis en mode automatique. Tout fonctionne parfaitement. Le commutateur de manœuvre est sur la position « arrêt ». Tous les systèmes sont au vert. Ma consommation de carburant est quasi nulle. Mon seul souci concerne le circuit de la com
لم أشعر بأي ارتباك على الإطلاق. شعرتُ أنني أستطيع النظر إلى الأرض - شعرتُ براحة تامة وأنا أنظر إليها - كما أستطيع الاستلقاء على ظهري والنظر إلى الأعلى دون أ
No. Devi dare il massim
了解、ビル。ダンプを受け取りました。音質はとても良いです。ヒューストンに持ち帰って再生す
LOS, 
휴스
Roger. Le Foxtrot d'Area dure une heure, 28 mi
مباشرة في
了解しました。目的は近点通過と2時
अब 45,0
그리고, 11번 국도, 휴스턴. 마이크, 내일 착
En observant les alentours, le contraste est globalement dû à l'ombre portée par le soleil: un gris très clair, un halo autour de mon ombre et de celle de mon casque. En regardant au loin, le contraste est maximal car la couleur environnante reste assez claire. En regardant vers le soleil, une plus grande zone ombragée nous fait face. La couleur générale de la zone environnante est moins contrastée. En examinant la zone poussiéreuse que nous avons soulevée, on constate une texture nettement plus sombre. J'en ai soulevé une, et j'imagine que c'est l'arpenteur. Il en va de même lorsque j'observe la zone où nous marchons. En général, cela est dû à la présence d'empreintes de pas. Le terr
알겠습니다. 곧 비행 계획대로 복귀할 수 있을 것 같습니다. 연소 
好的。还有两步。步骤 6
D'accord. Et étape suivante, panneau 12: FONCTION S-BAND à VOIX et FONCTION RANGEMENT à
Houston, la trappe a passé
मुझे लगता है हमें कुछ बेहतर करना होगा। वे 
Ладно, мы не потратили бензин зря, делая то, что делали, но мы потратили бензин зря из-за этой чертовой активности DAP; я этого не понимаю. Прямо как симулятор
J
ねえ、ここで始められるかどうか見てみましょ
好的。月亮以零下
ज
Capito, 
Похоже, что в вашем вторичном контуре охлаждения клапан противод
去
Roger You have plen
Roger, Seven, I read you weak but readable
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo su Marte entro il 2000, ma i leader democratici hanno risposto che la priorità deve essere data alle esigenze sulla Terra. Agnew, alto funzionario governativo al decollo dell'Ap
Lors de notre prochain passage, j
Let's see, what's tearing me u
حسنًا. لديّ بعض ال
That's affirmed,
Acquario, Houston. Se mi h
Pa
Okay. W
ठीक है। जैक, उस सूची में से हमें कमांडर
هيا 
알았어, 잭이 내가 카메라 설정을 잘 못 읽는다고 하네. 시작 프레임을 기준으로
मुझे तकनीक समझ आ गई है, जैक। हमें प्रवेश कोण को तेज करने के लिए पर्याप्त समय चाहिए
Да. Мы решили использовать контейнер, и, как вы знаете, вокруг охлаждаемой жидкостью одежды есть п
रॉजर। आपकी ओर आ रहा हूँ। 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; माइनस 061, प्लस 067 135 23 4149;, प्लस 32020, प्लस 06713, माइनस 02773 181 054 013;, HA अनुपलब्ध है, प्लस 00230 32833 228, डेल्टा VC 32625 24 1510 355। अगली तीन लाइनें अनुपलब्ध हैं। प्लस 1103, माइनस - माइनस 17237 11806 36275 
아폴로 13호, 휴스턴입니다. 약 1분 후 카나본 우주 정거장과의 데이터 전송이 끊길 예정입니다. 음성 통신은 가능할 것으로 예상됩니다. 모든 것이 순조롭게 진행되고 있으며, 연소 과정
روجر. هذه الصورة تنحرف عن المركز مرة أخرى. هل يمكنك إجراء تعديل آخر لإعادتها؟ لا 
Okay. Modus 1, 5 Stunden, Rollen 1,38, Nicken 7,89, Gieren 357,37. Modus 1, 15 Minuten, Rollen 180,73, Nicken 29,46, Giere
That's right. I - I haven't entered - I gave the - I gave it back to the computer for a second. I put the mode switch from MANUAL back to while I fooled with the, and the computer drove the star off out of sight. So the delay here has been in going back to MANUAL and finding the star aga
मैं सेक्स्टेंट के बारे में कुछ कहना चाहूंगा। तंग अंतरिक्ष यान में इसका उपयोग करना बहुत मुश्किल है, खासकर हेलमेट पहने हुए। मैंने अंततः यह निष्कर्ष निकाला कि हेलमेट पहने हुए तारों के लिए आवश्यक कोणों को कैप्चर करने का प्रयास व्यर्थ होगा। इसलिए मैंने अपना हेलमेट उतार दिया। इससे मुझे इसके उपयोग में थोड़ी अधिक सुविधा मिली, लेकिन फिर भी अंतरिक्ष यान को नियंत्रित किए बिना मैं लगभग 20 से 23 डिग्री के कोणों तक ही सीमित था। होता यह था कि खिड़की के ऊपरी हिस्से से तारा दिखाई नहीं देता था। अब, अंतरिक्ष यान को अधिक बार और अधिक नियंत्रित करके आप इसे इस प्रकार नियंत्रित कर सकते हैं कि खिड़की की लंबी धुरी आपके ट्रैकिंग प्लेन में आ जाए। ईंधन की कमी के कारण हमने इस तरह से नियंत्रण करना उचित नहीं समझा। हमने पल्स मोड का भी उपयोग किया, बिना अधिक नियंत्रण किए। उस प्रयोग के लिए चुने गए तारे क्षितिज से काफी ऊंचे कोण पर थे, इसलिए उन्हें कैप्चर करना बहुत मुश्किल था। हमने अंततः क्षितिज के थोड़ा करीब के तारों को कैप्चर करने का निर्णय लिया। मैंने कैनोपस और कुछ अन्य फिल्टरों पर कुछ परीक्षण किए, जैसा कि आप देखेंगे। नीले फिल्टर ने क्षितिज को पूरी तरह से ढक दिया; जब मैंने इसका इस्तेमाल किया तो मुझे क्षितिज बिल्कुल भी दिखाई नहीं दिया। चांदनी में क्षितिज की छवि शायद उतनी अच्छी नहीं आती। हालांकि, हरे फिल्टर से मुझे बिना फिल्टर के मुकाबले थोड़ा साफ क्षितिज दिखाई दिया। मुझे हरे या साफ फिल्ट
こんにちは、アポロ11
Apollo 8, H
D'accord. Nous avons terminé une étape. Voulez-vous que nous essayions une autre, ou préférez-vous que nous attendions de pouvoir en i
روجر، سبعة. نحن متأكدون من ذلك، نحصل على أوقات ألفا و... ف
11、こちらヒューストン。スリングショットを
ماذا تناولت اليوم على ال
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Bien reçu. Pourriez-vous répéter DELTA-VC prime? La communication a été interr
Ok
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴
...да... У меня очень сильно п
...
И у вас будет блокнот для такого отно
Das stimmt. Alle sind mit der Arbeit am Erdhorizont sehr zufrieden; und was uns betrifft, können Sie das getrost ignorieren
Адрес 82 не я
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP COM. Se leggete, chiedete al Pilota di Comando
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Attendere, per 
Хорошо. Ладно. Я буду наготове и сделаю копию, как толь
콜롬비아, 맞습니다. 그리고 T1
Roger. E Fred ora è stato sostituito. È tornato a r
わかりました。まず12ページをご覧ください。ページの右側、中央
وإغلاق واق
Хорошо, Одиссея; Хьюстон. Т
Gemelli 4. Sei una pe
是的，这台电脑里的那个该死的“1”，你知道的——耳轴角度
BLOCK 
Andare
알겠습니다. 전부 0입니다. 좋습니다. 7번 별에서 1, 2, 3번 표시의 트러니언을
Roger. At about 148 hours, if you've not already done so, a CO2 filter change, and the H2 purge line heater on 20 minutes before the O2 and H2 purge. At 148 hours, we'd like you to initiate a charge on battery Alfa instead of at 151 hours, and leave the charge on until we notify you further. At 150 hours, waste water dump to 10 percent. We do plan to burn midcourse correction 5. It will be an burn about 5 feet per second at about the nominal time in the flight 
حسنًا. وأود أن أذكرك بضرورة تثبيت العدسات بزاوية
再说一遍
잠시 기다려 주
Oui. Oui, Jack, je r
On the right-hand half of the page, cross out the "Orbital scien
太陽を見下ろす
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo su Marte entro il 2000, ma i leader democratici hanno risposto che la priorità deve essere data alle esigenze sulla Terra. Agnew, alto funzionario governativo al decollo dell'Apollo 11 mercoledì, apparentemente parlava a nome suo e non necessariamente dell'amministrazione Nixon quando ha affermato: "A mio giudizio, dovremmo mandare un uomo su Marte entro la fine di questo secolo". Laredo, Texas, AP: I funzionari dell'immigrazione di Nuevo Laredo hanno annunciato mercoledì che agli hippy verrà negata la carta turistica per entrare in Messico, a meno che non facciano il bagno e si taglino i capelli. Huberto Cazaras, capo dell'immigrazione messicana a Nuevo Laredo, ha affermato che le autorità di Città del Messico, Acapulco e altre famose località turistiche hanno ricevuto lamentele nei confronti degli hippy. Di United Press International: La reazione iniziale alla concessione di un lunedì di vacanza da parte del presidente Nixon ai dipendenti federali, in modo che potessero celebrare una giornata nazionale di partecipazione alla missione di allunaggio dell'Apollo 11, è stata per lo più di sorpresa. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, Londra AP: L'Europa è stata colpita dalla missione Apollo 11 sulla Luna. I giornali di tutto il continente riempiono le loro pagine di immagini del razzo Saturn V in decollo per stabilire il primo collegamento della Terra con il suo satellite naturale. E i titolisti hanno messo a dura prova la loro immaginazione per trovare le parole per celebrare l'impresa. "La più grande avventura nella storia dell'umanità è iniziata", ha dichiarato il quotidiano francese Le Figaro, che ha dedicato quattro pagine ai resoconti da Capo Kennedy e ai diagrammi della missione. Il tabloid Paris Jour ha proclamato: "Tutto il mondo dice loro bravo". Il quotidiano comunista L'Humanité ha pubblicato in anteprima la foto del lancio e ha dedicato l'intera ultima pagina a un entusiasta resoconto sulla Luna che descriveva il conto alla rovescia e il lancio, le mogli e le famiglie degli astronauti e le attività lunari di base. Hempstead, New York: Joe Namath si è presentato ufficialmente al campo di addestramento dei New York Jets presso la Hofstra University mercoledì, dopo un incontro a porte chiuse con i suoi compagni di squadra per le sue divergenze con il commissario del football professionistico Peter Rozelle. Londra UPI: Mercoledì la Camera dei Lord ha ricevuto rassicurazioni sul fatto che un sottomarin
Roger. F
روجر. نحن في الوقت الفعلي ونستخدم نظام ACQ-AID. يبدو أ
Valvola devia
没错，但你的坐姿仍然受到限制，就像坐在公交车座位上一样。虽
알겠습니다. 저희는 UHF 2번 
Voyons voir. À Springfield, dans le Missouri, Mickey Owen, l'ancien receveur des Dodgers de Brooklyn, entré dans l'histoire en laissant échapper une troisième prise qui a permis aux Yankees de New York de remporter la victoire contre les Dodgers lors des Séries mondiales de 1941, a décidé de laisser une trace indélébile dans les mémoires, au-delà de ses exploits sportifs. Quarante-cinq garçons et filles ont reçu un poney grâce à son ges
了解。D-9の最新情
Роджер, Джим.
駅の簡単なレポートをいただけ
Roger, Houston. Apollo 11. Hai ricevuto la notifica sulla checklist di i
ヒューストン、アポロ1
हां, इसे संभाल कर रखे
Roger
Хорошо. Я возвращаюсь к прежнему настрою и подожду, пока ставки не сни
まあ、ジムが数時間で起きると思っているなら、私たちは2時間遅れることになり
Roger. Apollo 8, H
インバーターの設定は変えていません。簡単に説明します。インバーターは4です。これは
赤い物体が私たちの後を追ってきました。高度調整噴射の直後です。どうやら後方に漂っているようです。明らかに赤い色をしています。異物
Nun ja, wir alle haben unsere Probleme
Джим, мы разрабатываем для тебя процедуру 
حسنًا يا جيم. قواطع الدائرة هي قواطع دائرة جهاز الإنذار/الرصيف/المكونات الموجودة على اللوحة رقم 11، الصف الثالث، أقصى اليمين، أسف
好吧，上次也发生过
많은 실패 사례에
أبولو 8، هيوستن
L'ultimo 55-DELTA. 55-DELTA. Mi ricevi? Gemini 4, CSQ. Mi hai 
कोलंबिया, ये ह्यूस्टन है। क्या तुमने मेरे पैड की कॉपी बन
Roger. Merci. Les réglages de la cabine sont excellents et je m'y sens p
H
C'est exact. J'allais justement vous le dem
حسنًا. الآن - كان ذلك صحيحًا، لكنني أريد إعادة التح
T
Roger. Quel était le montant de l'opération de rachat inversée? Les 400
Roger. Si trattava di un problema relativo all'acqua accompagnato da let
好的。没问题。杰克，我来提醒你一下舱口完整性检查。你要对着隧道排气，直到压差达到 3 psi。这应该需要 9 到 10 分钟，我们觉得之后你不
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Do y
For the 
전압 39.4볼트, 전류 1.
收到。这种测距序列是我们在语音备份模式下会遇到的现象；在这种模式下，测距和语音共享相同的信道，所以我们必
Роджер. В
روجر. تصحيح على T4:
ठीक है। मैं वापस बेडरूम में जा रहा हूँ। हम सबसे अच्
Roger, alles in Ordnung. Wir schaffen
Okay. Ich habe den Anstellwinkel jetzt auf etwa 180 Grad erhöht. Soll ich für die Ausricht
よし、いい
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, इन निर्देशों में हमने चंद्रमा की तस्वीरें लेने के लिए कोई व्यवस्था नहीं की है। अगर आप कार्यक्रम समाप्त होने के बाद किसी दूसरी खिड़की से या किसी छोटे-मोटे तरीके से चंद्रमा क
Roger. La procédure MA négative est acc
ジム、夕方、フレッド・オが司令船の窓1番から何かが噴出していると報告しました。また、約4インチ四方の銀色の金属片が漂っているのも報告しました。私たちが確認しようとしていたことの一つは、これが新たな噴出なのか、それとも当初の問題で発生した噴出の一部なの
Хорошо. Никто не принимал никаких других лекарств; никто не принимал Марезин; никто не бо
يخبرني روجر وجاك أن هذا كله قاطع دائرة و
了解しました。2行目はこれですべてです。3行目、安定性と制御性の
はい。わかりました。マイナス5秒でこれをセットして、時間通りに、つまりゼロカウントで
Roger, Bill. On voit très bien O'Neal, 
On fait l'inventaire de nos réserves, on va peut-être envisager de rationner une partie. Il faut s'assurer d'en avoir assez pour tenir et de consommer suffisamment d'eau. Je serais vraiment désolé de manquer d'eau le dernier jour. On regarde la quantité
جيميني 4، مركز عمليات القيادة في هيوستن على أ
Хорошо, в это время мы должны провести исс
Это «Дру
D'accord. Film exposé 16 mm et 70 mm dans R-13. Ensuite. Bouchons de protection sur les tuyaux d'oxygène. Puis: deux appareils Ha
Roger. ascension PAD: 104 39 47 0
Sig
좋습니다, 짐. 아주 잘하고 계십니다. 시끄러운 소음이 없으니 정말 좋네요. 제가 하려는 일을 말씀드리겠습니다. 앞서 말씀드렸듯이, 지금 당장은 자세한 절차를 알려드리지는 않을 겁니다. 곧 다음과 같은 형식의 절차를 제공해 드릴 예정입니다. 첫째, 모든 주요 이벤트 시간과 구성, 스위치 설정 등 우리 기종에 특유한 사항들의 시간을 담은 비행 계획표 같은 타임라인을 제공할 겁니다. 이러한 사항들은 체크리스트에는 없을 겁니다. 예를 들
Yes, it's kind of a cold winter day
Bene. Nel riquadro 122, l'unica modifica è la dicitura C
All that procedure for P22
Put yourself in start position to begin physiological functions
11번, 복사할 준비 되면, 비행 계획 업데이트 몇 가지랑 소모품 업데이트, 그리고 아침 뉴스도 좀 전해드릴게요. 이
هذا هو سيجما 7. فحص HF لمدة 30 ثانية، يبدأ بعد 10 ثوانٍ. هذا اختبار لمدة 30 ثانية، أثناء مروري بساحل باجا ك
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입
로저. 회장님께서 들으셨습니다. 여기
太平洋からケベック沿岸警備隊の海域に00時に雲が迫ってくる様子を、絞りf/11、絞り150でS-5で撮影しました。フレーム番号は28です。S-5用に数枚撮影しています。ちょうど熱帯暴風雨カーラのエリアにいます。今は雲が厚く垂れ込めています。雲の形をいくつか撮影します。雲の上には、とても興味深い模様が織り交ぜられています。カメラが捉えてくれるかもしれません。とても明るいので、絞り250、絞り16で撮影します。28、29がフレームになり、
燃えてい
Il messaggio veniva trasmesso tramite un nuovo sistema di comunicaz
次回は、コントロ
حسنًا، في هذه الوضعية يا جاك، ونحن نتأرجح، لا يمكنني استخدام التلسكوب لرؤية النجوم. ببساطة، لا نستطيع رؤيتها على الإطلاق. قد نتمكن من المناورة بالانحراف أو الدوران و/أو الالتفا
Хорошо. На странице E-7 контрольного сп
노출 시간은 1/8초, 1/2초 정도가 적당합니다. 카메라를 안정적으로 고정할 수 있다면 2초
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。こちらがコピーしているようです。連絡を回復させようとしている間、光学スイッチをゼ
Ниже зачеркните «Автоматическая проверка па
了解。了解。こちらでもキーキーという音が聞こえた。デルタVC 104356。オーバー
제미니 4호, 카나본 관제탑(CAP COM). 여행 기록을 업데이트했습니다. 케이프 커내버럴에서 유효한 시간을 입력받지 못했습니다. 이제 21-4일 비행에 대한 유효한 시간을 입력받으셨습니다. 휴스턴 관제탑(CAP COM)에서 전달해 드린 것과 동일
Понятия не имею, где мы остановились, Вэнс. Я просто сказал, что мы выполнили процедуру в точности так, как ты сказал. Мы дошли до критической части SEP, где я сказал: «выбрать наилучший OMNI». Однако мы не получаем никаких показаний напряжения н
それは何の役にも立たなか
Und Mrs. Robert Goddard sagte heute, ihr Mann wäre überglücklich gewesen. „Er hätte nicht gejubelt oder so. Er hätte einfach nur gestrahlt.“ Sie fügte hinzu: „Das war sein Traum, eine Rakete zum Mond zu schicken.“ Menschen auf der ganzen Welt hatten viele Gründe, sich über die Apollo-11-Mission zu freuen. Die italienische Polizei bericht
Los geht's, 
روجر، ١١. لديّ لك ورقتان، ٣٠ ثم ٣١. ٣٠ SPS/G&N:
Ricevuto. Rollio 198,6, beccheggio 130,7 e imba
أجل، أعرف. أنت تعرف كيف يكون الأمر مع ذلك - حقيبة الصدر تلك صعبة في الطائرة ذات الجاذبية الصفري
Et n'ou
Jim, on the battery problem, we have determined that it is not overcurrent or reverse current. We suspect it's over-temp, but don't know for sure, so we're going to watch it for awhile
,
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP CO
好的，杰克。燃料电池程
Si ha l'illusione di essere su un treno o su un altro veicolo, a causa del ronzio, e si ha la sensazione 
Да. К твоему сведению, Джим, я не знаю, слышал ли ты это изначально, но этот участок с 2,5 до 1 часа там проезжали около трех раз, и он довольно плотный, поэтому мы постарались отсеять все, что могли, а это немного. Но я думаю, что еще один момент, который ты мог бы донести до Джека, когда будешь выравнивать эту платформу, — н
الآن يمكنك رؤية تلك المحركات النفاثة وهي تعمل هناك
كان ذلك س
Now, in answer to Question 2, there was, of course, a vibration transient in the second stage that - due to the number 5 engine going out - which occurred shortly before the engine went out, and slightly after that then the S-II stage was
नहीं। मैं ले आता हूँ। नहीं, आप इस ट
Roger. A Washington, la Commissione Finanze del Senato ha approvato l'estensione della sovrattassa sull'imposta sul reddito, ma un voto del Senato sul disegno di legge sembrava al momento remoto. Ad Austin, il deputato statale Ray Lemmon di Houston è stato nominato Direttore Nazionale dell'American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon ha proposto uno studio sulla possibilità di istituire un istituto di oceanografia in Texas. Sarebbe il primo istituto del genere nella parte occidentale del Golfo del Messico. A Minneapolis, Minnesota, l'ufficio meteorologico, dopo aver riepilogato le previsioni meteo odierne con una massima di 88 e una minima di 72, ha annotato "nevicate: nessuna". Da St. Petersburg, Florida, arriva un rapporto radio dell'esploratore norvegese Thor Heyerdahl, che afferma che l'equipaggio della sua barca di papiro, la Ra, navigherà verso Bridgetown, Barbados, nonostante i danni causati dal mare grosso. L'equipaggio, tuttavia, dormirà su una nave di scorta. Norman Baker, navigatore della spedizione, ha affermato che l'equipaggio era oggi a bordo della Ra per riparare i danni causati dalle tempeste della scorsa settimana, che hanno spaccato la base dell'albero maestro. Parte dell'albero spezzato era stato gettato in mare e la nave si trovava a 725 miglia a est delle Barbados. "È possibile, ma scomodo, dormire a bordo del Ra", ha detto Baker nel rapporto radio. "Ma lo scopo del nostro viaggio non è una prova di forza o resistenza umana". Questo è il motivo per cui l'equipaggio ha trascorso le notti 
ロジャー、この粒子はまた後方に漂っているのが見えます。しかし、気球の線と完全に平行ではありません。おそら
不，它从未发
Ok
ठीक है। आरोही नोड का देशांतर 
Roger. Stai registrando tutti i dati del 23 o vuoi che t
Entrée comme suit: Pacifique central, 357 152 359 268, plus 0813, moins 165 03 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028, NA 4 fois, avec TO 400 0207 0025 0333 0816 16 0590 312, Zeta Persei, en haut 165, à droite 34, en haut. Remarques: utiliser un modèle sans sortie. Zeta Persei se situe entre Mirfak et Aldebaran, et Frank ne pourra 
روجر. شكرا
Gemini 4, Gemini 4. Ici Hou
そうだ、テープを
और 
I don't know.
Non sono sicuro di aver capito la domanda, ma abbiamo ottenuto una buona parte della massa del terreno nel campione 
It is unfortunate that we do not have - we can't make the other 
Nous survolons actuellement la série de cratères Messier, en les observant verticalement, et on peut distinguer des bloc
Roger. We figured
और हम आपसे स्वीकृति चाहते हैं। हमारे पास एक स्टेट वेक्टर अपलिंक है। और उसके बाद, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपने प्लेटफ़ॉर्म को उस नए संस्करण के अनुसार पुनः संरेखित करें जिसे हमने एक या द
哦，好的，你
좋아요
这是友谊七号。太阳，我想在太阳落
रॉजर, तुम थोड़ी कमजोर शुरुआत कर रहे हो। अगर तुम इसकी एक कॉपी कर 
Хорошо. Следующая поправка, вероятно, будет — может быть, чуть выше. Вот она; я подго
그는 UHF 대역을 사용하고 있었습니다. 몇 분 동안 그의 목소리
了解。全てゼロ、全てゼロ。オーケー。7
네, 잠깐 이야기가 딴 데로 샜네요. 밥 호프가 다시 베트남에 가서 평소처럼 멋진 공연을 펼치고 있습니다. 뉴스 기사에 나오는 이름 중 하나는 USS 뉴저지호에 관한 것입니다. 밥 호프는 어제, 아니 수요일에 뉴저지호의 거대한 함포탑 위에서 농담을 하며 
알았어. 
ソース圧力は1500、ソース温度は60～50です。RCS
좋습니다
Roger, Seven, siamo d'accordo. Vi consiglio di continuare a usare il fly-by
Intelsat è un consorzio internazionale di comunicazioni composto da 63 nazioni; fornisce una mappa della prima rete di comunicazioni globale. Il nuovo satellite dovrebbe entrare in servizio commerciale a pieno regime il 2 gennaio, inizialmente servendo il Nord e il Sud
रॉजर। आपके पास 215 पाउंड पानी है, यानी 2 1/5
Apollo 8, Houston. Roger. We rec
روجر. يمكنك الآن المضي قدماً وتسليم جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بك والحصول على التحديثات، ولنبدأ في معال
11，休斯顿。就在刚才，我们拍到了你，巴兹，还有那两个头盔收纳袋。在你左肩后面，巴兹，我们看到了
Roger. Ho degli aggiornamenti sul piano di volo pe
네. 원하시면 직
分かりました。コンピュータをすべてのモードでチェックします。このチェックには 3 つの手順があります。まず、すべての IVI ウィンドウで 10 フィート/秒を入力します。次に、誤動作リセットを押します。次に、Start Comp を押して、Computer Running Light の表示を確認します。これをすべてのモードで実行します。繰り返しますが、コンピュータが動作しているという表示が得られない場合は、別のテストを実行します。この別のテストでは、すべてのモードでチェックします。コンピュータの電源を 2 秒間オフにします。コンピュータの電源を 2 秒間オフにします。コンピュータの電源が再投入さ
この辺りの詳しい状況については後ほど説明しますが、形、角、粒度など、ありとあら
Roger. Hier o
Wir könnten es versuchen, Jack, obwohl ich nicht weiß, wie erfolgreich es sein wird. Wir haben es schon versucht – das Licht un
Sie beabsichtigen, es zu beha
Я не хотел включать основные батареи. Там нужно всего лишь установить скорость орбиты, скорость FDM платформы, масштаб FDI — высокий. Перейти к управлению скоростью. ACME. OAMS 
Ecco la torre che è andata a
Immagino anche che quando dovremo tornare lì dentro, prenderemo la droga e il cibo... li porteremo q
هيوستن، هيوستن، أبولو 13. انت
好的，请您方便的时候进行一次客舱温度调查，并将结果记录在您的飞行日志中，以便飞行后查阅。我们需要客舱内的环境干球温度和
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 시간 제약은 없는 것 같습니다
Roger. In Washington hat der Finanzausschuss des Senats die Verlängerung des Einkommensteuerzuschlags genehmigt, eine Abstimmung im Senat über den Gesetzentwurf scheint jedoch derzeit unwahrscheinlich. In Austin wurde der Abgeordnete Ray Lemmon aus Houston zum Nationaldirektor der Amerikanischen Gesellschaft für Ozeanographie ernannt. Lemmon hat eine Studie zur Möglichkeit der Gründung eines ozeanographischen Instituts in Texas vorgeschlagen. Dies wäre das erste Institut dieser Art am westlichen 
、カナリア
11, Houston. On our real-time telemetry we saw 95 to
另外，我还要祝贺美国创造了新的太
Anzeige – Die Retro-Einstellung wurde aktiviert. Abschnitte 1, 2, 3,..
आप इंतज़ार कीजिए, मैं 100 सेकंड के लिए शून
Oui, en effet. On est à l'étroit. La plupart de nos affaires sont dans l'habitac
尼尔，这里是休斯顿。我清楚地听到了你的留言，也看到了“我怀疑我们是不是一直在触发某种反应”和“我不这么认为”这两
Okay, Fred. You're almost up with us. We are looking real hard at getting water from the command module waste tank into the, using that hose and then dumping it from the into th
Readi
Voulez-vous que nous les acceptions, ou devri
Righto. And we're lookin
Роджер. Примерно через 2 минут
，Cape 有 1 - 
Ok. Vogliamo che tu mantenga la tua mano
이글, 휴스턴. 
إنه لأمرٌ مُدهش. لا تزال هناك مساحة واسعة في الأسفل حتى مع وجود صندوق كاميرا هايكون مُنزلاً. والآن، سأعيد الكاميرا إلى 
Roger. Das sollte der zweite Schritt in diesem Verfahren sein. Um 22:40 Uhr, oder sobald Sie soweit sind, möchten wir mit dem Laden von Batterie A
حسنًا. خطوتان أخيرتان. الخطوة السادسة: ابقَ على هوائي عالي الكسب في هذا الوضع لمدة دقيقتين. لا تُبدّل إلى وضع OMNI خلال هاتين الدقيقتين، وحافظ على إعدادات وضع الصوت والبيانات. نتوقع ألا تتجاوز مدة انقطاع الاتصال 15 دق
Nous avons le
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tem
Eh bien, nous
好的，比尔。这会写在你的飞行计划第2-22页。对于指令舱驾驶员——我已经跟他提过了——在页面顶部，大约在……的位置，我们希望他进行一次对准，然后按计划完成。这四颗星是南河三、轩辕十四和天象座α星，我们意识到天象座α星可能不太好找，轩辕十四在地
Вид Луны, который мы наблюдаем в последнее время, просто потрясающий. Она занимает приме
Okay. You want CB - CB,, t
巴兹
Ав
And, Houston? Buzz here. I'm showing 3.78 psi, 63 percent, no flags, adequate, slig
CB CTE, MAIN A 
यह तो वाकई बहुत बड़ा है, है ना? ठीक है, मैं इसे करने के 
J'ai 140 degrés ici. Et la températ
Okay. Und die Telemetrie
Ist es so? Na ja, ich sehe hier gerade wirklich etwas Schlechtes – einen schlechten Bil
Okay, Jim. Das schien be
연소 상태에 문제가 있는
Okay. 
नहीं, हम 
مراراً وتكرار
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अनुरोध करें और स्वीकार करें, और हम आपका स्टेट वेक्ट
Jim, wir möchten bestätigen, dass die hohe Verstärkung sichergestellt ist, die S-Band-Antenne auf OMNI
Insure that the automatic light control, the ALC switch on the came
ठीक है। पैनल 4: टेलीकॉम, ग्रुप 1, AC1 से कनेक्ट करें। निम्नलिखित सर्किट ब्रेकर बंद करें: ग्रुप 1 दबाएँ, मेन B; ग्रुप 2 
Роджер. Верхний сли
Alrig
11, Houston. We'd like to advance the time on that
Aquarius, Houston. After the OMNI switch, we would like you to get the ranging off
Hier spricht Fri
Ну вот, вы только начинаете видеть окрестности. Я вижу части Центральной Америки, и там, похоже, довольно ясно. Острова Карибского моря начинают появляться, и видны довольно длинные облачные полосы. Похоже, что у берегов Гренландии образовалась система с большими облачными потоками, простирающимися на юго-запад. Восточное побережье США только сейчас начинает показываться, и, насколько я могу судить,
Okay, we have good T/M. Hold up a se
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 다음번에 롤 0 지점을 지날 때 정지할 예정인데, 그러면 90도 피치가 됩니다. 제가 이해한 바로는, 플랫폼 정렬(
Roger, Frank. Restez en atten
حسنًا، فهمت. سأذهب إلى أنتاريس أولًا ونجرب. كما تعلم، جربنا ذلك في المرة الماضية، لكنني تمكنت من التقاط صورة واحدة قبل أن يختفي القمر تمامًا في الضباب الأبيض. سأحاول مرة أخرى، وإذا لم ينجح الأمر،
D'accord. Reçois ça, 
एक मिनट रुकिए, फ्रैंक। हमने देखा कि आपका रवैया कुछ ज्यादा ही आक्रामक हो गया है, 
While I'm here, let me -
Das Gebiet links aus dem Fenster ist eine relativ ebene Fläche mit zahlreichen Kratern von 1,5 bis 15 Metern Durchmesser und einigen kleinen, schätzungsweise 6 bis 9 Meter hohen Hügelkämmen. Darüber hinaus gibt es Tausende kleiner Krater von 30 bis 60 Zentimetern Durchmesser. Einige hundert Meter vor uns sehen wir kantige Felsblöcke mit etwa
...अब आ रह
Roger. Blood-pressure start, nob'. My status is good. The capsule status is good. Furl is
Okay, auf Seite 17. Die Last bei minus 4 Minuten durchführen; dazu CB(11), Wechselrichter 2, Schließen, und „Wechselrichter 1 auswählen“ markieren. Die Drehzahlskala wurde auf „25 Grad pro Sekunde“ geändert. „Ausbalancieren“ wird deaktiviert; und übrigens, Charlie, beim Thema Dämpfungsraten kommt die Diskussion über die Übernahmen wieder hoch, die wir vorher hatten. Wir könnten besprechen, was es uns DELTA-V kostet, wenn wir ein
收到，特兰奎利特。地面收到。你们那边有好几个人都快吓死了。我们总算松了口
Он сейчас надевает шляпу. Чья это пр
那是老款的南冕座星，显示得非常清晰，还有努基星。南冕座星就在它应该在的航线上。我读到的是0度偏航，5度左滚，处于反航向。我真想知道为什么这么复杂。在那几个家伙上方，我应该还能看到另一个明亮的星体。那一定是，一定是牛郎星。很好。你甚至会感觉这次飞行你并没有真正飞越澳大利亚。好的。现在让我们看看，我们已经完成了对那几个家伙的偏航检查，他们即将到达广州。这次他们遇到的情况比预想的
誰のことが読めるの
Your blood pressure was received. B
现在
D'accord, Apollo 8. Il est un peu tôt pour vous donner des chiffres précis sur les performances de votre système de communication. Il semble fonctionner comme prévu, et tout le reste semble alle
روجر. قمتُ بإعادة صيانته، وضبطتُه على الوضع التلقائي - تدفق الماء على الوضع التلقائي؛ وانخفض ضغط البخار إلى الصفر مجددًا. لذا حاولتُ إعادة صيانته للمرة
Хорошо. Температура на входе вторичного радиатора составляет около 70-72 градусов; на выходе радиатора около 30; температура испарения гликоля около 65; давление пара максимальное, давление на выходе гликоля около 9 psi. Температура в вторичных накопительных костюмах около 52 градусов; в кабине около 58 градусов; давление в костюме 4,1, в кабине 5. Парциальное давление CO2 чуть больше 1, около 1,1. На боковой стенке дома температура 72 градуса, гелий 3500; N2 A 2300; N2 B около 2450. Топливо около 165; топливный элемент 1, оба закрыты, давление нулевое. Температура кожи 405 градусов; показания на выходе конденсата ниже. Топливный элемент 2 — сейчас у нас показания расхода кислорода или водорода от 0,13 до 0,14, при этом расход кислорода сейчас зафиксирован на максимальном значении, хотя он менялся в зависимости от работы двигателей, что также привело к понижению напряжения на основной шине A от стабильного значения около 1,1 до максимального значения. Температура кожи около 445, а на выходе конденсатора 17, поправка, 180. Давайте 
Хорошо. Значит, пе
Meglio così, Jack. Continua con la tua rilettura
روجر، أعد ذكر ارتفاعك من فضلك. لقد ان
好的。在辅助回路
9, 8, 7, 6, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1. Burn i
加油，休斯顿
ठीक है, चार्ली। यह ज़्यादा खुला न
Ok. Ricevuto, Jim. Ottimo. Sai se Jack ha scattato qualche foto dall
حسنًا. نعم، انسخ كل ذلك. أعتقد أن لديك أربع أو خمس علامات على مقياس الطاقة، 
알겠습니다, 선장님. 따뜻하게 지낼 방법을 알아냈습니다. 지금부터 전원을 공급하기로 했는데요, 먼저 준비 
好的。杰克，我可能要跟你再检查一遍，因为这份清单在我们各种操作流程中已经写过两三遍了。顶行前两个
R
角度の変更や修正については、しばらく
Apollo 8, während wir auf den maximalen Gewinn warten, setze ich die Zusammenfassung der Flugbahn fort. Wir können immer noch von der Dreizehnten aus die Mittelpazifiklinie erreichen, und Sie sind nach 138 Sekunden Brenndauer auf dem Weg. Das sind 138 Sekunden, damit Sie die Butterfly-Region verl
Это подтверждается. Сначала я быстро пройдусь по времени основных событий, а затем мы вернемся и уточним некоторые детали. Хорошо. Вход в атмосферу запланирован на 142 часа 40 минут; примерно за 6,5 часов до этого мы начнем весь процесс, включив питание нагревателя, проверив температуру в модуле управления и предварительно прогрев его при необходимости. Мы предполагаем, что нам, вероятно, потребуется это сделать. Подробные инструкции будут опубликованы позже. Примерно за 6 часов до этого мы начнем включать питание, используя модифицированный 30-минутный контрольный список, который вы использовали для предыдущего промежуточного этапа. Затем, незадолго до 5 часов до этого, мы попросим вас принять положение для выравнивания по оси тела, используя терминатор Земли, как мы делали раньше; И как только мы это получим, мы выполним маневр -7, который, судя по всему, сейчас будет представлять собой примерно 2 фута в секунду или около 15 секунд работы двигателя. Мне сказали, что сейчас скорость снизилась до 1,5 фута в секунду, так что это вполне в пределах допустимых значений. Хорошо. После этого мы немедленно начнем маневр по сбросу служебного модуля, который будет в плоскости, поскольку мы сбрасываем его раньше, чем обычно. Нам не нужна и нежелательна внеплоскостная составляющая. Таким образом, он будет в плоскости, а служебный модуль будет направлен обратно вдоль радиус-вектора. Затем мы начнем подготовку командного модуля к запуску, включая проверку командного модуля и запуск двигателя, и примерно за 4 часа 30 минут до или мы сбросим служебный модуль. Мы будем держать самолет поднятым, пока не получим доступ к сервисному модулю... и попытаемся сделать несколько фотографий, но мы не будем возиться с маневрами перемещения для получения снимков, потому что не хотим испортить угол траектории полета в это время. Хорошо. Это дает нам примерно 2 часа свободного времени, чтобы закончить, если мы опоздаем, перейти к контрольному списку и подготовиться к включению командного модуля. Мы начнем полное включение командного модуля за 2 часа 30 минут до конца. Мы подключим компьютер, поднимем самолет, начнем передавать ваши векторы состояния и так далее, и выровняем платформу командного модуля. Примерно через 1 час 30 минут, самое позднее, у нас будет час на выполнение этих действий с командным модулем, мы начнем маневр по сбросу. Затем вы начнете закрывать... Конечно, у нас не все места для хранения будут сконфигурированы задолго до этого. Мы закроем люк, проведем проверку герметичности, и за 1 час до захода (141 час и 40 минут) сбросим его. Как только мы это сделаем, вы можете начать маневр по определению положения при входе в атмосферу. Когда вы окажетесь там, проверьте положение с помощью секстанта, снимите оптику, и в этот момент мы предоставим вам вашу окончательную площадку для входа. Вы можете инициализировать систему, и в этот момент вы, по сути, вернетесь к контрольному списку. Есть одно небольшое отличие от вашего номинального входа. Вы немного раньше утром, поэтому, когда вы доберетесь до места, будет ночь
Roger. De plus, set numéro 2, set numéro 2, changez l'
아니요. 세상에
好的，杰克。从上开始。好的。低温储罐；H2 1 和 H2 的读数都是 230。我们的 O2 低温储罐 1 看起来勉强维持在 300。低温储罐 2 的 H2 1 读数是 73，H2 2 是 74。在 O2 方面，我们读取到 O2 1 的量为 76；O2 的读数已达到满量程高位。辐射温度：主入口温度约为 55；辐射出口温度约为 30；次级出口温度为 52 度。蒸发
收到。我要飞到上空
रॉजर। मैंने आखिरी हिस्सा मिस कर दिया, 
Хорошо. Есть предпо
Yur
阿波罗1
好的。你的动力
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie können mit Ihrem Computer zu B
シグマセブン、シグマセブン、こちらはムチア・キャップ・コム。読み方は？オー
Apollo 8, Hous
Okay. For the mid-Pacific, the general condition is good. You can expect cloud bases 2000 foot scattered, visibility 10 miles, wind 070 at 12, wave heights 4 feet, altimeter 2974. Sunrise 10 Zulu, and first light 16:49 Zulu. ship will be Yorktown; the aircraft will be Airboss number 1 and 2, and Recoveries 1, 2, and 3. The estimated time to a the ship is - Yorktown is on the target point, Airboss aircraft 15 minutes and will be on-scene commander. Recoveries 1, 2, and 3 are SH3 Alfas, and they go with the Yorktown, so they are at the target point. All of them have swimmers aboard. If the recovery ai
Roger. Zur Information: Wir passieren gerade den Krater Langrenus und fahren 
W
Для этого потребовалось совсем немного — примерно н
أبولو ١٣، هيوستن. يبدو أن المناورة ستأخذك مباشرةً من 
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿
मैं इसे बाह
Когда смотришь вниз, со
Eagle, Houst
Nous allons vous enregistrer
11، هيوستن. وصل ب
Sfortunatamente, abbiamo solo una finestra con vista sulla Terra ed è occupata
It 
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 2, /: 46427, -053, +141, -01350, +
收到。您将在77°04′10″（大约40秒后）穿过45号公路西行方
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 2분 남았습니다. 달 반대편 좌표는 80 33 21이고, 우호적인 백색 팀이 달 뒤에서 나오면 여러분을 맞이할 것입니
休斯顿奥德赛。你们做得一切都对。G&N 号列车可以出发了。完毕
제가 한번 찾아보겠습니다. 물론 창문을 통해서도, 망원경으로도 봤습니다. 제가 한번 
लगभग 47 मिनट बीतने के बाद अब रात के समय में प्रवेश 
우리는
了解しました。さあ、
इनमें से कुछ छोटे गड्ढे धंस जाते हैं - लगभग 2 या 3 इंच तक। सर्वेक
你……只
لماذا لا تستخدم PCM، منخفض، ولا 
……格林威治标准时间22
Amicizia Sette, non provo alcuna sensazione di assenza di peso, se non molto piacevole. Nessun effet
Roger. Nous constatons une légèr
Позвольте мне закончить. Хорошо. Так я и думал. BAT Charlie BAT CHARGE/2, 
不，我不想那
حسناً، 
Ok, Houston; Aquarius. Sto tornando indietro verso gli angoli iniziali che mi hai dato, con un beccheggio di 257. Mi avvicinerò alla fascia addominale i
この
Ok, Vance. Questo è il modulo di comando per: filtro e sacchetto della ventola della cabina; sac
Und 3-D zeigt einen Wert v
Rig
好的，迈
Il dit comprendre pourquoi
哦
ठीक है, वैंस, हम अभी कुछ नहीं कर रहे हैं, बस उत्सुक हैं। हम प्रवेश प्रक्रिया शुरू कर सकते हैं और सब कुछ व्यवस्थित कर सकते हैं, और फिर जब 55 घंटे पर टीवी चालू हो जाएगा, तो हम इसे सिर्फ टीवी के लिए इस्तेमाल कर सकते हैं, और हमें एसएचई टैंक के दबाव और ऐसी चीजों की जांच करने की चिंता नहीं करनी पड़े
Да, включено. Передатчик сей
로저
Ricevuto. Ci stiamo lavorando. Non ci sono state trasmissioni dalla Base Tranquility dall'ultima volta che ci siamo sentiti. Non possiamo fornirti un ripetitore completo in banda S senza la garanzia di un'antenna ad a
आप लोगों के
西格玛七号，西格玛七号，这里是穆
दक्षिण अमेरिका के दक्षिणी छोर पर, नीचे बादलों का एक बड़ा बवंडर सा दिखाई दे रहा है। यह किसी भयंकर तूफान ज
好的。如果您现在方便的话，我想看一下氧燃料电池的吹扫过程。您
Fred, wegen dieser improvisierten Lithiumhydroxid-Kanister fü
क्या आप बस एक मिनट इंतजार कर सकते हैं? मैं अभी इवेंट 
Roger. Ora met
अपोलो - कोलंबिया, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आपके मानचित्र निर्देशांक 
Bene. E abbiamo una piccola aggiunta alla procedura che vi è stata letta prima, che prevede il trasferimento di po
Neil, qui è Houston. Se ci leggi, ti suggeriamo di smontare un'ante
Roger. J'ai vos informations de changeme
Вот он, тот с
알겠습니다. 그럼 PRO를 켜고 5018이 깜빡이는 걸 보면, 여기서는 일반 모드 대신 자동 기동을 해야 하니까, PRO에서 GUIDANCE, PNGS, MODE CONTROL, AUTO를 선택합니다
13号，
我们得确保自己不会陷入那
Vance, mi hai detto di
좀 더 자세한 정보를 얻기 위해 잠시 보류하겠습니다. 곧 더 자세한 내용을 알려드리
نعم. كانت أولى دوراتنا على المقود كالتالي: 007 للأمام، 005 لليسار، و007 للأعلى. أما الدورة الأخيرة فكان
Roger. Mike, quando stavi giocando con il qualche tempo fa e abbiamo ridotto la deadband, abbiamo dato per scontato che fosse centrata sul nuovo assetto che avevamo in q
まだ要件がある
休斯顿。双
और
Il tempo impiegato dal fuoco di retromarcia all'inversione dell'angolo di inclinazione è di 10:54. 
Forza! Vai a dormire! Senti, tra un
Okay. Es sieht so aus, als würde es allmählich auf nahezu null ab
하룻밤 자고 나니, 해치를 여는 것에 대한 생각이 달라졌나요
Roger. Flyby SPS/G&N: 62815, plus 097, minus 020 070 54 5944, minus 00028, plus 00023, plus 00069, 269 149 312 NA, plus 00221 00078 001 00034, 01 21
わかりました。皆さんにはこの点について知っていただき、飛行計画にどのような影響があるか考えていただきたかったのです。広角で月についてコメントし、どのセクションが最も適切だと思うか確認します。さて、フランクはスクロールで、進入プロファイルが表示される順番を確認してほしいと言っていました。最初に表示されるプロファイルは「非退出番号2」と表示されており、これは短距離高速進入です。2番目に表示されるのは「3500マイル」と表示されており、これも高速進入ですが、長距離進入を行う場合に使用します。3番目のプロファイルは「非退出番号1」で、その後ろに3500マイルのプロファイルが続きます。つまり、4つの進入プロファイルがあります。1番と3番は短距離、2番と4番は長距離のスクロールです。コールドソークについては、そこで何をするか話し合ったと思いますが、1時間ほどでコールドソークの作業に入りたいと思っています。12時にやるつもりは絶対にありません。軌道計算担当者と話をしたところ、水が沸騰する現象についてどう思っていたかということですが、覚えておいてほしいのは、彼らは軌道図上で水が飛び散ったり沸騰したりする様子を見ているということです。これは、軌道が大きく変動しているという事実ではなく、彼らの計算スキームによるものだと思われます。ですから、もし水が沸騰するのであれば、軌道修正がどうなるかが分かっている中間軌道の直前に行うのが妥当かもしれません。中間軌道修正の直前に水が沸騰する現象を
Ok. Aspet
أبولو 8، هي
نجم المحور هو الأرض، أسفل 037، يمين 22، زائد 10 68، ناقص 165 00 128 56 361 18. نجوم المحاذاة: النجم الرئيسي هو الشعرى اليمانية، والنجم الثانوي هو رجل الجبار 010، 294، 320، بدون فراغ، مسار العودة، 8750. هذا يؤدي إلى المحيط الهندي ويتطلب إجراءً عالي السرعة، أي ناقص مايك ألفا، وهذ
Demain, Charlie, nous allons réorganiser notre rangement au plus près de la configuration nominale. Voici quelques éléments qui ne seront pas conformes: les visières ont été remises dans le module de commandement, mais nous n'avons pas encore trouvé leur emplacement. Nous vous indiquerons où elles seront rangées. De plus, environ 2,5 kg de matériel divers provenant du compartiment Able 8 remplacent les LCG que nous avons dép
아, 저기 있군. 수평선을 놓치고 있었어. 설마 보조 스캐너가 지금 꺼진 건 아니겠지? 그럴 리가 없어. 어떻게 되는지 보자. 이 구체는 완전히 빗나갔어. 안녕히 주무세
حسنًا يا جيم. نحن نناقش هذا الأمر معك؛ إنه موضوع أردنا طرحه عليك. لقد فكرنا فيه مليًا، ورأينا هو
Voici Friendship Seven. La lumière est encore très vive à l'horizon: orange en bas, une couche jaunâtre, puis bleue, et enfin très sombre
Roger. Sie lassen weiterhin Sauerstoff aus dem Flüssigsauerstofftank ab, der nicht für den Antrieb benötigt wird. Die Abluftöffnung wäre dann radial gegenüberliegend. Die Booster bestätigen mir, dass es sich um das kontinuierliche Entlüftungssystem handelt. Außerdem wird derzeit eine kleine Menge Treibstoff abgelassen. Bis zum Brennvorgang sind es noch et
ठीक है। हीलियम का दबाव लगभग 37 है, मैनिफोल्ड का दबाव 182 है, और मात्रा 80 दिखा रही है। B का तापमान लगभग 112 है, हीलियम का दबाव लगभग 36.5 है, ईंधन का दबाव 180 है, और मात्रा लगभग 77 है। C का तापमान 140 है - वैसे, अन्य
यह सकारात्मक है। मित्रता सा
迈克，这会对我们的
Примерно то же самое, Фре
Okay. As I read you we get the gray tape and fold it so that we get - the back sticks around the outside of the canisters, then we mount to that four sides of our... cards like our... cards; then we overlap those cards down around the base of the canister. Then we - then we... over the... at the top.... Then we take the towel from the old ones and put the
Хорошо. Следующие два, три, четыре остаются без изменений. Затем
روجر. لقد ظهر بوضوح أكبر بكثير من خلال السدس مقارنةً بالمنظار الأحادي، وكان من الواضح تمامًا أنه خلية واحدة في المراحل الأخيرة من نموها. لا بد أنه ارتفع إلى أكثر من 50,000 قدم. يتميز شرق البح
Ok
ठीक है। यह उस प्रक्रिया का दूसरा चरण होना चाहिए। रात 10:40 बजे, या जब भी आपको समय मिले, हम बैटरी A को चार्ज करना शुरू करना चाहेंगे। और रात 10:10 बजे, हमारे पास आपके ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन के लिए एक अद्यतन स्थित
Громко и ясно, «Аполло
Okay. Du bist jetzt sehr schwach. Wenn du bere
Хорошо. Начальный компьютер - ТОЛКАНИЕ. Платформа - СКОРОСТЬ ОРБИТЫ. Положен
Roger. Eagle. We concur. Stand by on the gimbal angles. And also, Eagle, while we'
Вперед, продол
Понял. Это «Дружба Семь». Мой статус: я в действии, но он не всегда держится. Проблемы с рысканием изменились. В первой части полета, когда у меня были проблемы над западным побережьем США, у меня были проблемы с рысканием, не было малой тяги влево; теперь у меня есть тяга в этом направлении, но нет малой тяги вправо. Когда капсула отклоняется от курса в этом районе, она переходит в режим высокой 
Columbia, Houston. We have a update for y
जैसे ही बूस्टर हमसे अलग हुआ, रोल नोजल से ईंधन निकलते हुए दिखाई दिया। बूस्टर जैसे-जैसे घूमता रहा, लगभग उस तल में जो अंतरिक्ष यान के मुख्य अक्ष से बूस्टर तक जाने वाली रेखा के लंबवत था, उससे निकलने वाली लंबी, लहराती हुई पूंछ दिखाई दी। मैं अपने उड़ान योजना पर इसका एक छोटा सा चित्र बनाऊंगा। अंतरिक्ष यान के अलग होने पर चारों
And, Houston, I'd suggest that along the ecliptic line we can see the corona light out to two lunar diameters from this loc
结果是阴性。我没打开它。在完成这些读数之前，我不会打开它。Phecda 现在在中间位置，也就是雾霾层和地面之间的中间位置，数值为 1.7，已经消失。好的，Woomera，我的——我的状态非常好。宇航服温度正在大幅下降。蒸汽排放口的温度下降不多，但宇航服环境温度为 60 度。我感觉很舒适。舱内温度为 101 度；舱内指示压力为 4.8；氧气含量为 75-100%；所有直流电源仍然良好，电流为 20 安培；两个交流母线都正常；燃油读数分别为 46% 和 40%。我处于漂移飞行状态。我已经喝了足够的
Ok, bene. Il passo successivo è ancorare il nastro, e il modo in cui vogliamo che tu lo faccia è tagliare circa 60 cm dal rotolo e poi strapparlo nel senso della lunghezza in modo da ottene
Rog
아마 아내분들이 어떤 말씀을 하셨는지 궁금하실 거예요. 닐, 제니는 어제 있었던 일에 대해 이렇게 말했어요. "저녁은 믿을 수 없을 만큼 완벽했어요. 남편, 승무원, 유인 우주선 센터, 미국 국민, 그리고 모든 인류와 함께 달 탐사의 시작이라는 장엄한 경험을 나눌 수 있어서 영광이고 특권입니다." 그러자 제니에게 달 착륙이 인생에서 가장 위대한 순간이었는지 물었더니, "아니요, 그건 우리가 결혼한 날이었어요."라
ठीक है, ओडिसी; ह्यूस्टन। हम आपके लिए तैयार हैं, बस आपको तैयार हो जाइए और वार्म अप कीजिए। बाकी सब ठीक रहा तो, हम चाहेंगे कि आप अपनी चेकलिस्ट के अन
अरे, एक मिनट रुको, जैक। तुमने पेरीसिंथ
That's correct, Jack. Okay, that's it. And I think we're about ready to go with this procedure wheneve
존
さあ、ヒュース
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 이제 다음 시간 이벤트까지 3시간밖에 남지 않았습니다. 그러면 소위 달 관측 자
Rog
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. The window, attitude indications, and periscope all check right together in good shape. I can see the dark side coming up in the periscope back behind me at present time. Cabin pressure is 5.5 and holding. Cabin temperature is 95 [degrees]. Relative humidity is 28 [percent]. I have turned the cabin--my suit temperature onto the increased water position for more cooling. Steam temperature is presently indicating 61 [degrees]. Oxygen is 75--100 [percent]. 
Roger. Houston, Apollo 8. Je vous reçois fort et clair. plan 24136 179 045 001 515 105196 35569 357 091 001; plus 10, aband
Roger, Bill. Wir haben hier unten eine Menge Kassetten
D'accord, Jack. Bien reçu. Merci beaucoup. Au f
比較のために、別のヌル バイアス テストの結果を適
ठीक है, बिल। यह आपके उड़ान योजना के पृष्ठ 2 पर होगा। कमांड मॉड्यूल पायलट के लिए - मैंने उसे पहले ही बता दिया है - पृष्ठ के शीर्ष पर, लगभग, वास्तव में, हम चाहते हैं कि वह एक संरेखण करे, और फिर बाकी काम निर्धारित समय पर हो जाना चाहिए। वे चार तारे, प्रोसियोन, रेगुलस, अल्फार्ड, और हम जानते हैं कि अल्फार्ड शायद उतना अच्छा तारा न हो, रेगुलस क्षितिज से लगभग 3 डिग्री ऊपर है, और स्पिका 48 डिग्री के ट्रनियन कोण पर है; तो मेरा मतलब यह है कि अगर जिम को इन चारों तारों में से प्रत्येक पर एक सेट करने में कठिन
Roger, Aurora Seven. Ich habe Ihre Anweisungen zum Steuermodus verstanden: Gyro-Käfig; Kraftstoff 45–42 %; Sauerstoff 79–100 %; den letzten Teil Ihrer Übertragung 
はい。もうすぐ終わりで
جيميني 
Фред, у нас уже есть для тебя эта история, практически полностью готовая. Мы сейчас её изучаем. И я хотел бы отложить этот вопрос на потом. В общем, мы просто выключим двигатель и будем использовать то, что есть, а у нас есть средняя траектория со ск
अंतरिक्ष से मानवयुक्त मौसम पूर्वानुमानकर्ता की यह आपकी प
Bene. Questo ci fornisce una buona piattaforma. Ora la manovra per l'assetto di scarico, e l'unica cosa importante qui è che bisogna assicurarsi che il percorso scelto per l'assetto di scarico eviti il ​​blocco del giunto cardanico sulla propria piattafo
Okay. Mein Radar ist gut; ich kann dich nur 
저기 아래쪽에 볼트 몇 개가 풀린 것 같은데, 기억이 나면... 제
지금 기온은 약 67도이고 우리는 쾌적합니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요
발사체 유도 시스템 모두 양호한 상태인 것으로 보입니다. 발사체 유도 차단 확률은 99% 이상으로 예상됩니다. 따라서 모든 것이 매우 잘 유지되고 있는 것 같습니다. 참고로 MLA는 약 1분간 사용 가능한 TV 영상을 수신했습니다. 즉, 시스템이 정상적으로 작동하고 있는 것으로 보입니다. 카나리 성단 가시거리까지는 1분 남짓 남았으며, 타나나리브 관측 지점까지는 2시간 9분 18초가 남았
Roger
好的。我们复制了波斯湾的宽度，我想我能提供的第一手数据只有一个，那就是今天早上休斯顿这里天气晴朗。这只是一个相当局部的观察结果。由于你们的废水排放，似乎模式受到了一定程度的干扰。我们目前显示
Роджеру, 13 лет. Из-за сбоя датчика количества кислорода во втором баллоне, он хочет более тщательно контро
يا إلهي، دعني أستعيد 
Вп
روجر. سأنتقل إلى الصفحة 33. بقي 4 دقائق. حسنًا. بالانتقال إلى أسفل الصفحة، ستجد السطر 7 تقريبًا، إلى "مثبت المحرك": "مثبت المحرك، إيقاف". ثم انزل إلى "التحكم في الوضع"، واجعله "التحكم في الوضع:
当然，前提是你掌握了新的信息。否则，我就沿用之前
Questo è con
वाह, माइक! बहुत बढ़िय
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, this is Houston. Ov
Das ist nur die Hälfte. Den Großteil haben wir versteckt. Es war ziemlich interessant, die ganze Kameraarbeit hier zu erledigen, um etwas zusätzliche Übung im Umgang mit dem Fernseher zu bekommen, hoffentlich für den Einsatz vor Ort in Fra Mauro. Der Monitor macht es aber wirk
O
هل قمت بتقليد مولي برا
Roger. The adapter batteries are all reading 2 on the amps and 24 volts. The RCS rings are holding up well. The Secondary O2 bottles are 
콜럼비아, 휴스턴. 제 마크
I can see a black fire down on the desert. You can see right down to the very source where it's coming from. I couldn't see exactly what it was, but it made a very, very distinct mark on the ground. I've taken several S-5 terrain pictures as we crossed the 17. Feels like we've got a failure in magazine no. 7. It feels like one of the dogs isn't catching down on the film or the film's bailing up
जेमिनी VI, ह्यूस्टन। अभी आपकी स्थिति बहुत कमजोर है। क्या आप अपना 
L'appareil photo 
하!
Bene. Al momento, Houston, la tensione è... sembra buona. E abbiamo sentito un botto piuttosto
Данные о выра
جيد جداً. 
我们正在使用六分仪
Роджер. Тебя разбудил 
阿波罗8号，在我们等待高增益期间，我将继续进行轨迹概要。我们仍然可以从13号返回太平洋中线，你们将在点火138秒后开始返回。138秒足以让你们脱离蝶形区。我们建议在20秒后不要尝试预点火或重启。如果超过20秒，轨迹可能会超出修正范围——修正能力足以让飞船自由返回。回收区的天气状况良好。我们有跟踪和无跟踪两种情况。在点火过程中，由于储罐中的燃料耗尽并流入集油箱，你们可能会注意到燃烧室压力和储罐压力略有变
罗杰八世。我完全听懂了。我有一些信息要告诉你。准备好
罗杰，63（度
Buongiorno, Frank. Sembra che abbiamo perso il trasduttore della temperatura di uscita del radiatore primario. Stiamo mostrando un valore fuori scala. Il resto del circuito sembra comunque a posto. Quando hai tempo, potresti dargli un'occhiata e vedere se sei 
De plus, j'ai parfois essayé d'observer les étoiles sous différents angles solaires, mais à cette altitude, c'est très difficile. Dans le télescope de balayage, le soleil et la Terr
これまでのすべてを振り返っていただけま
Roger. Stiamo manovrando per posizionarci per la TV. Bill l'ha sistemata nella finestra di ritrovo di sinistra di Frank, e io sono al posto di Bill e guardo fuori dalla fin
여기에 카나본
Question, Joe. Jim m'a parlé de la façon dont on va procéder en cours de route, et il y a quelque temps, lors de la mise sous tension, on a coupé le disjoncteur du s
Roger. I'm reading you loud and clear. I'll 3, 4, 5, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1. How d
Auf den Stichwortkarten steht eine Nummer. Wir haben keinerlei Ambitionen, uns mit den Profis zu messen, glaubt mir. Wir fühlen uns hier oben aber sehr wohl. Wir haben ein richtiges Zuhause. Es ist genug Platz für uns drei, und ich glaube, wir finden alle langsam unsere Lieblingsecke. Schwerelosigkeit ist sehr angenehm, aber nach einer Weile hat man es satt, ständig gegen Decke, Boden und Wände zu stoßen. Dann sucht man sich eine kleine Ecke, zieht die Knie an oder so, um es sich gemütlich zu machen, und das fühlt sich dann gleich viel 
Et nous allons diffuser environ 10 minutes et 30 secondes. Je vous r
Okay. Nächste Seite, Stromkreis 7, Schalttafel 16. Erste Reihe: Schließen Sie die vier QUAD-TCA-Leistungsschalter, also QUAD 1, TCA; QUAD 2, QUAD 3 und QUAD 4 TCA. Oka
阿波罗8
Il pannello di immissione è il seguente: Mid-PAC, 000153, 000;, 178; meno 21,66, meno 165,37; 28. Le quattro colonne successive sono N/D; DO è 4,00, Zebra Libra, o qualcosa del genere, Beta Libra è giù 08,8, sinistra 0,4; vettore di salita su; ingresso allineato, stelle 31, 33. Rollio 041, beccheggio 045, imbardata 024. Da utilizzare il modello di non uscita; mantenere l'assetto di controllo della Luna fino al tramonto della Luna. E se tutto il resto è perduto, l'ingresso g costante è c
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티 기지. 모든 소모품은 양호합니다. 모든 면에서 좋아 보입니다. 환기 중인 것을 확인했습니다. 모든
Horizo
Brennst
Die Kabinentemperatur steigt
离焊接开始还有20分钟。哦，不好意思，是10分钟——离焊接开始还有
네, 몇 가지 지시 사항이 있습니다. 전원을 켜셔도 됩니다. 컴퓨터를 켜고, 전원을 공급하고, 레이더를 대기 모드로 전환하겠습니다. 5분 후에 
अपोल
玛
방금 우리 바로 앞쪽으로 별똥
GMT를 기준으로 2시 1분 15분 55초 47을 읽고 있습니다. GMTRB는 16시 05분 31초입니다. 선회각은 좌측 55°, 우측 65°
Die meisten von ihnen b
ええと、グラウンドは51.5、私たちも5
现在屏幕中央的陨石坑就是韦伯望远镜。在它动力下降前大约6分钟，我们
로저
Charlie, on a vérifié la longueur des câbles, 
好的，水瓶座。我
روجر، منذ 15 دقيقة. جيم، سأشرح لك الإجراءات العامة للعودة إلى الغلاف الجوي. ستتلقى تحديث 63-1 وتفاصيل مرورك التالي فوق الولايات المتحدة من غاس. الإجراء العام بعد إطلاق النار العكسي هو: الدوران إلى الوضع الطبيعي مع توجيه مقدمة الطائرة للأسفل، للحصول على أقصى ارتفاع للرفع حتى 400 ألف قدم. سنحدد لك زاوية الارتفاع التي يجب عليك تثبيتها حتى 400 ألف قدم، ثم نود منك الدوران بمعدل 15 درجة/ثانية حتى يرتفع مؤشر الارتفاع عن الحد الأقصى أو حوالي 100 ألف قدم، ثم العودة إلى أقصى ارتفاع للرفع مرة أخرى حتى الو
好的。现在到旁边。CB 11，面板 11 和 
- そしてそれが私たちが持っていた唯一の理論でした - それは良い理論のように見えました
О, это выведет нас пр
COMM
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. 
了解。どうやら、今の状況だと、この前方を避けるにはもう少し小さな機動をする必要があるかもしれない。も
हे फ्रेड? ये जेटिसन बैग एकदम एयरटाइट
أما بالنسبة للتعريضات، فنحن نبحث عن ثُمن ث
Houston, Apollo 11. We've got the continent of Africa... facing toward us right now, and of course, everything's getting smaller and smaller as time goes on. The Mediterranean is completely clear. The Sun looks like it's about to set around Madagascar. The equatorial belt of Africa stands out quite clearly. We're seeing the dark green or a muddy colored green, compared to the sandier colors in the southern tip of Africa and, of course, the Sahara northern coast of Africa. There'
分かりました。モニターには映らないので、カメラに修正を加えることになりますが、場合によ
On the powering up. I went to gyros normal, finally, after getting gyros set at approximately three zeros
حسنًا. هذا يحل مشكلة تفعيل سخان الماء الرئيسي، وحسب فهمي، كنا سنقوم بإدخال البيانات الفعلية مع وجود كل من سخان الماء الرئيسي والثانوي 
Houston, wir haben den Brennvorgang bei 7,7 + X + 00001 Y durchgeführt; alle Z-Werte sind Null. Gimbal-Winkel: Rollen 180°, Nicken 310° und Gieren 02
ठीक है। फ्रेड, मैंने इसे कॉपी कर लिया है। और हमारे थर्मल विशेषज्ञ इसकी जांच करेंगे। मध्यमार्ग सुधार के संबंध में हम जिन बातों पर चर्चा कर रहे हैं, उनमें से एक यह है कि हम इसे SHe टैंक के फटने से पहले नहीं करन
جيميني 4، 
Roger. Ich wiederhole e
Вы подождите, а я буду создавать нулевое смещение в течение 100 секунд. Хотите, чтобы я включил автомат
We're considering powering down the but we want to know what capability you have to do a coarse and fine aline. We read your conversation about being unable to see out the window very good. How abou
Das ist bejahend
Ed, ba
Мне кажется, на крышке объектива есть несколь
Ok. BATTERIA 1, ALTA TENSION
알겠습니다. 이 점을 알려드리고 비행 계획에 어떤 영향을 미칠지 생각해 보시길 바랐습니다. 달에 대한 광각 영상과 설명을 다시 보여드리고 어떤 부분이 가장 적절할지 의견을 들어보겠습니다. 네. 프랭크는 진입 프로필이 표시되는 순서를 확인해 달라고 했습니다. 첫 번째 프로필은 "비출구 2번(Nonexit Number 2)"으로, 단거리 고속 진입 프로필입니다. 두 번째는 "3,500마일(The 3,500 Mile)"로, 역시 고속 진입 프로필이지만 장거리 진입 시 사용하게 됩니다. 세 번째 프로필은 "비출구 1번(Nonexit Entry Number 1)"이고, 그 뒤에 네 번째 3,500마일 프로필이 나옵니다. 따라서 총 네 개의 진입 프로필이 있습니다. 1번과 3번은 단거리 진입 프로필이고, 2번과 4번은 장거리 진입 프로필입니다. 콜드소크에 대해서는, 우리가 어떻게 할 건지 이야기했던 것 같은데, 대략 한 시간 안에 콜드소크 작업을 시작해야 할 것 같습니다. 12시에 바로 하고 싶지는 않죠. 궤적 담당자들과 물 끓이기 현상에 대해 이야기를 나눴는데, 그들이 궤적 그래프에서 물 배출과 물 끓이는 현상을 볼 수 있다는 점을 명심해야 합니다. 궤적이 심하게 교란된 것이라기보다는 그들의 계산 방식 때문에 그렇게 보이는 것 같습니다. 그래서 물 끓이기 작업을 해야 한다면, 모든 추적이 안정되고 중간 코스 수정값이 확정된 후에, 중간 코스 직전에 하는 것이 좋을 것 같습니다. 중간 코스 직전에 작업을 하면, 중간 코스 수정 
Роджер. Еще одно замечание: поскольку это вызвало много споров на совещаниях по приоритетам данных, похоже, что наклон оси на 10 градусов вверх — это оптимальное положение для получения горизонта, чтобы можно было следовать за ор
Frank, sei proprio come pensavamo prima. La luce del tuo dock oscura completamente le luci ACQ
물병자리님, 2분 때도 멋
Роджер. 
E 
Voilà où nous en s
That's negative, Mike. If you'll look at the plot, which we'll save for you and let you see it postflight, it started off immediately on the first REV and just spiraled out to about - oh 20 to - 20 degrees in pitch, and then it seemed to be setting up a spiral around an offset pitch point of about 20 degrees off from 90 degrees; but we didn't want to take a chance that it would become stable at that po
T1 時間と T2 時間
So, hier haben wir etwas Kakao; das sollte gut sein. Ich gebe etwa 150 ml heißes Wasser dazu. Das 
Ici Friendship Seven, en direct de nuit. Un instant. Friendship Seven, en direct de nuit, effectue des observations nocturnes. Il semble y avoir une couche nuageuse très élevée au-dessus de l'horizon, bien plus haute que tout ce que j'ai pu observer de jour. Les étoiles semblent la traverser avant de redescendre vers l'horizon. Elle paraît avoir une largeur d'environ 7 ou 8 degrés. Je distingue les nuages ​​en dessous, puis une bande sombre, puis une bande plus claire que les étoiles traversent en descendant vers l'horizon. Je peux identifier les constella
이거요? 이건
好的。在单引擎推进器（SEP）启动前 
من المؤكد أن المرء يشعر وكأنه ينظر إلى أعلى من مستوى نظره عند هذه الوضعية، وإذا لم يكن هناك أفق، فستبدو السماء سوداء حالكة. كمية الضوء في قمرة القيادة عالية جدًا. بمجرد أن
好
All right, Buzz. It's - flyby i
Vos mouvements font réellemen
광도계를 다시 사용할 수 있을 만한 곳에 놓아두겠습니다. 현재, 각속도는 거의 정확히 음수입
Roger. Pourquoi ne pas relire ce groupe de mots, et ensuite nous pourro
Okay. Dovresti riuscire a vede
रेटिंग दें, उच्च स्तर पर अ
2口径が来
D'accord, Jim. Je ne voulais pas aborder ce sujet car nous ne sommes pas encore prêts à recommander une procédure. Nous ne pouvons pas mettre le CM sous tension conformément à la procédure habituelle, car l'ampérage est insuffisant. Il se peut que nous vous demandions 
Okay, 13. Per cominciare, ho apportato una pic
D'accord, Joe. Si je comprends bien, à 74 heures, nous allons effectuer un contrôle par rapport au Soleil au niveau du cran 2, ce qui nécessitera de dégager le radar de rendez-vous. Nous utiliserons la manœuvre automatique pour y parvenir, ou du moins pour calculer les angles de sortie. Si le résultat est satisfaisant à 1 degré près, vous confirmez que la plateforme est apte pour la manœuvre et qu'aucune autre ne sera nécessaire. Même si tout est en ordre, vou
Ok. Per la prima volta notia
2986. حسنًا. نحن جاه
Понял. И нас интересует влажность в салон
Ok. Noi... La vediamo solo come una porzione luminosa del disco lunare, e assomiglia molto a come la vedi dalla Terra. Mo
Salut Houston, Apoll
रॉजर। आपको यह जानकर शायद दिलचस्पी होगी कि बीच वाली खिड
Хорошо. Мы никуда не спешим. На самом деле, это очень приятная обстановка. Солнце находится внизу, поэтому оно не светит сквозь 
Negativo, sembra tutto pulito. Immagino che non abbia molto senso sottopormi a degli scanner, visto che qui sto procedendo pi
E quella vecchia tuta laggiù ha una temperatura di 55°, banda S-CONTINUA, band
Роджер. У нас есть небольшой визуальный эксперимент с использованием лазера, который мы хотели бы для вас провести. Если бы вы смогли увидеть Землю через окно или 
罗杰。现在，点火姿态会显示在屏幕上，但基本上，我们正在寻找局部水平逆行点火，这意味着，如果你把水平线放在地球的角上，然后滚动使 X 轴指向太阳的方向，我们就能得到点火姿态；你可以
1 34 37. Vogliamo avere una combustione 
Роджер. Бо
好的。收到。根据目标着陆点理解：T1，104 32 18；T2，104 37 28，以及南边 
I guess that's the config - Stand b
Хорошо. А пока я снижу обор
И, думаю, мы ответили на пятый вопрос. Мне кажется, у нас ни раз
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 아름다운 일몰을 봤는데, 북쪽 지평선까지 빛이 저 멀리까지 비
Durch das Summen entsteht die Illusion, man säße in einem Zug oder einem anderen Fahrzeug und hätte das Gefühl, auf einer Art Schiene zu fahren. Ähnlich dem Geräusch eines Schiffes auf See. Das Gebläsegeräusch und die Wechselrichter erzeugen vermutlich dieselb
سأستخدم الآن تكبيرًا منخفضًا. تصحيح: تكبير عالٍ على المنظار، انظر كيف يبدو؟... انحرفت نحو اليمين حوالي 5 درجات. انظر كيف تتطابق مع المنظار في هذه المرحلة. لنفترض أن محاور الانحراف (المؤشر) عند حوالي 10 درجات إلى اليمين، في هذ
Хорошо. Цель состоит в том, чтобы перенести векторы состояния и на земную сферу. Глагол 37 ВВОД, 23 ВВОД. В, в, загрузите в регистры 1, 2 и 3 следующие числа. Регистр 1, 00002; регистр 2, пять шаров; регистр 3, 00210. Шаг 3: 
L'ASCS sembra a posto, tutti i propulsori fly-by-wire sembrano funzionare bene su tutti gli assi. Prossimamente... sto iniziando a smontare l'attrezzatur
Ro
C'est exact. Notre première manœuvre de pilotage était: 007 en avant, 005 à gauche et 007 vers le haut. La manœuvre finale à mi-parcours était: 004 en avant, 06 à droite et 003 vers le haut. Cela correspond assez bien à la trajectoire prévue. Nous sommes légèrement en dessous de la ligne nominale de la trajectoire à ce moment-là. Au freinage, nous avons généré un delta-V de 27 pieds par seconde. Il y a 27 pieds par seconde à l'arrière, soit un 
Близнецы VI, CSQ. Вы говорите о воде — замерзшая вода поя
Questa è l'Apollo 8, in diretta dalla Luna. Abbiamo dovuto cambiare telecamera. Prima vi abbiamo mostrato una vista della Terra, così come la stavamo osservando da 16 ore. Ora cambiamo in modo da potervi mostrare la Luna, che abbiamo sorvolato a 96 chilometri di altitudine per le ultime 16 ore. Bill Anders, Jim Lovell e io abbiamo trascorso la vigilia di Natale qui a fare es
- - Mach
مرحباً أبولو ١١، هيوستن. لاحظنا بعض الأمور الغريبة في مُحوّل مؤشر تدفق الأكسجين. لدينا شكوك حول المُحوّل - كنا نتوقع أن نرى تدفق أكسجين مرتفعاً عند فتح صمام تهوية تخزين النفايات على وضع "التهوية". لكن هذا لم يحدث. لاحظنا أي
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. На данный момент вам разрешено сбросить отходы, и, насколько я понимаю, это 
了解。了解しました。どうもありがとう
Die LEDs an meinen Fingerspitzen befinden sich genau an meinem ersten
好的。那么，刚才说的复古火力
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 이 송신은 거의 1:1 정도 남았습니다. 다시 말씀해 주시겠습니까? 
휴스턴
Колумбия, Хьюсто
Okay. Molto bene. E mentre ne parlate, potreste rileggere: avete la procedura per invertire la situazione? Ve la
잠시만 기다려 주세요, 제가 가져다 드리겠습니다. 즉, 사용할 수 있는 연료가 좀 더 있다는 뜻입니다. 그래서 지금 다른 추적 작업과 비행 계획에 포함시킬 몇 가지 사항을 작업 중이
أبولو 8، أبولو 8، هيوستن. 
Roger. Abbiamo un piccolo esperimento visivo laser che vorremmo farti fare. Se... se riuscissi a vedere la Terra attraverso una delle tue finest
Forza Houston, Gemelli
11日、ヒューストン。現在の予報では、回復エリアの気象状況は良好です。高度は散在して 2,000 フィート、高散在して、風向は 070 度、風速 13 ノット、視程 10 マイル、海面は約 4 フィートです。昨日の予報では、熱帯暴風雨「クラウディア」がハワイの東 500 ～ 1,000 マイル付近に発生するとされていました。昨日の午後に地球の衛星から撮
はい、大丈夫です。コンピューターテストもご
حسنًا يا جيم. هذه شروط تعويض الجيروسكوب. لقد تم تحميلها بالفعل، ونحن الآن بصدد تحديث جداولك الموجودة على 
Gemini VI. Ready 
И, кстати, вы можете использовать тень, которую отбрасывает посох, чтобы ***привести его в перпендикулярное поло
حسناً. بعد ذلك، أعطيتُ واحدة أخرى. البطارية رقم ٢، جهد عالي، إيقاف/إ
Проявите инициативу и узнай
अरे, शायद आपने यह साबित कर दिया
Jim, das haben wir verpasst. Sag es nochma
Can't see a thing, Gus
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Примерно от 4 минут до 1 часа, и я поставлю вам отметку в 1 час. Был ли необходим предварительный прогрев команд
Хорошо, вот. Уберите это, и мы пройдемся
D'accord. Je vous tiendrai au courant de nos avan
了解。燃料は1.0、酸化剤は0.25。OXアンバランスの値は減少傾向にあるが、これはあまり意味がない。ヴァンス、そこまで押し込んだわけじゃないと思う。加速度計の動きはあまり見なかったし、インジェクターバル
收到，鹰
مساء الخير. أودّ أن أناقش معكم بعض الجوانب الرمزية لرحلة مهمتنا، أبولو 11. فبينما كنا نناقش الأحداث التي جرت خلال اليومين أو الثلاثة الماضية على متن مركبتنا الفضائية، توصلنا إلى استنتاج مفاده أن هذه الرحلة كانت أكثر بكثير من مجرد رحلة ثلاثة رجال إلى القمر؛ بل وأكثر من جهود فريق حكومي وصناعي؛ وأكثر حتى من جهود دولة واحدة. نشعر أن هذه الرحلة تُجسّد فضول البشرية جمعاء الذي لا يشبع لاستكشاف المجهول. وأعتقد أن مقولة نيل قبل أيام، عند وطء قدمه سطح القمر لأول مرة: "هذه خطوة صغيرة لرجل، لكنها قفزة عظيمة للبشرية"، تُلخّص هذه المشاعر خير تلخيص. لقد قبلنا تحدي الذهاب إلى القمر؛ وكان قبول هذا التحدي أمرًا لا مفر منه. وأعتقد أن السهولة النسبية التي أنجزنا بها مهمتنا تُعدّ دليلاً على توقيت هذا القبول
どういうわけか、こ
谢谢
Roger. Che ne d
そ
ターミナルフェーズ経過時間 1+29+17; 燃焼開始点 5+16+54; デルタV 33.0; 燃焼時間 41秒; コア25 00301; コア26 90135; コア27 00016; デルタV 32.9, 1.5, 1.5; 燃
唯一的问题是，我们目前在这方面的账目记录得不太
Und übrigens,
حسناً.
BMAG MO - BMA
حسناً، سأفعل ذلك
Va ben
好的，Buzz。这次飞行的目的是飞掠。SPS/G&N：62815，+097，-020 070 54 5944，-00028，+00023，+00069 029 149 312，远地点不适用，+00221 00078 001 00034，六分仪星 01 2385 227，视轴星不适用。纬度为-0265，-16500，11899 36228，144 56 47。备注：你设定的星体是天津四和织女星，坐标为007 144 068。没有空隙。这是
Ho (illeggibile) ho qualcosa (illeggibile) Retro Power. Ricorda che abbiamo sempre avuto quella cosa fuori
Okay. We copy tha
Sai, se allineassi l'imbardata, la allineerei pr
W
D'accord. Nous prévoyons, à l'heure nominale de votre prochaine manœuvre de mi-parcours (soit 2 heures avant l'entrée en vol), une poussée de 1,4 pied par seconde, 
حسنًا. سنكون ضمن نطاق تغطية الطائرة هنا خلال دقيقة تقريبًا. سيحاولون هذه المرة البث عبر نطاقي S و
Forza Houston, Ge
Un altro elemento relativo a una procedura di malfunzionamento. È improbabile che dobbiate preoccuparvene domani, ma nell'elenco dei malfunzionamenti, alla voce "attracco" a pagina F11 9, è presente una procedura di malfunzionamento per un flusso di O2 elevato nella parte superiore di - sotto il tunnel
حسناً يا جاك. نحن بصدد تنفيذ إجراءات إيقاف تشغي
What is your report on descent stage venting - Was it venting? Anything else goi
C'était difficile d'y entrer et un peu difficile d'y revenir aussi. Mais c'était vraiment quelqu
हम थोड़ा नीचे जा सकते हैं। जिम ने ऑप्टिक्स में पृथ्वी को शामिल कर रखा है, इसलिए हम थोड़ा नीचे जा सकते हैं और शायद किसी एक के काफी करीब 
컴퓨터는 우리 거예요. 지금 BLOCK 수업 중인데, TV 볼륨을 
अपोलो 8, अपोलो 
Horizo​​n チェック
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。我们希望在您方便的时候接受您的请求。我
わかりました
알겠습니다. 히터 4개는 모두 닫히고, 디스플레이는 열리고, S밴드 안테나는 닫히고, 카메라 시퀀스는 열리고, 디스플레이는 열리고, DC 버스 전압은 닫히고, 인버터 2는 열리고, 상승 ECA는 닫히지만 상승 ECA 제어는 열리고, 하강 ECA는 닫히고, 하강 ECA 제어는 닫히고, 대향 버스 타이는 닫히고, 크로스 타이 버스는 열리고, 밸런스 로드는 닫히고, 배터리 공급 타이는 닫힙니다. 잭, 질문 하나 드
حسنًا. سأضع ذ
Роджер. Мы хотели бы немного сбалансировать криогенные баллоны. Так что, если вы сможете перевести переключатель нагревателя кислородного баллона № 1 в положение «ВЫКЛ», а переключатель нагревателя во
它们挺有意思的。
イーグル、ヒューストン。大丈
Роджер, Брюс. Спасибо. Мы ждем телевизор. Мы все подключили. Мы еще не включали его. Мы готовы сделать э
Ça a l'air d'aller beaucoup m
자, 이제 제가 이해하지 못한 부분이 하나 있습니다. MDC 5로 가서 A 입력 - AC 인버터, AC 버스 1, 리셋, 그리고 중앙으로 이동
You can tell Cape Sir John that we ha
OK. Nous partons tout de suite pour le SEF et nous commençons à sortir tout notr
好的。就在13点钟下方。另外，我
सेकेंडरी कूलेंट लूप वाकई बढ़िया लग रहा था। ऐसा लगता है कि आपका रेडिएटर अच्छी तरह से कसा हुआ था और बाकी सब कुछ परफॉर्मेंस कर्व के अनुसार सही ढंग से काम कर रहा था। हमारी जाँच के दौरान आपके दोनों मुख्य ऑक्सीजन रेगुलेटर 104 psi पर भरे हुए थे। चंद्र कक्षा को देखते हुए, प्रति घंटे लगभग 1 पाउंड पानी उबलने की उम्मीद है, और यह सिर्फ एक अनुमान है; पानी उबलने की आवश्यकताओं के बारे में अनुमानों में काफी विविधता है, यह बहुत अधिक उबलने से लेकर बिल्कुल न उबलने तक कुछ भी हो सकता है। अगला पानी का निकास इसके बाद होगा, इसलिए जब तक आप लक्ष्य प्राप्त नहीं कर लेते, तब तक आपको इसकी चिंता कर
ठीक है। बस आवाज की पुष्टि कर रहा हूँ। कृपया सक्रियण चेकलिस्ट में उस पृष्ठ का नाम बताएँ जिस
Роджер. 
Houston, Apollo 8. Einflug wie folgt: Mittelpazifik, 357 152 359 268 plus 0813 minus nächster Block nicht anwendbar, 400 0212 0025 0334 0814 16059 312, Zeta Persei, 165° nach oben, 35° nach rechts oben, Nichtausstiegsmuster verwenden, Backup-Ausrichtung; Sirius, Rigel, Rollen 308°, Nicken 209°, Gieren 357°, und wir werden es 
Мы бы хотели, чтобы они вы
I thi
آه،
Хорошо. Отлично. Это была действительно
D'accord. Donc, v
نعم. لا تنس
로저. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 컴 테크 캔턴입니다. 연료 90~100%, 산소 73~101
11，休斯顿。供您参考，这两条记录是对您已上传至系统的
طبيعي. درجة حرارة المقصورة — 9
Dovremmo usare quell'ossigeno e non sprecarlo
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है, जो अंधेरे में प्रसारण कर रहा है। पेरिस्कोप में पीछे से सूर्योदय हो रहा है। पेरिस्कोप में यह बहुत चमकीला दिख रहा था, क्षितिज के पास आते हुए और ऊपर आते हुए यह चटख लाल रंग का था; और जैसे ही मैंने खिड़की से बाहर देखा, मुझे कैप्सूल के चारों ओर हजारों छोटे, चमकदार कण घूमते हुए और लगभग 3 से 5 मील प्रति घंटे की रफ्तार से मुझसे दूर जाते हुए दिखाई दिए। अब जब मैं तेज धूप में बाहर हूँ, तो वे गायब हो गए लगते हैं। यह ठीक उसी समय हुआ जब सूरज उग रहा था। अब भी मुझे उनमें से कुछ ही दिखाई दे रहे हैं, हालांकि सूरज क्षितिज से लगभग 20
Хорошо. Давайте так и сделаем. У меня тут есть один. Мне всё рав
了解。これはプラス90パッドです。/G&N、63825、マイナス1.54、プラス1.32、マイナス0491.7、プラス0000.1、プ
Ich nähere mich der Retro-Stimmung. Ich schwinge mich in die Retro-Stimmung hinein; und hier eine gute Aufnahme des Sustainers. Er befindet sich genau im optimalen Ber
罗杰。我确实看到阴天下有一些白色，我确定那一定是你们
Okay, in der vierten Reihe befinden sich alle QUAD HEATER-Leistungsschalter, SUIT FAN 1, darunter GLYCOL 1 und 2; und unter COMM befinden sich COMMANDER AUDIO IN, s/, STANDBY und OPERATE. Das war's. Okay, in der untersten Reihe befinden sich die BAT FEED TIE-Leistungsschalter
음, 누군가의 OAMS 레트로 버전을 구했어요. 누구 건지
حسنًا. عندما يصبح الوقت المتبقي 10 ثوانٍ، قم بتشغيل نظام الهيليوم لل
और, केन, अगर आपका साथी ओम्नी-स्विच गेम खेलना चाहता है, तो हम इस समय डॉग-ब्रावो पर हैं, असल में ब्रावो पर तो हैं लेकिन डी के लिए भी कॉन्फ़िगर किए गए हैं - सुधार, हम ड
Okay. Based on your vector, the vector
Ricevuto. Confermiamo il tuo flusso e comprendiamo che ora
Roger. Tu vas 
При фиксации заднего положения радар может быть направлен в сторону плюса X, и я буду использовать правый задний угол. Это но
罗杰。我先去收拾
アポロ8号、ヒ
Ora vediamo. Cosa dovremmo fare qui ade
ح
Houston, Apo
Давайте теперь просто подведем итоги ситуации. Мы больше ни
Мы работаем над этим, Фрэнк. Мы пытаемся вычислить, что будет находиться в радиальном направлении в ближних терминах. Теперь у вас по-прежнему Земля — как я понимаю, плюс Y и плюс Z квадранты. Другими словами, она
— А шок от разделения — шок от взрыва пиротехники при разделении — поднял его до 100 с лишни
D'accord. J'ai remis à zéro l'aiguille de roulis et l'aiguille de tangage, et je suis maintenant en lacet (roulis à gauc
Sì, credo che sia quello che hanno discusso sul cam
Bene, posso dimostr
Comment s'est pas
わかった。ジャック、
然后滚动 180 度，之后我们再讨论降调
分かりました。ジョー。ニュースについては、ジムが少し待っ
هل يمكنك التفكير في أي ظواهر تهوية طبيعية قد تحدث، مثل خزان 
Ha, ha. Ich nehme an, ein altes Lied wie „Drifting and D
AS
Derselbe Kerl, der heute Nachmitt
페이지 상단에 38단계가 있고, 그 바로 아래 39단계 이전에 1차 글리콜 루프를 활성화해야 합니다. 글리
Roger, in questo momento sta inserendo la sonda per la
जब मैंने तुम्हें वो निशान दिया, बस
D'accord. Je vais relire. COMPRESSEURS DE COMBINAISON 1 et 2, ARRÊT; POMPES
درجة حرارة الهواء الجاف تتراوح بين 72 و79 درجة. وقبل ذلك بقليل، تراوحت بين 75 و77 درجة. أما درجة حرارة الهواء الرطب للمجموعة الأخيرة فكانت بين 57 و61 درجة. والمج
ये 
Légère inclinaison vers le haut à 02:19:13. Je la remets à zéro. Commandes de vol
ありがとうございます。1時間半
حسنًا. ما زلنا في الصفحة E-9، 
Cape Com Tech. Sigma Sev
了解。軌道修正その4：11月のアルファ星/62888、マイナス00012、マイナス00011、プラス00012、031、008、323、プラス00618、00020、011、00020、17、2965、308、アルファ・ケンタウリ、上073、左34。星は、主星シリウス、副星リゲル、129、
휴스턴, 내가 이걸 땅에 박아 넣으려면 얼마나 세게 쳐야 하는지, 한 5인치 정도는 들어가는데, 잘 보고 있길 바라
好的。也没什么特别的。嗯，我们先从体育说起吧，管它呢。太空人队以8比7险胜，勇士队在第九局得了五六分，但他们最终还是赢了；当天另一场重要的比赛，小熊队因为下雨取消了。其他比赛的比分我都有，你要哪一场可以告诉我。马尼拉和吕宋岛其他地区发生了地震。发生了三次震动，建筑物摇晃了大约半个小时，震级大约是里氏5级。好的，我们来看看
Bon sang, ça me met en rogne. Mon Hasselblad a disparu. Retrouvez-le avant qu'elle ou moi ne… Cherchez tous un Hasselblad qui flotte. Je vois aussi un stylo qui f
Pourri
부정
Réfléchis bien, Jim. Il dit qu'il aurait pu glisser le long du conduit de 
Understand you
Zwilling
Roger. Wir werden das Teleobjektiv nicht benutzen. Ich glaube nicht, dass wir die Erde fotografieren können. Wir werden wohl nur die Mondoberfläche, also den Ter
Ne me dites pas que cette boussole fonctionne? Je devrais en dire plus. Ce que j'ai fait, c'est utiliser une source de lumière standard. À ce stade, pour la capsule, pour mon visage puisque je regarde droit vers le haut, la boussole oscille vraiment dans le plan de l'axe de roulis. J'a
Und 13, Houston. Wenn Jack wach ist, würde ich gerne kurz mit ihm dar
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on your own, that's the place we'd like to break off and let you go ahead and take over with your own alinement. However, we are giving you a procedure which will give you things we know you can see in the telescope without worrying about any reflections or anything of that nature, and it's not intended that this procedure has to be followed past the point where you know you've got good definition of star patterns in your telescope. If you n
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir sehen uns jetzt. Es kann ein paar Minuten dauern, bis Sie die von uns angegebenen Vektoren integriert haben. Wenn Sie nicht WIG-schweißen, ist die Empfindlichkeit recht gering. Sie können die Temperatur einfach auf WIG hochfahren lassen, und sobald der Wert Null err
手臂约束装置收起。好的，肘托收起，腰带解开并
Go ahead and delete the remainder of the 's that you're working on now, go back to attitude, and then pick up where it says in the flight plan to pick up again there with your, or if you prefer to slip that time a couple of hours, i
Columbia. Hier ist Houston. Für Ihre Ladung in R2 benötigen wir eine 0 und vier Einsen, also
निशान
Yes, it did. We were showing you remaining well within a circle of 10 degrees radius throughout the night. Seems to be workin
Apollo 8, Houston. W
Comme le dit « Ole Leonov », je travaille (illisible) dans l'espace. Ce n'est pas grand-chose, mais je 
Привет, Бермуды, привет, Bermuda CapCom. Friend
За э
Okay, why don't w
Ah, je vois ces courants… ces courants… ils sont descendus dans les piles à combustible… 
Fred, ça a l'air bien, mais ils n'ont pas encore eu le temps de tout analyser. Ils devraient avoir fini d'examiner les graphiques d'ici une quinza
Und wieder brauchen wir eine kleine Lagekorrektur. Unsere Erde verschwindet nach oben und rechts. Unsere Erde und deine Erde. In die falsche Richtung, in die falsche Richtung. Noch ein bisschen. Okay. Das ist gut, wenn du sie so halten kannst. 
Jim, Neil est là. Il vous informe que vous n'aurez pas besoin de la lampe pour le
Roger. Puoi indicarci meglio la posizione di questa Zeta Persei? Non ce l'abbiamo segnata sulle nostre carte. Abbiamo Mirfak e conosc
Okay.
了解。時計がス
Attendez… attendez une minute. Attendez
Всё выглядело именно так, как я и ожидал, Джо. Она стояла в программе REA
좋습니다. SEP 자세로의 기동은 2+56+37초, 즉 4분 후에
Хорошо. Вход: область в центральной части Тихого океана, 357 152 359 268, плюс 0813, минус 16503 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028, не применимо четыре раза, другими словами, DL MAX, DL MIN, VL MAX и VL MIN - все не применимо. 0590 312. А ваша вихревая звезда — Дзета Персея, которая находится посередине между Мирф
Roger. Bien reçu. – Je ressens encore environ 3 g. La capsule fonctionne parfaitement. La commande de vitesse est stable. L'altimètre est opérationnel. L'attitude est très sta
了解。また次
罗杰。我想我们能看
Vor uns befindet sich in diesem Tal ein sehr dunkler Krater im Füllmaterial. Er ist insofern ungewöhnlich, als er zwar scharf abgegrenzt ist, seine Innenwände aber vollständig dunkel sind, während die meisten neu aussehenden Krater ein sehr helles
Ро
罗杰。
Roger
了解しました。180 021 002、該当なし、プラス 00188 28972 251 28793 40 2769 
Très bien, j'ai environ 3 secondes de r
Roger. We tried to put that other red filter in fro
알겠습니다. 어댑터에서 간단히 카운트다운해 드리겠습니다. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 - 이제 안테나 선택, 재진입(REENTRY
Flight affirme qu
E, Aquarius; Houston. Ho un modulo 
Friendship Seven, Canaveral Com
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous pensons avoir identifié la cause du problème de réacquisition rencontré lors de la précédente révision. Il semblerait qu'il s'agisse d'un problème d'alimenta
روجر. أنا أستمتع كثيراً هنا بالانجراف. أستمتع به لدرج
D'accord, et à la page suivante, la 29, en haut à droite, rayez « Photo target 13, nord à 5,6, 250 », etc., toute cette ligne. Et rayez e
Gemini 4，休斯顿 C
Roger. Les MSC-2 et -3, en rotation avant et arrière, commencent à 23 heures et 49 minutes. Fin à 15 minutes sur la rév
好的。开始。127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 度/秒 105. 2+13.
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. В тот момент мы зафиксировали 84 градуса, а в тот — 80. Посмотрим на л
わかりました。これは高速帰還のためのペリシントス+2です。これは/62871、マイナス161、プラス129、プラス45224、マイナス06216、マイナス18712 001 287 351、11月のアルファ星プラス00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296、地球上010、右37、プラス1475、プラス06500 13239 36913です。主星はシリウス、副星はリゲル129 155 010、アレージなし、中間軌道修正4の実行を前提とし、
Ça s'annonce bien, Frank. Nous venons de recevoir un nouveau lot de données et nous sommes en train de les traiter. Il semblerait, pour l'instant, q
Aft DE
Base Tranquility, qui Houston. La nostra telemetria mostra che l'interruttore del braccio motore è attualmente in posizione APERTO. Vi preghiamo di lasciarlo aperto finché non sarà teoricamente previsto che venga inserito, ov
没错，吉姆。我
Columbia, Houston. Vous n'avez pas besoin d'en faire d'autre, sauf si v
Roger. ΔV90. 16 52 25.
Il dérive à nouveau en lacet. Terminé. Et une fois de plu
Хорошо, мы сейчас 
ジェミニ4、ジェミニ4、
Apollo 8, Houston.
Roger, 07:56 Uhr werden wir nördlich der Bodenba
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。荷物を運び込みました。コン
Ci vuo
Роджер. Тридцат
Okay, Jim. We are laying for you on that one; it is a subject that we wanted to - to bring up with you. We have been considering it, and our feelings are - Of course, it is up to you, but as we see the pros
प्रत्यक्ष विदेशी नि
Ich weiß nicht, ob Ed schon eins gemacht hat oder nicht; ich mache eins. Möcht
ニール、映像は鮮明です。画面下部に小さな白い点が見えるだけです。テレビ担当者によると、どうやらカメラの
我敢肯定，如果你在 50,000 英尺的高空，你肯定
是的。我们把固定位
On a fait une rentrée atmosphérique comme ça lors d'Apollo 8... Avec Houston, Buzz a allumé les réchauffeurs du module de commande et les a laissés allumés. Les activateurs ont crié « Shooo! » pour les deux réserv
ALIMENTATION ASCENTE, FERMÉE, la pression se maintient bien; A
Rog, Roger. Vi leggo tra un po', vi leggo tra un po', qui alle
Apollo 13, Houston. Canari dans 30 secondes
そうです、まさに先ほど話していたこと
3時26分33秒に、空に10個の粒子が見えること
روجر. انتظر لحظة من فضلك. في رحلة أبولو دي-9 ا
Okay. Well, that takes care of the questions from our geo
好的。翻到下一页和最后一页，吉姆，34。页面顶部写着“通过470监控DELTA-VX”。划掉接下来的两行：“当推进剂数量等于37时”和“下降氦气调节器”。划掉“指挥官，减少到10%”。现在我们要你添加一行：“关闭”——这是关闭标准，“燃烧时间减1秒时关闭”
13, Houston. I
알겠습니다, 찰리. 17, "CB(16
فريندشيب سفن، فريندشيب سفن. هذه قناة إنديان كوم تك على نطاق التردد العالي والعال
Molto piccole, direi che sono nell'ordine di 4 mm o meno. Si muovono vicino alla finestra e riesco a vederle 
11, Hou
रॉजर। हम तैयार हैं। मुझे लगता है कि इस 
حسنًا. لدينا مهمة تتطلب منا القيام بـ والمضي قدمًا في ذلك في وضع الحد الأدنى من الدفع حتى لا نقوم بإدخال أي تصحيحات لتثبيت الوضع. وسنقوم بتتبع انحراف الوضع، ويريدون ذلك لمدة - حوالي 6 سا
D'accord. Si 
迈克，他们多久才能告诉我们中途飞行对我们
헬륨의 온도는 58도이고 압
..
Все режимы работы работают отлично. Температура в тепловом куполе скафандра составляет около 72 градусов, на входе в скафандр — около 63 градусов, немного снижается. Определенно, это оптимальная
Okay. Strom 5, Notabschaltung. Punkt 1, erst
كان ذلك معدل الأكسجين المرتفع لمدة دقيقتين تقريبًا لخفض الضغط عن الحد الأقصى. الآن
Sette, il nostro 
休斯顿，11。你正在
Это подтверждается. Добавьте это в начало страницы. Что мы на самом деле делаем... Давайте добавим это прямо перед "Активац
Roger, Mike. Ich möchte ein paar Anmerkungen zu den Daten machen. Das automatische Manöver war recht genau. Anscheinend haben wir während des Manövers einen substellaren Punkt getroffen; die automatische Optik hat Canopus genau an die richtige Stelle gebracht; die minimale Impulssteuerung hat wie erwartet funktioniert. In den Höhen, in denen ich mit den Beobachtungen begonnen habe, ist eine deutliche, dunstige Bandlinie zu erkennen. Der Filter verleiht der Erde einen orangefarbenen Schimmer. Es ist sehr schwer zu bestimmen, wo genau der Stern zu finden ist, aber es scheint eine klare Linie zu geben, wo man den Horizont vermuten würde. Diese Linie erscheint durch den Dunst hindurch, dort, wo wir die Atmosphäre vermuten. Ich bin dem Verfahren gefolgt, das wir am MIT angewendet haben: etwa zwei Linien oberhalb der Dunstschicht – eine klar
D
هذا تأكيد. نحن جاهزون للانطلاق. ما نفعله الآن يا جاك هو ترك المركبة الفضائية تنجرف ف
We are giving the 
请继续，吉姆
Sigma Seven, questa è Canary Cap Com. Trasmette s
Роджер, Хьюстон. Звонок с "Аполлона-11" примерно в 130 000 милях от нас. Мы медленно приблизим изображение с нашей камеры, чтобы получить максимально в
حسنًا يا بيل. قبل أن نقرأ التحدي
كولومب
Ruhe. Verstand
좋습니다. 두 단계만 더 남았습니다. 6단계, 이 모드에서 고이득 안테나를 2
सिग्मा सेवन, यह म
ठीक है। समझ गया। अगर मुझे इससे जल्दी बाहर निकलना है, तो मुझे पैनल 5 प
Bereit zum Kopiere
I've got the orange glow. I assume we're in blackout now. Gus, give me a try. There goes something tearing aw
Gemini 
D'accord. Il reste 20 secondes ava
It sure 
मुझे समझ आ गया है कि आपको S-5 पर एक और बार काम करने की जरूरत है और आपके पास S-6 की अच्छी खासी मात्रा है। क्या यह
जी हाँ, और चूंकि आप अभी भी एक घंटे की दूरी पर हैं, तो मुझे लगता है कि न्यूनतम आवेग (MI
حسناً. 
Aspetta un atti
حسناً. هل أضع مكعب LR هنا ت
了解
O2分圧が変動しています--4.2 [ps
هذا سيجما سفن. لست متأكدًا مما إذا كنت تدرك ذلك، لكنني كنتُ في وضعية
잭, 지금 프레드의 작업실을 보
D'accord. On n'est pas pressés. C'est même très agréable. Le soleil est couché, donc il ne brille pas à travers les fenêtres et ne chauffe pas l'appartement. On a une vue stable de la Terre par la fenêtre 1, de la Lune par la fenêtre 3 et, bien sûr, on est bloqués sur le sy
أب
Понял. И к вашему сведению, ваша текущая высота составляет 148 морск
क्या 
Ah, Roger, Friendship Seven. In welchem 
हाँ, बस एक तरह से हमने एक साथ कई बार एंटर दबाया, और फिर आप सबने 
좀 더 자세한 정보를
Go ah
그랬나요?... ​​그랬던가요?... ​​앞으로 
Okay, Joe. Verstehe, dass die JETT-Lage ähnlich wie beim normalen Abwurf des Servicemoduls sein wird, d. h. nach
Roger, die Überprüfung der Fly-by-Wire-Funktion ist 
Ea
यह छोटा सा टेप रिकॉर्डर हमारे लिए बहुत उपयोगी साबित हुआ है - चंद्रमा की यात्रा के दौरान समय बिताने में इसने हमारी बहुत मदद की है, और इसे ओडिसी में इस 
Roger. Listen, Charlie Duke wants to talk to you - to you about the star check; and, so that we can have good COMM, I'd like to reconfigure with the POWER AMPLIFIER circuit breaker in and the VOICE FUNCTION switch to VOICE and while we're at it, we'd like the RANGING FUNCTION switch to 
では、最初の星についてですが、補正高度は15キロメートル
Хорошо, Вэнс. Дай мне проверить, есть ли у меня это здесь. Для этого 
Kabinendruck und Kabinenhöhenmesser stimmen in der Höhe überein. Müsste jetzt 13.000 Fuß sein. Markierung 10; ich sehe, dass das Hauptsegel geöffnet und gerefft ist, sieht gut aus. Der Hauptfallschirm ist geöffnet. Das Landekissen schaltet jetzt auf Automatik. Der Bremsfallschirm ist abgefallen. Ich sehe einen einwandfreien Fallschirm, Visier geöffnet. Die Kabinentemp
Вы остаетесь в этом
Ему 
네, 제 생각엔… 뭔가 좋을
本日はこれ
了解しました。話が進む前に、二次蒸
ジェミニ4号、こちらヒューストンCAP C
रॉजर। आपकी कक्षा 87, 147 में बदल दी गई है। आप नाममात्र M = 4 के लिए तैयार हैं। तल में थोड़ा बदलाव होगा। हम आपको यह जानकारी बाद में देंगे और हम समझते हैं कि तापमान सामान्य से अधिक था, इसलिए हम आपको समय 
Okay. Mal sehen, ob ich das hier habe, 
好的，我已
Wir haben noch 1 Minute bis Tananarive; wir sehen uns dann wieder über Carnarvon. Ende
Разве это не 
Okay. Schritt 8 lautet: „In den Haltezust
那是你的吗
罗杰。烤牛肉和奶
알겠습니다. 밴스, 배터리 충전을 차단하는
... Non appena h
네, 알겠습니다. 필터 전문가들이 대기하고 있
रॉजर, माइक। फेजिंग टी.आई.जी. 103 
Avez-vous un voyant d'alerte de
This is Friendship Seven. Having no trouble
Roge
Buona velocità. 25.710
Хорошо, Джим. И я хочу передать вам краткую инструкцию по активации управляе
分かりました。ヒューストン、こちらは
शुभ संध्या। मैं आप सभी से अपोलो 11 मिशन की उड़ान के कुछ प्रतीकात्मक पहलुओं पर चर्चा करना चाहता हूँ। पिछले दो-तीन दिनों में अंतरिक्ष यान में घटी घटनाओं पर चर्चा करते हुए हम इस निष्कर्ष पर पहुँचे हैं कि यह केवल तीन मनुष्यों की चंद्रमा यात्रा से कहीं अधिक था; यह किसी सरकारी और औद्योगिक टीम के प्रयासों से कहीं अधिक था; यहाँ तक कि किसी एक राष्ट्र के प्रयासों से भी कहीं अधिक था। हमारा मानना ​​है कि यह अज्ञात को जानने की मानवता की अदम्य जिज्ञासा का प्रतीक है। नील ने कुछ दिन पहले चंद्रमा की सतह पर पहला कदम रखते हुए कहा था, "यह मनुष्य के लिए एक छोटा कदम है, लेकिन मानवता के लिए एक बड़ी छलांग है," मेरा मानना ​​है कि यह इन भावनाओं को बहुत अच्छे से व्यक्त करता है। हमने चंद्रमा पर जाने की चुनौती स्वीकार की; इस चुनौती को स्वीकार करना अपरिहार्य था। मेरा मानना ​​है कि जिस सहजता से हमने अपना मिशन पूरा किया, वह उस चुनौती को स्वीकार करने की समयबद्धता का प्रमाण है। आज, मुझे लगता है कि हम अंतरिक्ष
Ok. Pensavo che stessi chiamando, ma credo che laggi
Dovrebbe essere un bel momento. Dovrebbero essere un po' alla tua
I believe that's only if it hasn't been used for quite a while, K
Je voudrais dire un mot sur le sextant. Son utilisation dans un vaisseau spatial exigu est très difficile, surtout avec le casque. J'ai finalement conclu qu'il serait inutile, avec le casque, d'essayer de prendr
아니요. 두 곳
Okay, J
ठीक ह
Vediamo, voglio che gli interrutto
カーナボンです。二次冷却ループをオフにして、エバポレーターをノーマルにすることがで
ア
休斯顿，静海基地将就昨晚的地质问题作几点说明。我们降落在一个相对平坦的陨石坑区，这里分布着许多细长的次生陨石坑——圆形次生陨石坑，大多数陨石坑都有边缘，无论大小。当然，这并非绝对。周围也有一些较小的陨石坑没有明显的边缘。整个区域的地表物质是细沙到淤泥。我认为地球上最接近的物质是石墨粉。在这些地表物质中，分布着各种形状、大小、纹理的岩石，有圆润的，也有棱角分明的，许多岩石的质地也各不相同。正如我所说，我看到了看似普通的玄武岩和多孔玄武岩。还有一些岩石没有晶体，一些岩石则含有少量白色斑晶，含量可能在1%到5
Ha! Ha! Ich habe immer noch schwarze Bremsspuren an meinen Schwimmflossen von deinem Ausflug ins Buschland. Okay, du siehst, ich bin schon wieder nach rechts gegiert. Ich muss – Korrektur, nach links gegiert. Ich muss nach rechts, der Mond steht direkt am Horizont. Ich drehe ihn nochmal richtig, nur um dir zu zeigen, wie einfach das geht. Ich scheine noch genug Treibstoff zu haben, also probiere ich ihn mal ein bisschen aus. Okay, wir sind fast im Gierwinkel, aber immer noch zu weit in der Rollachse. Ich drehe sie kurz rein, dann haben wir's geschafft. Jetzt kommt die Rollachse, um sie wieder auszurichten. Gleich kommt die Rollachse – okay, ich höre jetzt auf. Besser geht's nicht. Hier noch ein bisschen Rollachse. So. So würde ich es machen. Okay, ich stelle die Kreiselsteuerung wieder auf Normal und lasse sie wieder in die Spur kommen. Ich werde jetzt alles einri
水
रॉजर। क्या आप इन्ह
Ricevuto. Ho cinque osservazioni. Numero uno, presuppone l'esecuzione della manovra di sorvolo; numero due, usa lo stesso allineament
Roger. Noch im Empfang. Bitte weiter. Apollo 11, hier spricht
分かりました。コンピュータをすべてのモードでチェックします。このチェックには 3 つの手順があります。まず、すべての IVI ウィンドウで 10 フィート/秒を入力します。次に、誤動作リセットを押します。次に、Start Comp を押して、Computer Running Light の表示を確認します。これをすべてのモードで実行します。繰り返しますが、コンピュータが動作しているという表示が得られない場合は、別のテストを実行します。この別のテストでは、すべてのモードでチェックします。コンピュータの電源を 2 秒間オフにします。コンピュータの電源を 2 秒間オフにします。コンピュータの電源が再投入されたら、手動の Malfunction Reset と Start C
Oui,
160 piedi, 6-1/2 giù - 5-1/2 giù, 9 avanti. S
Вы нас читаете? Апо
حسنًا. ربما أتصل بسرعة كبيرة. حسنًا. في المحاولة الثالثة، حصلنا على الأهداف 58 و63 و65. تم إنجاز التصوير التدريبي، وتم ذلك على المخزن D، الذي يحتوي الآن - تصحيح، هذا هو المخزن E - على 95 لقطة. المخزن D جديد. تم استخدام المخزن K أيضًا للت
बहुत बढ़िया। फ्ला
इसे आप तक पहुंचाना कोई बहुत जरूरी नहीं है। बस, इससे 
Je vais pr
Qual è il tuo resoconto sullo sfiato della fase di d
ठीक है। आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं कि पश्चिम टेक्सास स्थित मैकडॉनल्ड वेधशाला का लेजर लगभग 181 घंटे 30 मिनट से चालू हो जाएगा और एक घंटे तक चलेगा। जब भी आप 357 डिग्री का 
Подумайте о том, чтобы оставить Retropack включенным, вас об 
从显示器上看，光圈值似乎没问题。因此，我们
روجر. ما هو المبلغ الذي دفعه البنك العكسي في تلك الصفقة
로저. 공보실의 속보입니다. 아폴로 11호는 여전히 전 세계 뉴스의 중심을 차지하고 있습니다. 중국, 북한, 북베트남, 알바니아 단 네 나라만이 아직 자국민에게 당신의 달 착륙 소식을 알리지 않았습니다. 한 기자는 당신의 성공을 어떻게 표현해야 할지 더 이상 모르겠다고 했습니다. 오늘 저녁, 닉슨 대통령은 워싱턴에서 열리는 올스타 야구 경기를 관람할 예정입니다. 경기가 끝난 후, 그는 태평양 회수 지역으로 출발합니다. 수요일 저녁, 그는 헬리콥터를 타고 존스턴 섬에서 해군 통신함 알링턴으로 이동합니다. 그리고 목요일 아침, 다시 헬리콥터를 타고 호넷으로 이동하여 당신의 착수 장면을 참관할 예정입니다. 대통령과 함께 윌리엄 로저스 국무장관과 프랭크 보먼이 동행합니다. 그들은 태평양 사령관 존 시드니 매케인 제독과 함께 회수함 함교에서 착수 장면을 지켜볼 것입니다. 호넷에서의 체류를 마친 후, 대통령은 아시아 순방에 나서 루마니아를 방문할 예정입니다. 루나 15호는 어제 달 궤도를 52바퀴 돈 후 위기의 바다에 추락한 것으로 추정됩니다. 소련 통신사 타스는 "달 근지구 공간에서 과학적 연구가 수행되었다"고 보도했습니다. 조드렐 뱅크 천문대의 버나드 러벨 경은 루나 15호가 시속 약 480km(300마일)의 속도로 달 표면에 충돌했다고 밝혔습니다. 최근 베트남은 비교적 조용했습니다. 순찰 중인 미군 병사들이 여러분의 비행 중계를 듣기 위해 트랜지스터 라디오를 소지하고 있는 모습이 목격되었습니다.
13، نود منك و
حسناً. نجم السدس 2
はい。彼らはそのデータを入手し、車内が暖かく、温度計が高めの値を示しているときにDELTAがど
我不知道。太阳太刺眼了，格斯。我觉得我们还是别试了。埃德试过戴着头盔睡觉，一会儿戴上，一会儿又摘下来，现在他又把头盔戴上了。他受不了太阳。我也试过
Roger. According to our stowage list the - the landing site oblique should be in the transfer bag. In - But in the backup set of data, the intermediate scale oblique is in the lunar landmark book, and the large scale oblique is in the back of the lunar surface map 
이 기체는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 처음 운항을 시작했을 때, 요(yaw) 방향으로 자세 제어 모드에 들어가면 다른 축들이 틀어지는 문제가 있었습니다. 한동안 이런 현상이 계속되었는데, 기체가 천천히 오른쪽으로 기울어지면서 20도 정도까지 틀어질 때까지 아무런 수정도 이루어지지 않았습니다. 그러다가 갑자기 빠르게 자세를 바로잡고 20도 오른쪽 자세에서 왼쪽 자세로 돌아오는 현상이 반복되었습니다.
Roger. Understand. Pitch is 37 [degree]. You look real
13، هيوستن. نود منك فتح دائرة خلية الوقود رقم 1؛ اترك الخ
Ok. E hai ric
أفهم. نقوم بالإدخال دون الإفلات، هل هذا صح
Роджер. Джордж, я держу клапан охлаж
おい、マイク、待って。待っ
알겠습니다. 제 생각에는 만약 고이득이 기계적 한계에 도달하기 전에 스캔 한계를 확실히 넘어서는 것을 확인하면, REACQ 기능이 작동하지 않았을 경우 해당 기능을 꺼서 정지 상태를 유지하도록 
س
Okay. I got the POWER AMPS now, PC plus 2 hours, ; 38.030, plus 08330, minus 00509, minus 02139, N/A, plus 00205, 08615, 4:24, 272, 081; rest N/A. Ullage two jets, 10 seconds, weight 62480, weight 33452; throttle profile the same, 5 seconds idle, 40 percent at 21
Хорош
Oui. Ken, je me fais remonter les bretelles parce que j
Houston, Apoll
わかりま
休
Roger, Canton. Ero impegnato con le manovre qui. Non ti ho ancora dato il tuo rapporto, stavo preparando le luci e cercando di stivare tutto per il fuoco retrogrado. Ho il 45-45 [percento] di carburante, l'ossigeno è al 60-90 [percento], gli ampere sono 2
Очень, о
Нет. Сейчас переключусь на низ
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخي
Est-ce que ça v
D'accord, nous revoilà sur la bande UHF. C'étaient bien les lucioles que vous avez décrites au lever du soleil. Je n'ai pas particulièrement observé les couchers de soleil ces derniers temps. Par exemple, maintenant, quand je suis en plein jour et que je les observe, je vois appa
アクエリ
أواف
Б
फ्रेड, दो और बातें हैं। पहली बात तो यह है कि बर्न के दौरान आपके इंजन में शा
यह सिग्मा सेवन की केवल VOX रिकॉर्डिंग है। मैंने ऑटो मोड को सामान्य स्थिति में फिर से चालू कर दिया है, जिसमें थ्रस्टर का इस्तेमाल बहुत कम है। इस समय, यह 85 प्रतिशत ऑटो और 90 प्रतिशत मैनुअल मोड में है। और मुझे लगता है कि अब जब मैं तैयार हूँ, तो मैं कुछ ऐसे प्रयोग कर सकता हूँ जो पहले संभव नहीं थे। अब मैं कैप्सूल को फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड में नीचे की ओर ले जाऊँगा। सबसे पहले मैं यह देखूँगा कि अगर मैं अपने बीकन चालू कर दूँ, तो नीचे मौजूद कोई भी मुझसे संपर्क नहीं कर पाएगा। और हाँ, अगर दक्षि
Roger. There are two gears that we have that go around when you pull the handle back and forth. One of them is the gear that sort of acts as a ratchet, a little cylinder with a piston in it and a spike behind it that engages the ratchet. And we were having a little trouble with that before we got it open and after we got it open we had difficulty getting this ratchet to work. Also, we had a great deal of difficulty getting the hatch closed far enough so that we could even start latching it. Then, Ed had to push the ratchet in with his hand on every go until we got the thing started. And I was pulling on the thing until I thought probably I was going to break a lug ri
安全にドッキング解除できると感じられる速度まで減速した後、私たちはドッキング解除し、秒速数フィートの速度でアジェナからできるだけ早く離れようとしました。推進剤の量が50%から30%以下に減少していくのを確認していました。OAMS
Les fiches de préparation, c'est non. Croyez-moi, nous n'avons aucune intention de rivaliser avec les professionnels. On est vraiment bien ici. On a un chez-soi heureux. Il y a largement assez de place pour nous trois et je crois qu'on apprend tous à trouver notre petit coin préféré. L'apesanteur est très confortable, mais au bout d'un momen
Okay, 13; Houston. Der Booster meldet, dass die Treibstoffabgabe abgeschlossen ist; die nicht-treibstoffhaltigen Entlüftungsventile sind nun geöffnet, und was Sie sehen, ist ein normales Phänomen, d
好的。继汤米·雅各布斯之后，我们来看看休斯顿当地占星师露比·格雷厄姆的劲爆预测。她说，所有星座都预示着你们的月球之旅即将启程。尼尔很聪明，迈克判断力强，巴兹则擅长解决复杂问题。她还说，尼尔总是乐观向上，乐于助人。尼尔，你还应该拥有“能够感性地解读生活的直觉”，巴兹则非常善于交际，无法忍受孤独，并且拥有出色的批判能力。由于她不知道迈克的出生时间，所以她推测他要么拥有和尼尔一样的特质，要么就是富有创造力，性格特立独行，这种特立独行
بعد ظهر اليوم يا جيم. أتمنى أن أكون هناك بعدك بقلي
Давай, Базз. Это Хьюстон
11، هيو
Rog
좋습니다. 문제없습니다. D-9를 사용하세요. 아폴로 랜드마크 2번은 19번입니다. 랜드마크는 항로에서 북쪽으로 16마일 떨어져 있으며, 이때 기체는 약 -30°의 하강각을 유지해야 합니다. 최대한 정확하게 랜드마크를 추적하여 16mm 카메라에
Хорошо. 47 футов/сек и 1+18 при стрельбе вперед. 120 фут
Хорошо. Подожд
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Мы заметили некоторые странности в показаниях датчика расхода кислорода. У нас есть подозрение, что датчик… Мы ожидали увидеть высокий расход кислорода при открытии вентиляционного клапана для отработанного топлива в положение «ВЕНТ». Этого не произошло. М
ठीक है। जब भी आप भेजने के लिए तैयार हों, हम पूरी
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हम संचार परीक्षण को बर्न 
स
チャーリー、その件についてですが、私たちはここで2
रॉजर। ह
Okay. Wir sind bereit, Ihnen die Vorgehensweise zu erklären, die
Я вижу показания около 12,5. Похоже, у нас проблема с датчиком... Только что сработала главная сигнализация, но индикатор предупреждения не загорелся; мы прим
Jim, wir möchten dich bitten, diesen Steuerungsmodus zu überdenken und zu prüfen, ob er mit deinem aktuellen Wissen funktionieren könnte. Wir sind etwas skeptisch, möchten dir aber trotzdem deine Meinung dazu geben. Sobald du eine gute Position eingenommen hast, überwache die Position, gehe wie von uns beschrieben auf MINIMALER IMPUL
わかりました。ENTER、333 ENTERと押して、レジスタ1を読み取ってください。レジスタ1の値は10000になっているはずです。もし違っていたら、10000にする方法をお教えしま
А теперь скажи, а как насчет того, чтобы т
أرى ال
Okay, just don't call it
Ich kann das kleine Objekt, das diesmal wie eine Schneeflocke aussah, tatsächlich sehen, wie es sich von der Kapsel entfernt. Natürlich auf derselben Flugbahn. Es sah definitiv wie ein weißes Stück aus, ist aber vor dem schwarzen Himmel, den ich jetzt sehe, gut zu erkennen – die Sterne, die sich von uns entfernen. Es hat definitiv
Ok. C'è qualcuno
Non ho ne
알
Right. He's
好的。在太阳半单位向量处，X，R1，是+0.4549
حسنًا، حسنًا يا جيم. يبدو صوتك جيدًا هذا الصباح. نود أن نقدم لك شرحًا موجزًا ​​عن هذه النجوم. كما ترى في خطة الرحلة، فقد حددنا لك موعدًا مع النجم رقم 33، قلب العقرب (أنتاريس)، والنجم رقم 34، الأذين (أتريا)، والنجم رقم 40، النسر الطائر (ألتير). الآن، النجم الأول، قلب العقرب، يقع في مستوى الرحلة؛ أما النجمان الآخران فيقعان خارج مستوى الرحلة. كما تعلم، نود الحصول على مزيج من القياسات في مستوى الرحلة وخارجه. قلب العقرب، النجم رقم 33، قريب من الشمس، ونتوقع أنك ستواجه صعوبة في الحصول على هذه القياسات عليه. نود بشدة أن تحاول، ولكن إذا لم تتمكن من القيام بذلك، فنقترح عليك استخدام النجم رقم 42، وهو نجم الطاووس، حتى الأفق البعيد للقمر. ندرك أن الطاووس ليس أعظم نجم متاح - أعظم نجم في السماء - ولكنه تقريبًا
Prima della combustione era il 66 percento, ora 
はい、天井の窓から覗いて
Okay. Ich schildere Ihn
Не могли бы вы предоставить показания
Roger. Ich habe gerade Mahlzeit A von Tag 3 beendet. Ed hat auch schon eine gegessen – die
로저, 3 설정으로 돌아갔을 때 잠시 동안 제대로 작동하지 않았지만 오래 있지는 않았습니다. 확실히 7.5에서 8 정도가 적당할 것 같습니다. 현재 자동 후방 자세 제어 
Hallo, Guaymas Com Tech, Guaymas Com Tech. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Empfangen Sie Ihre HF-Nachrichten laut und deutlich. Wie ge
Westdeutschland hat den Montag zum „Apollo-Tag“ erklärt. In Bayern haben die Schüler schulfrei. Postangestellte wu
روجر. تعليق أخير: نظرًا للجدل الكبير الذي أثير في اجتماعات تحديد أولويات البيانات، يبدو أن زاوية ميل 10 درجات للأعلى هي الأنسب للحصول على الأفق، ما يسمح بتتبع المعلم عبر التلسكوب الماسح. إذا انخفضت الزاوية أكثر من ذلك، فلن يظهر الأفق عن
ठीक है। फ्रैंक, हमारे पास मौसम की जानकारी है। पूर्वानुमान के अनुसार, 2000 फीट की छिटपुट और 4000 फीट की हल्की बारिश होगी और आसमान में घने बादल छाए रहेंगे। नीचे आते समय आपको शायद ये बादल दिखें। लहरों की ऊंचाई 4 फीट, हवा की गति लगभग 070 की रफ्तार से 12 मील प्रति सेकंड होगी, दृश्यता 10 मील प्रति सेकंड होगी और इलाके में छिटपुट बारिश की संभावना है। यह पूर्वा
Roger. Aus den Nachrichten des Pressebüros: Apollo 11 beherrscht weiterhin die Schlagzeilen weltweit. Nur vier Nationen – das kommunistische China, Nordkorea, Nordvietnam und Albanien – haben ihre Bürger noch nicht über Ihren Flug und Ihre Mondlandung informiert. Ein Journalist sagte, ihm seien die Worte ausgegangen, um Ihren Erfolg zu beschreiben. Heute Abend wird Präsident Nixon das All-Star-Baseballspiel in Washington besuchen. Im Anschluss reist er zum Bergungsgebiet im Pazifik. Am Mittwochabend fliegt er mit dem Hubschrauber von Johnston Island zum Marine-Kommunikationsschiff Arlington. Am Donnerstagmorgen steigt er wieder in den Hubschrauber und fliegt rechtzeitig zur Hornet, um Ihre Wasserung mitzuerleben. Den Präsidenten begleiten Außenminister William Rogers und Frank Borman. Sie werden die Wasserung von der Brücke des Bergungsschiffs aus zusammen mit Admiral John Sidney McCain Jr., dem Befehlshaber der Pazifikstreitkräfte, verfolgen. Nach seinem Aufenthalt an Bord der Hornet tritt der Präsident seine Asienreise und seinen geplanten Besuch in Rumänien an. Luna 15 stürzte vermutlich gestern nach 52 Mondumrundungen ins Meer. Die sowjetische Nachrichtenagentur TASS 
ठीक है, और अगर आप पावर 8 का अगला पेज पलटेंगे, तो आपको स्पेसक्राफ्ट के बाकी फंक्शन्स मिलेंगे। हमारे पास लो बिट रेट TM है। हालांकि, हमारे पास कोई VHF नहीं है। हमारे पास ग्लाइकोल पंप हैं। हमारे पास सूट फैन हैं। आपके लिए केबिन रीप्रेस भी है, और एटी
Frank, restez près de nous; nous allons le chercher. Pendant ce temps, pour Bill, la qualité audio en haut débit est excellente. S'il souhaite l'utiliser brièvement pour enregistrer des choses importantes, nous le lui conseillons. Nous lui demandons d'attendre 20 secondes aprè
رو
好的，现在我看到的一半是
짐, 브리핑을 원활하게 진행하기 위해 통신
好的。我们现在停下来，调整姿态，准备进行光学校准。关于这一点，我昨天想跟你们说的就是这个。在你们给我设定的仰角、俯仰角和偏航角下，M线根本不与地平线平行，而我之前试图调整姿态让它与
了
Роджер. Среди главных заголовков, касающихся Аполлона сегодня утром, есть один, в котором вас просят обратить внимание на очаровательную девушку с большим кроликом. Древняя легенда гласит, что прекрасная китайская девушка по имени Чанго жила там 4000 лет. По-видимому, она была изгнана на Луну за то, что украла у своего мужа пилюлю бессмертия. Вы также можете поискать её спутника, большого китайского кролика, которого легко заметить, поскольку он всегда стоит на з
D'accord. Votre heure de début est… ça me convient parfaitement. Ça nous laissera largement le temps de nous organiser, notamment pour l'organisation, au cas où on aurait des problèmes pour s'arrêter et arriver. Et puis, ça nous permettra aussi de p
Bien reçu. Si possible, veuillez relever la température des parois gauche et droite de votre cabine à l'aide du thermostat. Veuillez également signaler toute trace d'humidité visible et
D'accord. Permettez-moi de vérifier si quelqu'un d'
您的右侧辅助氧通道应打开，左
请继续，
Houston, Apollo 
Roger, r
Apollo 8, Houston. Conferma che
Voilà, c'est tout pour le moment, Frank. On a reçu d'autres nouvelles qu'ils ont promis de nous transmettre dès leur arrivée. Les seuls sujets vraiment intéressants étaient la sortie de Pueblo. Je crois que tu as déjà entendu parler du mariage Nixon-Eisenhower. Et puis, il y a la météo, qui 
روجر، إذا كان لديك وقت فراغ لدقيقة، لديّ بعض التحديثات على لوحات التحكم التي أرسلناها إل
了解しました。少しお待ちください。アポロD-9第4回発射では、アンタレスとさそり座に着陸しました。長距離飛行と短距離飛行を行いました。また、アンタレスとさそり座の3等星にも着陸しました。アポロの恒星とブースターの接近は確認できませんでした。空軍のD-9ロケットは3回発射しました。ヒューストン、ジェミニ4号です。聞
وعندما يقوم بذلك على جهاز الإرسال والاست
Und noch eine kleine Neuigkeit: Ein weiterer Entdecker musste seinen Versuch, mit einem Papyrusboot den Atlantik zu überqueren, aufgeben. Das vom Sturm beschädigte Boot wurde etwa 650 Meilen vor Bermuda aufgegeben. Die Geschwindigkeit des Schiffes hatte sich auf etwa 25 Meilen pro Tag reduziert, und Heyerd
Bene. Al punto 34, sotto lo stivaggio finale, che è una sorta di area di raccolta, c'è un passaggio che dice glicole secondario al radiatore e dice bypass, verifica. Mentre siamo in quest'area, vorremmo andare al pannello 382, ​​il pannello di controllo dell'acqua, e impostare la valvola di controllo dell'acqua dell'evaporatore, sia primaria che secondaria, su AUTO. Ora, questa è una cosa che avremmo fatto 
休斯顿 CAP COM，这里是 G
١١، هذه هيوستن. غولدستون يُفيد بأنهم يتلقون صورة تلفزيونية منكم، بها بعض الت
友谊七号，这里是金丝雀C
Роджер, пойми. Ты видел это с
阿波罗8号，在我们等待高增益期间，我将继续进行轨迹概要。我们仍然可以从13号返回太平洋中线，你们将在点火138秒后开始返回。138秒足以让你们脱离蝶形区。我们建议在20秒后不要尝试预点火或重启。如果超过20秒，轨迹可能会超出修正范围——修正能力足以让飞船自由返回。回收区的天气状况良好。我们有跟踪和无跟踪两种情况。在点火过程中，由于储罐中的燃料耗尽并流入集油箱，你们可能会注意到燃烧室压力和储罐压力略有变化。这可能发生在点火开始后的2到5秒左右。两个系统的压力变化都很小。所有系统都运行正常。为了确保轨迹，我们希望在点火后停止水沸腾。你们的排水情况看起来不错；应该没问题。我们会尽量在 5 点之后再进行排水。
Ich sehe jetzt den Sonnenaufgang im Periskop. Das erste Licht im Periskop während dieser Umlaufbahn, verursacht durch die Nachtseite. Offensichtlich hat das Periskop auf der Nachtseite keinerlei Funktion bei der Rückwärtsbewegung. Das erste Licht, das ich erhalte, ist praktisch sofort da. Der Sonnenaufgang kommt ziemlich schnell durch das Periskop. Ich sehe die beleuchteten Objekte, die John erwähnt hat, und ich kann welche erzeugen, indem ich sie abschieße. Ich habe definitiv das Gefühl, dass es ein Feld ist, dessen Größe von klein bis hell variiert. Das Periskop selbst blendet mich. Ich muss die Karte darauflegen, damit ich aus dem Fenster sehen kann. Ich bin jederzeit bereit für die Rückwärtsbewegung, also bleibt mir nichts anderes übrig, als aus diesem Fenster zu schauen. Vorausgesetzt, der Anzug funktioniert einwandfrei. Diese Karte hilft ungemein, das verdammte Periskop abzudecken. Ein ziemlich großes Feld dieser Objekte. Es ist definitiv bestätigt, dass man sie von der Luke abschießen kann, wie Scotty gesagt hat. Und sie entfernen sich in einem deutlichen Abstand von der Kapsel, allerdings mit einer anderen Geschwindi
杰克——这里是水瓶
約8秒で1回転します。くるくると回転しています。以前よりも少し遠くまで来たようです。少しずれたようです。1.5マイル（約2.4キロメートル）くらいでしょうか、もしかしたらもう少し遠くまで。初めて
А споры вокруг аренды крытого стадиона всё ещё продолжаются. Кроме того, сегодня
Okay. Gute Idee. Wir haben uns eingehend überlegt, welche Manöver wir Ihnen erlauben sollten, um das Servicemodul zu fotografieren. Wir messen dem eine eher niedrige Priorität bei; Bilder des Servicemoduls wären zwar hilfreich, sind aber für unser Fehlerbehebungsprogramm nicht erforderlich. Was die Lageregelungsbehörde usw. betrifft, werden wir Ihnen später 
حسنًا. لدينا ثلاث نقاط. أولًا، تم تقييم جميع علامات دفعتكم - علامتان - وألف مبروك. تبدو رائعة، وهم راضون عنها جدًا. لم يتبقَّ لكم سوى 4 دقائق قوسية في جانب النقطة دون النجمية، وهذا أول ما يجب ذكره. ثانيًا، ما
Ok. Li vediamo molto male. Beh, in realtà, o
Early and busy as usual. I told Michael you guys are up there, and he said 
D'accord, Houston. Je vais p
ठीक 
Роджер. Единственное изменение с тех пор, как мы это обсуждали в прошлый раз, заключается в том, что мы испол
Sì, lo so. Non so come si aspettano che 
Хорошо. И позвольте мне рассказать, что мы собираемся сделать, поскольку сегодня днем ​​мы рассказали вам другую историю об этом туннеле. Мы фактически собираемся проветрить туннель, чтобы в итоге получить абсолютное дав
D'accord. Apollo 11 reste l'événement majeur, le monde entier attendant votre atterrissage aujourd'hui vers 11h49, heure de Houston. À Washington, les réformateurs fiscaux de la Chambre des représentants ont élaboré une disposition qui empêcherait les personnes fortunées d'échapper totalement à l'impôt sur le revenu grâce à des placements exonérés d'impôt ou des abattements spéciaux. Selon la proposition adoptée provisoirement par la commission des voies e
Хорошо. Готов скопировать исправление в +44
好
J'en ai une autre pour vous. Vous allez la copier et me la restituer. D'accord. Une fois que vous avez compris le principe et que vous voulez utiliser la lam
嗯，我想我们或许真
روجر. توقيت غرينتش الخاص بي -
Stasera avrei dovuto fare una let
Просто хочу уточнить у вас время. Когда вы хотите, чтобы мы начали ак
收到。从推进剂平衡的角度来看，我
Roger. Roger, Frank. Ein paar Gedanken zum nächsten Programmpunkt. Die Sternenbeobachtungen, sobald Jim aufsteht; im Moment haben wir genug vom Erdhorizont gesehen, alles sieht gut aus; und wir sind bereit für die Mondbeobachtungen. Wenn Jim also aufsteht, geben wir ihm den aktualisierten Flugplan für die Sternenbeobachtung mit dem Mond. Außerdem würden wir uns freuen, wenn du ungefähr nach den Sternenbeobachtungen deine nächste Wasserabgabe durch
र
オーロラ・セブン、インディアン・キャップ・コム。インバーターの温度は、150
ठीक है। हम फिर से जुड़ गए हैं। आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ आ 
Okay. The next three are unchanged. And then the EVENT TIMER START 
यह 1 बजे की दिशा में 
ديك، أعتقد أن الرقم حوالي 51 أو 50 في وحدة التحكم، وحوالي - لا أعرف - 45 أو أقل قليلا
جيميني 4، غوايماس CAP COM. هل ستضع مفتاح القياس
Роджер, «Спокойствие». По поводу таймера миссии два предложения. Установите автоматический выключатель на панели 11; также перезагрузите его и попробуйте запустить. Девятка в первой цифре может иметь к эт
Ho acceso la piattafor
네, 저희는 통신 장비가 있습니다. 목소리가
Neil, this is Houston. We're estimating about 10 minutes for the do
罗杰。我确定它在自动模
Roger. E, immagino che 
Близнецы 4
А вы знаете, я не могу действовать на минимальном импульсе. Мне нужно использов
You are full-scale - Beautiful! - That's a be
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir möchten S
Род
ठीक है। मैंने पहले
알겠습니다. 저희가
Mike, how about selecting Bravo at this time, and I'll give you a COMP configuration here, short
अब, हमारे पास और क्या
コロンビア、ヒューストン。SEQ ARMサーキットブレーカ
Roger, Alabama. Je suis en mode automatique; rétroaction; les commutateurs du gyroscope sont normaux; la manœuvre est désactivée. La capsule est prête pour la rétroséquence, sauf pour le rangement de deux cartes. Je suis sûr que nous pouvons y aller. J'ai 81 % en mode automatique (carburant) et 80 % en mode manuel (carburant), ce qui correspond à mon rapport intermédiaire. 
حصلنا على بعض العينات من عمق يصل إلى 7.5 سم في المنطقة التي كنت أدرس فيها التباين مع العمق في العينة الكلية. لم يكن هناك فرق ملحوظ، ولم أص
Jack, att
Tranquilit
Давайте переключим
여러분이 보고 계신 것은 바로 스미스 해(Smyth's Sea)입니다. 스미스 해는 캐스트너(Castner)와 길버트(Gilbert) 분화구이며, 특히 지구에서는 볼 수 없지만 달 표면을 뒤덮고 있는 작고 밝은 충돌 
你好，吉姆。迪克·
Okay. Okay. First of all, general philosophy is that these rules should 
好的。杰克，我们已经收到你的数据了，这方面看起来没问题。在5号
कृपया प्रतीक्षा
روجر، تفضل يا كارنارفون. الجوزا
よし。電力系統に切り替えて、問題なさそうだ。「CAUTION AND WARNING POWER」のランプと、すべての赤信号が点灯しているのをじっと見ている。X系統のLUNAR BUS TIEブレーカーは両方とも「IN」になっている。「UTILITY
Ensuite, allons au panneau 11, fermons le disjoncteur du ventilateur de combinaison et mettons en marche le ventilateur
रॉजर, माइक। मैं डेटा पर कुछ टिप्पणी देना चाहूंगा। स्वचालित पैंतरेबाज़ी काफी सटीक थी। ऐसा लगता है कि पैंतरेबाज़ी में हमें कोई उपतारकीय बिंदु मिला; स्वचालित प्रकाशिकी ने कैनोपस को ठीक उसी स्थान पर रखा जहां उसे होना चाहिए था; न्यूनतम आवेग नियंत्रण ने अपेक्षित रूप से काम किया। जिन ऊंचाइयों पर मैंने अवलोकन शुरू किए, वहां एक स्पष्ट धुंधली पट्टी रेखा दिखाई देती है। फ़िल्टर पृथ्वी को एक चमक देता है, कुछ नारंगी रंग की चमक। तारे को ठीक से निर्धारित करना बहुत मुश्किल है, लेकिन ऐसा लगता है कि एक ठोस रेखा है जहां क्षितिज होने की उम्मीद है, जो धुंध के माध्यम से दिखाई देती है जहां वायुमंडल होने की उम्मीद है। मैंने वही प्रक्रिया अपनाई जो हमने एमआईटी में की थी, धुंध की परत के ऊपर लगभग दो रेखाएं इन अवलोकनों के लिए एक निश्चित रेखा थीं। प्रकाशिकी अंशांकन के संबंध में, वेंटिंग में दृष्टि की प्रमुख रेखा मे
是的，我同意你
这是Sigma Seven，展示的是日出时分倒飞，偏航角90度的效果。最直观的感受就是你的飞行方向，就像透过火车车窗向外看一样。你会看到地貌在你眼前掠过，各种各样的云朵从我身边掠过，正好位于与飞行器纵轴成90度角的平面上。偏航的景象非常生动。现在我正转动机身，虽然机身倒置，但钝端已经开始进入正确的偏航
Quelle est ton altitude, Wa
جاك، استعد لتجهيز ا
Хоро
嗯，在不让自己又热又出汗的情况下，这大概就是所有合理的措施
알겠습니
По многочисленным кратерам видно, что эта планета на протяжении тысячелетий подвергалась бомбардировке множеством мелких астероидов и ме
로저. 곧 여기에 소변을 더 버려야 할 것 같아. 추적에 
Небольшая заде
Мы рекомендуем вам п
Roger. In Washington, the Senate Finance Committee has approved extension of the income tax surtax, but a Senate vote on the bill currently seemed remote. In Austin, State Representative Ray Lemmon of Houston has been nominated as the National Director of the American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon has proposed a study of the possibility of establishing an institute of oceanography in Texas. This would be the first such institute on the western Gulf of Mexico. In Minneapolis, Minnesota, the weather bureau, after recapping today
还有，休斯顿的宁静。我们还是节省时间吧；继续播放卡佩拉的歌。完毕
Ja. Wir haben uns für einen Kanister entschieden, und Sie wissen ja, dass das flüssigkeitsgekühlte Kleidungsstück einen Beutel hat, den wir vermutlich auch verwenden können – oder zumindest wissen, dass wir ihn verwenden können. Wir haben es ausprobiert. Es ist also quasi ein Beutel im Beutel, und darin befindet sich das flüssigkeitsgekühlte Kleidungsstück. Der Beutel, der dem Kleidungsstück am nächsten ist, ist der, den wir brauchen, und wir haben zwei davon. Dann brauchen wir natürlich noch etwas Klebeband und, wie Sie schon sagten, eine der Rückseiten eines Flugdatenblatts oder so etwas Ähnliches. Mit diesen Materialien können wir uns diesen provisorischen Kanister basteln. Der gesuchte Beutel ist also der, der direkt ne
Вчера Комитет по бюджету и налогообложению Палаты представителей также согласовал изменения в налогообложении, затрагивающие нефтяные компании, а также банки и коммунальные предприятия, которые могут увеличить федеральные доходы на 2 миллиарда долларов в год. Комитет также предварительно проголосовал за изменение процедур бухгалтерского учета для телефонных, электроэнергетических, газо- и нефтепроводных компаний и за сокращение налоговых льгот для взаимных сберегательных и кредитных учреждений. Таким образом, похоже, что налоговая р
了解。了解
Род
The Sun 
疑惑は
我想再次查看 
没错。特别是这些燃烧将垂直于我们的飞行路径和太阳方向，从而形成更
Giusto, stiamo lavorando alle procedure per questo. Ken ha lavora
了解。4日目の1食目を食べ始めました。水を8杯ほど飲みました。最後の4時間は1時間半ほ
さて、ヴァンス、水瓶座をどう読みま
Okay. We'
好的。大约在 114:10，“高度设置为 60 
收到。我完全明白你的意思。你能告诉我们一下你的
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, ici Houston. Émission à l'aveugle. Si vous nous recevez
ヒューストン、こちらは13です。パイロアームにGOサインをいただけ
おい、君は話が分からな
좋습니다, 제미니 8호. 추적/수동 신호가 안정적입니다. 지상 상태도 양호합니다. 도킹
Understand you still have the balloon with you. It's possible if you go to deploy position and back to release, you can-
नीचे पेड़ और जंगल हैं; ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे पेड़ और जंगल हो। बर्फ और पेड़ दिख रहे हैं। शानदार। मुझे बिलकुल भी नहीं पता कि हम किस दिशा में जा रहे हैं या किस ओर मुड़ रहे हैं, लेकिन यहाँ का निम्न दबाव क्षेत्र बहुत स
Хорошо. Просто сообщите нам напряжение и с
هذا صحيح. وهذه هي جميع التغييرات التي طرأت على خطة الرحلة. وسينضم إلينا كين الآن وفي وقت لاحق عندما ننتهي من الترتيبات، وأعت
Okay. Ich werde mich jetzt darum kümmern, ein paar Fotos z
Хорошо. Я сейчас начну. А теперь давайте посмотрим н
Roger, ti leggo ora sulle a
Roger, Apollo 8. Il vostro Green Team si conge
好的。我们也想这么做。等一下，
로저. 케이프는 출발 준비 완료, 저도 출발 준비 완
And they were your color,
أما الخبر الأبرز في هيوستن اليوم فيتعلق بفريق أستروس. ففي عالم الرياضة، انتفض فري
ヒュー
Roger. Das ist bestätigt. Wir sind im 
Vous serez peut-être intéressé(e) de savoir que je ne 
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मैं मुख्य घटनाओं के समयों पर संक्षेप में चर्चा कर लेता हूँ, और फिर हम कुछ विवरण भरेंगे। ठीक है। प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस 142 घंटे 40 मिनट पर है; लगभग 6-1/2 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम हीटर पावर लगाकर, CM/ तापमान की जाँच करके और आवश्यकता पड़ने पर CM/ को पहले से गर्म करके इस पूरी प्रक्रिया को शुरू करेंगे, और हमें लगता है कि हमें ऐसा करना पड़ेगा। इसके लिए विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ बाद में उपलब्ध होंगी। लगभग 6 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम संशोधित
गुआयमास को रेट्रोस की संख्या, आईवीआई रीडिंग, अनुमानित संख्या आदि की रिपोर्ट करें - आपको बस संख्
Okay. The master title, "Entry, LM PREP, minus 6 hours." First, BAT 5 NORMAL FEED, ON; second, use modified /, 30-minute activation checklist. Next, is at minus 5 hours, -7, if required. Now, we have a preentry procedure. First, we maneuver to service module SEP attitude. Second, configure for hotfire. Under that, DEADBAND MAX, and ATTITUDE CONTROL, three, to PULSE. Thirdly, perform hotfire. Fourth, we - The maneuvers back to SEP attitude, with ATTITUDE CONTROLs, PITCH and ROLL to PULSE, ATTITUDE CO
روجر. حالة التعافي هي: غطاء سحابي بنسبة 0.5، رؤية 10 أميال، سرعة الرياح 3 عقد، واتجاه الرياح 3
Хорошо. 
Roger. Pour l'étoile numéro 40 que vous suivez actuellement, le plan de vol ne prévoit qu'une seule série de marques. Vous en avez demandé deux, et c'est à votre discrétion. Une seule est obligatoire. Nous serons ravis de recevoir les données si vous effectuez
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Отсюда вы по-прежнему отлично выглядите. Разреше
我知道不应该让那些东
好的，Ron，对于MIDPAC：000、152、001、194、46 06、267、加1332、减16917、064、36194、649、14045、36275、195 03 06、0028、154、084、2240、180、400、02 13、00 17、0
요금이 안정되기까지는 다소 시간이 걸릴 수 있습니다. 현재로서는 
Да, подтверждаю. Просто БАТАРЕЯ 6, Джек. А в следующей строке у тебя были БАТАРЕЯ 1 и 3. Добавь БАТАРЕЯ 1, 2, 3 и 4. Просто добавь БАТАРЕИ 2 и 4. Все четыре приличных БАТАРЕИ. А затем следующие две строки о ожидании 30 минут, вычеркни это. И следующую строку о выключении/сбросе БАТ
- - 그 깜빡임이 바로
Похоже, передвигаться не составляет труда, как мы и предполагали. Возможно, даже легче, чем в симуляциях при перегрузке в одну шестую g, которые мы проводили в различных наземных симуляциях. На самом деле, ходить здесь не составляет труда. Хорошо. Двигатель спуска не оставил после себя кратера сколько-нибудь значите
यह वह
Coming on back here. P Front of the window. P Front of the instrument panel. P Going to the floor. C If there's an experiment that comes
ट्रैंक्विलिटी, ह्यूस
حسنًا. في الصف الرابع: تحت قسم السخانات، يجب أن تكون سخانات QUAD الأربعة مغلق
로저. 비행 중인데, 왜 데드밴
Roger. Ci asteniamo. Era una breve procedura in tre fasi che diceva: "Ripetere le pagine di attivazione 1, 1A e 2", ma c'era un altro passaggio che nessuno capisce. Quindi, in sostanza, quello che raccomanderemmo in quel caso sarebbe di ripetere la procedura che abbiamo appena saltato per la lettura della pressione SUPERCRIT. Se necessario, lo chi
أوه، بمجرد أن
إذا وا
حسناً. الآن علينا أن نجعل الحزام مشدوداً 
...
Et, Jim, vous pouvez saisir 400 suivi de zéros à tout moment; cela indique simplement qu
إجابة واحدة فقط؛ كانت تلك هي الإجابة الأولى وهي نسبة 16 بالمائة من كمية الوق
और मैं अल्टीमीटर के चालू होने का इंतज़ार कर रहा हूँ। केप, क्या तुम सुन पा रहे हो? अल्टीमीटर चालू हो गया है। 10
지금 오리온자리를 제대로 볼 수 있네요. 정말 아름다운 광경입니다
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 그럼 터널 벤트로 돌아가서 /CM DELTA-P를 확인하고 압력이 유지되고 있는지 다시 한번 점검하겠습니다. 그리고 다시 한번 해치 무결성 점검과 터널 벤
Tr
Ich gehe jetzt die Checkliste für die Installation durch. Gleichspannung ist die Hauptspannung. Die Sicherung des Retromanuals ist ausgeschaltet. Das Retromanual ist ausgeschaltet. Alle Instrumente sind in Ordnung. Alle Batterien sind in Ordnung. Die Wechselstromversorgung ist gut. Mal sehen, wo ist der Booster? Da unten sind wunderschöne Wolkenformationen. Der Booster befindet sich vor einer großen Wolkenformation. Ich scheine viel näher an der Erde zu sein, als ich erwartet hatte. Der Booster i
好的，杰克，他们
Ты всё очень чётко объ
Roger, Jim, Bill, ora potete spegnere 
D'accord. Comprenez que la situation se dégrade fortement. Vous avez un départ depuis le sol. Nous sommes
في الحقيقة، كما ت
Il nous reste une minute, Frank. Tu peux arrêter de remuer tes cryogéniseurs à tout m
Okay. Die nächsten drei sind gleich, und dann wollen wir TAP
알겠습니다. 다시 읽어보니 텔레메트리 명령(TELEMETRY COMMAND)은 OFF, VHF AM B는 중앙, S-밴드 스퀠치(S-BAND SQUELCH)는 OFF, 연료 전지 반응 밸브(FUEL CELL REACS VALVES)는 NORMAL, 테이프 레코더 전진(TAPE RECORDER FORWARD), 테이프 이동(TAPE MOTION), 전원(POWER), PMP 전원(PMP POWER), AC 인버터 1(AC INVERTER 1)은 OFF, AC 인버터 2(AC INVERTER 2)는 OFF, 인버터 1에서 AC 1로의 연결(INVERTER 1 to AC 1)은 OFF, AC 1 리셋(AC 1 RESET)은 OFF, 인버터 2에서 AC 2로의 연결(INVERTER 2 to AC 2)은 OFF, AC 2 버스 리셋(AC 2 BUS RESET)은 OFF입니다. 그리고 패널 
Direi che siamo a circa 88 gradi es
Va bene. Va bene. Quindi da "Ciclo 5 fotogrammi, Sostituisci diapositiva scura",
C
Okay, ich habe ein paar Anweisungen für Sie. Okay, Sie können jetzt einschalten. Ich möchte Ihren Computer hochfahren, ihn mit Strom versorgen und Ihr Ra
TIGまであと1分です
特此通知，我们将开始称
흥미로운 소식이 하나 있습니다. 미시간주 앤아버에 새로운
Verseau
アポロ11号、ヒュ
로저. 목
Okay. Just - just give us the volts and amps just before you sta
जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, हालांकि मुझे लगा था कि मुझे कभी इसका इस्तेमाल नहीं करना
Хьюстон, криогенны
هذا ما فهمته من خلال الاستماع إلى مؤتمر غودارد (حلقة اتصالات 
Okay. Für den mittleren Pazifik sind die Bedingungen im Allgemeinen gut. Sie können mit einer Wolkenuntergrenze von 2000 Fuß (aufgelockert), einer Sichtweite von 10 Meilen, Wind aus 070° mit 12 Knoten, Wellenhöhen von 4 Fuß und einem Höhenmesser von 2974 rechnen. Sonnenaufgang ist um 10:00 Uhr UTC, erste Dämmerung um 16:49 Uhr UTC. Das Raumschiff ist die Yorktown; die Flugzeuge sind Airboss 1 und 2 sowie Recoveries 1, 2 und 3. Die geschätzte Zeit bis zum Eintreffen des Raumschiffs beträgt 15 Minuten. Die Yorktown befindet sich am Zielpunkt, die Airboss-Flugzeuge sind vor Ort. Die Recoveries 1, 2 und 3 sind SH3 Alfas und begleiten die Yorktown, befinden sich also ebenfalls am Zielpunkt. Alle haben Rettungsschwimmer an Bord. Falls die Bergungsflugzeuge keinen Kontakt zum Raumschiff herstellen können; Sie werden die Schwimmer ins Wasser lassen, und wenn Sie in guter Verfassung
Jim, Sie können nun fortfahren, aber ich möchte Sie darauf hinweisen, dass die Fernsehzeit weiterhin auf 55 Stunden festgelegt ist. Wir stehen bereit, um Ihren Beitrag zu unterstützen und melden uns in einer Minute bei Ihnen zurück, um mehr über die O2-Brennstoffzellenspülung und die Abwasserents
Oui. Ça s'
Roger. 21
Sì.
시그마 세븐, 객실 열교환기 온도
Jerry, on va l'allum
目前关于CM/加热的问题有
П
D'accord. Pouvez-vous me donner une étiquette sur mon orbite le plus rapidement p
罗杰，04加
Apollo 
Vous avez compris
D'accord. Voici quelques informations. Nous mettons au point une procédure pour que vous puissiez utiliser les cartouches LiOH du module de commande et les connecter aux tuyaux de sortie. Ainsi, au fil de la miss
好的，乔。从管道工程的角度来
좋습니다. 1차 글리콜 루프 활성화가 완료되었
Roger. Hier die Geschichte zur Anzugtemperatur. Ich habe sie seit dem Start zweimal um 10 Grad erhöht. Jetzt bin ich etw
正解です、アポロ8号。近いうちにもう2つお話があります。現在、フライバイ（接近通過）の作業を進めています。六分儀と望遠鏡で星を観測する際の問題について、もう少しお話を伺う予定です。ブラックチームがMOKRに到着したらすぐに、2つのチームがいるのですが、何が観測され、何が観測されなかったのか、そしてどのような状況だったのかを改めてお伺いし、皆さんが理解できるよう定義づけてみたいと思います。それから、もしタイムラインに関して何かコメントがあれば、もしあれば教えてくだ
Nur zu, Wasser
알겠습니다. 증발기가 제대로 작동하는 것 같습니다. 아니, 적어도 그렇게 되려고 애쓰고 있는 것 같네요. 온도가 섭씨 0도 정도까지 떨어졌다가 다시 올라와서 섭
potere—ATTEGGIAMEN
Хорошо. Когда мы переключили выключатель питания переменного тока с IGS на ACME — это не должно включать компьютер — индикатор компьютера погас. Когда загорелся индикатор неисправности, индикатор компьютера снова загорелся, а индикатор неисправности остался гореть. Довольно скоро оба индикатора потускнели... Через 3 или 4 минуты, после того как мы переключились на питание ACME, индикатор компьюте
そして、フレッド、燃料電
Хорошо, ладно. Мы зам
지금까지 우리가 알 수 있는 건 이게 전부인 것 같습니다. 이상입니다
你好
罗杰。入口停机坪：区域为太平洋中部，滚轴坐标 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267，纬度加 1332, 减 16917, 064, 36194, 649，航程 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 00 28，最大升力 154, 084, 22400, 18000，D0 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02，六分仪星 45 0189, 277，瞄准星，无可用，升力矢量向上。备注：对准织女星和天津四，横滚078度，俯仰角223度，偏航角340度。补充备注：使用非出口航线，-30度，地平线检查194 33 06。俯仰角298度。你会得到P65，但不会得到P66。补充说明：P67的初始倾斜角可能不是最大
알았어. 프레드, 잠
Gemini 4, veuillez nous c
我一直说他
- - clockwise
11번, 휴스턴입니다.
ठीक है। हम गाइडेंस कंट्रोल में बर्न करेंगे। और मोड कंट्रोल को एटीट्यूड होल्ड पर सेट करेंगे। आपके एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल स्विच रोल को पल्स पर, पिच को पल्स पर और यॉ को मोड कंट्रोल पर सेट करेंगे। तो यह आपके यॉ को नियंत्रित करेगा और आप पिच और रोल को नियंत्रित करने के लिए इसका उपयोग करेंगे। इंजन गिम्बल बंद; 10 प्रतिशत थ
ええ、そうですね。スポーツ面は、あまり動きがありません。UCLAは両方のバスケットボールの投票でトップです。もし何か特定のチームについて聞きたいことがあれば、教えてください。どちらの投票でもトップ10に入っているかどうかお教えし
هذا منزلنا خلال الساعتين القادمتين، ونريد أن نعتني به جيدًا. حسنًا. أنا الآن على الدرجة العلوية، ويمكنن
收到。您的请求将会得到满足，尤
27 
روجر. يمكننا أن نلاحظ أنها 
Роджер. Мы вас читаем. Похоже, что при высоком коэффициенте усилени
Jim, könntest du u
Здравствуйте. Роджер, «Дружба Семь». Слышу вас хорошо. Кажется, все системы работают исправно. Ваши часы синхронизированы. В аэропорту Вумера
Now we're over the Mediterranean. It is very easy to recognize. I see a couple of very large ships. They start off from Beirut. We should be pas
روجر. أخشى أن يكون إد قد نام بحلول ذ
ओह, इस
Хорошо. Хорошо, теперь у вас подключен инвертор 1 к обеим шинам переменного тока. И, Джек, одним из отключенных нами элементов были все насосы топливных элементов. Хорошо, и, пожалуйста, сообщите нам, когда понадобится насос для топливного элемента 2; нам нужно будет позаботи
खैर, मैंने अभी तक यह नहीं पूछा है, जैक; एक पर
了解
Я почти уверен, что это та
अपोल
네, 조. 움직이기 시작하는 게 보이네요. 하
何かが見えた。もしかしたら…ボーマンの…は見えたと言ってい
يبدو أنك تجاوزت زاوية الإزاحة المحددة بـ 15 در
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Мы так заняты, что нам трудно аккуратно вести учет. Я постараюсь делать это на плане полета; и если я сделаю какие-либо визуальные набл
Роджер. Если это тебе поможет, Майк, Земля находится под углом плюс Y примерно 45 градусов к минус X. Я вижу это из св
Go ahe
알겠습니다. 관제탑에서 컴퓨터가 정상 작동하려면 몇 번의 궤도 비행
帰る前に、ライト
हाँ। रॉन को अब साइलेंट कैप कॉम के नाम से
Columbia
रॉजर। मैं इसे फिर से एंटर ब
Questo è per il modulo d
सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है, मैं आपको यहा
يا للأسف، لم يتبقَّ سوى أقل من نصف ساعة للعب بهذه الطائرة. سأستخدم الآن نظام التحكم الإلكتروني بالطيران على مستوى منخفض. سأحرر الجيروسكوبات لخفض زاوية الميل لمراقبة أضواء ديربان. الجيروسكوبات حرة، نظام التحكم الإلكتروني بالطيران على مستوى منخفض، تصحيح، سأستخدم الآن التحكم اليدوي النسبي. لم أقم بشحن أي بيانات، لذا سأعود إلى الوضع الافتراضي. نظيف. سأنتقل إلى أمر معدل الطيران. التحكم اليدوي النسبي. سأجرب هذا ال
Ça
كم م
Salut Verseau. C'est clair et
그 안에는 
ठीक है; सही है। ठीक है। मैं प्रक्रिया शुरू करने के लिए तैयार हूँ। जब आप मुझे जवाब दें, तो ज़ोर से बोलें - माइक्रोफ़ोन में ज़ोर से बोलें, क्योंकि हमारा डाउनलिंक काफ़ी शोर वाला है। सबसे पहले, हम एक कैनिस्टर पर यह करेंगे, और फिर आप इसे दूसरे पर दोहरा सकते हैं। तो एक कैनिस्टर लें और उसकी बाहरी थैली काट दें। हीट सील के साथ-साथ काटें; इसे ध्यान से और हीट सील के पास से काटें, क्योंकि अगर भीतरी थैली क्षतिग्रस्त हो जाती है तो हमें बाहरी थैली का उपयोग करना पड़ सकता है। तो इसे काट लें, और फिर हम अगला चरण
أبولو 8، هيوستن. ان
Хорошо. Я просто постараюсь все это время держаться от него подальше, не давая ему 
Okay. Der letzte Stern war Navi, und er war nicht besonders gut zu erkennen. Ich verstehe, woher diese
Верно, и поскольку до вас еще час езды, думаю, не помешает использовать MINIMUM IMPULSE или что-то подобное, а не, по крайней мере, пока вы не приблизитесь. Информацию о загрузке мы
We just wante
好吧。我觉得我们在地面呼叫如何调整航天器方
了解しました。東太平洋上の宇宙船から地球の中心を見ています。ハワイ諸島はまだ目視できていませんが、北アメリカ西海岸ははっきりと見えます。アメリカ合衆国、サンホアキン渓谷、シエラネバダ山脈、バハ・カリフォルニア、メキシコからアカプルコ、ユカタン半島まで見渡せます。さらに中央アメリ
Piuttosto bu
네, 몇 가지 지시 사항이 있습니다. 전원을 켜셔도 됩니다. 컴퓨터를 켜고, 전원을 공급하고, 레이더를 대기 모드로 전환하겠습니다. 5분 후에
いいえ、ステージングは​​見えませんでした。霞んでいて見えませんでしたが、
ブースターが私たちから離れた時、ロール ノズルから燃料が噴き出すのが見えました。ブースターが回転するにつれ、宇宙船の主軸からブースターまでを結ぶ線
Fred, on a déjà ce scénario pour toi, il est quasiment prêt. On est en train de le relire. Je préfère reporter ta question à plus tard. En gros, on va couper le moteur et faire avec ce qu'on a. On a une vitesse moyenne d'environ 1,5 mètre par seconde, le maximum, n'importe où pendant la manœuvre pour revenir à la position de retour libre. Voilà, c'est tout. On te donnera les règles de mission pour cette manœuvre dans un instant
मु
मुझे पूरा यकीन है कि हम कभी भी बराबरी नहीं कर पाएंगे। चलिए शुरू करते हैं और देखते हैं क्या ह
わかりました。「AUTO SELECT, 16, OFF」を削除してください。「CB LOGIC POWER」を「LOGIC THRUST POWER - CBS CS LOGIC THRUST, 4, to clos
- - Выключить
Einen Moment bitte. Ich werde dazu eine Vorhersage treffen. Übrigens hoffe ich, dass Sie Buch 
هذه هي الطريقة التي ي
Roger, Tom. Pour information, notre technicien de maintenance le confirme, et nous avons testé une solution qui semble convenir. Pourriez-vous me relire le résultat 03? J’ai été
Apollo 13, Houston. Veuil
我们刚刚启动了平台，大约需要 30 分钟才能完全
माइक, आपको थोड़ा अंदाज़ा देने के लिए, मैं खाड़ी के दक्षिण-पश्चिमी तट और ह्यूस्टन के संभावित स्थान को देख सकता हूँ, साथ ही मिसिसिपी नदी के मुहाने को भी। मैं बाजा कैलिफ़ोर्निया और उस विशेष क्षेत्र को भी देख सकता हूँ। मैं अपने ज
हां, मैंने क्यू कार्ड से निर्देशांक लोड 
ロジャー、ヒューストン。進入は以下の通り：太平洋中部、357 152 359 267、プラス0813、マイナス16503 066 36221 647 12166 36301 0028、NA、400 0210 0025 0335 0816 160590 312、ペルセウス座ζ星、上165、右34、上。非退出パターンを使用：シリウス、リ
Il faudra vous remettre du courant alternatif et vous réenclenchez le disjoncteur. Voyons voir… J'ai encore la haute tension pour les disjoncteurs différentiels, d
Roger. 11, /: 45597, 0 - correcti
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон с р
Это не настройки. Давайт
Is it just sl
Кабина пол
I've been resting m
Vuoi prem
रॉ
Для тех, кто не читал табличку, мы прочитаем надпись на передней стойке шасси. Во-первых, там изображены два полушария, по одному для каждого из двух полушарий Земли. Под ними написано: «Здесь человек с планеты Земля впервые ступил на Луну, июль 1969 года нашей эры. Мы пришли с миром для всего человечества». На табличке есть подписи членов экипажа и президент Соединенных Шта
Et vou
D'accord, Apollo 8. Il semble que vous puissiez maintenant arrêter vos ventilateurs cryogéniques. Nous vous laissons tranquille un moment pour vous permettre de rattraper votre retard. Concernant les opérations à bord, comme le test de l'
And in the, let's go
Gemin
Togliere c
ठीक है। हमने 1 घंटे तक की चेकलिस्ट पूरी कर ली है, और हम 1 घंटे
روجر. نيل، مجرد تذكير مرة أخرى، قانون الرعاية الصحية الميسرة خا
在内华达州里诺市，由于家中没有壁炉，一个小男孩写信给当地报社的圣诞老人，建议道：“请您走前门。门底有点卡，您可能需要踢一下。”在阿肯色州小石城，圣诞节前一周到圣诞节当天在圣文森特医院出生的婴儿，出院时都会被装在巨大的红色圣诞袜里交给他们的母亲。这是一个跨宗教合作的例子。在加利福尼亚州印第奥市，警察局长在圣诞节当天收到了一本祈祷书。拉比菲利
이 기체를 가지고 놀 시간이 30분도 채 남지 않았다는 게 너무 슬프네요. 이제 플라이 바이 와이어 저고도 모드로 전환하겠습니다. 자이로스코프를 해제하고 더반 등대를 관측하기 위해 기체를 아래로 내리겠습니다. 자이로스코프 해제, 플라이 바이 와이어 저고도 모드, 수정, 이제 수동 비례 제어로 전환하겠습니다. 아직 요금을 청구하지 않았으니 이전 설정으로 돌아가겠습니다. 깔끔하네요. 요금 명령으로 이동합니다. 수동 비례 제어를 해제합니다. 이 모드로 크기를 시험해 보겠습
Ça fait 52. 52 devrait être… c
رو
ठीक है। मैं ऐसा करूँ
了解。ヒューストン、アポロ8号。はっきりと聞き取れました。計画 24136 179 045 001 515 105196 35569 357 091 001; プラス10、ピッチ上の態度199を中止してくだ
Jim sta imp
了解。ケープで待機してください
Okay. There's not a whole lot to it. Well, let's see, we'll start with the - Let's start with sports, what the heck. The Astros survived 8 to 7, the Braves got five or six runs in the 
자, 제가 읽어드린 숫자를 기억해 두시는 건 어떠세
11، هيوستن. تمام. يبدو الأمر جيدًا. و، 11، لديّ تحديثات ل
Роджер. Мы проверили космический аппарат и систему наведения ракеты-носителя. Обе системы, похоже, в порядке. Мы оцениваем вероятность сбоя системы наведения ракеты-носителя более чем в 99 процентов, так что, судя по всему, всё работает очень хорошо. К вашему сведению, мы получили примерно 1 минуту пригодного для просмотра телевизионного изображения, так что, судя по всему, система работает. И вы находитесь чуть больше чем в минуте от Канарских островов; до Танар
C'est exact. Nos équipes évaluent actuellement la situation thermique. Il semble que vous serez hors de portée pendant un certain temps. C'est pourquoi nous vous demandons de reprendre la mission dès que vous aurez effectué ces trois observations d'étoiles. Nous continuons à travailler sur la situation thermique et l'observation des étoiles pendant environ 
Das ist in Ordnung. Fahren Sie bitte vor. Wir werden dann zu den Kreuzungen 307, 354 und 19½ navigieren. Vie
Bene. Eccoci qui. -2, /G&N: 63634; più 0,96, meno 0,23;; meno 0021,7, meno 0001,7, meno 0008,0; 080, 164, 326; N/D, N/D; 0023,2, 0:03,5 - Vi diamo mezzo secondo sul t
Джим, над процедурами вх
わかりました。メモには、私たちの声が聞こえるはずだと書いてあります。数分経っても聞こえない場合は、パネル16のPOWER AMP回路ブレーカーを閉じてください。これで1アンペア以上の電力を節約できると期待しています。現在の姿勢ではこれ
알겠습니다. 자이
11号，
네, 확인했습니다. 파워 앰프 차단기가 열려 있습
هذا يبدو خبراً 
مددت يدي إلى هنا ذات مرة... صورة للمكان الذي ظنن
Che ne dite di una stima a
Molto
Если мне удастся заставить его держать руки подальше от меня, это буд
D'accord. On va commencer la purge de la pile à combustible pendant qu'on mange. Changement de la cartouche de CO2 n° 6; vérification du débit du radiateur secondaire; copie de quelques coussins. À 72
Ha detto che ci son
밖 풍경이 정말 멋지네요! 마치 산비탈에 그대로 
好的
로저. 어댑터 배터리 측정값이 나옵니다. 전압은 1-A부터 1-C까지 모두 24V로 정상입니다. 전
This is
抱歉，吉姆，我们只能一个一
很好。看看能不
休斯顿，静海。上次观测我用了五车二，它离边缘还有一段距离，离第四道岔中心也有一段距离。我
I hear you well, I know whom I'm talking
إليكم خبرًا طريفًا ومثيرًا للاهتمام. يبدو أن هناك عصابة شبابية جديدة في آن أربور، ميشيغان، تُدعى "عصابة جيلنت". تجوب هذه العصابة شوارع آن أربور، وتعمل سرًا، وتتجاوز القانون أحيانًا. يُطلقون على أنفسهم اسم "مقاتلو الخير". من بين أعمالهم: طلاء جسر كان مُغطى بعبارات بذيئة في إحدى الليالي. كما قاموا بإغلاق منزل مُهدم - كان يحظى بشعبية بين أطفال الحي، ولكنه خطير - بألواح خشبية. وملؤوا أحواض الزهور الفارغة في وسط المدينة، بسبب جدل حول الجهة المسؤولة، هل هي الشركات أم الحكومة. وقاموا بتقليم سياج نباتي، كان يُعتقد أنه يُعيق الرؤية، عند تقاطع مزدحم، مما أثار غضب صاحبه. كما قاموا بجمع القمامة على طول جزء من نهر هورون. أعضاء العصابة مراهقون مجهولون لا يسعون إلى الشهرة. هدفهم هو تبسيط الإجراءات، وإنجاز الأمور - الأمور الجيدة في نظرهم. وللمنظمة طابع ديني خفيف. إنها أشبه بجماعة مسكونية، كما قال أستاذ مساعد في جامعة ميشيغان، والذي يُعدّ بمثابة مستشار غير رسمي لأفكار المجموعة. اسمها مستوحى من القديس بطرس، وشبكة الصياد. وهي بعيدة بما يكفي لعدم ربطها بأي كنيسة بعينها. وأضاف أستاذهم، الذي فضّل أيضاً عدم الكشف عن هويته، أن هناك خيطاً من روح روبن هود يربط هذه المجموعة. الكثير من أنشطتهم خارجة عن القانون. فعندما يتعثر النظام، يقدمون الخير مباشرةً، بدلاً من المرور عبر القنوات البيروقراطية. تتألف المجمو
Okay, Jack. Starting at the top. Okay. The CRYO TANKS; H2 1 is reading 230 and the same for 2. Our O2 CRYO TANK 1 is - looks like it's barely holding its own at 300. And, CRYO TANK 2 is H2 1 is reading 73, 2, 74. On the O2 side, we're reading O2 1 at quantity, 76; O2 pegged to full scale high. RAD TEMPs PRIMARY INLET, we're reading about 55; RAD OUT is reading about 30, and the SECONDARY OUTLET is reading - reading 52 degrees. And the EVAP OUT TEMP is 45, STEAM PRESSURE 0.17, and GLYCOL DISCHARGE 48. SUIT COMPRESSOR is reading zip. The ACCUM is reading 30; H2O WASTE is reading about 34; POTABLE's reading about 98; SECONDARY RAD INLET is reading about 71; and the RAD OUT is about 30; GLYCOL EVAP T
Je reviens ici. P Devant la fenêtre. P Devant le tableau de bord. P Au niveau du plancher. C Si une expérience nécessite mon intervention... P D-8 est désa
確かにデテント 2 を試してみたいのですが、私たちの
I see a bright star out there, must be Venus. Forgot to memorize John Mayer's views out the window well enoug
ええ、フランク、私も全く同じ考えです。月の上空に広がる孤独感は畏敬の念を抱かせ、地球にどれほどのものがあるかを改めて実感させてく
Okay, Jack. Auf deiner Checkliste für den Einstieg, Seite 2-5, unten bei Schritt 9, wo 152 Grad Neigung bei 0,05 g st
Das is
ええと、月面ブーツと2枚の下着、そして全員が...睡眠用拘束
روجر، رقم 11، نود منك إغلا
لا، لست بحاجة إلى أي فائض. فقط قم بقصه بشكل م
Okay. Wir gehen zu. in ACC
روجر. وفقًا لقائمة التخزين لدينا، يجب أن يكون الرسم المائل لموقع الهبوط في حقيبة النقل. ولكن في مجموعة ا
Хорошо. Кажется, я читал, что вы готовы. Я забыл... наушники. Процедура проста: нужно доста
Okay. The time is - The event will be at; and we're to maneuver to the following attitude; roll 101.0, pitch 090.0, yaw all zips. High gain angles will be pitch minus 23, yaw 
जिम, मानचित्र पर बार-बार चिह्नित किए जा सकने वाले और आसानी से खोजे जा सकने वाले दो छोटे क्रेटरों के आपके उपयोग से हम सहमत हैं; और यदि आप हमें अपने नए अक्षांश और देशांतर बताएँगे, तो हम आपके लिए अंतरिक्ष यान को 10 डिग्री ऊपर की ओर झुकाकर उन 
Хорошо. У вас есть OMNI Bravo, и мы хотели бы попр
روجر. ضغط دمنا جيد. يمكنك البدء بتمرينك من عل
Ici Houston, Eagle.
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。我已经准备好了你们的TLI+90分钟中止程序
ロジャー、アル。自動後退モードです。ジャ
250
You going to co
C'est à peu près la position dans laquelle nous placerons la caméra après la descente initiale de l'échelle, et elle prendra une image par seconde pendant la majeure partie de la sé
11, qui Houston. Ora stiamo ricevendo una buona immagine di Buzz, ma nessuna modulazione vocale. Potresti aumentare il
Forse ti interesserà sapere, visto che sei già in viaggio, che un'astrologa di Houston, Ruby Graham, afferma che tutti i segni sono adatti al tuo viaggio sulla Luna. Dice che Neil è intelligente, Mike ha un buon giudizio e Buzz sa risolvere problemi complessi. Dice anche che Neil tende a vedere il mondo attraverso lenti rosa, ma è sempre pronto ad a
Хорошо. Мы готовимся к смене смены, и я хотел бы обсудить несколько моментов. Сейчас скорость ветра, похоже, составляет максимум 0,3 фута в секунду, поэтому на шестом участке траектории маневра не будет. Седьмой участок немного больше, и мы примем решение по нему позже. Погода в месте посадки по-прежнему хорошая, прогноз составляет около 2000 футов (разрозненная) и 12000 футов (прерывистая), примерно те же цифры, что и ранее Фрэнку. Видимость будет около 10 миль, высота волн около 4 футов. И, я думаю, есть несколько разрозненных грозовых ливней, менее 5 процентов, о которых вам следует беспокоиться. А на высоте 2000 футов видимость составляет от 10 до 30 процентов, прерывистая, а не
Ho
Под
좋습니다. 이제 가방은 준비됐고, 다음 단계는 빨간색 우주복 호스(지휘관용이든 LMP용이든 상관없습니다. 나중에는 두 호스 모두 준비해야 하니까요)를 가방 상단에 넣을 준비를 하는 것입니다. 그러려면 먼저 빨간색 호스와 파란색 호스를 분리해야 합니다. 이미 분리하셨는지 모르겠지만, 만약 분리하지 않으셨다면 호스의 바깥쪽 베타 천을 전체 길이에 걸쳐 잘라내고, 두 호스를 고정하는 고무 끈도 잘라내세요. 그러면 호스가 분리
Ich schätze, du bist so ziemlich di
Роджер, инерциальная система. И вот мы на 2-м ПАД. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, плюс 166, минус 081; TIG 080 11 3603. СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 81: минус 01408, минус все шары, минус 00743. Все шары, 196 359 00657, плюс 00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Секстант 23 1160 138. Остальная часть ПАД недоступна. Выравнивание, Вега и Денеб 243 183 012. Заполнение, два реактивных двигателя 19 секунд. Примечания: На вашей загрузке нам нужен R1 20101 вмес
杰
아폴로 11호, S밴드 신호가 끊기면 OMNI Charlie 신호를 보내주시면 감사하겠습니다. 그리고 지난번에 말씀드렸던 내용을 업데이트하자면, 77시 4분에 아리스타르코스가 지평선 위로 보이기 시작할 것으로 예상됩니다. 77시 12분은
はい
Roger. And got a couple of items that I would like to clean up. We will get you an budget. We've got one redline now; we are trying to get some firmer numbers for you, and we will have those in a little bit. Right now your usage is right on the flight plan line, so everything looks pretty good the
Если вы используете режим отслеживания орбиты, рекомендуем выбрать соб
11、休斯顿。您认为目前是否存在任何主要的锋面天气系统，或者是
26, 36 футов в секунду вве
Roger. Wir zeigen Ihnen gleich, wie Sie vorgehen sollen. Lassen Sie Ihre FDAI-Einstellungen dafür offen. Die Vorgehensweise ist wie folgt, falls Sie berei
- TPI 접근. 와, 이거 정말 멋지네요. 한번 보세요. 착륙장으로 접근하는 모습을 꼭 보셔야
わかりました。これらの右側に少しスペースを空けておいてください
"캐빈 에어 재
У нас есть действующая справка о измерении температуры тела ртом, выданная компанией Command Pilo
Да, подт
那我问你一件事。你是想在中期调整之前先进
好的。月球温
And Mrs. Robert Goddard said today that her husband would have been so happy. 
Jerry, hier spricht Frank. Gibt es inzwischen Neuigkeiten zu unserem Flugverlauf und wie die L
Kein
收到。友谊七号。太空舱内一切正常。我偶尔还能看到一些小颗粒物在太空舱周围飘动。即使
バイザーは
आपक
Gémeaux 4, Gémeaux 4, RKV CAP COM
Что случилось с той ка
Роджер. У меня наблюдаются периодические сбои в работе нагревателя RCS. Первый раз было 47, я включил нагреватель, и индикатор загорелся на 54. Это было кольцо А. Кольцо В — 05. Потребовалось 5 минут, чтобы он загорелся до 20, и еще 5 минут, чтобы погас. Кольцо В загорелось на 37, и п
Roger. Les problèmes que vous avez rencontrés jusqu'à présent sont dus à une source inconnue, probablement une surcharge de votre cellule de tourillon, qui est maintenant à 91°. Par conséquent, elle ne représente pas l'angle de tourillon réel. Ce problème de surcharge n'implique aucune diminution de la fiabilité de votre systè
No wonder
حسنًا. الآن أعتقد أنني سأفعل
Muchea Com, 수정
Got more targets of opportun
No. Non vogliamo che tu lo fa
캔턴 컴 
Cavolo, questo separatore d'acqua non funzio
D'accord, 
Come va, Neil? N
Roger, this is Friendshi
... testing on HF GMT 16 31 59 MARK. I read the capsule w
Friendship Seven, Cap Com. Pourriez-vous nous décrire les difficultés que vous rencontrez avec le lacet dans ASCS? Term
Oh, oh! Der Schutzschalter der B
Ich kann derzeit eine Rollbewegung nach rechts von etwa 5 Grad erkennen und habe bemerkt, dass das Periskop dunkel ist, was bedeutet, dass wir uns im dunklen Bereich befinden. Ich werde versuchen, die Veränderungen durch das Periskop zu beobachten. Momentan kann ich durch das Periskop nichts für Nachtbeobachtungen sehen, zumindest nicht in dieser Position. Ich bin mir nicht einmal sicher, wann ich die geringe Vergrößerung eingestellt habe, außer der Position des Hebels. Das Fenster ist bewölkt. Jetzt scheint Sonnenlicht darauf, und es war definitiv durch d
Ok. CB 16, ASCENT EC
ठीक है। हम चाहेंगे कि आप अपने ए
Х
Roger. Le
Roger, Neil. Thank you. It also appears that just to the left of the terminator, up in the northern hemisphere, there's a cloudband trending - a gap in the cloud, trending northwest/southeast. It appears to us that
R
حسنًا. بالنسبة لهذا البرنامج التلفزيوني الذي سيُعرض خلال ساعتين، قد تفكرون في كيفية توقفنا، إن كنتم ستتوقفون، للحصول على أفضل زاوية تصوير؛ وسيكون من الجيد أيضًا لو استطعتم إ
Roger. Next subject, did either of the solar panels on the touch
Хьюстон, как выглядят запасы пропускной способности цепи в S-диапазоне по сравнению с вашими предполётными рас
11時54分でし
제미니 4호, RKV 외과의사시군
——服务模块 RCS 推进剂，
好的。第 8 步说：“保持”。第 9
Okay, at 49 000 feet, we're supposed to be 65 feet per second - our little old chart says. And our LOS rate's supposed to be about O.1; it's about point - 
了解。パワーアンプを取得しました。PCプラス2時間、38.030、プラス08330、マイナス00509、マイナス02139、N/A、プラス00205、08615、4:24、2
Хорошо. Здесь будет немного по-другому. Когда я зачитаю вам ΔV, первые две цифры будут направлены вперед, а следующие две — назад. То же самое с ΔT. Первая группа цифр будет направл
Okay, Jim, since we're in LOW BIT RATE now, we cannot monitor the for program alarms, et cetera, and we recommend that, in order for you to do so on board, you push in the following On pan
好的。重
Und das Abflussventil ist gesch
Cen
로저, 짐. 며칠 전처럼 컴퓨터에서 지울 수 있는 메모리 덤프를 다시 한번 진행하려고 합니다. 8시간 
프렌드
Roger. 45-1 101. 2+08. 12 37 50. 5+36. 10+33. 46-1 114. 2+25 14 12 47. 4+05. 9+33. 47-1 Fore and aft firing thrusters. 08 and 120. 0+14 and 2+30. 15 46 36. 3+17. 8+37. 48-1 Fore and aft thrusters. 24 and 120. 0+40 and 230, correction 2+30. 17 20 19. 2+42. 8+43. 49-4 111. 2+21. 20 06 48. 4+1
罗杰。比尔，出于好奇，我们可以简单说说低温罐的加热器和风扇的情况。我们注意到加热器工作正常，循环开关；随着时间的推移，循环频率增加，表明罐内出现了一些分层现象。然后，我们每隔4小时启动风扇几分钟，搅动一下罐内物质，加热器的循环频率就会降低一些，持续一段时间，直到再次
Houston
不快なほど暑いわけではない
계측기 상관관
Если нам удастся распутать здесь несколько проводов, мы 
मैंने ऑटो मोड से मैनुअल मोड में और फिर वापस ऑटो मोड 
Roger. Wir bereiten uns hier gerade auf den ersten Kommunikationscheck vor. Wir führen einen Omni-Kom
D'accord. C'est exact. Donc, en résumé, il va falloir allumer le système et lancer la boule de cristal, puis régler l'orientation, placer le drone dans le hublot et activer le guidage. Il faudra ensuite orienter manuellement le vaisseau spatial de façon à ce que le centre de la Terre soit aligné avec l'axe Z. Puis, effectuer une rotation autour de l'axe Z pour placer la pointe du croissant sur l'axe Y. L'axe X positif sera ainsi orienté vers le Soleil, comme nous l'avons vu précédemment. Le cro
Allez-y
We got a valid blood pr
Jim, juste un point à méditer pour toi et Fred, au cas où vous n'auriez pas été mis au courant: on en parle un peu en ce moment. Ces personne
Entschuldigung, das ist ein Fehler. Schalten Sie den
Ro
Okay. Two fast items: number one, it has been suggested that since Marezine takes some time to take effect, you might consider whether you would be interested in taki
अगर हमें कोई समस्या आती है, ठीक वैसी ही समस्या, जो पीछे की तरफ धूप में हो, तो शायद सेकेंडरी लूप को तब तक घुमाना अच्छा रहेगा जब तक समस्या हल न हो जाए। इस बारे में आप
الأفق هنا شديد السواد. السماء حالكة السواد، والأرض - أو القمر بالأحرى، معذرةً - مضي
That's affirmative, Jim. We haven't got a picture of it yet. It's going to be in the top part of the - Correction, top part of the at the top of the - the top of detent 2 and the top part of the, and it should, in attitude, if you're right on the Sun, should split the cursor, though that roll angle
好的。放射治疗：C
Okay, das – a
Роджер. Отлично, Фред-о. Это приведет вас к шагу 8, и вы увидите мигающее число 5018, когда вы включите режим PRO. Хорошо. При 5018 нам нужно выполнить автоматический маневр для изменения положения, поэтому просто выполните команду PRO с управлением наведением, PNGS; управлением режимом, PNGS, AUTO; и мы возьмем это положение. Теперь это позволит нам определить положение для проверки Солнца. В этой программе в стыковочной конфигурации у нас есть мертвая зона в 1,4 градуса; поэтому, чтобы помочь вам, вы можете позвонить, чтобы получит
Passez au 
В один раз — в другой раз, когда я попытался это использовать, — в следующий раз у меня получилось довольно точное измерение. Используя без фильтра, я ориентирова
Maintenant, en réponse à la question 2, il y a eu, bien sûr, une vibration transitoire dans le d
了解しました。船内の数量表示をお願いします
D'accord. Après les derniers « 400 plus zéro », « Ne dépassez pas les l
Oui. Cela semble s'être produit au moment où j'ai appliqué la poussée positive X, et apparemment le drone n'était pas centré, car d'une manière ou d'une autre, j'ai accidentellement dévié de mon assiette et le système de maintien d'assiette 
バズ、まだ心電図のデータが取れません。データを取得するには、ご都合の良い時に、心電図のリード線を交換していただくしかなさそうです。リード線は中央の青いピンに接続されています。予備のリード線が医療ボックスに入っています
أبولو 8، هيوستن. نعيد الآن بث صوركم التلفزيونية. يمكننا رؤية
네, 저희가 보기에는 당신과 프레드는 좀 주무셔
Friendship Se
Houston here. Your rates look very stable. It looks like your rates are damped out completely here. As far as we can see, it would be a
We'll keep one man with a hea
روجر. اقرأ من 62 إلى 74 بالمئة، يا فريندشيب سفن
Да, слишком высоко. Я никак не смогу его поднять, ес
Да. Я не думаю, что у нас действительно были трудности с пространством для головы. Мне казалось, что у меня было достаточно места для головы, и я могла... опуститься и управлять собаками. Просто на
わかりました。最初の星は26番星です。2セットの測定を行います。地球の地平線に近い位置で、26番星を使って測定します。次に、地球の地平線に近い位置で、16番星を
جيم، لقد قدرنا أنك استخدمت حوالي 50 بالمائة من قدرة نظام إدارة العمليات والصيانة (OAMS) 
Apollo 8, Houston. Bereit für die Übergabe von Carnarvon nach Guam zur vollen Stunde. Wir sollten durchgehend Kontakt haben, a
정말 많은 별들을 봤어요... 남반구의 별들도 봤고, 여름철 삼각형도 봤고... 베가, 북십자성도 봤네요. 이제 제가 떠오르는 것 같아요. 저기... 저
I'm afraid I didn't copy that, Fred, an
쌍둥이자리 VI님, 당신의 운세를 기다리고 
J'entendais Watertown, 
حسناً، لقد فعلت ذلك... الموق
Ken, soll ich beim nächsten Ma
Roger, bien reçu. Rayonnement 11005, 10006, 09007; aucun médicament; 37,1, 37,1, 37,1, 82, 84, 85, 87. Termin
로저. 잔차: -0.1, -0.2, -0.7. 그리고 우리는 DELTA-VZ에 대해 9.5인 NOUN 86
हाह
9월, 에드가 펌프 패키지를 봤다고 하네요, 하
罗杰。谢谢你，迈克。休息一下。老鹰，我们给你准备了一个K因子。
Roger. Okay. Der Cape rät nun, die Anzugseinstellung an Ort
休斯顿，阿波罗8号。你如何阅读
ब्लैकआउट 2+38 बजे से शु
D'accord. À l'étape 34, sous « Rangement final », qui est u
シグマ・セブン。前回の通信は理解できませんでしたが、
حسناً. الجزء الذي 
Bien. Appuyez sur ENTRÉE, puis sur 333, puis de nouveau sur ENTRÉE. Ensuite, nous vous demandons de lire le registre 1. Nous nous attendons à ce que le registre 1 contienne la valeur 10 000. Si c'est le cas, l'ordinateur effacera sa mémoire deux fois. Cela correspond à 10 000, deux fois la valeur affichée. Si la valeur affichée est différente de 10 000, appuyez sur ENTRÉE, puis sur 333, puis de nouveau sur 10 000, puis de nouveau sur ENTRÉE. Une fois cette opération effectuée, appuyez sur ENTRÉE pour lancer l'effacement. La mémoire effaçable sera alors 
Glaubst du, es
Roger. NOME 84: più 01223, meno tutti gli zeri, più 01889; NOME 33: 102 44 2700, pi
네, 밴스, 잠깐 쉬어도
Roger. Stand by
Apollo 8,
Roger. I copy that it's - tracking is easier using the sextant than the scanning telescope; it gives you finer control, and say 
Gee, I sure haven't se
- - हमारा सारा विश्लेषण 14 एम्पियर तक पावर डाउन पर आधारि
حسنًا، لقد فعلت ذلك - أنا مسجل فقط، وأنا أقترب من
ठीक है। पहले दबाव को पुनः बढ़ाने के लगभग 12 से 15 मिनट
L'ho
Roger. ÉVENT DE CARBURANT DE PROPULSEUR DE DESCENTE, OUVERT; ÉVENT DE COMBUSTIBLE 
Das erschei
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호. 무선
Okay. Strom 5, Notabschaltung. Punkt 1, erste Zeile: Ich streiche „And VHF-A“. Zweite Zeile: „SIMPLEX operation“. Dritte Zeile: Ich ersetze den zweiten Vorzeichen (Verstärker) durch „OFF“ und das letzte Wort „OFF“ durch „PCM“. Vierte Zeile ist in Ordnung. Fünfte Zeile: Ich streiche die gesamte Zeile. Beleuchtung: Wir haben die Flutlichter noch nicht benötigt, daher lassen wir sie ausgescha
Roger. Mike, I think we can explain that seven-tenths rate. When we - the first time through, you know, we failed to go through the, so we 
... semplicemente fanta
收到。飞马座就在地平线上。飞行路线在CSQ附近，你的53转/分。如果你注意俯仰角，你会保持90度
रॉजर। अंतरिक्ष यान के साथ परीक्षण मिलन के लिए 05:00:
好的。给
Ну, я об этом не говорил. Возможно, мы… возможно, рассмотрим этот вариа
Nous allons les mettre en cage tous
Okay, that's - Roger. That's both the numbers on the itself, and the little words like PROGRAM and VER
了解しました。該当しません。プラス 00202、02356 022 0228
Hier ist eine interessante kleine Neuigkeit, die man eigentlich ganz gut hören sollte. In Ann Arbor, Michigan, gibt es anscheinend eine neue Jugendgang. Sie nennt sich Gilnet Gang. Sie zieht durch die Straßen von Ann Arbor, agiert im Verborgenen und umgeht dabei manchmal das Gesetz. Sie nennen sich selbst die „Guerillas für das Gute“. Zu ihren Aktionen gehörte unter anderem, eine mit Obszönitäten beschmierte Brücke übermalt zu haben. Sie strichen sie in einer Nacht. Ein baufälliges Haus – beliebt bei den Kindern aus der Nachbarschaft, aber gefährlich – wurde verbarrikadiert. Blumenkästen in der Innenstadt, die leer standen, weil es Streit darüber gab, wer dafür verantwortlich war – die Wirtschaft oder die Regierung –, wurden mit Blumen bepf
Probabilm
Forse ti interesserà sapere, visto che sei già in viaggio, che un'astrologa di Houston, Ruby Graham, afferma che tutti i segni sono adatti al tuo viaggio sulla Luna. Dice che Neil è intelligente, Mike ha un buon giudizio e Buzz sa risolvere problemi complessi. Dice anche che Neil tende a vedere il mondo attraverso le
Ok, Houston. Il c
Dann schien jegliche Bewegung zum Stillstand gekommen zu sein, und wir näherten uns wohl. Also drehte ich das Raumschiff und versuchte, die Plattform auszurichten. In der Zwischenzeit sank die Boosterstufe deutlich unter uns ab. Daher gab ich den Versuch auf, die Plattform auszurichten und auf die Boosterstufe zuzusteuern, und 
जेमिनी VI, यह CSQ सर्जन है। कमांड पायलट के रक्तच
Dove hai messo il libro? Dove hai messo il primo? Qu
Roger. Nous sommes à votre disposition. Êtes
로저. 지상에
제미니 4, 휴스턴 CAP COM. 종
أبولو 13، هيوستن. م
Nessuno riesc
罗杰，卡纳里。在我收到这些照片之前信号就会中断。我想拍几张照片。让穆切
Окей. Я вам скажу, что вы могли бы сделать, если больше ничего не делаете, — нужно сделать пять отметок с интервалом в 30 с
C'est exact. Tu as fait une petite pause, Jim. On va s'en occuper avec la balle, en partant de l'attitude de la brûlure. 
Right. Well, we are seeing the entire earth now includi
مرحباً جاك، هذا في العمل. وبمقارنة قائمة جيم بقائمة التحقق الخاصة بي، وجدتُ فرقاً واحداً عند الدق
Houston, hier spricht Apollo 8. Wir möchten Sie darauf hinweisen, dass wir bezweifeln, ob wir die Sterne für unsere alternative Ausrichtung nutzen können. Wir konnten bisher noch keine 
Gemini 4, Hawaii, stand by for an 8 minute mark to r
Apollo 13, you're heading for gimbal 
Columbia und Tranquility Ba
Хо
Roger. Ti sento forte e chiaro. Non sono sicuro di aver capito tutto. Ho OMNI B in banda S, OMNI, traccia su MANUALE, e beam wid
Salve, Apollo 11. Houston. Siamo pronti a metterti a letto e darti la buonanotte, se ci fornisci
Houston, Verseau. Quel livre voulez-vous que nous ayons sous la main? En cas d'impré
Похоже, что в режиме отключения питания (неразборчиво) мы всё ещё потребляем чуть меньше 11 ампер. На первом участке — 10, на втором — чуть меньше 11. Расположение троса или соединительного кабеля на внешней дверце значительно затрудняло работу в открытом космосе, особенно в плане аэродинамики свободного троса перед космическим аппаратом. Когда я работал в этой зоне, трос, заканчиваясь, отбрасывал меня назад, и реакция поднимала меня обратно к аппарату, к адаптерной секции. Именно поэтому я постоянно выходил из поля зрения во время маневрирования над окнами, а затем меня уносило назад, к задней части аппарата. Мне постоянно приходилось подтягиваться, чтобы выб
- - DÉBIT BITA
Okay, here we come. Entry pad: Mid-Pacific, 000153; 000. The next two lines will be the of moonset and the Moon-check attitude; , 178; NOUN 61, minus 21.66, minus ; 00:28. The next four are N/A; DO is 4.00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353.1, 
Jim, une fois que tu auras fini de déplacer ton matériel et que ce sera possible, on aimerait interrompre la charge des batteries un instant pour activer la télémétrie et vérifier à nouveau les températures, comme hier. Tes batteries ont actuellement une capacité de 111 ampères-heures; on es
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप हमें ओम
Die meisten von ihnen befinden sich im Niede
写
Bien reçu, Wally. Si tu as le temps, pourra
रॉजर। मैं अभी
روجر. الأرض هنا أيضًا؛ وجيم، حان وقت فحص الفولت/الأمبير مرة أخرى. للعلم، لقد رفعنا
रॉजर। अब आपको मिल जाना चाहि
了解。
Péricynthion plus 2 - OK, péric
彼は順調に進んでいて、
Roger. Nous affichons une pression de carburant de 167, et de 163 dans le circuit AUX. Pensez-vous qu'il soit possible que nous ayons eu un déclenchement transitoire d'alerte concernant la pression du circuit AUX de carburant au début de la combustion, qui se serait corrigé d
Dies befindet sich im Ausgangsb
你好，通信技术部。友谊七号。你听
好的。下一页，电源7，面板16。第一
Хорошо, вот. Уберите это, и мы пройдемся по контрольному списку перед повторным запуском, и сделаем эт
了解。まずは機動、1、これは/で、重量から始まる。63295 - 163 + 129 + 001 36 
On Altair
रॉजर। रॉजर, फ्रैंक। अब आगे क्या होने वाला है, इस बारे में कुछ बातें। जिम के उठने पर तारों का नजारा देखने को मिलेगा; अभी ऐसा लग रहा है कि हमने पृथ्वी के क्षितिज को काफी हद तक देख लिया है, और सब कुछ ठीक है; और हम चंद्रमा के क्षितिज को देखने के लिए तैयार हैं। तो जिम के उठने पर, हम उसे चंद्रमा के साथ तारों के एक समूह के लिए उड़ान योजना की जानकारी देंगे। साथ ही, तारों को देखने के दौरान या उसके बाद हम चाहेंगे कि आप अपना अगला पानी का छिड़काव करें
Roger. I was just cracking open some acorns here for breakfast. Let me put them down, 
ええ、少し力を入れて、そ
わかりました。パネル11で、回路ブレーカーを閉じてください。次にアクティベーション25に進み、手順1、2、3を実行してください。その後ア
Pun
ジェームズ、もし君が宇宙船をあれほど大事に扱えないなら、もう二度と君に宇宙船を貸さないかもしれない。ジム、ヒューストン。ジャックがそこにいる間に、望遠鏡を覗いて星が見えるかどう
«Колумбия», это Хьюстон. Просим вас выполнить еще одно задание. Пожалуйста, позвольте автоматической оптике позаботиться о слежении и сосредоточьте свои усилия на попытке обнаружить объект на лунной поверхности. Если, конечно, вы сможете 
好的。关于第一项：第二项是12小时开尔文冷浸，经过我和这里以及飞行前的讨论，我认为大家一致同意我们不需要进行冷浸。所以我们将删除第二步。实际上，我认为我们确实需要进行冷浸，而且我们肯定需要在进入前对热水锅炉进行测试，以确保不会出现像之前那样干涸的情况。我们正在制定相关程序，稍后会向您汇报，我们会尽量在比尔在线的时候进行，以便大家都能同时参与讨论。我们希望在第8步和第9步之间，或者作为第8步的一部分，增加一个步骤。所有这些都在E-1页，其中我们在-4小时35分钟时将VHF切换到单工A模式。现在这已经超出了双向甚高频（VHF）的通信范围，但这样可以确保我们在接收到信号时它已经开启。我们已经能够通过下行链路传输到20000英里以外的地方，并且正在检查上行链路信号。所以，如果我们现在开启它，我们就能确保在任何可能接入甚高频（VHF）频段之前，它就已经开启了
はい、そうです。ご質問があるのは承知しております
我们现在开始第四
هذا يعادل قطرين قمريين على طول مسار الشمس في الجزء الساطع، صحيح؛ ربع إلى ثمن نصف قطر قمري للخارج، وهذا عمودي
Tout à coup, on a entendu un petit clic, et la puissance du signal a commencé à fa
Voici la liste de vérifica
Okay. We copy 39.3 and 1.20. And, Jim, I've got one more item for information for you. At - In about 45 minutes or so, you will get an H2O quantity caution light on the descent t
أبولو 11، هذه هيوستن
9, /: 45597, -040, +157, +34188, -01353, +00780 180 008 001, NA, +00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, 下 131, 左 28, +0758, -16500 12987, +- 或 36277
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। उड़ान भरने का समय 15:00, 5622, घटा 165, 47:04। क्या यह स
D'accord. Les suivants, deux, trois et
Roger. Capisco. OMNI Charlie. Mike, sappi che abbiamo un aggiornamento per te sul volo. Stimiamo che sia atterrato a circa 4 mig
알겠습니
Je ne sais pas si je 
アポロ11号、こちらヒュースト
Va bene
चूंकि आप पहले से 
알았다. 1 
أعطيت
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। ईगल के साथ हमारा डेटा खो गया ह
Никаких изменений, и мы готовы к выходу в открытый космос. У нас есть камеры, оружие, всё оборудование собрано, мы завершаем окончательную проверку 
켄
Скотт, мне кажется, о
Bene. Abbiamo appena finito di esaminare tutti i tuoi sistemi e tutte le informa
……双子座 VI。结束
D'accord. On sort un peu du cadre de l'avion mainten
ठीक है। उन्होंने बताया है कि अंतरिक्ष यान GT-2 और GT-3 पर किए गए जमीनी परीक्षण में यही समस्या सामने आई थी और ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि इसका कारण कंप्यूटर का अत्य
Alle Systeme funktionieren jetzt einwandfrei. Ich möchte Ihnen einen kurzen Überblick über die Steuerungssysteme geben.
罗杰。理解并接受，你就
Ora 
Yes. We have decided to use a canister and, you know that the liquid-cooled garment has a bag around it that we think we can use, too, or that we know we can use. We've tried it. So what you have is the - a ba
了解。スタートコンプ-プッシュ。プラットフォーム-軌道レート。
Houston, 11. Je ne crois pas que nous vous appelions à ce mo
ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस, ह्यूस्टन से। क्या आप हमें बता सकते ह
هذ
ただあなたの
Bene. Riga 1, sul pannello 16, saranno aperti gli ASCENT FEED 1 e 2. Saranno aper
好的。我已经拿到应
Ok. Vi abbi
In questo momento non stai ne
Percez-le s
The switch is OFF. B
جيميني 4، هيوستن CAP COM. شغّل مفتاح قراءة الكمية واتركه مُشغّلاً حتى أقول لك
Friendship Seven, si vous êtes prêts, pouvons-nous procéder 
Under
好的。我只是想让你
いいえ、最近はやっていません。今回の検査の一環として、今度実施します。血圧測定はありまし
Okay. I don't see any loose sensor - the
Okay, Bill. Ich möchte meine letzte Anmerkung zur Verwendung des Bordzustandsvektors für Punkt 4 zurücknehmen. Nach weiterer Prüfung vor Ort müssen die Berechnungen nun dringend durchgeführt werden. Anstatt dies zu verschieben oder doppelt durchzuführen, werden wir die bisher üblichen Verfahren anwenden. Was die Mondumlaufbahn betrifft, haben wir uns das genauer angesehen, und einige Kollegen – Jack Schmitt und seine Kollegen – untersuchen im Hintergrund die Auswirkungen der Fenster. Im Grunde genommen scheinen zwei Optionen Einfluss auf Punkt 2 zu haben. Eine Möglichkeit wäre, dass Sie und Jim die Plätze tauschen und Jim so seine SAM-Daten erhält. Die andere Möglichkeit wäre, das Raumschiff zu drehen und Jim die Optik so weit wie möglich nach vorne richten zu lassen, um seine SAM-Daten durch das Teleskop zu erfassen. Wir würden gerne Ihre Gedanken dazu hören, was Sie mit den Fenstern machen könnten. Wenn Sie Vorschläge haben, würden 
了解。MSC
J'espère qu'on pourra réparer l'autre objectif ou trouver des informations à so
Roger. Nessun problema di carburante. Sembra solo che ci sia un limite al numero di P22 e al numero di caselle della gri
Die Manschette ist in voller Größ
Roger. Credo che il dottor Mueller stia tornando da Città del Capo. Vi porteremo i suoi
ينعكس ضوء الشمس عن الهيكل. ومع وجود التلسكوب الملحق، يصبح عديم الفائدة تقريبًا. أعتقد أن خرائط النجوم التي زودتنا بها هيئة إدارة الموانئ البحرية ستكون مفيدة للغاية إذا اضطررنا - لأي سبب كان - إلى تحديد الأهداف من خلال التلسكوب. يمكننا استخدامها كدلي
Хорошо. Вы
This has been going on since abou
Apollo 8, this is Houston. We are going to have a command ch
इस स्थिति में, ऊपर आसमान की ओर देखने का भ्रम ज़रूर होता है, और अगर क्षितिज न हो, तो बस काला आसमान ही दिखाई देता है। कॉकपिट में रोशनी काफी तेज़ है। एक बार अभ्यस्त हो जाने पर, केबिन लाइट से इसे कम किया जा सकता है। फिलहाल, सूट सर्किट की समस्या के कारण मैं रोशनी कम करने में थोड़ा हिचकिचा रहा हूँ। मैं अपनी उंगलियों की रोशनी का भरपूर इस्तेमाल कर रहा हूँ। ऐसा लगता है कि भविष्य की उड़ानों में, हमारे पास कोई ऐसा उपकरण होना चाहिए जिसमें हम वस्तुओं को भर सकें और उन्हें कुछ समय के लिए वहीं फंसाए रख सकें।
제대로 하세요. 시간을
Ich schätze, es waren ungefähr 20 Minuten, nachdem
Я вык
Im schlimmsten Fall ja. Die Y-förmige Strebe dort ist wa
Okay. Sembra che la situazione stia gradualmente peggiorando fino a diventare praticamen
टीटीसीए, जेट
रेखा अभी भी तनी हुई नहीं है। मेरे पास कुछ तस्वीरें हैं जिनमें रेखा पीछे की ओर लहरा रही है। मेरा अनुमान है कि इसमें लगभग एक चक्र प्रति म
Friendship Seven, Fr
82人全員が北朝鮮と
ठीक है। आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं कि पश्चिम टेक्सास स्थित मैकडॉनल्ड वेधशाला का लेजर लगभग 181 घंटे 30 मिनट से चालू हो जाएगा और एक घंटे
No, from our explosion
ठी
Ich lege es hier ab. Bring es herunter. Hierher. Legt sie alle an ein
सेवा मॉड्यूल बी। हम कॉपी करते हैं। कोई समस्या नही
روجر. فرانك، م
La quantit
주 버스 연결 단자; AC, OFF - DC
同意，请复制以下内容。此注释应为：使用 NC
Okay, Bill. Das kommt auf Seite 2, Strich 22 deines Flugplans. Für den Kommandomodul-Piloten – ich habe es ihm ja schon gesagt – möchten wir, dass er oben auf der Seite, ungefähr bei [Zeitangabe fehlt], eine Ausrichtung durchführt. Danach sollte die Navigation wie geplant erfolgen. Die vier Sterne sind Procyon, Regulus und Alphard. Wir wissen, dass Alphard kein optimaler Stern ist, Regulus steht etwa 3 Grad über dem Horizont und Spica hat einen Zapfenwinkel von 48 Grad. Wenn Jim also Schwierigkeiten hat, jeweils eine Navigationseinheit zu jedem dieser vier Sterne durchzuführen, schlagen wir vor, dass er den betreffenden Stern auslässt und stattdessen zwei Navigationseinheiten zu einem anderen Stern durchführt, der ihm besser liegt
Позвольте мне показать вам примерную разницу во времени по Гринвичу, чтобы вы могли сравнить наше текущее 
아래쪽으로 이어지는 다음 크레이터가 바로 듀크 아일랜드이고, 왼쪽에는 사진 중앙 부근에 있는 가장 큰 크레이터인 마스켈린 W가 있습니다. 이것은 하강 중 약 
일출. 아아아! 그때 반딧불이들이 얼마나 아름답게 빛났던지. 정말 눈부셨어. 그런데, 음, 그게 다야... 아, 맞다, 혹시 누가 이 글을 읽는다면, 내가 반딧불이들을 가지고 있다는 걸 알려줄게. 정말 밝아. 캡슐에서 빛이 뿜어져 나와. 뚜껑을 두드리면 수백 마리가 쏟아져 나와. 캡슐 옆면을 두드리면 엄청난 양의 반딧불이가 쏟아져 나와. 그중 몇몇은 빛을 내는 것 같아. 잠깐 다른 쪽으로 고개를 돌려볼
Ro
Roger. Negative, in automatic position did not get a 
休斯顿，你们在高增
ゴ
Okay, Joe. Was die Nachrichten angeht, möchte Jim das noch etwas hinauszögern, und ich möchte die FAO bitten, wenn er im Laufe des Tages Zeit hat, wenn wir ein Flugplan-Update mit den Aktivitäten erhalten, die wir während des Mondorbits als optional vereinbart haben, und den wenigen Aktivitäten, die wir streichen wollten. Ich glaube, ich habe die Karte beim Anlegen der Raum
はい、マイクさん、あなたの車の形
阿波罗13号，休斯顿。大约1分钟后。我
Je vous le dis, on a tous
Roger. There's no problem fuel wise. It's just th
OK. Le point d'entrée (PAD) se situe dans la zone MIDPAC: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, +1102, -17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28; DL et VL, les quatre ne sont pas applicables; DO, 4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380; l'étoile de visée est Scorpio Theta, haut 314, droite 34, vecteur de portance vers le haut. Commentaires: les données d'entrée supposent l'absence de manœuvres en milieu de trajectoire. Votre entrée terrestre: -30 mi
分かりました。ジャック、念のため言っておきますが、パワーア
Okay, Sie sehen also, wie aus Fenster 1 etwas Dampf austritt, und Sie haben ein etwa 10 cm großes, 4 cm 
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8
Hallo Frank. Es ist Weihnachtsmorgen im Hause Borman. 
حسنًا. فهمت يا فريد. وقراءتك لثاني أكسيد الكربون هي 0.1 
Ok
ケン、こ
ب؛ دلتا-في، 14.0؛ زمن الاحتراق، 0 زائد 24؛ الانعراج 180، الميل 0؛ النو
هل ستضغط على زر إيق
Et, Buzz, mise à jour de la bande S orientable pour vous sur le
よし、ジョー。最後に手に入れたのは、ヘリウムモニターからスーパークリティ
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호
Роджер. Температура пара в скафандре 69 градусов, а в кабине +11. Она резко упала, когда загорелся индикатор избытка воды в кабине. Думаю, я попробую еще раз увеличить поток воды в скафандре. Если это не сработает, я переключусь на закрытый режим и начну все снач
रॉजर। हम दिखा रहे हैं कि फ्यूल सेल 2 का रेडिएशन आउट तापमान लगभग 90 डिग्री होगा, और 1 और 3 का तापमान थोड़ा कम होगा - शायद 75 या 80 डिग्री। लगभग एक घंटे पहले आपने फ्
Roger. weight 36651, weight 33627, pitch trim minus 0.72, yaw trim plu
Roger. Avez-vous bien reçu la demande concernant le vaisseau spatia
Roger. Questa è Friendship Seven. Il finestrino, le indicazioni di assetto e il periscopio sono tutti in perfetto stato. Vedo il lato oscuro emergere dal periscopio dietro di me in questo momento. La pressione in cabina è 5,5 e si mantiene. La temperatura in cabina è 95 gradi. L'umidità relativa è del 28 percento. Ho impostato la temperatura della mia tuta sulla posizione "aumento dell'acqua" per un maggiore raffreddamento. La temperatura del vapore indica attualmente 61 grad
Acquario, Houston. Vai
Proprio in quel momento stavamo sorvolando la serie di crateri Messier, guardandoli verticalmente, e nel Messier A possiamo vedere blocchi di buone dimensioni sul fondo del cratere. Non so a che altitudine siam
Roger. Wie sieht es mit deiner Heliumtemperatur und d
Und nur zur Erinnerung: Vergessen Sie nicht
罗杰。捕获闩锁在探针
Gemini 
Bene. Ora, vo
Bien, Apollo 8. Le premier test est terminé. Nous allons maintenant passer en mode liaison montante « COMMANDE ET TÉLÉMISSION » et désactiver la modulation vocale. Nous resterons dans ce mode pendant deux minutes et demie et enverrons un message de test. Cela n'aura aucun impact sur votre ordinateur ni sur la configuration de votre panneau de commande. Vous pourriez observer le bruit de la bande S lié au verrouillage de la liaison. Cependant, le signal sur votre wattmètre devrai
Ben
Die einzigen beiden Sicherungen 
Aucun d'entre eux ne sera probablement d'accord sur
좀 정신없네요. 제가 이 일을 한 지 얼마 안 됐거든요. 스페인 사람들이 투우장에서 가죽 부대에 술을 따라 마시던 방
И, Игл, Хьюстон. У
Ma
那
收到。明白了。有几盏灯亮
Роджер, се
Я вижу там яркую звез
روجر. إذا ضغطت ع
ठीक है। यह बहुत आसान है। हम देख रहे हैं कि आपको पहले ही ऊपर बुलाया जा चुका है, इसलि
Хорошо, звучит неплохо. Потому что я не знаю, где я — как далеко я тебя потерял. Хорошо, панель 4; ТЕЛЕКОММУНИКАЦИЯ, ГРУППА 1, к AC1. На панели 5 замкните следующие контакты: ГРУППА ДАВЛЕНИЯ 1, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ГРУППА ДАВЛЕНИЯ 2, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ТЕМПЕРАТУРА, ОСНОВНОЙ B; ПРЕОБРАЗОВАТЕЛЬ ВТОРИЧНОЙ ПЕТЛИ, ОСНОВНОЙ B; РАДИАТОР УПРАВЛЕНИЯ/НАГРЕ
알겠습니다. 잭, 물에 대해 한 가지 더 말씀드리겠습니다. 압력을 완전히 빼낼 만큼 충분한 양의 물을 넣지 않으면, 남아있는 압력이 1~3시간 안에 빠져나가게 됩니다.
Dann möchten wir, dass Sie die Kamera so ans Fenster halten, dass die Nase nicht im Bild ist. Wir benötigen zwei Fotoserien. Bitte verwenden Sie den Pulsmodus und richten Sie das Raumschiff senkrecht nach unten auf die Erde. Ich gebe Ihnen etwas Zeit zum Starten. Die Aufnahme erfolgt auf der Nachtseite der Erde. Geben Sie nun einen Impuls nach oben und machen Sie ein Foto mit geöffnetem Verschluss (Bulb-Position). Sobald das Raumschiff über den Horizont gestiegen ist, machen Sie ein weiteres Foto mit einem Impuls nach unten und ebenfalls mit geöffnetem Verschluss. An
機首を下げな
Oh, Roger, Apollo 11. Ti abbiamo fatto raggiungere un assetto posigrado e ti vogliamo bene: que
Okeydoke. I'll tell you what you could do, if you're not doing anything else, is - supposed to take five marks 30 seconds apart. W
Roger, Jim. Wir möchten für ein paar Minuten die Kontrolle über das Band übernehmen, um sic
अपोलो
Gemin
Нет. На сам
Das ist bejahend. Das Fahrwerk ist ausgefah
13, ह्यूस्टन। हम आपसे कुछ रीडिंग सत्यापित करने का अनुरोध करते हैं। हमें फ्यूल सेल 1 पर नाइट्रोजन का दबाव चाहिए। हमें फ्यूल सेल 2 पर ऑक्सीजन का 
Okay, Joe. I have one more question, here. If we get a little bit ahead of time on the command module full powerup after we jettison the service module, I'd like to go to JETT attitude early, and make sure we get that part squared away and sit there for a while before JETT of 1 hour. Now, will we be using power up to that time? Ther
Natch. Cabin temperature — 92. Suit temperature — 58. Cabin pressure is 5.6. Suit CO2 is 3/4. Left bottle is 5100. Right bottle is 5050. O2 quantity 62. Press
Роджер. Перицинфия плюс 2, минимум / 62871, N
아니요, 저는 미래지향적인 태도가 훨씬 더 좋아요. 예를 들어,
На данном этапе мне не хочется
روجر. فهمت قصدك جيدًا، وبصوت عالٍ وواضح. - لا يزال لدي
Fred observe actuellement à travers notre appareil optique. C'est un instrument qui sert à aligner notre plateforme, et Fred essaie de voir quelle image extérieure il pourrait obtenir. Nous pourrions peut-être utiliser une caméra TV pour observer l'extérieur du module de commande 
Hast du den RET 400 K kopier
O
Хорошо. Это предварительные результаты, но они дадут вам некоторое представление. Скорректированная высота составляет 17 ± 4 километра, и тот факт, что это ± 4 километра, указывает на вашу последовательность в оценке высоты. Эффективная высота составляе
Bon, il y a une minute, alors que j'étais à l'étage, j'ai remarqué ce qui semblait être une nouvelle ventilation provenant du module de service. Je l'ai vue par la fenêtre 1, et j'ai aussi aperçu un morceau de métal – un carré d'environ 10 cm de côté – de couleur argentée,
좋아. "크리스마스 이브 밤, 우주 저 멀리 아폴로 8호 승무원들은 달 착륙 경쟁에서 막 승리했지. 헤드셋은 콘솔에 조심스럽게 걸려 있었고, 크리스 크래프트가 곧 도착하길 바랐어. 프랭크 보먼은 침대에 포근하게 누워 '킬로이가 여기 있었다'라는 환상에 잠겨 있었지. 짐 러벨
حسنًا يا رون، بالنسبة لـ MIDPAC: 000، 152، 001، 194، 46 06، 267، زائد 1332، ناقص 16917، 064، 36194، 649، 14045، 36275، 195 03 06، 0028، 154، 084، 2240، 180، 400، 02 13، 00 17، 03 51، 09 02، 45، 0189، 277، لا يوجد شيء متاح، ارفع المتجه للأعلى، قم بال
Okay, VII und VI. Hawaii wird bereitstehen. Wir hab
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, लाल फिल्टर, पोलराइजिंग फिल्टर, लाल और नीले फिल्टर होल्डर और कुछ टेप न
روجر، 
Der von Bill angeforderte
تنورة سبتمبر... 
रॉजर। मेरे पास अभी 1 और 4 पैड मौजूद हैं। मैं अभी एक पल में आपको पढ़कर सुनाने के लिए तैयार
컬럼비아, 휴스턴.
Okay, Tom. You got it all and here's what we'd like you to do prior to making the burn. We'd like you to move 5 to 10 feet north of Spacecraft VII and about 50 feet behind. This is prior to making the burn. Now the reason for this is to keep the Spacecraft VII D-4/D-7 instrume
네. 방금 말씀드린 건 착륙 후 환기구(POSTLANDING VENT), FLT/PL이라고 표시된 부분을 여는 겁니다. 다음은 직접 여유 공간(DIRECT ULLAGE) 두 개인데, 이것도 여는 
ठ
마이너스 Y자형 지지대에 있는 
마이크, CDR 측정값은 4, 즉 0.04이고, CMP
И, 13, это Хьюстон. В этом случае мы хотели бы выполнить шаг 3, а именно: подключить бата
Хьюстон, Транквилити. Мы готовы начать проверку электрооборудования. Будем модулировать ЧМ в S-диапазоне. Конец связ
这里有个挺有意思的小新闻，听起来挺不错的。密歇根州安娜堡市出现了一个新的青少年帮派，名叫吉尔内特帮（Gilnet Gang）。他们秘密地在安娜堡的街头游荡，有时甚至会绕过法律。他们
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 일단은 체크리스트에 나온 대로 진행하세요. 회로 
I've got a comment about the point on the Earth where the Sun's rays reflect back up toward us. In general, the color of the oceans is mostly uniform and it's bright and darker blue except for that region that's about one-eighth of an Earth's radius in diameter; and in this circular area, the blue of the water turns a grayish color, and I'm sure that's where the Sun's rays are being reflected back on u
Eagle, Houston. Dopo l'imbardata, angoli: passo in banda S, meno 9, imbardata 
지금 보시는 것이 바로 오디세이호 기수 부분에 있는 탐사 장비입니다. 상당히 무거운 장비이지만, 무중력 상태에서는 무게감이 전혀 느껴지지 않아 훨씬 쉽게 움직일
没错。首先，我将快速回顾一下主要事件的时间，然后再补充一些细节。好的。进入界面时间是142小时40分钟；大约在此之前6个半小时左右，我们将启动整个流程，首先是启动加热器，检查指挥中心温度，并在必要时预热指挥中心，我们估计可能需要这样做。稍后我们会提供详细的操作步骤。大约在此之前6小时左右，我们将开始启动，使用您上次中途飞行时使用的修改后的30分钟检查清单。然后，在大约5小时之前，我们希望您像之前一样，使用地球晨昏线调整姿态，以便进行体轴对准；一旦我们完成上述操作，我们将执行-7，这看起来大约是每秒2英尺的燃烧，或者持续约15秒。据我所知，现在已经降到了1.5英尺，所以完全在安全范围内。好的。执行完-7后，我们将立即开始调整服务舱的抛弃姿态，由于我们比通常更早抛弃它，所以它会保持在平面内。我们不需要也不希望出现平面外的分量。因此，它会保持在平面内，服务舱会沿着半径矢量指向外侧。然后，我们将开始准备指令舱，为服务舱单引擎推进程序（SEP）做准备，包括
बस यह सुनिश्चित कर लें
로저. 정말 감사합
산소 소모량은 어떤가요? 그래프로 그려봤는데 비교적 양호한 것 같습니
Okay, then jump down to just about 159:28. Cross out "Maneuver to contamination field p
Roger, Bill. Beim nächsten Einsatz im Sonnenli
Хорошо. На странице E-9, в шаге 39 внизу проверки пиротехнической цепи, есть шаг, где написано: панель 8, все автоматические выключатели ЗАМКНУТЫ, кроме одного, а затем перечисл
I must send my greetings to the other people of our same area. The fact that we are two h
Friendship
Roger. Questo dov
لا، في الحقيقة لم نفعل. لقد كان الجو جافاً في تلك المنطقة منذ أن 
...
알겠습니다. 마이크, 약 11분 후 83시 44분에 84시 30분에 방송이 있을 예정입니다. 방송 전에, 또는 방송 시간에 S 밴드를 고이득 트랙은 REACQ로, 
好的。我查阅了资料，关于那226个断路器，其中涉及六个断路器，它们都是——它们是配电盘最下面一排从左数起的前六个。它们在“照明”电路下
了解しました
分かりました。翻
Roger RKV, ihr habt euch getrennt. Ich habe hier nur den Anfang und den letzten Teil d
哦，那太好了。不过我把洛弗尔安排到沙发底下去了。
Температура скафандра составляет 74 градуса; температура пара, выходящего из скафа
11日
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्टन। यह अपो
只有最新形成的地貌特
Also – soll ic
OK. Bonne confirmation, Jack. Il ne manque que le numéro 1 à 4. Je n'ai pas bien entendu 
そして、アポロ11号、ヒューストン。ホワイトチームが帰還情報
ええ、もちろんです、ビル。もし興味があれば、具体的な数字など何でも教えてくれます
Фрэнка пока нет на связи; он скоро появи
收到。继续报告。舱压5.5，保持良好。舱内空气温度95华氏度；相对湿度20%；冷却剂用量67%；宇航服温度67华氏度；压力5.8；蒸汽温度50华氏度，正在缓慢下降。氧气浓度70-100%；电流22安培。除了故障之外，目前唯一异常的情况是太空舱周围出现了一些发光的小颗粒，日出时分太平洋上空出现了成千上万个。
罗杰，1
... 로저, 알겠
Oui. Nous pouvons entendre et sentir le cardan du moteur pend
We know there's a lot of scientists from a number of countries standing by to see the lunar samples, and we thought you'd be interested to see them as they really are here. These two boxes are the sample return containers. They - They're vacuum packed containers that were closed in a vacuum on the lunar surface, sealed, and then brought inside 
حسن
Roger. Pericynthian plus 2, minimum / 62871, NA, NA,
Принято. Мы пол
كنا نبحث عن "مخلب القط" أيضاً، معتقدين أننا ربما كنا في منطقة بعيدة، خلف "القمة الكبيرة". لكنني أعتقد أنه من المحتمل أن تكون تلك هي "الحفرة الغربية" التي عبرناها أثناء اله
ヒューストン、1
ジェミニ4号、ジェミニ4号。こちら
And the EVAP flow valve, that's open now, and I'
Стальногол
Je passe maintenant en grossissement faible. Correction en grossissement élevé sur le périscope. Voyez ce que ça donne… Elle a dévié d'environ 5 degrés vers la droite. Observez comment elle s'aligne avec le péri
It should be pretty
あれは面白い話だったよ。ショックは感じなかったし、かなり安定していると思っていたのに。そこでリトラクト（後退）に行ったら、大混乱になったんだ。皆さんは、リトラックサイクル中にかなりガクガクしていたように見えましたか
Kein Problem, ich kann das den ganzen
好的。第三行，打开接下来的五个——更正——打开左边的前五个，关闭 HEATER，关闭 SIG
D'accord. Je ne mesure aucune tension sur la batterie C, et l'ampérage semble être d'environ 2 ampères, mais cela pourra
이글, 휴스턴. S 밴드를
मान लीजिए, हमारी स्थिति यहाँ काफी अ
روجر. ساعة واح
RKV陰性、双子座4度。得られたのはアセンディングノードだけで、他の情報は全て見逃し
杰克，就到此为止吧。
好的，休斯顿。热水锅炉已重新维修，背压阀关闭 1 分钟
Gemini 4, this is Houston CAP COM. Go
信号清晰，阿波罗8号。感谢你们精
रॉजर। मैंने आपकी बात
हमारे रडार परीक्षणों से पता चलता है कि ऊंचाई का खतरा 50,000 फीट है। दृश्य ऊंचाई परीक्षण के अनुसार ऊ
조명(LIGHTING) 항목 아래; 투광 조명(FLOOD), 열림; 트랙(TRACK), 열림. ED 로직 - 수정(ED LOGIC - Correction) 항목 아래, ED: 로직(LED: LOGIC), 열림. 하강 엔진 오버라이드(DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE), 열림. 슈트 흐름 제어(SUIT FLOW CONTROL) 항목 아래, 열림. 3번째 줄, 통신(COMM): 디스플레이(DISPLAY), 열림; VHF A 송신기(VHF A TRANSMITTER), 열림; VHF B 수신기(VHF B RECEIVER), 열림. 디스플레이(DISPL
Bien, équipage. La seule autre information que j'ai à vous communiquer pour le moment concerne la mise à jour de votre zone de décollage à +35 heures. Il s'agit d'une modification par rapport à la zone que nous vous avons attribuée hier. Cette mise à jour vise à éviter les conditions météorologiques défavorables dans
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 지형에 관해 저희가 드릴 수 있는 최선의 조언은 불규칙한 모양의 분화구 서쪽을 살펴보시고, 그 남서쪽 방향으로 가시면 된다는 것
Здесь, внизу,
हाँ, सही है। ठीक है। 
Bonjour, Muchea Com Tech, Friendship Seven. Je vous ai bien reçus; comm
スーツの入口で 2 度の低下を示
State facendo un ottimo lavoro. È un'immagine davvero stabile, qui. Siamo... La nitidezza è eccellente. Il colore, è... le nuvole sono... I bianchi sono distinti. Il resto, se sembra, almeno a me sul monitor che sto osservando, è un blu piutt
スティールヘッド
Eagle, Houston. We read y
Il Sole rimbalza sulla struttura. Con il telescopio attaccato, è praticamente inutile. Credo che le mappe stellari fornite dall'MPAD sarebbero molto utili se dovessimo usare il telescopio... se per qualche motivo dovessimo segnare qualcosa. Potremmo usarle come guida per ciò che stiamo osservando e dire: "Beh,
حسنًا، أبولو 8. دعوني أخبركم بموضوعنا الأول، وهو مراجعة جميع إجراء
这很有意思。表面很软，但偶尔我用应
نعم. تبدو جيداً على أر
프렌드십 세븐, 과이마스입
Сотрудники службы безопасности сообщили, что у них налажена очень хорошая связь по вопросам дистанционного управления "воздух-земля", и хотели бы, чтобы вы подробно рассказали о проблеме с закрытием 
Хорошо. Уровень АРУ упал до того уровня, который я называю уровнем шума, — это был уровень напряжени
क्या? दोब
네. 카메라를 오른쪽으로 움직이면 화면에서 지구가 왼쪽으로 이동합니다. 화면에서 명암 경계선은 수평 방향과
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. ليلة سعيدة من الفريق الأبيض للمرة الأخيرة. سنغادر عندما تستيقظون صباحًا. لقد كان من دواعي سرورنا العمل معكم. كان عرضًا رائعًا منكم جميعًا. نقدر ذلك كثيرًا، وسنراكم عند خروجكم من مركبة ال
ठ
Apollo 8, Houston. La qualité de l'enregistrement est excellente. Il nous reste environ 15 minutes pour transférer les données, ce que nous ferons dès que nous aurons un gain élevé. Ter
这是友谊七号。我没听清你的话。我大声地读了，但听得含糊不清。完毕
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 통화 중일 때 OMNI를 통해 높은 비트 
잭, 마침 운이 좋게도 방금 전에 지휘 
الوقت الآن هو عام 1821. هل يمكنني قراءة هذه الكلمات في جهاز الت
Ok. Per quanto riguarda la temperatura del serbatoio di elio: non è registrata a basso bit rate, e guardando i nostri dump su nastro, la maggior parte del materiale che abbiamo sul retro ha un bit rate basso. Quindi non saremo in grado di darvi un numero esatto, ma guardando quello che abbiamo ogni volta che usciamo dalla vista e tornia
रॉजर। आपके सिस्टम अभी भी ठीक लग रह
Okay. Es ist Zeit fü
J'ai bien compris, Jim. Pour tes sorties extravéhiculaires, garde les positions prévues: BEF et un roulis de 180°. Ce sera 
रॉजर। फ्रैंक, क्या आपको लगता है कि आप इसे गोलाकार रूप से जला पाएंगे? अगर आप इसे किसी और दिशा में जलाते हैं, तो हम इसकी तीव्रता बढ़ाना चाहेंगे।
Page 14, right-hand side, near the bottom under "Orbital Science," scratch out "Verify ON,
Nous allons 
No, we sure don't (cough) - sure don't. We're showing - we're showing about 15 degrees plus pitch 
And, Eagle, here. I have read out address in the 404, 405 and 406, and I had believed that 405 and 406 would both be all zeros, and I would propose 
まるで三重サーカス。燃料電池のパージ作
分かりました、ジム。まだ手順を推奨する準備が整っていないので、その件についてはお話ししたくありませんでした。アンペア数が足りないため、通常の電源チェックリストに従ってCM/に電源を入れることができません。1リングずつ予熱していただく必要があるかもしれません。現在検討中です。もう一つの可能​​性としては、その時点で電源を切って予熱を行い、その後再び電源を入れて、最終的に電源
Credo di sì. Vedo delle crepe sul rivestimento esterno intorno al tunnel. Nel rivestimento termico pr
Подождите. Я сейчас про
متجهًا نحو 
रॉजर। समझ गया। GET बर्न 02 45 50; डेल्टा-V, 26.2; 0 प्लस 
晚上好。我是阿波罗11号的指挥官。一百年前，儒勒·凡尔纳写了一部关于登月之旅的小说。他的宇宙飞船“哥伦比亚号”从佛罗里达州起飞，完成登月之旅后降落在太平洋。今天，随着现代版的“哥伦比亚号”明天也将与地球和太平洋完成对接，我们觉得与
جيمين
Le deuxième point, bien sûr, est que lorsque vous arrêtez votre contrôle thermique passif, vous êtes à environ 90 degrés par rapport à l'axe du sol. Par conséquent, lorsque vous effectuez un lacet à gauche, vous devrez continuer jusqu'à ce que l'angle de cardan central avoisine les 60 degrés. Vous obtiendrez les 30 degrés supplémentaires grâce au décalage entre la direction pointée par la caméra et votre axe X positif. La somme des deux angles sera d'environ 90 degrés. Nous voulions simplement nou
좋아, 버즈. 목적은 근접 비행이야. SPS/G&N: 62815, +0.97, -0.20 0.70 54 5944, -0.0028, +0.0023
نعم، عليّ الحصول على قائمة ال
И, Джек, Водолей. Раз уж ты об этом думаешь, — до того, как у нас возникли проблемы со связью, мы хотели узнать, стоит ли подключать систему сл
わか
자, 소각 카드에서 세 번째 줄은 CB(11)을 제외하고 모두 STAB/CONTROL CB를 CLOSED로, OPEN으로, ABORT STAGE를 OPEN으로, AELD를 OPEN으로, CB(16) AEL
로저 RKV님, 연락이 끊겼네요. 메시지의 앞부분과 뒷부분만 받았
로저. 그때
You know, if I lined up the yaw, I'd line it up right there. What 
Свечение незначительное: совсем чуть-чуть. Показания 0,5 г. Система Aux Damp, похоже, работает хорошо. Надеюсь, топлива хватит. Показания 1 г. Выделяются несколько струек дыма сзади. Видны зеленые вспы
Für das große Astro Blue Bonnet Spiel, den Basketballklassiker mit anschließendem Astro Blue Bonnet Spiel, sind SMU und Oklahoma angereist. Die Stimmung ist aufgeheizt. Hier steht nicht, wer als Favorit gilt. Ich recherchiere das und melde mich später, falls es einen Favoriten gibt. Der Davis Cup läuft gerade in Australien, und die USA wollen ihn zurückerobern. Anscheinend gelten wir heute als Favoriten. Eine weitere Neuigkeit: O. J. Simpson wurde von der Walter Camp Football Foundation zum zweiten Mal in Folge zum College-Football-Spieler des
짐, 투구 방향이 지금 잘못된 것 빼고는
Okay, Fred. Since you went ahead and used the condensate container, we got the procedure in for using it. I'm not going to read it up to you except that it cautions a little bit about shaking it too much or about filling it too full, because they feel th
All right. Now, I've come above the spacecraft and
Il va fal
Apollo 11, Houston. Basierend auf unseren Beobachtungen seit der Mittellinie zeigen wir einen Gammawert von -6,57 an. Dies ist jedoch vorläufig, und wir gehen davon aus, dass sich die Position nach weiterer Beobachtung stabilisieren wird und wir sie präzise in den Korridor einfädeln können. Sie befindet sich etwa in der Mitte des Korridors; alles sieht gut aus. Wir werden I
24
Хорошо. В принципе, это правильно. Позвольте мне немного пошагово объяснить, а потом я зачитаю вам этапы. Думаю, так будет понятнее. Схема такова: вы можете направить свой телескоп на заданный набор углов, которые направят вашу оптику на Луну. Теперь, в любой момент, в любом положении, если вы можете посмотреть в телескоп и распознать звездные узоры настолько хорошо, что
ठीक है। जिम, मेरे पास आपके लिए दो अपडेट हैं। पहला, धूमकेतु बेनेट को देखने की प्रक्रिया के बारे में है, और मैं जैक के उठने तक इसके बारे में आपको जानकारी नहीं दूंगा। दूसरा अपडेट तीन घंटे पहले उड़ान भरने से 
慣性を保持してい
This is Friendship Seven. Have yawed
コロンビア、ヒューストン。了解。了解しました。イーグル、アンテナは前方に設置するのが最適のようです。それから、ブレイク。イーグル、TIGとP32の装
众议院筹款委员会昨日也同意对石油公司、银行和公用事业公司进行税收改革，此举每年可为联邦政府增加高达20亿美元的收入。该委员会还初步投票决定修改电话、电力、天然气和石油管道公司的会计程序，并削减互助储蓄贷款机
EVA项目状态为“GO”
Ce que je voulais dire,
Cette zone située juste à l'ouest de la Mer des Crises s'appelle le Marais du Sommeil et à l'ouest de celui-ci, la Mer de la Tranquillit
Мы попытались немного сместить частоту, чтобы уменьшить помехи. Думаю, это прозвучит так: «Вам нужно включить кислород для снижения и выключить кислород для подъема. Конец связи. И запросить ВПЕРЕД, ВСЕОБ
Роджер RKV, вы расстались. Я п
Apollo 11, this is Houston. When you stop at 0 roll, you will be in app
Roger. Abbiamo ricevuto una traccia in banda C negativa sull'Ascensione. Vorr
Да, я понятия не имел, когда мы уже были в воздухе; я 
오늘 밤에 낭독회를 하
О, вам это неинтересно. Позвольте мне кое-что подсчитать. Сейчас 79, а какое у нас сейчас время? Примерно... мы... мы... мы вообще знаем как
Jim, bisher haben wir nur einen Punk
قرأتُ كلامك غير واضح. 1، 2، 3
로저. 연료 압력이 167, 보조 압력이
Привет, Джим, у меня есть три момента. Во-первых, компьютер снова твой. Во-вторых, никаких манипуляций с этого момента и до момента запуска не потребуется, так чт
わかりました。フランクさん、天気予報はこちらです。風速2000メートル、霧雨4000メートル、高層雲が覆っています。この天気図を見ながら下っていくと、波の高さが4フィート、風速約0.7メートル、視程10マイル、この辺りでは散発的ににわか雨が降るかもしれません。これは27日16時（ズールー時間）の予
Привет, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. У нас есть для вас некоторые прогнозы и общие обновления по дрейфу, если вы сог
罗杰：桑给巴尔
Gemini 4, Hous
D'accord, et j'ai un outil de visualisation des étoiles pour télescope à balayage que vous pourrez récupérer lorsque vous s
Roger. Ti ho sentito e ti ho sentito bene. Ti ho chiamato due o tre volte in HF e non 
This is Sigma Seven. A 30 second HF check, at minutes commencing at 10 seconds after that. This is a 30 second duration test, as I pass down through the coast of
好
حسنًا، هناك الكثير من الأشياء التي تخرج، سأخبرك بذلك. كيف تبدو درجات حرارة الفوهات
OK. Après la recommandation du système de guidag
रॉज
Et ça commence vraiment à paraître un peu plus gros. On distingue assez nettement certains détails à l'œil nu. Et pour l'instant, je dois bien avouer que Jim a raison: ça reste assez gris avec des
그리고 저기 있는 낡은 방호복 온도는 55°이고
分かりました。運転の参考になれば幸いですが、計算上、窓の外をプラスX方向
ठीक है, जो। मैं बस हनीसकल में टीवी का स्विच ऑन करना चाहता था ताकि उसे व
The West Coast residents in Seattle, Washington; Portland, Oregon; Vancouver, British Columbia; and San Francisco all plan to make their areas visible to the three of you by lighting their lights between 9 pm and midnight tonight, according to the Associated Press. We do have clear weather predicted there, so you may be able to see Christmas lights, porch lights, stor
This is Friendship Seven. Fo
रॉजर। समय 12:15:0
Okay, Fred-o. Okay. Das ist „Einstieg, VORBEREITUNG“. Beginnt 6 Stunden vor dem Start. Dann schalten Sie das ACS ein. Ich gebe Ihnen jeweils eine Zeile vor, und wenn Sie das bestätigt haben, gehe ich zur nächsten über. Klingt das
في هذا الوقت، يمر توهج ليلي عبر القمر، SEF. كان الوقت عند 59 دقيقة و10 ثوانٍ. يُقدّر سمك الطبقة بحوالي نصف
没错。你只需要做一件事，那就是每当你想要从下降水箱里喝水时，只需短暂地打开
Das ist bestätig
Non lo so.
मैंने कहा
Oh. Il nostro p
يتم الآن تخزين الكاميرا. يتم الآن فك قفص الجيروسكوب. التحكم الإلكتروني بالطائرة يعمل الآن.
いいえ、もし右側の列にそれら全てについて何か書いてあるなら、私たちはそれをやらなくて済
Obwohl die 
좋아요. VHF 무전기도 전원을 꺼둔 
روجر، كناري. سأواجه انقطاعًا في الإشارة قبل أن أتمكن من استلام هذه الصور. أريد ا
罗杰。你现在看到
ठीक है, जैक। अब बचे हुए चरण बस सूट-लूप कॉन्फ़िगरेशन के चरण हैं ताकि इसे पूरी तरह से चालू किया 
अरे यार! मुझे तो इस 8-बॉल पर यकीन ही नहीं हो रहा। ये तो बिलक
Roger. GET B 13 25 52; Delta-V, 9 feet per second; burn time, 0 plus 11; 0 yaw, 0 pitch; Core 25, 00090; Cor
Apollo 8, Houston. Abbiam
Ich habe es seit Einbruch der Dunkelheit nicht gefun
好的，休斯顿，我们要进行加压和
تحت الأنف ه
わかりました。本当
سيجما سفن. كيب كوم تك. هل تقرأ؟ ان
Я так понимаю, это маневр, который мы будем 
मुझे नहीं पता कि म
Wir – Unser Update bringt Sie auf – den DELTA-H auf 35 Kilometer
是的。我们现在也看到
大丈夫、一日中我慢できるよ。ゆっくりしていって。あ
わかりました。アダプターを接続し
Apollo 11, this is 
收到。看来这款红色软管吸尘器不太可能
ابن العاهرة - 
还有一件事，如果你能帮
نعم. الأكسجين الثانوي، مف
好的。就在13点钟下方。另外，我们安排了人员研究几个课题。我们正在研究即将到来的中途阶段，确定控制系统以及如何使用选定的控制系统，还有对准问题。月球管理系统（LMS）和几个小组正在全力以赴地进行相关工作。我们还在研究进入阶段，如何以及何时启动。此外，我们还在监测系统状态。明天某个时候，我们将对主总线B进行检查，所以我们有
Roger. Tonhöhe minus, minus 2 1/2 Grad, und du bist genau richtig;
9
रॉजर। संभवतः ब
Roger. Où en est l'appro
마이너스 Y자형 지지대에 있는 프로브가 보이네요. 부러졌다가
D'accord. Même en contournant l'échangeur de 
是的，我注意到了。之前它的数值一直低于这个
नही
هذا غير صحيح. لقد ضبطتُ كلا الجهازين على سبعة
我有上行语音链路连接到航天器；下行链路
Houston, 11. Stai guardando il, e procederò quando 
あなたの
ठीक है। और वैसे भी हमें वैध ओरल टेम्परेचर एओएस नहीं मिला है, इसलिए हमें आपका एयरो-
Roger. Questa è Friendship Seven. Partenza con imbardata di 180° a
روجر
I feel very good, Gene. I am on HF at this time with the dipole. The--I've readjusted the cabin setting. It--the dome went down to about 45 degrees. I set the cabin at 3.
रॉजर। आप पृथ्वी को देख रहे हैं, जैसा कि हम इसे अपनी बाईं खिड़की से देख रहे हैं, पृथ्वी का लगभग आधा हिस्सा। हम पूर्वी प्रशांत महासागर को देख रहे हैं, और स्क्रीन के ऊपरी आधे हिस्से के उत्तरी भाग में, हम उत्तरी अमेरिका, अलास्का, संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका, कनाडा, मैक्सिको और मध्य अमेरिका को देख सकते हैं। दक्षिण अमेरिका टर्मिनेटर के ठीक बाहर या छाया के अंदर अदृश्य हो जाता है। हम महासागरों को स्पष्ट नीले रंग में देख सकते हैं, पृथ्वी पर फैले प्रमुख बादल संरचनाओं की सफेद पट्टियाँ देख सकते हैं, और तटरेखाओं को देख सकते हैं, पश्चिमी अमेरिका, सैन जोकिन घाटी, सिएरा पर्वत श्रृंखला, बाजा कैलिफोर
रॉजर। बिल्कुल स्पष्ट। आपकी पिछली उड़ान में ट्रांसमीटर में कुछ समस्या आ गई थी। हमें अभी केप से एक संदेश मिला है... ईंधन बचाने के 
バイブレー
わかりました。ヒューストンから、来られない
Das 
नहीं, ऐसा नहीं है। हाँ, हर
我想亲眼看看那景象。为什么不给我们放
로저. 지금까지 발생한 문제는 알 수 없는 원인, 아마도 트러니언 셀에 가해지는 압력(현재 91도) 때문인 것으로 보입니다. 이 압력은 실제 트러니언 각도를 정확하게 나타내지 않습니다. 하지만 이러한 압력 문제로 인해 광학 장치의 신뢰성이 저하되는 것은 아니라고 생각합니
Columbia, this is Houston. Any joy on the that pass? 
正解です。パネル5の次のステップは、MAIN BUS TIE A/CスイッチをBAT A/Cの位置
حسنًا. حسنًا؛ سيُنهي المستشار الألماني الغربي ويلي برانت، الذي شهد إطلاقكم من كيب كانافيرال أمس، والرئيس نيكسون جولتهما من المحادثات اليوم. وتشير التقارير إلى أن برانت جاء إلى الولايات المتحدة للحصول على تأكيدات من الرئيس بالمضي قدمًا في المحادثات مع دول أوروبا الشرقية، وخاصة ألمانيا الشرقية وبولندا وروسيا. لا يزال العديد من مراقبي الحركة الجوية في إجازة، لكن التقارير تُشير إلى أنهم يعودون تدريجيًا إلى العمل، وسيسعدكم معرفة أن المراقبين هنا ف
アクエリアス、ヒューストン
Сейчас я начинаю видеть восход солнца в перископе. Первый свет в перископе за этот конкретный виток благодаря ночной стороне. Очевидно, что перископ совершенно бесполезен в ретроградном движении на ночной стороне. Первый свет, который я получаю, сейчас практически на высоте. Восход солнца довольно быстро проникает в перископ. У меня есть освещенные объекты, о которых упоминал Джон, и я могу создать некоторые из них, сбивая их. У меня определенно есть ощущение, что это поле, и они различаются по размеру от маленьких до ярких. Сам перископ меня слепит. Мне придется надеть на него карту, чтобы я мог смотреть в окно. Я готов к ретроградному движению в любой момент, поэтому мне ничего не остается, кроме как смотреть в это окно. Предполагая, что схема скафандра исправна. Эта карта очень помогает замаскировать этот проклятый перископ. Довольно большое поле этих объектов. Определенно подтверждено, что их можно сбить с люка, как сказал Скотти. И они стремительно удаляются, и нет никаких сомнений в том, что они движутся от ка
Houston, Apollo 11. Nous venons d'avoir une très bonne vue du site d'alunissage. Nous pouvons disting
Роджер. Как видите, я немного небрежно выполняю крен. 
是的。那东西的可读性就像，你知道，大概只有半帧的距离；所以，我
地平線
ठीक है, 8. हमें अभी-अभी टेस्ट पैटर्न के बारे में जवाब मिला है। हमें लगा था कि हमारे पास 25 टेस्ट पैटर्न हैं जो ग्राउंड 
아주 좋아요. 2단계도 잘 진행됐어
Ok, ho capito. Più 51,5, zeri e zeri, e stai usando 125:19:34,70. Grazi
ठीक है। हमारा सुझाव है कि जब CMP और CDR जाग रहे हों, तब LMP आराम करें। LMP को लगभग 63 बजे सोना चाहिए, उठने में 25 मिनट बाकी हैं। आपको 6 घंटे आराम करने का समय मिलेगा। आप 69 बजे उठेंगे। 70 बजे, कमांडर और कमांड मॉड्यूल पायलट 76 बजे तक 6 घंटे सोएंगे। लगभग 70 - 76-1/2 से 77 बजे के बीच, हम एक और 52 करेंगे। 78:30 बजे, हम लोड करे
ウィルコ
11号，休斯顿。目前的天气预报显示，您的灾后重建区域天气状况良好：2000英尺高度有零星云层，高空有零星云层，风向070度，风速13节，能见度10英里，海况约4英尺。昨天的预报显示，热带风暴克劳迪娅位于夏威夷以东约500至1000英里处。昨天下午地球卫星拍摄的图像显示，克劳迪娅正在消散，因此它的影响似乎比之前更小了。目前，您的灾后重建区域被认为位于热带辐合带以北不远处，您从窗户往外看应该就能看到。昨天还有报道称，更西边的地方出现了热带风暴维奥拉。它目前位于菲律宾以东约1000英里处，正向西北方向移动。热带风暴维奥拉一直在增强，预计将在未来12小时左右升级为台风；但是，届时它将位于您西部很远的地方。事实上，日出晨昏线尚未到达维奥拉。几个小时后，当它到达时，您应该能从您的视角轻松辨认出来。或许您可以拍些照片。几个小时后，当您有机会看到维奥拉时，请发表您的评论。以上就是您所在区域目前
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。テレビの準備は完了です。設定も完​​了しました。ご
حسنًا. يبدو أننا حصلنا على تثبيت محكم خلال الدقيقة الأخيرة تقريبًا، حيث كانت مؤشرات ضبط السرعة القصوى تتذبذب صعودًا وهبوطًا، وكذلك مؤشرات الميل وا
Okay, Jack. Es ist ganz klar, dass wir daf
Okay. And on the las
Ка
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Mein Status ist ausgezeichnet. Ich habe die Kontrolle über die Kapsel, Fly-by-Wire-Steuerung läuft. Tr
Ricevuto. E le nostre le
好的。您是否准备好复制您的
C'est exact. On a commencé à avoir une indication erratique sur le signal principal, alors on est passés au secondaire, et c'était encore erratique. J'ai pensé que ça pouvait êt
Роджер. Некоторые из предыдущих комментариев Джима о яркости края диска Солнца перед восходом вызвали здесь большой интерес. И мы хотели бы спросить его, если у него будет возможность снова это заметить или, возможно, он вспомнит, были ли какие-либо изменения во внешнем виде звезд. Например, заметил ли он какое-либо мерцание во время этого процесса и заметил ли он какое-либо небольшое увеличение яркости края диска за 10-2
Roger. Welcher
이거 다 준비됐어? 여기 다시 놓아둘게. 네 물건 밑에 있어. 자, 버즈가 카메라를
好的。这就是我们希望您使用的配置，我们是这样考虑的。当我们把1号水箱设置为自动，2号水箱设置为关闭时，我们发现加热循环中1号水箱的压力约为233 psi，远高于警示和警告限值。如果我们在睡眠模式下使用这种配置，就能避免睡眠循环期间出现警示和警告灯。好的。为了确保睡眠舒适，我们希望在白天剩余时间
Роджер. С
Et, Eagle, Houston. Nous vous demandons de sélectionner OMNI arrière maintenant. Ce sera
아주 좋습니다. (비상 복구 구역) 3-C 역행(시간)에 대비
And the EVAP flow valve, that's open now, and I've undone my suit hoses he
이글, 여기는 컬럼비아입니다. 휴스턴에서 후방 OMNI를 선택해 
了解。ハイゲインがちゃんと機能しているか確認するのに苦労しているようです。ピッチがマイナス10、Y軸がプラス350、ビーム
Roger. Wir beginnen mit den Weltnachrichten. Lob für die amerikanischen Apollo-8-Astronauten und Hoffnungen auf internationale Zusammenarbeit in der Weltraumforschung wurden mit den weltweiten Weihnachtsbotschaften verbreitet, während das kleine Raumschiff den Mond umkreiste. Selbst in der kommunistischen Welt herrschte Begeisterung für die erste bemannte Mondlandung. In Moskau erinnerte der sowjetische Wissenschaftler Anatoli Besaranow daran, das
正解です。次にミッションタイマーを設定します。MDC側のミッションタイマーのみをオンにしました。アップリンクが完了するまで、コンピューターを使える
鹰号，哥伦比亚。您的高增益角度已更正——鹰号，休斯顿。您的高增益角度为
13、今のところ火傷については心配していません。火傷に至るまでにはもう少し時間がかかりますが、システムを使用できる他の手順をご案
Definitely below me. I'd been tracking it below me from about Carnarvon on. Up until about Carnarvon we had it below us, and then up to the horizon, and then down below us again. It almost looked like it was in a different orbit than I was. It had a different apogee and perigee than what I did. Anyway, I attempted to close with it at daylight as soon as I could tell where it was. As I said, at that time it was a mile or two out in front of me - down below me. So, the more I tried to close, the less I really gained on it. I was firing retrograde. I was using my top thrusters to fire in such a manner as to decrease my total velocity, and then firing... at the same time. I never really closed, and it continued to pull away from me. It became obvious to me that by the time we got to Hawaii that to close on the booster in time to do the EVA with the booster would probably take all the fuel we had onboard. In the ground rule w
У 
我们现在已经对您的负载进行了充分验证，看起来没
Это Хьюстон. Подо
Feeling grea
네, 4-A는 3.8입니다. 알겠
Ok. Il tempo di serraggio sarà di 49 ore, 8 minuti e 35 se
上
了解しました。窓の状態は分かりません。もし…この燃焼中は、前方の窓から外を見て、窓の位置合わせをする必要があります。そのため
Roger. Sounds good. And this is the crew of Apollo 13 wishing everybody there a nice evening, and we're just about ready to
روجر، لديّ تحديث بخصوص حرقك لملف اللحاق بالركب
收到。明白了。向前推进1
Sekundärer O2-
Roger. I
我这儿有
ठीक है, जिम। समझ गया। और उनकी इस बात के आधार पर कि वे इसे 24 घंटे पहले से ज़्यादा देर तक नहीं कर
休斯顿
Ti leggo forte e chiaro, Buz
396 033, down 054, left 21, plus 08 10 minus 16500 12968 36222; same align; Sirius and Rige
Ok. Parla lentamente perché c'è molto rumore di fondo. Hai compl
Non riesco a capirlo bene.
Ro
حسنًا. هذا هو البيريسينثيان زائد 2. / 62871 نوفمبر ألفا، وانتظر لحظة. حسنًا. سنستأنف مع ضبط الميل وضبط الانحراف غير قابل للتطبيق؛ الوقت، ناقص 00468، زائد 00254، زائد 00181 173 101 027 نوفمبر ألفا زائد 00187 00563 5
も
알겠습니다. GMTB 15 43 23. ΔV 139. 연소 시간 - 2분 39초. 15 55 24. 왼쪽으로 55만큼 회전하세요. GMTRB 16 05 28. 오른쪽으로 65만큼 회전하세요. GMT 400 K 15 58 23. 기동 부하: 6344257, 0444775, 0533348, 664903.3, 676628.4, 082244.4,
La temperatura della cabina è sotto c
जी हाँ। जी जैक, मैं अभी तुम्हारे सवाल का जवाब दे देता हूँ, लेकिन जैक की पहली प्रतिक्रिया यही है कि यह उस दुर्घटना के तुरंत बाद जितनी तीव्र थी, अब उतनी नहीं है। और मैं उससे सहमत हूँ। उसने कहा कि यह आधी है और मैंने कहा कि शायद एक तिहाई रह गई है। और
Houston, Apollo 11. Checklist page F9 7; I've completed step 8, and I'd like to know what you think is ideal 
Jack, I can definitely tell we're moving away from the Moon, now. I got it all in the monocular 
Apollo 8, Houston. Le verrouillage est difficile. Pourrions-nous essayer de sélectionner le mode AUTO pour le suivi des
로저. 시야도 좋고 통
Roger. Friend
거꾸로 가는 건 어
Pour le contrôle d'attitude, allez-vous utiliser la commande de taux de rentrée ou la co
はい、ちょっと待ってください。ちょ
Roger. Le centre de contrôle aérien indique que la mise en service de votre ordinateur peut prendre plusieurs orbites. Veuillez le laisser en mode pré-lancement; le centre au sol vous contac
알았어, 프레드.
في النصف الأيمن من الصفحة، قم بشطب "كتلة العلوم المدارية"، وتحتها "الهدف المرئي 1 جنوب المسار TR". 
了解しました。11. バッテリー充電に関するご質問ですが、おそらく個々
Roger. We have been working under the assum
We did notice one thing, Vance. You know 
ربما يهمكم ما قالته زوجاتكم. قالت نيل، التي تحدثت عنها جان عن أحداث الأمس: "كانت الأمسية مثالية بشكل لا يُصدق. إنه لشرف عظيم لي أن أشارك زوجي، وطاقم المركبة، ومركز المركبات الفضائية المأهولة، والشعب الأمريكي، والبشرية جمعاء، هذه التجربة الرائعة لبداية استكشاف القمر". ثم سُئلت عما إذا كانت تعتبر الهبوط على سط
这东西转起来太慢了；我们还有20
谢谢您
그 봉투들은
Gemini 4，CSQ CAP COM。请注意，如果您正在跟踪 Pegasus，请勿超过 45° 俯仰角。您有关键的磁带转储。如果您正在跟踪 Pegasus，请调整至关键磁带转储
कृपया प्रतीक्षा करें। जैक लाइन पर है और वह कह रहा है कि वह कंप
Ok. Mi chiedevo solo se respirav
Gemini 4, Can
现在海拔450
지금 슈트 설정을 8로 조정했습니다. 즉, 슈트 냉각수량을 8로 설정한 것입니다. 슈트 흡입구 온도는 현재 65도(화씨)로
照明；泛光灯，打开；轨道，打开。ED逻辑 - 校正，ED：逻辑，打开。下降引擎超控，打开。宇航服流量控制，打开。第3排，通信：显示，打开；VHF A发射机，打开；V
Ну ладно, оставим включенным и посмотрим, что получится. Если п
Bon, j'ai comm
Canary Cap Com, hier spricht Sigma Sev
Дальше на север и чуть дальше на восток. Объект, который я вам описывал, небольшой яркий кратер на краю большого, довольно старого кратера, находится примерно на отметках Майка 0,8 и
Il ne n
罗杰，2：SPS/G&N：38320，加166，减081 080 11 3603，减01408，减去所有球，减去00743，全零，196 359 00657，加00537，0159
Non si romperà
Да. Думаю,
हाँ, मुझे पता ही 
마이너스
这里有个挺有意思的小新闻，听起来挺不错的。密歇根州安娜堡市出现了一个新的青少年帮派，名叫吉尔内特帮（Gilnet Gang）。他们秘密地在安娜堡的街头游荡，有时甚至会绕过法律。他们自称“行善游击队”（Guerillas for Good）。他们做过的一些事包括：在一个晚上，他们把一座被污言秽语涂满的桥重新粉刷了一遍；把一栋被判定为危房的房子——虽然很受附近孩子欢迎，但其实很危险——用木板封了起来；把市中心那些因为争论是商家还是政府负责而空着的花坛重新种满了鲜花；修剪了繁忙路口的一丛被认为遮挡视线的树篱，这让树篱的主人很生气；清理了休伦河沿岸一段的垃圾。帮派
객실 상대 습도는 20%입니다. 냉매량은 66%입니다. 우주복 온도는 68도, 압력은 5.8psi, 증기 온도는 우주복 회로에서 50도로 쾌적합니다. 산소 공급량은 65~100
好的。我只是想让你们注意这一点，思考一下它可能对飞行计划产生的影响。我会把这个广角镜头和关于月亮的说明再放一遍，看看你们觉得哪些部分最合适。好的。在卷轴上，弗兰克想让我们确认他预期看到的进入剖面图的顺序。第一个出现的剖面图标记为“Nonexit Number 2”，这是短程高速进入剖面图。第二个出现的剖面图标题为“3500 Mile”，也是高速进入剖面图，但如果我们需要进行更远距离的进入，则会使用这个剖面图。然后第三个剖面图是“Nonexit Entry Number 1”，之后是第四个3500 Mile剖面图。所以你们有四个进入剖面图。编号1和3是短程剖面图，编号2和4是长程剖面图。关于冷浸，我想我们之前讨论过具体操作，但大概一个小时后，我们就要开始进行冷浸了。我们肯定不想在12点进行。和轨迹控制人员沟通过，了解他们对水沸腾的看法——需要注意的是，他们会在你的轨迹图上看到水的排放和沸腾。这似乎是他们计算方案的结果，而不是轨迹受到扰动的结果。所以，如果我们要进行一些水沸腾实验，我们
... obte
... oug
Nous n'oublierons pas de le faire un peu
نستعد الآن ل
Хорош
좋습니다. 태평양 한가운데 착륙 지점의 날씨는 양호합니다. 구름은 2000피트 높이에 흩어져 있고, 시야는 10피트, 풍향은 10노트, 파고는 4피트, 고도계는 2986피트입니다. 소나기는 전체 면적의 10% 미만에 산발적으로 내릴 것으로 예상됩니다. 구조대는 이오
음, LM
Ahh, Roge
11, 
Wir gehen davon aus, dass die Ausrichtung in Ordnung ist, d
روجر، مايك. أودّ التعليق على البيانات. كانت المناورة الآلية دقيقة للغاية. يبدو أننا رصدنا نقطةً دون نجمية أثناء المناورة؛ فقد وضعت البصريات الآلية كوكبة كانوبوس في مكانها الصحيح؛ وعمل نظام التحكم بالدفع الأدنى كما هو مُعلن. عند الارتفاعات التي بدأتُ عندها عمليات الرصد، يظهر خطٌ ضبابي واضح. يُضفي المرشح على الأرض توهجًا، نوعًا ما توهجًا برتقاليًا. من الصعب تحديد موقع النجم بدقة، ولكن يبدو أن ه
Je vous prie d'envoyer un message au directeur, au commandant du Corps des Marines des États-Unis, à Washington. Dites-lui que j'ai effectué mes 4 heures de vol mensuelles requises et demandez qu'un bon de vol soit établi pour moi. Ter
嗯，我
حسنًا. فيما يتعلق بمنتصف المسار، أعتقد أن هناك اتفاقًا عامًا على أن نتبع نفس النهج المعتاد. أما بالنسبة للنوافذ، فالنوافذ المركزية غير قابلة للاستخدام عمليًا. أما النا
नहीं, हमने अभी तक पानी में क्लोरीन नहीं मिलाया है। हम 
आवाज़ साफ़ आ रही है। आपकी आवाज़ थोड़ी अस्पष्ट आ रही थी। क्या आप हमें अप
Welc
现
अरे यार, ये खिड़कियाँ
We're 
Ok, Jack. Non avevo intenzione di resettare la valvola DROP ISOL del quad Charlie. Vuoi che lo faccia io? Ok. L'abbiamo ap
好的，杰克。明白了，你已经准
Ricevuto. Pr
21455です。ありがとうございます。ちなみに、あなたの声が届くまで約1.6秒か
... du bist ja voll dabei, Kumpel
Eh bien, il y a beaucoup de bruit de fond, 
わかりました。いいですね。タンクの圧力が高くなっていましたが、圧力スイッチが閉じてヒーターサイクルを開始するのを待っている間に、タンク1の圧力がさらに少し下がり、注意と警
We're just at 3+34 right now. Just going into darkness. The sunlight has been shining on the nose of the 
해가 예정대로 지고 있
好的，我进行月球检查姿态机动；此时我将 36 号窗口线对准月球，就在这之前，地球将
और हम लगभग 7 मिनट की दूरी पर हैं, इसलिए हमारे पास
알겠습니다. 현재 온도가
...nuvole. Sembrano strati, ma hanno sicuramente un effetto moderato. Chissà se tutto quest
Scheint so zu
روجر، جيم. يمكنكما العودة إلى المربع؛ لقد حصلنا على البيانات وتحققنا 
H
Sigma Seven. Your transmissions are now very noisy. We will stand by and not 
제 생각엔 큰 문제는 아닌 것 같아요. 자동 모드로 전환할 때 잠깐 튕기는 것뿐이죠. 진입에는 큰 문제가 없을 거라고 생각합니다. 저도 마찬가지로 진입 체크리스트를 살펴보고 있어요. 체크리스트에서 제일 먼저 
きっと上にも必要でしょう。と
Weißt du, wo sie s
Mac
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы остановились под правильным углом крена, а затем выполнили крен и тангаж. Конец связи. Поправка: крен и р
ヒューストンのアソシエイテッド社ハリー・ローゼンタールによる特集記事です。2歳のジェフリー・ラベルくんのクリスマスイブを、2人のサンタが明るく彩ります。1人目は玄関をノックしてプレゼントを持ってきました。2人目は月からお父さんを家まで送り届けました。1人目は赤い服と白いひげを生やし、「ホー、ホー」と叫び、その声は街の向こうまで聞こえました。2人目は月の裏で巨大なエンジンが炎を吐き出し、何千人もの人々がエンジン始動の知らせを待ちわびていました。「サンタクロースがいます」。エンジンがクリティカル噴射を完了してから15分後、無線沈黙から目覚めたアポロ8号から最初に届いた言葉は、不安な世界に告げるものでした。「これ以上のクリスマスプレゼントは期待していません」とミッションコントロールのケン・マッティングリーは語りました。「地上の皆様に感謝します。皆さんがいなければ、私たちは成し遂げられませんでした」と、宇宙船の船長フランク・ボーマン大佐は返事をしました。ちょうどその時、ミッションコントロールのコンソールの前にクリスマスツリーが灯り、ハリソン・シュミット宇宙飛行士が乗組員たちに「聖ニコラスの訪問」の宇宙版を読み上げました。「クリスマス前夜、はるか宇宙の彼方で、アポロ8号の乗組員が月面レースに勝利したばかりでした」と始まります。ミッション
ओह, बस इतना ही - हम चाहते थे कि आप CO2 सेंसर ब्रेकर को बंद कर दें और हमें ईगल से ऑनब
Houston, Apollo 8 w
Just saw a satellite, very high,... spotted away like a star on the ground when you see one go by. A long, long ways away. When I saw this satellite go by, we were pointed just about directly overhead. It looked like it was going from left to the right. .
Die Verantwortung für diesen Flug liegt in erster Linie bei der Geschichte und den wissenschaftlichen Giganten, die diesem Vorhaben vorausgingen; dann beim amerikanisch
Итак, свежие новости: вчера, во вторник, Хуан Карлос был официально назначен преемником генерала Франко — главой государства Испании и будущим королем. Сегодня Хуан Карлос примет присягу в качестве своего преемника, принеся клятву верности закону и Национальному движению, единственной легальной политической организации Испании. По всей видимости, ег
Boy, is it crowded in here
Okay, ich wollte gar nicht durchkommen oder so. Ich wol
Roger. Début au coucher du soleil le jo
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Je passe en mode de commandes de vol électriques pour un pilotage plus précis.
就中间那根导联。我去问医生正确的术语。稍等。这叫胸骨心电图，
알겠습니다. 다시 말씀해 주시겠어요? 잘 이해가 안 되
Friendship Seven, hi
알겠습니다. 알겠습니다. 턱걸이인지 팔굽혀펴기인지 잘 모르겠네요. 알아서 선택하시
Okay. We copy 39.3 and 1.20. And, Jim, I've got one more item for information for you. At - In about 45 minutes or so, you will get an H2O quantity caution light on the descent tank. We expect this. It occurs at 16 percent. And it's no problem, because we intend to run the tank dry just for drill. To r
罗杰。好的，水瓶座
Билл благодарит за отл
48587 603 48383 06 2027 250, et l'étoile de visée est le centre de la Ter
계속하세
... poussée à NORMAL; poussée DELTA-V, deux, OFF; PITCH et YAW à AUTO; MOTEURS DE GIMBALE PITCH et YAW OFF; DELTA-V/CG, /CSM; LOGIQUE ELS, OFF; ELS AUTO à MANUEL; L
Roger, Jack. Since we've got the up, we plan to use that information to give the a dock coarse aline, and then we're in the service module jettison attitude, we'll wait until it comes time to power up the, and we'll get the a dock coarse aline, and we'll pick some good stars to give you a fine aline with, and it looks like we can pick some stars that are looking away from the Sun in which you can fin
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. يق
スーツの吸気口の温度はまだ61～62度くらい。ドームは約72度。ちょうどいいくらい涼しさ。本当に美
Roger. Bitte stellen Sie das Signal in den REACQ-Modus und überwachen Sie es. In etwa zwei Minuten erreichen wir die hohe Verstärkung. Könnten Sie bitte den REACQ-Modus überwachen? Falls die Aufna
你好，Muchea Com Tech，Muchea Com Tech。收
«Аполлон-1
أبو
أبولو 8، هيوستن. ا
11, Houston. Sur cet écran, notre commentaire – le moniteur que je regardais avait un décalage d'environ 12 à 15 secondes, le temps que l'image passe par notre convertisseur de couleurs. C'était probablement… Vous pensiez que j'étais fou, mais
你需要“Y”型连接器吗？我之前把它从哈苏相机上拆下来了，它会影响
Kopieren, 144. Und wir haben ein Update für den Statusvektor bereit, das Sie auf Ih
You said not applicable for and; I started to copy it down, and t
Ricevuto. Forza
Friendship Seven, qui California C
ヒューストン、ジェミニ4
Okay. Schalten Sie MAIN B
Roger. E 
روجر. نتلقى منك رسالة ضعيفة جداً، حو
Pochi
Температура вашего инвертора на 250 вольт-ампер составляет 150 градусов и держится на этом уров
Roger. Joan wasn't
Grazie, 
जिम, आप स्थानीय समयानुसार लगभग 8 बजे समोआ से लगभग 560 मील दक्षिण-पूर्व में उतरेंगे। क्षेत्र के लिए मौसम का पूर्वानुमान अच्छा है; 1500 फीट
J'ai vraiment l'impression que je me refroidis. La température à l'entrée de ma combinaison est mainte
Есть ли у вас основания для использования нами
ठीक है। मुझे एक मिनट के लिए रुकना पड़ा। बॉब होप अपने सैनिकों के साथ एक बार फिर वियतनाम में हैं और हमेशा की तरह शानदार काम कर रहे हैं। इस खबर में एक छोटा सा नाम यूएसएस न्यू जर्सी से जुड़ा है। बॉब होप ने कल - या बुधवार को - युद्धपोत न्यू जर्सी पर सवार 1500 सैनिकों को हंसाने के लिए एक विशाल तोप बुर्ज के ऊपर से मज़ाक किया। न्यू जर्सी अपने 20वें क्रिसमस पर विदेशों में तैनात अमेरिकी सै
67; oxidizer is 63; descent tank 1... is 64;
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous n'avons encore aucune donnée au sol; la transmission vocal
알겠습니다, 짐. 그 부분은 저희가 당신을 위해 말
不，是那个东西——就是支撑着那些该
... في هذا المجال البصري، أرى في الغالب اللو
알겠습니다. 페르시아만의 폭을 기준으로 말씀드리자면, 제가 직접 드릴 수 있는 정보는 단 하나의 국지적인 데이터뿐입니다. 바로 오늘 아침 휴스턴에서는 날씨가 맑았다는 것입니다. 이는 매우 국지적인 관측 결과입니다. 폐수 방류로 인해 기체의 균형이 다소 흐트러진 것으로 보입
로저. 월리, 그 수량을 확인했습니다. 상태가 좋아 보이네요. 경과 시간
أقول لكم يا أصحاب اللون "الأرجواني"،
حسنًا. إذا استطعت تح
非常によかったです。ご存知の
Okay. The primary loop down here still looks real good, so it looks like you are in fine shape. Your battery B charge ought to be done by about, and we think you shouldn't even try to charge battery A, since it looks like, at entry int
Ещё немного местных новостей: здание окружного суда в Хантсвилле сгорело вчера до рассвета, так что, похоже, там снова займутся строительством. Немного о семьях, ожидающих возвращения. Вот что написала Энн Джеймс, репортер газеты Post. «Мы отдыхаем на обратной стороне Луны», — сказала Валери Андерс в канун Рождества, ожидая, когда «Аполлон-8» покинет лунную орбиту и направится домой. Миссис Андерс была дома во вторник в 00 утра, и соседи только что собрали всех детей, чтобы семья могла отдохнуть, пока космический корабль находился за Луной и был вне зоны связи. Дом полковника Фрэнка Бормана был украшен четырьмя большими венками из вечнозеленых деревьев на улице, посыпан пушистым снегом и украшен красными бантами. Дерево в гостиной ждёт его благополучного возвращения, а его красивая светловолосая жена Сью и крепкие сыновья Фредерик и Эдвин планируют остаться дома до полуночного старта с лунной орбиты. Обычно они посещали полуночные службы в епископальной церкви Святого Христофора. Планировалось, что семья отправится туда в полночь. Поскольку в доме Борманов нет маленьких детей, дарение рождественских подарков просто отложится до возвращения полковника Бормана с его фантастическим праздничным подарком — полетом на Луну и обратно. Четверо детей Мэрилин Ловелл пр
맞습니다. 그것들은 발사 당시 있던 자리에 그
分かりました。そう
ليس لدي ضوء. أرى الأحزمة تتس
D'accord, Apollo 8. C'est exact. Vous utilisez un débit binaire élevé et nous crai
Oh, ça a un peu dévié, mais on a fini par revenir au
Хорошо. Время, необходимое для достижения температуры 400 К, составляет 2 минуты 40 секунд при 16:56:01. Время достижения этой температуры — 2 минуты
Роджер. Если у вас есть обновленная информация 
160 फीट, 6-1/2 नीचे - 5-1/2 नीचे, 9 आगे। अभी भी अच्छा लग रहा है। 12
まだ理解できなかったよ、フレッド。ごめん
Le prochain cratère que l'on aperçoit en bas, c'est Duke Island, juste là. À gauche, le cratère Maskelyne W, le plus grand parmi ceux situés près du centre de l'image. Il s'agit d'un contrôle de position pendant la descente, à environ 3 minutes et 39 secondes. C'est notre contrôle de position longitudinale et transversale avant de virer face au ciel pour acquérir le signal du radar d'atterrissage. Après ce point, nous ne pourrons plus voir la surface sous nous
Okay. Thank you
そうですね。今日は約7.5cmほど雨が降りました。この辺りの人たちは羊のために雨を大いに活用していま
Nous allons effectuer une rétrogradation manuelle ave
في الساعة 00:34:28، قمتُ برفع درجة حرارة صمام مياه المقصورة وصمام ا
هذا تأكيد. حسنًا. الصفحة 
D'accord, sur la carte de brûlure, la troisième ligne devrait STAB/CONTROL 
Хорошо. Это было
笑一个！你正
Нет. Сейчас переключусь на низкий уровень громкости, пока не потерял тебя. Голосо
ヒューストンのアソシエイテッド社ハリー・ローゼンタ
ロジャー、この問題以外はすべて順調に進
Ricevuto, Jim. Stiamo cercando di completare le procedure e di consegnartele il più 
Wie geht's di
コロンビア、ヒューストン。六分儀のマークを付け、再初期化しないことをお勧めします。
Okay. I don't see any loose sensors, but the
收到。滚转和俯仰角与飞行计划略有偏差，11。滚转角现为 198.6，俯仰角为 130
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हमने आपको पहले जो यॉ पल्स की संख्या 21 दी थी, उसे हम घटाकर 12 करना चाहते हैं। 12 पल्स से यॉ राइट होता है, और अगर आप इन्हें गिनना नहीं चाहते ह
हाँ, यह अच्छा लग रहा है। मुझे नहीं लग
……输入。好的。我
看起来我在水面上很稳。鞭状天线已经升起来了，我能看到它。我这就换
这个大集装箱也
À Houston, alors que j'effectuais l'espacement, le panneau solaire de droite s'est déployé automatiquement. Pour celui de gauche, j'ai dû actionner manuellement la barre à l'extrémi
지금 조종실 바닥 사진을 보여드리겠습니다. 가운데에 휴대용 생명 유지 장치 배낭 두 개 중 하나가 보이고, 양쪽에는 헬멧 바이저가 두 개씩 있습니다
알겠습니다. 잘 들렸습니다. 어떻게 되시나요? 이상입
バッテリーの読み取り値を示す前に、電源を
Хорошо. Я просто хотел узнать
Ehi, 
好的，Ron，对于MIDPAC：000、152、001、194、46 06、267、加1332、减16917、064、36194、649、14045、36275、195 03 06、0028、154、084、2240、180、4
نحن الآن عند 3+34. ندخل في الظلام. تسطع أشعة الشمس على مقدمة المركبة الفضائية، مع توجيه طرفها الصغير للأمام تقريبًا. في الواقع، نحن على بعد 30 درجة إلى اليسار من الوضع المستقيم، مع توجيه الطرف الصغير للأمام. وبسبب طريقة انعكاس أشعة الشمس على حافة الصاروخ المعزز، كانت المركبة الفضائية تعكس الضوء، تمامًا ك
Мы вас вернули. Интересно, не могл
و١٣، هذه هيوستن. لدي إجراء آخر لـ... 
Odyssey, Houston standing by 
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हमने देखा कि एसेन्ट टैंक में ऑक्सीजन का दबाव थोड़ा अधिक है, इसलिए हम इसका कुछ हिस्सा इस्त
Okay. On page 6 1 of the entry out checklist down toward the bottom after "MAI
اقلب
Die Kuppel hält jetzt immer noch die Temper
حسناً. هل تعتقد أننا سنتمكن من توليد كمية كافية من الماء
حسنًا يا جاك. الخطوة ال
रॉजर, मैंने धुंध की परतें तो देखीं, लेकिन वैसी नहीं जो क्षितिज से अलग थीं, जैसा हमने सोचा था और जिसके बारे में जॉन ने बताया था। अगली बार मैं ध्यान से देखूंगा और सूर्यास्त के बाद उन्हें देखने की कोशिश करूंगा। प्रकाश की ओर, चमकीली, इंद्रधनुषी नीली परत के अलावा और कुछ नहीं है, जो वास्तविक क्षितिज को अंतरिक्ष के गहरे काले रंग से अलग करती ह
켄, 저희는
로저. PAD: 2
Wir befinden uns noch 
트랭
非常好
フレンドシップセブン、バミュー
Ну, Земля очень-очень яркая. В объективе нет ничего, что можно было бы пережечь. Камера, похоже, всё ещё работает. Мы можем прямо сейчас показать вам показания люменов Земли, 
收到。我们
了解、フレン
Ok
Roger. In meiner letzten Schlafphase habe ich vier Stunden geschlafen, die meiste Zeit davon tief und fest. Meine letzte Mahlzeit bestand aus Erdnusswürfeln, Orangensaft, Sandwiches und einem Fruchtcocktail. Dazu habe ic
Ti è apparsa una spia di malf
Qu'as-tu dit, Gor
وأنت أيضا
समझें; 5 फी
地平線がとても明るくなりました。かなり明るく、地平線の大部分は雲で覆われ
알겠습니다. 짐벌 록 현상만 피하시면 45도 각도는 크게 중요하지 않습니다. (평면 이
Черно-белое изображение — это журнал № 2
حسنًا. تقول لا 
Apollo 8, le magnéto
फ्र
好
Wollen wir wetten, wer am nächst
Хо
D'accord, Jack. Tu te souviens que tout le monde a déjà mentionné avoir vu le coucher de la Lune quelques mi
是的，听起来很有可能，
حسنًا. هل أنت مستعد للعودة إلى 275؟ تأكد من إغلاق قاطع الدائرة الرئيسي A، 
这里是休斯顿，13号台。我们想再稍微降低一下功率，所以请关闭2号台的电源；并确保你
Dry bulb between about 72 and 79. A little bit before that they ran betw
罗杰。然后
Lo vedi? Di solito Buzz sta guardando: guarda la fines
Неужели мы снова 
Sembra che possiamo usare il tuo ronzio com
This is using the push to talk. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 4, 3,
这个
Und das könnte dazu führen, dass Ihr Zeitplan etwas zu eng wird, wenn Sie Ihre Anzüge erst in letzter Minute hochladen; sagen wir, weniger als eine Stunde vor dem Betreten der Benu
Okay, jetzt schaue ich mir den Adapter und die Ausrüstung da hinten nochmal an. Ich kann die Trennebene sehen; sie ist zie
No, non l'ho ancora fa
База Спокойствия, Х
يبدو أنه لو كان لديهم - ما كان ينبغي عليهم... التبديل إلى وضع الشعاع الع
Eine Note
광학계에 대한 또 다른 의견입니다. 지금 우리는 M선을 통과하고 있는데, 롤은 약 182도, 피치는 약 226도, 요는 약 18도입니다. 이 특정 자세에서 축을 완전히 회전시킬 수 있는데, M선의 이쪽 약 10도 지점에 빛줄기가 나타납니
Roger, non preoccuparti per quello in Africa perché è
Umschaltung auf manuelle 
Acquario,
حسنًا، انتظر لحظة. اسمع، يمكنك إبلاغ إدارة الطيران عبر الخطوط الأرضية بأننا م
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы по-прежнему не можем вас обнаружить с помощью антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления. Просим вас перейти в ручной режим и выбрать широкую диаграмму направленности. Углы тангажа и рыскания в вашем контрольном списке указаны верно. Вы должны найти нас там. Коне
네, 맞습니다. 이렇게 설정하시면 됩니다. 해당 회로의 회로 차
I'd like to comment a little on the sextant. Its use in a cramped spacecraft is very difficult, particularly with the helmet on. I finally decided it was going to be useless with your helmet on to try to take the angles that the stars, that were being called for, required. So I took my helmet off. This gave me a little more flexibility in using it, but still I was limited to angles of about 20 to 23° without maneuvering the spacecraft. What would happen is the star would be cut out by the upper part of the window. Now, by more frequent and liberal maneuvering of the spacecraft you could maneuver it so that you have the long axis of the window in your tracking plane. We were somewhat limited by fuel and we didn't choose to maneuver in this manner. We used Pulse Mode, too, without a lot of maneuvers. The st
Сейчас мы устали, 
알겠습니다. 다음 궤
Okay. Warten Sie auf 1, Joe. Und der Kommandant ist für kurze Zeit nicht mehr
ठीक है, जिम। ये जायरो कंपनसेशन की शर्तें हैं। इन्हें पहले ही अपलोड कर दिया गया है, और हम अभी आपके ऑनबोर्ड चार्ट को अपडेट कर रहे हैं। कॉलम A में, क्रमांक 11 पर, 77646 को 00114 में बदलें; क्रमांक 12 पर, 77332 को 77546 
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 통신 상태가 매우 불안정
Да, я пытаюсь убрать крен. Крен до нуля. Просто доведите до нуля, я сейчас включу режим ATT HOLD. Тогда рыскание исчезнет, ​​тангаж останется таким, какой есть; затем мы уменьшим
좋아요, 18페이지에 있는데, 제가 이미 1분 만에 끝냈어요. "마스터
好的。我们刚才把 OMNI 的增益调低了一会儿，比特率也降低了，现在准备把比特率调回高。您希望我们每次更改磁带速
好的。请看F页9-8
Roger, Bill. Si vou
D'acco
03:30 即将到来 - 应该是 5.5，而且现在是 
ठीक है। लैंडमार्क 130 प्राइम का उपयोग करके ट्रैक करें, और जानकारी के लिए, यह आपके रेंडेज़वस रडार ट्रांसप
Roger. T
Автоматический выключатель замкнут и находится в положении COMMAND. Не могли бы вы подсказать, как это исправить в на
좋습니다. 마이크, 
さて、13号の飛行をアポロ8号と比べると、離陸時の振動は8号で感じたのとほぼ同じでしたが、飛行開始時の横揺れは8号で経験したものより少なかったです。S-ICの分離は8号よりも13号の方が激しく感じました。もしかしたら私の席が違ったからかもしれませんが、よく分かりません
ठीक है, चलिए इस पर एक मिनट विचार करते हैं, और मैं तुरंत आपसे संपर्क कर
Bene. Stiamo dando un'ultima occh
अभी हमें काफी शोर सुनाई दे रहा है। अगर आप थोड़ी देर रुके
Aquarius, Houston. We see ASCENT O2 tank number 2 buildi
我明白了，
13, ह्यूस्टन। आप अच्छा प्रदर्शन कर र
Houston, Apollo 8
Okay. We switched to ascent water, but we'll probably have to have the d
Un instant. Nous avons un petit p
了解。ブレイク。アポロ8号、ヒューストン。2点はOK。3点をコピーして
好的。点火时间为 035:00，DELT
أبولو 8، هيوستن. إذا أمكنك، نود أن تقوم بتحريك الأ
Роджер. Чётко и ясно слышу... твоя нога на 
Sì. Puoi manovrare, Jim. Scusa, pensavo stessi parlando dell'ATT HO
Эд начал с распаковки оборудования, и как только мы оказались в положении, когда возиться с ускорителем стало невозможно, я стал помогать ему на полную ставку — по крайней мере, держал оборудование, укладывал его и старался, чтобы оно не пропало. Чем быстрее мы работали, тем больше отставали. Не потому, что мы неправильно раскладывали оборудование, просто это заняло гораздо больше времени, чем мы ожидали. В условиях невесомости это было не намного проще, чем на симуляторе, хотя и не намного. Так что мы работали весь круг. К тому времени, как мы добрались до Карнарвона, я уже решил, что мы не сможем это сделать, но подумал, что мы ещё немного поработаем. К тому моменту, когда мы добрались до Карнарвона — или чуть раньше, чем покинули его, — мне стало ясно, что мы не сможем выполнить раз
阿波罗8号
Roger
В качестве интересного замечания по поводу этой конфигурации стыковки, следует отметить, что зонд для стыковки
Роджер. 9-C было 04 36 18. 7+59. 15+26. 10-Чарли 123. 1+45. 05 13 47. 13+37. 11 Д
Nello sport, gli Hous
वैसे तो इलाका देखने में चिकना लग रहा था, लेकिन मुझे वे दिखाई नहीं दिए। मैंने पास में ही एक 
Kurz gesagt, Jim, wir erwarten keine Probleme, werden dies aber später noch
Okay. From Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Britain's big Jodrell Bank radio telescope stopped receiving signals from the Soviet Union's unmanned Moon shot at 5:49 EDT today. A spokesman said that it appeared the Luna 15 space ship "had gone beyond the Moon." Another Quote: 
تشير النسبة المئوية إلى 
फ्लैग लॉक्स की पूरी तरह से जाँच की गई है। *** लॉक्स की जाँच की गई है, नीले लॉक्स की जाँच की गई है, लॉक लॉक्स, लाल लॉक्स, पर्ज ल
Доброе утро, Майк. У нас тут произошла небольшая 
罗杰
حسنًا. اللوحة 4: الاتصالات، المجموعة 1، إلى AC1. أغلق قواطع الدائرة التالية: اضغط على المجموعة 1، MAIN B؛ اضغط على المجموعة 2، MAIN B؛ درجة الحرارة، MAIN B؛ محول الحلقة الثانوية، MAIN B؛ المبرد، التحكم/السخانات، MAIN B؛ ناقل مرحل البطارية، البطارية B؛ شاحن البطارية، البطارية B، شحن - أو إلى B، شحن؛ التحكم في العاكس، 2؛ التحكم في العاكس، 1؛ إشارة المستشعر، AC1؛ إشارة المستشعر MAIN B؛ وحدة المستشعر، ناقل التيار المتردد 1؛ م
И мне понадобится погрешность вашего акселерометр
로저. 빌 씨의 궁금증을 풀어드리기 위해 극저온 탱크 히터와
حسنًا يا جيم. خط العرض هو -021.62؛ لدي تصحيح لخط الطول - -165.3
Хорошо. Хорошо, Джек. Подожди. 1. А пока... если ты не против, 
— 
D'accord. Votre alimentation est très faible. Nous recommandons: éteindre le chauffage du réservoir d
Okay. Roger, Columbia. T1 104 32 24, 104 37 33, 2 miles
Пох
Nein, ich glaube nicht, dass das stimmt. Mein Visier war offen; jetzt ist es geschlossen. Ich kann mir nicht vorstellen, dass mir so heiß ist. Mir ist es recht angenehm, ich schw
Le circuit de refroidissement second
... 오전 11시 50분에 전원을 켰는데, 12시 15분에 예열 완료를 알리는 Attitude Mal Light
Apollo 8, Houston. Vos données semblent excellentes. Il s'agit simplement de les récupérer sur place et de 
11、ヒューストンです。Sバンドで自動再捕捉する機能を確認しようとしています。アップリンクキャリアを約30秒間確保します。その後、アップリンクキャリアを再びオンにし、宇宙船の機器が自動的に再捕捉するかどうかを確認します。約3分以内に連絡がない場合は、再捕捉できなかったことを意味しますので、手動
Okay. Stand by 1, Joe. 
Wir haben sogar eine zwölfsaitige G
우리는 그 다른 벡터가 다시는 필요
Ro
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 في المؤخرة ستكون 42. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-1 84 في المؤخرة ستكون 56. 2+20. 1+11. 16 08 16. 3+05. 8+53. 33-1 84 في المؤخرة ستكون 68. 2+20. 1+27. 17 42 15. 2+37. 8+49. 29-BRAVO 84. 50 في المؤخرة. 2+20. 1+03. 12 16 35. 12+08. 30-برافو 120.2+32. 13 50 19. 12+29. 34-4 120.2+32. 20 29 04. 3+33. 8+55. 31-برافو 95.2+01. 15 30 09. 11+48. 32-برافو 86.1+50. 17 05 01. 10+40. 
РУЧНОЙ КОНТРОЛЛЕР ПЕРЕВОДА активирован. Акт
Roger. Computerprüfung aller Modi. 10 ft/sec in alle IVIs eingeben, die Störungsanzeige betätigen und die Start-Computer-Taste drücken. … oder … den Computer 
أنت في وضع جيد جداً؛ تعمل مثبتات الكاميرا لديك بشكل أكثر 
روجر. سيكون هناك أيضًا تسجيل فيديو في الساعة 8:3
Okay, Charlie. Mi sembra solo che tu debba avere un reticolo tangente all'orizzonte nel punto in cui segni, altrimenti non sei
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. الخطوة التالية هي تشغيل مفتاح ربط ناقل البيان
Es sieht so aus, als ob null psi etwa drei Zehntel Volt am Messgerät entsprechen. Das ist uns schon ein paar Mal passiert, dass der
没错，吉姆。那一行的其他断路器都和你清单上看到的一样。第五行唯一的改动是，你要打开“ASCENT ECA 
Ed started on unstowing stuff and as soon as we got to the position where it became no longer feasible to fool with the booster, I started full-time helping him - at least holding the things and stowing them away and trying to keep them from disappearing. The faster we worked the farther behind we got. Not because we weren't putting things the way they were supposed to, it just took a lot longer than we had anticipated. It really wasn't much easier at zero g than it was in the simulator, if as easy. So we worked all the way around. By the time we got to Carnarvon, I had made up my mind that we couldn't 
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Allez-vous positionner votre système d'aide à l'acquisition de données en temps réel au commandem
Роджер, «Д
Роджер. Я это понял. Оставим эти два автоматических выключателя разомкнутыми и подк
वाह, बहुत बढ़िया। ठीक है, 
Roger. Wir haben
We are getting about half of the earth, Frank. The top half - our top half which 
好的。这是我最后要说的。在我们等待您做出决定的这段时间里，让我继续说下去。可接受的死区范围是 660 到 770 psi。换句话说，任何上升时间，只要压力值在这个范围内，就能保证在大约 103 小时后压力低于临界值。所以，我们预期读数会在这个范围内，如果确实如此，就不会有问题。如果读数在 770 到 800 psi
نعم
Роджер. И мы не знаем состояния ваших окон. Если вы... Во время этого заезда нам придется смо
네, 맞습니다. 알겠습니다
Roger, Jim. Nous avons une procédure à vous indiquer pour élargir la zone morte à 5 degr
우리가 당신을 도와드리겠
التغييرات هي كالتالي، وكلها في العمود أ: الرقم 12، التغيير الجدي
Okay. Okay. Gehen Sie z
Roger. The re
No, l'ha attraversato comp
... o
Es gibt keinen Grund
Dev'essere l'orsacchiotto di Bill
روجر.
मैंने ग्रीन फिल्टर का इस्तेमाल किय
Roger. Co
J'ai terminé les vérifications des propulseurs à grande vitesse. Voici un rapport tardif.
D'accord. Panneau 3: mettre CHARGE DE LA BATTERIE sur OFF. Panneau 5: CONNECTER LA BATTERIE A/C AU BUS PRINCIPAL; CHARGEUR DE BATTERIE CB, BAT A CHARGE, ouvrir; CHARGEUR DE BATTERIE CB, BAT B CHARGE, fermer. Ensuite, panneau 250: CONNECTER L'ALIMENTATION/LA PORTÉE DE LA BATTERIE CB B, fermer. Panneau 5: CONNECTER LA BATTERIE B/C AU BUS PRINCIPAL, BAT B, arrêt. Panneau 3: CHARGE DE LA BATTERIE sur B. Prévenez-nous; patientez. Jack, prévenez-nous que nous avons une procédure de retour en arrière pour cela, mais nous vous la présenterons plus tard, dans environ 2 heures. Et aussi, que cette procédure est 
TVC GIMBAL DRIVE, PITCH e
제미니 7호, VI호. 데이터 포인트 그래프를 보면 우리가 정확히 선상에 있는 것 같습니다. 마지막 데이
Be advised also that you have a critical ta
알겠습니다. 디스플레이 전원을 끄기 위해 열 수 있는 회로 차단기가 몇 개 있습
Понял. Это функци
Also relay down that control with the gun was... very good in yaw, very good in pitch. Roll control wasn't as good but when I had the gun, I was able to pick a spot on the spacecraft and r
इसलिए जब हम टकराए
알았어, 잭. 지금 바로 추진기 설정을 알려
マイ
روجر، هل ق
分かりました
Flight sagt, er mache sich keine Sorgen um die Str
हमने आपको वापस कर दिया। मुझे आश्चर्य है कि क्या आप गाइडेंस विभाग
Zwillinge, Zwillinge VI. Ihre Treibzeit beträgt 29 plus 45; Hauptzeit beträ
Warum machst du nicht zum Beispiel... nachdem 
Roger. E ho un paio di altre cose, Mike. Dobbiamo terminare la carica della batteria B in questo momento, e inoltre, il meteo sta mettendo a dura prova il nostro punto di atterraggio previsto a causa di temporali sparsi. Non vogliamo trovarci di fronte a uno di questi, quindi sposteremo il tuo punto di mira più in alto. Correzione: sarà più in basso, per puntare a 1500 m
Роджер. Зона 55-ДЕЛЬТА 82. 04 34 10. 9+57. Зона 55-3, раздельное торможение, 55 сзади, 109 спереди. 1+31. 2+17. 05 15 40. 02+33. 08+47. Как дел
他每次那样做，我们都吓得心都提
आरंभ में, परमेश्वर ने आकाश और पृथ्वी की रचना की। पृथ्वी निराकार और खाली थी, और गहरे जल के ऊपर अंधकार छाया हुआ था। परमेश्वर की आत्मा जल के ऊपर प्रकट हुई, और परमेश्वर ने कहा, "प्रकाश हो।
क्या आपको डेटा प्रा
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。电脑部分结束了。您可以返回 BLOCK 了。完
バスに乗って電源を切ると0ボルトになり
Roger. Il nous faut un peu plus de temps que prévu pour passer en revue et r
स्थानीय समाचारों में एक और छोटी सी खबर: हंट्सविले स्थित काउंटी कोर्ट हाउस कल सुबह भोर से पहले जलकर राख हो गया, इसलिए लगता है कि अब वहां निर्माण कार्य फिर से शुरू करना पड़ेगा। प्रतीक्षा कर रहे परिवारों के बारे में एक छोटी सी जानकारी। यह पोस्ट रिपोर्टर ऐन जेम्स द्वारा है। क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या पर वैलेरी एंडर्स ने कहा, "हम चंद्रमा के पिछले हिस्से पर आराम कर रहे हैं," जब वह और उनका परिवार अपोलो 8 के चंद्रमा की कक्षा से बाहर निकलने और घर की ओर लौटने का इंतजार कर रहे थे। श्रीमती एंडर्स मंगलवार की सुबह 12 बजे से घर पर थीं, और पड़ोसियों ने सभी बच्चों को इकट्ठा कर लिया था ताकि परिवार को कुछ आराम मिल सके जब तक कि अंतरिक्ष यान चंद्रमा के पीछे है और संचार से बाहर है। कर्नल फ्रैंक बोरमैन के घर को बाहर चार बड़े सदाबहार फूलों की मालाओं से सजाया गया था और उस पर हल्की बर्फ गिरी हुई थी और लाल धनुषों से सजाया गया था। बैठक में एक पेड़ उनके सुरक्षित लौटने की प्रतीक्षा कर रहा है, और उनकी सुंदर गोरी पत्नी सू और हट्टे-कट्टे बेटे फ्रेडरिक और एडविन, चंद्रमा की कक्षा से आधी रात को होने वाले विस्फोट के लिए घर पर रहने की योजना बना रहे हैं। आमतौर पर, वे सेंट क्रिस्टोफर एपिस्कोपल चर्च में आधी रात की प्रार्थना सभा में शामिल होते हैं। योजना रात 12 बजे परिवार के लौटने की थी। बोरमैन परिवार में छोटे बच्चे नहीं हैं, इसलिए क्रिसमस के तोहफे देने का सिलसिला कर्नल बोरमैन के चांद पर जाकर वापस आने के शानदार तोहफे के आने तक टल गया। कैप्टन लवेल की व्यस्त पत्नी ने बताया कि उनके चार बच्चों का क्रिसमस बिल्कुल सामान्य रहेगा; लेकिन तोहफों की बात करना मुमकिन नहीं था क्योंकि उनमें से दो उनके बगल में ही बैठे थे। श्रीमती लवेल ने कहा, "मुझे तो कल रात पहने हुए कपड़े बदलने का भी समय नहीं मिला।" हालांकि, बड़ों के बीच तोहफे बांटे जाएंगे और लवेल के घर लौटने पर क्रिसमस ट्री वहीं लगा होगा। एक्शन लाइन पर एक मजेदार खबर है। एक्शन के संपादक को एक छोटा सा पत्र लिखा गया है। उसमें लिखा है, "कल रात हम उड़न तश्तरी से आपको सरप्राइज देने आए थे। लेकिन एक मोटे आदमी, एक स्लेज और रॉकेट से चलने वाली बाल्टी में बैठे तीन लोगों की चांद के चारों ओर रेसिंग देखकर ह
로저. 지금 플라이바이와이어 저고도 조종으로 부분 제어 중입니다. 후진 자세가 되면 제어권을
Oui. Jim, pour info, je ne sais pas si tu étais au courant, mais ce réglage entre 2,5 et 1 a été effectué environ trois fois, et c'est assez serré. On a donc essayé d'éliminer ce qu'o
ジェミニ4号機、こちらヒューストンCAP COMです。D-9、
Jawohl, Sir. Sie leiste
Canary Cap 
I think we're going to have to - Well, we'll leave this here anywa
Что ж, если у специалистов по системам возникнут какие-либо вопро
好的。这段话献给罗德·罗斯和圣克里斯托弗教堂的教友们，实际上也献给全世界的人们。上帝啊，请赐予我们洞察力，让我们即便在人类的种种失败中，也能在世间看到您的爱。请赐予我们信心，让我们即便在无知和软弱中，也能信赖您的良善。请赐予我们
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호입니다. 별들의 궤도 차이가 허용할
Да. Прямо
रॉजर। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है, फ्लाई-बाय-वायर सिस्टम पर मैन्युअल रूप से नियंत्रित हो रही है, नियंत्रण में कोई परेशानी नहीं है। बहुत सहज और आसान; नियंत्रण बहुत बढ़िया है। बाएँ पैनल पर फ्यूज अभी भी वही हैं। स्क्विब चालू है, स्क्विब सक्रिय है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। फ्लाई-बाय-वायर सिस्टम स्वचालित है, जाइरो सामान्य है। पूरा ईंधन भरा है, सभी "T" हैंडल लगे हुए हैं, रेट्रो डिले सामान्य है। इस समय खिड़की से तट का सुंदर दृश्य दि
了解、ウォーリー。やってみます。（リカ
Ich stehe zwei Meter davon entfernt, Charlie, und du kannst es besser lesen als ich. Da stim
I feel pretty 
Джим, то, что я тебе сказал о твоей памяти, неверно. В 
Non. Je ne l'ai pas fait. La lunette
The horizon here is very, very stark. The sky is pitch black, and the earth - or the moon, rather, excuse me - is quite light; and the contrast between the sky and the moon is a vivid, dark line. Coming into the view of the camera now are some interesting old double ring craters, some interesting features that are quite common in the mare region and have been filled by some material the same consistency of the maria and the same color. Here are three or four of these interesting features. Furth
لا بأ
Rega
Roger, pronto
로저. 아직 약 80피트 정도 떨어져 있는 것 같습니다. 메인 레드 스위치는 꺼져 있고, 메인 그린 스위치는 켜져 있으며, 무장 스위치는 꺼져 있고, 보조 하이 스위치는 켜져 있고, 보조 로우 스위치는 켜져 있고, 자세 제어 스위치는 켜져 있고, 고정 스위치는 꺼져 있고, 전원은 켜져 있습니다. 아직 부두가 잘
Das stimmt. Für den HF-Check bin ich also bestens ge
Oui, je
わかりました、ロン。MIDPAC の場合: 000、152、001、194、46 06、267、プラス 1332、マイナス 16917、064、36194、649、14045、36275、195 03 06、0028、154、084、2240、180、400、02 13、00 17、03 51、09 02、45、0189、277、使用可能なものなし、ベクトルを上に持ち上げて、位置合わせ、ベガとデネブ、ロール 078、ピッチ 223、ヨー 340。nonexit を使用してください。マイナス3
Die Funktionsfähigkeit der Speicherplatine und das Auslesen der Signale wurden überprüft. Alles in Ordnu
좋습니다. 승무
Bene. Davvero, penso che dovremmo fornirvi una procedura più dettagliata a riguardo; e, in generale, questi sono i materiali che devono essere utilizzati, ma torniamo alla procedura dettagliata su come far funzionare questa disposizione delle ca
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。復唱は正確です。参考までに、ゴールドストーンは約1分間のFMダウンリンクキャリアを受信したと報告しています。SバンドAUXスイッチ、SバンドAUXテープスイッチをOFF、
Es sieht so aus, als würde das Band noch laufen, und die rote Kontrollleuchte leuchtet noch nicht. Das ist wirklich unbefriedigend – die Position der Kontrollleuchte am Kassettenrekorder. Der ganze Kassettenrekorder – genau, die gesamte Funktionsweise ist fehlerhaft. Er sollte dauerhaft laufen können, damit man auch über 
Laggiù a destra. Credo che sia il sole che splende
Да, для этих проверок доступно 15 из 10 
Roger. Los geht's – Sie können den motorisierten Sinkflug fortsetzen. Los geht's, de
阿波罗发射台随后。TIG 125 19 3470；TIG 126 57 0000；，0532，加上所有零，373 03196 275 04170；
哈哈！哈哈！你上次去灌木丛里，我的脚蹼上还留着黑色的刹车痕迹呢。好了，你看，我又向右偏航了。我得往右偏——更正一下，我向左偏航了。我得往右偏航，月亮就在地平线上。我再往右偏航一次，给你演示一下有多容易。我的燃料好像还够用，所以我再稍微调整一下。好了，偏航基本到位了，但横滚还没完全到位。我猛地一推，就搞定了。横滚开始调整，让船摆正。横滚快到了——好了，我到此为止。这已经
هذا صحيح. حسنًا، الآن ستزودك المحطة الأرضية بتحديث عند -2 + 15. هذا هو الوقت الذي يجب عليك ضبطه لاستقبال بيانات القياس عن بُعد. وما ستحصل عليه في التحديث هو زيادة في قيمة الساعة، ومتجه حالة؛ ستحصل على قيمتين، قيمة فعلية وقيمة مفضلة؛ وقيمة الحمل المستهدف. الآن، إذا أردت نسخ هذه البيانات، يمك
Roger. Going to - which OMNI do yo
आप लोग इसे पढ़ रहे हैं। 
Klingt, als ob du es fast geschafft hättest. Okay. Ich glaube, wir haben die ersten beiden Zeilen auf Punkt 2-2 durchgestrichen. Direkt darunter steht „Checkliste für die Trennung“. Wir werden das also komplet
알았어. 이제 좀 가네. 저게 뭐지? 음, 뭐 좀 먹어야겠다. 어, 이거에 설탕에 절인 젤리가 들어있
We are recommending that the retropackage not, I say again, not be jettisoned. This means that you will have to over
待機してください、マ
रॉजर। आज सुबह अपोलो से जुड़ी बड़ी-बड़ी खबरों में से एक खबर यह है कि आपको एक सुंदर लड़की और उसके साथ एक बड़े खरगोश को देखना चाहिए। एक प्राचीन कथा के अनुसार, चांग-ओ नाम की एक खूबसूरत चीनी लड़की 4000 वर्षों से वहां रह रही है। ऐसा लगता है कि उसे चंद्रमा पर निर्वासित कर दिया गया था क्योंकि उसने अपने पति से अमरता की गोली चुरा ली थी। आप 
Roger. Wir denken auch darüber nach, 
Roger. Ci pia
罗杰。好的，吉姆，我们决定
حسنًا. وسأقوم بفصل قواطع الدائرة الكهربائية - أعتقد أننا 
Okay. I think I read that you were ready. I forgot... earphones. This simply consists of getting a second pair of cartridges out of the command module, putting one band of sticky tape, that is the gray tape, with the sticky side out, around the sides of each new canister near the top, taking a piece of cue card and cutting it into four squa
وبالحديث عن النوافذ، فإن
Хорошо, Джек. Когда раздался громкий хлопок, произошла и перезагрузка. Ты это 
Apollo 11, Houston. Cinq minutes avant. Concernant votre d
الصداقة السابعة. جاهزة للصدمة؛ على و
ठीक है, लेकिन मुझे नहीं लगता कि इससे कोई फर्क पड़ेगा, जब तक हम वापस जाते है
17-BRAVO 87, 01+51. 01 17 26 03. 10+03. 18-1 04+14. 18 02 42. 02+44. 08+57. 18-BRAVO 85. 01+48.
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। पेरिसिंथियन से 2 घंटे पहले लैंडिंग स्टेशन (पैडल) पर पहुंचा। जीएंडएन: 62710, प्लस 
बहुत अ
分かりました、ジャック。その後でバックアウトをお送りし
로저. 027 44 5
REPRESS パッケージを分離します。了解
मैं उनके इशारे पर गोली चलाऊंगा। मुझे लगता है कि अभी समय थोड़ा 
Okay, 
Gemini 4, Canary CAP COM. 
Хорошо. Ладно, Джо. Мы провели проверку кам
Dann beginnen
We would like to look at a couple more tests on the, and the
Sì. Siamo ancora qui, Jack. 
收到。科德角方面想获取飞行员的第一份医疗数据。建议他现在就进行口腔温度测量，以便我们科德角那边能够
Scheint es Ihnen so, als ob der 240-Regler die Auslasstemperatur des Glykolverdampfers ordnu
Roger. Abbiamo un paio di modifiche alle regole della missione NO GO per la tua carta NO GO, Neil. Una piccola modifica alla carta APS/carburante e pressione TEMP, e abbiamo una modifica alla procedura per il controllo delle perdite del radiatore secondario, che verrà effettuato alle 71:00 di domani, e anche alcune indicazioni che abbiamo un paio di obli
حسنًا. سأبدأ مناورتي الآن، لكنني لن أضيّق نطاق التردد، وسنلقي نظر
I understand that this is the 
जी हाँ। हम अभी भी यहीं है
好的。现在你想给我 T-EPHEM，NOUN 01
1 34 37. Нам н
Объектив на этом сломан... на том тоже... Секстант сломан. 16-мм камера работает только примерно половину в
दोबारा सोचने पर, चूंकि इससे रेंज रेट तय
ठीक है। समय 32 घंटे 00 मिनट। निर्देश: पूरा होने पर, निम्नलिखित स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी करें: रोल 101.0, पिच 090.0, यॉ 000.0। हाई पिच माइनस 23, यॉ 93।
Я пони
حسنًا. الخطوة 11: "أطفئ أضواء المرافق". الخطوة 12: "قم بتوصيل الكهرباء ولاحظ الملاحظات المعتادة وقم بالإبلاغ عنه
Das wäre dann bei 44 Minuten. 
Roger, I understand that you are up 
In fact, we picked you up when you began working 
О
收到。穆切亚，指挥官。声音洪亮清晰。告诉杰瑞、格斯、刘易斯以及所有和我一起工作过
了
और कृपया अपने डेल्टा-पी वि
罗杰，那页是NC-7。我再读一遍。然后继续进行无通信程序的经度控制，见NC-7页。走廊控制图的400K平均速度（V 400K）为36253。我再说一遍，走廊控制图的400K
阿波
कोलं
11, это Хьюстон. Повто
좋습니다. 미세 조정을 진행해 주시고, 자이로 토크 각도는 X
11, ह्यूस्टन। ऐसा लगता है कि अब हमें कुछ और धूल के कण दिखाई दे रहे हैं। अब ये स्क्र
로저. 이글, 여기 아주 좋은
Ро
好的。这是我最后要说的。在我们等待您做出决定的这段时间里，让我继续说下去。可接受的死区范围是 660 到 770 psi。换句话说，任何上升时间，只要压力值在这个范围内，就能保证在大约 103
ठीक है। यह दोस्ती 
Дружба Семь, Гавайи, коммуникационные технологии. К
2C는 6 1/2인치와 24인치입니다. 그리고 상태가 좋아 
È bello 
روجر، ما زلنا نتخلص من أشرطتك. جودة الصوت ممتازة عند استخدام أعلى معدل بت، وأنت جاهز للانطلاق في المراجعة التالية. ونود الحصول على تقرير موجز عن حالة باقتك بين عامي 1 و2، فقط لتزويدنا 
罗杰。我们完全同意。
짐 맥디빗입니다. 지금은 발사 후 약 3시간 정도 남았습니다. SECO에서 부스터를 분리했을 때, 각도 변화가 초당 약 0.5도 정도였습니다. 제가 그 변화를 줄이려고 노력했고, 결국 SECO + 30초쯤에 부스터를 완전히 분리했습니다. 분리할 때 각도 변화가 약간 달라진 것 같기도 합
D'accord. Parfait. L'étape suivante consiste à découper un trou en diagonale dans l'une des extrémités du sac plastique, près de l'arche. Choisissez l'une ou l'a
こんに
Jack, while he's doing that, copy down wha
阿波罗
すごくいい。本
オーケー、ペリシンチオンプラス2をMPLに、079、27、4013、プラス08144、マイナス00443、マイナス00226、N/A、プラス00205、08455、4プラス20、268、261、プラス08155、マイナス00443、マイナス021、2187、N/A。GDAは現状のままで大丈夫でしょう。ピッチ5.85、ヨー6.74になるはずです。2ジェットのアレージは10
你在玩
Okay. Bereit zum Kopiere
Pour le film noir et blanc, la valeur d'exposition est de 13 pour une sensibilité ISO 64. Réglage de la valeur d'exposition à 13. Prise de la photo numéro 7 avec filtre. Le continent sud-américain est difficile à photographier à cause des conditions météorologiques. Je vais prendre un panorama. Début dans presque 8 heures. En fait, ce sera le cas. MARK, 7, 8, 9 photos en noir et blanc, film noir et blanc. Dix photos, film noir et blanc. Les prises de vue sont effectuées à 250 5,6 (1/250 seconde et f/5,6) à l'infini. Prise de la photo numéro 11, en regardant vers la gauche. Je survole le continent sud-américain à ce stade. J'aperçois un grand fleuve. Je pr
नेवादा के रेनो में, एक छोटे लड़के के घर में चिमनी न होने के कारण, उसने स्थानीय अखबार के पते पर सांता क्लॉज़ को पत्र लिखकर कहा, "क्या आप कृपया सामने वाले दरवाजे का इस्तेमाल करेंगे? आपको नीचे से थोड़ा धक्का देना पड़ेगा क्योंकि वह अटकता है।" अर्कांसस के लिटिल रॉक में, क्रिसमस से पहले के सप्ताह और क्रिसमस के दिन तक सेंट विंसेंट इन्फर्मरी में पैदा हुए बच्चों को डिस्चार्ज के समय उनकी माताओं को बड़े-बड़े लाल क्रिसमस मोजों में सौंपा जा रहा है। यहाँ एक उदाहरण सर्वधर्म सहयोग का है। कैलिफोर्निया के इंडियो में, क्रिसमस के दिन पुलिस प्रमुख को एक प्रार्थना पुस्तक दी गई। रब्बी फिलिप एच. वेनबर्ग ने एक दिन के लिए पुलिस प्रमुख का पदभार संभाला ताकि असली पुलिस प्रमुख, होमर हंट, जो एक मेथोडिस्ट हैं, अपने परिवार के साथ छुट्टियाँ
我们掌握
알겠습니다. 인코더를 꺼주시기 
D'accord. Vous l'activez. Très bien, nous vous tiendrons au courant. Quel est l'
Mise à j
어디 보자. 미주리주 스프링필드에서, 1941년 월드시리즈에서 브루클린 다저스의 전설적인 포수이자, 삼진을 잡아내 뉴욕 양키스의 승리를 확정지은 미키 오웬은 스포츠 기록 이상의 것으로 기억되기를 바랐습니다. 그는 45명의 소년 소녀들에게 조랑말을 선물했습니다. 아이들은 그에게 조랑말을 어떻게 돌볼 것인지 편지를 보내달라는 요청을 받았습니다. 편지가 쏟아지자, 그는 이미 제공했던 20마리에 5마리를 더 추가했고, 다른 기부자들도 20마리를 더 보태주었습니다. 미키 오웬은 "45통 정도 받을 줄 알았는데, 900통이나 받았어요."라고 말했습니다. 이제 특집 기사입니다. 뉴질랜드 웰링턴에서는 오늘 남극에서 약 50명의 남성들이 전통적인 칠면조와 크랜베리 ​​소스를 곁들인 식사를 즐겼는데, 이날 크리스마스는 동양적인 분위기도 감돌았습니다. 여기에는 남극 대륙을 횡단하다 미 해군 극지 기지에 하루 동안 정박한 일본인 일행이 직접 요리한 스키야키가 포함
알겠습니다, 짐. 이 정보를 바탕으로 전원을 끄는 작
Хорошо. Теперь следующим этапом будет отделение служебного модуля, и вот несколько шагов, но
Okay, Jim. We've come up with a COMM recommendation which we hope will save some power by powering down the power amplifier, if it works. And I'd like to read up the steps to you and have you think about them for a minute, and we recommen
罗杰。你目前遇到的问题可能是由于某些未知原因造成的，例如你的耳轴单元（现在设置为 91 度
हेलो, हवाई कॉम टेक, हवाई कॉम टेक, ऑरोरा से
FDR. Leave it on PLATFORM. Leave it on RATE. FDI is on LOW. You want it on LOW or 
この血圧の問題について少し説明していただけますか？空気が出る穴に親指を当てていませんで
Abbiamo un nuovo attacco sulla tua orbita. Sono 89
Хорошо. Джек показывает Фреду порядок действий. Хочу, чтобы он ознакомился с ним и у
Oui, nous sommes toujours là, Jack. Nous allons vous accompagner tout au long de cette procédure, et pour cela, nous allons utiliser une connexion haut débit. 
Yes. We could do that. We were actually pretty interested in seeing what the effect on would be of the waste water dump. We don
ठीक है। और अभी कुछ मिनट और लगेंगे, जिम। हम अभी भी 
Is that a off phenomenon
34 मिनट पर प्राथमिक स्कैनर पर वापस आ रहे हैं। वार्म-अप का समय लगभग 30 सेकंड है। हम इसे बेहतर परिणाम के लिए
आ
アメリカンリーグでは、デトロイトがクリーブランドを4対0で破り、ニューヨークはワシントンを5対0で圧勝し、ボルチモアはヒットで打ち負かし、ボストンはボルチモアを6対1で打ち負かし、オリオールズは2点だった。シカゴ
Роджер, Джек. Раз уж мы поднялись, мы планируем использовать эту информацию, чтобы выровнять траекторию стыковки, а затем, когда придёт время сбросить сервисный модуль, мы подождём, пока не включим питание, и выровняем траекторию стыковки, выбрав несколько хороших звёзд, чтобы точно определить их положение. Похоже, м
はい、それは、ある程度機能してい
Вп
Okay. You're in pulse alining the platform. Are your logic yaw rate gryos and attitude drive
휴스턴, 아폴로 11
È in fase di recupero
好的。在第 4 行：在“加热器”下方，您的四个四路加热器应关闭，打开“显示器”，打开“S 波段天线”，打开“序列摄
Well
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। थ्रस्ट ठीक है। सब क
ロジャー、ニール。まず始めに。アポロ11号ミッションに対する祝辞が、世界各国の首脳からホワイトハウスに一
Okay. Now it looks like - Okay, the weather on the horizon -- clouds, clouds on the horizon on the left hand side of the picture, I can see the clouds right up to about th
Enregistrement VOX prévu pou
Hou
11, 휴스턴
MARQU
음, 적어도 플랫폼은 필요할지도 모르
أنت لست كذلك - لديك الكثير من الأفلام بالأبيض وال
Apollo 8, Houston. Tout semble bien se passer ici. Tous les commutateurs et systèmes sont
Ro
Roll
مدار القمر نائم؛ (سعال) كتم صوت النطاق S، 
D'accord, Fr
그리고 메인 A의 부하를 줄이기 위해 잭이 명령 
Oh, ne 
Bene, buonaser
休斯顿，阿波
Roger on the GO 17-1 准
الأمر صعب بعض الشيء هنا يا جاك، الدخول إلى الأرجوحة في انعدام الجاذبية. لست متأكداً مما إذا ك
まったく混乱す
Пере
Switchin
ح
音楽を聴きまし
المج
Да. Я слежу за ними, и, на мой взгляд, всё в порядке, Билл. Подождите секунду, я свяжусь с экспертами. Да, с температурой вашег
네. 
Le site du PAO pour les informations du soir e
मैंने आपकी वॉटर बॉयलर की आउटलेट पर दोनों नज़रें जमा रखी हैं... यह छोटी सी दिखती है... लगभग एक ट्यूब के आकार क
Роджер, Брюс. Когда у вас будет несколько минут, не могли бы вы рассказать мне о завтрашних мероприятиях — когда 
Houston, la trappe a passé le test d'intégrité. Je vais maintenant aller à la ventilation du tunnel et la l
好的，杰克。看来我们已经把所有细节都解决了。令人惊讶的是，在所有这些讨论中，我们似乎只
यह पहली बार है जब यह इस तरह से विफल हुआ
Хорошо. Он уже встал и ест. Мы планируем следовать стандартным процедурам, указ
了解。N2タンクの圧力とタンクのブラボー圧力を1960年頃まで表示し
별로 큰 문제는 없었어요. 처음 5cm 정도는 별문제 없이 들어갔는데, 두 번째부터는 망치를 두 손으로 잡고 힘껏 두드려도 연장봉 윗부분에 꽤 큰 
Apollo 8, 
저는 그냥 하늘을 돌아다니면서 높은 속
Roger; esatto, Fred-o. E ora vorremmo fornirti una configurazione per collegare il tuo vettore di stato al carico target. Quindi, se 
在这种飞行姿态下，确实会产生一种抬头仰望的错觉，如果没有地平线，那就只有一片漆黑的天空。驾驶舱内的光线非常明亮。当然，一旦适应了，就可以通过舱内照明灯来降低亮度。但目前，由于飞行服电路的问题，我不太愿意降低舱内照明。我频繁地使用指尖照明灯。有人指出，在以后的飞行中，我们必须配备一个万能装置，可以把东西塞进去，并暂时固定住。我正在努力解决垫圈和那块小金属片的问题。我……终于
好的。在第 4 行，“自动传输”将关闭。
现在……可以帮我确认
إليكم تقريرًا من هاري روزنتال من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في هيوستن. أضفى بابا نويلان البهجة على ليلة عيد الميلاد للطفل جيفري لوفيل، البالغ من العمر عامين. طرق الأول باب منزله وجلب الهدايا، بينما قام ال
Bien, Apollo 8. Tous les systèmes, après un rapide coup d'œil, semblent fonctionner parfaitement. Nous disposons d'une mise à jour complète des quantités, donc cette information est disponible. La température de la conduite d'alimentation en comburant et celle du carburant sont toutes deux à 73 degrés. Le profil cryogénique est actif: batterie A (nos
네, 그런 것 같아요. 저는 그게 원래 로드할 수 없는 그런 종류의 데이터였을지도 모른다고 생각했어요. 어쩌면 아주 짧은 시간 동안만 로드되었다가 카운터가 짐벌 각도를 읽으면서 실
ではウォーリーさん。また次回
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。首先，我们希望后侧的废水排放量降至10%。其次，目前看来我们不需要更换飞机，所以我们不会上传新的飞机。第三，我希望你们所有的低温加热器都设置为自动模式，并且我们已经准备好给电池充电，电池是BRAVO；
Continuing with the report. No sequence panel lights showing. Only abnormal position. Landing bag is off. The EPI is indicating okay. Control fuel 
ジェミニVI、もう
罗杰。沃利，我们确认了这些数量。看来你情况不错。在规定时间之前，你收到切换到超高频（UHF
Roger. Avevo... sto mangiando proprio ora. Secondo pasto del terzo giorno. Ho bevuto 6 sorsi d'acqua. Ho dormito bene solo 
D'accord. On 
Похо
Roger. Are you satisfied
로저, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 롤은 오른쪽으로 20° 벗어났지만, 요는 상당히 양호
Ça me paraît bien. D'accord. Nous avons effectué un exercice avec la maquette concernant les préparatifs de préentrée, et nous avons remarqué que dans la liste de contrôle du LMP à la page S-12, lorsqu'il s'agit de remplir les flacons de repressage, je pense qu'il s'agit d'une erreur 
好的，杰克。从负 2:30 到 1 点这段时间非常紧张，所以你得抓紧时间。我们决定
Roger. Capisco, e possiamo v
Je dois commencer à resse
D'accord, Jack. Les étapes restantes consistent simplement à configurer le circuit de la combinaison pour que le système soit pleinement opérationnel. Nos 
قاعدة ترانكويليتي، هيوستن. لقد جمعنا
Hai un altro minu
さて、あなたは今、コンピューターをどのモードで使用し
Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон. Маневр уклонения G&N: 63481, плюс 095, минус 02
Commande par m
هذا صحيح يا فريد. ليس لدينا إجراءات محددة لذلك حتى الآن، ولا نتوقع أن نتوصل إليها قريبًا. الإجراء الذي سأقرأه عليك الآن هو ببساطة الخطوات اللازمة للحصول على قراءة ضغط الهيليوم فوق الحرج بعد 55 ساعة. ا
Хорошо. 5, /: 47 поправка - 45701, минус 043, плюс 116. В
Houston, Columbia. Ripeto, non sono riuscito a vederlo. L'ottica AUTO ha puntato su un punto molto vicino alle coordinate che mi hai fornito, quindi ho scelto un piccolo cratere in quella zona e l'ho segnato i
क्या आपने कहा कि 
Roger. Sti
Il avait du mal à maintenir son orientation, et il me sembla dès lors qu'il se déplaçait hors du vaisseau sans tenir compte de sa direction. Il pouvait imprimer une vitesse de rotation assez élevée, jusqu'à 2° par seconde. Je comptais la maintenir en dessous de ce niveau. Lorsqu'il est remonté dans le vaisseau, nous avons rencontré de sérieuses difficultés avec l'écoutille. Nous avons d'abord soulevé la partie à cliquet pour l'enclencher. Une fois enclenchée, impossible de la fermer complètement. Nous avons même dû tirer sur les poignées de verrouillage pour les dégager. Bref, on a passé un moment assez mouvementé, et je crois que c'é
جيم، عندما تنتهي من إعادة ترتيب أغراضك ويكون ذلك مناسبًا، نود إيقاف شحن البطارية مؤقتًا لتشغيل نظام القياس عن بُعد، حتى نتمكن من مراجعة درجات الحرارة مرة أخرى، كما فعلنا بالأمس. أخبرنا أن سعة بطارياتك الحالية تبلغ 111 أمبير/ساعة، ونأمل أن تصل في النهاية إلى حوالي 116 أمبير/ساعة. نقطة أخرى، يمكننا إما مراجعة الإجراء الذي يتضمن زيادة سعة القياس عن بُعد، أو إذا كان جاك لا يزال يحتفظ بملاحظاته، ولكن لدي
O
أبولو 8، ه
그게 우리가 플랫폼에서 얻은 정보입니다. 모든 주소를 확인해
روجر. نحن نراقب الوضع الحالي لنرى ما إذا كان جاك قد بدأ التسخين المسبق، ولم نره بعد. هل حالته جي
Roger. Non l'ho seguito molto da vicino. Una cosa che ho notato è che quando accendi le ventole si verifica un'anomalia nella quantità, che potrebbe corrispondere a un'anomalia nella corrente alter
D'ac
Si vous avez le temps, veuillez connecter l'émetteur KB et parler, comptez jusqu'à 20. Si vous êtes disponible, faites-le-moi savoir. Vous me recevez? Yuri, mais commencez dans une minute, s'il vous plaît. Vous me re
Roger. We show you, in the flight plan, staying in orbital rate until about 79 hours 10 minutes. Do you have some particular 
रॉजर। गुब्बारा लगभग 100 डिग्री के चाप में दोलन कर रहा है। यह अक्सर नज़र से ओझल हो जाता है। इस समय, यह लगभग सीधा खड़ा है। इस समय एक तटीय मार्ग को चिह्नित करें—ऐसा लगता है—मैं आपको यह बताने की
Antenna Seleziona su RIENTRO, ed è già su RIENTRO. Misurator
Roger
Okay. Geben Sie m
저것들은 설정이 아닙니다.
检查其他系统。它们似乎都相当稳定。宇航服穹顶温度仍然在71度左右，宇航服进气口温度为62度，这次感觉
로저. 지금 기온이 약 104도 정도 되는
Okay. Ich habe Sie gelesen, bis ich BAT 6 ausgeschaltet habe – Korrektur: Schalten Sie
Хорошо. На пер
Abbiamo notato un leggero aumento dell
Roger. Versuch es von hie
Roger. Temo che Ed 
로저, 오로라 세븐입니다. 제어 모드 매뉴얼
了解しました。この装置の酸素流量を毎時0.6ポンドに調整する必要があるのですが、このトランスデューサーが正常に動作していないので、最新の数値を
Roge
ओह,
Cavolo, credo che quello che stiamo dicendo è che... [L'esperimento] D-9 non può essere fatto
D'accord. Le pre
罗
Fa caldo qui d
Roger: I've heard inclusion. Feeling fine. I see Earth: v
Non, pas vraiment. Je dois encore un peu travailler sur l'écran de télévision. 
Fo
方向感覚は全く失われませんでした。地面を見下ろすこともできました。地面を見下ろすのに全く違和感はありませんでした。仰向けに転がって上を見上げることもできましたが、方向感覚は全く失われませんでした。宇宙船が私にとって最高の基準でした。宇宙船を見るたびに、すぐに良い基準点ができました。実際、
ठीक है। हवाई के ऊपर से गुजरते समय हमने सारा एसपीसी लोड सही ढंग से नहीं पहुंचाया था, और हम यहीं से एसपीसी लोड पूरा करन
لدينا ثمانية
로저. 참고로 말씀드리자면, 혹시라도 당신이 당직을 서지 않는 동안 발생한 일일까 봐 알려드립니다. 메인 경고 회로 차단기는 여전히 작동 중이며, 현재 하강 배터리에 이상 표시가 나타나고 있지만 모든 매개변수는 이전과 마찬가지로 정상입니
هذا خبر سار. أعتقد أنني 
杰克
روج
نعم، لقد أصبح مر
次に、カメラを窓に向けてください。先端が視野に入らないように持ちます。それから、2セットの写真を撮ります。パルスモードで、探査機を真下に地球に向けてください。起動時間はお教えします。夜側の黒い地球を撮影します。次に、ピッチをパルスアップさせて、カメラのシャッターをバルブ位置に開いた状態で写真を撮ります。次に、地平線を上がってくる時に、ピッチをパルスダウンさせて、カメラの別のフレームで、この時もシャッターを全開にした状態で写真を撮ります。次に、パルス
알았어, 조. 내가 제대로 받았는지 다시 한번 확인해 볼게. 그 후, 우리 동안 육분의를 이용해 베넷 혜성을 관측하고, 혜성이 보인다면 롤 각도를 기록하라는 거지? 혜성은 이상적으로는 45도에서 75도 사이에서 보일 거고, 약 155도 롤 후에 사라질 거야
画面の右端にある明る
罗杰
148550；这真是
Ok, Vance. Allo spegniment
Apollo 8, wir haben anscheinend Ihre Stimme verloren; das Bil
Okay. Ein SEP-Pad vor, minus 1 Stunde, Manöver in folgende Lagen: Rollen 130°, Nick
Это Friendship Seven. Нет, не знаю; в этом районе слишком много облаков. Я заснял огни в Перте в хорошем состоянии; они были очень четкими, но я не заснял огни в Вумере; извин
今天我们煮了三杯咖啡。最后一杯——你知道，就是所有管道都预热好了，氢气枪什么的都用上了之后——是三杯里最热的。我不知道是谁喝的——尼尔，是你喝的吗？你的咖啡怎么样？你
ठीक है। ये दो लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड के डिब्बे हैं, उस 
Roger. Je crois que c'est tout pour aujourd'hui, Mike
好的，没问题。您有空的时候可以给我们提供辐射报告。我们正在为您准备一份消耗品更新报告，
Хорошо, я сейчас включу ДОСТОЙНОЕ КОЛИЧЕ
الشيء الوحيد هو كل الهندسة التي بُذلت في تلك الأشياء اللعينة. لقد استُثمر
로저, 지금 인버터 설정을 4에서 5로 올렸습니다. 그리고 
제미니 4호,
알겠습니다. 방금 햇빛 속
コンピュータ
ठीक है। प्रोपेलेंट डिस्प्ले ओवरराइड सर्किट ब्र
Houston, Apollo 8. Sollen wir für de
分かりま
Okay. We c
Хорошо. Снова на крыльце, немного пошевелила ногами. Не
Roger. 31,
हेलो कोल
Roger, Roger. Alles klar und deutlich zu 
그들이 돈을 낼 거라고 생각하
网络，卡纳文。读你的文字虽然虚弱但
그건 전부
Roger. Pour Bill: la qualité audio au verso est extrêmement mauvaise. Nous la jugeons inutilisable et recomman
Apollo 8
انتظر قليلاً. سنفحصها يا
Roger, tu as
36 pi
Siamo sulla SIMPLEX A, ma non attraverseremo Tanana
और यह बंद ही रहता ह
Wie viel Schlaf haben Sie zwischen dem Burnout und dem Zeitpunkt, an dem Sie für 
정말 좋네요! 저도 그 자료들을 볼 수 있으면
Roger. Ich habe
Apollo 8, Houston. Concernant votre point d'information télévisé, nous vous suggérons de démarrer la diffusion à l'heure prévue du vol et de prolonger l'arrêt de quelques minutes. L'arrêt est actuellement prévu à [heure], et nous souhaiterions que la diffusion se pour
不，你没有，
フレンドシップ
ठीक है। मुझे 
روجر. المنطقة 57-2 86. 1+49. 07 42 52. 7+12. 11+52. 58-2 94. 1+59. 09 16 42. 5+49. 10+41. المنطقة 58-برافو، انقسام الاحتراق، 55 للأمام، 51 للخلف. 1+31. 1+54. 10 00 10. 9+03. المنطقة
Ещё немного местных новостей: здание окружного суда в Хантсвилле сгорело вчера до рассвета, так что, похоже, там снова займутся строительством. Немного о семьях, ожидающих возвращения. Вот что написала Энн Джеймс, репортер газеты Post. «Мы отдыхаем на обратной стороне Луны», — сказала Валери Андерс в канун Рождества, ожидая, когда «Аполлон-8» покинет лунную орбиту и направится домой. Миссис Андерс была дома во вторник в 00 утра, и соседи только что собрали всех детей, чтобы семья могла отдохнуть, пока космический корабль находился за Луной и был вне зоны связи. Дом полковника Фрэнка Бормана был украшен четырьмя большими венками из вечнозеленых деревьев на улице, посыпан пушистым снегом и украшен красными бантами. Дерево в гостиной ждёт его благополучного возвращения, а его красивая светловолосая жена Сью и крепкие сыновья Фредерик и Эдвин планируют остаться дома до полуночного старта с лунной орбиты. Обычно они посещали полуночные службы в епископальной церкви Святого Христофора. Планировалось, что семья отправится туда в полночь. Поскольку в доме Борманов нет маленьких детей, дарение рождественских подарков просто отложится до возвращения полковника Бормана с его фантастическим праздничным подарком — полетом на Луну и обратно. Четверо детей Мэрилин Ловелл проведут совершенно обычное Рождество, как сообщила занятая жена капитана Ловелла; но говорить о подарках было невозможно, потому что двое из них сидели прямо рядом с ней. «У меня даже не было времени переодеться, в чем я была вчера вечером», — сказала миссис Ловел
उह-उह। मुझे उम्मीद है कि आप धरती के करीब नहीं जा रहे हैं। हमें अभी
Aber es gibt doch alle möglichen Gesteinsarten, oder zu
네, 저는 빛 속에
收到。完全明白。只是想确认一下通讯
喉が少し乾いていて、初日の終わり頃には目が
尼尔，你还记得最近这次推进器活动期间看到的
ええと、あの紐、つまり宇宙船の形をした紐が、ずっと私をここに留めてくれていたんです。ここから外に出ると、テザーダイナミクスでここに戻ってきて、それからまたこっちに戻って操作するんです。あのアンカーポイントを設計した
حسنًا يا فريد، أنت ضعيف جدًا في النقطة الأخيرة. أفهم أنك ستفصل الاتصال، وسيتم إيقاف تشغيل جهاز BIOMED الخا
जीएमटी 2-1—15 55 47 को वापस पढ़ने पर। जीएमटीआरबी 16 05 31 है। बैंक कोण बाएँ 55° 
哦，下雪了。
わかりました、フラン
Okay, WATER AND GLYCOL TANKS PRESSURE and 
रॉजर। सिग्मा सेवन। गुआयमास कैप कॉम। साफ-साफ। कैलिफोर्नि
加油，双子座4号
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 지금 소변 투기를 진행하는 데에는 아무런 이의가 없습니다. 그리고 참고로 말씀드리자면, 폐수 투기는 저희 일정상 약 90% 정도까지 미룰 예정입니다. 평소보다 조금 높지만, 연소 과정이 완료된 후로 미루려고 했습니다. 앞으로 산소 연료 전지 퍼지 작업도 있고, 항성 랜드마크 관측 삭제에 대
Roger. Wir be
الوقت الآن ١٤ وشيء. لحظة من فضلك. ح
好的。这是氧气（O2）还是氢气
حسنًا يا فريد، لديّ بعض الكلمات لأخبرك ببعض الأمور التي نريد القيام بها خلال الساعات القليلة القادمة، ولضمان اتصال جيد، ولإتاحة بضع دقائق لتحديد المدى، أريدك أن تضع قاطع دائرة مُضخّم الطاقة في اللوحة رقم 16، ومفتاح وظيفة الصوت على وضع "صوت"، ومفتاح وظيفة تحديد المدى
Roger. Du bist laut und
Apollo 8, Houston. Schalten Sie Ihr Gerät
Я точно е
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। डिस्प्ले के लिए अपने सर्किट ब्रेकर खोलने के लिए तैयार रहें। हम आपको बताएंगे कि वे क्या हैं, और मेरे पास आपके लिए कुछ जाइरो टॉर्क
أبولو 8، هيوستن. حاضر. 
ठीक है। मैं आपको एक R कैलक
Хо
Ja, ich hatte vor, viel mit den Filtern herumzuspielen, einfach so, während du schläfst. Als Nächstes wollte ich den
D'accord.
フレ
روجر. 50 دقيقة و18 ثانية. درجة حرارة الرادياتير الداخلة
Okay. Batterie A 38,3, Batterie B 36,9, Batterie C 38,5. Das sieht gut aus. Es scheint, als hätten wir alle ausgebauten Teile wieder eingebaut und liegen genau im
- - I monitor RCS sono stati controllati - (Risate) Okay, ecco che arriva il bambino di Buzz - VERBO 83 - de-dum-de-dum-de-dum. Errore dell'operato
Non, laissez-moi vérifier. Je descends au panneau 275, j'ouvre CB MAIN A, BAT BUS A et CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B. 
卡纳维拉尔通信技术
حسنًا. أولًا، علينا اتباع تلك ال
Roger, Houston. Apollo 11 
Roger. Mi dispiace disturbarti, Columbia. Due cose: ti chiediamo di selezionare una zona morta di 10 gradi nella tua checklist, in conformità con le procedure di Foxtrot 9 7; e in secondo luogo, vorremmo lasciare un display sul quale non si verifichino cicli, ma che venga costantemente aggiornato. Una volta ampliata la zona morta, otterrai u
Zanzibar Cap Com, Sigma Seven sur UHF. Termin
At - we have a 1 degree per second right yaw rate. 0 degree per second pitch, and 3/4 of a degree per second left roll. No change in fuel quantity. No detectible thruster action. We are swinging around and
Très bien. Passez à 
아니요, 
杰克，你又陷进泥里了。看来是其他电路也
そして現在、私たちは月から 22,500 マイル離れたところで、秒速 
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフランク・ボーマ
روجر. تم تفعيل مفتاح التفجير؛ تم إيقاف تشغيل مفتاح الارتداد التلقائي؛ الجيروسكوبات في وضعها الطبيعي؛ المقبض اليدوي للخار
Don't call out your
И, кстати, там, где в середине страницы находится небольшой блок с над
حسنًا. عند الدقيقة الأولى، نبدأ بـ"الذراع الرئيسية"، ثم نخدش. عند الثانية 35، نخدش السطرين الأولين. سيبدأ "التنظيف اليدوي" عند الثانية 9؛ سنخ
Oh, attends un peu, Fred. On aimerait… modifier la position du CONTRÔLE D'ATTITUDE, puis du CONTRÔLE DE MODE, pour qu'il soit juste en dessous de « libre ». C'est plus
네, 알겠습니다. 차트북에 차트 몇 개가 있는데, 그중에 입력해야 할 숫자가 몇 개 있습니다. 그중 하나는 규모와 중단율 간의 관
TRANS
Okay. Zeile 3 unter COMM. DISPLAYS öffnen, SE AUDIO schließen, VHF-Sender A und Empfänger B öffnen, beide Sicherung
Vedo molto chiaramente la for
Junge
わ
अभी हम आपको हाई गेन सेटिंग पर रख रहे हैं। क्या आप चाहते हैं कि हम इसे ओम्नी सेटिंग पर स्विच क
ジーン、調子はとても良いです。今はダイポールアンテナでHFに入っています。キャビンの設定を調整しました。ドームが約45度まで下が
Ken, wir h
You just woke the d
Эй, Джим, ты не мог бы расположить сервисный модуль так, чтобы он находился между тобо
Ricevuto. Solo u
Okay. That's affirm. Stand by. Let me just make sure I've got everything here before I go of
罗杰。我们当时机头向下追踪助推器，恐怕我们的角度不太合适，所以无法很好地接收那些电台
Капсула находится в идеальном положении. Идеальные снимки для метеорологической службы. Кажется, я даже в это время включил видои
Wir messen einen CO2-Partialdruck von 4,2 Millimetern. Wir dürfen die Sekundärluftanlage nutzen, bis der
Roger, 11. Questo è il CAP COM originale. Congratulazioni per l'eccellent
收到。你要把头盔放
当前时间（02:
BMAG मोड, तीन, 
4機のSPS/G&Nが到着：38320、マイナス055、プラス060、084、30、2749、プラス31380、プラス03475、マイナス01032、NA
Ok. Saltiamone uno e vogliamo che il BUS PRINCIPALE B della CELLA A COMBUSTIBILE 2 sia in grigio; e, nel suc
很好。好的。你想让我至少先把这
이것은 북두칠성에서 안개층으로 
रॉजर। अभी-अभी आप हमारे पास पहुंचे हैं। डीकंप्र
D'accord, Jac
Okay. You're still looking real fat on power. We show you having over 30 amps on the water. If you do get into a bind and don't come up - that's amp-hours - don't come up with Recovery, you can always power down and you can always put the p
ठीक है, मुझे बुध ग्रह हवा की चमक में से गुजरता हुआ दिख रहा है। देखते हैं कि वह स्थिर रहता है या नहीं। जब मैंने कहा, "मैं देख सकता हूँ," तो यह इसकी शुरुआत थी। मार्क, टी, रंग में पहला बदलाव, जो अब हल्का नीला है। और यह अभी भी दिखाई दे रहा है। मार्क, टी, गहरा नीला। पृथ्वी की सतह के पीले-नारंगी रंग में दिखाई दे रहा है। यह बुध ग्रह था, जो क्षितिज के पार जा रहा था। मुझे जल्
Это Sig
알겠습니다
11. Судя по показания
Hanno detto qualcosa riguard
حسنًا. أردتُ فقط إطلاعكم على هذا الأمر والتفكير فيه وفي تداعياته المحتملة على خطة الطيران، وسأعيد عرض هذه الزاوية الواسعة مع التعليق على القمر لنرى أيّ الأقسام ترونها الأنسب. حسنًا. في الشاشة، طلب منا فرانك التحقق من ترتيب ظهور مسار الدخول، والمسار الأول الذي سيظهر مُسمى "مسار الدخول بدون مخرج رقم 2" وهو مسار الدخول قصير المدى وعالي السرعة. المسار الثاني الذي سيظهر بعنوان "3500 ميل" وهو أيضًا مسار دخول عالي السرعة، ولكنه المسار الذي ستستخدمونه في حال انتقلنا إلى نطاقات دخول أطول. ثم سيكون المسار الثالث "مسار الدخول بدون مخرج رقم 1"، وسيتبعه مسار رابع بطول 3500 ميل. إذن لديكم أربعة مسارات دخول. المساران 1 و3، عند الوصول إليهما، هما مسارا الدخول قصيري المدى، والمساران 2 و4 هما مسارا الدخول طويلي المدى. بخصوص مرحلة التوقف التام، أعتقد أننا ناقشنا ما سنفعله هناك، ولكن في غضون ساعة تقريبًا، سنحتاج إلى البدء في هذه المرحلة. بالتأكيد لا نريد القيام بذلك في الساعة 12. بالحديث مع فريق تحليل المسار - ما رأيهم في عملية "غليان الماء"؟ - من المهم أن نضع في اعتبارنا أنهم يرون عمليات "تفريغ الماء" و"غليان الماء" على مخطط المسار. يبدو أن هذا يعتمد على نظامهم الحسابي وليس على مدى اضطراب المسار. لذا، يبدو أننا سنفكر في إجراء عملية "غليان الماء" قبل منتصف المسار مباشرةً، بعد استقرار عملية التتبع ومعرفة تصحيح منتصف المسار. حينها، في تلك الفترة التي تسبق منتصف المسار مباشرةً، يمكننا القيام بذلك، وسيستأنفون عملية التتبع بعد تصحيح منتصف المسار. لذا إذا
Gemini 4, Houston. Pouvez
حسنًا. اترك مفتاح مكبر الطاقة في وضع التشغيل الأساسي بدلاً من وضع الإيقاف، وضع مفتاح تحديد المدى في وضع المدى بدلاً من وضع الإيقاف/إعادة ا
म
Ok, Jack. Puoi procedere con la configurazione degli interruttori. Quello che stiamo discutendo è di farti attivare gli interruttori del motore MAIN BUS TIE più avanti, semplicemente per verificare che funzionino correttamente, perché le batterie probabilmente si stanno raffreddando un po'. Ma torneremo con una procedur
حسنًا. نقوم بتقريب العدسة حتى تملأ الشاشة
금리가
Не думаю, что многие видели это ме
Sì. Andrebbe bene. C'è qualcosa che puoi fare: puoi revisionarlo. Ed è un processo un po' noioso, ed è per questo che vogliamo solo tenerlo d'occhio, così da avere un'idea prima dell'ingresso se possiamo contare su due circuiti o uno solo. Il che ci porta a un'altra domanda che stiamo cercando di definire, due domande, in realtà. Numero uno, vorremmo verificare che tu preveda di utilizzare sia la caldaia primaria che quella secondaria durante l'ingresso vero e proprio, e stiamo anche cercando un modo per controllare la caldaia primaria per assicurarci che non sia asciutta prima dell'ingresso. E questo si sta rivelando un po' più impegnativo di quanto tu possa imm
Roger. Ich denke, wir können sie erkennen. Die Farbe verbessert unsere Fähigkeit, Details und Krater im Vergleich zu dem, was wir in 
Ja. Ich habe einen RKV-Gesundheitsdatenpass Nr. 1 f
로저, 프랭크. 지금 여기서 하려는 작업은 이렇습니다. 수평선 보정을 해야 하는데, 총 15개의 표시가 필요합니다. 한 별에 3세트, 다른 별에 2세트씩 말이죠. 하지만, 바로 다음 단계로 넘어가야 한다는 점도 고려해야 합니다. 그래서 몇 분만 더 기다려 주시면, 지금 
D'accord. Il est levé et mange. Nous prévoy
حسناً، هل تبدو الصخور متشابهة؟
Negative. I will switch to lo now 
Comprends bien ça, Jack. J'aimerais peut-être le laisser cha
了解しました。また同じ「注意」と「警告」が出ることを覚悟してくださ
了解。BLOCKとDOIに戻ります。101:36:1
——它逆转了你的偏航
Apollo 8, 
قل يا بيل، كيف تصف لون الق
अगर आप आगे की जानकारी म
مثل الأصداف البحرية - جميلة جداً، ومتناسقة جداً
はい。あ、こちらはケンです。はい。ケン、気
카메라 앞에 편광 필
そうだ。ミズーリ州スプリングフィールドでは、ブルックリン・ドジャースの元捕手、ミッキー・オーウェンがいた。1941年のワールドシリーズで、ニューヨーク・ヤンキースをドジャースに勝利に導いたサードストライクを落とすという記録を打ち立てた人物だ。彼はスポーツでの記録だけでなく、それ以上のことで記憶に残ることを決意した
Ich habe es seit Einbruch der Dunkelheit nicht gefunden. Es – es – es spinnt ziemlich, Deke. Es ist nicht vollständig aufgepumpt und spannt sich nicht so straff an der Leine, wie ich erwartet hatte. Es springt auf und ab und schwingt hin und her. 
D'accord, en commençant par le haut de la page, barrez les cinq premières lignes, qui sont « Configurer la caméra pour la contamination et la photographie, Betelgeuse, CM4/EL/80 », etc., « MAG T », 
حسنًا. الصورة التي أعطاني إياها جيم عن رؤيته من خلال القمر الصناعي كانت داخل - جزء من الأرض، الجزء المضاء يقع في النصف العلوي من الق
Der Sturm w
ジェミニ4、
नमस्क
Et Eagle est
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. Thirty-minute report follows: Head movements cause no nausea or no bad feelings at all. I am surprised that I can look as close to t
フレッド、あと2点あります。1つ目は、エンジンの噴射中にミスアライメントはほとんど発生しないと予想しています。そのため、特に推力が非常に低い状態なので、噴射中はエンジン回転数の変化はほとんどないと予想しています。2つ目は、スーツの温度調節器が「フルコールド」になっていることを確認してください。もし「フルコールド」になっていれば、機内温度が改善される可能性があり
そうですね、あと 20 分ほどで
У нас есть несколько рабочих процедур, и я их видел, Фред. Думаю, довольно скоро мы отправим их тебе, чтобы ты уточнил, какие к
Immagi
Roge
Okay, fine. The next step now is to anchor that tape, and the way we want you to do that is to cut about a 2-foot length off the roll and then tear it lengthwise so that you have two strips about 2 feet long and about a half an inch wide. And you'll wrap those around the canister at right angles, more or less, to the tape that you've got so that it goes across the top and across the bottom; and when it goes across the
Родже
Voglio guardare di nuovo il
حسناً يا إد حبيبي، سأبدأ ب
Хоро
双子座八号，这
И снова нам нужна небольшая корректировка положения. Наша Земля уходит вверх и вправо. Наша Земля и ваша Земля. В неправильном направлении, в неправильном направлении. Еще немного. Хорошо. Это нормально, если вы сможете удержать ее в этом положении. Ой! Теперь она снова соскальзывает. Хорошо. Продолжайте двигаться еще немного, еще немного. Хорошо. Девяносто градусов в этом направлении; это неправильны
Loud and clear. You were coming in slightly garbled. Could you give us your fuel, oxygen 
Ok. Bit rate, LO; FUNZIONE VOCE, BACKUP VOCE GIÙ; BANDA S DELL'AMPLIFICATORE DI POTENZA, aperto; e FUNZIONE GAMMA su GAMMA; e questa è una verifica. E ho ancora il BIOMED acceso qui, quindi non abbiam
11, Houston. Nous allons 
لم أغير إعدادات المحولات. سأشرح لك الأمر باختصار. المحولات مضبوطة على 4، وهذا هو إعداد صمام التح
Близнецы 4, вам не нужно измерять т
Okay, Jack. We don't want to bug you, but you ought to be thinking - or what your thoughts are concerning what the next burn will be. I 
80, 81, 82번
ठीक है। आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ आ रही है, और
Columbia, Houston. Rollio zero,
Хорошо. А можно просто накрыть всё абаж
سؤال يا جو. كان جيم يتحدث معي عن كيفية تنفيذ هذا الأمر في منتصف الدورة، وقبل فترة عندما قمن
Ce serait plu
Houston, Apollo 11. Nou
はっきりと聞こえました。さっそく
Je ne sais pas, la pastille est tombée. Je ne vais pas rem
…あそこ…
Ну, это здорово! Я не могу разорвать пакет. Очень хочется избавиться от этого запаха, а единственный способ сделать это — разорвать 
D'accord
Vou
안개층 한가운데에서는 페크다가 보이지 않습니다. 광도계로도 측정이 안 되
ठीक है, जो। मैंने यहाँ एक नया पेज बनाया है जिसका नाम है -1A, आइटम 6, बिजली चालू करना और हमेशा की तरह यह जांचना कि फ्लडलाइट खाली है और मैंने CAUTION WARNING POWER लाइट चालू कर रखी है; मुझे जैक से एक सूचना मिली है, और मैं उसे आपको बता दूंगा। आइटम 7, सर्किट ब्रेकर ट्रांसलूनर बस टाई, पैनल 11 और 16, बंद। चरण 8, पैनल 1 पर सर्किट ब्रेकर लाइटिंग और यूटिलिटी, बंद, और यूटिलिटी लाइट चालू करें। हालाँकि, लाइटिंग ऐसी है कि मुझे वास्तव में उनकी ज़रूरत नहीं है। वे अभी, शायद, स्टोरेज में ह
Lo ottengo al
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous avons ces chiffres en pourcentage. Nous allons les convertir en livres. En attendant, nous allons changer notre antenne au sol dans environ deux min
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। मार्क, इस समय, मुझे अभी भी नीचे कुछ बादल दिखाई दे रहे हैं, सूर्यास
ठीक है, एक तरफ रुकिए। सुनिए, आप फ्लाइट को लैंडलाइन के ज़रिए बता सकते हैं कि हम इस काम में देरी कर रहे हैं। बहुत सार
Roger. Tout semble normal ici. Tout est en ordre. J'ai 55 % de carburant automatique. Je passe sous les 70 000 pieds, puis 65 000. L'assiette est très stable. J'approche des 60 000 pieds. Le régulateur de vitesse fonctionne très bien. J'approche des 5
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। हमने आपके सिस्टम की हाई बिट रेट पर जांच कर ली है। सब कुछ बढ़िया लग 
Das
Bermuda again shows high thruster action on switch over to f
吉姆，昨天和昨晚机舱里一直有点热。关上窗户后温度有所下降，我们看到宇航服温度在40多华氏度，机舱
يا رجل، يبدو أنك تستمتع حقاً. سأتركك 
Мы счит
Roger, Bill. Bevor ihr die manuelle Mischung ausprobiert, möchten wir euch bitten, es erst einmal mit der manuellen Einstellung zu versuchen und die K
كان السبب هو تجاوز الهوائي عالي الكسب 
Роджер. Копия. A
ठीक है। मैं
Understand. The b
알겠습니다. 절차는 다음과 같습니다., ENTER; 1331, ENTER; 7, ENTER; 그리고 ENTER. 설명은 
Rog. Ich bin mir nicht sich
John voulait simplement vous rappeler que le plus dur ar
Мы понимаем, что у вас эта функция не активируется в 
你好，卡那封，你好，卡那封
Sev
Хорошо. Пропустим с
نعم، لديك خاصية
روجر. لقد راجعنا بيانات أنظمتك أثناء التشغيل، وكل شيء يبدو جيدًا. على وجه الخصوص، يبدو كل شيء جيدًا. مع ذلك، أود تذكيرك بطلب إجراء هذا الحرق على صمامات الكرة في المجموعة A فقط، وأنت موافق على ذلك. أيضًا، لدينا حاليًا في خطة الطيران أنك قد حددت غدًا بدء الدخول إلى النظام في حوالي الساعة 96، ونود معرفة ما إذا كانت
هل قمت بتد
エリオットさん…本を更新しましたね。プレローンチからキャッチ
Хорошо. Я по
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Ho ancora una luce molto intensa lungo l'orizzonte: arancione in basso, uno strato giallastro, poi blu, poi 
Quello che sto tirando fuori ora, Jack, è un altro nuovo pezzo di hardware che questa volta porteremo con noi
ठीक है। अब पैनल 8 पर, मुझे आपको उन सर्किट ब्रेकरों की संख्या बतानी होगी जिन्हें हम खोलना चाहते हैं, इसलिए सीबी पैनल 8 को पूरी तरह बंद करके शुरू करें, सिवाय उन दो को छोड़कर जो हमारे पास पहले से हैं: सीएम/हीटर, खुला, और फ्लोट बैग, और निम
Откройте TEMP/PRESS DISPLAY-FLAGS и PQGS/DISP
Хорошо. Мы продолжим и выключим питание. Думаю, если по
Ты была так добра, когда попросила об
你可以把头
Это всё
Выглядит неплох
Wir haben es geschlossen; der Leistungsschalter 
休斯顿
네, 프레드, 그 부분에서 약간의 실언
好
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。マイク、通信は不要だ。トランキリティと話をしたい場合に備えて、その位置にいてほしいだけだ。休憩。ヒュ
أنت تقود السيارة بروح معنوية
Итак, Джек, сейчас я покажу тебе LEVVA, которую уже демонстрировали раньше. Это головной убор для ношения на поверхности, и я... я покажу здесь головной убор Джима, чтобы продемонстрировать пару модификаций. Раньше была одна проблема: персонажей на поверхности было трудно различить. Поэтому на костюме Джима не только есть красные полосы, но, как ты видишь, на его LEVVA тоже есть красная полоса. А теперь ты можешь
分かりました。騒音は止まったようです。ありがとう、チャー
حسناً، أنا أنظر إل
Right. Now we have some additional instructions in case this does not work. They say a full 20, Frank, on that ALC. It requires a full 20 seconds undisturbed for the ALC to properly do its thing. Now if these procedures th
わかりました。待機するように伝
네, 프레드. 앞으로 몇 시간 동안 진행할 몇 가지 작업에 대해 말씀드리겠습니다. 원활한 통신을 위해, 그리고 잠시 거리 측정을 위해, 16번 패널의 파워 앰프 회로 차단기를, 음성 기능 스위치를 음성(VOICE)으로, 거리 측정(RANGING) 기능 스위치를 거리
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Tous vos systèmes fonctionnent correctement. À vo
罗
好的。我们复制 39.3 和 1.20。吉姆，我还有一件事要告诉你。大约 45 分钟后，下降气瓶上的水量警告灯会亮起。这是预期的。它会在水量降至 16% 时亮起。这没问题，因为我们打算把气瓶里的水全部用完，只是为了演练。要重置指示灯，只需
कमांड मॉड्यूल डॉकिंग लाइट। ठीक है। आपन
रॉजर। ऐसा लगता है कि उस ऑक्सीजन हीटर का प्रेशर स्विच खराब हो गया है। बेहतर होगा कि आप उस ऑक्सीजन हीटर को ऑटोमैटिक मोड से बंद कर दें, और फिर तापमान और प्रेशर को मैन्युअल रूप
表面全体が、太陽がかなり高い位
D'accord. Quantité de p
Gemini VI, Gemini VI, Houston CAP COM.
必须把地平线保留在画
روجر... 43-2 101. 2+06. 09 40 59. 5+14
حسناً، على حد علمنا، لم يكن هناك شيء قريب منك إلى هذا الحد. كان 
Verseau, Houston.
わ
82人全員が北朝鮮と韓国を隔てる「帰らざる橋」を渡るのに約3
아폴로 8호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 수신할 수 없습니다. 약 1분
They wouldn
As you come over Ascension I want to try to give you a check there. The air-ground remote hasn't worke
Francamen
잭, 우리가 어떻게 할 수 있을지 알아볼게요. 복구팀에 연락해서 당신이 돌아오면 태평양에 요원을 보낼 수 있는지 알아보겠습니다. 글쎄요, 한번 봅시다. 프로 농구 소식으로는 닉스가 밀워키 벅스를 110 대 102로 이겼고, 빌리 캐스퍼가 마스터스에서 54홀 후 208타로 선두를 달리고 있으며, 봄철 미식축구 훈련이 한창입니다. 오늘 소식은 이게 전부입니다. 여러분께 알려드릴 오늘의 업데이트된 계획은 다음과 같습니다. 유니폼은 
이제 곧 정전이 시작될 것 같습니다
Bene. Nella zona di atterraggio del Pacifico centrale, il tempo è buono. La copertura nuvolosa è di 
Panel 3: POWER AMPL to OFF. Inciden
... und jetzt schalten Sie Ihr FDAI ei
हाँ, चार्ली, ऐसा ही था, लेकिन एक ऑटो पैंतरेबाज़ी से दूसरी ऑटो पैंतरेबाज़ी में जाते समय, हमने नियंत्रण अपने
Du hast ihnen die Wahrheit gesagt. Fühl
네, 그리고 
ثم، في الصفحة 35، على الجانب الأيمن. يجب إضافة التعليق "صور ضوء البروج اختيارية" إلى كل شيء بدءًا من "التحكم بالمركبة الفضائية، تلقا
제가 올
Кажется, я теперь вижу, что фонарь всё ещё лежит в сумке для хранения. Эй, отличный снимок! Мы вас там видим. Наверное, это Нил и Майк. В любом случае, так и 
Gemini VI は
Roger. Seems to me since we know orbits so precisely, and know where the stars are so precisely, and the time of setting of a star or a planet to so very fine a degree, that this might be
쌍둥이자리 4호, RKV 외과의사. 책 
よし。DIYの水酸化リチウムボンベの交換は完了だ。ジョー、一つだけ違うのは、この段ボールのアーチが小さすぎて赤いホースの入口
यह सही है। फिर माइनस 
2-1 170. 3+40
ठीक है। मेरे पास आपके लिए कुछ अच्छी बातें हैं। मिटाने योग्य मेमोरी को पूरी तरह से खोलकर जांचा गया है, और ऐसा लगता है कि सब ठीक है। आपके द्वारा किए गए किसी भी कार्य का कोई प्रभाव नहीं पड़ा। एक चीज जिस पर संदेह हो सकता है, वह यह है कि यदि आपने डिस्प्ले पर पहुंचने पर किसी त्रुटि का उपयोग किया है, तो हो सकता है कि वह अविश्वसनीय हो, और वहां आपको W-मैट्रिक्स क
برج الجوزاء 4، هذه هيوستن. أقول إنها 1
ऑरोरा सेवन, यह इंडियन कैप कॉम है। हमारे सभी रेट्रोसीक्वे
Yes. They are
Bene. A 23 ore il totale è 1121, il quad A è 274, il quad Bravo è 286, il quad Charlie è 274, il quad Delta è 287, e le criocelle sono le seguenti: serbatoio H2 1, 83 percento; serbatoio H2 2, 86 percento; serbatoio O2 1, 87 percento; serbatoio O2 2, 
Going for the computer. Clock is reading about . We'll say. At we should pick up Muc
是的，戈尔多，所有保险丝开关的位置都和之前一样，我一个都没动过。引信已启动，自动反推已关闭。我使用的是电传操纵、自动和陀螺仪模式。所有“T”型手柄都已按下。
-4. Хорошо, я проверю. 
ठीक है। अगर नी
Zwillinge 4, Sie brauchen Ihre Körpertemperatur nicht oral zu messen. Dafür haben wir keine Zeit. Wir verzichten darauf. Fa
دعونا نتجاوز ذلك - لننتقل إلى النقط
ه
外も
알겠습니다. 제가 가지고 있는 건 그
D'accord, merci. C'est une des premières questions qui nous sont venues à l'esprit. Nous sommes prêts à effectuer u
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴입니다. 업링크 작업이 완료되었습니다. 컴퓨터는 이제
सब ठीक चल रहा है। - ज़रा रुकिए, मैं आपको डेल्टा-पी र
罗杰。我想我把你的一部分信息屏蔽掉了。反推之后，我们立刻达到全升力，在0.05g时，或者说在那个时候，我们把升力调
好的。好的。首先，总体原则是这些规则应该类似于模式 I 中止，但限制条件更严格。现在，我逐条讲解，方便你抄写。好的。如果出现以下任何情况，你都应该关闭发动机：推力监控读数低于 77%；推进剂罐压力（即入口压力）机载读数低于 160；燃料与氧气压力差大于 25 psi（这需要地面呼叫通知）；姿态误差超过正负 10 度（启动瞬态除外）；姿态速率限制为每秒正负 10 度。如果出现以下任何情况，你也应该关闭发
ईगल, ह्यूस्टन। इस म
Да. Я начинала 
حسنًا. لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 الحدث الأبرز، والعالم ينتظر هبوطها اليوم حوالي الساعة 11:49 صباحًا بتوقيت هيوستن. في واشنطن، صاغ مُصلحو الضرائب في مجلس النواب بندًا يجعل من المستحيل على الأفراد الأثرياء التهرب من ضريبة الدخل كليًا من خلال الاستثمارات المعفاة من الضرائب أو الإعفاءات الخاصة. وبموجب الاقتراح الذي اعتمدته مبدئيًا لجنة الطرق والوس
好的。跳过下一个，我们要将逆变器 1 交流 1 关闭，再跳过两个，
L'analyse préliminaire des données indique que le moteur central S-II a vibré avec une amplitude légèrement supérieure à celle observée lors des vols précédents, et ce, environ 160 secondes après le début de sa combustion. Ces vibrations ont entraîné une chute de pression dans la chambre de combustion, déclenchant l'arrêt du moteur central par les deux
조, 초
그리고 제게서 정장 전원을 빼주시
Я побежал обратно, чтобы посмотреть, что я смогу увидеть в сканирующем телескопе. Сейчас там всё выглядит довольно мрачно. Возможно, нам прид
Balance-Pärchen, aus. Sehr ruhige Fahrt. Da ist noch das... was jetzt herausrag
Ro
了解。我々が読んでいるのはそれとは少し違います。待機
好的。在225号面板上，我们需要断开会合应答器飞行总线断路器和S波段调频发射机/飞行总线断路
Halten Sie sich
Roger. Je vais com
नहीं। मैंने ऐसा करने से बचने की कोशिश की है। अगर मैं सूट का ताप
네, 13번입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 참고로 말
15 حسناً. عمري 15 عاماً - كان ذلك متأخراً بحوالي 3 ثوانٍ على
W
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Wir habe
По сообщению Associated Press, американцы наблюдали за рождественской мессой Папы Павла в Италии, а европейцы увидели рождественское поздравление с «Аполлона-8» через самый мощный из ко
Il a fallu environ 30 minutes aux 
ठीक है। मैं सामान्य आवाज़ में बात करता हूँ। शायद - या यह बात पहले से ही
روجر. الأمر الأساسي هو إيجاد ط
Хорошо. Я так п
無重力ってどんな感じ？頭が変になったりする人、
روجر، نود تفريغ خزان مياه الصرف الصحي لديك إلى 25%؛ ونفضل القيام بذلك قبل منتصف الدورة، لأغراض المتابعة. لذا، إذا كان ذلك مناسب
알겠습니다.
Das war's daz
Right now, we're in nose-to-the-ground type attitude, such that I don't believe the ground stations are able to read us. We have heard several calls cut in and out for us. We're going to stay in this attitude though for a while 
Роджер, Скотт. Понимаю. Извините. Только
로저.
收到，吉姆。我们随时准备进行运载火箭系统简报，你们准备好了都可以。
And, 1
जब तक आप वह काम कर रहे हैं, मुझे कैमरा ला
حسنًا يا جو. يبدو أننا عبرنا إلى خليج المكسيك هنا، وهناك شبه جزيرة أو جزيرة في الأسفل. لا أعرف إن كنت
S-6は
रॉजर।
目前舱体运行良好。250（逆变器）温度为132度，150（逆变器）温度为……5。备用（逆变器）温度为120度……推进器……向右，向左超过100度。俯仰角（推进器）为105度。俯仰角（推进器）为100度。舱内热交换器（设置
H
روجر. لا بأس بذلك يا جيم
Roger; esatto, Fred-o. E ora vorremmo fornirti una configurazione per collegare il tuo vettore di stato al carico target. Qui
アポロ11号、こちらはヒューストンです。カットオフを示し、
Okay. Beim nächsten Mal wirst du sie wahrscheinlich l
ऐसा लग रहा है कि लगभग 1500 बिखरी हुई, ऊँची बिखरी हुई लहरें हैं। और अभी भी इनकी ऊँचाई 3 से 6 फु
250वां f:8 पर, मुझे लगत
Roger.
نعم.
Ich werde jetzt ein
Роджер, Аполлон-11.
Я также думаю, что когда нам придётся вернуться туда, мы... возьмём плавучий контейнер
Mi sento c
Hello, Columbia. Houston. We will not come up on the rel
On dirait vraiment que le vaisseau spatial dégaze, car dès qu'un petit morceau de poussière ou autre chose passe à proximité, il se d
يبدو أن أحد هذه الماسحات الضوئية يحتاج إلى راحة بين الحين والآخر. أ
休斯顿，阿波罗
모하비 사막은 어떻게 보이나요? 
Mentre puntiamo verso l'alto in questa direzione, vediamo il Sole che passa dai nostri finestrini laterali e, naturalmente, da uno dei nostri finestrini in questo momento vediamo la Terra. Ora, proprio dietro il mio finestrino, ovviamente, abbiamo il Sole, perché il Sole illumina le carte stellari che vediamo. Questa linea rappresenta il piano dell'eclittica e queste linee, verticali, rappresentano il nostro sistema di riferimento che la sonda sta utilizzando in questo momento. Man mano che ci avviciniamo alla Luna, questa diventerà gradualmente sempre più grande e alla fine si troverà dentro - eclisserà il Sole mentre le passiamo dietro, mentre ci avvicin
Controllo di Iwo Jima, q
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। आपको इस संदेश का जवाब देने की आवश्यकता नहीं है, लेकिन डॉक्टरों का कह
そして、13番、ヒューストン。回避行動は正常だったようです。液体酸素の投下時刻
I'v
헌츠빌 통신 
D'a
Questo è il primo rapporto mete
Okay. The thrusters... and the... outside... and they hardly look like they.
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन से ग्वायमास ह
يا إلهي، تلك المياه المتدفقة م
Nous pouvons très c
了解しました。ご都合がよろしければ、廃水排出を残り5%まで行いたいと思います。今回の廃水排出が完了すれば、次回の廃水排出は約25時間後になります。以上で
Хорошо. Я нажму «Указать ретро-ориентацию», разделы 1 «Платформа — скорость орбиты», 
روجر، يا صديقي السابع. لقد سمعتك بوضوح تام على جهاز HF أيضًا
잠시 기다려
Okay. Ich glaube, ich habe gelesen, dass du bereit bist. Ach ja, Kopfhörer. Du brauchst dafür nur ein zweites Paar Kartuschen aus dem Kommandomodul. Dann klebst du an den Seiten jeder neuen Kartusche, nahe dem oberen Rand, einen Streifen Klebeband (das graue Klebeband mit der Klebeseite nach außen). Anschließend schneidest du ein Stück Pappe in vier Quadrate (ca. 5–7,5 cm Seitenlänge), biegst diese im rechten Winkel, um die Ecken zu stützen, und befestigst sie am Klebeb
حسناً يا جاك. يمكنني تأكيد الخطوة الثانية. لقد اكتملت
حسنًا. قواطع دائرة تجاوز عرض الوقود مغلقة... 
Роджер. Также совету
... meine sind... Hey, ich hab dir ein sa
Хорошо, Джо. Что касается новостей, Джим хотел бы немного подождать, и я хочу обратиться к ФАО с просьбой, если он согласится, в течение дня, когда мы получим обновленный план полета с теми мероприятиями, которые мы договорились сделать необязательными во время пребывания на лунной орбите, и с теми немногими мероприятиями, которые мы собирались исключить. Кажется, я забыл и оставил эту карточку в ко
Roger. Und ich habe noch ein paar andere Dinge, Mike. Wir müssen jetzt den Ladevorgang von Batterie B beenden. Außerdem zieht das Wetter an unserem Ziellandepunkt wegen vereinzelter Gewitter auf. Wir wollen nicht in ein Gewitter geraten, deshalb verlegen wir den Zielpunkt nach vorne – Korrektur: nach hinten – auf 1500 Seemeilen, um die Aufwindkont
Avez-vous quelque chose d'important 
«Ап
알겠습니다. 제 생각에는 이 냉간 열처리 방법은 차량 내부에 열교환기가 있다는 전제하에 설계된 것 같습니다. 만약 차량 내부에 열교환기가 없다면 어떻게 해야
良い
Хорошо. И не забудьте посмотреть через
30-1 109. 2+19. 13 00 13. 4+52. 9+40. 31-1 84 arrière sera 42. 2+20. 9+54. 14 34 22. 3+54. 9+18. 32-1 84 arrière sera 56. 2+20. 1+11. 16 08 16. 3+05. 8+53. 33-1 84 arrière sera 68. 2+20. 1+27. 17 42 15. 2+37. 8+49. 29-BRAVO 84. 50 arrière. 2+20. 1+03. 12 16 35. 12+08. 30-BRAVO 120.
Ещё бы. На спортивной странице не так уж много активности. UCLA лидирует в обоих баскетбольных рейтингах. Если у вас есть какой-то конкретный вопрос, дайте мне знать, и я скажу, входят ли они в десятку лучших в каком-либо из рейтингов. Что касается Севера — завтра состоится студенческий матч всех звёзд, — Север немного опережает Юг. Ара Парсегян — тренер команды Севера, и у него работают шесть игроков из Notre Dame, так что о
G
هل يقرأ أحد؟ هل يقرأ أحد أورورا سفن
حسنًا. إذا فهمتُك بشكل صحيح، فهذا يمنحني مجالًا للمناورة عند اكت
Okay. And, Houston, can we proceed with our powerdown now? Getting the ball back off and lamp, et ceter
了解しました。PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50、マイナス00021、182 287 000、プラス56919。中止、10分未満、105 12 30.00。中止、10分以上、103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00。プラス12なし: 102 44 27.00。プラス01223、マイナス全球、プラス01889 01520、プラス00110 0
إنها درجة صوت سلبية
أفضّل عدم القيام بذلك الآن
V
Okay. This is a 9, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 34188, minus 01353, plus 00780 180 008 001, November Alfa, plus 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, down 131, left 28, plus 0758, minus 16500 12987 36277; primary star Sirius, secondary Rigel, 129 155 010
好的。好的。首先，总体原则是这些规则应该类似于模式 I 中止，但限制条件更严格。现在，我逐条讲解，方便你抄写。好的。如果出现以下任何情况，你都应该关闭发动机：推力监控读数低于 77%；推进剂罐压力（即入口压力）机载读数低于 160；燃料与氧气压力差大于 25 psi（这需要地面呼叫通知）；姿态误差超过正负 10 度（启动瞬态除外）；姿态速率限制为每秒正负 10 度。如果出现以下任何情况，你也应该关闭发动机：发动机万向节故障、国际空间站故障、程序报警、CES DC，以及切换逆
This is Friendship Seven. Several times I have felt that I had a partially stuck thruster or one that was just partly operating in pitch down and just then again I had a pitch up rate going and all at once I felt a down thrust and it pitched down on me. Again there, it repeated again that time
了解。エリア4-4 15
Понял. Начиная с минус 1 минуты, вычеркните «MASTER ARM, ON». Минус 35 секунд, вычеркните первые две строки. На минус 10 секундах измените это на «Минус 9 секунд»; таким образом, на «Минус 9 секунд» будет «Ручная очистка». На 2 секундах вычеркните «MODE, FREE» и «ACA out of detent». После «IGNITION», на плюс 1 секунде, вычеркните «Terminate Ulla
Roger. Ti capiamo. Questa dovrebbe essere la tua ultima volta. Non v
ठीक है
Roger. Noch sechs Minuten. Ic
Anfangs verhinderte die Operation mit dem Treibstoffablass den geplanten sofortigen Beginn unserer Beobachtungen, da wir ein weiteres Ausweichmanöver durchführen mussten. Der Ablass des Treibstoffs verursachte eine enorme Menge an Pseudosternen in dem Gebiet, was eine optische Kalibrierung praktisch unmöglich machte. Die von uns entwickelte Methode erwies sich als wenig effektiv. Schließlich verwendete ich die Methode, in den Weltraum einzudringen, Sirius, unseren hellsten Stern, anzusteuern, die Achse und den Zapfen zu bergen und das Raumschiff dann zu Sirius zu fliegen, um diese für die optische Kalibrierung zu verwenden, was wir später auch taten. Bezüglich der Lichtstreuung scheint es, dass wir in fast jeder Lage während unserer passiven Temperaturregelung Lichtstreuung im Scannenden Teleskop messen. Sie äußert sich hauptsächlich in Form eines breiten Lichtbandes quer durch die Mitte des Teleskops, etwa 10 Grad in beide Richtungen von Null. Es ist sehr schwierig, Sterne in diesem Bereich zu sehen. Die Neuausrichtungen verliefen erfolgreich. Ich konnte den Stern im Sextanten für die Ausrichtung anvisieren, aber ich konnte den Stern, den wir beispielsweise in Fällen wie Regor oder Menkent im Sucherfernrohr verwendeten, nicht identifizieren. Die erste Sternbeobachtung der Erde zeigte einen sehr undeutlichen Horizont. Es schien jedoch eine recht scharfe Linie zwischen dem vermeintlichen Erdhorizont und der Atmosphäre zu geben. Der Landmarken-Sichtlinienfilter schien die Horizontbestimmung zu erleichtern. Der Horizont zwischen dem Weltraum und der Obergrenze der Atmosphäre ist sehr verschwommen und undeutlich, und er ist nur schwer zu nutzen. Wie bereits erwähnt, erscheint der Raum um den Mond bei naher Sonne manchmal nicht dunk
好的。我给你的第一个例子是加44的机动。我从左边一栏开始读。加44，/ 62970，减162，加129，加00197，加全零，加607 01 180 133，
휴스턴, 아폴로 8호입니다. 
حسنًا. أعتقد أنني قرأت أنك جاهز. نسيت... سماعات الأذن. الأمر بسيط، كل ما عليك فعله هو إخراج زوج ثانٍ من الخراطيش من وحدة التحكم، ووضع شريط لاصق رمادي اللون، مع توجيه الجانب اللاصق للخارج، حول جوانب كل خرطوشة جديدة بالقرب من الأعلى، ثم أخذ قطعة من ورق مقوى وتقطيعها إلى أربعة مربعات، طول ضلع كل منها حوالي 5 إلى 
프렌드십 세븐, 여기는 카노 캡 콤입니다. 잘 읽히지 않는 것 같으니 잔지바르로 넘기겠습니
क
わかった。ゴールドストーンか
罗杰
لم ي
Роджер. Мне нужно отрегулировать поток кислорода в этом приборе до шести десятых фунта в час, но поскольку этот датчик работает неправильно, не могли бы вы сообщить мне обновленное значе
いいえ、しかしビル・シェイファーについてのあなた
في الحقيقة، سأضع خاصت
Роджер, Колумбия. Вот и мы с 11. G&N: 37200, минус 060, плюс 047, 098 05 2422, плюс 41448, плюс 03719, минус 02422. Крен NA, тангаж 020, остальная часть PAD NA. Установленн
Okay. Wir haben unser Manöver abgeschlossen. Wir befinden uns in unserer breiten Totzone, und Nunki ist nahe am oberen Rand meiner Anzeige. Antares scheint momentan eher in Richtung Zentrum zu sein. Wir befinden uns jedoch weiterhin in unserer breiten T
좋습니다. 첫 번째는 S-밴드 일반 모드 음성, 끄기; 두 번째는 S-밴드 일반 모드, 끄기; 세 번째는 S-밴드 일반 모드 레인징 
알겠
Bonjour Guaymas. Allez-
Schritt 41 Bravo auf Seite E-9 Alfa. Wenn Sie sich entsche
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन से होते हुए हन
ओडिस
好的。下次我戴上帽子，就能听
Roger, nous avons bien reçu votre message et pris note de vos remarques concernant la possibilité pour notre site distant de communiquer avec vous. Une partie de nos difficultés réside dans la connexion à ce site. Nous essaierons d'établir cette connexion dès 
大丈夫。私は…今はプ
Ok. La pill
没错，而且，在那一页上——根据我们上
로저. 알겠습니다, 버즈. 지상 점검 목록에 몇 가지 변경 사항이 있습니다. 기본적으로, 마지막으로 사령선의 위치를 ​​추적해 주시길 바랍니다. 즉, P57 지점에서요. 그리고 나머지 점검을 계속 진행하시면 됩니다. 나머지는 점검 목록의 몇 가지 사소한 변경 사항입니다. 가장 중요한 것은 상승 중에는 랑데부 레이더를 켜지 않도록 하는 것입니다. 이렇게 하면 하강 중에 발생하는 프로그램 경보의 과부하를 줄일 수 있을 것으로 예상됩
Ricevuto. Accensione a 13 più 25 più 52; Delta-V, 09 piedi al secondo; 00 più 11 secondi; imbardata 0, bec
Jim, j'ai copié 63 et 64, qui, je pense, étaient le
Ok. Poco sotto i 13. E solo per tua informazione, abbiamo persone che lavorano su diversi argomenti. Stiamo lavorando sulla rotta intermedia in arrivo per determinare il nostro sistema di controllo e come gestirlo con il sistema di controllo che selezioniamo, cosa dovremmo fare riguardo all'allineamento. Abbiamo l'LMS e un paio di equipaggi impegnati a lavorarci. E stiamo anche lavorando sul nostro ingresso, come e quando dovremmo attivarlo. E stiamo lavorando sullo stato dei sistemi. Domani a un certo punto avremo un controllo del MAIN BUS B, quindi abbiamo un sacco di persone che lavorano duramente qui e ho alcune 
Meine Güt
Роджер. Вот что ты мог бы уточнить, у нас тут кое-что произошло... Хо
Хорошо. Кажется, нам удалось зафиксировать положение на протяжении последней — ну, примерно минуты. Стрелка... колебалась вверх и в
Die Einrichtung zur Überprüfung des O2-Durchflusssensors ist abgeschlossen
لا. بمجرد أن انقطع البث، ا
이거 예열하는 데 얼마나 걸리나요? 3시간 정도요
حسنًا
Roger. I have the Computer Switch ON and the Power Switch on IGS. Let 
パワーダウン（判読不能）状態でも、まだ 11 アンペア弱しか消費していないようです。1 番機では 10 アンペア、2 番機では 11 アンペア弱です。テザー、つまり外側のハッチにあるテザーもしくは臍帯拘束具の位置のせいで、宇宙船前方での自由テザーの空気力学的制約による船外活動（EVA）作業はかなり困難でした。そのエリアで作業している時はいつでも、テザーが端に達すると私は引き戻され、その反動で宇宙船上方、アダプター セクションの方へ運ばれていました。そのため、窓の上方で操縦している間、私は視界から消え、その後宇宙船後方へと戻されていました。宇宙船の前部に出るために、私は絶えず自分自身を引き上げ続けなければなりませ
Ok
찰리, 난 지금 
Roger. Rev 27, Apollo 
네. 좋습니다. 제가 먼저 해야 할 네다섯 가지는 3번 패널의 BAT CHARGE를 OFF로, AC 인버터 2를 OFF로, 5번 패널의 MAIN BUS TIE를 BAT A/C ON으로, 250번 패널의 CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POS
Bene. I successivi uno, due, tre, quattro, cinque, sei, se
Les orientations étaient tout à fait exactes, à plus ou 
몇 가지 테스트를 더 진행해 보고 싶습니다. 전반적으로 특별한 문제는 없는 것으로 판단됩니
Gémeau
Tu as l'air un peu dérangé, mais je te comprends. Sache que nous avons relâché la pression de notre système de refroidissement ext
Roger, du bist immer noch
Ich bin wieder im G-Feld. Die Fluglage is
حسنًا، ممتاز. تحت عنوان "التخزين النهائي"، أول بند مُدرج في السطر 36، الصفحة 1-5، هو "البصريات". وإذا كنت ترغب في البدء بالتخزين، فنفضل عدم
في الوقت الحقيقي والاستح
Vous regardez aussi à travers un peu de buée sur les vitres
まだ目の前で滑り出していま
Roger. La combustion verticale est 
그게 뭐라고요
ठीक है। मैं फिर से ज़मी
적어도 저는 그렇게 설정해 놓았습니다. Eag
Okay, anytime OAMS is grea
まあ、もしこれがもう必要なくなったら、あれはしまっておくと思う。明日はシステムが君のもの
Sono in modalità bicono e la visiera è chiusa. Tutti gli altri oggett
11番、ヒューストン。地上の状況は良好です。現在、171号線と40号線沿いに排水が行われる
OK, un instant. Je range ce crayon. Je suis en configuration chimpanzé. La capsule vole à merveille. Tous les propulseurs fonctionnent correctement. Le gyroscope est normal. Le commutateur de manœuvre est désactivé. Tous les systèmes sont au vert; et je surveille actuellement la température du
У тебя отлично получается, Майк. У тебя 
好的。电压为 39.
了解。操縦モードは手動、ジャイロはケージ、
Houston, Apollo 8. L'ultima serie di segni non è valida. Ignora ciò c
Okay. We've got ou
R
He was shaving a little bit ago. He might have just let it slip. H
Roger. Capisco l'impressione generale di umidità che si è creata nel tubo di carotaggio. Prossima domanda: abbiamo copiato i vostri commenti prima della descrizione generale dell'area. Ci chiedevamo se qualcuno di voi avrebbe bisogno di una descrizione più lunga o più dettagliata del riassunto generale della geologia dell'area. 
휴스턴, 아
现在应该能看到跟踪灯了——就是这样——看起来没有……但它并没有——
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन।
Houston, Apollo 11. En marquant cette étoile, j'obtiens un NOUN 87 deux fois de suite sur cinq boules, c'est donc suffis
سأؤجل استخدام جهاز الإرسال. أعتقد أن الساعة تشير إلى حوالي الساعة التي شغّلت بها الج
Okay. Ja. Tatsächlich; der rote Schlauch des K
好的。来自英国乔德雷尔班克天文台，美联社报道：英国乔德雷尔班克大型射电望远镜于美国东部时间今天下午5点49分停止接收来自苏联无人登月探测器“月球15号”的信号。一位发言人表示，“月球15号”飞船似乎“已经飞越月球”。另一则消息称：“我们认为它没有着陆，”天文台台长伯纳德·洛弗尔爵士的发言人说道。华盛顿合众国际社报道：副总统斯皮罗·T·阿格纽呼吁在2000年前将人类送上火星，但民主党领导人回应称，必须优先考虑地球上的需求。阿格纽是周三阿波罗11号发射时在场的最高级别政府官员，他当时说“依我之见，我们应该在本世纪末之前将人类送上火星”，显然他当时是在代表自己，而不是代表尼克松政府。德克萨斯州拉雷多，美联社报道：新拉雷多的移民官员周三宣布，除非嬉皮士洗澡理发，否则将被拒绝发放旅游签证入境墨西哥。新拉雷多墨西哥移民局局长胡贝托·卡萨拉斯表示，墨西哥城、阿卡普尔科和其他热门旅
وبعد ذلك، سنبدأ شحن البطارية، وسيتعين علينا معرفة مت
鹰，休斯顿。你能简单数一下吗——这个模式？
월리, 네, 바로 여기 6시 끝부분입니다. 방금 보신 입자들의 상대적인 움직임에 대
我们想再确认一下
ولإفادة من قد يتساءل أين ينام جيم، سيكون من الصعب قليلاً تثبيت أرجوحته هنا الآن مع فتح الباب، لكنها تمتد جانبياً في هذا الاتجاه، من الأم
Роджер, Чарли. Хочу проинформировать в
わかりました。これはロッド・ローズとセント・クリストファーズ教会の皆さん、そして世界中の人々へ捧げます。神よ、人間の失敗にもかかわらず、あなたの愛をこの世界に見出すことができる視力を私たちに与えてください。私たちの無知と弱さにもかかわらず、善良さ
حسنًا يا فريدو، عرض جيد. في الصف الرابع، بدءًا من: م
13, Houston. Vous utiliserez la commande m
Tha
रॉजर, ये फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। मैं आपको अपना समय बता देता हूँ, मेरे कैप्सूल का बीता हुआ समय 04 प्लस 31 प्लस 35 है। 2, 3, 4, मार्क। क्या आप इसे तुरंत केप को बता देंगे? म
هيوستن،
रॉजर। नील, आपके 'नो गो' कार्ड के लिए मिशन नियमों में कुछ बदलाव हैं। एपीएस/ईंधन और तापमान दबाव कार्ड में एक छोटा सा बदलाव है, और द्वितीयक रेडिएटर रिसाव जांच की प्
Ora, il cratere che si trova al centro dello schermo è Webb. Lo osserveremmo dall'alto circa 6 minuti prima della discesa di potenza. Ha un fondo relativamente piatto, e si possono vedere forse due o tre crateri sul fondo, sulla parete occidentale, la parete che ora è più vicina alla telecamera. Vicino al fondo 
Ce serait bien si vous pouviez jeter un coup d'œil à tous les disjoncteu
Capisco cosa intendi. Ho dormito un po' prima, 
프랭크, 이제 사진이 나왔어. 꿈틀
In the beginning, God created the Heaven and the Earth. And the Earth was without form and void, and darkness was upon the face of the deep. And the spirit of God moved upon the face of the waters, and God said, "let ther
是的，我们之前已经讨论过这个问题了，乔。当然，当我们近距离观察它时，它也做出了规避动作，这一点也
연소 후 잔
C'è Giove e c'è Formalhaut al centro della finestra
はい、そうです。お願いで
Bene. Ora, a circa 105:05, c'è un "." che dovrebbe essere spostato verso l'alto, a 105, e sotto di esso, 
Это 
Je sens le décollage
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। नहीं, मेरे पास नहीं है; इस क
わかりました。ありがとうございます。ジャイロの最大ドリフトは、X-ジャイロで毎時0.03度です。PIPAではY-PIPAが最大で毎秒0.006フィートなので…微調整中です。ジャイロと加速度計の
لقد تلقينا إشعار
了解、ジム。発射台プラス15番、015:00、デルタVT 5622、経度マイナス
روجر. سنبدأ بأخبار العالم. شهدت ليلة عيد الميلاد إشادة واسعة برواد فضاء أبولو 8 الأمريكيين، وتعبيرًا عن الآمال في تعاون دولي في استكشاف الفضاء، وذلك مع بث رسائل التهنئة العالمية بينما كانت المركبة الفضائية الصغيرة تدور حول القمر. حتى في العالم الشيوعي، كان هناك حماس كبير لأول رحلة بشرية إلى القمر. في موسكو، استذكر العالم السوفيتي أناتولي بيسارانوف كيف تبادلت بلاده والولايات المتحدة المعرفة الفضائية سابقًا، وتوقع أن تؤدي رحلة أبولو 8 إلى مزيد من التعاون. في كوبا، أعادت إذاعة هافانا بث برنامج صوت أمريكا لإبلاغ مستمعيها بخطاب أبولو 8. وقال مسؤولو صوت أمريكا إنها المرة الأولى التي تُبث فيها أي من برامج الوكالات الأمريكية عبر إذاعة هافانا. تابعت تشيكوسلوفاكيا رحلة القمر عبر تغطية تلفزيونية واسعة النطاق؛ وفي بودابست، المجر، لم يكن الناس يتحدثون إلا عن هذا الحدث في القطارات والحافلات. في العالم غير الشيوعي، حبس موظفو المكاتب والمتسوقون أنفاسهم بينما كانت المركبة الفضائية تُجهز للانطلاق نحو الأرض. أشاد الفرنسيون في الشوارع بالخبرة الأمريكية والإنجاز الفضائي، وهتف بعض المشاهدين الذين تابعوا صور القمر على التلفزيون "رائع!". وفي لندن، اكتظت المتاجر والحانات بحشود من المتسوقين لمشاهدة صور فوهات القمر على التلفزيون. وأوضح برنارد لوفيل، أبرز علماء الفلك الفضائيين في بريطانيا، والذي كان ينتقد مشروع أبولو 8 حتى أسابيع قليلة مضت بحجة أن ال
ठीक है। बर्न के लिए, हम गाइडेंस कंट्रोल, मोड कंट्रोल, एटीट्यूड होल्ड, एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल स्विच का उपयोग करेंगे। रोल पल्स, पिच पल्स और यॉ मोड कंट्रोल भी उपलब्ध होंगे। हम पिच और रोल के लिए कंट्रोल का उपयोग करेंगे। इंजन गिम्बल बंद रहेगा; हम 10 प्रतिशत थ्रस्ट का उपयोग करेंगे; हम इसे मैन्युअल रूप से शुरू और बंद कर
Jim, battery A is charged now. Whenever you want to unhook
حسنًا. لدينا VERB 48 in و VER
Давайте посмотрим на мир спорта. Пока вы были заняты на днях, Джо Намат и комиссар футбола Пит Розелл объявили, что «Бродвейский Джо» согласился продать свою долю в ресторане Bachelors III и перейти в «Нью-Йорк Джетс». Джо прибыл сегодня в тренировочный лагерь «Джетс» и провел свою первую тренировку. Несколько других игроков «Джетс», которые вместе с Джо бойкотировали тренировки, также прибыли. А Дэви Хилл из Джексона, штат Мичиган, выиграл свой третий крупный турнир по гольфу за три старта на прошлой неделе. Он выиграл Philadelphia Classic. Хилл выиграл четыре турнира в этом году и является лидер
Хорошо. Отвечая на вопросы о зарядке аккумулятора, я рассчитал, что он должен быть полностью заряжен. Однако, как и в случае с вентиляционным отверстием, зарядка должна производиться так же бы
روجر. بالنسبة للنجمة رقم 40 الت
음, 짐
Ok, Sigma Seven. Qui
Roger. Abbiamo una richiesta da fare a Jim: distanziare i s
友谊七号，友
3点5
Ретроспективы отсоединяются, и Эд говорит,
이봐, 지금 블랙 크루와 함께하는 새로운 캡콤 게임이 나왔는데,
«Аполлон-11», э
아폴로 8호, 아폴로 8호. 지상 관측 자료에 따르면 주 증발기가 말라버린 것 같습니다. 가능하시다면 재점검을 시도해 보시는 것
Apollo 8, Houston. 
ヒューストン、DIRECT O2バ
ونود أيضًا معرفة ما 
Aquarius, all of your pads will be coming up in about 3-1/2 hours, at minus 06:30. And one thing we wa
- - قرأنا لكم خمسة يا كولومبيا. لقد هبط في قاعدة ترانكويليتي. النسر في تران
Roger. Nous observons le centre de la Terre depuis le vaisseau spatial dans l'est de l'océan Pacifique. Nous n'avons pas pu distinguer visuellement l'archipel d'Hawaï, mais nous voyons clairement la côte ouest de l'Amérique du Nord: les États-Unis, la vallée de San Joaquin, la Sierra Nevada, la Basse-Californie et le Mexique jusqu'à Acapulco, ainsi que la péninsule du Yucatán. On aperçoit également l'Amérique centrale et la
好的。在启动步骤中，第 2 行（或步骤 2）显示“正在闪烁 3700，按回车键”。杰克，我们要用到这个功能的时候，是当你刚启动电脑，它的状态向量是几个小时前的状态向量时。所以我们要按回车键来停止积分
Ro
Ricevuto. La temperatura di scarico della tuta, la temperatura del vapore è 61 [gradi]. L
D'accord. Puissan
D'accord. L'objectif est un péricynthion, plus 2 heures d'interruption: +1633,0, -0014,5, -0751,5; apogée non applicable, périgée à +0020,5; 1797,7, 8:35, 268, 264, +16410, -00145, -07338. Non applicable. J'ai deux angles de trim d
حسنًا. الخطوة الرابعة هي "التحكم في الوضع: الانحراف، إلى ال
Хьюстон, Аполлон
언제 없어지는지 어떻게 아는지 모르겠네요. 아마 그게 다
你必须往右边走。你走的
마이크, 실내가 좀 습해지는 것 같아요. 재생음이 들리네요. 실내가 꽤 습한 것 같습니다. 실내 온도 조절 장치를 자동 모드로 다시 
Eagle, Houston. Request abort stage, reset,... PROP reset, and mode control to 
Oh, that 
现
안
حسناً، لقد حص
Роджер. Плюс 3,3 к. И мы копируе
バハ・カリフォルニアはどうですか、バ
Gemini 4, Gemini 4
매우 좋
在你执行这些操作的同时，指挥飞行员能否给我提供一些关于助推器、距离、你需要做些什么才能靠近到足以看到它以及灯光工作情况的信
버즈, 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 제가 보기엔 상황이 꽤 좋아 보입니다. 저기 열대 수렴선
Okay, Vance, ich bin bereit, die Änderungen aus
体調は良好です。飛行を続けてください。機体は安定しています。窓に地球、空、地平線が見えます。
うわー！そうだね、10人のクルーに投票する
罗杰。我这边一切正常。我感觉很好，正打算关闭1号舱门
Apollo 8, Houston. Pr
Роджер, Аврора семь
Bene. Spegniamo il riscaldatore in linea sulla cella a combustibile 1. Procediamo con lo spegnimento, subroutine sp
نعم
这是Sigma Seven，展示的是日出时分倒飞，偏航角90度的效果。最直观的感受就是你的飞行方向，就像透过火车车窗向外看一样。你会看到地貌在你眼前掠过，各种各样的云朵从我身边掠过，正好位于与飞行器纵轴成90度角的平
Ja, ich habe es verstanden
Да, Джи
روجر. طول 
Vogliamo davvero utilizzarlo negli scat
罗杰。如果你愿意的话，在填写表格准备参赛作品时，请放慢速度，我们会尽量从这
现在你能看到
Bene. Abbiamo completato il dump e il registratore è tornato a te. Puoi usarlo come preferisci. Potremmo volerlo scaricare di nuovo, e in tal caso andremo avanti e useremo le stesse informazioni, a meno che tu non abbia qualcos'altro che desideri specificamente aggiungere in seguito. Ascoltando la qualità della voce, sembra dav
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Siete i GO per la messa in scena
You know how many times I screwed up on my a
नहीं। ह
مع اقتراب 
Yes. Jim's sleeping now, and Jack and I
Friendship Seven, I have no sensations at all from weightlessness except very pleasant. No ill effects at all, I'm not sick; feel fine. I have had no, no I've run the head checks, the head movements and have no problem with that. I've run the oculogyric check and have no problem wi
Hallo aus Houston. Ihre Zinssätze sehen sehr stabil aus. Es scheint, als wären Ihre Zinssätze hier vollständig gedämpft. Soweit wir das beur
Sie kommen jetzt un
रॉजर। थोड़ी देर में हमारे पास अखबार आ रहा है; हम आपको बाद में कुछ औ
저는 아주 편안합니다. 정말 완벽히 편안해요. 슈트 통풍구 온도는 지금
Le contrôle par relais avec le canon était excellent en lacet et en tangage. Le contrôle du roulis était moins bon, mais grâce au canon, je pouvais sélectionner un point précis sur le vaiss
罗杰，休斯顿。输入如下：中太平洋，357 152 359 267，加 0813，减 16503 066 36221 647 121
Roger. This is Friendship Seven, controlling manually on fly-by-wire, having no trouble controlling. Very smooth and easy; controls very nicely. Fuses are still the same on the left panel. Squib is, Squib is armed. Auto Retrojettison is off. is fly-by-wire, auto, gyro normal. All fuel, all "T" handles are in, Retro Dela
범위 측정값 110. 자세는 볼에서 약 55도 정도 벗어나 있습니다. 범위는 13.
Apollo 8, Houston. Tous nos experts analysent vos données. Les premières impressions sont très positives et n
Geht auf NIEDRIG; e
Anelli di prov
Ok, Fred. Credo che tu abbia capito. Non ho copiato complet
Apollo 11, Houston. Basierend auf unseren Beobachtungen seit der Mittellinie zeigen wir einen Gammawert von -6,57 an. Dies ist jedoch vorläufig, und wir gehen davon aus, dass sich die Position nach weiterer Beobachtung stabilisieren wird und wir sie präzise in den Korridor einfädeln können. Sie befindet sich etwa in der Mitte des Korridors; alles sieht gut aus. Wir werden Ihnen in ein paar Stunden, bevor Sie schlafen gehen, die Eintrittsinformationen (PAD) zukommen lassen. Und von unseren Kollegen aus der Öffentlichkeitsarbeit gibt es neben Ihrem Flug noch ein paar weitere Schlagzeilen. Sie dominieren weiterhin die Nachrichten. Es gibt jedoch noch einige andere interessante Dinge für Sie. Wie ich bereits erwähnt habe, wurde das All-Star-Spiel wegen Regens abgesagt. Es wird morgen stattfinden. Präsident Nixon wird es jedoch nicht wie geplant besuchen können. Wir halten Sie über die Ergebnisse auf dem Laufenden. Und auch die Wettervorhersage ist gut für Sie. Unsere Prognose sieht gut aus für das Bergungsgebiet; es sollte dort draußen sehr schön sein. Präsident Nixon, der sich auf den Flug zur Begrüßung Ihrer Rückkehr vorbereitete, sagte vorau
关于书本，我认为我们应该更加注意所使用的环扣类型。我们已经遇到过两三次打不开的情况，而且书页也容易撕裂，无法固定在书里。我们应该考虑对环扣连接的孔洞进行加固。水枪末端的小喷嘴（用来出水的）会卡在“出”的位置，就像模拟器上那样，即使松开扳机，水也
乔，你打算全程不用宇航服
Avant, on pensait qu'il était impossible de maîtrise
هذا صحيح يا جاك. هل أنت مستع
Roge
Siamo in OMNI -
了解。バンク角00度、RNマイナスRPプラス107度、バンク角44度、RNマイナスRP0度、バンク角
ロジャー、こちらフレンドシップセブン。タイムを報告します。カプセルの経過時間は、私の
分かり
Yes. Ye
Das ist bestätigt. Okay. Reihe 3, unter TREIBER:
알겠습니다. 몇 시
2, /: 46427, 마이너스 053, 플러스 141, 마이너스 01350, 플러스 0000, 플러스 0000 000 175 358 00607, 플러스 00606 01350 009 01265 02 31
И я вижу лучи, исходящие из Блейз Пикеринг. Мы приближаемся к нашей начальной точке приземления P-1, которую я постараюсь осмотреть. Имейте в виду, что круглое окно, люк, полностью покрыто льдом; мы не можем им воспользоваться; мы с Биллом делим окно дл
Okay. Lo terremo qui per due, Ken. Frank 
سنمضي قدماً. إليك
알겠습니다. 그럼, 주행 가능 거리는 어떻게 
Et Apollo 11, bonne nuit de 
Ricevuto. La combustione dall'alto verso il bass
로저입니다. 21450번이고, 폴이 발레리가 여기 와서 빌에게 편안한 낮잠
Вы
We noticed the old familiar pulsing in the suits when we had the RECIRC closed all the way down and our dampers that time were open full in both suits. It was the same type of
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフランク・ボーマンが同行します。彼らは太平洋軍司令官ジョン・シドニー・マケイン・ジュニア提督と共に、回収艦のブリッジから着水を見届けます。大統領はホーネット号での滞在後、アジア歴訪と予定されていたルーマニア訪問に出発します。ルナ15号は昨日、月を52周した後、「危機の海」に墜落したとみられています。ソ連の通信社TASSは、「月近傍空間における科学的」「研究」が行われたと報じました。ジョドレルバンク天文台のバーナード・ラベル卿は、ルナ15号が時速約300マイル（約480キロメートル）の速度で月面に衝突したと述べました。ベトナムでは最近、比較的静穏な状況が続いています。パトロール中の米兵が、飛行中の航空機に同調するトランジスタラジオを携帯しているのが目撃されました。ベトナムの軍のラジオ・テレビネットワークは、このミッションを全面的に報道しました。スエズ運河沿いでは、エジプトとイスラエルの間で小競り合いが依然として続いています。国連監視団は、この動きを阻止しようとしています。ワシントンでは、下院歳入委員会が、27.5%の石油枯渇許容量を20%に削減することを決議しました。ここヒューストン地域では、何度か雨が降っています。今日は曇りで、にわか雨が降る見込みです。スポーツに関しては、先ほども述べたように、オールスター ゲームが今夜開催されます。昨日は試合がありませんでした。昨夜ニューヨークで、全米野球記者協会がベーブ ルースを史上最高の野球選
Хорошо. Я только что подключился к своей системе связи и хотел бы з
Это фантастическое зрелище, Билл. Похоже на небольшую экскурсию в стиле ретр
Ok, Vance. Siamo quasi pronti a copiare le modifiche al libro in solitaria e al piano di volo, e quando i tuoi appunti saranno pronti, li prenderemo. E per quanto riguarda l'anticipo del periodo di sonno, va bene, ma noi..
Okay. Bedienfeld 3: Batterieladung auf AUS stellen. Bedienfeld 5: Hauptbusverbindung BAT A/C auf BAT A/C stellen; CB-Batterieladegerät, BAT A-Ladevorgang öffnen; CB-Batterieladegerät, BAT B-Ladevorgang schließen. Als Nächstes: Bedienfeld 250: CB BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING schließen. Bedienfeld 5: Hauptbusverbindung, BAT B/C, aus. Bedienfeld 3: Batterieladung auf B stellen. Hinweis: Bitte warten. Jack, wir haben ein Rückfallverfahren dafür, das wir Ihnen aber später, in etwa zwei Stunden, vorlesen werden. Dieses Verfahren ist eine Änderung gegenüber dem ersten Batterieladeverfahren, das wir Ihnen gezeigt haben. Anders ausgedrückt: Es ist ein Unterschied zu Ihrem aktuel
알겠습니다. 1단계, BIOMED 끄기;
Buonasera. Vorrei discutere con voi alcuni degli aspetti più simbolici del volo della nostra missione, l'Apollo 11. Mentre discutevamo degli eventi accaduti negli ultimi 2 o 3 giorni qui a bordo della nostra navicella spaziale, siamo giunti alla conclusione che questo è stato molto più di un viaggio di tre uomini verso la Luna; più, ancora, degli sforzi di un team governativo e industriale; più, persino, degli sforzi di una sola nazione. Riteniamo che questo rappresenti un simbolo dell'insaziabile curiosità di tutta l'umanità di esplorare l'ignoto. La dichiarazione di Neil l'altro giorno, quando ha messo piede per la prima volta sulla superficie della Luna: "Questo è un piccolo passo per un uomo, ma un grande balzo per l'umanità", credo riassuma molto bene questi sentimenti. Abbiamo accettato la sfida di andare sulla Luna; l'accettazione di questa sfida era inevitabile. La relativa facilità con cui abbiamo portato a termine la nostra missione, credo, è un omaggio alla tempestività di tale accettazione. Oggi, ritengo che siamo pienamente in grado di accettare ruoli più amp
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في جهاز المحاكاة، إن لم يكن بنفس السهولة. لذا أكملنا المهمة حتى النهاية. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون، كنت قد قررت أننا لن نتمكن من الوصول، لكنني فكرت في الاستمرار قليلًا. عندما وصلنا إ
لقد حصلنا على منظر جميل لجانب وحدة القيادة من خلال النظر في المثب
प्रतीक्षा करें। मुझे दिखाई नह
Apoll
Ok. 
好的。等等。让我——让我把电
了解。胸の上部
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ و
नील, आपकी आवाज़ कट-कट कर आ रही है। आपकी बात समझ में नहीं आ रही। मुझे लगता है आपने एसेंट इंजन पर कंटिंजेंसी सैंपल कंटेनर के बार
那一定是比尔的泰迪
Everything continues to look very good here on the ground. I've got a re
रॉजर। गाइडेंस कंट्रोल, मोड कंट्रोल, एटीट्यूड होल्ड, एंटर; एटीट्यूड में पैंतरेबाज़ी करें जो रोल 0, पिच 90 और यॉ है, जो वर्तमान यॉ है। 
And we'll give you that word when we want you to do that. That's only, not to power down the . But we'd like
ロジャー。彼は戻っ
Фред, я бы посоветовал тебе, когда твое окно снова окажется обращенным
Notre position est la suivante: survol, /G&N; 63385; plus 0,97, moins 0,23; plus 0212,7, moins 0141,7, moins 0254,8; 148, 316, 050; NA, plus 0
أقوم حاليًا بفحص جهد التيار المستمر. جهد ناقل التوزيع الرئيسي 24 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع المعزول 27.5 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع الأول 25 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع الثاني 25 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع الثالث 25 فولت. جهد ناقل التوزيع الاحتياطي الأول 25 فولت، وجهد ناقل 
Roger. Brennbeginn 3 47 37; Delta-V, 42,9;
Du hast nach dem Nullmeridian aufgehör
Роджер, не беспокойся насчет
그는
Yaw complete. 
Potresti fornirci le impostazioni della tua valvola di controllo della temperatura, per favore
鞭状天线已升起
तापमान थोड़ा कम हो गया है। अब लगभग शून्य है; मतलब लगभग 70 डिग्री है। पहले थोड़ा ज्यादा था। विज़र बंद है और मुझे थोड़ी ठंड लगने 
Roger. Nur zur Info: Ihre beiden E
我
D'accord. Information de dernière minute: Juan Carlos a été officiellement désigné hier, mardi, pour succéder au général Franco à la tête de l'État espagnol et, à terme, au trône. Il prêtera serment aujourd'hui après avoir juré fidélité à la loi et au Mouvement national, unique organisa
私は読んでいます。はっきりとあなたの言葉を読んでいま
Ok. Ricevuto. Vediamo cos'altro abbiamo per te, Jim. Midcourse-2 sembra a circa 7 metri al secondo, quasi retrogrado e in orario. E ora sta mantenendo una velocità molto stabile. Per tua informazione, e non c'è bisogno che tu lo trascriva, perché è ancora piuttosto debole, ma abbiamo un impatto a circa 8,57 gradi sud e circa 33,9 gradi ovest, che è un po' a ovest e un po' a sud del valore del piano di volo. Lo abbiamo a circa 77 gradi più 51 gradi, che è poco prima, e i pad sono un po' in ritardo, e come ho detto, è ancora piuttosto debole, e ti a
Ok. Joe, siamo O
Je l'ai ouvert. Le 
ワシントン駐屯の米海兵隊司令官にメッセージを送ってほしい。今月の飛行時間4時間を確保したと伝え、飛行許可証の発行を要請し
기내 압력은 6.1로 
حسنًا. انتبه ألا تضغط على أي من المفاتيح.
Neil, this is Houston. We'd like you all to get two core tubes and the solar wind experiment; two core tubes and the solar 
D'accord. Nous avons plusieurs points à aborder. Premièrement, un rappel: R1 doit être égal à 375 - 0,375 degrés
네, 세계 뉴스부터 시작하겠습니다. 아폴로 8호 우주비행사들에 대한 찬사와 우주 탐사 분야에서의
我们刚刚完成了阿金纳号的偏航操作，偏航角达到 090 度，偏航速率精确
百慕大，
Non. Je ne le crois pas, je pense que c'est... c'est à peu près 
मैं आपकी बात अच्छे से सुन रहा हूँ, क्या आप मुझे समझ पा रहे हैं
Okay. Ich glaube, ich bin auf dem best
アポロ8号、ヒュースト
هل قمت بضبط مفتاح القياس عن بعد على وضع الوقت الحقيقي ووض
好的，收到。我们没有其他问题了。如果您有
No. Non vogliamo che tu l
Roger. 21-4 Your ΔV will be split between forward and aft. 56 feet forward at 1 minute 32 seconds. 120 ft/sec a
Roger, request a cabin humidity reading and a hatch temperature 
Похоже, передвигаться не составляет труда, как мы и предполагали. Возможно, даже легче, чем в симуляциях при перегрузке в одну шестую g, которые мы проводили в различных наземных симуляциях. На самом деле, ходить здесь не составляет труда. Хорошо. Двигатель спуска не оставил после себя кратера сколько-нибудь значительного размера. Зазор на земле составляет
मेरा सुझाव है कि जब आप यह कर रहे हों, तो हम आगे बढ़ें और यहाँ एक बदलाव करें; इसे स्वचालित रूप से होने दें और इसे थोड़ा समायोजित कर लें। जिम को रिगेल और सीरियस का उपयोग करना पड़
D'accord. La t
제미니 4호, 휴스
ठीक है। और अपनी क्रू स्टेटस रिपोर्ट तैयार कर लीजि
我能看到的
B
The helmet and glov
좋아요, 그렇게
那是格林威治标准时间 00:15
阿波罗8
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы готовы к трансляции по телевидению в Голдстоуне. Трансляция
Va bene. Per le emergenze abbiamo i c
Roger, Canary CAP COM. Leggi il tuo rumore
Роджер. Понял. Я хотел бы получить разъяснения по этому поводу, прежде чем мы 
हमें बूस्टर का एक और दृश्य दिखाई दिया है, यह इस समय क्षितिज पर बिल्कुल सामने है। हम लगभग सीधे आगे की ओर बढ़ रहे 
И, 13, Хьюстон. Вы
Non credo che le onde siano troppo alte. Dovremo 
Well, I'm back around now to the Southern Cross wit
إيجل، هيوستن. بعد التهيئة، سنكون جاهزين لإتمام عملية الدفع
Jim, il semblerait que ce soit un problème de capteur; la batterie n° 2 assure bien le partage de charge. De plus, nous ne constatons aucune augmentation d
了解しました。一つお知らせがあります。彼らは中継機を使ってハワイ経由であなたと連絡を取ろうとしています。ハワイを占領する前に、UHFに切り替えてい
Okay, Bill. Ich möchte meine letzte Anmerkung zur Verwendung des Bordzustandsvektors für Punkt 4 zurücknehmen. Nach weiterer Prüfung vor Ort müssen die Berechnungen nun dringend durchgeführt werden. Anstatt dies zu verschieben oder doppelt durchzuführen, werden wir die bisher üblichen Verfahren anwenden. Was die Mondumlaufbahn betrifft, haben wir uns das genauer angesehen, und einige Kollegen – Jack Schmitt und seine Kollegen – untersuchen im Hintergrund die Auswirkungen der Fenster. Im Grunde genommen scheinen zwei Optionen Einfluss auf Punkt 2 zu haben. Eine Möglichkeit wäre, dass Sie und Jim die Plätze tauschen und Jim so seine SAM-Daten erhält. Die andere Möglichkeit wäre, das Raumschiff zu drehen und Jim die Optik so weit wie möglich nach vorne richten zu lassen, um seine SAM-Daten durch das Teleskop zu erfassen. Wir würden gerne Ihre Gedanken dazu hören, was Sie mit den Fenstern machen könnten. Wenn Sie Vorschläge haben, würden wir diese gerne in unsere Überlegungen einbeziehen und unsere Pläne so früh w
伙计，
Okay. Ich verstehe nicht, warum Sie so vi
- - the ball... get back to - Okay. What we'd like now, I guess, is the next attitude to go to, Va
Roger, Jim. Ho una breve procedura che vorrei leggerti e vorrei spiegarti di cosa si tratta. La tua matrice W condivideva alcune posizioni di memoria con; quindi, la matrice W che hai adesso non è
Bene. Questo è il tuo amichevole kit fai-da-te COMM con una procedura suggerita per la situazione dell'idrossido di litio. Tutto bene. Abbiamo letto 1,8 millimetri e ne hai abbastanza... per il resto del volo. Tuttavia, essendo prudenti, vorremmo usare un altro set di contenitori del
जी हाँ। हमने एक कनस्तर का उपयोग करने का निर्णय लिया है, और जैसा कि आप जानते हैं, तरल-शीतित वस्त्र के चारों ओर एक थैली होती है जिसका उपयोग हम कर सकते हैं, या हमें पता है कि हम इसका उपयोग कर सकते हैं। हमने इसे आजमाया है। तो आपके पास एक थैली के अंदर एक और थैली है, और उसके अंदर तरल-शीतित वस्त्र है। जो थैली तरल-शीतित वस्त्र के सबसे करीब है, वही हमें चाहिए, और हमारे पास ऐसी दो थैलियाँ हैं। और फिर, ज़ाहिर है, हमें कुछ टेप का उपयोग करना होगा, और जैसा कि आपने कहा, उड़ान डेटा फ़ाइल टाइमलाइन बुक या इसी तरह की किसी चीज़ के पीछे का भाग, और बस इन सामग्रियों का उपयोग करके, हम यह जुगाड़ वाला कनस्तर बना सकते हैं। तो, जिस थैली की हमें तलाश है, वह तरल-शीतित वस्त्र के ठीक बगल वाली थैली है, और अगर हम इसे काटने में बहुत सावधानी बरतें, तो हम एक अच्छा जुगाड़ बना स
没错。与之前的格式唯一的区别在于，当你开始掷骰子时，我们将给你0.05克RET，而不是400,000RET
और आप तैयार हैं। हंट्सविले की रिपोर्ट के अनुसार, आपके पास 6 सेकंड का प्रोपेलेंट पैड है, जो 3-सिग्मा केस से 3 सेकंड अधिक है; इसलिए उपभोग्य सामग्रियों की कोई कमी नहीं है। यह इतना अच्छा है कि हम इसे अपडेट नहीं करने जा रहे हैं। आपके लिए एकमात्र बदलाव चेकलिस्ट में है। 57 मिनट पर जहां आपने 18 डिग्री पर स्ल्यू किया था, हम वहां 20 डिग्री की अनुशंसा करते हैं, और हम अनुशंसा करते हैं कि आप
好的，将两倍于最大功率点火提前角（MPL）的参数设置为：079、27、4013，加上 08144，减去 00443，减去 00226，不适用，加上 00205、08455、4，加上 20、268、261，加上 08155，减去 00443
Роджер. Мне нужно о
알겠습니다. 21-4 ΔV는 전방과 후방으로 나뉩니다. 전방으로 56피트, 1분 32초
रॉजर। समझ गया, प्री-रेट्रो चेकलिस्ट पूरी हो गई है। आपके पास एक नया टीआर है। आपके पास कमांड लोड है
Okay, Joe. Ich 
سيجما سفن، هذه شركة إنديان كوم تك. أسمعك بوضوح. انتظروا شركة إنديان كاب 
Okay. W
这是友谊七。否定。上
अपोलो 8,
Родже
Roger. Wir werd
Gemini 4,
L'objectif de celui-ci est
Sag ihnen, sie sollen sich ansehen, was sie gestern beko
Водолеи, все ваши электроды поднимутся примерно через 3,5 часа, в минус 6:30. И еще одно напоминание: когда вы отключаете питание от кабеля управления модуля, обязательно раз
18 37 58. Temps écoulé au sol 04 13 
여기는 우
Et 11, Houston. Nous avons une demande à vous faire. Concernant la vanne de pressurisation du carburant de propergol secondaire du module de service: par mesure de précaution, nous vous demandons de bien vouloir actionner brièvement les quatre interrupteur
Houston, could you give me the helium tank temperature at about
ठीक है। मा
Bonjour, comment allez
아폴로 
Roger. 
Roger. We are learning a 
Roger. For 64 thousand dollars, we're still trying to work 
...конец. Хорошо. 5000, 10
Bon. Il n'y a pas grand-chose de nouveau dans l'actualité ce matin. C'est plutôt calme. Le principal sujet d'actualité concerne le nombre d'accidents – les décès survenus pendant les fêtes – ce qui n'est certainement pas une bonne nouvelle, mais on dénombre 233 morts à l'échelle nationale, dont 9 à Houston la veille et le jour de Noël. Du côté international, les familles ont de nouveau fait parler d'elles. Voici ce qu'on a appris: « Les familles des membres d'équipage d'Apollo 8 ont adressé un message de Noël au commandant de la 
Eagle, Hou
ठीक है। R-13 में 16 मिलीमीटर और 70 मिलीमीटर की एक्सपोज़्ड फिल्म। ठीक है, अगला चरण। ऑक्सीजन होज़ पर ऑक्सीजन स्क्रीन कैप लग
现
E, Fred, vorremmo che tu verificassi che il talkback sui reagenti delle celle a combustibile è un palo da barbi
Yes. I am going around it, doing this AUTO maneuvers to the PAD values of rol
يبدو جيداً. حسناً. لقد أجرينا تمريناً باستخدام النموذج الأولي على الاستعدادات قبل الدخول، ولاحظنا أنه في قائمة التحقق الخاصة بـ LMP في الصفحة S-12، عن
Nous allons brièvement passer à l'entrée auxiliaire bande S pour que vous puissiez transférer
休斯顿，阿波罗11号
好的，休斯顿；水瓶座。我现在是SEP
テレメトリによると、O2 圧力は基準値を超えて高
Très bien, Houston. Nous 
Mon heure rétrograde est de 04 plus 32 
Подтверждаем, мы завершили проверку. Мы предоставим вам данные через секунду. Мы успешно прошли проверку с помощью секстанта при входе в атмосферу
Salut Mike. Le MIT serait-il en train de se faufi
Roger, Neil. Merci. Il semble également qu'à gauche du terminateur, dans l'hémisphère nord, une bande nuageuse se forme, une trouée dans les nuages, orientée nord-ou
这里是Sigm
저는 부스터를 향해 초속 약 5피트(약 1.5m)의 추력을 가했습니다. 분리 연소는 대략 6~7초 정도 걸렸습니다. 부스터를 향
Hast 
Роджер. Хорошо. Мы ошиблись в нашем — в нашем резервном комплекте. Они были не на своих местах. Похоже, бортовые д
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Risposta affermativa per il backup a voce bassa. Vorremmo che confe
Roger. We'll hold up on the high-gain check 
Gemini 4,
Je n'ai pas inscrit tous ces changements de configuration de contrôle sur la liste de vérification, mais c'est exactement ce que nous avons fait: nous avons utilisé l'IMPULSION MIN
Apollo 8, Houston. Allez. Je vou
열대성 폭풍 칼라 근처에 있을 때 S
Ho scattato la foto S-5 appena ho avuto il contatto con Hous
よし、ジーン、まずはスーツの話をしよう。みんなの負担が軽くなるように。スーツのドーム温度は72度、つまりドーム温度だ。スーツの吸気口は66度で、スーツの設定は8。今のところスーツの回路には非常に
好的。没错，更新的最后一句话是，在45度和155度的倾斜角下，你可以看到这颗彗星。杰克，现在的情况是，根据他们给我看的图表，这颗彗星似乎距离太阳大约10度，由于它遮挡太阳的几何形状，在45度到75度左右的倾斜角范围内，你似乎可以通过六分仪看到这颗彗星，而不会受到太阳直射的影响。看起来，当翻滚角度超过75度时，虽然彗星仍在视野内，但太阳也会出现在视野中。如果您在45度到75度之间都没能拍到彗星，那么在75度到155度之间可能就拍不到了。如果您发现可以在45度到75度或80度之间看到彗
그 과정을 다시 한번 해주시면 
了解しました。いくつか整理したい項目があります。予算はお渡しします。現在、レッドラインが1つあります。より正確な数値を算出しようとしており、後ほどご報告いたします。現在、お客様の使用状況は飛行計画のラインと合致しており、状況は良好です。クルーのステータスレポートをお送りください。2つの飛行計画案を確定させ
Gemini 4, pour cette insertion des
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। रॉजर। 
Ok, Jack. 
Роджер. В других 
아폴로 11호가 착륙 접근로를 처음으로 관측하고 있습니다. 이번에는 타룬티우스 분화구 위를 지나가는데, 아폴로 8호와 10호가 보내온 사진과 지도를 통해 이곳의 모습을 미리 잘 파악할 수 있
Got a yaw, now roll righ
Okay, chamber pressure's falling off a little bit; now it's going back up; chamber pressure
オーロラセブン、オーロラ
Хорошо, на TIG минус 17 удалите CB (11). Шина AC A, РАД
CAP COM كارنارفون، الجوز
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴입니다. 이전에 21개로 알려드렸던 요 펄스 수를 12개로 줄이고 싶습니다. 12개의 
Ro
ليس سيئاً. ليس
بما أنك في طريقك بالفعل، قد يهمك أن تعلم أن عالمة الفلك روبي غراهام من هيوستن تقول إن جميع الأبراج مناسبة لرحلتك إلى القمر. تقول إن نيل ذك
Okay. On the water boiler: it's interesting that I get my own - I w
Houston, comment lisez-vous? Ap
Roger. Wir haben einen Kraftstoffdruck von 167, im Hilfsdrucksystem 163. Meinst du, es könnte sein, dass zu Beginn des Brennvorgangs kurzzeitig eine Warnmeldung wegen des Kraftstoff-Hilfsdrucks ausgelöst wird, die sich dann im Normalfall von selbst korrigiert, sobald wir g
收到，我们会转达给
紧急客舱压力提升至两
Quiv
ありがとうございます。あと残っているのは通信機器の点検だけなので、もし現在のスケジュールに影響が出ずに作業できるのであれば
Нет, у этой штуки, ах, практически нет показаний регулировки углов, Дик, но сейчас я, я бы сказал, перевернулся на 30 градусов влево. — Довольно
如果你愿
Ah, Roger, Zanzibar CapCom. Friendship Seven. Tous
ठीक है। बढ़िया। हमें यह समझ आ गया, फ्रेड। और यह दिखाने के लिए कि हम प्रवेश को
К сожалению, эти цифры сюда так и не попали. Если вы посмотрите на диаграмму, которая есть у Фреда Хейза, там показана единица в положении «11 часов», это уровень шума. Я не помню, какое было напряжение. Возможно, оно есть в моей кни
好的，8. 我们想在这里进行一次现场演练，确保我们能够及时地将录音带导出并把语音部分传回休斯顿。所以我们计划导出您的录音带，并在此演练一下将录音带
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。オーバ
検閲
わかった。いいだろう。でもレティクルが地平線と平行じゃない。
Я подумал, что мы могли бы просто положить мой контрольный список активации прямо сюда, и тогда мы будем полностью го
चल
莫莉·布朗，更正一下，是40万英尺。那是1901年29
Apollo 11, this is Houston. We are not receiving your FM d
了解。予定通り11時50分にプラットフォームの電源を入れましたが、
حسنًا. أولًا، تشير خطة الطيران إلى أن CDR يجب أن ينام. ثانيًا، ملخص لرحلة الهبوط. جميع أنظمتك تعمل بشكل سليم. يُظهر المسار أن لديك نقطة اقتراب قريبة (CPA) عند مسافة 69.67 ميلًا، ووقت الحضيض هو 11. لديك نقطة عودة حرة جيدة. من المبكر بعض الشيء تقييم المسار بشكل كامل للتحكم في الممر. لن يكون لديك أي تحديث لبيانات الكتلة +11. بعد مراجعة المنحنيات، يبدو أن ضغط تهوية البطارية يساوي صفرًا عند 0.2 إلى 0.3 فولت، لذلك - نتفق معك في ذلك، ويمكنك المضي قدمً
Roger, Frank. Quello che stiamo facendo qui sotto è questo. Vorremmo davvero la calibrazione dell'orizzonte. Vorremmo un totale di 15 punti; sapete, tre serie su una stella, due sull'altra. D'altra parte, stiamo bilanciando questo con la necessità di andare a, e non stiamo perdendo di vista il fatto che volete andare a subito. Quindi, se avete pazienza ancora un paio di minuti, stiamo cercando di decidere se chiedervi di to
Très bien. Le commandant signale que tous les verrou
ठ
حسناً
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Также, что каса
好的。我们现在的想法是，我
والآن، يا فريق ترانكويليتي بيس، يغادر الفريق
Alright. Midcourse correction number 4: the / 62888 November Alfa November Alfa minus 00
بما 
好的，杰克。下一步是拿出提示卡，用它在罐子顶部形成一个拱形；只需将提示卡的一端短一些，塞到罐子顶部的一
オーウェン、了解。君の合図と読み
Roge
أبولو 8، لنعد إلى الأعلى -
La qualité de la voix est mauvaise pour le moment, et les équipes de guidage n'ont pas tout reçu. Pourriez-vous patienter deux ou trois minutes? Nous allons changer d'antenne
... ou nous serons sur le batea
Sigma Seven，这里是Ca
OK. J'ai les gyroscopes en mode normal, automatique et en mode « cage ». Je vais mettre le moteur 
और, ह्यूस्टन, हमने अपने कंप्यूटर को रीस्टार्ट किया और एक
रॉजर। ऐसा लगता है कि इसे करने का एकमात्र तरीका 
لا، بل TLI زائد 9
D'accord. Je suis actuellement en mode IMPULSION MIN
إيجل، هيوستن. هل قمتَ بتفعيلها بعد؟
부스터가 분리될 때, 롤 노즐에서 연료가 분사
Роджер. Я вас тоже понял. Не могли бы вы сообщить нам о ва
यह ह्यूस्टन है। मैं आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से सुन पा रहा हूँ और समझ गया हूँ कि आपने वायु सेना के तीन डी-9 विमान, एंटारेस तारामंडल पर अपोलो नंबर 4 और वृश्चिक राशि के एक तारे पर लंबी और छोटी उड़ान भरी है। आपने एंटारेस तारामंडल पर लंबी उड़ान भरी है और वृश्चिक राशि पर तीसरी तीव्रता का तारा दे
No, non è poi così male. Abbiamo la maggior parte di tutta la roba in più nascosta sotto le gambe, dietro i talloni, roba che comunque non si usa molto, quindi non è poi così fastidiosa. Ma abbiamo le macchine fotografiche, le borse e i sacchi della spazzatura praticamente attaccati dappertutt
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird
Voyons vo
了解
地獄より熱く見えるよ。おい、この大
S
كولومبيا، هذه هيوستن. هل نسخت إحداثيات المركبة القمرية؟ 
추적은 어떻게 진행
Roger. Le traitement thermique ne semble pas poser de problème. Nous examinons l'impact potentiel de ce phénomène sur la vitesse de rotation, et il semble que nous ne modif
Мы начинаем маневр для пер
Nous avons reçu des félicitations pour Hawaï! Vous
سيجما سفن، سيجما سفن، هذه شركة ووترتاون كوم تك. UHF. كيف تقر
ठीक है। और अगर आपके पास थोड़ा समय हो तो आप एक बात देख सकते हैं। अरिस्टार्कस के आसपास कुछ चंद्र क्
Roger. Il ne nous r
Jim, nous avon
Okay, Charlie. If the atti
Roger. 5 SPS/G&N: 37201, minus 060, plus 047 086 09 3666, p
Roger. Or
D'accord. Parfait, Frank. L'autre ch
Roge
मैंने आपका Z
Eagle, Houston. Pourriez-vous nous indiquer
D'accord. Et nous allons probablement – ​​si nous avons une combustion OAMS courte – corriger notre temps de rétro-allumag
حسنًا. يبدو أن الصوت العادي غير قابل للاختراق. في خزانات التبريد، لاحظنا تفاوتًا كبيرًا في توزيع الأكسجين، خاصةً، وهذا واضح أثناء دورات المروحة، لذا سنحرص على تقليب الأكسجين قبل التشغيل. يعمل النظام بسلاسة تامة. تشير بيانات التحكم والتوجيه إلى أن الكميات جيدة. أنت تستخدم نفس الكمية المتوقعة لـ و لمحاذاتك. سنخبرك أنه يمكنك استخدام 30% لكل وحدة رباعية في المدار القمري. هذه كمية كبيرة من الوقود،
आपको डा
جيميني 4، هيوستن CAP COM. نرجو منكم ترك مفتاح تشغي
分かりまし
Хорошо. Наши ребята здесь следят за программой наведения антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления, поэтому, когда вы не используете её ни для чего другого, они хотели бы посмотреть её пару циклов. Та
좋아요.
Думаю, изначально у них было ровно тысяч. У
了解しました。ミッション終了時の逆算シーケンスは04+32+39と理解しました。よろしいでしょう
Вер
Und 13, das ist Houston. Im nächsten Schritt, 12, möchten w
ठीक है। मुझे उन लोगों से एक शब्द भी सुनने को नहीं मिला, और मुझे लगा था कि मैं
OK. +90: /G&N, 63825, -1,54, +1,32, -0491,7, +0000,1, +6634,0, 180, 228, 001; N/A; +0017,9, 6652,2, 7:37, 6626,5, 26, 155,4, 15,7; Zeta Sagittarius; montée, 08,0; droite 2,1; -22,81, -025,00, 1140,7, 34087, 32:14. Départs: Arcturus, Denebola; roulis 044, tangage 012, la
Okay. Under "VHF/S-band Activation and Checkout," scratch step 1. Do step 2 with the following change, "DOWN VOICE BACKUP" to "VOICE." Sc
«Аполлон-8»,
0.01、わかりました。 - ああ、忘れました。あれは灰色のギエナだったと思いま
Ich verstehe dich jetzt. Hast du meine 2 Charlie-Zeit bek
6,50 градусов. И, Джим, Хьюстон. В заключение, мы ожидаем, что нам потребуется около часа, чтобы обновить ваш контрольный список и график работ позже сегодня, и мы хотели бы, чтобы вы это учли. Я думаю, что на подготовку всего этого уйдет 3 или 
이는 옵션 1로 진행됩니다. 컴퓨터 내부에
Mann, das Bilgenwasser 
37号星足以满足光学校准的需求。而且，在我们的状态矢量上行链路之后，
روجر. ظننت أننا أعطيناك ذلك. مايك، أنت جاهز لتفعيل ذراع بايرو، وأنت جاهز لتفعيل خاصية الإلق
휴스턴에 계신 아쿠
Roger. Ho... ti do 45 secondi. MARK T 45 secondi. Ha
Ricevuto. I riscaldatori dell'O2 sono accesi e
了解です。はい。電圧と電流値を読み取るために、これらを閉じてください。次のステップは、パネル250の回路ブレーカーBAT A POWER ENTRYとPOSTLANDING、そしてBAT B 
It's working good so far, Charlie. We've got one installed on the water gun and the other one installed on the spigot down in the, and we - mention one problem with them is that they 
マーキュリー・
Звучит неплох
Apollo 11, hier spr
عند إشارتي، سيكون التوقيت العالمي المنسق 18
네, 나일강이 거의 발원지
ちょっと待っ
Ich habe kein Licht. Ich sehe, wie die Gurte abfallen. Ic
11, qui Houston. Correzione 
了解しました。了解しました、ジム。いくつか時間も用意し
B; 델타-V, 13.5. 고도 조정; 델타-V, 59.5. 위상 조정: 델타-V, 31.3. 남쪽 방향으로 궤도 변경: 델타-V, 44.3. 동일
はい、フレ
Ricevu
ठीक है, और अगर आप चाहें तो - दरअसल, हम चाहेंगे कि आप अपने सभी टाइप 2 मेडिकल पास को टाइप 1 में अपडेट कर लें। इससे आपको थोड़ा और व्यायाम क
Roger. TLI: 23514 179 071 001, burn time 547 104356 35575. Roll for SEP 357 107 041, 301 28
هيا يا غوايماس. الجوزاء 
ヒューストン、正確な位置は分からないと言った人たちが
了解。六分儀を使ってテキサスを見てきました。天気予報士の
Okay. Die Vorgehensweise ist wie folgt:, ENTE
알겠습니다. 이 기동은 고이득 안테나의 스캔 한계에 매우 근접하게 진행되므로, 기동하는 동안 표시등을 확인하십시오. 스
Okay, Aquarius. We're ready. So we want some high bit rate. To do that, go over to panel 16 under COMM and close 
Передайте мой к
Роджер. Возможно, вам не придётся это распаковывать. Местоположение, к
हमें बहुत से लोगों ने इतनी संक्षिप्त जानकारी पढ़कर स
휴스턴, 여기는 컬럼비아입니다. 잘 들립니다. 저희 세 명 모두 안으로 들어왔고, 해치도 
Okay. Wir müssen abwarten. Es sieht so aus, als ob du die Einstellung verlierst, High Gain zu nutzen. Wir werden es beim nächsten Mal b
Yes. I don't believe we were actually having difficulty with the head clearance. I felt l
أنتظر
2+40은 OAMS 레트로 맞죠? 아닌가요
आगे बढ़ो, गोर्ड
मैं इसे... बाहर निकाल रहा हूँ... और मैं दक्षिण की ओर और सूर्य की ओर की बजाय थोड़ा पीछे की ओर इशारा कर रहा हूँ
Роджер. Мы дадим вам разрешение на использование 6-4. Я обновлю данные по загрузке 4-4 с учетом 
52-
对
我说过这里没
Roger, Seven. Du versuchst es, mindestens 7 Erdumrundunge
هناك في الأعلى؟ من المفترض أ
Houston CAP CO
रॉजर, सेवन। तीसरे ऑर्बिट के लिए हम सुझाव देते हैं कि आप अपनी इच्छानुसार जाइरोस्कोप का उपयोग करें, चाहे वह सामान्य हो या मुक्त, ताकि तीसरे ऑर्बिट पर रेट्रोफायर से पहले यदि स्कैनर ठीक से प्र
Columbi
Роджер. Кажется, всё в порядке. Всё выглядит хорошо. Автоматический режим заправки заполнился на 55 процентов. Пролетаю 70 000 футов, 65 000. Положение самолёта очень стабильн
わかりました、ジャック。ジムです。チェックリストの変更点が本当に必要な項目かどうか、きちんと選別されているか確認したいのですが。手順を習得する際には、一度しか変更できません。土壇場で変更することはできません。できる限り最善かつ安全な方法で行いたいのですが、本当に必要な変更でない限り
Die Sonnenuntergänge sind spektakulär. Die Erde ist schwarz, nachdem die Sonne untergegangen ist. Der erste Streifen nahe der Erde ist rot, der nächste gelb, dann blau, dann grün u
Roger. Rapport de situation. J
مرحباً، أبولو 
好的，收到，吉姆。我想确认几件事，我不确定我是否听清了你刚才读的内容。第一点是斑马天秤座，也就是天秤
こちらフレ
好的。重点来了。除了横滚之外，你的姿态看起来相当不错，我们需要你做以下调整。在最小脉冲模式下，我们希望你将俯仰调整到零度（这和你现在的位置差不多）；横滚调整到0.08度（这和你当前的横滚姿态相差约16度）；偏航调整到零度（这和你现在的位置差不多）。然后，我们希望你将机身轴线调整为400+5，400+0。将俯仰和横滚调整到脉
Хорошо, я сейчас перенесу телевизор. Я вытащу его из этого кронштейна, Д
Et vous, Houston, Apollo 8, quelle taille d'antenne allez-vous util
Roger. Solo per assicurarci che la voglia di scattare foto della luna con filtro rosso e blu n
ठीक है। क्या इससे कोई फर्क पड़ेगा
Roger. Wenn ich nur einen Lüfter verwende
一人ぼっちだ。了
双子座 
Or
ل
알겠습니다. "AUTO SELECT, 16, OFF"를 삭제하세요. "CB LOGIC POWER"를 "LOGIC THRUST POWER - CBS CS LOGIC THRUST, four, to closed"로 변경하세요. "DELTA-V CG"를 삭제하고, 아래쪽에 있는 "SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER, one, AC 1; POWER, 1, to ON"을 삭제하세요. 여기서 숫자 1이 중요합니다. "POWER to 1; MODE, three, to RATE 1"에서 "AUTO SELEC
Columbia, hier spricht Houston. Kön
Okay. We'd like to update. The order that we'll update will be the state vector, the state vector, and then the external and the. So any time you're free with it, we can have in ACCEPT; we'll go
ساعة واحدة من الاستعداد قبل الإطلاق. استمر في فحص الأجه
私たちは現在、態度を変える過
Роджер. 13-2 120. 2+33. 01 1
Ti ho sentito for
Il nous faut en met
罗杰·休斯顿，双子座4号。我听说你们
D'accord. Allez-
Apollo 8,
Friendship Seven, vou
8 is cop
わかっ
Нет, медицинская справка не 
Okay. Under the powerup, the first line says "AUTO SELECT, 16, to OFF." Okay. You can just delete that part. On the fifth line, it says "Circuit breaker LOGIC POWER," that's really "LOGIC BUS, four of them, to closed." The DELTA-V CG is not important since we are not burning the engine. The "SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER" lis
Okay. Very good. They'll update your bias after you complete your burn over
了解。こちらフレンドシップセブンです。窓、姿勢指示器、潜望鏡はすべて正常に作動しています。現在、後方の潜望鏡からダークサイドが上昇しているのが見えます。客室気圧は5.5で安定しています。客室温度は95度（華氏）、相対湿度は28パーセント（パーセント）。冷却効果を高めるため、客室（
نعم، وأنا كذلك
روجر، ما زلنا نو
RÉINITIALISATION, ARRÊT et FAIBLE. OK. Circuit d'éclairage coupé; ÉCLAIRAGE EXTÉRIEUR éteint. OK. Tu veux régler tes disjoncteurs, Jim?
Roger, Gemini 4. Bien reçu. Et à 30 minutes de votre plan de vol, rayez « mise sous tension 
좋아
Здравствуйте, Friendship Seven, Woomera Cap Com. Температура инвертора на 150 вольт: 195 градусов; температура инверто
حسنًا، عدتُ الآن إلى كوكبة الصليب الجنوبي، حيث تظهر بقعة ضوئية متناثرة - أعتقد أنها مليئة بنجوم خفيفة جدًا. لا أتذكر أنني رأيتُ نفس المشهد في القبة السماوية. نجمتا ألفا قنطورس وبيتا واضحتان تمامًا. ما زلتُ في هذا الوقت 
もう
わかりました、チャーリー。手動スタートなら、スロットルを40パーセントにして
收到，吉姆。你可以返回BLOCK了；我们已经收到并核实了信息
Whate
Здесь или зде
रॉजर। पेरिगी 
Roger. The problems you have run into so far are due to some unknown source, probably or the like loading your trunnion cell which is now 91, so it doesn't really represent your true trunnion angle. Now this loading problem we don't feel implie
シグマセブ
هذه هي سيجما 7، تُظهر تأثيرات الطيران المقلوب عند شروق الشمس، مع انحراف 90 درجة. من الواضح تمامًا اتجاه مسارك، تمامًا كما لو كنت تنظر من نافذة قطار. ترى التضاريس تمر من حولك، وهناك سحب من جميع الأنواع. أستطيع رؤيتها وهي تمر بجانبي بزاوية 90 درجة - أي بزاوية 90 درجة على المحور الطولي للمركبة. عرضٌ واضحٌ جدًا للانحراف. وبينما أدور الآن، يبدأ طرفي غير الحاد في اتخاذ
صحيح. إنها واحدة من القلائل الت
地平線が見つかったら、ハッキングして、星も撮って、青いフィルターもかけて。星以外はすべてカットできた。かなりうまく。でも、まだ地
Houston, Apollo 8. Term
Вам лучше надеяться, что мы приземли
哦，那太好了。不过我把洛弗尔安排到沙发底下去了。现在左边沙发底下睡着一个人，右边沙发底下也睡着一个人，我们
और
Houston, mes commentaires concernant le lever du soleil portaient sur la zone située au-dessus du re
Roger. Wir hatten hier staubiges Wetter, und soweit wir sehen können
2800，中止 47
Vielen Dank. Es sieht so aus, als ob uns nur noch ein Kommunikationscheck fehlt, und wenn wir diesen ohne Unterbrechung Ihres aktuellen Zeitplans einbauen können, würden wir das ge
Salut Houston, on a le feu vert pour le 
कंपास पर पीछे लगे एटीट्यूड इंस्ट्रूमेंट्स और जाइरो का बहुत ज़्यादा असर पड़ता है। इसीलिए मैं इसे उनके पास नहीं ला सकता। मैं इसे इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल और अपने चेहरे के बीचोंबीच, ग्लव बॉक्स और पैक के बीच की रेखा के संदर्भ में पकड़े हुए हूँ। CE के समय, यह सीधे आगे के हैच क्लैंप लाइन की ओर इशारा कर रहा है। ऐसा लगता है कि यह हैच 
好的。我们两种方法都试过了。如果断
Roger. We'd - we're
分かりました。その通りです。では、その曲線上にプロットする点をいくつかお教えしましょう。現在描かれている曲線は、60マイルの近地点、つまり近月点に基づいています。そして今、62マイルの近点が描かれています。目標が62マイルなのは、着陸地点の上空を通過するためです。
Go ah
جيميني 8،
Ecco un articolo di Harry Rosenthal dell'Associated di Houston. Due Babbi Natale illuminano la vigilia di Natale per Jeffrey Lovell, 2 anni. Il primo ha bussato alla sua porta di casa e gli ha portato i regali. Il secondo ha accompagnato il padre a casa dalla Luna. Il primo indossava un abito rosso e una barba bianca e ha emesso un grido così forte da essere sentito fino all'isolato. Il secondo era un enorme motore che sputava fiamme dietro la Luna, e migliaia di persone attendevano la notizia dell'accensione. "Si prega di essere informati che c'è un Babbo Natale" sono state le prime parole dell'Apollo 8 mentre emergeva dal silenzio radio per informare un mondo in ansia 15 minuti dopo che il motore aveva completato la sua fase critica. "Nessuno di noi si aspetta mai un regalo di Natale migliore di questo", ha detto Ken Mattingly del Controllo Missione. "Ringraziate tutti a terra da parte nostra. Sapete che non ce l'avremmo fatta senza di voi", è stata la risposta del Colonnello Frank Borman, il comandante della navicella spaziale. A questo punto, un albero di Natale si illuminò davanti alle console del Controllo Missione e l'astronauta Harrison Schmidt lesse all'equipaggio una versione spaziale di "Una visita di San Nicola". "Era la notte prima di Natale, e nello spazio, l'equipaggio dell'Apollo 8 aveva appena vinto la corsa alla Luna", iniziava. L'equipaggio del Controllo Missione aveva rimandato i festeggiamenti finché il padre di Jeffrey, il Capitano di Marina James Lovell, insieme al Maggiore dell'Aeronautica William A. Anders e al Colonnello Borman non fossero tornati a casa sani e salvi. In qualsiasi altra vigilia di Natale, le famiglie degli astronauti sarebbero state in chiesa per le funzioni natalizie, ma quest'anno erano tutti incollati ai loro televisori. Le case vicino al Manned Spacecraft Center erano decorate. I prati intorno alla casa di Lovell e in tutta la sua comunità di Timber Cove erano fiancheggiati da luminari in stile messicano, e i quattro Lovell 30. Alle 00, un'auto arrivò con a bordo un Babbo Natale alto con un grande sacco sulla schiena. Si avvicinò alla porta e bussò forte. Si aprì e lì apparve Jeffrey Lovell, che compirà 3 anni il 14 gennaio. Jeffrey indietreggiò alla vista. Sua madre lo sollevò e Jeffrey si aggrappò a lei, ancora intimidito. "L'anno scorso è scappato via piangendo", disse la sorella quindicenne Barbara. Prima, aveva dovuto rincorrerlo per impedirgli di spegnere tutte le luci. Gli altri figli Lovell, James di 13 anni e Susan di 10, guardavano divertiti. Infine, Babbo Natale e i bambini scomparvero all'interno; i regali furono messi sotto l'albero; regali che non sarebbero stati aperti fino a quel giorno. La signora Lovell preparò zabaione e biscotti per gli ospiti, e guardarono un tour televisivo
रॉजर, जॉर्ज। मेरा कंट्रोल मोड मैनुअल है। जायरो बंद हैं,
यह बिल्क
ठीक है, एक - एक 
फिर से 
음, 문제는 제가 오두막
La lettura del valore di luce, per la pellicola in bianco e nero, è 13 per ASA 64. Imposto il valore di luce a 13. Scatto la foto numero 7 con filtro. Il continente sudamericano è difficile da fotografare a causa delle condizioni meteorologiche. Scatterò un panorama a quest'ora. A partire da quasi 8 ore. In effetti, sarà così. MARKT, 7, 8, 9 fotografie in bianco e nero, pellicola in bianco e nero. Dieci fotografie, pellicola in bianco e nero. Gli scatti vengono eseguiti a 250 5.6 (1/250 di secondo e f5.6) all'infinito. Scatto la 
अभी-अभी एक उपग्रह देखा, बहुत ऊँचाई पर... ज़मीन पर किसी तारे की तरह दूर से ही दिखाई दिया। बहुत दूर था। जब मैंने इस उपग्र
روج
كولومبيا، هيوستن. سمعت أنك تحدثت مع إيجل
알겠
晚上好。我想和大家探讨一下我们阿波罗11号任务中一些更具象征意义的方面。过去两三天，我们在飞船上讨论了一系列事件，最终得出结论：这远不止是三个宇航员的登月之旅；它超越了政府和工业团队的努力；甚至超越了一个国家的努力。我们认为，这象征着全人类探索未知世界的永不满足的好奇心。尼尔前几天首次踏上月球表面时说的那句话——“这对个人来说是一小步，但对人类来说是一大步”——我认为很好地概括了这种感受。我们接受了登月的
روجر، والي، هل لديك
MARKIERE
حسنًا يا فريدو. حسنًا. هذا هو "الإدخال، التحضير". يبدأ قبل ست 
分かりました。ACバスAはオン、両方のバスはオフ
没错，吉姆。我们还没拍到照片。它应该在顶部——更正一下，顶部，也就是定位销2的顶部，以及顶部，如果你正对着太阳，它应该能让光标分开，不过横滚
Roger. Ci risulta che non puoi effettuare una manovra per l'assetto di scarico perché sono gli angoli che ti abbiamo dato e non corrispondono agli angoli del giunto cardanico per il ca
θ 角 11.8°；范围 68.90°；总 ΔV 为 232°；ΔVI 为 101.1°；数据点为 05:40。数据点 12.5°：θ 角 12.5°；范围 63.75°；总 ΔV 为 199°；ΔVI 为 84.2°。数据点 40：θ 角
わかりました。
أستطيع مرة أخرى رؤية البر
好的。目前，你们的电池电量如下：A电池39.32安时，B电池35.21安时，C电池38.46安时。你们的低温燃料剩余量与上次相同，每个燃料箱180磅氧气和11磅氢气。目前，根据计算机计算的燃料量，服务舱A四联装燃料箱的剩余量为45%，B四联装燃料箱为50%，C四联装燃料箱为58%，D四联装燃料箱为48%。我们计划在实际剩余量为37%时启动备用燃料箱，并建议在通信中断或其他类似情况下，以舱内测量值达到50%时
ठीक है। जब जैक संचार पर था, मैं यहाँ डॉकिंग विंडो से बाहर देख रहा था, और मुझे सर्विस मॉड्यूल से कणों की एक और अच्छी बौछार निकलती हुई दिखाई दी। और इस बार यह दूसरी तरफ से आती हुई प्रतीत हो रही है। पहले, हम इन्हें हमेशा विंडो 1
أبول
Columbia, Houston. First of all, we'd like a waste water dump to 10 percent on the backside. Secondly, it does not look like we are going to need any plane change at this time, so we will not be uplinking a new. Third item, I would like all of your CRYO heaters to AUTO, and we are ready for a battery charge, battery BRAVO; it will last about 7 hours. If you should go to sleep, we will be terminating that BATT charge, but at the moment, we can go ahead and 
Okay, 11. Es hat sich herausgestellt, dass die Triebwerksleistung bei beiden Brennvorgängen dieser Mission bisher der Leistung bei den Triebwerksabnahmetests entsprochen hat. Der Messwert des Bordcomputers ist auf einen bekannten Kalibrierungsfaktor des Manometers zurückzuführen, der zwischen dem tatsächlichen Brennraumdruck und dem angezeigten Wert liegt. Wir erwarten im Einbankenbetrieb einen Brennraumdruck von 90 psi – das heißt, 90 psi auf dem Manometer bei einem tatsächlichen Brennraumdruck von 95 psi. Im Zweibankbetrieb beträgt der Brennraumdruck auf dem Manometer 94 psi bei einem tatsächlichen Druck von 99 psi. 80 psi auf dem Bordmanometer entsprechen einem tatsächlichen Druck von 83 psi. Wir e
CSQ, 제미니 VIII이 또 다른 포인트를 가져왔
Ok, Jim. Ora, te lo divido in due parti. La prima riguarda il trasferimento delle apparecchiature del modulo di comando. La seconda parte sarà l'inverso, dal modulo di comando all'apparecchiatura. Entrambe le parti rappresentano i Delta provenienti dallo stivaggio del lancio, ed ecco la prima lista, per il trasferimento delle apparecchiature del modulo di com
それは明日の朝のものです
Ok, Bill. Prima di leggere il grande aggio
अपोलो 11, ह्
ठीक है, पृष्ठ 17 पर। लोड को माइनस 4 मिनट पर सेट करें; यह CB(11), इन्वर्टर 2, क्लोज़ है, और "इन्वर्टर 1 चुनें" को हटा दें। रेट स्केल को "25
陷在泥里了。好的，明白了。让他把它们重新打开——好的，吉姆，那是自动线圈，环路1，主A，你弄好之后，请你抄录一
Другой авиатор, Макс Конрад, совершающий кругосветное путешествие на своем легком самолете (он провел Рождество в Антарктиде), ждет хорошей погоды, чтобы продолжит
现在开始检查安装清单。直流电压正常。手动保险丝开关已关闭。手动保险丝开关已关闭。所有仪器都已关闭。所有电
Yes, I did tha
روجر. ومعايرة وضعية البصريات: الدوران
रॉजर। हम बिल को शौच के लिए ले जाना चाहते हैं
声音
了解しました。地上の両ループのポンプがオン
Ich glaube, ich habe mich vorhin etwas gei
Р
Wir werden die Temp
هذا هو فريندشيب سفن. إنه ساطع للغاية عند رؤيته بوضوح. بدأ بالظهور تمامًا عندما أعطيتك تلك 
أنت تفهم... 
Roger. 11, /: 45597, 0 - Korrektur - das sind minus 040, plus 157, plus 36325, minus 01727, plus 01428 180 003 000, November Alfa, plus 00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254; Scorpii Delta, runter 103, links 48, plus 0742, minus 165
Roger. A Washington, la Commissione Finanze del Senato ha approvato l'estensione della sovrattassa sull'imposta sul reddito, ma un voto del Senato sul disegno di legge sembrava al momento remoto. Ad Austin, il deputato statale Ray Lemmon di Houston è stato nominato Direttore Nazionale dell'American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon ha proposto uno studio sulla possibilità di istituire un istituto di oceanografia in Texas. Sarebbe il primo istituto del genere nella parte occidentale del Golfo del Messico. A Minneapolis, Minnesota, l'ufficio meteorologico, dopo aver riepilogato le previsioni meteo odierne con una massima di 88 e una minima di 72, ha annotato "nevicate: nessuna". Da St. Petersburg, Florida, arriva un rapporto radio dell'esploratore norvegese Thor Heyerdahl, che afferma che l'equipaggio della sua barca di papiro, la Ra, navigherà verso Bridgetown, Barbados, nonostante i danni causati dal mare grosso. L'equipaggio, tuttavia, dormirà su una nave di scorta. Norman Baker, navigatore della spedizione, ha affermato che l'equipaggio era oggi a bordo della Ra per riparare i danni causati dalle tempeste della scorsa settimana, che hanno spaccato la base dell'albero maestro. Parte dell'albero spezzato era stato gettato in mare e la nave si trovava a 7
Il dit qu'il pe
了解しました。それでは、先に進めてよろしいでしょうか？確認させていただき
Ja, das hat es. Wir haben Ihnen gezeigt, dass Sie 
Roger, 70. Mir geht es hervorragend, ich fl
Actuellement, nous volons à très basse altitude, si bien que je ne pense pas que les stations au sol puissent nous localiser. Nous avons entendu plusieurs communications intermittentes. Nous allons toutefois maintenir cette position un moment afin de garder le lanceur en vue. Il ne semble pas que nous progressions beaucoup vers lui pour le moment. Il semble rester à peu près à la même 
. 변환 
नहीं। यह पूरी तरह अंदर नहीं गया है। इसे थोड
Okay, Jack. Es sieht so aus, als würden wir mit den Aufstiegstanks weitermachen. Und es sieht so aus, a
Sì, ogni tanto le cose e
All righ
D'accord. Puissance 6. D'accord. Puissance 6 correspond au panneau 11. Suivez le schéma, à l'exception des disjoncteurs que j'ai indiqués. La première ligne est correcte. Ou plutôt, la première rangée. Deuxième rangée: QUAD 4, TCA, fermé; QUAD 3, TCA, fermé; QUAD 2, TCA, fermé; et QUAD 1, TCA, fermé. Le reste de cette rangée est correct. Troisième rangée, à peu près au milieu: ATCA (PGNS), fermé. D'accord. Le reste de cette 
क्या आपको 
Bei 0
غروب الشمس خلابٌ حقًا، لا أعتقد أنني بحاجة لإضاعة الكثير من الوقت في النظر إليه. إنه مثيرٌ للاهتمام للغاية. الأمر الآخر المثير للدهشة هو مدى سواد الظلام عندما لا تكون العينان قد اعتادتا عليه. أستطيع بالتأكيد رؤية بعض الطلاء على النافذة. سأعود الآن إلى وضع VOX على تردد UHF-hi للإرسال. سأفتح واقي الوجه لمسح ا
关于入场摄影，如果您使用全新的彩色内景胶片，我们建议以下曝光设置：光圈 f/11，快门速度 1/250 秒，每秒 6 帧，对焦距离 7 英尺（约 2.1 米），拍摄火球；光圈 f/2.0，快门速度 1/60 秒，每秒 6 帧，对焦距离 50 英尺（约 15 米），拍摄降落伞打开。如果您使用部分已用于拍摄内景的胶片，我们建议光圈 f/16，快门速度 1/500 秒，每秒 6 帧，对焦距离 7 英尺（约 2.1 米），拍摄火球；光圈 f/2.8，快门速度 1/60 秒，每秒 6 帧，对焦距离 50 英尺（约 15 米
Po
알겠습니다. 콜럼비아, 시작.
Friendship Seven, ici Kano Cap Com. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Comment me recevez-v
हां, क्यों न हम सीधे-सीधे कह दें कि अगर हमें कोई समस्या आती है, जैसे कि जब इसे समस्या का पता लगाना चाहिए तब यह उसे नहीं पकड़ता, तो हम एक बार कोशिश करके देखेंगे, और फ
Roger. Da terra hai un bell'aspetto. Potresti disatti
Okay. Schritt 6: „Stromversorgung einschalten (Flutlicht aus), VORSICHT WARNUNG STROM VORSICHT LEUCHTET. Meldung an: Schalttafel 11, LEISTUNGSSCHALTE
После включения режима регулировки высоты за нами следовал красный объект. Он, по-видимому, дрейфовал назад. Определенно имеет красный ц
Vorremmo un'altra conferma: quando abbiamo chiuso la valvola di sfiato del tunnel su / DELTA-P, leggevamo circa 1,7 - 1,75, e ora è salito lentamente fino a circa - oh, direi un po' meno di 2,2. Sembra che si mantenga lì. C'è un ritardo nel sistema
알겠습니다. 4일차 첫 번째 식
はい。明るさはまだ十分です。1～2段絞
Хорошо. Начнём с теста номер 1, и не могли бы вы проверить, находится ли переключатель режима NORMAL S-диапазона в положении
Okay. Thank y
Ja. Ich glaube nicht, dass wir tatsächlich Probleme mit der Kopffreiheit hatten. Ich hatte das Gefühl, genügend Kopffr
C'est exact. Je ne roule pas du tout sur cette voile. Bon, j'ai e
不，我们都在这儿吃
Roger, ja, bin ich. In etwa 10 oder 15 Minut
알겠습
Roger. Ich möchte Sie daran erinnern, dass der Horizon Sc
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अब रंग बेहतर दिख रहा है। यह स्पष्ट हो रहा है। हम इस पर थोड़ा और बेहतर फोकस करने की कोशिश कर सकते हैं। लीजिए, अब फोकस काफी बेहतर हो गया है
Columbia, qui Houston. Potresti per favore darci il comando ACCEPT? Abbiamo un carico per te. Pausa. Eag
रॉजर। 50 मिनट और 18 सेकंड। आपके रेडि
I was sure everybody was jumping up and down o
ठीक है, कुंभ राशि; ह्यूस्टन। अब आप एक-एक करके आ रहे हैं। कृपया ध्यान दें कि मैंने शुरुआती मानों और
Ja, du solltest es dir besser
مرحباً، فريندشيب سفن. فريندشيب سفن، كوم تك. انت
Roger. Understand. I was looking where auto optics was tracking, on the average, and understand that it should 
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Je n'avais rien dit à ce moment-là. Nous sommes en train de trouver des solutions pour vous. Concernant votre question précédente sur la gestion des cycles de sommeil, nous partageons votre avis. Nous souhaitons rectifier le tir en ce qui concerne les cycles de sommeil et autres aspects du plan de vol d'ici notre arrivée en orbite lunaire. Nous vous demandons donc de bien vouloir évaluer la manière la plus efficace d'intégrer les cycles de sommeil et de les répartir entre vous. Nous aimerions que vous nous teniez informés des tâches de chacun et de vos projets. Nous avons un cycle de sommeil décalé de deux heures. Nous aimerions rattraper le retard. Nous pouvons également ajuster l'horaire d
休斯顿，加油！阿波罗8
私は、トランスレーション コントロールによる飛行姿勢に慣れすぎていて、ACA ではそれができない
안
해외 소식을 전해드리자면, 서울과 인천항을 연결하는 한국 최초의 고속도로가 당신의 아폴로 여행을 기념하여 아폴로 고속도로로 명명되었습니다. 어젯밤에도 말씀드렸듯이 닉슨 대통령은 이미 세계 일주를 시작했으며, 오늘은 첫 번째 방문지인 샌프란시스코에 도착해 있습니다. 이후 미 해군 함정 호넷호에 탑승하여 당신의 우주선 귀환을 지켜볼 예정입니다. 닉슨 대통령은 이번 순방에서 루마니아를 포함한 7개국을 방문할 계획입니다. 아시다시피 어제는 비 때문에 올스타 야구 경기를 보지 못했지만, 
My window's not in the light anymore, and I still don't see the stars. If there's any possibility in the world to see stars in the daylight and horizon at the same time, I'm in the position right now where I should be able to do it. And don't have the sun on the nose of the spacecraft. It's on the bottom. I can see the bo
Roger. Par simple curiosité pour Bill, nous pouvons dire quelques mots sur les résistances chauffantes des cuves cryogéniques, ainsi que sur les ventilateurs. Nous avons constaté que les résistances fonctionnent normalement, s'allumant et s'éteignant par cycles. Au fil du temps, la fréquence de ces cycles augmente, ce qui indique une légère stratification dans les cuves. Lorsque nous mettons les ventilateu
11, Houston. Neil, nach deiner abschließenden Bemerkung zum Fernseher fragten wir uns, ob du ihn ausschalten würdest. Es klang so, als würdest du vielleicht darüber nachdenken, ihn wieder einzuschalten. Wir überlegen, ob wir die Leitungen offen lassen so
And if you should
バーンアティチュードに何か問題があります。ボールの測定値が正しくなく、針は中央に表示されています。何が間違っているのかよくわかりません
Another little of local news: the County Court House at Huntsville burned down before dawn yesterday, so it looks like they will go in the construction business there again. On the got a little bit about the waiting families. This one is by Ann James, Post reporter. "We rest on the backside of the moon," said Valerie Anders on Christmas Eve, as she and her family waited for Apollo 8 to get out of the moon orbit and head back toward home. Mrs. Anders had been 00 a.m. Tuesday, and neighbors had just collected all the youngsters so the family could get some rest while the spacecraft was behind the moon and out of communication. Colonel Frank Borman's home was decorated with four big evergreen wreaths outdoors and sprinkled with powdery snow and decorated with red bows. A tree in the den awaits his safe return, and his pretty blond wife Sue and husky sons, Frederick and Edwin, plan to stay home for the midnight blast out of moon orbit. Ordinarily, they would attend midnight services at St. Christopher's Episcopal Church. The plans were for the family 00 a.m. Since there are no young children in the Borman home, family Christmas gift giving will simply wait until Colonel Borman comes back with his fantastic holiday gift of the flight to the moon and back. Marilyn Lovell's four youngsters will have an absolutely normal Christmas as far as the kids are concerned, the busy wife of Captain Lovell reported; but talking about presents was out because two of them were sitting right there next to her. "I haven't even had time to change my clothes that I wore last night," Mrs. Lovell said. Adult-to-adult gifts, however, and the Christmas tree will still be right there when Lovell comes home. Here is a good one on the Action Line. There is a little letter to the Action editor. It says, "We intended to pay you Earthlings a surprise visit by a flying saucer last night. We got scared off by some crazy antics of a fat man and a sleigh and three guys in a rocket-powered bucket drag racing around the moon. Is that any way to run a planet?" Signed the boys from Mars. Frank, it looks like the only 
753 um 09:00 - 11:09 Uhr - Sonne direkt am Horizont. Wir hatten mit der 
こんにちは、ムチア、こんにちは、ムチア・カプ・コム。こちらはシグマ・セブン。HF。聞こえます
Хорошо, Джек. Я хотел бы передать вам схему подключения переключателей на криогенных кислородных баллонах и объяснить, почему. Сейчас мы просим вас перевести переключател
حسنًا، كما تعلم، تم ضبط وضع التحكم على الانجراف. الوضع المُختار هو الوضع العادي، التلقائي، مع تثبيت الجيروسكوبات. لقد اخترت وضعية العودة إلى الغلاف الجوي. أنا بالطبع في وضع ال
不行。我得下去倒掉那些磁带，等我
ठीक है, जिम। पैंतरेबाज़ी पैड: उद्देश्य मध्यमार्ग-7 है। है। उपलब्ध नहीं है। HA उपलब्ध नहीं है। HP +0020.5 है। DELTA-V R 0019
밴스 씨, 저희 요금을 모니터링해 주시고, 언제쯤 안정될 것 같은지 대략적인
了解、バズ。今の姿勢は、出発するには都合が良い。この姿勢で十分だ。それでは、チャーリーとデルタのク
D'accord, Fred. On vous reçoit parfaitement. Bien. On prépare une procédure pour vous: un contrôle solaire sera effectué dans environ 74 heures, soit un peu plus de 3 heures. Il s'agira d'un cran d'arrêt 2. Nous vous fournirons une procédure détaillée sous peu, qui inclura une nouvelle désignation du radar de rendez-vous pour le libérer et une manœuvre d'assiette. Si le contrôle est correct à 1 degré près, votre plateforme devrait être prête pour la manœuvre sans problème. Dans le cas contraire, nous mettons au point une procédure d'alignement Terre/Soleil pour aligner la plateforme, et nous vous la communiquero
老鹰，你读过哥伦比亚大学
حسنًا يا تشارلي. نحن نرسل الآن، ودعنا ن
Roger. Parfait. Vos doigts d'or sont devenus si rapides que nous avons raté quelques repères lors de la transmission. Je me demandais: si vous les aviez notés manuellement, pourriez-vous nous lire vos trois 
Très bien, je vais le chercher, Buzz. Laisse-moi prendre ces poignées optiques. Je crois que je ne pensais pas vraime
누구도 자기 권리를 주장할 수 없다 -
All set. Okay. You saw what difficulties I was having. I'll try to watch your from underneath
ロジャー、こちらフレンドシップ7です。ヨー操縦を開始します。40秒ほど遅れています。ただいまヨー
- - per la correzione 
Nein. Nein, ich glaube nicht, ab
Questa è Friendship Seven. Tutte queste piccole particelle; ce ne sono migliaia; e non provengono dalla capsula. Sono qualcosa che è già lassù perché sono sparse in tutto il cielo. Le ve
ジム、了解。中間コースで使用する手順の説明として、手動噴射を行います。姿勢制御とエ
क्वाड बी 76 प्रतिशत, 233 पा
Водолей, мы видим, что у тебя повышается температура гликоля. Если хочешь, можешь немного повысить её, или попробуй установить клапан регулировки температуры ко
D'accord, Jim. Juste une petite introduction à la procédure que nous allons utiliser à mi-parcours: il s'agira d'une manœuvre manuelle. L'attitude et l'allumage/l'extinction du moteur seront contrôlés manuellement. Nous avons maintenant une bonne trajectoire sur vous, mais il s'avère que votre incidence est un peu tro
Nous savons que de nombreux scientifiques de différents pays attendent avec impatience de voir les échantillons lunaires, et nous pensions que vous serie
はい、はい。その後、PR
Roger, tu perds du terrain. On est à peu près à zéro. Flight préférerait que tu envisages de passer à la position 3 après avoir évalué la position 8 un peu plus 
Hello, hello, Canary Cap Com, Aurora Seven. Reading you loud and clear; HF. Transmitting HF. How do you re
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Понял. Мы рекомендуем использовать широкоугольный объектив для этого конкретного телесъёмочного цикла. Вы можете использовать телеобъектив с той же конфигурацией, что и во вчерашнем телешоу. Однако мы рекомендуем широкоугольный объектив. Шаг номер 1: приклейте единственный красный фильтр к красному фильтру на дер
Okay sep. That's good.... command
जेमिनी VIII, गुआयमास CAP COM। हम आपको ज़मीन पर जाने 
收到。你收到
Oh, Vance, do you want to stay in this attitude for a certain length of time bef
Гавайи, Близнецы 4. Вы
كان هناك المزيد من تلك الجزيئات الصغي
हाँ। इससे कुछ बढ़
阿波罗11号，这里
Ok. Logica sequenziale, due. Logica sequenziale 1 
कोलंबिया, ये 
Bene, facciamolo: rimetti
좋습니다. 1번 첫 번째 줄에서 "And VHF-A"를 지우세요. 두 번째 줄에서는 "SIMPLEX operation"을 지우세요. 세 번째 줄에서는 "Prime"을 지우세요. "Prime"은 PRIME POWER AMP, OFF를 의미합니다. 이 "PRIME"을 "OFF"로 바꿔야 합니다. 이 줄에서 "PRIME"이 두 번째입니다. 또한 세 번째 줄의 마지막 단어 "OFF"를 지우고 "PCM"으로 바꾸세요. 네 번째 줄은 괜찮습니다. 다섯 번째 줄인 "VHF VOICE, ON, OFF, OFF"를 지우세요. 다음 줄인 "Lighting, FLOODS"는 "OFF"로 하고, "Or OVERHEAD/FORWARD prefer OFF"를 추가하세요. 좋습니다. 2단계는 그대로 두세요. 지금은 변경하지 마세요. 잠시 기다리세요. 2단계는 건너뛰세요. 하지 마세
41 minutes. Nous passons au scanner principal sur Horizon Scan et il n'y a pas de différence notable dan
كان بالتأكيد أسفل مني. كنت أتابعه أسفل مني منذ كارنارفون تقريبًا. حتى كارنارفون تقريبًا، كان أسفلنا، ثم ارتفع إلى الأفق، ثم عاد أسفلنا مرة أخرى. بدا وكأنه في مدار مختلف عن مداري. كان له أوج وحضيض مختلفان عن مداري. على أي حال، حاولت الاقتراب منه عند الفجر حالما تمكنت من تحديد موقعه. كما قلت، في ذلك الوقت كان على بعد ميل أو ميلين أمامي - أسفل مني. لذا، كلما حاولت الاقتراب منه، قلّت المسافة التي قطعتها. كنت أطلق الصواريخ عكسيًا. كنت أستخدم محركات الدفع العلوية لإطلاقها بطريقة تقلل من سرعتي الإجمالية، ثم أطلقها... في الوقت نفسه. لم أتمكن من الاقتراب منه أبدًا، واستمر في الابتعاد عني. أصبح من الواضح لي أنه بحلول الوقت الذي نصل فيه إلى هاواي، فإن الاقتراب من الصاروخ المعزز في الوقت المناسب للقيام بالنشاط خارج المركبة معه سيستهلك على الأرجح كل الوقود الموجود على متن المركبة. اتفقنا في القواعد الأساسية على عدم القيام بذلك. لذا تواصلت مع مركز قيادة المركبة الفضائية، وقررنا عدم المضي قدمًا في جزء الصاروخ المعزز من المهمة. لا أدري إن كنت قد ذكرت ذلك، ولكن عندما انفصلنا عن الصاروخ المعزز، بدا أن معدلات دوراننا عليه منخفضة، حوالي نصف درجة في الثانية في كل من الميل والانعراج. حاولتُ تخفيف هذه المعدلات. أطلقتُ نبضة واحدة في كل اتجاه، ثم ركزتُ على الانفصال عن الصاروخ المعزز. انفصلنا، وانفصلنا بالطريقة التي ولّدنا بها بعض المعدلات الأخرى. عدنا إلى وضعنا الصحيح في النهاية، واستدرنا. ربما استغرق الأمر دقيقة ونصف أو دقيقتين. يبدو أن المشك
彼女は、私と
Okay. Ich
Apollo 8, Houston. W
لا أعرف إن كنتم تستطيعون سماعي على جهاز VHF، لكن صوتكم يبدو
ダウンリンクで情
أبول
Да. Хорошо, давление кислорода сейчас упало до 925, и мы находимся на высокой скорости подачи кислорода
Roger. Compris, nous restons pour T3. Restez en 
알겠습니다. AUTO 선택 스위치에서 쿼드 알파와 브라보를 활성화하고, 찰리와 델타는 비활성
Ich habe noch ein Stück Frü
Roger. Tu reviens un peu fatigué. On dirait que notre capteur de débit d'oxygène est devenu bien plus défectueux. Je viens
I am chang
Okay, Aquarius. Our tracking data shows that since the helium dump, our entry angle has not changed from its value of 6.24 and somebody calculated that if we had a propulsive vent, that helium could roughly, at the maximum, only impart a DELTA-V of a half a foot per second or less, anyway. But we're continuing to track and as soon as we get some more info, we'll pass i
オート燃料は80パーセント、マニュアル燃料は100パーセント、メインO2は69パーセ
阿波罗8
حسنًا يا فرانك. ها قد فهمنا. الصوت 
Roger, Elliot. We are... first burn in... mode ... adjust alining... certainly looks beaut
你的手表呢？你的秒
T
آمل أن يكون الجميع قد فحصوا هذا الأمر بدقة متناهية. أحد أهم أهدافنا هو الحصول على مركبة فضائية مثالية قبل ال
了解。マイク、他にいくつか
روجر. لدينا بعض التغييرات على قواعد المهمة، لا يُسمح لك بالهبوط، يا
OK, c'est bon. Je suis dedans; l'assiette est correcte; les gyroscopes sont normaux; le commutateur de manœuvre est sur la position « arrêt ». Je chauffe le circuit de dérivation TR-10 pour les gyroscopes de vitesse. Le mod
Okay. Bedienfel
Okay. Looking over the weather I gave you was - the 2000 foot scattered at the target point may have a 6000 foot broken layer above that. At the 
मुझे 
Ap
ضغط ال
好的。你的二级辐射输入温度，我给你的是70到72度左右；辐射输出温度大约是30度；乙二醇蒸发温度读数大约是65度；蒸汽压力满刻度高，乙二醇排​​放压力大约是9磅/平方英寸。二级蓄能器（宇航服）显示大约52度；舱室大约58度；压力，宇航服读数4.1，舱室读数5。二氧化碳分压略高于1，大约1.1。在房屋侧面，温度是72度，氦气读数3500；氮气A读数2300；氮气B大约2450。燃料读数大约是165；燃料电池1，两个都关闭了，它们没有反应；皮肤温度405度；冷凝器排气量程较低。燃料电池 2 - 目前氧气或氢气流量读数在 0.13 到 0.14 之间，氧气流量目前处于满量程高位，但会根据推进器活动而波动，这也导致主总线 A 电压从稳定的 1.1V 左右波动到满量程高位。TSKIN 约为 445，冷凝器排气量程 17（更正为
Хорошо. Обновление карты на 5/6, восход солнца, нулевой меридиан, закат; -1, время ближайшего сближения с целью B-1. Те
Bene. Ho preso tutto quel materiale 
ヒューストン、アポロ11号です。アフリカ大陸が
OK. Moins 04402 moins 00001 plus 48387 178 169 359, non applicable, plus 00185 48587 603 48383 06 2027 250, centre terrestre 0123 - bas 123; je répète, bas 123, droite 22 plus 21123 moins 03000 12313 34494, nord, étoiles, roulis 068, tangage 097, l
और मैंने सोचा कि मैं यहाँ लगभग 5 सेकंड का समय लेकर देखूँ कि क्या मैं 000 को हटा सकता हूँ, क्योंकि हम अभी गिम्बल लॉक के काफी क
T
حسنًا. بقية تحديثك كانت أنه لا بأس إذا كان الضغط بين
मुझे थोड़ा क्षितिज दिखा
哥伦比
Roger. 
ठीक है। अगला पृष्ठ बिल्कुल वैसा ही है, बस एक छोटी सी बात अलग है: R1 में हमें प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट मिली है। इसके अलावा बाकी सब कुछ एक जैसा ही है, और तीसरे पृष्ठ में कुछ बदला
こちらシ
Vous avez dit que la t
هذه هي ال
Houston, Houston, hier spricht Apoll
在登月舱里，这是相机的盖子。好好想想——
Comprenez que vous êtes prêt. Zone 9-Bravo. C'est GET RC, 13:19:36; 400K = 20 + 25; inclinaison inverse = 26 + 13; tous ces angles d'inclinaison, pour toutes ces mises à jour, seront de 90 degrés: GET RC, 14:17:05; 400K = 20 + 32; inclinaison inverse = 25 + 54. 11-2: GET RC, 52:02; 400K = 20 
罗杰。吉姆之前关于日出时星体边缘亮度的描述引起了我们这里很多人的兴趣。我们想问问他，如果他有机会再次观察，或者他能回忆起来，星体的外观是否有任何变化。例如，他是否注意到星体闪烁，或者在日出前10到20秒内，星体边缘是否有明显的增亮现象？
Wilco, Apollo 8. Tout d'abord, si vous le pouvez, nous aimerions avoir le
Roger, 11. Non dobbiam
У вас получились хорошие
هذا صحيح
쌍둥이
Houston, Colombie. J'ai terminé mes manœuvres. J'ai activé l'accélération maximale 
38-デルタ 100. 2+07. 01 49 14. 1
यह कैनावेरल कैप कॉम है, जो एचएफ का परीक्षण कर रहा है। जीएमटी 15:52:05, मार्क। मैंने कैप्सूल नहीं पढ़ा। केप, बाह
Roger, and VI on your OAMS status, your fuel
पिच पर 115 डिग्री। वो गेंद
ठीक है, जैक। दो हैं - एक स्विच और एक सर्किट ब्रे
Я попытаюсь ввести ваши данные на +44 и использовать это время работы двигателя. Я заметил, что скорость входа немного завышена. Возможно, у нас не получится сделать всё как обычно, но мы п
罗杰。你说的是内墙。那是指北面的内边缘
Das wird schon funkt
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. Thirty-minute report follows: Head movements cause no nausea or no bad feelings at all. I am surprised that I can look as close to the sun as I can; the sun is shining directly on my face at present time, and all I have to do is to shade my eyes with my eyebrow. All fuse switches are still as previously reported on left panel. Mode Select is normal, auto, gyro normal: Squib is armed, Auto Retrojettison is off. All "T" handles are in except manual and I have it pulled so that I can immediately go to manual as a backup in case the malfunctions further
好的。这是机组人员状态报告。辐射情况：CD
फिर से कहिए। हम रीएक्यू (REACQ) में हैं - ऑटो रीएक्यू 
Ok, Joe, circa 76 ore e immagino tu abbia frainteso. La mia domanda era: qual era il percorso di ritorno, quando sono arrivato per la prima volta al... e 
هذا سيجما سفن. على تردد HF. هذا سيجما سفن. على تردد HF. سأقوم بعدّ قصير. هذا للتحقق من تغطية HF على النطاق العالمي. مدة الإرسال 60 ثانية. أتمنى لو أعرف ماذا أقول لأشغل الوقت. ربما يساعدني التنفس بعمق. الكبسولة تعمل بشكل ممتاز، وأعتقد أننا على وشك الانتهاء من 60 ثانية. نستخدم HF للإرسال والتسجيل على النطاق العالمي. وهذا
罗杰。这只
ठीक है। पृष्ठ 
أعتقد أنني أخطأت قليلاً في تقديري سابقاً، حين ظ
ह्यूस्टन
……云。它们看起来像层云，但确实对天气有
Хорошо, Хьюстон; 13. В ответ на вопрос 1, изменения уровня шума происходили главным образом между первой ступенью и остальными ступенями — уровень шума на остальных ступенях был примерно одинаковым, очень тихим, а первая ступень, конечно, вначале издавала довольно много шума, который нарастал во время высокого значения Q,
아주 좋습니다. 전부 정확하고, 복사할 준비가 되면 언제든지 
Buzz 会想
알겠습니
Apollo 11, Houston. Contrôle VHF sur Simplex Alfa. Terminé
D'accord. Je l'ai 
हम स्वीकार क
При выполнении ПРОГРАММЫ 52 мы получили СИГНАЛ ТРЕВОГИ ПРОГРАММЫ 401, который указывал на то, что если мы продолжим, т
Roger. La serie di crepe o faglie che le attraversano scende di circa tre gradini verso sud. La faglia parallela a nord presenta un dislivello al centro. Spero che tutti voi laggiù sulla Terra possiate capire cosa intendiamo quando diciamo che si tratta di un orizzonte piuttosto minaccioso, un luogo piuttosto buio e dall'aspetto poco invitante. Ora stiamo sorvolando uno dei nostri futuri siti di att
Helium tan
كل شيء يبدو جيداً على ا
Et j'ai votre correcteur de mi-parcours numéro 2 PAD lorsque vous serez pr
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 1분 남았습니다. 어
Вы уже что-нибудь ели
호넷. 로
Джим, и в симуляторе с нашей конфигурацией, которая у нас здесь была, всё работает о
Э
Ricevuto. Il tuo MAX g, 063; il tuo, il tuo Gamma, a 400K, 
ليس الجو حارًا بشكل
舱内通风口向下（打开）。呼
जेमिनी 4, आरकेवी सर्जन। कफ पूरी तर
Okay. The only thing I don't understand about that is why it took off at the rate it did. What rate should it have taken off
ठीक है, जैक। मैं इसे तुम्हें पढ़कर सुनाता हूँ, फिर कुछ 
水瓶座
Ich verstehe, dass 
这个在上
好了，这是你的血压。我喝了大约
अभी तक
好的，没错。我们翻到第3页，第3页第一个，TOWER J
了解しました。T/Mさんによると、太平洋通過中に燃料電池の酸素・水素ヒーターのブレーカーが開いたそうですが、デイ
Ok. Le temperature del tuo pacco b
E un'altra domanda, Houston. Vuoi davvero t
罗杰，
네, 아폴로 8호. 통신 성능에 대한 정확한 수치를 알려드리기에는 아직 조금 이릅니다. 예상대로 잘 작동하는 것 같고, 다른 부분들도 전반적으로 개선되고 있는 것 같으
알겠습니다, 잭. 상황이 좀 이상하게 흘러가는 것 같네요. 잠깐 다른 얘기가 나왔는데, 자세, 특히 음높이가 문제인 것 같습니다. 지금 확인해 보겠습니다. 지난번에 달이 공전했을 때는 각도보다 훨씬 위에 있었는데, 지금 지구가 공전하고 있는 걸 보니 상당히 낮게 위치하고 있네요. 두 천체가 앞뒤로 진동하는데, 
Apollo 11, Houston. C
Roger. Gémeaux VI, chirurgien à Houst
그리고 프레드, 16번 패널에 고속 차
Roger. Questo nostro viaggio sulla Luna potrebbe esserti sembrato semplice o facile. Vorrei assicurarti che non è stato così. Il razzo Saturn V che ci ha portato in orbita è un macchinario incredibilmente complesso, ogni cui componente ha funzionato alla perfezione. Questo computer sopra la mia testa ha un vocabolario di 38.000 parole, ognuna delle quali è stata scelta con cura per essere del massimo valore per noi, l'equipaggio. Questo interruttore che ho in mano ora, ha oltre 300 controparti solo nel 
저는 전화하지 않았어
Roger. Sigma Seven. Cape Cap Com. Auto
SPS/G&N: 36639; ваш, минус 072, плюс 051; ваш, 135 24 4000;, плюс 32178, плюс 0
396 033, вниз 054, влево 21, плюс 08 1
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل. حسناً. واجهة الدخول عند الساعة 142 و40 دقيقة؛ قبل ذلك بست ساعات ونصف تقريباً، سنبدأ كل هذا بتشغيل الطاقة الحرارية، من خلال فحص درجات حرارة وحدة التحكم وتسخينها مسبقاً إذا لزم الأمر، ونعتقد أننا سنحتاج إلى القيام بذلك. سنُقدم إجراءات مُفصلة لاحقاً. قبل ذلك بست ساعات تقريباً، سنبدأ بتشغيل وحدة التحكم باستخدام قائمة التحقق المُعدلة لمدة 30 دقيقة، والتي استخدمتموها في منتصف الدورة السابق. ثم بعد ذلك بقليل، قبل خمس ساعات تقريباً، سنطلب منكم اتخاذ وضعية مُحاذاة محور الجسم، باستخدام خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار على الأرض كما فعلنا من قبل. وبمجرد حصولنا على ذلك، سننفذ -7، وهو ما يبدو الآن وكأنه احتراق بمعدل قدمين في الثانية أو حوالي 15 ثانية. وقد أُبلغتُ أنه انخفض إلى قدم ونصف الآن، لذا فهو ضمن الحدود الآمنة. حسنًا. عند القيام بذلك، سنبدأ فورًا المناورة للوصول إلى وضعية إطلاق وحدة الخدمة، والتي ستكون في مستوى الطائرة لأننا نُطلقها أبكر من المعتاد. لسنا بحاجة، ولا نرغب، في وجود عنصر خارج مستوى الطائرة. لذا ستكون في مستوى الطائرة مع توجيه وحدة الخدمة للخارج على طول متجه نصف القطر. سنبدأ بعد ذلك في تجهيز وحدة القيادة لوحدة الخدمة SEP، بما في ذلك فحص وحدة القيادة وإطلاق النار الساخن، وقبل حوالي 4 ساعات و30 دقيقة من الإطلاق، سنُطلق وحدة الخدمة. سنرفع الطائرة حتى نحصل على وحدة الخدمة في... ونحاول التقاط بعض الصور، لكننا لن نُجري مناورات تحويلية لالتقاط الصور لأننا لا نريد إفساد زاوية مسار الطيران في ذلك الوقت. حسنًا. هذا يُعطينا ساعتين تقريبًا من الوقت المتاح هنا للانتهاء، إذا تأخرنا في ذلك، للانتقال إلى قائمة التحقق والاستعداد لتشغيل وحدة القيادة. سنبدأ التشغيل الكامل لوحدة القياد
केप। ज़मीन पर हमारी मेमोरी लोडिंग से पुष्टि होती है कि आपकी
ठीक है। उन स्विचों में से किसी एक के पास खड़े हो जाओ। हम उन्हें एक मिनट में चालू कर देंगे
सामान्य जानकारी के लिए, 11, आप अब पृथ्वी से 95,970 मील दूर
好的。中期修正第7次，/: 31600，不适用，不适用，减去00014，加上五个零，加上00001。到目前为止你都
참고로 이 해먹들은 정말 편안합니다. 아폴로 설계 당시에는 필요 없다고 생각했지만, 실제로 사용
收到。你现在在UHF高频段
D'accord. Et à ce moment-là, vous devrez effec
让他们看看昨天收到的东西。他一点
Okay. Ich habe den Leistungsverstärker ausgeschaltet, die Sprachausgabe deaktiviert, die PCM-Bitrate auf niedrig eingestellt und den UPDATA
...प
이 고도에서 바라보
GET RC 25 15
للعلم، 
Fred, Houst
Apollo 11, Ho
Qui è l'Apollo 11. Cont
Roger. Wir stimmen zu und würden es uns sehr wünschen, e
好的。按照你告诉杰克的步骤
Определенно, он был подо мной. Я следил за ним примерно с Карнарвона. До Карнарвона он был ниже нас, затем поднялся к горизонту, а потом снова опустился ниже. Казалось, что он находится на другой орбите, чем я. У него были другие апогей и перигей, чем у меня. В любом случае, я попытался сблизиться с ним на рассвете, как только смог определить его местоположение. Как я уже сказал, в тот момент он был в миле или двух передо мной — внизу. Поэтому, чем больше я пытался сблизиться, тем меньше мне удавалось его догнать. Я работал в ретроградном режиме. Я использовал верхние двигатели, чтобы уменьшить общую скорость, и одновременно... тоже. Я так и не сблизился, и он продолжал отдаляться от меня. Мне стало очевидно, что к тому времени, как мы добрались до Гавайев, чтобы сблизиться с ускорителем и совершить выход в открытый космос с его помощью, вероятно, потребуется все имеющееся на борту топливо. В правилах полета мы договорились этого не делать. Я связался с CAP COM, и мы решили отказаться от выполнения части миссии, связанной с ускорителем. Не знаю, упоминал ли я об этом, но когда мы отделились от ускорителя, казалось, что наши показатели тангажа и рыскания были низкими, порядка половины градуса в секунду. Я попытался их сгладить. Я выпустил по одному импульсу в каждом направлении, а затем сосредоточился на отделении от ускорителя. Мы отделились, и отделились так же, как и при других показателях. В конце концов, мы выровнялись и развернулись. Вероятно, это заняло около полутора или двух минут. Похоже, главная проблема заключалась во времени, которое я потратил на полувыравнивание платформы перед тем, как мы перешли на тёмную сторону. Мы, вероятно, мгновенно оказались прямо над ускорителем. Если бы я проигнорировал платформу, мы смогли бы продолжить и завершить миссию. С другой стороны, я хотел убедиться, что у
١١، هيوستن. نواجه مشكلة في الاتصال. لهذا السب
Mais j'ai envie de sortir et de prendre de belles photos. Ça ne me suffit pas. Bon, je descends en douceur sous le v
Ich glaube schon, Ken. Dieses Lichtband verläuft parallel zur M-Linie, und ich vermute, es hängt mit der Konstruktion der Optik zusammen, genauer gesagt mit dem rechteckigen Eingang von außen. Bei diesem speziellen Sonnenwinkel verläuft es genau quer dar
यह सही है। ठीक है, तो हम टनल वेंट पर वापस जाकर /CM DELTA-P की जाँच करेंगे और सुनिश्चित करेंगे कि यह दबाव बनाए रख रहा है। फिर हम वापस आकर हैच की अखंडता की जाँच और टनल वेंट की सभी प्रक्रियाओं को आपके साथ दोहराएँगे। अगली चीज़ जो मैं पढ़ना चाहता हूँ वह है -1 
चलिए, रीएंट्री रेट कमांड का इस्तेमाल करके देख
Хорошо, Джек, теперь у меня 
Ricevuto. I Cowboys sono stati distrutti ieri dai Cleveland Browns. L'equipaggio del Pueblo dovrebbe essere rilasciato. E ora ho sentito dire che il nostro volo aria-terra ha un sacco di rumore di fondo. Pronti a partire; esamineremo queste modalità di 
D'accord. Ensuite, CB CTE, MAIN B, à fermer. Puis, panneau 250: CB BAT C BAT CHARGE/2 à fermer; CB BAT C POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING à fermer. Ensuite, panneau 275: CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B, à fermer; CB INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B, à fermer. D'accord. Au fait, tout ce que je vous ai donné jusqu'à présent n'est pas critique en termes de séquence, mais à partir de maintenant, cel
रॉजर, बिल। अगली बार जब इसे धूप में रखा जाएगा, तो हमें प्राथमिक इवेपोरेटर में कोई समस्या 
존 야들리는 내기에서 졌다. 기내 온도는 9
Should I open m
了解。
حسنًا. في الخطوة 5 من النموذج E-11، يوجد العنوان الفرعي الأول بعنوان "الخوذات والقفازات"، والبنود التي تليه تتأثر بارتداء البدلات الرسمية أو القمصان، ولكن يجب إتمامها. يجب أن تكون صمامات عودة ا
OK. Plus 1197 moins 16500 12681 35608, aligneme
待機する
로저. 믿기 어려우시겠지만, 저희는 이글호의 위치 레이더에 이상한 점들을 포착했고, 그게 저희가 가진 유일한 추측이었어요. 
Хорошо. Это 4-е обновление
11, ह्यूस्टन। हेलमेट बैग में रखे सामान के बारे में हमारी सलाह है - सुधार, हैच बैग में रखे सामान को निकालकर दाईं ओर के सोफे के नीचे स्लीप रिस्ट्रेंट में रख दें। इसका कारण यह है कि हैच बैग के स्ट्रैप केवल जीरो ग्रेविटी के लिए बने हैं, और इसे बांधना काफी मुश्किल 
Houston, Apollo 8. Roger. L'évaporateur primaire est en mode AUTO, le d
Le tue temperature sono buone, Fr
收到。1，G&N：38658，减 054，加 065，078 02 0345，加 29180，加 03779，减 01325；滚转 NA，俯仰 041；两台喷气式发动机，19 秒，未对接。4：
On nettoie tout. Je vais rester éveillé pour essayer de maintenir le vaisseau spatial à la verticale e
好的，迈克。当然，这是在G&N系统和发动机都出现故障，需要你进行恒载飞行的情况下进行的；我们想做的是将恒载飞行范围从1100英里扩展到1500英里。我们已经在模拟器中运行过这个程序，效果很好。基本上，我会讲解一遍——你先听一遍，如果有任何问题再回来。升力矢量保持不变，直到达到最大过载，然
了解。数量読み取りを
客室気圧は 6.0 
Okay. Area 27-
B
جيميني 4، كارنارفون، م
Voilà pour l'actualité internationale et nationale, ainsi que les reportages. Côté sport, Hank Stram, des Chiefs de Kansas City, a été nommé entraîneur de l'année de l'AFL. C'est la deuxième fois en trois saisons qu'il reçoit cette distinction. Le vote a été effectué par un panel de 30 journalistes et commentateurs sportifs de l'Associated Press, trois par ville. Le candidat le plus proche de lui était Weeb Ewbank. Parmi les autres entraîneurs ayant reçu des votes, on retrouve Sid Gilman de San Diego et Lou Sabin de Denver. Quant au match des étoiles universitaires Shriners d'hier, le Nord a battu le Sud 3 à 0. Dick Berlinsky, de Michigan State, a réussi un field goal de 23 yards au premier quart-temps, suffisant pour permettre au Nord de vaincre le Sud mercredi, lors du match des étoiles universitaires Shriners. À noter: les premières tentatives (Nord: 19, Sud: 16) et les courses (Nord: 214, Sud: 169). Le score à la passe était de 96 pour le Nord et 109 pour le Su
好的，乔。我——你的检查清
Gemin
RKV, Близнецы 4. Верните нам нашу ΔV еще раз. Повтори
好的。我们希望你进行通风——隧道通风，直到并添加以下内
제가 이 정도만 말하면 이 녹음기가 실시간으로 작동하는 데 그리 오래 걸리지 않을 겁니다. 곧 시작될 거예요. 당신은 지금 어떤 태도를 취하고 있든 전혀 신경 쓰지 
짐, 이제 참가하셔도 됩니다. 다만 TV 방송 시간은 여전히 ​​오후 5시 5분으로 고정되어 있으니 참고하시고, 저희는 참가하시는 동안 대기하고 있겠습니다. 산소 연료
Houston, Apollo 11. Could you confirm that pi
H
Möchten
क्या आपके पास 204 ह
ठीक है। वैंस, मुख्य कार्यक्रम के लिए तैयार र
Je peux l'obser
Okay
What's the 
يا نسر، هل أنت مستعد لنسخ نقطة Y الخاصة بك
收到。宇航服温度现在是7
Gol darn it. Just as you started tal
好的，杰克。回到我之前教你的电池充电步骤。要终止充电，你只需要在我给你的电路开关旁边写上“打开”或“关闭”。所以，在250号面板上，你已经打开了那个断路器；在275号面板上，逆变器电源-2主B，打开；在5号面板上，电池继电器总线BAT A，打开；传感器单元交流总线2，打开；传感器信号AC2，打开；电池充电器主B，打开；电池
네, 짐. 저희는 사령선에서 더 나은 별 관측을 위해 발사대 자세와는 다른 자세로 이동하는 것에 대해 이야기해 왔습니다. 저희가 부탁드리고 싶은 것은
今、地中海上空を飛んでいます。とても分かりやすいですね。数隻の大型船が見えます。ベイルートから出発しています。ベイルートのすぐ南を通過す
ヒューストン、アポロ1
जी हाँ, जैक। आपसे अनुरोध है कि इसे बंद करने से पहले, वोल्टेज और करंट की सामान्य रीडिंग ले लें; साथ ही, हमें समाप्ति का समय भी चाहिए
EMS 모드에서 대기 모드로
Das stimmt, Jim. Das ist die Version, die wir dir gestern Abend nach dem großen Brennvorgang gegeben haben, und wir verwenden sie in der von uns modifizierten Version. Wir haben das im Simulator getestet, und natür
Dico che semb
Houston, Columbia on OMNI 
你好，太平洋司令部舰艇。PC
알겠습니다. 롤 137, 피치 310, 요 34
حسنًا يا جيم، بهذا نكون قد انتهينا من إجراءات إيقاف التشغيل، ونحن بانتظارك لتبدأ ا
Ich glaube, wir haben einen Abschnitt ausgelas
ヒューストン、アポロ、もしくはヒュースト
حسنًا، عزم الدورا
Houston, Apollo 11. One of the larger craters on the back side - I noticed a small, dark speck on the outer wall and I put the monocular on it. I was able to see - oh, an area maybe a quarter of a mile in diameter. It was really a freshlooking dark colored pit, and that seems to be in contrast with all the other fresh little craters or holes that you can perceive on the walls of any of these craters. Around this particular one there seems to be two or three of these - especially the on
Okay. I know you're trying to be quiet, so I'll just read up some information to you. One of the things that we just turned up that might give you some confidence, if you lose oxygen cryo tank you have 80 pounds remaining now at / . The limiting factor on single tank operation right now is the hydrogen tank which has a positive margin at /, assuming our standard profile gives you about 143 hours. So it looks like you are over the hill on those. Notice that you're flying in the rate 2 position for you which is fine. Only make sure that you still wer
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。你可以继续运行37号程序，我们也会在地面上观察，看看结果如何。这里有一些关于轨道计算方面比较值得关注的数据。位置的不确定度大约是12英里。速度的不确定度大约是每秒四分之
알겠습니다, 짐. 한 시간 전처럼 '주의 및 경
Roger. Nous affichons une pression de carburant de 167, et de 163 dans le circuit AUX. Pensez-vous qu'il soit possible que nous ayons eu un déclenchement transitoire d'alerte concernant la pression du circuit AUX de carburant au début de la combustion, qui 
ヒューストン、コロンビア。オ
Tiens-toi prêt,
इससे मास्टर अलार्म फिर से चालू हो गया। अब यह लगातार बज रहा है, तो मैं इसे चालू ही रहने दूँगा। मुझे समझ नहीं आ रहा कि मुझे बिजली की समस्या क्यों आ रही है - ओह, मुझे या
Вэнс, по моим подсчетам, мы сделали около 10 снимков «земляного окна». Я не вижу здесь ничего, кроме закрытия вентиляцио
휴지를 구하려면 어디로
Roger. Wir haben hier unten auch PU-S
Poi vorremmo che posizionaste la macchina fotografica contro il finestrino in modo che... e la teneste in modo che il muso non sia nel campo visivo. Poi vorremmo due serie di fotografie. Vogliamo che siate in modalità Impulso e che la navicella spaziale sia puntata direttamente verso la Terra. Questa sarà... vi darò il tempo di avviarla. Ma sarà rivolta alla Terra Nera sul lato notturno. E poi date un impulso in su... un impulso in su e ottenete una foto con gli otturatori della macchina fotografica aperti in posizione Bulb. E poi, mentre risalite attraverso l'orizzonte, scattate un'altra f
As I said before, everything looks very good here. Surgeon is after me here fo
Roger. Going back on. Yaw check okay. Can pick up yaw fairly well in the scope. It's a little different display than I had really anticipated, but it checks okay, and I can pick up yaw. I have to be about 5° or so in yaw before I reall
Да, я бы сказал... Возможно, Чарли. Подожди здесь. Мы теб
Apollo 8, Houston. Apollo 8, Houston in the blind. We've lost all data on you and request you select us a good OMNI
짐? 두 분 모두 현재 상태가 아주 좋고 심전도 검사 결과도 모두 정상입니다. 수분 섭취량도 충분히 늘
रॉजर। चरण 1, 2 और 3 को छोड़ दें; चरण 4 को पूर
روجر. تم التحقق من Canary وTS Plus 5. يعمل الوضع اليدوي بشكل جيد على جميع المحاور. يعمل كل من نظام التحكم الإلكتروني (Fly-by-wire) والوضع التلقائي بشكل جيد على جميع المحاور. يعمل نظام التخميد الإضافي (Aux Damp) بشكل جيد أيضًا. ان
D'acc
Ok, "meno 0
Сейчас я на высоте около 1500 футов. Основной парашют по-прежне
Понял. Нужно контролировать количество жидкости во вторичном аккумуляторе. Шаг 2: подача вторичного гликоля к радиаторному клапану, в обычном режим
حسنًا يا فانس. تقول إننا يجب أن نبدأ في وضع الاستعداد (PREP) في كتاب الطوارئ عند حوالي الساعة 10:00، وسأناقش هذا الأمر مع جيم بعد قليل 
Колумбия, Игл. Как вы чит
Pronti per il rapporto delle 17:00. Il carburante è a 89-90. L'ossigeno a 56-75 (psi, in centinaia). L'ingresso della tuta è... La temperatura della cupola è a 70 (gradi). La temperatura della cupola del
Die Antwort auf die Frage lautet: Ja, wir planen, beides zu verwenden. Bevor wir uns jedoch mit der Boilerpumpe befassen, möchte CDR auch noch eine Seconal-Tablette nehmen, damit e
Tieni premuto... qui s
Итак,
؟: ١٢ ٥٣ ٠٠. تحدث إلى غوا
Хорошо, Джо. Я начал. Я перешел к варианту 3, и на дисплее - 1520 - 1525 я вызвал 
Okay. For attitude contro
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 저수지
Okay, Aquarius, we're recommending you go to AUTO. Let the thrusters fi
ठीक है - यह स्थिति चंद्रमा को देखने के लिए निर्धारित कोण पर स्थापित होने के बाद की बात है। जिम कहत
Ricevu
यह सही है, और उसी पृष्ठ पर, हमारे पिछले सही या जोड़ अभ्यास से, आपको "पुनः स्थापित करें" नामक एक अनुभाग मिलेगा
Okay, die Manöver zur Mondbeobachtungsposition, bei der sich der Mond im Zentrum der Optik des Kommandomoduls befindet, wobei diese auf Null 
I'm alining my attitudes. Everything is fine. I have part of the stowage checklist taken ca
네. 그들은 그 데이터를 얻었고, 객실이 쾌적하고 따뜻하며 온도계가 높은 온도를 
ठीक है। मुझे नहीं लगता कि इससे कोई नुकसान होगा। मेरा मानना ​​है कि हम कुछ ठोस निष्कर्ष निकालने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं ताकि उड़ान के बाद हमारे पास ज़मीनी स्तर पर किए गए काम से तुलना करने के लिए कुछ सटीक डेटा उपलब्ध हो सके और भविष्य में उसका उपयोग क
Apollo 8,
Das war NSR 
Rog
11, Houston. Das war eine gute Aufnahme von Panel 2. Jetzt haben
双子座4号，双子座4号，休斯
Und, Jack, da es eine ganze Weile dauern wird, bis wir wieder die alte Eins
मुझे खेद है, यह एक त्रुटि है। अपने टेप र
Роджер, Гавайи. Близнецы
इंजन बंद होने से ईंधन की खपत थोड़ी बढ़ गई - लगभग 10 सेकं
Хорошо, Джим. После того, как вы немного подкорректируете ориентацию, мы выполним выравнивание по оси тела, которое будет находиться на отметке 400 плюс 5. Если мяч в этот момент поднят, он переместится в точку 000. Мы можем поговорить подробнее о режимах управления позже, но, конечно, мы рекомендуем делать это в режиме УДЕРЖАНИЕ ПОЛОЖЕНИЯ. Переведите управление рысканием в режим УПРАВЛЕНИЯ, а управление тангажем и креном 
Okay. And the note says that you should be able to hear us. If we can't hear you in a couple of minutes, you should close the POWER AMP circuit breaker on panel 16, and we expect to save an amp or more on this. It should work in the present attitude. When we go to the new yaw attitude, we're thinking about powering up the steer
双子座4号，夏
Okay, Houston. Reading back 382, SECONDARY EVAPORATOR H2O CONTROL valve's OFF, and PRIMARY 
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다.
نريد تأكيدًا آخر، عندما أغل
कंप्यूटर चालू है और कोई खराबी की लाइट नहीं जल 
这是在即将到来的轨
حسنًا يا فانس. هذه وحدة التحكم لـ: فلتر مروحة المقصورة والحقيبة في؛ أكياس التطهير، باستثناء تلك التي نستخدمها لكاميرا التلفزيون، في؛ اثنين في؛ أربع علب LOiH [s
Hope 
Molto bene. Torniamo 
Роджер. Начнём с мировых новостей. Всеобщие поздравления американским астронавтам «Аполлона-8» и надежды на международное сотрудничество в освоении космоса сопровождались рождественскими посланиями, разосланными по всему миру, пока крошечный космический к
少しお待ちいただけますか？現時点
좋습니다.
Ok. Rileggo: monitorare la quantità nell'accumulatore secondario; valvola secondaria del radiatore del glicole, NORMALE
Хорошо. Теперь, после обслуживания модуля JETT, моя процедура будет заключаться в том, чтобы подняться, чтобы попытаться установить сервисный модуль так, чтобы центральное окно оказалось в поле зрения сервисного мод
Хорошо. И можете забыть про "Последующие действия". Итак, на странице 17 выполните все действия, и через 4 минуты у нас будет изменение. Первая строка: CB(16) ИНВЕРТОР 3, ЗАКРЫТЬ; строка 2: вычеркните "Выберите ИНВЕРТОР 1". Далее, после "МОНИТОР ПОЛОЖЕНИЯ", мы хотим, чтобы вы установили ШКАЛУ СКОРОСТИ на "25 градусов в секунду". Хорошо, еще через четыре строки до "БАЛАНСИРУЮЩАЯ ПАРА", мы хотим отключить "БАЛАНСИРУЮЩУЮ ПАРУ". Это нужно, чтобы предотвратить восходящее излучение форсунок на случай, если нам придется снизить скорость, хотя мы не думаем, что это потребуется. Затем выполните оставшуюся часть страницы, как написано.
わかりました。チェック
早上好。我们还有大约两分钟就
حسنًا. في 
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben ein Update zur automatischen Optik für Sie, falls Sie bereit sind, es 
Okay, sehr gut. Unter „Endgültige Verstauung“ steht auf Seite 1-5, Zeile 36, als erstes „Optiken“. Wenn Sie mit dem Verstauen beginnen möchten, lassen wir die Optiken bitte erst einmal weg, da die Sternenprüfung erst später ansteht. Den Rest kön
روجر، فهمت. للعلم فقط، ربما قرأتَها على الأرض. أجريتُ حساب ارتفاع نقطة الحضيض باستخدام متجه حالة النجم الذي استخدمناه في الملاحة، وحصلنا على ارتفاع 84.7 ميلًا بحريًا. ثم استخدمنا متجه حالتك الذي حدّثته لنا في الم
Clean the electrical switches out, Jim, whi
对计算机的准确
Хьюстон, мы собираемся выполнить автоматический маневр д
Aquarius, Houston. Du beobachtest den mittleren Gimbal dort, nicht wahr? Nur zu, Aqua
और क्या आप एफएओ से संपर्क करके पता लगा सकते हैं क
Roger. PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50, moins 00021, 182 287 000, plus 56919. Arrêt, moins de 10 minutes, 105 12 30.00. Arrêt, plus de 10 minutes, 103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00. Pas de plus 12: 102 44 27.00. Plus 01223, moins toutes les billes, plus 01889 01520 plus 00110 02250, temps de combustion 046 000 190, plus 01187, plus toutes les billes, plus 01911. NOUN 11 103 31 07.00. NOM 37 105 12 30.00. Prêt pour vos re
برج الدلو، ه
حسنًا يا مايك، ما حدث هو أنك كنت تراقب، وفي الخطوة 7 دخلت إلى N
아니요. 정확히 마이너스 2.
لدي ضوء خافت ج
حسنًا. تقول الملاحظة أنه يجب أن تتمكن من سماعنا. إذا لم نتمكن من سماعك خلال دقيقتين، فعليك إغلاق قاطع دائرة مضخم الطاقة في اللوحة رقم 16، ونتوقع توفير أمبير أو أكثر في هذه الحالة. من المفترض أن يعمل هذا في الوضع الحالي. عند الانتقال إلى وضع الانعراج الجديد، نفكر في تشغيل نظام التوجيه،
Хорошо, Джек. Это Джим. Я просто хочу убедиться, что вы фильтруете изменения в контрольном списке, которые появляются, чтобы убедиться, что они действительно необходимы. Когда мы изучаем наши процедуры, мы можем выполнить
3Cレトロタイムの準備
حسنًا. هذا هو الإعداد الذي نريدك أن تستخدمه، وإليك ما نفكر فيه. عندما انتقلنا إلى وضع الخزان 1 التلقائي، والخزان 2 المتوقف، وجدنا أن دورة التسخين ت
네, 궤적상의 이유로 방사형 상향을 원하며, 크기는 블로우다운 시 
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. يبدو لنا أننا نشاهد منظرًا من الخارج بالإضافة إلى جزء 
收到。好的。我已经把体温计放进你嘴里了。你想让我
Roger. Compris. OMNI Charlie. Mike, nous avons des nouvelles concernant le… Nous estimons qu'il a atterri à environ 6,5 km de la zone de lancement. Vos temps T1 et T2 sont mis à jour, si vous êtes prêt à l
Хорошо. Следующие три параметра такие же, а затем нам нужно, чтобы параметр «Сброс топлива» был установлен в 
Pouvons-nous faire autre chose pour vous, ou 
좋아요. 우리가 달에 좀 더 가까이 접근해서 최대한
13, Houston. Wir möchten Sie bitten, zusätzlich die Lüfter in O2-Tank 1 einzuschalten, und wir können die zusätzliche Stromstärke d
좋아, 네 위치를 알아냈
了解。それでも、あなたはG.E.T.で1秒遅いと表
Okay. You got it
Молодец! Давайте посмотрим, что касается AFL: сегодняшняя 
चार्ली, समस्या बस इतनी सी है कि इन टीवी स्टेजहैंड्स को पता ही नहीं है कि उनकी क्या भूमि
Роджер. Вы на
好的。嗯，对于几个小时后即将播出的这个电视节目，您不妨考虑一下您希望我们如何停下来，如果可以的话，为了获得最佳的高增益角度；另外，
और हम आपको स्टेट वेक्ट
- - guarda la luna davanti a noi, ch
Okay, Jack. Fangen wir oben an. Okay. Die Kryotanks: H2 1 zeigt 230 an, ebenso H2 2. Unser O2-Kryotank 1 scheint bei 300 g
Wenn es so ist, dann ist es definitiv so
Gemini 4, 
फोटो-1. इस समय पानी में छलांग लगाते हुए। तीनों पैराशूट अपनी जगह से हट गए हैं। वे पानी
쌍둥이자리 4, 아직 읽고 있
게인을 '높음'으로 낮추자마자 신호 강도가 올라왔
Roger. In Washington, the Senate Finance Committee has approved extension of the income tax surtax, but a Senate vote on the bill currently seemed remote. In Austin, State Representative Ray Lemmon of Houston has been nominated as the National Director of the American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon has proposed a study of the possibility of establishing an institute of oceanography in Texas. This would be the first such institute on the western Gulf of Mexico. In Minneapolis, Minnesota, the weather bureau, after recapping today's weather showing a high of 88 and a low of 72, has noted "snowfall: none." From St. Petersburg, Florida, comes a radio report from the Norwegian explorer, Thor Heyerdahl, which said that the crew of his papyrus boat, the Ra, will sail into Bridgetown, Barbados, despite damage from heavy seas. The crew, however, will sleep on an escort vessel. Norman Baker, navigator of the expedition, said the crew was aboard the Ra to
杰克，在我们开始阅读操作步骤之前，我们想先说明一下——我们发现A电池电量充足，状态良好。现在切换到B电池，再给B电池充一会儿电。再充两个小时。这里有一个七到八步的操作流程，如果
알겠습니다, 짐. 최대한 빨리 절차를 마무리해서 보내드리려고 노력하고 있습니다. 절차는 이미 마련되어 있습니다. 지금 담당자들이 CMS/LMS 시스템에서 절차를 실행하고 통합하는 작업을 진행 중입니다. 모든 사항이 정확한지, 일정은 여유로운지 
ジェミニ4、ハワイCAP
了解。なぜレーダ
了解。Y 001、NA、プラス00202 46420 547 46211 12 1383 327 023 上172 左22、プラス1293、マイナス16500、プラス12905、プラス36180、シリウス、010 294 320、アレージなし、高速帰還、7821 
알겠습니다, 잭. 지금 우리가 처한 특이한 상황은 해치가 설치된 상태이고, 탐사선과 드로그는 여전히 지휘선 내부에 있다는 겁니다. 그리고 당
Forza Houston. Ap
Передай
... I got it, thank 
Fortf
そういえば、サービス モジ
了解。軌道エリアの終了地点はゴルフで、3時間00分39秒です。もう一度言います。3時間00分39秒です。オ
Look at that lightni
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿，
알겠습니다. 구역 36-4 4 40 및 120; 1+06. 2+31. 23시, 38:08. 2+48. 8+44
사실 그렇지 않습니다. 저희는 중간 항로 수정 전에 온수 보일러를 점검하는 것
좋습니다. 22도입니다. 앞으로 있을 연소 과정에서 사용할 자세 제어 절차
بما أننا لسنا كذلك - ليس واضحًا لي أننا لم نواجه توقفات ميكانيكية ل
Хор
في المرة القا
了解です。25ページをご覧ください。25ページの手順3を省略し、手
Sto osservando bene Orione in questo momento. Bellissima vista.
Dammi il tuo interruttore di lettura su 
Non stai scherzando! Sono d'accordo. Le cose che s
11, we concur that having, up on the may well
I am g
Хорошо. Сначала я быстро прочитаю их здесь, чтобы вы получили общее представление. Параметры площадки, положение служебного модуля JETT, положение для наблюдения за Луной, положение для наблюдения за Солнцем и положение JETT. На площадках указаны приблизительные углы наклона для наблюдения за Луной и Солнцем, приблизительные углы наклона для входа в атмосферу и углы входа в атмосферу для JETT. Наблюдение за Луной и вход в атмосферу. Хорошо. Это — это общая информация о площадках. Если хотите, я прочитаю это медленно, чтобы вы могли все записат
わかりました。そんなことが起きるかもしれないと私に言いましたが、彼は
आगे बढ़ो, अप
Оно должно быть по
Ok. La temperatura d
نعم يا فريد. نحن جاهزون للمضي قدمًا في إيقاف التشغيل. لديّ تغييران لك. الخطوة الأولى من إيقاف التشغيل الطارئ موجودة في صفحة الطاقة - 5. انت
...
Dr
Voici un reportage d'Harry Rosenthal, de l'Associated Press de Houston. Deux Pères Noël ont illuminé la veille de Noël du petit Jeffrey Lovell, âgé de deux ans. Le premier a frappé à sa porte et lui a apporté des cadeaux. Le second a ramené son papa sur la Lune. Le premier portait un costume rouge et une barbe blanche, et son « ho, ho! » résonnait si fort qu'on l'entendait à plusieurs kilomètres. Le second était un énorme moteur crachant des flammes derrière la Lune, et des milliers de personnes attendaient la confirmation de son allumage. « Sachez qu'il y a un Père Noël », furent les premiers mots d'Apollo 8, sortant du silence radio pour annoncer au monde entier, quinze minutes après les faits, que le moteur avait réussi sa combustion critique. « Aucun d'entre nous ne s'attend à recevoir un plus beau cadeau de Noël que celui-ci », déclara Ken Mattingly, du centre de contrôle des missions. « Remerciez de notre part tous ceux qui sont restés sur Terre. Vous savez que nous n'aurions rien pu faire sans vous », répondit le colonel Frank Borman, commandant du vaisseau. À ce moment précis, un sapin de Noël s'illumina devant les consoles du centre de contrôle des missions, et l'astronaute Harrison Schmidt lut à l'équipage une version spatiale du conte « La visite de Saint Nicolas ». « C'était la veille de Noël, et très loin dans l'espace, l'équipage d'Apollo 8 venait de remporter la course vers la Lune », commençait le récit. L'équipe du centre de contrôle des missions avait retardé les festivités jusqu'à ce que le père de Jeffrey, le capitaine de la marine James Lovell, ainsi que le major de l'armée de l'air William A. Anders et le colonel Borman soient rentrés sains et saufs. N'importe quel autre réveillon de Noël, les familles des astronautes aurai
That's affirm. Next. flight data file. That will go in R-1, R-2, and R-3. Next. Three PPK
휴스턴 이글입니다. 고이득 설정을 원하시면 
Ben
了解しました。私たちの収納リストによると、着陸地点の斜視図は転送バッグに入っているはずです。しかし、バッ
Bene. Ques
Roger, Jim. Rechnen Sie einfach damit, dass eine VORSICHTS- UND WARNUNGSMELDUN
서지 탱크
आगे बढ़ो, 
11، هيوستن. تشير التوق
了解、アル。あと30秒で
Oui. C'est à peu près comme ça que ça fonctionne ici. Faites juste attention à son ut
Прив
Friendship Seven, potresti fornirci una lettura su t
Der Druck an Punkt A beträgt 2000 – Punkt B betr
حسنًا، صحيح. حسنًا. أنا جاهز للبدء بالإجراء. عندما ترد عليّ، ارفع صوتك في الميكروفون، لأن إشارة الاستقبال لدينا مشوشة نوعًا ما. أول شيء نريدك أن تفعله، وسنفعل ذلك على عبوة واحدة، ثم ن
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। ओम्नी स्विच के ब
Okay. Ich bin 
Roger. Un'altra cosa: i tempi dei punti di controllo che mi hai fornito sono un po' imprecisi e, confrontando queste mappe, ho notato che anche queste non sono b
Gemini
了解。了解しました。彼はここにいます
Роджер. Мы хотели бы, чтобы переключатель ATTITUDE SET вернулся в исходное состояние, если вы закончите работу с ALINE. Здесь возникают проблемы с тел
ठीक है। अपोलो लैंडमार्क रन 2 और 3 को हटा दें। वह क्षेत्र बादलों से घिरा है और आपकी 
5시간 빼주세요. 중간 과정 7, 필요시. 입학 전 절차. 그리고 
我马上把这个网站
DOWN VOICE BACKUP with the POWE
It's projected up 
ठीक है। पंक्ति 1 में फ्लाइट डिस्प्ले के नीच
Well, there's no doubt that this is a little smaller than th
O
S
ठीक है, बिल। हमने कुछ समय पहले पेज E-9 के स्टेप 38 पर, बिल्कुल श
Я чувствую себя на миллион долларов. Ладно, мы
Okay, Abflussventil wied
Et Mme Robert Goddard a déclaré aujourd'hui que son mari aurait été si heureux. « Il n'aurait pas crié, rien. Il aurait simplement rayonné. » Elle a ajouté: « C'était son rêve, envoyer une fusée sur la Lune. » Partout dans le monde, on avait de nombreuses raisons de se réjouir de la mission Apollo 11. La police italienne a annoncé que la nuit de dimanche à lundi avait ét
好的。
休斯顿，
谢谢。这些飞行经历非常有教
Хорошо, а как нас
ヒューストンさ
Houston, ici Apollo 8. Comment recevez-vous les message
Das ist richtig. Okay, dann gehen wir zurück zur Tunnelentlüftung und überprüfen den Druckunterschied (ΔP) in cm³, um sicherzustellen, dass der Druck gehalten wird. Anschließend wiederholen wir die Überprüfung der Lukendichtheit und die Prozeduren der Tunnelentlüftung. Als Nächstes möchte ich die Werte -1 +20 vorlesen. Wir gehen nu
正解です。では、トランスデューサー、圧力
هيوستن، بر
D'après l'A
मैं भी आपकी बात सुन रहा हूँ। क्या आपने
Ok, Vance. Ab
Okay. We ha
네. 카메라가 좀 흔들리긴 했지만, 초록색 컴
前進12。右
双子座4号，金
好了，你记住我刚才念给你的数字吧；不用写下来。稍微向
खैर, इसमें अंतरिक्ष यान का व
Gemini 4, ici le centre de contrô
わかった。これを通して見ることができる最小の物体でも、かなり良いハッキ
Хорошо. Для управления двигателем перейдите в GUIDANCE CONTROL, MODE CONTROL ATT HO
Аврора Севен, Гавайи, коммуникационные 
로저. 다음 감압 작업 시에는 객실 감압 속도를 높이기 위해 전방 해치 덤프 밸브 외에 또는 그 대신 상부 해치 덤프 밸브를 사용해도 됩니다. T13 업데이트가 있으니, 가능한 한 빨리 데이터를 보내주시면 새로운 상태 벡터를 업링크해 드리겠습니다. 이상
حسنًا. اليوم، نود منك تحديد انحراف محور الدوران، قبل عمليات الرصد كما هو موضح في الإجراءات، ومرة ​​أخرى بعدها. هدفنا هنا هو التحقق من احتمال وجود تأثير حراري ما قد يُسبب أخطاءً في قراءة ال
罗
11，我们同意，之前的操作可能对您的启动产生了一定影响。看起来这会导致——让计算机根据实际的CDU角度进行操作。我们希望您执行CDU归零操作，即按回车键，然后从步骤2重新开始，加载VERB 6，在自动机动中设
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Valerie Anders am Heiligabend, während sie und ihre Familie darauf warteten, dass Apollo 8 die Mondumlaufbahn verließ und zur Erde zurückkehrte. Frau Anders war am Dienstag um Mitternacht dort gewesen, und die Nachbarn hatten gerade alle Kinder zusammengetrommelt, damit die Familie sich ausruhen konnte, während sich das
Хорошо. На странице E-9, в шаге 39 внизу проверки пиротехнической цепи, есть шаг, где написано: панель 8, все автоматические
मैंने बस इतना ही सुना है कि केबिन में दबाव 
Roger, Amicizia Sette. I vostri propulsori funzionano, tutti i vostri 
Il est impossible de faire transiter quoi que ce soit par le MDIU. Lorsque vous avez essayé de l'éteindre, le voyant Ma1function s'est rallumé et rien
了解… 順調です。乗船します… すぐ
收到。声音洪亮清晰。飞行
20 feet, down a half; drifting forward just a littl
Okay. S-Band-Status auf AUS. Damit sind w
P
Okay, Vance. Wird es 
You
ठीक है, मैं इन्हें वैसे ही पढ़ूंगा जैसे मुझे दिख रहा है, न कि जैसे एसईडीआर (सर्विस इंजीनियरिंग डिपार्टमेंट रिपोर्ट) वाले पढ़ते हैं। मुझे फिर से वही पुरानी यादें सताने लगी हैं। लगता है जॉन को राहत मिली होगी। मैं उन्हें ढूंढ नहीं रहा था - वे
Okay. Könnten Sie mir den B
ठीक है। नंबर 2 बैटरी के बारे में, आपको लगता है कि यह सेंसर की खराबी हो सकती है क्योंकि आपको कोई बदलाव नहीं दिख रहा है, और आप लगभग 10 मिनट में बैटरी को वापस ला
Roger. 1A et 1
是的，我打开过。但是食物都碎成渣了；我都不敢再打开包装了，怕碎屑弄得胶囊里到处都是。我可以保证，像我们这次航班上准备的这种一口
Jim, tu sei riuscito a ottenere quelle letture
Роджер, эти частицы снова дрейфуют назад, но они не совсем параллельно линии, ведущей к воздушному шару. Они дрейфуют назад в пределах дуги п
जिम, यह लगभग सही है। जैक उस स्थिति में कोर्स अलाइन करेगा। हम आपको इसी के लिए उस स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी करने को कह रहे हैं। हम कोर्स अलाइन गिम्बल कोणों की गणना करेंगे और उन्हें जैक को भेज देंगे, और वहाँ पहुँचने पर व
收到。我完全明白你的意思。我将更新你的飞行任务记录，并向你发送机动
Okay. It's about a 10-stepper, but real easy. Okay. On CB 16, INVERTER 2, close. CB 11, AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2, close. Panel 14, verify INVERTER switch 2. CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2, close. RENDEZVOUS RADAR, release. RENDEZVOUS RADAR to on panel 3. Are you with me? Over
Try to touch the yaw attitude (indicator) touched the yaw att
أبولو
Und ich habe zwei Dinge, die Jack im Steuermodul erledigen soll, um die Last auf MAIN A zu reduzieren. Erstens soll er den CM/RCS-HEIZUNGSSCHALTER überprüfen oder ausschalten. Das haben wir bereits erledigt, und obwoh
13, Houston. We'd like you to verify couple of readings for us
Leise H
小
Думаю, да. Мы будем использовать это как монитор ожогов. Ожоги будут проводиться вручную, их запуск и остановка б
لا. من الأفضل إعادة تركيب القطعة الأ
فانس، هل فكرتم جميعًا في الكاميرات التي ترغبون في استخدامها؟ حاليًا، قمنا بتجهيز كاميرا هاسلبلاد بعدسة 250، ولديّ كاميرا هاسلبلاد
Для чего были нужны эти последние четыре р
吉姆，我有很多信息要告诉你。首
OK NS
我听到了——我的就留着吧……
ठीक है। यह तेज़ वापसी के लिए एक पेरीसिंथियन प्लस 2 है। यह / 62871, माइनस 161, प्लस 129, प्लस 45224, माइनस 06216, माइनस 18712 001 287 351, नवंबर अल्फ़ा प्लस 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, पृथ्वी ऊपर 010, दाएँ 37, प्लस 1475, प्लस 06500 13239 36913 होगा; प्राथमिक तारा सीरियस, द्वितीयक रिगेल 129 155 010, कोई उलेज नहीं, मध्यमार्ग सुधार 4 के निष्पादन को मानता है
로저, 휴스턴. -11, /: 45597, -040, +157, +36325, -01727, +01428 180 003 000, 해당 없음, +00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254; 스코르피이 델타, 아래 103, 왼쪽 48, +0742, -16500 13005 36327; 시리우스, 리겔, 129 155 010; 4개의 쿼드, 15초, T
11, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы попробовать работу с высокоэффективной антенной решеткой. Если вы выберете повторный захват и установите для вашей S-диапазонной антенны высокий коэффициент усиления, ваши пол
Это
イーグル、ヒューストン。このモ
わかりました。エントリー1を見てください。2番目の項目は12時間のケルビンコールドソークですが、ここでの議論と飛行前の議論で、コールドソークは行わないという合意が得られました。そこで、ステップ2を削除します。つまり、コールドソークは実施する必要があり、エントリー前に給湯器の動作確認を行い、以前乾燥してしまった給湯器があったのと同じように、乾燥してしまった給湯器がないことを確認する必要があります。そのための手順を現在検討中で、後ほど改めてご報告します。ビルが電話に出ている時に、全員が同時にループに参加できるように、いつか実行する予定です。ステップ8と9の
Хорошо. Готов к небольшому подсчету,
Ricevuto. Questo è 
Oui. Ils sont rangés sous l'ordinateur, et plus il y a d'objets lourds là-dessous, plus le ratio L/D augmente. Nous n'avons pas de bac de récupération, alors je me demandais quels objets lourds pourraient être placés là-dessous. On pourrait peut-être y mettre des caméras, des caméras de télévision, des choses assez lour
Verschwund
弗雷德，关于这个临时搭建的指令舱氢氧化锂罐，我们至少需要做两个，每次使用两个——每组软管上各一个。具体做法是，我们将其中一个临时罐连接到红色接头上，空气会被吸入氢氧化锂罐，然后从蓝色接头吹出。同时，我们还要将氢氧化锂罐从宇航服回路中移除
Roger. Thank you. He'll take a minute r
Welcher Fe
حسنًا. نقوم بتشغيل PRO - بعد إدخال 200. سنحصل على وميض 0688. ثم نقوم بتحم
E mi - - 02:30 पर, जब हम अम्बिलिकल से बिजली हटा रहे होते हैं, तो सबसे पहले हम दो काम करते हैं। हम MAIN B के सर्किट ब्रेकर खोलते हैं, और फिर तीसरा काम आता है "सर्किट ब्रेकर सेंसर सिग्न
알겠습니다. 잭, 다시 한번 강조하지
그건 그렇게 쓰여 있지 않아요. 거기에는... P00으로 가라고
Non ho una luce di scansione, ma non credo che funzioni bene. Ora 
На этом, пожалуй, все мировые и национальные новости и статьи. На спортивной странице Хэнк Стрэм из «Канзас-Сити Чифс» был назван лучшим тренером года в AFL. Это уже второй раз за три сезона. Голосование проводилось группой из 30 спортивных журналистов и комментаторов Associated Press, по три человека из каждого города. Ближайшим к нему по результатам голосования был Уиб Юбэнк. Другие тренеры, получившие голоса, — Сид Гилман из Сан-Диего и Лу Сабин из Денвера. Что касается вчерашнего матча всех звезд колледжей Shriners, то Север одержал победу над Югом со счетом 3:0. Дик
はい、わかりました。スタンバイの方をお願いしま
好的。这是可选的。我们之前写第-1A页的方式，那都是步骤6的一部分。你还没到步骤7呢。步骤7如下
로저, 이글. 아주 훌륭합니
Okay. Start time is 18:13. Okay, then we go down 20 on the day. And then the HF - next time in that column on th
ジ
Houston, Apollo 11. I think the problem here is that that attitude just is not too close to the substellar point. I'm having to maneuver quite a bit; and that's in progress now, 
Сейчас на стороне Джима дневной свет, а со своей стороны я всё ещё могу различить некоторые звёзды. Похоже, можно удерживать космический аппарат в таком положении, чтобы одна сторона была тёмной, а другая — дневной. Сторона Джима сейчас определённо находится на дневном свете, а моя — в темноте. Это одна из вещей, которая меня больше всего удивила в начале полёта, когда я смотрел на всех этих маленьких светлячков из ускорителя и отмечал, как темно и как это выглядит. Я посмотрел на Джима, и он смотрел в окно, идеально залитое дневным светом. На самом
روجر، فريندشيب سفن. هل تعمل محركات الدفع لديكم؟ هل تعمل ج
—9½ e 24 su uno e 9½ e 24 su due, e 9½ e 24 su tre. 9½ e 24 su quattro. Questi piatti principal
Wir müssen warten, bis Sie wied
روجر. لقد كنت هنا لمد
روجر
Хорошо. Сначала я быстро прочитаю их здесь, чтобы вы получили общее представление. Параметры площадки, положение служебного модуля JETT, положение для наблюдения за Луной, положение для наблюдения за Солнцем и положение JETT. На площадках указаны приблизительные углы наклона для наблюдения за Луной и Солнцем, приблизительные углы наклона для входа в атмосферу и углы входа в атмосферу для JETT. Наблюдение за Луной и вход в атмосферу. Хорошо. Это
さあ、ヒューストン。アポロ
Okay. You guys just tell m
いや、まだだよ。バイザーを開けないようにしているんだ。サーキットを走りたいんだ。ちょっと撮るチャンスがあ
هذا صحيح. في معظم الأحيان يبدو أن السائل يتسرب من حول مكان توصيله بدلاً من التسرب من الفتحة التي من الم
यह दोस्ती की सातवीं तस्वीर है। क्षितिज पर अभी भी बहुत तेज रोशनी है; नीचे नारंगी रंग, फिर पीली परत, उसके बाद नील
أعتقد أن
حسنًا. سأشرح لك ما لديّ - أعتقد أنه سيكون من الأسهل شرحه. في الصف العلوي، في الدائرة 11، لدينا أربعة قواطع 
That was a funny one. You know, I didn't feel it shock, and I thought thi
双子座
हेलो, ह्यूस्टन। अपोलो 8। ह्यूस्टन, 
まるで完璧でした! DELTA-TIG ゼロ、燃焼時間 557、角度のシャフト値、VGX マイナス 0.1、VGY マイナス 0.1、VGZ プラス 0.1、トリムなし、DELTA-VC でマイナス 6.8、燃料は 38.8、LOX 39.0、バランスでプラス 50、PUGS の増加を実行したところ、60.9 x 169.9 にな
Oui, c'est exact: nous rétractons les bras, tout se déroule comme prévu, la machine fonct
わかりました。DOWN VOICE BACKUP に進み、POWER AMPL 回路ブレーカーを引きます。問題が
I'm now in reentry attitude. Standing by to go into automatic mode. Fly-by-wire tracks absolutely beautifully, just as it worked in the trainer. Ve
Houston, Apollo 8. Comme
Ti dirò, amico, non hai bisogno di niente per sapere la tua i
Bene. Guardando la voce 1: il secondo elemento riguarda la fase di cold soak Kelvin di 12 ore, e nelle discussioni che ho avuto qui e prima del volo, credo che si sia concordato che non vogliamo effettuare la fase di cold soak. Quindi elimineremo il passaggio 2. In pratica, credo che vogliamo effettuare la fase di cold soak, e certamente vogliamo testare i boiler ad acqua prima dell'inserimento per assicurarci di non averne uno asciutto, nello stesso modo in cui ne avevamo uno asciutto prima. Stiamo lavorando su alcune procedure per questo, e dovremo tornare da voi con quelle un po' più tardi, e cercheremo di farlo quando Bill è in linea in modo che tutti possano partecipare al loop contemporaneamente. Vorremmo aggiungere un passaggio tra i punti 8 e 9, o come parte del passaggio 8. Tutto questo è a pagina E-1, dove spostiamo la VHF su Simplex A a meno 4 ore e 35 minuti. Ora, questo sarà oltre la portata VHF bidirezionale, ma ci assicurerà di averlo a
알겠습니다. 저희는 기체를 아래로 향하게 하여 부스터를 추적하고 있었는데, 안타깝게
Okay, im Vergleich zum Flug von Apollo 8 war der Start von ähnlicher Vibrationsstärke wie bei Apollo 8, aber zu Beginn des Fluges gab es weniger seitliche Bewegungen. Die Trennung des S-IC fühlte sich bei Apollo 13 heftiger an als bei Apollo 8, vielleicht lag es an meinem Sitzplatz, ich weiß es nicht. Es gab etwa drei abrupte Zündaussetzer und ein paar laute Knalle, bei denen wir längs an unseren Gurten nach hinten geschleudert wurden, bevor das S-II-Triebwerk zündete. Das S-II-Triebwerk lief bei Apollo 1
ठीक है, जिम। यह बहुत अच्छा लग रहा है। हम देख रहे हैं कि इसमें 
네, 그 빛줄기는 육분의 전체 길이에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 사실, 우리가 지나가는 동안 다가오는 것을 볼 수 있었는데, 스캐닝 망원경의 빛줄기가 달이 있는 곳을 가로질러 움직였기 때문입
わかりました、アポロ8号。星26番、つまり26番星に変更します。地球に近い方の地平線を2セット、2セットにします。
착륙 자세가 좀 불안정했죠, 
Roger, 11. Sta
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입
Alle Systeme laufen einwandfrei, außer der Anzugkühlung – und die Kuppeltemperatur steigt tatsächlich. Ich werde mich jetzt kurz wieder einloggen und versu
Bene. La nostra CONFI
Restez à l'écoute, Versea
네. 질문입니다. 24페이지의 간단한 작동 단계 3에서는 시스템 A/B, 즉 쿼드 히터 두 개만 켜고 패널 11의 차단기는 여전히 꺼진 상태로 둡
罗杰. 3：/45810，减053，加141，加30128，减00540，加01911。180 019 
حسنًا، لا بأس. لديّ تحديثان لك يا جيم. الأول يتعلق بإجراءات البحث عن المذنب بينيت في حوالي الساعة 10:00 صباحًا، 
Если ты можеш
오로라 세븐, 마지막 기록은 읽을 수 없었습니다. 간헐적이긴 하지만 상태가 많이 악화되고 있습니다. 제가 눈으로 확인하지 않고 역행 시퀀스 시간을 읽어보겠습니
Роджер, Джим. На вашем компьютере мы хотели бы снова сделать дамп памяти с возможностью стирания, как мы делали на днях. Причина в том, что, когда вы делали это около 8 часов назад, и вы помните, что потратили на это время и получили результат, мы 
텍사스가 그 메시지를 전해줄 
Okay, Aquarius. You can go low bit rate, POWER AMP, OFF and D
Donnez-moi un LP
11, ह्यूस्टन। आप 
Роджер, 11. Мы хотели бы в ближайшее время в удобное для вас время произвести сброс сточных вод. Конкретное время не запланировано. В момент коррекции тр
休斯顿，
Ich warte mit meinem Le
그 외의 다른 곳, 즉 잡지
You know, it's going 
Roger. Ce voyage sur la Lune vous a peut-être paru simple, voire facile. Je tiens à vous assurer que ce n'était pas le cas. La fusée Saturn V qui nous a placés en orbite est une machine incroyablement complexe, dont chaque composant a fonctionné à la perfection. Cet ordinateur 
Roger. This will affect your sequence time. I'll g
コンパスは、その背後にある姿勢制御計とジャイロの影響を受けすぎています。そのため、コンパスを近づけることができません。
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 플라이 바이 와이어 시스템을 작동할 때 스위치에서 약간의 잡음이 들리는 것을 확인했습
Hauptbus-Verbind
好的，AC 2 完全没反应。
そこに時間を同期させ
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。今のところはダメ
أبولو ١١، أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن تبث من دون علم.
了解しました。燃料消費量が優れていたとお考えになった理由を
알겠습니다, 짐. 지금 125파운드(약 57kg)를 
حسنًا. إليكم واحدة: دخل وقف إطلاق النار المقرر مسبقًا لمدة 72 ساعة من قبل ا
Вы же не
L'altimetro 
Ok. INVIO, 333 INVIO, quindi leggi il registro 1, e quel registro 1 dovrebbe essere 10.000. E poi, se non lo è, posso darti le procedure per portarlo a 10.000.
Bien reçu, Fred. Si vous déployez une plateforme de manœuvre, je vous donnerai des informations sur l'atterrissage
Семь. Все системы здесь, на земл
نعم. توضع أسفل الكمبيوتر، وكلما زاد وزن الأشياء الموجودة هناك، زادت نسبة الحمل إلى العمق (L/D). ليس لدينا أي أجهزة تخزين، لذا كنت أتساءل عن الأشياء الثقيلة التي يمكننا وضعها هناك - ربما يمكننا وضع بعض الكاميرات، كاميرات التلفزيون، وما شابهها من الأشياء التي عادة ما تكون ثقيلة - في خزانتنا. لا، لا يمكننا وضع الأجهزة في خزانتنا، ولكن يمكننا وضعها في تلك الحاوية الموجودة هناك، مما سيساعد في تقليل نسبة الحمل إلى العمق. أي شيء آخر يخطر ببالك
Roger. This is the story on the suit temp. I have increased two 10-degree marks since lift-off. And now about--well, 15 degrees above launch mark. M
로저. 다시 말씀드리지만, 방금 드린 지침대로 설치하면 카메라가 창밖을 향하게 되고, 플러스 X축에서 왼쪽으로 약 30도 정도 기울어지게 됩니다. 그러니 미리 카메라를 그렇게 설치해 두시는 게 좋겠습니다.
罗杰，13-BRAVO； 146、03+32。 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 27 11. 56 46. 3+17, 8+36. 14-布拉沃：04+07、09+03。 15-布拉沃：121、02+
당신의 목소리가 잘 안 들리네요. 배경 소음이 너무 많아서 그런 것 같아요. 다시 오신 걸
روجر، الأمر بدأ. هل تريدني أن أكون في وضع مستقيم عندما أمر فوق 
네. 골프계 소식입니다. 최근 몇 년간 대회 출전이 뜸했던 토미 제이콥스가 어제 필라델피아 골프 클래식에서 선두를 차지했습니다
Думаю, мы могли бы выключить лампы
Das passierte, glaube ich, gestern. Wir führten eine 
ठीक है। आरएन, आरपी, प्लस 77, 400 फुट नाममात्र पर पिच कोण; सुधार, 400,000 फुट नाममात्र; आरईटी 400,000 फुट, 22 प्लस 02; ब्लैकआउट की शुरुआत, 24 प्लस 43; ब्लैकआउट का अंत, 30 प्लस 01; ड्रोग शूट, 31 प्लस 37; मेन शूट, 32 प्लस 58। और आपके लिए रिकवरी क्षेत्र का मौसम इत्यादि भी उपलब्ध है, यदि आप इसे कॉपी करने के लिए तैया
エド、私たちが話していた参考文献についてのこと
Okay. Mal sehen. Deine Golftasche befindet sich zusammen mit den anderen beiden PGA-Schlägern in der L-förmigen Tasche, und dein Helm und deine Handschuhe sind ebenfalls in der L-
Подтверждаю. В разделе «Активация и проверка VHF/S-диапазона» вычеркните шаг 1. В разделе «Шаг 2» измените «ГОЛОСОВАЯ РЕЗЕРВНАЯ КОПИЯ» на «ГОЛОСОВАЯ КОПИЯ». Вычеркните шаг 3. В разделе «Включить» вычеркните всю процедуру. В разделе «Установка/П
मैं सेक्स्टेंट के बारे में कुछ कहना चाहूंगा। तंग अंतरिक्ष यान में इसका उपयोग करना बहुत मुश्किल है, खासकर हेलमेट पहने हुए। मैंने अंततः यह निष्कर्ष निकाला कि हेलमेट पहने हुए तारों के लिए आवश्यक कोणों को कैप्चर करने का प्रयास व्यर्थ होगा। इसलिए मैंने अपना हेलमेट उतार दिया। इससे मुझे इसके उपयोग में थोड़ी अधिक सुविधा मिली, लेकिन फिर भी अंतरिक्ष यान को नियंत्रित किए बिना मैं लगभग 20 से 23 डिग्री के कोणों तक ही सीमित था। होता यह था कि खिड़की के ऊपरी हिस्से से तारा दिखाई नहीं देता था। अब, अंतरिक्ष यान को अधिक बार और अधिक नियंत्रित करके आप इसे इस प्रकार नियंत्रित कर सकते हैं कि खिड़की की लंबी धुरी आपके ट्रैकिंग प्लेन में आ जाए। ईंधन की कमी के कारण हमने इस तरह से नियंत्रण करना उचित नहीं समझा। हमने पल्स मोड का भी उपयोग किया, बिना अधिक नियंत्रण किए। उस प्रयोग के लिए चुने गए तारे क्षितिज से काफी ऊंचे कोण पर थे, इसलिए उन्हें कैप्चर करना बहुत मुश्किल था। हमने अंततः क्षितिज के थोड़ा करीब के तारों को कैप्चर करने का निर्णय लिया। मैंने कैनोपस और कुछ अन्य फिल्टरों पर कुछ परीक्षण किए, जैसा कि आप देखेंगे। नीले फिल्टर ने क्षितिज को पूरी तरह से ढक दिया; जब मैंने इसका इस्तेमाल किया तो मुझे क्षितिज बिल्कुल भी दिखाई नहीं दिया। चांदनी में क्षितिज की छवि शायद उतनी
了解、グアイマス、はっきりと。操縦モードはフライ・バイ・ワイヤになりました。ジャイロはケージド、操縦はオフです。すぐに自動モードに移行します。私の状態は良好です。カプセルの状態も良好です。燃料は69～69パーセント、酸素は88～100パーセントです。キャビンの蒸気ベントがプ
ठीक है। कल भी यही हुआ था। मैं आपके द्वारा दिए गए मान
Ok. Il tuo RAD IN SECONDARY, ti ho dato 70 - circa 72 gradi; il RAD OUT è circa 30; la TEMP EVAP GLICOLE è circa 65; la PRESSIONE VAPORE a fondo scala alta, la PRESSIONE DI SCARICO GLICOLE circa 9 psi. L'ACCUMULATORE SECONDARIO TUTE mostra circa 52 gradi; CABINA circa 58 gradi; pressioni, TUTA lettura 4.1, CABINA a 5. LA PRESSIONE PARZIALE CO2 è salita a poco più di 1, circa 1.1. Sul lato della casa, la temperatura è 72 gradi, la lettura dell'elio 3500; N2 A lettura 2300; N2 B circa 2450. IL COMBUSTIBILE è circa 165; CELLA A COMBUSTIBILE 1, entrambe CHIUSE, sono zip; TEMP. INTERNA 405 gradi; LO 
Он
初步数据分析表明，中央S-II发动机的振动幅度比以往飞行中观察到的要大一些，振动大约
I can see a black fire down on the desert. You can see right down to the very source where it's coming from. I couldn't see exactly what it was, but it made a very, very distinct mark on th
Okay, Fred. First of all, preparations for this, starting with contingency checklist, page 24, we would recommend should start at, and we'll be happy to receive any comments you have on that, though. Second point: when you're in the burn attitude, you should see the Sun at the very top of the. It'll be splitting the cursor, when your cursor's set at zero. One thing to be aware of though, that it'll slip right out of the very easily since it'll be very sensitive to roll and yaw. Understand that's in detent 2, by the burn is very insensitive to burn time and attitude. In other words, if necessary, we can slip it if there's any problem at all, and attitude isn't too critical. So that brings us to the point that we only have one real burn rule; that is, if - rate about any axis gets to 1
Хорошо, конфигурация панели 11, верхний ряд: Шина переменного тока B, я хочу, чтобы S-диапазонная антенна была открыта; Шина переменного тока A, магнитофон, открыт. Второй ряд, под СИСТЕМОЙ A, я хочу, чтобы основной коммутатор через QUAD 1 TCA был закрыт. Указатель командира X под ПОЛЕТНЫМИ ДИСПЛЕЯМИ, открыт; открыт; Резервный обогреватель радара спуска, открыт; Обогреватель радара посадки, открыт. Выключатель ATTITUDE DIRECT, закрыт; ED: LOGIC POWER A, открыт; UTILITY, открыт. Под: ВЕНТИЛЯТОР КОМПЛЕКТАЦИИ 1, закрыт; АВТОМАТИЧЕСКАЯ ПЕРЕ
Роджер. Начало работы двигателя 3 47 37; Дельта-V, 42,9; время работы дв
Houston, potresti darci qu
Um dir eine Vorstellung zu geben, Mike, was wir sehen können: Ich kann die Südwestküste des Golfs von Mexiko und die 
負けだ。早くやる唯一の利点は、パワーダウンできるかどうかだ。早くやる唯一の利点は、今から大規模噴
罗
Put that away and get some status
Roger. Und er schlägt später vor, dass man dasselbe tut, wenn sie wie weiße Partikel ersch
알겠습니다. "태도가 좋을 때는 ACA가 바늘을 무효화하기 위해 억제력을 해제
Roger, Michael. 
ह्यूस्टन, हमारे लिए यह एक अद्भुत अनुभव रहा है। अब हम फिर से तारे देख पा रहे हैं और इस यात्रा में पहली बार तार
Как обычно, м
Роджер. Я по
맞습니다. 제 제어 모드는 수동이고, 자이로스코프는 사용하지 않으며,
取り出す
Houston, Apollo 11. Wie l
Есть вот этот —
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。バズ、心電図は良好のようです。医師か
了解しました。フ
Das andere T
Nun
मैंने अभी-अभी हैसलब्लैड क
Gemini VI, going over to VII for a few minutes. We'll be back to you with - probably have an update
ठी
Мы получим как
Elliptic - we must have had an ellipticity because we're - s
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لا نحصل على إشارة جيدة. هل يمكننا التأكد من أننا في وضع "تلقائي" على المسارات
알겠습니다. 어젯밤에 기본 투표에서 15까
أبولو 8، هي
Questa è l'Amic
제미니 4호, 아직 데이터 덤프를 수신하
Хор
جيميني 4، سنحصل على خط رؤية مباشر خلال دقيقة
روجر. إذا كنت ترغب في التقاط بعض الصور، فننصحك باستخدام مجلة Uniform المحملة بفيلم أبيض وأسود عالي السرعة، مع إطفاء الأنوار الداخلية، وكاميرا هاسلبلاد كهربائية بعدسة 80 ملم. أعتقد أنك ستحتاج إلى حملنا باليد. ننصح بفتحة عدسة f/2.8، ونرغب في الحصول على سلسلة من ال
休斯顿，哥伦比亚
Bene, vorremmo sapere se nelle ultime 24 ore qualcuno ha avuto sintomi si
Roger, Hous
Bene. Ora, questa è la procedura completa per iniziare, per quanto riguarda l'inizio. Quello ch
はい、彼はそこに着いたらすぐに
D'accord. Nous avons 
Roger. We will start out with the world news. praise for America's Apollo 8 astronauts and hopes for international cooperation in space exploration with the worldwide Christmas Eve messages as the tiny spaceship orbited the moon. Even in the Communist world, there was enthusiasm for man's first voyage to the moon. In Moscow, Soviet scientist Anatoly Besaranov recalled his country and the United States had shared space knowledge before and predicted the Apollo 8 flight would lead to more cooperation. In Cuba, Radio Havana rebroadcast the Voice of America program to tell its listeners of the Apollo 8 speech. Voice officials said it was the first time that any of the U.S. agencies' programs had been carried by Havana radio. Czechoslovakia saw the moon flight through extensive television coverage; and in Budapest, Hungary, people talk of little else on the trains and buses. In the non-Communist world, office workers and Christmas shoppers held their breath as the spacecraft was readied for the blas
水瓶座
Okay, Bill. We're ready to try this music on a different kind of lash-up this time. What I'd like to do in order to make sure that we maintain voice COMM is when you get it if you would, give us a call and tell us you have the music and any comment about its relative volume or anything like that. And if I get your call, then I'll call you back and tell you. And what will happen is when I go to talk to you we'll drop the music link. A
4種類の推進剤
أبولو 8، هيوستن. يبدو أنها نقطة توقف جيدة. كل 
Wir benötigen für jede Bitte ein „GO“; a
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к
Roger, Buzz. I brok
हां, मुझ
Très bien. Jim, j'ai deux informations à te communiquer. La première concerne la procédure de recherche de la comète Bennett, et j'attendrai que Jack se lève avant de te donner les détails. La seconde concerne la possibilité d'entrer dans l'atmosphère trois heures plus tôt. Je crois que Vance t'a mentionné hier soir que c'était envisageable, et que nous aimerions vérifier la pression du réservoir de supernova plus tôt. Comme nous
Right. Now we have some additional instructions in case this does not work. They say a full 20, Frank, on that ALC. It requires a full 20 seconds undisturbed for the ALC to properly do its thing. Now if these procedures that I've given you do not work, then we will be giving you some more, and they have to do with other filters and various combinations thereof. So I'd have the polarizing filter and the red and blue filter holder at hand because we will be attempting t
好的，2-C 是 24, 6；2-B 是 24, 5.5；2-A 是 24, 6；1-C 是 24, 12；1-B 是 24, 1
该单位每
मैंने अरब प्रायद्वीप क्षेत्र क
ठीक है। मैं जैक से कहूंगा कि वह CM/RCS हीटर स्विच की जांच कर ले कि वह बंद है या नहीं, और अगर नहीं है तो हम उसे बंद कर देंगे; और साथ ही लॉजिक पावर 2/3 स्विच को भी बंद कर दे, क्य
È affermativo. Quell'INVIO è ciò che avvia il dump. Poi, prima di questo, vogliamo assic
Да.
Gemini VIII，这里是休斯顿。我们这里出现了 Delta-P 指示灯，这在 GT-7 上并不罕见，但在 GT-8 上不应该出
휴스턴, 이글입니다. 이산화탄소 램프를 하나 구했습니다. 부분 
迈克，你还有多久
알겠습니다. 저희는 지금 물 배출 작업을 잠시 
Oka
Jack – hier spricht Aquarius. Ich bin mir nicht g
Gemini 4, 
L'enregistrement audio du passage à Tananarive durant cet
Tiens, ça soulève une question. On se demandait où vous comptiez ranger la sonde et le parachute de croisière? On a pensé à la ranger à peu près à l'endroit où se trouve normalement le
ممتاز. هذه نسخة 23 ديسمبر من صحيفة "إنترستيلر تايمز" على طريقة بول هاني. نود إعلامكم بأنه لم يتبق سوى يومين للتسوق حتى عيد الميلاد. يقول إن بثكم التلفزيوني حقق نجاحًا كبيرًا أمس. ميكي هيرشكوفيتز يقوم بعمل مزدوج في صحيفة "الواشنطن بوست". فقد كتب مقالين عن إطلاقكم بالإضافة إلى مقالاته الرياضية ا
Sì. Siamo ancora qui, Jack. Quello che vogliamo fare è seguirti passo passo, quindi useremo un bit rate elevato per farlo. In risposta alla tua domanda, per annullare rapidamente questa procedura, nel caso in cui si verifichi un problema, assicurati di non toccare l'interruttore POWER del 124 perché ha una posizione di RESET. 
177 143 000 NA, plus 00197, 47020 551 46818 12 128.3 257 023, up 263, left 17, plus 1195, minus 16500, plus 126 23 35608, the north set, roll 68, pitch 97, yaw 356, no ullage, high speed, 7900 Indian O
We'd like t
Apollo 13, Apoll
你好，Canton C
Et toi, Jack, tu aimerais savoir q
알겠습니다. 비상시에는 임시 난방 장치가 있고, 일반적인 경우에는 난방기 가
罗杰。1. 1-A 和 2-B 都
ヒュー
Хорошо, если вы сможете дотянуться до панели 3 через Билла, я думаю, нам нужно будет включить и выключить кислородные вентиляторы. А также переключить BIOMED в режим 
Vediamo. A Springfield, Missouri, Mickey Owen, il ricevitore storico dei Brooklyn Dodgers che è entrato nel libro dei record segnando un terzo str
… 42 %. Environ 45 à 55 kg de combustion visible. Cela ne laisse aucune marge. Si la combustion est trop courte, elle sera trop longue. Nous pouvons donc avancer le temps de rétro-allumage de 
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। हाँ, सही 
You're getting pretty pr
Jim, plus tôt dans la soirée, Fred-o a signalé une évacuation d'air par le hublot n° 1 du module de commande. Il a également signalé la présence d'un morceau de métal argenté d'environ 10 cm de côté, qui flottait à proximité. Nous essayions de déterminer s'il s'agissait d'une nouvelle évacuation ou d'un résidu de notre problème initial. Avez-vous d'autres informations ou commentaires? Fred-o a pris des photos, prises sur des cibles d'opportunité, avec la caméra lunaire n° 1, à une vitesse d'obturation de 1/250 s. Ne sachant pas précisément quelle ouverture utiliser, nous lui avons suggéré de prendre trois clichés de chaque cible, à f/4, f/5,6 et f/8. Termi
Ok, Fred, non riesco più a sentirti a causa del rumore di fondo
Bien sûr. Tout se passe
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы сейчас переместить переключатель BIOMED на правую стор
좋아, 덤프하러 가자. 4.2, 4.1, - -까지 떨어졌
Hallo, Ap
ضغط المصدر ١٥٠٠، ودرجة حرارة المصدر ٦٠-٥٠. ودائرة التحكم في رد الفعل تعمل. الهوائي سل
はい、良いものが見つかるといいですね
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Посмот
わかりました。4行目の「ヒーター」の下にあるクワッドヒーター（4つ）は閉じ、「ディスプレイ」を開き、「Sバンドアンテナ」を開き、「シーケンスカメラ」
ठीक है। और अब हम प्राइमरी इवेपोरेटर 
खैर, कुछ मायनों में यह अच्छा हो सकता है, 
I don't note any abnormalities in the. The pods seem to be in good shape. The primary and secondary struts are in good shape. Anten
我想我现
حسنًا. هل حاولت إع
哥伦比
Some appear to glow but I don't beli
यह दोस्ती का सातवां अध्याय है। मुझे लगता है कि अब दिन के समय, इन सब बातों और रवैये में मेरा संतुलन ब
こ
11, 
Hey, I 
नहीं, चार्ली। मेरे पास उतनी स्पष्टता नहीं है। लेकिन आपको थोड़ा अंदाज़ा द
わかりました。エントリー1を見てください。2番目の項目は12時間のケルビンコールドソークですが、ここでの議論と飛行前の議論で、コールドソークは行わないという合意が得られました。そこで、ステップ2を削除します。つまり、コールドソークは実施する必要があり、エントリー前に給湯器の動作確認を行い、以前乾燥
Сделайте 
حسناً يا ف
13, Хьюстон. Мы видим, что вы приближаетесь к блокировке карданного подвеса. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы подняли все квад-саксофоны C на MAIN A, квад-саксофоны C-1, C-2, C-3, C-4 на MAIN A, а
حسنًا
Это «Дружба Семь». Хороший вопрос. Я бы тоже хотел знать ответ. Эти ошибки в
जेमिनी 4, पूरे समय पल्स - होराइजन स्कैन मोड में रहा। एट
Роджер. Вернуться к БЛОКУ; и ПЕРЕСТРОИТЬ: 101
了解しました。3つすべてとL
Bon, comme vous le savez, le mode de pilotage est configuré pour la dérive. Le mode sélectionné est normal, automatique, avec les gyroscopes bloqués. J'ai sélectionné l'attitude de rentrée atmosphérique. Je suis bien sûr en mode de pilotage automatique à basse altitude. Le commutateur de manœuvre est sur la position « arrêt ». Je vais vous donner les quantités de carbura
켄, 저도 그렇게 생각합니다. 이 띠는 M선과 평행한데, 외부에서 광학 장치로 들어오는 직사각형 입구, 즉 광학 장치 설계와 관련이 있는 것 같습니다. 이 특정 태양 각도에서는 띠가 정확히 가로지릅니다. 지구와 태양 모두 스캐닝 망원경에 이런 현상을 일으킨다는 것을 알게 되었습니다. 육분의에서도 같은 빛 띠가 나타나는데, 육분의 시야 전체를 가리지만 확대율 덕분에 별이 아주 잘 보이고 표시도 가능합니다. 하지만 스캐닝 망원경으로는 별을 식별하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 제가 발견한 광학 장치의 최적 관측 자세는 스캐닝 망원경으로 큰개자리와 오리온자리를 볼 수 있는 자세입니다. 지금처럼 우주선이 특정 각도에 있을 때는 띠가 사라지고 태양이 우리 뒤에
双子座 4，双子座 4，休斯顿 CAP COM 结
Stai copiando qualche atteggiamento
अपोलो
ठीक है। इसे खींचो
ハ
أنا - إن كنت تتساءل - حشوت قائمة
지금 보시는 저 둥근 가방이 바로 프레드 뒤에 있는 건데, 그 안에 진공 호스가 들어있습니다. 우리가 안으로 돌아가면 우주복에서 진공 호스를 분리해서 달 표면으로 나가
ヒューストン、アポロ 8 号。4 日目の食事 (訂正: 4 日目、食事 A) 
Apollo 8, 
了解、フレンドシップ・セブ
인적이 드문 오지
好的。我们对此有很多有趣的想法，我听到的最新想法是启动平台并使其对齐，然后将 CM
ह्यूस्टन स्थित एसोसिएटेड न्यूज़ एजेंसी के हैरी रोसेन्थल की एक रिपोर्ट यहाँ प्रस्तुत है। दो सांता क्लॉज़ ने 2 वर्षीय जेफ़री लवेल के लिए क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या को रोशन कर दिया। पहले सांता ने उसके घर का दरवाज़ा खटखटाया और उपहार लाए। दूसरे सांता ने उसके पापा को चाँद से घर भेजा। पहले सांता ने लाल सूट और सफ़ेद दाढ़ी पहन
Ro
좋아요, SEDR(서비스 엔지니어링 부서 보고서) 담당자들이 하는 방식대로가 아니라 제가 보는 방식대로 읽어볼게요. 다시금 머릿속에 반짝이는 생각들이 떠오르네요. 존은 안심했나 봐요. 일부러 찾으려고 한 건 아닌데 그냥 거기에 있었
D'accord. Très intéressant. On va essayer de déterminer où cela se situe par rapport à vous. Ils mettent régulièrement à jour les prévisions concernant l'impact de la tempête tropic
좋아요. 이제 좀 딴 데로 새는 
……できましたか？こちらにあまり行き過ぎたら、ピッチ角に注意しないといけないかもしれません。今のところは
Okay. 47 ft/sec und 1+18 bei Ihrem nach vorne gerichteten Geschos
जॉन, टेक्सास के ऊपर से गुजरते समय अपना रेट्रोपैक पहने रहना। क्या तुम सुन रहे हो
हाँ। चलिए 
Здесь в
Okay, Fred-o, bitte hol die Notfallcheckliste heraus; schlag Seite 1 auf, die 2-Stunden-Akti
アジェナを090度までヨーイングさせる作業を完了しました。ヨー操作では、ヨー角は1秒あたり1.5度と正確に一致していましたが、90度まで…数秒かかりました
О
了解しました。はい。口腔体温計を口に入れています。体温を測るために、数分間口を閉じたままにしておいてもよろしい
Bien, Apollo 8. 
D'acco
Хорошо. В целом, система выглядит неплохо, Билл. Через несколько минут начнётся цикл работы криогенной вентиляторно
它们在电脑里，弗雷德
В целом
휴스턴, 지금처럼 고수익 상황에서 콜럼비아를
حسنًا يا جي
حسناً. هل يمكنك
Jack, war das nur Aktivieru
Roger. Je n'ai commencé l'alignement qu'une trentaine de mi
Vance, have you all thought about what cameras you wanted to use
네, 맞습
Definitely below me. I'd been tracking it below me from about Carnarvon on. Up until about Carnarvon we had it below us, and then up to the horizon, and then down below us again. It almost looked like it was in a different orbit than I was. It had a different apogee and perigee than what I did. Anyway, I attempted to close with it at daylight as soon as I could tell where it was. As I said, at that time it was a mile or two out in front of me - down below me. So, the more I tried to close, the less I really gained on it. I was firing retrograde. I was using my top thrusters to fire in such a manner as to decrease my total velocity, and then firing... at the same time. I never really closed, and it continued to pull away from me. It became obvious to me that by the time we got to Hawaii that to close on the booster in time to do the EVA with the booster would probably take all the fuel we had onboard. In the ground rule we had agreed not to do this. So I checked with CAP COM and we decided to not go ahead with the booster portion of the mission. I don't know if I mentioned it, but when we separated from the booster, it seemed like our rates on the booster were low, on the order of a half a degree a seco
11, ह्यूस्टन। हम अभी भी अंतःउष्णकटिबंधीय अभिसरण के साथ बैंडिंग देख रहे हैं। मेरा अनु
Roger. Ich höre dich seit etwa dr
Und ich habe eine Frage an John. Ich würde gerne wissen, wie seine Abfallanalyse voranschreitet
Di solito lasciamo riposare queste bevande per 5 o 10 minuti, ma Bill le berrà subito. Poi, per proseguire con il programma, taglia un altro l
Non. En réalité, nous n'avons pas vraiment eu le temps de faire grand-
Sembra tutto molto chiaro, marrone chiaro e grigio, sai, è proprio questo il colore. Quando ci arrivi, quando lo vedi, beh, non è affatto quello
Okay. I'm reading you loud with just a little background no
I will check my time as 1 plus 06 plus 50 seconds when I went into reentry attitude. The stars are very easy to see. I see quite a few, but am bothered by a considerable amount of red light. I, now, am going to devote some attention to the suit circuit for a minute or so. Then prepare to go 
And you want to
Bof, bof. Je me suis installé seulement une heure à l'avance (rires). Mieux vaut tard que jam
네, 그들은 이 
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 원하시면 더 하실 필요 없습니다. 휴식. 그리고 컬럼비아,
...추력을 정상으로 설정; 델타-V 추력 2, OFF; 피치 및 요를 자동으로 설정; 짐벌 모터 피치 및 요 OFF; 델타-V/CG, /CSM;
Ils entren
Хорошо, мы изучаем это, Водолей
MARK, hunder
حسناً ي
罗杰。上升 PAD：TIG 124 22 00 00 00 NOUN 76 55349 00322，加
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 알겠습니다. 잘 들립니다. 그리
没错
Es ging zu RATE 
برج الد
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम देख रहे हैं कि आप कनेक्ट हो गए हैं। यदि आप हमें स्वीकृति देंगे, तो हम अपना अपलिंक शुरू कर देंग
빌, 지금 체크리스트를 보면 이 작동 시점이 약 
Und, Houston. Der Computer gehört dir, du kannst jederzeit zu
分かりました。最初の追加質問ですが、元の質問に戻りましょう。この質問には
在卡那封取货。我们没办法像往常那样出
Давайте посмотрим. Скорость изменения орбиты с
Хорошо, перейдём к резервному варианту подключения (DOWN VOICE BACKUP) и выключим автоматический выключатель усилителя мощности (POWER AMPL). Если возникнут проблемы,
Ça n'apparaît pa
Das ist richtig. Als Nächstes
Roger, Mike. Sembra che se anticipassimo questo tempo di scarico e vi dessimo un nuovo carico, ci vorrebbe un nuovo att
Okay. I'm going to check t
Wassermann, es ist noch etwas zu früh, um genau zu sagen, wie es läuft. Wir würden gerne noch ein paar Punkte holen, also lest sie weiter
На
जेमिनी 4, हवाई कैप कॉम। क्या आपको समझ आ
Ich dachte, wir wären nah genug dran, um draußen den Rand d
هل 
D'accord. J'ai remarqu
Okay. O2 ist aus. Könnten Sie Ihre vorherige Aussage bitte präzisieren? Hatten Sie vor etwa 10 Minuten, als wir über OMNI verbunden waren,
حسنًا. شكرًا لك. الخطوة التالية بعد صمامات التحكم في 
D'accord. C'est comme ça qu'on l'avait prévu. On laisse Jack faire ses trois modifications, et
好的，杰克。步骤没问题，然后我们得回去做点什么。
Okay. Im Prinzip stimmt das. Ich erkläre es Ihnen kurz grob, dann lese ich Ihnen die einzelnen Schritte vor. Ich denke, dann wird es verständlicher. Das Prinzip ist, dass Sie zu bestimmten Winkeln fliegen können, die Ihre Optik auf den Mond ausrichten. Wenn Sie nun, egal in welcher Position Sie sich befinden, durch das Teleskop Sternmuster erkennen können, die Ihnen eine selbstständige Ausrichtung ermöglichen, dann möchten wir Sie an dieser Stelle unterbrechen und die Ausrichtung selbst vornehmen lassen. Wir geben Ihnen jedoch ein Verfahren an die Hand, mit dem Sie Dinge sehen können, die Sie durch das Teleskop ohn
ठीक है। बर्न के नियम। हमें तब इंजन बंद कर देना चाहिए जब थ्रस्ट मॉनिटर 77 प्रतिशत या उससे कम हो; नंबर 2, यदि प्रोपेलेंट उलेज प्रेशर 160 psi से कम हो; 3, यदि फ्यूल ऑक्सीडाइज़र 
제미니 4호, 하와이 CAP COM. 재진입 모드로 전환하십시오. 제미니 4호, 수신했
Okay. The information be
About 40 feet out - I'd 
Mancano 4 minuti. Ti darò un 
Roger. Vorremmo fare un piccolo bilanciamento del serbatoio CRYO. Quindi, se potessi posizionare l'interruttore del riscaldatore del serbatoio di
可怜的LM被污染了；上面到处都是尿液颗粒；而且，在这样的光线下，它们看起来是黄色的。你知道，那些小东西——
알겠습니다. 디스플레이는 열려 있고, SE 오디오는 닫혀 있고, VHF A 송신기는 열려 있고, VHF B 수신기는 열려 있고, 파워 앰프는 열
收到。获取 B 2 18 26；速度增量，49.3；扭矩增量，1 加 0.07；偏航角 0，俯仰角 0；核心 25，00493；核心 26 和 27，全
Роджер. Показания DELTA выглядели абсолютно точными. Время работы двигателя, как нам показалось, увеличилось примерно на 2 секунды, 517. Показания VGX составляли 95485, когда мы его получили. Ориентация была номинальной. Показания VI в момент отключения составляли 35452, H-dot 045
ठीक है, बढ़िया! हम माइक वॉश को इसके लिए शाबाशी देंगे। ठीक है जिम, ज़रा रुकिए, मैं देख लेता हूँ कि कोई 
收到。指示灯工作正常。不过
いいえ
了解しました。もう一度言います。アルファ225、74%。ブラボー240ポンド、79
Hous
ठीक
La fascia luminosa di stelle sembra... le stelle proprio attorno alla Croce del Sud e l'area vuota piuttosto scura e
ジェミニ4、カーナボンCAP CO
了解しました。インジケータライトテスト回路ブレーカーをオフにして、Mal
알겠습니다. 빌, 확인했습
Roger. Copy. Also, di
تفضل يا سيجم
Roger. Dem stimmen wir zu. Ich dachte nur, vielleicht könnte Jim – oder Sie – mi
C'est un sacré bon poste de couch
धुंध की परत के बीच में, फेक्डा दिखाई नहीं दे रहा है—मैं फोटोमीटर से भी इसकी रीडिंग नहीं ले पा रहा हूँ। फेक्डा अब क्षितिज के 
Friendship Seven, ici le chirurgien de Za
我还有一个问题。你把这个抄下来，然后复述一遍给我。好的。一旦你掌握了方法，想要使用——想要点亮指示灯，我们需要关闭 CB 16 INVERTER 2；关闭 CB 11 AC BUS A LAMP。之后，你可以打开 CB 16 INVERTER 2，以及 CB 11 AC
了解しました。オン
حسنًا. مفهوم. سيكون ذلك للمراجعة 57، التسلسل رقم 16، في تمام الساعة 8:11 صباحًا بتوقيت غرينتش. زاوية الانحراف 12 درجة، زاوية الميل 30 درجة، باستخدام كامير
And, 13, this is Hous
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 피치는 348도, 요각은 31
Wie wäre es damit – ein Paket aus Ihrem Br
Okay, Jack. Als Nächstes verschließen wir die Bypass-Öffnung, also das Loch in der Mitte des Behälterbodens. Wir müssen sie verschließen, damit der Durchfluss nicht unterbrochen wird. Ich habe vergessen zu sagen, dass du etwas zum Verschließen des Lochs benötigst. Wir empfehlen ein Feuchttuch, ein Stück Socke, das du abschneidest, oder etwas zerknülltes Klebe
रॉजर। ठीक है। दूसरी बात लैंडिंग के बाद की है। हम फिर से दोहराना चाहते हैं कि आप अंतरिक्ष यान में 1 घंटे से ज़्यादा समय नहीं बिताना चाहेंगे। अगर अंतरिक्ष यान में कोई रिसाव नहीं है, तो आप अपनी मर्ज़ी से अपने सूट उतार सकते हैं। खुला हैच रखना प
Hallo. Roger, Friendshi
我们建议您将陀螺仪设置
Mann, ich bin hier seit Stunden nu
حسنًا. لنبدأ. -2، /G&N: 63634؛ زائد 0.96، ناقص 0.23؛ ناقص 0.21.7، ناقص 0.17، ناقص 0.80؛ 0.80، 1.64، 3.26؛ غير متوفر، غير متوفر؛ 0.23.2، 0:03.5 - سنمنحك نصف ثانية في وقت الاحتراق لأنه قصير جدًا - 0.18.5؛ 44، 135.9، 28.1؛ والباقي
Роджер. Мы просмотрели графики и получили точно такой же ответ, как и вы. Похоже, ваша методика очень хороша; похоже, вы действительно хорошо всё продумали. Вы не забыли усреднить скорость. Мы также провели вычисления, чтобы проверить график, и получили хорошее 
收到。关于您的任务计时器，我们需要断开断路器，让它冷却一个半小时到两个小时。我相信断路器目前是断开的。它已经断开过了，所以请
큰 경기인 애스트로 블루 보닛 게임을 위해 SMU와 오클라호마 대학이 도착했습니다. 농구 빅매치에 이어 열리는 이 경기를 앞두고 선수들은 들뜬 분위기입니다. 어느 팀이 우세한지는 나와 있지 않네요. 나중에 확인해보고 우세팀이 있는지 알려드리겠습니다. 데이비스 컵은 현재 호주에서 진행 중이며, 미국은 다시 한번 우승을 탈환하기 위해 노력하고 있습니다. 오늘 경기에서는 미국이 우승 후보로 꼽히고 있습니다. 또 다른 소식으로는 O.J. 심슨이 월터 캠프 풋볼 재단에서 
そうですか、アクエリアスさん。ジンバル/スロットルテストは省略
Roger, Houston. Questo è un più 90 come segue: meno - il peso sar
On dirait que la vitre numéro 5 commence à s'emb
Okay, Ed
Roger, ich habe zwar Dunstschichten gesehen, aber nicht die, die wir erwartet und von John berichtet hatten und die sich vom Horizont abheben. Ich werde beim nächsten Mal genauer hinschauen und versuchen, sie nach Sonnenuntergang zu sehen. Auf der hellen Seite ist nur die helle, schillernde blaue Schicht zu erkennen, die den eigentlichen Horizont vom tiefen Schwarz des Weltraums 
了解。その時間まではWARMUPになり
收到，哥伦比亚。收到。很好，我们需要一份关于TEP的读数，大约是你——也就是“鹰”号——选择辅助环路
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это Кантонский коммерческий техн
你知道这……水
D'accord, Fred. On vous reçoit parfaitement. Bien. On prépare une procédure pour vous: un contrôle solaire sera effectué dans environ 74 heures, soit un peu plus de 3 heures. Il s'agira d'un cran d'arrêt 2. Nous vous fournirons une procédure détaillée sous peu, qui inclura une nouvelle désignation du radar de rendez-vous pour le libérer et une manœuvre d'assiette. Si le contrôle est correct à 1 degré près, votre plateforme devrait être prête pour la manœuvre sans problème. Dans le cas contraire, nous mettons au point une procédure d'alignement Terre/Soleil pour aligner la plateforme, et nous vous la communiquerons plus tard. Bien. Si le contrôle solaire est concluant, nous vous donnerons une étoile pour une vérification de sécurité sur la face arrière, dans l'obscurité. Nous 
Хьюстон, к вашему св
أرى بعض الأشياء تنطلق، لكن لا أستطيع رؤيتها بوضوح. ها نحن نصل إلى 0.05، إشارة خضراء. لن أتدخل في هذه المرحلة. في وضع التحكم بالمعدل، في وضع التخميد الإضافي. وقد بدأتُ بقياس معدل الدوران. معدل ميل طفيف، ليس سيئًا على الإطلاق. أستطيع الرؤية من النافذة أخيرًا لسبب غريب. ها هو جهاز آخر طويل يشبه اللولب. سأقيس ضغط دمي مرة أخرى الآن، بعد 0.05 غرام. جميع المعدلات طبيعية جدًا. أظن أن التحكم بالمعدل يع
准备升至再入姿态。现在没必要打开手套箱。得找个标准光源，我应该能找到。
Okay, maneuver pad, purpose: fly-by, /G&N; 63385; plus 0.97, minus 0.23;; plus 02
Nun ja, es gibt einige Wolken darüber und darunter, und ein ziemlich gute
...더
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हमें लगता है कि हमने आपके बेहद व्यस्त कार्यक्रम में कुछ समय बचाने का तरीका ढूंढ लि
Хорошо. Прежде чем вы начнете копировать, позвольте мне прочитать вам все это целиком, чтобы вы поняли, о чем мы говорим. Название этого небольшого послания — «Эксперимент по корреляции теле- и киносъемки», и они хотят установить телекамеру с телеобъективом на кронштейне в окне съемки и сделать телеснимок Земли через красный и синий фильтры, по 1 минуте на каждый фильтр; то есть, по отдельности через красный и синий фильтры. Затем они хотели бы сделать телеснимо
ما هو الوضع الذي تستخدمه
रॉजर। हम आपकी प्रगति पर नज़र रख रहे हैं। सलाह दी जाती है कि ऐसा लगता है कि आप अपना पहला तारा पूरा कर रहे हैं, और हमें 
هذا هو سيجما سبعة. أنا مستعد الآن لتسلسل رجع
了解しました、カナリア。ジェミニ。通常の飛行計画に戻りましたが、現時点では具体的な時刻はあまり詳細ではありません。実験開始の参考として、飛行計画を随時更新し、適切な時刻を具体的に記載したいので、ヒュー
.
यह फ्रें
रॉजर, जैक। वेंटिंग वाकई में... जैसा कि मैंने पहले बताया था, मैंने एक बड़ा टुकड़ा गुजरते हुए भी देखा था और हमारे जलने से पहले... अब जो वेंटिंग आप देख रहे हैं वह बहुत अध
Я определённо вижу следы рыскания в окне, в перископе, в прицельной сетке. Само окно работает удовлетворительно при угле обзора (-) 34 градуса, я закрыл гироскоп и теперь возвращаюсь влево, чтобы устранить рыск
항상 그런 것은 
로저. 복사, 11. 아주 분명하게 보입니다. 거
哎，我这几个小时一直忙
네, 그렇습니다. 자세: 롤 0도, 요 2도 우측, 피치 -33도. 모든 수치가 0을 나타내고 있습니다. 현재 작동 중입니다. 시계는 여전히 복귀 시간으로 설정되어 있으며, 역행 시간은 04 + 32 + 28입니다. 버뮤다에서 역행 시간 정보는 정확합니다. 객실 압력은 5.7로 안정적으로 유지되고 있습니다. 객실 온도는 90도입니다. 상대 습도는 30%입니다. 냉매량은 68%입니다. 우주복 내부 온도는 65도입니다. 우주복 압력은 5.8을 나타내고 있습니다. 우주복 증기 온도는 60도입니다. 매우 편안합니다. 하지만 아직 출력을 낮추고 싶지 않습니다. 1차 산소는 78%, 2차 산소는 102%입니다. 메인 버스는 24입니다. 1번 버스는 25, 25, 25입니다. 1번 대기 
分かりました。分かりました。まず第一に、これらのルールは厳しい制限のあるモード I の中止と同様であるべきというのが基本的な考え方です。では、皆さんがコピーできるように 1 つずつ説明していきます。分かりました。以下のいずれかの事象が発生した場合は、シャットダウンする必要があります。推力モニターの読み取り値が 77% 以下。推進剤タンク圧力 (これは入口圧力です) の機内読み取り値が 160 以下。燃料 OX DELTA-P が 25 psi 以上 (これは地上への呼び出しとなります)。姿勢誤差がプラスまたはマイナス 10 度 (始動過渡を除く)。姿勢レート制限が 1 秒あたりプラスまたはマイナス 10 度。また、以下のいずれかの事象が発生した場合もシャットダウンする必要があります。エンジン ジンバル、ISS
Хот-дог! Стар
네, 맞습니다. 그럼 간단히 설명드리자면, 먼저 전원을 켜고 8볼을 올린 다음, 자세를 설정하고, 앞쪽 창에 표시를 하고, 유도 제어는 당연히 작동시키겠습니다. 하지만 수동으로 우주선의 방향을 조정해서 지구 중심이 Z축 바로 위에 오도록 하세요. 그런 다음 Z축을 중심으로 회전해서 초승달 모양의 꼭짓점이 Y축에 오도록 합니다. 이렇게 하면 앞서 설명드린 대로 X축이 태양 방향을 가리키게 됩니다. 즉, 초승달 모양이 위쪽을 향
好的。向前 36-4 40 英尺/秒。那是 1+06。向后 120 英尺/秒，位置 2+31。位置 2
Roger, ich vers
제
Apollo 8, I read you loud and clear. How 
저 밖에서 잘
数量
अब 6 घंटे 35 मिनट बीत चुके हैं, और मैं अंतरिक्ष य
Okay, ich glaube, ich habe dir dafür etwas Blut gegebe
Ricevuto. Qualcuno ha segnalato che il sacco di atterraggio potrebbe essere caduto? Pass
了解。ありがと
ちなみに、ジョー、もしあなたが私たちを監視しているなら、私たちは全
Ok
Nous reviendrons sur les détails de ce qui nous entoure, mais il semble s'agir d'un ensemble de roches de tout
Roger. On compte faire ça. Je me demandais juste combien de temps on pouvait encore attendre. On a probablement encore une demi-heure de photos, et je suppose qu'on pourrait faire un cycle de repas, puis changer le f
جيم، 
أرى بعض الأشياء تنطلق، لكن لا أستطيع رؤيتها بوضوح. ها نحن نصل إلى 0.05، إشارة خضراء. لن أتدخل في هذه المرحلة. في وضع التحكم بالمعدل، في وضع التخميد الإضافي. وقد بدأتُ بقياس معدل الدوران. معدل ميل طفيف، ليس سيئًا عل
好的。在250号配电盘上，断路器BAT A（电源入口/落地式电源）闭合；在275号配电盘上，断路器INVERTER POWER 2（主电源B）闭合。接下来几个断路器在5号配电盘上：断路器BAT RELAY BUS（电池
रॉजर, हम आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से सुन पा रहे हैं। हम यहाँ एक वोबुलेटर परीक्षण करन
Хорошо. А как насчет того, чтобы вы подготовили еще какие-нибудь данные, которые вам
«Аполлон-8». Хьюстон. У меня для вас результаты матча. Окончательный счет: Окленд — 41, Канзас-Сити — 6. 41:6 в пользу Окленда. Мы пытаемся подготовить для вас пресс-релизы. Подозреваю, что главной новостью дня,
알았어, 내가 잡고
مساء الخير. معكم قائد أبولو ١١. قبل مئة عام، كتب جول فيرن رواية عن رحلة إلى القمر. انطلقت مركبته الفضائية، كولومبيا، من فلوريدا وهبطت في المحيط الهادئ بعد إتمام رحلتها إل
Wissen Sie, es ist wirklich schade, dass die Seitenscheiben beschlagen sind, denn durch die Fenster des Treffpunkts sehen wir nie Sonne, und durch
わかりました。OMNI を切り替えるだけです。わかりました。ジョー、1 ～ 4 ページの変更点を読んでみると、燃料電池ヒーター 3 がオフで、燃料電池 1 
ニールとバズ、こちらはヒューストンです。前回の件について確認ですが、消耗品は今のところ良好な状
Ja, das wäre in Ordnung. Sie können die Anlage überholen lassen. Das ist allerdings ein etwas aufwendiger Prozess, weshalb wir die Anlage im Auge behalten möchten, um vor dem Betreten der Anlage abschätzen zu können, ob wir mit zwei oder nur einem Heizkreislauf rechnen können. Das führt uns zu einer weiteren Frage, genauer gesag
了解、フレッド。次のステップは、推進剤温度モニター
Okay. Ich überprüfe jetzt Wechselrichter 1. Wechselrichter 2 ist in Ordnung; und Wechselrichter 1 ist auch in Ordnung, und wir sind im W
आपकी ऊंचाई 9413 है; वेग 6072 है; रोल 1 डिग्री है, पिच 58 है
了解し
지금 프레드랑 같이 아래로 내려가서 어떻게 작동하는지 보여드리려고 하는데, 자꾸 위로 떠오르네요. 그래도 여기서라도 사진 한 장 건질 수 있을지도 몰라
N
Questo è negativo. Aspetta. Tutto 
फ्रैंक, हम जो करना चाहते हैं 
Guten Abend. Ich möchte mit Ihnen einige der symbolträchtigeren Aspekte unserer Apollo-11-Mission besprechen. In den Gesprächen der le
Is that too close, Vance, or can you make out the engine panel
Roger. Ci risulta che non puoi effettuare una manovra per l'assetto di scarico perché sono gli angoli che ti abbiamo dato e non corrispondono agli angoli
Houston, Columbia è in OMNI C, Charlie, VOCE DI RITORNO GIÙ e, quando puoi, potresti cercarmi le coordinate del 130, per favore? Ho informazioni contrastanti tra la mia scheda di smistamento e il mio piano di v
Roger. Abbiamo c
Хьюстон, Ап
Roger Canary, Gemelli
알겠습니다. 무슨 말인지 알겠어요. 다시 한번 설명해 드릴게요. 큐 카드를 가져와서 위쪽으로 아치형을 
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir haben verstanden, dass Sie uns in Kopie senden. Während wir versuchen, den Kontakt wiederherzustellen, bitten wir Sie, Ihre Optik auf Null zu stellen. Wir sehen, dass Sie
よし、ジョー。コピーする準備はできている
杰克，这里最棒的一点，尤其对我这样的新手来说，就是——在这里行动非常方便。当然，正如你在指令舱模拟器里工作时所了解的，零重力环境确实非
वह क्या करेगा
Bon, ça fait trois minutes et dix secondes d'oxygénothérapie à haut débit. Je ne veux pas que ça dure cinq minutes. Je pense que c'est trop pour un homme. La température à l'entrée de la combinaison est montée à 64 et la pression est descendue à 825. On va activer les réc
Индийская команда по ра
13번, 휴스턴. 네. 폭발물 처리반 사용 허가합니다. 기내
이것은 시그마 세븐입니다. 일출 시간에 거꾸로 비행하는 모습을 보여드리고 있는데, 90도 회전(요)이 특징입니다. 비행 방향이 가장 명확하게 보입니다. 마치 기차 창밖을 보는 것과 같습니다. 지나가는 지형이 보이고, 다양한 종류의 구름이 보입니다. 기체의 세로축에 대해 90도 각도로 휩쓸고 지나가는 구름들을 볼 수 있습니다. 회전이 매우 생생하게 느껴지는 순간입니다. 지금 기체가 거꾸로 뒤집힌 상태임에도 불구하고, 기체 앞부분이 제대로 된 회전 자세
好了，休斯顿，水瓶座。我们已经把旁通
Stand by, and I will stand by for a mark on com
嗯，月亮几乎完全消失了。我们想知道你有没有可能从其他窗户往外看
了解。ウォームアップで2をコピーしました。最後までやってみ
OK. J'ai maintenant les amplificateurs de puissance, PC + 2 heures,; 38.030, + 08330, - 00509, - 02139, N/A, + 00205, 08615, 4:24, 272, 081; reste N
这是友谊七号。负面。我遇到了一些问题。我的态度
जिम, एक और सवाल है। यहाँ 
Roger, Houston. We are 
Вы уда
شكراً لك يا أبولو 11. أنا متأكد من أنهم، إن لم يسمعوا
トラッキング ライトが見えるはずです - そうです - 見えません... でも、そうではありません - オ
Roger. One more comment: as it offered a lot of controversy at data priority meetings, it looks like 10 degrees pitch up is the best attitude to obtain the horizon s
روجر. ما زلت أتابعك. أشعر ببعض الإرهاق. مع بلوغي الثلاثين، حالتي جيدة. الوقود والأكسجين مستقران. ضغط المقصورة 5.8 رط
Apollo 8, Apollo 
Роджер. У нас остался один магазин п
로저. 40 2711 398 
네, 맞습니다. 패널 350, 변경 없음. 패널 351, 메인 조절 밸브 2개는 모두 닫힘(CLOSED)으로, H2O/글리콜 탱크 압력 조절 밸브는 꺼짐(OFF
Sono quasi certo c
フランクさん、おっしゃっている手続きは実際には不要で、
Okay,
Okay. Our is recording those numbers. 
혈압 측정 좀 해주시겠어요? 버튼을 누르신 후, 번지 코드를 당기시고, 다시
はい
BAT Charlie，37.0；烟火 A，37.0；烟火 B，37.0；氦气压力，3450；顺便一提，氮气 A，2300；氮气 B，2400；5 Charlie，4.5；5 Dog，3.5；6 Alfa，4.0；6 
Roger. Rev 57, Sequenz 16, 08:11, Gierwinkel 12°, 
D'accord. Pour répondre à ta question, Joe, non. J'ai vérifié la CABINE en permanence. Qualitativement, quand on est passés à cette configuration, la fréquence ou le bruit du ventilateur de la combinaison n'ont pas semblé diminuer. Ils se sont peut-être un peu atténués, mais je vais suivre ta procédure. 
好的。日出时间是祖鲁时间17:10，第一缕曙光
कोलंबिय
Ricevuto. Probabilmente ci vorranno altri 10 o 15 secondi. Stiamo per attraversare il Vang
Хорошо. Мы предполагаем, что у вас всё ещё больше воды, чем нужно. И вот что мы хотели бы попросить вас сделать, когда вы бу
О, да. Так гораздо лучше. Вы получили мой отчет о разных типах людей и о том, чем они здесь з
...そして我々が待ってい
Apollo 8, kinda stand by for a burst of noise as we change configurations on the ground. We're going into test 1; You'll sti
SEP, RCS/G&N à un TIG de 100 
Ja. Warten Sie einen. Ungef
Ha qualcosa a che fare con il fatto di bagnarsi i pantalon
أرى نجمًا ساطعًا في السماء، لا بد أنه كوكب الزهرة. نسيت أن أحفظ
これを見て
Vielen Dank. Ich nehme an, wir haben noch eine Kryo-Umrührung vor uns, und wir haben Ihre dreifache Vorspannung überprüft, und es gibt keine Veränd
Okay. Wir empfehlen, bei 54°45°00' anzuhalten. Damit sollten Sie den optimalen Rollwinkel erreichen. Die empfohlene Fluglage ist: Roll 263°, Nick 090°, Gier 000°. So haben Sie im Kommandomodul freie Sicht auf die Erde durch Fenster 1 und können die Hochleistungsantenne für Fernsehempfang nach Belieben im Fenster platzieren. Die Sonne scheint dann durch die Luke, und wenn Sie die Jalousien herunterlassen, gelangt etwas Sonnenlicht ins Innere. Wir empfehlen eine breite Tot
Roger, Tom. Nur zur Information: Unser T/M bestätigt dies, un
Okay.
Okay. Es gibt heute Morgen nicht viel Neues in den Nachrichten. Es ist ziemlich ruhig. Die wichtigste Nachricht betrifft wohl die Unfallzahlen – die Todesfälle an den Feiertagen –, was natürlich keine erfreuliche Nachricht ist. Landesweit kamen 233 Menschen ums Leben, neun davon in Houston am Heiligabend und an Weihnachten. In den Weltnac
Хорошо. Понял
了解しました。再生時のシステムデータを確認しましたが、すべて順調です。特に、は良好です。ただし、バンクAのボールバルブのみの燃焼を実施するよう要請がありましたので、再度お知らせします。2回はGOです。また、現在の飛行計画では、明日96時間頃に進入を開始する予定ですが、それより早く進入を開始
DELTA-TIG était nul et le temps de combustion ét
Apollo 11, Houston. We'd like to terminate the TV. We don't - We think we got a really - a good tape. That hour and a half show was superb. 
जी हां, और क्या आप अपने ईसीएस ऑक्सीजन स्विच को बंद कर 
フライトでは、リング B でラインをクリアしますが、モーター バルブはオフのま
حسنًا. تريد منا أ
चांद देखने में कोई दिक्कत नहीं हुई। जब मैंने तारे के निशान की दिशा में देखा, तो मुझे चांद बहुत पतला अर्धचंद्राकार दिखा, लेकिन वह साफ दिख
रॉजर... गेट आरसी 25 15 58; आरटी 400के, 20 प
Hallo Cal Com Tech, Aurora Seven. Laut und deutlich. Wie 
麦
Die Farbe der lokalen Oberfläche ist
धन्यवाद। ठीक है। और लड़कों को हमारे सिस्टम पर कड़ी नज़र रखने के लिए कहो। बूढ़ा एंडर्स इन तस्वीरों के साथ इतना व्यस्त है कि बाकी कोई काम हो ही नही
Roger. Vorremmo che passa
Apol
Oh, okay, grazie. Quello che stiamo ottenendo ora è una b
アトランティック・シップ、こちらフレンドシップ7号です。ケープ岬へ行っていただけませんか。カプセルを180度の位置まで流してしまい、現在、方向転換をしています。イアンが水平線と潜望鏡に一直線になった時、姿勢指示が大きくずれています。ロールは右30度、ヨーは右35度、ピッチはプラス40度を示しています
How about using, as an undocking time, 100 hours an
Roger. 21-4 56.
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन।
O
Да, похоже, он немно
حسنًا، هيوستن. اللوحة 276، أجهزة القياس خارجة وأعيد ضبطها 
Ok, la prima stella: l'altitud
닐, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 말씀하신 내용 잘 들립니다. 잠시 쉬어주세요. 버즈, 여기는 트랭퀼리티를 통해
Roger. We have you about 30 seconds prior to separa
और मैंने क्रॉस फीड 
BAT Charlie, 37.0; pyro A, 37.0; pyro B, 37.0; pressione dell'elio, 3450; e giusto per divertimento, azoto A, 2300; azoto B, 2400; 5 Charlie, 4.5; 
Okay. Right now, our gimbal angles are about - roll's about 
好的。
Jim, nous avons quelques nouvelles. Le président Nixon a nommé un juge du Minnesota au poste de juge associé à la Cour suprême. Un projet de loi accordant une augmentation de salaire de 6 % a
ठीक है। आगे बढ़ने से पहले आप मुझे बता दीजिए। हमें अभी इसकी
Roger. Aktuelles zu Luna 15: TASS meldete heute Morgen, dass die Raumsonde in eine Umlaufbahn nahe der Mondoberfläche gebracht wurde und alles an Bord normal zu funktionieren scheint. Sir Bernard Lovell sagte, die Sonde befinde sich offenbar in einer Uml
حسناً. لقد تم تخزينها جميعاً. قم بتوصيل خرطوم 
No, non è 
알겠습니다. 궤도가 87, 147로 변경되었습니다. 공칭 M=4로 설정하여 진행을 시작하세요. 약간의 궤도면 변경이 있을 예정입니다. 자세한 내용은 나중에 알려드리겠습니다. 또한, 온도가 평소보다 높았던 것으로 알고 있으며, 40분에 1번 유닛의 오
ठीक 
알
Jim, it looks pretty good except that the pitch i
현재 기체가 
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы сказать, сколько примерно времени пройдет, прежде чем вы начнете закрывать заднюю крышку? Конец с
حسنًا. النافذتان رقم 1 ورقم 5 ضبابيتان، لكنهما قد تكونان مفيدتين جزئيًا. ناف
設定は PEAK になっているのではないかという予感がしますが、まだ設定していない場合は ALC
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमने LOI 2
Okay. Das ist bestätigt. Im nächsten S
Okay. On row 1 under FLIGHT DISPLAYS, SYSTEMS ENGI
Roger. Alles richtig vorgelesen. Ich habe noch zwei kurze Anmerkungen dazu, möchte aber ein
好的。电池A 38.3V，电池B 36.9V，电池C 38.5V。看起来不错。看来我们已经把之前取出的部件都装回去了，一切都在按预期进行。请您伸手过去切换一下电池C，我们需要
य
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 수치는 백분율로 표시되어 있습니다. 이제 파운드로 변
Roger. Je comprends. Tu as trop 
मनोवृत्ति स
Roger, du kannst ihm auch mitteilen, dass seine Frau die Blumen erhalten hat und vergessen hat, ihm das 
好的。我想你
오로라 세븐, 여기는 카나리 캡콤입니다. 들
极光七号，卡普
Finora il nostro problema principale, a parte il portello e qualche altro 
17-BRAVO 87, 01+51. 01 17 26 03. 10+03. 18-1 04+14. 18 02 42. 02+44. 08+57. 18-BRAVO 85. 01+48. 18 57 42. 09+19. 19-4 137, 03+3 - correzione, correzione, 03+22. 
لا، يمكنك التعامل
Apollo 8, Hou
E, Jim, il nostro piano attuale è di non correggere il... Prenderemo tutto quello che avremo e ci conviveremo. E potremmo in un certo
حسنًا. لا داعي للعجلة في ذلك. كنت أتساءل فقط عما إذا كنت قد فعلت ذلك؛ سنتحقق منه مقابل ما لدينا في مخططنا ال
Passez à 
友谊七号。瓜伊马斯指挥中心。我们还有大约3分钟才能获取遥测数据。我会告诉你，我会告诉你2号区域Alp
جراح RKV. روجر. لدى CAP COM
ठीक है। धन्यवाद। आज तो 
Ma quando l'ho visto per la prima volta,
표면 전체가 이전에 태양이 우리 머리 위 높이 떠 있었을 때보다 
Negativo. I
All they are doing there is just making sure you get your heater circuit 
Okay. 
지금이 물 한 모금 마시기에
わかった、ジャック。ジョー・カーウィンから電源の入れ方を
Due decimi di punto percentuale, mi dis
С 10 
क्या आप चाहते हैं कि हम इन्हें स्वीकार करें, या हमें इन्हें अनदेखा कर
Houston, Apol
Negativo. Al momento non c'è da preoccuparsi. Stiamo monitorando la situazione e volevamo solo farvi sapere che la stiamo esaminando. Se ci avviciniamo anche solo lontanamente a una situazione in cui riteniamo di dover cambiare, torneremo indietro 
Okay. O2 ist aus. Könnten
Roger. Pass you
Roger. Pourriez-vous
Right now we're talking about a 7-foot-per-second midcourse at 104 hours. And extrapolate that down to about 8 hours befo
어! 방금 그 섬광 봤어요? 응? 네. 공중 조명에 아주 밝은 섬광이 번쩍였어요. 당신 쪽이었어요. 아주 
Okay. Vielen Dank. Die g
أنا الآن أتج
Это «Дружба Семь», вещание из слепого наблюдения. Подождите минутку. «Дружба Семь», вещание из слепого наблюдения, ночные наблюдения на открытом воздухе. Кажется, высоко над горизонтом находится слой небесных светил; намного выше всего, что я в
Здравствуй
Роджер, командир индийского военного округа. Я вас прекрасно слышу
حسنًا. حسن
D'accord. Voilà pour les projecteurs du panneau 8. Maintenant, on va régler le rhéostat des projecteurs du panneau 5 sur « FLOOD » et 
Wie lange dauert es bis zum Wiede
ところで、今回の航海では後ろ
Roger
Beh, la zona sembra liscia, ma non sono riuscito a vederlo
Das stimmt. Wir bekamen zunächst unregelmäßige Anzeigen im Primärsystem, also schalteten wir auf das Sekundärsystem um. Dort waren die Anzeigen ebenfalls unregelmäßig, und ich dachte, es könnte an einem Sensor liegen. Aber jetzt hat sich alles beruhigt, und wir ve
好的
Roger. 10, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35189, minus 01513, minus 00346 180 007 000, November Alfa plus 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, boresight star Scorpii Delta (another name for it is Dzuba) down 071, left
Хорошо, Скиппер. Мы не видим никаких проблем с теплоотдачей в результате этого изменения. Если возникнут проблемы со связью, возможно, нам придётся что-то изменить, но пока всё хорошо. И нам бы хотелось ус
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8। हमें ओम्नी पर स
حسنًا.
ठीक है। अब जब हम चंद्रमा से वापस आ गए हैं, तो मैं आपके लिए कुछ सामान्य बातों पर प्रकाश डालना चाहूँगा - खाद्य क्षेत्र में हुए विकास। मुझे यकीन है कि आप पहले से ही पेय पदार्थ के कंटेनर के प्रकार से परिचित होंगे। थोड़ी देर बाद, माइक आपको दिखाएगा कि हाइड्रोजन को निकालने के लिए नए फिल्टर के साथ वाटर गन कैसे काम करती है। मूल रूप से, इस वाटर गन को इस सिरे से डाला जाता है और इस बैग को पानी से भर दिया जाता है, फिर पेय पदार्थ पानी में घुल जाता है, और इस सिरे से बाहर निकल जाता है। इसी तरह, हमारे पास अन्य ठोस खाद्य प
700 pieds, 21 vers le bas
... 
Okay. On page 6 1 of the entry out checklist down toward the bottom after "MAIN DEPLOY pushbutton," we have three additional steps we'd like you to accomplish. The intent of this is to reduce the oxygen pressure in your
Я стою в шести футах от него, Чарли, и ты можешь прочитать это лучше, чем я. С систе
好的。我们现在正在测量一些恒
それは
3,2,
마이크, 당신은 어떻게 글을 읽
Nous n'avons pas d'autre en
Penso che due angoli si siano toccati, dato che quando è stato dispiegato, non sono usciti entrambi contemporaneamente. Si è aperto in modo un po' irregolare e, naturalmente, il terreno su cui si trovava era un po' - non proprio livellato - come avrei voluto. E credo che due angoli si siano toccati per circa 2,5 cm - no, da tre quarti a mezzo pollice di profondità; e forse lungo il fondo, forse 7,5 cm, lasciando un piccolo rivestimento triangolare su due degli angoli; e credo che questi siano su quelli occid
D'
알았
Вс
好的。我现在有功率安培数了，PC加2小时，；38.030，
토끼 옷을 입고 그 운동을 
收到，阿波罗1
挺好的，杰克。对了，你可
حسنًا. يبدو لنا، رغم أننا نقرأ نفس الكمية التي تقرأها أنت على جهاز القياس الرباعي، باستخدام برنامج الكمبيوتر وجميع عوامل التصحيح المُدرجة فيه، أن قراءات أجهزة القياس الرباعية الأربعة متقاربة جدًا. على سبيل المثال، يبدو أن لديك 193 رطلاً في الجهاز الرباعي A، و189 في B، و200
わかりました。現在、宇宙船の速度はピッチとヨーで約1度/秒、ロー
Roger. Das hat uns auch etwas übe
Jack, warte mal
Ok. Vediamo se ho capito bene. A 49 ore, prima di uscire da
좋은 생각인데요. 연소 후
जेमिनी 4, हव
Немного музыки из "With Their Eyes on the Stars",
रॉ
مرحباً، أبولو ١١. هيوستن. نحن على وشك الوصول إلى أقصى حدٍّ يمكننا فيه الحصول على أي نوع من الصورة على شاشات التلفزيون متعددة الاتجاهات. أعتقد أن الصورة ستكون شبه معدومة في هذه 
了解しました。これは手順の2番目のステップです。22時40分、あるいはあなたがその時間に到着したら、バッテリーAの充電を開
好的。你是想让我把这里多余的材料修剪
Bene. E poi, più avanti, a circa 3 metri, c'è una roccia ancora più grande, molto arrotondata. Quella roccia è circa... Quella più vicina a te spor
好的，吉姆。等你把姿态调整得更陡一些之后，我们进行一次机身轴线校准，校准点在 400 加 5 的位置。如果此时球体向上，球体将移动到 000。我们稍后可以详细讨论控制模式，但我们建议你当然是在姿态保持模式下进行操作。将偏航设置为模式控制，俯仰和横滚保持在脉冲模式，这样就可以用偏航来控制姿态。我们不想使用万向节，所以关闭发动机万向节。我们将以 10%
Okay. Wenn – mal sehen, wenn wir – ich verstehe Ihren letzten Kommentar nicht. Wenn wir auf ein Problem stoßen, sollen wi
Gute Show. Wie sieht's aus? Sie scheint mir ziemlich aufrecht zu stehen. Sie ist ein bisschen nach links geneig
はい。わかりました。次は司令船の写真です。司令船からサービスモジュールを見るのは少し難しいかもしれませんが、もし見えるとしたら5番窓からだろうと、ここにいる人たちは考えています。そのためには70ミリレンズをお勧めします。これらの写真は優先度2です。これは70ミリELで、80ミリレンズを取り付けた状態で、すべてB-3にあります。80ミリレンズを取り外し、250ミリレンズを取り付けます。250ミリレンズはU-4にありま
नमस्कार, ह्यूस्टन। अ
جوردو، هل لديك موعد لإجراء ف
Bene. Il tuo atterraggio... l
A Mosca, l'ingegnere spaziale Anatol Koritsky, citato dalla TAS
好吧——今天早上，我们来看看它与M线平行的程度。在我们第一次开始标记之前，这三个角度的计算似乎有些偏差，我浪费了很多燃料，先调整到这三个角度，然后再进行大幅度的姿态调整以使M线平行。在某些情况下，似乎只需要一个公认的姿态，但你们都说不需要。所以有些情况下，我的标记是在M线不平行的情况下进行的。我以为你们可能有一个
Oh, son of a gun! (Laughter) We're goi
Le deuxième sac à dos est posé au sol, je l'espère, positi
알겠습니다. 2시간에서 15시간 사이의 시간을 삭제하고, 시간이 있을 경우
收到。你的姿态角为：横滚1
يا أهل هيوستن، ستُقدم لكم قاعدة ترانكويليتي بعض التعليقات بخصوص سؤال الجيولوجيا الذي طُرح الليلة الماضية. لقد هبطنا في حقل فوهات بركانية ن
罗杰。源压力为1950
روجر. أفهم أنك تريدنا أن نلقي نظرة على 
Affermativo. Area 3 Echo, Area 
제가 이해가 안 되는 건, 이게 도대체 뭘
罗杰。读得好
そして、フレッドさん、DELTA-VR
안녕하세요, 지금 앞쪽 트렁크를 가리키고 있는데
١١، هذه هيوستن. يبدو أن التشويش على جهاز الاتصال قد خفّ الآن. أعتقد أننا قمنا بتدوير هوائي جديد ليصبح مرئيًا، وربما اختفت 
让我看看。在密苏里州斯普林菲尔德，布鲁克林道奇队的老牌捕手米奇·欧文（Mickey Owen）决定，他不仅要以体育成就载入史册，还要以其他方式被人们铭记。1941年世界大赛上，他因漏接第三个好球而导致纽约扬基队战胜道奇队。他向45名男孩女孩赠送了小马。他请这些孩子写信告诉他，他们会如何照顾小马。信件纷至沓来，他在原有20匹小马的基础上又增加了5匹；其他捐赠者又捐赠了20匹。米奇·
Beautiful, beautiful. And for you information, Jim, you'll
حسنًا يا جاك. ما نريده منك هو إغلاق صمام المواد المتفاعلة في خلية الوقود رقم 2. إيقاف تشغ
Наши эксперты утверждают, что это не причина с
Friendsh
حسنًا يا
제미니 8호. 지상에서
Apollo 8, this is Houston. is rewound, and it's yours - available for use is about 1 hour of low bit rate and 2 minu
هيوستن، هل قمت بنسخ NOUN 05، وهل تنظر إ
حسنًا. انظروا. ل
روجر. كانت الساعة 05:36 ودرجة الحرارة 3 درجات
Okay. Here we go. The purpose is midcourse correction for free return.:; minus 0021.3, plus 0004.1, minus 0031.2; HA and HP are NA; DELTA-V 0038.0; 031, 120, 298, minus 00213, plus 00041, minus 00312; NA. And I have your GDA angles. Pitch 5.86, roll 6.75. Your throttling, 5 seconds at 10 percent, burn the rest 
Роджер. Проблема заключалась в проверке сканера. И вращение прошло, как мы и ожидали. Сейчас я возвращаюсь к нормальному режиму работы гироскопов, примерно на 2 минуты раньше. Это тот порядок действий, который был
11, Houston. Nous avons un PAD préliminaire de 30 exempla
मुझे रेगिस्तान में नीचे एक काली आग दिखाई दे रही है। आग के स्रोत तक साफ़-साफ़ देखा जा सकता है। मैं ठीक से देख तो नहीं पाया कि वह क्या थी, लेकिन उसने ज़मीन पर एक बहुत ही स्पष्ट निशान छोड़ दिया है। 17 नंबर हाईवे पार करते समय मैंने S-5 से कई भू-भाग की तस्वीरें
«Дружба Семь», это Индийская командная стан
ठीक है। प्रक्रिया इस प्रकार है:,, एंटर; 1331, एंटर; 7, एंटर; और एंटर। स्पष्टीकरण इस प्रकार है। इस दौरान, एक बार ऐसा हुआ जब ऑप्टिक्स ज़ीरो स्विच को ज़ीरो पर करने के लगभग 16 सेकंड बाद कंप्यूटर में दर्ज किया गया। यह एक बहुत ही असामान्य विसंगति है क्योंकि, यदि आप ऑप्टिक्स को ज़ीरो करने के लगभग 16 सेकंड बाद -0.4 सेकंड के अंतराल के दौरान ऐसा करते हैं, तो कुछ OPT-मोड बिट्स रीस
Roger. Minus three balls 24. And you can g
जैक, ह्यूस्टन। आपकी आवाज़ नहीं आ रही है। आपसे अनुरोध है कि कृपया माइक में थोड़ा और सीधे बोलें। मु
حسنًا. سأع
OK, c'est bon. Je suis dedans; l'assiette est correcte; 
ठीक है। अब हम आपकी बात बेहतर ढंग से 
Хорошо. Вот, Джим, и далее. Это стартовая площадка для старта плюс 60. Причина обновления — избегание не
Вы сейчас используете ручное пропорциональное управление или электронн
حسنًا. هذا هو الحد الأقصى لحجم المكالمات التي يمكننا استقبالها هنا؛ لذا إذا كنت ترغب بالتحدث إلينا، فقد تضطر إلى الاتص
——服务模块 RCS 推进
일
Roger. Abbiamo un paio di modifiche alle regole della missione NO GO per la tua carta NO GO, Neil. Una piccola modifica alla carta APS/carburante e pressione TEMP, e abbiamo una modifica alla procedura per il controllo delle perdite del radiatore secondario, che verrà effettuato alle 71:00 di domani,
Tangage
روجر، لدينا رسالة واحدة لك. يرغبون في محاولة الاتصال بك فوق
로저, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 안구운동검사는 1분
How about some 
ठीक है। बढ़िया, फ्रैंक। दूसरी बात ये है कि पीछे वाले कमरे में बैठे लड़कों को थोड़ा समय चाहिए जब सब जाग रहे हों - अगर आप दोनों केबिन के पंखे लगभग 5 मिनट के लिए चला दें, तो वे देखना चाहेंगे कि जब हवा का बहाव शुरू हो जाए और रुकावट दूर हो जाए, तो टेलीमेट्री
Ils ne verraient rien maintenant. On n'a auc
好的，Van
Préparatio
わかりました。司令船内に水が入っているのを初めて確認しました。101号機の時のように、後部隔壁
Laut und 
Roger. Möchtest du deinen Sender hochfahren, um mit dem Ausl
مثل محاذاة ملفات PNG. انته
네, 그 사람이 맞네요
لا يبدو أنها قادمة من الكبسولة على الإطلاق. إنها كثيرة جداً.
यह सही है। ठीक है। अगला। मोड - पर - जब आप निर्धारित स्थिति में हों, तो मोड कंट्रोल ऑटो चुनें। दरों की निगरानी के लिए कुंजी दबाएँ; जब 0.1 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड से कम हो, तो सभी अक्षों में दर की निगरानी करें, फिर प्लस-X थ्रस्टर्स को निष्क्रिय करें। ठीक है। अगला, एंटर दबाएँ; 1257, एंटर दबाएँ; 252, एंटर दबाएँ; 1, एंटर दबाएँ; एंटर दबाएँ; DAR 22110 डालें और आगे बढ़ें; एंटर दबाएँ; फिर, दरों की निगरानी करें। सभी अक्षों में 0.01 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड से कम दर
Apollo 11,
Проверка отношения к проблеме будет связана с прямыми иностранными инв
ふたご座VI。あなたはだんだんと消えては
Die Wassersperre wird gese
حسناً. 
ठीक है, चैम्बर का दबाव थोड़ा कम हो रहा है; अब यह वापस बढ़ रहा है; चैम्बर का 
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。夕阳西下，白队向你道晚安。如果我们能拿到关于十分之七任务的报道
لدي الآن ضغط 3.5 رطل لكل بوصة مربع
Roger. Pericynthian plus 2, Minimum / 62871, NA, NA, minus 00468, plus 00254, plus 00181 173 101 027, NA, plus 00187 
Меня совершенно не волнует отношение
알겠습니다. 저희는 고비트레이트를 유지할 계획입니다. 저희도 그게 어떤 차이를 만드는지 여쭤보려고 했는데, 마치 저희 마
Il 32 percento indica la quantità di pro
Roger. Wir würden den ATTITUDE SET-Schalter gerne wieder auf die Ausgangsposition zurücksetzen, wenn Sie mit Ihrer A-Line fertig sind. Er verursacht hier unten ein Tel
Хорошо. Непосредственно за 2 часа и 15 минут, я так понимаю
Мы удаляем этап midcourse-3 и переносим срок прохождения дис
ロジャー、マイク。SEP PAD、RCS/G&N: および N
Vorremmo un'altra conferma: quando abbiamo chiuso la valvola di sfiato del tunnel su / DELTA-P, leggevamo
ジャック、あの時は月を見逃したよ。でも、少し遡って計算すると、角度は42
Roger. J'ai vos informations de changement 
Più 37746, meno 03299, pi
我得稍微向
अगर उसमें जगह 
好
谢谢你，布鲁斯。你还有大约一分二十秒的时间
Ne parleremo più appro
Charlie, wir haben die Kabellängen geprüft und überleg
Роджер, я это чувств
Okay. Könnten Sie bitte die Einstel
찰리, 우리가 찾고 있는 건 T2까지 카운트다운하는 시간이 60분과 같아야 한다는 겁니다. 즉, T3가 T3 
네, 맞습니다. 우선 주요 이벤트 시간을 간단히 훑어보고 나서 세부 사항을 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 좋습니다. 진입 인터페이스는 142시간 40분, 즉 약 6시간 30분 전에 시작합니다. 히터 전원을 켜고, CM/ 온도를 확인하고 필요하면 CM/을 예열합니다. 아마도 예열이 필요할 것으로 예상됩니다. 자세한 절차는 나중에 안내해 드리겠습니다. 약 6시간 전에는 이전 중간 점검 때 사용했던 수정된 30분 체크리스트를 사용하여 전원을 켜기 시작합니다. 그리고 약 5시간 전에는 이전처럼 지구 종단면을 사용하여 기체 축 정렬 자세를 취해야 합니다. 그리고 그게 준비되는 대로 -7 단계를 수행할 건데, 현재로서는 초당 약 2피트(약 60cm) 정도의 연소 속도, 즉 약 15초 정도 걸릴 것 같습니다. 지금은 1.5피트(약 3.8m)까지 내려갔다고 하니, 안전 범위 내에 있는 것 같습니다. 좋습니다. 그 후, 서비스 모듈 투하 자세로 즉시 기동을 시작할 겁니다. 평소보다 
了解。オートモードに戻りました。気温は29度とこれまでで最も低いで
حسناً. فهمت. إذا أردت الخروج من هذا بسرعة، عليّ فتح قاطعين كهربائيين فقط في اللوحة رق
La réparation de la soupape de purge et du système ECS O2 était très ingénieuse et visait à résoudre le problème de John concernant la purge hors du tartre. Or, maintenant, bien sûr, la purge se fait dans le tartre, ce qui, co
ヒューストン、アポロ 8.1 は次のようになります: /: 
Va bene. Stavo solo pensando. Sto cercando di mettere più peso possibile laggiù. Non abbiamo s e poi il nostro serbatoio di scarico è - sai - piuttosto esaurito. Credo che sia sceso al 40% ci
罗杰。这次它好像不太对劲。当我输入27303回车键时，它突然以超过每秒1度的速率开始横滚。结束了。我
내... 그리고 우주선에서 탈출하는 좋은... 방법을 찾아야 해. 우리에게 필요한
Lasst uns ein bisschen Kau
Sì. Il GE
Alright. Still on page E-9 and under step 39 at the bottom of the pyro circuit check, there's a step that says panel 8, all circuit breakers CLOSED except and then it lists five that are printed, one that was pen-and-inked before launch. It says power circuit breakers 3 OPEN, an
Ok. Rice
Okay, Fred. This is a procedure for getting a read-out of the descent propellant tank temps. It's no big problem, but our people say that the bottom of the descent stage is probably cooling off, and we just want to verify that the descent water tank will be okay. Right now, it looks as though it won't freeze until several hours after it's empty, but we want to have you read these temperatures out to us so we can see how good our predictions are. The proced
इस समय कैमरे पर बड़ा बैक लगा हु
Ok
Okay. Entry pad as follows: Mid-PAC, 000152, 000;, 178; minus 21.66, minus 165.37; 30; all the DLS are N/A. DO is 4.00, 0
हमने अभी तक टर्मिनेटर को पार नहीं किया
गुआयमास कैप कॉम, गुआयमास कैप कॉम, यह सिग्मा सेवन है। हाई फाउल पर। क्या आप मुझे सुन रहे ह
收到。我正准备剥些橡子当早餐呢。我先把橡子放下，然后去
أعتقد أن الأمور سارت على ما يرام يا هيوستن، مع أنني أظن أنني استهلكت وقودًا أكثر مما كنت أستهلكه في جهاز المحاكاة. في مناورة الدوران، ضغطت على زر "PITCH ACCEL COMMAND" وبدأت في رفع مقدمة الطائرة، ثم عندما عدت إلى زر "MANAUAL ATTITUDE PITCH" ثم زر "RATE COMMAND" لسبب ما، توقف معدل رفع المقدمة، واضطررت للعودة إلى زر "ACCEL COMMAND" والضغط على ما ظننت أنه زر "PROCEED" إضافي. خلال ذلك، ابتعدنا قليلًا عن الهدف أكثر مما توقعت. كنت أتوقع أن نكون على بعد حوالي 66 قدمًا. أظن أنني كنت على بعد حوالي 100 قدم، ولذلك، أتوقع أنني استهلكت وقودًا أكثر ق
Roger. Aus den Nachrichten des Pressebüros: Apollo 11 beherrscht weiterhin die Schlagzeilen weltweit. Nur vier Nationen – das kommunistische China, Nordkorea, Nordvietnam und Albanien – haben ihre Bürger noch nicht über Ihren Flug und Ihre Mondlandung informiert. Ein Journalist sagte, ihm seien die Worte ausgegangen, um Ihren Erfolg zu beschreiben. Heute Abend wird Präsident Nixon das All-Star-Baseballspiel in Washington besuchen. Im Anschluss reist er zum Bergungsgebiet im Pazifik. Am Mittwochabend fliegt er mit dem Hubschrauber von Johnston Island zum Marine-Kommunikationsschiff Arlington. Am Donnerstagmorgen steigt er wieder in den Hubschrauber und fliegt rechtzeitig zur Hornet, um Ihre Wasserung mitzuerleben. Den Präsidenten begleiten Außenminister William Rogers und Frank Borman. Sie werden die Wasserung von der Brücke des Bergungsschiffs aus zusammen mit Admiral John Sidney McCain Jr., dem Befehlshaber der Pazifikstreitkräfte, verfolgen. Nach seinem Aufenthalt an Bord der Hornet tritt der Präsident seine Asienreise und seinen geplanten Besuch in Rumänien an. Luna 15 stürzte vermutlich gestern nach 52 Mondumrundungen ins Meer. Die sowjetische Nachrichtenagentur TASS berichtete von „wissenschaftlichen“ Untersuchungen im erdnahen Weltraum. Sir Bernard Lovell vom Jodrell-Bank-Observatorium gab an, dass Luna 15 mit einer Geschwindigkeit von etwa 480 km/h auf die Mondoberfläche aufschlug. In Vietnam war es in letzter Zeit relativ ruhig. Patrouillierende US-Soldaten wurden mit Transistorradios beobachtet, die auf Ihren Flug eingestellt waren. Der vietnamesische Militärsender berichtete umfassend über die Mission. Entlang des Suezkanals dauern die Gefechte zwischen Ägyptern und Israelis weiterhin an. UN-B
好的，万斯，你说得对。我们确实有几乎按照你说的配置好的摄像机。对于指令舱，你认为使用配备 250
今は11時に250で反撃
О, у вас есть довольно неплохие цифры, которые я вам вчера отправил, и у вас было примерно... Ну, я проверю, но вы явно переборщили с криогенной обработкой. У меня есть кое-что... У вас 33:20. Вы пролетаете служебный модуль через... У вас 142; 
حسناً. فهمت؛ سأتحقق
이거 보니까 눈이 삐뚤어지네. 마이크, 그냥 궁금해서 그러는데, 지난 한 시간 반 동안 지구
Хорошо, Джим. Мы все еще обдумываем этот вопрос, но некоторые соображения подсказывают нам, что мы можем выполнить эту коррекцию, вероятно, даже через 118 часов, без существенного увеличения DELTA-V, и с достаточным отслеживанием после этого, чтобы убедиться, что мы все сделали правильно, и подготовить вас к поздней коррекции, если она нам понадобится, хотя, вероятно, она не понадобится. Мы довольны вашим текущим режимом, и, хотя мы разрабатываем режим для использования после коррекции на среднем участке траектории, мы бы хотели, чтобы вы оставались в нем некоторое время, потому что он работает хорошо. Мы следим за погодой в районе посадки. Мы не думаем, что у нас будут проблемы, но мы очень внимательно ее проверяем, и если нам нужно что-то изменить, мы хотим сделать это во время коррекции на среднем участке траектории. И по этим причинам мы рассматриваем во
Мы считаем, что космический аппарат в хорошем состоянии. Здесь, внизу, пока вы не ляжете спать, никаких ком
حسنًا. لقد راجعتُ التعليمات: راقب كمية المُجمِّع الثانوي؛ صمام مُشعِّع الجليكول الثانوي، اضبطه على الوضع العادي لمدة 30 ثانية، ثم على وضع التجاوز. إذا لم تنخفض كمية المُجمِّع الثانوي، اضبط صمام مُشعِّع الجليكول الثانوي على الوضع العادي
Хорошо, Джек. Это вторичные топливные стерж
Roger. Die Abgastemperatur des Anzugs beträgt 61 Grad, die Dampftemperatur 61 Grad. Ich habe sie gerade h
Ok. Sembra che non riusciremo a riprodurre la voce normale. Nei serbatoi criogenici, abbiamo avuto un bel po' di destratificazione, in particolare nell'ossigeno, e lo noterete durante i cicli delle ventole e... quindi ci assicureremo e vi ricorderemo di nuovo di mescolare l'ossigeno prima... sta procedendo come un orologio. G&C
C'est exact. Panneau 251, inchangé; panneau 252, vanne d'évent du 
了解。ジャイロはケージに入れられてい
هذا هو كيب 
そうです。S/2-6を参照してください。ジャック、これはまさにハッチの整合性チェック用のデカールのことです。S/2-6を開けて
Roger, Friendship Seven. We have nothing for you, you're 
Apollo 11, this is Houston. You were just on the fringes of coverage from Gol
회로 차단기
Roger, Friendship Seven. Qui Ca
حسنًا. دعني أشاركك ملاحظاتي حول ناقل التيار الرئيسي B. حدثت الأمور بسرعة كبيرة هناك، وسمعنا أولًا صوت الاصطدام أو الانفجار أو أيًا كان السبب، لست متأكدًا. بعد ذلك - حوالي ثانية واحدة - انطلق إنذار رئيسي يشير إلى انخفاض جهد ناقل التيار الرئيسي B. نظرت إلى الجهد، وكان جيدًا في ذلك الوقت، لذا أظن أنه كان ارتفاعًا مفاجئًا. كانت خلية الوقود 3 جيدة أيضًا، مع تدفق جيد. مع ذلك، في تلك اللحظة، كان فريد يدخل إلى وحدة التحكم ويجلس في مقعده. في ذلك الوقت، أضاء مؤشر ناقل التيار المتردد 2 بعد فترة وجيزة من جلوسه. نظر إلى ناقل التيار الرئيسي B، فوجد أن قراءة ناقل التيار الرئيسي B تساوي صفرًا. ومع ذلك، كان تدفق خلية الوقود صفرًا أيضًا. أظن أن لدينا بالفعل ناقل تيار رئيسي B. لكن هذا مجرد تخمين. لم أحاول إعادة ضبطه أبدًا. واجهنا مشاكل أخرى مع ناقل الب
Il nostro unico commento, Joe, è stato che la combustione, a nostra conoscenza, è stata di circa 3-3/4 secondi più lunga di qua
400K, 20 + 15
D'accor
Verificare che l'interruttore auto
Nous vous suggérons de boire un verre d'eau si vous n'en avez pas bu 
Хорошо. На панели 3: ТРАНСПОНДЕР — ОСНОВНОЙ; УСИЛИТЕЛЬ МОЩНОСТИ — ОСНОВНОЙ; УСИЛИТЕЛЬ МОЩНОСТИ — ВЫСОКИЙ; РЕЖИМ ГОЛОСОВОЙ — ВЫКЛ; ПИТАНИЕ — НОРМАЛЬНЫЙ; УСИЛИТЕЛЬ МОЩНОСТИ — НОРМАЛЬНЫЙ; S-ДИАПАЗОННАЯ АНТЕНН
Sì, Joe. Devo... ehi, ascolta. 
C'est dommage, il ne me reste qu'un peu moins d'une demi-heure pour m'amuser. Je passe en mode de pilotage automatique à basse altitude. Gyroscopes libres, je pique du nez pour observer le phare de Durban. Gyroscopes libres, pilotage automatique à basse altitude, correction, je passe en mode proportionnel manuel. Je n'ai pas encore chargé de ressou
Ja, ich hatte vor, viel mit den Filtern her
はい、回路ブレーカー パネル 11 UPDATA LINK、CLOSE、PRIMARY POWER AM
Pericynthion plus 2 - Okay, pericynthion plus 2, at; p
把那面旗帜弄得漂
알겠습니다. 현재 속도는 100km/h입니다. 네, 15만 km/h, 즉 
Okay
Okay. 
حسنًا. الخطوة التالية هي توفير الطاقة اللازمة لل
Сейчас горизонт очень четкий. Он довольно светлый, и состоит в основном из облаков. Я вижу облака, звезды, когда они начинают опускаться в основной слой атмосферного свечения, но облака, кажется, делают горизонт более светлым. Не похоже, что раньше во время полета мы видели горизонт без облаков, и он был гораздо плотнее – довольно плотный слой атмосферного свечения, и можно было видеть звезды, когда они проходили сквозь него. Однако на этом облачном горизонте звезды видны хуже; хотя я заметил, что некот
Okay. It's coming up now, Columbia. We're going to keep you a little busy here. As so
D'accord. Je d
ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम, मिथुन राशि VI। क्या VII आपसे बात कर रहा है? हमें यहाँ नीचे कुछ सुनाई दे रहा है
我们有时间
Fred, il y a peut-être une anomalie dans les données. Le taux est revenu à
Du musst die Nase na
जेमिनी VII
Чарли, я хотел бы передать привет всем моим коллегам-скаутам и руководи
현재 예상 시간은 5초 빠른 5시 57
C4はオフ、B3もオフ。トランスポンダーはヒーターに接続されており、オフになって
Хорошо. Так гораздо лучше, и мы предполагаем, что сбой в работе батареи был вызван тем, что термовыключатель сработал неправильно — один раз включился сигнал "ВНИМАНИЕ" и "ПРЕДУПРЕЖДЕНИЕ", и снова сработал
And you've got the computer ag
Ici Friendship Seven. L'éjection automatique est désactivée. Le sélecteur de mode est normal, la commande de vitesse et le gyroscope sont normaux. Toutes les poignées « T » sont enfoncées, sauf la poignée manuelle, qui est sortie. Je pilote actuellement en mode manuel. L'interrupteur du sac d'atterrissage est éteint. Le panneau de séquence est normal, sauf celui-ci. Le niveau de carburant est de 60 à 82 %. En mode manuel, les attitudes sont actuellement: roulis de 5° à droite, lacet de 15° à droite et tangage de -34° en orbite. Mon temps depuis le lancement est de 2 h 33 min 60 s. Correction: 2 h 34 min. Avez-vous re
分かりました。はい、その通りです。5番窓から外を見るとランデブーレーダーが見
Билл, сразу после того, как Джим закончит, мы запланировали для тебя сброс сточных вод, цикл работы криогенного вентилятора, проверку резервных компонент
E sotto di me? Lo vedi sotto di me da qualc
Ricevu
أورورا سفن، أورورا سفن، هذه غرفة ع
Vous êtes clairs et forts, Houston, au-dessus des Can
Хорошо, регистр 1, плюс 27218; регистр 2, плюс 35570; регистр 3, плюс 33010; и чтобы
...p
Friendship Seven, qui è Cape Co
이제 저배율로 가보겠습니다. 정정합니다. 잠망경으로 고배율 관측을 해 보겠습니다. 어떻게 보이는지... 오른쪽으로 약 5도 정도 기울어져 있네요. 이 지점에서 잠망경과 어떻게 일치하는지 보세요. 예를 들어,
Okay. We have not. We have not completed it. We will start. We want you to monitor the maneuver. Ov
Ed, k
よし。今はマイナス30だ。SEQUENTIAL、LOGIC、その2つをONにし
Gemini VII, hier spricht Gemini VI. Wir haben ein Objekt, sieht aus wie ein Satellit, der von Norden nach Süden fliegt, wahrscheinlich in einer polaren Umlaufbahn. Er bewegt sich auf ei
Хорошо. Я скажу Джеку проверить, выключен ли переключатель CM/RCS HEATER, и если нет, мы его выключим; а такж
That's affi
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Correction de trajectoire n° 2. SPS/G&N 63059, +097, -020, allumage 02644 5792, +00118, -00003, +00177, roulis 277 355 015, BLOCK: NA, DELTA-VT 00213 003 00168, étoile du sextant 30 2082 370. Le reste
로저. 말씀드린 대로, 이 작업의 주된 목적은 산소 유량 센서를 점검하는 것입니다. 하지만 약 2시간 동안 객실 산소 공급이 더 필요하기 때문에, 이 목적을 위해 설치할 
杰克收拾睡袋的时候，我想带你看看这个有趣的小角落。这里有个临时储物袋，我们每次吃完饭后都会把废纸和其他杂物都放进去。它就在右边角落，靠近我们的
查理，我们也会继续推进这
Roger. Avec une telle visibilité et des communications aussi bonnes, nous allons simplement vous donner une description verbale sans voir le télescope de balayage pour le moment. Vos angles de manœuvre pour Arcturus étaient excellents. J'ai centré Arcturus dans le télescope. À cet angle solaire, un faisceau lumineux traverse directement le centre du télescope, créant une bande de lumière. Cela empêche de voir beaucoup d'étoiles autour de nous, et même si j'ai gardé l'œil r
Okay. Brennregeln. Wir sollten den Brennvorgang abbrechen, wenn der Schubmonitor 77 % oder weniger anzeigt; 2. wenn der 
كل ما تريد تش
分かりました。残差についてG
ठीक है। बहुत बढ़िया। अच्छा, हम तब तक इंतजार करेंगे जब तक वह यहाँ अपना दांव नहीं खेल लेता
好的。在 PC+2 之后，没有配平要求；而且，如果在 PC+2 期间发生发动机故障，后续的中段机动——最
はい、その通りです。パッドの最後の部分
Bene. Dopo PC più 2, non ci sono requisiti di assetto; e, se si verifica uno spegnimento durante PC più 2, le successive manovre a metà rotta richieste con - Beh, la prima sarebbe PC più 4. Se non si esegue un PC più 2, ma vogliamo comunque farne uno - più tardi. A PC più 4, l'aumento di DELT - in DELTA-V, o la penalità, sarebbe di circa 24 piedi al secondo, con un atterraggio nel Pacifico centrale a. Ora, dovresti aspettarti nuove piattaforme, vettori di stato e bersagl
Dort, wo es am Raumschif
次に下に見えてくるクレーターはデューク島です。そして左側のクレーターは、現在写真の中央付近にあるクレーターの中で最大のもので、マスケリンWです。これは降下中の位置確認で、約3分39秒の時点で行われています。着陸レーダーを捕捉するために機首を上げて機体を反転させる前の、ダウンレンジと
Роджер. Следующие — ELS BAT A,
هيوستن، كنت تريد أن
حسناً. فهمت. إرج
अब हर कोई बिना बोल
لم تحصل على
हाँ, बिलकुल। आपको अंदाज़ा नहीं है कि धीमा होने की स्थिति में यह कितना ठ
Хорошо. Мы прогнозируем, что в номинальное время вашего следующего маневра на промежуточном участке траектории, то есть за 2 часа до входа в атмосферу, скорость вращения двигателя составит 1,4 фута в секунду, что изменит вашу гамму в точке входа в атмосферу на десятую долю градуса. Сейчас, без дальнейших маневров, ваша гамма составляет минус 6,39 градуса, и мы немного увеличим е
We were looking for the Cat's Paw, too, thinking we were probably downrange, beyond the Big V. But I think that it's likely that that might have been W
ر
Ricevuto. Mi metto in posizione. Vuoi un rapporto sullo
फ्लोरिडा के ऊपर
Roger, Jim. Comunque, te li tengo ap
Okay, Apollo 8. Wir möchten Ihren Zustandsvektor und Zielpunkt aktualisieren. Wenn es Ihnen ger
रेट्रोडिले साम
لدي سيارة أ
Bene. Hai la valvola di intercettazione sullo zaino 
La cible se trouvait exactement sur l'axe du réticule, décalée d'u
रॉजर। मैं पूरी टिप्पणी दोबारा पढ़ लेता हूँ ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो जाए कि हमने इसे सही ढंग से समझा है। NC-4 के चरण 1 से 11 का पालन करें; फिर पृष्ठ NC-7 पर बिना COMM प्रक्रिया के 
لقد أيقظتَ الطبيب للتو. قلتَ "نبض"، فاستعا
Hallo, 11. H
Можете объяснить, почему они
は
Astro. This is 
और प्यूर्ज चेक पूरा हो गया है,
हैलो कानो। यह सिग्मा सेवन है। आप दोनों की आवाज टूटी-फ
D'accord, Jack. Les étapes restantes consistent simplement à configurer le circuit de la combinaison pour que le système soit pleinement opérationnel. Nos équipes préfèrent attendre que la cartouche sur laquelle vous travaillez atteigne 7,6 millimètres de mercure, ce qui devrait prendre encore 45 minutes à une heure (nous indiquons actuellement 4,7). En attendant, nous vous demandons de configurer la deuxième cartouche du module de commande de la même manière que la première,
Роджер. Перицинфия плюс 2, минимум / 62871, NA, NA, минус 00468, плюс 00254, плюс 00181 173 101 027, NA, плюс 00187 00563 515 00563 01 3169 198 044, вниз 044, влево 45, плюс 1100, минус 02500 12967 36198, главный Сириус, вторичный Ри
Warten Sie, Buzz. Soweit ich das beurteilen kann, sieht es ziemlich gut aus. Wir haben hier entlang der tropischen Konvergenzlinie ein paar Wolken auf der Wetterkarte, aber nichts Bedeutendes. Moment mal. Mal sehen, im Moment – ​​ja, am MPL – haben wir 3000 verstreute Winde, Sichtweite 10 Fuß, Wellenhöhe 3 Fuß. Das ist das aktuelle Wetter. Ich glaube nicht, dass irgendetwas von Bedeutung vorhergesagt ist. Es gibt ein pa
ठीक है। हमें म
罗杰，明白
È sul. Beh, fo
D'accord. Vous pouvez prendre le temps de trouver la meilleure attitude, et vous n'aurez pas à la maintenir jusqu'à 
さあ、ヒューストン。
روجر. النسبة تشير إلى 55%، لكنها تتذبذب باستمرار. أعتقد أ
Ok. La pressione dell'elio è circa 37, la pressione del collettore è 182 e la quantità è 80. B ha una temperatura di circa 112, la pressione dell'elio di circa 36,5, la pressione del carburante di 180 e la quantità è circa 77. C ha una temperatura di 140 - tra l'altro, quelle altre temperature avrebbero dovuto essere 120 invece di 110; stavo guardando la calibrazione sbagliata qui. La pressione è 37, la pressione del collettore è circa 182 e la quantità è 8
Houston, Apollo 11. Wir haben den afrikanischen Kontinent vor uns, und natürlich wird alles mit der Zeit immer kleiner. Das Mittelmeer ist völlig klar. Die Sonne scheint gleich hinter Madagaskar unterzugehen. Der äquatoriale Gürtel Afrikas ist deutlich zu erkennen. Wir sehen ein dunkles, trübes Grün, im Vergleich zu den sandfarbenen Tönen an der Südspitze Afrikas und natürlich der Sahara-Nordküste. In der Nähe der Grenze zwischen Afghanistan und Pakistan ist eine bemerkenswerte 
Gemini 4, CSQ. Sie haben den ersten Teil Ihres Getriebes nicht richtig verstanden. Ich erhielt die Meldung: „Sie haben es über das kleine Ende gesehen und glauben, dass es nach Osten zeigte.“ Was war der erste Teil Ihres Getriebes
Okay, 13; Houston. Ich glaube, wir könnten eine niedrigere Blendenöffnung verwenden. Welche Blendenöffnung verwend
11号，休斯顿。我们希望在下次OMNI重新定位后，将洒水时间提前到大约171+30秒，正如我刚才提到的，新的洒水量将降至45%。另外，我们正在等待您的喷射器温度读
Okay. Der Brennvorgang war planmäßig um 125:19:3470 Uhr, die Lö
सिग्मा सेवन, 
すべての手順のログを保存します
म
Okay. Fine. Say, it's a spare primary cartridge back the
هذه فريندشيب سفن. رأيت عاصفة كبيرة في الأفق جنوبًا، بالطبع، لفترة و
Хорош
Was? I
罗杰。4，/ 62888 NA，NA，减 00012，减 00011，加 0
Передай мне 
埃德开始拆卸东西，当我们到达无法再操作助推器的位置时，我便全心全意地帮他——至少帮忙拿着东西，把它们收好，尽量不让它们丢失。我们干得越快，进度就越落后。倒不是因为我们没按规矩来，只是比我们预想的要花更多时间。在零重力环境下操作其实并不比在模拟器里容易多少，甚至可能差不多。所以我们只能绕着轨道转一圈。到了卡那封轨道时，我已经认定我们无法完成任务，但我还是想再坚持一下。当我们到达卡那封轨道——或者说就在我们离开卡那封轨道之前——我清楚地意识到我们无法完成减压。我请求跳到下一个轨道。然后……我们喘了大约20分钟，试图整理我散落在驾驶舱里的杂物。然后我拿出检查清单，我们又仔细地核对了一遍，确保匆忙中没有遗漏任何步骤。舱外活
Okay, Bill. Before
Ich hab's geöff
AO
I think that two corners did touch, since when it was deployed, both of them didn't come out at the same time. It unfolded a little un
इस समय मुझे यह दृश्य स्पष्ट रूप से याद आ रहा है। हाँ। मुझे क्षितिज दिखाई दे रहा है। ऐसा लग रहा है जैसे हम आगे बढ़ रह
Roger, Bill. più 11, e questo presuppone che sia un /;
Mal sehen, was ich jetzt tun kann – ich bewege gerade meine Arme hin und her, und das kann ich an den Zeigern für Rollen, Gieren und Nicken erkennen. Durch die Bewegung meines Oberkörpers kann ich die Nickrate-Nadel um bis zu 1 Grad pro Sekunde bewegen. Die Rollrate-Nadel reagiert sehr e
ए पर मात्रा 
Oggi abbiamo dormito solo 2 ore circa, MAX, Ken. Ora andiamo: Bill resterà sv
ऐसा लगता है कि पावर डाउन होने पर भी हम लगभग 11 एम्पियर से थोड़ा कम करंट खींच रहे हैं। नंबर 1 पर 10 और नंबर 2 पर 11 से थोड़ा कम करंट है। बाहरी हैच पर टेदर या अम्बिलिकल रिस्ट्रेंट की स्थिति के कारण अंतरिक्ष यान के आगे मुक्त टेदर एरोडायनामिक्स के लिहाज से EVA का काम करना काफी मुश्किल हो गया था। जब भी मैं उस क्षेत्र में काम कर रहा होता, टेदर जब खत्म होने वाला होता तो मुझे पीछे की ओर धकेल देता और प्रतिक्रिया के कारण मैं वापस अंतरिक्ष यान के ऊपर से होते हुए एडाप्टर सेक्शन की ओर चला जाता। इसीलिए खिड़कियों के ऊपर पैंतरेबाज़ी करते समय मैं बार-बार नज़र से ओझल हो जाता और फिर अंतरिक्ष यान के पिछले हिस्से की ओर बह जाता। मुझे लगातार खुद को खींचकर अंतरिक्ष यान के आगे वाले हिस्से में 
... e il propellente primario e secondario B è andato.
Я всё ещё немного запутался в этом вопросе — в активации вторичного контура. Вы указали, что его нужно отключить через 1 час или 5 минут после подключения основного испарителя. В
As I just - Yes, are you ready to take over? Well, he just - he just asked - said he thought I was supposed to be sleeping. And I told him that I was waiting for you to - Okay. You were off the NET when they explained the - But don't they - Can't we monitor our CDU's any more to tell when to switch antennas, so they've just - 
여기 위쪽은 모든 게 꽤
Ich sehe einen Stern. Er scheint links von dem Objekt, 
Acquario, ti consigliamo
Affermativo, Frank. Vorremmo che tu trasferissi il vettore dal vettore al vettore di s
Then after getting stabilized, we checked out our whole Thrust Control System and found that we had no yaw or roll control - or we had no yaw control of the yaw thrusters since our
Très bien. L'étape suivante consiste à fixer le ruban adhésif. Pour cela, découpez un morceau d'environ 60 cm (2 pieds) dans le rouleau, puis déchirez-le dans le sens de la longueur afin d'obtenir deux bandes d'environ 60 cm 
Aquariu
Roger, 11; this is Houston. We're reading you loud and fairly clearl
C'est vraiment une vue fantastique à travers ce sextant. Il y a une minut
Sa
不
روجر، نتفق تمامًا. وبينما أنت منهمك في ذلك، سأقرأ هذه الملاحظات. اتصل ببرنامج الإنذار المحتمل 5.6، إذا كان المدى أكبر من 400 ميل بحري، ثم استخدم كما هو موضح في 20. اختر الخيار 1 في NOUN 06، واستخدم وضع عدم التحديث. سيُثبّت رادار الالتقاء على الهدف عند ارتفاع 25 درجة تقريبًا فوق الأفق. في حالة حدوث إنذار 503، حدد فشلًا. اضغط على زر المتابعة، ودع رادار الالتقاء يبحث عن الهدف. ضع مفتاح مراقبة المدى والارتفاع في وضع الارتفاع/معدل الارتفاع لمنع شريط القياس من الوصول إلى نقاط التوقف. ثم اضغط على زر التشغ
Okay. Nächste Seite, Stromkreis 7, Schalttafel 16. Erste Reihe:
आप जानते हैं, वह तो बस कचरे का ढेर है जिसे हम वापस ले जाना चाहते हैं - एलएम के पुर्जे
その直角括弧、直角括弧は、それを必要
Хорошо. «Альфа-1» находится на высоте 500 футов над местом посадки. Спасиб
Bill bedankt sich für die gute Arbeit, die OMNIs am Laufen zu 
了解。ヒューストン、アポロ8
네. 당신이 이미 알고 계실 줄 알았지만, 
ジェミニ4号星、前回の通信が届きませんでした。
Роджер. Что касается вашего подхода к запуску: мы хотели бы, чтобы вы использовали крен 096, тангаж 356, рыскание 018. Это даст
الأفق واضح
UHF
هيوستن، للعلم فقط، فقدنا الات
Ci stai seguendo? Hai qualc
Vas-y, Fr
Apollo 8, le
로저. 혹시나 해서 이번 TV 테스트 촬영에 달에 빨간색과 파란색 필터를 씌운 장면을 넣고 싶은 충동이 스며들지 않았는지 확인해 봤습니다. 이미 빨간색과 파란색 필터
罗杰，坎顿。请通知卡纳维拉尔
알겠습니다. 
你知道它们落在
Roger. H
Très bien. Je vous comprends mieux maintenant. Avez-vous bien
Roger. Compris. Notre débit d'oxygène est un peu plus élev
سأستبدل كل هذه المعلومات القيّمة بق
Bene. Ci sono due bombolette di idrossido di litio, un rotolo di quel nastro grigio speciale, due scatole da cui user
よし、ケン。何か書きたいことがあるんだ。あれは18時
Sei bei dem, was bei - 
ممتاز جداً. نود أن يكون جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بك جاهزاً للإطلاق المسبق
11시, 복사할 기분이 들면 비행 계획
Okay.
Nous allons effectuer des ma
حسنًا. سنوقف الدخول عند لفة 285، وزوايا الكسب العالي هي زاوية الميل 23 وزاوية ا
Okay. Und wi
Okay. Turn t
阿波罗
Gemini 4，Guaymas CAP CO
달에 가는 길에 더 이상 소변을 버릴 필요가 없습니다. 전부 작은 봉투에 담아
कै
Okay, Vance. Ab
Ricevuto. Ho cap
Доброе утро, Фрэнк. Аполл
حسنًا. الوقت 32 ساعة و00 دقيقة. التعل
Attends, Vance;
Роджер. И дайте совет примерно че
MSC-2 und -3 wurden um 
ह्यूस्टन, क्या यह तकनीक P2
友谊七号，友谊七号，就是这里。现在是16:32:26。我们清楚地听到了你们的声音；我们清楚地听到了你们
لدينا بعض 
Clairement en dessous de moi. Je le suivais du regard depuis Carnarvon. Jusqu'à Carnarvon, il était en dessous de nous, puis il est monté jusqu'à l'horizon, avant de redescendre en dessous. On aurait presque dit qu'il était sur une orbite différente de la mienne. Son apogée et son périgée étaient différents des miens. Bref, j'ai tenté de le rattraper au lever du jour, dès que j'ai pu le localiser. Comme je l'ai dit, à ce moment-là, il se trouvait à un ou deux kilomètres devant moi, en dessous. Plus j'essayais de me rapprocher, moins je gagnais de terrain. Je tirais en rétrograde. J'utilisais mes propulseurs supérieurs de manière à réduire ma vitesse totale, et je tirais… simultanément. Je ne suis jamais vraiment parvenu à le rattraper, et il a continué à s'éloigner. Il m'est apparu évident qu'une fois arrivés à Hawaï, pour rattraper le lanceur à temps pour la sortie extravéhiculaire, nous épuiserions probablement tout le carburant embarqué. Or, le protocole aéroporté interdisait cette manœuvre. J'ai donc consulté le commandant de bord et nous avons décidé de ne pas poursuivre la partie de l
我不知道为什么会有那种感觉。是的，我感觉那是一种新的体验——也是一
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। व्हाइट टीम की ओर से आखिरी बार शुभ रात्रि। सुबह उठने पर हम रवाना हो जाएंगे। आप लोगों के साथ काम करना बहुत अच्छा लगा। आप तीनों का प्रदर्शन शानदार रहा। हम इसके लिए बहुत आभारी हैं, और एलआरएल से बाहर आने पर आपसे फिर 
Roger. Rapporto sullo stato dell'equipaggio: acqua, il comandante ha percorso circa 50 chilometri finora oggi; CMP 43; e l'LMP è 44. Abbiamo consumato due pasti finora oggi. Giorno 3, pasto 
Хорошо. Вы
О
रॉजर, कोलंबिया। हम 11 के साथ आ रहे हैं। जी एं
Apollo 8, Houston. When we say bring up the secondary loop, we mean bring up the e
Demande 20 par té
こんにちは、カナリア。フレンドシップ・セブン。少し不明瞭な声で、大声で受
Ja, Sie haben die genaue Zeit bis zum AOS eingestellt – wei
Хьюстон, как ты читаешь чис
네, 곧
रॉजर
좋습니다. 영하 4도에 기온 40도를 더한 상태에서, 입실 체크리스트 1~6페이지의
- - that MA
Se ci fossero anche delle costolette di maiale, 
खैर, जैसा मैंन
Повтори ещё раз, индиец. Коне
Roger. Control mode, manual; gyros normal; the maneuver switch is off. Fuel is 45-45 [percent]; oxygen is 70 [percent], or, correction, oxygen is 80 and 100 [percent]. Suit temperature is 68 [degrees], now and coming down prett
사령선이나 그 안에는 파편이 거의 없었습니다. 볼트, 너트, 나사 조각이나 먼지 같은 것도 아주 조금밖에 발견되지 않았습니다. 
حسنًا يا جيم. نود منك التحقق مرة أخرى من درجات حرارة خزانات الوقود، كما فعلنا بالأمس. والإجراء هو: في اللوحة 
很好，减去 00050，加上全零，加上 00001 000 334 001 五个零，加上 00190
Gut gelesen, Wasserm
水瓶座，休斯顿。抱歉，背景噪音太大，听不清你的声音。
حسنًا. سأخبر
Apollo 8, ce que nous aimerions faire avec ces angles, c'est de le régler en AUTO REACQ sur le panneau 2, et il se trouve sous le suivi de l'antenne à gain élevé, et il - la position inférieure indiquera REACQ, et sur les cadrans de position, nous aimerions régler le tangage à moins 45
Okay, Ken. Penso che sia un'ottima idea; è una cosa che abbiamo messo in pr
わかりました。まずはプラス44の操作です。左の列から読み上げていきます。プラス44、/62970、マイナス162、プラス129、プラス00197、プラス全てゼロ、プラス607 01 180 133
जब आप अगली बार अमेरिका के ऊपर
वाह, बहुत बढ़िया। वॉरेन, आपसे बात करके अच्छा लगा, 
अगर ऐसा है, तो मुझे बस यही चिंता है कि सब कुछ ठीक हो जाए। अभी बहुत समय है... मैं चाहता हूँ कि सब कुछ अपनी जगह पर हो। सारा सामान हटा दिया जाए, सब कुछ... तैयार हो और पता हो कि क्या करना है और... ताकि हम बीच का रास्ता तय कर सकें, और... कमांड मॉड्यूल में प्रवेश कर सकें... सर्विस मॉड्यूल को अलग कर सकें, और फिर ठीक से जान सकें कि
Sun right in v
你还有
حسنًا. أولًا، انتقل إلى الصفحة 12. على الجانب الأيمن من الصفحة، بدءًا من منتصف الصفحة إلى أسفل، احذف كل ما هو موجود أسفل "Cycle 5 frames, Replace dark side or dark slide" حتى تصل إلى أسفل الصفحة حيث يوجد "Acquisition
了解、11番。了解しました。ここへ進むことをお勧めします。オプション1を推奨します。それから姿勢制御へ進みます。オーバー。それから通信機を準備します。姿勢制御に進んだら、高ゲインでピッチ90、
Vorrei valutare le varie velocità a cui una persona può viaggiare sulla superficie lunare. Credo 
हेलो, मुचेआ कैप कॉम, ऑरोरा 
双子座4
Роджер. В соответствии с шагом 1, описанным на странице 47, управление наведением находилось в режиме PGNS и MODE CONTROL, PGNS, AUTO; и, конечно же, автоматические выключатели на двигателях еще не были включены, поэтому, когда мы начали проходить DAP и перешли к NOUN 46 — а сейчас мы смотрим на NOUN 47 — у нас за
자, 여기 있는 동안 아폴로 8호의 서비스 모듈 수량을 업데이트하려고 하는데, 수
좋아, 지구가 올 때까지 이 필름으로는 더 이상 사진을 찍지 않는 게 좋겠어
罗杰，卡那封。飞机更换。GET 02 加 42 加 07；Delta-V，31.7；持续时间，0 加 40 秒；偏航，右 90 度，俯仰 00；核心 25、26、0；核
好的。也没什么特别的。嗯，我们先从体育说起吧，管它呢。太空人队以8比7险胜，勇士队在第九局得了五六分，但他们最终还是赢了；当天另一场重要的比赛，小熊队因为下雨取消了。其他比赛
Comment se fait-il qu'on ait un jaune? Ah oui, c'est 
Roger，散热器在 40:
आप ईंधन की थोड़ी बचत करना शुरू कर देते हैं और शायद, हो सकता है कि आप मैन्यु
А для тех, кто может задаться вопросом, где спит Дж
قد ينجح الأمر لو اضطررنا لذلك يا فريد. حاليًا، لدينا فائض مريح من الماء عبر جهاز التسامي. كنا نتحدث فيما بي
Canton Cap Com, standby I'll give you a report in a minute here. I'm maneuvering back into retro attit
Gemini VI，我们这里弄反了。它的射程是 32.69，射程速率
极光七号，极光七号，卡普角通信结束
حسنًا. حسنًا، هذه مناورة تمهيدية PC + 2. البداية: ؛ + 0819.2، - 0020.0، - 0218.9؛ غير متوفر؛ + 0020.9، 0848.2؛ 420، 274، 082؛ + 0820.3، - 0020.0، - 0215.0. ملاحظات: سعة الخزان عبارة عن فوهتين لمدة 10 ثوانٍ. الوزن، 62480. الوزن 33576. وفيما يلي مخطط الخانق: 5 ثوانٍ عند الحد الأدنى متبوعة
VI 的电源记录仪
Credo che quello
Well, we 
Nun, suchen Sie
물병자리 여러분, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 저희가 
Tandis que nous pointons vers le haut, nous voyons par nos hublots le Soleil défiler et, bien sûr, par l'un d'eux, la Terre. Juste derrière mon hublot, nous avons le Soleil, car il éclaire les cartes stellaires que nous consultons. Cette ligne représente le plan de l'écliptique et ces lignes verticales représentent notre système de référence utilisé par le vaisseau spatial. À mesure que nous n
रॉजर। पृष्ठ F2-20, कॉलम अल्फ़ा: 05, 01042; 07, 00256; 11, मैं फिर से कहूँगा। 11, 00070
分かりました。ここに、カメラ側面のダブテールではなく、カメラ上部のダブテールを使用するようにという注意書きがあります。ブラケットへ
Neil and Buzz, the President of the United States is in his office now and would like to say a few words 
Roger. Je passe Jack en ligne po
Ed a commencé à ranger le matériel et, dès que nous avons atteint un point où il 
All r
Okay. Ich denke, die meisten stellen sich das Raumfahrtprogramm als eine Ansammlung exotischer Elektronik vor, und sicherlich trifft das auch größtenteils zu. Aber ich wollte Ihnen in diesem Zusammenhang ein paar weitere Punkte zeigen. Nach dem ersten Schritt erhält man
Houston, Apol
अगर आपको जरूरत हो तो मैं आपको TR + 3 मिनट का टाइम हैक देने के ल
Houston, the cryos have been stirred, and could you also give me a quick rundown on how the line temps
D'accord. Nous avons eu un bref moment de confusion, car votre attitude ne nous permettait pas de vous recevoir. Jack
外面的景色太壮观了——看起来就像你要直接撞向山体侧面
カナリア、フレンドシップセブン。了解。管制チェック完了。カプセルを格納し、待機状態。窓の外にブースターが見える。おそらく1マイルほど離れており、私の位置の下、少し左寄りに落
ほら、レチクルが平行じゃないと、地平線に対して垂直にマークしていないし、星間点にもマークしていない。どこか別の場所にマークしていること
صحيح. الأسطر الثلاثة الأخيرة مشطوبة. ليس لدينا واحد من هذه ال
Роджер. Вот и всё. 
Подождите
03 11 00의 알파 3개
아폴로 11호. 휴스턴
Вы немного завышенны над траекторией
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Понял. Можете продол
Roger, Houston. Pour l'ajustement de hauteur, le GET est maintenant 2 plus 17 plus 59; Delta-V, 63,4; durée, 1 plus 20; lacet 0, tangage 0; Noyau 25, 00634; 26 est 0; 2
D'accord. J'ai relu: surveiller le niveau dans l'accumulateur secondaire; vanne du radiateur de glycol secondair
了解。
Роджер. Жителям космического корабля «Колумбия», возможно, будет интересно узнать, что сегодня в Колумбии День независимости. Вчера вечером Глория Диас из Филиппин была коронована как «Мисс Вселенная». Она обошла 60 других девушек в борьбе за титул чемпионки мира по красоте. Мисс Диас 18 лет, у нее черные волосы и глаза, параметры фигуры 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. Первой вице-мисс стала Мисс Австралия, за ней следуют Мисс Израиль и Мисс Япония. Пока вы будете возвращаться во вторник вечером, в Вашингтоне будут играть команды всех звезд Американской и Национальной лиг. Ожидается, что Мел Стоттлмайр из «Янкиз» станет первым питчером Американской лиги. Пока никто не предсказывает, кто станет первым питчером Национальной лиги. В составе команды девять питчеров. Хотя исследования в космической программе, безусловно, принесли свои плоды, похоже, что не всегда все приносит результаты. Корпорация Woodstream, материнская компания Animal Trap Company of America, которая произвела более миллиарда деревянных пружинных мышеловок, сообщает, что создала более совершенную мышеловку, но мир не стал ей препятствовать. На самом деле, компании пришлось вернуться к старым методам. Они сказали: «Нам сле
D'accord. Suivez le point de repère 130 Prime; cela positionnera correctement votre transpondeur radar de rendez-vous. T1 est 122 + 16 + 05… Oups, d'accord.
好的。我们预测，在您下一次中段飞行的预定时间（即进入界面前2小时），我们将以每秒1.4英尺的速度进行燃烧，这将使您在进入界面时的γ角改变十分之一度。目前，在没有进一步机动的情况下，您的γ角为-6.39度，我们将略微增加其角度以击中目标线的中心，机动后将变为-6.51度
روجر. مقابل 64 ألف دولار، ما زلنا نحاول تحديد موقع هبوطك، قاعدة 
Roger. E punto successivo, la velocità di salita dell'elio supercritico è nominale, e ci avevi anche chiesto dell'attività dei tuoi propulsori durante l'ultimo REV. Credo che ora lo capiamo, dato che hai riferito che il tuo beccheggio era in COMANDO DI ACCELERAZIONE e imbardata e 
Джек, по
Alright, I'll - I'll look for it, Buzz. Let me get these - op
जी हां। आपने जितने रन पूरे किए हैं और अपोलो डी-9 के लिए आप किन तारों का 
Did you go off the 
Хо
Fred-o, abbiamo un'ultima modif
在桑给巴尔上空的第二次轨道
Roger. Understand pl
هذه هي الأرض. الآن، لا أعرف إن كنا نتأرجح ذهابًا وإيابًا أم لا يا جاك، أو إن كانت حركة مس
Хорошо. Для тех, кто не знает, здесь мы зап
Bene, quello che stavamo pensando di fare era far bollire un po' l'evaporatore second
了解。こちらはフレンドシップ・セブンです。30分後の報告です。頭を動かしても吐き気や不快感は全くありません。太陽をできるだけ近くで見ることができるなんて驚きです。今は太陽が顔に直接当たっていて、眉毛で目を覆えばいいだけです。左パネルのヒューズスイッチはすべて、以前の報告通りです。モードセレクトは正常、自動、ジャイロは正常。スクイブは作動状態、自動逆噴射はオフ。手動以外の「T」ハンドルはすべてオンで、万が一故障した場合に備えてすぐに手動に戻せるように引いています。レスキューエイドは正常です。ランディングバッグはオフです。シーケンスパネルのその他の項目はすべて通常位置です。制御燃料は68～100パーセント、これを繰り返し、68～100パーセントです。EPIは私のおおよその
Roger. Ti ho sentito forte e chia
現在、前方に 1 秒あ
L'humidité dans le tunnel est actuellement plus élevée qu'elle ne l'a jamais été. Subjectivement, nous n'avons constaté aucune augmentation de ce taux. Il ne semble y avoir aucune humidité ailleurs dans le vaisseau. Par exemple, les hublots ne sont pas embués et divers autres e
Wir wollen die große Kamera, ja? Großes
Roger. How are you reading me n
楕円形 - 我々は楕円性を持っていたに違いありません。なぜ
Roger. Have got that done. I've got attitud
好的。您已经更新了登月舱位置的
D'accord. Sur le côté de la maison, sur le panneau 16: les connexions d'alimentation du disjoncteur (deux) sont ouvertes; batterie 1, haute tension, arrêt/réinitialisation; batterie 2, basse tension, arrêt/réinitialisation puis marche; batterie 2, haute tension, arrêt/réinitialisation 
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Конец св
ठीक है। और मैं... - एटीटी को बनाए रखने के ल
では、進めます。もし、噴射中にエンジンが停止した場合、NOUN 97 が点滅していたら、「進む」、次に「アレージ」、 「エンジンスタート」を押して、「降下エンジンオーバーライド」をオンにしてください。わかりました。次は一般的な情報です。PC プラス 2 を噴射していなかった場合、おそらく P - P プラス 4 が最も早くなります。ご存知のとおり、レートフェイル モードでのみバックアップされます。スター チェックについて話しています。これについては後ほど連絡します。何らかの理由で PC-2 がない場合は、152:02:00 に着陸する自由帰還軌道になります。これは、93 時間でおそらく毎秒約 4 フィートになる、小さなミッドコース 5 の後になります。インド洋には復旧部隊がいます。そこでは状況は良好です。インド洋が今回の着陸地です。わか
好的，杰克。回到我之前教你的电池充电步骤。要终止充电，你只需要在我给你的电路开关旁边写上“打开”或“关闭”。所以，在250号面板上，你已经打开了那个断路器；在275号面板上，逆变器电源-2主B，打开；在5号面板上，电池继电器总线BAT A，打开；传感器单元交流总线2，打开；传感器信号AC2，打开；电池充电器主B，打开；电池充电器交流电源，打开；电池充电器BAT A充电，打开；逆变器控制2，打开；逆变器控制3，打开；你已经完成了主总线连接。然后将电池充电开关拨至 AC 1。
摄像
Вот водяной пистолет. Эта цилиндрическая штуковина на его конце — фильтр с несколькими мембранами: одна пропускает воду, но не газ; другая пропускает газ, но не воду. Таким образом, пропуская газообразн
ربما يكون هناك إزاحة أفقية طفيفة باتجاه - دعنا 
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Мы потеряли 
Il paracadute principale è verde. Il paracadute principale sta venendo fuori senza terzaroli e sem
네. 저희는 얼마 전에 산소 유량에서 발생했던 작은 오류를 해결하려고 노력 중인데, 지금은 다시 정상으로 돌아왔습니다. 우선, 캐니스터 교체 작업 중에 산소 수요 조절기 A를 CABIN 이외의 위치로 옮기셨는지 
Le GET de la combustion de sép
ठीक है, हम चाहेंगे कि आप पृथ्वी की रोशनी के बिना, दिन के उजाले वाले हिस्से में तारे देखने की कोशिश करें। सेक्स्टेंट को भूल जाइए; बस दिन के उजाले वाले हिस्से में जितना हो सके अंधेरे के अनुकूल होने की कोशिश क
Ok. Sent
로저. 카메라 아랫부분이 고장난 것 같군. 버즈, 사진들이 정말
روجر. 7 /: 45701، ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 32346، ناقص 01168، زائد 057
В ходе миссии «Аполл
Roger. Für deinen bevorstehenden Lauf rechne mit einer 7er-Zeit in der Streckenmitte. Nur kurz zur Info: Die Flugbahn sieht so gut aus, dass du den Korridor wahrscheinlich s
Mike, es wird hier drin etwas feucht – wir hören gerade eine Wiederholung, Mike. Es wird hier drin etwas feucht. Es wär
罗杰。45-1 101。2+08。12 37 50。5+36。10+33。46-1 114。2+25 14 12 47。4+05。9+33。47-1 前后推进器。08 和 120。0+14 和 2+30。15 46 36。3+17。8+37。48-1 前后推进器。24 和 120。0+40 和 230，修正 2+30。17 20 19。2+42。8+43。49-4 111。2+21。20 06 48。4+11。9+46。 44 BRAVO 前后推进器点火 14 和 120。0+24 和 2+30。11 55 
コアチューブ2本と太陽風、そして周辺から急いで集めた様々な岩石が詰まった大きなサンプルバッグの半分ほど
Да, мы не так быстро приближаемся к Земле
Abbiamo un grosso problema di gestione con tutta questa attrezzatura a bordo di cui pen
HF通信が途絶えた原因の一つは、ダイポールアンテナからバイコーンアンテナに何度も切り替えていた
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 출발. 당신
Okay. Ent
حسناً يا جو. هل أنت 
Ici Friendship Seven. Observation concernant le fonctionnement du système de commandes: il semble que chaque fois que je passe en mode manuel (commandes électriques) et que je manœuvre pendant une période prolongée, nous introduisons des erreurs considérables dans le système gyroscopique. Je me retrouve avec toutes sortes d'attitudes. Pa
Houston, one more question then before I start. Did you notice on this last update, 
嘿，你最好给卢打个电话，告诉他我们晚
N2 A هي
私はそ
Roger. Ich verstehe, dass wir überall dort, wo es möglich ist, Landschaftsaufnahmen machen sollen und nicht bis zum letzten Tag warten sollen. Wir 
I said the booster is way below me. Could you tell me my 
Canary, is this Apoll
Roger. Non sono molto sicuro di cosa sia successo quella volta, Mike. Stavo segnando i punti di atterraggio, 
로저. DELTA-VZ는 플러스 00190, 옵션 롤, 피치 213 357, 그리고 NA입니다. DELTA-VT는 00197 003 00152입니다. 나머지 PAD는 NA이며, 여유 공간은 없습니다. 무게는 33
Okay. That's correct. Now, that gets you back to the place where you can back out
حسنًا أيها الطيار. أعتقد أنني أفضل البقاء في الداخل وأن تأتي قارب صغير إلى جانبي، وأن تستخدموا إجراءاتكم المعتادة 
ठीक है, कुंभ राशि। मेरे 
ヒュー
알았어, 잭. 내가 알려준 배터리 충전 절차로 돌아가. 충전을 종료하려면, 내가 알려준 회로 스위치 옆에 "열림" 또는 "꺼짐"이라고 적기만 하면 돼. 그러니까 250번 패널의 회로 차단기는 이미 열었고, 275번 패널의 인버터 전원-2 메인 B는 열림, 5번 패널의 배터리 릴레이 버스 배터리 A는 열림, 센서 유닛 AC 버스 2는 열림, 센서 신호 AC2는 열림, 배터리 충전기 메인 B는 열림, 배터리 충전기 AC 전원은 열림, 배터리 충전기 배터리 A 충전은 열림, 인버터 제어 2는 열림, 인버터 제어 3은 열림. 메인 버스 연결은 이미 했지. 그리고 BAT CHARGE 스위치를 AC 1로 설정하십시오. 패널 3에서는 이미 AC INVERTER 2를 OFF로, INVERTER 2 AC BUS 2를 OFF로,
रॉजर। कमांड पायलट को सूचित करें कि
ठीक है। 10, /: 45597, माइनस 040, प्लस 157, प्लस 35186, माइनस 01512, माइनस 00520 180 007 000, नवंबर अल्फ़ा, प्लस 00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253; स्कॉर्पी डेल्टा, नीचे 069, बाएँ 45, प्लस 0748, माइनस 16500 
Okay. Vers
نعم. الكرة داخل المناورة، نعتقد أن الأمر سيستغرق منا حوالي 15 دقيق
Джим, в этом режиме управления это, похоже, лучший вариант. Единственное, что тебе нужно будет сделать, это установить режим удержания положения (ATTITUDE HOLD), поэтому перед началом маневрирования тебе нужно будет поднять рычаг управления и ввести значение 400 плюс все нули, а затем он будет реагировать на рыскание, когда ты перейдешь в режим управления (MODE CONTROL). То есть, он будет управлять твоим рысканием в режиме управления (MODE CONTROL), а тангаж и крен можно будет контролировать в импульсном режиме (PULSE). После того, как ты установишь положение, тебе нужно будет снова ввести значение по оси корпуса, которое равно 400 плюс 5, а затем снова
Abbiamo disattivato l'ACS e acceso l'alimentazione della navicella spaziale, l'ali
Inol
Okay, Joe. And just for confirmation, I went through the switch list you gave me. We are in exactly that configuration with one exception, and that is over on panel 382. I have not, the a - H2O ACCUMULATOR is in 
Houston, Apollo 11. When we pass the proper roll angle, we're not going to be anywhere near zero degrees yaw. Do you want us to just stop and try until we
没错。把它添加到页面顶部。我们真正要做的是——把它放在“激活”之前。页面顶部的另一个步骤属于“设置云台微调”，我们直接省略了那个步
舱内温度正在上升。宇航服的温度似乎也在上升。我打算让它出去到凌晨2
इसे थोड़ा और खीं
알겠습니다. 마지막 조는 -4시간 30분 동안 실행하고, 초당 0.5피트의 속도로 밀어 올리고, 4개의 제트 엔진으로 연료 탱크를 채운 다음, SEP를 실행하고 초당 0.5피트의 속도로 당기는
Roger, Houston. plus 4. Gewicht bleibt gleich, minus 164 plus 129 minus 01594 plus alle Kugeln plus 52885 178 155 000 NA plus 00192 52909 627 52694 12 1037 211, Erdmittelpunkt unten 063, rechts 213 plus 1068 minus 16500 12505 3506
Roger, 15 minuti fa. Jim, ti passo le procedure generali per il rientro. Riceverai l'aggiornamento 63-1 e i dettagli sul tuo prossimo sorvolo degli Stati Uniti da Gus. La procedura generale dopo il retrofire è il rollio in posizione normale, con la testa verso il basso, per la massima 
네, 버즈 씨. 마지막으로, 중간 수정은 아니지만, 한 가지 요청드릴 사항이 있습니다. 폐수 방류가 완료된 후에
मुख्य पैराशूट 1
Luminosità del 
ठीक है। फ्रेड, आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें कि आपके जहाज पर CO2 का स्तर ज़मीन पर हमारे द्वारा मापे जा रहे स्तर से थोड़ा अधिक है, इसलिए जब आपके मीटर 
로저, 11. 저희도 동의합니
Grazi
И ещё, Кен, мы сейчас включим нашу УКВ-радиостанцию, примерно за 4 часа 
But it's pattern is such that it 
알겠습니다. 제 생각에는 이 냉간 열처리 
Affermativo. La stella del sestante è 06, 
ठीक है। जैक, मैं बस यह जानना चाहता हूँ कि s या the के लिए क्या योजनाएँ या विचार चल रहे हैं, क्या हम उनके LiOH कैनिस्टर का उपयोग करेंगे या उपकरणों को कमांड मॉड्यूल में वापस ले जाएँगे, या बस आ
Okay, Jim. Wir überlegen noch, wie wir die Korrektur durchführen können, aber einige unserer Überlegungen lassen uns vermuten, dass wir sie bis zu 118 Stunden nach Landung ohne nennenswerte Delta-V-Einbußen vornehmen können. Wir werden den Kurs anschließend noch ausreichend überwachen, um sicherzustellen, dass wir alles richtig gemacht haben und Sie für eine spätere Landung vorbereiten können, falls nötig – was aber unwahrscheinlich ist. Wir sind mit dem aktuellen Modus zufrieden und arbeiten zwar an einem anderen Modus für die Zeit nach der Kurskorrektur, würden Sie aber gerne noch eine Weile in diesem Modus bleiben, da er sich bewährt hat. Wir beobachten die Wetterlage im Landegebiet. Wir gehen nicht von Problemen aus, überprüfen sie aber sehr genau. Sollten wir Änderungen vornehmen wollen, möchten wir die Kurskorrektur durchführen. Aus diesem Grund erwägen wir, die Kurskorrektur von 104 auf einen Zeitpunkt zwischen 104 und 118 Stunden zu verschieben. Wir würden ger
Понял. Я готовл
Rép
네. 
He is above our a
Я н
そうですね。これがうまくいかなかった場合のために、いくつか追加の指示があります。フランク、ALCは20秒間そのままにしておく必要があるそうです。ALCが正常に
Et enfin, Jack m'a laissé remonter dans l'Odyssée alors que nous glis
Roger. Mike, I think we can explain that seven-tenths rate. When we - the first time through, you know, we failed to go through the, so we had a large error between our actual CDU and desired CDU in roll. And with that situation, the - the vehicle will roll - will maneuver, rather, at a rate that is lo
Columbia, Houston. Vorbe
好的。不过我非常怀疑
D'ac
Хорошо. На странице 1-12, панель 325, нам нужно перевести оба предохранител
알겠습니다. 승무원 현황 보고입니다. 방사능 노출량: CDR 110
13，休斯顿。如果还有余力的
Non dirmi che questa bussola funziona? Dovrei parlare di più. Quello che ho fatto finora è stato estrarre la fonte di luce standard. A questo punto, per la capsula, per il mio viso, perché sto guardan
Хорошо. Мы смотрим на показания вашего CDU (градуса тангенса угла наклона головки цилиндра) и нам кажется, что ваше значение отклоняется примерно на 25 градусов от 1
नहीं, ब्रूस। बस मुझे अक्षांश और देशांतर को 2 से भाग देकर, ऊँचाई बता दो, और ग्रिड वर्ग बता दो। 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。能否帮我们找一个更好的全向天
Okay,
Roger. Meinst du den Notfall-Sauerstoff in Ed
في مباراة "أسترو بلو بونيت" الكبرى، التي تلتها مباراة كرة السلة الكلاسيكية بين فريقي إس إم يو وأوكلاهوما، وصل الفريقان. يستعدان بحماسٍ شديدٍ لهذه المباراة الحاسمة. لم يُذكر هنا الفريق المرشح للفوز، سأتحقق من ذلك وأخبركم لاحقًا إن كان أحدهما مرشحًا للفوز. انطلقت بطولة كأس ديفيز الآن في أستراليا، وتسعى الولايات المتحدة لاستعادة اللقب، ويبدو أننا المرشحون الأوفر حظًا للفوز اليوم. ومن الأخبار الأخرى، حصول 
И одна из приятных вещей, Джек, особенно для новичка вроде меня, это — легкость передвижения внутри. Конечно, как вы знаете из работы в симуляторе командного модуля, наличие невесомости — это действительно большое преимущество. Потому что при одной перегрузке передвигаться внутри довольно тесно, а в этой среде это довольно легко. Как видите, здесь все выглядело довольно чисто, я нашел пару ослабленных шайб, а маленькая пластиковая крышка от секвенсорной камеры отвалилась, и я обнаружил, что она застряла возле панели ED. Хорошо. Прямо под Джимом, он стоит на чем-то, что выглядит как банка. И, ради всех людей, находящихся там, внутри этой банки находится двигатель подъема, на котором, надеюсь, вы видите мою руку, лежащую сейчас — двигатель, который мы используем для взлета с Луны. Непосредственно рядом с крышкой двигателя я держу руку на белом ящике, который уже
收到。好的。如果你准备好接收，我这里有一
On your next pass, Columbia, rather than performing a as such, we would like you to look in the vicinity of the coordinates that we gave you, which is our best analysis based on map physics and the trajectory, and we also have another set of coordinates that we would like you to search in the vicinity of. This last one being based on all interpretation of the geological features that were seen by the crew on their way down. The coordinates of this second site are Mike 0.7 and 8.0. I sa
हा हा। बढ़िया! ज़रा रुकिए, मैं केप को फ़ोन करता हूँ। देखता हूँ उन
Вам придётся сообщить мне высоту, потому что я ничего не вижу
Okay. Im Prinzip stimm
Roger. Pourriez-vous
Скажу вам честно, этот Водолей оказа
Charlie, questa volta la pressione in cabina è rimasta s
Sì, è proprio lì che stavo guardando. L'illuminazione era tale che si vedeva chiaramente. Ciò che me l'ha ricordato è che ora sto guardando fuori dalla fin
로저, 당신 말은 꽤 잘 읽히네
Это Сигма Семь. Мне пришлось отказаться от этой бол
Gemini 4, CAP COM. Il braccia
Négatif 
阿波罗8
Charlie, I'll give you a view out of the overhead window, back looking at the command module right-hand 
Ja, das ist richtig, Jack; die sind ziemlich einfach. Ungefähr in der Mitte des Vorgangs haben wir einen Schritt auf Bedienfeld 3, nämlich „Leistungsverstärker, hoch“; wir möchten das in „Leistungs
ضغط الدم هو...،
Non. Nous n'en recevons aucun. Pourriez-vous nous indiquer les angles d'alignement du cardan à utiliser pour déplacer le dispositif, puis nous l'al
로저, 11. 저희는 그런 기능이 없습니다. 정확한 위치를 파악하려면 M 라인이 수평선과 평행해야 
Ecco il mon
잭, 내가 여기 처음 왔을 때 눈치챈 게 하나 있는데, 사령선에서 똑바로 서서 
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Повторите ещё
1、G&N: 62710、プラス098、マイナス019、点火075 49 4965、マイナス28897、マイナス03944、マイナス00686。ロール358、ピッチ226、347；01692、プラス00610；29173 602 29108；六分儀星31 1066 358。PADの残りはNA。ベガとデネブを243
Хорошо, Дж
没错。接下来你要做的就是设置任务计时器，我们现在只在MDC上启用了任务计时器。你可能
ठीक है। इससे पहले कि मैं इस विषय पर आगे बढ़ूँ, मैं यह पुष्टि कर
Non… nous avions de la batterie pendant un certain temps
На самом деле нет. Думаю, мы рассматриваем период до корректировки курса как время, когда нам нужно проверить водонагреватели. Холодная стоянка тоже включает в себя работу водонагревателей, но это будет сделано непосредственно перед входом в гавань, когда эти вещи не очень чувствительны, и если мы не сделаем это в течение 12 часов, не совсем понятно, где именно происходит холодная стоянка или где нужно включить дополнительный водонагреватель. Просматри
N2 A는 2400, B는
素晴らしいですね。こちらはポール・ヘイニー流のインターステラー・タイムズ、12月23日号です。クリスマスまであと2日でショッピングデーです。昨日のテレビ放送は大好評だったそうです。ミッキー・ハースコウィッツはポスト紙で二刀流です。彼は他のスポーツコラムに加えて、あなたの創刊に関するコラムもいくつか執筆しています。ジム、あなたのお母さんは誕生日のお祝いにとても喜んでくれました。昨日、ニューオーリンズの刑務所から21人の囚人が脱獄しました。ジョンソン大統領は昨夜、インフルエンザにかかりましたが、
Гас, здесь
罗杰。请继续，11号。完
सूर्य की किरणें संरचना से टकराकर वापस लौटती हैं। इसके साथ जुड़ा होने पर वह दूरबीन लगभग बेकार हो जाती है। मुझे लगता है कि एमपीएडी द्वारा दिए गए वे तारा चार्ट तब सबसे उपयोगी होंगे जब हमें किसी कारणवश दूरबीन से निशान लगाने पड़ें। हम उनका उपयोग यह जानने के लिए कर सकते हैं कि हम क्या देख रहे हैं और कह सकते हैं, "वह चमकीला 
Forza Houston
好的。台风“宝贝”目前仍在台湾附近。您将于06日收到天气预报。天气预报显示，格林尼治标准时间13日将有新的台风来袭。如果
روجر. ECS O2. في 22 25
Canary Cap Com, это Si
프레드, 우리는 아무런 문
Volts
Ricevuto. 1-4 01 00 16; RET RB, 20 più 08; tiro a
Com
13번, 휴스턴. 이제 잘 들리시죠? 골드스톤에서 약간 문제가 생겼으니 잠시 기다려
了解し
Ночью нам следует просто фотографировать — делать снимки, не преследуя какой-либо конкре
Okay. Fine. I'll do it. And on the system, the - Whatever the problem was, it seems to have gone away without any changing of J52 sensors or anythin
아폴로 8
네, 연결이 해제되
好的。杰克，我再强调一下，2.5 小时是我们最早可以开始准备那些强化道具的时间。其他的一切你都可以像往常一样做，尽可
Роджер. Навигация по окололунной области выполнена. Мы провели два подхода на звезде 16, два подхода на звезде 22 и один подход н
- - خلية الوقود 
Row are the systems experts on the coming,
好的。删除“自动选择，16，关闭”。将“CB逻辑电源”更改为“逻辑推力电源 - CBS CS逻辑推力，4，关闭”。删除“DELTA-V CG”，向下移动到“信号调节器/驱动器偏置电源，1，AC 1；电源，1，开启”，其中是数字1。“电源至
हम - हम इस खाने के समय में आगे हैं - हम पिछले खाने के समय में पीछे हैं या कुछ ऐसा ही है
फ्रैंक, अ
네. 지금 짐이 들고 있는 것 같은데... 아마 조리개 f:22, 무한대 초점, 그리고 50mm 필름일
2, /: 46427, minus 053, plus 141 , minus 01350, plus 0000, plus 0000 000 175 358 00607, plus 00606 01350 00
Roger. The suit in
फ़ंक्शन, बंद; मोड, स्टैंडबाय; जीटीए, नीचे; जीटीए कवर, सुरक्षित; एटीट्यूड,; स्केल, 5/5; सेलेक्ट, 1; सोर्स,; एटीट्यूड सेट,; मैनुअल एटीट्यूड रोल, पिच, यॉ, रेट कमांड; लिमिट साइकिल, बंद; डेडबैंड, न्यूनतम; रेट, उच्च; टीएचसी पावर, बंद; रोटेशन कंट्रोल पावर सामान्य, दो, बंद; रोटेशन कंट्रोल पावर डाय
दो अतिरिक्त टिप्पणियाँ केवल इतनी ही थीं कि, पहली बात तो यह कि उन्होंने आपके शून्य पूर्वाग्रह के आधार पर डेल
Ok. BAT B, 37.0; piro A, 37.0; piro B, 37.0; pressione dell'elio, 3400; e azoto A e B - giusto per darci dentro, rispettivamente 2200 e 2400; e la temperatura dell'iniettore - stand by - Il sole è tramontato. Ok. La temperatura dell'iniettore, 5 Charlie, 3.9; 5 Dog, 3.2; 6 Alfa, 3.6; 6 Baker, 3.9; 6 Ch
Et pour prendre des photos du vaisseau spatial, le mieux serait d'avan
रॉजर। आपका ट
分かりました。今のあなた
我认为目前还有两件事尚未解决，一是如何处理“”，二是如何处理合适的入场方
Yes. Okay, the first four or five things that I have is panel BAT CHARGE to OFF on panel 3; AC INVERTER 2, OFF; panel 5: MAIN BUS TIE, BAT A/C ON; panel 250: CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING, open; panel 275: INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B, open; and then, the - just to go ahe
好的。另外，需要说明的是，我们所有的数据都
收到。
Gem
ठीक है, हवाई, हमें अपोलो 8 की आवाज़ सुनाई दे रही है। क्या 
고도는 9,413피
नीचे की ओर दिख रहा अगला क्रेटर ड्यूक द्वीप है, और बाईं ओर, तस्वीर के केंद्र के पास स्थित सबसे बड़ा क्रेटर मास्केलीन डब्ल्यू है। यह लगभग 3 मिनट और 39 सेकंड पर उतरने के दौरान की गई स्थिति की जाँच है, और लैंडिंग रडार प्राप्त करने के लिए विमान को सीधा करने से पहले यह हमारी डाउन रेंज और क्रॉस रेंज स्थिति की जाँच है। इस बिंदु के बाद, लैंडिंग क्षेत्र के बहु
7분 정
41 минута. Мы переходим к основному сканеру на горизонте, и существенной разницы в работе основного или вторичн
네, 맞습니다. 현
Er ist
了解しました。すべてのシステムが正常に動作しているようです。フライトでは、機器の保管場所について検討していただきたいと考えています。C
Ok, Fred. Solo... Solo un piccolo dettaglio che abbiamo appena rilevato. In cima, a meno 6 ore, il titolo è "power up", s
S
머리를 숙이고 가까이 두세요. 이제 등을 아치형으로 구부려 보세요. 좋아요. 공간이 충분하네요. 자, 이제 등을 조금 더 아치형으로 만들고 머리를 ***에 붙이세요. 오른쪽으로 살
वाह, बढ़िया सौदा है। धन्यवाद। मेरे पास यहाँ एक वॉशर है। मैंने एक वॉशर और धातु का एक छोटा सा टुकड़ा पकड़ा है और यह एक शंक्वाकार वॉशर जैसा दिखता है, जैसे वोइशन टाइप का या कुछ
ठीक है। और
로저. 저는 그로부터 약
Роджер. Мы видим, что температура на выходе радиатора топливного элемента 2 составляет около 90 градусов, а на элементах 1 и 3 она немного ниже — может быть, 75 или 80 градусов. Примерно час назад вы спрашивали о производительности топливных элементов; похоже, что производительност
The O2 pressure gage is unsatisfactory in many respects. Not only 
Хьюстон, Колумбия. Повторюс
هل ما زلتَ تتواصل مع
D'accord. Côté couleurs, l'eau est d'un bleu roi; les nuages, bien sûr, sont d'un blanc éclatant; le reflet de la Terre est – semble – bien plus important que celui de la Lune. Les terres émergées présentent généralement une textu
Apollo 8, Houston. Ti chiedo di cambiare il tuo OMNI. Ora sta
알겠습니다. 그리고 B
Houston, Colombie. Je le répète: je ne les ai pas vus. L’optique automatique pointait vers un endroit très proche des coordonnées que vous m’avez données. J’ai donc repéré un petit cratère dans cette zone et je l’ai marqué afin d’obtenir des données reproductibles
好的，杰克。图表显示你距离目标大约13万英里，这比我几个小时前上线时你离目标近了大约1万英
रॉजर। मुझे एकदम 
MA
क्या अब आपको बेहतर महसूस हो रहा ह
Роджер. Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Мы передаём через канал 1, и ваш сигнал т
Джим, мы будем брать плату за 4,5-5 час
Okay, Apollo 8. Alle Systeme – ein kurzer Blick in den Raum – sehen einwandfrei aus. Sie haben ein Update der Messwerte vom Quadcopter erhalten, diese Information liegt also vor. Die Temperatur der Oxidator-Zuleitung und die Treibstofftemperatur liegen beide bei 73 Grad. Das K
わかりました。一番下の「MAIN DEP
ठीक है। हम इसे लगभ
Fred, ti consiglio di scattare un'altra di quelle foto quando la tua finestra torna a essere rivolta verso la Terra e, allo stesso tempo, di ricominciare da capo. Potremmo averti inviato un'informazione un po' confusa. L'istruzione "disattiva due quad" si applica solo a una fase iniziale della procedura
Eagle, Columbia. Ich stehe bereit, dich be
А что, Вэнс, вы сделали какие-н
没错。好的。下一个。模式 - 当姿态稳定后，选择“模式控制自动”。按下此键监控速率；当速率小于每秒 0.1 度时，调整所有轴的速率，然后禁用 X 轴推进器。好的。下一个，按回车键；输入 12
ジュリエット0.5と7.7のクレー
3時26分33秒に、空に10個の粒子が見えることに気付きました。それらは間違いなく私には輝いて見えま
水瓶座，我们目前的决定是：保持电源开启，关闭电源，以及其他非必要物品。我们会尽快制定更详细
Okay. Gut gelesen. Weiter geht's auf der Seite. Schalter „BALANCE COUPLE“, „BALANCE COUPLE OFF“. Okay, weiter zur letzten Zeile vor -2 Minuten: „COMMANDER THROTTLE, MINIMUM; LMP to DETS“. Bei -2 Minuten: „400 plus 1“ streichen. Bei -1 Minute: „MASTER ARM, ON“ streichen. Bei -10 Sekunden: „MANUAL ULLAGE“ hinzufügen. Bei +5 Sekunden: „DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, ON;“ hinzufügen: „, 40 Prozent“. Okay, „Wenn der Motor beim 
That's negative, Mike. If you'll look at the plot, which 
और, ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। कृपया समझें कि आपने मुझे जो तीन गि
ほら、下の方を見てみたら、Dリングが外れてるように見えたんだけど、でも今触ってみたら、ハウジン
हमारे ग्राउंड कंप्यूटरों पर हमने
روجر، بيل. نلاحظ أن ضغط البخار الثانوي لديك يعود 
Questa è Friendship 
Okay. The Earth went by there, Jack, at about 18 degre
حسنًا، لنبدأ. إيقاف تشغيل الطاقة الإلكترونية... اللوحة 8. إيقاف تشغيل جميع المفاتيح الستة عشر. إيقاف تشغيل الإضاءة الرقمية الداخلية؛ إيقاف تشغيل الإضاءة الداخلية
لقد وجدت مكاناً من
आपके ऑक्सीजन का स्तर लगभग 950
Okay, Jack. Die verbleibenden Schritte sind lediglich Konfigurationsschritte für die Anzugschleife, um das System voll funktionsfähig zu machen. Unsere Leute möchten damit warten, bis der Druck in der Kanisterflasche, an der du arbeitest, 7,6 Millimeter Quecksilbersäule erreicht hat. Das dauert wahrscheinlich noch 45 Minuten bis eine Stunde – wir messen jetzt 4,7 Millimeter. In der Zwischenzeit sollst du bitte die zweite Kommandomodulflasche genauso einrichten wie die erste,
Dite loro di guardare la roba che hanno preso ieri. Non è cambiato per ni
Nous aimons adopter une attitude q
You want me to run through a te
बस इतना ही, जैक। और पानी लेने के बारे में एक और बात; अगर आप पर्याप्त पानी नहीं निकालत
Небольшая вибрация, довольно п
Хорошо. Рассмотрим пункт 1: второй пункт — это 12-часовая холодная выдержка по Кельвину, и в ходе обсуждений, которые я здесь проводил, и перед полетом, я думаю, было решено, что мы не хотим проводить холодную выдержку. Поэтому мы удалим этот шаг 2. Суть в том, что, я думаю, мы хотим провести холодную выдержку, и мы, безусловно, хотим проверить водонагреватели перед входом в атмосферу, чтобы убедиться, что ни один из них не высох, как это было до этого. М
ठीक है। मध्य प्रशांत महासागर में उतरने वाले क्षेत्र में मौसम अच्छा है। बादल 2000 फीट (लगभग 10 किमी/घंटा) के हैं, दृश्यता 10 किमी/घंटा; हवा की गति 0.60 किमी/घंटा (लगभग 10 किमी/घंटा); लहरों की ऊँचाई 4 फीट है, और अल्टीमीटर 2986 किमी/घंटा (यदि आप जानना चाहें तो)। छिटपुट बारिश क्षेत्र के 10 प्रतिशत से कम हिस्से में हो सकती है। इवो जिमा से बचाव दल लैंडिंग पॉइंट पर मौजूद रहेंगे, विमान का कॉल साइन रिकवरी 1 होगा, और वे तैराकों के साथ स्टेशन पर तैनात रहेंगे। हमारे पास यूएसएस हॉ
D'accord. Aristarque se trouve à l'angle Echo 9 sur votre carte ATO. Il est à environ 394 milles au nord de votre route. Cependant, à votre altitude actuelle, soit environ 167 milles nautiques, il devrait être au-dessus de vous, c'est-à-dire visible à l'horizon: 23 degrés nord, 47 degrés ouest
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。バッテリーの充電が完了しました。乗組員の状態報告は
Roger. Jim, we noticed you just went to AUTO and back to CLOSE on the SUIT RELIEF valve. Is everythi
حسنًا. في الصف الرابع، سنفتح جميع السخانات الأربعة - النظام A والنظام B - وقواطع الدائرة الأربعة الأولى. سنغلق مفتاح التحويل التلقائي. سنفتح جهاز استقبال VHF A ومفتاح صوت القائد. وسنغلق مفتاح وضع الاس
Итак, начнём. Интерес к полёту «Аполлона-11» остаётся высоким, но в районе Хьюстона также наблюдается конкурирующий интерес к смягчению правил полива. Мэр Луи Уэлч обещает отменить ограничения на полив газонов, если дожди продолжатся. В пятницу ожидается переменная облачность, и во второй половине д
Джек, я не думаю, что мы когда-либо отключали CB POWER-1, MAIN A. Мы отключали POWER-2, MAIN B, и POWER-1, MAIN B. Оба
好的，我明白。我只是——就像我说的
Хорошо. Это было... Эт
Houston, Apollo 8
太平洋
알았어, 잭. 그건 상관없어. 우리는 저 연결관들 상류의 터널을 
- -... time on 
حسنًا يا غاس، لدي سؤال واحد فقط لك قبل أن تبتعد عن نطاق التغطية. 
9 फीट/सेकंड-10. ठीक है
हैलो, हैलो, बर
잠시만 기다려 주세요. 제가 최신
C'est un feu vert pour la décompression et un feu ve
Roger. We have a lock-on now,... at 21 50 we had a range of 22.24 nautical m
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। हम तारा संख्या 26, यानी दो-छह, का उपयोग करना चाहेंगे; हम इसे दो सेटों के लिए पृथ्वी के निकट क्षितिज के रूप में उपयोग करना चाहेंगे। फिर हम तारा संख्या 16 को पृथ्वी के दूर क्षितिज के रूप में एक सेट के लिए उपयोग करना चाहेंगे। यदि तारा संख्या 2
Sounds good. Without the, we may have a be
How is our O2 consumption? I've been plotting it and it looks like we're in reasonably goo
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。システムはすべて順調に進んでおり、もうすぐ到着です。向こう側でお会いしまし
Eine Möglichkeit wäre, den Zwischengang auszulassen und stattdessen etwa acht Stunden vor dem Eintritt einen kompletten Zwischengang einzulegen. Wir haben uns
Ok, Vance. Come stai leggen
И у меня есть две вещи, которые мы хотели бы попросить Джека сделать в командном модуле, чтобы снизить нагрузку на ГЛАВНЫЙ ПУНКТ А. Во-первых, проверить или выключить переключатель НАГРЕВАТЕЛЬ CM/RCS. С этим мы уже покончили, и хотя автоматические выключатели отключены, переключатели могут потреблять небольшой ток. А во-вторых, мы хотели бы попросить его выключить ПИТАНИЕ ЛОГИКИ 2/3; сейчас оно нам не нужно. Оно упомина
Verdammt nochmal! Du solltest
That's affirm. Before I start on the pads, another comment. The general indications that we gave 
ठीक है। जब भी आप भेजने के लिए तैयार हों, हम पूरी तरह से तैय
好的。我们首先要做的事情之一是给电池充电，这样我们才能获得足够的电力来完成这项
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们还有3分钟；所有系统准
Очен
Okay, hier am Boden sieht es wirkli
Похоже, оптика никак не пострадала, но на некоторых окнах определенно образовались наледи. На окне номер 1, ближайшем к вентиляционному отверстию, и немного на окне номер 5 есть н
罗杰。潜水服蒸汽温度是69度，舱内温度是+11度。舱内过水指示灯亮起时，温度骤降。我
罗杰。你
Roger. Abbiamo un piccolo esperimento visivo laser che vorremmo
アポロ8
알겠습니다. 카메라에 대해서는 이해했습니다. 산소 퍼지에
짐, 당신은 현지
コロンビア、コロンビ
في مكان أقرب قليلاً هنا، في ممفيس، تينيسي، أطلق والدا فتاة صغيرة، السيد والسيدة إيدي لي ماكجي، عليها اسم "موديل" (وحدة). وقالت السيدة ماكجي: "لم تكن فكرتي، بل كانت فكرة زوجي". وأضافت أنها ترددت في البداية ب
Roger. Non m
ここで犯すことのできる本当にひどい間違いは 1 つ
نحن الآن عند 3+34. ندخل في الظلام. تسطع أشعة الشمس على مقدمة المركبة الفضائية، مع توجيه طرفها الصغير للأمام تقريبًا. في الواقع، نحن على بعد 30 درجة إلى اليسار من الوضع المستقيم، مع توجيه الطرف الصغير للأمام. وبسبب طريقة انعكاس أشعة الشمس على حافة الصاروخ المعزز، كانت المركبة الفضائية تعكس الضوء، تمامًا كما لو أن أحدهم وضع مرآة هناك وسلط
Affermativo. Sul lato destro, tutto è fuori bordo, tranne la spia del livello del carburante che 
D'accord. Je suis toujours en mode SLEW, donc on
मैं अभी फ्रेड के साथ नीचे जाने की कोशिश कर रहा हूँ ताकि आपको दिखा सकूँ कि यह कैसे काम करता है। हालाँकि मैं बार-बार ऊपर तैर रहा हूँ, लेकिन शायद हम यहाँ ए
卷号 177 1
了解しました。O2ハイレートではなく、キャビンリチェックバルブの使用をお願いします。また
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस
ठीक है। बर्न के लिए, हम गाइडेंस कंट्रोल, मोड कंट्रोल, एटीट्यूड होल्ड, एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल स्विच का उपयोग करेंगे। रोल पल्स, पिच पल्स और यॉ मोड कंट्रोल भी उपलब्ध होंगे। हम पिच और रोल के लिए कंट्रोल का उपयोग करेंगे। इंजन
أوه، ظننت أنك ربما تريد مني أن أذهب لألتقط صوراً أو ش
Okay. Prüfen Sie, ob die Wechselstromversorgung (AC) funktioniert. Dazu muss der Wechselrichter 2 an Panel 16 geschlossen sein. Der Leistungsschalter für den Wechselrichter 2 muss ebenfalls geschlossen sein. An Panel 11 unter „FLIGHT DISPLAYS“ müssen die Leistungsschalter GASTA und COMMANDER geschlossen sein. Auch an Panel 11 müssen die Leistungsschalte
- - tim
Aquarius, Houston. Wir haben einen Teil Ihrer N
Roger. Ich habe im AUTO-Modus angedockt, und wie gesagt, ich war mir des genauen Kontaktzeitpunkts nicht sicher. Ich habe die Anzeigen der Andocksonde ständig überprüft. Zwei „Barber Poles“-Symbole zeigten an, dass die drei Verriegelungen – nicht die Verriegelungen, sondern die drei Verriegelungen – eingerastet waren und wir sanft angedockt hatten. Zu diesem Zeitpunkt wirkte die Situation sehr stabil. Also schaltete ich auf FREE, warf einen Blick aus dem Fenster, und es sah immer noch stabil aus; dann zündete ich die zweite Primärtriebwerksflasche. In diesem Moment begann eine Drehung zwischen den beiden Fahrzeugen, deren Ursache mir unklar ist
Rog
Хорошо. В данный момент он отделился от космического корабля, находится
휴스턴, 
Fred, ich kann dich nicht richtig einschätzen, aber ich glaube
بالنسبة لكاميرا هاسيلبلاد، فإنّ لفا
Okay. And for your information, all of our numbers are based on amperage usage of 14 amps. And we're using only 12.3, so we'
Siamo in attesa delle tue 
Okay. Sie möchten, dass ich Folgendes auf MDC 3 vorlese: Batteriespannung B, Zündkerzenspannung A, Zündkerzenspannung B, Einspritzdüsentemperaturen
Ja, so sieht es aus. 
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We've got some sw
分かりました。分かりました。やります。それからシステムですが… 問題が何であれ、J52センサーの交換などは一切せずに解決した
Сейчас 7:55 и 1/2. Я снимал на Contarex, пытаясь запечатлеть «Ураганную красотку». Не очень-то успе
Das Merkwürdige an der Plattformausrichtung, Owen, ist, dass ich, wenn ich mir wirklich Zeit nehme und sehr langsam, sorgfältig und präzise markiere, ungefähr die gleiche Ste
Роджер
알겠습니다. 하지만 그러려면 먼저 음정이 있어야 하겠죠. 오늘은 다들 훨
यह सही है। ठीक है। अगला: अगला कैमरा - स्टैंडबाय 1। मुझे यहाँ शोर सुनाई दे रहा है। ठीक है। अगला - अगला कैमरा 16-मिलीमीटर वाला होगा, और इन तस्वीरों को प्राथमिकता 3 माना जाता है। ठीक है। A-8 से 16-मिलीमीटर वाला लेंस और पावरपैक लें। 10-मिलीमीटर वाला लेंस लें और उसे हटा दें - 10-मिलीमीटर वाला लेंस हटा दें, और B-3 से 18-मिलीमीटर वाला लेंस लें और उसे कैमरे से जोड़ दें। और पावर केबल को कैमरे से जोड़ें, फ्रेम रेट को 12 फ्रेम प्रति सेकंड पर सेट करें, और वही डेटा लाइन जो मैंने आपको पहले दी थी, इस बार इस तरह दिखेगी: /DAC/18/CEX, बैटरी (f:8 और 1/250th)। ठीक है। अब इन दोनों कैमरों को देखते हुए, यह सलाह दी जाती है कि आप पहले 2-1/2 मिनट के लिए 16-मिलीमीटर वाले लेंस का उपयोग करें और फिर 70-मिलीमीटर वाले लेंस प
Они постепенно продвигаются
훌륭
Роджер. Я понял. Примерно за 2 минуты до восхода солнца из-за края диска появляется тонкая белая дымка. Насколько далеко она распрост
理解 f:16 为 
مقياس ضغط الأكسجين غير مُرضٍ من نواحٍ عديدة. فهو لا يحتوي على مقياس كافٍ، وفي حالتنا الحالية، تم ضبطه على مستوى منخفض جدًا بحيث يقع ضمن نطاق التشغيل الطبيعي. ونحن نضطر إلى رفعه إلى مستوى ضغط الأكسجين العالي باستم
و CB - CB INVERTER 1، اللوحة 11، مغلق. CB اللوحة 16، مستشعر إشارة الجهاز، مغلق. INVERT
Ok, capo. Ci vediamo lì. È stata una corsa davvero, davvero bella, l'ultima; questo m
Vedo il portello e tutti i... tutti i corrimano. È la prima volta che vediamo l'este
コピーしました。ア
Roger. I'm afraid that Ed will be asleep b
حسنًا يا هيوستن. انظر إلى السجل رقم 3 في البيانات. هذه البيانات تتزايد باتجاه القيمة المطلوبة وهي 315؛ وسأترك وحدة التحكم 
حسناً يا جيم. أعتقد أن هذا ما كان يهدف 
알겠습
Das ist Friendship Seven. Es blendet durch das Zielfernrohr im Klarmodus. Es ist genau in dem Moment gestartet, als ich dir das Zeichen gegeben habe
रॉजर। हम अपशिष्ट जल के निपटान के लिए अनु
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Correction de trajectoire n° 2. SPS/G&N 63059, +097, -020, allumage 02644
Роджер, Аврора Севен, сейчас всё в порядке. Похоже, мы потеряли показания температуры тела с предыдущих станций. Сейчас у нас 102 градуса, но главное, чтобы вы сейчас 
ठीक है। और अब हम आपको चेकलिस्ट की पहली किस्त पढ़कर सुनाने के लिए तैयार हैं। इसमें हम एक समयरेखा और उसके अनुसार च
Roger, chirurgo, ritiene che ciò sia con
रॉजर। डेल्टा बिल्कुल सही लग रहा था। बर्न टाइम हमें लगभग 2 सेकंड ज़्याद
... It's, I thi
حسنًا، اقتربنا من دقيقتين؛ سأحصل
The heliu
짐, 저희는 당신이 원하는 대로 작업을 진행하시기를 권장하지만, VERB 49 상태를 유지하시고 데드밴드를 아직 좁히지 마세요. 그런 마음가짐을 갖추신 후에 스타 체크
ओडिसी, ह्यूस्टन। समाप
了解。それで間違いありません。
알았어. 프레드, 알겠어. 종 겉면이
Эй, Фрэ
«Аполлон-8», это Хь
Roger, Neil. Grazie. Sembra anche che appena a sinistra del terminatore, nell'emisfero settentrionale, ci sia una fascia nuvolosa che
Мы собираемся провести ручную перен
Il pilota comandante sta ancora dormendo. Si sveglierà tra cir
好的。一件很有
F
はい、あなた
没错。我这就去了解一下预计何时
好的，杰克。等等。我忘了把 ANUN/NUM 的调光旋钮拧到最低了，现在显示的是 72
روجر، فريندشيب سفن. نحن نراقب محولات الطاقة لديك. محول الطاقة الخاص بك ذو الـ 150 ف
ठीक है
Отлично. У меня получ
Negative. I w
Sette, qui
ज
लॉन्च के दौरान आप चुप रह सकते हैं। जब भी समय मिले जवाब दें, मैं आपको विवर
Alimentation du système de con
Thanks a bunch. Okay, I'll read these quantities off. The GMT was 1716 when we started. Propellant quantity was 60. Cabin temperature — 92. Suit temperature — 58. Cabin pressure — 5.6. Suit CO2 — 3/4 millimeter. Secondary left O2 bottle — 5100. Secondary O2 bottle right was 5050. ECS O2 quant
На самом деле, последние 12 часов, а может и больше, а может, и 24, мы не слишком внимательно следили за тем, чтобы лиц
मुझे बस इस चीज
Well, along with one tree, it turns o
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 추가적
أعتقد أن باز محقٌ على الأرجح. في الواقع، في إحدى المرات وضعتُ علامةً ظننتُ أنها خاطئةٌ بعض الشيء، لكنني قلتُ لنفسي: "حسنًا، سأجربها على أي حال"، فحصلتُ على خمسة أصفارٍ في تلك المرة. وعندما ظننتُ أن ك
अपोलो 8, ह्यू
You went a little fas
Мы предпочитаем прид
Марк, ты хочешь, 
Sì. Non credo che avessimo effettivamente difficoltà con lo spazio per la testa. Sentivo di avere abbastanza spazio per la testa e potevo effett
Okay, Fred-o, gut gemacht. In Reihe 4, beginnend mit: ANZUGLÜFTER 1, GESCHLOSSEN; GLYKOLPUMPE AUTOMATISCHE UMSCHALTUNG, VHF-SENDER B, GEÖFFNET; VHF-EMPFÄNGER A, GEÖFFNET. Darunter: SIGNALSTÄRKEANZEIGE, GEÖFFNET; BETRIEB, GESCHLOSSEN. Darunter, Reihe 5: QUERVERBINDUNGSBUS,
О, мы сейчас пров
ऑक्सीडाइज़र और ईंधन फीड लाइन का तापमान 75 डिग्री है और स्थिर बना हुआ है। सर्विस मॉड्यूल क्वाड पैकेज का तापमान 120 और 140 डिग्री के बीच घट-बढ़ रहा है और स्थिर है, और ऐसा लगता है कि हीटर सामान्य रूप से काम कर रहा है। हम आपको 2 बजे के बाद 60 मील की गोलाकार कक्षा में रखने की योजना बना रहे हैं। और लगभग उसी समय बर्न के दौरान हम आपको
了解。非常に良い天気だ。休憩。着陸エリアの天気予報は、現在2000m、高波、10マイル。風速約0.80m、風速18ノット。波の高さは3～6フィート。デルタHはプラス
我们终于解决了宇航服电路的温度问题。我明白斯科特为什么只关注这个记录位置了。
Ok, Jim
잠시 기다려주세요. 저희 거리는 약 3000피트
Molto bene. Utilizzerai la modalità retrò e lo standby 
Roger, 11. Zu Ihrer Frage bezüglich des Ladevorgangs der Akkus: Wir gehen davon aus, dass es sich um Unterschiede zwischen den einzelnen Akkus ha
حسنًا يا جاك. لاحظ أنك قمت بتأمين ذلك، وكان هذا ما سنوصي به على أي حال. سنطلب من الفريق المختص في الغرفة الخلفي
Хорошо. Мы выполним прогрев системы управления наведением (GUIDANCE CONTROL). И режим управл
Gemini VI, your 
روجر. ستكون سرع
Honeysuckle-Netzwerk, GOSS-KONFER
Ok. Abbiamo il tubo blu dell'LMP vicino al finestrino dell'LMP e il - Ovviamente, il tubo ro
この岩塊は、最終降下時に通過した、この大きくて鋭い縁を持つ岩のリムクレーターに起源を持つのではないかと考えています。昨日、私はそれがフットボール競技場ほどの大きさだと言いましたが、実際、近づくにつれて測るのが少し難しくなりました。しかし、私たちが通り過ぎた時には、アストロドームにちょうど
Мы знаем, что множество ученых из разных стран готовы осмотреть лунные образцы, и мы подумали, что вам будет интересно увидеть их в таком виде, в каком они есть на самом деле. Эти два ящика — контейнеры для возврата образцов. Это вакуумно упакованные контейнеры, которые были закрыты в вакууме на лунной поверхности, герметизированы, а затем доставлены внутрь и помещены в эти пакеты из стекловолокна, застегнуты на молнию и снова герметизированы снаружи, и размещены в этих емкостях в боковой части командного модуля. Это два ящика. И как только мы поднимемся на борт корабля, я уверен, что эти ящик
罗杰。现在你还要检查一
Roger. Je crois que j'étais monté jusqu'à 90,0 avant que ça n'arrive là. Celui de ce côté est bon, je vérifi
मुझे आपकी बात साफ-साफ सुनाई दे रही है, म
알겠습니다. 위도 +1.243, 경도 2 +11.8
حسنًا يا جاك، سنبدأ. أكره حقًا أن أخسر. آمل حقًا أن يكون إجراء منتصف الدورة 
加州资本通信中心，这里是
A
حسنًا. أول شيء علينا فعله حقًا هو توازي المنصة من 06:50 إلى 07:10. إنهم يزودوننا بمناورة الانعطاف المحملة بواسطة وحدة التح
हमने इग्निशन की पुष्टि कर दी है, और थ्
Okay. Also gut, ich habe es nicht so lange gehalten. Vielleicht 2 oder 3 Sek
D'accord. Pour commencer, je vais modifier la configuration de base que nous vous avons fournie: nous voulons ouvrir deux disjoncteurs supplémentaires sur le tableau 225. Êtes-vous pr
मुझे खेद है
11, Houston, unser Foto is
알겠습니다. 저는 그게 문제를 해결하
حسنًا. احذف "AUTO SELECT, 16, OFF". غيّر "CB LOGIC POWER" إلى "LOGIC THRUST POWER - CBS CS LOGIC THR
はい、必要
Okay, Wal
오브 레이트, 호라이즌 스캔을 진
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir haben Ihre Bordvektordaten übernommen und weitergeleitet, und es
离开
Bien, nous évalu
ЗАДНЯЯ О
Okay, verstand
Cavolo, mi dispiace dirlo guardando attraverso questo monocolo, ma c'è una macchia bianca che sembra proprio un cratere: sembra
Okay. Fe
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह स्टीलहेड है। आप अब 1,000 गज दूर है
D'accord. J'allais dire que non - nous n'avons pratiquement pas de module de service SEP pa
Ну вот, вы только начинаете видеть окрестности. Я вижу части Центральной Америки, и там, похоже, довольно ясно. Острова Карибского моря начинают появляться, и видны довольно длинные облачные полосы. Похоже, что у берегов Гренландии образовалась система с большими облачными потоками, простирающимися на юго-запад. Восточное побережье США только сейчас начинает показываться, и, насколько я могу судить, сейчас там не так уж и плохо. Возможно, позже сегодня днем ​​у нас будут неплохие снимки. Коне
انتقل إلى حذف ما تبقى من الملفات التي تعمل عليها الآن، ثم ارجع إلى وضعية الطائرة، ثم
حسناً. ها هو ريتر هناك.
如果把它放在后面的箱子里，几乎会占
Roger. I docked in AUTO, and as I said, I wasn't really sure of the moment of contact. I kept cross checking the docking probe indicators. I got two barber poles indicating that the three capture latches - not capture latches, but the three... latches had made, and we were soft docked. And at that time the situation looked very stable. So, I went to FREE, glanced back out the window and it still looked stable; and I fired primary 2 bottle. And at that time, a gyration began between the two vehicles due I'm not sure to what. Perhaps the thrusting or perhaps it was building up prior, and I hadn't noticed it. But anyway, during the RETRACT of the probe, there were yaw - my yaw excursions of, I would guess, around 15 degrees, and I had to come back on, take the FREE switch and throw it back to AUTO, and try to damp them out; and I guess Neil was doing the same in the. I'll let him tell you about his side of it. And I though that we were not going to get a successful RETRACT and hard dock. However, in about - oh, I guess 6 or 8 seconds, I did hear - could see the situation damping out, and then we heard the noise indicating the docking latches h
Roger, 
아폴로 11호. 알겠습니다
حسنًا. ما نفعله هنا 
... لنرى ما إذا 
저는 메인 경보기에 사용하는 광전지 
O
Vie
11، هيوستن. باز، الخبر من الغرفة الخلفية هو أنه يمكنك بالفعل تحميلها، ولكن
ट्रैंक्विलिट
هناك بعض الأضواء على الأرض تحتي. ان
Отложите м
حسنًا. سخانات الخزان رقم 2 مطفأة في هذا
Хорошо. Давайте получим остаточные платежи. Хорошо, Хьюсто
了解。ロックオン成功です。21時50分時点では射程距離が
Понял. В данный 
All that procedure for seemed to work very well. The only thing that was a little odd, is that there was some thruster activity. I had pitch in ACCEL COMMAND, and roll and yaw in RATE COMMAND, and somehow, roll and yaw got ex
ठीक है। मुझे समझ आ गया कि आपको रीडिंग मिल ग
रॉजर। और हमारे जहाज पर रीडिंग इस प्रकार हैं:
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमने देखा है कि आपकी उपस्थिति दर बढ़ रही है। क्या आप कृपया इसे घटाकर लगभग 04 तक ला सकते हैं? अन्यथा हमें जल्द ही उच्च लाभ खो
休斯顿，
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。你最后一次操作后是不是按了 COMMAND RESET
غروب الشمس خلابٌ حقًا، لا أعتقد أنني بحاجة لإضاعة الكثير من الوقت في النظر إليه. إنه مثيرٌ للاهتمام للغاية. الأمر الآخر المثير للدهشة هو مدى سواد الظلام عندما لا تكون العينان قد اعتادتا عليه. أستطيع بالتأكيد رؤية بعض الطلاء على النافذة. سأعود الآن إلى وضع VOX على تردد UHF-hi للإرسال. سأفتح واقي الوجه لمسح الميكروفون الأيمن. لقد لعقته. سأغلق واقي الوجه. تم إغلاق واقي الوجه فورًا لكي تعمل دائرة البدلة. لا أريد أن أعبث بها مرة أخرى. مدخل البدلة يحافظ على درجة حرارة جيدة جدًا عند حوالي 68 درجة. لذا سأرفع القبة مرة أخرى. إنها الآن عند 76، 75. يبدو أن هذا الإعداد الأعلى هو ما نريده. أعتقد أنني سأضيف نصف علامة أخرى الآن وقد نتمكن من تثبيته. لقد بدأت تبرد أخيرًا، لذا أعرف ما أريد الوصول إليه في الإعداد. لقد ضبطتُ كمية سائل التبريد للبدلة وذراع التحكم على 8.5. قراءة درجة حرارة القبة حاليًا هي 75 درجة. مدخل البدلة 68 درجة. جوٌّ لطيف للغاية. أشعر بهواء بارد يمرّ على وجهي. تبدو كمية الأكسجين جيدة جدًا، 60 و75 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة. أراقب محوّل الطاقة 250. تقترب درجة حرارته من 140 درجة، وانخفضت درجة حرارة محوّل الطاقة 150 إلى حوالي 100 درجة. درجة حرارة وضع الاستعداد حوالي 100 درجة، وهي درجة حرارة المقصورة. ثالثًا، محوّل الطاقة 250 - هذا المحوّل يعاني، وسأراقبه. مبادل حرارة المقصورة يستقرّ بالتأكيد عند 40 در
ठीक है। अब, जब आप इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में हों, तो निम्नलिखित ऑनबोर्ड रीडआउट आवश्यक हैं: बैट सी वोल्टेज, पायरो बैट ए वोल्टेज, पायरो 
Ha! Ha! J'ai encore des traces de freinage sur mes palmes à cause de ton escapade dans la brousse. Bon, tu vois, j'ai encore viré à droite. Je dois… correction, j'ai viré à gauche. Je dois aller à droite, la lune est juste à l'horizon. Je vais la remettre sur la bonne voie, juste pour te montrer comme c'est facile. Il semblerait que mon niveau de carburant soit correct, alors je vais faire quelques essais. Bon, on est presque sur la bonne voie, et encore un peu à côté en roulis. Je vais la remettre en place et ce sera bon. Voilà le roulis qui va la redresser. On remonte en roulis… bon, j'arrête là. C'est le mieux que je puisse te donner. Un peu de roulis par-ci par-là. Voilà. C'est ce que je te donnerais. Bon, je vais remettre les gyroscopes en mode normal et les laisser revenir sur la bonne voie. Je vais tout configurer et découvrir les instrument
Роджер, Майк. Мы видим колебания на наших графиках. Вы подключались и отключались, но у медиков по-
Warten Sie, Charlie. Ja, wir werden hier mit 263 Umdrehungen pro Minute losfliegen un
إيج
了解しました。もしかしたら、箱を開ける必要はないかもしれません。今お伝えした位置はウェストクレーターの少し西です。おそらく0.2キロメートルほど西です。ニールかバズが降下中、月面滞在中、あるいは上昇中に、この事実を裏付けるか反証するかするような、何か他の目印を観測したかどうか、気になっていたんです。一つ気になるのは、もしあなたがこの位置にいたなら、上昇中にあなたの足跡のすぐ北にキャッツ・ポー
Apollo 8, Houston. 
好的。D-8 06:35 00；通过夏威夷；Rev 4。D-8 10:00；
Глядя на Землю издалека, из космоса, я чувствую то же самое, что и путешественники на старых парусных кораблях, отправлявшиеся в очень долгие плавания вдали от дома, а теперь мы возвращаемся обратно. И меня переполняет чувство гордости за проделанную поездку, но при этом я рад вернуться домой, в наш родной порт. И это — это то, что вы видите здесь
Инфор
Atlantikschiff, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich wünsche mir, dass Sie Kurs auf Cape Cod nehmen. Ich habe die Kapsel auf die 180°-Position treiben lassen und muss mich momentan neu orientieren. Als ich mich vollständig auf Horizont und Periskop ausrichtete, waren meine Lageanzeigen völlig falsch. Meine Rollachse zeigt 30° na
Es sieht so aus, als wären wir gut vorbereitet, diese Hochleistungsantenne noch einmal beim C
روجر. لق
La stella è uscita dalla cima. Non riuscivo pi
ठीक है। और जैसे ही आप एक अच्छे नियंत्रण मोड के साथ पूरी तरह से
Хорошо. Вы же сказали, что это бу
Okay, zurück zu Bedienfeld 250. CB BAT Bravo POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING, schließen. Als Nächstes: MDC 3, AC INVERTER 2 auf MAIN B. AC INVERTER 2, AC BUS 1, einschalten. Als Nächstes: Bedienfeld 5: AC INVERTER AC BUS 1 auf UP, TLM auf COMMAND RESET, dann AUS. Anschließend OMNI auswäh
D'accord, Jim. On est d'accord avec toi sur ce point; c'est un sujet qu'on voulait aborder avec toi. On y a réfléchi, et voici notre avis: bien sûr, la décision te revient, mais vu les avantages et les inconvénients, tu as clairement identifié l'avantage. On effectue un contrôle d'intégrité des écoutilles peu avant EI moins une heure, et si le contrôle est négatif, tu auras du mal à enfiler tes combinaisons. Par contre, l'inconvénient, c'est que les combinaisons pourraient te ralentir considérablement, sans même compter le temps pour les enfiler. De plus, quelqu'un craint qu'après un certain temps passé dans les combinaisons, tu aies trop chaud, et qu'on soit obligés d'activer le système de ventilation, ce qu'on préférerait éviter car 
Go ahe
Das stimmt, der Wert ist etwas niedrig. Ich habe den Anzug jetzt auf 6 eingestellt und werde auf 6,5 erhöhen. Ich komme nicht wirklich
Роджер. Отличная работа радара. Ужасно жаль, что н
罗
١١، هيوستن. خلال الساعتين الماضيتين، لاحظنا ارتفاعًا طفيفًا ومستمرًا في الضغط الجزئي لثاني أكسيد الكربون. هل قمتم بتغيير أسطوانة ثاني أكسيد الكربون هذا الصباح؟ لسنا بحاجة إلى القيام بذلك الآن؛ نود فقط التأكد من أن أجهزتنا تعمل بش
Okay. L'unica proposta che sembra essere questa, se lasciassimo che Jim facesse la sua valutazione attraverso il telescopio, sarebb
あなたのTRはカウント
好的。
どうしたんですか、シート中に血を撒き散
Хорошо. Этот маневр приб
안녕하세요, 카나리 캡콤, 오로라 세븐
Okay, Fred. Wir erhalten Ihre MED-Daten; es hat etwas gedauert, bis si
حسنًا، انظر، إذا وضعنا هذا الفيلم - إذا وضعته هنا والتقطت صورة أو اثنتين، فسأضطر إلى إزالته مرة أخرى؛ هذه هي المشكلة الوحيدة. لن أضطر إلى ذلك، لكنه لا يُخزّن بشكل أنيق
Okay, Apollo
Vous voulez prendre des
ممتاز. نراكم في غ
أوه،
D'accord. Commençons par une première vérification
イーグル、ヒューストン。活動の進捗
Well, that is what we wanted to do. It seems that would be the most interesting thing we can show you
Понял. Подождите. У меня для вас время начала сброса жидкого кислорода. Он должен начаться в 5 + 03 + 07 и закончиться в 5 + 04 + 55. Сжигание в свободном пространстве начинает
Roger, ich habe Ihnen eine TR- und G
Go ahead, Houston. A
आप 
Das ist ri
5
TRが拒否されま
알겠습니다. 제가 다 이해했는지 확인해 보겠습니다. 먼저, 랑데부(Rendezvous)를 위해 CB 16 인버터 2를 닫고, CB 11 AC 버스 A 버스 타이 인버터 2도 닫아야 합니다. 그런 다음 패널 14에서 인버터 2가 선택되었는지 확인합니다. 그리고 CB 11 랑데부 레이더 2도 닫아야 합니다. 두 차단기 모두 닫아야 합니다. 그 후 랑데부 레이더 해제 손잡이를 당깁니다. 패널 3에서 랑데부 레이더를 활성화합니다. 레지스터 1과 2에 모든 zip 값을 더하고 28300을 더한 후 GO를 누릅니다. 그런 다음 16 72로 움직임을 모니터링합니다. 주차가 완료되면 CB 11 랑데부 레이더 2를 열고 ENTER를 누릅니다. 그리고 CB 16 인버터 2도 엽니다. 이제 램프를 켜기 위한 정렬 작업이 시작되면 CB 16, 인버터 2가 닫히고 CB 11 AC 버스 A 램프가 
了解しました。もし少しお時間があれば、昨日の午後に渡したPAD
トンネル内の湿度は、これまでで最も高くなっています。主観的には、湿度の変化、つまり湿度の上昇は確認できていません。宇宙船内の他の場所には湿気は見られません。例えば、窓は曇っておらず、宇宙船周辺の他の涼しい場所もすべて完全に乾いている
Sta
Okay, Jack. D
Sì. Va bene, allora. Ieri sera alla base aerea di Walker sono morti cinque membri dell'equipaggio quando un KC-135 si è schiantato in fase di atterraggio. La maggior parte delle al
चार्ली, हमारे पास सचमुच
Roger. Passa parola a Jim che, per questi segnali che stanno p
海角
了解です。あと2ステップです。ステップ6、高利得アンテナをこのモードで2秒間オンにしてください。この2秒間はOMNIモードに切り替えず、音声とデータのモード設定を維持して
Roger. Le système de rétro-éjection automatique est désactivé; le fusible de rétro-éjection d'urge
Роджер. Жду ответа. Клапан системы REPRESS т
Хорошо. У нас есть это в
D'accord. Alor
Роджер. Хо
Rog
Мы ведь не тратим много време
Oui, nous le sommes. Mais pas autant qu'il y a 
Jim. Quelli non sono angoli. Sono solo a
Nur zur Information: In Register 1 wird 3,0 ang
Okay, Fred. It's just beginning to cut off at th
हाँ, 
Eine andere Sache, die sich vielleicht jemand ansehen sollte – ich möchte die Kollegen oben nicht belästigen – ist der Ablaufschlauch
로저, 인수 관련해서요. RKV 시간은 약 20분 정도 걸릴
프레드, 소고기 씹느라 너무 바쁘지 않을 때, 이산화탄소 수치가 어떻
Sono d'accordo. Quello che farò è portare il rollio a zero e cer
收到。明白了
没错。我根本没法用这个降落伞。好了，我已经把那该死的面罩软管拆
Roger. Die Fangverriegelung befindet sich in der Sonde oder ist im Fangtric
Le lacet est actuellement à environ 0° 
好的。杰克，关于水
- - دفت
Хорошо. Похоже, длина тени от этого облака примерно равна шири
अपोलो 11 
Hey Joe. Jim berichtet, dass es im Tunnelbereich einen leichten, du weißt s
I did a star check, and it passes. It puts that star right in the telescop
Хорошо, Хьюстон, что касается 's: CDR — 0,07, CMP — 0,64, 
रॉजर। आज खिड़की से दुनिया का नज़ारा दिख रहा है और एक दूरबीन से इसे देखना वाकई अद्भुत है। काश मैं इसे ठीक से बयान कर पाता। मौसम बहुत सुहावना है। दक्षिण अमेरिका नज़र आने लगा है। मुझे क्षितिज के ऊपरी हिस्से में एक बिंदु दिखाई दे रहा है जो लगभग सिएटल, वाशिंगटन के पास होगा, और वहाँ से मैं टिएरा डेल फ़्यूगो के दक्षिणी छोर और महाद
알겠습
حسنًا، NOUN 01، ثم اضغط إدخال؛ 3011، ثم اضغط إدخال؛ 44، ثم اضغط إدخال. هذه هي طريقة توسيع نطاق 
Canar
Fred is now looking through our optical device. It's an instrument in which to aline our platform, and Fred is now looking into it just to see what kind of an outside picture he might be able to get. We might be able to use a TV camera to look through our optical instrument to the outside of the command module. A few minutes ago while we first came in, we did manage to look to the outside of the side hatch of the command module through our optical 
分かりました。一つ提案があります。ジムに望
حسنًا. وعلى أي حال، لم نحصل على تقرير طبي صالح لقياس درجة الحرارة عن طريق الفم، لذا سن
Роджер. Здесь, н
ठीक है। मैं पाँचवीं पंक्ति से असहमत हूँ। ऐसा लगता है कि हमें ASCENT ECA CONTROL को
Tr-10 вернулся в норму. Я уже делал это раньше. Хорошо, мы получили – получили давление в скафандре. Давайте еще раз посмотрим на инверторы. 250 — это 141 (градус), 150 — около 107 (градусов). Ну, этого достаточно. В режиме ожидания... 7. Почти как окружающая среда. Даже немного отр
रूबी ग्राहम, ह्यूस्टन में एक ज्योतिषी हैं। अब हम मिशन के लिए सभी संकेतों की जानक
프랭크, 저희도 그 문제를 해결하려고 노력하고 있습니다. 바깥쪽으로 방사형으로 얼마나 뻗어 나갈지
Je passe le niveau 182 en mode ine
휴스턴, 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 연소 상태 보고서를 확인하고자 합니다. VG
यह सुनिश्चित करें कि बिल सोने से पहल
네. 책 내용을 대부분 검토했고, 재진입 구역에 들어가기 전에 보일러를 점검할 수 있는 방법을 제안해 드려야겠습니다. 마지막으로 추가된 수정 사항들, 그러니까 펜으로 적어 넣은 부분들을 모두 검토했는데, 다 괜찮아 보입니다. E-7 페이
好的。第五步，将高增益天线的俯仰角
D'accord. Ce
रॉजर, 11. आपके लिए दो पैड हैं, 30 और फिर 31. 30 SPS/G&N: 36691, माइनस 061, प्लस 066 135 23 4156. संज्ञा 81: 32 - सुधार, प्लस 32011, प्लस 06818, माइनस 02650 181 054 014. अपोजी 
停
Bene. Abbiamo esaminato le procedure di malfunzionamento e il n
わかりました、アポロ8号です。この7900フィート/秒が誤解のないように確認しておきたいのですが、これはフィート当たりの高速回避策とは関係あ
حسنًا، لم يكن لدينا متسع من الوقت يا هيوستن لنحدثكم عن المناظر التي رأيناها من النافذة أثناء استعدادنا للإقلاع؛ ولكن حتى ذلك الحين، كان بإمكاننا رؤية الجزء الشمالي بأكم
Роджер. Мы ст
Roger. Danach habe ich es noch einmal versucht. BAT 2, HI VOLT, AU
D'accord. Au fait, le LPD sur la Lune était nul, il est donc en train de redescendre. Le point où nous so
좋습니다. 4번째 줄에서 히터 4개(시스템 A와 B)의 첫 번째 회로 차단기 4개를 모두 열겠습니다. 자동 전환 스위치는 닫고, VHF A 수신기와 커맨더 오디오 스위치는 엽니다. 그리고 대기 스위치는 닫습니다.
了解、2：SPS/G&N：38320、プラス166、マイナス081 080 11 3603、マイナス01408、マイナス全球、マイナス00743、全ゼロ、196 359 00657、プラス00537、01
With this
This will be a piece of stew out of a deep sleep. Okay, stand 
알겠습니다. 025:00, 5119,
Alright. Mode 1, 5 hours,
罗杰，友谊七号。
コンフォートコントロールバルブスーツの設定は何
네, 아시다시피 조종 모드는 드리프트 모드로 설정되어 있습니다. 선택된 모드는 일반, 자동, 자이로스코프는 비활성화된 상태입니다. 재진입 자세를 선택했고요. 물론 플라이바이와이어 저고도 모드
حسنًا. الخطوة 7. لوحة قاطع الدائرة 11، ناقل التيار المتردد B، شاشة 
Ich muss ein paar Kleinigkeiten kla
D'accord. La proposition qui me semble la plus plausible est la suivante: si on laisse Jim effectuer son évaluation au télescope, vous procédez exactement de la même manière, sauf que vous pivotez de 180 degrés pour avoi
Roger. Voilà: 5, / 45701, moins 043, plus 116, plus 31171, moins 00767, moins 00214 180 017 001, NA, plus 00188 31181 259 31003 40 2711 398 033, bas 043, gauche 23, plus 0832, moins 16500, plus 12956 36208. Les étoiles de réglage sont les mêmes; ullage - nous aimerions - 
जिम, हमें लगता है कि आपकी बैटरी ठीक है, दरअसल यह सेंसर की समस्या है; इसलिए, आपसे अनुरोध है कि पैनल 16 पर लगे सर्किट ब्रेकर पर क्रॉस टाई बैलेंस लोड को 
아마 110
わかりました、ジャック。これを読んで、いくつかコメントを加えて、少し話し合いましょう。これは の後、いつか行う予定です。49時間後の再配置後、時間が許せば、クルーに にいる間に、彗星を写真撮影できるロール角があるかどうか調査してもらいます。もしあれば、 で再開する前に、写真撮影に最適なロール角を記録してください。クルーが で作業を終えたら、惑星オプションを使用して、ベネット彗星を で追跡するための以下の半単位ベクトルを使用
जेम्स, अगर तुम इससे बेहतर तरीके से अंतरिक्ष यान की देखभाल नहीं कर सकते, तो हम तुम्हें दूसरा अंतरिक्ष यान 
Prima di buttarlo v
로저, 오로라 세븐입니다. 제어 모드 매뉴얼을 복사했습니다. 자이로 케이지, 연료 45-42%, 산소 79-100%입니다. 그리고 마지막 부분
Roger, Fred-o. Buona lettura. Ora, sulla Terra, stimiamo che, se dovessi fare questo allineamento, la Terra sarà inclinata di circa 2 gradi. E sarà illuminata per circa tre quarti. Ora, per segnare sulla Terra, vorremmo che prendessi una linea 
Бож
D'accord. Les disjoncteurs CROSS TIE BALANCE LOAD sont installés, Vance. Vous voulez maintenant que nous remettions la batterie 2 en plac
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We see your middle gimbal
هذا صحيح. لا حاجة للت
Roger, understand. I have all that down. Could you give us a blood 
わかりました、マイク。信号調整器から黄色のコネクタを外して、問題が
А в правой части экрана мы видим объекты Messier Al
Сейчас я смотрю на звезды. Не так уж и темно, но и светло. Кажется, что окно создает своего рода фильтр, который отсекает звезды меньшей величины. Сейчас я смотрю на Большую Медведицу и дальше до Арктура... и мне кажется, что сейчас я вижу в основном звезды второго и третьего порядка. Маленькие звезды пока что практически не видны. Думаю, с наступлением ночи их станет больше, но определенно, в ясную ночь на высоте 40 000 футов в самолете не увидишь столько звезд, сколько видишь, летя на высоте 40 
Роджер. С земли все системы выглядят
Noch eine
Houston, questa è una piccola dimostrazione per i bambini a casa, per tutti i bambini del mondo, se è per questo. Volevo mostrarvi come si beve l'acqua da un cucchiaio, ma temo di averlo riempito
안녕하세요, 아폴로 8호입니다. 디크입니다. 관제센터의 모든 사람들과 전 세계 모든 사람들을 대표하여 여러분 모두에게 즐거운 크리스마스를 기원합니다. 이보다 더 좋은 크리스마스 선물은 상상도 못 했을 겁니다. 오늘 밤 푹 주무시고 내일 크리스마스
好的。是什么事
ठीक है, मैं आपको
わかりました。これが私たちがあなたにお願いしたい設定です。そして、私たちが考えていることは次のとおりです。タンク 1 を自動、タンク 2 をオフにしたところ、ヒーター サイクルでタンク 1 の圧力が約 233 psi であることがわかりました。これは注意と警告の限度をはるかに上回っています。スリープ時にその設
11, hier spricht Houston. Ich bin bereit mit den 1- und 4-PAD
いや、まだ
ロジャー、マイク。データについていくつかコメントしたいと思います。自動操作は非常に正確でした。操作中に恒星の真下に位置する点を捉えたようです。自動光学系がカノープスをあるべき位置にまっすぐに導きました。最小インパルス制御は宣伝通り機能しました。私が観測を開始した高度では、はっきりとした霞の帯状の線がありました。フィルターによって地球はオレンジ色のような輝きを放っています。星の位置は非常に曖昧ですが、霞を通して地平線と思われる場所に、大気があると予想される場所に実線が見えるようです。MITで行った手順に従い、霞の層の上に
Apollo 8, Houston.
ऐसा लग रहा है कि मैं अभी-अभी मार्शल द्वीप समूह के कुछ हिस्सों के ऊपर से गुजरा हूँ। आसमान एकदम साफ था और द्वीपों के आसपास के एटोल और अन
참고로, 송신을
Une fois l
Роджер. Хорошо. Мы ошиблись в нашем — в нашем резервном комплекте. Они были не на своих местах. Похоже, бортовые данные верны. Мы просто хотели, чтоб
ह्यूस्टन, 
Я полност
电压 39.4
Roger, Neil. Wir beobachten bei dem passiven seismischen Experiment einen etwas höheren Temperaturanstieg als üblich und würden gerne die Position des Sensors überprüfen. Er befindet sich etwa 40 Fuß von der 11-Uhr-
Roger. You're five by now,
रॉजर, नील। शुरुआत करते हैं: अपोलो 11 मिशन पर बधाई संदेशों का सिलसिला पूरे दिन लगातार व्हाइट हाउस में विश्व नेताओं की ओर से आता रहा है। इनमें ग्रेट ब्रिटेन के प्रधानमंत्री हेरोल्ड विल्सन और बेल्जियम के राजा के टेलीग्राम भी शामिल हैं। विश्व के प्रेस में अपोलो 11 की खबरों का बोलबाला रहा है। कुछ पत्रकारों का अनुमान है कि आज देश भर के अखबारों में छपी खबरों में से 60 प्रतिशत से अधिक खबरें आपके मिशन से संबंधित थीं। न्यूयॉर्क टाइम्स, जिसकी आज की प्रति की इतनी मांग रही (हालांकि इसकी 950,000 प्रतियां ही छपीं), ने कहा कि वह गुरुवार को इसे एक स्मृति संस्करण के रूप में पुनः प्रकाशित करेगा। और प्रधानमंत्री एलेक्सी कोसिन ने रूस दौरे पर आए पूर्व उपराष्ट्रपति हम्फ्री के माध्यम से आपको और राष्
And, Columbia,
ジェミニ4、ハワイCAP C
حسنًا. ننتقل إلى الخطوة الأولى؛ الاختبار الأول: انتظر 5 ثوانٍ. ها هي 5 ثوانٍ. الوضع التلقائي. حسنًا، جميع أضواء المؤشرات مطفأة؛ النطاق صفر، صفر. الآ
짐, G&N 사령선을 발진시키는 절차에 대한 전반적인 내용을 설명해 드리겠습니다. 현재 제안된 절차인데, 더 나은 방법이 나올 수도 있지만 지금은 이대로 진행하려고 합니다. 먼저, 중간 단계에서 했던 것처럼 지구를 조준합니다. 그런 다음 ACS에서 400+5를 적용하여 궤도를 000으로 맞춥니다. 그 후, 달을 향해 광학계를 조준할 수 있도록 궤도 자세를 설정합니다. 별이 보인다면 별도 활용할 수 있습니다. 그런 다음, 플랫폼을 회
لا، ليس حقاً. أكبر حجماً، لكن لا يزال أ
Sigma Seven this is Cape Cap Com.
ブースターが私たちから離れた時、ロール ノズルから燃料が噴き出すのが見えました。ブースターが回転するにつれ、宇宙船の主軸からブースター
Okay. Und ich werde mich melden, sobald du über 50 Grad Gierwinkel kommst, also werde ich diesen Wert wohl ziemlich genau im Auge behalten. Wir würden gerne das BIOMED auf die rechte Seite umste
わかりました。始めましょう。127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 deg/sec 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-BRAVO: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-BRAVO: 93. 1+58 14 45 02. 11+04. 62-BRAVO: 85. 1+47. 16 18 08. 10+29. 63-BRAVO: 82. 1+44. 17 48 43. 10+07. 
Ge
好的。你的声音很清晰，我的
スーツを着るのはちょっと気が進まな
好
罗杰。鹰，我们这里得到了一些很棒的数据。我们——那些系统工程师们正在查看。一会儿我们会告诉你一切进展
지금 점프하
好的。在 276 号面板
目前为止控制效果极佳。非常好，到目前为止控制方面没有任何问
10，/: 45597，减 040，加 157，加 35186，减 0
알겠습니다. 전원을 끄겠습
Negative. We've alread
好的，机动平台，目的：飞掠，/G&N；63385；正负0.97；正负0.23；正负0212.7，负负0141.7，负负0254.8；148，316，050；NA，正负0022.5；0360.9，0:53，0356.3；33，352.7，15.0；NA，NA，NA。起始纬度为-23.26，-165.00；1147.7，36172；166:54:02。备注
Quattro du
Roger
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, ici Kano Com Tech, transmission sur
ठीक है। हम यहाँ अपने डेटा का विश्लेषण करेंगे और आपक
11号，这里是休斯顿。我们现在能清楚地看到巴斯光年了，
아폴로 8호
Apollo 8, Houston. Wi
对于S-5任务，飞越美国上空时将使用第32版
네, 휴스턴, 아쿠아리우스. 여기서 마치겠습니다
Houston, Colombie. Je le répète: je ne les ai pas vus. L’optique automatique pointait vers un endroit très proche des coordonnées que vous m’avez données. J’ai
로저. 여전히 g.e.t.에서 1초 느리다고 표
Roger. Verstanden. Wir konnten nicht erkennen, ob es ein Klimmzug oder ein Liegestütz 
हमने लगभग 2 psi तक फॉरवर्ड डंप वाल्व का उपयोग किया, और अब हम ओवरहेड वाल्व का उपयो
Oui, je vois. Ron allait me donner un PAD et le plan de vol indique: « Des deux itiné
わかりました。次の1、2、3も同じです。TAPE RECORDER FORWARDを中央に、TAPE MOTIO
حسنًا. لديّ قطعة مقطوعة هنا، وسنقوم بتمزيقها طوليًا... وسأقوم باللف حول هذا النت
STE
Только не 
Roger.
OK. Nous enregistrons le fonctionnement de votre pompe. GET B 03:19; Delta-V, 0,8; votre temps de combustion, zéro plus 01; le lacet et le tangage sont à zéro; Noyau 25, 00008; les noyaux 26 et 27 sont à zér
Хорошо. Мне гораздо про
It's ok, you know musicians; now they're here, now they're there,
…まるで黄道光みたいですね。どんどん遠くまで伸びていきます。これについ
ヒューストンのアソシエイテッド社ハリー・ローゼンタールによる特集記事です。2歳のジェフリー・ラベルくんのクリスマスイブを、2人のサンタが明るく彩ります。1人目は玄関をノックしてプレゼントを持ってきました。2人目は月からお父さんを家まで送り届けました。1人目は赤い服と白いひげを生やし、「ホー、ホー」と叫び、その声は街の向こうまで聞こえました。2人目は月の裏で巨大なエンジンが炎を吐き出し、何千人もの人々がエンジン始動の知らせを待ちわびていました。「サンタクロースがいます」。エンジンがクリティカル噴射を完了してから15分後、無線沈黙から目覚めたアポロ8号から最初に届いた言葉は、不安な世界に告げるものでした。「これ以上のクリスマスプレゼントは期待していません」とミッションコントロールのケン・マッティングリーは語りました。「地上の皆様に感謝します。皆さんがいなければ、私たちは成し遂げられませんでした」と、宇宙船の船長フランク・ボーマン大佐は返事をしました。ちょうどその時、ミッションコントロールのコンソールの前にクリスマスツリーが灯り、ハリソン・シュミット宇宙飛行士が乗組員たちに「聖ニコラスの訪問」の宇宙版を読み上げました。「クリスマス前夜、はるか宇宙の彼方で、アポロ8号の乗組員が月面レースに勝利したばかりでした」と始まります。ミッションコントロールの乗組員は、ジェフリーの父親である海軍大佐ジェームズ・ラヴェル、空軍少佐ウィリアム・A・アンダース、そしてボーマン大佐が無事に帰還するまで、祝賀会を延期していました。例年のクリスマスイブであれば、宇宙飛行士の家族は教会でクリスマス礼拝に出席していたでしょうが、今年は皆テレビに釘付けでした。有人宇宙船センター周辺の家々は皆、飾り付けで飾られて
알겠습니다. "AUTO SELECT, 16, OFF"를 삭제하세요. "CB LOGIC POWER"를 "LOGIC THRUST POWER - CBS CS LOGIC THRUST, four, to closed"로 변경하세요. "DELTA-V CG"를 삭제하고, 아래쪽에 있는 "SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER, one, AC 1; POWER, 1, to ON"을 삭제하세요. 여기서 숫자 1이 중요합
Di sicuro rimane 
Tranquility Base, hier ist Houston. 
Roger, 11. Unter Spalte A auf Seite F2-20, Zeile 5, lautet der neue Wert 01042; Zeile 7 lautet der neue Wert 00256. Weiter zu Zeile 11: 00070; Zeile 12: 00042; Zeile 13: 77730. In Spalte Bravo sollten die leeren Zeilen 3, 4 und 5 jeweils Nullen enthalten: Zeile 3: 20017; Zeile 5
सिग्मा से
- - okay, DELTA-V THRUST A, NORMAL; stand by for a malfu
是的，我完
C'est exact. Vous entrerez les orientations obtenues à partir de l'un des supports, ce qui correspondra aux angles d'alignement gros
Okay, Jack. 226 is configured just like it shoul
Apollo 8, H
Roger. Credo di aver capito tutto abbasta
Я предлагаю вам звонить
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Сейчас у нас 
查理，我们正在寻找的是从 T2 开始计数的时间等于 60 分钟，或者从 T3 开始计数的时间等于 T3 的
I lost you when you said
Hier in Houston trafen sich gestern deine drei Frauen mit ihren Kindern zum Mitta
지금 가고 
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。了解です。音声ははっ
休
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven,
… un peu d’eau ici. M
Compte tenu d
Roger. Wir planen eine Müllkippe über Texas. Bitte seien Sie vorber
Okay. There's - on the right side of the screen at the present time, there's a triple crater with - with a small crater between the first and second; and
캡슐이 꽤 양
Okay. We got no problem. Go ahead and use your D-9. Now, on the Apollo Landmark no. 2, we would 19. And the landmark will be 16 miles north of track, and you should be pitched down about minus 30° at that time. And we would like for you to track this as close as possible and to get 
11番、ヒューストン。本当に素晴らしい眺めですね。バズ、戻ってきましたね。窓
Votre signal est également en 
Ti ho capito forte e chiaro, Jim. Per quanto riguarda le tue attitudini per l'EVA, procedi con le stesse che avevi pianif
D'accord, conti
नील और बज़, मैं आपसे व्हाइट हाउस के ओवल रूम से टेलीफोन पर बात कर रहा हूँ, और यह निस्संदेह अब तक की सबसे ऐतिहासिक टेलीफोन कॉल है। मैं आपको शब्दों में बयां नहीं कर सकता कि हम सभी को आप पर कितना गर्व है कि आपने हर अमेरिकी के लिए क्या किया है। यह हमारे जीवन का सबसे गौरवपूर्ण दिन है। और मुझे यकीन है कि दुनिया भर के लोग भी अमेरिकियों के साथ इस बात को मानते हैं कि यह कितना बड़ा कारनामा है। आपके इस कार्य के कारण ही स्वर्ग मनुष्य के संसार का हिस्सा बन गया है। और जब आप शांति सागर से हमसे बात कर रहे हैं, तो यह हमें पृथ्वी पर शांति और स्थिरता लाने के अपने प्
Ok, mi d
Vous dites vous être réveillé i
罗杰。我的RCS加热器一直断断续续
هيا يا هيوستن، يا كولومبي
روجر، فهمت. قلتَ 30.5 بالمئة. هل 
了解です。「VHF/Sバンドの起動とチェックアウト」の手順
好的。我再拍一张清晰的照片
Do that 
Je suppose qu'ils sont... en passe
Okay. Wir haben kein Wasser mehr im Tr
제미니 VI호입니다
D'accord. D'accord, à environ 156:50 sur la moitié droite de la page, il y a une ligne qui indique « Cible visuelle 16, sud, 11, Gassendi, f:15 ». Veuillez rayer cette lig
よし、ウォーリー。キャビンのドームとキャビンの温度を教
Roger, Sigma Seven, qui Canary Cap Com, vi ricevo forte e chiaro. Vorremmo avere qualche misurazione della temperatura. Tuta da cabina, cupola da cabina e cupola d
No. I see the reflection from the
J'ai com
Okay. A couple of items I want to check up I'
How's that circuit breaker set-up 
Esatto. Niente paura. John Aaron sta solo dicendo che potrebbero essere molto richiesti. Sta controllan
Сейчас в центре экрана находится кратер Уэбба. Мы смотрим на него прямо сверху примерно за 6 минут до начала спуска. У него относительно плоское дно, и вы можете увидеть, возможно, два или три кратера на его дне на западной стене, той стене, которая сейчас ближе всего к камере. В нижней части экрана мы видим небольшой кратер, расположенный чуть дальше от камеры. А затем, вернувшись к нижней части экрана и влево, вы можете увидеть ряд углублений. Именно такие соединенные кратеры вызывают у нас наибольший интерес, и нам интересно выяснить,
كولومبيا، هذا هيوستن. على خريطتك LAM 2، نود التأكد من المنطقة ال
카나리아 여러분,
네, 롤아웃을 하려고 했어요. 롤을 0으로 맞추는 거죠. 그냥 0
你现在声音清晰响亮了
Роджер. Обычно это делается автоматически, Джим; и если бы вы выполнили все точно по расписанию, 
收到。这种测距序列是我们在语音备份模式下会遇到的现象；在这种模式下，
Wir würden uns freuen. Auf all unseren Monitoren hier ist es zi
저 사람이 찰리
11, Houston. C'est assez difficile de décrire cette vue. Elle est
立ち上がるときには、電源
Moment, Fred. Wir möchten die Position des Einstellungsreglers, also des Modusreglers, so ändern, dass er knapp 
अब मैं अंधकार से उबर चुका हूँ। अभी तक चंद्रोदय नहीं हुआ है और हालाँकि मुझे अभी भी हमारे पीछे डूबते सूरज से प्रकाशित क्षेत्र दि
D'accord, Jim. Nous avons quatre étapes à vous indiquer p
मुझे भी नहीं पता
Ja, mach ruhig ein Foto. Aber bit
ठीक है। मेरे पाँच सुझाव हैं। पहला, फ्लाईबाई पैंतरेबाज़ी के निष्पादन को मानकर चलें; दूसरा, फ्लाईबाई के लिए इस्तेमाल की गई संरेखण रेखा का ही उपयोग करें; तीस
シグマ・セブン、シグマ・セブン、こちらウ
Roger, je reviens avec un rapport sur le pilote. Son dernier repas était le deuxième j
Джек, они пока не хотят называть 
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। अगर आपको मौका मिले, तो कृपया हमें अपने ट्रनियन कैलिब्रेशन नंबर बता द
और अब हम कोलंबो और गुटेनबर्ग क्रेटर्स के पास पहुँच रहे हैं। बहुत अच्छी तरह से दिखाई दे रहे हैं। हम लंबी समानांतर दरारें या ग्रैबेन देख सकते हैं, जो मारे की मिट्टी से होते हुए सी
Okay. Vance, se ci sono Bu
Okay, 13. Wir würden Sie bitten, uns die Messwerte des Systemtests für die Brennstoffze
你是否关闭了
Хорошо, Джек, и вот в какой странной ситуации мы сейчас находимся: люк установлен, зонд и тормозной конус всё ещё находятся внутри командного модуля, и мы будем оставаться в этом положении, пока ты не дашь нам р
كولومبيا، هيوستن. لديكما فرصة ل
ह्यूस्टन स्थित एसोसिएटेड न्यूज़ एजेंसी के हैरी रोसेन्थल की एक रिपोर्ट यहाँ प्रस्तुत है। दो सांता क्लॉज़ ने 2 वर्षीय जेफ़री लवेल के लिए क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या को रोशन कर दिया। पहले सांता ने उसके घर का दरवाज़ा खटखटाया और उपहार लाए। दूसरे सांता ने उसके पापा को चाँद से घर भेजा। पहले सांता ने लाल सूट और सफ़ेद दाढ़ी पहनी थी और इतनी ज़ोर से 'हो-हो' की आवाज़ निकाली कि पूरे मोहल्ले में सुनाई दी। दूसरा सांता एक विशाल इंजन था जो चाँद के पीछे से आग उगल रहा था, और हज़ारों लोग इसके चालू होने की खबर का इंतज़ार कर रहे थे। "कृपया सूचित किया जाए कि सांता क्लॉज़ आ गए हैं," अपोलो 8 के पहले शब्द थे जब उसने रेडियो साइलेंस से बाहर आकर 15 मिनट बाद उत्सुक दुनिया को सूचित किया कि इंजन ने अपना महत्वपूर्ण बर्न पूरा कर लिया है। मिशन कंट्रोल के केन मैटिंगली ने कहा, "हममें से किसी ने भी इससे बेहतर क्रिसमस उपहार की उम्मीद नहीं की थी।" अंतरिक्ष यान के कमांडर कर्नल फ्रैंक बोरमैन ने जवाब दिया, "ज़मीन पर मौजूद सभी लोगों को हमारी ओर से धन्यवाद दें। आप जानते हैं कि हम आपके बिना यह नहीं कर सकते थे।" इसी समय, मिशन कंट्रोल के कंसोल के सामने एक क्रिसमस ट्री जगमगा उठा, और अंतरिक्ष यात्री हैरिसन श्मिट ने दल को "संत निकोलस की यात्रा" का अंतरिक्ष संस्करण पढ़कर सुनाया। "क्रिसमस की रात से ठीक पहले, अंतरिक्ष में, अपोलो 8 के दल ने चंद्रमा की दौड़ जीत ली थी," यह शुरू हुआ। मिशन कंट्रोल दल ने उत्सव को तब तक के लिए स्थगित कर दिया था जब तक कि जेफरी के पिता, नौसेना कप्तान जेम्स लवेल, वायु सेना के मेजर विलियम ए. एंडर्स और कर्नल बोरमैन सुरक्षित रूप से घर नहीं लौट आए। किसी भी अन्य क्रिसमस की पूर्व संध्या पर, अंतरिक्ष यात्रियों के परिवार क्रिसमस की प्रार्थना के लिए चर्च में होते, लेकिन इस साल वे सभी अपने टेलीविजन सेटों से चिपके हुए थे। मानवयुक्त अंतरिक्ष यान केंद्र के पास के सभी घर सजाए गए थे। लवेल के घर के आसपास और उनके टिम्बर कोव समुदाय में लॉन मैक्सिकन शैली के ल्यूमिनारियो से सजे हुए थे, और चारों लवेल 30. वे 00, एक कार आई जिसमें एक लंबा सांता क्लॉस अपनी पीठ पर एक बड़ा बोरा लिए बैठा था। वह दरवाजे तक आया और जोर से दस्तक दी। दरवाजा खुला और सामने जेफरी लवेल खड़ा था, जो 14 जनवरी को 3 साल का हो जाएगा। उसे देखकर जेफरी सहम गया। उसकी माँ ने उसे गोद में उठा लिया और जेफरी उनसे लिपट गया, फिर भी शरमाता रहा। उसकी 15 साल की बहन बारबरा ने कहा, "पिछले साल तो वह रोते हुए भाग गया था।" इससे पहले, उसे सारे लैंप बुझाने से रोकने के लिए उसके पीछे भागना पड़
鹰，这里是哥伦比亚。休
제미니 4, RKV 외과
Ro
ठीक है। प्लस 1197 माइनस 16500 12681 35608, उत्तर दिशा संरेखित करें, तारे सेट करें, रोल 068
Okay. Vuoi che il guadagno elevato sia garantito e vuoi l'OMNI su OMNI C
Хорошо. Пропуст
जी हाँ, चलिए - हम इसका जवाब कल त
わかりました。もし軌道情報を得る前にこの時間枠内でSHeタンクが破裂したら、軌道情報が多少遅れることになり
Okay, Apollo 8. It's a little bit early to give you any real numbers on your COMM performance. Looks like it's working as good as predicted, and everything else seems to be 
我们还需要一些项目，请在最终装载前尽可能晚些完成读数。我们还没有关于上次机组人员睡眠时
罗杰。请注
А далее, на странице 3
Aquarius, Houston, j'ai des données supplémentaires concernant le bloc-notes que je viens de consulter. Il y a cinq éléments. Prévenez-
我没
休斯顿，
ヒューストン、アポロ8号。5フィート先
م
Roger, Jim. C'est la manœuvre de milieu de parcours numéro 5, et c'est un /, et c'est 31700, non applicable, n
休斯顿
真ん中
我给你买个
ああ、あの光学系には本当にがっかりした。あの望遠鏡はひどい。練習か慣れか、あるいは何か他のことをすれば良く
네. 짐이 거기까지 뛰
데드밴드, 최소. ATT 제어에서 모드 제
11日、ヒューストンです。CDR、ちょっとお知らせがあります。私たちみんな、ここでの仕事から束
了解、ジェミニ4号。地上では順調ですね。バッテリーの状態を
No, stiamo bene. Mi
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Veuillez effectuer une acquisition sur l'antenne à gain élev
हमारे पास आपके लिए कुछ
그랬
ジムさん、今の細かいアラインメントをそのまま使って、（）は無視
それはあなたのMGス
ロジャー。ドアを開けると、そこに待っていて、電
Jim, Houston. Deine Kommunikation war ziemlich gestört, gera
Je suis d'accord. Je pense que pour la rentrée atmosphérique, nous n'avons pas besoin d'une plateforme d'une précision absolue, mais je ne l'ai pas dit à J
Okay. Und Ihre Tonhöhenangabe – ich war mir nicht sicher, ob Sie 245 oder 045 vorgel
Okay, Fred. Only - Only a minor point that we just picked up. At the very top, minus 6 hours, the title is
Neil, hier spricht Houston. Ich habe dich deutlich verstanden und 
Хорошо. Три к РЕЖИ
はい、そうだったに違いありません。私のオン
잘 자, 브루스. 정말 
好的。开始。127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 度/秒 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-BRAVO: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-BRAVO: 93. 1+58
Wir werden versuchen, das Fernsehen zu einem späteren Zeitpunkt einzuschalten, wenn wir uns nicht gerade auf einen B
Ho selezionato il co
AP通信によると、アメリカではイタリアで教皇パ
Oh! Did you see that flash? Huh? Yes. A very b
Apollo 8, Houston. Sie haben ein GO für einen zwe
Roger. Je vous ai enfin reçu. J'ai entré les angles pour la bande S, mais impossible d'éta
Роджер, 
장병 여러분,
Хорошо, спасибо. Что касается вашего вопроса о числе 8750, это число, которое используется в опционе для получения минимальной доходности за определенный период вре
Forse ti interesserà sapere che non credo che notiamo alcuna difficoltà nell'adattarci a un sesto di gravità. Sembra immediatamente naturale muoversi 
क्या आपको वो चढ़ाई मिल गई.
حسنًا يا جيم. لقد كنا نتحدث عن تغيير وضعية المركبة من وضعية الإطلاق لتحسين رؤية مجال النجوم من وحدة القيادة، وما نود منك فعله هو التالي: إذا استطعت التنبؤ الآن أو قريبًا بالوضعية التي ترغب في اتخاذها، ثم اتخاذها الآن، فسنتمكن من حساب زوايا جيمبال ال
Gus, riguardo a questo... cosa c'è nel registratore vocale? Dicono che lo accendevam
Hey, 
Ok. E c'è un'altra cosa di cui non so se sei a conoscenza. Al momento
13、内側から外側へ向かっていることを確認しました。順調そ
जिम, मैंने आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से समझ ली है। ईवीए के लिए आपने जो सेटिंग्स तय की हैं, उन्हीं पर कायम रहें। यानी बीईएफ और 180° का एंग
Х
Si trova sulla Rev 56, longitudine 33° Ovest, al
コピーする準備
11番、こちらはヒューストンです。残り約6分です。地上回線の設定をするため、次の通過
إلا إذا كان الأ
우리가 한번 
燃料
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Мы отключили прямую подачу кислорода, давление в кабине составляет 57, и, что любопытно, когда мы перекрываем клапан прямой подачи кислорода, срабатывает главная сигнализация, точно так же, как это было во время испытаний космического кораб
रॉजर। हम कहते हैं कि हम नकल करने के लिए तैयार हैं
罗杰，休斯顿。哥伦比亚
了解しました。PAD: TIG 102 33 0
我们终于解
ठीक है। मैंने पावर एम्पलीफायर बंद कर दिया है, वॉयस बैकअप कम कर दिया है, पीसीएम को लो बिट रेट पर सेट कर द
맞습니다. 다음
로저. 저희도 동의합
One minute readiness
Der Sonnenuntergang ist wirklich beeindruckend, ich glaube nicht, dass ich viel Zeit damit verschwenden muss, ihn anzusehen. Er ist sehr interessant. Faszinierend ist auch, wie schwarz es ist, wenn sich die Augen nicht daran gewöhnt haben. Ich kann definitiv eine Beschichtung auf dem Fenster erkennen. Ich schalte jetzt wieder auf VOX im UHF-Hi-Modus, um zu senden. Ich öffne das Visier, um das rechte Mikrofon abzuwischen. Ich habe es abgeleckt. Visier zu. Das Visier wurde sofort abgedichtet, damit die Anzugselektronik ihre Arbeit aufnehmen konnte. Ich will damit nicht noch einmal Probleme haben. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hält die Temperatur sehr gut bei etwa 68 Grad. Also wird die Kuppel wieder hochgefahren. Sie steht jetzt bei 76, 75 Grad. Anscheinend ist diese höhere Einstellung die richtige. Ich denke, ich drehe sie jetzt noch eine halbe Markierung hoch, dann haben wir sie vielleicht fixiert. Sie kühlt endlich etwas ab, also weiß ich, in welche Richtung ich die Einstellung ändern muss. Ich habe die Kühlmittelmenge für den Anzug und den Steuerhebel auf 8,5 eingestellt. Die Anzeige in der Kuppel zeigt aktuell 75 Grad an. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hat 68 Grad. Sehr angenehm. Ich spüre die kühle Luft auf meinem Gesicht. Der Sauerstoffgehalt sieht sehr gut aus, 60 und 75 psi. Ich habe den Inverter 250 im Auge behalten. Er nähert sich 140 Grad, während der Contrast 150 auf etwa 100 Grad gesunken ist. Im Standby-Modus liegt die Temperatur bei etwa 100 Grad, was der Kabinentemperatur entspricht. Drittens, der 250er – der macht Probleme, und ich
그리고 이렇게 긴 시간 동안 체크리스트를 읽
حسنًا. عند حوالي 114:10، يجب أن يحتوي كل شيء تحت "ضبط الارتفاع يساوي 6
はい、そ
لقد
لقد استمعنا إليكم، والمشكلة موجودة على أرض الواقع. آمل أن نكون قد حللنا
Und dann fahren Si
Ok, Jack. La linea temporale tra meno 02:30 e 1 ora è davvero affollata, quindi dovr
كولومبيا، هيوستن.
あれはACですね。はい、良いACです。ハッチから外を見ると、何かを排出し
Ricevuto. Esatto. Al passaggio 5, esegui il passaggio 5. In "Attivazione del ciclo primario del glicole", passaggio 1, riga 1, "CB(16): DISPLAY - CHIUDI". Questa è un'opzione per l'equipaggio; puoi averla se vuoi. Ometti il ​​resto dei passaggi 1 e 2. 
وثالث عشر، 
रॉजर। समझ गया। और अब मैं अपन
알겠습니다, 
好的。加90：/G&N，63825，减1.54，加1.32，减0491.7，加0000.1，加6634.0，180，228，001；不适用；加0017.9，6652.2，7:37，6626.5，26，155.4，15.7；射手座ζ星；上升08.0；右2.1；减22.81，减025.00，1140.7，34087，32:1
Okay. Wir möchten Ihnen unseren Plan kurz erläutern. Wir befinden uns derzeit in einer wasserkritischen Situation. Daher möchten wir so wenig Wasser wie möglich verbrauchen. Zu diesem Zweck planen wir, bei 61 Stunden, also in 37 Minuten, ein Freilaufmanöver mit einer Schubgeschwindigkeit von 16 Fuß pro Sekunde durchzuführen. Anschließend werden wir die Schubkraft reduzieren und bei 79 Stunden ein weiteres Abbruchmanöver durchführen, um die verbliebenen Reserven zu verbrauchen. Wir möchten die Schubkraft aber so schnell wie möglich reduzieren. Dies wäre nach der Kursmitte. Was halten Sie von einem Schubmanö
अपोलो 11, ह
ठीक है। हम SPAN टी
واحد
Ici Friendship Seven. J'ai très chaud. Enfin, 
前
알겠습니다. 에드는 낮잠을 한 시간 정도밖에 못 잤어요. 우리도 수면 패턴을 조금 바
よし、ジェミニ4号。血圧は良好だ
Roger. Se preferisci, vorremmo portare lo scarico delle acque reflue al 5% rimanente. Dopo il completamento di questo, il prossimo sc
I sure will. And, let's see, we just wanted to let you know we've got a real good battery charge going here this time. Looks like - it looks just like the ones in the book, and I'd like to get a battery C voltage before you shut down, and a sleep repo
그렇게 된다면 아주
D'accord, F
Indian Cap Com. Überprüfen Sie, ob Sie alle Farben z
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Далее следует 30-минутный отчет: Движения головы не вызывают тошноты или каких-либо неприятных ощущений. Я удивлен, что могу смотреть так близко к солнцу; солнце сейчас светит прямо мне в лицо, и все, что мне нужно сделать, это прикрыть глаза бровью. Все предохранители на левой панели по-прежнему находятся в том же положении, что и ранее. Выбор режима нормальный,
J'utilise le photomètre maintenant… pour essayer d'obtenir une mesure. J'ai vu un… non, c'est le ballon que je vois, dérivant toujours s
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन से। हमें अभी तक आपका एफएम
Такой подход 
스포츠 소식을 살펴볼까요? 여러분이 바쁘셨던 며칠 전, 조 네이머스와 미식축구 커미셔너 피트 로젤은 "브로드웨이 조" 네이머스가 자신이 소유한 배첼러스 III 레스토랑 지분을 매각하고 뉴욕 제츠에 합류하기로 합의했다고 발표했습니다. 네이머스는 오늘 제츠 훈련 캠프에 도착해 첫 훈련을 소화했습니다. 네이머스와 함께 훈련에 불참했던 다른 제츠 선수들도 합류했습니다. 그리고 미시간주 잭슨 출신의 데이비 힐은 지난주에 출
AT
यह 15 47 30 था। क्या यह सही ह
Roger. La série de fissures ou de failles qui la traversent plonge vers le sud en trois paliers environ. Le réseau de failles parallèles au nord présente une dépression centrale. J'espère que vous tous, sur Terre, comprenez ce que nous voulons dire lorsque nous affirmons que l'horizon est plutôt inquiétant, un endroit sombr
स
لا يا جاك. سنضطر إل
فريندشيب سفن، هذا جراح زنجبار. ضغط الدم الانقباضي ١٣٦ بعد التمرين، وهو معدل جيد، وينخفض ​​الآن إلى أقل من ٩٠ للانبساطي. كلا الرسمين البيانيين بجودة ممتازة. تخطيط القلب الكهربائي ممتاز أيضًا. كل شيء على المؤشرات يدل على ح
ああ、それは、おおよその数字はご存じで
Yes. I think if you add up the - Yes - if you add up the operating time, I think the beats the by a considerable margin on this fli
Roger. La batterie adaptatrice 1 a une tension de 24,5 volts et un courant de 7,0 ampères (1A)
Это «Дружба Семь». Солнце, я хочу поставить здесь отметку, когда солнце сядет. Сейча
짐, 오늘 저녁 일찍 프레드가 사령선 1번 창문에서 가스가 새어 나오는 것을 목격했다고 보고했습니다. 또한 약 4인치 정사각형 크기의 은색 금속 조각이 떠다니는 것도 봤다고 했는데, 우리가 확인하려는 것은 이것이 새로운 가스 누출인지 아니면 기존 문제의 잔여 가스 누출인지 여부입니다. 더 하실 말씀이나 의견이 있으신가요? 그리고 프레드가 사진 촬영을 하고 있었는데, 우리는 
わかりまし
아시다시피, 시뮬레이터에서처럼 최소 충격량으로 이 핸드 컨트롤러를 세게 누르면, 툭툭
روجر، أرجو منك استخدام صمام إعادة فحص المقصورة بدلاً من صمام الأكسجين عالي التدفق. كما
Roger. Are you in attitude for your O
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. A 사분면의 온도가 다른 사분면보다 약간 높은 것 같습니다. 앞서 말씀드렸듯이 앞으로 이륙이 불가능한 시간이 길어질 예정입니다. 가능하면 A 사분면을 그늘진 곳에 두시고, 온도가 너무 높아지지 않도
ジャック、1-Aの目盛りは下が0。1-Bの目盛りは3.45。よし。必要
Okay. Wir bereiten uns auf den Schichtwechsel vor, und ich wollte vorher noch ein paar Punkte ansprechen. Die Windgeschwindigkeit beträgt anscheinend maximal 0,3 Fuß pro Sekunde, daher wird es für Mittelkurs 6 keinen Brennvorgang geben. Mittelkurs 7 ist etwas stärker, darüber entscheiden wir später. Das Wetter am Landeplatz ist weiterhin gut, und die Vorhersage lautet auf etwa 2000 Fuß vereinzelt und 12000 Fuß gebrochen, ungefähr die gleichen Werte, die Frank vorhin genannt wurden. Die Sichtweite beträgt etwa 10 Meilen, die Wellenhöhe etwa 4 Fuß. Und ich glaube, es gibt einige vereinzelte Gewitter, weniger als 5 Prozent, vor denen Sie sich in Acht nehmen sollten. Bei 2000 Fuß liegt die Wahrscheinlichkeit für gebrochenen, nicht vereinzelten Regen bei 10 bis 30 Prozent; es sieht
Это дей
Houston, la Base Tranquillité va vous donner quelques précisions concernant la question géologique d'hier soir. Nous avons atterri dans un champ de cratères relativement lisse, composé de cratères secondaires allongés et circulaires, dont la plupart présentent des rebords, quelle que soit leur taille. Ce n'est toutefois pas toujours le cas. Quelques petits cratères alentour n'ont pas de rebord visible. Le sol de toute la zone est composé de sable très fin, voire de limon. Sur Terre, on pourrait le comparer à de la poudre de graphite. Dans ce sol se trouvent une grande variété de roches de formes, de tailles et de textures diverses, arrondies ou anguleuses, et de consistances variées. Comme je l'ai dit, j'ai vu ce qui semblait être du basalte pur et du basalte vésiculaire. D'autres roches étaient dépourvues de cristaux, certaines présentaient de petits phénocristaux blancs, parfois moins de 5 %. Et le rocher… Nous sommes dans 
संकट सागर के ठीक पश्चिम में स्थित इस क्षेत्र को नींद का दलदल कहा जाता है और उसके पश्चिम में स्थित क्षेत्र
11번, 휴스턴. 이제 아주 좋은 사
Oui, nous
E sembra che potremmo sostenere un allineamento tra qu
Yes. I don't know what the problem was there. It just started oscillating around in yaw. According to
좋아요. 데이터는 괜찮아
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Жду
И Джек, и Фред собираются спать. Это довольно з
짐에게 이
1 - 2 - 3 - 4 - 5 - 4 - 3 - 2 - 
收到
रॉजर। मैं समझता हूँ, लेकिन जब हम एटीट्यूड पर पहुँच जाएँगे, तो हम एलाइन बॉल पाने के लिए 400 प्लस 5 करेंगे, और फिर हम 400 प्लस
Okay, Jack. Du erinnerst dich sicher, dass alle in der Vergangenheit berichtet haben, den Monduntergang nur wenige Minuten vor dem Eintreffen gesehen zu haben. Dein Horizont wird wahrscheinlich dunkel sein, wenn du dort ankommst; du landest früh morgens; und wenn du von Westen kommst, wirst du noch auf einen dunklen Horizont blicken. Als zusätzliche Methode, ähnlich wie beim Verfolgen des Horizonts, geben wir dir eine Ausrichtung auf der Landeplattform, sodass du direkt auf den Mond schauen kannst. Dies ist eine Trägheitsausrichtung; sie ändert sich nicht. Du richtest die 36-Grad-Fensterlinie auf den Mond aus und beobachtest ihn dann einfach. Kurz zuvor wird die Erde aufgehen und den Mond bedecken, und du kannst dann den Horizont gut überprüfen. Ich habe einige Zeiten
Eine andere Sache, die sich vielleicht jemand ansehen sollte – ich möchte die Kollegen oben nicht belästigen – ist der Ablaufschlauch, den wir im Kommandomodul haben. I
EMS 上的 DELTA-
Ok. Manovra 
Водолей, вот одна идея по управлению всенаправленными антеннами. Возможно, всем будет проще, если мы отключим шумоподавление в восходящем канале и будем управлять антеннами, переключ
Готов
네
جيم، الخطوة التالية التي نرغب في تنفيذها هي نقل بعض الطاقة إلى وحدة التحكم الرئيسية (MAIN B) حتى نتمكن من بدء شحن البطارية، وأعتقد أنه من الأفضل أن نبدأ بهذا الأمر ع
Forse dovrebbe invertire la ro
D'accord. Et en bas de la page, étape numéro 1. Ce sera à moins 19 minutes, et nous pour
Stand b
Это утвердительно. Такова конфигу
Roger. Ça ne me dérange pas de jouer, car vous avez été très gentils ces cinq derniers jours. Si vous vo
Roger. Okay. L'altra cosa è il post-atterraggio. Noi continuiamo - giusto per ribadire - a non voler rimanere più di un'ora nella navicella. Toglietevi le tute, a vostra discrezione, se la navicella non presenta perdite. La parte del portello aperto è una vostra decisione. Al momento, sembra
実はゲージ自体の問
Привет, мыс. Дружба номер се
Il les a observés, mais ils n'ont pas
Roger. D-8 Experiment, Prüfung Nr. 1. Start bei 57. Prüfung Nr. 2. Start bei 01:30. Punkt 4, Rev 50, aufsteigender Knoten 102° 26. Punkt 5: Falls möglich, S-6-Fotos des tropischen Sturms vor der Westküste. Apollo Landmark lö
Хорошо. А мы сможем и дальше работать с антеннами OMNI, Джек? То есть, я могу оставить S-диапазонную
सूर्य की स्थिति नाक से लगभग 40 डिग्री ऊपर थी। चार श्रृं
Роджер. Что эт
حسناً. انتظر. هل تريد العودة إلى معدل
यॉ एटीट्यूड (इंडिकेटर) को छूने की कोशिश करें। मैंने 270 डिग्री के संकेत पर यॉ एटीट्यूड (इंडिकेटर) को छुआ। 
Это кораб
روجر. نود منك استلام ملف بيانات الرحلة، وقائمة ا
Okay. Very good. Looks to me 
Okay. Wen
いや、そんなにひどいわけではない。余分な荷物は脚の下とかかとの裏に全部収納しているから、そもそもあまり使わないものなので、それほど不便ではないんだけど。でも、カメラやバッグ、ゴミ袋はマジックテープにしっか
Wir sind jetzt bei 180 Grad, und nun sollten wir das stoppen und einen l
J'ai une r
Columbia, Houston. Si cela ne vous convient pas, veuillez n
Sembra una buona i
好的。收到，
好的，杰克。这次飞掠时，地球出现在登月舱窗口的左上角
フレッド、まずは準備から始めましょう。24ページの緊急時対応チェックリストを参考に、まずはそこから始めることをお勧めします。ご意見があればぜひお聞かせください。2点目：噴射姿勢の時、太陽が画面の一番上に見えるはずです。カーソルをゼロに合わせると、カーソルが分割されます。ただし、一つ注意すべき点は、ロールとヨーに非常に敏感なので、簡単に画面から外れてしまうことです。これはデテント2の状態です。噴射は噴射時間と姿勢にほとんど影響されません。つまり、何か問題があれば、必要であれば噴射をずらすことができ、姿勢はそれほど重要ではないということです。つまり、噴射に関する本当のルールは一つしかないということです。つまり、任意の軸の回転速度が毎秒10度に達したら、それが噴射を停止する限界です。次のポイントは、焼き込みが終わってトリミングする前に、アドレス470をしばらく残しておいて、私たちが確認できるようにしてほしいということです。確認できたら声をかけてください。それか
This little tape recorder has been a big benefit - has been a big benefit to us in passing some of our time away on our transit to the Moon, and it'
私たち
この時点で再突入姿勢に移行し、スコープを手動で格納することをお勧めしま
Okay. One of the first things we want to do is charge the battery in, so we can get some power over there to do that, and we have procedures ginned up to do it. In regards to reentry, we're planning our last midcourse at 5 hours before entry interface, and, if we have to make one, that is. And then we'd like to jettison the service module at 4 hours and a half, ro
老兄，你没开玩笑吧
Houston, Apollo 11. Nous avons le continent africain face à nous, et bien sûr, tout rapetisse à mesure que le temps passe. La Méditerranée est parfaitement dégagée. Le soleil semble sur le point de se coucher près de Madagascar. La bande équatoriale africaine se détache nettement. On distingue un vert foncé, presque boueux, comparé aux teintes sableuses de la pointe sud de l'Afrique et, bien sûr, du Sa
A Reno, in Nevada, poiché non c'è un camino in casa, un bambino ha scritto a Babbo Natale sul giornale locale e gli ha suggerito: "Per favore, potresti usare la porta d'ingresso? Dovrai dare un piccolo calcio al fondo perché si appiccica". A Little Rock, in Arkansas, i bambini nati al St. Vincent Infirmary durante la settimana prima di Natale e fino al giorno di Natale vengono consegnati alle loro madri al momento delle dimissioni in enormi calze rosse natalizie. Ecco un esempio di cooperazione ecumenica. A Indio, in California, il capo della polizia è stato 
Ich befinde mich jetzt in der Wiedereintrittsposition. Bereit für den Automatikmodus. Das Fly-by-Wire-System funktioniert einwandfrei, genau wie im Trainer. Sehr positive Ergebnisse mit dem Verfahrenstrainer. Die Zeit vergeht wirklich rasant. Zurück in den Automatikmodus. I
11, Houston. Roger. Your angles are 45 and 255. Do I understand that as s
Roger. C'est exact. Pourriez-vous vérifier que le radar en bande L est bien désactivé, s'il vous plaî
Bene. Alfa è all'81%, Bravo al 75%. A quasi 115 ore, l'ossigeno in discesa è
짐, 이 제어 모드에 대해 생각해 보시고 지금 알고 있는 정보로 효과가 있을지 판단해 주시면 좋겠습니다. 저희는 약간 회의적이지만, 당신의 의견을 들어보고 싶습니다. 자세가 어느 정도 안정되면 모니터를 켜고 최소 임펄스(MINIMUM IMPULSE)로 이동한 다음, 요율(yaw rate)을 오른쪽으로 설정하세요. R3 버튼을 눌러 가운데 짐벌을 모니터링하면서 안정되는지 확인해 보세요. 만약 안정되지 않으면 자세 유지(ATTITUDE 
حسنًا. أولًا، يبدو أنه من المستحيل تجاهل حقيقة أنكم تتصدرون جميع الأخبار هنا على الأرض. حتى صحيفة برافدا الروسية تتصدر عناوينها المهمة وتصف نيل بـ"قيصر السفينة"
Apollo 8. Kehren wir zur Batterie Bravo zurück und beenden wir diese, bevor wir mit A
ジム、いい調子ですね。これらの星について少し説明しましょう。飛行計画書にあるように、33番のアンタレス、34番のアトリア、
好的，杰克。收到。
Okay. Okay. Zunächst einmal gilt grundsätzlich, dass diese Regeln dem Abbruchmodus I mit den strengen Grenzwerten ähneln sollten. Ich gehe sie jetzt einzeln durch, damit Sie sie abschreiben können. Okay. Sie sollten das Triebwerk abschalten, wenn einer der folgenden Fälle eintritt: Schubmonitoranzeige 77 Prozent oder weniger; Treibstofftankdruck – das ist der Einlassdruck – Bordanzeige 160 oder weniger; Kraftstoff-Sauerstoff-Delta-Druck größer als 25 psi – in diesem Fall müssten Sie von der Bodenstation k
로저. 근무 중입니다
Роджер. Теперь я тебя лучше п
Roger, Houston. Potresti ripetere ancora una vo
मैं स्विच कर रहा हूँ - मेरा केबिन ठीक से काम कर रहा है। सूट भी ठीक है। मैं यॉ चेक के लिए नीचे जा रहा हूँ। सुध
मुझे लगता है इसके लिए सैनबोर्न चेक करना पड़ेगा। बीपीएमएस पर काम शुरू होने वाला है। जीन, मैं अब सूट के तापमान से ब
여기는 프렌드십
Tempo trascorso fase terminale 1 più 29 più 1
D'accord. Ce que nous souhaitons tous, c'est que nous n'insistons abs
罗杰，吉姆。布雷克，杰克，我们希望你保持现在的死区设置，等电视节目结束后我们会进行调整。另外，我们希望你检查一下高增益表上的俯仰角和偏航角，以便我们将其与这
أقوم بتفريغ بيروكسيد الهيدروجين. أشغل الصمام. في وضع الاستعداد. ذراع الاستعادة جاهز. في وضع الاستعداد للمظلة الرئيسية. جميع المفاتيح في وضعها الصحيح. الوقود اليدوي يكاد ينفد. ها هي المظلة الرئيسية قد خرجت. إنها - لقد خرجت - رائعة. السماء زرقاء صافية. وقد تم تجريدها من الشعاب المرجانية، وتبدو كقطعة حلوى. الوقود التلقائي يُفرغ. معدل الهبوط حوالي 35 قدمًا في الثانية في هذا الوقت. لا أرى أي مشا
Ho posizionato Giove sul lato destro,
好的。
Роджер, я по
Okay. Alles klar. Und während ihr das besprecht, könntet ihr vielleicht nochmal nachlesen – habt ihr die Vorgehensweise, um das rückgängig zu machen? Ic
D'accord. Nous avons plusieurs idées intéressantes à ce sujet, et la dernière en date consiste à optimiser la plateforme e
…nous consommons environ 1
Ich gehe zur VOX-Aufnahme. Ich schaue durch das Fenster, das vom Sonnenlicht durchflutet ist. Es ist eindeutig ein Rauchmuster mit Lichtstr
Okay. Now what wa
Roger. Att
Gémeaux 4, ici Canton. Vous arriv
Mir geht es bestens. Ich höre jet
Et vo
I don't know what f-stop I ought to be at
西格玛七号，这
Роджер. Когд
Это был автоматический выключатель цепи зарядки аккумулятора, позволяющи
알았어, 좋아. 짐, 궤도 조정은 안 하기로 했어. 그러니까 역추진하기 전에 한 번만
ليس تمامًا يا جيم. الأمر يتعلق بمصفوفة W هذه. أتذكر أننا أعدنا
Okay. Nach der Empfehlung des Startleitsystems von fügen Sie Folgendes hinzu: Treibstoffentlüftung für den Abstieg, öffnen; Oxidatorentlüftung für den Abstieg, öffnen; Talkback-Funktion
روجر، فرانك. تحديث الخريطة: 1/2، لا تغيير؛ ي
Bene. Esaminando il nostro controllo dei componenti ridondanti, sembra che non abbiamo ancora ver
ठीक है। चरण 11, "उपयोगिता लाइटें बंद करें।" 12, "बिजली चालू करें और सामान्य अवलोक
Okay, perform
– – bei diesem sehr flachen Sonnenstand. Es s
Роджер. Сейчас у меня настроена конфигурация для вращения BD, двигатели C4 и B3 в
روجر. درجة حرارة عادم البدلة 70 درجة. درجة حرارة عادم المقصورة 49 د
Okay. We'll do that. We haven't chlorinated the water yet, and we haven't changed the lithium hyd
الأمر الغريب يا أوين، فيما يخص محاذاة المنصة، هو أنه عندما أتمهل وأقوم بعملية تحديد دقيقة وبطيئة للغاية، أحصل على نفس فرق زاوية النجم تقريبًا كما لو كنت 
D'accord. R
Pouvez-vous patienter une seconde? Pour l'instant, nous ne pouvons pas confirmer que le problème est résolu. Nous avons constaté une chute de courant indiquant que plusieurs moteurs de cardan se sont arrêtés. Nous revenons vers vous dans un
喉に詰まってるプラグはどうですか？寝ている間に外しましたか
चलिए इस
イーグル、コロンビア。バーンの支援を待っています。状況がどうな
تأكد من إغلاق وقفل لوحة الوجه. الخوذة مقفلة، والقفازات في مكانها، ووصلة المدخل والمخرج على شكل حرف "Y"، وخراطيم نظام التحكم الإلكتروني بالهواء (ECS) حرة. سأجري بعد ذلك فحصًا لبدلة الطيار، وقد انتهيت منه بالفعل... لننتقل إلى فحص التدفق. قفل الفتحة مفتوح. ثم عليك فحص باقي الأمور. عند بدء وضع تخفيف الضغط، يجب ضبط صمام تهوية المقصورة على
了解、マイク
أهل
Ce sera peut-être un peu plus
不快なほど暑いわけではないけど、少し温かいくらい。スーツの回路をコントロールできるようになるまで
Ja. Und es ist keine sichtbare Feuchtigkeit vorhanden. Auch um das Löschpapier herum ist keine Feuchtigkeit. Leider haben Sie die Wände abgedeckt, sodass ich die Temperatur nicht messen kann, aber die höchste Temperatur, die ich finden konnte, liegt bei e
تصحيح، سيتم التحويل إلى نظام التحكم الإ
대량 샘플에서 깊이에 따른 변화를 살펴보던 지역에서는 최대 3인치까지 파낼 수 있었습니다. 실제로 큰 차이는 없었고, 단단한 층은 발견되지 않
لدينا رادار جيد جدا
D
음,
ठीक है। पैनल 8: सीक्वेंस लॉजिक, दो, 
Looking real good, Wally. The computer summation looks re
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Когда вы остановитесь в положении «0 крена», вы будете находиться примерно
D'accord. Pourquoi ne pas
إنها صامدة، لكن الوضع يتكرر نفسه يوماً 
P22 的所有操作似乎都很顺利。唯一有点奇怪的是 DAP 推进器出现了一些异常活动。我当时在 ACCEL COMMAND 指令中设置了俯仰控制，在 RATE COMMAND 指令中设置了滚转和偏航控制，不知何故，滚转和偏航控制突然活跃起来，DAP 推进器也开始频繁点火。我们在 CMS 系统
Ja (Gelächter)
Okay, Ken. Pericynthian plus 2, fast return / 62871, minus 161, plus 129, plus 45224, minus 06216, minus 18712 001 28 603 49118 112 038 296 earth up 010, right 37, plus 1475, plus 06400 1323 936 913, primary Sirius, secondary Rigel 129 155 010, no ullage, assume 4 same alignment, 5 GERU determination NC-4 0 t
... إ
Ok. Ora inizierò la mia manovra, ma non restringerò la zona morta, e daremo un'occhiata a Nunk
我々がここのクリアゾーンに到着し、スキャン制限を確実に超えたら、先に進んで手動および自動ロックオン 
Ç
Хорошо. Мы предлагаем, чтобы пилот левого модуля отдыхал, пока командир левого модуля и командир левого модуля бодрствуют. Пилот левого модуля должен лечь спать примерно через 63 часа, через 25 минут. А вы отдыхаете 6 часов. Вы встаёте в 69 часов. В 70 часов командир и пилот левого модуля спят 6 часов до 76 часов. Примерно через 70-76,5-77 часов мы выполним первый и второй маневры. В 78:30 мы загрузим и выровняемся. Время запуска второго маневра будет в ближайшее время, и мы скоро предоставим вам площадку. Мы предлагаем всем вам поесть после маневра. Это будет через
アポロ8号。大音量ではっきりと待機
Now, switch from RATE, HIGH, to RATE, LOW. But that might make it better and mayb
シグマセブン、シグマセブン
Ich glaube, ich werde – zwischen dir und Canton – noch einen Versuch mit der Temperatu
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。マイク、そのキャニスターについてですが、以
好的，第二步是在电路中的“ASCENT ECA CONTROL”部分，关闭两个。划掉它。下一行是“
В разделе ОСВЕЩЕНИЕ; ПРОЖЕКТОР, открыто; ПУТЬ, открыто. В разделе ED LOGIC - Коррекция, в разделе ED: LOGIC, открыто. ОТКЛЮЧЕНИЕ ДВИГАТЕЛЯ СПУСКА, открыто. В разделе: УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ПОТОКОМ КОСТЮМА, открыто. В 3-м ряду, КОММУНИКАЦИЯ: ДИСПЛЕЙ, открыто; ПЕРЕДАТЧИК 
Roger. Frank, do you think you are going to be able to do this burn radially? We would like to add to its magnitude if you are going to make it in some other
I'm going to just leave the food bags do
其
Roger. Compris. Une seconde de moins, et on dirait que tu es 
次に、35ページの右側です。「宇宙船制御、自動、検証」から下はすべて「黄道光写真はオプション」と
Oui. Nous étions en train de brancher la sirène sur l'alarme principale et nous effect
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон
Hast du etwa den ganzen Sitz vollgeblutet
ठीक है, हम कहाँ हैं? हम नीचे की ओर जा रहे हैं। 
네, 그리고 에드는 이 시간 동안 잠들
アポロ8号、標準レンズではお見せいただいた通りのものが撮れましたが、望遠レンズでは何も撮れませんでした。現在、この問題の解決に取り組んでいます。問題の一つは、低光量用のレンズであることです
はい、ジェミニ4号。実験MSC-1に関してですが、実験期間中、約5分間、ACQエイドビーコンをオフにしてください。今
システムの概要をご説明する準備が整いました。最終段階の手順をすべて確認し、軌道とシステム情報について、私たちが見ているものをお伝えします。また
Forza
그 작업은 완료되었습니
시그마 세븐, 캔턴 통신 기술국. 5번 읽었습니다
Хорошо. Придётся 
روجر. هاواي في انتظ
Ja. Sag mir doch Bescheid. Ich habe irgendwie das Zeitgefühl verloren, wann ich ins Bett gegangen bin. Aber es war ungefähr so: I
Ok, Mike. Ovviamente, questo vale nel caso in cui il G&N e il gimbal si fermino e tu debba volare a g costante; e quello che stiamo cercando di fare è estendere l'autonomia a g costante da 1100 a 1500 miglia. Abbiamo eseguito questa procedura nel simulatore e funziona bene. In pratica, la spiegherò - la spiegherò e poi, se hai domande, torna a trovarci. Ma è lo stesso vettore di portanza fino al massimo g, poi il vettore di portanza scende, e poi moduli il vettore di portanza finché il punto g non va a zero. Ok. Questa procedura è essenzialmente la stessa finora. E poi mantieni il punto g a zero finché non superi il tempo trascorso RETRO della V circolare; e poi, dopo aver superato questo tempo trasco
Okay, Jim. There's one thing before you get sta
Итак, как у нас обстоят дела с контрольным списком? Давайте убедимся, что мы ничего не испортим и ничего не забудем
アポロ11号、ヒュ
もう一度言って、ジャック。わか
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, ये है कैलिफोर्निया कॉम टेक, कैलिफोर्निया कॉम टेक। क्या आप
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous étions curieux de voir s'il y avait un excès d'humidité autour de la trappe du tunnel, comme nou
The dome now is still holding at 78 (degrees).
Roge
ठीक है, ह्यूस
Okay. Noch ein paar Minuten, Jim. Alles sieht sehr gut aus. Deine Zeit in Carnarvon wird gut sein, und wir wissen noch nicht
こちらヒュースト
Roger. Hauptsache ist, eine Methode zu finden, um festzustellen, o
Роджер, перех
На самом деле, Билл только что упомянул, что видимость, похоже, отличная почти до самой ли
Okay, Apollo 8. I would like to verify sextant star shaft 0590, and the b
はい。75時間続けてください - 太陽と地球
Houston, Apollo 11. Quelle page souhaitez-vous dans cette 
क
Yes, we took out the residuals
로저. 닐, 이제 DEDA도 
Housquin - Houston, Tranquility. Можете показать конфигурацию автоматического выключателя на рычаге двигателя? Конец связи. Я спрашиваю потому, что его конец, кажется, сломан. Думаю, мы сможем вставить его обр
Ricevuto. Il rollio e il beccheggio sono leggermente diver
ジェミニVI、カ
ठीक है, जिम। आपके वर्तमान कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में निम्नलिखित विशेषताएं हैं। हमने BAL LOAD सर्किट ब्रेकर के माध्यम से इलेक्ट्रिकल BUSES को आपस में
حسناً. لقد حصلت ع
روجر. 1، G&N: 38658، ناقص 054، زائد 065، 078 02 0345، زائد 29180، زائد 03779، ناقص 01325؛ دوران غير محدد، ميل 041؛ محركان نفاثان، 19 ثانية، غير ملتحمة. 4: 38658، ناقص 054، زائد 065، 084
여기는 휴스턴입니다. 버즈
نحن الآن في وضعية منخفضة للغاية، لدرجة أنني لا أعتقد أن المحطات الأرضية قادرة على رصدنا. لقد سمعنا عدة اتصالات متقطعة. سنبقى على هذه الوضعية لبعض الوقت لإبقاء الصاروخ المعزز في مجال رؤيتنا. لا يبدو
永久的じゃないよ、マイク。チャーリーが
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्ट
Roger. C'est bien, Fred-o. Cela vous amène à l'étape 8, et vous obtenez un clignotement de 5018 lorsque vous activez le mode PRO. D'accord. À 5018, nous allons effectuer une manœuvre AUTO pour atteindre l'assiette. Il suffit donc d'activer le mode PRO avec les touches GUIDANCE
Вот интересная новость, которую приятно услышать. Оказывается, в городе Анн-Арбор, штат Мичиган, появилась новая молодёжная банда. Она называется «Банда Гилнет». Члены банды бродят по улицам Анн-Арбора
여기는 케이프입니다. 통신 실험 1-2
컬럼비
Questa è Friendship Seven. Ho visto un tramonto me
何か必要なことがあれ
Mes vitesses sont quasiment nulles sur les trois axes. J'
आप सही कह रहे हैं, कुंभ राशि। चलिए चेकआउट हटा देते हैं। और सब ठीक 
जैसा कि आप शायद जानते हैं, हमारे पास आगे की प्रक्रियाओं पर काम करने वाले कई समूह हैं। एक समूह मध्य-मार्ग सुधारों पर काम कर रहा है ताकि सिस्टम, उसकी स्थिति, उसे कैसे करना है, संरेखण तकनीकें आदि निर्धारित की जा सकें। एक समूह प्रवेश पर काम कर रहा है, जिसमें यह भी शामिल है कि हम इसे कब और कैसे सक्रिय कर
ठीक है। ये छोटे-छोटे टुकड़े 
OAMS燃烧还有30
시그마 세븐, 시그마 세븐, 여기는 헌츠빌입니다... 시그마 
, Grande Boîte 14. A
حسناً، أنت تعتقد أن الأمر برمته مجرد خلل في رمي المفاتيح، وإذا اتبعت الخطوات بدقة وبطء وتأنٍ، فستكون ب
Уолли
تمام. وضع التحكم يدوي، الجيروسكوبات ت
Das umfasst alles ab da, mit Ausnahme von „Fen
И, Хьюстон, мы демонтировали ваш автоматический выключатель UPDATA LINK, поэтому, если вы хотите обновить его для чего-либо, сообщите
Che ne dici di 
आप आफ्टर बर्न 
Ciao Amicizia Sette, Amicizi
Gemini 4, Houston CAP 
Роджер. На заднем плане ви
彼はカレンダーを見ているが、それが何を意味するのかは分から
नहीं, मैंने नहीं देखा। मैंने ओ-रिंग को देखा और मुझे नहीं लगता कि यह ओ-रिंग की समस्या है। मुझे लगता है कि यह मेरी... मैंने देखा कि लॉन्च से ठीक पहले, पिछली सुबह जब मेरी जाँच हुई थी, तब उन्हें इसमें थोड़ी दिक्कत आ रही थी। मेरा... रक्तचाप ऊपर-नीचे होता रहता है। लगता है मेरे सूट में कोई समस्या है। क्या आप चा
ठीक है। 
还有，哥伦比亚大学和休斯顿大学。你们也一样
Roger, nous avons
रॉजर। ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन अभिवृत्ति: रोल 330.5, पिच 086.3, यॉ 000.0। पेन और स्याही से अंकित नाममात्र अभिवृत्ति अभी भी सही है। लगभग 25:30 बजे, आपके पूरा करने के 
Okay, e
D'accord. Le 16 mm ouvre à f/11 s'il est face à vous, et à f/28 dans le cas contrair
Roger. Notieren Sie sich das. Und die Bordanzeigen: D ist 69, C ist 73, D ist – Moment, ich fange nochmal von vorne an. Okay. A ist 51 und B ist 62; C ist 
Apollo 8, Houston al buio. L'imbardata è di 42 gradi. Si cons
是的。我们当时正在主警报器上安装
ヒ
Roger, Elliot. Wir sind... erster Einbrennvorgang... Modus... Ausrichtung anpassen... sieht wirklich
11번, 휴스턴. 현재 예보에 따르면 복구 지역의 기상 조건은 양호합니다. 고도 2000피트, 산발적 강풍, 풍향 70도, 풍속 13노트, 시야 10마일, 파고 약 4피트입니다. 어제 예보에서는 열대성 폭풍 클라우디아가 하와이 동쪽 500~1000마일 해상에 있다고 했습니다. 어제 오후 지구 위성 사진에서 클라우디아가 소멸하는 모습이 확인되어 이전보다 영향이 더욱 줄어든 것으로 보입니다. 현재 복구 지역은 열대 수렴대 바로 북쪽에 위치해 있으며, 창밖으로 보시면 열대 수렴대를 보실 수 있을 겁니다. 어제 서쪽으로는 열대성 폭풍 비올라가 발생했다는 보고도 있었습니다. 현재 비올라는 필리핀 동쪽 약 1000마일 해상에서 북서쪽으로 이동하고 있습니다. 열대성 폭풍 비올라는 세력
في البداية، حالت العملية دون بدء عمليات الرصد فورًا كما خططنا، نظرًا لوجود مناورة مراوغة أخرى. تسبب تفريغ الحمولة في ظهور كمية هائلة من النجوم الزائفة في المنطقة، مما جعل معايرة البصريات شبه مستحيلة. لم تكن الطريقة التي ابتكرناها فعالة. أما الطريقة التي استخدمتها في النهاية، فكانت التوجه إلى نجم الشعرى اليمانية (سيريوس)، وهو ألمع نجومنا، والحصول على العمود والمحور، ثم توجيه المركبة الفضائية إلى سيريوس لاستخدامهما في البصريات، وهو ما فعلناه لاحقًا. فيما يتعلق بتشتت الضوء، يبدو أننا نتلقى تشتتًا ضوئيًا في التلسكوب الماسح الضوئي في 
休斯顿，第二区重新开
Хорошо, отлично. Что касается индикатора компонента, у нас не будет H2O SEP. Хорошо, на CB(16) прямо под ним, "ДИСПЛЕЙ НАГРЕВАТЕЛЕЙ, ЗАКРЫТЬ", можете это зачеркнуть. Выполните все шаги 2 и выполните шаг 4 со следующими изменениями. На панели 11, в р
Jim, Roger. Your use of the TC - and just a reminder that in maneuvering that - that - that roll is in R3 and yaw is in R1
Okay. Während Jack im Funkverkehr war, h
好的，弗兰克。这是我们目前正在研
D'accord. Al
分かりました。3点ほど質問があります。まず1つ目は、皆さんのバッチの2点が評価され、「おめでとうございます。とても良いですね。皆とても満足しています」と言われたこと
Да, то шумно, то нет, Джерри. Здесь было довольно шумно, а всякий раз, когда кто-то
11، هذه هيو
Ici le chirurgien. Répétez. Est-ce le pilote qui par
正解です。日中側でロールを確認したいのですが、ピッチングもヨーイングも非常に正確です。ただ、ロールは6度ほ
في البداية، حالت ا
अब हम आपको उर्वरता सागर के ऊपर का दृश्य दिखाते हैं, और हमें ट्रैक के दक्षिण में
了解。マイク、他にいくつか連絡があります。この時点でBバッテリーの充電を終了させる必要があります。また、目標着陸地点では、散発的な雷雨のため天候が荒れています。そのよう
Apollo 11, Houston. You are breaking
D'accord, V
حسناً. حسناً، سنق
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 마이크, 프로그램 경보가 울린 이유는 자세 제어에 사용된 별
Columbia, ici Houston. Nous allons vous transmettre un nouveau vecteur d'état, puis nous le renverrons, car l'envoi du vecteur d'état effac
حسنًا. في قسم التشغيل، السطر الأول يقول "AUTO SELECT, 16, to OFF". حسنًا، يمكنك حذف هذا الجزء. في السطر الخامس، يقول "Circuit breaker LOGIC POWER"، وهو في الواقع "LOGIC BUS, four them, to closed". لا يهم DELTA-V CG لأننا لا نحرق المحرك. يسرد "SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER" "Two to AC 1". سنجعله واحدًا ف
알겠습니다.
1 - 2 - 3 - 4 - 5 - 4 - 3 - 2 - 1로 시
자, 잭, 지금처럼 기체가 기울어진 상태에서는 별을 볼 수가 없어요. 전혀 보이지 않아요. 회전이나 롤링 같은 방향으로 기체를 움직여서 별을 볼 수 있을지도 모르지만, 지금은 전혀 볼 수가 없어요. 망원경이 
Родже
Cos'è? Mi 
RKV, RKV. Близнецы VIII с точкой
आरकेवी, जेमि
Ok, Joe. Dalla fine
收到。你刚才说月球表面方面的书有一些更新内容要告诉我们。完
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿
Sembra che stia migliorando. Ciò che tocco sono solo questi tre ogget
阿波
오
حسنًا. ماذا لو رفعت زاوية ميل المدفع إلى حوالي 115 درجة
Gemini 4, this is Houston. We are not reading. Houston in the blind. Pilot be ready for Medical I say again, Medical Data Type 1 for Pilot at CSQ. 0
Aquarius, Houston. When y
Fortfa
제미니 4호, 여기는 휴스
네, 맞습니다. 자, 이제 이 별 확인, 아니, 태양 확인, 프레드
我随时准备在适当的时候检查我
فريندشيب سفن، كانتون كوم تك. أسمعك بوضوح. ا
حسناً. لقد قاموا بتحمي
Roger, Cap. Nous allons vous demander de laisser votre interrupteur de propulsion allumé et d'effectuer la manœuvre de survol du Texas. Nous surveillerons ensuite votre consommation de c
Und, Houston, Fred wird die Kamera bedienen
The one time - the other time I tried to use it, I got a pretty good measure on it the next time. The ... using no filter, I used the top of the glow of the thick layer of the
罗杰。弗兰克，我这
Хорошо. У нас там на нескольк
사실 빌이 방금 말했듯이, 명암 경계선 바로 앞까지 시야가 아주 좋은 것 같아요. 전혀 예상 못 했던 부분이에요. 좀 더 서서히 
收到。我们接下来将启用弹射机动。液氧排放将在大约12分钟
No, per niente. Ti stiamo solo dando informazioni in eccesso. Voglia
Hai completato i controlli de
Oh, yes; way off on the horizon, there, yes
ठीक है, आप हाई रेट पर जाकर इसे रेडी
Sigma Seven，这里
Potresti riferire a Cape Canaveral Com Tech che l'ho 
了
지금 안개층에 대한 언급으로 시작하시려는 것 같은데... 그 당시 상황이 그랬고, 동시에 비행 계획이 
네. 책 내용을 대부분 검토했고, 재진입 구역에 들어가기 
حسنًا يا هيوستن. سيستيقظ CMP في الساعة 11 صباحًا. سينام LMP الآن، وسينام حتى 
好的。我们又把你搞糊涂了。这是我们现在的加热器配置：氢气加热器 1，关闭；氢气加热器 2，自动。两个氧气加热器都设置为自动
ठीक है। सबसे पहले हम बैटरी को चार्ज करना चाहते हैं, ताकि हमें वहां कुछ पावर मिल सके और हम ऐसा कर सकें। इसके लिए हमने प्रक्रियाएँ तैयार कर ली हैं। पुनः प्रवेश के संबंध में, हम प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस से 5 घंटे पहले अपना अंतिम मध्यमार्ग लेने की योजना बना रहे हैं, और यदि आवश्यक हुआ तो। फिर हम प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस से लगभग साढ़े चार घंटे पहले सर्विस मॉड्यूल को अलग करना चाहेंगे, और अगले 3 से 3-1/2 घंटे तस्वीरें लेने, कमांड मॉड्यूल G&N को चालू करने, भंडारण और अन्य छोटे-मोटे काम निपटाने में बिताएंगे। हम प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस से 1 घंटे पहले तक इसे अपने पास रखेंगे, और फिर इसे अलग कर देंगे। ये प्रक्रियाएँ कल सुबह CMS और LMS में एकीकृत रूप से चलाई जाएंगी, और उम्मीद है कि दिन
Р
I'm now starting to see the sunrise in the periscope. First light in the periscope during this particular orbit as a result of the night side. It is obvious that the periscope has no function whatsoever in retroattitude on the night side. First light that I get is right now at a of practically. The sunrise is coming in rather rapidly through the periscope. I do have the lighted objects that John mentioned, and I can create some by knocking them off. I definitely have a sensation of their being a field and varying in size from small to bright. The periscope itself is blinding me. I'll hav
收到。休斯
Le commutat
ठीक है। 4:30 बजे हॉटफायर के लिए कॉन्फ़ि
이제 우주선을 
مرحباً جيم. الأمور تسير على ما يرام. كيف حالك هناك؟ هل نمت جي
Эй, похоже, он довольно хорошо держится, 
Inizia
Apollo 8, this is Houston. You are right; the is 2. The was determined out there before the last midcour
アルタイルではグ
रॉजर। कॉपी। मुझे लगता है कि टेलीविजन पर भी ऐसा ही दिखाई दिया। और अब आखिरी सवाल। नील, आपने बताया था कि लैंडिंग स्पॉट की ओर बढ़ते समय आप एक फुटबॉल मैदान के आकार के गड्ढे के
Okay, Jack. In der zweiten Zeile unter „powerup“ steht „POWER to BOTH“, und wir setzen das auf „1“. Der Grund dafür ist, wie bereits erwähnt, Energie zu sparen. Es gibt keinen Grund, den zweiten Prozessor anzusteuern, bevor wir diese Info
चलिए देखते हैं, क्या हमने इस चेकलिस्ट में सब कुछ पूरा कर लिया है, जॉन? चलिए देखते हैं—क्या रेट्रो रॉकेट सुरक्षित हैं? ह
알겠습
अब जब फ्रेड अपना झूला उतारकर उसे वापस रख र
Roger. You're GO f
左手の窓の外は比較的平坦な平原で、直径5～50フィート（約1.5～15メートル）のクレーターがかなり多く、尾根もいくつかある。高さは20～30フィート（約6～9メートル）と推測される小さなもので、その周囲には文字通り1～2フィート（約4～6メートル）の小さなクレーターが何千個も点
ठीक है। अभी यहाँ लिखा है, "G&N से बाहर निकलने के लिए," फिर पेन और स्याही 
Итак, мы начинаем. Входная зона: Средний Тихий океан, 000153; 000. Следующие две строки будут соответствовать заходу Луны и положению для проверки положения Луны;, 178; СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 61, минус 21,66, минус; 00:28. Следующие четыре строки Н/Д; ДО: 4,00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353,1, 29,9. Звезда на оси обзора — Сигма Ве
알겠습니다. 보조 라디에이터 입력 온도는 70도에서 약 72도 사이이고, 라디에이터 출력 온도는 약 30도입니다. 글리콜 증발기 온도는 약 6
That's right. Star number 1, 
이러한 작은 함몰 부분 중 일부는 가라앉는 경향이 있습니다. 아마도 2~3인치 정도일 겁
Как выгл
알겠습니다. 다시 당직을 맡겠습니다. 열 관리를 소홀히 하면서 별 관측을 너무 많이 하지 않도록 주의해야 하니, 저희를 잘 살펴보시고 한쪽이 너무 뜨거워
Roger. Wir sehen den Erdmittelpunkt, aufgenommen von der Raumsonde im östlichen Pazifik. Die Hawaii-Inselkette konnten wir bisher nicht erkennen, aber die Westküste Nordamerikas ist deutlich zu sehen: die Vereinigten Staaten, das San Joaquin Valley, die Sierra Nevada, Baja California und Mexiko bis hinunter nach A
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि बैटरी A पर 30 प्लस 15 पर चार्जिंग बंद क
About 40 feet out - I'd say out at the en
D'accord. Je 
The suit pressure lines and put t
La visibilità attraverso il telescopio è stata molto scarsa. Direi che è persino peggiore di quella attuale del simulatore. Richiede lunghi periodi
ほぼ同じです。問題は、それが私たちにかなり正確に向けられていること
Describing the blue band. There's a relatively dark blue band right at the surface of the earth, and a light blue band, and another dark 
Сейчас мы покажем вам пол кабины. Думаю, вы видите один из двух портативных рюкзаков с системой жизнеобеспечения в центре, а по бокам — по два забрала для шлемов. Я сниму одно из них и покажу вам поближе, к
就目前我所能告诉你的情况来看，你剩下的燃料应该
È una finestra
참고로, 이 도킹 구성에서 명령 모듈 도킹 프로브는 도
알겠습니다. 지금 저비트
Я тебя понял, моло
And on the exposures we're looking for an eighth of a second, a h
Zur endgültigen Ausrichtung hätten wir es gerne
Это «Дружба номер семь». Мне очень жарко. Нет, я просто остаюсь неподвижно, стараясь сохранять как можно больше прохлады. Сейчас мне не
Jim, Houston. Deine Kommunik
Ho
جيميني 4، كارنارفون CAP COM. تبدو في
はい、ヒュース
Roger. Wir beginnen mit den Weltnachrichten. Lob für die amerikanischen Apollo-8-Astronauten und Hoffnungen auf internationale Zusammenarbeit in der Weltraumforschung wurden mit den weltweiten Weihnachtsbotschaften verbreitet, während das kleine Raumschiff den Mond umkreiste. Selbst in der kommunistischen Welt herrschte Begeisterung für die erste bemannte Mondlandung. In Moskau e
Houston CAP COM, Gemini 
روجر. نحن على وشك البدء بالخروج. إد ارتدى قفازًا واحدًا فقط. سيرتدي قفازًا آخر ثم سيكون جاهزًا 
Хорошо. Справа от меня поднимаются Пиренейские горы, и мы уже почти над Мессье и Пикерингом. Наша первая точка хорошо видна с нашей высоты. По мере приближения к терминатору мы видим довольно сильный контраст. Вид кажется хорошим, солнце не отражается в глазах; похоже, видимость в этом месте отличная. Очень легко определить нашу первую точку; а за этой
了解…43-2 101. 2+06. 09 40 59. 5+14. 10+36. 44-2 114. 2
روجر. الصعود PAD: 104 39 47 00، 55358 00322، بالإضا
Roger. Pendant votre passage, nous souhaiterions effectuer un contrôle UHF. Je
아폴로 11호, 아폴로 11호입니다. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 신호가 들리면 전방향 안테나를 사용하여 수신을 시도
그리고 만약 그것을 찾을 수 있다면, 꼭 추적하거나 어디에 있었는지 메모해 두세요. 다음 REV에서 저희가 추적할 수 있도록 하겠습니다. 준비되셨다면, 지금 전달해 드릴 업데이트가 있습니다. 수락해 주시면 감사하겠습
Okay. Und da wir Ihnen heute Nachmittag etwas anderes über diesen Tunnel erzählt haben, möchte ich Ihnen nun erklären, was wir tun werden. Wir werden den Tunnel entlüften, sodass wir am Ende einen absoluten Druck von etwa 1,5 bis 2 psi im Tunnel haben. Dadurch ergibt sich ein Druckabfall (ΔP) von 3. Wir werden die Di
Хорошо. минус 00489 плюс 00000 плюс 47250 177 144 000, н
了解しました。視界も通信も非常に良好ですので、今は走査望遠鏡を見
了
حسنًا. مفهوم. سيكون ذلك للمرا
로저, 메시지는 다음과 같습니다. 연료량 90-100%, 산소량 73-100%, 전류 22A, 기내 압력 5
Роджер. 5000 рассеянных волн; ветер северо-западный 10; высота волн 3 фута; высотомер 2986; позывной спасательных сил Naha RESCUE 1, GMT 02:58; Nahe SEARCH 1, GMT 03:44; эсминец USS Mason
È ancora lì. Lo sto guardando proprio ora. Posso guardare... il Sole è proprio dietro di me, poi compaiono tutti questi luccichii. Sì. Sembra quasi di essere proprio nel 
Se riusciamo a districare alcuni fili, vi mostreremo
Okay. Lesen Sie die Änderungen auf dieser Seite noch einmal durch – bitt
मैंने अभी-अभी आपके कंप्यूटर को नए 36-4 लोड से अपडेट किया है। मेरे पास आपकी बैकअप फ़ाइलें ह
Okay. I co
Роджер
로저입니다. 케이프 기지에서 조종사에게 의료 데이터
好的。鉴于今天下午我们跟你们讲的隧道情况不一样，我来解释一下我们接下来要怎么做。我们实际上要降低隧道内的气压，使隧道内的绝对压力降至 1.5 到 2 ps
Верно, Джек. Хорошо, на странице 2-5. Верхняя строка, где у нас было «Проверка горизонта», теперь это «Проверка захода Луны», и время приблизите
자, 진입합니다. 진입 좌표: 태평양 중부, 000153; 000. 다음 두 줄은 월몰 시각과 달 관측 자세입니다., 178; NOUN 61, -21.66, -; 00:28. 다음 네 줄은 해당 없음입니다. DO는 4.00, 02:04; 00:17, 03:22, 08:14; 33, 353.1, 29.9입니다. 보어사이트 별은 시그마 리브라이며, 아래쪽으로 08.8, 왼쪽으로 0.4입니다. 상승 벡터는 위쪽입니다. 진입 정렬을 위해 별 31과 23을 사용합니다. 롤 정렬은 041, 피치는 245, 요는 024이며, 비출구 패턴을 사용합니다. 월몰 시각까지 달 관측
Roger. And I have a flight plan update when you get a time to copy it sometime, I'll pass i
了解しました。これまで発生していた問題は、何らかの原因、おそらく何らかの原因でトラニオンセルに負荷がかかっているため、現在91度になっているため、実際のトラニオン
Roger. I've got the world in my window for a change and looking at it through the monocular, it's really something. I wish I could describe it properly. The weather is very good. South America is coming around i
حسنًا. ناقص 00489 زائد 00000 زائد 
И мы показываем 
好的。DELTA-
아니요, 아마 저희 이후
好的，杰克。看起来
Wassermann, alle Ihre Pads werden in etwa 3,5 Stunden, um -06:30 Uhr, wieder funktionieren. Und noch eine wichtige Erinnerung: Wenn Sie die Stromzufuhr zum Steuermodul unterbrechen, müssen Sie unbedingt die beiden Hauptsicherungen (POWER MAIN B) öffnen, bevor Sie die Schalter und Sicheru
Ciao Houston, Acqu
उड़ान योजना में बदलाव। इस चक्कर में 
Okay. We want the tape dump,
Kano Cap Com，Sigma S
«А
Okay, I think they held well, Al. The--I think they were good. I can't tell you what was wrong about them because the gy
わかりました。BAT FEED TIESとCROSSTIE BAL LOADを閉じ、CROSS TIE BUSを開いてください。次の3つも閉じてください。ASCENT ECA CONTROL、ASCENT ECA、INVERTER 1を開いてください。DC BUS VOLTを閉じてくださ
قراءة التوقيت العالمي المنسق (GMT) هي 2-1—15 55 47. 
ठीक है। ठीक है, जैक। मैं कहने ही वाला थ
Okay. Roger. True for the code AUTO OP
フレンドシップ・セブン、フレンドシップ・
Good, minus 00050, plus all zeros, plus 00001 000 334 001 five zeros, plus 00190 00050 014 00050. Are you still with me? Over
Okay, Va
حسنًا يا جاك. بما أننا حصلنا على الإشارة، نخطط لاستخدام هذه المعلومات لإعطاء المركبة الفضائية محاذاة تقريبية، ثم سنكون في وضعية إطلاق وحدة الخدمة، 
Okay, very good. Under "Final stowage," the first thing that's listed on line 36, page 1-5, is "Opt
Ja, ich 
了解。3 53 23 を持っ
С этой стороны всё выглядит довольно хорошо. Как держалось положение самолёта? Были ли 
Right. It will be at about the REV 20 terminator, so it will be late in your lunar orbit activities before you will be able to photograph it, and FAO is looking at whether we can 
ジェミニVI。レトロゲー
연료 전지 퍼지를 시작했고, 15까지 올린 다음, 초당 0.3도의 롤 안정화 테스트
Okay, eine erste Datenanalyse deutet darauf hin, dass das mittlere S-II-Triebwerk mit einer etwas höheren Amplitude vibrierte als bei früheren Flügen. Die Vibrationen begannen etwa 160 Sekunden nach dem Brennbeginn des S-II-Triebwerks. Infolge dieser Vibrationen sank der Brennkammerdruck so weit ab, dass die beiden Schubsensoren für niedrige Schubpegel (die Schub-OK-Sensoren) die Abschaltung des mittleren Triebwerks 
That is the time for it,. 16 +
알겠습니다. 보조 라디에이터 입력 온도는 70도에서 약 72도 사이이고, 라디에이터 출력 온도는 약 30도입니다. 글리콜 증발기 온도는 약 65도이고, 증기 압력은 최대치이며, 글리콜 배출 압력은 약 9psi입니다. 보조 축압기 보호복 온도는 약 52도이고, 객실 온도는 약 58도입니다. 압력은 보호복이 4.1, 객실이 5입니다. 이산화탄소 분압은 1을 약간 넘는 약 1.1입니다. 건물 측면 온도는 72도이고, 헬륨은 3500, N2 A는 2300, N2 B는 약 2450입니다. 연료는 약 165이고, 연료 전지 1은 둘 다 닫혀 있고 압력이 0입니다. 피부 온도는 405도입니다. 응축기 배기가스는 낮은 스케일입니다. 연료 전지 2의 경우 현재 O2 또는 H2 유량은 0.13~0.14로 측정되고 있으며, O2 유량은 현재 최대 스케일 상한에 고정되어 있지만 추
अब आप जिन 's पर काम कर रहे हैं, उनके शेष भाग को हटा दें, एटीट्यूड पर वापस जाएं, और फिर फ्लाइट प्लान में जहां लिखा है, वहां से अपने काम को फिर से शुरू करें, या यद
わ
現在高度は約 110 マイルですが、もちろ
Non ci andrò. Ah, a proposito, che ne dici di dare un'occhiata ai 
, this is. Go 
Elle est beaucoup plus sensible aujourd'hui qu'elle ne l'était 
フレンドシップ・セブン、カナベラル通信技術部。はっきりと聞こえました。キャプテン・コミッション
Следует отметить, что в 3:26:33 я наблюдаю в небе одновременно 10 частиц. Они, несомненно, кажутся мне светящимися. Они выглядят как мал
Okay, jetzt sehe ich nur noch die Hälfte im Hellen und die andere Hälfte im Dunkeln. Wir bewegen uns also ein wenig seitwärts in Richtung Small-End-Forward, aber Eds Seite ist komplett im Dunkeln, glaube ich. Stimmt das, 
わかりま
好的。乔
Okay, Jim. Die Sicherungsautomaten sind die ANUNCIATOR/DOCK/COMPONENT-Sicherungsautomaten auf Schalttafel 11, dritte Reihe, ganz rechts, unter BELEUCHTUNG; und auf Schal
Bill has got the tape recorder now; we are evaluating the dump. The data is good, and we are evaluating the voice quality here sho
...dors maintenant... Ba
C'e
Gemini 4, ici Houston CAP COM. Je souhaite mettre à jour votre plan de vol pour les 
Это подтвержда
Okay. A metà PAC, 000152, 000;, 178; e ricordi che questo è il tramonto della luna e l'assetto del controllo della luna. NO
Apollo 8, Houston. Questa è una fase p
11, Roger. Th
Okay, Jack, was ich jetzt hier habe, ist LEVVA, das wir auch schon mal gesehen haben. Es ist eine Kopfbedeckung für die Oberfläche, und ich – ich hole Jims hier raus, um ein paar MODs zu zeigen. Ein Problem war bisher, dass man die Charaktere an der Oberfläche nicht gut auseinanderhalten konnte. Jims Anzug hat also nicht nur rote Streifen, sondern, wie du siehst, auch sein LEVVA. Und jetzt siehst du hier noch einen anderen MOD, Jack, den ich selbst vorher noch nicht gesehen hatte. Ich glaube, in Folge 12 hatten Pete und A1 Probleme mit dem Sonnenlicht in den Augen erwähnt, deshalb haben sie unseren LEVVAs ein neues Mittelteil verpasst, das man herunterziehen und wie eine Baseba
로저. 48:1 비율의 작
Roger.
Hawaii Cap Com, Hawaii Cap Com, ici Sig
네바다주 리노에 사는 한 어린 소년은 집에 벽난로가 없어서 지역 신문사에 산타클로스에게 편지를 써서 "앞문을 이용해 주시면 안 될까요? 문이 좀 뻑뻑해서 아래쪽을 살짝 차셔야 할 거예요."라고 제안했습니다. 아칸소주 리틀록에서는 크리스마스 전 주부터 크리스마스 당일까지 세인트 빈센트 병원에서 태어난 아기들을 퇴원시킬 때 커다란 빨간 크리스마스 양말에 넣어 어머니에게 전달합니다. 이는 종교 간 협력의 좋은 예입니다. 캘리포니아주 인디오에서는 경찰서장이 크리스마스 당일 기도서를 들고 있었습니다. 필
아름다운 별들이 보
0.01, God damn it! Now that's enough to piss a bod
Apollo 11, Houston. Mike, on that canister, we had you due to change one at 133 before, and it's on page 399. The next one we got is at 14
Die Mitarbeiter der Lagerverwaltung haben die Idee mit der Schwarzweiß-Fernsehkamera in Lagerplatz B-6 ausprobiert und sagen, dass sie selbst ohne Objektiv nicht hineinpasst. Daher empfehle ich weiterhin, si
Ich glaube, ich habe Wasser getrunken und auch etwas gegessen. Tatsächlich bin ich
Oui. Allez-y. Désolé, j'ai éteint l'interrupteur, ça s
Numero 43 17.2, 45.
いいえ。入っています。
أحسنت
Ci aspettiamo che la tua erogazione di acqua diminuisca e che, a quel punto, il DELTA salirà a 160-165 
حسنًا يا جيم. التكوين الحالي الذي قمنا بإعداده يستهلك وقودًا أكثر مما نرغب من النظام "ب". نود منك إعادة تكوينه إل
आगे बढ़ो, ह्य
また、ジム、いつでも 400 とすべてのゼロを加算することができます。これは、MODE CONTROL の ATTITUDE HOLD に切り替えた場合に姿勢を制御するように指示する
La separazione pirotecnica è stata sufficiente a far sì che... sentissi una g sensata ne
Would yo
음, 그냥 여기다 넣으세요. 그러면 알아서 잘 고정될
Ja, Shaffer hat Mist gebaut – er 
वैसे, ये झूले बहुत आराम
Endlich konnten wir ein paa
प्लस 44, / 62970, माइनस 162, प्लस 129, प्लस 00197, प्लस सभी शून्य, प्लस 60701 180 
Roger, ti ho letto forte e chiaro. Ho una lunga lista di aggiornamenti per te. Fammi sapere quando sei pront
Мы спали примерно 
一切正常，我来快速汇报一下。燃油量为29-27%。舱压为5.5，舱内空气温度为88华氏度，相对湿度为33%；冷却液量为58%，舱内温度为71华氏度，宇航服温度为71华氏度，宇航服压力为5.8，
दोनों बसें ठीक हैं। 
سنقوم بتركيب خر
La température en cabine est sous contrôle.
로저. 지금은 설령 원한다고 해도 그 내용을 꺼낼 수 없을
سيضطرون لإعادة توصيل التيار المتردد، ثم تقوم بتوصيل قاطع الدائرة - حسن
У нас ещё есть новости, но мы настоятельно рекомендуем вам и Джеку постараться поспать ещё ок
收到，加州通信技术员。收到你的声音了。怎么回事？完
Questo è quello che volevo che dicessi. Abbiamo utilizzato gli angoli d
这些不是设置值。让我解释一下。宇航服舱顶温度是75度。座舱舱顶温度是56度。宇航服冷却
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 비
Roger. You can power dow
罗杰，2：SPS/G&N：38320，加166，减081 080 11 3603，减01408，减去所有球，减去00743，全零，196 359 00657，加00537，01592 017 01531 23 1160 138。织女星，天津四 243 183 012，两台喷气式发动机运行
حسناً، فهمت. إذا
好的，很好。我看我好像稍微向
They
Siehst du da oben Wolken, von denen du Fotos machen kö
Okay.
حسنًا
Q
रॉजर। 6 मिनट कम। समझ गया कि आप गिम्बल मोटर्स और बाकी सब चालू करने वाले हैं। ठीक है। अब हमें पैनल के ऊपरी मध्य भाग में कंप्यूटर दिखाई दे रहा 
好的。我们正准备交接班，我想先交接几项。现在
روجر
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。完毕
Bien, et si vous tournez la page sur la puissance 8, vous trouverez les fonctions restantes du vaisseau spatial. Nous avons une transmission TM à faible débit. Cependant, nous n'avons pas de VHF. Nous avons des pompes à glycol, des ventilateurs de combinaison et la dépressurisation de la cabine. Veuillez patienter dans le système de contrôle d'attitude. Dans ce dernier, nous aurons des dispositifs de sécurité pour les
Bene. Ora ho un bel po' di informazioni da darvi. Vorremmo che il pilota, che sta dormendo, tenesse la visiera aperta e i guanti tolti. E poi vorremmo che il pilota sveglio si togliesse casco e guanti e utilizzasse le cuffie leggere per le comunicazioni, se possibile. E vorremmo che continuaste in questo modo fino a circa 3 ore prima del retrofire. Poi, una vol
Si Jack écoute, dites-lui que l'optique fonctionne peut-être bien, mais que l'œil a un peu de mal à voir à travers toute cette buée sur le
Хорошо. Первой звездой бу
글쎄, 아직 그건 묻지 않았잖아, 잭. 일단 하나만 
Roger. We got the Int
Apollo 8, this is Houston. I have got two methods for you to warm up the cabin there. The first one is a one-man job - about the best way would be to put one or both cabin fans ON and go full hot on the cabin heat exchanger. It'll be a fairly slow process of warming up, and you won't get a who
D'accord. J'ai compris qu'il peut voir des étoiles et des constellations, et qu'
Roger. Hat jemand gemeldet, dass das Landekissen heruntergefallen sein 
لقد خسرنا - الميزة الوحيدة للقيام بذلك مبكرًا هي أنه إذا استطعنا استعادة الطاقة، فسنتمكن من الهبوط. الميزة الوحيدة للقيام بذلك مبكرًا هي أنه يمكنك القيام باحتراق كبير الآن ودوران متوسط ​​ثم الهبوط. وإلا، فسيتعين علينا إبقاء منطقة التشغيل خالية حتى نصل إلى القمر. بالإضافة إل
Bene. Il titolo principale è "Entrata, PREPARAZIONE LM, meno 6 ore". Primo, BAT 5 ALIMENTAZIONE NORMALE, ATTIVA; secondo, utilizzare la checklist di attivazione modificata /, 30 min
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很神奇，就是眼睛还没适应的时候，周围一片漆黑。我确实能看到窗户上有一些涂层。现在要回到超高频VOX模式进行发射。打开面罩擦拭右侧麦克风。我舔了一下。关上面罩。面罩立刻密封，以便宇航服电路开始工作。我可不想再被它弄脏。宇航服进气口的温度稳定在68度左右。所以穹顶又要升起来了。现在温度是76度，75度。看来这个更高的设置才是我们想要的。我想再往上加半格，应该就能锁定温度了。宇航服终于开始降温了，所以我知道该把温度调到什么程度了。我已经将宇航服和控制杆的冷却液量设定在 8.5。此时穹顶读数为 75 度。宇航服进气口温度为 68 度。非常舒适。我能感觉到凉爽的空气拂过我的脸庞。氧气量看起来也很好，分别为 60 和 75 psi（单位为百）
Okay. Ich höre d
Ti ho sentito forte e chiaro. Mi chiedo se Canary abbia la mia ultima indicazione sul sistema della tuta. Ho 82 gradi sulla cupol
Роджер. На звезде 02: Там, где напечатано два набора, мы хотели бы сделать только один набор; а затем мы хотели бы до
Yes. We noticed that it had gotten warmer in the cockpit coming back than it was going out. And I remember going out when we manually positioned the ten-pin valve, but we had pretty good control over the glycol evap outlet temperature. So possibly that would be the thing to attack fir
Roger. Il est temps de procéder à un cycle de refroidissement cryogénique des quatre ventilateurs, Frank, une courte impulsion pour chacun d
रॉजर। बज़, तुम इस अंदाज़ में बहुत अच्छे लग रहे हो। हम तुम्हें पाँ
通过 Honeysuckle，我们觉得你们的声音很好听。我们听起来怎
そのバンドを手に入れて、どんな角度になるか試
Близнецы
Ver
«Аполлон-8»
Хорошо, Джек. Заметил, что ты это учёл, и это, по крайней мере, было нашей рекомендацией. Мы попросим ребят в подсобке посмотреть и попытаться подобрать более точные значения, исходя из угла конуса, через который ты проходишь, и 
Nous constatons des valeurs similaires à celles relevées précédemment concernant le débit d'oxygène. Ce niveau élevé est dû au changement de gaz dans la cabine. D'après Apollo 7, si vos données confirment les leurs, ce débit devrait rester élevé pendant encore quelques h
좋습니다. + 00068, + 00000,
حسنًا يا جاك، فهمت. تريد منا توجيه المحور السيني (X) نحو الجنوب باستخدام الجهاز المُشغّل. ثم، بإيقاف تشغيل الجهاز، سنفقد القد
로저. 121 웨스트, 
Хорошо. Тогда подождем немного. У нас есть хороший вариант. Подождем, пока вы его установите
Es gibt eine neu
Okay. Aline... Plat
休斯顿的奥德赛公司。你只需要关闭燃料电
Roger. Der Kabinendruck beträgt 5,5 und wird gehalten. Die Kabinentemperatur liegt bei 95 Grad. Die Warnleuchte für überschüssiges Wasser leuchtet weiterhin. Ich reduzie
Gemini VIII，RKV CAP COM。我们有最
Okay. E io... - uso una c
알겠습니다, 잭. 패널 3, AC 인버터 2, 메인 B; 인버터 2, AC 버스 2 켜짐; AC 버스 2 리셋으로 재설정 및 중앙으로 이동; 배터리 충전기를 A로 설정; AC 표시등을 배터리 충전기로 선택. 처음 30분 동안은 10분마다, 그 후에는 30
除了我们勘测过的那个大陨石坑之外
ठी
好的。听起来很简单。理解
रॉजर, माइक। ऐसा लगता है कि अगर हम इस जेटिसन टाइम को आगे बढ़ाते हैं और आपको नया लोड देते हैं, तो इसके लिए एक नए दृष्टिकोण की आवश्यकता होगी, और हम पहले से ही बंद किए गए काम के कारण ऐसा नहीं कर सकते, और इससे हमें हर तरफ से परेशानी होगी और हमारा संचार टूट जाएगा। हम लगभग 10 मिनट में इसे अलग करने की सोच रहे हैं। हम प्रक्ष
هذه هي المرة ال
Roger. And on the " Activation," same page, perform step 1; and in step 2, perform line
ठीक है, जैक, अब मेरे पास प्रक्रिया है, मैं आपको पढ़कर सुना सकत
Понял. 
11, Houston. Abbiamo un PAD preliminare da 30, se sei pronto a copia
Roger. Verstanden, Buzz. Wir haben ein paar Änderungen an deiner Checkliste für die Oberfläche vorgenommen. Im Allgemeinen möchten wir, dass du das Kommandomodul für
Gémeaux 4, Houston
Хорошо. Пока мы проверяем положение прокрутки — сейчас это обсуждается в подсобке — я бы хотел(а) бы проследить за контрольным 
Wir holen gleich unseren Ti
मुझे केबिन का तापमान और अपने सूट के इनलेट का ता
Beh, questa è una delle tante. E vogliamo dirti una cosa che ho già detto a Jim prima, e che riguarda il controllo. Al momento hai il 
Houston, Apollo 8 in banda S. Se leggete, tutto è p
Ho appena fatto un tentativo sul bersaglio 16-A. L'aeroporto di Bassora, si trova proprio sul Golfo Persico. L'ho individuato... ho individuato il Golfo Persico a circa... un angolo di circa 30°... Ho picchiato e poi ho individuato il lago... a nord-ovest del Golfo Persico. Bassora, essendo proprio sui laghi, molto vicino ai laghi, si può semplicemente seguire
एक्वेरिय
Ok. Quando siamo entrati lì,
Se è veloce
자, 프레드가 해먹을 내리고 다시 정리하는 동안, 위아래 구분이 없는 혼란스러운 상황을 조금이나마 보여드리겠습니다. 저는 터널 입구 바로 앞에 있는 상승 엔진 위에 자리 잡고 있거든요. 카메라를 180도 돌
Роджер. Температура в куполе скафандра 68 градусов. Температура в салоне 48 гра
Roger. Bitte warten. Um wie viel U
А, Джо, Джек то
Ja. Denken Sie daran, dass es sich jetzt um die Zeitdiffe
Tout va bien. Le pilote s'est endormi il y a environ une demi-heure et il dormira probablement encore 5 ou 6
Hous
D'accord. Elle est presque dressée dans l'eau. Je vais déployer l'antenne fouet, Gus, et 
阿波罗8号，
Ja, aber de
ट्रैंक्विलिटी, ह्यूस्टन। जब आप कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हों, तो मेरे पास
روجر، لديّ تحديثٌ خاصٌّ بمهمة أبولو لاند مارك. هذا التحديث خاصٌّ بالرحلة رقم 6، التسلسل 15، المراجعة 42. سيكون التوقيت العالمي المنسق (GMT) بعد 8 ساعات و31 دقيقة، بزاوية انحراف 15 درجة، وزاوية ميل 30 درجة. يمكنك استخدام نظام إدارة الحركة الجوية (OAMS) الخاص بك 
ठीक है। फ्रेड, समझ गया। ऑक्सीजन प्रवाह के बारे में, हमने स्पष्ट रूप से देखा कि डिमांड रेगुलेटर बं
好的，请您方便的时候进行一次客舱温度调查，并将结果记录在您的飞行日志中，以便飞行后查阅。我们需要客舱内的环境干球温度和湿球温度，以及潜水服进气口的干球温度和湿球温度。请取下蓝色喷嘴，直接检查氧气流量。如果可以，我们也需要舱门
Eagle, Houston. Potresti darci un'idea di 
Now I need a VERB 76.
जी हाँ। ह
Potete star certi che quel 
了解。分かりまし
ज
Roger. Kano. Looks like you got good
حسنًا
Okay. Zunächst eine Anmerkung. In der Mitte der Seite endet der Abschnitt über das Zodiakallicht, direkt darunter. Wenn Sie dann bis zum Seitenende scrollen, streichen Sie die Zeile „Fotoziel 12 auf Kurs“ usw. durch u
यह अपोलो 11 है। 
저것 좀 봐.
ठीक है। वह कौन सा पेज है जिस पर जा
Jack, wir sind uns noch nicht sicher, wann der beste Zeitpunkt für diese Vorgehensweise ist. Deshalb möchten wir sie dir jet
Penso che sia lo stesso per Jim. Non avevo notato il suo c
Verstanden, Jim. Und – Jack liest dir
يقولون إنه يجب استخدام شر
Ragaz
Aurora Seven, stai perdendo rapidamente i sensi. Stai perdendo i sensi. Il Centro Controllo Mercurio è preoccupato per il consumo di carburante della tua auto e del tuo manuale. Ti co
Houston, Colombie. Je le répète: je ne les ai pas vus. L’optique automatique pointait vers un endroit très proche
Ich glaube, du weißt ja, was bei euch alles los ist, und hier unten ist es ganz ruhig. Alle lächeln; der Weihnachtsmann war zu den meisten Leuten auf der Welt nett, und alles ist ziemlich friedlich, so wie es an Weihnacht
Ok. E prima del trasferimento LMP, vorremmo che aggiungessi un altro p
Боюс
はい、数回のパスの途中で別れま
Хьюстон, Транквилити. Мы готовы начать проверку электрооборудования. Будем модулироват
Bene. Nella zona di atterraggio del Pacifico centrale, il tempo è buono. La copertura nuvolosa è di 2000, sparsa; visibilità 10; venti 060 a 10; l'altezza delle onde è di 4 piedi e l'altimetro 2986, se vi interessa. Rovesci sparsi su meno del 10% dell'area. Le forze di recupero dell'Iwo Jima saranno 
Хорошо. Сначала нам
Proprio 
좋아요, 당신은 이게 그냥 일시적인 오류일 뿐이고, 정해진 규칙대로 천천히 신중하게 진행하면 괜찮을 거라고
Хорошо. Я показываю им это, и мне хотелось бы узнать, могут ли они прочитать то, что отображается, а также видят ли они P-R-O-G, V-E-R-B и N-
Фотоаппарат убран. Фотометр достаточно лёгкий, чтобы его можно было достать и оставить. Перед завершением я ещё раз проверю одно небольшое устройство. Показания поднялись примерно на толщину одной линии. Теперь оно показывает 0,06, что меньше 0,1. Все это теперь будет убрано в бардачок; до этого они лежали на люке, рядом с пружиной, удерживающей люк, ближайшей к аварийной ручке регулировки скорости. В вертикальной плоскости, параллельной сумке, в которой хранятся дополнительные вещи, кот
알겠습니다. 그리고 오늘 오후에 이 터널에 대해 다른 이야기를 드렸었으니, 이제 우리가 무엇을 할 건지 말씀드리겠습니다. 터널의 압력을 낮춰서 터널 내 절대압을 약 1.5~2psi 정도로 만들 겁니다. 이렇게 하면 델타-P는 3이 됩니다. 터널 압력을 낮추는 동시에 해치 무결성 검사도 진행
実際、今私たちはケープ岬を真下から見
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。最後にもう一度お見せするため
Columbia, Houston. We 
로저. 
روجر. شكرًا لك يا مايك. استراحة. إيج
ठीक है, फ्र
Roger. Would you place your T/M switch to REAL-TIME a
您可以帮我们检查一下，但这似乎是一个相当晚的更改，而这正是我们一直
تريد أن ينتهي بك الأمر عند تلك ا
ठीक है। हम आपको सलाह देना चाहते हैं कि आप पूरी फिल्म का इस्तेमाल करें। यह आपका आखिरी प्रयोग है। आपके पास जितनी भी फिल्म है, उसका इस्तेमाल करें। जिम यहाँ है और हम आपसे इस पुनः प्रवेश के बारे में थोड़ी बात 
Okay, Jim. Just as kind of a lead-in to this procedure that we're going to use for the mid-course to use and it's going to be a manual burn. The attitude will be controlled manually; the start/stop on the engine will be controlled manually. So we have a pretty good vector on you now, and it turns out you're coming in a little bit too shallow. So what that means is we're going to make our burn to come in a little more steeply, and we're going to be coming in around the dark side of the Earth. Therefore, to come in more steep, ou
13, Ho
Apollo 8, Houston. Go ah
MA
250° a f:8, penso
Roger. And I understand he was down there and really enjoyed watchin
Okay. As of, your batteries - you had battery A with 39.32 amp-hours, battery B had 35.21, and battery C 38.46. Your cryo quantities remaining at were the same we gave you the last time, 180 pounds of oxygen per tank and 11 pounds of hydrogen per tank. At present, the service module, using the computer values for the quantities, you have quad A with 45 percen
还有，休斯顿，水瓶座。我不确定如果我听从指示并忽略这些针头，那是
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait p
Ich habe jetzt eine
Die wichtigste Nachricht in Houston heute betrifft di
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अब से लेकर जब तक हम इस स्थिति में बदलाव 
Парциальное давление кислорода в салоне в данный момент составляет примерно 3,9–4,0 (psi). Температура теплооб
حسنًا يا جاك، أثناء البث التلفزيوني، كنا نستخدم وضع التتبع التلقائي، وعرض الحزمة الضيق، والإلكترونيات الأساسية. وقد حصلنا على تثبيت جيد. بعد بدء المناورة مباشرة، تمكنت 
Хорошо. Я прос
"- - Quando il DELTA-VX è uguale al DELTA-VX finale," cancella quella riga. Cancella "CONTROLLO ASSETTO: IMBARDATA, a IMPULSO." Agg
Apollo 8, Houston. You don't need to answer
Apollo 11, this is Houston. When 
Gemini VII, VI. From our plot on the data point, looks like we're right on the line. The last data point was 38 degrees at about 22 mi
ठीक है। हम आपको कैनरी सिस्टम्स को सौंप रहे ह
Magnifique, Frank. Je te comprends parfaitement. Comment ç
Some of these craters look like pickaxes striking conc
Okay. Well, I'll wait till you f
In diesem Moment habe ich definitiv das Gef
已审
F
D'accord. RN, RP, +77, angle de tangage à 400 pieds nominaux; correction, 400 000 pieds nominaux; RET 400 000 pieds, 22 + 02; début de la panne de courant, 24 + 43; fin de la panne de courant, 30 +
Weißt du, das war einfach so 
Oui. C'est ce à quoi nous pensons aussi. Vous voulez que je fasse un rapide calcul? Il semblerait que… Nous en avons discuté, et il semblerait que nous alignions nos plateformes, puis que nous coupions l'alimentation de l'une et la laissions allumée pour 
Это «Дружба Семь». В данный момент, МАРК, подо мной еще видны облака, закат был прекрасен. Он очень быстро стих. На горизонте все еще видна яркая синяя полоса, почти полностью закрывающая мое окно. Красные оттенки заката я все еще могу разглядеть сквозь облака далеко слева от моего кур
卷帘门没放下来，门也打不开了。这大概是第三组了。我们从第一组开始，每隔五分钟拍一组，现在它们都出
Kilo 0,9 et 6,3. Merci. Une seule de ces cases de la grille correspond à peu près à la surface maximal
確定です。「イベントタイマーの設定」の下で、ENTERを押します。125
Pas une brûlure.
是的。我们已收到通知，请
Ok, lo spegnerò appena sarò in Africa. Non vedo q
Ja, ganz sicher – wie das Ding funk
Houston, Columbia. Ich verstehe euch laut und deutlich. Wie geh
Roger. Copy MAX g 6.3; R2 at, 6.48; range to go,, 14033; RET V c
حسناً يا كين، ل
Houston, this 
S'il vous p
Lasciami *** su stretto 
Mentre puntiamo verso l'alto in questa direzione, vediamo il Sole che passa dai nostri finestrini laterali e, naturalmente, da uno dei nostri finestrini in questo momento vediamo la Terra. Ora, proprio dietro il mio finestrino, ovviamente, abbiamo il Sole, perché il Sole illumina le carte stellari che vediamo. Questa linea rappresenta il piano dell'eclittica e queste linee, verticali, rappresentano il nostro sistema di riferimento che la sonda sta utilizzando in questo momento. Man mano che
У меня есть какое-то представление о том, что я собираюсь это с
이미 
알겠습니다. 수신했습니다. 651이 깜빡이는 것이 보이네요. 실제로 레지스터 1과 2를 아주 명확하게 읽
Okay. And circuit breakers on panel 5 we w
네, 맞습니다. 저희는 말씀하신 대로 마
قد تلاحظون بالنسبة للأشخاص في معهد ماساتشوستس للتكنولوجيا أن سلسلة النجوم التالية سيتم تصويرها بواسطة الملاح الرئيسي وهو يرتدي خوذة فضائية وعدسات عين
روجر. النجوم 2
燃料电池
D'acc
Et, 13, ici Houston. J'ai u
分かりました、ジャック。それによると、LMPは約6時間睡眠をとることになっています。その間、CDRとCMPは何か食べるようにしてください。私は69時に起床します。CDRとCMPは70時に睡眠し、76時に起
罗杰，如果你
1 hour and 10 mi
मैंने दो तस्वीरें लीं - 45 और 46। मैं अभी अफ्रीका के ऊपर से गुजर रहा हूं और सहारा रेगि
Роджер. А он
네,
Хорошо, Джек. Мы хотим, чтобы ты оставил 
हेलो, हवाई कॉम टेक। 
정말 말똥말똥
现在，我来给你简要汇报一下，目前宇航服进气口（温
Роджер. Подождите. Вы отлично выглядите
روجر. 
좋습니다. 다음, 두 번째, 세 번째도 동일하고, 그 다음에는 테이프 레코더를 중앙으로 앞으로, 테이프 모션 토크백을 바버폴로, 전원을 중앙으로, 그리고 PMP 전원을 중앙으로 설정해 주세요. 이상입
Gemelli VI, Roger
كولومبيا، ه
- - 좋아요, 나머지 두 명이
О, да. У нас есть 
Мы это получим, Джек, но... Подожд
حسناً. ت
حسنًا يا فريد، أعتقد أنك فهمت. لم أنقل شرحك حرفيًا، لكن الأمر بهذه البساطة. سنضع الخرطوشة الجديدة - الجزء العلوي منها مقابل الجزء السفلي من القديمة - ونحرك سدادة المنشفة، ون
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь», управляю вручную по электронной системе управления, без проблем. Очень плавно и легко; управляется отлично. Пред
Und Mrs. Robert Goddard sagte heute, ihr Mann wäre überglücklich gewesen. „Er hätte nicht gejubelt oder so. Er hätte einfach nur gestrahlt.“ Sie füg
9, /: 45597, минус 040, плюс 157, плюс 34188, минус 01353, плюс 00780 180 008 001, NA, плюс 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, вниз 131, влево 28, плюс 0758, минус 16500 12987, плюс - или 36277; и это Сириус и Ригель 129 155 010, четыре реактивных двигателя, 15 секунд, 1,2 градуса на
Address 82 is 
オーケー、チャーリー。着いた
Roger
Verseau ici. Allez-y, Housto
حسنًا، أبو
Это был сброс шины AC 2, верно? Хорошо. Пропустим следующий шаг, и на панели 4 нам нужно выключить GAGING; выключить TELCOM G
تم إرسال ذلك عبر نظ
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。クルーの状況報告と、先ほどCO2ボンベを交換したこ
私たちはそれを
Roger. Things axe
何か不満は
罗格。我不确定我们靠近时出了什么问题，但我可以告诉你一件事，我很庆幸我们花了那么多时间
哦，那太好了。不过我把洛弗尔安排到沙发底下去了。现在左边沙发底下睡着一个人，右边沙发底下也睡着一个人
ヒューストン、テープを返して
로저. 홍콩 남
了解。ちょっとおかしな状況ですね。既にピッチが70度までずれていますが、皆さんは何かベントとか、そういったものがあったのでしょうか？それが我々をここまで追い詰めるような速度上昇の原因
और, एक्वेरियस, अब हम आप पर काफी सटीक निशाना साध रहे हैं। और ऐसा लग रहा है कि आप कॉरिडोर से थोड़ा बाहर हैं। हम 104 घंटे पर 7 फुट प्रति सेकंड की मध्य गति से आप पर नज़र रख रहे हैं। संचार बाधित होने की स्थिति में उपयोग करने
Хорошо. Выключите сейча
偏光フィルターを通した写真についておっしゃっていましたが、あれは偏光フィルターを通したテレビの写真
Nein, 
Это пов
रॉजर, बज़। यह एक प्रविष्टि PAD, MPL है, जो रोल 05, 35 से शुरू होती है - सुधार - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, प्लस 1102, माइनस 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, संज्ञा 69, सभी चार लाइनें NA हैं। D शून्य से शुरू: 400 02 09. ब्लैकआउट का RET, 00 17 03 38 08 20. सेक्स्टेंट तारा, 02 0945 149. बोरसाइट तारा स्कॉर्पी थीटा है, यानी स्कॉर्पी थीटा। ऊपर 315, दाईं ओर 35, लिफ्ट वेक्टर ऊपर। और टिप्पणियाँ: यह एंट्री PAD मिडकोर्स 6 को नहीं मानती है। और आपकी 
Ein strahlend blauer Horizontstreifen, während die Sonne immer tiefer sinkt
Et, Jim, dans le simulateur avec notre configuration, le système est très stable à 10 %, donc nous ne pensons pas que vous
Джо, ты план
アクエリアスさん、当面の決定は、電源を入れたままにし、
अगर ऐसा है तो यह बहुत ही शानदा
在后部定位销上，雷达可以指向X点，而我将使用右后方。这
私は追跡する
カントン、シグマ・セブンです。聞こえま
रॉजर। वैसे, अगर आप सोच रहे थे तो बता दूं कि अगले ऑर्बिट के लिए आपकी बारी है। केप भी इससे सहमत है। 4-1 के लिए आपक
أقو
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। CO2 सिलेंडरों के संबंध में, यहाँ PCO2 का स्तर अभी 1.6 है। हमें उम्मीद है कि हमारे पास मौजूद दो सिलेंडरों से हम कम से कम 6 घंटे और काम चला सकते हैं। हालांकि, 112 घंटे पूरे होने पर, जब कई लोग काम पर पहुँच जाएँगे, तो हम दो और सिलेंडर लगाएँगे और इसके लिए हमारे पास नई सरल प्रक्रिया उपलब्ध है। लेकिन इस बीच, अगर हमें सिलेंडर बदलने की आवश्यकता पड़ती है, तो हम प्राथमिक सिलेंडर का 
今日は面白い日になりそ
رو
Roger, Mike. I'd like to give some comments on data. The auto maneuver was quite accurate. Looks like we got some substellar point in the maneuver; auto optics put Canopus straight
Alright, we're coming up on bus ti
I
Okay. Würden
Roger, Houston. -1 latitudine meno 606269, longitudine su 2, meno 78954, altitudine più 00152; per -2 latitudine meno 09638, longitudine su 2, più 81691, altitudine meno 00007. Ho provato a ottenere -3 allo stesso passaggio, ma
Спускаемся к 
Роджер. Я уже несколько ра
分かりました。給湯器についてですが、私も自分の給湯器をもらったのは面白いですね。マイクをONにすると、自分の声が2秒ほど遅れて聞こえるんです。一次ボイラーと二次ボイ
हमें खुशी है
저는 부스터를 향해 초속 약 5피트(약 1.5m)의 추력을 가했습니다. 분리 연소는 대략 6~7
D'accord
罗杰。我想我们还会给你安排一些跟踪任务，而且我们希望你能尽快完成大部
不久前我打开了面罩，吃了木糖片。我船上其他的食物要么碎了，要么融化了。现在都不能吃了，所以我想这颗木糖片将是我在零重力状态下的最后一餐。不过，第一颗木糖片，在食物
罗杰，你现在处于什么模
Да. Джо, какой длины он? Длинный, короткий или
ठीक है, बस मुझे उसके स्थ
Запись следующая: середина Тихого океана, 357 152 359 268, плюс 08:13, минус
Roger. Vorrei fare una domanda su questa
Хорошо. И первое изменение коснется Sur
Gemini 4, Canary CAP COM. I tuoi sist
Das ist völlig in Ordn
Thanks,
Okay. Let me give you my observations on main bus B. Things happened pretty fast there, and we first heard the impact or explosion or whatever caused it, I'm not sure. The next - About 1 second later, there was a MASTER ALARM which was the MAIN BUS B UNDERVOLT. I looked at the voltage, and the voltage was good at this time so I'm suspecting it was a spike. Fuel cell 3 was also good, with good flow. However, Fred, at that point, was coming into the command module and got over into his seat. At that time, we shortly had an AC BUS 2 light about the time he got into his seat. He looked at the MAIN BUS B and the MAIN 
D'ac
Okay. Für Notfälle haben wir die Festverriegelungen, und für den normalen Gebrauch ist eine 15-minütige Anfrage erforderlich, um die Heizunge
Roger, Amicizia Sette. Sentite l'impatto con la ca
아니요, OAMS 역화재의 발사 속도를 낮게 설
Okay. First off, it looks like it's going to be impossible to get away from the fact that you guys are dominating all the news back here on Earth. Even Pravda in Russia is headlining the mission and calls Neil, "The Czar of the Ship." I think maybe they go
Роджер. Понял, следующ
Möchtest du mir den Startzähler mitteilen, damit ich meine Uhr starten k
Roger. We're at that stag
네, 맞습니다, 잭. 이제 1-6페이지로 가보죠. 페이지 아래쪽 3분의 1쯤에 "Panel 275 CB MAIN A, BAT C, closed"라고 나와 있는데, 이 줄과 그 다음 두 줄을 지웁니다. "MAIN A, BAT C, closed; MAIN B, BAT C, closed; and DC INDICAT
ठीक है। निगरानी फिर से शुरू हो गई है। हम यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि हम तापमान नियंत्रण की कीमत पर तारों को देखने में अति न कर दें, इसलिए कृपया हम पर नज़र रखें और अगर 
Okay. Jetzt nutze ich den Mond links von mir, und das hilft wirklich gut. Ich decke den Lagenanzeiger ab, damit ihr die Gierbewegung beobachten könnt. Ich deaktiviere die Kreiselsteuerung und versuche, jetzt den Fly-by-Wire-Modus für niedrige Flughöhen zu wählen. Ich positioniere den Mond zuerst in der Mitte des Sichtfelds – halte dabei Rollen und Nicken gedrückt und bringe den Mond dann wieder an seine ursprüngliche Position. Der Mond nähert sich jetzt der Mitte des Sichtfelds. Okay, ich halte ihn dort an und steuere das Rollen, um das auszugleichen. Okay, jetzt habe ich 0
요각 지시계(yaw atti
네. 시간 되실 때 다음 밸브들을 확인하시고, 저희
جيميني 8، جيميني 8، اتصال قائد سرب القيادة ع
रॉजर। अब हम उस चरण में हैं जहाँ हम पृथ्वी के मौसम की कुछ तस्वीरें लेने जा रहे हैं। अगर आप आस-पास खड़े हैं, तो मैंने कैमरा पृथ्वी की ओर कर रखा है, और जब मै
केबिन स्टीम वेंट 10 है; सूट स्टीम वेंट 62 ह
Roger. And your
Roger, Canton. Très bien, je vais vous faire 
يشير إلى 6 غرام
Sieh
了解しました。まずは世界のニュースから始めましょう。アメリカのアポロ8号宇宙飛行士たちへの称賛と、宇宙探査における国際協力への期待が、小さな宇宙船が月を周回する中、世界中にクリスマスイブのメッセージとして届きました。共産圏でさえ、人類初の月への旅に熱狂が沸き起こりました。モスクワでは、ソ連の科学者アナトリー・ベサラノフ氏が、自国とアメリカが以前に宇宙に関する知識を共有していたことを振り返り、アポロ8号の飛行がさらなる協力につながると予測しました。キューバでは、ラジオ・ハバナがボイス・オブ・アメリカの番組を再放送し、アポロ8号の演説をリスナーに伝えました。ボイスの関係者によると、米国の機関の番組がハバナのラジオで放送されたのは初めてとのことです。チェコスロバキアでは、テレビの広範な報道を通して月面飛行の様子を目にしました。ハンガリーのブダペストでは、電車やバスの中では月面飛行以外の話題はほとんど聞かれませんでした。非共産圏では、オフィスワーカーやクリスマスの買い物客たちは、宇宙船が地球への打ち上げに向けて準備される様子を息を呑んで見守っていた。街頭に繰り出したフランス人たちは、アメリカのノウハウとこの宇宙での偉業を称賛し、テレビで月面の
네. 그쪽 기지 위로 풍선을 날려 보내려고 했는데 실패했어요.
ジェミニ4、RKV CAP 
いい
وهناك بعض درجات الحرارة التي نراقبها. لقد أوقفنا تشغيل السخانات. ونحن نراقبها، وتشمل هذه درجات حرارة s و 
En observant les alentours, le contraste est globalement dû à l'ombre portée par le soleil: un gris très clair, un halo autour de mon ombre et de celle de mon casque. En regardant au loin,
À ce stade, nous avons tellement de lumière du solei
好的。杰克，你每次发射信号时，自动增益控制（AGC）就开始下降，
Das Tonbandgerät funktioniert weder im automatischen noch im manuellen Aufnahmemodus; es scheint, als sei das Band leer. Bitte spulen Sie 
Apollo 8, ici 
D'accord. Nous allons au terminus. - Vas-y
罗杰。我们现在正
ठीक है, जैक। इससे कोई फर्क नहीं पड़ता। हम 
Le réglage est à -50 degrés. Les gyroscopes sont libres. Maintien à -50 degrés. En attente d'un liseré. Le roulis et le lacet sont 
好的。RN，RP，加77，400英尺标称高度俯仰角；修正值，400K英尺标称高度；RET 400K英尺，22加02；断电开始，24加43；断电结束，30加01；减速伞，31加37；主伞
D'accord. La prochaine fois, je mettrai mo
لقد التقطت صورة، صورة جيدة جداً، لمطار القاهرة من ال
Ta coupe est vraime
रॉजर और गोर्डो, हमने अपने प्राथमिक स्क
Это верно. На странице 2-1, строка номер 2, укажите время "Мину
ठीक है। हम पावर एम्प में PRIM मोड में हैं और रेंजिंग मोड
ヘリコプターでサモアまでお連れしま
Sai, sono un po' contento di aver indossa
Я вижу, как работают ваши
わかりました。エントリー1を見てください。2番目の項
Positiv
我现在看不到下
حسنًا. الآن، إن لم تخني الذاكرة، أعتقد أنه من المفترض أن تقوم بربط البراغي مباشرةً دون أي تأخير. نحدد الوقت الذي يتم فيه الربط. لذا، بمجرد أن تدون ا
わかりました。セカンダリー・ラド・インは70度、つまり約72度と伝えました。ラド・アウトは約30度、グリコール蒸発温度は約65度、蒸気圧は最大で、グリコール排出圧力は約9psiです。アキュムレーター（セカンダリー・アキュムレーター・スーツ）は約52度、キャビンは約58度、圧力はスーツが4.1度、キャビンが5度です。CO2分圧は1を少し超える約1.1度まで上昇しています。家の側面では、温度は72度、ヘリウムは3500度、N2 Aは2300度、N2 Bは約2450度です。燃料は約165度、燃料電池1は両方とも閉で、ジップになっています。スキン温度は405度、凝縮排気は低目盛りです。燃料セル2 - 現在、O2またはH2フローの測定値は0.13～0.14です。O2フローはフルスケールで上限値を維持していますが、スラスターの活動状況によって変動しています。また、メインバスAの電圧も約1.1Vからフルスケールまで低下しています。スキン温度は約445度、凝縮排気は17V（
روجر، باز. استراحة. استراحة. كولومبيا، هذه هيوستن. عندما ينتهي نطاق هوائي الكسب العالي، فلنطلب إمالة دلتا متعددة الاتجاهات، إمالة دلتا متعددة الاتجا
이곳의 지평선은 아주 뚜렷합니다. 하늘은 칠흑같이 어둡고, 땅, 아니 달은 아주 밝습니다. 하늘과 달의 대비는 선명한 검은 선처럼 보입니다. 이제 카메라 시야에 들어오는 것은 흥미로운 오래된 이중 고리 크레이터들입니다. 이 크레이터들은 바다 지역에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 지형으로, 바다와 같은 점성과 색깔을 가진 물질로 채워져 있습니다. 여기 세네 개의 흥미로운 지형이 보입니다. 지평선 너머로 보이는 것은… 이제 솟아오르는 산들은 수많은 크레이터로 뒤덮여 있으며, 큰 크레이터들 중 상당수에서는 중심 봉우리를 볼 수 
في الدقيقة 02:30 من اليوم السابق، أثناء فصل الطاقة عن الكابل، أول ما نقوم به هو خطوتان: فتح قاطع الدائرة الرئيسي B، وقاطع دائرة الطاقة الرئيسي B، ثم هناك خطوة ثالثة تقول "قاطع دائرة
听起来不错。好的。我们用模拟设备进行了一次入港前准备的练习，我们注意到LMP清单S-12页上，关于加满减压瓶的部分，我认为是一个印刷错误；应该是“加注阀”而不是“减
Роджер, время 2 Alpha — 01:36:13, GMT — 14:21:30. Это уч
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Bitte wiederho
ठीक है। कंटेनर पर चिपचिपा सि
रॉजर। क्या तुमने मेरा पिछला संदेश पढ़ा? ह्यूस्टन तुम्हें गुआयमास के ऊपर अंतरिक्ष या
Roger. Le désengagement de l'ACA n'a pas suffi car les commutateurs de mode
L'analyse préliminaire des données indique que le moteur central S-II a vibré avec une amplitude légèrement supérieure à celle observée lors des vols précédents, et ce, environ 160 secondes après le début de sa combustion. Ces vibrations ont entraîné une chute de pression dans la chambre de combustion, déclenchant l'arrêt du moteur central par les deu
J
Наилучший угол наклона С
Abbiamo preso due tubi di carotaggio, un eolico solare e circa metà del grande sacco di campioni di rocce assortite che ho raccolto in fretta e furia
好的。实际上，这样做的好处是，它能让你进行压力测试——隧道压力完整性测试，或者舱门压力完整性测试——隧道和舱室之间的压差为 3 psi。然后你不需要进行排气步骤。你只需让它保持在那里，直到你与舱门分离。这样就能产生类
Мы могли бы передвинуть — мы могли бы передвинуть эту су
نعم، إنه 
Ah, bene. Abbiamo perso ogni contatto con te. Ho l'ora
好
Температура в куполе поддерживается на уровне 70 градусов. Температура в кабине — 50 градусов. Комфортная температура во вентилируемом скафандре — 62 градуса. Давление в скафандре стабильно — 5 psi. Очень интересное облачное образ
不。我
روجر. لديّ أوقات T1 وT2، بالإضافة إلى خط طول النجم 1
Sì, sembra che stiamo esplorando un territorio m
— ВКЛЮЧИТЬ — ВКЛЮЧИТЬ — УВЕЛИЧЬТЕ ДРОССЕЛЬНУЮ ЗАСЛОНКУ ДО МИНИМУМ. Хорошо, через 35 минут мы включим питание от батареи и 
حسنًا يا فريد، كان هناك بعض التشويش ف
रॉजर। मात्
Ok. Salta 3. Vogliamo SEC LOGIC, due OFF, giù, 
روجر. أنت تنظر إلى نظام دلتا-آر دلتا-في الخاص بنا. يبدو أن دلتا-آر كب
짐이 방금 또 다른 인공위성을 봤어요. 전에 봤던 것
네, 프레드. 이제 목소리가 아주 또렷하게 들리시죠? 좋습니다. 지금 준비 중인 절차는 약 74시간, 즉 3시간 조금 넘게 후에 태양 점검을 하는 것입니다. 2단계 정지(detent 2)가 될 것이고, 곧 자세한 절차를 알려드리겠습니다. 이 절차에는 랑데부 레이더 재
착륙 지점은 간신히 어둠 속에 가려져 있습니다. 윗부분만 보이고 아랫부분은 완전히 어둠 속에 있는 작은 분화구가 바로 그것입니다. 작고 윤곽이 뚜렷한 이 분화구는 몰트케 분화구로
Roger. I can see the entire landing area from the position I'm in l
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। गोल्डस्टोन पूरी तरह से तैयार है, और आप उस
En la regardant maintenant, là, tout de suite,
Mark, 1 minute. La pression cabine est conforme aux prévisions; le carburant et 
Roger. L'altimètre, réglé sur sa position,
En regardant à l'étranger, on constate que la première autoroute de Corée du Sud, reliant Séoul au port d'Incheon, a été baptisée « Autoroute Apollo » en hommage à votre voyage. Je crois que nous avons mentionné hier soir que le président Nixon a déjà entamé son tour du monde et qu'il se trouve aujourd'hui à San Francisco, première étape de son périple. Il se rendra ensuite à bord de l'USS Hornet, d'où il assistera au retour de votre vaisseau spatial. Il prévoit de visiter sept pays, dont la R
今のところ地上に無視の兆候はありません、フレンドシップ・セブン。ハワイ。オーバ
D'accord. Alors, comment est la vue de l'extérieur maintenant, Joe? On se prépa
D'accor
Roger, mi sto preparando. Pronti per la t
휴스턴, 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다
रॉजर, बज़। मुझे लगता है कि मैं बात समझ 
Ja. Wir sind jetzt weit genug draußen, dass – ich glaube, 
Выглядит 
शेफ को मेरी हार्दिक बधाई। खाना ल
جيميني 6، هيوستن، لقد انتهينا من تحديث انحياز مقياس التسارع. يمكنك العودة إلى ما قبل الإطلا
メインA/メイ
罗杰，加州。我已在 05 中设置 - 更正，。Guaymas Cap Com，你读
The oxygen pressure h
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 이제 2분 남았습니다. 주 증발기 정비
Gemini VIII, I have some new rescue data
はい、アポロ8号です。まだ写真がありません
はい、その通りです。夜通し、半径10度の範囲内に留まっている様子を示していまし
Sie wissen ja, dass bei unserem speziellen Raumschiff der Schutzschalt
Okay, es sieht so aus, als ob wir über der Südspitze Afrikas einige beleuchtete Gebiete sehen. Ich habe definitiv eine Stadt in Sicht, und – hier spricht Sigma Seven. Im Sendemodus habe ich nur VOX-Aufnahme. Ich habe definitiv eine Stadt in Afrika in Sicht. Sie tauchte zum ersten Mal nach wenigen Sekunden auf. Die Lichter sind sehr deutlich zu erkennen. Ich befinde mich derzeit im Rückwärtsflug, um meine Position zu markieren, und der Mond liegt auf me
سفينة المحيط الهندي، هذا سيجما سفن على التردد ا
T
OAMSヒー
车厢风扇开启时会发出
ふたご
…セカンダリーで。15まで上げましょう。ヘッドセット
Roger. We are still dumping your tapes. The voice quality on high bit is coming through superb, and you are GO for the next rev. And we would like to get a brief status report on your 
A 36 anni sono an
이글, 휴스턴. 우리는 무슨 일이든 상관없어요. 우리가 하려는 건 단지 표류율을 알아내고, 투하 후에 물체가 완전히 
Okay. And our guys down here are watching high-gain antenna pointing program, so anytime you're not using the for anything else, they'd like to watch it for a couple of cycles, so if you would leave that on the display it will he
他们
Nous vous avons – Ten
罗杰。9-3 04 36 19。07+59。15+47
13، هيوس
Roger. I've got some more talking to do about
휴스턴, 여기는 아폴로
हाँ, अभी एक मिनट पहले मैं इसी के बारे में ब
Laissez l'o
هذا مركز عمليات هاواي. جاهزون. كل شيء يبدو على ما يرام 
D'accord. Pourquoi ne pas remettre le véhicule en position d'attente et le remettre en mode maintien d'attitude pour le roulement? Nous allons ensuite réexaminer les exigences. Il semble que les résultats 
能否将实时时间/测量开关设
Roger. Da qui si gode di una bella v
알겠습니다, 짐. 이해했습니다. 저희가 그걸 복사했는데, 혹시 다시 보시면 별이 반짝이는 부분이나 추가적인 정보가 
G
Be sure and give us 
좋아요. 3, 2,
Bo
そうです。通報しました。かなり前に通報したと思います。今はテープで覆わ
Sì, avevo intenzione di sperimentare molto con i filtri, solo quelli, mentre dormivi. La cosa successiva che avrei fatto sarebbe stata semplicemente tirare fuori il sestante e spe
Deux autres questions: avez-vo
Ah! Ah! Ho ancora i segni neri di sbandata sulle pinne dopo la tua fuga nella boscaglia. Okay, vedi che ho virato di nuovo a destra. Devo tornare - correzione, ho virato a sinistra. Devo tornare a destra, la luna è proprio all'orizzonte. La rimetto a destra, giusto per mostrarti quanto è facile da acquisire. Sembra che io stia ritardando il mi
好的。这段话献给罗德·罗斯和圣克里斯托弗教堂的教友们，实际上也献给全世界的人们。上帝啊，请赐予我们洞察力，让我们即便在人类的种种失败中，也能在世间看到您的爱。请赐予我们
わかりました。少し前に教えていただいたバッテリーのアンペア数を確認しています。0.5アンペアから1アンペアくらい低い数値を希望しています。ジャックに、これまでに接続した回路ブレーカーとスイッチを確認して、MAIN Aに余分な負荷がかかっていないか確認してもらってください。具体的には、Floodlight設定、CAUTION AND WARNING（注意と警告）回路ブレーカー、そしてESSE
Apollo 11, Houston. À vous de jouer. Te
了解。プラス1418、マイナス
로저. 한 가지 더 말씀드리자면, 알려주신 제어점 시간이 약간 어긋나 있고, 이 지도들을 비교해 보니 정렬 상태도 그다지 좋지 않은 
Okay. I'll just let go of it, Buzz; it will be ha
Je l'ai juste
يب
क्या आ
休斯顿，阿波罗11号。在陨石坑背面一个较大的陨石坑里，我注意到外壁上有一个小小的黑点，于是我用单筒望远镜观察了一下。我看到了——哦，大概有四分之一英里直径的区域。那是一个看起来很新鲜的深色坑，这与其他陨石坑壁上那些新鲜的小坑或孔洞形成了鲜明的对比。在这个坑周围似乎有两三个这样的坑—
Понял, Джим. Мы стараемся как можно быстрее завершить разра
, Canary. Tieni presente che nei tuoi 15 secondi di combustione hai raggiunto una velocità di 12,6 pie
Bonjour Houston, ici Apollo 8. La caméra de télévision est maintenant pointée 
Roger. Je com
Roger. J'ai amarré en mode AUTO, et comme je l'ai dit, je n'étais pas vraiment sûr du moment du contact. Je vérifiais constamment les indicateurs de la sonde d'amarrage. J'ai obtenu deux barres de barbier indiquant que les tro
रॉजर। मैं समझ गया। जॉन, जाइरो की समस्या के बारे
Okay. I'll do a ENTER with the MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD and then 30 clicks of right yaw to set the
Roger, 11. Wir müssen uns darüber keine Gedanken mehr machen. Der Höhenmesser hat jetzt den Standardwert von 29,92. Das be
Du musst es nicht auseinander
Il
Apollo 8, Houston. Per quanto riguarda il confronto, usando i vettori, otteniamo un -1,4 su quella rotta intermedia rispetto al tuo 2,8. Abbiamo elaborato le tue soluzioni al computer e anche in questo caso otteniamo un 2,8, quindi il risultato sembra buono. Siamo ancora impegnati a modificare i vettori e a 
ジョー、私が見た限りでは、爆発
D'accord. Je vais demander à Jack de configurer le tout. Il pourra noter les instructions et on récupére
Ok, Jim. È stata
في مكان أقرب قليلاً هنا، في ممفيس، تينيسي، أطلق والدا فتاة صغيرة، السيد والسيدة إيدي لي ماكجي، عليها اسم "موديل" (وحدة). وقالت السيدة ماكجي: "لم تكن فكرتي، بل كانت فكرة زوجي". وأضافت أنها ترددت في البداية بشأن اسم "لونار موديول ماكجي" (وحدة قمرية 
Roger. Co
F5.6，最后那四张照片的焦距是 F3.8。光线很暗。
Apollo 8, Houston. C'est suffisant pour la pile à 
Roger. Lo scopo principale di questo è, come ho detto, permetterci di controllare il tuo trasduttore di flusso di O2. Tuttavia, abbiamo ancora bisogn
حسنًا. أعتقد أن ما سنفعله هنا هو، إ
Gemini VI. Nous sommes encore à environ 248 km. Heure d'arrivée e
はい。
D'accord. De p
Okay, back to page 18. We'll continue on
아니요. 말씀드릴 때
That's affirmative. That ENTER is what starts the dump. Then we just prior to that want to make sure we got 10 000; 
Ok, Jim. Mancano ci
わかりました。R1に03750を入力することをお勧めします。これで毎秒0.3度の回転速度が得
Okay. come segue: /: 45597, meno 040, più 157, più 35189, meno 01513, meno 00346 180 007 000, non applicabile, più 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, Scorpii Delta (Dzuba), giù 071, sinistra 45, più 0748 meno 16500 12995 36300; Sirius, Rigel, 129 155 010; quattro quad, 15 secondi, li
Roger, Fred. E fateci sapere quando andrete a
好的。这就是我们希望您使用的配置，我们是这样考虑的。当我们把1号水箱设置为自动，
ジェミニ4、ヒュースト
分かりました。そうしま
Во
さて、飛行計画には停止する場所が記されています。ここに書いてあります。ピッチ 
휴스턴, 안녕하세요. 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 지금 텔레비전 카메라를 지구로 향하게 했
11番、ヒューストン。ブロックに戻ってく
حسنًا. "حتى 
好的。从我们这
J'avais la synchroni
D'accord, Jack. Ça me paraît très bie
D'accor
حسناً. سننت
Oui. Je suppose que c'est en partie parce que vous êtes plus loin. Nous voulions 
是的，你的轨道（远地点-近地点）大约会增加
로저. 하와이에서 제미니
Ripet
इनमें से कुछ गड्ढे ऐसे दिखते हैं
सच कहूँ तो, मुझे यहाँ अंदर
Ich habe ein paar Fotos mit Blende 2.8 und Blitzlicht gemacht. Hier ist eins vom Ballon. Die Sonne ist jetzt zu hell. Daher kommen die kleinen weißen Frostpartike
Okay. You're going to delete between 2 hours and 15 there, and you're going to add it, if there is time, only 
Роджер, Аполлон-8. Несколько замечаний: мы рассмотрели ваши векторы состояния и всю предоставленную информацию. Платформа выглядит хорошо, и, похоже, вы можете обойти это ограничение, если хотите, ваша платформа останется работоспособной и при следующем проходе. Мы хотели 
罗杰。沃利，你的超高频信号传输有点失真。你可以
حسنًا. أعتقد أن الجميع تقريبًا يتصورون برنامج الفضاء على أنه مليء بالإلكترونيات المتطورة، وبالتأكيد، هذا صحيح إلى حد كبير. لكنني فكرت في عرض بعض الأدوات هنا بالتزامن مع ذلك. بعد الأولى، ستحصل على قياس دقيق جدًا لكمية الماء المتبقية في الخزان. سنستخدم هذه الحقيبة التي أعرضها الآن لجمع الماء المتبقي من الخزان ومعرفة الكمية المتبقية لدينا بالفعل، ونأمل أن نتمكن، في المهمات المستقبلية، من تمديد الوقت المسموح به لهذه الوحدات بأمان لفترة أطول. وفي يدي الأخرى، لديّ الآلية التي نحدد بها كمية الماء الم
نتفق معك في
Einen Moment bitte
इवैप
Тогда мы выполним только один вариант, если вы захотите. Наш п
E siamo a circa 7 minuti di distanza, quindi abbiamo circa 7 mi
रॉजर, जैक। आप हमारे बर्न कार्ड, हम
この岩塊は、最終降下時に通過した、この大きくて鋭い縁を持つ岩のリムクレーターに起源を持つのではないかと考えています。昨日、私はそれがフットボール競技場ほどの大きさだと言いましたが、実際、近づくにつれて測るのが少し難しくなりました。しかし、私たちが通り過ぎた時には、アストロドームにちょうど収まるだろうと思いました。そして、この岩のリムクレーター付
ठीक है। हमें 02:15 G.m.t. पर एक नया D-8 मिलेगा। हमन
Мы — мы опережаем график приема пищи в этот период, но отстаем от графика приема пищи в прошлый пери
Strahlend blauer Himmel; 32 Sekunden; 9.000 Fuß, Treibstoff- und 
Nun, es erstreckt sich über die gesamte Länge des Sextanten. Tatsächlich konnte ich uns schon kommen sehen, als wir uns näherten, denn der Lichtstreifen im Sucherfernrohr verlief genau dort, wo sich der Mond befand, und e
Beh, penso che probabilmente pensassero che queste particelle che ho visto potessero provenire da lì, ma queste sono... 
Roger. 7,5, 7,5 und 6,5. Und ich habe hier noch ein paar Worte zur Motorleistu
好的，谢谢。收到
안 돼, 마이크. 쌍안경을 쓰든 안 쓰든, 우리는 터미네이터 너머는 아무것도 볼 수 없어. 지구가
Frank, we've got some guys looking at it. We might be able to find a way to make it work for you. Hopefully, by a couple of hours before TV time t
Tout ce que 
Это «Сигма Семь» в режиме AT. Отсутствует 
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Убедитесь, что звезда прицеливания и SPA — эт
Well, let me try 
Gemini 4, Хьюс
彼がそれを持っていることを願います.
Apol
Roger. If you're reading me now, I am in hot mike because I'm in ICS push to talk, and D
Okay. Die zweit
Roger. C'est entré sans probl
बज़, कृपया प्रतीक्षा करें। जहाँ तक मुझे पता है, म
ठीक है। हमें लगता है कि अब आप बिना किसी नुकसान
Следующее, что мы сделаем, будет в 1
Loud and clear. It's nice to have someon
Roger. Die Signalstärke fiel sehr schnell 
好了，斯科特
了解しました。現在地は東を振り返って東
रॉजर, जिम। अगर आपके पास अभी कुछ मिनट हैं, तो मैं आपको प्रवेश प्रक्रिया में हुए बदला
Роджер. Мы не хотим выбрасывать водородный бак, в котором произошло расслоение, поэтому не могли бы вы, пожалуйста, включить и выключить вент
ठीक है। अब चरण 3, सुधार, पृष्ठ 3, चेकआउट पर आगे बढ़ते हैं। चरण 1, चरण 1 करें। चेतावनी बत्तियाँ ASCENT PRESS, CES AC, और CES DC होंगी। चेतावनी बत्तियों के नीचे, हीटर की बत्ती भी हो सकती है। बस इतन
고도 속도, 3.5 하강, 220피트; 13 전진, 11 전진, 순조롭게 하강 중. 20
ダメだ、ブルース。緯度経度を2乗して、高度とグリッドのマス目だけ教えてくれ。他のこと
收到。不行，自动模式下指示灯没亮，我现
Pas de problème, Gene, vas-y, je prends 
休斯顿，哥伦比
أقوم حاليًا بفحص جهد التيار المستمر. جهد ناقل التوزيع الرئيسي 24 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع المعزول 27.5 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع الأول 25 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع الثاني 25 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع الثالث 25 فولت. جهد ناقل التوزيع الاحتياطي الأول 25 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع الاحتياطي الثاني 25 فولت، وجهد ناقل التوزيع المعزول 28 فولت. بالعودة إلى ناقل التوزيع الرئيسي، فإن جهد المراوح 115 فولت. يسحب النظام 20 أمبير. ضغط الأكسجين المتبقي 50 رطل/بوص
Gemini 4, CSQ CAP COM. У 
네, 있습니다. 수
아폴로 13호
프랭크, 제가 계속 상상하는 건, 만약 제가 다른 행성에서 온 외로운 여행자라면 이 고도에서 지구를 어떻
わかりました。少し前に酸素流量に小さな不具合がありましたが、今は正常に戻りま
这纯粹是一个强化道具，这样我们就可以
Dry bulb between about 72 and 79. A little bit before that they ran between 75 and 77. Wet bulb last g
نحن راسية تماماً يا هي
Wir sahen es, als es gerade dun
再往下几行，你会看到“DAC ON 4 秒，帧速率约为 
휴스턴의 13
Ho
Sieht immer noch gut aus. Das hat zwar nicht viel verändert, aber insgesamt sieht es, angesichts de
لهذا السبب صنعت هذه القفازات بهذه الطريقة حتى أ
Ja. Hör mal, ich hatte am Ende des ersten Tages echt Probleme mi
分かりました。私の知る限り、誰も薬を飲んでいませんし、今のところ休息に関しては、この状況では普段より疲れているわけではないと思います。仕事と睡眠のサイクル
Inoltre, quando ci si trova a una rotta di più 96 gradi, l'Agena passerà
Ok. Sta scendendo. Cos'è?
Wir haben noch et
Okay. Another thing to keep in mind is that we haven't seen the moon - we didn't see all the way out, and we rarely see it going back. We have seen it once since
Wir befinden uns momentan in einer sehr flachen Fluglage, sodass die Bodenstationen uns vermutlich nicht orten können. Wir haben zwar einige Funksprüche gehört, die immer wieder unterbrochen wurden, aber wir bleiben noch eine Weile in dieser Position, um die Boosterstufe im Blick zu behalten. Im Moment scheinen wir nicht viel näher an die Boosterstufe heranzukommen. Sie ist anscheinend immer noch ungefähr gleich weit entfernt. Als die Boosterstufe unter uns war, sah der Himmel fast sternenklar aus. 
حسنًا، لنكمل. بعد عبارة "إيقاف التشغيل عند وقت الاحتراق ناقص ثانية واحدة"، نحذف السطر التالي؛ ونحذف "التحكم في الوضع: الانحراف، إلى النبض"؛ ونحذف "تخميد المعدلات الزائدة عبر ترجمة Y، Z"؛ ونضيف السطر "إلغاء" مؤشرات الخطأ، ثم نقص - إلغاء مؤشرات الخطأ وقص العنوان 470 إلى - ما هي القيمة هناك يا 
Roger, 15 minuti fa. Jim, ti passo le procedure generali per il rientro. Riceverai l'aggiornamento 63-1 e i dettagli sul tuo prossimo sorvolo degli Stati Uniti da Gus. La procedura generale dopo il retrofire è il rollio in posizione normale, con la testa verso il basso, per la massima portanza fino a 400 km. Ti forniremo un angolo di quota da mantenere fino a 400 km, poi ti chiediamo di rollare a 15 gradi al secondo finché l'
我正在切换——我的座舱运转正常。宇航服也没问题。我要下去做偏航检查。更
Roge
مفهوم. جميع الأنظمة تعمل بشكل سليم. لدينا درجات الحرارة لديك. محول الطاق
Roger. Apollo Landmark no. 15 Rev 27. 08 52 59.
알겠습니다. 1천에서
حسنًا يا فريد. اعلم أن الخرطوم الأحمر الخاص بجهاز LMP فقط هو الموصول بكيس الحاوية. في هذه الحالة، نرجو منك اتباع الخطوات التالية لإدخال الخرطوم الأحمر الآخر في كيس الحاوية الآخر: قم بعمل فتحة مائلة في إحدى زوايا الكيس. انظر إلى الكيس الآخر ولاحظ كيف تم ذلك. أدخل الخرطوم حوالي 15 سم. حاول توجيه
Roger... REP RB 26 più 39; rollio a sinist
ह्यूस्टन, 13. क्या आप अभी भी निर्धारित समय पर टीवी चलाने की योजना बना रहे 
'올레 레오노프'가 말했듯이, (알아볼 수 없는 부분) 우주에서 일을 하고 있습니다. 대단한 건 아니지만,
アポロ8号、こちらヒ
11، هيوستن. ما زلنا نرى - ما زلنا نرى - التشكّل النطاقي على طول خط التقارب المداري. أعتقد أن أكثرها وضوحًا الآن يقع حول خط الا
لا تزال شركة جنرال 
Okay, Jim. After you get that orientation to come in a little more steeply, we perform an body-axis aline which is at 400 plus 5 on the. If the ball is up 
Roger. Pourrions-nous avoir une dernière mesure de tensi
Well, Mike, I am right now at the substellar point of 33. I don't kn
Let's see. In Springfield, Missouri, Mickey Owen, the old-time catcher for the Brooklyn Dodgers who made the record books by dropping a third strike that led the New York Yankees to a victory over the Dodgers in the '41 World Series, decided that he would be remembered by more than just his sports record. Forty-five boys and girls have been the recipients of ponies that he offered. These youngsters were reques
ヒューストン、アポロ11号。ダイレクトO2を終了しました。キャビンの圧
Du kannst es 
지금 상황을 다시 정
5、4、3、2、1。MA
أبولو
Я точно не могу сказать
Roger, and VI on your OAMS status, your fuel remaining is 148 pounds; oxidi
لم ت
И я подумал, что стоит потратить здесь секунд пять и посмотреть, смогу ли я убрать 000, поскольку мы сейчас довольно близки к блокировке кардан
أعتقد أنها 136 درجة شر
D'accord. Une entrée en matière appropriée ralentirait en quelque sorte... les allers-retours d'une heure... jusqu'à ce moment
Roger, Hawaii. Gemini 4. Loud and 
حسنًا يا جو. نحن جاهزون لنسخ تحديث خطة الرحلة وموادك الاستهلاكية
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。はっ
Я бы х
ठीक है। मैं VOX के पुश-टू-टॉक का जि
Forza, Houston. Apo
많은 실패 사례에는 그런 요소가
Okay, Jack,
Ja. Wir können VERB 64 besorgen, bevor wir über den Hügel 
Нам нужно придумать способ использо
肯定是在外面——我们一接到出发通知我就出来了。实际上，在去夏威夷之前
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। थोड़ी देर में आप चाहते 
I thought it was going to b
제미니 
프레드가 지금 광학 장치를 통해 살펴보고 있습니다. 이 장치는 우리 플랫폼의 정렬을 위한 장비인데, 프레드가 지금 이 장치를 통해 외부 모습을 어떻게 볼 수 있을지 확인하고 있는 겁니다. TV 카메라를 사용해서 광학 장치를 통해 사령선 외부를 살펴볼 수도 있을 것 같습니다. 몇 분 전 처음 진입했을 때, 광학 장치를 통해 사령선 측면 해치 외부를 살펴보는 데 성공했었습니다. 잠시만 기다
40 फीट, ढाई 
R
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। हम आपके गिम्बल को देख रहे हैं और हमने पाया कि इसमें चार जेट वाला अलेज लगा हुआ है और पैड पर हमने आपको दो जेट दिए हैं। लेकिन चलिए, जो लगा हुआ है उसी से काम च
**
دعني أخبرك، لقد كا
你好，加州首都通
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Siamo quasi al limite per poter ottenere qualsiasi tipo di immagine sugli OMNI in TV. L'immag
好的。我已经关闭了氧气罐加热器1和氢
了解です。まず主要なイベントの時刻を簡単に確認し、その後、戻って詳細を補足します。さて、進入インターフェースは142時間40分、つまり6時間半前です。そのおよそ6時間半前に、ヒーター電源を投入し、CM/の温度をチェックして、必要に応じてCM/を予熱することで、このプロセス全体を開始します。おそらくそうすることになるでしょう。詳細な手順は後ほど説明します。約6時間前頃に、前回の中間コースで使用した修正版/30分チェックリストを使用して、電源投入を開始します。その後、少し前、5時間前頃に、前回と同様に地球ターミネーターを使用して、体軸アラインメントの姿勢をとってください。それができ次第、-7を実行します。これは、今のところ約2フィート/秒、つまり約15秒間の噴射のようです。そして、今は1.5フィートまで下がっているとのことなので、余裕でマージン内です。わかりました。それを実行すると、すぐにサービスモジュールの分離姿勢への操作を開始します。通常よりも早く分離するため、平面状態になります。平面外のコンポーネントは不要であり、望んでいません。つまり、サービスモジュールが半径ベクトルに沿って外側を向いた状態で平面状態になります。その後、コマンドモジュールのチェックアウトとホットファイアを含む、サービスモジュールSEPの準備を開始します。そして、約4時間30分前にサービスモジュールを分離します。サービスモジュールを捕捉するまで機首を上げ、写真を撮ろうとしますが、写真を撮るために移動操作はしません。飛行経路の角度を崩したくないからです。わかりました。これで2時間ほどの余裕ができます。もし遅れてしまった場合は、チェックリストを確認してコマンドモジュールの起動準備を終えることができます
Roger, ho capito che stavi leggendo circa 
... looking down there... sure looked like
How'd the - is this the first part 
Roger. 
सँ
The CDR got 5 hours of fitful sle
Хорошо, 8. Мы только что получили ответ по тестовым схемам. Мы думали, что у нас есть 25 тестовых схем, выделенных для наземных испытаний, и это те, которые мы рассматривали. Затем есть еще пять, выделенных для летных испытаний, и единственное различие между этими схемами заключается в том, что на летных схемах есть инструкции; поэтому, если мы рассматриваем тестовую схему № 8, это означает, что мы все еще
إيجابي واح
Questa è Friendship Seven. Tutte queste piccole particelle; ce ne sono migliaia; e non provengono dalla capsula. Sono qualcosa che è
分かりました。それはいいですね。
Pour la suite, nous aimerions clarifier si vous comptez effacer uniquement les points de contrôle 1, 2 et 3, et effectuer la simulation de site d'atterrissage; ou si vous comptez également effacer les marques de la simulatio
好的
Ora s
حسنًا، أبولو 8. دعوني أخبركم بموضوعنا الأول، وهو مراجعة جميع إجراءات الدخول والمعلومات ذات الصلة، وسنراجع قائمة التحقق الخاصة بالدخول. لا يزال فريق العمل يُجري التحقق من ذاكرة الوصول العشوائي، ونحن نبحث في المشكلة، ونتناقش حول درجة حرار
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴. 만약 보이신다면, 구름 사이로 떠오르는 것처럼 보일 겁니다. 맥도널드 보고에 따르면 구름 사
Columbia et Tranquility Base, ici Houston. Au cas où vous ne l'auriez pas remarqué, le relais 
Ça pourrait marcher si on n'avait pas le choix, Fred. Pour l'inst
D'accord. J'y
Хоро
B
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Wir möchten den Lad
Хорошо. Позвольте мне прокомментировать это. Я подозреваю, что углы крена, кот
잭, 우리 공에 전원이 공급
وهل ما زلت تستخدم ال
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。我们正在向您通
안녕하세요, 캘리포니아 공과대학교입니다. 프렌드십 세븐입니다.
«Дружба Семь», вы проводите проверку дневного гориз
ロジャー、フランク。軌道について最新情報をお伝えします。この中間コースは、毎秒0.7フィートと非常に小さいため、
Beginnen Sie bei 108:00 auf der linken Seite und streichen Sie „Stop ORB rate at ORB science attitude“. Streichen Sie in der linken Spalte die Werte „10101“ und „11111“ aus. Fügen Sie anschließend bis 10 
Ich denke, wenn wir uns schon für einen Zeitpunkt entscheid
是的，如果你愿
Okay, copy that. Farewell, Aquar
Roge
Vance, avez-vous déjà réfléchi aux caméras que
D'accord. Actuellement, il est indiqué: « Pour quitter G&N », puis une modification manuscrite indique: « AUTO SE
알겠습니다. 또 하나 기억해야 할 것은, 블랙아웃이 시작되는 시점(약 0.5g)인데, 체크리스트 어디에든 적어두시면 됩
ठीक है। चौथी पंक्ति में, हम चारों हीटर - सिस्टम A और B - यानी पहले चार सर्किट ब्रेकर खोलेंगे। हम ऑटो ट्रांसफर बंद करेंगे। हम VHF A रिसीवर और कमांडर ऑडिय
휴스턴, 이글은 보조 송수신
네, 보시다시피 오른쪽으로 선회하고 있고, 아주 잘 돌고 있습니다. 아직 롤아웃을 
Roger. Ça a fonctionné. M
罗杰。我还有 12-BRAVO ΔV 160。3+37。01 天，09
わかりました。マイナス5時5分に地球と地球を結ぶ直線を作り、マイナス5時0
Роджер. Показатель LMP не сдвинулся ни на дюйм с момента взлета. И тот же самый показате
Хорошо, я немного поплаваю в свободном режиме и посмотрю, смогу ли занять удачную 
أنت تدرك أن الوقت المنقضي لكبسولتك أبطأ بحوالي ثانية واحدة مقارنة
Houston, Apollo 11. Abbiamo il continente africano... rivolto verso di noi in questo momento, e ovviamente, tutto diventa sempre più piccolo con il passare del tempo. Il Mediterraneo è completamente limpido. Il Sole sembra sul punto di tramontare intorno al Madagascar. La fascia equatoriale dell'Africa si distingue chiaramente. Stiamo vedendo un verde scuro o un verde fangoso, rispetto ai colori più sabbiosi della punta meridionale dell'Africa e, naturalmente, della costa 
حسنًا. سيتعين عليك دفع كل شيء. يبدو أن الأمور تسير
네, 잘 들었습니다. 플랫폼에 대해 말씀하시던 중에 갑자기 끊기셨는데, 대략 52시간쯤 후였던 것 같습니다. 그 이후로는 다시는 연락이 닿지 
ニール、映像は鮮明です。画面下部に小さな白い点が見えるだけです。テレビ担当者によると、どうやらカメラの焼き付きに
Nein. Tatsächlich habe ich die Frontplatte schon eine ganze Weile offen gelassen, um nachzusehen, ob wir irgendwelche Schadstoffe aufnehmen. Die relative Luftfeuchtigkeit ist hi
Gem
Nur zu, Housto
Похоже, вы превысили допу
एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 
Roger. Che ne dici di darci lo stato
Da erlöschen die Leuchtfeu
On s'est bien amusés à expérimenter et maintenant on va avoir le plaisir d'être prêts à rentrer dans l'atmosphère à tout moment. Bon. V
مرحباً يا برمودا، مرحباً يا برمودا يا كابكوم. سفينة الصداقة السابعة تسمعك بوضوح. مرحباً يا برمودا، سفينة ا
Apollo 8, Houston. Avez-vous reçu les mots sur le vecteur 
روجر. وإذا سمحت، عندما تُعدّ مشاركاتك للتحضير، توخَّ الحذر قليلاً، وسنحاول متابعة 
마지막 단계인 7단계에서 문제가 발생하면 초기 짐벌 각도인 피치 10도, 요 45도, 롤 150도로 돌아가서 다시 초점을 맞추
这里是阿波罗8号，正在月球上为您现场直播。现在我们切换了电视摄像机。之前我们向您展示了过去16个小时里我们一直在观测的地球景象。现在我们切换画面，向您展示过
了解しました。チャートを確認したところ、あなたと全く同じ答えが得られました。手順は非常に良く、ヘッドも非常に良好だったようですね。速度を平均化することも忘れていませんでしたね。私たちもチャートを検証するために計算を行い、良い解を得ました。以
当然可以。吉姆
... ال
До начала торможения осталось около 2 минут. Я на УВЧ-диапазоне, передаю и записываю, радиосвязь. Все предохранители находятся в правильном положен
好的，吉姆。我们现在设置的这个配置，B系统的燃料消耗量比我们
Gemelli VI, in att
ナショナルリーグの他の試合では、ニューヨークがモントリオールを5対2で
Да. Ночь была очень тихой. Здесь, внизу, с
Cavolo, quella cosa è davvero incredibile, 
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Я закончил маневры, автоматический маневр в 41-м положении, но, похоже, смещены только стрелки крена и рыс
Хорошо. Мне пора отключитьс
Tutto quello
Sì, eravamo su quelli... quindi avevamo meno di 
Ich bin ganz deiner Meinu
Bonjour Houston, ici Apollo 8. La caméra de télévision est maintenant pointée directement vers la Terre et nous avons suivi les instructions q
C'est une bonne façon de le décrire
네, 맞습니다. 수동 시동이라면 수동으로 시동을 꺼야 하고, 30피트/초의 속도에서 보다 정확하게 시동을 끄려면 스로틀을 40으로 유지해야 합니다. 그러면 가속이 적절하고, 수동으로 시동을 잘 끌 수 있을 것 같습니다. 이상입
- - حسنًا، قوة ا
如果你能找到它，请务必追踪它或记下它的位置，以便我们在下次
Sehr gut, Deke. Es i
罗杰。我们
حسنًا، ٨. لقد تلقينا للتو ردًا بخصوص أنماط الاختبار. كنا نظن أن لدينا ٢٥ نمط اختبار مخصصة للاختبار الأرضي، وهي الأنماط التي كنا نراجعها. ثم هناك خمسة أنماط أخرى مخصصة للاختبار الجوي، والفرق الوحيد بين هذه الأنماط هو أن أنماط الاختبار الجوي تحتوي على تعليمات مكتوبة عليها؛ لذا إذا كنا ننظر إلى نمط الاختبار رقم ٨، فهذا يعني أننا ما زلنا نعمل على الأنماط المخ
Я несколько раз замечал, что при переходе из солнечного света в тень, как только я вхожу, помимо отражения от моего лица на визоре, появляется дополнительное отражение, что значительно ухудшает видимость именно в месте перехода из солне
यह हां है, और मैं इस
حسنًا. سنرسل ذلك، وسأقدم لك 
نحن ندرس أنماط استهلاك المياه بدقة، ويبدو أن الوضع الحالي يميل إلى ترك الأجهزة تعمل وإيقاف تشغيل الأجهزة الأخرى، لكننا سنوافيكم بمزيد من المعلومات قريبًا. وننصحكم بترك شخص واحد يراقب أثناء النوم. كما ننصحكم بتجنب التبول قدر الإمكان، لأنه سيزيد من مشكلة المخلفات سوءًا
Я не думаю, что это было задумано, Билл. Они имели в виду, что теплообменник скафандра подключен к обоим контурам; и если они слишком остынут, можно будет использовать панель управления для отключения основного контура через теплообменник. Но в любом случае, что-то всегда будет поступать к теплообменнику скафандра. Я понимаю, что мы будем отключать вторичный теплообменник перед входом в скафандр, а затем снова включать его перед входом, но идея заключалась в том, чтобы одновр
알겠습니다. GMTB 15 43 23. ΔV 139. 연소 시간 - 2분 39초. 15 55 24. 왼쪽으로 55만큼 회전하세요. GMTRB 16 05 28. 오른쪽으로 65만큼 회전하세요. GMT 400 K 15 58 23. 기동 부하: 6344257, 0444775, 0533348, 664903.3, 676628.4, 082244.4, 09120.50, 10
这是双
조, 딱 내가 예상했던 대로였어. REACQ 모드에서 
حسنًا. سأبدأ بالبحث مجددًا، وسأرى إن كان بإمكاني رصدها. لديّ كوكبة الجبار هنا إلى يساري قليلًا، لكنها قريبة جدًا من - أوه، هنا. لديّ ن
Non ci posso credere. La temperatura della mia tuta segna 15 gradi e mi sento piuttosto a mio agio. Sono sicuro che suderei di più se la mia temperatura f
Вы говорите немного невн
I
Stand by
... لذا كما ترون، فإن نفس البيانات التي حصل عليها ا
Ok, Houston; 13. Siamo un po' troppo avanti. Abbiamo il via libera per lo spurgo delle celle
And the shaft mechanical CDU looks like it is reading about 4/100 below zer
Hallo. Roger, Friendship Seven. Wir verstehen Sie laut und deutlich. Alle Systeme scheinen betriebsbereit zu sein.
إنها ليست عملية طويلة يا فريد. نعتقد أن لدينا طاقة تكفي لحوالي 15 دقيقة في وحدة التحكم، لذا نريدك أن تبدأ بالتحرك وشحنها. هل أنت مستعد لنسخ الإجراء
네. 마지막으로 좀 더 자세히 알려드릴 사항이 있습니다. 말씀드렸듯이 상승 시 SEP 자세는 수평면이었지만, JETT(제트 추진) 자세는 일반 서비스 모듈 SEP 자세와 더 유사해질 것입니다. 즉, 상승하고, 반경 벡터를 벗어나고, 오른쪽으로 45도 기울어져, 수평면에서 벗어나 남쪽을 향하게 됩니다. JETT 추진 전에는 오버헤드 해치를 닫고, 벤트 밸브를 열어두는 것이 좋습니
你闻到燃料味
Roger, Jim. If you've got a couple of minutes now, I'd like to read up to you the change to the entry procedure that we'd like you to observe at 55
رو
أعتقد أنه إذا اخترنا وقتًا، ف
G
Quad Delta 245, 81 %. P&C indique 
Neil, qui è Houston. Affermativo. Stiamo ricevendo una nuova immagine. Si vede che è un obiettivo con una lunghe
시그마 세븐, 시그마 세븐입니다. 여기는 워터타운 통신기술센터입니다. 통화가 끊긴 것 같습니다. 
Das ist Friendship Seven. Die Kopfbewegungen haben keinerl
여기는 프렌드십
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们再次切
Houston, Apollo 8. Hai letto che stiamo registrando tutti i dati DELTA-R e trunnion
了解しました。アセンション上空でCバン
У в
你现在看到的，正是地平
과산화수소를 투하하고 있습니다. 퓨즈 스위치를 켜고 대기 중입니다. 회복 암은 "작동" 상태입니다. 주 낙하산을 펼칠 준비를 합니다. 모든 스위치가 정상 위치에 있습니다. 수동 연료가 거의 다 떨어졌습니다. 드디어 주 낙하산이 펼쳐졌습니다. 정말 아름답습니다. 하늘은 맑고 푸르네요. 낙하산도 풀렸고, 마치 달콤한 파이처럼 보
면화 따는 기계는 절대 가만히 있지 않아요. 한번 시도해 보
罗杰，双子星4号。S-6阶段的天气情况。请在加那利群岛和马德拉岛的背风面寻找云层，以便拍摄倾斜照
我想这应该会在
Roger a terminé la double purge dans la sectio
了解しました。周りの雑音が多
سيكون هذا أغرب موقف قد يمر به مصور سينمائي على الإطلاق، حيث سيعلق م
Ro
Okay. Ich gebe Ihnen einfach, was ich habe. In der obersten Reihe 11 befinden sich die vier AC-BUS-TIE-Leistungsschalter und der AC-BUS-VOLTS-Leistungsschalter. Das war's. In der zweiten Reihe befinden sich die vier TCA-Leistungsschalter. Unter FLIGHT
Pretty good, Jack. Say, you 
روجر. نقطة الدخول: المنطقة هي وسط المحيط الهادئ، الإحداثيات 000، 152، 001، 194 46 06، 267، خط العرض + 1332، - 16917، 064، 36194، 649، المدى المتبقي 14045، 36275، 195 03 06، 00 28، أقصى مسافة هبوط 154، 084، 22400، 18000، D0 400، 02 13، 00 17، 03 51، 09 02، نجم السدس 45 0189، 277، نجم محور الرؤية، غير متوفر، متجه الرفع للأعلى. ملاحظات: محاذاة، فيغا ودينيب، دوران 078، ميل 223، انحراف 340. ملاحظات إضافية: استخدم نمطًا غير خروجي، -30، فحص الأفق 194 33 06. ميل 298. ستحصل على P65، ولكن لن تحصل على P66. ملاحظة إضافية: قد لا تكون زاوية الميل الأولية في P67 هي الرفع الكامل. أ
Vielleicht könne
ठीक है। किसी ने इवैपोरेटर की जाँच करन
Okay. Kartenaktualisierung für den 6. Mai, Sonnenaufgang, Nullmeridian, Sonnenuntergang; -1, Zeitpunkt der größten Annäherung an Ziel B-1. Ihre beiden Kontrollpunkte: 1 (Erfassung), 2 (Erfassung). 
Houston, wie liest du Columbia auf
J'en laisse quelques-uns, Jack a
Okay. Noch etwas sollten wir bedenken: Wir haben den Mond nicht gesehen – wir konnten ihn nicht vollständig sehen und sehen ihn auf dem Rückweg nur selten. Wir haben ihn seit unserem Aufbruch einmal gesehen, aber wir haben uns in die falsc
Ok, sei p
... die Vorbereitungen für d
로저: 5분 준비 완료 안내입니다. 볼륨을 최대로 설정해 주십시오. 최대 볼륨으로
D'accord, Fred. Juste deux modifications, des commentaires à ce que nous venons
Okay, Vance. We'll go back up - We've go
Roger. Dein pr
好的。我正在大
نعم. ما زلت غير راضٍ عن الصور التي
Ricevuto. Su quel trasduttore di flusso 2O qui sotto in telemetria, i nostri valori concordano abbastanza bene con quanto letto a bordo, e gli EECOMM hanno notato questo ciclo, ma sembra ancora che la portata indicata sia inferiore a quanto ci a
O
Roger. Questo nostro viaggio sulla Luna potrebbe esserti sembrato semplice o facile. Vorrei assicurarti che non è stato così. Il razzo Saturn V che ci ha portato in orbita è un macchinario incredibilmente complesso, ogni cui componente ha funzionato alla perfezione. Questo computer sopra la mia testa ha un vocabolario di 38.000 parole, ognuna delle quali è stata scelta con cura per essere del massimo valore per noi, l'equipaggio. Questo interruttore che ho in mano ora, ha oltre 300 controparti solo nel modulo di comando, questo singolo interruttore progettato. Oltre a questo, ci sono miriadi di interruttori, leve, aste e altri controlli associati. Il motore, il nostro grande motore a razzo all'estremità posteriore del nostro modulo di servizio, deve aver funzionato alla perfezione, altrimenti saremmo rimasti bloccati in orbita lunare. I paracadute sopra la mia testa devono funzionare perfettamente domani, altrimenti precipiteremo nell'oceano. Abbiamo sempre avuto fiducia che tutte queste apparecchiature avrebbero funzionato, e funzionato correttamente, e continuiamo ad avere fiducia che lo faranno per il resto del volo. Tutto questo è possibile solo grazie
बूस्टर
And I don't have one yet, but I feel closer to hav
La gomma
ठीक है, जिम। च
Nave Atlantica, qui Friendship Seven. Vorrei che passaste a Capo. Ho lasciato che la capsula si spostasse di 180° e al momento devo riorientarmi. Quando sono allineato con l'or
Okay. And in regard to your timeline here, we suggest that you let Bill and Jim sleep for an extra period of time and don't wake them up until, and that would
आप हिसाब-किताब अच्छे स
好的，我唯一的问题是关于第一部分——就是它
Eh bien, c'est un sacré changement, n'est-ce pas, Ja
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हमने अभी जो जानकारी दी है, उसमें बस दो बदलाव और टिप्पणियाँ हैं। पहली टिप्पणी सामने की ओर है - "माइनस 2-1/2 घंटे" वाले अनुभाग में, "नाल से बिजली हटाना" के बारे में। आप इसे देख स
التقطتُ الصورة رقم 4، -4أ، وهي صورة لساحل الولايات المتحدة. سأضطر إلى مراجعة الخريطة قريبًا لأرى موقعنا. توجد كتلة سحابية كبيرة نوعًا ما في هذه النقطة. سنعيد الك
Li abbiamo sentiti dare una lettura che indicava una qu
컬
没错。我
Très bien. Je passerai un examen médical de type 1 sur le 
よし、ジャック。マ
Aquarius, 
Nous avons repéré une autre fusée, elle est juste à l'horizon en ce moment. Nous nous dirigeons approximative
休斯顿 CAP CO
एक और बात जो खराबी की प्रक्रिया से संबंधित है। कल शायद आपको इसकी चिंता न करनी पड़े, लेकिन पृष्ठ F1
그리고 동시에 아프리카도 볼 수 있어요. 서아프리카는 아
Хорош
حسناً. سنترك الأمر
Мертвое лицо, парикмахерский столб. Хорошо, на 11, автоматические выключа
Okay. Chiamo Jim
We would like to tell you to drink plenty of water. 
…側面から上がってくるはずだ。それなら、ジム、君は僕たちを正しい平面に導いたね。正しい平面だ。方向指示器を出して
روجر، ديك. أنا
Okay. Mike, what happened is - you know, you were sitting there monitoring,, and at step 7 you went into, NOUN 01, and keyed in the address and then INFORMATION INFORMATION; and on the final ENTER of that 35400 ENTER, right after that, it - that then put you back into the 16,. Then when you did the, ENTER, you were really entering the information in the actual CDU; and when you got the two entries in, in re
ठीक है, मैं अब बायोमेडिकल रिकॉर्डर
حسنًا. الآن، بدأنا العمل على الحقيبة، والخطوة التالية هي تجهيز خرطوم البدلة الأحمر، سواءً كان خرطوم القائد أو خرطوم المركبة، لأننا سنحتاج إلى تجهيز كليهما في النهاية، ووضعهما في الجزء العلوي من الحقيبة. وللقيام بذلك، عليك أولًا التأكد من فصل الخرطوم الأحمر عن الخرطوم الأزرق. لا أعرف إن كان هذا قد تم بالفعل، ولكن إن لم يكن كذلك، فما عليك فعله هو قص الغلاف الخارجي المصنوع من قماش بيتا على طول الخرطومين، ثم قص الأربطة المطاطية التي تربط الخرطومين معًا، وبذلك سينفصل الخرطومان وي
We're going to have an LOS, I believe. I'll let Hawaii gi
Les deux pompes de refroidissement sont en marche. Les ventilateurs de la combinaison sont en marche. Les récepteurs HF sont en mode rentrée atmosphérique. Le nouveau mode audio est activé sur HF. Nous 
Okay. Fred, das war gut auf der Checkliste. Das war's. Wir zeigen Ihnen gleich die Checkliste zum Herunterfahren und möchten Sie fragen, ob Sie die Speicherkarte zum Brennen verwenden 
로저. 퍼스에서 오는 빛을 관측하신다고 들었습니다. 잠시 후 방사체 상태를 알려드리겠습니다. 실험에 사용하시는 G
روجر، أبولو 8. ملاحظتان لك:
الخطوات التالية، واحد، اثنان، ثلاثة، أربعة، هي نفسها، ونريد إيقاف تشغيل 
Friendship Seven, qui Steelhead. Attenzione, vi ho visto, prevedo di ess
알겠습니다. 1번을 건너뛰고, INVERTER 2 AC 2를 OFF로 설정하겠습니다. 그
روجر، قم بتشغيل ا
नमस्कार, कोलंबिया। ह्यूस्टन। हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपनी जेटिसन चेकलिस्ट शुरू करें। हम प
分かりました。ヴァンスさん、バッテ
31700, NA, NA,, минус 00050, плюс все нули, плюс 00001 000 334 001, все нули, плюс 00190 00050 014 0050 413020 183, Шаула, вниз 064, влево 06, плюс 0747, минус 16410 12988 36301; Сириус, Ригель, 308 209 357; использовать высокоскоростную процедуру с ми
रॉजर, बिल। आपसे 15 मिनट तक डेटा संपर्क नहीं हो पाया और लगभग 45 मिनट तक वॉइस कम्युनिकेशन भी बंद रहा, जिससे हमें थोड़ी बेचैनी होने
罗杰。哥伦比亚
그리고 아쿠아리우
لا، 
Ok
Well,
双子座 VI，CSQ。你说的是水——是出现在
«Аполлон-8», Хью
吉姆，我们看来
21455. Grazie. Solo una curiosità: 
Sextan
그리고 이는 105시간에
收到，杰克。我们目前看到的距离仍然是137英里，多普勒雷达也证实了这一点。67小时后我们会提供最
Ok. Fred, per tua informazione, la lettura di CO2 a bordo è leggermente superiore a quella che leggiamo qui a terra, quindi quando il tuo misuratore arriva a 15, passa al secondario. Vorremmo ricevere un aggiornamento ogni 30 minuti circa: ti contatteremo per questo. Ma solo per farci sapere
E, Mike, pensiamo che questi grandi DELTA-R, NOUN 49, che stai ottenendo siano davvero significativi, dato che è passato molto tempo dall'ul
そうだったかな
最后那四次时间分别是 17:3
ठीक है। अगर आप हमें ACCEPT देंगे और बने रहेंगे, तो हम
キャンプに参加していた子供たちでさえ、マイク・ジュニアが「お父さんは歴史に名を残すことになるの？」と聞かれ、「ええ」と答えたと報道され、話題になりました。そして少し間を置いてから、「歴史って何？」と問いかけました。ワシントンでは、ニクソン大統領が行政権を行使し、
正解です、ジム。そして13番、ヒューストン。コンピューターはあなたのもの
아폴로 11호, 여기는 
アトランティック・シップ、こちらフレンドシップ7号です。
Это «Дружба Семь». Со стороны Африки было много облаков. Сейчас они значительно рассеялись, и хотя я не могу точно разглядеть океан, здесь много лунного свет
이해했습니다. 초속 5피트입
Gémeaux, ici Hawaï. Nous n'avons rien d'autre à
Bene. Interruttori: SONDA DI ATTRACCIAMENTO, due, A
D'accord. C'est péricyntien plus 2. / 62871 novembre Alfa, et attendez un. D'accord. Nous allons reprendre avec un trim de tangage et un trim de lacet non a
分かりました、ジャック。それでは、こちらで対応
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。満
En fait, nous avons effectué les calculs ici même sur la r
Здравствуйте, Аполлон-11. Хьюстон. У нас для 
Gemini VIII, Guay
Джим, единственный известный нам способ получить такой же или даже лучший результат, чем у тебя сейчас, — это включить G&N на полную мощность, а мы этого делать не хотим. Поэтому наш план — просто взять то, что есть, и, возможно, к тому времени, как ты начнёшь распоряжаться своим настроением, т
로저. 그럴 줄 알았어요. 그리고 참고로, 제가 주간에 나갈 때쯤이면
... not as comfortable. I'll tell
أوه، ها هي. كنتُ أفقد الأفق. لا تقل لي إن أجهزة المسح الاحتياطية م
シグマ・セブン。はっきりと聞こ
, плюс 31776, минус 00823, минус 01365 180 016 001, неприменим
水瓶座，休
ठी
收到。我们收到，11。我们了解到该程序可以给出几乎无限多种角度组
好的。我们正在考虑或许可以把一部分视频以每秒 12 帧的速度播放。我觉得我们可以把所有 0.5 到 0.5g 的下载量都降下来；这样大概只能录制 7.8 分钟，帧数……翻倍就行了。我想，也许我们只需要偶
11, ह्यूस्टन। रेट्रो टीम जानना चाहती थी कि क्या आप हमें हमारे पास मौजूद किसी भी गैर-मानक सामान के बारे में जानकारी दे सकते हैं। उन्हें बस स्थान
حسنًا. ثمّ، تكون الخطوات التالية (واحد، اثنان، ثلاثة، أربعة، خمسة، ستة) متشابهة، ثمّ نريد ضبط جهاز الإرسال والاستقبال S-BAND على المنتصف، إيقاف التشغيل؛ نتخطى خطوة، ونريد ضبط مُضخّم طاقة S-BAND، عالي، على المنتصف، إيقاف التشغيل؛ ثمّ نضبط مُضخّم الطاقة على وضع التحدث مع عمو
알겠습니다. 밴스, 이 내용을 빈 페이지에
それに、ジャック、元の態度に戻るにはかなり時間がかかるので、す
Okay. That is correct. Now I also have to give you a couple of points to plot on that curve. The present curve you have drawn is based on a 60-mile perigee or perilune, and you right now have a 62-mile pericynthian; and the reason that your target is for 62 miles is to 
ठीक है। टॉमी जैकब्स के बाद, हमारे पास ह्यूस्टन की एक स्थानीय ज्योतिषी रूबी ग्राहम की ओर से एक बेहद महत्वपूर्ण खबर है। उनका कहना है कि चंद्रमा की यात्रा के लिए सभी राशियाँ अनुकूल हैं। नील चतुर है, माइक का निर्णय लेने की क्षमता अच्छी है, और बज़ जटिल समस्याओं को सुलझाने में माहिर है। उनका यह भी कहना है कि नील दुनिया को गुलाबी चश्मे से देखने की प्रवृत्ति रखता है, लेकिन वह हमेशा पीड़ित या परेशान लोगों की मदद करने के लिए तैयार रहता है। नील, आपके पास "अंतर्ज्ञान है जो आपको जीवन को भावनाओं 
Okay. I see. I d
整流罩全
إلى ا
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. سأحاول الوصول إلى أقرب نقطة ممكنة من مدار الأرض هنا على الجانب ا
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous s
I would like to give one quick step in case that gave Jim report some sort of problem for us to get out
Хорошо. Ну, вы скопировали этот 
4개의 SPS/G&N만 해당: 38320, -055, +060, 084, 30, 2749, +31380, +03475, -01032, NA, 034. 나머지 PAD는
Verrà eseg
Understand scratch the bottom part underneath the diagram because 
Хорошо, и если хотите — а точнее, мы бы хотели, чтобы вы обновили все свои медицинские пропуска типа 2
了解。最後
Ich möchte anmerken, dass ich um 3:26:33 Uhr zu jedem Zeitpunkt 10 Partikel am Himmel sehe. Sie scheinen mir zweifellos zu leuchten. Es waren kleine Frostpartikel. Einige scheinen jedoch sehr, sehr weit entfernt zu sein. Zwei davon 
Vance，你可能会感兴趣—
मैंने पढ़ा। 
Esatto, Apollo 8. E tra poco avremo un altro paio di cose da raccontarvi. Stiamo lavorando a un sorvolo in questo momento. E parleremo ancora un po' del problema dell'osservazione delle stelle con il sestante e il telescopio. E quello che vorremmo fare non appena la squadra nera arriverà sul MOKR, visto che abbiamo due squadre qui, vorremmo avere un riassunto da voi su cosa vedete e cosa non vedete esattamente e in quali condizioni, e vedere se possiamo definirlo in modo che tutti qui capiscano quello che ci avete detto. E se avete commenti sulla t
わかり
हां, जब आप सामान्य कामकाज से बा
알겠습니다. 좋아요. 저희는 84도(섭씨 약 23도)의 정장을 추천하고 있는데, 좀 높은 온도인
로저, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. HF 통신으로 당신의 목소리를 또렷하게 들었습니다. 이상
还
04:44 बजे 0.05 ग्राम का
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन, यह कानो कॉम टेक है, यूएचएफ/एचएफ पर प्रसारित हो रहा है। क्य
هذا 
Troppa enfasi per un atteggiamento pari a zero,
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। क्य
जेमिनी VI, जेमिनी VI
Флаг или буквы... Похоже, они выжжены так же сильно при запуске, как и после возвращения в атмосфе
分かりました。アセンション島上空での地上移動中に、ケープ・ケープ・
Roger. Sono l'Amicizia Sette. Segue il rapporto di trenta minuti: i movimenti della testa non mi causano nausea o alcun tipo di sensazione spiacevole. Sono sorpreso di riuscire a guardare il sole il più vicino possibile; il sole mi splende direttamente in faccia in questo momento, e tutto ciò che devo fare è ripararmi gli occhi con il sopracciglio. Tutti gli interruttori dei fusibili sono ancora come precedentemente riportato sul pannello di sinistra. La selezione della modalità è normale, automatica, giroscopio normale: Squ
روجر. لقد توصلنا أخيرًا إلى اتفاق بشأن مشكلتنا هنا بعد أن قام 50 شخصًا بمراجعتها. عندما كنا في جهاز 5018، حاولنا تحميل البيانات القابلة للمسح قبل أن تقوم بإنهاء العملية. لذا يا مايك، ما علينا فعله هو استدعاء وحدات 
Gemini 4, CSQ. Potresti verificare che 
روجر. تم الاستلام 
Ich werde hier oben mal nac
了解。プラス11をコピーする準備ができました
休斯顿，
Roger. Wi
Вы сейчас находитесь в п
はい、ライトテスト
If you go high bit rate, we wil
よし、ジャック。操縦パッド、自由帰還のための中間コー
Umschaltung auf manue
حسنًا. وبعد ذلك، نأخذ التسلسل المنط
벌써 84시간 됐나요? 네,
... Roger, Houston. Brennstatusbericht folgt: DELTA-TIG Null; Brenndauer 17; Winkel durch die Pads: DELTA-VGX +0,3; VGY -0,0; VGZ -0,1; DELTA-VC -5,2; Brennstoff 362; 
Eagle et Columbia, ici l'équipe de réserve. Toutes nos félicitations 
네, 짐. 시작하기 전에 한 가지 말씀드릴 게 있습니다. 저희가 전에 말씀드린 내용은 여전히 ​​정확하다고 생각합니다. 컴퓨터 메모리에서 변경되는 부분은 W-매트릭스뿐입니다. 하지만 추가적인 안전 조치로 컴퓨터 메모리를 덤프해서 비트 단위로 하나하나 확인하고 모든 것이 정확한지 다시 한번 점검하겠
طبيعي. درجة حرارة المقصورة — 92. درجة حرارة البدلة — 58. ضغط المقصورة 5.6. تركيز ثاني أكسيد الكربون في البدلة 3/4. أسطوانة الأكسجين اليسرى 5100. أسطوانة الأكسجين اليمنى 5050. كمية الأكسجين 62. الضغط 840. درجة حرارة ال
了解。また後方監視に戻った。星空観察をやりすぎて温度管理を犠牲にしないように注意したいので、様子を見て、片側が熱くなりすぎそうになったら停止を指示しても
了解、フレンドシ
لقد فعلت ذلك
嗯，这是其中之一。我们想跟你们说说我之前跟吉姆说过的关于控制的事情。现在如果需要的话，你们可以把控制切换到硬控制模式，但是当我们切换到一些正常的控制模式时，由于
Roger. Ich versuche es jetzt nochmal, diesmal gleichzeitig mit MA. Beim letzten Mal, vor den letzten Sichtungen, hatte ich 2 Fuß pro Sekunde gemessen. Mal sehen, was diesmal dabei herausk
罗杰。请您将T/M开关保持在实时ACQ-AID位置，
D'accord. Voilà toute la procédure d'amortissement des taux. Je vous ai seulement indiqué l'étape 2, mais c'était la procédure complète. Passons maintenant à la page 29. Correction: il y avait une erreur dans la rele
フレッド、了解。これで君の声がはっきりと聞こえるようになった。了解。君の手順は、約74時間後、つまり3時間ちょっと後に太陽チェックを行うことになっている。これはデテント2にな
أخبرني عندم
E, Mike, se vuoi il nostro obiettivo DELTA V, te lo 
もう一度言ってください
जिम, बस एक जानकारी देना चाहता हूँ, अगर किसी कारणवश आपको थोड़ी देर के लिए रुकना पड़े, तो हमारे यहाँ के लोगों का मानना ​​है कि 30 मिनट तक रुकने से कोई खास नुकसान नहीं होगा। जैसा कि आप जानते हैं, प्रक्रिया में फ्लैशिंग 99 पर PRO बनना ज़रूरी नहीं है और हमने सोचा कि आपको यह जानकारी उपयोगी लगेगी कि समय इतना
Я понимаю, о чём вы говорите. Я немного поспал сегодня, так что я довольно хорошо отдохнул и хочу убедиться, что Фрэнк хорошенько поспит здесь перед тем, как войти. Возможно, сейчас самое время попроб
はい。すべて開いていま
いくつかの小
«Аполлон-11», Хьюст
ロ
Ok, forse ho il pollice debole. Senti, potresti chiedere ai dott
Ro
Хорошо. Готовы к пе
네, 그럼 업데이트된 내
Non pensiamo che sia un problema. Vorremmo che accendessi l'interruttore di lettura della quantità e lo lasciassi acceso per le prossime ore, così possiamo capire cosa sta succedendo. Anche al ritmo con cui è stato utilizzato nelle 
好
ठ
Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Есть какие-нибудь новости о прохождении этого маршрута? Конец с
了解。飛行を続けてくださ
Roger. Dai fili caldi dell'Ufficio Relazioni Pubbliche: l'Apollo 11 domina ancora le notizie di tutto il mondo. Solo quattro nazioni, Cina comunista, Corea del Nord, Vietnam del Nord e Albania, non hanno ancora informato i propri cittadini del vostro volo e dell'atterraggio sulla Luna. Un giornalista ha detto di non avere più parole per descrivere il vostro successo. Stasera, il Presidente Nixon dovrebbe assistere alla partita di baseball All Star a Washington. Dopo la partita, partirà per l'area di recupero del Pacifico. Mercoledì sera, volerà dall'isola di Johnston in elicottero alla nave di comunicazione della Marina Arlington. Poi, giovedì mattina, salirà a bordo dell'elicottero e volerà fino all'Hornet in tempo per assistere al vostro ammaraggio. Ad accompagnare il Presidente ci saranno il Segretario di Stato William Rogers e Frank Borman. Assisteranno all'ammaraggio dal ponte della nave di recupero con l'Ammiraglio John Sidney McCain, Jr., Comandante delle Forze del Pacifico. Dopo la permanenza del Presidente a bordo dell'Hornet, partirà per il suo tour in Asia e la visita programmata in Romania. Si ritiene che Luna 15 si sia schiantata ieri nel Mare delle Crisi, dopo aver orbitato attorno alla Luna 52 volte. L'agenzia di stampa sovietica TASS ha riferito che sono state condotte ricerche "scientifiche" nello spazio vicino alla Luna. Sir Bernard Lovell dell'Osservatorio di Jodrell Bank ha affermato che Luna 15 ha colpito la superficie della Luna a una velocità di circa 480 chilometri orari. La situazione è stata relativamente tranquilla di recente in Vietnam. Soldati in pattuglia sono stati osservati con radio a transistor sintonizzate sul vostro volo. Le emittenti radiotelevisive delle Forze Armate in Vietnam hanno dato piena copertura alla missione. Le schermaglie continuano tra egiziani e israeliani lungo il Canale di Suez. Gli osservatori delle Nazioni Unite stanno cercando di fermare l'azione. A Washington, la Commissione per i Modi e i Mezzi della Camera ha votato per ridurre la tolleranza al depauperamento del petrolio dal 27,5% al 
好的。现在屏幕右侧
Роджер. Земля вверх 005, вправо 27, плюс 03
Und Vance
حسنًا، اقتربنا من دقيقتين، وسيكون فحص الأفق هذ
حسنًا يا جيم. ما زلنا نجمع أفكارنا حول هذا الأمر، لكن بعض الاعتبارات تشير إلى أنه يمكننا إجراء هذا التصحيح ح
2일
١١، هيوستن. نواجه مشكلة في الاتصال. لهذا السبب لا نستطيع قراءتك. سنقوم بتغيير الموقع. انتظر قل
I don't know how much detail you can see, Jim, but your subspace
Okay. Und wenn Sie es dann an dem gewünschten Ort geparkt haben, schalten Sie die OPTIK-STROMVERSORGUNG AUS
Negativo, questo è il P
作为交换，外科医生希望了解你们每个人的大致睡
Roger. Nous le voyons, 11. Restez 
Okay. Fred, nur zur Info: Dein CO2-Wert an Bord ist etwas höher als der, den wir hier am Boden messen. Sobald dein Messgerät 15 anzeigt, schalte bitte auf Sekundärbetrieb um. Wir möchten etwa alle 30 Minuten eine Statusmeldung erhalten – wir melden uns dazu bei dir. Damit du weißt, dass wir an d
No, you don't have on
阿波罗11号，这里
ठीक है। अगर 
रॉजर, मैनुअल फ्यूल टेम्प
Рог. Я не уверен, в чем была проблем
很好
खैर, आप सब अब धीरे-धीरे दिखाई देने लगे हैं। मुझे मध्य अमेरिका के कुछ हिस्से दिख रहे हैं, और वहाँ मौसम काफी साफ लग रहा है। कैरेबियाई द्वीप भी दिखने लगे हैं और बादलों की कुछ लकीरें भी दिख रही हैं। ऐसा लग रहा है कि ग्रीनलैंड के पास एक सिस्टम है, जिसकी कुछ बड़ी बादल की लकीरें दक्षिण-पश्चिम की ओर फैली हुई हैं। अमेरिका का पूर्वी तट अब धीरे-धीरे दिखाई देने लगा ह
Roger. That's affirmative. We're standing by her
Это подтверждается, и мы добавили еще одно наблюдение звезды к тому, которое было зафиксировано в другом мест
자, 여기 있는 오
Bien sûr. Nous configurons Goldstone; ce sera fait dans une minute. En attendant, je peux vous lire cette procédure si vous êtes prêt
罗杰。理解并接受，你就会给我们带来新的成果
أسمعك بوضوح تام. انتظروا اتصال كابتن أمر
Roger, richiedi una lettura dell'umidità della c
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. 우선, 폐수 배출구를 후면 10%로 설정해 주십시오. 둘째, 현재로서는 항공기 교체가 필요하지 않을 것으로 예상되므로 새로운 항공기 정보를 업로드하지 않겠습니다. 셋째, 모든 극저온 히터를 자동(AUTO)으로 설정해 주시고, 배터리 브라보(BRAVO) 충전을 시작하겠습니다. 약 7시간 동안 사용 가능합니다
Intendo le luci di Durban. Non sono riuscito a ve
Roger. Je tourne à la page 33. Moins 4 minutes. OK. Je descends jusqu'à la ligne 7 environ, à « ENGINE GIMBAL »: « ENGINE GIMBAL, OFF ». Je descends jusqu'à « MODE CONTROL », je remplace par « MODE CONTROL:, ATT HOLD », puis je raye « PROPELLANT QUANTITY MONITOR, 
好的，尼尔，请稍等
好的。接下来的1、2、3、4、5、6、7都一样，然后是“注意/警告 正常”到“确认”，“注意/警告”到，以及“注意/警告 电源
Lass uns z
Co
Okay, Fred. Wir haben das verstanden. Noch eine Frage zu
알겠습
D'accord. Depuis Jodrell Bank, en Angleterre, via AP: le grand radiotélescope britannique de Jodrell Bank a cessé de recevoir les signaux de la sonde lunaire soviétique Luna 15 à 5h49 EDT aujourd'hui. Un porte-parole a déclaré qu'il semblait que le vaisseau spatial Luna 15 « ait dépassé la Lune ». Autre citation: « Nous ne pensons pas qu'il ait atterri », a déclaré un porte-parole de Sir Bernard Lovell, directeur de l'observatoire. Washington UPI: le vice-président Spiro T. Agnew a appelé à envoyer un homme sur Mars d'ici l'an 2000, mais les dirigeants démocrates ont répondu que la priorité devait être donnée aux besoins terrestres. Agnew, haut responsable gouvernemental lors du décollage d'Apollo 11 mercredi, parlait apparemment en son nom propre et pas nécessairement au nom de l'administration Nixon lorsqu'il a déclaré: « À mon avis, nous devrions envoyer un homme sur Mars d'ici la fin de ce siècle. » Laredo, Texas, AP: les services d'immigration de Nuevo Laredo ont annoncé mercredi que les hippies se verraient refuser des cartes de tourisme pour entrer au Mexique à moins de prendre un bain et de se faire couper les cheveux. Huberto Cazaras, chef de l'immigration mexicaine à Nuevo Laredo, a déclaré que les autorités de Mexico, d'Acapulco et d'autres lieux touristiques populaires avaient reçu des plaintes concernant les hippies. Selon United Press International: La réaction initiale à la décision d
हेलो, रॉजर, ये फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। आपकी
Аполлон-
All'accensione. Alla fine, dopo averli impostati a circa tre zeri con la manovra disattivata, sono passato ai giroscopi normali. Non c'è stata alcuna transizione a spinta elevata. Poi, quando ho impostato i tre zeri, ho ottenuto una transizione a spinta elevata nell'assetto di selezione
좋아요. 괜
Мы готовимся зачитать их вам
アクエ
好的。一旦你调整好操控模式，准备进入最佳飞行姿态，就可以开始
Хорошо. С правой стороны, начиная с «маневра по ориентации относительно Земли» и до всего остального вплоть до «связи с источником сигнала», это необязательно. Это «ориентация 
로저, 제리. 알겠습니다. 한 가지 차이점을 발견했습니다. 저희는 선호 옵션을 사용했는데요. 첫 번째 건은 문제가 있었고, 마지막 건은 예상대로 진행되었습니다. 첫 번째 건의 경우 옵션이 나왔
休斯顿，加油
我明白这
G
Der CDR-Wert lautet 1101
Хорошо. Джим, мы хотели бы сделать следующее: мы настроим приблизительные углы карданного подвеса, которые ты будешь для нас держать; мы поднимем платформу, и тогда, когда ты позвонишь и используешь PICAPAR, он, вероятно, не будет достаточно близко, чтобы поместить звезду в секстант, но если ты увидишь какую-нибудь яркую звезду в непосредственной близости — я имею в виду 2-3 градуса от центра телескопа, чтобы у тебя было хоть какое-то представление о направлении, — то проблема идентификации не должна представлять большой сложности. И как только ты пом
Apollo 8, Houston. You are GO
그리고 Eagle은 달 표면 데이터 PAD를 복사할 준비가
ロジャーで
パイロット、こちらは軍医です。チャック・ベリーは、もし望むなら8時間寝てもいいと言っています。読
お時間に変更はご
Sag e
ヒューストン、アポロ 11 号。ロン、一定の抗力レベルに関するあなたのメッセージをコピーする準備ができまし
알겠습니다. 기장은 1/2온스 음료 129잔과 식사 3끼를, 조종사는 1/2온스 음료 11
Ich weiß nicht. Ich bin oben, jetzt bin ich unten, Jack. Wenn Jack hochgeht, kann er ja mal nachsehen und mir Bescheid geben. Okay, ich ü
ジム、今夜はCクワッドとDクワッ
Roger, 13. Because of the O2 tank 2 quantity sensor drop out, wants to keep a little closer track of the cryo quantities, and he's going to be asking you to stir all the cryo tanks at slightly more frequent intervals than had been planned, and the first time is now, and we will be calling you probably every 5 or 6 hours, except during sleep
Eagle, Houston. Wir haben die Perspektiven kop
アポロ11号、こちらヒュースト
Ok. Vorrei commentare. Immagino che gli angoli di rollio che ti a
حسنًا. الآن، إذا اجتزنا هذا الفحص، يمكنك إنهاء المهمة هنا، وسنعطيك إشارة للانتقال إلى وضعية الاحتراق، ومن ثمّ يمكننا إجراء فحص النجوم. إذا لم تجتز الفحص، فنريدك أن تُجري محاذاةً بعد 75 ساعة. وإذا كنتَ مستعدًا للاستلام، فلدينا بعض متجهات نصف الوحدة للشمس وبع
Ach, keine Sorge. Ich würde mich freuen, wenn Sie mit uns sprechen würden. Gleich geht es u
Roger, Bill. We lost data on you for 15 minu
Nein. Es besteht momentan k
연소가 완
روجر. ما زلتُ أستلم الرسالة. تفضل. أبولو 11، هذه ه
Roger. For your address 224
로저, 첫 번째 읽기. 55
يا إلهي، دعني أستعيد تلك الكاميرا. هناك فوهة بركانية ضخمة ورائعة هنا. أتمنى لو كا
روجر. هيوستن، أبولو 8. أسمعك بوضوح. الخطة 24136 179 045 001 515 105196 35569 357 091 001؛ بالإضافة إلى 10، إلغاء الموقف 199 على أرض الملع
아니요. 제가
Gemini 4, Flight chiede come stai andando per quanto riguarda lo stivaggio delle cose e se lassù ti senti un po' troppo 
Be advised that the MDI readouts confir
어때요! 더 빨라진
Next Saturd
わかりました。次のは飛ばして、ACインバーター1とACイン
네, 16번 패널, 맨 위 줄, 비행 디스플레이: 시스템 엔지니어 크로스포인터, 열림; 시스템 쿼드 1~4 TCA, 모두 닫힘. 두 번째 줄, 조명: 투광등은 아마 열려 있을 겁니다. 로직 파워 B, 열림; 슈트 흐름 제어, 열림. 통신 아래: 디스플레이, 열림; VHF A 송신기, 열림; VHF B 수신기
ठीक है। तारा आईडी 03 है, और तारा 36,
Sempre vigile e... Ehi, c'è qualche medico laggiù che sorveglia l'alta quota? Sto cercando di fare un po' di cors
Hallo, Hawaii Com T
Роджер. Эй, Джим, пока ты не спишь и всё спокойно, позволь мне дать тебе ещё пару советов. Один конкретный. Я знаю, что никто из вас толком не спит из-за холода, и вам, возможно, стоит прилечь к 35 или около того, достать по паре таблеток Декседрина и попробовать по одной примерно в это время, а также с 39 до 01
그리고 잭, 저희가 통신 문제를 해결할 때까지 통신 설
جاهز للنس
Ich 
Род
حسنًا. لسنا في عجلة من أمرنا. في الواقع، هذا موقف مريح للغاية. الشمس غائرة، لذا فهي لا تسطع من النوافذ ولا تُسخّن المكان. الأرض ثابتة خارج النافذة رقم 1، والقمر ثابت خارج النافذة رقم 3، وبالطبع، نحن نحافظ على أعلى مستوى للتدفئة. طالما أن خبراء التدفئة الحرارية را
بر
わかってるよ、わかっ
進めます。
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Роджер. Мы получили сообщение. Спасибо
Okay. 
That's affirmative. We're reading you.
Roger. Nous avons actuellement une 
巴兹，这里是休斯顿。通讯非常好。你的声音清晰洪亮，迈克转达说他
Okay. Delete the section that says "Before un-
バズについ
Okay, danke. Solange OMNI nicht funktioniert, ist es für uns viel einfacher. Wir haben hier alles mit der Achtkugel und dem Würfelwurf verdeutlicht... 
मुझे समझ में आ रहा है कि सवाल यह है कि जहां 's' रखे जाते हैं वहां किस तरह
Say a
我们现在正等着吉姆，我注意到，即使另一扇窗户里阳光很
Abbiamo iniziato a fornirti alcuni tempi. Pensiamo di poterti fornire valori migliori molto presto. Ma sembra che la tua acqua sia buona 
Roger. Kurskorrektur Nummer 2. SPS/G&N: 63059, plus 097, minus 020 02644 5792, plus 00118, minus 
好的，稍等。我这就告诉你电压和电流。好的，电压是39.
ヒューストンさん、給湯器のメンテナンス
네
Okay. Make that power 5 in the conting
Sì, qui al sud è
روجر. أبولو 8. هذا ما كنا نحاول القيام به. يبدو أن جزءًا من مشكلتنا يكمن في ال
は
로저. 네, 객실 압력은 여전히 ​​5.5로 유지되고 있습니다. 출발 이후 계속 그 상태를 유지하고 있습니다. 객실 온도는 90%이고, 상대 습도는 약 36%로 다시 올라갔습니다. 냉매량도 약간 줄었는데, 습도가 20% 정도까지
そうです、ダラスでは泣いているんです。バスケットボールのスコア：ヒューストンは今週末、あまり良い成績を残せませんでした。イリノイ大学がヒューストンに97対84で勝利しました。そしてノースカロライナ大学はアウルズに勝利しました。スコアは85対77でした。フランク、新聞にはオイラーズについて少し書いてありま
आपको यह भी सूचित किया जात
... थ्रस्ट सामान्य; डेल्टा-वी थ्रस्ट, दो, बंद; पिच और यॉ ऑटो; गिम्बल मोटर्स पिच और यॉ बंद; डेल्टा-वी/सीजी, /सीएसएम; ईएलएस लॉजिक, बंद; ईएलएस ऑटो से मैनुअल; लॉजिक बंद, नीचे; प्रणोदक डंप,
Okay. Have you hit the ST
9피트/
ठीक है। मैंने एक छोटा सा रोल अंदर 
了解。客室気圧は5.5%を維持しています。出発以来ずっとこの状態です。客室温度は90%、相対湿度は36%まで戻りました。冷却水の量も少し減っています。湿度がこれほど上昇しているということは、どこかで小さな水漏れがあったのかもしれません。以前は20%ほど下がっていましたから。冷却水の量は現在62%ほど減っています。宇宙服の吸気温度は70度、客室気圧は5.8度です。蒸気温度は4ポイントで48度です。酸素濃度は60～90%です。アンペアは24アンペアで、11アンペア、現在約115アンペアです。ファ
We always have the same smear to look through. The rendezvous windows are okay, but they're so small and looking in the wrong direc
रॉजर, जीन। मैं कहता हूँ कि सुबह 5 बजे की पिछली रिपोर्ट के बाद से मेरी स्थिति में कोई बदलाव नहीं हुआ 
Roger. As-tu reçu mon feu ver
अच्छा, केन, अब बस तुम य
Ok, Jim. La fortuna ti tiene. Il tracciamento mostra che il tuo angolo di ingresso è salito a -6,24. Questo sulla base di tutti i dati che abbiamo raccolto tra la metà del p
Kleine fluoreszierende K
好的。步骤如下：，，回车；1331，回车；7，回车；然后回车。解释如下。在
Bene, POTERE a E
تمام
D'accord. Concernant la température du réservoir d'hélium: elle n'est pas enregistrée à faible débit binaire, e
こんにちは、カーナボ
コ
और एस पर 14 पाउंड। आपने क्वाड ए से बाकी की 
Okay, Jim. Wir wollen dir da entgegenkommen; es ist ein Thema, das wir mit dir besprechen wollten. Wir haben darüber nachgedacht, und unsere Meinung dazu ist – natürlich liegt die Entscheidung bei dir, aber wenn wir die Vor- und Nachteile abwägen, hast du ja bereits den Vorteil genannt. Wir führen kurz vor EI minus einer Stunde eine Luken-Integritätsprüfung durch, und wenn diese beschädigt ist, hättest du große Schwierigkeiten, in die Anzüge zu schlüpfen. Andererseits könnten die Anzüge dich erheblich verlangsamen, ganz abgesehen von der Zeit zum Anziehen. Außerdem besteht die Sorge, dass dir nach einer gewissen Zeit in den Anzügen zu warm werden könnte und wir dann die Anzug-Loop-Anlage zur Belüftung der Anzüge aktivieren müssten, was wir vermeiden wollen, da es viel Energie kostet. Daher hätten wir dir empfohlen, den Anzug nicht zu tragen, da wir keinen Grund zur Annahme haben, dass die Integritätsprüfung etwas andere
Roger. Questo nostro viaggio sulla Luna potrebbe esserti sembrato semplice o facile. Vorrei assicurarti che non è stato così. Il razzo Saturn V che ci ha portato in orbita è un macchinario incredibilmente complesso, ogni cui componente ha funzionato alla perfezione. Questo computer sopra la mia testa ha un vocabolario di 38.000 parole, ognuna delle quali è stata scelta con cura per essere del massimo valore per noi, l'equipaggio. Questo interruttore che ho in mano ora, ha oltre 300 controparti solo nel modulo di comando, questo singolo interruttore progettato. Oltre a questo, ci sono miriadi di interruttori, leve, aste e altri controlli associati. Il motore, il nostro grande motore a razzo 
Roger. Könntest du Buzz bi
알겠습니다. 연
13，休斯顿。方便的时候，我们需要/DELTA-P读数
Coperchio di atterraggio ap
Je pense que lors de cette mission de suivi, en utilisant la carte du monde et la carte détaillée de la régio
معك حق. أما ساعتي، فأظن أنها أسرع بثلا
阿波罗8号，你们能否在
다
Роджер. 110 в кормовой части, 
よし、マイク。もう態度を
أوه، هذا لون رائع؛ يجب أن
Jack, it is very comfortable. We've run it several times now and, in fact, it's being run right now, again. And we've run it both here at Houston and at the Cape. The only place where you might find that you need to stay ahead of things is during the platform-alinement period, when yo
罗杰，阿波罗11号。按照我们现在的态度，这就像你昨天经历
Oh oui. Ça ne m
罗
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. كنتُ أقرأ بعض نصوص
هذه قراءة أدق لمستوى الوقود، إذا تمكنت من الوصول إليه، ستكون 78% قبل عملية التخفيض. أنا مُهيأ لتنفيذ عملية التخفيض - تحكم آلي - بعد التخفيض، سأنتقل إلى التحكم الإلكتروني وأرفع مقدمة الطائرة إلى
离焊接开始还有20分钟。哦，不好意思，是10分钟——离焊接开始还有10分钟，不好意思。还有10分钟多一点——80:1
Хорошо, теперь я вас слышу. У меня для вас обновление карты на борту. Восходящий узел находится на 132° восточной до
Se lo si allinea a una velocità di 90 cm al secondo, con uno scarto di 10 gradi sulla piattaforma, sarebbe difficile per noi vederlo, per quanto riguarda il funzionamento Delta-V. Quindi perché non... quando arriviamo sul palco lo mettiamo in SEF per un po'. B
ح
ठीक है, एड जान, मैं शुरू करने जा
Роджер, Аполлон-8. Несколько замечаний: мы рассмотрели ваши векторы состояния и всю предоставленную информацию. Платформа выглядит хорошо,
О, чем дольше мы будем вести наблюдение, тем умнее станем; но вот один из п
Gemini 4，Carnarvon 
阿波罗11
Хорошо. Отлично. Мы тут немного расслабимся. У меня есть стартовая площадка Lift-Off Plus 15. С чтением не нужно спешить, так что дайте знать, когда будете готовы
Einen Moment bitte. Wir
अच्छा, हमारे पास ताननारिव होना चाहिए। चलिए आगे बढ़ते है
Ok. ILLUMINAZIONE: FLUSSO, PRINCIPALE A; ILLUMINAZIONE: FLUSSO
9、/：45597、マイナス040、プラス157、プラス34188、マイナス01353、プラス00780 180 008 001、NA、
Понятно, хорошо. Спасибо, оно было вы
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. تبدو الأسعار مناسبة. يمكنك البدء. 
首先
D'accord, Vance. En attendant, pour in
일몰이 정말 멋지네요. 오래 볼 필요도 없을 것 같아요. 정말 흥미롭습니다. 또 하나 신기한 건, 눈이 어둠에 적응하지 않았을
Potresti controllare la lettura dell'imbardata in base a ciò che hai letto per me in questo mo
حسنًا. هذا هو التحكم في الممر الأوسط 7، غير متوفر؛ 42، غير متوفر؛ بالإضافة إلى 0020.5؛ 0019.3. زمن 
Хорошо. Мы не убирали его с места хранения. Мы просто о
Ok. Volevamo... volevamo lanciarlo prima del periodo MAX, non credi? Hai idea di quando lo 
Tous les systèmes semblent en parfait état de fonc
Ok. Stai parlando forte e chiaro, e sono configurato per la voce normale. Se hai modifiche agli switch, fa
Okay, Jack. Going to hold up 1. All the hordes of people that devised this procedure are going to be coming into the room in a minute, and
Apollo 11, Houston. Non siamo ancora in grado di rilevarvi con l'antenna ad alto guadagno. Vi chiediamo di imposta
好的，我明白了
神称光为昼，称暗为夜。有晚上，有早晨，这是
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। फ्रेड, 74 घंटे पर हमारे प
ठीक है। हम शिफ्ट बदलने की तैयारी कर रहे हैं, और इससे पहले मैं कुछ बातों पर चर्चा करना चाहता था। अभी, ऐसा लग रहा है कि हवा की गति ज़्यादा से ज़्यादा 0.3 फुट प्रति सेकंड है, इसलिए मिडकोर्स नंबर 6 के लिए कोई बर्न नहीं होगा। मिडकोर्स नंबर 7 थोड़ा ज़्यादा 
Хорошо. Сигнал датчика CB, основной B, 
Думаю, здесь тоже мо
就连夏令营的孩子们也上
Roger
D'accord
分かりました。Apollo 8さん、もう一つコメントがあります。ナビゲーションのアンザップを行う前に
حسناً. بمجرد الانتهاء من هذا الإرسال، هل يُس
Dovrebbero darsi da fare per sistemare in q
好的，很好。关于组件指示灯，我们不需要 H2O SEP。好的，在 CB(16) 上，就在它正下方，“加热器显
هيوستن، هل يمكنك
Wir sind bereit, ihn gehen zu lassen, aber er hat den Ticketpreis
Okay, I guess the only question I have is in the first - the very first portion involving the here where it has me turn on the only BAT 6, and then turn off all the DESCENT BATTERIES. Are yo
वैसे तो मैं उनसे घर लौटने के बारे
حسنًا. سأعطيك 
E stamattina non abbiamo ricevuto alcun rapporto sullo stato dell'equipaggio. Ci chiedevamo se pot
Роджер, Фрэнк. На третьем участке траектории скорость составляет чуть больше 30 см в секунду, поэтому мы не рекомендуем вам его использовать. Это приводит нас к четвертому участку траектории со скоростью всего около 90 см в секунду. Ваша
La responsabilità di questo volo ricade innanzitutto sulla storia e sui giganti della scienza che hanno preceduto questo sforzo; poi sul popolo americano, che ha espresso il suo desiderio attraverso la propria volontà; poi, su quattro amministrazioni e sui loro Congressi, per aver attuato tale volontà; e infine, sui team delle agenzie e dell'industria che hanno costruito i nostri vei
समझ गए 
Roger. Say again ch
इनमें से केवल सबसे नई आकृति ही स्पष्ट रूप से
Negativo. Cape ci ha avvisato che sarai in diretta negli Stati Uniti. C'è qualcosa che vuoi condividere con noi, prima che ti man
No, non potevo. Forse mi hai frainteso. Non vedevo nessun edificio. E potresti dire agli a
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया 
D'accord. La purge est terminée. Merci. Concernant votre système cryogénique, il semble que nous aurons 82 kg dans chaque
Dispiegamento del pallon
火车车厢现在正驶离车站
Pourquoi ne pas simple
로저. 저희가 롤 각도를 참고하고 있
Wonder if I should put my gl
Roger. Wir haben das Raumschiff und die Steuerung der Trägerrakete überprüft. Beides scheint in Ordnung zu sein. Wir schätzen die Wahrscheinlichkeit eines Steuerungsausfalls der Trägerrakete auf über 99 Prozent, daher hält alles offenbar sehr gut. Zur Information: Wir haben etwa eine Minute lang ein brauchbares Fernsehbild empfangen, das System funkti
Roger. J'ai
알
Quel transponder è stato controllato. Spero che ne abbiano uno bel
تقول إن لديك حوالي 3 فولتات وشيء هن
खैर, चूंकि हमें यकीन नहीं है कि पिछली बार यह लगभग 10 मिनट तक मैकेनिकल स्टॉप से ​​टकराया था, इसलिए मुझे नहीं लगता कि इस बार ऐसा करना बहुत
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 이상
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 지금 인버터 온도를 원하시
ア
- - è tutto
Es dauert noch ein paar Minuten, bis ich
D'accord. À 1 h, nous avons photographié la cible 90 et le terminateur côté sud. À partir de 2 h, nous avons photographié la cible 12 et les cibles 10, 14, 16, 19, 20, 21 et 23. Malheureusement, nous avons eu un problème de sensibilité: j'ai utilisé la pellicule haute vitesse quelque part, et je pense que les cibles de 250 mm étaient en haute sensibilité. Nous avons changé de pellicule et avons commencé à Tex Crater, au Texas, avec les cibles 28, 31, 40 et 36, ainsi que plusieurs cibles d'opportunité qui ont
我们会在夏威夷上空向您汇报最终的高度调整情况。另外，请您检查一下 X 轴……它略微超出公差范围。因此，在进行高度调整之前，请不要立即按下“开始补偿”按钮
Okay. Die erste Zusatzfrage lautet: Lassen Sie mich die Originalfrage wiederholen, da es in dieser Frage heißt: „Genauer zu Punkt 2“, und Punkt 2 lautet: „Gab es signifikante Änderungen des Geräusch- und Vibrationspegels während der einstufigen Triebwerksabschaltung?“ Beschreiben Sie bitte Ihre Beobachtungen während der frühen Phase des Abschaltens des mittleren Triebwerks der S-II. Etwa 90 Sekunden vor dem Abschalten berichteten Sie von starken Vibrationen. Wir möchten Sie bitten, den A
अरे, एस-बैंड पर इस सीओएमएम मोड में आप मुझे कैसे
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM입니다. 냉각수 온도가 상승하고 있음을 알려드립니다. 컴퓨터 문제 해결에 대해 낙관적으로
-4
Gemini 4, CSQ. Не могли б
캡슐에 표시되는 경과 시간이 간혹 1초 정도 빠르게 표시되었다가 저희 시간과 일치하고, 다시 1
Tienilo stretto, tesoro. Dov'è quel libro di G&N? C
Хорошо. И ещё один вопрос, Чарли. Хотелось бы узнать, находится ли примечание, которое вы мне дали, о снижении ставок, перед остальной информацией на
昔の毘翅目が美しく見えています。ヌンキも見えています。南半球の毘翅目も見えています。ヌンキは飛行経路上、まさに本来あるべき位置にあります。ヨーは0度、左ロールは5度、後退姿勢です。なぜこんなに複雑なのか、ぜひ知りたいですね。そして、あの人たちの上空にもう一つ明るい星が見えています。きっとアルタイルでしょう。素晴らしい
Okay. Wir sind un
Abbiamo aperto il portello, rimosso e riposto il drogue e la sonda, e ora siamo
分かりました。ジャック、水についてもう1つ注意点
D'accord, Vance. Les résultats du test
إذن، الأكسجين 
Roger, Gemini VI. Request that you kick the tape recorder. We feel that the tape might be o
Roger. Aqua
plus 11 / 63140, moins 163, plus 129, moins 00599, plus 00000.
13，休斯顿。方便的时
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы забираем вас сейчас над Бермудскими островами. Я 
Я вижу чёрный огонь в пустыне. Видно прямо до самого источника, откуда он исходит. Я не смог точно разглядеть, что это было, но он оставил очень, очень отчётливый след на земле. Я сделал несколько снимков местности с S-5, когда мы пересекали 17-ю трассу. Такое ощущение, что у нас провал в седьмом журнале. Кажется, одна из собак не улавливает плёнку или плёнка срывается. Не знаю. Не думаю, что мы извлечём из этого чт
フレンドシップ・セブン、フレンド
جيري، بعد
Hey, Jim, do you suppose that you could orient the so that the service module would be between you and the Sun? I believe you could see - recognize constellations out your front 
Хьюстон, криогенные установки запущены, и не могли бы вы также вкратце рассказать о температуре на лин
Roger. Deke, la mia modalità di controllo è manuale; i giroscopi sono bloccati; l'interruttore di manovra è spento. Il livello del carburante è 45 e 42 [percento]; l'ossigeno è 76 e 100 [percento]; le temperature dello sfiato del vapore sulla tuta son
10、/：45597、マイナス040、プラス157、プラス35186、
अरे, मुझे लगता है कि हमारी नाव का घूर्णन (याव ड्रिफ्ट) र
收到，双子座8号。当前时间为03:47:35，速度增量​​61.2；扭矩增量1加22；偏航角0度；俯仰角向下21度；核心
コロンビア。了解。了解
Houston, Apollo 11. Sto osservando quella nube attorno al Pakistan attraverso il
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, dès que votre poussée OAMS dépasse 120 pieds/seconde, nous effectuerons une double poussée: 84 pieds avec les propulseurs avant et le reste avec les pro
Хорошо. 36-4 40 футов/сек вперед. Это 1+06. 120 футов/сек назад
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Перед нами континент Африка... и, конечно же, с течением времени всё становится всё меньше и меньше. Средиземное море совершенно чистое. Солнце, кажется, вот-вот зайдёт над Мадагаскаром. Экваториальный пояс Африки выделяется очень чётко. Мы видим тёмно-зелёный или мутно-зелёный цвет, в отличие от более песочных оттенков на южной оконечности Африки и, конечно же, северного побережья Сахары. В районе границы между Афганистаном и Пакистаном появилось довольно пр
Okay, I'm going to go to C
रॉजर। मैं आपको पाँच
Roger. Well you're doing a
罗
了解しました。「ACCEPT」で、中間コース3は不要
了解しました。さて、月周回軌
제미니 4, 카나리 CAP COM.
حسنًا. في اللوحة 3: جهاز الإرسال والاستقبال إل
알겠습니다. 순서대로 ARM BATT A, 그리고 BATT B 순으로 들어갑니
D'accord. Passons aux choses plus prosaïques, maintenant que nous avons quitté la Lune. J'aimerais vous parler un peu des évolutions concernant l'alimentation. Je suis sûr que vous avez déjà vu le type de récipient pour boisson. Un peu plus tard, Mike vous montrera comment fonctionne le pistolet à eau avec son nouveau filtre pour éliminer l'hydrogène. En gros, ce pistolet à eau est placé à cette extrémité et remplit ce sac d'eau, la boisson se dissout ensuite dans l'eau, et c'est ainsi que se déroule la distribution. De même, nous avons d'autres aliments plus solides. Vous avez probablement vu ce cocktail de crevettes cet après-midi, pendant que nous mangions une salade de saumon. Une autre évolution rapide a été l'utilisation d'aliment
友谊七号
알겠습니다. 우선 가장 먼저 해야 할 일은 플랫폼 병렬 처리 06 50에서 07 10까지입니
ठीक है। टेप 
١١، هيوستن. نشكركم على هذا العرض. شكرًا جزيلً
Подтверждаю.
Und als wir anfingen zu gier
Roger. Copy, Gemini, and be advised they're planning to come into a -3 area. They're looking into 6 or
네, 맞습니다. 저분이 짐 러벨입니다. 오늘 저희는 아폴로 8호 내부의 생활에 대해 간략하게 보여드리려고 합니다. 달과 지구의 모습은 이미 보여드렸으니, 이제 저희의 보금자리로 여러분을 초대하려고 합니다. 보시다시피 계기판에서 알 수 있듯이, 저희는 최소 4일 동안 이곳에 머물렀습니다. 계기판에 매일 날짜를 표시하는데, 오늘로 4일째이고 5일째를 보내고 있습니다. 물론 저희 모두 금요일 착륙을 손꼽아 기다리고 있습니다. 여기, 우주선 하부 장비실이라고 부르는 곳에서 대통령 체력 담당 고문이신 짐 러벨 대위님께서 매일 하는 운동 프로그램을 시작하시려고 합니다. 러벨 대위님이 아주 자유롭게 떠다니는 게 보이시죠? 방금 항법에 사용되는 광학 장치에 머리를 
네, 세계 뉴스부터 시작하겠습니다. 아폴로 8호 우주비행사들에 대한 찬사와 우주 탐사 분야에서의 국제 협력에 대한 기대감이 전 세계에 퍼졌습니다. 작은 우주선이 달 궤도를 돌고 있는 동안, 전 세계는 크리스마스
روجر، هاواي. فهمت. استعد للهجوم B، 01 34 37؛ دلتا-في، 2.9؛ المدة، 0 زائد 05؛ الانعراج 0، الميل 0؛ العنوان 25، 90029؛ 26 جميعها 
رو
好
В правой части страницы 25, где находится заголовок «Фотосъемка солнечной короны и осветления края диска Солнца», вы
Roger. Der Grund für die Verzögerung, Charlie, ist, dass es schwierig ist, zwei Sterne zu finde
ああ、ちょっと考え
أبولو 8، هل يمكنك التأكد من أنك قمت بضبط العدسات قبل 
Hallo Gus. Wie liest 
G
ठीक है, और आप वाकई बहुत अच्छे हैं। यह - यह सब शोर न होना वाकई सुखद है। जिम, मैं आपको बताता हूँ कि मैं क्या करना चाहता हूँ। जैसा कि मैंने कहा, हम अभी आपको विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ
Roger. PAD di ingresso MIDPAC: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, più 1102, meno 17
저는 작
, Canary. I have your radiator temperatures,
Я попробую вашу технику с периодом дрейфа для этой орбиты, используя — думаю, это будет очень весело. 
Okay. We 
그럼 지구는 이제 어디에 있는 거
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في جهاز المحاكاة، إن لم يكن بنفس السهولة. لذا أكملنا المهمة حتى النهاية. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون، كنت قد قررت أننا لن نتمكن من الوصول، لكنني فكرت في الاستمرار قليلًا. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون - أو قبل مغادرتنا لها بقليل - كان واضحًا لي أننا لن نتمكن من تخفيض الضغط. طلبتُ الانتقال إلى المدار التالي. ثم... استعدنا أنفاسنا لمدة 20 دقيقة تقريبًا وحاولنا ترتيب الخردة المتناثرة في قمرة القيادة. ثم أخرجتُ قائمة التحقق، وراجعناها بتفصيلٍ دقيق للتأكد من عدم إغفال أي شيء في عجلة من أمرنا. بدأنا عملية السير خارج المركبة، وحصلنا على إشارة البدء فوق كارنارفون. كنا على أتم الاستعداد، وكنا ننتظر إشارة البدء لبدء عملية تخفيف الضغط. وقد حصلنا عليها. أكملنا دورة تخفيف الضغط. عند مغادرتنا كارنارفون، حصلنا على تصريح السير الكامل خارج المركبة. وصلنا إلى كانتون أو هاواي، وفي ذلك الوقت، أعتقد أن كانتون أو هاواي هي التي أعطتنا إشارة البدء للخروج من المركبة الفضائية وبدء مناورات السير خارج المركبة. أنجزنا ذلك كما هو موضح في مسجل الصوت الذي سجلناه مسبقًا، وكذلك في موقع جهاز الاتصال الصوتي. انطلقنا، وخرج إد، وبدأنا بالتقاط الصور كما نفعل عادةً... في البداية، ثبتُّ المركبة الفضائية له. ثم عندما خرج، وبدا وكأنه يطفو بطريقةٍ لم أستطع تتبعها، ق
Vola come un'astronave invece che come un simulatore. Spero che sia una
Okay, Joe. Ich richte 
In etwa einer Minute sollte d
收到。是的。好的，我现在切换到电传操纵，切换到辅助阻尼，现在——姿态不匹配。还有五分钟开始逆行；指示灯亮了。我的下降率大约是每秒10到12英尺
77:44 - はい、 - LOS は予
Kano Cap Com, stai arrivando debole 
Гас, 
좋아요, 산소 고농도 공급 3분 10초 됐네요. 5분 동안은 안 돼요. 사람이 견딜 수 있는 시간
Ну, всё, что мы от вас хотим, это чтобы вы снова навели прицел в автоматическом режиме, Билл. И, похоже, это один из способо
ハハハ。いいショーだったね。ちょっと待って、ケープに電話するから。何かあるか聞いて
Мне так и не удалось проверить смещение акселерометра на платформе. Я большую часть времени работал в режиме толчка и не мог как следует стабилизировать платформу. Думаю, мы пропустили пару записей из-за странного положения, в котором находились. С Карнарвоном я не смог хорошо связаться с первого раза. Жаль, 
네, 맞습니다. 우선 주요 이벤트 시간을 간단히 훑어보고 나서 세부 사항을 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 좋습니다. 진입 인터페이스는 142시간 40분, 즉 약 6시간 30분 전에 시작합니다. 히터 전원을 켜고, CM/ 온도를 확인하고 필요하면 CM/을 예열합니다. 아마도 예열이 필요할 것으로 예상됩니다. 자세한 절차는 나중에 안내해 드리겠습니다. 약 6시간 전에는 이전 중간 점검 때 사용했던 수정된 30분 체크리스트를 사용하여 전원을 켜기 시작합니다. 그리고 약 5시간 전에는 이전처럼 지구 종단면을 사용하여 기체 축 정렬 자세를 취해야 합니다. 그리고 그게 준비되는 대로 -7 단계를 수행할 건데,
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन से। जब आपके प
Gemini 
One thing the world might be interested in knowing is what you do after the burn in the way of configuring switches back. We - We heard you go through the checklist. But, I guess
Ricevuto. Ripeto, il tuo vettore di stato è a posto; è ancora un po' instabile, e il motivo per cui siamo qui è che stiamo controllando se qualche informazione è andata persa. Questo è il primo motivo, e il secondo motivo è che la tua matrice W condivide alcune celle di memoria del computer con, e stia
अरे, डॉक्टर को बता देना कि मुझे बोनस पॉइंट क
まだ聞こえます。奥の部屋で誰かが椅子を叩いているような音が
Горизонт выглядит как очень оранжевая полоса. По мере захода солнца оно простирается далеко в стороны, примерно на 45° с ка
Ok. Ho delle informazioni meteo e sulla situazione delle forze di recupero, oltre a un paio di c
Это первый случай п
Да,
下の
Вы хотите это сделать, или вы пр
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous allons basculer sur le système de secours Upvoice pendant environ deux minutes. La transition
さて、食事についてコメントさせてください。これまでオレンジジュースの袋、つまり私が水を入れた袋（オレンジジュースがどんな形であれ、パイナップルジュースでも、オレンジジュースそのものでも）の全てで、水漏れが発生しました。今のところ、他に水漏れした袋はたった一つだけで、フライト開始から既に60時間以上が経過しています。しかし、全てのオレンジジュースの袋から水漏れが発生しま
D'accord. À la fin de la procédure, après les étapes BAT 5 et 6, OFF, ajoutez les éléments suivants: disjoncteurs, panneaux
Houston, 13. Wir sind nicht erreichba
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमने आपको पीटीसी में रोक लिया है; स्थिति हमें ठीक लग रही है। माइक, मुझे संचार जांच चाहिए। अंतरिक्ष यान से पिछले कुछ प्रसारण अस्पष्ट रहे हैं, खासकर बज़ से। क्या आ
망원렌즈를 사용해 보는 건 어떨까요? 초점을 맞추기가 조금 더 어려워지겠지만, 더 좋은 사진이 나올 수도 있
Va bene. Non devi ammetterlo: ti trovi in ​​un'orbita
Это был, пожалуй, самый короткий день в моей жи
RESETをCOMMANDに設定し
हम पानी के उपयोग के पैटर्न का बारीकी से विश्लेषण कर रहे हैं, और फिलहाल हमारा रुख यही है कि एक को चालू रखा जाए और दूसरे को बंद कर दिया जाए, लेकिन हम आपको जल्द ही और जानकारी देंगे। सोते समय हम आपको सलाह देते हैं कि एक व्यक्ति को निगरानी के लिए तैनात कर दें। यदि संभव हो तो कृपया पेशाब न करें,
That's affirmative. What we want to do, if we got a manual start, we'r
罗杰。如果你想拍照，我们建议使用装有高速黑白胶卷的杂志型Uniform相机，关掉车内灯，用哈苏电动相机配80毫米镜头。看来你得帮我们拿着相机了。我们建议光圈设
好的。我们刚才似乎锁定了目标——大概一分钟前，“TUNE FOR MAX”指针一直
हे फ्रेड? ये जेटिसन बैग एकदम एयरटाइट हैं, अगर आप इन्हें लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड बैग या इसी तरह की किसी चीज को लपेटने के लिए इस्तेमाल करना चा
Хорошо. Подключите кабели. Шаг 2, питание 1 AC и 2 AC, замкнуты, автоматические выключатели. Шаг 3, панель 5: сигнал датчика, основная шина B, замкнут. Шаг 4, панель... замкнута. Затем основная шина B, шина B, замкнута. Проверьте напряжение на основной шине, затем включите питание. Шаг 7: авт
صحيح، وبما أنك ما زلت على بعد ساعة، فأعتقد أنه من الأفضل استخدام خاصية "الدفع الأدنى" أو ما شابه بدلاً من الخاصية الحالية، على الأقل ل
Хорошо. Мы на странице — активация 12, 13, на шаге 4, проверка обратной связи Descent — серый цвет, и они отобр
निश्चित रूप से मुझसे नीचे। मैं कार्नार्वोन से ही इसे अपने नीचे ट्रैक कर रहा था। कार्नार्वोन तक यह हमारे नीचे था, फिर क्षितिज तक, और फिर से हमारे नीचे। ऐसा लग रहा था मानो यह मुझसे अलग कक्षा में हो। इसका अपोजी और पेरिजी मुझसे अलग था। खैर, जैसे ही मुझे इसकी स्थिति का पता चला, मैंने दिन के उजाले में इसके करीब जाने की कोशिश की। जैसा कि मैंने कहा, उस समय यह मुझसे एक या दो मील आगे था - मेरे नीचे। इसलिए, जितना अधिक मैंने करीब जाने की कोशिश की, उतना ही मैं इसके करीब नहीं पहुँच पाया। मैं प्रतिगामी गति से थ्रस्ट चला रहा था। मैं अपने ऊपरी थ्रस्टर्स का उपयोग इस तरह से कर रहा था जिससे मेरी कुल गति कम हो जाए, और फिर एक ही समय में थ्रस्ट चला रहा था। मैं वास्तव में इसके करीब नहीं पहुँच पाया, और यह मुझसे दूर होता चला गया। मुझे यह स्पष्ट हो गया कि जब तक हम हवाई पहुँचेंगे, बूस्टर के साथ ईवीए करने के लिए बूस्टर के करीब पहुँचने में शायद हमारे पास मौजूद सारा ईंधन खर्च हो जाएगा। हमने ग्राउंड रूल में ऐसा न करने पर सहमति जताई थी। इसलिए मैंने कैप कॉम से बात की और हमने मिशन के बूस्टर वाले हिस्से को आगे न बढ़ाने का फैसला किया। मुझे नहीं पता मैंने इसका जिक्र किया था या नहीं, लेकिन जब हम बूस्टर से अलग हुए, तो ऐसा लगा कि बूस्टर पर हमारी गति धीमी थी, पिच और यॉ में लगभग आधा डिग्री प्रति सेकंड की दर से। मैंने इसे कम करने की कोशिश की। मैंने हर दिशा में एक-एक आवेग छोड़ा, और फिर बूस्टर स
Okay. When you pick up your activities, I have a preferred alignment here that I want you to be in 
لا، على حد علمي، الأمر 
Bien. Si vous le voyez, vous pouvez sortir le sextant, mais je ne vous recommande pas de 
لنلقِ نظرة على عالم الرياضة. بينما كنتم منشغلين بالأمس، أعلن جو ناماث ومفوض كرة القدم بيت روزيل أن "برودواي جو" قد وافق على بيع حصته في مطعم باتشيلورز 3 والانضمام إلى فريق نيويورك جيتس. وصل جو إلى معسكر تدريب الجيتس اليوم وخاض أول تدريب له. كما انضم عدد من لاعبي الجيتس الآخرين الذين كانوا قد امتنعوا عن اللعب مع جو. أما ديفي هيل، من جاكسون بولاية ميشيغان، فقد فاز ببطولة الجولف الكبرى الثالثة له في ثلاث مشاركات خلال الأسبوع الماضي، حيث فاز ببطولة فيلادلفيا كلاسيك. وقد فاز هيل بأربع بطولات حتى الآن هذا العام، وهو صاحب أعلى رصيد من الأرباح هذا العام بمبلغ 129 ألف دولار. وفي لعبة البيسبول، لا تزال المنافسة محتدمة في القسم الغربي من الدوري الوطني. يتأخر فريقا لوس أنجلوس وسان فرانسيسكو بفارق مباراة واحدة عن أتلانتا المتصدرة. يمتلك فريق أستروس سجلاً من 48 فوزاً و48 خسارة، ويحتل الآن المركز الخامس بفارق سبع مباريات. وقد تم تأجيل مباراتين متتاليتين بين أستروس وسينسيناتي الليلة الماضية بسبب الأمطار. لا يزال فريق شيكاغو كابز متصدرًا للقسم الشرقي، متقدمًا على نيويورك ميتس بأربع مباريات ونصف. وفي الدوري الأمريكي، يتقدم فريق بالتيمور بثبات نحو لقب القسم الشرقي، متقد
टेप डंप पूर
Not very much. There was quite a bit of Kapton and parts of the 
في س
Negativo. Non mi sembra di vederne da queste parti. Ne ho viste alcune, solo alcune, subito dopo av
Columbia, Houston. Your AUTO - AUTO optics landmark ID on. T1, 106 plus 30 plus 31; T2, 106 plus 35 plus 41, 2 nautical miles south. Your TCA, 106 plus 37 plus 16.
좋아, 잭, 네 말이
Oui, à Dallas, on pleure. Côté basket: Houston n'a pas brillé ce week-end. L'Illinois a battu Houston 97 à 84. Et la Caroline du Nord a vaincu les Owls sur le score de 85 à 77. Frank, on a parlé des 
C
Поверь мне, Канари
Hallo, Canary Cap Com, laut und deutlich auf Kurzwelle. Wie geht's? 
ヒューストン、こちらはジムです。フレッドが月着陸船に乗って以来、そして彼が月着陸船のパイロットになって以来、彼が自分の体が正しい状態にあると感じたのは
現
这很有意思。表面很软，但偶尔我用应急取样器插入的地方，会碰到很硬的表面，不过看起来都是同一种非常粘稠的材料。我试着
Bene. Questa è la procedura per caricare BAT Baker. Pannello 3; CARICA BAT, OFF; pannello 5; COLLEGAMENTO BUS PRINCIPALE, BAT A/C su A/C; CARICA BATTERIE CB, CARICA BAT A, aperto; CARICA BATTERIE CB, CARICA BAT B, chiuso. Pannello 250; INGRESSO ALIMENTAZIONE BAT B CB e POSTLANDING, chiuso. Pannello 5; COLLEGAMENTO BUS PRINCIPALE, BAT B/C, su OFF; Pannello 3; CARICA BAT su B. Questo è un DELTA per la
11, это Хьюстон. У меня есть ваш перицинтион плюс 2 PAD, фо
Ро
Oui, sa trajectoire est aléatoire. Je ne peux prévoir aucune oscillation. Le câble qui relie le ballon est parfois tendu, parfois lâche – suffisamment lâche pour former des boucles. Son comportement est totalement aléatoire, à ce que je sache. Le ballon n'est pas bien gonflé non plus. Il a une forme o
Roger, we got your ground-to-ground here. I got a map update for you. Ready to co
الكاميرا مخزنة. مقياس الضوء خفيف بما يكفي لإخراجه وتركه. سأجري فحصًا آخر على جهاز صغير هنا قبل أن ننهي المهمة. وقد ارتفع مستوى الإشارة بمقدار سُمك خط و
わかりました、ケン。一つ思うのは、このデカールは、まだアンビリカルケーブル
रॉजर, मैं तुम्हें भी मुश्किल स
Jim, pourrais-tu inverser la position de ton commutateur BIOMED? Nous recevons une sous
Мне так и не удалось проверить смеще
Houston, we made the burn at 7.7 plus X plus 00001 Y; and Z's a
Roger. Wally, tes transmissions UHF sont légèrement brouillées. Essaie de régler 
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Ро
Армстронг говорит, что дело в люке, и если мы ос
Je vous entends très faiblement, il y a une indication de transmission de lumière et de son s
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في جهاز المحاكاة، إن لم يكن بنفس السهولة. لذا أكملنا المهمة حتى النهاية. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون، كنت قد قررت أننا لن نتمكن من الوصول، لكنني فكرت في الاستمرار قليلًا. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون - أو قبل مغادرتنا لها بقليل - كان واضحًا لي أننا لن نتمكن من تخفيض الضغط. طلبتُ الانتقال إلى المدار التالي. ثم... استعدنا أنفاسنا لمدة 20 دقيقة تقريبًا وحاولنا ترتيب الخردة المتناثرة في قمرة القيادة. ثم أخرجتُ قائمة التحقق، وراجعناها بتفصيلٍ دقيق للتأكد من عدم إغفال أي شيء في عجلة من أمرنا. بدأنا عملية السير خارج المركبة، وحصلنا على إشارة البدء فوق كارنارفون. كنا على أتم الاستعداد، وكنا ننتظر إشارة البدء لبدء عملية تخفيف الضغط. وقد حصلنا عليها. أكملنا دورة تخفيف الضغط. عند مغادرتنا كارنارفون، حصلنا على تصريح السير الكامل خارج المركبة. وصلنا إلى كانتون أو هاواي، وفي ذلك الوقت، أعتقد أن كانتون أو هاواي هي التي أعطتنا إشارة البدء للخروج من المركبة الفضائية وبدء مناورات السير خارج المركبة. أنجزنا ذلك كما هو موضح في مسجل الصوت الذي سجلناه مسبقًا، وكذلك في موقع جهاز الاتصال الصوتي. انطلقنا، وخرج إد، وبدأنا بالتقاط الصور كما نفعل عادةً... في البداية، ثبتُّ المركبة الفضائية له. ثم عندما خرج، وبدا وكأنه يطفو بطريقةٍ لم أستطع تتبعها، قررنا في البداية أنه من الأفضل تركها تنجرف. هل
D'accord. Au travail
Ok. Mi pare di aver letto che eri pronto. Ho dimenticato... gli auricolari. Consiste semplicemente nel prendere un secondo paio di cartucce dal modulo di comando, mettere una striscia di nastro adesivo, quello grigio, con il lato adesivo rivolto verso l'esterno, attorno ai lati di ogni nuovo contenitore, vicino alla parte superiore, prendere un pezzo di cartoncino e tagliarlo in quattro quadrati di circa 5 o 7,5 cm di lato, piegarli ad angolo retto per formare un supporto angolare, attaccarli al nastro adesivo in modo che sporgano e si sovrappongano al vecchio contenitore, e poi semplicemente posizionare il vecchio contenitore accanto al nuovo contenitore e f
こんにちは、アポロ11号。
मुझे समझ नहीं आ रहा कि हमारा रिकॉर्डर काम क्यों नहीं कर 
收到。返回 BLOCK 和 DOI：101:36:14.07；减去 0075.8，加上全零，加上 000
不，还好。大部分杂物都塞在腿底下，脚后跟后面，反正也不常用，所以没什么不舒服的。不过相机
... un po' come la luce zodiacale. Continua ad allont
Und Apollo 13, Houston. Wir möchten die S-Band- und Antennenkonfiguration ändern. Bitte auf Omni-Delta umstellen. B
ओह। इस 
Potres
حسنا
ठीक है, जैक, हमारे पास एक पैंतरेबाज़ी पैड है, मुक्त वापसी के लिए एक मध्यमार्ग है। माइनस 0021.3, प्लस 004.1, माइनस 0031.2; HA और HP उपलब्ध नहीं; डेल्टा-VR 0038.0; 031, 120, 298; माइनस 00213, प्लस 00041, माइनस 00312 उपलब्
На самом деле, Билл только что упомянул, что видимость, похоже, отличная почти до самой 
C'est une possibilité à laquelle nous avons pensé, Jim, car nous avons chauffé ce réservoir et nous n'avons pas utilisé d'hy
Ro
네, 첫 번째 별의 경우, 보정된 고도는 15km ± 4km이고, 유효 고도는 12km ± 7km입니다. 항성 바로 아래 지점의 값은 분각 단위로 2분각으로, 아주 정확합니다. 나머지 부분은 몇 시간 후에 다시 알려
Je l'ai allumé à 11h50 et à 12h15, le voyant Atti
いいえ。まだ作業中です。スティーブ・グレガさんに伝えていただけると嬉しいです。ランデブー手順につ
Sigma Seven, hier spricht Muchea Cap Com. Ich gla
Okay, Fred. Das Manöverziel ist PC + 2, bis jetzt fliegen wir zum MPL. Und, 079, 27, 4013, plus 08144, minus 00443, minus 02226, Apogäum i
كاليف
Oui,
Madrid, Houston COMM T
어젯밤에는 그곳에서 여기까지 올 수 없었어요
好的。请您在方便的时候进入系统，检查以下阀门，并按照我们这里列出的设置进行操作。减压阀（REPRESS PACKAGE），关闭；紧急舱压阀（EMERGENCY CABIN PRESSURE），关闭；直接氧气阀（DIRECT O2），关闭；需求调节阀（DEMAND REG），关
Was du siehst, Mike, ist – Houston, was du siehst, ist die westliche Hemisphäre. Ganz oben ist der Nordpol; in der Mitte – etwas tiefer – Südamerika – bis 
अपोलो 8, अब हम संचार परीक्षण शुरू करने जा र
Roger. Ab
... एटीट्यूड ऑन के लिए, वॉली। 
전류는 
Roger. Questo è un argomento che sta ricevendo molta attenzione, e
Roger. 55 percent. Could I have the temperature and pressure
لا أعرف، لكنه بالتأكيد أحدث خللاً بسيطاً عند الدقيقة الثانية؛ أعتقد أنه 
E, Apollo 11, Houston. Il
ठी
双子座 4 号，双子座 4 
Poursuivre
Roger. Ho 3,8 e
존, 텍사스 고개를 넘을 때 레트로팩을 계속 착용해 둬. 글은 읽을 줄 
Spero che i ragazzi nella stanza sul retro che h
Роджер. Я принял одну таблетку Актифед (пишется Actyfed) через 21 час 3
쌍둥이자리
روجر. لن نستخدم العدسة المقربة. لا أعتقد أننا سنتمكن من التقاط صورة للأرض. سنضطر إلى تصوير خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار، سطح القمر. أنا أنظر إلى الأرض الآن؛ ولن نرا
We're going to have the flares. All four of them go at approximately 00 [plus] 58 plus 30. We do have an eight by eight covera
로저, 11. 배터리 충전 문제에 대해 말씀드리자면, 배터리마다 차이가 있는 것으로 보이며, 여기서는 초기 시동 과정에서 발생했던 일시적인 현상이 사라진 것 같습니다. 배터리 온도와 같은 다른 요인들도 영향을 미칠 수 있을 것으로 예상
鹰，这里是哥伦比亚。休斯顿希望你重新获取高增益信
はい、そうしました。バスタイのモータースイッチを使って両方のバスの電源を入れ、バスタイのモータースイッチを外したいということですね。まず、バスに負荷がかかっていないことを確認し、次に回路ブレーカーを引いてバスの電源を切ります。モータースイッチがオンにならないようにするためです。バスタイがオンのままで、必要な時に使えるようにするためで
Nun ja, ich habe es versucht, aber es hat nicht geklappt. Ich dachte, du wü
Apollo 11. Pronto 
저건 평면에서 크게 벗어난 건데, 어느 방
Je vois des éléments se détacher, mais ce n'est pas très net. On passe à 0,05, feu vert. Je n'y touche plus. En mode commande de vitesse, amortissement auxiliaire. Le taux de roulis est activé. Un léger taux de tangage, pas mal du tout. Je peux enfin voir par la fenêtre, allez savoir pourqu
好的。还剩87小时35分钟
ठीक है। पैनल 225 पर। इसमें वही रीडिंग आएगी, बस फर
ठीक है। और अगर माइक के पास एक मिनट का समय हो, तो हम थोड़ी सी समस्या का निवारण करना चाहेंगे। ऐसा लगता है कि या तो उसकी छाती चपटी है या क
ちょっと面白い、ちょっと嬉しいニュースがあります。ミシガン州アナーバーに、新しい若者ギャングが誕生したそうです。ギルネット・ギャングという名前で、アナーバーの街を徘徊し、秘密裏に活動し、時には法の網をかいくぐっています。彼らは自らを「善のためのゲリラ」と名乗っています。彼らの活動の一つに、卑猥な言葉で埋め尽くされた橋をペンキで塗ったことがありました。ある夜、彼らはそれをペンキで塗りつぶしたのです。近所の子供たちに人気があるものの危険な廃屋は板で覆われました。企業と政府のどちらが責任を負っているのかという議論で埋め尽くされてしまったダウンタウンのプランターには、花が植えられました。交通量の多い交差点の視界を妨げていると考えられていた生垣が刈り込まれ、所有者は激怒しました。ヒューロン川沿いのゴミ拾いも行われました。ギャングのメンバーは匿名のティーンエイジャーで、個人として認められようとはしません。彼らの目的は、官僚主義を打破し、物事（彼らにとって良いこと）を成し遂げることです。この組織にはかすかな宗教的色合いがある。ミシガン大学の助教授は、ギャングの思想について非公式に意見交換する場を設けており、一種のエキュメニカルなグループだと語る。名前は聖ペテロ、漁師の網に由来する。また、特定の教会と結び付けられないほど人里離れた場所に拠点を置いている。匿名を希望する彼らの教師は、「この組織にはロビン・フッドの血が流れている」と語る。彼らの活動の多くは超法規的だ。組織が行き詰まった際には、官僚的な手続きを経ずに、直
Yes, I noticed that. Before, it was maintaining less than that; it was abnormally low. I almost asked them about it during boost, and then I decided to heck with it. Damn, it'll be hard to see throu
1, G&N: 62710, плюс 098, минус 019, зажигание 075 49 4965, минус 28897, минус 03944, минус 00686. Крен 358, шаг 226, 347; 01692, плюс 00610; 29173 602 29108; секстант 31 1066 358. Остальная часть PAD — NA. Выровнять Вегу и Денеб 243 183 012. Нет зазора. Горизонт будет ви
रॉजर। मुझे सिर्फ बिजली चमकती हुई दिखाई दे रही है। लगता है आप लगभग पूरी तरह से घिर गए हैं। मैं थोड़ी देर यहीं रुकूंगा और
Это подтве
Go
Jack, pronto per il dump della memoria elettronica. Penso che saremo pronti tra ci
Ok. Sembra che non riusciremo a riprodurre la voce normale. Nei serbatoi criogenici, abbiamo avuto un bel po' di destratificazione, in particolare nell'ossigeno, e lo noterete durante i cicli delle ventole e... quindi ci assicureremo e vi ricorderemo di nuovo di mescolare l'ossigeno prima... sta procedendo come un orologio. G&C ci dice che le quantità sembrano buone. State
네, 맞습니다. 패드에 
Columbia, hier spricht Houston. Wir können Ihnen bezüglich der topografischen Gegebenheiten le
Хорошо. Хорошо, мы это приняли. Хотелось бы, чтобы он проверил силу тока; посмот
Хорошо. Плюс 3195, минус 01267, плюс 04716 179 008 001, неприменимо, плюс 00187 33552 311 33355 42 0909 252. Вы еще со мной? Конец 
Роджер. Мы видим, что температура на выходе радиатора топливного элемента 2 сос
그리고 본질적으로, 그것은 바로 우리의 X축이 태양
Hallo, Kommunikationstechnik. Freundschaft Sieben. Wie können Sie mich lese
Ok, Jim. Stiamo ancora raccogliendo le nostre idee, ma alcune considerazioni ci dicono che possiamo effettuare quella correzione probabilmente anche dopo 118 ore, senza penalità significative per il DELTA-V e con un monitoraggio approfondito in seguito per assicurarci di aver fatto la cosa giusta e per prepararti a una correzione tardiva se ne avessimo bisogno, cosa che probabilmente non accadrebbe. Siamo soddisfatti della modalità in cui ti trovi ora e, anche
Ok. Elimina le corse Apollo Landmark 2 e 3. Quella zona è nuvolosa e per aiutarti con il tempo trascorso del volo
Roger. Era
Роджер. 
好的。我只是想知道它们是
ठीक है। और आपकी टाइमलाइन के सं
罗杰。他们还在忙活。他们在讨论舱内风扇，但那听起来
맞아요, 짐. 우주선 광학 장치가 있는 구석진 곳에서 뭘 하고 있는지 보면 좋을 것 같아요. 앞으로 몇 분 동안 관측을 어떻게 할 건지 설명해 주
休斯顿，这里是双子星6号。我的建议
ठीक है, जो। पिछली बार हमने सकारात्मक संकेत तब देखा था जब फ्रेड ने लगभग 5 घंटे बाद उससे गैस निकलते हुए देखा था। हमें लगता है कि हमने इसे बाद में देखा होगा। हमने वहाँ एक कण या कुछ और देखा जो इधर-उधर घूम रहा था, जो शायद बूस्टर या पैनलो
로저. 사실 그렇게 자세히 살펴보지는 않았어요. 한 가지 눈에 띄는 점은 팬을 켤 때 팬 속도에 오류가
Дружб
Ich 
نعم. لقد حصلوا على تلك البيانات، وكانوا مهتمين نوعًا ما برؤية كيف يبدو الأمر عندما تكون المقصورة دافئة ومريحة ويشير مؤشر درجة الحرارة إلى مستوى م
La pressione della nostr
宇宙船の写真を
И,
Apollo 8, Houston. Ricevuto. L
Ja. Jim schläft jetzt, und Jack und ich sind wach, und ich habe gerade erst wieder g
Oh ja, das habe
C'è Giove e c'è Formalhaut al centro della finestra, questa volta. L'assetto è davvero rigido ora. Solo per caso, suppongo. Il rollio è perfetto, l'imba
75 بالمئة
I can definitely see a yaw pattern in the window, in the periscope, in the reticle. The window itself is satisfactory at (-) 34 degrees, I've covered the gyro and am now coming b
Je propose qu'on commence à ranger le vaisseau et à tout mettre en ordre, puis qu'on aille se reposer et manger.
حسنًا. بالنظر إلى حالة الطقس التي ذكرتها، فإن طبقة الهواء المتناثرة على ارتفاع 2000 قدم عند نقطة الهدف قد يكون فوقها طبقة متقطعة على ارتفاع 6000 قدم. ع
Das ist in Ordnung. Ic
While I was outside I noticed on Jim's window - he's got a coating on the outside of it. One time when I brushed up against it with with either my shoulder or my arm it ac
D'accord, et à la page suiv
روجر. بناءً على ضغط ما قبل الإطلاق في خزان الهيليوم-3 وزمن الارتفاع الاسمي الذي يبلغ حوالي 6.5 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة في الساعة، يجب أن يكون الضغط حوالي 710 رطل
अभी जिम की तरफ उजाला है, और मेरी तरफ से देखने पर मुझे अभी भी कुछ तारे दिखाई दे रहे हैं। ऐसा लगता है कि अंतरिक्ष यान को इस तरह से रखा जा सकता है कि एक तरफ अंधेरा रहे और दूसरी तरफ उजाला हो। जिम की तरफ अभी बिल्कुल उजाला है और मेरी तरफ अंधेरा है। उड़ान के शुरुआती दौर में जब मैं बूस्टर से बाहर छोटी-छोटी जुगनुओं को देख रहा था और सोच
Вперед
わかりました。二次ループチェックで二次ラジエーターのFLOWを確認したところ、最初の10秒間で流量が40%から36%まで低下し、その後30秒間は36%で
我们不打算穿着
ठीक है, ओडिसी। हम इलेक्ट्रॉनिक उपकरणों की बिजली 
...
Фрэнк, мы предполагаем, что это займет окол
是的。我一直使用的是纬度2799和经度11730
Roger. Qui 
我认为在这次追踪任务中，我们利用世界地图和开罗-亚历山大地区的小地图，找到了开罗机场的位置。不过，我估计我们当时距离机场大约10°或15°时才看
没错。接下来，CB面板16，电池馈线
I heard a little some
روجر، جورج. وضع التحكم يدوي. الجيروسكوبات مثبتة، والمناورة معطلة. نسبة الوقود 45 و64 بالمئة، متقدمة قليلاً عن الجدول الزمني. نسبة الأكسجين تتراوح بين 82 و100 بالمئة. درجة حرارة فتحة البخار في البدلة تنخفض قليلاً، وهي أقل بقليل من 70 درجة. ضغط المقصورة 4.6 رطل/بوصة مربعة. انخفضت درجة حرارة البدلة إلى حوالي 71 درجة الآن. الطاقة جيدة، وهذا قياس ضغط الدم. انتهى
रॉजर। मेरी स्थिति ठीक है; ईंधन 51 प्रतिशत और 69 प्रतिशत दिखा रहा
05 13 13; 012538, 32,6, 32,0 en avant, 1,7 en haut, 5,7 à gauche, 32,5, 131, 27,4 
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मैं मुख्य घटनाओं के समयों पर संक्षेप में चर्चा कर लेता हूँ, और फिर हम कुछ विवरण भरेंगे। ठीक है। प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस 142 घंटे 40 मिनट पर है; लगभग 6-1/2 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम हीटर पावर लगाकर, CM/ तापमान की जाँच करके और आवश्यकता पड़ने पर CM/ को पहले से गर्म करके इस पूरी प्रक्रिया को शुरू करेंगे, और हमें लगता है कि हमें ऐसा करना पड़ेगा। इसके लिए विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ बाद में उपलब्ध होंगी। लगभग 6 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम संशोधित / 30-मिनट की चेकलिस्ट का उपयोग करके पावर चालू करना शुरू करेंगे, जिसका उपयोग आपने पिछले मध्यक्रम के लिए किया था। फिर कुछ ही समय बाद, लगभग 5 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम चाहेंगे कि आप बॉडी एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट के लिए सही स्थिति में हों, जैसा हमने पहले किया था, अर्थ टर्मिनेटर का उपयोग करके। और जैसे ही हमें वह मिल जाएगा, हम -7 का प्रदर्शन करेंगे, जो अब लगभग 2 फुट प्रति सेकंड की बर्न दर या लगभग 15 सेकंड का प्रतीत होता है। और मुझे बताया गया है कि यह अब 1-1/2 तक कम हो गया है, इसलिए यह मार्जिन के भीतर आराम से है। ठीक है। जैसे ही हम ऐसा करेंगे, हम तुरंत सर्विस मॉड्यूल जेटिसन एटीट्यूड के लिए पैंतरेबाज़ी शुरू कर देंगे, जो प्लेन में होगा क्योंकि हम इसे सामान्य से पहले जेटिसन कर रहे 
好的，杰克。我觉得你不需要把所有的断路器都重新
Ricevuto. DELTA-VZ è più 00190, tira l
Il y a beaucoup de lumières
減圧の準備ができるまで、キャビンの熱交換器とファンをオ
好的
Houston, la Base Tranquillité va vous donner quelques précisions concernant la question géologique d'hier soir. Nous avons atterri dans un champ de cratères relativement lisse, composé de cratères secondaires allongés et circulaires, dont la plupart présentent des rebords, quelle que soit leur taille. Ce n'est toutefois pas toujours le cas. Quelques petits cratères alentour n'ont pas de rebord visible. Le sol de toute la zone est composé de sable très fin, voire de limon. Sur Terre, on pourrait le comparer à de la poudre de graphite. Dans ce sol se trouvent une grande variété de roches de formes, de tailles et de textures diverses, arrondies ou anguleuses, et de consistan
Fred, environ un quart de notre écran est éclairé et il est impossible de déterminer ce que vous regarde
我认为有两个角确实接触到了，因为它展开时，两个角并没有同时展开。它展开得有点不均匀，当然，它所在的地面也稍微有点不平整，不如我理想中那么平坦
Ungefähr 10 Sekunden auf mei
और, जिम, आप जब चाहें 400 के साथ सभी शून्य जोड़ सकते हैं; इससे बस इतना पता चलता है कि आप चाहते हैं कि यह आपके रवैये को नियंत्रित करे, यदि आप मोड कंट्रो
Yes. I found I could be very comfortable, and wal
रॉजर। ठीक है। हम बैटरी चार्ज नोट कर लेंगे जैसे ही हमें समय मिलेगा, और ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन के लिए एटीट्यूड: रोल 330.5, पिच 086.3, और यॉ सभी शून्य। फ्लाइट प्लान के अनुसार एटीट्यूड ठीक है; और मैं आपका बैटरी चार्ज नोट कर लेता हूँ। क्रू स्टेटस रिपोर्ट इस प्रकार है: स्लीप सीडीआर 7, सीएमपी 7, एलएमपी 5.5। और 
케이프 캡 컴, 여기는 시그마 세븐입니다. 
好
好的。另外，我们——你的状态向量现在是基于大约5个小时的跟踪数据计算出来的。我们确定你位于一条69.7英里的环线内，并且有自由返航段。你的进入航迹角度看起来
Streichen Sie darunter „Visuelle Beobachtungen fortsetzen“ und „Beobachtungen beenden“ durch. Streichen S
Roger. Mir ist klar, dass wir hier eine kleine... Explosion haben. Ich werde den Startvorgang erst kurz vor dem Brennvorgang sta
روجر. في هذه اللحظة، يتجمع السائل حول أنبوب التصريف؛ ويبدو أن الأنبوب ممتلئ، ومستوى السائل خارجه يصل 
Houston, Apo
こちらがジェミニVIです。12時あ
Okay. Der Kammerdruck ist absol
You're loud and clear. The waste water dump is down to 10 percent. I have a question 
Okay, Jack. I've a question - one more question abou
روجر. هذه فريندشيب 7. إليكم تقريرًا مدته ثلاثون دقيقة: لا تسبب حركات الرأس أي غثيان أو أي شعور سيئ على الإطلاق. أنا مندهش من قدرتي على النظر إلى الشمس عن قرب؛ فالشمس تسطع مباشرة على وجهي الآن، وكل ما عليّ فعله هو تظليل عينيّ بحاجبي. جميع مفاتيح الصمامات لا تزال كما ذُكر سابقًا على اللوحة اليسرى. وضع التحديد عادي، تلقائي، الجيروسكوب عادي: الصاعق مُفعّل، والارتداد التلقائي مُعطّل. جميع مقابض "T" في مكانها باستثناء الوضع اليدوي، وقد سحبته لأتمكن من الانتقال فورًا إلى الوضع اليدوي كخيار احتياطي في حال حدوث أعطال أخرى. وسائل المساعدة على الإنقاذ تعمل بشكل طبيعي. حقيبة الهبوط مُعطّلة. جميع عناصر لوحة التسلسل الأخرى في وضعها الطبيعي. وقود التحكم يتراوح بين 68 و100%، كرر، 68-100. يشير مؤشر موقع المركبة (EPI)
ポケットに入れておき
Hello, Apollo 11, Houston. 
نيل، هذه هيوستن. واضح تمامًا. فاصل. فاصل. باز، هذه هيوستن. فحص الراديو، وتأكد من
フレンドシップ・セブン、フレンドシップ・セブン。
速度は
로저. 네, 잘 읽혔습니다. 저희 쪽에서 약간의 시스템 재구성을 했습니다. 잠시 기다려 
بدء التشغيل. روجر. 
Unfortunately, the numb
네. 휴스턴 애스트로스는
Oui. Je peux le voir à travers une partie de ma fenêtre. Apparemment, 
مه
... сегодня тебя по
Apollo 13, Houston. Canary tra 30 secondi. Richiedi COMAND RESET, 
네. 영국 조드렐 뱅크에서 AP 통신이 전한 소식입니다. 영국의 대형 조드렐 뱅크 전파 망원경이 오늘 오전 5시 49분(미국 동부시간)에 소련의 무인 달 탐사선 루나 15호의 신호 수신을 중단했습니다. 대변인은 루나 15호가 "달 표면을 넘어간 것으로 보인다"고 밝혔습니다. 또 다른 소식으로는, 버나드 러벨 천문대 소장의 대변인이 "착륙했다고 생각하지 않는다"고 말했다는 것입니다. 워싱턴 UPI 통신에 따르면, 스피로 T. 애그뉴 부통령은 2000년까지 화성에 사람을 보내야 한다고 주장했지만, 민주당 지도부는 지구의 필요에 우선순위를 두어야 한다고 반박했습니다. 수요일 아폴로 11호 발사 
ハミング音のせいで、まるで電車か何かの乗り物に
Роджер Джемини 4, это хирург RKV. У вас по-прежнему не получается измерить артериальное давление, но прежде чем попробовать в следующий раз, проверьте конец фитинга и убедитесь, что внутри уплот
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप से
Okay. On Power 6, 
了
نعم، انخفض عددهم إلى 5 الآن... لقد كنا نعمل بمروحة واحدة لفترة طويلة. اليوم الثا
Houston, comment écoutes-tu Columbia avec un gain é
Okay, Fred. Die Anleitung, die ich für dich habe, befindet sich am Ende der Stromabschaltung der Kommandozentrale. Nur zur Info: Nachdem du den gesamten Vorgang abgeschlossen hast und kurz bevor du zum Kommandomodul wechselst, wird die Stromzufuhr zur Kommandozentrale unterbrochen und du kannst sie abziehen. Das heißt, nachdem du die Schalter umgelegt hast. Ist das verst
罗杰。下一个问题，超临界氦气上升速率正常，您之前也问过我们关于上次回转期间推进器活动的问题。现在我们理解了，正如您报告的那样，您的俯仰控制处于加速指令模式，偏航和滚转控制处于速率指令模式。您当时正在启动俯仰推进器。这会将速率耦合到偏航和
On dirait qu'on passe
로저. 아직 약 80피트 정도 떨어져 있는 것 같습니다. 메인 레드 스위치는 꺼져 있고, 메인 그린 스위치는 켜져 있으며, 무장 스위치는 꺼져 있고, 보조 하이 스위치는 켜져 있고, 보조 로우 스위치는 켜져 있고, 자세 제어 스위치는 켜져 있고, 고정 스위치는 꺼져 있고, 전원은 켜져 있습니다. 아직 부두가 잘 
ज
好的。您是想
ठीक है, हम वापस यूएचएफ सिग्नल पर आ गए हैं। सूर्योदय के समय आपने जिन जुगनुओं का वर्णन किया था,
助推器脱离我们时，可以看到燃料从滚转喷嘴喷出。助推器翻滚着，大部分时间都在一个垂直于航天器主轴的平面内运动，可以看到它拖着长长的尾焰。我会在飞行计划上画个简图。航天器分离时，到处都是碎片。我们转身一看，到处都是东西。事实上，直到我们仔细观察助推器，我才真正分辨出哪些是碎片。整流罩在整流罩喷嘴处顺利脱落。地平线扫描仪的整流罩看起来也完整地脱落了，但我无法确定，因为它最后才消失在视野中。我完
로저. 하
罗杰，加州。我已在 05 中设置 - 更正，。Guaymas Cap Com，你读了吗？完
好的。雷达、跟踪和遥测数据在两架飞行器上都正常。好的。我们现在向您展示的是 GET B 的 GO 状态；11 加 14 加 29；速度增量，每秒 9 英尺；燃烧时间，0 加 15；偏航角 00
Okay. Wir fahre
W
好的。我们还没有收到您的信号，11，尽管我们已经确认您的FM下
Ok. Ci rilasseremo dopo una dura giornata di lavoro. Do
आरईपी
Eigentlich will er gar nicht so vi
Après réflexion, comme cela va limiter l'autonomie, je pense qu'il vaut mieux éviter. Pour cette autonomie affichée actuellement, 425 miles avec une puissance de signal de 2,2, il semble q
Roger. Ich verstehe, dass wir überall dort, wo es möglich ist, Landsc
알겠습니다. 제가 가지고 있는 것만 알려드리는 게 더 쉬울 것 같네요. 11번 라인의 맨 위 줄에는 AC 버스 타이 브레이커 4개와 AC 버스 전압 브레이커가 있습니다. 두 번째 줄에는 TCA 브레이커 4개가 있고, 비행 디스플레이와 커맨더 아래에 GASTA가 있습니다. 마찬가지로 AC 버스 A 아래에도 GASTA와 커맨더 브레이커가 있습니다. 이게 전부입니다. 세 번째 줄
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。コピーの準備
Fred, concernant ce module de commande bricolé avec une bonbonne d'hydroxyde de lithium, il va falloir en
Demandez-vous combien de gallons de car
待機。大丈夫。ただいま、ブレーカーが1つ外れてい
खैर, हम रुके और पहले मोटे तौर पर अलाइनमेंट किया, फिर बारीक अलाइनमेंट किया, और फिर एक जोड़ी चुनने के लिए कहा, कैपेला को चुना, लेकिन वह गाड़ी चलाती रही और कहीं नहीं पहुँच पाई। मैंने कैपेला नहीं चुना, और अभी मुझे वहाँ कोई भी कैपेला नज़र नहीं आ रहा है। क्या मैं यहाँ से री-साइकिल करके वापस ज
هيا يا هي
――OFFです。DEL
Okay. Our estimate is that we will start powering up for the burn at abo
روجر. لديّ معدل انحراف طفيف يبلغ حو
عند 30 40 كانت 
Хорошо. Я понимаю, что звезда номер 2, крен 195,2, угол поворота
我原本打算今晚放
نعم. جهاز قياس ضغط ال
아주 조용한 항해였어요. 앞뒤로 천천히 흔들리는 정도였고, 추진 장치 작동도 거의
はい
هل لديكم قراءات لدرجات حرارة المحرك الرباعي لمعرفة متى يمكننا البدء؟ ن
हाँ, इसमें अनियमित बहाव है। मुझे इसमें किसी भी प्रकार का दोलन दिखाई नहीं देता। गुब्बारे तक जाने वाली डोरी कभी कसी हुई होती है, कभी ढीली—इतनी ढीली कि उसमें लूप बन जाते हैं। जहाँ तक मैं समझता हूँ, इसका व्यवहार पूरी तरह अनियमित है। गुब्बारा भी ठीक से फुलाया नहीं गया है। यह गोल आकृति के बजाय आयताकार आकार का है; और मेरा मानना ​​है कि जब इस पर सूरज की रोशनी पड़ती है, तो इसका नारंगी और चाँदी जैसा रंग सबसे ज़्यादा 
좋아요, 다행이네
Ho sempre detto che stava meglio quando 
좋습니다. 제 백업 솔루션은 위로 초당 2피트, 앞으로 초당 23피트 속도로 이동하는 것입니다. 이렇게 하면 이 위치에 도달하게 됩니다. 거리 데이터 포인트에서 폐쇄 루프를 사용하겠습니다. 요약 속도를 높이겠습니다. 
Sì, l'ho fatto. Vuoi rimuovere - Vuoi alimentare entrambi i bus, con gli interruttori del motore BUS TIE; prima di tutto, per verificare che non ci siano carichi sui bus, e in secondo luogo, e poi togliere l'alimentazione ai bus
Роджер. К вашему сведению, лазер из обсерватории Макдональд в Западном Техасе будет работать примерно 181 час 30 минут, в течение 1 часа. Вы сможете видеть Землю из окна номер 1 каждый раз, когда будете проезжать поворот на 357 градусов, и тогда, конеч
Non appena avrò un po' 
चलिए
了解です。エントリーパッドは以下のとおりです。Mid-PAC、000152、
What's he going to do, read out of the AMA 
桑给巴尔，这里是Sigma Seven。我完全明白你的
لا أعتقد أن هذا كان القصد يا بيل. ما كان يدور في أذهانهم هو أن لدينا مبادل حراري للبدلة على كلا الدائرتين؛ وإذا انخفضت درجة الحرارة كثيرًا، يمكنك استخدام مفتاح ال
You're loud and clear, Charlie.
GO orbit and the booster is safe.
그리고
انطباعي الآن 
收到。如果你现在正在听我说话，说明我麦克风处于开启状态，因为我
Sigma Seven, ici Cape Cap Com. Transmission HF, test vocal. À
はい、ここは結構忙しいんです。ちょっとだけ… 15分くら
그리고 그 김에, 태도 제어(ATTIT
جيميني 6، نريد تجربة تفر
알겠습니다. 지금 
Our congrat
Houston. Abbiamo acceso il ventilatore criogenico: il serbatoio di H2 numero 1 era acceso. Puoi darci un sugger
We don't think it's any problem. We would like for you to put your Quantity Read Switch ON and leave it on for the next several hours so we can get a feel for what's going on. Even at the rate that's been used in the last several hours, it won't be any problem, but we'd like to find some way to control this thing without 
Там написано: выполнить уборку, убрать шлемы, мешки для хранения; достать зеркало, контрольный список и устройство для утилизации. Убрать промежуточное устройство хранения, достать и настроить для использования 16-миллиметровый объектив, HC-EX, f:4, 500, бесконечность, 
Yes, sir. You're doing good work, h
जेरी, एक और पहचान की विशेषता: इन छोटे उल्कापिंडों के गड्ढों के केंद्र में गहरे धब्बे होते हैं, जहाँ ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि वे उसमें 
好的，迈克。我这就去——尽量找准位置，然后就
J'ai désac
Хорошо. Чере
Хорошо, ла
Okay. Bedienfeld 4: TELCOMM, GRUPPE 1, zu AC1. Schließen Sie die folgenden Schutzschalter:, DRÜCKEN SIE GRUPPE 1, HAUPT B
Ciao Astro, qui è
嘿，如果你想用250mm镜头的话？这里有一张齐奥尔科夫斯基的绝美照片，我们很少能拍
क्या तुम्हें यह दिख रहा है, जै
Ok. Per quanto riguarda le questioni più banali, ora che abbiamo lasciato la Luna, vorrei ripercorrerle un po' per voi *** gli sviluppi che hanno avuto luogo nel reparto alimentare. Sono sicuro che avete già *** un contenitore per bevande. Un po' più tardi, Mike vi mostrerà come funziona la pistola ad acqua con il suo nuovo filtro per estrarre l'idrogeno. In sostanza, questa pistola ad acqua viene inserita in questa estremità e riempie questa sacca d'acqua, e la bevanda si dissolve nell'acqua, e questa estremità del *** fuoriesce. Allo stesso modo, abbia
ठीक ह
मुझे रेगिस्तान में नीचे एक काली आग दिखाई दे रही है। आग के स्रोत तक साफ़-साफ़ देखा जा सकता है। मैं ठीक से देख तो नहीं पाया कि वह क्या थी, लेकिन उसने ज़मीन पर एक बहुत ही स्पष्ट निशान छोड़ दिया है। 17 नंबर हाईवे पार करते समय मैंने S-5 से कई भू-भाग की तस्वीरें ली हैं। ऐसा लग रहा है
حسناً، كان الأمر كذلك يا تشارلي، ولكن عند الانتقال من مناورة آلية 
トランキ
روجر. وهيوستن، هذه الساعة الثامنة. قد نراجع جدول رصد الملاحة المستقبلي الخاص بنا إذا كان سيتم تع
Да. Слышу вас отче
D'accord. J'ai votre chargement 33-1. J'ai vos quantités de guidage de secours 33-1 lors
はい。お渡ししたメモはこれで結構ですが、後ほど変更する可能性もあります。とりあえずこ
Мы доставили на борт дополнительную партию продукто
11号，休斯顿。我们这里有一些东西要给你
Roger. W
저기서 벗어
Oka
انتظروا قليل
Facile - Facile 0,3, 7,6, mais je... juste à l'extrémité sud-ouest d'un cratère. Je pense qu'ils le sauraient s'ils étaient à un
रॉजर। मैं 1
Роджер. Боюсь, к тому времен
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。还有，后隔板上的水，如果不太多，我们建议用吸水布吸干，然后把海绵扔到垃圾存放区。如果水太多，我们建议按照F
- - لا يمكنك
Тонкий - квад
Верните его на некоторое время в режим 
...ク
Roger. Ja. Okay, ich schalte jetzt auf Fly-by-Wire, auf Hilfsdämpfung, und jetzt – die Einstellungen stimmen nicht überein. Fünf Minuten bis zum Rückwärtsflug; die Kontrollleuchte ist an. Meine Sinkrate be
На самом деле дело не в самом манометре. Дело в том, что давление на выходе установлено ниже..
真想知道下面那根带子是干什么用的？因为我觉得我的盒子现在完全闭合了。你没把它闭合
オーケー。バッテリーB 37.0、パイロA 37.0、パイロB 37.0、ヘリウム圧力 3400、窒素Aと窒素B ― 面白半分
Хорошо. Это общее замечание, которое относится ко всем случаям, когда вы работаете или переключаетесь между ними, и вам следует быть осторожными, чтобы не использовать расширенный глагол в это время. Это указано в примечаниях к программе, и это просто напоминание. Что произойдет, если мы перейдем к расширенному глаголу, такому как или? Мы можем застрять в и нам придется перебирать его, чтобы получить 63, и ни один из этих вариантов обычно не используется, и это просто хорошая практика. И мы просто пытаемся напомнить вам, что не следует использова
Вы завершили свой 
好的。由于噪声干扰，
Roger. When you commented on that quad Bravo problem at separation, you were a little weak. Could you 
Хорошо. Позвольте мне поделиться своими наблюдениями по главной шине B. События развивались довольно быстро, и сначала мы услышали удар, взрыв или что-то ещё, я не уверен. Затем, примерно через секунду, сработала главная сигнализация, указывающая на пониженное напряжение на главной шине B. Я проверил напряжение, и в этот момент оно было в норме, поэтому я подозреваю, что это был скачок. Топливный элемент 3 тоже работал исправно, с хорошим потоком. Однако в этот момент Фред зашёл в командный модуль и сел на своё место. Вскоре после этого загорелся индикатор AC BUS 2. Он посмотрел на главную шину B, и показания на ней были нулевыми. Однако потоки в топливных элементах также были нулевыми. Я подозреваю, что, возможно, у нас всё-таки есть главная шина B. Но это всего лишь предположение. Я так и не попытался её сбросить. У нас были и другие проблемы с главной шиной A, например, пониженное напряжение и ещё кое-что подобное. 
Giusto. Questo vale per il sorvolo e il pericinto 
ठीक ह
Ho spinto verso il booster a circa 1,5 metri al secondo. La mia combustione di separazione è durata circa 6 o 7 secondi. Ho spinto verso il booster per circa 1,5 o 1,8 metri al secondo e poi l'ho osservato mentre ci separavamo. Ho spinto di altri 1,5 metri al secondo. S
Роджер. Ознакомьтесь с информацией о медицинском
On the way out, they gave us some REACQ angles which we used, and once it broke lock and re-positioned itself, why, it went over to the OMNI's and waited till we got to near breaking lock again and switched b
わかりました。始めましょう。127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 deg/sec 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-BRAVO: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-BRAVO: 93. 1+58 14 45 02. 1
Okay. Bedienfeld 5; FLUTSCHEINWERFER; der Rheostat soll eingeschaltet sein. Bedienfeld 100, FLUTSCHEINWERFER; die Einstellung soll
रॉजर, मिथुन
Hallo Jim, wir haben die groben Kardanwinkel für die Ausrichtung berechnet, basierend auf I
सिग्मा
Vance, secondo i miei ca
스캐너-프라이머리를
जब आपको कॉपी करने का मन करे, 11, मेरे 
收到。你通过ATS进行的偏航检查很好。你通
Cap. Avez-vous reçu vos expériences p
No. A 
了解。なぜレーダーを動かす必要があると思う
روجر، صوتك متقطع هنا. من الصعب فهمك. هل هذه طريقة تواصل جيدة مع 
بما أنك في طريقك بالفعل، قد يهمك أن تعلم أن عالمة الفلك روبي غراهام من هيوستن تقول إن جميع الأبراج مناسبة لرحلتك إلى القمر. تقول إن نيل ذكي، ومايك يتمتع بحكمة، وباز قادر على حل المشكلات المعقدة. كما تقول إن نيل يميل إلى رؤية العالم بنظرة متفائلة، لكنه دائمًا على استعداد لمساعدة المحتاجين. نيل، من المفترض أيضًا أن تتمتع بـ"حدس يمكّنك من فهم الحياة بمشاعر صادقة". أما باز، فهو اجتماعي للغاية ولا يطيق الوحدة، بالإضافة إلى امتلاكه قدرة نقدية ممتازة. ولأنها لم تكن تعرف ساعة ميلاد مايك، فقد قررت أنه إما يمتلك نفس صفات 
Roger. PAD: 23514 179 071 001 547 104356 35575 357 107 041 301 287 319. 10-minute abort pitch, 223. Ove
ボルト、39
了解しました。参考までに、西テキサスのマクドナルド天文台のレーザーは、181時間30分頃から1時間点灯します。ロール357度を通過するたびに、1番窓から地球が見えるよう
Le ciel est d'un noir absolu, complètement noir. Je distingue pourtant des étoile
運動しなくてもいいんです。本当に運動する必要性を感じないんです。暑くなりすぎてしまうので
11番、ヒューストン。時間
सम
Roger, ho ricevuto l'aggiornamento e devo dire che ho una spia del risc
ジャック、ヒューストン。ちなみに、地球の勢力圏内に入ってい
Ricevuto. Il Delta-V è di 2 piedi al secondo, 
分かりました。ご提案いただいたレセプタクルは問題なく
Хорошо.
Laisse-nous environ une journée pour trouver la véritable anomalie, Jim, afin de voir si nous pouvons réellement effectuer ces rétro-remplacements OAMS. Par exemple, po
هذا صحيح. لن يتم التخ
Jack, wir können es nicht weiter zentrieren, denn die seitliche Luke ist nur ein Teil davon. Der Rest dieser Schwärze, die du s
Ja, Blende 8 bei 1/250 Sekunde. Und nachdem Sie alles eingestellt haben, überprüfen Sie die Blende noch einmal, da sie sich schon bei der kleins
Bene. Rileggiamo COMANDO TELEMETRIA SU su OFF; VHF AM B, centro; SQUELCH BANDA S su OFF; VALVOLE REACS CELLE A COMBUSTIBILE su NORMALE; REGISTRATORE AVANTI, centro; MOVIMENTO NASTRO, palo del barbiere; ALIMENTAZIONE, centro; 
好的。我刚才
हाँ, बिल्कुल। तो अब हमारे पास BAT 1, 2, 3, 4, और 6 चालू हैं, और 
はい、そうだと思います.
Roger. 18
로저. 확인했습니다. 추력 변환 - 제트 엔진 4개 
Roger. Von hier oben sieht es ganz gut aus. Wir fliegen gerade über Westtexas. In etwa einer
I'
下の方の数値はすべて正常のようです。カプセルは
And the age-old question that is always asked us is how do we get rid of liquid waste and
罗杰，好好睡一觉。我觉得自己像个保姆。我每天晚上都哄你们睡觉，现在却要照顾你们四个
Und wenn Sie jetzt Zeit für eine Mahlzeit oder etwas anderes haben, während sich die Kurse stabilisieren, 
Sigma Seven. Wenn ihr gerade nichts tut, könnt ihr uns dann bitte eure Stimmungslage 
, Canary. Ho le temperature dei t
Jim, non ho capito tutto quello che hai detto, ma credo che volessi sapere quando saranno disponibili le procedure di ingresso e di approfondimento. Se è così, beh, parliamo di circa 120 ore. Per quanto riguarda la ricarica della batteria A, vogliamo f
ठीक है। हमने यहाँ पुस्तक का अधिकांश भाग देख लिया है, और हमें पुनः प्रवेश क्षेत्र में जाने से पहले पानी के बॉयलर की जाँच करने का तरीका सुझाने के लिए वापस आना होगा। हमने अंतिम समय में किए गए सभी बदलावों (पेंसिल और स्याही से किए गए) की समीक्षा कर ली है, और 
روجر. نحن نناقش ملف تعريف إعادة الدخول هذا، وسنزودك بالبيانات النهائية بمجرد أن نتوصل إلى إجاب
罗杰
Salve, Nave Comando del Pacifico, Nave C
네, 마이크, 저희 CDH 시간은 126분
روجر. لدينا ترسان يدوران عند سحب المقبض ذهابًا وإيابًا. أحدهما ترس يعمل كآلية سقاطة، عبارة عن أسطوانة صغيرة بها مكبس ونتوء خلفه يُشغّل آلية السقاطة. واجهنا بعض الصعوبة في ذلك قبل فتح الباب، وبعد فتحه واجهنا صعوبة في تشغيل آلية السقاطة. كما واجهنا صعوبة بالغة في إغلاق الباب الخلفي بما يكفي لبدء تثبيت المزلاج. ثم اضطر إد إلى دفع آلية السقاطة بيده في كل مرة حتى بدأنا في تشغيلها
Housto
もう一つ。この中間コースのタイミングを計るという考え方自体は、SHeタンクが排気される直前
Ok, Fred. Lo scopo della manovra è PC più 2, per ora stiamo andando all'MPL. E 079, 27, 4013, più 08144, meno 00443, meno 02226, l'
Does it feel firm 
Okay. Das bedeutet, die Spannung am Hauptbus zu überprüfen und die Stromversorgung einzuschal
Roger, Houston. Nous avons reçu un 4 / 45695, moins 053 plus 141, plus 30627, moins 00625, plus 00577 180 018 001, NA, plus 00188 30639 256 30452 40 2730 396 033, en bas 030, à gauche 19, plus 0858, moins 16500, plus 12960, plus 36195; Sirius, Rigel, 129 155 010, deux quads, 20 secondes
यह सही 
알겠습니다. 전원을 연결했는데 괜찮아 보였습니다. 그런데 전원 경고등과 모든 위험 신호가 켜져 있고, X 루나 버스 타이 차단기 두 개가 모두 켜져 있습니다. 유틸리티 조명 차단기도 켜져 있고, AC 버스 B 헬륨 PQS 디스플레이, AC 버스 B 숫자 조명, 그리고 AC 버스 B 인버터 1은 버스 타이가 닫힌 상태입니다. 그런 다음 인
Aspetta. Era 
Okay, Jack, dovremo fare un pass
로저. 존, 컷오프가 훌륭했습니다. 속도가 초당 8피트 낮았습니다. V/VR은 1.0002입니다. 인도양 선박에서 Easy, Foxtrot, Hotel로 이어지는 역순열을 확인해 주시겠습
روجر. سنبدأ بأخبار العالم. شهدت ليلة عيد الميلاد إشادة واسعة برواد فضاء أبولو 8 الأمريكيين، وتعبيرًا عن الآمال في تعاون دولي في استكشاف الفضاء، وذلك مع بث رسائل التهنئة العالمية بينما كانت المركبة الفضائية الصغيرة تدور حول القمر. حتى في العالم الشيوعي، كان هناك حماس كبير لأول رحلة بشرية إلى القمر. في موسكو، استذكر العالم السوفيتي أناتولي بيسارانوف كيف تبادلت بلاده والولايات المتحدة المعرفة الفضائية سابقًا، وتوقع أن تؤدي رحلة أبولو 8 إلى مزيد من التعاون. في كوبا، أعادت إذاعة هافانا بث برنامج صوت أمريكا لإبلاغ مستمعيها بخطاب أبولو 8. وقال مسؤولو صوت أمريكا إنها المرة الأولى التي تُبث فيها أي من برامج الوكالات الأمريكية عبر إذاعة هافانا. تابعت تشيكوسلوفا
R
Кило 0,9 и 6,3. Спасибо. Один из этих квадратов сетки
नहीं। मुझे लगता है कि ऐसा इसलिए है क्योंकि खिड़की पर बहुत सारी परछाइयाँ पड
No, for the earth coming up, we want 250. Might take som
Where was that
روجر. أفهم أنك لم تحصل على قفل بعد، وستنتظر قبل إرسال 270. 
Ok, Apollo 8. Sembra che o
Yes, I'll b
Nous avons besoin d'une batterie dans votre pile à combustib
أبولو 8، هيوستن. 
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हमें रेंजिंग का अच्छा बैच मिल गया है और अब हम चाहते हैं कि आप कॉन्फ़िगरेशन को उलट दें, रेंजिंग को बंद करें, वॉयस फ़ंक्शन को डाउ
烧毁前是 66
ठीक है। अब ब
バーンアティチュードに何か問題があります。ボールの測定値が正しくなく、針は中央に表示されています。何が間違っているのかよくわかりません。
روجر، هل لديك مواعيد رحلاتك الثلاثة (الكلاب، والرحلات السهلة، والفندق) من سفينة المحيط اله
حسنًا. لقد قاطعني أحدهم للحظة. عاد بوب هوب إلى فيتنام مع قواته، ويؤدي عمله على أكمل وجه كعادته. أحد الأسماء المذكورة في هذا الخبر هو اسم حاملة الطائرات الأمريكية "نيو جيرسي". مازح بوب هوب من أعلى برج مدفع ضخم يوم أمس - أو الأربعاء - لإسعاد 1500 رجل على متن البارجة "
这个
Хорошо. В данный момент скорость
휴스턴 시내에서는 거의 자
मैंने 35 डिग्री पर बादल निर्माण की एक और तस
यह 7 पर चमका - ठी
Roger. Mike, lorsque vous jouiez avec le vaisseau il y a quelque temps et que nous avons réduit la zone morte, nous avons supposé que cette zone était centrée sur la nouvelle attitude du moment. Depuis, nous avons dérivé de quelques degrés en tangage et en lacet par rapport à cette attitude. Par conséquent, si nous suivions la procédure que nous vous avons expliquée (ACCEL COMMAND, activatio
BAT A, oui, s'il vous plaît. Chargement de BAT 
Roger. Il motivo del ritardo, Charlie, è che è difficile trovare due stelle che non siano occultate dall'astro e che non siano nel mezzo di 
Gemini
ईगल, कोलंबिया। लैंडिंग साइट के ऊपर से गुजरते हुए। नीचे
Bien, et si vous tournez la page sur la puissance 8, vous trouverez les fonctions restantes du vaisseau spatial. 
नहीं, मुझे लगता है कि मेरे पास सब कुछ 
Voilà qui concl
ああ、聞いて、デイブ、私は並ばなくてはいけないん
了解。スタンバイ。状況報告をし
로저. 게임하는 건 괜찮아요. 지난 5일 반
어머, 카
Okay. Die Erde durchlief die Strecke diesmal in einem Winkel von 26 Grad, also in e
推力设置为正常；DELTA-V 推力，2，关
D'accord. D'accord. Tout d'abord, le principe général est que ces règles doivent être similaires à celles du mode I d'interruption, avec des limites strictes. Maintenant, je vais les passer en revue une par une pour que vous les preniez en compte. D'accord. Vous devez couper le moteur si l'un des événements suivants se produit: affichage du moniteur de poussée inférieur ou égal à 77 %; pression du réservoir de propergol (pression d'entrée) affichée à bord inférieure ou égale à 160 psi; niveau de carburant pour OX DELTA-P supérieur à 25 psi (vous devrez alors contacter le sol); erreur d'assiette de plus ou moins
Хорошо. Мы всё ещё работаем над герметизацией. Я сейчас свяжусь с Джимом 
아니요, 그렇지 않습니다. 제가 라디오에서 직접 밝혔습
收到
알겠습니다. 
Хорошо, Джек. Похоже, мы разобрались со всеми нерешенными вопросами. Удивительно, но из всего этого 
Hello, 11.
이 지역에서 햇빛이 강하게 반사되어 표면
حسنًا يا جاك. لنبدأ من الأعلى. حسنًا. خزانات التبريد؛ قراءة الهيدروجين 1 هي 230، وكذلك قراءة الهيدروجين 2. يب
Wir h
ठीक है। ईंधन 1.0 है; ऑक्सीडाइज़र 0.25 है; ऑक्सीडाइज़र असंतुलन घट रहा है, जिसका कोई खास मतलब नह
... en défense. On va laisser le score mon
Là où il est indiqué « Et notez », le CMP se trouve dans le sac en forme de L avec les deux autres PGA. La visière
알겠습니다. 변경 없음, 2/3
E per nostra informazione, abbiamo di nuovo monitorato un PCO2. Hai cambiato una bomboletta di idrossido di litio stamattina?
روجر، هل قام ق
Can't
了解。停電
Der Sonnenuntergang ist wirklich beeindruckend, ich glaube nicht, dass ich viel Zeit damit verschwenden muss, ihn anzusehen. Er ist sehr interessant. Faszinierend ist auch, wie schwarz es ist, wenn sich die Augen nicht daran gewöhnt haben. Ich kann definitiv eine Beschichtung auf dem Fenster erkennen. Ich schalte jetzt wieder auf VOX im UHF-Hi-Modus, um zu senden. Ich öffne das Visier, um das rechte Mikrofon abzuwischen. Ich habe es abgeleckt. Visier zu. Das Visier wurde sofort abgedichtet, damit die Anzugselektronik ihre Arbeit aufnehmen konnte. Ich will damit nicht noch einmal Probleme haben. Der Lufteinlass des Anzugs hält die Temperatur sehr gut bei etwa 68 Grad. Also wird die Kuppel wieder hochgefah
В правой части страницы 25, где находится заголовок «Фотос
Как дела? Нужна какая
Запись разговора, сделанная во время пролета над Тананаривом в этот период, в настоящее время недоступна. Технический специалист связи Тананарива сообщил в Хьюстоне в 77:54:27, что он связался с Gemini 4, 
सूर्योदय। आह्ह्ह्ह! उस समय कितने सुंदर जुगनू चमक रहे थे! उस समय सब कुछ बहुत ही चमकदार था। लेकिन ठीक है, वे—ठीक है, मेरे पास—अगर कोई पढ़ रहा है, तो मेरे पास जुगनू हैं। वे बहुत चमकीले हैं। वे कैप्सूल से निकल रहे हैं। मैं ढक
好的，你做得很好。没有那些噪音真是太好了。吉姆，让我告诉你我想做什么。正如我所说，我们现在不会给你详细的操作步骤。我们预计很快会给你一些操作步骤，我们会尽量以以下形式提供给你。首先，我们会有一个时间表，有点像飞行计划，上面会列出所有主要事件的时间，以及我们配置特有的任何设置、开关设置等等，这些内容在检查清单中找不到。例如，我们启动指令舱的方式就是如此；其次，当然，我们会对检查清单进行任何
Beh, te ne sar
ठीक है। हम तैयार हैं - जब आप तै
Das ist bestätig
Okay. We'd like - t
Ok, 11. Molto bene. Ora, per quanto riguarda il contenitore del campione documentato: in televisione ci è sembrato che i campioni per quel contenitore fossero stati effettivamente forniti, selezionati in base a una riflessione o a una considerazione rivolta alle rocce stesse. E ci chiedevamo se potesse fornirci ulteriori dettagli a memoria su uno qualsiasi di questi campioni, e sul contesto del materiale o della supe
3,
Да, подтверждаю. Если бы у нас был ручной запуск, нам пришлось бы вручную выключать двигатель, и, чтобы обеспечить более точное отключение при скорости 30 футов в секунду до финиша, мы х
لنتابع. إذا توقف المحرك أثناء الاحتراق، وظهر لك مؤشر NOUN 97 يومض، فعليك المتابعة، ثم ضبط مستوى الوقود، وبدء تشغيل المحرك، وتفعيل تجاوز محرك الهبوط. حسنًا. الآن، بعض المعلومات العامة. إذا لم تستخدم دورة الا
Roger. Je vous 
Zur Information, Columbia: Sie nähern sich der VHF-Sichtverbindungsgrenze zur Tran
자, 닐, 우리가 접촉하는 걸 느끼면 몇 초
Colum
Hanno una procedu
吉姆，你能否再给我们测量一下电池A
Oka
Mann, es ist echt schwer zu beschreiben, wie die Erde hier aussieht. Ich schaue gerade aus meinem runden Fenster, das größer ist als die Erde im Moment. Ich kann die Terminatorlinie deutlich sehen. Ich kann fast ganz Südamerika erkennen, bis hinauf nach Mittelamerika, Yucatán und der Halbinsel Florida. Direkt vor de
जिम, आ
Gemini 4，请注意，飞行员可以清除其生物医学数据，飞越夏威夷，下一个修订版
チャーリー、ごめん。ずっと切れてる。「君なら何でもできる」までは聞こえたけど、その後は何も聞こえなかった
Canton this is Sigma Seven. I read you. At this time, I am in fly-by
我当时肯定大家都高兴
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. لقد بدّلنا الهوائيات معكم مجدداً. أكرر أنه لا توجد لدينا أي تحديثات على سطح القمر - تحديثات للكتب في الوقت الحالي. نحن ندرس بعض التحديثات الطفيفة،
Роджер. Просто к вашему сведению, на случай, если это про
वे कंप्यूटर में ह
Okay. That was the entire pro
بشكل عام، أعتقد أنهم يقومون 
Roger. Vielen Dank. Wir haben uns die Wiedergabe angesehen und dabei gleich zu Beginn einige Dinge bemerkt. Wir melden uns später d
هذا صح
幅広の青い地平
مرحباً، أبولو ١١، هيوستن. للعلم، تحطمت ال
Roger. Überprüfen S
D'accord. Je dois juste changer les OMNIs. D'accord. En lisant les modifications, Joe, aux pages 1 à 4: 3 chauffages de piles à comb
제미니 4, 제미니 4, 여기는 휴스턴 CAP C
L'impostazione è -50 gradi. I 
रॉजर। और मुझे कुछ और बातें पता हैं, माइक। हमें इस समय बैटरी बी का चार्ज बंद करना होगा, और साथ ही, छिटपुट गरज-चमक के कारण हमारे लक्षित लैंडिंग पॉइंट पर मौसम बहुत खराब है। हम उनमें से किसी एक में फंसना नहीं चाहते, इसलिए हम - आपका लक्ष्य बिंदु आगे की ओर ले जा रहे हैं। सुधार, यह आगे की ओर होगा, 1500 नॉटिकल मील की एंट्री के लिए, ताकि हम अपलिफ्ट कंट्रोल सुनिश्चित कर सकें। नए निर्देशांक 13 डिग्री, 19 मिनट उत्तर, 169 डिग्री, 10 मिनट पश्चिम हैं। उस क्षेत्र में मौसम बहुत अच्छा है। हमें 2000 और 8000 नॉटिकल मील की छिटपुट गरज-चमक मिल रही है, दृश्यता 10 मील है और समुद्र में 6 फुट ऊंची लहरें हैं, और हॉर्नेट उस लक्षित स्थान तक पहुंचने के लिए बेहतरीन 
Alpha/PC vers PC; INDICATEUR DE LANCEMENT DU VÉHICULE vers GPI; INCLINAISON et LAYAUGLEMENT DE LA CARROSSERIE sur AUTO; RÉINITIALISATION DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS, vers le haut; DÉMARRAGE DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS sur ARRÊT; MINUTES ET SECONDES DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS au centre; Valve de ventilation POST-ATTERRISSAGE, pousser; EXTENSION/RELÂCHEMENT DE LA SONDE sur ARRÊT; Messages d'extension/relâchement, deux, gris; RÉTRACTATION DE LA SONDE D'AMARRAGE, PRINCIPALE et SECONDAIRE, désactivée; étendre les FEUX DE NAVIGATION/FEUX EVA, désactivés; étendre les FEUX DE NAVIGATION - FEU DE RENDEZ-VOUS, désactivé - il faut en avoir un - voilà - FEU DE TUNNEL, désactivé; FEU D'ALIMENTATION, désactivé; MODULE DE SERVICE Hélium, quatre, au centre; Message HÉLIUM 1, quatre, gris; MODULE DE COMMANDE DE TÉLÉMÉTRIE VERS LE HAUT et BLOQUÉ; PRESSIONS DU MODULE DE COMMANDE, désactivées; INDICATEUR DU MODULE DE SERVICE, QUANTITÉ DE PROPULSEUR; MODULE DE SERVI
रॉजर। अरे, ये आज के पोस्ट की हेडलाइन है; आप इसे भी भेज सकते हैं, ब
حسنًا. في منتصف الطريق تقريبًا. عندما تصل كمية الوقود الدافعة إلى 30%، أو بالأحرى 37%، نود تغيير هذا السطر ليص
Dopodiché, ho un paio di minuti di 
ニール
ठीक है। ठीक है, बिल, और मैं हर 30 मिनट में आपसे संपर्क करता रहूंगा, ताकि यह सुनिश्चित 
— — Проверены мониторы RCS — (Смех) Ладно, вот и малыш Базз
جيميني 4، غوايماس CAP COM. تُفيد الرحلة بأنها تُفضّل توفير الوقود. سيتم إبلاغكم بذلك فوق رأس الرجاء ال
제미니 4호, 여
로저, 살살 할게요. 이륙
Checked the dome temperature on the suit is 82 [degrees] and you have just now set to 6.5. D
Roger. Nous constatons qu'il vous reste encore du carbu
Oui,...
ठीक है। एक पर 
Sigma Seven. Ich habe die letzte Übertragung nicht verstanden, gehe aber davon aus, dass Sie gelesen haben, dass der UHF/DF-Schalter auf R/T stehen sollte. Ich habe momentan keine Informationen zur Landung und Wiederherstellung des Flugbetriebs, werde sie Ihnen aber zukommen lassen, 
هيوستن، برج الجوزاء 4. أنتما تنفصلا
,. Ho un'indicazione di spinta in avanti. Ho un'imbardat
了解。21-4 ΔVは前方と後方に分割されます。1分32秒で前方56フィート。2+30で後方120フィート/秒。01日23時間53分23
C'est le meille
Tr
オーロラセブン。こちらはキャプテン・コムです。ジャイロを通常モードに戻して、窓からの眺めがジャイロと
罗杰，明白
रॉजर। आपके बैक प्रेशर वाल्व के बारे में, हम यह जानना चाहेंगे कि आपने पहली बार बैक प्रेशर वाल्व बंद करने के बाद कितनी देर तक उसे बंद रखा था - यानी बंद करने से लेकर मरम्मत शुरू करने तक कितना समय लगा? हम चाहेंगे कि आप लगभग 15
Roger. On dirait que l'évaporat
Hey, der Klett
拍摄了一张黑白月亮照片。照片中已取出气象局滤
ठी
2. نحن هنا بالضبط. هذا ما مكّننا من الدخول، والتقدم مباشرة،...
ええと、今は3人ともなんとかやっているところです。何かおすすめは
Roger. Verstanden. Sie woll
了解。メインバスは24、ワンは25、25、25。スタンバイワンは25、25。アイソレートは29、メインは再び24。ファンは113、113。右側のスイッチヒューズはすべてオン。ただし、Retrojet
Roger,, for 3 Bravo. Is 
حسنًا. لقد انتهينا من ملخصات الكمبي
我们预计，当目标从头顶飞过时，由于雷达的最
Хьюстон, вы видите вид Земли, снятый ниже лунного горизонта. Мы будем следовать по тр
एक और चीज़ जिस पर आप किसी से नज़र डलवा सकते हैं - म
D'accord. À -4 h 30, c
أبولو 8، عبر ريدستون. وضعك جيد؛ كلا الحلقتين ا
هذا 
ヒューストン、この水準器を使っても正確な水準器を出すのは無理だと思う。BBが入っているこのカップは、凹型ではなく凸型にな
Roger. Wir überwachen Ihre Tank
Roger. Je vous ai bien reçu. Je vais vous en envoyer un autre... (tension a
لنشغل بعض ال
好的。我们读到3g，看来这次可以不用再进行再入
— — N косая черта A в
好的，我正在读取仪表数据，250 逆变器温度为 145 度。这是 250 逆变器的温度。150 逆变器温度为 105 度，备用逆变器温度为 119 度，
11，休斯顿。罗杰，尼尔。你们的船员状态分别为 8 1/2、7 和 8 分
Роджер. Майк, когда ты некоторое время назад экспериментировал с этим, и мы снова уменьшили мертвую зону, предполагалось, что мертвая зона центрирована вокруг нового положения, в котором мы находились в тот момент. С тех пор мы отклонились на пару градусов как по тангажу, так и по рысканию от этого положения, так что если бы мы выполнили процедуру, как мы тебе объяснили, — включили бы команду ускорения (ACCEL COMMAND), все переключатели автоматического выбора (AUTO SELECT), а затем команду скорости (RATE COMMAND), — самолет попытался бы вернуться к положению по тангажу и рысканию, которое было, когда мертвая зона уменьшилась. Мы можем предотвратить это, если непосредственно перед включением команды скорости (RATE COMMAND) на переключателях ручного управления пол
Nous reviendrons sur les détails de ce qui nous entoure, mais il semble s'agir d'un ensemble de roches de toutes formes, angles et granularités, bref, d
わかりました。ACが機能していることを確認しましょう。パネル16のI
रॉजर, नील। शुरुआत करते हैं: अपोलो 11 मिशन पर बधाई संदेशों का सिलसिला पूरे दिन लगातार व्हाइट हाउस में विश्व नेताओं की ओर से आता रहा है। इनमें ग्रेट ब्रिटेन के प्रधानमंत्री हेरोल्ड विल्सन और बेल्जियम के राजा के टेलीग्राम भी शामिल हैं। विश्व के प्रेस
Okay, jetzt schaue ich mir den Adapter und die Ausrüstung da hinten nochmal an. Ich kann die Trennebene sehen; sie ist ziemlich sauber. Die Triebwerke sind sauber. Die Wärmeleitfarbe und die Wärmeleitstreifen sehen gut aus. Auch der Klettverschluss, den wir direkt neben der Kam
आ रहा 
रात में अवलोकन के लिए रेटिकल को पर्याप्त रूप से मंद नहीं किया जा सकता। खिड़की में तारों को फिर से चिह्नित करें, यानी ग्रस को... थॉरस ठीक केंद्र रेखा से नी
D'accord. Je distingue très peu de cho
Eagle, Houston. Die Aufstellung und die Initialisierung sahen für uns gut aus. En
Bene. Il lato destro della telecamera è puntato in direzione ret
नहीं, मुझे नहीं लगता कि हमें इससे बहुत आराम मिल रहा है, लेकिन दूसरी तरफ, हम ज्यादा काम भी नहीं कर रहे हैं, इसलिए हम ज्यादा थके हुए भी नहीं हैं। मुझे लगता है कि हम अगला रा
Okay. We have DISPLAY, open; SE AUDIO, closed; VHF A TRANSMITTER, open; VHF B RECEIVER, open; POWER AMP's going to be open; TRANSMITTER/ RECEIVER, closed; S-BAND ANTENNA, open; PMP, closed; TV, open; DISPLAY is open; next th
テープレコーダーは動いてるよね
Roger: 15 Minuten Vorbereitungszeit, Handschuhe anziehen. 
舱门
D'accord, Fred. Avant le décollage, soit une heure avant, effectuez les manœuvres suivantes: roulis, 130°; tangage, 125°; lacet, 12,4°. Les angles de cardan correspondants seront: roulis, 29
हे केन, अगर तुम्हें गिम्बल लॉक के पास कुछ भी आता हुआ दिखे त
ヒューストン、
Ce qui était hors de l'avion était
Apollo 13, Houston est opérationnel. Vérification des c
حسنًا يا جاك.
And, Houston, Apollo 11. These AUTO optics maneuvers or P23's, AUTO maneuvers, don't seem to be going to the substellar point. Can you come up with the roll, pitch, and yaw angle for the substellar point on thi
Got th
Das ist in Or
Okay, we yawed 
ヨー角は1秒あたり約0.5度とわずかに変化しており、機体を飛ばさずに取り出すのはほぼ不可能
حسنًا يا فريد، كنا نشك في أنك قد حققت إنجازًا واحدًا على الأقل. لقد لاحظنا ان
حسنًا. س
Okay, und wenn Sie die Seite mit Power 8 umblättern, sehen Sie die verbleibenden Raumschifffunktionen. Wir haben TM mit niedriger 
और, जैक, हमने अपशिष्ट जल निथारने वाला हीटर बंद कर दिया है। अगर आपको और अपशिष्ट जल निथारने की ज़रूरत है, तो बेहतर होगा कि हम इसे तब करें जब पाइप 
알겠습니다, 밴스. 당신 말이 맞아요. 말씀하신 대로 거의 완벽하게 구성된 카메라가 있습니다. 명령 모듈의 경우, EL 카메라에 250mm 렌즈, CEX 필름, f/8 조리개, 1/250 줌이 가장 적합하다고 생각하시는 거죠? 그리고 그 카메라가 보이는 위치는 5번 창문이라고 생각하시는 건가요? 
J'ai votre 
Aspe
حسنًا يا بيل. نعتقد أنه سيكون من المفيد للغاية معرفة كيفية عمله في وضع الاستجابة التلقائية، ونقترح إجراء اختبار عليه في هذا الوض
はい、コロンビア。長さは約4マイルです。待機してください
了解。もう一度言います。42 ブラボ
Oh 
هذه هي الصداقة السابعة، وهي ت
Гуаймас, Близнецы 4. Имейте в виду, что я снял шлем и не могу ва
Apollo 11, Houston. Es tut uns
जी हाँ, जैक। हमने पूरी प्रक्रि
연료 전지...
حسنًا. سأضغط على زر الإدخال مع تثبيت زر التحكم في الوض
And the manual deployment of the LR cubed, the little spring that is at the end of the string is p
Okay. For the burn there will be go t
Хорошо. Аполлон-1
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 저희 컴퓨터를 사용해서
프렌드십 세븐입니다. 혈압 측정 결과 126
Osserva i residui. PRO
Это подтвержд
روجر
제미니 4호. 사령
Ok, facciamo un controllo elettrico. Il bus principale è a 24 volt, il bus isolato è a 24 volt (ti
प्रतीक्षा करें। यह बंद 
Хорошо. В строке 3 под COMM. Откройте DISPLAYS, закройте SE AUDIO, откройте VHF TRANSMITTER и B RECEIVER, закройте оба основных автоматических выключателя S-диапазона. Откройте S-диапазонную антенну, закр
Sembra che alla fine ne ab
좋아요. 이제 우회 구멍을 막는 작
Okay, maneuver pad, purpose: fly-by, /G&N; 63385; plus 0.97, minus 0.23;; plus 0212.7, minus 0141.7, minus 0254.8; 148, 316, 050; NA, p
On a tous dormi à peine deux heures aujourd
Apollo 8. Eine der Dinge, die wir gerne noch vor der Abschaltung
Вторичный контур охлаждения выглядел действительно хорошо. Похоже, у вас был хорошо герметичный радиатор, и все остальное работало в соответствии с рабочими кривыми. Во время нашей проверки оба ваших основных кислородных регулятора наполнились до 104 psi. Учитывая лунную орбиту, ожидайте кипение воды со скоростью около 1 фунта в час, и это лишь приблизительная оценка; существует довольно много разных оценок относительно того, какими могут быть требования к кипению воды, от сильного кипения до полного отсутствия кипения. Следующий сброс воды состоится позже, так что вам не нужно беспокоиться об этом, пока вы не закончите. Прогнозы связи выглядят многообещающе, возможно, немного лучше, чем мы надеялись, и, похоже, мы получим высокую скорость
Your shaft and trunnions remain the same. Sirius remains on the 50-degree line just like Navi us
休斯顿，你现在如
인도양 선박, 인도양 선박, 시그마 세븐, UHF-hi 통신
ठीक है। ध्यान रहे कि कहीं कोई स्विच दब न जाए।
Bon, on s'est arrêtés pour un premier alignement, puis un alignement précis, et on a choisi une paire. On a choisi Ca
ヴァンス、数分後には、まだ使っていない唯一のシステムがどのように動作するか確認しましょう。
Роджер, Фрэнк. Мы хотели бы проинформировать вас о вашей траектории. Следующий промежуточный курс, который мы проходим, оказывается очень коротким, со скоростью 0,7 фута в секунду, и мы бы не хотели его проходить. Наши данные выглядят очень хорошо, и, экстраполируя их впер
네, 당신이 자는 동안 필터들을 이것저것 만져보면서 놀 계획이었어요. 그다음에는 육
罗杰。倒计时3小时，机动飞行并保持ATT HOLD模式以观察月球，姿
ठीक है। यह
Rog
11, Houston. Vediamo il palo del barbiere con alimentazione incrociata e ora abbiamo le toppe in velcro riattaccate ai sistemi. Possiamo vedere i segni sui misuratori
Oh, listen, Da
Хорошо. А если это не получится, то, конечно же, сделайте всё, что в ваших силах. Придётся попробовать. Возможно, это будет не совсем похоже на симу
Apollo 8, in attesa di un po' di rumore mentre cambiamo configurazione a terra. Stiamo entrando nel test 1; avrete ancora uplink e downlink, 
Roger, Canary, Gemini. Nous reprenons notre plan de vol habituel, mais celui-ci manque actuellement de précision quant aux horaires. Pourriez-vous transmettre à Houston que nous souhaiterions qu'il soit mis à jour avec des horaires précis au fur et à mesure de notre progression,
还有，休斯顿
जिम, हम चाहते हैं कि आप इस कंट्रोल मोड के बारे में सोचें और देखें कि क्या आपको लगता है कि यह आपके मौजूदा ज्ञान के आधार पर काम करेगा। हमें थोड़ा संदेह है, लेकिन हम इसे आपके सामने रखना चाहते हैं। तो, एक बार जब आप अच्छी स्थिति में आ जाएं, तो मॉनिटर करें, न्यूनतम आवेग पर जाएं, जैसा कि हमने किया है, और दाईं ओर यॉ रेट सेट करें। R3 पर मध्य गिम्बल को मॉनिटर करें और देखें कि क्या यह स्थिर हो जाता है। यदि नहीं, तो हमारे पास एकमात्र दूसरा सुझाव है कि आप एटीट्यूड होल्ड पर जाएं। ज
What I'll do - let me repeat - Okay. Let me repeat it all back to you. REPRESS PACKAGE VALVE, off; EMERGENCY CABIN PRESSURE, off; DIRECT O2, off; both the DEMAND REGs, off; both H2O ACCUMULATORS, WATER GLYCOL ACCUMULATORS, off; MAIN REG A and B, open; WATER and GLYCOL TANK INLET and OUTLET, open; for water, momentarily pressurize the SURGE TANK, take out water as required. You're recommending drain out all the water until I can't get any more water out of it in order to con
良くなってきましたね。1時か2時の方向で構えていますね。良くなってきましたね。
로저. 우리는 지금 할 일이 생기길 기다리며 가만히 앉아 있습니다. 상태 벡터와 측정값이 필요하고, 부하를 모니터링하고, 음성 확인과 스로틀 점검을 해 주
الانتقال إلى المرحلة الثانوية عام 1
それ
MDIUに何も入力できません。電源を切ってもMa1fun
好的。阿金纳位于瞄准镜
Roger. Stiamo manovrando per
ठीक है। हमारी चेकलिस्ट में "सभी जेट" को काट दिया गया है, और उसमें लिखा है "सभी अक्षों पर युग्मों को सक्षम करें"। तो हम क्या करेंगे - हम इसे फिर से स्थापित करेंगे और चरण 7 पर आएंगे
好，3，2，1
حسناً يا جاك. سنحصل على 
نتوقع أن تهبط الطائرة في غضون 20 ثانية تقريبًا
यह सही है। हमने इसी तरह शुरुआत की थी, और हम
Roger. Stiamo visualizzando della spazzatura sul tuo computer. Se premi ERROR RESET, possiamo cancellare quell'ALLARME DI PROGRAMMA in modo che il prossimo possa essere identificato. 
Bei der letzten Übertragung habe ich meinen
حسناً، انتهى كل شيء ما عدا لحظ
11, ici Houston. C'est parti. Termin
Gemini 4, Ha
Aq
私はします
प्लस 44, / 62970, माइनस 162,
Gemini 4, Carn
確かに。私たちは日光の下にいるし、彼らも皆
Также, эксперимент S-5. MCC просит экипаж сделать фотографии местности на всех 
- ensuite nous arriv
好
罗杰。我们想估算一下你手头
去吧，万斯
Okay, I've got the load ready, you got the new TR time. We're standing by for that Pilot's blood pressure. You ready to copy your update 
Molto bene, molto bene. Mi chiedevo cosa avresti
Roger. Die Ko
今日は本
And, Houston, Tranquility Base is going to give you a few comments with regard to the geology question of last night. We are landed in a relatively smooth crater field of elongate secondary - circular secondary craters, most of which have rims irrespective of their - raised rims irrespective of their size. That's not universally true. There are - There are a few of the smaller craters around which do not have a discernible rim. The ground mass throughout the area is a very fine sand to a silt. I'd say the thing that would be most like it on Earth is powdered graphite. Immersed in this ground mass are a wide variety of rock shapes, sizes, textures, rounded and angular, many with varying consistencies. As I said, I've seen plain - what looked to be plain basalt and vesicular basalt. Others with no crystals, some with small white phenocrysts, maybe one to less than 5 percent. And the bould - we are in a boulder field where the boulders range generally up to 2 feet with a few larger than that. Now, some of the boulders are lying on top of the surface, some are partially exposed, and some are just barely exposed. And in our traverse around on the surface and particularly working with the scoop, we've run into boulders below the surface - it was probably buried under several inches of the
रॉजर। आप पावर अप - प्रेशराइजेशन से 
알겠습니다. 그때는 문제가 있었던 것 같습니다. 27303 ENTER 입력란에 도착했을 때, 기체가 초당 1도 이상의 빠른 속도로 회전하기 
Oh, sì, ho il tuo guadagno elevato in 
はい。クワッド・ブラボー251
はい、毎秒3フィートの速
Und, Houston, wir befinden uns im ATT-Wartemodus, können wir die Busse abstel
اضبط الكرونومتر وضع الكابلات فيه، أل
22590。マ
Okay. Fine. I'll do it. And on the system, the - Whatever the problem
No more urine dumps on the 
Apollo 11, Houston. Your comma
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह ज़ांज़ीबार कैप कॉम है, आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप
أبولو 8، هيوستن. طلب ​​إيقاف
わかった。そう、できないんだ。自分の書いたものが読めないんだよ。ESSENTIAL INSTRUMENTATION POW
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. نُق
Stand by for a Mark at 
Beneath that, scratch out "Spacecraft control dash AUTO verify." Scratch out the "" and all in parentheses after that, like the "Minus 00507," et cetera. And beneath that, scratch out "PRO to 
Ok, ragazzi, ora abbiamo l'ELEVATO BIT RATE
— 
アポロ8号、下層装備ベイで機会があれば、投光器をDim 2の位置にしているようですが、これは期間限定アイテムです。通常の運用はDim 1の位置でお
パースが見えてくるはずです。ああ、これは素晴らしいヨーチェックですね。進路に対して左に約10度です。正確には進路に対して左に約12度です。ちょうど窓の端なので、ヨーは0度になるはずです。潜望鏡を通しては、助けになるものは何も見えません。あまりにも…雲が多すぎます。VOX 1、2、1、2
밴스, 어디서 중단했는지 전혀 모르겠습니다. 제가 말씀드린 대로 절차를 정확히 수행했다고만 말씀드렸습니다. SEP의 중요 부분, 즉 제가 "최적의 OMNI를 선택하세요"라고 말한 부분까지 진행했습니다. 그런데 메인 버스 B 전압이 전혀 측정되지 않습니다. 배터리 버스 B(베이커)는 36.5V, 배터리 버스 
收到，11号，这里是休斯顿。我们收到的信号非常清晰。据塔那那利佛雷达显示，你位于一个103.
ठीक है, फ्रेड
روجر
Canary, a
分かりました。サービスモジュールのクワッド・ブラボー・パッケージの温度が少し低いようです。約20度低いようです。他のクワッドよりも低いようです。クワッド・ブラボーのヒーター
友谊七号，Ca
... انحرف كثيراً إ
Sì. Sta tornando indietro. Un 
罗杰，乔
Und wie sieht es mit unserer Checkliste aus? Lasst uns sicherstellen, dass 
ठीक है, केन। आपकी तरफ से संचार बहुत कमजोर है - बहुत कमजोर, मैं - मै
حسنًا. محاذاة ا
다음 정상 연소의 ΔV는 
ठीक है, चढ़ाई 
네. 늘 그렇
Sag es noc
روجر، هيوستن. أبولو 11، 
Non. Nous prendrons
Things are looking very good at primary. We
E stamattina non abbiamo ricevuto alcun rapporto sullo stato dell'equipaggio. Ci chiedevamo 
Veuillez patienter. Nous allons passer en revue la liste de vérification de la
, dr
음식 얘기는 이쯤에서 끝내죠. 캔턴 컴
Negative. There's no sweat right now. We're wa
E, Charlie, vuoi
짐, 로저. TC 사용법에 대해 다시 한번 말씀드리지만, 조종 시 롤은 R3,
Ok. Il tifone Babe è ancora al largo di Formosa. Arriverai alle 06. Il meteo prevede un nuovo 13 GMT. Vorremmo delle foto, se riesci a farle. Nessun consumo d
我的也是大
Roger. Stellen Sie das Abwasserablassventil über Bord auf die P
Да, подтверждаю, подождем минут 10 или 5, а потом вы сможете п
알겠습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 복사할 도구
Ora spegne anche le luci
ठीक है। हम इसे बाहर निकालने ही वाले
Die nächste Umdrehung, wo
此时，我的三个轴几乎都处于反向姿态。通常通
هاواي. السادس. لدينا 36 بالمائة م
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्
レーダ
Gemini VI, Houston. Bitte prüfen Sie, ob der Stromkreis des Tonbandgeräts eingeschaltet ist. Der Steuerstromkreis des Tonbandger
Р
你指
حسنًا. وقت بدء العمل لديكم يبدو مناسبًا جدًا. هذا سيمنحنا وقتًا كافيًا للاستعداد لأي طارئ، تحسبًا لأي مشكلة في التوقف والوصول إلى هناك، كما سيتيح لنا بعض الوقت لل
La temperatura più alta nel nostro serbatoio è 
コロンビア、ヒ
حسنًا يا فريد، هناك أمران أو ثلاثة. أولًا، نحتاج إلى فحص زاوية الالتحام في أقرب وقت ممكن. ثانيًا، يمكنك
ロール 177 144 00 NA プラス 
Ho inserito una nuova cartuccia alle 06:00. Ho appena scattato
Хорошо, активируем основной испаритель. К
Roger. 
इसके 
好的。我们正在记录这些数字。
收到。休斯顿，这里是阿波罗8号。我们正在进行控制点跟踪——我设法在这次旋转中同时寻找-1和-2。我找到了两个标记，它们和之前给我的标记一样小，但更容易识别。我知道我可以重复这个过程，在下一次旋转中找到同样的小点。现在我可以尝试寻找那些记录下来的控制
ر
Хоро
حسنًا. نحن الآن في 
OK, et le chargement rétro est maintenant initialisé, car j'ai appelé les adr
Ok, Fred-o. Questo è il monitor PC della piattaforma di manovra più 2 ore; tutto N/D finché non arrivi a,
わかっ
我只是有点
Hallo H
Прежде чем я с вами попрощаюсь, позвольте мне сказать, 
أفهم أنهم يقدرون نقطة
S
क्या आप यकीन करेंगे कि आप चिकन स्टू देख रहे हैं? बस आपको इतना करना है - 3 औंस गर्म पानी को 5 या 10 मिनट के लिए उबालना है। अब हम गर्म पानी को ऊपर लगे एक छोटे से नल से लेते हैं जिसमें एक फिल्टर लगा होता है जो पीने के पानी में मौजू
जी हां। एक मिनट रुकिए; हम 6.13 और 4.80 
Ok. Ancora una volta, solo per tua informazione, sembra che la tua lettura di 87 psi corrisponda alla nostra lettura TM corretta di 92 - cioè 92 psi, e 89 a bordo sono in re
Джим, я передал Фреду наш новый планшет при
11日、かなり多くの視聴者がいらっしゃいましたね。アメリカでは生放送ですが、日本、西ヨーロッパ、そして南米の大部分にも生中継されます。皆さん
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. لقد بدّلنا الهوا
D'accord, Charlie. Il est complètement défoncé. Tu comprends que tu es prêt pou
Хьюсто
Armstrong meint, es sei die Luke, und wenn wir Sonde und Fangtrichter dort lassen, sparen wir morgen Zeit. Ich weiß nicht, ob man da drin schlafen kann. Ich glaube
3からRATE 2; デッドバンド、最大 
这里是
Roge
Im DIRECT-Modus fu
Friendship Seven
The fix on the vent valve and the ECS O2 was very cleverly fixed to take care of John's com
了解。もし承認してそのまま残っていただければ、トラニオ
حسنًا. الصف الثالث، تحت قسم الوقود - الدفع:
Apollo 11, Houston. Backup-S-Band jetzt, und wir sind berei
さあ、ヒュース
रॉजर, जैक। यह प्रक्रिया पूरी हो गई है, और अब मैं आपको कमांड मॉड्यूल में वापस जाकर मुख्य बसों को अस्था
看起来即使在断电状态下（字迹模糊），我们仍然消耗着略低于11安培的电流。1号机组是10安培，2号机组略低于11安培。系绳——或者说系绳或脐带式约束装置在外部舱门的位置——使得在航天器前方进行任何舱外活动（EVA）都相当困难，尤其是在自由系绳空气动力学方面。每当我在那片区域操作时，系绳末端会把我往后拉，反作用力会把我带回航天器上方，然后回到适配器部分。这就是为什么我在舷窗上方进行操作时，总是会超出视
ठ
रॉजर। क्या आप हमें 15 सेकंड के लिए क्वांटिटी रीड का 
Roger, Frank. Voici ce que nous faisons ici. Nous aimerions vraiment effectuer le calibrage de l'horizon. Il nous faudrait un total de 15 marques: trois séries sur une étoile, deux sur l'autre. Par ailleurs, nous devons tenir compte de votre besoin de passer à l'horizon, et nous comprenons que vous souhaitiez 
照明弾を発射します。4発とも約00[+]58+30の速度で発射します。
ठीक है। अब हम उस स्थिति में हैं जहाँ, आपके लिए बनाई गई उड़ान योजना के अनुसार, आप सभी खाना खा चुके होंगे और फ्रेड के सोने जाने के बाद आप और जैक ड्यूटी पर होंगे। तो, संक्षेप में, हमारी योजना के अनुसार, आप लगभग 3 या 4 घंटे पहले उठ गए। और - आपके लिए अगली विश्राम अवधि 96 घंटे पर है, जो अब से 7 घंटे बाद है, और उससे एक घंटा पहले, मान लीजिए 95 घंटे पर, आप तीनों खाना खाएंगे, और फिर आप और जैक दोबारा सो जाएंगे और फ्रेड 102 घंटे तक ड्यूटी पर रहेगा। हमें आपके लिए इस कार्य-विश्राम
Roger, I lost it for a while when I went back to the 3 setting, but I didn't stay there very long. It definitely should be about 7-1/2 to 8. At this point, I am on auto retroattitude. I am going to go to fly-by-wire shortly. I had been on gyros normal, and maneuver has been off. All systems are green. I snapped off about 2 percent of manual (fuel) one time b
إليكم تقريرًا من هاري روزنتال من وكالة أسوشيتد برس في هيوستن. أضفى بابا نويلان البهجة على ليلة عيد الميلاد للطفل جيفري لوفيل، البالغ من العمر عامين. طرق الأول باب منزله وجلب الهدايا، بينما قام الثاني بتشغيل محرك أبولو 8 العائد من القمر. ارتدى الأول بدلة حمراء ولحية بيضاء، وأطلق صيحة "هو هو" بصوت عالٍ سُمع في آخر الشارع. أما الثاني، فكان محركًا ضخمًا ينفث اللهب خلف القمر، وكان الآلاف ينتظرون بفارغ الصبر خبر تشغيله. "يرجى العلم أن هناك بابا نويل" كانت أولى كلمات أبولو 8 بعد أن خرجت من الصمت اللاسلكي لتُعلم العالم القلق بعد 15 دقيقة من إتمام المحرك لمهمته الحاسمة. قال كين ماتينجلي من مركز التحكم بالمهمة: "لم يتوقع أحد منا أن يحصل على هدية عيد ميلاد أفضل من هذه". وجاء الرد من العقيد فرانك بورمان، قائد المركبة الفضائية: "نشكر كل من كان على الأرض نيابةً عنا. كما تعلمون، لم نكن لننجح لولاكم". في هذه اللحظة، أضاءت شجرة عيد الميلاد أمام شاشات التحكم في مركز المهمة، وقرأ رائد الفضاء هاريسون شميدت نسخة فضائية من قصة "زيارة من القديس نيكولاس" على الطاقم. بدأت القصة قائلة: "كانت ليلة عيد الميلاد، وفي أعماق الفضاء، فاز طاقم أبولو 8 للتو بسباق القمر". كان طاقم مركز المهمة قد أرجأ الاحتفال حتى عودة والد جيفري، الكابتن جيمس لوفيل من البحرية، برفقة الرائد ويليام أ. أندرس من القوات الجوية والعقيد بورمان، سالمين إلى ديارهم. في أي ليلة عيد ميلاد أخرى، كانت عائلات رواد الفضاء ستجتمع في الكنيسة لحضور قداس عيد الميلاد، لكن هذا العام كانوا جميعًا يتابعون بشغف عبر شاشات التلفزيون. كانت المنازل القريبة من مركز المركبات الفضائية المأهولة مزينة. اصطفت فوانيس على الطراز المكسيكي على المروج المحيطة بمنزل لوفيل وفي جميع أنحاء مجتمعه في تيمبر كوف، وعندما وصل أربعة من سكان لوفيل، توقفت سيارة تحمل رجلاً طويل القامة يرتدي زي بابا نويل ويحمل كيساً كبيراً على ظهره. صعد سانتا كلوز إلى الباب وطرق بقوة. فُتح الباب، وإذا بجيفري لوفيل، الذي سيبلغ الثالثة من عمره في الرابع عشر من يناير، يقف هناك. ارتد جيفري إلى الوراء عند رؤيته. حملته والدته، فتشبث بها جيفري وهو لا يزال يرتجف. قالت شقيقته باربرا، البالغة من العمر خمسة عشر عامًا: "في العام الماضي هرب باكيًا". في وقت سابق، اضطرت للركض خلفه لمنعه من إطفاء جميع الأضواء. شاهد طفلا لوفيل الآخران، جيمس البالغ من العمر ثلاثة عشر عامًا وسوزان البالغة من العمر عشرة أعوام، المشهد بمتعة كبيرة. أخيرًا، اختفى سانتا والأطفال في الداخل؛ ووُضعت الهدايا تحت الشجرة؛ ولن تُفتح حتى اليوم. أعدت السيدة لوفيل مشروب البيض والبسكويت للضيوف، وشاهدوا جولة تلفزيونية مدتها خمس وعشرون دقيقة على سطح القمر قدمها رواد الفضاء الثلاثة. لاحقًا، اصطحب الأصدقاء السيدة لوفيل وباربرا وجيفري في جولة في الحي المُضاء بأضواء عيد الميلاد. في سماء صافية، أضاء القمر ف
Rog, capisci. Ti darò qualche informazione retrospettiva mentre mi mandi la pressione sangui
네, 잭 씨. 저희는 아직 여기 있습니다. 이 과정을 끝까지 진행해 드리기 위해 고화질 영상으로 연결하겠습니다. 질문하신 내용
Roger. Tu vas maintenir l
Хорошо. Мы рекомендуем остановиться на 54°45'00", это должно обеспечить вам почти правильный угол крена. Рекомендуемое положение: крен 263°, тангаж 090°,
Dopo aver ridotto la velocità a un punto tale da ritenere di poterci sganciare in sicurezza, lo abbiamo fatto e ci siamo allontanati dall'Agena a diversi metri al secondo il più velocemente possibile. Avevamo visto la quantità di propellente scendere dal 50% a meno del 30%. Dopo aver disattivato l'OAMS e ancora in potenza di polarizzazione e tutto il resto - valvole del motore spente - stavamo ancora rollando; abbiamo at
트랭퀼리티 기지, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 원격 측정 데이터에 따르면 현재 엔진
Okay. Ora sembra che... Okay, il tempo all'orizzonte... nuvole, nuvole all'orizzonte sul lato sinistro dell'immagine, riesco a vedere le nuvole fino a circa la metà, e al centro sembra che si stacchino, e poi c'è solo un po' di roba alta e sparsa... sembra che questa roba sulla si
D'accord. On va essayer de vous obtenir les livres aussi
オーロラセブン、カプコン。まだ読ん
Роджер
我外面能看
다음 페이지의 B1 칸에는 음식이 약 15% 정도 남아 있는 것으로 추정됩니다. B2 칸에서는 PPK를 꺼내고 쓰레기를 버렸습니다. B3 칸의 4번 창
- - BMAG MODE, three - You should stabilize and align CM
ठीक है। संज्ञा 26 का प्रयोग करें; तारे 26 और 33। तारा कोण का अंतर सभी गेंदों के बराब
माइक, यह ठीक नहीं है। अगर आप प्लॉट देखेंगे, जिसे हम आपके लिए बचाकर रखेंगे और उड़ान के बाद आपको दिखाएंगे, तो यह पहले ही चक्कर में शुरू हुआ और लगभग 20 से 20 डिग्री के कोण पर घूमता हुआ आगे बढ़ा, और फिर ऐसा लगा कि यह 90 डिग्री से लगभग 20 डिग्री के कोण पर एक ऑफसेट पिच प
وبالطبع، عندما تستعدون للانعطاف، عودوا إلى وضع الحذر والتحذير، ثم اضغطوا على زر التشغيل، ونود أن نقول نيابةً عن جميعنا هنا في هي
確かに私の真下です。カーナボンあたりからずっと真下を追っていました。カーナボンあたりまでは真下、そして地平線まで上がり、そして再び真下まで来ました。まるで私の軌道とは違うように見えました。遠地点と近地点も私の軌道とは違っていました。とにかく、位置がわかるとすぐに、日が暮れてから接近を試みました。先ほど言ったように、その時は私の1、2マイル先、真下にいました。つまり、接近しようとすればするほど、実際には接近できなくなっていったのです。私は逆噴射していました。上部スラスターを使って総速度を落とすように噴射し、そして…同時に噴射していました。実際には接近できず、ブースターは私から遠ざかり続けました。ハワイ
روجر. لأغراض ضبط توازن التبريد، ن
数量读数为 6
Out of DET
さて、手袋は外しましたか
حسنًا. إليكم الخبر العاجل:
ठीक है। मुझे एक मौका दीजिए, और मुझे लगता है 
Это «
Apollo 8, i
Okay, Jack. That's completely correct on 1-
いいえ。手元にある資料を確認して、あなたの
Okay. Sie möchten, dass ich Folgendes auf MDC 3 vorlese: Batteriespannung B, Zündkerzenspannung A, Zündkerzenspannung B, Einspritzdüsentemperaturen des Steuermoduls: 5 Char
That's only half of it. We have most of it hidden away. It's been pretty interesting doing all the camera work here to get a little extra training running the TV here, hopefully for when we get on the ground at Fra 
我々は大き
Dici che pensi che potrebbe averti causato un po' di rollio a sinistra anziché un'imbard
सुरंग में अब पहले से कहीं अधिक नमी है। प्रत
الساعة الآن حوالي 5:25، ونحن نعبر فوق
Che furbo. - Il retro dell'ufficio meteorologico è finalmente uscito. Il primo scatto non vale la pena di essere usato, quindi lo cambierò. - Okay. Abbiamo tira
알겠습니다. 03은 38549, 04는 61388, 05는 07513, 코어 66은 65384, 07
O
रॉजर
Roger. Ho appena... ho appena superato la costa e in questo momento mi trovo sop
ヒュー
好的。Vance，如果Buzz或Neil在附近，你可以问问他们，他们是否像在11号星球上那样，需要用灯来
حسنًا. انطلق. 127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 درجة/ثانية 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-برافو: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-برافو: 93. 1+58 14 45 
안녕하세요, 13번에서 미세한
حسنًا يا
Ok
Les Hawks ont remporté leur match de la ligue Pee-Wee 3-2. Ils on
Eh bien, c'était le cas, Charlie, mais en passant d'une manœuvre AUTO à une autre, nous avons pris 
Roger. What's the acceptable pitch attitude that we can have for? I can 
Checking over the other systems. They all seem to be fairly constant. Suit dome is still about 71 (degrees), suit inlet is 62 (degrees), which this time is comfortable. Cabin pressure and suit pressure and suit pressure gauge all match within about 1/10 of a psi. Getting some light i
Sì, qu
फ्लाइट सर्जन यह जानना चाह
わかった。目を閉じて、頭を四方八方に激しく振っている。上下、ピッチ、ロール、ヨー。お腹の中にも、どこにも何もない。今、ゼロ、タイムゼロボタンを押してみる。いや、失敗した。どこに何があるか少し分からなくなっていた。これで何を達成したいのか、正確には分からないが、方向感覚の問題はない。内耳と水平感覚で、この環境に適応していく。まるで、この環境に生
Хорошо. Перейдём к странице 1-11. На панели 276 изменений нет; на панели 278 мы хотим, чтобы все автоматические выключатели 
Okay. Und wenn Sie es dann an dem gewünschten Ort geparkt 
Roger. Ca
Да, у нас тут довольно много работы. О
네, 저는 큐 카드에서 130번 분화구의 좌표를 
Censo
रॉजर। हम सब कुछ कॉपी कर लेते हैं। आप अच
Roger, Frank. Quello che stiamo facendo qui sotto è questo. Vorremmo davvero la calibrazione dell'orizzonte. Vorremmo un totale di 15 punti; sapete, tre serie su una stella, due sull'altra. D'altra parte, stiamo bilanciando questo con la necessità di andare a, e non stiamo perdendo di vista il fatto che volete andare a subito. Quindi, se avete pazienza ancora un paio di minuti, stiamo cercando di decidere 
Верно. Вы меня опередили. Хорошо, в строке 29
- - e questo avviene in entrambi i cas
我正在抄写查理教我的重新建立机动动作。第五步是：“当速率小于每秒0.05度时，使用姿态控制偏航脉冲。” 但我该如何把速率降到每秒0.0
और दो काम हैं जो हम जैक से कमांड मॉड्यूल में करवाना चाहते हैं ताकि मेन ए
रॉजर। 
كولومبيا، هذه هيوستن. أسمعك بوضوح. 
Ça y est. C'est comme ça que ça déclenche… 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. صباح الخير من م
奥德赛
Roger. Since we're going as smoothly as we 
收到。当然，这是向上俯仰。还有，39:41：Rev 4；东经112.2度；赤经08:22:5
حسنًا. أعتقد أن الم
제
Okay. Ich denke, ihr braucht zwei Lithiumhydroxid-Kanister für Kommandomodule, eine Rolle graues Klebeband, die beiden „S“, w
让我看看。在密苏里州斯普林菲尔德，布鲁克林道奇队的老牌捕手米奇·欧文（Mickey Owen）决定，他不仅要以体育成就载入史册，还要以其他方式被人们铭记。1941年世界大赛上，他因漏接第三个好球而导致纽约扬基队战胜道奇队。他向45名男孩女孩赠送了小马。他请这些孩子写信告诉他，他们会如何照顾小马。信件纷至沓来，他在原有20匹小马的基础上又增加了5匹；其他捐赠者又捐赠了20匹。米奇·欧文说：“我原以为会收到45封信，结果收到了大约900封。” 接下来是专题报道：今天，在新西兰惠灵顿，大约50名男子在南极享用了传统的火鸡和蔓越莓酱，但今年的圣诞节也带有一丝东方风味。其中包括由一支穿越南极大陆的日本探险队成员烹
Okay, Fre
روجر، فرانك. ما نقوم به هنا هو التالي. نريد معايرة الأفق. نحتاج إلى 15 علامة إجمالاً؛ ثلاث مجموعات على نجم، واثنتان على الآخر. من جهة أخرى، ن
J'ai une remarque concernant le point sur Terre où les rayons du Soleil se réfléchissent vers nous. En général, la couleur des océans est assez uniforme, d'un bleu clair à un bleu foncé
どうぞ、CAP COM、こちらはジェミニ 
Roger. Puoi raccontarmi quali erano i tuoi atteggiamenti quando hai superato l'Ascen
Et pour rappel, n'oubliez pas notre problème d'arrimage. Nous devons encore ranger une bo
我这里有个ASCS（自动控制系统）的问题。我觉得ASCS运行不正常。让我先——紧急逆向顺序已启用，手动逆向顺序也已启用。吉姆，在我们继续之前，我得先评估一下这个逆
لي 
了解し
E 11, Houston, ho un aggiornamento su circa quattro elementi del tuo
Gemini 4
你能转告 Cape Com Tech 公司，我能读懂他的话吗
좋아요. 네, 그럼 그걸 먼
Und, Joe, Jack sagt, alle Einspritzdüsentemperaturen, er hat sie gerade nochmal überprüft, un
Роджер. Теперь мы тебя гораздо лучше понимаем. Джим может продолжить передачу информации войскам наведения. У них есть о
नह
Okay. Gut. Sag mal, da hinten ist auch noch eine Ersatz-
다시 말씀해 주
Okay, 11. Thank you. That sums up our questions for now, and we'll crank these back into the engineering p
阿波罗8号，在我们等待高增益期间，我将继续进行轨迹概要。我们仍然可以从13号返回太平洋中线，你们将在点火138秒后开始返回。138秒足以让你们脱离蝶形区。我们建议在20秒后不要尝试预点火或重启。如果超过20秒，轨迹可能会超出修正范围——修正能力足以让飞船自由返回。回收区的天气状况良好。我们有跟踪和无跟踪两种情况。在点火过程中，由于储罐中的燃料耗尽并流入集油箱，你们可能会注意到燃烧室压力和储罐压力略有变化。这可能发生在点火开始后的2到5秒左右。两个系统的压力变化都很小。所有系统都运行正常。为了确保轨迹，我们希望在点火后停止水沸腾。你们的排水情况看起来不错；应该没问题。我们会尽量在 5 点之后再进行排水。在……之前，我们想搅拌一下低温液——修正。燃料电池的下一次吹扫大约会在……进
Ta transmission est plutôt mauvaise, essayons
ロール
No. You hav
前にも言ったように、こちらは状況が非常に良好です。外科医が私の後に来て、もう一度血圧測定をします。ご都合はよろしいでし
प्राथमिक रेडिएटर का ब
了解しました。もう一度言ってください。エリア17-1のバンク角が00度の場合、RNからRPを引いた値はプラス107になります。2回目の読み上げでは、バンク角が44度の場合、RN、RPは0になります。3回目では、バンク角が90度の場合、RNからRPを引いた値はマイナス1
ठीक है, बि
Roger, Apollo 8. Couple of notes for you: on the you are coming up to on this, we've looked at your state vectors and all your information. The platform looks good, and it appears that it is your option if you would like to by-pass this, your platform will still
J
We have not received a blood pressure or an o
Подтверждаю. Хорошо, теперь мы на отметке минус 5 плюс 05. И, что каса
Okay, und wenn Sie die Seite mit Power 8 umblättern, sehen Sie die verbleibenden Raumschifffunktionen. Wir haben TM mit niedriger Bitrate. Allerdings haben wir kein VHF. Doch, wir haben 
Родже
Charlie, Apollo 11. Ho un paio di domande sull'arresto. Mi sembra che il modo più semplice per fermarlo sarebbe: siamo essenzialmente, ovviamente, a 0 gradi di imbardata e in chiusura a 90 gradi di beccheggio, quindi si tratta solo di fermarsi a circa 260 gradi di rollio e... Che ne dici di una procedura che prevede l'ASSETTO
Le déflecteur de jet monté sur le quad 1 semble être beaucoup plus froissé *** en ce moment sur 
こちらコロンビアで
أبولو ١١، هيوستن.
Sembr
ジム、フライトプランの初期段階で、スラスターの使用率、後方噴射と前方噴射の
正解です。
로저. 저희도 고객님의 콘센트 온도에
알겠습니다. 제가 확인해야 할 것은, 달 표면에서 물을 걸러낼 때 사용하려던 응축수 용기가 완전히 밀폐되어 있는지 여부입니다. 무중력 상태에서 이 용기를 통해 액체를
就在我们进入非洲大陆的那一刻，我用哈苏相机拍下了第55张照片。当时我们看到了一缕非常漂亮的高空云，看起来是这样——所以我又拍了一
Houston, Zwillinge 4. Verst
Das ist richtig. Okay, dann gehen wir zurück zur Tunnelentlüftung und überprüfen den Druckunterschied (ΔP) in cm³, um sicherzustellen, dass der Druck gehalten 
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP C
そ
Ich weiß nicht.
Jim, ici CAP COM. Tu pourrais aussi dire au pilote, à son réveil, que Jim e
フレンドシップ・セブン。グアイマス・キャップ・コム。テレメトリを取得するまでまだ3分ほどあります。エリア2アルファ、ゴルフ、ホテ
D'accord. C'est bien lui. Il s'agit de Jim Lovell. Aujourd'hui, nous souhaitions vous faire découvrir un peu la vie à bord d'Apollo 8. Après vous 
了解しました、ジム。COMMの推奨事項を作成しました。うまくいけば、パワーアンプの電源を切ることで電力を節約できるはずです。手順を読み上げて少し考えていただきたいのですが、最初のヨー操作の前に試して
11, Хьюстон. Похоже, в ближайшие пару часов 
好的。这是E内存转储文
알겠습니다. 대기하세요. VOX는
Ok. Non ho rilevato alcuna tensione su BAT C e l'amperaggio sembra essere di circa 2 ampere, ma potrebbe essere un po' un problema di rumore
Водолеи, пока ещё рано говорить о том, как всё будет развиваться. Мы хотели бы получить ещё несколько пунктов, поэтому продолжайте зачи
هذه فريندشيب سفن. الآن يا مارك، في هذه اللحظة، لا تزال بعض الغيوم ظاهرة أسفل مني، كان غروب الشمس جميلاً. غاب بسرعة كبيرة. لا يزال بإمكاني رؤية شريط 
Roger. Votre vi
잭, BAT B와 충전기 전류 값을 알려주시겠어
ठीक है। बर्न के नियम। हमें तब इंजन बंद कर देना चाहिए जब थ्रस्ट मॉनिटर 77 प्रतिशत या उससे कम हो; नंबर 2, यद
好的，肯。我们的
Now com
Et Fred, demande du PCM sur le débit binaire LO, main
Roge
रॉजर। जी हाँ, बिल्कुल। संकेत मिल रहे हैं कि सिस्टम थोड़ा गर्म होने लगा है और हमें लगता है कि कंप्यूटर जल्द ही चालू हो जा
Roger. Ora, per quanto riguarda il tuo riavvio avvenuto in orbita lunare, per la tranquillità degli informatici e del MIT, abbiamo una domanda. È stato il tasto ENTER a causare il riav
방금 S-5로 사진을 찍었어요. 사하라 사막 위를 지나고 있는데 정말 아름다운 풍경이네요.
Если я смогу убрать немного еды Билла отсюда — В этом месте, которое называется нижним отсеком оборудования, находится наше оптическое позиционирующее оборудование. Мы осуществляем всю навигацию здесь, ориентируясь на звезды и горизонты Луны или Земли. Именно здесь мы точно определяем свое местоположение в космосе, направление и скорость движения. А наш компьютер, как уже упоминал Фрэнк, принимает информацию и подсказывает нам
D'accord. Nous avons temporairement réduit le gain sur l'OMNI et sommes
रॉजर। पढ़कर सुनाना सही है। मेरे पास उन पर दो और संक्षिप्त टिप्पणियाँ हैं, लेकिन मैं उन्हें आपको भेजने से पहले एक पल रुककर यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहता हूँ कि मैं उन्हें अच्छी तरह समझ गय
今荷物を
Хорошо, мы снова на UHF-диапазоне. Это определенно были те светлячки, которых вы описывали на рассвете. 
Schiff im Indi
«
Hawaii Cap Com, ich starte einen Standardbericht. Ich befinde mich im automatischen Rückwärtsflug. Kreisel sind auf Normalbetrieb eingestellt, Manöver sind deaktiviert, alle Systeme sind aktiv, und i
ALIMENTATION D
45 40 GET Theta, 7,5; plage, 1000,01; Delta-V total était de 430; Delta-VI est de 202,1; la variation angulaire a diminué de façon marquée à environ - à un GET de 450,0 secondes ou un temps de phase total de 1 heure et 2 minutes
روجر. احتراق GET الخاص بك 02 18 25؛ دلتا-V، 50.6؛ دلتا-T، 1 زائد 08؛ الانعراج 0، الميل 0؛ النو
好的。关于第一项：第二项是12小时开尔文冷浸，经过我和这里以及飞行前的讨论，我认为大家一致同意我们不需要进行冷浸。所以我们将删除第二步。实际上，我认为我们确实需要进行冷浸，而且我们肯定需要在进入前对热水锅炉进行测试，以确保不会
Roger. I have the T1 and T2 times and also the longitude of the 130 prime. We're working on th
No, vediamo se ci 
C'est exact, Jim. Le reste est déjà fermé, il ne nous reste donc plus qu'à
Okay, Vance. Wir sind fast sow
«Дружба Семь», это представитель коман
La charge SPC que nous transmet
Houston, with reference to the on high bit rate, what I would like to do this is 
ليس لديّ واحدة بعد، لكنني أشعر الآن أنني أقرب إلى الحصول عليها من أي وقت مضى. أعتقد أن السبب هو هذا الأكسجين النقي بنسبة 100%. أستنشقه ولا أظن أنني شعرت بجفاف أنفي هكذا من قبل. مع أسوأ نزلة برد أصابتني على الإطلاق، حيث لا أستطيع التنفس من أنفي ويبدو صوتي وكأنني مصاب بنزلة برد شديدة. يبدو صوتي وكأنني... لكنني أستطيع الآن لو... كنت كذلك حتى أثناء نومي. لكن في الحقيقة، كان أنفي يحترق أثناء نومي. 
Roger. Ti
13, Houston. For
알겠습니다. 그 정도면 괜찮고, 보관 장소에 그
Я сделал
नील
好的。
로저. 그건 잠시 보류하겠습니다. 간단한 3단계 절차였는데, "활성화 페이지 1, 1A, 2를 반복하십시오"라고 되어 있었지만, 아무도 이해하지 못하는 단계가 하나 더 있었습니다. 그래서 기본적으로 저희가 권장하는 방법은 방금
Apollo 8, Houston. G
こちらシグマ・セブン。ただいまから日中のヨーイング検査を開始します。私は…グアイマスです。聞こえますか？オーバー。こちらシグマ・セブン。それでは血圧測定をお送りします
حسنًا. أعتقد أن المعدات التي ستحتاجها هي عبوتان من هيدروكسيد الليثيوم لوحدة التحكم، ولفة من الشريط الرمادي، وحقيبتان صغيرتان، لأننا سنستخدم الأكياس من تلك الحقيبتين، وبطاقة تذكير واحدة - واحدة من بطاق
この曲線は... 右にヨー？左か
Oh, il neige. Non, pas vraiment. Les vitres sont en très mauvais état, et je suppose que pour le module de service, on va essayer de tirer par la fenêtre, parce que toutes les vitres du module de commande sont couver
Роджер. Понимаю. Узел 
हाई गेन प्राप्त करने के लिए रोल करेक्शन किया जा रहा है, और हम इस समय हाई गेन के लिए उचित स्थिति प्राप्त करने के लिए रोलिंग जारी र
...बस ऐसे ही... मै
هل تريد وضع كلا الفلتري
रॉजर, गुआयमास।
看看体育界，我们来看看。就在你前几天忙的时候，乔·纳马斯和橄榄球联盟
Okay. Let's stay there for now and I assume y
Okay. We will stand, and you give us a mark on that. In just a second, I 
حسناً ي
Jack, qui è l'Acqua
Hey Fred? Diese Abwurfsäcke mit dem Minuszeichen sind wirkli
Хорошо. Здесь есть примечание, в котором говорится, что нужно использовать крепление типа «ласточкин хвост» сверху камеры, а не сбоку. Используйте крепление типа «ласточкин хвост» сверху камеры для крепления к кронштейну и наденьте гайку-качельку на кронштейне вниз, а «вни
Another comment on the optics. We're in right now. We are passing the - we have the roll of about 182; we're about in 226 pitch and 18 in yaw. I can rotate the shaft all the
Хорошо. После PC + 2 требований к триммированию нет; и, если во время PC + 2 произойдет выключение двигателя, последующие маневры на среднем участке траектории потребуются... Ну, самый ранний из них будет PC + 4. Если вы не выполните PC + 2, но мы все еще хотим это сделать — позже. На PC + 4 увеличение DELT — в DELTA-V, или штраф, составит около 24 футов в секунду, при посадке в центральной части Тихого океана. Теперь следует ожидать новых стартовых площадок, в
Okay, Jim. We have about three items for you. We have a maneuver pad, maneuver, again; and the maneuver pad for the for splashdown. We also have a checklist change with contingencies, - contingencies che
ठीक है, जैक ने खुद को वापस नीचे कर लिया। 250 वोल्ट के बैट ए और बैट बी ब्रेकर लगाने के बाद, उसने बैट बस वोल्ट ए पर
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。中間軌道からの観測に基づき、ガンマはマイナス6.57です。ただし、これは暫定的な値です。もう少し追跡すれば、軌道に乗れるようになり、軌道上に調整できると考えています。軌道のほぼ中央に位置しており、状況は良好です。就寝の数時間前に進入PADをお送りします。広報担当から、あなたの飛行に関するニュース以外の見出しをいくつかお伝えします。あなたは依然としてニュースを独占していますね。しかし、他にも興味深いニュースがあります。先ほどもお伝えしたように、オールスターゲームは雨天中止となりました。明日開催されます。しかし、ニクソン大統領は予定通り観戦することはできません。結果については、引き続きお知らせします。それから、天気予報も皆さんにとって良い天気になるでしょう。私たちの予報では、回収エリアの天気は良好のようです。外はきっと晴れるでしょう。ニクソン大統領は、皆さんの帰還を迎えるために出発の準備を進める中で、31年以内に人類は少なくとも一つの惑星を訪れ、そこに何らかの生命が存在するだろうと予測しました。「2000年には、この地球に住む私たちは、生命が存在するであろう新しい惑星を訪れることになるでしょう」と、ホワイトハウスで2000人の留学生たちに語りました。1週間の訪問に出発する前に、大統領は州際通商委員会の再編に関する提案を議会に提出しました。また、ベトナムから帰国後、統合参謀本部のアール・ウィーラー議長とも協議を行いました。インテルスタットの打ち上げは中止となり、水曜日の東部夏時間午後10時に再スケジュールされました。第2段燃料地上支援システムに汚染物質が検出さ
約束してい
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8. 
休
आह! लगता है म
POMPES À GLYCOL primaires ver
Хорошо. Спокойно. Ладно, тепе
Ricevuto. Carburante 103-100 [percentuale]. Ossig
Elliot... hat dein Buch aktualisiert. Wir sind von der VORLAUNCH-Phase in die CATCH-UP-Phase und dann wieder zurück in die VORLAUNC
콜럼
好的，这里一切看起来都
حسنًا، في تلك الطلعة الأخيرة، التقطنا حوالي 38 صورة باستخدام التصوير الجوي الشامل للتضاريس، بدءًا من منطقة شرق سان دييغو وحتى واجهنا الغطاء السحابي مجددًا. استأنفنا التصوير بشكل متقطع بمجرد أن بدأنا فوق الجزء الجنوبي من الولايات المتحدة، مرورًا بألاباما وميسيسيبي وصولًا إلى فلوريدا. حصلنا على صور ممتازة للطقس في تلك المنطقة، ثم التقطنا صورًا للمطارات حول جاكسونفيل. التقطنا أيضًا صورتين لرأس كيب كود. ربما كانت إحدى أفضل الصور التي التقطناها هي تلك التي التقطناها من الخلف، حيث أظهرنا تشكيلًا جويًا كاملًا على طول الساحل بدءًا من فلوريدا وصولًا إلى تكساس. خط جوي واضح المعالم يتبع الساحل بدقة. بعد ذلك، التقطنا صورًا للتشكيل الجوي في ولاية فلوريدا، حول كوبا ومنطقة الجزر، وصولًا إلى الخليج... تراكمات جوية،
Ok. Lo lascerò su OFF, in P
제미니 4호, 하와이 CAP CO
Хьюстон, Колумбия. Повторюсь, я его не увидел. Оптика AUTO была направлена ​​на точку, очень близкую к указанным вами координатам, поэтому я в
أقرأ لك بصوت عا
Puisque vous êtes déjà en route, il pourrait vous être utile de savoir que Ruby Graham, une astrologue de Houston, affirme que tous les signes sont favorables pour votre voyage sur la Lune. Selon elle, Neil est intelligent, Mike a un bon jugement et Buzz est capable de résoudre des problèmes complexes. Elle ajoute que Neil a tendance à voir la vie en rose, mais qu'il est toujours prêt à aider les pers
这就是他们所说的非推进式排气口吗
क्या आप इसे कॉपी करने के लिए तैया
Okay, Apollo 8. Looks like you can terminate your cryo fans now, and we're going to leave you alone for a while and let you get caught up. Things we ha
Я выпил много воды. Не знаю, сколько именно глотков, но, наверное, 
分かりました。ジョー、あなたの質問にお答えすると、いいえ。キャビンは常にチェックし
Roge
Vergewissern Sie sich, dass die Luke gesichert ist und d
네, 알겠습니다. 먼저 BAT 2, 저전압, OFF/RESET, 그리고 ON 순서로 진행해 주세요. 그다음 BAT 2, 고전압,
ठीक है। चलिए खेल समाचारों से शुरुआत करते हैं। लॉस एंजिल्स डोजर्स के पिचर सैंडी कौफैक्स और अभिनेता रिचर्ड विडमार्क की 23 वर्षीय बेटी एन विडमार्क निक
जी हाँ। यह ठीक रहेगा। आप कुछ कर सकते हैं; आप इसकी मरम्मत करवा सकते हैं। यह एक थकाऊ प्रक्रिया है, और इसीलिए हम इस पर नज़र रखना चाहते हैं ताकि प्रवेश से पहले हमें पता चल सके कि इसमें दो लूप होंगे या एक। इससे हम एक और सवाल पर आते हैं, बल्कि दो सवाल हैं। पहला, हम यह पुष्टि करना चाहते हैं कि आप प्रवेश के
Okay. block data, starting with. 025:00, 5119, minus 165, 071:08; 035:00, 7733, minus 165, 36; 045:00, 6208, minus 165, 094:52; 060:00, 59
Sembra piut
我跟你说，这些新旋钮真
了解。こ
Je suis effectivement assez pen
Die Anlagen am Boden sehen momentan recht normal aus. Die Temperaturen sind etwas erhöht, aber es gibt keine kritischen Anzeichen. Laut den neuesten Berichten liegen die Tempe
Apollo 11, Houston. Ich habe gerade einige der Transkripte von heute Morgen gelesen, die sich mit unserem vorherigen Versuch befa
Это обеспечит высокую скорость передачи данных, и вам п
はい、そうです。月をロックオンに使っただけです。簡単に報告します。スラスターを見れ
Хорошо, 8. Мы хотим провести небольшую тренировку на месте, чтобы убедиться, что мы сможем вовремя перезаписать пленку и доставить голосовую часть в Хьюстон. Итак, мы планируем перезаписать вашу пленку и отработать процедуру на месте, чтобы доставить ее сюда и прослушать. Мы считаем, что на пленке уже есть что-то, если только вы не перезаписали ее после последней пе
알았어. 무슨 일이 생기면 다시 한번 제대로 
…ムチ
Два фунта на квадратный дюйм. Ты понял, Эд? Мы сейчас закроем вентиляционный клапан и проверим показания артериального давления. Мы проверим костюмы на герметичность при давлении 2 фунта на квадратный дюйм. Прове
Дж
Wir können nichts sehen... Ich hoffe, sie 
Muss H
フレンドシップセブン、セグメ
了解。
حسنًا. في منطقة الهبوط في وسط المحيط الهادئ، الطقس جيد. الغطاء السحابي 2000 قدم، متفرق؛ الرؤية 1000 قدم/ثانية؛ سرعة الرياح 60 عقدة/10 ميل/ساعة؛ ارتفاع الأمواج 4 أقدام، والارتفاع عن سطح البحر 2986 قدمًا. زخات مطر متفرقة تغطي أقل من 10% من المنطقة. س
コロンビア、ヒューストン。君たちの対応があまりにも早すぎるようだから、投棄時間を130プラス30くらいに早めようと思っているんだけど
没错。我想我们现在看到的就是我们脚下的南美
ऑरोरा सेवन, क्या आप चाहती हैं कि मैं आपको चेकलिस्ट में 
알겠습니다. 다음으로 진행할 작업은 바로 물 투하입니다. 이 작업이 
알겠습니다.
이미 여행 중이시니 알아두시면 좋을 정보가 있습니다. 휴스턴의 점성가 루비 그레이엄은 달로 가는 여정에 모든 징후가 좋다고 말합니다. 그녀에 따르면 닐은 영리하고, 마이크는 판단력이 뛰어나며, 버즈는 복잡한 문제를 해결하는 데 능숙하
Sigma Seven this is Kano Cap Com. Transmitting on HF. Do you
روجر
ठीक है, एक्वेरियस। हम तैयार हैं। तो हमें हाई बिट रेट चाहिए। इसके लिए, COMM के अंतर्गत पैनल 16 पर जाएं और प
Ok, Jim. Solo una sorta di introduzione alla procedura che useremo per la fase intermedia, che sarà un'accensione manuale. L'assetto sarà controllato manualmente; l'avvio/arresto del motore sarà controllato manualmente. Quindi ora abbiamo un vettore piuttosto preciso su di te, e a quanto pare stai procedendo in modo un po' troppo superficiale. Ciò significa che dovremo accelerare un po' di più e procederemo intorno al lato oscuro della Terra. Pertanto, per procedere in modo più ripido, la nostra spinta dovrebbe essere in direzione del Sole. Tutto questo ti è chiaro
ठीक है। मैंने ऑक्सीजन टैंक हीटर 1 बंद
D'accord. Vous voulez que je lise sur MDC 3: tension BAT B, tension PYRO A, tension PYRO B, températures des injecteurs
Roger. Da haben wir Collins für d
जी हां, फ्रैंक। आपको यह सुनिश्चित करना होगा कि आप में से कोई एक अपना COMM कैरियर चालू रख
Okay. About all we se
Да. И когда ты сидишь между двумя парнями, которые те
초당 4피트, 
いくつかお願いがあります。現時点ではバッテリー B の充電を中止してください。また、4 つすべてを 2 分間、低温撹拌してください。UP TELEMETRY スイッチを BLOCK に
알겠습니다. 거기
Roger. Abbiamo due ingranaggi che ruotano quando si tira la maniglia avanti e indietro. Uno di questi è l'ingranaggio che funge da cricchetto, un piccolo cilindro con un pistone e una punta dietro che innesta il cricchetto. E abbiamo avuto qualche problema con quello prima di aprirlo e dopo averlo aperto abbiamo avuto difficoltà a far funzionare il cricchetto. Inoltre, abbiamo avuto molta difficoltà a chiudere il portello abbastanza da poterlo anche solo agganciare. Poi, Ed ha dovuto spingere il cricchetto con la mano a ogni tentativo finché non siamo riusciti a farlo partire. E io continuavo a tirare finché non ho pensato che probabilmente avrei rotto un perno del portello. E finalmente ci siamo riusciti, e finalmente è venuto in avanti. Quindi n
Хорошо, ладно. Мы летим над Штатами в 11-е по Гринвичу, и нас просят сделать неско
Le TR-10 est revenu à la normale. Je l'ai déjà fait. Bon, la pression de la combinaison est revenue. Jetez un œil aux onduleurs. 250 correspond à 141 degrés, 150 à environ 107 degrés. C'est suffisant. La pression de veille est de 7, soit presque la pression ambiante. Négative, même 
Roger, Fred. Bonne relecture. Commençons par le panneau 16. Sous AFFICHAGES DE VOL, rangée 1: POINTEURS CROISÉS SE, OUVERT; SYSTÈME Bravo - QUAD 1 TCA, FERMÉ; QUAD 2, FERMÉ; QUAD 3, FERMÉ; QUAD 4, FERMÉ. Deuxième rangée, sous ÉCLAIRAGE: PROJECTEUR au choix. Vous pouvez utiliser: ALIMENTATIO
حسنًا، عدنا إلى تردد UHF-hi. كانت تلك بالتأكيد اليراعات التي وصفتها عند شروق الشمس. لم أكن أركز على غروب الشم
確認しました。R Cal はオ
支
...in qualunque modo tu l
حسنًا يا جيم. إذن نريد أن
TAUX, ÉLEVÉ; A
...토스트가 완전
杰克，……现在月球上的温度是
Sì, potresti dare un'occhiata: se stai cercando qualcos
حسناً. البطارية 
حسنًا، 11. هيوستن. حاضر. بالتأكيد. ينتظر قسم الاتصالات الإلك
प्रविष्टि इस प्रकार है: मध्य प्रशांत, 357 1
Right. Three minutes prior to that they want you to put your oral temp prob
Хорошо, Gemini VI. Переведит
Ich glaube schon, Ken. Dieses Lichtband verläuft parallel zur M-Linie, und ich vermute, es hängt mit der Konstruktion der Optik zusammen
تريد أن ي
ねえ、フランク、あなたの健康
Roger. Im ersten Schritt auf Seite 47, Schritt 1, hatten wir die Steuerung im Automatikmodus und die Schutzschalter für die Triebwerke noch nicht aktiviert. Als wir dann fortfuhren – und wir sehen uns das jetzt an – leuchtet die TTA-Leuchte und vier der acht anderen roten Warnleuchten.
إنها تتحرك بسرعة كبيرة في الدوران، لكنها ثابتة ضمن نطاقها الآمن. يبدو أنها ثابتة عند حوالي 8 درجات بدلاً من 
ठीक है। मैं आधे रास्ते में हूँ, बस ऐसे 
Вэнс, по моим подсчетам, мы сделали около 10 снимков «
Roger, Apollo 
أبولو 8، هذه هي
جيميني 4، هاواي، مركز الا
저희는 고객님의 대기 원격 측정 송신기 점검
Roger, Gemini 4. Bien reçu. Et à 30 minutes d
Хорошо, дайте мне достать мой... дайте мне достать стамеску. У мен
Roger. Se vuoi scattare qualche foto, ti consigliamo di usare la rivista Uniform caricata con pellicola bianco e nero ad alta sensibilità, luci interne spente, una Hasselblad elettrica con obiettivo da 80 millimetri. E immagin
Okay, da has
再次检查面罩是否已关闭并锁定。头盔已锁定，手套已戴好，进气口和出气口的“Y”型接头已连接，ECS软管已连接。接下来我会进行指挥飞行员服检查（我已经检查过了）……检查气流。舱门锁已打开。然后你还有其他项目需要检查。当我们启动减压模式时，座舱通风阀压力会降至2磅/平方英寸，然后我们关闭通风阀。之后，我们需要安装两个血压泵插头，但我好像找不到
Oui. Baissez votre
I read the report. Awaiting the dome
सेटिंग -50 डिग्री पर है। जायरो फ्री हैं। -50 डिग्री
Ok, ora
هناك في الأعلى
नमस्कार, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस, ह्यूस्टन। आप T3
Wir fahren jetzt zu AUTO nach Houston, um zu versuchen, die Preise zu dämpfen. Wir sin
أبولو 8، هيوستن
Apollo 8, Houston. Tra un paio di minuti cambieremo l'antenna. È previsto un cambio di comunicazi
我
布鲁斯，我们希望当时我们的16毫米胶片相机在下降过程中还能正常工作，这样我们就能确认着陆点的位置。我们原本以为在上升过程中或许能拍到着陆点附近的一些可辨认的物体，我们也确实看到了一些小陨石坑、陨石坑群之类
実に不気味な光景ですね。太陽のコロナが月の背後からこのように現れ
Eh bien, q
صحيح يا
D'accord. Je crois que je me suis 
Roger. Aufstieg PAD: TIG 124 22 00 
わかりまし
我很少有机会说话
Indian Ocean Ship, Indian Ocean Ship. Sigma 
Я вижу, как двойные звёзды созвездия Грюнберга выстраиваютс
Eagle, Columbia.... got a solid lock on in VHF ranging and... 480 feet per 
了解しました
Non sono sicuro che siamo rimasti lì abbas
13, Houston. It won't do any
आगे बढ़ो, ह्
Il nous reste 10 secondes de fusée écla
Hawaii Cap Com. I am 4 secon
That's affi
Okay. And you can forget the " Follow-up," too. Okay, on page 17, perform all of the entries and at 4 minutes, we got a change. First line, CB(16) INVE
16 44 01. All right
ठीक है। अब आपकी मर्ज़ी। जैक के उठते ही, मेरा सुझाव है कि हम इन लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड के डिब्बों को तोड़क
Vediamo. A Springfield, Missouri, Mickey Owen, il ricevitore storico dei Brooklyn Dodgers che è entrato nel libro dei record segnando un terzo strike che ha portato i New York Yankees alla vittoria sui Dodgers nelle World Series del '41, ha deciso che sarebbe stato ricordato per qualcosa di più del suo record sportivo. Quarantacinque ragazzi e ragazze hanno ricevuto i pony da lui offerti. A questi ragazzi è stato chiesto di inviargli delle lettere in cui spiegavano come si sarebbero presi cura di un pony. Quando le lettere sono arrivate a fiumi, ha aggiunto cinque pony ai 20 già offerti; e altri donatori ne hanno aggiunti altri 20. E Mickey Owen ha detto: "Pensavo di ricevere circa 45 lettere, ma alla fine ne ho avute circa 900". Ora, nella pagina principale: Wellington, Nuova Zelanda, circa cinquanta uomini si sono seduti oggi al Polo Sud per gustare il tradizionale tacchino con salsa di mirtilli rossi, ma il Natale aveva anche un sapore orientale. Tra questi, il Sukiyaki cucinato dai membri di 
Was hast 
أجل، أعتقد أنه من الأفضل أن آخذ تلك الحقيبة الصغيرة – والمحفظة أيضاً. أقول لك شيئا
Okay. Ich bin momentan im Minimalmodus, während wir feuern. Danach schalte ich wieder in d
11번, 휴스턴입니다. 이곳에 상당히 잘 자리 잡은 것으로 보
Хорошо. Понял, Фред. И у тебя снова 0,1 CO2. Кстати, у вас получается откачивать воду
O
罗杰。步骤 9 是 a。步骤 
جيم، عندما تنتهي من إعادة ترتيب أغراضك ويكون ذلك مناسبًا، نود إيقاف شحن البطارية مؤقتًا لتشغيل نظام القياس عن بُعد، حتى نتمكن من مراجعة درجات الحرارة مرة أخرى، كما فعلنا بالأمس. أخبرنا أن سعة بطا
ठीक है। मैं इन्हें पहले जल्दी से पढ़ लेता हूँ ताकि आपको एक सामान्य जानकारी मिल जाए। पैड, सर्विस मॉड्यूल JETT एटीट्यूड, मून
No, possibly I did notice, oh, at the end of about the 6th or 7th pass, I drank quite a bit of water ... And got to feeling better. I've been eating and drink
알겠습니다. 페르시아만의 폭을 기준으로 말씀드리자면, 제가 직접 드릴 수 있는 정보는 단 하나의 국지적인 데이터뿐입니다. 바로 오늘 아침 휴스턴에서는 날씨가 맑았다는 것입니다. 이는 매우 국지적인 관측 결과입니다. 폐수 방류로 인해 기체의 균형이 다소 흐트러진 것으로 보입니다. 현재 피치 방향으로 약 20도, 요 방향으로 약 6도 정도 벗어난 상태인데, 이는 폐수 방류 이전보다 두 배 이상, 즉 상당히 큰 편차입니다. 저희는 계속해서 상황을 주시하고 있으며, 필요한
Okay. Weiter mit dem Zielstern: Dzuba, der zentrale Stern im Kopf des Skorpions; seine Position ist 060° unten, 42° links, plus 0773°, minus 16500°, 12982° 36256°. Die nördlichen Sterne bleiben Sirius und Rigel; Rollwinkel 129°, 
他很难保持方向感，而且在我看来，从那时起，他似乎完全不顾飞船的指向，随意地调整方​​向。他甚至能以相当高的速率调整方向，高达每秒2度。我打算把调整速率控制在这个范围内。当他回到飞船里时，我们费了好大劲才打开舱门。我们先抬起舱门的棘轮部分进行啮合。啮合之后，我们却无法将舱门完全关上。实际上，我们甚至开始向下拽锁扣把手，试图把卡住的卡爪弄出来。所以，我们经历了一段相当惊险的时光，我
Sospetto che questo campo di massi possa avere origine in parte da questo grande cratere roccioso dai bordi affilati che abbiamo superato durante la discesa finale. Ieri ho detto che aveva più o meno le dimensioni di un campo da football, e devo ammettere che è stato un po' difficile da misurare all'inizio. Ma ho pensato che potesse entrare nell'Astrodome mentre lo superavamo. E le rocce nelle vicinanze del cratere roccioso sono molto più grandi di quelle in questa zona. Alcune sono alte circa 3 metri e forse più grandi, e sono molto densamente popolate fino a ci
Apollo 8, nous avons te
收到，双子座，请注意，他们计划进入-3区域。他们目前正在调查6-3或7-3区域。他
了解しま
11, Houston. Nelle ultime due ore abbiamo visto un leggero aumento continuo della pressione parziale di CO2. Avete già sostituito la bombola di CO2 stamattina? Non è necessario farlo subito; vorremmo sol
罗杰，宁静。我们还有大约 6 分钟就到 108 了。如果您想启动您的活动计时器，我们可以在 
Abbiamo iniziato a fornirti alcuni tempi. Pensiamo di poterti fornire valori migliori molto pre
روجر، سيجما 7. تف
روجر. لا نتلقى بيانات القياس عن بُعد منك بش
好的。这是 9，/: 45597，-040，+
Contrast has increased and only the sunlit side of these 
罗杰。您能对 OMNI 设备上的语音进行高比特率
Верно. Хорошо, тогда мы закончим проверку вентиляционного отверстия туннеля и проверим перепад давления /CM DELTA-P, убедившись, что он держит давление. Затем мы вернемся и еще раз обсудим с вами все процедуры проверки целостности люка и вентиляции туннеля. Следующее, что я хочу прочитат
حسنًا، صحيح. حسنًا. أنا جاهز للبدء بالإجراء. عندما ترد عليّ، ارفع صوتك في الميكروفون، لأن إشارة الاستقبال لدينا مشوشة نوعًا ما. أول شيء نريدك أن تفعله، وسنفعل ذلك على عبوة واحدة، ثم ندعك تكرره على الثانية. خذ إحدى العبوتين واقطع الكيس الخارجي. اقطع على طول أحد اللحامات الحرارية؛ افعل ذلك بحذر وبالقرب من اللحام الحراري، لأننا قد نضطر إلى است
Eagle, qui Houston. Abbiamo perso tutte le comunicazio
أما بالنسبة لتصوير الدخول، إذا كنت ستستخدم فيلمًا ملونًا جديدًا للداخل، فنوصي بإعدادات التعريض التالية: فتحة عدسة f/11 بسرعة 1/250، ست لقطات في 
This is Houston. Go a
好的，万斯。你说我们应该从应急手册的准备阶段开始，大概是……我一会儿和吉姆商量一下，马上回复你。在点火姿态下，我们应该能看到太阳正好在顶部，我猜这是第二个定位点
Negative. Everything here is going honky dory. Apparently I 
자, 페이지 맨 위부터 시작해서 "오염 및 사진 촬영용 카메라
わかりました。そのページの右側の一番上の行、「4秒間オン、50フレームレートのカバーレンズ」を消してください。そして、その右下の「マガジ
Negative. I would like you to keep the p
Aquarius, 2 minutes and 40 seconds to g
こんにちは
-4. حسنًا، سأتحقق من هنا. يبدو مناسبًا. كان بإمكاني ضبطه بشكل أفضل قليلًا. حسنًا، هذا كل ما أحتاجه لفحوصات الانحراف الليلي، وبالنسبة لي، سأعود وأمنح الرجال مزيدًا من الوقت. لا أرى أي سبب لإهدار الكثير من الوقود. الآن سأعطيك واحدة من تلك الأشي
روجر. 
さあ、カーナ
Нет; мы удалили это. Ваши показатели дрифта настолько 
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous aimerions un cycle de refroidissement cryogéni
D'accord. Je voulais simplement vous en informer et vous inciter à réfléchir à ses implications sur le plan de vol. Je vous présenterai ensuite une vue d'ensemble et commenterai la Lune afin de déterminer les s
Sembra che zero psi corrisponda a circa tre decimi di volt sul misuratore di pressione. Ci è successo un paio di volte, con la pressione 
روجر. سنُهيئ لك وضعيةً لتنتقل إليها بعد قليل. يُرجى إبقاء حسابك على FDAI جاهزًا لذلك. الوضعية
Роджер, Хьюстон. Несколько слов о нашей сист
了解。フレンドシップ・セブン。こちらも少し不明瞭な音声で受信しています。調子は良好です。燃料5、訂正。燃料64～48パーセント、酸素52
A
حسنًا. هناك أمر آخر يجب مراعاته، وهو أننا لم نرَ القمر بعد - لم نره حتى النهاية، ونادرًا ما نراه عند العودة. رأيناه مرة واحدة منذ انطلاقنا، لكننا اتجهنا في الاتجاه الخاطئ من وضعية الرؤ
高
«Сигма Семь», это Мучеа, я вас плохо понял, но хотел бы попросить измерить артериальное давление. Доктор Берри был бы при
حسنًا. ان
로저, 
好了，现在RCS B的重
ومن السمات المذهلة للسطح الاستدارة التي تتمي
Nein, ich auch nicht. W
11 42. Род
И, Хьюстон, мы хотим убедиться, что у нас будет достаточно времени, чтобы настроиться 
А после того, как пропадет поддержка голосовой связи на iOS, буду использовать Zanzibar в это
了解しました。線量
2C is 6 1/2 and 24. And they look good. RCS A and B are both holding u
알겠습니다, 빌. 그렇게 되기를 바랍니다. 당분간 안정
Tranquility, Houston. Abbiamo ricevuto indicazioni che lo scambiatore di calore dell'elio del carburante di discesa s
انظر إلى ذلك، أليس كذلك؟ انظر 
そうだ
Gemini Net, Gemini Net. This is Gemini 4, Gemini 
危机之海西边的这片区域被称为沉睡沼泽，沉睡沼泽西边是宁静之海
Inoltre, alle Bermuda, il pallone non solo oscilla in
Apollo 
इससे मास्टर अलार्म फिर से चालू हो गया। अब यह लगातार बज रहा है, तो मैं इसे चालू ही
Cavolo, che bell'orizzonte lassù adesso. La luna sta tramontando e lo strato di luminescenza a
Ich nehme an, Sie fahren noch mit manueller Proportional
حسناً. في نظام ال
收到。这
네, 프레드. 아직 그에 대한 절차는 없고, 앞으로 그런 절차를 마련할 계획도 없습니다. 지금 말씀드릴 절차는 55
We're coming through the lower layer, 
Roger. Die Cape-Station möchte eine medizinische Datenfreigabe für den Piloten erhalten. Ich empfehle, dass er jetzt die orale Temperatur misst, damit wir in der Cape
Хорошо, да. Я х
休斯顿，你现在在屏幕
...여러분은 예전 G&N 직원들과 함께 이
그건 좀 더 알아내기 어려울 것 같습니다. 마이크가 마지막으로 그 일을 한 게 언
罗杰。吉姆之前关于日出时星体边缘亮度的描述引起了我们这里很多人的兴
Cont
Ricevuto. Stiamo appena completando alcuni dei nos
알겠습니다. 이제 방송을 종료하고 프레드오를 켜겠습니다. 배터리 충전도 중
...
Roger, Frank. Dobbiamo recuperare alcuni numeri che non siamo riusciti a copiare qui. Aspettate solo uno. Frank, nel tuo primo tentativo, abbiamo sbagliato tre punt
罗杰。加 90，G&N：63481，减 153，加 132，004 10 25 38，减 04761，加 00001，加 53361，180 193 000，不适用，加 00203 53573 633 53349，33 1578 122，不可用，减 0252，减 02580 11
Come va il nostro consumo energetico,
罗杰，弗兰克。如果方便的话，请你把耳轴校准编号念给我们。我们下行链路漏掉了
Bon, James, si tu n'es pas capable de mieux prendre soin d'un vaisseau spatial, on ne t'en confiera peut-être pas un autre. Salut Jim, à Houston. Tu pourrais demander à Jack, pendant qu'il est là-bas, de jeter un coup d'œ
Non, laissez-moi vérifier. Je descends au panneau 275, j'ouvre CB MAIN A, BAT BUS A et CB MAIN B, BAT BUS B. Ensuite, je descends au panneau 250 et je tire sur CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING et BAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDING. Puis, sur l
Roger. Ich brauche eine sehr genaue Positionsangabe, da ich immer nur etwa ein Rasterfeld gleichzeitig zufriedenstellend scannen kann. Der Bereich, den wir bisher abges
ケン、これらのスーツについては、ノースアメリカンが提案
Etwa 40° Sch
Jim, we have you 101 000 m
好的，吉姆。在你开始之前还有一件事。我们之前告诉你的，我们仍然认为完全正确。计算机内存中唯一会因此而改变
Okay. Uns ist noch etwas aufgefallen: Beim Druckaufbau stieg der Druck in den Aufstiegstanks an. Bitte überprüfen Sie daher, ob die Aufstiegszuleitungen geschlossen sind. Schließen Sie dazu
杰克，我还有一个问题。我仍然认为——我仍然坚持认为——我们16号配电盘上的照明电路，泛光灯和轨道灯应该保持开启状态。我们目前
Hai tutto il materiale s
Gemini VIII, RKV. Nous allons avoir une ligne de visée. Vous êtes en excellent état vu du so
ハワイとカリフォルニアの間の3分の
“——当DELTA-VX等于最终DELTA-VX时”，划掉该行。划掉“姿态控制：偏航，脉冲”。添加“修正”，划掉“通过Y、Z轴平移抑制过大速率”，并在该点添加“零”误差指针。
Да. Я как раз 
はい。ディスプレイは開いています。SE AUDIOは閉じています。VHF A TRANSMITTERは開いています。VHF B RECEIVERは開いています。POWER AMPは開いています。TRANSMITTER/RECEIVERは閉じています。S-BAND ANTENNAは開いています。PMPは閉じています。TVは開いています。DISPLAYは開いています。次の3つは開いています。CABIN REPRES
Voulez-vous que nous vous s
Und die nächs
알겠습니다. 그리고 정장 차림으로 입장하는 부분에 대해서는 조금
아폴로 
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호. 휴스턴입니다. 비행 계획에 제시된 각도는 198.6, 130.7, 340.0으로 여전히 
好的，寄存器 1，加上 27218；寄存器 2，加上 35570；寄存器 3，加上 33010；为了恢复窄死区，我们需要一个，NOUN 01，ENTER，3011，
Роджер. Понимаю 03 47 35; 61.2; 01 плюс 22; рыскание равно нулю, тангаж 21 градус вниз; 25, 00570; 26, 00224; 27 все нули; задн
फ्रे
Nun ja, ich muss leider gest
هذا صحيح. هذا ما هو مضبوط على ا
रॉजर, यह फ्रे
11, qui Houston. Al momento non vi riceviamo. Siete molto p
Bene. Ora prendi una delle bombolette di idrossido di litio e lasciami descrivere quale estremità è quale. È approssimativamente quadrata da una parte: una delle estremità piatte e ventilate ha la fascetta, e quell'estremit
Роджер.
روجر. نوصي باستخدام هذه الطريقة لمناورة الفصل، لأننا نرغب في الحصول على ال
रॉजर, हमें डंप वाल्व दि
There's the little Corona Australis, that we decided to use as a calibration. It's out in front of me right now, and they go down to fifth order stars and I can see stars that are distinctly of a less magnitude than the stars in the
Roger, Mike. Ihr habt jetzt fünfmal so viel Signal wie mit der hohen Verstärkung. Wir befinden uns genau zwischen den OMNI-Antennen, und die Kommunikation mit den OMNI-Antennen ist ziemlich schlecht. Wir haben fünfmal so viel Signal wie mit der hohen Verstärkung, und wir verste
रॉजर। हमने सभी क्रायोसेप्टिव कंटेनरों को हिला दिया है। क्या आप कृपया मुझे उनकी मात्रा बता सकत
The Delta-V is 42.5; duration, 53 seconds; yaw - correction - pitch is down 2 degrees; Core 25 is 00425; 
حسنًا. يشتكي الطاقم من وجود خطوط أفقية على شاشت
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。你们在等我们吗？等我们回来才开始进行云
We're directly over our first initial point now for P-1. It's almost impossible to miss, very easy to pick out, and we can look right over 
정말 잘 떨어지지 않네요
그리고
Okay, I'm reading you loud and clear, too. I'm reading you much better than I've read anyone else in a lo
Okay, Charl
11,
Affermativo. Hai capito bene, Jim, potresti accendere l'interruttore di
Aurora Seven, India
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Рекоме
I think that two corners did touch, since when it was deployed, both of them didn't come out at the sa
Et si vous pouvez maintenant profiter de votr
Okay. Di' a Zeke Thomas di svegliar
Ja, wir sind noch da, Jack. Wir möchten Ihnen bei diesem Vorgang folgen und verwenden dafür eine hohe Bitrate. Um Ihre Frage zu beantworten: Falls Probleme auftreten, um die Prozedur schnell rückgängig zu machen, berühren Sie auf keinen Fall den Netzschalter 124, da dieser eine Reset-Position hat. Zum Rückgängigmachen gehen Sie bitte in den Sicherungskasten und öffnen Sie dort auf Feld 5 zwei Sicherungsautomaten. Das sind die, die wir Ihnen zuerst
जिम, हमें असली गड़बड़ी का पता लगाने के लिए लगभग एक दिन का समय दीजि
حسنًا. ننتقل إلى الخطوة، التصحيح، الصفحة 3، التحقق. الخطوة 1، نفّذ الخطوة 1. ستكون أضواء التحذير هي ASCENT PRESS وCES AC وCES
Houston, Apollo 8. Nous sommes actuellement en mode gain élevé si vous souhaitez obten
रॉजर, नील। यहाँ एक महत्वपूर्ण बात यह है कि नमूना किस गहराई से एकत्र किया गया था। क्या आप सतह से कुछ इंच या उसके करीब तक नीचे 
も
وجهازك معطل
Rog
रॉजर। यह सही है। चरण 5 पर, चरण 5 का पालन करें। "प्राइमरी ग्लाइकॉल लूप एक्टिवेशन" के अंतर्गत, चरण 1, पंक्ति 1, "CB(16): DISPLAY - CLOSE"। यह क्रू का विकल्प है; यदि आप चाहें तो इसे रख सकते हैं। चरण 1 और चरण 2 के शेष भाग को छोड़ दें। चरण 3 क
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。廃水処理を開
はい、HFチェックを始めた時にアダプターを使って、そのままにしていました。そして、リエントリーと同じようにうまく機能しているようです
N
अगर इनमें से कि
Bene. Ti stiamo mostrando il meglio qui a terra. Ti dia
यह टेक्सास कैप कॉम, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। हम आपको सलाह देते है
休斯顿，阿波罗13号。我
Hallo, Muchea, Friendshi
Questa è Friendship Seven, che trasmette nella capsula. L'alba è spuntata dietro il periscopio. Era brillante nel mirino, di un rosso brillante mentre si avvicinava all'orizzonte e sorgeva; e proprio mentre... mentre guardavo di nuovo fuori dal finestrino, ho visto letteralmente migliaia di piccole particelle luminose che turbinavano intorno alla capsula e si allontanavano da me a una velocità di circa 5-8 ch
そうです、プラスで
Okay. Unglaublich, aber wahr: Der Norden ha
ठीक है। जैसा कि मैंने पढ़ा, हम ग्रे टेप लेते हैं और उसे इस तरह मोड़ते हैं कि उसका पिछला हिस्सा डिब्बों के बाहरी हिस्से के चारों ओर चिपक जाए। फिर हम अपने कार्डों को उसके चारों किनारों पर चिपकाते हैं; फिर हम उन कार्डों को डिब्बे के आधार के चारों ओर एक दूसरे के ऊपर रखते हैं। फिर हम... फिर 
姿态控制，水
Ero un po' preoc
يُ
或许我们今天还能让他再去参加 PROGRAM 01 课程
حسنًا. حسنًا يا رون. نحن جاه
Hier ist die
好的。面板 3：将电池充电开关关闭。面板 5：将主母线电池交流连接线连接至电池交流连接线；断开电池充电器断路器（电池 A 充电）；关闭电池充电器断路器（电池 B 充电）。接下来，面板 250：关闭电池 B 电源输入/落地式断路器。面板 5：将主母线电池 B/C 连接线关闭。
रॉजर। ल
네, 맞습니다. 우선 주요 이벤트 시간을 간단히 훑어보고 나서 세부 사항을 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 좋습니다. 진입 인터페이스는 142시간 40분, 즉 약 6시간 30분 전에 시작합니다. 히터 전원을 켜고, CM/ 온도를 확인하고 필요하면 CM/을 예열합니다. 아마도 예열이 필요할 것으로 예상됩니다. 자세한 절차는 나중에 안내해 드리겠습니다. 약 6시간 전에는 이전 중간 점검 때 사용했던 수정된 30분 체크리스트를 사용하여 전원을 켜기 시작합니다. 그리고 약 5시간 전에는 이전처럼 지구 종단면을 사용하여 기체 축 정렬 자세를 취해야 합니다. 그리고 그게 준비되는 대로 -7 단계를 수행할 건데, 현재로서는 초당 약 2피트(약 60cm) 정도의 연소 속도, 즉 약 15초 정도 걸릴 것 같습니다. 지금은 1.5피트(약 3.8m)까지 내려갔다고 하니, 안전 범위 내에 있는 것 같습니다. 좋습니다. 그 후, 서비스 모듈 투하 자세로 즉시 기동을 시작할 겁니다. 평소보다 일찍 투하하기 때문에 평면 내 자세를 유지할 겁니다. 평면 이탈은 필요 없고, 원하지도 않습니다. 서비스 모듈은 반경 벡터를 따라 바깥쪽으로 향하게 평면 내 자세를 유지할 겁니다. 그런 다음 사령선 점검 및 실사격을 포함하여 서비스 모듈 투하 준비를 시작하고, 약 4시간 30분 전에 서비스 모듈을 투하할 겁니다. 서비스 모듈을 확보할 때까지 기체를 상승시키고 사진을 몇 장 찍겠지만, 사진 촬영을 위해 기체를 이탈시키는 기동은 하지 않겠습니다. 비행 경로 각도를 망칠 수 있기 때문입니다. 좋습니다. 이제 2시간 정도의 여유 시간이 생겼습니다. 만약 시간이 부족하더라도 체크리스트를 확인하고 사령선 모듈 전원 공급을 준비할 수 있습니다. 사
우린 일자리를 지켜야 해, 짐
收到。关机
Okay, und du machst das wirklich gut. Es ist eine Wohltat, dass es hier nicht so laut ist. Lass mich dir erklären, was ich vorhabe, Jim. Wie gesagt, wir werden dir jetzt keine detaillierten Anweisungen geben. Wir werden dir aber in Kürze Anweisungen geben, die wir dir in folgender Form zukommen lassen: Zuerst erstellen wir eine Art Zeitleiste, eine Art Flugplan, mit den Zeiten aller wichtigen Ereignisse und allen Konfigurationen, Schaltereinstellungen usw., die speziell für unsere Konfiguration sind und daher nicht in der Checkliste stehen. Das gilt beispielsweise für das Einschalten des Komman
11，休斯顿。现在随着镜头移动，我们看到那里出现了一道美丽的彩虹……看起来星
您有时间给
Houston, Apo
알았어. 이제 살살 내려놔. 너무 세게 
Roger. Ich habe die Mengenangaben für Sauerstoff und Wasserstoff, falls Sie zum Abschreiben bereit si
Okay. Was wir alle wissen möchten: Wir bestehen keinesfalls darauf, Mond und Erde als 
Roger. Nous sommes entièrement d'accord. Pendant que vous vous y mettez, je vais lire ces notes. Appelez l'alarme de programme possible 5.6, portée supérieure à 400 milles nautiques, puis utilisez la procédure décrite au point 20. Choisissez l'option 1 dans NOUN 06 et utilisez le mode sans mise à jour. Le radar de rendez-vous se verrouillera à environ 25 degrés d'élévation au-dessus de l'horizon. Si l'alarme 503 se produit, désignez l'échec. Appuyez sur PROCÉDER et laissez le radar de rendez-vous effectuer la recherche. Place
هذا تأكيد. في اللوحة 
Vance，我已经把光圈开到最大了；你现在用肩膀看着的是四边形
이 비행의 책임은 우선 역사와 이 노력에 앞서 나간 위대한 과학자들에게 있습니다. 다음으로는 의지를 표명해 주신 미국 국민들에게, 그리고 그 의지를 실행에 옮긴 네 개의 행정부와 의회에, 마지막으로 새턴, 컬럼비아, 이글, 그리고 달 표면에서 우리의 작은 우주선 역할을 했던 우주복과 배낭인 EMU를 제작한 기관과 산업체 팀들에게 있습니다. 특히 우주선을 제작하고 설계하고 시험하며 온 마음과 모든 능력을 쏟아부은 모든 미국인들에게 특별한 감사를 전하고 싶습니다. 오늘 밤, 그분들께 특별히 감사를 드리며, 오늘 밤 방송을 듣고 시청하시는 모든 분들께도 신의 축복이 있기를 바랍니다. 아폴로 11호에서 인사드립
— Veu
收到，比尔。
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。ヨー90度に旋回してください。中間ジンバル角に注意してください。ジンバ
休斯顿，阿波罗8
حسنًا. يبدو أننا حصلنا على تثبيت محكم خلال الدقيقة الأخيرة تقريبًا. كان المؤشر يتحرك صعودًا وهبوطًا، وكذلك مؤشرا الميل والانحراف، لكن يبدو أنه استقر الآن تلقائيًا. نحن بصدد إنهاء عملية تنظيف خلية الوقود. سيتم تفريغ الهيدرو
ठीक है।
جاك، لقد اعتدت ك
Veuillez 
2-1 170. 3+40. 01 32 39. 2+18. 8+
好的，只要 OAMS 大于 120 英尺/秒，我就从前面抽取 84 - 84，
Okay. Fine. We're i
D'accord
Nous en reparle
П
Verstanden. Als nächstes kommt FLIGHT BUS, MAIN A und MAIN B, und das si
Compr
Questo s
Roger. Avec une telle visibilité et des communic
Okay. Step 2: "BALANCE COUPLE, OFF; DEAD BAND, MINIMUM; ATTITUDE CONTROL: PITCH and ROLL to PULSE; YAW to DIRECT; MODE CONTROL:, ATT HOLD; GUIDANCE CONTROL to ACS; damp rates; pitch and roll with the, yaw with
Très bien. Si vous n'avez rien, je vais vous confier à Sir John pou
It's right at the separation pla
11号，休斯顿。你们地面情况看起来不错
Roger. Wir hatten hier staubiges Wetter,
私も同じです。そして
Roger. Sul timer della missione, volevamo staccare l'interruttore e lasciarlo raffreddare per un'ora e mezza o due ore. Credo che l'interruttore sia attualmente aperto. È stato spento, quindi vai avanti e resetta l'interruttore del timer della missione. Imposta il controllo del timer su RESET e tienilo in RESET per 30 secondi, quindi ruotalo fino alle impostazioni desiderate da sinistra a destra e posiziona il controllo del timer su START.
Pourr
هذا سيجما سفن، أقرأكم بوضوح تام يا ووترتاون.
Ответственность за этот полет лежит, во-первых, на истории и на гигантах науки, которые предшествовали этому начинанию; во-вторых, на американском народе, который своей волей выразил свое желание; затем, на четырех администрациях и их Конгрессах за реализацию этой воли; и, наконец, на командах агентств и промышленных предприятий, которые создали наши космически
... 
わかった
Ich verstehe, dass einer Ihrer Gründe für den Einsatz in einem geschützten Rahmen die Tatsache ist, dass die Luke des Kommandomoduls... nicht gut funktioniert hat. Sie scheint sich nicht von an
Neil,
روجر. المراجعة 
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。ネガ
Könnten S
Комбинация космического корабля и Agena взлете
Just call me what you have, not what you'r
Однако, похоже, сейчас мы включим вашу платформу прим
Angolo di
D'accord, Owen. Je tiens à te 
Okay. 
Роджер. Понимаю, ты идёшь на проверку дроссельной заслонки. Это п
ああ、大丈夫だよ、フランク。ここは全部順調だよ。調子はどう
双子座4号，卡那封CAP COM。如果你读到这句话，请将口腔温度计插入……指挥飞行员的嘴里
아폴로 11호. 
ठीक है। हमने ऑक्सीजन हीटर नंबर 1 को बंद स्थिति में रखा हुआ है। मुझे लगता है कि यही आपका 
Bonj
嗯，这就是我的问题。我们——我们的16 20和这里的八号球不匹配。我们切换到了“开启”模式，但我们的球体动力还没有完全发挥出来。可能存在……而且我们的角度看起来不一样，我们不想进入万向节锁定状态
Okay. Und wir sind – wir haben hier sowieso erstmal keine Sichtverbindung, 13
Роджер. Вы по-прежнему указываете на задержку в 1 секунду по GET; мы же указываем на
알겠습니다. 통신 디스플레이, 디스플레이, 둘 다 열려
休斯顿，我们准备弹射的时候没多少时间跟你聊
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। बचाव पैंतरेबाज़ी G&N: 63481, प्लस 095, माइनस 020; 004 40 0100, प्लस 00051, प्लस सभी गेंदें, प्लस 00190; रोल आपका 
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。你们已在计划任务中心（PTC）停稳；姿态看起来不错。迈克，我想检查一下通讯。飞
진저브레드 포
53-ДЕЛЬТА 100. 2+07. 01 26 56
고르도가 잃어버린 방
Canary Cap Com, qui Si
लेकिन इस मोड में प्लेटफॉर्म ठीक से अलाइन हो जाता ह
Bene, concludiamo la lista di contr
了解しました
Must have been out - I came out just as soon as we got the GO. Before Hawaii, actually, I came out ... following the camera and inst
他に何か
わかりました。次の3つは同じです。それから、PROPELLANT DU
Roger. Wir möchten nicht, dass Sie diese Markierungen akzeptieren. Der Grund dafür ist, dass durch das Umgehen der Zapfen-Vorspannungsprüfung noch hohe Werte in diesen Registern vorhanden sind. 
Some appear to glow but I don't believe they really do; it's just the light of the sun. I'll try to get a picture of it. They're bril
Roger, 13. Because of the O2 tank 2 quantity sensor drop out, wants to keep a li
알겠습니다. 제가 드린 기상 정보를 다시 살펴보니, 목표 지점의 2,000피트 고도에
Négatif, B
Senden Sie Ihre Nac
Ok. Copiamo 39.3 e 1.20. E, Jim, ho un'altra informazione per te. Tra circa 45 minuti, si accenderà una spia di allerta quantità di H2O sul serbatoio di discesa. Ci aspettiamo che ciò accada. Si verifica al 16%. E non è un problema, perché intendiamo
わかりました
Allez-y
ठीक है, जैक, और अभी हम जिस अजीब स्थिति में हैं
Хорошо. Меня прервали на минутку. Боб Хоуп снова во Вьетнаме со свои
最后一个数字是负数
C'e
Bien, équipage. La seule autre information que j'ai à vous communiquer pour le moment concerne la mise à jour de votre zone de décollage à +35 heures. Il s'agit d'une modification par rapport à la zone que nous vous avons attribuée hier. Cette mise à jour vise à éviter les conditions météorologiques défavorables dans la zone d'atterrissage du Pacifique 
نعم. أعتقد أنني كنت 
好
Et ce n'est pas correct non plus. Les gyroscopes sont… fonctionnent correctement; mais ils sont en veille ASCS. Il pourrait s'agir d'un problème d'orientation. Je vais m'orienter visuellement et… voir si cela résout le problème A
Hou
Роджер, Кантон. Пожалуйста, сообщите Кейп-Коудс, что я указываю к
水瓶座さん、2分前はすごく綺麗だっ
Anche i bambini al campo estivo sono finiti al centro dell'attenzione quando Mike Jr. ha risposto "sì" a qualcuno che gli aveva chiesto se suo padre sarebbe entrato nella storia. Poi, dopo una breve pausa, ha chiesto: "Cos'è la storia?". A Washington, il presidente Nixon sta pianificando di usare il suo potere esecutivo per sne
Fred, did you get any MASTER ALARMS up there about 5 or 10 minutes ago? Fo
قد تكتشف ما إذا كانوا يرغبون في الحصول على تصريح طبي من النوع ال
Questo è negativo. Lo
ОТМЕТКА
D
Okay. We have a correction to make to your plus 44 hour. If you've got a 
لقد أضفتُ بندًا آخر إلى قائمة التحقق ا
Roger. À Washington, la commission des finances du Sénat a approuvé la prolongation de la surtaxe sur le revenu, mais un vote du Sénat sur le projet de loi semble pour l'instant peu probable. À Austin, le représentant de l'État, Ray Lemmon, de Houston, a été nommé directeur national de la Société américaine d'océanographie. M. Lemmon a proposé une étude sur la possibilité de créer un institut d'océanographie au Texas. Ce serait 
Vous auriez pu lui laisser la trappe déverrouillée
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une de l'actualité mondiale. Seuls quatre pays, la Chine communiste, la Corée du Nord, le Nord-Vietnam et l'Albanie, n'ont pas encore informé leurs citoyens de votre vol et de votre alunissage. Un journaliste a même déclaré être à court de mots pour décrire votre succès. Ce soir, le président Nixon assistera au match des étoiles de baseball à Washington. Après le match, il se rendra dans la zone de récupération du Pacifique. Mercredi soir, il se rendra en hélicoptère de l'île Johnston au navire de transmissions de la Marine, l'Arlington. Jeudi matin, il reprendra l'hélicoptère pour rejoindre le Hornet à temps pour assister à votre amerrissage. Le président sera accompagné du secrétaire d'État William Rogers et de Frank Borman. Ils observeront l'amerrissage depuis la passerelle du navire de récupération en compagnie de l'amiral John Sidney McCain Jr., commandant des forces du Pacifique. Après son séjour à bord du Hornet, le président entamera sa tournée en Asie et sa visite prévue en Roumanie. On pense que Luna 15 s'est écrasée dans la mer des Crises hier après avoir effectué 52 orbites autour de la Lune. L'agence de presse soviétique TASS a rapporté que des « recherches scientifiques » avaient été me
알았어. 프랭크, 여기 불이 꺼졌어. (햇빛이 없어졌어.) 몇 가
ठीक है। बढ़िया, फ्रैंक। दूसरी बात ये है कि पीछे वाले कमरे में बैठे लड़कों को थोड़ा समय चाहिए जब सब जाग रहे हों - अगर आप दोनों क
ठीक है। पैनल 4: टेलीकॉम, ग्रुप 1, AC1 से कनेक्ट करें। निम्नलिखित सर्किट ब्रेकर बंद करें: ग्रुप 1 दबाएँ, मेन B; ग्रुप 2 दबाएँ, मेन B; तापमान, मेन B; सेकेंडरी लूप ट्रांसड्यूसर, मेन B; रेडिएटर, कंट्रोल/हीटर, मेन B; बैटरी रिले बस, बैटरी B; बैटरी चार्जर, बैटरी B, चार्ज करें - या B से कनेक्ट करें, चार्ज करें; इन्वर्टर कंट्रोल, 2; इन्वर्टर कंट्रोल, 1; सेंसर सिग्नल, AC1; सेंसर सिग्नल मेन B; सेंसर यूनिट, AC 
Fred, hast du vor etwa 5 oder 10 Minuten irgendwelche Generalalarm-Melder dort oben empfangen? Einige Leute meinten, s
Ciao Ca
C'est exactement ce qu'il a fait. Tom a dit que tu avais eu une journée tellement longue hier qu'il pensait devoir jouer de la guitare pour t'aider à t'end
Как так получилось, что этот
روجر. وقت بدء المناورة هو 
روجر. سأرا
Houston, Apollo 11. Could you observe a difference in the N2 pressures before LOI? It seems to me as though the two were not equal on the... B
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 4분 남았습니다. 당신은 지금 이 순
我只需要做
Gemini 4, Guaym
सचमुच, मैंने जितने भी खूबसूरत नज़ारे देखे, उनमें से एक था नीचे देखना और फ्लोरिडा के दक्षिणी छोर, क्यूबा द्वीप, प्यूर्टो रिको और सांता डोमिंगो द्वीप समूह को देखना। यह वाकई एक अद्भुत दृश्य था। नीले रंग के विभिन्न शेड्स और जैसे-जैसे पानी गहराता गया, द्वीपों का न
Роджер... над районом урагана или тайфуна... прямо над Карлой и... какие именно это были объекты. Кажется, мне удалось сделать несколько хороших снимков на Hasselblad. Сверху была довольно обширная облачность и
A pro
Roger, j'ai bien reçu la révis
Apollo 1
يا أهل هيوستن، نحن نتخلص من ال
예. GET RC는 10 04 47입니
何が起こっているのかはわか
我们正在研究这个问
Roger. I copy. 331 Aft, Right 105, Down 0
在这
Хот
And have you hit PROCEE
- - गेंद... वापस आओ - ठीक है। अब हमें लगता ह
Roger, Houston. Qualche parola sul nostro sistema di tracciament
روجر. لقد استعاد بيل جهاز التسجيل الخاص به، ولاحظنا خلال عملية التفريغ الأخيرة أن الت
Роджер. Понял. Небольшое замедление по рысканию влево. Вы начинаете нем
تما
ああ、よかった。君との連絡は完全に途絶えた。エリ
هذه هي فريندشيب سفن. تعمل بدقة متناهية في فحص التحكم، وقد سارت العملية بسلاسة تامة كما هو مُوضح في برنامج التدريب على الإجراءات. إنها سلسة للغاية، وقد تأكدت
Houston, we're showing a glycol EVAP OUT TEMP around 44, and a RAD OUT TEMP of about 28. I wonder if we might try some manual mixing here to raise the glycol EVAP TEMP 
杰克，我弄了个挺不错的睡眠舱。我从指挥舱里取出一个睡眠束缚带，拉上拉链，然后把拉链顶端的系带钩在上舱门把手上。这样
حسنًا. يا له من إنجاز! أصبحت أصابعك الذهبية سريعة جدًا لدرجة أننا أغفلنا بعض الع
Houston, with reference to the on high bit rate, what I would like to do this is - if you got the last
Roger. Before we get too far along, we'd like to see, essentially with the secondary evaporator check, what we got on the redundant components c
分かりました。ドラッグ展開とスプラッ
All right, Jack. One thing we'd like to have done sometime soon is to have you cycle the cryo fans in O2 tank 2 one more time. We'd lik
わかりました。フィル
Okay. Jack, let me read you command module procedures just to make sure I have them right, al
Roger. It's 308 amps - - stand by
سيجما سبعة، لدي دقيقة واحدة تق
Хорошо. Так мы и поступим. Мы подождем, пока люди получат свои устройс
Je voudrais dire un mot sur le sextant. Son utilisation dans un vaisseau spatial exigu est très difficile, surtout avec le casque. J'ai finalement conclu qu'il serait inutile, avec le casque, d'essayer de prendre les angles requis pour les étoiles visées. J'ai donc retiré mon casque. Cela m'a donné un peu plus de liberté de mouvement, mais j'étais toujours limité à des angles d'environ 20 à 23° sans manœuvrer le vaisseau. L'étoile était alors masquée par la partie supérieure du hublot. En manœuvrant le vaisseau plus fréquemment et plus amplement, on pourrait aligner le grand axe du hublot avec le plan de visée. Mais, limités par le carburant, nous n'avons pas opté pour cette méthode. Nous avons également utilisé le mode pulsé, sans trop de manœuvres. Les étoiles sélectionnées pour cette campagne avaient des angles assez élevés, ce qui rendait l'horizon difficile à atteindre. Nous avons finalement décidé de les photographier un peu plus près de l'horizon. J'ai effectué quelques mesures sur Canopus et quelques autres télescopes, comme vous le remarquerez. Le filtre bleu semblait masquer complètement l'horizon; je ne voyais aucun horizon avec ce filtre. La qualité de notre image de l'horizon est probablement moins bonne en présence de lune. Le filtre vert, en revanche, m'a permis d'obtenir un horizon légèrement plus net qu'avec l'absence totale de filtre. Je n'ai rencontré aucune difficulté pour effectuer ces mesures, que ce soit ave
Roger. Je ne sais pas exactement ce qui s'est passé, Mike. J'étais en train de marquer les sites d'atterrissage avec le code, et j'avais sans cesse un gros message d'erreur pour l'OPTIQUE AUTOMATIQUE. Je voyais la cible, 
Ora sono in registrazione VOX. Ho sentito le H
Roger. That's why we are trying t
롤 기능을 껐어요. 아니, 롤
Forte e chiaro, ra
ロジャー、チャーリー。塩素処理の状況をお知らせします。コンパートメント
Roger. It went by me there. RETRO caught it. I
双子座4号，我们已收到您的血压数据。我们正在
On enregistre un écart de point de rosée de l'ordre de 65° (thermostat humide) et d'environ 73° (thermostat s
알겠습니다. 여기 있는 장비를 대기 모드로 전환해도
I'll bet. If you've got nothing els
I mean the Durban lights. I was not able to see them. I see some lights on the ground - at this time - in the middle of the
그건 확
单
はい。かなり下を向いています。これから上を向
Et je suis pr
«Аполлон-8», Хьюст
17-BRAVO 87，01+51。01 17 26 03。10+03。18-1 04+14。18 
Roger. Ich verstehe, aber nachdem wir die richtige Haltu
अच्
Фред, с карданными подвесами всё в порядке. Больше ничего на странице 14. Переходим к странице 15, и в разделе «ПРОВЕРКА» мы хотели бы убрать эту формулировку и просто написать: «Проверьте следующие переключатели: УПРАВЛЕНИЕ НАВЕДЕНИЕМ,;» Шаг 3 — исправление — это строка 3, измените «УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ПОЛОЖЕНИЕМ (3)» на «УПРАВЛЕНИЕ РЕЖИМОМ;» «УПРАВЛЕНИЕ РЕЖИМ
ह्यूस्टन, ट्र
Well, I don't know. It should be - let's see, it should have started the 
А ты, Джо, достал... для
음, 잭, 이게 우리가 가진 전부라면 한번 시도해 보죠. 37분 동안 초당 16피트 속도로 연소한다는 말인
Сейчас
On ne distingue aucune lumière cendrée ni aucun détail de la surface terrestre, car la luminosité est intense et provoque la contraction de nos pupilles. La vue du terminateur est 
يا برج الدلو، إذا استطعت أن تتخلص من جاك هناك، لدي بع
Okay, führen Sie die Initialisierung gemäß der Ch
هل وجدت أ
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. S-밴드 일반 모드 범위 설정을 끄고 S-밴드 일반 모드를 다시 설정해 주십시오. 다시 말씀드립니다. S-밴드 일반 모드 범위 설정은 끄고, S-밴드 일반 모드는 다시 
अपोलो 8। यह ह्यूस्टन है
Twenty seconds to burn. You 
Roger. 
好的。指挥飞行员
ठीक है, एडवर्ड। चलिए 14 मिनट-13 मिनट की चेकलिस्ट पर एक नज़र डालत
روجر. أخبرنا، لن نفرض قيودًا على معدل البت ا
Хорошо. После пункта 1, в первой строке, зачеркните «И VHF-A». Во второй строке зачеркните «Симплексный режим работы». В третьей строке зачеркните «Prime». Это относится к УСИЛИТЕЛЮ МОЩНОСТИ PRIME, ВЫКЛ. Это — «PRIME» следует заменить на «OFF». И это второй штрих в этой строке. Также в третьей строке последнее слово «OFF» следует зачеркнуть и заменить на «PCM». Четвертая строка в порядке. Пятая строка, которая гласит «VHF ГОЛОС, ВКЛ, ВЫКЛ, ВЫКЛ», зачеркните. «Освещение, ПРОЖЕКТОРЫ», которая находится в следующей строке, должна быть «OFF», но добавьте следующее: «Или ЛОБОВОЙ/ПЕРЕДОВОЙ, предпочтительно ВЫКЛ». Хорошо. Шаг 2 остается без изменений; пока без изменений. Подождите. Пропустите шаг 2. Не делайте его. Просто перейдите к шагу 3, который гласит «Настройте автоматические выключатели согласно схеме». Это подводит нас к странице 6. Почему бы тебе не перечитать мне то, что
И, Хьюстон, не могли бы вы сообщить нам, можем ли мы провести упражнение с красно-синим фи
알겠습
幅広の青い地平線が見えてきました。カプセルが通過
Gemini 4, Хьюстон, CAP 
罗
D'accord, Houston; 13. En réponse à la question 1, les changements de niveau sonore se sont produits principalement entre le premier étage et les autres étages - les autres étages étaient
Хорошо. Мы хотели бы попросить вас выключить индикаторы ACQ, командов
네, 맞습니다. 현재 돔 내부 온도는 약 77도입니다. 5
这是双子星
Il est sorti, Gus, et c'est vraiment impressionnant. Écoute, notre VOX ne fonctionne pas très bien, et je n'arrive pas à capter les communications. Il faudra faire la transmission. Le canon fonctionne à merveille. Il a pu manœuv
حسنًا، إنهم يفعلون ذلك بذكاء - على جانبي العالم المتقابلين - لذا عليك 
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 어젯밤 우주선 내부가 더 시원하게 느껴졌다는 귀하의 주관적인 평가와 관련하여, 저희는 앞서 전날 밤보다 약 3도 정도 기온이 떨어진 
좋
D'accord. 
Roger, kannst du 
了解しました。もう一度言いますが、今お伝えした手順では、カメラは窓の外を向き、X軸プラス方向から左に約30度傾いた状態になるはずです。早めにカメラをそのように設置することをお勧めします。何か問題が
Questo è negativo, Jack. Secondo l'ultimo aggiornamento, gli ampere-ora sono arri
जब आपने कंट्रोल मोड आज़माने की बात कही, तब मुझे आपकी बात समझ नहीं आई
Okay, ich gehe jetzt wieder in die Konfiguration. Ich werde das gleich tun. Und sie kam herein, ohne dass die Triebwerke hochgefahren waren, glaube ich. Könnten Sie das bitte noch einmal überprüfen? Und dafür messe
Ich frage mich, ob ich so langsam war, alles in Gan
我们确认裙边 SEP。罗杰。塔楼 J
Roger. Wir haben ihn n
जी हां, जिम। जिस स्थिति में आप बर्न-इन करना
そして私はあな
يبدو أن نظام توجيه مركبة الإطلاق يعمل بشكل جيد. ونُقدّر أن احتمال انقطاع التوجيه على مركبة الإطلاق يزيد عن 99%. لذا، يبدو أن الأمور تسير على ما يُرام. للعلم، استقبلت 
눈 때문에 꼼짝 못 한다니 아쉽네. 그래도 곧 만날 수 
ठ
Roger. This is Friendshi
Alba sulla costa occidentale. È piuttosto deludente perché è quasi completamente coperta da nuvole e smog. Vedo delle pause mentre mi avvicino alla costa. Un giorno, potrò sorvolare il Pacifico senza nuvole sot
물병자리, 휴스턴입니다. 상황이 어떻게 돌아가
收到。我的状态是“开始”。我能收到太平洋所有电台的信号，但他们似乎收不到我的信号。您建议他们盲发吗？我和太平
Roger, Bill. Notiamo che la pressione del vapore secondario sta lentamente aumentando e 
Es wäre schon interessan
收到。准备复
ठीक है। अगला एक, दो, तीन, चार, पांच, छह, सात, आठ एक समान हैं, और फिर हम फ्
使用
Houston, we'll be moving shortly from the side window to the hatch window, and we'll try and pick up some of the landmarks that we'll be looking at as we approac
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We recommend you accept the NOUN 49. Continue through your sequence of si
Wenn wir uns hier draußen im freien Bereich befinden, w
Okay. In der dritten Zeile unter COMM: DISPLAY, offen; SE AUDIO, geschlossen; VHF A TRANSMITTER, offen – das ist eine Änderung – VHF B RECEIVER, offen; PRIMARY S-BAND, POWER AMPLIFIER, offen; TRANSMITTER/RECEVER, geschlossen; S-BAND ANTENNA, offen; PMP, geschlossen; TV, offen. Darunter: DISPLAYS, offen; GLYCOL PUMP SECONDARY, offen; LOC PUMP, offen; CABIN FAN CONTROL, offen; CABIN REPRESS, geschlossen; und alle nächsten vier ebenfalls ge
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 부스터는 정상적으로 작동하고 있으며, 산소 고유량 문제도 우려할 만한 사항은 아닙니다. 
Esatto, perché la temperatura è un po' bassa. Sulla tuta, ora sono a 6 e aumenterò a 6,5. Non sto facendo molti progressi. Sono arrivato a circa 6,25 circa 5 minuti fa e ora
あなたは今、そこにある大きな岩の上に立っています
Yes, I think we lost lock. We'll st
Хорошо, Вэнс. Зарядное устройст
Ok,
One thing about it, when Ed gets out there and starts wiggling around, it sure makes the spacecraft tough to control
VII, questo è VI. A quan
यूरी अलेक्सेयेविच, मैं आपको याद दिलाना चाहता हूँ कि अंतिम क्षणों की तैयारियों के बाद उड़ान
11, Houston
分かりました。分かりました。まず第一に、これらのルールは厳しい制限のあるモード I の中止と同様であるべきというのが基本的な考え方です。では、皆さんがコピーできるように 1 つずつ説明していきます。分かりました。以下のいずれかの事象が発生した場合は、シャットダウンする必要があります。推力モニターの読み取り値が 77% 以下。推進剤タンク圧力 (これは入口圧力です) の機内読み取り値が 160 以下。燃料 OX DELTA-P が 25 psi 以上 (これは地上への呼び出しとなります)。姿勢誤差がプラスまたはマイナス 10 度 (始動過渡を除く)。姿勢レート制限が 1 秒あたりプラスまたはマイナス 10 度。また、以下のいずれかの事象が発生
Zweites
और, अगला पृष्ठ, पृष्ठ 35, दाहिनी ओर। "अंतर
ठीक है
دخلنا الغلاف الجوي بنفس الطريقة في أبولو 8 مع هيوستن، حيث قام باز بتشغيل سخانات وحدة القيادة وتركها تعمل. أطلقت أجهزة التشغيل صوت "أطلق!"، فتوقفت الخزانات تمامًا؛ لم يكن لدينا وقود. كان معدل الدوران بطيئًا جدًا... خرجنا إلى وحدة التحكم وبدأنا في جمع المعلومات، لكننا تركنا المركبة تعمل وراقبناها؛ ثم قامت المركبة بقفزة قصيرة، قفزة من 
그럼 한 가지 여쭤보겠습니다. 중간 수정 전에 1시간 동안 냉수 처리를 해야 한다는 말씀이신가요? 제가 제대로 이해한 
はい。LM操縦パッド、PCプラス2時間、開始時刻は、プラス08:33.0、マイナス00:50
इस सवाल का जवाब है हां, हम दोनों का इस्तेमाल करने की योजना बना रहे हैं। लेकिन इससे पहले कि हम वाटर बॉयलर पंप के बारे में बात करें, सीडीआर एक सेकोनल भी लेना चाहेंगे; यह सु
以前はここにありました。今どこにあるか分か
Zwei Dinge, Jim
Nous aimerions avoir beaucoup de... les caractéristiques de contrôle sont du module de commande, et si nous pouvons utiliser le contrôleur d'attitude uniquement pour manœuvrer la combinai
全部正
روجر. نستلم، ١١. نفهم أن البرنامج يمكن أن يعطيك عددًا لا نهائيًا تقريبًا من تركيبات الزوايا، وهذا ليس بالأمر غير
Yes. 9, 8, 7,
Pas très é
روجر. الغطاء السحابي هنا عبارة عن طبقة 
Джек, у меня получилась довольно неплохая спальная станция. Я вытащил один из спальных фиксаторов из командного модуля, застегнул его на молнию, а затем прикрепил стяжку прямо сверху молнии к верхней ручке люка. Так меня там как бы удерживало, и я просто плавно перемещался вверх ногами по туннелю лицом к люку, так что солнечный свет не попадал м
كان الدخول صعباً، والعودة أيضاً كانت صعبة بعض الشيء. لكن بالتأكيد كان هناك شيء 
حسنًا. قم بالتسخين المسبق، وهل يمكنك 
Okay, Jack. Ed è corretto. L'ho capito male. Metteresti quel CO
Und, Houston, Jack wird jetzt selbst versuchen, seinen Anzug zum Üben anzuziehen, und wenn er ihn herausgenommen hat, werden wir
Okay. On panel 250: circuit breaker BATTERY A POWER ENTRY and POSTLANDIN
أبولو 8، هيوستن. سنقوم بتغيير هوائينا خلال دقيقتين. ترقبوا عملية تحويل
Roger. Along with the other FAM 
好了，我的……不过在那之前我想告诉你，我在
2C имеет размеры 6 1/2 и 24. И выгл
Roger, reentry checklist complete. Standing by for ma
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 안녕하세요, 잔지바르, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 수신되십니까? 이상입
...
Oui, je sais, mais je veux dire q
ジャイロを評価し
Houst
네. 연소는 예정된 시간인 125 19 3470에 진행되었고, 연소 속도는 초당 51.5피트가 저희가 설정한 값입니다. 잔차를 약간 조정한 결과, -0.2, +0.
मुझे लॉन्च के बाद से ही यही समस्या हो रही है। मैं 
지금은 7시 55분 30초입니다. 콘타렉스 망원경으로 허리케인 베이브를 찍어보려고 했는데, 별로 성공적이지 못했네요. 허리케인 자체는 그다지 눈에 띄지 않고, 그냥 구름 
Ricevuto. Forte e chiar
Bene. Davvero, penso che dovremmo fornirvi una procedura più dettagliata a riguardo; e, in generale, questi sono i materi
Sì, signore. Questa è la mappa. Ogni piega è contrassegnata con una lettera nell'angolo in basso a destra, o 
A
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह इंडियन कॉम टेक है। आपकी आवाज़ बहुत धीमी, बहुत अस्पष्ट सुनाई दे र
Okay
周囲を見渡すと、コントラストは全体的に、太陽の影のおかげで生じています。非常に薄い灰色、薄い灰色、自分の影の周り、ヘルメットの影の周りの光輪。次に、横に目を移すと、周囲の色はまだかなり明るいため、コントラストが最も強くなります。太陽を見下ろすと、より広い範囲の影の部分がこちらを向いています。周囲の全体的な色のコントラストはそれほど大きくありません。私たちが蹴り上げた埃っぽいエリア全体を調べると、質感がかなり暗くなっています。今、私は埃を 1 つ蹴り上げましたが、これは *** Surveyor だと思いま
Hous
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous recevons la retransmission télévisée à Goldstone. Nous ne sommes pas encore tout à fait prêts à Houston pou
Je m'en occuperai. Je n'aurai pas l'
そして、先ほどここで少し操作すると、目的地より
روجر، لدي سؤال بخصوص الأدوية. هل تناولت أي أدوي
*** 片方の方向にバランスを失いそうになりますが、回復するのは非常に自然で簡単です *** そして、腕を動かしても、ジャック、 *** 表面から離れる *** ほど軽
जी हाँ। हम
Okay. Ihr Computer ist angemeldet und verifiziert. Sie können auf BLOCK gehen, wir sind in etwa 45 Sekunden hier. Ich fange trotzdem schon mal an. Zeitbasis 6P 24136, Rollwinkel 179, Nickwinkel 045, Gierwinkel 001, Brenndauer 5 plus 15, DELTA-VC Prime 105 196 VI 35569, Rollwinkel 357, Nickwinkel 091; plus 10 Minuten; Abbruchlage 199 Grad, und ich glaube nicht, dass Sie Zeit haben, das nochmal durchzules
Роджер. Жителям космического корабля «Колумбия», возможно, будет интересно узнать, что сегодня в Колумбии День независимости. Вчера вечером Глория Диас из Филиппин была коронована как «Мисс Вселенная». Она обошла 60 других девушек в борьбе за титул чемпионки мира по красоте. Мисс Диас 18 лет, у нее черные волосы и глаза, параметры фигуры 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. Первой вице-мисс стала Мисс Австралия, за ней следуют Мисс Израиль и Мисс Япония. Пока вы будете возвращаться во вторник вечером, в Вашингтоне будут играть команды всех звезд Американской и Национальной лиг. Ожидается, что Мел Стоттлмайр из «Янкиз» станет первым питчером Американской лиги. Пока никто не предсказывает, кто станет первым питчером Национальной лиги. В составе команды девять питчеров. Хотя исследования в космической программе, безусловно, принесли свои плоды, похоже, что не всегда все приносит результаты. Корпорация Woodstream, материнская компания Animal Trap Company of America, которая произвела более миллиарда деревянных пружинных мышеловок, сообщает, что создала более совершенную мышеловку, но мир не стал ей препятство
Roger. Do you have any update for the roll, pitch and yaw angles on the top of page 37 in the flight plan. Or are t
Ich bin überras
ロジャー。あなたがアセンションを過ぎた時、ど
요각 지시계(yaw attitude indicator)를 만져보세요. 270도를 가리키는 요각 지시계를 만졌습니다. 수동 비상 조종률 레버도 만져보세요. 네, 만져보겠습니다. 손을 정확히 댔습니다. 이 테스트는 다른 테스트보다 훨씬 쉽게 통과한 것 같습니다. 
好的。我们需要在7分钟
Präsident Nixon hat außerdem einen Aktionstag für alle Bundesangestellten am Montag ausgerufen, damit jeder Ihre Aktivitäten an der Öffentlichkeit verfolgen kann. Viele Landes- und Stadtverwaltungen sowie Unternehmen im ganzen Land geben ihren Angestellten ebenfalls frei, sodass Sie voraussichtlich ein recht großes Publikum erreichen we
يا تشا
E fissa il sacco di scarico
Sono a 45 minuti.
ठीक है। जिम, मेरे पास आपके लिए दो अपडेट हैं। पहला, धूमकेतु बेनेट को देखने की प्रक्रिया के बारे में है, और मैं जैक के उठने तक इसके बारे में आपको जानकारी नहीं दूंगा। दूसरा अपडेट तीन घंटे पहले उड़ान भरने से संबंधित है, और मुझे लगता है कि वेंस ने कल रात आपसे इसका जिक्र किया था, कि हम एसएचई टैंक के दबाव की जांच पहले ही करना चाहेंगे। और चूंकि हम मिडकोर्स 3 नहीं करन
알겠습니다. 표면
Sì. La risposta è no
روجر. فهمت
了解、2：SPS/G&N：
了解。戻ります。ヨーチェックはOKです。スコープでヨーをかなりよく捉えています。予想
हमें 1202 प्रोग्राम अलार्म की रीडिंग बताएं
Deshalb sage ich, nich
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。收到。你的点火正时为11秒；V
Роджер. Теперь, что касается вашей перезагрузки, произошедшей
ええ。ほぼ両
حسنًا. انقطع اتصالنا بك لفترة وجيزة بسبب عدم قدرتك على استقبالنا. جاك، نود الانتظار حوالي خمس دقائق. سيستمع إلينا المزيد من الأشخاص، وقد تطلب الأمر جهدًا
Okay. Fine. Say, it's a spare primary cartridge back there, too, isn't it? So
रॉजर। 35 मिमी ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट या कलर लेंस पर f/18 अपर्चर और 8 फीट की दूरी पर बल्ब की स्थिति के साथ 
L'humidité dans le tunnel est actuellement plus élevée qu'elle ne l'a jamais été. Subjectivement, nous n'avons constaté aucune augmentation de ce taux. Il ne semble y avoir aucune humidité ailleurs dans le vaisseau. Par exemple, les hublots ne sont pa
Хорошо. Я получи
Okay. That's correct. And the last part of the pad is at, which is minus 4.5 hours, execute a push of 0.5 feet per se
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस आपको पिछली रात के भूविज्ञान संबंधी प्रश्न के बारे में कुछ जानकारी देगा। हम अपेक्षाकृत चिकने गड्ढों वाले क्षेत्र में उतरे हैं, जिनमें लंबे, वृत्ताकार द्वितीयक गड्ढे हैं। इनमें से अधिकांश गड्ढों के किनारे उभरे हुए हैं, चाहे उनका आकार कुछ भी हो। हालांकि, यह बात हर जगह लागू नहीं होती। आसपास कुछ छोटे गड्ढे ऐसे भी हैं जिनके किनारे स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई नहीं देते। पूरे क्षेत्र की मिट्टी बहुत महीन रेत से लेकर गाद तक है। 
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP COM. Nous avons votre température. Vous pouvez commencer la prise de ten
Okay, go ahead and ta
Eh bien, 
D'accord. Il s'agit d'un péricyntien plus 2 pour un retour rapide. Ce sera / 62871, moins 161, plus 129, plus 45224, moins 06216, moins 18712 001 287 351, Novembre Alfa plus 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, Terre en haut 010, à droite 37, plus 1475, plus 06500 13239 36913; étoile principale Sirius, étoile secondaire Rige
मेरे पास सक्रियण प्रक्रिया है। कृपया इसे लिख ले
If Jack's listening, tell him tha
Sens horaire sur le contrôl
حسنًا. سن
好的。我读你的步骤，我们用灰色胶带，把它折叠起来，让背面
ठीक है। अब तस्वीर में कोई उल्टा दिखाई दे रहा है। ज़ाहिर है, अंतरिक्ष में कुछ भी सीधा या उल्टा नहीं होता। हमे
Son
了解。漂流飛行はしましたか？オーバー
هناك منطقة عاصفة كبيرة تحتي. لا بد أنها تمتد، فأنا أرى ومضات برق بعيدة جدًا في الأفق إلى اليمين. كما أنها تكاد تكون تحتي مباشرة هنا. تظهر بوضوح شديد هنا على الجانب ا
我计划进行最终调整——自动调整，然后进行四
Apollo 8, ici
Roger. Voici les nouvelles concernant la température de la combinaison. J'ai augmenté la température de 10 degrés à deux reprises depuis le décollage. On est maintenant à environ 15 degrés au-dessus du point de lancement. Les températures de mes évents de vapeur sont de 69 et 80 degrés. Je vais tenter une dernière fois d'augmenter ou de diminuer la température en m
Gemini 4
제미니 4호, 송신 중. 무전 복귀했습
Wir möchten kurz auf S-Band-AUX-Tape umschalten, damit Sie das Band leeren können, während wir auf hoher Verstärkung arbei
यह मेरे पास यहीं है। इसमें लगभग एक रोल है - 
收到。
روجر. لقد حصلنا على ضغط دم جيد أيض
Negativo. Penso che t
好的。请再告诉我一下什
Und – wir werden – wir geben Ihnen die Unterlagen morgen, aber grundsätzlich gehen wir davon aus, dass der Hauptbus B in Ordnung ist, und wir werden ein Testverfahren ausarbeit
로저. 모든 게 괜찮아
ヴァンス、私はロールとヨー、いや、むしろロールとピッチを得るために、MINIMUM IMPULSE 姿勢制御のみを使おうとしていました。しかし、この構成では姿勢制御のみでは、思い通りにロールを制御できません。ロールをゼロに近づけるには、270 度まで減少させる必要がありました。姿勢制御において、ピッチとロールを思い通りに制御できる組み合わせが何なのか
Хорошо. Ваш компьютер подключен и проверен. Можете перейти в BLOCK, и мы начнем
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы подойти побл
11, Хьюстон. 
Roger. Nur zur Info: Ich habe den Druck etwas erhöht. Meine Messwerte liegen jetzt bei 7 psia im Anzug und in der Kabine. Wie hoch sind die Temperaturen meines Wechselrichters und der Triebwerksleitungen, 
Ich gebe Ihnen – können Sie 
حسناً. مرت الأرض من هنا
还有，水瓶座，检查一下 11 号面板上
ठीक है। यह फ्लाईबाई कल दी गई फ्लाईबाई का अपडेट है, इसलिए कृपया ध्यान दें कि यह दूसरी फ्लाईबाई है। यह फ्लाईबाई /; 62970, माइनस 162, प्लस 129, प्लस 0
— Фред и Джек сейчас занимаются 
Okay. Unter Zeile 4: Unter HEIZUNGEN sollten Ihre QUAD-He
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。こちらフレンドシップ・セブン、マーキュリー・ネットワークに非公開で放送しています。1、2、3、4、5。こちらマーキュリー・フレンドシップ・セブン。アウ
了
Roger. Und wir übernehmen Ihre Apogäum
ニールか、光の中にいる誰かにそれ
3B 영역
Понял. Мы приняли. И мы рекомендуем вам продолжить тестирование на борту. Если у вас возникнут проблемы, мы свяжемся с ва
ठीक है। मैं प्रसारण बंद कर 
好的。从瞄准星开始，是天蝎座头部中心的那颗星——老祖巴星；它的方位角是：下060度，左42度，正北0773度，负16500度，12982度，36256度。北落星仍然是天狼星和参
حسناً. ف
«Аполлон-11», Хьюстон. Мы рекомендуем убрать его обратно над приборной па
Bene. Questo ci consente di abilitare la 
자, 휴스턴 여러분. GDA는 지금 어떻게 보
Роджер. DELTA-VZ имеет значение +00190, бросьте кубик, шаг 213 357, и это NA. DELTA-VT 00197 003 00152. Остальная часть P
Родж
حسنًا يا جاك، دعني أشرح لك الآن إعدادات المحركات النفاثة. المحركات Able 1 وCharlie 1 وAble 2 متوقفة. أما Charlie 2 وMAIN A، فجميع المحركات النفاثة التي أذكرها والمُشغّلة تعمل على MAIN A. المحرك Baker 1 متوقف. المحرك Dog 1 مُشغّل، المحرك Ba
Роджер. Проверка эксперимента D-8 № 1. Начало в 57. Проверка № 2. Начало в 01:30. Пункт № 4, версия 50, восходящи
مفه
戈德斯通，这里
Meglio controllare l
好的。第一步，我要对我们之前给你的基本配置做一处改动
이곳의 지평선은 아주 뚜렷합니다. 하늘은 칠흑같이 어둡고, 땅, 아니 달은 아주 밝습니다. 하늘과 달의 대비는 선명한 검은 선처럼 보입니다. 이제 카메라 시야에 들어오는 것은 흥미로
이쪽 작업을 거의 마칠 때까지
罗杰。所有这些程序都会奏效—
Это «Сигма Семь». Кто-то ведёт трансляцию вслепую, я вас плохо 
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। जहाँ तक खिड़कियों के पर्दों की बात है, चालक दल की सुविधा के अलावा इनमें कुछ भी नहीं है। मुझे नहीं लगता कि सिस्टम में कोई स
了解。約3秒早いですね。
Да, Джо, дождь идёт. У меня сейчас окол
D'accord. Je me suis détaché et je roule vers la droite maintenant. De mon propre chef. Voilà un... on dirait un g
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لقد وصلنا بك إلى نقطة الأوج 
Roger, George. My control mode is manual. The gyros are caged, maneuver is off. Fuel is 45 and 64 [percent], a little ahead of schedule. Oxygen reads 82-100 [percent]. Steam vent temperature in the suit is dropping slightly. It's a little below 70 [degrees]. Cabin is 4.6 [psia]. Suit temperature has dropped to about 71 [degrees] now. All the power is good, and here is a blood pressure. 
حسنًا يا جو. لقد شهدنا للتو انخفاضًا مؤقتًا ف
阿波罗8号，我们希望您前往并接受，我们想在这个时候取走录音机；然后我会
Tenez l'astronaute informé de l'avancement de la récupération; tenez l'ast
Potrei facilmente arrivare da un altro pianeta e sentire di essere sulla schiena e che la Terra è sopra di me, ma è più o meno la stessa sensazione che
추진체가 저보다 훨씬 아래에 있다고 말씀드렸습니다
로저 제미니 4님, RKV 외과의입니다. 아직 혈압 측정이
Negative. It is dropp
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。中継でトランクウ
Roger. J'ai constaté des variations de température avec le chauffage RCS. La première fois, la température était de 47 °C, j'ai allumé le chauffage et le voyant indiquait 54 °C. C'était le circuit A. Le circuit B était à 5 °C. Il a fallu 5 minutes pour atteindre 20 °C, et
Très bien, cela devrait permettre de mettre la structure au point, et je vais l'étendre à l'infini 
是的。吉姆，我告诉你，我不知道你之前有没有听到，但是从2.5英寸到1英寸
Майкл, го
Okay. Mid-PAC, 000152, 000;, 178; und Sie erinnern sich, das ist Monduntergang und Mond-Check-Attitüde. NOUN 61, minus 21,66, minus 165,37; 30; die nächsten vier sind N/A; DO ist 4,00, 02:20; 19, 
하와이, 제미니 4호, 힘내세
Хорошо, Джек, и процедура отключения зарядки батареи остается неизменной, но когда мы включим питание и посмотрим на ваш TM, нам потребуется
Mentre guardo la Terra da così lontano nello spazio, credo di avere la sensazione che i viaggiatori sulle vecchie navi a vela fossero soliti intraprendere un lungo viaggio lontano da casa, e ora stiamo tornando indietro, e provo quella sensazione di essere orgoglioso del viaggio, ma comunque... comunque felice di tornare a casa e al nostro porto di o
Elle est pile au centre de notre écran. Tenez-la bien, restez stable. C'est vraiment bien. OK
我们愿意放他走，但他还没凑
Roger. We're working on the pressurization of the now, and working off the decal with CSM- pressure equalization. And we're down to step 13, where we're waiting for the ca
Okay, Jack. Moment mal. Ich hatte vergessen, dass der Regler am ANUN/NUM ganz heruntergedreht war und
حسناً. سنتوقف هنا عند تفريغ الماء، فقط للتأكد من أن فتحة تهوي
Хорошо, Джек. Вот, собственно, и все заметки по хронологии, которые я для тебя подготовил. Не хочу тебя расстраивать, но мне также нужно внести пару исправлений в контрольный список. Это не исправления, а просто части к
रॉजर, कैंट
روجر. لقد استعاد بيل جهاز التسجيل الخاص به، ولاحظنا
Ich könnte Ihnen sagen, dass wir gerade auf diese runde Tasche direkt hinter Fred schauen, in der unser Vakuumschlauch steckt. Sobald wir wieder im Inneren sind, schließen wir
وسنأخذ -
好的。吉姆马上就要重新连线了，我会断开生物
Oui, n
- -... Questo è quello che... 0,5, giusto? È... Mike, hai d
11، هيوستن. هل يمكننا الحصول على قراءة ع
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لقد تجاوزنا للتو نسبة 25 بالمائة، و
우리는 곧 아프리카 
Salve. California Com Tech, Aurora
Фрэнк, судя по всему, с памятью компьютера, кроме W-матрицы, абсолютно ничего не случилось. Тем не менее, мы продолжаем изучать этот вопрос, и есл
Итак, панель 16, верхний ряд, ДИСПЛЕИ ПОЛЕТА: ПЕРЕКРЕСТНЫЙ УКАЗАТЕЛЬ СИСТЕМНОГО ИНЖЕНЕРА, ОТКРЫТ; СИСТЕМНЫЕ КВАДРОЦИКЛЫ 1–4 TCA, все ЗАКРЫТЫ. Второй ряд, ОСВЕЩЕНИЕ: ПРОЖЕКТОРЫ, вероятно, будут открыты; ЛОГИЧЕСКОЕ ПИТАНИЕ B, ОТКРЫТО; УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ПОТОКОМ КОСТЮМА, ОТКРЫТО. Под КОММУНИКАЦИЯМИ: ДИСПЛЕЙ, ОТКРЫТ; ПЕРЕДАТЧИК VHF A, ОТКРЫТ; ПРИЕМНИК VHF B, ОТКРЫТ; АНТЕННА S-ДИАПАЗОНА, ОТКРЫТА. Нижний ря
Хорошо. Основной заголовок: «Вход,
ATCA (PGNS) は閉じたままにしてください。3列目の4つのブレーカーは閉じる必要があります。ヒーター、信号コンディショナー1、そしてATCA (PGNS)、姿勢制御。私たちのミスです。順
Okay, und Atria ist im Sextanten. Na ja, nicht genau in der Mitte. Ich nehme an – ich weiß nicht was – Hast du j
Houston, bei diesem Bremsma
わかりました。
रॉजर, जेमिनी VI। अगर आप 
मैं ज़रूर करूँगा। और चलिए देखते हैं, हम आपको बताना चाहते थे कि इस बार बैटरी चार्ज बहुत अच्छा है। यह बिल्कुल किताब में दी गई बैटरी जैसी दिखती है, और मैं चाहता हूँ कि आप बंद करने से पहले
D'accord. Ça me va. Si ce n'est pas urgent, mais si vous avez le temps 
Il... propulsore si è a
收到。这里是友谊七号。以下是三十分钟报告：头部活动没有引起任何恶心或不
はい、あなたはおそらく
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフランク・ボーマンが同行します。彼らは太平洋軍司令官ジョン・シドニー・マケイン・ジュニア提督と共に、回収艦のブリッジから着水を見届けます。大統領はホーネット号での滞在後、アジア歴訪と予定されていたルーマニア訪問に出発します。ルナ15号は昨日、月を52周した後、「危機の海」に墜落したとみられています。ソ連の通信社TASSは、「月近傍空間における科学的」「研究」が行われたと報じました。ジョドレルバンク天文台のバーナード・ラベル卿は、ルナ15号が時速約300マイル（約480キロメートル）の速度で月面に衝突したと述べました。ベトナムでは最近、比較的静穏な状況が続いています。パトロール中の米兵が、飛行中の航空機に同調するトランジスタラジオを携帯しているのが目撃されました。ベトナムの軍のラジオ・テレビネットワークは、このミッションを全面的に報道しました。スエズ運河沿いでは、エジプトとイスラエルの間で小競り合いが依然として続いています。国連監視団は、この動きを阻止しようとしています。ワシントンでは、下院歳入委員会が、27.5%の石油枯渇許容量を20%に削減
Roger. Good signal through KB-
Okay, Apollo 8. Es sieht so aus, als könnten Sie Ihre Kryo-Lüfter jetzt abschalten. Wir lassen Sie jetzt erst einmal in Ruhe, damit Sie sich einarbeiten können. Die Tests an Bord, wie die Überprüfung der Hochgewinnantenne und des Kommunikationsmodus, die Sie aufgelistet haben, verschieben wir und führen sie durch, sobald Sie bereit sind. Das können Sie also ganz nach Belieben erledigen. Beim Ho
Роджер. Если
好的。杰克，关于水还有一点要补充。如果你取水时没有完全释放压力，剩下的压力会在1到3小时内消失。虽然氧气含量不多，但我们最好还是保存起来。所以，如果你想彻底解决这个问题，可以把水装进水袋里，这样就能完全
わかりました。OMNIスイッチの次に、パワーアンプをオフにして、ダウンボイスバックアップFTAとレンジングをオフにします。お好み
Ça devait être quelqu'un d'autre
11, Houston. Su quella TV, il nostro commento... Il monitor che stavo guardando era in ritardo di circa 12 secondi, da 12 a 15 secondi, mentre passava attraverso il nostro 
D'accord. Je vais peut-être revoir ça avec toi, Jack, car cette liste de contrôle a déjà été modifiée deux ou trois fois dans nos différentes procédure
好的。关于解放军和中国人民解放军的最新情况，40-3 
여기는 VOX 녹음 전용으로 시그마 세븐입니다. 고속 추진기 작동 없이 일반 자동 모드를 복구했습니다. 현재 85%는 자동, 90%는 수동 
Negative. I went up and tried to repressurize the surge tank and get another shot of water, a
Roger, 11. Under column A on page F2-20, line 5, line 05, the new data is 01042; line 07, the new data is 00256. Skipping down to line 11, 00070; line 12 is 00042; line 13 is 77730. In column Bravo, lines 3, 4, and 5, which are blank, should be all zeros for line 3; line 4 is 20017; 
Ricevuto. Ho un paio di cose da considerare sul piano di volo. Ora, numero 1: abbiamo un riallineamento che dobbiamo effettuare prima degli avvistamenti, e questa sarà l'opzione 
Итак, мы в
Oui, vous m'avez enlevé le
Hé, voyons si je peux lancer ça 
Go ahead
Gemini 4, Guaymas
Okay. Du hast immer noch ordentlich Power. Wir zeigen dir über 30 Ampere auf dem Wasser. Falls du in Schwierigkeiten gerätst und 
Et, Verseau; Houston. J’ai un bloc-notes SEP pour le module de service si vo
Okay, Houston. The center panel - I'm looking at the indicator A. We have a package temperature of about 180. Our helium pressure is 3900. I'm looking at fuel pressure of about 180 and percentage of about, I'd say 85 percent. B is about the same, except that that package pressure is 190. On quad C, we're looking about the same, except that the package temperature is 100. On quad D, we're looking at package temperature of 160. All other indications are about the same. pressure - pressure is looking nominal. Helium pressure's up around 4000. And package temperature 
रॉजर। हम आपके साथ
हालांकि, ऐसा प्रतीत होत
Roger. 
ठीक है। इस इलाके में चाँद बहुत चमकीला है और ठीक से दिखाई नहीं दे रहा है। मैं आपको क्षितिज की एक तस्वीर भेज दे
자,
نقوم بتنظيف كل شيء. سأبقى مستيقظاً وأحاول الحفاظ على 
Okay. And we're ready to read you the first checklist installment. This will - What we're going to readup is going to be a time line, a time li
SUIT 
نعم
双子座4号，
Canary, Friendship Seven. Bien reçu. Contrôle terminé. Capsule en place et en attente. J'aperçois le pro
Nicht wirklich. Die ersten fünf Zentimeter kam ich ohne größere Probleme rein, und selbst als ich so fest wie möglich draufhämmerte – beim zweiten Mal brauchte ich beide Hände am Hammer – und dabei ziemlich tiefe Dellen in die Oberseite der Verlängerungsstange schlug, ging es einfach nicht viel weiter. Ich glaube, die Gesamttiefe betrug etwa 20 
Houston, questa è una piccola dimostrazione per i bambini a casa, per tutti i bambini del mondo, se è per questo. Volevo mostrarvi come si beve l'acqua da un cucchiaio, ma temo 
알겠습니
هل تصدق أنك تنظر إلى يخنة دجاج؟ كل ما عليك فعله هو سكب 90 مل من الماء الساخن لمدة 5 إلى 10 دقائق. الآن، نأخذ الماء الساخن من صنبور صغير هنا مزود بفلتر لتنقية الماء من أي غازات قد تكون موجودة فيه، ثم ندخل طرف هذا الأنبوب الصغير في الصنبور ونضغط عل
Ricevuto. Bene, sono le 36:41. E aspe
Roger, Carnarvon. For the Plane-Change. At a GET 02 plus 42 plus 07; Delta-V, 31.7; duration, 0 plus 40 seconds; yaw, right 90 degrees, pitch 00; Core 25, 26, 0; Core 27, 90317; aft thrusters
Думаю, телескоп, скорее всего, практически бесполезен, но с помощью секс
了解。それから、あそこでは楽しいことは何もないってことを覚えておいてください。CDU
माइक, इस 
Roger. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie während dieses Überflugs bei Ascension einen HF-Check durchführen sollen. Dieser HF-Check findet um 05:15 Uhr statt. Schalten Sie Ihren Sender in Sich
D'accord, Bill. Je crois que je veux revenir sur mon dernier point concernant l'utilisation du vecteur d'état embarqué pour le point 4. Après l'avoir examiné plus en détail au sol, ils doivent commencer à fabriquer les fichiers et à effectuer tous leurs calculs. Plutôt que de reporter ou de refaire le travail, nous allons procéder comme d'habitude. Concernant l'orbite lunaire, nous avons étudié la question et plusieurs personnes – Jack Schmitt et son équipe dans l'arrière-salle – analysent l'impact des hublots. Il semble que deux options aient un impact sur le point 2. La première consiste à ce que Jim et toi échangiez vos places et q
حسنًا يا جيم. يبدو أن ما علينا فعله هو - للحفاظ على تسخين متساوٍ، علينا تدوير الجهاز بالكا
Nous avons effectué le verrouillage radar à environ 288 km et l'alignement radar a été réalisé à environ 251 km. Les aiguilles sont relativement stables et semblent correctes. L'aiguille de lacet oscille légèrement, d'environ ±1 degré. Il est à noter que notre problème réside dans l'élimination des résidus. Nous p
Négat
ठीक है; एकदम बढ़िया। जिम की एक अच्छी तस्वीर थोड़
OK, Fred. Bien joué. Étape 6: ENTRÉE, plus toutes les boules, plus 28300. Étape 
تبدو الأمور جيدة جداً يا والي. ملخص الك
أجل، كان ذلك لط
حسناً. وهذه هي مناورة
收到。1，G&N：38658，减054，加065，TIG 078 02 0345，加29180，加03779，减01325；滚转NA，俯仰041。PAD的其余部分NA。空高两台喷气发动机，19秒。4 PAD，G&N：38658，减054，加065，TIG 084 29 5059，加31373，加03760，减00968；滚转NA，俯仰034。PAD的其余部分NA。空高两台喷气发动机，19秒。这两个PAD都是用于未对接机动。另
ऐसा लगता है। ऐसा दिखत
Bonjour California Cap Com. Amiti
इसलिए मैं कहता हूं कि यह बहुत कल्पनाशील नहीं है, लेकिन मुझे लगता है
네. 저희는 지난 12시간 동안 안면 보호대를 열고 장갑을 벗은 채로 작업해 왔는데, 대부분 
罗杰。明白吗？14秒，按时燃烧，名义态度，十分之二X，十分之一Y，以及零——减去十分之一Y，以及零Z；你把6.2放上去，燃
好了。把红色滤镜用胶带粘到长焦镜头上。这
Roger, CSQ. Ici Gemini 4. Pourriez-vous me donner des nouvelles? M
Okay. At your convenience we have an item to give you which will have to be copied. It's information on how to photograph Com
L'ordinateur est en phase 
أقوم بتصوير الطقس بشكل عمودي تقريبًا. قيمة الإضاءة 13.5. هذا يعطيني تقريبًا 250 و5.6 (1/250 ثانية وفتحة عدسة f/5.
I just put the wind
Ich bin gerade von der Vorstartphase auf die Nachholphase umgestiegen. Dadurch ging die Computer-LED aus. Mal sehen, ob sie jetzt wieder angeht. Okay. Sie ist wieder an. Jetzt schalten wir den ganzen Computer aus und schauen, was pas
收到。我无法确认飞行计划是否完全按时进行。日落时分，我没有看到约翰报告的、位于
닐, 믿기지 않겠지만,
Okay, Apollo 8. Wir verschieben den Kom
Okay, die PCM-Bitrate ist niedrig. Nach dem Andocken: Es wird angezeigt: Rate, h
Ну, скажу вам честно, я просто обожаю бродить здесь, внутри, туда-сюда, то на одно место, то обратно. Это как на улице, только гораздо к
حسن
わかりました。いい
ジャック、ジムは不快じゃないと言っていました。OMNIの切り替えに関しては少し面倒だと言っていました。それに、
Roger, Jim. Je garde ces documents ouverts jusqu'à ce que vous me donniez d'autres instruction
Ricevuto. L'IVI a poppa, 292; sinistra-destra, 0; su-giù, 100
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। राष्ट्रपति के साथ विदेश मंत्री विलियम रॉजर और फ्रैंक बोरमैन भी होंगे। वे प्रशांत बलों के कमांडर एडमिरल जॉन सिडनी मैक्केन जूनियर के साथ राहत पोत के पुल से जलप्रपात देखेंगे। हॉर्नेट पर कुछ समय बिताने के बाद, राष्ट्रपति एशिया के अपने दौरे और रोमानिया की निर्धारित यात्रा के लिए रवाना होंगे। माना जा रहा है कि लूना 15 कल चंद्रमा के 52 चक्कर लगाने के बाद संकट सागर में गिर गया। सोवियत समाचार एजेंसी TASS ने बताया कि "चंद्रमा के निकट अंतरिक्ष में वैज्ञानिक अनुसंधान किया गया।" जोड्रेल बैंक वेधशाला के सर बर्नार्ड लवेल ने कहा कि लूना 15 लगभग 300 मील प्रति घंटे की गति से चंद्रमा की सतह से टकराया। हाल ही में वियतनाम में अपेक्षाकृत शांति रही है। गश्त पर तैनात सैनिकों को ट्रांजिस्टर रेडियो लिए हुए देखा गया, जिन पर आपकी उड़ान का प्रसारण चल रहा था। वियतनाम में सशस्त्र बलों के रेडियो और टीवी नेटवर्क ने मिशन का पूरा कवरेज किया। स्वेज नहर के किनारे मिस्र और इजरायल के बीच झड़पें अभी भी जारी हैं। वहां मौजूद संयुक्त राष्ट्र के पर्यवेक्षक कार्रवाई को रोकने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। वाशिंगटन में, हाउस वेज़ एंड मीन्स कमेटी ने 27.5 प्रतिशत तेल उपयोग भत्ते को घटाकर 20 प्रतिशत करने के लिए मतदान किया है। ह्यूस्टन क्षेत्र में कई बार बारिश हुई है। आज बादल छाए हुए हैं और और बारिश होने की संभावना है। खेल जगत की बात करें तो, जैसा कि हमने पहले बताया, ऑल स्टार गेम आज रात है। कल कोई मैच नहीं खेला गया। कल रात न्यूयॉर्क में, बेसबॉल राइटर्स एसोसिएशन ऑफ अमेरिका ने बेब रूथ को सर्वकालिक महानतम बेसबॉल खिलाड़ी घोषित किया। जो डिमैगियो को जीवित सर्वश्रेष्ठ बेसबॉल खिलाड़ी का खिताब मिला। खिलाड़ियों के सम्मान में आयोजित रात्रिभोज में फ्रैंक बोरमैन ने ये घोषणाएं कीं। जो नामथ ने न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स के प्रशिक्षण शिविर में पूरा दिन अभ्यास किया। लगभग 500 बच्चे ब्रॉडवे जो को छूना चाहते थे, उन्हें रोकने के लिए पांच पुलिसकर्मियों को काफी मशक्कत करनी पड़ी। उन्होंने कहा कि वह 
好的。第3行，推进剂-推进系统下：备用交会加热器和着陆雷达加热器的断路器将断开。我刚刚更换了天线；继续往下看，ATCA断路器将断开，最后四个断路器（ED下两个，照明
アポロ8号、アポロ8号、ヒューストン。音声ははっきりと聞き取れました。飲料水量の問題を確認したところ、トランスデューサーの問題のようです。飲料水タンクは隔離したままにしておくことをお勧めしま
Фред, ты начинаешь терять форму. Запрос AFT OMNI, OMNI A
프렌드십 세븐
روجر. هذه فريندشيب سفن. أعتقد أن لديّ الآن تشكيلة جيدة
5,6 à - 5,6 à 1/250e est pr
Okay, Jack. Ich habe den Anfang der Vorgehensweise verstanden, wie man diesen Vorgang um
Понял. Всё ясно и поня
Ricevuto. Osserviamo le tue manovre e tra un pa
Es ist unmöglich, irgendetwas durch das MDIU zu leiten. Als Sie versucht haben, es auszuschalten, leuchtete die MA1-Funktionsleuchte wieder auf, und beim Starten – Drü
بعضها يبدو متوهجًا، لكنني لا أعتقد أنه كذلك حقًا؛ إنه مجرد ضوء الشمس. سأحاول التقاط صورة له. إنها رائعة. أعتقد أنها ستتأل
Oui. Bon, les quatre ou cinq premières choses que j'ai sont: panneau BAT CHARGE sur OFF sur le panneau 3; AC INVERTER 2, OFF; panneau 5: MAIN BUS TIE, BAT A/C ON; panneau 2
Apollo 8, si Anders a le temps de nous faire un compte
음, 이것이 지구보다 조금 작다는 것
하와이 통신기술대학교, 하와이 캡콤, 여기는 시
Хорошо. Я включил запись — прокрутите диктофон до начала. У нас довольно много высокочастотного сигн
क्या आप उस पट्टे पर काम
Хорошо. Думаю, мы не очень удачно определились с наземным оп
Apollo 8, we are th
궤도 진입 능력이 있어야 합니다. 
روجر. ٥٠٠٠ متفرق؛ رياح شمالية غربية ١٠؛ ارتفاع الموج ٣ أقدام؛ مقياس الارتفاع ٢٩٨٦؛ نداء قوات الإنقاذ: ناها RESCUE ١، الساعة ٠٢:٥٨ بتوقيت غرينتش؛ ناهي SEARCH ١، الساعة ٠٣:٤٤ بتوقيت غرينتش؛ المدمرة يو إس إ
这些事情开始变得
आगे बढ़ो। ह्यूस्ट
नहीं, मुझे लगता है कि मैं एक आ
네. 피치 바늘이 지금 아주 살짝 올라가 있네요. 원하시
好的，杰克
Dovremmo qualificare questi comput
82. 좋아요. 말씀하세
はい、これが最後に見送った点です。ここで決定を待っている間に、続けましょう。許容範囲とされるデッドバンドは660～770psiです。言い換えれば、この2つの圧力の間の圧力になる立ち上がり時間であれば、103時間後あたりで臨界圧力を下回ることができます。ですから、その範囲内に収まると予想しており、もしそうであれば問題ありません。もし770～800psiの範囲であれば、59時間後に再度圧力を確認してください。詳細な手順は後ほど説明します。もし圧力が800psi以上の場合は、より詳細な手順を検討する必要があります。まず、PCMデータを取得するようにします。ゲージがカチッと音がするタイミングを確かめ、正確な立ち上がり時間を測定するには、しばらくゲージを見つめていただく必要があるかもしれません。極端な場合は、焼けてしまう可能性も考えられますが、実際にはそんなことは起こらないでしょう。さて、もしコピーしていただ
Ok, Fred-o. Ti leggo 5-by. La procedura che ti leggerò è un controllo del Sole per vedere se avremo bisogn
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。你说
C'est pour
منتجنا جيد
Nous traversons Houston au niveau du brasier; c'est entre Houst
Хорошо. Это обращение к Роду Роузу и прихожанам церкви Святого Христофора, да и вообще ко всем людям. Даруй нам, Боже, видение, позволяющее увидеть 
로저. 네, 
Roger. VHF Simplex - eh bien, nous avions ça sur la liste de vérification depuis enviro
रॉजर। 50 मिनट और 18 सेकंड। आपके रेडिएटर का इनपुट तापमान 73 है, रेडिएटर का आउटपुट तापमान 38 है। 
了解です。計器の表示は22%です。ヨーとロールの制御ができず、ヨースラスターも制御不能です。どうやらど
Нет, я просто скажу им, что часть этой подготовки принесла свои плоды. Мы смогл
D'accord. Mike, vous pouvez manœuvrer jusqu'à votre attitude préliminaire comme indiqué à la page 398 du plan de vol, et les angles de gain élevés sont bons comme indiqué dans le plan de vol, et nous aimerions que vous larguiez les eaux usées à 131 05 
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम आपको सलाह देते हैं कि आप अपना द्वितीयक जल वाष्पीकरण यं
روجر، أنت تتراجع. نحن على وشك الوصول إلى المركز الثالث. لا يزال فريق الطيران يفضل أن تفكر في الانتقال إلى المركز الثالث بعد تقييم المر
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Siamo p
카나본
يُخبرك هذا بالمدى - معدل المدى بالدرجة المئوية، وهي الزاوية بين خط رؤية المنظار والأفق، وذل
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. إحدى الفوهات الكبيرة على الجانب الخلفي - لاحظتُ بقعةً صغيرةً داكنةً على الجدار الخارجي، فوجهتُ إليها المنظار. تمكنتُ من رؤية - أوه، منطقة قطرها ربما ربع ميل. كانت حفرةً داكنةً تبدو حدي
Aquarius, Houston. Vorremmo avere AFT OMNI, e perderemo il contatto con voi per circa un minuto mentre cerchiamo di stabilire il tracciamento. E i nostri ultimi 
قاعدة ترانكويليتي، هيوستن. على علامتي، ٢٥ دقيقة حتى الوصول إلى المبنى رقم 
Cosa farò - lasciami ripetere - Okay. Lascia che te lo ripeta tutto. RIPRESSA LA VALVOLA DEL PACCHETTO, chiusa; PRESSIONE DI EMERGENZA CABINA, chiusa; O2 DIRETTO, chiuso; entrambi i REGOLATORI A RICHIESTA, chiusi; entrambi gli ACCUMULATORI DI H2O, ACCUMULATORI DI ACQUA E GLICOLE, chiusi; REGOLATORI PRINCIPALI A e B, aperti; INGRESSO E USCITA DEL SERBATOIO DI ACQUA E GLICOLE, aperti
这是友
ح
Eh bien, ces p
ठीक है। सब
Hey, schau mal aus dem 
好的，
Gemini 4, I did not get your last transmission. I say again, use stars of opportu
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। 
Roger. Wenn Jim am Ende angelangt ist, blinkt der Bildschirm. Wir möchten, dass e
好的。在距离他们发布更新还有不到 2 小时 15 分钟的时候，我假设那是在他们发布更新之前，我做了一个操作。
Die 
Say, listen. Ed hasn't been to sleep yet. He's just about to go to sleep and I think it would be better for him to go to sleep than 
風船は半分膨らんでいます。きつく締まって
रॉजर, जेमि
收到，是的
حسنًا. نود تشغيل مروحة تبريد قبل عملية الحرق. حوالي دقيقة واحدة لكل مر
Houston,
ठीक है, मुझे अपना औजार
11, this
That'
Hawaii, Sigma
لا، هذا هو الفعل رقم 66... أبوجي
أبولو 8، هيوستن مع نتيجة أولية 1. 
客舱压力保持在5.5。客
Okay. Ich bin bei Fehler 23, Schritt 2. Es sieht so aus, als bestünde eine geringe Möglichkeit, dass es zu einem Siedepunkt kommt, aber ich bezweifle es. Daher sollten Sie direkt zu Schritt 4 springe
わかりました、ジャック。ちょっと待ってください。FLIGHT andに1～2分ほどお時間をいただきます。起こ
11, Houston. Abbiamo un prob
네, 잠깐만요. 잠깐만요. 마스터 스위치 켜짐, 인터콤 켜짐, VHF 무전기 켜짐, 패드 통신 꺼짐, S-밴드 켜짐, 그리고 인터콤/푸시 투 토크 모드까지 모두 설정되어 있으니,
الضغط A هو 2000 — الضغط B هو 2650 
177 143 000 NA, plus 00197, 47020 551 46818 12 128.3 257 023, en haut 263, à gauche 17, plus 1195, moins 16500, plus 126 23 35608, cap au nord, roulis 68, tangage 97, lacet 356, pas de remplissage, grande vitesse,
نعم. نعم سيد
Wir werden mit 44 Prozent Treibstoffmenge bereitst
Houston, the guys that said that we wouldn't be able to tell precisely where we are are the winners today. We were a little busy worrying about program alarms and things like that in the part of the descent where we would normally be picking out our landing spot; and aside 
네, 배경에 약간의 잡음이
シグマセブンです。ちょっと二重権威になってしまいました。ドリフト中に手動プロポーショナルに飽きてしまい、レートコマンドスイッチを
Oui, 
Roger, 
아니요. 그는 원하지 않았어요. 자, 얘들아,
Вид Луны, который мы наблюдаем в последнее время, просто потрясающий. Она занимает примерно три четверти иллюминатора, и, конечно же, мы видим всю её окружность, хотя часть её находится в полной те
这里应该能看到
शुरुआत में, एक और बचाव पैंतरेबाज़ी के कारण, निर्धारित समय पर हमारी अवलोकन प्रक्रिया तुरंत शुरू नहीं हो सकी। इस प्रक्रिया के कारण क्षेत्र में बड़ी मात्रा में नकली तारे बन गए, जिससे ऑप्टिक्स कैलिब्रेशन लगभग असंभव हो गया। हमने जो तरीका विकसित किया था, वह भी कारगर नहीं रहा। अंततः मैंने जो तरीका अपनाया, वह था सीरियस तारे तक जाना, जो हमारा सबसे चमकीला तारा था, वहाँ से शाफ्ट और ट्रनियन प्राप्त करना, और फिर अंतरिक्ष यान को सीरियस तक ले जाना ताकि उसका उपयोग ऑप्टिक्स के लिए किया जा सके, जो हमने बाद में किया। प्रकाश प्रकीर्णन के संबंध में, ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि हमारे निष्क्रिय तापीय नियंत्रण के दौरान लगभग किसी भी स्थिति में, स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में प्रकाश प्रकीर्णन हो रहा है। यह मुख्य रूप से स्कोप के केंद्र के ठीक पार शून्य से लगभग 10 डिग्री दोनों दिशाओं में प्रकाश की एक चौड़ी पट्टी के रूप में दिखाई देता है। इस क्षेत्र में तारों को देखना बहुत मुश्किल है। पुनः संरेखण सफल रहे हैं। मैंने सेक्स्टेंट में तारे को देखकर संरेखण तो कर लिया, लेकिन स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में रेगोर या
Да. Он будет находиться примерно на терминаторе REV 20, поэтому сфотографировать его вы сможете только на позднем этапе вашей работы на лунной орб
حسنًا، أرسلها. ستندهش عندما تعلم أن القمر غير مرئي الآن. الأفق واضح تمامًا من موقعي الحالي، عند الدقيقة 00:54:44. أعتقد أن الأفق على الجانب المظ
Sì. Ma non so perché stiamo ottenendo quella velocità di spinta lì, forse... stiamo
然后，请您将相机贴在窗户上，并确保相机镜头不进入视野。接下来，我们需要两组照片。请您将相机设置为脉冲模式，并将相机镜头垂直向下对准地球。我会给您一些时间启动相机。相机镜头会对准夜侧的黑色地球。然后，请进行一次脉冲向上拍摄，并使用相机快门处于B门模式拍摄一张照片。当相机升至地平线以上时，请进行一次脉冲向下拍摄
わかりました。OMNI を切り替えるだけです。わかりました。ジョー、1 ～ 4 ページの変更点を読んでみると、燃料電池ヒーター 3 がオフで、燃料電池 1 メイン バス A の中央に下りてきて、メイン バス A をオフにします。メイン バス - 燃料電池 2 をメイン バス A にオフにします。燃料電池 3 をメイン バス A にトークバック グレーにします。メイン バス A リセットをオフにします。燃料電池
잭, 가능하면 한 시간
هذا صحيح. حسنًا. التالي. الوضع - عند - عندما تستقر على الوضعية المطلوبة، اضغط على زر MODE CONTROL AUTO. أدخل المفتاح لمراقبة المعدلات؛ عندما تكون أقل من 0.1 درجة في الثانية، قم بمراقبة المعدل في كل محور، ثم قم بتعطيل محركات الدفع الإضافية على المحور X. حسنًا. التالي، اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ 1257، اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ 252، اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ 1، اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ أدخل DAR 22110 وتابع؛ اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ ثم راقب المعدلات. عندما تكون المعدلات أقل من 0.01 درجة في الثانية في جميع المحاور، اضغط على
分かりました。アセンション島上空での地上移動中に、ケープ・ケープ・コマンダーとヒ
Я думал, свет погаснет. Черт, напряжение сильно падает
飛行機に乗った
К нашему сведению, мы снова следили за уровнем PCO2. Вы сегодня утром меняли баллон с гидроксидом лити
D'accord. Radioactivité: CDR 11009, C
Vedo una stella luminosa lassù, dev'essere Venere. Ho dimenticato di memorizzare le immagini di John Mayer dalla finestra abbastanza bene da p
继续。如果在燃烧过程中发动机停止运转，并且NOUN 97闪烁，你应该先执行PROCEED指令，然后执行ullage指令，接着执行ENGINE START指令，再执行PESH指令，最后执行DESCENT E
看起来即使在断电状态下（字迹模糊），我们仍然消耗着略低于11安培的电流。1号机组是10安培，2号机组略低于11安培。系绳——或者说系绳或脐带式约束装置在外部舱门的位置——使得在航天器前方进行任何舱外活动（EVA）都相当困难，尤其是在自由系绳空气动力学方面。每当我在那片区域操作时，系绳末端
Да, в Далласе плачут. Ре
ठीक है। टॉमी जैकब्स के बाद, हमारे पास ह्यूस्टन की एक स्थानीय ज्योतिषी रूबी ग्राहम की ओर से एक बेहद महत्वपूर्ण खबर है। उनका कहना है कि चंद्रमा की यात्रा के लिए सभी राशियाँ अनुकूल हैं। नील चतुर है, माइक का निर्णय लेने की क्षमता अच्छी है, और बज़ जटिल समस्याओं को सुलझाने में माहिर है। उनका यह भी कहना है कि नील दुनिया को गुलाबी चश्मे से देखने की प्रवृत्ति रखता है, लेकिन वह हमेशा पीड़ित या परेशान लोगों की मदद करने के लिए तैयार रहता है। नील, आपके पास "अंतर्ज्ञान है जो आपको जीवन को भावनाओं के साथ समझने में सक्षम बनाता है।" बज़ बहुत मिलनसार है और अकेले रहना बर्दाश्त नहीं कर सकता, साथ ही उसमें उत्कृष्ट आलोचनात्मक क्षमता भी है। चूंकि उन्हें माइक के जन्म का समय नहीं पता था, इसलिए उन्होंने अनुमान लगाया कि या तो उसमें नील जैसे ही गुण हैं या वह एक अपरंपरागत दृष्टिकोण वाला आविष्कारशील व्यक्ति है जो कल्पनाहीन लोगों को सनकी लग सकता है। और आज के लिए बस इतना ही। सम
はい、簡単です。既に指示が出ているようですので、機動と姿勢保持の指示を使ってくだ
Cela n'inclut p
Okay. Panel 3: BATTERY CHARGE, OFF - you've already done that, Jack - next AC INVERTER, Panel 5: MAIN
وفي الجزء الأيمن من شاشتنا الآن، 
G
لا يمكننا رؤية أي ضوء أرضي أو أي معالم سطحية على الإطلاق في ضوء الأرض الآن، وذلك لأن الشمس ساطعة للغاية وتتسبب في انقباض حدقة العين. إنه لمنظر رائع حقًا رؤية خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار عند النظر على طول حافته. أعتقد أنك ستوافقني الرأي بأن بعض هذه الفوهات التي تراها في الصورة الآن تبرز بشكل واضح بسبب امتداد الظلال كلما اقتربت من خط
حسنًا، هذا يثير غضبي. اختفت كاميرا هاسلبلاد. ابحثوا عن تلك الأم قبل أن تُنهي هي أو أنا... ابحثوا جميعًا عن كاميرا هاسلبلاد عائمة. أ
Wir gehen davon aus, dass Ihr Wasserverbrauch sinken wird und DELTA in Kürze auf 160–165 St
정말 좋은 거
أبولو 8. ها نحن ذا في مناورة تحليق. ستكون هذه / 63087، -162، +129، +009 62، +005 68، -020 77 000 000 000، نوفمبر ألفا، +00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013 لأعلى 048 يمين 37، +1418، -16500 129 04 361 60. نجم الشمال 323 090 056، لا يوجد فراغ. ملاحظات: أولاً، يتطلب هذا إعادة توجيه 
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आपने हमें यॉ, पिच और
Роджер. ПАД. TIG из 1
حسناً. لقد دفعت للخلف - دفعت للخلف قليلاً نحوها يا تشارلي، وأن
Columbia, Houston
Roger. Und
阿波罗13号
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ。T3までカウントダウン中。ハックを教えていただけるなら、イベントタイマーを設
Roger, Buzz. Das klingt nach einer guten Idee für eure Vermessungsarbeiten im Co
それは肯定的なので、私に
了解しました。エバポレーターのようです。エバポレーターは正常に動作しているようです。
Cela me donne un tout petit peu de 
И мы отключили AC
프레드, 데이터는 충분합니다. 잭에게 턴테이블 모터를 분리하고 그의 백아웃 절차에 따라 전원을 다시 끄도록 권장합니다. 잭이 그렇게 하면 
罗杰，休斯顿。我们今天的计划是从太空飞船“奥德赛号”开始，带您穿过隧道进入“水瓶座号”。我们会向您展示一下着陆器，现在您的电视操作员正躺在中央沙发上，看着弗雷德·海斯
Настоящий цирк. У меня идёт продувка топливного элемента, я пытаюсь установить камеры и кронштейны, наблю
Хорошо. Согласно данным, в настоящее время перигей в вакууме составляет 23,6 градуса, а угол траектории полета — минус 6,25 градуса
いいえ、ヒューストン
Roger. I see things coming up now. Jerry, we're going to get the block data around, and we'll do alignment around and then we'll go into ci
Ok, i r
Yes, that's sure - the way that
Abbiamo iniziato a fornirti alcuni tempi. Pensiamo di poterti fornire valori migliori 
Понял. Я нахожусь в орбитальном режиме и отлично
Ok, Jim. Solo una sorta di introduzione alla procedura che useremo per la fase intermedia, che sarà un'accensione manuale. L'assetto sarà controllato manualmente; l'avvio/arresto del motore sarà controllato manualmente. Quindi ora abbiamo un vettore piuttosto preciso su di te, e a quanto pare stai procedendo in modo un po' troppo superficiale. Ciò significa che dovremo accelerare un po' di più e procederemo 
शायद न
Questo porta il punteg
Houston, n'hésitez pas à nous prévenir si l'horaire risque d'être encore reporté, car nou
रॉजर, समझ गया। मेरे पास तुम्हारा अपोलो लैंडमार्क रन वन है। कॉपी कर
मैं भी यही पढ़ रहा हूँ। AO
D'accord, très bien. J'ai la liste des documents 
Ok. Sembra un'ottima idea. Inoltre, mentre aspetti che il veicolo si stabilizzi, potrebbe essere in
حسنًا يا جو. بخصوص الأخبار، يرغب جيم في تأجيل ذلك قليلًا، وأريد أن أطلب من منظمة الأغذية والزراعة، إذا كان بإمكانه في وقت ما خلال اليوم، عندما نتلقى تحديثًا لخطة الرحلة مع تلك الأنشطة التي اتفقنا على جعلها اختيارية أثناء الدوران حول القمر والأنشطة القليلة التي كنا سنحذفها، أعتقد أنني نسيت وتركت تلك البطاقة م
I've a very dim source
わかりました、ジム。最
Un aggeggio d
アポロ8
さあ、アクエリアス
조, 있잖아, 무슨 말이냐면, 앞
分かりました。ゲインを高く設定してもらいます。バックグラウンドで聞こえるのはおそらくグリコールポンプの音だと思いますが、電源を入れるところまで来ました。ここで数分間待つか、それともIMUの電源を入れた方
罗杰。我们这里有两个齿轮，拉动把手来回转动时它们会跟着转。其中一个齿轮有点像棘轮，它是个带活塞的小圆筒，后面有个尖头，用来啮合棘轮。在打开舱门之前，我们遇到了一些麻烦，打开之后
र
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 페리신시온 궤도 진입 2시간 후(PAD 기준). G&N: 62710, +0.98, -0.19, 점화 077 46 2248, DELTA-VX, +32148, -0.0455
और इसके बदले में, सर्जन यह जानना चाहेंगे कि आपमें से प्रत्येक ने लगभग कितने घंटे की नींद
रॉजर। मुझे अभी भी एक P76 पैड चाहिए, और आपकी सुविधानुसार कभी भी ए
110... 이상
الجوزاء، ا
Похож
Roger. 1, /: 62844 减 161，加 129，减 29840，加 02390，加 01053 000 200 005 01693，加 00600 29954 402 29788 01 0688 259，英仙座ζ星，下 048，左 05；天狼星，参宿七，129 155 010：无空隙，地平线 2 分 4
了解しました、ジム。もし君が必要になったら、クルー
컴퓨터는 우리 거예요. 지금 BLOC
Roger. A Washington, la Commissione Finanze del Senato ha approvato l'estensione della sovrattassa sull'imposta sul reddito, ma un voto del Senato sul disegno di legge sembrava al momento remoto. Ad Austin, il deputato statale Ray Lemmon di Houston è stato nominato Direttore Nazionale dell'American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon ha proposto uno studio sulla possibilità di istituire un istituto di oceanografia in Texas. Sarebbe il primo istituto del genere nella parte occidentale del Golfo del Messico. A Minneapolis, Minnesota, l'ufficio meteorologico, dopo aver riepilogato le previsioni meteo odierne con una massima di 88 e una minima di 72, ha annotato "nevicate: nessuna". Da St. Petersburg, Florida, arriva un rapporto radio dell'esploratore norvegese Thor Heyerdahl, che afferma che l'equipaggio della sua barca di papiro, la Ra, navigherà verso Bridgetown, Barbados, nonostante i danni causati dal mare grosso. L'equipaggio, tuttavia, dormirà su una nave di scorta. Norman Baker, navigatore della spedizione, ha affermato che l'equipaggio era oggi a bordo della
Friendship Seven, this is Indiana Cap
Роджер, Спокойствие. Перерыв. Колумбия, мы хоте
D'accord. Zone de manœuvre: objectif: milieu de parcours 5,,, est N/A, HA est N/A, périgée, plus 0019,8, 0,007,8, 0,15, le reste est N/A. Coupez le moteur 1 seconde avant la fin de la combustion. Arrêtez-le manuellement à 14 secondes. L'injection est de quatre gicleurs pendant 10 secondes, à 10 % de la 
好的，弗雷德。请注意，只有LMP的红色软管实际连接到了集尘袋上。在这种情况下，请按照以下步骤将另一根红色软管插入另一
ر
Хоро
Мы хотим передать часть мощности — я хочу сначала 
फिर से कहो। सम
Yes, indeed. We are crowded. We have most of that junk down in o
Oui, je suppose. Il va falloir gérer le débit de carburant de manière intermittente, car si je fais une manœuvre brusque, je dois piquer de 80 degrés, puis arrêter complètement le tangage, ou presque, sauf pour le débit de carburant. Ça va gasp
データポイント10 4.8、126.65、1
Хорошо. Позвольте мне поделиться своими наблюдениями по главной шине B. События развивались довольно быстро, и сначала мы услышали удар, взрыв или что-то ещё, я не уверен. Затем, примерно через секунду, сработала главная сигнализация, указывающая на пониженное напряжение на главной шине B. Я проверил напряжение, и в этот момент оно было в норме, поэтому я подозреваю, что это был скачок. Топливный элемент 3 тоже работал исправно, с хорошим потоком. Однако в этот момент Фред зашёл в командный модуль и сел на своё место. Вскоре после этого загорелся индикатор AC BUS 2. Он посмотрел на главную шину B, и показания на ней были нулевыми. Однако потоки в топливных элементах также были нулевыми. Я подозреваю, что, возможно, у нас всё-таки есть главная шина B. Но это всего лишь предп
마지막으로 확인했을 때, 어떤 
ラインはまだ張っていま
Roger
- - 00166에서 00022를 뺀 값
OK, on ​​eff
罗杰。休斯顿那边有副本，我
J'ai plein 
You must have just wiped your mouth, Jim. Di
I'm staying i
Das ist richtig. Das Rück
Roger, Canary. Mon état est bon; l'état de la capsule est bon; mon mode de pilotage est automatique; les gyroscopes fonctionnent normalement; manœuvre désactivée. Carburant: 51-68 %, oxygène: 85-100 %. La température de la vapeur de la cabine remonte et af
D'accord, Mike. Bien sûr, ceci est prévu pour le cas où le système de guidage et de neutralisation tombe en panne et que vous deviez voler à facteur de charge constant. Notre objectif est d'étendre la plage de facteur de charge constant de 1100 à 1500 miles. Nous avons testé cette procédure sur simulateur et elle fonctionne parfaitement. Je vais vous l'expliquer brièvement, et si vous avez des questions, n'hésitez pas à revenir. Le principe est le même: le vecteur de portance monte jusqu'au facteur de charge maximal, puis descend, et enfin on module le vecteur de portance jusqu'à ce que le point g atteigne zéro. La procédure reste globalement la même jusqu'ici. Ensuite, maintenez le point g à zéro jusqu'à ce que le temps de rétrogradation de la rotation V soit écoulé. Une fois ce temps écoulé, inclinez l'avion à un angle de 45 degrés et maintenez cet angle constant jusqu'à
罗杰。或许在你看来，我们这次登月之旅看似简单轻松。但我可以向你保证，事实并非如此。将我们送入轨道的土星五号火箭是一台极其复杂的机器，每一个部件都运转得完美无瑕。我头顶上的这台计算机拥有38000个词汇，每个词汇都经过精心挑选，对我们宇航员来说至关重要。我手中的这个开关，仅在指令舱内就有超过300个相同的开关，而
You said not applicable for and; I started to copy it down,
Hauptrutsche bei 12+3
알겠습니다. 말씀하신 내용을 
Раньше считалось, что на уровне LOI 2 невозможно контролировать ситуацию; что любой жест, любое поведение
로저, 닐. 알겠습니다. 닐이 저기 있는 벨크로 매트를 확인하려는 것 
روجر، جيم. لدي سؤال واحد - لقد تحدثنا عن فحص نظام التعليق. هل تفضل ا
Ok, Fred. Dato che hai usato il contenitore della condensa, abbiamo la procedura per utilizzarlo. Non te la leggerò, ma ti avverto un po' di non agitarlo troppo o di non riempirlo troppo, perché temono che in tal caso la valvola di sfi
Ich kann nicht herausfinden, wie man merkt, wann einer weg ist. Ich glaube, das war'
हम चाहते हैं कि आपके रिकॉर्डर 
Хорошо. У нас здесь три камеры, две из них для фотосъемки из окна №5, а одна — из окна №5. Сначала я 
好的。我们需要您按回车键，输入 333，再按回车键，然后读取寄存器 1 的值。我们预期寄存器 1 的值是 10000。如果寄存器 1 的值是 10000，那么计算机将对可擦除内存进行两次转储。也就是说，要转储 10000 个数字，两次，即 10000 个数字。如果读取的值不是 10000，我们需要您按回车键，输入 333，再按回车键，输入 10000，再按回车键，使其读取 10000。完成上述操作后，转储命令是回车键，这将
ठीक है। अब चरण 3,
روجر. الأمور تسير على ما يرام، وإعداد الآلة مستق
E, Acquario, giusto per farti riflettere in quella direzione, abbiamo condotto un'analisi piuttosto approfondita e abbiamo scoperto che sarà più economico tenere il e il su e spegnere l'inverter e la sfera. Ci farà risparmiare 1 amp
Die Temperaturen der Oxidator- und Brennstoffzuleitungen liegen bei 75 Grad und bleiben konstant. Die Temperaturen des Servicemodul-Quad-Packages schwanken zwischen 120 und 140 Grad, und es sieht so aus, als ob die Heizung normal funktioniert. Wir pl
Хорошо. Давайте я уточню. Мы вызываем номер, и на мигающем 0406 мы вводим 3, что приводит нас к ми
No, va bene. Una cosa interessante, però, è che l'ultima volta che hai scaricato l'acqua, hanno notato un cambiamento
D
로저: 발판을 내리는 중인데, 소리는 안 들리네요. 진동만 느껴져
好的，杰克。我们有中段5：NOUN 33,;, N/A; HA N/A; 加上 0019.8, 0007.8，燃烧时间 0.15，其余部分，N/A
حسناً. لقد تجاوز الحد المسموح به للتحذير، ودخل في ن
Apollo 8, i
Je ne peux pas l'entendr
Non, n
後ろでスラスターが作動しているの
ACQ एड बीकन 13:42 बज
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich bin momentan auf Kurzwelle (HF). Ich wechsle auf UHF, sobald wir eine stab
Хорошо. Это о
了解しました。コアチューブに詰まった状態で湿っていたという全体的な印象は理解できました。次の質問です。この地域の概要説明の前に、ご意見をコピーさせていただきました。この地域の地質の概要について、より詳しい説明や詳細な説明をご希望でしたら、お二人からお願いいたしま
에드는 지금 대부분의 장비를 가지고 있어요. 저는 총, 카메라
매우 좋은...
あっ。もうすぐ再突入姿勢にピッチアップします。今のところグローブボックスを開けておく必要はありません。標準光源を入手する必要があるのですが、入手で
Roger. Questo è Friendship Seven, controllo manuale tramite fly-by-wire, senza problemi di controllo. Molto fluido e facile; i comandi sono molto buoni. I fusibili sono ancora gli stessi sul pannello di sinistra. Squib è armato. Il Retrojet automatico è disattivato. È fly-by-wire, automatico, il giroscopio è normale. Tutto il carburante, tutte le manopole a "T" sono inserite, il Ret
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8... снова. Как в
알겠습니다. "후속 조치"도 잊어버리셔도 됩니다. 17페이지에서 모든 항목을 입력하고 4분 후에 변경 사항이 있습니다. 첫 번째 줄, CB(16) INVERTER 3, CLOSE; 두 번째 줄, "Select INVERTER 1"을 
Роджер. У вас есть несколько углов тангажа и рыскания для нашего дополнительно
Je ne sais pa
Columbia, Houston. I can give you some REACQ angles for the high gain on the jettison attitude. Then y
알겠습니다. 예비 샘플 채취는 완료됐
제 생각엔 그
बैटरी सी पावर एंट्री और पोस्टलैंडिंग बं
Okay, e... Ehi, noi... registreremo tutto, e immaginiamo che tu possa sistemare la sonda e il farmaco nel...
اختبار أضواء التسلسل -- كهرماني -- 
This is Texas Cap Com, Friendship Seven. We a
ठीक है.: 2 प्लस 26 प्लस 05, 179, 108, 000, 5 प्लस 47, 10416.9, 35587, 358, 139, 320, 302, 319, 040, और निष्कासन समय, 4 प्लस 01 प्लस
알겠습니다. 한번 시도해 보고, RAD OUT 온도가 너무
حسنًا. لقد كنا نعمل مع فتح واقي الوجه وخلع القفازات طوال الاثنتي عشرة ساعة الماضية تقر
Apollo 8, Houston. Sei perfetto per la messa in scena
罗杰。我们的第一个控制点非常靠近晨昏线，当光学系统跟踪它时，我有机会看到太阳升起。大约在日出前两分钟，你会看到——月牙边缘开始变得明亮，变成一层
Natch. Cabin temperature — 92. Suit temperature — 58. Cabin pressure is 5.6. Suit CO2 is 3/4. Left bottle is 5100. Rig
Columbia, this is Houston. While I'm talking to you, will be 
... Ich hab's verstanden, dank
Hier spricht Friendship Seven, wir senden im Blindflug. Hinter mir ging die Sonne im Periskop auf. Im Periskop war sie strahlend rot, als sie sich dem Horizont näherte und aufging. Und genau in dem Moment – ​​als ich wieder aus dem Fenster schaute – sah ich buchstäblich Tausende kleiner, leuchtender Partikel um die Kapsel wirbeln, die sich mit etwa fünf bis acht Kilometern pro Stunde von mir entfernten. Jetzt, im hellen Sonnenlicht, scheinen sie verschwunden zu sein. Es 
Apollo 8, Houston. Falls wir diese Zwischenlandung nicht schaffen, werden wir trotzdem versuc
— Хорошо. Аристарх находится под углом 9 эх
Oui, la
سيتم وضع أكمام بدلة إد والملابس السميكة الإضافية التي أرتديها على إحد
Верно, командир, управлять пушкой очень легко. Единственная проблема в том, что у меня не хватает топлива. Сейчас топливо закончилось, но я смог маневрировать вокруг передней части космического корабля, назад и подлететь прямо к верхней части адаптера. Чуть-чуть... вернулся в поле зрения Джима. Единственное, чего мне не хватает, это топлива. Это самый лучший опыт в моей жизни... просто потрясающе! Сейчас я стою на голове и смотрю прямо вниз, и кажется, что мы приближаемся к побережью Калифорнии. Я медленно вращаюсь вправо. Абсолютно никакой дезориента
Negative. I'm in auto reentry at
रॉजर। समझ गया; पैंतरेबाजी
لن نحتاج 
Ricevuto. Conferma di avere il controllo della spi
好的。明白了。将 R-6 上的驾驶室快速断开接头安装到 251 尿液连接器上，并确认排污阀已关闭，然后再
ヒューストン、今読んでます
«Дружба Семь». Принято. Все предохранители на переключателях по-прежнему в том же положении. Пирогенератор активирован. Автоматическая система реверсивного торможения выключена. Селектор режимо
스포츠 소식을 살펴볼까요? 여러분이 바쁘셨던 며칠 전, 조 네이머스와 미식축구 커미셔너 피트 로젤은 "브로드웨이 조" 네이머스가 자신이 소유한 배첼러스 III 레스토랑 지분을 매각하고 뉴욕 제츠에 합류하기로 합의했다고 발표했습니다. 네이머스는 오늘 제츠 훈련 캠프에 도착해 첫 훈련을 소화했습니다. 네이머스와 함께 훈련에 불참했던 다른 제츠 선수들도 합류했습니다. 그리고 미시간주 잭슨 출신의 데이비 힐은 지난주에 출전한 세 번의 메이저 대회에서 모두 우승을 차지하며 세 번째 메이저 골프 대회 우승이라는 쾌거를 달성했습니다. 그는 필라델피아 클래식에서 우승을 거머쥐었습니다. 힐은 올해 벌써 네 번의 메이저 대회 우승을 기록하며 총상금 12만 9천 달러로 시즌 선두를 달리고 있습니다. 야구에서는 내셔널리그 서부 지구의 치열한 경쟁이 계속되고 있습니다. LA 다저스와 샌프란시스코 자이언츠는 선두 애틀랜타 휴스턴에 한 경기 차로 뒤쳐져 있습니다. 휴스턴은 48승 48패로 현재 5위에 올라 있으며, 선두와는 7경기 차입니다. 어젯밤 예정됐던 휴스턴과 신시내티 레즈의 더블헤더 경기는 비로 인해 연기되었습니다. 시카고 컵스는 여전히 동부 지구 1위를 유지하고 있습니다. 뉴욕 메츠와의 격차는 4.5경기입니다. 아메리칸 
そして、アクエリアスさん、シミュレーターでのテストでは、あなたが自分の態
Хорошо. Я так понимаю, вам
Friendship
Nessuna delle nostre tute ha il misuratore di pressione sanguigna - il
はい。既に37 06という数字が表示されていると思います。もし表示されているなら、ENTERキーを押してください。すると、スタンバイ要求のコード00062が表示されます。その
Roger. Nota che stai iniziando con la tua, che è l'ultima attività programmata. Il tracciamento iniziale sembra indicare che la velocità iniziale a metà rotta potrebbe essere inferiore a 4 piedi al secondo, 
هذا صح
Apollo 8, Houston. Ricevuto. Capito. 5C e 5D so
Kein Problem. Ich mach nur 
Мы готовы прямо сейчас. Мы этим заним
네. 물론이죠, 저희가 하려는 게 바로 그거예요.
Ok. Vorrei solo chiarire una cosa sulla rampa SEP. Mi sembra che nella mia configurazione, potrei probabilmente usare un carico a 622, imbardata, beccheggio e rollio, in quest'ordine; e poi essere in gra
ठीक है। हम उस खरगोश वाल
Okay. Blunt-end-forwar
Correzione sul secondo: 2
휴스턴, 지금 저는 정렬 작업을 할 예정입니다.
了解。バッテリー電圧：メインが24、ナンバー1が25、ナンバー2が25、ナンバー3が25。スタンバイ1が25、スタンバイ2が25、分離が2
There seems to be a move on in Rome to make Pope John XXIII a saint. Even 
好了，万斯，如果你
Roger. I valori della batteria dell'adattatore sono arrivati. Tutti segnano 24, da 1-A a 1-C in tensione. Gli 
حسنًا يا با
Roger. La Terre est là aussi;
Roger. Es ist jetzt etwas dunkel, 11. Vi
你是否关闭了11号面板上的S&C发动机控制断路
Roger. You look good down 
Okay. Ready to copy 
أفهم أنهم يقدرون نقطة الحضيض القمري لديك - نقطة
E cancella il blocco in basso su quella metà della pagina che dice "percentuale di caricatori richiesta 
Перемещать вещи, конечно, легко, правда? А вот этот восьмифунтовы
स्
로저, 나도 당신 말을
짐, 세 가지 말씀드릴 게 있어요. 첫째, 컴퓨터는 이제 다시 당신 거예요. 둘째, 지금부터 데이터 전송 완료 전까지는 아무런 조작도 필요 없으니, 그냥 데이터 전송 모드로 가만히
आप
Хорошо. Да, всё верно. Значит, нам нужно заклеить скотчем половину — и синий, и кр
ठीक है। आप बहुत अच्छे लग रहे ह
짐이 어디서 자는지 궁금해하시는 분들을 위해 말씀드리자면, 지금은 해치가 열려 있어서 해먹을 설치하기가 좀 어렵습니다. 짐의 해먹은 앞뒤 방향으로 길게 
Okay. Ihre Batterien hatten folgende Kapazitäten: Batterie A mit 39,32 Amperestunden, Batterie B mit 35,21 und Batterie C mit 38,46 Amperestunden. Die verbleibenden Kryomengen sind unverändert: 180 Pfund Sauerstoff und 11 Pfund Wasserstoff pro Tank. Laut den aktuellen Berechnungen des Servicemoduls haben Quad-A 45 %, Bravo 50 %, Charlie 58 % und Delta 48 % ihrer Kapazität. Wir planen, die Sekundärtanks bei 37 % tatsächlicher Füllmenge zu aktivieren. Im Falle eines Kommunikationsausfalls oder Ähnlichem empfehlen wir, die Sekundärtreibstoffe bei
弗兰克和吉
はい。50%を少し超えたくらいです。このまま作業を続けますが、寒すぎるようでしたらご連絡
Reprenez à 
C'est ce q
네, 알겠습니
Sui nostri computer di terra confermiamo che l'angolo di inclinazione e di inclinazione che avete indicato è rivolto verso la stella. Tuttavia, sembra che quell'angolo di inclinazione e di inclinazione sia rivolto anche verso la struttura della stella, qui
Nur die mittlere Ableitung. Ich hole die richtige Bezeichnung vom Arzt.
Das ist die nicht-antreibende Entlüftungsöff
Apollo 8, Houston. Ihre Daten sehen sehr gut aus. Es geht nur noch 
Okay. Non farli aspettare troppo a lungo. Voglio essere salvato in fretta. Di' al Dottor Berry che abbiamo la pressione alt
Roger. Lecture à rebours 8-C. ΔV 166. 3+35. 01 02 06 51. Dites le
Ok. Credo che l'attrezzatura di cui avrai bisogno saranno due bombolette di idrossido di litio del modulo di comando, un rotolo di nastro adesivo grigio, le due s, perché us
D'accord, Houston. C'est 39,2 v
Très bien. Je vais 
Apollo 11, Hous
了解。同じ内容ですね。
Нил, посмотри на Y-образную распорку с отрицательным направлением, направление движения там *** 
16 m
مرحباً يا برمودا، مرحباً يا برمودا يا كابكوم. سفينة الصداقة السابعة تسمعك بوضوح. مرحباً يا برمودا،
Роджер, Хьюстон. Сегодня мы планируем начать с космического корабля «Одиссея» и провести вас оттуда через туннель в «Аквариус». Мы покажем вам немного посадочного модуля, а ваш телеоператор сейчас отдыхает на центральном диване, глядя на Фреда Хейза, голова которого находится почти в начале туннеля, а спина прижата к оптической зоне нижнего отсека обор
This is Friendship Seven. I believe so. I have Foxtrot co
Хорошо. 
Sono Typhoid Jack, e abbiamo delle belle parole che abbiamo scritto a Cape Cod insieme a un gruppo di
Ich sehe, wie sich Dinge lösen, aber ich kann sie nicht genau erkennen. Da sind wir bei 0,05, grün. Ich lasse die Steuerung jetzt laufen. Rate Command, Aux-Dämpfung
还有你
Und es scheint, dass Resolve Medium eine sehr gute Kombina
— On va probablement avoir une sou
아니요, 우주선 내부 어디에서도 습
OK, panneau 16, rangée du haut, AFFICHAGES DE VOL: POINTEUR CROISÉ DE L'INGÉNIEUR SYSTÈME, OUVERT; TCA SYSTÈMES 1 à 4, tous FERMÉS. Deuxième rangée, ÉCLAIRAGE: PROJECTEURS (probablement ouverts); ALIMENTATION LOGIQUE B, OUVERT; CONTRÔLE DU FLUX DE COMBINAISON, OUVERT. Sous COMMUNICATIONS: AFFICHAGE, OUVERT; ÉMETTEUR V
روجر. نظامي هو 6. القبة
Circa mezzanotte nella città
Okay. Thank 
Roger. E qual è stata la sequenza relativa nella selezione del separatore d'acqua nume
了解。IVIの報道をもう一度見せて
로저. 027
Il est sorti, Gus,
Okay. meno 00489 più 00000 più 47250 177 144 000, non applicabile, più 00197 47253 554 47050 12 1278 256 023, su 265, a 
Roger, Gemini 4. Guaymas SIR JOHN fuor
この岩塊は、最終降下時に通過した、この大きくて鋭い縁を持つ岩のリムクレーターに起源を持つのではないかと考えています。昨日、私はそれがフットボール競技場ほどの大きさだと言いましたが、実際、近づくにつれて測るのが少し難しくなりました。しかし、私たちが通り過ぎた時には、アストロドームにちょうど収まるだろうと思いました。そして、この岩のリムクレーター付近の岩は、この地域の岩よりもはるかに大きく、中には10フィートほど、あるいはそれ以上の大きさの岩もあり、クレーターの縁からクレーターの直径ほどの範囲まで非常に密集しています。それを超えると、岩塊はいくらか減少しており、この地域でも岩塊は不規則なパターンで列をなしているように見えます。そして、岩塊と岩塊の間には、硬い岩の表面
Come 
Близнецы 4,
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。完毕
Loud and clear. I was just che
माइक, लैंडिंग साइट पर बहुत सारी चीज़ें हैं। इन्हें देखकर जैक श्मिट का दिल खुश हो जाएगा
Roger. Nur zur Info: Wir haben dich hinter uns gelass
आगे बढ़ो, आगे बढ़ो, आगे बढ़ो, आगे
Roger. Das hast du verstanden, das ist also die letzte Entlüftung und die Entlüftung
よし。まずまずだ。
L'autre aviateur qui fait le tour du monde, Max Conrad, avec son avion léger – il a passé Noël en Antarctique, à Puerto Aranes au Chili – attend des conditions météorologiques favorables pour poursuivre son vol vers le pôle Sud. Il espère ainsi boucler le tour du mo
알겠습니
我
没错，这
На показания компаса слишком сильно влияют расположенные за ним приборы определения положения в пространс
Roger, 13 anni. Lo vediamo. 
That's affirmative. Our first stick course was 007 forward, 005 left, and 0
And 
Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Мы не хотим, чтобы вы перед
वो नील था। ये बज़ है। काश पता चल पाता कि मेरे लॉन की कटाई आखिरी बार कब हुई
Вы пон
Attends Buzz. Ça a l'air plutôt bien, d'après ce que je vois. On a la ligne de convergence tropicale là-bas. Il y a quelques nuages ​​sur la carte m
Apollo 8, Houston. Avanti
Braccio auto-ret
객실 설정은 완료됐고, 더 이상 돔을 내릴 필요는 없겠네요. 아주 좋습니다. 시간 점검 결과 18분 남았네요. 시간도 맞습니다. 스러스터 - 좌측 롤 자동 119도, 우측 롤 자동 115도, 좌측 롤 수동 100도. 객실 열교환기 온도는 43도입니다. 피치 업 자동 95도, 피치 다운 자동 95도, 요 좌측 자동 80도, 요 우측 
分かりました。あなたは静かにしているつもり
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 8। हमने अभी-अभी कैनिस्टर बदलने का काम पूर
好的，乔。氧气流量高指示灯又亮了吗？我们还
잔지바르 캡콤, 시그
Okay, Jim. Wir haben eine Empfehlung für die Kommunikationsabteilung, die hoffentlich Energie spart, indem sie den Leistungsverstärker absc
肯，趁我们闲着没事，我们注意到几个问题。你知道，就是飞行服的鞋套；我的鞋套磨损得很厉害，我不得不
まあ、ここには喜んで一緒に来てくれる
Я слышу, что у вас плохое, но приподнятое настроение, вы чувствуете 
Columbia, this is Houston. We're going to uplink you a new state vector, and then we'll se
我が
오
Okay. On the top of the next page where it says "Secondary water EVAP," just keep in mind we don't plan to use the secondary evaporators unless the primary fails. On line 35 on page 1-5, next to "Command module 
Roger Houston, Gemin
ご信頼いただきありがとうございます
Hey, J
ठीक है। E-11 के चरण 5 पर, पहला उपशीर्षक है हेलमेट और दस्ताने, और उसके नीचे दिए गए आइटम इस बात पर निर्भर करते हैं कि आप सूट पहनते हैं या शर्ट की आस्तीन में आते हैं, लेकिन इन्हें पूरा करना आवश्यक है। और 
روجر. موشيا كاب كوم. واضح تمامًا. أخبر جيري
How are yo
알았어. 그리고 잭, 기동에 사용하는 방법에 대해
Bene. Sotto ogni cosa i
Ricevu
好的。第10
والأمور تسير على ما يرام. لديّ الآن مدخل هواء بدرجة 
.., Fred-o. We're 68 hours, about, and 46 minute
13, Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы, чтобы вы проверили несколько автоматических выключателей на панели 226. Криогенный кислородный нагреватель
現在、逆
हाँ। वे कंप्यूटर के नीचे वाले डिब्बे में र
Yes, that's quite a
और, जो, बस एक याद दिलाना चाहता हूँ; अब जब आपने इसका जिक्र किया है - कि अब 24 घंटे से भी 
いいですね。これはアップボイスのバックアップです。ハイゲインのナロービームになっているのを確認していただけます
프레드오, 저걸로 이걸 제어할 수 있는 방법이
ضبطتُ إعدادات بدلة الغوص لصمام التح
로저. 그럴 
Roger. My status is good; fuel reads 51 [percent] and--and 69 [percent]; oxygen is 84 [percent] and 100 [percent]; cabin pressure is holding good. All d-c and a-c power is good. The only thing of--to report regarding the flight plan is that fuel levels are lower than expected. My control mode now is ASCS. I expended my extra fuel in trying to orient after the night side. I think this is due to conflicting requirements of the flight plan. I should have taken time to orient and then work with o
Très bien. J'aimerais prendre les liaisons principales, deux d'entre elles, et ainsi de suite. C'est probabl
로저, 혹시 우리 컴퓨터로 수표
رأينا قمراً صناعياً آخر في الجوار - كانت الساعة 2:38 صباحاً عندما رأيته، وكان أبعد بكثير من
Roger. La batteria dell'adattatore 1 è 24,5 volt, 1 A è 7,0 ampere. La batteria dell'adattatore D è 24 e 6,8 ampere. Il numero 1C è 24 e 6,9. 2 A è 24 e 8,5 ampere. 2B, 24 e 8,3. 2C è 24
حسنًا. يبدو أننا ما زلنا على بعد حوا
それは簡単な仕事ではありま
Siamo pronti a spegnere il ventilatore del serbatoio O2 2 e 
アポロ8号、ヒューストン
That's right, Jack. What I'm
罗杰。我了解到天狼星上有六个
ठीक है, चंद्रमा को देखने की स्थिति में लाने के लिए किए जाने वाले युद्धाभ्यास, जिससे चंद्रमा 
आगे बढ़ो। कॉपी करने के लि
마이크, 말씀 잘 들립니다. 모든 게 순조롭게 진행
ठीक है। हमारे पास आपके लिए और कु
Negativo, ma ho sicuramente una strana combinazione di interruttori. Ho acceso l'alimentazione ACME, ho acceso il computer, e alla fine la spia del computer si è spenta e alla fine si è spenta anche la spia di malfunzi
هذا صحيح، ونود منك تعطيل
Okay, Bill. Ich möchte meine letzte Anmerkung zur Verwendung des Bordzustandsvektors für Punkt 4 zurücknehmen. Nach weiterer Prüfung vor Ort müssen die Berechnungen nun dringend durchgeführt werden. Anstatt dies zu verschieben oder doppelt durchzuführen, werden wir die bisher üblichen Verfahren anwenden. Was die Mondumlaufbahn betrifft, haben wir uns das genauer angesehen, und einige Kollegen – Jack Schmitt und seine Kollegen – untersuchen im Hintergrund die Auswirkungen der Fenster. Im Grunde genommen scheinen zwei Optionen Einfluss auf Punkt 2 zu haben. Eine Möglichkeit wäre, dass Sie und Jim die Plätze tauschen und Jim so seine SAM-Daten erhält. Die andere Möglichkeit wäre, das Raumschiff zu drehen und Jim die Optik so weit wie möglich nach vorne richten zu lassen, um seine SAM-Daten durch das Teleskop zu erfassen. Wir würden gerne Ihre Gedanken dazu hören, was Sie mit den Fenstern machen könnten. Wenn Sie Vorschläge haben, würden wir diese gerne in unsere Überlegungen einbeziehen und unsere Pläne so früh wie möglich konkretisieren. Wir möchten die Planung nicht aufschieben, damit wir nach der Hälfte der Zeit nichts mehr zu tun haben. Sie können uns sicher mehr darüber erzählen, was Sie mit diesen Zeitfenstern anfangen können. Teilen Sie uns also Ihre Ideen mit, und wir werden sehen, wie wir sie berücksichtigen kön
알겠습니다. 그때 송수신기 HF를 끄겠습니다. 2
Okay. Wir erwägen eine Kurskorrektur in etwa 104 Stunden – also in 20 bis 18 Stunden –, und zwar nur 7 Fuß pro Sekunde. Die andere Möglichkeit wäre, den Kurs beizubehalten, da wir möglicherweise nicht mehr in den optimalen Bereich zurückkehren können, und die Korrektur zu verzögern. Das ist also die Art von Option, die wir in Betracht ziehen. Ich wollte Ihnen nur mitteilen, dass Sie sich z
收到。吉姆操作到最后的时候，屏幕上会闪烁一下。我们希望他不要继续，先停在那里；我们想在这个时候从电
Il nostro monitor mostra immagini abb
11, Houston. Roger, Neil. 8 1/2, 7 e 8 per il tuo st
نعم، هذا ما كنا 
프렌드십 세븐, 무중력 상태에서 느껴지는 감각은 전혀 없고, 오히려 아주 기분 좋습니다. 아무런 부작용도 없고, 아프지도 않고, 괜찮습니다. 머리 움직임 검사도 했는데 아
नील और बज़, मैं आपसे व्हाइट हाउस के ओवल रूम से टेलीफोन पर बात कर रहा हूँ, और यह निस्संदेह अब तक की सबसे ऐतिहासिक टेलीफोन कॉल है। मैं आपको शब्दों में बयां नहीं कर सकता कि हम सभी को आप पर कितना गर्व है कि आपने हर अमेरिकी के लिए क्या किया है। यह हमारे जीवन का सबसे गौरवपूर्ण दिन है। और मुझे यकीन है कि दुनिया भर के लोग भी अमेरिकियों के साथ इस बात को मानते हैं कि यह कितना बड़ा कारनामा है। आपके इस कार्य के कारण ही स्वर्ग मनुष्य के संसार का हिस्सा बन गया है। और जब आप शांति सागर से हमसे बात कर रहे हैं, तो यह हमें पृथ्वी पर शांति और स्थिरता लाने के अपने प्रयासों को दोगुना करने के लिए प्रेरित करता है। मानव इतिहास के एक अनमोल क्षण में
알겠습니다. 몇 가지 필요한 사항이 있습니다. 배터리 C 전압과 배터리 매니폴드 압력을 확인해 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 그리고 고이득(high gain) 값도 알려주시면 좋겠습니
Va 
Columbia, ici Houston.
다른 차단기는요? 카메라 설치는 다 됐어요. 나머지가 빠지지만
Р
收
진행 중입니다. 
13, Houston. Wir müssen Sie bitten, die Abschaltprozedur für Brennstoffzelle 1 durchzuführen
Roger. Analizzeremo i
ジェミニ4号、あと1分ほどあります。その前に状
روجر. لقد قلّدتك هذه المرة. أتوقع أنك ستستعد على الأرجح للإصدار الثاني في المر
...음, 사실 잘 모르겠어요. 그중 일부는... 짐, 저도 당신과 같은 문제가 있어요. RHC로는 음정을 잘 조절할 수가 없어서 THC를 써야 하는데, 그게 바로 조절 문제였죠. 아니, 저는 조절 문제가 있다고 생각하지 않아요. 왜 그런지는 모르겠지
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。パネル16では、クロスタイバルロードブレーカーを閉じ
1A、9.5、1B、10.0、1-メイン、14.5、2-メイン、8.0、2A、4.8
わかりました。CB(16)の中止ステージを終了してください。
RKV، إما أننا 
そしてヒューストン、ドッキング後のチェックリストを確認している
Aquarius, Houston. Bitte um
로저. 16 50 40인가요? 7+03인가
B; Delta-V, 13,5. Höhenkorrektur; Delta-V, 59,5. Phasenkorr
Voici la fonction « 
Roger. Es sieht wirklich gut au
分かりました。故障番号23、ステップ2です。沸騰している可能性はわずかにあるように見えますが、おそ
После того, как мы снизили скорость вращения двигателя до уровня, при котором посчитали, что можем безопасно отстыковаться, мы это сделали и как можно б
حسنًا. الوضع الرا
Okay. Power 6. Okay. Power 6 refers to panel 11. You should go per the chart with the exception of those breakers that I call out. First line is okay. Or, let's say, first row. Second row, QUAD 4, TCA, closed; QUAD 3, TCA, closed; QUAD 2, TCA, closed; and QUAD 1, TCA, closed. The rest of that row is okay. Row 3, about halfway over, ATCA (PGNS), closed. Okay. The rest of that line is okay. Fourth line, HEATER - stand by. Okay. That line is all okay with the exception of the last three 
わかりました。「フォローアップ」も忘れてください。17ページ目のすべての項目を実行して、4分で変更点があります。1行目、CB(16) INVERTER 3、CLOSE。2行目、「Select INVERTER 1」を消してください。ページを下に進んで、「ATTITUDE MONITOR」の後の「RATE SCALE」を「25 degrees a second」に設定してください。4行下がって「BALANCE COUPLE」まで進み、「BALANCE COUPLE-OFF」にしてくださ
وتم ضبط مؤقت 
どうぞ
Он начинает светиться в 
11, Хьюстон. Не могли б
DSKY 屏幕空
«Аполлон
Roge
And it appears so fa
いいえ、持っていたとは思わないでくださ
你可以把它扔进去
好的。接下来，第
Oss
Innanzitutto, sono in rientro automatico; sono in modalità automatica; i giroscopi sono no
रॉजर। मुझे लग
휴스턴과 나머지 두 명의 우주 에이스가 이제 타석에 들어설 차례입니다. LMP는 패드에 올라가
हमें हमेशा एक ही धुंधली सी तस्वीर से देखना पड़ता है। मिलन
Your GOSS Conference loop
الصداقة السابعة، تستعرض قائمة الت
休斯顿，鹰。你可以
D'accord. Supprimez la section qui dit « Avant le
لا بأس، ن
Роджер. В данный момент вся жидкость собралась вокруг стояка;
Roger. Mi sento bene, sono di buon
ठीक है। एक शब्द में कहें तो, उस 2 घंटे की सक्रियण प्रक्रिया को सर्वोत्तम तरीके से पूरा करने में आमतौर पर 
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。君の声が全く聞こえない
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि हम सभी इस बात से सहमत हैं कि अगर हमें वास्तव में यह नहीं पता कि हम क्या देख रहे हैं, तो हमें इसके साथ प्रयोग करने की कोशिश नहीं
Pro
+ 44، / 62970، - 162، + 129، + 00197، + أصفار، + 60701 180 133 001، + 00203، + 6070
Und, Houston, Aquarius. Es sieht so aus, als ob die Entl
Похоже, что в режиме отключения питания (неразборчиво) мы всё ещё потребляем чуть меньше 11 ампер. На первом участке — 10, на втором — чуть меньше 11. Расположение троса или соединительного кабеля на внешней дверце з
メモ用紙に書いてもいいかもしれませんね。とても簡単です
Okay. NOUN 71: Wir haben 30 und 37 verwendet, vier Kugeln 1; NOUN 93: plus 0
حسنًا. في نهاية رؤيا 59، خط طول العقدة الصاعدة 124 درجة غربًا، بتو
ठीक है, मैं बात करते हुए आपको यह दिखाना चाहूँगा। यह कैमरे की तरह काम करता है। इसमें एफ-स्टॉप कंट्रोल है, और आप इसे f:22 पर सेट करते हैं, जिससे ज़ाहिर है, सबसे कम 
了解、ジョー。もし今からバーンイ
Frank, con
Okay. Jim, während wir an diesem Vorgang arbeiten, möchten wir wissen, ob Sie 01 ausgewählt haben und die Meldung ENTER, 01 ENTER erh
알겠습니다.
D'accord, c'est confirmé, Jim. Il y avait beaucoup de bruit et on n'a pas bien capté la partie centrale, mais je pense que c'est assez clair pour toi. Ne t'inquiète pas pour la relecture de ce qu'on a raté, sauf si tu as le mo
R
Eagle, Columbia. Ihre maximalen Anstellwinkel sind – Korr
你好，宁静基地，休斯顿。我是否从
يا إلهي، لقد انقلبتُ رأسًا على عقب الآن. لسببٍ م
Roger. Vorläufige Version 1 wie folgt: /; 6284
حسنًا. لقد قمتُ بالفعل بإعادة ضبط الجهاز، لكن ما زال هناك تشويش في الشريط.
了解。それでは参加して頂ければ幸いです。「承認」して頂ければ、新しい状態ベクトルをアップリンクし、クロックを更新し
토끼 옷을 입고 그 운동을 하면 정말 힘들어요. 이제 더 이
Hier ein Bericht von Harry Rosenthal von Associated aus Houston. Zwei Weihnachtsmänner verschönern dem zweijährigen Jeffrey Lovell den Weihnachtsabend. Der erste klopfte an seine Haustür und brachte Geschenke. Der zweite holte seinen Papa vom Mond zurück. Der erste trug einen roten Anzug und einen weißen Bart und rief laut genug, um es bis zum Ende der Straße zu hören. Der zweite war ein riesiges Triebwerk, das hinter dem Mond Flammen spuckte, und Tausende warteten gespannt auf die Nachricht, dass es gezündet hatte. „Bitte beachten Sie, dass es einen Weihnachtsmann gibt“, waren die ersten Worte von Apollo 8, als die Funkstille 15 Minuten später endete und die besorgte Welt darüber informierte, dass das Triebwerk seine kritische Zündung durchgeführt hatte. „Keiner von uns erwartet jemals ein schöneres Weihnachtsgeschenk als dieses“, sagte Ken Mattingly von der Missionskontrolle. „Vielen Dank an alle auf der Erde. Sie wissen, dass wir es ohne Sie nicht geschafft hätten“, antwortete Oberst Frank Borman, der Kommandant des Raumschiffs. In diesem Moment erstrahlte ein Weihnachtsbaum vor den Konsolen in der Missionskontrolle, und Astronaut Harrison Schmidt las der Crew eine Weltraumversion von „Ein Besuch vom Nikolaus“ vor. „Es war die Nacht vor Weihnachten, und weit draußen im Weltraum hatte die Apollo-8-Crew gerade das Rennen zum Mond gewonnen“, begann sie. Die Crew der Missionskontrolle hatte die Feier verschoben, bis Jeffreys Vater, Marinekapitän James Lovell, zusammen mit Major William A. Anders und Oberst Borman von der Luftwaffe sicher auf dem Heimweg waren. An jedem anderen Heiligabend wären die Familien der Astronauten zum Weihnachtsgottesdienst in der Kirche gewesen, aber dieses Jahr saßen sie alle gebannt vor ihren Fernsehern. Die Häuser in der Nähe des bemannten Raumfahrtzentrums waren alle festlich geschmückt. Die Rasenflächen rund um das Haus der Lovells und in seiner ganzen Gemeinde Timber Cove waren mit Lichterketten im mexikanischen Stil geschmückt, und die vier Lovells... 30. Sie... 00. Ein Auto fuhr vor, in dem ein großer Weihnachtsmann mit einem dicken Sack auf dem Rücken saß. Er klopfte lautstark an die Tür. Die Tür öffnete sich, und da stand Jeffrey Lovell, der am 14. Januar drei Jahre alt wird. Jeffrey zuckte erschrocken zurück. Seine Mutter stützte ihn, und Jeffrey klammerte sich an sie, immer noch etwas schüchtern. „Letztes Jahr ist er weinend weggelaufen“, sagte seine 15-jährige Schwester Barbara. Vorher musste sie ihm hinterherlaufen, damit er nicht alle Lichter ausblies. Die anderen Lovell-Kinder, der 13-jährige James und die 10-jährige Susan, sahen amüsiert zu. Schließlich verschwanden der Weihnachtsmann und die Kinder im Haus; die Geschenke wurden unter den Baum gelegt; Geschenke, die erst heute geöffnet werden sollten. Frau Lovell hatte Eierpunsch und Plätzchen für die Gäste zubereitet, und sie sahen sich eine 25-minütige Fernsehübertragung einer Mondtour an, die von den drei Astronauten geleitet wurde. Später unternahmen Freunde mit Frau Lovell, Barbara und Jeffrey einen Spaziergang durch die weihnachtlich beleuchtete Nachbarschaft. Über ihnen, am klaren Himmel, leuchtete der Halbmond hell, und die
ठीक है। हम कंप्यूटर को सभी मोड में चेक करना चाहते हैं। इस चेक के तीन चरण होंगे। सबसे पहले सभी IVI विंडो में 10 ft/sec की गति सेट करें। फिर मालफंक्शन रीसेट बटन 
你
好的。我们
Роджер, Кано, Близне
La surface est fine et poudreuse. Je peux la soulever légèrement du bout du pied. Elle adhère en fines couches, comme du charbon en poudre, à la semelle et aux côtés de mes bottes. Je ne m'enfonce que de quelques millimètres, peut-être un huitième de millimètre, mais je peux distinguer les empreinte
المنطقة التي تظهر من النافذة اليسرى عبارة عن سهل مستوٍ نسبيًا مليء بالفوهات، يتراوح قطرها بين 5 و50 قدمًا، بالإضافة إلى بعض التلال الصغيرة، التي يبلغ ارتفاعها حوالي 20 أو 30 قدمًا، وآلاف الفوهات الصغيرة التي يتراوح قطرها بين قدم وقدمين. نرى بعض الكتل ذات الزوايا الحادة على بعد مئات الأقدام أمامنا، والتي يبلغ قطرها حوالي قدمين ولها حواف حادة. هناك تل في الأفق، يقع تقريبًا على المسار الأرضي أمامنا.
표면 색깔은 우리가 궤도에서 태양 각도 약 10도 정도에서 관측한 것과 매우 유사합니다. 거의 색깔이 없죠. 회색인데, 태양과 직각을 이루는 0도 각도에서 보면 아주 하얗고 분필 같은 회색입니다. 그리고 태양을
And, Vance, are you still trying to get me an answer on that - pulling that ASA b
Фред сейчас смотрит в наше оптическое устройство. Это прибор для выравнивания нашей платформы, и сейчас Фред смотрит в него, чтобы посмотреть, какую картину снаружи он сможет получить. Возможно, мы сможем использовать теле
Préparez-vous à recevoir des colis valant des millions de dollars. Il
Ho sinc
Роджер. Здесь всё прекрасно, Джон
On est… la façon dont on se déport
それは単なる推測です。本当には分かりません。私は十分近くで見ることができて
罗杰
收到。正在切换到超高频
Nous aborderons ici le premier rapport d'étape sous p
... रोजर, ह्यूस्टन। बर्न स्टेटस रिपोर्ट इस प्रक
We would like permiss
コロンビア、コロンビア、こちらヒュー
四分钟后，“极光七号”准备就绪。燃料和氧气供应稳定；舱内保持电流
了解しました。最後の予定活動を開始されたようですね。初期追跡によると、最初の中間軌道は最初の推測で秒速4フィートを下回っている可能性があります。また、燃焼データを確認しま
What w
로저. 콜럼비아호에 거주하시는 여러분께 알려드립니다. 오늘은 콜롬비아 독립기념일입니다. 어젯밤에는 필리핀의 글로리아 디아즈가 미스 유니버스에 선정되었습니다. 그녀는 60명의 경쟁자를 제치고 세계 최고의 미인으로 등극했습니다. 디아즈는 18세이며, 검은 머리와 눈을 가지고 있고, 신체 사이즈는 34.5인치(약 87cm)에 허리 23인치(약 61cm), 엉덩이
Нам показалось, что мы попытались загрузить стираемый файл до того, как вошли в систему, которая всё ещё работала, и это повреди
제미니 
Роджер. Следующий вопрос: касались ли солнечные панели на борту лунного аппарата поверхности Луны во время развертывания? Конец 
हाँ। वे यहाँ भी बेहद खूबसूरत लग रही थीं। अर
D'accord. J'ai effectué la charge de la batterie, la purge de la soupape de ventilation et la purge du réservoir de carburant. Arrêtez-vous à 55 heures. Votre assiette de roulis sera alors de 285 degrés, conformément au plan de vol. Les angles de l'antenne à gain élevé sont légèrement différents: tangage à 23 degrés et lacet à 267 degrés. Le passage TV se fait selon la procédure standard, à l'exception de quelques étapes spécifique
Хорошо. Я отследил яркую звезду, и я думаю, что она находится там, в созвездии Орла. На самом деле, я почти уверен. Я вижу две целевые звезды. Я отслеживал её до самого верха. Она почти достигла вершины. Сейчас она исчезнет из поля моего зрения. Я отслежи
Roger. Vier von acht Schutzschaltern zeigen Rot an. Die Schutzschalter sind aktuell noch ausgeschaltet. Ich glaube, wir haben gerade Band 3052 aktiviert und können mit dem Brennvorgang fortfahren. Sind diese v
Командир штаба, как вы теперь чи
Danke s
방금 아제나를 9
Roger, il y a 15 minutes. Jim, je vais te transmettre la procédure générale de rentrée atmosphérique. Tu recevras la mise à jour 63-1 et les détails de ton prochain passage au-dessus des États-Unis de la part de Gus. Après la rétropropulsion, la procédure générale consiste à revenir en position normale, tête baissée, pour une portance maximale jusqu'à 400 K. Nous te donnerons un angle d'altitude à maintenir jusqu'à 400 K, puis tu devras effectuer une inclinaison de 15 degrés par seconde jusqu'à ce que l'altimètre descende en dessous de la bu
روج
शुभ प्रभात, फ्रैंक। लगता है कि प्राइमरी रेडिएटर के आउटपुट तापमान का ट्रांसड्यूसर खराब हो गया है। तापमान बहुत ज़्यादा दिखा रहा है, जो तय सीमा से बाहर है। हालांकि, बाकी का लूप ठीक लग रहा है
Hey, das wir
Д
ピッチ角ゼロ、
글쎄, 잘 모르겠어. 난 위층에서 나왔고, 지금은 아래층에 있어, 잭. 잭이 위층에 올라가서 한번 보고 알려줄 수 있겠지. 알았어, 바로 뒤쪽으로 옮겨볼까 생각해 볼
没错，万斯。六分仪里全是——全是乳白色的东西，任何能透过它看到的
Напряжение всех батарей около 23,5 вольт или выше, амперметр почти стабильно показывает 20 ампер. Хотел проверить перед выключением, напряжение 115 вольт. Напряжение вентиляторов около 115 вольт, в режиме ожидания 0 вольт. Ладно, кабина чистая. Очевидно, что эта чертова антенна н
ああ、ロジャー、アポロ11号。
Woher hast du die Reichwe
لقد توصلتُ للتو إلى حلٍّ لتغيير خط طول الهبوط بمقدار 6 درجات شرقًا. أريد فقط مقارنة ذلك بما توصلوا إليه بناءً على نفس مدة الاحتراق، استنادًا إلى خط طول تأ
Хорошо. Давайте отдадим последнюю вещь Джеку, а я все это оставлю снаружи. Понятно? СИСТЕМА А. Она под
Okay, Houston; Aquarius. I'm flying it back over towards the initial angles you gave me of a pitch of 257. I'll get near the bellyband in roll and yaw; then I'l
GET は 2 プラス 20
Gemini 4. Tieni presente che l'esercente è dalla parte del Pilota
He's out, Gus and it's really nifty. Listen, our VOX doesn't work ver
Через 3 минуты. Уровень топлива и кислорода остается стабильным; в кабине держится 5,8 [psia]. Энергоснабж
Das könnten wir jetzt 
ああ、電
わかりました。それでは… - ATT HOLD設定を使って姿勢を維持し、JETTの姿
Say, listen. Ed hasn't been to sleep yet. He's just about to go to sleep and I think it would be better for him to go to sleep than to have a Medical Data Pass. How about a medical pass on hi
13, ici Houston. Nous aimerions que vous nous fassiez un état des lieux de vos affichages sur les MDC 1 et 2. Veuillez nous communiquer les relevés des jauges et les informations de
1A, 9.5; 1B, 10.0; 1-मेन, 14.5; 2-मेन, 8.0; 2A,
그 수치를 얻었을 때 그는 당신보다 
I have your 2-1
روجر. ولا توجد تقارير - لا توجد تقارير من حشرا
좋아, 버즈. 목적은 근접 비행이야. SPS/G&N: 628
रॉजर, फ्रेडो। अब ह
रॉजर। मुझे नहीं लगता कि मैं स
我们当时也在寻找猫爪，心想我们可能已经越过大V字形区域，进入了更远的射程。但我认为，那很可能就是我们着陆
네. 두 번째 질문은 베넷 혜성을 32시간 동안 관측하는 것인데, 우주선이 관측 시작 전 최대한 안정적인 상태일 때 사진을 찍어 달라는 것입니다. 안정성 조건이 매우 중요합니다. 저희가 전달해 드린 내용만으로는 이 부분을 제대로 이해하셨는지 확신이 서지 않았습니다. 또한, 사진으로는 혜성의 모든 것을 눈으로 볼 수 있는 것처럼 담아낼 수 없을 수도 있습니다. 따라서 혜성의 구조에서 흥미로운 부분을 발견하시면, 그 이유
Meno di 100. Ora circ
Да, это правда, что на этом расстоянии мы не видим той глубины цвета, которой наслаждались на расстоянии 50 000 миль. Однако океаны по-прежнему имеют отчетливый синий оттенок, а континенты в целом имеют коричневатый оттенок, хотя
Hello, Aquarius; Houston. How 
Мы собираемся
Чарли, на обратном пути мы будем вращаться примерно на 270 градусов по тангажу, а не на 90, как в обратном направлении. Верн
Roger. Je vous suis depuis un certain temps. J'ai essayé de vous contacter par HF sans succès. Mon état est bon; l'état de la capsule est bon; le mode de commande est électrique; les gyroscopes sont bloqués; la manœuvre est désactivée. Le niveau de carburant est de 74 à 85 %. Le niveau d'oxygène est de 87 à 100 %. La température de la cabine est un peu é
わかりました。G&C 7-1の手順3と4のフラグを設定してください
حسنًا. كين، لقد وضعنا بعض 
Okay
아니오, 버즈. 여전히 상태가 좀 안 좋아 보여요.
ジャック、月
13, Houston. All
Roger. Wir würden gerne, wenn es Ihnen passt, den Abwassertank auf 5 Prozent Restfüllstand
أورورا سفن. فهمت أن نظام RSCS لم
حسنًا. إذا كنت قد فعلت كل شيء آخر، فماذا عن إجراء فحص VH
Qu'est-ce que c'était? Quelle était la première partie
Apollo 8, Ho
Roger
ठीक है, मैं अभी से अपनी 5 मिनट की दर शुरू कर रहा
了解。フランク、ここは苦情は聞いてないよ
Хорошо. И наконец, теперь, когда космический аппарат находится там, наведите камеру так, как нужно, чтобы Земля попала в поле зрения, и н
Houston, Aqu
جا
حسنًا. تم الحرق في 
收到。你的
了解、11。バズ、もう一
ヒューストン、アポロ 8 号。私たちはあなたの最新情報やあなたのをお
Bon 
هيوستن، كولومبيا بصوت منخفض. هل تقر
알겠습니다. 짐, 몇 가지 말씀드리겠습니다. 첫째, 기동을 위해 를 사용할 수 있지만, 최소 추진력을 사용하면 연료를 훨씬 절약할 수 있습니다. 따라서 최소 추진력을 사용하는 것이 더 나을 것입니다. 둘째, 플러스-X 추진기를 끄기 전, 그리고 를 조작하기 전에, 그리고 모드 제어를 통해 ATT HOLD로 전환하기 전에, G
Ладн
Roger. Kopie 0.64, 0.09. Danke
Cabina 107 [gradi
My rates are now just about 0 in all three axes. I still have light in the periscope, of course. I am looking straight up and yet at this point which is.., that my attitude is - let me get into the couch here. I really can't pick it too well, I am just about inverted at this point, an
好的。在第三行，COMM（通信）下方：DISPLAY（显示器），打开；SE AUDIO（单声道音频），关闭；VHF A 发射机，打开 - 这是个变化 - VHF B 接收机，打开；PRIMARY S-BAND（主S波段功率放大器），打开；发射机/接收机，关闭；S波段天线，打开；PMP（功率放大器），关闭；TV（电视），打开。在：DISPLAYS（显示器），打开；GLYCOL PUMP SECONDARY（二次乙二醇泵），打开；LOC PUMP（本地泵），打开；CABIN FAN CONTROL（舱扇
... hier drüben
Gemini 4, Houst
Roger, et nous aimerions faire cela en mode manuel, donc à la page 17, environ aux 
One definitely gets the illusion of looking way up above you at this attitude, and if there is no horizon, it's just a black sky. The amount of light in the cockpit is quite high. Once one gets adapted and it can be reduced, of course, by the cabin light. At this 
아니요. 필요한 스로틀 데이터는 모두 확보했습니다. 낮은 비트 전송률을 유지하셔도 됩니다. 스로틀 테스트를 진행하셔도 되지만, 짐벌 트림은 하지 
Au fait, les fenêtres sont arrivées en excellent état. La fenêtre 5 est impeccable, ce qui
Yes, I guess so. It's going to be sort of a passthrough ORB rate
好的，杰克。现在你可以把它放好；也就是说，把它从内袋里拿出来，放到外袋里，然后找个地方存放；我们建议放在 U-1 号地方，
Okay. Our checklist has "all jets" scratched out, and it says "enable couples on all axes." So what we'll do is - we'll reestablish 
Das ist bestä
What TV was th
ठीक है। इसमें कोई खास परेशानी नहीं है। हम बस इतना ही कर रहे हैं। हम इसे जारी रखने की कोशिश करेंगे। और आप अभी तक इस रवैये से संतुष्ट हैं। मुझे लगता है कि आप थर्मल निगरानी करेंगे और पता लगाएंगे कि क्या हमें 
अ
Ok, ho la mia prima stella. - Sono abbastanza sicuro che questo rivestimento sul mio finestrino sia all'incirca a passo zero. Vedo una stella laggiù sotto... penseresti che dovrei riuscire a vederla. Potrebbe essere solo il modo particolare in cui i riflessi tornano indiet
Roger. Lo
Роджер. Я понимаю, вы дважды пытались провести техническое обслуживание, оба раза давление пара падало до нуля, и теперь вам приходится закрывать обратный клапан вручн
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。
Роджер. Нам нужна высокая скорость передачи данн
はい、そうです
عليّ أن أنحني ل
That
روجر. 4 مُعدّلة: SPS/G&N: 38320، ناقص 055، زائد 060 084 30 2749، زائد 31380، زائد 03475، ناقص 01032؛ الدوران غير مُتاح، الميل 034. باقي مساحة الهبوط غير مُتاح. سعة خزان الوقود لمحركين نفاثين 16 ثانية، غير مُ
Roger. Understand. Just for information, perhaps you read it out on the ground. I ran our pericynthian altitude determination using first of all, . The star state vector that we navigated with, w
好的，汤姆。你都明白了。接下来，在进行点火之前，我们需要你这样做：移动到航天器 VII 北面 5 到 10 英尺处，后方大约 50 英尺的地方。这是在进行点火之前。
بينما 
Houston, Col
알겠습니다. 아래쪽까지 전부 해당 없음입
ठीक है। अपशिष्ट को कंडेनसेट कैन में स्थानांतरित करने की प्रक्रिया बह
روجر، أبولو ١١. الطريقة التي شرحناها لك بها، وبنفس الموقف الذي نحن عليه، ستكون تم
Amazing how quickly you adapt - Why, it doesn't seem weird at all to me to look out 
That's affirmative, Columbia. It's abo
好了。你可
1A، 9.5؛ 1B، 10.0؛ 1-الرئيسي، 14.5؛ 2-الرئيسي، 8.
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们希望您建
Houston, nous venons de réaliser un PROGRAMME 21, et nous montrons un péricyntien de plus de 74,9 m
A Mosca, l'ingegnere spaziale Anatol Koritsky, citato dalla TASS, ha affermato che Luna 15 potrebbe realizzare tutto ciò che è stato 
62970, minus 162, plus 129, plus 00966, plus 00552, minus 02079. Next t
Roger. Die Cape-Station möchte eine medizinische Datenfreigabe für den Piloten 
तो सबसे पहले, यह SPC यॉ मैन्यूवर के बारे में है। मेरे पास आपके लिए कुछ उपयोगी जानकारी 
Apollo 8, H
ठीक ह
Roger, I understand. Ascending node 157 W
窓からはもう光が届かず、星もまだ見えない。もしこの世に、昼間の光と地平線上の星を同時に見ることが可能な場所があるとしたら、私
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। 30 सेकंड में कैनरी। कृपया कमांड रीसे
Ja. Dies wird folgendermaßen durchgeführt: Der Brennpunkt liegt
Утверждаю. На высоте 400 км ваш угол наклона носа самолета должен быть — точным — 27° над горизонтом. А это было бы недопустимо, что привело бы к.
ऑरोरा सेवन, कैप कॉम। क्या आप 
أبولو ٨، هيوستن. اكتملت عملية تفريغ البيانات؛
Роджер, Фрэнк. Мы хотели бы проинформировать вас о вашей траектории. Следующий промежуточный курс, который мы проходим, оказывается очень коротким, со скоростью 0,7 фута в секунду, и мы бы не хотели его проходить. Наши данные выглядят очень хорошо, и, экстраполируя их вперед, мы видим, что 4-й промежуточный курс на отметке минус 8 часов будет иметь скорость около 4 футов в секунду. Между тем, траектория свободного возвращения выглядит очень хорошо, с точкой всплеска воды у побережья Африки. Таким образом, похоже, вы движетесь прямо по старой осевой линии, и мы предлагаем н
برج الجوزاء
分かりました。分かりました。まず第一に、これらのルールは厳しい制限のあるモード I の中止と同様であるべきというのが基本的な考え方です。では、皆さんがコピーできるように 1 つずつ説明していきます。分かりました。以下のいずれかの事象が
好的。翻译手柄控制器的逆时
로저.
روجر، جو. فكرت، إذا كنا سنقوم بعملية الحرق الآن، فيجب أن أقدم لكم تحديثًا عن صفحات كتاب الطوارئ 32 و33 و34،
好了。那是——那是弗雷德。我正在把他翻过来，好让后面睡眠站的各位看到。弗雷德，你能
Verstanden. Er hat das nicht erwähnt. Einen Mom
了解、はっきりと。状況はどうです
アポロ8号
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다.
我——好了。我现在
هيوستن، إيجل. يمكنك - زوايا الالتواء عل
Хорошо, нам нужно новое место для этой кассеты.
هيوستن، كولومبيا. بمجرد حصولك على البيانات اللازمة على ر
Ро
13, Houston. Forte e ch
Qui Sigma Seven. Su 
そうしま
Roger. Ripeto, le istruzioni che ti ho appena dato dovre
Ricevuto. Siamo sotto il limite di e
ठीक है। आगे आत
Okay. Tha
I got one more for you. You'll copy this and give me it all on the readback. Okay. Once you get the attitude and you wan
ハワイです。地上の状況
This transmission is coming to you approximately halfway between the moon and the earth. We have been 31 hours and about 20 minutes into flight. We have about less than 40 hours to go to the moon. You can see that Bill has his toothbrush
Хорошо, Вэнс. При отключении питания мы переходим на низкую скорость передачи данных; отключи
Ok. Inizia a meno 6 ore e mezza. Dovrai ricomprare assorbenti e assorbe
Roger. Verstanden. 
ニール、こちらヒューストン。映像を撮っています。あなたは今写
Хорошо. Пункт первый, от одного 
我不知道。
Apollo 11, qui Houston. In at
Apollo 8, Houston. Es sieht so aus, als ob die Ladung von Batterie B noch etwa sechs Stunden dauern könnte. Die Laderate ist zwar geringer als die, die wir anhand unserer Bodenkurven messen
Okay. Let me ask one question, here. About how long do you think it'll take to charge these b
Also, wenn wir diese hie
Roger. Das waren die tatsächl
حسناً. هذا يفترض أن يوصلك إلي
Negativo, 11. Per ora va bene il minimo. 
了解しました。マイナス4時間半でSEPの設定をします。まず、バランス・カップルをオンにします。次に、カウンターをゼロにします。404、405、406、プラス0。読み取り値は470です。次に、プラスXを毎秒0.5フィートに変換します。4番目に、CM/SEP。5番目に、SEPの後、470をゼロにします。6番目に、姿勢制御の3をパルスにします。7番目に、写真用のサービスモジュールを取得
Okay. Our maneuver is complete, and at this attitude the M-line is 
... Роджер, Хьюстон. Ниже приведён отчёт о состоянии горения: DELTA-TIG ноль; время горения, 17; значения
알겠습니다. 곧 필터 교체를 진행할 예정이며, 퍼지 라인 히터는 ***로 작동 중입니다. 산
Und du weißt, ich kann nicht mit minimalem Impuls fahren. Ich mus
哦，我们正在清点物资，看看有多少，也许该考虑一下定量分配。我的意思是，确保我们有足够的物资，也确保我们有足够的水。我可不想最后一天没水喝。看看我们有多少，把它们装满，就放在那儿。对了，我告诉你，现在能吃的东西是糖果、三明治酱。也许还有冷冻
जी हां, फ्रेड। हमें कुछ भी खर्च नह
現時点ではそうではありません。これはケープ
मैं 23:18 के लिए ठी
D'accord. ΔV 180. 4+15. 18 02 57. 3+0
Ora, dobbiamo fare qualcos'altro per
Хорошо. Сейчас 18:30 ми
Хорошо. Это верно, и последнее предложение в обновлении гласит, чт
Gémeaux 4, i
Das ist richtig, Jim. Weiter geht's mit Seite 29. An dieser Stelle ist ein schriftlicher Eintrag erforderlich. Es sind etwa sechs oder sieben Zeilen, und ich werde versuchen, langsam vorzugehen, damit Sie ihn aufschreiben können, wenn Sie bereit sind, i
Apollo 8, Houst
네, 맞습니다. 바로 그렇습니
ठीक है। और एक और बदलाव यह है कि इसके तुरंत बाद, जब हम जेटिसन के लिए कॉन्फ़िगरेशन कर रहे होते हैं, तो हमने फॉरवर्ड डंप वाल्व और ओवरहेड डंप वाल्व दोनों को बंद कर दिया है। और हम इस तरह की लॉक-अप स्थिति में नहीं फंसना चाहते, इसलिए इससे बचने का एक तरीका यह है कि
알겠습니다. 아폴로 8
Gemi
C'est bien. Quand je suis allé me ​​coucher hier
R
Okay, Fred. And you're loud and clear down here now. Okay. What we're getting a procedure ready for you is to do an Sun check at approximately 74 hours or in just a little over 3 hours. That will be a detent 2; we'll have a detail procedure up shortly and it will include a rendezvous radar redesignation to get it out of the way and a maneuver to the attitude. It's our feeling that if that checks out within 1 degree that your platform will be okay for the burn without a subsequent. If it's not within 1 degree, we are working up an Earth/Sun alinement procedure to aline the platform, and we'll have that up to you later. Okay. Assuming that the Sun check is okay, we will then give you a star for a confidence check on the back side when you're in the darkness. We'll be updating a burn pad to you prior to going around the Moon. We'll have another look at you after, and we'll update the pad if required. Right now that update should be ve
こちらはフレンドシップ・セブンです。フライ・バイ・ワイヤを操作すると、フライ・バイ・ワイヤのスイッチか
제미니
Roger. Verstanden. OMNI zu Baker und OMNI, HANDBUCH. Und die Win
알겠습니다. Enter 키
Scheinbar hat B es nicht ganz geschafft; ich stelle es
Роджер. Моя система — 6. Температура купола — 81, 81 (град
是的，听起来很有可能，吉姆。弗雷德也报告了类似的情况，但我们还没能确定它们到底是什么，可能要等到我们加大力度调查后才能确定。如果情况有任何变化
好的，杰克。下一步是将连接着软管的指挥舱容器放置在合适的位置，确保容
Okay, ich wollte Ihnen gerade von der Übergabe berichten, die wir eben hatten, aber ich war etwas spät dran. Da wir ausreichend Strom haben und nach dem Stromausfall gerne wieder S-Band-Verbindungen mit Ihnen hätten, möchten wir Sie bitten, den Schritt auf Ihrer Checkliste für den Eintritt (Seite 2-5) nach „Stromausfall beginnen“ zu streichen. Dort steht „POWER PMP auf A
Nous savons que de nombreux scientifiques de différents pays attendent avec impatience de voir les échantillons lunaires, et nous pensions que vous seriez intéressés de les voir tels qu'ils sont ici. Ces deux boîtes sont les conteneurs de retour des échantillons. Ce sont des conteneurs emb
11، هيوستن. روجر. نحن ننسخ و
好的，没错。那么
好的。104小时的时候
Oh, toller Sport. Ich habe g
Understand. 
Нет, не смотрел. Я посмотрел на уплотнительное кольцо, и думаю, дело не в нём. Думаю, проблема в... Я заметил, когда меня осматривали утром перед запуском, что у них были небольшие проблемы с ним. У меня... повышается кровяное 
थोड़ी देर में पुनः प्रवेश की स्थिति में आ जाऊँगा। अभी ग्लव बॉक्स खुला रखने की कोई ज़रूरत नहीं है। मुझे प्रकाश का मानक स्रोत लाना होगा, शायद मैं ला सकूँ। इसे जल्दी से अंदर रख दो। यह यहीं रहेगा। यह यॉ कवर है। बाकी सब
ठीक 
حسنًا. لدي في F2-22، العمود ليما، العنص
ऐसा लग रहा है कि मैं अभी-अभी मार्शल द्वीप समूह के कुछ हिस्सों के ऊपर स
弗
Bene, c'è
埃德认为你需要……来控制航天器在超过20°的角度飞行。同时
Say a
Вот репортаж Гарри Розенталя из Associated, Хьюстон. Два Санта-Клауса украсили сочельник для двухлетнего Джеффри Ловелла. Первый постучал в его входную дверь и принес подарки. Второй проводил его папу домой с Луны. Первый был в красном костюме и с белой бородой, и его крики «Хо-хо» были слышны за кварталом. Второй представлял собой огромный двигатель, извергающий пламя за Луной, и тысячи людей ждали известия о его запуске. «Пожалуйста, примите к сведению, что Санта-Клаус существует», — такими были первые слова «Аполлона-8», когда он вышел из радиомолчания, чтобы сообщить встревоженному миру через 15 минут после того, как двигатель выполнил свой критически важный запуск. «Никто из нас никогда не ожидал получить лучший рождественский подарок, чем этот», — сказал Кен Маттингли из Центра управления полетами. «Поблагодарите всех на Земле за нас. Вы знаете, что мы бы не справились без вас», — последовал ответ полковника Фрэнка Бормана, командира космического корабля. В этот момент перед пультами в Центре управления полетами загорелась рождественская елка, и астронавт Харрисон Шмидт прочитал экипажу космическую версию «Визита Святого Николая». «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и далеко в космосе экипаж «Аполлона-8» только что выиграл лунную гонку», — начиналось чтение. Экипаж Центра управления полетами отложил празднование до тех пор, пока отец Джеффри, капитан ВМС Джеймс Ловелл, вместе с майором ВВС Уильямом А. Андерсом и полковником Борманом не отправятся домой. В любой другой сочельник семьи астронавтов были бы в церкви на рождественской службе, но в этом году все они были прикованы к своим телевизорам. Дома рядом с Центром пилотируемых космических аппаратов были украшены. Газоны вокруг дома Ловелла и по всему его поселению Тимбер-Коув были украшены мексиканскими фонариками, и четверо Ловеллов 30. Они 00, подъехала машина, в которой ехал высокий Санта-Клаус с большим мешком за спиной. Он подошёл к двери и громко постучал. Дверь открылась, и перед ним стоял Джеффри Ловелл, которому 14 января исполнится 3 года. Джеффри отшатнулся при виде этого. Мать подняла его, и Джеффри, всё ещё стесняясь, прижался к ней. «В прошлом году он убежал, плача», — сказала его 15-летняя сестра Барбара. Ранее ей приходилось бежать за ним, чтобы он не задул все фонарики. Другие дети Ловелла, 13-летний Джеймс и 10-летняя Сьюзен, наблюдали за происходящим с большим удовольствием. Наконец, Санта и дети скрылись внутри; подарки были положены под ёлку; подарки не будут открыты до сегодняшнего дня. Миссис Ловелл приготовила для гостей яичный ликер и печенье, и они посмотрели 25-минутную телевизионную экскурсию по Луне, которую провели три астронавта. Позже друзья провели для миссис Ловелл, Барбары и Джеффри экскурсию по окрестностям, ярко освещённым к Рождеству. Над ними на ясном небе ярко сияла четверть луны, и три астронавта, которые больше, чем кто-либо другой из людей, видели плоды творения, останавливаются в своих научны
Ciao, H
Auf der nächsten Seite, in Fach B1, schätzen wir, dass noch etwa 15 Prozent der Lebensmittel übrig sind. In Fach B2 haben wir PPK entfernt und Müll hineingelegt. In Fach B3 befinden sich das 16-Millimeter-Kabel, die 18-Millimeter-Linse und der Winkelspiegel an Fenster Nummer 4. Damit sind Sie auf dem neuesten Sta
- -... यह वही है जो... 0.5, 
D'accord. La Terre est passée à 26 degrés dans la direction opposée cette fois-ci,
ठीक है। हमन
Понял. Подожди немно
मैं हैच कवर पर लिखे अक्षर पढ़ सकता हूँ। यह बूस्ट कवर रिलीज़ है; और बड़ा पीला तीर जो खुल
Sulla base dei dati in nostro possesso, il tuo angolo di ingresso è 5,99. I dati del blocco che ti abbiamo fornito ieri sera sul pad per un midcourse-7 senza COMM non sono più validi perché abbia
نعم. يبدو أن لدينا انحيازًا سلبيًا بم
关于入场摄影，如果您使用全新的彩色内景胶片，我们建议以下曝光设置：光圈 f/11，快门速度 1/250 秒，每秒 6 帧，对焦距离 7 英尺（约 2.1 米），拍摄火球；光圈 f/2.0，快门速度 1/60 秒，每秒 6 帧，对焦距离 50 英尺（约 15 米），拍摄降落伞打开。如果您使用部分已用于拍摄内景的胶片，我们建议光圈 f/16，快门速度 1/500 秒，每秒 6 帧，对焦距离 7 英尺（约 2.1 米），拍摄火球；光
11, Houston. Je te donne un petit 
好的。这些只是清理工作，杰克。第 2-3 页列出了如何从 CM/SEP 等内容中分离出来，所以，很明显，如果我们在步骤 5 进行到 43 分钟时——那部分内容都要删除。一直删除到第 2-4 页，直到写
Das ist eine gute und treffende Beschreibung. Mir scheint, es macht einen Unterschied, einfach im Tunnel zu sitzen und alle Fenster zu betrachten; es ist wichtig, aus welchem ​​Fenster man schaut. Die Kamera filmt zum Beispiel gerade aus Fenster Nummer 5, und das Licht
Yes. It's coming
Okay. Die gleichen Kommentare. Ich fange hier nochmal ganz oben an. Okay. „BALANCE COUPLE“ sollte in „OFF“ geändert werden. Darunter sollte „LMP“ in „JET“ geändert werden. „400 plus 1“ bei -2 streichen; „MASTER ARM, ON“ bei -1 streichen. Bei -10 Sekunden „MANUAL ULLAGE“ hinzufügen; Zündung hinzufügen – der Kommentar „Wenn kein Start, START-Taste drücken; immer noch kein Start, DESCENT ENGINE COMMAND OVERRIDE, ON“ kann hinzugefügt we
はい、大
Хорошо. Отличное
So che tutti noi qui vogliamo ringraziarvi per
روجر. قمتُ بالالتحام في وضع التشغيل التلقائي، وكما ذكرتُ، لم أكن متأكدًا تمامًا من لحظة التلامس. ظللتُ أُراجع مؤشرات مسبار الالتحام. ظهر لي مؤشران يُشيران إلى أن مزاليج التثبيت الثلاثة - ليس مزاليج التثبيت، بل المزاليج الثلاثة - قد أغلقت، وأننا كنا في حالة التحام سلس. وفي ذلك الوقت، بدا الوضع مستقرًا للغاية. لذا، انتقلتُ إلى وضع التشغيل الحر، وألقيتُ نظرةً خاطفةً من النافذة، وبدا الوضع لا يزال مستقرًا؛ ثم أطلقتُ أسطوانة الغاز الرئيسية الثانية. وفي ذلك الوقت، بدأت حركة
尤里，大家一直都在为你送上最美好的祝愿，请代我向你
罗杰。我上次睡觉睡了四个小时，大部分时间睡得很好。我最后一餐是花生块、橙汁、三明治和什锦水
حسنًا. الآن أستخدم القمر الموجود على يساري، وهو حلٌّ ممتاز. سأقوم بتغطية مؤشر الوضعية، ويمكنك مراقبة الانحراف. سأترك الجيروسكوبات حرة، محاولًا اختيار وضع التحكم الإلكتروني المنخفض. سأضع القمر في منتصف النافذة أولًا، 
VITESS
Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Das System ist
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। सेंटर पैनल - मैं इंडिकेटर A देख रहा हूँ। पैकेज का तापमान लगभग 180 है। हीलियम का दबाव 3900 है। ईंधन का दबाव लगभग
了解、フランク。まだはっきりと聞こえてい
Roger. Ihre 
रॉजर। आपसे अनुरोध है कि O2 हाई रेट के बजाय केबिन रीचेक वाल्व का उपयोग करें। साथ ही, ध्यान रहे कि ह्यूस्टन का कहना है कि यदि संभव हो तो केबिन के माध
Okay. Ich denke, wir s
Да, Фред. Мы только что заметили, что у вас уменьшилось количество воды на 2 фунта. Вы недавно пили воду или знаете какую-нибудь причину, по которой её количество могло уменьшиться? Конец 
Хор
休斯顿
حسنًا. في الخطوة 34 ضمن قسم التخزين النهائي، وهو قسم مخصص لجميع الأغراض، توجد خطوة بعنوان "توصيل الجليكول الثانوي بالمبرد"، وفيها خيار "تجاوز، تحقق". أثناء وجودنا في هذا القسم، نود الانتقال إلى اللوحة 382، وهي لوحة التحكم بالماء، وضبط صمام التحكم في ماء المبخر، الأساسي والثانوي، على وضع "تلقائي". هذا إجراء كنا سنفعله لو قمنا بنقع النظام في درجة حرارة -12 ساعة، 
Ok. Ci abbiamo già pensato. Ci abbiamo pensato fin dall'inizio della partita. Rimetteremo 
रॉजर। ठीक 
Okay.
Das ist positiv, ich bin bereit für die 
Roger RKV, you broke up. I only got the first part and the 
Hous
OK. Ceci est un 9, /: 45597, moins 04
スコット、そちらの
- - our descent 2. Okay. I've got descent 2 now right up on 67
Mit D-9 konnten wir keine Dat
Okay. Die Wetterprognose für Ihren Landeplatz, etwa 560 Meilen südlich von Samoa, lautet: Windstärke ca. 1500, vereinzelt, hohe, brechende Wellen. Die Wellenhöhe beträgt ca. 1,5 Meter, der Wind weht mit 15 Knoten, die Sichtweite liegt bei 20 M
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Вы можете отключить заряд батареи «Браво», и нам нужен отчет о состоянии экип
Roger. Je reçois sur 17-1 angle de roulis 00 degrés; RN moins RP, plus 107;
注册号 1，加上 112
- - Qu
This is a reading on Phecda in--in the Big Dipper prior to entry in the, the, into t
20 feet, down a half; drifting forward just a
Okay. L'unica proposta che sembra essere questa, se lasciassimo che Jim faces
Gemini VI, Карнарвон. Вы можете перев
Роджер говорит, что нужно обязательно подождать хотя бы 5 м
Credo che in quel momento fossi in cima alla navicel
Va bene
Отлично. В данный момент у нас нет связи с мысом Доброй Надежд
Роджер. Проверка эксперимента D-8 № 1. Начало в 57. Проверка № 2. Начало в 01:30. Пункт № 4, версия 50, восходящий узел 102° 26. Пункт № 5: если возможно, фотографии тропического шторма у западного побережья, сделанные аппаратом S-6
조금 부족하다는 게 
感觉很好。检查手机和扬声器一切正
This little tape recorder has been a big benefit - has been a big benef
Ok, Houston. Qualche minuto fa ero perfettamente stabile sui dati, e da allora mi sono mosso verso il basso, puntando dritto verso il raggio vettore, e questo nonostante una serie di impu
你说得对，吉姆。在上升发动机罩后面，我们还有
コロンビア、ヒュースト
Das ist bestätigt, aber – nur zum Spaß – gehen wir diese Panels noch einmal durch, 
ठीक है, जैक। आपक
وأبولو 13، هيوستن. نود تغيير 
And right in this area, there are two craters. The one that's right in front of me now as I look off in about the eleven o'clock position from the spacecraft, about 30 to 35
로저. 연료 압력이 167, 
아, 간헐적으로요, 제리. 여기 소음이 꽤 심
مرحباً، 13؛ هيوستن. نحن مستعدون لأخذ نسخ
عندما انفصل الصاروخ المعزز، كان بالإمكان رؤية الوقود يتناثر من فوهة الدوران. وبينما كان الصاروخ يدور حول نفسه، ف
11, Хьюстон. Что касается расхода кислорода в топливном элементе 3: по-видим
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन CAP COM। हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप अपने कं
Oui, tout 
Okay. I'll get it the rest of the way. And I'll give it to you to 
Well, I can't say that this week hasn't
ヒューストン。プライマリパワーアン
Поня
Okay. Okay, Tom. I
لديّ 56 على الأكسجين و75. لا يوجد تغيير يُذكر في 
Okay. Dies ist ein al
好的。第二排，通过隔离
Voici un
रॉजर, नील। कॉलम 1 के अंतर्गत - यानी कॉलम लीमा, पंक्ति 06। नया डेटा 00001 है। पंक्ति 07, नया डेटा 02134 है।
Сотрудники склада опр
Diese Ar
Roger. Das sind 13 Grad links vom Schatten. Die nächste Frage bezieht
कृपया दोबारा बोलिए। बोलिए। हम 130 
Roger. Wir haben gerade festgestellt, dass es fehlt, und ja, wir würden es gerne beheben. Sie verstehen, dass wir Ihnen nicht vorschlagen, den Durchfluss zu erhöhen,
这里是休斯顿，11号台。我们的遥测数据显示，
Du machst eine gute Figur am Boden, O
真倒
제미니 4호, 카나본 CAP COM
Okay. Ein paar Dinge möchte ich noch klären: Ich möchte sichergehen, dass die Luken
ठीक है। मैंने नल - रोल नीडल और पिच नीडल को शून्य कर दिया है और अब मैं यॉ - रोल लेफ्ट पर हूँ। मैं लगभग 9 डिग्री लेफ्ट पर रोल हूँ
这是一个面积很大、分布很广的陨石坑；它有两个撞击坑，一个
好的。在 PC+2 之后，没有配平要求；而且，如果在 PC+2 期间发生发动机故障，后续的中段机动——最早的一次是在 PC+4。如果您没有进行 PC+2，但我们仍然想进行一次——稍后。在 PC+4 时，速度增量​​（D
Roger. Affermativo... L'eser
... I turned it on at 11:50 and at 12:15 I got the Attitude Mal Light which indicated that it was w
Кейп. Как вы 
짐, 컴퓨터가 필요 없으시면 ENTER로 전화해 주시겠어요? 저희가 여기서 안테나 B-D 전환을 처리하겠습니다
Guten Morgen
Zunächst einmal: Ich bin im automatischen Wiedereintrittsmodus; alles läuft auf Automatik; die Kreisel sind im Normalmodus; Manöver sind deaktiviert; alle Einstellungen sin
حسنًا. نريد منك أن تُبقي على وضعية المناورة حتى ننته
حسناً، الآن بدأت أرى كل تلك الجسيمات المختلفة، إنها بعيدة جداً.
ठीक है। बर्न 2 18 00 का गेट; डेल्टा-वी, 60.
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストンです。この時間、ダウンボイスバックアップの通信チェックを行いたいと思います。SバンドAUXテープをダウンボイスバックアップ、入力をLOWに設定してください。
D'accord. J'ai trouvé un créneau horaire pour vous, où vous serez au plus près du booster. Cela vous convient-il pour que vous puissiez le repér
ヒューストン
هيوستن، أبولو ١١. أعتقد أن المشكلة هنا تكمن في أن هذا الوضع ليس
Спасибо. Вы..
Oui, je crois que tu as raison. Dis donc, on voit bien l'affaissement. On voit bien où tout s'est accumulé au fond, dans le coin; tu sais, sur le bord, là où une bonne partie de la substance bla
Roger. Understand. Pete says to tell you that you'll have some time on the beach in Samoa to thaw out after this col
प्रणोद
Non siamo riusciti a fare nulla con D-9, era lì che potevamo registrare dati. Dobbiamo... Noi... Per S-6 abbiamo bisogno di un lungo sorvolo
Okay. On panel 250: circuit break
So che tutti n
حسناً. 
Le suivi des gyroscopes semble se faire sans problème. Pa
谢谢。迈克，是四个四连音，持续1
Avevamo agganciato il velivolo a circa 179 miglia e il radar ci ha puntato a circa 156; gli aghi sono relativamente stabili; sembrano piuttost
Хорошо, Вэнс. Процедура: УПРАВЛЕНИЕ НАВЕДЕНИЕМ,; РЕЖИМ У
Die Aussicht aus dieser Höhe auf Ho
ええと、もうすぐ地平線に着きます。ヨーはどうですか？ヨーはどうするんです
We have it closed; the closed - BALANCE LOADS circu
और मुझे ब्लेज़ पिकरिंग से किरणें निकलती हुई दिखाई दे रही हैं। अब हम अपने पी-1 प्रारंभिक स्थल के पास पहुँच रहे हैं, जिसे मैं देखने की कोशिश करूँगा। कृपया ध्यान दें कि गोल खिड़की, हैच वाली खिड़की,
Хор
11, Houston. Una piccola informazione per te, CDR. Ci siamo tutti presi una breve pausa dal lavoro per mangiare qualcosa di speciale, per assaggiare un pezzo di formaggio speciale, ovviamente. A quanto pare ci è stato spedito
Apollo 8, Houston. Vi mostriamo fino al 25% delle vostre acque
Vous p
間
看起来云层有好几层。一层很高的卷云…
Okay. When you get your - before you get your map book out, the Houston COMM TECHS have got a little word for an old e
好的。我们仍然飞往太平洋中部，坐标为357 152 359 267，正负时间为0813，负时间为16503 066 36221 647 12166 36301 0028，下一个目标群是十一月阿尔法星，V0 400 0210 0025 0335 0816 160590 312；英仙座ζ星，上升165度，右转34度，非出口航线；天狼星和参宿七，横滚308度，俯仰209度，偏航357度，无其他
Okay, and we're recording the time that that was complete. You have two lists there, one is to equi
Elapsed time is 1:05. Now, I'm
F5.6 Die letzten vier Aufnahmen waren mit 
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन क
Gem
11, ह्यूस्टन। नीचे टेप पर चल रही आपकी बर्निंग प्रक्रिया के दौरान, हमने सिस्
罗杰。+90，G&N：63481，-153，+132；
Od
Роджер. 104. 2+15. GMTR
Tu as enfin réussi à
알겠습니다. 아폴로 8호입니다. 추적 관련 요구 사항 때문에 통신 테스트를 잠시 연기해야 ​​할 것 같습니다. 현재 작업에 큰 지장을 주지 
我们希望您
روجر، هيوستن. سأتحدث قليلاً عن نظام تتبع البصريات لدينا. استخدمتُ خاصية "البصريات التلقائية" لنقطتي التحكم 1 و2 على الجانب الخلفي، وقد عملت بكفاءة عالية، حيث تتبعت الهدفين بدقة. ثم انتقلتُ إلى نقطة التحكم 3 المحددة في دليل التحكم المداري للاطلاع على خطوط الطول والعرض المُعطاة لي، واستخدمتُ خاصية "البصريات ال
26, 36 футов в секунду вверх. Будьте осторожны
로저
맞아요. 지금 저는 
Ricevut
Noch einmal, 
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон.
Roger. And, Mike, we'll have in about 11 minutes at 83 44. is 84 30, and prior to - or at, we would like you to go - Configure
캡슐은 현재 매우 잘 작동하고 있습니다. 250(인버터)은 132도, 150(인버터)은... 5도입니다. 대기(인버터)는 120도이고, 스러스터는 오른쪽, 왼쪽은 100도 이상입니다. 피치 다운(스러스터)
好的。有几件事我想确认一下。我想确认一下，如果可以的话，你们在滑道上
地元ニュースを少しお伝えします。ハンツビルの郡庁舎が昨日未明に全焼したため、再び建設工事が行われるようです。記事では、待つ家族について少し触れています。これはポスト紙記者のアン・ジェームズによるものです。「私たちは月の裏側で休んでいます」と、ヴァレリー・アンダースさんはクリスマスイブに家族とアポロ8号が月周回軌道を外れて帰還するのを待ちながら言いました。アンダースさんは火曜日の午前0時に帰宅し、近所の人たちが子供たち全員を集めてくれたので、宇宙船が月の裏側で通信不能になっている間、家族は休むことができました。フランク・ボーマン大佐の自宅は、屋外に4つの大きな常緑樹のリースが飾られ、粉雪が舞い、赤いリボンで飾られていました。書斎の木が彼の無事の帰還を待っています。ブロンドの愛らしい妻スーとたくましい息子たち、フレデリックとエドウィンは、真夜中に月周回軌道から離脱するまで家にいる予定です。普段はセント・クリストファーズ・エピスコパル教会の真夜中の礼拝に出席するのが恒例です。予定では午前0時に家族で集まります。ボーマン家には小さな子供がいないので、クリスマスプレゼントの贈呈はボーマン大佐が月往復飛行という素晴らしいホリデーギフトを持って戻ってくるまで待つことにします。マリリン・ラヴェル大佐の4人の子供たちは、子供たちに関しては全く普通のクリスマスを過ごす予定だと、忙しいラヴェル大佐の妻は言います。しかし、プレゼントの話はできませんでした。なぜなら、そのうち2人がすぐ隣に座っていたからです。「昨晩着ていた服をまだ着替えていないんです」とラヴェル夫人は言います。しかし、大人から大人への贈り物は、ラヴェルが帰宅するまでずっとそこにあるのです。アクションラインに良い記事があります。アクション編集者への短い手紙です。そこにはこう書いてある。「昨夜、地球の皆さんに空飛ぶ円盤でサプライズ訪問するつもりだったんです
정
Okay, Jack. Spontan fällt mir nicht ein, warum wir uns um die sofortige Steuerung kümmern sollten, da die Plattform ja abgeschaltet ist. Aber wir brauchen auf jeden Fall 15 Minuten Vorheizzeit, bevor wir die Triebwerke in Betrieb nehm
わかりました。もう一つ覚えておいていただきたいのは、私たちはまだ月を見ていないということです。月全体を見ていないし、帰る途中もほとんど見ていません。出発してから一度だけ月を見ましたが、視認姿勢から最短ルートへ移動する際に間違った操作をしてしまったのです。地球視
हाँ, ∆T भेज दो - ठीक रहेगा। मुझे यह बिना OAMS के च
Ро
了解。
नहीं, अभी नहीं - बत्ती बुझने तक इंतज़ार करो। क्या वो ची
혹시 더 자세한 소식을 원하신다면, 저희는 오늘 세 끼 식사를 모두 마셨고 물도 많이 마셨습니다. 짐은 지
Roger. Alles normal hier. Sieht gut aus. 55 % automatischer Treibstoff. Durchfliege 70.000 Fuß, 65.000 Fuß. Die Fluglage ist sehr stabil. Nähere mich auf 60.000 Fuß. Die Steigrate funktioniert sehr gut. Nähere mich auf 50.000 
روجر. 1، G&N: 62710، زائد 098، ناقص 019، 075 49 4965، ناقص 28897، ناقص 03944، ناقص 00686؛ 358 226 347؛ 01692، زائد 00610؛ 29173 602 29108؛ 31 106.6 358. قم بمحاذاة فيغا ودينيب 243 183 012. لا يوجد فراغ. الأفق في نافذة الفتحة قبل دقيقتين من 
Транквилити, Хьюстон. Запросите установку устройств для 
双子座4号
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। हमें नहीं लगता कि माइनस 03137 के इस पेरिजी पूर्वानुमान में कोई समस्या या गड़बड़ी है। यह एक केप्लरियन पूर्वानुमान है, और यह बहुत सटीक नहीं है। अब हमने डाउनलिंक से आपका वेक्टर लिया है 
정확히는 모르겠습니다. 비행 계획선에 수직으로 약 5~6마일 정도 떨어진 곳에 있는 것
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 예상 위치는 위도 + 0.799, 경도
تفضل يا فان
わかった。大丈
还有，13，你可能还
Mark Mode 4, Ap
Mann, es ist echt schwer zu beschreiben, wie die Erde hier aussieht. Ich schaue gerade aus meinem runden Fenster, das größer ist als die Erde im Moment. Ich kann die Terminatorlinie deutlich sehen. Ich kann fast ganz Südamerika erkennen, bis hinauf nach Mittelamerika, Yucatán und der Halbinsel Florida. Direkt vor der Ostküste ist eine große, wirbelnde Bewegung zu sehen, und weiter östlich kann ich noch Westafrika erkennen, wo es momentan ein paar Wolken gibt. Wir können bis hinunter nach Kap Hoorn in Sü
ठीक है। समझ गया। अगर मुझे इससे जल्दी बाहर निकलना है, तो मुझे पैनल 5 पर लगे दो सर्किट ब्रेकर खोल
क्या आपको तापमान और र
Die Erde wird in 1 bis 2 Minuten wieder im Zeitfenster
روجر. انتظر هنا حوالي نصف ثانية. حسنًا.
Perché non li chiamiamo e glielo 
Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Вы в курсе, что компания Eagle планирует вылеты примерно
Roger
罗杰。迈克，我们想就今天的表现谈谈我们的看法，如果
Okay, Fred-o. Auf Seite 12 benötigen wir die Updates. Wir haben einige Vektoren und ein Pad für dich. Sobald du diesen Zustand erreicht hast, geben wir dir Bescheid, wann wir die Verbindung herstellen möchten. Okay. Führe unter „Aktivierung und Selbsttest“ die gesamte Prozedur durch. Auf Seite 13, unter „AGS Aline“, führe Schritt 1 aus; unter „Set, Gimbal-/Gashebeltest“ führe Schritt 
उन्होंने आपके लैंडमार्क ट्रैकिंग के परिणाम भी देखे हैं। सभी अंक स्पष्ट रूप से बहुत अच्छे थे, और हमारे पास विभिन्न साइट स्थानों की ऊँचाई से संबंधित डेटा का एक पूरा पृष्ठ है, जिसे मैं आपको पढ़कर नहीं सुनाऊँगा, लेकिन मैं आपको यह बताना चाहता था कि अंक स्पष्ट रूप से बहुत अच्छे रहे। मेरे पास आपके उपभोग्य बजट भी हैं, विशेष रूप से प्रणोदक की मात्राएँ। यदि आप चाहें तो ये नाममात्र से डेल्टा हैं। आपका
Роджер. Пойми, они хотят, чтобы м
Роджер. Итак, на обороте 30-й страницы, Джим, у тебя в контрольном списке пустая страница, или дол
Roger. W
フレッド、まずは電圧、つまりBAT Aの電
سنقوم - هيوستن - بمناورات مستقبلية 
Roger. 
मुझे नहीं पता। मैंने उसकी तस्वीर खींची, लेकिन जैसे ही मैंने उसे देखा, सूरज खिड़की के पार आ गया। मे
حسنًا. في الأسفل، نحذف كل شيء باستثناء الخطوة الأولى، صمام التفريغ الأمامي، مغلق، والخطوة 10، وهي صمام التفريغ العلوي، مغلق، ونتركها في قائمة التحقق من
Oui, c'est sûr - la façon dont ça fonctionnait - la façon dont ça fonctionnait et restait verrouillé jusqu'au bout - Waouh,
Я бы сказал, что 
Was that when I was yawing right - lef
인디언 캡 콤, 보고드리겠습니다. 저는 현
この臭いを考えると、O2 High Rate を使わなければならないかもし
ठीक है। हम इस बात से सहमत हैं, औ
いや、フレッド、もう少し中心に寄せないとい
好的，休斯顿，你们有什么话要对
Поймите, у вас всё ещё есть воздушный шар. Возможно, если вы перейдёте в положение для развертывания, а затем вернётесь в положение для сброса, вы сможет
지금 에어글로우 필터를 사용하고 있습니
– Hier is
所以我们现在比打印出来的飞行计划提前了大约 3 分钟；最好
Wechsel zu Fly-by-Wire-Tiefflug.
はい、ロ
Okay. Wir überlegen, ob wir einen Teil davon mit 12 Bildern pro Sekunde aufnehmen sollten. Ich denke, wir können alles von 0,5 auf 0,5 g reduzieren; das ergibt nur etwa 7,8 Minuten Laufzeit und... Bilder... das Doppelte. Ich schätze, ein gelegentlicher Sprint mit 12 Bildern pro Sekunde wäre optimal, der Rest mit 6 Bildern pro Se
Friendship Seven. Hier spricht Canton Cap Com. Alle Systeme am Boden scheinen betriebsbereit zu sein. Die Temperatur Ihres 150-Voltampere-Wechselrichters beträgt aktuell 188° (188°). Ihre Uhren sind synchronisi
好了，三文鱼沙拉
... अपेक्षाकृत कम बना हुआ है। हम ओस बिंदु 
هذه قراءة لنجم فكدا في كوكبة الدب الأكبر قبل دخوله طبقة الض
أعدتُ تشغيل قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية وحصلت على جميع الأرقام التساعية. ولن نعيد ضبطها الآن من جميع ال
그리고 파노라마가 완성되었습니다. *** 그리고 
Okay. Jetzt verstehe ich, was du meinst. Ich spreche das nochmal mit den Leuten vom Fernsehen ab und frage nach ihrer Meinung. Sie wollten außerdem mit einer Hasselblad durch das Rendezvous-Fenster mit Rot- und Blaufilter auf Schwarzweißfilm fotografieren, und dann noch einmal mit Polarisationsfilter. Das Ganze soll dazu dienen, die Fernsehaufnahmen mit den Aufnahmen von normaler Filmfotografie zu vergleichen. Wenn du das für sinnvoll hältst und es selbst ausprobieren möchtest, spreche ich mit Jack und den
गिम्बल अच्छे द
ठीक है। करूँगा। मुझे यहाँ कोई रुकावट नहीं दिख रही, चार्ली। मैं बस यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए जाँच क
罗
... dé
네, 덤프 작업이 완료되었고 테이프 레코더를 돌려드렸습니다. 원하시는 대로 사용하셔도 됩니다.
J'ai remarqué dans les zones molles où nos empreintes de pas avaient près de deux centimètres de profondeur que le sol est très
Aquarius, Houston. We'd like you to go ahead and yaw 90 for the. Keep a close eye out on your middle gimbal angle. You're about 30 degrees from gimhal lock, and we'll call you an OMNI switch halfway t
أظن 
ठीक है। ह्यूस्टन, मुझे अभी पृथ्वी की रीडिंग मिली है। यह 320 है। पृथ
请注意，我发送了两次TX。我的飞船被
ATCA 
それともわかります
أنا سعيد لأنك فعلت ذلك - وأنت كذلك يا نيل؛ لقد كانت ف
Похоже, я иду прямо по правильному пути — возможно, мне 
세계 및 국내 뉴스, 그리고 특집 기사는 여기까지입니다. 스포츠면에서는 캔자스시티 치프스의 행크 스트램 감독이 AFL 올해의 감독으로 선정되었습니다. 3시즌 만에 두 번째 수상입니다. 투표는 AP 통신 소속 스포츠 기자 및 해설자 30명(각 도시에서 3명씩)으로 구성되었습니다. 스트램 감독에 이어 위브 유뱅크 감독이 가장 많은 표를 받았습니다. 샌디에이고의 시드 길먼 감독과 덴버의 루 세이빈 감독도 표를 받았습니다. 어제 열린 슈라이너스 대학 올스타전에서는 북부팀이 남부팀을 3대 0으로 완파했습니다. 미시간 주립대의 딕 베를린스키 선수가 1쿼터에 23야드 필드골을 성공시키며 북부팀의 승리를 이끌었습니다. 흥미로운 점은 퍼스트 다운 횟수에서 북부팀이 19, 남부팀이 16이었고, 러싱 
아니요. 아마 그렇지 않을 거예요. 하지만 어쨌든
에드워드, 네 생각만 말해.
Roger. Je n'ai pas bien compris votre question. Dès mon réveil, j'ai bu environ cinq gorgées d'eau, et je me suis également r
Bon, on a peut-être cassé le verrouillage bidirectionnel, mais j'avais toujours un AGC au niveau du bruit, 
了解しました。これらの負荷は入力済みで検証済みです。コンピュータでブロック状態に戻ってください。ジョージ・ローは、6番、つまり宇宙船104番のウィンドウの問題に取り組んでいると言っ
Deux autres points, Fred. Premièrement, nous ne prévoyons pratiquement aucun désalignement de votre moteur pendant la combustion, donc nous ne nous attendons pas à des variations de régime moteur significatives, d'autant plus que la poussée est très fa
OK, Houston. Sur DESCENT 1, la pression du carburant et de l'oxydant est de 10 psi; sur DESCENT 2, la pression du carburant est de 10 psi et celle de l'ox
Okay. Bitrate auf LO-Bitrate. VOICE-FUNCTION-Schalter auf DOWN VOICE BACKUP. POWER AMPS CB, offe
हम दुनिया का सबसे सटीक संरेखित मंच बनाने जा रहे हैं। हम एक घंटे से संरेखित होंगे। संभवतः हम अंधेरे से बाहर न
रॉजर। मुझे सम
Ho dormito molto profondamente e mi sono svegliato quando... è cambiato da due a uno e poi 
Es war größtenteils weiß, vielleicht mit einem Hauc
Хорошо. Остал
分かりました。パネル6の最初の項目は飛ばしてください。POWERをOFFにし、下の方まで飛ばしてSU
Roger, Tranqui
Ok
यह नकारात्मक है
Roger. Wir arbeiten daran. Stellen Sie den Men
Quanto tempo f
Apollo 8, Houston. We
D'accord, Jack. Nous ne voulons pas que vous fermiez ces deux dernières fenêtres. Ce sont des modifications de votre configuration de base,
Roger. Félicitations! Excellent
グア
Tutt
حسنًا. فهمت يا فريد. بخصوص تدفق الأكسجين، رأينا بوضوح منظم الطلب ينتقل إلى وضع الإيقاف ثم يعود إلى وضع المقصورة. أعتقد أنه ليس بالأمر ا
रॉजर। मैं 17-1 बैंक कोण 00 डिग्री पर कॉपी करता हूँ; RN माइनस RP, प्लस 107; 
ठीक है। मैं टीवी पर नकल करने के लिए तैया
Ja. Wir werden – ich werde in der gegen
और वहां पहुंचने पर आपको ATT HOLD की आवश्यकता 
상당히 큰 숫
Okay. Read you loud and clear now. Just wanted to remind you that in the event of a loss of COMM, we don't want you to burn 7. Your present entry is good. We'll be updating your landing points at the same time that you would have gotten 7, 
He
Вэнс, раз уж Джек в курсе дела, позволь мне задать вопрос о том, как мы планируем это сделать в середине процесса, если мы собираем
Wir sehen, dass die Trägerrakete alles richtig macht und
Хорошо. Если количес
Австралия, мы все к этому готовы, и..
वाह, ये तो बहुत बढ़िया है। मैं अभी-अभी इस विषय पर एक लंबा शोधपत्र लिख रहा था कि कम बिट रेट में हमें समस्याएँ क्यों आती हैं और हम इसका उपयोग क्यों नहीं कर सकते। तो ये बहुत अच्छी बात
콜럼비아, 콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴
食事：2日目の2食目まで食べました。
僕たちは...直径2つ分外れてる
Oh, certo, Jim. Siamo mol
两
알겠습니다. 그리고 T/M을 실시간 
अच्छा - ठीक है - तो चलिए आज सुबह देखते हैं कि यह एम-लाइन के समानांतर होने के कितना करीब आता है। पहली बार मार्किंग शुरू करने से पहले, ऐसा लग रहा था कि उन तीन कोणों की 
جيد، ناقص 00050، زائد جميع الأصفار، زائد 00001 000 334 001 خمسة أ
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。当你们停在0度横滚角时，你们的俯仰角大约为90度，偏航角为0度，横滚角也为0度。我们希望你们从这个姿态运行第一个程序，也就是选项3。然后我们会在你们机动到0度横滚角之前或期间，通过上传链路发送一个新的指令，之后你们可以扭转平台，运行第二个程序。完毕。运行第二个程
حسنًا. الإجراء هو الضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER)، ثم 333 ثم الضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER)، وقراءة السجل رقم 1. بعد ذلك، سيتم قراءة قيمة الذاكرة 10000 مرتين إذا كانت مُهيأة بشكل صحيح. إذا لم تكن كذلك، فسيتعين علينا تحميل القيمة 10000، وذلك بالضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER)، ثم 333 ثم الضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER)، ثم 10000 ثم الضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER)، ثم الضغط على مفتاح الإدخال (ENTER). الآن
Наконец-то выяснил, где находится Луна, и ваше текущее положение — если вы случайно посмотрите в правое окно,
خاض
双子座 VIII，
आगे बढ़ो, अपोलो 8
Roger. Capisco l'impressione generale di umidità che si è creata ne
रॉजर। यह सही है। और क्या आप यह पुष्ट
Индийская команда по разведке м
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 녹음기 대기실에 대기해 주십시오. 증기 압력을 확인해 주시기 바랍니다. 1차 증발기가 말라버린 것 같습니다. 증기 압력이 측정
E, Jack, il nostr
حسنًا. عليّ فقط تبديل أجهزة الإرسال والاستقبال متعددة الاتجاهات. حسنًا. بقراءة التغييرات يا جو، في الصفحات من 1 إلى 4، سخانات خلايا الوقود الثلاثة، إيقاف، وصولًا إلى خلية الوقود 1، ناقل رئيسي A، مركز - ناقل رئيسي A إلى إيقاف؛ ناقل رئيسي - خلية الوقود 2 إلى ناقل رئيسي A، إيقاف؛ خلية الوقود 3 إلى ناقل رئيسي A، اتصال داخلي، رمادي؛ إعادة ضبط ناقل رئيسي A إلى إيقاف؛ خلية الوقود 1 إلى ناقل رئيسي B، اتصال داخلي، رمادي؛ خلية الوقود 2 إلى ناقل رئيسي B، اتصال داخلي، رمادي؛ خلية الوقود 3 إلى ن
Non riesci a 
好的。第三行，打开接下来的五个——更正——打开左边的前五个，关闭 HEATER，关闭 SIG COND
Houston, Apollo 11. Sur cette étoile, la manœuvre AUTO fonctionne parfaitement. Je suis exactement au point substellaire. Tout est magnifique, s
分かりました。分かりました。まず第一に、これらのルールは厳しい制限のあるモード I の中止と同様であるべきというのが基本的な考え方です。では、皆さんがコピーできるように 1 つずつ説明していきます。分かりました。以下のいずれかの事象が発生した場合は、シャットダウンする必要があります。推力モニターの読み取り値が 77% 以下。推進剤タンク圧力 (これは入口圧力です) の機内読み取り値が 160 以下。燃料 OX DELTA-P が 25 psi 以上 (これは地上への呼び出しとなります)。姿勢誤差がプラスまたはマイナス 10 度 (始動過渡を除く)。姿勢レート制限が 1 秒あたりプラスまたはマイナス 10 度。また、
Ap
我读你的文字有点含
Okay. Alles klar. Jack, ich möchte noch etwas zur Dichtigkeitsprüfung der Luke sagen. Du entlüftest den Tunnel, bis du einen Druckunterschied von 3 psi erreichst. 
Roger, wir werden danach Ausschau halten. Das ist wirklich gut; wir werden danach suchen, aber nicht so viel Treibstoff verbrauchen. Jim scheint ziemlich gut abgesoffen zu sein. Er hat die letzten anderthalb Stunden nichts g
休斯顿的奥
收到。27区-BRAVO 分裂
Mann, in der Schwerelosigkeit hat man echt eine ganz andere Perspektive. Neil hat gerade die Füße auf der vorderen Luke und kann mit den Armen alle fünf Fenster erreichen. Er kann sogar bis zum Abfluss hinuntergreifen. Er kann fast bis i
Yes, 
好的。我这里有一段裁好的布料，我们把它纵向撕开…
Apollo 13, H
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Сейчас у нас низкая скорость передачи данных. Мы могли бы добиться лучших результатов с помощью антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления. Прежде чем вы перейдете на другую сторону,
네, 잭. 스위치 설정을 진행하셔도 됩니다. 잠시 후 메인 버스 타이 모터 스위치를 작동시켜 배터리가 식었을 테니 제대로 작동하는지 확인
ठीक है। और
こちらリカバリーです。アポロ13号は高度2,000フィートまで降下
罗杰，11. 尼尔，两副西装里都
Yuri, tout le monde t'envoie ses meill
И мы возьмём — у нас будет ВЫСОКОЕ КОЭФФИЦИЕНТ УСИЛЕ
알겠습니다. 첫 번째 P57 이후에는 E 메모리 덤
Aspetta un minuto,
अपोलो 8, जब तक हमें उच्च लाभ नहीं मिल जाता, मैं प्रक्षेप पथ का सारांश जारी रखूंगा। हम तेरहवें बिंदु से मध्य-प्रशांत रेखा पर वापस आ सकते हैं, और 138 सेकंड के बर्न के बाद आप अपने मार्ग पर
Better get that 
ها! ها! أراهن 
Okay, Houston. Apollo 11. Here's another 49 for you. Are you getting it on the 
Tu as combien de temps p
す
Ok. La pressione dell'elio è circa 37, la pressione del collettore è 182 e la quantità è 80. B ha una temperatura di circa 112, la pressione dell'elio di circa 36,5, la pressione del carburante di 180 e la quantità è circa 77. C ha una temperatura di 140 - tra l'altro, que
好的。断电后，我们预计您
D'accord. Atte
Qui Houston. Le vostre tariffe s
Ricevuto. Capito. Houston ti darà il via libera o il divieto di
好的。从倒计时6个半小时开始。你要重新准备很多便签纸，我不知道你想不想抄写。我可以把这些念给你听。完毕。除非你特别想抄，否则不
ठीक है,
ठीक है। समझ गया। 1
好的。杰克，这张照片是不是太暗了？你觉得把光
好了，主S波段功率放大器现在关闭
Roger, Deke. I'm on push-to-talk at t
…133時間より長い…ああ、そうだった、そうだった。彼は…木曜日の午後
No. I wouldn't say it was necessarily material that had been uncovered. I think some of the material might have been baked or in some way caused to be more cohesive and perhaps flow together in some way, I don't know. Now, in other areas, before we started trampling around out front, why, we could see that small erosion had taken place in a radially outward direction, but it had left no si
طاقة نظام التحكم في رد الفعل A وB-AC
로저 제미니 4, 휴스턴 CAP COM입니다. 11-BRAVO 업
Verstanden, Jack. Booster sa
Grazie, Michael. A titolo di curiosità, questi finestrini laterali sono così offuscati che quando il sole li colpisce, sono praticamente... sono davvero pessimi per qualsiasi osservazione vi
了解。はっきりと聞こえました
Well, I hate to stick my finger on it;
Roger. Zanzibar. Sorry I miscalled you. I am going to set my... setting on the suit coolant valve 
入っておいで、ガス。入ってみろよ。ちょっと大変だっ
روجر
Sì, sai che è stato un trucco intelligente da parte nostra, non an
Sembra che siam
好的。LMP的蓝色软管在LMP舷窗附近，当然，红色软管和蓝色软管之间隔着大约4英尺。好的。我们接下来要——另一根软
Okay. Very good. Well, we shut out the Sun coming in from the other windows into the spacecraft, so it's looking through a - the number 1 window, and there isn't any reflected light no
오로라 세븐... 95. 착륙 지점은 20
Je note la manœuvre de rétablissement que Charlie m'a montrée. L'étape 5 était: « Lorsque les taux de variation sont inférieurs à 0,05 degré par seconde, effectuez un contrôle d'attitude en lacet (PULSE). » Mais comment suis-je censé réduire mes taux à 0,05 degré par seconde? Mon indicateur de taux de variation e
ねえ、もう
收到。我们随
On ne peut pas faire grand-chose pour eux. En fait, ce n'est pas si mal… mais… sacrément malheureux. J'ai comme l'impression que… maintenant, quand je… juste avant… que ça tombe à zéro en une seconde, je va
キ
안녕하세요. 오늘 저는 아폴로 11호 임무의 상징적인 측면 몇 가지를 여러분과 나누고자 합니다. 지난 2~3일 동안 우주선 안에서 일어난 일들을 논의해 본 결과, 이번 임무는 단순히 세 사람이 달에 간 것 이상의 의미를 지닌다는 결론에 도달했습니다. 정부와 산업계의 협력팀의 노력 그 이상이며, 심지어 한 국가의 노력보다도 더 큰 의미를 갖습니다. 우리는 이번 임무가 미지의 세계를 탐험하고자 하는 인류의 끝없는 호기심을 상징한다고 생각합니다. 닐 영이 달 표면에 처음 발을 디뎠을 때 했던 말, "이것은 한 인간에게는 작은 발걸음이지만, 인류에게는 위대한 도약입니다." 이 말이 바로 이러한 생각을 잘 요약해 준다고 생각합니다. 우리는 달에 가는 도전을 받아들였습니다. 그리고 그 도전을 받아들이는 것은 필연적이었습니다. 우리가 비교적 수월하게 임무를 수행할 수 있었던 것은 바로 그 도전을 받아들인 시기적절함 덕분이라고 생각합니다. 오늘날 우리는 우주 탐사에서 더욱 확장된 역할을 수행할 능력을 충분히 갖추고 있다고 생각합니다. 돌이켜보면, 우리가 고심 끝에 선택한 우주선 호출 부호인 컬럼비아와 이글에 모두 매우 만족했습니다. 또한, 지구에서 달로 평화의 상징인 올리브 가지를 가져오는 미국 독수리를 묘사한 우리
रॉजर। मेरी स्थिति ठीक है; नियंत्रण मोड फ्लाई-बाय-वायर है; जाइरो सामान्य हैं; पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है। ईंधन 45-6-70 प्रतिशत है, यानी 45-70 प्रतिशत, और ऑक्सीजन 84-100 प्रतिशत है। मुझे बस एक छोटी सी समस्या है, और वो ये है कि मैं सूट के स्टीम वेंट का तापमान कम नह
罗杰。DELTA-V数据在AGS
Et, 13, Houston. Vérifiez votre angle d'
Stowing the camera at this time. Going to the gyro uncaging procedure
Salut Bill, peux-tu nous dire quels angles cela a parcourus? La courbe que nous avons tracée correspond apparemment à la limite RF plu
Say that aga
Роджер. Как вы оцениваете время восстановления? Конец связ
是的，也许是这样。这是一种非常奇特的耦合，它的响应时间比你想象的
حسنًا، الخطوة الثانية كانت في دائرة التحكم في الصعود ECA، أغلق اثنين منها. اشطب ذلك. في السطر التالي، كان لدينا تغذية البطارية 5 العادية، قيد التشغيل؛ اشطب البطار
I sure don't 
Это «Друж
はい、うまくいきました
في مكان
TRAVERSINE PRINCIPALI, due, ACCESE, Fred. Okay. VALVOLA DELL'ELIO, due, AUTOMATICA e palo del barbiere AUTO controllato. ALIMENTAZI
Другой нах
Das ist richtig.
はい
Nun, vor einer Minute sagte er das, um Ihnen mitzuteilen, dass er sich nach Ihren früheren Kommentaren zu seinem Werdegang und so weiter nun beruhigt habe,
Credo di sì. Vediamo, la p
実際のところ、まったく沈んでい
नेवी ने हडसन नदी के ऊपर से आप 
Роджер. 180 021 002, неприменимо, плюс 001
아니요. 방금 몇 분 전에 그 이야기를 나눴습니다. 습도는 60~63% 정도로 낮게 유지되고 있고, 눈에 띄는 습
The matter of anot
はい。ページ12、13のアクティ
Apollo 8, Houston. Falls wir diese Zwischenlandung nicht schaffen, werden wir trotzdem versuch
回収エリアの天候は良好です。雲は曇り、波の高さは3フィート、風速は8ノット、視程は10マイル、雲底
حسنًا. ممتاز. تذكر أن تغلق لوحة وجهك الآن. وتذكر أيضًا أن 
Columbia, Houston. Si consiglia di prendere i segni del sestante e di non reinizializzarli. P
Эд начал с распаковки оборудования, и как только мы оказались в положении, когда возиться с ускорителем стало невозможно, я стал помогать ему на полную ставку — по крайней мере, держал оборудование, укладывал его и старался, чтобы оно не пропало. Чем быстрее мы работали, тем больше отставали. Не потому, что мы неправильно раскладывали оборудование, просто это заняло гораздо больше времени, чем мы ожидали. В условиях невесомости это было не намного проще, чем на симуляторе, хотя и не намного. Так что мы работали весь круг. К тому времени, как мы добрались до Карнарвона, я уже решил, что мы не сможем это сделать, но подумал, что мы ещё немного поработаем. К тому моменту, когда мы добрались до Карнарвона — или чуть раньше, чем покинули его, — мне стало ясно, что мы не сможем выполнить разгерметизацию. Я запросил переход на следующий виток. Затем мы... перевели дух примерно на 20 минут и попытались разобраться с хламом, который валялся у меня в кабине. Затем я достал контрольный список, и мы еще раз подробно его проверили, чтобы убедиться, что ничего не пропустили в спешке. Начали выход в открытый космос — получили разрешение на пролет над Карнарвоном. Мы были полностью готовы и ждали разрешения на начало разгерметизации. Мы получили его. Прошли
13, Houston. Vorremmo che isolassi il tuo serbatoio di compensazione d
Gémeaux VI. Votre état est
फ्रेड जो खोल रहा है, वह एक पानी की थैली है जिसे हम अपने गले में बांध लेंगे और जिससे हम चंद्रमा की सतह पर रहते हुए पानी पी सकेंगे। पीट और 
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。皆さんのフレンドリーなグリーンチームは今夜、最後の飛行に出発します。良い夜をお過ごし
你肯定不想——你肯定不想把减速伞和探针放
Последний номер, который вы м
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Качество записи с ленты очень хорошее. У нас осталось около 15 минут на запись, что мы сде
Roger. Vos gyroscopes 
血圧をもう少し上
ठी
На данный момент я завершил проверку двигателей большой мощности. Отчёт отложен. Все оси работали безупречно. Сейчас у меня 75% (автоматический режим) подачи топлива и 75% (
罗杰，复古模式正在运行
Roger, be advised... the Command Pilot has started the sleep cycle and I
收到
好的。我正在设置偏航角。我已经可以看到偏航角为-
Хорошо. Секунду, мы сейчас это проверим. Тогда вы сможете вернуться к наблюд
请继续，
दरअसल, बात ठीक से नहीं हो पा रही है क्योंकि दुर्भाग्यवश हमारे पास रेडियो बंद करने का कोई तरीका नहीं है। इसलिए जब हम इस तरह बात कर रहे हैं, तो एड हम दोनों को सुन सकता है; हालाँकि उसने आवाज़ कम कर रखी है, मुझे यकीन है कि वह अभी हमें सुन
Ce n'est pas vrai partout, mais il existe certainement des endroits où l'on observe une pente descendante 
रॉजर। समझ लो कि यह 122 15 है, जी एंड एन डिक्
ح
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。电脑是你的了
ओह, रो
了解。ターミナルフェーズの経過時間、開始1プラス29プラス17、GET、5プラス16プラス54、デルタV
Roger. Gemini 8, Houston. We would like to bring you up to date on the COMM situation while we've got some quiet time here. We'll be Tananarive in another 2 minutes; we'll be picking you up over Carnarvon at Carnarvon will be; then we've got number 1 coming in about; and after that, we
Да. Думаю, у нас есть на это причина. Подожди
아주 좋아요. 부모님이 저를 자랑스러워하실까요? 제가 지금 엑서지
E un'altra domanda, Houston. Vuoi davvero tirare fuori l'interruttore ASA? Vuoi rinunciare def
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। हम आपको थो
ठीक है। मैं फिर से
알았어, 잭. 아무래도 우리는 상승용 탱크를
Das
好的，非常感谢。陀螺仪的最大漂
Sì. Dov'è 
好的。刚才两个天线都出现了
नहीं, नह
आपकी यात्रा
マイク、NAVの観測結果について興味深い見解があります。帰還時に最小インパルス制
是的，我们将去做其他事
ええと、あのサンプル一つだけ見てみたら、もっとたくさんの塵がな
इससे बेहतर ऑफर और क्या हो सकता है? आज आपके 
Et je n'ai pas reçu la position de votre commutateur gyroscopiq
Siehst du das? Buzz schaut normalerweise nach – beobachte einfach mal kurz Fenster 5. Siehst 
또 다른 지역 소식입니다. 헌츠빌 카운티 법원이 어제 새벽에 화재로 전소했습니다. 따라서 그 자리에 다시 건설 사업을 해야 할 것 같습니다. 한편, 귀환을 기다리는 가족들에 대한 소식도 전해드립니다. 앤 제임스 기자가 보도한 내용입니다. "우리는 달 뒷면에서 쉬고 있어요." 발레리 앤더스는 크리스마스 이브에 가족과 함께 아폴로 8호가 달 궤도를 벗어나 지구로 귀환하기를 기다리며 이렇게 말했습니다. 앤더스 씨는 화요일 새벽 0시에 도착했고, 이웃들이 아이들을 모두 데려가 우주선이 달 뒤편에 있어 통신이 두절된 동안 가족들이 편히 쉴 수 있도록 도와주었습니다. 프랭크 보먼 대령의 집은 야외에 커다란 상록수 화환 네 개가 걸려 있고, 고운 눈이 뿌려져 있으며, 빨간 리본으로 장식되어 있었습니다. 거실에는 그의 안전한 귀환을 기다리는 크리스마스트리가 놓여 있었고, 금발의 아름다운 아내 수와 늠름한 두 아들 프레더릭과 에드윈은 자정 무렵 달 궤도를 벗어나는 순간을 집에서 지켜볼 계획이었습니다. 평소 같으면 그들
햇빛을 내려다보니 피부가 아주 까
D'accord, Jack. Et
Okay. Unter „VHF/S-Band-Aktivierung und -Überprüfung“, Schritt 2, haben wir Änderungen an der COMM als Kolleg
Wir konnten Südamerika, Florida und den südlich
ठीक है। यह सही है। प्राथमिक वाष्पीकरण जल नियंत्रण वाल्व को ऑटो पर से
हम अभी अरिस्टार्कस के 
P22에 대한 모든 절차는 아주 잘 작동하는 것 같았습니다. 다만 한 가지 이상한 점은 DAP 추진기가 작동했다는 것입니다. 가속 명령(ACCEL COMMAND)에는 피치를, 회전율 명령(RATE COMMAND)에는 롤과 요를 입력했는데, 어찌 된 일인지 롤과 요가 과
11, это Хьюстон. У нас осталось примерно 6 минут, и чтобы мы могли настроить линии связи, мы хотели бы узнать, планируете ли вы по-прежнему включать телевизор с началом следующего прохода. Конец связ
罗杰。理解横滚零度、俯仰角0.25
Okay, Jack. Are you wi
حسناً. أل
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, ये है कैनरी कैप कॉम। आप कैसे 
Apoll
私たちは「zap」という言葉を辞
Apollo 8, Houston. You can go ahead and run that 37 and we're going to kind of watch that from the ground, too, and see how it works out. A couple of items that are just
Что ещё нам нужно сделать? Сканеры должны
Roger. Freut mich zu hören. Wir haben uns gerade über eine Wasserentnahme hier
..
PCMビットレートは「
Okay, Joe. Es sieht so 
ठीक है। कमांड मॉ
D'accord. Bonne idée. Nous avons longuement réfléchi aux manœuvres à vous autoriser pour photographier le module de service. Nous considérons cela comme une priorité assez basse; il serait certes intéressant d'avoir des photos du module, mais elles ne sont pas indispensables à notre programme de dépannage. Concernant l'autorité de contrôle d'attitude, etc., nous vous donnerons plus de détails ultérieurement; nous y travaillons. Il sembler
انتظر حتى أنته
١١، هيوستن. أثناء عملية الاحتراق التي تم عرضها هنا، لاحظنا انخفاضًا طفيفًا في ضغط خزان النيتروجين "برافو" في النظام، أكثر مما توقعنا. الضغط مستقر حاليًا. سنواصل مراقبته وسنُطلعكم على أي جد
Roger, Bill. Merci. Vous captez encore quelqu
- - SPENTO. E tutta la 
Oui. C'était une nuit très calme. 
Cl
プロットボードをそこから取
11, Houston. Sobald Sie fertig sind, möchten wir Ihnen einen 
阿波罗8号，休斯
I was a little worried. Thi
그보다 조금 늦어질 수도 있지만, 다시 말해서 한 시간쯤 후에 준비를 시작
뒤쪽부터 살펴볼게요.
시그마 세븐, 여기는 HF 대역의 워터타운 캡 콤입니다. 제 목소리가 들리신다면, 케이프 플라이트 관제소에서 UHF 대역으로 전환하여 중계 항공기와 교신을 시도해 달라고 요청하고 있
Роджер. Начнём с мировых новостей. Всеобщие поздравления американским астронавтам «Аполлона-8» и надежды на международное сотрудничество в освоении космоса сопровождались рождественскими посланиями, разосланными по всему миру, пока крошечный космический корабль вращался вокруг Луны. Даже в коммунистическом мире царил энтузиазм по поводу первого полёта человека на Луну. В Москве советский учёный Анатолий Бесаранов вспомнил, что его страна и Соединённые Штаты уже обменивались знаниями о космосе, и предсказал, что полёт «Аполлона-8» приведёт к дальнейшему сотрудничеству. На Кубе радио Гаваны ретранслировало программу «Голоса Америки», чтобы рассказать слушателям о речи «Аполлона-8». Представители «Голоса» заявили, что это был первый случай, когда программы американских агентств транслировались по радио Гаваны. Чехословакия наблюдала за полётом на Луну благодаря обширному телевизионному освещению; а в Будапеште, Венгрия, в поездах и автобусах почти ни о чём другом не говорили. В некоммунистическом мире офисные работники и покупатели рожде
Okay, Joe. -7:, meno 0003.1, più 
Роджер. 01 0688 259, Персея Зета, вниз 048, влево 05. Остальное неприменимо. Сириус, Ригель, 129 155 010; отрицательный зазор. Горизонтальное окно, зажи
Колумбия, Колумбия, Хью
في مركز التحكم، ربما ترغبون بالانضم
罗杰。来自阿波罗8号地面的圣诞祝福，非常感谢你们的讲解，我们玩得很开
This is Friendship Seven. It drifts about out 20° to the right and then 
फ्रेड, 1 नंबर पर तैयार 
弗兰克，我一直在想，如果我是一个来自外星
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया ओम्नी सी में है, चार्ली, वॉइस बैकअप बंद करो और जब आपको समय मिले, तो क्या आप मेरे लिए 130 के निर्देशांक देख सकते हैं? मेरे क्यू कार्ड और फ्लाइट प्लान में विरोधाभासी जानकारी है। मैं जानना चाहता हूँ कि आप मुझसे कौन से निर्देशांक इस्तेमाल करने को कह 
रॉजर। मेरी स्थिति ठीक है; ईंधन 51 प्रतिशत और 69 प्रतिशत दिखा रहा है; ऑक्सीजन 84 प्रतिशत और 100 प्रतिशत है; केबिन का दबाव ठीक है। डीसी और एयर कंडीशनिंग दोनों की पावर ठीक है। उड़ान योजना के संबंध 
あれは
Attends Buzz. Ça a l'air plutôt bien, d'après ce que je 
... बहुत अच्छा काम करता है, लेकिन मुझे नहीं लगता कि वह किसी को समझ सकता है। इसलिए मुझे ही बताना पड़ेगा। बंदूक बढ़िया काम करती है। वह हर तरफ पैंतरेबाजी कर
R
追加点ですが、これはジャックさんへの質問です。少し前にメインバ
이제 2분도 채 남지 않았습니다. 아직 깨어 계시다면 다음 방송은 114 04입니다. 이상
它们应该已经升
Fred, we already got that story for you, pretty well in hand. We're reviewing it right now. And I'd like to defer that question until later on. Basically, we're just going to shut down and take what we got, and we got a midcourse of about - the maximum of
Exactement. C'était ça. Le Ca
Хорошо. И я буду держать вас в кур
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 전송하실 데이터가 있습니다. 수락해 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 데이터는 슬롯에 들어갈 사전 상태 벡터와 사후 상태 벡터, 그리고 목표 데이터로 구성되어 있습니다. 괜찮으시다
Hier ist eine interessante kleine Neuigkeit, die man eigentlich ganz gut hören sollte. In Ann Arbor, Michigan, gibt es anscheinend eine neue Jugendgang. Sie nennt sich Gilnet Gang. Sie zieht durch die Straßen von Ann Arbor, agiert im Verborgenen und umgeht dabei manchmal das Gesetz. Sie 
Роджер. У меня 20 игроков на позиции нап
休斯顿。双子座VIII型，带一个点
ये लोग बहुत ज्यादा आवाज करते हैं, है ना? वैसे शायद ये
Anelli di prova A e B
Rog
Roger. Sigma Seven. Flag P
Okay, Jack. We've got attitude control now in the. We're going to try to rotate up t
D'accord. La seule question est: que voulons-nous indiquer à ce
Another comment on the optics. We're in right now. We are passing the - we have the roll of about 182; we're about in 226 pitch and 18 in yaw. I can rotate the shaft all the way around at this particular attitude, and I get this band of light at about 10 degrees of this side of the M
Gemini 4, Hawa
После стабилизации мы проверили всю нашу систему управления тягой и обнаружили, что у нас отсутствует управление рысканием и креном — или, вернее, отсутс
حسناً. أكرر. ΔV 167. 3+35. GETRC 01 32 35. ير
Roger. Your suit tem
Sigma Seven. Continuerò a parlare nella speranza che possiamo risolvere questo problema di blackout. A 17K,
Well, here we have some cocoa; should be good. I'll be adding about 5 ounces of hot water to that. These are little sugar cookies, some orange juice, corn chowder,
Jim, die Situation ist die, dass wir momentan etwas zu flach sind, und der
分かりました。そういったものは何も持っていなかったので、特に問題はありませんでし
ジャック、とても快適です。これまで何度か試験運用を行っており、実は今も再試験運用中です。ここヒューストンとケープカナベラルの両方で試験運用しました。事前に準備
Apollo 11, Houston. Je me demandais si vous aviez comparé la 
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。还有一分钟到达加那利群岛；塔那那利佛37时04分，甚高频单
제미니 4호, CSQ. 고다드 루프 때문에 계획이 틀어졌네요. 해치가 닫
Okay, 13; Houston. Just as an ite
鹰号和哥伦比亚号卫星，哥伦比亚号卫星还有大约1分钟就到了。看起来我们还有大约51.5分钟的距离，我们倾向于确认你的Y点。然后，休息一下。鹰号卫星方面，请确认VHF Bravo发射
كيف كان الإقلاع؟ م
D'accord. Faisons attention à ne pas perdre cet appareil photo. Je ne l'ai pas encore tout à fait. Encore un petit peu, mais doucement, doucement, doucemen
好的，迈克，事情是这样的——你知道，你当时坐在那里监控，在步骤 7，你进入了 NOUN 01，输入了地址，然后是 INFORMATION INFORMATION；在你最后一次按下回车键（35400 ENTER）之后，它就把你带回了步骤 16。然后当你按下回车键时，你实际上是在向实际的 CDU 输入信息；当你把这两个条目输入到寄存器 1 和 2 时，实际的 CDU 发生了瞬间变化，它查看了变化，看到了它认为它接收到的信息。我的天哪，我得到了每秒 600 度的速率。然后它启动了喷气发动机来试图消除这个速率。它所监测的速率滤波器——它监测的速率是经过滤波的，所以它实际上只有在温度达到一定值后才能感知到实际速率。然后它开始读取速率滤波器，并发现
逆噴射はすべて自動で行われた。カウントダウンの1分前、いや1秒前だった
Roger, Al. Ich bin im Automatikmodus; Rückwärtsgang; die Kreiselschalter sind normal; Manöver sind deaktiviert. Die Kapsel ist für den Rückwärtsgang vorbereitet, bis auf das Verstauen zweier Karten. Ich bin sicher, wir können starten. Ich habe 81 % Automatik (Kraftstoff) und 80 % manuell (Kraftstoff), was meinem Zwischenbericht entspricht. Daran hat sich nichts geändert. Ich habe 52 psi (in Hunderten) Sauerstoff auf der Primäranlage und 75 psi (in Hunderten) auf der Sekundäranlage. Der Anzug ist bei 62 Grad startbereit. Alles wie 
알겠습니다. 배터리 브라보의 충전을 111+15에서 종
Да. Теперь, когда мы знаем, где находится (неразборчиво), в следующий раз будет намного проще. В первый раз, когда мы искали Каир — Каир и Александрию, — мы довольно долго находили (неразборчиво). Я так и не увидел аэродром. Я видел только местность. Я предположил, что если правильно направлю камеру, то сфотографирую Каир. Но на этот раз я действительно запечатлел аэродром. То же самое с Александрией. Думаю, если вы собираетесь сфотографировать что-то подобное, возможно, стоит один раз проехать мимо, внимательно рассмотре
Jupe SEP... tou
了解。望遠レンズは使わない。地球の写真は撮れないと思う。月面、つまり
Ok. Elimina "AUTO SELECT, 16, OFF". Cambia "CB LOGIC POWER" in "LOGIC THRUST POWER - CBS CS LOGIC THRUST, quattro, su chiuso". Elimina "DELTA-V CG", che scende qui sotto "SIGNAL CONDITIONER/DRIVER BIAS POWER, uno, AC 1; POWER, 1, su ON", ed è il numero 1. "POWER su 1; MODE, tre, su RATE 1", eliminando "AUTO SE
收到。我现在把所有评论都读一遍，确保我们理解正确。使用 NC-4，步骤 1 到 11；然后按照 NC-7 页上的无通信程序进行经度控制；走廊控制图的 Victor 400K 平均值为 36253；当 GERU 小于 07990 时，中止后可以执行负 M
No, I haven't. I've tried not to open the visor. I want to get the ci
Ok. Ecco cosa faremo. Metteremo Fred di guardia qui, e io e Jack ce la prenderemo comoda, e se Fred copia 
В любом случае, нам не нравятся эти обогреватели, работающие от прямых нагревательных элементов
أتحقق من الأنظمة الأخرى. يبدو أن جميعها مستقرة إلى حد كبير. درجة حرارة قبة البدلة لا تزال حوالي 71 درجة، ومدخل البدلة 62 درجة، وهي درجة حرارة مريحة هذه المرة. يتطابق ض
罗杰。你当时是不是正看着太阳，然
चूंकि आप पहले से ही यात्रा पर हैं, इसलिए आपको यह जानकर शायद दिलचस्पी हो कि ह्यूस्टन की ज्योतिषी रूबी ग्राहम का कहना है कि चंद्रमा की आपकी यात्रा के लिए सभी संकेत अनुकूल हैं। उनका कहना है कि नील चतुर है, माइक में अच्छी समझ है और बज़ जटिल समस्याओं को सुलझाने में माहिर है। उनका यह भी कहना है कि नील दुनिया को गुलाबी चश्मे से देखने की प्रवृत्ति रखता है, लेकिन वह हमेशा पीड़ित या परेशान लोगों की मदद करने के लिए तत्पर रहता है। नील, आपके पास "अंतर्ज्ञान है जो आपको जीवन को भावनाओं के साथ समझने में सक्षम बनाता है।" बज़ बहुत मिलनसार है और अकेले रहना बर्दाश्त नहीं कर सकता, साथ ह
Хорошо. Это предполагает, что все BAT-модули нисходящего типа подключены к сети, а BAT-модули восходящег
Ed, ici le centre de commandement des opérations aériennes de Houston. Je ne vous reçois pas, je ne comprends pas ce que vous dites. Apparemment, vous 
Роджер. Доброе 
좋아요. 짐, 좋은 생각이에요. FAO에서 괜찮으시다면 자기 전에 사진 한 장만 
حسناً، سنحصل على صورة ع
Dépressurisation de la
了解しました。まずは世界のニュースから始めましょう。アメリカのアポロ8号宇宙飛行士たちへの称賛と、宇宙探査における国際協力への期待が、小さな宇宙船が月を周回する中、世界中にクリスマスイブのメッセージとして届きました。共産圏でさえ、人類初の月への旅に熱狂が沸き起こりました。モスクワでは、ソ連の科学者アナトリー・ベサラノフ氏が、自国とアメリカが以前に宇宙に関する知識を共有していたことを振り返り、アポロ8号の飛行がさらなる協力につながると予測しました。キューバでは、ラジオ・ハバナがボイス・オブ・アメリカの番組を再放送し、アポロ8号の演説をリスナーに伝えました。ボイスの関係者によると、米国の機関の番組がハバナのラジオで放送されたのは初めてとのことです。チェコスロバキアでは、テレビの広範な報道を通して月面飛行の様子を目にしました。ハンガリーのブダペストでは、電車やバスの中では月面飛行以外の話題はほとんど聞かれませんでした。非共産圏では、オフィスワーカーやクリスマスの買い物客たちは、宇宙船が地球への打ち上げに向けて準備される様子を息を呑んで見守っていた。街頭に繰り出したフランス人たちは、アメリカのノウハウとこの宇宙での偉業を称賛し、テレビで月面の映像を観ている視聴者の中には「素晴らしい！」と歓声を上げる人もいた。ロンドンでは、クリスマスの買い物客たちが店やパブに押し寄せ、月のクレーターのテレビ映像を観賞した。英国の第一人者である宇宙天文学者バーナード・ラベルは、数週間前まで宇宙飛行士の命を危険にさらすことなく観測機器で観測を行うことができるという理由でアポロ8号計画を批判していたが、今回の月面飛行には深く感銘を受けたことを明らかにした。教皇パウロ6世は、人類の知性と活動の拡張を先導したこれらの人々に敬意を表した。しかしながら、クリスマスの航海を「軽蔑」するケチな人はごくわずかだった。最も注目を集めたのは、ロンドンの地球平面協会の事務局長サミュエル・シェントン氏で、彼は国民が「騙されている」と発言しました。フランクさん、この発言についてどう思
Se lo si allinea a una velocità di 90 cm al secondo, con uno scarto di 10 gradi sulla piattaforma, sarebbe difficile p
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन; 13. हम थोड़ी जल्दबाजी कर रहे हैं। क्या हमें फ
Okay. Ich nehme an, wenn Jack in dieser Position nach Angabe der groben Anstellwinkel keine Sterne sehen kann, werden wir Ihnen nicht einfach unsere Kardanwinkel vorlesen und Sie bitten, einen Zielwinkel für Jack zu berechnen, sondern Sie möchten, dass er Mond und Sonne anvisie
Seven, thi
Exactement, Jim. Ce serait intéressant de voir ce que vous faites dans le coin du vaisseau spatial où se trouvent les optiques. Il serait peut-être intéressant de décrire ce que vous allez faire
Stand by one, Charlie; w
Ok. A questo punto sono in modalità di controllo 
Comment ça s'est p
Roger. Wir stim
Canarino, Gemelli 4. Tieni presente che non c'è abb
ठीक है। अच्छी तरह से पढ़कर समझ आया। पृष्ठ पर आगे बढ़ते हैं। "बैलेंस कपल" स्विच, "बैलेंस कपल बंद।" ठीक है
Roger. And next item, the supercritical helium rise rate is nominal, and you also had that question for us about your thruster activity during the on the last REV. Believe we 
Okay, now, Neil, when you feel us contact, you're going to turn... second
D'accord. Roger. C'est exact pour le code AUTO OPTICS et l'absence de point de repère. Je vais donc continuer au lieu de poursuivre – ou j'utili
Qu'a-t-il dit à p
روجر، هيوستن. المشكلة الوحيدة هي 
ضغط المق
好的。读取以下设置：向上遥测命令关
No, non lo è..
Roger; esatto, Fred-o. E ora vorremmo fornirti una configurazione per collegare il tuo vettore di stato al carico target. Quindi, se sei pronto a copiare, ho a
Gemini 4, вы можете выключить ра
Roger, Seven. À toi d'essayer, 
네, 알겠습니다. 아마 오늘 오후에 그 서류를 보내드렸을 겁니다. E-8 페이지를 보시면 입력 확인 작업이 1시간 후에 실행된다고 나와 있는데, 아시다시피
Роджер. Батарея адаптера 1 имеет напряжение 24,5 вольта, 1A — 7,0 ампер. Батарея адаптера D имеет напряжение 24 вольта и ток 6,8 ампер. Батарея 1C имеет напряжение 24 вольта и ток 6,9 ампер. Батарея 2A имеет напряжение 24 вольта и ток 8,5 ампер. Батарея 2B имеет напряжение 24 вольта и ток 8,3 ампер. Батарея 2C имеет напряжение 24 вольта 
Now, let's see. What should we be doing here
«Аполлон-11», 
알겠습니다. 모든 시스템 정상
알겠습니다. 연료 압력은 자동변속기 차량은 100%, 수동변속기 차
디텐트에서
아, 네. 만약 그가 당신이 유지할 SEP 자세에서 별을 
रॉजर। हम अपने वॉयस चैनल पर इस अपलिंक की जाँच करेंगे। टीवी पर जो ट्रांसमिशन था - हम गोल्डस्टोन में लगभग 10 मिनट का सिग्नल प्राप्त करना चाहेंगे ताकि जब वे इसे वापस हमारे पास भेजें तो हम ह्यूस्टन में कैमरे की गुणवत्ता को लगभग 10 मिनट तक देख सकें। हम यह कह रहे थे
ठीक है। यही आखिरी चीज़ थी जो मुझसे छूट गई थी। और जब तक हम यहाँ निर्णय लेने का इंतज़ार कर रहे हैं, मैं आगे बताता हूँ। स्वीकार्य डेडबैंड 660 और 770 psi के बीच है। दूसरे शब्दों में, कोई भी राइज़ टाइम जो आपको इन दोनों के बीच का दबाव देगा, वह आपको लगभग 103 घंटों पर क्रिटिकल प्रेशर से नीचे रखेगा। इसलिए, हम उम्मीद करते हैं कि रीडिंग इसी बैंड में आएगी और अगर ऐसा होता है, तो कोई समस्या नहीं होगी। अगर रीडिंग 770 और 800 psi के बीच आती है, तो हम चाहेंगे कि आप लगभग 59 घंटों पर दबा
On va laisser tomber 
Stand by Buzz. It looks pretty good as far as I could tell. We got the - along the tropical convergence line there, there's a few clouds shown on the weather map I'm looking at here, but nothing of significance. Right now - Stand by. Let's see, right now in the mid - yes, at the MPL - we've got 3000 scattered, visibility 10, waves height 3 feet, is the present weather. I don't think there's anything forecast to be of significance. There are a couple of - FLIGHT just informed me that what I just gave you was the forecast. are a couple of tropical storms in th
六分儀は私の足の
انتظر يا باز. يبدو الوضع جيدًا على حد علمي. لدينا - على طول خط التقارب الاستوائي هناك، تظهر بعض السحب على خريطة الطقس التي أطلع عليها هنا، لكن لا شيء يُذكر. الآن - انتظر. لنرى، الآن في منتصف - نعم، في منطقة الهبوط - لدينا 3000 غيوم متفرقة، والرؤية 10، وارتفاع الأمواج 3 أقدام، هذا هو ا
Friendship Seven, Guaymas. Du warst dabei, als die Verbi
로저. 나 방
ओह, हाँ, चार्ली। अब मैं इसे सेक्स्टेंट से देख सकता हूँ, और मुझे दिख रहा है कि तटरेखा साफ है। वे बादल ब
Bene. In basso, dopo "Pulsante PRINCIPALE DI DISTRIBUZIONE, PREMERE; SERBATOIO DI SOVRALIMENTAZIONE O2, OFF; e RIPREN
حسناً. يبدو أن الطريقة الوحيدة التي سنتمكن من خلالها من القيام بذلك هي إيقاف تشغيل المش
네,
Se riesco a raccogliere un po' del cibo di Bill qui intorno e a portarlo via... In questa zona si trova la cosiddetta stiva inferiore, dove abbiamo le nostre apparecchiature ottiche di posizionamento. Eseguiamo tutta la nostra navigazione qui sotto osservando le stelle e gli orizzonti della Luna o della Terra. Ed è qui che scopriamo esattamente dove ci troviamo nello spazio
حسنًا. يا له من إنجاز! أصبحت أصابعك الذهبية سريعة جدًا لدرجة أننا أغفلنا بعض العلامات ف
मैं मुख्य बैटरी नहीं लगाना चाहता था। आपको बस ORBIT RATE, platform FDM 
Да, я загрузил координаты 
알았어. 그냥 놔둘게, 버
Okay. You can get those configures when you can. And the next order of business I've got for you is a procedure to verify that MAIN BUS B is good. And a little after that, we'll want to read up to you, for your fut
이륙은 어땠나요? 이륙할 때 어떤 
इस कैमरे का लेंस खराब हो गया है... उस कैमरे का भी... सेक
Yes, I think it can too, Ed. I said that... ... looked
Sai, è una buona cosa che non possiamo
अब इंसर्शन चेकलिस्ट देख रहा हूँ। डीसी वोल्ट मुख्य है। रेट्रोमैनुअल फ्यूज स्विच बंद है। रेट्रोमैनुअल बंद है। सभी उपकरण ठीक हैं। सभी बैटरियाँ ठीक हैं। एसी पावर ठीक
Gemini, qui Houston. Questa è so
这些钟不像有些钟那样可以移动。让我试
ठीक है। ह्यूस्टन, 
ウォータータウン。シグマ・セブンがあ
잭, 휴스턴. 우리
Le tiroir noir, je crois, est just
Roger, Frank. Die Geschwindigkeit im Mittelkurs 3 liegt bei etwas über 30 cm pro Sekunde, daher raten wir davon ab. Das führt uns zu einem Mittelkurs 4 mit aktuell nur etwa 90 cm pro Sekunde. Eure Flu
Gris foncé, com
现在我们处于机头朝下的姿态，地面站应该无法接收到我们的信号。我们听到几次呼叫断断续续。为了保持对助推器的目视观测，我们会暂时保持这种姿态。目前看来，我们与助推器的接近进展不大。它似乎仍然保持着和之前差不多的距离。在夜间观测助推器位于我们下方时，天空仿佛繁星点点。助推
روجر. لقد قمت بتغيي
わかっ
Apollo 8, Houston. Roger. We recommend you use a wide-angle lens on this particular TV run. You can use a telephoto lens with the same setup as yesterday's TV show. However, we recommend a wide-angle lens. Step number 1, tape the single red filter to the red filter on the red/blu
Roger. Erhalten Sie in letzter Zeit einige unserer Dump
Okay, looks like I'm unable to turn it 
네, 기체가 왼쪽으로 약 7도 기울어졌고, 오른쪽으로 2도 요(yaw)되었으며, 기수는 약 4도 위로 올라갔습
Apollo 11, Houston. Passeremo la comunicazione a Goldstone tra circa 2 minuti. Potremmo
음, 당신은 원치 않겠죠. 당신은 드로그와 프로브를 넣
Gémeaux 4, votre tension artérielle est bonne. Nous attendons votre rap
Okay, Fred. Deine Rücklesung war korre
Il y a quelque temps, j'ai noté une longue séquence de manœuvre de contrôle de couloir CO
はい、ニール、SEP バーンの準備はすべて整いま
ठीक है। हम खड़े हो जाएँगे, और आप हमें इस पर निशान लगा
好的，面板 11 配置，顶行：交流总线 B，S 波段天线，打开，打开；交流总线 A，磁带录音机，打开。第二行，在系统 A 下，主电源通过 QUAD 1 TCA，全部关闭。飞行显示器
ठीक है। इसके नीचे "कैमरा अर्थशाइन फ़ोटो कॉन्फ़िगर करें" से लेकर "डार्क स्लाइड बदलें" तक की जानकारी वैकल्पिक है। इसलिए, वहाँ टिप्पणी के रूप में "अर्थशाइन वैकल्पिक" लिख दें, और कैमरा सेटिंग्स में, "f:2.8 125, इन्फिनिटी" वाले ब्लॉक में, "125" को काट दें और उसकी जगह "एक-आठवां" यानी
मुझे आपकी एक क्लोजअप तस्वीर ल
रॉजर। उस दृष्टिकोण से आप अपना खुद का
أنا مائلة إلى الجانب بشكل ملحوظ، ولكن يبدو أنه لا يوجد ماء في ا
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 
बहुत बढ़िया। मैंने देखा कि यॉ रेटिकल बहुत अच्छा काम कर रहा है। मै
好吧，看来我们只能这么做了。
Ricevuto. Capisco. Le acque
Tras
जैक, 
रॉजर। फ्रैंक, क्या आपको लगता है कि आप इसे गोलाकार रूप से जला पाएंगे? अगर आप इसे किसी और दिशा में जला
रॉजर। हमने आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से सुन ली है और रिमोट साइट से आपके साथ संचार स्थापित करने के आपके अनुरोध को भी समझ लिया है। रिमोट साइट से
Aquarius，删除设置，进行云台/油门测试。请确保 DECA POWER 和 DE
こんにちは、デイク。はっきりと聞こえました
Hai fatto rumore, non ti ho copiato. Hai impostato la deriva e la
Nous avons repéré un autre propulseur. Il semble être quasiment à l'horizontale par ra
すべて順調です。生理機能検査を始めるには、スタートポジ
Ok. Abbiamo avuto un passaggio di consegne, ma è successo circa mezz'ora fa e non ti ho chiamato per questo. Lascia che mi faccia sapere se pensa che sia tutto a posto. La tua c
أقوم بفحص محولات الطاقة الآن.
And I am not night adapted right now, so I cannot see any of 
Es sieht so aus, als ob wir ECM auf dem Boden haben werden und das Kabel auf Eds Schoß. Die Pistole wird wieder in der mittleren Verpflegungsbox verstaut sein, wo sie vorhe
Okay. Am Ende von Rev 59, aufsteigender Knoten, Längengrad 124° West,
备受瞩目的Astro Blue Bonnet篮球赛即将开打，SMU和俄克
R
Роджер. Преж
You want to do something to the polarizing filter, 
Nous vous recevons parfaitement et nous seron
Ja, man kann die relative Bewegung tatsächlich sehen, Gus. Man sieht sie direkt am Fenster und dann wieder weit weg. Es sieht so aus, als sähest du 
مرحباً يا كاناري كوم تك، هذا سيجما 
Du b
哥伦比亚
罗杰，我有
彼はそのコメントで国内であまり主張して
아니요, 압력 조절기에 스위치가 있
よし、ジョー。すべて順調だ。予定通り順調に進んでいる。もう完了した。
— И система наведения ракеты-носителя, похоже, работает хорошо. Мы оцениваем вероятность сбоя наведения ракеты-носителя выше 99 процентов. Так что, судя по всему, всё держится очень хорошо. К вашему сведению, MLA получила примерно 1 минуту пригодного для 
Roger. I looked at all three of the upper chest center ones
Okay, klar. Ich werde hier ein
맞습니다. 그리고 같은 페이지 2-1에서 "RCS 서비스 모듈로 전송"으로 시작
हाँ, ब
9 ft/se
Хорошо. Я просто... Хорошо
좋아요, 18페이지에 있는데, 제가 이미 
Roger, mi sto preparando. Pronti per
Нил, посмотри н
A
Игл, Хьюстон. Загрузка завершена. Мы повторно выбрали P00; интеграци
11, ह्यूस्टन। रॉजर। आपके कोण 45 और 255 हैं। क्या मैं सही समझ रहा हूँ कि कैरियर के बंद होते ही ये कोण बन गए; या फिर अपलिंक कैरियर के पुनः सक्रिय होने और एंटीना के पुनः सिग्नल प्राप्त करने के बाद ही 
Pensavo che saremmo stati abbastanza vicini da riuscire
11, ह्यूस्टन। वर्तमान पूर्वानुमान के अनुसार, आपके राहत क्षेत्र में मौसम अनुकूल है: 2000 फुट की ऊंचाई पर छिटपुट बादल, 70 डिग्री से 13 समुद्री मील की हवा, 10 मील की दृश्यता और समुद्र की लहरें लगभग 4 फुट ऊंची हैं। कल के पूर्वानुमान में हवाई के पूर्व में लगभग 500 से 1000 मील की दूरी पर स्थित उष्णकटिबंधीय तूफान क्लाउडिया को दिखाया गया था। कल दोपहर पृथ्वी के उपग्र
Penso che tutti gli altri stiano pensan
- - und wir werden die Temperaturen weiterhin im Auge behalten, und falls nötig, werden wir den Verdampfer frühzeitig einsc
- - see those clips up there, one of those. It's got a snap right here that's pret
Okay, Jack, irgendetwas gibt uns einen Schub, sowohl in der Nick- als auch in der Rollrichtung. Ich vermute, es liegt an dem, was da hinten austritt. Ich musste den Direktantrieb nutzen, um das Flugzeug zu stabilisieren, und sobald ich das tue, nehmen die Flugraten wied
1번 공
OK. Le point d'entrée (PAD) se situe dans la zone MIDPAC: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, +1102, -17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28; DL et VL, les quatre ne sont pas applicables; DO, 4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380; l'étoile de visée est Scorpio Theta, 
यह ह्य
好的，宝贝。我们马上会给你一些任务
好的
Ici Friendship Seven. Au lever du soleil, des particules d'une lum
रॉजर। कोई दवा
Roger. Pour la fenêtre num
Ro
Je passe maintenant en grossissement faible. Corre
Roger. Comme je l'ai mentionné, l'objectif principal est de vérifier votre capteur de débit d'oxygène. Cependant, nous avons encore besoin d'environ deux heures d'enrichissement en air de la cabine. Nous so
お待ちください。すぐにお答えします
Похоже, суть ваших коммен
Hier sind nun ein paar Beutel – ich denke,
Okay. Ich habe eine Seite mit de
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。もし2番線でヘッドアップをすることに決めたら、一つ覚えておいてほしいのは、高利得アンテナの通信を維
11，休斯顿。巴兹，你已
You have to take your pants off and abo
알겠습니다. 투구. 알겠습니다, 투구 10
Get a picture of tha
로
Roger. Heure de décollage: 124 h 22 min 00 s. Votre soudage TIG, répétez: 125 h 19 min 34 s. Votre TIG ou TPI: 126 h 57 min 00 s. Valeurs du module de commande pour le 
Okay. Step 7. Circuit breaker panel 11, AC BUS B, HELIUM PQGS DISPLAY, CLOSED. Main - Circuit breaker panel 11, AC BUS B, NUMERIC LIGHTING, 
نعم، يمكنك ذلك - 
Ok, lo riferirò al Cap
네. OMNI Bravo를 받으셨는데, 녹음기가 꺼져 있는지 확인해 
Хорошо, и третий
Сброс сточных вод, подождем 84 часа; возможно, они уже смоделировали вентиляционное отверстие или что-то в этом роде, п
फ्रैंक, मेरे विचार भी कुछ ऐसे ही हैं। चांद पर मौजूद विशाल एकांत विस्मयकारी है, और इससे आपको एहसास होता ह
Ok, ho un aggiornamento della mappa per te se lo vuoi 
주변을 둘러보니, 전반적인 명암 대비는 햇빛에 드리워진 그림자 때문에 완전히 나타납니다. 아주 밝은 회색, 옅은 회색, 제 그림자와 헬멧 그림자 주변에 후광처럼 드리워진 색입니다. 그러다가 저 멀리 시야를 넓히면 주변 색이 여전히 상당히 밝아서 명암 대비가 더욱 강해집니다. 햇빛을 내려다보면 더 넓은 그림자 영역이 우리 쪽
D'accord. On a fait la passation de consignes il y a une demi-heure environ, et je ne t'en ai pas parlé. Je vais vérifier avec lui pour voir si tout est en ordre. Ta communication e
Okay, Sigma Seven. This is Cal Cap Com. You're at. Two minutes on live TV. Go
Okay. Wir setzen mitten auf der Seite fort, dieser Block „CMS resume attitude contro
Хорошо, Джек. Мы хотим, чтобы ты закрыл клапан подачи реагентов на топливном элементе 2. Отключи инверторы. Отключи шину реле батареи. Сними клеммы батареи и выключи автоматические выключатели
ああ、やっとだよ、フレッド
それは西北西部の内側の端、つまり地球から見ればほぼ正常な
Okay
Friendship 
Oui, je l'ai fait. Vous voulez retirer - Vous voulez alimenter les deux bus, avec les interrupteurs de moteur BUS TIE; tout d'abord, pour vérifier qu'il n'y a pa
로저. 잘 들었습니다. 추가로 짧은 의견 두 가지를 더 드리려고 하는데, 제
Is there anything else you want up th
Neil, je te garantis que la brûlure es
아니요, 저희가 가지고 있는 것과 
نحن على استعداد للسماح له بالرحيل
シグマ・セブン、シグマ・セブン、こちらカノ・コムテック、
フレンドシップ・セブン、カリフォルニア・キャップ・コ
네, 알겠습니다. 확인했습니다. 짐, 다른 정보가 있는지 볼까요? 미드코스-2는 초속 약 23피트로 예상되며, 역행 방향으로 예정대로 이동하고 있습니다. 현재 매우 안정적인 상태입니다. 참고로, 아직 확정된 수치가 아니니 받아 적으실 필요는 없지만, 영향 지점은 남위 약 8.57도, 서경 약 33.9도로 예상됩니다. 이는 비행 계획 값보다 약간 서쪽, 남쪽으로 치우친 수치입니다. 속도는 약 77에 51을 더한 값으로 예상보다 약간 빠릅니다. 착륙 패드는 약간 늦게 도착했고, 말씀드렸다시피 아직 확정된 수
Okay, again, looking through the telescope, I'm absolutely unable to tell if it's Nunki, but I have it
Le ballon est p
Хорошо, Хьюстон
볼트 하나가 
알았어, 진. 여기 있는 것들을 분석해서 
Roger. Die Werte des 2O-Durchflusssensors hier unten in der Telemetrie stimmen recht gut mit Ihren Bordanzeigen üb
ठीक 
Negative, Bruce. Just give me the latitude and longitude over 2, altitude, and the grid squa
Ja, wir gähnen. Ich muss ve
لديّ أمران نرغب أن يقوم بهما جاك في وحدة التحكم لتخفيف الحمل على الدائرة الرئيسية A. أولهما هو التحقق من مفتاح سخان CM/RCS أو إيقافه. لقد انتهينا من ذلك، وعلى الرغم من فصل قواطع الدائرة، فقد تسحب المفاتيح تيارًا كهربائيًا ضئيلاً. أما الأمر الثاني فهو إيقاف تشغيل LOGIC POWER 2/3؛ لسنا بحاجة إليه الآن. يتم استدعاؤه في ق
Bene. E nella riga 05, colonna B
Roger. Es ist ziemlich offensichtlich, dass der Computer nic
Bonsoir. J'aimerais aborder avec vous quelques aspects symboliques de la mission Apollo 11. En revenant sur les événements de ces deux ou trois derniers jours à bord de notre vaisseau, nous sommes arrivés à la conclusion que cette mission représente bien plus que trois hommes en route pour la Lune; bien plus encore que les efforts d'une équipe gouvernementale et industrielle; bien plus encore que les efforts d'une seule nation. Nous avons le sentiment que cette mission symbolise l'insatiable curiosité de l'humanité pour l'exploration de l'inconnu. La déclaration de Neil, l'autre jour, lors de notre premier pas sur la Lune: « C'est un petit pas pour un homme, mais un grand bond pour l'humanité », résume parfaitement ce sentiment. Nous avons relevé le défi d'aller sur la Lune; relever ce défi était inévitable. La relative facilité avec laquelle nous avons mené à bien notre mission témoigne, je crois, de la pertinence de cette décision. Aujourd'hui, je suis convaincu que nous sommes pleinement capables d'assumer des rôles plus importants dans l'exploration spatiale. Avec le recul, nous sommes tous particulièrement satisfaits des indicatifs que nous avons choisis avec soin pour nos vaisseaux spatiaux, Columbia et Eagle. Nous sommes particulièrement fiers de l'emblème de notre mission, représentant l'aigle américain apportant de la Terre, de la planète Terre à la Lune, le symbole universel de la paix: le rameau d'olivier. C'est notre équipage qui a décidé de déposer une réplique de ce symbole sur la Lune. Personnellement, en repensant aux événements de ces derniers jours, un verset des Psaumes me vient à l'esprit: «
ठीक है, जैक, मैं अब लाइन पर वापस आ गया हूँ। एस-बैंड पर, आप चाहते हैं कि मैं ट्रांसमीटर/रिसीवर औ
في الحقيقة يا فانس، ما تراه هو قطرات ماء صلبة تخرج باستمرار تقريبًا. إنها تضيء السماء بأكم
... Das war mir nicht bewusst. Das beweist, dass die Wahrscheinlichkeit, 
Hier in Houston trafen sich gestern deine drei Frauen mit ihren Kindern zum Mittagessen bei Buzz. Und laut Pat war es ein richtiges Plaudertreffen. Die Kinder
रॉजर। अपोलो लैंडमार्क का निकटतम दृष्टिकोण, रेव 28, जीएमटी 10:16:51। 28 मील दक्षिण में। क्रमांक 12: जीएमटी 10:21:50। 6 मील दक्षिण में। क्रमांक 13: जीएमटी 10:25:30। 1.5 मील उत्तर में। क्रमांक 18: 10:30:15। 28 मील उत्तर में। इन युद्धाभ्यासों के लिए किसी भी प्रकार के अभिवृत्ति नियंत्रण का उपय
Ok, Joe. Abbi
حسناً. لقد أخرجت حافظة الملفات الطب
가까운 지평선에서 26번 별
Аврора Севен, Аврора Севен, мыс Кап Ком. Обратите внимание, что место вашей посадки находится на значительном расстоянии. Мы доставим к вам спасателей с воздуха примерно чер
حسناً. فهمت. السؤال الثاني: عندما ننتهي من -7، ستكون تلك المناورة لوضعية JETT عبارة عن زوايا تُعطى لنا من
حسنًا. سأراقب هذا الرقم عن كثب إذا تجاوزت زاوية الانحراف 50 درجة. نود أن
Понял. Контрольный список для доретро-версии выполнен. У вас новый TR. У вас есть командная
هذا صحيح. ما زلت أستخدم نظام التحكم الآلي. سأنتقل إلى نظام التحكم الإلكتروني قريبا
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 지금은 신호가 잘 안 터져서 송신을 하고 있습니다. 다운링크가 원활
The secondary coolant loop really looked good. Looks like you had a nice tight radiator and everything else on there was working right along the performance curves. Your main oxygen regulators both filled at 104 psi during our check. Looking at the lunar orbit, expect to be doing a water boil of about 1 pound per hour, and this is just an approximation; there's quite a variety of estimates as to wh
Roger, ho degli aggiornamenti sul tuo Apollo D-9, Re
Roger. Insertion Check List c
أبولو 8، هذا غير صحيح. 
はい。TX は届きませんで
It appears that we did a grave injustice to the food people. Just after our 
Roger, 11. Comme vous l'avez probablement constaté, votre angle de c
Jim, it's been a li
Ricevuto, Jim. Secondo i nostri calcoli, Nunki dovrebbe trovarsi, al momento della combustione,
Хорошо, теперь вернемся к панели 250. CB BAT Bravo
Houston, Apollo 8 in band
Ok, glielo dirò. Come stanno andand
Okay. Copied 39.3 and 1.25. Jim, did Jack
D'accord. Attends une minute, Jack, et nous te donnerons une indication sur la s
روجر. من بين العناوين الرئيسية المتعلقة ببرنامج أبولو هذا الصباح، هناك عنوان يطلب منك البحث عن فت
Roger. Aus den Nachrichten des Pressebüros: Apollo 11 beherrscht weiterhin die Schlagzeilen weltweit. Nur vier Nationen – das kommunistische China, Nordkorea, Nordvietnam und Albanien – haben ihre Bürger noch nicht über Ihren Flug und Ihre Mondlandung informiert. Ein Journalist sagte, ihm seien die Worte ausgegangen, um Ihren Erfolg zu beschreiben. Heute Abend wird Präsident Nixon das All-Star-Baseballspiel in Washington besuchen. Im Anschluss reist er zum Bergungsgebiet im Pazifik. Am Mittwochabend fliegt er mit dem Hubschrauber von Johnston Island zum Marine-Kommunikationsschiff Arlington. Am Donnerstagmorgen steigt er wieder in den Hubschrauber und flieg
Beh, diavolo, Jack. Tutto quello che fai... non ne usi uno molto buono... Solo se vai... al tuo riferimento di assetto per... e i
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。还有大约一分半钟。你看起来棒极了。今天真是美好的
Okay. Perform the command module check per st
로저. 제가 지금 비행 계획에서 조금 뒤처져 있습니다. MIT 필름을
本格的ですね - 美しい！ - 素晴らしい記録ですね、ジム
هذا صحيح. ونُظهر -55، ما يعني أنه عند الوصول إلى وضعية الدخول، لدينا فحص نجمي باست
好的，没问题。现在袋子底部可能还有
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे ऑप्टिक्स ट्रैकिंग सिस्टम के बारे में कुछ शब्द। मैंने पीछे की तरफ नियंत्रण बिंदु 1 और 2 के लिए ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग किया, और इसने बहुत अच्छा काम किया, मेरे लिए दोनों लक्ष्यों को ट्रैक किया। फिर मैं हमारे कक्षीय नियंत्रण पुस्तिका में निर्दिष्ट नियंत्रण बिंदु 3 पर गया, जहाँ मुझे अक्षांश और देशांतर दिए गए थे, और मैंने उस विशेष निर्देशांक प्रणाली को ट्रैक करने के लिए ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग किया, और यह वास्तविक ट्रैकिंग प्लॉट के बहुत करीब था। मैंने वहाँ एक निशान चुना जहाँ मैंने अंतिम मार्किंग की और अक्षांश और देशांतर रिकॉर्ड किए। अब मैं लैंडिंग साइट के पास पहुँचने व
حسناً يا أوديسي، لقد تقدمتِ فجأةً
ロジャー、ヒューストン。それが今まさに私たちがやろうとしていることです。光学装置のために15度に調整しようとしています。地球が明るいので、六分儀に収まる星を見つけるのは非常に困難でした。自動光学系を使って星を見つけようとしています。今はそれができています。探査機を操作してトラニオ
收到。你离运载火箭有多远
Bene. Sul pannello 276: int
هدوء، هذه هيوستن. لدينا أيضًا مجموعة من حوالي عشرة أسئلة تتعلق بملاحظاتك، أشياء ربما شاهدتها خلال المهمة. يم
이
Okay, wir gehen jetzt et
Okay, Jack. Geh zurück zur Batterieladeprozedur, die ich dir gegeben habe. Um den Ladevorgang zu beenden, musst du einfach „Offen“ oder „Aus“ neben den entsprechenden Schalter schreiben. Also, auf Panel 250 hast du den Sicherungsautomaten bereits geöffnet; auf Panel 275 ist INVERTER POWER-2 MAIN B geöffnet; auf Panel 5 sind BAT RELAY BUS BAT A geöffnet; SENSOR UNIT AC BUS 2 geöffnet; SENSOR SIGNAL AC2 geöffnet; BATTERY CHARGER, MAIN B geöffnet; BATTERY CHARGER AC POWER geöffnet; BAT A CHARGE geöffnet; INVERTER CONTROL 2 geöffnet; INVERTER CONTROL 3 ​​geöffnet; die Verbindung zum Hauptbus hast du bereits hergestellt; und dann den Schalter BAT CHARGE auf AC 1 gestellt. Auf Panel 3 hast du AC INVERTER 2 bereits auf OFF und INVERTER 2 AC BUS 2 ebenfalls auf OFF gestellt. AC BUS 2 auf AUS zurückgesetzt. Der Batterieladeschalter ist bereits auf AUS gestellt; die DC-Anzeige ist auf MAIN B eingestellt. End
يا برج الدلو، لا داعي للعجلة. إذا كنت ترغب في منح فريد الوقت الكافي للتأق
ठीक
J'ai une bonne vue d'
Отлично, отлично, Джим. Сегодня утром у вас всё хорошо. Мы хотели бы немного рассказать вам об этих звёздах. Как вы видите в плане полёта, у вас запланированы полёты к звёздам номер 33, Антарес, номер 34, Атриа, и номер 40, старый добрый Альтаир. Первая из них, Антарес, находится в плоскости полёта; две другие — вне плоскости. Как вы знаете, нам нужно сочетание полётов к звёздам в плоскости и вне её. Антарес, номер 33, находится близко к Солнцу, и мы предполагаем, что у вас возникнут трудности с измерениями на звёзде номер 33. Мы бы очень хотели
रॉजर। सिसलूनर एनएवी सफलतापूर्वक पूरा हुआ। हमने तारा संख्या 16 पर दो सेट, तारा संख्या 22 पर दो से
지금 바하 캘리포니아에 거의
كا
フレッド、ヒューストン
자동
Voici une petite information intéressante, plutôt encourageante. Il semblerait qu'à Ann Arbor, dans le Michigan, un nouveau gang de jeunes ait fait son apparition: le gang Gilnet. Ils sillonnent les rues d'Ann Arbor, agissant en secret et parfois en toute impunité. Ils se font appeler les Guérillas du Bien. Parmi leurs actions, on peut citer le fai
حسنًا يا بيل. نحن نقترب من موعد الرصد، وهناك بعض المخاوف من أن الانتقال مباشرةً إلى وضعية المحاذاة قد يؤدي إلى ارتفاع درجة حرارة المركبة الفضائية "تشارلي". لذا نود منك الآن توجيه المحور السيني السالب نحو الشمس. لديّ بعض زوايا الجيمبال هنا. إذا قمنا بتوجيه المحور السيني السالب نحو الشمس من الآن وحتى موعد بد
Fermeture de la visière. Bien. Voyons où nous en sommes. Nous avons effectué un contrôle du dosimètre. Je vais piquer du nez en mode commandes de vol électriques pour atteindre l'attitude de rentrée atmosphérique. Essayons maintenant une manœuvre manuelle proportion
Хорошо. Еще два шага. Шаг 6: оставайтес
ह्यूस्टन, यह अपोलो 8 है। कृपया, आप चंद्र कक्षा के दौरा
D'accord. Jack, j'aimerais juste savoir quels sont les plans ou les idées envisagés concernant les [appareils/systèmes], si nous allons utiliser leurs conteneurs de LiOH ou ramener les appareils
好的。好的，请稍等片刻，等
Okay, I'm going to get DESC
Okay. This is - we would like him to do them, as I say, whenever he is through the series he is on now, and they are
Oh, ich schätze – warten Sie bitte. Ich denke, vielleicht zwei oder drei Stunden. Es war furchtbar kalt, und ich ha
Ricevuto. Bermuda in standby. Qui Friendship Seven. Carburante 103-101 [percento], ossigeno 78-100 [percento]. Tutti i voltaggi sopr
收到。目前，我们……而且断断续续地有噪音…
알겠습니다. 가
휴스턴, 그쪽 시스템 상황은 
네. 잠시만
ह्यूस्टन, यह देखना बहुत दिलचस्प है कि जब मैं अपना पैर मारता हूँ (यहाँ वायुमंडल नहीं है और गुरुत्वाकर्षण भी नहीं है) तो कण उठते हुए प्रतीत होते हैं, और उनमें से अधिकांश का प्रस्थान कोण और वेग लगभग समान होता है। जहाँ मैं खड़ा हूँ, वहाँ से देखने पर, उनमें से अधिकांश एक निश्चित दूरी पर गिरेंगे। कई कण (यहाँ तक कि प्रतिशत के हिसाब से) अलग-अलग क्षेत्रों में गिरेंगे (यह काफी हद तक ऊपर की ओर
रॉजर। हमने केबिन और सूट के दबाव में बहुत मामूली उछाल दे
Oui, enfin, 
حسنًا يا فريد. في الصف 3 تحت COMM، افتح DISPLAYS وتحته، افتح DISPLAYS
खैर, मुझे लगता है कि उन्होंने शायद सोचा होगा कि मैंने जो कण देखे हैं वे शायद वहीं से आए होंगे, लेकिन ये तो हजारों की संख्या में हैं, और ये मुझसे हर दिशा में मीलों तक फैले
好的，Vance。好的。我们刚刚更换了这里的OMNI传感器。我说，如果你能从我们这里获取数
好的，地面上的景象看起来真不错
收到，双子星6号。雷达锁定和交会测试进展顺利，持续时
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 슬링샷 자세 관측을 위한 기동을 완료했지만 아무것도 보이지 않습니다. 지구도, 그 어떤 
Je suis zut alors! Je suis en mode « appuyer pour parler » maintena
Когда я осматриваю окрестности, контраст, в целом, возникает исключительно за счет тени, падающей на Солнце... очень светло-серый цвет, ореол вокруг моей собственной тени, вокруг тени моего шлема. Затем, когда я смотрю в сторону Солнца, контраст становится наиболее сильным, поскольку окружающий цвет все еще довольно светлый. Когда вы смотрите вниз на Солнце, большая часть затененной области обращена к нам. Общий цвет окружающей области не так велик. Осматривая всю пыльную область, которую мы подняли, я вижу, что она значительно темнее по текстуре. Я поднял один слой, и я предполагаю, что это… Геодезист. То же самое верно, когда я осматриваю местность вдоль того места, где мы идем. В целом, я вижу там следы. Общая местность, где я поднимал много этого поверхн
Roger. Ogn
私はこれまで M.I.T. に関して言
Compris. Changement du réglag
Apollo 8, Houston. Abbiamo ricevuto un buon carico; è il tuo 
네, 맞습니다, 컬럼비아 씨. 길이는 약 4마일입니다. 잠
是的。好的，13。目前我们没有适合您的信息。一切正常。我们正在查看您
Okay, Punkt 8. Wir möchten hier vor Ort eine kleine Übung durchführen, um sicherzustellen, dass wir das Band rechtzeitig auslesen und die Sprachaufzeichnung nach Houston übermitteln können. Wir planen also, Ihr Band auszulesen und werden den Ablauf vor Ort üben, um es hierher zu bekommen und anzuhören. Wir gehen davon aus, dass sich bereits etwas auf dem Band befindet, es sei denn, Sie haben es nach dem letzten Auslesen überspielt. 
برج الجوزاء 4. جراح RKV. ضغط دمنا جيد. نحن جاهزون لتوفير الطعام والماء 
Roger, Buzz. Première entrée: bus AC A. La ligne s'étend jusqu'au portail supérieur. En fait, la ligne devrait indiquer: « Interdit au bus AC A ». 
रॉजर, यह काहिरा है, 26वें संशोधन में। जीएमटी 07:18:37। 12 मील उत्तर-पश्चिम, यानी ट्रैक के उत्तर-पश्चिम में। तिरछी दूरी 90 समुद
Sembra che non ci siano difficoltà a muoversi come sospettavamo. Forse è persino più facile delle simulazioni a un sesto di gravità che abbiamo eseguito nelle varie simulazioni a terra. In realtà, camminare non è un problema. Okay. Il motore di discesa non ha lasciato crateri di alcuna 
روج، نحن نفقدك. نحن نفقدك في الجو وع
로저. 여기서 보면 피커링에서 나오는 광선이 아주 희미합니다. 왼쪽으로 
アポロ11号、ヒュー
잠시 나가서 여기서 처음으로 사진 몇 장을 
アポロ13号、ヒューストン。戻ってき
आपका मतलब दाईं ओर
乔，你知道吗？你打算让我们在下一次彗星公转的时候观测一下贝内特彗星吗？还是你想让我现在就把光学系统关
Roger, Amicizia Sette.
Vous a
好的。我这
Roger. Aufgrund der geringeren Last bei 
Okay. So that gives us a good platform. Now the will maneuver to the jettison attitude, and the only thing of significance here is that you want to watch to make sure that the path they choose to go to the jettison attitude avoids gimbal lock on your own platf
Bene. Quando sono andato a let
Gemini 4, это связь с центром управления авиацией Хьюст
نعم، كان ينبغ
Okay. "Era la notte prima di Natale e, nello spazio, l'equipaggio dell'Apollo 8 aveva appena vinto la corsa alla luna; le cuffie erano appese con cura alle console, nella speranza che Chris Kraft sarebbe arrivato presto; Frank Borman era rannicchiato tutto al caldo nel suo letto, mentre visioni di danzavano nella sua testa; e Jim Lovell, nel suo divano, e Anders, nella cabina, si stavano scervellando sullo schermo di un computer, quando da lì si levò un tale frastuono che Frank balzò giù dal letto per vedere cosa fosse successo. Corse al sestante come un lampo, per assicurarsi che non si schiantassero. La luce sul petto della crosta frastagliata della luna, dava una lucentezza di formaggio verde alla grigia polvere lunare, quando ai suoi occhi meravigliati non apparve altro che un cartello della Burma Shave che diceva "Kilroy è stato qui". Ma Frank non era uno stupido; capì subito che erano stati i primi; doveva essere un trucco. Più rapidi dei razzi, le sue maledizioni giunsero, si rivolse ai suoi uomini e li chiamò per nome. Ora Lovell, or
حسناً يا جاك. من الواضح تماماً أننا سنضطر إلى إعداد قائمة مراجعة كاملة لك بعناية فائقة بشأن ذ
Lascerò che sia Tom a
자, 잭, 
是的，先生。让我看看——稍等一下——我检查一下这个舱口和完整性，或许我能告诉您一些情况。关于您
Odyssey,
Okay. Gli chiederò di richiamare la navicella spaziale e vorrei che mi facessi rapporto se non attiva i tr
Den E
Eccola che arr
D'accord. Les 4 ou 5 derniers modèles CLA ne
That is af
Роджер. Начальная точка PAD: область — центральная часть Тихого океана, координаты: 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267, широта: плюс 1332, минус 16917, 064, 36194, 649, дальность полета: 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 00 28, максимальная дальность DL: 154, 084, 22400, 18000, D0 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 09 02, звезда секстанта: 45 0189, 277, звезда оси визирования: отсутствует, вектор подъема вверх. Комментарии: выравнивание, Вега и Денеб, крен 078, тангаж 223, рыскание 340. Дополнительные комментарии: использовать схему без выхода, минус 30, проверка горизонта 194 33 06. Тангаж 298. Вы получите P65, но не P66. Дополнительная заметка: на
在107号航段中期
네, 저도 알아요. 지금은 사진이 잘 안 
أهلًا هيوستن. أنظر الآن شمالًا باتجاه أريستارخوس، ولا أستطيع تحديد ما إذا كنت أنظر إليه تحديدًا من 
Eh bien, si les techniciens systèmes ont des questions
Columbia, Houston. Zunächst einmal möchten wir, dass die Abwasserentsorgung auf der Rückseite auf 10 Prozent eingestellt wird. Zweitens sieht es derzeit nicht so aus, als ob ein Flugzeugwechsel nötig wäre, daher werden w
Roger, 11. This is Houston. At approximately 71 hours to 72 hours, we have you down for an eat period which I imagine is probably in progress already. 71 hours: O2 fuel cell purge; 72 hours GET: CO2 filt
Okay, Jack. Dieses Verfahren wur
स्कॉट, मुझे लगता है कि वे प्रतिबिंबित हो रहे हैं। स्कॉट, मैं अब आगे बढ़ता हूँ और कुछ यॉ चेक करता हूँ
D'accord. L'indicateur affiche 22 %. Nous n'avons aucun contrôle sur le lacet ni le roulis, et il semble impossible de reprendre le contrôle des propulseurs de lacet, aucun d'entre eux apparemment. Les propulseurs de tangage, en revanche, semblent opératio
...поскольку качество не очень хорошее. Как т
はい、Echo 9 ページについて
बिल, अगर आप उस 
जि
देखते हैं। उन्होंने हमें इसे दोबारा चालू करने के लिए कभी 
Ok, Gus, la mia situazione è buona; la modalità di controllo è fly-by-wire; i giroscopi sono ancora ingabbiati; la manovra è disattivata. Il carburante è al 62 e al 68 percento. Un po' più avanti sul consumo di carburante; la spia della quantità di carburante è accesa; la spia dell'acqua in eccesso in cabina è accesa. P
Apollo 11, Houston. 
제미니 4호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 더 이상 연락할 것이
ठीक है। बढ़िया सोच। हमने इस बात पर काफी विचार किया है कि आपको सर्विस मॉड्यूल की तस्वीरें लेने के लिए किस तरह की सुविधा दी जाए। हम इसे कम प्राथमिकता देते हैं; हमारा मानना ​​है कि सर्विस मॉड्यूल की तस्वीरें लेना अच्छा रहेगा, लेकिन हमारे समस्या निवारण कार्यक्रम के लिए इनकी आवश्यकता नहीं है। जहां तक ​​एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल अथॉरिटी वगैरह की बात है, हम आपको इसके बारे में बाद में और विस्तार से जानकारी देंगे; हम इस
روجر، لديّ تغيير طفيف في تحديث مناورة ا
双子座 4，夏威夷 C
मार्क।
我们目前的配置是：氢气加热器：1个自动，2个关闭
حسنًا. انطلق. 127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15 درجة/ثانية 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-برافو
Gemini 4, H
По сообщению Associated Press, американцы наблюдали за рождественской мессой Папы Павла в Италии, а европейцы увидели рождественское поздравление с «Аполлона-8» через самый мощный из когда-либо запущенных в космос спутников связи. Новости о Папе Павле и экипаже «Аполлона-8» во вторник вечером стали первыми, переданными через Атлантику ком
Bene. Ora, a circa 105:05, c'è un "." che dovrebbe essere spostato verso l'alto, a 105, e sotto di esso, anche la "manovra" dovre
ええ、特に計画はなかったんです。いえ、そ
私たちはヒューストンをバーンで横切ります。そこはヒュー
مرحباً، فني اتصالات كناري. على جهاز HF؛ كيف تستقبلني؟ كلامك واضح تم
Ich habe gerade Ziel 16-A anvisiert. Das ist der Flugplatz in Basra, direkt am Persischen Golf. Ich habe ihn – genauer gesagt den Persischen Golf – in einem Winkel von etwa 30° erfasst. Dann habe ich die Nase gesenkt und den See nordwestlich des Golfs anvisiert. Da Basra direkt an den Seen liegt, kann man dem Flugplatz einfach folgen und ihn sofort anvi
Теперь мы видим планету. Роджер. Юпитер. Я вижу цепочку звёзд для «Грузового луча», и старый добрый Формальгаут — там, в верхнем углу
Роджер. Принято, Базз. У меня есть пара изменений в вашем контрольном списке для надводного полета, и в целом, мы хотим, чтобы вы отслеживали командный модуль для последнего взлома вашего местоположения. И это будет — другими словами, P57, — а затем продолжайте выполнять контрольный список, а остальные — это пара незначительных изменений в контрольном с
好的。SEQ PYRO AR
روجر. الأرض عند 24. ويبدو أنك تصل إلى حوالي 15 على ثاني أكسيد الكربون،
جميع الأنظم
Ho fatto un controllo elettrico. Abbiamo avuto problemi di comunicazione durante il viaggio. E tutti i sistemi hanno funzionato benissimo. L'ossigeno sta reggendo molto bene. Darò al circuito della tuta un po' 
阿波罗13号，休斯顿经卡那封
تُصدر مروحة ا
旗帜或
阿波罗发射台随后。TIG 125 19 3470；TIG 126 57 0000；，0532，加上所有零，373 03196 275 04170；NOUN 86 加上 0532，加
Roger. Jim, au verso de la page 30, il y a une page blanche dan
हम चाहेंगे कि आप इस समय स
Ok. Da quello che dici, dovremmo essere un po' scettici su questa procedura, ma vorremmo che la provassi e la valutassi. Puoi monitorare il gimbal centrale su R3. Prima di spegnere la palla, vogliamo la tua valutazione. La seconda sc
ह्यूस्टन, जैक यह जानना चाहता है कि लगभग 105 डिग्री पिच, शून्य रोल और शून्य यॉ 
There's a little noise ther
了解しました。それでは、このチェックに合格すれば、そのまま停止していただいて構いません。そして、噴射姿勢に移行するための姿勢指示を出し、そこからスターチェックを行います
威尔科。我们刚完成探测，正准备关闭舱门。我们
Roger. U
Das müssen woh
Cela prendra un certain temps. Nous traversons une longue période de sécheresse. Nous allons donc essayer de vous laisser tranquille et de vous permettre de vous reposer. Vous avez une mise à jour J-8. L'opération J-8 aura lieu.
روجر. شكراً لك. هل يمكنك تزويدنا بقراء
罗杰
مرحباً أبولو ١١، هيوستن. لاحظنا بعض الأمور الغريبة في مُحوّل مؤشر تدفق الأكسجين. لدينا شكوك حول المُحوّل - كنا نتوقع أن نرى تدفق أكسجين مرتفعاً عند فتح صمام تهوية تخزين النفايات على وضع 
そうですよ
Roger. Wie wertvoll schätzen Sie die Mon
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Мы получили
14세부
알겠습
好的，吉姆。早上好；我听说你接替了值班，之后的事情我记不太清了
わかっ
Bon. J'ai été interrompu une minute. Bob Hope est de retour au V
最初に入ったときは少し暑かったり、蒸し暑かったりしまし
A Reno, in Nevada, poiché non c'è un camino in casa, un bambino ha scritto a Babbo Natale sul giornale locale e gli ha suggerito: "Per favore, potresti usare la porta d'ingresso? Dovrai dare un piccolo calcio al fondo perché si appiccica". A Little Rock, in Arkansas, i bambini nati al St. Vincent Infirmary durante la settimana prima di Natale e fino al giorno di Natale vengono consegnati alle loro
Roger. Vogliamo parlarne con te. Mike, possiamo... per tua scelta, possiamo farlo in e
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。请您稍等片刻，提供一下您机载氮气罐Bravo的读数。我们想确认一下，自从您停止推进以来，这个罐子里的温度一直保持稳定。完
우리는 그것을
Fate in modo che siano i vostri amichevoli "Verdi". Il vostro amichevole Team Bianco CAP COMM vi vedrà quando uscirete da dietro la Luna. Credo che qui ci sia f
تم. فهمت قصدك 
罗杰
そうして頂ければ幸
هذا صحيح. حسنًا. الصف الثالث، تحت قسم الوقود: يجب أن يكون صمام/منظم تدفق الهيليوم للهبوط مفتوحًا. رادار الالتقاء الاحتياطي، مفتوح؛ رادار الهبوط، مفتوح. تحت قسم التحكم/الثبات: يجب أن يكون نظام مراقبة الحركة الجوية مفتوحًا. تحت قسمي الطوار
Roger, Eagle. Ti presento un PAD: 101 36 14.07, meno 00758, più tutte le palle, più 00098 più - correzione, 00572, perigeo più 00085 00764 030 000 293. NOME 86, meno 00759, più tutte le palle, più 00090. Il resto del PAD è NA. Attendi la tua lettura. Se sei pronto a
روجر. لدينا بعض التغييرات على قواعد المهمة، لا يُسمح لك بالهبوط، يا نيل. تغيير طفيف في بطاقة ضغط الوقود ودرجة الحرارة، وتغيير في إجراء فحص تسرب المبرد الثانوي، والذي سيتم إجراؤه غدًا الساع
여기서 뭐 좀 먹고 올게, 마이크. 그냥 좀 쉬
कंप्यूटर लेने जा रहे हैं। घड़ी में लगभ
了解。友情セブ
حسنًا. هناك أمر
Dro
حسنًا. سنأخذ الهوائيات ونبدأ باستخدام جهاز الإرسال والاستقبال عالي
Ciao, Apollo 11. Ho
जी हाँ। काश हम आपको एक किट भेज पाते, जिससे आपको मॉडल हवाई जहाज जोड़ने जैसा अनुभव होता। लेकिन असल में, जब आप इसे पूरा जोड़ लेंगे, तो 
Gemini 4, qui Hawaii, trasmissione in zona cieca. Imbardata - 0°, beccheggio - 60°, leggermen
アポロ11号、アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン
네, 동사 8
動詞51を教えてください
Yes, indeed. I'l
로
Hier spricht Gemini 7/6 auf dem Weg nach Honolulu. Können Sie 
Oui, je crois bien; c'était affiché sur les vitres. Ils n
……GAST
روجر، لقد أع
See those sta
Go ahead now,
Roger. Le DELTA semblait correct. La durée d
Это Хьюстон. У нас это есть, а также у нас есть резервная копия TPI
حسناً يا هيوستن، أخبرني إ
好的，宝贝。我们马上会
Как у мен
收到，已收到。现在请你抬头滑行。建议使用脉冲模式。尽量减少燃料消耗。滑行过程中，再次进行一次关于重返大气层的
Friendship Seven, nous avons détecté une indication au sol sur le segment 51: « Déploiement du sac d'atterrissage ». Nous soupçonnons qu'il s'agit d'un signal erroné. Le Cap vous demande de vérifier en m
Ещё два момента, Фред. Во-первых, мы не ожидаем практически никакого смещения вашего двигателя во время работы двигателя, поэтому мы не ожидаем каких-либо изменений его характеристик на протяжении всего процесса работы, особенно учитывая очень низкую тягу. Во-вторых, прошу вас убедиться, что ваш температ
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。アップリンクをアップボイス・バックアップに約2分間切り替えます。切り替えには数秒かかる場合があります。
Хорошо. Я попрошу его снова связаться с космическим аппаратом, и хотел бы, 
روج
로저. 참고로, 서부 텍사스에 있는 맥도널드 천문대의 레이저가 약 181시 30분부터 1시간 동안 켜져 있을 겁니다. 357도 방향을 지날 때마다 1번 창으로 지구를 볼 수 있을 거고,
Apollo 11, Houston. In base al nostro avvistamento da metà percorso, stiamo mostrando un gamma di -6,57. Questo è preliminare, però, e pensiamo che dopo un ulteriore monitoraggio dovrebbe entrare, e potremmo regolarlo direttamente nel corridoio. È più o meno al centro del corridoio; tutto sembra a posto. Ti faremo avere un PAD di ingresso tra un paio d'ore prima che tu vada a dormire. E dai nostri amici degli affari pubblici, qualche titolo, oltre al tuo volo. Stai ancora dominando le notizie. Tuttavia, ci sono altre cose di tuo interesse. Come ho detto prima, la partita All Star è sta
Gémeaux 4, Carnarvon CAP
燃焼時
Хорошо. Чуть ниже 13. И просто для вашей информации, у нас есть люди, работающие над несколькими вопрос
Io dico che le rocce sono p
Хорошо. Теперь на той странице, где описан маневр облета, под
Roger. Wir haben das Raumschiff und die Steuerung der Trägerrakete üb
Ti chiedono di lasciare l'interruttore in posizione AUTO fino a quando non vai a letto stasera. In attesa. Voglio dire in posizione ON. Lo ripeto. In posizione OFF fino a quando non vai a letto stasera, perché hai uno squilibrio del 3%, e vorrebbero che fosse più equilibrato. Quindi, appena prima di andare a letto, 
シグマ・セブン。私の指示で、地上経過
嘿，杰克。你的任务计时器还在吗
로저. 지금 제 목소리가 들리신다면, 제가 ICS 푸시 투 토크 기능과 다운보이스 백업 기능을 사용하고 있어서 마이크가 켜져 있는 상태라
Okay, Roger. Mark the Gage Cor
Хорошо. П
पेगासस को ट्रैक करना और सही स्थिति में रहना थोड़ा मुश्किल होगा, आप मुझसे क्या करवाना
Houston, Apollo 8. Will you give us the information when you want us to stop the venting and so o
Nich
C'est exact. À ce sta
안녕하세요, 카나리. 우정 7. 좀 크고 알아듣기 힘든 목소리로 대답합니다.
Alright. 10, /: 45597, minus 040, plus 157, plus 35186, minus 01512, minus 00520 180 007 000, November Alfa, plus 00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253; Scorpii Delta, down 069, left 45, plus 0748, minus
Ok. Ci proveremo sicuramente. Come ho 
حسنًا. في منتصف الطريق تقريبًا. عندما تصل كمية الوقود الدافعة إلى 30%، أو بالأحرى 37%، نود تغيير هذا السطر ليصبح - عندما يكون الوقت المتبقي 10 ثوانٍ - بالطبع، يبقى السطر الذي يليه كما هو،
Roger. Ich verstehe, dass meine Rückrechnung für das Miss
Okay, Jack. Du erinnerst dich sicher, dass alle in der Vergangenheit berichtet haben, den Monduntergang nur wenige Minuten vor dem Eintreffen gesehen zu haben. Dein Horizont wird wahrscheinlich dunkel sein, wenn du dort ankommst; du landest früh morgens; und wenn du von Westen kommst, wirst du noch auf einen dunklen Horizont blicken. Als zusätzliche Methode, ähnlich wie beim Verfolgen des Horizonts, geben wir dir eine Ausrichtung auf der Landeplattform, sodass du direkt auf den Mond schauen kannst. Dies ist eine Trägheitsausrichtung; sie ändert sich 
لمن لم يقرأ اللوحة، سنقرأ اللوحة الموجودة على الجزء الأمامي من عجلات الهب
好了，我们来了。进场点：中太平洋，000153；000。接下来的两行是月落时间和月相检查姿态；，178；NOUN 61，减去 21.66，减去；00:28。接下来的四行不适用；DO 为 4.00，02:04；00:17，03:22
水瓶座，休斯
회로 차단기를 사용해서 제대로 작동하지 않는 추진기를 차단해
रॉजर, ह्यूस्टन। कोलंबिया में अब वीएचएफ रेंजिंग सुविधा फि
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। क्वाड ए पर हम जिस हीलियम टैंक के तापमान की
はい
阿波
好的。到
हमें पता है कि कई देशों के बहुत से वैज्ञानिक चंद्र नमूनों को देखने के लिए उत्सुक हैं, और हमने सोचा कि आप भी इन्हें यहाँ देखना चाहेंगे। ये दो बक्से नमूने वापस लाने वाले कंटेनर हैं। ये वैक्यूम पैक्ड कंटेनर हैं जिन्हें चंद्रमा की सतह पर वैक्यूम में बंद करके सील किया गया था, फिर इन्हें अंदर लाकर इन फाइबर ग्लास बैगों में रखा गया, ज़िप लगाकर बाहर से फिर से सील किया गया, और कमांड मॉड्यूल के किनारे बने इन पात्रों में रखा गया। ये दो बक्से हैं। और जैसे ही हम यान पर पहुँचेंगे, मुझे यकीन है कि इन बक्सों को तुरंत चंद्र प्राप्ति प्रयोगशाला में स्थानांतरित कर दिया जाएगा और वहाँ पहुँचाने की प्रक्रिया शुरू कर दी जाएगी। इन बक्सों में विभिन्न प्रकार की चट्टानों के नमूने, मिट्टी का ग्राउंडमास, रेत और गाद, सौर पवन प्रयोग के लिए कण संग्
O
C'est très facile à repérer. On peut voir d'i
حسنًا. هذا يتطلب بعض التغييرات. انظر إلى السطر الثالث حيث كُتب "صمام تهوية النفق، تهوية النفق لمدة 30 ثانية"؛ اشطب "30 ثانية" واشطب السطرين 
Du w
ठीक है, फ्रेड। समझो, केवल एलएमपी की लाल नली ही कैनिस्टर बैग में लगी है। ऐसे में, हम चाहते हैं कि आप दूसरी लाल नली को दूसरे कैनिस्टर बैग में डालने की प्रक्रिया का पालन करें: बैग के एक कोने में तिरछा छेद काटें। दूसरे बैग को देखें और समझें कि वह कैसे किया गया है। नली को लगभग 6 इंच अंदर डालें। कोशि
알겠습니다. 감사합니다. 내일 명령 모듈을 가동하면, 또는 오늘 안에, 누출 원인을 좀 더 자세히 파악할 수 있기를 바랍니다. 하지만 유도 담당자들은 데이터에서 누출 흔적을 전혀 발견하지
我不确定我有没有复制过来
По
Я только что снял кадры 3, 4, 5, 6 и 7 над Северной Африкой... (неразборчиво) Кадры (неразборчиво)... 6... Аравийский полуостров, снято из... прямо через середину полуос
Bist du gerade mit Essen beschäftig
はい、でも、今は足
Roger. Okay, Jim, abbiamo deciso che ti è rimasto un po' di carburante con cui possiamo giocare qui nel Piano di Volo. Vorremmo che tu passassi alla Modalità Scansione Orizzontali per le prossime 8 ore. Sono 30, e vogliamo che tu usi lo Scan
Salut Jerry, 
ठीक है, जैक। मैंने क्वाड चार्ली ड्रॉप आइसोलेशन वाल्व को रीसेट करने की योजना नहीं बनाई थी। क्या आप चाहते हैं कि मैं ऐसा करूँ? ठीक है। हमने अभी इसे आज़माया और क्वाड अल्फ़ा और 
好的。我们会这么做。我们会等到大家都收到各自的设备后，再在这里讨论协调，确保不会出
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11. क्या आप पढ़ रहे ह
Ora sono in assetto di rientro. Pronto a passare alla modalità automatica. Il fly-by-wire segue i movimenti in modo impeccabile, proprio come nel simulatore. Risultati molto positivi dall'utilizzo del simulatore di procedure. Non c'è dubbio, il tempo passa piuttosto velocemente. Torno in modalità automatica. Ho ricevuto il segnale di pitch down, solo un leggero ribasso d
Roger. Bitte 
네. 기억하시겠지만, 저는 처음에 TV 카메라가 있던 분화구 쪽에서 시작해서 표면의 암석 샘플을 여러 개 채취했고, 분화구 북쪽으로 약 6~6미터(20~15~20피트) 깊이의 암석 샘플도 몇 개 채취했습니다. 그런데 그 지역이 하강 엔진의 배기가스에 많이 노출되었을 것 같아서 분화구 남쪽으로 건너가서 우리가 언급했던 길쭉한 이중 분화구 주변과 그 너머 지역에서 샘플을 채취했습니다. 주어진 짧은 시간 동안 눈으로 확인할 수 있는 최대한 다양한 종류의 암석
지금 보이는 화면
Joe, peux-tu également nous donner une idée de l'autonomie que nous pouvons espérer av
क्या क्षितिज के निकट कोई तारे दि
Giusto! È di
Roger. Klingt, als hättest du da oben eine wundersc
磁带录音机将以高比特
네, 예비 분석 결과 중앙 S-II 엔진이 이전 비행에서 관찰된 것보다 다소 높은 진폭으로 진동한 것으로 나타났으며, 이는 S-II 연소 시작 후 약 160초부터 발
了解。ところで、
Roger. Understand; number 3 is unusable and number 5 
هيوستن، والطياران الآخران في مجال الفضاء جاهزان الآن، وسيقوم LMP باله
هل جربتَ بالصدفة استخدام مفتاح
Роджер, Хьюстон. Я вас прекрасно понял и п
دعني أكتش
Quello che stavo dicendo è che vogliamo capire cosa sta succedendo con quell'accumulo di pressione nel sistema primario di O2. Vogliamo provare a trovare un modo per controllarlo senza che sia necessario scaricare la pressione in cabina ogni pochi minuti o ogni poche ore, qu
Hey, good morning, Frank. We've been tracking you for about 18 minutes now, and we show your orbit 
Guardando al mondo dello sport, vediamo un po'. Mentre eravate impegnati l'altro giorno, Joe Namath e il commissario di football Pete Rozelle hanno annunciato che "Broadway Joe" aveva accettato di vendere la sua quota nel ristorante Bachelors III e di presentarsi ai New York Jets. Joe è arrivato oggi al campo di allenamento dei Jets e ha svolto il suo primo allenamento. Anche diversi altri giocatori dei Jets che avevano resistito insieme a Joe si sono presentati. E Davy Hill, di Jackson, Michigan, ha vinto il suo terzo torneo importante di golf in altrettante partite la scorsa settimana. Ha vinto il Philadelphia Classic. Hill ha vinto quattro tornei finora quest'anno ed è il miglior vincitore in denaro quest'anno con una bella vincita di 129.000 dollari. E nel baseball, la divisione occidentale della National League rimane una gara serrata. Los Angeles e San Francisco sono a una partita di distanza da Atlanta, capolista del campionato. Gli Astros hanno un record di 48 vittorie e 48 sconfitte, e ora sono al quinto posto, a sette partite di distanza. Un doppio incontro tra gli Astros e Cincinnati di ieri sera è stato rinviato a causa della pioggia. I Chicago Cubs sono ancora al primo posto nella East Division. Hanno un vantaggio di quattro 
روج. حبل الأمان. حبل الأمان الخاص بك موص
रॉजर। आपका एटीट्यूड रोल 12 डिग्री, पिच 270 डिग्री, यॉ 0 डिग्री होगा। हाई गेन एंटीना ए
لا. فقط أؤكد أن 
रॉजर। आपके एडाप्टर बैटरी के रीडिंग आ रहे हैं। वोल्टेज के हिसाब से सभी में 1-A से 1-C तक 24 रीडिंग आ रही है। एम्पीयर रीडिंग 1-A पर 6, 1-B पर 10, 1-C पर 11, 2-A पर 6, 2-B पर 5 और 2-C पर 6 हैं। RCS रिंग्स ठीक दिख रह
Roger, Buzz. Si vous le souhaitez, j'ai vos constantes d'interruption.
أورورا سفن، ه
Похоже, Хьюстон всё ещё немного окутан смого
Ладно, Джек просто... вернулся в исходное положение. И после того, как он установил автоматические выключатели на 250 для батарей A и B, он зафиксировал напряжение на шине батарей как 32,3 В на A и 37,0 В; затем он включил автоматические выключатели на 275 В, которые соединили батареи с шинами, и в этот момент он зафиксировал напряжение на шине A как 3
Très bi
Okay, Jack. Hier ist Jim. Ich möchte nur sichergehen, dass du die Änderungen an der Checkliste, die ang
Роджер, Хьюстон. В Columbia снова заработала УКВ-диапазонная связь. Я буду ис
Apollo 8, Houston. Richiesta di commutazione da modalità NORMALE a banda S in modalità R
了解。45-1 101。2+08。12 37 50。5+36。10+33。46-1 114。2+25 14
Gemini 4, Hous
Корабль из Индийского океана, это «Сигма Семь». К
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон – Х
Bene. L'immagine che Jim mi ha dato della sua visione attraverso la Terra era all'interno della - parte della Terra, la parte illuminata si trovava nella metà superiore della Terra con la cuspide che si trovava proprio sulla linea Y-Y. E quindi - L'intera parte scura della Terra si troverebbe nella parte inferiore della Terra, tranne una sottilissima falce della parte scura fino a u
没错。这张卡片就完成了。其余的更新只是基于我们58小时的平台数据，仅供您参考——请查看平台数据。我们目前状态非常好。您的陀螺仪几乎没有漂移，因为上次更新时，X轴漂移为-2.24，Y轴漂移为+0.87，Z轴漂移为-0.11。上次更
罗杰-道奇。阿波罗里程碑跑 6 08 31，偏航 15，俯仰 30，
私は、彼らが私のために計画している隔離施設とは別に、別の隔離施設で時間
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。我们看到您的通话已
Okay. Unsere Kollegen hier unten schauen sich gerade ein Programm zur Ausrichtung von Hochleistungsantennen an. Wenn Sie das Gerät also ger
लगता है अब थोड़ी नींद आने व
Nous allons tenter d'améliorer la communication et la télémétrie en interrompant tempora
Okay. Well, for this TV program coming up in a couple of hours, you m
ت
、ビッグボックス14。もう一度ホールドダウンしてもらえますか
आगे बढ़ो ह्य
了解。プラス90：/G&N、63825、マイナス1.54、プラス1.32、マイナス0491.7、プラス0000.1、プラス6634.0、180、228、001。該当なし。プラス0017.9、6652.2、7:37、6626.5、26、155.4、15.7。いて座ζ星。上、08.0、右2.1。マイナス22.81、マイナス025.00、1140.7、34087、32:14。セ
रॉजर, अपोलो 8। आपके लिए कुछ बातें: इस विषय पर, हमने आपके स्टेट वेक्टर्स और आपकी सभी जानकारी देख ली है। प्लेटफ़ॉर्म ठीक लग रहा है, और ऐसा लगता है कि यदि आप इसे बायपास करना चाहें तो यह आपका विकल्प है, अगले पास में भी आपका प्लेटफ़ॉर्म ठीक रहेगा। और हमें आपकी प्रतिक्रिया चाहिए, और मुझे लगता है क
روجر، هل تمكنت من استقبا
Хорошо. Как я уже понял, мы берём серую ленту и складываем её так, чтобы задняя сторона приклеивалась к внешней стороне контейнеров, затем прикрепляем к ней четыре стороны наших... карточек, как наши... карточки; затем накладываем эти карточки друг на друга вокруг основания контейнера. Затем мы... затем мы... поверх... сверху... Затем берём полотенце от старых и кладё
11, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 통신 잡음이 이제
Отрицательно. Хорошо. Я хотел бы обсудить с вами это измерение артериального давления. Адаптер нужно надевать только после того, как вы окаже
네, 11번에는 DECA POWER, DECA GIMBAL, OPEN이 있습니다. 16번에는 ATCA b
Altre notizie, e ce n'era un po', riguardano un altro esploratore: Thor Heyerdahl dovette rinunciare al suo tentativo di attraversare l'Atlantico a bordo di una barca di papiro. L'imbarcazione, danneggiata dalla tempesta, fu abbandonata a circa 650 miglia dalle Bermuda. La velocità dell'imbarcazione era stata ridotta a circa 25 miglia al gior
로저. 버즈, 5번 읽
49-دلتا 55 للأمام، 99 للخلف. 1+31. 2+05. 19 13 14. 9+
Ja, das hat es. Wir haben Ihnen gezeigt, dass Sie sich die ganze Nacht über innerhalb eines Kreise
Roger. Wir hatten hier zwei Datensicherungen, und die waren hervorragend... die Webseite hat bestätigt, dass die Datensi
Probabilmente puoi scriverlo su un p
حسنًا، ه
了解。ジャイロ
Voic
레트로 셉, 그리고 에드는 펌프 패키지가 보인다
わかった。ジャック、君から初めてはっきりとした言葉を聞いたよ。もしかし
نأسف ب
Bene. Per prima cosa, devi invertire la procedura di carica della batteria. Per farlo, sul pann
रॉजर। और राहत क्षेत्र में मौसम बहुत अच्छा ल
Хорошо, Ван. Готов скопиров
रॉजर, फ्लाई-बाय-वायर की जाँच करना बहुत आसान है। हमारी टेलीमेट्री से आपके सभी 
C'est confirmé. La procédure est assez longue, mais en résumé, il faut recouvrir le tout de plastique. On place un renfort en haut pour éviter que le plastique ne colle à l'entrée du LiOH. Il vous faut du ruban adhésif gris pour fixer le tout, e
لقد خسرنا للت
はい、一つありました。ランダムな動きで、中には前に進んでいるように見えるものもありました。外にも一つあります。まるで渦に巻き
I say, I can't see down toward Australia, this time - she's oriented up toward th
يرجى العلم أي
ठीक है, पृष्ठ 17 पर। लोड को माइनस 4 मिनट पर सेट करें; यह CB(11), इन्वर्टर 2, क्लोज़ है, और "इन्वर्टर 1 चुनें" को हटा दें। रेट स्केल को "25 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड" में बदल दिया गया है। "बैलेंस कपल" को हम "बंद" कर देंगे; और, संयोगवश, डैम्पन रेट्स वाले बिंदु पर, चार्ली, टेकओवर के बारे में हमारी पिछली चर्चा याद आ जाती है। आप इस बारे में चर्चा कर सकते हैं कि अगर हमें नियंत्रण में कोई समस्या आती है, तो उसे बंद करने और मैन्युअल रूप 
好的。如果——当达到所需的滚转姿
아름다운 별들이 보이고, 캡슐 자체에서 나와 떠다니는 듯한 작은 흰 물체들도 보입니다. 만약 그것들이 궤도 수정용이라면 정말 멋진 일입니다. 제가 보는 별은 아르크투루스일 거라고 생각했는데, 정말 흥미로운 일이네요. 하지만 그건 별이 아닙니다. 흰 물체 중 하나일 뿐이고, 두 별은 아주 가만히 있습니다. 그 흰 물체가 마치 저에게 
Ok. Prima di copiare, lascia che te lo legga tutto dall'inizio alla fine, così capirai di cosa stiamo parlando. Il titolo di questa piccola epistola è "Esperimento di correlazione tra fotografia televisiva e cinematografica" e quello che vogliono fare è montare la telecamera con il teleobiettivo su una staffa nella finestra di rendezvous e scattare una foto televisiva della Terra attraverso i filtri rosso e blu, 1 minuto per filtro; questo significa filtri rosso e blu individualmente. Poi vorrebbero scattare una foto televisiva della Terra attraverso il filtro rosso, in questo caso il filtro Alfa 25 combinato con il filtro polarizzatore. Ruotare il filtro polarizzatore di 360 gradi in incrementi, sempre di 1 minuto per posizione. Poi vorrebbero scattare una foto televisiva della Luna con il filtro polarizzatore a 360 
Haben Sie den Teleme
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Voici deux méthodes pour réchauffer la cabine. La premiè
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. I am having no trouble at all se
Affermativo; e dopo, tu sei PRO su questo, e ti viene in mente un 0688 lampeggiante, e dob
Okay, Fred. That concludes the DELTAs. And perhaps you heard that our GAM
최
Yes, w
Jim, bitte 
ठीक है। हम 2 
Oh, fine. I'm not bored up here. I just f
قلها مرة أخر
ठीक है। बिल्कुल सही। ये जिम लवेल हैं। आज हम आपको अपोलो 8 के अंदर के जीवन के बारे में थोड़ा सा दिखाना चाहते थे। हमने आपको चंद्रमा के दृश्य दिखाए, पृथ्वी के दृश्य दिखाए, और अब हम आपको अपने घर में आमंत्रित करना चाहते हैं। जैसा कि आप इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर देख सकते हैं, यह कम से कम चार दिनों से हमारा घर है। हम इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर हर दिन को चिह्नित करते हैं। चार दिन पूरे हो चुके हैं, और हम पाँचवें दिन पर काम कर रहे हैं। बेशक, हम सभी शुक्रवार को लैंडिंग का बेसब्री से इंतजार कर रहे हैं। अंतरिक्ष यान के इस हिस्से में, जिसे हम लोअर इक्विपमेंट बे कहते हैं, राष्ट्रपति के शारीरिक फिटनेस सलाहकार, कैप्टन जिम लवेल, एक व्यायाम कार्यक्रम शुरू करने वाले हैं जो हम हर दिन करते हैं। आप देख सकते हैं कि वे बहुत आराम से इधर-उधर घूम रहे हैं। नेविगेशन के लिए इस्तेमाल होने वाले ऑप्टिक्स से उनका सिर टकरा गया। वे एक ऐसे व्यायाम उपकरण का उपयोग कर रहे हैं जो मांसपेशियों को चुस्त-दुरुस्त रखने के लिए बनाया गया है। हमारे अंतरिक्ष यान का एक और बहुत महत्वपूर्ण कार्य कंप्यूटर है, और मुझे लगा कि आपको यह 
Il
你好，Sigma Seven。Ca
जेमिनी 4, कैनरी कैप कॉ
أحتاج إل
И 13, Хьюстон. Если Джек будет на связи
रॉजर। रॉड और मैं साथ बैठे थे, 
حسنًا. دعنا نتأكد من فهمي الصحيح. عند الساعة 49، قبل الخروج من وضع الصفر في نظا
حسنًا. الإشعاع: CDR 11009، CMP
D
Roger, ich 
A Reno, in Nevada, poiché non c'è un camino in casa, un bambino ha scritto a Babbo Natale sul giornale locale e gli ha suggerito: "Per favore, potresti usare la porta d'ingresso? Dovrai dare un piccolo calcio al fondo perché si appiccica". A Little Rock, in Arkansas, i bambini nati al St. Vincent Infirmary durante la settimana prima di Natale e fino al giorno di Natale vengono consegnati alle loro madri al momento delle dimissioni in enormi calze rosse natalizie. Ecco un esempio di cooperazione ecumenica. A Indio, in California, il capo della polizia è stato armato il giorno di Natale di un libro di preghiere. Il rabbino Phillip H. Weinburg ha assunto l'incarico di
F
حسنًا، لست متأكدًا من وضعك. يمكنني إخبارك بوضعي، و
Okay. In Zeile 14, unter HEIZSYSTEM A/B-1: QUAD 1 bis 4 öffn
Роджер. Ваш текст едва читается. Мы бы хотели порекомендовать вам сообщить нам о ваших периодах сна, считаете ли вы, что высыпаетесь. И мы п
هذا ا
أبولو 8، أبولو 8، 
ر
はい。ハイゲイ
それ
아폴로
윌코, 그리고 짐에게 우리 RTCC가 약 4마일 정도 떨어져 있다고 전해주세요. 우리는 20,496을 가지고 있었습니다
जो, हमारी एकमात्र टिप्पणी यह ​​थी कि हमारी जानकारी के अनुसार, जलने की अवधि अनुमानित अवधि से लगभग 3-3/4 सेकंड अधिक थी और यही एकमात्र चीज़ थी जिस पर हमने वास्तव में
双子座 4，加那利群岛 CAP CO
No, it's not too bad. We've got the bulk of all the extra stuff stored underneath our 
Vedremo cosa possiamo fare, Jack.
Roger, die Seite ist NC-7. Ich lese sie noch einmal. Dann weiter zur Längensteuerung für das Verfahren ohne Kommunikatio
ヒューストン、今中級
روجر. أتفهم 
Ok. A meno 4 ore e mezza, configura per SEP. Per prima cosa,
Bien, équipage. La seule autre information que j'ai à vous communiquer pour le moment concerne la mise à jour de votre zone
阿波罗8号。我们即将进行飞掠机动。这次的坐标为/63087，-162，+129，+009 62，+005 68，-020 77 000 000 000，十一月阿尔法，+00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013，向上048，向右37，+1418，-16500 129 04 3
让我
最終テストでは、割り当てられた時間の終わりに、すべてのフィルターを取り外して、すべてのフィルターを取り外した状態がどのように見えるかを確認したいと思います。そ
आपने कंप्यूटर स्विच ऑन कर दिया है
Right. And another thing we've done is to pull your and EPC DISPLAY breakers and so - But we left your CAUTION and WARNING powered up. So if you get -type or CAUTION and WARNING you'll have to power up those meters with the DISPLAY breakers. And we are watching
阿波罗8号，当你有机会去下层设备舱时，看起来你把泛光灯调到了调暗2档，这是
जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, हालांकि मुझे लगा था कि मुझे कभी इसका इस्तेमाल नहीं करना पड़ेगा, लेकिन वह तकनीक काफी अच्छी लग
Je
Roger. E Aquarius, ora dovremo passarti a un altro sito, e pensiamo che forse le cose andranno meglio se questa volta
알겠습니다. 그리고 광학 장치를 축과 90도 각도로 고정해 두시라는 점을 
Di sicuro rimane acceso, te lo
Роджер. Джоан сейчас нет дома, Базз, но Джанис сообщает, что трава сильно выросла, и я думаю
OK. Ceci est un 9, /: 45597, moins 040, plus 157, plus 34188, moins 01353, plus 00780 180 008 001, Novembre Alfa, plus 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, bas 131, gauche 28, plus 0758, moins 16500 12987 36277; étoile principale Sirius, secondaire Rigel, 129 155 010; quatre quadrangles, 15 secondes, espacement, horizons sur la ligne de fenêtre de 1,2 degré à T moins 3; utiliser la procédure à grande vitesse avec moins Mike Alfa. Après analyse des données de combustion de vos essais précédents, il apparaît que les performances du moteur devraient permettre une durée de combustion de 3 secondes, supérieure à celle enregistrée. Cette valeur devrait correspondre à celle affichée par
Apollo 8, this is Houston. 
この辺りを回るのにすごく時間がかかってるんだ。TIGまであと20分しかないんだ。もしよろしければ、
로저. 컬럼비아, +7입니다. 정정하자면, 위도는 +0.799, 경도는 +11.
자, 잭. 다음 단계는 바이패스 구멍을 막는 겁니다. 이 구멍은 
Ripetilo, per favore, Neil. Noi... voi vi stavate lasciando. Non ci siamo acco
Apollo 8, Hous
Основной парашют на зелёном фоне. Парашют выпущен, находится в рифовом состоянии на высоте 10 800 футов, и выглядит великолепно. Парашют выглядит хорошо. Нахожусь на аварийном кислородном контроле, и парашют выглядит очень хорошо
そうです。ジムが今持っているのは、紐に取り付けた
मुझे लगता है कि हम
この岩塊は、最終降下時に通過した、この大きくて鋭い縁を持つ岩のリムクレーターに起源を持つのではないかと考えています。昨日、私はそれがフットボール競技場ほどの大きさだと言いましたが、実際、近づくにつれて測るのが少し難しくなりました。しかし、私たちが通り過ぎた時には、アストロドームにちょうど収まるだろうと思いました。そして、この岩のリムクレーター付近の岩は、この地域の岩よりもはるかに大きく、中には10フィートほど、あるいはそれ以上の大きさの岩も
Hallo Michael, wir haben die Sperre ve
RKV
다시 한번, 자세를 조금 바로잡아야겠네요. 우리 지구가 오른쪽 위로 사라지고 있어요. 우리 지구와 여러분의 지구 모두요. 잘못된 방향이에요, 잘못된 방향. 조금만 더. 좋아요. 그 위치에 고정해 놓으면 괜찮아요. 어머! 다시 미끄러져 나가네요. 좋아요. 조금만 더, 조금만 더. 좋아요. 그 방향으로 90도. 잘못된 90도, 반대 방향이네요. 됐어요. 조금만 더. 아니, 잘못된 방향이에요, 잘못된 방향. 죄송합니다. 그 방향으로 계속 가세요. 아니, 12시 방향으로 올라갔어요. 됐어요, 다시 내려오고 있어요. 됐어요, 다시 내려오고 있어요, 내려오고 있어요. 조금만 더 내려오세요. 좋아요. 멈춰요. 이제 다시 그 방향으로
Bene, un minuto fa, ha detto questo per dirti che ora si è tranquillizzato dopo i tuoi commenti pass
軌道 3 に進む
그들은 어떻게 나이 든 정비 담당자를 야간 근무조에
هيوستن، ترانكويليتي. استخدمتُ كابيلا في آخر رصد، وهي قريبة جدًا من ال
您目前处于录音和连续对讲（按键通话）模式。我正在使用超高频（UHF）频
Ho ancora un bel po' di rumore di fondo, ma se parli così, penso che possiamo se
待機しています。コピーの準備ができるまで待機し
罗杰。一切看起来都很好。你听
Quel est le t
了解。スタートコンプ-プッシュ。プラットフォーム-軌道レート。姿勢-レートコマンド。パルス状態です
جيد. 12 1383 327 023 لأعلى 172 يسار 22، زائد 1293، ناقص 16500، 12905 36180. ملاحظات: على نجمي الشعرى الي
Roger. The recovery is.5 cloud cover, 10 miles vis, 3 knots and 360 degrees from the north, 
Potrebb
收到。以下是您将收到的更新的简要概述。您目前收到的关于完成-8飞掠机动后+2的更新
D'accord.
Ricevuto. E se l'antenna orientabile non dovesse funzionare al decollo, sembra che l'OMNI anteriore sia funzionante per circa 30-60 secondi dopo il decollo. P
Roger, Frank. Die Haupt
Columbia, Houston. We'd like you to turn off your rotational direct - rotational 
켄, 저도 그렇게 생각합니다. 이 띠는 M선과 평행한데, 외부에서 광학 장치로 들어오는 직사각형 입구, 즉 광학 장치 설계와 관련이 있는 것 같습니다. 이 특정 태양 각도에서는 띠가 정확히 가로지릅니다. 지구와 태양 모두 스캐닝 망원경에 이런 현상을 일으킨다는 것을 알게 되었습니다. 육분의에서도 같은 빛 띠가 나타나는데, 육분의 시야 전체를 가리지만 확대율 덕분에 별이 아주 잘 보
روجر. هل يمكنك التأكد من أن مفتاح مسار ال
D'accord. Il semble que cela se dégrade progressivement jusq
Roger. Would you check yo
휴스턴, 이글. 화재가 완전히 진압됐습니다. 어
Dove siamo finiti con OAMS Power, Maneuver, OAMS Power Sw
阿波
いいえ。みんながこれを気に入ってくれたら、VERB 83かVERB 66か、あるいは…ご自分に合ったものを試してみてはいかがでしょうか。どれだけ…努力したか、見て
Installation du rideau anti-éclaboussures, du déflecteur d'air, poignée de recirculation d'air cabine vers le haut. Poignée du tuba gauche vers le haut, poignée de ventilation cabine vers le haut. Gâchette d'ouverture de la trappe relâchée. Vérifier que le joint d'étanchéité est abaissé et fermé. Attacher la dragonn
네, 잠시 생각해 보고 바로 다시 연락드리겠습니
Yes, that's the one
Gemini 
We know there's a lot of scientists from a number of countries standing by to see the lunar samples, and we thought you'd be interested to see them as they really are here. These two boxes are the sample return containers. They - They're vacuum packed containers that were closed in a vacuum on the lunar surface, sealed, and then brought inside the and put inside these fiber glass bags, zippered, and resealed around the outside, and placed in these receptacles in the side of the command module. These are the two boxes. And as soon as we get onto the ship, I'm sure these boxes will immediately be transferred and delivery started to the Lunar Receiving Laboratory. These boxes include the samples of the various types of rock, the groundmass of the soil, the sand and silt, and the particle collector for the solar wind experimen
11,
11, Houston. That's a good shot of Neil's, there. Ove
配置は 06 13 
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。
Okay, VII. 36 Prozent - Korrektur, VI, - 36 P
Ok. Il resto
Roger. Nuove quantità 3-1 167. 3+35. 14 48 
Фред, оди
로저
好的。接下来，二、三、四、五、六、七、八都保持不变，最后是ELS AUT
I have extincted Alvagrin to read at. Now this experiment isn't going to be valuable; I need cabin lights to see. It's awfully hard to find the extinction photometer. Let's see if I can do it no
了解しました、フ
0,01, accident
Houston, this is 
アクエリアス、
Роджер. Сигма
D'accord. Nous allons tester l'ordinateur dans tous les modes. Ce test se déroule en t
ترانكويليتي، هيوستن. السؤال الأول هنا هو كيف تُقدّر أفضل زاوية انحراف الطائرة مقارنةً بخطة ما قبل الرحلة الاسمية؟ انت
是的，我还以为你已经听说了
ठीक है। कैच-अप के
是的，如果我能找到
هذه هي الصداقة السابعة، وهي تقوم بمراجعة قائ
はい、なぜなら私があなたのデータを記録するときは、SIMPLEX
嘿，
Das war eine O2-Hochrate für etwa zwei Minuten, um den Druck vom Maximalwert zu senken. Der Wert liegt jetzt bei
从左侧 108:00 开始，划出“在 ORB 科学姿态下停止 OR
휴스턴, 제가 말하려던 건,
あなたのリンクに接続するには、いず
Houston, Apo
La cabina è pronta, non voglio più abbassare la
好的，我假设在你列出的所有数字中，我们得到了一个 S
Джим, мы разрабатываем для тебя процедуру о
Хорошо, вот там четыре автоматических выключателя, Кен. Когда ты сказал «панель 8», я подумал, что ты именно об этом и говоришь. Я не думаю, что автоматические выключатели сейчас отключены, но 
Aquarius, Houston. When you look out a detent 2 in the proper burn attitude,
このロールはかなり遠いですね。どれくらい遠いの
And now while Fred's taking his hammock down and restowing it, I might give you some idea of what sort of confusion of attitudes since there is no up or down, and I'm situated on top of the ascent engine just at the entrance to the tunnel. I'll reverse the camera 180 degrees and go from Fred, look through the tunnel again back at Odyssey, and we might pic
로저. 우리가 궤도를 아주 정확하게 알고, 별의 위치를 ​​아주 정확하게
还有，13号，休斯顿。如果您愿意，我们可以每隔大约两分钟提醒您地球即将进入您的
حسنًا. والخطوة الأخيرة هي اختيار أسطوانة ثاني أكسيد الكربون الثانوية. سنتركها تتدفق عبر الفتحة الف
好的，吉姆。为了节省一两安培的功率，我们希望你切换到“语音备用通信”配置，也就是断开电源和断路器，切换到“语音备
D'accord. Concernant la phase intermédiaire, il semble que nous soyons généralement d'accord pour la poursuivre comme d'habitude. Pour ce qui est des hublots, les hublots centraux sont, en réa
好的。我说过，Fred 质疑的 DELTA-V
Всё верно. Теперь перейдём к след
Und in der Abbildung, w
닐, 닐, 여기는 트랭퀼리
Klingt gut. Okay. Wir haben mit dem Modell eine Übung zu den Vorbereitungen vor der Einreise durc
로저. 자, 시작합니다: 5, / 45701, -0.43, +116, 
Roger. 121° Ovest alle 12:35 G.m.t
Нас в основном интер
ジャック、こちらは水瓶座です。このガス放出が私たちの軌道にどれくらいの期間、どれほどの影響を与えるのか、よく分かりません。でも、様子を見ておいた方がいいか
Bene. Passiamo alla situazione COMM: antenna a banda S OMNI A in Bravo, antenna a banda S OMNI su OMNI, traccia ad alto guadagno
Die Warnleuchte für zu viel Kabinenwasser ging an. Ich muss ganz runter und sie ausschalten. Der Anzug ist immer noch zu hoch. Die Kabi
Und allen geht es gut zu Hause i
और, ह्यूस्टन से 13, अगर आप O2 फ्यूल सेल पर्ज और वाटर डंप को इस समय तक आगे बढ़ाना चाहते हैं त
ऊपर? उन्होंने हमें माइलेज नह
로저. MIDPAC 진입 PAD: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, +1102, -17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 0028, DL 및 VL NA, 4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380, 전갈자리 델타 - 전갈자리 세타, 위쪽 314, 오른쪽 34, 위쪽. 중간 항로 수정 없음, 수평
Negative. I've tried not to get into that. If I can get the suit temperature down a little bit, I'll open the visor and get some wate
D'accord, Mike, s'il y a des sa
分かりました。ジャックがちょうど戻ってきて、まだ出ていると言っていました。司令官側からしか出ていないんです。つまり、私と同じ窓、窓1から見えたとい
あれは面白い話だったよ。ショックは感じなかったし、かなり安定していると思っていたのに。そこでリトラクト（後退）に行ったら
That's affirmative. The next step on panel 5: we want the MAIN BUS TIE A/C switch to the BAT A/C position, and verify prop
네. 기억하시겠지만, 저는 처음에 TV 카메라가 있던 분화구 쪽에서 시작해서 표면의 암석 샘플을 여러 개 채취했고, 분화구 북쪽으로 약 6~6미터(20~15~20피트) 깊이의 암석 샘플도 몇 개 채취했습니다. 그런데 그 지역이 하강 엔진의 배기가스에 많이 노출되었을 것 같아서 분화구 남쪽으로 건너가서 우리가 언급했던 길쭉한 이중 분화구 주변과 그 너머 지역에서 샘플을 채취했습니다. 주어진 짧은 시간 동안 눈으로 확인할 수 있는 최대한 다양한 종류의 암석 샘플을 채취하려고 노력했습니다. 이전에 분화구 주변을 걸으면서 봤던 다른 샘플들도 몇 개 있었는데, 다시 가져와서 기록 샘플로 제출하고 싶었지만 그러지 못했습니다. 자세한 내용은 
Нил, у нас очень четкое изображение. Единственное, что мы видим, это маленькая белая точка внизу экрана, которая, по словам наших специалистов по телевидению, является, по-видимому, перегоревшим пятном в камере, но изображение должно в
极光七号，
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 이제 회전 핸드 컨트롤러
分かりました。その通りです、ジャック。それではメインバスの起動手順に入りましょう。最初のステップはパネル5です。BAT CHARGER BAT A CHARGE の回路ブレーカーと BAT CHARGER BA
罗杰。看来250伏逆变器的温度上升幅度不
さて、少し話が逸れてしまいました。ボブ・ホープは部隊と共に再びベトナムに戻り、いつものように素晴らしい任務を遂行しています。このニュース記事に登場する小さな人物の一人は、戦艦ニュージャージーの隊員です。ボブ・ホープは昨日、いや水曜日、巨大な砲塔の上から冗談を飛ばし、戦艦ニュージャージーの乗組員1500人を楽しませました。これは、海外にいる米軍部隊を接待して20年目のクリス
아랫쪽 패널 왼쪽 아래에 있는 밸브입니다. 저기 있는 저것
Houston, la Base Tranquillité va vous donner quelques précisions concernant la question géologique d'hier soir. Nous avons atterri dans un champ de cratères relativement lisse, composé de cratères secondaires allongés et circulaires, dont la plupart présentent des rebords, quelle que soit leur taille. Ce n'est toutefois pas toujours le cas. Quelqu
Роджер, ты... я бы хотел передать тебе твое время в рам
بعد أن خفضنا معدلا
We're just maneuvering to 
— — что это из
셔터가 내려가지
That is affirmative. Attitude: roll 0 [degrees], yaw 2 [degrees] right, pitch --33 [degrees]. Rates are all indicating zero. I am on at present time. The clock is still set for time to re
收到。谢谢。第 2-104 页的姿态应为零俯
J'ai comme l'impression que dès que la nuit tombera, on 
Да. Тот пожар слева от вас, каже
Das stimmt. Ich möchte
दक्षिण अटलांटिक विसंगति के दौरान एमएससी-2 और -3 के प्रदर्शन के लिए मैं अब बहुत अच
好的。时间是——事件将在；我们需要机动到以下姿态：滚转角 101.0，俯仰角 90.0，偏航角全开。高增益角为俯仰角 -23，偏航角 93。我们将使用常规程序来抑制加速度。抑制加速度后，在启动前，我们将使用 G 型胶片盒将高速黑白胶片装入六分仪。然后，我们将使用自动曝光模式拍摄三张照片，曝光时间分别为 5 秒、20 秒和 60 秒。我们的参数值分别为：R1 + 34717，R2 - 08028，R3 + 35075。之后，我们将使用手动曝光模式再拍摄三张照片，曝光时间分别为 5 秒、20 秒和 60 秒。轴倾角 0.8 度，轴颈倾角 12.5
알겠습니다, 짐. 이번 버닝 운동에 대한 저희 추천은 최소 충격량(MIN IMP
حسنًا. إذن
Roger. Ist Bill Shaff
Retour à la chaîne n° 1 sur la bande UHF après un temps écoulé de 42 secondes
وأعتقد أنه في منتصف المسار الأخير، سنرغب في البدء بالنظر إلى منتصف المسار مبكرًا نسبيًا، إن أ
ठीक है। अपोलो लैंडमार्क अपडेट की कॉपी प्राप्त करने के ल
Хорошо. После это
Okay,
물론 그랬지, 잭. 덕분에 기체의 요(yaw)가 완전히 반전되고 피치(p
로저. 알겠습니다, 닐. 다음 질문입니다. 착륙 직후에 말씀하셨듯이, +Z축을 따라 서쪽에 언덕이 있습니다. 그 방향에 일몰 시 태양광을 가릴 만한 큰 바위가 있습니까? 해당 지역의 일몰 시간에 태양광을 가릴 만한 큰 바위가 있는지 확인해 보시겠습니까?
Nein. Ich würde nicht sagen, dass es sich unbedingt um freigelegtes Material handelte. Ich denke, ein Teil des Materials könnte gebrannt oder auf irgendeine Weise verfestigt worden sein und sich vielleicht irgendwie verbunden haben, ich weiß es nicht. Nun, in anderen Bereichen, bevor wir anfingen, draußen herumzutrampeln, konnten wir sehen, dass eine leichte Erosion radial nach außen stattgefunden hatte, die aber außer der Abtragung keine nennenswerten Spuren auf der Oberfläche hinterlassen hatte. Anders sah es hinten aus – direkt unter dem Rock. Es scheint, als wäre die Oberfläche streifenförmig gebrannt worden, und ich denke, ein paar Fotos werd
Положительный результат. По всей видимости,
फिर से बोलो। उस बार तुम्हारी आवाज़ अस्पष्ट थी। यह दोस्ती का सातवाँ चरण है
收到。信号干扰很大
Some of them almost float with me. Most of them appear
地上で見慣れているギザギザの線ではなく、大きな塊のような稲妻です。まるで対空砲火のようです。明るい光の大きな塊が、すぐに消えてしまいます。まるで曇り空に覆われて
Хорошо. Вы хотите, чтоб
了解。30、SPS/G&N: 36691、マイナス 061、プラス 066 135 23 4156、プラス 32011、プラス 06 818、
Ric
Okay. PC plus 2; plus 0819,2, minus 0020,0, minus 0218,9; NA; plus 0020,9, 0848,2; 420, 274, 082; plus 0820,3, minus 0020,0, minus 0215,0; der Rest N/A. Anmerkungen: Gasvolumen, zwei Düsen 10 Sekunden; Gewicht 62480; Gewicht 33576. Gasann
Roger. Wurde die 6 genau bestimmt, als Sie auf die sechs Zehntel Fuß pro Sekund
コ
फ्रेड, अगर हमें ऐसा करना ही पड़े तो शायद यह तरीका काम कर जाए। अभी तो सब्लिमेटर से हमें ज़रूरत से ज़्यादा पानी मिल रहा है। आज सुबह हम आपस में बात कर रहे थे कि क्या हम आपको एसेंट टै
मैंने फ्लाइट प्लान तैयार कर लिया है, नील, अगर तुम चाहो
美しい。完璧だ。廊下の真ん中だ。降りてきて、ゼロ、ゼ
Mi sento al settimo cielo. Va bene, ci
82
로저. 분리 과정에서 쿼드 브라보
Roger, Jim. J'ai une courte procédure à vous expliquer. Votre matrice W partage des emplacements mémoire; par conséquent, la matrice W actuelle n'est pas valide et nous vous déconseillons de poursuivre vos observations avec celle-ci. La procédure que je vais v
现在我们处于机头朝下的姿态，地面站应该无法接收到我们的信号。我们听到几次呼叫断断续续。为了保持对助推器的目视观测，我们会暂时保持这种姿态。目前看来，我们与助推器的接近进展不大。它似乎仍然保持着和之前差不多的距离。在夜间观测助推器位于我们下方时，天空仿佛繁星点点。助推器喷出的气体非常多，直冲云霄。事实上，我当时还说它们看起来就像星
제미니 씨, 저는 외과의사입니다. 혈압이 정확하게 측정되었습니다. 
Близнецы VI, Близнецы VI, Хьюстон CAP COM. К
لا أعتقد أن هذا كان القصد يا بيل. ما كان يدور في أذهانهم هو أن لدينا مبادل حراري للبدلة على كلا الدائرتين؛ وإذا انخفضت درجة الحرارة كثيرًا
Well, that's intermittently affirmative, Bruce. We have these two hydrogen filters, which work fine as long as you don't hook them up to a food bag. But the entry way into the food bag has enough back pressure to cause the - the filters to start losing their efficiency. A couple 
B
D'accord. Eh bien, avec 
收到。只要避免万向节锁
Ro
Oh. Bien reçu. Il dit qu'il v
Friendship Seven, Frien
No. I saw it yesterday, but we haven't 
Ye
Mesure des tensions continues. Bus principal: 24 V, bus isolé: 27,5 V, bus 1: 25 V, bus 2: 25 V, bus 3: 25 V. Bus de secours 1: 25 V, bus de secours 2: 25 V, bus isolé: 28 V. Retour au bus principal. Les ventilateurs sont tous deux à 115 V. Consommation: 20 A. Pression d'oxygène restante: 50 psi 
Questi erano angoli carda
알겠습니다, 짐. 위도는
好的。时间22:25:06；卡那封号船员状态报告。更新到此结束；只是一个简单的事项。请将低温测量开关拨到ECS O2位置
Единственный, что у меня есть, примерн
रॉजर. 1, /: 62844 माइनस 161, प्लस 129, माइनस 29840, प्लस 02390, प्लस 01053 000 200 005 01693, प्लस 00600 29954 402 29788
그들에게는 가장 최근에 형성된 특징만이 뚜렷하게 보이며, 결국에는 끊임없이 떨어지는 작은 운석들에 의해 침식되어 사라진
Ok, a 100.000 piedi atti
Très 
Jim, due cose: nel modulo di comando, vogliamo verificare che il selettore della batteria pir
11, ह्यूस्टन। मार्गदर्शन टीम संज्ञा 40 - 49 से संबंधित सामग्री की जांच कर रही है। हम
Gemini VI, к вашему сведению, проверка смещения акселер
Roger. Normalerweise läuft das automatisch ab, Jim; und wenn du die Schritte genau nach Plan durchgeführt hättest, wäre es auch automatisch geschehen. Da aber
네, 알겠
Хорошо. Еще один момент, который мы рассмотрим перед началом проверки — и мы это сделаем — это стандартный шаблон проверки входа, и в настоящее время он указан в контрольном списке как то, что мы делаем примерно через ча
أعتقد أن هذا ضيق قليلاً؛ إنه حوالي ربع درج
ठीक है, जब मैं इंस्ट्रूमेंट्स पढ़ रहा हूँ, तो 250 का तापमान 145 (डिग्री) है। यह 250 इन्वर्टर का तापमान है। 150 इन्वर्टर का तापमान 105 (डिग्री) है, और स्टै
जिम, थोड़ा इंतज़ार कीजिए। हमें लगता है कि हमें सब कुछ मिल रहा है। हम अभी पुष्टि कर रहे हैं। जी हां, जिम। हमें जो भी जानकारी 
알겠습니다. 대기 중입니
11, Housto
... 마치 황도광과 비슷하죠. 계속해서 더 멀리 뻗어나가잖아요. 이 부분은 나중에 좀
了解しました。T
ठीक है। लॉन्च गाइडेंस सिस्टम की अनुशंसा के बाद, डिसेंट प्रोपल्शन फ्यू
Can you put the colla
Houston, Eagle. Habt ihr unsere Sternwinkeldifferenz und Drehmomentwinkel 
Roger, je 
是的，它们都紧得不能再
Roger. Secondo la nostra lista di stivaggio, l'obliquo del sito di atterraggio dovrebbe es
Wir haben hier einen Toleranzbereich vo
Wir verstehen Sie auch laut und deutlich, Bill. Das Problem hier über Honeysuckle liegt am Boden. Ihre Raumschiffausrüstung funkt
D'accord. Éte
Wir bestätigen dies mit TM-Au
11, qu
हां। डाउनवॉइस बैकअप। आप मुझे कैसे सुन पा र
Роджер. Мы слышали, что
Ok. Per la combustione andremo su CONTROLLO GUIDA, CONTROLLO MODALITÀ ATT HOLD, gli interruttori CONTROLLO ATTEGGIAMENTO saranno ROLL PULSE, PITCH PULSE, CONTROLLO MODALITÀ IMBARDATA
ねえ、私が読んだ数字を覚えておいて。書き留めなくてもいいから
استلمت
了解しました。デイクさん、もやの層はとても明るいですね。実際の地平線から8度から10度くらい上空
좋아요, 잭. 1-4번은 완전히 맞습니다. 1-5번으로 넘어가서, 그 페이지의 첫 번째, 두 번째, 세 번째, 네 번째, 다섯 번째, 여섯 번째 항목이 모두 같은 내용이고, UP TELEMETRY
वैसे, हम यहां आपके टीडी एंड
Bene. Abbiamo r
... बंद... जाओ... 
حسنًا. 21. هل هذ
حسناً. الآ
それは良い考えだと思います。そうしまし
35 degrés, 35 degrés; 750,... de
Роджер. Здесь всё хорош
روجر. نحن
Ecco la pistola ad acqua. Questo oggetto cilindrico all'estremità è un filtro con diverse membrane: una lascia passare l'acqua, ma non il gas; l'altra lascia passare il gas, ma non l'acqua. Quindi, convogliando l'acqua gassosa che proviene dal nostro serbatoio attraverso questo fi
Хорошо. У нас есть требование, которое заключается в том, чтобы мы выполнили операцию и сделали это в режиме минимальн
了解。Y 001、NA、プラス00202 46420 547 46211 12 1383 327 023 上172 左22、プラス1293、マイナス16500、プラス12905、プラス36180、シリウス、010 294 320、アレージなし、高速帰還、7821 ミッドPAC、高
تم الانتهاء من تجهيز النفق بالكامل،
好的，我们现在有
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». У меня хороший обзор ночного горизонта, 
Roger. Okay. The other thing is the post-landing. We still - just to reaffirm - you would like no more than that 1 hour in the spacecraft. Get your suits off, at your discretion, if the spacecraft has
Da
, Canary. Bitte stellen Sie Ihren Heizkörperschalter auf die
We
Roger. L'étendue à 20 - à notre GET de 21 50 00 plus 22,24. L'étendue à 22 plus 00 plus 00 était de 17,63. L'étendue à 22 plus 12 plus 00 était de 18,33. L'étendue à 22 plus 20 plus 00 éta
नियंत्रण बहुत अच्छा है। लगता है मैनुअल ईंधन पर्याप्त है। मैं अभी भी 72 प्रतिशत पर हूँ। इस समय पिच में चक्रीय दर बिल्कुल सही है। यॉ काफी स्थिर है; गुरुत्वाकर्षण बढ़ रहा है। कैप्सूल काफी स्थिर है। एक हरा प्रवाह है - और बीच-बीच में नारंगी धारियाँ दिखाई देती हैं। पुनः प्रवेश बहुत अच्छा हो रहा है। असामान्य रूप से धीमी 
Sì. I transienti erano più evidenti rispetto alle accensioni precedenti, Charlie. L'ho semplicemente attribuito al fatto che avevamo un modulo di comando leggero, ma c'era una considerevole attività di rollio che si è attenuata dopo i primi 20 secondi, direi, dell'accensione; poi c'era anche un po' di attività di beccheggio e imbardata. Non credo fosse anormale, e sembrava che le bande morte fossero piuttosto nette in rollio più o meno 8 gradi da entrambi i lati della linea centrale; e dopo i primi due - oh, dopo i primi 20 secondi circa, i gimbal erano silenziosi, e beccheggio e imbardata erano relativamente silenziosi. Prima di allora, c'era qualche oscillazione, ma per lo più solo nei 
अच्छा, प्लस 00068, प्लस 00000, प्लस 46420 178 134 001, लागू नहीं, प्लस 00202 46420 547 46211. क्या आप मेरे 
Die Kreisel sind deaktiviert und das VOX-System ist ausgeschaltet. Ich wähle den W
Roger. Getting read
On prendra un café plus tard, quand tu auras un peu d
حسنًا، لنجرب أمر معدل إعادة الدخول. كنت سأفعل ذلك على أي حال، ثم قررت أننا لا نستطيع فعل ذلك لعدم توفر الرد، ولكن ب
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्टन। अपो
そうだね、
Roger. Ich habe es offen. Mach nur
Ok, Jack, capito. Chiudi gli interruttori automatici della valvola REAC nella cella a combustibile 2. Spegni gli inverter. Spegni il bus relè BAT. COLLEGAMENTI BAT, OFF. Ingresso alimentazione ed entrambi gli interruttori automa
그건
Devi far partire i tuoi timer partendo da Carnarvon. Poi attraversa e allinea di nuovo la piattaforma. Prendi il control
Roger. plus 90,
제 
روجر، نعلم أنك مشغول، لذا لن نزعجك.
Okay, Jim. Would you press on your external lead. Hey, and we have an indication that you're using about 2 ounces more than we think you should. We're wondering 
मैं सेक्स्टेंट के बारे में कुछ कहना चाहूंगा। तंग अंतरिक्ष यान में इसका उपयोग करना बहुत मुश्किल है, खासकर हेलमेट पहने हुए। मैंने अंततः यह निष्कर्ष निकाला कि हेलमेट पहने हुए तारों के लिए आवश्यक कोणों को कैप्चर करने का प्रयास व्यर्थ होगा। इसलिए मैंने अपना हेलमेट उतार दिया। इससे मुझे इसके उपयोग में थोड़ी अधिक सुविधा मिली, लेकिन फिर भी अंतरिक्ष यान को नियंत्रित किए बिना मैं लगभग 20 से 23 डिग्री के कोणों तक ही सीमित था। होता यह था कि खिड़की के ऊपरी हिस्से से तारा दिखाई नहीं देता था। अब, अंतरिक्ष यान को अधिक बार और अधिक नियंत्रित करके आप इसे इस प्रकार नियंत्रित कर सकते हैं कि खिड़की की लंबी धुरी आपके ट्र
Roger. We are assuming a heads-up attitude. Be adv
अरे बाप रे, ये तो बिजली ही होगी। या फिर ये.
皇帝が歯
Gemini VIII, 
11, 
Okay. Dies ist der LM-Manöverplatz, PC 
62970، ناقص 162، زائد 129، زائد 00966، زائد 00552، ناقص 02079. الثلاثة التالية كلها أصفار، غير متوفر، زائد 00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013، لأعلى 04.7
……是自动的，……2
Attends Buzz. Ça a l'air plutôt bien, d'après ce que je vois. On a la ligne de convergence tropicale là-bas. Il y a quelques nuages ​​sur la carte météo que je regarde, mais rien d'important. Pour l'instant... Attends. Voyons voir, là, à mi-hauteur... oui, à MPL... on a 3000 pieds de nuages ​​épars, visibilité 10 pieds, vagues de 3 pieds, c'est la météo actuelle. Je ne pense pas qu'il y ait de prévisions importantes. Il y a quelques... FLIGHT vient de m'informer que ce que je viens de te donner était les prévisions. Il y a quelques tempêtes tropicales dans le... enfin, pas dans la zone d'atterrissage, mais dans le Pacifique. Une tempête appelée Claudia qui est au nord-est d'Hawaï. Elle se dirige vers le nord-ouest et se dissipe. Et il y en a une appelée Viola, qui est au-dessus de Guam, et elle
よし。もうECSの酸素抜きを心配する必要は
هل يمكنك تزويدنا بقراءة محدثة لزوايا الكاميرا المثبتة
Okay. We're reading 3 g's, think we'll have to let the reentry damping check go this time. Re
Quell'altro aviatore che sta facendo il giro del mondo, Max Conrad con il suo aereo leggero - ha trascorso il giorno di Natale in Antartide, a Puento Aranes in C
세계 및 국내 뉴스, 그리고 특집 기사는 여기까지입니다. 스포츠면에서는 캔자스시티 치프스의 행크 스트램 감독이 AFL 올해의 감독으로 선정되었습니다. 3시즌 만
ईगल, कोलंबिया। जब आपको मौका 
确保摄像机上的自动光线控制开关（ALC开关）处于“开启”位置
로저. 위상 조정 기동에 대한 업데이트 사항이
Ricevuto. Ricevuto, Buzz. Ho apportato un paio di modifiche alla tua checklist di superficie e, in generale, quello che vorremmo che facessi è tracciare il modulo di comando per un ultimo controllo della tua posizione lì. E questo sarà - in altre parole, P57, e poi proseguire con la checklist, e il resto sono un paio di piccole modifiche alla checklist. La principale è che non vogliamo che il radar di rendezvo
روجر. بخصو
इसकी अपनी एक अनूठी सुंदरता है। यह संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के ऊंचे रेगिस्तानों जैसा है। यह अलग है, लेकिन यहाँ का नजारा बेहद खूबसूरत है। ध्यान रहे कि यहाँ पाए जाने वाले कई चट्टानी नमूनों, खासकर कठोर चट्टानों के नमूनों की सतह पर छोटे-छोटे छिद्र दिखाई देते हैं। साथ ही, मैं अभी एक ऐसे नमूने को देख रहा हूँ जिसमें किसी प्रकार का फेनोक्रिस्ट (पर
हमें रात भर यहीं किनारे पर बैठकर बस तस्वीरें खींचनी चाहिए—बिना किसी पूर्
Roger, Mike. Veuillez noter vos angles maintenant, puis exécuter la commande et charger ces angles (ceux que vous voyez sur la commande) dans l'emplac
稍等。好
Roger. Ging es dabei um das Auftreten von Wasser in Verbindung mit unregelmäßigen CO2-Partialdruckwerten, od
अरे, श
J'ai demandé: «
حسنًا، سأذهب إلى قسم "المتابعة" لأرى ما إ
I'm all ready. I think it's been all squared away a
- - we'd lik
Роджер. Показатель LMP не сдвинулся ни на дюйм с момента взлета. И тот же самый показатель CMP по-прежнему равен 0,64. Я поспал всего около 5,5 часов и сейчас уплетаю еду; пью много вод
안녕하세요, 텍사스입니다. 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 잘 
Pourriez-vous me donner une astuce pour le minuteur d
We've got another sighting on the booster. It looks like it's just about horizontal with us and right straight 
好的，吉姆。在第2-107页，我们建议你删除“保持这种态度”那部分。你的平台已经很好了，我们觉得没必要再做调整。反正之后还会再出现。另
Plus 59578, moins 00086, moins 05287, 012 080 018, non applicable, plus 00203 59813 650 59566 11 2160, 332, terre vers le haut 005, droite 27, plus 0398, plus 06500 13215 36961; Sirius Rigel 137 311 339, pas de marge, supposer l'exécution d'une manœuvre de survol, utilise un alignement stable pour le survol; temps de 5 pour la détermination du GERU; utiliser les étapes 1 à 10 de NC-4, les étapes 3 et 4 de NC-8. V moyen 400K pour la cart
Хорошо. Нажмите ENTER, 333 ENTER, затем считайте значение регистра 1, и оно должно быть 10 000. Если это не так
Seh
わかった。それを公表して、テレビに対する姿勢を
Ich sehe, wie sich Dinge lösen, 
That's affirmative. I called that out. I guess I had 
ठीक है, जैक, अब मेरे पास प्रक्रिया है, मैं आपको पढ़कर सुना सकता हूँ। इससे पहले, मैं फ्रेड को कुछ बताना चाहता हूँ जो उसके लिए उपयोगी हो सकता है। हम एसएचई टैंक के दबाव में वृद्धि देख रहे हैं और हमें लगता है कि यह फट सकता है। हमें ठीक-ठीक समय नहीं पता, लगभग 105 घंटे या शायद उससे भी बाद। हमारे पास ब्लोडाउन की पर्याप्त क्षमता है। हमन
Хорошо, Джек. И мы видим, 
Хорошо. Следующие раз, два, три — то же самое, и нам нужно, чтобы VHF AM B
Roger. We're all set whenever you're ready
Okay. Then following this, the will pitch up to acquire the Moon - Excuse me, they're going to pitch up and acquire the service module and photograph, and they'l
收到。RKV 通行期间语音更新
Okay. Mach ich
收到，双子座8号。当前时间为03:47:35，速度增量​​61.2；扭矩增量1加22；偏航角0度；俯仰
هيو
Et comment se por
Gémeaux 4, chirurgien RKV. Votre tension est bonne. Veuillez me donner un signe lorsqu
يا إد، كما تعلم، لطالما قلنا إننا سنقوم بإعادة دخول مفتوحة الحلقة. أنا سع
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, Cap Com. Cape Flight advises 
Хорошо. Это был – Да, вентиляционный канал для по
Хорошо, это просто мера предо
로저, 버즈. 우리도 같은 걸 알아챘어. 당구공이나 볼링공
Roger. Il tuo blocco di sicurezza è dovut
روجر. سنقوم بتصوير تسلسل ت
Gemini 4, это связь с центром управления авиацией Хьюстона. Ко
좋아, 짐, 이번엔 내가 자
ننصحك بالا
Роджер, Брюс. Когда у вас будет несколько минут, не могли бы вы р
Roger. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Es folgt ein dreißigminütiger Bericht: Kopfbewegungen verursachen weder Übelkeit noch sonstige Beschwerden. Ich bin überrascht, wie nah ich der Sonne kommen kann; sie scheint mir gerade direkt ins Gesicht, und ich muss meine Augen nur mit einer Augenbraue beschatten. Alle Sicherungsschalter auf dem linken Bedienfeld befinden sich noch in der zuvor gemeldeten Position. Modusauswahl: normal, Automatik, Gyro normal: Zünder scharfgeschaltet, automatische Rückstoßsteuerung deaktiviert. Alle T-Hebel sind eingelegt, außer dem manuellen Hebel. Dieser ist gezogen, sodass ich im Notfall sofort auf manuell umschalten kann. Die Rettungshilfen funktionieren. Der Landesack ist abgenommen. Alle anderen Bedienelemente des Sequenzpanels befinden sich in normaler Position. Der Treibstoffstand liegt zwischen 68 und 100 Prozent, Wiederholung: 68–
Roger, Woomera. Reading you loud and clear, also. I'd like readout o
로저, 닐. 먼저 말씀드리겠습니다. 아폴로 11호 임무에 대한 축하 메시지가 오늘 하루 종일 세계 각국 정상들로
Вам, вероятно, интересны комментарии ваших жён. Нил, сказала Джен о вчерашних событиях: «Вечер был нев
والآن، 
燃料のより正確な値は、もし指先で確認できれば78、78（パーセント）です。逆噴射前です。逆噴射を実行するように設定しました。自動制御、逆噴射後、フライ・バイ・ワイヤに切り替えて再突入軸まで機首を上げ、修正します。逆噴射後、フライ・バイ・ワイヤに切り替え、再突入姿勢まで機首を
Okay. Frank, unser Vorgehen ist folgendes: W
J'ai installé une nouvelle cartouche de bande à 6 h. Je viens de prendre une autre photo du S-6. Elle a été prise au-dessus de la zone désertique, montrant les longues lignes de découpe lo
Guaymas Cap Com, Guaymas Cap C
好的。那我们再试
아니요, 그는 우리 잠옷을 입어주려고 돌아다녔어요. 그러니까 별로 귀찮은 일은 아니었던 것 
Bon, voyons voir; nous voulons modif
理解；OMNI
रॉजर, हमें वो ए
宇宙船は実際にガスを放出しているように見えます。なぜなら、小さな塵や何かが通り過ぎるたびに、それが必ずドアに
Installation du rideau anti-éclaboussures, du déflecteur d'air, poignée de recirculation d'air cabine vers le haut. Poignée du tuba gauche vers le haut, poignée de ventilation cabine vers le haut. Gâchette d'ouverture de la trappe relâchée. Vérifier que le joint d'étanchéité est abaissé et fermé. Attacher la dragonne, trappe gauche ouverte. Ranger l'équipement de survie du pilote commandant sur le côté droit du vaisseau. Boucle de récupération complète... côté droit du vaisseau. Vous vous déplacez vers le siège gauche avec votre kit de survie. Jetez l'équipement de survie du pilote sur la trappe gauche, au-dessus de la boucle de récupération. Gonflez le parachute de sauvetage, assurez-vous qu'il est du côté droit du vaisseau. Je casse un pilote... à vous de voir. Vous retirez votre équipement de 
好的。我现在处于AT&T HOLD状态。你明白我的意思吗
Ricevuto. Sigma Seven, ora ti faccio un controllo vocale di emergenza. La prossima trasmissi
Bon
حسنًا. انتظر
Сигма Семь. Повтори, давление в кабине. Я тебя не поня
Esatto. Sul pannello 5: interruttore aut
Das klingt nach einer guten Idee; lass uns nach dem Brennvorgang den Mond beobachten. 
我们
好的。
了解しました。バズ、了解しました。地上チェックリストにいくつか変更点があります。基本的には、司令船を追跡して、最後にもう一度位置を確認することをお
لا. كانوا يفكرون فقط 
In
好的。还有上行遥
オフです
약 5시 33분, 그러
— — и выполните шаги 2, 3 и 4 активации 28. Вам нужно будет сделать это, чтобы получить углы тангажа и рыскания
Rog
Columbia, hier spricht Housto
Это Чарли. Проверьте напряжение на главной шине; з
好的，弗雷德。下一步只需将推进剂温度压力监测开关拨到下降 1 位置，读取燃料和氧气温度，然后拨到下降 2 位置，再次读取燃料和
Come probabilmente saprai, abbiamo dive
Soyez prêts pour l'ALARME GÉNÉ
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. نحن هنا نعيد تنظيم صفوفنا، ونعمل على تحسين أنظمة التحكم لديك، ونحاول إعداد شيء ما، ونلقي نظرة على المواد الاستهلاكية بدلًا من خطة الطيران، وما إلى ذلك. وبمجرد حصولنا على كل هذه المعلومات، سنبلغك بها. لدينا أيضًا طاقم الدعم المكون من 14 فردًا في أجهزة المحاكاة، يراجعون 
알겠습니다. 시간 22시 25분 06초, 카나본 기지 승무원 현황 보고입니다. 업데이트는 여기까지입니다. 간단한 내용이었습니다. 크라이오 게이지 스위치를 ECS O2로 설정해 주시겠습니까
रॉजर। और आपमें से जो लोग स्वस्थ और स
मुझे ऐसा लगता है। हम इसे बर्न मॉनिटर के रूप में इस्तेमाल करेंगे। जलने की प्रक्रिया मैन्युअल होगी, 
了解。45-1 101。2+08。12 37 50。5+36。10+33。46-1 114。2+25 14 12 47。4+05。9+33。47-1 前後スラスター発射。08 と 120。0+14 と 2+30。15 46 36。3+17。8+37。48-1 前後スラスター。24 と 120。0+40 と 230、補正値 2+30。17 20 19。2+42。8+43。49-4 111。2+21。20 06 48。4+11。9+46。 
GET ist 2 plus 20 plus 00; das Delta-V ist 60,8;... Daue
Roger, il semble y avoir un débit un peu plus important, et même un courant plus fort que sur l
了解、ジム。ここで1、2アンペアの電力を節約するために、ダウンボイスバックアップ通信設定に切り替えてください。これは、電源と回路ブレーカーを抜いて、ダウンボイスバックアップに切り替える設定です。通信に問題が発生した場合は、この設定を逆にするだけで、
그 장비로는 사진 찍기가 어려웠어요... 괜찮긴 했지만요. 사진을 몇 장 찍어보려
Понял... запрос на обновление 
아니,
11, Houston. Les prévisions actuelles indiquent des conditions acceptables dans votre zone de récupération: nuages ​​épars à 600 mètres d'altitude, vent du 070° à 13 nœuds,
روجر، يبدو أنني قد أضطر للقيام ببعض المناورات ا
You've got the answe
准备操
You're okay. I'
Ciao, Tranquili
Nun, mal sehen – ich habe mich umgedreht, warum habe ich zuerst den Sonnenschutz 
早上好，阿波罗8号！我是迪克。我谨代表控制中心的全体人员，以及全世界的朋友们，
في تمام الساعة 00:29:43، تمكنتُ لأول مرة من التقاط صور للأفق باستخدام فيلم MIT. تم ضبط الإعدادات على F8 و1/125. الصورة الثانية تُظهر الأفق جنوبًا باتجاه الشمس، مباشرةً على مسار رحلتي. أما الصورة الثالثة، فتُظهر الأفق عند 15 درجة شمالًا، عند انقضاء وقت الكبسولة في
了解、インド洋艦艇。フレアは見ていま
Да. Почему бы 
잘 보이실
Roger. Ho qui i PAD 1 e 4, proprio ora. S
로저 RKV님, 
Okay. Könnten Sie mir bitte am Ende einer Minute eine Bewertun
Yes. You're 
わかりました。デルタ方
Oh, good.
好的。四个
قاعدة ترانكويليتي، هيوستن. لقد جمعنا الآن جميع بيانات تحديد المدى التي يمكننا استخدامها، ويمكنك العودة إلى وضع التن
بر
D'accord. Avant de poursuivre, établissons un débit binaire élevé et patientons une seconde. Ensuite, pendant la procédure, veuillez patienter une fois la mise sous tension de MAIN B effectuée afin que nous puissions l'examiner s
حسنًا يا جو. بخصوص الأخبار، يرغب جيم في تأجيل ذلك قليلًا، وأريد أن أطلب من منظم
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. تح
Аполлон-8, Аполлон-8, это Хьюстон, Хьюстон.
收到。穆切亚，指挥官。声音洪亮清晰。告诉杰瑞、格斯、刘易斯以及所有和我一起工作过的人“你好”。约翰·惠特勒，如果你看到
रॉजर। चंद्रमा की हमारी यह यात्रा आपको शायद सरल या आसान लगी हो। मैं आपको आश्वस्त करना चाहता हूँ कि ऐसा बिल्कुल नहीं था। जिस सैटर्न वी रॉकेट ने हमें कक्षा में पहुँचाया, वह एक अविश्वसनीय रूप से जटिल मशीन है, जिसका हर एक पुर्जा त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता है। मेरे सिर के ऊपर स्थित इस कंप्यूटर में 38,000 शब्दों की शब्दावली है, जिनमें से प्रत्येक शब्द को हमारे, यानी चालक दल के लिए अत्यंत महत्वपूर्ण होने के लिए बहुत सावधानी से चुना गया है। मेरे हाथ में जो स्विच है, उसके कमांड मॉड्यूल में ही 300 से अधिक समकक्ष हैं, इस एक स्विच डिज़ाइन में ही। इसके अलावा, असंख्य सर्किट ब्रेकर, लीवर, रॉड और अन्य संबंधित नियंत्रण उपकरण भी हैं। हमारे सर्विस मॉड्यूल के पिछले हिस्से में स्थित हमारा विशाल रॉकेट इंजन त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता रहा होगा, अन्यथा हम चंद्र कक्षा में ही फँस जाते। मेरे सिर के ऊपर लगे पैराशूट को कल भी पूरी तरह से काम करना होगा, अन्यथा हम समुद्र में गिर जाएँगे। हमें हमेशा से विश्वास रहा है कि यह सभी उपकरण काम करेंगे, और ठीक से काम करेंगे, और हमें शेष उड़ान के दौरान भ
Houston, Columbia. Vi leggo fo
Prêt à 
아쿠아리우스, 저희가 처음 추정했던 물 사용량과 전력 사용량을 비교해 보니, 물 사용량은 거의 정확한 것 같고, 전력 사용량은 처음 분석했을 때 예상했던 것보다 약간 적은 것
ワシントンでは、下院歳入委員会が石油会社、銀行、公益事業に影響を与える税制改革案を承認しました。この案は連邦政府の歳入を年間約20億ドル増加させる可能性があります。また本日、NASAは1972年にサターンVの縮小版を搭載した大規模な軌道上実験場を打ち上げると発表し
И, Одиссея, Хьюстон. Мы также отправляем вам последнее обновление смещения и увеличение времени работы тактовой частот
캡슐은 현재 매우 잘 작동하고 있습니다. 250(인버터)은 132도, 150(인버터)은... 5도입니다. 대기(인버터)는 120도이고, 스러스터는 오른쪽, 왼쪽은 100도
Roger, du p
You want to go ba
No, just the coast is all that's socked in. The rest of it's CAVU (clear and visibility unlimited). As long as I get some time I can look. I've got some roads down here that are pretty 
... Vediamo, circa 1
Okay. All three of them are still 37.
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। कल रात यहाँ पहले की किसी भी रात की तुलना में थोड़ी ज़्यादा ठंड थी। क्या EEC
Okay, you might let them know that, if they hadn't thought of it, that we
Die K
Yes, the Retro Jettison ARM first. Jettison Retro. Report Jettison retros to Guaymas. Retro Power-SAFE, Retro Jet-SAFE, Re
あなたは彼らに「ブエナス・ディアス」またはそれに似たような言葉を返し
알겠습니다. 2-1페이지의 4단계에 따라 명령 모듈
はい、CB ESSE
Gut, versuchen wir es mit dem Befehl „Wiedereintrittsrate“. Das hatte ich sowieso vor, aber dann dachte ich, es ginge nicht, weil wir keine Antwort erhalten haben. Da wir es aber nicht unbedingt brauchen, ve
روجر، مايك. نود أن تقوموا بتشغيل مفتاح "التسارع" على مفاتيح "الوضع اليدوي". ثم تشغيل مفاتيح "الاختيار التلقائي"، ثم الانتقال إلى "معدل الإطلاق". سيمنعنا ذلك من إطلاق المحركا
不，……是普通的吐司……这些
네. 10단계 정도 걸리지만 아주 간단합니다. 좋습니다. CB 16, 인버터 2, 닫으세요. CB 11, AC 버스 A 버스 타이 인버터 2, 닫으세요. 패널 14, 인버터 스위치 2를 확인하세요. CB 11, 랑데부 레이더 2, 닫으세요. 랑데부 레이더, 놓으세요. 랑데부 레이더를 패널 3으로 옮기세요
正解です。また、そのページには、前回の正解、あるいは追加の練習問題で「再確立」というセクション
Ok. Eccoci qui. Lo scopo è la correzione di metà rotta per un ritorno libero.:; meno 0021,3, più 0004,1, meno 0031,2; HA e HP sono NA; DELTA-V 0038,0; 031, 120, 298, meno 00213, più 00041, meno 00312; NA. E ho i tuoi angoli GDA. Becchegg
D'accord. Panneau 5, signaux MAIN A et MAIN 
Stiamo viaggiando attraverso l'Africa in questo momento. Sono in modalità Impulso. Abbiamo avuto una parte piuttosto infr
了解しました。1
And, Houston, the secondary radiator flow check is complete and
了解
I'm afraid I didn
Роджер. Ниже приведено описание работы панели: предохранители на левой панели работают так же, как и сообщалось ранее, без повторения. Пирогаситель активирован. Автоматическое реверсирование выключено. Выбор режима в обычном режиме, автоматический, гиромотор в обычном режиме. Все Т-образные рукоятки выдвинуты. Задержка реверсирования в обычном режиме, освещение кабины включено. Кра
罗杰，金丝雀，双子座。我们已恢复正常飞行计划，但目前我们的飞行计划在具体时间方面不够详细。请您转告休斯顿，我们希望随着实验的进行，飞行计划能够更新，包含更具体、更准确的时间信息。他们的飞行计划和我们一样，我们希望能够进行一些更新，使时
حسناً. إنه ف
了解。テレビの開始時間と終了時間を正
11, Houston. Certains de nos gars viennent de rentrer et disent que le ciel est bien dégagé au-dessus 
Dovrò lasciare che la macchina fotografica si f
Там написано «сниж
Хорошо, Аполлон-8. Хочешь попробовать автонаведение? Кажетс
हे भगवान, मैं आपको बता दूं, उस दूरबीन से दिखा
Sì. Ne vedo uno piuttosto grande e isolato. Ce ne sono un paio più a sinistra
アメリカの宇宙記録を破りました。そして03。確かCSQ（宇宙服務規程）を過ぎていたと思いますが、彼らは…挑戦したがっていました。私は彼らに尋ねました。「タイムド・テープ・ダンプは全て受信できていますか？」彼らは「完璧で
क्या आप अभी 134 और कुछ महीनों के लिए बिना COMM के कोई मिडकोर्स करने की
Deux ou trois bras cassés, et tout ira
11，我们仍然看到您航天器的运行速率高于我
まあ
I understand the technique, Jack. W
روجر، فحص نظام التحكم الإلكتروني سهل للغاية. نظام القياس عن بُعد لدينا يفحص جميع أنظمتك بشكل سليم. هل أنت مستعد لتحديث 
Okay. Wir haben es nicht eilig. Das ist sogar eine sehr angenehme Einstellung. Die Sonne steht unter, scheint also nicht durch die Fenster und heizt die Wohnung auf. Wir haben die Erde konstant vor Fenster 1. Wir haben den Mond konstant vor Fenster 3, und natürlich haben wir uns auf die maximale Wärmegewinnung eingestellt. Solange die Thermiker zufrieden
Okay, and leave a little space if you can to the right of these because when we talk about the backup procedure, why then we can just use the same listing, and I'll - I'
रॉजर, ब्रूस। धन्यवाद। हमें टीवी चाहिए। हमने सब कुछ कनेक्ट कर द
粒子は見えました。日の出の時、太陽から背を向けていたので、粒
يا برج الجوزاء 4، لستَ بحاجة لقياس درجة حرارة
좋아요, 아쿠아리우스. 당분간 이 설정을 유지하시고, 배터리 상태를 
Gli elementi di cui abbiamo ancora bisogno saranno letti il ​​più tardi possibile, prima dello stivaggio finale. E non
Das Wasser 
ठीक है। बैट चार्ली पाव
D'accord, Jack. J'ai une autre question à la page 18. À 1 minute, je suis d'accord avec l'activation du bras maître, mais je me demande pourquoi je d
أعتقد أن جيم سيخلع الخوذة الآن عن البقية؛ فالجو يصبح خانقاً بعض الشيء داخلها. هذه الخوذات لا تحتوي على واقيات للوجه، ونواجه صعوبة في التنفس عند ارتد
Das Bücken ist recht einfach. Dabei habe ich mir den Anzug schmutzig gemach
ठीक है, जैक। चलिए, बात करते हैं कि मैं किस तरह से सही स्थिति में आऊंगा और 
9, /: 45597, meno 040, più 157, più 34188, meno 01353, più 00780 180 008 001, NA, più 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, giù 131, sinistra 28, più 0758, meno 16500 12987, più - o 36277; e q
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. أنت تقطع الصوت بشدة. قلها مر
Okay. Ich bin falsch
«Аполло
Roger, Canton. Hast du gelesen, dass ich im Rückwärtsgang war? Hast du gelesen, dass mein Manöver deaktiviert war? Hast du gelesen, d
Stop right there. That is worse, Bill. Go back where you were. You made it disappear to our 3 o'c
Das klingt super, Ken. Nur ein kleines Problem: Um uns herum schweben lauter helle Objekte, und außerdem reflektiert dieser Teil des Wassermanns das Licht extrem sta
Роджер. Мое состояние хорошее; уровень топлива 51% и 69%; кислород 84% и 100%; давление в кабине держится хорошо. Все системы постоянного и переменного тока работают исправно. Единственное, что я хотел бы сообщить относител
マイク、私たちが持っている最新の状態ベクトルを実行したところ、ペリシンス山脈は 6
Ricevuto. 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 만약 이 중간 기착지를 확보하지 못하더라도, 우리는 여전히 다른 곳을 시도할 것이며, OCTO 10인 미르팍을 시도해 보는 것도 고
Род
Ricevuto, Neil
双子座 VI，双子座 VI。一切都结束了
好的。饮用水箱里没水了。几分钟前我们
इस समय, मैं मेडिकल रिकॉर्डर को 1 ऑफ से 1 ऑन और 2 ऑफ मोड में बदल रहा हूँ। जिम को सोने जा
我们希望有足够的……控制特性是/指令模块的，以及我们是否可以仅使用姿态控制控制器来操纵组合体，以便在 4 加 30 处拍摄服务模块
好的，休斯顿。回读 382，二级蒸发器水控制阀关闭，一级蒸发器水
E, Acquario, Houston. Vorremmo che tu, nel tuo allineamento, potessi continuare con la sottile linea di attivazione 31? Procedi diretta
Tell them the next time though, to get those clouds out of the way so I can see the city and n
Houston, Columbia ist in OMNI C, Charlie, bitte leiser sprechen. Könntest du mir bei Gelegenheit bitte die Ko
객실 상대 습도는 20%입니다. 냉매량은 66%입니다. 우주복 온도는 68도, 압력은 5.8psi, 증기 온도는 우주복 회로에서 50도로 쾌적합니다. 산소 공급량은 65~100%이며, 주 회로는 24, 25, 25, 25A, 예비 회로는 25, 25
マイク、他のみんなが寝る前に私の状況をお伝えします。3 時間ほど寝て、もう一度食
Хорошо, Джек. Мы... Мы собираемся установить регулярное время для наблюдения и сна. Фред долго не спал, поэтому я встал немного раньше, чтобы его сменить. Джек и Фред сейчас спят, поэтому я дам им поспать столько, сколько они смогут, потом у нас будет время поесть, а затем я немного лягу спать. И мы ра
Ну, э
正在处理
休斯顿航班，这里是双子星8号。我们正在阿金纳火箭上保持约150英尺的轨道高度
Bonne affaire. Continuez à travaill
أبولو 8، هيوستن. نعم. نحن بصدد الحصول على بياناتك، وقد يطرأ تغيير على عرض الحز
Okay. Sie möchten also, d
حسنًا. مع وجود ضوء الشمس المباشر من النافذة، خارج مجال كاميرا التلفزيون كما هو الحال الآن، نود م
रॉजर।
Nein, wir haben einen S
... to NORMAL, and check the radia
D'accor
Wirklich 
侧面，我们处于最小死区姿态保持状态；接触时，我加大了推力 X；不久之后，姿态出现了明显的振荡，推进器也开始点火，所以我们将死区调至最大，并在收回过程中手动操控飞行器保持稳定
ठीक है।
로저. 그때는 아무런 흔적도 없었습니다. 다만 좌표가 - -인 수상할 
Хорошо. И мы понимаем, что так и не узнали, что с
И, Водолей, прежде чем мы сможем отправить вам груз, нам нужно будет замкнуть автоматический выключатель UPDATA LINK на панели 
우리는 45마일 정도였던 것 같은데, 정확한 거리는 측정기를 통
还有一点。之所以选择这个中途点火时间，部分原因是考虑到氦气罐即将排气。这样，我们希望能够确保能量供应充足，并且您也能控制排气时间，以防万一您
حسنًا. وقد استعدت جهاز CAP COM الحقيقي ا
روجر،
Only the newest feature is of any sharp definition to them, and eventually they get eroded down by the constant bombardment of s
正解です。操縦モードは手動、ジャイロは使用せず、機動は
Houston, Apollo 8. The water is in the process of bei
안
トラン
Apollo 8, Houston. On va faire les besoins. Terminé
انتظر لمدة دقيقتين؛ ثم س
Okay. Ho
処理中
D'accord. En ce qui concerne votre question sur l'étape 13 de l'autocollant, je compr
Our altitude's building up a little
Wir 
حسنًا. ظهرك ملاصق للحقيبة
罗杰。所有这些程序都会奏效——都会精确地制定出来，我们同意在航程中期之
로저. 5 SPS/G&N: 37201, -060, +047 086 09 3666, +33521, +03441, -0145 458, NA, 032
Roger. Ich glaube nicht, dass du die GET-Datei vom B
是的。
Apollo 11, qui Hou
休斯顿，这里是 Gemini V
待機せよ、イーグル。ステップ4で待
いやいや。フレッド
好的，吉姆。机动平台：目的是中段-7。是。不适用。HA 不适用。HP 为 +0020.5。DELTA-V R 为 0019.3。燃烧时间，0:39；008,000；其余为不适用；推力将为 10%。
여기 아래는 모든 게 좋아 보이네
Rog. Je ne sais pas exactement ce qui s'est passé quand on s'est approchés, mais je peux te dire une chose: je suis content qu'on ait passé autant de temps à s'entraîner à ouvrir et fermer les écoutille
14 ページ、右側、下部近くの「軌道科学」の下の「検証オン」を消し、「トラック 180 プラス 19 の視覚ターゲット 3」も削除し、ペンで書
Friendship Seven, Bermudes, nous avo
Ok. Le temperature del tuo pacco batterie vanno da 85 a 44 gradi. Gli iniettori vanno da 44 a 21 gradi; e lo scudo termico è ben al di sopra dei limiti minimi in tutte le varie posizioni. Le temperature sembrano variare in base all'inclinazione del sole, e non c'è da preoccuparsi. Sembrano tutte molt
La vecchia stella numero 30 sembra trov
好的。一切都
И ещё кое-что об «Аполлоне-13»: мы наблюдали, и вы, возможно, тоже это видите, небольшое колебание ко
注意してください、私の O2 圧力は 960 を少し超えたところで維持されています。コマンド パイロットはぐっすり眠っているので、現時点では O2 高レートにするつもりはありません。眠らせてあ
ठीक है। समझ गया। और आप अपने T/M स्विच को वापस REAL-TIME/ACQ-AID स
はい。2 4 は4.7ボルト、2 5 は4.8ボルト、1 2 は4.8ボルト、1 4 は4.8ボルト、1 6 は4.5ボルト、2 1 は4.8ボ
ロジャー、11です。その機能はありません。良いマークを得るには、Mラインが
Roger. Sembra che l'unico modo per riuscirci sia spegnere i te
Yuri Alekseyevich, nous avons un problème: après la fermeture de l'écoutille, un des contacts n'a pas fait un bon contact. De ce fait, nous allons démonter l'écoutille et la remont
كانت تلك حركة دوران
아니요, 그건 잘못된 방법인 것 같네요, 프랭크. 우리가 그림을 놓치고 있는 것 같아요. 자, 보세요
هيوستن،
Nous avons obtenu une lecture d
حسناً، يبدو أنها صُنعت خصيصاً لهذا الغرض - هذا هو - هذا كل شيء، أليس كذلك؟ ألم تُصنع لتوضع هنا بحيث تقوم بتخزينها بوضعها هنا بدلاً من 
友谊七号，这里是虹
E, Vance, abbiamo intenzione di in
We're going to make the bet out of
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很神奇，就是眼睛还没适应的时候，周围一片漆黑。我确实能看到窗户上有一些涂层。现在要回到超高频VOX模式进行发射。打开面罩擦拭右侧麦克风。我舔了一下。关上面罩。面罩立刻密封，以便宇航服电路开始工作。我可不想再被它弄脏。宇航服进气口的温度稳定在68度左右。所以穹顶又要升起来了。现在温度是76度，75度。看来这个更高的设置才是我们想要的。我想再往上加半格，应该就能锁定温度了。宇航服终于开始降温了，所以我知道该把温度调到什么程度了。我已经将宇航服和控制杆的冷却液量设定在 8.5。此时穹顶读数为 75 度。宇航服进气口温度为 68 度。非常舒适。我能感觉到凉爽的空气拂过我的脸庞。氧气量看起来也很好，分别为 60 和 75 psi（单位为百）。我一直在观察 250 逆变器。它的温度接近 140 度，而 150 对比度逆变器的温度已降至约 100 度。待机温度约为 100 度，也就是舱内温度。第三点，250 逆变器——它有点问题，我会密切关注。舱内热交换器的温度稳定在 40 度，这让我很头疼，因为我显然欠了弗兰克·萨蒙斯基 50 美分。我感到很惊喜。舱内燃料读数也略高。让我看看，我们现在的燃料压力是 5.5 psi。读数大约是5点，更正一下，5.3，对于这个舱室来说不算太高。外面天色渐暗，我想现在出去看看星星。左手手套上手电筒的电池盖有点松动了。只有开关那部分松动，没问题，只是电池盖磨损得比较快。我一边想着，一边看了看手表，以防万一。更正一下，没错，没
Роджер, Фрэнк. Ваше обновление данных о блоках за 51 час будет пропущено. 
Houston, Apollo 11. 
Ja, ich habe ve
了解しました。挿入後、脱出モードからキャビンモードに切り替えた後、スーツループの設定を変更しましたか？特に、セカンダリーキャニスターに乗っている間に、ダイバータバルブの位置を「EGRESS
Et, 11, ici Houston. Voici quelques informations supplémentaires basées sur notre analyse de votre dernière combustion: il semble que vous ayez obtenu une combustion complète et efficace. Nous affichons une pression de chambre de 94 psi et tout semble indique
分かりました。その通りです。最新情報の最後の文には、彗星のロール角が45度と155度になる可能性があると書いてありますね。さて、ジャック、ここで重要なのは、彼らが見せてくれた図によると、彗星は太陽から約10度離れているように見えるということです。そして、太陽を影で覆う彗星の形状から、ロール角が約45度から75度の間であれば、太陽の影響を受けずに六分儀を通して彗星を見ることができるようです。ロール角が75度を超えると、彗星は視野内に収まっているものの、太陽も視野内に収まっているようです。45度から75度までは観測できていないのに、75度
알겠습니다. 저희는 그 문제를 바로 논의하거나 MSC-10 실험 직후에 논의할 예정입니다. 실험은 대략 한 시간 반 정도 걸릴 
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन। आप क्वां
了解しました。これが実際の値です。最初のも
とても良いですね。カプコンに戻りま
Affermativo, abbiamo completato il test. Vi daremo i dati tra un secondo. Abbiamo superato il controllo stellare del sestante in assetto di ingresso e in questo momento stiamo manovrando per il nostro pri
目前为止，我们对时钟灯或 
はい。ステップ4は「姿勢制御：ヨー、
Roger. Houston, this is Apollo 8. What we are doing on the control point tracking - I managed to look for a -1 at the same time we were trying to do a -2 on this rev. I picked up two marks which are just as small, but more easily recognizable, than the ones that were given to me. I know that I can repeat the process and pick the same small point on the next rev. Now I can try to look for the control points that are written down, but I think that I have better control over the o
يا كناري، كيف تقر
阿波罗8号，休斯
네,
Okay, H
Okay. Wir haben die Breite des Persischen Golfs übernommen, und ich kann Ihnen aus erster Hand wohl nur einen e
-7：减去 0003.1，加上所有零，加上 00001，不适用，加上 0020.5，0003.1，23，008，359；其余部分不适用。备注
حسناً يا جو. لقد وضعنا العلبة داخل الكيس، وشريطين حول جانبي الكيس، بإحكام شديد، وكلاهما مغلق 
11, hier spricht Houston. Wir haben jetzt ein gutes Bild von Buzz, aber keine Sprachmodulation. Könnten Sie bitte die Blende der Fernsehkamera etwas öffnen? Ver
Ich mu
11, ici Houston. Suite à la purge effectuée par le système de gestion des eaux usées, nous avons conclu que votre capteur de débit d'oxygène est effectivement défectueux. Comme je l'ai mentionné lors de votre explication concernant la vidange cyclique de l'accumulateur d'eau, même si le système fonctionnait, indiquant probablement un débit plus élevé, ce débit ne semblait pas suffisant. Compte tenu de cela et du débit actuel, nous avons conclu que le transducteur est défectueux. Nous allons maintenir l'injection d'oxygène pendant environ une heure, pu
VI, négatif. Nous regardons simplement le soleil
Мы получили поздравления из Гавайев! Вы слышал
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Je contrôle les commandes de vol électriques, heure actue
わかりました。コピーする準備ができたら、地図のアップデートをお
خزان الأكسجين رقم 1: 270 رطلاً، 270؛ خزان
收到。迈克，你能确认一下B3和C4推进器都已关闭吗？完毕。还有，你的雷达应答器也已
Ricevuto. Area 1 Echo è di un'ora, 15 minuti e 42 secondi. Ripet
ठीक है। चरण 1, BIOMED बंद करें; चरण 2, LOW BIT RATE पर जाएं; चरण 3, DOWNVOICE BACKUP पर जाएं; चरण
Be
They are playin
그건 확실해요. 짐이 최대 확대로 보여줬어요
Welche hast du? Die 60? Die 60 hast du,
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Stimiamo che la batteria B si caricherà in circa 2-3 or
了解しました。フランク、今回の噴射で必要なのは毎秒8フィート、毎秒8フィートです。放射状上向きに噴射したいの
रॉजर। हाँ, यह प्रकाश की ओर था। पृथ्वी लगभग दो तिहाई प्रकाशित थी, जिसका टर्मिनेटर क्षितिज की ओर नीचे था। और अब पृथ्वी के विपरीत किनारे, सूर्यप्रकाश वाले किनारे से, लगभग एक चौथाई से एक तिहाई त्रिज्या अंदर की ओर आ रही थी। सामान्यतः, केंद्र से होकर ग
ठ
Je pense qu'on devrait f
Houston, we've got two angles here at 3 minutes in ascent. 
Oka
了解
收到。面板状态如下：左侧面板上的保险丝开关状态与之前报告一致，不再赘述。点火装置已启动。自动反推装置已关闭。模式选择正常，自动，陀螺仪正常。所有“T”型手柄均已按下。反推延迟正常，座舱灯均已开启。红色滤光片已开启。低频遥测已开启。救援辅助系统为自动。除着陆气囊处于中间关闭位置外，所有顺序面板项目均正常。燃油量为90-100%。姿态指示为右偏5度，左偏3度，下偏36度。EPI指示良好，目前已接近伍默拉上空。从我指示的发射时间起算，时
Согласно расчетам, вы должны увидеть Луну. Это будет полнолуние. Вы должны видеть б
Questo è Sigma Seven, a. Nessuna velocità di imbardata, un leggero rollio a sinistra di ½ grado al secondo. Un leggero beccheggio di ¼ di g
Und vergiss nicht 
Nun, wir werden uns umdrehen und nach unten neigen, sodass wir aus den vorderen Fenstern hinun
O
我已经走出了黑暗的阴影。
नहीं
Хорошо. 10, /: 45597, минус 040, плюс 157, плюс 35186, минус 01512, минус 00520 180 007 000, Ноябрьская Альфа, плюс 0
OK, ça 
Hey, Jim, this is
わかりました。このNAVの視認は延期できます。予定時刻はここで
Джек, я думаю, нам это пока не нужно, но мы зададим команду, когда будем готовы. Кажется, они сейчас сбрасывают данные с ленты. С ракетой-носителем всё в порядке. Космический аппарат тоже выглядит хорошо, судя по тем нескол
Der Kabinendruck liegt konstant bei 5,5. Die Kabinentemperatur beträgt 100 Grad. Die Luftfeuchtigkeit in der Kabine beträgt 25 Prozent. Der Kühlmittelstand beträgt 67 Prozent. Die Umgebungstemperatur im Anzug beträgt 62 Grad. Einlassdruck. Einlasstemperatur,... Der Druck im Anzug beträgt 5,8. Die Dampftemperatur beträgt 57 Grad und sinkt, seit ich sie reduziert hab
— Je n'ai pas de lumière fixe en 
Ricevuto. Ricev
훌륭해
Для
알았어, 잭
そうだ。レス
This is Friendship Seven. Working just like clockwork on the control check, and it went through j
Nun, das ist auf den in letzter Zeit gestiegenen Durchfluss zurückzuführen
Роджер, в данный момент он вставляет внутриротовой тер
I just pressurized 
Roger, qui è Friendship Seven. Capisco, c
Ho il nastro adesivo
Okay, Jack. The next step is to stop up the bypass hole, which is the hole in the center of the bottom of the canister; we want to stop that up because we don't want to bypass the flow; and I forgot to tell you to get something to stick in that hole. We recommend that you either use a wetwipe, or cut off a piece of sock and stuff
わかった、ジャック。ジョー・カーウィンから電源の入れ方を教わったんだ
Okay. Damit ist der Mond im Bild. Wi
Ich sehe gar nichts, Gus. Die Sauerstoffmenge war am Ende 
ठीक है, बज़
D'accord, Ken. Péricynthe plus 2, retour rapide / 62871, moins 161, plus 1
Ricevuto, Bill. Vi sento debole ma chiaro. Proce
هذا صحيح، أبولو 8: أربع دورات رباعية لمدة 1
Привет
로저, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 여기는 잔지바르 캡 콤입니다. 
जी हाँ। हमने कंपन महसूस किया, लेकिन यह इतना तीव्र नहीं था कि हमें लगा कि कोई बड़ी दुर्घटना होने वाली है; बस कंपन शुरू हुआ और फिर EN ल
はい、ランダムに揺れます。予測できるような振動は全くありませ
検閲
Боюсь, я не расслышал это, Фред, и пока я слушал, он сказал, что хотел бы получить еще один результат по 
هذا 
Okay, scratch "MASTER ARM - OFF" at plus 15, and "At Engine Cutoff" after "MODE CONTROL: - ATT HOLD," we want a " ENTER," and "Damp Excessive rates Via Y, Z translation." And a question on the - propellant quantity, we expect it to get down below 37 percent on this burn. Does that compare with tha
पृष्ठ के दाहिने आधे भाग में, "कक्षीय विज्ञान ब्लॉक" को काट
了解。N2タンクの圧力とタンクのブラボー圧力を1960
肯，我们绕路的时候，你想让我用高增益模式吗？还是全指向模式就够用了
जी हां, और एक और सिस्टम आइटम यहां है - अपने क्रायो टैंकों को संतुलित करने के लिए, क्या आप अपने ऑक्
Roger. Je recommand
休斯顿，阿波罗1
روجر. لا مشكلة. جيم، سأقدم لك بعد دقائق الجدول الزمني العام لصباح الغد. قد ترغب في تدوين بعض الملاحظات، مع العلم أنه ليس لدينا إجراءات مفصلة لك في الوقت الحالي. ربما ترغب في أن
Roger. Cap est opérationnel et je le suis aussi. La c
わかりました。家の横のパネル16にあります。CBバットフィードタイ、2つ、開、バッテリー1、高電圧、オフ/リセット、バッテリー2、低電圧、オフ/リセット後オン、バッテリー2、高電圧、オフ/リセット後オン、バッテリー1、高電圧、オン。パネル1
まあ、いずれにせよ、君には一つあげる価値があ
네, 마이크, 연소 시간과
подо мной довольно большая грозовая зона. Она, должно быть, простирается, потому что я вижу вспышки молний далеко на горизонте справа. Они также видны почти прямо подо мной.
了解、ジャック。O2タンク1の圧力は200を少し
Вот проверка LCG: «Проверьте.
Хорошо. Хорошо, теперь у вас подключен инвертор 1 к обеим шинам переменного тока. И, Джек, одни
D'accord. Et encore une fois, dans la zone où j'ai dit que l'ordre n'était pas critique, il ne l'est toujours pas lorsque vous revenez en arrière. Mais maintenant, je vais continuer. D'accord, panneau 4: TELCOMM, GROUPE 1, AC1, il ne sera plus AC1, il passera à OFF. Panneau 5: tous les disjoncteurs de ce panneau qui étaient positionnés vont mainte
ねえ、ジョー？FAOは準備できていますか？それとも、ソ
ن
알겠습니다. 입력하신 시간을 확인해 보니 16분이 맞습니다. 예정된 시간에 맞춰 업데이트된 정보를 제공해 드리겠습니다. 동시에, 해당 항로의 상태 벡터도 업데이트해 드리겠습니다. 중간 항로 수정 7번은 초당 0.7피트 미만이므로 실행하지 않겠습니다. 예정된 수정 사항이 하나 있는데, 이는 필수 사항은 아닙니다. 선택 사항입니다. 하지만 수정 사항을 삭제하더라도 
それで待機してください。アクエ
वे इसी ब
Хорошо. Мы проверяем прожекторы, которые вам дали. В
D'accord. Vous
ठीक
И, Хьюстон, Игл. Приобрел лампоч
D'accord. Il faut vérifier que l'alimentation secteur est bien présente: panneau 16, inverseur 2 fermé. Disjoncteur de l'inverseur 2 fermé. Ensuite, sur le panneau 11, sous Affichages de vol, il faut fermer les disjoncteurs GASTA et COMMANDER. Toujours sur le panneau
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 중간 항로 수정 2번입니다. SPS/G&N 63059, +0.97, -0.20, 점화 02644 5792, +0.0118, -0.0003, +0.0177, 롤 277 355 0.15, BLOCK은 NA, DELTA-VT 00213 0.03 0.0168, 육분면 별 30 2082 3.70. 나머지 PAD는 NA입니다
I've been advised from the Cape you might put your prop switch off and recycle a couple of times, and it might sto
Falls ihr sie nicht alle aufesst, bringt sie zurück, und wir essen
Okay, Fred-o. Reading you 5-by. The procedure I'm go
了解
يا إلهي، هذا الشيء فيه انحناءة صغي
Roger
로저. 이 입자들의 크기는 얼마나 되나
Бл
Hello, Muchea Com Tech, Muchea Com Tech. R
了解。大丈
Roger.... that is 01 12 08; Rev 1; 179 degrees west; 08:28:42, rig
Roger. E ho un paio di altre cose, Mike. Dobbiamo terminare la carica della batteria B in questo momento, e inoltre, il meteo sta mettendo a dura prova il nostro punto di atterraggio previsto 
أي
Roger. Wir hatten vorher etwa 20 Punkte. Und nur zur In
टीवी परीक्षण के संबंध में, मेरा मानना ​​है कि हम टीवी से स्वतंत्र रूप से, लेकिन उसी समयावधि या लगभग उसी सीमा में पृथ्वी की लाल और नीली तथा
罗杰。船员状态报告如下：水量方面，指挥官今天至今已航行约50公里；CMP 43；LMP 44。我们今天已经吃了两顿饭。第三天的A餐和B餐；除了硬邦邦的一小块（没人喜欢）之外，大部分都吃完了。布丁
11, Houston. We'll have you for about 3 or 4 minutes through Reds
D'accord. Je vais sélectionner « Indiquer l'attitude rétro », sections 1: Plateforme - VITESSE ORBITALE, FDR - PLATEFORME, FDM - VITESSE,
자, 이제 필름 테이프 팩 11번을 시작해 보겠습니다. 방금 9번을 끝냈는데, 9번 팩에는 불이 들어오는 것 같았습니다. 8번 팩에도 불이 들어오는 방법이 
Apollo 8. Houston. Ho un punteggio per voi. Oakland 41, Kansa
До TIG-сварки у нас осталось 4 ми
Roger. In questo periodo sto guardando avanti al piano di volo. Francamente, ritengo che siano necessarie molte pi
Okay. On primary glycol loop activation, crew option on step 1, first line; the rest of it we'll
Okay. War das alles, was du seit deiner Mahlzeit gegessen h
ये रहे आपके पुराने दिनों की यादें, अगर आप 
На наших наземных компьютерах мы подтверждаем, что угол наклона вала и цапфы направлен на звезду. Однако, похоже, что этот угол наклона вала и цапфы также направлен в сторону структуры, так что, хотя вы будете видеть горизонт Земли, звезда... будет скрыта ею. Мы рекомендуем выполнить автоматический маневр в соответствии с положениями, указанными в плане полета. 
روجر. الآن، للمناورة بحيث يكون الميلان صفرًا، والارتفاع 90 درجة، والانعطاف للداخل - الارتفاع هنا، والميلان هنا. الانعطاف - أيًا كان مقدار الانعطاف لدينا. حسنًا، فانس. في مناورتنا الأولية لضبط الوضع، سأضطر إلى استخدام - لعرض 16 20، وسأضطر إلى است
11日、ヒューストン。ヘルメットバッグ（訂正：ハッチバッグ
Houston, il portello ha superato il controllo di integrità. Ora vado al tun
你现在想把其中一个遮阳板放下来还是
Roger, Jim. Bezüglich Ihres Verdampfers: Sollten Sie das nächste Mal ein ähnliches Problem auf der Rückseite in d
Okey doke. H
صحيح. كنتُ مضطرًا للتحكم في آلية التعشيق على الفتحة في كل مرة أسحبها، لذا لم أتمكن من السحب بقوة كما اعتدت. لذلك كان علينا التنسيق فيما بيننا، و
Хорошо. Вращательная мощность,
没错。我刚才利用月亮锁定了目标。我会给你做个简短的
حسنًا، سأخبرك، لقد استمتعتُ كثيرًا بالتجول هنا في الداخل، ذهابًا وإيابًا من مكان إلى آخر. إنه أ
카나리아, 쌍둥이자리 
Roger. Du bi
Pensavo
Roger, understa
알겠습니다. 이제부터 저희가 여러분께 알려드릴 것은 배터리 A 충전 절차와, 이 모든 과정을 
ठीक है। पानी के बॉयलर के बारे में: यह दिलचस्प है कि मुझे अपना खुद का बॉयलर मिलता है - मैं कहने वाला था कि जब भी आप हमारा माइक ऑन करते हैं, तो मुझे अपनी आवाज़ लगभग 2 सेकंड के अंतराल के साथ सुनाई देती है। प्राथमिक और द्वितीयक बॉयलर की जाँच के संबंध में, मुझे लगता है कि प्र
ええ、確かにそうです。減速モードに入ると、この物体がどれほど冷たくなるか、想像もつかないでしょう。ちょ
روجر.
ठीक
Sto scattando alcune foto delle nuvole alle 
分かりました。色については、海は全体的にロイヤルブルーのような色合いで、雲は当然ながら明るい白
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 원하는 자세로 기동 중입니다. 현재 롤 8.37, 피치 61.
Okay. Ich versuche es von dir zu bekommen, Deke. Ich – du sprichst undeutlich, sprich es ganz lan
はい、コンピューターの電源を切ってください。コンピューターの電源を切ってください
Was die Fenster betrifft, Houston: Die Fenster 1 und 5 weisen einen leichten Schleier auf. Fü
نعم. الآن، ستظهر لك على الأرجح رسالة "37
يرج
Хорошо. Панель 8: установите PYRO ARM, два, в поло
روجر، كيف حالك؟ هل تشعر بعدم ا
ठीक है, जो। मैंने यहाँ से शुरू कर दिया है। मैंने विकल्प 3 पर आगे बढ़ गया हूँ, और डिस्प्ले पर - 1520 - 1525 पर, मैंने 1691 को चुना है। मैं आपको अवलोकन करने और देखने दूंगा जबकि ऑप्टिक्स
Роджер. Вы хотите, чтобы мы остановили интеграцию? Конец с
उस भिनभिनाहट के कारण ऐसा भ्रम होता है मानो आप किसी ट्रेन या अन्य वाहन में हों, और ऐसा लगता है कि आप किसी पटरी पर हैं और आगे बढ़ रहे हैं। ठीक वैसे ही जैसे समुद्र में चलते समय जहाज की आवाज़ 
Ok, imbardata più 27100, beccheggio più 35500, rollio più 33000. E pensi che sia più economico eseguire manualmente quella manovra o prendere l'intervallo di
我没有任何
حسنًا. أقل بقليل من 13. وللعلم فقط، لدينا فريق يعمل على عدة مواضيع. نعمل حاليًا على المرحلة المتوسطة القادمة لتحديد نظام التحكم وكيفية استخدامه مع النظا
وهل لديك صورة تلفزيو
Canton Cap Co
Roger. Für 64.000 Dollar versuchen wir immer noch, den genauen Standort Ihres Landeplatzes, Tranquility Base, zu ermitteln. Wir vermuten, dass er sich auf der LAM-2-Karte bei Juliet 0,5 und 7,8 befindet. 
了解。調子はいいよう
알겠습니다. 저희 계획에 대
So, jetzt haben wir'
نسخ هيوستن. انت
Это подтверждается. На этом проверка завершается. Остальные обновления предназначены лишь для вашей информации и основаны на данных нашей 58-часовой платформы — посмотрите на платформу. У нас всё в порядке. Ваши гироскопы практически не показывают дрейфа с момента обновления графика, где мы наблюдали дрейф по оси X -2,24... по оси Y +0,87, по оси Z -0,11. После обновления, которое, как я полагаю, основано на 52-часовом графике, мы показали дрейф по оси X +0,79, по оси Y +1,06, по оси Z +0,02...
حسنًا. بعد ذلك، في نفس الصفحة، تحت عنوا
Questo è negativo. A parte questo prob
저희도 지금 그
Houston, Apollo 11. Ich habe einen Lagebericht fü
ठीक है। इस प्रकार: /: 45597, माइनस 040, प्लस 157, प्लस 35189, माइनस 01513, माइनस 00346 180 007 000, लागू नहीं, प्लस 0
Роджер. Что касается индекса Доу Джонса, то с момента закрытия торгов во вторник днем, 15-го числа, до примерно 13:05 по хьюстонскому времени сегодня днем
Sigma Seven，Sigma S
Nous aimerions effectuer quelques tests supplémentaires, et le consensus général est qu'il ne semble pas y avoir de problème particulier. Nous aimerions e
Ro
Gemini 4, 
रॉज
टीआर-10 सामान्य स्थिति में आ गया है। मैंने यह पहले भी किया है। ठीक है, सूट का दबाव सही है। इनवर्टर को फिर से देख लीजिए। 250 डिग्
फ्रेड, मैं
Le prochain cratère que l'on aperçoit en bas, c'est Duke Island, juste là. À gauche, le cratère Maskelyne W, le plus grand parmi ceux situés près du centre de l'image. Il s'agit d'un contrôle de position pendant la descente, à environ 3 minutes et 39 secondes. C'est notre contrôle de position longitudinale et transversale avant de virer face au ciel pour acquérir le signal du radar d'atterrissage. Après ce point, nous ne pourrons plus voir la surf
Quanto puoi avvicinarti a una brucia
बिल्कुल; हम धूप में हैं, और ऐसा लगता है क
Liste de contrôle Horizon, parfaite
02:30 أو 02:
了解。バ
天线选择“再入”，它已经处于“再入”状态。推进剂计量表RCS-B，我已经将其设
手順 7 
टर्मिनल रन के दौरान
Roger. Compris. Ajustement de phase à 02 18 26 49,3; 1 plus 07; lacet 0, tangage 0; 25, 00493; 26 et 27, tous à zéro; propulseurs arrière; Posigrad
Хорошо, Вэнс. Наше значение DELTA-P состав
Hawaii Cap Com, Hawaii 
لحظة من فضلك. س
Gemini VI. Siamo ancora a circa 247 km. Abbiamo un GET di 3-
That's okay. Go ahead. We'll maneuver around to 307, 354
Ho impostato la valvola di controllo della tuta
हमारे विशेषज्ञों का कह
Non so se riesci a capirlo, ma nel Mare della Fertilità ci sono diversi crateri appena visibili, vecchissimi cra
I'm positive I'm not getting it, because if - I'd be leaping all over - I'd be leaping all over the sky if I were getting h
로저. 지금 잭에게 델타 값을 받아 적도록 하겠
Хо
알겠습니다. CB BAT A, 전원 입력/포스트랜딩, 열림; 인버터 전원 2, 메인 B, 열림을 계속 진행한 다음, 절차 진입 시 수행했던 단계를 역순으로 진행하
네, 정
罗杰，谢谢。
Roger. Les réchauffeurs d'oxygène sont allumés, et nous allons maintenant
わかりました。あなたのは左側
Roger. Fantastico, a
Schon wieder Gemini 4. Ich sehe dieselbe Art von Lichterbogen, ähnlich den Nordlichtern, nur dass sie unter uns sind. Ich habe sie schon einmal gesehen, damals waren es lange, breite Linien. Sie verlaufen scheinbar parallel zu unserer Flugrichtung und erstrecken sich vom Horizont, knapp unterhalb
最初にそれを見た時、どれくらい離れていたと思います
Хорошо. На панели 250 замыкается автоматическ
Aspetta. Ti racconterò la ve
ठीक है, चरण संख्या - या पृष्ठ 2 पर, हमें चरण 5 करना चाहिए और चरण 6 की दूसरी पंक्ति को संशोधित
यह रिकॉर्डिंग के लिए ब्लाइंड में रखा गया फ्रेंडशिप सेवन 
Roger, Tranq
Сейчас я в режиме записи VOX. Слышу, как зовут Гавайи, ха-ха, зовут Гавайи. Переключусь на прямую пер
わかりました。パネル3で、トランスポンダーをプライマリーに設定し、パワーアンプを
Nous sommes en 
Sorry I
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 첫 번째 통신 테스트를 시작하려고 합니다. 이번 테스트는 업링크 음성, 거리 측정, 그리고 다운링크 전체 테스트로, 기존에 탑재된 장비와 크게 다르지 않습니다. S밴드 일반 모드 음성 
ठीक है। हम अभी भी मध्य प्रशांत की ओर जा रहे हैं, 357 152 359 267,
오로라 세븐, 캡
फ्रेड, हमें
Ok. Ti darò un suggeri
نعم. كان ع
Итак, «Аполлон-8». Позвольте мне рассказать вам о главном: во-первых, мы проводим обзор всех процедур входа в атмосферу и подобной информации, и мы собираемся подробно изучить контрольный список для входа. У нас есть специалисты, которые все еще работают над проверкой
Penso che quello che sta realmente accadendo è che stiamo rotolando e sta cambiando l'angolazione da cui guardo fuori dal 
Roger。当 GERU 小于 07990 时，减
ठीक है, बज़। पहली बात तो 
我们
Я удерживаю настройку управления костюмом
C'est exact. Ce sont les seuls changements sur
시그마
찰리, 2차 누출 점검은 네가 원하는 대로 그대로 읽어 줘. 그러면 내가 체크리스트를 건드리지 
了解。96フィート/
Sag
Sì. Non sono ancora soddisfatto delle foto che sto ottene
حسناً، ما رأيك في ذل
比尔想请求友
Okay. Based on your vec
Роджер. Кажется, я понял. Я многое помнил, поэтому, учитывая то, что ты мне сказал, 
了解しま
好的。杰克，我再强调一下，2.5 小时是我们最早可以开始准备那些强化道具
さあ、ヴァ
좋은 생각이에요, 켄. 그런데 한 가지 작은 문제가 있어요. 우리 주변에 떠다니는 밝은 물체들이 너무 많고, 특히 물병자리 일부가 엄청나게 빛을 반사하고 있거든요. 그래도 한번 시도해 볼 수는 있어요. 문제없어요. 우리가 볼 
Okay. Aus Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Das große britische Radioteleskop Jodrell Bank empfing heute um 5:49 Uhr EDT keine Signale mehr von der sowjetischen Mondsonde Luna 15. Ein Sprecher sagte, es scheine, als habe die Sonde den Mond bereits hinter sich gelassen. Ein weiteres Zitat: „Wir glauben nicht, dass sie gelandet ist“, sagte ein Sprecher von Sir Bernard Lovell, dem Direktor des Observatoriums. Washington UPI: Vizepräsident Spiro T. Agnew forderte, bis zum Jahr 2000 einen Menschen auf den Mars zu schicken. Demokratische Politiker entgegneten jedoch, dass die Bedürfnisse auf der Erde Priorität haben müssten. Agnew, ranghöchster Regierungsbeamter beim Start von Apollo 11 am Mittwoch, sprach offenbar für sich selbst und nicht unbedingt für die Nixon-Regierung, als er sagte: „Meiner Meinung nach sollten wir bis zum Ende dieses Jahrhunderts einen Menschen auf den Mars schicken.“ Laredo, Texas, AP: Einwanderungsbeamte in Nuevo
При 
मैंने अभी-अभी टारगेट 16-A पर एक रन बनाया। बसरा का हवाई अड्डा, यह ठीक फारस की खाड़ी के किनारे पर है। मैंने इसे पकड़ लिया - मैंने लगभग 30° के कोण पर फारस की खाड़ी को पकड़ा... मैंने नीचे की ओर उड़ान भरी और फिर झील को पकड़ा... फारस की खाड़ी के उत्तर-पश्चिम में। बसरा झीलों के ठीक किनारे पर, झीलों के बहुत पास होने के कारण, आप सीधे ऊपर से फॉलो कर सकते हैं और तुरंत हवाई अड्डे को पकड़ सकते हैं। इसलिए मैंने टारगेट तक पहुँचने से काफी पहले हवाई अड्डे को पकड़ लिया, और फिर टारगेट को ट्रैक करना शुरू कर दिया। जब मैं ऊर्ध्वाधर से 20° के कोण पर था, तब तक मैं वास्तव में टारगेट पर था - और रनवे से लगभग 40° के बिंदु तक इसे ट्रैक किया, और मैंने ट्रैकिंग बंद कर दी। मेरे पास 16-mm कैमरे पर 75-mm लेंस था, जिसमें आगे के सिरे से तस्वीरें लेने के लिए एडेप्टर लगा हुआ था और मैंने इसे पिछले प्रयोग से टारगेट के लिए चालू 
On dirait bien que c'est la zone qui arrive, Jim. Voilà le Grand Virage. Je crois qu'on l'a passé, Ji
Dopo aver controllato i sistemi della navicella spaziale, abbiamo scoperto che il propulsore numero 8 apparentemente non si è aperto al momento e questo potrebbe essere stato vero al momento dell'incidente, anche se al momento non possi
- - gli a
Bon, je m'apprêtais à vous parler de la passation de relais, mais j'ai un peu tardé. Comme nous avons suffisamment d'énergie et que nous aimerions avoir la bande S avec vous après la coupure de courant, nous vous demandons de supprimer l'étape « POWER PMP à OFF » de la page 2-5 de votre liste de contrôle d'entrée. Si vous y pensez, laissez-la act
Да. Хорошо. Третий ряд. Прямой контроль над отношением у меня всё 
Das Frühstück war wie immer herrlich. Ich hatte Pfirsichspalten, Bratwürstchen, zwei Tassen Kaffee
あり
Beh, Frank, sembra che esc
Hast du dich ge
ويبدو أن قراءة وحدة التحكم الميكانيكية للعمود تبلغ حوالي 4/100 تحت الصف
और, ह्यूस्टन, एक्व
D'accord. Descendez jusqu'au panneau 380, vanne de régulation de la demande d'oxygène, sur OFF, et vanne de retour du circuit de l'ensemb
13, Хьюстон. Нам нужно установить дополните
You mean after I went to all this work of cranking those numbers in you're going
ケン、
제미니 4, 휴스턴 
Questa è Friendship Seven. Ho disattivato la modalità automatica in imbardata solo per spostarmi a sinistra e guardare il tramonto. Al momento è di nuovo in modalità automatica su tutti
Okay, dann. Un
أرى بعض النجوم الجميلة، وأرى أيضًا تلك الأجسام البيضاء الصغيرة التي تبدو وكأنها تنبعث من الكبسولة نفسها وتنجرف بعيدًا. إذا كانت هذه الأجسام تُستخدم للتحقق من الانحراف، فهذا رائع. أظن أن النجم الذي أراه هو السماك الرامح. سيكون الأمر مثيرًا للاهتمام - لكنه ليس أيًا منهما. إنه أحد الأجسام البيضاء... نجمان ثابتان تمامًا. بدا
روج
휴스턴, 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 여러분께서 검토해 
روجر، هذا ما سمعته. لقد سمعت تقريرك في
Okay, Jim. We are laying for you on that one; it is a subject that we wanted to - to br
Oka
Apollo 8, Houston. Quad A ist etwas wärmer als die anderen Quads. Wie ich bereits erwähnt habe, stehen wir nun vor einer längeren Phase ohne Flüge. Wir bitte
بالتأكيد سأفعل. ودعنا نرى، أردنا فقط إعلامك بأن شحن البطارية ممتاز هذه المرة. يبدو تم
你好，通信技术
D'accord. Il fait assez sombre ici, à l'ombre, et j'ai un peu de mal à voir où je mets les pieds. Je vais me frayer un chemin vers la lumière du s
Не думаю. Когда закончите, я быст
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। यह एक अच्छा सवाल है। काश मुझे भी पता होता। उड़ान के दौरान ये त्रुटियाँ रुक-रुक कर आती रही हैं। मैंने जायरो को बार-बार केज किया और फिर से केज किया। अब मैं ऑर्बिट एटीट्यूड में वापस आ गया हूँ, ले
Roger. Je me sens bien. La dernière fois, on m'a dit
ठीक है। अगला, सीबी, पैनल 11 और 16,
Хорошо. Мне пришлось поменять местами OMNI-модули. И на панели 250 должны быть открыты все два модуля, кроме SEQUENCE A и 
是的。是的，当星星穿过它时，它们会稍微被遮挡一下；然后它们会在左侧出现，你甚至可以看到它们一直延伸到地平线以下。在我看来——如果你计算
Роджер. Судя по о
好的。使用地面相机，分别设置快门速度 1/250 秒、光圈 f/4、f/5.6 和 f/8。我拍摄了很多照片，主要针对 f/5.6 和 f/8 这两个光圈值。我也用 f/11 
حسناً يا جاك، لقد اعتقدنا أن الوقت قد ح
R
Это отрицательно. При таком режиме работы двигателя мы не достигаем 37 процентов, поэтому, думаю, нам не придётся выполнять этот шаг. Мы это проверим для вас. Хорошо. Ещё один момент: «При выключении двигателя, если запуск ручный, то при скорости 30 футов в секунду до конца, уменьшите дроссель до 40 процентов. Когда DELTA-V равно нулю, нажм
كلامك واضح وجليّ يا ج
Abbiamo un t
Ça me va très bien; je préfère largement prendre une éto
没错。好的，接下来我们回到隧道通风口，检查/CM DELTA-P，确保压力保持正常。之后我
That was stupid. Now we go to fly-by-wire low. I had a case of double authority and really flotched it. But better conserve our fuel. It's much too easy to get into double authori
حسنًا. أيضًا، تم تحديد مسارك الآن بناءً على حوالي 5 ساعات من التتبع. أنت الآن على نقطة حضيض تبلغ 69.7 ميلًا مع عودة حرة. تبدو زاوية مسار دخولك حوالي -14 درجة. ستحتاج فقط إلى بضعة أقدام في الثانية للعودة إلى زاوية الدخول الا
Seguirò il suggerimento di Flight e ridurrò l'impostazione al
收到。休斯顿，请讲。阿波罗
روجر. بدءاً من نجم السدس
Okay. Step 4 
Nun, das wird er Ihne
Хорошо. Мои комментарии были такими: Голдстоун сказал, что
روجر. أفهم، لقد قرأتك. 1 170. 3+40. 01 32 34، 2+1
Giusto. Questo vale per il sorvolo e il pericinto più un aggiornamento di
Il nocciolo della questione era che il VC aveva stipulato un cessate il fuoco prima della tregua che avevamo pianificato, com
OK. AF
Ok. Solo per tua informazione, l'Agena era molto stabile e al momento non abbiamo al
حسنًا. في الصف الثاني، سنفتح ASCENT FEED 2 و AS
抜け出しました。バランスを崩してしまいました。戻ってバズに引き継いで
저 아래를 내려다보고 여러분들이 불을 켜놓았는지 확인해 봐야겠어요. 혈압을 
لا مانع لدي. سأكتب ع
मुझे अब भी वो आवाज सुनाई देती है। ऐसा लगता है जैसे कोई पीछे वाले कमरे में कुर्सियाँ पटक रह
حسنًا، توقفنا ومررنا بخيارات المحاذاة الخشنة، ثم المحاذاة الدقيقة، واخترنا ز
هذه هيوستن. نح
—पहले पर 9½ और 24, दूसरे प
نحن بصدد إطلاق
Это здорово; фантастика! Это будет держать геолог
わかった。それから、ジョンの友達が何人かここにいたのを見た。残念ながら、君と同じようにやられたんだけど
好的，2 
Roger. Sul timer della missione, volevamo staccare l'interruttore e lascia
Anche noi vogliamo darvi un bell'aggiornamento sul Greenwi
フレッドさん、約68時間と46分経
Здесь, на месте, в
了解。カウボーイズは昨日クリーブランド・ブラウンズに完敗しました。プエブロのクルーは解放される見込みです。そして、空対地通信にかなりのノイズが入ったと聞きました
حسناً، أستطيع أن أرى ال
Okay, Houston. Die Dockingsonde
Roger, je vous reçois sur HF. Es
रॉजर। पिच 56 डिग्री है। आप देखिए-
Sigma Seven thi
Okay. Uns ist außerdem aufgefallen, dass die University of Houston gestern Abend ihr erstes Heimspiel im Basketball sei
シグマ・セブン、こちらはカル・キャップ・コムです。ブラインドで再放送してい
阅
Хорошо. «Аполлон-8», мы хотели бы обновить ваши часы. Это не для исправления существу
Возможно, нам лучше отложить проверку связи до середины курса, потому что, если мы хотим сгореть к 9, нам
我们预计您的用水量将会下降，同时，DELTA值很快就会上升到160-165小时。另外，我们也想了解一下您目前的休息和用药情
Пр
당신은 일어나고 있
Jim, falls du den Computer nicht brauchst, ruf bitte ENTER an, wir kümmern uns dann um die Antennenumschaltung B-D 
再次检查你的
Ok. Prima di copiare, lascia che te lo legga tutto dall'inizio alla fine, così capirai di cosa stiamo parlando. Il titolo di questa piccola epistola è "Esperimento di correlazione tra fotografia televisiva e cinematografica" e quello che vogliono fare è montare la telecamera con il teleobiettivo su una staffa nella finestr
从地面上，我们透过舷窗看不到任何星星；但从我头顶的舱
Okay, während ich die Klebearbeiten durchführe, werde ich das entsprechende Anzug-Durchflussventil kurzzeitig in die Posit
Besorg
روجر. هل لديك وقت المنطقة 2 دلتا، المنطقة 2 دلت
Ich werde es auf ihre MARK abfeuern. Ich denke, der Zeitpunkt ist
Okay, Jack. Ora sono... Il REGISTRO 1 è in modalità DEC
Setting is -50(degrees). Gyros are free. Holding at -50 (degrees). Standing by for flare. Roll and yaw are holding. I see the flare on my left which is kinda wrong, I think. I think I saw a flash of lightning. Probably - that is lightning I'm seeing, 
13，休斯顿。加油
罗杰，巴兹。我们也注意到了同样的情况。这很像用光照射台
А пока 
В тот раз произошло то же самое, Кен. На этот раз напряжение АРУ упало до минимального значения на несколько секунд, но антенна, похоже, способна просвечивать сквозь космический аппарат, и я гарантирую, что Земля ока
C'est confirmé. Je vais tout d'abord passer rapidement en revue les horaires des événements principaux, puis nous reviendrons sur les détails. Bien. L'interface d'entrée est prévue à 142 heures et 40 minutes; environ 6 heures et demie avant, nous commencerons la procédure en appliquant la puissance de chauffage, en vérifiant les températures du module de commande et en le préchauffant si nécessaire. Nous pensons d'ailleurs que nous devrons probablement le faire. Nous vous fournirons des procédures détaillées ultérieurement. Environ 6 heures avant, nous commencerons la mise sous tension en utilisant la liste de contrôle modifiée de 30 minutes que vous avez utilisée pour la précédente inspection à mi-parcours. Puis, peu de temps avant, environ 5 heures avant, nous vous demanderons d'adopter l'attitude pour un alignement sur l'axe du corps, en utilisant le terminateur terrestre comme précédemment. Dès que nous aurons cela, nous effectuerons la manœuvre -7, ce qui correspond à une combustion d'environ 60 cm/s, soit environ 15 secondes. On m'indique que la vitesse est maintenant descendue à 45 cm/s, ce qui est largement dans la marge. Bien. Une fois cela fait, nous entamerons immédiatement la manœuvre d'évitement du module de service, qui sera dans le plan de la fusée puisque nous l'éjecterons plus tôt que d'habitude. Nous n'avons pas besoin, et ne voulons pas, de composante hors plan. Le module de service sera donc dans le plan de la fusée, po
جيميني 4، هذه محطة اتصالات هيوستن CAP. لا أستطيع استقبالك. سأبث آخر بندين من خطة الرحلة 15 إلى 11:15. 15 إلى 11:15. هذه محطة اتصالات هيوستن CAP تبث بشكل غير مب
Оно держится, но изо дня в день всё повторяется 
Okay. I
我々はここで何
Roger, Bill. Vous connaissez la chaudière secondaire; en fait, les deux procédures de révision sont disponibles dans un manuel de dépannag
حسنًا، يبدو جيدًا. لأنني لا أعرف أين - إلى أي مدى أضعتك. حسنًا، اللوحة 4؛ الاتصالات، المجموعة 1، إلى AC1. في اللوحة 5، أغلق ما يلي: مجموعة الضغط 1، الرئيسية B؛ مجموعة الضغط 2، الرئيسية B؛ درجة الحرارة، الرئيسية B؛ محول الحلقة الثانوية، الرئيسية B؛ المبرد، التحكم/ا
你说从1号和4号四联推进器的颜色
एड, अगर तुम और ज्यादा खाओगे तो कुछ और कर ही नह
Все почтовые инде
Roger. Aucune marque à ce moment-là. J'ai aperçu un petit obje
Ok Gemelli 4. Stai be
Okay. Now, Ken, we'd like to get all squar
Roger. Flight advises it may take several orbits for your computer to come on line. Would like for you to leave the computer at the Prelaunch
ठीक है। पहले चरण के बाद, पहली पंक्ति में से "And VHF-A" को काट दें। दूसरी पंक्ति में से "SIMPLEX operation" को काट दें। तीसरी पंक्ति में से "Prime" को काट दें। इसका मतलब है PRIME POWER AMP, OFF। इस "PRIME" को "OFF" से बदलना चाहिए। और यह उस पंक्ति में दूसरा "Prime" है। तीसरी पंक्ति में अंतिम शब्द "OFF" को भी काट दें और उसकी जगह "PCM" लिखें। चौथी पंक्ति ठीक है। पाँचवीं पंक्ति, जो "VHF VOICE, ON, OFF, OFF" है, उसे काट दें। अगली पंक्ति "Lighting, FLOODS" है, उसे "OFF" होना चाहिए, लेकिन इसके साथ यह जोड़ें, "Or OVERHEAD/FORWARD prefer OFF"। ठीक है। चरण 2 वैसा ही रहेगा; अभी कोई बदलाव नहीं। प्रतीक्षा करें। चरण 2 को छोड़ दें। ऐसा न करें। सीधे चरण 3 पर जाएं, जो "चार्ट के अनुसार सर्किट ब्रेकर कॉन्फ़िगर करें" है। इससे हम पृष्ठ सं
Хорошо. Панель 3: ЗАРЯДКА АККУМУЛЯТОРА, ВЫКЛ. - ты это уже сделал, Джек - далее ИНВЕРТОР ПЕРЕМЕННОГО ТОКА, Панель 5: ГЛАВНАЯ ШИНА, СОЕДИНЕНИЕ АККУМУЛЯТОРА B/C С АККУМУЛЯТОРОМ B/C. А? Да, она в верхнем положении. Автоматический выключатель, ВХОД/ПОСТПОЗИЦИЯ АККУМУЛЯТОРА A, разомкнут; автоматический выключатель, ВХОД/ПОСТПОЗИЦИЯ АККУМУЛЯТОРА B, разомкнут, Панель 5: А
... I didn't real
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हमें पता चला है कि आपने इसे लगभग 4 मिनट पहले बंद किया था, इसलिए हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि आप 15 मिनट और प्रतीक्षा करें और फिर उस समय इसे दोबारा चालू करने का प्रयास करें और फिर ऑटो मोड पर जाएं। 
Nur zu
E siamo passati alla bomboletta di CO2 secondaria. Fred ha sostituito quella primaria, ma vogliamo continuare a usare quella secondaria 
ロジャ
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous
Ricevuto. Prima di procedere oltre, vorremmo vedere, esse
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 알겠습니다. 지상에서 통신하겠습
Хьюстон, Ап
56-BRAVO Split-Burn, 55 vorn, 106 achtern. 1+31. 2+15. 06 57 55. 6+42.
Ci lavoreremo. Ti daremo un
أوه، فقط... لن أتوقف عن الحديث عن موضوع الأرض والقمر على التلفاز، وكنت أقو
Что касается окон, Хьюстон: на окнах 1 и 5 наблюдается умеренная дымка. Для визуального наблюдения это приемлемо, но, возможно, не для фотосъемки. Окна 2 и 4 чис
U
J'ai l'impression que l'obturateur de mon Hasselblad se bloque sur certaines de ces photos. Il s'agit de la deuxième série de photos prises avec le S-6 au-dessus de l'Atlantique. Le mécanisme d'avancement du film est clairement à l'origine du fonctionnement erratique de l'appareil. Je l'utiliserai donc manuellement 
حسنً
Roger. 104. 2+15. GMTRC 01 days, 00 hours, 
はい
Fortfa
沟通检查。1、2、3、4、5、6、7、
Близнецы 4, 
D'accord, Jack. Il semble que nous
罗杰。所有适配器电池的电流读数均为 2 安培，电压读数均为 24 伏。RCS 环工作正常。备用氧气瓶工作正常。主电池的电流读数为 9 安培，电压读数约为 22.5 至 23 伏。控制总线（无法辨认），S2 为 26，S2 为 26，
Aspetta un attimo
Gemelli 4, il tuo polsino è a grandezza natura
Roger. Je sui
Si vous me suivez bien, Frank, je vais vous mettre au courant de quelques points. Le fichier que nous allons vous envoyer est une mise à jour du vecteur d'état destiné à l'emplacement, et nous souhaitons, comme prévu, le transférer à l'aide de la touche Entrée. Je vous rappelle qu'avant d'appuyer sur Entrée, vous devez sélectionner manuellement 
你现在应该能听到噪音了。那是因为他们正在降低天桥
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。低電圧タップをオフにして、リセットしてか
Roger. This is the story on the suit temp. I have increased two 10-degree marks since lift-off. And now about--well, 15 degrees above la
D'accord. Ensuite, ils vont s'approcher de la Lune pour récupérer le module de service et prendre une photo. Ils utiliseront en
No, non è necessario che ci sia troppo m
- - 베넷 혜성 촬영을 위해 060으로 바로 이동하여 모든 드론의 작동을 중지해 주십시오. 이를 위해 쿼드콥터 C와 D를 활성화해 주십시오. 모든 드론을 사용하여 촬
फ्रैंक, जब बिल जाग जाए तो मुझे आवाज़ देना
西格玛七
마지막 하나는 쓰레기봉투에 버렸어요. 아, 저는 만약 당신이...을 원한다면 수산화리튬을 사용해야 할 거라고
روجر. ستكون زاوية ميلك 12 درجة، وزاوية ميلك 270 درجة، وزاوية انحرافك 0 درجة. زوايا ه
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। नियंत्रण प्रणाली के संचालन
Хорошо. Я крикну Джиму
A1 칸에 있어요 - 저와 함께 계시죠? 저는
Era prevalentemente bianco, forse con una sfumatura giallastra; e sembrava essere... per come lo ricordo, il terminatore della Terra era verso l'orizzonte e sembrava essere a circa un quarto o un terzo della distanza... verso il terminatore della Terra... dall'orizzonte opposto. Sono da un terzo a un qu
알겠습니다. 제가 있던 위치가 바로 그곳입니다. 명령 모듈 추진제 2, 중앙, 켜짐, 위쪽; 추진제 통신, 2, 회색; 서비스 모듈 보조 연료 압력, 4, 중앙, 닫힘; 자동, 꺼짐; 명령 모듈/최종 분리, 2, 꺼짐; 명령 모듈/서비스 모듈 분리, 2, 아래
好的。杰克按下了250安培的BAT A和BAT B入口断路器。他读取到电池母线电压，A端为32.3伏，B端为37.0伏。然后他按下了275安培的断路器，将BAT连接到主母线上。在这种配置下，主母线A电压为32.0伏，电流为0安培
네, 예비 분석 결과 중앙 S-II 엔진이 이전 비행에서 관찰된 것보다 다소 높은 진폭으로 진동한 것으로 나타났으며, 이는 S-II 연소 시작 후 약 160초부터 발생했습니다. 이러한 진동으로 인해 엔진실 압력이 감소하여 두 개의 저고도 추력 센서(추력 정상 감지 센서)가 중앙 엔진 정지를 작동시켰습니다. 초기 데이터 평가 결과 엔
حسناً. لقد أحضرناهم في الوقت المحدد لأول مد
알겠습니다. 연료 및 소비량 관련 복사
ब्लैकआउट 24 
阿波罗
看看体育界，我们来看看。就在你前几天忙的时候，乔·纳马斯和橄榄球联盟主席皮特·罗泽尔宣布，“百老汇乔”已经同意出售他在“单身汉三号”餐厅的股份，并加入纽约喷气机队。乔今天抵达了喷气机队的训练营，并进行了首次训练。其他几位和乔一起罢训的喷气机队球员也都报到了。来自密歇根州杰克逊的戴维·希尔在上周赢得了他参加的三场高尔夫大满贯赛事中的第三场。他赢得了费城精英赛。希尔今年至今已经赢得了四场比赛，并以12.9万美元的奖金成为今年的奖金王。棒球方面，国家联盟西区的竞争依然激烈。洛杉矶道奇队和旧金山巨人队落后联盟领头羊亚特兰大勇士队一个胜场。休斯顿太空人队目前战绩为48胜48负，排名第五，落后七场。昨晚太空人队和辛辛那提红人队的双赛因雨延期。芝加哥小熊队仍然稳居东区榜首，领先纽约大都会队4.5个胜场。而在美联，巴尔的摩金莺队正朝着东区冠军稳步前进，领先第二名波士顿红袜队11个胜场。展望未
杰克，准备好进行E内存转储。我想我们大
Roger. Nous vous serions reconnaissants de bien vouloir prendre une mesure de l'humidité en cabine et une mesure de la température au n
네, 맞습니다. 지금 달 주변 
ठीक है। अपोलो 8, मैं आपको केवल चौथी मध्यमार्ग सुधार रिपोर्ट पढ़कर सुनाता हू
अद्भुत! ज़रा पीछे देखो, बिल्कुल ए
Вперёд, Гавайи
Роджер. Подтвердите, пожалуйста, что переключатель посадочн
ह्यूस्टन में जब कोई तारा अस्त होता है, तो इसमें कोई संदेह नहीं है। एक पल वह वहां होता है, और अगले ही पल 
«Аполлон-8
Forza Housto
نعم، لقد وضع
أوه، هذا - هذا رئيسنا، 
Le réglage de la combinaison est actuellement à 8. Le débit de liquide de refroidissement est donc réglé à 8. La température à l'entrée de la combinai
Roger. Procediam
Eleven minutes flat. Tha
Ho una stella in v
Roger. Pourriez-vous placer votre commutateur de quantité cryogénique sur la position ECS O2, s'il 
지금은 피곤하지만, 정상적인 일상
Fo
Va b
好的。我们现在差不多要记录BLOCK数据了，包
चार्ली, कल हम अपने सामान को यथासंभव सामान्य स्थिति में व्यवस्थित करेंगे। कुछ चीज़ें जो सामान्य स्थिति में नहीं होंगी, वे इस प्रकार हैं: विज़र को कमांड मॉड्यूल में वापस लाया गया है, और अभी तक हमने उनके लिए कोई जगह नहीं ढूंढी है। हम आपको बता देंगे कि वे कहाँ जाएंगे। इसके अलावा, एबल 8 कंपार्टमेंट से लगभग 5 पाउंड का अतिरिक्त सामान है, और यह एलसीजी की जगह लेगा, जिसे हमने ए 8 से सूट बैग में स्थानांतरित कर दिया था। हमने एक अतिरिक्त सामान से भरा बैग हटा दिया है, जिसमें ज्यादातर पुराने खाने के रैपर, पुरान
ठीक है,... मैं जैक से साम
È solo una supposizione. Non saprei dirlo con c
Хорошо. Он поправляется. Он говори
Okay, auf Seite 18, und das habe ich bereits nach einer Minute getan; „MASTER ARM -
Houston. Okay. Vog
Apollo 8. Houston. Impossible de vous recevoir. Après environ une minute dans cette configuration, nous repasseron
Нет. Сейч
Roger
Okay. We're predicting that you still have more water than you need. And one thing we'd like for you to do is when you're going to sleep up there in t
जेमिनी VIII, हव
알겠습니다... 정말 아름답네요
了解。DELTA V では、両方での使用が
你好，大西洋之船。友谊七
Sept, ici Zanzibar Cap Com. Je vous reçois par
极光七号，极光七号，这里是桑给巴尔资本通讯公司。您的报告虽然简短，但勉强
Apollo 8,
Ok, Apollo 8. Esatto. Hai un bit rate elevato e temiamo che tu possa esaurire lo spazio prima della master
Хорошо. Это необязательно. В том виде, в котором была написана страница -1A, это всё было частью шага 6. Вы ещё даже не дошл
알겠
ठीक है, ओडिसी; ह्यूस्टन। हम आपके लिए तैयार हैं, बस आपको तैयार हो जाइए और वार्म अप कीजिए। बाकी सब ठीक रहा तो, हम चाहेंगे कि आप अ
Hey, Bill, can you tell us what angles this went through? The curve that we have plotted is apparently the RF limit rather than the mechanical limit; and discussing the function of the AUTO REACQ mode, it looks like it is supposed to shift when it hits the RF limit, which is yo
迈克，你得等到这次跟踪调
Roger. À Washington, la commission des finances du Sénat a approuvé la prolongation de la surtaxe sur le revenu, mais un vote du Sénat sur le projet de loi semble pour l'instant peu probable. À Austin, le représentant de l'État, Ray Lemmon, de Houston, a été nommé directeur national de la Société américaine d'océanographie. M. Lemmon a proposé une étude sur la possibilité de créer un institut d'océanographie au Texas. Ce serait le premier institut de ce type dans l'ouest du golfe du Mexique. À Minneapolis, dans le Minnesota, le service météorologique, après avoir dressé le bilan des températures du jour (maximum 31 °C et minimum 22 °C), a indiqué: « Aucune chute de neige. » De St. Petersburg, en Floride, un reportage radio de l'explorateur norvégien Thor Heyerdahl nous apprend que l'équipage de son bateau en papyrus, le Ra, rejoindra Bridgetown, à la Barbade, malgré les dégâts causés par la forte mer. L'équipage passera la nuit sur un navire d'escorte. Norman Baker, navigateur de l'expédition, a déclaré que l'équi
Schauen wir uns die Sportwelt an. Während Sie neulich beschäftigt waren, gaben Joe Namath und Football-Commissioner Pete Rozelle bekannt, dass „Broadw
飞行员的RKV医疗数据通行证1号，格林尼治标准时间02:17:43。请飞行员在采集数据前3分钟将体温探
ठीक है, वैंस। हम डेटा मोड में हैं और सर्किट ब्रेकर चालू है। आगे
罗杰，11. 我们建议您手动打
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir spulen
Roger. In riferimento alla t
D'accord. J'aimerais leur montre
了解。私も同じです。次の動きについてはまだ話し合っている
查理，阿波罗11号。关于停止飞行器，我有几个问题。在我看来，最简单的停止方
٨٨. حسنًا. فهمت ذ
好的。我们已核对您的时间，
CSQ, 제미
Le p
حسنًا، انتظر. سأضع هذا القلم جانبًا. أنا في وضعية الشمبانزي. الكبسولة تطير بشكل ممتاز. جميع المحركات تعمل بشكل جيد. مفتاح الجيروسكوب طبيعي. مفتاح المناورة مُطفأ. جميع الأنظمة تعمل بشكل سليم؛ وأراقب درجة حرارة القبة في دائرة البدلة حال
Хорошо. Мы сейчас выключим автоматический выключате
귀사의 제어 시스템은 어떻습니까?
भारतीय पैराशूट समिति के सदस्य महोदय, मैं आपको ए
Apollo 11, Houston. 
星図の仕上げは非常
كلامك واضح يا والي. هل يمكنك، إن كان لديك وقت، أن تعطينا تقريراً عن أدائك في اختبارات الت
हे 
ब्लैकआउट सम
एक और बात। इस प्रक्रिया के मध्य में इसे करने का सिद्धांत कुछ हद तक SHe टैंक के वेंटिंग से ठीक पहले इसे करने पर आधारित है। इस तरह, हम उम्मीद करते हैं कि तब तक टैंक चालू हो चुका होगा और वेंटिंग कब होगी, इस प
Sigma Seven Sigma Seven, hier spricht Watertown Cap Com 
ठ
Okay. Lass ihn uns sagen, was er sieht – worauf er schaut. Und erinnere ihn daran, dass er das Licht nicht sehen wird. Er w
Jim, der Fliegerarzt, möchte gerne etwas zu Ihren Augen sagen. Hatten Sie irgendwelche Probleme? Trockene A
...чер
Okay. Wir haben eine Anleitung vorbereitet, die wir Ihne
システムの
Warum haben wir ein gelbes – ach ja, stimmt. Wir sollten d
我们也
This is Jim here. And I'm having a lot of difficulty telling how far out I am from the bo
Ok. Per il tuo aggiornamento PLA e CLA, Area 40-3, questa è una combustione divisa. 56 a prua, 120 a poppa. 1+34. 2+30. 05 38 10. 2+56. 8+52. Area 41-DELTA 83. 1+41. 06 30 09. 8+58. 15+01. Area 42-2 90. 1+52. 08 06 26. 6+52
Roger. We saw you up stirring aro
Роджер. С
ヒューストン、コロンビア。ダウンリンクの必要なデータについてもう一度教えてください。お知らせいただけ
11、ヒューストン。酸素タンク1と2の負荷を均等化するためのCRYOスイッチの推奨構成があります。以上で
Okay, that's correct. Now we're coming up on minus
मुझे नहीं लगता कि हमारे पास 
Хорошо. Джим,
حسنًا. التالي، الصفحة 26، قواطع ا
Bene. Questo è per Rod Rose e per le persone di St. Christopher, in realtà per le persone di tutto il mondo. Donaci, o Dio, la visione che possa vedere il tuo amore nel mondo, nonostante i fallimenti umani. Donaci la fede per confidare nella bontà nonostante la nostra ignoranza e debolezza. Donaci la conoscenza per continuare a pregare con cuore comprensivo e mostraci cosa ognuno di noi può fare pe
D'accord. S'ils pouvaient patienter encore quelques heures, s'ils ont la moindre information, dites-leur simplement que je suis vivant. Je leur donnerai une bonne leçon quand j'aurai fini. Je pourrais même clamer haut
ジェミニ4号、RKV。とても弱っているよ
Okay. Wir haben die Anwesenden befragt. Ihre Verbrauchsmaterialien sehen gut aus; Ihr Eintrittsgamma liegt aktuell bei minus 6,01.
罗杰。面板已关
Die Kontrollleuchte für den KRYODRUCK leuchtet jetzt. Der H2-Heizer hat seinen unteren Grenzwert erreich
Apollo 8, noch 10 Sekun
정말 감사합니다. 마이크 콜린스가 
D'accord. Nous aimerions que v
حسنًا. لقد قمت بإيقاف تشغيل مضخم الطاقة، وخفض مستوى صوت النسخ الاحتياطي، وضبط معدل بت PCM على LO، وفصل قاطع وصلة تح
Je tiefer die Nacht wird, desto mehr Sterne werden sichtbar. Ich kann sie erkennen – ich glaube, ich sehe jetzt Sterne bis zur fünften Größenklasse. Es ist noch nicht so ein strahlender Sternenhimmel wie in einer klaren Nacht aus 6.000 Metern Höhe, aus dem Cockpit eines Flugzeugs. Ich habe meine Lampen stark gedimmt, und der Anblick ist viel spektakulärer. Tatsächlich scheinen die Sterne mit der zunehmenden Anpassung meiner Augen immer deutlicher zu werden. Ich schaue gerade auf das Kreuz des 
네, 짐. 어젯밤 대규모 연소 작업 후에 드린 바로 그 설정입니다. 저희가 수정한 대로 그 설정을 사용하겠습니다. 시뮬레이터에서 시험해 봤는데, 물론 슬로싱 같은 건 없었지만, 피치와 롤 방향으로는 레이트를 0으로 맞추고 요 방향으로는 ACS가 처리하도록 하니 꽤 잘 작동하는 것 같았습니다
One gets the illusion that you're on a train or some other vehicle, due to the humming, and you feel that you should be on a track of some kind and you're driving down. Much like the sound of the ship when you're under way 
Мы дума
Okay. Lascia che ti riporti 
こちらフレンドシッ
了解しました。視界も通信も非常に良好ですので、今は走査望遠鏡を見ずに口頭で説明させていただきます。アークトゥルスへの操作角度は非常に良好でした。走査望遠鏡の中心にアークトゥルスを配置しました。この太陽角度では、走査望遠鏡の中心を真横切る光軸と光の帯があります。そのため、周囲の多くの星は見えません。しばらくの間望遠鏡に目を釘付けにしていましたが、星の模様などを見るのは非常に困難です。アークトゥルスでは、光学系が私をそこに導いてくれない限り、それを認識できませんでした。今、私はゼロ軸とゼロ軸に近づいているので、かなり大きな軸の動きを感じています。軸が動くたびに、光学系からより多くの粒子が放
アポロ8号、ヒューストンです。アップリンクをアップボイス・バックアップに約2分間切り替え
Augmentation du d
Wir haben immer denselben Fleck vor uns. Die Sichtfenster sind zwar in Ordnung, aber sie sind so klein und zeigen
ええ。どうやらレンタル料金で折り合いがつかなかったようです。バド・アダムスは「ドームは地球の8番目の不思議かもしれないが、レンタル料金は間
真是见鬼了。我现在用的是
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मैं मुख्य घटनाओं के समयों पर संक्षेप में चर्चा कर लेता हूँ, और फिर हम कुछ विवरण भरेंगे। ठीक है। प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस 142 घंटे 40 मिनट पर है; लगभग 6-1/2 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम हीटर पावर लगाकर, CM/ तापमान की जाँच करके और आवश्यकता पड़ने पर CM/ को पहले से गर्म करके इस पूरी प्रक्रिया को शुरू करेंगे, और हमें लगता है कि हमें ऐसा करना पड़ेगा। इसके लिए विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ बाद में उपलब्ध होंगी। लगभग 6 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम संशोधित / 30-मिनट की चेकलिस्ट का उपयोग करके पावर चालू करना शुरू करेंगे, जिसका उपयोग आपने पिछले मध्यक्रम के लिए किया था। फिर कुछ ही समय बाद, लगभग 5 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम चाहेंगे कि आप बॉडी एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट के लिए सही स्थिति में हों, जैसा हमने पहले किया था, अर्थ टर्मिनेटर का उपयोग करके। और जैसे ही हमें वह मिल जाएगा, हम -7 का प्रदर्शन करेंगे, जो अब लगभग 2 फुट प्रति सेकंड की बर्न दर या लगभग 15 सेकंड का प्रतीत होता है। और मुझे बताया गया है कि यह अब 1-1/2 तक कम हो गया है, इसलिए यह मार्जिन के भीतर आराम से है। ठीक है। जैसे ही हम ऐसा करेंगे, हम तुरंत सर्विस मॉड्यूल जेटिसन एटीट्यूड के लिए पैंतरेबाज़ी शुरू कर देंगे, जो प्लेन में होगा क्योंकि हम इसे सामान्य से पहले जेटिसन कर रहे हैं। हमें आउट-ऑफ-प्लेन कंपोनेंट की आवश्यकता नहीं है, और न ही हम इसे चाहते हैं। इसलिए यह सर्विस मॉड्यूल के साथ प्लेन में होगा जो त्रिज्या वेक्टर के साथ वापस बाहर की ओर इंगित करता है। फिर हम कमांड मॉड्यूल को सर्विस मॉड्यूल एसईपी के लिए तैयार करना शुरू करेंगे, जिसमें कमांड मॉड्यूल चेकआउट और हॉट फायर शामिल है, और लगभग 4 घंटे 30 मिनट पहले, हम सर्विस मॉड्यूल को जेटिसन कर देंगे। हम सर्विस मॉड्यूल प्राप्त करने तक इसे ऊपर उठाएंगे... और कुछ तस्वीरें लेने की कोशिश करेंगे, लेकिन तस्वीरों के लिए हम ट्रांसलेशन पैंतरेबाज़ी में समय बर्बाद नहीं करेंगे क्योंकि हम उस समय आपके उड़ान पथ के कोण को बिगाड़ना नहीं चाहते। ठीक है। इससे हमें लगभग 2 घंटे का खुला समय मिलता है, अगर हम इसमें देरी करते हैं, तो चेकलिस्ट पर जाकर कमांड मॉड्यूल को चालू करने की तैयारी कर सकते हैं। हम कमांड मॉड्यूल को 2 घंटे 30 मिनट पहले पूरी तरह से चालू करना शुरू करेंगे। हम कंप्यूटर को लाइन पर लाएंगे, इसे चालू करेंगे, आपके स्टेट वेक्टर्स को अपलोड करना शुरू करेंगे, और इसी तरह कमांड मॉड्यूल प्लेटफॉर्म को संरेखित करेंगे। लगभग 1 घंटे 30 मिनट पहले, यानी कमांड मॉड्यूल से संबंधित काम करने के लिए एक घंटे के भीतर, हम जेटिसन स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी शुरू करेंगे। फिर आप इसे बंद करना शुरू करेंगे। बेशक, इससे पहले हमारा सारा सामान व्यवस्थित नहीं होगा। हम हैच बंद कर देंगे, दबाव अखंडता की जाँच करेंगे, और -1 घंटे यानी 141 घंटे और 40 मिनट पर, हम इसे अलग कर देंगे। जैसे ही हम ऐ
Roger. Nous venons de constater son absence et, oui, nous aimerions bien l'ajouter. Vous comprenez bien que nous ne vous 
알았어, 짐. 이륙 후 15분 경과: 015:00, DELTA-VT 5622, 경도 -165, 그리고 400
Okay. We lost you there briefly while you were in an attitude where we couldn't receive you. Jack, we'd like to hold off for about 5 minutes. We have some more people coming in to listen to this, and it took a lot of people to devise this procedure, and a few people h
그건 부정적입니다. 잠시 기다려 주
휴스턴 CAP COM, 제미니 VI입니다. VII이
Okay. We're into the presleep checklist now. As far as the crew status report, as far as medication goes, we've had no medication. And we're all feeling really good. I've given you the onboard
ठीक है। अब बैग को उन चिपचिपी पट्टियों पर दबाएँ जिन्हें हमने डिब्बे के किनारों पर लगाया था। अगर कोई अतिरिक्त कपड़ा हो, तो उसे थोड़ा मोड़कर अच्छी तरह सील कर द
了解しました。あなたがテストを出すまではコピーしていましたが、その
了解。シグマ・セブン、緊
……那里什么也看不到。试试也无妨。那里看不到地平
Я думаю, что... красный свет... до
Roger. La série de fissures ou de failles qui la traversent plonge vers le sud en trois paliers environ. Le réseau de failles parallèles au nord présente un
Kraftstoffstand 103-
Alpha/Pc から Pc、LAUNCH VEHICLE INDICATOR から GPI、GIMBAL DRIVE PITCH および YAW から AUTO、EVENT TIMER RESET から上、EVENT TIMER START から STOP、EVENT TIMER MINUTES, SECONDS から中央、POSTLANDING VENT バルブ、押す、PROBE EXTEND/RELEASE から OFF、EXTEND/RELEASE トークバック (2 つ、灰色)、DOCK PROBE RETRACT、PRIMARY および SECONDARY、オフ、EXTEND
... У меня не было пистолета, а использовать шнурок было немного сложнее из-за его расположения на двери космического корабля. Он, как и любой страховочный трос, имел тенденцию возвращать меня назад и отбрасывать обратно к адаптер
2
Это Фрэнк Борман. Нам понравились наши телепередачи, и мы хотели бы, чтобы
好的，乔。一切顺利。我们正按计划稳步推进。我已经完成了。我可以告诉你
Okay. Non potrebbe ess
R
Bene. A pagina 1, l'unica cosa che dobbiamo fare è Attivazione, passagg
로저. 45-1 101. 2+08. 12 37 50. 5+36. 10+33. 46-1 114. 2+25 14 12 47. 4+05. 9+33. 47-1 전후방 추진기 발사. 08 및 120. 0+14 및 2+30. 15 46 36. 3+17. 8+37. 48-1 전후방 추진기. 24 및 120. 0+40 및 230, 수정 2+30. 17 20 19. 2+42. 8+43. 49-4 111. 2+21. 20 06 48. 4+11. 9+46. 44 브라보, 전후방 추진기 14번과 120번 발사. 0+24번과 2+30번. 11 55 47번. 11+10번... 5 120번. 2+30번. 13 29번 13번. 11+42번. 46 브라보 94번. 1번. 15 0
Roger, sto per
마침 지금 우리가 얘기하던 주제였네요. 트렁크 덮개 바깥쪽 가장자리에 아주 약간 습기가 차 있긴 한데, 아주 미미한 정도입니다. 호스를 연결해 놨으니 그걸로 좀 마르게 할 수 있을 것 같네
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। लगभग 2 मिनट में हनीसकल को क
Roger. It should be the second step in that procedure. At time 22 40, or when you ge
Это время, прошедшее с момента создания капсулы. Мы скопируем промежуточный отчет, созданный вручную, и я м
रॉजर। आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से समझ आ रही है। प्रारंभिक ट्रैकिं
로저, 알. 저는 자동 모드, 역추진 모드입니다. 자이로 스위치
शांति, ह्यूस्टन। अब आप फ्यूल और OX 
Roger. Graz
わかった。朝食の時間になったら教えてね。新
Понял. Это командир экипажа. Я проснулся около 30 минут 
はい、ジム。こちらはヒューストンです。ファンクションスイッチを「ダウンボイスバ
Роджер, Хьюстон. Запись следующая: середина Тихого океана, 357 152 359 267, плюс 0813, минус 16503 066 36221 647 12166 36301 0028, NA, 400 0210 0025 0335 0816 160590 312, Зета Персей, вверх 165, вправо 34, вверх. Используйте схему бе
أن
Roger. Je reçois vos horair
好的，杰克。所有开关都保持
好的。在第 15 页，我们将标题“CHECKOUT”更改为“验证以下开关”，这些开关是“GUIDANCE CONTROL”；第三行，“ATTITUDE CONTROL (3)”更改为“MODE CONTROL”；然后将“MODE CONTRO
收到。11，/: 45597，0 - 更正 - 即 -040，+157，+36325，-01727，+01428 180 003 000，十一月阿尔法星，+00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254；
روجر. خمسة يا نيل. لقد نسخنا حتى القيم المتبقية. هل يمكنك من فضلك إعادة ذكر القيم المتبقية في قسم التصحيح - فحص صحيفة ذا 
Roger. Alles klar. Ich verstehe, wir spielen a
Nous avons r
أقصد أضواء ديربان. لم أتمكن من رؤيتها. أرى بعض الأضواء على الأرض - في هذا الوقت - في منتصف النافذة، وهو الوقت الذي تظهر فيه أضواء ديربان تقريبًا. إنها تحت السحب وليست واضحة بما يكفي لرؤيت
جيمي
Salve, Apollo 11. Houston. Abbiamo a
Во время вашего следующего прохода, Колумбия, вместо выполнения какого-либо конкретного действия, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы осмотрели окрестности указанных нами координат, которые являются результатом нашего н
Роджер. ΔV139. 
Okay, Jack. As I read that, the LMP is to go to sleep at for about 6 hours. During that period, the CDR and CMP should try to get a bite to eat. I'm to awake at 69 hours. CDR and 
Guardando al mondo dello sport, vediamo un po'. Mentre eravate impegnati l'altro giorno, Joe Namath e il commissario di football Pete Rozelle hanno annunciato che "Broadway Joe" aveva accettato di vendere la sua quota nel ristorante Bachelors III e di presentarsi ai New York Jets. Joe è arrivato oggi al campo di allenamento dei Jets e ha svolto il suo primo allenamento. Anche diversi altri giocatori dei Jets che avevano resistito insieme a Joe si sono presentati. E Davy Hill, di Jackson, Michigan, ha vinto il suo terzo torneo importante di golf in altrettante partite la scorsa settimana. Ha vinto il Philadelphia Classic. Hill ha vinto quattro tornei finora quest'anno ed è il miglior vincitore in denaro quest'anno con una bella vincita di 129.000 dollari. E nel baseball, la divisione occidentale della National League rimane una gara serrata. Los Angeles e San Francisco sono a una partita di distanza da Atlanta, capolista del campionato. Gli Astros hanno un record di 48 vittorie e 48 sconfitte, e ora sono al quinto posto, a sette partite di distanza. Un doppio incontro tra gli Astros e Cincinnati di ieri sera è stato rinviato a causa della pioggia. I Chicago Cubs sono ancora al primo posto nella East Division. Hanno un vantaggio di quattro partite e mezzo sui New York Mets. E nell'American League, Baltimora si sta avvicinando al titolo della Eastern Division. Hanno un vantaggio di 11 partite su Boston, seconda in classifica. Guar
Okay, Houston. Ich habe hie
تم إغلاق C
Nicht schlecht, Jim. Prob
Bon, c'était bien... On passe à la manœuvre, je veux dire à la position de sommeil? Quelqu
And, Jim, when you have leisure to copy, I have your and data load num
Pourriez-vous me dire si 
Il y a
Accidenti! N
아니요, 해안가만 안개가 꼈어요. 나머
아, 
Columbia, Houston. A
알겠습니다,
ठीक है। "क्रिसमस से एक रात पहले, अंतरिक्ष में बहुत दूर, अपोलो 8 के दल ने चंद्रमा की दौड़ जीत ली थी; हेडसेट कंसोल पर सावधानी से लटकाए गए थे, इस उम्मीद में कि क्रिस क्राफ्ट जल्द ही वहाँ होंगे; फ्रैंक बोरमैन अपने बिस्तर में आराम से लेटे हुए थे, जबकि उनके दिमाग में 'के सपने नाच रहे थे; और जिम लवेल, अपने सोफे पर, और एंडर्स, केबिन में, एक कंप्यूटर डिस्प्ले पर अपना दिमाग खपा रहे थे, तभी अचानक से ऐसी खड़खड़ाहट हुई कि फ्रैंक यह देखने के लिए अपने बिस्तर से उछल पड़े कि क्या हुआ है। वह बिजली की तरह सेक्स्टेंट की ओर भागे, यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि वे दुर्घटनाग्रस्त न हों। चंद्रमा की ऊबड़-खाबड़ सतह पर प्रकाश ने धूसर चंद्र धूल को हरे पनीर जैसी चमक दी, तभी उनकी आश्चर्यचकित आँखों के सामने क्या प्रकट हुआ, एक बर्मा शेव का चिन्ह जिस पर लिखा था 'किलरॉय यहाँ था।'" लेकिन फ्रैंक मूर्ख नहीं था; वह जल्दी ही समझ गया कि वे पहले आए थे; यह ज़रूर कोई चाल होगी। रॉकेट से भी तेज़, उसके गालियां 
Roger. Ich habe im AUTO-Modus angedockt, und wie gesagt, ich war mir des genauen Kontaktzeitpunkts nicht sicher. Ich habe die Anzeigen der Andocksonde ständig überprüft. Zwei „Barber Poles“-Symbole zeigten an, dass die drei Verriegelungen – nicht die Verriegelungen, sondern die drei Verriegelungen – eingerastet waren und wir sanft angedockt hatten. Zu diesem Zeitpunkt wirkte die Situation sehr stabil. Also schaltete ich au
रॉजर।
Roger. D'après nos informations, il 
Odyss
Хорошо. Нам нужны показания через 7 минут, то есть через мин
Roger. Vediamo il sole che splende attraverso la stella dietro di lui e traccia la correzione equatoriale
Would you say again the daylight time, please, sunrise, and f
Ok. Mi riferisco alla checklist di i
J
Аполлон-8, Аполлон-8. Под
Très bien. Que prévoyez-vous pour activer le circuit secondaire avant la séparation? Il semble qu'en cas de problème avec le ventilateur de cabine, nous ne pourrons pas effectuer un refroidissement complet. Y a-t-il une solution possibl
Roger. Wir werden die Ausrichtung des Sextantensterns für Sie über
Le pilote commandant a-
Non posso dire molto sulla visibilità qui senza la visiera alzata. È buio. Sembra che ci sia una *** superf
Okay. I read back: monitor secondary accumulator quantity; secondary glycol radiator valve, NORMAL for 30 seconds, then to BYPASS. If no decrease in secondary 
ठीक है। 13 से थोड़ा नीचे। और आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, हमारे लोग कई विषयों पर काम कर रहे हैं। हम आने वाले मिडकोर्स पर काम कर रहे हैं ताकि अपने कंट्रोल सिस्टम को निर्धारित कर सकें और यह तय कर सकें कि चुने गए कंट्रोल सिस्टम के साथ अलाइनमेंट कैसे किया जाए। हमारे पास एलएमएस है और कुछ टीमें इस पर काम कर रही हैं। हम अपने प्रवेश पर भी काम कर रहे हैं, कि इसे कब और कैसे सक्रिय किया जाए। हम सिस्टम की स्थिति पर भी काम कर रहे हैं। कल किसी समय हम मेन बस बी का चेकआउट करेंगे, इसलिए हमारे कई लोग यहां काफी मेहनत कर रहे हैं और मेरे पास आपके लिए चंद्र सतह कैमरे के लिए कुछ एफ-स्टॉप सेटिंग्स हैं। 1/250वें स्केल पर, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अवसर के अनुसार लक्ष्य चुनें। प्रत्येक तस्वीर के लिए तीन एफ-स्टॉप का उपयोग करें, क्योंकि हमें ठीक से नहीं पता कि कौन सा सबसे अच्छा काम करेगा, इसलिए सतह कैमरे के लि
Роджер, "Убедитесь, что обогр
We have a valid oral temp on 
Roger, ich bin komplett abgeschaltet – alle Lichter sind aus. Ich verbrauche wohl nur 13 bis 14 Ampere, und
Roger. Quello che è successo è che il nostro dispositivo all'idrossido di li
로저. 방금 7분 10초쯤에 진입했어요. 유지 장치가 제 머리 위, 아니 수평선 위에 아주 안정적으로 떠 있네요. 저는 지금 완전 잠수 모드인데, 유지 장치가 정말 멋지게 
罗杰，查理。我想向你们汇报一下我们的氯化消毒情况。在B4隔间，我们有1、2、3、4、5、6、7个——更正一下，是8个氯和缓冲剂安瓿的隔间，其中——让我更正一下，是7个隔间，其中一个是空的，一直都是空的，还剩下6个。在另一边的B7隔间
Ne nous imputez pas vos problèmes d'antenn
Tranquility Base, Houston. Azzero il timer dell'evento e sono s
Следующий кратер, приближающийся ко дну, — это остров Дьюк, а слева — кратер Маскелайн У., самый большой из кратеров в центре снимка. Это проверка положения во время снижения примерно на 3 минуте 39 секунде, наша проверка положения в направлении вниз и в поперечном направлении перед поворотом лицом вверх для захвата посадочного радара. После этого момента мы не сможем видеть поверхность под собой, пока не прибл
Роджер. Если у вас есть обновленная информация о плане полета, я сейча
ああ、分かりました。私もそう思っ
알겠습니다. 122 15를 이해하셨고, 20번 G&N 사
Quelle vue magnifique nous avons aujourd'hui! On aperçoit un peu plus de la moitié de la Terre. On dirait l'Afrique et la mer Rouge; on n'en est pas tout à fait sûrs à cause des nuages, mais même à travers la brume, c'est vraim
D'accord. Plus 4 heures. Le poids est toujours de 63531 comme indiqué; le tangage et le lacet sont respec
D'accord. Peut-être que cela nous donne un peu plus confiance en nous, que si nous devions faire des choses sur 
Penso che sia solo un interruttore. Io..
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон, 
الوضع الرابع. روجر. تجهيز
في وضع ما قبل الإ
J'y suis. J'ai terminé les vérifications de lacet avec la fenêtre, j
अब, प्रश्न 2 के उत्तर में, निश्चित रूप से, दूसरे चरण में एक कंपन क्षणिक घटना हुई थी - जो इंजन नंबर 5 के बंद होने के कारण हुई थी - जो इंजन के बंद होने से कुछ समय पहले हुई थी, और उसके थोड़ी देर बाद एस-II चरण बहुत
Roger. Die angezeigte Menge beträgt 55 Prozent, schwankt aber ständig. Ich denke, das ist momentan ein r
착륙 자세가 좀 불
알겠습니다. 로저. Rev 57용입니다. 시퀀스 번호 16, 
Okay, Jack. Now that's the - those are the time-line notes I had for you. I hate to tell you this, but I also have a cou
حسنًا، حسنًا يا جيم. يبدو صوتك جيدًا هذا الصباح. نود أن نقدم لك شرحًا موجزًا ​​عن هذه النجوم. كما ترى في خطة الرحلة، فقد حددنا لك موع
That's affirmativ
Seule la partie la plus 
حسنًا، سألقي نظرة أخرى. عليّ أن أقنع شريكي بالذهاب
Okay. Und das funktioniert mit beiden Sätzen von Servoele
로저. 알겠습니다.
Хорошо. Температура на входе вторичного радиатора составляет около 70-72 градусов; на выходе радиатора около 30; температура испарения гликоля около 65; давление пара максимальное, давление на выходе гликоля около 9 psi. Температура в вторичных накопительных костюмах около 52 градусов; в кабине около 58 градусов; давление в костюме 4,1, в кабине 5. Парциальное давление CO2 чуть больше 1, около 1,1. На боковой стенке дома температура 72 градуса, гелий 3500; N2 A 2300; N2 B около 2450. Топливо около 165; то
分か
Apollo 8, Houston. Stiamo scaricando i dati i
逻辑电源 A，已关闭
さて、今朝のニュースは実はあまりなく、静かですね。最大のニュースは事故率、つまりホリデーシーズンの死亡率でしょう。これは決して喜ばしいニュースではありませんが、全国で233人が亡くなり、そのうち9人がクリスマスイブとクリスマスにヒューストンで亡くなりました。世界のニュースでは、またしても家族に関するニュースが取り上げられました。「アポロ8号の乗組員の家族が、北朝鮮から今週解放されたUSSプエブロ号の乗組員、ロイド・ブッチャー海軍司令官にクリスマスメッセージを送った。サンディエゴ海軍病院にいる​​ブッチャー司令官夫妻に宛てたメッセージには、『私たちはあなた方を思い、祈ってきました。あなた方との再会は、このクリスマスの日に私たちの心に大きな喜びをもたらしました。あなた方個人と、あなたの指揮下にあるすべての家族に、心からお見舞い申し上げます』と書かれていました。そして、署
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 
J'ai exactement une seconde de retard. Correction: j'ai une
जिम, थोड़ी देर हो गई है। इसे पढ़कर स
우메라. 여기는
ठीक है, पहले तारे की बात करते हैं: सही ऊंचाई 15 किलोमीटर (प्लस या माइनस 4); प्रभावी ऊंचाई 12 किलोमीटर (प्लस या माइनस 7)। उप-तारकीय बिंदु का मान चाप-मिनट - 2 चाप-मिनट है, जो कि बहुत अच्छा है। और ज
अरे, ये बंद हो गया - ये बंद हो गया। उन्होंने 
Указательны
У нас -11, мы потеря
Выглядит неплохо. Если удерживать устройство неподвижно, возникает своего рода задержка. Любое движение в этом месте порт
Aufgestanden? Ich dachte, ich hätte mich ziemlich de
많아야 그렇겠죠. 저기 있는 Y자형 지지대는 아마 그보다
Роджер. Хорошо. Ваш
찰리, 아폴로 11호입니다. 기체 정지에 대해 몇 가지 질문이 있습니다. 제 생각에는 가장 쉬운 정지 방법은, 현재 요각은 0도이고 피치각은 90도에 가까워지고 있으니, 대략 롤각 260도에서 정지하는 것일 텐데, 절차는 어떻게 될까요? 수동 자세 제어(MANUAL ATTITUDE)로 들어가서 3단계 속도 제어(RATE COMMAND)를 실행한 다음, 데드밴드가 이미 줄어든 상태이므로 8번 패널의 추진기를 켜면 기체가 현재 자세에서 정지할 것입니다.
That's affirmative. Hold it just a second;
알겠습니다. 그곳에 투하하기 전에, 40
着陆点几乎完全隐没在黑暗中。你看到的那个陨石坑，上半部分清晰可见，下半
जैक, मैं पुष्टि
D'accord. Lorsque nous avons basculé l'interrupteur d'alimentation de la prise IGS à la prise ACME (qui n'est pas censée alimenter l'ordinateur), le voyant de l'ordinateur s'est éteint. Lorsque le voyant de dysfonctionnement s'est allumé, le voyant de l'ordinateur s'est rallumé, mais le voyant de dysfonctionnement est resté allumé. Rapidement, les deux voyants ont faibli. Trois ou quatre minutes après le passage à l'alimentation ACME, le voyant de l'ordinateur s'est éteint. Le 
分かりました。キャビンの温度は100度、キャビンドームは40度、キャビン熱交換器の温度は42
알겠습니다. AGC가 제가 '노이즈 레벨'이라고 부르는 수준까지 떨어졌는데, 이는 노이즈가 발생하기 시작했을 때 AGC에서 측정된 전압 레벨을 적분한 값입니다. 게이지의 11시 방향쯤이었는데, 그 지점에서 빔 폭이 켜졌다 꺼졌다 하는 것처럼 보였습니다. 빔 폭이 위아
Okay. Ich habe jetzt die Seite mit den Kartenaktualisieru
Роджер. У нас есть некото
Меня от этого укачива
Roger. Understand. Your body temperature readouts on the ground are not good. We are not paying any attention to your body temperature readouts. Over
11, Houston. On dirait 
أربع تمريرات للأمام. أربع تمريرات للأمام. انحراف طفيف إلى ال
Ricevuto. Percorso 62, 168° Est
رأيتُ للتو قمراً صناعياً عالياً جدا
ويا أكواريوس، هيوستن، نود الحصول على قراءة أخرى ل
يجب أن تحرص على الميل في الاتجاه الذي ترغب بالذهاب إل
أغلق قاطع دائرة مص
This is known as preparing lunch and doing a
Ci stiamo lavorando, Frank. Stiamo cercando di calcolare in termini ravvicinati cosa sarà radialmente verso l'esterno. Ora, hai ancora la Terra, se ho capito bene, più il quadrante Y e più il quadrante Z. In altre parole, è in basso a d
हमारे सामने इस घाटी में जमाव वाली सामग्री मे
Jim, bezüglich des Batterieproblems haben 
了解しました。全く同感です。あなたがその作業を始めている間に、私は以下のメモを読み上
He was shaving a little bit ago. He might have just let
わかりました。もう一度確認して
हां, लेकिन क्या हमसे
ठीक है। जैक, मैं इस पर आपके साथ चर्चा कर सकता हूँ, क्योंकि हमारी विभिन्न प्रक्रियाओं में इस चेकलिस्ट को दो-तीन बार लिखा जा चुका है। सबसे ऊपर वाली पंक्ति में, पहले दो खुले हैं, अगले तीन बंद हैं, और अब हम QUAD TCA के 1, 2, 3, 4 को खोलने जा रहे हैं; CROSSFEED बंद रहेगा, और TEMP/PRES
好的。我这里有一些关于飞行计划的细节，如下所示。当然，由于没有-3，你需要删除所有中途3阶段的内容，包括大约在54.5分钟处提到的-the，我们会把它推迟到稍后进行，我稍后会告诉你。好的。然后，我们需要将电池充电提前3小时。我们还需要将隧道通风阀/DELTA-P提前3小时，届时你可以直接跳转到飞行计划中的57小时点，将数字从57小时改为54小时，然后开始执行。在备注部分大约有一条“氧气燃料电池吹扫和废水排放”的提示。如果之前没有执
알겠습
휴스턴, 다시 말씀해
روجر. قد يهمّكم يا سكان المركبة الفضائية كولومبيا أن تعلموا أن اليوم هو عيد الاستقلال في كولومبيا. تُوّجت غلوريا دياز من الفلبين بلقب ملكة جمال الكون الليلة الماضية، بعد أن تفوقت على 60 فتاة أخرى لتفوز باللقب العالمي. تبلغ الآنسة دياز من العمر 18 عامًا، بشعر وعينين سوداوين، ومقاساتها 34.5-23-34.5. أما الوصيفة الأولى فكانت ملكة جمال أستراليا، تلتها ملكة جمال إسرائيل، ثم ملكة جمال اليابان. وبينما أنتم في طريق عودت
Roger. I think we alrea
了解しました。アダプターバッテリー1、2、3の電圧と電流の測定値を教えてくだ
看起来云层有好几层。一层很高的卷云……一层稍低的卷云……拍几张不同高度
Per
Okay. Very good,... 
Controlla l'aumento quell
Dopo aver ridotto la velocità a un punto tale da
로저. 보시다시피 제가 롤 조작을 조금 서툴게 했네요. 무리는 안 했습니다. 여기 올라오면 바로 제대로 조작할게요. 네. 롤은 재진
11, Хьюстон. К вашему сведению, эти две записи представляют собой обновление для вашего DELTA-H, которое мы уже передали на серв
Jim, siamo pronti a rimettere in funzione la batteria. Ti chiedo di aprire l'interruttore automatico CROSS TIE BAL LOAD, pan
罗杰。接下来是三号位，开始
روجر. نحن نف
Bonjour, Tranquility. Houston. Nous avons le tapis roulant d'ascension. Si vous êt
我
Yes. It's a 
Roger, Neil. Pour commencer: les messages de félicitations pour la mission Apollo 11 affluent à la Maison-Blanche depuis ce matin, envoyés sans interruption par les dirigeants du monde entier. Parmi les derniers en date figurent des télégrammes du Premier ministre britannique Harold Wilson et du roi des Belges. La presse internationale est entièrement consacrée à Apollo 11. Certains journalistes estiment que plus de 60 % des articles parus aujourd’hui dans les journaux du pays concernent votre mission. Le New York Times, qui, comme nous l’avons déjà mentionné, a connu un tel succès pour son édition du jour (malgré un tirage de 950 000 exemplaires), a annoncé qu’il republierait l’intégralité du numéro jeudi, à titre d’édition spéciale. Le Premier ministre Alexeï Kossyguine vous a adressé ses félicitations, ainsi qu’au président Nixon, par l’intermédiaire de l’ancien vice-président Humphrey, actuellement en visite en Russie. Les cosmonautes ont également publié un communiqué de félicitations. Humphrey a cité Kossyguine qui aurait déclaré: « Je veux que vous disiez au président et au peuple américain que l'Union soviétique souhaite travailler a
감사합니다. 한 시간 반쯤 후에 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 출발
Okay, I - I was talkin
제미니 4, 휴스
Ok. 
Vi sentiamo forte e chiaro, Apollo 8
Roger, et concernant votre statut OAMS, il vous reste 148 livres de carburant et 193 livres d'oxydant. Nos calculs indiquent qu'il vous reste en
Ti leggo un po
Okay, devi in
Okay. Panel 4: TELCOMM, GROUP 1, to AC1. close the following circuit breakers: , PRESS GROUP 1, MAIN B;, PRESS GROUP 2, MAIN B;, TEMP, MAIN B;, SECONDARY LOOP TRANSDUCER, MAIN B; RAD, CONTROL/HEATERS, MAIN B; BAT RELAY BUS, BAT B; BAT CHARGER, BAT B, CHARGE - or to B, CHARGE; INVERTER CONTROL, 2; INVERTER CONTROL, 1; SENSOR SIGNAL, AC1; SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN B; 
रॉजर. 
هذا صحيح يا جيم. لقد فهمت الفكرة جيدًا، وهل فهمت ما تقصده بـ "400 زائد 5" ثم "400 زائد 5"؟ أي "400 زائد 5" ثم "400 زائد صفر" متت
로저, 지
ठीक है, फ्रेड। अब आपको कुछ और ग्रे टेप लेकर दोनों नीले नोजल (कमांडर और एलएमपी) के आउटलेट एरिया के आधे हिस्से पर टेप लगा देना है। ऐसा इसलिए कर रहे है
Это отриц
Guay
Роджер. Зона 11-DELTA ΔT ноль. GMTRC 01 день 07 48 58. RET 400 K, 15+26. Зона 12-DELTA: ΔV 96. ΔT 2+05. GMTRC 01 день, 08 часов, 4
All that procedure for P22 seemed to work very well. The only thing that was a little odd is that there was some DAP thruster activity. I had pitch in ACCEL COMMAND, and roll and yaw in RATE COMMAND, and somehow roll and yaw got exci
Yes
わかりました。ここで考えられるあらゆる可能性を検討しました。最悪のケースは、3シグマの誤差でミスディスタンスが最大で70海里です。70海里です。OAMS逆噴射機動を実施していただき、その後、もちろんコンピューターを使わずに手動で逆噴射を行います。ゼロリフト、ローリング再突入を希望します。ゼロリフト、ローリング再突入です。90-90バンクではなくローリングを選択した理由は、分散の可能性が低いためです。分散は均一化する傾向があります。その方が回復が早いと考えています。また、その方法であれば、ブラックアウト前にIPを取得でき、再突入時に約8Gの衝撃
ठीक है, जैक। हमें वोल्टेज एम्पियर का एक और माप चाहिए, और फिर शायद 
아주 좋습니다. +30627, -00625, +00577 180 018 001, 해당 없음, +00188 30639
저희는 고이득 구
Ricevuto. Stiamo visualizzando una pressione del carburante di 167, in AUX di 163. Mi chiedevo, pensi che ci sia la possibilità che si attivi un allarme temporaneo sulla pressione del carburante AUX all'inizio della combustione, che si correggerebbe automaticamente non appena avessimo la possibilità di pressurizza
好的，听起来不错。我猜你现
Ok, con questo atteggiamento, Jack, in cui ci stiamo muovendo, non posso usare il telescopio per vedere le stelle. Noi... noi
Yeah, I think it is. I didn't want to rush into it, and I didn't get too hot. I know you are concerned. I'd rather come up on the right setting than dicker around going
Pourvu que les choses s'am
구강
알겠습니다
Roger, 2: SPS/G&N: 38320, plus 166, moins 081 080 11 3603, moins 01408, moins toutes les boules, moins 00743, tous les zéros, 196 359 00657, plus 00537, 01592 017 01531 23 1160 138. Vega, Deneb 243 183 012, deux jets 19 secondes, R1 20101. Étoile du sextant entre 79 30 10 et 79 52 10. Attitude: tête en bas, rétrograde cabré à 28 degrés. HA après la c
かなりいいで
यह हां है, और यह उसके लिए है जब वह व
Les systèmes au sol semblent fonctionner normalement pour le moment. Les températures sont légèrement élevées, mais rien de critique n'est à signaler. Les derniers rapports indiquent que les onduleurs sont à environ 200 et 210 degrés; cela ne semble pas alarmant. Ils 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们希望获得您此次机
Хорошо. Это ваш дружелюбный самодельный комплект для связи с модулем управления, предлагающий процедуру действий в ситуации с гидроксидом лития. Всё в порядке. Мы замерили 1,8 миллиметра, и у вас достаточно... на весь оставшийся полёт. Однако, будучи осторожными, мы хотели бы использовать ещё один комплект контейнеров для командног
No, solo la costa è coperta. Il resto è CAVU (visibilità illimitata). Finché ho un po' di tempo, posso guardare. Ci sono alcune strade qui che sono piuttosto evident
很好。微调控制良好。-0.96，+0.96，-
Хорошо.
C'est affirmati
शायद थोड़ा क्षैतिज रूप से विस्थापित ह
알겠습니다, 13번. 이 프로젝트에 정말 많은 사람들이 참여하고 있습니다. 새로운 소식이 나오는 대
After checking the Spacecraft systems we found Thruster Number 8 apparently failed OPEN
Okay. And the note says that you should be able to hear us. If we can't hear you in a couple of minutes, you should close the POWER AMP circuit breaker on panel 16, and we expect to save an amp or more on this. It should work in the present attitude. When we go to the new yaw attitude, we're thinking about powering up the steerable, leaving the POWER AMP off and, if we can get good COMM in that mode, we'll still save some power. So if you concur, w
C'est exact. On a commencé à avoir une indication erratique sur le signal principal, alors on est passés au secondaire, et c'était encore erratique. J'ai pensé que ça pouvait être un problème de cap
双子座八号
Das ist eine gute und treffende Beschreibung. Mir scheint, es macht einen Unterschied, einfach im Tunnel zu sitzen und alle Fenster zu betrachten; es ist wichtig, aus welchem ​​Fenster man schaut. Die K
休斯顿，这里是
نحن الآن نقترب من بحر سميث، وهي منطقة صغيرة مغطاة ب
11, Houston. Obs
روجر. قياس ضغط الدم قادم الآن
Hey Frank, wie wär's mit ein paar Worten zu deiner Gesundheit für die ganze
Intelsat è un consorzio internazionale di comunicazioni composto da 63 nazioni; fornisce una mappa della prima rete di comunicazioni globale. Il nuovo satellite dovrebbe entrare in servizio commerciale a pieno regime il 2 gennaio, inizialmente servendo il Nord e il Sud America e l'Europa. Ulteriori informazioni sulla missione Apollo 8 saranno trasm
आगे बढ
यार
I got one more for you. You'll copy this and give me it all on the readback. Okay. Once you get the attitude and you want to use the - you want to get the lamp, we got to go CB 16
좋아요. 자, 조, 길이
هذا صحيح. قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية INVERTER POWER 1 و
它得升得
Das haben wir uns hier unten auch
네. 산소 유량 조절기가 최대치에 거의 도달할 때까지 조정한 다음, 직접 산소 공급 밸브를 약
우리는 바로 그 순간 메시에 크레이터들을 수직으로 내려다보며 관찰하고 있었는데, 메시에 A 크레이터 바닥에 꽤 큰 바위들이 보였습니다. 지금 우리의 고도가 얼마인지는 모르겠지만, 어쨌든 그 바위들은 
D'accord. Concernant votre atterrissage, les conditions météorologiques prévue
よし、フレッド。その前に、つまりマイナス1時間前に、機体を以下の角度に操縦しろ。ロール130°、ピッ
حسنًا، احصل على B 02 45 50؛ دلتا-في، 2
了解。今、私たちはその姿勢で走査望遠鏡を覗いています。星はほとんど見えません。スラスターが噴射するたびに、視界が完全に真っ白
जेमिनी 4, जेमिनी 4, यह ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम है
I nostri esperti affermano che non è questa la causa del problema. Affermano che la stratificazione falsifica il sensore di capa
रॉजर। बहुत ज़्यादा ऊँचा। रेडिएटर पर बाय-पास मोड
Понял. Похоже, нет никакого медленного способа перевести REPRESS в автоматический режим и избе
那玩意儿到底在哪儿
Houston, do you show the - Houston, Apollo 8 - do you show the
Mal sehen, was ich jetzt tun kann – ich bewege gerade meine Arme hin und her, und das kann ich an den Zeigern für Rollen, Gieren und Nicken erkennen.
स्क्रीन के बिल्कुल दाहिने किनारे
मैं फ्लाईबाई एंगल की नकल करने के 
Man kann die Schwerelosigkeit auch nutzen, um viele Dinge zu demonstrieren, die wir alle in der Schule gelernt haben. Ich möchte kurz zeigen, wie einfach sich die Funktionsweise eines Gyroskops erklären lässt. Wenn ich diese Dose drehe, wissen wir laut den Bewegungsgleichungen, d
أبولو 8، هيوستن. فرانك، نود ال
了解しました。一つお知らせがあります。彼らは中継機を使ってハワイ経由であなたと連絡を取ろ
حسنًا، أرى عطارد يمر عبر وهج الهواء. سنرى إن كان سيصمد. عندما قلتُ "أرى"، كانت تلك البداية. مارك، أول تغيير في اللو
ワシントン発：「このクリスマス、世界は平和への希望で明るく輝いています。希望が現実となり、再び銃声が静まる時、それは皆さんが勇気と技量をもって平和を追い求めてきたからこそ実
2, /: 46427, माइनस 053, प्लस 141, माइनस 01350, प्लस 0000, प्लस 0000 000 175 358 00607, प्लस 00606 01350 009 01265 02 3112 197; टॉरस, आइडा, ऊपर 16.2, बाएँ 0.1, निश्चित रीड लागू नहीं; सीरियस, रिगेल 129 155 010, कोई उलेज नहीं, इग्निशन माइनस
罗杰，哥伦比亚。我知道
BATT bus 
Роджер. Не могли бы вы еще раз прокомментировать это, систему отношения к визуальной отсылке, и 
Roger.
ヴァンス、今からお見せしようと思っていたのですが…もしかしたら、地球から月までの距離をどうやって測るのか、地球の皆さんも興味があるかもしれませんね。今、
Apollo 8, Houston
تم إصدار التوجيه
了解。こちらに向かっています。30、SPS/G&N: 36691; マイナス 061、プラス 067 135 23 4149;、プラス 32020、プラス 06713、マイナス 02773 181 054 013;、HA は NA、プラス 00230 32833 228、DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355。次の3行は NA。プラス 1103、マイナス - マイナス 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52。設定した星はデネブとベガで、242 172 012。2つのジェット機のアレージは16秒です。地平線はTIGマイナス2分で11度の位置になります。その他、コメン
私たちはT/Mだと思います...ほら、私はあなたの手袋を1つ手に入れました...私は
Have a go with your guid
알겠습니다. 패널 3: 배터리 충전, 꺼짐 - 잭, 이미 하셨네요. 다음은 AC 인
Défilement ORDEAL? Faites-en q
Qui a Houston, ieri le tue tre mogli e i tuoi figli si sono riuniti per pranzo a casa di Buzz. E secondo Pat, si è rivelato un vero e proprio tripudio di chiacchiere. I bambini hanno nuotato e fatt
نعم، لكن يبدو أنها لم تنجح أبدًا... قمت بحساب الوقت..
Okay. After number 1, first line, cross out "And VHF-A." Second line, cross out "SIMPLEX operation." Third line, cross out "Prime." That refers to PRIME POWER AMP, OFF. That - that "PRIME" should actually be replaced by OFF. And that's the second prime that line. Also in the third line the last word "OFF" should be crossed out and replaced by "PCM." Fourth line is okay. Fifth line, which is "VHF VOICE, ON, OFF, OFF," cross out. "Lighting, FLOODS," which is the next line should be "OFF", but add the following, "Or
That's affirmative. The procedure was given to me 10 minutes ago. I have 10 more minutes to wait until I try to
Roger, Gemini 4. Reading you loud and clear. Did you get your map upd
It looks like in our power-down (illegible) we're still pulling just a little less than 11 amps. We've got 10 on no. 1 and a little less than 11 on no. 2. The tether - the location of the tether or the umbilical restraint on the outside hatch made it rather difficult to do any EVA work as far as free tether aerodynamics out in front of the spacecraft. Whenever I'd be operating out in that area, the tether would - when it would come to its end would start me back and the reaction would carry me back up towards the - over the spacecraft and b
休斯顿，这里是阿波罗8号。我们尽量让这里的
180 degrees to the right. H
मेरा कहने का मतलब यह था कि हम प्राइमरी ऑक्सीजन सिस्टम में दब
로저. 당신에게 다가가고 있습니다. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; -061, +067 135 23 4149;, +32020, +06713, -02773 181 054 013;, HA는 NA, +00230 32833 228, DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355. 다음 세 줄은 NA입니다. +1103, -- -17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. 설정 별은 데네브와 베가, 242 172 012입니다. 우리는 16초에 두 개의 제트 엔진 여유 공간을 선호합니다. 지평선은 TIG에서 2분 후에 11
Okay, Fly-by-Wire ist auf niedrig eingestellt, und der Normalmodus ist aktiviert, Automatik, Gyroskope sind deaktiviert, Manöver sind weiterhin aus. Und die 
Роджер. Понимаете, что 14 секунд, время сгорания, номинальное положение, две десятых X, одна десятая Y и ничего - минус одна деся
La vitesse sembl
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। बायोमेड स्विच सेंटर से अनुर
Io
ゲインを高く設定している間に
ओह, हाँ; दूर क्ष
좋아요, 프레드. 사진이 정말 멋지네요. 어떤 설정으로 찍으셨는지 알려주시면 좋
Roger. Ho la luna proprio al centro del mio campo visivo. È un riferimento di imbardata meraviglioso. Non c'è da preoccuparse
ठीक है। फिलह
休斯顿，我们的预检中不会显示这项，但
सूर्यास्त का नज़ारा काफ़ी मनमोहक है, मुझे नहीं लगता कि मुझे इसे देखने में ज़्यादा समय बर्बाद करने की ज़रूरत है। यह बहुत दिलचस्प है। दूसरी बात, यह देखना भी दिलचस्प है कि जब आँखें इसके अनुकूल नहीं होतीं तो यह कितना काला दिखता है। मुझे खिड़की पर कुछ परत साफ़ दिखाई दे रही है। इस समय मैं UHF-hi में VOX पर वापस जा रहा हूँ ताकि ट्रांसमिट कर सकूँ। दाहिने माइक्रोफ़ोन को पोंछने के लिए विज़र खोल रहा हूँ। मैंने इसे चाट लिया था। विज़र बंद कर रहा हूँ। सूट सर्किट को काम करने के लिए विज़र को तुरंत सील कर दिया गया। मैं इसे दोबारा गंदा नहीं करना चाहता। सूट का इनलेट लगभग 68 डिग्री पर बहुत अच्छे से स्थिर है। इसलिए डोम को फिर से ऊपर उठाना पड़ेगा। यह अभी 76, 75 पर है। ज़ाहिर है, यही ऊँची सेटिंग हमें चाहिए। मुझे लगता है कि मैं अब इसमें आधा अंक और बढ़ा दूँगा और शायद हम इसे लॉक कर पाएँगे। यह आख़िरकार थोड़ा ठंडा हो रहा है, इसलिए मुझे पता है कि मुझे सेटिंग कहाँ रखनी है। मैंने सूट और कंट्रोल लीवर के लिए कूलेंट की मात्रा 8.5 पर सेट कर दी है। इस समय डोम का तापमान 75 डिग्री है। सूट का इनलेट 68 डिग्री है। बहुत अच्छा लग रहा है। मुझे ठं
짐이 방금 또 다른 인공위성을 봤어요. 전에 봤던 것처럼 아직 자세히 설명해 주지는 않았네요. 37시였는데, 그건 틀렸어요.
Okay. Sie können jetzt zum Außenbordeinsatz (EVA) aufbrechen. Bereit für die Dekompressionskorrektur. Können Sie uns bitte den Blutdruck des Kommandopiloten mitteile
هذا صحيح، 13. على حد علمي ب
当时我们舱内的压力也更高。所有数据都记录在机载磁带上，
هذه هيوستن. نستطيع رؤية يد باز اليمنى. الصورة غير واضحة بعض الشيء. أظن أننا كنا نركز على مسافة تتراوح بين 20 و30 سم خلف موضع يده عندما
いいえ。こちら側では見かけないようです。カナベラルを出て前を向いた直後に少しだけ見えました。その時、粒子は私の方に向かってきていました。私は出発する途中だったので、カプセルから来たものではないことは分かっています。これまで、日の出のたびに大量の粒子を見てきまし
Да. Довольно неплохо. 
광학계에 대한 또 다른 의견입니다. 지금 우리는 M선을 통과하고 있는데, 롤은 약 182도, 피치는 약 226도, 요는 약 18도입니다. 이 특정 자세에서 축을 완전히 회전시킬 수 있는데, M선의 이쪽 약 10도 지점에 빛줄기가 나타납니다. 축 위치에 따라 밝기가 달라지지만, 이 특정 자세에서는 분명히 
Нет. Знаете, вы же знаете, какие они. Им нрави
Bene. St
好的。现在我想去，我将使用你的三个角度，并执
APS 以外す
この期間中のタナナリブ通過時の音声テープは現時点では入手できません。タナナリブ通信技術者はヒューストン通信局（CAP COM）の77 54 27番に、ジェミニ4号と交信し、乗組員がテープ再生スイッチをコマンドに、T/Mスイッチをコマンドに切り替えたと報告しました。タナナ
这里是Sigma Seve
बहुत बढ़िया। हमने आपके लिए
In sports, the Houston Oilers are showing plenty of enthusiasm in their early preseason workouts at Kerrville, and Coach Wally Lemm says he is impressed with the fine group of rookies. National League baseball yesterday, Thursday: St. Louis 11, Philadelphia 3; Montreal 5, over Pittsburg 4; Atlanta 12, Cincinnati 2; San Fransciso 14, and Los Angeles 13. American League: we have Baltimore 3,
Eagle - Houston, ici Eagle. Je vous reçois parfaitement sur la bande S, voi
Hier haben wir noch 67 Prozent Treibstoff. Ich frage mich, warum sie nich
알았어, 잭. 나도
Roger, Scott. Ich befinde mich im Driftflug, habe aber den Klimaanlagenbus eingeschaltet. Er funktioniert einwandfrei. Die Notfunkbaken schalte ich später ein. Der gewählte Steuermodus ist Fly-by-Wire, obwohl ich nicht aktiv s
Итак, «Аполлон-8». Вы готовы. Конец связи
Хорошо, Джек, начнём. Мне очень жаль, что мы можем пропустить этот этап. Я очень надею
Я имею в виду огни Дурбана. Мне не удалось их увидеть. Я вижу какие-то огни на земле — в это время — посреди окна, как раз в то время, когда должны быть видны огни Дурбана. Они находятся под облаками, и их недостаточно хорошо
Flight sagt, er mache 
حسنًا. هل يمكننا - بما أن الجزء الأول منه، ستقرأ أنت فقط وسأقوم
حسنًا. ما نود فعله يا جيم هو أننا سنقوم بضبط المحاذاة التقريبية لزوايا المحور التي ستستخدمها، ثم سنجهز المنصة. وعندما تتصل وتستخدم برنامج PICAPAR، قد لا تكون الصورة قريبة بما يكفي لوضع النجم في السدس، ولكن إذا استطعت رؤية أي نجم ساطع في المنطقة المحيطة - وأعني بالمنطقة المحيطة درجتين إلى ثلاث درج
Хорошо. И прост
В Западной Германии понедельник объявлен «Днем Аполлона». Школьники в Баварии получили выходной. Сотрудникам почты рекомендовано приносить на работу радиоприемники, а во Франкфурте устанавливают телевизоры 
Ok. È affermativo. Quindi, in termini generali, quello che dovremo fare è accendere il e far apparire la palla otto, quindi impostare l'assetto, posizionare il nel finestrino anteriore e il controllo di guida sarà attivo, ovviamente. Ma orientare manualmente la navicella per posizionare il centro della Terra direttamente fuori dall'asse Z. Quindi ruotare attorno all'asse Z per posizionare la punta della falce sull'asse Y del. E questo avrà il vostro asse X positivo
D'accord. Merci. Bien, la prochaine étape après le réglage des vannes de régulation d'eau consiste à effectuer le préchauffage. Nous le feron
알겠습니다. 이것은 LM 기동 패드, PC 플러스 2시간, 시작 시 0833.0, -0050.9, -0213.9, N/A, +0020.5, 0861.5, 4:24, 272, 081이며, 나머지는 다음과 같은 주석을 제외하고는 N/A입니다. 연료 탱크 용량, 제트 엔진 2개, 10초; 중량, 62480; 중량, 33452이며, 스로틀 프로필은 이전과 동일하게 최소 5초, 40% 21초, 나머지 시간은 
Okay
Okay. Roger. Verstanden, basierend auf einem anvisierten Landeplatz; T1, 104 32 18; T2, 104 37 28 und 4 Meilen südli
بدأ الضوء يتسلل، وما زلت أرى عدداً ل
حسن
さあ、ヒューストン。アポ
实际上，这已经是我们通常能得到的纯度最高的了。所以
रॉजर। आरोही नोड
यहां तापमान 140 डिग्री है। और यह धीरे-धीरे
Позвольте мне сначала повернуться к вам спи
좋아요. 
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。状態ベクトルのロー
Roger. Crew status report as follows: water, the commander has about 50 clicks so far today; CMP 43; and the LMP is 44. We've eaten two meals so far today. Day 3 meal A and B; consumed most of it except for the hard hard bite, which no one cares for. Pudding was outstanding. We're at a gain of
Manche dieser kleinen Vertiefungen neigen dazu, abzusinken – vielleicht um 5 bis 7,5 cm. Das entspricht genau dem, was die Bilder des Vermessers zeigten, als sie etwas weggeschoben wurden. Dabei wird eine Kraft durch die oberste Bodenschicht übertragen, und etwa 12 bis 15 cm Erdr
Verificata l'usabilità della scheda di memoria e dei segnali di lettura. Tutto a posto
Роджер. Жителям космического корабля «Колумбия», возможно, будет интересно узнать, что сегодня в Колумбии День независимости. Вчера вечером Глория Диас из Филиппин была коронована как «Мисс Вселенная». Она обошла 60 других девушек в борьбе за титул чемпионки мира по красоте. Мисс Диас 18 лет, у нее черные волосы и глаза, параметры фигуры 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. Первой вице-мисс стала Мисс Австралия, за ней следуют Мисс Израиль и Мисс Япония. Пока вы будете возвращаться во вторник вечером, в Вашингтоне будут играть команды всех звезд Американской и Национальной лиг. Ожидается, что Мел Стоттлмайр из «Янкиз» станет первым питчером Американской лиги. Пока никто не предсказывает, кто станет первым питчером Национальной лиги. В составе команды девять питчеров. Хотя исследования в космической программе, безусловно, принесли свои плоды, похоже, что не всегда все приносит результаты. Корпорация Woodstream, м
D'accord. Pouvez-vous mieux me compre
Roger. 91 plus 30, minus 7 Prozent; Alfa minus 8, Bravo minus 2,5, Charlie minus 10, Delta minus 6,5
S
D'accord. Apollo 11 reste l'événement majeur, le monde entier attendant votre atterrissage aujourd'hui vers 11h49, heure de Houston. À Washington, les réformateurs fiscaux de la Chambre des représentants ont élaboré une disposition qui empêcherait les personnes fortunées d'échapper totalement à l'impôt sur le revenu grâce à des placements exonérés d'impôt ou des abattements spéciaux. Selon la proposition adoptée provisoirement par la commiss
Das d
좋아요. 시작. 127. 2+40. 16 55 57. 2+25. 15도/초 105. 2+13. 11 32 44. 10+48. 60-BRAVO: 120. 2+32. 13 05 56. 10+58. 61-BRAVO: 93. 1+58 14 45 02. 11+04. 62-BRAVO: 85. 1+47. 16 18 08. 10+29. 63-BRAVO: 82. 1+44. 17 48 43. 10+07. 이게 다
Thank you. I had a good C
——我能认出猫爪状的地貌，也能认出最末端的那对陨石坑，但我看
휴스턴, 7.7 + X + 0.00001 Y로 연소를 완료했고, Z 값은 모두 0입니다. 짐벌 각도는 롤 180도, 피치 310도, 요 0.020도입니다
दरअसल, यह उतना बुरा भी नही
Ric
了解しました、ジム。エバポレーターについてですが、次回、日光が当たる裏側で同様の問題が発生した場合は、エバポレーターの出口温度を確認してください。もし60℃を超えるようであれば、二次ループの温
Okay. Oka
वो नील था। ये बज़ है। काश पता चल पात
حسنًا. في
좋습니다. 모드 1, 5시간, 롤 1.38, 피치 7.89, 요 357.37. 모드 1, 15분, 롤 
了解。今、月の高度は22
全
Un'altra piccola notizia locale: il tribunale della contea di Huntsville è andato a fuoco prima dell'alba di ieri, quindi sembra che riprenderanno i lavori di costruzione. Ho ricevuto un piccolo articolo sulle famiglie in attesa. Questo è di Ann James, giornalista del Post. "Ci riposiamo sul lato oscuro d
Gemini VI, la tua orbita è 87 per 
كان ذلك غباءً. الآن ننتقل إلى وضع التحكم الإلكتروني المنخفض. لقد ارتكبتُ خطأً فادحًا في التحكم، وأفسدتُ الأمر تمامًا. لكن من الأفضل ترشيد استهلاك الوقود. من السهل جدًا الوقوع في خطأ التحكم المزدوج، حتى مع وجود هذا الم
ठ
まあ、彼らはこれを巧妙に行います - ちょうど地球の反対側でなので、常にピッチングする必要がありま
Roger, Houston. Quello che abbiamo in programma di fare per voi oggi è partire dalla navicella spazia
冗談じゃない！私も同感です。起こったことは、私たちが以前に経験したことのないことではなく、事前に手順を練っていなかったことでもあります。私たちが行ったことは、今日非常に大きな成果をもたらしたと思います。私たちが受けたすべての訓練と、共に
Questa è Friendship Seven, che trasmette nella capsula. L'alba è spuntata dietro il periscopio. Era brillante nel mirino, di un rosso brillante mentre si avvicinava all'orizzonte e sorgeva; e proprio mentre... mentre guardavo di nuovo fuori dal finestrino, ho visto letteralmente migliaia di piccole particelle luminose che turbinavano intorno alla capsula e si allontanavano da me a una velocità di circa 5-8 chilometri orari. Ora che sono fuori, al sole splendente, sembrano essere scomparse. Era proprio mentre il sole stava sorgendo. Riesco ancora a vederne solo alcune, anche se il sole è alto circa 20° sopra 
This is Cape, estimating 04 50. Ov
Okay. Das ist richtig. Schritt 8 lautet nun: „Führen Sie auf Anfrage Schritt 9 aus.“ Anders gesagt: Sie warten, bis wir uns entschieden haben, wie vorzugehen ist, und zwar gemäß der bereits mitgeteilten Anweisung. Und Schritt 9, den ich Ihnen jetzt gebe, lautet: „HELIUMMONITOR AUS, WECHSELR
알겠습니다. 패널 3: 처음 세 줄은 이미 제가 처음에 되돌리기 절차에서 처리했으니, MODE, VOICE부터 시작해서 VOICE로 되돌리세요. POWER, OFF; PMP, OFF; S-BAND ANTENNA, OMNI Bravo. 패널 225
アポロ 8 号、戻って、最小周星群に 2 を加えたピッチ列が 101
네, 휴스턴, 물병자리시네요. 태양의 기
Roger. Wie wäre es mit der Einstellung „Antenne mit hoher Verstärkung“ 
Хорошо. Правила работы дв
Negativo. Al momento non c'è da preoccuparsi. Stiamo monitorando la situazione e volevamo s
रॉजर। अब हम बूस्टर के पास पहुँच रहे हैं, और आप देख सकते हैं कि दिन का उजाला शुरू हो रहा है। लाइटें साफ़ दिखाई दे रही हैं, और मेरा अनुमान है कि इस समय हम बूस्टर से लगभग तीन-चौथाई मील की दूरी पर हैं। लाइटें बहुत आसानी से दिख रही हैं, और क्षितिज भी इस समय स्पष्ट रूप से दिखाई दे रहा है। हमने कॉन्टारे
很好，迪
St
원하시면 지금 바로 산소
Roger, 11. Ici Houston. Entre 71 et 72 heures environ, vous atterrirez pour une période de repos, probablement déjà en cours. 71 heures: purge de la pile à combustible O2; 72 heures: changement du filtre CO2 n° 6, vérification du débit du radiateur secondaire. Nous vous enverrons ensuite les données de vol après un passage de 2 heures, un passage de péricynthion et une interruption du mode retour. À 73 heures 00 minutes: arrêt à environ 0 degré de roulis. Autrement dit, lorsque vous approchez de 0 degré de roulis vers 73 heures, nous vous demandons de vous arrêter. Effectuez ensuite l'option 3 restante pour une vérification de dérive. 73 heures 20 minutes: nous vous communi
كول
Okay, SERVICE MODULE HEATER MAIN B, offen, und HE
Yes, I know they're
أبولو 8، هيوستن. يمكنك إيقاف تشغيل 
TR 시간은 7-3 지역 기준이며, 현재 시간으로부터 약 1시간 15분 후입니다
حسناً يا أوديسي، لقد تقدمتِ ف
Gemini 4. Flight möchte eine Bestätigung erhalten, dass dies für Sie Sequenznummer 15 auf diesem Apo
Friendship Seve
好的。当你开始你的活动时，我希望你按照我推荐的方式进行，我大概需要修改你时间表上的四项内容，所以如果你准备好
로저: 되감기 중입니다. 테이프 
Roger. Nous avons un 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, moins 061, plus 067 135 23 4149; plus 32020, plus 06713, moins 02773 181 054 013; NA, plus 00230, plus 32833 228 32625, 24 1510 355; NA tro
Roger, Ed. We want you to resume your normal Flight Plan. We base this on the fact that we feel that you have 205 ft/sec ΔV left and 63 revolutions you'll still be in a 81, 125.7 orbit. That will leave us enough for OAMS retro which 
Négatif. Nous n'en av
रॉजर। वाशिंगटन में, सीनेट वित्त समिति ने आयकर अधिभार के विस्तार को मंजूरी दे दी है, लेकिन विधेयक पर सीनेट में मतदान की संभावना फिलहाल कम ही लग रही है। ऑस्टिन में, ह्यूस्टन के राज्य प्रतिनिधि रे लेमन को अमेरिकन सोसाइटी फॉर ओशनोग्राफी के राष्ट्रीय निदेशक के रूप में नामित किया गया है। लेमन ने टेक्सास में एक समुद्र विज्ञान संस्थान स्थापित करने की संभावना का अध्ययन करने का प्रस्ताव रखा है। यह पश्चिमी मैक्सिको की खाड़ी में इस प्रकार का पहला संस्थान होगा। मिनियापोलिस, मिनेसोटा में, मौसम विभाग ने आज के मौसम का सारांश देते हुए बताया कि अधिकतम तापमान 88 और न्यूनतम तापमान 72 रहेगा, और कहा है कि "बर्फबारी नहीं होगी।" सेंट पीटर्सबर्ग, फ्लोरिडा से, नॉर्वेजियन खोजकर्ता थोर हेयर्डाहल की एक रेडियो रिपोर्ट आई है, जिसमें कहा गया है कि उनकी पपाइरस नाव, रा, का दल भारी समुद्री तूफानों से हुए नुकसान के बावजूद ब्रिजटाउन, बारबाडोस की ओर रवाना होगा। हालांकि, दल एक एस्कॉर्ट पोत पर सोएगा। अभियान के 
अपोलो
Attendre un
没错，阿波罗11号。迈克，这和脱离对接
Ich verstehe dich laut
Мы совершили подобный вход в атмосферу на «Аполлоне-8»… с Хьюстоном, старина Базз включил обогреватели командного модуля и оставил их включенными. Активаторы закричали: «Ура!» — оба бака; у нас закончилось топливо. Скорость входа была очень низкой… Мы даже вышли в консоль и начали разбор полетов, но оставили все включенным и наблюдали; и этот сукин сын сделал прыжок с места, прыжок снизу… но не очень большой, а затем м
알겠습니다. 그리고 참가 신청을 하실 때 조금 천천히 진행해 주시면, 저희가 여기서 각 신청 과정을
つ
Siehst du da oben W
Roger. Frank, vorrei parlarti p
Gemini 4,
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 자세 설정 스
Roger, signore, se potesse tenermi premuto per 15 s
- - ويشرب عصيره البرتقالي اللذيذ. ربما يجب أن أقول إنه يشرب عصيره البرتقالي. فهو عادةً ليس بهذه السرعة. بيل في عجلة من أمره 
نعم، أنا أيضاً 
我还有一些其
حسنًا. سأنسخ هذه البيانات، و
ش
Bene, spero... spero che abbiano i dati che mostrano esattamente cosa avevamo
Ro
Devo chi
これは良い例です。地球が窓 1 の外に、月が窓 3 の外にあり、太陽が下にあるため、ここの照明は比較的一
你有
Roger, Houston – Hier spricht Hou
قال إن عبور جميع الرجال الـ 82 لجسر اللاعودة، وهو الجسر الذي يفصل بين كوريا الشمالية والجنوبية، استغرق حوالي 30 دقيقة. وصلوا في تمام الساعة 11:30 صباحًا، وانتهوا عند الظ
Ehi, vediamo se riesco a iniziar
はい。アップデート情報をお
Bien reçu. Je vous ai bien compris. Cette communication est incroyablement bon
Хорошо, Джим. Ваша текущая конфигурация имеет следую
Forza
10, 9, 8, 7, 6, 5, 4, 
अच्छा, यह उनमें से एक है। और हम आपको कुछ बताना चाहते हैं जो
Хорошо. А после того, как вы установите его
Dis donc, tu as l'air bien petit là-bas, 
अब मुझे बहुत अच्छा लग र
أبقِ رأسك منخفضًا وقريبًا من جسمك. الآن ابدأ بتقويس ظهرك. هذا جيد. هناك مساحة كافية. الآن، حسنًا، قوّس ظهرك قليلًا، وارفع رأسك عن الأرض. *** تدحرج ق
11, Houston. Buz
Ok, torniamo a pagina 18. Continueremo così a 30 secondi, 10 secondi, 7 secondi, meno 5 secondi. A "accensione", nessuna accensio
Okay. That last comment w
네, 맞습니다. 그럼 이 구성에서 다시 설정하려면, 
अगर यह ठीक नहीं है, तो हमें वैसे भी एक
और जैक, मेरे जैसे नौसिखिए के लिए एक अच्छी बात यह है कि यहाँ घूमना-फिरना बहुत आसान है। जैसा कि आप कमांड मॉड्यूल सिम्युलेटर में काम करने से जानते हैं, शून्य गुरुत्वाकर्षण का होना वाकई बहुत फायदेमंद होता है। क्योंकि एक गुरुत्वाकर्षण में वहाँ घूमना-फिरना काफी मुश्किल हो जाता है, लेकिन इस वातावरण में यह बहुत आसान है। जैसा कि आप देख सकते हैं, यह काफी साफ-सुथरा दिख रहा था, मुझे इसमें कुछ ढीले वॉशर मिले और सीक्वेंस कैमरे का एक छोटा सा प्लास्टिक का ढक्कन ढीला हो गया था जो मुझे ईडी पैनल के पास फंसा हुआ मिला। ठीक है। जिम के ठीक नीचे, वह वास्तव में एक डिब्बे जैसी चीज़ पर खड़ा है। और पीछे मौजूद सभी लोगों की जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, इस डिब्बे के अंदर एसेंट इंजन है, जहाँ आप
रॉजर, जिम। यहाँ से सब कुछ बहुत अच्छा दिख
罗杰，
Le contraste a a
No, I don't think we're getting an awfu
صحيح. أنا - لم أدخل - أعطيتُ - أعدتُ الجهاز للحظة. أعدتُ مفتاح الوضع من يدوي إلى وضع آخر بينما كنتُ أُحاول ضبطه، لكن الجهاز أخفى النجم عن الأ
알겠습니다. "하단 게이트까지 5분"에서
로저,
جميعنا نشعر بحالة جيدة الآن؛ لا توجد مشاكل.
मैंने
بعد ساع
أشعر وكأنني مليونير. حسناً، سنرفع الطائرة ونتجه
3,7
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन; एक्वेरियस। हमने पावर कनेक्शन पूरा कर लिया है और ऊपर सब ठीक लग रहा है। क्या हम बैटरी चार्ज करने क
यहां एक दिलचस्प खबर है जिसे सुनकर अच्छा लगा। ऐसा लगता है कि मिशिगन के एन आर्बर में एक नया युवा गिरोह पनपा है। इसका नाम गिलनेट गिरोह है। यह गिरोह एन आर्बर की गलियों में छुपकर घूमता है और कभी-कभी कानून को भी दरकिनार कर देता है। वे खुद को 'गुरिल्ला फॉर गुड' कहते हैं। उन्होंने कुछ कारनामे किए हैं, जैसे कि एक पुल पर अश्लील
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि आपको दो कमांड मॉड्यूल लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड के कनस्तर, ग्रे टेप का एक रोल, दो S (क्योंकि हम S के बैग इस्तेमाल करेंगे), और एक क्यू कार्ड (एक कार्डबोर्ड क्यू कार्ड जिसे आप रिंग से लगभग डेढ़ इंच काट लेंगे) की आवश्यकता होगी। अब, मुझे लगता है कि हमें
지금 계획을 세우고 있습니다. 혹시 필요한 물질이 있는지 확인해 보겠습
D'accord. Vous pouvez aussi oublier la « Suivi ». Bien, à la page 17, saisissez toutes les informations. À 4 minutes, nous avons une modification. Première ligne: CB(16) INVERTER 3, FERMER; ligne 2, rayez « Sélectionnez INVERTER 1 ». Ensuite, en descendant la page, après « ATTITUDE MO
Roger. Wir bräuchten eine Blutdruckm
ジェミニ4号、ジェミニ4号、こちらRKV CAP
Attendez une secon
로저입니다. 스콧과 저는 여기서 신호를 아주 선명하게 수신했습니다. 그쪽은 항상 신호가 깨끗한 것 같네요
看来用单筒望远镜获得稳定视野的最佳方法是，先稳住望远镜，让它在眼
了解。サーマルは
짐, 지금 연소 작업
了解。ロー
吉姆，就目前
Okay. Between your first and second repressurization, in that wait period, we want you to put your radiator to BYPASS and then to FLOW after yo
了解。メインバスは24、ワンは25、25、25。スタンバイワンは25、25。アイソレートは29、メインは再び24。ファンは113、113。右側のスイッチヒューズはすべてオン。ただし、RetrojettisonとRetromanualはセンターオフの位置。その他のスイッ
Well, I'm reading 70 [degrees]. I'm really a little at a loss as to how to get it down, my suit---water valve is set now past the marks. This doesn't seem to being it down, and neither does putting it... negative. That's wrong. The cabin was past the marks. The suit tem
Roger, Jack. Da wir die Startposition haben, planen wir, diese Informationen zu nutzen, um eine grobe Andockposition zu ermitteln. Dann befinden wir uns in der Abwurfposition des Servicemoduls. Wir warten, bis es Zeit ist, das System hochzufahren, und ermitteln die grobe Andockposition. Anschließend wählen wir einige geeignete Sterne für eine präzise Anflugrichtung aus. Es sieht so aus, als könnten wir einige Sterne finden, 
네, 맞습니다. 숫자 자체와 'PROGRAM', 'VERB', 'NOUN', 'COMPUTER ACTIV
Man, 
잘 
Аврора Севен, можем ли мы перейти к контрольному списку
알겠습니다. 
Понял. У тебя пока нет захвата цели, и тебе нужно подождать, прежде чем отправл
罗杰。在比尔睡着之前，我们
Je viens de terminer la 29e prise de vue avec mon Hasselblad lors d'un voyage à travers l'Afrique du Nord et l'Arabie. Je crois que nous avons surv
这是友谊七号。我现在完全手动控制。之前它还在断断
用 F2.8 光圈和 B 门拍了几张照片。现在，照片在这里，一张是气球的。现在
Roger, ver
В блоке, где написано «Фотографии солнечной короны и осветления края диска», вычеркните «И фотографии осветлен
收到。我们
ठीक है, बिल। इस बार हम इस संगीत को एक अलग तरह के सिस्टम पर चला
Роджер. Плюс 1418, минус 16505, 12904 36160; выровняйтесь со звездами Сириуса и Ри
그게 당신에게 자신감을 주
Я просто хочу держаться подаль
了解です。時刻は - イベントは - で、姿勢はロール101.0、ピッチ090.0、ヨーは全開です。高ゲイン角度はピッチマイナス23、ヨー93です。通常の手順で速度を減衰させます。速度を減衰させた後、ス
Okay. Now it looks like - Okay, the weather on the horizon -- clouds, clouds on the horizon on the left hand side of the picture, I can see the clouds right up to about the middle, and at the middle it looks like they break off, and then there's just some scattered high stuff - it looks like this stu
Я ещё довольно далеко. Это определённо панель SLA — в этом нет никаки
누군가 "우리가 너희들을 대신해서 일
Bien. Voyons voir s
वाइज़र बंद कर रहा हूँ। ठीक है। चलिए देखते हैं कि हम कहाँ हैं। इस बिंदु पर हमने डोज़ीमीटर से जाँच कर ली है। मैं फ्लाई-बाय-वायर तकनी
そうなんですか。まるでハワイに帰っていくよう
Sigma Seven, hier spricht Woomera Cap
حسناً يا جاك. هل تريدني أن أقرأها
没错，我
Roger, Houston. plus 4. Weight remains the same, minus 164 plus 129 minus
休斯顿。收到。完
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आपने वो टेप डंप कर दिया है? हम जल्द ही सबसे ज़्यादा बढ़त हासिल करने वाले खिलाड़ी को
빌, 당신 말이 잘
実は、この相対湿度
收到。我大概在7分10秒的时候进入了飞行状态。助推器非常稳定地悬停在我上方，应该说是在地平线以上。我现在处于“猩猩模式”，
Sie hat, wie ich vers
Роджер, Ба
Roger. We'd like you to switch to OMNI Delta as we show you approximately at the scan limit of the high gain antenna. Now we will then command OMNI Delta down here after you advise us 
حسناً. ا
Верно
알겠습니다, 인디언 캡 콤입니다. 잘 들립니다. 저는 어떻습니까
Et vous voulez que nous gardions le contrôle
13, Houston. Affirmatif. 
Hé, ça a l'air bon, Jerry - un bon vieux rôti de bœuf et du Yorkshir
Roger. In meiner letzten Schlafphase habe ich vier Stunden geschlafen, die meiste Zeit davon tief und fest. Meine letzte Mahlzeit bestand aus Erdnusswürfeln, Orangensaft, Sandwiches und einem Fruchtcocktail. Dazu habe ich et
Хорошо. Перейдите к панели 380, клапан регулирования п
C'est négatif, Apollo 8. Nous aimerions d'abord mettre à jour certaines choses
Bene, in quell'ultimo passaggio abbiamo scattato circa 38 foto con il Synoptic Terrain Photography, partendo un po' a est di San Diego e fino a quando non abbiamo incontrato di nuovo la copertura nuvolosa. Abbiamo ripreso con immagini intermittenti non appena abbiamo iniziato a sorvolare la parte meridionale degli Stati Uniti, passando per l
Roger. There's not 
Roger. Go a
Aquarius, Houston. Concernant les cartouches de CO2, le PCO2 est actuellement de 1,6. Nous estimons pouvoir utiliser les deux cartouches actuelles pendant au moins six heures supplémentaires. Cependant, à 112 heures, lorsque plusieurs personnes seront en vol, nous installerons deux cartouches supplémentaires selon une nouvelle procédure simplifiée. En attendant, si u
R
Well, I can show you my heart's still working
这是友谊七号。之前非洲上空云层很厚，现在云层已经稀薄了很多。
Okay. Das war ein kleiner 
好的，回到第18页。我们继续，分别在30秒、10秒、7秒、减5秒处进行。在“点火”处，没有点火，我们在这里添加“没
로저. 여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동 중입니다. 다시 한번 장비 수량을 알려드렸습니다. 더 이상 시간을 낭비할 필요는 없습니다. 관측을 위해 
Und, nun ja, wo Sie den Block in der Mitte der Seite haben, der besagt – 
, quel controllo è a post
Ich seh
알겠습니다. 제어 모드가 어떻게
Souha
收到。继续报告。舱压5.5，保持良好。舱内空气温度95华氏度；相对湿度20%；冷却剂用量67%；宇航服温度67华氏度；压力5.8；蒸汽温度50华氏度，正在缓慢下降。氧气浓度70-100%；电流22安培。除了故障之外，目前唯一异常的情况是太空舱周围出现了一些发光的小颗粒，日出时分太平洋上空出
로저. 오로라 세븐, 상태는 양호합니다. 지금 진동이 꽤 심하고 연료도 거의 다 떨어졌습니다. 태양 각도는 약 45
Give me a call 
알겠습니다. 잭, 저는 그 장비들에 대해 어떤 계획이나 생각을 하고 있는지, LiOH 캐니스터를 사용할지 아니면 지휘 모듈에 장비를 다시 가져갈지, 아니면 그냥 앞으로의 계획이 무엇인지 알고 싶습
होला, मित्र, मेक्सिको से मित्रता और विशेष रूप से गुएमास से मित्र। डेसडे एल एस्पासिओ एक्सटीरियर, सु
알겠습니다, 잭. 이제 남은 단계는 이 장비를 완전히 작동시키기 위한 우주복 루프 설정 단계입니다. 저희는 당신이 작업 중인 캐니스터의 압력이 7.6mmHg에 도달할 때까지 이 단계를 보류하려고 합니다. 아마 45분에서 1시간 정도 걸릴 겁니다. 지금은 4.7mmHg입니다. 그동안 당신이 해야 할 일은 방금 첫 번째 캐니스터를 설치했던 것과 같은 방식으로 두 번째 지휘 모듈 캐니스터를 지휘관용 호스를 사용하여 설정하는 것입니다. 모든 설정이 완료되면 아마 전환할 시간이 될 겁니다. 참고로, 그 작업을 완료하고 아침 식사도 마치셨다면, 다음으로 제가 준비한 지휘 모듈 전환 설정 목록을 드리겠습니다. 이 목록
짐, 그거 꽤 방대하네요. 중간쯤 가면 
Фре
非常感谢你，布鲁斯。和
ठीक है। जब संचार बा
H
Looks like you've exceeded your 15 degrees offset attitude, so you can go to attitude H
मानक दहन दर 93 फीट/सेकंड है। हम
还有，休斯顿，水
はい...
휴스턴, 11번 관제탑입니다. 요청 사항이 있습니다. 서
Роджер, 11. Мы записываем показания о радиации. И мы рассматриваем... это выгля
कुछ नहीं। मैं सूट की सेटिंग को यहीं रखूंगा जब तक कि थोड़ी गर्मी न 
Apollo 8, Housto
휴스턴, 
제가 어떻게 할 건지 다시 한번 말씀드리겠습니다. 네, 다시 한번 다 말씀드릴게요. 패키지 밸브 압력 해제, 비상 객실 압력 해제, 직접 산소 공급 해제, 수요 조절기 
Roger. Je vous ai bien compris. Où en êtes-vous avec v
ヒューストンのアソシエイテッド社ハリー・ローゼンタールによる特集記事です。2歳のジェフリー・ラベルくんのクリスマスイブを、2人のサンタが明るく彩ります。1人目は玄関をノックしてプレゼントを持ってきました。2人目は月からお父さんを家まで送り届けました。1人目は赤い服と白いひげを生やし、「ホー、ホー」と叫び、その声は街の向こうまで聞こえました。2人目は月の裏で巨大なエンジンが炎を吐き出し、何千人もの人々がエンジン始動の知らせを待ちわびていました。「サンタクロースがいます」。エンジンがクリティカル噴射を完了してから15分後、無線沈黙から目覚めたアポロ8号から最初に届いた言葉は、不安な世界に告げるものでした。「これ以上のクリスマスプレゼントは期待していません」とミッションコントロールのケン・マッティングリーは語りました。「地上の皆様に感謝します。皆さんがいなければ、私たちは成し遂げられませんでした」と、宇宙船の船長フランク・ボーマン大佐は返事をしました。ちょうどその時、ミッションコントロールのコンソールの前にクリスマスツリーが灯り、ハリソン・シュミット宇宙飛行士が乗組員たちに「聖ニコラスの訪問」の宇宙版を読み上げました。「クリスマス前夜、はるか宇宙の彼方で、アポロ8号の乗組員が月面レースに勝利したばかりでした」と始まります。ミッションコントロールの乗組員は、ジェフリーの父親である海軍大佐ジェームズ・ラヴェル、空軍少佐ウィリアム・A・アンダース、そしてボーマン大佐が無事に帰還するまで、祝賀会を延期していました。例年のクリスマスイブであれば、宇宙飛行士の家族は教会でクリスマス礼拝に出席していたでしょうが、今年は皆テレビに釘付けでした。有人宇宙船センター周辺の家々は皆、飾り付けで飾られていました。ラヴェル家の周りの芝生や、彼が住んでいたティンバーコーブのコミュニティ全体に、メキシコ風のランタンが飾られ、ラヴェル家の4人の乗組員が3000メートル離れたところにやって来ました。大きな袋を背負った背の高いサンタクロースを乗せた車が到着しました。彼はドアまで駆け寄り、大きくノックした。ドアが開くと、1月14日に3歳になるジェフリー・ラベルが立っていた。ジェフリーはその光景に後ずさりした。母親が彼を抱き上げると、ジェフリーは怯えながら母親にしがみついた。「去
Roger. Indiquez-moi la température de votre cabin
Хорошо. Мы рекомендуем остановиться на 54°45'00", это должно обеспечить вам почти правильный угол крена. Рекомендуемое положение: крен 263°, тангаж 090°, рыскание 000°. Это позволит вам видеть Землю из окна номер 1 в командном модуле и разместить антенну с высоким коэффициентом усиления в окне для просмотра телевизора в удобное для
D'accord. Il y a une note ici qui indique d'utiliser la queue d'aronde située sur le dessus de la caméra, et non celle sur le côté. Utilisez la queue d'aronde du dessus de la caméra pour la fixer au support et placez l'écrou de blocage du support vers le bas, c'est-à-dire dans la direction de votre axe X
모든 자세가 아주 좋아 보입니다. 머리와 소파에 필기선이 
Верно. Мы получаем хорошие резул
أبولو 8، قبل أن تبدأوا العمل هنا، نود منكم إعادة ضبط ال
Es zieht jetzt vorbei, Bruce, aber ich habe die Gegend, von der du sp
おい、フレッド。ジョンが堤防を使えば分離できるって言ってるよ
حسنًا. سيقوم جيم بالتقاط صورة لنا من حجرة المعدات الس
दक्षिण की ओर। 
Credo di sì. Vediamo, la partecipazione alla stagione regolare è stata circa la metà. Questo include tutte le partite di esibizione. Il giornale dice che la media per le partite di campionato è stata di 
Ok, ti ​​
D'accord. Je vais vous dire o
わかりまし
— juste pour
D'accord. Depuis Jodrell Bank, en Angleterre, via AP: le grand radiotélescope britannique de Jodrell Bank a cessé de recevoir les signaux de la sonde lunaire soviétique Luna 15 à 5h49 EDT aujourd'hui. Un porte-parole a déclaré qu'il semblait que le vaisseau spatial Luna 15 « ait dépassé la Lune ». Autre citation: « Nous ne pensons pas qu'il ait atterri », a déclaré un porte-parole de Sir Bernard Lovell, directeur de l'observatoire. Washington UPI: le vice-président Spiro T. Agnew a appelé à envoyer un homme sur Mars d'ici l'an 2000, mais les dirigeants démocrates ont répondu que la priorité devait être donnée aux besoins terrestres. Agnew, haut responsable gouvernemental lors du décollage d'Apollo 11 mercredi, parlait apparemment en son nom propre et pas nécessairement au nom de l'administration Nixon lorsqu'il a déclaré: « À mon avis, nous devrions envoyer un homme sur Mars d'ici la fin de ce siècle. » Laredo, Texas, AP: les services d'immigration de Nuevo Laredo ont annoncé mercredi que les hippies se verraient refuser des cartes de tourisme pour entrer au Mexique à moins de prendre un bain et de se faire couper les cheveux. Huberto Cazaras, chef de l'immigration mexicaine à Nuevo Laredo, a déclaré que les autorités de Mexico, d'Acapulco et d'autres lieux touristiques populaires avaient reçu des plaintes concernant les hippies. Selon United Press International: La réaction initiale à la décision du président Nixon d'accorder un jour férié lundi aux fonctionnaires fédéraux pour célébrer la journée nationale de participation à la mission Apollo 11, qui a permis l'alunissage, fut surtout la surprise. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, Londres: L'Europe est fascinée par la mission Apollo 11. Les journaux du continent publient des photos de la fusée Saturn V décollant pour établir le premier lien entre la Terre et son satellite naturel. Les rédacteurs de titres rivalisent d'imagination pour trouver les mots justes pour saluer cet exploit. « La plus grande aventure de l'histoire de l'humanité a commencé », titrait le Figaro, qui consacrait quatre pages aux reportages de Cap Kennedy et aux schémas de la mission. Le tabloïd Paris Jour proclamait: « Le monde entier leur dit bravo! » Le quotidien communiste L'Humanité a fait sa une avec la photo du lancement et a consacré toute sa dernière page à un reportage enthousiaste sur la Lune, décrivant le compte à rebours et le lancement, les épouses et les familles des astronautes, et présentant les activités lunaires. Hempstead, New York: Joe Namath a officiellement rejoint le camp d'entraînement des Jets de New York à l'université Hofstra mercredi, après une réunion à huis clos avec ses coéquipiers concernant ses différends avec le commissaire de la NFL, Peter Rozelle. Londres (UPI): La Chambre des lords a reçu l'assurance mercredi qu'un sous-marin américain de poche ne causerait aucun dommage ni n'agresserait le monstre du Loch Ness. Lord Nomay a déclaré vouloir s'assurer que quiconque naviguant dans le Loch « ne soumettrait aucune créature susceptible de l'habiter à des dommages ou à des agressions ». Il a demandé que le plan du sous-marin, qui consiste à prélever un échantillon de tissu à l'aide d'une fléchette récupérable sur tout monstre trouvé, puisse être mis en œuvre sans dommage ni perturbation. On lui a répo
C'est exact; c'est pourquoi je les ai choisis. Ce sont deux caractéristiques très marquées, et ce sont deux très petits cratères, de tai
桑给巴尔，这里是
Okay. I guess everybody has pretty much envisioned the space program as being all a lot of exotic electronics, and, certainly, a lot of it is. But I thought I'd bring out a couple of items here in conjunction with th
هذا هو Gemini 4. يرجى ا
Okay. I guess the smallest object that you could pick o
Хорошо. Используйте наземную камеру на выдержках 1/250, 4, 5,6 и 8. Я довольно много снимал, охватывая два из этих значений в диапазоне 5,6 и 8. Я также снимал на 11, поэтому просто немного уменьшу выдержку. Луна там всё ещё такая большая и яркая, что у меня есть ощущение, что она, вероятно, находится в диапазоне f
J
... la vue est correcte en contrebas, mais on ne trouve pas un seul endroit à la surface qui ne soit pas... un angle d'incidence du soleil de 1 degré, c'est... c'est tout simplement un angle d'incidence du soleil médiocre
Roger. This is 30-minute report coming up. Have gone through head movements and I get no effect from that. Have gone through the reach test and have no problem with that at all. My orientation is good, vision is clear. My moving target, looking at a light spot back and forth causes no ill effects whatsoever. Running the light test at present time and all lights do check okay in the 
मुझे ब
روجر، فريد. أود أن أؤكد
알았어, 조. 이제 복사할 준비가 됐어
Houston, Eagle. Com
Roger. Wie bereits erwähnt, dient dies in erster Linie dazu, Ihren O2-Durchflussmesser zu überprüfen. Da wir jedoch noch etwa zwei Stunde
这里是休
Ehi, credo che la deriva dell'imbardat
Джим, мертвая зона и так хороша. Она сос
Okay
何かお預かりし
धन्य
Bien, le transfert d'alimentation a duré 57 heures et 11 minutes. Pour information, nous disposons d'une réserve d'énergie suffisante. Nous envisageons d'ailleurs une procédu
حسنًا. هذا كل ما يتعلق بالجدول الزمني يا فريد. الآن قائمة التحقق من الخطط البديلة، إن كانت في متن
Molto bene. Questa è l'edizione del 23 dicembre dell'Interstellar Times alla Paul Haney. Vorremmo informarti che mancano solo due giorni di shopping a Natale. Dice che la tua trasmissione televisiva di ieri è stata un vero successo. Mickey Herskowitz sta facendo un doppio lavoro per il Post. Ha scritto un paio di articoli sul tuo lancio, oltre alle sue altre rubriche sportive, e, Jim, tua madre ha sicuramente apprezzato gli auguri di compleanno. Ventuno detenuti sono evasi ieri da una prigione di New Orleans, e il Presidente Johnson è tornato a casa ieri sera dal Bethesda Naval Hospital dopo l'influenza. Vi manda un messaggio speciale, non su cosa fare per l'influenza, ma 
نعم. الآن؛ نعم، لقد انخفضت النسبة إلى حوالي 70 بالمائة يا جو، وك
Хорошо. Мы снова связались. Ваш голос слышен четко. Мы вас слышим. У нас здесь, на земле, проблема с передачей сигнала на удаленный о
まずはその宇宙空間をキャンセルしてください
まず
Je pensais qu'on serait assez près pour qu'une fois dehors, on puisse apercevoir son rebord, mais je n'y 
Oui. Nous avons constaté qu'il faisait plus chaud dans le cockpit au retour qu'à l'aller. Je me souviens qu'à l'aller, nous avions positionné manuellement la vanne à dix broches, mais nous contrôlions assez bien la température de 
잭, 절차를 시작하기 전에 말씀드리고 싶은 게 있습니다. A 배터리가 완전히 
알았어. 잘 가
Я тебя прекрасно слышу, Уолли. Как насчет стандар
Okay, Fred. Ich glaube, du hast es verstanden
Comment je fais pour contourner ça? J'ai 58 g et je ve
È affermativo; ecco perché li ho scelti. Sono entrambi... sono entrambi caratteristiche molto evidenti, e sono entrambi crateri molto piccoli, più o meno delle stesse dimensioni di quel
Ce qu'il me faut, c'est une valeur entre 0,3 et 0,5 sur ce truc, plus proche de 3. Je l'aurais,
Gemini 4, это Хьюстон
أعتقد أن لديك آلة طيران رائعة 
上昇フィードが閉じています。圧力は良好に保たれ
こんにちは
네, 프레드 씨. 레인징 기능이 잘 작동하고 있습니다. 이제 설정을 반대로 바꿔주세요. 레인징 기능을 끄고, 음성 기능을 낮추고, 음성 백업을 해제하고, 파워 앰프 회로 차단기를 끄세요. 잠시 후에 다시 연락
11,
は
بينما أنظر إلى الأرض من هذا العمق في الفضاء، ينتابني شعورٌ يُشبه شعور المسافرين على متن السفن الشراعية القديمة الذين اعتادوا الإبحار في رحلات طويلة بعيدًا عن ديارهم، والآن نحن عائدون، ويغمرني شعورٌ بالفخر بهذه الرحلة، ولكني في
En levant les yeux, je me retrouve maintenant en plein dans l'ombre, face à Buzz à la fenêtre. Je vois tout trè
रॉजर, 11. आपने अच्छी तरह से जानकारी दी। यह 12 घंटे के लिए निर्धारित ब्लॉक डेटा था। हम यहाँ उड़ान योजना अपडेट के माध्यम से आपको कुछ बातों की याद दिलाना चाहते हैं, जिन्हें आप अपनी सुविधानुसार कर सकते हैं और चाहें तो जल्दी सो सकते हैं। हमारे पास और कोई योजना नही
好
Verstehe ich das richtig, dass wir berech
Et si vous êtes d'humeur à recopier, j'a
好的，我们
Roger. Understand. Phase-Adjust 02 1
Oui. Ça a été vraiment
هيوستن، برج الدل
Eagle, Houston. Dopo OMNI, basso bit rat
いいえ。必ずしも露出した物質だとは言えません。一部の物質は焼かれたか、あるいは何らかの方法で凝集性を高め、もしかしたら何らかの形で流れ込んだのかもしれません。よく分かりませんが。さて、他の場所では、私たちが正面を踏みつけ始める前に、放射状に外側に向かって小さな浸食が起こっていたのがわかりましたが、表面には浸食されただけで、目立った痕跡は残っていませんでした。さて、スカートのすぐ下は違っていま
नमस्कार,
روجر
ठीक है। मेरे पास आपके लिए कुछ अ
ओह, हम पल्स मोड
On va reco
Wir hab
मुझे अपने सी-बैंड बीकन पर स्विच की स्थिति
ज
알겠습니다. 궤도 종료 시각은 
ठीक है। पैनल 16, पंक्ति 2, STAB नियंत्रण ATC
Rog. Non so bene quale sia stato il problema quando ci siamo avvicinati, ma ti dico una cosa: sono contento che abbia
Canton Com Tech, ici 
로저. 고도를 다
Okay. 13, Houston. Honeysuckle in about 30 sec
좋아요
J'ai bu énormément d'eau et j'ai encore soif. En 
Steh
收到，我是阿波罗8号，休
أرى بعض الأضواء تضيء على السحب
По моим оценкам, мы находимся примерно на 88
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, Houston
Roge
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Tra circa due minuti avremo il passaggio di consegne da H
Okay. Dies ist ein allgemeiner Hinweis, der sich auf Situationen bezieht, in denen Sie zwischen verschiedenen Befehlen wechseln. Vermeiden Sie es, währenddessen einen erweiterten Befehl (z. B. `and`) aufzurufen. Dieser Hinweis steht auch in den Programmhinweisen und dient lediglich als Erinnerung. Was passiert, wenn wir in einen erweiterten Befehl wie `and` oder `and` gelangen? Wir könnten in `and` hängen bleiben und den Vorgang wiederhol
क्या हमारी सारी
Подтверждаю. У нас надёжное радиолокационное прицеливание. Минутку, и я сообщу вам нашу 
Die Kamera ist verstaut. Das Photometer ist leicht genug, um es herauszunehmen und liegen zu lassen. Ich überprüfe hier noch einmal ein kleines Gerät, bevor wir Schluss machen. Der Wert ist um etwa eine Strichstärke gestiegen und liegt jetzt bei 0,06, also unter 0,1. Alle diese Teile kommen nun ins Handschuhfach; sie lagen vorher auf der Heckklappe, neben der Arretierungsfeder am nächsten zum Notentriegelungsgriff. Sie befinden sich in einer vertikalen Ebene parallel zu der Tasche mit den zusätzlichen Kleinigkeiten, die nicht woan
Apollo 13, Houston. Le transfert aura lieu dans une trentaine de secondes. Vous pourriez subir une brève interruption de servic
아폴로 8
Roger, 11. Siamo stati... sono appena stato indirizzato a un 
저희는 지금 
That's a Roger, Jim. What happens is, of course, we set - when you go out of detent, you reset the error needles and you - and you lose your attitude reference. You establish a new attitude reference, and it might not be the burn attitude since, a
31 मिनट। अब हमें बहुत सारे सितारे दिखाई दे
看起来，我想赋予它那种立体感的应该是地球反照光。我能比较清楚地看到第谷星——至少如果我的视线方向正确的话，我相信那是第谷星，在月光下——我是说，在地球反照光下。当然，我可以看到月亮周围的天空都
Affirmative Indian Cap Com, let me give you a report. I'm at 7,000 feet, the main chute is
5時
好了，杰克回来
Ok, Aquarius. I nostri dati di tracciamento mostrano che, dopo lo scarico di elio, il nostro ang
ジムさん、現地時間午前8時頃、サモアの南東約560マイルの海上に着水します。この海域の天気予報は良好です。風速1500m、波はまばらで、高波が立ち、視界は1
... says we won't need it anymore. The pressure will s
41 Minuten. Wir wechseln zum primären Scanner im Horizontscan, wobei kein nennenswerter Unterschied zwischen dem primären und 
TR
ええと。そんなにたくさんはないですね。ええと、まずはスポーツから始めましょう。どうせなら。アストロズは8対7で勝ち越し、ブレーブスは9回に5、6点取られましたが、なんとか勝ち進みました。そして、この日のもう一つの重要な試合は、カブスが雨で中止になりました。残りのスコアは全部持っていますので、もし欲しければ教えてください。マニラとルソン島の他の地域で地震がありました。3回の
好的。等你们找到两个人，可以搭建一个氢氧化锂装置的时候，我希望你们把材料准备好，
罗杰。请你让巴兹检查一下他的生物医学TM传感器，看看有没有松动或干涸的传感器？我们得到一个不稳定的心电图读
一つ興味深い点があります。最初の数回の録音では、使えないと思っていた低速の情報を聞きました。今ははっ
Ah, parfait. Je vous reçois parfaitement. Un, deu
Ok. Il contro
Роджер. Се
रॉजर. ΔV139. 15 55 47. 01 31 47. बाएँ 55° घुमाएँ. GMTRB 16 05 31.
حسنًا. ممتاز يا جو
ठीक है। हम 104 घंटे बाद (लगभग 20-18 घंटे बाद) बीच में सुधार करने पर विचार कर रहे हैं, और यह सुधार केवल 7 फीट प्रति सेकंड 
Роджер. А на той же странице, в разделе «Активация», выполните шаг 1; а на шаге 2 выполните строку но
حسناً يا هيوستن. لقد 
はい、わかりました。ちょっと待ってください。このハッチと整合性を確認させてください。何かお伝えできるかもしれません
夏威夷Cap Com，这里是Sigma Seven，收到你
20秒
还不错。我也
Das ist bestätigt. Wenn wir einen manuellen Start haben, müssen wir den Motor auch manuell abstellen. Um eine bessere, gesteuerte Abschaltung bei einer Restgeschwindigkeit von 30 Fuß pro Sekunde zu erreichen, möchten wir, dass Sie bei 40 Fuß pro Sekunde Gas geben. Die Beschleunigung ist dann im Rahmen, und wir sind zuversichtlich, dass wir so eine gute manuelle Abschalt
सुप्रभात, या शुभ दोपहर, या जो भी कहो। वह CON म
روجر، ا
やあ、ビル。
当然，这意味着 CDR
Oui. Je peu
No, la situazione, Jim, è che il tuo portello è buono quanto qualsiasi altro, ma non avremo la possibilità di verificarlo fino a molto tardi nel gioco, tipo un'ora prima dell'interfaccia di ingresso
Roger. Alles klar, kein Problem. 20 Fuß Abstand. Die Do
जिम, अगले एक-दो मिनट तक यहीं रुको, जब तक हम इसका मूल्यांकन नहीं कर ले
ऑरोरा सेवन, ऑरोरा सेवन, ऑरोरा सेवन। यह एचएफ और यूएचएफ
Ok, Vance. Siamo puntati a poca distanza dalla Luna. Jim sta tenendo la telecamera attraverso la finestra 3. Il Sole arriva a circa 40 gradi alla nostra sinistra, e quello che vi mostreremo tra un minuto sono circa 30 secondi di scarico di acque reflue e vi mos
Es sieht so aus, als gäbe es ein paar Wolken westlich der Sierra Nevada, et
Roger. Lorsque vous l'aurez reçu, nous aimerions que le numéro et la lettr
Ещё немного местных новостей: здание окружного суда в Хантсвилле сгорело вчера до рассвета, так что, похоже, там снова займутся строительством. Немного о семьях, ожидающих возвращения. Вот что написала Энн Джеймс, репортер газеты Post. «Мы отдыхаем на обратной стороне Луны», — сказала Валери Андерс в канун Рождества, ожидая, когда «Аполлон-8» покинет лунную орбиту и направится домой. Миссис Андерс была дома во вторник в 00 утра, и соседи только что собрали всех детей, чтобы семья могла отдохнуть, пока космический корабль находился за Луной и был вне зоны связи. Дом полковника Фрэнка Бормана был украшен четырьмя большими венками из вечнозеленых деревьев на улице, посыпан пушистым снегом и украшен красными бантами. Дерево в гостиной ждёт его благополучного возвращения, а его красивая светловолосая жена Сью и крепкие сыновья Фредерик и Эдвин планируют остаться дома до полуночного старта с лунной орбиты. Обычно они посещали полуночные службы в епископальной церкви Святого Христофора. Планировалось, что семья отправится туда в полночь. Поскольку в доме Борманов нет маленьких детей, дарение рождественских подарков просто отложится до возвращения полковника Бормана с его фантастическим праздничным подарком — полетом на Луну и обратно. Четверо детей Мэрилин Ловелл проведут совершенно обычное Рождество, как сообщила занятая жена капитана Ловелла; но говорить о подарках было невозможно, потому что двое из них сидели прямо рядом с ней. «У меня даже не было времени переодеться, в чем я была вчера вечером», — сказала миссис Ловелл. Однако подарки будут переданы взрослым, и рождественская елка останется на месте, когда Ловелл вернется домой. Вот
視界を遮る
روجر، لديّ تعليقان. أولهما: يتطلب إعا
Okay, Jack. Schalte A-4
ह्यूस
طالما أنك تقرأني جيدًا يا فرانك، سأطلعك على بعض الأمور. سنرسل لك تحديثًا لحالة النظام إلى الفتحة، ونود - كما هو مخطط - نقله إلى الفتحة بالضغط على زر الإدخال (Enter). نود تذك
Да, наверное. И я прервусь, если в G&N с
Roger, J
أبولو 8، هيوستن. ستكون جاهزة مع الصاروخين في غضون دقيقة ت
Ici Friendship Seven sur UHF. En survolant la zone de récupération, j'ai aperçu un sillage, ce qui semblait être un long sillage dans l'eau. J'imagine qu'il s'agit des navir
نعم
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Wir em
Gemini Net、Gemini Ne
Ebbene, il problema dell'acqua si è manifestato pri
Okay. After that, lock both rotation h
62970，减去 162，加上 129，加上 00966，加上 00552，减去 02079。接下来的三个都是零，NA，加上 00202 02358 022 02281 03 0407 317 013，向上 04.7，向右 3.9，加上 1418，减去 16505，加上 12904，加上 3
Wenn Sie bereit sind, würd
D'accord. Je suis actuellement en mode IMPULSION MINIMALE p
Rod Rose est assis dans la salle de vis
Roger. Typhoon Babe, G.m.t. 07:56, so
रॉजर। बर्न स्टेटस रिपोर्ट नीचे दी गई है। डेल्टा-टीआईजी शून्य, बर्न समय 557,... वीजीएक्स माइनस 0.1, वीजीवाई माइनस 0.1, वी
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Ich hatte damals noch nichts gesagt. Wir arbeiten gerade an einer Lösung. Bezüglich Ihrer vorherigen Frage zur Koordination der Schlafzyklen stimmen wir Ihnen zu. Wir möchten den Flugplan bezüglich der Schlafzyklen etc. bis zum Erreichen der Mondumlaufbahn wieder einhalten. Daher bitten wir Sie, selbst zu entscheiden, wie Sie die Schlafzyklen am effizientesten untereinander aufteilen. Bitte halten Sie uns auf dem Laufenden, wer welche Aufgaben übernimmt und welche Pläne Sie haben. Wir haben den um zwei Stunden verschobenen Termin. Wir möchten den anderen Termin noch ein
कृपया ध्यान दें, आप अपने कंप्यूटर और मात्रा पढ़ने वाले स्विच को बंद कर स
Genau das hat er getan. Tom meinte, du hättest gestern einen so langen Tag gehabt, dass er d
चार्ली, हमें यहाँ थोड़ा और काम करना है। हमें यह सुनिश्चित करना होगा कि सब कुछ हमारी इच्छानुसार व्यवस्थित और संग्रहीत हो जाए और कल के निर्धारित समय से थोड़ा आगे निकल सकें। मुझे 
罗杰，11。尼尔，你的信号有点断断续续的。信号很强，但偶尔会断断续续。从地面上看，你的飞船一切正常。我们注意到你在驾驶舱里走动，所以给你打了个电话。完毕
Cape recommande de redémarrer en mode manue
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 45%까지 떨어뜨렸고, 이제 멈추겠습니다. 동의하십
好的。你的意思是，如果你看猫爪，那大概就在它的中指
A Reno, in Nevada, poiché non c'è un camino in casa, un bambino ha scritto a Babbo Natale sul giornale locale e gli ha suggerito: "Per favore, potresti usare la porta 
네, 1
Как у нас обстоят дела с соблюдением сроков, кто-нибудь? Нил,
हे ह्यूस्टन, यह अंतिम चरण शायद बहुत लंबा लगा होगा। ऑटो टारगेटिंग हमें सीधे एक फुटबॉल मैदान के आकार के गड्ढे में ले जा रही थी, जिसके चारों ओर लगभग एक या दो गड्ढे के व्यास के दायरे में बड़ी संख्या में बड़े-बड़े पत्थर और चट्टानें थीं, और इसके लिए P66 में मैन्युअल रूप से उड़ान भरकर चट्टानी क्षेत्र के ऊ
了解。キャビンのベント
C'est exact. L'étape suivante consiste à régler le minuteur de mission. Pour l'instant, nous
अप
لا أصدق ذلك. درجة حرارة بذلتي 60 درجة، وأشعر براحة تامة. أنا متأكد من أنني كنت سأتعرق أكثر من ذلك لو كانت 
クラフト将軍は依然として自動車燃料について懸念を抱いています。自動車燃料の使用をできるだけ控え、逆噴射時間前にどうしても必要な場合を除き、自動車燃料は使用しないでください。また、インバーター熱交換器への流量を増やして温度を下げるのも有効
Хорошо. Подтверждаю. Итак, в общих чертах, нам нужно будет включить питание и запустить бильярдный шар, затем настроить ориентацию, установить датчик в переднее окно, и, конечно же, управление будет включено. Но вручную сориентируйте космический аппарат так, чтобы центр Земли находился то
È questo 
发射！发射
私たちも本当に楽しかったです
프렌드
了解しました。プラス00523とプラス11710を理解しました。ありがとう
여기는 텍사스 캡콤, 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 재진입 과정 전체에 걸쳐 레트로패키지를 계속 장착해 두시는 것을 권장합니다. 즉, 0.05g 스위치 작동을 수동으로 제어해야 한다는 뜻입니다. 또한, 
Apollo 8, Houston. The voice quality on your tape was just fair-to-middling; we were able to monitor your burn and hear most of that pre
さあ、始めましょう。アポロ11号の飛行への関心は依然として高い水準にありますが、ヒューストン地域では散水規制の緩和が大きな関心事となっています。ルイ・ウェルチ市長は、雨が降り続ければ芝生への散水規制を解除すると約束しています。金曜日は一部曇りで、午後には雷雨の可能性が30%あります。ワシントンD.C.では、上院財政委員会が所得税追加税の延長を承認しましたが、上院での法案採決
稍等。情况看起来不错。我这就
Roger. Die RAD-OUT-Temperatur von Brennstoffzelle 2 liegt b
Bene. Al punto 5 di E-11, c'è... 
네, 질문은 "라인에 ASCENT BATTERY BAT 6이 하나만 연결되어 있어야 한다"는 것이고, 바로 이어서 DESCENT BAT 4개를 끄
Okay. s, you got three, RATE 2? O
روج
알겠습니다. 자이로스코프는 일반, 자동, 케이지 모드가 있습니다. 전원을 켜고... 아니, 전원을 켜고 플라이바이와이어 모드로 전환하겠습니다. 지금 AC 버스를 모니터링하고 있는데,
ठीक ह
Roger, Houston. Die beiden Schut
ठीक है। रवैया; पैमाना, 5/5;, 1 चुनें; स्रोत। हे, जो, तुम बस उन वाक्यों को पढ़ो जिनमें ब
Хорошо. Просто хотел уточнить — у нас был плохой прием, когда я разговаривал с вами раньше — я хотел убедиться, что вы понимаете, что проверка Солнца, которую вы провели ранее, была верной, и именно на этом мы и основываемся. Все, что мы вам говорили раньше о наблюдении за Солнцем в левом переднем окне или за звезд
最後のロールで、赤ランプがロールの終わりに点灯し
Ok. Restiamo
في أعلى الصفحة، ستجد الخطوة 38، وأسفلها مباشرةً، قبل الخطوة 39، نريد تفعيل دائرة الجليكول الأساسية. ما نفعله هو ضبط مفتاح ماء مبخر الجليكول على الوضع التلقائي، ومفتاح ضغط بخار مبخر الجليكول على الوضع التلقائي أيضًا. سيؤدي هذا إلى تشغيل غلاية الماء 
حسنًا يا جيم. نحن نناقش هذا الأمر مع
Роджер, Базз. Нынешнее положение дел — у
Grazie, Signor Presidente. È un grande onore e privilegio per noi essere qui a rappresentare non solo gli Stati Uniti, ma anche gli uomini di pace di tutte le nazioni, con interesse, curiosità e una visione per il futuro. È un onore per noi poter partecipar
分かりました、ジャック。18ページにもう一つ質問があります。1分あたりで、MASTER ARM ONについては同意しますが、なぜABORT STAGEブレーカーをオンにする必要がある
Да, в Далласе плачут. Результаты баскетбольных матчей: Хьюстон в эти выходные выступил не очень хорошо. Иллинойс обыграл Хьюстон со счетом 97:84. А Северная Каролина взяла верх над «Совами». Счет был 85:77. Фрэнк, в газете было несколько слов об «Ойлерз». «Ойлерз» признали Джорджа Вебстера самым ценным игроком, и хотя Хьюстон в этом году никого не включил
收到。我最好再解释一下舱内模式。我的意思是，您可以继续保持舱内模式。戴头盔和手套是您的自愿选择。我们完全不担心二氧化碳排放
È uscito a 15 metri dalle mie IVI. Ora mi farai un segno s
알겠습니다, 밴스. 
ठीक है, NOUN 01, एंटर; 3011, एंटर; 44, एंटर। अब, 
حسنًا. سنتحقق من وصلة الإرسال هذه عبر الصوت. كان الإرسال على التلفزيون - نود الحصول على إشارة لمدة 10 دقائق تقريبًا في غولدستون حتى نتمكن من فحص جودة الكاميرا هنا في هيوستن لمدة 10 دقائق تقريبًا عندما يعيدون توصيلها بنا. ما كنا نقوله هو أنه يمكنك اختيار التصوير الداخلي أو الخارجي بالكاميرا. بالنسبة للقطات الخارجية، نود أن ننظر إلى
ठीक है। बहुत दिलचस्प। हम पता लगाने की कोशिश करेंगे कि यह आपके सापेक्ष कहाँ है। वे हम पर S-IV के प्रभाव के बारे में थोड़ी-थोड़ी जानकारी अपडेट करते रहते हैं। हमारा आखिरी अनुमान यह
ダーバン灯台の様子を確認するためにカメラをしまっておきます。フレアがうまく撮
Now, let me go through this checklist in an orderly 
Intelsat ist ein internationales Kommunikationskonsortium aus 63 Nationen und stellt eine Übersicht des ersten globalen Kommunikationsnetzwerks bereit. Der neue Satellit soll am
Hatten
Eagle, Houston. We would like you to zero, as calle
और आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, जब आप अगली बार आ
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। अगर आपको समझ नहीं आया, बज़, तो पैड पर यह पढ़ना अच्छा रहा। हमारे पास आपके लिए घड़ी का अपडेट है जो हम साइट पर अपलोड ह
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, Hawa
...работают очень хорошо, но я не думаю, что он кого-либо умеет читать. Поэтому мне придется передать информацию. Оружие работает отлично. Он смог мане
カナリア、私の現在の軌道は？
Immer wenn ich 
ठीक है। हम 2 मिनट के लिए प
Roger. Das wirst du immer wieder sagen müssen. Eure Trennung v
好了，开始吧。主控、主控、高、语音、（咳嗽）PCM、范围、向下语音备份、辅助磁带、关闭；遥测转数据；向上时间命令转正常；VHF A 和 B、关闭；仅接收……；PCM/模拟、录音、转发、正常、正常——没问题，低——主控、重新响应、
……理解，手动偏
- - five balls, plus 0.0, and I call it 0.8, it was
Okay. Picking up with T 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225, Shaula, up 236 000, plus 0813 m
Ciao
E, 11, Ho
我安装了防溅帘和颈部挡板，舱内空气循环手柄向上。左侧呼吸管手柄向上，舱内通风手柄向上。舱门释放扳机处于关闭状态。确认水封已向下并关闭。系好安全绳，打开左侧舱门。将指挥官飞行员的救生装备收纳到飞船右侧。整个回收环……都在飞船右侧。你要做的就是带着你的救生包移动到左
了解しました。あなたのシステムでは、酸化剤は75度、燃料は74度、バルブは
收到。我
रॉजर। मित्र
र
わかった、ジャック
Roger. Le coussin d'atterrissage était déjà décollé. Je l'ai remarqué en premier et je l'ai signalé. Le mode manuel est désa
待機してください、ジャ
Ed, hier spricht Houston CAP COM. Ich kann Sie nicht lesen –
こちらフレンドシッ
ठीक है। यह अभी भी पृष्ठ 30 पर, बाईं ओर है। समय वाले भाग में - बाईं ओर 
ठीक है। हमारे आंकड़े अच्छे दिख रहे हैं। हाँ, हम थोड़ा करीब हैं,
Roger. Ci proverò. Ho il pallone che si scarica a intermittenza e non riesc
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 오늘 밤 올스타전을 중계해 드리려고 했지만 비 때문에 취소되었습니
حسنًا. أفهم من كلامك أنه إذا لم 
Right. I was having to actually manipulate the gain dogs on the hatch each time that I stroked it, so that I wasn't able to pull as hard as I usually had been able to. So we had to coordinate ourselves and where I would strok
Roger. Nous attendions une autorisation de type 1 d'Aero-Med. Pourriez-vous insérer l
이것은 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 제어 점검은 마치 시계처럼 정확하게 진행되
Houston, Columbia. Also my VHF ranging is not working now, and I'd like to know whe
컬럼비아, 휴스턴. P76 PAD, 복사할 준비가 되셨나요? 
Columbia, Houston. Nous vous communiquerons une mise à jour sur la situation des vecteurs de transmission un pe
Джим, почему бы тебе не надеть на него наушник
...так что, как видите, те же данные, которые доктор Берри получил обо м
روجر. نريد التحدث معك بشأن ذلك. مايك، يمكننا - حسب رغبتك - القيام بذلك بأي طريقة. إما أن ندعك تقوم بذلك في عملية الإلقاء - تصحيح، أو ي
Okay. Wir sind bereit, Ihnen die Vorgehensweise zu erklären, die Ihren Computer etwas ausbremsen wird. Danach können wir Ihnen vielleic
Ich kann derzeit eine Rollbewegung nach rechts von etwa 5 Grad erkennen und habe bemerkt, dass das Periskop dunkel ist, was bedeutet, dass wir uns im dunklen Bereich befinden. Ich werde versuchen, die Veränderungen durch das Periskop zu beobachten. Momentan kann ich durch das Periskop nichts für Nachtbeobachtungen sehen, zumindest nicht in dieser Position. Ich bin mir nicht einmal sicher, wann ich die geringe Vergrößerung eingestellt habe, außer der Position des Hebels. Das Fenster ist be
Sigma Seven，Sigm
嘿，就是这样。顺便
Pour déployer manuellement le LR Cube, le petit ressort situé au bout de la corde se détache de la tête du médiator. Cependant, j'ai réussi à atteindre la tête du médiator et à le dégager. Il sera donc égalemen
ما هو الضغط
查理，
フレンドシップ・セブン、フレンドシップ・セブン。こちらはHF・UHF
Роджер. 40 2711 398 033, вниз 043, влево 23, плюс 0832 минус 16500 12956 36208; северная группа звезд остается Сириусом и Ригелем; углы крена, тангажа и рыскания остаются прежними: 129 155 010, пустое пространство остается двумя квадратами в течение 20 секунд
Роджер. Проблемы, с которыми вы столкнулись, вызваны каким-то неизвестным источником, вероятно, нагрузкой на вашу цапфовую ячейку, угол наклона которой сейчас составляет 91°, что не соответствует вашему истинному углу наклона. Однако мы считаем, что эта проблема с нагрузкой никак не влияет на надежность вашей оптики. Мы полагаем, что лучший способ обойти эту проблему — сначала перевести переключатель OPTICS ZERO в положение ВЫКЛ, а затем в положение ВКЛ перед использованием оптики. Думаю, после этой процедуры у вас больше не будет пробл
Du lebst noch
هذه هي الطريقة التي يريدونك أن تتبعها. إنهم يريدون معرفة ما إذا كان هناك أي تغيير في ن
我觉得这不会是
D
好的。面板 5：断路器 E
로저, 빌. 여기 네가 좋아하는 음악이 담긴 테이프가 몇 개 있는데, S-밴드에 대한 뒷이야기 좀 들어볼래
Roger. Sehr 
مرحباً يا بيل. إذا ك
Bien reçu. Allez-y, envoyez-le. Sachez que je n'ai pas de lune actuellement. L'horizon est parfaitement visible depuis ma position actuell
Right. Okay. Next for the command module pictures, it may be a little hard to see the service module from the command module, but if you can see it, it will be through window 5, people down here think. Recommend for that the 70-millimeter. These photos h
روجر، ١١. كانت قراءة جيدة. هذه هي بيانات الكتلة المجدولة لمدة ١٢ 
إذا استطعت إقناع الناس بنشر إحدى تلك اللافتات حول المنطقة ال
Roger. Stiamo discutendo di que
휴스턴, 물병
あなたのTRはカウントアップしています。私たちのTRはカウントダウン
로저, 마이크. 분
Roger, Jim. Veuillez activer votre fonction de lecture des quantités pendant environ 15 secondes
水瓶座，休斯顿。我们想把之前给你的偏航脉冲数从 21 次
Роджер. Мы на некоторое время потеряли с 
真ん中にあるク
Apollo 
حسنًا. ذهبت
こちらフレンドシップセブンです。いい質問ですね。私も知りたいです。これらのエラーは飛行中ずっと断続的に発生していました。ジャイロをケージしたり、再びケージしたり、ケージした
Bene. Bene. Sul pannello 276: interruttore automatico CO
Sì, lo s
Okay. Sie haben OMNI Bravo und wir 
Roger. Now you want to check out the primary evaporat
Wir möchten gerne wissen, wie Ihre Pläne für h
Okay. Ich lese es hier nochmal vor… Reihenfolge… STROM, AUS. NUMERISCHE BELEUCHTUNG, FLUTBELEUCHTUNG und INTEGRIERTE BELEUCHTUNG, alle drei, AUS. Bedienfeld 101, URINENTSORGUNGSHEIZUNGEN, URINENTSORGUNG AUS, ABWASSER AUS. Bedienfeld 122, KONTROLLEU
Ich kann dich nicht hören, B
Ricevuto. Qui tutto è a posto. Il Pilota di Comando sta dormendo p
Тогда мы даже не будем исследовать звезду 22, если только не сможем найти звезду 26 на ближайшем гори
Eagle – Eagle, Houston. Wir haben verstanden. Gibt es einen Fl
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。如果你愿意使用高比特率，我们会把录音机送回你的指
रॉजर। चंद्रमा की हमारी यह यात्रा आपको शायद सरल या आसान लगी हो। मैं आपको आश्वस्त करना चाहता हूँ कि ऐसा बिल्कुल नहीं था। जिस सैटर्न वी रॉकेट ने हमें कक्षा में पहुँचाया, वह एक अविश्वसनीय रूप से जटिल मशीन है, जिसका हर एक पुर्जा त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता है। मेरे सिर के ऊपर स्थित इस कंप्यूटर में 38,000 शब्दों की शब्दावली है, जिनमें से प्रत्येक शब्द को हमारे, यानी चालक दल के लिए अत्यंत महत्वपूर्ण होने के लिए बहुत सावधानी से चुना गया है। मेरे हाथ में जो स्विच है, उसके कमांड मॉड्यूल में ही 300 से अधिक समकक्ष हैं, इस एक स्विच डिज़ाइन में ही। इसके अलावा, असंख्य सर्किट ब्रेकर, लीवर, रॉड और अन्य संबंधित नियंत्रण उपकरण भी हैं। हमारे सर्विस मॉड्यूल के पिछले हिस्से में स्थित हमारा विशाल रॉकेट इंजन त्रुटिहीन रूप से कार्य करता रहा होगा, अन्यथा हम चंद्र कक्षा में ही फँस जाते। मेरे सिर के ऊपर लगे पैराशूट को कल भी पूरी तरह से काम करना होगा, अन्यथा हम समुद्र में गिर जाएँगे। हमें हमेशा से विश्वास रहा है कि यह सभी उपकरण काम करेंगे, और ठीक से काम करेंगे, और हमें शेष उड़ान के दौरान भी यही विश्वास बना हुआ है। यह सब कुछ कई लोगों के खून-पसीने और अथक परिश्रम से ही संभव हो पाया है। सबसे पहले, कारखाने में इन मशीनों को जोड़ने वाले अमेरिकी कामगार। दूसरे, असेंबली और उसके बाद के पुनः परीक्षण के दौरान विभिन्न परीक्षण टीमों द्वारा किया गया अथक परिश्रम। और अंत में, मानवयुक्त अंतरिक्ष यान केंद्र के
Das ist bestätigt. Jim, nur zur Information: Die verstrichene Zeit beträgt vorläufig 67 + 40 Minuten, also ungefähr 2 Stunden. Wir senden Ihnen
Okay, wir notieren den Zeitpunkt, zu dem das erledigt war. Sie haben zwei Listen: eine für den Gerätetransfer und die zweite für den umgekehrten Vorgang. Bitte streichen Sie den let
Friendship Seve
ठीक है। अब मैं आपको बताता हूँ कि हम क्या करने वाले हैं, क्योंकि हमने आज दोपहर इस सुरंग के बारे में एक अलग कहानी बताई थी। 
Roger, 
هيوستن، أبولو 8. هل تريدون منا أن نتحرك إلى وضعية معينة لإلقاء الماء،
了解。10、/: 45597、マイナス040、プラス157、プラス35186、マイナス01512、マイナス00520 180 007 000、11月のアルファ星、プラス00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253。さそり座デルタ星、下069、左45、プラス0748、マイナス16500 12994 36300。主星シリウス、副星リゲル、129 155 010。4つの四重連星、15秒、アレージ。地平線はTマイナス3の3.2度ウィンドウライン上。マイ
Hou
ठीक है, जैक। आपको याद होगा कि पहले सभी ने चंद्रमा अस्त होने से कुछ मिनट पहले उसे देखने की बात कही है, और जब आप वहाँ पहुँचेंगे तब तक क्षितिज शायद अँधेरा होगा; आप सुबह जल्दी प्रवेश कर रहे हैं; और पश्चिम से आने पर भी आपको अँधेरा क्षितिज ही दिखाई देगा। तो, एक बैकअप तकनीक के तौर पर, जैसे आप क्षितिज को ट्रैक करते हैं, हम आपको एक एटीट्यूड देंगे जो पैड पर होगा ताकि आप सीधे चंद्रमा को देख सकें। यह एक इनर्शियल एटीट्यूड है; यह बदलेगा नहीं, और आप 36-डिग्री विंडो लाइन को चंद्रमा पर रखेंगे, और फिर बस वहीं बैठकर उसे देखेंगे। और ठीक पहले, पृथ्वी ऊपर आएगी और उसे ढक लेगी, और तब आपको क्षि
Роджер, Игл. Представляю вам PAD: 101 36 14.07, минус 00758, плюс все шары, плюс 00098 плюс - поправка, 00572, перигей плюс 00085 00764 030 000 293. СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 86, минус 00759, плюс все шары, плюс 00090. Остальная часть PAD — нет данных. Подождит
On peut voir le nom
Хорошо. Сейчас
阿
Okay. We started maneuvering to. We are getting kind of far
Okay, Vance. Register 1 wil
الرقم 41 14.9، 49.78، 
E noterete che per quanto riguarda l'attività del pitch thruster, ho ancora... ho inserito una dozzina di impulsi minimi in pitch down, e 
हाँ, यह तो बहुत सीधा-सादा है। ठीक
Понял. Будьте на связи. Мы копируем звёзды, котор
أعتقد أننا م
좋아요. 그런데 믿기지 않겠지만, 북부 팀이 남부 팀을 3대 0으로 이겼는데, 그것도 1쿼터에
地面上的一切看
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。かなり弱いようです。状態ベクトル情報を繰り返し
分かりました。ありがとうござい
Okay, der Mond bei minus 
Sembra che durante la nostra fase di spegnimento (illeggibile) consumiamo ancora poco meno di 11 ampere. Ne abbiamo 10 sul n. 1 e poco meno di 11 sul n. 2. Il cavo di sicurezza, la posizione del cavo o del cordone ombelicale sul portello e
빌, 창문에서 눈을 떼실 수 
روجر. بدا أن جهاز دلتا يعمل بشكل صحيح. بدا لنا أن وقت الاحتراق أطول بحوالي ثانيتين، 517. كانت قراءة VGX هي 95485 عندما حصلنا عليه. كان الوضع طبيعيًا. كانت قراءة VI هي 35452 عند القطع، وH-dot هي 04552، وH هي 01791. كانت C على -20.6
نعم. نعتقد أن الأمر ضمن الحدود الطبيعية يا
حسنًا. سأعاود المحاولة. فحص الانحراف سليم. يمكنني رصد الانحراف بشكل جيد في المنظار. الشاشة مختلفة قليلًا عم
Okay. I'll tell Jack to check that the CM/RCS HEATER switch is of
I don't think it's any great big deal, because the antenna switching is not hard at all and the ... is required to
حسنًا، شكرًا لك، لقد انتهيت. من المفترض أن أقوم بفحص معدل الأكسجين المرتفع. 
كواد دلتا ٢٤٥، ٨١ بال
Imbardata a sinistra di 13
نشعر بأننا مضطرون لاستخدامها. المكاسب ليست جيدة جدًا في الميل والدوران في هذا التكوين. ستحافظ على ثباتها ف
Roger, compris. D'après le plan de vol, vous devriez passer en mode FBW maint
罗杰，你的 48-1 的
네. 기억하시겠지만, 저는 처음에 TV 카메라가 있던 분화구 쪽에서 시작해서 표면의 암석 샘플을 여러 개 채취했고, 분
Roger. Jim, continuez à pomper
Check. 27 20, Char
收到。它应该完全打开，之后就可以一直开着了。目的是彻底释放氧
और आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, ह्यूस्टन, जब खिड़की नंबर 5 पर सूरज की रोशनी पड़त
无法通过 MDIU 发送
रॉजर, माइक। ऐसा लगता है कि अगर हम इस जेटिसन टाइम को आगे बढ़ाते हैं और आपको नया लोड देते हैं, तो इसके लिए एक नए दृष्टिकोण की आवश्यकता होगी, और हम पहले से ही बंद किए गए काम के कारण ऐसा नहीं कर सकते, और इससे हमें हर तरफ से परेशानी होगी और हमारा संचार टूट जाएगा। हम लगभग 10 मिनट में इसे अलग करने की सोच रहे हैं। हम प्रक्षेप पथ देख रहे हैं और कुछ ही देर में आपसे संप
Vous av
ठीक 
좋아. "크리스마스 이브
Aquarius さん、当初
짐, 지금 그 문제를 논의 중인데, 추적 정보를 기다려 봐야 할 것 같습니다. 일단은, 당신이 그 근처에 계시니 굳이 지나칠 필요는 없겠죠. 하지만 추적 정보를 계속 확인해서 조만간 방법을 찾을 수 있을 
收到。57-2 区 86. 1+49. 07 42 52. 7+12. 11+52. 58-2 区 94. 1+59. 09 16 42. 5+49. 10+41. 58-BRAVO 区分段燃烧，55 号
जी हां, जैक, और इसी क
私たちの...を立ち
零重力状态下的感觉太棒了。这是我第一次穿这套宇航服，感觉非常
Okay. Just below 13. And just for your information, we've got people working on several subjects. We're working on the midcourse coming up to determine our control system and how to do it with the control system we select, what we should do about the alinement. We've got the LMS and a couple of crews cranked up working on that. And we're 
Хорошо. PC плюс 2; плюс 0819.2, минус 0020.0, минус 0218.9; NA; плюс 0020.9, 0848.2; 420, 274, 082; плюс 0820.3, минус 0020.0, минус 0215.0; остальное N/A. В примечаниях: заполнение, два жиклера 10 секунд; вес 62480; вес 33576. Профиль дросс
... حسنًا، هيوستن؛ برج ا
Okay. Das ist in Ordnung, 
روجر. أعتقد أننا فهمنا أن العمق الذي وصل إلى 3 بوصات لم يصطدم بأي طبقة صلبة، ولم تُلاحظ أي تغييرات
Что... чего мы зд
Genau. Ich – ich habe noch nichts eingegeben – ich habe es dem Computer kurz zurückgegeben. Ich habe den Modusschalter von MANUELL zurückgestellt, während ich mit dem
Roger. Drei Kugeln weniger, 24. Und Sie k
그건 샌본
Le problème
Volevo sapere cos'è un test di sequ
제미니 6호, 카나본 CAP COM입니다. 곧 
Ici Friendship Seven. Les gyroscopes sont de nouveau opérationnels, retour à l'attitude orbi
E disattiveremo la parte della sottoportante vocale del nostro uplink verso di te per non disturbarti mentre parlia
Роджер, эта страница — NC-7. Я перечитаю её ещё раз. Затем перейдите к контролю долготы без процедуры связи, страница NC-7. Средняя скорость 400k, V 400K, для контрольных карт коридора состав
فريد، بعد انتهاء عملية الحرق، سنرسل إليك تعليمات إيقاف التشغيل أو التغييرات في قائمة التحقق. في الوقت نفسه، نود أن نطلعك على حالة المواد الاستهلاكية. كل ما يمكنني قوله الآن هو أننا نعتقد أن حالتك جيدة إلى حد مع
Sag das nochmal, 
Das arme LM ist verunreinigt; es ist voller Urinpartikel; und im Licht sehen sie gelb aus. Weißt du, diese kleinen – ich schätze, es ist jetzt etwas fest, alles andere ist verdampft und es ist etwas fester 
여기는 휴스턴입니다. 로저. 감
Ok, meno 55 m
哦
分かりました。いつ彼に電話したらいいか
Gemin
Roger. Stavo giusto registrando qualcosa. L'unica cosa insolita che ho notato è uno strato di foschia piuttosto alto, che sembrerebbe essere di circa 7 o 8 gradi sopra l'orizzonte sul lato notturno. Riesco a vedere le stelle attraverso di esso mentre scendono verso l'orizzonte reale, ma è una singola banda o strato molto visibile, piuttosto al di sopra dell'orizzonte norm
D'accord
友谊七号，我们注意到地面51区段显示“着陆气囊展开”的指示。我们怀疑这是个错误信号。不过，Cape公司希望您能将着陆气囊开关调
是的。我试着把它放飞到他们车
Et Mme Robert Goddard a déclaré aujourd'hui que son mari aurait été si heureux. « Il n'aurait pas crié, rien. Il aurai
Чт
Das ist bestätigt. Der Grund, warum wir die Logik abschalten, Jack, ist die Energieeinsparung. Wir schalten sie also aus, und i
Roger. GET of acquisition 3 plus 07; GET of R = 248 nm; GET rendezvous, 3 plus 15; azimuth, 0 degrees; elevation,
원하시면 (복구 영역)
I want to go up this way to get away from that - the radios ar
That's roughly correct, Jim. Jack will coarse aline at that attitude. This is what we're having you maneuver to the - to that attitude for. We're going to compute coarse aline gimbal angles and pass them up to him, and the first thing he'll do when he gets there, per his checklist, 
로저, 브루스. 감사합니다. TV 방송이 나올 예정입니다. 모든 연결은 완료됐습니다. 아직 켜지는 않았지만, 지금 바로 
Die Restwerte beim Brennen betrugen 80 – alle waren Null. 81 bei einem Zehntel 
D'accord. Nous vous 
Okay, Apollo 8. All the systems - giving a quick look around the room - look real fine. You've got an quad update on the quantity, so you have that information. The oxidizer feed-line temperature and the fuel temperature are both at 73 degrees. The cryo pro
لدينا بعض الإجراءات قيد التنفيذ، وق
Ricevuto. Ti sto seguendo. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; meno 061, più 067 135 23 4149;, più 32020, più 06713, meno 02773 181 054 013;, HA è NA, più 00230 32833 228, DELTA VC 32625 24 1510 355. Le tre linee successive sono NA. più 1103, meno - meno 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52. Le stelle che hai impostato sono Deneb e Vega, 242 172 012. Ci piacerebbe avere due jet ullage a 16 sec
弗雷德，闯进来。你太弱了。如果巴兹或尼尔在这里，你想问问他们是否用那盏灯做了什么
卡纳
روجر، سأعطيك إعداداتي. أنا في وضع التحكم التلقائي، وضع التحكم الرجعي؛ الجيرو
... Nun ja, nicht wirklich –
好的。四个加热器将关闭；显示器打开；S波段天线关闭；摄像机序列打开；显示器打开；直流母线电压关闭；逆变器2打开；上升ECA关闭，但上升ECA控制打开；下降ECA关闭；下降ECA控制关闭；月面母线连接
分かりました。ジャックが通信中、ここのドッキングウィンドウから外を見ていたら、サービスモジュールからまた大量の粒子が噴出しているのが見え
Wir wollen versuchen, die Plattf
L'umidità relativa della cabina indica il 20%. La quantità di refrigerante è del 66%. La temperatura della tuta è di 68 gradi, la pressione indicata è di 5,8, la temperatura del vapore è di 50 gradi nel circuito della tuta ed è confortevole. L'ossigeno è a 65-100 ampere, la co
Nous disposons désormais d'un
알겠습니다. 메모에 저희 목소리가 들리셔야 한다고 적혀 있습니다. 몇 분 안에 목소리가 안 들리면 16번 패널의 파워 앰프 회로 차단
继续燃烧。坚持
通用卡夫公司仍然对汽车燃料有些担忧。尽量少用汽车燃料；除非在追溯期之前迫不得已，否则不要使用汽车燃料。我认为或许可以增加逆变器热交换器的流量来
لقد قمتُ للتو بتصوير الهدف 16-أ. إنه مطار البصرة، ويقع مباشرةً على الخليج العربي. التقطتُ صورةً للخليج العربي بزاوية 30 درجة تقريبًا، ثم خفضتُ مقدمة الطائرة والتقطتُ صورةً للبحيرة الواقعة شمال غرب الخليج. وبما أن البصرة تقع على البحيرات، وقريبة جدًا منها، يُمكنك ببساطة متابعة الطائرة والتقاط صورة للمطار مباشرةً. لذا، تمكنتُ من تصوير المطار قبل الوصول إلى الهدف بمسافة لا بأس بها، ثم بدأتُ بتتبعه. في الواقع، كنتُ على الهدف عندما كنتُ لا أزال على بُعد 20 درجة تقريبًا من الوضع العمودي، على ما أعتقد، وتابعتُ التتبع من المدرج حتى وصلتُ إلى نقطة 40 درجة تقريبًا بعده، ثم توقفتُ عن التتبع. كنتُ أستخدم عدسة 75 مم على كاميرا 16 مم مع محول لالتقا
Yes, I think you're right. Boy, you can really see the slumping, though. Most of the - You can see where it's all gathered down in the bottom in the corner; you know, on the edge -
هذا
Хорошо. Я буду готов. Пр
أوه، ليس جيدًا جدًا يا جاك؛ أقترح أن ننتقل إلى قاطع دائرة مكبر الطاقة الداخل ومفتاح الوظيفة إ
हां। म
Roger. Je répète, plus 00185
مرحباً يا جون. ل
روجر، كولومبيا. ما زلنا بحاجة إلى إنهاء عملية الإرسال الخاصة بك هناك، وبعد ذلك سأحصل على أوق
Und, Fred, wir kommen mit unserem Wasser
Questo piccolo registratore è stato di grande aiuto, ci ha aiutato a trasco
Apoll
스포츠 소식을 살펴볼까요? 여러분이 바쁘셨던 며칠 전, 조 네이머스와 미식축구 커미셔너 피트 로젤은 "브로드웨이 조" 네이머스가 자신이 소유한 배첼러스 III 레스토랑 지분을 매각하고 뉴욕 제츠에 합류하기로 합의했다고 발표했습니다. 네이머스는 오늘 제츠 훈련 캠프에 도착해 첫 훈련을 소화했습니다. 네이머스와 함께 훈련에 불참했던 다른 제츠 선수들도 합류했습니다. 그리고 미시간주 잭슨 출신의 데이비 힐은 지난주에 출전한 세 번의 메이저 대회에서 모두 우승을 차지하며 세 번째 메이저 골프 대회 우승이라는 쾌거를 달성했습니다. 그는 필라델피아 클래식에서 우승을
Sigma Seven. Woomera Cap Com. Hast du gesagt, du wür
Оно отдаляется. Мы его
हम मैन्युअल तरीके से इस समस्
मैं ओम्नी ब्रावो हूं, 
أبولو 8، هيوستن مع تحديث
케이프 콤 테크. 시그마 세븐. UHF 중계는
Okay, Vance..., più 0833.0, meno 0050.9, meno 0213.9, N/D, più 00205, 08615, 4:24, 272, 081 e il resto N/D. Ulage due getti 10 secondi, peso 62480, peso 33452, profilo dell'acceleratore come prima, 5 secondi, 40 perc
我们刚刚完成；继续
В воздухе плавают довольно крупные обломки. План полета составлен. Гироскопы отключатся в 12:33, и я буду использовать систему управления по проводам, чтобы отслеживать ускоритель. Я... это не очень хорошая задача на отслеживание. Наши скорости слишком близки к одинаковым. Я размещу его в центре правого окна, плюс. Я точно в центре — чу
Roger. Tout d'abord, Frank, les gars ici aux consoles tiennent à vous féliciter pour le magnifique tra
아니요. 감사
Roger. My status is good; the capsule status is good; my control mode is automatic; gyros are normal; maneuver is off. Control fuel is 51 [percent] and 69 [percent]; oxygen is 82 [percent] and 100 [percent]
Gemelli VI, passiamo a VII per qualche minuto. Torneremo presto con voi, probabilmente avremo un aggiornamento per v
Gemelli 4, Guaymas. Posso darti un voto a TR+
Ja. Das ist der Notizblock, den wir Ihnen gegeben haben, aber wir können unsere Me
好的，考虑得很周全。我们一直在仔细考虑允许您进行哪些操作来拍摄维修舱。我们目前认为这项工作优先级较低；
न
Ok. So che stai cercando di stare zitto, quindi ti leggerò un po' di informazioni. Una delle cose che abbiamo appena scoperto e che potrebbe darti un po' di sicurezza è che se perdi la bombola di ossigeno criogenico, ti restano 36 kg a /. Il fattore limitante per il funzionamento co
조금 걱정됐습니다. 이분은 아직 대기 중인 예비 사령관입니다. 아직 명령을 내려주시지 않았
D'accord. Maintenant, p
Hé Jim, tu as même bien géré le
ठीक है। चरण 5, उच्च-लाभ वाले एंटेना क
Ok, 
よし。スーツパワーはオフでした。パネル10に進み、パワー
了解。これが焼きたいデータだ。
Okay. Let me ask one question, here. About how long do yo
طاقم تيمبر كوف، كما تعلمو
The secondary coolant loop really looked good. Looks like you had a nice tight radiator and everything else on there was working right along the performance curves. Your main oxygen regulators both filled at 104 psi during our check. Looking at the lunar orbit, expect to be doing a water boil of about 1 pound per hour, and this is just an approximation; there's quite a variety of estimates as to what the water boiling requirements may be, might go anywhere from boiling lots to not boiling at all. The next water dump will be coming up after, so you don't have to worry about any of that until you get through. Communications predictions are looking good, possibly a little bit better than what we had hoped for, and looks like we're going to get high bit rate on OMNI's with our 210-foot dish at Goldstone. This will be working for us on the first couple of rev's, and then we'll be switching sites, so we'll go back to using OMNI's for high bit. The voice quality on is good. Your fuel cells have been running above nomin
غطاء سحابي ف
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। सेंटर पैनल - मैं इंडिकेटर A देख रहा हूँ। पैकेज का तापमान लगभग 180 है। हीलियम का दबाव 3900 है। ईंधन का दबाव लगभग 180 है और प्रतिशत लगभग 85 प्रतिशत है। B भी लगभग वैसा ही है, सिवाय इसके कि पैकेज का दबाव 190 है। क्वाड C पर भी लगभग यही स्थिति है, सिवाय इसके कि पैकेज का तापमान 100 है। क्वाड D पर पैकेज का तापमान 160 है। बाकी सभी इंडिकेटर लगभग समान हैं। दबाव सामान्य दिख रहा है। हीलियम का दबाव लगभ
알겠습니다. 1번 창과 5번 창은 흐릿하지만 부분적으로는 사용할 수 있을 것 같습니다. 해치 창은 매우 심하게 흐려져 있습니다. 2번 창과 4번 창
Да, я так думаю. И надеюсь, что 
Non credo che sia un grosso problema; salta solo 
और मैंने भी यह देखा। वह प्रकाश का एक बहुत ही चमकीला धब्बा 
わか
रॉजर, बिल। आप सेकेंडरी बॉयलर के बारे में जानते हैं - दरअसल, दोनों ही मरम्मत प्रक्रियाओं की जानकारी एक खराबी पुस्तिका में उपलब्ध है, और प्राइमरी बॉयलर की जांच में मुख्य स
それでは、このチェッ
سيتم ذلك كخيار 1. السبب الوحيد لوجود الآخر داخل الكمبيوتر هو أنه
روجر. بخصوص سؤالك عن الخيار: يقوم البرنامج رقم 40 بتعيين العلامة المفضلة بحيث يظهر الخيار 
चार्ली, हमने अभी-अभी 261 डिग्री का रोल सेट किया है, और लगता है जिसने भी इसे सेट किया है उसने बढ़िया काम किया है। यह बिल्कुल वहीं है
알겠습니다. 지난번에 그렇게 했을 때는 테이
Main
Ok, Fred-o, ti chiediamo di prendere la lista di controllo delle emerg
ठीक है। प्रवेश पैड क्षेत्र मिडपैक है: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, प्लस 1102, माइनस 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28; डीएल और वीएल, 
لم أصل إلى هناك بعد. أقول حوالي 25 إلى 30 درجة، سأوقف الانحراف الآن. يتحقق الم
Questo è tutto per quanto riguarda le notizie mondiali e nazionali e gli approfondimenti. Nella pagina sportiva, Hank Stram dei Kansas City Chiefs è stato nominato allenatore dell'anno della AFL. Questa è la seconda volta in tre stagioni. La votazione è stata effettuata da una giuria dell'Associated Press composta da 30 giornalisti e telecronisti sportivi, tre per ogni città. Il più vicino a lui era Weeb Ewbank. Altri allenatori che hann
我们刚刚启动了平台，大约需要 30 分钟才能完全启动，之后我们才能开始进行对准工
रॉजर। मैंने TIG 124 22, 125 19 3470,
Say again. This is Friendship Seven
Ja, das wissen wir zu schätzen, Vance. Es ist nur so, dass wir uns momentan an den Mittellinien orientieren, die
È maggiore di 1,5; quello sfiato -
Penso che oggi sia anche il com
Roger, 11 ans
Ricev
11, ह्यूस्टन। हमारा कहना यह है कि अगर लो गेट से पहले हम किसी एक अक्ष पर नियंत्रण खो देते हैं, तो हम उड़ान रद्द करने की सलाह देंगे। इसके लिए दो अलग-अलग जेट का नुकसान होना आवश्यक होगा, जो कि बहुत कम संभावना है, लेकिन हम यही सलाह दे रहे हैं। लो 
ライト値は、白黒フィルムで ASA 64 の場合は 13 です。ライト値を 13 に設定しています。フィルターを使用して、7 番目の写真を撮影します。南アメリカ大陸は天候がさまざまなため、写真を撮るのが難しいです。今回はパノラマ写真を撮ります。ほぼ 8 時間後に開始します。実際、そうなるでしょう。MARKT、7、8、9 枚の黒の写真、白黒フィルム。10 枚の写真、白黒フィルム。ショットは、無限遠で 250 5.6 (1/250 秒および f5.6)
C'est exact. Je l'
알겠습니다. 저희는 지금 선호하는 정렬 작
弗雷德，他们说他
네,
Bon, ce ne sont que de vieux vecteurs, parce que je n'ai jamais fait VERBE 66, je crois, après
ठीक है। मैं फ्रेड की खिड़की से बाहर देख रहा हूँ। मुझे वहाँ बहुत सारे कण दिखाई दे रहे हैं, लेकिन उनमें से बहुत से कण अभी भी हमसे दूर जा रहे हैं, इसलिए उनम
أوه، بخير. كيف حال
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Mike, stiamo ancora ricevendo un tracciato piatto per il pneumografo a impedenza. Prima di andare a dormire stasera, potresti provare a mette
Roger, Friendship Seven. Sind Sie bereit, Ihre Delta-Rücklaufzeit für den Notfallbereich 1 zu kopi
Пока вы проверяете свиток, выясните, в каком формате ввода мне следует и
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। आप
Wally, du bist etwa 9.000 Yards vom Flugzeugträger entfernt 
...لكنني أعتقد أن السبب هو هذا الأكسجين ال
ロジャー、ヒューストン。はっきり
모든 
西格玛七号。请再说一遍。完毕
D'accord, Jack. Les commutateurs restent tous dans leur position actuelle, c'est-à-dire au centre, mais comme le bus est hors tension, la rangée inférieure de supports d'inter
Sì
حسنًا. دعني - أولًا، دعني أرى كيف تسير الأمور هنا.
Okay, Bill. Wir nähern uns dem Zeitpunkt der Sichtungen, und es besteht die Sorge, dass Quadrocopter Charlie überhitzen könnte, wenn wir direkt zur Ausrichtung übergehen. Daher bitten wir dich, die negative X-Achse jetzt zur Sonne auszurichten. Ich habe hier einige Gimbal
不，我们掌控着局面。让我
Roger. Gr
ठीक है। मुझे थोड़ी निराशा ह
よし、マ
Nun, Frank, ich sehe das gan
... spinta su NORMALE; spinta DELTA-V,
قد يكون على علم بذلك، لكنه لا يعرف حتى ما إذ
자, 휴스턴. 아폴로 8호
Роджер. Понятно. Поток кислорода у нас немного выше, чем я думал, но Билл говорит, что это примерно то, чего он 
انتقل إلى حذف ما تبقى من الملفات التي تعمل عليها الآن، ثم ارجع إ
No, neit
好的。
Okay. Das war also die komplette Vorgehensweise, um darauf zuzugreifen. Ich zeige Ihnen jetzt, wie Sie sich nach dem Lesen wieder abmel
Acquario, Houston. Il tuo atteggiamento sembra davvero buono. Ti daremo un voto a 10 minuti dalla comb
休斯顿，宁静。您能展示一下发动机臂断路器的配置吗？完毕。我这么问是因为它的末端好像断了。我想我们可以把它推回去。不过，
Понимаете? 
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une de l'actualité mondiale. Seuls quatre pays, la Chine communiste, la Corée du Nord, le Nord-Vietnam et l'Albanie, n'ont pas encore informé leurs citoyens de votre vol et de votre alunissage. Un journaliste a même déclaré être à court de mots pour décrire votre succès. Ce soir, le président Nixon assistera au match des étoiles de baseball à Washington. Après le match, il se rendra dans la zone de récupération du Pacifique. Mercredi soir, il se rendra en hélicoptère de l'île Johnston au navire de transmissions de la Marine, l'Arlington. Jeudi matin, il reprendra l'hélicoptère pour rejoindre le Hornet à temps pour assister à votre amerrissage. Le président sera accompagné du secrétaire d'État William Rogers et de Frank Borman. Ils observeront l'amerrissage depuis la passerelle du navire de récupération en compagnie de l'amiral John Sidney McCain Jr., commandant des forces du Pacifique. Après son séjour à bord du Hornet, le président entamera sa tournée en Asie et sa visite prévue en Roumanie. On pense que Luna 15 s'est écrasée dans la mer des Crises hier après avoir effectué 52 orbites autour de la Lune. L'agence de presse soviétique TASS a rapporté que des « recherches scientifiques » avaient été menées dans l'espace proche de la Lune. Sir Bernard Lovell, de l'observatoire de Jodrell Bank, a déc
Okay, Fred. And you're loud and clear down here now. Okay. What we're getting a procedure ready for you is to do an Sun check at approximately 74 hours or in just a little over 3 hours. That will be a detent 2; we'll have a detail procedure up shortly and it will include a rendezvous radar redesignation to get it out of the way and a maneuver to the attitude. It's our feeling that if that checks out within 1 degree that your platform will be okay for the burn without a subsequent. If it's not within 1 degree, we are working up an Earth/Sun alinement procedure to aline the platform, and we'll have that up t
A causa della distanza di separazione che vorremmo raggiungere tra ora e il momento dello speg
Columbia, Columbia, questa 
Хорошо. Время — событие состоится; и нам нужно занять следующее положение: крен 101,0, тангаж 090,0, рыскание — все углы. Углы усиления будут: тангаж -23, рыскание 93. И мы должны использовать стандартные процедуры для демпфирования скоростей. После демпфирования скоростей и перед запуском мы должны установить на секстант с магазином G, используя сверхскоростную черно-белую пленку. Затем мы должны сделать тр
自动一号。战
Écrivez-l
알겠습니다. 저는 파괴역학 전문가들이 
了解しました。一連の亀裂、つまり断層は南に向かって約3段に下がっています。北側に平行に走る断層パターンは中央が下がっています。地球にいる皆さんには、これがかなり不気味な地平線、非常に暗く食欲をそそらない場所だと言ったとき、どういう意味かお分かりいただけると思います。私たちは今、この滑らかな地域にある将来の着陸地点の一つ、静かの海に近づいています。これは、山を避けて着陸を試みる必要がないように、最初の着陸を
क्या आप चाहते हैं कि वह हाई गेन यॉ 0 पर जाए? संख्याएँ
حسنًا. المدخل: منطقة منتصف المحيط الهادئ، 357 152 359 268، زائد 0813، ناقص 16503 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028، غير قابل للتطبيق أربع مرات، أي أن DL MAX وDL MIN وVL MAX وVL MIN غير قابلة للتطبيق. 0590 312. ونجم الدوامة هو زيتا برساوس، وهو في منتصف المسافة بين ميرفاك والدب
La mise au point est-elle suffisamment bonne, Joe, pour que tu puisses voir tous les débris
It's a full-blown tropical stor
Roger
D'accord, Fred. Voici la procédure pour relever la température du réservoir de propergol de descente. Ce n'est pas un problème m
Good morning. Are you planning a midcourse corre
他のシステムも点検中。どれもほぼ安定しているようだ。スーツドームは依然約71度、スーツインレット
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。お時間がありましたら、ブラボーの窒素タンクの搭載状況を教えていただけますか？それから、燃料噴射を停止して以来、タンク内の温度は安定している
我一直在对
Bene. Da Jodrell Bank, Inghilterra, tramite AP: Il grande radiotelescopio britannico di Jodrell Bank ha smesso di ricevere segnali dal satellite lunare senza equipaggio dell'Unione Sovietica alle 5:49 EDT di oggi. Un portavoce ha affermato che sembrava che la navicella spaziale Luna 15 "fosse andata oltre la Luna". Un'altra citazione: "Non pensiamo che sia atterrata", ha detto un portavoce di Sir Bernard Lovell, direttore dell'Osservatorio. Washington UPI: Il vicepresidente Spiro T. Agnew ha chiesto di mandare un uomo su Marte entro il 2000, ma i leader democratici hanno risposto che la priorità deve essere data alle esigenze sulla Terra. Agnew, alto funzionario governativo al decollo dell'Apollo 11 mercoledì, apparentemente parlava a nome suo e non necessariamente dell'amministrazione Nixon quando ha affermato: "A mio giudizio, dovremmo mandare un uomo su Marte entro la fine di questo secolo". Laredo, Texas, AP: I funzionari dell'immigrazione di Nuevo Laredo hanno annunciato mercoledì che agli hippy verrà negata la carta turistica per entrare in Messico, a meno che non facciano il bagno e si taglino i capelli. Huberto Cazaras, capo dell'immigrazione messicana a Nuevo Laredo, ha affermato che le autorità di Città del Messico, Acapulco e altre famose località turistiche hanno ricevuto lamentele nei confronti degli hippy. Di United Press International: La 
روجر. لا أعتقد ذلك - لا يمكننا ت
Roger, 11. Copiamo la tua descrizione. Mi risulta che vedi un'ombra proiettata da quella nuvola tra Afghanistan e Pakistan. Hai una s
جيم، لقد راجعنا للتو علاماتك فيما يتعلق بالدقة، وتبين أنها قريبة جدًا من القيمة المثلى ا
Okay. Charlie und D
いいえ。遠心分離機よりずっといい
没错，弗雷德。估计大约15分钟后就能送到你手
Хьюстон, Аполлон-8. Как вы чита
了解しました。イーグルはここから見ても非常に順調に見えます。位置はほぼ確実に把握しています。ただし、機
حسنًا. الآن، في تلك الصفحة التي تتضمن مناورة التحليق، أسفل مجموعة نجوم الشمال، لديّ بعض الأرقام الجديدة لك لأننا غيّرنا تلك النجوم من نافي وبولاريس. كما تتذكر، غيّرناها إلى سيريوس وريجل، لذا - وهذا أيضًا، بالمناسبة، هو تحدي
قطع من البيض مع لحم الخنزير المقدد، وخبز محمص وعصير بر
This is Friendship 
Well, we 
Мы б
완전 난장판이네요. 연료 전지 퍼지 작업을 진행 
Okay, Jim. Ich habe das Befehlsmodul 356.65, 163.42, 346.67 erhalten.
حسناً. قل ذلك مرة أخرى. لم أستطع فهمك جيدا
रॉजर। हम देख सकते हैं; अभी तो 
M
On en reparle, Jim. Bon, Jim, pour l'instant, d'après ce qu'on voit, ça a l'air aussi bien que tout ce qu'
Dis Jerry, quelle quantité d'eau consomme ce distributeur d'eau dans le compartiment technique inférieur, celui qui distribue de l'eau chaude et de l'eau fr
Va bene
Роджер. Имейте в виду, мы только что провели тест на КВ-диапазоне 31 и не получили ответа ни от одной ст
罗杰，休斯顿。-11，/: 45597，-040，+157，+36325，-01727，+01428 180 003 000，不适用，+00186 3
Sembra che durante la nostra fase di spegnimento (illeggibile) consumiamo ancora poco meno di 11 ampere. Ne abbiamo 
ठीक है, बढ़िय
Джим, этот космический аппар
わかりました。4列目に入ったら、OPERATE（運用）ブレーカーを開きます。つまり、CDU（通信ユニット）を監視できなくなり、姿勢も確認できなくなります。そのため、通信に使用するアンテナの選択についてアドバイスすることはできません。対処方法としては、UPLINK SQUELCH（アップリンク・スケ
Bene. Questa manovra ti porterà molto vicino ai limiti di scansione dell'antenna ad alto guadagno, quindi mentre esegui la manovra, controlla le luci. Se la spia del limite di scansione si accende, hai ancora 15 gradi di margine. Ma l'unico messaggio è che, se dovessi interrompere l'aggancio, dovrai tornare indietro, riacquisire e ripeter
ठीक है। मैं अब तक के चरण 7 तक पहुँच गया हूँ, और मुझे यहाँ हीलियम इंडिकेटर में ज़्यादा रोशनी नहीं दिख रही है। क्यों न मैं आपको बता दूँ कि हमने अब तक कैसे आगे बढ़े हैं, और आप मुझे दी गई
Je pense que nous avons la meilleure configuration
... Test auf HF GMT 16 31 59 MARK. Ich konnte die Kapsel schwach, ab
わかりました。「フォローアップ」も忘れてください。17ページ目のすべての項目を実行して、4分で変更点があります。1行目、CB(16) INVERTER 3、CLO
分かりました。いくつか確認したい点があります。可能であれば、パラシュートに乗っている間に
Gemini VIII, this i
如果我的声音听起来不太清晰，那是因为我嘴
好的，Fred-o。在第12页，我们需要更新。我们有一些矢量信号和一个垫子给你。当你到达那个状态时，我们会通知你何时需要上行链路。好的。在“激活和自检”下，执行整个程序。在第13
Roger. Abbiamo copiato l'impostazione
BAT Charlie, 37.0; pyro A, 37.0; pyro B, 37.0; helium pressure, 3450; and just for kicks, nitrogen A, 2300; nitrogen B, 2400; 5 Charlie, 4.5; 5 Dog, 3.5; 6 Alfa, 4.0; 6 Baker, 4
好的，杰克。我们先把
谢谢
माइक, जब तुम ठीक 7 मील पर होगे, तब हमें एक मार्क देना चाहते हो - मेर
ブースターは急速に落下し、私たちの速
हे भगवान, ऐसा क्यों... (हंसी
Okay. Die nächsten vier bleiben unverändert. 
В городе Рено, штат Невада, из-за отсутствия камина в доме, маленький мальчик написал Санта-Клаусу в местную газету и предложил: «Пожалуйста, воспользуйтесь входной дверь
Beh, questo è... - Mi sembra che tu sia a posto. Ricorda solo che dovrai abbassare il diaframma probabilmente a 22, forse no: la messa a fuoco rimane all'infinito e lo zoom mi batte. Puoi scegliere, pu
Roger Zanzibar. Bien reç
Okay... su questo... vettore. Okay, R1 più 45
Ed iniziò a stivare le cose e, non appena arrivammo al punto in cui non era più possibile armeggiare con il booster, iniziai ad aiutarlo a tempo pieno, almeno tenendo le cose, stivandole
わかったよ、ジャック。よかった
حسنًا. لديّ هنا الكثير من صفحات سجل صور
大丈
Okay, Gus, my status is good; my control mode is fly-by-wire; the gyros are still caged; maneuver is off. Fuel is 62 and 68 [percent]. A little ahead on fuel consumption; fuel
Wassermann, es ist noch etwas zu früh, um genau zu sagen, wie es läuft. Wir würden gerne noch ein paar Punkte holen, also lest sie weiter vor, und wir h
Columbia v
로
了解。02 + 08 +
Sì, la mia lista di controllo non lo preved
.30
क्या चीज
الطريقة التي سنفعل ب
يا أهل هيوستن، ستُقدم لكم قاعدة ترانكويليتي بعض التعليقات بخصوص سؤال الجيولوجيا الذي طُرح الليلة الماضية. لقد هبطنا في حقل فوهات بركانية ناعم نسبيًا، يتكون من فوهات ثانوية مستطيلة وأخرى دائرية، معظمها ذو حواف مرتفعة بغض النظر عن حجمها. هذا ليس صحيحًا دائمًا، فهناك بعض الفوهات الصغيرة التي لا تظهر لها حواف واضحة. تتكون الكتلة الأرضية في جميع أنحاء ا
알겠습니다. 이 초신성 가스 탱크가 파열되면 어떤 일이 벌어질지, 가스 배출이 우리에게 어떤 영향을 미칠지 잘 모르겠네요
Roger. Would you believe you've got thruste
أبولو 8، هيوستن. ليس لدينا أي اعتراض على المضي قدمًا في عملية تصريف البول الآن. وللعلم، بالنسبة لتصريف مياه الصرف الصحي، نخطط لتأجيله ح
حسنًا. سنكون مستعدين لذلك في 
Okay. Heute möchten wir, dass Sie vor den Beobachtungen, wie in den Verfahren beschrieben, und anschließend eine Zapfenabweichungsmessung durchführen. Wir möchten damit überprüfen, ob thermische Effekte die Winkelmessung im Sextanten verfälschen. Die zuvor ermittelte Abweichung sollte berücksichtigt werden. Fahren Sie mit Schritt 87 fort, sobald zwei aufeinanderfolgende Messungen innerhalb von 0,003 Grad übereinstimmen. Verstellen Sie den Zapfen zwischen den Messungen um einige Grad. Die Erde sollte heute in Ihrem Sichtfeld deutlich kleiner erscheinen. Sie können uns das sicherlich besser erklären als wir, aber um eine korrekte Winkelmessung zwischen Stern und Horizont zu gewährleisten, muss die M-Linie des Sextanten – die Linie, die durch die beiden Striche verläuft und senkrecht zur R-Linie steht – am Substellarpunkt parallel zum Horizont verlaufen. Die eigentliche Überlagerung des Sterns mit dem Horizont kann dann an jeder beliebigen Stelle im Sichtfeld des Sextanten erfolgen: oberhalb, unterhalb oder auf der M-Linie. Wir empfehlen, die Markierungen so schnell wie möglic
تم
हां, उसने 60 सेकंड तक पु
はい。はい、その合間にも
حسنًا. بناءً عل
把它
Okay. Questo è un più 11, /. Questo 40 meno 163, più 129, meno 005, 99, più 00 00 0, più 47016, 177 143 000 Novembre Alfa, più 001 97 47 020 5 51 468 18 12 12 83 257 023, su 263, sinistra 17, più 11 95, meno 165 00 126 83 356 08, stelle polari; 068 097 356, nessun ullage. Per il ritorno veloce, 7900 per l'Oceano Indiano, procedura ad
Roger, Guaymas. 
Et sur la page suivante, à environ [heure manquante], vous pouvez reprendre le plan de vol normal. Nous aimerions ajouter une précision: à [heure manquante], un point de déversement des eaux usées. Même si ce n'est pas vraiment nécessaire à ce stade, nous préférons effectuer ce déversement afin de pouvoir vous suivre sans interruption, sans aucu
听起来你精神
आप सभी बहुत अच्छा क
알겠습니다. -00489 +00000 +47250 177 144 000, 해당 없음, +00197 47253 554 47050 12 1278 256 023, 265 증가, 18 감소. 여기까지 
We don't think it's any problem. We would like for you to put your Quantity Read Switch ON and leave it on for the next several hours so we can get a feel for what's going on. Even at the rate that's been used in the last several hours, it won't be any problem, but we'd like to find some way to control this thing without it being a nuisance to use so you won't be bothered with it. That's the reason we want to take a look at it for some time. Don't like the 
了解、ジム。ここで1、2アンペアの電力を節約するために、ダウンボイスバックアップ通信設定に切り替えてください。これは、電源と回路ブレーカーを抜いて、ダウンボイスバックアップに切り替える設定です。通信に問題が
罗杰，双子座 
了解
알겠습니다. S-밴드 OFF 상태를 OFF로 변경하겠습니다. 이렇
スペースクラフト V
حسناً، نعم. الآن
这将是G
نجم المحور هو الأرض، أسفل 037، يمين 22، زائد 10 68، ناقص 165 00 128 56 361 18. نجوم المحاذاة: النجم الرئيسي هو الشعرى اليمانية، والنجم الثانو
それと、できるだけ早くRetro Attitudeを始めてください。
Bonjour, Apollo 11.
حسنًا يا جاك، هذا ي
Нил и Базз, я разговариваю с вами по телефону из Овального зала Белого дома, и это, безусловно, самый исторический телефонный разговор в истории. Я просто не могу передать словами, как мы все гордимся тем, что вы сделали для каждого американца. Это, должно быть, самый гордый день в нашей жизни. И я уверен, что люди во всем мире тоже разделяют с американцами понимание того, насколько это грандиозное достижение. Благодаря тому, что вы сделали, небеса стали частью мира человека. И когда вы говорите с нами из Моря Спокойствия, это вдохновляет нас удвоить наши усилия по установлению мира и спокойствия на Земле. В этот бесценный миг всей истории человечества все люди на этой Земле поистине едины; едины в свое
فريندشيب سفن، برمودا، لقد فقدنا الاتصال بعلامة TM التجارية
नमस्कार, ट्रैंक्विलिटी बे
음, 어쨌든 뭔가 
روجر. نقطة الدخول: المنطقة هي وسط المحيط الهادئ، الإحداثيات 000، 152، 001، 194 46 06، 267، خط العرض + 1332، - 16917، 064، 36194، 649، المدى المتبقي 14045، 36275، 195 03 06، 00 28، أقصى مسافة هبوط 154، 084، 22400، 18000، D0 400، 02 13، 00 17، 03 51، 09 02، نجم السدس 45 0189، 277، نجم محور الرؤية، غير متوفر، متجه الرفع للأعلى. ملاحظات: محاذاة، فيغا ودينيب، دوران 078، ميل 223، انحراف 340. ملاحظات إضافية: استخدم نمطًا غير خروجي، -30، فحص الأفق 194 33 06. ميل 298. ستحصل على P65، ولكن لن تحصل على P66. 
了解。同じ内容ですね。ゴー
Nun ja, es ist immer noch nicht so; ich hatte es schon 
Nur zu,
रॉजर, आगे ब
And, Jack, have you all got good data down 
रॉजर, फ्रैंक। अगर आपको मौका मिले, तो कृपया हमें अपने ट्रनियन कैलिब्रेशन नंबर बता दें। डाउनलिंक के दौरान हमसे वह छू
分かりました。それで、私たちの大体の姿勢が分かっているなら、南
Ici Eagle. J'ai lu les adresses 404, 405 et 406. Je pensais que les adresses 405 et 406 seraient toutes deux à zéro, et je me demandais si je ne devrais pas les remettre à zéro. Je constate que l'adresse 404 devrait être négative,
제미니 4호, 여기는 휴스턴입니
嗯，现在我能做什么呢？我现在正前后摇晃我的手臂，这会让横滚、偏航和俯仰指针发生变化。通过移动我的躯干，我可以让俯仰速率指针每秒移动1度。横滚速率指
ठीक है। 104 घंटे पर प्रसव के बीच में एक समस्या आ गई है, डॉक्टर हमें इसके लिए बाद में एक प्रक्रिय
أنا سعيد لأنك فعلت ذلك - وأنت كذلك يا نيل؛ لقد كانت فكرة جيدة، 
はい、大丈夫です。キャニスターの底から2インチほど余分な袋がはみ出ていると思います。これが下の網に吸い込まれてしまわないように、ハサミで切り取ってください。切り取ったら、さらに12インチくら
알겠습니
And Jack, Houston. For your information, tells me that we are in the Earth's sphere of influence an
Hier ist eine interessante kleine Neuigkeit, die man eigentlich ganz gut hören sollte. In Ann Arbor, Michigan, gibt es a
روجر، فريندشيب سفن. لنبدأ هذا التقرير الذي يستغرق 30 دقيقة، بدءًا من مواقع لوحة ا
こちらアポロ8号、月から生中継でお送りしています。テレビカメラを切り替える必要がありました。まずは、過去16時間にわたって地球の様子をお伝えしました。次は、高度60マイル（約97キロメートル）を16時間飛行してきた月の様子をお伝えします。ビル・アンダース、ジム・ラベル、そして私自身は、クリスマス前日の16時間、ここで実験や写真撮影、そして宇宙船のエンジンを噴射して月を周回してきました。これから、一日中追跡してきた軌跡を辿り、月の日没までをお伝えします。月は私たち一人ひとりにとって異なる存在です。私たち一人ひとりが、今日見たものについて、それぞれの印象を持っていると思います。私自身の印象としては、広大で孤独で、威圧的な存在、あるいは何もない空間、まるで軽石の雲のように見える、住むにも働くにもあまり魅力的な場所とは思えない、というものです。ジム、あなたは何について一
Tout est prê
Ро
Ich habe bisher drei Mahlzeite
Роджер. Похоже, мы пропустили вчерашние показания бортовых приборов батареи Чарли и батарей PYRO Альфа 
One thing that I don't know if we got on tape before, but both Ed and I mentioned that we were quite thankful for all the training that we'd done in the altitude chamber, in the zero-g airplane, and th
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Se dovessi decidere di lanciarti in prim
D'accord. La durée des manœuvres sera probablement inférieure à une minute. Nous voulons que vous ayez une coupure horaire. Nous vous indiquerons donc la durée de la manœuvre. J'ai également une zone de manœuvre pour le module 7 en milieu de parcours au cas où nous perdrions les communications. Si vous êtes prêt à recevoir les instr
分かりました。一つ提案があります。ジムに望遠鏡を通して評価をさせるというものです。あなたは全く同じことをしますが、180度回転して頭を上げます。そしてジムに望遠鏡を通して追跡を
네, 밴스, 지금은 딱히 뭘 하고 있는 건 아니고요, 그냥 궁금해서요. 진입 절차를 시작하고 모든 걸 정리해 둔 다음, 55시간 후에 TV가 나오면 그때 TV 시청에만 사용하면 되
Ich habe seit dem Aufwachen ungef
Apo
سيجما سفن سيجما سفن زنجبار كوم 
Apo
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। क
好的。燃烧规则。如果推力监测器读数低于或等于 77%，我们应该关闭发动机；如果推进剂空腔压力低于 160 psi，我们也应该关闭发动机；如果燃料氧化剂压差大于 25，并且需要地面呼叫，我们也应该关闭发动机；如果姿态误差在正负 10 度以内（启动瞬态过程除外），我们也应该关闭发动机。好的。速率限制为每秒正负 10 度。此外，如果发动机万向节指示灯亮起，国际空间站 (ISS) 程序报警指示灯亮起，CES
我们收到您发送的清零信号，但我们不知道它的
满载而归，度过美
好的，我们会帮你整理好。我们刚才还在讨论冗余组件检查，打算等大家都睡醒后再进行。这样你就不用
好的，休斯顿。我同意。我正在看14号线，角度基本居中。它在Crisium以南，但
알겠습니다. 배터리 충전 관련 질문에 대한 답변으로, 제 
रॉजर। मुझे यकीन नहीं है कि मैंने सब कुछ 
D'acco
Kabinendruck und Kabinenhöhenmesser stimmen in der Höhe überein. Müsste jetzt 13.000 Fuß sein. Markierung 10; ich sehe, dass das Hauptsegel geöffnet und gerefft ist, sie
로저, 휴스턴. 이글이 70mm 카메라 두 대와 16mm 카메라 두 대 모두를
はい。わかりました。次は司令船の写真です。司令船からサービスモジュールを見るのは少し難しいかもしれませんが、もし見えるとしたら5番窓からだろうと、ここにいる人たちは考えています。そのためには70ミリレンズをお勧めします。これらの写真は優先度2です。これは70ミリELで、80ミリレンズを取り付けた状態で、すべてB-3にあります。80ミリレンズを取り外し、250ミリレンズを取り付けます。250ミリレンズはU-4にあります。CEXフィルムはA-13から使用してください。リング
Scommetti. Sulla pagina sportiva, non c'è molta attività. UCLA è in cima a entrambi i sondaggi di basket. Se ne vuoi sapere di una in particolare, fammelo sapere e ti dirò se è tra le prime dieci in entrambi i sondaggi. Per quanto riguarda il Nord, l'All Star Game universitario che si giocherà domani, il Nord è leggermente favorito sul Sud. Ara Parseghian è l'allenatore della squadra del Nord e ha sei giocatori di Notre Dame che lavorano per lui, quindi dovrebbero essere piuttosto tosti. L'allenatore della squadra del Sud è Frank Howard di Clemson. Dice che non è fa
好的。我们现在的想法是，我们正在查看您机载相机上的一些镜头，看看能
わかりました。冒頭でフェードアウトし
Roger. C
Oui. Existe-t-il un terme de la 
OK. Je suis en mode automatique. Tout fonctionne parfaitement. Le commutateur de manœuvre est sur la position « arrêt ». Tous les systèmes sont au vert. Ma consommation de carburant est qua
Okay. Die nächste Seite ist bis auf eine Kleinigkeit identisch: Anstelle von R1 befindet sich dort die Checkliste für die An
الجوزاء 4، الج
حسناً يا جيم. لقد كان عرضاً رائعاً حتى ا
Fo
コロ
很好。这是上行声道备份，请确认您已开启窄波束高增益模式
Roger. Stavo giusto registrando qualcosa. L'unica cosa insolita che ho notato è uno strato di foschia piuttosto alto, che sembrerebbe essere di c
Roger. All four AUTO, all fou
Отлично! Я как раз писал длинную диссертацию о том, почему у нас возникают проблемы и почему мы не можем использовать эт
Vorremmo sapere quali sono i tuoi piani per la riconsegna del volo stasera. Nel nostro piano di volo ti mostriamo un periodo di riposo che inizierà alle 182 circa, e cosa hai intenzione di fare in quel periodo? Terremo d'occhio il meteo e prevediamo di avere un aggiornamento, credo, tra circa mezz'ora
फ्
모든 게 순조롭습
Okay. Jetzt können wir mit der Arbeit
फ्लाइट
Я собир
私たちが求めているのは - はい、P
好的。1
Houston, la Base Tranquillité va vous donner quelques précisions concernant la question géologique d'hier soir. Nous avons atterri dans un champ de cratères relativement lisse, composé de cratères secondaires al
Potresti fornirgli un bollettino meteorologico dell'Apollo 8. Il
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。请问您是否已在过去一小时内按照飞行计划更换了二氧化碳过滤器？完
제미니 4님, 해당 컴퓨터 오류에
Je trouvais ces éma
Эти чертовы ублюдки почти всегда выруливают на взле
Roger. Bereich 36-4 
Ich kann da unten hineingreifen. Das ist der erste Ort. Ich habe nachgese
好的。你想确保高收益，你想让 OMNI Charlie 或 Ba
And don't forget one 
ठीक है
Nein, das ist der falsche S
ठीक है, जैक। ज़रा रुको। मैं 
Houston, Apollo 11. Ich denke, der Grund liegt darin, dass bei den nachfolgenden Landungen 1620 angezeigt wird, oder 
로저. 11, /: 45597, 0 - 수정 - 마이너스 0.40, 플러스 1.57, 플러스 36325, 마이너스 0.1727, 플러스 0.1428 180 0.03 0.00, 노벰버 알파, 플러스 0.0186 36394 323 36186 42 0.995 254; 스코르피이 델타, 하강 103, 좌측 48, 플러스 0.742, 마이너스 16500 13005 36327; 시리우스와 리겔, 129 155 0.10, 4개의 쿼드, 15초; T 마이너스 2에서 
रॉजर। यह वाकई एक अच्छा विचार 
11، هيوستن. نحن في وضع
Ok, Jack. Odyssey è pronta per essere copi
रॉजर, ऑरोरा सेवन, मैंने आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से 
Ok. Forse sto chiamando troppo in fretta. Ok. Il terzo, abbiamo ottenuto i target 58, 63 e 65. La fotografia di addestramento è stata completata, ed è stata fatta sul caricatore D, che ora ha - correzione, è il caricatore E - che ora mostra 95 esposizioni. Il caricatore D è nuovo. Anche il caricatore K è stato usato per la fotogra
收到。感觉良好，心情愉快，准备出发
कोलंबिया, ये ह्यूस्टन है। ओ
11, आपके मित्र भूविज्ञानी का कहना है कि अगर 16-सीक्वेंस वाला कैमरा
لدينا معدل بت عالي؛ نحن على أهبة الاستعداد لإشارة الإدخال 
हाँ, बिल्कुल। जिम, आप थोड़ी देर के लिए रुके थे। हम इसे बर्न एटीट्यूड से बॉल पर करेंगे। हम बस चाहते हैं कि आप 90 डिग्री तक किसी भी दिशा में रोल करें, पिच 0 और यॉ 0 रखें। अब, चरण 3; "जब एटीट्यूड पर हों, तो ACA डिटेंट से बाहर।" चरण 4; "एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल: यॉ, मोड कंट्रोल पर। जब दरें 0.05 से कम हों, तो
로저. 앞으로 받게 될 업데이트에 대한 간략한 요약입니다. 현재 마이너스 8 비행 기동 후 플러스 2를 받는 업데이트는 그대로 유효합니다. 해당 업데이트는 더 이상 적용되지 않습니다. 다음 업데이트는 4입니다. 그 후에는 4번의 기동 완료를 전제로 하는 플러스 2 기동이 두 가지 추가됩니다. 하나는 최소 기동이고, 다른 하나는 빠
Houston, stai monitorando l
Die Gyroskope scheinen problemlos zu funktionieren. Allerd
피치는 0이고
좋습니다. 아폴로 13호, 휴스턴입니
알겠습
Roger, Buzz. Beginnen wi
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Zanzibar Com Tech, вещание в диапазоне КВ/УВЧ. Вы читаете? Кон
Ja. Es sind kl
आ
프렌드십 세븐, 프렌드십 세븐, 무체아
수치가 12.5 정도로 나오네요. 게이지에 문제가 있는 것 같아요... 방금 마스터 경보가 울렸는데 경고등은 안 켜졌어요. 이산화탄소 농도가 한계치에 가까워지고 있어서 그런 거라고 생각했는데, 아마 여기서는 제대로 나오지 않은 것 같네요
Роджер. В связи с задержкой с сжи
Okay. Vielen Dank. Die größte Abweichung bei den Gyroskopen beträgt 0,03 Grad pro Stunde (X-Gyroskop). Bei den PIPA-Sensoren ist die Abweichung beim Y-PIPA am größten und beträgt 0,006 Fuß pro Sekunde. Wir versuchen, die Werte weiter zu optimieren. Die größte Abweichung, die wir bisher gemessen haben, liegt bei etwa einer Standardabweichung (Sigma) sowohl bei den Gyroskopen als auch bei den Beschleunigu
Дава
로저, 13-BRAVO; 146, 03+32. 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 2
Gemini V
И вы готовы. В Хантсвилле сообщают, что у вас 6-секундная площадка для запуска, что на 3 секунды больше, чем в случае с 3-сигма-гипофизарным корпусом; так что с ра
Роджер. Ко
Oui. Nous avons décidé d'utiliser un conteneur. Vous savez que le vêtement refroidi par liquide est entouré d'un sac que nous pensons pouvoir utiliser également, ou du moins dont nous sommes sûrs qu'il peut l'être. Nous l'avons testé. Il s'agit donc d'un sac à l'intérieur d'un autre, et à l'intérieur se trouve le vêtement refroidi par liquide. Le sac le plus proche du vêtement refroidi par liquide est celui dont nous avons besoin, et nous en avons deux. Ensuite, bien sûr, il nous faut du ruban adhésif et, comme vous l'avez dit, un classeur de données de vol ou quelque chose du genre. Avec ces seuls matériaux, nous pouvons fabriquer ce conteneur de fortune. Le sac que nous recherchons est celui qui se trouve juste à côté du vêtement refroidi par liquide, et si nous faisons très attention à l'endroit où no
我们停下来，先做了粗略校准，然后做了精细校准，还选了一对，选了Capel
لا، لم أقم بذلك مؤخرًا. سأقوم بذلك الآن كجزء من هذا الف
VI，你
Roger
我々が見た限りでは。音声ループで1分ほどテレビ信号を受信したという報告があり、ゴールドストーン氏からは1分ほど変調信号は受信したもの
... ce l'abbiamo per te, ma vogliamo darci una sistemata qui dentro; rin
いいえ。もう一度 PROGRAM 01 に戻らなければならない場合
حصل روجر على 43 نقطة برافو، لكنه لم يحصل على المعلومات السابقة، ولم يح
Roger. Ab
Ok, Fred-o. Ecco... ecco i cambiamenti. Non così estesi come quelli di prima, ma comunque piuttosto lunghi. Avete commenti o 
Hey, Jim, do you suppose that you could orient the so that the service module would be between you and the Sun? I believe you could see - recognize constel
ロジャー。マルーン・ビューグルの続きです。ニクソン大統領は、あなた方に会いに行く飛行機に乗る直前に、サンフランシスコから電話をかけ、奥様たちを驚かせました。奥様方は皆、あなた方のテレビ放送に感動していました。ジャンとパットはここミッションコントロールから見ていました。ケープカナベラルからのインテルサットの打ち上げは昨夜、4度目の延期となりました。デルタ衛星の第2段にある窒素調整器の故障が原因とされています。今夜、新たな打ち上げが試みられる予定です。メキシコ湾流を調査している調査潜水艦ベン・フラ
이제 당신은.
了解。メインバ
Роджер, Хьюстон.
Give us a call when you think we ought to
D'accord. RÉ
네. AC 전원 스위치를 IGS에서 ACME로 옮겼을 때(이건 컴퓨터에 전원을 공급하는 게 아닙니다), 컴퓨터 표시등이 꺼졌습니다. 그러다 고장 표시등이 켜졌고, 컴퓨터 표시등도 다시 켜졌지만 고장 표시등은 계속 켜져 있었습니다. 얼마 지나지 않아 두 표시등 모두 점점 희미해졌습니다. 3~4분 후, ACME 전원으로 다시 옮기자 컴퓨터 표시등이 꺼졌습니다. 고장 표시등은 그 후 4~5분 정도 켜져 있다가 마침내 꺼졌습니다
Sehr schön. Weiter südlich und landeinwärts sehe ich noch mehr Lichter. Dort sind zwei, eigentlich vier Muster zu erkennen. Und jetzt sehe ich im Fenster noch ein weiteres, fast direkt unter mir. Von hier oben sind die Licht
Bien, 8. Nous allons faire un petit exercice sur le terrain pour nous assurer que nous pouvons transférer l'enregistrement et ramener la partie vocale à Houston rapidement. Nous prévoyons donc de transférer votre enregistrement et de tester la procédure sur place pour le récupérer et l'écouter. Nous pensons avoir déjà quelque chose sur la bande, à moins que vous 
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आप कुंभ राशि के बा
Роджер, 11. Это Хьюстон. Примерно через 71-72 часа мы приглашаем вас на промежуточную посадку, которая, как я полагаю, уже идёт. 71 час: продувка кислородного топливного элемента; 72 часа: замена фильтра CO2 (номер 6), проверка потока вторичного радиатора. Мы отправим вам данные о двухчасовом пролёте, перисинтезном пролёте, прерывании режима возврата. В 73 часа 00 минут: остановка примерно на 0 градусах крена. То есть, когда вы приблизитесь к углу крена 0 градусов примерно в 73 часа, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы остановились. И выполните оставшийся вариант 3 для проверки дрейфа. 73 часа 20 минут: мы предоставим вам обновлённую информацию о месте посадки, 1 вектор состояния и целевой нагрузке. 73 часа 30 минут: маневрирование до 000 градусов крена, тангажа и рыскания; углы антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления буду
짐은 다시 낮 시간대에 관측하기 시작했고, 저도 다시 꽤 좋은 별들을 볼 수 있게 됐어요. 
और, क्या आपको सेकेंडरी एस-बै
जी हां, ह्यूस्टन, बिल्कुल। 
피치 트림은 2를 약간 웃도는 수준을 유지하고 있으며, 대략 2와 2.4 사이에서 진동하고 
下降到一万
Okay. We're zooming in now on a crater called Schubert N. Schu
... उस गड्ढे की दीवार पर कुछ पर
ठीक है। चरण 2: "बैलेंस कपल, बंद; डेड बैंड, न्यूनतम; एटीट्यूड कंट्रोल: पिच और रोल पल्स पर; यॉ डायरेक्ट पर; मोड कंट्रोल:
This is Friendship Seven. I now have control in low thrust to the left. I do not have control in low right thru
복사본 0.65입니다.
좌우
わかりました。これで良いプラットフォームができました。これから投棄姿勢へ操縦しますが、ここで重要なのは、投棄姿勢へ向かう際に、自機のプラットフォームがジンバルロックに陥らないように軌道を
네 번째 줄 아래에는 QUAD HEATER 차단기 IN, SUIT FAN 1이 있고, 그 아래에는 GLYCOL 1과 2가 있습니다. COMM 아래에는 COMMANDER AUDIO IN, s /, STANDBY, OPERA
बहुत बढ़िया। हम इसकी पुष्टि करते हैं। रेट्रो 1, 2 और 3। र
روجر، ب
ジャッ
Миру, возможно, будет интересно узнать, что вы делаете после завершения полёта, а именно, как вы возвращаете переключатели на место. Мы слышали, как вы проходили по контрольному списку. Но, я думаю, сейчас вы, по сути, уже установили все перекл
Amicizia Sette. Puoi confermare di aver ric
मैंने कई बार धूप
Okay. I might be calling up too fast. Okay. On the third, we got target 58 and 63 and 65. The training photography was accomplished, and it was done on magazine D, which now has - correction, that's magazine 
D'accord. C'est parti. L'objectif est une correction de trajectoire pour un retour libre: -0021,3, +0004,1, -0031,2; HA et HP sont NA; DELTA-V 0038,0; 031, 120, 298, -00213, +00041, -00312; NA. Et voici vos angles GDA. Tangage 5,86, roulis 6,75. Votre poussée: 5 secondes à 10 %, puis le reste à 40 %. Votre remplissage sera de deux gicleurs pendant 10 se
로저. 최종 
, минус 29837, плюс 02390, плюс 00994 000 200 005 01693, плюс 00600 29949 402 29782
了解しました
ठीक है, जैक। मैंने अभी आपको बैकआउट के बार
ه
Vom Piloten,
我现在要试试潜望镜。透过潜望镜
और आप - बर्न के दौरान, निश्चित रूप से, त्रुटि सुइयों के माध्यम से पिच और रोल को नियंत्रित करेंगे, और यह वही छोटी सी योजना
그리고 당신은 지금 있는 곳에서는 그렇게 할
我怀疑他在这点上是对的
唉
Roger. 033 0000, left 17, plus 0883, minus 16500 12955 36185; Sirius, Rigel 129, 155 010, ullage two jets, 20 seconds, quads Bravo and Delta. Horizon on the 24 degree line at ignition mi
ठीक है। हम अंतरिक्ष यान के अंदर वापस आ गए 
好的，我们明白了
फ्रेड, मेरा सुझाव है कि जब आपकी खिड़की फिर से पृथ्वी की ओर घूमे, तो आप ऐसी ही एक और तस्वीर खींच लें, और साथ ही, आपको शायद फिर से शुरू करना चाहिए। हमने शायद आपको कुछ गलत जानकारी भेज दी है। "दो क्वाड को निष्क्रिय करें" केवल प्रक्रिया के शुरुआती चरण में लागू होता है। हमारा मतलब प्रक्रिया के बाद वाले हिस्से से नहीं था, जहाँ हमने "सभी जेट को सक्रिय करें"
रॉजर। टीवी पर तस्वीर आ 
Это Gemini 4. Мы в правильном положении. Парашют зафиксирован двумя точками, и всё
我睡得很
D'accord. En bas, vous avez « Déploiement du parachute principal à 3 048 mètres (10 000 pieds), bouton-poussoir de déploiement principal, appuyer
В общем, что бы я им ни сказал, они м
حسنًا، السجل 1، بالإضافة إلى 27218؛ السجل 2، بالإضافة إ
Ein Zehntel, jetzt ist es minus ein
, Carnar
Роджер. ΔV139. 15 55 47.
Очевидно, что если оно отклоняется в ту сторону, то оно на самом деле не находится на полярной орбите. Да, оно наклонено под небольшим
Okay. The systems test 1-A s
نعم، أر
Ok. Il circuito primario qui sotto sembra ancora in buone condizioni, quindi sembrerebbe che tu sia 
Z cal을 기
네, 우주선 분리 시점이었죠. 어떤 속도로 분리된 것 같은데, 방향은 정확히 알 수 없었어요.
Ja. Gut, ich schalte sie jetzt ab und schaue, was passiert. Okay. Die Hauptversorgung ist aus. Sie war sieben Minuten lang an, während wir mit hohem Sauerstoff
공이 좋다는 건 알잖아요. 그
هذه هي فر
Ho capito che aggiornerai il vettore di stato, il vettore di st
Einen Moment bitte. Wir setzen uns mit dem Fernsehmann von Goldstone in Verbindung. Wir haben hier in Houston 
요지는 베트콩이 우리가 크리스마스 연휴 기간으로 
ठीक है। चूंकि रेंडेज़वस रडार बंद होने के कारण लोड कम है, इसलिए हम चाहते हैं कि बैटरी 5 और 6 अ
روجر، جيم. شكرًا لكما، وما زلتُ لا أفهم ما تقصدانه. هل قمتَ بالعد التنازلي من 5 إلى صفر بشكل طبيعي، ثم واصلتَ العد التنازلي عبر الصفر بطريقة سالبة، والآن تُشير القراءة إلى -6.2؟ هل
روجر، كانتون. الصداقة السابعة تتكرر. أولاً، هل لديك علامة 
Роджер.
了
Да, и мы р
11, это Хьюстон. Мы слышим только
네. 당시 지구는 62도의 각도로 통과했습니다. 두 번의 공전 주기는, 제가 앞부분의 지구
Affermativo; e, dato che il gimbal è stato regolato durante la grande accensione di ieri, dovremmo aver ancora completato il baricentro, e vorremmo assicurarci che Jack si sieda nella stessa posizione di ieri per questa accensione. In
Ciao, Columbia. Houston. Mi risulta che non hai potuto vedere Tranquility. Cosa stavi segnando? P
Sì, è un angolo troppo gran
La voce non è un granché in questo
И, Игл, Хьюстон. Мы будем ждать в этом режиме около минуты. Мы вернемся к вам, если вы
좋습니다
再说一
好的，吉姆。我们明白了。地球
Okay, Bill. Bevor wir das große Update lesen, möchte ich Jim kurz die Vorgehensweise erklären. Sobald er wieder bei Bewusstsein ist, soll er „ENTER“ drücken. Nicht fortfahren. Dadurch werden die Längen- und Breitengrade seiner Markierung nicht übernommen, der Referenzwert des Landeplatzes bleibt unverändert, und wir lösen das Problem mit der
22 is 94.3. And
Richtig. 183° Rollwinkel, 137° Nickwink
Okay... Up a little bit, just a little bit. You're right on it in yaw, 
روجر. سبعة. ا
ج
Roger. Ist dein Computer eingeschal
我现在要收起相机，去检查
おい、ハイゲ
Roge
罗杰。入口停机坪：区域为太平洋中部，滚轴坐标 000, 152, 001, 194 46 06, 267，纬度加 1332, 减 16917, 064, 36194, 649，航程 14045, 36275, 195 03 06, 00 28，最大升力 154, 084, 22400, 18000，D0 400, 02 13, 00 17, 03 51, 0
Хорошо. Прежде чем мы начнём, зап
你知道吗，不
杰克，这里最棒的一点，尤其对我这样的新手来说，就是——在这里行动非常方便。当然，正如你在指令舱模拟器里工作时所了解的，零重力环境确实非常有利。因为在1g重力下，你在里面活动会非常受限，而在这个环境下就轻松多了。正如你所看到的，这里看起来很干净，我发现周围有几个松动的垫圈，还有序列摄像机的一个小塑料盖松了，卡在了ED面板旁边。好了。就在吉姆的正下方，他现在站在一个看起来像罐子的东西上。为了让后面的人都能看清楚，这个罐子里装的是上升发动机，希望你们能看到我现在把手放在上面——就是我们用来离开月球的发动机。紧挨着发动机盖的，我手上拿着一个白
罗杰。下一个问题，超临界氦气上
Ap
О, у вас есть довольно неплохие цифры, которые я вам вчера отправил, и у вас было примерно... Ну, я проверю, 
Sind wir bereit für die richtige Entscheidung? Hoffentlich. Wir
रॉजर। मैंने ऑटो मोड में डॉक किया, और जैसा कि मैंने कहा, मुझे संपर्क का क्षण ठीक से याद नहीं था। मैं डॉकिंग प्रोब इंडिकेटर्स को बार-बार चेक कर र
Okay. D
D'accord. La procédure est la suivante: appuyez sur ENTRÉE, 333, ENTRÉE, puis lisez le registre 1. Ensuite, chargez 10 000 (la valeur de la mémoire). L'ordinateur effectuera alors un double vidage de la mémoire, comme si la configuration était correcte. Sinon, il faut charger 10 000 en appuyant sur ENTRÉE, 333, ENTRÉE, 10 000, ENTRÉE, puis ENTRÉE. Si le registre 1 contient bien 10 000, il faudra tout 
Какое значение парциа
我可以告诉你们，我们现在看到的，弗雷德身后的那个圆形袋子里装着我们的真空软管；当我们回到舱内时，我们
Houston, Tranquility. I used Capella in the last sighting, and it's a good ways near the edge. A good ways away from the center of dete
Ok, Joe, circa 76 ore e immagino tu abbia frainteso. La mia domanda era: qual era il pe
ठीक है
Ok. Vorrei che dessi un'occhiata per vedere se riesci a vedere le luci di Melbour
Tu vo
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。ダウンリンク
わかりました。G&Cチェックリストの2-4ペ
Good evening. I'd like to discuss with you a few of the more symbolic aspects of the flight of our mission, Apollo 11. As we've been discussing the events that have taken place in the past 2 or 3 days here on board our spacecraft, we've come to the conclusion that this has been far more than three men on a voyage to the Moon; more, still, than the efforts of a government and industry team; more, even, than the efforts of one nation. We feel that this stands as a symbol of the insatiable curiosity of all mankind to explore the unknown. Neil's statement the other day upon first setting foot on the surface of the Moon, "This is a small step for a man, but a great leap for mankind," I believe sums up these feelings very
D'accord. J'ai effectué la charge de la batterie, la purge de la soupape de ventilation et la purge du réservoir de carburant. Arrêtez-vous à 55 heures. Votre assiette de roulis sera alors de 285 degrés, conformément au plan de vol. Les angles de l'antenne à gain élevé sont légèrement différents: tangage à 23 degrés et lacet à 267 degrés. Le passage TV se fait selon la procédure standard, à l'exception de quelques étapes spécifiques que nous vous indiquerons pour vérifier la pression du réservoir de carburant, information que je ne possède pas encore. Redémarrez vers la fin des opérations, ou dès que vous aurez terminé. Ensuite, à votre convenance, nous vous invitons à effectue
हमारे रडार परीक्षणों से पता चलता है कि ऊंचाई का खतरा 50,000 फीट है। दृश्य ऊंचाई परीक्
这里是休斯
١١، هذه هيوستن. من المفترض أن يستغرق الأ
Oui, ce problème d'hydrogène… Je ne suis pas sûr, mais je pense que c'est un problème de contre-pression. Si la moindre 
Canton Com Tech, Canto
Roger. Vous, habitants de la navette Columbia, serez peut-être intéressés d'apprendre qu'aujourd'hui, la Colombie célèbre son indépendance. Gloria Diaz, des Philippines, a été couronnée Miss Univers hier soir. Elle a remporté le titre face à 60 autres candidates. Mademoiselle Diaz a 18 ans, les cheveux et les yeux noirs, et ses mensurations sont 88-58-88. La première dauphine est Miss Australie, suivie de Miss Israël et de Miss Japon. Pendant votre retour mardi soir, les All-Stars des Ligues américaine et nationale s'affronteront à Washington. Mel Stottlemyre, des Yankees, devrait être le premier lanceur de la Ligue américaine. Personne ne prédit encore qui sera le premier lanceur de la Ligue nationale. Neuf lanceurs sont inscrits. Même si la recherche a certainement porté ses fruits dans le cadre du programme spatial, il semble que ce 
電源ブレーカーが閉じていて、COMMAND
잠시 나가서 여기서 처음으로 
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कि हमने लगभग 3 इंच की गहराई तक जांच की, कोई कठोर सतह नहीं मिली, 
Okay. Step 7: "MODE CONTR
물 다 드셨나요
D'accord. Bon, j
好的。很
Roger. Deux vérifications supplémentaires. Pouvez-vous confirmer que le disque contenant les messages a bien été déposé sur la surface comme prévu, et que tous les é
了解です。あと2ステ
ロジャー、ヒューストン。今日の予定は、宇宙
Rog
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हम
私もそう思
C'est une bonne façon de le décrire. Il me semble que le simple fait de s'asseoir dans le tunnel et de regarder par
Das ist Freundschaft Sieben. Korrektur: Ich werde jetzt den Tageshorizont überprü
Okay. After number 1, first line, cross out "And VHF-A." Second line, cross out "SIMPLEX operation." Third line, cross out "Prime." That refers to PRIME POWER AMP, OFF. That - that "PRIME" should actually be replaced by OFF. And that's the second prime that line. Also in the third line the last word "OFF" should be crossed out and replaced by "PCM." Fourth line is okay
はい。グリコールエ
D'accord. AP
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티입니다. 판독 결과를 보내주시면 감사하겠습니다. EM 
지도 업데이트 내용은 다음과 같습니다. 
روجر. هذا على بعد 13 د
Арте
分かりました。登り用の水に切り替え
Tout e
Ich hoffe, du siehst, wie fest ich das Ding in den Boden rammen muss, ungefähr 5 Zo
नहीं। हम नहीं चाहते कि आप ऐसा करें। मुझे अपने कोण बताइए, और आइए हम उनकी तुलना यह
はい。どう読
Роджер. Понял. Я... мы сначала поедем в Антарес и попробуем. Знаешь, мы пробовали в прошлый раз, но мне удалось сделать один снимок, прежде чем луна совсем скрылась в белой ды
O
Hey Joe, es sieht ungefähr so ​​aus,
Хорошо, X минус 00011, Y 
The responsibility for this flight lies first with history and with the giants of science who have preceded this effort; next with the American people, who 
네, 아폴로 8호입니다. 몇 분만 더 기다리면 통신 점검을 시작할 수 있습니다. 참고로, 광대역 모드(WIDE BEAM)에서 신호 강도가 예상보다 3~4dB 정도 더 좋은 것으로 나타났습니다. 이는
それは仕事中だよ、ヒューストン。なあ、ちょっと待っててくれないか
Ich scherze nur; was brauchst du – AOS-Zeit
로저, 구강 체온 측
حسنًا، سأخبرك بشيء. أحضر كل الأغراض. أعطني الأغراض الآن. جاك، أعطني كل الأ
Wie vie
好的。ATCA断路器已接通。是的。我猜是为了备用电源。嘿，ATCA怎么
このパスでは確かに伝統が破られ
稍等。好的，8。
أوه، سيكون ذلك لطيفًا. لكنني أرسلت لوفيل تحت 
روجر. لست متأكدًا تمامًا مما حدث في ذلك الوقت يا مايك. كنتُ أُحدد مواقع الهبوط باستخدام الكود، وكنتُ أتلقى باستمرار رمزًا كبيرًا لـ "AUTO OPTICS". ورأيتُ الهدف، أو موقع الهبوط، يظهر، لذا قمتُ بتحديده يدويًا، لكن خطوط الطول والعرض كانت مختلف
Okay, Jack. So we can make sure
Okay, Joe. The - the DELTA-V no bi
分かりました。六分儀で中心を定義できるなら、その
كنت تأمل أن يكون هناك حل. أليس كذل
맙소사! 여기 지질학자가 오면 완전히
Okay. Two more steps. Step 6, remain on high-gain an
알겠습니다. 제가 가지고 있는 것만 알려드리는 게 더 쉬울 것 같네요. 11번 라인의 맨 위 줄에는 AC 버스 타이 브레이커 4개와 AC 버스 전압 브레이커가 있습니다. 두 번째 줄에는 TCA 브레이커 4개가 있고, 비행 디스플레이와 커맨더 아래에 GASTA가 있습니
알겠습니다. 곧 비행 계획대로 복귀할 수 있을 것 같습니다. 연소 작업이 늦어져서 업데이트 및 기타 정보는 다소 지연될 예정입
Puis-je vous donner un coup de ma
好的，就在我们现在看到的入口检查底部，最下面一行显示“MODE to STANDBY”（模式设置为待机）。就在它上面——我想提醒您添加一条备注：“不要初始化范围”。这是因
Roger, 13-BRAVO; 146, 03+32. 11 01 48. 12+09, 121. 03 27 11. 56 46. 3+17, 8+36. 14-BRAVO: 04+07, 09+03. 15-BRAVO: 121, 02+34, 14 10 30, 8+35, 16-BRAVO: 096, 02+03, 15 50 26. 11+28. 158, 3+48, 16 28 28, 2+39, 08+22. 17-BRAVO: 087, 01+51, 17 26 03, 10+03. Alles klar, verst
دعونا نرى ما يمكنني تركيبه مع فتح غطاء ا
39-3 83 전방, 68 후방, 2+18. 1+25. 04 0
Our altitude's building 
30-1 109. 2+19. 13
Roger. We ha
Gemini 4，正在发射 UHF 1 号信号。1、
Okay, Vance, non è così: non stiamo guardando il Sole, quello che stiamo vedendo è un grande riflesso del Sole dietro di noi; ed è così: sta arrivando su quel quad 1 lì, e quel quad
짐, 저건 36도 창문
Хорошо, Джим. Мы планируем сделать это 
Хорош
자, 새로운 주제로 넘
आगे बढ़ो, 
わかりました。状態が良好であれば、通信の遅延は発生
하하. 어쩌면 "떠돌아다니며 꿈꾸기"라는 옛 노래가 지금 상황에 어울릴지도 모르겠지만, 지금 난 꿈꿀 겨를이 없어
Penso che
Хорошо. У меня есть вот такой отрезок, мы его распилим вдоль... и я пройдусь по нему вот здесь, по этому гребню
Wir haben gerade ein automatisches Manöver durchgeführt un
Ich werde zuse
Bien reçu. Il suffit d'éviter le blocage de cardan et cet angle de 45 degrés n'est pas critique — c'est-à-dire hors du p
حسنًا، أبولو 8. نبدأ الآن - نُجهّز لاختبار الاتصالات الأول. سيكون هذا اختبارًا للصوت في اتجاه الإرسال، وقياس المسافة، واستقبال البيانات بالكا
Roger. Nun, zumindest so viele waren in Gedanken bei dir. Wir haben heute um 11 Uhr in den Nachrichten gehört, dass die New York Times 
Roger. Starting with NOU
और हम सुबह मिलेंगे, ठीक
Apollo 8, Houston. Ihre Booster
Roger. Molto bene. Pausa. Le p
Okay. The second one, at 32 hours looking at Bennett's Comet - we want the pictures taken when the spacecraft is as stable as it's going to be before starting. The stability requirement is very high. We weren't sure if you understood that from what we passed up. In addition, the photographs might not show as much a
Roger, je vous reçois parfai
Роджер. Жаль, что я не могу сделать то же самое
रॉजर। गैजिंग, च
そして、乗り物自体の振動は、2番目に動力飛行
Carnarvon, do you still read Gemini 
了解。地平線が見えてきたぞ
Понял. У нас осталось примерно минута до того
كولومبيا، استعدوا عل
Voici un reportage d'Harry Rosenthal, de l'Associated Press de Houston. Deux Pères Noël ont illuminé la veille de Noël du petit Jeffrey Lovell, âgé de deux ans. Le premier a frappé à sa porte et lui a apporté des cadeaux. Le second a ramené son papa sur la Lune. Le premier portait un costume rouge et une barbe blanche, et son « ho, ho! » résonnait si fort qu'on l'entendait à plusieurs kilomètres. Le second était un énorme moteur crachant des flammes derrière la Lune, et des milliers de personnes attendaient la confirmation de son allumage. « Sachez qu'il y a un Père Noël », furent les premiers mots d'Apollo 8, sortant du silence radio pour annoncer au monde entier, quinze minutes après les faits, que le moteur avait réussi sa combustion critique. « Aucun d'entre nous ne s'attend à recevoir un plus beau cadeau de Noël que celui-ci », déclara Ken Mattingly, du centre de contrôle des missions. « Remerciez de notre part tous ceux qui sont restés sur Terre. Vous savez que nous n'aurions rien pu faire sans vous », répondit le colonel Frank Borman, commandant du vaisseau. À ce moment précis, un sapin de Noël s'illumina devant les consoles du centre de contrôle des missions, et l'astronaute Harrison Schmidt lut à l'équipage une version spatiale du conte « La visite de Saint Nicolas ». « C'était la veille de Noël, et très loin dans l'espace, l'équipage d'Apollo 8 venait de remporter la course vers la Lune », commençait le récit. L'équipe du centre de contrôle des missions avait retardé les festivités jusqu'à ce que le père de Jeffrey, le capitaine de la marine James Lovell, ainsi que le major de l'armée de l'air William A. Anders et le colonel Borman soient rentrés sains et saufs. N'importe quel autre réveillon de Noël, les familles des astronautes auraient assisté à la messe de Noël à l'église, mais cette année, elles étaient toutes rivées à leur téléviseur. Toutes les maisons près du Centre spatial habité étaient décorées. Les pelouses autour de la maison des Lovell et dans tout son quartier de Timber Cove étaient ornées de luminaires de style mexicain, et les quatre Lovell… 30. Soudain, une voiture s'arrêta, transportant un grand Père Noël avec un gros sac sur le dos. Il s'approcha de la porte en chantant « ho ho » et frappa fort. La porte s'ouvrit et apparut Jeffrey Lovell, qui aura 3 ans le 14 janvier. Jeffrey recula à cette vue. Sa mère le soutint et il s'accrocha à elle, toujours timide. « L'année dernière, il s'est enfui en pleurant », raconta sa sœur Barbara, âgée de 15 ans. Auparavant, elle avait dû courir après lui pour l'empêcher de souffler toutes les guirlandes. Les autres enfants Lovell, James, 13 ans, et Susan, 10 ans, observaient la scène avec beaucoup d'amusement. Finalement, le Père Noël et les enfan
Roger. W
Roger, Houston. È quello che stiamo cercando di fare. Sto cercando di ottenere 15 per un'ottica. È s
어머나, 카메라 좀 돌려줘 봐. 여기 엄청 크고 멋진 분
«Ап
Roger. Die Lichter kommen sehr gut zur Geltung
मैंने अभी प्री-लॉन्च से कैच-अप मोड में स्विच किया है। इससे कंप्यूटर की लाइट बंद हो गई। देखते हैं अब यह चालू होती है या नहीं। ठीक है। यह चालू हो गई है। अब हम पूरे कंप्यूटर को बंद करके 
Ich habe noch keine Aktualisierungen zur Abdockzeit erhalten; ich habe immer noch 100 Stunden und 15 Minute
收到。我给你格林威
Ok, Joe. Vediamo che ini
好的。现在，逆向发射
Яу отвечает очень хорошо. Бросок отвечает хорошо. Она очень хорошо поворачива
Okay. You want me to read out on MDC 3: BAT B voltage, PYRO A voltage, PYRO B voltage, command module injector tempe
글쎄,
他——他用的是LM S波段，尼尔，显然是这样
没错。没问题，Eagle。
로저입니다. 콜럼비아, 죄송하지만 몇 가지 말씀드리겠습니다. 첫째, 체크리스트의 Foxtrot 9 7 절차에 따라 데드밴드를 10도로 설정해 주시기 바랍니다. 둘째, 지속적으로 업데이트되는 화면이 아닌 고정된 화면을 유지해 주시면 감사하겠
それで待機してく
Was 
난 안 갈 거야.
अंतिम दिशा निर्धारण के लिए
Okay, Vance. Lass mich mal nachsehen, ob ich das hier habe. Ich möchte das 70-mm-DC-Hasselblad-80-mm-Objektiv in A-13 verwenden, mit 3400er Schwarzweißfilm MAGs R oder S. Die Kamera soll dann an den gewünschten Ort gebracht werden, und die Einste
好的。我们收到，你一声不吭就毁了我连续两
肯定在我下方。从卡那封附近开始，我就一直在追踪它。直到卡那封附近，它都在我们下方，然后升到地平线，之后又回到我们下方。它看起来几乎像是在和我不同的轨道上。它的远地点和近地点都和我不一样。总之，天亮后，我一确定它的位置就尝试接近它。正如我所说，当时它在我前方一两英里处——在我下方。所以，我越是努力接近，就越是难以拉近距离。我当时在进行逆向推进。我
Wi
わかりました。次はMAIN BUS AのRESETをオフにします。一つ飛ばして、FUEL 
Roger. Read you loud and clear.
فريندشيب سفن، فريندشيب سفن، هذه شركة كاليفورن
Roger. Nous avons détecté des erreurs sur votre ordinateur. Veuillez cliquer sur RÉINITIALISATION ERREU
わかった、ジャック。その時、月は32度を通過し
이쪽
Okay. Ich denke, die meisten stellen sich das Raumfahrtprogramm als eine Ansammlung exotischer Elektronik vor, und sicherlich trifft das auch größtenteils zu. Aber ich wollte Ihnen in diesem Zusammenhang ein paar weitere Punkte zeigen. Nach dem ersten Schritt erhält man eine sehr genaue Messung der verbleibenden Wassermenge im Behälter. Wir werden diesen Beutel, den ich Ihnen jetzt zeige, verwenden, um das restliche Wasser aufzufangen und zu sehen, wie viel tatsächlich noch vorhanden war. Hoffentlich können wir so bei zukünftigen Missionen die zulässige Nutzungsdauer dieser Einheiten noch etwas verlängern. Und in meiner anderen Hand halte ich den Mechanismus, mit dem wir die tatsächliche Wassermenge in diesem Beutel bestimmen. Ich würde dieses Gerät am besten als Fischwaage bezeichnen. Sie sehen, ich wiege mich gerade, und die Waage zei
Ok, Fred-o, come faccio ad aumentare il t
Roger. And got a couple of items that I would like to clean up. We will get you an budget. We've got one redline now; we are trying to get some firmer numbers for you, and we will have those in a little bit. Right now your usage is right on the flight plan line, so everything looks pretty good there. We want to get a crew status report from you. We would like to firm up the 2 flight plan idea; 
Gemini 4, это связь с це
と
现在真的很亮，不是吗？（​​码头灯
Impossibile attenuare sufficientemente il reticolo per un'acquisizione notturna. MARK di nuovo Grus, cioè delle stelle stesse nella finestra... Thaurus sta arrivando proprio attraverso la linea centrale. Potrei imbardare a destra di circa 5 gradi, il che soddisferebbe la stima. Poi rollare a sinistra di circa 5 gradi, il che è piuttosto grafico. Per un'osservazione retrospettiva, questa sembra un'ottima configurazione. Non ci saranno problemi di assetto di volo qui con la luna luminosa... luce
罗杰。乔治，我把宇航服冷却剂阀门设置在7号位
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। जब आप तैयार हों, हम आपको राज्य स्तर पर स्थिति का
Ora inizio a vedere l'alba nel periscopio. La prima luce nel periscopio durante questa particolare orbita è dovuta al lato notturno. È ovvio che il periscopio non ha alcuna funzione in retroattività sul lato nott
रॉज
…et il y a actuellement de n
罗杰。在比尔睡着之前，我们希望他现在就做一次二次蒸发排放系统检查，在他方便的时候随时都可以。如果我们碰巧无法
Roger. Et pour votre information, nous vous montrons actu
Apollo 8, this is Houston. Indications are that we are getting it; we are checking. You will have to leave the computer alone for 3 minute
Okay. Es dauert noch etwa zwei Minuten, bis wir anfangen. Also, du st
도중에 차단되
요각 지시계(yaw attitude indicator)를 만져보세요. 270도를 가리키는 요각 지시계를 만졌습니다. 수동 비상 조종률 레버도 만져보세요. 네, 만져보겠습니다. 손을 정확히 댔습니다. 이 테스트는 
わかっ
कोलंबिया, अगली बार जब आप वहां से गुजरें, तो सीधे 
Okay. La Terra è 
Roger. The burn time was on ti
Роджер. 10, /: 45597, минус 040, плюс 157, плюс 35189, минус 01513, минус 00346 180 007 000, Ноябрь Альфа плюс 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, звезда оси наблюдения Дельта Скорпиона (другое название — Дзуба) вниз 071, влево 45, плюс 0748 минус 16500 12995 36300; главная звезда Сириус, вторичная, Ригель, 129 155 010; четыре квадру, 15 секунд, пустое пространство; горизонт на линии окна 2,9 на T минус 3
यह नकारात्मक है। मैंने अभी दोनों को सात पर सेट किया है और सेटिंग बढ़ाने से सूट का तापमान कम ह
フレンドシップ・セブン、バ
아니요. 모든 게 순조롭게 진행되고 있어요. 6개월 동안 운전하게 된 것 같은데, 아주 만족합니다. 차 전체
Ricevuto. GET B 1 34 37; Delta-V, 2.9; tempo di combustione, 0 più 05; imbardata 0, beccheggio 0; Indirizzo 25, 90029; Indirizz
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है। मैंने उस समय कुछ नहीं कहा था। हम अभी आपके लिए कुछ पहलुओं पर विचार कर रहे हैं। नींद चक्र में फेरबदल के बारे में आपके पहले के प्रश्न के संदर्भ में, हम आपकी टिप्पणी से सहमत हैं। हम चाहते हैं कि चंद्र कक्षा में पहुँचने तक नींद चक्र आदि के संबंध में उड़ान योजना पर वापस आ जाएँ। इसलिए हम चाहते हैं कि आप नींद चक्रों को समायोजित करने के सबसे कुशल तरीके के बारे में अपने विवेक का उपयोग करें और इसे आपस में बाँट लें। हम चाहते हैं कि आप हमें इस बात की जानकारी देते रहें कि कौन क्या कर रहा है और आपकी क्या योजनाएँ हैं। एक उड़ान में 2 घंटे की देरी हो गई है। हम दूसरी उड़ान को पूरा करना चाहते हैं। अगर दूसरी उड़ान में कोई समस्या आती है, तो हम उसका समय भी समायोजित कर सकते हैं - मुझे लगता है कि इसमें दो और घंटे लगेंगे। अगर आप हमें बताएँगे कि जिम कब कुछ अवलोकन करने के लिए उपलब्ध होंगे, तो हम उनका समय समायोजित कर सकते हैं। सं
Okay. Prendi - Questo non sa
Следует отметить, что в 3:26:33 я наблюдаю в небе одновременно 10 частиц. Они, несомненно, кажутся мне светящимися. Они выглядят
Er hat das verstanden. David ist da; er sagt, du hättest ihn so beschäftigt gehalten, dass er die ganze Woche keine Zeit hatte,
هذا تسجيل من سفينة الصداقة السابعة. الكثير من الأوساخ على النوافذ من الحريق العكسي، ويبدو أن الكثير من الأشياء هنا، آه، ربما سحقنا بعض الحشرات حتى في طريقنا للصعود من المنصة. ربما يوجد دم على الجزء الخارجي من النافذة. هذا يجعل الأمر واقعيًا، ومن الصعب جدًا ملاحظة أي شيء عندما يتجهون نحو الجانب المشمس
... But I think because of this 100 percent oxygen where I kept assimilating it. I suspect that may
Roger. We have been working under the assumption that
روجر. تبدو الأمور على ما يرام من ناحية المسافة يا نيل. وسنعيد ضبط وضعيتك عندما تنتهي من تصوير البانوراما. أنت الآن تتحرك بسرعة كبيرة أثناء مسح البانوراما. سيتعين عليك 
यह अपोलो 8 है, जो आपको चंद्रमा से लाइव प्रसारण कर रहा है। हमें अब टीवी कैमरे बदलने पड़े हैं। हमने पहले आपको पृथ्वी का वह दृश्य दिखाया, जिसे हम पिछले 16 घंटों से देख रहे हैं। अब हम कैमरा बदल रहे हैं ताकि हम आपको चंद्रमा दिखा सकें, जिसके ऊपर हम पिछले 16 घंटों से 60 मील की ऊंचाई पर उड़ान भर रहे हैं। बिल एंडर्स, जिम लवेल और मैंने क्रिसमस से एक दिन पहले का दिन यहाँ प्रयोग करने, तस्वीरें लेने और अंतरिक्ष यान के इंजन चलाकर चारों ओर घूमने में बिताया है। अब हम उसी र
Hallo, Atlantikschiff. Freundsc
로저. 저는 자동 모드로 도킹했는데, 말씀드렸다시피 접촉 순간을 정확히 기억하지 못했습니다. 도킹 프로브 표시기를 계속 확인했죠. 세 개의 캡처 래치, 아니, 그냥 세 개의 래치가 제대로 걸렸다는 걸 나타내는 두 개의 바버폴 표시가 떴고, 소프트 도킹이 완료된 겁니다. 그때 상황은 아주 안정적으로 보였습니다. 그래서 프리 모드로 전환하고 창밖을 다시 봤는데 여전히 안정적이었
حسنًا. سنسمي هذا -1A، الخطوة 6، "التحويل إلى الطاقة
Okay. Wir setzen mitten auf 
Okay. Anschließend werden sie sich nähern, um den Mond – Entschuldigung, sie werden sich nähern, um das Servicemodul zu erfassen und ein Foto zu machen, und sie werden von nun an den ACA für Rotationen verwenden. Und Sie können möglicherweise gleichzeitig das fünfte Teleskop aus Fenster r
حسناً. هل تر
それらはコン
Bene, quello che avevamo pianificato era di usare il periodo di 10-11 ore come preparazione pre-combustione, proprio come avremmo fatto normalmente, e 
지금 넓고 푸른 지평선 띠가 보입니다. 현재 캡슐이 02 0700에 경과한 시점에서 이 띠는 태양 바로 아래 지름과 거의 같은 크기입니다. 태양 바로 아래에서의 두께는 태양의 지름과 같은 것으로 보입니다. 북쪽과 남쪽으로 갈
Jim, Houston. Your COMM got pretty garbled there just 
روجر. ما مدى أهمية المسح القمري الذي أجريناه بعد عمل
Roger. Als Nächstes d
With respect to the window, Houston: the windows 1 and 5 have moderate haze on them. Satisfactory for visual observation, but possibly not for photography. Windows 2 and 4 are clear. Window 
عينة الطوارئ موجودة في الجيب. نسبة الأكسجين لدي 81%. لا توجد أي مؤشرات تحذيرية، وأنا أس
Il semblerait que le réglage
Signal faible mais lisible, Friendship Seven. Tous les systèmes semblent fonctionner correctement. Tension artérielle: 125/90.
Okay, I'm stopping that blood pressur
Ich verste
Хорошо. Мы некоторое время видели, как капли б
حسنًا
We co
Okay. Bevor Sie sich abmelden, hätten wir gerne noch einige Anmerkungen von Ihnen bezüglich des Teleskops, des Se
Bene. A pagina 15, cambieremo l'intestazione "CHECKOUT" in "Verifica i seguenti interruttori", e quegli interrut
Okay, the fans have been cycled 2 minutes each and they
لقد حدث اصطد
TR-10 恢复正常。我之前已经试过了。好的，宇航服压力正常。再看一下逆变器。250 是 141 度，150 大约是 107 度。单独来看就足够了。备用压力是……7。差不多是环境压力。负值，甚至还有点……舱内压力大约是 5.3 psi，非常理想。宇航服顶盖温度是 72 度。舱内顶盖温度是 45 度，舱内保持稳定。宇航服温度大约是 64 度，我很满意。氧气压力是 60 psi（单位是百）。舱内
Джим, мы хотим,
Bene. Ora passiamo alla checklist pre-sonno. Per quanto riguarda il rapporto sullo stato dell'equipaggio, per quanto riguarda i farmaci, non ne abbiamo presi. E ci sentiamo tutti molto bene. Vi ho dato le letture di bordo. Jim sta clorando l'acqua potabile ora. Sono pronto per un dump di E-me
Ok, Jack. Parliamo di come raggiungere l'assetto e poi accendere il motore. Sto parlando delle tecniche di controllo. Per come stanno le cose ora, cercherò di fermare la navicella in imbardata con la Terra fuori dal finestrino, poi saremo in GUIDA o in CONTROLLO; saremo in imbardata e saremo in CONTROLLO MODALITÀ. Poi useremo il per controllare il beccheggio e poi il rollio. Non vedo un altro modo per controllare la combinazione che abbiamo qui senza usare il. P
Vorrei fare un piccolo commento sul sestante. Il suo utilizzo in una navicella spaziale angusta è molto difficile, soprattutto con il casco. Alla fine ho deciso che sarebbe stato inutile con il casco per cercare di catturare gli angoli richiesti dalle stelle. Così mi sono tolto il casco. Questo mi ha dato un po' più di flessibilità nell'uso, ma ero comunque limitato ad angoli di circa 20-23° senza manovrare la navicella. Quello che succedeva era che la stella veniva tagliata fuori dalla parte superiore della finestra. Ora, con manovre più frequenti e libere della navicella, si poteva manovrarla in modo da avere l'asse longitudinale della finestra nel piano di inseguimento. Eravamo in qualche modo limitati dal carburante e non abbiamo scelto di manovrare in questo modo. Abbiamo usato anche la modalità a impulsi, senza molte manovre. Le stelle selezionate per quella prova avevano angoli piuttosto elevati rispetto all'orizzonte e, quindi, erano molto difficili da ottenere. Alla fine abbiamo deciso di procedere e di avvicinare le stelle un po' di più all'orizzonte. Ne ho eseguiti un paio con Canopus e un paio con altri, come noterete. Il filtro blu sembrava bloccare completamente l'orizzonte; non avevo orizzonte quando l'ho usato. La nostra immagine dell'orizzonte probabilmente non è altrettanto buona quando c'è la luce della luna. Il filtro verde, invece, mi ha dato quello che considererei un orizzonte un po' più nitido rispetto a quello che avevo senza filtro. Ho pensato che non ci fossero difficoltà nell'effettuare queste misurazioni né con il filtro verde né con quello trasparente. Tuttavia, l'orizzonte non è molto ben definito e bisogna in un certo senso standardizzarsi e misurare sulla stessa parte dell'orizzonte che si era usata prima per ottenere una misurazione standard. Per me è stato
阿波罗8号
Houston CAP COM, this is Gemini 4. Looks like we're over Texas now,
Хорошо. Мои коллеги с эти
I'm getting a very good yaw check with the yaw reticle in the mode.
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मध्यमार्ग सुधार संभवतः 104 घंटे पर होगा, और हम केवल 4 से 6 फीट प्रति सेकंड के डेल्टा-वी की तलाश कर रहे हैं। ठीक है। यह पहला बिंदु है। अब, मैं आपको उपभोग्य सामग्रियों के बारे में जानकारी दूंगा। ठीक है। आपके पास 1498 - यानी 1498 एम्प-घंटे शेष हैं। इसका मतलब है कि 61 घंटों में आप - यह औसतन 24.5 एम्प्स होगा। हमें उम्मीद है कि पावर बंद होने के बाद, आप प्रति घंटे 14 या 14 एम्प्स का उपयोग करेंगे, और मिशन के अंत में 5
Apollo 11, Houston. Abbiamo scambiato
Dite loro che non abbiamo altro da fare se non ricontrollare qui p
Фред, с этим самодельным контейнером для гидроксида лития в командном модуле нам придётся сделать как минимум два и использовать по два за раз — по одному на каждый комплект шлангов. Мы подключим один из этих самодельных блоков к красным фитингам, воздух будет всасываться через гидроксид лития, а затем выдуваться через синий фитинг. Также, когда мы это сделаем, мы снимем контейнер с гидроксидом лития с петли скафандра, либо с основного, либо со вспомогательного. Мы сейчас 
वे आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं क
التاسع والعشرو
Alles klar. Die Umlaufgeschwindigkeit ist das, was mich beim Rollen stört. Ich habe sie noch nic
Definitely below me. I'd been tracking it below me from about Carnarvon on. Up until about Carnarvon we had it below us, and then up to the horizon, and then down below us again. It almost looked like it was in a different orbit than I was. It had a different apogee and perigee than what I did. Anyway, I attempted to close with it at daylight as soon as I could tell where it was. As I said, at that time it was a mile or two out in front of me - down below me. So, the more I tried to close, the less I really gained on it. I was firing retrograde. I was using my top thrusters to fire in such a manner as to decrease my total velocity, and then firing... at the same time. I never really closed, and it continued to pull away from me. It became obvious to me that by the time we got to Hawaii that to close on the booster in time to do the EVA with the booster would probably take all the fuel we had onboard. In the ground rule we had agreed not to do this. So I checked with CAP COM and we decided to not go ahead with the booster portion of the mission. I don't know if I mentioned it, but when we separated from the booster, it seemed like our rates on the booster were low, on the order of a half a degree a second in pitch and yaw. I tried to damp these. I fired one impulse in each direction, and then I concentrated on coming off the booster. We came off, and we came off in the manner in which we generated some other rates. We came right-side-up, eventually, and turned around. Probably about a minute and a half or two minutes. It looked like the big problem was the time I took out to semi-aline the platform before we went into the dark side. We'd probably gotten right on top of the booster instantaneously. If I'd ignored the platform we would have been able to go ahead and complete it. On the other hand, I wanted to make sure we had a reasonably good alinement prior to getting to our 2-1 GO-NO GO point in case anything we
Ti farò ancora u
Прямо зде
يا برج الجوزاء، هذه هيوستن. هذا مجرد تقدير تقريبي لاستخدام نظام إدارة العمليات الخارجية (OAMS).
هذا صحيح. حسنًا. السطر 4 أ
알겠습니다. 저희가 자이로 토크 각도 정보를 몇 가지 준비했
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir arbeiten an der genauen Uhrzeit. Wir sollten Ihnen vorher Bescheid geben kön
काश मैंने कल रात शेव कर ली होती
ठीक है। हम शिफ्ट बदलने की तैयारी कर रहे हैं, और इससे पहले मैं कुछ बातों पर चर्चा करना चाहता था। अभी, ऐसा लग
روجر، هيوستن. لقد عادت النسر إلى مدارها، بعد أن غادرت قاعدة ترانكويليتي وتركت وراءها نسخة طبق الأصل من شعار أبول
はい
ठीक है। सुनिए, क्या ह्यूस्टन को सूचित कर दिया 
سنعرض لكم الآن ا
하지만 여전히 음높이
现
Friendship Seven, Friendship Seven, hier spricht Muchea Com Tech, Anruf über HF und UHF. Friendship Seven, hier spricht Muchea Com Tech. Können 
Okay. Wir haben endlich die richtige Skala dafür gefunden. – Ich muss kurz in die VOX-Aufzeichnung. Die Skala für das Dosimeter stimmt – und es zeigt einen Wert von etwa 0,04 an, also weniger als 0,1. Ich setze das Dosimeter jetzt wieder auf die Luke –
Vor
所有姿态都运行良好。宇航服热穹顶温度约为 72 度，宇航服进气口温度约为 63 度，略有下降。这架宇航服的最佳飞行设置大约在 7.5 到 8 之间。我会再调高一档到 8。我已经将宇航服冷却液流量调节器设置为 8 档
제미니 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 레트로파이어 이후에는 저희와 연락이 되지 
Ok, 8. Vogliamo fare una piccola esercitazione qui sul campo per assicurarci di poter scaricare il nastro e riportare la parte vocale a Houston in tempo utile. Quindi abbiamo intenzione di scaricare il tuo nastro e proveremo la procedura sul campo per riportarlo qui e ascoltarlo. Crediamo di avere già qual
ठीक है। पैनल 3 पर: ट्रांसपोंडर को प्राइमरी पर सेट करें; पावर एम्पलीफायर को प्राइमरी पर सेट करें; पावर एम्पलीफायर को हाई पर सेट करें; वॉइस मोड को ऑफ पर सेट करें; पावर को नॉर्मल पर सेट करें; पीएमपी को नॉर्मल पर स
了解。9-チャーリー137。2+02。01日03時間40分03秒。13+05。93 00 00。GMTRC 01日、04 36 1
로저. 버즈, 5번
लगभग 179 मील पर हमारा लॉक-ऑन हो गया था, और रडार बोरसाइटेड लगभग 156 मील पर हो गया; और सुइयाँ अपेक्षाकृत स्थिर हैं; वे ठीक दिख रही हैं। यॉ सुई आगे-पीछे हिल रही है, शायद प्लस या माइनस 1 डिग्री। और यहाँ एक बात ध्यान देने वाली है कि हमें अवशिष्टों को खत्म करने में परेशानी हो रही है। हम अवशिष्टों को कम संख्या तक लाते हैं, और फिर अगली रीडिंग में वे बढ़ जाते हैं, और अगली रीडिंग में वे कम हो जाते हैं। यह बताना मुश्किल है
ह्यूस्टन, यह ईगल में अपोलो एलएम है - ईगल में अपोलो 11, और मुझे पूरे लैंडिंग क्षेत्र का एक सुंदर
了解しました。1でターゲット90を撮影
罗杰。在大泄压前大约 12 分钟，有一个小型持续排
로저. 나도 여러 번 시
आपका ECT म
Aurora Seven... 95. Your landing point is 200 miles long.
- - and the launch - vehicle guidance are both looking to be in good shape. We estimate you have better than a 99-percent probability of a guidance cut-off on the launch vehicle. So, things are apparently holding in very well. For your information, MLA received approximately 1 minute of a usable TV picture; so, apparently the system is working. You're a little over a minute from LOS 
Хорошо. У нас есть еще один входной сигнал, 11, что данные можно распознать как изображение, но у нас нет оце
11
好的。燃烧时间可能不到一
Je suis en VOX – c'est exact, je vais utiliser la fonction
Und, Houston, Tranquility Base möchte Ihnen ein paar Anmerkungen zur geologischen Frage von gestern Abend geben. Wir befinden uns in einem relativ glatten Kraterfeld mit länglichen, kreisförmigen Sekundärkratern, von denen die meisten unabhängig von ihrer Größe einen Rand aufweisen. Das trifft jedoch nicht überall zu. Es gibt einige kleinere Krater, die keinen erkennbaren Rand haben. Der Boden in diesem Gebiet besteht aus sehr feinem Sand bis hin zu Schluff. Ich würde sagen, dass er auf der Erde am ehesten mit Graphitpulver vergleichbar wäre. In diesem Boden finden sich Gesteine ​​unterschiedlichster Formen, Größen und Texturen – abgerundete und kantige –, viele mit unterschiedlicher Konsistenz. Wie bereits erwähnt, habe ich reinen Basalt und blasigen Basalt gesehen. Andere weisen keine Kristalle auf, einige haben kleine weiße Einsprenglinge, vielleicht ein bis weniger als fünf Prozent. Und der Felsblock – wir befinden uns in einem Geröllfeld, wo die Blöcke 
نحن في محطة 
いいえ。
The big problem here is, when you move the TV around, this wire follows you like a
एक्वेर
Là, je vois une zone éclairée. Très bien éclairée. On dirait un aéroport. Il faudrait 
好的，好的。我准备开始操作了。回答我的时候，请对着麦克风大声点，因为我们的下行链路噪音比较大。首先，我们要你做的是，我们先在一个罐子上操作，然后再在第二个罐子上重复一遍。拿起其中一个罐子，沿着热封线剪掉外包装袋；小心点，尽量靠近热封线，因为如果损
ठीक है। अगल
好
ああ。そうするって言ってたよね？さて、あと10秒。最後の1分間は手動ヒーターのスイッチを押しっぱなしにしてたんだ。圧力は825に保た
Das ist bejahe
अपोल
麻省理工学院的人们可能会注意到，下一组星空照片将由首席导航员戴着太空头
Ok. È affermativo. Quindi, in termini generali, quello che dovremo fare è accendere il e far apparire la palla otto, quindi impostare l'assetto, posizionare il nel finestrino anteriore e il controllo di guida 
ここの窓はきれいなので、あ
Der Blutdruck
这里是
Это «Сиг
了解、ジャック。パネル3、ACインバーター2、メインB、インバーター2、ACバス2、オン、ACバス2リセットでリセット、センター、バッテリーチャージャーをA、ACインジケーターセレクトをバッテリーチャージャーに設定。最初の30分間は10分ごとにアン
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस
11番
حسنًا، في تلك الطل
Хорошо. Всё верно, Джек. Перейдём к странице 1-10. И на панели 
Roger. Nous avons une approche télévisuelle à vous proposer si vous êtes
I'm gla
जी हां। हम यहां आपको एक ऐसी स्थिति में लाने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं जिससे आप अपनी गति को कम कर सकें और इससे बाहर निकल सकें। और यह वह स्थिति है जो म
알겠습니
Roger, Mike. Vous pouvez activer votre système logique quand vous le souhaitez, et nous vous donnerons le feu vert po
사실, 여기서 아래쪽으로 섬들이 훤히 보이고, 그 너머 지역 호텔도
Okay. Bitte wa
Jack, your cabin REGs are
حسنًا. تفضل؛ اقرأ أي
ठीक है। क्षेत्र 27-2 96. 2+02. 08 27 55. 6+35. 10+58. क्षेत्र 28-2: ΔV 111. 2+20. 10 02 54. 4+50. 9+39. क्षेत्र 29-2: ठीक है, यह एक विभाजित ΔV है। आगे 66. पीछे 61. 1+48. 1+17. GMTRC 11 37 05. 3+43. 08+59. क्षेत्र 24-डेल्टा: ΔV 89. 1+53. 03 45 30. 11+03. क्षेत्र 25-डेल्टा: 86. 1+49. 05 19 09. 09+51. 26
太阳光会从这个结构上反射。加上这个装置，那台望远镜几乎没用了。我觉得，如果我们必须用望远镜观测，MPAD提供的那些星图会很有用。我们可以用它们作为参考，比如，“嗯，那边那个亮光点肯定是那颗星，因为那就是我们
음, 어쩌면 첫 번째 방법을 사용하는 
मैं अभी ग्रस तारामंडल को देख रहा हूँ, और उसके तारे काफी स्पष्ट दिखाई दे रहे हैं, यहाँ तक कि चौथी और पाँचवीं परिमाण के छोटे तारे भी... शाम के इस समय और रात में, आकाश बिल्कुल काला होता है और तारे साफ दिखाई दे
Okay. We've got a telescope alignment if you'd like to give it a try.
로저, 수신했습니다. 잠시 기다려 주시면 감사하겠습니다. 연료를 아끼려고 
Okay. Apollo 11 remains the prime story with the world awaiting your landing today at about 11 49 a.m. Houston time. In Washington, House tax reformers have fashioned a provision which would make it impossible for wealthy individuals to avoid income tax entirely through tax free investments or special allowances. Under the proposal tentatively adopted by the House Ways and Means Committee, everyone would pay taxes on at least half of their i
コピーする準備は
Oh, I thought maybe you'd want me to do a to go shoot pictures or
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Не могли бы вы сообщить нам знак
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। कमरे में सरसरी नज़र डालने पर सभी सिस्टम एकदम सही लग रहे हैं। आपको मात्रा के बारे में क्वाड अपडेट मिल गया है, तो वह जानकारी आपके पास है। ऑक्सीडाइज़र फीड-लाइन का तापमान और ईंधन का तापमान दोनों 73 डिग्री पर हैं। क्रायो प्रोफाइल बैटरी A के लिए चल रहा है - हमारे अनुमान के अनुसार 39.63 एम्प घंटे। बैटरी B के लिए 37.94 और बैटरी चार्ली के लिए 38.46। COMM गुणवत्ता और सर्किट मार्जिन के मामले में अनुमान से बेहतर प्रदर्शन कर रहा है। 
好的，格斯。一会
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Перед нача
1
好的。我
Okay. Number one on the list of things is that the flight plan shows CDR should hit the sack. Number two, kind of a summary of your burn. All your and systems look GO. The trajectory shows that you have a CPA with a mode of 69.67 miles and the time of pericynthion is. You do have a capture on a good free return. It's a little bit early to completely evaluate the trajectory for corridor control. You'll have no update to the plus 11 block data. After looking through the curves, it looks like the battery-vent pressure is actually zero at 0.2 to 0.3 volts, so that - we agree with you there, and you can go ahead with the water dump. We still have the COMM check to do whenever we get ourselves in a good high gain look angle a
После того, как мы снизили скорость вращения двигателя до уровня, при котором посчитали, что можем безопасно отстыковаться, мы это сделали и как можно быстрее отошли от «Агены» со скоростью несколько футов в секунду. Мы наблюдали, как уровень топлива снизился с 50 до менее чем 30 процентов. После отключения системы OAMS и при сохранении режима работы с регулируемым питанием и выключенными клапанами двигателей, мы продолжали движение; мы активировали систему RCS. Система ACME не работала, и мы постепенно восстановили у
Roger. Mein Zustand ist gut, der Zustand der Kapsel ist gut. Ich befinde mich im Driftflug mit manueller Steuerung. Die Gyroskope sind deaktiviert. Der Treibstoffstand liegt bei 45–42 Prozent, der Sauerstoffgehalt bei 79–100 Prozent. Die Temperaturen an den Dampfventilen betragen jetzt 65 Grad; die Anzugtemperatur ist erfreulich gesunken. Es sind jetzt 62 Grad, und die Energieversorgung ist in Ordnung. Der Blutdruck beginnt jetzt zu steigen. Ich habe gerade einige Fotos vom MIT gemach
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप
11, ici Houston. Suite à la purge effectuée par le système de gestion des eaux usées, nous avons conclu que votre capteur de débit d'oxygène est effectivement défectueux. Comme je l'ai mentionné lors de votre explication concernant la vidange cyclique de l'accumulateur d'eau, même si le système fonctionnait, indiquant probablement un débit plus élevé, ce débit ne semblait pas suffisant. Compte tenu de cela et du débit actuel, nous avons conclu que le transducteur est défectueux. Nous allons maintenir l'injection d'oxygène pendant environ une heure, puis l'arrêter au bout de 31 heu
Et, Vance, nous prévoyons de commencer la mise en marche à [date manquante]. Est-ce le bon moment ou pensez-vous que nous devrions attendre encore 
Хорошо. Первый пример, который я вам дам
وأنا كذلك، حسناً. لماذا نتحرك أصلاً الآن؟
Roger. The burn time was on time - about 2 seconds; we have residual 4.4 X. We burned it out to 0.2. Attitudes are nominal. The C before the residuals were taken out was a
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。设置OMNI Charlie。完
हेलो, हवाई कॉम टेक। क्या आपक
시간 상관관계 때문에 조종실에 붉은 빛이 너무 많습니다.
Ok, Houston. Decollo più 15: 015:00, 5622, meno 165, 0
是的，我们应该买250——我
偏航角现在大约为0度——标记。T. 我会看看——
Rice
روجر، هيوستن. سأتحدث قليلاً عن نظام تتبع البصريات لدينا. استخدمتُ خاصية "البصريات التلقائية" لنقطتي التحكم 1 و2 على الجانب الخلفي، وقد عملت بكفاءة عالية، حيث تتبعت الهدفين بدقة. ثم انتقلتُ إلى نقطة التحكم 3 المحددة في دليل التحكم المدار
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Könne
ठीक है, कुंभ राशि; ह्यूस्टन। अब आप एक-एक करके आ रहे हैं। कृपया ध्यान दें कि मैंने शुरुआती मानों और टिप्पणियों को छोड़कर बाकी सब कुछ सुन लिया है। कृपया उ
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 지금 
Хорошо, Джек, повтори эт
Il va fallo
ترانكويليتي، هذه هيوستن. 
Roger. Copy. 2.
잭, 2번 탱크에
रॉजर। मैंने H2 1 और 2 और O2 1 पर पहले ही 2 मिन
여기는 프
Eagle, Houston. Könnten S
أبولو 8، هيوستن. يمكنك إيق
जब तक मैं यहाँ अपना खून बहाना खत्म नहीं कर लेता, तब तक इंतज़ार करो। ठीक है, मेरा काम हो गया। ठीक है, अब तुम अपने
यूएचएफ रिले ठीक
मैं इसे
こんにちは、水星回復部隊の皆さん。オーロラ・セブンをどう読
Roger. I am a little sloppy on the roll as you may see. No strain
11, Хьюстон. За последние 2 часа мы наблюдаем неболькое, но устойчивое повышение парциального давления
Roger. that
ठीक है। धन्यवाद, चार्ली। अब बिना किसी और कार्रवाई के बत्ती बुझ
ジェミニ4、ヒューストンCAP
क्या नहीं हुआ
यह कानो कैप कॉम अंधे में संचारित कर रहा है
لدي اتصال صوتي صاعد بالمركبة الفضائية؛ أما ال
罗杰，Rev 33，运行 4，开始时间 19:43:00，那是日落时间。结束时间 0-20。我重复一遍，20:19:00，那是日出时间。收到
好的，弗雷德。很好。
わかった。いいぞ。やってみよう。もしかしたら全部話が終わって、
No, questa cosa non ha, ah, praticamente nessuna velocità indicata, Deke, ma or
Фреду пора начинать пои
좋아요. 그렇게 하
Demain, Charlie, nous allons réorganiser notre rangement au plus près de la configuration nominale. Voici quelques éléments qui ne seront pas conformes: les visières ont été remises dans le module de commandement, mais nous n'avons pas encore trouvé leur emplacement. Nous vous indiquerons où elles seront rangées. 
أراهن على ذلك. إذا لم يكن لديك ما تفعله، فلديّ رسما
안녕하세요, 
D'accord. On y a déjà pensé. On y a pensé très tôt. On va remettre le pack événementiel dans le passage de roue, côté passager, et le 
C'est exact. Nous souhaitons croiser les informations que nous recevons avec les vôtres afin de pouvoir, si possible, mettre à jour la plateforme. En fait, Jim, notre objectif est de déterminer si nous pouvons établi
ठीक है। जब भी आपको समय मिले, कृपया जाकर स्वीकार कर लें। हम आपके W मैट्रिक्स को अपडेट करने जा रहे हैं। और जब भी आपको मौका मिले, हम पैनलों के बारे 
Хорошо. Он смотр
Bon, Gene, je vais commencer par t'expliquer le fonctionnement de la combinaison pour que tout le monde soit tranquille. La température du dôme est de 72 degrés. L'entrée d'air est à 66 degrés et le réglage de la combinaison est sur 8. Je suis très satisfait du circuit de la combinaison po
好的。现在我们要把上行链路切换到语音备份，大约两分钟。你可能会听到语音丢失的提示音，大概需要几秒钟。所以你可以把上行遥
哎，我们的水快用
Friendship 
こちらはフレンドシップセブン。ダメでした。最後のラウンドでは、問題に追われていたので食べませんで
روجر. بعد حوالي 148 ساعة، إذا لم تكن قد فعلت ذلك بالفعل، 
حسنًا. وسأطلعكم على آخر المستجدات. الاختبار الأول هو اختبار الصوت والنطاق في وص
据美联社报道，华盛顿州西雅图、俄勒冈州波特兰、
아니요, 놓쳤어요. 마치 커다란 팔이 튀어나온 것처럼 보였어요. 잠깐 동안만 잡고 있었는데, 영화 카메라로 몇 장 찍고 하셀블라드로 한 장 찍었어요. 그런데 프리 드리프트 상태였고
Es sieht so aus, als wären es vielle
Okay. GUIDANCE CONTROL,; MODE CONTROL to ATT HOLD. clears. Okay. We've got to get that 
Роджер. Кажется, всё в порядке. Всё выглядит хорошо. Автоматический режим заправки заполнился на 55 процентов. Пролетаю 70 000 футов, 65 000. Положение самолёта очень стабильное. Приближаюсь к 60 (тысячам). Система управления скоростью работает отлично. Приближаюсь к 50 (тысячам). Выглядит отлично. Приближаюсь к 45 000. Перегрузка упала примерно до 1 g. Готовлюсь к резкому ускорению на 40, 41 (тысяче). Я ускоряюсь, и самолёт вылетает. Слышно, но я не вижу из-за облаков. Положение самолёта хорошее. Ручной рычаг включен. Топливо расходуется довольно быстро. Теперь я вижу самолёт. Выглядит очень хорошо. Я собираюсь включить
Dieser Anstellwinkel we
Le courant de la batterie C était de 2 ampères et la tension de la batterie A, 
Ber
La luce di ign
Okay, wir wollen eine 10. Los geht's – Wollt ihr
أبولو 8. هيوستن
好的。我们转到 Surface 60，然后在页面中间，在“发射引导系统建议”之后
अब उन सभी का स
Bene. Abbiamo tre fotocamere qui, due delle quali da usare per scattare foto dalla finestra numero 5, e una da usare dalla finestra numero 5. Per prima cosa, parlerò delle fotocamere. E questa fotocamera di cui parlo ora ha la priorità assoluta. È considerata quella che offre i risultati migliori. Si tratta della fotocamera DC Reseau da 70 millimetri, Hasselblad, con l'obiettivo da 80 millimet
Hallo Apollo 11, Hous
알겠습니다. 프레드오를 붙이고 
OK, Houston. On aimerait bien trouver un moyen de régler le minuteur de notre mission ici, Ja
मै
Roger. We saw you come up over the horizon and it looks like yo
Ers
아주 좋습니다. 현재 케이프 커내버럴과는 연락이 닿지 않지만, 그쪽에서 비행 제어 문제에 대해 좀 더 자세
他一直
アップリンクでBATが約33.5%でした。速すぎま
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Осталось около 40 секунд, и здесь всё выглядит х
Oka
रॉजर। मैंने आपकी बात साफ़-साफ़ समझ ली
C4 est éteint; B3 est éteint. Le transpondeur 
数量読み取りスイッチを ECS O2 の位置に切り替えて、移動するように指示されるまでそのままにしておくのはどうでしょうか
Ok
Voici une petite information intéressante, plutôt encourageante. Il semblerait qu'à Ann Arbor, dans le Michigan, un nouveau gang de jeunes ait fait son 
इस डॉक कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में एक दिलचस्प बात यह है कि कमांड मॉड्यूल डॉकिंग प्रोब बिल्कुल बीच में स्थित है - बल्कि डॉकिंग लाइट डिटेंट के ठीक बीच में है। और जब सूरज की तेज रोशनी पड़ती है, तो इससे काम करना वाकई मुश्किल
Doesn't have to be really... over that the only thing we're... we can just take the sc
هذا غير صحيح. انتظر. كل ما نريده يا جاك هو إيقاف شحن البطارية حاليًا. سنكمل هذه العملية حالما تنتهي من ال
रॉजर। मैं समझ गया - स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप की तुलना में सेक्स्टेंट का उपयोग करके ट्रैकिंग 
这里是友
好的。我重新读了一遍：监测二次蓄压器液位；二次乙二醇散热器阀，正常模式保持30秒，然后切换至旁通模式。如果二次蓄压器液位没有下降，则将二次乙二醇散热器阀切换至正常模式。二次冷却液循环泵，AC 1 或 2。3分钟后，确认二次乙二醇排放压力在39至51 psig之间。确认二次蒸发器出口温度是否发生变化。关闭二次冷却液循环泵。将二次乙二醇散热器阀切换至旁通模
क्या तुम उन बच्
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티입니다. 지난번 관측에서 카펠라를 사용했는데, 가장자리에 꽤 가깝더군요. 4번 위치 중심에서 상당히 멀리 떨어져 있습니다. 1번 별인 알페라츠를 사용하는 게 나을지 고민 중입니다. 
Roger, Columbia. Ici Houston. Dites quelque chose. Ils devraien
好的，休斯顿；水瓶座。我们似乎已经到了——到了
はい、本当に素晴らしいですね。あれほど騒がしい音がなくて嬉しいです。ジム、私が何をしたいのかお話ししましょう。先ほど言ったように、今は詳細な手順はお伝えしません。まもなく、以下の形式で手順をお伝えする予定です。まず、タイムライン、いわば飛行計画のようなものを用意します。そこには、す
알겠습니다. 아직 락온이 되지 않았으니 270 신호를 보내기 전에 기다려야 한다는
- 
1号氧气罐270磅，270；2号氧
Roger, 11. Nella colonna A a pagina F2-20, riga 5, riga 05, i nuovi dati sono 01042; riga 07, i nuovi dati sono 00256. Saltiamo alla riga 11, 00070; la riga 12 è 00042; la riga 13 è 77730. Nella colonna Bravo, le righe 3, 4 e 5, che sono vuote, dovrebb
Это утвердительно, 1, /: 62844 1, исправление, минус 161, плюс 129, минус 29840
أبولو 11، هيوستن. 
मुझे उस चीज़ को खींचना बिल्कुल पसंद नहीं है। दूसरा विकल्प 
إيجل، كولومبيا. أود العودة إلى وضعية 
好的。准备好
好的，看起来不错。奇怪的是，你打电话
روجر. هذا ما أردت
好了，开始吧。电子设备电源，关闭……面板 8。所有 16 个开关，关闭。内部数字照明，关闭；内部集成照明，关闭
التقطتُ للتو لقطةً لبعض مراحل تشكّل العواصف الر
م
حسنًا. R1 + 27
نحن نعمل 
是的，
هيوستن. بخصوص تعليقك عن الفرس وهي تقترب من التضاريس - تضاريس جبلية، هل هذا انطباع يشبه تدفق الحمم البركانية حول نتوء صخري 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。数据转储完成，这是您的电脑
11, Houston. Ora ti abbiamo ripreso con il guadagno elevato. Hai capito t
Roger. Concernant le premier point, nous 
罗杰
Tranquility, 
好的。输入：太平洋中部区域，357 152 359 268，加上 0813，减去 16503 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028，不适用四次，换句话说，DL MAX、DL MIN、VL MAX 和 VL MIN——
Верно, «Аполлон-8». И вскоре у нас будет для вас еще пара моментов. Сейчас мы работаем над пролётом мимо звёзд. И мы собираемся ещё немного поговорить с вами о проблеме наблюдения за звёздами с помощью секстанта и телескопа. И как только чёрная команда прибудет на MOKR (пока здесь две команды), мы хотели бы получить от вас краткий обзор того, что вы видите, а что нет, и при каких условиях, и попытаться определить это так, чтобы все здесь понимали, о 
Okay, Jack. What they'd like you to do on this at 49 hours, they've been o
Roger. Panel rundown follows: The fuse switches on the left panel are all as previously reported, without repeating them again. Squib is armed. Auto Retrojettison is off. Mode Select is normal, auto, gyro normal. All "T" Handles are in. The Retro Delay is normal, Cabin lights are on both. I have the red filters on, of course. The Telem low frequence is on. Rescue Aids is auto. All sequence panel items are normal except the Landing Bag to the center-off position. Fuel is 90-100 [percent]. Attitude indications are 5 [degrees] right, 3 [degrees] left, 36 [degrees] down. EPI is indicating fairly well, indicating almost over Woomera at present time. Time from launch on my mark will be 58 plus 15. Standby-MARK. Retrograde time
シグマ・セブン。客室気圧と高度計
우리는 그렇게 하지 
D'accord, Frank. C'est l'un des points que nous examinons actuellement. La diffusion devrait s'arrêter à environ [insérer la durée], et nous envisageons de la prolonger de quelques minutes pour inclure la vue du terminate
حسنًا. لم أسمع علامة زائد أو
نرى بوضوحٍ تامٍّ العلاقة بين الحبل السريّ والمقبض، يا باز. نراك تُكبّر الآن على أحد الملصقات. مكتوبٌ عليه: "لإعادة الضبط، افتح المقبض؛ أغلقه خلف المقبض واسح
سوف يتقلص ح
Es wird Z
مرحب
请代我们感谢所有在现
Je n'ai même pas t
收到。稍等片刻。他们
روجر. تقرير الحالة. لقد أرسلت لك عينة دم. جميع الأنظمة تعمل بشكل سليم، باستثناء دائرة البدلة، والتي أعمل عليها بحرص. أنا في وضعية التراجع؛ الجيروسكوبات تعمل بشكل طبيعي؛ المنا
그리고 현재로서는 황도광을 거의 또는 전혀 볼 수
Roger. Would you ver - We've lost COMM with you for about the last 10 minutes. Would you verify that the S band t
네. 그리고 이제 태양이 렌즈 안으로 들어올 것 같으니 카메라를 옮겨야겠
コロンビア、ヒューストン。君たちの対応があまりにも早すぎるようだから、投棄時間を130
收到。还有几项需要处理。我们会给您一份预算。目前我们有一个修改后的版本；我们正在努力为您提供更确切的数字，稍后会给您。目前您的使用情况正好在飞行计划范围内，所以一切看起来都不错。我们需要您提供一份机组状态报告。我们想最终确定双飞行计划方案；在您方便的时候，我们想读取机长和机组人员的读数，然后请您交换一下。我们正在努
Okay. Following Tommy Jacobs, we have the hot smoking word from a local Houston astrologer by the name of Ruby Graham. She says that all the signs are right for your trip to the Moon. Neil is clever, Mike has good judgment, and Buzz can work out intricate problems. She also says Neil tends to see the world through rose colored glasses but is always ready to help the afflicted or distressed. Neil, you are also supposed to have "intuition that enables you to interpret life with feeling," Buzz is supposed to be very sociable and cannot bear to be alone in addition to having excellent critical ability. Since sh
रॉजर। जी हाँ, बिल्कुल। संकेत मिल रहे हैं कि सिस्टम थोड़ा गर्म होने लगा है और हमे
罗杰。我理解岩芯管内岩芯潮湿的总体感觉。下一个问题：我们已将您在对该区域进行总体描述之前的评论复制下来。我们
We're getting their ligh
여기는 프렌
D'accord. Comprenez que vous avez terminé. L'étape suivante du plan de vol est un 
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Vorremmo che r
A steady strea
Я думаю о ра
ज़्यादा फ़र्क़ नहीं पड़ा। मैं पहले 2 इंच तक तो आसानी से ठोक पाया, लेकिन फिर जै
Привет, 11. Мы 
Roger, John. Sono appena uscito dalla configurazione di spegnimento, in cui avevamo l'inverter spento. È tornato in buone condizioni e rimarrà acceso per il resto del volo. Gli ampere e i volt sono corretti. Gli ampere sono scesi a circa 19 ampere, dopo l'acce
……云。它们看起来像层云，但确实对天气有一定影响。我想知道所有这些天气现象是否都会出现在夏威
Roger. We're showing some garb
I have some pretty stars in sight, and also I have the little white objects t
Roger. Seven. Your (recovery area) 2-1 retros
MSC-2 と -3 は、04 19 40 にオフになります。残念ながら、星を眺めるのに夢中になりすぎて、適切な時間にオフにすることを忘れ
よくやっ
Aurora Seven from Indian Cap Com. Your blood pressure on your... fairly high and you are supposed to, if possible, give a blood pressure over Ind
我得弄点光才能看清氧气表。这样可
ठीक है। थोड़ी देर मे
OK, panneau de disjoncteur 11 UPDATA LINK, FERMÉ; AMPLIFICATEUR DE PUISSANCE PRINCIPAL, panneau 
Род
11, ह्यूस्टन। लगता है अगले कुछ घंटों तक यहाँ काफी आराम का समय रहेगा। अगले कुछ घंटों में हम आपको PAD (पैडल ऑफ द डे) की जानकारी देंगे और आपको अपडेट करते रहेंगे। 
Roger. Stiamo osservando il centro della
제 생각엔 그럴 것 같은데, 다시 확인해 볼게요. 아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴. 네, 
Роджер. Поймите, мы ожидаем, что на 63-м обороте будет 81, 125. Примерно в это время нам п
सूर्यास्त का नज़ारा काफ़ी मनमोहक है, मुझे नहीं लगता कि मुझे इसे देखने में ज़्यादा समय बर्बाद करने की ज़रूरत है। यह बहुत दिलचस्प है। दूसरी बात, यह देखना भी दिलचस्प है कि जब आँखें इसके अनुकूल नहीं होतीं तो यह कितना काला दिखता है। मुझे खिड़की पर कुछ परत साफ़ दिखाई दे रही है। इस समय मैं UHF-hi में VOX पर वापस जा रहा हूँ ताकि ट्रांसमिट कर सकूँ। दाहिने माइक्रोफ़ोन को पोंछने के लिए विज़र खोल रहा हूँ। मैंने इसे चाट लिया था। विज़र बंद कर रहा हूँ। सूट
Roger, die hatte ich auch, aber 17-1 habe ich vorher ni
Хорошо. Я просто хотел узнать, как дела дома. Все
روجر. من مكتب الشؤون العامة: لا تزال مهمة أبولو 11 تتصدر الأخبار في جميع أنحاء العالم. أربع دول فقط، هي الصين الشيوعية، وكوريا الشمالية، وفيتنام الشمالية، وألبانيا، لم تُبلغ مواطنيها بعد برحلتكم وهبوطكم على سطح القمر. قال أحد الصحفيين إنه لم يعد لديه كلمات لوصف نجاحكم. من المقرر أن يشاهد الرئيس نيكسون الليلة مباراة البيسبول في واشنطن. بعد المباراة، سيتوجه إلى منطقة عمليات الإنقاذ في المحيط الهادئ. مساء الأربعاء، سينتقل من جزيرة جونستون بطائر
रॉजर। मैं
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。2号機のGO、全システムGO。評価は
好的，接受。杰克，你可以继续进行光学强
Ricevuto. Tra circa 10 secondi, mancano 19 minuti all'ac
Roger. We're just sitting around waiting for something to do. We need a state vector, a REFSMMAT before we can proceed on with the AGS, and we need you to watch our DAP data load, gi
了解しました。EEPでは、バッテリーAは38.95アンペア時間、バ
لا أعتقد أن هذا كان القصد يا بيل. ما كان يدور في أذهانهم هو أن لدينا مبادل حراري للبدلة على كلا الدائرتين؛ وإذا انخفضت درجة الحرارة كثيرًا، يمكنك استخدام مفتاح اللوحة لإيقاف الدائرة الرئيسية عبر المبادل الحراري. ولكن على أي حال، سيكون هناك دائمًا تدفق إلى مبادل حرارة البدلة. أدرك أننا سنقوم بإيقاف المبادل الحراري الثانوي مسبقًا ثم إعادة تشغيله قبل الدخول، ولكن الفكرة كانت أن تكون كلتا الدائرتين، الرئيسية 
Okay. We have some notes on that. Listen
Х
حسنًا يا مايك، ما حدث هو أنك كنت تراقب، وفي الخطوة 7 دخلت إلى NOUN 01، وأدخلت العنوان ثم INFORMATION INFORMATION؛ وعند الضغط على زر الإدخال الأخير 35400 ENTER، مباشرةً بعد ذلك، أعادك ذلك إلى 16. ثم عندما ضغطت على زر الإدخال، كنت تُدخل المعلومات في وحدة التحكم بالشاشة (CDU)؛ وعندما حصلت على المدخلين في السجلين 1 و2، حدث تغيير فوري في وحدة التحكم بالشاشة، ونظر النظام إلى ذلك ورأى ما اعتقد أنه لديه. يا إلهي، لقد حصلت على معدل 600 درجة في الثانية. وقام النظام بتشغيل النفاثات لمحاولة خفض هذا المعدل. ومرشحات المعدل التي يراقبها - حسنًا، المعدل الذي يراقبه مُصفّى، لذا فهو لا يستشعر المعدل الفعلي إلا بعد أن يتراكم بالفعل، ثم يبدأ بقراءة مرشحات المعدل، ويقول: "حسنًا، لم يكن لديّ 600 درجة فعلًا". فيقوم بإيقافه ويحاول إبطاءه. ولكن إلى أن يحدث ذلك، وهو ما يُسبب بعض التأخير الزم
Sig
Мы проходим нижний слой атмосферы, Джон. Тебе
One other question, Jim. Our readings down here say yo
좋습니다. 연결 케이블을 연결하세요. 2단계, 전원 1 AC와 2 AC 회로 차단기를 닫습니다. 3단계, 패널 5: 센서 신호, 메인 B 회로 차단기를 닫습니다. 4단계, 패널...을 닫습니다. 그런 다음 메인 B 배터리 버스 B 회로 차단기를 닫습니다. 메인 버스 
حسناً. تم إطلاق ثلاث طل
Negative, Fred. That's half of the commander's blue hose and half
Houston kopiert. Raus. Das ist eine wirklich gute Sicht auf
ठीक है। मुझे एक मिनट के लिए रुकना पड़ा। बॉब होप अपने सैनिकों के साथ एक बार फिर वियतनाम में हैं और हमेशा की तरह शानदार काम कर रहे हैं। इस खबर में एक छोटा सा नाम यूएसएस न्यू जर्सी से जुड़ा है। बॉब होप ने कल - या बुधवार को - युद्धपोत न्यू जर्सी पर सवार 1500 सैनिकों को हंसाने के लिए एक विशाल तोप बुर्ज के ऊपर से मज़ाक किया। न्यू जर्सी अपने 20वे
いいえ、今はそうする理由はありません。もう
Roger. Verstanden, Gemini. Zur Info: Sie planen, in einen -3-Bereich vorzudringen. Aktuell prüfen sie den Bereich 6 oder 7-3. Sie möchten, dass Sie Modul 4
了解。進入地点：中部太平洋、357 152 359 268、プラス0813、マイナス16503 068 36221 651 12202 36301 0028、該当なしが4回。つまり、DL MAX、DL MIN、VL MAX、VL MIN、すべて該当なし。0590 312。渦巻き星はゼータ・ペルセウスで、ミルファクとアルデバランの中間、上165、右34です。備考：非出口パター
ये चार्ली है। मेन बस वोल्टेज की जाँच करें; फिर, पैनल 2 पर पावर 
База «Транквил
休斯顿，阿波罗 11 号。在这个星形标记上，我在连续五个球中得到了两次 NOUN 8
Columbia, Houston. First of all, we'd like a waste water dump to 10 percent on the backside. Secondly, it does not look like we are going to need any plane change at this time, so we will not be uplinking a new. Third item, I would like all of your CRYO heaters to AUTO, and we are ready for a battery charge, battery BRAVO; it will last about 7 hours. If you should go to sleep, we will be terminating that BATT charge, but at the moment, we can go ahead and start th
Als sich die Boosterstufe von uns trennte, konnte man sehen, wie der Treibstoff aus der Rolldüse spritzte. Während die Boosterstufe taumelte, größtenteils in einer Ebene senkrecht zu
현재 저는 실질적으로 세 축을 후방 
क्या सच में किसी ने पृथ्वी से अंतरिक्ष यान को देखा है? दृष्टिग
Роджер. Автоматическая система ретрореактивного торможения выключена; предохранитель аварийной системы ретрореактивного торможения выключен; предох
Das war es ganz sicher. Das 
Cap Co
روجر. (سؤال 
Okay. Du meinst also, dass ich wahrscheinlich ein PROGRAMM 06 mit blinkender ENTER-Taste erhalten werde
알겠습니다. 감사합니다
好了，它正在下降。那是什么？嗯，我想我最好吃点东西。嘿，这个里面有蜜饯果冻……你知道，我们已经很久没睡觉了。我
عملية العودة تسير على ما يرام. يبدو أن نظام التخميد المساعد يحافظ على التذبذبات بشكل جيد. نحن الآن عند قوة جاذبية مقدارها 1.5 جي. كانت هناك قطعة كبيرة مش
ठीक है। समय 32 घंटे 00 मिनट। निर्देश: पूरा होने पर, निम्नलिखित स्थिति में पैंतरेबाज़ी करें: रोल 101.0, पिच 090.0, यॉ 000.0। हाई पिच माइनस 23, यॉ 93। दरों को कम करने के लिए सामान्य प्रक्रियाओं का उपयोग करें। वाहन के स्थिर होने के बाद, और स्पिनअप से पहले, धूमकेतु बेनेट की तस्वीरें लें। मैगज़ीन G के साथ सेक्स्टेंट पर इसका उपयोग करें। यानी, बहुत तेज़ गति वाली ब्लैक-एंड-व्हाइट फिल्म, है ना? यह डिम-लाइट फिल्म है। तीन तस्वीरें लें, एक-एक 5, 20 और 60 सेकंड के समय एक्सपोज़र पर। ऑटो ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग करें। मान R1 प्लस 34717, R2 माइनस 08028; R3 प्लस 35075 हैं। मैनुअल ऑप्टिक्स का उपयोग करके तीन तस्वीरें लें, एक-एक 5, 20 और 60 सेकंड के समय एक्सपोज़र पर। शाफ्ट 000.8 डिग्री होगा, ट्रूनियन। लगभग 50 फ्रेम हटा दें; यानी, फ़ोटो के पहले फ़्रेम से पहले और अंतिम फ़्रेम के बाद 2 से
أنا 
휴스턴, 아
D'accord. Pourriez-vous nous appeler à ce sujet, s'il vous pl
우주선 자체가 문제는 아닙니다. 조종하기 어려운 건 우주선이 아니라 카메라입니다. 거치대
Zurück zur SEP-Einste
मुझे लगता
ヒューストン、トランク
Roger, haben 
ठीक है, आखिरी बार जब हमने सिनॉप्टिक टेरेन फोटोग्राफी का इस्तेमाल किया, तो हमने सैन डिएगो के थोड़ा पूर्व से शुरू करके बादलों के घेरे में आने तक लगभग 38 तस्वीरें लीं। जैसे ही हम संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के दक्षिणी भाग, अलबामा और मिसिसिपी के आसपास से होते हुए फ्लोरिडा तक पहुंचे, हमने रुक-रुक कर तस्वीरें लेना शुरू कर दिया। हमें उस क्षेत्र के मौसम की कुछ बहुत अच्छी तस्वीरें मिलीं, फिर हमने जैक्सनविले के आसपास के हवाई अड्डों की कुछ तस्वीरें लीं। हमने केप की भी कुछ तस्वीरें लीं। शायद सबसे अच्छी तस्वीरों में से एक वह थी जिसमें हमने फ्लोरिडा से शुरू होकर टेक्सास तक तटरेखा के साथ-साथ पूरे मौसम का नजारा देखा। तटरेखा के समानांतर मौसम की एक बहुत ही स्पष्ट रेखा दिखाई दी। फिर हमने फ्लोरिडा राज्य, क्यूबा और द्वीप क्षेत्र के आसपास और खाड़ी में मौसम के नजारे की कुछ तस्वीरें लीं... मौसम
ठीक है। हमें समझ आ गया। लेकिन चढ़ाई कार्
알겠습니다, 잭. 조만간 산소 탱크 2의 극저온 팬을 한 번 더 가동해 주시면 
Хорошо. Запустит
월리,
처음에 우리는 또 다른 회피 기동을 해야 했기 때문에 예정대로 관측을 즉시 시작할 수 없었습니다. 투하 과정에서 엄청난 양의 유사 별들이 주변에 생겨 광학계 보정이 사실상 불가능해졌습니다. 우리가 고안했던 방법은 그다지 효과적이지 않았습니다. 결국 제가 사용한 방법은 가장 밝은 별인 시리우스로 가서 축과 트러니언을 가져온 다음, 우주선을 시리우스까지 올려 보내 광학계 보정에 사용하는 것이었습니다. 이 작업은 나중에 실제로 수행했습니다. 빛 산란과 관련하여, 수동 열 제어 중 거의 모든 자세에서 스캐닝 망원경에 빛 산란이 발생하는 것으로 보입니다. 이 산란은 주로 망원경 중앙을 가로지르는 넓은 띠 모양으로, 0도에서 좌우 약 10도 범위에 걸쳐 나타납니다. 이 영역에서는 별을 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 재정렬 작업은 잘 진행되었습니다. 저는 육분의로 별을 찾아 정렬하는 데는 성공했지만, 스캐닝 망원경에서 레고르나 멘켄트 같은 별을 관측할 때는 그 별을 식별할 수 없었습니다. 처음 지구를 관측했을 때는 지평선이 매우 흐릿하게 보였습니다. 하지만 지구의 지평선과 대기 사이에는 뚜렷한 선이 있는 것처럼 보였습니다. 랜드마크 시선 필터를 사용하니 지평선이 더 선명해졌습니다. 우주와 대기 상층부 사이에는 매우 흐릿하고 불분명한 지평선이 있어서 관측하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 앞서 말씀드렸듯이, 태양이 가까이 있을 때 달을 관측하
わかりました。「フォローアップ」も忘れてください。17ページ目のすべての項目を実行して、4分で変更点があります。1行目、CB(16) INVERTER 3、CLOSE。2行目、「Select INVERTER 1」を消してください。ページを下に進んで、「ATTITUDE MONITOR」の後の「RATE SCALE」を「25 degrees a second」に設定してください。4行下がって「BALANCE COUPLE」まで進み、「BALANCE COUPLE-OFF」にしてください。これは、上昇ジェットが噴射されないようにします。万が一、速度を抑制しなければならない場合に備えてですが、おそらく抑制することはな
Wie wäre es, wenn wir ihm die orale Temperatursonde in den Mund s
Vous avez compris? Les I
Salut Frank, bonjour. On te suit depuis environ 18 minutes, et on voit ton 
了解、ヒューストン。
明白你已准备就绪。9-Bravo 区域。获取遥控指令，13:19:36；400K 为 20 加 25；反向倾斜为 26 加 13；所有这些倾斜角度，对于所有这些更新，都将是 90 度：获取遥控指令，14:17:05；400K，20 加 32；反向倾斜，25 加 54。11-2：获取遥控指令，52:02；400K，20 加 11；反向倾斜，25 加 40。12-2 获取遥控指令，17:25:40；400K，20 加 03；反向倾斜，25
알겠습니다. 
네. 약 3분 후에 안테나를 마드리드에서 골드스톤으
منصة جيميني 8. يبدو أن لدينا ماسح
Houston, if I recall the launch set of the gimbals, the GDAs are not correct here, and where are we going to get those set 
로저. 5번과 6번 단자
Roger Dodger. L'Eagle est en bon état. L
Хорошо. Мы пон
And if you'll take me 
На вашем квадрокоптере A, C и D все практически идентичны. Квадрокоптер B работает немного холоднее, но совсем незначительно. Показатели температуры во всех отношениях в норме, так что, судя по всему, с точки зрения теплоотвода все работает хорошо. Что касается расхода топлива, он минимален, как мы и ожидали. Есть ли у вас какие-либо комментарии по это
すべてのリクエストに GO をお願い
저건 분
Мы свяжемся с вами через Соединенные 
好的。今天早上新闻其实没什么特别的。一切都很平静。我想最大的新闻应该是事故率——也就是节假日死亡人数——这当然不是什么好消息，全国共有233人丧生，其中9人是在平安夜和圣诞节当天在休斯顿遇难的。国际新闻方面，遇难者家属再次成为新闻焦点。本周，朝鲜方面公布了阿波罗8号宇航员家属向美国海军“普韦布洛”号航天
Роджер. Как только м
Роджер. Мы приближаемся к лини
当初は、別の回避操作があったため、予定通りの観測を直ちに開始することができませんでした。この操作によって、その領域に膨大な量の疑似星が発生し、光学系の較正が事実上不可能になりました。私たちが考案した方法はあまりうまく機能していないようでした。最終的に私が採用した方法は、最も明るい恒星であるシリウスに行き、シャフトとトラニオンを回収し、その後、宇宙船をシリウスまで飛ばして光学系の較正に使用するというものでした。これは後日実施しました。光の散乱に関しては、受動熱制御中のほぼどの姿勢でも、走査望遠鏡で光の散乱を受けているようです。これは主に、望遠鏡の中心を横切る幅広い光の帯として現れ、零点を中心に両方向に約10度の範囲に広がります。この領域では星を見るのは非常に困難です。再調整は順調に進んでいます。アライメントを行うために六分儀で星を捉えることはできましたが、走査望遠鏡でレゴールやメンケントといった星を捉えることはできませんでした。地球で最初に観測した星では、地平線が非常にぼやけていました。しかし、地球の地平線と大気圏の間には、非常に、あるいはやや鮮明な線が見えるように見えました。ランドマーク視線フィルターは、この地平線の定義に役立つようです。宇宙空間と大気圏上層の間には、非常にぼやけてぼやけた地平線があり、これは非常に使いにくいものです。前にも述べたように、太陽が近くにあるときに月を見ると、月の周りの空間は
Всё я
Jack, avant de commencer la procédure, nous constatons que la batterie A est complètement chargée et en excellent état. Nous allons recharger la batterie B. Laissez-la charger encor
Roger. Ripeto, le istruzioni che ti ho appena dato dovrebbero finire per far sì che la telecamera sia rivolta verso l'esterno del finestrino e imbardata di circa 30 gradi a sinistra rispetto all'asse X positivo, quindi ti consiglio di impostare la telecamera in questo modo il prima possibile; e se ci sono problemi, contattaci; ne parle
はい。プラス00192 52909 627 5269
आपको मिल
11, Houston. Ricevuto? P
, Carnarvon. When you have a chance from the pilot, the medics would like to get a readin
Okay. Skip one, and we want FUEL CELL 2 MAIN BUS B talkback, gray; and, the next one, we want FUEL CELL 3 M
كواد برافو، نعم؛ كل من التعليقات الرئيسية والثانوية تحولت إلى فوضى ع
Привет, КАРТОЧНЫЙ ФАЙЛ 23, КАРТОЧНЫЙ ФАЙЛ 23, Свобода Се
10 - 9 - 8 - 7 - 6 - 5 
Хорошо. На 1 минуте — «ГЛАВНЫЙ РЫЧАГ», мы удаляем. На 35 секунде удаляем первые две строки. «Ручная очистка» начинается на 9 секунде; мы удаляем блоки на 02 секунде; а строка ни
네. 그중 하나는 PNGCS 형식입니다. 문제는 PNGC
You wish to start your comment now 
शायद हैं। मैंने आज सुबह उठते ही उन्
此时舱内氧分压约为 3.9 至 4.0 psi。舱内热交换器温度约为 50 度。穹
ठीक है। ये तो बस कुछ सफा
Hello Muchea, hello Muchea. Friends
Я вижу только дымку. О да, там вода! Это
Roger. Dieser helle H
Le caratteristiche m
यार, मैं पिछले कुछ घंटों से यहाँ ब
Forza Hou
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन से 
Ok. Ci avviciniamo alle 88 ore. Ti do un ritardo di 2 secondi. Pront
कैप्सूल एकदम सही स्थिति में है। मौसम विभाग के लिए आदर्श तस्वीरें। मुझे लगता
Ricevuto. Capisco; ma quando passeremo ad un bit rate elevato, vuoi essere informato ogni volta che effettuiamo un trasferimento? Non l'ave
好的，我想说说我们的食物。到目前为止，所有装过橙汁的袋子，或者我往里面加过水的袋子，不管是装过橙汁、菠萝汁还是纯橙汁，都存在漏水的问题。目前为止，我只遇到过另一个漏水的袋子，而我们已经飞行了大约60个小时。但是，所有装橙汁的袋子都漏水。而且，埃德刚刚又弄来一个漏水的橙汁袋。不过，这是埃德第一次遇
收到，阿波罗11号。我们
هاواي
ジム、もし説明を受けていない場合に備えて、あなたとフレッドに考えておいていただきたいこ
아니요
А пока мы работаем над этим, Водолеи, у нас есть предложение по обновлению плана полетов для ваших рабочих и отдыхающих циклов. И — готовы с
Okay, Bill. Bevor wir das große Update lesen, möchte ich Jim kurz die Vorgehensweise erklären. Sobald er wieder bei Bewusstsein ist, soll er „ENTER“ drücken. Nicht fortfahren. Dadurch werden die Längen- und Breitengrade seiner Markierung ni
Roger. Cap ti chiede di correlare le azioni delle particelle che circondano il veicolo con la reazione di uno dei tuoi getti di controllo. Hai capito? P
Roger, Gemini 
Les habitants de la côte ouest américaine, à Seattle (Washington), Portland (Oregon), Vancouver (Colombie-Britannique) et San Francisco, prévoient d'illuminer leurs quartiers entre 21 h et minuit ce soir, selon l'Associated Press. Le ciel devrait être dégagé, vous pourrez donc admirer
Okay, Jack. Wir werden jetzt einen festen Wach- und Schlafrhythmus einführen. Fred war lange wach, deshalb bin ich etwas früher aufgestanden, um ihn abzulösen. Jack und Fred schlafen jetzt, also lasse ich sie so lange schlafen, wie sie können. Da
Роджер, Джим. Я хочу поговорить с тобой
알겠습니다. 다시 읽어보니, 보조 어큐뮬레이터 용량을 모니터링하고, 보조 글리콜 라디에이터 밸브를 30초 동안 정상(NORMAL)으로 유지한 후 바이패스(BYPASS)로 전환합니다. 보조 어큐뮬레이터 용량이 감소하지 않으면 보조 글리콜 라디에이터 밸브를 정상(NORMAL)으로 되돌립니다. 보조 냉각수 루프 펌프는 AC 1 또는 2로 설정합니다. 3분 후, 보조 글리콜 토출 압력이 39~51psig인지 확인합니다. 보조 증발기 출구 온도가 변했는지 확인합니다. 
窓はすべてクリアです。スーツサーキットは42～43です。上昇圧力灯、VF灯、そしてライトも点灯し
AMPLIFICATORI DI POTENZA in P
不，
Fred, this is Houston. Go ahead and back out of this little 
ثم
Итак, в четвертом ряду у нас находятся все выключа
Ic
Ok, Jim, abbiamo appena dato un'occhiata ai tuoi angoli e stai andando bene. Anche tu stai andando bene. Non possiamo an
Ich glaube, auf der Objektivabde
Houston, Wasserm
रॉजर, नील। धन्यवाद। ऐसा प्रतीत होता है कि टर्मिनेटर के ठीक बाईं ओर, उत्तरी गोलार्ध में, एक बादल पट्टी उत्तर-पश्चिम/दक्षिण-पूर्व की ओर बढ़ रही है - बादलों में एक अंतराल है। हमें लगता है कि यह लगभग उत्तरी संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका या शायद मध्य संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका के ऊपर से गुजरती है। क्या यह अनुमान
Роджер, я так 
Хорошо. Я вам один высылаю. Режим управления: автоматическое реверсирование; гироскопы в обычно
로저. 굳이 풀어볼 필요는 없을 것 같습니다. 제가 방금 알려드린 위치는 웨스트 크레이터에서 약간 서쪽입니다. 대
시그마 세븐, 시그마 세븐입니다. 여기는 무체아 캡 컴입니다
Columbia maintient inertiellement son attitude de décollage, m
أشعر الآن براحة كبيرة، رغم أنني لم أنم جيدًا. تناولت وجبتين. تناولت الفطور مباشرةً بعد انتهاء تدريبنا على السير في الفضاء، بينما كان إد نائمًا. ثم تناول
了
ちょうど目の前のすぐ近くで流れ星の尾が流れ落ちてきて、かなり下の方で燃え尽きたんです。尾全体はか
По
ठीक है। मुझे यहाँ एक सवाल पूछने दीजिए। आपके हिसाब से इन बैटरियों को चार्ज ह
Vous avez bien compris. Le niveau des eaux usées rejetées e
好的。在面板 5 上，断开电源 1 和 2 号断路器。然后复位并释放电源开关。在面板 11 和面板 16 上，闭合跨月母线连接断路器。在面板 16 上，闭合上升 ECA 控制断路器。在面板 16 上，闭合下降 ECA 控制断路器。在面板 14 上，接通电池 5 的正常供电。接通电池 1、2、3 和 4 的低压分接。断开电池 5 的正常供电。断开上升 ECA 控制断路器。明白
알겠습니다. 확
알았어, 좋아. 한 2시간 후
네, 프레드. 델타에 대한 설명은 여기까지입니다. 그리고 아마 들으
Weiter auf Seite 15, linke Spalte bzw. linke Seite, unten, wo „Kameras und Band konfigurieren“ steht und die Schritte bis „Dunkelschieber ersetzen“ fortgesetzt werden. Dort einfach den Kommentar hinzufügen: „Sonnenkorona ist optional.
I might tell you that we're looking at right now, that round bag that's just behind Fre
정말
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Коне
Ci sono due
روجر. نواجه مشكلة بسيطة في الهوائي الأرضي هنا. 
Wie lange wa
双子座4号，卡
अब मुझे पेरिस्कोप में सूर्योदय दिखने लगा है। इस विशेष कक्षा के दौरान पेरिस्कोप में पहली रोशनी रात के समय दिखाई दे रही है। यह स्पष्ट है कि रात के समय रेट्रोएटीट्यूड में पेरिस्कोप का कोई कार्य नहीं है। मुझे जो पहली रोशनी मिल रही है, वह लगभग अभी है। सूर्योदय पेरिस्कोप से काफी तेजी से आ रहा है। मुझे वे प्रकाशमान वस्तुएं दिखाई दे रही हैं जिनका जॉन ने उल्लेख किया था, और मैं उन्हें गिराकर कुछ और बना सकता हूँ। मुझे निश्चित रूप से ऐसा महसूस हो रहा है कि वे एक क्षेत्र में हैं और उनका आकार छोटे से लेकर चमकीले तक भिन्न-भिन्न है। पेरिस्कोप ही मेरी आंखों को चकाचौंध कर रहा है। मुझे इस पर चार्ट लगाना होगा, 
Очень, очень хорошо. Мы хотели бы получить ваш компьютер в режиме предваритель
क्या आप 
알
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. SEP 준비하시는 모습이 보입니다. 모든 게 아주 잘 되
We saw another satellite about - it was 02:38 when I saw the thing and it was much farther away than the other one that I saw. I tried taking a picture of it. I think I might have it on o
Okay. Genau. Das ist Jim Lovell. Wir dachten, wir zeigen Ihnen heute einfach ein bisschen was vom Leben an Bord von Apollo 8. Wir haben Ihnen bereits Bilder vom Mond und von der Erde gezeigt und möchten Sie nun in unser Zuhause einladen. Wie Sie auf dem Instrumentenbrett sehen können, ist es nun schon seit mindestens vier Tagen unser Zuhause. Wir markieren jeden Tag auf dem Instrumentenbrett. Wir haben vier Tage hinter uns und arbeiten am fünften. Natürlich freuen wir uns alle auf die Landung am Freitag. Hier unten, im unteren Geräteraum des Raumschiffs, befindet sich der Fi
ダメだ、マイク。双眼鏡を使っても使わなくても、ターミネーターの向こう側は何も見えない。この地球は明るすぎるし、夜への適応が鈍ってダークサイドの何
«Дружба Семь». Ожидайте информацию о времени ретроспективного анали
Je le ferai 
로저, 버즈. 지금 우리가 있는 이 분위기가 시작하기에 아주 좋은 분위기입니다. 이 분위기로 충분할 것 같습니다. 그러니 찰리와 델타 쿼드콥터를 비활성화해 주십시오. 5분에서 10분 
J'observe la constellation de la Grue, et ses étoiles sont très nettes, même les petites étoiles de magnitude 4 et 5. À 
好的。加 25，这将是一个 /。63087，减 162，加 129，减 001 63，加 00001，加 527 59 177 137 001，十一月阿尔法，加 00201 527 59 623 525 43 14 2347 337 023 上 195 左 17，加 11
Rig
各种警报全响了
Non ho visto un gran numero di queste partice
了解。フライトプランに書いてあります。ありがと
अगले एक, दो, तीन, चार एक जैसे हैं, और हम 
У ва
11 40 41, das ist Offenba
जिम, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपनी मौजूदा फ़ाइन अलाइन का ही इस्तेमाल करें और बाकी बातों को नज
Roger. (Question from VII about antenna s
Okay, Apollo. That's a
当初は、別の回避操作があったため、予定通りの観測を直ちに開始することができませんでした。この操作によって、その領域に膨大な量の疑似星が発生し、光学系の較正が事実上不可能になりました。私たちが考案した方法はあまりうまく機能していないようでした。最終的に私が採用した方法は、最も明るい恒星であるシリウスに行き、シャフトとトラニオンを回収し、その後、宇宙船をシリウスまで飛ばして光学系の較正に使用するというものでした。これは後日実施しました。光の散乱に関しては、受動熱制御中のほぼどの姿勢でも、走査望遠鏡で光の散乱を受けているようです。これは主に、望遠鏡の中心を横切る幅広い光の帯として現れ、零点を中心に両方向に約10度の範囲に広がります。この領域では星を見るのは非常に困難です。再調整は順調に進んでいます。アライメントを行うために六分儀で星を捉えることはできましたが、走査望遠鏡でレゴールやメンケントといった星を捉えることはできませんでした。地球で最初に観測した星では、地平線が非常にぼやけていました。しかし、地球の地平線と大気圏の間には、非常に、あるいはやや鮮明な線が見えるように見えました。ランドマーク視線フィルターは、この地平線の定義に役立つようです。宇宙空間と大気圏上層の間には、非常にぼやけてぼやけた地平線があり、これは非常に使いにくいものです。前にも述べたように、太陽が近くにあるときに月を見ると、月の周りの空間は暗くなく、明るい青色に見えます。これは、星とアライメントを行う際に太陽が光学系のやや近くにあるときに六分儀を覗き込む場合も同様です。しかし、六分儀でこれらの星を見つけるのに苦労することはありません。星の地平線測定では
मैंने प्रशांत महासागर के ऊपर, कोस्टल सेंट्री क्यूबेक क्षेत्र की ओर आ रही एक बादल संरचना की S-5 तस्वीर ली। तस्वीर लेने के लिए 
OK. C'est vérifié. Le disjoncteur d
Columbia,
Я только что переключился с режима «Предва
Roger, on va voir si on pe
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯
Ricevuto. Ho ricevuto i tuoi dati, li sto convalidando.
Roger that. T
收到。请复制 308 安培和 117 
Qual è l'altitudine di base?... le i
Хорошо. Отличная идея. Мы много размышляли над тем, какие маневры вам разрешить выполнить для фотографирования, я имею в виду, сервисного модуля. Мы считаем это довольно низким приоритетом; есть ощущение, что получить фотографии сервисного модуля было бы очень полезно, но они не требуются для нашей программы поиска и устранения неисправносте
La mer de Salton est à peu près aussi loin au nord que je puisse la voir. On a une très belle vue sur la Basse-Californie. Et je crois que je peux distinguer Guaymas très nettement, 
새로 달린 조절 손잡이 덕
रॉजर। मैंने ऑटो मोड में डॉक किया, और जैसा कि मैंने कहा, मुझे संपर्क का क्षण ठीक से याद नहीं था। मैं डॉकिंग प्रोब इंडिकेटर्स को बार-बार चेक कर रहा था। मुझे दो बारबर पोल मिले, जिससे पता चला कि तीनों कैप्चर लैच - कैप्चर लैच नहीं, बल्कि तीनों... लैच - जुड़ गए थे, और हम सॉफ्ट डॉक हो गए थे। उस समय स्थिति काफी स्थिर लग रही थी। तो, मैंने फ्री मोड में जाकर खिड़की से बाहर देखा और स्थिति अभी भी स्थिर लग रही थी; और मैंने प्राइमरी 2 बॉटल फायर कर दी। उसी समय, दोनों वाहनों के बीच एक चक्कर शुरू हो गया, मुझे नहीं पता किस वजह से। शायद थ्रस्टिंग की वजह से या शायद यह पहले से ही बन रहा था, और मैंने ध्यान नहीं दिया था। खैर, प्रोब के रिट्रै
Aurora Seven, retrosequen
Wassermann, Houston. Noch 10 Sekunden bis zum Ende der Brennpha
バズ、こちらヒューストン。まだ近くにいるなら、ボールレ
네,
Die Reichweite betrug 
Die Kommunikation auf dieser Konferenz ist h
Полегче. Похоже, у тебя
まだあ
- - IMU align. Unstow
Nein, und unser Radar ist eingeschaltet, aber es hat kein Ziel erfas
로저. 회로 차단기 경고음 8개 중 4개가 빨간색으로 표시되고 있습니다. 현재 회로 차단기는 여전히 꺼진 상태입니다. 지금 이 순간 3052번 테이프에 진입했고, 화재 진압 작업을 진행할 준비가 된 것 같습니다. 빨간색 경고음이 4개나 표시되는 것이 정상
Hier in Mem
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это... Cap Com на КВ, вы
アポロ8号、ヒューストン
我们终于解决了宇航服电路的温度问题。我明白斯科特为什么只关注这个记录位置了。也没有侧音。此时宇航服温度——MARK.T——是68度，我感觉棒极了。宇航服穹顶温度又回到了72度左右。显然，温度确实会波动，而且我们现在正进入夜侧。我相信我们已经很好地控制了宇航服电路。我将切
로저. 40 2711 398 033, 하강 043, 좌회전 23, 플러스 0832 마이너스 16500 12956 36
Oh, th
Roger. Im Moment sammelt sich die gesamte Fl
Roger. When you get back into your surface checklist and come over to the COMM reconfiguration on page Surface 45, we'd like you to enable the ranging feature on your S band. That is, when you come down to S band configuration, instead of CAUTION and WARNING ELECTRONICS
わかりました。どうぞ。コピ
Так что, когда мы нанесем удар, прои
روجر 
روجر. ١٨٩ زائد ٠٠: المجموع ناقص ١ بالمئة؛ ألفا ناقص ١١؛ برافو زائد ١٠؛ تشارلي ناقص ١؛ دلتا ناقص ١؛ إجمالي الهيدروجين
Mi chiedo se dovremmo smante
Эт
そうです、CAP COM、銃を使った操縦はとても簡単です。唯一の問題は燃料が足りないことです。燃料は使い果たしましたが、宇宙船の前方を回り込み、後方を回り込み、アダプターの頂上まで操縦することができました。もうすぐ…ジムの視界に戻りました。ただ一つ残念なのは、もっと操縦できたらよかったということです
你可能会问……他们能否为拍摄航天器内部照片设定一些参数？我们有200英尺的胶片。我已经拍了几张，
Roger, Friendship Seven. Perderemo i contatti da un momento all'altro, dovete effettuare i controlli di rientro e manca
Okay. Verstanden. Wenn ich hier schnell wieder raus will
C'est exact, Jim. Tu travailleras
この飛行の責任は、まず歴史と、この努力に先んじた科学の巨人たちにあります。次に、意志をもってその願いを示したアメリカ国民にあります。次に、その意志を実行に移した4つの政権とそれぞれの議会にあります。そして、サターン、コロンビア、イーグル、そして月面に着陸した小型宇宙船EMU（宇宙服とバックパック）を製造した宇宙機関と産業界のチームにも責任があります。宇宙船を製造し、建造、設計、試験を行い、心血を注ぎ、あらゆる能力を注ぎ込んだすべてのアメリカ国民に、心からの感謝を申し上げます。今夜、これらの人々に心か
Je ne sais pas.
分かりました。お分かりいただけたと思います。パネル5：回路ブレーカー、MAIN AとMAIN 
هذه هي الصداقة ا
收到。夏威夷方面试图给我提供一些关于我们视线范围内燃油消耗情况的最新信息
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, मैंने तुम्हें पढ़ लि
是的，先生，我已经登录成
...но я бы все равно хотела заниматься спортом больше, чем за
Sunset is rather striking, I don't think that I need to waste much time looking at them. They are very interesting. The other thing, it's fascinating is how black it is when your eyes are not adapted. I definitely can see some coating on the window. Going back to VOX at this point in UHF-hi to transmit. Opening visor to wipe off the right microphone. I licked it. Closing visor. Visor was sealed immediately for the suit circuit to go to work for me. I don't want to get fouled up with it again. The suit inlet is holding very nicely at about 68 (degrees). So the dome again is going to go back up. It's now up at 76, 75 . Apparently this higher setting is the one we want. Think I'll put in another half a mark on that now and we may have her locked. She's getting kinda cool at last so I know where I want to go with the setting. I have set the coolant quantity for the suit and control lever at 8.5 
जी हाँ। आप अंदर जा सकते हैं, जिम। मुझे माफ़ करना, मुझे लगा कि आप एटीटी होल्ड और उसके बाद जेट के ब
Okay, Fred-o. Auf Seite 12 benötigen wir die Updates. Wir haben einige Vektoren und ein Pad für dich. Sobald du diesen Zustand erreicht hast, geben wir dir Bescheid, wann wir die Verbindung herstellen möchten. Okay. Führe unter „Aktivierung und Selbsttest“ die gesamte Prozedur durch. Auf Seite 13, unter „AGS Aline“, führe Schritt 1 aus
Hey, ich hoffe, irgendjemand 
Хорошо. Вольт - 39,1; а
好的。在该页所有内容下方，添加以下内
Beh, questo mi fa incazzare. La Hasselblad è sparita. Trovate quella madre 
روجر. تصحيح منتصف المسار رقم 2. SPS/G&N: 63059، زائد 097، ناقص 020 02644 5792، زائد 00118، ناقص 00003،
Ok, Apollo 8. Facciamo gli stessi angoli, ovvero beccheggio 242 e imbard
Roger. 40 2711 398 033, bas 043, gauche 23, plus 0832 moins 16500 12956 36208; l’ensemble d’étoiles au nord reste Sirius et Rigel; le roulis, le tangage et le lacet restent les mêmes angles: 129 155 010,
Hé, j'aime bi
جيميني 4، هاواي كاب كوم، لدي تحديث D-9 لك عندما
حسنًا. الأربع ساعات الإضافية مناسبة. سنجهز لك الساعات الإحدى عشرة الإضافية قريبًا، وبالنسبة لفحص هوائي الكسب العالي، نرجو منك ترك المفتاح على وضع "الش
コ
Quad Delta 245, 81 %. P&C indique que ces résultats restent bons malgré le temps.
Roger. Stand by. In I have a LOX dump start time for you. It's supposed to start at 5 plus 03 plus 07, and sto
أنا فعلت هذا
휴스턴 트랭퀼리티 기지. 추진 회로 차
हे माइक, क्या तुम बी सिग्नल पर ट्रांसमिट कर रहे
좋습니다. 하나 더 알려드리겠습니다. 베트콩이 당초 예정됐던 72시간 휴전이 오늘 발효됐습니다. 이는 연합군의 24시간 휴전 시
よし。さあ、始めよう。目的は自由帰還のための中間軌道修正だ。:; マイナス0021.3、プラス0004.1、マイナス0031.2。HAとHPはNA。DELTA-V 0038.0; 031、120、298、マイナス00213、プラス00041、マイナス00312。NA。GDA角度は確認した。ピッチ5.86、ロ
Это хорошо. Жаль, что нам не удалось заставить работать то
Roger. Das ist ungefähr dasselbe wie vorher. Ich schalte
لكن درجة حرارة فتحة البخار لا تزال حوالي 
Ce l'hai inserito tu? Dovrebbe essere 40 nel 
ठीक है। लगता है गुंबद थोड़ा नीचे आ रहा है। मैं कु
ठीक है, समझ गया। क्या आप
D'accord. Ce que je veux faire, Jim, c'est utiliser ces autres objectifs. Je pense qu'on peut 
杰克，如果我们要拆下指令舱窗户拍照，我想我
यह बैटरी चार्ज सर्किट ब्रेकर था
Интенсивность отражения солнечного света в этой области затрудняет различение деталей, которые мы видим на поверхности, и, полагаю, на экране телевизора это еще сложнее, но по мере приближения к терминатору и удлинения теней
嗯，看来你大功告成了。不过记住，你得把光圈调到f/22左右，也可能不用——对焦在无限远，变焦对我来说有点难。你可以自己选择，如果你动作够慢
Gemini 4, Houston
Roger. Der Pilot ist gerade aufgewacht, hat seine zweite Mahlzeit des vierten Tages zu sich genommen, fünf Schlucke Wasser getrunken und sich dann etwa fünf Stunden 
Das ist bestätigt, Apollo 8. Wir werden das Manöver timen und dann in der normalen Vorbereitungssequenz alles durchführen. Und – wir haben hier einen Spielstand – im vierten Viertel, 31 zu 13. Und ich habe jederzeit etwas zu Ihrer Diskrepanz zu sag
Роджер. Поймите, что при угле 87 на 140 потребуется 
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Всё ясно. Я получил ваше предупреждение/предупреждение, шаг 1, выполните его; у нас будут гореть следующие предупреждающие индикаторы: AS
Хорошо. Я включу ему режим высокого усиления. Вероятно, это гликолевый насос, который вы слышите на заднем плане, и я дошёл до момента включения. Вы бы посо
Okay. Sie sind sich also sicher, dass es sich um das Serv
Ro
E l'evaporatore secondario sta per entrare in fu
D'accord. Zéro adresse 25, 26 et 27. C'
...그 빌어먹을 병을 
Он будет там, когда вы при
好的。现在，关于如
ठीक है। मैं SEP पैड के बारे में एक बात स्पष्ट करना चाहता हूँ। मुझे लगता है कि मेरे कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में, मैं शायद 622, यॉ, पिच और रोल में लोडिंग का उपयोग कर सकता हूँ, इसी क्रम में; और 
هذا سلبي. لم أفتحه. ولن أفتحه حتى أنتهي من هذه القراءات. اختفى نجم فيكدا الآن عند 1.7 في المنتصف، في منتصف المسافة بين طبقة الضباب وا
य
Ja. Das wollte ich dir sch
रॉजर। हम टेलीफोटो लेंस का इस्तेमाल नहीं करेंगे। मुझे नहीं लगता कि हम पृथ्वी की तस्वीर ले पाएंगे। हमें टर्मिनेटर यानी
午前6時に新しいテープカートリッジを装着しました。S-6でまた
मिथुन 4, 
मैंने बूस्टर की ओर लगभग 5 फीट/सेकंड की गति से धक्का दिया। मेरा पृथक्करण बर्न लगभग 6 या 7 सेकंड का था। मैंने बूस्टर पर लगभग 5 या 6 फीट/सेकंड की गति से धक्का दिया और फिर उससे 
CSQ、ふたご座4世。
आपको
حسنًا، ها هي قواطع الدائرة الأربعة هناك يا كين. عندما قلتَ اللوحة رقم 8، ظننتُ أنك تقصدها. لا أعتقد أن قواطع الدائرة معطلة الآن، ولكن لماذا لا نتأكد من قواطع الدائرة ونضبط المفات
Ricevuto, Buzz. Quando hai interrotto - o, correzione - quando hai te
فريندشيب سفن، غوايماس. قلتُ إن لديّ مؤشرًا على انكما
रॉजर। रॉड और मैं साथ बैठे थे, और मैं आज रात की 
Okay, Jack. Folgendes ist zu beachten: Der Leitungsschutzschalter begrenzt den Strom auf 15 Ampere. Die Leitung zwischen den beiden ist 
Do y
フレッド、彼らはSHeタンクの圧力上昇を監視していて、105時間あたりで爆発する
素晴らしいですね。こちらはポール・ヘイニー流のインターステラー・タイムズ、12月23日号です。クリスマスまであと2日でショッピングデーです。昨日のテレビ放送は大好評だったそうです。ミッキー・ハースコウィッツはポスト紙で二刀流です。彼は他のスポーツコラムに加えて、あなたの創刊に関するコラムもいくつか
了解
Sieht immer noch 
Va bene. La prossima volta indosserò il cappello e ascolterò quello c
क्या आप हमारे एडाप्टर की रीडिंग जानना चाहते हैं? जे
알겠습니다, 휴
ठीक है। मुझे सं
Sai, questi propulsori non vengono usati molto qui. Beh, forse... o qualcosa 
收到。我们已经接收并核实了那些
रॉजर। क्या आप अपने इंडिकेटर 
Roger. Le roulis et le tangage sont légèrement différents de ceux prévus dans le plan de vol, 11. Le roulis est maintenant de 198,6,
在 Altair 上，我会使用绿色滤镜，或者不使用滤镜
We saw another satellite about - it was 02:38 when I saw the thing and it was much farther away than the other one that I saw. I tried taking a picture of it. I think I
जी हां। इसे पेज के सबसे ऊपर जोड़ दें। हम असल में क्या कर
Lui potrebbe saperlo, ma non sa nemmeno se l'erba è 
好的。我们已经加了氯，水已经消毒了，稍等片刻，我去
Ripeti l'ultima tras
حسناً
わかりました。右手にピレネー山脈が見えてきて、ちょうどメシエ山とピカリング山の上空を飛んでいる
Au début, l'opération avec le [nom du dispositif manquant] a empêché le démarrage immédiat de nos observations comme prévu, car nous avons dû effectuer une autre manœuvre d'évitement. Le déversement du [nom du dispositif manquant] a provoqué une quantité considérable de pseudo-étoiles dans la zone, rendant l'étalonnage optique pratiquement impossible. La méthode que nous avions mise au point ne semblait pas fonctionner correctement. La méthode que j'ai finalement utilisée consistait à entrer dans [nom de la zone manquante], à nous rendre à Sirius, notre étoile la plus brillante, à récupérer l'axe et le tourillon, puis à faire voyager le vaisseau spatial jusqu'à Sirius pour l'utiliser pour l'optique, ce que nous avons fait ultérieurement. En ce qui concerne la diffusion de la lumière, il semble que, quelle que soit l'attitude pendant notre contrôle thermique passif, nous recevions de la lumière diffusée dans le télescope de balayage. Cela se présente principalement sous la forme d'une large bande de lumière traversant le centre du télescope, à environ 10 degrés de part et d'autre de zéro. Il est très difficile de voir les étoiles dans cette zone. Les réalignements ont été bons. J'ai pu repérer l'étoile dans le sextant pour effectuer l'alignement, mais je n'ai pas pu identifier l'étoile utilisée pour des observations telles que Regor ou Menkent avec le télescope de balayage. La première observation d'étoile que j'ai effectuée depuis la Terre a révélé un horizon très indistinct. Cependant, une ligne assez nette semblait se dessiner entre ce qui paraissait être l'horizon terrestre et l'atmosphère. Le filtre de visée à repères a semblé améliorer la définition de cet horizon. L'horizon entre l'espace et la haute atmosphère est très flou et indistinct, ce qui le rend difficile à utiliser. Comme je l'ai mentionné précédemment, il arrive que, lorsque le Soleil est proche, la zone autour de la Lune ne soit pas sombre, mais plutôt claire, ap
रॉज
了解。どうぞ。OMNI Bを要請して、フレ
Хорошо. Рад это слышать. А вы получ
Roger. They are having trouble verifying that the high gain is doing its thing. Like to verify that the pitch is minus 10, the Y is plus 350, yo
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
Apollo 8, qui Houston. Siamo
W
Je vais bien. Attendez, je retourne à la capsule. Ça doit me retarder. J'aimerais régler ce problème que vous avez visiblement constaté sur le cir
もう一度言っ
ठीक है। जेमिनी VIII, आपके लिए एक चिकित्सा संबंधी जानकारी है। पहली बात, रेट्र
ジャック、何ができるか調べてみます。あなたが戻ってきた時に、リカバリー担当と連絡を取り、エージェントを太平洋に派遣できるかどうか確認します。まあ、様子を見ましょう。プロバスケットボールでは、ニックスがミルウォーキー・バックスに110対10
Roger. And Aquarius, we're going to have to hand you over to a different site now, and we think maybe things will work 
ईवीए दस्ताने को प्लास्टिक ब
네. 지금 화면 오른쪽에는 세 개의 크레이터가 나란히 있는데, 첫 
Okay. Mike, quello che è successo è che... sai, eri seduto lì a monitorare... e al passo 7 sei andato su NOUN 01 e hai digitato l'indirizzo e poi INFORMAZIONI INFORMAZIONI; e sull'ultimo INVIO di quel 35400 INVIO, subito dopo, sei tornato al 16. Poi, quando hai premuto INVIO, stavi davvero inserendo le informazioni nella CDU vera e propria; e quando hai inserito le due voci nei registri 1 e 2, c'è stato un... è stato un cambiamento istantaneo nella CDU vera e propria, e l'ha guardato e ha visto... ha visto cosa pensava di avere. Mio... mio dio, ho ottenuto una velocità di 600 gradi al secondo. E accende i getti per cercare di ridurre quella velocità. E i filtri di velocità che sta osservando... beh, la velocità che sta osservando è filtrata, quindi non rileva realmente la velocità effettiva finché la cosa non è già stata costruita, e poi inizia a leggere i filtri di velocità e dice: "Beh, in realtà non avevo 600 gradi". Quindi lo spegne e cerca di 
偏航 1
C'est un péril pou
यह B-2 पर था। अब B-3 पर आ रहे हैं। इस समय पिच लगभग 10 डिग्री नीचे है। स्कैनर बंद होने के दौरान जो रोल त्रुटि उत्पन्न हुई थी, वह अब ग
رو
753, 09 - 11:09 बजे - सूरज क्षितिज पर बिल्कुल सामने था। हैसलब्लैड के फोटो-इवेंट इंडिकेटर के साथ हमें ज़्यादा सफलता नहीं मिली। आखिरकार, हमने इसे ढूंढ ल
Ok. Da qui in poi si parte per l'EVA. Pronti per la decompressione - correzione, depressurizzaz
Хорошо. Я постараюсь сделать все, что в моих силах. У меня есть единая т
ठीक है। एकदम साफ। थोड़ी द
Х
Roger, Buzz. Ça me paraît une bonne idée po
ठीक है, बढ़िया। जिम, हमने ऑर्बिट एडजस्टमेंट न करने का फैसला 
Weiter s
ठीक है, स्कॉट। मैं ठीक महसूस कर रहा हूँ। मुझे पूरा यकीन है कि हम इस सूट सर्किट में सही से काम कर रहे हैं। डोम का तापमान अब स्थिर है। यह लगभग 81 डिग्री है। मैं इसमें थोड़ा बदलाव कर रहा हूँ। सूट का इनलेट तापमान लगभग 78 डिग्री है। मुझे लगता है कि कंट्रोल में एक औ
ठीक है। मुझे नहीं पता कि मैं इसे पूरा पढ़ पाऊँगा या नहीं। ठीक है, लाइटिंग: न्यूमेरिक/इंटीग्रल
روجر، كل شيء يسير على ما يرام هنا. نتأخر قليلاً في الرد عليك لأننا قمنا بتشغيل جهاز الإرسال UHF الخاص بنا في ذلك الوقت ونحتاج إلى بعض الوقت للتس
ठीक है। यह तेज़ वापसी के लिए एक पेरीसिंथियन प्लस 2 है। यह / 62871, माइनस 161, प्लस 129, प्लस 45224, माइनस 06216, माइनस 18712 001 287 351, नवंबर अल्फ़ा प्लस 00187 49336 603 49118 112 038 296, पृथ्वी ऊपर 010, दाएँ 37, प्लस 1475, प्लस 06500 13239 36913 होगा; प्राथमिक तारा सीरियस, द्वितीयक रिगेल 129 155 010
Go ah
알겠습니다. 짐, 몇 가지 말씀드리겠습니다. 첫째, 기동을 위해 를 사용할 수 있지만, 최소 추진력을 사용하면 연료를 훨씬 절약할 수 있습니다. 따라서 최소 추진력을 사용하는 
Eh bien, nous ne savons pas vraiment. Il y a généralement deux personnes dans la cabine, et c'est beaucoup – elle semble beaucoup plus compacte, et donc nous ne ressentons pas le froid ic
- - un paio di buon
Sappiamo che ci sono molti scienziati provenienti da diversi paesi che aspettano di vedere i campioni lunari, e abbiamo pensato che vi sarebbe 
That's affirmative, Jim. We haven't got a picture of it yet. It's going to be in the top part of the - Correction, top part of the at the top of the - the top of detent 2 and the top part of the, and it should, in attitude, if you're right on the Sun, should split the cursor, though that roll angle is not too critical; if we're in about 10 degrees, we'll be okay. We - but I think - we think you should be able to get it better than that. On page 31, under the " Burn Technique," you can scratch the bottom 
TVC GIMBAL DRIVE, PITC
ここにカーブがあります... 
Fred, after
Charlie, quel
好了，我们现
Vielleicht findest du ja heraus
まだありません。こ
Bien reçu. Je suis en mode automatique, en attitude de rentrée atmosphérique. Les gyroscopes sont normaux, la manœuvre est désactivée et tous les systèmes sont opérationnels. Le niveau de carburant est de 89 % en mode automat
알겠습니다. 
저기, 250mm 렌즈
روجر. الكبسولة تدور، وأستطيع رؤية الصاروخ المعزز أثناء الدوران على بعد بضع مئ
D'accord. 400K, c
Roger, 11. Correzione alla mia ultima. A 73:20, ti inoltriamo il nuovo. E a 73:30, vorremmo che tu manovrassi a 0 rollio, 0 beccheggio, 0 imbardata con il vecchio. E poi ruotassi verso il nuovo e
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। वैसे तो हमें लगभग डेढ़ घंटे और चाहिए, लेकिन हम चाहते 
Negativ
コロンビア、ヒュー
पहले स
Gemini 4, Hawaii CAP CO
Итак, во время последнего пролета мы сделали около 38 снимков на синоптическую съемку местности, начиная немного восточнее Сан-Диего и до тех пор, пока снова не столкнулись с облачностью. Мы продолжили съемку с перерывами, как только начали пролетать над южной частью Соединенных Штатов, в районе Алабамы и Миссисипи, и далее до Флориды. Мы сделали несколько очень хороших снимков погоды в этом районе, затем сделали несколько снимков аэродромов вокруг Джексонвилла. Мы сделали пару снимков мыса. Вероятно, один из лучших снимков, который мы сделали, был снят с заднего плана, и мы запечатлели всю погодную зону вдоль побережья, начиная от Флориды и до самого Техаса. Очень четко выраженная линия непогоды, идущая вплотную к побережью. Зат
Вначале работа с системой не позволила нам немедленно начать наблюдения, как мы планировали, поскольку нам предстоял очередной маневр уклонения. Сброс системы вызвал огромное количество псевдозвезд в этой области, что сделало калибровку оптики практически невозможной. Разработанный нами метод, похоже, работал не очень хорошо. В итоге я использовал метод, заключавшийся в том, чтобы спуститься в систему, добраться до Сириуса, нашей самой яркой звезды, взять вал и цапфу, а затем поднять космический аппарат к Сириусу, чтобы использовать их для оптики, что мы и сделали позже. Что касается рассеяния света, то, похоже, почти в любом положении во время пассивного терморегулирования мы получаем рассеяние света в сканирующем телескопе. Оно принимает форму широкой полосы света прямо по центру телескопа, примерно на 10 градусов в каждом направлении от нуля. В этой области очень трудно увидеть звезды. Перенастройки прошли успешно. Мне удалось обнаружить звезду в секстанте для юстировки, но я не смог идентифицировать звезду, которую мы использовали в таких случаях, как Регор или Менкен, в сканирующем телескопе. Первое наблюдение звезды над Землей показало очень нечеткий горизонт. Но, казалось, существовала очень — или довольно — резкая — линия между тем, что казалось горизонтом Земли, и атмосферой. Фильтр, определяющий линию визирования, помог, по-видимому, улучшить четкость этого горизонта. Между космическим пространством и верхней границей атмосферы проходит очень размытый и нечеткий горизонт, и использовать его очень сложно. Как я уже говорил, иногда, глядя на Луну, когда Солнце находится в непосредственной близости, область вокруг Луны, пространство вокруг Луны, не темное, а светлое — выглядит как светло-голубое. То же са
... avait un important site
Hey Bill, kannst du uns sagen, welche Winkel das Gerät durchlaufen hat? Die Kurve, die wir aufgezeichnet haben, scheint eher die HF-Grenze als die mechanische Grenze darzustellen. Wenn wir über die Funktion des AUTO-REACQ-Modus sprechen, sieht es so aus, als ob er sich beim Erreichen der HF
नहीं। हमें ऐसा नहीं लगता, अपोलो 11। हमारा मानना ​​है कि यह संभवतः कुछ विचलन के कारण है, और यह शायद ठीक है। इसलिए इसे स्वीकार कर लीजिए। यह हमारे मानदंडों के अनुरूप है कि यदि आप निशान को दोहराते हैं और आपको समतुल्य आकार
我们有程序警报
Ricevuto. Inoltre, imposta i
Yes. You remember I initial
أورورا سفن، أورورا سفن، هذه غرفة 
Non mi i
And,
Die Erd
Concernant les fenêtres, Houston: les fenêtres 1 et 5 présentent un voile modéré. Suffisant pour une observation visuelle, mais probablement pas pour la photographie. Les fenêtres 2 et 4 sont claires. La fenêtre 3 est presque opa
Okay. On this pass, th
Roger. Je s
휴스턴, 테이블 담당자에게 연락드리겠습니다. 잠시만 기
Complimenti allo chef, l'insalata di salmone è ec
जी हाँ, हम अभी नक्शा देख रहे थे, और आप फ्लोरिडा के दक्षिण में हैं, इसलिए आप अभी ग्रामीण क्षेत्र में नहीं हैं। लेकिन हम जानना
Хорошо. Это 9, /: 45597, минус 040, плюс 157, плюс 34188, минус 01353, плюс 00780 180 008 001, Ноябрьская Альфа, плюс 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, вниз 131, влево 28, плюс 0758, минус 16500 12987 36277; главная звезда Сириус, вторичная Ригель, 129 155 010; четыре квадрупольных снимка, 15 секунд, пустое пространство, горизонты на линии окна 1,2 градуса при T минус 3; использовать высокоскоростную процедуру с минусовой Альфой Майка. После анализа данных о времени работы двигателя в предыдущих заездах, кажется, что его производительность должна обеспечивать время работы в 3 секу
ठीक ह
حسنًا. في أي وقت تقوم بتشغيلها، يُفضل تشغيلها في وضع خا
了解。エドは1時
Apollo 8, Houston. Pourriez-vous passer le commutateur AUX
Ok. Il tuo RAD IN SECONDARY, ti ho dato 70 - circa 72 gradi; il RAD OUT è circa 30; la TEMP EVAP GLICOLE è circa 65; la PRESSIONE VAPORE a fondo scala alta, la PRESSIONE DI SCARICO GLICOLE circa 9 psi. L'ACCUMULATORE SECONDARIO TUTE mostra circa 52 gradi; CABINA circa 58 gradi; pressioni, TUTA lettura 4.1, CABINA a 5. LA PRESSIONE PARZIALE CO2 è salita a poco più di 1, circa 1.1. Sul lato della casa, la temperatura è 72 gradi, la lettura dell'elio 3500; N2 A lettura 2300; N2 B circa 2450. IL COMBUSTIBILE è circa 165; CELLA A COMBUSTIBILE 1, entrambe CHIUSE, sono zip; TEMP. INTERNA 405 gradi; LO SCARICO CONDENSA è a scala inferiore. CELLA A COMBUSTIBILE 2 - al momento abbiamo una lettura del FLUSSO di O2 o H2 compresa tra 0,13 e 0,14, e il FLUSSO di O2 è attua
Attends Buzz. Ça a l'air plutôt bien, d'après ce que je vois. On a la ligne de convergence tropicale là-bas. Il y a quelques nuages ​​sur la carte météo que je regarde, mais rien d'important. Pour l'instant... Attends. Voyons voir, là, à mi-hauteur... oui, à MPL... on a 3000 pieds de nuages ​​épars, visibilité 10 pieds, vagues de 3
よくやった！そうだ、AFLの今日の注目試合はオークランドとカンザスシティの試合だった。オークランドが41対6で勝利したので、AFLの決勝戦はレイダースとジェッツになり
收到。轨道运行结束时间：01:28:17。任务结束时间：04:32:27。1 Bravo 16 加 
١١، هذه هيوستن. ٥ SPS/G&N: ٣٧٢٠١، ناقص ٠٦٠، زائد ٠٤٧؛ TIG ٠٨٦ ٠٩ ٣٦٦٦. NOUN ٨١: زائد ٣٣٥٢١، زائد ٠٣٤٤١، ناقص ٠١٤٥٨؛ الدوران غير متوفر، الميل ٠٣٢. باقي PAD 
Когда мы начали 
わかった。
यह B-2 पर था। अब B-3 पर आ रहे हैं। इस समय पिच लगभग 10 डिग्री नीचे है। स्कैनर बंद होने के दौरान जो रोल त्रुटि उत्पन्न हुई थी, वह अब गायब हो गई है। इस समय, मैं पुनः प्रवेश के लिए शीतलन बढ़ाने के लिए सूट प्रवाह को लगभग थोड़ा सा बढ़ा रहा हूँ। देखते हैं कि क्या मैं इसे थोड़ा और कम कर
A1隔间，16毫米弹匣将放置在4号窗口，而不是5号窗口。纸巾盒只剩一个了。U3隔间，16
ليس سيئاً. ليس سيئاً عل
Roger, Frank. Die Heliumtanktemperatur, die wir bei Quad A überwachen, ist während eurer gesamten Arbeit nur um 1 Grad gestiegen, daher halten wir das nicht für besonders besorgniserregend. Sobald ihr mit dieser Arbeit fertig seid, möchten wir, anstatt alles wieder in den Normalzustand zu versetzen, Quad A einfach um 180 Grad drehen und auf die kühlere Seite stellen und es dort halten, bis eure nä
Soll ich etwas versiegeln? Ich werde den Film, den wir gerad
コロンビア、ヒューストン。了解。了解しました。イーグル
罗杰。据我了解，它已经超过了警告阈值，达到了扫描或射频阈值。让我来给你简要说明一下它在这
Okay. Wir haben den Verbrennungsprozess planmäßig abgeschlossen und die Rückstände entfernt. Der OAMS-Wert liegt bei 8
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。マニュアルモードです。ダークサイドにいる間、地平線に照準を合わせ、高度000まで上げてジャイロをケージに閉じ込め、再びケージから外し
Aquarius, Houston, I
Ну, связь — это хорошо. Черт возьми,
Les lunettes de soleil n'ont pas fait l'affaire, Bu
Okay. Dies ist für den Gerätetransfer. Kabinenlüfterfilter und -beutel g
En regardant à l'étranger, on constate que la première autoroute de Corée du Sud, reliant Séoul au port d'Incheon, a été baptisée « Autoroute Apollo » en hommage à votre voyage. Je crois que nous avons mentionné hier soir que le président Nixon a déjà entamé son tour du monde et qu'il se trouve aujourd'hui à San Francisco, première étape de son périple. Il se rendra ensuite à bord de l'USS Hornet, d'où il assistera au retour de votre vaisseau spatial. Il prévoit de visiter sept pays, dont la Roumanie, au cours de ce voyage. Comme vous le savez sans doute, il a dû manquer le match des étoil
당신의 경우, 쿼드 A, C, D는 거의 동일해 보입니다. 쿼드 B는 
Okay, Vance, ich bin b
收到。这里是友谊七号。以下是三十分钟报告：头部活动没有引起任何恶心或不适感。我惊讶地发现自己可以如此近距离地看向太阳；此时阳光直射我的脸，我只需用眉毛遮挡一下即可。所有保险丝开关的状态与之前报告的左侧面板一致。模式选择正常，自动，陀螺仪正常：点火器已准备就绪，自动反推装置已关闭。除手动模式外，所有“T”型手柄均已就位，手动模式已拉出，以便在发生进一步故障时可以立即切换到手动模式作为备用。救援辅助设备正常。着陆气囊已关闭。所有其他顺序面板项目均处于正常位置。控制燃油量为68-100%，重复，68-100。EPI指示我的大
नेवादा के रेनो में, एक छोटे लड़के के घर में चिमनी न होने के कारण, उसने स्थानीय अखबार के पते पर सांता क्लॉज़ को पत्र लिखकर कहा, "क्या आप कृपया सामने वाले दरवाजे का इस्तेमाल करेंगे? आपको नीचे से थोड़ा धक्का देना पड़ेगा क्योंकि वह अटकता है।" अर्कांसस के लिटिल रॉक में, क्रिसमस से पहले के सप्ताह और क्रिसमस के दिन तक सेंट विंसेंट इन्फर्मरी में पैदा हुए बच्चों को डिस्चार्ज के समय उनकी माताओं को बड़े-बड़े लाल क्रिसमस मोजों में सौंपा जा रहा है। यहाँ एक उदाहरण सर्वधर्म सहयोग का है। कैलिफोर्निया के इंडियो में, क्रिसमस के दिन पुलिस प्रमुख को एक प्रार्थना पुस्तक दी 
Right now it's daylight over on Jim's side, and looking out my side I can still make out some of the stars. It appears that you can keep the spacecraft oriented so that one side is dark. On the but the other side is in daylight. Jim's side is definitely in the daylight right now and mine is in the dark. This is one of the things that surprised me the most earlier in the flight when I was looking out at all the little fireflies from the 
रॉजर।
Apollo 8, Houston. If you don't need the computer, we would like to 
Ok, l'interruttore di ali
Roger. Stanno benissimo e, per quanto ne sappiamo, da qui in poi tutto va bene
Je ne pense pas que ce soit un gros problème, car le changement d'antenne n'est pas difficile 
不，我们掌控着局面。让我给你提供一
---재진입
Ri
了解、マイク。データを再生してみましたが、ここにあるチャートの記録を分析すると、そのよう
ठीक
Auto Two. Guerre. Vou
هناك برق 
음, 그건 최근 유입량이 증가한 결과입니다.
«Аполлон-8», пока мы ждём высокого усиления, я продол
你知道我的想法吗？我觉得我们之前看到的排气是由于我们的DELTA-V
Seven, hier ist Cape. Das Wetter im Erholungsgebiet
Okay. Rücklesung: NOUN 11, 105 35 3700, 107 11 3000, 0538, minus alle Nullen, NA, 09356, 10315. NOUN 86, plus 0538, plus alle Nullen, un
Ты готов к своему нижнему белью? Майк, ты готов к своему нижнему белью? Ты готов к сво
오케이 휴스턴. 닐도 마이크도 안 보이네. 그런데, 저 축과 회전축이 지구를 향하지 않고 아슬아슬하게
Мы
我们
是的，到了。真美
Okay
रॉजर, कैनरी, जेमिनी। हम अपने नियमित उड़ान योजना पर वापस आ गए हैं, लेकिन फिलहाल हमारी योजना में सटीक समय का वि
Aquarius, Houston. Wir benötigen dringend AFT OMNI und verlieren daher für etwa eine Minute den Kontakt zu Ihnen, während wir versuchen, die Positionsbestimmung herzustellen. Unsere neuesten Daten zeigen, dass Ihre größte An
로저. 33-1 39 전방 1+04. 120 
알겠
BD roule dans le
D'accord. Les quatre résistances cryogéniqu
了解しました。REACQ、ピッチプラス30、ヨー270。あり
こちらフレンドシップセブン。今は雷がいっぱい
好的，
D'accord, Jack. Il semble que nous soyons en train de… petite digression, l'attitude… en inclinaison. Je vais vérifier, mais la dernière fois que la Lune a fait le tour de l'orbite terrestre, elle était bien au-dessus de l'angle d'incidence, et je vois la Terre qui fait le tour maintenant, ce qui va se produire assez bas. Elles oscillent d'ava
हाँ। हमने देखा कि वापस आते समय कॉकपिट का तापमान बाहर जाते समय 
Roger, attitude looks very good 
此外，百慕大气球不
로저. 물론이죠. 모든 게 잘 되고 있어요. 제가 
Enfin, nous aimerions savoir si votre confi
Frank, die Ärzte sagen, sie könnten bei Bill noch nichts feststellen. Anscheinend ist seine Harnröhre nicht versto
هي
Houston. Come hai letto
짐, 우리 생각엔 부스터가 지금쯤 당신 앞에
好的。在第 4
Bon, je regarde maintenant à travers le réticule arrière dr
فرانك، ما أظل أتخ
جيميني 4، هذا كل شيء من هيوستن. سنكون على أهبة الاستعداد. لدينا حوالي دقيقة واحدة للوصول إلى خط 
حسنًا. يبدو الأمر بسيطًا بما فيه الكفاية. افهم إجراء النسخ الاحتياطي عند قيمة g ثابتة، ارفع المتجه لأعلى حتى أقصى قيمة g ثم اخفضه لأسفل؛ ثم عدّل زاوية الميل حتى تصبح قيمة g تسا
क्या इसे डालते समय
不，我当时正在尝试记录时间，16 65，但不知怎么的，在我输入 
Okay, I think they held well, Al. The--I think they were good. I 
La visiera è rimasta aperta per un po',
嘿，吉姆。
रॉजर, माइक। आपकी श्वसन दर का ग्राफ अभी भी स्थिर है। अगर आज शाम सोने से पहले आपके पास समय हो, तो हम सुझाव देंगे कि आ
罗杰。来自公共事务办公室的最新消息：阿波罗11号仍然是全球新闻的焦点。只有四个国家——共产主义中国、朝鲜、北越和阿尔巴尼亚——尚未向其公民通报您的登月飞行和登月。一位记者表示，他已经找不到合适的词语来形容您的成功。今晚，尼克松总统计划在华盛顿观看全明星棒球赛。赛后，他将前
Нуж
Potresti dirci se ti senti a tuo
कोलंबिया, ये ह्यूस्टन है, आपकी 
Colum - correzione, Eagle, Houston. Vediamo il MASTER ARM, potete andare avant
了解、ニ
내가 립 반 
11, Houston.
Okay. Dies sind vorläufige Ergebnisse, aber sie geben Ihnen einen ersten Anhaltspunkt. Die korrigierte Höhe beträgt 17 ± 4 Kilometer, und die Abweichung von ± 4 Kilometern deutet darauf hin, dass Sie die Höhe sehr genau bestimmen. Die effektive Höhe beträgt 10 ± 12 Kilometer. Wie bereits erwähnt, wählen Sie den Horizont konsistent. Der Fehler des substellaren Punktes beträgt durchschnittlich 15 Bogenminuten. Wenn Sie die Fehlerrate minimieren könnten, wäre ein Wert von 5 Bogenminuten wünschenswert. Das ist die ei
That's affirmative, Jim. We haven't got a picture of it yet. It's going to be in the top part of the - Correction, top part of the at the top of the - the top of detent 2 and the top part of the, and it should, in attitude, if you're right on the Sun, should split the cursor, though th
تما
请确认飞机姿态、ASCS（自动稳定控制系统）和电传操纵系
Je ne vo
Puisque vous êtes déjà en route, il pourrait vous être utile de savoir que Ruby Graham
Roger. Könnten Sie uns bitte den Syst
Eagle, Houston. It appeared to us when you were doing the, maneuvering the S band, the high gain went into the stop. V
好的，万斯。我们接
G
حوالي دقيقتين ونصف يا جيم، وستكون في كارنارفون، أي بعد دقيقتين و25 دقيقة و50 دقيقة. انت
حسنًا يا جيم. أريد أن أُطلعك على إجراءٍ مختصر لتفعيل هوائي النطاق S ال
Роджер. Не могли бы вы повторить свой 
Ok. Quello che abbiamo in mente è che stiamo esaminando alcuni
Хорошо. Кажется, мы их получили. Мы будем использовать новый, и у него б
جيميني 6، هذا قائد روس لاند. روجر، نحن نقرأك. نعتقد أننا على بُعد 30 ميلاً
Vous pourriez signaler aux chercheurs du MIT que
The big back is going on the camera at this time. There was a period there when nothing was recorded bec
네, 고르도, 퓨즈 스위치는 모두 제자리에 그대로 있습니다. 제가 건드린 건 하나도 없어요. 스퀴브는 작동 준비 완료이고, 자동 역추진은 꺼져 있습니다. 플라이 바이 와이어, 자동, 자이로스코프는 정상 
11, H
Roger, Jim. Gra
इसका मतलब है कि यह लॉन्च और बूस्ट की भारी मा
Thank you
この通信は、月と地球のほぼ中間地点から送信されています。飛行開始から31時間20分が経過しました。月まであと40時間弱です。ビルが歯ブラシを持っているのがお分かりいただけると思います。彼はいつも歯を磨いています。無重力下で物体がどのように浮遊するかを示すためです。彼が物体を捕まえようとする様子は
जैक, मुझे साफ पता चल रहा है कि हम अब चांद से
見て。広い範囲を覆っている。なんてこった、あの
짐, 세 가지 말씀드릴 게 있어요. 첫째, 컴퓨터는 이제 다시 당신 거예요. 둘째, 지금부터 데이터 전송 완료 전까지는 아무런 조작도 필요 없으니, 그냥 데이터 전송 모드로 가만히 계시면 돼요. 셋째, 방금 시작했던 데이터 링크 업데이트 절차를 취소하고 싶어요. 그러려면 TM 비트 전송률을 HI에서 LO로,
Roger. Okay. L'altra cosa è il post-atterraggio. Noi continuiamo - giusto per ribadire - a non voler rimanere più di un'ora nella navicella. Toglietevi le tute, a vostra discrezione, se la navicella non presenta perdite. La parte del portello aperto è una vostra decisione. Al momento, sembra che nell'area di recupero sia adatta a questo scopo. Ricordate l'esercizio di pompaggio che abbiamo fatto al momento della visita medica, e i piedi sollevati sarebbero la soluzione miglio
Roger. BLO
13, Houston. Vous 
Okay. Apollo 11 remains the prime story with the world awaiting your landing today at about 11 49 a.m. Houston time. In Washington, House tax reformers have fashioned a provision which would make it impossible for wealthy individuals to avoid income tax entirely through tax free investments or special allowances. Under the proposal tentat
حسنًا. سأبذل قصارى ج
T
No, en
罗杰，11。正如你可能已经注意到的，由于废水排放、燃料电池吹扫以及自然耦合，你的锥形角在模式下大幅增大，所以看来我们一
好的。基本上，你说得对。我先简单概括一下，然后再把步骤念给你听。我觉得这样更容易理解。方案是这样的：飞到一组球形角度，让你的望远镜指向月球。现在，无论我们处于什么姿态，只要你能通过望远镜观察到足够清晰的星图，并且相信自己可以独立完成校准，我们就应该停止讲解，让你自己进行校准。不过，我们给你的是一个步骤，它能让你看到望远镜里清晰可见的星图，而不用担心任何反射或其他类似因素的影响。这个步骤并非要求你在望远镜里已经能清晰看到星图之后还要继续执行。如果需要继续，我们会进行机动，观察月亮，在那里做一个标记，然后再次调整角度，观察太阳，在太阳上做另一个标记，这样就完成了对准。对准方案是，我们会提供一组角度，当指针指向月亮时，你可以用这些角度粗略地对准球。这组角度将与你输入的标称值一致。你可以用它进行粗略对准，设置漂移旗和REFSMMAT旗，这样你就能获得一个良好的平台，并且对准误差在几度之内。如果需要，我们可以在这一点上中断并进行入场；但是，为了获得一个良好的平台，我们将让你执行方案1，你会在方案1的槽位中找到入场点。你会得出这些数值，我们打算先粗略地将球对准入场姿势，然后按照
没错，现在整个月亮周围的区域，包括天空和月亮本身，都因为太
了解
알겠습니다. 빌이 시간 나면 배터리 B 충전을 시작해 주시면 좋겠
Flight表
حسنًا يا جو. كما قرأت، بعد 74 ساعة، سنجري فحصًا للشمس عند نقطة التوقف 2، مما سيستلزم إبعاد رادار الالتقاء. سنستخدم المناورة الآلية للوصول إلى هناك، أو على الأقل تحديد الزوايا اللازمة، وإذا نجح الفحص في حدود درجة واحدة، فهذا يعني أن المنصة مناسبة للمناورة، ولن نحتاج إلى فحص لاحق. ولكن حتى لو نجح الفحص، ستزودنا بنجم يمكننا استخدامه للفحص عندما نكون في الظلام. إ
Atlantikschiff, hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich wünsche mir, dass Sie Kurs auf Cape Cod nehmen. Ich habe die Kapsel auf die 180°-Position treiben lassen und muss mich momentan neu orientieren. Als ich mich vollständig auf Horizont und Periskop 
D'accord, Jack, répète ça... pour la mise hors tension; ce n'est pas dans les pages roses,
Roger. Area 1 Echo is one hour, 15 minutes, 42 seconds. I say again, one hour, 15 minutes, 42 seconds. O
روجر. نحن نمر فوق فوهة بركان بورمان، وهناك بركان أندرس؛ ويقع بركان لوفي
Pour information, Vance, il y a environ une demi-heure, Jack et moi ne pouvions pas observer les constellations ni les étoiles depuis certaines positions du vaisseau spatial. Nous pouvions distinguer 
Apollo 8, Houston.
罗杰，2：SPS/G&N：38320，加166，减081 080 11 3603，减01408，减去所有球，减去00743，全零，196 359 00657，加00537，01592 017 01531 23 1160 138。织女星，天津四 243 183 012，两台喷气式发动
لدي تحديث العقدة الخاص بك بتاريخ 20 42 09؛ ال
吉恩，我感觉很好。我现在正在用偶极天线进行短波通信。我已经重新调整了机舱设置。天线罩下降到大约4
如果我们
Bene. Per prima cosa, devi invertire la procedura di carica della batteria. Per farlo, sul pannello 3, spegni BATTERY CHARGE; AC INVERTER 2, spegni; sul pannello 5, MAIN BUS TIE BAT Alfa Charlie, accendi; sul p
고객님의 시계가 여전히 1초 
我用的是消光后的阿尔瓦格林光子来读。现在这个
حسنًا، هيوستن؛ 
Houston, Apollo 
ハッセルブラッドの写真の中には、シャッターが少し引っかかっているような感じがするものがあります。これは大西洋上空で撮影したS-6シリーズの2枚目です。フィルム巻き上げ機構がハッセルブラッドの動作を不安定にさせているのは間違いありません。今後は手動で操作する
Ждать 5 минут с како
Okay. „Bis / D
알겠습니다. 아주 좋습니다. 확인할 수 있
रॉजर, और एसईसीओ चेकलिस्ट पूरी हो गई है। वह 6.3 [जी] के उच्चत
Первичный кислородный баллон 
イーグル、コロ
फिर हम चाहेंगे कि आप कैमरे को खिड़की के सामने इस तरह रखें कि उसका अगला हिस्सा कैमरे के दृश्य क्षेत्र में न आए। फिर हमें दो सेट तस्वीरें चाहिए। आप पल्स मोड में हों और अंतरिक्ष यान को सीधे पृथ्वी की ओर नीचे की ओर रखें। यह तब होगा जब आप इसे शुरू करेंगे, लेकिन यह रात के समय पृथ्वी के क
Quelques points lumineux brillent sur la sonde. Apparemment, le sole
Хорошо, мы уже достаточно далеко продвинулись в этом направле
Хорошо. На панели 250 замыкается автоматический выключатель BAT A, ВВОД/ПОСТУПАЮЩЕЕ ПИТАНИЕ; на панели 275 замыкается автоматический выключатель INVERTER POWER 2, MAIN B. Далее на панели 5 нахо
よし。ジム、僕がやりたいのは、他のレンズを取り出すことだ
로저, 버즈. 제가 제대로 이해한 것 같습니다. 두 샘플 간의 차이가 미미하고, 각각의 경우 약 2인치 정도는 문제없이 박아 넣었지만, 그 이후로는 8~9인치 깊이까지 박아 넣기 위해 상당히
11, Houston. N
Стальноголовый лосось. Роджер. Перелом, якорное устройство и т.д. готовы на палубе. Все оборудование полностью подготовлено. Полагаю, мы сможем поднять вас на борт примерно через
لا
अपोलो 11, अपोलो 11
ロール1
收到。我再说一遍，你的状态向量没问题，一切正常。我们之所以在这里停留，是为了检查是否有信息丢失。这是第一个原因。第二
네, 이제 잘 들립니다, 프랭크. 프로그램
Roger. Moins 3 heures, manœuvre et maintien de l'at
로저. ΔV90. 16 52 25. 02 28 35
Aquarius，对比我们最初对用水量和用电量的估计，我们发现
見えましたよ。そうなんです、ロジャー。確かに光は見えました。でも、それが何なの
Сигма Семь, Сигма Семь, это командова
자, 이제 뒤쪽 어댑터와 장비를 다시 살펴보겠습니다. 분리면이 보이는데, 아주 깨끗합니다. 추진기도 깨끗하고요. 열 차폐 페인트와 열 차단 스트립도 상태가 좋아 보입니다. 카메라 옆에 붙인 벨크로도 잘 붙어 있는 것 같습니다. 다시 우주선으로 내려오겠습니다. 여기 앉아서 캘리포니아 해안 전체를
حسناً، تم إ
Okay. Under "VHF/S-band activation
G
Нет,
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous constatons que vous avez fermé la dernière fois il y a environ 4 minutes. Veuillez donc patienter 15 minutes supplémenta
——我
روجر، فهمت. نحن في الوضع الذي يكون
罗杰。30，SPS/G&N：36691，减 061，加 066 135 23 4156，加 32011，加 06 818，减 02650，181 054 014；远地点 NA，加 00230 32836 228 32628 42 1511 357，NA 三线，加 1103，减 17237 11806 36275
ठीक है। हमें समझ आ गया। आपके अंतरिक्ष यान के अं
Okay. Tha
أودّ التعليق قليلاً على السدس. استخدامه في مركبة فضائية ضيقة أمرٌ بالغ الصعوبة، خاصةً مع ارتداء الخوذة. قررتُ في النهاية أنه سيكون عديم الفائدة مع ارتداء الخوذة لمحاولة تحديد الزوايا المطلوبة للنجوم. لذا خلعتُ خوذتي. منحني هذا بعض المرونة في استخدامه، لكنني بقيتُ مقيدًا بزوايا تتراوح بين 20 و23 درجة تقريبًا دون تحريك المركبة الفضائية. ما كان يحدث هو أن الجزء العلوي من النافذة كان يحجب الن
Zwillinge
ジェミニ4号、ヒュ
Rog
Карнарвон. Близнецы VIII, если вы готовы к про
好的。阿波罗8号。看来由于一些跟踪要求，我们不得不推迟这次通信测试。如果这不会对你们目前的操作造成太大影响，我们可以在大约一个小时后完成。这可能需要15到2
Ok, Jim. La fortuna ti tiene. Il tracciamento mostra che il tuo angolo di ingresso è salito a -6,24. Questo sulla base di tutti i dati che abbiamo raccolto tra la metà del percorso e il momento in cui il serbatoio SHe è entrato in acqua. Quindi continueremo a osservarlo e vedremo se il 
Роджер, 
Ok.
Fortuna
... how do you read? 
Roger, Fred-o. Il nous reste une dernière procédure, et nous pourrons tout arrêter. Il s'agit de récupérer les aiguilles et le matériel nécessaires à cette manœuvre. Le 5018 pourrait vous am
Okay. Sì, è così 
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हम अपनी अवमंदन अवधि को 5 मिनट और बढ़ाना चाहते हैं; ताकि दरें काफी नीचे आ जाए
알겠습니다. 마
रॉजर। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। मैं फ्लाई-बाय-वायर मोड पर हूँ ताकि मैं इसे और सटीक रूप से नियंत्रित कर सकूँ। यह समस्या गुआयमास पहुँचते ही शुरू हुई, और ऐसा लगता है कि यह यॉ (yaw) में दाईं ओर लगभग 1° प्रति सेकंड की दर से भटक रही है। यह लगभग 20° के कोण पर पहुँच जाती है और वहीं स्थिर रहती है, और जब यह लगभग 20° के कोण पर पहुँचती है तो ओरिएंटेशन मोड में चली जाती है और शून्य पर
لنرى، سنقوم بتزويد ناقل الطاقة الآخ
ठीक है, मैंने तुम्हारी ब
ピッチダウン
收到。雷达显示良好。非常遗憾我们的朋友朱利安不能和我们一起。我想向你汇报一下控制模式的情况。首先，手动和电传操纵低空模式都很棒；辅助阻尼器也工作得很好。我现在处于自动模
Apollo 8, veuillez reconfirmer votre temps de combusti
そこ
जैसा हमने अनुमान लगाया था, चलने-फिरने में कोई कठिनाई नहीं दिख रही है। यह शायद ज़मीन पर किए गए विभिन्न सिमुलेशन में एक-छठे गुरुत्वाकर्षण बल पर किए गए सिमुलेशन से भी आसान है। वास्तव में, चलना-फिरना बिल्कुल आसान है। ठीक है। उतरने वाले इंजन ने कोई बड़ा गड्ढा नहीं छोड़ा है। ज़मीन पर इसकी लगभग 1 फुट की ऊँचाई है। हम यहाँ बिल्कुल समतल जगह पर हैं। मुझे उतरने वाले 
حسنًا. لديّ 
好的，我们走吧
Exacteme
Hier
هيا يا هيوست
VOX 녹음 중입니다. 방금 비행 중 스틱을 움직여서 반응 속도가 증가하는지 확인해
Тета, 11,8; диапазон 68,90; общее значение Delta-V равно 232; Delta-VI равно 101,1; точка данных: 05:40. Данные 12,5 Тета; диапазон 63,75; общее значение Delta-V равно 199; Delta-VI равно 84,2. Точка данных 40:... 13,5 Тета; диапазон 61,19; общее значение Delta-V равно 181; Delta-VI равно 74,8. 12:20
好的。在启动步骤中，第 2 行（或步骤 2）显示“正在闪烁 3700，按回车键”。杰克，我们要用到这个功能的时候，是当你刚启动电脑，它的状态向量是几个小时前的状态
バルクサンプルの進捗
Roger, Jim, Bill, ihr könnt die sekun
好的，
Roger. E, Mike, tra circa 11 minuti alle 83:44, ovvero alle 84:30, e prima di - o alle - vorremmo che tu andassi - Configura la banda S per la traccia ad alto guadagno su REACQ, il fascio ad alto guadagno su NARROW, e proviamo a vedere se riusciamo a ottenere un REACQ automatico alla pro
روجر. نحن في تلك الحالة الآن وننظر من خلال التلسكوب الماسح. بالكاد أستطيع رؤية 
아, 괜찮아요. 전 여기서 심심하지 않아요. 방금 전에 미드웨이 섬 위를 비행했거든요. 제대로 구경했죠. 지금은 여러분 쪽으로, 물론 여러분 북쪽으로 향하고 있어요. 진 듀렛에게 
Ok.
ठीक है। करेंगे। हम गेंद का वर्णन करें
Roger, Mike. T1, 104 32 18; T2, 104 37 28. E questo è 4 miglia a sud. Questo si basa su un sito di atterraggio mirato. Passo
لا، يمكننا ترك هذين الاثنين
Roger. Nous suivons votre progression. Il semble que vous soyez en train de terminer votre première étoile, et il nous faudra une autre série pour la deuxième. Ce délai de 7 heures n'est pas strict, nous vous serions donc reconnaissants de bien vouloir te
阿波罗11号，休斯
자, 이제 Flight 측에서는 헬멧을 벗고 잠을 자보실 생각이 
أبولو 11، هذه
阿
Musst du unten etwas durc
D'accord. Nous n'avions pas procédé à l'alig
कफ पूर्ण आकार का है
Roger, Frank. Nous avons effectué des vérifica
Gemini, we estimate you still have about 
そ
休斯顿，这里是
네. 저희는 용기를 사용하기로 결정했고, 아시다시피 액체 냉각복에는 덮개가 있는데, 그 덮개도 사용할 수 있을 것 같습니다. 아니, 사용할 수 있다는 것을 확인했습니다. 이미 시도해 봤거든요. 그러니까, 덮개 안에 또 다른 덮개가 있고 그 안에 액체 냉각복이 들어 있는 구조입니다. 액체 냉각복에 가장 가까운 덮개가 필요한데, 그런 덮개가 두 개 있습니다. 그리고 물론 테이프도 필요하고, 말씀하신 대로 비행 데이터 파일 타임라인 북 같은 것도 있으면 됩니다. 이런 재료들을 사용해서 임시 용기를 만들 
제미니 4, 제미니 4. 
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티입니다.
Nous affichons environ 104 800 miles et nous estimons qu'il reste en
Roger, compris. Vous avez dit 30,5 %. C'es
Okay. 
Apollo 8, Houston
Du lässt es doch au
We had a view, Buzz, of the util
Okay. Danke, Chef. Wir freuen uns 
هل يستهلك محرك التثبيت الخاص بكاميرا التلفزيون الطا
フレッド、この司令船の水酸化リチウムボンベを自作するんですが、少なくとも2個作って
D'accord, nous n'avons pas encore d'heure précise pour le début de cette procédure; nous y travaillons activement. Ce ne sera pas avant plusieurs heures; nous vous communiquerons 
हमारा अ
Okay, Pilot. Ich würde es vorziehen, an Bord zu bleiben und mich von einem kleinen Boot längsseits begleiten zu lassen, wobei natürlich Ihre
D'accord Fred-o. Page 12, nous avons besoin des mises à jour. Nous avons des vecteurs et une tablette pour vous. D
Eh bien, ce
杰克，我们还不确定实施这个流程的最佳时机，所以我们现在想做的是先给你念一遍，
Сейчас я начинаю видеть восход солнца в перископе. Первый свет в перископе за этот конкретный виток благодаря ночной стороне. Очевидно, что перископ совершенно бесполезен в ретроградном движении на ночной стороне. Первый свет, который я получаю, сейчас практически на высоте. Восход солнца довольно быстро проникает в перископ. У меня есть освещенные объекты, о которых упоминал Джон, и я могу создать некоторые из них, сбивая их. У меня определенно есть ощущение, что это поле, и они различаются по размеру от маленьких до ярких. Сам перископ меня слепит. Мне придется надеть на него карту, чтобы я мог смотреть в окно. Я готов к ретроградному движению в любой момент, поэтому мне ничего не остается, кроме как смотреть в это окно. Предполагая, что схема скафандра исправна. Эта карта очень помогает замаскировать этот проклятый перископ. Довольно большое поле этих объектов. Определенно подтверждено, что их можно сбить с люка, как сказал Скотти. И они стремительно удаляются, и нет никаких сомнений в том, что они движутся от капсулы с другой скоростью
Давайте немного пожуем жвачку. Кто-
Верно, Джек.
Amicizia Sette, A
Af
ठीक है। अब जब हम चौथी पंक्ति में पहुँचेंगे, तो हम ऑपरेट सर्किट ब्रेकर को खोल देंगे; इसका मतलब यह है कि हम आपके सीडीयू को देखने की क्षमता खो देंगे, इसलिए हम आपकी स्थिति नहीं देख पाएंगे। इसलिए, हम आपको यह सलाह नहीं दे पाएंगे कि संचार के लिए कौन सा एंटीना चुनना है। इसके लिए आपको अपलिंक स्क्वेल्च को बंद करना होगा, और जब आपको शोर सुनाई दे, तो एंटीना बदल दें। हम आपको एंटीना बदलते हुए देख पाएंगे, और एंटीना बदलने के बाद दोबारा लॉकऑन स्थापित करने में हमें लगभग 3 से 5 मिनट लगेंगे। हर बार एंटीना बदलने के बाद, हम एक वॉइस चेक शुरू करेंगे। और मूल रूप से, जब आपको खिड़की से पृथ्वी दिखाई दे, तो आप फॉरवर्ड एंटीना का उपयोग कर सकते हैं, और जब खिड़की में चंद्रमा दिखाई दे, 
안녕하세
Plus 38. Roger. Doe
알겠습니다. 다시 말씀드리지만, 어둠 속에 있을 때는 봤지만, 다시 빛 속으로 나온 후로는 보지 못했
रॉजर। मुझे समझ आ 
रॉजर। आज दोपहर हम टेक्सास खाड़ी तट के किनारे आपके क्षेत्र में एक दूर
알겠습니다. 괜찮으시다면 고비트레이트로 전환할 준비가
收到。您的留言几乎无法辨认。我们建议您告知我们您的睡眠时间，以及您是否感觉睡眠
罗杰。双子座8号，休斯顿。趁着现在有点空闲时间，我们想向您汇报一下通讯情况。再过两分钟我们就到塔那那利佛了；我们会在卡那封上空与您取得联系；然后1号卫星大约会到达；之后，我们会将信号移交给水星卫星
هذا صحيح. حسنًا. التالي. الوضع - عند - عندما تستقر على الوضعية المطلوبة، اضغط على زر MODE CONTROL AUTO. أدخل المفتاح لمراقبة المعدلات؛ عندما تكون أقل من 0.1 درجة في الثانية، قم بمراقبة المعدل في كل محور، ثم قم بتعطيل محركات الدفع الإضافية على المحور X. حسنًا. التالي، اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ 1257، اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ 252، اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ 1، اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ أدخل DAR 22110 وتابع؛ اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ ثم راقب المعدلات. عندما تكون المعدلات أقل من 0.01 درجة في الثانية في جميع المحاور، اضغط على زر الإدخال؛ MODE CONTROL، ATT HOLD؛ ثم 30 نقرة من الانعطا
Okay. Es könnte aufgezeichnet worden sein, muss aber nicht. Es dauerte – ich glaube, wir waren 44 Minuten nach Beginn des Außenbordeinsatzes. Ich schaute auf meinen Zeitmesser, den ich gestartet hatte, als Ed das Raumschiff verließ. Nach 44 Minuten war die Luke immer noch nicht geschlossen. Wir versuchten, ruhig und besonnen zu bleiben, dam
ठीक है। फिलहाल, हमारे पास चंद्र सतह पर आधारित पुस्तक के बारे में कोई
ठीक है। बहुत दिलचस्प। हम पता लगाने की कोशिश करेंगे कि यह आपके सापेक्ष कहाँ है। वे हम पर S-IV के प्रभाव के बारे में थोड़ी-थोड़ी जानकारी अपडेट करते रहते हैं। हमारा आखिरी अनुमान यह था कि यह लगभग उसी देशांतर पर प्रभाव डालेगा जो हमने आपको बताया था, लेकिन शून्य
쌍둥이자리 4호, 미국 상공을 지나고 나면 궤도 계
Gemini 4, ici le chirurgien de Houston. Nou
Columbia, this is Houston. The 
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। कृपया 90 डिग्री का यॉ करें। अपने 
Siamo scesi a 2400. N
了解。名詞76のクロスレンジは…ちなみに、後で更新するかもしれませんが、現在はプラス0017
我要做的——让我再说一遍——好的。让我把所有步骤都复述一遍。减压阀关闭；紧急舱压关闭；直接供氧关闭；两
Das reicht. Du ka
Der K
今は減っています。これから…これから…寒いです。司令船で気づきました。
バズは頑張っていると
Il comandante è a b
That's 
Ну что, вы получили межгалактический обзор новостей, который мы вам отправили пару часов назад? Возможно, это было во время вашего отдыха. Мы вам сообщили пару 
Okay. Ich habe eine Lösung
Хорошо. В третьем ряду, под COMM: DISPLAY, открыто; SE AUDIO, закрыто; VH
روجر. 0.98، وماذا قرأت عن تدفق الأكسجين على مقياسك الموجود في السيارة
VOXの記録に行きます。窓を見ると、太陽の光が一面に輝いています。確かに、光の筋が入った煙のような模様です。粉状の破片が付着していて、中にはピンク色、ピンクがかったオレンジ色のような色をしているものもあります。おそらく、リングやシステムのシーリング部品、つまりタワー投棄システムの周囲に取り付けられて
북극항로(NSR)는 지금 몇
Das Wetter ist hier eigentlich recht gut. Ich denke, bei Ihrem nächsten Besuch könnten Sie den Ta
हम आपसे दूसरी तरफ
Okay. Können Sie uns etwas über die Entlüftung sagen, woher
Bene. Per prima cosa, devi invertire la procedura di carica della batteria. Per farlo, sul pannello 3, spegni BATTERY CHARGE; AC INVERTER 2, spegni; sul pannello 5, MAIN BUS TIE BAT Alfa Charlie, accendi; sul pannello 250, apri l'interruttore BAT Alfa, POWER E
카나본, 질문이 하나 있습니다. 연료 보급 라인으로 복귀한 후 원래 
R
I'll get
Bene, siamo a 180 gradi, e ora vogliamo fermarci e iniziare un lento pitchdown. Vogliamo and
Acquario
फ्रेंड
١١، هيوستن. الوضع أفضل بكثير على خر
Roger. Nous allons
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 왼쪽 소파 밑에 누가 있습니까? 아니면 수위 조절 패널
Tout à fait, Fred. Et si vous avez la moindre question concernant l'alignement, n'hésitez pas à nous la poser. Nous serons ravis d'y répondre, comme pour l'alignement sur Terre, tel que décrit précédemment.
شاشتنا متذبذبة قليلاً، لذا ي
쌍둥이자리 
この時点でイベントインジケーターは正常に動作しました。写真撮影ができるように調整できたので、今後のシリーズはイベ
Questa è Friendship Seven. L'imbardata è uscita dai limiti di circa 20 gradi a destra. Al momento la sto riportando manu
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Буду готов с двумя аппарат
Houston, it's very interesting to note that when I kick my foot *** with no atmosphere here, and this gravity *** they seem to leave, and most of them have about the same angle of departure and velocity. From where I stand, a large por
パースが見えてくるはずです。ああ、これは素晴らしいヨーチェックですね。進路に対して左に約10度です。正確には進路に対して左に約12度です。ちょうど窓の端なので、ヨーは0度になるはずです。潜望鏡を通しては、助けになるものは何も見えません。あまりに
حسنًا، نعم. لم نُهيّئ حلقة 
यह सही ह
我们已经设置了滚转速率；滚转速率为0.3度。现在它正在移除
Guten Abend. Ich möchte mit Ihnen einige der symbolträchtigeren Aspekte unserer Apollo-11-Mission besprechen. In den Gesprächen der letzten zwei, drei Tage an Bord unseres Raumschiffs sind wir zu dem Schluss gekommen, dass dies weit mehr war als die Reise dreier Männer zum Mond; mehr als die Anstrengungen eines Regierungs- und Industrieteams; mehr sogar als die einer einzelnen Nation. Wir sehen darin ein Symbol für die unstillbare Neugier der Menschheit, das Unbekannte zu erforschen. Neils Worte, als er neulich als Erster den Mond betrat: „Dies ist ein kleiner Schritt für einen Menschen, aber ein großer Sprung für die Menschheit“, bringen diese Gefühle meiner Meinung nach sehr treffend zum Ausdruck. Wir haben die Herausforderung angenommen, zum Mond zu fliegen; diese Annahme war unausweichlich. Die relative Leichtigkeit, mit der wir unsere Mission erfüllen konnten, ist meiner Ansicht nach ein Beweis für die Rechtzeitigkeit di
Хорошо. Следующие три параметра такие же, а затем нам нужно, чтобы параметр «Сброс топлива» был установлен в положени
Roger. PAD di ingresso MIDPAC: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, più 1102, meno 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 1
D'accord. Ne les faites pas trop attendre. Je veux être secouru au plus vite. Dites au docteur Berry que notre tensio
Аполлон-11, Аполлон-11, это Хьюстон.
ただし、灰色なのか薄茶色なのかはわかりま
非常
Jim, in that control mode, that sounds like the best way to
रॉजर, गुआयमास, आवाज़ साफ़ आ रही है। मेरा कंट्रोल मोड अब फ्लाई-बाय-वायर है; जायरो बंद हैं, मैं अंदर हूँ - पैंतरेबाज़ी बंद है। मैं सीधे ऑटोमैटिक मोड में जा रहा हूँ। मेरी स्थिति ठीक है; कैप्सूल की स्थिति भी ठीक है। ईंधन 69-69 प्रतिशत है, ऑक्सीजन 88-100 प्रतिशत है। केबिन स्टीम वेंट का तापमान +10 हो गया है, 
Хорошо. Понятно. Второй вопрос: когда мы закончим -7, этот маневр для достижения положения JETT будет выполнятьс
盲区通讯。我们已建立视距。地面运行时间已到，4小时29分30秒。盲区通讯至Aurora Seven。请确保所有音调开关均已开启；警示灯已亮起；手
Они
TTC：そうですね。これはJETSに出演するべきだと思います。これは…それとも
О, хорошо. Я думал, ты... я тоже. Я думал
オート燃料残量は約68%、マニュ
Roger. Give
Bien reçu. Et les relevés de bord: D vaut 69, C vaut 73, D vaut… Je recommence. D’accord. A vaut 5
CB، DIRECT ULLAGE، اثنان منهم، مغل
रॉजर। 1, G&N: 38658, माइनस 054, प्लस 065, TIG 078 02 0345, प्लस 29
Ok, ora vado a configurare lo switch prima che Jim va
좋습니다. 57번 표면의 NOUN 73 트러니언은 180으로 유지하고, 샤프트는 335로 설정하겠습니다. 이상입니다
分かり
13, ह्यूस्टन। ह
That's correct. Okay. Next. Mode - at - When you're established at the attitude, MODE CONTROL AUTO. Key in to monitor rates; when less than 0.1 degree a second, rate in all - in each axis, then disable plus-X thruste
11番、こちらヒューストンです。準備はできています。ただ、このテストの前に高
휴스턴, 이글. E 메모리 덤프를 보내주실 준비가 되셨나요? 이
Okay. MANUELL
Roger. Pourriez-vous répéter en quelques mots pourquoi vous pensiez que la consommation de carburant était excell
It's surprising. There still is quite a bit
罗杰。我们正在查看电流，看看杰克是否已经
Houst
لا، لم نقل شيئا
Ricevuto. Capisco. Le letture della temperatura corporea a
待機してください。ロジャー、血圧を
Versteh d
알겠습니다. 전화 주세요. 다른 일들을 진행하고 있습
好的。最后一个问题在第2-4页
Ладно, Хьюстон
查理，关于二次泄漏检查，你就按你说的逐字
أرى، غرب محطتك، العديد من الدوامات والأنماط السحابية. الصور الملتقطة في هذه اللحظة هي: ٢، ٣، ٤، ٥. وضع التحكم الآن تلقائي. يوجد المعزز أسفل مني مباشرةً. أعتقد أن وضعي لا يتوافق مع قراءات الأجهزة، وربما يعود ذلك إلى فترة توقف الجيروسكوب. باستثناء اختلاف طفيف في مؤشرات الوضع،
حسنًا. حاليًا، يظهر النص "للخروج من G&N"، ثم يوجد تعديل مكتوب يدويًا يقول "تحديد تلقائي، 12 MAIN A وB". ثم نصل إلى الخطوة الأولى المطبوعة. نريد نقل "تحديد تلقائي، 12 MAIN A وB" إلى الخطوة الثانية، ليصبح الإجراء كالتالي: "الخطوة 1، الوضع اليدوي 3،
Flight continues, congestion is increasing, slow rotations, everything feeling fine. Through the periscope I can see 
Понял. Это «Дружба Семь». Мой статус: я в действии, но он не всегда держится. Проблемы с рысканием изменились. В первой части полета, когда у меня были проблемы над западным побережьем США, у меня были проблемы с рысканием, не было малой тяги влево; теперь у меня есть тяга в этом направлении, но нет малой тяги вправо. Когда капсула отклоняется от курса в этом районе, она переходит в режим высокой т
로저, 짐. 간단한 절차를 알려드리고자 합니다. 현재 사용하시는 W-매트릭스가 일부 메모리 위치를 공유하고 있어서, 지금 사용하시는 W-매트릭스는 올바른 값이 아닙니다. 따라서 이 매트릭스를 사용하여 관측을 계속하시는 것은 
حسنًا، إليك الآن - للتأكيد - مُضخّم الطاقة، مُطفأ؛ جهاز الإرسال والاستقبال مُطفأ؛ مُحوّل التيار المتردد، 2، مُطفأ؛ والأخير في اللوحة 250، بطارية جهاز 
REP RB 26 plus 39; Rolle links 47, Rolle
आप ऐसा कैसे क
Va 
Отлично. На странице E-9, когда вы готовитесь перейти в положение командного модуля, если вы хотите избежать запуска двигателей в результате коррекции ориентации, вы можете перевести ручные переключатели ориентаци
لقد رأيت ضوء سخان R
Roger. Non appena avrai la possibilità d
我现在正在看
Je largue le H2O2. Fusible activé. En attente. Le bras 
夏威夷，我们
Buzz, hier spricht Houston. Falls du noch in der Nähe bist, könntest du bitte 
Ok, 11. Molto bene. Ora, per quanto riguarda il contenitore del campione documentato: in televisione ci è sembrato che i campioni per quel contenitore fossero stati effettiv
Okay. Wir sind startklar. Ich habe Ihre 21-4-Ladung zur Übertr
Certo che sì. Altrimenti otterrei 
Ricapitoliamo la situazione. Non faremo altro. Manterr
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。你们友好的白队会一直陪伴你们，直到我们送你们回家。我们想祝贺大家此次聚会圆满成功，并祝愿大家度过一段美好的时光。演出精彩纷呈
わかりました。パネル 11 の構成、一番上の行: AC BUS B、S バンド アンテナをオープン、オープンにします。AC BUS A、テープ レコーダーをオープンにします。2 行目の SYSTEM A の下では、MAIN SOV から QUAD 1 TCA までをすべてクローズにします。FLIGHT DISPLAYS の下の COMMANDER'S X-POINTER をオープン、オープン、RENDEZVOUS RADAR STANDBY HEATER をオープン、LANDING RADAR HEATER をオープンにします。ATTITUDE DIRECT ブレーカーをクローズ、ED: LOGIC POWER A をオープン、UTILITY をオープンにします。その下: SUIT FAN 1 をクローズ、AUTO TRANSFER をクローズにします。COMM の下: VHF B TRANSMITTER
لديّ فكرة ما بأنن
거의 다 떨어졌고 마지막 컬러 롤이라서 지
Роджер. Мы с этим согласны. Я просто подумал, что, возможно, Джим, с помощью своей оптики, или вы, могли бы получить некоторое представлен
了解です。まず主要なイベントの時刻を簡単に確認し、その後、戻って詳細を補足します。さて、進入インターフェースは142時間40分、つまり6時間半前です。そのおよそ6時間半前に、ヒーター電源を投入し、CM/の温度をチェックして、必要に応じてCM/を予熱することで、このプロセス全体を開始します。おそらくそうすることになるでしょう。詳細な手順は後ほど説明します。約6時間前頃に、前回の中間コースで使用した修正版/30分チェックリストを使用して、電源投入を開始します。その後、少し前、5時間前頃に、前回と同様に地球ターミネーターを使用して、体軸アラインメントの姿勢をとってください。それができ次第、-7を実行します。これは、今のところ約2フィート/秒、つまり約15秒間の噴射のようです。そして、今は1.5フィートまで下がっているとのことなので、余裕でマージン内です。わかりました。それを実行すると、すぐにサービスモジュールの分離姿勢への操作を開始します。通常よりも早く分離するため、平面状態になります。平面外のコンポーネントは不要であり、望んでいません。つまり、サービスモジュールが半径ベクトルに沿って外側を向いた状態で平面状態になります。その後、コマンドモジュールのチェックアウトとホットファイアを含む、サービスモジュールSEPの準備を開始します。そして、約4時間30分前にサービスモジュールを分離します。サービスモジュールを捕捉するまで機首を上げ、写真を撮ろうとしますが、写真を撮るために移動操作はしません。飛行経路の角度を崩したくないからです。わかりました。これで2時間ほどの余裕ができます。もし遅れてしまった場合は、チェックリストを確認してコマンドモジュールの起動準備を終えることができます。コマンドモジュールの完全起動は、マイナス2時間30分後に開始します。コンピューターを接続し、機首を上げ、状態ベクトルのアップリンクなどを開始し、コマンドモジュールプラットフォームの位置合わせを行います。遅くとも1時間30分後には、コマンドモジュール関連の作業に1時間かけ、分離姿勢への操作を開始します。その後、機首を閉じ始めます。もちろん、それよりずっと前に収納の準備がすべて完了しているわけではありません。ハッチを閉じ、圧力整合性チェックを行い、マイナス1時間、つまり141時間40分後に を投棄します。それが完了次第、突入姿勢へのマヌーバを開始できます。突入したら、六分儀による恒星チェックを行い、光学機器を取り外します。その時点で、最終
Affermativo sui gimbal, Fred. Nient'altro a pagina 14. Procedi a pagina 15 e, alla voce "CHECKOUT", vorremmo cancellare quella dicitura e scrivere semplicemente "Verificare i seguenti interrut
好的。SPAN 的人说看起来不错，他们认为其中一个可以装在你 B1 头盔上，另一个可以装在迈克
了解しました。「VHF/Sバンドのアクティベーションとチェックアウト」のステップ1を削除してください。ステップ2で「DOWN VOICE BACKUP」を「VOICE」に変更してください。ステ
オーケー、ヒューストン。パイロアーム、GOだ
好的。在第一步之后，第一行，划掉“And VHF-A”。第二行，划掉“SIMPLEX operation”。第三行，划掉“Prime”。它指的是主功率放大器，关闭。这个“PRIME”实际上应该替换成“OFF”。这是该行的第二个“Prime”。同样，第三行的最后一个词“OFF”应该划掉，并替换成“PCM”。第四行没问题。第五行，即“VHF VOICE, ON, OFF, OFF”，划掉。下一行“Lighting, FLOODS”应该写成“OFF”，但要加上“Or OVERHEAD/FORWARD prefer OFF”。好的。第二步保持不变；暂时不用改动。稍等。跳过第二步。不要执行。直接进行第三
13番、ヒューストン。準備はできていますので、
, do you think we need 
रॉजर, तुम थोड़ी कमजोर शुरुआत कर रहे हो। अगर तुम इसकी एक कॉपी कर सको तो कृपया इसके 
D'accord. Je lui transmettrai. Merci beau
D'accord, Frank... 
Нет. Нет. Оно поднималось прямо от нижнего края горизонта
Negative. How do you read n
Роджер.
Верно, командир, управлять пушкой очень легко. Единственная проблема в том, что у меня не хватает топлива. Сейчас топливо закончилось, но я смог маневрировать вокруг передней части космического корабля, 
- - बज़। ठीक है, इसे घ
ठीक है, हमें कुछ समस्याओं का
Sì. Abbiamo deciso di usare un contenitore e, come sapete, l'indumento raffreddato a liquido è circondato da una sacca che pensiamo di poter usare anche noi, o che sappiamo di poter usare. Ci abbiamo provato. Quindi quello che abbiamo è una sacca dentro un'altra sacca e al suo interno c'è l'indumento raffreddato a liquido. La sacca più vicina all'indumento raffreddato a liquido è quella che ci serve, e ne abbiamo due. E poi, ovviamente, dobbiamo usare del nastro adesivo e, come dici tu, uno dei retro del file dei dati di volo, del libro della cronologia o qualcosa del genere, e,
ह्यूस्टन, कोलंबिया। संज्ञा 49 की प्रतिलिपि बना
Okay. Per rispondere alla tua domanda, Joe, è no. Ho controllato la CABINA di continuo. Qualitativamente, quando siamo passati a questa configurazione, non mi è sembrato che la frequenza o il rumore della ventola della tuta... siano diminuiti... si 
Роджер, Фрэнк. Вы могли бы нам помочь, если бы объяснили, где вы находитесь относительно уско
さて、月を離れた今、もっと日常的なことについて少しお話したいと思います。食品部門で起こった進歩についてです。皆さんは既にご存知だと思いますが、飲料容器のようなものはご存知でしょう。後ほどマイクが、新しいフィルターを使って水素を取り除く水鉄砲の使い方を
あり
再说一遍，阿波罗8号
Era un bel programma televisivo quello che hai trasme
Acquario, confront
Tout va bien pendant
Это хорошо. Хочу 
Ok
حسنًا. سنجرب واحدة أخرى، وهي أكثر وضوحًا. في الواقع، هي الوحيدة الأخرى التي تُظهر ال
Okay. I think, unless you guys got some more comments along these lines, maybe we ought to give these guys a chance to get to sleep,
Aquarius, Houston. Entschuldigung, aber es gibt zu viele Hintergrundgeräusche, um Sie zu verstehen. Wir müssen wohl warten, bis Sie 
Fred, dopo la masterizzazione, ti invieremo le istruzioni per lo spegnimento o le modifiche alla checklist. Allo stesso tempo, vorremmo darti informazioni sullo
Dome, cabin dome is about 57 (degrees). Cabin temperature is 90 (degrees). Suit inlet is 62 . Oxygen remaining 50 (psi, in hundreds) primary, 75 (psi, in hu
قبل فترة، قمت بنسخ مخط
Okay. Ich wür
ロジャー、チャーリー。ブザーを鳴らしてくだ
Я не могу вставить грушу для измерения артериального дав
Apollo 11, hier ist Hous
收到。雄鹰已脱离母舰。雄鹰已展翅。
Esatto. Bene. Il passo successivo è l'attivazione del modulo di 
D
了解、ジャック。噴出は本当にすごいようだ… 先ほども報告したように、大きな破片が通り過ぎて、我々が…燃える前に… 今見える噴出はもっと大きい… ダークモー
रॉजर। क्या आप मुझे कार्नार्वोन और कैंट
روجر. نواجه تشويشًا كبيرًا. بحر الأزمات يمتد أمامنا في الأفق، ويمكن رؤية فوهة بيكارد المظلمة في المنتصف. نحن الآن نقطع شروق الشمس على سطح القمر أو غروبها على سطح الم
特此
Ich melde mich nach einer etwa 45-minütigen Pause kurz. Uns ist aufgefallen, dass Sie Ihre Hochleistungsantenne optimal nutzen können, indem Sie bei einem Gierwinkel von 90 Grad und einem Nickwinkel von -45 Grad von der OMNI-Antenne auf diese umschalten. Sie nutzen die OMNI-Antenne derzeit etwa 10 Minuten länger, was in Ordnung ist. Mit dieser Vorgehensweise könnten Sie die Hochleistungsantenne jedoch effiz
حسناً. يبدو أ
Okay, sir
Это для Колумб
Ro
Большое спасибо, Брюс и Фред Шоу, мы э
Esatto. Questo dovreb
هيوستن، سنبقى 
Roger, Houston. C'est exactement ce que nous essayons de faire. J'essaie d'obtenir 15 secondes d'arc pour l'optique. Avec la luminosité de la Terre, il est très difficile de trouver une étoil
Houston, pour information, les deux dernières étoiles, les 34 et 40, ont été tirées à l'extrémité même du cercle éclairé. Il faut presque imaginer que le cercle se pro
Температура в куполе кабины около 57 градусов. Температура в кабине 90 градус
I've go
了解。コロンビア、ブ
هذا صحيح تماما
ठीक है। पैनल 3: बैटरी चार्ज, बंद - जैक, तुमने यह पहले ही कर दिया है - अगला एसी इन्वर्टर, पैनल 5: मेन बस टाई बैट बी/सी टू बैट बी/सी। हैं? हाँ, यह ऊपर है - ऊपर की स्थिति में। सर्किट ब्रेकर, बैट ए पावर एंट्री/पोस्
Bist du ber
You were blocked out p
2 番目の訂正: 2 プラス 56 プラス 37、お
Ok. Ditemi semplicemente con che tipo di materiale avevate in mente di costruire questa cassetta postale, e io e Jack ci metteremo al lavoro per provare a costruirla. 
Oh, stand by 1, Fred. We'd like to - change the position of that ATTITUDE CONTROL, three, MODE CONTROL to be just under free. That's a more con
Okay, Houston. We're at burn attitude. Jim is on the sextant star check, and w
Ich habe mich gefragt, ob wir ein A benötigen – benötigen wir möglicherweise einen der ANUN/DOCK/COMPONENT-Leistungssc
Хорошо, давайте попробуем. Могу я также уточнить кое-ч
Похоже, вы превысили допустимое отклонение в 15 градусов, поэтому можете п
Roger. E la prossima domanda del nostro panel è per Buzz. Ricordiamo che ha riferito di aver visto un laser sulla Terra la prima volta dopo la prima REV dopo l'ascesa, e ci chiediamo di che colore fosse il raggio e se è 
Roger, we 
Roger. On vous reçoit. On est prêts pour votre intervention. Attention, il s'agit d'une transmission UHF à 6 
Prévoyez-vous d'activer le compre
ठीक है। यह तेज़ वापसी के लिए एक पेरीसिंथियन प्लस 2 है। यह / 62871, माइनस 161, प्लस 129, प्लस 45224, माइनस 06216, माइनस 18712 001 287 351, 
杰克，我想你
That is correct. My faceplate is closed. Also, what is the trend of my cab
Bonjour. Nous pensions que vous étiez 
로저. 지금 보시는 모습은 동태평양에 있는 우주선에서 바라본 지구 중심부입니다. 하와이 제도는 아직 육안으로 포착하지 못했지만, 북미 서해안은 선명하게 보입니다. 미국, 샌호아킨 밸리, 시에라 네바다 산맥, 바하 캘리포니아, 멕시코의 아카풀코, 그리고 유카탄 반도까지 보입니다. 중앙아메리카를 지
아폴로 8호, 휴스
マイクさん、またフランクで
أ
11, ह्यूस
Ricevuto. Hai degli angoli di beccheggio e imbardata per la n
You can 
Oh no. 
Eagle, Houston. We look good through the 210 on this mode. We're going to shift data select to an 
알겠습니다.
Do you still want our - have us command as much as we can on the ground, or would you like to move
Nein, ich hatte den Hilfsschalter nicht eingeschaltet. Ich spüre, ob er lä
जी हां, फ्रेड। हम पावर डाउन करने के लिए तै
罗杰
... они могут взя
Roger. Je
11, Houston. Nous vous recevons très faiblement, le bruit est encore trop fort pour que la transmission se termine. Si vous pouviez nous aider pour un reverrouillage man
That's correct, Fred. We don't have procedures for that yet, and we don't have any real expectation of getting into it. The procedure I'd 
アポ
Deine Temperaturwerte sehen gut aus, Frank. Es gibt zwar noch e
A quanto ho capito, Jack, sei leggermente più avanti del 
لا، لدينا مفتاح على منظم الضغط هذا... مفتاح... مفتاح الكبح... بحيث يكون رقم 1... وهذا هو التكوين الآن، رقم 1 قيد التشغيل ورقم 2 قي
はい、2時
11号，休斯顿。经检查温度，飞船似乎在过去24小时内温度下降了2到3度
Rog
罗杰，休斯顿。-1纬度减去606269，经度除以2减去78954，海拔加00152；-2纬度减去09638，经度除以2加81691，
حسناً. على اللوحة 276: قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية للتحكم في طاقة الأجهزة، 3 و 
पश्चिमी तट पर सूर्योदय। यह थोड़ा निराशाजनक है क्योंकि चारों ओर घना कोहरा छाया हुआ है; धुंध और बादल छाए हुए हैं। तटरेखा के पास पहुँचते ही मुझे कुछ साफ बादल दिखाई देने लगे हैं। उम्मीद है, कभी न कभी मुझे प्रशांत महासागर के ऊपर से ऐसी उड़ान भर
배낭의 질량은 관성에 어느 정도 영
हम अभी बाजा कैलिफोर्निया के ऊपर से गुजर रहे हैं। 
还有一个问题，休斯顿。你说的“关闭电
他们也查看了你的地标追踪结果。所有标记点似乎都非常准确，我们这里有一整页关于各个站点海拔高度的数据，我就不一一念给你看了，但我想告诉你，标记工作显然非常顺利。我还拿到了你的消耗品预算，特别是推进剂用量。如果你需要的话，这是实际用量与标称值的偏差值。你最糟糕的是查理四象限，比标称值低了9%。除非你想看，否则我不会念其他四
ठीक है। और एक और बात है जिसके बारे में मुझे नहीं पता कि आपको जानकारी है या नहीं। पैनल
रॉजर, मैंने आपकी बात साफ़-सा
버스를 끄겠습니다. 그 사람들이 원했던 냉각수 밸브들을 전부 제거해서 압력을 0으로 맞
はい、わかりました。緊急時対応マニュアルを取り出して、Power 6 ページを開いてください。
Хорошо. Это даёт представление о том, как выглядит удержание позиций в режиме
태도 조절
Okay, Fred. That's one that we're leaving up until the is established. We have a procedure for to try with you, which we're hopeful will work pretty well. And I'll read t
네, 맞습니다. 업데이트의 마지막 문장은 혜성이 45도와 155도 회전 각도에서 관측될 수 있다는 내용입니다. 잭, 제가 본 도표에 따르면 혜성은 태양에서 약 10도 정도 떨어져 있는 것으로 보입니다. 혜성이 태양을 가리는 기하학적 구조 때문에, 45도에서 75도 사이의 회전 각도에서는 태양빛에 방해받지 않고 육분의를 통해 혜성을 관측할 수 있을 것으로 예상됩니다. 롤 각도가 75도를 넘으면 혜성은 시야에 들어오지만 태양도 함께 들어오기 때문에 45도에서 75도 사이에서 제대로 관측하지 못하면 75도에서 155도 사이에서는 혜성을 관측하기 어려울 것 같습니다. 만약 45도에서 75도 또는 80도 사이에서 혜성을 관측할 수 있다면, 해당 롤 각도를 기록해 두시고, 가능하면
9일 경기 TV 중계 시간
さて、ヴァンス、ちょっ
絶対に入らないよ。あ
再说一
Хорошо. Затем, после этого, они поднимутся, чтобы захватить Луну — извините, они собираются подлететь, чтобы захватить служебный модуль и сделать снимок, и с этого момента они будут использовать ACA для вращений. И вы можете увидеть пятый аппарат из иллюминатора одновременно с тем,
Stand by. We'll let the docs look at it. Buzz, we're on low bit rate. 
Роджер, понял. У меня 
Роджер. Наконец-то я снова подключил тебя к OMNI D. Я безуспешно пытался установить высокий уровень усилен
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ロックがうまくいきません。軌道上でオートモードになっているか、ビーム幅が
जेमिनी 4, जेमिनी 
...자,
ठीक है। यह अच्छा लगा, जिम। अगर आपक
ヒューストン、アポ
ठीक है। ऑटो रेट्रोफायर में चार रेट्रो फायर किए गए और 292, 000 के बाद और 114 नी
好的。现在翻到第32页，页面顶部，第一行，划掉“”。第三行，“模式控制：，ATT HOLD”。在“减6分钟”处，划掉第1、2行，在“Burn Attitude”处，划掉“”。划掉第2、3、4行。现在在“Burn Attitude”处，我们希望你输入“400加5”，然后输入“VERB - 400加0”。这里我们有一个注意事项
Яу отвечает очень хорошо. Бросок отвечает хорошо. Она очень хорошо поворач
रॉजर
क्या आप यह भी बता देंगे कि हम डी-9 को स्थगित कर रहे हैं क्योंकि हमारी उड़ान योजना के अनुसार ऐसा करना आवश्यक है। 
イベント時間は使用し
TR-10 정상 작동 중입니다. 아까 전에 이미 확인했었죠. 좋습니다. 슈트 압력도 확인했습니다. 인버터를 다시 한번 확인해 보겠습니다. 250은 141도, 150은 약 107도입니다. 이 정도면 충분합니다. 대기압은... 7입니다. 주변 온도와 
Okay. Die
Hier ein Bericht von Harry Rosenthal von Associated aus Houston. Zwei Weihnachtsmänner verschönern dem zweijährigen Jeffrey Lovell den Weihnachtsabend. Der erste klopfte an seine
Sieht so aus, als hätten alle jünger
你状态极佳，听起来棒极了。你除了带我们
짐, 여기 관제센터 직원들이 정말 잘해주고 있어서 기쁩니다. 모두 훌륭
Es stimmt, dass wir in dieser Entfernung nicht mehr die Farbtiefe erreichen, die wir in 50.000 Meilen Entfernung genossen haben. Die Ozeane sind jedoch immer noch deutlich blau und die Kontine
Roger. The rays out of Pickering are quite faint from here; there are two different groups going to the left. They don't appear to have any depth to them at all, just rays com
00:17:3
Роджер, Фрэнк. Мы хотели бы спросить вас о ближайших нескол
«Аполлон-11», Хьюс
了解。このページの変更点を読み返してくだ
Okay. I guess we should start off with a
Ok. Una delle prime cose che vogliamo fare è caricare la batteria, così da poter avere un po' di energia laggiù, e abbiamo predisposto delle procedure per farlo. Per quanto riguarda il rientro, stiamo pianificando il nostro ultimo rientro a metà rotta a 5 ore prima dell'interfaccia di ingresso, e, se dovremo farne uno, ovviamente. Poi vorremmo sganciare il modulo di servizio a circa 4 ore e mezza prima dell'interfaccia di ingresso, e dedicare le successive 3-3 ore e mezza a scattare foto, avviare il modulo di comando G&N, occuparci dello stivaggio e altre piccole cose. E lo terremmo fino a 1 ora prima dell'interfaccia di ingresso, e poi lo sganceremmo. Queste procedure saranno eseguite integrate nel CMS e nell'LMS domani mattina e, si spera, più tardi nel corso della giornata, le ripeteremo con il Controllo Missione in loop. Un paio di domande sono: cosa ne facciamo? L'idea è che ci sia O2 a sufficienza nel modulo di comando e che rappresenti una fonte di alta pressione e un problema di stivaggio, e si sta pensando di lasciarli lì. L'altra cosa è che pensiamo che potreste voler fare un ingresso in tuta, indossando la tuta prima di sganciarvi, perché quello che stiamo facendo è, quando sganciamo la tuta, farlo come abbiamo fatto nell'Apollo 10: lasciare andare la bellezza, e se non fossimo in tuta, beh, scommetteremmo sulla g
كولومبيا، هيوستن. لقد أخطأنا في هذه الإحداثيات. نرجو منك تحميل خط العرض 89 + 01 243، وخط الطول 2 + 11 844، والارتفاع
D'accord. Supprim
16 44 0
I'm unable to run any more tests on stars at time. I am coming back to the view of the surface of the earth. There's quite a bit of moonlight, and as a resul
我们可以看到月亮从窗外经过，它的大小看起来
Je crois que c'était après l'insertion, Bruce. Je ne me souviens plus exactement quand. C'était quand on était en orbite, après avoir enlev
Okay. We 
下面有树和森林；看起来像是有树和森林之类的。看起来像雪和树。
हां... उन लोगों ने
ठीक है। हम 3 g's पढ़ रहे हैं, लगता है इस बार हमें रीएंट्री डैम्पिंग चेक को छोड़ना पड़ेगा। अब रीडिंग 4 g's है। रीएंट्री ठीक चल रही है। ऑक्स डैम्पिंग रेट्स को संभाल रहा है। मुझे नहीं लगता कि मैं बहुत ज्यादा ऑसिलेट कर रहा हूँ; ऐसा लग रहा है कि मैं उस चमक के चारों ओर घूम रहा हूँ - पीछे का आकाश। ऑटो 
好的。我
好的。这里应该会越来越大，如果真是这样，那就
Co
Roger. Compris. Zone 7-3 GET RC, 10 04 47; RET 400K, 22 plus 02; RET RB, 28 plus 1
ويمكننا ب
حسنًا. لقد حصلت على متوسط، ومرت أمامنا للتو 
حسناً
了解。GET B 02 45 50。デルタV 26.2。燃焼時間 0 プラス 35。ヨー右 90、ピッチ 0。コア 25 と 26 はゼロ。コア 27 は 90262。スラ
... 제 모니터에 있습니다
Roger: Rückspule
有点像黄道光。它一直在向外延
Мы тоже выйдем на сол
ممتاز. ليس لدينا أي اتصال مع كيب كانافيرال حاليًا، لكنهم طلبوا مني مراجعة مشكلة التحكم في الطيران لديك. أول ما أود معرفته هو معدل دوران الطائرة عند تركها تدور 
Nein
जी हां, जिम। यही वो है जो हमने आपको कल रात बड़े परीक्षण के बाद दिया था, और हम इसे अपने द्वारा संशोधित करके इस्तेमाल करेंगे। हमने इसे सिम्युलेटर में आजमाया था, और ज़ाहिर है, कोई गड़बड़ नहीं हुई, लेकिन पिच और रोल में दरों को शून्य करके और ACS को यॉ में 
레트로 파워가 ARM 상태입니다. 제 그리니치 시계가 
روجر. PAD: TIG 102 33 04.36 09 50، ناقص 00021، 182 287 000، زائد 56919. إيقاف، أقل من 10 دقائق، 105 12 30.00. إيقاف، أكثر من 10 دقائق، 103 40 00.00 107 11 30.00. لا زائد 12: 102 44 27.00. زائد 01223، ناقص جميع الكرات، زائد 01889 015
Apollo 8, Houston. Et si on lançait un comp
Roger. And good
좋아요, 휴스턴. 지구를 조금 돌려서 물 말고 다른 것도 좀
Li vedo già al lavoro su McDonnell per questo guadagno. Immagino che ci siano delle pellicce che volano. Sarà quando torneremo. Li colpirò duramente. Voglio sapere esattamente quando hanno pulito quella roba. Ricordi? Avevano ricevuto istruzioni di farlo il giorno 
ठीक है, पृष्ठ के मध्य में, पंक्ति 9 पर, हम "संचार जांच के लिए वीएचएफ सक्रिय करें" और पंक्ति 10 पर, "सत्यापित करें" को काट देंगे। हम "बंद" को वैसे ही रहने देंगे, क्योंकि इससे बिजली की बचत होगी, और वीएचएफ सक्रियण भी इसी उद्देश्य स
Bill
마이크, 지금 보고 계신 것은 서반구입니다. 위쪽에는 북극이 있고, 가운데 바로 아래쪽에는 남아메리카가 있으며, 아래쪽으로는 혼 곶까지 보입니다. 바하 캘리포니아와 미국 남서부 지역도 보입니다. 북동쪽으로 길
로저. 산소 고용량 공급 대신 객실 재점화 밸브를 사용해 주시기 바랍니다. 또한,
Gemini 4，Canary CA
Und 11, Houston. Wir haben eine Bitte an Sie. Bezüglich des Sekundärtreibstoff-Druckventils des Servicemoduls: Sicherheitshalber bitten wir Sie, die vier Schalter kurz in die Position „GESCHLOSSEN“ zu betätigen und dann loszulassen. Wie Sie wissen, verfügen wir über keine technischen Daten oder Rückmeldeinformationen zu diesen Ventilpositionen, und es ist denkbar, dass einer der Schalter durch den Trenns
Они хотели получить этот ответ. У
Questa
好的。基本上，你说得对。我先简单概括一下，然后再把步骤念给你听。我觉得这样更容易理解。方案是这样的：飞到一组球形角度，让你的望远镜指向月球。现在，无论我们处于什么姿态，只要你能通过望远镜观察到足够清晰的星图
روجر. لقد قمنا بضبط نطاق التردد C على وضع التشغيل المستم
Хорошо. Хорошо. Прежде всего, общая философия заключается в том, что эти правила должны быть похожи на правила аварийного прекращения работы в режиме I с жесткими ограничениями. Теперь я пройдусь по ним по порядку, чтобы вы могли их переписать. Хорошо. Вам следует выключить двигатель, если произойдет что-либо из следующего: показания монитора тяги 77 процентов или ниже; давление в топливном баке — это давление на входе — бортовые показания 160 или ниже; разница между топливом и кислородом (DELTA-P) более 25 psi — и это должно быть сообщением с земли вам; ошибка ориентации плюс-минус 10 градусов, за исключением переходного процесса при запуске; ограничения скорости изменения ориентац
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Je n'avais rien dit à ce moment-là. Nous sommes en train de trouver des solutions pour vous. Concernant votre question précédente sur la gestion des cycles de sommeil, nous partageons votre avis. Nous souhaitons rectifier le tir en ce qui concerne les cycles de sommeil et autres aspects du plan de vol d'ici notre arrivée en orbite lunaire. Nous vous demandons donc de bien vouloir évaluer la manière la plus efficace d'intégrer les cycles de sommeil et de les répartir entre vous. Nous aimerions que v
Gemini 4, H
Jim findet, Deke kl
Wenn ich mich umschaue, fällt mir auf, dass der Kontrast im Allgemeinen ausschließlich durch den Schattenwurf der Sonne entsteht – ein sehr helles Grau, ein Halo um meinen eigenen Sch
私たちは、... を再び眠らせることを考え始めなければなりません。なぜなら、私は、
E
Apo
كان ذلك - كان قاطع دائرة شحن البطارية الذي يسمح لك بقراءة الفولت، لكننا لم نعرف اسمه الدقيق بع
Richte Valerie und den Kindern frohe Weihnachten von mir, Mike, aus und sag ihnen, dass wir uns in einer Weile wied
ह्यूस्टन, ईगल। सेकेंडरी ट्रांसमीटर/रिसीवर और पा
로저. 1, G&N: 62710, +0.98, -0.19, 0.75 49 4965, -28897, -0.3944, -0.0686; 358 226 347; 0.1692, +0.0610; 29173 602 29108; 31 106.6 358. 베가와 데네브 정렬 243 183 0.12. 여유 공간 없음. TIG 용접 2분 전 해
Да, его мож
Аполлон-8,
Хорошо. Теперь, Джим, если ты позволишь мне взять камеру, я покажу людям, где ты работаешь большую ча
Indikator für die E
13, Хью
La spia dell'acqua in eccesso nella cabina è accesa in questo momento, 03:56:24. La abbasserò un po', quindi sarà più o meno all'altezza della tuta. Direi, vediamo, da questo, che è 
あの超高密度の星空はまだ残っているんで
D'accord, Jim. Nous sommes encore en train de réfléchir à la question, mais certains éléments nous indiquent que nous pouvons effectuer cette correction jusqu'à 118 heures plus tard, sans pénalité significative de DELTA-V, et avec un suivi suffisant par la suite pour nous assurer d'avoir pris la bonne décision et vous préparer à une éventuelle correction tardive, ce qui est peu probable. Nous sommes satisfaits du mode de pilotage actuel et, bien que nous travaillions sur un mode à utiliser après la correction de mi-parcours, nous préférerions que vous restiez dans celui-ci pour le moment, car il fonctionne bien. Nous surveillons les conditions météorologiques dans la zone d'atterrissage. Nous ne p
बहुत बढ़िया। रेट्रो लुक के लिए लगभग सब कुछ त
Хорошо. В 14-й строке, в разделе СИСТЕМА НАГРЕВАТЕЛЕЙ A/B-1: откройте QUAD 1–4; ниже единственное изменение — в разделе НАСОС ГЛИКОЛЯ закройте АВТОМАТИЧЕСКИЙ ПЕРЕКЛЮЧАТЕЛЬ; в разделе СВЯЗЬ единственное изменение: откройте ПРИЕМНИК VHF A, откройте АУДИО КОМАНДИРА;
Roger. Ich habe dazu einige Informationen, die wir uns direkt nach der nächsten Übung ansehen werden. Wir möchten Sie bitten, diesmal die Fluglage „Nase Nord“ zu testen, also einen Nickwinkel von 180° und einen Gierwinkel von 315°. Außerdem möchten wir uns diesen Modus-freien Flug erneut ans
D'accord, Buzz. Premièrement, il semblerait que vos cartes obliques de site d'atterrissage ne soient pas correctement positionnées. Veuillez vérifier: nous pensons que la carte oblique de site d'atterrissage à échelle intermédiaire est rangée dans le livre des repères lunaires. Quant à la carte oblique de site d'atterrissage à grande échelle, elle se trouve probablement à la fin du livre des car
アクエリアスさん、オデッセイからアンペアとボルト
Apollo 11
O
Roger, Guaymas. Abbiamo ancora il booster. Siamo piuttosto lontani da esso ora, e sta consumando un po' più di carburante del previsto. Abbiamo 61 nella finestra di prua e di poppa in direzione poppa, 37 a sinistra e 36 in alto al momen
Okay, Buzz. Es ist ein Vorbeiflug. SPS/G&N: 62815, +097, -020 070 54 5944, -00028, +00023, +00069 029 149 312, Apogäum ist nicht verfügbar, +00221 00078 001 00034, Sextantenstern 01 2385 227, Richtstern ist nicht verfügbar. Breite: -0265, -16500, 11899 36228, 14
حسناً
La voilure principale est rentrée (signal vert). La voilure est sortie, conditions récifales à 3 292 mètres (10 800 pieds), et la voilure est magnifique. La voilure semble en bon état. Alimentation en oxygène d'urgence activée, et la voilure est en très bon état. La vitesse de descente est p
好的，吉姆。我只有最后三个区块。纬度，-021.62；经度，-265.37；范围，216
ठीक है। हमें लगता है कि अब आप बिना किसी नुकसान के अपने ब्लड प्रेशर को काफी कम कर सकते हैं, इसलिए अगर यह परेशान
ठीक है। चरण 7. सर्किट ब्रेकर पैनल 11, एसी बस बी, हीलियम पीक्यूजीएस डिस्प्ले, बंद। मुख्य - सर्किट ब्रेकर पैनल 11, एसी बस बी, न्यूमेरिक लाइटिंग, बंद। सीडी पैनल 11, एसी बस - क्या यह एसी बस बी 
अपोलो 11, यह ह
— — Я уже зачеркнул "CB(
आपको सूचित किया जाता है कि आपके पास एक नया 48-1 टीआर समय और भार है। मेरे पास आपकी बैकअप मार्गदर्शन मात्राएँ हैं। क्या आप इसे कॉपी 
また、S-5実験について。MCCは、地上線路沿いの障害物
La temperatura più alta nel nostro serbatoio è attualmente
로저. 참고로 여쭤보는 건데, 이렇게 작은 개울에서 근지점 고도가 이렇게 큰 마이너스 값으로
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。你的显示器（电视显示器）底部是不是有个
알겠습니다. 275번 패널의 해당 단계 이후에 "CB MAIN A, BAT C; CB MAIN B, BA
Роджер. Извините за спешку, но у нас тут произ
Gemini, CS
收到。好
ठीक है। पृष्ठ के मध्य से शुरू करते हुए, वह ब्लॉक "सीएमएस रिज्यूम एटीट्यूड कंट्रो
オイラーズはフィールドではそれほど好成績を残せなかったものの、興行収入は好調でした。バド・アダムス、ドン・クラウスターマン、ウォーリー・レムは皆、大満足でした。ちなみに、彼
Roger. Understand. We'll charge until the sleep period on B and delete the batt
روجر. العودة إلى الكتلة؛ وإعادة المحاذاة: 101 36 14.07 ناقص 00758، زائد جميع الأصفار، زائد 0
Знаете, мы пр
罗杰。继续播报《栗色号角》。尼克松总统在登机飞往与您会面之前，从旧金山给您的夫人打了个电话，令她们惊喜不已。她们都被您的电视讲话深深感动。简和帕特在任务控制中心观看了直播。昨晚，国际通信卫星组织（Intelsat）在卡纳维拉尔角的发射第四次被推迟。据说问题出在德尔塔火箭第二级的氮气调节器故障。今晚将再次尝试发射。正在研究墨西哥湾流的科考潜艇“本杰明·富兰克林”号在佐治亚州海岸1300英尺深的水域中，24小时内从海底上方10英尺漂移到100英尺，创造了一项纪录。该任务由雅克·皮卡
11, Houston. We'd like to try operation with the high gain array here. If you would select reacquire and your S band antenna to HIGH GAIN, your positions are pitch plus 40 and yaw 270, and then monitor for acquisition
Роджер. Мы списывали, пока ты не сдал свой тест. После этого мы пер
Foto scattata in bianco e nero della luna. Con il filtro meteorologico rimosso. Foto numero 6. E mentre la luna tramonta ne proveremo un'altra con una velocità di otturazione inferiore. Cercando di tenerla con attenzione. Questa è la seconda foto scattata della luna al tramonto. A questo punto il dorso della fotocamera verrà reinstallato e la foto
了解、トランクウィリティ。108番の約6分後に到着します。イベントタイマーを開始したい場合は、108:00にハックできます。オーバー
Okay. Noch etwas sollten wir bedenken: Wir haben den Mond nicht gesehen – wir konnten ihn nicht vollständig sehen und sehen ihn auf dem Rückweg nur selten. Wir haben ihn seit unserem Aufbruch einmal gesehen, aber wir haben uns in die falsche Richtung bewegt, um den kürzesten Weg zum Mond zu finden. Der Wechsel von der Erdperspektive zur Mondp
罗杰，早上好。7号航道中段的情
The Sun feels wonderful. It's shining in the re
Sigma Seven, hier spricht Kano Com Tech. Sendung auf Kur
मैं अब आपके प्लस 44 पर इनपुट देने और उस 44 घंटे के बर्न टाइम का उपयोग करने का प्रयास करूंगा। मैंने देखा कि प्रवेश वेग थोड़ा अधिक है। शायद हम सामान्य त
자, 이제 달에 기준점을 하나 표시해 드릴게요. 이 지점이 지금의 요각 0도라고 할 수 있겠네요. 마크.T
이건 프
R
월리, 내가 거기서 네 차선을 끊었어. 인버터의 수도 밸브 설
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन सीएपी कॉम। क्या आप उड़ान योजना अपडेट कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हैं
Bon, tant pis pour le rayon alimentaire. Je vais fer
قاع
Хорошо. Мы можем отложить эту навигационную навигацию. Она была запланирована здесь на [время], и мы можем её перенести. Судя по вашим комментариям о сне, мы хотели бы получить её как можно скорее, и сейчас мы планируем перенести её на 2 часа. Мы сделаем это, перенеся её на т
روجر، إذا لم يتغير الوضع منذ 4 أو 5 ساعات مضت، فأنا 
Jim, Sie können nun fortfahren, aber ich möchte Sie darauf hinweisen, dass die Fernsehzeit weiterhin auf 55 Stunden festgelegt ist. Wir stehen bereit, um Ihren Beitrag zu unterstützen und melden uns in einer Minute bei Ihnen zurück, um mehr über die O2-Brennstoffzelle
Correction, Roger, pression artérielle, 47 [degrés] sur la température de la va
프렌드십 세븐, UHF 대역에서 저희 
罗杰。我们正
अपोलो 8, यह ह्यूस्टन है, 3 
Roger. Kop
Zumindest können wir sie bis zur Nachbes
..
بدأتُ الآن أرى شروق الشمس في المنظار. هذا أول ضوء يظهر في المنظار خلال هذه الدورة تحديدًا نتيجةً للجانب الليلي. من الواضح أن المنظار لا يعمل إطلاقًا في وضع الرجوع للخلف على الجانب الليلي. أول ضوء أراه الآن في وضع شبه مظلم. يشرق الشمس بسرعة كبيرة عبر المنظار. لديّ الأجسام المضيئة التي ذكرها جون، ويمكنني توليد المزيد منها بإزالتها. لديّ إحساس واضح بوجود حقل منها، تتفاوت أحجامها من صغيرة إلى ساطعة. المنظار نفسه يُعمي بصري. سأضطر إلى وضع الخريطة عليه لأتمكن من الرؤية من النافذة. أنا في وضع الرجوع للخلف في أي وقت، لذا ليس لديّ ما أفعله سوى النظر من هذه النافذة. بافتراض أن دائرة البدلة تعمل بشكل جيد. تساعد تلك ال
すでに旅の途中にいるあなた、ヒューストンの占星術師ルビー・グラハムが、あなたの月への旅の星座がすべて良好だと言っていることをご存知でしょうか。彼女はニールは賢く、マイクは判断力があり、バズは複雑な問題を解決できると言っています。また、ニールは世界をバラ色の眼鏡で見る傾向があるものの、苦しんでいる人や困っている人をいつで
Roger. Mir scheint, da wir die Umlaufbahnen so genau kennen, die Positionen der Sterne so genau b
L'un des cratères dont 
روجر. لقد قضى ليلة جيدة
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, den korrekten Rollwinke
Okay. Ruft uns in ein paar Minuten nochmal an. Wir holen gerade etwas zu e
好的，休斯顿；水
Я получил твой контрольный список, Майк; хочешь его верну
That is all of this group. We have a correction on that time for the HF voice check. It is at 05 hours 09 minutes. Do you
Guarda lì!
그곳은 폐쇄되었고, 배터리에 대한 경고 표시도 없지만, 
«Аполлон-11», Хьюст
Nun, es wird dunkel. Ich sehe hier auch Dunkelheit, Jim. Mal sehen, was wir in einer der nächsten Nä
Die Smyth Se
好的。杰克，地球从那里经过时，温度大约是18度
Пол
غروب الشمس خلابٌ حقًا، لا أعتقد أنني بحاجة لإضاعة الكثير من الوقت في النظر إليه. إنه مثيرٌ للاهتمام للغاية. الأمر الآخر المثير للدهشة هو مدى سواد الظلام عندما لا تكون العينان قد اعتادتا عليه. أستطيع بالتأكيد رؤية بعض الطلاء على النافذة. سأعود الآن إلى وضع VOX على تردد UHF-hi للإرسال. سأفتح واقي الوجه لمسح الميكروفون الأيمن. لقد لعقته. سأغلق واقي الوجه. تم إغلاق واقي الوجه فورًا لكي تعمل دائرة البدلة. لا أريد أن أعبث بها مرة أخرى. مدخل البدلة يحافظ على درجة حرارة جيدة جدًا عند حوالي 68 درجة. لذا سأرفع القبة مرة أخرى. إنها الآن عند 76، 75. يبدو أن هذا الإعداد الأعلى هو ما نريده. أعتقد أنني سأضيف نصف علامة أخرى الآن وقد نتمكن من تثبيته. لقد بدأت تبرد أخيرًا، لذا أعرف ما أريد الوصول إليه في الإعداد. لقد ضبطتُ كمية سائل التبريد للبدلة وذراع التحكم على 8.5. قراءة درجة حرارة القبة حاليًا هي 75 درجة. مدخل البدلة 68 درجة. جوٌّ لطيف للغاية. أشعر بهواء بارد يمرّ على وجهي. تبدو كمية الأكسجين جيدة جدًا، 60 و75 رطل لكل بوصة مربعة. أراقب محوّل الطاقة 250. تقترب درجة حرارته من 140 درجة، وانخفضت درجة حرارة محوّل الطاق
حسنًا. أعتقد أن جيم يمسكها الآن، ويجب 
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Une minute avant Canary; à Tananarive 37 04 en VHF Simplex Alfa. Te
네, 짐. 어젯밤 대규모 연소 작업 후에 드린 바로 그 설정입니다. 저희가 수정한 대로 그 설정을 사용하겠습니다. 시뮬레이터에서 시험해 봤는데, 물론 슬로싱 같은 건 없었지만, 피치와 롤 방향으로는 레이트를 0으로 맞추고 요 방향으로는 ACS가 처리하도록 하니 꽤 잘 작동하는 
Gut. Das wird to
Roger. Donnez-m
62970, माइनस 162, प्लस 129, प्लस 00966, प्लस 00552, माइनस 02079। अगले तीन सभी शून्य हैं, NA, प्लस 00202 02358 0
نيل، انظر إلى دعامة Y السالبة، اتجاه الحركة 
Warum willst du das Trainingsgerät benutzen? Fühlst
Eagle, Houston. Ti consigliamo di imbardare 10 a destra. Ci aiuterà con l'intensità del segnale ad a
CM/LAUNCH 
Ce que vous voyez, Mike, c'est l'hémisphère occidental. En haut, le pôle Nord; au centre, juste en dessous, l'Amérique du Sud, jusqu'au cap Horn. Je peux voir la Basse-Californie et le sud-ouest des États-Unis. Un long banc de nuages ​​s'étend vers le nord-est, couvrant une grande partie du golfe du Mexique et remontant jusqu'à l'est des États-Unis. Il semble que la côte est soit nuageuse; je peux voir des nuages ​​au-dessus de certaines régions du Mexique; le ciel es
ヒューストンネットワークのハニーサックルがGOSSカンファレンスに出演します。どうですか
مرحباً يا غوايماس. هذ
Ok. Abbiamo il tubo blu dell'LMP vicino al finestrino dell'LMP e il - Ovviamente, il tubo rosso è separ
Чарли, повтори еще раз эти три угла. Я хотел бы подтвердить и
Still staying 
Давай, Хьюстон. 
जैसे-जैसे हम बर्निंग प्रक्रिया के करीब पहुँचते हैं, आपको वही जाँच करनी होगी जो हमने पिछली बर्निंग प्रक्रिया के लिए की थी। यानी, हमें यह सुनिश्चित करना होगा कि सब कुछ चा
Okay
Lascia il computer così c
هذا صحيح. أنتم الأجدر بمعرفة ذ
分かりました。いつか二人の人がそこに集まって、水酸化リチウムの装置を一つ作れるようになったら、材料を揃えて、一緒に手順を確認しましょ
Ricevuto. Questa è SWIM 1,
Да, он возвращается. Похоже, у него 
舱顶——卡诺，这里是Si
Roger. Ich verstehe dich, Mike, und ich habe dich auch schon beim letzten Mal verstanden, als du mich das gefragt hast, also habe ich dich wohl nicht erreic
... レトロな雰囲気を醸し出す時代が来
سيجم
アポロ8
로저. 수신했습니다. 11. 프로그램이 거의 무한대에 가까운 각도 조합을 제공할 수
아
Ce n'est pas le vaisseau spatial qui est difficile à pointer, c'est la caméra. Le support est tellement flexible qu'il peut faire sortir la caméra du champ de vision lorsqu'elle est positionnée à travers le hublot. Il a
ठीक है, जैक, इस स्थिति में, जिसमें हम इधर-उधर हिल रहे हैं, मैं तारों को देखने के लिए इसका उपयोग
O
いいえ、残念ながら彼はそこまで
了解、コロンビア。11号機が到着しました。機体番号：37200、マイナス060、プラス047、098、05、2422、プラス41448、プラス03719、マイナス02422。ロールはNA、ピッチは020、その他のPAD
Nein, nicht wirklich. Ich muss noch ein bisschen am Fernsehmonitor arbeiten. Mei
Okay, Jim hat Recht. Wir sollten das alles streichen, bis auf ein paar Ausnahmen. Das erste Schritt, das geschlossene Vorwärts-Ablassventil, sollte bleiben. Alle anderen Schritte können gestrichen werden, außer dem letzten, dem geschlossenen Überkopf-Ablassventil. Damit b
방금 레트로 
Okay. Bedienfeld 3: BATTERIELADUNG, AUS – das hast du schon gemacht, Jack – als nächstes der Wechselrichter. Bedienfeld 5: HAUPTBUSVERBINDUNG BAT B/C. Hä? Ja, er ist oben – in der oberen Position. Sch
我们的
现在我的三个轴向运动速率都接近于0。当然，潜望镜里仍然有光。我正直视上方，然而此时此
휴스턴, 아폴로
알겠습니다. 그게 저희
एक्
Вероятно, Кен, мы никогда не теряем сигнал при
جيميني 4، جيميني 4، جيميني 4، هذا هو مركز اتصالات آر كي في ك
11، هذه هيوستن. لقد أكملنا عملية الإرسال؛ الكمب
Bien, Apollo 8. La suite de notre test est identique à celle d'hier: nous allons passer en mode de liaison montante avec commandes et télémétrie sans communication vocale. Nous resterons dans ce mode pendant environ deux minutes et demie et enverrons deux messages de t
Хорошо, я не хотел дозвониться или что-то в этом роде. Я просто хотел проверить, есть ли у нас во
Roger.
Roger. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich nutze jetzt Fly-by-Wire, um prä
알겠습니
罗杰。我们也在考虑这个问题，
रॉजर। मध्य पाठ्यक्रम सुधार संख्या 2. एसपीएस/जी एंड एन: 63059, प्लस 097, माइनस 020 02644 5792, प्लस 00118, माइन
ブルース、ホワイト爺さんは元気かい？裏側に行った時、コーヒーでも飲
ピッチレートをそこに
O
아주 좋습니다. CAP COM으로 다시 보내드리겠습니다. 카나리 외과의사였
로저. 우리 선실은 괜찮은 상태입니다. 딱히 어떻게 할 수 있는 방법이 없는 것 같아요. 산소탱크 압력이 올라가는 것 외에는 별다른 문제가 없습니다. 사실 우리는 필요 이상으로 산소를
Gli EECOMM affermano 
Okay. All right, I didn't hold it in that l
Roger, understand 6 mi
D'
シグ
नमस्कार, कोलंबिया। ह्यूस्टन। हम चाहते हैं कि आप अप
Roger. Das war eine gute Rückmeldung. Wir haben noch eine letzte Anweisung für Sie. Das Rendezvous-Radar ist momentan eingefahren, und wir können aus Position 2 nichts sehen. Daher bitten wir Sie, das Radar auf 0283 zu positioniere
حسنًا، كل ما نريده منك يا بيل هو إعادة الالتقاط في الوضع التلقائي. ويبدو أن هذه إحدى الطرق. لكن ما نقوله هو، كما تعلم، إذا أردت 
और अभी तक मुझे सर्दी नहीं हुई है, लेकिन अब मुझे लग रहा है कि सर्दी होने वाली है, पहले कभी नहीं हुई। मुझे लगता है कि ये सब उस 100 प्रति
Sì. Attraversano appena a sud della parte inferiore del Messico, probabilmente attraverso l'America Centrale. Quella è la fascia equatoriale che supponiamo essere la zo
Cabin PO2 at this time is about 3.9 to 4.0 (psi). Cabin heat exchanger is about 50 (degrees), at this time. Dome just happens to be on an ups
哥伦比亚，这里是休斯顿。你与宁静基地之间的视
Wir passieren hier einige steile Grate. Es handelt sich um die Ränder alter Krater, die von Apollo 10 fotografiert wurden; die Besatzung von Apollo 10 war sehr beeindruckt von der Steilheit dieser Grate, als sie diese in etwa 15.000 Metern Höhe übe
好的，杰克。现在剩下的步骤只是宇航服回路的配置步骤，目的是让这套系统全面投入运行。我们的人员希望等到你正在操作的那个气瓶压力达到7.6毫米汞柱后再进行配置，这大概还需要45分钟到1个小时——我们现在读数是4.7毫米汞柱。所以，在此期间，我们希望你用指挥官的软管，以同样的方式设置第二个指挥舱气瓶，并做好一切准备。大概到那时，就可以进行切换了。顺便告诉你，当你完成这些步骤，并且吃过早饭之后，接下来我要给你一份指挥舱的切换配置清单，这份清单代表了我们所有进入舱前检查的初
嗯，这是
我看到了，我不确定我的VOX录音功能是否正
그
アポロ8号、ヒューストンは現在視界不良です。ダウンボイスを受信できません。データは取得済みですが、おそらく地上の問題と思わ
马克
C
Роджер. Некоторое время назад мы заметили признаки перезагрузки компьютера и хотели бы узнать, есть ли у вас какие-л
로저. 여기도 괜찮아요
روجر، 
わかりました。E-11のステップ5の最初のサブタイトルに「ヘルメットと手袋」とありますが、その下の項目はスーツを着用するかシャツの袖で入るかによって変わりますが、必ず実行する必要があります。スーツのリターンエアバルブは、シャツの袖で入る場合は実際には開いている必要があります。また、緊急キャビン圧力バルブとCMPがソファに移動する時間の間に、光学機器の電源をOFFにする線
Bene. In questo passaggio
Houston, vous vouliez juste deux minutes de 
بينما نوجه المركبة نحو الأعلى في هذا الاتجاه، نرى من نوافذنا الجانبية الشمس وهي تمر، وبالطبع نرى الأرض من إحدى نوافذنا الآن. وخل
ठीक है। हम लगभग 2 मिनट तक इसी स्थिति में रहेंगे, और फि
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 네, 동의합니다
了解。オートにします
Да, думаю, так и ес
Okay. How about - You ready for some other re
Roger. Vanne de purge supérieure fermée. Jim n'a peut-être pas tort, fi
教えてください。HF を 1 つのボタンで使用しま
嘿，格斯。你能帮
Ever
好的
Oui. Nous sommes suffisamment loin maintenant pour que l
روجر، فريد. قراءة جيدة. بدءًا من اللوحة 16. تحت شاشات العرض، الصف 1: مؤشرات التقاطع SE، مفتوحة؛ نظام Bravo - وحدات التحكم الرباعية 1، مغلقة؛ الرباعية 2، مغلقة؛ الرباعية 3، مغلقة؛ الرباعية 4، مغلقة. الصف الثاني، تحت الإضاءة: يمكنك اختيار الإضاءة الكاشفة. يمكنك استخدام إما: طاقة المنطق Bravo، مفتوحة؛ أو التحكم في تدفق البدلة، مفتوحة. الصف الثالث، الشاشة، مفتوحة؛ جهاز إرسال VHF A، مفتوح؛ جهاز استقبال VHF B، مفتوح؛ هوائي النطاق S، مفتوح. الصف الرابع، تحت السخانات: الشاشة، مفتوحة؛ تحت: العاكس 2، مفتوح. وهذا كل شيء.
알겠습니다. 그리고 데이터가 쏟아지기 시작하면 다시 시간을 알려주
ठीक है। मैं बस आपको इस बात से अवगत कराना चाहता था और इस पर विचार करना चाहता था कि उड़ान योजना पर इसके क्या प्रभाव पड़ सकते हैं। मैं इस वाइड एंगल वी
자, 휴스턴, 시작해
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। अब हम संचार जाँच के लिए तैयार हैं, और यह आपकी मर्ज़ी है। हम आपको स्विच बता सकते हैं और आप उन्हें चालू कर
Roger. Hai avuto un taglio eccellente, John. La tua velocità era di 8 piedi al secondo, bassa. V su VR, 1,0002
Да, думаю, нам лучше быть в хорошей форме, особенно нам самим, отдохнувшими перед этим днем ​​вступления в до
没错。请按照登记簿第1-4页第32步进
ठीक है, आपको यहाँ समस्या है। इसे प्राप्त कर
We have a scanner ignore
서두를 필요 없어요. 다음 RE
了解。分離噴射はGET、09プラス44プラス
Cette transmission vous parvient à mi-chemin environ entre la Lune et la Terre. Nous sommes en vol depuis 31 heures et 20 minutes environ. Il nous reste moins de 40 heures pour atteindre la Lune. Vous pouvez voir que Bill a sa bros
Le batterie princi
ライト値は、白黒フィルムで ASA 64 の場合は 13 です。ライト値を 13 に設定しています。フィルターを
そうするか
좋습니다, 휴스턴. 연소 작업이 완료되었습니다. 이제 전원 차단에 대해 이야기해야 하는데
أورورا سفن،
So, 
R
您的时间安排没有变
ठी
الصداقة السابعة، تستعرض قائمة 
हम 
11, Хьюстон. Мы можем разглядеть маркировку на панели. Мы читаем: СИСТЕМА А, ТОПЛИВО ASCENT, ОКИСЛИТ
Gémeaux 4. Gémeaux 4,
좋습니다. 다음 단계는 패널 11과 16 CB ASCENT ECA CON
I think we ought to make a bi
एक्वेरियस, ह्यू
是的。答案是不要快速将其设置为自动模式。它
حسنًا. الخيار لك. حالما ينهض جاك،
Apollo 11, Houston. We're doing a nonpropulsive vent on the booster at the present time. You may see some sort of a 
कृपया एक व्
Okay, Houston; W
Okay. You watching you
Okay, Brennstatus: DELTA-TIG war Null, Brennzeit war 2 plus 30. Padwinkel: DELTA VGX nach Trimmung war 0,1, VGY 0,9, VGZ 0,1. DELTA-VC minus 17,9, Brennstoff 10,6, Sauerstoff 10,4, Unwu
Très bien
그랬나요?... ​​
ठीक है। प्रवेश पै
好的。我看错钟了
Hallo, Freunde, Glückwünsche nach Mexiko u
로저. 닐, 원거리 촬영은 괜찮아 보이네요. 파노라마 촬영이 끝나면 다시 정렬해 드릴게요. 지금 파노라마
بدأتُ الآن أرى شروق الشمس في المنظار. هذا أول ضوء يظهر في المنظار خلال هذه الدورة تحديدًا نتيجةً للجانب الليلي. من الواضح أن المنظار لا يعمل إطلاقًا في وضع الرجوع للخلف على الجانب الليلي. أول ضوء أراه الآن في وضع شبه مظلم. يشرق الشمس بسرعة كبيرة عبر المنظار. لديّ الأجسام المضيئة التي ذكرها جون، ويمكنني توليد المزيد منها بإزالتها. لديّ إحساس واضح بوجود حقل منها، تتفاوت أحجامها من صغيرة إلى ساطعة. المنظار نفسه يُعمي بصري. سأضطر إلى وضع الخريطة عليه لأتمكن من الرؤية من النافذة. أنا في وضع الرجوع للخلف في أي وقت، لذا ليس لديّ ما أفعله سوى النظر من هذه النافذة. بافتراض أن دائرة البدلة تعمل بشكل جيد. تساعد تلك الخريطة كثيرًا في إخفاء ذلك المنظار اللعين. إنه حقل كبير جدًا من هذه الأجسام. من المؤكد أنه يمكنك إزالتها من الفتحة، كما قال سكوتي. وتنطلق هذه الأجسام بسرعة، وبالتأكيد لا توجد مشكلة في تقدير أنها تبتعد عن الكبسولة، بسرعة مختلفة عن سرعتك. إنها بالتأكيد أبطأ من الكبسولة نفسها. بنقرة واحدة، يمكنك رؤيتها تنزلق للخلف. إنها صغيرة جدًا بحيث لا يمكن تصويرها. لن أحاول حتى التقاط صورة لها. يت
बहुत बढ़िया, जैसा कि आप जानते होंगे, पहले चक्कर के दौरान इस सूट सर्किट
Das ist negativ, Mike. Wenn du dir den Flugplan ansiehst, den wir dir nach dem Flug zeigen, siehst du, dass das Flugzeug direkt nach der ersten Umdrehung spiralförmig auf etwa 20 bis 20 Grad Steigung abdriftete. Dann schien es ein
这
- -
嗯，我这里有一份超过 35 小时的
Роджер. Наконец-то я снова подключил тебя к OMNI D. Я безуспешно пытался установить высокий уровень усиления, и у меня
تمام
电视上还有一点需要注意，专家告诉
रॉजर, नील। अगला विषय इंजन के जलने वाले क्षेत्र से निकलने वाली किरणों से संबंधित है। हम यह जानना चाहते हैं कि इंजन के नीचे से निकलने वाली क
Potresti ripetere di nuo
روجر. تصب
When in our time - What's 
他很难保持方向感，而且在我看来，从那时起，他似乎完全不顾飞船的指向，随意地调整方​​向。他
13, Хьюстон. Мы просим вас попытаться повторно подключить топливный элемент 1 к MAIN A и топливный элемент 3 к MA
ठीक है। हमारे वीएचएफ की जाँच करने के लिए बस एक छोटा सा डाउनलिंक: मैं हमें प्
حسنًا، قد يكون ذلك صعبًا بعض الشيء. سنلقي نظرة على النفق الآن. يبدو أن هناك رطوبة زائدة بين طبقات التراب داخل النفق. بالطبع، لم يتم تهويته عندما قمنا بالرحلة عبر 
再说一
ठीक है, फ्रेड, बैकग्राउंड के शोर के कारण अब मैं आपकी आवाज़ नहीं सुन पा रहा हूँ। मुझे लगता है - मुझे लगता है मैंने जैक को आपको यह बतात
हेलो, कॉम टेक।
알겠습니다. 3번은 건너뛰세요. SECs LOGIC은 2개 OFF, 아래쪽으로, SECs PYRO ARM은 2개 OFF, 아래쪽으로 설정하겠습니다. 이상입니
अपोलो 11, अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन ह
Roger, 11. Ici CAP COM. Félicitations pour votre excellent travail. Vous avez vraiment assuré! Il est temps de vous reposer un peu. Votre journée a été longue. J'espère que vous dormirez bien sur le chemin du retour. J'ai 
この静かな時間は、現場の多くの人々に影響を与えているに違いありません。ここにもう少しデータを追加した方が良いと思います。収集日時は 
알겠습니다, 프레드. 기동 목적은 PC + 2이고, 이 시점은 MPL입니다. 그리고 079, 27, 4013, + 08144, - 00443, - 02226, 원지점은 N/A이고, 근지점은 + 00205
로저. 제가 말씀드리는 건, 음질이 상당히 안 좋다는 겁니다. 그들이 당신 말을 알아듣지 못할 
로저.
Roger. Ho finito il pasto 1 del 4° giorno. Ho bevuto 6 sorsi d'acqua e probabilmente andrò a let
알겠습니다. 제가 보기에는 제안하신 콘센트가 아주 적합해 보입니다. 현재 구성 그대로 사용하셔도 괜찮을까요
支
ठीक है, आपको उसमें पिच रेट शामिल करन
알겠습니다, 잭. 패널 3, AC 인버터 2, 메인 B; 인버터 2, AC 버스 2 켜짐; AC 버
Делаю несколько снимков этого камн
ह्यूस्टन, स्क्रीन के म
アポロ8
罗杰，第一个在 11 号，格林尼治标准时间是 10 点 16
Ему было трудно сохранять ориентацию, и мне показалось, что с этого момента он ориентировался вне космического корабля, не обращая внимания на то, в каком направлении тот направлен. Он мог передавать ему довольно высокую скорость, до 2° в секунду. Я намеревался держать их ниже этого уровня. Когда он вернулся в космический кор
ح
Verstanden. Wir haben ein Team, das daran arbeitet, und unter anderem möchten sie wissen, welche Lithiumhydroxid-Behälter im Kommandomodul leer sind. Sie ben
了解。
스캐너가 무시됐네요. 무슨 이유인지 모르겠어요. 어휴, 저희가 투구하고
11, this is Houston. We're getting a good picture of Buzz now, but no voice modulation. And would you open up the f stop on the TV cam
A 压力为 2000 — B 压力为 2650 — 主电流表 1 号为 19 — 2 号为 — 1A 
알겠습니다. 정확한 위치 정보가 필요합니다. 제가 한 번에 제대로 스캔할 수 있는 격자 칸은 하나 정도밖에 안 되거든요. 저희가
ठीक है। मुझे बैटरी C पर कोई वोल्टेज नहीं दिख रहा है, और एम्पेरेज लगभग 2 एम्पियर लग रहा है, लेकिन यह शोर स्तर की वजह से भी हो सकता है। मैंने सभी फ्लडलाइट बंद कर दी हैं और क्या आप कुछ सुझाव दे सकते हैं जिससे मैं मेन
Wally, oui, juste ici, à la fin de la sixième. Avez-vous des comment
حسنًا. إنها المر
Roger. Mein Zustand ist gut, der Zustand der Kapsel ist gut. I
अपोलो 11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आगे बढ़ो
रॉजर। आपकी ओर आ रहा हूँ। 30, SPS/G&N: 36691; माइनस 061, प्लस 067 135 23 4149;, प्लस 32020, प्लस 06713, माइनस 02773 181 054 013;, HA अनुपलब्ध है
そうです。もう一つの変更点は、その直後、投棄の準備段階で、前方ダンプバルブと頭上ダンプバルブの両方を閉じた
Jim, es ist wieder Zeit für Volt und Am
أتعلم، لو قمت بمحاذاة الانحراف، لكانت محاذاته هنا تمامًا. كي
저는 그 내용을 기억하지
Температура инвертора составляет 205° для вентиляторов в перевернутом положении и 190° для самого инвертора. Мы теряем телеметрическую связь. Подождите
Roger Houston, Gemini 4. Ich habe gehört, Sie haben Wetterdaten für S-6. Sie sind ziemlich gestört, ich habe 
Okay. I thought you were calling, but I guess we had a ground switching problem down the
أنا 
Voi
Nous avons encore des nouvelles, mais nous vous recommandons fortem
Okay, Jack. Go back to the battery charge procedure I gave you. And, in order to terminate charge, just - You'll just have to write "Open" or "Off" next to the circuit switch that I gave you. So on panel 250, that circuit breaker you've already opened; on panel 275, INVERTER POWER-2 MAIN B, open; panel 5, BAT RELAY BUS BAT A, open; 
Oh. Bien reçu. Il dit qu'il vous a bien cerné à 15 centimètres par seconde près; la trajectoire à mi-parcour
حسناً. سأخبر
ヨー1、
전원/GPI, 꺼짐. 자동 제트 선택, 
分かりました。プラットフォームの状態
Pour
ठीक है, बढ़िया। मैं अंदर हूँ; रेट्रोएटीट्यूड; जायरो सामान्य हैं; पैंतरेबाज़ी स्विच बंद है
Думаю, это немного рискованно; примерно на четверть градуса. Мы мож
わか
휴
Roger, Buzz. First entry's on the under AC bus A. The line extends all the way to high gate. Actually, the line should read - at it would be NO-GO AC bus A. After that the NO-GO would be both buses. So if you will just pencil in both buses from through high gate, it'll
没错。目前穹顶温度大约是77华氏度。
了解しました。コアチューブに詰まった状態で湿っていたという全体的な印象は理解できました。次の
حسنًا. الآن، عندما نصل إلى الصف الرابع، سنفتح قاطع الدائرة الكهربائية "تشغيل"؛ وهذا يعني أننا سنفقد القدرة على مراقبة وحدات التحكم في الاتصالات (CDUs)، وبالتالي لن نتمكن من رؤية وضعك. لذلك، لن نتمكن من إرشادك بشأن الهوائي المناسب للاتصالات. الطريقة التي نريدك أن تتبعها هي إيقاف تشغيل خاصية كتم صوت الوصلة الصاعدة، وعندما تسمع الضوضاء، بدّل الهوائي. سنتمكن من رؤيتك وأنت تُبدّل الهوائي، وسيستغرق الأمر من 3 إلى 5 دقائق تقريبًا لإعادة الاتصال بعد التبديل. بعد كل مرة تُبدّل فيها الهوائي، سنبدأ فحصًا صوتيًا. باختصار، عندما ترى الأرض من الناف
Luminosità del reticolo... Non ne so niente... Oculari Stow Opt
Wir haben draußen wieder einen Wasserstrahl. Partikel we
Die Kontrollleuchte für den Bordcomputer leuchtet immer noch, obwohl der Schalte
Род
अपोलो 8
13, Хьюстон. Начало движения через 4 минуты. Маленькие красные линии проходят прямо по маленьким 
네. 창문 틈으로 보이네요. 제가 보고 있던 건 실 조각이었고, 그게
Sì, sì. Più
Moins 3 minutes et ça continue. CM
Roger. I'll read back the entire remarks now just to make sure we got it straight. Use NC-4, steps 1 through 11; then proceed to longitude control for no COMM procedure on page NC-7; average Victor 4
Apollo 11, this is Houston. We obse
罗杰，尼尔。这张照片真棒。我们看到了ACA，
جيميني 4، هذه غرفة عم
D'accord. Nous vous conseillons d'utiliser toute la pellicule. C'est votre dernière expérience. Utilisez toutes les pellicules dont vous disposez. Jim est là et nous aimerions discuter un peu
Закат довольно впечатляющий, думаю, не стоит тратить много времени на его созерцание. Он очень интересный. Ещё меня поражает, насколько темно, когда глаза не адаптированы. Я определённо вижу какое-то покрытие на окне. Возвращаюсь к VOX в диапазоне UHF-hi для передачи. Открываю визор, чтобы протереть правый микрофон. Я его лизнул. Закрываю визор. Визор сразу же загерметизировался, чтобы схема скафандра могла начать работать. Не хочу снова с ней возиться. Вентиляционное отверстие скафандра держится очень хорошо, около 68 градусов. Так что купол снова поднимется. Сейчас он поднят на 76, 75. По-видимому, это более высокое значение — то, что нам нужно. Думаю, добавлю ещё полбалла, и, возможно, мы её зафиксируем. Наконец-то становится прохладнее, так что я знаю, какое значение выбрать. Я установил количество охлаждающей жидкости для скафандра и рычага управления на 8,5. Показания на дисплее купола в данный момент составляют 75 градусов. На входе в скафандр — 68 градусов. Очень приятно. Я чувствую, как прохладный воздух обдувает мое лицо. Показатель кислорода выглядит очень хорошо, 60 и 75 (psi, в сотнях). Я слежу за инвертором 250. Он приближается к 140 градусам, а контраст с 150 снизился примерно до 100 градусов. В режиме ожидания около 100 градусов, что соответствует температуре в салоне. В-третьих, 250 — он страдает, 
У меня вопрос, Карнарвон. Похоже, 
«Аполлон-8». Мы не сможем переключать всенаправленную антенну ещё примерно тридцать минут, пока не вернёмся к 85-
わかりました、アポロ8
ठीक है। मुझे बस इतना समझ आया कि वह तारे और तारामंडल देख सकता है और क्वाड बाइक से कुछ सूर्य की रोशनी परावर्तित हो रही है। बस इतना ह
明天，我们得带很多胶卷，才能拍到
Хорошо, не могли бы вы измерить нам еще раз артериальное давление? Это измерение показало слишком ра
Роджер. У Нила самая высокая частота сердечных сокращений, когда-либо зафиксированная на пилотируемом космическом корабле, а мы т
了解、カナリア。状態は良好です。カプセルの状態も良好です。操縦モードは自動、ジャイロは正常、機動停止。燃料は51～68%、酸素は85～100%です。キャビンの蒸気ベントの温度が上昇し、約19度を示しています。スーツの蒸気ベントの温度はまだ70度です。ゼロまで下げ
مر
好的。我的右侧是比利
良さそうだ。40フィート下、2.5フィート。少し埃をかぶっている。30フィート下、2.5フィート下 - まっすぐ下。4フィート
ليس هناك الكثير مما يمكنهم تقديم
Я думаю, сегодня также день рождения Калифорнии, и, кажется, им исполняется 200 лет, и мы поздравляем их с этим событием. 
Okay. Weiter geht es mit Seite 26, den Leitungsschutzsc
D'accord. Dites-moi quand vous 
Ricevuto. Ci stiamo lavorando. Non ci sono state trasmissioni dalla Base Tranquility dall'ultima volta che ci siamo sentiti. Non possiamo fornirti un ripetitore completo in banda S senza la gara
روجر. 7 ساعات و2
Nun ja, das stimmt nur bedingt, Bruce. Wir haben diese beiden Wasserstofffilter, die einwandfrei funktioniere
إيجل، كولومبيا. انتهيت
Хорошо. Сейчас справа на экране находится тройной кратер, между первым и вторым — небольшой кратер; а тот, что внизу экрана, — это кратер Шуберта Y. Приблизьте изображение; у нег
了
알겠습니다. 지금 11시라 
わかりました。皆さんにはこの点について知っていただき、飛行計画にどのような影響があるか考えていただきたかったのです。広角で月についてコメントし、どのセクションが最も適切だと思うか確認します。さて、フランクはスクロールで、進入プロファイルが表示される順番を確認してほしいと言っていました。最初に表示されるプロファイルは「非退出番号2」と表示されており、これは短距離高速進入です。2番目に表示されるのは「3500マイル」と表示されており、これも高速進入ですが、長距離進入を行う場合に使用します。3番目のプロファイルは「非退出番号1」で、その後ろに3500マイルのプロファイルが続きます。つまり、4つの進入プロファイルがあります。1番と3番は短距離、2番と4番は長距離のスクロールです。コールドソークについては、そこで何をするか話し合ったと思いますが、1時間ほどでコールドソークの作業に入りたいと思っています。12時にやるつもりは絶対にありません。軌道計算担当者と話をしたところ、水が沸騰する現象についてどう思っていたかということですが、覚えておいてほしいのは、彼らは軌道図上で水が飛び散ったり沸騰したりする様子を見ているということです。これは、軌道が大きく変動しているという事実ではなく、彼らの計算スキームによるものだと思われます。ですから、もし水が沸騰するのであれば、軌道修正がどうなるかが分かっている中間軌道の直前に行うのが妥当かもしれません。中間軌道修正の直前に水が沸騰する現象を観測し、中
जी हाँ। आपको याद होगा कि मैंने शुरुआत में उस तरफ से काम करना शुरू किया था जहाँ टीवी कैमरा लगा हुआ था, और मैंने सतह पर मौजूद चट्टानों के कई नमूने लिए थे
휴스턴, 아폴
Ok, Bill, i nostri dati BIOMED sembrano ancora un po' instabili. Che ne dici di controllare il condizionatore di segnale blu sul tuo cablaggio BIOMED? Hai un connettore, dovrebbe essere il pacchetto centrale, con un connettore blu. Controllalo, e non so se hai cambiato i cavi del cablag
Je ne veux pas simplement parcourir le ciel à toute vitesse et obtenir des taux élevés,
Роджер. Мы полностью согласны. И пока вы этим занимаетесь, я почитаю — просто прочитайте эти заметки. Вызовите возможную программную тревогу 5.6, дальность действия более 400 морских миль, а затем используйте, как описано в пункте 20.
D'accord. On parlerait plutôt d'ondulation horizontale, au lieu de band
我一切顺利。12个对接锁扣我已经扣上了8个，所有操作都
ठीक है, चार्ली। क्रू स्टेटस रिपोर्ट इस प्
北アフリカは昼間もかなり見てきました。よく知っています。ターゲット14のD-9ア
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。你录音带的声音质量一般；我们能够监测
D'acc
Roger. Se vuoi andare su e ACCETTARE, per favore, ti invieremo un carico che aggiornerà un valore che sarà seguito da una modifica procedurale, Jim, te lo comunicheremo pi
बिल ने कहा कि वैलेरी को फोन करो और उससे टेप रिकॉर्डर को रिवाइंड करने के 
Фрэнк, я только что получил
أعاني من نفس المشكلة منذ الإقلاع. لا أستطيع تثبيت هذا الشيء ال
Très bien. Cape estime que tu es en bonne forme
रॉजर। पृष्ठ 33 पर चलते हैं। 4 मिनट कम। ठीक है। पृष्ठ पर नीचे जाते हुए, लगभग पंक्ति 7 पर, "इंजन गिम्बल": "इंजन गिम्बल, बंद।" "मोड कंट्रोल" पर, इसे "मोड कंट्रोल:, एटीटी होल्ड" कर दें, और फिर
もう一つ。この中間コースのタイミングを計るという考え方自体は
Roger. Four balls 6 and four balls 1. Okay. Frank, your attitude is pitch 180, yaw 315, and roll rate 0.3 degrees per second. The reason for wanting to point it north is not because we are concer
Der nächste Krater unten ist Duke Island, und links davon befindet sich der größte Krater in der Bildmitte – Maskelyne W. Dies ist eine Positionsprüfung während des Sinkflugs bei etwa 3 Minuten und 39 Sekunden. Wir überprüfen unsere Position in und quer zur Landebahn, bevor wir uns zum Landeradar drehen. Danach können wir die Oberfläche unter uns erst wieder sehen, wenn wir uns dem Landegebiet sehr genähert h
GDC の配置は - この「D」とは何で
ठीक है,
Okay. Wenn Sie die Kamera nach rechts bewegen, verschiebt sich die Erde auf unserem Bildschirm nach links. Auf unserem Bildschirm verläuft die Terminatorlinie nahezu parallel zu
حسنًا. أول مناورة سأقدمها لكم هي مناورة +44. سأبدأ القراءة من العمود الأيسر. +44، / 62970
Okay. Wir haben noch sch
जी हां, उन्होंने कि
حسنًا. هذا هو الإعداد الذي نريدك أن تستخدمه، وإليك ما نفكر فيه. عندما انتقلنا إلى وضع الخزان 1 التلقائي، والخزان 2 المتوقف، وجدنا أن دورة التسخين تُنتج ضغطًا في الخزان 1 يبلغ حوالي 233 رطلًا لكل بوصة مربعة، وهو أعلى بكثير من حد التحذير والتنبيه، وإذا انتقلنا إلى هذا الإعداد للنوم، فسنتجنب ظهور أضواء التحذير والتنبيه أثناء دورة النوم. حسنًا. وللقيام بذلك براحة، نريد أن نقضي بقية اليوم في استخدام المزيد من الهيدروجين من الخزان رقم 2، وذلك لخلق اختلال في التوازن لصالح الخزان 1، بحيث يتعادل الوضع في نهاية دورة 
わかりました、ヴァンス。Sバンド機能はVOICE、レンジング
ठीक है, जो। बैग को कनस्तर के ऊपर इस तरह चढ़ाओ कि मेहराब बैग के निचले हिस्से में हो और उसके किनारे मेहराब के 
Да, в Далласе плачут. Результаты баскетбольных матчей: Хьюстон в эти выходные выступил не очень хорошо. Иллинойс обыграл Хьюстон со счетом 97:84. А Северная Каролина взяла верх над «Совами». Счет был 85:77. Фрэнк, в газете было несколько слов об «Ойлерз». «Ойлерз» признали Джорджа Вебстера самым ценным игрок
알겠습니다. 지금 바
Roger. And she looks like she's really well lin
Послушай. Эд ещё не спал. Он вот-вот уснёт, и я думаю, ему лучше поспать, чем 
オデッセイ
Откуда у нас взялись OAMS Power, Maneuver, 
わかりました。チェックリストの6ページに
こ
好了，刚才被打断了一会儿。鲍勃·霍普又回到越南和他的部队一起演出了，一如既往地表现出色。新闻里提到的一个名字来自“新泽西”号战列舰。昨天——或者说是周三——鲍勃·霍普站在一个巨大的炮塔上开玩笑，逗乐了“新泽西”号战列舰上的1500名官兵，这已经是该舰连续第20年在海外慰问美军士兵过圣诞节了。霍普和他的27名成员组成的乐队在参加完“汉考克”号航空母舰上的圣诞弥撒后，来到“新泽西”号上为官兵们表演，两艘船都在越南附近海域。“这一定是世界上最大的克里斯·克拉夫特号了，”霍普对官兵们说，“它看起来像带舵的威克岛。” “我觉得他们
هذا صحيح. وسنقوم أيضاً بتشغيل محول التيار المتردد 
わかりました。今日は、手順書に記載されているように、観測前と観測後に、トラニオンのバイアス測定を行ってください。ここでの目的は、何らかの熱効果によって六分儀の角度読み取りに誤差が生じている可能性を確認することです。事前に得られるバイアスは、2回連続して0.003度以内の測定値が得られた後、NOUN 87の「PROCEED」で考慮する必要があります。そしてもちろん、測定の間にはトラニオンを数度ずらしてください。今日の視野では、地球はずっと小さく見えるはずです。そのことについては、皆さんの方が私たちよりもずっと詳しいと思いますが、恒星と地球の地平線の間の角度測定が正確に行われるようにするためには、六分儀のM線（2つのハッシュマークを通り、R線に垂直な線）が、恒星直下で地球の地平線と平行になっている必要があります。そして、星を地平線上に重ね合わせる作業は、六
Vérification de connexion terminée. Vous me recevez? La position des commutateurs du panneau est par défaut. Globe en place, latitude nord 63°, longitude est 97°, correction 710, heure de division: 9 h 18 min 07 s; l’index de déplacement est par défaut (premier jour: 7). Pression cabine: 1 bar, humidité: 65 %, température: 19 °C, pression dans le compartiment: 1,2 bar, pression dans le système d’orientation manuel: 175 bar, première orientation automatique: 155 bar, deuxième o
روجر، فهمت. وأود إبلاغك بأن ضغط المقصورة يبدو أنه أقل بقليل من 5. استقر في البداية عند 5.5، ثم انخفض إلى 5.25، 
Sì, spero che tu ne riceva alcuni buoni. Potresti darci la quantità letta per circa 10 second
로저. 델타는 정상인 것 같았습니다. 연소 시간은 약 2초 정도 더 길어진 517초였습니다. VGX는 수신 당시 9
Roger, Carnarvon, Gémeaux 4. Nous vous recevons parfai
알겠
肯，
Ok. Area 7-3 GET RC, 10 04 47; RET, 400K, 22 più 02; RET RB, 28 più 15; sponda sinistra 50, sponda destra 60. Hai ricev
컬럼
C
चार्ली, हमने अभी-अभी 261 डिग्र
물론 그렇게 하겠습
Ok. Tutto sembra a posto a terra con entrambi i
Eagle, Houston. Avez
Eagle, Houston. Dopo l'imbardata, angoli: passo in banda S, meno 9, i
分
Roger. On and off in approximatel
カナリアCAP COM。他にはあ
わかり
现在我们正在指示飞
Okay, Jack. Die Karte zeigt, dass du etwa 130.000 Meilen entfernt bist, was, nun ja, 10.000 Meilen näher ist als vor ein paar Stunden, als ich reinkam. Und lass mich mal nach deiner Ann
조. 네, 37이라는 숫자가 깜빡이고 프로그램 06에 있습니다. 대기 표시등은 켜지지 않는데, 입력 버튼을 눌러도 원래 표시되어야 하는 세 개의 공 모양 아이콘
11、ヒューストン。トンネル内の映像のクオリティには本
Hallo Roger Gemini 4, hier spricht RKV Surgeon. Sie e
Ricordi i... i tassi di rotazione che hai visto durante l'attività dei propulsori? Non hai detto qualcosa riguardo a 0,4? Forse... ricordi quando l'S
Okay. Bevor Sie Ihre Karte raus
Наконец-то 
了解。了
알겠습니다, 휴스턴 아쿠아리우스입니다. 잭이 전
Votre arbre et vo
حس
Du musst auf deinen Fuß aufp
Nous n'aurons pas le temps de pa
D'accord, Frank. C'est l'un des points que nous examinons actuellement. La diffusion devrait s'arrêter à environ [insérer la durée], et nous envisageons de la prol
잭, 우
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Quando hai un minuto libero, potresti darci la lettura di bordo del serbatoio di N2 Bravo, per favore? E vorremmo assicurarci che tu capisca che da quando hai smesso di spingere con il, la temperatura in questo serbatoio è rimasta costante. Passo. Assicurati che 
ठीक है। टैंक 2 के पंखे बंद हो गए हैं। ठीक है। अब टैंक 1 के पंखे और हीटर दोनों चालू ह
3.5ですね。オートモードですか
मुझे वो सर्जन मिल गया। हम उन्हें
Джо, не могли бы вы также подсказать, насколько долго мы сможем использовать батареи командн
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我们正在努力确定时间。我们应该能提前告诉你们。完
Roger. Wir machen weiter mit dem Gasgeben... überprüfen Sie, ob 
좋아요, 그럼
Und wir sind bereit, PAD zu
没错。我们想做的是，
水瓶座，休斯顿。在完成全向切换后，请关闭测距功能，将语音开关拨至“语音备份”位置，并将功率放大器 CB 的 16 号开关打
알겠습니다. 7번 패널에서 전원 끄기, 서보 전원 1과 2 끄기, /GPI 전원 끄기, 그리고 로직 2
Co
罗杰。吉姆，你在这儿干什么？吉姆在做甜点。他正在做一袋巧克力布丁。你看，它飘过来了。比尔正从下面的设备间上来。真可惜，这支长焦镜头坏了。吉姆，把这支有问题的镜
Ok, siamo molto più avanti d
そして..
Et ce que je voulais souligner, je ne sais pas si c'est évident, mais… pour montrer l'avantage de faire tous les rejets juste avant la combustion, nous observons à nouveau la même scène au-dessus du quadrant 1 de la Lune. Et maintenant, vous ne voyez plus toutes ces particules gelées scintillantes à l'extérieur. Nous nous sommes en quelque sorte éloignés et les avons laissées derrière 
了解。分かりました。ありが
平台已经搭建完毕，我们已对准
D'accord. La pression de l'hélium est d'environ 37, la pression d'admission est de 182 et la quantité est
مرحباً هاواي، برج الجوز
Houston, Colombie. Mon télémètre VHF ne fonctionne pas. Préfé
알겠습니다, 잭. 배터리 충전 종료 절차는 변경되지 않았지만, TM을 켜고 확인할
Es sieht so aus, als ob sie den... Schalter auf WIDE BEAM erst hätten umleg
الطر
Ich verstehe, was du meinst. Ich habe vorh
你看起来没事，但有人却翻
ठीक है। मैं 
卡纳文，这里是双子星4号。看来我们的
わかりました。ドラッグ展開に10+55、スプラッ
That failing to separate f
Okay. 
Roger. Je comprends. Écoutez, si vous pensez que c'est si important, on va continuer à tergiverser san
由于嗡嗡声，你会产生一种错觉，仿佛置身于火车或其他交通工具中，感觉自己应该
حسنًا. ا
ح
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We've run the angles given in the flight plan for the attitude through the machines down here, and they come up the same thing every time. 
Okay, Jack. Das kostet 120 Amperestunden, was 10 Stunden entspricht. Damit haben wir wieder 193 Stunden, und das ist mehr 
네. 빔 폭을 좁히기가 어렵네요. AUTO 트랙이나 REACQ 모드로 전환해 봤는데, 요(yaw) 각도가 270도에서 0도 사이를 왔다갔
Ich habe viel Wasser getrunken. Ich weiß nicht genau, 
清楚得很。怎么是我？完毕
좋아. 이제 TV 켤 준비가 됐어. 이것저것 만져
Дружба Семь, Друж
加 37746，减 03299，加 00844 179 346 357，不适用，加 00176 37900 336 37705 42 1279 309，不适用三次，加 1350，减 16500 
吉
फ्रैंक का कहना है कि यहाँ सब कुछ सामान्य लग रहा है। आप केबिन के तापमान को नियंत्रित करने वाले हीट एक्सचेंजर में बदलाव करके देख सकते ह
Ok, ventola cabina accesa. Riscaldatore ECS O2 spento. Piattaforma, LIBERA... propulsore spento. Controllare e bloccare il cablaggio di sicurezza. I nottolini del portello
हाँ। वह बात या
좋아, 그럼
Дело не в космическом аппарате; сложно навести его не на космический аппарат, а на камеру. Кронштейн имеет достаточный прогиб, из-за чего камера может выходить из поля зрения при съемке через окно. И потребовалось много микронастроек и подсказок с Земли, чтобы установить её, это была действительно сложная работа. Поэтому я думаю, вам следует всё это учитывать; если есть возможность использовать широкоугол
134
Каждый раз, когда он это делает, наши сердца... наши сердца замирают в груди. И, Джек, если ты захочешь закры
Roger. Buon accordo
Friendship Seven, ich verspüre keinerlei Schwerelosigkeit, außer dass es mir sehr angenehm ist. Keine Nebenwirkungen, mir ist nicht übel; ich fühle mich gut. Ich habe alle Kopftests und die Kopfbewegungsprüfung durchgeführt und hatte damit keine Probleme. Auch die okulogyre Prüfung verlief problemlos. Allerdings ko
了解。30分レポートをお送りします。頭の動きを確認しましたが、何の影響もありませんでした。到達距離テストも実施しましたが、全く問題ありません
У Gemini VI всё наоборот. Дальность 32,69, скорость изменения дальности 139; 
はい、ハワイ、ジェミニ4。はっきりと読み取
زائد 1197، ناقص 16500 12681 35608 0506
Не читал, не читал. Повторю ещё раз, повторю ещё ра
मुझे लगता है कि वे अब मैकडॉनल प
अ
روجر، شكرًا لك على تقرير الطقس. لا نستطيع الرؤية بوضوح في تلك المسافة. يبدو أن الجو قد تحسن الآن، حسب ما قاله بعض القادمين. هذه الغيوم الكثيفة المستمرة في
単眼
아니요. 꼭 드러난 물질이라고는 할 수 없을 것 같습니다. 어떤 물질은 구워지거나 어떤 방식으로든 더 응집력이 생겨서 서로 섞였을 수도 있다고 생각합니다. 정확히는 모르겠습니다. 다른 지역에서는, 우리가 앞쪽을 밟기 시작하기 전에는, 방
यह कभी अंदर तो कभी बाहर की ओर हिलता रहता है। कभी-कभी रेखा एकदम कसी
明白了。我——我们先去心宿二试试。你知道，我们上次
ठीक है। मैंने बैटरी चार्ज, वेंट वाल्व, फ्यूल सेल पर्ज की जाँच कर ली है, और फिर 55 घंटे पर रुक जाइए। उस समय आपका रोल एटीट्यूड 285 डिग्री होगा, जो फ्लाइट प्लान के अनुसार है। हाई गेन एंटीना के कोण थोड़े अलग हैं, पिच 23 और यॉ 267 डिग्री। टीवी पास अभी भी सामान्य है, सिवाय कुछ विशेष चरणों के जो हम आपको SHe टैंक प्रेशर देखने के लिए देंगे, जो मेरे पास अभी नहीं है। लगभग या जब भी आप गतिविधियाँ पूरी कर लें, तब रीस्टार्ट करें। उसके बाद, अपनी सुविधानुसार, हम चाहेंगे कि आप विकल्प 3 का उपयोग करें जिसे हमने 54-1/2 घंटे पर रद्द क
في موسكو، نقلت وكالة تاس عن مهندس الفضاء أناتول كوريتسكي قوله إن مركبة لونا 15 قادرة على إنجاز كل ما أنجز
حسنًا، لا بأس. أردتُ فقط التأكد. كان فريد قد دوّن منذ فترة أن زاويتنا الآن حوالي 71 درجة، وأننا سنُجري دورة متوسطة بسرعة 7 أقدام في ال
Bit
Roger. Ich habe im AUTO-Modus angedockt, und wie gesagt, ich war mir des genauen Kontaktzeitpunkts nicht sicher. Ich habe die Anzeigen der Andocksonde ständig überprüft. Zwei „Barber Poles“-Symbole zeigten an, dass die drei Verriegelungen – nicht die Verriegelungen, sondern die drei Verriegelungen – eingerastet waren und wir sanft angedockt hatten. Zu diesem Zeitpunkt wirkte die Situation sehr stabil. Also schaltete ich auf FREE, warf einen Blick aus dem Fenster, und es sah immer noch stabil aus; dann zündete ich die zweite Primärtriebwerksflasche. In diesem Moment begann eine Drehung zwischen den beiden Fahrzeugen, deren Ursache mir unklar ist. Vielleicht der Schub, oder vielleicht hatte sie sich vorher aufgebaut, ohne dass ich es bemerkt hatte. Jedenfalls gab es während des Einfahrens der Sonde Gieren – ich schätze, etwa 15 Grad – und ich musste zurückschalten, den FREE-Schalter betätigen und wieder auf AUTO stellen, um die Drehungen zu dämpfen; und ich nehme an, Neil tat dasselbe. Er wird Ihnen seine Version der Geschichte erzählen. Ich dachte schon, dass wir das Einfahren und Andocken nicht schaffen würden. Doch nach etwa sechs oder ach
よし、ヒューストン。データのレジスタ3を見てください。このデータは私の目標値である3
Roger, Buzz. Es handelt sich um einen Eintrag PAD, MPL, beginnend mit Roll 05, 35 - Korrektur - 3
네, 맞습니다. 확실히 그렇습니
收到。
テレメトリ スイッチを
分かりました。これがレート減衰の全手順です。ただし、ステップ2だけを伝えましたが、これが全手順です。さて、29ページの印刷内容についてですが、訂正です。「姿勢制御」のリードバックに誤りが1つありました。「ピッチとロール」を「パルス」に、「ヨー」を「ダイレクト」に修正していました。続きまして、29ページの印刷された手順ですが、最初の4行
알겠습니다. 증발기가 제대로 작동하는 것 같습니다. 아니, 적어도 그렇게 되려고 애쓰고 있는 것 같네요. 온도가 섭씨
Apollo 8, ici Hou
मुझे लगा था कि हम इतने करीब होंगे कि बाहर निकलने पर हमें उसका किनारा दिखाई देगा, लेकिन ऐसा नहीं हुआ। लेकिन मुझे नहीं लगता कि हम उससे आधे मील से ज़्यादा दूर हैं। हम उससे आधा मील पश्चिम में हैं
كم ساعة؟ لديّ 20 
なるほど、それでは、私たちの座り方からすると、地球がすぐそこまで来ている様子が写真に撮れると思います。どう
ジム、機動を続行することをお勧めします。ただし、VERB
わかりました、ジャック。チェックアウトとアクティベーショ
وخلال الجزء الذي شهد ارتفاعًا في 
Okay. In Zeile 14, unter HEIZSYSTEM A/B-1: QUAD 1 bis 4 öffnen; darunter die
Apollo 13, Houston. Nous avons un itinéraire de l'État à vous envoyer. Faites votre demande et 
حسنًا. نوصي بالتوقف عند 54 45 00، وهذا سيضعك تقريبًا عند 
11日、ヒューストン。隣のコンソールにいる医師によると、トガリネズミは24時間で体重の6倍もの餌を食
هذا ما يبدو عليه الوضع من هنا يا جاك. إنه عكس إجراء التفعيل تمامًا حيث نقوم بعملية المحاذاة الخشنة لل
ह्यूस्टन, आपके पास कितन
Roger. Fri
En fait, ce n'est pas le sachet qui pose problème, mais la nourriture à l'intérieur. Elle est émiettée. Je n'ose pas ouvrir le sachet de peur que le
Oh, j'ai failli rater mon premier coucher de soleil en essayant d'éteindre 
Roger. Would you ver - We've lost COMM with you for about the last 10 minutes. Would you verify that
हेलो, ह्यूस्टन। अपोलो 8। ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 
とても小さいですね。1/16イ
エドは寝ていた。地上には話せる人もいなかったし、少し静かだった。エドは寝
사본 8
روجر، مايك. لا يزال منحنى معدل تنفسك ثابتًا. إذا كان لديك وقت هذا المساء قبل النوم، نقترح عليك
알겠습니다. 그럼, 
जेमिनी, कैनरी। नए 3-1 डेटा को कॉपी करने के ल
Он голубовато-зелёны
वैसे, आसमान 
أريد أن أصعد من هذا الطريق ل
ठीक है, जैक। आगे बढ़ते हु
Nur zu, Houston
罗杰。我只是想提醒你，我们还没注意到电视屏幕上的烧灼痕迹
Okay, let's do one more. We're going first opportunity, you think
И теперь оно действительно начинает выглядеть немного крупнее. Некоторые 
そうです。正解です。オーケー、ジャック。あと一つ。残り2時間15分になる前に
Vous avez compris? Les IVI
Оуэн, странная вещь в выравнивании платформы: когда я действительно не тороплюсь и делаю разметку очень медленно, аккуратно и точно, я получаю примерно такую ​​же разницу в углах звезд, как и когда я делаю это в режиме DTC и мне приходится делать это в спешке с относительно плохим слежением. Разница в углах звезд кажется нечувствительной. Это почти заставило меня поверить, ч
We're in the light. We'll
まあ、あなたがどう思うかは自由です
По
Хм, вот
收到。7:15 至 11:15 飞行员
Последний раз скорость горения, которую мы наблюдали, составляла 96 футов в секунду, а время горения — минуту 
ठीक है। हम बस कुछ करने के लिए बैठे-बैठे इंतज़ार कर रहे हैं। एजीएस पर आगे बढ़ने से पहले हमें एक स्टेट वेक्टर और एक REFSMMAT की ज़रूरत है, और आपको 
Let see. Else
好的。完成之后
Bon, on est en mode veille, j'ai les angles de visée optim
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Мы снова с
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Die Leute von Goldstone TV berichten von horizontalen Streifen im oberen und unteren Bildbereich. Sie bezeichnen die Linien als gerade, 
Das 
好孩子！你
रॉजर। हम बूस्टर का पीछा करते हुए पूरी तरह से नीचे की ओर झुके हुए थे और मुझे डर है कि हमारी स्थिति ऐसी नहीं थी 
Джек, ты сейчас в тени; у нас есть небольшие помехи от твоего окна, которое очень яркое, поэтому мы не мож
D
Ten, nine, eight, seven, six, five, four, three, two,
240コントローラーはグリコー
Джим, в соответствии с нашим планом, мы сначала займемся сервисным модулем JETT, а затем 
추진기를 작동할 때 증기에서 나오는 불빛도 볼 수 있습니
...Управление питанием, скорость орбитального движения платформы с
Okay, Jac
मुझे यकीन नहीं है कि मैंने वह सही से लिखा है, फ्रेड। अगर आप मुझसे पूछें कि क्या मेरे पास वह पावरअप प्रक्रिया है, तो मेरे पास 
That's correct, Jack. Those are the only changes on 1-3. Now, let's go to 1-4. No changes on the remaining three panel 2 switches.
Vorrei tanto sape
हाँ, विंडो में ASCS के साथ मेरी सहमति नहीं 
ठीक है, 8. हम यहाँ ज़मीन पर एक छोटा सा अभ्यास करना चाहते हैं ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि हम टेप को डंप कर सकें और आवाज़ वाले हिस्से को समय पर ह्यूस्टन वापस ला सकें। तो हम आपका टेप डंप करने की योजना बना रहे हैं, और इसे यहाँ वापस लाने और सुनने के लिए हम ज़मीन पर प्रक्रिया का अभ्यास करेंगे। हमारा मानना ​​है कि टेप में पहले से ही कुछ है, जब तक कि आपने पिछले डंप के बाद उस पर कुछ रिकॉर्ड न किया हो। बस यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए, हम चाहेंगे कि आप टेप पर कुछ शब्द बोलें, हमें एक छोटी सी गिनती या कुछ और बताएँ और जो कुछ भी आप उसमें डाल
Роджер, Фрэнк. Вот что мы здесь делаем. Нам очень нужна калибровка горизонта. Нам нужно в общей сложности 15 меток; три набора на одной звезде, два на другой. С другой стороны, мы учитываем необходимость немедленной калибровки горизонта, и мы не упускаем из виду тот факт, что вы хотите сделать это прямо сейчас. Поэтому, если вы потерпите еще пару минут, мы пытаем
***
好的。您可以将“读取
Roger. Our MOCR's about empty right now. We're taking it a little easy. How d
Es gab keine Probleme, den Mond zu sehen. Als ich nach der Sternenmarkierung in Sichtlinie suchte – es ist eine sehr schmale Sichel, aber sie war sehr gut sichtba
Roger, Jim. Nous avons une procédure à vous indiquer pour élargir la zone morte à 5 degrés dans les 3 ou 4 prochaines heures, si vous êtes prê
It's very difficult to estimate w
والآن، انتقل إلى الصفحة 
रॉजर। मैं 
ठीक है। सबसे पहले, मैं मुख्य घटनाओं के समयों पर संक्षेप में चर्चा कर लेता हूँ, और फिर हम कुछ विवरण भरेंगे। ठीक है। प्रवेश इंटरफ़ेस 142 घंटे 40 मिनट पर है; लगभग 6-1/2 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम हीटर पावर लगाकर, CM/ तापमान की जाँच करके और आवश्यकता पड़ने पर CM/ को पहले से गर्म करके इस पूरी प्रक्रिया को शुरू करेंगे, और हमें लगता है कि हमें ऐसा करना पड़ेगा। इसके लिए विस्तृत प्रक्रियाएँ बाद में उपलब्ध होंगी। लगभग 6 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम संशोधित / 30-मिनट की चेकलिस्ट का उपयोग करके पावर चालू करना शुरू करेंगे, जिसका उपयोग आपने पिछले मध्यक्रम के लिए किया था। फिर कुछ ही समय बाद, लगभग 5 घंटे पहले, या लगभग उसी समय, हम चाहेंगे कि आप बॉडी एक्सिस अलाइनमेंट के लिए सही स्थिति में हों, जैसा हमने पहले किया था, अर्थ टर्मिनेटर का उपयोग करके। और ज
네. 저 두 사람
Jack è a lett
它是.
حسنًا. وعندما تنتهي من ذلك، لتثبيت القوس في مكانه،
Per il nostro bene mentre facciamo questo briefing, Jim, vorremmo che la COMM fosse migliore e che potessimo sicuramente risparmiare energia; quindi vorremmo che sul pannello 16 chiudessi l'interruttore del circuito dell'AMPLIFICATORE DI POTENZA e sul pannello 12 vorremmo che spostassi l'interruttore della FUNZIONE VOCALE su VOCE
好吧，先
Alright. Weight 45701, minus 040, plus 157 , plus 32346
Yes, just a second. Just a second - Your MASTER is ON; your INTERCOM is ON; your VH
프랭크, 온도는 괜찮아 보입니다. 쿼드바이크 간 온도 차
11号，休斯顿。从我们这里回放的燃烧录像来看，我们观察到系统中氮气罐Bravo
짐, 우리가 여기 앉아있는 지 20분이 조금 넘었는데, 스러스터 작동 상태는 어떻습니까? PTC를 계속 진행할 준비
जेमिनी 4, ह्
افهم الأمر الأ
Роджер. 4 пересмотрено: SPS/G&N: 38320, минус 055, плюс 060 084 30 2749, плюс 31380, плюс 03475, минус 01032; крен NA, тангаж 034. Остальная часть PAD NA. Заполнение двух реактивных двигателей 16 секунд, отст
हमें इसकी एक प्रति 
हाँ। मेरा अनुमान है कि मूल प्रश्न यहाँ और खिड़की से बाहर गेंदों की तुलना करने का है, यह बहुत अनुचित नहीं लगता, और मुझे लगता है कि जिम का कहना है कि यॉ और रोल उसके अनुमान से थोड़ा अलग है; लेकिन फिर भी, एयर नीडल्स रोल और यॉ दोनों में पूर्ण प
نعم. الآن، ستظهر لك على الأرجح رسالة "37 ENTER 06 ENTER" على شاشة الكمبيوتر. ما نريده هو وضع الكمبيوتر في وضع الاستعداد؛ إذا ظهرت لك رسالة "37 06"، فسيتعين عليك الضغط على زر "ENTER" للحصول على الرمز 62. إذا ظهر الرمز 62، يمكنك الض
أبولو 8، هيوستن. انته
Хорошо. А как насчет того, чтобы вывести все эти показания на пятизн
Sounds goo
Quer
테이프 덤프가 완료되
Roger, she's all in good shape 
हम यहां क
Qualcuno ha detto qualco
Wir würden die Entlüftung gerne erst wieder aufnehmen, wenn wir die Anla
Hallo, Tranq
2C имеет размеры 6 1/2 и 
Okay, Bill, and our BIOMED data still looks a little bit squirrelly. How about checking the blue s
好的，Vance。我们找到了一些用于烟弹改装的东西。一个是专门用来罩住手提袋的防尘袋，它很厚实而且不透水；我们上楼去厨房又倒了几次水，又做了一大堆饮料袋；然后我们从食品储藏室里拿出一个相当大的塑料密封袋，就是装那些饮料袋的
Cette v
보시다시피, 베리 박사가 제미니 7호에서 저에 대해 얻은 데이터는 아폴로 8호의 프
À 76 milles nautiques, nous avons repéré 
On Spacecraft VII
とても良いです、とても
Jet
Hawaii Cap Com, je vais commencer un rapport standard. Je suis en rétroattitude automatique. Gyroscopes en mode normal, manœuvres désactivées, tous le
Verseau, ici Houston. On vous reçoit avec beaucoup de… interférenc
罗杰。关于那个四极杆温度计——它的上限是105度（瓶身
Der Heizkörper hat einen Durchfluss von 41. Vergangene Z
네. 지금 슈베르트 N이라는 분화구를 확대해서 보고 있습니다. 슈베르트 N은 내부 벽이 매우 원뿔형이고 바닥은 거의
D'accord. C'est bien. Il ne nous reste plus que quatre dixièmes. C'est 
Okay. E per quanto riguarda la tua cronologia, ti suggeriamo di lasciare che Bill e Jim dormano per un periodo di tempo extra e di non svegliarli finché... e questo causerebbe la can
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Перед нами континент Африка... и, конечно же, с течением времени всё становится всё меньше и меньше. Средиземно
ठीक है। अब हम बैग के साथ काम शुरू कर रहे हैं, और अगला कदम है लाल सूट की नली (या तो कमांडर की या एलएमपी की, क्योंकि हम चाहेंगे कि आपके पास अंततः ये दोनों हों) को बैग के ऊपरी हिस्से में रखना। इसके लिए, सबसे पहले आपको यह सुनिश्चित करना होगा कि लाल नली नीली नली से अलग हो। मुझे नहीं पता कि 
Хорошо. Продолжаем с середины страницы, во
Erinnerst du dich an irgendwelche Körperraten, die du während dieser Triebwerksaktivität beobachtet hast? Hast du nicht etwas von 0,4 gesagt? Vie
好的。关于2号电池，你认为可能是传感器故障，因为你没有看
D'accord. Je vais donc procéder à la poussée. La différence triangulaire est de 0,01, mais c'est assez difficile à une vitesse de 3/10. Je dois utiliser une vitesse moyenne sans résolution, et il est difficile de maintenir l'étoile centrée suffisamment longt
Okay. Jim, we have a handover coming up on the hour; that's in a minute and a half. On the hour, we would like you to turn the S-BAND TRANSMITTER/RECEIVER switch to OFF, and 5 minutes later turn it back t
Положение в порядке. Тангаж возвращается в исходное положение для входа в атмосферу, корректировка ретроградного положения. Нет причин оставаться в исходном положении дл
Roger. This is Friendship Seven.
मैं... रवैये के बारे में बात करना चाहता हूँ, एड, और मैं चाहता हूँ कि तुम मुझे बताओ कि तुम्हारे हिसाब से यह क्या है... 00 रवैया पिच, 0 रवैया प
Per vostra informaz
أليس هذا ما يخرج من
Yes, he took a picture of it with 
मुझे ल
Apollo 11, Houston. Unsere Empfehlungen für die Aktivitäten in der nächsten Stunde (bzw. im Hinblick auf den Flugplan): Machen Sie sich wie gewünscht bis etwa 58 Stunden mit der Kabine vertraut, steigen Sie dann in die Kabine ein, schließen Sie die Luke und beziehen Sie kurz 
यहां तापमान 140 डिग्री है। और यह धीरे-धीरे बढ़ रह
Roger. Ho avuto un ciclo di accensione e spegnimento dei requisiti del riscaldatore RCS. Il primo era 47, ho acceso il riscaldatore e la spia era 54. 
हाँ, बिल्कुल। इसका मतलब है कि अब 
我想我们就到此为
ठीक
Forza Housto
约翰，我们检查后发现，你的姿态误差在 2° 以内，几乎完全正
Okay, ich hab
मैं आपकी बात साफ़-साफ़ सुन पा रहा हूँ। मैं इसे यहीं छोड़ देता हूँ। आप चाहें तो इसे लाइव सुनकर आवाज़ का मूल्या
रॉजर। 7-डेल्टा के लिए आरईटी 400 के 13+48 है
— Вы находитесь на этапе постдоки
Roger. Wir möchten gerne wissen
네
Nous n'avons pas d'autre endroit où stocker l'oxygène que dans la cabine. Nous venons de terminer l'opération sur le système à haut débit d'oxygè
حسنًا. هذا لا يزال صحيحًا. سنمنحك فرصة أخرى بعد انتظار 5 ثوانٍ، وبعد ذلك، بعد بضع خطوات فقط، وبعد فتح قواطع التحكم ASCENT ECA CONTROL في اللوحة رقم 16، عند هذه النقطة، لن 
물병자리, 우리가 당신의 별자리를 4개씩 읽어봤어요. 계속 읽
제
It's
Verstanden. Ich habe das kopiert. 
रॉजर। तुम यहाँ ज़मीन पर बहुत अच्छे दि
We could see the southern part of California and Arizona,
收到。
Worüber wir gerade nachdenken, Jerry, ist, diesen Keilwinkel
C'est exact, Jim. Et rien
Roger, Jim. Ich möchte Ihnen kurz eine V
What do you thin
Roger,. The platform alines al
هيوستن، أبولو 8. يبدو أن هناك تصحيحًا بمقدار 2.8 قدم في الثانية في منتص
Non, 
はい。さあ、始めましょう。スイッチ
了解、ヒューストン
Roger, je vous ai bien reçu. Consommation minimale de carbur
Хорошо. Мы предлагаем время начала, время окончания, и вы будете в режиме. Мы запрашиваем скорость крена влево, которую, как мы заметили, вы предпочитаете, — 1 оборот в час, и это в вашем текущем положении (т. е. тангаж 10 градусов, 010 градусов и рыскание 45 градусов). Шаг 1: остановитесь при угле крена 150 г
Хорошо. На мой взгляд, этот способ охлаждения основан на предположении, что у вас есть теплообмен
Roger. Wir haben mit dem Laden von Batterie A begonnen, und die Spannung war anfangs viel höher als erwartet. Sie lag knapp unter 40 Volt. Jetzt scheint sie etwas zu sinken, der Batterieladeregler. Gestern, als wir das mit Batterie C gemacht haben, war es ähnlich: Die Spannung war anfangs auch höher 
ブースターを見た時、どちらを向いていたのか思い出せません。
오후 4시 3분쯤, 캘리포니아 만의 멕시코 쪽을 마지막으로 횡단할 때, 기체가 완벽하게 앞쪽으로 기울어
Roger. La correction se trouve dan
알겠습니다
로저. 당신 말이 좀 헷갈리네요. 그건 카나본 
罗杰。由于焚烧作业延迟，您介
好的，在10万英尺高度时，我们启用着陆臂。
Can
Okay, Jack, my only other concern now is the CO2 rise in the s
也
제 말 들리시나요? 음악 전송은 2번 KB 채널을 통해 이루어집니다
جاهز لل
Роджер. У меня сейчас какое-то странное настроение, я тебе сейчас объясню. Ха-ха, я смотрю вниз на землю. Я как бы приближаюсь к те
D'accord. Le titre principal est « Entrée, PRÉPARATION LM, moins 6 heures ». Premièrement, ALIMENTATION NORMALE BAT 5, ON; deuxièmement, utiliser la liste de contrôle d'activation modifiée de 30 minutes. Ensuite, à moins 5 heures, -7, si nécessaire. Maintenant, nous avons une procédure de pré-entrée. Premièrement, nous manœuvrons pour atteindre l'attitude du module de service SEP. Deuxièmement, nous configurons pour le feu à chaud. En dessous, DEADBAND MAX, et ATTITUDE CONTROL, 3, sur PULSE. Troisièmement, effectuer le feu à chaud. Quatrièmement,
ジムさん、状況に関する情報がありますので、メモ用紙に書き
收到。什么？这条带状物是沉积在光学元件外侧
OK. Reprise avec T 00014 004 00014 45 0459 225, Shaula, +236 000, +0813 -16503 12202 36301; constell
Okay. TPI
खैर, मुझे नहीं पता। मैं अभी एक मिनट में
And I don't have one yet, but I feel closer to having one now than I have had at any time.
Just like the
كيف تسير الفحوصات الطبية - نبضات
Кана
रॉजर। डी-8 प्रयोग जाँच संख्या 1. 57 से शुरू करें। जाँच संख्या 2. 01:30 से शुरू करें। आइटम संख्या 4, संशोधन 50, आरोही नोड 102° 26। आइटम संख्या 5: यदि संभव हो, तो अपोलो लैंडमार्क रन संख्या 7 के पश्चिमी तट से दूर उष्णकटिबंधीय तूफान की एस-6 तस्वीरें। क्षे
프렌드십 세븐, 캡 콤
자, 어디 보자. 이 화상은… 등 쪽으로 난 것 같군. 효과가 있기
Ac
This is Friendship Seven. I'm on HF at present time, on HF. I'll shift to UHF-- is, if 
حسنًا يا جاك. يُظهر لك الرسم البياني أنك على بُعد حوالي 130 ألف ميل، أي أق
هيوستن، هذه كولومبيا. أسمعك بوضوح. عدنا جميعاً إلى الداخل؛ تم تركيب الفتحة. نجري
Bien. Dans cette configuration, les relevés embarqués suivants sont nécessaires: tension de la batterie C, tension de la batterie pyrotechnique A, tension de la batterie pyrotechnique B, pression d'hélium, températures des injecteurs (positions 5 Charlie, 5 Delta, 6 Alfa, 6 Bravo, 6 Charlie, 6 Delta) et pression du collecteur de batterie (position 4 Alfa). Le système e
ठीक है। कॉपी करने से पहले, मैं इसे यहाँ पूरा पढ़कर सुना देता हूँ ताकि आपको समझ आ जाए कि हम किस बारे में बात कर रहे हैं। इस छोटे से पत्र का शीर्षक है "टीवी और फिल्म फोटोग्राफी सहसंबंध प्रयोग", और वे क्या करना चाहते हैं: टेलीफोटो लेंस वाले टीवी कैमरे को ब्रैकेट पर लगाकर, रेंडेज़वस विंडो में पृथ्वी की टीवी तस्वीर लेना, लाल और नीले फिल्टर के माध्यम से, प्रत्येक फिल्टर के लिए 1 म
هيوستن، أبولو 11. اختفى النجم 40 للتو من جه
Roger, Houston. For the Height-Adjust, the GET i
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Мы готовы к проверке логики в любой момент. Мы готовы активировать логику. Логика 
COPPIA DI EQUILI
알겠습니다. 아주 잘 들립니다. 말씀하시는 내용이 간헐적으로 끊
मुझे इसका को
ええ。あの二人には絶対に気をつけないと。ところで、
Roger. Our ranging is complete, and we have been monitoring your 
Okay. We can leave the VHF powered d
罗杰，阿波罗11号。我们准备启动一个激光装置——这是一束蓝绿色的激光，我们将以一秒亮、一秒灭的频率让它闪烁。它来自埃尔帕索附近的麦克唐纳天文台，应该就在晨昏线附近，或者说就在晨昏线内。我
Nein. Das tat es nicht
고도계가 작동되면 바로 알려드리겠습니다. 케이프, 들리십니까? 고도계가 작동했습니다. 100피트(1,000피트), 하강 속도가 줄어들고 있고, 기내 압력은… 기내 압력은 괜찮습니다. 아직 약간의 공기 흐름이 있습니다. 아니, 그건 충격파입니다. 뒤쪽에서 연기가 뿜어져 나오고
Frank dit que tout semble normal ici
Bene. Dopo 47 ore, totale 1096, quattro Alfa 270, Bravo 278, Charlie 270, Delta 278 e l'H2... Mi hanno dato l'H2 in percentuale, 76%; e sull'O2 abbiamo l'81%. Tuttavia, ora mostriamo la lettura del serbatoio O2 2 fuori scala. Siamo abbastanza sicuri che si tratti di un guast
К западу от вашей
Sur votre appareil, les quads A, C et D semblent quasiment identiques. Le quad B chauffe légèrement
네. 지금 7단계까지 왔는데 헬륨 지시약에 빛이 거의 들어오지 않네요. 지금까지 
Columbia, ici Houston. Dans environ 2 minutes. Tout semble fonctionner
Roger. Sta
N
わかりました。ここは影になっていてかなり暗くて、足元がしっかりしているかちょっとわかりにくいで
Oh, beinahe hätte ich den ersten Sonnenuntergang verpasst, weil ich versucht habe, das rechte Kabinenlicht auszuschalten. Es geht ziemlich schnell, wie mir gesagt wurde. I
कार्नरवॉन, मिथुन राशि 4. क्
ठीक है, जैक। अगला चरण है क्यू कार्ड लेना और उसका उपयोग करके कैनिस्टर के ऊपर एक चाप बनाना; बस एक छोटा सिरा ऊपर की एक उभार के नीचे और दूसरा सिरा दूसरी तरफ की उभार के साथ इस तरह दबा दें कि कैनिस्टर के ऊपर एक गोल चाप बन जाए। देखो, जैक, हम क्या करेंगे कि बैग को इस पूरे ढांचे के ऊपर चढ़ा देंगे और क्यू कार्ड बैग
दरअसल, बिल ने अभी बताया कि टर्मिनेटर तक दृश्यता बहुत अच्छी है। यह ऐसी बात है जिसकी मुझे उम्मीद नहीं थी। मुझे लगा था कि अंधेरा धीरे-धीरे बढ़ेगा, लेकिन यहाँ तो अंधेरा एकदम तीखा और स्पष्ट है
Jack, Houston. You are not 
아니요, 
OFF, 
좋습니다. 1번 첫 번째 줄에서 "And VHF-A"를 지우세요. 두 번째 줄에서는 "SIMPLEX operation"을 지우세요. 세 번째 줄에서는 "Prime"을 지우세요. "Prime"은 PRIME POWER AMP, OFF를 의미합니다. 이 "PRIME"을 "OFF"로 바꿔야 합니다. 이 줄에서 "PRIME"이 두 번째입니다. 또한 세 번째 줄의 마지막 단어 "OFF"를 지우고 "PCM"으로 바꾸세요. 네 번째 줄은 괜찮습니다. 다섯 번째 줄인 "VHF VOICE, ON, OFF, OFF"를 
Roger. Ti abbiamo inviato una copia di circa cinqu
Я почти уверен, что это так, потому что я бы заметил это довольно быстро. За время полета я один раз использовал большую тягу, когда переключался с ручного пропорционального управления на
أبولو ١١، أبولو ١١، هذه محطة هيوستن تبث بشكل غير مباشر. إذا كنتم تسمعوننا، فحاولوا استقبالنا عبر هوائيات متعددة الاتجاهات. حاولوا استقبالنا عبر هوائيات 
Ti porteranno in elicot
Okay. Ich denke, 
Roger. Nous allons modifier l'orientation de l'étoile du sextant afin d'améliorer la couverture de l'antenne à gain élevé, et nous vous la p
Где бы оно б
分かりました。それほど心配し
You've been asleep
नहीं, मुझे नहीं पता, बस ऐसा लग रहा
罗格，把它传
Ci sentiamo man mano che andiamo avanti. Ti darò un punteggio a 1-2-30-20-10 e conta
मैं अभी एक रोल डाल
حسنًا يا فانس.
はい。ここで
弗雷德，第一步稍等。我们正在给你传达信息。你
Ricevuto. Li abbiamo visti 1.3 ora su TM. 
OK,
ちょっと待って。ちょっと
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. У меня есть в налич
Хорошо. Какова ваша высота на
Это совершенно верно. Я уже забыл, сколько именно дней длилось дожди, Базз, но примерно 30 дней без дождя; 
再往北一点
Ok. Tra poco rallento un po' perché siamo a 15K. Siamo a circa 15K e 
こちらシグマ・セブン。聞こえています。かなり…かなり乱れています。方向転換時にHFア
Верно. Так и было. Мыс Кейп-Код запросил это. Мы показываем отставание в 4 секунды от тебя, Уо
ठीक है। बिल्कुल सही। ये जिम लवेल हैं। आज हम आपको अपोलो 8 के अंदर के जीवन के बारे में थोड़ा सा दिखाना चाहते थे। हमने आपको चंद्रमा के दृश्य दिखाए, पृथ्वी के दृश्य दिखाए, और अब हम आपको अपने घर में आमंत्रित करना चाहते हैं। जैसा कि आप इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर देख सकते हैं, यह कम से कम चार दिनों से हमारा घर है। हम इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर हर दिन को चिह्नित करते हैं। चार दिन पूरे हो चुके हैं, और हम पाँचवें दिन पर काम कर रहे हैं। बेशक, हम सभी शुक्रवार को लैंडिंग का बेसब्री से इंतजार कर रहे हैं। अंतरिक्ष यान के इस हिस्से में, जिसे हम लोअर इक्विपमेंट बे कहते हैं, राष्ट्रपति के शारीरिक फिटनेस सलाहकार, कैप्टन जिम लवेल, एक व्यायाम कार्यक्रम शुरू करने वाले हैं जो हम हर दिन करते हैं। आप देख सकते हैं कि वे बहुत आराम से इधर-उधर घूम रहे हैं। नेविगेशन के लिए इस्तेमाल होने वाले ऑप्टिक्स से उनका सिर टकरा गया। वे एक ऐसे व्यायाम उपकरण का उपयोग कर रहे हैं जो मांसपेशियों को चुस्त-दुरुस्त रखने के लिए बनाया गया है। हमारे अंतरिक्ष यान का एक और बहुत महत्वपूर्ण कार्य कंप्यूटर है, और मुझे लगा कि आपको यह देखकर दिलचस्पी होगी कि हमारे पास यहाँ क्या है - वे डिस्प्ले जो हमें हमारे बर्न, नेविगेशन और पृथ्वी-कक्षीय मिशनों में प्रवेश और रेट्रोफायर के दौरान उपयोग की जाने वाली गति के बारे में सारी जानकारी देते हैं। आप देख सकते हैं कि यह एक कंप्यूटर द्वारा नियंत्रित होता है, जो टाइपराइटर कीबोर्ड के समान है, और इससे आने-जाने वाली चीजें बिल्कुल चमत्कारिक हैं। इसने हमारे लिए शानदार काम किया है, और जिम लवेल ने इसे चलाने में उत्कृष्ट कार्य किया है। अब एक और बहुत महत्वपूर्ण बात, चाहे आप अंतरिक्ष में हों या जमीन पर, भोजन है, और मैंने बिल एंडर्स से आपको यह दिखाने के लिए कहा है कि हम उड़ान के दौरान यहाँ कैसे भोजन करते हैं। कृपया तस्वीर के लिए क्षमा करें क्योंकि हम यहाँ घूम रहे हैं और कैमरा बदल रहे हैं। हम जो भोजन उपयोग करते हैं वह सब डिहाइड्रेटेड होता है; यह वैक्यूम-सील्ड बैग में पहले से पैक होकर आता है। आप देख सकते हैं कि बिल को इसे एक जगह रखने के लिए बस इसे छोड़ना होता है। अंतरिक्ष यान में हवा के प्रवाह को छोड़कर, यह बिल्कुल स्थिर रहता। वह अपनी काम की कैंची निकालता है और बैग को काटता है। खाना कई तरह का है, और आम तौर पर काफी अच्छा है। अगर यह तारीफ के लायक नहीं लग रहा है, तो ऐसा नहीं है, लेकिन फिर भी, खाना वाकई अच्छा है। आप देख सकते हैं कि बिल बहुत होशियार है। वह काम जल्दी करता है। दरअसल, खाने के ये पैकेट आपस में इसल
11, ह्यूस्टन। समझ गया। और एक अन्य विषय पर, आपसे अनुरोध है कि रात के लिए अ
Hey Jim, du musst dich nicht auf den Kopf stellen, wenn du nicht willst. Du kannst 
Ricevuto. E abbiamo dovuto disattivare il relè unidirezionale 
Roger. Wir sprechen über verschiedene Dinge, zum Beispiel darüber, das Z
Okay. Es scheint, als ob wir hier oben hin und wieder mal das Schloss kn
حسنًا يا جيم. أعتقد أن أفضل طريقة هي أن تُجهز المعدات ونشرح لك الإجراء أثناء قيامك به. يمكنك إعطاء جاك سماعة ال
はい、わかりました。六分儀の星は06、軸は2
알겠습니다. 마이크, 무슨 일이 있었냐면, 당신은 모니터링을 하고 있었는데, 7
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Ваша дружелюбная Белая команда подготовила для вас информацию о возвращени
आप जानते हैं, मैं अभी कुछ समय के लिए ही यहाँ आया हूँ, और मैं यह पता लगाने की कोशिश कर रहा हूँ कि हम किस
ال
Хьюсто
We'd like to hold off on the and get some more information. We'll have some more details of that for yo
我们的停机坪如下：飞越，/G&N；63385；加 0.97，减 0.23；；加 0212.7，减 0141.7，减 0254.8；148，316，050；NA，加 0022.5；0360.9，0:53，0356.3；33，352.7，15.0；NA，NA，NA；减 23.2
Gemini VI. Non abbiamo alcuna gioia nel vedere il tuo scarico di nastro. Ti preghiamo di disattivare l'interruttore di alimentazione del registratore e
ぜひ望遠撮影に
收到。我的情况良好；宇航服温度已大幅下降；
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。没反应。马德里
저것 좀 봐. 저렇게 둥둥 떠다니는 
ठीक है। एक बात, जो; मैं एक बार फिर से पुष्टि करना चाहता हूँ। जो चीज़ें सामान्यतः 57 घंटे से शुरू होती थीं, जिनमें से पहली चीज़ थी 5.7 पीसिया पर दबाव डालना, अब हम उसे बढ़ाकर 64 घंटे कर रहे हैं, यानी हमारी प्रविष्टि जो सामान्यतः 58 घंटे पर थी, अब
Ok. Passo al punto 1; test 1: attendi 5 secondi. Ci sono 5 secondi. Vado in AUTO
Il regarde son calendrie
こんにちは
D
Klingt gut. Berechnungen von außen zeigen, dass Apollo 8 104.000 Meilen von der Heimatbasis entf
好的，非常感谢。我们最后要讨论的是，我们希望和您确认一下您希望如何处理 Windows
जेरी, मैंने पहले जो कहा था: मैंने प्रोग्राम 01 को कॉल करके हमें वापस जहाज पर लाने की कोशिश करके घर वा
Фред, один-один пункт по поводу просьбы: примерно через час или меньше, когда вы будете совершать поворот на 90 градусов, делайте это в режиме AUTO, а не ATT HOLD. П
你好，阿波罗11号，休斯顿。如果你
我们
Хорошо, давайте рассмотрим это подробнее. Итак, следующий пункт в контрольном списке — минус 40; переходим к панели
ठीक है, जो। अभी-अभी सिग्नल की गति में थ
سيجما
네. 돌아올 때 조종실
Bene. Per quanto riguarda l'attivazione del ciclo primario del glicole, l'opzione crew è sul passaggio 1, prima riga; il resto lo ometteremo. Il passaggio 2 lo ometteremo e f
Houston, on vous voit par la fenêtre. On dirait qu'une circulation nuageuse vient de passer 
Roger, Neil. Keine Eile. Ende
그리고, 트랭퀼리티, 휴스턴. 시간을 아끼고 싶으니 카펠라로 넘어가겠
Ich weiß es nicht; das könnte unter das DOI fall
حسنًا. سأعود إلى غرفة النوم. سنختار أفضل جهاز OMNI ون
Roger. Sauerstoff-Brennstoffzellen-Spülung um 113:30 Uhr. Rückkehr zum Normalbetrieb nach 121 Stunden (Aufwachen). Lithiumhydroxid-Wechsel Nr. 9. Normale Mondkommunikations-Schlafkonfiguration, ich b
하이 게이트까지는 맞습니다. "로우 게이트까지 5분"이라고 
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. I movimenti della testa non mi hanno causato alcuna sensazione, di sorta. Mi sento bene. Test di portata:
روجر. لقد قمنا بتركيب قواطع الدائرة الكهر
Roger, Gemini VI. Bitte treten Sie gegen das Tonbandgerät. Wir vermuten, dass das Band außerhalb des zulässigen B
We can see the Moon passing by the window and it looks what I considered to be a correc
Va bene. Mi sembra giust
Roger. C'est exact. Le compteur affichait 6,9 quand on l'a éteint. La dernière fois que je l'ai vu, il indiquait 6,9. Frank vient de le remettre en mode AUTO avec le commutateur de fonction enfoncé, et il a avancé de six dixièmes. Puis il a réessayé, et il est resté à zéro. On ne sait vraiment pas ce q
プラス00202 02359 022 02282 03 0399 314 013 上048 右37、プラス1418、マイナス16
알겠습니다. 그럼 이
Okay. Wir empfehlen, bei 54°45°00' anzuhalten. Damit sollten Sie den optimalen Rollwinkel erreichen. Die empfohlene Fluglage ist: Roll 263°, Nick 090°, Gier 000°. So haben Sie im Kommandomodul freie Sicht auf die Erde durch Fenster 1 und können die Hochleistungsantenne für Fernsehempfang nach Beli
روجر. قم بتثبيت الكاميرا على حامل التلفزيون القابل للتعديل وقم بتثبيت الحامل على نقطة تثبيت التلفزيون 
Хорошо. Плюс 1197 минус 16500 12681 35608, выровнять север, установить звезды, крен 068, тангаж 097, рыскание 356, зазор отсутствует; другое: один, быстрое возвращение, равно 7900 для Индийского океана; номер 2, высокоскоростная процед
좋습니다. 카메라 오른쪽이 역방향으로 향하고 있습니다. 지금 휴스턴 분화구 옆을 지나가고 있는데요, 텍사스에 계신 분들을 위해 카메라가 저
로저... 허리케인이나 태풍 지역 상공에서... 바로 칼라 태풍 위에 있었는데... 어떤 태풍들이었는지는 모르겠
Détenir 12
D'accord. Cela me conviend
Roger. We're looking at a - sort of a funny looking. We've already drifted out to 70 degrees in pitch a
Sì, penso che tu... Probabilmente hai avut
At E mi - minus 02:30, during power removal from the umbilical, first thing we do is two steps with the. We open the MAIN B, the POWER to MAIN B circuit breakers, and then there's a third step which says "Ci
Okay. Null Adressen 25, 
Okay. For today, we'd like you on to make a trunnion bias determination, prior to sightings as called out in procedures, and also one afterwards. Our intent here is to check out the possibility that some sort of thermal effect may be giving you errors in the angular read
Très bien. Vas-y,
We really have them, Charlie. We've got all kinds of good stuff. We've got coffee up here in the upper left and various breakfast items, bacon in little small bites, beverages like fruit drink, and over in the center part we have, oh, all kinds of things. Let me pull one out here and see
Je doi
무슨 일이야
Ok, Apollo 8. Vorrei verificare l'asse de
機材は収納されています
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। आप जिम को बता दीजिएगा, कल उसका दिन बहुत थका 
我们认为对准没问题，所以不需要进行完全对准。我
We've got to think about when
ठीक है। हमें उच्च बिट दर चाहिए। हमने आपकी सेवा छोड़ दी है, और हम कुछ समय के लि
Роджер, Кантон. Вы читали, что я был в режиме ретро?
It's really a fantastic sight through that sextant. A minute ago, during that AUTO ma
Хорошо. Тут особо нечего рассказывать. Ну, давайте начнём со спорта, какого черта. «Астрос» выстояли со счётом 8:7, «Брейвс» набрали пять или шесть очков в девятом иннинге, но им это удалось; а в другой важной игре дня матч «Кабс» был отменён из-за дождя. У меня есть все остальные результаты, можете сказать, если хотите. В Маниле и других районах острова Лусон произошли землетрясения. Было три толчка, и здания тряслись около получаса, магнитуда была примерно 5 по шкале Рихтера. Хорошо, давайте посмотрим. «Битлз» объявили, что больше не будут выступать как группа. Сообщается, что квартет заработал более полумиллиарда долларов за свою короткую музыкальную карье
Это Sigma Seven, запись только в режиме VOX. Я восстановил автоматический режим в нормальном режиме без использования двигателей большой мощности. На данный момент у меня 85 процентов автоматического режима, 90 процентов ручного. И я чувствую, что теперь, когда я в строю, я могу проводить эксперименты там, где раньше не мог. Сейчас я опущу капсулу на низкой высоте с электронным управлением. Сначала я п
Aquarius, Houston. Die Kommunikation war dort etwas unruhig, und ich möchte sichergehen, dass wir die Zahlen richtig haben. Deshalb bitte ich Sie,
Роджер. 11, /: 45597, 0 - поправка - это минус 040, плюс 157, плюс 36325, минус 01727, плюс 01428 180 003 000, Ноябрьская Альфа, плюс 00186 36394 323 36186 42 0995 254; Скорпионы Дельта, вниз 103, влево 48, плюс 0742, минус 16500 13005 36327; Сириус и Ригель, 129 155 010, четыре квадру, 15 секунд; горизонт на линии 2,9 градуса в то
Que
01 06 106、つまり 1 分、1 時間 7 分が経過
On verra ce qu'on peut faire, Jack. On va contacter l'équipe de récupération et voir si on peut envoyer l'agent dans le Pacifique à ton retour. Tiens, on verra bien. En basket, les Nicks ont battu les Bucks de Milwaukee 110 à 102, et Billy Casper est en tête du Masters après 54 trous avec un score de 208. Les entraînements de football américain battent leur plein. Voilà pour les dernières nouvelles. Le programme du jour est le suivant: l'uniforme sera la tenue de service de vol avec épées et médailles. Ce soir, dans le hangar à matériel, on projette « Le Vol d'Apollo 13 » avec John Wayne, Lou Cos
حسنًا، بدءًا من أعلى الصفحة، قم بشطب الأسطر الخمسة الأولى، وهي 
रॉजर। यह फ्रे
حسناً، هذا جيد. سلم عليها نيابة
रॉजर। एरिया 1 चार्ल
了解。経過時間01 37で
Il commence à faire sombre. Laisse-moi voir. Muchea contac
Close t
مرحباً
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。PTCに停止しました。姿勢は良好です。マイク、通信チェックをお願いします。宇宙船からの最近の数回の通信は、特にバズの通信が乱れています。お二人とも通信チェック
… Je perds toutes les référenc
जी हाँ, मैंने खाया है। हालाँकि, खाना बुरी तरह से बिखर गया है; और मुझे डर है कि कैप्सूल में खाने के टुकड़े बिखर जाएँगे, इसलिए मैं अब पैकेट खोलने से कतराती हूँ। मैं इस बात की पुष्टि कर सकती हूँ कि इस उड़ान के लिए पैक किए गए छोटे-छोटे टुकड़ों वाले खाने को खाने में कोई सम
카나리입니다. 어떻게
ठीक है। प
# Cana
这里是Sigma Seven。收到，2 Charl
罗杰。抱歉刚才有点匆忙，我们这边出了点故障；
Так это выглядит; если только это не просто тёмно-коричневая полоса. На самом 
Roger. Step number 2, attac
Die Menschen, die dort wohnen, kommen 
Je comprends ce que tu veux dire. J'ai dormi un peu 
Ok. L'orario di iniz
Роджер. «Примерно» — это приблизитель
再说一遍，11
Questo è confermato. Inoltre, Jim, per informazione, abbiamo stimato il tempo trascors
कौन से स्मृति चिन्ह? (हंसी) मे
알겠습니다. 여기 또 다른 입력값 11이 있는데
Oui, c'est exact, Jack; c'est assez simple. À mi-chemin de la procédure, nous avons une étape sur le panneau 3, intitulée « Amplificateur de puissance, haut »; nous aimerions la remplacer par « Amplificateur de puissanc
Il rapporto sulla correlazione di Gage
حسنًا. تريدني أن أقرأ ع
Alors, avez-vous eu l'occasion de dormir un peu depu
Bon, on devrait s'occuper de ce problème de roulage que j'avais signalé, m
버즈는 VERB 82를 하고 싶어할 거예요.
不，我还没有。稍等一
Tranquillité. Roger. Bien r
Roger. We ar
Roger, Rév. 33, exécution 4, heure de début 19:43:00, soit l'heure du coucher du soleil. Fin 0-20. Je répète 20:19:00, soit l'heure du lever du so
Okay. Und dasselbe gi
फ्लाईबाई / 63087, माइनस 162, प्लस 129, प्लस 009 62, प्लस 00568, माइनस 02077, 000 000 000, NA. क्या आप अब तक मेरी बात समझ रहे ह
Lasciami scattare una foto ravvicinata 
Roger. Ich wiederhole es noch einmal: Ihr Zustandsvektor ist in Ordnung; er ist noch nicht veraltet. Wir halten hier an, um zu prüfen, ob Informationen verloren gegangen sind. Das ist der erste Grund. Der zweite Grund ist, dass Ihre W-Matrix einige Speicherzellen mit anderen Systeme
友谊七号，百慕大Cap
V
"0.1 foot per second." The reason we are shutting down on the burn time is, since the ASA breaker has been out fo
वे हर हाल में हद से ज्यादा
Apollo 8, Hou
Этот промежуточный этап должен быть интересным. Знаете
ジェミニVI、ヒューストン。ヘリコプター
알겠습니다. 그리고 나
제미니 4, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 지금은 교신하지 않습니다. 휴스턴, 통신 두절. 조종사, 다시 한번 말씀드리지만, CSQ에서 조종사 
Nein, das ist mir recht. Ich ri
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। 
ये हमारा उतरने से पहले का
罗杰。把它调低。听着，我刚才把转速调到了大约 5 又 1/4，现在我正试图用 Repress 键把它保持在 5 又 1/4……保持住。如果不行，我就把它调到 800 左右
凌晨 1 点 30 分，天空已经相当黑了。燃油和氧气供应稳定，座舱压力稳定在 6.2 磅/平
ठीक है। एंट्री 1 को देखते हुए: दूसरा आइटम 12 घंटे का केल्विन कोल्ड सोक है, और यहाँ और प्रीफ्लाइट में हुई चर्चाओं में, मुझे लगता है कि इस बात पर सहमति बनी है कि हम वहाँ कोल्ड सोक नहीं करना चाहते। इसलिए हम स्टेप 2 को हटा रहे हैं। इसका मतलब यह है कि मुझे लगता है कि हम कोल्ड सोक करना चाहते हैं, और हम निश्चित रूप से एंट्री से पहले वाटर बॉयलर का परीक्षण करना चाहते हैं ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके
قيادة سلسة إلى حد ما، كما تعلم؛ صحيح أنها تصدر بعض الاهتزازات الطفيفة، لكنها لا تُقارن بسيارة ستافورد – تبد
Roger. Compris. Nœud 07 04 4
Mir wird dabei ganz übel, Charlie. Ich bringe
Я бы сказал, что рост сост
Apollo 8, Houston. We're going to go ahead and try to dump your tape right now. Circuit margins aren't too good at our present configuration. We're going to take a look 
네, 토요일
네, 좋습니다. 해당 프로그램 경보는 정상입니다. 트러니언이 50도 아래로 내려가면
收到。我
Хорошо, Джим. Это хорошая обратная связь, и в случае потери связи используйте процедуры, которые я вам дал. Во
Хоро
Sì. Potremmo farlo. In realtà eravamo piuttost
罗杰
로저. 나 지금 막 들어가려고 해. 난 그 일에 참여 안 
좋아요. 남은 시간
Oh, sono circa 12-15 righe. Si tratta di verificare alcune valvole e
روجر. بعض الملاحظات المثيرة للاهتمام - أجريتُ للتوّ مسحًا فلكيًا باستخدام القمر؛ الشمس تحجب الرؤية تمامًا. تمكنتُ من التقاط صورة لنجم قلب العقرب (أنتاريس) وكنتُ أعمل على الثانية، لكن حافة القمر اختفت تمامًا. الرؤية عبر السدس بيضاء حليبية، سواءً كنتَ تنظر إلى السماء السو
検閲済
Привет, Вумера
D'accord. Nous rencontrons quelques problèmes de liaison, et nous vous recevons faiblement mais clairement. Nous sommes prêts à commencer notre test. Nous allons changer de mode; vous entendrez probablement un bref bruit lors de ce changement. Ce bruit ressemblera à un verrouillage de bande S. Cependant, votre responsable AEC le bloquera. Ceci est dû à la perte de modulation sur la liaison montante. Cela durera environ deux minutes, 
罗杰。
On s'est bien amusés à expérimenter et maintenant on va avoi
看起来即使在断电状态下（字迹模糊），我们仍然消耗着略低于11安培的电流。1号机组是10安培，2号机组略低于11安培。系绳——或者说系绳或脐带式约束装置在外部舱门的位置——使得在航天器前方进行任何舱外活动（EVA）都相当困难，尤其是在自由系绳空气动力学方面。每当我在那片区域操作时，系绳末端会把我往后拉，反作用力会
Abbiamo visto che hai sollevato il coperchio nella fase di interruzi
حسنً
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous avons reçu beaucoup de bruit. Pourriez-vous essayer un gain élevé avec une large ouverture de faisceau? Les angles sont de 180°, le lacet et le tangage sont
我得喊你一声，才能把任务计时器打开。我
Okay, wo sind wir? Wir stürzen ab. Schade, das
Die Invertertemperatur Ihrer Lüfter beträgt 205 Grad und
CC_?: TMS calling. Repeat please..... Did you receive C
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لدينا هذه الأرقام كنسبة مئوية. سنقوم بتحويلها إلى أرطال، وفي هذه الأثناء، سنقوم بتغيير هوائي الأرض خلال دقيقتين ونصف تقري
杰克，我弄了个挺不错的睡眠舱。我从指挥舱里取出一个睡眠束缚带，拉上拉链，然后把拉链顶端的系带钩在上舱门把手上。这样就能把我固定住，然后我就头朝下，脸对着舱门，顺着隧道漂上去，这样阳光就不会照到我眼
なぜワイドデッドバンドがオンになっているのですか？待機してください
في موسكو، نقلت وكالة تاس عن مهندس الفضاء أناتول كوريتسكي قوله إن مركبة
Columbia, qui Houston. Mi r
저건 아폴로 8
روجر، ووميرا. فهمت قصدك جيدًا. أريد قراءة درجات حرارة العاكس، وعلامة على الشع
在这里，我们显示了在回放燃烧过程中腔室压力约为 103 至 10
わかりました。皆さんにはこの点について知っていただき、飛行計画にどのような影響があるか考えていただきたかったのです。広角で月についてコメントし、どのセクションが最も適切だと思うか確認します。さて、フランクはスクロールで、進入プロファイルが表示される順番を確認してほしいと言っていました。最初に表示されるプロファイルは「非退出番号2」と表示されており、これは短距離高速進入です。2番目に表示されるのは「3500マイル」と表示されており、これも高速進入ですが、長距離進入を行う場合に使用します。3番目のプロファイルは「非退出番号1」で、その後ろに3500マイルのプロファイルが続きます。つまり、4つの進入プロファイルがあります。1番と3番は短距離、2番と4番は長距離のスクロールです。コールドソークについては、そこで何をするか話し合ったと思いますが、1時間ほどでコールドソークの作業に入りたいと思っています。12時にやるつもりは絶対にありません。軌道計算担当者と話をしたところ、水が沸騰する現象についてどう思っていたかということですが、覚えておいてほしいのは、彼らは軌道図上で水が飛び散ったり沸騰したりする様子を見ているということです。これは、軌道が大きく変動しているという事実ではなく、彼らの計算スキームによるものだと思われます。ですから、もし水が沸騰するのであれば、軌道修正がどうなるかが分かっている中間軌道の直前に行うのが妥当かもしれません。中間軌道修正の直前に水が沸騰する現象を観測し、中間軌道修正後に軌道修正を再開することになります。ですから、もし誰かが、私たちが最も重要な時にデータを捨てているのではなく、それ
حسنًا. 
Ich h
Ich warte mit meinem Leuchtfeuer noch. Die Uhr steht schätzungsweise auf der Zeit, als ich das Gerät eingeschalte
Всё в порядке, Фрэнк. Отлично. В заключение мы хотели бы снять три
Roger, Jim. Al momento, stiamo valutando, provvisoriamente, di iniziare circa 45 minuti prima dell'ustione e la nostra sensibilità non è poi così male. Possiamo continuare per 30 m
好的。到380号
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 지형에 관해 저희가 드릴 수 있는 최선의 조언은 불규칙한 모양의 분화구 서쪽을 살펴보시고, 그 남서쪽 방향으로 가시면 된다는 것입
Роджер, я приближаюсь к отметке 20 000. Готов к установке шноркеля. Давление в кабине повышается. Шноркель нужно снять. Кажется, крышка шноркеля лопнула. Я это почувствовал, я все равно его сниму. У меня есть аварийный тариф. Ду
哦，吉姆，我
네, 그러니까 저희가 이적을 조금 늦게 한 이유는… 보수적인 전략을 펼쳤기 때
Well, it was nice to talk to you and get all the news from the home front. As we went over Houston, I could actually see. When I was outside, I could see the Gulf and Galveston Bay and I could see right on up
انضم لاعبان من فريق أويلر
g feels sort of p
Aquarius, Houston. Ve
That's a
Tranquility Base, this is Houston. Our telemetry shows the engine arm circuit breaker in the OPEN position at the present time. We want you to leave it open until it is nominally sch
Ok. Bisogna stare molto attenti a tenere traccia di dove si trova il baricentro. A volte, ci vogl
Roger. Ho... 
روجر. هل يمكنك أن تطلب من باز فحص أجهزة الاستشعار الطبية الحيوية للتأكد من عدم وجود مستشعر مفكوك أو جاف؟ نحصل على قراءة غير منتظمة لتخطيط القلب الكهربائي. قد يكون السبب أحد أقطاب الصدر الثلاث
Okay. In Schritt 5 von E-11 steht – die erste Unterüberschrift lautet „Helme und Handschuhe“. Die folgenden Punkte hängen davon ab, ob Sie einen Anzug tragen oder mit Hemdsärmeln einsteigen, müssen aber in jedem Fall erledigt werden. Die Rückluftventile des Anzugs müssten bei einem Einstieg mit Hemdsärmeln geöffnet sein. Außerdem sollte zwischen dem Notdruckventil in der Kabine und dem Zeitpunkt, an dem der CMP (Command Managem
You won't be able to 
Friendship Seven, Guaymas Cap Com. Everything looks
알겠습니다, 프레드. 저희가 당신의 오랜 친구인 배터리 2를 
嗯，它不太管用；似乎一直都不太管用。根据太阳的位置，它中间会出现一条横贯的带状区域。我不认为它失效是因为废水颗粒造成的。
Sagen Sie uns bitte einfach die Uhrzeit, wir wollen nur wissen, wann es soweit ist. Ich würde den Terminator gerne bekommen, wenn möglich, und wir haben ein
了解。相変わらず、
Ok. Potresti spegnere la batteria 2, lasciarla spent
다른 정보도 좀 있습니다. 궤적에 대한 정확한 정보는 약 2시간 후에나
ठीक है। बढ़िया। मैं कर दूंगा। और सिस्
ر
Roger. That's goo
Vuoi che A
从现在起，您的状态将变为绿
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, die Sauerstoffspülung zu b
D'accord.
로저. 이제 남은 일은 두 가지뿐
حسناً يا فانس، لقد حصلت على قراءاتك في ال
मुझे ऐसा नहीं 
J'ai Fred là-haut avec Jack pour les aider à mettre le système en marche, et j
تمام
Понял. Подождите. У м
एक लक्ष्य 
We're going to have an LOS, I believe. I'll let Hawaii give you a G.m
알겠습니다. 제가 있던 위치가 바로 그곳입니다. 명령 모듈 추진제 2, 중앙, 켜짐, 위쪽; 추진제 통신, 2, 회색; 서비스 모듈 보조 연료 압력, 4, 중앙, 닫힘; 자동, 꺼짐; 명령 모듈/최종 분리, 2, 꺼짐; 명령 모듈/서비스 모듈 분리, 2, 아래쪽;
40 feet, down 2 1/2. Kicking 
Gemini VI, we're interested in Delta-V's on the terminal phase initiation and the braking, and also several million people are interested in a little more description of 
了解しました。11です。その説明は理解しました。アフガニスタンとパキス
是的，我们认为这
आज रात आसमान में काफी बादल छाए हुए हैं।
Describing the blue band. There's a relatively dark blue band right at the surface of the earth, and a light blue band, and another dark blue band, and a large white band which is the air glow, and then a deep black one and sorta goes from a grayish blue in to a dense black. Almost looks like underneath a rain cloud as far as the transition from the blue band to the total darkness. And I'll bring up my fingertip lights. And at Mercury is right on the horizon. Arcturus should be in view, b
حسنًا، الآن لن يكون لي أي صوت معك
आपने उसे डिलीट कर दिया और फिर नया वाला ड
रॉजर। पूर्वी प्रशांत महासागर में स्थित अंतरिक्ष यान से हमें पृथ्वी का केंद्र दिखाई दे
Sì. Per tua informazione, Jim, non so se l'hai sentito inizialmente, ma quel tempo da 2-1/2 a 1 in è stato eseguito 
Roger. Mike, als du vor einer Weile damit ex
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Vos données 1 et 2 reçues lors du dernier passage sont toujours valides. Grâce à elles, votre prochaine 
Хьюстон, это
복사 
5. 4, 
네. 시간 되실 때 다음 밸브들을 확인하시고, 저희가 안내해 드리는 대로 그대로 두시기 바랍니다. 리프레스 패키지 밸브, 꺼짐; 비상 객실 압력 밸브, 꺼짐; 직접 산소 공급 밸브, 꺼짐; 수요 조절 밸브, 꺼짐; 두 개의 물 축압기, 꺼짐; 메인 조절기 A와 B, 열림; 물/글리콜 밸브 - 정정 - 물 밸브, 그리고 글리콜 탱크 입구와 출구 밸
It goes up quite a ways. It takes a fan shape, unlike the sunrise on earth where the atmosphere affects it. This just sort 
Я уже его загрузил. Не думаю, что э
कॉपी, अपोलो 11। हमें तो ठीक लग रहा है। समाप
Ici Friendship Seven. Négatif. Je me
ओह, ठीक है। मुझे लगा कि आप - मैं भी यही सोच रहा था। मुझे लगा कि आपने कहा था कि जाँच करें, और मुझे लगा कि आप हाई गेन एंटीना के बा
まだロ
روجر. هاواي ك
ठीक है। ठीक है, मैंने इसे इतनी देर तक नहीं रोका। शायद 2 या 3 सेकं
見ま
Ich fliege mit minimalem Impuls, Houston, und es ist ziemlich schwierig, die Daten konstant zu halten. Die Flugbahn schwankt star
알겠습니다. 제가 제대로 이해했다면, 활성화가 완료될 때쯤에는 기동할 여지가 생기고, 연소 준비
ヒューストン、アポロ 11 号。興味深いことに、70 mm カメラでは、司令船で約 300 枚、司令船で
さあ
In the beginning, the operation with the precluded immediate starting up of our sightings as we had scheduled since we had another evasive maneuver. The dumping of the caused a tremendous amount of - of pseudo stars in the area which made an optics calibration practically impossible. The method which we had worked out did not seem to work too well. The method which I finally used was to go into, go to Sirius, which was our brightest star, get the shaft and trunnion, and then fly the spacecraft up to Sirius to use that for the optics, which we did at a later time. With regards to light scatter, it appears that at almost any attitude during our passive thermal control, we ar
Roger. Im Moment i
Okay GET B 02 45 50; Delta-V, 26.2; burn time, 0 plus 35; yaw 90 right, 
Давай
Ещё один момент, на который вы могли бы обратить внимание: среди наших читателей есть 
Forty-five deg
Вы можете выключить ко
Das i
Ok, Fred-o. 
この辺りのビルの食べ物を片付けて、どこかへ持っていくことができればいいのですが。このエリアの下には「下部機器ベイ」と呼ばれている場所があり、ここには光学測位機器があります。私たちはここで星や月か地球の地平線を視準して、すべてのナビゲーションを行っています。そして、ここで私たちが宇宙のどこにいるのか、どの方向に、どのくらいの速さで移動しているのかを正確に把握します。そし
알겠습니다. 비행 디스플레이, 임무 타이머, 닫았습니다. 이제 유령들을 끝까지 볼 수 있습니
OK - mett
Род
알겠습니다. 저희 팀에서 그 부분을 담당하고 있는데, 참고로 그 팀에서 알고 싶어하는 정보 중 하나는 사령선 모듈에 있는
Я сделал снимок 4, - 4a, это побережье Соединенных Штатов. Предполагаю, что скоро мне придется посмотреть на карту и определить наше местоположение. В этом месте довольно большая облачная масса. Мы снова уберем камеру. Скорость дрейфа недостаточно постоянна, чтобы просто сделать снимок 
Okay, crew. About the only other thing I've got for you right now is an update to your pad for lift-off plus 35. This is a change to the pad we gave you yesterday. The reason for the update is for weather avoidance in the mid-Pacific landing area at 70 hours, which is the return time for this pad, and in case the question arises in your mind, we don't expect any problem there for the end of the mission. The weathe
I'm going - have I had any high thruster acti
ओह, हाँ। मुझे इसकी चिंता नहीं है। मैं बस यह सु
Подтверждаю. Хорошо. Если вы готов
요,
待機する..
Hier spricht Canton. Laut und deutlich, Aurora Seven. Können Sie mit dem Kurzbericht
Ricevuto, Jim. Vorremmo la prossima manovr
D'accord, Houston. En me basant sur la solution avec moins de MA, j'ai obtenu une longitude d'impact de -160,95. Je l'ai ajustée pour obtenir une latitude et une longitude d'impact de 163,75. Je voulais déplacer mon point d'impact de 30 degrés vers l'est et j'ai cherché à déterminer les paramètres de correction nécessaires. J'ai obtenu une correction X de -11,6, une correction C de +600 et une correction Y de 0. Cela a modifié ma correction X précédente, qui était de -50,2. Je voudrais simplement savoir si cela est 
Хорошо. Первое утверждение: «Проверить в режиме РАБОТЫ в течение 5 минут». Затем переходим к «адресу 400 плюс 5, затем 400 плюс ноль. ТАНГЕНЦ и КОЛЬЦО в импульсный режим; РАВНОВЕСИЕ, РЕЖИМ УПРАВЛЕНИЯ. Маневрирование с использованием тангажа и крена». Компьютер управляет рысканием, но вы можете переопределить его с помощью ACA. Вы меня понимае
乔，你读得
Ça a disparu par ma fenêtre mainte
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है, जो अंधेरे में प्रसारण कर रहा है। पेरिस्कोप में पीछे से सूर्योदय हो रहा है। पेरिस्कोप में यह बहुत चमकीला दिख रहा था, क्षितिज के पास आते हुए और ऊपर आते हुए यह चटख लाल रंग का था; और जैसे ही मैंने खिड़की से बाहर देखा, मुझे कैप्सूल के चारों ओर हजारों छोटे, चमकदार कण घूमते हुए और लगभग 3 से 5 मील प्रति घंटे की रफ्तार से मुझसे दूर जाते हुए दिखाई द
The responsibility for this flight lies first with history and with the giants of science who have preceded this effort; next with the American people, who have through their will, indicated their desire; next, to four administrations, and their Congresses, for implementing that will; and then, to the agency and industry teams that built our spacecraft, the Saturn, the Columbia, the Eagle, and the little EMU, the space suit and backpack that was our small spacecraft out on the lunar surface. We would like to give a special thanks to all those Americans who built the spacecraft, who did the construction, design, the tests, and put their - their hearts and all their abilities into those crafts. To those people, tonight, we give a special t
好的。这就是我们希望您使用的配置，我们是这样考虑的。当我们把1号水箱设置为自动，2号水箱设置为关闭时，我们发现加
Oui, je l'ai fait. Vous voulez retirer - Vous voulez alimenter les deux bus, avec les interrupteurs de moteur BUS TIE; tout d'abord, pour vérifier qu'il n'y a pas de charge sur les bus, et ensuite, couper l'alimentation des bus en tira
Ja, ich habe versucht, den Rollwinkel zu reduzieren. Roll auf Null. Einfach auf Null, ich stelle auf ATT HOLD. Dann wird die Gierbewegung aufgehoben, die Nickbewegung bleibt aber gleich; dann neigen wir na
Okay, Joe. The last time we saw the positively was when Fred saw it venting at about - at about 5 hours. We think we might have picked it up later on. We saw a particle or something out there that was tumbling which might have bee
好的，休斯顿。
एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्ट
左側の108:00から「ORB科学姿勢におけるORB
I'm sorry, let
ठीक है, मेर
Bene. Suggeriamo l'ora di inizio e di fine e sarai in... Ti chiediamo una velocità di rollio a sinistra, che abbiamo notato essere la tua preferenza, una velocità di rollio a sinistra di 1 giro all'ora, e questo è nel tuo assetto attuale (ovvero, beccheggio 10 gradi, 010 gradi e imbardata 45 gradi). Fas
Just like to mention that, even if, for some reason, we run out of time or something and don't complet
حسنًا، تم تشغيل ربط نا
Valvole di ISOLAMENTO DELLA TUTA
Roger. Compris. OMNI Cha
Si nous tardons à vous répondre, c'est parce que nous sommes en train de manger des san
Это сверху. Ещё один вот-вот — в
Да, в моем контрольном списке этого нет. Д
저분이 로저입
分かりました。同じコメントですね。もう一度最初から書き始めます。分かりました。「バランスカップル」を「オフ」に変更します。その下の「LMP」を「ジェット」に変更します。マイナス2の「400プラス1」を消し、「マスターアーム、オン」をマイナス1に消します。マイナス10秒の時点で「手動アレージ」を追加します。イグニッションを追加します。「始動しない場合は、スタートボタンを押してください。それでも始動しない場合は、降下エンジンコマンドオーバーライド、オン」というコメ
Думаешь, ты сможешь дотянуться до этого крюка, который висит в
आरसीएस हीटर बंद हो र
Po
了解、ジャック。MDC1には異常はありません。レートインジケーターはすべてゼロです。ボール2は当然フリーズしています。メインBが故障したのです。ボール1は正常
オーケー。通信システムに接続する
Eh bien, je me faufile là où il n'a pas accès... D'ailleurs, il doit y avoir un m
Nicht wirklich. Ich denke, wir planen, die Wasserkessel vor der Kurskorrektur zu überprüfen. Auch beim Kaltwasserbad werden die Wasserkessel genutzt, aber das erfolgt kurz vor dem Eintritt in den Anflug, wenn die Empfindlichkeit noch gering ist. Wenn wir das nicht innerhalb von zwölf Stunden tun, ist unklar, wo genau das Kaltwasserbad stattfindet und wo der sekundäre Wasserkessel eingeschaltet wird. Beim Durchsehen der Checkliste für den Eintritt heute Abend haben wir dazu kein
11번, 휴스턴. 이게 단순한 오차인지 아니면 달 궤도를 벗어난 영향인지 좀 더
…銃は持っていなかったので
無料で見られるものばかりです。大きなものも小さなものも見えます。写真を撮るのはほぼ不可能です。ほとんどは、いわゆる良い星よりも小さいもの
Bien. Correction de trajectoire numéro 4: / 62888 Novembre Alfa Novembre Alfa moins 00012, moins 00011, plus 00012 031 008 323 Novembre Alfa, plus 00618 00020 011 00020 17 2965 308 Alpha-Centauri, vers le haut 073, vers la gauche 34. Pour les étoiles, ce sera la principale S
Okay, die Umschaltung auf Stromversorgung dauerte 57 Stunden und 11 Minuten. Zur Information: Wir scheinen über ausreichend Energie zu verfügen. Tatsächlich prüfen wir ein Verfahren, das wir Ihnen möglicherweise späte
रॉजर। केप तैयार है और मैं भी तैयार हूँ। कैप्सूल अच्छी स्थिति में है। ईंधन 103-102 प्रतिशत, ऑक्सीजन 78-100 प्रतिशत, केबिन का दबाव 5.8 पर स्थिर है, एम्प्स 26 हैं। सभी सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहे 
Роджер. Проверьте дрейф на 1° в сек
Roger. Merci, Houston. Nous apprécions ce résumé. Nous cherc
ओह, यह अच्छा नहीं है, जैक; मेरा सुझाव है क
Хьюстон, Ко
Yes, the
...총은 없었지만, 우주선 문에 부착된 끈을 사용하는 게 좀 더 어려웠어요. 마치 밧줄처럼, 끈이 자꾸 저를 뒤로 끌어당겨 문에 부딪히게 하고 어댑터 쪽으로 튕겨 나가게 하는 경향이 있어서, 그 구역에서 벗어나려고
Bene. L'immagine che Jim mi ha dato della sua visione attraverso la Terra era all'interno della - parte della Terra, la parte illuminata si trovava nella metà superiore della Terra con la cuspide che si trovava proprio sulla linea Y-Y. E quindi - L'intera parte scura della T
حسنًا يا جاك. بما أننا حصلنا على الإشارة، نخطط لاستخدام هذه المعلومات لإعطاء المركبة الفضائية محاذاة تقريبية،
حسنً
Джим, в этом режиме управления это, похоже, лучший вариант. Единственное, что тебе нужно будет сделать, это установить режим удержания положения (ATTITUDE HOLD), поэтому перед началом маневрирования тебе нужно будет поднять рычаг управления и ввести значение 400 плюс все нули, а затем он будет реагировать на рыскание, когда ты перейдешь в режим управления (MODE CONTROL). То есть, он будет управлять твоим рысканием в режиме управления (MODE CONTROL), а тангаж и крен можно будет контролировать в импульсном режиме (PULSE). После того, как ты установишь положение, тебе нужно будет снова ввести значение по оси корпуса, которое рав
E, Mike, pensiamo che questi gr
オーケー。クリスマス前夜、宇宙のはるか遠くで、アポロ8号の乗組員たちは月面レースに勝利したばかりだった。ヘッドセットはコンソールに丁寧に掛けられ、クリス・クラフトがもうすぐそこにいるだろうと期待していた。フランク・ボーマンはベッドに心地よく潜り込み、宇宙船の夢が頭の中で踊っていた。ジム・ラヴェルはソファに、アンダースはベイにいてコンピューターのディスプレイに頭を悩ませていた。その時、物音が響き、フランクはベッドから飛び起き、何事かと尋ねた。彼は電光石火のごとく六分儀へと飛び、墜落しないかと確かめた。月のギザギザの地殻の胸に灯る光は、灰色の月の塵に緑のチーズのような輝きを与えていた。その時、彼の驚嘆の目に映ったのは、ビルマ・シェーブの看板で「キルロイはここにいる」と書かれていた。しかしフランクは馬鹿ではなかった。すぐに彼らが先だったと悟った。これはきっと罠に違いない。ロケットよりも速く、彼らは罵声を浴びせ、フランクは乗組員の方を向いて彼らを罵倒した。今度はラヴェル、今度はアンダース、今度はお前が壁に書いた古い冗談に私が騙されるとは思わないでくれ。彼らは一言も発せず、エルフのようにニヤニヤ笑い、思わず冗談に笑っていた。フランクはソファに飛び乗り、船を勢いよく推進すると、
Laisse tomber, Jack. J'en reparlerai plus tard, une f
Hey, 
Roger. Und
Я готов. Я завершил проверку 
Ладно, Джек просто... вернулся в исходное положение. И после того, как он установил автоматические выключатели на 250 для батарей A и B, он зафиксировал напряжение на шине батарей как 32,3 В на A и 37,0 В; затем он включил автоматические выключатели на 275 В, которые соединили батареи с шинами, и в этот момент он зафиксировал напряжение на ш
罗杰，弗兰克，你们现在在俯仰和偏航姿态保持模式下每小时消耗1.4磅的重量。我们很想知道，每秒0.3度的旋转角度是否会因为旋
Qualcuno ha
You're probably lo
了解しました。信号強度は急速にゼロまで低下し、ピッチとヨーは約3秒でピッチ40度、ヨー240度まで変化しました。現在、ピッチは約15度、ヨーは約265度です。つまり、それほど大き
알겠습니다. 그럼, 이 기동을 계속해서 롤 82, 피치 218, 요 0으
换能器，第 1 组和第 2 组，主 
Roger. Copy. And you can place your T/M switch back to REAL-TIME/
रॉजर, अभी भी फ्लाई-बाय-वायर सिस्टम पर काम कर रहा
Oui. Nous avons constaté qu'il faisait plus chaud dans le cockpit au retour qu'à l'aller. Je me souviens
هيوستن، تم تنظيف جميع خلاي
00:17:30 为接触时间，持续 4 分钟。方位角 99.5 度，仰角 90 度。回波位于光线
Ihre Umlaufbahn beträgt derzeit 86,3 mal 141,6. Sie hal
Ok, Ken. Tornia
D'accord. Certains observateurs du secteur télévisuel ont des idées sur ce qu'ils aimeraient tester avec les filtres. Je vous propose de les lire ici et de réfléchir à la question; vous aurez dix heures pour décider si cela vaut la peine d'être tenté. E
सिग्मा सेवन, यह वाटरटाउन कॉम टेक है। मैंने आप
Okay. We need a - Sor
그리고 밴스, 당신은 아직도 ASA 차단기를 내리는 문제에 대한 답을 찾으
Roger. Non ho sentito lamentele da queste parti, Frank. Ti aggiornerem
D'accord. Attends un 
Allez-y, Housto
Brennvorgang 2 17 59; Delta-V, 63,4; Brenndauer, 1 + 20; Gierwinkel 0, Nickwinkel 0; Kern
D'accord. Je tiens à le préciser, Jack: ces 2 h 30 représentent le minimum pour commencer les améliorations. Pour le reste, vous pouvez procéder comme d'habitude, en essayant de prendre le plus d'avance possible. Mais ce délai de 2 h 30 est calculé en fonction des consommables du module de commande. Si vous gérez bien les consommables, on aura largement le temps de vous fournir des ventilateurs sur l'eau. C'est donc le point à ne surtout pas nég
RKV 経由のパイロットに対して、Medical Type 1 Pass を実行することをお
Ok, Mike. Ti abbiamo chiesto di scollegare il connettore giallo dal condizionatore di segnale e di verificare che sia a posto, di ricollegarlo e poi, se vuoi, di controllare i due elettrodi posizionati uno su ciascun lato della parte inferiore della gabbia tor
Roge
Сейчас мы вообще не видим земного свечени
ठीक है। और हमारे लोग यहाँ हाई-गेन एंटीना पॉइंटिंग प्रोग्राम देख रहे 
We'r
I cr
रॉजर, जिम। समझ लीजिए कि सूर्य से आने वाली रोशनी स्कैनिंग टेलीस्कोप में प्रवेश कर रही है जिससे देखना असंभव हो जाता है, और आपको केवल सेक्स्टेंट पर ही निर्भर रहना पड़ता है। क्या आप इसका कोई 
罗杰。向他们致以亲切的问候
D'accord, Jack. Ce qu'ils aimeraient que tu fasses à 49 heures, c'est qu'ils ont observé une légère variation de l'angle de l'axe optique, d'environ 0,2 degré, plus ou moins. Avant de sortir de la position « OPTICS ZERO », au début de cette opération, ils aimeraient que tu observes simplement l'affichage de l'axe et que tu vérifies si la variation se produit également sur cet affich
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP COM. Si vous lisez ce message, le
Хорошо. Давайте
Il y en a une de coul
تم ضبط 
Ende des Stromausfalls, 30 plus 01; Drogue, 31 plus 37; Main, 32 plus 58; und Sonnenauf
Senden im Blindflug. Sichtverbindung. Die verstrichene Zeit am Boden beträgt laut meiner Markierung 4 Stunde
从主循环开始的
我们将使用 OAM
Okay. Frank, qui la luce si è spenta. (La luce del sole è scomparsa.) Devo accendere un po'
Vuoi l'80, giusto? S
ロジャー、11歳。それは
Roger. Je c
سيكون من الصعب بعض الشيء تتبع بيغاسوس والبقاء في حالة تأهب، فأيهما تريدني
ماذا عن تلك 
Ok, va be
Wel
Ich schalte jetzt den medizinischen Rekorder von 1 AUS auf 1 EIN und 2
罗
حسناً. تم إغلاق واقي الوجه بإحكام. زجاجة واقي الوجه في مستوى عالٍ جداً ضمن النطاق ا
Ok, Fred. Sappi 
ठीक है। आप बहुत धीमी गति से आ रहे ह
Ok, va bene. Perché non so dove - quanto lontano ti ho perso. Ok, pannello 4; TELCOMM, GRUPPO 1, ad AC1. Sul pannello 5, chiudi quanto segue: GRUPPO PRESSIONE 1, PRINCIPALE B; GRUPPO PRESSIONE 2, PRINCIPALE B; TEMP, PRINCIPALE B; TRASDUTTORE CIRCUITO SECONDARIO, PRINCIPALE B; RAD, CONTROLLO/RISCALDATORI, PRINCIPALE B; BUS RELÈ BATTERIA, BAT B; CARICABATTERIA, BAT B; CONTROLLO INVERTER, 2; CONTROLLO INVERTER, 1; SEGNALE SENSORE, AC1; SEGNALE SENSORE, PRINCIPALE B; UN
Andare avanti
こちらアポロ8号、月から生中継でお送りしています。テレビカメラを切り替える必要がありました。まずは、過去16時間にわたって地球の様子をお伝えしました。次は、高度60マイル（約97キロメートル）を16時間飛行してきた月の様子をお伝えします。ビル・アンダース、ジム・ラベル、そして私自身は、クリスマス前日の16時間、ここで実験や写真撮影、そして宇宙船のエンジンを噴射して月を周回してきました。これから、一日中追跡してきた軌跡を辿り、月の日没までをお伝えします。月は私たち一人ひとりにとって異なる存在です。私たち一人ひとりが、今日見たものについて、それぞれの印象を持っていると思います。私自身の印象としては、広大で孤独で、威圧的な存在、あるいは何もない
Давление A равно 
Okay. Ich bin jet
هذا ما كنا نتحدث عنه بالضبط. هناك بعض الرطوبة الطفيفة حو
Roger. Fine.
Did you
Okay, Jim. We'd like to get a suggested time from you. We can figure out a free-return maneuver for any time you want to give us, so if you'll give us the time you'd like to shoot for, we'll figure 
Okay. At minus 4-1/2 hours, configure for SEP. First, BALANCE COUPLE, ON. Secondly, zero the counters in; 404, 405, 406, plus 0; read out 470. Thirdly, translate plus-X to 0.5 foot per second. Fourth, CM/ SEP. Fifth, after SEP, null 470 to 0. Sixth, ATTITUD
알았어, 조. 여기 -1A라는 새 페이지를 만들었어. 항목 6, 전원 전환. 투광등이 꺼져 있는지, 주의/경고/전원 표시등이 켜져 있는지 확인하는 건 평소처럼 하면 돼. 잭한테서 확인 받으면 바로 전달해 줄게. 항목 7, 회로 차단기 트랜슬루나 버스 타이, 패널 11과 16, 닫힘. 8단계, 패널 1의 회로 차단기 조명 및 유틸리티, 닫힘. 그리고 유틸리티 표시등을 켜. 그런데 조명이 이미 충분해서 사실 그 표시등은 필요 없어.
休斯顿，阿波罗11号
……我之前没意识到这一点。这证明你有超过50%的概率会进入钝端，
ちょっと...面白半分でやってみまし
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Вы бы переключ
罗杰，10 16 20. 2, 
好的，稍
Okay. BAT C
روجر. قبل أن ينام بيل، نود أن يق
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, RKV SIR JOHN. Вы выполняете свои упра
よく分かりません。地平線が見え
Bene, al centro della pagina, alla riga 9, cancelleremo semplicemente "Attiva VHF per i controlli COMM" e alla
B1 헬멧에 맞을지는 잘 모르겠네요. 다른 하나는 맞을지도 모르겠어요. 수면용 구
Roger. That will be left on for the rest of the fl
Bene. Nel controllo del circuito secondario, quando siamo passati alla modalità FLOW sui radiatori secondari, la quantità è scesa dal 40% al 36% nei primi 10 secondi, per poi 
Okay. And we'll probably - if we have a short OAMS burn we're going to correct our retrofire time just like we would if we had a short OAMS b
Roger. Batteriespannungen: Hauptbatterie 24 V, Batterie 1 25 V, Batterie 2 25 V, Batterie 3 25 V, Standby 1 25 V, Standby 2 25 V, isolierte Batterie 29 V. Amperemeter: 22 V, Lüfter: 112 V, Lüfte
로저, 70세. 기분 아주 좋습니다
...물을 끓이는 것
是的，我
سنحصل
ما هذا؟ تمرين رياضي في 
जैक, ह्यूस्टन। संचार व्यवस्था कहीं बेहतर तो कहीं बदतर है, और आखिरी संदेश जो 
Comprenez-vous cela? Essayez-vous d'obtenir environ une lecture par révision et de
सुनने में तो 
Хорошо, Джо. Я... А ты уже выложил свой контрольный список по поводу в
やあ、ジョー。2時間12分で「O2 FLOW HIGH」ランプが点灯したんだ。それ以来ずっと高い数値が続いているから、今は
Haben Sie schon versucht, Ihr Headset am Nacken ausz
Apollo 13, 
حسنًا. بقية هذه الصفحات تبدو جيدة؛ سأنتقل الآن إلى الرسوم البيانية
جيم، هي
Apollo 8, Houston. Tous nos experts 
Have som
فهمت. لقد نسخت ذلك. بالنسبة لهدفك من هذه التجارب، نود أن نمنحه الأولوية رقم 1، S-5؛ رقم 2،
It has a stark beauty all its own. It's like much of the high desert of the United States. It's different but it's very pretty out here. Be advised
रॉजर, मैं अब रीएंट्री पर हूँ। 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 - 5, 4,
好的。这些只是清理工作，杰克。第 2-3 页列出了如何从 CM/SEP 等内容中分离出来，所以，很明显，如果我们在步骤 5 进行到 43 分钟时——那部分内容都要删除。一直删除到第 2-4 页，直到写着“15 分钟”的那一行。然后，我们再从那里继续。从 15
罗杰，弗兰克。目前为止，气温还没有
Okay. Ich bin bere
هذا هو الحدث الذي كانوا يتحدث
Okay, Fred. Th
わかりました。次の項目は飛ばしてください。NUMERICS LIGHTINGをOFF、FL
Due psi. Hai capito bene, Ed? Chiuderemo la valvola di sfiato e controlleremo le letture della pressione sanguigna che abbiamo. Controlleremo le tute per eventuali perdite a 2 psi. Controlla le tue per assicurarti che la tuta... uno. O
Хорошо, Джим. Мы... Мы говорили о том, что вам нужно изменить положение относительно стартовой площадки для лучшего обзора звездного поля из командного модуля, и вот что мы хотели бы от вас попросить. Если вы можете предсказать сейчас или в ближайшее время, какое положение вы хотели бы занять в данный момент, и занять это положение сейчас, мы хотели бы иметь возможность вычислить углы поворо
ああ、そう。よかったよ
Okay. Now, Fred, that was good in the checklist. That's all. We'll have the powerdown checklist for you momentarily, and we'd like to ask you if you p
Ich kann auch das Licht an m
أظن أن هذا الحقل الصخري قد يكون له أصل جزئي من تلك الفوهة الصخرية الكبيرة ذات الحواف الحادة التي مرر
Семь, это
ठीक है। 1 मिनट पर, "मास्टर आर्म" लिखकर हम स्क्
نحن بخير. ذهب الطيار للنوم منذ حوالي نصف ساعة، وسيظل نائماً على الأر
发射时，你
Peux-tu le faire encore q
제리, 제가 궁금한 건 연료 소모량이에요. 저희가 하는 일 때문에 연료
了解しました。1時4分に前方33-1、39。2時30分に後方120。02、17、42、47。2時30
Okay. Before you start copying, this procedure is - is basically simply to activate the supercritical helium pressure gaging so that you can read it. And the concern here is lest this supercritical helium pressure reach 1800 psi by 103 hours, at which point we'd be within a possibility of rupturing the burst disk when you activate the. Now, based on the pressure at launch, and based on a nominal rise time of about 6-1/2 psi per hour between then and now, the pressure 
Думаете, у нас 
يا فريد، بخصوص علبة هيدروكسيد الليثيوم هذه المُعدّلة لوحدة القيادة، سنحتاج إلى صنع اثنتين على الأقل واستخدامهما معًا - واحدة لكل مجموعة خراطيم. سنقوم بتوصيل إحدى هذه الصناديق المُعدّلة بالوصلات الحمراء، وسيُسحب الهواء عبر هيدروكسيد الليثيوم ثم
D'accord. Je vais d'abord vous les lire rapidement pour que vous ayez une idée générale. Les points d'appui (pad), le module de service, l'attitude JETT, l'attitude pour l'observation de la Lune, l'attitude pour l'observation du Soleil et l'attitude JETT. Les points d'appui correspondent aux angles d'alignement approximatifs pour les attitudes lors des observations de la Lune et du Soleil, aux angles d'alignement approximatifs pour la rentrée atmosphérique et aux angles de rentrée pour JETT
نعم
روجر. من بين العناوين الرئيسية المتعلقة ببرنامج أبولو هذا الصباح، هناك عنوان يطلب منك البحث عن فتاة جميلة برفقة أرنب كبير. تقول أسطورة قديمة إن فتاة صينية جميلة تُدعى تشانغ-أو تعيش هناك منذ 4000 عام. ويبدو أنها نُفيت إلى القمر لأنها سرقت حبة الخلود من زوجها. ي
네, 프레드 씨. 경보음과 영상이 나오도
Tous les 
我不知道该把它放在哪
जी हां
好的。开始了。-2，/G&
Decisamente sotto di me. L'avevo seguito sotto di me da Carnarvon in poi. Fino a Carnarvon l'avevamo tenuto sotto di noi, poi fino all'orizzonte, e poi di nuovo sotto di noi. Semb
- - whether I'm spaced properl
不，如果你在右侧栏里已经填写了所有这
13, это Хьюстон. Мы хотели бы еще немного приглу
Understand yo
Вид на Хьюстон с 
Roger. La relecture e
好的。GMTB 15 43 23。ΔV 为 139。燃烧持续时间 - 2 分 39 秒。您的 15 55 24。左滚 55。GMTRB 16 05 28。右滚 65。GMT 400 K 15 58 23。您的机动载荷：6344257、0444775、0533348、664903.3、676628.
了解。プラス 90、G&N: 63481、マイナス 153、プラス 132、004 10 25 38、マイナス 04761、プラス 00001、プラス 53361、180 193 000、該当なし、プラス 00203 53573 633 53349、33 1578 122、利用不可、マイナス 0
Colu
Ich habe einen weiteren Punkt auf meiner Checkliste: „Überprüfen, ob die Erfassungssperren eingerastet sind“. Ich habe die Sonde bereits vorgeladen; es ist zwar etwas seltsam, aber e
是
Aujourd'hui, à Houston, l'actualité sportive est marquée par la victoire des Astros. Dans le monde du sport, les Astros de Houston ont renversé la situation en neuvième manche à Cincinnati, s'imposant 7 à 4 face aux Reds. Pourtant, à l'entame de cette neuvième manche, la situation semblait désespérée. Menés 4 à 3, les Astros ont profité d'un retrait pour frapper un simple au champ droit. John Edwards a récidivé avec un autre simple, toujours au champ droit, et Sandy Valdespino a frappé un double, permettant à son équipe d'égaliser. Julio Gotay a obtenu 
일몰이 정말 멋지네요. 오래 볼 필요도 없을 것 같아요. 정말 흥미롭습니다. 또 하나 신기한 건, 눈이 어둠에 적응하지 않았을 때는 모든 게 얼마나 새까맣게 보이는지입니다. 창문에 뭔가 코팅이 되어 있는 게 확실히 보이네요. 이제 다시 VOX로 돌아가서 UHF-hi 모드로 송신해야겠습니다. 바이저를 열어서 오른쪽 마이크를 닦았습니다. 핥았네요. 바이저를 닫고 바로 밀봉해서 슈트 회로가 제대로 작동하도록 했습니다. 다시는 문제가 생기지 않도록 해야죠. 슈트 공기 흡입구 온도가 68도 정도로 아주 잘 유지되고 있습니다. 그래서 돔을 다시 올려야겠네요. 지금은 76~75도 정도입니다. 이 높은 설정이 우리가 원하는 온도인 것 같습니다. 0.5도 정도 더 올려놓으면 딱 맞을 것 같네요. 드디어 좀 시원해졌으니 이제 설정을 어디까지 해야 할지 알겠습니다. 우주복 냉각수 양과 조절 레버를 8.5로 설정했습니다. 현재 돔의 온도는 75도입니다. 우주복 흡입구는 68도입니다. 아주 쾌적합니다. 시원한 바람이 얼굴을 스치는 것을 느낄 수 있습니다. 산소량은 60~75psi(100psi 단위)로 양호합니다. 250 인버터를 계속 지켜보고 있는데, 온도가 140도에 가까워지고 있고, 150 콘트라스트는 약 100도까지 떨어졌습니다. 대기 온도는 약 100도로, 객실 온도와 같습니다. 세 번
了解、
로저. 접지 문제였어요. 방
E, Fred, il computer ha inserito il carico 
Роджер, Хьюстон. Игл с отсчетом. 
रॉजर, 70 वर्ष। बहुत अच्छा महसूस कर रहा हूँ, उड़ान जारी रखें, गुर
收到，杰克。这个步骤完成了。接下来我要讲的是返回控制模块，临时给主总线供电的步骤。首先，我们要确保主总线上没有任何负载，所有设备
時間が経つのを待ちます。42時07
로저. 자, 이제 롤 0, 피치 90, 요우 인으로 기동하려면, 피치 인은 여기, 롤은 여기, 요우는 현재 요우 값대로 하면 됩니다. 알겠습니다, 밴스. 초기 자세 제어 기동에서, 저는 16 20을 표
Und, 11, Houston. Nur zur Information, Eagle, gegen 3:19 Uhr ging bei uns die ISS-Fehlerleuchte aufgrund einer Überhitzung der CDU an; 
こち
比尔说打电话给瓦
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11
Привет, Га
ठीक है। बढ़िया। जैक, आपके लिए एक और जानकारी; हमें पता चला है कि ऑप्टिक्स जिटर अपोलो 12 में देखे गए जिटर के काफी सम
안테나 선택에서 재진입(REENTRY)을 선택했는데 이미 재진입 모드로 설정되어 있습니다. 추진제 게이지 RCS-B도 이미 B로 설정되어 있고요. 양(Quantity)은 꺼짐(O
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Négatif. Un ordinateur de commande sur le site de Madrid est tombé en panne. Nous avons dû basculer temporairement sur Ascension. Nous sommes de nouveau opérationnels à distance via Madrid, l'ordinateur es
了解。104。2+15。GMTRC 01日00時52分14秒。13+48。現在
Роджер. У нас сильные помехи. Море Кризисов перед нами на горизонте, а посередине виден темный кратер Пикар. Сейчас мы видим восход Луны или закат космического аппарата. Это область, где солнце только что взошло на Луне. Море, над которым мы сейчас находимся, имеет пятнистый вид, но не сильно изрыто кратерами, так чт
Well, hell, Jack. All you - you don't use a very good one... Just if you'll go... at your attitude refer
杰克，我们看看能不能
Ro
Wir befinden uns momentan in einer sehr flachen Fluglage, sodass die Bodenstationen uns vermutlich nicht orten können. Wir haben zwar einige 
友谊七号，这里是钢头鱼。请注意，我已经目视确认，预计大
다시
أنا متأكد تمامًا أنني
Bene. Considerando che la luce solare diretta entra dalla finestra, fuori dal campo della telecamera, vorremmo che aprissi il diaframma di circa uno stop e, se ti è comodo, cercassi di tenere quel 
Avrei proprio voluto r
好的。没错，更新的最后一句话是，在45度和155度的倾斜角下，你可以看到这颗彗星。杰克，现在的情况是，根据他们给我看的图表，这颗彗星似乎距离太阳大约10度，由于它遮挡太阳的几何形状，在45度到75度左右的倾斜角范围内，你似乎可以通过六分仪看到这颗彗星，而不会受到太阳直射的影响。看起来，当翻滚角度超过75度时，虽然彗星仍在视野内，但太阳也会出现在视野中。如果您在45度到75度之间都没能拍到彗
Environ 2 degrés de décalage dans l'inclinaison
حسنًا. ما يفعله هذا الجهاز إذًا هو أنه يوفر لك فحصًا لسلامة ضغط النفق أو سلامة ضغط الفتحة، مع فرق ضغط (
로저. 우선 프랭크, 여기 콘솔 
罗杰。威尔科。我们
È affermativo. La soluzione di Keplero
ह्यूस
يا إيجل، أ
سفينة المحيط الأطلسي، هذه فريندشيب 7. أتمنى أن تمروا إلى كيب كانافيرال. تركتُ الكبسولة تدور حتى وصلت إلى وضعية 180 درجة، وأضطر الآن إلى إعادة توجي
Auro
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Non abbiamo notato alcun cambiamento nel segnale ricevuto dall'elettrocardiogramma dell'LMP. Quando avrà un 
로저, 휴스턴. 여기는 아폴로 8
Roger. We're in attitude and would you please give us a call when our t
好的。我们现在来到了
Come dici tu, potre
Это «Дружба Семь». Плеяды видны здесь очень четко. Се
Nein, das haben wir tatsächlich nicht. Es ist in der Gegend trocken, seit wir das letzte M
了解。VOXは大
Je vais laisser la bande tourner en continu à partir de maintenant. Ajoutons-en une autre ici. J'en ai une maintenant et une autre pl
わかりました、ジャック。ちょっと待ってください。FLIGHT andに1～2分ほどお時間をいただきます。起こして申し訳ありませんが、1分ほどお時間をいただければ、読み上げさせていただきま
Oka
Roger. Ce qui s'est pass
فرانك، تشير جميع الدلائل إلى عدم وجود أي 
और मुझे आपके ए
هذا صحيح تقريبًا يا جيم. سيقوم جاك بمحاذاة تقريبية عند هذا الوضع. هذا هو الغرض من مناورتك للوصول إلى هذا الوضع. سنحسب زوايا المحاذاة التقريبية ونرسلها إليه، وأول ما سيفعله عند وصوله، وفقًا لقائمة التحقق 
Ok, Jim. Stiamo pensando di farlo con il modulo di servizio in posizione SEP, e l'ottica sarà puntata lontano dal Sole. Quindi dovrebbe essere una buona posizione
Fantastico. Guarda dietro di noi, sembra proprio un cratere gigantesco; guarda le montagne che lo circond
Okay. Können Sie mir bitte so schnell wie möglich eine Markierung auf mei
Tranquility Base, Houston. Vor
Roger, Carnarvon. For the Plane-Change. At a GET 02 plus 42 plus 07; Delta-V, 31.7; duration, 0 plus 40 seconds; yaw, 
Роджер. Похоже, мы всё ещё находимся примерно в 80 футах от берега. У нас горит основной красный сигнал: ВЫКЛ.; основной зелёный сигнал
Elle possède une beauté austère qui lui est propre. Elle ressemble à une grande partie du haut désert des États-Unis. C'est différent, mais c'est vraiment magnifique ici. Sachez que beaucoup d'échantillons de roche ici, les roches dures, présentent ce qui ressemble à des vésicules en surface. De plus, j'e
Rog
Мне не нужно заниматься спортом. Я действительно не чувствую
休斯顿，阿波罗1
そのやり方がかなり難しくなったら、ひっ
よし。動いて、左に転がる
Bene. Quello che possiamo mostrarvi ora, un piccolo vantaggio aggiuntivo, è che abbiamo il farma
Хорош
はい。そ
わかりました。バッテリー2をオフにして、そのままにして、見さ
ロジャー、ちょっと覗いてみること
잭, 당분간 10분에서 15분 간격으로 배터리 전압과 충전기 전류를 측정해야 하니
मुझे लगता है कि इस चट्टानी मैदान की उत्पत्ति शायद उस बड़े, नुकीले किनारों वाले चट्टानी किनारे वाले गड्ढे से हुई होगी, जिसके ऊपर से हम अंतिम उतरते समय गुज़रे थे। कल मैंने कहा था कि वह लगभग एक फुटबॉल
ه
He may know that, but he doesn't even know wheth
حسنًا، هيوستن؛ برج الدل
Roger. 2 manœuvres, /: 46728, moins 053, plus 121 plus 28466
यह सही है। हमने इसी तरह शुरुआत की थी, और हमने ग्लाइकोल पंप चालू कर दिए हैं, और हम इसे आंतरिक रूप से प्रसारित कर रहे हैं। और हम कमांड मॉड्यूल को हीट सिंक के रूप में इस्तेमाल करने पर भरोसा कर रहे हैं; यह काफी ठंडा है, और लग
阿波罗
Хорошо. Это подтверждается. Те, что слева, изменения от 
罗杰。我们理解，我们已向下挖掘了3英寸，没有遇到任何坚硬的岩层，而且在这个深度范围内，岩层的成分也没有发生显著变化。下一个问题是——由于时间限制，第二个样品打包得比较仓促，我想知道您是否能够提供第二个样品中包含的更详细
Ricevuto, Jim. Stiamo cercando di completare le procedure e di consegnartele il più velocemente possibile. Esistono. Quello che stiamo facendo ora è che i ragazzi le stanno eseguendo nel CMS/LMS, integrandole, per assicurarsi che gli atteggiamenti siano corretti e che la tempistica sia fluida e rilassata e tutto il resto. E non saranno completate prima di qualche ora. Tuttav
嘿，看看
Apollo 11, Apo
ह्यूस्टन, 
هيا، قم بتسلي
네, 맞습니다. 그럼 간단히 설명드리자면, 먼저 전원을 켜고 8볼을 올린 다음, 자세를 설정하고, 앞쪽 창에 표시를 하고, 유도 제어는 당연히 작동시키겠습니다. 하지만 수동으로 우주선의 방향을 조정해서 지구 중심이 Z축 바로 위에 
아폴로 8호, 저희는 당신이 일반 렌즈로 보여주신 것과 같은 결과물을 얻었는데, 망원 렌즈로는 아무것도 얻지 못한 것 같습니다. 지금 이 문제를 해결하기 위해 노력하고 있습니다. 문제점 중 하나는 저조도 환경에서 촬영하기 어려운 렌즈라는 점입니다. 너무 밝은 피사체를 촬영하면 렌즈가 과열되어 손상될
Bene. 
Cela a probablement été arraché penda
Roger. The light's working fine. I can't tell exactly how far it is though, I guess I'm probably a half a mile or so. The booster st
Take it easy now. You s
13, Houston. Il e
그동안 MAIN A 전압을 안정시키
حسناً 
नहीं, फ्रेड। कंप्यू
Verstehe, dass du für die d
わかりました。電源を切る前に少しだ
Bene. Nella zona di atterraggio del Pa
Houston, this is Gemini VI. Our radar appe
了解。聞こえました。バンク角
Kanarienvogel, Zwillinge 4. Lesen Si
Ed a la plupart de l'équipe
Okay. I
Il nous faudra une lampe torche. – Je peux avoir une lampe torche? Tu as une lampe torche. Il nous en faudra peut-être une de rechange. Tu en as une? D’accord. D’a
Okay. I'm 
로저. 상승 PAD: TIG 124 
Houston, Apollo 8. Abbiamo tempo per u
39.0 और 1.75 की प्रतिलिपि बनाए
जी हाँ। हमने
둘째로, 예정된 기상 시간인 121시간 12분으로 정상 일정을 다시 진행하겠습니다. 준비 작업 중에 수산화리튬 용기 9번 교체를 슬쩍 넘겼는데, 지금 바로 완료해 주시기 바랍니다. 수면 중 통신은 일반적
そうですね。何もしていないと
IDE nulli per allineare 
हाँ, हमने इस बारे में थोड़ी बात की थी। लेकिन हमने थोड़ी बात तो की, पर वहाँ कैमरे के लिए कोई जगह नहीं थी। चलो, अंधेरा होने से प
콜럼비아, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 잘 들립
Ici Gemini 4. Comprenez qu'après en
أتمنى أن يبقى الوضع على ما هو عليه. حسن
Ich glaube, du weißt ja, was bei euch alles los ist, und hier unten ist es ganz ruhig. Alle lächeln; der Wei
알겠습니다, 빌. BIOMED 데이터가 여전히 좀 이상하네요. BIOMED 하네스의 파란색 신호 컨디셔너를 확인해 보시겠어요? 가운데 패키지에 파란색 커넥터가 하나 있을 겁니다. 그걸 확인해 보시고, 최근에 BIOMED 하네스 배선을 교체하셨는지 모르겠지만, 만약 교체하셨다면
レトロパワーRCS、
13번, 휴스턴. A와 C의 추진 밸브에 전력을 공급하려고 해도 소용없으니, 찰리의 AUTO 기능을 비활성화해 주
الجوزاء 4. ستكون السا
D'accord. Encore deux étapes. Étape 6: restez sur l'antenne à gain élevé dans ce mode pendant deux secondes. Ne passez pas en mode omnidirectionnel pendant ces deux secondes et conservez la configuration voix et données. La perte de
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 이상
D'accord. Soit j'ai mal recopié le disjoncteur, soit je n'arrive pas à le lire. Il se trouve environ au vingtième rang, après le panneau 276, où il est écrit « CB INSTRUMENTATION 
わかりました。圧力が45以上、マイナス46である
Sigma Seve
Un anello di uno dei nostr
Carnarvon, come
了解、マイク。VHFには左側のVHFアンテナをお勧め
Pour le grand match des Astro Blue Bonnet, le classique du basket-ball suivi de la rencontre entre les Astro Blue Bonnet de SMU et d'Oklahoma, l'excitation est à son comble. On ne sait pas encore qui est favori. Je me renseignerai et v
わかりました。エントリーチェックリストのE-7ページ、ステップ34で、パネル382が開いている限り、蒸発器の一次側と二次側の水位制御を「AUTO」に、二次グリコ
هيوستن، كولومبيا. قراءتي هي 4.9، في X، 5.0..، اجعلها 10
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। मैं दिखा
حسنًا. لدى جاك لوسما هنا نسخة مُحسّنة من طريقة تحضير هذه الأشياء بسهولة، وأعت
Roger. Wir h
覚えていません。カプトンとステージ上の他の部品が周囲にかなり遠
Ситуация постепенно 
I don't
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. جميع الأنظمة جاهزة للعمل. نقوم بتقييم
मैंने अभी तक रोल रेट तय नहीं किया है। जब मेरा 
Il sole è di nuovo ben visibile... questo dovrebbe essere l'angolo di imbardata corre
ठीक है, अब मुझे वे सभी अलग-अलग कण दिखने लगे हैं, वे 
안
रॉजर, 11. आपने अच्छी तरह से जानकारी दी। यह 12 घंटे के लिए निर्धारित ब्लॉक डेटा था। हम यहाँ उड़ान योजना अपडेट के माध्यम से आपको कुछ बातों की याद दिलाना चाहते हैं, जिन्हें आप अपनी सुविधानुसार कर सकते हैं और चाहें तो जल्दी सो सकते हैं। हमारे पास और कोई योजना नहीं है, लेकिन हम आपको फ़िल्टर बदलने और ऑक्सीजन ईंधन सेल को साफ़ करने
لحسن الحظ، تمكنت من الحصول على القليل من كل شيء. أعني، ه
우정 7입니다. 맞습니다. 지금은 통제권을 쥐고 있는 것 같습니다. 하지만 오른쪽으로 
没错。好的。下一个。模式 - 当姿态稳定后，选择“模式控制自动”。按下此键监控速率；当速率小于每秒 0.1 度时，调整所有轴的速率，然后禁用 
D'accord. Quan
And we're showing about 10 minutes and 30 seconds to. I would like to remind you to enable the BD
In questo momento, che ovviamente è appena prima del tramonto, stiamo osservando una serie di particelle bianche. Si vedono nel cielo azzurro. Ho l'orizzonte quasi in v
Сейчас в левом углу Луны я едва могу различить подножия формации Фра Мауро. Нам так и не удалось увидеть её, когда мы были там на близк
D'accord. J
Ok, Vance, volevo mostr
क्या आपको ईंधन और ΔV की स्थिति समझ में आ गई है? क्या एड ने आपको सब कुछ समझाया ह
알겠습니다. 파워 앰프를 끄고, 음성 백업을 낮추고, PCM 비트 전송률을 LO로 설정하고, 11번 핀의 데이터 
मैंने आपका संदेश पढ़ लि
Andare avan
I'm taking some general - normal lens on the 16-mm photographs of the water and
分かりました。あ
阿波
, Canary
Хорошо. Панель 8: SEQ PYRO ARM, два, в Б
Теперь у нас есть достоверные данные об артериальном давлении. Нам бы хотелось получит
로
これは現在 144
Роджер. Да. Я так п
Ro
私の窓は日光が差し
Okay. In Zeile 14, unter HEIZSYSTEM A/B-1: QUAD 1 bis 4 öffnen; darunter die einzige Änderung: Unter GLYKOLPUMPE AUTO TRANSFER schließen; unter COMM die einzige Änderung: VHF-A-EMPFÄNGER und COMMANDER AUD
Ciao Kano. Sono Sigma Seven. State arrivando e
बहुत बढ़िया। ठीक है, मुझे ईंधन की स्थिति देखकर खुशी हो रही है। मेरे हि
알겠습니
حسنًا. أولًا، عليك عكس عملية شحن البطارية. للقيام بذ
조명(LIGHTING) 항목 아래; 투광 조명(FLOOD), 열림; 트랙(TRACK), 열림. ED 로직 - 수정(ED LOGIC - Correction) 항목 아래, ED: 로직(LED: LOGIC), 열림. 하강 엔진 오버라이드(DESCENT ENGINE OVERRIDE), 열림. 슈트 흐름 제어(SUIT FLOW CONTROL) 항목 아래, 열림. 3번째 줄, 통신(COMM): 디스플레이(DISPLAY), 열림; VHF A 송신기(V
Roger. De 
Bald geht es hier um Schmidt, nicht w
い
그렇게 
好吧，上
Хьюстон, Игл. Вы удовлетворены результатами са
Sì. Non riusciamo a farlo scendere troppo stretto. Abbiamo provato a passare alla traccia AUTO o REACQ, e l'imbardata passa da 270° a 0°. E il beccheggio passa da circa 6° a 90°. Ci sto provando... ora lo stiamo montando manualmente agli angoli che ci hai indicato, e pr
D'accord. Sur le panneau 5, les bornes CB POWER-1 MAIN B et 2 MAIN B s
켄, 저도 그렇게 생각합니다. 이 띠는 M선과 평행한데, 외부에서 광학 장치로 들어오는 직사각형 입구, 즉 광학 장치 설계와 관련이 있는 것 같습니다. 이 특정 태양 각도에서는 띠가 정확히 가로지릅니다. 지구와 태양 모두 스캐닝 망원경에 이런 현상을 일으킨다는 것을 알게 되었습니다. 육분의에서도 같은 빛 띠가 나타나는데, 육분의 시야 전체를 가리지만 확대율 덕분에 별이 아주 잘 보이고 표시도 가능합니다. 하지만 스캐닝 망원경으로는 별을 식별하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 제가 발견한 광학 장치의 최적 관측 자세는 스캐닝 망원경으로 큰개자리와 오리온자리를 볼 수 있는 자세입니다. 지금처럼 우주선이 특정 각도에 있을 때는 띠가 사라지고 태양이 우리 뒤에 있어서 별을 꽤 많이 볼 수 있습니다. 어제는 어둠에 적응하고 나니 처음에는 보이지 않던 카시
Smyth Sea doesn't look much like a sea. I
D'accord. Parce que je cherchais au mauvais endroit la dernière fois. AUTO Optics ne m'indiquait pas les coordonn
好的，杰克。我看看我有没有记下来。我们先像中途飞行时那样把目标指向地球，然
روجر. وضع التحكم الخاص بي الآن يا ديكي هو الوضع اليدوي؛ الجير
Роджер. Я вас прекрасно понял. Похоже, у на
알아요, 알아요 — 295. A 온도 — 87. A 압력 — 3000. B 온도 — 82. B 압력 — 2650. 주 전류계 — 19. 2번 — 19.5. 1A — 4.5. 1B — 4.5. 1C — 4. 2A — 5. 2B — 4 3/4. 2C — 4 3/4. 직류 전압 23.5V. S1 — 29. S2 
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। हमारे पिछले वीडियो को एक घंटे से ज़्
The..
मैंने सारी लाइटें बंद कर दी हैं और अंतरिक्ष यान में सब कु
Okay, Houston. The water boiler has been reserviced, back pressure valv
Okay. Quando
罗杰。杰克负责抄写，我负
Houston, Acqu
Columbia, Houston. Nous vous apportons vot
सब कुछ
Then after getting stabilized, we checked out our whole Thrust Control System and found that we had no yaw or roll control - or we had no yaw control of the yaw thrusters since ou
Vai avanti
我们
알겠습니다. 메인 버스 전압을 확인한 후, 메인 버스와 배터리 버스를 연결하여 메인 버스와 배
والمؤشرات ا
That's affirmative, Jim. After you get oriented in the attitude you want to burn in, do an aline which is - an body-axis aline wh
Хорошо. И верхний ряд указан верно. Во втором ряду нам нужно, чтобы были закрыты QUAD TCA с 1 по 4. В третьем ряду нам нужно, чтобы был закрыт ATCA (PGNS). В четвертом ряду нам нужно,
わか
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, यह
11, Хьюстон. Мы видим, что здесь все довольно хорошо налажено, и будем держать вас в курсе событий. А теперь слово за комментатором Б
जेरी, तुम मुझे कभी-कभार फोन कर देना, बस यह बताने के लिए कि तुम अभी भी यहीं हो, जब हम एंटेना बदल रहे हों, या कुछ 
我们得查
제가 방금 말씀드
Et l'unité de mesure de la température mécanique de l'arbre semble indiquer une température d'environ 4/100 en dessous de zéro, ce qui correspondrait à environ 
Roger. Der Dr
Минус 0,7, 
Да, Скотт. Я чувствую себя хорошо. Уверен, мы справимся с этим контуром скафандра. Температура купола держится. Сейчас около 81 градуса. Я вн
好的。我只是想让你们注意这一点，思考一下它可能对飞行计划产生的影响。我会把这个广角镜头和关于月亮的说明再放一遍，看看你们觉得哪些部分最合适。好的。在卷轴上，弗兰克想让我们确认他预期看到的进入剖面图的顺序。第一个出现的剖面图标记为“Nonexit Number 2”，这是短程高速进入剖面图。第二个出现的剖面图标题为“3500 Mile”，也是高速进入剖面图，但如果我们需要进行更远距离的进入，则会使用这个剖面图。然后第三个剖面图是“Nonexit Entry Number 1”，之后是第四个3500 Mile剖面图。所以你们有四个进入剖面图。编号1和3是短程剖
ठीक है। बिल्कुल सही। ये जिम लवेल हैं। आज हम आपको अपोलो 8 के अंदर के जीवन के बारे में थोड़ा सा दिखाना चाहते थे। हमने आपको चंद्रमा के दृश्य दिखाए, पृथ्वी के दृश्य दिखाए, और अब हम आपको अपने घर में आमंत्रित करना चाहते हैं। जैसा कि आप इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर देख सकते हैं, यह कम से कम चार दिनों से हमारा घर है। हम इंस्ट्रूमेंट पैनल पर हर दिन को चिह्नित करते हैं। चार दिन पूरे हो चुके हैं, और हम पाँचवें दिन पर काम कर रहे हैं। बेशक, हम सभी शुक्रवार को लैंडिंग का बेसब्री से इंतजार कर रहे हैं। अंतरिक्ष यान के इस हिस्से में, जिसे हम लोअर इक्विपमेंट बे कहते हैं, राष्ट्रपति के शारीरिक फिटनेस सलाहकार, कैप्टन जिम लवेल, एक व्यायाम कार्यक्रम शुरू करने वाले हैं जो हम हर दिन करते हैं। आप देख सकते हैं कि वे बहुत आराम से इधर-उधर घ
11, Houston. Dès que vous ave
हम पानी के उपयोग के पैटर्न का बारीकी से विश्लेषण कर रहे हैं, औ
Roger, in attesa. Cal sta uscendo
बीस से थोड़ा अ
अ
هيوستن، هذه أبولو 8. سننهي برنامجنا لهذه الرحلة ونبدأ الاستعدادات للرحلة 2، إذ
Dies ist Sigma Seven, nur VOX-Aufnahme. Ich habe den Automatikmodus auf Normalbetrieb ohne Hochgeschwindigkeitsantrieb wiederhergestellt. Aktuell liegt der Automatikmodus bei 85 Prozent, der manuelle Modus bei 90 Prozent. Jetzt, wo ich eingeschaltet bin, kann ich einige Experimente durchführen, die vorher nicht möglich waren. Ich werde die Kapsel nun im Fly-by-Wire-Modus auf niedrige Flughöhe bringen. Zuerst überprüfe ich, ob mich niemand von hier unten über meine Notfunkbaken erreichen kann. Falls jemand in Südameri
औ
التقطتُ صورةً لدعامة Y الإضافية من قرب مرحلة الهبوط، وأعتقد أننا سنتمكن من رؤية التأثيرات الحرارية بشكل أفضل
Okay, ich verstehe. Gleich wird die Wasserwarnleuchte aufleuchten, die werde ich dann zurücksetzen
فان
حسناً. أنا هن
その飛行機外はレーダーでは
了
D'accord. Continuon
ああ、昔のホワイトチームは目がキラキラしてて、尻尾
हमें लगता है कि हमें इसका इस्तेमाल करना होगा। इस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन में पिच और रोल में लाभ बहुत अच्छे नहीं हैं। यह यॉ में तो इसे स्थ
Ok. Sono rotolato via e ora sto rotolando verso destra. Sotto la mia influenza. Ecco che arriva... sembra un guanto termico
罗杰。2 机动，/: 46728，减 0
休斯顿，阿波罗8号。收到。主蒸发
Gemelli
让
Okay. Stavo per dire che non lo faccio. Difficilmente portiamo con noi un modulo di serviz
11، هيوستن. هل ترى أي أنظمة جوية سائدة من حيث نوع الجبهات أو أي تراكم لأنواع العواصف الاستوائية؟ انته
Transmit
とても良いですね
Okay. Knapp unter 13. Nur zur Info: Wir haben Leute, die an verschiedenen Themen arbeiten. Wir arbeiten an der bevorstehenden Mittellinie, um unser Steuerungssystem festzulegen und die Ausrichtung zu opti
로저. 점화 접근 경로에 진입하고 있습니다. 점화 13분 전과 같은 시점이고, 현재 동경 83도 정도 되는 것 같습니다. 지
Jac
Yuri Alekseyevich, I want to remind you that after last minute of readiness will be 6 minutes delay before actual flight. Don't worry ple
Роджер, Нил и Базз. Давайте продолжим доставать магазин 
По
Р
Apollo 11, Houston. Pouvez-vous confirmer que le filtre à CO2 a été changé conformément au plan de vol au cours de la der
Abbiamo ricevuto la conferma della p
Roger. J'aim
로저, 방
روجر، هل فهمت؟ ٤٨ بالمئة. لن يكون هناك تصريح
We got a
Je vais utiliser la commande de taux
रॉजर,,,, 
يقرأ Auto 
Gemelli 4, qui Houston CAP COM. Non ti leggo. Leggerò 11-BRAVO ancora una volta alla cieca. 183. 3+57. 07 08 55. 9+30. Angolo di inclinazione inverso no
Negative RKV, Gemini 4. All I got w
D'accord. Voilà pour les projecteurs du panneau 8. Maintenant, on va régler le rhéostat des projec
Lasciatemi dire che è stata una rivoluzione frenet
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We'll have our answer for you on the 
罗杰。你之前评论四联装Bravo导弹分离问题时，语气有点软弱。你能再
이거 언제까지 받아야 해요? 좋아
Bene. Collegare i cavi ombelicali. Fase 2, POWER 1 AC e 2 AC, chiusi, interruttori automatici. Fase 3, pannello 5: SENSORE SEGNALE, MAIN B, chiuso. Fase 4, pannello... chiuso. Quindi MAIN B BAT BUS B, chiuso. Verificare la tensione del MAIN BUS, quindi commutare l'alimentazione su. Fase 7: CB MAIN B BAT BUS B, aperto. E sul pannello 250, INGRESSO ALIMENTAZIONE BAT e POSTLANDING, aperti. Verificare la
Non credo che ci sia alcun posto, tranne qui, in cui si dice qualcosa riguardo ai filmati da 16 m
Mein 
Roger, Bill. La prossima volta che ci siamo rimessi al sole, non prevediamo alcun problema con l'evaporat
11, Houston. Zu Ihrem Sauerstoffdurchfluss, Brennstoffzelle 3: Anscheinend war der Durchfluss während der Spülung etw
어디 보자. 미주리주 스프링필드에서, 1941년 월드시리즈에서 브루클린 다저스의 전설적인 포수이자, 삼진을 잡아내 뉴욕 양키스의 승리를 확정지은 미키 오웬은 스포츠 기록 이상의 것으로 기억되기를 바랐습니다. 그는 45명의 소년 소녀들에게 조랑말을 선물했습니다. 아이들은 그에게 조랑말을 어떻게 돌볼 것인지 편지를 보내달라는 요청을 받았습니다. 편지가 쏟아지자, 그는 이미 제공했던 20마리에 5마리를 더 추가했고, 다른 기부자들도 20마리를 더 보태주었습니다. 미키 오웬은 "45통 정도 받을 줄 알았는데, 900통이나 받았어요."라고 말했습니다. 이제 특집 기사입니다. 뉴질랜드 웰링턴에서는 오늘 남극에서 약 50명의 남성들이 전통적인 칠면조와 크랜베리 ​​소스를 곁들인 식사를 즐겼는데, 이날 크리스마스는 동양적인 분위기도 감돌았습니다. 여기에는 남극 대륙을 횡단하다 미 해군 극지 기지에 하루 동안 정박한 일본인 일행이 직접 요리한 스키야키가 포함되어 있었습니다. 캘리포니아주 샌디에이고에서는 나포된 첩보선 푸에블로호의 승무원들이 첫 급여를 샌디에이고 발보아 해군 병원 직원들에게 기부했습니다. 그들은 모두 20달러씩 받았는데, 샌디에이고에 도착했을 때 자신들을 따뜻하게 맞아준 사람들에게
Jim, das wurde im Simulator von Charlie und anderen getestet. Sie empfehlen, die Kursänderungen an den Fehleranzeigen auf Null zu stellen, bis sich nich
Apollo 8, Houston. Los. Ich empfange dich sch
... لكنك تقع بين جهاز السدس الخاص بي وجهاز قيا
알겠습니다, 빌. 그렇게 되기를 바랍니다. 당분간 안정적인 온도가 유지될 것으로 예상되며, 끓을 만큼 
好的。放不进右侧食物箱的垃圾
Ok. Lasciate che vi dia le mie osservazioni sul bus principale B. Lì le cose sono successe piuttosto velocemente, e per prima cosa abbiamo sentito l'impatto o l'esplosione o qualunque cosa l'abbia causata, non ne sono sicuro. Il secondo dopo, circa 1 secondo, c'è stato un ALLARME PRINCIPALE, che era la SOTTOTENSIONE del BUS PRINCIPALE B. Ho controllato la tensione, ed era buona in quel momento, quindi sospetto che si sia trattato di un picco. Anche la cella a combustibile 3 era buona, con un buon flusso. Tuttavia, Fred, a quel punto, stava entrando nel modulo di comando e si è seduto al suo posto. In quel momento, abbiamo visto per un breve periodo la spia del BUS AC 2, più o meno mentre si sedeva al suo posto. Ha guardato il BUS PRINCIPALE B e il BUS PRINCIPALE B segnav
Base Tranquility, ici Houston, Roger. Bien reçu. Début de la préparation. Pause. Pause. Columbia, Columbia, ici Houston. Je v
读数需要
了解。バズ、ロール角度をもう一度言って。了解。029
로저. 출발합니다. 모든 시스템 정상 작동합니다. 자동 모드이고, 기동 기능은 꺼져 있습니다. TR-10 바이패스도 정상입니다. 연료와 산소 모두 정상입니다. 모든 게 정상입니다. 저는 지금 뚱뚱합니다. 시간 확인 
Roger. Copy the bu
ठीक है। लाइन 1, पैनल 1
好的，很好。我现在仍然处于线控低速待机切换状态，
水瓶座，我们需要高比
前进吧
لا، هذه أبو
О, наверное, вариант "вверх" 
और
Sounds like a good idea; le
알았어, 잭. 오디세이에 대해 질문 하나만 더 
好吧，我会按我自己的理解来读，而不
Dites-moi, avez-vous quelque chose à me transmettre avant que nous vous diffusions en direct à la télévi
حسنًا. تخطى الخطوة 1، ونريد إيقاف تشغيل العاكس 2 AC 2؛ وتخطى الخطوة 1، ونريد إع
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿，你们的第一次机动动作需要增加一项。完
そして、私たちはまだ...バッテリーさえも理解していませ
Ok, A
Base Tranquility, Houston. Se vuoi, posso darti un suggerimento sulla durata della missione, ogni 30 minut
يا فريد، يتزايد مستوى ثاني 
日没。備考：B-1は-1です。あと4つの時間があります。地平線
I've got quite a bit of information to pass up to you, Jim. First of all 
최근 우리가 보고 있는 달의 모습은 정말 장관입니다. 창문의 4분의 3을 달이 가득 채우고 있고, 물론 달의 전체 둘레를 볼
Non. Dès que le signal a disparu, il a dérivé vers ces angles et y est resté. Puis, lorsqu'il est revenu, il a cherché un moment, mais sans s'éloigner davantage. Il s'est progressivement recentré sur les angles où il se 
최근 작전에 대한 약간의 업데이트가 있습니다. 복사할 
Ok, torniamo a pagina 18. Continueremo così a 30 secondi, 10 secondi, 7 secondi, meno 5 secondi. A "accensione", ne
रॉजर। और मुझे कुछ और बातें पता हैं, माइक। हमें इस समय बैटरी बी का चार्ज बंद करना होगा, और साथ ही, छिटपुट गरज-चमक के कारण हमारे लक्षित लैंडिंग पॉइंट पर मौसम बहुत खराब है। हम 
Роджер. Имейте в виду, что сейчас из моего окна открывается хороший вид на Гавайские острова. Примерно через 30 секунд я буду пролетать над ними. Облака местами разо
両方ともわかり
ठीक है। समझ गया, फ्रेड। बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद; 38.9 और 1.9। और वह बस बैटरी में वापस डाले जा रहे एम्पियर की मात्रा को सत्यापित करने के लिए यथासंभव
我认为目前还有两件事尚未解决，一是如何处理“”，
Pourriez-vous nous communiquer vos relevés av
Хорошо. Выключите свой кислородный наг
في المرة الأولى - في المرة الثانية التي حاولت فيها استخدامه، حصلت على قياس جيد جدًا في المرة التالية... باس
믿으셔도 좋습니다. 그 오래된 서비스 모듈은 우리에게 정말 큰 도움이 되었으니
Roger, deine Verbindung ist schwach und unregelmäßig. Kannst du uns 
E se - se ora puoi andare nel tuo periodo di alimentazion
تأكد من أن تتصل بي قواتك إذا اقترب
阿波罗8号，阿波罗8号，出发
حسنًا. على جانب المنزل، في اللوحة رقم 16، يوجد مفتاحان لتغذية البطاريات (CB BAT FEED TIES)، مفتوحان؛ البطارية 1، جهد عالٍ، إيقاف/إعادة ضبط؛ البطارية 2، جهد منخفض، إيقاف/إعادة ضبط ثم تشغيل؛ البطارية 2، جهد عالٍ، إيقاف/إعادة ضبط ثم تشغيل؛ البطارية 1، جهد عالٍ، تشغيل. اللوحة رقم 16، مفتاحان لتغذية البطار
Хорошо, Водолей. Следующий шаг — возьмите внутренний пакет, который вы разрезали, и наденьте его на верхнюю часть баллона. При этом расположите его так, чтобы «уш
네
ठीक है। मैं इन्वर्टर 1 की जाँच करने जा रहा हूँ। इन्वर्टर 2 ठीक है; और इन्वर्टर 1 भी ठीक
Have a pencil?
就在这个区域，有两个陨石坑。一个就在我眼前，从航天器上向大约11点钟方向望去，大约30到35英尺远……那里有
最後の数字をもう一
حسنًا يا فريد، انتظر. كنا نتحدث عن إمكانية إجراء العملية لك في مركز جراحة القلب المفتوح. نوصي حاليًا بإج
أجل، أعتقد ذلك. بعد دقيقة، ستسمعون صوت م
11, Houston. Non ci sembra che riuscirete a raggiungere questa posizione di osservazione in 2 
D'accord, Jack. J'ai la procédure sous les yeux. Elle comporte environ 18 étapes, et sa longueur s'explique par le fait que nous partons de la configuration de base que nous vous avons fournie précédemment. Elle concerne la charge de la batterie A, bien sûr, qui est notre batterie faible. Lorsque v
はい。イベント後、イベントタイマ
Ich habe einige Bilder der Boosterstufe, vielleicht 17 oder 18, insgesamt. Dann geht es Richtung Horizont, von Norden nach Süden. Da ist 
روجر. الجو صافٍ لكن
로저. 당신 말 잘
Sarà interessante oggi, Jack. La Terra è molto più grande; la falce 
Yes. I agree, Jack. Jack Swigert and I went upstairs earlier and both got a canister, and we were scratching around for some material and thinking about using them, and that's actually why - when we made up all t
الفوهة الموجودة في منتصف الشاشة الآن هي فوهة جيمس ويب. كنا ننظر إليها مباشرةً من الأعلى قبل حوالي ست دقائق من بدء الهبوط. قاعها مسطح نسبيًا، ويمكنكم رؤية فوهتين أو ثلاث في قاعها على الجدار الغربي، وهو الجدار الأقرب إلى الكاميرا. قرب أسفل الشاشة، نرى فوهة صغيرة على الحافة الخارجية. وبالعودة إلى أسفل الشاشة نحو اليسار، نرى سلسلة من المنخفضات. هذا النوع من الفوهات المتصلة هو ما يثير اهتمامنا لمعرفة سبب وجودها بهذا الشكل. سأقوم الآن بتقريب الكاميرا لأريكم تفاصي
オーケー。3Gを検知しています。今回は再突入時のダンピングチェックをパスする必要があるようで
Roger. A, la
Okay. 
Pourriez-vous vérifier votre lecture de lacet par 
Ok
ねえ、コンピューターはまだ
يجب أن أبدأ 
Хорошо, спасибо. Что касается вашего вопроса о числе 8750, это число, которое используется в о
Houston, Apollo 1
J'essaie 
नहीं, शायद मैंने ध्यान दिया था, लगभग छठे या सातवें चक्कर के अंत में, मैंने काफी पानी पिया... और मुझे बेहतर महसूस होने लगा।
Bon, on… vous n'avez donné que 10 minutes pour l'échau
嗯，看起来是个适合出海的好日子。
罗杰，这里是双子座
Roger. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich habe jetzt eine recht gute Gyros-Besetzung, denke ich. Die Kontrolle auf der Nachtseite war in Ordnung, aber sie drifteten wieder ab, anscheinend sogar ziemlich schnell. Ich habe nochmal nachgeprüft, und sie scheinen sich jetzt wieder gut stabilisiert zu haben. Ich m
Ich sage Ihnen,
Roger, Mike. You can go ahead and arm your logi
Apollo 8, Houston. Kommunikatio
好的。看起来问题很大。我们注意到您把第二颗星移到了列表
ヒューストン、
ठीक है, बज़। पहली बात तो ये है कि हमें संकेत मिले हैं कि आपके लैंडिंग साइट ऑब्लिक सही जगह पर नहीं हैं। अगर आप जाँच करेंगे, तो हमें लगता है कि इंटरमीडिएट स्केल लैंडिंग साइट ऑब्लिक लूनर लैं
了解。気球は約100度の円弧を描いて振動しています。頻繁に視界から消えますが、今はほぼ垂直です。この状態で沿岸航路をマークしてください。どうやら…つまり、気球は上下に180度振動しているということです。オーバー
Сейчас я на высоте около 1500 футов. Основной парашют по-прежнему в хорошем состоянии. Скорость сн
백만 달
我听得很清楚。感觉很好，飞行也很顺利。我看到了地球，飞行继续
Jim, viele Leute arbeiten bereits an den Einreiseformalitäten und werden das auch weiterhin tun. Wir haben ein paar Ideen, die wir dir gerne vorstellen möchten, damit du darüber nachdenken kannst, falls du denkst, dass du sie bespr
D'accord. Avez-vous effectué l'
... أنت ت
Roger. Lösche die O2-Brennstoffzellenspülung
ठीक है। चलिए देखते हैं कि मैंने सब कुछ सही समझा है या नहीं। सबसे पहले, हमें CB 16 INVERTER 2 को बंद करना है, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2 को भी बंद करना है। फिर पैनल 14 पर, INVERTER 2 के चयन की पुष्टि करें। और CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 को भी बंद करें, दोनों ब्रेकर। फिर हमें RENDEZVOUS RADAR RELEASE हैंडल को खींचना है। पैनल 3 पर, हमें RENDEZVOUS RADAR को चालू करना है। सभी ज़िप कोड के साथ ENTER दबाएं, और रजिस्टर 1 और 2 में 28300 डालें। फिर GO बटन दबाएं। इसके बाद, हम 16 72 से मूवमेंट को मॉनिटर करेंगे। पार्क होने के बाद, CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 को खोलें, फिर ENTER दबाएं। और CB 16 INVERTER 2 को भी खोलें। अब, जब लैंप प्राप्त करने के लिए संरेखण का समय आता है, तो सीबी 16, इन्वर्टर 2 बंद, सीबी 11 एसी बस ए लैंप बंद, और सीबी 16 पर संरेखण पूरा होने के बाद, इन्वर्टर 2 खुला, स
Wir berechnen trotzdem 4,5
了解。こちらへ。BAT2が接続中です。マスターアラームとバッテリーランプが点灯しています
안녕하세요, 카나본, 
알겠습니다. 39.3과 1.20을 복사합니다. 그리고 짐, 알려드릴 정보가 하나 더 있습니다. 약 45분 후에 하강 탱크에 H2O 수량 경고등이 켜질 겁니다. 이는 예상되는 현상이며, 16%에서 발생합니다. 탱크를 완전히 비울 때까지 훈
يبدو أن التنقل سهل كما توقعنا. بل ربما يكون أسهل من المحاكاة التي أجريناها على الأرض عند سدس قوة الجاذبية الأرضية. في الواقع، لا توجد أي مشكلة في التجول. حسنًا. لم يُحدث مح
Roger. Vielen D
Хорошо
Да. Хорошо. Это на этих часа
この方向を向いていると、側面の窓から太陽が流れていくのが見えます。そしてもちろん、今、窓の一つからは地球が見えます。そして、私の窓のすぐ後ろには、もちろん太陽があります。太陽が私たちの星図を照らしているからです。この線は黄道面を表し、これらの線、つまり垂直線は、宇宙船が現在使用している基準系を表しています。私たちが月に近
알겠습니다. 3단계는 생략하고, 마지막 줄을 제외한 4단계를 수행하십시오. 회로 차단기 16, 인버터
コロンビア、こちらヒ
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, Cape
حسنًا يا جو. هناك شيء واحد لاحظته، وهو أن بعض الدوائر هناك الآن - النبض... - على الأقل عددها، قد انخفض بشكل ملحوظ، و... سيئ للغاية، ويبدو أن التهو
フレッド、DESCEN
네, 컴퓨터 요약 설명은
现在一切都
Roger. Nous sommes en phase de rentrée atmosp
罗杰。对于观测日冕，
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 자가 점검 및 상태 표시등에 대한 제 실수였습니다
我知道，我知道——295。A 温度——87。A 压力——3000。B 温度——82。B 压力——2650。主电流表——19。2 号——19.5。1A——4.5。1B——4.5。1C——4。2A——5。2B——4 3/4。2C——4 3/4。直流电压 23.5。S
روجر. حسناً يا برج الدلو، تابع كما هو
Si vous arrivez à convaincre les gens de déployer une de ces banderoles autour de la zone 
हम
Apollo 8, Houston. Trois positions de commutateur de communication. Premièrement, entrée auxiliaire bande S sur retour vocal descendant; mode normal bande S désactivé; entrées télémétrie à niveau élevé. Je répète: entrée auxiliaire bande S sur retour vocal descendant; mode 
Ich glaube, wir sind für Nummer 9 zuständig. Ungefähr um diese Uhrzeit ging
Non, il est possible que j'aie remarqué, ah oui, vers la fin du sixième ou septième passage, que j'ai bu pas mal d'ea
罗杰。你现在看到的地球，和我们透过左侧窗口看到的一样，大概是地球的一半多一点。我们看到的是东太平洋，在屏幕上半部分的北半部分，可以看到北美洲、阿拉斯加、美国、加拿大、墨西哥和中美洲。南美洲在晨昏线之外或阴影区
C'est exact, Eagle. Je vous 
ステーションからオーロラセブンを呼び出しています。もう一
Apollo 8, Houston. La qualité audio est excellente. À vo
Ach du lieber H
Компания Cape рекомендует повторно ввести данные вручн
オーロラ・セブン、こちらはIOSコムテック、HF
Ricevuto, Buzz. È un PAD di ingresso, MPL, che inizia con il rullo 05, 35 - correzione - 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, più 1102, meno 17203, 068,, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, NOME 69, tutte e quattro le linee sono NA. Riprendendo con D zero: 400 02 09. RET del blackout, 00 17 03 38 08 20. Stella del sestante, 02 0945 149. La stella di puntamento è Scorpii theta, cioè Scorpii theta. Su 315, a destra 35, vettore di salita su. E i commenti: Questa voce PAD non presuppone alcuna rotta intermedia 6. E per tua informazione, guardandola ora, in ba
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une de l'actualité mondiale. Seuls quatre pays, la Chine communiste, la Corée du Nord, le Nord-Vietnam et l'Albanie, n'ont pas encore informé leurs citoyens de votre vol et de votre alunissage. Un journaliste a même déclaré être à court de mots pour décrire votre succès. Ce soir, le président Nixon assistera au match des étoiles de baseball à Washington. Après le match, il se rendra dans la zone de récupération du Pacifique. Mercredi soir, il se rendra en hélicoptère de l'île Johnston au navire de transmissions de la Marine, l'Arlington. Jeudi matin, il reprendra l'hélicoptère pour rejoindre le Hornet à temps pour assister à votre amerrissage. Le président sera accompagné du secrétaire d'État Will
그리고 파노라마가 완성되었습
罗杰，宁静基地。从这里听起来真棒！你们做得
Можем ли мы сейчас немног
D'accord. Et nous voulons activer l'évaporateur principa
حسنًا. أريد 
Très bien. J'ai cherché un peu avant de trouver ça. Bon, je vais maintenir le tangage. Je maintiens le lacet. J'arrête le roulis. Et je suis désolé, je ne vois pas votre arrondi. Je vais commence
收到。这种测距序列是我们在语音备份模式下会遇到的现象；在这种模式下，测距和语音共
いつも気を配って…なあ、ハイグレードを監視している医療スタッフはいるか？ここでその場
रॉजर। मरून बगुल के साथ जारी। राष्ट्रपति निक्सन ने आपसे मिलने के लिए विमान में सवार होने से ठीक पहले सैन फ्रांसिस्को से फोन करके आपकी पत्नियों को चौंका दिया। वे सभी आपके टेलीविजन प्रसारण से बहुत प्रभावित हुईं। जेन और पैट ने यहां मिशन कंट्रोल से इसे देखा। कल रात केप से इंटेलसैट का प्रक्षेपण चौथी बार स्थगित कर दिया गया। बताया गया कि समस्या डेल्टा के दूसरे चरण में नाइट्रोजन रेगुलेटर की खराबी थ
روجر، فهمت، الأنظمة خضراء. ش
Bene. Vi darò un breve riassunto dei sistemi. Fondamentalmente, tutti i sistemi sono a posto. Per quanto riguarda la vostra traiettoria di ritorno, possiamo ancora raggiungere la linea del Pacifico centrale aspettando fino al tredicesimo. Dopo 138 secondi di accensione, siete sulla via del ritorno. Le con
わかりました、ジム。今、もう一つのキャニスターに切り替えるかどうかについては、数分後にまた連絡します。2点目ですが、まずはロールに集中して、それを軌道に乗せると、セットアップがうまくいくかもしれません。そして、
Voyons si je peux faire baisser cette pression en utilisant un débit d'oxygène élevé, si cela vo
Auro
Roger. Notice that you are starting on your which is the last scheduled activity. Initial tracking looks like the initial midcourse may be less than the 4 foot per second on the first guess. And we have looked at your burn data, and it's all just as smooth as you said; everything on there looked real nominal. Systems now look good; looks like in attitude, we should be able to switch OMNI's for you, if you wou
रॉजर, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन। रोल द
아폴로
Верно. Хорошо, давайте перевернём страницу 2-2 и вычеркн
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 이 자동 광학 기동(P23)이 
Roger. Ich glaube, wir müssen uns von dieser Sache distanzieren oder sie ganz hinter uns 
Okay. It is, but
Okay. We'll get started on the fuel cell purge 
نعم يا فرانك. نود منك الانتقال من متجه الحالة إلى متجه ا
D'accord. Étape 1; test 1: attendez 5 secondes. 5 secondes. Mode automati
飞
ठीक ह
रॉज
Roger. Je viens de mettre l'IGS sous tension et les ordinateurs en 
Bien reçu. Nous 
और यह - यह कुछ हद तक बदलता रहता है - 865 नहीं, बल्कि 830 होता
뭔가 우리가 잊어버린
रॉजर। आपने हमें पहले बताया था कि रात के लिए एओएस शुरू होने का समय 18:20
E
Dès que vous serez prêt(e), nous vous enverrons une mise à jour de l
Аполлон-1
如
제 생각에 이 암석 지대는 우리가 최종 하강 시에 지나쳤던 크고 날카로운 모서리를 가진 암석 테두리 분화구에서 유래했을 가능성이 있습니다. 어제 제가 그 분화구가 축구장 크기 정도라고 말씀드렸는데, 솔직히 말해서 실제로 측정하기는 조금 어려웠습니다. 하지만 우리가 지나갈 때 아스트로돔 안에 들어갈 수 있을 것 같다고 생각했습니다. 그리고 이 암석 테두리 분화구 주변의 암석들은 이 지역의 암석들보다 훨씬 큽니다. 어떤 것은 3미터 정도 되고, 어쩌면 더 클 수도 있습니다. 이런 암석들은 분화구 가장자리에서 분화구 지름만큼 떨어진 곳까지 매우 빽빽하게 분포되어 있습
네. 잠시 동안 연결이 끊겼습니다... 양쪽 안테나 모두에서
Роджер, каюта 7,5, а каюта примерно 10. Это 10 в каюте и
D'accord, 11. Houston. Roger. C'est bien ça. EECOMM attend avec impatience son grand moment pour la vérification de la séquence logique, dès que vous ser
D'accord, Odyssey; H
रॉजर, अपोलो 8। अब आवाज़ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है। क्या आप कॉपी क
Bene. 10, /: 45597, meno 040, più 157, più 35186, meno 01512, meno 00520 180 007 000, November Alfa, più 00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253; Scorpii Delta, giù 069, sinistra 45, più 0748, meno 16500 12994 36300; stella primaria Sirio, secondaria Rigel, 129 155 010; quattro quadranti, 15 secondi, ullage; orizzonte sulla linea della f
收到。双子座8号，我们有医疗更新要告知您。第一，在逆向点火前后都要喝水。第二，服用一片美拉嗪片。逆向
지금 보시는 것이 바로 오디세이호 기수 부분에 있는 탐사 장비입니다. 상당히 무거운 장비이지만, 무중력 상태에서는
حسنًا. شكرًا لك. وإذا تذكرت، عندما يحين الوقت، عندما لا 
네. 제가 거꾸로 서 있었네요. 이
Это Роджер. Следующий шаг, шаг 4: «УПРАВЛЕНИЕ ПОЗИ
... 마치 황도광과 비슷하죠. 계속해서 더 멀리 뻗어나가잖아요. 이
로저, 휴스턴. 플러스 4. 무게는 동일하게 유지, 마이너스 164 플러스 
उड़ान के शुरुआती दौर में बूस्टर के बारे में जो जानकारी मैं दे रहा था, उसे जारी रखते हुए। अंधेरा छाने के बाद, लगभग 1200 फीट की दूरी पर, मैंने बूस्टर के साथ अपनी दूरी का अनुमान लगाने की कोशिश की, लेकिन उस समय बूस्टर से अपनी दूरी का अंदाज़ा लगाने के लिए मेरे पास केवल चमकती बत्तियों के बीच की दूरी ही थी। कभी-कभी - बल्कि लगातार - मुझे एक बत्ती, फिर दो बत्तियाँ, फिर एक बत्ती दिखाई देती थी, और कभी-कभी दो बत्तियाँ दिखने में काफी समय लग जाता था - जिससे पता चलता था कि बूस्टर लगातार घूम रहा था। मुझे वास्तव में यह बिल्कुल भी नहीं पता था कि वह किस दिशा में जा रहा है। बत्तियों के बीच की दूरी के आधार पर, जब मैं दोनों बत्तियाँ देख पाता था, तो मुझे लगता था कि कार्नार्वोन तक पहुँचने तक मैं बूस्टर के साथ अच्छी स्थिति में था। उस समय मुझे ऐसा लग रहा था कि मैं काफी तेज़ी से उसके करीब आ रहा हूँ, हालाँकि मैं इस बात को लेकर पूरी तरह से आश्वस्त नहीं था। उस समय तक मैंने जितना भी ΔV (विपरीत गति) जोड़ा था, वह बूस्टर की दिशा में, या प्रतिगामी (रेट्रोग्रेड) था। दुर्भाग्य से, वह बूस्टर ऐसी स्थिति में आ जाता था कि अगर मुझे उसके करीब जाना होता, तो मुझे उसके करीब जाने के लिए पोसीग्रेड बल लगाना पड़ता, जिसके 
Ready to copy
D'ac
Wir haben keinen... Diesen
没错。我们希望将我们获得
Хорошо, Джек. Продолжаем, всё в порядке, пока вы не дойдете до следующего шага — на следующей странице вы дойдёте до пункта «Проверьте индикатор расхода кислорода, увеличен
و يا فريد، ربما يكون هذا هو سبب تدهور جودة الاتصال قليلاً، وزيادة الضوضاء الخل
حسناً. كان اختبار الماسح الضوئي هو سبب الم
자, 물병자리 여러분, 시
Хорошо. В экстренных слу
روجر. ن
रॉजर। क्या आपके कंप्यूटर का स्विच ऑन पोजीशन में है, और एसी पावर स्विच एसीएमई पोजी
We see you exercising. Is that corre
好的。燃油方面，自动挡为 100%（百分比），手动挡为 95%（百分比）；氧气方面，主氧气为 62，副
B
حسنًا. وقت الإشعال هو 035:00، دلتا-في تي 7883، خط الطول ناقص 155، و400 كيلو أوم 069:
Roger. In Washington, the Senate Finance Committee has approved extension of the income tax surtax, but a Senate vote on the bill currently seemed remote. In Austin, State Representative Ray Lemmon of Houston has been nominated as the National Director of the American Society for Oceanography. Lemmon has proposed a study of the possibility of establishing an institute of oceanography in Texas. This would be the first such institute on the western Gulf of Mexico. In Minneapolis, Minnesota, the weather bureau, after recapping today's weather showing a high of
D'accord
알겠습니다. 첫 번째로 비행 계획을 보니 CDR은 이제 잠자리에 들어야 할 것 같습니다. 두 번째로, 연소 과정 요약입니다. 모든 시스템이 정상적으로 작동하는 것 같습니다. 궤적을 보니 69.67마일의 모드와 근일점 통과 시간으로 CPA가 설정되어 있습니다. 자유 귀환 경로도 양호합니다. 회랑 제어를 위한 궤적을 완전히 평가하기에는 아직 조금 이릅니다. 플러스 11 블록 데이터는 업데이트되지 않을 것입니다. 곡선을 살펴본 결과, 배터리 벤트 압력이 0.2~0.3볼트로 0인 것으로 보
거의 젖은 것처럼 보이
حسنًا. الآن، المشكلة الوحيدة هنا هي أنه من شبه المستحيل توجيه كاميرا التلفزيون؛ مجال الرؤية ضيق للغاية لدرجة أننا احتجنا إلى ثلاثة رجال وصبي لتوجيهها في الاتجاه الصحيح. حاولنا استخدام العلكة كأداة للتصويب، ولكن دعني أخبرك أن احتمالية غرسها في الأرض ضئيلة ج
7、テ
Finished connection checking. Do you read me? Position of switches on the panel is set to default. Globe in place, latitude north 63 °, longitude east 97°, correction number 710, division time is 9 hours 18 min. 07 sec.; moving index is set to default position — first day 7. Pressure in cabin is 1, humidity 65%, temperature 19 °C, pressure in compartment 1.2, pressure in hand-driven orientation system is 175, first automatic orientation 155, second automatic orientation 157, press
로저, 11. 중간 항로 수정의 크기는 참고용으로만 알려드린 것이며, 중간 항로 4는 초당 약 2.0피트 정도 하강했습니다. 다시 한번 알려드리자면, 챔버 압력에 대해 말씀드리자면, 귀하의 온보드 판독값 87psi는 저희 원격 측정값으로는 9
Okay. Lasciami - Prima di tutto, fammi vedere come stiamo andando qui. Sta scen
我们能
SLEW 모드로 남겨둘게요.
Roger, Houston. The Eagle is back in orbit, having left Tranquility Base and leaving behind a replica from our Apo
روجر. جيم، لاحظنا أنك قمت بتغيير وضع صما
좋아요. 여러분이 이 우편함을 어떤 재료로 만들 생각이었는지 말씀해 주시면, 잭과
g fühlt sich irgendwie angenehm 
Roger. I have an update to your Phase-Adjust Maneuve
Es sieht so aus, als ob wir ECM auf dem Boden haben werden und das Kabel auf Eds Schoß. Die Pistole wird wieder in der mittleren Verpflegungsbox verstaut sein, wo sie vorher war. Der Film kommt ebenfalls in die mittlere Verpflegungsbox. Die Kameraausrüstung kommt in 
حسنًا، أبولو 8. لقد راجعن
よく聞こえます。体調は良好で、飛行も順調です。地球が見え、飛行は継続しています。視界は良好で、すべてがはっきりと見えます。一部は雲に覆われていますが、飛行は継
好的。还有一点细节需要补充说明。正如我们之前所说，上升段单引擎推进器（SEP）的姿态是平面内的，而喷气推进器（JETT）的姿态将更接近于正常服务舱SEP的姿态，即向上，沿半径矢量向外偏转45度，偏离平面向南。我们建议在进行JETT之前，将顶部舱门关闭，通风阀打开，并在隧道加压的情况下进
R
حسنًا. استعد، أوقف تشغيل نظام الص
好的，没错。那么，总的来说，我们需要做的就是启动航天器，调出八号球，然后设置姿态，把导航控制放在前面的窗口里，当然，导航控制也得先接通。手动调整航天器的姿态，使地球中心位于Z轴正前方。然后绕Z轴旋转，使月牙的尖端位于Y轴上。这样，X轴的正
か
Gemini 4, Hawaii, stand by for an 8 minute mark to retr
Я его слышал. Я его слышал, когда мы наконец отключились от VOX — "Впустите его!" Ха
في ذلك الوقت، كان مؤشر الحدث يعمل بشكل جيد. يبدو أنني تمكنت من ضبطه بحيث يمكنني التقاط
Je vous recontacte après une pause d'environ 45 minutes. Nous avons remarqué que, concernant votre antenne à gain élevé, vous pourriez l'utiliser plus efficacement en passant de l'antenne OMNI à celle-ci lorsque l'angle de lacet est de 90 degrés et l'angle de tangage de -45 degrés. Nous constatons que vous restez 10 minutes de plus en mode OMNI, ce qui est normal; cependant, vous pourriez tirer davantage profit de l'
Nein. Das beko
Direkt
コ
Okay, Fred. Zunächst zu den Vorbereitungen, beginnend mit der Checkliste für Notfälle auf Seite 24. Wir empfehlen, dort zu beginnen, und freuen uns über Ihre Anmerkungen dazu. Zweitens: In der Brennposition sollte die Sonne ganz oben im Bild zu sehen sein. Sie teilt den Cursor, wenn dieser auf Null steht. Beachten Sie jedoch, dass die Brennposition leicht abrutschen kann, da sie sehr empfindlich auf Roll- und Gierbewegungen reagiert. Das gilt für die zweite Rastposition; die Brennpositio
わかりました。装備を下
D'accord. Procédez à la vérification du module de commande conformément à l'étape 4,
Roger. 5,000 scattered; winds northwest 10; wave height 3 feet; altimeter 2986; recovery forces call sign Naha RESCUE 1, GMT 02 58; Nahe SEARCH 1, GMT 03 44; USS Mason des
Nur z
了解、フレンドシップ・セブン。緊急エリア1デルタの逆シーケンス時間を
Hast du 
ठीक है। मैं आपको बस इतना बता देता हूँ - मुझे लगता है कि जो मेरे पास है उसे बताना आसान होगा। ठीक है, 11 नंबर की पहली पंक्ति में, हमारे पास चार AC BUS TIE ब्रेकर IN और AC BUS VOLTS ब्रेकर IN हैं, बस इतना ही। दूसरी पंक्ति में, हमारे पास चार TCA ब्रेकर IN हैं। FLIGHT DISPLAYS और COMMANDER के नीचे GASTA है। और इसी तरह AC BUS A के नीचे, हमारे पास एक GASTA और एक CO
ここは140度です。そして、上昇傾向はゆっくりとしています。コールドプ
- - يبدو أ
Right. I was having to actually manipulate the gain dogs on the hatch each time that I stroked it, so that I wasn't able to pull as hard as I usually had been able to. So we had to coordinate ourselves and where I would stroke do
Roge
好的
रॉजर। समझ गया, फ्रैंक; जब चाहो तब कर लो - बस हमें बता देना कि 
Richte das auf Neil oder auf jemanden, der im Licht steht. Ja, wir krieg
Columbia, Houston. Bei den Koordinaten ist uns ein Fehler unterlaufen. Bitte l
地平线再次出
रॉजर। हमें आपका मौखिक तापमान प्राप्त हो रहा है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप पूरे राज्यों मे
Roger. Wir möchten, dass Sie Batterie A nach 26 Stunden ab
D'accord, Jack. Sur le panneau 3, CHARGEUR DE BATTE
और, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हम चाहेंगे कि आप ऑक्सीजन फैन चालू रखें। इससे
Houston, Acqu
로저. 상황 보고입니다. 혈액 샘플을 보내드렸습니다. 모든 시스템은 정상 작동하지만, 우주복 회로에 문제가 있어 조심스럽게 점검 중입니다. 현재 후퇴 자세이며, 자이로스코프는 정상입니다. 기동은 해제된 상태입니다. 우주복 회로를 수리하고 있으며,
Très bien. Après une bonne
I 5,5 psid della cabina sembrano buoni. Le celle a combustibile sono bu
Roger, Mike. While we are waiting for the spacecraft
ठीक है। हमने दोनों तरीके आजमा लिए हैं। अगर सर्किट ब्रेकर रीसेट करते समय चालू रहता है, तो मुझे 902 04 40 मिलता है।
マスター
J
Roger. We'll pass
是的，弗雷德到手了。他好像拿着套索，准备把清单
Eh bien, on dirait que tu te
双子星4号，这里是休斯顿。我们
双子座4号，双子座4号，这里是休斯
Bene. Una cosa molto interessante: Jim ha la luce del giorno piena fuori dalla sua finestra, mentre io ho la notte piena fuori dalla mia. Stiamo gradualmente virando verso la parte anteriore, e sembra che il riflesso del sole su queste lucciole le faccia brillare molto intensamente. Era il tipo di stelle che abbiamo visto nel nostro primo l
Хорошо. Я н
И если Джон готов повторить какой-либо из этих маневр
А гамма-и
Apollo 8, Houston. Das ist bestätigt, Frank. Wir bereiten gerade die Erstellung eines löschbaren Datenabbilds vor. Wir beginnen jetzt mit den Vorbereitungen und melden un
We're plann
Sigma Seven, qui Muchea. Non ho le
Р
Es sieht so aus, als ob wir im abgeschalteten Zustand (unleserlich) immer noch knapp 11 Ampere ziehen. An Anschluss 1 liegen 10 Ampere an, an Anschluss 2 etwas weniger als 11. Die Position des Sicherungsseils bzw. der Kabelbefestigung an der Außenluke erschwerte jegliche Außenbordeinsätze aufgrund der Aerodynamik des freien Seils vor dem Raumschiff erheblich. Immer wenn ich in diesem Bereich arbeitete, schleuderte mich das Seil – sobald es sein Ende erreichte – zurück, und die Rückstoßkraft zog mich über das Raumschiff hinweg zurück zum Adapterbereich. Deshalb geriet ich bei meinen Manövern oberhalb der Fenster immer wieder außer Sichtweite und driftete dann zurück zum Heck des Raumschiffs. Ich musste mich ständig selbst ziehen, um wieder in den vorderen Teil des Raumschiffs zu gelangen. Mit den aufgenommenen Bildern war ich nicht zufrieden. Es war ziemlich schwierig, die ganzen Sicherungsleinen an Ort und Stelle zu halten… Ich hatte die Leine an der Waffe, die Verbindung mit dem Kabel und der Versorgungsleitung, und noch einige andere, die herumflatterten. Es war schwer, sie von der Kamera fernzuhalten. Auf den Bildern sieht man vielleicht, dass ich meine Arme schnell bewege. Ich habe ständig versucht, sie aus dem Weg zu räumen, um fotografieren zu können. Ich würde sagen, sie waren etwa 50 bis 60 Prozent der Zeit vor mir; die restliche Zeit w
コロンビア、こちらヒューストン。トランキリティ基地との視線通信捕捉は108プラス29。108プラス42
V
我现在感觉休息得很好，虽然我没怎么睡好。我吃了两顿饭。早餐是在我们完成舱外活动训练后，趁着艾德睡觉的时候吃的。然后我又吃了一顿，也就是B餐。第
收到。关于
Ich bin ein bissch
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 현재 상태가 상당히 불안정해 보입니다. 상태 벡터 정보를 다시 알려드리겠습니다. 현재 상태 벡터는 5시간 이상 추적한 결과를 바탕으로 산출되었습니다. 근일점에서 69.7마일(111km) 떨어진 지점에 있으며, 자유 복귀 궤도로 진입하는 비행 각도는 -14도입니다. 달과의 거리에서 정상적인 진입 각도로 돌아오
Il nocciolo della questione era che il VC aveva stipulato un cessate il fuoco prima della tregua che avevamo pianificato, come una sorta di tregua per le vacanze di 
ठीक है। ज़रा रुकिए। चलिए इसे देखत
우리는 전력을 전송하고 싶습니다. 먼저 여기서 높은 비트 전송률을 설정한 다음, 프레드에게 전력을 전송하고 싶습니다
Роджер. Из новостной ленты отдела по связям с общественностью: «Аполлон-11» по-прежнему доминирует в новостях по всему миру. Только четыре страны — коммунистический Китай, Северная Корея, Северный Вьетнам и Албания — еще не сообщили своим гражданам о вашем полете и высадке на Луну. Один журналист сказал, что у него закончились слова, чтобы описать ваш успех. Сегодня вечером президент Никсон планирует посмотреть бейсбольный матч всех звезд в Вашингтоне. После игры он отправится в район поиска и спасения в Тихом океане. В среду вечером он вылетит с острова Джонстон на вертолете на военно-морской корабль связи «Арлингтон». Затем в четверг утром он снова сядет в вертолет и полетит на «Хорнет» как раз вовремя, чтобы стать свидетелем вашего приводнения. Президента будут сопровождать государственный секретарь Уильям Роджерс и Фрэнк Борман. Они будут наблюдать за приводнением с мостика спасательного корабля вместе с адмиралом Джоном Сидни Маккейном-младшим, командующим Тихоокеанскими силами. После пребывания на борту «Хорнета» президент отправится в турне по Азии и запланированный визит в Румынию. Предполагается, что вчера «Луна-15» упала в Море Кризисов после 52 витков вокруг Луны. Советское информационное агентство ТАСС сообщило о проведении «научных» «исследований в окололунное пространство». Сэр Бернард Ловелл из обсерватории Джодрелл-Бэнк заявил, что «Луна-15» врезалась в поверхность Луны со скоростью около 300 миль в час. В последнее время во Вьетнаме относительно спокойно. Было замечено, что американские солдаты, патрулировавшие территорию, несли транзисторные радиоприемники, настроенные на ваш рейс. Радио- и телесеть Вооруженных сил Вьетнама обеспечила полное освещение миссии. Столкновения между египтянами и израильтянами вдоль Суэцкого канала продолжаются. Наблюдатели ООН пытаются остановить их. В Вашингтоне Комитет по бюджету и налогообложению Палаты представителей проголосовал за сокращение квоты на истощение запасов нефти с 27,5% до 20%. В районе Хьюстона несколько раз шли дожди. Сегодня облачно, ожидаются новые ливни. Что касается спорта, как мы уже упоминали, сегодня вечером состоится Матч всех звёзд. Вчера игр не было. Вчера вечером в Нью-Йорке Ассоциация бейсбольных журналистов Америки назвала Бейба Рута величайшим бейсболистом всех времён. Джо Димаджио был назван величайшим из ныне живущих бейсболистов. Фрэнк Борман сделал эти объявления на ужине в честь игроков. Джо Намат провёл полный день в тренировочном лагере «Нью-Йорк Джетс». Пяти полицейским с трудом удалось сдержать около 500 детей, которые хотели потрогать «Бродвейского Джо». Он сказал, что чувствует себя хорошо и сыграет в Матче всех звёзд 1 августа, если тренер Виб Юбэнк позволит ему. Тренировочный лагерь «Ойлерз» в Керрвилле вчера промок, но тренировки продолжались. Были незначительные травмы, но ничего слишком серьёзного. Тренер Уолли Лемм пока доволен тренировками. «Ойлерз» ожидают более 30 000 зрителей на предсезонном матче с «Баффало». По всей в
سأراقب الوضع
安全にドッキング解除できると感じられる速度まで減速した後、私たちはドッキング解除し、秒速数フィートの速度でアジェナからできるだけ早く離れようとしました。推進剤の量が50%から
जेमिनी VI, ये... तुम रडार पर हो
哦，约翰，别这样，昨晚一定很漫长吧。如果我是你，我会想
That's affirmed. Okay, and then the wil
LiOH 교체는 약 30분 정도 보류하겠습니다. PCO2 수치가 낮고, CDR을 깨우고 싶지 않거든요. CDR은 그의 발 바로 옆에 있습
Хорошо. Фрэнк, наша процедура заключается в выборе платформы и выполнении выравнивания. После этого мы вышлем вам файл, и вы сможете выбрать нужные параметры. Затем вы снова сможете
ह्यूस्टन, अपोलो 11। अगर आपको यह पसंद है, तो हम इसे
حسناً، فهمت ذلك. هل تترك الهوائي عالي الكسب قيد ال
Roger. Mike, tu es en mode cinq par cinq. Nous souhaiterions la configuration OMNI 
ठीक है। ठीक है। मैं थ्रॉटल 
这里是休斯
मुख्य बैटरियां - हमने उनकी जांच की। वे ठीक निक
휴스턴, 컬럼비아는 OMNI C 모드입니다. 찰리, 음성 백
收到。请问您的编码器是否已开
- - i
Sì. E sembra che stiamo per inquadrare il Sole nell'obiettivo, quindi dovremo spostare l
فريندشيب سفن، هذا جراح زنجبار. ضغط الدم الانقباضي ١٣٦ بعد التمرين، وهو معدل جيد، وينخفض ​​الآن إلى أقل من ٩٠ للانبساطي. كلا الرسمين البيانيين بجودة ممتازة. تخطيط القلب الكهربائي ممت
嗯，等我们从这件事中走出来的时候，你会发现更悲伤
로저. 휴스턴에
أبولو 8، هيوستن. لقد أخطأنا في تر
1 34 37 ist die
Roger, 11. Neil, deine Verbindung ist etwas schwach. Deine Signale sind zwar laut, aber ab und zu unterbrochen. Vom Boden aus sieht dein Raumschiff einwandfrei aus. Wir haben bemerkt, dass du dich im Cockp
わかりました、ヴァ
需要注意的是，电流表读数为 12 安培，与广告宣传的一致——显然，有人在驾驶室氧传感器上做了 
좋습니다. 다
Wir emp
단안경으로 안정적인 시야를 확보하는 가장 좋은 방법은 단안경을 안정적으로 잡고 눈앞에 위치했을 때 접히도록 한 다음, 몸이 단안경 옆으로 살짝 떠 있는 것처럼 움직여서 전혀 닿지 않도록
了
了解。アジェナはレティクルの中央にいます。姿勢制御、パルス
هذه مركبة فريندشيب 7. نظام الإطلاق العكسي التلقائي مُعطّل. مُحدد الوضع طبيعي، وأمر التحكم في السرعة، والجيروسكوب طبيعيان. جميع مقابض "T" في وضعها الصحيح باستثناء الوضع اليدوي، وهو مُعطّل. أتحكم يدويًا حاليًا. مفتاح حقيبة الهبوط مُعطّل. لوحة التسلسل طبيعية تمامًا باستثناء ذلك. نسبة الوقود المُتحكم به تتراوح بي
माइक, आपको थोड़ा अंदाज़ा देने के लिए, मैं खाड़ी के दक्षिण-पश्चिमी तट और ह्यूस्टन के संभावित स्थान को देख सकता हूँ, साथ ही मिसिसिपी नदी के मुहाने को भी। मैं बाजा कैलिफ़ोर्निया और उस विशेष क्षेत्र को भी देख सकता हूँ। मैं अपने जहाज पर मौजू
好的，就在我们现在看到的入口检查底部，最下面一行显示“
S
Roger, Fred. Vorrei confermarvi che state ricevendo acqua potabile dal modulo di comando e, se potete fare una stima di quanta ne usate nel tempo e quanta ne avete 
わかりました。通常の音声はハッキングできないようです。クライオタンクでは、特に酸素においてかなりの分層崩壊が発生しています。ファンサイクルや「」の時にもこの現象に気付くと思いますので、確認します。また、開始前に酸素をよくかき混ぜるよう再度お知らせします。順調に進んでいます。G&Cによると、燃料量は良好のようです。あなたとアライメントの予測通りの量を消費しています。月周回軌道では、クワッドごとに30%使用できるとお伝えします。これはかなりの量の燃料ですが、30%を残りの燃料から差し
Okay. Das klingt gut. Während Sie darauf
ああ、ごめんなさい。ところで、フレッ
Ok, al passo numero - o pagina 2, dovremmo eseguire il passo 5 e modificare la seconda riga del passo 6 per leggere INVERTER 2, quindi INVERTER 1, fino all'ultima riga del 
Хорошо. В принципе, это правильно. Позвольте мне немного пошагово объяснить, а потом я зачитаю вам этапы. Думаю, так будет понятнее. Схема такова: вы можете направить свой телескоп на заданный набор углов, которые направят вашу оптику на Луну. Теперь, в любой момент, в любом положении, если вы можете посмотреть в телескоп и распозна
स
Es ist nicht zeitkritisch, Fred, aber wenn die Leute jetzt wach sind, könntest du es schon mal machen. Übrigens, du weißt das wahrscheinlich schon, aber die nächs
Bene, oggi dovremo farlo al chiuso perché non ci sono buone foto della luna o della Terra; 
잘 들립니다. 잘 지내시
र
Bonjour, Canton Com Tech, Aurora Seven. C'est clair et
わかりました、ジャック。上から始めましょう。わかりました。クライオタンク; H2 1は230を示し、2も同様です。私たちのO2クライオタンク1は- 300でかろうじて持ちこたえているようです。そして、クライオタンク2は、H2 1は73、2、74を示しています。O2側では、O2 1の量は76で、O2は最大スケールの上限に固定されています。ラジアン温度は、プラ
Моё
D'ac
Okay, Jack; Houston. We
Look, we don't care about the potable tank, but we do about the waste tank, so just in case there is a problem somewhere, I'm going to shut the potable tank off and leave the waste tank inlet valve open. How does that sound to 
VIII,
Роджер. У меня сейчас какое-то странное настроение, я те
Hey, it's warmed up here now. It's almost com
罗杰。初步结果 1 如下：/；62844，减去 161，加上 129。你在抄
حسنًا. سيكون النجم الأول هو 26، وسنجري مجموعتين من
Roger. Veuillez noter que nous vous demanderons d'effectuer un contrôle HF à Ascension durant ce passage. Ce contrôle aura lieu à 5 h 15. Vous allu
Okay. Che ne dici se mantenessi un assetto di beccheggio di circa 115° invece di c
Привет, Джим. Не мог бы ты рассказать, каково было соотношение использования твоих двигател
Le haut... En 
حسنًا، 
Ich bin jetzt in etwa 1.500 Fuß Höhe. Der Hauptschirm sieht noch gut aus. Di
Okay. Nun,
Bene. È stivato. Bene, PREPARATI pe
मेरी यह
11, this is
ठीक है। चलिए शुरू करते हैं। -2, /G&N: 63634; प्लस 0.96, माइनस 0.23;; माइनस 0021.7, माइनस 0001.7, माइनस 0008.0; 080, 164, 326; N/A, N/A; 0023.2, 0:03.5 - हम आपको बर्न टाइम पर आधा सेकंड देंगे क्योंकि यह बहुत छोटा है - 0018.5; 44, 135.9, 28.1; और बाकी N/A है। सेट स्टार 31 और 23; रोल एलाइन 288, पिच 205, यॉ
कोलंबिया, कोलंबिया, ये ह्यूस्टन है। अगर आप पढ़ रहे हैं तो हमने हाई गेन एंटीना, यॉ 180, पिच 0 का अनुरोध किया है। मैं 
Хорошо. На панели 5: CB ЦЕНТРАЛЬ
알겠습니다
Okay, Vance, w
Sounds good, Houston. The ride was very nominal
Esatto. Hai capito bene. Okay, Jack. Un'altra cosa. Poco prima delle 2 ore e 15 min
Теперь нескольк
トム、カーナボンが君に与え
Okay, we don't hav
هيوستن؛ روجر
好的。稍后我会给您发送一份耗材更新，稍后您准备好复制时，我还会给您发送一份简短的飞行计划更新。没什么大不了的
Finora è stato così, ma questa volta ero
Is that too clo
रॉजर, कानो कैप कॉम। ऑरोरा सेवन आ
아주 좋습니다, 아주 좋습니다. 모든 것이 순조롭게 진행되고 
D'accord, Jim. Nous allons avoir une panne d
روجر. عند 123 زائد 00، المجموع ناقص 7 بالمئة، ألفا ناقص 12 بالمئة، برافو زائد 4.5، تشارلي ناقص 7، دلتا ناقص 6.5. إجم
Eagle, Ho
Роджер. Нам придётся снова установить ACME. Нам нужно выйти в высокочастотный/низкочастотный диапазон. Всё должно быть правильно расположен
Okay. I'm still on SLEW so we may tend to lose as we gradually pitch over. 
没
Roger. Avant que Jim ne fasse sa prochaine marque, pourrait-il appeler? On a raté le dernie
Okay. Die Spann
你可能对你妻子们的评论很感兴趣。尼尔，简谈到昨天的活动时说：“昨晚简直完美得难以置信。能与我的丈夫、宇航员、载人航天中心、美国公众以及全人类共同分享月球探索开端的壮丽体验，我感到无比荣幸。” 随后有人问她是否认为登月是她一生中最伟大的时
No
- - and 12.5 is wide angle. The only thing that confuses me is that it says for v
D'accord. Nous avons également constaté que l'Université de Houston a perdu son premier match de basketball à domicile en trois ans et demi hier soir. L'Illinois l'a emporté de justesse. Le Département d'État a annoncé il y a quelques minutes que l'équipe 
Хорошо. Это верно, и последнее предложение в обновлении гласит, что вы можете ожидать появления кометы при угле крена 45 градусов и при угле крена 155 градусов. Теперь, Джек, судя по показанным мне графикам, комета нах
Roger, Guaymas, alles klar und deutlich. Mein Steuermodus ist jetzt Fly-by-Wire; die Gyroskope sind deaktiviert, ich bin drin – Manöver sind ausgeschaltet. Ich gehe direkt in den Automatikmodus. Mein Status ist gut; der Kapselstatus ist gut. Der Treibstoffstand liegt bei 69-69 Prozent, 
How long you got - to end this ma
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. I'm going on fly-by-wire so I can control more accurately. It just started as I got to Guaymas, and appears to be it drifts off in yaw, to the right at about 1° per second. It will go over to an attitude of about 20°, and hold at that and when it hits about a 20° point it then goes into orientation mode and comes back to zero, and it was cycling back 
Roger,
Хорошо, отл
알겠습니다. 배터리 전압: 메인 배터리 24V, 1번 배터리 25V, 2번 배터리 25V
Apollo 8, Houston durch die Kanarischen Inseln. Wie liest du 
Okay, Vance. Let me see if I have it here. For the, want to use the 70-millimeter DC Hasselblad 80-m
ظلال من جيميني ريتروف
Ich kann da drüben nichts sehen, John. Ich fahre mal wieder nach rechts, damit wir beide sehen können. Ah ja, da
Ja, endlich, Fred-o.
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस
Houston, Columbia. Ich wiederhole: Ich habe sie nicht g
Ich habe den Booster gerade im Sonnenlicht gesehen, aus einer E
حسنًا. سيكون لدينا نموذج D-8 جديد في تمام الساعة 02:15 بتوقيت غرينتش. كم عدد نماذج D-8 الت
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हम अभी आपकी टेप को डंप करने 
Похоже, у вас там наверху
Wir möchten Sie bitten, direkt auf 060 zu sprin
Это с
초속 25피트 전진! 와, 정말 대단하네요
Another little of local news: the County Court House at Huntsville burned down before dawn yesterday, so it looks like they will go in the construction b
Go ahead, Hous
Нет. Подождите. Джек, сейчас нам нужно только сказать: "ЗАРЯДКА АККУМУЛЯТОРА ВЫКЛЮЧЕНА". Мы завершим эту процедуру, как только вы полностью закончите с Кено
알파/PC에서 PC로;
... فهمت يا إد. فقط لا تكس
确认无误。步骤 8：“按电源关闭”——更正为“按应急检查清单第 5 页电源关
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。没反应。马德里站的一台指令计算机出了故障。我们不得不暂时切换到阿森松站。现在我们已经恢复通过马德里站远程控制，计算机也恢复了，我们已准备好恢复对你们OMNI系
Аполлон
Хьюстон, это «Аполлон-8». Как читать
ええと、私たちは睡眠姿勢で、高ゲインの
रॉजर। हम देख रहे थे - मानो या न मानो, हम ईगल के मिलन रडार पर
罗杰，休斯顿。输入如下：中太平洋，357 152 359 267，加 0813，减 16503 066 36221 6
收到，
सच में बहु
D'accord, Jim. Je pensais que le mieux serait 
음, 제 생각에는 그들은 제가 본 입자들이 거기서 나온 것일지도 모른다고 생각했을 것 같은데, 이것들은 수천 개나 되고, 제 기준으로 사방으로 수 마일씩 뻗어 나가며 아주 천천히 움직입니다. 첫 번째 궤도
तो, हम यह जानना चाहेंगे कि पिछले 24 घंटों में क्या किसी को फ्रैंक जैसे लक्षण महसूस हुए हैं? हम यह भी जानना चाहेंगे - जैसा कि हमने आपको कुछ दिन पहले बताया था कि आप मारेज़िन अपनी इच्छानुसार ले सकते हैं - हम यह भी जानना चाहेंगे कि क्या किसी
Apollo 13, Houston. On dirait que la manœuvre va vous faire passer juste là. Vous allez devoi
बज़, तुम अब किस चीज़ का पीछा क
D
Ok. Non c'è molto da dire stamattina. La situazione è piuttosto tranquilla. Credo che la notizia più importante sia il tasso di incidenti - le morti durante le festività - che non è certo una notizia pi
ठीक है। पैनल 250 BAT B पावर एंट्री/पोस्टलैंडिंग खोलें, और फिर 
मुझे लगता है कि इंजन के ठीक नीचे ही वह जगह हो सकत
Apollo 13, Houston. Der Computer geh
Хорошо. Вот в чем суть. Ваше положение в пространстве выглядит довольно неплохо, за исключением крена, и мы хотели бы, чтобы вы сделали следующее. В режиме MIN impulse мы хотели бы, чтобы вы установили триммер на нулевой тангаж, что примерно соответствует вашему текущему положению; на 0,08 градуса по крену, что примерно на 16 градусов отличается от вашего текущего положения по крену; и на нулевой рыскание, что примерно соответствует ва
Хорошо. Здесь, в тени, довольно темно, и мне немного сложно разглядеть, где я нахожусь. Я проберу
روجر. عند بدء التشغيل قبل دقيقة واحدة، امسح عبارة "تشغيل الذراع الرئيسي". قبل 35 ثانية، امسح السطرين الأولين. قبل 10 ثوانٍ، غيّر ذلك إلى "قبل 9 ثوانٍ"؛ لذا، ع
それはいい
रॉजर। समझ गए? हम 63 रेव पर 81, 125 की उम्मीद कर रहे हैं। उस समय हमें लगभग 113 ओएएम की आवश्यकता होगी और ह
Fred, je voulais juste vous prévenir que le niveau de CO2 de la cartouche secondaire approche de la limite critique et que no
88. 好的，我收到。您是
Ах, Роджер, Zanzibar CapCom. Friendship Seven. Все предохранители остались такими же, как сообщалось ранее; ни один из них не менял. Пирогенератор активирован. Автоматическая система реверсивного торможения выключена. Включено в обычном режиме, автомат, гиромотор в обычном режиме. Все Т-образные рукоятки вставлены. Задержка реверсивного торможения в норме. Панель управления работает нормально. Посадочный мешок выключен. Топливо 90-98% [
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Если нам не удастся пройти этот промежуточный участок траектории, мы в
ठीक है, जैक। सीबी बैट चार्जर को एसी पावर से कनेक्ट करें, बंद करें। तैयार रहें। ठीक है। मुझे यहाँ एक लाइट लगानी थी
Sigma Seven, Sigma Seven, hier spricht PCS C
Wir suchten auch nach dem Katzenpfotenkrater,
C'est une possibilité à laquelle nous avons pensé, Jim, car nous avons chauffé ce réservoir et nous n'avons pas utilisé d'hydrogène; il pourrait donc s'échapper par l'
了解。待機して
態度なんてどうでもいい。自由に漂っ
Хорошо. Одна из первых задач, которую мы хотим выполнить, — зарядить батарею, чтобы обеспечить её питание, и у нас уже разработаны соответствующие процедуры. Что касается входа в атмосферу, мы планируем последний промежуточный этап за 5 часов до точки входа, если это потребуется. Затем мы хотели бы сбросить служебный модуль примерно за 4 с половиной часа до точки входа и потратить следующие 3–3,5 часа на фотографирование, запуск системы управления G&N командного модуля, укладку оборудования и другие мелочи. Мы будем держать его до часа до точки входа, а затем сбросим. Эти процедуры будут запущены в интегрированном режиме в CMS и LMS завтра утром, и, надеюсь, позже в течение дня мы повторим это с участием Центра управления полетами. Пара вопросов: что нам делать с... Суть в том, что в командном модуле достаточно кислорода, а источник высокого давления и проблема с размещением представляют собой источник кислорода, и люди подумывают оставить их там. Кроме того, мы думаем, что вам, возможно, стоит 
ठीक है, जैक। अब हमने स्थिति
Okay, Jack. Auf MDC 1 ist alles in Ordnung. Alle Ratenanzeigen stehen auf Null. Kugel 2 ist natürlich eingefroren; wir haben MAIN B verloren. Kugel 1 scheint normal zu funktionieren. Momentan habe ich Rollwinkel 0, Nickwinkel 180 und Gierwinkel etwa 13 Grad. Ich versuche, diese Werte beizubeh
And we have a little l
It's hard saying what a sane pace might be. I think it's the one that I'm using now - would get rather tiring after s
13, Houston. Nous v
光学系は...上がってい
알
2, /: 46427, -053, +141, -01350, +0000, +0000 000
Roger, Friendship Seven, je comprends que vo
Okay, Jack. It appears that we're going - funny diversion here, the attitude in - in pitch. I'm goin
Apollo 8, während wir auf den maximalen Gewinn warten, setze ich die Zusammenfassung der Flugbahn fort. Wir können immer noch von der Dreizehnten aus die Mittelpazifiklinie erreichen, und Sie sind nach 138 Sekunden Brenndauer auf dem Weg. Das sind 138 Sekunden, damit Sie die Butterfly-Region verlassen. Wir empfehlen, nach 20 Sekunden keine Vorzündungen oder Neustarts mehr durchzuführen. Wenn Sie 20 Sekunden überschreiten, kann dies die Flugbahn außerhalb des Korrekturbereichs bringen – Korrekturmöglichkeiten bis hin zu einer freien Rückkehr. Das Wetter im Bergungsgebiet ist gut. Wir haben eine Folge von und eine ohne. Während der Brenndauer können Sie eine leichte Änderung des Kammer- und Tankdrucks aufgrund des Treibstoffverbrauchs im Vorratstank und des Umfüllens in den Sumpftank bemerken. Dies kann etwa 2 bis 5 Sekunden nach Brennbeginn auftreten. Es wird sich um eine geringe Druckänderung in beiden Systemen handeln. Alle Systeme sind betriebsbereit. Wir wollen verhindern, dass das Wasser nach dem Brennvorgang kocht, um die Flugbahn zu optimieren. Ihre Wasserablasssituation sieht gut aus; Sie sollten gut bis über 5 Sekunden sein. Wir versuchen, die Wasserabgabe bis nach 5 Uhr hinauszuzögern. Anschließend möchten wir die Kryoka
We're doing fine. The Pilot went to sleep about half an hour ago and he'll be sleeping probably for another 5 or 6 
好的。没错，更新的最后一句话是，在45度和155度的倾斜角下，你可以看到这颗彗星。杰克，现在的情况是，根据他们给我看的图表，这颗彗星似乎距离太阳大约10度，由于它遮挡太阳的几何形状，在45度到75度左右的倾斜角范围内
Manœuvre de survol / 62954, moins 16
And that old suit temp down there at 55°, S-band-CONTINUOUS, C-band-CONTINUOU
Tell them to look 
Ah, ici Seven. Veuillez relayer au Cap Com. Mon altitude est de 4 000 pieds, la situation est inchangée, le parachute principal est en bon état, le sac d'atterrissage s'est déployé et le peroxy
かなり高くまで上がります。地球の日の出のよう
Okay, Vance. Dici di aver apportato alcune modifiche alle procedure che usavo prima per ottenere la telemetria e controll
わかりました。インバーター2のACバス2をオンにしてください。もう一つのスイッチ、ACバス2リセットをリセットしてセンターにしてください。バッテリー充電をアルファにしてください。DCインジケーターをバッテリーチャージャーにしてください。そして、最初の30
Okay. Auf Bedienfeld 326 sollen die Ve
它就连接在航天器上。这里没有什么特别的地方可以用来蹬地。现在，看看我能不能用力蹬地。如果没有这把
Хорошо. Мы завершили наш маневр. Мы находимся в широкой зоне нечувствительности, и Нунки находится близко к верхней границе моего отображения. Сейчас Антарес, кажется, находится ближе к центру. Однако мы находимся в ш
حسنًا يا مايك، أنا الآن عند النقطة شبه النجمية 33. لا أعرف مكان الشمس بالضبط من هناك، لكن هذه هي الزاوية تقريبًا. نحن - 
لا، بل هو أفضل ردّ رأيته في حياتي، سأخبركم بذلك. أعتقد أنكم شاهدتم ردّ
Alle drei Scha
It is comi
11, qui Houston. Al momento del vostro colpo ciclico dell'accumulatore, stavamo ricevendo dati a basso bit rate e di conseguenza non ricevevamo il parametro di flusso di O2. Ci aspettiamo che quello che state vedendo sia probabilmente nominale. Cioè, è probabilmente quello che ci aspetteremmo da un trasduttore che probabilmente non funziona correttamente in questo modo, e la situazione continuerà a peggiorare
네, 2분 30초 동안 고농도 산소 공
もう一つ
Roger. We've been looking at your systems data on playback, and everything is lookin
Apprezzo il lavoro che hai fatto e Jack dice che sarà dura battere il suo 
わかりました。もう一度確認してリセ
わかりま
Roger
سنخبرك عندما ننتهي هنا. نسمعك بوضوح تام، وتبد
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。お願いが一つあります。光学系を
Ho messo il mio ACME... Ora radd
ठीक है। क्वाड सी
بين العلامات الس
روجر. زائد 90، /، 6
휴스턴, 컬럼비아. 로직 버스 암(Logic 
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон.
ど
Gemini VI. Siamo ancora a circa 247 km. Abbiamo un GET di 3-4 ore, 0 minuti e 0 se
Okay. We're r
Roger. Je t'ai copié cette fois-ci. Dans le proc
Roger. / - ceci est pour 3 - 46427, moins 053, plus 141, plus 28960, moins 00456, plus 00720 180 021 002, NA, plus gauche 17, plus 00883, moins 16500 12955 36185; Sirius, Rigel 129, 155, 0
Oh, its' dark, that's what happened. It's facing a dark earth. Sunset F16 to F, okay
That's 3.5. Are you in AUTO? Verify cabin pressure at 3.5 and suit circuit pressure between 3.
太阳角度越大，你得到的
正確には、指揮官の転送先で、ハッチを閉じるという意味ですね
فريد، عليك أن تعيد المحاولة. لا أستطيع قراءتك بوضوح. هناك ضوضاء خلفية كثيرة. ربما نحتاج إلى هوائي 
حسناً. 
Хорошо, если сравнивать полёт «Аполлона-13» с «Аполлоном-8», то при старте вибрация была примерно такой же, как и на «Аполлоне-8», но в начале полёта боковые колебания были меньше, чем на «Аполлоне-8». Отделение S-IC ощущалось более резким на «Аполлоне-13», чем на «Аполлоне-8», возможно, это потому, что я сидел в другом кресле, не знаю. Но было около трёх резких переходных процессов отключения и пара сильных взрывов, когда нас отбросило назад вдоль ремней безопасности, прежде чем сработал S-II. И S-II, конечно, был таким же плавным на «Аполлоне-13», как и на «Аполлоне-8», за исключением двигателя № 5. И мы не испытывали той вибрации, которую испытывали на «Аполлоне-8» к концу работы S-II
닐과 버즈, 저는 지금 백악관 집무실에서 전화 통화를 하고 있는데, 이 통화는 분명 역사상 가장 역사적인 통화일 것입니다. 여러분이 모든 미국인을 위해 해낸 일에 대해 우리 모두가 얼마나 자랑스러워하는지
ジム、地図上で繰り返しマークして見つけられる2つの小さなクレーターを使
Station ca
いいえ、どうやら地球信号は一度も失われたことがなかったようです。常に片方向ロックを拾おうとしていたようで、AGCは短時間を
我已经加载了。我觉得应该不会有太
D'accord. Je vais simplement essayer de le tenir à l'écart de notre o
로저, 버즈. PAD, MPL 항목입니다. 롤 05, 35부터 시작합니다. 수정: 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, + 1102, - 17203, 068, 36194 656 11894 36275 195 03 03 0027, NOUN 69, 네 줄 모두 NA입니다. D 0부터 시작합니다: 400 02 09. 정전 RET, 00 17 03 38 08 20. 육분의 별, 02 0945 149. 보어사이트 별은 Scorpii theta입니다. 즉, Scorpii theta입니다. 위쪽 315, 오른쪽 35, 상승 벡터는 위쪽입니다. 그리고 코멘트: 이 진입 PAD는 중간 코스 6을 수행하지 않는다고 가정합니다. 참고로, 현재 모든 추적 정보를 바탕으로 볼 때, 해당 기동은 초당 0.1피트(약 0.15미터) 정도의 속도로만 가능합니다. 따라서 아마도 생략할 것 같습니다. 나중에 더 자세히 알려드리겠습니다. 좋습니다. 30분 전 수평계 점검 결과, 194°33'03에서 피치 각도는 298°입니다. 좋습니다. 백업 정렬 - 진입을 위한 설정 별은 데네브와 베가(079°234°340)입니다.
Also another dep
Okay. Ich habe es wieder für dich, wenn du bereit bist, es 
Yes, 
Acquario, Houst
Roger. Vous, habitants de la navette Columbia, serez peut-être intéressés d'apprendre qu'aujourd'hui, la Colombie célèbre son indépendance. Gloria Diaz, des Philippines, a été couronnée Miss Univers hier soir. Elle a remporté le titre face à 60 autres candidates. Mademoiselle Diaz a 18 ans, les cheveux et les yeux noirs, et ses mensurations sont 88-58-88. La première dauphine est Miss Australie, 
روجر. إذا كان لديك وقت فراغ لبضع دقائق، فلدينا إجراء هنا يسمح لنا بالتحقق من محول تدفق الأكسجين، وفي الوقت نفسه إنجاز المزيد من عمليات إثراء المق
Tutta
Okay. Ich wer
Affermativo, Frank, se
शानदार जीटी-3। अगली यात्रा में फिर म
你能转告休斯顿我们当时在……但是我们能够
罗
Роджер. Я готов посмотреть, смогу
罗杰。废气室阀门已经处于通风状态——哦，我猜
Oui. L
Tutto quello che ho sentito è che la cabina stava mantenendo la pressione. Non ho sentito altro. E, Odyssey, sia
Боже мой
여기 물총이 있습니다. 끝에 있는 원통형 부분은 여러 개의 막으로 이루어진 필터인데, 하나는 물은 통과시키지만 가스는 통과시키지 않고, 다른 하나는 가스는 통과시키지만 물은 통과시키지 않습니다. 따라서 물탱크에서 나오는 가스가 섞인 물을 이 필터를
저희가 현재 연료 전지에서 산소를 제거하고 있다는 
Sai, non ho visto mo
我觉得吉姆的情况可能也一样。我没注意到他输入了什么，但他的指针一直稳稳
Хо
If you have to
当
Gemini VIII, CSQ. We
Okay. Sie können mit einer Brennstoffzellenspülung rechnen, und wir sollten kurz darauf mit de
حسنًا يا جاك، وتبقى إجراءا
11番、ヒューストン。本当に素晴らしい眺めですね。バズ、戻ってきましたね。窓のシェードを片方外しているのに気づきましたか？オ
네, 맞습니다. 지금 읽고 계신다면 
حس
Подтверждаю. Следующий шаг на панели 5: нам нужно перевести переключатель MAIN BUS TIE A/C в положение BAT A/C, проверить правильность
Roger. Stiamo rice
Nein, noch ni
حس
Hai ricevuto queste informazio
…vous voyez donc que les mêmes données que le Dr Berry a obtenues sur moi lors de la mission Gemini VII sont également valables pour Frank lors de la mission A
И они должны быть на связи. Это
我在凌晨 0 点，使用 f/11 光圈和 150 焦距，拍摄了一张太平洋上空云层的 S-5 照片，拍摄地点位于魁北克海岸哨兵区域。这是第 28 张照片。我正在拍摄多张 S-5 照
And in exchange for that, th
안녕하세요, 카나본, 안녕하세요, 카나본, 제미니 4
Eh bien, Houston, nous n'avons pas eu beaucoup de temps pour vous décrire ce que nous voyions par le hublot pendant que nous nous préparions à l'éjection; mais jusque-là, nous avions une vue dégagée sur toute la partie no
Ricevuto. Il radiator
ओह नहीं। हम बदल गए हैं; हम चंद्रमा 
O
然后，请您将相机贴在窗户上，并确保相机镜头不进入视野。接下来，我们需要两组照片。请您将相机设置为脉冲模式，并将相机镜头垂直向下对准地球。我会给您一些时间启动相机。相机镜头会对准夜侧的黑色地球。然后，请进行一次脉冲向上拍摄，并使用相机快门处于B门模式拍摄一张照片。当相机升至地平线以上时，请进行一次脉冲向下拍摄，同样使用相机快门全开模式拍摄另一张照片。之后，我们需要两张照片，一张是脉冲向上拍摄，画面中可以看到地平线和黑色地球；另一张
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。出发
待機す
また、作業を開始する前に、バッテリーの充電手順にいくつかの違
Roger. Ça me paraît une bonne idée, Jim. Pourquoi ne pas la 
रॉजर। मुझे लगता है कि डॉ. मुलर केप से वापस आ रहे हैं। हम उनकी ओर से आपको शुभकामनाएं पहुं
ठीक है, जो। अभी-अभी सिग
Ok,
हो सकता है कि चंद्
Warum machst du nicht zum Beispiel... nachdem es rausgegange
Темпера
Roger. Wir haben Neuigkeiten für Sie. Wir würden uns außerdem freuen, wenn Sie uns zu diesem Zeitpunkt Ihre GO/NO-GO-Werte mitte
확실히 그들 중
Houston. Gemini VIII wi
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。当时我什么也没说。现在我们正在想办法解决你们的问题。关于你们之前提出的睡眠周期调整问题，我们同意你们的看法。我们希望在进入月球轨道之前，能够重新回到飞行计划中，尤其是在睡眠周期等方面。所以，我们希望你们自行判断如何最有效地协调睡眠周期，并合理分配时间。请你们随时告知我们每个人的工作安排和计划。我们之前把其中一个人的睡眠时间推迟了2个小时。我们
Cos'è quella cosa che svolazza nella brezza? Stiamo di n
Affirmative. That's the pad that we've given you, but we may change our mind later on. We want you to have this info for now. And that's a m
D'accord. La première rangée est correcte. Pour la deuxième, les circuit
설치
Sì. La spia della batteria l
هيوستن، كولومبي
Roger. 23° out the window. On th
ठीक है। R1 प्लस 27210, R2 प्लस 35570, R3 प्लस 33010। दूसरा आइटम, जैसा कि आप जानते हैं, PROCEED और PROCEED के साथ पैंतरेबाज़ी के कारण; और, आपके रवैये के बाद, एक अनुस्मारक जो आपको एक संकीर्ण डेडबैंड पर वापस नहीं ले जाएगा। 1.40-डिग्री डेडबैंड पर वापस जाने के लिए, आपको उस प्रक्रिया का उपयोग करना होगा जो मैंन
好的，我知道你已经读取了数据。你能给我一些关
ठीक है। ह
로저. 한 시간 전쯤에 
The next crater coming into the bottom, that's Duke Island right there, and to the left, the crater - the largest of the craters near the center of the picture right now is Maskelyne W. This is a position check during descent at about 3 minutes and 39 seconds, and it's our down range position check and cross range position check prior to yawing over f
هل أنتم تتحرك
알겠습니다. 
Ich frage mich, ob Neil irgendwelche Vorbereitungen 
يا جيم، للعلم فقط، لديّ لوحة التسجيل. ولديّ ملخص حالة الطقس لمنطقة الهب
संक्षेप में कहें तो, जिम, हमें किसी समस्या की आश
Ich bin nur etwas neugierig, Mike; ich dachte, das wäre schon erledigt. Ich dachte, der Computer hätte sich um dieses kle
프렌드십 세븐, 여
Okay, wir sind so weit, Neil; bis du da unten bist und dein Auge aus dem Fenster strecken kann
ええと、今、あの装置を設置した後、0.35まで戻りました。それ以前は、目盛りレベルで読み取っていました。私たちの計測値は比較的正確だと思います。少なくとも、10秒後に水蓄圧器が作動するタイミングになると、0.75、0.8くらいまで上
D'accord, et il semble que cette fois-ci, nous allons procéder au préchauffage. C'est pourquoi nous voulons nous assurer que sa durée ne dépasse pas 20 minutes. Il se peut que nous ne puissions pas le surveiller à ce moment-là, car l'appareil ne sera pas encore sous 
Roger. Je voudrais revoir ce rapport de 30 minutes, en commençant par le commutateur Auto Retro-jett. 
आगे बढ़ो, 
看起来即使在断电状态下（字迹模糊），我们仍然消耗着略低于11安培的电流。1号机组是10安培，2号机组略低于11安培。系绳——或者说系绳或脐带式约束装置在外部舱门的位置——使得在航天器前方进行任何舱外活动（EVA）都相当困难，尤其是在自由系绳空气动力学方面。每当我在那片区域操作时，系绳末端会把我往后拉，反作用力会把我带回航天器上方，然后回到适配器部分。这就是为什么
友谊七号，除了感觉非常舒适之外，我没有任何失重感。没
查理，阿波罗11号。关于停止飞行器，我有几个问题。在我看来，最简单的停止方法是——我们现在基本上处于0度偏航角，俯仰角接近90度，所以只需要在滚转角大约260度时停止即可。——
그리고 페이지 절반
Sigma Seven, 
This is Friendship Seven. An observation on control system operation: It appears that whenever I go off on manual, or fly-by-wire and maneuver for any lengthy period of time, that somehow we induce considerably, considerable errors into the gyro system. I come up with a
لنفعل ذلك... لمجرد التسلي
Roger. Altitude de l'apogée: 143 milles nautiques. Périgée: 86 milles nautiques. Vous avez b
我们会把它
Roger. Ciao, ho un aggiornamento sul piano di volo per
Roger.
Ja, tut mir leid, schalten Sie die bitte aus. Die OAMS-Leistungs- und Lageregelungstriebwerke funktionieren beide. Triebwerk A zeigt 3000 an, Triebwerk B etwa
我还没到
जिम, एक तरफ रुको। तुम्हार
どうぞ
Le niveau de 
이해했습니다. 스타 31, 롤 184 7, 피치 23 4, 요 14 3, 그리고 스타 샤프트
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. نحن نشهد بعض المعدلات المنخفضة للغاية في هذا ا
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। मुझे यकीन नहीं है कि आपने मेरा पिछला संदेश ठीक से सुना होगा, क्योंकि हम अभी-अभी ओम्नी सिस्टम बदल रहे थे। हम पानी छोड़ने का समय लगभग 5 मिनट आगे बढ़ाना चाहते हैं। हम आपको पानी छोड़ने का सटीक 
分かりました。読み上げます。セカンダリーアキュムレーターの流量を監視します。セカンダリーグリコールラジエーターバルブを30秒間ノーマルにし、その後バイパスにします。セカンダリーアキュムレーターの流量に減少が見られない場合は、セカンダリーグリコールをラジエーターバル
휴스턴, 폐수 
Was f
ठीक है, बज़। पिछली
Retro Je
Roger. And Neil has 66 percent O2, no flags, minimum cooling, and the suit 
Ja. Klingt, als wärst du die ersten paar Umlaufbahnen wahnsinnig
我们现在显示舱内温度为 70 度，所以您那里的
MARK. 
DREHSTE
روجر، ١١. كما لاحظت على الأرجح، فقد زادت زاوية المخروط في وضع التشغيل بشكل ملحوظ نتيجةً لتفريغ مياه الصرف الصحي، وتنظيف خلية الوقود، والاقتران الطبيعي، لذا يبدو أننا سنضطر إلى إنهاء الاتصال هنا بعد قليل. ونود أن نعرف رأيك فيما إذا كنت لا تزال تخطط لمحاولة إرسال إشارات تلفزيونية من داخل المركبة القمرية؛ وإذا كان الأمر كذلك، فسنحاول توفير وضعية يمكنك الحفاظ عليها تُمكّننا من الحصول على إشارة عالي
И теперь оно действительно начинает выглядеть немного крупнее. Некоторые детали можно довольно отчетливо разглядеть невоор
Sì. È stato molto comodo da quando ho finalmente ottenuto l'impostazi
Роджер. Жителям космического корабля «Колумбия», возможно, будет интересно узнать, что сегодня в Колумбии День независимости. Вчера вечером Глория Диас из Филиппин была коронована как «Мисс Вселенная». Она обошла 60 других девушек в борьбе за титул чемпионки мира по красоте. Мисс Диас 18 лет, у нее черные волосы и глаза, параметры фигуры 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2. Первой вице-мисс стала Мисс Австралия, за ней следуют Мисс Израиль и Мисс Япония. Пока вы будете возвращаться во вторник вечером, в Вашингтоне будут играть команды всех звезд Американской и Национальной лиг. Ожидается, что Мел Стоттлмайр из «Янкиз» станет первым питчером Американской лиги. Пока никто не предсказывает, кто станет первым питчером Национальной лиги. В составе команды девять питчеров. Хотя исследования в космической программе, безусловно, принесли свои плоды, похоже, что не всегда все приносит результаты. Корпорация Woodstream, материнская компания Animal Trap Company of America, которая произвела более миллиарда деревянных пружинных мышел
好的。
Ich habe keine Ahnung, wo wir den Fehler gefunden haben, Vance. Ich habe doch gerade gesagt, dass wir die Prozedur genau wie beschrieben durchgeführt haben. Wir sind jetzt im kritischen SEP-Abschnitt, wo ich gesagt habe: „Wähle den besten OMNI-Wert“. Wir
Well, if you are readin
Okay. Fuel is 45-42 [percent]. B
अरे बाप रे! अब तो मैं पुश-टू-टॉक मोड का इस्ते
日の出。ああ！あの時は美しく光る蛍がいた。本当に明るかった。でも、あれはただ、ええと、あの蛍は…ええと、私は…もし読んでいる人がいたら、私は蛍を
アポロ11号、ヒュ
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。申し訳ありませんが、周囲の雑音が多すぎて聞こえま
Boy, you sure get a different perspective in this thing in zero g. Righ
١١، هذه هيوستن. أفاد غولدستون أنهم يستطيعون قراءة الأرقام على الشاشة. كما يستطيعون قراءة الفعل والاسم
Roger. Je 
ईगल, यह ह्
The one that I have now, and the one that Jim took off, w
Bonjour, Apollo 11
Jack berichtet, dass er glaubt, Alt
Хорошо. У нас есть три момента. Во-первых, все ваши результаты — две оценки — были проведены, и… — Поздравляем! Выглядит отлично; они очень довольны. У вас осталось всего 4 угловые минуты по субзвездной точке, и это первое, что нужно отметить. Во-вторых, если вы не видите в этом необходимости, я не вижу необходимости перечитывать информацию, которую
- - Warum versuchst du e
Columbia, Houston. Nous vous liso
Ça commence vraiment à se faire sentir, n'es
Yes. Okay, then. There were five air crewmen killed at Walker Air For
Эй, Чарли, нам нужно сделать ещё несколько фотографий. Обычно, нет никаких ограничен
That was at B-2. Coming up on B-3. Pitch down at this time to approximately 10 degrees. The roll error that developed during the period where we had the scanners off has disappeared. At this point, I am going to increase the suit flow to approximately- just a tad to increase the cooling for reentry. See if I can bring it down a little bit more. There is almost perfect attitude. Yaw is good. Pitch is down a little 
And you've got the computer again, if you
Die Farbe der lokalen Oberfläche ist sehr ähnlich der, die wir aus dem Orbit bei diesem Sonnenwinkel von etwa 10 Grad beobachtet haben. Sie ist praktisch farblos. Sie ist grau, und zwar ein sehr helles, kreideartiges Grau, wenn man in Richtung der Nullphasenlinie blickt; und ein deutlich dunkleres Grau, eher aschgrau, wenn man im 90-Grad-Winkel zur Sonne blickt. Einige der Oberflächengesteine ​​hier in der Nähe, die durch die Triebwerksabgase zerbro
Il modo in cui Gordo ha perso..
... Je
Verseau, Houston. Nous avons reçu une partie de votre transmission. Nous comprenons que la situation s'est considérablement détériorée et que vous souhaite
Нет. Это есть в вашем контрольном списке
Ich werde deine Methode zur Berechnung der Driftperiode für diese Umlaufbahn ausprobieren – das wird bestimmt spannend. Gerade eben hatte ich hier draußen ein Loch mit einer Insel. Das könnte San Clemente gewesen sein, ich bin mir aber nicht sicher. Ja, ich bin jetzt über L
我可以给出很高
14시 53분 21초 GMT입니다. GET은
Roger. Le 8, /: 45701, moins 040, plus 157. Vou
Apollo 8, Housto
Roger, Jim. Quello che succede è che, ovviamente, impostiamo... quando si esce dal punto di arresto, si reimpostano gli indicatori di errore e si perde il riferimento di assetto. Si stabilisce un nuovo riferimento di assetto, e potrebbe non essere l'assetto di combustione, dato che, a questo punto, stiamo controllando l'assetto con... Ora, riprendiamo con "INVIO", cancella. Cancella tutto fino a "404 più zero" e vogliamo che tu esegua questi passaggi da 
Okay, Rcal ist aus.
यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। 
Roger, Eagle. Correction - Roger, Columbia. We copy. You guys are speedy; you beat us
휴스턴에 우리 육분의 후방 창문 전구가 나간 것 같다고 전해주시겠습니까? 그리고 추가적인 지시 사항이 있는지 여쭤봐도 될까요? 혹시 여분
Ja, das stimmt. Tatsächlich wird diese Ausrichtung auf der Erde diesmal
Roger. Ce l'abbiamo proprio sotto di noi, esattamente sotto di noi, a circa 120-150 metri. La luce ci arriva abba
알겠습니다. 기내 온도는 92도이고, 인버터를 알려드리겠습니다. 대
Okay. As of, your batteries - you had battery A with 39.32 amp-hours, battery B had 35.21, and battery C 38.46. Y
프렌드십 세븐, 스틸헤드. 의료진은 구조 직후 필요한 지원이 있을 경
E mi - 02:30에, 연결 케이블에서 전원을 제거하는 동안 가장 먼저 두 단계를 수행합니다. 먼저 MAIN B,
わかった.
Friendship Seven, Guaym
Commande par molette. 0,
Comment ont-ils fait pour avoir un vieux
يا إلهي! الآن، انتبه جيدا
Хорошо, Фред, я больше тебя не слышу из-за фонового шума. Я предполагаю, что... кажется, я слышал, как Джек сказал тебе, что мы собираемся делать с шумоподавлением в восходящем канале связи, выключи его. Ты займешься антеннами, потому что мы не видим твоего положения. Мы проверим твой голос, когда поднимемся. На это у нас уйдет от 3 до 5 минут. И чтобы это было безопасно для космонавтов, когда ты увидишь Землю, используй переднюю антенну; когда увидишь Луну
Ok, Jack. Hai copiato CABIN GAS RETURN in EGRESS? 
Roger. Ascolta, Charlie Duke vuole parlarti del controllo stellare; e, affinché possiamo avere una buona COMM, vorrei riconfigurare l'interruttore dell'AMPLIFICATORE DI POTENZA 
Что касается выдержки, нам нужна восьмая доля секунды, полсе
ठीक है। आप देख सकते हैं कि वह अपनी कैंची से एक छोटे से नोजल का प्लास्टिक वाला सिरा काट रहा है, जिसमें वह पानी की बंदूक लगाने वाला है। यह पानी की बंदूक हर क्लिक पर आधा औंस पानी की बौछार करती है। लीजिए, बिल ने इसे ल
로저
どうぞ、ヒューストン、イーグルで
Houston, Columbia. Il mio segna
Jim, de Houston. Je crois que vou
Répétez. Hé, c'est e
Миру, возможно, будет интересно узнать, что вы делаете после завершения полёта, а именно, как вы возвращаете переключатели на место. Мы слышали, как вы проходили по контрольному списку. 
रॉजर। क्या वे आपके पास से गुज
Ok, Apollo 8. È un po' presto per darti dati concreti sulle prestazioni del tuo sistema di comunicazione. Sembra che funzioni come previsto, e tutto il resto sembra andare meglio, quindi anche questo potrebbe andare meglio, dopo aver effettuato i prossimi control
我没见过数量庞大的这类粒子，但见过一些。它们的运动是随机的；在我
这是“友谊七号”。它刚开始运行时，偏航时会进入姿态控制模式，这会导致其他轴的姿态也出现偏差。这种情况持续了一段
Хорошо, 8. Мы хотим провести небольшую тренировку на месте, чтобы убедиться, что мы сможем вовремя перезаписать пленку и доставить голосовую часть в Хьюстон. Итак, мы планируем перезаписать вашу пленку и отработать процедуру на месте, чтобы доставить ее сюда и прослушать. Мы считаем, что на пленке уже есть что-то, если только вы не перезаписали ее после последней перезаписи. Просто чтобы убедиться, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы сказали несколько слов, короткий счет или что-то еще, что вы хотели бы добавить. И мы сделаем это в течение следующих 5 минут, прежде чем покинем Мадрид. Это место, где мы хотим провести тренировку, поэтому мы 
ठीक है। हमने इस बारे में बात कर ली है, और 12 घंटे पहले, सभी को लगता है कि हमें इसे अभी करने की ज़रूरत नहीं है। लेकिन नज़दीक से देखने पर, इससे प्रक्षेप पथ पर कोई असर नहीं पड़ता। और जैसा सुझाव दिया गया है, अगर आप चाहें तो हम प्रवेश चेकलिस्ट पर एक नज़र डाल सकते हैं और कंसोल पर मौजूद सभी लोगों के साथ लाइव प्रसारण के दौरान इस पर चर्चा कर सकते हैं। अभी, आपके साथ वह टीम है जो प्रवेश सत्र आयोजित करेगी, इसलिए हम चेकलिस्ट पर चर्चा कर स
わかった
56-BRAVO, combustion fractionnée, 55 vers l'avant, 106 vers l'arrière. 1+31. 2+15. 06 57 55. 6+42.
حسنًا يا مايك، ما حدث هو أنك كنت تراقب، وفي الخطوة 7 دخلت إلى NOUN 01، وأدخلت العنوان ثم INFORMATION INFORMATION؛ وعند الضغط على زر الإدخال الأخير 35400 ENTER، مباشرةً بعد ذلك، أعادك ذلك إلى 16. ثم عندما ضغطت على زر الإدخال، كنت تُدخل المعلومات في وحدة التحكم بالشاشة (CDU)؛ وعندما حصلت على المدخلين في السجلين 1 و2، حدث تغيير فوري في وحدة التحكم بالشاشة، ونظر النظام إلى ذلك ورأى ما اعتقد أنه لديه. يا إلهي، لقد حصلت على معدل 600 درجة في الثانية. وقام النظام بتشغيل النفاثات لمحاولة خفض هذا المعدل. ومرشحات المعدل التي يراقبها - حسنًا، المعدل الذي يراقبه مُصفّى، لذا فهو لا يستشعر المعدل الفعلي إلا بعد أن يتراكم بالفعل، ثم يبدأ بقراءة مرشحات المعدل، ويقول: "حسنًا، لم يكن لديّ 600 درجة فعلًا". فيقوم بإيقافه وي
Trasmetto in cieco. Abbiamo la LOS. Il tempo trascorso a terra è al mio posto, 4 ore, 29 minuti e 30 secondi. Trasmetto in cieco ad Aurora Seven. As
よく復唱しました、アクエリアス。では…針を刺すには、司令官の電源を入れなければなりません。すぐに手
Jim, Houston here. Two items: first of all, your is looking very good and it should carry you through the night; second
मुझे लगता है कि इस
They tell me you got to use Vel
खैर, अब मैं दक्षिणी क्रॉस के आसपास वापस आ गया हूँ, जहाँ हल्के धब्बेदार क्षेत्र में बहुत सारे हल्के तारे दिखाई दे रहे हैं। मुझे तारामंडल में ऐसा ही नजारा याद नहीं आ रहा। अल्फा सेंटौरी और बीटा स
Okay. Ich schüttle meinen Kopf heftig in alle Richtungen, mit geschlossenen Augen, auf und ab, neige, rolle und giere. Nichts im Magen; nichts irgendwo. Jetzt – ich versuche, den Nullpunkt zu drücken, den Zeit-Null-K
没错。
Forty-six
또 다른 지역 소식입니다. 헌츠빌 카운티 법원이 어제 새벽에 화재로 전소했습니다. 따라서 그 자리에 다시 건설 사업을 해야 할 것 같습니다. 한편, 귀환을 기다리는 가족들에 대한 소식도 전해드립니다. 앤 제임스 기자가 보도한 내용입니다. "우리는 달 뒷면에서 쉬고 있어요." 발레리 앤더스는 크리스마스 이브에 가족과 함께 아폴로 8호가 달 궤도를 벗어나 지구로 귀환하기를 기다리
Конечно, передам, и, если у него есть какие-либо сообщения, скажите Фрэнку, что его люди находятся примерно в десяти футах от
Houston, at these sun angles, everything is quite distinct; shadows are good; the ground does
Und nun möchten wir Ihnen eine Frage zu Ausrichtungen usw. stel
ر
Если он вооб
Roger. Wie Sie vielleicht sehen, bin ich beim Rollen etwas ungenau. Keine Sorge. Ich werde sie direkt in den Wiedereintritt bringen, sobald ich hier oben bin. Okay. Sie befindet sich im Wiedereintritt, was das Rollen angeht. Okay. Das Teleskop kommt näher. Ich nut
١١، هيوستن. نود تجربة تشغيل مصفوفة الكسب العالي هنا. إذا اخترت إعادة الالتقاط وهوائي النطاق S على وضع الكس
Как вы, вероятно, знаете, несколько групп работают над дальнейшими процедурами. Одна группа занимается корректировкой траектории полета, чтобы определить систему, ее положение, способы выполнения, методы выравнивания и так далее. Другая группа работает над входом в атмосферу, включая то, как и когда мы будем активировать систему. Третья группа занимается проверкой состояния системы, и через несколько часов — завтра, судя
أنا مندهش من كيفية تجوله في
Un'altra cosa, Jim, è che mentre stai manovrando per ragg
好的。耳轴校准值全部
बज़, कृपया प्रतीक्षा करें। जहाँ तक मुझे पता है, मौसम काफी अच्छा दिख रहा है। उष्णकटिबंधीय अभिसरण रेखा के साथ, मौसम मानचित्र पर कुछ बादल दिखाई दे रहे हैं, लेकिन कुछ खास नहीं। अभी - प्रतीक्षा करें। चलिए देखते हैं, अभी मध्य में - हाँ, एमपीएल पर - 3000 बिखरे बादल हैं, दृश्यता 10, लहरों की ऊँचाई 3 फीट है, यह वर्तमान मौसम है। मुझे नहीं लगता कि कोई खास पूर्वानुमान है। कुछ - फ्लाइट ने अभी मुझे सूचित किया है कि मैंने ज
وفي هذه المنطقة تحديداً، توجد فوهتان. الفوهة التي أمامي الآن وأنا أنظر من المركبة الفضائية، في
E, Tranquil
알겠습니다. LMP 이관 직전에, 프레드 씨, 한 단계를 더 추가해
فريندشيب سفن، هاواي 
مو
Хорошо. А вт
목소리도 좀 
ठीक है। जिम, हम चाहते हैं कि ए
मिथुन राशि वालों, यह हवाई है। हमारे पास 
कैसे? क्या उसने इसे उल्टा क
«Аполлон-11», это
Aurora Seven, Indian Cap Com. Температура инверто
أ 3، 2، 1 
请稍
훌륭한 스포츠입니다. 요
It appears that we did a grave injustice to the food people. Just after our TV show,
我不
Okay. Lesen Sie
Roger. Les horaires 
알겠습니다. 배터리 2, 저전압, OFF/RESET 후 ON
Ci stiamo lavorando, Frank. Stiamo cercando di calcolare in termini ravvicinati cosa sarà radialmente verso l'esterno. Ora, hai anc
Okay. Nach Schritt BAT 5 und 6, AUS, werden in Schritt 3 die Leistungsschalterfelder
D'accord. Soit j'ai mal recopié le disjoncteur, soit je n'arrive pas à le lire. Il se trouve environ au vingtième rang, après le panneau 276, où il est écrit « CB INSTRUMENTATION POWER CONTROL 3 ​
Sembra che la cabina stia sfiatando a
You mig
يبدو لي
यह B-2 पर था। अब B-3 पर आ रहे हैं। इस समय पिच लगभग 10 डिग्री नीचे है। स्कैनर बंद होने के दौरान ज
Роджер. В 74:30 мы хотели бы попросить вас включить вентиляторы во всех четырех криогенных резервуарах и перевести нагреватели во всех четырех криогенных резервуарах 
2:26
روجر، نود أن نسألك عما إذا كنت قد ضغطت على زر الإدخال (ENTER) لنقل متجه الحالة من الفتحة إلى الفتحة الأخرى. لم نقم ب
Charlie, Apollo 11. J'ai quelques questions concernant l'arrêt du drone. Il me semble que la méthode la plus simple serait la suivante: nous sommes actuellement à 0 degré de lacet et nous approchons d'un tangage de 90 degrés. Il s'agit donc simplement de l'arrêter à environ 260 degrés de roulis. Que pensez-vous de la procédure suivante: passer en mode MANUEL D'ATTITUDE, puis en mode COMMANDE DE RATE, et ensuite, étant donné que notre zone morte est déjà réduite, activer les propulseurs du panneau 8. Le drone devrait alors s'immobiliser quelle que soit son attitude actuelle. Si je fais tout cela lorsqu'il atteint 261 degrés de roulis, nous devrions nous arrêter ne
मैं ज़रूर करूँगा। और चलिए देखते हैं, हम आपको बताना चाहते थे कि इ
Roger, Neil. Thank you much for that description. We've got a pretty dark p
حسن
Ok, n
حسنًا، في
Roger, ich habe eine Korrektur zum Flugplan. Die Bandenablage erfolgt in der 13. Umdre
Roger. Riesco a leggere i numeri chiaramente. Non riusciamo a dis
Roger. Tonbandgerät an, Sicherungsautomaten e
रॉजर। फंक्शन स्विच डाउनवॉइस बैकअप 
Wir haben verloren – der einzige Vorteil eines frühen Manövers wäre, wenn wir die Leistung wieder reduzieren könnten. Der einzige Vorteil eines frühen Manövers wäre, dass man jetzt einen starken Schub und einen Mittelkurs durchführen und dann die Leistung reduzieren könnte. Ansonsten
收到。区域 11-DELTA：ΔT 为零。GMTRC：1 天 07:48:58。RET：400 K，15
Ok. Volevo solo che ne foste consapevoli e che ci pensaste e che ci rifletteste sulle possibili implicazioni per il piano di volo. Poi vi mostrerò questo grandangolo e il commento sulla Luna e vedrò quali sezioni ritengono più appropriate. Ok. Sulla pergamena, Frank voleva che verificassimo l'ordine in cui poteva aspettarsi di vedere il profilo di ingresso, e il primo profilo che appare è etichettato "Nonexit Numero 2" e si tratta dell'ingresso a corto raggio e ad alta velocità. Il secondo profilo che apparirà è intitolato "The 3500 Mile" che è anche un ingresso ad alta velocità, ma è quello che usereste nel caso in cui dovessimo raggiungere distanze di ingresso più lunghe. Poi il terzo profilo sarà "Nonexit Entry Numero 1", seguito da un quarto da 3500 miglia. Quindi avete quattro profili di ingresso. I numeri 1 e 3, man mano che li incontrate, sono i brevi raggi, mentre i numeri 2 e 4 sono i raggi a lungo raggio. Per quanto riguarda il coldsoak, credo che abbiamo parlato di cosa faremo lì, ma da qualche parte entro un'ora circa, vorremo entrare nel vivo della questione. Di certo non vogliamo farlo a mezzanotte. Parlando con gli addetti alla traiettoria - cosa ne pensano dell'ebollizione dell'acqua - una cosa da tenere a mente è il fatto che vedono i tuoi scarichi d'acqua e l'acqua che bolle sul tuo grafico della traiettoria. Sembra che sia una funzione del loro schema di calcolo piuttosto che una funzione del fatto che la traiettoria venga perturbata c
रॉजर। समझ गया कि अभी तक आपका लॉक-ऑन नहीं हुआ है और आप 270 भेजने से पहले थोड़ा इ
Wenn wir uns hier draußen im freien Bereich befinden, wenn wir definitiv außerhalb des Scanbereichs sind, werde ich die manuelle und automatische Zielerfassungssequenz aufrufen und auf REACQ umschalten, um zu sehen, was b
罗
好的，Vance。D
أيها
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Com Tech. Ich höre Sie 
... um 16
Apollo 11, this is Houston. If you have a minute or so free, we can read you 
11番、ヒューストン。エントリーパッドや消耗品など、いくつかご用意しております。準備が整いましたら、これらのアイテムに取り掛かる準備ができま
Хорошо. Теперь мы приблизим изображение кратера под названием Шуберт Н. У кратера Шуберт Н очень конические внутренние стенки, а дно каж
Der verbleibende Treibstoff bet
Хьюстон, Аполлон-13. Я почти готов к люб
Roger
Roger. Vorremmo che il tuo interruttore di lettura della quantità fosse acceso e che ci fosse anche 
Ok. Credo che l'attrezzatura di cui avrai bisogno saranno due bombolette di idrossido di litio del modulo di comando, un rotolo di nastro adesivo grigio, le due s, perché useremo i sacchetti della s, e una - una scheda di segnalazione - una di quelle schede di cartone che taglierai a circa 3,5 cm dal ring. Ora, credo che sia 
حسنًا. هذا سيكون لفتحة تهوية أخيرة في الخزان، لذا في أعلى ا
いいえ、ここにあるか確認させてください。パネル275まで降りて、CB MAIN A、BAT BUS A、CB MAIN B、BAT BUS Bを開きます。次にパネル250まで降りて、CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDINGとBAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDINGを引き、次にパネル5まで上がって、SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN A、SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN B、BATTERY CHARGER BAT B CHARGE、BATTERY CHARGER BAT A CHARGEを引きます。そして閉じます。RENDEZVOUS RADAR TRANSPONDER FLIGHT BUSとS-BAND TRANSMITTER/FLIGHT BUSを閉じる必要が
C'est l'Amitié Sept. Affirmative. J'ai Orio
And if you can find the, then by all means, track it or make a note of where it was and we can track it on the next REV. If you are ready, we have a update that we can pa
確認。「押す」の手順1、1行目を削除。4行目「DESCENT HELIUM R
제대로 하세요. 시간을 충분히 가지세요
Хорошо, теперь я не буду... я не буду с вами разговаривать, так что... Вы правы? Вы не хотите, чтобы я подключался, вы хотите, чтобы я просто
ठीक है। मेरे लिए इसमें आगे बढ़ना बहुत आसा
Roger. Point suivant: le taux de montée en pression de l'hélium supercritique est nominal. Vous nous avez également interrogés sur l'activité de vos propulseurs lors de la dernière rotation. Nous comprenons maintenant: vous avez indiqué que le tangage était en mode ACCEL COMMAND et le lacet et le roulis en mode RATE COMMAND. Vous actionniez vos propulseurs de tangage. Cela couple les vitesses de rotation aux axes de lacet et de roulis, et – vous ne mainteniez alors qu'une zone morte d'un demi-degré seulement. Le couplage des vit
- 그리고 그는 맛있는 오렌지 음료를 마십니다. 어쩌면 그가 오렌지 음료
うわー、すごく楽しんでるみたいですね。キャリブレーションを送信するので、しばらく静かにしてくだ
जेमिनी VI. हम अ
Okay, 13; Houston. I think we could use an f-stop lo
非常感谢B
D'accord. Si… voyons, si… Je ne comprends pas votre dernier commentaire. Si nous rencontrons un pr
Roger, understand,
Ok. Te ne mando uno. Modalit
Okay. Ich wurde kurz unterbrochen. Bob Hope ist wieder mit seinen Truppen in Vietnam und leistet wie immer hervorragende Arbeit. Ein Name, der hier in den Nachrichten auftaucht, stammt von der USS New Jersey. Bob Hope scherzte gestern – oder Mittwoch – von einem riesigen Geschützturm herab, um die 1500 Mann an Bord des Schlachtsch
双子座八号，休斯顿 CAP COM。
- - 고이득을 얻기 위한 롤 보정을 진행 중이며, 현재 고이득에 적합한 자세를 찾기 위해 계
L'heure de
Мы находимся под углом 90 градусов к оси X, и нам нужно отдалиться на 1000 фу
알겠습니다. 8시 23분부터 8시 33분까지, 그리고 8시 14분부터 8시
D'accord. Passez au suivant. Nous voulons que l'o
Gemin
D'accord, Jack, surveilles-tu les températures du quad dans le quad A - l
Ok, eccoci qui. Blocco note: Pacifico medio, 000153; 000. Le due righe successive saranno q
Okay. Apollo 8, Sie können die Lüfter im Wasserstofftank abstellen, und wir sind bereit, mit d
ठीक है। यह अच्छा लगा, जिम। अगर आपको 
吉姆，我们目前的计划是不去纠正这个问题。我们会接受现状
D'accord. Nous allons couper le disjoncteur de fonctionnement, vous ne pourrez donc pas voir notre orientation. Par conséquent, vous ne nous indiquerez pas comment changer d'antenne et nous activerons le SQUELCH. Je vais désactiver le SQUELCH afin que, dès que nous capterons des parasites, nous changions d'antenne. En règle générale, lorsque la Terr
Das ist clever. – Die Wetterkamera ist endlich draußen. Die erste Aufnahme ist unbrauchbar, also wechsle ich sie. – Okay. Der Slider ist draußen. Wetterfilter rein, wenn ich ihn hinkriege. Diese Seite zum Objektiv. So, Filter drin. Ich fotografiere mit AS
That's right. It is one of the few that is. The center window, unfortunately, is all fogged over; it looks like a coating of ice or coating of heavy fog. Bill claims i
了解、ジャック。緯度はマイナス21.62度、経度はマイナス165.37度です。これは、あなたが私たちにく
रॉजर। समझ गय
Je suis p
Je vais
Houston, Sie sehen hier eine Aufnahme der Erde unterhalb des Mondhorizonts. Wir folgen einer Bahn bis zum Terminator, wo wir das Raumschiff drehen und Ihnen die lang besch
أ
Хорошо. ОСВЕЩЕНИЕ: ПРОЖЕКТОР, ОСНОВНОЙ
目前为止控制效果极佳。非常好，到目前为
ジム、1時間ほど前に食
Okay. Bereich 27-2 96. 2+02. 08 27 55. 6+35. 10+58. Bereich 28-2: ΔV 111. 2+20. 10 02 54. 4+50. 9+39. Bereich 29-2: Okay, dies ist ein geteiltes ΔV. Vorwärts 66. Rückwärts 61. 1+48. 1+17. GMTRC 11 37 05. 3+43. 08+59. Bereich 24-DELTA: ΔV 89. 1+53. 03 45 30. 11+03. Bereich 25-DELTA: 86. 1+49. 05 19 09. 09+51. 26-BRAVO, Bereich 26-BRAVO: Split ΔV. 66 vorn 104 achtern. 1+48. 2+10. 07 40 28. 8+54. Bereich 27-DE
起初，由于需要进行另一次规避机动，我们无法按计划立即开始观测。抛射物在目标区域产生了大量的伪星，使得光学校准几乎不可能。我们之前研究的方法似乎不太奏效。我最终采用的方法是进入天狼星轨道（我们最亮的恒星），取回轴和耳轴，然后驾驶航天器飞向天狼星，利用它们进行光学校准，这项工作我们稍
了
わかりました。セカンダリー・ラド・インは70度、つまり約72度と伝えました。ラド・アウトは約30度、グリコール蒸発温度は約65度、蒸気圧は最大で、グリコール排出圧力は約9psiです。アキュムレーター（セカンダリー・アキュムレーター・スーツ）は約52度、キャビンは約58度、圧力はスーツが4.1度、キャビンが5度です。CO2分圧は1を少し超える約1.1度
わかりました。手順の最後に、BAT 5と6をオフにした後
Это «Сигма Семь», демонстрирующая эффект полета вверх ногами на рассвете, с рысканием на 90 градусов. Для вас это самое очевидное — направление вашего движения. Как будто вы смотрите в окно поезда. Вы видите проплывающий мимо ландшафт. Там облака самых разных типов. Я вижу, как они проносятся мимо меня, находясь под углом 90 градусов — под углом -90 градусов к продольной оси аппарата. Очень, очень наглядное отображение рыскания. Сейчас, когда я разворачиваюсь, мой тупой конец начинает принимать правильное положение по рысканию, хотя я и перевернут.
Weather photography... at about 24 - 00:41 on the first day. A whole series of... clouds in a very peculiar pattern down on the ground. The light wasn't very good so I used a
Que diriez-vous de passer 
Yes, it's going
分かりました。
쌍둥이자리 4,... 저
C'est e
बिल ने ओम्नी कारों को सुचारू रूप से चलाने के लिए धन्यवाद 
Elle me paraît br
로저. 이제 당신 일은 끝났다는 걸 알려드리고 싶었어요. 그리고 저희 노드 상황과... 점검 사항에 대한 업데이
こんにちは、カナリアさん。UHFのフレンドシップ・セブンです。
Джим, Роджер. Мы только что определили,
मुझे लगता है कि उसने बस शिफ्ट
オーケー。バッテリーB 37.0、パイロA 37.0、パイロB 37.0、ヘリウム圧力 3400、窒素Aと窒素B ― 面白半分で付け加えると、それぞれ 2200 と 2400 です。インジェクター温度 ― スタンバイ ― 日が沈みました。オーケー。インジェクター温度 5 チャーリー 3.9、5 ドッグ 3.2、6 アルファ 3.6、6 ベイカー 3
Okay. Heute möchten wir, dass Sie vor den Beobachtungen, wie in den Verfahren beschrieben, und anschließend eine Zapfenabweichungsmessung durchführen. Wir möchten damit überprüfen, ob thermische Effekte die Winkelmessung im Sextanten verfälschen. Die zuvor ermittelte Abweichung sollte berücksichtigt werden. Fahren Sie mit Schritt 87 fort, sobald zwei au
Roger, 11. Ihre TV-Ausrichtung ist: Rollen 261°, Nicken 090°, Gieren 000°. Bei hohem Gewinnwinkel: Nicken +28°, Gie
Negative. We were just talking about that a few minutes ago. The humidity is staying low, about 60 to 63 percent, and there is no noticeable moisture. We've been doing a great deal 
Yes, we did. Based on your very excellent briefing I was expecting the thing to continue desiring increase for the whole time, so we started out with it in INCREASE. I saw that we prett
Non credo che sia un grosso problema; salta solo quando si passa in AUTO. Non credo che ci darà fastidio per l'ingresso. Io... io sto facendo la stessa cosa; sto controllando la mia checklist di ingresso. Una delle prime cose che vedo qui è un col
जी हाँ। जाहिर तौर पर वे किराए की कीमत पर सहमत न
كيف حالك يا صديقي القد
Гавайи, коммуникационные
双子座4号，休斯顿
ヒューストン、ジェミニVII
收到，昴星团已经出现在
Eh bien, avec une constellation pareille… C'est une grande cons
ح
フレン
Okay. Sehr gut, Jack. U
Hall
أين الآخر؟ سأعيده إ
Hallo, Wassermann. La
Я вас прекрасно понимаю. Полет 
Передайте Джею и Дэвиду, что я вес
Sie sind nicht – si
ヒューストン、この水準器を使っても正確な水準器を出すのは無理だと思う。BBが入っているこのカップは、
コリンズも持っているが、
Apollo 8, ici Houst
più 44, / 62970, meno 162, più 129, più 00197, più tutti zeri, più 60701 180 133 001, più 00203, più 60701
今、やっと出てきました。荷物を全部出し終えたばかりで、もし必要になったとしても航空医療パスを取得する
Con tutte le altre procedure su cui hai lavorato, ho 
और एक और सवाल, ह्यूस्टन। जब आप पावर डाउन या पावर डाउन कहते हैं, तो क्या आपका मतलब 06 में जाना है या मल
Guarda quella cosa; è proprio lì che la voglio. Cosa ne pensi? Un po'
알겠습니다. 요컨대,
Another thing, Jim, is while you're maneuvering to that attitude using to control your yaw, if you find out enroute to that attitude th
罗
네, 다시 UHF-hi로 돌아왔습니다. 말씀하신 대로 일출 때 보셨던 반딧불이가 
好的。在单引擎推进器（SEP）启动前 1 小时，进行以下姿态机动：横滚 130°；俯仰 125°；偏航 1
Это запись с «Дружбы Севен». На окнах много грязи от ретро-пожара, и многое здесь выглядит так, будто мы, возможно, раздавили каких-то насекомых даже по пути с площадки. Похоже на кровь на внешней стороне окна, может быть. Это делает
네... 저 사람들이 저보고 플랫폼을 정렬하라고 했어요.
حسنًا يا مايك. أعتقد أننا ما زلنا نرى - ما تقوله هو أنه ما زلنا نرى الكثير من قطرات الماء، ول
紙を一
Ich hole mal ein Blatt 
حسنًا، إذا غلى الماء، فسنعرف ذلك مسبقًا - لن يطول بنا الوقت لنكتشف أنه لن يغلي. ليس بوسعنا فعل الكثير حيال ذلك، فلماذا لا ننتظر حتى يستيقظ شخص آخر هنا، حتى يستيقظ فرانك مجددًا
Yes, okay. Understand they
Il nostro unico commento, Joe, è stato che la combustione, a nostra conoscenza, è stata di circa 3-3/4 secondi più lunga di quanto previsto e questa è stata l'unica cosa che abbiamo notato; altrimenti, sembrava che PI [?] fosse nominal
D'accord, Houston. Nous avons besoin de votre appel pour que Jack pu
Роджер, «Дружба Семь»,
ठीक है। जब हमने एसी पावर स्विच को आईजीएस से एसीएमई पर किया - इससे कंप्यूटर चालू नहीं होना चाहिए - तो कंप्यूटर की लाइट बंद हो गई। जब खराबी की लाइट जली, तो कंप्यूटर की लाइट फिर से जल गई और खराबी की लाइट जलती रही। थोड़ी देर में दोनों की रोशनी धीमी हो गई... 3 
Roge
これが水鉄砲です。先端の円筒形の部分は、複数の膜で構成され
This is Apollo 8, coming to you live from the moon. We've had to switch the TV cameras now. We showed you first a view of earth as we've been watching it for the past 16 hours. Now we're switching so that we can show you the moon that we've been flying over at 60 miles altitude for the last 16 hou
Okay. Holen wir uns
ロジャー、トランクウィリティ。T8、114 30 57; T9、116 29 10; T10、118 27 23; T11、120 25 36; T12、122 23 49。読み上げ。
Il casco e i guanti si trovano nella borsa del portello, la grande borsa che si trova sotto il divano sinistro in cui 
Il Salton Sea è il punto più a nord che riesco 
了解しました。そうします
ヒューストン、
好的，就这
Apollo 8, Houston. Demande de désa
Je vous ai bien compris, Bill. Je n'ai pas entendu
यह बिल्कुल सही है, और अब पूरे चंद्रमा के आसपास का क्षेत्र, आकाश और स्वयं चंद्रमा, 
MOTEURS DE CARTER, INCLIN
계
Mike, un punto di vista interessante sugli avvistamenti del NAV: manovrare con il controller a impulso minimo sulla via del
尼尔，我一直没注意外面——我的眼
不，没关系。
双子座
Хорошо. «Это была ночь перед Рождеством, и в открытом космосе экипаж «Аполлона-8» только что выиграл лунную гонку; наушники были аккуратно развешаны у пультов, в надежде, что Крис Крафт скоро будет там; Фрэнк Борман уютно устроился в своей постели, а в его голове мелькали образы; Джим Ловелл на диване, а Андерс в отсеке ломали голову над экраном компьютера, когда из ниоткуда раздался такой грохот, что Фрэнк вскочил с кровати, чтобы посмотреть, что случилось. Он молниеносно полетел к секстанту, чтобы убедиться, что они не разобьются. Свет на изрезанной лунной коре придавал серой лунной пыли блеск зелен
OK, les notes a-c et d-c sont toutes dans le vert. 
C'est fe
Okay, we're just now 
네, 이
Apollo 1
11, we concur that having, up on the may well have had some effect on your initiation. It looks like this would give - let the computer work with a knowledge of the actual CDU angles.
Кен, у нас тут две особенности, которые немного меняют схему работы теплообменника для скафандра. Во-первых, мы не используем холодную термическую обработку, а во-вторых, мы отключаем вторичный контур перед эт
هذه الكاميرا ذات الـ 16 ملم، يا باز، مع عد
Gemini 4，休斯顿 
Nous t'avons perdu, V
フレンドシップ・セブン、こちらはカナリア・キャプコム。150ボルトアンペアのインバーターは1
Ok. Lasciamo che sia l'automatismo a
جيميني 4، غوايماس CAP COM. هل ستضع مفتاح ا
Что бы ты хотел посмотреть, Вэнс
음, 지금은 모니터를 볼 수가 없네요. 초점을 맞춰서 보겠지만, 지금은 쿼드콥터 하나와 안테나
Ge
Okay. Step 2: "BALANCE COUPLE, OFF; DEAD BAND, MINIMUM; ATTITUDE CONTROL: PITCH and ROLL to PULSE; YAW to DIRECT; MODE CONTROL:, ATT HOLD; GU
D'accord. Concernant le passage +35, la mise à jour que je souhaite vous communiquer concerne
巴兹，我们能很清楚地看到连接处的连接线了。我们看到你现在正在放大看其中一个贴纸。上面写着：“重置方法：打开手柄；扣
D'accord. Tout d'abord, sur le panneau 11, fermez le disjoncteur de l'antenne bande S. Ensuite, allez à la section Activation, page 28, activat
ق
У нас вышел из строя мультиплексор, и мы не можем считывать показания нескольких температур здесь,
罗杰，七号。我没看到你的手动燃油读数。你刚才有点断断续续的。你能把读
Houston, Acquario. 
Fokus, ich stelle auf Unendlich, un
Jim, it's volts and amps time again, at 
ログ。君を見失いそうだ。空中でも地上でも見失いそうだ。この際
E Buzz, tra circa mezz'or
嘿，弗雷德。约翰说你可以用上面的楔子
Rog
हम तस्वीरें
धन्य
Okay. Wir würden auch gerne die pr
Ha! Ha! I still have black skid marks on my swim fins from your trip into the bush. Okay, you can see I've yawed right again. I need to come - correction, yawed left. I need to come right, the moon is right on the horizon. I'll put it right on again, just to show you how easy it is to acquire. I seem to be holding up on my fuel minimum so I'll go ahead and play with it a little bit here. Okay, we're just about on in yaw, and still off in roll. I'll slap her in and we'll have it made. Here comes roll to straighten her up. Coming up on roll - okay, I'm quitting right there. That's about as good as I'll ever give you. Little off in roll here. There we go. Now, that's what I would give you. Okay, I'm gonna go back to gyros normal, and let them come back on the line. I'm going to set up now and uncover the instruments for chimpanzee configurations. Dammit, I'm sorry, auto mod
فريندشيب سفن، هذا هو 6 سبانغ 8
... j'ai essayé d'alerter quelqu'un, n'importe qui, sur les ondes HF pour
五分钟指示灯亮了。这
No. Sembra piuttosto buono. Vorremmo avere un percorso pa
로저. 연료 전지 2의 RAD OUT 온도는 약 90도 정도이고, 1번과 3번은 이보다 약간 낮은 75도나 80
西格玛七号。自动二
रॉजर। यहाँ सब कुछ सामान्य लग रहा है। सब ठीक दिख रहा है। ऑटो फ्यूल 55 प्रतिशत है। 70,000 फीट, 65,000 फीट से गुजर रहा हूँ। स्थिति बहुत स्थिर है। 60 (हजार) फीट के करीब पहुँच रहा हूँ। रेट कमांड बहुत अच्छा काम कर रहा है। 50 (हजार) फीट के करीब पहुँच रहा हूँ। सब कुछ बढ़िया लग रहा है। 45,000 फीट के करीब पहुँच रहा हूँ। दबाव लगभग 1 जी पर आ गया है। 40, 41 (हजार) फीट पर स्पीड बढ़ाने की तैयारी क
Bien. La manœuvr
क्यू कार्ड पर एक नंबर लिखा होता है। यकीन मानिए, हमारा पेशेवरों से मुकाबला करने का कोई इरादा नहीं है। वैसे, हम यहाँ बहुत आराम से हैं। हमारा घर बहुत खुशहाल है। हम तीनों के लिए काफी जगह है और मुझे लगता है कि हम सभी बैठने के लिए अपना पसंदीदा कोना ढूंढ रहे हैं। शून्य गुरुत्
रॉज
好的，记录一下。我觉得很有意思。透过气辉滤镜，这层薄
Ok, grazie. Ti faremo sapere se qualcosa non va. Sono sicuro
途中修正はキャンセルされ
روجر. هذا صحيح. لديّ تحديث بخصوص المواد الاستهلاكية لك يا جيم، إذا كنت مستعدًا
ओडिसी, ह्य
Okay. Jack hat die 250-V-Sicherungsautomaten für die Anschlüsse BAT A und BAT B eingeschaltet. Er hat die Spannung an den Batterieschienen mit 32,3 V an A und 37,0 V an B abgelesen. Anschließend hat er die 275-V-Sicherungsautomaten eingeschaltet, die die Batterien mit den Hauptschienen verbinden. In dieser Konfiguration liegen an Hauptschiene A 32,0 V und null Ampere 
Wunderbar. Freu
كيف تعتقد 
41 Minuten. Wir wechseln zum primären Scanner im Horizontscan, wobei kein nennenswerter Unterschied zwischen dem primären und dem sekundären Scanner besteht; in 50 Minuten wechseln wir zum primären CATCH-UP 
एड ने सामान खोलना शुरू किया और जैसे ही हम उस स्थिति में पहुँचे जहाँ बूस्टर के साथ छेड़छाड़ करना संभव नहीं था, मैंने पूरी तरह से उसकी मदद करना शुरू कर दिया - कम से कम सामान पकड़कर उसे सही जगह पर रखना और उसे गायब होने से बचाना। जितनी तेज़ी से हम काम करते, उतना ही हम पीछे होते चले जाते। ऐसा इसलिए नहीं था कि हम चीज़ों को सही जगह पर नहीं रख रहे थे, बल्कि इसमें हमारी उम्मीद से कहीं ज़्यादा समय लग रहा था। जीरो ग्रेविटी में यह सिम्युलेटर की तुलना में ज़्यादा आसान नहीं था, हालाँकि उतना ही आसान था। इसलिए हमने पूरा चक्कर लगाया। जब तक हम कार्नार्वोन पहुँचे, मैंने मन बना लिया था कि हम वहाँ नहीं पहुँच पाएँगे, लेकिन मैंने स
收到。很好，Fred-o。这样就进入第 8 步了，当你按下 PRO 键时，屏幕上会闪烁 5018。好的。在 5018 位置，我们要进行一次自动姿态机动，所以只需按下 PRO 键，选择“引导控制”、“PNGS”、“模式控制”、“PNGS”、“自动”，然后我们将姿态调整到这个位置。现在，这将使我们处于太阳检查的姿态。在这个程序中，我们在对接配置下设置了 1.4 度的死区；为了帮助你，你可以调高指针，当指针经过零点或归零，进入死区时，你就可以查看太阳的距离了。我们希望误差在正负 1
Négatif, négatif. Ils sont très lents; ils ne s'éloignent pas de moi à plus de 5 ou 6 kilomètres par heure. Ils roulent à peu près à la même vitesse que moi. Ils sont à peine 
ठीक है। कृपया S बैंड फ़ंक्शन को रेंज मोड पर स्विच करें। हम आपकी रेंजिंग जाँचने जा रहे हैं। साथ ही, जब आप कॉपी करने के लिए तैयार हों, तो मेरे 
Vous allez à
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। आपको सूचित किया जाता है कि आपकी मित्रवत व्हाइट टीम अपनी पहली शिफ्ट के लिए आ गई है, और यदि हम
I think you did th
हम न्यूनतम डेडबैं
لماذا لا أقوم ببساطة بإيقاف 
RKV, we either have Sirius or VII in sight! It's right in the middle of the reticle. Ra
さあ、RKV。ジェミニ4号
당신은 조금 
Ricevuto. Alle 74:30, vorremmo che attivaste le ventole in tutti e quattro i serbatoi CRYO e posizionaste i riscaldatori in tutti e quattro i serbatoi CRYO in posizione AUTO. Lo faremo in anticipo per assic
अपोलो 8, कंप्यूटर का काम पूरा हो गया है। आप ब्लॉक पर वापस जा सकते हैं, और ऐसा लगता है कि अब आप
Нет, это, вероятно, произойдёт после тог
Apollo 11, this is Ho
روج
Sembra che 
Roger e Mark, ora una lettura del tensiometro. È la corda più 
Roger. Apollo 8, on your backside data, it's pretty much unintelligible. We suggest, Bill, that you recheck the position of your mike for your backside pass a
OAMS Heaters's circuit breaker c
Nella seconda orbita su Zanzibar, ore 15:23 Zulu. L'azimut dovrebbe essere
吉姆，稍等片刻。我们还需要几分钟才能把那份文件读给你听。我们正在查看应急检查清单，它在第5页。在我们准备把它交给你的时候，你可能正
相机已收好。光度计很轻，可以取出来就放在那里。在结束之前，我还要再检查一下这个低级设备。它的读数增加了大约一根线的粗细，现在是0.06，小于0.1。这些东西现在都要放进手套箱里；它们之前放在舱门上，靠近紧急加速手柄的舱门弹簧旁边。它
यह ज़ांज़ीबार कैप कॉम है, ज़ांज़ीबार कै
わかりました。もしそれが彼らの推奨なら、試
罗杰。我想知道你倒了多少东西。这样我才能知道……所有这些事情是否进展顺利，或者我们是否已经找到了
我也
Наверное, имен
ठीक है। चलिए देखते हैं कि मैंने सब कुछ सही समझा है या नहीं। सबसे पहले, हमें CB 16 INVERTER 2 को बंद करना है, CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2 को भी बंद करना है। फिर पैनल 14 पर, INVERTER 2 के चयन की पुष्टि करें। और CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2 को भी बंद करें, दोनों ब्रेकर। फिर हमें RENDEZVOUS RADAR RELEASE हैंडल को खींचना है। पैनल 3 पर, हमें RENDEZVOUS RADAR को चालू करना है। सभी ज़िप कोड क
Roger, Wally, avete qualcosa da dire a tutti, vi guardano da ogni parte del Paese per qu
了解。TRは地面と完全に同期してい
幸运的是，你什么都弄到了一点。我是说，那些石头——我是
Je suis actuellement à 
Да, Фред, подтверждаю. Нам это нич
私たちは X 軸から 90 
Roger, Mike. Il semble que si nous avancions l'heure de largage et vous confions une nouvelle charge, cela nécessiterait une nouvelle approche, ce qui est impossible car la zone est déjà fermée. De plus, l
«Аполлон-8
네, 알, 잘 버텨준 것 같아요. 괜찮았던 것 같습니다. 자이로가 완벽하지 않아서 뭐가 문제였는지는 정확히 말씀드릴 수 없지만, 역추진 관련해서는 퓨즈 스위치 3개가 켜져 있습니
Roger. Mighty fine. Break. The weather forecast in the landing area right now is 2000 scatter
좋아요, 잘 읽었어요, 프레드. 15초 뒤에 "MASTER ARM - OFF"를 지우고, "엔진 정지 시"로 넘어가는 부분에서 "MODE CONTROL
Okay. Ich wollte Sie nur darauf hinweisen und Sie bitten, darüber nachzudenken und die möglichen Auswirkungen auf den Flugplan zu bedenken. Ich lasse Ihnen dann die Weitwinkelaufnahme und die Kommentare zum Mond vorab durchgehen und sehe, welche Abschnitte am besten geeignet erscheinen. Okay. Frank bat uns, die Reihenfolge der Eintrittsprofile auf der Bildrolle zu überprüfen. Das erste Profil ist mit „Nonexit Nummer 2“ beschriftet und stellt den Kurzstrecken-Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt dar. Das zweite Profil heißt „3500 Meilen“ und ist ebenfalls ein Hochgeschwindigkeitseintritt, der jedoch für längere Eintrittsstrecken verwendet wird. Das dritte Profil ist „Nonexit Eintritt Nummer 1“, gefolgt von einem vierten, ebenfalls 3500 Meilen langen Eintrittsprofil. Es gibt also vier Eintrittsprofile. Die Nummern 1 und 3 sind die Kurzstrecken, die Nummern 2 und 4 die Langstreckeneintritte. Beim Kaltstart haben wir, glaube ich, schon besprochen, wie wir da vorgehen werden. Ungefähr in einer Stunde wollen wir uns damit befassen. Auf keinen Fall um 12 Uhr. Wir haben mit den Trajektorienexperten gesprochen – was sie vom „Wasserkochen“ halten – und dabei ist zu beachten, dass sie die Wassereinbrüche und das „Wasserkochen“ in der Trajekt
そうですか、ここで言われているのは、戻ってくるたびに再訓練を受けなけれ
On the right-hand half of the page, cross out the "Orbital science block," and under that "Visual target 1 south 
Джим снова начинает видеть дневную сторону, и
कोलंबिया, कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। अनुरोध करें और स्व
そうだね
I'v
Okay, Vance. Stai dicendo che dovremmo iniziare con la PREP nel manuale di emergenza a circa, e ne parlerò tra un minuto con Jim e poi ti risponderemo. Quando siamo in assetto di accensi
Хорошо. Теперь я использую Луну, которая находится слева от меня, и это очень удачное решение. Я просто закрою индикатор положения в пространстве, и вы сможете наблюдать за рысканием. Я отключу гироскопы, пытаясь выбрать режим полета по проводам на малой высоте. Сначала я помещу Луну в центр окна, удерживая крен и тангаж, а затем верну Луну на место. В этот момент Луна приближается к центру окна. Хорошо, я остановлю ее там, и мы включим управление креном, чтобы сбалансировать положение. Хорошо, в этот момент у меня будет нулевой крен. Я промахн
Ici Sigma Seven, enregistrement VOX uniquement. J'ai réactivé le mode automatique en mode normal, sans action sur les propulseurs. Actuellement, le mode automatique est à 85 %, le mode manuel à 90 %. Maintenant que je suis en vol, je peux enfin faire des expériences que je ne pouvais pas faire auparavant. Je vais maintenant piquer du nez avec les commandes de vol électriques au minimum. Je vais d'abord vérifier que si j'active mes balises, personne ici ne pourra me contacter. Si quelqu'un en Amérique du Sud a émis une balise, il mérite de l'entendre. Les balises sont allumées, avec un
Роджер. Мы почувствовали рывок, когда вставили бак Б, не то чт
알겠습니다. 비상시에는 임시 난방 장치가 있고, 일반적인 경우에는 난방기 가동을 위해 15분 정도 요청하셔
了解。9-Cは04 36
Bonjour, Com Tech. Amitié Sept. Commen
रॉजर, रॉजर। आपकी आवाज़ सा
Okay. We're so efficient down here that we got an entry pad re
13
Roger, understand. Will you give me a list of your consumables, please?
Vorrei solo dire che, anche se per qualche mo
Et le disjoncteur ASCENT ECA sur le panneau 11? Jim l’a installé là-b
D'accord. On peut commencer? Puisque pour la première partie, vous allez s
30 分間のレポ
아직 1.5g 정도 남았습니다. 프로그
Use all the green tape, d
桑给巴尔，这里是Sigma
नील, यह ह्यूस्टन है। हम चाहते हैं कि आप सभी दो कोर ट्यूब और सौर पवन प्रयोग लें; दो कोर
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Wir empfangen Ihre FM-Verbindung noch nicht. Wir warte
了解しました。では、5、/ 45701、マイナス043、プラス116、プラス31171、マイナス00767、マイナス00214 180 017 001、NA、プラス00188 31181 259 31003 40 2711 398 033、下043、左23、プラス0
デッドバンドは以前ほどき
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 화이트 팀이 연결되었습니다
Хорошо, следующая страница, 16. Это продолжение той же темы солнечной короны
分かりま
Если ты можешь его разбудить, почему бы тебе не попросить его спросить в подсобк
알겠습니다. 먼저, 찰리 씨 쪽에서 전원을 공급하는 절차를 거쳐야 합니다
La nostra piattaforma è la seguente: sorvolo, /G&N; 63385; più 0,97, meno 0,23;; più 0212,7, meno 0141,7, meno 0254,8; 148, 316, 050; NA, più 0022,5; 0360,9, 0:53, 0356,3; 33, 352,7, 15,0; NA, NA, NA; meno 23,26, meno 165,00; 1147,7, 36172; 166:54:02; stelle impostate 31, 23; rollio 288, beccheggio 205, imbardata 034; nessun ullage;
ठीक है, जैक। समझ गया। बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। वैसे, जैस
C'
Okay, Vance. Questo dovrebbe complet
Okay. Looking over the weather I gave you was - the 2000 foot sc
حسنًا. هل سنستخدم نفس الأساليب التي نستخدمها عادةً للتنشيط؟ بمعنى آخر، أحاول الحفاظ على وضعية معينة، وأعطيه بعض الزوايا، ث
よし、00050 を引いて、すべてゼロを足し、00001 000 334 001 
11番、ヒューストン。エントリーパッドや消耗品など、い
ومن الأمور الرائعة يا جاك، خاصةً بالنسبة لشخص مبتدئ مثل
- - etwas früh
Ap
Roger, bien reçu, Jim. Nous restons joignables sur tous ces sites isolés. Je vous appellerai simplement pour vous dire: « À 
D'accord, Frank, on dirait que ça arrive tout droit. Ça fonctionne comme prévu, et apparemme
Was du siehst, Mike, ist – Houston, was du siehst, ist die westliche Hemisphäre. Ganz oben ist der Nordpol; in der Mitte – etwas tiefer – Südamerika – bis hinunter zum Kap Hoorn. Ich kann Baja California und den Südwesten der Vereinigten Staaten sehen. Eine große, langgestreckte Wolkenbank zieht nach Nordosten, bedeckt weite Teile des Golfs von Mexiko und reicht bis in de
रॉजर। जनसंपर्क कार्यालय की ताज़ा ख़बरें: अपोलो 11 अभी भी दुनिया भर की खबरों में छाया हुआ है। केवल चार देशों - कम्युनिस्ट चीन, उत्तर कोरिया, उत्तर वियतनाम और अल्बानिया - ने अभी तक अपने नागरिकों को चंद्रमा पर आपकी उड़ान और लैंडिंग की सूचना नहीं दी है। एक पत्रकार ने कहा कि आपकी सफलता का वर्णन करने के लिए उनके पास शब्द कम पड़ गए हैं। आज रात, राष्ट्रपति निक्सन वाशिंगटन में ऑल स्टार बेसबॉल मैच देखने वाले हैं। मैच के बाद, वे प्रशांत क्षेत्र में राहत कार्य के लिए रवाना होंगे। बुधवार शाम को, वे जॉनस्टन द्वीप से हेलीकॉप्टर द्वारा नौसेना के संचार पोत अर्लिंगटन के लिए उड़ान भरेंगे। फिर गुरुवार सुबह, वे हेलीकॉप्टर में सवार होकर हॉर्नेट पर उड़ान भरेंगे और समय पर आपके जलप्रपात के साक्षी बनेंगे। राष्ट्रपति के साथ विदेश मंत्री विलियम रॉजर और फ्रैंक बोरमैन भी होंगे। वे प्रशांत बलों के कमांडर एडमिरल जॉन सिडनी मैक्केन जूनियर के साथ राहत पोत के पुल से जलप्रपात देखेंगे। हॉर्नेट पर कुछ समय बिताने के बाद, राष्ट्रपति एशिया के अपने दौरे और रोमानिया की निर्धारित यात्रा के लिए रवाना होंगे। माना जा रहा है कि लूना 15 कल चंद्रमा के 52 चक्कर लगाने के बाद संकट सागर में गिर गया। सोवियत समाचार एजेंसी TASS ने बताया कि "
D'accord. Sur le disjoncteur du panneau 16, les deux bornes d'alimentation de la batterie sont ouvertes. Écoutez attentivement les signaux de haute et basse tension: batterie 1, haute tension, puis arrêt/réinitialisation; batterie 2, basse tension, pu
取り出すには振り返らなければな
ठीक है। लगभग 5 मिनट के लिए हमारा टी
Роджер, Фрэнк. Причина в том, что для калибровки горизонта требуется несколько точек, чтобы получить качественные данные для бортовой навигационн
わかった。解決策がある。4.5で、秒速10フィー
わかりました。背景のマス
トランスデューサー、グループ 1 
Roger. Auf dem TM hier haben wir einige Schwankungen festgestellt, die möglicherw
不，没关系，万斯。我想在我们担
Okay, Jack. Wir haben in wenigen Minuten ein Pad für dich. Wir erfassen gerade die Tracking-Daten, und obwohl wir vermuten, dass die Änderungen gegenüber deinem vorläufigen Pad sehr gering sein werden, empfehlen wir dir, mit der Initialisierung zu warten, bis wir di
Хорошо. Сегодня мы хотели бы, чтобы вы определили смещение цапфы до наблюдений, как указано в процедурах, а также после них. Наша цель — проверить возможность того, что какой-либо тепловой эффект может вызывать ошибки в угловых показаниях секстанта. Полученное ранее смещение следует учесть, то есть ПЕРЕЙТИ к пункту 87 после получения двух последовательных измерений, равных с точностью до 0,003 градуса. И, конечно же, сместите цапфу на пару градусов между измерениями. Земля сегодня должна быть намного меньше в вашем поле зрения. Я уверен, что вы гораздо лучше нас в этом разбираетесь, но 
알
Gemini 4, это связь с диспетчерской вышкой Хьюстона. Я вас не принимаю. Я передам последние два соо
Я только что повесила шторы. Так будет прохлад
Базз, мы получили... Единственное, чего нам не хватает, это проверки на скольжение. После того, как мы закончим погрузк
Questa è una pr
Извилистая борозда — это та 
Однако мы не можем определить, серый он 
D'accord. Concernant le chauffe-eau: c'est intéressant que j'aie le mien; j'allais justement dire que dès que notre micro est activé, je m'entends parler avec un décalage d'environ deux secondes. Pour ce qui est des vérifications des chaudières primaire et secondaire, je pense qu'il est judicieux de s'assurer que nous les avons effectuées toutes les deux ava
Хорошо. Шаг 6. «Переключитесь на питание (прожекторы погасн
哦，好的，我会的
네, 짐. 저기를 보면 배터리 3이 약 1암페어 정도만 소모하고 있는 것을 알 수 있습니
जो, जैक ने मुझे बताया कि उसे अभी भी ऑप्टिक्स से देखने में दिक्कत
Warten Sie kurz, Jack. Okay, Ja
少しプレイしてから、それについて話しましょう
جيميني 4، جي
Хорошо. -2, /G&N: 63634; плюс 0.96, минус 0.23,; минус 0.21.7, минус 0.001.7, м
13, ह्यूस्टन। आपकी 
ओह, मैं समझ गया। देखिए, क्या बिना लाइट जलाए रेटिकल दिख सकता है? ठीक है। हम जाँच करेंगे। और एक बात और, आप उस रेंडेज़वस रडार एंटीना को कि
Ja... es brannte... und was ich sah, löste sich in Luft auf. Da ist
알겠습니다. 플랫폼은 그대로 두고 컴퓨터 전원을 끄기로 했습니다. 전원 차
J'allais dire: « Je parie que les
스포츠 소식입니다. 휴스턴 오일러스는 커빌에서 진행 중인 프리시즌 훈련에서 열정적인 모습을 보여주고 있으며, 월리 렘 감독은 훌륭한 신
케이프 캡 컴, 
Wir haben e
確認しま
जी हाँ। जब आपको पता चल जाएगा कि आपने कितनी टेप डिलीट की है, तब आप हमें पूरी जानकारी दें
아, 그냥 CO2 센서 차단기를 닫고 Eagle에서 온보드 판독값을 알려주시면 되는 거였어
Die Kabinentemperatur und der Kabinenwasserdurchfluss sind komplett abgestellt und sinken jetzt wieder auf etwa 7,5, also etwas weniger. Derzeit wird der
روجر. المشاكل التي واجهتك حتى الآن تعود إلى مصدر غير معروف، ربما بسبب تحميل خلية المحور التي تبلغ الآن 91، لذا فهي لا تعكس زاوية المحور الحقيقية. لا نعتقد أن مشكلة التحميل هذه تؤثر على
了解、フレンドシップセブ
ठीक है। मैं फिक्स अपडेट और मैप अपडेट के साथ लगभग 15 मिनट पहले आ गया हूँ। जब भी आपको कॉपी करने में सुविधा हो, मैं इन्ह
Roger. Avez-vous donc effectivement 
Roger. Wir empfangen Ihre mündliche Temperaturmessung. Wir möchten, dass Sie die Temperaturmessung während d
Roger. Jim, il semblerait qu'ils veuillent garantir une
Ecco un piccolo articolo interessante che fa piacere sentire. Sembra che ad Ann Arbor, nel Michigan, abbiano una nuova gang giovanile. Si chiama Gilnet Gang. Si aggira per le strade di Ann Arbor, agendo in segreto e a volte aggirando la legge. Si fanno chiamare Guerillas for Good. Tra le cose che hanno fatto c'è stata quella di dipingere un ponte coperto di oscenità. L'hanno dipinto una notte. Una casa inagibile – popolare tra i bambini del quartiere, ma pericolosa – è stata sbarrata con assi di legno. Le fioriere del centro, rimaste vuote a causa di un dibattito su quale gruppo fosse responsabile, tra aziende o governo, sono state riempite di fiori. Una siepe, ritenuta ostruire la visuale, a un incrocio trafficato, è stata potata e il proprietario si è infuriato. I rifiuti lungo un tratto del fiume Huron sono stati raccolti. I membri della gang sono adolescenti anonimi che non chiedono alcun riconoscimento individuale. Il loro scopo è quello di eliminare la burocrazia, di ottenere risultati – buoni risultati, a loro avviso. L'organizzazione ha una vaga connotazione religiosa. È una sorta di gruppo ecumenico, ha detto un professore associato dell'Università del Michigan che funge da cassa di risonanza informale per le idee della gang. Il nome deriva da San Pietro, la Rete del Pescatore. Ed è abbastanza remoto da non essere identific
وأخيرًا، أبولو 13، هيوستن. أنصحك با
私のはまだクリ
Nous avons payé notre dette en
أرى توهجًا برتقاليًا. أظن أننا في 
لا يا فرا
Et, Eagle, Houst
Exactement. Et, pour votre information, le
네. 다음 페이지, 전원 7, 패널 16번입니다.
더할 나위
Ok, Odyssey; Houston. Ora siamo bloccati su un bit rate elevato e stabile; ripeti INVIO. Fine. Ritarda; tieni pre
同样的警报，而且
D'accord. Pouvez-vous nous s
Attends une minute. Il demande l'heure actuelle, et je ne peux p
रॉजर। कॉरिडोर कंट्रोल चार्ट के लिए औसत V 400K 36253 ह
لا، لم نتلقَّ هذه التعليمات. سأطلب من آرني أن يتحقق من الأ
7-3 はちょうど真ん中あたりにな
Roger, Buzz. We'd like you to place the S-band antenna OMNI A switch to the Bravo position. S-band antenna OMNI switch to the OMNI position, the high gain track to MANUAL, and the high gain angles will be yaw 270, pitch minus 50. Ov
E poi sembrava che ogni movimento apparente si fosse fermato e che probabilmente ci stessimo avvicinando. Così ho girato la navicella e ho tentato di allineare la piattaforma. Nel frattempo, il booster ha iniziato a scendere sotto di noi a una velocità piuttosto evidente. Così ho rinunciato a cercare di allineare la piattaforma per allinearci e s
لا، لم نقم بتعقيم الماء بالكلور بعد. سنحضر لك النوع الآخ
Это «Дружба Семь». Это «Дружба Семь», трансляция вслепую на сеть Mercury. 1, 2
此时机动[开关]关闭，我将手动调整至后
지금은 지평선이 아주 선명하게 보입니다. 하늘이 꽤 밝고, 지평선은 주로 구름으로 이루어져 있습니다. 구름 사이로 별들이 지평선 너머로 지는 모습이 보이지만, 구름 때문에 지평선이 더 밝게 보이는 것 같습니다. 비행 초반에는 구름 없는 지평선을 본 적이 있는데, 그때는
А Джек, переключись в режим BYPASS на радиаторах и выключи г
حسنًا. أعتقد أننا لم نكن موفقين تمامًا في توجيه المركبة الفضائية من الأرض. أعتقد أننا نستطيع فعل ذلك بشكل أفضل بكثي
Черт возьми
セブン、こちらはカントン・キャップ・コムで
Okay, Joe. Ich richte es rüber zu Jack, und es ist ziemlich hell, da draußen durch da
Джек, мы выключили нагреватель для слива сточных вод. Если ты собираешься сливать еще сточные воды, то, наверное, лучше сделат
...
Roger. Merci, Gemini 4. Retour à H
Ich glaube, Buzz hat wahrscheinlich recht. Tatsächlich habe ich einmal eine Markierung gesetzt, die mir etwas fehlerhaft vorkam, aber ich dachte: „Na ja, was soll’s. Ich probiere es trotzdem mal aus“, und bekam fünf Nullen. Und selbst wenn ich dachte, alles wäre absolut korrekt eingestellt, habe i
D'accord. Nous aimerions faire ça aussi. Attend
Да, именно это я и говорю — вы — это делает всё интереснее, понимаете. Думаю, мы провели для них несколько чте
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous n'avons aucune objection à procéder dès maintenant au déversement d'urine. Pour information, le déversement des eaux usées est reporté à une date ultérieure, ce qui vous permettra de remplir votre réservoir d'eaux usées à environ 90 %. C'est un peu plus que d'habitude, mais nous souhaitions attendre la fin de la combustion. Parmi les autres opérations à venir, il y
V
أنا بخير. انتظر، سأعود. هذا الأمر يعيقني. الكبسولة - أودّ حلّ هذه المشكلة التي لاحظتها بوضوح في دائرة البدلة. لم أوفق كثيرًا في خفضها. سأرفع الإعداد إلى 8 الآن. أنا على الإعداد 8 الآن - قبة البدلة الآن حوالي 81 درجة. لقد انخفضت درجة واحد
D'accord, ça a l'air bien. Donne-moi un VE
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 프레드, 커뮤니케이션에 대해 다뤘습니다. 다음으
Okay
D'accord, Jim. Voici une mise à jour du plan d
好的。我们现在停下来，调整姿态，准备进行光学校准。关于这
D'accord. Il faut vraiment être en mode MANUEL pour que ces indications fo
5,4,3,2,1. MARK! Brennvorgan
비행 경로에서 
फिर से बोलो। उस बार तुम्हारी आवाज़ अस्पष्ट थी। यह दोस्ती का सातवाँ चरण ह
Bene. Puoi ottenere quelle configurazioni quando puoi. E il prossimo punto all'ordine del giorno che ho per te è una procedura per verificare che il BUS 
Apollo 8, Houston through the
罗杰，弗兰克，你们现在在俯仰和偏航姿态保持模式下每小时消耗1.4磅的重量。我们很想知
알겠습니다
يا إلهي، من الصعب حقاً وصف شكل هذه الأرض. أنظر من نافذتي المركزية، وهي نافذة دائرية، والنافذة أكبر من الأرض نفسها الآن. أستطيع رؤية خط الفصل بين الليل والنها
Okay. Auf Feld 3: TRANSPONDER auf PRIMÄR; LEISTUNGSVERSTÄRKER auf PRIMÄR; LEISTUNGSVERSTÄRKER, HOCH; MODUS, SPRACHE, auf AUS; EIN/AUS 
从那里看比从弹道飞
Gemini 4, qui Houston CAP COM. Vorremmo ottenere un Medical Data Pass, Tipo 1, sul Pilota a un tempo trascorso di 6 ore e 12 minuti. Questo avverrà sopra il Texas. Saranno circa le 21:28:00 Z. Può impostare la sua temperatura orale e la contatteremo quando
Хорошо, Джо. Я заметил одну вещь: в паре цепей импульс... по крайней мере, их количество, за
Gemi
وأبولو ١١، هيوستن. فريقكم الأبيض الودود لديه معلومات عودتكم إلى الوطن، إذا كنتم مستعدين
هيوس
حسن
D'accord, Jack. C'est le panneau 3, ONDULEUR CA 2, PRINCIPAL B; ONDULEUR 2, BUS CA 2, activé; RÉINITIALISATION DU BUS CA 2: réinitialiser et centrer; CHARGEUR DE BATTERIE: A, INDICATEUR CA: sélectionner CHARGEUR DE BATTERIE. Indiquez l'ampérage et la tension toutes les 10 minutes pendant les 30 prem
我能感
分かりました。ヘリウム圧力は約37、マニホールド圧力は約182、燃料量は約80です。Bの温度は約112、ヘリウム圧力は約36.5、燃料圧力は約180、燃料量は約77です。Cの温度は140です。ちなみに、他の温度は110ではなく120であるべきでした。ここで間違ったキャリブレーション
I'll give you 
औ
Das ist bestätigt, wir haben es geschafft. Wir liefern Ihnen die Daten gleich. Wir haben den Sextanten-Sterncheck in der Eintrittslage bestanden und manövrie
سأعطيك هذا عندما أ
What you're seeing, Mike, is a - Houston, what you are seeing is the Western Hemisphere. Looking - at the top is the North Pole; in the center - just lower to the center is South America
로저. MIDPAC 진입 PAD: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, +1102, -17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 0028, DL 및 VL NA, 4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380, 전갈자리 델타 - 전갈자
Roger. From the hot wires of the Public Affairs Office: Apollo 11 still dominates the news around the world. Only four nations, Communist China, North Korea, North Viet Nam, and Albania, have not yet informed their citizens of your flight and landing on the Moon. One newsman said that he has run out of ways to describe your success. Tonight, President Nixon is scheduled to watch the All Star baseball game in Washington. After the game, he will depart for the Pacific recovery area. Wednesday evening, he will fly from Johnston Island by helicopter to the Navy communications ship Arlington. Then on Thursday morning, he will reboard the helicopter and fly to the Hornet in time to witness your splashdown. Accompanying the President will be Secretary of State William Rogers and Frank Borman. They will watch the splashdown from the bridge of the recovery ship with Admiral John Sidney McCain, Jr, Commander of the Pacific Forces. Following the President's stay aboard the Hornet, he will depart for his tour of Asia and scheduled visit to Romania. Luna 15 is believed to have crashed into the Sea of Crises yesterday after orbiting the Moon 52 times. The Soviet News Agency TASS reported that "scientific" "research in near Moon space was carried out." Sir Bernard Lovell at Jodrell Bank Observatory said that Luna 15 hit the surface of the Moon at a speed of about 300 miles per hour. Things have been relatively quiet recently in Viet Nam. GI's on patrol were observed carrying transistor radios tuned into your flight. The Armed Forces radio and TV network in Viet Nam gave the mission full coverage. Skirmishes still continue between the Egyptians and Israelis along the Suez Canal. U.N. observers there are trying to halt the action. In Washington, the House Ways and Means Committee has voted to reduce the 27.5 percent oil depletion allowance to 20 percent. We've had rain several times here in the Houston area. Today it is cloudy, and more showers are expected. On the sports front,
Ogni vol
「テープレコーダー」と「早送り録音」の間に「高ビットレートコマンドリセット」を挿入します
11, ये हॉर्नेट है। कॉपी। 11, हॉर्नेट। आपका स्प्लैशडाउन एरर क्या ह
Oui. Jim, pour info, je ne sais pas si tu étais au courant, mais ce réglage entre 2,5 et 1 a été effectué environ trois fois, et c'est assez serré. On a donc essayé d'éliminer ce qu'on pouvait, ce qui n'est pas grand-chose. Mais je pense que l'autre message que tu pourrais faire passer à
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。テ
Передайте в Хьюстон, пожалуйста, что у нас, по-видимому, перегорела л
Okay. Aus Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Das große britische Radioteleskop Jodrell Bank empfing heute um 5:49 Uhr EDT keine Signale mehr von der sowjetischen Mondsonde Luna 15. Ein Sprecher sagte, es scheine, als habe die Sonde den Mond bereits hinter sich gelassen. Ein weiteres Zitat: „Wir glauben nicht, dass sie gelandet ist“, sagte ein Sprecher von Sir Bernard Lovell, dem Direktor des Observatoriums. Washington UPI: Vizepräsident Spiro T. Agnew forderte, bis zum Jahr 2000 einen Menschen auf den Mars zu schicken. Demokratische Politiker entgegneten jedoch, dass die Bedürfnisse auf der Erde Priorität haben müssten. Agnew, ranghöchster Regierungsbeamter beim Start von Apollo 11 am Mittwoch, sprach offenbar für sich selbst und nicht unbedingt für die Nixon-Regierung, als er sagte: „Meiner Meinung nach sollten wir bis zum Ende dieses Jahrhunderts einen Menschen auf den Mars schicken.“ Laredo, Texas, AP: Einwanderungsbeamte in Nuevo Laredo gaben am Mittwoch bekannt, dass Hippies keine Touristenkarten für die Einreise nach Mexiko erhalten, es sei denn, sie baden und lassen sich die Haare schneiden. Huberto Cazaras, Leiter der mexikanischen Einwanderungsbehörde in Nuevo Laredo, berichtete, dass die Behörden in Mexiko-Stadt, Acapulco und anderen beliebten Touristenorten Beschwerden über die Hippies erhalten hätten. United Press International: Die erste Reaktion auf Präsident Nixons Entscheidung, Bundesangestellten am Montag einen Feiertag zu gewähren, damit sie den nationalen Gedenktag zur Apollo-11-Mondlandung begehen konnten, war überwiegend Überraschung. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, London: Europa ist vom Apollo-11-Ereignis begeistert. Zeitungen auf dem ganzen Kontinent füllen ihre Seiten mit Bildern der Saturn-V-Rakete, die zum ersten Mal eine Verbindung der Erde zu ihrem natürlichen Satelliten herstellte. Und die Schlagzeilenmacher suchten nach den passenden Worten, um diese Leistung zu würdigen. „Das größte Abenteuer in der Geschichte der Menschheit hat begonnen“, verkündete die französische Zeitung Le Figaro, die vier Seiten Berichten vom Cape Kennedy und Diagrammen der Mission widmete. Die Boulevardzeitung Paris Jour rief: „Die ganze Welt sagt Bravo!“ Die kommunistische Tageszeitung L'Humanité veröffentlichte auf der Titelseite ein Foto des Starts und widmete die gesamte Rückseite einem enthusiastischen Bericht über die Mondlandung. Darin wurden der Countdown und der Start, die Frauen und Familien der Astronauten sowie Hintergrundinformationen zu den Mondaktivitäten beschrieben. Hempstead, New York: Joe Namath meldete sich am Mittwoch offiziell im Trainingslager der New York Jets an der Hofstra University, nachdem er sich hinter verschlossenen Türen mit seinen Teamkollegen
Pourriez-vous me donner les valeurs de pression et de température de votre source
Роджер. Он 
Ça confirme
分かりました。そうします。チャーリー、特に制約はないようです。念のため確認したかったんです。前回は8から9
できれば太陽には入りたくな
알겠습니다. 그리고 레지스터 1을 수정하셨네요. 272
로저. 색깔에 대해 몇 가지 아이디어를 주시겠어요? 그리고 약간 
Джим, а
11号，休斯顿。我们要做出一些改变——我们正在考虑将语音上行链路
Mer
हां, अभी हमारे पास यहां नंबर 7 और 
Un piccolo cratere da impatto di fronte a noi, ora ben definito, è piuttosto recente, e un altro si avvicina. La sonda è rivolta a nord. Dalla nostra rotta, stiamo procedendo lateralmente verso s
Ich habe das Gefühl, dass ich meiner Aufgabe gewachsen bin... zum Überleben in der Arktis... in den Trop
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 상태 보고서에 필요한 수치 
휴스턴, 최소 추진력으로 비행 중인데 일정한 속도를 유지하기가 꽤 어렵네요. 속도가 자꾸 오르락내리락합니다. MASCONN 신호 때문인
プラットフォームがオフになっている場合は、オフのままにしておく
I
Итак, начиная с верх
안녕하세요, 프랭크 씨. 약 18분 동안 추적해 온 결과, 궤도 크기는
Die Ergebnisse auf der Primärebene sehen sehr gut aus. Die Sekundärebene werden wir voraussichtlich nach der LOS-Prüfung übe
这片区域
Поддерживат
Я пр
了
もしお持ちでなければ、いつでもお
O
MARK LOGI
Roger. Mike, lorsque vous jouiez avec le vaisseau il y a quelque temps et que nous avons réduit la zone morte, nous avons supposé que cette zone était centrée sur la nouvelle attitude du moment. Depuis, nous avons dérivé de quelques degrés en tangage et en lacet par rapport à cette attitude. Par conséquent, si nous suivions la procédure que nous vous avons expliquée (ACCEL COMMAND, activation de tous les commutateurs AUTO SELECT, puis RATE COMMAND), le vaisseau tenterait de revenir à l'attitude en tangage et en lacet qu'il avait avant la réduction de la zone morte. P
Je te comprends parfaitement
알겠습니다. 어댑터 배터리 1은 24.5볼트, 1A는 7.0암페어
今のところは以上です。テレビについては後ほどもう少しお話させていただきます。早めに準備していただくことをお勧めします。ご質問があればお気軽にお寄せください。専門家が多数おりますので、お気
تعمل المحركات عالية الدفع بشكل جيد، ويجب إجراء التتبع الدقيق باستخدام نظام التحكم الإلكتروني المنخفض فقط. يُعدّ تتبع الصاروخ المعزز مهمة صعبة مع المحركات عالية الدفع. تبقى الجيروسكوبات ضمن الحدود المسموح بها بشكل جيد. الوقت المنقضي هو 13:56. لقد فقدت رؤية الصاروخ المعزز في هذا الوقت. سأقوم بضبط وضعية الرادار العكسي في هذا ا
Non è una procedura molto lunga, Fred. Abbiamo calcolato che abbiamo ancora circa 15 minuti di energia nel modul
好的，万斯。我们差不多可以把单人飞行手册和飞行计划的修改内
ठीक है। र
Gemini 4, Houston CAP CO
रोजर की 
Roger. Houston, warum gebt ihr uns nicht einfach Salven, damit wir hier die Schalter kontrolli
«Др
Я убавил громкость в S-диапазоне, чтобы избавиться от фонового шума; теперь не забудьте снова 
Семь, это мыс. Отпр
Po
روجر، نود تفريغ خزان مياه الصرف الصحي لديك إلى 25%؛ ونفضل القيام بذلك قبل منتصف الدورة، لأغراض المتابعة. لذا، إذا كان ذلك مناسبًا لك، إذا بدأت الآن، فس
G
E Boothill, Duke Island, Sidewinder, guardando Maskelyne W, che è il punto di controllo del giro di imbardata, e appena in prossimità del terminatore. Al terminatore è cinereo e grigio. Man mano che ci si allontana dal terminatore, diventa di un grigio più chiaro, e man mano che ci si avvicina al punto subsolare, si possono decisamente vedere toni marroni e beige sul terreno, almeno secondo l'ultima osservazione del
रॉजर, नील। शुरुआत करते हैं: अपोलो 11
Контрастность возросла, и освещенной остается только 
没什么大问题。我能很轻松地把它敲进大约两英寸深，然后我使出浑身解数把它敲进去，第二个就得双手握锤，而且我
Вперёд, полёт
알겠습니다. 025:00, 5119, -165, 071:08; 035:00, 7733, -165, 070:36; 045:00, 6208, -165, 52; 060:00, 
Je pense que nous avons la meilleure configuration. No
그를
好的。首先要确认交流电已接通，也就是面板 16 上的逆变器 2 断路器已闭合。然后，在面板 11 的“飞行显示”部分，我们需要确认 GASTA 和 COMMANDER 的断路器已闭合。同样在面板 11 下，GASTA 和 COMMANDER 的交流母线 A 断路器也需
जेम
Okay. We will go to and TRA
क्या आप फेसप्लेट बंद करने 
단안경으로 안정적인 시야를 확보하는 가장 좋은 방법은 단안경을 안정적으로 잡고 눈앞에 위치했을 때 접히도록 한 다음, 몸이 단안경 옆으로 살짝 떠 있는 것처럼 움직여서 전혀 닿지 않도록 하는 것 같습니다. 단안경이
알겠습니다. 말씀하신 내용을 잘 읽었습니다. 삽입 검사 목록은 모두 확인했고, 이상 사항은 없
好的。让我说说我对主总线B的观察。当时情况发生得很快，我们先听到了撞击声，或者爆炸声，或者其他什么原因，我不太确定。大约一秒钟后，出现了主警报，提示主总线B欠压。我查看了电压，当时电压正常，所以我怀疑是电压尖峰。燃料电池3也正常，
Man kann Jim sagen, dass er
Seven, this is California sending Z cal on my 
ठीक है। समझ गया। अगर मुझे इससे जल्दी बाहर निकलना ह
Speriamo, Bruce, che la nostra pellicola da 16 mm funzionasse a quel punto della discesa e che saremo in grado di confermare la nostra 
Beachten Sie, dass Sie Ihren Computer wahrscheinlich über Texas anschließ
روجر. الثور، عايدة؛ أكرر، الثور، عايدة. أعلى 162، يسار 01، الباقي غير قابل للتطبيق. محاذاة سيريوس، ريجل 129، 155، 010، فراغ سلبي، إشعال نافذة الأفق ناقص 3 27 درجة، الأفق إلى اليسار. عند الإشعال، 18 درجة
Нет. Я записал 134 10. Я не был в э
罗杰。我宇航服的穹顶温度
닐, 마이너스 Y자형
रॉजर। यह नॉर्मल मोड में है। जब से हमने वहां ता
알겠습니다. 텔레비전에 대해 더 이야기할 게 있는데,
Jim, in quella modalità di controllo, sembra la soluzione migliore. L'unica cosa che dovrai fare è impostare ATTEGGIAMENTO, quindi prima di iniziare la manovra, dovrai alzare il livello e ottenere un 400 più tutti zeri, quindi risponderai in imbardata quando passerai a CONTROLLO MODALITÀ. Cioè, controllerai l'imbardata in CONTROLLO MODALITÀ e il beccheggio e il rollio potranno essere gestiti in PULSE con un. Dopo aver impostato l'assetto, dovrai rifare 
And God called the light Day, and the darkness he called Night. And the evening and the morning were the first day. And God said, "let there be a firmament in the midst of the waters. And let it divide the waters from the waters." And God made the firmament and divided the wa
Roge
أيّهما حصلت؟ 60؟ حصل
ठीक है। हमारे रिडंडेंट कंपोनेंट चेक को देखने पर पता चलता है कि हमने अभी तक सेकेंडरी लूप रेडिएटर्स की अखंडता की जांच नहीं की है; और यदि आपने ऐसा नहीं किया है, तो हम कभी सेकेंडरी रेडिएटर्स को खोलना चाहेंगे, लेकिन उनमें से प्रवाह नहीं करेंगे और केव
좋습니다. 첫 번째 별은 26번입니다. 26번 별을 이용해 지구 근지평선에서 두 세트의 측정을 하겠습니다. 그런 다음 16번 별을 이용해 지구 원지평선에서 한 세트의 측정을 하고 싶습니다. 만약 26번 별을 지구 근지평선에서 측정하는 것이 불가능하다면, 1
Your ch
Et, Apollo 13, Houston. Nous aimerions modifier la bande S et la configuration d'antenne. Veuillez passer en mode omnidirectionnel Delta. Veuillez passer en mode manuel avec un gain élevé, un angle de tangage de -60
准备去VOX录音。看着阳光洒满的窗户。那绝对是烟熏图案，夹杂着光线。上面有粉状碎屑——有些呈粉红色，有点像粉橙色。可能是
Okay. Aus Jodrell Bank, England, via AP: Das große britische Radioteleskop Jodrell Bank empfing heute um 5:49 Uhr EDT keine Signale mehr von der sowjetischen Mondsonde Luna 15. Ein Sprecher sagte, es scheine, als habe die Sonde den Mond bereits hinter sich gelassen. Ein weiteres Zitat: „Wir glauben nicht, dass sie gelandet ist“, sagte ein Sprecher von Sir Bernard Lovell, dem Direktor des Observatoriums. Washington UPI: Vizepräsident Spiro T. Agnew forderte, bis zum Jahr 2000 einen Menschen auf den Mars zu schicken. Demokratische Politiker entgegneten jedoch, dass die Bedürfnisse auf der Erde Priorität haben müssten. Agnew, ranghöchster Regierungsbeamter beim Start von Apollo 11 am Mittwoch, sprach offenbar für sich selbst und nicht unbedingt für die Nixon-Regierung, als er sagte: „Meiner Meinung nach sollten wir bis zum Ende dieses Jahrhunderts einen Menschen auf den Mars schicken.“ Laredo, Texas, AP: Einwanderungsbeamte in Nuevo Laredo gaben am Mittwoch bekannt, dass Hippies keine Touristenkarten für die Einreise nach Mexiko erhalten, es sei denn, sie baden und lassen sich die Haare schneiden. Huberto Cazaras, Leiter der mexikanischen Einwanderungsbehörde in Nuevo Laredo, berichtete, dass die Behörden in Mexiko-Stadt, Acapulco und anderen beliebten Touristenorten Beschwerden über die Hippies erhalten hätten. United Press International: Die erste Reaktion auf Präsident Nixons Entscheidung, Bundesangestellten am Montag einen Feiertag zu gewähren, damit sie den nationalen Gedenktag zur Apollo-11-Mondlandung begehen konnten, war überwiegend Überraschung. Rodney Bidner, Associated Press, London: Europa ist vom Apollo-11-Ereignis begeistert. Zeitungen auf dem ganzen Kontinent füllen ihre Seiten mit Bildern der Saturn-V-Rakete, die zum ersten Mal eine Verbindung der Erde zu ihrem natürlichen Satelliten herstellte. Und die Schlagzeilenmacher suchten nach den passenden Worten, um diese Leistung zu würdigen. „Das größte Abenteuer in der Geschichte der Menschheit hat begonnen“, verkündete die französische Zeitung Le Figaro, die vier Seiten Berichten vom Cape Kennedy und Diagrammen der Mission widmete. Die Boulevardzeitung Paris Jour rief: „Die ganze Welt sagt Bravo!“ Die kommunistische Tageszeitung L'Humanité veröffentlichte auf der Titelseite ein Foto des Starts und widmete die gesamte Rückseite einem enthusiastischen Bericht über die Mondlandung. Darin wurden der Countdown und der Start, die Frauen und Familien der Astronauten sowie Hintergrundinformationen zu den Mondaktivitäten beschrieben. Hempstead, New York: Joe Namath meldete sich am Mittwoch offiziell im Trainingslager der New York Jets an der Hofstra University, nachdem er sich hinter verschlossenen Türen mit seinen Teamkollegen über seine Differenzen mit dem NFL-Commissioner Peter Rozelle ausgetauscht hatte. London, UPI: Dem House of Lords wurde am Mittwoch versichert, dass ein amerikanisches Kleinst-U-Boot das Ungeheuer von Loch Ness weder beschädigen noch angreifen würde. Lord Nomay erklärte, er wolle sichergehen, dass niemand, der ein U-Boot im Loch Ness betreibe, „keiner dort möglicherweise lebenden Kreatur Schaden zufüge oder sie angreife“. Er bat darum, dass der Plan des U-Boots, mit einem wiederauffindbaren Pfeil eine Gewebeprobe von einem gefundenen Ungeheuer zu entnehmen, ohne es zu beschädigen oder zu stören, durchge
パネル16、上段のフライトディスプレイ：システムエンジニアクロスポインター、開；システムクワッド1～4のTCA、全て閉。2段目の照明：フラッド、おそらく開。ロジック電源B、開；スーツフローコントロー
わかりました。インバーター2のACバス2をオンにしてください。もう一つのスイッチ、ACバス2リセットをリセットしてセンターにしてください。バッテリー充電をアルファにしてください。DCインジケーターをバッテリーチャージャーにしてください。そして、最初の30分間は10分ごとに充電器の電流と電圧を報告してください。その後は30分ご
Très bien, 
Es ist
حسنً
حسنًا. لقد حصلنا على بياناتك. نحن مستعدون لقراءة ما تريد، ونحن على أهبة الاستعداد لإرسال بياناتك الخارجية ومتجه الحالة بمجرد أن
Okay, Jack. Als Nächstes nimmst du die Karte und formst damit ein
Bene. Ora siamo al lavoro con la borsa, e il prossimo passo da compiere è p
わかりました。Zトルクは150ではなくプラス0.152です。これでほぼ合っていると思います。さて、バズ、その数字は書き留めておい
... um 22:35 Uhr G
알겠습니다. 잭, 송
Quella è stata una notte breve
ह्यूस्टन, 11. अगर आप हमें 45 पश्च
Cavolo, di sicuro non ne ho visto 
Хоро
Okay. Give me a mark, and let me check TR one more time
Роджер. Мы по-прежнему
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend die Details erläutern. Okay. Der Eintritt in die Atmosphäre erfolgt um 142:40 Uhr; etwa 6,5 ​​Stunden vorher, also ungefähr, beginnen wir mit der Aktivierung der Heizleistung, indem wir die Temperaturen des Kommandomoduls überprüfen und dieses gegebenenfalls vorheizen. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies notwendig sein wird. Detaillierte Anweisungen dazu folgen später. Ungefähr 6 Stunden vorher beginnen wir mit dem Hochfahren der Heizleistung anhand der modifizierten 30-Minuten-Checkliste, die Sie bereits für den vorherigen Zwischenkurs verwendet haben. Kurz darauf, etwa 5 Stunden vorher, benötigen wir die Ausrichtung für die Körperachsenausrichtung mithilfe des Erdterminators, wie zuvor. Sobald wir das haben, führen wir -7 durch, was jetzt etwa einer Brenngeschwindigkeit von 2 Fuß pro Sekunde oder etwa 15 Sekunden entspricht. Mir wurde gesagt, dass sie jetzt bei 1,5 liegt, also deutlich innerhalb der Toleranz. Okay. Danach beginnen wir sofort mit dem Manöver zur Abwurfposition des Servicemoduls. Da wir es früher als üblich abwerfen, befindet es sich in der Flugebene. Wir benötigen und wollen keine Abweichung von der Flugebene. Das Servicemodul befindet sich also in der Flugebene und ist entlang des Radiusvektors nach außen gerichtet. Anschließend bereiten wir das Kommandomodul für den SEP des Servicemoduls vor, einschließlich der Überprüfung und des Heißlauftests. Etwa 4 Stunden und 30 Minuten vor dem geplanten Zeitpunkt werfen wir das Servicemodul ab. Wir werden die Maschine so lange hochziehen, bis wir das Servicemodul im Flug haben und versuchen, ein paar Fotos zu machen. Wir werden aber keine riskanten Manöver für Fotos durchführen, da wir den Flugbahnwinkel zu diesem Zeitpunkt nicht verändern wollen. Okay. Das gibt uns ungefähr zwei Stunden Zeit, um die Vorbereitungen abzuschließen, 
ブースターに向かって約5フィート/秒の速度で噴射しました。分離噴射は約6～7秒でした。ブースターに向かって約5～6フィート/秒の速度で噴射し、その後
事实上，我能清楚地看到下方，从这里可以看到整个群岛的所有岛屿……我能看到更
Oh Mann
はい、これは素晴らしい
هذا صحيح، أبولو 8. وسنوافيكم ببعض المعلومات الإضافية قريبًا. نعمل حاليًا على التحليق بالقرب من المركبة. وسنتحدث معكم بتفصيل أكبر عن مشكلة رصد النجوم باستخدام السدس والتلسكوب. وما نود فعله فور وصول الفريق الأسود إلى جهاز MOKR، مع وجود فريقين هنا، هو أن نستمع إلى شر
Роджер, Gemini VI. Просим вас пнуть магнитофон. Мы считаем, что лента может выйти за пределы допустимых параметров, и, пнув
Das ist bestätigt, Jim. Jetzt könne
هذا بث
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, स्टीलहेड। हेलीकॉप्
Мне уже порядком надоело 
Roger. Sigma Seven. Guaymas Cap Com. Parfait. Il y a eu une panne de courant du côté californien. Nous lisons correctement votre temps de rétroséquence. À mon signal, voyons voir, le temps écoulé de votre capsule est actuellement en avance de 4 secondes, Wally. Cec
Роджер. УПРАВЛЕНИЕ НАВ
ALIMENTATION DE CONTRÔLE ROTATIF, NORMAL, 
双子座4号，这里是夏威夷，盲区发射。偏航角0°，俯仰角60°，略偏右，航向朝上，距离300海里。我再重
Посмотрим, что мы сможем сделать, Джек. Мы свяжемся с отделом восстановления и посмотрим, сможем ли мы отправить агента туда, в Тихий океан, когда ты вернешься. Черт возьми, посмотрим. В профессиональном баскетболе «Никс» обыграли «Милуоки Бакс» со счетом 110:102, Билли Каспер лидирует на Masters после 54 лунок с результатом 208, а весенние тренировки по американскому футболу идут полным ходом. И это, пожалуй, все новости, которые у нас есть; обновленный план на сегодня для вас, ребята: форма будет парадной формой, комбинезонами для пол
アポロ8号、テープレコーダー
正解です。では、サーキットブレーカー「トランスデューサー」
Что касается книг, я думаю, нам следует уделить больше внимания выбору колец. У нас уже два или три раза возникали трудности с их открыванием, а страницы рвутся и не держатся в книге. Нам следует подумать о каком-нибудь усилении отверстий, к которым крепятся кольца. На водяном пистолете маленький сосок, выступающий с конца для выпуска воды, зафиксирован в выдвинутом положении, как и на симуляторе, и позволяет воде вытекать после того, как вы отпустите курок. Время от времени его приходится поправлять, чтобы вода не вытекала из капсулы, когда вы достаете пистолет из упаковки с едой. Еще один момент: на поильном шланге очень легко 
درجة الح
Okay. Bevor Sie mit dem Kopieren beginnen: Diese Prozedur dient im Gr
오, 물론이죠. 제가 하셀블라드 카메라를 잃어버렸어요... 혹시 하셀블라드 카
わか
네,
J'ai dit: tu croyais dormir pendant toutes 
रॉजर। मेरा छोटा सा सिरा क्षितिज से ऊपर था, इसलिए मैं क्षितिज नहीं देख पा रहा था। जैसे ही वह सूर्य की ओर आया, मैंने उस
罗
追踪结
Bene. Pronto per copiare la rimozione d
On peut même apercevoir l
Roger, Friendship Seven, reading you lo
저
Bene, aspettate. Immagino che non siamo ancora nella giusta
水瓶座，休斯顿。弗雷德，关于
我感觉很好。吉姆又睡着了。我和比尔正在吃早餐，一切似乎
S
以下是云台角度。指令舱：356.69°，163.42°，346.67°。水瓶座：302.26
Ok. Ora rilassati
And if you
Okay, Vance. Wir sind fast soweit, die Änderungen im Solo-Buch und im Flugplan zu übernehmen, und sobald deine Unterlagen fertig sind, nehmen wir sie. Die Vorver
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमें संज्ञा 89
Это... это выше... Хорошо. Вы знакомы с тем, что минус 4 градуса находятся посередине неба, 
Roger. Amit
Мы знаем, что множество ученых из разных стран готовы осмотреть лунные образцы, и мы подумали, что вам будет интересно увидеть их в таком виде, в каком они есть на самом деле. Эти два ящика — контейнеры для возврата образцов. Это вакуумно упакованные контейнеры, которые были закрыты в вакууме на лунной поверхности, герметизированы, а затем доставлены внутрь и помещены в эти пакеты из стекловолокна, застегнуты на молнию и снова герметизированы снаружи, и размещены в этих емкостях в боковой части командного модуля. Это два ящика. И как только мы поднимемся на борт корабля, я уверен, что эти ящики немедленно будут перевезены, и начнется их доставка в Лунную приемную лабораторию
Houston, Ap
Gemini VIII, это Хьюстон. Переведите переключатель криогенного количества в п
حسنًا. تتراوح درجات حرارة مجموعة المكربن ​​الرباعي لديك بين 85 و44 درجة. وتتراوح درجات حرارة البخاخات بين 44 و21 درجة؛ وغطاء الحماية الحرارية أعلى بكثير من الحد الأدنى الم
Ok, Bill. Abbiamo appena ricevuto la tua registrazione vocale e 
是的，我觉得你说得对。哎呀，确实能看出塌陷了。大部分——你可以看到它们都聚集在底部角落里；你知道，在边缘——很多白色的东西都
Gemini 4, this is Houston. Did you have any luck tra
Hello, Houston. Houston, Apollo 13. O
Roger. Sur le TM ici présent, nous avons remarq
Хорошо, Джо. Я создал здесь новую страницу под названием -1A, пункт 6, Переключение на питание и обычная проверка того, что прожектор не горит и что горит индикатор ВНИМАНИЕ! ПРЕДУПРЕЖДЕНИЕ! ПИТАНИЕ; я получил сообщение от Джека, и я передам его тебе. Пункт 7, ТРАНСЛУНАРНАЯ ШИНА АВТОМАТИЧЕСКОГО ВЫКЛЮЧАТЕЛЯ, панели 11 и 16, ЗАКРЫТЫ. Шаг 8, освещение
Roger. Should be 8 hours, 52 minut
시그마 세븐
はい。と
はい、了解です。レーダーロックはしっかりしています。少しお待ちください。現在
Roger, Al. I am in auto; retro; the gyro switches are normal; maneuver is off. The capsule is prepared for retrosequence but for stowing two charts. I'm sure we're go. I have 81 percent auto, (fuel) 80 percent manual (fuel), which is the same as my intermediate report. They did not change. I have 52 (psi, in hundreds) on primary, 75 (psi, in hundreds) o
Non ho nemmeno guardato fu
Okay. Alles klar. Als Nächstes schneiden Sie ein diagonales Loch in eine der Laschen des Plastikbeutels in der Nähe des Bogens. Sie können eine der beiden Laschen wählen und ein etwa 4 bis 5 cm großes, diagonales Loch schneiden, groß genug, um den roten Schlauch hindurchzuschieben. Schieben Sie den ro
Il vaudrait mieux prendre un mor
قيمة الإضاءة للفيلم الأبيض والأسود هي 13 لحساسية ASA 64. ضبط قيمة الإض
Ricevuto
除了我们勘测过的那个大陨石坑之外，我想我们这片区域应该没有其他陨石坑了。架设好EASEP之后，我往回走了一圈，趁着Buzz开始整理采集到的样本时，我走到我们身后一
Dès
O
ما زلتَ واضحًا تم
了解。そちらは電波良好です。ありがとうござ
Forza
Questo è ciò che ho capito ascoltando la conferenza Goddard (circuito di comunicazione di rete
حسنًا. هل كان ذلك 74 30
रॉजर। मैं दोहराता हूँ, अक्षांश + 0920, - 16500 12953 361
아마 다른 입
알겠습니다
네, 음성 기록기가 계속 작동 중이어서 저희가 접속할 수 없었고, 시간이 다 됐으니 다시 접속하라고 알려드릴 
わかりました。パネル5
Roger. Concernant le
Hello Sigma Seven, hello Sigma Seven this is Cal Cap Com, Cal Cap Com. Broadcasting in the blind. We have had a power failure on our receiver. I am broadcasting in the blind. Reset your clock for retrosequence at. This takes into account your clock error at last readout. You had last report had 27 seconds set in. This should be 33 by last
了解、マイク。呼吸数の波形はまだ平坦ですね。今晩、寝る前に時
Roger. Deke, la mia modalità di controllo è manuale; i giro
Это утверждение верно. Лучше было бы сформулировать это так: маневрировать и удерживать позицию для на
了解。ロールは左
I got - I was trying to copy it as you were reading it, Vance. The pads are service module jettison attitude, Moon viewing attitude, Sun 
わかった。車
D'accord. Après cette étape sur le panneau 275, supprimez « CB M
Роджер. Наш полет на Луну, возможно, показался вам простым и легким. Хочу вас заверить, что это не так. Ракета «Сатурн V», которая вывела нас на орбиту, — невероятно сложная машина, каждая деталь которой работала безупречно. Этот компьютер над моей головой имеет словарный запас в 38 000 слов, каждое из которых было тщательно подобрано, чтобы иметь для нас, экипажа, максимальную ценность. Этот переключатель, который я сейчас держу в руке, имеет более 300 аналогов только в командном модуле
مهما حاولت وضع هذه العدسات العينية البصرية في علبتها، لا يبدو الأ
收到。刚才那一下故障，是不是指针快
Нет, его там нет; он лежал на по
11, Houston. Es sieht nicht so aus, als ob Sie es in 2 Minuten bis zu diesem Beobachtungsp
Хорошо, 8. Мы хотим провести небольшую тренировку на месте, чтобы убедиться, что мы сможем вовремя перезаписать пленку и доставить голосовую часть в Хьюстон. Итак, мы планируем перезаписать вашу пленку и отработать процедуру на месте, чтобы доставить ее сюда и прослушать. Мы считаем, что на пленке уже есть что-то, если только вы не перезаписали ее после последней перезаписи. Просто чтобы убедиться, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы сказали несколько слов, короткий счет или что-то еще, что вы хотели бы добавить. И мы сделаем это в течение следующих 5 минут, прежде чем покинем Мадрид. Это место, где мы хотим провести т
روج
التحكم ممتاز حتى
哦，你昨天收到的数据相当不错，你大概……嗯，我会查一下，不过你当时冷冻舱里的东西太多了。我有一些……你有33分20秒。你驾驶服务舱穿过……你有142秒；穿过……是
जी हां। आप बस इसे न्यूनतम आवेग पर सेट कर दीजिए, फिर हम इसे
알았어, 조. 명령 모듈 전원 공급 절차를 복사할 준비는 다 됐어. 언제든 원할 때 줘. 배터리 A를 충전 장치에서 언제 꺼
双子座4号，我错过了你最
Ok
了解しました。
收到。看来我们很快就能恢复飞行计划了。由于后续的燃
We ar
Всё выглядело именно так, как я и ожидал, Джо. Она стояла в 
Cert
The items that we still need 
हमें एक टॉर्च की ज़रूरत होगी - क्या मुझे एक टॉर्च मिल सकती है? आपके पास टॉर्च है? हमें एक अतिरिक्त टॉर्च की ज़रूरत पड़ सकती है - क्या आपके पास है? ठीक है। ठ
ثلا
Bene. Vorremmo illustrarvi il nostro piano. Al momento, siamo in una situazione critica per quanto riguarda l'acqua. Quindi vorremmo usarne il meno possibile. Per farlo, pianificheremo di effettuare una manovra di ritorno libero a 5 metri al secondo alle 61 ore, ovvero tra 37 minuti. Poi spegneremo i
حسنًا يا جيم. قرأناها لك على أنها انحراف،
Das ist bestätigt, Jim. Wir würden gerne – warten Sie einen Moment,
VI, हवाई। हमारे पास इससे अधिक जानकारी नहीं ह
アポロ8号、
ممتاز. في الصفحة E-9، عند الاستعداد لنقل التحكم إلى وحدة القيادة، إذا كنت ترغب في تجنب تشغيل المحركات نتيجة لتصحيح الوضع، يُنصح بضبط مفاتيح الوضع اليدوية على وضع "أمر التسارع" أو "الدفع الأدنى". ومرة ​​أخرى في 
Roger, 13. Because of the O2 tank 2 quan
حسنًا يا جاك. كما قرأت، من المفترض أن ينام قائد الوحدة لمدة ست ساعات تقريبًا. خلال هذه الفترة، يجب على قائد الوحدة ومساعده محاولة تناول وجبة خفيفة. سأستيقظ في الساعة 69. ينام قائد الوحدة ومساعده في الساعة 70، ويستيقظان في الساعة 76. ويجب أن نخطط للقيام بمناوراتنا في الساعة 76 أو 78:30. في الساعة 78:30، سنقوم بتحميل الذخيرة والتوجه إلى نقطة الانطلاق. ستتم المناورة الثانية
سؤال آخر يا جيم. تشير قراءا
알겠습니다. 목적은 근지점 + 2시간 후 중단입니다.:; +1633.0, -0014.5, -0751.5; 원지점은 적
こちらはシグマ・セブン。日の出の中、90度のヨー角で逆さまに飛行しているような映像です。自分の進路方向が最もはっきりと分かります。まるで列車の窓から外を眺めているようです。目の前を通り過ぎる地形が見えます。さまざまな種類の雲があります。機体の縦軸に対して-90度の90度平面で、雲が私のそばを流れていくのが見えます。ヨー角が非常に鮮明に映し出されています。今、旋回すると、機体は逆さまですが、鈍角の先端が適切なヨー角姿勢になり始
...вот... Прошло 38 минут, и 
Gut. Also, wir hatten hier im Mittleren Westen einen heftigen Schneesturm; ich weiß nicht, ob man den von da oben sehen kann. Und in Houston ist es übrigens ziemlich kühl geworden, so um die 35 Grad. Und wir würden gerne wissen, wen ihr nächsten 
ال
ठीक है, ह्यूस्टन। आप हमारे पास थोड़ा देर
Ok, Apollo 8. Lascia che ti spieghi quali sono gli argomenti principali: primo, stiamo esaminando tutte le procedure di ingresso e questo tipo 
हमें 5337.3 और 32.8 फीट प्रति सेकंड, 60
Roger. Votre orbite est modifiée aux coordonnées 87, 147. Vous êtes prêt pour un M nominal égal à 4. Il y aura un léger changement de plan. Nous vous donnerons plus d'informations ultérieurement. Nous comprenons que les températures étaient plus élevées que la normale et nous vous rappelons d'activ
Non riesco a inserire la pompetta p
Ok, proce
Salut Jim. Pourrais-tu me donner une idée de la proportion d'utilisation de te
حسنًا، في تلك الطلعة الأخيرة، التقطنا حوالي 38 صورة باستخدام التصوير الجوي الشامل للتضاريس، بدءًا من منطقة شرق سان دييغو وحتى واجهنا الغطاء السحابي مجددًا. استأنفنا التصوير بشكل متقطع بمجرد أن بدأنا فوق الجزء الجنوبي من الولايات المتحدة، مرورًا بألاباما وميسيسيبي وصولًا إلى فلوريدا. حصلنا على صور ممتازة للطقس في تلك المنطقة، ثم التقطنا صورًا للمطارات حول جاكسونفيل. التقطنا 
О, да. Так гораздо лучше. Вы получили мой отчет о разных типах людей и о том, чем они здесь за
ठीक है। लगता ह
そ
阿波罗11号，这里是休斯顿。近西那翁点，发射后2小时。G&N：62710，+098，-019，点火时间077 46 2248，DELTA-VX，+32148，-00455，-10377，横滚NA，俯仰角307，剩余发射时间NA。对准织女星和天津四。横滚243 183 0
这垫子肯定没有**
Я н
Okay. Ich bin dann mal
好的，这是你的远地点-近地
물총 게임을 기다리는 동안 광학계에 대해 몇 가지 의견을 드리겠습니다. 태양 근처 어디에서든 스캐닝 망원경을 가로지르는 빛줄기가 꽤 크게 나타나는 것 같습니다. 조금 전에는 스캐닝 망원경으로 달을 관측할 수 있는 위치에 있었습니다. 그리고
41 минута. Мы переходим к основному сканеру на горизонте, и существенной разницы в работе основного или вторичного сканера нет; переходим к основном
لا، بالتأكيد 
是的。02:30:5
Хорошо. Из Джодрелл-Бэнк, Англия, через AP: Британский радиотелескоп в Джодрелл-Бэнк перестал принимать сигналы от советского беспилотного аппарата, запущенного на Луну, сегодня в 5:49 по восточному времени. Представитель заявил, что, по всей видимости, космический корабль «Луна-15» «отдалился от Луны». Другая цитата: «Мы не думаем, что он приземлился», — сказал представитель сэра Бернарда Ловелла, директора обсерватории. Вашингтон, UPI: Вице-президент Спиро Т. Агню призвал отправить человека на Марс к 2000 году, но лидеры демократов ответили, что приоритет должен быть отдан потребностям на Земле. Агню, высокопоставленный правительственный чиновник, присутствовавший на запуске «Аполлона-11» в среду, по-видимому, говорил от своего имени, а не обязательно от имени администрации Никсона, когда сказал: «На мой взгляд, мы должны отправить человека на Марс к концу этого столетия». Ларедо, Техас, AP: Иммиграционные власти Нуэво-Ларедо объявили в среду, что хиппи будут отказывать во въезде в Мексику по туристическим картам, если они не примут ванну и не подстригутся. Уберто Касарас, начальник мексиканской иммиграционной службы в Н
Ich schalte den Hauptschalter aus und schaue, was los ist. Sehen Sie, da ist noch ein … Ich möchte diese Geräte ausschalten. Ich schalte sie nachein
حسنًا يا جيم، قررنا أن لديك بعض الوقود المتبقي الذي يمكننا استخدامه في خطة الطيران. نود منك الانتقال إلى وضع مسح الأفق خلال الساعات الثماني القادمة. يبدأ هذا الوضع عند الدقيقة 30، ونريدك أن
روجر، جيم. خطرت لنا فكر
في النصف الأيمن من الصفحة، قم بشطب "كتلة العلوم المدارية"، وتحتها "ا
ठीक है, जब आपको सुविधा हो, तो कृपया केबिन के तापमान का सर्वेक्षण करें और उड़ान के बाद के लिए इसे अपनी लॉग बुक में दर्ज कर लें। हमें केबि
Weißt du, ich habe da unten nachgesehen. Ich dachte, ich sähe meinen D-Ring herausragen. Aber
Яркий, четко очерчен
Apollo 8. Houston. Unable to copy. After about a minute of this configuration, we're going to return to
맞습니다. S/2-6을 참조하세요. 잭, 우리가
D'accord, Jack. Les étapes restantes consistent simplement à configurer le circuit de la combinaison pour que le système soit pleinement opérationnel. Nos équipes préfèrent attendre que la cartouche sur laquelle vous travaillez atteigne 7,6 millimètres de mercure, ce qui devrait prendre encore 45 minutes à une heure (nous indiquons actuellement 4,7). En attendant, nous vous demandons de configurer la deuxième cartouche du module de commande de la même manière que la première, à l'aide du tuyau du commandant, et de tout mettre en place. À ce moment-là, nous pourrons probablement effectuer la commutation. Pour information, une fois cette étape terminée et après avoir pris votre petit-déjeuner, je vous fournirai la liste de configuration de commutation du module de commande. Cette liste correspond à 
Ok, Acquario. Stiamo lavorando su cosa succederà dopo. Nel frattem
OK, Gus, tout va bien; le mode de commande est électrique; les gyroscopes sont toujours désactivés; la manœuvre est désactivée. Le niveau de carburant est entre 62 et 68 %. La consommation est légèrement en avance; le voyant de niveau de carburant est allumé; le voyant d'excès d'eau dans la cabine est allumé. Je vais essayer de passer directement en mod
هذه شركة Muchea Cap Com. لن
D'accord. Le contrôle stellaire à
了解。レトロアティチュードに戻った。チンパンジー
Well, you all are just beginning to come over the limb now. I can see parts of Central America, and it looks to be fairly clear there. The islands in the Caribbean are beginning to come in and rather a few streaming lines of clouds
Каков ваш статус по стат
そして私は「受け
اس
カーナボンさん、G.m.t.ハックを教えていただけま
了解、ジム。了解しました。ちなみに、回避行動
Роджер, Бермудски
Ok. Vorremmo un ENTER, 333 ENTER, e poi vorremmo che tu ci leggessi il registro 1. Ci aspettiamo che il registro 1 sia 10.000, e se il registro 1 è uguale a quel valore, significa che il computer scaricherà la sua memoria cancellabile due volte. Sono 10.000 numeri, il doppio del numero per il dump della memoria cancellabile. Se non legge 10.000
Роджер. А также Зона 13-2 120. 2+33. 01 дней, 10 10
了解。約2
알겠습니다. 켄의 사진 기록 
当我们翻越喜
Puoi provarci. S
Die Anzeige signalisiert, dass der Schutzschalter für die Landebahnsteueru
你好 Muchea Cap Com，我是 Sigma Seven。我读到你了。怎么样，完毕
D'accord. Vous me recevez parfaitement et ma configuration est en mode voix normale. Si vous
Хорошо. Мы рассмотрели все возможные варианты. Наихудш
这比我们在模拟器
Roger, Frank. La température du réservoir d'hélium que nous surveillons sur le quad A n'a augmenté que d'un degré pendant tout
罗杰。就你目
D'accord. Nous pouvons reporter cette observation NAV. Elle était prévue à cette heure-ci, et nous pouvons la reporter. Vu vos commentaires concernant le sommeil, nous aimerions l'effectuer
نعم. لقد
Да, я планировал много экспериментировать с фильтрами, просто пока вы спите. Следующим шагом я собирался достать секстант и поиграть с фильтрами и п
मुझे लगता है कि हमें शायद फिर से शुरुआत करनी पड़ेगी। हाँ, जैक, हमारी नाव का संतुलन काफी त
- -
روجر. أتمنى ل
聞こ
То, что находилос
그래서 우리는 좀 더 통제를 강화할 것입
737100.Roger. 35 500, pl
سنبدأ الآن اختب
好的，休斯顿。中央面板——我正在查看指示器 A。组件温度约为 180 度。氦气压力为 3900。我看到燃料压力约为 180 度，百分比约为 
फ्रेड, अब आप गोल्डस्टोन के बड़े सर्वर पर हमसे जुड़ चुके हैं, और हमारा संचार काफी बेहतर है। अगर आप चाहें तो बायोमेड स्विच को वहां मौजूद किसी भी क्रू मेंबर के लिए च
Je plaisante; de quoi avez-vous besoin? L'heure d'AOS? AOS sera… enfin, voyons voir… 8
Okay, Jack. What they'd like you to do on this at 49 hours, they've been observing a slight jitter in the optics shaft angle of about 0.2 of a degree plus or minus. Before you come out of the OPTICS ZERO position, at the start of this , they'd like you to just observe the shaft readout, and see if the jitter occurs on your direct readout there
プラス44、/62970、マイナス162、プラス129、プラス00197、プラス全てゼロ、プラス60701 180 133 001、プラス00203、プラス60701 704 60451 12 1375 349。地球、下037、右2.2、プラス1068、マイナス165 1285
D'accord, Jim. Nous aimeri
Роджер, Аполлон-11. Большое спасибо за передачу. Она действительно длил
阿波罗8号，这里是休斯顿。所有系统准备就绪。你们仍然准备
了解しました。さて、その点につ
11, ह्यूस्टन। आपके मॉनिटर पर जो सफेद धब्बा दिख रहा है, हमारे टीवी वालों का कहना है कि यह जलने का निशान है; लेकिन उन्हें उम्मीद है कि यह कुछ घंटों में गायब हो जाएगा।
イーグル、ヒューストン。B
Okay, danke. Einen Moment bitte, ich bin gleich bei 
好的，Odyssey；休斯顿。选择你最喜欢的OMNI，然后重复回车。完毕
シグマ・
What was tha
Я знаю, что такие вещи не должны валяться где п
Ich habe (un
Okay, Fred. Mir ist klar, dass nur der rote Schlauch des LMP tatsächlich an den Kanisterbeutel angeschlossen i
돔, 객실 돔 온도는 약 57도입니다. 객실 온도는 90도입니다. 우주복 흡입구 온도는 62도입니다. 산소 잔량은 1차 공급 시 50psi(단위: 100ps
Okay. Abbiamo ricevuto la t
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हमने आपके ऑप्टिक्स को शू
是的，不幸的是，从我们透过窗户向外看的方式来看，我们可以很好地调整偏航和滚转，但是太阳却会让我们产生
अगर आप इसे कॉपी कर
Houston, Apollo 
好的。在16号配电盘的断路器上，电池馈线（BAT FEED TIES）两个断开；现在你要仔细听高低电压的声音，电池1（BATTERY 1）高电压断开/复位；电池2（BATTERY 2）低电压断开，然后电池2（BATTERY 2
Bene. Questo coldsoak si basa sul presupposto che tu abbia uno scambiatore di calore nell'
مثل الأصداف البحرية - جميلة جداً، ومتناسق
Аполлон-8. Начинаем маневр пролета. Это будет / 63087, минус 162, плюс 
J'ai les yeux qui se croisent à force de regarder ça. Dis, Mike, juste par curiosité, j'
لا أ
少しだけ下がったかもしれません。今は0度くらい、いや、70度くらいです。少し高かったですね。バイザーを閉め
केबिन का तापमान बढ़ रहा है। सूट का तापमान भी बढ़ता हुआ प्रतीत हो र
好的。我们先划掉方块，然后划掉“PRO VERB 96”
그 사람 말에 속
هل تبدو ال
Ye
Okay. Wir haben einen davon fertig, und es sieht so aus, als könnten wir mit den Klebestreifen ein recht gutes Ergebnis erzielen. Zuerst die Streife
分かりました。ところでフランク、今の気持ちはどうですか？さっき見たちょっとした面白い出来事
Okay. That's a lot better, and we figure your battery glitch was just that thermal switch t
La risposta è affermativa 
Well, Jack, that's what it says the torquing angles are
Okay. DELTA-VZ in ist minus 02226
Sigma Seven, qui Indian Com Tech. Vi ho sentito forte e chiaro. In attesa di 
मैं ऐसा इसलिए कह रहा हूं क्योंकि मैंने तो 
Yes.
Roger. Ici Fri
로저, 프랭크, 지금 기체 자세 유지(피치 및 요)를 하면서 시
不。你所有的排泄结果都非常
حسناً. يمكنن
ジム、
Понял. Когда вы вернетесь к своему контрольному списку Surface и перейдете к перенастройке COMM на странице Surface 45, мы хотели бы, чтобы вы включили функцию измерения расстояния на вашем S-диапазоне. То есть, когда вы дойдете до настройки S-диапазона, вместо «ВНИМАНИЕ» и «ПРЕДУПРЕЖДЕНИЕ: ЭЛЕКТРОНИКА, ВКЛЮЧИТЕ ТВ», мы хотели бы, чтобы вы перешли в положе
Wir ziehen gerade über eine ganze 
Ok. Vorrei commentare. Imma
지금 시험 보러 가요. 시간 세고 있
نعم، لقد تحدثنا عن ذلك نوعًا ما. لكننا لم يكن
Eh bien, on dirait qu'elles ont été conçues pour ça… C'est… c'est ça, n'est-ce pas? N'ont-elles pas été conçues pour être rangées ici, pour que vo
Ancora un po'. Circa 
Roger. Sachez que la couronne solaire est visible à environ 200 diamètres solaires le long de l'écliptique, et 
ジャック、よく分からないんだけど、下の階にずっと閉じ込められてたから、もう半分のことなんてすっかり忘れてたみたい。でも、何度か上の階に行ったことがあって、窓辺で特に風が吹いているのに気づいたことはなかったから、最初は新しい換気口ができたのかなと思ったんだ。でも、そんなにひ
Roger. Vous n'aurez peut-être pas besoin de tout déballer. La position que je vous ai indiquée se situe légèrement à l'ouest du Cratère Ouest. Je dirais à environ deux dixièmes de kilo
Понял. Это «Дружба Семь». Мой статус: я в действии, но он не всегда держи
Роджер. Ваш голос неразборчив. Я скоро вам позвоню на 
それはよかった。あのレンズが1つ
Ed iniziò a stivare le cose e, non appena arrivammo al punto in cui non era più possibile armeggiare con il booster, iniziai ad aiutarlo a tempo pieno, almeno tenendo le cose, stivandole e cercando di evitare che sparissero. Più velocemente lavoravamo, più eravamo indietro. Non perché non stessimo sistemando le cose come dovevano essere, ma ci volle molto più tempo del previsto. In realtà non era molto più facile a gravità zero che nel simulatore, seppur altrettanto facile. Quindi lavorammo a tutto campo. Quando arrivammo a Carnarvon, avevo deciso che non ce l'avremmo fatta, ma pensavo che avremmo continuato ancora un po'. Quando arrivammo a Carnarvon, o poco prima ancora di partire, mi fu chiaro che non potevamo superare la depressurizzazione. Chiesi di passare all'orbita successiva. Poi... riprendemmo fiato per circa 20 minuti e cercammo di sistemare la roba che avevo in giro nella cabina di pilotaggio. Poi ho tirato fuori la checklist e l'abbiamo ripassata in dettaglio per assicurarci
Вы получили...? Если вы слишком далеко отойдете, нам, возможно, придется сле
Votre pression d'oxygène (O2) est anormalement élevée. Il se peut qu'un
Roger. Frank, tutte le temperature del circuito primario sono a posto. Le temperature dell'ingresso EVAP sono normali e i
و13، هيوستن. بدت المناورة المراوغة بسيطة. أصبح وقت تفريغ الأك
अंधेरा होने के बाद से मुझे यह नहीं मिला। यह—यह—यह बहुत इधर-उधर भ
Roger, are you busy
ठीक है। वह उस बैटरी एम्पेरेज को देख रहा है जो आपने हमें कुछ देर पहले बताया था। वह इसे लगभग आधा एम्पियर से एक एम्पियर कम देखना चाहता है। मैं चाहता हूँ कि आप जैक से कहें कि वह अब तक लगाए गए सर्किट ब्रेकर और स्विच की जाँच कर ले और सुनिश्चित करे कि मेन ए पर कोई अतिरिक्त लोड तो नहीं है; विशेष रूप से, फ्लडलाइट कॉन्फ़िगरेशन, उसके कॉशन एंड वार्निंग सर्किट ब्रेकर और उसके एसेंशियल इंस्ट्रूमेंटे
极光七号，你处于漂
खैर, अब नए सिर
यह सही है। कोर्स 7 के मध्य में पूरा होने पर, विमान एक अलग स्थिति में आ जाएगा। और यह स्थिति उन पैडों में से एक पर होगी जो आपको पूरी प्रक्रिया शुरू होने से पहले मिलेंगे। और इसे उस पैड पर गेंद के कोणों के अनुसार उड़ाया ज
아니요. 우리 모두 여기 앉아서 식사 중이에요. 저는 잠깐 
Wie fu
針をゼロにして、私たちはその方向へ向かいます。そし
好的，吉姆。飞行计划有更新。你做了星体可见性检查，目前看来，Navi 仍然是我们的目标星体
حسنًا. إذًا، نستخدم وضع PRO، وينتهي بنا الأمر بظهور وميض 5018؛ ونريد هنا مناورة تلقائية بدلًا من استخدام ، لذا نستخدم وضع PRO مع التوجيه، PNGS؛ والتحكم في الوضع، تلقائي. لدينا نطاق ميت 1.4 درجة، وسيعطينا المؤشر لمحاولة ضبطها، وفي ذلك الوقت أنظر من خلال ، وإذا كان الأمر مشابهًا لفحص الشمس في أبولو 11، فكل ما نحتاجه هو أن تكون الشمس في مكان ما في - هناك في مكا
रॉजर. टू-ब्रावो: 90 ΔV. 16 52 25. बीता हुआ समय 02 28 25. 
이 총은 아
好的，Vance……，加上 0833.0，减去 0050.9，减去 0213.9，不适用，加上 0020
Es geht j
Okay, Vance. Wir haben es mit der automatischen Optik versucht, konnten es aber nicht e
Роджер. Я читаю ваши сообщения уже некоторое время. Пытался связаться с вами по КВ-диапазону, но безуспешно. Моё состояние хорошее; состояние капсулы хорошее; режим управления — электронное; гироскопы закрыты; маневрирование отключено. Уровень топлива 74-85 [проценто
أبولو 8، هيوستن. في المرة القادمة التي تواجه فيها مشكلة في الكسب العالي، اتصل بنا، وسنقوم بضبط الإعدادات اللازمة للتخلص
제가 말씀드리는 건, 다시 한번 
Roger. Wil
시그마 세븐입니다. 무체아입니다. 
ヒューストンです。金利は非常に安定しているようですね。こちらでは金利が完全に抑制されているようです。私たちの見る
SERVICEMODULHEIZUNGEN, QUAD Charlie, HA
Roger. You may not have to unpack it. The position which I just gave you is slightly west of West Crater. I guess it's about two tenths of a kilometer west of it, and we were wondering if Neil or Buzz had observed any additional landmarks during descent, lunar stay, or ascent which would confirm or disprove this. One thi
रॉजर। उन पुराने 
Okay. Ja, das ist echt cool. Das i
मैं बी
फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, फ्रेंडशिप सेवन, य
C'est ac
彼らが何をするかは、私の推測では、そうですね、一列に並べて...、そし
हम अपना जला रहे हैं, 
わかりました、アポロ8号。通信性能について具体的な数値を発表するのはまだ少し早いですね。予想通り順調に動作しているようですし、他の部分も順調に進んでいるようですので、こちらもさらに良くなるかもしれません。次回の通信チェックが終われば、他の部分も
皆さんとご一緒できて本当に
Полагаю, лучший способ положить этому конец — вернуться к
알았어, 잭. 누가 우리 LEVVA를 고쳐줬어
안녕하세요, 아폴로 11호입니다. 휴스턴입니다. 편하신 시간에 TV 방송을 종료하셔도 됩니다. 충분한 수신 용량이 있습니다. 방송 시작도 편하신 시간에 하셔도 됩니다.
Okay. This maneuver is going to pu
확실히 제 아래에 있었습니다. 카나본(Carnarvon) 부근부터 계속 제 아래쪽으로 추적하고 있었죠. 카나본까지는 아래쪽에 있다가 지평선 위로 올라갔다가 다시 아래쪽으로 내려왔습니다. 마치 저와는 다른 궤도에 있는 것처럼 보였어요. 원지점과 근지점이 저와 달랐거든요. 어쨌든, 날이 밝자마자 위치를 파악하자마자 접근을 시도했습니다. 말씀드렸다시피, 그때 부스터는 제 앞쪽 1~2마일 정도, 즉 아래쪽에 있었습니다. 그래서 접근하려고 할수록 오히려 거리가 더 벌어졌습니다. 역추진을 하고 있었죠. 상단 추진기를 사용해서 전체 속도를 줄이는 동시에 추진기
あなたの言うことを信じますが、SPS、ECS、EPS は現在オンになっていま
Und, Wassermann, überprüfe deinen ATCA (PGNS)-Leistu
نح
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다
حسنًا. هل يمكنك ت
Ok, ho un telescopio a scansione per la vis
双子座，CSQ。你抄送了4
Houston, come leggi? Apoll
هل لديك أي تعليقات محددة على تجا
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Сейчас я рассматриваю это облако над Пакистаном через секстант
D'accord. On va essayer. Comme je l'ai dit, nous avons des étoiles. Elles ne sont pas centrées par rapport au zéro de l'arbre et du tourillon. Jetons un coup d'œil rapide au pas de 105, au zéro de l'arbre et du tourillon, et 
Ну, вот и всё... — Похоже, у вас всё в порядке. Только помните, что вам, вероятно, придётся выкрутить диафрагму с 22, а может и нет — фокус остаётся на бесконечности, а зум меня подводит. Выбирайте сами, можете использовать зум на полную мощность,
로저 씨, 90세
IN
ठीक है। पहला विकल्प है एस-बैंड नॉर्मल मोड वॉइस, बंद; दूसरा, एस-बैंड नॉर्मल मोड, बंद; तीसरा, एस-बैंड नॉर्मल मोड रेंजिंग स्विच को रेंजिंग पर सेट करें; और चौथा, एस-ब
Jim, we were just discussing burn star monitoring
D'accord. Après la commutation OMNI, nous désactiverons l'amplificateur de puissance et revie
是
Ja. Endlich habe ich ei
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. Зарядка бат
Aquarius, Houston. Vor
了解。ジェミニ8号機、医療に関する最新情報をお伝えします。1つ目は
不，回去
아폴로 8
Gemini 4, Canary CAP COM. Ваш пе
D'accord, Jim. Ça devr
휴스턴, 알겠습니다. 이글호가 궤도로 복귀했습니다. 트랭퀼리티 기지를 떠나 아폴로 11호 패치 복제품과 올리브 가지를 남겨두
Hé, Charlie, t'as la classe! Superbe brûlure. Difficile de faire mi
नहीं। मुझे लगता है कि वे 
11、こちら
ह्यूस
0
Аполлон-13, Хьюстон. Старт в 11 с половиной, прогнозируемое
わかりません。それは DOI に該当する可
Ok, Jim. Ora, te lo divido in due parti. La prima riguarda il trasferimento delle apparecchiature del modulo di comando. La seconda parte sarà l'inverso, dal modulo di comando all'apparecchiatura. Entrambe le parti rappresentano i Delta provenienti dallo stivaggio del lancio, ed ecco la prima lista, per il trasferimento delle apparecchiature del modulo di comando. Per prima cosa, ti darò anche la posizione dello stivaggio. Quella va in
10 時 50 分
Hey. The Astros did beat the Cards yesterday, 5 to 2. They're still in sixth p
迈克，着陆点
收到。我现在把所有评论都读一遍，确保我们理解正确。使用 NC-4，步骤 1 到 11；然后按照 NC-7 页上的无通信程序进行经度控制；走廊控制图的 Victor 400K 平均
11, Houston. Wir haben hier ein paar Dinge für Sie: Eingabepads, Verbrauchsmaterialien und so weiter. Sobald Sie sich etwas organisiert haben und bereit sind, 
Хорошо, Билл, а наши данные BIOMED по-прежнему выглядят немного странно. Как насчет проверки синего модулятора сигнала на жгуте проводов BIOMED? У вас есть один разъем, он должен быть в центральном блоке, и на нем есть синий разъем. Пров
As best as I can tell you right now, you'll be able to accomplish practically all of the Flight Plan with the fuel that you have remaining at this time. We'll keep updating you in real time. Right now we want you to get some sleep. As far as your Apollo D-9 goes, it looks like you're going to be too far 
下がり始めたら気をつけてください。蒸
حسنًا. هذا صحيح. لإعادة التهيئة من هذه الوضعية، يا جاك، نريدك أن تترك مفاتيح ر
Okay. Die Lage ist: Nickwinkel 23,4°, Rollwinkel 184,7°, Gierwinkel 14,3°. Wir richten das Teleskop in dieser Lage aus, weil wir als Nächstes den Sichttest mit dem Scanteleskop durchführen werden. Dafür benötigen wir 70 Grad Sichtwinkel zur Sonne und zum Arktur, wobei Schaft und Zapfen auf Null stehen. Anschließend können wir die Zapfenkorrektur durchführen 
Roger. To
まさにその通りです。バズ、正確に何日だったかは忘れましたが
Я переключаюсь — моя кабина работает нормально. Костюм в порядке. Я собираюсь снизиться для проверки рыскания. Точнее, для проверки выравнивания. Я снижаюсь на 
Хор
समझ लीजिए कि आप तैयार ह
다시 
- - Die Tendenz scheint zu sein, dass die Materie dort, wie bei einem Gravitationsgradientenexperiment, zum Mittelpunkt des Mondes
روجر. إذا كنت 
Non ci sono ancora arrivato. Direi tra i 25 e i 30 gradi, e a questo punto fermo l'imbardata. Il periscopio controlla la finestra e il reticolo e tra poco darò un segno per cercare di fermare tutte le rate. Ora sono quasi in retroassetto e l'imbardata sembra davvero pulita. Mi fermo e guardo. C'è circa 1 grado di imbardata, a destra - MARK.T. Ok, sono soddisfatto d
شرك
كلامك واضح
터널 환기 밸브를 /DELTA-P로 다시 닫았을 때 약 1.7~1.75 정도의 수치가 나왔는데, 지금은 천천히 
That will be before entering. I am going to give you this proce
من الصعب تحديد وتيرة معقولة. أعتقد أنها الوتيرة التي أستخدمها الآن - ستصبح متعبة للغاية
بدت تلك التي رأيتها في الجزء الخلفي من المركبة الفضائية أغمق بكثير؛ بالطبع، عند النظر إليها من الخلف، كانت الشمس تسطع عليها مباشرة. بدا الأمر كما لو أن المادة قد تعرضت للتسخين نوعًا 
बहुत सुंदर। एकदम सही। यह गलियारे में ही है। यह नीचे आता है और शून्य पर रुक जाता है, 
로저. 알
알겠습니다. 3번 패널에서: 트랜스폰더를 기본(PRIMARY)으로, 파워 앰프를 기본(PRIMARY)으로, 파워 앰프를 고(HIGH)로, 음성 모드를 끄기(OFF)로, 전원을 보통(NORMAL)으로, PMP를 보통(NORMAL)으로, S-밴드 안테나를 
네, 맞습니다. 조, 확실히 그렇습니다. 
D'accord. Nous rencontrons quelques problèmes de liaison, et nous vous recevons faiblement mais clairement. Nous sommes prêts à commencer notre test. Nous allons changer de mode; vous entendrez probablement un bref bruit lors de ce changement. Ce bruit ressemblera à un verrouillage de bande S. Cependant, votre responsable AEC le bloquera. Ceci est dû à la perte
Roger. Hier eine kurze Zusammenfassung der Updates, die du erhalten wirst. Das aktuelle Update für +2 nach einem -8-Vorbeiflugmanöver ist weiterhin gültig und wird nicht aktualisiert. Das nächste Update wird 4 sein. Danach 
Okay. After P
Gemini 4, êtes-vo
いいえ、ここにあるか確認させてください。パネル275まで降りて、CB MAIN A、BAT BUS A、CB MAIN B、BAT BUS Bを開きます。次にパネル250まで降りて、CB BAT A POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDINGとBAT B POWER ENTRY/POSTLANDINGを引き、次にパネル5まで上がって、SENSOR SIGNAL MAIN A、SENSOR SIGNAL MA
私
了解しました、ジム。あなたのWマトリックスについて、簡単な手順を読み上げ、説明したいと思います。あなたのWマトリックスはいくつかのメモリ位置を共有しています。そのため、現在のWマトリックスは良好な状態ではなく、そのマトリックスで観測を続けることは望ましくありません。これから説明する手順では、次のWマトリックスに入る前に、マトリックスを再初期化します。これで、あの3303の後にロードしたWマトリックスの値に戻ります。もしこれ
У меня
Oui, la lumière s'éteint puis se rallume au bout de quelques secondes, com
और मुझे लगता है कि वोल्टेज न पढ़ पाने का कारण यह है कि
Il problema più gran
Ja, ich denke, wir sollten alle in guter Verfassung sein, vor
Okay, Vance, I've got your readout
Und wir zeigen
60 cycles en 30 secon
了解。GET
अरे, क्यों न उनसे पूछा जाए कि क्या उन्हें मेरी आव
Спокойствие,
Rog
我闻
रॉजर। हमने आपके सिस्टम के प्लेबैक डेटा की जाँच की है, और सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है। विशेष रूप से, यह ठीक लग रहा है। हालाँकि, मैं आपको याद दिलाना चाहूँगा कि बैंक A के केवल बॉल वाल्व पर यह बर्न करने का अनुरोध है, और आप इसके लिए तैयार हैं। साथ ही, वर्तमान में हमारी उड़ान योजना में, आपने कल लगभग 96 बजे प्रवेश शुरू करने का समय निर्धारित किया है, और
ヒューストン、次はお家のお子さんたち、いや、世界中の子供たちにちょっとしたデモンストレーションをします。スプーンで水を飲む様子を見せようと思っていたのですが、スプーンに水を入れすぎてしまい、気をつけないと水がスプーンの端からこぼれ落ちてしまいそうです。スプーンの上で水がこぼれているのが見えます
好的。明白了。开
글리콜 증발기
Roger. Understand you want MSC-1 Experiment going to ACQ Aid Beacon t
Mon
好的。这里有
2 Delta, 2 Echo 및 Golf의 역행열 시
Et en même temps, o
Al 
Um eine etwas bessere Aussicht zu erhalten
चौथे वि
सेकेंडरी कूलेंट लूप वाकई बढ़िया लग रहा था। ऐसा लगता है कि आपका रेडिएटर अच्छी तरह से कसा हुआ था और बाकी सब कुछ परफॉर्मेंस कर्व के अनुसार सही ढंग से काम कर रहा था। हमारी जाँच के दौरान आपके दोनों मुख्य ऑक्सीजन रेगुलेटर 104 psi पर भरे हुए थे। चंद्र कक्षा को देखते हुए, प्रति घंटे लगभग 1 पाउंड पानी उबलने की उम्मीद है, और यह सिर्फ एक अनुमान है; पानी उबलने की आवश्यकताओं के बारे में अनुमानों म
Roger. Houston ti chiede qual è il tuo stato e se ci sono cambiamenti nel tuo pi
नहीं। हमने कुछ थैले खाली किए हैं। हमने कुछ और बार पेशाब के थैले खाली किए हैं - और ऐसा कभी नही
In questo caso
That is the earth, but it is not the telephoto lens, unfortunately. I
了解、バズ。ヘルメットとバイ
Wir haben ein Flugplan-Update, sobald Sie be
Acquario, H
Apollo 8, Houst
روجر. حسناً، الساعة الآن 36:41. انتظر ق
了解。とても素晴
Giusto. Volevo solo verificare: avevamo una scarsa ricezione quando ti ho parlato prima. Volevo verificare che tu capisca che il controllo del Sole che hai fatto prima era buono, ed è su questo che ci basiamo. Qualsiasi cosa ti abbiamo detto in passato riguardo all'osservare il Sole dal fi
Roger. Latest on Luna 15 - TASS reported this morning th
아직도 쫓아오고 있나요
Roger, Bill. Conosci la caldaia secondaria? Beh, in effetti entrambe le procedure di riparaz
Ok. Abbiamo operato con la visiera aperta e senza guanti per circa 12 ore, ma per lo più in quella situazione abbiamo continuato a dormire troppo. Quando dormiamo, di solito chiudiamo la visiera e mettiamo la... copertura per proteggere gli 
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。ゴールドストーンとのコマンドインターフェースが切断されました。
Хорошо. Я просто... у меня каждые несколько секунд срабатывает главная сигнализация, и сейчас я вижу проблеск надежды. На данный момен
- - We've got the two be
Auf Seite 28, Schritt 4, führen Sie die folgenden Änderungen im Warnleuchtenstatus durch. Unter den Warnleuchten wird wahrscheinlich die Anzeige „ASCENT PRESSURE“ und eine Kontrollleuchte angezeigt. Streichen Sie „A und B REG“ durch. Unter den Vorwarnleuchten wird die Kontrollleuchte „PRE AMPS“ a
Nous 
你们在发射
Ça me va. P
We cross Houston at the burn; it's between Houston and - the Cape
और आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दूं, जब आप अगली बार आएंगे तब हम ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस से भी एक कार्यक्रम करवाएंगे; और मेरे पास इसकी जानकारी है, अगर आप चाहें तो इसकी कॉपी ले सक
لا نعتقد أن هناك أي مشكلة. نرجو منك تشغيل مفتاح قراءة الكمية وتركه قيد التشغيل خلال الساعات القليلة القادمة لنتمكن من تقييم الوضع. حتى مع معدل الاستخدام الحالي، لن يكون هناك أي مشكلة، لكننا نرغب في إيجاد طريقة للتحكم في هذا الجهاز دون أن يكون استخدامه مزعجًا لك. لهذا السبب نريد مراقبت
يتم الآن تشغيل الجزء الخلفي الكبير للكاميرا. كانت هناك فترة لم يتم فيها تس
你好，11. 休斯顿。我们看到了那里，就在我们屏幕的右
مهلاً، ربما من
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 고이득
And, Fred, we would like to have you verify fuel cell reactants talkback is ba
Sigma Seven Sigma Seven, Hawaii
D'accord. La température de votre bloc moteur oscille entre 85 et 44 degrés. Celle de vos injecteurs varie entre 44 et 21 degrés, et votre écran thermique est bien au-dessus de sa limite inférieure, quel que soit l'endroit. Les températur
That's
جو، هل غيّر ت
알겠습니다. 저희는 곧 출발할 예정이고,
Вы хотите получить о
Okay. Gibt es etwas Bestimmt
Хорошо. Это зарядное
मैं अब VOX ट्रांसमिट पर वापस आ गया हूँ। क्या तुम सुन रहे हो, डीके? मैंने बाईं ओर एक शानदार 90 डिग्री का
天黑以后我就没找到它了。它——它——它晃动得厉害，迪克。它没完全充气，也没像我预期的
吉姆，我大概半小时前把我们最新的那台平板电脑给了弗雷德。这是我们最新的
좋아요
Zanzib
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, Houston. You a
Ok, siamo a 81 - 79 (percentuale di carburante manuale)...cabina 90 
Okay. Basically, that is correct. Let me just run through it hand-waving-type for a minute, and then I'll read you the steps. I think it will make more sense. The scheme is that the can fly to a set of ball angles that will point your optics at the Moon. Now, at any time, in any attitude that we happen to be at, if you can look in the telescope and recognize star patterns sufficient that you believe you can make an alinement all on you
계속하세
आप मिल्ट से 5 मिनट का समय क्यों नहीं मांग लेते
燃料電池1と2は持ちこたえようとしているけど、燃料
Okay. Ganz unten steht: „10.000 Fuß HAUPTFALLSCHIRM AUSLÖSEN, 
Okay. Das ist schon viel besser. Wir gehen davon aus, dass der Akku-Fehler lediglich durch einen Thermoschalter verursacht 
로저, 11. 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 약 71시간에서 72시간 사이에 식사 시간이 시작될 예정이며, 아마 이미 식사 중이실 겁니다. 71시간: 산소 연료 전지 퍼지; 72시간 GET: 이산화탄소 필터 교체 6회, 보조 라디에이터 유량 점검. 그리고 2시간 통과, 준위 통과, 복귀 모드 중단에 대한 블록 데이터를 보내드리겠습니다. 73시간 00분: 롤 각도 약 0도에서 정지하십시
Okay, Jack. Let me see if I have it. What we do is point the at the Earth as we did for the midcourse, and we do a body-axis aline on the. Then you give us an ball attitude to fly to.... the, and then we... point the... at the Moon. Then you would update the - give us some CDUs to coarse 
Кен, нам также следует проверить это на низкой 
私の計画は、プログラム52の再突入に戻ることです。まあ、カペラまでは移動しなかったし、走査望遠鏡で
네. 아, 맙소
حسناً. أستطيع أن أقول إنك تحاول فقط إنهاء هذا الأمر لأن جيم قد انتهى لل
Vous voulez que je m'éteigne mai
わかりました。代替案
Ok, Odyssey; Houston. Ora siamo bloccati su un b
로저, Rev 12에서 RKV가 PLA와 CLA 시간을 업데이트할 겁니다. Rev 13에서는 카나리아 제도에 C-밴드 트랙이 제공될 예정입니다. 또한 천체궤도 항법 점검 비행도 있을 겁니다. 자세 제어에는 추진제를 사용하지 않습니다. 이 시간은 GET(Global Event Time) 기준 12시간 16분 00초입니다. Rev 13 테이프 덤프는 카나본 상공에서 진행됩니다
알겠습니다. 이해했어요. 제가 초당 0.5피트(약 1.27미터)의 속도에 X를 더하고, 서비스 모듈을 JETT 방식으로 작동시킨 다음, 초당 0.5피
في الوقت الحالي، نشهد مجموعتين من مباريات د
我复制了
شك
Carnarvon, our final PQI reading is 29 percent. T
Roger. Understand 18-1 load is 17 56 
結構です。今のところケープとは連絡を取っていませんが、飛行制御の問題についてもう少し詳しく説明してほしいと依頼されています。まず知りたいのは、ヨーイングをそのままにしておくと、どれくらいの速度が出るのかということ
罗杰。横跨这片区域的一系列裂缝或断层向南呈阶梯状下降，大约有三级。北面的平行断层则在中心处向下倾斜。我希望地球上的各位都能明白我们所说的“令人不安的地平线，一个非常黑暗、令人倒胃口的地方”是什么意思。我们现在正飞越——接近我们未来选定的着陆点之一，这片平坦的区域被称为静海——之所以选择平坦的区域，是为了
…nous sommes en train de régler la situation. Nous ne sommes pas vraiment prêts à eff
नहीं। यहाँ सब कुछ बढ़िया चल रहा है। लगता है मुझे छह के लिए प्रतिबद्धता मिल गई है और मैं इससे बहुत खुश हूँ। पूर
रॉजर। आपका RETRB 16+1
우주선은
C'est exact, Jack. Et fermez la vanne de réactif sur la pile à
네, 프레드. 그리고 기본 카트리지를 교체할 때는 '기본'을 다시 선택
Хорошо, Базз. Что касается пунктов вашего плана полета, сначала несколько обновлений. Мы отменили промежуточный заход номер 6. Оставайтесь на месте. Я дам вам немного больше времени сегодня утром. Второй пункт плана полета: мы готовы зарядить батарею B в любой момент, когда вы захотите это сделать; и третий пункт: на этот раз мы хотели бы сбросить сточные во
खेल जगत की बात करें तो, चलिए देखते हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों में जब आप व्यस्त थे, तब जो नामाथ और फुटबॉल कमिश्नर पीट रोज़ेल ने घोषणा की कि "ब्रॉडवे जो" ने बैचलर्स III रेस्टोरेंट
バッテリー C 37.1、PYRO バッテリー A と B は両方とも 37
Roger. On a tout fini sur les
我们还需要稍作调整，才能把它移到屏幕中央。如果你能朝着晨昏线方向移动，那就是我们缺失的部分。我们现在看到的是
ジム、ここが今こちらに向かってきている場所のようです。ビッグベンドがあります。もう通り
네. 저희는 얼마 전에 산소 유량에서 발생했던 작은 오류를 해결하려고 노력 중인데, 지금은 다시 정상으로 돌아왔습니다. 우선, 캐니스터 교체 작업 중에 산소 수요 조절기 A를 CABIN 이외의 위치로 옮기셨는지 알려주시고, 잠시 OF
Okay, nach der Aktivierung haben wir den letzten Schritt abgeschl
Верно, потому что показания немного занижены. Сейчас на скафандре у меня 6, и я собираюсь увеличить до 6,5. Прогрес
Roger. Parmi les gros titres concernant Apollon ce matin, l'un d'eux vous invite à guetter une charmante jeune fille accompagnée d'un gros lapin. Une légende ancienne raconte qu'une belle Chinoise nommée Chang'o vit là depuis 4 000 ans. Il semblerait qu'elle ait été bannie sur la Lune pour avoir volé la pilule d'immortalité à
Okay, Jack just... himself back down. And after he put on the 250 BAT A, BAT B breakers, he read BAT bus volts as 32.3 on A, 37.0 on B; he then punched in the 275 breakers, which tied the batteries to the buses, and at 
Ich lasse H₂O₂ ab. Sicherung eingeschaltet. Bereit. Bergungsarm ist aktiviert. Bereit für den Hauptfallschirm. Alle Schalter sind in der richtigen Position. Der manuelle Treibstoff ist fast aufgebraucht. Da ist er, und der Hauptfallschirm ist draußen. Sie ist draußen, wunderschön. Strahlend blauer Himmel. Und sie ist entkoppelt und sieht aus wie ein Traum. Der automatische Treibstoff läuft ab. Die Sinkrate beträgt derzeit etwa 35 Fuß pro Sekunde. Ich sehe keinerlei Probleme. Ich bereite mich auf den Aufprall vor. Der automatische Treibstoff läuft ab. Der Kabinendruck steigt ordnungsgemäß an. Alle Systeme sehen einwandfrei aus. Mir ist nicht heiß, ich bin nicht überhitzt. Der Hauptfallschirm sieht fantastisch aus. Die Sinkrate beträgt 35 Fuß pro Sekunde. Ich habe keinen Grund, 
Хорошо. Мы начали ма
Yes, I have. However, the food has crumbled badly; and I hate to open the 
Okay, Jim. Ich habe nur noch die letzten drei Blöcke. Breitengrad, 
Хорошо. 10, /: 45597, минус 040, плюс 157, плюс 35186, минус 01512, минус 00520 180 007 000, Ноябрьская Альфа, плюс 00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253; Дельта Скорпиона, вниз 069, влево 45, плюс 0748, минус 16500 12994 36300; главная звезда Сириус, вторичная Ригель, 129 155 010; четыре квадру, 15 секунд, пустое пространство; горизонт на линии окна 3,2 градуса на T минус 3; использовать высокоскоростную про
肯，如果你的同事想玩全向切换游戏，我们现在用的是 Dog-Bravo 模式，实际上是 Bravo 模式，但也配置了 D 模式——更正一下
D'accord, Jim. Nous vous l'avons lu comme lacet, tangage et roulis, et nous aurions dû vous donne
好
Beh, certo, la Terra è piuttosto luminosa, e il cielo nero, invece di essere nero, ha una sorta di bagliore rosato. La stel
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。ジンバルロックシステム
여기서 뭘 하든 항상 거꾸로 된 자세로
Хорошо. Всё верно
正方位
Okay, Vance. Vorgehensweise: FÜHRUNGSSTEUERUNG,; MODUSSTEUERUNG, ATT HOLD;, EINGABE; Manöver in die richtige Lage; Rollen 0, Nicken 90, Gieren 0; mein Ball ist jetzt natürlich außer Betrieb, also muss ich das noch einstellen. Die 5 ist MODUSSTEUERUNG, AUTO; 6:,, Raten überwachen; Raten unter 1 Grad pro Sekunde in jeder Achse, deaktivieren, und ich habe den letzten Teil nicht gehört. Die nächste war,, EINGABE; 1257, EINGABE; 252, EINGABE; 1, EINGABE;, EINGABE;, EINGABE; 22110, FORTFAHREN;, EINGABE;,, EINGABE; Raten überwachen. Raten unter 0,01 Grad pro Sekunde in allen Achsen, EINGABE; MODUSSTEUERUNG, ATT HOLD; dann 30 Klicks R
Ora sta 
了解しまし
Okay. Ve
今
Сомневаюсь, что он поместится на шлеме в B1. Другой, возможно, поместится — может быть, в спальном мешке. У 
That's okay assuming I'm at the right attitude
— — Ты всё это понял, хорошо. Хорошо, а когда 
D'accord. Je me permets de commenter cela. Je soupçonne que les angles de roulis que nous vous avons donnés ont été calculés pour un tangage de 90 degrés exactement, et que vos mouvements de roulis sont probablement suffisamment importan
Apollo 8, pouvez-vous nous dire par quelle fenêtre vous regardez? On aperçoit un grand cratère, qui 
Что ж, система REACQ не сработала, как было заявле
P
알겠습니다
لا يا فريد
Bien reçu. En raison de la charge réduite avec le radar de rendez-vous désactivé, nous souhaiterions que les batteries 5 et 6 s
Continuing what I was debriefing about the booster, early in the flight. After we entered the darkness, at what I consider to be a distance of 1200 feet, I tried station-keeping with it, but the only thing I had to judge my distance from the booster at that time was the distance between
Friendship Seven, ici California Cap Com. Nous vous recevons parfaitement; comment ça
Jim, just an item for you and Fred to be thinking about in case you haven't been briefed on this, somethi
Bene. I primi sei a sinistra sono chiusi
Beh, devo solo moltiplicarl
Comment me
E, Jim, per quanto riguarda l'impostazi
It's 2:30. Everybody will be asleep. I going to s
Ok, Ken. Una cosa che penso è che - non so se qualcuno - l'
Итак, во время посл
That's not
Вы звонили в Кито или в Ке
了解しました。一連の亀裂、つまり断層は南に向かって約3段に下がっています。北側に平行に走る断層パターンは中
هذا صحيح. أرقام الرحلات ا
Transponder, aus. Wechselrichter, 2, auf Aus. Okay. Als Nächstes, Bedienfeld 250: CB-Batterie Bravo, Stromversorgung/Nachlandung öf
Negati
ठीक है, जैक। समझ गया कि आपने बैटरी चार्ज करना पूरा कर लिया है। अब अगर आप तैयार हैं, जैक, तो मैं आपको प्रक्
자, 이제 잭이 저와 함께 나와서... 이 수산화리튬 장치를 만드는 절차를 설명드릴 겁니다. 잭이 헬멧을 쓰면 바로 복제할 준비가 될 
음, 버즈, 70mm 용기에는 흑백 사진 한 장이랑 컬러 사진 한 장밖에 없잖아
……你建议……我们在CEX和CMAX上拍摄地球照片时，快门速度设置为1/250
我再说一遍。01 26 56
Roger, Columbia. Ici Houston. Dites quelque chos
Хорошо, Базз. Цель — пролёт. SPS/G&N: 62815, плюс 097, минус 020 070 54 5944, минус 00028, плюс 00023, плюс 00069 029 149 312, апогей NA, плюс 00221 00078 001 00034, звезда секстанта 01 2385 227, звезда оси обзора NA NA NA. Широта минус 0265, минус 16500, 11899 36228, 144 56 47. В комментариях: ваши звёзды установки — Денеб и Вега, 007 144 068. Нет пустого пространства. Это стыковочный маневр с использованием. Ждит
双子座4号，休斯顿 CAP COM。
이제 역순서가 표시되는데, 이는 정확히 1분 앞으로 돌리면 정확한 시간이 된다는 것을
빌, 2
Rog
On
रॉजर, बज़। अब हमें हेलमेट, वाइज़र और बैकग्राउंड में दिख रहे दस्तानों की बहुत अच्छी तस्वीर म
Sì, intendo dire che ci siamo trasferiti un po' tardi perché..
Roger, Mike. That's real nice, but if you don't m
5، 4، 3، 2، 1، ن
रॉजर। मैं बस यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहता था कि आप लोग फिर से सो तो नहीं गए। और
Ich werde Flights Vorschlag folgen und meine Einstellung für ein p
Роджер. Мы полностью согласны. И пока вы этим занимаетесь, я почитаю — просто прочитайте эти заметки. Вызовите возможную программную тревогу 5.6, дальность действия более 400 морских миль, а затем используйте, как описано в пункте 20. Выберите вариант 1 в NOUN 06 и используйте режим без обновления. Радар сближения зафиксируется на высоте около 25 градусов над горизонтом. Если возникнет тревога 503, 
제가 표시한 대로 5000
Всё выглядело именно так, как я и ожидал, Джо. Она стояла в программе REACQ с вы
네, 맞습니다. 저분이 짐 러벨입니다. 오늘 저희는 아폴로 8호 내부의 생활에 대해 간략하게 보여드리려고 합니다. 달과 지구의 모습은 이미 보여드렸으니, 이제 저희의 보금자리로 여러분을 초대하려고 합니다. 보시다시피 계기판에서 알 수 있듯이, 저희는 최소 4일 동안 이곳에 머물렀습니다. 계기판에 매일 날짜를 표시하는데, 오늘로 4일째이고 5일째를 보내고 있습니다. 물론 저희 모두 금요일 착륙을 손꼽아 기다리고 있습니다. 여기, 우주선 하부 장비실이라고 부르는 곳에서 대통령 체력 담당 고문이신 짐 러벨 대위님께서 매일 하는 운동 프로그램을 시작하시려고 합니다. 러벨 대위님이 아주 자유롭게 떠다니는 게 보이시죠? 방금 항법에 사용되는 광학 장치에 머리를 부딪히셨네요. 근육을 단련하기 위해 고안된 운동 기구를 사용하고 계십니다. 우리 우주선의 또 다른 매우 중요한 기능은 컴퓨터입니다. 여러분께서 흥미로워하실 것 같아 여기에 있는 디스플레이를 보여드리겠습니다. 이 디스플레이는 연소 과정, 항법, 그리고 지구 궤도 진입 및 역추진 시 사용하는 속도에 대한 모든 정보를 제공합니다. 보시다시피 타자기 키보드와 비슷한 장치로 조작되는데, 입력되는 정보의 양은 정말 놀랍습니다. 이 장치는 우리에
يا إلهي! أذناي تؤلمني من ا
Ok. Installare i cont
做好
Понял. Вы п
少し
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Одна просьба: переключите опти
フレッド、その通り。水分量が2ポンド（約900g）減っているのに気づきました。最近何か飲み物を飲んだのですか？それとも、水分量が減った理由が何かありますか？オーバー
今はまさにそれを見ているところです。待機してく
Хорошо. Мы поняли, что ваш насос включен. GET B 03:19; Delta
자, 물병자리 여러분. 제 신호와 
روجر. بخصوص وضعية الاحتراق: نود منك استخدام الدوران 096، والميل 356، والانحراف 018. سيعطيك ذلك نجمة سدسية بزاوية 01، ومحور 253.8، ومحور دوران
罗杰，我完全明白你的意思。我这里
Ok, Jack. Lascia che ti dia subito una configurazione dei propulsori. Able 1, Charlie 1, Able 2 s
सब कुछ ठीक लग रहा है, मैं आपको यहाँ संक्षिप्त जानकारी दे देता हूँ। ईंधन 29-27 प्रतिशत है। केबिन का दबाव 5.5 पर स्थिर ह
私はそれを少し
收到。我明白了——用六分仪跟踪比用扫描望远镜更
了解。かなり良い点数を取れているようですね。ベクト
È vero? Ne ho scattate molte, ma non sono un granché. Per la maggior parte di esse sei tro
了解。こ
켄, 다음번엔 진짜를 
माइक, आप जो देख रहे हैं, वह ह्यूस्टन, पश्चिमी गोलार्ध है। ऊपर की ओर उत्तरी ध्रुव है; केंद्र में - केंद्र से थोड़ा नीचे दक्षिण अमेरिका है - और य
지구 자전축의 흔들림이 점점 심해지는 것 같아요. 지금 지구는 창문 맨 위
SEF выровнялся. SEF выровнялся через 2 часа 46 минут, и мы завершили маневр смены
Ok. Ricevuto. Hai l'ALLARME PRINCIPALE, con la spia. Siamo pronti a procedere e a farti entrare nei contenitori del modulo di comando. E come primo passo, vorrei sapere se hai inserito
알겠습니다. SPS 회로 차단기 8개, 모두 닫혀 있습니다. 총 12
चलिए देखते हैं। ऑर्बिट रेट पर इसका झुकाव कम हो 
Sans le ballon, je peux toujours utiliser 
收到。血压正常。你各就各位，可以
好的。在第10
L'ordinateur est à vous, 11. Les chargements sont term
안녕하세요, 글쎄요. 음... 저기 소파가 있으니 나쁘지 않은 생활 방식
レオが出
ジェミニ
D'accord. À 23 heures, le total est de 1121, le quad A est à 274, le quad Bravo à 286, le quad Charlie à 274, le quad Delta à 287, et les cryostats sont les suivants: réservoir H2 1, 83 %; réservoir H2 2, 86 %; réservoir O2 1, 87 %; réservoir O2 2, 87 %. 
Хорошо. Теперь на той странице, где описан маневр облета, под вашей группой северных звезд, у меня для вас новые номера, потому что мы заменили эти звез
从地质
好的，吉姆。我得到了指令舱 3
是的，我们把西装袖带调到了 2。我们会把它们
이글, 여기는 휴스턴입니다.
わかりました、ジャック。先ほど教えたバッ
Wir fühlen uns heute recht gut. Beim Durchsehen des Flugplans ist uns aufgefallen, dass wir die Ruhepausen vielleicht etwas verk
Ricevuto. Trentasette volt, ok. Le quantità di crio previste sono: sul serbatoio di ossig
«Дружба Семь», это связь с ком
Roger. À, changez le numéro d'étoile 02 de un set à
Хорошо.
맞습니다. 좋습니다. 다음으로, 모드 - 자세 설정이 완
Roger. 
अपोलो 8, ह
Les 7 heures consacrées à ce problème sont dues au fait que nous voulons obtenir ces observations à une certaine distance. Termin
Eagle, Houston. Sia
Подождите. Мы справимся. У нас п
稍等。情况看起来不错。我
这里有个挺有意思的小新闻，听起来挺不错的。密歇根州安娜堡市出现了一个新的青少年帮派，名叫吉尔内特帮（Gilnet Gang）。他们秘密地在安娜堡的街头游荡，有时甚至会绕过法律。他们自称“行善游击队”（Guerillas for Good）。他们做过的一些事包括：在一个晚上，他们把一座被污言秽语涂满的桥重新粉刷了一遍；把一栋被判定为危房的房子——虽然很受附近孩子欢迎，但其实很危险——用木板封了起来；把市中心那些因为争论是商家还是政府负责而空着的花坛重新种满了鲜花；修剪了繁忙路口的一丛被认为遮挡视线的树篱，这让树篱的主人很生气；清理了休伦河沿岸一段的垃圾。帮派成员都是匿名青少年，他们不求任何个人荣誉。他们的目标是打破官僚主义，把他们认为的好事办成。这个组织带有一丝宗教色彩。一位密歇根大学的助理教授说，这有点像一个跨教派的团体，他非正式地为这个团伙提供咨询。他们的名字来源于圣彼得和渔网。而且，由于地处偏远，他们与任何特定的教会都没有关联。他们的老师（同样不愿透露姓名）说，这个团体里贯穿着罗宾汉式的精神。他们的很多活动都游走在法律边
Verseau, Houston. Désolé, mai
حس
Оно поднимается довольно высоко. Оно принимает веерообразную форму, в отличие от восхода солнца на Земле, где на него влияет атмосфера. Здесь же над всей местностью сплошная дымка. Она сконцентрирована именно в том месте, где сол
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. One request: the optics switch to zero. And we've got a lot of theories on why it maneuvered at seven-tenths a moment ago, Mike, but no real defin
D'accord, Jack, je m'en occupe. Jim et moi avons pu observer les constellations depuis les fenêtres quand il n'y a pas de ventilation. Pourriez-vous me donner une idée de la durée de vie de ces consommables, à votre avis? Il me semble que vous avez commencé à donner des indications, non? Ou bien ai-je mal 
Ok. Innanzitutto, la correzione a metà rotta sarà probabilmente a 104 ore, e tutto ciò che cerchiamo è un DELTA-V da 4 a 6 piedi al secondo. Ok. Questo è il primo punto. Ora, vi darò un riepilogo dei materiali di consumo. Ok. Nel, ne avete 1498, ovvero 1,498 ampere-ora rimanenti. Ciò significa che in 61 ore avreste... In media, 24,5 ampere. Ci aspettiamo che, dopo lo spegnimento, utilizziate 1,4 o 14 ampere all'ora, e questo lascerebbe una riserva di 500 ampere-ora a
حسنًا. الأمر الآخر هو ما بعد الهبوط. نؤكد مجددًا على ضرورة ألا تتجاوز مدة وجودك في المركبة الفضا
Думаю, мы
Это подтверждается; и, поскольку вчера во время большого запуска подвес был отрегулирован, мы должны пройти через центр тяжести, и мы хотели бы убедиться, что Джек будет сидеть на том же месте во время этого запуска, что и вчера. Таким образом, у вас не должно возникнуть проблем с контролем положения. Теперь я готов перейти к странице 32. К
الاهتزاز طبيعي، وانتقلنا إلى بدء المنافسة
नहीं, यह काफी अच्छा दिख रहा 
그럼
Apollo 11, Houston. Also, that water that you got on the aft bulkhead, we
Okay. On panel 3: TRANSPONDER to PRIMARY; PO
我们
ああ、聞きたくないだろう。ここで時間を計算してみろ。79歳で、今何歳だ？ 一体…これより速いコンピ
Следует отметить, что в 3:26:33 я наблюдаю в небе одновременно 10 частиц. Они, несомненно, кажутся мне светящимися. Они выглядят как маленькие кусочки инея. Однако некоторые из них находятся очень-очень далеко. Две из них выглядят так, будто находятся на расстоянии около 100 ярдов. Я давно не
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We've lost our command interface with Goldstone. We'd like you to 
Hanno dato 
Хорошо, Дик. Все окна в командном модуле сейчас сильно покрыты водой. Поэтому я не знаю, какие снимки мы из них получим, но я постараюсь их очистить и сделать все возможное с помощью 250-миллиметрового объектива 
जैक, आपके केबिन के नियमों का अभी भी पालन किया जा रहा है, लेकिन आप इस समय अपशिष्ट प्रबंधन वेंट को फिर से खोल सकते हैं, और हम इसे बंद करने के समय को आपके लिए उचित मात्रा में समायोजित कर लेंगे
Aquarius, Houst
Okay. First statement is a statement: "Verify in OPERATE for
Probabilmente un 
ربما قمنا بدفعها إلى البحر باستخدام مفتاح السخان هذا عندما اعتقدنا أن ا
يستهلك الآن 50 جنيهاً إسترلينياً. هل تلاحظين انخفاض
Mentre il booster si allontanava, si poteva vedere il carburante schizzare fuori dall'ugello di rollio. Mentre il booster ruotava, per lo più su un piano perpendicolare a una linea che passava per l'asse maggiore della navicella verso il booster, si poteva vedere la lunga coda fluente che ne usciva. Farò un breve disegno di questo sul mio piano di volo. C'erano detriti ovunque al momento della separazione della navicella. Ci siamo girati e c'erano cose dappertutto. In effetti, finché non abbiamo dato un'occhiata più da vicino al booster, non riuscivo proprio a capire cosa fosse. Le carenature si sono staccate proprio al punto di partenza senza problemi. Le carenature dello scanner dell'orizzonte sembrav
Okay. Panel 5, CB-Sensorsignale MAIN A und MAIN 
Да, подожди
D'accord, ça marche. Parce que je ne sais pas où je vous ai perdu. Bon, panneau 4; TELCOMM, GROUPE 1, vers AC1. Sur le panneau 5, fermez les éléments suivants: GROUPE DE PRESSION 1, PRINCIPAL B; GROUPE DE PRESSION 2, PRINCIPAL B; TEMP, PRINCIPAL B; TRANSDUCTEUR DE BOUCLE SECONDAIRE, PRINCIPAL B; RAD, CONTRÔLE/RÉCHAUFFAGES, PRINCIPAL B; BUS DE RELAIS DE BATTERIE, BATTERIE B; CHARGEUR DE BATTERIE, BATTERIE B; CONTRÔLE D'ONDULEUR, 2; CONTRÔLE D'ONDULEUR, 1; SIGNAL DE CAPTEUR, AC1; SIGNAL DE CAPTEUR, PRINCIPAL B; UNITÉ DE CAPTEUR, AC1; USÉE/EAU POTABLE, PRINCIPAL B; 
非常
Okay. We're just starting to get data, an
Roger. Nous partions du principe qu'il faudrait environ une heure pour que les interférences dues à la décharge d'eaux usées se dissipent suffisamment pour permettre des observations stellaires raisonnables, par exemple pour l'alig
Go ahead, Hou
Мы бы 
Ok, Jack. Stiamo ricevendo l'ultima conferma. Rimani in att
You might be
شكرًا لك
ठीक है, वैंस, मैं आगे बढ़ने 
我确定我是在
Oka
نعم. لقد حصلوا 
ロジャー、ジェリー。了解しました。一つ違いに気づきました。私たちは優先オプショ
Wir haben nur
En fait, il s'agit du transfert du
अपोलो 8, य
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, this is 
S
Esatto. Sto guardando Houston dall'
로저, 프렌드십 세븐
Ich habe 0,7 Meilen 
휴스턴, 아폴로 1
لم أفهم 
Ты это полу
Roger. My status is good; the capsule status is good; my control mode is automatic; gyros are normal; maneuver is off. Control fuel is 51 [percent] and 69 [percen
Ja. Wir senden Ihnen die Daten in
Alpha/PC vers PC; INDICATEUR DE LANCEMENT DU VÉHICULE vers GPI; INCLINAISON et LAYAUGLEMENT DE LA CARROSSERIE sur AUTO; RÉINITIALISATION DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS, vers le haut; DÉMARRAGE DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS sur ARRÊT; MINUTES ET SECONDES DU MINUTEUR D'ÉVÉNEMENTS au centre; Valve de ventilation POST-ATTERRISSAGE, pousser; EXTENSION/RELÂCHEMENT DE LA SONDE sur ARRÊT; Messages d'extension/relâchement, deux, gris; RÉTRACTATION DE LA SONDE D'AMARRAGE, PRINCIPALE et SECONDAIRE, désactivée; étendre les FEUX DE NAVIGATION/FEUX EVA, désactivés; étendre les FEUX DE NAVIGATION - FEU DE RENDEZ-VOUS, désactivé - il faut en avoir un - voilà - FEU DE TUNNEL, désactivé; FEU D'ALIMENTATION, désactivé; MODULE DE SERVICE Hélium, quatre, au centre; Message HÉLIUM 1, quatre, gris; MODULE DE
Все в п
Si è consapevoli che il tempo trascorso dalla capsula è circa un secon
Хорошо. Температура на входе вторичного радиатора составляет около 70-72 градусов; на выходе радиатора около 30; температура испарения гликоля около 65; давление пара максимальное, давление на выходе гликоля около 9 psi. Температура в вторичных накопительных костюмах около 52 градусов; в кабине около 58 градусов; давление в костюме 4,1, в кабине 5. Парциальное давление CO2 чуть больше 1, около 1,1. На боковой стенке дома температура 72 градуса, гелий 3500; N2 A 2300; N2 B около 2450. Топливо около 165; топливный элемент 1, оба закрыты, давление нулевое. Температура кожи 405 градусов; показания на выходе конденсата ниже. Топливный элемент 2 — сейчас у нас показания расхода кислорода или водорода от 0,13 до 0,14, при этом расход кислорода сейчас зафиксирован на максимальном значении, хотя он менялся в зависимости от работы двигателей, что также привело к понижению напряжения на основной шине A от стабильного значения около 1,1 до максимального значения. Температура кожи около 445, а на выходе конденсатора 17, поправка, 180. Давайте посмотрим, хотите ли вы
ठीक है। आपका लैंडिंग क्षेत्र, जो समोआ से लगभग 560 मील दक्षिण में है, में मौसम का पूर्वानुमान लगभग 1500 फीट ऊंची, छिटपुट और तेज़ लहरों वाला है। लहरें 5 फीट ऊंची होंगी, हवा की गति 15 नॉट होगी, दृश्यता 20 मील होगी, क्षेत्र के 10 प्रतिशत से कम हिस्से में बारिश की संभ
ठीक है। ठीक है, अब आपने दोनों एसी बसों पर इन्वर्टर 1 लगा दिया है। और जैक, जिन चीज़ों को हमने बंद किया था उनमें से एक थी - सभी फ्यूल सेल पंप। ठीक है, और जब फ्यूल सेल 2 क
Okay. First star will be 26, and we'll be making two sets of measurements, earth near-horizon using star 26. Then we would like to have one set on star 16, that's 16, using the earth far-horizon. If it turns out that star 26 earth near-horizon is not possible, then we'd like to have
很有意思的是，我的姿态——以及气球——大致是俯仰角向上30度，向右横滚130度，向左偏航20度。此时气球正和我
That's 3 down, 
No, non ho copiato. Li leggo solo saltuariamente, ma gr
1, G&N: 62710, plus 098, minus 019, ignition 075 49 4965, minus 28897, minus 03944, minus 00686. Roll 358, pitch 226, 347; 01692, plus 00610; 29173 602 29108; sextant star 31 1066 358. Remainder of the PAD is NA. align Vega and Deneb 243 183 012. No ullage. The horizon will be visible just below the upper edge of the hatch window 2 minutes prior to the burn. It will not be visible in the rendezvous window on the left hand side. at 75 hours 41 minutes 23 seconds. at 76 15 29. without the burn 76 05 30. The values which you would see on NOUN 42 prior to burn are HA plus 431.3, HP 
حسنًا يا جاك. في قائمة التحقق الخاصة بك، في الصفحة 2-5. في الأسفل، في الخطوة 9، حيث يُذكر 152 درجة ميل عند 0.05 جرام، بجانب ذلك، حتى يت
Très bien. J'aimerais prendre les liaisons principales, deux d'entre elles, et ainsi de suite. C'est probablement une vérificati
알겠습니다. 57-2 구역 86. 1+49. 07 42 52. 7+12. 11+52. 58-2 94. 1+59. 09 16 42. 5+49. 10+41. 58 구역 - BRAVO 분할 연소, 55 전방, 51 후방. 1
네, 좋습니다. 그럼 이제 전
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다
Roger. I
罗杰。请讲，13号
And I've got two things we'd like Jack to do in the command module to ease the load on MAIN A. One of them is to verify or turn the CM/RCS HEATER switch to OFF. We're done with that, and even though the circuit breakers are pulled, the switches might be drawing a little current. And the second one is, we'd like him to turn LOGIC POW
ロール
ठीक है। अगले कुछ घंटों के लिए हमें आपकी उड़ान योजना के बारे में अपडेट चाहिए। आपको क्या 
That's aff
알겠습니다. R1에 0.34202를 더하고
J'a
Понял. Мы 
로저. 그곳을 가로지르는 일련의 균열 또는 단층들은 남쪽으로 약 세 단계에 걸쳐 아래로 내려갑니다. 북쪽의 평행한 단층 패턴도 중앙에서 아래로 내려갑니다. 지구에 계신 여러분 모두 저희가 이 지평선이 얼마나 불길하고 어둡고 식욕을 떨어뜨리는 곳인지 이해하실 수 있기를 바랍니다. 저희는 지금 이 매끄러운 지역, 즉 '고요의 바다'라고 불리는 곳에 선정된 미래 착륙 지점 중 한 곳으로 접근하고 있습니다. 이 지역은 초기 착륙 시도 시 산을 피해야 하는 번거로움을 없애기 위해 매끄럽게 조성되었습니다. 이제 달의 일출 그림자가 길게 드리워지는 것을 보실 수 있습니다. 저희는 지금 달의 일출에 가까워지고 있으며, 지구에 계신 모든 분들께 아폴로
초당 거의 1피트(약 30cm)에 해당합니
알겠
Хорошо. Возможно, нам удастся... если удастся подобраться к Луне немного ближе, чтобы оказать на неё максим
لقد تجاوزتُ الجانب المظلم الآن. لم يطلع ال
بعض الأمور المتفرقة لك: نود منك التوقف عن شحن البطارية B في هذا الوقت؛ ونود أيضًا إجراء
That's affirmative. Okay, now we're at minus 5 plus 05. And, as far as you're concerned, Jack, the command module is using this for information only. This will be the doing an Earth-terminator alinement; and at the time of 5 plus 05 is the time they'll be going ahea
Alles klar. Auf Schalttafel 276: Leistungsschalter INSTRUMENTATION POWER CONTROL, 3 und 4, geöf
11，我们仍然看到您航天器的运行速率高于我们希望继续运行该模式的速
そうなるはずだ。3つでは分
로저. 말씀드린 대로, 이 작업의 주된 목적은 산소 유량 센서를 점검하는 것입니다. 하지만 약 2시간 동안 객실 산소 공급이 더 필요하기 때문에, 이 목적을 위해 설치할 환기구를 계속 작동시켜야 합니다. 좋습니다. R-6 구획(로미오 6)에 있는 객실 환기구 퀵 커넥터를 251번 패널의 소
D'accord. Merci. Je suis ravi d'apprendre que le système fonctionne bien. Aurie
Okay. Afte
حسناً، فهمت أن جيم أغلق صمام
是的，没错：我们正在收回机械臂，一切都在按计划进行，机器运
ठीक है। पीसी प्लस 2 के बाद, ट्रिम की कोई आवश्यकता नहीं है; और, यदि पीसी प्लस 2 के दौरान इंजन बंद हो जाता है, तो बाद में मध्य-मार्ग युद्धाभ्यास की आवश्यकता होगी - खैर, सबसे पहला पीसी प्लस 4 होगा। यदि आप पीसी प्लस 2 नहीं करते हैं, लेकिन हम फिर भी इसे करना चाहते हैं - तो बाद में। पीसी प्लस 4 पर, डेल्टा-वी में वृद्धि, या दंड, लगभग 24 फीट प्रति सेकंड होगा, मध्य प्रशांत में लैंडिंग के साथ। अब, आपको लगभग 78 पर पीसी प्लस 2 के लिए नए पैड, स्टेट वेक्टर और लक्
ليس كثيراً. ألاحظ أن الوضع مختلف عما كان عليه عندما خلدت إلى النوم. نحن الآن بزاوية أكبر مع خط فاصل الليل والنهار للأرض، ففي البداية كنا شبه موازين له، أما الآن فنحن مائلو
간단한 보고를 해
Ok. Abbiamo smesso di usare l'alto guadagno sull'OMNI per un po' e siamo passati a un bit rate basso, e ci s
그것을 가리
Roger. J'ai eu des indications lors de la transmission d
Okay. Wir sind jetzt genau an dem Punkt angelangt, an dem ihr laut dem von uns erstellten Flugplan alle mit dem Essen fertig gewesen wärt und du und Jack die Wache hättet, während Fred schlafen gegangen wäre. Dem Plan zufolge seid ihr also etwa drei oder vier Stunden früher aufgestanden. Die nächste Ruhepause ist um 96 Uhr, also in sieben Stunden. Eine Stunde vorher, sagen wir um 95 Uhr, würdet ihr alle drei essen, und dann würden du und Jack wieder schlafen ge
نيل، لم أكن منتبهاً - 
Tha
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في جهاز المحاكاة، إن لم يكن بنفس السهولة. لذا أكملنا المهمة حتى النهاية. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون، كنت قد قررت أننا لن نتمكن من الوصول، لكنني فكرت في الاستمرار قليلًا. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون - أو قبل مغادر
मुझे कसकर पकड़ना होगा, मुझे सीधा खड़ा करना 
로저. 그보다 조금 후인 1
हां, मैंने किया। और हमें लगभग 20 पाउंड सावधानीपूर्वक चुने गए नमूने मिले, हालांकि उनका दस्तावेजीकरण नहीं किया गया
Okay. "Era la notte prima di Natale e, nello spazio, l'equipaggio dell'Apollo 8 aveva appena vinto la corsa alla luna; le cuffie erano appese con cura alle console, nella speranza che Chris Kraft sarebbe arrivato presto; Frank Borman era rannicchiato tutto al caldo nel suo letto, mentre visioni di danzavano n
倒也
اسأله
로저, 오로라 세븐입니다. 카노 캡 
Deke, I finally got a grasp on this thing. I'm beginning to feel a little cooler. And the suit inl
Хорошо. Когда у вас найдётся два человека, и вы сможете построить одну из этих установок для добычи гидроксида лити
Sigma S
रॉजर। क्या 
Хорошо. Можно ожидать продувку топливного элемента, и зарядка батареи А должна завершиться где-то после этого; похоже, у вас будет почти полностью заряженная батарея. Мы позвоним вам, чтобы сообщить точное время отключения. Мы хотели бы получить от вас подтверждение относительно процедур с хлором. Вы использовали его прошлой ночью или нет? Вкратце, сколько вы спали на Ловелле и
Houston, die, die behauptet haben, wi
Capisco; vai avanti. Mike, vorremmo, se possibile, sincronizzare la TV con il passaggio sopra il terminatore. Vorremmo se
Eagle, Houston. Richiedi l'interruzione della fase, il ripristino,... il ripristin
チャーリー、単眼鏡を使えば、サンフェルナンド渓谷にはっきりとした緑色の影が
Эта операция 
收到。我的电脑里有有
Как ты меня теперь понимаешь, Эллиот
Okay.
J'ai un 
रॉजर। जेमिनी 4, हम चाहेंगे कि आप अपने एसी पावर स्विच को वा
لا، أعتق
Еда: на данный момент мы съели второй прием пищи за второй день. И мы оба уже съели регидратирующиеся продукты, соки и примерно 
피치다운, 그러니까 우리는 앞으로 나아가고 있는 거죠, 좋아요. 우리가 어떤 금리를 적용해야 할지 궁금하네
ऑक्सीजन प्रवाह के बारे में हमारी रीडिंग पहले जैसी ही है। इ
रॉजर
로저. Y 001, NA, 플러스 00202 46420 547 46211 12 1383 327 023 위 172 왼쪽 22, 플러스 1293, 마이너스 1
Roger. Your other readbacks wer
您上次的
反正他们是这么
रॉजर। आपका सेकेंडरी पंप बी चालू है। क्या आपने इसे
Commande de tuba activée. Débit d'urgence activé. Interrupteur de fusible principal d'urgence à 1
好的。这里有一个警告灯亮着，说明你没有喊出来——是前置放大器的问题——我猜
Хорошо. Давайте посмотрим, всё ли я понял. Для начала, чтобы произошла встреча, нам нужно замкнуть выключатель CB 16 INVERTER 2 и выключатель CB 11 AC BUS A BUS TIE INVERTER 2. Затем на панели 14 убедитесь, что выбран INVERTER 2. И замкните выключатель CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2, оба выключателя. Затем нужно потянуть за рычаг RENDEZVOUS RADAR RELEASE. На панели 3 нам нужно включить RENDEZVOUS RADAR. Нажмите ENTER с плюсом для всех почтовых индексов, плюс 28300 в регистрах 1 и 2. Включаем. Затем отслеживаем движение с помощью 16 72. После парковки разомкните выключатель CB 11 RENDEZVOUS RADAR 2, затем нажмите ENTER. И разомкните выключатель CB 16 INV
肯定しまし
ट्रैंक्विलिटी बेस,
Je ne pense pas que ce soit plus difficile de... qu'à des vitesses orbitales... Il n'y a tout simplement aucun moyen de... l'altitu
Richtig. Ich denke, die zweite Ableitung der Kurve des Wasserkochers über der Zeit wird uns den optimalen Zeitpunkt dafür li
GET
알았어, 조. 여기 -1A라는 새 페이지를 만들었어. 항목 6, 전원 전환. 투광등이 꺼져 있는지, 주의/경고/전원 표시등이 
बिल्कुल सही। मुझे लगता है कि अभी हम जो देख रहे हैं, वह हमारे नीचे दक्षिण अमेरिका
लैंडिंग के बाद की चेकलिस्ट। पैराशूट जेट-पुश किया गया। लैंडिंग सुरक्षित। लैंडिंग बस में सुरक्ष
J
로저, 평온함. TIG, 104 39 47 00, 55358 00322, 플러스 0022. 47, 플러스 37
Roger. Would you position your real time T/M switch 
Roger, come va, Ne
Ok Fred-o. A pagina 12, vogli
Ja, da sind auch ein paar Steine ​​drin. Man kann sie fühlen, aber nicht sehen;
Hallo, Apollo 11, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, an Ihren Kryogeräten jetzt alle vier Heizelemente auf AUTO zu ste
Oui, je les surveille et elles me semblent très bonnes, Bill. Un instant, je vérifie auprès 
Roger. I'm ready to go back to VHF RANGING configura
It's really beautiful; loud and clear and jus
Qui è
... wir haben ein Man
من الصعب تحديد وتيرة معقولة. أعتقد أنها الوتيرة التي أستخدمها الآن - ستصبح متعبة للغاية بعد عدة مئات من الخطوات، لكن قد يكون هذا بسبب هذه البدلة، با
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, ogni volta che la tua combustione OAMS supera i 36 metri al secondo, ti forniremo una combustione divisa, a 26 metri dai prop
Okay, Fred-o. Ich lese dir jetzt die Anleitung vor. Die Prozedur, die ich dir jetzt vorlese, ist ein Sun-Check, um zu sehen, ob wir eine Ausrichtung benötigen oder nicht. Nimm bitte dein G&N-Wörterbuch 
Roger. Bezüglich dieser RAD-Ausgangstemperatur: Zeigen 
わかりました。私の
Schau dir den Stern an, der dort oben aufgeht – s
ठीक है। म
فرانك، أنت تمامًا كما توقعنا من قبل. ضوء رصيفك يطغى تمامًا على 
Charlie, nenne diese drei Winkel bitte noch einmal. Ich möchte sie
罗杰。我刚把传感器插上
Allez-y, 
Quad Bravo、そうです。プライマリ トークバックとセカンダリ ト
杰克向外望去，发现粒子数量已经大大减少，几乎消失了，这表明可能正在排放的气体已经几乎
ठीक है। जैक, पानी के बारे में एक और बात। अगर आप दबाव कम करने के लिए पर्याप्त पानी नहीं निकालते हैं, तो बचा हुआ दबाव 1 से 3 घंटे में खत्म हो 
Roger. I believe we have the in sight. It would appear to b
Gemini VI, Gemini VI, Houston CAP COM. Ich habe eu
حسنًا. هذا هو 9، /: 45597، ناقص 040، زائد 157، زائد 34188، ناقص 01353، زائد 00780 180 008 001، نوفمبر ألفا، زائد 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033، لأسفل 131، لليسار 28، زائد 0758، ناقص 16500 12987 36277؛ النجم الرئيسي سيريوس، النجم الثانوي ريجل، 129 155 010؛ أربع مربعات، 15 ثانية، مسح، الأفق على خط نافذة 1.2 درجة عند T ناقص 3؛ استخدم إجراء السرعة العالية مع ناقص مايك ألفا. بعد م
— Et 12,5 est un grand angle. Ce qui me perturbe, c'est que la notice précise 
Mir gefällt, wie ordentlich er seinen Sicherheitsgurt angelegt hat – der sollte ungefähr an der richtigen Ste
本当に美しい
حسنًا، 13؛ نحن الآن نحصل على معدل البت العالي الخاص بك ونلقي ن
هيوستن، برج الدل
نعم، رمية 180، رمية 
Итак, мы — мы уже передали — подождите — мы уже передали вектор состояния, прежде чем сделали операцию 52. Поэтому се
Juste au-dessus du Golfe, hein? La météo a été bonne chez vous sur l'orbite
Qu
Vance, you might be interested - the way we're - the way we got this thing arranged, we have one helmet attached to the COMM lines attached to the hoses, and the guy that's got the duty wears the helmet, so the ot
Canary, Friendship Seven. Bien reçu. Contrôle terminé. Capsule en place et
Okay, we got your quantity, so we we'll leave you alone an
슈트 내부 
Apollo 8, Houston. Débit binaire réduit. La dernière fois que nous vous avons vu, vous 
はい、ジャック。それでは、リストにある残りのブレーカーに戻って、その逆の順番
로저. 커맨드 파일럿을 확인해 봤습니다. 21시 35분에 액티페드 알약 1정을 복용하셨네요. 코막힘 때문
Ich stelle jetzt auf niedrig
제어 모드를 사용해 보라고 했을 때 무슨 
حسنا
रॉजर, यह कैनरी कैपकॉम की ओर स
Okay. The next one, two, three, four are unchanged. And then we want TRANSLATION CONTROLLER POWER to OFF, ROTATION CONTROL POWER NORMAL, 
Ich habe auf VOX-Senden und -Aufzeichnen umgeschaltet. Ich bin zufrieden, dass ich die Gierbewegung durch das Sichtfenster auch ohne Fadenkreuz erkennen kann, indem ich Bilder 
Ok. Vance, ho la procedura per interrompere la carica della batteria. Vuoi che te 
8 मिनट 
Вначале работа с системой не позволила нам немедленно начать наблюдения, как мы планировали, поскольку нам предстоял очередной маневр уклонения. Сброс системы вызвал огромное количество псевдозвезд в этой области, что сделало калибровку оптики практически невозможной. Разработанный нами метод, похоже, работал не очень хорошо. В итоге я использовал метод, заключавшийся в том, чтобы спуститься в систему, добраться до Сириуса, нашей самой яркой звезды, взять вал и цапфу, а затем поднять космический аппарат к Сириусу, чтобы использовать их для оптики, что мы и сделали позже. Что касается рассеяния света, то, похоже, почти в любом положении во время пассивного терморегулирования мы получаем рассеяние света в сканирующем телескопе. Оно принимает форму широкой полосы света прямо по центру телескопа, примерно на 10 градусов в каждом направлении от нуля. В этой области очень трудно увидеть звезды. Перенастройки прошли успешно. Мне удалось обнаружить звезду в секстанте для юстировки, но я не смог идентифицировать звезду, которую мы использовали в таких случаях, как Регор или Менкен, в сканирующем телескопе. Первое наблюдение звезды над Землей показало очень нечеткий горизонт. Но, казалось, существовала очень — или довольно — резкая — линия между тем, что казалось горизонтом Земли, и атмосферой. Фильтр, определяющий линию визирования, помог, по-видимому, улучшить четкость этого горизонта. Между космическим пространством и верхней границей атмосферы проходит очень размытый и нечеткий горизонт, и использовать его очень сложно. Как я уже говорил, иногда, глядя на Луну, когда Солнце находится в непосредственной близости, область вокруг Луны, пространство вокруг Луны, не темное, а светлое — выглядит как светло-голубое. То же самое происходит и при наблюдении в секстант во время юстировки по звезде — когда Солнце находится в некоторой близости от оптики. Тем не менее, у меня нет трудностей с обнаружением этих звезд в секстанте. У меня также не возникло трудностей с обнаружением используемых мной звёзд,
クリッ
알겠습니다. 11단계, "조명 장치를 끄십시오." 12단계
— Nous vous demandons de vous mettre en position 060 et d'annuler vos tirs pour photographier la comèt
Ricevuto. Capisco che non hai ancora un aggancio e che dovra
罗杰。新的
फिर भी समझ नहीं आया, फ्रेड।
分かりました
वैसे यह 
هيوستن، أبولو 11. لقد حظينا للتو برؤية ممتازة لموقع اله
Roger. I
Bonjour Hous
غروب الشمس. ملاحظات: -1 لـ B-1، والآن لديّ أربعة أوقات أخرى لك - أوقات رصد لظهور
Aurora Seven, Aurora Seven, ici California Com Tech, California Com Tech. Vous m
好的，没问题
Ce gyroscope de vit
لا، يا د
알겠습니다. 그럼 이 방법은 터널과 객실 사이의 압력차(ΔP)가 3psi일 때 터널 압력 무결성, 즉 해치 압력 무결성 검사를 수행하는 데 도움이 됩니다. 
네, "마이너스 06:30"이고 전압 측정값 3.
Real 
Ok. Prima di copiare, lascia che te lo legga tutto dall'inizio alla fine, così capirai di cosa stiamo parlando. Il titolo di questa piccola epistola è "Esperimento di correlazione tra fotografia televisiva e cinematografica" e quello che vogliono fare è montare la telecamera con il teleobiettivo su una staffa nella finestra di rendezvous e scattare una foto televisiva della Terra attraverso i filtri rosso e blu, 1 minuto per filtro; questo significa filtri rosso e blu individualmente. Poi vorrebbero scattare una f
Okay. Do you have any roll angle that 
わかりました、クル
حسنًا. ما زلتُ أستخدم وضع SLEW، لذا ق
了解しました。プラットフォームの
不，我不着急。你们先把东西都收拾好；我可不想让几套西装露在外面。如果你们想晾一会儿，就用水管冲洗一下，我不着急。等你们弄完，我再把这
And, next, page 35, on the right-hand side. Everything from "Spacecraft control,, AUTO, verify" on down should be given the comment "Zodiacal light p
了解。バズ、この調子で君は素晴らしい。5点ずつ読んでいる。短いカウントで
D'accord, Houston. Tu lis toujours le numéro
好的。你的剩余收益部分可以
轴机械式 CDU 读数似乎低于零点 0.00，也就是大约 364
मुझे लगता है ऐसा ही है, लेकिन मुझे एक बार फिर से जाँच लेने दीजिए। एक्वेरियस, ह्यूस्टन। हाँ, बिल
肯，我们今天最多只睡了两个小时。我们现在要走了——比
Vous avez tout à fait raison! Je confirme. Les événements qui se sont produits n'ét
روجر، باز. تبدو فكرة جيدة
Здравствуйте, Muchea Com Tech, Friendship Seven. Конец 
3
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota quattro e stiamo lavorando al quinto giorno. Naturalmente, non vediamo l'ora che arrivi l'atterraggio di venerdì. Qui sotto, nella parte della navicella che chiamiamo stiva inferiore, abbiamo il consigliere del Presidente per la forma fisica, il Capitano Jim Lovell, che sta per sottoporsi a un programma di esercizi che svolgiamo ogni giorno. Notate che fluttua molto liberamente. Ha appena sbattuto la testa contro il sistema ottico, usato per la nostra navigazione. Sta lavorando con un attrezzo progettato per mantenere i muscoli in forma. Un'altra funzione molto importante della nostra navicella spaziale è il computer, e ho pensato che potesse interessarvi vedere cosa abbiamo qui, i display che ci forniscono tutte le informazioni sulla nostra combustione, sulla navigazione e sulla velocità che utilizziamo durante l'ingresso e il retro-fuoco nelle missioni orbitali terrestri. Potete vedere che è controllato da una tastiera, o qualcosa di simile a una macchina da scrivere, e le cose che entrano ed escono da essa sono assolutamente miracolose. Ha fatto un lavoro fantastico per noi, e Jim Lovell ha fatto un lavoro eccellente nel gestirlo. Ora un'altra cosa molto importante, sia che siate nello spazio o a terra, è mangiare, e ho chiesto a Bill Anders di mostrarvi come mangiamo qui durante il volo. Scusate la foto mentre ci spostiamo e cambiamo telecamera. Il cibo che usiamo è tutto disidratato; è preconfezionato in sacchetti sottovuoto. Notate che tutto ciò che Bill deve fare per tenerlo fermo è lasciarlo andare. Se non fosse per le correnti d'aria nella navicella, rimarrebbe perfettamente immobile. Tira fuori le sue comode forbici e taglia il sacchetto. Il cibo è vario, generalmente piuttosto buono. Se questo non sembra un incoraggiamento, non lo è, ma comunque è cibo piuttosto buono. Si vede che Bill è molto intelligente. Fa le cose in fretta. In realtà, quei sacchetti di cibo sono incolla
Tranquillité, ici Houston. Nous avons également une dizaine de questions concernant vos observations, notamment sur ce que vous avez pu voir pendant la mission. Vous pouvez en discuter un peu plus tard ce soir ou plus tard au cours de celle-ci, selon votre préférence. Comment vous sentez-vous? Termin
Хорошо, Вэнс. Готов 
好的，杰克。下一步是将两根蓝色软管与
Роджер. Вы оба в поряд
わかった。少し話し合お
You've got enough heat to maintain pressure. And I've got this Height-Adjust here if yo
Okay, we just finished doing that a little while ago. About half-way around on the night side the hatch temperature was 67°
हमारे पास कोई जानकारी नहीं है - शायद एक अंक क
알겠습니다. 중간 수정 2번 소각까지 한 시간도 채 남지 않았습니다. 여기서 작업을 종료하고 필
Très bien, Jim. Nous avons trois éléments pour vous. Il y a une aire de manœuvre, et une autre aire de manœuvre pour l'amerrissage. Nous avons également une liste de vérification des pro
Roger. Still reading you. Broken a little bit. At 30, my status is good. Fuel and oxygen are steady. Cabin 
रॉजर। ब्लॉक और डीओआई पर वापस: 101:36:14.07; माइनस 0075.8, प्लस सभी शून्य, प्लस 0009.8; 0057.2, प्ल
看起来不错。哦，现在大概每秒14英尺。高度很合适。我们应该能顺利地在……前5分钟完成一次漂
Roger, un 
Eccoci qui! Il rumore è molto buono. Tutto procede 
Scommetti. Sulla pagina sportiva, non c'è molta attività. UCLA è in cima a entrambi i sondaggi di basket. Se ne vuoi sapere di una in particolare, fammelo sapere e ti dirò se è tra le prime dieci in entrambi i sondaggi. Per quanto riguarda 
Хорошо. Верно. Это Джим Ловелл. Сегодня мы решили немного рассказать вам о жизни внутри «Аполлона-8». Мы уже показали вам виды Луны, виды Земли, и решили пригласить вас к нам домой. Это наш дом, по крайней мере, уже 4 дня, как вы можете видеть на приборной панели. Мы отмечаем каждый день на приборной панели. Мы уже отработали четыре дня и работаем над пятым. Конечно, все мы с нетерпением ждём посадки в пятницу. Здесь, в той части космического корабля, которую мы называем нижним отсеком оборудования, находится советник президента по физической подготовке, капитан Джим Ловелл, который собирается выполнить программу упражнений, которую мы делаем каждый день. Вы заметили, что он очень свободно перемещается внутри. Он только что ударился головой об оптику, используемую для навигации. Он работает с тренажером, предназначенным для поддержания мышц в форме. Ещё одна очень важная функция нашего космического корабля — это компьютер, и я подумал, что вам будет интересно посмотреть, что у нас здесь есть: дисплеи, которые предоставляют нам всю информацию о работе двигателя, о навигации и о скорости, которую мы используем во время входа в атмосферу и торможения на околоземных орбитальных миссиях. Вы видите, что он управляется с помощью клавиатуры, похожей на пишущую машинку, и то, что происходит на ней, — это просто чудо. Он проделал для нас фантастическую работу, и Джим Ловелл отлично справился с его управлением. Ещё одна очень важная вещь, независимо от того, находитесь ли вы в космосе или на Земле, — это питание, и я попросил Билла Андерса показать вам, как мы питаемся здесь, в полёте. Извините за фотографию, пока мы будем двигаться и менять камеры. Вся используемая нами еда — это обезвоженная пища; она поставляется в предварительно упакованных вакуумных пакетах. Вы заметите, что всё, что Биллу нужно сделать, чтобы удержать её на месте, — это отпустить её. За исключением воздушных потоков внутри космического корабля, она оставалась бы совершенно неподвижной. Он достаёт свои удобные ножницы и разрезает пакет. Еда разнообразная, в целом довольно хорошая. Если это не звучит как восторженная рекомендация, то так оно и есть, но тем не менее, еда довольно хорошая. Видно, что Билл очень сообразительный. Он всё делает быстро. На самом деле, эти пакеты с едой слиплись, 
On p
Напряжение всех батарей около 23,5 вольт или выше, амперметр почти
مرحباً يا فريق كاليفورنيا ك
Держу 
Bene. Abbiamo tre quinti del test. Dovre
杰克，信息如下——我们现在看到的三角形分别来自第一架、第二架和B-1轰炸机，我认为，这样的着陆条
Ok. Grazie mi
わかりました。アキュムレータの量が減っていないものとして手続きを進め
괜찮아요, 걱정
Роджер. Повторюсь, ваш вектор состояния в полном порядке; он по-прежнему работает с перебоями, и причина, по которой мы здесь задерживаемся, заключается в проверке, не была ли потеряна какая-либо информация. Это пе
Ici Cal. Je vous reçois très faiblement, Wally. Votr
38.3. D'accord, 
Хьюстон, Игл. Вам потребуется высокий коэффициент усиления, прежде чем вы 
Right. I'm gonna do a little st
以下是休斯顿联合通讯社记者哈里·罗森塔尔的报道。对于两岁的杰弗里·洛弗尔来说，两个圣诞老人点亮了他的平安夜。第一个圣诞老人敲响了他的家门，带来了礼物。第二个圣诞老人则从月球上接回了他的爸爸。第一个圣诞老人身穿红色圣诞老人套装，留着白色胡子，发出响亮的“嚯嚯”声，整个街区都能听到。第二个圣诞老人是月球背后喷吐火焰的巨型发动机，成千上万的人都在等待着它点火成功的消息。“请知悉，圣诞老人来了！”这是阿波罗8号打破无线电静默，向焦急的全世界宣布发动机完成关键点火15分钟后发出的第一句话。“我们谁也没想到会收到比这更好的圣诞礼物，”任务控制中心的肯·马丁利说道。“感谢地面上的所有人。你们知道，没有你们，我们不可能完成这项任务，”飞船指挥官弗兰克·博尔曼上校回应道。这时，任务控制中心控制台前的圣诞树亮了起来，宇航员哈里森·施密特为机组人员朗读了太空版的《圣尼古拉斯的来访》。故事开头是这样的：“圣诞前夜，在遥远的太空，阿波罗8号的宇航员们刚刚赢得了登月竞赛。”任务控制中心的工作人员推迟了庆祝活动，直到杰弗里的父亲，海军上校詹姆斯·洛弗尔，以及空军少校威廉·A·安德斯和博尔曼上校安全返回地球。往年的平安夜，宇航员们的家人都会去教堂参加圣诞礼拜，但今年他们都守在电视机前。载人航天中心附近的房屋都装饰一新。洛弗尔家周围的草坪以及他所在的蒂姆伯湾社区都挂满了墨西哥风格的灯笼。就在这时，一辆车开了过来，车上载着一个高大的圣诞老人，背着一
알겠습니다. 조명: 투광등, 메인 A 구역; 조명: 투광등, 메인 B 구역 폐쇄; 그리고 비행/착륙
了解。もう一度言います。プラス00
13, Houston. Did
I have made an electrical check. We had communication problems on the way across. And all the systems checked out very well. Oxygen is holding up
BMAG 모드, 
Houston, Gemini 4. Die Luftfeuchtigke
当然。体育版上没什么特别的。加州大学洛杉矶分校在两项篮球民意调查中都名列榜首。如果你有什么特别想问的，告诉我，我会告诉你他们是否在两项民意调查的前十名之列。至于明天即将举行的大学全明星赛，北方队略占优势。北方队的教练是阿拉·帕尔塞吉安，他手下有六名圣母大学的球员，所以他们应该会很强。南方队的教练是克莱姆森大学的弗兰克·霍华德。他打趣说，要在四天内组建一支球队来和圣母大学比赛可不是件容
Джим, ещё один момент: если во время маневрирования для достижения нужного положения вы об
Houston, vous avez été coupé. Pourriez-vous revenir sur la pression de
Houston, wir öffnen
자, 짐, 방금 각도를 살펴봤는데, 아주 좋아 보입
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette. Sono
Qui il tempo è belliss
好的，收到。代码是 AUTO OPTICS，没有地标。我会继
実際のところ、私
Roger. Immagino che parte della fotocamera si sia bruciata laggiù. Queste sono foto davvero belle, Buzz. Finite. 
ええ。宇宙計画といえば、皆さんはきっとたくさんの特殊な電子機器が使われているイメージでしょう。確かに、その多くはまさにその通りです。でも、ここでいくつか関連アイテムをご紹介したいと思います。まず、宇宙船に残っている水の量を非常に正確に測定できます。今お見せしているこのバッグを使って、残りの水を集め、実際にどれだけ残っていたのかを確認します。そして、将来のミッションでは、これらのユニットの安全な使用時間をさらに少しでも延ばせるようにしたいと考えています。そして、もう片方の手には、このバッグに実際にどれだけの水が入ってい
D'accord, Fred. On ne 
罗杰。他后来建议，当它们看起来像白色颗粒时，你也这样做，这或许可
好的，休斯顿。中央面板——我正在查看指示器 A。组件温度约为 180 度
Роджер. Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Обновление карты на 5 апреля: восход солнца, нулевой меридиан, закат; -1 время позиционирования контрольной точки 2; -1 время максимального сближ
Das ist richtig, Jim. Weiter geht's mit Seite 29. An dieser Stelle ist ein schriftlicher Eintrag erforderlich. Es sind etwa sechs 
残り30分弱で遊べるなんて、本当に残念です。これからフライ・バイ・ワイヤで低速飛行します。ジャイロはフリーで、ダーバ
Компьютер работает, индикатор неисправности не горит. Какова сейчас ситуация с компьютеро
Хорошо. Когда вы хотите включить двигатели
Sigma Seven, ici Kano Com Tech. Transmission sur HF. 
Just bar
ठीक है, जिम। क्या आप अपने बाहरी तार को दबाएंगे? और हमें संकेत मिला है कि आप अनुमान से लगभग 2 औंस अधिक तरल पदार्थ का उपयोग कर रहे हैं। हम जानना चाहते हैं कि आपके सूटबैंड की स्थित
Mike, der Brennvorgang ist abgeschlossen; er wur
روجر. عند إشارتي 
我说我们现在开始收拾飞船，做好一切准备，然后就可以睡觉吃饭了。从现
نعم. حسنًا، أول أربعة أو خمسة أشياء لدي هي: لوحة شحن البطارية إلى وضع الإيقاف في اللوحة 3؛ محول التيار المتردد 2، إيقاف التشغيل؛ اللوحة 5: ربط ناقل التيار الرئيسي، تشغيل مكيف البطارية؛ اللوحة 250: مدخل طاقة البطا
Okay, ich schalte jetzt die biomedizinischen Rekorder von Nr. 1 – AUS auf Nr.
Ici Houston. Alle
좋아요. 방금 다시 한번 기동을 해봤습니다. 롤링이 조금 과했던 것 같네요. 너무 심한 건지, 아니면 이제 멈췄으니 롤링을 좀 줄
여기는 잔지바르의 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 케이프타운에서 
Cavolo! Quella sostenitrice 
了解。ちょっと待ってください。メインバスBが司令船に適しているかどうか、お聞きした
روجر. وضع
オーロラセブン。カントンの上でお酒を飲みましたか？カントンの上
O
Ok. Una delle prime cose che vogliamo fare è caricare la batteria, così da poter avere un po' di energia laggiù, e abbiamo predisposto delle procedure per farlo. Per quanto riguarda il rientro, stiamo pianificando il nostro ultimo rientro a metà rotta a 5 ore prima dell'interfaccia di ingresso, e, se dovremo farne uno, ovviamente. Poi vorremmo sganciare il modulo di servizio a circa 4 ore e mezza prima dell'interfaccia di ingresso, e dedicare le successive 3-3 ore e mezza a scattare foto, avviare il modulo di comando G&N, occuparci dello stivaggio e altre piccole cose. E lo terremmo fino a 1 ora prima dell'interfaccia di ingresso, e poi lo sganceremmo. Queste procedure saranno eseguite integrate nel CMS e nell'LMS domani mattina e, si spera, più tardi nel corso della giornata, le ripeteremo con il Controllo Missione in loop. Un paio di domande sono: cosa ne facciamo? L'idea è che ci sia O2 a sufficienza nel modulo di comando e che rappresenti una fonte di alta pressione e un problema di stivaggio, e si sta pensando di lasciarli lì. L'altra cosa è che pensiamo che potreste voler fare un ingresso in tuta, indossando la tuta prima di sganciarvi, perché quello che stiamo facendo è, quando sganciamo la tuta, farlo come abbiamo fatto nell'Apollo 10: lasciare andare la bellezza, e se non fossimo in tuta, beh, scommetteremmo sulla guarnizione del portello che si prenderà cura di noi. Quindi abbiamo pensato di proporvi queste poche idee. Alcune di queste sono domande particol
Roger. Wir haben dir per TM übe
Okay, 13. Wir haben sehr viele Leute, die daran arbeiten; wir geben euch Bescheid, sobald wir Neuigkeiten haben, und ihr w
收到。我是双子星4号的指令长。我刚刚睡了大约五个半小时的午觉，其中最后三个小时睡得相当不错。前两个半小时睡得断断续续的。我正在吃第四天的第二餐，从醒来到现在只
Roger.
Ils sont brûlants, Ji
알겠습니다, 휴스턴. 끊겼네요,
- - dep
05 13 13; 012538, 32.6, 32.0 आगे, 1.7 ऊपर, 5.7 बाएँ, 32.5, 131, 27.4 ऊँचाई पर, और
, Canary. Be advised, on your 15 second bur
Я играл на позиции 
A couple of items, Jim. The first is, the time for closing the waste stowage vent is. If you turn in before that time, why it's okay as far as we're concerned down here to close it before that time just before you go to bed. The second point, we have some results on the s, a
Ok. Pannello 276: CONTROLLO POTEN
네, 제
حسنًا يا فانس، لقد أجرينا اختبارًا آخر للتحيز الصفري، 
ATT D
You got a big string hangin
Близ
Roger, Frank. Se ne hai la possibilità, vorremmo che ci leggessi il tuo numero di calibrazione del perno. Ci è 
ヒューストン。トランクウィリティは今から追跡モードに入り
了解。リカバリーエリアの天気は雲が点在し、風速10ノット、波高4フィート。これ以
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indiet
是的，那样没问题。您可以采取一些措施，比如重新维护。但这确实比较繁琐，所以我们才想密切关注，以便在进入之前大致了解情况，看看是能有两个循环回路还是只有一个。这引出了我们正在努力解决的另一
Houston, Columbia. How do 
罗杰，七号。我们建议您在第三次轨道飞行时
Базз, ты т
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम। समाप्त
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Puoi confermare di essere su OMNI Bra
Okay. For today, we'd like you on to make a trunnion bias determination, prior to sightings as called out in
Roger, Kano. Hier spricht Friendship Seven. Ich kehre gerade nach eine
यहीं रुक जाओ। ये तो और भी बुरा है, बिल। वापस वहीं जाओ जहाँ तुम थे। तुमने इसे हमारे 3 बजे की दिशा में गायब कर दिया था। अब ये वापस आ रहा है। ठीक है। यहीं रुक 
शून्य गुरुत्वाकर्षण का उपयोग करके आप उन कई चीजों को प्रदर्शित कर सकते हैं जो हम सभी ने स्कूल में सीखी हैं। मैं संक्षेप में यह दिखाना चाहूंगा कि जाइरोस्कोप की क्रिया को समझाना कितना आसान है। यदि मैं इस डिब्बे को घुमाता हूं, तो गति के समीकरणों के अनुसार, एक बार जब इसे घुमाना शुरू किया जाता है और इसका घूर्णन अक्ष इस दिशा में होता है, तो यदि हम इस पर एक विशेष बल लगाते हैं, और मैं ऐसा घुमाते समय अपने हाथो
ठीक है। ऑटो रेट्रोफायर में चार रेट्रो फायर किए गए और 292, 000 क
The secondary coolant loop really looked good. Looks like you had a nice tight radiator and everything else on there was working right along the performance curves. Your main oxygen regulators both filled at 104 psi during our check. Looking at the lunar orbit, expect to be doing a water boil of about 1 pound per hour, and this is just an approximation; there's quite a variety of estimates as to what the water boiling requirements may be, might go anywhere from boiling lots to not boiling at all. The next water dump will be coming up after, so you don't have to worry about any of that until you get through. Communications predictions are looking good, possibly a little bit better than what we had hoped for, and looks like we're going to get high bit rate on OMNI's with our 210-foot dish at Goldstone. This will be working for us on the first couple of rev's, and then we'll be switching sites, so we'll go back to using OMNI's for high bit. The voice quality on is good. Your fuel cells have been running above nominal for the entire flight, and they really look nice and stable. There's 
أبولو 8، هيوستن. عندما نقول تشغيل الدائرة الثانوية، فإننا نعني تشغي
खैर, ये तो पुराने 
네, 맞습니다. 좋습니다. 이제 지상 관제소에서 -2+15초에 업데이트를 제공할 예정입니다. 이 시간은 텔레메트리 수신을 위해 설정해야 하는 시간입니다. 업데이트에는 클럭 증분, 상태 벡터, 두 가지 값(실제 값과 선호 값), 그리고 진입 목표 부하가 포함됩니다. 원하시면 이 정보들을 복사해 
Передача вслепую. У нас прямая видимость. Время на земле указано на моей отметке: 4 часа 29 минут и 30 секунд. Передача вслепую на «Аврору Севен». Убедитесь, что все ваши тональные переключатели включены; сигнальные лампы горят; предохранитель ручного резервирования включен; предохраните
Du hast d
Jim, we got a couple of news-type items. President Nixon has chosen a judge 
D'accord. Votre dos est appuyé contre le sac. Parfait. Maintenant, il est dessus. En avant et en haut; vous êtes dégagé. Un peu vers moi. Tout droit en bas, un peu à gauche. Il y a largement assez de place. Neil, vous êtes bien aligné. Un peu vers moi, en bas. D'accord. Vou
...네... 270까지
それは否定的で
우리는 X축에서 90
时间 01 07 13；修订 1，东经
Non ho molta scelta. Tutto quello che posso fare è mangiare, dor
Полагаю, вы хотите, чтобы мы возобновили работу
はい、ジャック。
रॉजर। हमें एसेन्शन पर सी-बैंड ट्रैकिंग में नकारात
次に、121時間12分に予定されている起床時刻で、通常のタイムラインに戻ります
حسناً. ها أنت تنظر إليه 
ويف
好的。我这里有个哈尼特别报道。《星际时报》最新一期说，登月计划占据了报纸和电视的头条，成了头条新闻。《华盛顿邮报》的头条标题是“月球，他们来了”。据我们了解，比尔·安德斯今天将与一位身穿红色宇航服、居住在北极的老人
Nur zu, Indian Capit
अरे बाप रे! यकीन मानिए, गेंद अब
那边一切进展如何
双子座4号，请问您能打开
ठीक है, इस चीज़ पर हमें 02:4
روجر، التوقيت العالمي المنسق (GMTRC) لساعتك 48-1 هو 3 أيام و17
好的。灯灭了，2号
Friendship Seven, this is Steelhead. I understand 
كيف حال إيكوم الي
알겠습니다. AGS와 P
收到。明白了。你现在的宇
Okay. Jetzt nutze ich den Mond links von mir, und das hilft wirklich gut. Ich decke den Lagenanzeiger ab, damit ihr die Gierbewegung beobachten könnt. Ich deaktiviere die Kreiselsteuerung und versuche, jetzt den Fly-by-Wire-Modus für niedrige Flughöhen zu wählen. Ich positioniere den Mond zuerst in der Mitte des Sichtfelds – halte dabei Rollen und Nicken gedrückt und bringe den Mond dann wieder an seine ursprüngliche Position. Der Mond nähert sich jetzt der Mitte des Sichtfelds. Okay, ich halte ihn dort an und steuere das Rollen, um das auszugleichen. Okay, jetzt habe ich 0° Rollen. Ich habe den Mond überflogen und erfasse den Planeten Merkur, der schön hell ist und sich etwas weiter rechts befindet. Je
로저. 40 2711 398 033, 하강 043, 좌회전 23, 플러스 0832 마이너스 16500 12956 3620
Bene. C
好了。我准备用S级
Okay, Neil, I'm
如果杰克在听，就告诉他，光学设备可能没问题，但是眼
아니요, 전혀
Nous y som
روجر. لقد ر
D'acco
ईंधन नियंत्रण 90-98 प्रतिशत है, मैं दोहराता हूं, 90-98 प्रतिशत
I can see all those four n
好的，杰克。我知道粮农组织正在处理这件事，稍后我们会给你一些消息
Autorétro armé. Amorçag
Okay. Before you start copying, this procedure is - is basically simply to activate the supercritical helium pressure gaging so that you can read it. And the concern here is lest this supercritical helium pressure reach 1800 psi by 103 hours, at which point we'd be within a possibility of rupturing the burst disk when you activate the. Now, based on the pressure at launch, and based on a nominal rise time of about 6-1/2 psi per hour between then and now, the pressure should read about 710 psi. Stand by, 13, until we get better COM
OK, Joe. J'ai créé u
ठीक है। अभी हमारे गिम्बल के कोण लगभग इस प्रकार हैं - रोल लगभग 190, पिच लगभग 320 और यॉ लगभग 340। हम निश्चित रूप से इस स्थिति में काम कर सकते ह
现在，
제미니 VI, 휴스턴. 이 글을 읽으신다면, 저희는 당신의 연소 반응을 기다리고 있으며 카운트다운을 시작했습니
حسنًا. أهز رأسي بعنف من جميع الجهات، وعيناي مغمضتان، للأعلى والأسفل، وللميلان والدوران والانحراف. لا شيء في معدتي؛ لا شيء في أي مكان. الآن... سأحاول الضغط على زر الصفر، زر الوقت صفر. حسنًا، لقد أخطأت. كنتُ مرتبكًا بعض الشيء بشأن مكان الأشياء بالضبط، لستُ متأكدًا مما تريد تحقيقه بالضبط من خلال هذا، ولكن لا توجد مشكلة في ت
Hou
Okay. We have DISPLAY, open; SE AUDIO, closed; VHF A TRANSMITTER, open
Ich traue mich gar n
Apollo 8, Houston. Bien reç
네, 그
जेमिनी 4, कृपया हमें लगभग 15 सेकंड के लिए अपना क्वांटिटी
是的，是的，但这样
はい、ボールペンです。これです。というか、フェルトペンで
D'accord. Je viens de prendre une photo de deux orages qui ressemblent à de grandes crêpes, avec beaucoup d
في الحقيقة، المقصود هو نقل القائد إلى، وأنت تقصد إغلاق الفتحات. جمع
Bill, cosa ne 
好的，水瓶座号。我们的追踪数据显示，自从氦气排放以来，我们的进入角度一直保持在6.24度，没有变化。有人计算过，即使我们有推进式排气口，氦气最
Okay. Als nächstes kommt der Flu
わかりました。レジスタ
罗杰，明白了。你的收入会略有下
Я не остановился — я 
जिम, हमने अभी-अभी सटीकता के संबंध में आपके अंकों की जाँच की है और पाया है कि वे सैद्धांतिक इष्टतम मान से कुछ हज़ारवें डिग्री के अंतर पर हैं। इंटीग्रेटर भी इसकी
Okay; probably okay, Fred. Read it nice and slow so we'll be sure to get it. Ove
자동 후방 투하 장치
好的。加 25，这将是一个 /。63087，减 162，加 129，减 001 63，加 00001，加 527 59 1
Nein, das ist in Ordn
Хорошо, Джек. Временной промежуток между минус 2:30 и 1 часом очень тесный, поэтому тебе придётся поторопиться, и мы решили отменить проверку входа в 2:30. Это даст тебе немного больше времени. М
ठीक है। चार्ली, बस एक पर रुको। जिम इधर-उधर देखेगा कि उसे कुछ म
了解しました。左手の窓から地球が見えています。地球の半分強です。東太平洋と画面上部の北半分には、北米、アラスカ、アメリカ合衆国、カナダ、メキシコ、中央アメリカが見えます。南米は境界線のすぐ先、つまり影の中に隠れています。海ははっきりと青く染まってお
Давайте посмотрим — D-9 примерно 2
わかりました。それでPROを回すと、5018が点滅します。ここでAUTO操作をしたいので、GUIDANCE、PNGS、MODE CONTROL、AUTOの順にPROします。1.4度のデッ
On dirait bien q
你确定
알겠습니다. 제가 말씀드리는 건, 실험의 균형을 맞추는 데 
Хорошо,
Хорошо. Вода в каюте возвращается. Начну с двух градусов. Это на 20 градусо
Ok, Jim. Mancano circa 9 minuti all'inizio dell'accensione del modulo di comando e volevamo solo dirti, a beneficio di Jack, che, sebbene le batterie sembrino in buone condizioni, nel caso in cui siano fredde e abbiano qualche difficoltà a gestire il carico all'inizio, vor
Gemel
Ic
Jack, it is very comfortable. We've run it several times now and, in fact, it's being run right now, again. And we've run it both here at Houston and at the Cape. The only place where you might find that you need to stay ahead of things is during the platform-alinement period, when you're getting ready to close out the and then once you get into the command module and jettison the, why you're back on a very comfortable time. And, of course, we'l
Ok. Attacco per le spalle sistemato. Luce della cabina spenta. Casco tolto e 
你明白了吗？IVI 的速度比实际速度慢了 50 英尺
我们还要做什么？扫描仪应该切换到辅助模式。现在
ジャック、よく分からないんだけど、下の階にずっ
Houston, Apollo 8. We've just go
ああ。その通りです。もし彼が、あなたが保持するSEP姿勢で星が見えない
Это подтверждается. Сначала я быстро пройдусь по времени основных событий, а затем мы вернемся и уточним некоторые детали. Хорошо. Вход в атмосферу запланирован на 142 часа 40 минут; примерно за 6,5 часов до этого мы начнем весь процесс, включив питание нагревателя, проверив температуру в модуле управления и предварительно прогрев его при необходимости. Мы предполагаем, что нам, вероятно, потребуется это сделать. Подробные инструкции будут опубликованы позже. Примерно за 6 часов до этого мы начнем включать питание, используя модифицированный 30-минутный контрольный список, который вы использовали для предыдущего промежуточного этапа. Затем, незадолго до 5 часов до этого, мы попросим вас принять положение для выравнивания по оси тела, используя терминатор Земли, как мы делали раньше; И как только мы это получим, мы выполним маневр -7, который, судя по всему, сейчас будет представлять собой примерно 2 фута в секунду или около 15 секунд работы двигателя. Мне сказали, что сейчас скорость снизилась до 1,5 фута в секунду, так что это вполне в пределах допустимых значений. Хорошо. После этого мы немедленно начнем маневр по сбросу служебного модуля, который будет в плоскости, поскольку мы сбрасываем его раньше, чем обычно. Нам не нужна и нежелательна внеплоскостная составляющая. Таким образом, он будет в плоскости, а служебный модуль будет направлен обратно вдоль радиус-вектора. Затем мы начнем подготовку командного модуля к запуску, включая проверку командного модуля и запуск двигателя, и примерно за 4 часа 30 минут до или мы сбросим служебный модуль. Мы будем держать самолет поднятым, пока не получим доступ к сервисному модулю... и попытаемся сделать несколько фотографий, но мы не будем возиться с маневрами перемещения для получения снимков, потому что не хотим испортить угол траектории полета в это время. Хорошо. Это дает нам примерно 2 часа свободного времени, чтобы закончить, если мы опоздаем, перейти к контрольному списку и подготовиться к включению командного модуля. Мы начнем полное включение командного модуля за 2 часа 30 минут до конца. Мы подключим компьютер, поднимем самолет, начнем передавать ваши векторы состояния и так далее, и выровняем платформу командного модуля. Примерно через 1 час 30 минут, самое позднее, у нас будет час на выполнение этих действий с командным модулем, мы начнем маневр по сбросу. Затем вы начнете закрывать... Конечно, у нас не все места для хранения будут сконфигурированы задолго до этого. 
حسنًا يا قائد. لقد وجدنا طريقةً لتدفئتك. قررنا البدء بتشغيلك الآن، وما نريده
هل يمكنك تزويدي بقراءة لضغط مصدر الهيليوم ودرجة حرارته ومقياس كمية
로저,
13، هيوستن. في هذه الحالة، نقترح
Roger. Stavo giusto registrando qualcosa. L'unica cosa insolita che ho notato è uno strato di foschia piuttosto alto, che sembrerebbe essere di circa 7 o 8 gradi sopra l'orizzonte sul lato notturno. Riesco 
Nur
Okay. Die Lambdasondenheizung Nr. 1 ist ausgeschaltet. Ich g
Близнецы 4, это Хьюстон. Вы распознали 
了解。降下推進剤燃料通気
Roger, die Seite ist NC-7. Ich lese sie noch einmal. Dann weiter zur Längensteuerung für das Verfahren ohne Kommun
是的，那会让你害怕，因为这意味着你在逆行，对吧？嗯，我们来看看，如果它
Sì,
말씀하신 내용을
Canton Com T
奥德赛，休斯顿
インド洋艦。シグマ・セブン。オー
分かりました。AGCには電圧表示の目盛りがいくつかあると思いますが、11時
, Canary. Veuillez placer le commutateur de v
没错
रॉजर, ऑरोरा सेवन, मैंने आपकी बात स्पष्ट रूप से स
Cabin pressure seems to hold 
حسنًا. شحن البطارية، إيقاف؛ محول التيار المتردد 2 إلى إيقاف؛ ربط ناقل الطاقة الرئيسي، البطارية B/C إلى تشغيل. اللوحة 250: البطارية A، مدخل الطاقة ومحطة ما بعد الهبوط، مفتوحة؛ قاطع الدائرة، البطارية B، مدخل الطاقة ومحطة ما بعد الهبوط، مفتوحة. اللوحة 5: قاطع
好的。机动平台位于：目的为中段 5，，，不适用，高空不适用，近地点，加上 0019.8，0.007.8，0.15，其余不适用。在燃烧时间结束前 1 
我无法形
Это подтверждается. Положение: крен 0 [градусов], рыскание 2 [градуса] вправо, тангаж -33 [градуса]. Все показатели равны 
CSQ님, 저
मेरा प्रदर्शन बहुत अच्छा नहीं था। लगभग एक डिग्र
Okay. Ich ziehe den Haupt-S-Band-Leistungsverstärker-
एक्वेरियस, 
Ricevuto. La cella a combustibile 1 ha mostrato un flusso di H2 leggermente
Questa è Friendship Seven. Ho visto un forte temporale in vista verso sud, o
그리고 메인 A의 부하를 줄이기 위해 잭이 명령 모듈에서 해줄 일이 두 가지 있습니다. 첫 번째는 CM/RCS 히터 스위치를 확인하거나 OFF로 돌려주는 것입니다. 히터 작업은 완료되었고, 회로 차단기가 내려갔더라도 스위치에 약간의 전류가 흐르고 있을 수 있습니다. 두 번째는 로직 파워 2/3을 OFF로 돌려주는 것입니다. 지금은 필요하지 않습니다. 점검 목록에서 적절한 시점에 호출되므로, 잭이 이 스위치를 꺼주기를 바랍니다. 이상
W
收到信号了吗？
11, Houston. Possiamo persino leggere le decalcomanie lassù sul 
Okay, and Atria is there in the sextant. Well, you know, it's not right in the middle of the sextant. Of course, I guess - I don't know what - Have you ever heard any rules on what constitutes a good third sta
Ok. Il meteo nella
そうだ。ミズーリ州スプリングフィールドでは、ブルックリン・ドジャースの元捕手、ミッキー・オーウェンがいた。1941年のワールドシリーズで、ニューヨーク・ヤンキースをドジャースに勝利に導いたサードストライクを落とすという記録を打ち立てた人物だ。彼はスポーツでの記録だけでなく、それ以上のことで記憶に残ることを決意した。45人の少年少女が、彼が提供したポニーの受取人となった。これらの若者たちは、ポニーをどのように世話したいかを書いた手紙を送るよう依頼された。手紙が殺到したため、彼は既に提供していた20頭にさらに5頭のポニーを追加し、他の寄付者からも20頭のポニーが届いた。ミッキー・オーウェンはこう語った。「45通くらいだろうと思っていたら、結局900通くらい届いたんだ」。さて、特集ページはこちら：ニュージーランド、ウェリントン。今日、南極で約50人の男性が伝統的な七面鳥とクランベリーソースを囲んだが、クリスマスには東洋の風味も加わっていた。南極大陸を横断し、米海軍極地基地に日帰りで立ち寄った日本人隊員たちが作ったすき焼きも含まれていました。カリフォルニア州サンディエゴでは、拿捕された情報収集船プエブロ号の乗組員たちが、サンディエゴのバルボア海軍病院の職員たちに初めての給料を寄付しました。彼らは全員に20ドルずつ支給されており、サンディエゴに上陸した際に、これは自分たちを歓迎するために多大な貢献をしてくれた人々への気持
他照做了。大卫来了；
很高兴听到你已经排
Très bien, Gémeaux 4. Nous avons votre tension artérielle. Donnez-moi une note 
D'accord. Nous aimerions activer le FM maintenant
我们
हमारी कहानी का कथानक कहाँ 
120 ق
好的。这些只是清理工作，杰克。第 2-3 页列出了如何从 CM/SEP 等内容中分离出来，所以，很明显，如果我们在步骤 5 进行到 
잭, 특히 저 같은 초보자에게는 이곳의 좋은 점 중 하나는 움직이기가 매우 편하다는 것입니다. 물론, 사령선 시뮬레이터에서 일해 보셨겠지만, 무중력 환경은 정말 큰 도움이 됩니다. 1g에서는 움직이기가 상당히 제한적인데, 이곳에서는 훨씬 수월합니다. 보시다시피, 내부가 상당히 깨끗해 보입니다. 헐거워진 와셔 몇 개와 시퀀스 카메라의 작은 플라스틱 덮개가 떨어져서 ED 패널 근처에 끼어 있는 것을 발견했습니다. 자, 짐 바로 아래에 있는, 캔처럼 보이는 물체 위에 서 계신 분이 있습니다. 뒤쪽에 계신 분들을 위해 설명드리자면, 이 캔 안에는 상승 엔진이 들어 있습니다. 지금 제 손이 올려져 있는 것이 바로 달에서 이륙할 때 사용하는 엔진입니다
Ok. La batteria è in fase di ricarica e lo scarico delle acque reflue è in funzione. 3 è stato annullato. Sarebbe stato 0,8 piedi al secondo. 4 ora sem
पहले उस बाहरी अंतरि
Gemini
جيميني 4، هذا جراح هيوستن. لدي رسالة إلى فريق هوكس، 3؛ و
... funziona molto bene, ma non credo che riesca a leggere nessuno. Quindi d
なるほど、「シャットダウンは燃焼時間か
La temperatura dell'elio è di 58°C e la pressione è
R
Okay. We have been operating with the face-plate open and gloves off now for about the last 12 hours, but mostly in that situation we kept oversleeping. 
Roger, 
और 12.5 वाइड एंगल है। मुझे बस यही बात उलझन में डाल रही है कि इसमें लिखा है कि वाहन से वाहन के लिए हमें 12.5 पर ज़ूम करना है। शायद वे बस यह सुनिश्चित करना चाहते हैं कि आपको दूसरा वाहन दिखाई दे रहा है। शायद... टेल
Roger, Jim. Ich möchte Ihnen kurz eine Vorgehensweise erklären. Ihre W-Matrix teilt sich einige Speicherbereiche; daher ist die aktuelle W-Matrix nicht optimal, und wir raten Ihnen davon ab, Ihre Peilungen mit 
حسنًا، لماذا لا تترك المكنسة الكهربائ
Ok. Non l'abbiamo rimosso dal suo alloggiamento. L'abbiamo sem
Роджер, Базз. Кажется, я понял. Вы указываете на небольшую разницу между двумя образцами и на то, что в каждом случае вам удавалось забить стержни примерно на 2 дюйма без проблем, а затем приходилось довольно энергично бить молотком, чтобы забить их на общую глубину 8 или 9 дюймов, и даже после этого стержни не хотели оставаться в вертикаль
كل ما أردناه هو أن تقوم بفتح الدائرة الكهربائية في خلية الوقود
我们还需要另一组电池 B 
Понял. В Мадриде мы снова переключим наши антенны, и в вашей с
Houston, abbiamo effettuato la combustione a 7,7 più X più 00001 Y; e le Z sono tutte z
Roger, Apollo 8. Un paio di appunti per te: per quanto riguarda questo argomento, abbiamo esaminato i tuoi vettori di stato e tutte le tue informazioni. La piattaforma sembra a posto e sembra che tu possa scegliere se bypassare questo passaggio; la tua piattaforma sarà comunque valida al passaggio successivo. Vorremmo avere la tua lettura, e credo che sia
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Можете порекомендоват
Lors de nos tests de pression de la batterie, nous avons constaté qu'à l'ouverture de la vanne de purge, la pression chutait immédiatement et s'an
それは何の違いをもたらすのでしょうか
Хьюстон, Апол
罗杰。我们现在测得你的态
Ich schaue aus Fenster 5 auf etwas, das ich für das [Gebiet/die Quelle] halte, und sehe zwei scheinbar doppelte Ausläufer, die sich in zwei sehr schmalen Bändern von etwa 3 Grad Breite von diesem [Gebiet/die Quelle] ausbreiten. Daneben gibt es ein weniger dichtes Band, das sich über einen etwa 40 Grad breiten Streifen am Himmel erst
D'accord. Pourquoi ne pas remettre le véhicule en position d'attente et le remettre en mode maintien d'attitude pour le roulement? Nous allons ensuite réexaminer les exigences. Il semble que les résultats soient sensiblement les mêmes à chaque fois, d'après une analyse rapide. Nous allons donc vérifier à nouveau s'il est nécessaire de recommencer. Si c'est le cas, nous vous appellerons. Vous pouvez reme
Non in modo permanente, Mike. Resta qui mentre Charlie è fuori a controllare come usare quello strumento speciale sulla tele
Roger, ca
Houston, Apo
了解です。まず主要なイベントの時刻を簡単に確認し、その後、戻って詳細を補足します。さて、進入インターフェースは142時間40分、つまり6時間半前です。そのおよそ6時間半前に、ヒーター電源を投入し、CM/の温度をチェックして、必要に応じてCM/を予熱することで、このプロセス全体を開始します。おそらくそうすることになるでしょう。詳細な手順は後ほど説明します。約6時間前頃に、前回の中間コースで使用した修正版/30分チェックリストを使用して、電源投入を開始します。その後、少し前、5時間前頃に、前回と同様に地球ターミネーターを使用して、体軸アラインメントの姿勢をとってください。それができ次第、
ジムさん、遅れて
ハワイ、ヒューストンネットワーク、GOSSカンファレンス。あなたのNET
Vog
नमस्कार
我
Your readout on your capsule elapsed time occasionally reads o
Da Washington: "Questo Natale, il mondo è illuminato dalla speranza della pace. Quando arriverà, quando la speranza si trasformerà in realtà e le armi torneranno a tacere, arriverà perché l'
Скоро мы увидим горизонт, и, вероятно, солнце будет светить нам в глаза. В таком
Bene. E un'altra cosa che abbiamo notato. Quando avete pressurizzato, abbiamo riscontrato un aumento di pressione nei serbatoi di risalita, quindi vogliamo che verifichiate che le alimentazioni di risalita siano chiuse. Per farlo, sul pannello 11, chiudete gli interruttori di circuito d
10, 9, 8, 7, 6, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1, ACCENSION
Friendship Seven, hier spricht Steelhead. Bestätigt, die Kapsel
알겠습니다. 확실히 하고 싶었어요. 프레드가 얼마 전에 적어놨던 건데, 지금 각도가 71도 정도고, 경사가 얕아질 것 같아서 중간 속도로 초당 7피트 정도 이동할 거라고 했거든요. 이제 다 같은 얘기를 하
Roger. Verst
रॉजर। साथ ही, सेट नंबर 2, सेट नंबर 2, स्टार न
알겠습니다. 현재 시간 32시간 00분. 완료 후 지시사항: 다음 자세로 기동하십시오. 롤 101.0, 피치 090.0, 요 000.0. 최고 피치 -23, 요 93. 감속은 일반적인 절차를 따르십시오. 기체가 안정화된 후, 스핀업 전에 베넷 혜성을 촬영하십시오. G 매거진이 있는 육분의를 사용하십시오. 즉, 초고속 흑백 필름, 맞죠? 저조도용 필름입니다. 5초, 20초, 60초 노출로 각각 한 장씩 총 세 장의 사진을 촬영하십시오. 자동 광학계를 사용하십시오. 값은 R1 + 34717, R2 - 08028, R3 + 35075입니다. 수동 광학계를 사용하여 5초, 20초, 60초 노출로 각각 한 장씩 총 세 장의 사진을 촬영하십시오. 샤프트는 000.8도, 트러니언은 약 50프레임을 제거합니다. 즉, 첫 번째 프레임 이전과 마지막 프레임 이후에 각각 2초씩,
Okay, in this attitude, Jack, that we're pitching around, I cannot use the to see stars. We - we're just not able to see them at all. Now we may be able to maneuver off in yaw or - and/or roll and see stars. Right now, we haven't been able to. The is useless. The 
Okay,
두루미자리의 쌍성이 일렬로 늘어서 창문 정중앙으로 들어오는 게 보이네요. 목성은 물론 아주 밝습니다. 안카와, 아, 알 나이르도 보이고, 저건 아마 공작자리였을 거예요. 알 나이르는 비행 경로 오른쪽으로 약간 치우쳐 있네요. 제가 비행 중이긴 하지만, 분명 공작자리일 겁니다. 목성이 창문 모서리에 나타나네요. 고개를 제대로 돌리니 포르말하우트가 비행 경로 오른쪽에 보입니다. 목성은 오른쪽 모서리에 있네요. 이 시
Roger. Wir beginnen mit den Weltnachrichten. Lob für die amerikanischen Apollo-8-Astronauten und Hoffnungen auf internationale Zusammenarbeit in der Weltraumforschung wurden mit den weltweiten Weihnachtsbotschaften verbreitet, während das kleine Raumschiff den Mond umkreiste. Selbst in der kommunistischen Welt herrschte Begeisterung für die erste bemannte Mondlandung. In Moskau erinnerte der sowjetische Wissenschaftler Anatoli Besaranow daran, dass sein Land und die Vereinigten Staaten bereits zuvor Weltraumwissen ausgetauscht hatten, und sagte voraus, dass der Apollo-8-Flug zu einer verstärkten Zusammenarbeit führen würde. In Kuba wiederholte Radio Havanna das Programm von Voice of America, um seine Hörer über die Apo
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ。了解。医師の報告によると
स्कॉटी,
Tak
Tu as entendu? Je répète Zaria: j'essaie de r
फ्रेड, इस जुगाड़ से बने कमांड मॉड्यूल लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड कैनिस्टर के बारे में, हमें कम से कम दो बनाने होंगे और एक साथ दो का इस्तेमाल करना होगा - हर नली के सेट पर एक। हम इन जुगाड़ से बने बॉक्स में से एक को लाल फिटिंग से जोड़ेंगे और हवा लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड से होकर अंदर खींची जाएगी और फिर नीली फिटिंग से बाहर निकल जाएगी। और ऐसा करते समय, हम लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड कैनिस्टर को सूट लूप से निकालेंगे, चाहे 
Gemelli 4, Chirurg
チャーリー、単眼鏡を使えば、サンフェルナンド渓谷にはっきりとした緑色の影が見え
ठीक है। ठीक है, हमें समझ आ गया। कृपया उनसे वहां एम्पेरेज की जांच करने को कहें; अभी जो रीडिंग आ
حسنًا، سنجهز ذلك لكم، وكنا نتحدث للتو عن فحص المكونات الاحتياطية، و
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्टन। अपोलो 8
You can keep silence during launch. Reply when you can, I will transmit detai
现在，回答问题 2，当然，第二阶段出现了振动瞬态，这是由于 5 号发动机故障造成的——该故障发生在发动机故障之前不久，之后不久，S-II
Р
Roger. À l'heure actuelle, le liquide est concentré autour du tube de retenue; celui-ci semble plein et le 
Хорошо. А если ты крикнешь,
Im Wassermann-Stil ist es überhaupt nicht unangenehm, aber im Ody
今は私のがオンになってい
Sigma Seven, hier spricht Cal Cap Com. Wiederholung der Durchsage im Blindflug. Cape empfiehlt, die Uhr auf 33 Sekunden zurückzusetzen. Ende 
आगे बढ़ो, ह्यूस्टन। प्लस 25
Flight teilt mit, dass die Komm
Non credo che ci sia bisogno di farlo. Vorremmo solo confermarlo con una stella d
Main on gre
حسنًا. ما يدور في أذهاننا هنا هو أننا نفحص بعض العدسات الموجودة لديكم للكاميرات، وسنرى ما إذا كان بالإمكان استخدام إحداها لتخفيف بعض هذا الضوء حتى تتمكنوا من التقاط إحدى هذه 
جيم، هل يمكنك تغيير وضع مفتاح BIOMED إلى الوض
और, आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें, अगर हम पहले चरण में ईंधन भरते हैं, तो मध्यमार्ग सुधार 
Okay, Sauerstoff. Sie haben noch 44 Pfund Sauerstoff. Bei einem Verbrauch von 0,36 Pfund pro Stunde reichen die restlichen 120 Stunden. Okay. Weiter. A liegt bei 6,2 Prozent und B ebenfalls bei 6,2 Prozent. Wir gehen davon aus, dass nur 2 Prozent für die Sauerstoffversorgung benötigt werden, daher sind Sie gut aufgestellt. Weiter, Delta-v. Sie haben noch 1190 Fuß pro Sekunde. Und schließlich. Wir schätzen Ihren Sauerstoffvorrat auf 99 Amperestunden. Das ist eine Schätzung. Das war's. 
Теперь вы хотите, чтобы я сильно уд
Похоже, Б не совсем справил
यह सिग्मा सेवन है। 30 सेकंड का HF चेक, जिसके 10 सेकंड बाद से मिनट शुरू होंगे। यह 30 सेकंड का परीक्षण है, जब मैं बाजा कैलिफ़ोर्निया के तट से होते हुए दक्षिण-दक्षिण अमेरिका जा रहा हूँ। सभी सिस्टम ठीक स
Роджер. Вы проделали великолепную работу, ребят
わかりました。デカールに従ってハッチを取り付け、ハッチの整合性チェックを
रॉजर
私たちもそう思っていました。ありがと
Ok, Jack. Ora i passaggi rimanenti sono semplicemente la configurazione del circuito della tuta per rendere questo dispositivo pienamente operativo, e i nostri uomini vogliono aspettare che il contenitore su cui stai lavorando raggiunga i 7,6 millimetri di mercurio, il che richiederà probabilmente altri 45 minuti o un'ora... stiamo leggendo 4,7 ora. Quindi quello che vorremmo che facessi nel frattempo è impostare il secondo contenitore del modulo di comando nello stesso modo in cui hai appena fatto il primo, usando il tubo del comandante, e preparare tutto e probabilmente a quel punto sarà il momento di... di commutare. Per tua informazione, quando avrai fatto questo e se avrai fatto colazione e così via, la prossima cosa
はい。10ステップくらいですが、とても簡単です。CB 16のインバータ2を閉じます。CB 11の
Apollo 8, Houston. Versucht es doch mal ohne Gimbal-Winkel, falls das mög
لكن
هيو
حسنًا. بالطبع، في هذا السياق، نريد حرق بعض الدخان للأعلى وبعضه لليسار، ونحن نحاول أن 
Roger. Ho alcune informazioni per te su questo ar
क्या
Yes, why don't we just say if we do have problems, it doesn't pick it up when it's supposed to, give it a good try, and then call you up on the OMNI's or position ourselves and we'll talk about it and try for another t
روجر، جيم. لدينا إجراء سنقدمه 
分かりました。ジム、その通りです。キューカード、つまりちょうどいい大きさの硬めの紙を、リングから約3.5センチほどのところで切り取ってください。つまり、リングの穴を切り取るだけで、長さ約11インチ、幅はおそらく6インチくらいのカードができ
이제 달에 내려가서 달 암석 좀 가져올 준비
我们的态度还保
Aurora Sette, Aurora Sette. Qui è Canton Com Tech, Canton Com Tech. Mi 
Okay. Ich klappe die Kamera zusammen und verstaue d
अपोलो 
Okay, now, let's see; we want to change the DAP - t
休斯顿，鹰。您的比特率过低
Ещё немного местных новостей: здание окружного суда в Хантсвилле сгорело вчера до рассвета, так что, похоже, там снова займутся строительством. Немного о семьях, ожидающих возвращения. Вот что написала Энн Джеймс, репортер газеты Post. «Мы отдыхаем на обратной стороне Луны», — сказала Валери Андерс в канун Рождества, ожидая, когда «Аполлон-8» покинет лунную орбиту и направится домой. Миссис Андерс была дома во вторник в 00 утра, и соседи только что собрали всех детей, чтобы семья могла отдохнуть, пока космический корабль находился за Луной и был вне зоны связи. Дом полковника Фрэнка Бормана был украшен четырьмя большими венками из вечнозеленых деревьев на улице, посыпан пушистым снегом и украшен красными бантами. Дерево в гостиной ждёт его благополучного возвращения, а его красивая светловолосая жена Сью и крепкие сыновья Фредерик и Эдвин планируют остаться дома до полуночного старта с лунной орбиты. Обычно они посещали полуночные службы в епископальной церкви Святого Христофора. Планировалось, что семья отправится туда в полночь. Поскольку в доме Борманов нет маленьких детей, дарение рождественских подарков просто отложится до возвращения полковника Бормана с его фантастическим праздничным подарком — полетом на Луну и обратно. Четверо детей Мэрилин Ловелл проведут совершенно обычное Рождество, как сообщила занятая жена капитана Ловелла; но говорить о подарках было невозможно, потому что двое из них сидели прямо рядом с ней. «У меня даже не было времени переодеться, в чем я была вчера вечером», — сказала миссис Ловелл.
Roger, stai pronto. Devo riaccendere la
حسنًا. حسنًا. والأمر الآخر هو أننا لاحظنا وجود بعض الجزيئات الجديدة التي تطفو في الخارج، لذا من المحتمل أن وحدة الخدمة ب
로저. 내 마크에는 33이라고 적
Roger. And
Okay, auf Seite 18, und das habe ich bereits nach einer Minute getan; „MASTER ARM - EIN“, ich kra
ठीक है। सेकेंडरी लूप चेक के दौर
Apollo 11, allez-y
खेल जगत की बात करें तो, चलिए देखते हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों में जब आप व्यस्त थे, तब जो नामाथ और फुटबॉल कमिश्नर पीट रोज़ेल ने घोषणा की कि "ब्रॉडवे जो" ने बैचलर्स III रेस्टोरेंट में अपनी हिस्सेदारी बेचने और न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स में शामिल होने पर सहमति जताई है। जो आज जेट्स के ट्रेनिंग कैंप में पहुंचे और उन्होंने अपना पहला अभ्यास सत्र किया। जो के साथ कई अन्य जेट्स खिलाड़ी भी शामिल हुए, जिन्होंने पहले
Looking at the world of sports, let's see here. While you were busy the other day, Joe Namath and football Commissioner Pete Rozelle made the announcement that "Broadway Joe" had agreed to sell his interest in the Bachelors III restaurant and report to the New York Jets. Joe arrived at the Jets' training camp today and had his first workout. Several other Jet players who had held out along with Joe also reported. And Davy Hill, from Jackson, Michigan, won his third major golf in as many starts in the past week. He won the Philadelphia Classic. Hill has won four tournaments so far this year and is the leading money winner this year with a cool $129.000. And in baseball, the west division of the National League remains a tight race. LA and San Francisco are one game behind league leading Atlanta. The Astros have a record of 48 wins and 48 losses, and are now in fifth place, seven games out. A twin bill between the Astros and Cincinnati last night was postponed because of rain. The Chicago Cubs are still in first place in the East Division. They lead the New York Mets by four and one half games. And in the American League, Baltimore is breezing toward the Eastern Division title. They lead second place Boston by 11 games. Looking ahead, the All Star baseball game is scheduled for tomorrow. And President Nixon was scheduled to see the ga
アポロ11号、ヒューストン。映像の鮮明さとディテールには本当に感銘を受けました。色彩も素晴らしく、今モニターで見ていますが、本当に素晴らしい映像です。テレビコンバーターの変換により、ネットワ
Ich habe deine letzte Bemerkung nicht 
HF でカノが空中地上攻撃中です。1、2、3、4、5、6、7、8、9、10 - 9、8、7、6、5、4、3、2
알겠습
В
経過時間は
أظن أنني حصلت على ال
यह सही है। मैं दिन के उजाले में इस रोल की जाँच क
Ricevuto. E abbiamo dovuto disattivare il relè unidirezionale a causa di una riconfigurazione del sito di terra
わかりまし
Okay. They're out drinking coffee. I
了解。そちらへ行きたいなら、エンジンを
Neil e Buzz, vi parlo al telefono dalla Sala Ovale della Casa Bianca, e questa è sicuramente la telefonata più sto
D'accord. Nous vous enverrons quelque chose ici sous peu
हमने कर दिया। हमने वहाँ अपशिष्ट प्रबंधन वेंट वाल्व बंद कर दिया। या कहें अपशिष्ट भ
Ich habe zwar noch keinen Schnupfen, aber ich fühle mich so nah dran wie nie zuvor. Ich glaube, es liegt an diesem verdammten 100-prozentigen Sauerstoff. Ich atme ihn ein und meine Nase war noch nie so trocken. Bei der schlimmsten Erkältung meines Le
Роджер, мы сейчас находимся в вакууме, и правый гидрокостюм держит температуру на отметке 4, а циркуляция воздуха удовлетворительная. Мне не слишко
Roger. Negativ beim PQGS. Negativ beim ASCENT HELIUM REG und negati
روجر. يا جيم، بما أنك مستيقظ والجو هادئ، دعني أطرح عليك
Think I'd better take a try on
わからない。ジャック、僕は2階を出て、今は下にいる。ジャックが上に行ったら、様子を見て教えてくれると思う。わかった。ここから船尾へ直接切り替えることを考える。月が見えてるよ。ジャック、月は結構綺
मुझे लगा 
Okay. This is going to be for one last vent on the tank there, so at the top of the page just after INVERTER 1, CLOSE, add - Okay, after INVERTER 1, CLOSE, add PROP DESCENT HELIUM REG/VENT CLOSE, and then after STABIL
罗杰，阿波罗8号。有几点需要说明：关于你即将完成的这一步，我们已经查看了你的状态向量和所有信息。平台看起来不错，如果你想
Nein. Ich schaue mir da
روجر
알겠습니다. 이것은 9, /: 45597, -040, +157, +34188, -01353, +00780 180 008 001, November Alfa, +00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, 아래 131, 왼쪽 28, +0758, -16500 12987 36277입니다. 주성은 시리우스, 부성은 리겔, 129 155 010입니다. 4개의 쿼드, 15초, 여유 공간, 지평선은 T -3에서 1.2도 창선에 있습니다. 마이너스 마이크 알파를 사용하여 고속 절차를 사용하십시오. 이전 연소 데이터를 검토한
Sigma Seven，Cape Flight
Хорошо. Я вспомнил, что 
로저. 제 상태는 양호합니다.
肯定没问题。这么漂亮的驾驶舱里，什么东西都
Ok. Vediamo se ho capito bene. A 49 ore, prima di uscire dallo ZERO sull'OTTICA, osserva l'albero e richiama anche 16, 91 e lascia che tu guardi gli angoli dell'albero e del perno per osservare un possibile jitter. Ve
Okay. You're not quite squared away. Roll to the - 
Roger. Your othe
It's still there. I'm looking at it right now. I can look at - the Sun is right behind me, then all these sparklie
I can't see down at this time. I'm oriented to look at the stars
Roger. Huntsville this is 
Okay, Buzz. Zunächst einmal haben wir Hinweise darauf, dass sich Ihre Schrägprojektionen der Landestelle nicht an der richtigen Stelle befinden. Wenn Sie das bi
J'espère que ce pet
シグマセブン、シグマセブン、こちらムチア。聞
खैर, जब तक हम एलएम पावर पर स्विच नहीं कर लेते, तब तक म
Roger, 11. We copy your word description on that. I understand you can see a shadow being cast by that cloud over between Afghanis
L'unica volta, l'altra volta che ho provato a usarlo, ho ottenuto una misurazione piuttosto buona la volta successiva. Il... senza usare filtri, ho usato la parte superiore del bagliore dello spesso strato di bagliore atmosferico. È piuttosto nebuloso, bisogna in un certo senso calibrare il proprio bulbo oculare e cercare di posizionarlo nello stesso punto ogni volta... Ci vuole un controllo preciso dell'assetto per effettua
好的
Okay. I guess the view must be pretty good from up there
سأمنحك وقتاً رجعياً لنهاي
حسناً يا ج
就是这样。是的。***你为什么不
好的。这次飞掠是昨天那次飞掠的更新，请注意这是第二次。飞掠坐标为：62970，-162，+129，+00966，+00552，-02079。横滚、俯仰和偏航均为零，11月阿尔法星，近地点高度为+00202 02358 022 02
Fluglage in Ordnung. Rückwärtsneigung in Wiedereintrittslage, Korrektur der Rückwärtsneigung. Es gibt keinen Grund, in Wiedereintrittslage zu bleiben. Es gibt keinen Grund, in Wiedereintrittslage zu bleiben, wenn wir in Rückwärtsneigung so gut sehen können. Und das ist tatsächlich die Fluglage, die wir zum Fliegen benötigen. Wir nähern uns der Rückwärtsneigung. Rollen und Gieren sind in Ordnung. Wiedereintrittslage ist ausgewählt. Nickwinkel wird in Kürze 
ठ
حسنًا. درجة حرارة المقصورة 100 درجة، ودرجة حرارة قبة المقصورة 40 درجة؛ ودرجة حرارة مبادل حرارة المقصورة 4
좋아요, 잘 읽었어요, 프레드. 15초 뒤에 "MASTER ARM - OFF"를 지우고, "엔진 정지 시"로 넘어가는 부분에서 "MODE CONTROL: to ATT HOLD" 다음에 ","를 넣고 "Y, Z 변환을
罗杰，这是有史以来最清
Das ist Houston. Bitte wiederholen Sie das
Ok. Ora ho la pagina di aggiornamento della mappa. Perché n
मुझे चीज़ें हटती हुई दिख रही हैं, लेकिन मैं उन्हें साफ़-साफ़ नहीं देख पा रहा हूँ। अब हम 0.05 पर पहुँच गए हैं, एक हरा रंग। इस समय मैं कुछ नहीं कर रहा हूँ। रेट कमांड में, ऑक्स डै
Okay. We've already thought a
Très bien, Carnarvon. Gé
자, 캡콤, 여기
И это тоже неверно. Гироскопы
حسنًا، س
बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। आपने बहुत ही बढ़िया रिज्यूमे भेजा था। हम फिलहाल पानी और यूसीडीए से संबंधित अन्य चीजों को निकालने की प्रक्रिया में हैं। 
Das wird durch unsere Beobachtungen
मैं शर्त लगा सकता हूँ क
Okay. Burn rules. We should shut down for the if we have the thrust monitor at 77 percent or below; number 2, if the propellant ullage pressure is less than 160 psi; 3, if the fuel oxidizer DELTA-P is greater th
Je suppose que je dois vérifier le Sanborn pour ça. Prochainement, le BPMS. Gene, je suis vraiment content de la température de la combinaison. Elle est
आगे बढ़ो, आरकेव
Roger, Jack 告诉我，这都是一个断路器，下一个是照明：数字/积分、AC2、LMDC-AC1 和 RMDC-
Вы измеряете темп
صحيح. لم يستغرق ال
출항 시간을 100시간 12분으로 설정하
في رينو، نيفادا، ولأن منزله يفتقر إلى مدفأة، كتب طفل صغير إلى بابا نويل عبر الصحيفة المحلية مقترحًا: "هل يمكنك استخدام الباب الأمامي؟ ستحتاج إلى ركله قليلًا من الأسفل لأن
좋아. "크리스마스 이브 밤, 우주 저 멀리 아폴로 8호 승무원들은 달 착륙 경쟁에서 막 승리했지. 헤드셋은 콘솔에 조심스럽게 걸려 있었고, 크리스 크래프트가 곧 도착하길 바랐어. 프랭크
The laser reflector is installed and the bubble is leveled and the alignment appear
打开 TEMP/PRE
Roger. Unsere Mondreise mag Ihnen einfach erschienen sein. Ich kann Ihnen versichern, dass dem nicht so war. Die Saturn-V-Rakete, die uns in den Orbit befördert hat, ist eine unglaublich komplexe Maschine, deren einzelne Teile einwandfrei funktionierten. Dieser Bordcomputer über mir verfügt über einen Wortschatz von 38.000 Wörtern, von denen jedes einzelne sorgfältig ausgewählt wurde, um für uns, die Besatzung, von größt
コロ
جاك مستعد لإعطائك القراءا
Аполло
- - but my only question is, I got the CROSS TIE B
它在这里忽明忽暗；
Roger. Ready for you to 
罗杰，弗兰克，你收到我的信息了吗
Отрицательное значение. Это 45 градусов в направлении плюс-Y, в плоскости XY в сторону минус-X. 
نحن سعداء للغاية بأداء مركز التحكم هنا يا جيم. لقد قام الفريق بعمل رائع ويستحقون كل التق
Доброе утро, Фрэнк. Похоже, у нас вышел из строя датчик температуры на основном излучателе. Он показывает завышенное значение, выходящее за пределы шкалы. Однако остальная часть контура выглядит вполне нормально. Когда у вас бу
正解です。わかりました。次は、次のカメラです。スタンバイ 1。ノイズが入っています。わかりました。次のカメラは 16 ミリで、これらの写真は優先度 3 と見なされます。わかりました。まず、A-8 から 16 ミリとパワーパックを入手します。10 ミリレンズを入手して取り外します。10 ミリレンズを取り外し、B-3 から 18 ミリレンズを取り出してカメラに取り付けます。電源ケーブルをカメラに接続し、フレーム レートを 12 フレーム/秒に設定します。先ほど示したのと同じデータ ラインが、今回はこのように表示されます。/DAC/18/CEX、バッテリー (f:8、1/250)。わかりました。では、これらの 2 台のカメラを見てみましょう。最初の 2 分半は 16 ミリを使用し、その後 70 ミリに切り替えることをお勧めします。それはフレームが――というか、フレームが――近距離と遠距離に最適
روجر. 
Jim,
Okay. I'll hit Indicate Retro 
Хорошо. Подключите кабели. Шаг 2, питание 1 AC и 2 AC, замкнуты, автоматические выключатели. Шаг 3, панель 5: сигнал датчика, основная шина B, замкнут. Шаг 4, панель... замкнута. Затем основная шина B, шина B, замкнута. Проверьте напряжение на основной шине, затем включите питание. Шаг 7: автоматический выключатель основной шины 
Houston, Apollo 11. Ha attivato l'ALLARME PRINCIPALE tre volte, ormai
D'acc
Wir haben einen primären und einen sekundären Kanister an Bord. Der andere primäre Kanis
Okay, Charlie. Thank you. We'll just
좋아요. 그럼 저희가 언제까지 가
Apollo 8 ist startbereit. Danke, Housto
よし
Хорошо. Ну, я не знаю, сможем ли мы так долго этим заниматься, и я собираюсь убрать все остальные эксперименты, стереоскопическое изображение или другие виды фотографии, и мы немного устали; я хочу использовать этот последний момен
- - BMAG 모드, 3 - CM을 안정화하고 정렬해야 합니다 - BMAG 모드, 3을 ATT 
सिग्मा सेवन, सिग्मा सेवन, यह वाटरटाउन कैप कॉम से एचएफ 
That's affirmative on the gimbals, Fred. Nothing else on page 14. Proceed to page 15, and under " CHECKOUT," we'd like to scratch that wording and just say "Verify the following switches: GUIDANCE CONTROL,;" step 3 - correction - it's line 3, change "ATTITUDE CONTROL (3)" to "MODE CONTROL;" "MODE CONTROL (BOTH)" to "AUTO." Verify ACA PROP, LMP ENABLE; ACA/4 JET, LMP ENABLE; /TRANSLATION, LMP, ENABLE
好的。T1：122 加 16 加 05。Tango 2 是 122 加 21 加 11，位于轨道以北 6 英里处。您需要 NOU
はい。それでは、チェックリストの最初の部分を読み上げます。これから読み上げるのはタイムラインです。タイムラインと、それに合わせたチェックリストの変更点です。今、タイムラインの最初の部分
Roger, Tom. For your information, our T/M verifies this, and we have run out a s
... Avvertiamo che a 122 chilometri abbiamo quella che sembra essere l'Agena, e abbiamo anche una visuale
이글, 잠시 기다려 주시겠습니까? 통신 점검을 진행하기 
フレンドシップ
罗
了解。ジムは今B
फ्रेड, दो और बातें हैं। पहली बात तो यह है कि बर्न के दौरान आपके इंजन में शायद ही कोई गड़बड
ヒューストン、これは君の視点であって、我
로저, 휴스턴. 4/45695, -0.53 +141, +30627, -0.0625, +0.0577 180 018 001, NA, +0.0
Ricevuto. Capit
يا
روجر. بالنسبة للسباق القادم الذي ستخوضه، استخدم زمنًا قدره 7 في منتصف المسار. ملاحظة صغيرة أخرى: يبدو المسار جيدًا جدًا، لدرجة أنه يمكنك اجتياز الممر دون الحاجة إلى زمن 7 في منتصف المس
Да. Я всё ещё не доволен получаемыми фотографиями. У меня получило
ح
Это «Дружба Семь». Я получаю нестабильные показания 
How did
オプティクスゼロ - 
여기는 휴스턴입니다. 말씀하신 내용을 잘 들었습니다. 공군 D-9 3대, 안타레스에 있는 아폴로 4호, 그리고 전갈자리의 별 하나를 관측하셨다고 들었습니다. 그것도 장거리 관측과 단거리 관측 말이죠. 안
もしそれがプレシャスが望むことなら、ここで慣性中立にして地平線上
Okay. Ich
هل وصل
罗杰。我这里有一些重入数据，你准
حس
र
Tu ne dét
收到。请用UHF适配器
Okay. Good readback. Proceeding on down the page. "BALANCE COUPLE" switch, "BALANCE COUPLE OFF." Okay, down to the - it's the last line before minus 2 minutes -
Да. Вам нужно выровнять его как можн
Отлично. Дальше на юг, вглубь 
是的。这是我们给你的记事本，
잭, 우리가 어떻게 할 수 있을지 알아볼게요. 복구팀에 연락해서 당신이 돌아오면 태평양에 요원을 보낼 수 있는지 알아보겠습니다. 글쎄요, 한번 봅시다. 프로 농구 소식으로는 닉스가 밀워키 벅스를 110 대 102로 이겼고, 빌리 캐스퍼가 마스터스에서 54홀 후 208타로 선두를 달리고 있으며, 봄철 미식축구 훈련이 한창입니다. 오늘 소식은 이게 전부입니다. 여러분께 알려드릴 오늘의 업데이트된 계획은 다음과 같습니다. 유니폼은 근
了解。私の合図で19時4分になります。3、2、1 
了解
弗兰克，我们还有1分钟时间。你可以随时停止搅拌你的冷冻舱，我们同意你所
阿
Ce rouleau est assez long; je ne sais pas exactement combien - alors c'est - Oh, ça va faire BL
حسنًا، وأخيرًا، أربع علب من هيدروكسيد الليثيوم، تلك المستخدمة في [المكان المذكور]، ويمكن وضعها في كيس التخلص [المكان المذكور]. حسنًا، ملاحظتان. بعد تحميل [المكان المذك
Roger. We 
ヒューストン、聞こえたか？ア
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Negativo. Un computer di comando nel sito di Madrid si è rotto. Abbiamo dovuto passare temporaneamente ad Ascension. Ora siamo di nuovo in comunicazione remota tramite Madrid, il computer è tornato operativo 
जा
收到。我们的顺序断路器和两个顺序逻辑电路都已就位并启动，现在就等您确认是否
यह सही 
좋
わかりました。 を見せるんですが、 に表示されているものが読めるかどうか、そして P-R-O-G、V-E-R-B、N-O-U-N が見えるかどうかを確認したいんで
휴스턴, 컬럼비아.
Eagle, Columbia. Mein Manöve
Prévoyez-vous de toute façon une intervention non-COMM en milieu de parcours à 134 et quelques minutes, ou allez-vous atten
سيجما سفن، سيجما سفن، هذه كانتون كوم ت
Okay. Ich habe eine kleine Neuigkeit für Sie, falls Sie daran interessiert sind. 
जिम हमेशा जम
क्यू कार्ड पर एक नंबर लिखा होता है। यकीन मानिए, हमारा पेशेवरों से मुकाबला करने का कोई इरादा नहीं है। वैसे, हम
Get a couple of close ups on these quite rounded
알겠습니다. 닐, 방금 전에 
你现在获得了很高的收益，
Klingt, als hättest du einen Ausbruch, Ch
Die Einstellung ist gut, Houston, was die Vermeidung von Blendeffekten in der Optik angeht, und es könnte sein, dass h
Roger. We're showing an indication here on the ground of the computer be
曇り空の下に街があるみたい。よくわからないけど。今のところ、窓のほぼ真ん中くらい
Das ist ein gutes Beispiel dafür, wie die Crew mit 
这里是 Kano 的空地高频通信。1、2、3、4、5、6、7、8、9、10 - 9、8、7、6、5、4、3、2、
La nouvelle cassette pour la rétro est la cassette n° 15, et j'ai l
حسنًا. ماذا بعد يا جيمس؟ خط 
अगर मैं बीच में ही रुक जाऊं 
Apollo 8, this is Houston. Reading your down-voice backup loud 
私たちは今、OMNI D に乗っています。反
아니요. 항공기 교체는 없었고, 연소 속도는 초당 2.3피트였습니다.
了解。こちらはフレンドシップ・セブンです。30分間の報告を続けます。キャビンの気圧は5.
حسنًا. في نهاية رؤيا 59، خط طول العقدة ا
ロジャー、3の設定に戻った時に少しの間意識が遠のいてしまいましたが、長くはそこに留まりませんでした。7.5～8くらいになるはずです。この時点では自動後退姿勢になっています。もうすぐフライ・バイ・ワイヤに切り替える予
Jetzt ganz vorne. Ohne diese Waffe habe ich nicht 
Ah, parfait. Je
क्यू कार्ड पर एक नंबर लिखा होता है। यकीन मानिए, हमारा पेशेवरों से मुकाबला करने का कोई इरादा नहीं है। वैसे, हम यहाँ बहुत आराम से हैं। हमारा घर बहुत खुशहाल है। हम तीनों के लिए काफी जगह है और मुझे लगता है कि हम सभी बैठने के लिए अपना पसंदीदा कोन
حسناً. فهمت؛ معايرة البصريات وضبط الصفر
Roger. Vorremmo confer
أبو
Ich fliege mit minimalem Impuls, Houston, und es ist ziemlich schwierig, die Daten konstant zu halten. Die Flugbahn schwankt stark. Ich bin mir nicht sicher, ob das mit MASCONN zusammenhängt oder woran sonst, aber ich kann sie im Datenmodus komplett stabilisieren und sie dann in Ruhe lassen, und nach ein paar Minuten hat sie ihre
حسناً. لقد استلمنا ذلك، ومرة ​​أخرى نود الحصول على فحص الفولت والأمبير في وحدة التحكم.
Okay. A maneuver pad on the: purpose is midcourse 5,,, is N/A, HA is N/A, perigee, plus 0019.8, 0.007.8, 0.15, the rest is N/A. Shut down the engi
好的。我们有一个倾斜度为 2 度
रॉजर। आपकी आवाज़ साफ़ सुनाई दे रही है। मैंने आपको हाई-फायर पर दो-तीन बार कॉल किया, लेकिन कोई जवाब नहीं मिला। यूएचएफ पर आप
了解。窓を切
罗杰。嘿，你现在可以关掉排水阀了
روجر، أود 
...получит
不过，你选择
मुझे लग रहा है कि पिच में कुछ गड़बड़ है, लेकिन शायद वो क्षितिज पर दिखने वाली हवा की चमक की वजह से है। उसकी वजह से लगता है कि पिच असल से ज़्यादा ऊँची है। फिर भी मुझे लग रहा है कि पिच मे
После того, как мы снизили скорость вращения двигателя до уровня, при котором посчитали, что можем безопасно отстыковаться, мы это сделали и как можно быстрее отошли от «Агены» со скоростью несколько футов в секунду. Мы наблюдали, как уровень топлива снизился с 50 до менее чем 30 процентов. После отключения системы OAMS и при сохранении реж
أراهن أنني أعرف كيف يمكنني الحصول على محاذاة. سأعطيهم زاوية حلزونية للمؤشر. بدلاً من مناورة المركبة الفضائية
حسنًا. لدي تحديث للخريطة لك إذا كنت مستعدًا 
What do
Roger. Sul timer della missione, volevamo staccare l'interruttore e lasciarlo raffreddare per un'ora e mezza o due ore. Credo che l'interruttore sia attualmente aperto. È stato spento, quindi vai avanti e resetta l'interruttore del timer della missione. Imp
Oui, il y a 
Gemini 4, Guaymas CAP COM. Der Flugbetrieb weist darauf hin, dass Treibstoff gespart werden soll. Sie werden über dem Kap informi
Jetzt haben wir, meiner Meinung nach, nahezu perfekte Bedingungen zu
O
إن
Okay. Ich glaube,
姿勢は良好です。間違いありません。ヨー角は
O
ممتاز يا ديك. هذه أول مرة أتمكن فيها من الاسترخاء منذ ديسمبر الماضي. لقد مارست بعض التمارين الرياضية لتقوية عضلا
... 電話をかけてください、ジャッ
アポロ11号、アポロ11号、こちらヒューストン。無線チェック。オーバー
Das ist korrekt. B
了解。客室気圧は5.5%を維持しています。出発以来ずっとこの状態です。客室温度は90%、相対湿度は36%まで戻りました。冷却水の量も少し減っています。湿度がこれほど上昇しているということは、どこかで小さな水漏れがあったのかもし
Okay. We just appeared to get a solid lock for the last - oh, about a minute. The... needle's been wandering up and down, and the pitch and yaw 
Okay. And on the - your tracking that we have now, it still looks like the time we gave you last night for time of pericynthian is still good, 69
Я собираюсь выполнить команду скорости входа в атмосферу
我们得到了 5337
좋아요, 아트리아가 육분의에 있긴 한데, 정확히 육분의 정중앙에 있는 건 아니죠. 물론, 음, 잘 모르겠지만... 세 번째 별 확인을 제대로 하는 방법에 대한 규칙 같은 거 들어보신
好的。我们首先要做的是——平台并行性 06 50 到 07 10。他们给我们提供的是 SPC 加载的偏航机
D'accord, Columbia. La liaison montant
해상도와 중간 해상도의 조합이 아마도 최상의 조합일 것입니다. 속도가 너무 
Jack, die Informationen – die Dreiecke, die wir jetzt sehen, stammen von der ersten, zweiten und der B-1 und sind meiner Meinung nach genau richtig für die Landebedin
Zwei Fu
A
Sì. Va bene, allora. Ieri sera alla base aerea di Walker sono morti cinque membri dell'equipaggio quando un KC-135 si è schiantato in fase di atterraggio. La maggior parte delle altre notizie riguarda il volo, e sapete bene cosa sta succedend
Roger, Bill. Gra
Pas définitivement, Mike. 
Tout le mon
Yes. I guess you guys were pretty ti
Хорошо, Джек. У нас сработала главна
रॉजर, मिथुन राशि 4, मैं आपको इस स्प्लिट-बर
Pour votre information, la température à l'entrée de la combinaison est actuelle
Right. The - At these low Sun angles, there's no trace of brown, it's now returned to a very gray appearance and, li
روجر، هيوستن. سأقرأ الكتا
好的。请
Roger Aurora Seven, Cape C
ジム、それは我々が考えた可能性の一つです。なぜなら、我々はそのタンクを加熱しましたが、水素は使用していないので、船外放出口から漏れている可能性が
حسنًا. أول ستة صمامات على اليسار مغلقة - هذا من خلال صمام العزل، لكنني فتحت كل صمام 
Cue cards have a no. We have no intertions of competing with the professionals, believe me. We are
Мы ещё вернёмся к подробностям о том, что здесь находится, но, похоже, здесь собрано практически всё разнообразие форм, угловатости, зернистости, все виды горных пород, какие только можно найти. Цвета — ну, они сильно различаются в зависимости от того, как вы смотрите относительно нулевой точки. Единого
Роджер. Повторю. Альфа 225, 74 процента; Браво 240 фунтов, 79 процент
バイザーを閉じます。よし。位置を確認しましょう。この時点で線量計のチェックを行いました
好的。现在我用左边的月亮做参照物，效果很好。我先把姿态指示器遮住，你们可以观察偏航角。我打算暂时关闭陀螺仪，尝试选择低速电传操纵。我先把月亮放到窗口中央——同时控制横滚和俯仰，然
海外に目を向けると、ソウルと仁川港を結ぶ韓国初の高速道路が、貴大統領の訪韓を記念して「アポ
了解しました。こちらも聞こえています。HFで2、3回
Non stai scherzando! Sono d'accordo. Le cose che sono accadute non erano cose che non avevamo già fatto prima e cose per cui non avevamo ancora elaborato procedure. Le cose che abbiamo fatto, credo, oggi hanno 
Roger, Canton. Ich war hier mit Manövern beschäftigt. Ich habe Ihnen Ihren Bericht noch nicht gegeben, da ich die Beleuchtung aufgebaut und alles für den Rückzündvorgang verstaut habe. Mein Brennstoffvorrat liegt bei 45-45 Prozent, der Sauerstoffgehalt bei 60-90 Prozen
Okay,... sieht hier am Boden gut aus, und das ist auc
さあ、ヒュー
هيوستن، ما ترونه الآن في منتصف الشاشة هو فوهة شوبرت
好的，万斯。我可以给你。我启动后马上就读过了。电池A电压
알겠습니다. 맞습니다. 2번 탱크를 계속 지켜보겠습니다. 만약 2번 탱크의 수위가 떨어지지 않으면 상승 급수 밸브를 닫고 차단 밸브를 
ह
Я действительно вижу этот маленький объект, похожий на снежинку, удаляющийся 
Fr
Ich möchte mir das DA
Okay, Vance. Während wir warten, weißt du auch,
This is Apollo 8, coming to you live from the moon. We've had to switch the TV cameras now. We showed you first a view of earth as we'v
これらの渦雲を探
Ottimo. A pagina E-9, quando ci si prepara a trasferire il modulo di comando, se si vuole evitare che i motori si accendano a causa della correzione dell'assetto, si potrebbe voler portare gli interruttori di 
Houst
Salve, Apollo 11
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 광학 추적 시스템에 대해 간단히 말씀드리겠습니다. 뒷면의 제어점 1번과 2번에는 자동 광학 기능을 사용했는데, 아주 잘 작동해서 두 목표물을 모두 정확하게 추적했습니다. 그리고
По
罗杰。插入检
Oh, o
Okay. You burned out all 
बिजली! क्या आपकी खिड़की के बाह
Roger. Bonne relecture, E
ヒュー
تُفيد إدارة الطيران بأنها تحتاج إلى تسجيل البيانات ف
Роджер. Напряжение батарей: основная — 24 В, первая — 25 В, вторая — 25 В, третья — 25 В. Резервная первая — 25 В, резервная вторая — 25 В, изолированная — 29 В. Ампер
Okay. Wir möchte
Скоро будет досту
Проблема заключалась в том, что высокоэффективная антенна вышла за пределы допустимых парамет
रॉजर। आप पृथ्वी को देख रहे हैं, जैसा कि हम इसे अपनी बाईं खिड़की से देख रहे हैं, पृथ्वी का लगभग आधा हिस्सा। हम पूर्वी प्रशांत महासागर को देख रहे हैं, और स्क्रीन के ऊपरी आधे हिस्से के उत्तरी भाग में, हम उ
Circa 50 g
... بين خمسمائة وستما
지상 상태는 전반적으로 양호합니다. 인버터 온도가 약간 
ジェミニ4、ハワイCAP COM。体温を測りました。血圧を測り、
يسهل رصده للغاية. يمكنك رؤية حواف الفوهات بأكملها من هنا، وبالطبع الهلال الأبيض على الجانب البعيد حيث تسطع عليه الشمس. الظلال طويلة نوعًا ما الآن. ماسكلين ب (مستنقع النوم) له ظلال كثيرة، لكن يمكن تمييزه. غرب ماسكلين ب مباشرةً، نبدأ بالتوجه نحو خط الفصل بين الليل والنهار. خط الفصل واضح جدًا فوق جبال البرانس، ولا أستطيع رؤية أي شيء في ضوء الأرض في الوقت الحالي. يقول بيل إنه يستطيع رؤية أشياء من النافذة ا
わかりました。
J'ai noté les consommables et je vous restitue no
हम इस 
わかった。急がな
All right. We're going up on
Pour votre information, la température à l'entrée de la combinaison est actuellement d'e
रॉजर। हम अपशिष्ट जल के निपटान के लिए अनुरोध कर रहे हैं, जिसे 25:30 से घटाकर नाम
ええ、あなたとお話できて、地元のニュースを全部聞けて嬉しかったです。ヒューストン上空を通過した時、実際に視界が開けました。外に出ると、メキシコ湾とガルベストン湾、
Ok. Sembra davvero un gran bell'oggetto. Abbiamo notato che hai spostato la stella numero 2 in fondo all'annuncio, e dovremmo d
11号，休斯顿。我们将测试S波段自动重新锁定功能，具体操作是：先锁
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir
Gemini 4, we'll update you with the orbit calculations s
D'accord, je vous lis malgré le bruit de fond. Sachez que vous souhaitez vous renseigner auprès de Houston pour savoir s'ils exigent un certificat médical de type 1 pour le pilot
Roger. C
Ok. Apollo 8, potresti ver
Man, look at those stars. Ho
Брюс, мы надеемся, что наша 16-миллиметровая пленка работала в тот момент снижения, и мы сможем подтвердить место посадки. Мы думали, что во время подъема сможем за
C'est exact, Jim. Nous n'avons pas encore d'image. Ce sera dans la partie supérieure du... Correction, dans la partie supérieure du... en haut du cran 2 et dans la partie supérieure de... et, en position, si vous êtes bien aligné avec le Soleil, le curseur devrait se diviser. L'angle de roulis n'est pas crucial; environ 10 degrés, ça ira. Nous pensons que vous devriez pouvoir faire mieux. À la page 31, sous la rubrique « Technique de brûlage », vous pouvez gratter la partie inférieure sous le petit schéma, puisque le cardan est verrouill
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. S-밴드 A
روجر. مايك، هل يمكنك التأكد من إيقاف تشغيل المحركين B3 و C4؟ انتهى. 
로저. 당신이 볼 수 있었던 건 나가는 길의 일부뿐이
حسنًا يا جيم. في اللوحة رقم 11 هناك، يمكنك أيضًا ترك قاطع دائرة سخان 
Okay, Joe. Ich habe hier eine neue Seite namens -1A erstellt. Punkt 6: Umschalten auf Stromversorgung. Ich hab
了解。いろいろと助けて
Questa è Friendship Seven. Ho visto un tramonto meraviglioso e riesco a vedere la luc
그리고 13번, 휴스턴. 회피 기동은 무사했던 것으로 보입니다. LOX 투하 시간은 현재 4 + 39 + 20으로 약 3분 지연되
جيميني 4، مركز قي
روجر، لديّ تعليقان. أولهما: يتطلب إعادة ضبط المسار إلى الوضع المفضل؛ و
알겠습니다. 보조 라디에이터 입력 온도는 70도에서 약 72도 사이이고, 라디에이터 출력 온도는 약 30도입니다. 글리콜 증발기 온도는 약 65도이고, 증기 압력은 최대치이며, 글리콜 배출 압력은 약 9psi입니다. 보조 축압기 보호복 온도는 약 52도이고, 객실 온도는 약 58도입니다. 압력은 보호복이 4.1, 객실이 5입니다. 이산화탄소 분압은 1을 약간 넘는 약 1.1입니다. 건물 측면 온도는 72도이고, 헬륨은 3500, N2 A는 2300, N2 B는 약 2450입니다. 연료는 약 165이고, 연료 전지 1은 둘 다 닫혀 있고 압력이 0입니다. 피부 온도는 40
アポロ8号、ヒューストン
迈克，我想游戏规则就
로저. 약 148시간 후에, 아직 하지 않으셨다면 CO2 필터를 교체하고, O2 및 H2 퍼지 전에 H2 퍼지 라인 히터를 20분 동안 가동하십시오. 151시간이 아닌 14
Roger. Stiamo ricevendo un sacco di interferenze. Il Mare delle Crisi è di fronte a noi all'orizzonte, e il cratere scuro Picard è visibile al centro. Ora stiamo interrompendo l'alba della Luna o il tramonto della sonda. Questa è un'area in cui il sole è appena sorto sulla Luna. Il mare che stiamo sor
Okay. Ich kopiere da
Dies ist Sigma Seven, nur VOX-Aufnahme. Ich habe den Automatikmodus auf Normalbetrieb ohne Hochgeschwindigkeitsantrieb wiederhergestellt. Aktuell liegt der Automatikmodus bei 85 Prozent, der manuelle Modus bei 90 Prozent. Jetzt, wo ich eingeschaltet bin, kann ich einige E
ハワイさん、はっきりと聞こえましたよ。調子はどうですか？確かミッドウェー島が見えたばかりだったと思います。もう少ししたらそち
Хорошо, я вижу, как Меркурий проходит сквозь – свечение возд
Ok, Jack. Sono curioso 
좋습니다, 존. 이 문제를 끝까지 해결해 보겠습니다. 인버터 온
«Аполлон-8», это Х
Хорошо, Джим. Поскольку первая рекомендация по маневрированию не сработала, у нас есть еще одна. И ты можешь попробовать вот что. Установи рыскание на нол
Ce n'est que la moitié. Le reste est caché. C'était plutôt intéres
现在很清楚了。我明白了6月4日
这是事先计划好的
It's - the circuit breaker g
سفينة المحيط الهندي. سيجما سبعة. ان
Ok, Fred. La temperatura del pacchetto ASA sembra buona. È intorno ai 37 gradi e vorremmo veder
アクエリアス、ヒューストン。正確な値を読み取るために、AC電源を投入する必要があります。パネル11のバスタイインバーター回路ブレーカー4つすべてを閉じてください。パネル11のACバス電圧回路ブレーカーも閉じてください。パネル16のイ
أب
D'accord, Jack. On a le contrôle d'attitude mainte
Apollo 8, Houston. Zum Vergleich: Mit den Vektoren ergibt sich für die 
И, Фред, запрашиваю пе
休斯顿，我们正处于高增益状态，现在可能是进行 COMM 检查的好
Roge
Okay. We want to get some ranging data on 
Can you give us your state
لا، أعتقد أنه عندما تسطع الشمس عليهم، فسوف... عليهم. نعم، الشخ
ठीक है। दो और सत्यापन। क्या आप यह सत्यापित कर सकते हैं कि संदेशों वाली डिस्क
Ok, Jack. Questo ci toglierà 120 ampere-ora, ch
ど
حسناً. وقد 
Аполлон-8, Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Вы готовы к использованию пиротехник
Bien. On a eu une grosse tempête de neige ici dans le Midwest; je ne sais pas si vous pouvez la voir d'ici. À Houston, d'ailleurs, il commence à faire assez frais, environ 2 degrés Celsius. Et on aimerait savoir qui vous voyez gagner dimanche 
يا هيوستن، من المشكوك فيه حاليًا أن نتمكن من رؤية النجوم في هذا التكوين. ا
로저. 지금 바로 도착했습니다. MID 데드밴드 
D'accord, Jim. On a noté ça. Premièrement, il faut que tu passes en revue la procédure de mise sous tension, disjoncteur par disjoncteur, avec précaution pour le prochain essai, et on y travaille. Deuxièmement, il faut une procédure pour remettre le module de commande sous tension quand il faudra y accéder à nouveau et le rallumer; on en discute et on est en tra
Sotto, cancella "Controll
Роджер, Джим. Мы показываем вам данные телеметрии. Выглядит стабильно в новом положении. Просто к сведению, последние данные слежения показывают,
현
Tu sais, le disjoncteur dont je parl
알겠습니다. 음, 그렇게 오래 진행할 수 있을지는 잘 모르겠네요. 다른 실험들, 예를 들어 입체 사진 촬영이나 다른 사진 촬영 기법 같은 건 다 취소해야겠어요. 저희도 좀 피곤한 상태라서, 마지막 시간을 제대로 활용해서 
分かりました。74.30でしたっけ？ヒーターとファンを
아폴로 8호, 아폴로
रॉजर। हमने फोटोग्राफी के लिए एक और कक्षा मांगी थी। 
에드, 여기는 휴스턴 CAP COM입니다. 무슨 말씀인지 잘 안 읽히는데요. 당신은 제 말을 읽을 수 있는 것 같군요. 산소 공급 장치의 압력이 걱정됩니다. 97
L'étoile de visée est la Terre, en bas 037, à droite 22, plus 10 68, moins 165 00 128 56 361 18. Les étoiles d'alignement: l'étoile principale est Sirius, l'étoile secondaire Rigel 010, 294, 320, pas de marge, retour de trajectoire, 8750. Ceci va à l'océan Indien et nécessite une procédure à grande vitesse, c'est-à-dir
D'accord. J'ai compris. Bon. Je vais répéter. Prenez une f
没错。然后你要检查主母线电
حسنًا. هذا جيد جدًا يا جاك. أنت تراقبهم. هذا 
حسناً. نظراً لانخفاض الحمل مع إيقاف تشغيل رادار الالتقاء، نود أن تكون ال
Okay, Joe. Ich habe hier eine neue Seite namens -1A erstellt. Punkt 6: Umschalten auf Stromversorgung. Ich habe wie üblich überprüft, ob der Flutlichtstrahler aus ist und die Warnleuchte „Vorsicht, Stromausfall“ leuchtet. Ich bekomme eine Rückmeldung von Jack und leite sie dir weiter. Punkt 7: Leitungsschutzscha
여기는 휴스턴입니다. 알
Jim, bezüglich Fenster 5: Ich habe hier eine Zeichnung. Im angedockten Zustand beträgt der Winkel zwischen den Z-Achsen der beiden Raumschiffe etwa 60 Grad. Wenn m
لدينا لفة واحدة من فيلم 16 ملم ملون داخلي ASA 1000. كنا نفكر في تصويرها أثناء الدخول، من النافذة رقم 4 باستخدام حامل، وقد تحصل على دل
알겠습니
Roger. Verwenden Sie Ihre O2-Hochleistungspumpe, um den Kabinendruck z
Okay. Bezüglich der frühen Fernsehübertragung: Wir verlieren jetzt die Hochgewinnantenne, und es sieht so aus, als hätten wir die frühe Fernsehübertragung ohnehin nur über eine externe Station und deren Auswertung erreichen können. Daher verwerfen wir
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 모든 축에서 불규칙적인 신호가 감지되고 있습니다. 계기를 이용해 궤도 자세를 정렬해 보니 실제 위치와 상당히 벗어나 있습니다. 오른쪽으로 약 20도
보조 스캐너를 
嗯，我们一直在讨论这个问题。我们决定明天开
حسنًا، وفي الصفحة التالية، رقم 29، على الجانب الأيمن بالقرب من ال
Es werden genau 50 Sek
システムの概要をご説明する準備が整いました。最終段階の手順をすべて確認し、軌道とシステム情報について、私たちが見ているものをお伝えします。また、ジョー・カーウィン博士が最新のニュースをすべて持ってきていますので、もし眠れない場
١١، هذه هيوستن. أفاد غولدستون أنهم يستطيعون قراءة الأرقام على الشاش
Lors de votre prochain passage, Columbia, au lieu d'effectuer une recherche comme celle-ci, nous vous demandons de chercher aux alentours des coordonnées que nous vous avons fournies. Il s'agit de notre meilleure analyse basée sur la physique des cartes et la trajectoire. Nous avons également un autre ensemble de coordonnées à p
Non voglio se
로저. 공보실의 속보입니다. 아폴로 11호는 여전히 전 세계 뉴스의 
Okay, Joe. Sappi che l'assetto del JETT sarà simile allo sgancio normale del modulo di servizio, che consisterà nell'innalzarsi e uscire dall'aereo, e non appena avrò finito di manovrare verso l'assetto JETT sinistro, mi arrampicherò e chiuderò il portello, assicurandomi che la valvola di sfiato sia aperta, e poi lo sfiateremo, o lo sgancieremo con il tunnel pressurizzat
Роджер. PAD: 23514 179 071 001 547 104356 35575 357 107 041 301 287 319. 10-минутный бросок с прерыванием, 223.
D'accord, Joe. Puisque nous sommes en avance sur le planning, puis-je commencer et partir plus tôt, ou préférez-vous que je parte exactement à
Nous ne voulons pas perdre le contact av
Okay, 00
罗杰。我们一直假设，污水排放造成的干扰大约需要一个小时才能消散，届时您可以合理地进行星体观测，
아폴로 11호
... 1-أ يساوي 6. 1-ب يساوي 1
了解。それはいい計画だね、ジム。それを実行
第 275 组，全部开放；
알겠습니다. 잘 들
No, non lo fa. Si spegne p
好了，地球应该已经出现在视野里
舱顶温度约为 57 度。舱内温度为 90 度。宇航服进气口温度为 62 度。主氧气罐剩余压力为 50 psi（百分百），副氧气罐剩余压力为 75 psi（百分百）。所有电气设备运行正常。剩余燃料
わかりました。重量 33627、重量 36651、ピッチ トリム 00470、ロール トリム 00589
ठीक है। और जब भी आप इसे इ
了解しました。ダンプは完了し、テープレコーダーはあなたの
*** compact en dessous *** absolument pas *** vous 
حسنًا. دعني أقرأها هنا... الترتيب... الطاقة، إيقاف. إضاءة الأرقام، والإضاءة الكاشفة، والإضاءة المتكاملة، جميعها، إيقاف. اللوحة 101، سخانات تصريف البول، تصريف البول إلى إيقاف، مياه الصرف إلى إيقاف. اللوحة 122، مصابيح الحالة، إيقاف. اللوحة 201، سخان الطعام،
그는 너보다 훨씬 크
Okay, Jack, I have the procedure now to read up to you. Before I do, I want to mention something that will be of interest to Fred. We are looking at the SHe tank pressure rise and we expect it to blow. We don't know exactly what time it will go, somewhere around 105 hours or perhaps later than that. We've got plenty of blowdow
Хорошо. Почему бы вам не
روجر. هذه فريندشيب سفن. سأستخدم نظام التحكم الإلكتروني (Fly-by-wire)
Li abbiamo sentiti dare una lettura che indicava una quantità di carburante del 16 per
こんにちは、アポロ11号。ヒューストン。マイク、プログラムアラームは、姿勢
凍った小さな水滴が動き回る様子を見るのは、本当に素晴らしい。まるで四方八方と動いているように見えるけれど、ある一定の距離を過
Это примерно верно, Джим. Джек выровняется в этом положении. Именно для этого мы и просим тебя выполнить маневр — для достижения этого положения. Мы рассчитаем приблизительные углы карданного подвеса и передадим их ему, и первое, что он сделает, когда прибудет туда, согласно своему контрольному списку, — это приблизительно выровняет свою платформу. Затем он перейдет в положение, и, если он не увидит звезд, мы быстро передадим тебе — твои углы, чтобы установить его в положение, соответствующее виду Луны, и он выполнит свой ман
L'attitude de désamarrage et l'attitude SEP devraient être identiques. Je vais donc utiliser l'attitude de séparation-manœuvre mise à jour qu'ils m'ont fournie. L'écart est d'environ 7 degrés, mais elle figure dans votre plan de vol pour l'attitude de désamarr
이거요? 이건 괜찮
Уровень сигн
Houston. I have the seismic experiment flipped over now, and I'm aligning it, but I'm having a little bit of difficulty get
Роджер, Нил и Базз. Давайте продолжим доставать магазин для фото
Когда дело доходит до такой степени
Si nous parvenons à remettre cet appareil en marche, voulez-vous que nous le laissions fonctionn
Well, I understood that talked that over with Bill, and we do it 1 hour prior to entry. We'll do it wherever you say is the bes
Роджер. Ты скопировал это СУЩЕСТВИТЕЛЬНОЕ 49 на свой канал связи? Если у тебя 
Yeah. That's what they said it'd do
Okay. Just some info. We're working up a procedure for you to use to - to use command module LiOH canisters to connect to your hoses - the outlet hoses in the so that, as time passes in the mission, you can continue scrubbing the atmosphere. And this whole thing requires modifying a kit so that you can attach the hose modifying a LiOH cani
阿波罗13号，休斯顿。请求并接受状态向量。
Okay. I
... cups of water in addition to this, since the last time I saw you. I had about a 4-hour nap, and that's the best sleep I've
사실, 지금 당장 그렇게 해
6, /: 45701,
D
Okay. In der Notiz steht, dass Sie uns hören können sollten. Falls wir Sie in ein paar Minuten nicht hören können, schalten Sie bitte den Leistungsverstärker-Leistungsschalter an Schalttafel 16 aus. Dadurch sparen wir voraussichtlich mindestens eine Ampere. In der aktuellen Lage sollte es fun
Роджер, Хьюстон. Компания Eagle проверила обе 70-миллиметровые и обе 16-миллиметровые камеры, и
휴스턴, 아폴로 8
Eagle, Houston. Sie haben Recht. Die Lich
Gémeaux
Mike, nous sommes à moins de 3 pied
Scott, la
좋습니다. 시간은 다음과 같습니다. 이벤트는 이 시간에 진행될 예정이며, 우리는 다음 자세로 기동해야 합니다. 롤 101.0, 피치 90.0, 요는 최대 회전입니다. 고이득 각도는 피치 -23, 요 93입니다. 감속은 일반적인 절차를 따르십시오. 감속 후, 스핀업 전에 육분의에 G형 매거진과 초고
そして、トークバックは…ヘリウム1はすべて灰色です。ヘリウム2もすべて灰色です。主推進剤はすべて灰色です。副推進剤、バーバーポールが2つあります。Aはバーバーポール、Bは灰色、Cはバーバーポール、D
Questi massi sembrano basalto e contengono probabilmente il 2% di minerali bianchi, cristalli bianchi. E la cosa che ho descritto prima come vescicolare, non ci credo più. Credo che c
是的，
It hasn't changed from the summary maneuver that Carnarvon gave you, Tom. Do you have th
Sì, sono davvero contento di tutto. Ho fermato tutto per riprendere il controllo del circuito della tuta e sembr
Bene. Sotto la manovra definita dall'equipaggio, il lampeggiante 0622 indica gli ang
Хорошо, Джо, прошло около 76 часов, и, кажется, ты меня неправи
حسناً. ت
Ich gehe zur VOX-Aufnahme. Ich schaue durch das Fenster, da
حسنًا. هل سيحدث أي فرق إذا قمنا بفصل - لقد قمنا بفصل 
It'
Innanzitutto, sono in rientro automatico; sono in modalità automatica; i giroscopi sono normali; la manovra è disattivata; tutte le 
روجر. لا يوجد الكثير من الأحداث في الوقت الحالي يا كولومبيا. سأرى ما يمكنني 
Да. Кажется, кто-то говорил, что, находясь за 
Bene. Per chi non lo sapesse, qui è dove registriamo la maggior parte dei dati per ciascuna manovra, e abbiamo un'altra scheda come questa, il libro della cronologia, che è appoggiata sul tavolo davanti alla tastiera del display dati; ed è su questa cronologia che registriamo tutte le nostre procedure. Ma ovvia
Apollo 8, Houston. Stand by for handover from Car
अपो
了解。ピッチ
11, Houston. Vorremmo provare il funzionamento con l'array ad alto guadagno. Se selezioni la riacquisizione e l'antenna in banda S su ALTO GUADAGNO, le tue posizioni sono pitch più 40° e yaw 
حسناً. سأتناول الطعام
Okay. Joe. As I read that, at 74 hours we're going to do an Sun check at detent 2, which is going to require the rendezvous radar out of the way. And we use AUTO maneuver to get there, or at least the angles out of that, and if this passes within 1 degree, you're saying the platform is okay for the maneuver, and we won't 
In qualche modo, questo non ha funzionat
Merci. Soixan
로저. 해당 페이지로 이동하여 '승인'을 클릭해 주시면, 값을 업데이트하는 파일을 보내드리겠습니다. 이후 절차 변경 사항이 뒤따를 예정이며, 자세한
جاك، هيوستن. أنت لا تستجيب. أرجو منك التحدث بوضوح أكبر في المي
Это подтверждается. Положение: крен 0 [градусов], рыскание 2 [градуса] вправо, тангаж -33 [градуса]. Все показатели равны нулю. В настоящее время я нахожусь в режиме ожидания. Часы по-прежнему настроены на время до ретроградного движения, на время 04 + 32 + 28. Время ретроградного движения с Бермудских островов у меня в порядке. Д
Sag es
ठीक है। शुरुआती टीवी प्रसारण के संदर्भ में, अब हमारा हाई-गेन एंटीना काम नहीं कर रहा है, और ऐसा लगता है कि शुरुआती टीवी प्रसारण प्राप्त करने का एकमात्र तरीका इसे दूरस्थ स्थान पर भेजना और वहां इसकी जांच करना था। इसलिए हम इस विचार को छोड़ रहे हैं और निर्धारित टीवी प्रसारण से ही आगे बढ़ेंगे। बचे हुए संचार संबंधी जांच हाई-गेन पर निर्भर हैं, और हम उन्हें टीवी प्रसारण सत्र पूरा होने तक स्थगित कर रहे हैं, और हम अभी आपके लिए ईंधन प्
Roger. Ci stiamo prendendo il tempo necessario per adattarci a questo nuovo assetto; andare su Navi è piuttosto lontano dall'assetto di cui abbiamo bisogno. Ho una correzione da fare sul 20: su Navi, dopo esserci adat
Et toi, Houston, comment interprètes-t
फ्रेड, मेरा सुझाव है कि जब आपकी खिड़की फिर से पृथ्वी की ओर घूमे, तो आप ऐसी ही एक और तस्वीर खींच लें, और साथ ही, आपको शायद फिर से शुरू करना चाहिए। हमने शायद आपको कुछ गलत जानकारी भेज दी है। "दो क्वाड को निष्क्रिय करें" केवल प्रक्रिया के शुरुआती चरण में लागू होता है। हमारा मतलब प्रक्रिया के बाद वाले हिस्से से नहीं था, जहाँ हमने "सभी जेट को सक्रिय करें" लिखा है
Roger. We got the Interstellar Times here, the December 24 edition. Your TV program was a big success. It was viewed this morning by most of the nations of your neighboring planet; the earth. It was carried live all over Europe, including even Moscow and East Berlin, also in Japan and all of North and Central America an
C'est ouvert t
Et, Apollo 13, Houston. Nous aimer
В преддверии важного матча Astro Blue Bonnet, грандиозной баскетбольной классики, а также матчей SMU и Оклахомы, идет активная подготовка. Здесь не указано, кто является фаворитом. Я поищу эту информацию и сообщу вам позже, если кто-то из них окажется фаворитом. Сейчас в 
Okay. Als Nächstes setzen wir M
Dann stellst du die Retro-Power auf ARM, aber wir werden das an den Anfang verschieb
네, 잘 오실 겁니다. 혹시 교통 체증이 있더라도 기꺼이 감수해 
복사, 1
我现在正在用
ジム、5スクエアを読み上げます。どうぞ
Okay, Houston. 11's ready t
D'accord, 13. Pour commence
好的。从倒计时6个半小时开始。你要重新准备很多便签纸，我不知道你想不想抄写。我可以把这些念给你听。完毕。除非你特别想
...Управление
Okay. Dann lassen wir 
Es ist nicht so laut wie mit beiden Ventilatoren im Betrieb; wir ha
2°, 25 Minute
Quando diventa davvero dif
जी हाँ, जैक। ठीक है, पृष्ठ 2-5 पर। सबसे ऊपर वाली पंक्ति जहाँ "क्षितिज जाँच" लिखा था, अब वह "चंद्र अस्त जाँच" है और समय लगभग 57:37 है। और यह -02:23 है। और पुस्तक में जो कोण 1
Roger, Houston. Stiamo ancora mostrando circa i
Go 
روجر. ناقل البيانات الرئيسي هو ٢٤، وواحد هو ٢٥، ٢٥، ٢٥. ناقل البيانات الاحتياطي واحد هو ٢٥، ٢٥. معزول ٢٩، والرئيسي ٢٤ مرة أخرى. المراوح ١١٣، ١١٣. جميع صمامات المفاتيح على اليمين مضاءة باستثناء مفتاحي Retrojettison وRetroma
いやあ、ここなら走りな
Ok. Procederò con il controllo delle perdite nel 
好的，杰克，我们得先退一步。如果我们要按照这里的程序操作，也就是进入模式控制；自动模式，我们就必须
D'accord. Voici la procédure de charge de la batterie Baker. Panneau 3: BAT CHARGE, OFF; panneau 5: MAIN BUS TIE, BAT A/C vers A/C; CB BAT CHARGEGER, BAT A CHARGE, ouvrir; CB BAT CHARGE, BAT B CHARGE, fermer. Panneau 250: CB BAT B POWER ENTRY et POSTLANDING, fermer. Panneau 5: MAIN BUS TIE, BAT B/C, sur OFF; panneau 3: BAT CHARGE vers B. Ceci est une procédure DELTA pour la première charge de batterie; vous me donnerez la procédur
They do not seem to be coming from the capsule at all. Th
Okay, Vance. The following steps are sequence CB BAT B POWER ENTRY/P
Okay. Und noch eine Änderung: Kurz darauf, wenn wir die Abwurfvorbereitungen treffen, schließen wir sowohl das vordere als auch das obere Ablassventil. Um eine Blockade zu vermeiden, gehen wir folgendermaßen vor: Nachdem wir das vordere Ablassventil geschlossen haben, 
ठीक है, जिम। मुझे लगता है कि सबसे अच्छा तरीका यह होगा कि आप सारा सामान इकट्ठा कर लें और हम आपको प्रक्रिया समझाते हुए आगे बढ़ें। अब, आप जैक को हेडसेट दे दें और सारा सामान इकट्ठा कर लें, फिर हम आपको प्रक्रिया समझाते हु
おい、はっきり言ってくれ、
Okay. Zeile 7. Dort steht: „Manöver zur Horizontkontrolle“
Abb
Très bien, c'est parfait. Toute la procédure que je vais vous expliquer concerne les réglages de l'objectif et l'observation de la Terre depuis la fenêtre de rendez-vous. Tous les angles de cardan et autres paramètres sont conçus pour po
जी हां, मुझे माफ करना, इन्हें बंद कर दीजिए। OAMS पावर एटीट्यूड थ्रस्टर्स दोनो
좋아요. 그대로 두죠 (두 번 펌핑). 혹시 시간 되시면 여기에 벨크로 좀 붙여주
Gemini VIII. 
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。次の回転で2点目指してGO。オ
يبدو جي
Ci mancano ancora un paio di stelle, poi ci pr
قم بتوصيل خرطوم الأكسجين بالموصل الأزرق الموجود على اليمين وق
は
ソース圧力は1500、ソース温度は60～50です。RCSは両方とも作動しています
Je me demande si l'un de nos jets d'eau... fonctionne. Bon, vérifions... Que peut-on rempli
لا ت
Continuing what I was debriefing about the booster, early in the flight. After we entered the darkness, at what I consider to be a distance of 1200 feet, I tried station-keeping with it, but the only thing I had to judge my distance from the booster at that time was the distance between the flashing lights. Occasionally they would - not occasionally, but con
حسنًا. ق
वो चीज़ जिस तरह से चल रही थी, वो वाकई अजीब थी। पिच फायर करते ही मुझे 
Ok. Stiamo parlando di farlo circa un'ora prima; ma nel pre-controllo, una delle cose che abbiamo spento è stato il circuito se
Allez-y, Houston.
D'accord. Je quitte l'ant
Je comprends; passons à la suite. Mike, si possible, nous aimerions synchroniser la télévision avec le passage du terminateur. Nous aimerions suivre le terminateur à la télévision; c'est, à notre avis, la chose la p
Okay, Jim. Abbiamo quattro passaggi da darti per richiedere di tornare al BACKUP VOCALE DOWN, se sei pro
Ricevuto, Frank. Aspettatevi un VIA/NO-VIA per la prossima r
Pitch. Roge
- - but my only question is, I got the CROSS TIE BUS circuit breaker in? Could be 
よ
Noch 10 Sekunde
Apollo 11, Houston. Vuoi 
Zwillinge 4, Zwillinge 4, RKV CAP CO
はい。100秒、プラスマイナス4
我们要拿起电缆，让埃德把它夹在两腿之
ह्यूस्टन, हम 
Okay. We want to check the computer in all modes. There will be three steps to this check. First put 10 ft/sec in all IVI windows. Then push the Malfunction Reset. Then press the Start Comp and watch for a Computer Running Light
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We'll be charging batt
分かりました。読み上げます。セカンダリーアキュムレーターの流量を監視します。セカンダリーグリコールラジエーターバルブを30秒間ノーマルにし、その
Ricevuto. SOTTOTENSI
好的。关于氦气罐的温度：低比特率下记录的数据并不准确，而且查看我们的磁带备份，背面大部分数据都是低比特率的。所以我们无法提供确切的数值，但根据我
حسنًا، لنعد إلى الصفحة ١٨. سنتابع كما هو عند ٣٠ ثانية، ١٠ ثوانٍ، ٧ ثوانٍ، ناقص ٥ ثوانٍ. عند "تشغيل"، لا يوجد تشغيل، وسنضيف هنا: "لا يوجد تشغيل، زر التشغيل - اضغط؛ لا يزال
OK, super. On a pu prendre une belle photo de Jim pendant un instant. J'ai le tapis de décollage Lift-Of
地平线景色优美，引人入胜。太阳在左侧，大概——嗯，我猜是40度左右。可以看到地球表面有一条深色的线，云层呈橙色，还有浅黄色、浅白色和蓝色的条带。非常浅的蓝色，此时
6.3
Dass es uns nicht gelungen ist, uns von dieser Art von Problem zu trennen, hat uns ein we
रॉजर, हम ऑनबोर्
حسنًا، ضغط المقصورة لا يزال ثابتًا عند 5.5. وهو كذلك منذ مغادرتنا. درجة حرارة المقصورة 90%، والرطوبة النسبية عادت للارتفاع إلى حوالي 36%، وكمية سائل التبريد انخفضت قليلًا أيضًا، ربما حدث تسرب صغير للماء في مكان ما نظرًا لهذا الارتفاع الكبير في الرطوبة، لأنها كانت منخفضة حوالي 20%. مع ذلك، انخفضت كمية سائل التبريد لدينا إلى حوالي 62% الآن. درجة حرارة البدلة 70 درجة عند المدخل؛ وضغط بدلة المقصورة 5.8. درجة حرارة البخار 4 نقاط، أي 48 درجة. نسبة الأكسجين تتراوح بين 60 و90%. ا
Concernant Apollo 13, un autre point: nous avons observé, et vous l'avez peut-être constaté également, une légère fluctuation du TCE (température de contact thermique) de la pile à combustible n° 3. Cette fluctuation oscille entre 152 et 160 degrés environ sur une période de 37 secondes. Elle a déjà été observée lors de vols précédents. Cela ne suscite pas d'inquiétude particulière, ma
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Mike, wir erhalten immer noch keine Messwerte vom Impedanz-Pneumographen. Bevor Sie heute Abend schlafen gehen, könnten Sie versuchen, frische Paste in die Sensoren aufzutragen. Sollte das nicht helfen, haben die Sanitäter beschlossen, die Sache 
距离TIG还有1分钟。尼尔
Хьюстон, Игл. Вам потребуется высокий коэффициент усиления,
The line is still not taut. I have some pictures of the line just waving out in back. I would say we have about a one-cycle-per-minute oscillation. It's both in pitch 
これはフレンドシップセブン、再突入姿勢をとるということですね
D'accord. On essaie de faire tourner les choses avec l'attitude que vous nous avez donnée. Est-ce la mauvaise approche? Voulez-vous que je me contente d'aligner la Terre comme je l'ai fait lors de l
Roger. Alles klar und deutlich, 
Und 13, Houston. Wenn Sie möchten, können wir Sie etwa alle zwei Minuten informieren, bevor die Erde in Ihr Fenster kommt. Wir denken, wir haben das jetzt ganz gut im Griff, und Sie müssen nicht mehr so ​​lange danach such
حسنًا. لقد شطبنا عبارة "جميع المحركات النفاثة" من قائمة التحقق، وننص على "تفعيل الأزواج على جميع المحاور". لذا، سنعيد ضبط هذا الإعداد ونعود إلى الخطوة 7، وسنفعّل جميع المحركات النفاثة. هذا يعني تفعيل الرباعيين A وB. 
Yes, It would be nicer if it had another order of magnitude of power on it.
Wir sind jetzt über dem Mit
Plus 59578, minus 00086, minus 05287, 012 080 01
Houston. Were you able to get high bit rate from the OMNI's now, by the wa
फ्रेड, इस जुगाड़ से बने कमांड मॉड्यूल लिथियम हाइड्रोक्साइड कैनिस्टर के बारे में, हमें कम से कम दो बनाने होंगे और एक साथ दो का इस्तेमाल करना होगा - हर नली के सेट पर एक। हम इन जुगाड़ से बने बॉक्स में से एक को ला
Und einer der Vorteile, Jack, besonders für einen Neuling wie mich, ist die Bewegungsfreiheit hier. Wie du ja vom Kommandomodul-Simulator weißt, ist die Schwerelosigkeit ein echter Segen. Denn bei 1 g ist die Bewegungsfreiheit ziemlich eingeschränkt, und hier ist es viel einfacher. Wie du siehst, war alles recht sauber. Ich habe ein paar lose Unterlegscheiben gefunden, und eine kleine Plastikkappe der Sequenzkamera hatte sich gelöst und lag neben dem ED-Panel. Okay. Direkt unter Jim steht er auf etwas, das wie eine Dose aussieht. Und für alle da hinten: In dieser Dose befindet sich das Aufstiegstriebwerk, auf dem hoffentlich meine Hand ruht – das Triebwerk, mit dem wir vom Mond absteigen. Direkt neben der Triebwerksabdeckung liegt meine Hand auf einem weißen Kasten, den wir schon einmal gezeigt haben. Das hier ist Jims Rucksack, der uns auf der Mondoberfläche mit Sauerstoff und Wasser zur Kühlung versorgt. Wir hoffen, ihn für geplante vier Stunden, möglicherweise sogar bis zu fünf Stunden, nutzen zu können. Direkt dahinter, zwei kleine quadratische Päckchen, die ich gerade in der Hand halte – eines hier und eines direkt darunter –, befinden sich unsere Sauerstoffkanister, die für etwa 40 bis 45 Minuten reichen. Diese werd
Одиссей, Хьюстон. Вы можете обратиться в UP TEL BLOCK. (Далее
Ricevuto. Modalità di controllo manuale; giroscopi normali; interruttore di manovra spento. Carburante 45-45 [percento]; ossigeno 70 [percento], o, per una correzione, ossigeno 80 e 100 [percento]. La temperatura della tuta è di 68 [gradi], ora e sta scendendo abbastanza bene. La temperatura dello sfiato del vapore della tuta è di 69 [gradi], e inizia a essere un po' più confor
हमें दिखाओ कि क्या होने वाला 
Hö
Oui. Nous… Vous voulez dire 
はい。バッテリー5をOFF/リセットするとい
收到。看
C'est exact, Jim. Vous pouvez adopter une attitude qui brûle la chaleur, ou vous pouvez adopter une attitude qui permette au soleil d'entr
Die von uns angewandte Vorgehensweise ist an mehreren Stellen beschrieben. Sie findet sich in der Notfallcheckliste unter
Roger. Understand. Area 7-3 GET RC, 10 04 47; RET 
والآن، كيف تسير الأمور فيما يتعلق بقائمة المهام؟ دعونا نتأكد من أننا لا نرتكب أي خطأ أو ن
Эксперимент с антенной для входа в 
了解、ウーメラ。こちらもはっきりと聞こえました。インバーターの温度を知りたいです。そ
मैंने आपको अ
Qui è
यह बात सही नहीं ल
Ok, Fred. Solo due modifiche, commenti a ciò che ti abbiamo appena dato. La prima è vicino alla parte anteriore, nella sezione "meno 2 ore
Questo è Sigma Seven, che riproduce l'effetto di un volo capovolto all'alba, con un'imbardata di 90 gradi. È la cosa più ovvia per te, qual è la direzione del tuo percorso. Come guardare fuori dal finestrino di un treno. Vedi il terreno che ti scorre accanto. Ci sono nuvole di ogni tipo. Le vedo passare accanto a me propri
Дава
이해했습니다. 약간의 POGO 
Verstanden. Das ist zufriedenstellend und es wird empfohlen, es i
吉姆，提醒你一下；H
11번, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 마지막 연소 분석 결과를 바탕으로 추가 정보를 드리겠습니다. 연소가 아주
ठीक है। डिस्प्ले को बंद क
好的。我这里有一些关于飞行计划的细节，如下所示。当然，由于没有-3，你需要删除所有中途3阶段的内容，包括大约在54.5分钟处提到的-the，我们会把它推迟到稍后进行，我稍后会告诉你。好的。然后，我们需要将电池充电提前3小时。我们还需要将隧道通风阀/DELTA-P提前3小时，届时你可以直接跳转到飞行计划
Ha! Ha! J'ai encore des traces de freinage sur mes palmes à cause de ton escapade dans la brousse. Bon, tu vois, j'ai encore viré à droite. Je dois… correction, j'ai viré à gauche. Je dois aller à droite, la lune est juste à l'horizon. Je vais la remettre sur la bonne voie, juste pour te montrer comme c'est facile. Il semblerait que mon niveau de carburant soit correct, alors je vais faire quelques essais. Bon, on est presque sur la bonne voie, et encore un peu à côté en roulis. Je vais la remettre en place et ce sera bon. Voilà le roulis qui va la redresser. On remonte en roulis… bon, j'arrête là. C'est le mieux que je p
Ok. Quindi siamo PRO sul, e ci ritroviamo con un 5018 lampeggiante; e qui vuoi una manovra AUTO invece di usare il, quindi siamo PRO con GUIDA, PNGS; CONTROLLO MODALITÀ, AUTO. Abbiamo una banda morta di 1,4 gr
ठीक है, 13. आप पा
ठीक है। बढ़िया, जैक। अगला कदम है दोनों नीले होज़ को कैनिस्टर से अच्छी खासी दूरी पर अलग करना ताकि प्रवाह में कोई रुकावट न आए, और उन्हें टेप से चिपका देना; और उनके लिए आदर्श स
Okay, Charlie. Ich habe die Notfallcheckliste und bin bere
Poiché siamo in inverno, dato che nell'emisfero settentrionale è inverno, possiamo vedere tutto il Polo Sud e la calotta glaciale meridionale, ma non molto del Polo Nor
아마 그들은 아래에서 우리
हम आपके समुद्री अर्चिन अंडे के प्र
阿波罗8号，休斯顿，进
Хорошо. Мы ценим вашу признательность. Мы здесь, внизу, отлично проводим время, работая над всевозможными новыми процедурами, Фред. Заседание 
حسنًا يا هيوستن، هل تريد متابعة الصفحة 15 بخصوص عملية 
카나리 캡 콤, 시그마 세븐.
Kilo 0,9 e 6,3. Grazie. Uno di que
여기는 휴스턴입니다. 알겠습니다. 잘 들었습니
重返大气层过程相当顺利。辅助
Hey; okay, Fred. We suspected that you'd gotten at least one on. We've noticed a partial pressure drop from the 1.8 to
Roger, Houston. Hier spricht Apollo
You've got enough heat to maintain pressure. And I've got this H
Верно
杰克，或许——或许应该先把清单
Колумбия, Колумбия, это Хьюстон. Осталось одна минут
Merci. Ne me dites pas qu'ils ont interrompu un match de football; 
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。你读得怎
Bon, j'ai regardé autour de moi et j'ai essentiellement effectué les étapes 1 à 5, à l'exception des projecteurs et des écla
Und, Tranquil
تجاوز نظام التنفس الآن. معدل تدفق الطوار
لقد خرج يا غاس، وهذا رائع حقًا. ا
That's very handy, because the band width--there
روجر. سنقوم بتصوير تسلسل تحديد المدى؛ إذا أمكننا حذف الصوت لبضع دقائ
Okay, Jack. Nach 49 Stunden sol
Roger. Ho misurato la temperatura della parete un po' di tempo fa nel contenitore per alimenti di sinistra ed era 75. La carta assorbente non è bagnata al tatto e non
टीएलआ
好的。我们有一个倾斜度为 2 度、四分之三被照亮的地球，我们要想象一条连接地球两端的线，并在该线的中心
- - et terminez les étapes 2, 3 et 4 de l'activation 28. Vous devrez effectuer une opération pour obtenir les angles de tangage et de lacet, et la dernière étape se trouve 
Nous avons battu le record spatial des États-Unis. Et nous étions en 2003. Je crois qu
阿波罗11号，途
안
أظن أن هذا الحقل الصخري قد يكون له أصل جزئي من تلك الفوهة الصخرية الكبيرة ذات الحواف الحادة التي مررنا بها أثناء الهبوط الأخير. بالأمس قلتُ إن حجمها يُقارب حجم ملعب كرة قدم، ويجب أن أعترف أنه كان من الصعب قياسها بدقة أثناء الصعود. لكنني ظننتُ أنها قد تتسع داخل قبة أسترودوم أثناء مرورنا بها. والصخور في محيط هذه الفوهة الصخرية أكبر بكثير من تلك الموجودة في هذه المنطقة. بعضها يصل طوله إلى 3 أمتار أو أكثر، وهي كثيفة جدًا حتى مسافة قطر فوهة واحدة تقريبًا بعد حافتها. بعد ذلك، يقل حجمها، وحتى في هذه المنطقة، تبدو الكتل وكأنها تمتد في صفوف ذات أنماط غير منتظمة، ثم توجد مسارات بينها حيث تقل الأدلة السطحية على 
Роджер, 11. Принято, мы проверили это здесь, на месте. Одно исправление к моему предыдущему сообщению. Мы хотели бы получить это до сброса сточных вод, который состоится примерно через 3
13، هيوستن. نحن نعمل على الطبق الكبير الآن، لذا يرجى إيقاف تشغيل مفتاح الطاقة عالي 
了解、ヒューストン。アポロ11号、VHFシンプレック
Okay. Wir wollten es eigentlich vor der MAX-Reihe veröffentlichen,
Bene, su 
Интересно отметить, что мое положение — и положение самолета — примерно такое: тангаж вверх плюс 30 градусов, крен вправо на 130 градусов и рыскание вл
Ce n'est que la moitié. Le reste est caché. C'était plutôt intéressant de faire tout le travail de caméra ici, ça m'a permis de m'entraîner un peu plus à la gestion de la tél
Хорошо. Теперь, в этой конфигурации, необходимы следующие показания бортового оборудования: напряжение батареи C, напряжение батареи A (пирометр), напряжение батареи B (пиро
It's very interesting to remark that my attitude--and the--is roughly pitchup plus 30 [degrees], roll right 130 [degrees], and yaw left 20 [degrees]. The balloon at this time is moving right along with me. It's keeping a constant bearing at al
Okay. Können wir diese Einstellung dann über Bord werfen? Das ist in Ordnung. Ich werde das mit dem in Einklang bringen. Sage
그리고 (회복 영역) 역행 
休斯顿，请稍安心。如果您
In questo momento ho perso di
알았어, 프레드.
お
好的，杰克
ऑरोरल सेवन, ऑरोरल सेवन, ये ज़ांज़ीबार कैप कॉम है। पढ़ने में थोड़ी दिक्कत है, लेकिन समझ में आ रहा है। क्या आपके पा
मैं हैच कवर पर लिखे अक्षर पढ़ सकत
मैं प्रयासरत 
Ok, Jim. È ora, quando vuo
ठीक है। दाईं ओर सब कुछ ठीक 
메인 버스 타이, 2개,
ロジャー、こちらフレン
Роджер
Non c'è nemmeno qui, ho guardat
And, Houston, we've rewound the tape
Cela vous semble-t-il être
好的。关于氦气罐的温度：低比特率下记录的数据并不准确，而且查看我们的磁带备份，背面大部分数据都是低比特率的。所以我们无法提供确切的数值，但根据我们每次离开监控范围后翻过山丘回来时的数据来看，温
Roger, und gib uns eine Markierung für den Beginn des Brennvorg
로저, 짐. 증발기 문제에 대해 말씀드리자면, 다음에 뒷면이 햇볕에 노출되었을 때 비슷한 문제가 발생하면 증발기 출구 온도를 확인해 보시고, 
Charlie, Apollo 11. Ich habe ein paar Fragen zum Anhalten. Mir scheint, der einfachste Weg wäre folgender: Wir befinden uns ja im Prinzip bei 0 Grad Gierwinkel und nähern uns 90 Grad Nickwinkel. Es geht also nur darum, bei ungefähr 260 Grad 
Да, подтверждаю. У м
ठीक है, जैक। अब हमने
And we will put in - TM in ACCEPT now - at
Tranquility, Houston. We're looking at it. Sta
Хорошо, Хьюстон. Вы немного опоздали.
I'll go ahead 
D'accord. Ceci suppose que toutes les batteries de descente sont en ligne et que la batterie ASCENT 6 est alimentée normalement, comme indiq
Род
PADに行きま
И,
わかりました。1、2、3、4、5、5、4、
ठीक है
Хорошо. PC плюс 2; плюс 0819.2, минус 0020.0, минус 0218.9; NA; плюс 0020.9, 0848.2; 420, 274, 082; плюс 0820.3, минус 0020.0, минус 0215.0; остальное N/A. В примечаниях: заполнение, два жиклера 10 секунд; вес 62480; вес 33576. П
D'accord. J'ai maintenant la page de mi
Okay, Apollo 8. Do you want to try that AUTO REACQ? looks like a good time and the angles are the same. And the late ball scores i
Sie müssen Ihnen die Wechselstromversorgung wieder geben, und Sie drücken Ihren Sicherungsautomaten ein – mal sehen – ich habe die HP-Leitung für die FDAIs noch eingeschaltet, also funktioniert es jetzt. Sie benötigen lediglich den Lampensicherungsautomaten, den Lampensicherun
Fortsetzung des Berichts. Keine Kontrollleuchten im Sequenzpanel 
罗杰。
Один из водородных фильтров — тот, что у нас установлен на водонагревателе — продолжает пропускать воду, даже когда вы вынимаете из него один из пакетов с продуктами. Скорость потока у него довольно низкая, почти на исходн
Okay. Können wir diese Einstellung dann über Bord werfen? Das
わ
Мы немного увеличиваем высоту над уровнем
E potresti t
9, /: 45597, माइनस 040, प्लस 157, प्लस 34188, माइनस 01353, प्लस 00780 180 008 001, NA, प्लस 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, नीचे 131, बाएँ 28, प्लस 0758, माइनस 16500 12987, प्लस - या 36277; और वह सीरियस और रिगेल 129 155 010, चार जेट, 15 सेकंड, टी माइनस 3 पर खिड़की पर 1.2 डिग्री, उच्च गति माइनस एमए,
D'accord. J'ai effectué la charge de la batterie, la purge de la soupape de ventilation et la purge du réservoir de carburant. Arrêtez-vous à 55 heures. Votre assiette de roulis sera alors de 285 degrés, conformément au plan de vol. Les angles de l'antenne à gain élevé sont légèrement différents: tangage à 23 degrés et lacet à 267 degrés. Le passage TV se fait selon la procédure standard, à l'exception de quelques étapes spécifiques que nous vous indiquerons pour vérifier la pression du réservoir de carburant, information que je ne possède pas encore. Redémarrez vers la fin des opérations, ou dès que vous aurez terminé. Ensuite, à votre convenance, nous vous invitons à effectuer l'option 3 que nous avons annulée 
Нет, у этой штуки, ах, практически нет показаний регулировки углов, Дик, но сейчас я, я бы сказал, перевернулся на 30 градусов влево. — Довольно близко 
D'accord. Lors de la DESCENTE 
По-моему,
Do you want me 
……嗯，我其实不太清楚——部分原因是——你看，吉姆，我和你遇到同样的问题。我的右手控制杆（RHC）音调控制不太好——我必须用左手控制杆（THC），这就是控制问题所在。不，我不认为存在任何控制问题
Jack, we're going to need readings on the BAT volt and charger amps about every 10 or 15 minutes for a while, so is there somebod
Très bien, je comprends que vous soyez un peu fatigué et som
好吧，行
姿态正常。正在俯仰回到再入姿态，修正反向姿态。没有理由保持再入姿态。既然反向姿态视野如此开阔，就没必要保持再入姿态。这才是我们真正需要的飞行姿态
Houston, 
了解。4-4 
Tranquility Base, this is Houston. Our telemetry shows the engine arm circuit breaker in the OPEN position at the present time. We want you to leave it open until it is 
是
Родже
حسنًا، قائد المركبة الفضائية، ه
Okay.
Apollo 13,
了解しました。高利得アンテナのスキャン限界付近で、OMNI Deltaに
Questo è certo. Innanzitutto, ripercorrerò brevemente gli orari degli eventi principali, poi torneremo indietro e aggiungeremo alcuni dettagli. Bene. L'interfaccia di ingresso è alle 142 ore e 40 minuti; 6 ore e mezza circa prima di allora, o verso, inizieremo il tutto applicando l'ALIMENTAZIONE DI RISCALDAMENTO, controllando le temperature del CM/ e preriscaldando il CM/ se necessario, e sospettiamo che probabilmente vorremo farlo. Avremo procedure dettagliate in seguito. Circa 6 ore prima, o verso, inizieremo ad accendere il, ad accendere il, usando la checklist modificata di 30 minuti, che avete usato per la precedente sessione intermedia. Poi, poco prima delle 5 ore circa, o verso, vi vorremo in assetto per un allineamento dell'asse corporeo, usando il terminatore terrestre come abbiamo fatto prima; E non appena lo avremo, eseguiremo -7, che ora equivale a circa 60 cm al secondo, ovvero circa 15 secondi. E mi è stato detto che ora è sceso a 35 cm, quindi è comodamente entro i limiti. Bene. Quando lo faremo, inizieremo immediatamente la man
افهم الأمر الأول يا فانس، ولا أحد يفهمه في أي
ठीक है, फ्रेड। अगले कुछ घंटों में हम कुछ काम करने वाले हैं, जिनके बारे में मुझे आपसे कुछ बातें करनी हैं। इसके लिए और रेंजिंग के कुछ मिनट देने के लिए, मैं चाहता हूं कि आप पैनल 16 में पावर एम्पलीफायर सर्किट ब्रेकर को चालू करें, वॉइस फंक्शन स्विच को वॉइस पर और रेंजिंग फंक्शन स्विच को रेंजिंग पर 
È molto 
ह्यूस्टन, आपकी जानकारी के लिए बता दें कि जिस समय आपने भविष्यवाणी की थ
やった
吉姆，我觉得这
रॉजर, 11. शुरू में समस्या यह थी कि हम वांछित प्रारंभिक अभिस्थिति को लोड करने में विफल रहे; इसलिए हमने इसे उस पुरानी अभिस्थिति में वापस लाने का प्रयास किया जिसमें हमने कुछ घंटों के लिए शुरुआत की थी। इसीलिए हमने अन्य अक्षों में दरें प्राप्त कीं। हम दरों को पुनः निकालने के लिए लगभग 20 मिनट तक इस अभिस्थिति में प्रतीक्षा करेंगे, और फिर हम आगे बढ़ेंगे और उस समय की अप
Я не м
了解、よかった。ジェティソン・レトロ
了解。
了解。この2つの小さな点を地図上で正確に特定できますか？ オ
닐, 보통 이 사람을 
Gemini VI, Houston. Si vous lisez ceci, nous sommes prêts à recevoir votre signal et le compte à rebours est lancé. Il nous reste 4 minutes et 5
セブン、こちらケープ。大統領があなたと話している間に、ZとR
Roger. Fly-by-wire, Manu
あまり長く放置してはいけないことはご存じでしょ
Controllo dell'assetto, SCAN
罗杰，11。给你两台PADS，30和31。30 SPS/G&N：36691，减去061，加上066 135 23 4156。NOUN 81：32 - 更正，加上32011，加上06818，减去02650 181 054 014。远地点不适用，近地点加上00230 3286 - 更正，32836；燃烧时间2 28 32628 24 1511 357。接下来的三行不适用。名词 61：加 1103，减 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52。落日是天津四和织女星，坐标为 242 172 012。我们需要两台喷气式飞机的空隙持续 16 秒，地平线位于 10 度线上，时间 TIG - 2 分钟；你的六分仪星在 134 加 50 秒后可见。准备好复述
Хорошо. На панели 3: первые три шага мы выполнили: MODE, VOICE, to VOICE; POWER,, OFF; POWER PMP to OFF; и S-BAND OMNI вернется в исходное состояние; FLIGHT BUS, MAIN B, откроется
맞습니다. 좋습니다. 다음으로, 모드 - 자세 설정이 완료되면, 모드 제어 자동(MODE CONTROL AUTO)을 누르십시오. 회전율을 모니터링하려면 키를 누르십시오. 초당 0.1도 미만이면 모든 축의 회전율을 모니터링하고, 플러스-X 스러스터를 비활성화하십시오. 좋습니다. 다음으로, 입력(ENTER); 1257, 입력(ENTER); 252, 입력(ENTER); 1, 입력(ENTER); 입력(ENTER); DAR 22110을 입력하고 진행(PROCEED); 입력
Хорошо. Я проверил заряд батареи, вентиляционный клапан, продувку топливного элемента, а затем остановимся на 55 часах, и ваш угол крена составит 285 градусов, что соответствует плану полета. Углы антенны с высоким коэффициентом усиления немного отличаются: тангаж 23 градуса и рыскание 267 градусов. Телевизионный контроль, стандартная активация, за исключением некоторых специальных шагов, которые мы вам дадим, чтобы проверить давление в топлив
Roger. Ho ricevuto l'aggiornamento sui material
D'accord, Bill. On espère que ce sera le cas. Il semble que la température se soit stabilisée depuis un certain temps et qu'elle sera suffisamment élevée pour faire bouillir l'eau. C'est pourquoi, si l'eau bo
The balloon is gone [out of sight]. I am apparently out of manual fuel. I have to go to fly-by-wire to stop this tum
Oh, we were closer than t
Roger. Der Grund für die Verzögerung, Charlie, ist, dass es schwierig ist, zwei Sterne zu finden, die nicht von der Sonne verdeckt werden und sich hier oben auch nicht inmitten eines künstlichen Ste
――この
Хорошо. Теперь давайте убедимся
Il
무슨 말씀인지 알겠어요. 아까 잠깐 눈을 붙여서 푹 쉬었고, 프랭크도 들어오기 전에 여기서 푹 자게 해주고 싶어요. 이참에 배경 음악을 틀어보
Ricevuto. Ben
ठीक है। सूर्य के इन निम्न कोणों पर, भूरे रंग का कोई निशान नहीं है, यह अब पूरी तरह से धूसर रंग में बदल गया है और, जैसा कि 8 क्रू ने कहा है, सूर्य के इस कोण पर यह प्लास्टर ऑफ पेरिस जैसा दिखता है,
네, 32346을 더하고 01168을 빼고 4를 더합니다. 아, 정정합니다. 05730을 더합니다. 이해
Roger. La stella Boresight è esattamente 34. E ho l'asta del sestante: 
Cavolo, qu
Okay. Looking at our computations back here, we show you about 55 45
로저. 저는 자동 모드로 도킹했는데, 말씀드렸다시피 접촉 순간을 정확히 기억하지 못했습니다. 도킹 프로브 표시기를 계속 확인했죠. 세 개의 캡처 래
로저. 연소는 예정대로 진행됐고 잔여물도 확
Дальше на север и чуть дальше на восток. Объект, который я вам описывал, небольшой яркий кратер на кра
Хорошо. Для тех, кто не знает, здесь мы записываем большую часть данных по каждому из маневров, и у нас есть еще одна кар
好的，吉姆。由于切换天线有点麻
हाँ, बिल्कुल। हमें लगता है कि ऐसा ही है, लेकिन फिर भी
出ま
حسنًا. مفهوم. ابدأ Retrofire،... شروق الشمس 10:08:40. ومفهوم، انسخ حالة الطقس، ومقياس الارتفاع 2986، واستعادة ناها RESCUE 1 في توقيت غرينتش 02:58؛ وناها SEARCH 1
روجر. أنا على صواب تمامًا عند 
Cette période de calme doit peser sur beaucoup de monde sur le terrain. Je pense qu'il serait judicieu
Роджер, Гавайи. Близнецы 
了解しました。リモートサイトからお客様と連絡を取ることについて、お客様のご意見をはっ
Apollo 11, Houston. Noch fünf Minuten. Und zu Ihrer Anfrage bezüglich des Stickstoffdrucks vor dem Brennvorgang: Kurz vor dem Brennvorgang zeigten wir 2270 Pfund pro Quadratzoll auf Flasche Alf
Roger. Could you ask 
Neil, wir haben ein 
好的。好
尼尔和巴兹，这里是休斯顿。巴兹，在你爬梯子之前，我们想提醒你一下近摄相机的
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Три положения переключателей. Переключатель «ВХОДЫ ТЕЛЕМЕТРИИ» в положение «НИЗКИЙ»; 
오로라 세
Houston, this is Apollo 8. We have a little pi
That's affirmative. It appears that - can't quite tell what program... we
أ
ठीक है, जो। समझ लो कि जेट्ट की स्थिति सर्विस मॉड्यूल के सामान्य जेटिसन के समान होगी, यानी ऊपर की ओर और व
Okay. First a comment. In the middle of the page is where the zodiacal light stuff ends, just under. And then, if you'll go down to the bottom of the page, cross out the line "Photo target 
That w
ओह, ये तो बढ़िया रहेगा। मैंने लवेल को सोफे के नीचे भेज दिया है। यहाँ एक आदमी बाएं सोफे के नीचे
Roger. This is
OK. J'ai récupéré tous 
एक डिब्बे में 2 घंटे 35 मिनट पर शोर। आप
Okay. W
Roger, Houston. Qualche parola sul nostro sistema di tracciamento ottico. Ho usato AUTO OPTICS per i punti di controllo 1 e 2 sul retro, e hanno funzionato benissimo, hanno tracciato entrambi i bersagli per me. Sono andato al punto di controllo 3, come indicato nel nostro manuale di controllo orbitale, per vedere la latitudine e la longitudine che mi erano state fornite e ho usato AUTO OPTICS per tracciare quel particolare sistema di coordinate, ed era molto vicino al tracciato di tracciamento effettivo. Ho scelto il punto in cui ho fatto la marcatura finale e ho registrato 
Roger. Du bist schwach. Wenn du das hier liest, ist dein RETRB 16+1
收到
你的屁股需要额外的空
About 
ヒューストン、こちらは8です。走査望遠鏡と液体酸素の放出口を覗い
रॉजर, 11. यह ह्यूस्टन है। लगभग 71 से 72 घंटे के बीच, हम आपको खाने के लिए बुला रहे हैं, जो शायद पहले से ही चल रहा होगा। 71 घंटे: O2 फ्यूल सेल पर्ज; 72 घंटे GET: CO2 फिल्टर परिवर्तन संख्या 6, सेकेंडरी रेडिएटर फ्लो चेक। और हम आपको 2 घंटे के पास, पेरीसिंथियन पास, रिटर्न मोड एबॉर्ट पर ब्लॉक डेटा भेजेंगे। 73 घंटे 00 मिनट पर: लगभग 0 डिग्री रोल पर रुकें। यानी, जब आप लगभग 73 घंटे पर 0 डिग्री रोल एंगल के करीब पहुंच रहे हों, तो हम चा
حسنًا. نودّ إطلاعكم على خطتنا. نحن في وضع حرج فيما يخصّ المياه حاليًا، لذا نرغب في استخدامها بأقلّ قدر ممكن. ولتحقيق ذلك، سنخطط للقيام بمناورة عودة حرة بسرعة 16 قدمًا في الثانية عند الساعة 61، أي بعد 37 دقيقة من الآن. ثم سنخفّض الطاقة، وبعدها - عند الساعة 79 - سنقوم بمناورة إجهاض أخرى لتفريغ ما تبقى لدينا. لكننا نرغب في إيقاف تشغيلها في أسرع وقت ممكن. سيكون ذلك بعد منتصف المسار، فما رأيكم في القيام بمناو
ビルは、眠るためにセコナル
Et, Verseau, po
いい取引だ。頑張ってくれ、フィル
로저. 방금 아침으로 먹으려고 도토리를 깨고 있었어요
80 était un z
わかりました。ス
Okay. Ich halte Sie auf dem Laufenden. Der erste Test ist eine Uplink-Sprach- und Entfernungsmessung mit voller Downlink-Verbindung, also im Prinzip das, was Sie gerade tun, und dient als Ba
रॉजर। रोल
Roger. Verstanden. Wir sind sehr froh, dass Sie das verstanden haben, damit wir eine Horizontkalibrierung für den C
Houston, Tranquilit
私も同じです、ロン。とても良さそう
阿波罗 8 号。这是休斯顿，进行了一次飞掠，以及一次持续 2 小时的近地机动，
أنا أهبط الآن على الأفق، ويمكنك بالتأكيد رؤية الطبقتين الواضحتين لتوهج الهواء، الطبقة السميكة جدًا في الأعلى، ويمكنك رؤية النج
Okay, Jack. Wait 1. We want to get one into the hands of FLIGHT and, and it
抱
ठीक है, हम इसे आपके 
没错，吉姆。这就是昨晚大燃烧后我们给你的那个，我们会用它，并稍作修改。我们在模拟器里试过，当然，没有晃动之类的，但通过调整俯仰和横滚的速率，让ACS调整偏航，效果似乎不错。你可以通过观察误差指针来调整速率，当它们停止移动时，就
Okay, Jim. We're getting about 9 minutes from the commencement of command module powerup, and we wanted to just mention to you for Jack's benef
هل يمكنك - هل تعتقد أنك تستطيع تخمين
Bene. Abbiamo verificato il tuo orario, il 16 inserito è corretto. Ti forniremo un aggiornamento sull'orario programmato per il. Allo stesso tempo, ti forniremo un aggiornamento dei tuoi vettori di stato per il e. La correzione di metà rotta numero 7 era inferiore a sette decimi di piede al secondo e non la eseguiremo. Hai un orario programmato per il quale no
I haven't got any left. You're going to have to dump it. End up doing
حسنًا. أريد فقط توضيح نقطة واح
Apollo 8, Houston. Wir haben verstanden, dass Sie uns in Kopie senden. Während wir versuchen, den Kontakt wiederherzustellen, bitten wir Sie, Ihre Optik auf Null zu stellen. Wir sehen, dass Sie in der Trunn
لا، الأمر يتعلق بفقدان بعض بيانات التتبع، لذا 
Okay. Und wann rechnen Sie damit
रॉजर। पैनल का संक्षिप्त विवरण इस प्रकार है: बाएँ पैनल पर फ़्यूज़ स्विच पहले बताए अनुसार ही हैं, इन्हें दोबारा नहीं बताया जा रहा है। स्क्विब सक्रिय है। ऑटो रेट्रोजेटिसन बंद है। मोड सेलेक्ट सामान्य, ऑटो, जाइरो सामान्य है। सभी "T" हैंडल लगे हुए हैं। रेट्रो डिले सामान्य है, केबिन की दोनों लाइटें जल रही हैं। मैंने लाल फ़िल्टर चालू कर रखे हैं। टेलीम लो फ़्रीक्वेंसी चालू है। रेस्क्यू एड्स ऑटो है। लैंडिंग बैग को सेंटर-ऑफ़ स्थिति में छोड़कर सभी सीक्वेंस पैनल आइटम सामान्य हैं। ईंधन 90-100 प्रतिशत है। एटीट्यूड इंडिकेशन 5 डिग्री दाएँ, 3 डिग्री बाएँ, 36 डिग्री नीचे हैं। EPI ठीक से संकेत दे रहा है, वर्तमान समय में वूमेरा के लगभग ऊपर होने का संकेत दे रहा है। मेरे मार्क पर लॉन्च से समय 58 प्लस 15 होगा। 
Sì. Il punto è che, almeno nell'orientamento attuale, bisogna aspettare che il Sole 
好的，谢谢老板。我们期待好好休息一下，然后一路轻松
Колумбия, Хьюстон. Можете смело подключаться к
Скорость... Да, общая скорость так и не увеличилась как следует. Сколько она сос
Roger per Bill. Ora pu
Ok. Ecco cosa faremo. Metteremo Fred di guardia qui, e io e Jack ce la prenderemo comoda, e se Fred copia l'aggiornamento, beh, allora ricominceremo tut
D'accord, Fred. Si je comprends bien, seul le tuyau rouge du LMP est branché dans le sac du réservoir. Dans ce cas, veuillez suivre la procédure suivante pou
Оно движет
Hallo zusammen, hier spricht Chirurg Sansibar. Ihr Blutdruck lag vor d
Roger. Danke. Das hat dir jetzt wirklich weitergeholf
روجر، باز. نحن ننقل ال
हम आपके साथ हैं - प्रतीक्षा करें, बज़। लगभग 50,000। प्रतीक्षा 
分かりました。3点ほど質問があります。まず1つ目は、皆さんのバッチの2点が評価され、「
Roger. J'ai aussi des mises à jour concernan
... this... Forward firing thrusters, Retrogra
Ci credereste che state guardando uno stufato di pollo? Tutto quello che dovete fare è... 85 ml di acqua calda per 5 o 10 minuti. Ora prendiamo l'acqua calda da un piccolo rubinetto qui sopra con un filtro
Roger, Guaymas. Wir haben den Booster noch. Wir sind jetzt ziemlich weit davon entfernt, und er verbraucht etwas meh
Вот почему мы не зачитывали вам ни одной нов
हाँ, जॉर्ज, यह सही है। मैं फेसप्लेट बंद ही रखूँगा। मैंने फ्
حسنًا، جيم. في الصف الثاني، تحت النظام أ: يجب أن يكون كل من تغذية الصعود 2 وتغذية الصعود 1 مفتوحين. يجب أن يكون مؤقت المهمة مفتوحًا؛ وكذلك GASTA. تحت ناقل 
Bitte warten Sie... Geben Sie mir -... da drüben auf
忙しいのは承知していますが、ジャックに時間ができたら、コマンド モジュールの 
حسنًا يا جيم. في هذا، نرى أن 
イギリス、ジョドレルバンク発、AP通信経由：英国の大型ジョドレルバンク電波望遠鏡は、本日東部夏時間午後5時49分、ソ連の無人月探査機からの信号の受信を停止した。広報担当者は、ルナ15号宇宙船は「月面を越えた」ようだと述べた。また、「月面に着陸したとは考えていない」と、同天文台長のバーナード・ラベル卿の広報担当者は述べた。ワシントンUPI通信：スパイロ・T・アグニュー副大統領は、2000年までに人類を火星に送るべきだと主張したが、民主党指導部は地球上のニーズを優先すべきだと反論した。水曜日のアポロ11号打ち上げで政府高官を務めたアグニュー氏は、「私の判断では、今世紀末までに人類を火星に送るべきだ」と述べたが、これは必ずしもニクソン政権を代表した発言ではなく、自身の考えを代弁していたようだ。ラレド（テキサス州）AP通信：ヌエボラレドの入国管理当局は水曜日、ヒッピーたちは入浴と散髪をしなければメキシコ入国のための観光カードの発行を拒否されると発表した。ヌエボラレドのメキシコ入国管理局長ウベルト・カザラス氏は、メキシコシティ、アカプルコ、その他の人気観光地の当局からヒッピーに関する苦情が寄せられていると語った。ユナイテッド・プレス・インターナショナル：ニクソン大統領が月曜日、アポロ11号月着陸ミッションへの国民的参加の日として連邦政府職員に休日を与えたことに対する当初の反応は、ほとんどが驚きだった。ロドニー・ビドナー、AP通信、ロンドンAP通信：ヨーロッパはアポロ11号ミッションの衝撃を月面に受けた。ヨーロッパ大陸中の新聞は、地球と天然衛星との初のリンクを確立するために打ち上げられるサターンVロケットの写真で紙面を埋め尽くした。 「人類史上最大の冒険が始まった」とフランスの新聞「ル・フィガロ」は宣言し、ケープ・ケネディ宇宙センターからの報告とミッションの図面を4ページにわたって掲載した。タブロイド紙「パリ・ジュール」は「世界中がブラボーを叫んでいる」と称賛した。共産党系日刊紙「リュマニテ」は打ち上げの写真をトップに掲載し、カウントダウンと打ち上げ、宇宙飛行士の妻や家族、そして月面での活動の背景を描いた熱狂的な月面レポートで裏表紙全体を飾った。ニューヨーク州ヘムステッド：ジョー・ネイマスは水曜日、プロフットボール・コミッショナーのピーター・ロゼールとの意見の相違をめぐりチームメイトと非公開で会合を開いた後、ホフストラ大学で行われたニューヨーク・ジェッツのトレーニングキャンプに正式に参加した。ロンドンUPI通信：貴族院は水曜日、アメリカの小型潜水艦がネス湖の怪物に「損傷や攻撃」を与えることはないと確約された。ノメイ卿は、ネス湖
Wir befinden uns jetzt direkt über unserem ersten Ausgangspunkt für P-1. Er ist fast unmöglich zu verfehlen, sehr leicht zu erkennen, und wir können direkt hinüber zum zweiten Ausgangs
روجر. لدى قائد الطائرة 129 مشروبًا بحجم نصف أونصة وث
了解。ヒューストン、こ
調子
吉姆，如果你不需要电脑，就按回车键，我们会
エリア1B
是的，我们已经
وستلاحظون في نشاط دافع الميل، أنني ما 
로저. 요금이 충분히 안정되면 다시 연락드리
We were looking for the Cat's Paw, too, thinking we were probably downrange, beyond the Big V. But I think that it's likely that that might have been West Crater that we went across in la
Houston, Apoll
ロジャー
Oh sì, riesco a vedere 
ठीक है, 8. हम यहाँ ज़मीन पर एक छोटा सा अभ्यास करना चाहते हैं ताकि यह सुनिश्चित हो सके कि हम टेप को डंप कर सकें और आवाज़ वाले हिस्से को समय पर ह्यूस्टन वापस ला सकें। तो हम आपका टेप डंप करने की योजना बना रहे हैं, और
मुझे नहीं पता, गोली गिर गई। मैं रोगाणुनाशक की गोली नहीं डालूंगा, क्
Понял. Моё состояние хорошее; состояние капсулы хорошее; режим управления автоматический; гироскопы работают нормально; маневр отключен. Топливо в системе управления 51% и 69%; кислород 82% и 100%. Это почти всё, за исключением того, что мне пока не удалось снизить температуру пара в скафандре значительно ниже 70 градусов. В данный момент температура пара, или клапана управления водой, установлена ​​на 4 на предстартовой отметке. Возможно, она слишком высокая. Сейчас выключаю его и устанавливаю на 3, на этом уровне находится кабина
फिलहाल, मध्यमार्ग सुधार शून्य है; और लगभग डेढ़ घंटे में, हमारे पास इसकी पुष्टि
ठीक है। यह थोड़ा अलग होगा। जब मैं आपको ΔV पढ़कर सुनाऊ
Горизонт здесь очень, очень резкий. Небо кромешная тьма, а земля — или, вернее, луна, простите, — совершенно светлая; контраст между небом и луной — это яркая, темная линия. Теперь в поле зрения камеры появляются интересные старые двойные кольцевые кратеры, довольно распространенные в районе морей образования, заполненн
Хьюстон, мои комментарии по поводу восхода солнца касались области над горизонтом. Появилось то, что можно назвать диагональным светом или светом, вызванным дымкой, или чем-то подобным. Когда солнце поднималось над краем диска Солнца или перед этим, с другой стороны можно было увидеть отчетливые лучи. Это была равномерная дымка, исходящая из центральной точки, где д
アップリンクが終了次第、待機してください。以
알겠습니다
Roge
Hast
Als die Antenne wieder einrastete, betrug der Gierwinkel 60°, der Nickwinkel minus 5°, wobei der Messwert plus 67° für den Gierwinke
C'est très facile à repérer. On peut voir d'ici les bords entiers des cratères, avec bien sûr le croissant blanc sur la face opposée, éclairé par le soleil. Les ombres sont assez longues maintenant. Maskelyne B (Marais du Sommeil) est fortement ombré,
Okay. Following Tommy Jacobs, we have the hot smoking word from a local Houston astro
わかった、ジャック。もう一度確認してみよう。地球を正面の窓の外に置いて、地球の中心を置きます。地球の中心は今、地球の中心と平行で
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很神奇，就是眼睛还没适应的时候，周围一片漆黑。我确实能看到窗户上有一些涂层。现在要回到超高频VOX模式进行发射。打开面罩擦拭右侧麦克风。我舔了一下。关上面罩。面罩立刻密封，以便宇航服电路开始工作。我可不想再被它弄脏。宇航服进气口的温度稳定在68度左右。所以穹顶又要升起来了。现在温度是76度，75度。看来这个更高的设置才是我们想要的。我想再往上加半格，应该就能锁定温度了。宇航服终于开始降温了，所以我知道该把温度调到什么程度了。我已经将宇航服和控制杆的冷却液量设定在 8.5。此时穹顶读数为 75 度。宇航服进气口温度为 68 度。非常舒适。我能感觉到凉爽的空气拂过我的脸庞。氧气量看起来也很好，分别为 60 和 75 psi（单位为百）。我一直在观察 250 逆变器。它的温度接近 140 度，而 150 对比度逆变器的温度已降至约 100 度。待机温度约为 100 度，也就是舱内温度。第三点，250 逆变器——它有点问题，我会密切关注。舱内热交换器的温度稳定在 40 度，这让我很头疼，因为我显然欠了弗兰克·萨蒙斯基 50 美分。我感到很惊喜。舱内燃料读数也略高。让我看看，我们现在的燃料压力是 5.5 psi。读数大约是5点，更正一下，5.3，对于这个舱室来说不算太高。外面天色渐暗，我想现在出去看看星星。左手手套上手电筒的电池盖有点松动了。只有开关那部分
这里是Sigma Seven，沃特敦，高频。我能收到你们的超高频信号。你们能收
D'accord, Bill. Avant de lire la mise à jour importante, je voudrais expliquer brièvement la procédure à Jim. Lorsqu'il reprendra
سيجما سبعة، سيجما سبعة. تلقائي واح
Аполлон-11, Хьюстон. Если вы это читаете, пожалуйста, попробуйте установить высокое
NE
Yes, when I go to small-end-forward it 
로저, 11시입니다. 이제 14분 정도 남았네요. 86시 30분, 한 시간 정도 남았습니다. 그때쯤 한 분이라도 깨어 계실 계획인지, 아니면 모두 한 시간 안에 주무실 계획인지 
Roger. J'ai les temps T1 et T2 ainsi que la longitude du point premier 130. Nous travaillons sur les cases de la grille et nous les aurons bi
रॉजर, माइक। मैं डेटा पर कुछ टिप्पणी देना चाहूंगा। स्वचालित पैंतरेबाज़ी काफी सटीक थी। ऐसा लगता है कि पैंतरेबाज़ी में हमें कोई उपतारकीय बिंदु मिला; स्वचालित प्रकाशिकी ने कैनोपस को ठीक उसी स्थान पर रखा जहां उसे होना चाहिए था; न्यूनतम आवेग नियंत्रण ने अपेक्षित रूप से काम किया। जिन ऊंचाइयों पर मैंने अवलोकन शुरू किए, वहां एक स्पष्ट धुंधली पट्टी रेखा दिखाई देती है। फ़िल्टर पृथ्वी को एक चमक देता है, कुछ नारंगी रंग की चमक। तारे को ठीक से निर्धारित करना बहुत मुश्किल है, लेकिन ऐसा लगत
र
D'accord. Parfait. On a bien compris, Fred. Et pour vous montrer à quel point on e
버즈, 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 제가 보기엔 상황이 꽤 좋아 보입니다. 저기 열대 수렴선 부근에 구름이 조금 보이긴 하지만, 제가 보고 있는 기상도에는 특별히 우려할 만한 것은 없습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 지금 MPL(해상도)에서는 구름이 흩어져 있고, 시야는 10피트, 파고는 3피트입니다. 현재 날씨는 이렇습니다. 특별히 우려할 만한 기상 현상은 예보된 것이 없는 것 같습니다. 태평양에 열대성 폭풍이 몇 개 있는데, 착륙 지역은 아니지만요. 클라우디아라는 폭풍은 하와이 북쪽, 아니, 동쪽쯤에 있습니다. 북서쪽으로 이동하면서 소멸하고 있고요. 비올라라는 폭풍은 괌 상공에 있습니다. 하지만 이 
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, qui è Hou
نعم، هذا صحي
월리, 불빛을 켜놓으니 노즐 앞쪽의 불꽃이 
Роджер. Можешь рассказат
जैक, ऐसा लगता है कि जब हम इस कोण पर 239 डिग्री के आसपास पहुं
Okay, Houston.
了解。それで、送信してください。ちなみに、今は月が見えていないので
هذا صحيح. سأستعرض أولاً سريعاً أوقات الأحداث الرئيسية، ثم سنعود ونُكمل بعض التفاصيل.
Okay. Will we be jettisoning at about this attitude? That's okay. I'll align the with the. You can tell me a little lat
Роджер. У нас здесь, в Альф
Na ja, dann kann ich mein Mikrofon wohl genauso gut zuklappe
E - noi - Vi daremo 
रॉग, हम आपको खो रहे हैं। हम आपको हवाई और जमीनी दोनों तरह से खो रहे हैं। क्या आप इस समय वूमेरा स
フ
이글, 휴스턴. 중단 단계 요청, 재설정,... PROP 재설정 및 모
没错
هذا صحيح يا جورج. سأبقي غطاء الشاشة مغلقًا. لقد تناولت قطعة واحدة م
そう
रॉजर। माइक, मुझे लगता है कि हम उस सात-दसवें दर को समझा सकते हैं। जब हम पहली बार में थे, तो हम उस 
مرحباً، غوايماس. معكم جيميني 4. الطيار ما زال مستيقظاً. ي
30分で燃え尽きる
Никаких проблем. Хотя в про
알았어, 조. 내가 제대로 받았는지 다시 한번 확인해 볼게. 그 후, 우리 동안 육분의를 이용해 베넷
Eagle, qui Houston. Vediamo l'interruttore di azzeramento de
Dann möchten wir, dass Sie die Kamera so ans Fenster halten, dass die Nase nicht im Bild ist. Wir benötigen zwei Fotoserien. Bitte verwenden Sie den Pulsmodus und richten Sie das Raumschiff senkrecht nach unten auf die Erde. Ich gebe Ihnen etwas Zeit zum Starten. Die Aufnahme erfolgt auf der Nachtseite der Erde. Geben Sie nun einen Impuls nach oben und machen Sie ein Foto mit geöffnetem Verschluss (Bulb-Position
Vance 觉得我们应该拍一张 Jack 的照片，好让
Roger. 027 44 5363, minus 165 073 14 037 44 8016, minus 165 072 46; 046 44 6141, minus 165 097 03 
ठीक है। अब हमें थोड़ा बेहतर सिग्नल मिल रहा है। कृपया पुष्टि करें कि साइड हैच पर लगे क्लैंप को या तो पानी में या ढलान पर, जहाँ भी आप पहुँच सकें, हटाया जा सकता है। क्या यह सही 
자, 프레드
好的。S-BAND、PM、PRIMARY、PRIMARY again、O
好的，获取 B 02 45 50；ΔV，26.2；燃烧时间，0 加 35；偏航角右 90 度，俯仰角 0；25 号和 26 号核心为零；27 号核心，
Роджер, Джордж. Мой режим управления — ручной. Гироскопы закрыты, маневр отключен. Топливо 45 и 64 [процента], немного опережает график. Кислород показывает 82-100 [процентов]. Температура пара в скафандре немного падает. Она чуть ниже 70 [градусов]. В кабин
Je suis parfaitement à l'aise. La température à l'entrée de la suite est de 22 degrés Celsius, et 
아폴로
ア
At the elapsed time of 22 hours we will take up the Flight Plan again. We will be back on the fuel curve at t
展開時に2つの角が同時に出なかったため、2つの角が接触していたと思います。展開の仕方が少し不均一で、もちろん、それが置かれた地形も
了解、マヌーバパッド、目的：フライバイ、/G&N; 63385; プラス0.97、マイナス0.23;; プラス0212.7、マイナス0141.7、マイナス0254.8; 148, 316, 050; NA, プラス0022.5; 0360.9, 0:53, 0356.3; 33, 352.7, 15.0; NA, NA, NA。緯度から、マイナス23.26、マイナス165.00; 1147.7
Apollo 8, wir möchten die hohe Verst
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 가능하시면 극저온 팬 작동 과정을 알려주시면 감사하겠습니다. 
Contarex在哪儿
아폴로
Ich lasse H₂O₂ ab. Sicherung eingeschaltet. Bereit. Bergungsarm ist aktiviert. Bereit für den Hauptfallschirm. Alle Schalter sind in der richtigen Position. Der manuelle Treibstoff ist fast aufgebraucht. Da ist er, und der Haupt
Roger. Your 
フレンドシップ・セ
罗杰。我们现在快到助推器了，你可以看到天开始亮了。灯光很清晰，我估计我们现在距离助推器大概有四分之三英里。灯光很容易看到，地平线也清晰可见。我们已经取出了康泰克斯相机、哈苏相机、16毫米镜头和血压
حسنًا، ما زلت أحتفظ بقواطع الدائرة ا
Главные новости сегодня в Хьюстоне касаются «Астрос». В спортивном мире «Хьюстон Астрос» в девятом иннинге в Цинциннати одержали победу над «Редс» со счетом 7:4. Однако перед началом девятого ин
Le soleil était à environ 4
Roger. 45-1 101. 2+08. 12 37 50. 5+36. 10+33. 46-1 114. 2+25 14 12 47. 4+05. 9+33. 47-1 Fore and aft firing thrusters. 08 and 120. 0+14 and 2+30. 15 46 36. 3+17. 8+37. 48-1 Fore and aft thrusters. 24 and 120. 0+40 and 230, correction 2+30. 17 20 19. 2+42. 8+43. 49-4 111. 2
알겠습니다. 피치를 마이너스
レートをゼロにできそうです。よし、今からやります。カプセルが2時17分32秒経過したら、すべての
Близнецы 
ठीक है, फ्रेड। समझो, केवल एलएमपी की लाल नली ही
Jim? Ihr seid beide momentan in wirklich guter Verfassung, und alle EKGs sehen gut aus. Eure Flüssigkeitszufuhr ist hervorragend, und meiner letzten Berechnung zufolge seid ihr beide für den Wiedereintritt in die Atmosphäre bestens hydriert. Ich möchte s
알겠습니다. 입력하신 시간을 확인해 보니 16분이 맞습니다. 예정된 시간에 맞춰 업데이트된 정보를 제공해 드리겠습니다. 동시에, 해당 항로의 상태 벡터도 업데이트해 드리겠습니다. 중간 항로 수정 7번은 초당 0.7피트 미만이므로 실행하지 않겠습니다. 예정된 수정 사항이 하나 있는데, 이는 필수 사항은 아닙니다. 선택 사항입니다. 하지만 수정 사항을 삭제하더라도 자체 점검 및 상태 표시등 테스트는 여
जी हां। इससे यह कार्ड पूरा हो जाता है। बाकी अपडेट सिर्फ आपकी जानकारी के लिए हैं, जो हमारे 58 घंटे के प्लेटफॉर्म पर आधारित हैं - प्लेटफॉर्म को देखें। हमारी स्थिति बहुत अच्छी है। आपके GYRO में लगभग कोई विचलन नहीं है क्योंकि - प्लॉट किए गए अपडेट में हम X का मान -2.24, Y का मान +0.87 और Z का मान -0.11 देख रहे थे। अपडेट क
Принято, диспетчерская служба мыса. Мы почти готовы раскрыть парашют. Оставайтесь на связи
Пересадка прошла довольно успешно, Ф
Роджер. 1-4 01 00 16; RET RB, 20 плюс
Ok. Riquadro 229: CB TIMER, PRINCI
11, Houston. Avec un câble de 3,65 mètres, nous estimons qu
Roger. Nous suivons votre progression. Il semble que vous soyez en train de terminer votre première étoile, et il nous faudra une autre série pour la deuxième. Ce délai de 7 heures n'est pas st
Okay. I'm showing just a little bit above 50 percent here, and we'
That must be a "no, 
ऑरोरा सेवन, ऑरोरा सेवन। यह एचएफ और यूएचएफ पर आईओएस कॉम टेक है। आप कैसे सुन रहे हैं?
Хьюстон, мы используем ВАРИАНТ 1, аналогичный ВАРИАНТУ 3. У нас постоянно срабатывает сигнал тревоги 401, который с
Quindi siamo circa 3 minuti in anticipo rispet
ر
この収納で最も重要なことは、
Хор
For your information your O2 is holding. It seems to be w
Gemini 4, qui Houston CAP COM. Per favore, impostate l'i
That's correct. And the next thing you will do will be to set the mission timer and what we'
Роджер. Я съел из него всё, кроме апельсинового сока, а его куда-то затерял. Не зна
はい。今、地平線の天気はこんな感じです。画像の左側の地平線に雲があります。真ん中あたりまで雲が見えています。真ん中あたりで雲が切れて、その上に高い雲が点在しています。左側の雲
Hey, Jerry, yesterday I tried to cycle back 
आप कहते हैं कि आपमें अभी भ
नम
텔레
أبولو 8، هيوستن. معدل نقل البيانات منخفض. لن نتمكن من رؤية ضغط البخار لديك؛ معدل إخراج الإشعاع لديك هو
Ok, ora. Telecamera in bianco e nero, e consiglio di riporla sopra A-7 e A-11 in un sacco di decontaminazione. Poi: kit bandiera, posizione di
Apollo 8, ici Houston. Te
Roger, Houston. Columbia… en haut. J’ai gardé les yeux rivés sur le sextant à c
Okay. Sobald wir in der vierten Reihe sind, schalten wir den Betriebsschalter ein. Das bedeutet, dass wir Ihre CDUs nicht meh
姿勢制御は良好です。手動燃料は十分なようです。まだ72%です。この時点で、ピッチの周期的なレートは確実に確保されています。ヨーはかなり硬く、Gが増加しています。カプセルは非常に安定しています。緑色の気流があり、時折オレンジ色の筋が見えます。再突入は非常に順調です。かなり珍しいスローロールです。2Gまで増加しています。レートコマンドの燃料は十分です。今頃はきらめきが見え
ये फ्रेंडशिप सेवन की रिकॉर्डिंग है। रेट्रोफायर की वजह से खिड़कियों पर काफी धूल जमी है और यहाँ भी बहुत कुछ ऐसा दिख रहा है जैसे, आह, पैड से ऊपर आते समय हमने कुछ कीड़े कुचल दिए हों। 
Roger, Mike. Veuillez noter vos angles maintenant, puis exécuter la commande et charger ces angles (ceux que vous voyez sur la commande) dans l'emplacement prévu à cet effet; et appuyez sur PRO, ce qui lancera notre période de tar
نعم. هل
Положение автомобиля выглядит очень хорошо, уверенно 
Roger, 11. Zu Ihrer Frage bezüglich des Ladevorgangs der Akkus: Wir gehen davon aus, dass es sich um Unterschie
Ici Friend
네, 맞아요. 하지만 정장에 닿지는 않네요. 다시 한 번 쳐주
Ich habe einen guten Blick auf die USA. Der typische kalifornische Nebelg
こちらフレンドシップ・セブン、ブラインド放送中。ちょっと待ってください。フレンドシップ・セブン、ブラインド放送中。夜間の屋外観測を行っています。地平線よりずっと上の高い層があるようです。昼間側で見たものよりもずっと高いです。星々
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. مناورة مراوغة G&N: 63481، زائد 095، ناقص 020؛ 004 40 0100، زائد 00051، زائد جميع الكرات، زائد 00190؛ التدحرج خيارك، الرمية 213 357؛ غير متوفر؛ DELTA-VT هو 00197 003 00152. باقي PAD غير متوفر. لا يوجد ف
Friendship Seven, Bermud
حسنًا، ممتاز. يمكنك إخباره عندما نصل إلى تلك النقطة، أن لدينا بعض النجوم بزوايا محاورها وزوايا ارتكازها لنقدمها له كنسخ احتياطية في حال لم يوجهه الكمبيوتر مباشرةً
Yes, we can attach it up ther
Громко
確認してみたら、しっかり固定されている。このバイザーに
- - そして、もしあなたが物資を調達するの
ロジャー、私たち
يا فتى، لا يمكنك تفو
알겠습니다. 지금 자이로스코프 자유 모드로 들어가겠습니다. 그리고 자이
حسنًا، 13. نود أن تزودنا بقراءات اختبار الأنظمة على خلية الوقو
Jim, quando avrai finito di mangiare 
好的。我们建议的开始时间和结束时间，您将处于……状态。我们请求您使用左滚转速率，我们注意到您一直倾向于使用左滚转速率，即每小时 1 转，这是在您当前
حسنًا. صباح الخي
ठीक है
Das ist bestätigt. Und jetzt fügen wir etwas hinzu, das wir gelöscht haben. Moment, 1; die Kommunikation läuft schief
حسناً يا برج الدلو، ننصحك بالذهاب إلى الوض
L'approche est bonne à Houston, en ce qui concerne l'absence de reflets sur les optiques, et une certaine adaptation des données p
네. 아주 조용한 밤이었어요. 여기 아래쪽에서는 옛 블랙팀이 무전을 주
Il y avait très peu de débris dans le module de commande et dans le vaisseau. Nous avons 
Forse vedi la cerniera dell'amaca in questo momento. Sono le 
FACCIA MORTA, palo da barbiere. Okay, all'11, interruttori ECA DISCESA e 
Ça s'e
ठीक है। आपने मुझसे पहले भी कहा था, जो, कि मैं 400 प्लस 3 करूं, जो मैंने 
Roger. Es-tu en phase 
Ok. Sembra che abbiamo appena ottenuto un blocco solido per l'ultimo... oh, circa un minuto, le lancette di TUNE FOR MAX hanno oscillato su e giù e le lancette di beccheggio e imbardata hanno oscillato, ma sembra che ora si sia ristabilito da solo e saldamente. Ci stiamo solo riempiendo, stiamo completando la pulizia delle celle a comb
حسنًا. يُمكنك توقع عملية تنظيف خلية الوقود، وسننتهي من شحن البطارية (أ) بعد ذلك بوقتٍ ما؛ ويبدو أن البطارية ستكون مشحونة بالكامل تقريبًا. وسنتصل بك ل
Roger. Mir geht es gut, ich bin bester Laune und bereit für
E, per questo lungo periodo di lettura della checklist, tanto vale portare il COMM a u
और, ह्यूस्टन, हमने टेप को रिवाइंड कर दिया
Gemini VIII, hier spricht Houston. Könnten Sie mir bitte die Ergebnisse m
알겠습니다. 확인했습니다. 기내 모니터링 결과는 다음과 같습니다. 알파 로메오 2%, 브라보
हमें रंग का इस्
أصف الشريط الأزرق. هناك شريط أزرق داكن نسبيًا على سطح الأرض، وشريط أزرق فاتح، وشريط أزرق داكن آخر، وشريط أبيض عريض هو توهج الهواء، ثم شريط أسود قاتم يتدرج من الأزرق الرمادي إلى الأسود الداكن. يبدو الأمر كما لو كان تحت سحابة ممطرة عند الانتقال من الشريط الأزر
RIPARAZIONE CIRC
L
Oggi la mia stenografia è piuttosto scade
Roger. Wir sehen es, Jack. Und wir haben einen Wert von minus 2 Grad auf dem Andocki
أبولو 8، هيوستن. طلب ​​تحديد المدى في ال
太阳升起时的检查时间应该安排
Et le filtre v
Voilà. Le remplacement de notre cartouche d'hydroxyde de lithium est terminé. Joe, la seule différence, c'est que l'arche sur ce morceau de carton n'est pas assez grande pour position
यह सच है कि इतनी दूरी पर हमें रंगों की वह गहराई नहीं मिलती जो हमें 50,000 मील दूर से देखने पर मिलती थी। हाला
지금 시점에서 제가 읽은 요(yaw) 값과 
Negativo, Frank. Forse non si è riscaldato ben
نحن جاهزو
Okay. Aspetta
Good. I'll give him a cal
…ジャック…おい、ジャック。ステップ3で、BAT 5とBAT 6のノーマルフィードをオンにした。BAT 6だけ欲し
こち
,. Siamo pronti per le 
알겠습니다. 기구가 약 100도 호를 그리며 진동하고 있습니다. 자주 시야에서 사라지기도 합니다. 지금은 거의 수직입니다. 이 시점에 해안선을 표시해 두는 것이 좋을 것 같습니다. 제가 말씀드리려는 것은 기구가 위아래로 180도 진동한다는 것입니
ジム、高ゲインが確保されているこ
إنها مجرد ظواهر طبيعية. يمكنك رؤية بعضها كبير وبعضها صغير. يكاد يكون من المستحيل تصويرها. معظمها أقل سطوعًا من نجم جيد. بين الحين
Apollo 11, ici Houston. Ter
D'accord, Jim. Juste une petite introduction à la procé
J'ai l'impression que l'obtur
Вы по-прежнему отлично выглядите, и мы готовы 
よし、SEDR（サービスエンジニアリング部門レポート）の連中がやるやり方じゃなくて、私が見た通りに読み上げよう。またあの蛍が見える。ジョンはホッとしただろう。探していたわけじゃないんだ。ただそこにあったんだ
क्या हम पानी के बॉयलर का परीक्षण करते समय इसे प्रक्रिया का हिस्सा बना सकते है
Ja, ich glaube schon. Da draußen ist a
Fortfah
罗杰。我这里有个评
ロジャー、ヒューストン。こ
また、参考までに、次回あなたが来たときに、トランクウィリティ ベースでも調査を行う予定です。その情報をコピー
Y
제 말은, 마치 아무
Roger, you got it,
Ont-ils donné à Jack des instructions supplémentaires concernant la mise sous
حسنًا. لقد راجعتُ التعليمات: راقب كمية المُجمِّع الثانوي؛ صمام مُشعِّع الجليكول الثانوي، اضبطه على الوضع العادي لمدة 30 ثانية، ثم على وضع التجاوز. إذا لم تنخفض كمية المُجمِّع الثانوي، اضبط صمام مُ
罗杰。正如我刚才提到的，此举的主要目的是检查您的氧气流量传感器。不过，我们还需要大约两个小时的舱内氧气浓缩，所以我们需要保持即将安装的通风口开启。好的。请您将舱内通风快速接头安装到R-6舱
Хорошо. Это ваш д
알겠습니다
Bon, la pression dans la chambre diminue un peu; maintenant elle remonte; la pression dan
Dieser Schlafzyklus hier – wir müssen ihn wohl einfach in Echtzeit beobachten. Eigentlich sollte ich jetzt schlafen, aber offensichtlich – oder ich sollte gleich schlafen gehen, bin aber gerade erst aufgestanden. Wir müssen das wohl imp
Roger. On est en train d'aligner la plateforme, elle passe juste en dessous de notre gauche, et on va la suivre dans un instant. On est déjà en train de
Роджер. Дай мне знать, ко
Das ist bestätigt. Ich werde zunächst kurz die wichtigsten Ereignisse kurz zusammenfassen und anschließend die Details erläutern. Okay. Der Eintritt in die Atmosphäre erfolgt um 142:40 Uhr; etwa 6,5 ​​Stunden vorher, also ungefähr, beginnen wir mit der Aktivierung der Heizleistung, indem wir die Temperaturen des Kommandomoduls überprüfen und dieses gegebenenfalls vorheizen. Wir gehen davon aus, dass dies notwendig sein wird. Detaillierte Anweisungen dazu folgen später. Ungefähr 6 Stunden vorher beginnen wir mit dem Hochfahren der Heizleistung anhand der modifizierten 30-Minuten-Checkliste, die Sie bereits für den vorherigen Zwischenkurs verwendet haben. Kurz darauf, etwa 5 Stunden vorher, benötigen wir die Ausrichtung für die Körperachsenausrichtung mithilfe des Erdterminators, wie zuvor. Sobald wir das haben, führen wir -7 durch, was jetzt etwa einer Brenngeschwindigkeit von 2 Fuß pro Sekunde oder etwa 15 Sekunden entspricht. Mir wurde gesagt, dass sie jetzt bei 1,5 liegt, also deutlich innerhalb der Toleranz. Okay. Danach beginnen wir sofort mit dem Manöver zur Abwurfposition des Servicemoduls. Da wir es früher als üblich abwerfen, befindet es sich in der Flugebene. Wir benötigen und wollen keine Abweichung von der Flugebene. Das Servicemodul befindet sich also in der Flugebene und ist entlang des Radiusvektors nach außen gerichtet. Anschließend bereiten wir das Kommandomodul für den SEP des Servicemoduls vor, einschließlich der Überprüfung und des Heißlauftests. Etwa 4 Stunden und 30 Minuten vor dem geplanten Zeitpunkt werfen wir das Servicemodul ab. Wir werden die Maschine so lange hochziehen, bis wir das Servicemodul im Flug haben und versuchen, ein paar Fotos zu machen. Wir werden aber keine riskanten Manöver für Fotos durchführen, da wir den Flugbahnwinkel zu diesem Zeitpunkt nicht verändern wollen. Okay. Das gibt uns ungefähr zwei Stunden Zeit, um die Vorbereitungen abzuschließe
كيف يبدو لك الوضع الآن ي
Я п
روجر. بناءً على بيانات الولايات، س
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हम आपसे अनुरोध करते हैं कि टीवी को लगभग 10 मिनट तक चालू रखें, ताकि हम कैमरे से अच्छी तरह तुलना कर सकें। आप टीवी पर जो
それと、フレッドさん、パネル 16 に高速回路ブレーカーを用意
Okay. Wir prüfen das. Bitt
برج الدلو، هيوستن. لقد تم تسليمنا. كيف تقرأ
Roger. Here is the format which we'll send up to you for a rolling reentry. We'll give you the ∆V and ∆T for your OAMS burn. We'll give you the GMTRC. We'll give you a RET of.05g. And then you will also get the RET of drogue, of main, and of landing. Your procedure will be at retro to go to full lift, heads down. At the RET of.05g you will go into a 15° roll rate. When you reach 100,000, when the altimeter comes off the peg, go to full lift. How does that
चांद देखने में कोई दिक्कत नहीं हुई। जब मैंने तारे के निशान की दिशा में देखा, तो मुझे चांद बहुत पतला अर्धचंद्राकार दिखा, लेकिन वह साफ दिखा
방금 사전 실행 모드에서 따라잡기 모드로 전환했더니 컴퓨터 표시등이 꺼졌습니다. 이제 다시 켜지는지 봅시다. 네,
Gemi
How is that crater in - right in the middle lo
Okay. Here
Okay. Schritt 7 folgt: „Leistungsschalterfeld 11, AC-Sammelschiene B, Helium-PQGS-Treibmittelanzeige, geschlossen. Leistungsschalter 11, AC-Sammelschiene B, numerische Beleuchtung, geschlossen. Leistungsschalter 11, AC-Sammelschiene B, Sammelschienen-Wechselrichter 1, geschlossen. Leistungsschalterfeld 11, Wechselrichter 1, geschlossen. Leistun
Okay. Ricevuto, Jim. Allora, quando ti è più comodo, vor
Roger, 11. Per la calibrazione dell'ottica ho 346,5 per il rollio, 345,0 per il beccheggio e 0,07,8 per l'imbardat
Эй, Хьюстон — точнее, Водолей, Хьюстон. Мы довольны нашим нынешним положением дел. Мы не хотим, чтобы вы больше тратили бензин, пытаясь это сделать, и имейте в виду, что вы
Roger. C'est la révolution 41. L'heure de départ est 0
Roger, 8. Wi
Roger. Fly-by-Wire ist geprüft; alle Triebwerke funktionieren
Джим, можешь тепе
巴兹
Okay. For those of you that don't know, this is where we log most of our data for each of the
حسنًا. في الصف الثالث، تحت COMM: DISPLAY، مفتوح؛ SE AUDIO، مغلق؛ VHF A TRANSMITTER، مفتوح - هذا تغيير - VHF B RECEIVER، مفتوح؛ PRIMARY S-BAND، POWER AMPLIFIER، مفتوح؛ TRANSMITTER/RECEIVER، مغلق؛ S-BAND ANTENNA، مفتوح؛ PMP، مغلق؛ TV، مفتوح. تحت: DISPLAYS، مفتوح؛ GLYCOL PUMP SECONDARY، مفتوح؛ LOC PUMP، مفتوح؛ CABIN FAN CONTROL، مفتوح؛ CA
Roger, Frank. The helium tank temperature that we are watching on quad A has only gone up 1 degree in all this work that you are doing, so we don't consider it to be too terribly serious. What we would like to do, as soon as you finish this work, is rather than go back into, let's just roll her over 180 degrees and put quad A on the cool side, and hold it that way until
Bere
우리는 안전한 투하에 필요한 필수적인 사항들을 진지하게 검토해 봤습니까? 그렇지 않습니다. 대기권으로 진입하는 과정에서 사람들이 
Danke schö
吉姆，查理和其他人已经在模拟器上试过了，他们的建议是，把误差指针的速率调到零，直到指针完全不动为止，然后再等几
这是友谊七号。
Sie
ロジャー、ジェミニ4、ヒュース
Houston, Apollo 11. Pagina della checklist 
Ok, Jim. Ora, te lo divido in due parti. La prima riguarda il trasferimento delle apparecchiature del modulo di comando. La seconda parte sarà l'inverso, dal modulo di comando all'apparecchiatura. Entrambe le parti rappresentano i Delta provenienti dallo stivaggio del lancio, ed ecco la prima lista, per il trasferimento delle apparecchiature del modulo di comando. Per prima cosa, ti darò anche la posizione dello stivaggio. Quella va in R-
Okay, Fred. maneuver purpose is PC plus 2, to this time, we're going to the MPL. And , 079, 27, 4013, plus 08144, minus 00443, minus
逆变器
أوتو ون، هذا سيجما سفن. أنا أقرأك. كيف
收到。现
هذا استخدام زر الضغط للتحدث. 
そして、
حسنًا يا
Да
休斯顿，请继续。
D'accord. Je vérifiais juste. Je voulais simplement savoir comment fonctionna
よし、アクエリアス。準備はできた。では、高ビットレートにしたい。そのためには、パネル16のCOMMにあるPRIMARY
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフランク・ボーマンが同行します。彼らは太平洋軍司令官ジョン・シドニー・マケイン・ジュニア提督と共に、回収艦のブリッジから着水を見届けます。大統領はホーネット号での滞在後、アジア歴訪と予定されていたルーマニア訪問に出発します。ルナ15号は昨日、月を52周した後、「危機の海」に墜落したとみられています。ソ連の通信社TASSは、「月近傍空間における科学的」「研究」が行われたと報じました。ジョドレルバンク天文台のバーナード・ラベル卿は、ルナ15号が時速約300マイル（約480キロメートル）の速度で月面に衝突したと述べました。ベトナムでは最近、比較的静穏な状況が続いています。パトロール中の米兵が、飛行中の航空機に同調するトランジスタラジオを携帯しているのが目撃されました。ベトナムの軍のラジオ・テレビネットワークは、このミッションを全面的に報道しました。スエズ運河沿いでは、エジプトとイスラエルの間で小競り合いが依然として続いています。国連監視団は、この動きを阻止しようとしています。ワシントンでは、下院歳入委員会が、27.5%の石油枯渇許容量を20%に削減することを決議しました。ここヒューストン地域では、何度か雨が降っています。今日は曇りで、にわか雨が降る見込みです。スポーツに関しては、先ほども述べたように、オールスター ゲームが今夜開催されます。昨日は試合がありませんでした。昨夜ニューヨークで、全米野球記者協会がベーブ ルースを史上最高の野球選手に、ジョー ディマジオを現存する最高の野球選手に選びました。選手たちを称える夕食会で、フランク ボーマンが発表を行いました。ジョー ネイマス選手は、ニューヨーク ジェッツのトレーニング キャンプで丸一日を過ごしました。ブロードウェイ ジョーに触ろうとした約 500 人の子供達を 5 人の警官が制止するのに苦労しました。彼は気分は良く、ウィーブ ユーバンク コーチの許可があれば 8 月 1 日のオールスター ゲームに出場すると述べました。カービルのオイラーズのキャンプは昨日雨になりましたが、トレーニングは続行されました。軽傷者は数名いましたが、大したことはありません。ウォーリー レム コーチは、これまでのト
はい、完了しまし
Roger, Sequence time 
روجر. لا أتوقع أن أنتهي 
आपकी आवाज बहु
Roger. Où est-ce qu
Je commence à distinguer ce qui me semble être… oui, il s'agit très clairement d'une formation nuageuse égaleme
ヨー2
أبولو ١١، هذه هيوستن. لم نلحظ أي تغيير في الإشارة الوا
Ok, Acquario. L'ultimo blocco che ho per 
好的。我们的检查清单上“所有喷流”这一项被划掉了，取而代
好的，杰克。明白了。问个问题：如果你用望远镜看，能看到彗
جولدستون، هذه هي هيوست
D'accord. Nous ne le recevons pas encore, 11, bien que nous ayons confirmé la présence de votre porteuse FM en liaison
Mucheaから7つ。血圧をもう1
Ich habe es versäu
Gemini VIII, ti parle
Roger. Ici Friendship Seven. Le rapport de trente minutes se poursuit. La pression cabine est de 5,6 et se maintient. La température cabine est de 95 degrés et diminue lentement. L'humidité relative est de 20 %, la quantité de réfrigérant est de 67 %, et la température ambiante de la combinaison est de 68 degrés. La pression est de 5,8. La température de la vapeur est de 47 degrés, et je la réduis encore un peu. Le taux d'oxygène est de 68 à 100 %; l'intensité est de 22 ampères; les tensio
Я
これはかなり面倒なことだと分かっていますが、それでも結局は湿気などがた
吉姆，你刚才说到哪儿了？我们还没把你调到高增益模式。我们还在观察你
로저. 공보실의 속보입니다. 아폴로 11호는 여전히 전 세계 뉴스의 중심을 차지하고 있습니다. 중국, 북한, 북베트남, 알바니아 단 네 나라만이 아직 자국민에게 당신의 달 착륙 소식을 알리지 않았습니다. 한 기자는 당신의 성공을 어떻게 표현해야 할지 더 이상 모르겠다고 했습니다. 오늘 저녁, 닉슨 대통령은 워싱턴에서 열리는 올스타 야구 경기를 관람할 예정입니다. 경기가 끝난 후, 그는 태평양 회수 지역으로 출발합니다. 수요일 저녁, 그는 헬리콥터를 타고 존스턴 섬
ठीक है, वैंस। हम सोलो बुक और फ्लाइट प्लान में किए गए बदलावों की कॉपी बनाने के लिए
Hey James. Hier ist Shakey, 
Roger. Normalmente, Jim, viene fatto automaticamente; e se avessi eseguito i passaggi esattamente come previsto, sarebbe 
روجر. في آخر ليلة لي، نمت أربع ساعات، معظمها نوم عميق ومريح. كانت وجبتي الأخيرة عبارة عن مكعبات الفول السوداني، وعصير برتقال، وشطائر، وكوكتيل فواكه، وهذا كل شيء... شربت حوالي ست رشفات من الماء مع تلك الوجبة، وأنا الآن أستعد لتناول وجبة خفيفة من ال
У меня горит инд
アポロ11号、ヒューストンです。中間軌道からの観測に基づき、ガンマはマイナス6.57です。ただし、これは暫定的な値です。もう少し追跡すれば、軌道に乗れるようになり、軌道上に調整できると考えています。軌道のほぼ中央に位置しており、状況は良好です。就寝の数時間前に進入PADをお送りします。広報担当から、あなたの飛行に関するニュース以外の見出しをいくつかお伝えします。あなたは依然としてニュースを独占していますね。しかし、他にも興味深いニュースがあります。先ほどもお伝えしたように、オール
Roger. Comme v
Okay. We've completed the dump, and the tape recorder's back to you. You can use it any way you want. We may want to dump that thing again, and if we do we'll go ahead and use the same information unless you have something else that you specifically wanted to put on there later. Listening to the voice quality - it sounds real good. We're coming up on a midcourse 4 and right now it's - talking about doing it on time, and you can anticipate the burn in the neighborhood of 3 foot per second. We're considering and would like for you to think about the possibility o
"Y"자형 커넥터가 필요하세요? 제가 하셀블라드에서 이
Apollo 8, Houston. Mentre ti prepari per la tua missione,
حسنًا. ثاني أكسيد الكربون. مستوى ثاني أكسيد الكربون لدينا يرتفع. كان لدينا ضوء وض
पते 25,
الكاميرا في وضعية مثالية. لقطات رائعة لمكتب الأرصاد الجوية. أعتقد أنني استخدمت عدسة الكاميرا في هذه اللحظة. تصوير السحب بال
وتقري
Mentre mi guardo intorno, il contrasto, in generale, è *** generato completam
विल्को, अपोलो 8। सबसे पहले, यद
Roger, Muchea Cap Com. Laut und deutlich. Treibstoff: 62–85 Prozent; Sauerstoff: 65
ビル、待機。ビル、ダメだ。これで中間軌道修正2は中止になった。風速は毎秒1フィート未満だったので、実施しないことにした
لا نعتقد ذلك يا بيل. لم نتمكن من
Wir warten auf Ihren Besuch, Mar
好的。我给你发一个。控制模式是：自动后退；陀螺
Okay. I've just got to switch OMNIs. Okay. Reading the changes,
Roger. Ich verste
收到。您需要在自动选择开关上启用 Alfa 和 Bravo 四轴飞行器。禁用 Charlie 
غوايماس كاب كوم، أ
哦，这么说吧，我离开杰克的时候，弗雷德过来，我们
Roger, Apollo 11. Vu la façon dont on te
적어도 역사격이나 다른 모든 작전에 대한 자세 기준점
नहीं, 
حسنًا. نلاحظ أن زاوية المحور المركزي أصبحت مرتفعة قليلاً. يبدو أن نطاق الحركة يعمل بشكل جيد ضمن نطاقه، ولكن أردنا فقط إعلامك بأننا نراقب ال
네. 오늘 아침 뉴스는 그다지 특별한 게 없네요. 좀 조용합니다. 가장 큰 뉴스를 꼽자면 연휴 기간 사고 사망자 수인데, 물론 유쾌한 소식은 아니지만 전국적으로 233명이 사망했고, 그중 9명이 크리스마스 이브에 휴스턴에서 발생했습니다. 세계 뉴스에서는 또다시 유가족 소식이 화제가 되었습니다. 북
So we've got a little bit of a wobble on it. Of course, the co
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है कि अंतरिक्ष कार्यक्रम को लगभग सभी ने अत्याधुनिक इलेक्ट्रॉनिक उपकरणों से भरा हुआ ही समझा है, और निश्चित रूप से, इसमें बहुत कुछ ऐसा ही है। लेकिन मैंने सोचा कि मैं यहाँ कुछ और चीज़ें भी दिखाऊँगा। पहली चीज़ से आपको टैंक में बचे हुए पानी की मात्रा का बहुत सटीक माप मिल जाता है। हम इस थैली का उपयोग करेंगे जो मैं अभी दिखा रहा हूँ, टैंक में बचे हुए पानी को इकट्ठा करने के लिए और यह देखने के लिए कि वास्तव में कितना पानी बचा है, और उम्मीद है कि भविष्य के मिशनों में, इन इकाइयों के लिए अनुमत समय को सु
Okay, Fred. Als Nächstes sollst du bitte noch etwas graues Klebeband nehmen und die Hälfte der Auslassfläche jeder der blauen Düsen – der Kommandantendüse und der LMP-Düse – abkleben. Der Grund dafür ist, dass wir diesen Kreislauf durch die Öffnung des sekundären LiOH-Kanisters führen werden, wen
Ici Big Box 15
Nur zu, Housto
At this point in time, which is of course just p
If - I'm not sure right offhand what the angular size of the Moon is, Jack. If you can get it in the sextant; that's the best thing to do, but you may have t
네, 사실 그렇습니다. 완전히 끌 수 있어야 합
Roger, Apollo 8. Ihr Green Team verabschiedet sich in wenigen Minuten. Zuvor möchten Charlesworth und wir uns bei Ihnen bedanken un
로저. 빌에게 보내는 메시지입니다. 뒷면의 음질이 매우 좋지 않습니다. 저희는 이 음질을 사용할 수 없다고 판단하여, 중요한 의견은 모두 수기로 녹음하여 분실되지 않도록 하는 것이
हो सकता है कि हम उसे आज फिर स
VI, das ist VII. Ich glaube, es hat auch unse
わか
Команда «Перезагрузка» (COMMAND RESET) на борту «Аполлона-8» активировала движение ленты, теперь мы в
يرجى العلم أيضاً أن لديك
L'ho speso... con il funzionamento m
Roger. Un bel po' di rumore ora. Ho capito che ha
일단 그게 제대로 작동되면, 그 다음에 전원
That's coming from abo
Хорошо. Тут особо нечего рассказывать. Ну, давайте начнём со спорта, какого черта. «Астрос» выстояли со счётом 8:7, «Брейвс» набрали пять или шесть очков в девятом иннинге, но им это удалось; а в другой важной игре дня матч «Кабс» был отменён из-за дождя. У меня есть все остальные результаты, можете сказать, если хотите. В Маниле и других районах острова Лусон произошли землетрясения. Было три толчка, и здания тряслись около получаса, магнитуда была примерно 5 по шкале Рихтера. Хорошо, давайте посмотрим. «Битлз» объявили, что больше не будут выступ
Ja, das stimmt wirklich. Das stimmt wi
Apollo 
休斯顿，你们会复制我们的剩余
搬动东西确实很容易，不是吗？那
안테나 선택에서 재진입(REENTRY)을 선택했는데 이미 재진입 모드로 설정되어 있습니다. 추진제 게이지 RCS-B도 이미 B로 설정되어 있고요. 양(Quantity)은 꺼짐(OFF)으로 되어 있습니다. 역추진 자세 표시(Indicate Retro Attitude)를 하려면... 아마 그쪽에 뭔가
روجر، إذا كان لديك وقت ف
Ты выходишь неуверенно. У меня не совсем получилос
좋아요, 리밋 사이클이 꺼졌습니
It looks like in our power-down (illegible) we're still pulling just a little less than 11 amps. We've got 10 on no. 1 and a little less than 11 on no. 2. The tether - the location of the tether or the umbilical restraint on the outside hatch made it rather difficult to do any EVA work as far as free tether aerodynamics out in front of the spacecraft. Whenever I'd be operating out in that area, the tether would - when it would come to its end would start me back and the reaction would carry me back up towards the - over the spacecraft and back toward the adapter section. That's why I kept going out of sight during my maneuvering out there up above the windows, and then drifting back toward the back of the spacecraft. I continually had to keep pulling myself to get out in the front part of the spacecraft. I wasn't satisfied with the pictures that I was getting. It was rather difficult to keep any of the lanyards that I had on... I had the lanyard on the gun and the tether and umbilical that I was on, and several other miscellaneous type lanyards flailing around and it was difficult to keep them from in front of the camera. You'll notice that perhaps in the pictures that I'll be moving my arms rapidly. I kept trying to move them out of the way so that I could take a picture. I'd say they were in front of me probably about 50 or 60 percent of the time; and the other percent of the time I was not in as good a position as I would like to be. I think I probably took in the neighborhood of a dozen pictures. It does seem quite easy to operate, even just with the tether out t
フレッド、了解。機動目標はPCプラス2、今回はMPL（高度制限）です。そして、079、27、4013、プラス08144、マイナス00443、マイナス02226、遠地点はN/A、近地点はプラス00205、08455、420、268、261、プラス08155、マイナス00443、マイナス02187、はN/Aです。GDAは前回の燃焼からそのままで問題ありませんが、ピッチは5.85、ロール時は6.74です。アレージは10秒間2ジェット噴射です。スロットルは5秒間10%、21秒間40%、残りはフルス
Roger, Apollo 8. Laut und deutlich jetzt. Sind Sie bereit zu empfa
Roger, this is Friendship
알겠습니
Apollo 8. Houston. Ho un punteggio per voi. Oakland 41, Kansas City 6 è il punteggio finale. 41 a 6, Oakland. Stiamo cercando di mandarvi qualche comunicato stampa. Immagino che scopriremo che la messa in scena televisiva è stata probabilmente la notizia più importante della giorn
По сообщению Associated Press, американцы наблюдали за рождественской мессой Папы Павла в Италии, а европейцы увидели рождественское поздравление с «Аполлона-8» через самый мощный из когда-либо за
C'est bon, c'est parti! Huntsville indique que votre ch
और एक बार फिर, हमें थोड़ा सा नज़रिया बदलने की ज़रूरत है। हमारी पृथ्वी ऊपर और दाईं ओर गायब हो रही है। हमारी पृथ्वी और आपकी पृथ्वी। गलत 
ठीक है... थोड़ा सा ऊपर, बस थोड़ा
Bien r
로저,
Roger, ich habe ein Kartenupdate. Es ist GMT 10:17:49. Aufstei
你做得很好。吉姆，我们在这里对你平台的加速
Bene. Questo è un 9, /: 45597, meno 040, più 157, più 34188, meno 01353, più 00780 180 008 001, November Alfa, più 00187 34223 313 34021 42 0898 253 033, giù 131, sinistra 28, più 0758, meno 16500 12987 36277; stella primaria Sirio, secondaria Rigel, 129 155 010; quattro quadranti, 15 secondi, ullage, orizzonti sulla linea della finestra di 1,2 gradi a T meno 3; usare la procedura ad alta velocità con meno Mike Alfa. Dopo aver esaminato i dati di combustione delle tue precedenti accensioni, sembra che le prestazioni del motore dovrebbero darci u
Okay. Real fine. We're ready to talk in some more detail about the alinement procedures, the powerup procedures, and so forth, but why don't we give you a few minutes to diges
了解。六分儀の星、12 1037 211、地球の中心は下063、右23 プラス1068 マイナス16500 12505 35061、北に星を配置、ロ
우리는 그것
Ro
七号，这里是广州通信技术学院。
收到。没错。在步骤 5 中，执行步骤 5。在“主乙二醇环活化”下，步骤 1，第 1 行，“CB(16): 显示 - 关闭”。这是一个可选步骤；您可以选择启用它。省略步骤 1 和步骤 2 的其余部分。执行步骤 3
好的，巴兹。第一点是，我们有迹象表明你的着陆点斜视图位置不正确。请你检查一下，我们认为中等比例尺的着陆点斜视图收在月球地标图册里。我们认为大比例尺的着陆点斜视图
Okay. Jack, 1-A zeigt den Wert 0 (untere Skala) an; 1-B zeigt 3,45 an. Okay
غوايماس كاب كوم، غوايماس كاب كوم، هذا سيجما سفن. 
ゲージ相関レポートが完
Роджер, Gemini 4, хирург RKV. Ещё 
Понял. Далее, остановите пассивное терморегулирование при углах наклона подвеса 224, рыскания 020, кре
11, Ho
こんにちは、水瓶座さん。はっきりと聞こえます。ど
Роджер. Начнём с мировых новостей. Всеобщие поздравления американским астронавтам «Аполлона-8» и надежды на международное сотрудничество в освоении космоса сопровождались рождественскими посланиями, разосланными по всему миру, пока крошечный космический корабль вращался вокруг Луны. Даже в коммунистическом мире царил энтузиазм по поводу первого полёта человека на Луну. В Москве советский учёный Анатолий Бесаранов вспомнил, что его страна и Соединённые Штаты уже обменивались знаниями о космосе, и предсказал, что полёт «Аполлона-8» приведёт к дальнейшему сотрудничеству. На Кубе радио Гаваны ретранслировало программу «Голоса Америки», чтобы рассказать слушателям о речи «Аполлона-8». Представители «Голоса» заявили, что это был первый случай, когда программы американских агентств транслировались по радио Гаваны. Чехословакия наблюдала за полётом на Луну благодаря обширному телевизионному освещению; а в Будапеште, Венгрия, в поездах и автобусах почти ни о чём другом не говорили. В некоммунистическом мире офисные работники и покупатели рождественских подарков затаили дыхание, наблюдая за подготовкой космического корабля к старту. Французы на улицах восхваляли американские технологии и космический подвиг, а некоторые зрители, смотрящие по телевизору лунные фотографии, скандировали «Великолепно!». В Лондоне толпы покупателей, покупающих рождественские подарки, заполнили
请
حسنًا، عندما كنت في الطابق العلوي قبل قليل، لاحظت ما بدا أنه فتحة تهوية جديدة قادمة من أسفل وحدة الخدمة. لاحظت ذلك من النافذة رقم 1، ورأيت أيضًا قطعة معدنية - قطعة معدنية سائبة مربعة الشكل تقريب
まあ、組合カードを持ってないとダメだよね。あまり文句は言えない
除了机舱外，我们没有其他地方可以放置氧气。我们刚刚完成了高流
Yaw and let's take a picture of the Big Bend. Can you? Here, let me see if I can 
那是老款的南冕座星，显示得非常清晰，还有努基星。南冕座星就在它应该在的航线上。我读到的是0度偏航，5度左滚，处于反航向。我真想知道为什么这么复杂。在那几个家伙上方，我应该还能看到另一个明亮的星体。那一定是，一定是牛郎星。很好。你甚至会感觉这次飞行你并没有真正飞越澳大利亚。好的。现在让我们看看，我们已经完成了对那几个家伙的偏航检查，他们即将
好了，各位机组人员。我现在唯一要告诉你们的就是起飞后35小时的发射台位置更新。这是我们昨天给你们的发射台位置的变更。更新的原因是为了避开太平洋中部着陆区在70小时的天气状况，因为70小时是该发射台的返回时间。如果你们有任何疑问，我们预计在任务结束阶
Okay. Jim is going to take a shot of us from the lower equipment bay, and then we have to get back to our passive thermal control in the bar-b-que
Copy T1: 122 16 05. T2: 122 21 11, 6 miles north, NOUN 89 is plus 01243, plus 11844, minu
Мне неприятно это говорить, Фрэнк, потому что Джим, вероятно, уже не сможет носить свой коммуникационный жилет, но этот последний набор отметок накладывает ваш вектор состояния п
حسنًا. هذه هي جميع التغييرات التي أجريناها على قائمة التحقق هنا. لدي بعض 
Ricevuto
Okay, on comparing the flight of 13 to Apollo 8, lift-off was about the same amount of vibration as I noticed on 8, but at the beginning of the flight, there was less of the sideways motion than we experienced on Apollo 8. The S-IC separation felt more violent on 13 than it did on 8, maybe that's because I was in a different seat, I don't know. But there was about three sharp transients of the cut-off and a couple of big bangs where we were thrown backwards long
2:26. Regolare i girosc
음, 걔네들은 좀 과묵한 녀석들이에요. 말을 별로 안 하고 그냥 냠냠 먹을 
아폴로 8호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 모든 시스템이 정상 작동합니다. 96
In the LM, this cover for the camera. Think about that for a while - I got it loaded, and I don't see any need to ever change it. If it works now 
Houston, Columbia. I say again: I did not see them. AUTO optics pointed at a spot very close to the coordinates which you gave me, so I picked out a tiny crater in that area and marked on it, so that I'll be able to have repeatable data, but I was still unable t
Aller
Roger. Houston, hier spricht Eagle. Ich wünschte, wir hätten auch so ein Optiksystem. Ich werde Mike davon erzähle
نعم. هاتان هما خريطت
好的。我们复制 39.3 和 1.20。吉姆，我还有一件事要告诉你。大约 45 分钟后，下降气瓶上的水量警告灯会亮起。这是预期的。它会在水量降至 16% 时亮起。这没问题，因为我们打算把气瓶里的水全部用完，只是为了演练。要重置指示灯，只需在面板 2 上将 O2 H2O QUANTITY MONITOR 设置为 CAUTION/WARNING RESET 
确实如此。感觉就像
Roger. C'est exact. À l'étape 5, effectuez l'étape 5. Sous « Activation de la boucle glycolique primaire », étape 1, ligne 
了解
В 
حسنًا. أنا الآن في الوضع التلقائي. كل شيء يعمل بشكل مثالي. مفتاح المناورة مُطفأ. جميع الأنظمة تعمل بش
Мы не увидим, как Земля поднимется над горизонтом
Ok, sono tre minuti e dieci secondi di O2 ad alta frequenza. Non voglio rimanere lì per cinque minuti. Credo che sia più di quanto uno possa sopportare. La temperatura di in
Houston, Apollo 11. Konnten Sie vor dem Einsetzen des Sauerstoffs einen Unterschied im N2-Druck feststellen? Mir s
أ
了解、ジム。マニューバパッド：目的はミッドコース7。これはN/A。HAはN/A。HPはプラス0020.5。DE
La luna è appena tramontata. E vedo dei fulmini in vista su questa z
حسنًا. سنقوم بضبط نظام الملاحة هنا في غ
네. 몇 가지 사항이 있습니다. 첫째, 0.3도 회전율을 얻으려면 어젯밤과 같이 R1이 375 - 0
好的，迈克。当然，这是在G&N系统和发动机都出现故障，需要你进行恒
Vous voulez ramener toute l
Okay, Buzz. Zu den Punkten in deinem Flugplan, zunächst ein paar Aktualisierungen. Wir haben den Mittelkurs 6 gestrichen. Bleib einfach auf Kurs. Ich gebe dir heute Morgen etwas mehr Zeit. Zweitens: Wir sind bereit für eine BATT-B-Ladung, wann immer du sie einsetzen möchtest. Drittens: Wir hätten diesmal eine etwas andere Idee für die Abwasserentsorgung. Wir möchten sie an unseren Markierungen vom Boden aus durchführen. Die Flugbahn ist etwas unebe
Le modifiche sono le seguenti, tutte nella colonna A: numero 12, la
Okay. Immagino che, se Jack non riesce a vedere le stelle con questa posizione dopo avergli fornito gli angoli di allineamento grossolani, non ti leggeremo gli angoli del nostro gimbal e non ti chiederemo di calcolare un angolo bersaglio per Jack, ma vuoi che lui osservi la Lun
اقترب
حسنًا. +90: /G&N، 63825، -1.54، +1.
罗杰……电脑目前处于关机
बैक प्रेशर वाल्व बंद हो गया है, और 
Перед нами красивый и интересный горизонт. Солнце находится слева, примерно под углом 40 градусов. Видна тёмная линия поверхности З
270. 저
Роджер. Начнём с мировых новостей. Всеобщие поздравления американским астронавтам «Аполлона-8» и надежды на международное сотрудничество в освоении космоса сопровождались рождественскими посланиями, разосланными по всему миру, пока крошечный космический корабль вращался вокруг Луны. Даже в коммунистическом мире царил энтузиазм по поводу первого полёта человека на Луну. В Москве советский учёный Анатолий Бесаранов вспомнил, что его страна и Соединённые Штаты уже обменивались знаниями о космосе, и предсказал, что полёт «Аполлона-8» приведёт к дальнейшему сотрудничеству. На Кубе радио Гаваны ретранслировало программу «Голоса Америки», чтобы рассказать слушателям о речи «Аполлона-8». Представители «Голоса» заявили, что это был первый случай, когда программы американских агентств транслировались по радио Гаваны. Чехословакия наблюдала за полётом на Луну благодаря обширному телевизионному освещению; а в Будапеште, Венгрия, в поездах и автобусах почти ни о чём другом не говорили. В некоммунистическом мире офисные работники и покупатели рождественских подарков затаили дыхание, наблюдая за подготовкой космического корабля к старту. Французы на улицах восхваляли американские технологии и космический подвиг, а некоторые зрители, смотрящие по телевизору лунные фотографии, скандировали «Великолепно!». В Лондоне толпы покупателей, покупающих рождественские подарки, заполнили магазины и пабы, чтобы посмотреть телевизионные фотографии лунных кратеров. Ведущий британский астроном-космонавт Бернард Ловелл, который еще несколько нед
Oui, vous m'avez enlevé les mots de la bouch
Hawaii, Houston CAP COM. I would l
Das ist alles, was Sie eingegeben ha
Cela fait 2, Bravo lit - oh, 
Okay. Warten Sie eine Minute, 
Fred, just wanted to let you know in advance that we're coming up on the redline CO2 value for the secondary canister, and we expect to get there in something like a half hour, at which time we'll be asking you to switch over to the command module canisters. I have the re
All right. Under " checks," the fourth line down says "MANUAL ATTITUDE, three, to MINIMUM IMPULSE." We'll have to use "ACCEL COMMAND" and the reason for that, Jack, is we
REGs A und B werden g
أبولو ١١، هيوستن. 
알겠습니다. 잘 들었습니다. 필요한 정보를 가지고 있습니다. 복사
Roger. We are going to be doing a ra
ああ、しまった。このピッチはダメだ。32ピッチか？目指すは315ピッチか。よし。彼らは
سيجما سفن، هذا مركز اتصالات واترتون كاب كوم على تردد HF. إذا كنت تسمعني، فإن قيادة كيب فلايت تطلب منك الانتقال إلى تردد UHF، ومحاولة الاتص
Roger, Jim. We think it is going to be required prior to the next se
जेमिनी 4, ह्यूस्टन कैप कॉम। आपकी बात समझ में नहीं आ रही है, लगता है आप हमारी बात ठ
罗杰，休
Ah, Roger.
연소 시험에 가까워짐에 따라 지난번 연소 시험 때와 동일한 점검 절차를 거쳐야 합니다. 즉, 모든 장비
A little bit more. Stop her right there and hold it. It keeps slipping up a little bi
Roger. Kopiert. Raus
Je v
مرحباً كانتون. مرحباً كانتون، يا صداقة سبعة. 
Oh, we're taking stock of how much we got there, maybe sort of think about rationing some of it. I mean just to make sure we've got enough to last us and that we get enough water out. I'd hate to run out of water on the last day. Take a look and see how much we got, and fill them up and just hold them there. Yes, and I'll tell you the stuff that's g
미안해요, 빌. 약속을 지키지 못했네요. 다
Рог. Я не уверен, в чем был
ठीक है। हम एचएफ टे
I took picture 4, - 4a at, which 
Roger. Non capisco gli effetti dell'oculogir
Роджер, 11. Мы хотели бы в ближайшее время в удобное для вас время произвести сброс сточных вод. Конкретное время не запланировано. В момент коррекции траектории 3, примерно в 53:55, мы удаляем коррекцию траектории 3 и все связанные с ней элементы. Для вашей информации, расчетное значение скорости вращения для коррекции траектории 3 составило восемь десятых фута в секунду, то есть 0,8 фута в секунду. Если мы решим выполнить коррекцию траектории 4, то скорость вращения для коррекции траектории 4 составит 2,0 фута в секунду. В 53 часа у нас будет перенастройка. Мы просим вас сделать это
कैलिफ़ोर्निया देखने में सुंदर लगता है। सैन जोकिन घाटी एक गहरे रंग के धब्बे की तरह दिखती है, जिसके दोनों ओर हल्का भूरा रंग है। इसे देखकर पता नहीं चलता कि यह हरा है। यह कुछ-कुछ गहरे भूरे रंग का 
Gemini 4, wir werden Sie einige Zeit nach dem Überflug über die USA über die Bahnberechnun
ठीक है, मेरे कार्ड पर वो जानकारी 
네, 빌, 여기까지는 
Хорошо. Обнов
D'accord. C'est ex
حسنًا. لقد انتهينا من عملية التفريغ، وجهاز التسجيل مُعاد إليك. يمكنك استخدامه كما تشاء. قد نرغب في تفريغه مرة أخرى، وفي هذه الحالة سنستخدم نفس المعلومات ما لم يكن لديك بيانات أخرى ترغب في إضافتها لاحقًا. جودة الصوت ممتازة. نحن نقترب من المرحلة الرابعة من المسار، ونتحدث الآن ع
休斯顿，
Start nach den Regenfällen in Houston
Beautiful, Frank. I'm reading you loud and clear. Ho
हम सहमत हैं, पृष्ठ
Okay, Jack. Just for curiosity's sake, does have any info
Gemini 4，休斯顿 CAP
Okay. Nach PC + 2 gibt es keine Trimmvorgaben mehr. Sollte es währ
لقد فهمت كلامك بوضوح تام؛ يبدو أن اتصال
收到。沃利，你现在高频信号很清晰
ठीक है। बहुत-बहुत धन्यवाद। हमारे जायरो में सबसे ज़्यादा विचलन X-GYRO पर 0.03 डिग्री प्रति घंटा है। PIPA में, Y-PIPA में सबसे ज़्यादा विचलन 0.006 फीट प्रति सेकंड है, इसलिए इसे थोड़ा और बेहतर करने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। जायरो और एक्सेलेरोमीटर दोनों पर अधिकतम विचलन लगभग एक
ロジャー、ヒューストン。4/45695、マイナス053、プラス141、プラス30627、マイナス00625、プラス00577 180 018 001、NA、プラス00188 30639 256 30452 40 2730
Хорошо, Водолей. Теперь ты можешь установить низкую скорость передачи данных, у
Ok. Rileviamo la larghezza del Golfo Persico e credo che tutto ciò che posso darvi di prima mano sia un singolo dato isolato, ovvero che stamattina qui a Houston era sereno. È un'osservazione piuttosto localizzata. A causa del vostro scarico di acque reflue, sembra che la modalità sia stata in qualche modo alterata. Al momento vi mostriamo circa 20 gradi di beccheggio e circa 6 gradi di imbardata, che è significativamente maggiore, circa il doppio, poco più del doppio della deviazione che avevate prima dello scarico di acque reflue
कमांड मॉड्यूल के निचले हिस्से स
Ok. Credo che fi
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。还有2分钟就到了。我们对主蒸发器进行了很好的维修，目
Ah! Vedi come è tutto sp
That's affirmative. We have it up on the Eidephor now. The focus is 
Okay. Die ersten beiden Zeilen sind in Ordnung. CB – dritte Zeile, CB(11) und (16): STAB/KONTR
Roger. Osserverò, mi mu
ठीक है, आप उन्हें बता सकते हैं कि, अगर उन्
Роджер. Скоро будет 30-минутный отчёт. Я проверил движения головы, и это никак на меня не повлияло. Прошёл тест на 
Роджер: Объявлена ​​готовность через 10 минут. Шлем закрыт. Всё в порядке, чувствую себя отличн
로저. 꺼졌어, 엘리엇. DCS 플랫폼 모드 주 
アポロ11号、こちらヒューストンです。お時間がありましたら、
ヒューストン、間もなく側面の窓からハッチの窓へ移動し
Okay. Let's just go through our procedures a litt
ما يسمى بقفزة الكنغر فعال ب
まあ、そのときはあれを口の中に
ठीक है। मेरे दाईं ओर पाइरेनीज़ पर्वत श्रृंखला दिख
알겠
CSQ
はい、見えています。地球の境界線に近い部分は見えていません。地球の暗い部分は、
D'accord. Je commence à adopter la bonne attitude, je c
Let's check and see if we actually do get yaw out of these. They are tending to go up in relation to me, rather t
حسنًا. لقد راجعنا وقتك، والرقم 16 في إدخالك صحيح. سنزودك بإدخال مُحدّث في الوقت المُجدول. في الوقت نفسه، سنزودك بتحديث لمتجهات حالتك. كان تصحيح المسار رقم 7 أقل من سبعة أعشار قدم في الثانية، ولن نقوم بتنفيذه. لديك موعد مُجدول في وقت غير مطلوب. الأمر متروك لك. مع ذلك، إذا قررت حذفه، فسيظل الفحص الذاتي واختبار ضوء الحالة مطلوبي
13, Хью
Ricevuto, ripeto. Dalle 05:56 alle 06:16, controllo della navigazione orbi
Roger. Es dauert wohl noch 10 oder 
そしてもちろん、旋回する準備ができたら、注意と警告に戻り、「EN
حسنًا. الآن أستخدم القمر الموجود على يساري، وهو حلٌّ ممتاز. سأقوم بتغطية مؤشر الوضعية، ويمكنك مراقبة الانحراف. سأترك الجيروسكوبات حرة، محاولًا اختيار وضع التحكم الإلكتروني المنخفض. سأضع القمر في منتصف النافذة أولًا، مع تثبيت التحكم في الميل والدوران، ثم سأعيد القمر إلى مكانه الصحيح. يقترب القمر من منتصف النافذة الآن. حسنًا، سأوقفه هنا، وسنُفعِّل التحكم في الدوران لتحقيق التوازن. الآن، سأحصل على دوران صفري. لقد تجاوزت القمر، وألتقط الآن كوكب عطارد الساطع، وهو بعيد قليلًا إلى اليمين. الآن، لنُجرِّب ونرى كم درجة انحر
13، هيوستن. نلاحظ اقترابك من مشكلة قفل الكاميرا. نرجو منك رفع جميع وحدات الكاميرا الربا
حس
こんにちは、トランクウ
Weißt du, Jack, mi
好的，听起来不错。因为我不知道我刚才讲得你一头雾水。好的，面板 4；电信，组 1，至 AC1。在面板 5 上，关闭以下线路：压力组 1，主 B；压力组 2，主 B；温度，主 B；二次回路传感器，主 B；散热器控制/加热器，主 B；电池继电器
Roger, Frank. What w
Roger. Ca
Ja
Abbiamo ricevuto la conferma della pressione sanguigna. Siamo in attesa del tuo resoconto alimentare. Hai mangiato qualcosa dopo il 
この時点で、スーツの温度を心配しながらコックピットを掃除していたことにお気づきかと思います。ようやく温度が下がり、大丈夫だと確信
Seg
好的。我打算再四处搜寻一下，看看能不能找到它们。猎户座在我左边一点，离这里很近——哦，找到了。天
Houston, Apollo 11. Sto osservando quella nube attorno al Pakistan attraverso il sestante, e sembra essere una singola cellula nelle ul
Torno qui. P Davanti al finestrino. P Davanti a
Okay. Reach up here and give me t
फि
Sembra così triste, mi resta poco meno di mezz'ora per giocare con
Хорошо. Вы получите своё первыми. Давайте будем пол
Jim, juste un point à méditer pour toi et Fred, au cas où vous n'aurie
제가 어떻게 
네, 맞습니다. 제가 보고 있는 사진에서 보니 모든 배선이 서로 연결되어 있고, 중앙 벨트, 방향지시등 컨디셔너로 연
こちらはヒューストンです。バズの右手が見えます。少しピントがずれていますね。ケーブルを引き抜いた時の手の位置から、たぶん8インチから1フィートくらい後ろくらいにピントを合わせていたと思います
バズ、了解しました。2つのサンプルの違いはわずかで、どちらの場合も約5cmほどまでは問題なく打ち込んだものの、その後、合計20cmか23cmの深さまで打ち込むためにかなり激しくハンマーで打ち続けなければならなかった、そしてその時点でもロッドは垂直に立っていられず、そこまで打ち込んだ後でも倒れそうになった、とおっしゃってい
Yes. For your information, Jim, I don't know whether you heard that originally, but that 
わかった。わかった。ところ
はい。全員チェックしましたか？ ― 気に入らない人が一人いるんで
You got i
La temp
네, 저희는 예상보다 화재가 더 오래 지속된 것 
Stiam
Хорошо. Ваш козыре
ومن الأمور الرائعة يا جاك، خاصةً بالنسبة لشخص مبتدئ مثلي، سهولة الحركة هنا. وكما تعلم من عملك في محاكي وحدة القيادة، فإن انعدام الجاذبية يُعدّ ميزةً كبيرة. لأنك تشعر بضيق المساحة عند مستوى جاذبية واحد، ما يجعل الحركة صعبةً للغاية، بينما الحركة سهلة في هذه البيئة. وكما ترى، كان المكان نظيفًا، وجدتُ بعض الحلقات المعدنية المفكوكة، وغطاءً بلاستيكيًا صغيرًا لكاميرا التسلسل كان قد انفصل ووجدته عالقًا بجوار لوحة ED. حسنًا. الآن، يقف جيم أسفل ما يبدو أنه علبة. ولتوضيح الأمر للجميع، يوجد داخل هذه العلبة محرك الصعود، حيث يمكنك رؤية يدي موضوعةً فوقه الآن، وهو المحرك الذي نستخدمه للانطلاق من القمر. بجوار غطاء المحرك مباشرةً، أضع يدي الآن على صندوق أبيض سبق عرضه. هذا الصندوق هو حقيبة جيم، أو حقيبة الظهر التي ستزودنا بالأكسجين والماء للتبريد أثناء وجودنا على سطح القمر. نأمل أن نستخدم هذا الجهاز لمدة أربع ساعات مُخطط لها، وربما تصل إلى خمس ساعات. 
Roger. On va vérifier la liaison montante. La transmission à la télé était… On aimerait recevoir e
They came - both came down here rubbing their hands, shivering. It'
罗杰。过去两天我们这里一直有点雷暴天气
مرحباً يا هيوستن. مرحباً يا
没问题。你以后还会给A充
11, Хьюстон. На ваших переклю
Ok. Ho alcuni dettagli sul piano di volo per voi, come segue. Naturalmente, dato che non c'è -3, cancellerete tutte le informazioni relative al 3 di metà percorso, incluso il - il, che viene chiamato a circa 54-1/2, e lo rimanderemo a più tardi, cosa che vi - cosa che vi dirò - cosa che vi dirò - cosa che vi dirò tra un minuto. Ok. Quindi voi - vogliamo spostare la carica della batteria di 3 ore a circ
天快黑了。吉姆，我这里也黑了。咱们找个晚上或者白天看看我们能看到什么，看不到
Roger, bitte richte 
Sì, è piuttosto bello. Niente male. Hai ragione, non l'hai detto. Questa in cui ci troviamo è una bella, bella giostra, Vance. Ogni 10 m
わかりました。最初の星は26番星です。2セットの測定を行います。地球の地平線に近い位置で、26番星を使って測定します。次に、地球の地平線に近い位置で、16番星を使って
रॉजर। ह
Roger. Copied for the Height-Adjust GET of burn, 03 plus 03 plus 19; Delta-V, 0.8, duration, 0 plu
Je vais tenter le déploiement de la dérive.
Ricevuto. Ti ho letto forte e chiaro. Aggiornerò il tuo TR e ti trasmetterò un
了解、フレンドシップ
Хорошо. Ну, я почти готова это сделать. Когда будете готовы отпустить его на свободу, про
Oka
ああ、ここは順調に物事が進んでいるわ。彼と付き合うのはそんなに難し
Sì, dovrebbe essere in R-1. Un libro enorme, con un
Houston C
रॉजर। मुझ
Sì, signore. Glielo daremo tra poco. Inoltre, un piccolo aggiornamento sul piano di volo, Mike. Se... A pagina 3 113, puoi eliminare lo spurgo della cella a combustibile O2
ادعموا و
Да. Да, Джек, я отвечу ему на твой вопрос через минуту, но сделай так, чтобы первое впечатление Джека было таким: интенсивность боли уже не та, что была сразу после нашей аварии. И я должен с этим согласиться. Я 
روجر. لقد أرسلتُ أمر T/M الخاص بك، في الوقت الفعلي، وقد استلمناه. نحن نستقبل أمر T/M الخاص ب
Ça a l'air d'un
Read y
はい、13番。こちらはヒューストンです。G&Cチェックリストのピンクのページ1～5をご覧ください。デルタが10アンペアにな
Kabinendruck und Kabinenhöhenmesser stimmen in der Höhe überein. Müsste jetzt 13.000 Fuß sein. Markierung 1
Okay. Wir haben alle möglichen Szenarien durchgespielt. Der schlimmste Fall, den wir uns vorstellen konnten, ist Ihre 3-Sigma-Fehlerdistanz – im schlimmsten Fall 70 Seemeilen. Das sind 70. Wir möchten, dass Sie ein OAMS-Rückwärtsmanöver durchführen; anschließend zünden wir die Bremsrakete manuell, natürlich ohne Computer. Wir wünschen uns einen rollenden Wiedereintritt ohne Auftrieb. Genau, rollender Wiedereintritt ohne Auftrieb. Der Grund für die Entscheidung für den rollenden Wiedereintri
At about 5:33, jus
ठीक है... टी/एम के 
Сложно сказать, какой темп можно считать разумным. Думаю, сейча
好了，我已经全部复制好了。我们在这里向你展示地面上的“GO”标
Okay, Vance. Wir sind fast soweit, die Änderungen im Solo-Buch und im Flugplan zu übernehmen, und sobald deine Unterlagen fertig sind, nehmen wir sie. Die Vorverlegung der Schlafenszeit ist in Ord
マスターアラームが再びオンになりました。安定して点灯しているので、このままにしておきます。なぜ電源が入ったのか分かりません…ああ、そうか
Ok, allora saltiamo a circa 159:28. Cancella "Manovr
알겠습니다. 저희 NOUN 49는 다음과 같이 읽고 있습니다: 레지스터 1, 플러스 08793; 레지
अपोलो 8, अपोलो 8। आप पायरो आर्म के लिए तैयार हैं। सब कुछ ठीक लग र
燃料は52〜45パーセント、酸
休斯顿的朋友们，接下来我要给家里的孩子们，或者说给全世界所有的孩子们做一个小小的示范。我本来想教你们怎么用勺子喝水，但我怕勺子装得太满了，一不小心水就要溢出来了。孩子们，你们看到勺子上的
好的。面板 7 上，我们需要关闭电源、伺服电源 1 和 2、/GPI 电源
ハワイ、こちらはジェミニVIです。35度40秒のデータです。シータ6.4度、範囲115.58度、デルタV合計523度、デルタVI24
랑데부 레이더 자체 테스트가 완
好的，请您方便的时候进行一次客舱温度调查，并将结果记录在您的飞行日志中，以便飞行后查阅。我们需要客舱内的环境干球温度和湿球温度，以及潜水服进气口的干球温度和湿球温度。请取下蓝色喷嘴，直接检查氧气流量。如果可以，我们也需要舱门表面温度和侧壁表面温
Say again, please. Go ahead. We are 1
唉，我真不想这么说，就凭这单筒望远镜看到的，有个白点看起来像个
Roger. Rod and I got to
Ich glaube, du weißt ja, was bei euch alles los ist, und hier unten ist es ganz ruhig. Alle lächeln; der Weihnachtsmann war zu den meist
Bien reçu. Nous notons la charge de la batterie dès que possible, ainsi que l'assiette pour l'optique CAL: roulis 330,5, tangage 086,3 et lacet à zéro. L'assiette prévue dans le plan de vol est correcte; je prends note de la charge de la batterie. Rapport d'état de 
13번, 휴스턴입니다. 쿼드 C와 D는 비활
Houston, we had a momentary O2 high flow, but we thi
시그마 세븐, 시그마 세븐, 여기는 워터타운 캡 컴입니다. 케이프 플라이트에서 
آه، كان الأمر فقط - أردنا منك إغلاق قاطع مستشعر ثاني أكسيد الكربون وإعطائنا قراءة من جهاز إيجل، هذا كل شيء. كولومبيا، هيوستن. لدينا توجيه ولاية لك إذا وافقت. ا
Die gesamte Nachthimmelsleuchte sieht aus wie ein Weg hinaus am Horiz
收到。你收到下行链路上的 NOUN 49 
و13، هيوستن. أوقات التهوية اسمية 
क्या प्रवेश के लिए न्यूमोग्राम रिपोर्ट अस्व
Я не понимаю... 
Durch die Zeitkorrelation ist zu viel rotes Licht im Cockpit. Venus steht ü
好的。断电后，我
ジョー、質問です。ジムが中間コースの進め方について話してくれたのですが、少し前にパワーアップ作業を行った際に、STAB/CONTROL ASAブレーカーを抜いてしまったんです。ASAのヒーターが壊れてしまったので、どうなっているのか気にな
ठीक है, 13. इस पर बहुत सारे लोग काम कर रहे हैं; जैसे ही हमें कोई जानकारी मिलेगी, हम आपको ब
よし。カメラをなくさないよ
Apollo 8, hier spricht Houston. Noch eine Minute; alle
Roger, Friend
Er sagt, er glaube, er kön
أبولو 8، هيوستن. تبدو زوايا REACQ سالبة 45 في الميل، موجبة 90 في الانحراف، وذلك بالن
Ich kann es nicht sehen. Oh ja, jetzt kann ich es ger
バッテリー C 37.1、PYRO バッテリー A と B は両方とも
收到。没错。但
रॉजर। उससे पूछो कि शेयर बाजार कैसा चल 
Segui l'ago, segui l'ago... Tog
Имеющееся у меня устройство для измерения звезд очень помогает подтвердить наличие звезд, но получить их из
As the booster departed us, you could see the fuel spraying out of the roll nozzle. As the booster tumbled around, mostly in a plane that would be perpendicular to a line through the major axis of the spacecraft to the booster, you could see the long flowing tail that came out of it. I'm going to draw a short little picture of that on my flight plan. There was deb
乔，我们
肯只是个普通人。这是他的替代品；这
There wasn't very much debris in the command module or the. We found very few loose particles of bolts, nuts, and screws and lint and thin
Стан
11、ヒューストン。12フィートのケーブルを使用する場合、カ
Выкл., центр, 
मुझे लगता है कि इस ट्रैकिंग कार्य में, विश्व मानचित्र और काहिरा-अलेक्जेंड्रिया क्षेत्र के छोटे मानचित्र का उपयोग करके, हम काहिरा हवाई अड्डे का पता लगाने में सक्षम थे। हालाँकि, मुझे हवाई अड्डा तब तक दिखाई नहीं दिया जब तक हम उससे लगभग 10° या 15° की दूरी पर नहीं पहु
Понял.
로저, 모
ठीक है। मैं बस नहीं कर सकता, है ना - मैं अपनी लिखावट नहीं पढ़ पा रहा हूँ, एसेंशियल 
收
D'accord, 
روجر. G&N: 62710، زائد 098، ناقص 019، 077 46 2248، زائد 32148، ناقص 00455، ناقص 10377، غير متوفر، 307، فيغا ودينيب، 243 183 012، لا يوجد فراغ، مو
Questa è l'Apollo 8, in diretta dalla Luna. Abbiamo dovuto cambiare te
वह 25
Rollen,
ああ、この地球がどんなふう
Роджер, Хьюстон. Это +90, как показано ниже: минус - вес составит +63531 минус 164 плюс 129 0041 74265 минус 04402 минус 0001 плюс 48387 178 169 359 плюс 00185 48587 603 48383. Информацию о секстант
Аврора Севен, ваша последняя запись была нечитаемой. Ваше состояние ухудшается, хотя и с перебоями. Я прочитаю время ретросеквенции вслепую. Зона 3 Дельта, 04 12 32, 04 12 32; Эхо 04 22 27; 3 Эхо 0
A un certo punto,
Вперед, 
Gee, I'm sorry, Fred. We're just not reading you right now. Maybe we'll hav
Aquarius, Houston. Entschuldigung, aber es gibt zu viele Hintergrundgeräusche, um Sie z
罗杰，比尔。我知道你们搅动了低温容器。上次我们检查时，管线温度非常好，温暖舒适。我们现在就
धन्यवाद महोदय। मैं नील और बज़ को बता
了解。こちらはフレンドシップ・セブンです。30分後の報告です。頭を動かしても吐き気や
Roger, Apollo 8
休斯顿，阿波罗1
Houston. Ora noto una piccola fluttuaz
계속하세
好的，这次看来我们可能真的需要预热了
알겠습니다. 요(YAW)는 0, 피치(PITCH)
Мой выбор — вернуться в EMU. Я уже непло
休斯顿，双子
Friendship Seven, Guaymas. Do you want your c
यूरी अलेक्सेयेविच, हम अभी इस रेडियो स्टेशन को बंकर में ले जा रहे हैं। इसलिए चैनल पर 5 मिनट का मौन रहेगा। निक
Roger. Das w
问你个问题，乔。吉姆一直在跟我讨论我们要在课程中途进行这项操作，之前我们启动的时候，把STAB/CONTROL ASA的断路器给拉断了。我想知道
Gemini 4, Carnarvon CAP COM. I updated your TR, they did not get a valid time in at the Cape. Y
للعلم، خلال آخر مرور لي عبر المنطقة الشاذ
- في الجزء الأوسط من الصفحة، يبدأ إيقاف التشغيل الطارئ، وسنقوم ب
Здравствуйте, «Аполлон-11». Хьюстон. Мы просим вас отключить нагреватели кислородного
알겠습니다. 백업 정렬
La lettura del valore di luce, per la pellicola in bianco e nero, è 13 per ASA 64. Imposto il valore di luce a 13. Scatto la foto numero 7 con filtro. Il continente sudamericano è difficile da fotografare a causa delle condizioni meteorologiche. Scatterò un panorama a quest'ora. A partire da quasi 8 ore. In effetti, sarà così. MARKT, 7, 8, 9 fotografie in bianco e nero, pellicola in bianco e nero. Dieci fotografie, pellicola in bianco e nero. Gli scatti vengono eseguiti a 250 5.6 (1/250 di secondo e f5.6) all'infinito. Scatto la foto numero 11, guardando a sinistra. Sto attraversando il continente sudamericano a questo punto. Ho un grande fiume in vista. Scatto una foto, con la fotocamera rivolta verso il basso il 
不。我们——收到。我们很想知道您的航班——您的航线调整情况如何，因为我们获得了每秒2英尺的
Да, они движутся иначе, чем я, потому что кружатся вокруг 
确认无误。您已获准执行 BA
Фред, у тебя там что-нибудь сработало в плане главных сигнализаций при
हमारे अवशेष शून्य हैं। शेष प्रणोदक की मात्रा 87.5 ह
罗杰，查理。我想向你们汇
Roger. Bill hat seinen Kassettenrekorder wieder, und uns ist beim letzten Übertragen aufgefallen, dass di
太陽が背後にあれば、それが可能になる
Apollo 11, qui Houston. Pericynthion più 2 ore di 
我们只有一个问题，关于隧道排气阀。我们想知道，既然要打开隧道，然后正常加压，为什么还要等到ΔV大于1
تمهل قليلاً يا مايك؛ مهلاً، مهلاً، مهلاً مهلاً
نعم. الوضع: دوران 0 درجة، انحراف 2 درجة إلى اليمين، ميل -33 درجة. جميع المعدلات تشير إلى الصفر. أنا في وضع التشغيل حاليًا. لا تزال الساعة مضبوطة على وقت الرجوع، لوقت الرجوع 04 + 32 + 28. لديّ أوقات الرجوع جيدة من برمودا. ضغط المقصورة ثابت عند 5.7. درجة حرارة هواء المقصورة 90 درجة. الرطوبة النسبية 30%. كمية سائل التبريد 68%. درجة حرارة بيئة البدلة 65. ضغط البدلة يشير إلى 5.8. درجة حرارة البخار على البدلة 60 درجة. أشعر براحة كبيرة. مع ذلك، لا أريد خفضها الآن. نسبة الأكسجين الأساسي 78%؛ الثانوي 102%. الح
哎，我再
In Reno, Nevada, schrieb ein kleiner Junge, weil sein Haus keinen Kamin hat, einen Brief an den Weihnachtsmann, c/o Lokalzeitung, mit der Bitte: „Würd
Okay, Jack. We don't want to bug you, but you ought to be thinking - or what your thoughts are concerning what the next burn will be
खैर
了解しました。ジム、燃料が少し残っているので、フライトプランで調整することにしました。これから8時間はホライゾン・スキャン・モードに切り替えてください。高度
यह ह्यूस्टन है। फिर से कहि
B; Дельта-V, 14,0; время работы двигателя, 0 плюс 24; рыскание 180, тангаж 0; Ядро 25, 00140; Ядра 26 и 27 равны нулю. 
Okay. Non sono d'accordo sulla quinta riga. Sembra che dovremmo tenere aperto il CONTROLL
ठीक है, जैक। हमारे पास मिडकोर्स 5 है: संज्ञा 33,;, लागू नहीं; HA लागू नहीं; साथ ही 0019.8, 0007.8, बर्न टाइम 0.15, पैड का शेष भाग, लाग
روجر. سأقرأ لك خمسة. كيف حال
スコッティ
Roger. Je 
إذا لم ي
짐, 송신을 시도하고 있다면, 전혀 알아들을 수 없어. 잡음만 들리고 
最終的にはフライト プランに従いますが、いくつかの項目については、順序の面で修正する必要
अगर इसके साथ कुछ पोर्क चॉप्स मिल जाएं तो
Voici Friendship Seven. J'ai presque atteint le point de demi-tour à nou
حسنًا، أبولو 8. لقد انتهينا من الاختبار الأول، وسنغير الآن وضع الإرسال إلى "أوامر الإرسال وتحديد المدى"، وسنع
로저. 해당 사항 없음, 플러스 00188 30193 25
ठीक है। वो आवाज़ एकदम साफ़ थी। जैसा कि आप जानते हैं, अभी हमा
你将舱室设置为 3.5。这样对
أنت جاهز. المنطقة 9-برافو. هذا هو GET RC، 13:19:36؛ 400K هي 20 + 25؛ الانحناء العكسي هو 26 + 13؛ جميع زوايا الانحناء هذه، لجميع هذه التحديثات، ستكون 90 درجة: GET RC، 14:17:05؛ 400K، 20 + 32؛ الانحناء العكسي، 25 + 54. 11-2: GET RC، 52:02؛ 400K، 20 + 11؛ الانحناء العكسي، 25 + 40. 12-2 GET RC، 17:25:40؛ 400K، 20 + 03؛ الانحناء العكسي، 25 + 35؛ المنطقة 13-2: GET RC، 19:01:21؛ 400K هي 19 + 58؛ البنك العكسي، 25 زائد 28. 
और आपकी जान
Верно, Джек. Это просто для дополни
Non, je n'ai rien vu. J'ai examiné le joint torique et je ne pense pas que le problème vienne de là. Je crois que c'est… J'ai rema
ジョー、念のため確認させ
حسنًا يا جاك، دعني أشرح لك الآن إعدادات المحركات النفاثة. المحركات Able 1 وC
こんにちはハワイ、ジェミニ4
Quando te la senti di copiare, 11, h
Понял. У нас возникли проблемы с передачей команд в космический аппарат. Пожалуйста, переведите переключатель телеметрии UP в положение COMMAND RESET и OFF, а затем о
ठीक है। 36-4 40 फीट/सेकंड आगे। यह 1+06 है। 2+31 पर 120 फीट/सेकंड पीछे। 23 38
我们需要向右偏大约5度，并且我们需要停止
我们不仅考虑废水，还考虑必须从航天器中排出的其他类型的水，即略微
ठीक है। मुझे लगता
Hey; okay
We concur with
अपोलो 8, अपोलो 8. क्या आपने
Be sure and give us a mark when he 
با
아쿠아리우스, 휴스턴입니다. 죄송하지만 배경 소음이 너무 심해서 음성
Immagino che il mondo giri davvero. Ora riesco a vedere alcune delle mie terre emerse. Dev'essere l'Australia in basso, e immagino che non abbiamo ancora capito cosa c'
Okay. First, unstow the red filter
حسنًا. الوقت 32 ساعة
好的。我读了 VERB
Можете ли вы назвать какие-либо обычные явления, связанные с утечкой газа, например, сброс избыточного давления в водородном баллоне через смотровое окно
負けだ。早くやる唯一の利点は、パワーダウンできるかどうかだ。早くやる唯一の利点は、今から大規模噴射して中間軌道を回ってからパワーダウンできることだ。そうでなければ、月を周回するまでパワーアップした状態を保たなければならない。しかも、噴射時には内部に潜ることになる
There is a grou
はい、今は5人まで減っています…長い間、ファン1台で走り続けていました。2日目…食料が遅
Apollo 13, Houston. Stand by for mode
На основании имеющихся у нас данных ваш угол входа составляет 5,99. Данные о б
Stehen zu
はい、CB、パネル16、BAT
Bonjour, Apollo 11. Houston. Nous avons des réglages de commutateurs pour le gain él
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, 
ठीक है। 24 10. आग
Houston, Eagle. Sur l'émetteur/récepteur secondaire et l'amplificateur de puissance, comment lisez-vous? Terminé. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5. Te
Здравствуйте
Хьюстон, Водолей
Okay, Vance, ruf mich an, wenn du bereit für unseren 
Sur la page suivante, dans le compartiment B1, nous estimons qu'il reste environ 15 % de 
了解しました。まず、飛行計画ではCDRが寝返りを打つ必要があることになっています。次に、燃焼の概要です。すべてのシステムが正常に動作しているようです。軌道を見ると、CPAはモード高度69.67マイル、近点到達時刻は69.67マイルです。良好な自由帰還軌道を捕捉しています。回廊制御のための軌道を完全に評価するには少し早いです。プラス11ブロックのデータの更新はありません。曲線を調べたところ、バッテリーベント圧力は0.2～0.3ボルトで実際にはゼロのようで
Apollo 8, je vous reçois pa
रॉजर। आप पृथ्वी को देख रहे हैं, जैसा कि हम इसे अपनी बाईं खिड़की से देख रहे हैं, पृथ्वी का लगभग आधा हिस्सा। हम पूर्वी प्रशांत महासागर को देख रहे हैं, और स्क्रीन के ऊपरी आधे हिस्से के उत्तरी भाग में, हम उत्तरी अमेरिका, अलास्का, संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका, कनाडा, मैक्सिको और मध्य अमेरिका को देख सकते हैं। दक्षिण अमेरिका टर्मिनेटर के ठीक बाहर या छाया के अंदर अदृश्य हो जाता है। हम महासागरों को स्पष्ट नीले रंग में देख सकते हैं, पृथ्वी पर फैले प्रमुख बादल संरचनाओं की सफेद पट्टियाँ देख सकते हैं, और तटरेखाओं को देख सकते हैं, पश्चिमी अमेरिका, सैन जोकिन घाटी, सिएरा पर्वत श
Кен, пожалуйста, кратко объясните мне суть вашего маневра, о котором я совершенно не осведомлен
11, Houston. On 
네, 기본적으로는 맞습니다. 제가 간단히 설명드린 후 단계별로 안내해 드리겠습니다. 그러면 더 이해하기 쉬울 겁니다. 이 방법은 망원경으로 달을 관측할 수 있도록 특정 각도로 이동하는 것입니다. 어떤 자세에서든 망원경으로 별의 무늬를 충분히 식별하여 스스로 정렬할 수 있다고 판단되면, 그 시점에서 이 절차를 중단하고 직접 정렬을 진행하도록 하시면 됩니다. 하지만 저희는 반사나 기타 요인에 대한 걱정 없이 망원경으로 관측할 수 있는 조건을 충족하는 방법을 알려드리는 것이며, 별의 무늬가 충분히 선명하게 보인다면 그 이후에는 이 절차를 굳이 따라야 할 필요는 없습니다. 계속 진행해야 한다면, 기동을 하면서 달을 살펴보고 거기에 표시를 하겠습니다. 그런 다음 다시 각도를 조정하여 태양을 살펴보고 태양에 또 다른 표시를 하면 정렬이 완료됩니다. 정렬 방식은 다음과 같습니다. 저희가 달을 가리키는 동안 구체를 대략적으로 정렬할 수 있는 각도 세트를 제공해 드릴 것입니다. 이 각도 세트는 여러분이 공칭값으로 설정한 값과 일치합니다. 이 각도 세트에 맞춰 대략적으로 정렬하고, 드리프트 플래그와 REFSMMAT 플래그를 설정하면 좋은 플랫폼을 확
Hallo Apollo 11, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, die Sauerstoffspülung zu beenden, falls Sie dies noch
글쎄요, 잘 모르겠네요. 그가 춤추는 모습을
ヒューストン、トランクウィリティ基地はパワーダウンを実行し、シミュレーションさ
1秒の誤差です。確定です。正しい逆行時間は04+32+38であることをケープに確認してもらってください。
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। लगभग 4:30 बजे शुरू होगा। आपके सभी सिस्टम बहुत बढ़िया चल रहे हैं। ईगल बिना किसी कूलिंग के एक घंटे 30 मिनट त
P
Au-dessus d'Hawaï, nous avions une ligne de visée directe lorsque vous nous avez communiqué la position de vos commutateurs. Nous avons reçu la commande 041 « RECORDER ON », et à ce moment-là, le vaiss
Apollo 8, okay; we can pu
Friendship Seven, I have no sensations at all from weightlessness except very pleasant. No ill effects at all, I'm not sick; feel fine. I have had no, no I've run the head checks, the hea
收到。好的。我们备份数据有误，放错位置了。看起来机载数据没问题。我们只是想让你再检查一下。面板上的APS/燃油卡也有问题，是个拼写错误。如果你能把那张小卡片拿出来，我们就能帮你更正这个拼写错
Хорошо. Время — событие состоится; и нам нужно занять следующее положение: крен 101,0, тангаж 090,0, рыскание — все углы. Углы усиления будут: тангаж -23, рыскание 93. И мы должны использовать стандартные процедуры для демпфирования скоростей. После демпфирования скоростей и перед за
روجر. حسنًا. فهمت قصدك. حسنًا. سندخل، اضغط
Джек, они пока не хотят называть конкретную цифру, потому что говорят, что баки прогреются позже,
ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म के लिए लाइट वैल्यू रीडिंग ASA ​​64 के लिए 13 है। लाइट वैल्यू 13 सेट कर रहा हूँ। फ़िल्टर के साथ सातवीं तस्वीर ले रहा हूँ। दक्षिण अमेरिका महाद्वीप में मौसम की वजह से फ़ोटो खींचना मुश्किल है। इस समय मैं एक पैनोरमा फ़ोटो खींचूँगा। लगभग 8 घंटे बाद शुरू कर रहा हूँ। दरअसल, ऐसा ही होगा। MARKT, 7, 8, 9 ब्लैक फ़ोटो, ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म। दस फ़ोटो, ब्लैक एंड व्हाइट फिल्म। ये शॉट 250 × 5.6 (1/250 सेकंड और f5.6) पर अनंत कोण पर लिए जा रहे हैं। 11वीं तस्वीर ले रहा हूँ, बाईं ओर देख रहा हूँ। इस समय मैं दक्षिण अमेरिकी महाद्वीप के पास पहुँच रहा हूँ। मुझे एक बड़ी नदी दिखाई दे रही है। तस्वीर खींच रहा हूँ, कैमरा जितना हो सके नीचे की ओर करके। मुझे लगता है कि मैंने कैप्सूल की खिड़की को बहुत अच्छे से कैप्चर कर लिया है। अब मैं B-1 पर वापस आऊँगा। मैंन
वैंस, जो ने -2 प्लस 30 पर संरेखण का मुद्द
收到。我要给你发送一个双子座卫星数据包。这次请你
了解。メインバスは24、ワンは25、25、25。スタンバイワンは25、25。アイソレートは29、メインは再び24。ファンは113、113。右側のスイッチヒューズはすべてオン。ただし、Retr
एक और बात जिस पर आप ध्यान दे सकते हैं: जब आप इसे देख रहे हों, तो कुछ लोग यह जानना चाहेंगे कि क्या आपको खिड़कियों पर धुंध जमने का कोई स्पष्ट प्रभाव दिखाई देता है। विशेष रूप से, क्या सूरज की रोशनी से धुंध की तीव्रता मे
That's right. Now, I've been asleep for about 2 or 3 hours. Ed's going to sleep for about 
جيميني 8، هيوستن. قل 
Penso che abbia messo a fuoco un po' meglio la seconda. Penso che sia bellissima. Semplicemente favolosa. Non so bene cosa stai guardando, ma ci sono delle rocce fresche davvero enormi in quel crater
Роджер. У меня есть время T1 и T2, а также долгота простого чис
RCS bon; aucun drapeau. 
Well, that has disappeared, just practically. We were wondering if there was any chance of your looking out one of the other windows and seeing the moon? Hey, it is coming back in, Bill. Okay. Hold it right there. That is just fine for the earth right where you are. That is e
確認済みです。わかりました、ジャック。6時
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. «Аполлон-8», Х
يبدو أن ه
D
了解しました。148時間後、まだ実施されていない場合は、CO2フィルターを交換し、酸素と水素のパージの20分前に水素パージラインヒーターをオンにしてください。148時間後、151時間後ではなく、バッテリーアルファの充電を開始してください。充電は、別途通知があるまでオンのままにしておいてください。1
Quelle heure était-il? 1 h 
로저. 이번 2번 연소에는 뭘 
조금 덜하네요. 10초 정도 
ALIMENTATIO
Bien. Aujourd'hui, nous vous demandons de déterminer le biais du tourillon avant et après les observations, comme indiqué dans la procédure. L'objectif est de vérifier si un effet thermique peut induire des erreurs dans la lecture angulaire du sextant. Le biais mesuré au préalable doit être pris en compte: appuyez sur PROCEED sur NOUN 87 après avoir obtenu deux mesures consécutives à 0,003 degré près. Déplacez ensuite le tourillon de quelques degrés entre les deux mesures. La Terre devrait apparaître beaucoup plus petite dans votre champ de vision aujourd'hui. Vous êtes sans doute bien plus qualifié que nous pour nous renseigner à ce sujet, mais pour garantir une bonne mesure de l'angle entre l'étoile et l'horizon terrestre, la ligne M du sextant (la l
회전 속도가 꽤 빠르네
D'accord. Je le ferai. Je ne vois
Immagino che tu stia ancora utilizzando la 
यह एक बहुत अच्छा छोटा टेलीवि
Gemini 4, Gemini 4. Qui è Houston C
Friendship Seven, se siete pronti, potremmo fare questo r
휴
हमें कोई और विकल्प नहीं है। जब तक हम मध्यमार्ग पार कर लेते हैं और उसके बाद अगल
了解。Sバンド機能をレンジに切り替えてください。測距を行います。コピーの準備ができたら、最新の
Jim, sembra che si tratti di un problema al sensore; la batteria numero 2 condivide bene il carico. E non vediamo indicazioni di temperature più elevate nel circuito
자, 휴스턴 CAP COM, 제
О
로저. 똑같은 '주의' 및 '경고' 메시지가 다시 나올 거라고 예상하세요. 그런데도 
Right now it's daylight over on Jim's side, and looking out my side I can still make out some of the stars. It appears that you can 
オーケー、アクエリアス。こちらで再編成中です。操縦モードの調整や設定、飛行計画ではなく消耗品の確認などを行っています。必要な情報が集
آه، هذا 
روجر. لديّ 10-تشارلي 123. 1+45. 01 يوم 05 13 
좋습니다. 그러면 11번 별 대신 1번 별이, 그리고 달의 먼 지평선 ​​대신 달의 가까운 지평선이 표시되고, 두 세트로 유지됩니다.
- - لتصحيح الميلان للحصول على كسب عالٍ، ونواصل الدوران للحصول على الوضعية المناسبة للكسب العالي في هذا الوقت. سنحذف مناورة الميلان التي كانت مقررة بعد فحص ال
아니요, 그렇게 생각하지 않습니다
जेमिनी 4, सीएसक्यू। 33-1 रेट्रो लोड के लिए अपना कंप्यूटर चालू
Amicizia Sett
알겠습니다. 이해했습니다. 지금 첫 번째 플레어에 대한 설
Ok, Houston. Sto visualizzando... Ho provato a resettare e le celle a combustibile
Houston, Apollo 11. Wir haben den afrikanischen Kontinent vor uns, und natürlich wird alles mit der Zeit immer kleiner. Das Mittelmeer ist völlig klar. Die Sonne scheint gleich hinter Madagaskar unterzugehen. Der äquatoriale Gürtel Afrikas ist deutlich zu erkennen. Wir sehen ein dunkles, trübes Grün, im Vergleich zu den sandfarbenen Tönen an der Südspitze Afrikas und natürlich der Sahara-Nordküste. In der Nähe der Grenze zwischen Afghanistan und Pakistan ist eine bemerkenswerte Wolke zu sehen. Sie geht gerade unter und wirft einen ziemlich großen Schatten. Sie steht isoliert da. Es scheinen keine anderen Wolken zu sein. Das Wolkenband nahe der tropischen Übergangszone und die Wolken am Äquator trennen deutlich die im Uhrzeigersinn und gegen den Uhrzeig
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We got the network all configured for the TV. You can start any time
收到。指示灯工作正常。不过我不太确定具体距离，估计大概在半英里左右。助推器刚离开助推器就开始翻滚。我试着降低升力，降到看起来只有每秒四分之一度，但我们一离开助推器，我绕到它跟前一看，它又开始翻滚了
알겠습니다. 저 기능들이 제대로 작동하려면 완전히 수동 모드로 설정해
मैंने बस इतना ही सुना है कि केबिन में दबाव बना हुआ है। इससे ज़्यादा कुछ नहीं सुना। और, ओडिसी, हम चाहते हैं कि आप अपनी मर्
And I'm on secondary, or number 2 pump right now, and I'll hold here for a couple of seconds a
मुझे लगता है कि हमें वे सभी मिल गए है
了解、アポロ8号。ヒューストン。今ははっきりと聞こえていますね。数分間、かなり雑音が多かったのですが、私の声が聞こえます
حسنًا يا 
يُشير جهاز المراقبة الطبية إلى أننا نقرأ معدل تنفسك. أعتقد أن هذه هي المرة الأولى تقريبًا التي يُسجّل فيها هذا ا
Source pressure is 1500, source temperatur
रॉजर, 11. यहाँ तस्वीर काफी स्पष्ट है। हमें ऐसा लग रहा है - क्या आप बता सकते हैं - हमें ऐसा प्रतीत हो रहा है कि पूर्व/पश्चिम दिशा में दो अलग-अलग बादल संर
收到。翻到第33页。还剩4分钟。好的。往下翻，大约在第7行，“发动机万向节”：“发动机万向节，关闭”。往下翻到“模式控制”，改成“模式控制：，
Is that
Hallo, Tranquility Base, Houston. Bezüglich unserer Entlüftungs- und Treibstoffprobleme: Unser Wärmetauscher ist wieder frei. Wir haben gehört, dass das Eis geschmolzen ist und alles wieder in Ordnung
Roger. Wir möchten mit Ihnen darüber sprechen. Mike, wir können – ganz nach Ihren Wünschen – beides machen. Entweder lassen wir Sie es beim Abwurf – Korrektur – durchführen, oder wir schicken Ihnen eine Zielladung und Sie können dann – ganz wie Sie möchten. E
罗杰。除了你的电脑之外，其他一切看
迈克，电池仓内的压力应该低于1
那我问你一件事。你是想在中期调整之前先进行一个小时的
هدوء، هذه هيوستن. لدينا أيضًا مجموعة من حوالي عشرة أسئلة تتعلق بملاحظاتك، أشياء ربما شاهدتها خلال المهمة. يمكنك مناقشتها لاحقًا هذا المساء أو في وقت لاحق من المهمة
Va bene
それ
음, 지금 다시 남십자성 쪽으로 돌아왔는데, 밝고 얼룩덜룩한 영역이 보이네요. 아마도 아주 밝은 별들이 많이 있는 것 같아
Am
まあ、とりあえずはこれで終わりだ、フランク。いくつかニュースが入ってきたので、通信
У нас до сих пор не
Wir versuchen im Grunde, Sie in eine Haltung zu bringen, in der Sie, wenn Sie die Erde durch das Fenster sehen, sie abdämpfen und festhalten können – die Erde im Fenster festhalten. Fahren Sie mit dem Rest von Seite 29 fort. Streichen Sie unter „DRÜCKEN“ alle drei Schritte wie gedruckt durch. Streichen Sie auf Sei
Houston, 11. Non credo che 
はい。それでは、続けてくださ
एक्वेरियस
Roger. 10, /: 45597, meno 040, più 157, più 35189, meno 01513, meno 00346 180 007 000, novembre Alfa più 00186 35223 318 35019 42 0928 253, stella boresight Scorpii Delta (un altro nome per essa è Dzuba) giù 071, sinistra 45, più 0748 meno 16500 12995 36300; stella primaria Sirio, secondaria, Rigel, 129 155 010; 
Roger. We were seeing - believe it or not, we were seeing some funnies o
알겠습니다. 모두 확인하셨나요? 혹시 마음에 안 드는 사람이 있나요
케이프 캡 컴, 시그마 세븐. 저
了解。10、/: 45597、マイナス 040、プラス 157、プラス 35189、マイナス 01513、マイナス 00346 180 
Und, Joe, Jack 
No
Das ist eine
了解。人民解放軍と軍用機の最新情報です。エリア4
아직 예정보다 앞서 
Давайте посмотрим, что же я могу сделать? В данный момент я раскачиваю руки взад-вперед, и это отображается на стрелках крена, рыскания и тангажа. Двигая туловищем, я могу заставить стрелку скорости тангажа перемещаться на 1 градус в секунду. Стрелка крена очень чувствительна к этому. Стрелка рыскания тоже. Давайте посмотрим, сейчас я открою визор. В к
Ja, Sir. Das ist bestäti
أبولو 8، هيوستن. عند المقارنة، باستخدام المتجهات، حصلنا على -1.4 في منتصف المسار مقارنةً بـ 2.8 لديك. قمنا بتشغيل حلولك على جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بنا وحصلنا أيضًا على 2.8، لذا تبدو حلولك جيدة. ما زلنا نعمل على تعديل المت
D'accord. Bien sûr. Buzz, veuillez allumer le ventilateur du réservoir d'oxygène numéro 2. Et, 11, concernant l'étalonnage de vos op
좋아, 닐, 거의 다 왔어. 네가 거기까지 내려가서 
Haben Sie schon einmal einen Driftflug 
Роджер. Хотел б
Schöne Sterne im Hintergrund im Nor
रॉजर, कोलंबिया। हम 11 के साथ आ रहे हैं। जी एंड एन: 37200, माइनस 060, प्लस 047, 098 05 2422, प्लस 41448, प्लस 03719, माइनस 02422। रोल अनुपलब्ध है, पिच 020, पैड का बाकी हिस्सा अन
बिल्कुल सही। मैं सीधे ह्यूस्टन को देख रहा
52... بالمئ
जेमिनी 4, हवाई, रेट्रोफायर के लिए 8 मिनट तक प्रतीक्षा करें
Всё в порядке. Меня сбивает с толку скорость вращения вокру
マー
ठीक है, जो। यह 
حسنًا. أبولو 8، نود تحديث ساعتك. ليس هذا لتصحيح الأخطاء الحالية، بل لتعويض بعض التأثيرات التي ستحدث في مدار القمر. ما نرجوه منك هو الانتقال إلى [رابط] والموافقة على التحد
はい。18ページです
Ro
Roger, we used Pulse Control in a minimum amount; the target of number 12 was obscured by clouds; I had the time and locati
Roger. Abbiamo m
ठीक है। क्
セブン、キャプテン
Roger, sto scendendo a 20.000. Sono pronto per lo snorkle. La pressione in cabina sta aumentando. Lo snorkle dovrebbe andare. Cre
了解しました。33-1の積載は完了しました。コピーの準備ができたら、33-1の予備誘導量も用意しておきます。前回のパスでは少し問題が発生しました。パスの3分の2ほど進んだところで、完全に電源が落
はい。そうしました。それ以来、宇宙船
Роджер, 15 минут назад. Джим, я передам тебе общую процедуру входа в атмосферу. Ты получишь обновление 63-1 и подробности о твоем следующем пролете над Штатами от Гаса. Общая процедура после тормозного огня: развернись в норма
Der Computer ist eingeschaltet
Ed a commencé à ranger le matériel et, dès que nous avons atteint un point où il n'était plus possible de manipuler le propulseur, je l'ai aidé à plein temps – du moins en tenant les objets, en les rangeant et en essayant d'éviter qu'ils ne disparaissent. Plus nous travaillions vite, plus nous prenions de retard. Non pas que nous ne rangions pas les choses correctement, mais cela prenait be
オーケー、アクエリアス。彼女の姿勢がほぼ整い、必要な距離まで来たら、コントロールモードを試してみて、うまくいくかどうか見てみよう。ちょっと試してみよう。ボールはパワーオンのままにしておく。もしうまくいかなかったら、当然ながら「姿勢保持」モードに戻らなければならない。さ
I'm
双子座4号，这里是广州通信技术
Roger. Verstanden. Von
Roger. Nous avons entendu la sonnerie descendante. Nous avons cru que vous essayiez de nous appeler. Toutes nos excuses. Nous espérons ne pas vous avoir
Roger 
描述一下那条蓝色带。地球表面附近有一条相对较深的蓝色带，然后是一条浅蓝色带，再是一条深蓝色带，接着是一条宽阔的白色带，那是大气辉光，然后是一条深黑色带，颜色从灰蓝色过渡到浓黑色。从蓝色带到完全黑暗的过渡区
Okay. Sie können jetzt zum Außenbordeinsatz (EVA) aufbrechen. Bereit für die Dekompressionskorrektur. Können Sie uns bitte 
روجر، جورج. وضع التحكم يدوي. الجيروسكوبات مثبتة، والمناورة معطلة. نسبة الوقود 45 و64 بالمئة، متقدمة قليلاً عن الجدول الزمني. نسبة الأكسجين تتراوح بين 82 و100 بالمئة. درجة حرارة فتحة البخار في البدلة تنخفض قليلاً، وهي أقل بقليل من
L'attrezzatura è 
罗杰。地平线上也看不清什么。
로저. 공보실의 속보입니다. 아폴로 11호는 여전히 전 세계 뉴스의 중심을 차지하고 있습니다. 중국, 북한, 북베트남, 알바니아 단 네 나라만이 아직 자국민에게 당신의 달 착륙 소식을 알리지 않았습니다. 한 기자는 당신의 성공을 어떻게 표현해야 할지 더 이상 모르겠다고 했습니다. 오늘 저녁, 닉슨 대통령은 워싱턴에서 열리는 올스타 야구 경기를 관람할 예정입니다. 경기가 끝난 후, 그는 태평양 회수 지역으로 출발합니다. 수요일 저녁, 그는 헬리콥터를 타고 존스턴 섬에서 해군 통신함 알링턴으로 이동합니다. 그리고 목요일 아침, 다시 헬리콥터를 타고 
아주 작아요. 1/16인치 정도 또는 그보다 더 작을 거예요. 창밖으로 떠다니
ठीक है। चरण 5, उच्च-लाभ वाले एंटेना के पिच और यॉ नियंत्रण को पृथ्वी के अनु
D'accord. Nous recopions les points 39.3 et 1.20. Jim, j'ai une dernière information pour toi. Dans environ 45 minutes, le voyant d'avertissement de niveau d'eau s'allumera sur le réservoir de descente. C'est normal. Cela se produit à 16 %.
아폴로 11호, 여기는 휴스턴입니다.
دخلنا الغلاف الجوي بنفس الطريقة في أبولو 8 مع هيوستن، حيث قام باز بتشغيل سخانات وحدة القيادة وتركها تعمل. أطلقت أجهزة التشغيل صوت "أطلق!"، فتوقفت الخزانات تمامًا؛ لم يكن لدينا وقود. كان معدل الدوران بطيئًا جدًا... خرجنا إلى وحدة التحكم وبدأنا في جمع المعلومات، لكننا تركنا المركبة تعمل ورا
네, 맞습니다. 저분이 짐 러벨입니다. 오늘 저희는 아폴로 8호 내부의 생활에 대해 간략하게 보여드리려고 합니다. 달과 지구의 모습은 이미 보여드렸으니, 이제 저희의 보금자리로 여러분을 초대하려고 합니다. 보시다시피 계기판에서 알 수 있듯이, 저희는 최소 4일 동안 이곳에 머물렀습니다. 계기판에 매일 날짜를 표시하는데, 오늘로 4일째이고 5일째를 보내고 있습니다. 물론 저희 모두 금요일 착륙을 손꼽아 기다리고 있습니다. 여기, 우주선 하부 장비실이라고 부르는 곳에서 대통령 체력 담당 고문이신 짐 러벨 대위님께서 매일 하는 운동 프로그램을 시작하시려고 합니다. 러벨 대위님이 아주 자유롭게 떠다니는 게 보이시죠? 방금 항법에 사용되는 광학 장치에 머리를 부딪히셨네요. 근육을 단련하기 위해 고안된 운동 기구를 사용하고 계십니다. 우리 우주선의 또 다른 매우 중요한 기능은 컴퓨터입니다. 여러분께서 흥미로워하실 것 같아 여기에 있는 디스플레이를 보여드리겠습니다. 이 디스플레이는 연소 과정, 항법, 그리고 지구 궤도 진입 및 역추진 시 사용하는 속도에 대한 모든 정보를 제공합니다. 보시다시피 타자기 키보드와 비슷한 장치로 조작되는데, 입력되는 정보의 양은 정말 놀랍습니다. 이 장치는 우리에게 환상적인 역할을 해냈고, 짐 러벨은 이를 훌륭하게 조작해 왔습니다. 우주에 있든 지상에 있든 또 다른 매우 중요한 것은 식사입니다. 빌 앤더스에게 비행 중 우리가 어떻게 식사를 하는지 보여달라고 부탁했습니다. 카
マスターズでは同点で、スタンバイ状態です
L'unità percorre quel furlo
ठीक है। प्रक्रिया इस प्रकार है:,, एंटर; 1331, एंटर; 7, एंटर; और एंटर। स्पष्टीकरण इस प
I might as well look down and see if you fellows have got some lights on. I'm gonna 
روجر. لدينا أسلوب تلفزيوني مناسب لك إذا كن
지금 들리는 잡음은 예전에 채널을 바꾸셨을 때와 비슷한 잡음입
Roger, Houston. A
Fortunately
双子座八号，我有一些新的救援数据要发给你。准备好接收了
لدي حوالي 10 ثوانٍ. يمكنني أن أعطيك إياها في أي وقت، أليس كذلك
रॉजर। फिलहाल हमें उम्मीद नहीं है कि एसएचई टैंक
- - 그러면 상태 벡터와 목표
わかった。いいアイデアだね。フランクにサックタイムを教えてもら
这是友谊七号。问得好。我也想知道。这些误差在整个飞行过程中断断续续地出现。我反复地锁定和解除陀螺仪的锁定。现在我回到了轨道姿态，但实际上并
哦，那太好了。不过我把洛弗尔安排到沙发底
Le soleil brille dans
제미니 4, CSQ
नहीं, वह चीज - वही तो उन बेकार से बैफल्स को थामे हुए
Apollo 11, 
我理解你想在
Okay. Your computer is in and verified. You can go to BLOCK, and we're going to have here in about 45 seconds. I'll start on the anyway. Time base 6P 24136, roll 179, pitch 045, yaw 001, burn time 5 plus 15, DELTA-VC prime 105 196 VI 35569, roll 357, pitch 091; plus 10 minutes; abort attitude is 199 degrees, and I don't believe you've got time to read that back. We'll see you over Canaries at. Adios
Et je suis revenu en arrière - OK, je suis revenu à la MOYENNE main
Apollo 8, Houston. Veuillez vous t
سنعرض لكم الآن صورة لأرضية المقصورة. أعتقد أنكم ترون إحدى حقيبتي الظهر المخصصتين لأجهزة دعم الحياة المحمولة هنا في المنتصف، وعلى كل جانب، يوجد واقي
Роджер. Мы получаем от вас сообщение примерно пять на два, очень слабое. Не могли бы вы предоставить нам отчет о состоянии де
Roger. Okay. The other thing is the post-landing. We still - just to reaffirm - you would like no more than that 1 hour in the spacecraft. Get your suits off, at your discretion, if the spacecraft has no leak. The open hatch part is strictly your decision. It looks good in the recovery area at the present time for this. Remember the pumping exercise that we did at the time of the physical, and the feet up would b
Roger. Ich verstehe dich gut, laut und deutlich. – Ich hab
ロジャ
阿波罗11号，休斯顿。如果方
言ってください - ヴァンス、最後のとこ
さて、そのデータポイントを取得
Roger. Ti leggo allo
Положение автомобиля выглядит очень хорошо, уверенно и 
روجر. ضغط المقصورة ٥.٥ وهو ثابت. درجة حرارة هواء المقصورة ٩٥ درجة. لا يزال ضوء تحذير الماء الزائد في المقصورة مضاءً. سأخفض
Houston, Columbia. Ho modificato la piattaforma sul retro. Ho l'opzion
ق
Roger. Besser, Mike. Wir empfangen dich jetzt etwa vier Uhr morgen
Gemi
그럴 
... easi
Ecco un articolo di Harry Rosenthal dell'Associated di Houston. Due Babbi Natale illuminano la vigilia di Natale per Jeffrey Lovell, 2 anni. Il primo ha bussato alla sua porta di casa e gli ha portato i regali. Il secondo ha accompagnato il padre a casa dalla Luna. Il primo indossava un abito rosso e una barba bianca e
Oh, EECOMM est content. Une fois votre installation terminée, voici une petite procédure d'EECOMM pour vérifier le débit d'oxygène et le capteur de
concorda mol
네, 맞습니다, 잭. 요청 사항은 다음과 같습니다. 전원을 끄기 전에 전압과 전류를 측정해 주시고, 전원 끄는 시간도 알려주시면 감사하겠습니다. 또한 전원 끄기 절차를 숙지하고
Okay. Ein paar Dinge, Jim. Erstens: Du kannst zwar zum Manövrieren die Steuerknüppel benutzen, sparst aber viel Treibstoff, wenn du den Minimalimpuls ausprobierst. Das wäre also vielleicht die bessere Empfehlung. Zweitens: 
रॉजर। जी एंड एन: 62710, प
Questa è una risposta affermativa. È ciò che è impostato sull'orologio. L'orizzonte è di un blu brillan
Nun, ich weiß es nicht. Eigentlich müsste die LOX-
オーケー、アポロ8号。これで
...
쉬움 - 쉬움 0.3, 7.6, 하지만 저는... 분화구의 남서쪽 끝자락에 있어요. 그런 위치에 있었다면 분명 알았을 거예요. 경사가 
Roger. Continuing with the Maroon Bugle. President Nixon surprised your wives with a phone call from San Francisco just before he boarded a plane to fly out to meet you. All of them were very touched by your television broadcast. Jan and Pat watched from Mission Control here. The launch of Intelsat from the Cape was postponed for the fourth time last night. The problem was said to be a malfunctioning nitrogen regulator in the second stage of Delta. A new attempt will be made to launch it tonight. The research submarine Ben Franklin, which is studying the Gulf Stream, set a record by drifting 24 hours from 10 to 100 feet above the ocean floor in 1300 feet of water off the Georgia coast. The mission is led by Jacques Picard. Wally Schirra has been elected to a 5 year term on the board of trustees of the Detroit Institute of Technology. He will serve on the Institute's development committee. Air Canada says it has accepted 2300 reservations for flights to the Moon in the past 5 days. It might be noted that more than 100 have been made by men for their mothers in law. And finally, it appears that rather than killing romantic songs about the Moon, you have inspired hundreds of song writers. Nashville, Tennessee, which probably houses the largest collection of recording companies and song publishers in the country, now reports it is being flooded by Moo
Vorremmo invitarti a recarti a START COMP in questo momento, così possiamo controllare i tuoi accelerometri m
حسنًا، برج الدلو؛ هيوستن. يبدو هذا ال
Cela me fait penser à une flamme de pétrole comme celles q
Ti riferisci alla mia registrazi
जी हां। मैंने सेकेंडरी पंप चालू कर 
Roger. Here is a rather brief summary of the updates that you will be getting. The one that you have now for plus 2 following an minus 8 flyby maneuver is still good. That will not be updated. The next update you will get will be 4. After that, you will get two plus 2 ma
了解、ビル。1時間ほど前に更新したも
Oui, cela ne les aurait probablement pas au
了解。乗組員の状況報告です。放射線
Я несколько раз замечал, что при переходе из солнечного света в тень, как только я вхожу, помимо отражения от моего лица на визоре, появляется дополнительное отражение, что значительно ухудшает видимость именно в месте перехода из солнечного света в тень. По сути, на мой визор падает столько бликов, что шлем фактически оказывается в тени. Затем моим глазам требует
알
わかった、私も君の言葉
ठीक है। यह फ्रेंडशिप सेवन है। 
実際、ここ 12 時間以上
罗杰，艾略特。我们正在……首次试车……模式……
オーロラセブン。ムチア・キャップ・コム。1、
分かりました。ヘリウム圧力は約37、マニホールド圧力は約182、燃料量は約80です。Bの温度は約112、ヘリウム圧力は約36.5、燃料圧力は約180、燃料量は約77です。Cの温度は140です。ちなみに、他の温度は110ではなく120であるべきでした。ここで間違ったキャリブレーションを見ていました。圧力は37、マニホールド圧力は約182、燃料量は80です。Dの温度は1
D'accord, Jack. Joe Kerwin m'a transmis la procédure pour alimenter le... Est
Apollo 8, Houston. Concernant votre point d'information télévisé, 
روجر. لقد ان
Ok
E p
Dovrei dire, Bruce, che quando sono andato al circuito secondario dell'acqua, dal separatore d'acqua al ci
马克，还
Wenn ich mich umschaue, fällt mir auf, dass der Kontrast im Allgemeinen ausschließlich durch den Schattenwurf der Sonne entsteht – ein sehr helles Grau, ein Halo um meinen eigenen Schatten, um den Schatten meines Helms. Wenn ich dann in die Ferne blicke, wird der Kontrast am stärksten, da die Umgebung immer noch recht hell ist. Wenn man in die Sonne schaut, fällt ein größerer Teil der Schattenfläche auf uns zu. Die allgemeine Farbe der Umgebung – der Kontrast ist nicht mehr so ​​groß. Die aufgewirbelte Staubfläche erscheint deutlich dunkler. Ich habe gerade einen aufgewirbelten Staub aufgeworfen, und ich nehme an, das ist d
Ok. Non abbiamo ancora una fo
Okay, Jim. Ihre aktuelle Konfiguration hat folgende Merkmale: Die elektrischen Sammelschienen sind über die BAL LOAD-Leistungsschalter verbunden, und die automatische Kabinenrückstellung ist aktiviert. Wir möchten Ihnen jetzt eine Uplink-Verbindung bereitstellen. Schließen Sie dazu bitt
罗杰。由于能
«Дружба Семь», «Дружба Семь», это Индийская комиссия по управлению воз
찰리, 잘 들립니다. TIG 
Sembra che abbia appena sorvolato alcune delle Isole Marshall laggiù. Erano piuttosto limpide e si potevano vedere gli atolli e il paesaggio circostante. Ho provato a fotografarle, ma le ho vi
마이크, 그건 부정적이네요. 그래프를 보시면 아시겠지만, 첫 번째 회전에서 바로 시작해서 피치가 약 20도에서 -20도 사이로 나선형으로 휘어졌습니다. 그리고 90도에서 약 20도 정도 벗어난 피치 지점을 중심으로 나선형
Roger, Friendship S
Das ist 
거스, 질문이 하나 있어. 이 D-9 실험 말이야. 4번 기체는 아폴로 계획용이야, 아니면 
Ok. Ora il mio ago del pitch è leggermente 
괜찮아요. 지원팀을 불러오세요
Ich habe gerade einen Satelliten gesehen, sehr hoch oben...
هيوستن، كيف تقرأ؟ أب
Roger, Fred-o. Wir haben noch einen letzten Schritt, dann können wir das Sys
Sì, ma
Rog
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。
Roger. Continuiamo con il Maroon Bugle. Il Presidente Nixon ha sorpreso le vostre mogli con una telefonata da San Francisco poco prima di salire su un aereo per incontrarvi. Sono rimasti tutti molto colpiti dalla vostra trasmissione televisiva. Jan e Pat hanno guardato dal Controllo Missione qui. Il lancio di Intelsat da Città del Capo è stato rinviato per la quarta volta ieri sera. Si dice che il problema sia dovuto a un malfunzionamento del regolatore di azoto nel secondo stadio del Delta. Un nuovo tentativo di lancio verrà effettuato stasera. Il sottomarino di ricerca Ben Franklin, che studia la Corrente del Golfo, ha stabilito un record navigando alla deriva per 24 ore da 3 a 30 metri sopra il fondale oceanico a 400 metri di profondità al largo della costa della Georgia. La missione è guidata da Jacques Picard. Wally Schirra è stato eletto per un mandato di 5 anni nel consiglio di amministrazione del Detroit Institute of Technology. Farà parte del comitato per lo sviluppo dell'istituto. Air Canada afferma di aver accettato 2300 prenotazioni per voli verso la Luna negli ultimi 5 giorni. Si noti che più di 100 canzoni sono state scritte da uomini per le loro suocere. E infine, sembra che, invece di
D'accord. Comprenez que la situation se dégrade fortement. Vous avez un départ depuis l
A
Je 
Houston, je règle
Das Erdlicht entspricht in etwa den Erwartungen, Houston. Natürlich nicht so 
Apollo 11, Houston. Wir sind bereit zum Abdo
Friendship Seven, ici Kano Cap Com.
ダメだ、ブルース。緯度と経度の2乗、高度、そしてグリッドのマス目だけ教えてくれ。他のことは気にしないでく
Apollo 8, mentre aspettiamo l'alto guadagno, continuerò il riepilogo della traiettoria. Possiamo ancora tornare alla linea del Pacifico centrale dal tredicesimo, e siete in viaggio dopo 138 secondi dall'accensione. Sono 138 secondi, e vi portano fuori dalla zona a farfalla. Consigliamo di non provare preaccension
わかりました。それでは…何をするかというと…残りの燃焼時間と燃焼前のカウントダウンの間は
了解、11。
好的。在第101格，跳过前三项。我们要关闭“尿液排放”和“废水排放”。完
حسنًا، في الصف الرابع، لدينا جميع قواطع سخانات Q
Okay, zurück zu Seite 18. Wir machen wie bisher weiter bei 30 Sekunden, 
Affermativo. Okay. Se sei pronto a ricevere, ho questa proce
Хорошо. Сейчас мы как раз подошли к тому моменту, когда, согласно составленному для вас плану полета, вы в
하와이 캡콤, 하
बस तुम पर ह
Да, кон
Das freut mich. Der Arzt fragt
Ich habe noc
わかりました。パージは完了しました。ありがとうございます。それから、クライオタンクについてですが、酸素タンクはそれぞれ180ポンド、水素タン
Gemini VI，Carnarvon CAP 
Apollo 8, Houston. Ich glaube, wir sind vom Thema abgekommen. Die Nick- und Gierwinkel, die wir Ihnen für die Hochgewinnantenne mitgeteilt haben, bezogen sich auf Bills Anfrage, welche Positionen wir für die automatische Empfangsposition (AUTO REACQ) einnehmen könnten. Die Einschränkung besteht weiterhin, wenn wir nicht gleichzeitig eine Omni-Antenne verwenden wollen. Wir befinden uns in der AUTO REACQ-Position; wir sollten uns für eine der beiden entscheiden. Sie können dies
Houston, Apollo
Вэнс, возможно, то, что видели люд
尼尔，不好意思打扰你；你能把我的个人作品集从 R-1 室拿出
所有姿态都运行良好。宇航服热穹顶温度约为 72 度，宇航服进气口温度约为 63 度，略有下降。这架宇航服的最佳飞行设置大约在 7.5 到 8 之间。我会再调高一档到 8。我已经将宇航服冷却液
休斯顿，阿
La température de notre combinaison a bais
I don't think we require it just yet, Jack, but we'll command it when we're ready. I believe they are dumping the tape now. The booster looks good. The spacecraft looks good on the few minutes'
Bene. La nostra checklist ha cancellato "tutti i getti" e dice "abilitare
로저. 우리도 동감입니다. 마치 그게 당신을 쫓아오는 
그
わかりました、ジム。断続的に電力が供給されています。さらに、パネル16のプライマリパワーアンプの回路ブレーカーを開けていただければ、電力供給が安定し、回路のマージンを改善できると思います。次の手順につい
Oui, je pense qu'il serait probablement préférable, vu qu'on a déjà fait la mise à jour, de le remettre au-dessus du tableau de bord plutôt que de le placer au-dessus de la borne de recharge
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। जब आप अपनी उड़ान की तैयारी कर रहे हों, तब हमारे पास आपके लिए डेल्टा-एच का एक अपड
Okay. Jim, while we're working on this p
Bene. Oggi, le funzioni religiose in tutto il mondo menzionano l'Apollo 11 nelle loro preghiere. Anche la funzione religiosa del Presidente N
オーケー、シグマ・セブン。こちらはカル・キャップ・コム。こちらです。
ठीक है।
Хорошо, Джим. Мы... Мы говорили о том, что вам нужно изменить положение относительно стартовой площадки для лучшего обзора звездного поля из командного модуля, и вот что мы хотели бы от вас попросить. Если вы можете предсказать сейчас или в ближайшее время, какое положение вы хотел
Gemini 4, Canary CAP 
크고 또렷하게 들리네요, 카네이션. 쌍둥이자리 4. 
روج
그 스타를
E, Aquarius; Houston. Ho degli interruttori automatici che puoi aprire per spegnere i display. In più,
-7:, माइनस 0003.1, प्लस सभी शून्य, प्लस 00001, N/A, प्लस 0020.5, 0003.1, 23, 008, 359; शेष N/A है। टिप्पण
Мы бы предпочли этого не делать, Фрэнк. Подождите 
ヒューストン、ダウンボイ
いいですね、そして1フィート半、つまり1秒あたり1フィートです。
N2 A
Я запустил 16-милли
11, Houston. Lo scarico L
هذه هي الأرض، ولدينا رؤية رائع
---재진입 시, ASCS
La température a peut-être légèrement baissé. Il fait environ zéro degré mainten
Roger. In Washington, the Senate Finance Committee has approved extension of the income tax surtax, but a Senate vote on the bill current
Роджер. В соответствии с шагом 1, описанным на странице 47, управление наведением находилось в режиме PGNS и MODE CONTROL, PGN
Als ich draußen war, bemerkte ich an Jims Fensterscheibe eine Beschichtung. Als ich einmal mit der Schulter oder dem Arm daran stieß, verschmierte sie sich und bedeckte den oberen Teil seiner Windschutzschei
Unser Wasserabscheider scheint nicht richtig zu funktionieren. Es dringt viel Wasser durch de
Hello, Apollo 11. Houston. We switched the antennas on you again. Would you pl
Да. Надеюс
さあ、ヒュース
Houston, Ap
14 ページ、右側、下部近くの「軌道科学」の下の「検証オン」を消し、「トラック 
Ich lasse das überprüfen, ab
In compartment A1, the 16 millimeter magazine will be located in window number 4 instead of 5. Tissue dispensers; there is only one of them left. And compartment U3, the 16 millimeter bracket is on window 4, and the b
بدأ إد بفكّ المعدات، وما إن وصلنا إلى الموضع الذي أصبح فيه التلاعب بالصاروخ المعزز غير ممكن، حتى بدأتُ بمساعدته بدوام كامل - على الأقل بحمل الأشياء وتخزينها ومحاولة منعها من الاختفاء. كلما أسرعنا في العمل، كلما تأخرنا أكثر. ليس لأننا لم نضع الأشياء في مكانها الصحيح، بل لأن الأمر استغرق وقتًا أطول بكثير مما توقعنا. لم يكن الأمر أسهل بكثير في انعدام الجاذبية منه في جهاز المحاكاة، إن لم يكن بنفس السهولة. لذا أكملنا المهمة حتى النهاية. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون، كنت قد قررت أننا لن نتمكن من الوصول، لكنني فكرت في الاستمرار قليلًا. عندما وصلنا إلى كارنارفون - أو قبل مغادرتنا لها بقليل - كان واضحًا لي أننا لن نتمكن من تخفيض الضغط. طلبتُ الانتقال إلى المدار التالي. ثم... استعدنا أنفاسنا لمدة 20 دقيقة تقريبًا وحاولنا ترتيب الخردة المتناثرة في قمرة القيادة. ثم أخرجتُ قائمة التحقق، وراجعناها بتفصيلٍ دقيق للتأكد من عدم إغفال أي شيء في عجلة من أمرنا. بدأنا عملية السير خارج المركبة، وحصلنا على إشارة البدء فوق كارنارفون. كنا على أتم الاستعداد، وكنا ننتظر إشارة البدء لبدء عملية تخفيف الضغط. وقد حصلنا عليها. أكملنا دورة تخفيف الضغط. عند مغادرتنا كارنارفون، حصلنا على تصريح السير الكامل خارج المركبة. وصلنا إلى كانتون أو هاواي، وفي ذلك الوقت، أعتقد أن كانتون أو هاواي هي التي أعطتنا إشارة البدء للخروج من المرك
外科医は、この時点で都合が良ければ血圧測定
Roger, Neil. Per iniziare: messaggi di congratulazioni per la missione Apollo 11 sono arrivati ​​alla Casa Bianca a fiumi per tutto il giorno dai leader mondiali. Tra gli ultimi, i telegrammi del Primo Ministro Harold Wilson di Gran Bretagna e del Re del Belgio. La stampa mondiale è stata dominata dalle notizie sull'Apollo 11. Alcuni giornalisti stimano che oltre il 60% delle notizie pubblicate oggi sui giornali di tutto il paese riguardasse la vostra missione. Il New York Times, che, come abbiamo già detto, ha avuto una tale richiesta per la sua edizione odierna (nonostante la tiratura di 950.000 copie), ha dichiarato che ristamperà l'intero articolo giovedì come edizione ricordo. E il Primo Ministro Alexei Kosygin ha inviato congratulazioni a voi e al Presidente Nixon tramite l'ex Vicepresidente Humphrey, in visita in Russia. Anche i cosmonauti hanno rilasciato una dichiarazione di congratulazioni. Humphrey ha citato Kosygin: "Voglio che diciate al Presidente e al 
Esatto. Niente paura. John Aaron sta solo dicendo che potrebbero essere molto richiesti. Sta controllando, quindi c
E questo include nel margine a sinistra il "carico"
Roger.
좋아요, 10도를 복사했어요. 저
रॉजर। ईगल, हमारे पास कुछ बेहतरीन डेटा है। हम - सिस्टम टीम के सभी लोग - इसे देख रहे हैं। हम आपको एक मिनट में बताएंगे कि स्थिति क
Mark. Ein Bild des Boosters. Sende und nehme jetzt auf. 2, 3, 4, 5, 6,... 10, 11, 12 Bilder des Boosters, der genau durch die Mitte d
Это не очень долгая процедура, Фред. Мы предполагаем, что у нас осталось заряда в командном модуле примерно на 15 минут, поэтому мы хотим, чтобы ты начал подк
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Кажется, у меня сейчас неплохой состав гироскутеров. Проверка, которую я провел на ночной стороне, прошла нормально, но они снова уплыли, причем, судя по всему, довольно быстро. Я провел еще одну проверку, и, похоже, они вернулись в нормальное состояние. Мне не пришлось снова их
휴스턴 시 관계자 여러분, 혹시라도 시작 시간이 더 늦어질 가능
حسناً. لقد قمت بتحديثه، هذا صحيح. لقد بذلنا جهد
نعم، قد يكون ذلك صحيحًا. إنه اقتران غر
Okay. Nach 47 Stunden beträgt der Gesamtwert 1096, verteilt auf vier Alfa 270, Bravo 278, Charlie 270, Delta 278 und den H2-Tank. Der H2-Wert liegt bei 76 Prozent, der O2-Wert bei 81 Prozent. Allerdings zei
罗杰，吉姆。我们刚想到一件事
Gémeaux 4
Как вы себя сей
हमारे ग्राउंड कंप्यूटरों पर हमने पुष्ट
また、Rev 34でアンティグア上空でSPAD
روجر، جيميني 8. وفي هذا التحد
धुंध की परत के बीच में, फेक्डा दिखाई नहीं दे रहा है—मैं फोटोमीटर से भी इसकी रीडिंग नहीं ले पा रहा हूँ। फेक्डा अब क्षितिज के नीचे है, 
Salut Jack, tu as u
...を...に置くこともできると思い
就在我们进入非洲大陆的那一刻，我用哈苏相机拍下了第55张照片。当时我们看到了一缕非常漂亮的高空云，看起来是这样——所以
Tranquility Base, Houston. Wir möchten die Umstellung von LOIO auf LiOH bis nach dem [Datum einfügen] verschieben. Es besteht die Möglichkeit, dass Sie den Behälter be
로저, 버즈. PAD, MPL 항목입니다. 롤 05, 35부터 시작합니다. 수정: 359 152 001. 194 46 03 267, + 1102, - 17203, 068, 36194 656 11894 36275 1
罗杰。休斯顿，你为什么不给我们发射一轮齐射，好让
좋아요. 저
.
ठीक है, जैक। क्या मैंने आपके यॉ और रोल पर 360 डिग्
제미니 
罗杰。立管里充满了液体。液
ऑरोर
ジャ
这里是高频友谊七号。我状态极佳。一切都在按计划进行。控制燃料90-100%，氧气72
了解、こちらフレンドシップ・セブン。燃料は90～9
الجو
收到。180°偏航灯已启动。准
Ok, John dice che possiamo guard
Роджер. Похож
Tutti i sistemi sono sot
حسناً، لقد 
Хорошо. Я просто хотел, чтобы вы были в курсе этого, подумали об этом и о том, какие последствия это может иметь для плана полета. Я покажу вам этот широкоугольный снимок и прокомментирую луну, чтобы посмотреть, какие участки, по их мнению, будут наиболее подходящими. Хорошо. На свитке Фрэнк хотел, чтобы мы проверили порядок, в котором он может ожидать увидеть профили входа в атмосферу. Первый профиль, который появляется, обозначен как «Nonexit Number 2», это короткий высокоскоростной вход. Второй профиль, который появится, называется «3500 Mile», это тоже высокоскоростной вход, но его следует использовать, если мы перейдем к более длинным дистанциям входа. Затем третий профиль будет «Nonexit Entry Number 1», и за ним последует четвертый — 3500 миль. Таким образом, у вас есть четыре профиля входа. Номера 1 и 3, как вы их увидите, — это короткие дистанции, а номера 2 и 4 — это длинные свитки. Что касается х
كان ذلك موقفًا طريفًا. كما تعلم، لم 
デ
Bene. Il t
Roger. Je s
フランク、もう既に言われ
Р
Хорошо. Сегодня мы хотели бы, чтобы вы определили смещение цапфы до наблюдений, как указано в процедурах, а также после них. Наша цель — проверить возможность того, что какой-либо тепловой эффект может вызывать ошибки в у
Это не критично по времени, Фред, но если вы сейчас разбудили людей, то можете сделать это. Кстати, вы, наверное, знаете, но следующие несколько часов будут довольно спокойными с нашей точки зрения. Мы работаем над процедурами входа и будем готовы зачитать их вам примерно через 8 часов; а до этого момента ничего особенного прои
هذه هي فريندشيب 7. ينحرف ياو عن مساره
И, 13, Хьюстон. В качестве последнего предложения, мы хотели бы попросить вас включить вентиляторы во втор
Это Тананарив на КВ. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10 - 9, 8, 7, 6, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1. Танан
Ho una foto del montante a Y positivo scattata vicino alla fase di discesa, e penso che potremo vedere un 
Can 
15 - 저희는 7분 거리에 있습니
H2O2を排出中です。スイッチヒューズをオンにしました。待機しています。リカバリーアームは「アーム」です。メインシュートを待機しています。スイッチは全て正しい位置にあります。手動燃料はほぼ空になりました。メインシュートも出ました。美しいですね。明るい青空です。リーフも解除され、まるでお菓子のパイのようです。自動燃料が排出されています。降下率は現時点で約35フィート/秒です。全く問題はありません
11, Houston. On a maintenant une bonne vue de l'espace de rang
Хорошо. Температура в салоне 92 градуса, и я дам вам инверторы. Подождите. - Основной инве
好的
好了，万斯
是的，
D'accord. Odyssey est complètement hors tension, conformément à la procédure que vous avez 
尼尔，你还记得最近这次推进
Okay, Hou
로저, 11. 저
ठीक है। हमारे टॉर्क एंगल को कॉपी कर लो। हम अभी इन्हें
알겠습니다. 오토 원입니다. 워페어 내용을
روجر، ١١. كانت قيم تصحيحات منتصف المسار للعلم فقط، لكن منتصف المسار ٤ انخفض بمقدار قدمين في الثانية تقريبًا. وللعلم أيضًا، بالنسبة لضغط غرفة الاحتراق، يبدو أن قراءة جهازك البالغة ٨٧ رطلًا لكل بوصة مربعة تُطابق ٩٢ رطلًا ل
Man, I sure hate to say it based on looking through this monocular, but there's a white spot that's just like a crater - looks like an awful lot under these small fresh ones in the bottom of this rather old crater, but right in the center of it, it looks like instead of there being a crater, looks like it'
로저. 우리 선실은 괜찮은 상태입니다. 딱히 어떻게 할 수 있는 방법이 없는 것 같아요. 산소탱크 압력이 올라가는 것 외에는 별다른 문
Ricevuto. Capito; clorazio
알겠습니다. 
了解、オーロラセブン、今のところ大丈夫そうです。以前のステ
That's correct. Okay. Next: the next camera - Stand by 1. I've got noise here. Okay. The next - The next camera for the will be the 16-millimeter, and these photos are considered to be priority 3. Okay. One, get the 16-millimeter and powerpack from A-8. Get the 10-millimeter lens, and remove it - remove the 10-millimeter lens, and take the 18-millimeter lens from B-3 and attach it to the camera. And attach the power cable transfer to the, set frame rate at 12 frames per second, and the same data line that I gave you before reads this way this time. /DAC/18/CEX, battery (f:8 and 1/250th). Okay. Now looking at these two cameras in the, it's recommended that y
Roger, Houston. Quello che abbiamo in programma di fare per voi oggi è partire dalla navicella spaziale Odyssey e portarvi attraverso il tunnel fino ad Aquarius. Vi mostreremo un pezzetto del veicolo di atterr
罗杰，弗雷德。复述得不错。从面板 16 开始。在“飞行显示器”下，第一行：SE 十字指针，打开；系统 Bravo - 四联 1 TCA，关闭；四联 2，关闭；四联 3，关闭；四联 4，关闭。第二行，“照明”下：泛光灯任你选择。你可以使用逻辑电源 Bravo，打开；飞行服流量控制，打开。第三行，显示器，打开；VHF A
Columbia, Houston. 
جيميني 4، جيمي
Хорошо. Вы хотели пригласить Ф
双子座4号，双子座4号。这里是休斯顿。如果你们能读懂，我将向你们汇报27-BRAVO的最新情况。这是一次分段燃烧。前向76。后向94。2+07。1+58。09 12
ジャック、ここで横にトルクをかけているのですが、どちらの OMNI 
По
理
Right. How's everything going
Kling
휴스턴, 이글입니다. 참고로, 현재 글리콜
अरे यार! नाक पर सीधी धूप पड़ने से तो कुछ दिखाई ही नहीं द
Roger. We have an a
Roger. Le manuel est à 80 (pour 
D'accord. Tirez sur 
Apollo 11, Houston
分かりま
分かりました。パネル8：SEQ LOGICの2をOFFにし
Вращ
Okay. Ich bin jetzt voll im Retro-Fieber
Ré
ええ。ジムは今寝てるし、ジャックと私は起
ठीक है, ह्यू
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. Мы считаем, что эти показания находятся в пределах нормы. Мы просто хотели получить ваше согласие, прежде чем продолжат
Sauerstoffflasche 1: 270 P
No, that's okay. Something that is kind of interesting though is that the last time you had your water dump, they noticed a change in the trajectory tracking at the same time and they got through correlating it, they found some fellow that thought he knew the characteristics of a nozzle and how much water y
حسنً
अपटेलीमेट्री डेटा को DATA में स्थानांतरित किया जा
Bon, James, si tu n'es pas capable de mieux prendre soin d'un vaisseau spati
Roger, capi
Il nous reste 13 degrés à gauche de la balle, et je pense que c'est à peu près correct. En regardant l'ombre, etc., on est probablement à environ 13 degrés à gauche de l
Acquario, confrontando le nostre stime iniziali sul consumo di acqua e di energia elettrica, sembra che abbiamo ragione sul consumo di acqua e stiamo utilizzando un po' meno ampere di quanto ci aspettassimo nella nostra prima anali
这是要放在同一张
RKV医療データパス1番をパイロット宛に、GMT02 17 43に発行。パイロットはデータ取得の3分前に体温プローブを口に含むように指示。また、回収エリア9-3から13-2、および8-Charlieから12-BRAVOまでの音声アップデートも実施。D-8実験はGMT02 30 59に開始。
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 지금 육분의로 파키스탄 주변의 구름을 보고 있는데, 발달 후기 단계에 있는 
D'accord. Radiographie CDR 11005, CMP 10006, LMP 09007; médicament négatif. Et j'ai des informations sur la batterie et d'autres chiffres pour 
Да
Okay. Ich wurde kurz unterbrochen. Bob Hope ist wieder mit seinen Truppen in Vietnam und leistet wie immer hervorragende Arbeit. Ein Name, der hier in den Nachrichten auftaucht, stammt von der USS New Jersey. Bob Hope scherzte gestern – oder Mittwoch – von einem ri
戦いの真っ最中で、渡す
Apol
では、再突入率コマンドを試してみましょう。いずれにせよ
好的，名词 81，减
Роджер, 11. У меня для вас обновление плана полета, чтобы вы могли выбрать оп
哥伦比
ठीक ह
ヒューストン、コロンビア。ロジックバスARMのGOはいか
Neil et Buzz, je vous parle au téléphone depuis le Salon Ovale de la Maison Blanche, et il s'agit sans aucun doute de l'appel téléphonique le plus historique jamais passé. Je ne saurais vous dire à quel point nous sommes tous fiers de ce que vous avez accompli pour chaque Américain. C'est assurément le jour dont nous sommes le plus fiers. Et je suis certain que le monde entier partage l'admiration des Américains pour cet exploit immense. Grâce à vous, les cieux font désormais partie intégrante du monde des hommes. Et tandis que vous nous parlez depuis la Mer de la Tranquillité, cela nous inspire à redoubler d'efforts pour apporter la paix et la sérénité
— 
لا، ليس بعد، 
Aktualisierung erh
R
Позвольте мне немного прокомментировать это
È piuttosto buio 
Houston
... ينبغي أن نصعد من الجانب. إذن، أنت قد وضعتنا في المسار الصحيح يا جيم. نحن في المسار الصحيح. نحن متجهون للخارج و
He is down underneath t
Okay. And now we're going to switch uplink to the upvoice backup for about 2 minutes, and it may take a couple of seconds when 
C'est exact. Bien. Suivant: la prochaine caméra – Veille 1. J'ai du bruit ici.
Пожалуйста, сообщите нам примерное время переключени
في 4 SPS/G&N: 38320، ناقص 055، زائد 060 084 30 2749، زائد 31380، زائد 03475، ناقص 01032، غير متوفر، 034. باقي بيانات PAD غير مت
收到。这回读很到位。显示屏下方显示它是关闭的
稍等，你状态不错。你现在状态依然很好，还有3
Roger. I'm all se
起初，由于需要进行另一次规避机动，我们无法按计划立即开始观测。抛射物在目标区域产生了大量的伪星，使得光学校准几乎不可能。我们之前研究的方法似乎不太奏效。我最终采用的方法是进入天狼星轨道（我们最亮的恒星），取回轴和耳轴，然后驾驶航天器飞向天狼星，利用它们进行光学校准，这项工作我们稍后完成。关于光散
180, esatto. Li ho confusi, vero? È 
अच्छा। पता लगाने का कोई तरीका नहीं होगा - टीआईजी स्कैन होने में 16 मिनट बचे हैं। क्या यह स
はっ
收到。巴兹，我也在读你的五路信号，而且比特率很高。通过戈德斯通传输效果非常好。给你计数：1、
了解。冗長
Jack meint, es sei definitiv das Servicemodul gewesen – das war auc
حسنًا يا فريد. أريد أن أتأكد من أن رقم تعريف جهاز DELTA-VR الخاص بك هو 0007.8
Uffa! Beh, devo
Roger. Rev 27, Apollo Landmark 15 08 52 59. 46 Meilen südli
おはようございます。今朝は中間軌道
Sigma Seven Sigma Seven, ici Canton Com Tech, Canton Com Tech, c
아주 작아요. 1/16인치 정도 또는 그보다 더 작을 거예요. 창밖으로 떠다니는데 어두운 밤하늘을 배경으로 보여요. 해 뜰 무렵에는 정말 수천 개나 있었어요. 마치 수많은 별처럼 보였죠. 이상입니
È proprio al centro del nostro schermo. Tienila stretta, tienila ferma. Sembra davvero bella. Oka
O
硫磺岛控制中
Okay, Buster. Atteggiamento di rientro,
当前航程中期修正次数 6 看起来为零，航程中期修正次数 7 约
OK. +35 PAD: le DELTA-VT d
يرجى العلم أي
もう一つの可能​​性が浮かびます。全
鹰，哥伦比亚。请告诉我你何时进行热火检定，以便我取消
フレッドさん、ジャックが先ほど尋ねた質問を明確にするために、もう一つ変更点
Molto bene, Jim. Babbo Natale ha colp
그
Capito.
了解。今、食べているところです。3日目の2食目です。水を6杯飲みました。最後の5時間のうち、睡眠サイクルが正常だった4時間はぐっ
오늘 밤 잠자리에 드실 때까지 스위치를 AUTO 위치에 두시도록 요청하셨습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요. 다시 말씀드리지만, ON 위치에 두셔야 합니다. 다시 한번 말씀드리겠습니다. 
كن
11号，休斯顿。我们想知道
روجر. هم
はい、BAT 2、LO
로저, 
Okay. Jim sarà nei guai con il nostro attuale atteggiamento nei suoi confro
Il Sole rimbalza sulla struttura. Con il telescopio attaccato, è praticamente inutile. Credo che le mappe stellari fornite dall'MPAD sarebbero molto utili se dovessimo usare i
As the booster departed us, you could see the fuel spraying out of the roll nozzle. As the booster tumbled around, mostly in a plane that would be perpendicular to a line through the major axis of the spacecraft to the booster, y
Stehen 
Gemini 4, Gemini 4. Хьюстон CAP CAM. Кантон. В режим
휴스턴 이글입니다.
D'accord, c'est ça… Roger. Ça comprend à la fois les chiffres sur le programme lui-même, et les petits mots comme PROGRAMME, VERBE, NOM, ACTIVITÉ INFORMATIQUE, ce genre de choses
برج ا
Okay. And you want to know if you can go ahead and use additional oxyg
Ici Friendship Seven. Je contrôle maintenant la p
Роджер. Я вижу, вы подключены. Если вы подтвердите подключение, мы передадим вам новый вектор 
ジェミニ4、外科医。聞こ
휴스턴 CAP COM. 그가 퇴장
أنا لا أعتق
好的。下一页顶部写着“辅助水蒸发器”的地方，请记住，除非主蒸发器发生故障，否则我们不打算使用辅助蒸发器。在第
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 패널 382의 EVAP 수분 제어가 AUT
हां, यॉ वापस
روجر. نحن نأخذ وقتنا الكافي للوصول إلى هذا الوضع الجديد؛ فالوصول إلى نافي لا يزال بعيدًا عن الوضع المطلوب. لديّ تصحيح بخصوص الصورة رقم 20 - بعد تأقلم نافي مع الظلام، يمكنك تمييز كوكبة ذات الكرسي، ويمكنك تمييز نافي نفسها. من الصعب رؤية النجوم المحيطة. لا يزال لدينا عدد كبير من الجسيمات العالقة بالم
フレッドさん、ジャックが先ほど尋ねた質問を明確にするために、もう
了
Fred-o, se pensi che sia pratico, siamo pronti a dartene un po': stiamo lavorando su alcune impostazioni della fotocamera per le foto della ventilazione. E, se hai una fotocamera pronta all'uso, facci sapere qual è, così possiamo ottenere le impostazioni per quella fotocamera. Cosa ne pens
好的，收到。吉姆，我们来看看还有什么数据。中段-2 的速度大约是每秒 23 英尺，大致逆行，按时到达。现在轨迹非常稳定。给你参考一下，不用记下来，因
Вы уверены
네. 제가 이걸 보여드리고 있는데, 화면에 보이는 내용을 읽을 수 있는지, 그리고 P-R-O-G, V-E-R-B, N-O-U-N이라는 글자도 볼 수 있는지 확인
قله
收
هذا ما كنت تريده، أليس كذلك؟ ظننت أن هذا هو الغرض من كل ش
E Joe, Jack dice che tutte le temperature degli iniettori, le 
Canary CAP COM. У нас больше ничего не
好的，埃德。他们
11, यह ह्यूस्टन है। आपने जो व्यक्तिगत अनुभव बताया कि पिछली रात अंतरिक्ष यान के अंदर ठंडक महसूस हुई, उसके संदर्भ में हमने पहले ही बताया था कि पिछली रात की 
ヒューストンの DELT
Roger. Tu reviens un peu fatigué. On dirait que notre capte
Roger. Wir prüfen das. Wir glauben, dass wir in Madrid zwischenzeitlich die Führung verloren hatt
حسنًا، نحن
يمكنني
Рог. Я не уверен, в чем была проблема, когда мы спустились так близко, но скажу те
おい、
L'alimentation rétro est activée. Ma montre Greenwich s'est arrêtée. Les batteries principales sont en cours de chargement. Vérifiez que les alimentations RCS A et B so
मुझे लगता है कि म
Apollo 8, Houston. Roger. Wir empfehlen Ih
Roger.
وجاك، هيوستن.
Хорошо. Единственное, что 
11, ह्यूस्टन। हेलमेट बैग में रखे सामान के बारे में हमारी सलाह है - सुधार, हैच बैग में रखे सामान को निकालकर दाईं ओर के सोफे के नीचे स्लीप रिस्ट्रेंट में रख दें। इसका कारण यह है कि हैच बैग के स्ट्रैप केवल जीरो ग्रेविटी के लिए बने हैं, और इसे बांधना काफी मुश्किल काम है। स्लीप रिस्ट्रेंट में सामान रखने से इसे बांधना एक सामान्य प्रक्रिया है, और आप अपने पास मौजूद बीटा कॉर्ड का भी उपयोग कर सकते हैं। क्या आप सहमत हैं
... 
Roger. Wir möchte
Oui. Je n'arrive tout s
И,
私に足りないのは、膝の上に載っているこの物だけ
रॉजर। पृष्ठभूमि में कुछ "सबसे भाग्यशाली
Flight 社では、2 回目のテスト中に Running Light の表示が出た場合は、最初のテストに戻って各モードで同じこと
彼は今荷物を出し入れしているので、少し待つ必要があるかもしれませ
We just got it out now. We just tried to get all of our stuff unstowed, and we're not really prepared to 
Si j'avais su comment ça allait se passer, je n'aurais pas poussé l'expérience aus
— à droite du termi
Apollo 8, préparez-vous pour un repère 
좋습니다. 그
非常感谢。好的，我来念一下这些数据。起飞时格林尼治标准时间是17:16。推进剂用量为60。舱内温度为92。宇航服温度为58。舱内压力为5.6。宇航服二氧化碳浓度为0.75毫米汞柱。左侧备用氧气瓶容量为5100。右侧备用氧气瓶容量为5050。应急氧气系统（ECS）氧气含量为62%。压力为840。氧气源温度为55。氧气源压力为2000。燃料温度为68
Отлично. Теперь я вас лучше слышу. И вы поняли, что м
يمكنك أيضًا استخدام انعدام الجاذبية لتوضيح العديد من الأمور التي تعلمناها جميعًا في المدرسة. أود أن أوضح بإيجاز مدى سهولة شرح آلية عمل الجيروسكوب. إذا قمت بتدوير هذه العلبة، فنحن نعلم أنه وفقًا لمعادلات الحركة، نتوقع أنه بمجرد أن تدور هذه العلبة، ويكون محور
Okay. 5
コア 03,33649; コア 04,64690; コア 65,01059; コア 66,65460; コア 07,34726; コア 08,40866; コア 09,31745; コア 10,02510; コア 11,13600。
好的，杰克。我有个问题。如
Wir befinden uns momentan in einer sehr flachen Fluglage, sodass die Bodenstationen uns vermutlich nicht orten können. Wir haben zwar einige Funksprüche gehört, die immer wieder unterbrochen wurden, aber wir bleiben noch eine Weile in dieser Position, um die Boosterstufe im Blick zu behalten. Im Moment scheinen wir nicht viel näher an die Boosterstufe heranzukommen. Sie ist
Ja. Da wir e
حسنًا، في أسفل نافذة فحص الإدخال، حيث نحن الآن، يظهر في السطر الأخير: "من وضع الاستعداد". وفوق ذلك مباشرةً، أود تذكيرك بكتابة ملاحظة: "لا تقم بتهيئة النطاق المطلوب". وذلك لأنك ستدخل 
コンピューターから
يُشير جهاز المراقبة الطبية إلى أننا نقرأ معدل تنفسك. أعتقد أن هذه هي المرة 
Roger. Bene, Mike, ora riesco a vedere l'intera Terra dal finestrino centrale. Vedo la Florida, Cuba, l'America Centrale, tutta la metà settentrionale dell'America Cen
D'accord. I
ठीक है। बहुत बढ़िया। क्या आप जाने के लिए त
C'était en attente..
다음 페이지의 B1 칸에는 음식이 약 15% 정도 남아 있는 것으로 추정됩니다. B2 칸에서는 PPK를 꺼내고 쓰레기를 버렸습니다. B3 칸의 4번 창에는 16mm 케이블, 18mm 렌즈, 그리고 직각 거울이 있습니
Where? You're not even t
ठीक है। हमने रिकॉर्डिंग पूरी कर ली है, और टेप रिकॉर्डर आपको वापस दे दिया गया है। आ
All
Джим, похоже, что ваша батарея исправна, и проблема действительно в датчике; поэтому просим вас замкнуть цепи балансировочных нагрузок на панели 16. П
Houston, seid
좋아요, 수성이 대기광을 뚫고 지나가는 게 보이네요. 잘 보일지 지켜보죠. 제가 "보인다"라고 말했을 때가 시작이었어요. 마크, 처음으로 색깔이 변했는데, 지금은 연한 파란색이에요. 아직도 잘 보이죠. 마크, 더 진한 파란색으로 변했어요. 마크, 지구 표면의 
La vue à travers ce sextant est fantastique. Je peux voir l'Alaska juste au large, et
날씨 사진 촬영... 첫날 24시 41분경에 찍은 사진입니다. 지면에 아주 특이한 모양으로 구름이 일렬로 늘어서 있었어요. 빛이 좋
Roger. And around 00 40, the C-Reentry to COMMAND, the C-Adapter to CONTINUOUS and the S-3 Exper
Il nostro ECS è ancora 
Von hier aus sieht es gar nicht so flach aus, aber ich weiß 
了解。前線に20、右に11、
没错，如果你按正
Roger, Mike. Vorrei fare qualche commento sui dati. La manovra automatica è stata piuttosto precisa. Sembra che abbiamo individuato un punto substellare nella manovra; l'ottica automatica ha posizionato Canopus esattamente dove dovrebbe essere; il controllo dell'impulso minimo ha funzionato come previsto. Alle altitudini a cui ho iniziato gli avvistamenti, si nota una netta linea di banda nebulosa. Il filtro conferisce alla Terra un bagliore, una sorta di bagliore arancione. È molto indefinito dove posizionare la stella, ma sembra esserci una linea continua dove ci si aspetterebbe che si trovi l'orizzonte, che appare attraverso la foschia dove ci as
Моё рет
알겠습니다. 어제 카우보이스는 클리블랜드 브라운스에게 처참하게 패배했습니다. 푸에블로 승무원들은 곧 석방될 예
Il motivo per cui pensiamo che funzionerebbe è che ha funzionato sull'Apol
저는 그냥... 괜찮아요. 이제 내려
D'accord. Lacet, zéro; tangage, moins 20, sur le gain
Роджер. GET B 13 25 52; ​​Дельта-V, 9 футов в секунду; время работы двигателей, 0 плюс 11; рыскание 0, тангаж 0; Ядро 25, 00090; Ядра 26 и 27, все
Gemini 4, Хь
Apollo 8, Hawaii. Houston reports they copied your l
ロジャー、GMTRC でフェードアウトしてしまいました... もう
Questa è l'Amicizia Sette, press
不，我们还没有——足够小的——DE
Ok, Bill. Questo sarà a pagina 2, trattino 22 del tuo piano di volo. Per il pilota del modulo di comando - gliel'ho già detto - ma in cima alla pagina, circa, in realtà, vorremmo che facesse un allineamento, e poi dovrebbe essere fatto come da programma. Quelle quattro stelle, Procione, Regolo, Alphard, e ci rendiamo conto che Alphard potrebbe non essere una stella molto buona, Regolo è a circa 3 gradi sopra l'orizzonte e Spica ha un angolo di perno di 48 gradi; quindi immagino che quello che stiamo dicendo è che se Jim ha difficoltà a fare un set su ciascuna di quelle quattro ste
هيوستن، هذه أ
Houston, Verbrennung abgeschlossen. Kopiert ihr unsere Tantiem
Stiamo bene. Il pilo
A
除了引爆开关臂之外，检查清单
Что ж, вы можете просто продолжать в текущей конфигурации. Однако, если вы попытаетесь включить какие-либо двигатели, система попытается перевести вас в пол
Okay. Jack, außerdem benötigen wir von dieser Liste die Einstellung "THROTTLE" des COMMAND
हमने मूत्र प्रणाली को ठीक कर लिया, मूत्र की थैलियों को खाली कर दिया, और अब हम
Давай,
We don't care about the chamber pressure,... watch yourself for - brace
阿波罗8
روجر. بالنسبة لبيل، جودة الصوت على الجهة الخلفية رديئة للغاية. نعتبرها غير قابلة للاستخدام، ونوصي بتسجيل جميع التعليقات المهمة يدويًا حتى لا نفقدها. لا ينبغي لنا ا
यह सही है। ठीक है। अगला। मोड - पर - जब आप निर्धारित स्थिति में हों, तो मोड कंट्रोल ऑटो चुनें। दरों की निगरानी के लिए कुंजी दबाएँ; जब 0.1 डिग्री प्रति सेकंड से कम हो, तो सभी अक्षों में दर की निगरानी करें, फिर प्लस-X थ्रस्टर्स को निष्क्रिय करें। ठीक है। अ
Bene, mi sto intrufolando dove lui non ha... Tra l'altro, questo deve avere un po' di... deve avere una modalità di oscillazione attorno al nostro asse X, perché ora la Luna e 
Do you need that high gain any mo
わかりました。4列目に入ったら、OPERATE（運用）ブレーカーを開きます。つまり、CDU（通信ユニット）を監視できなくなり、姿勢も確認できなくなります。そのため、通信に使用するアンテナの選択についてアドバイスすることはできません。対処方法としては、UPLINK SQUELCH（アップリンク・スケルチ）をオフにし、ノイズが聞こえたらアンテナを切り替えてください。アンテナの切り替えは確認できますが、切り替え後、再びロックオンを確立するまで約3～5分かかります。アンテナを切り替えるたびに、音声チェックを開始します。基本的に、窓の外に地球が見えたらFORWAR
Готово 
Roger. Dank
Columbia, this is Houston.
यह चारों क्वाड पर सक्रिय हो गया था; बिल्कुल सही। हमारा अंतिम भं
ليس تمامًا يا جيم. الأمر يتعلق بمصفوفة W هذه. أتذكر أننا أعدنا تهيئتها في مدار القمر، ثم عملنا عليها أثناء عودتك بعد المشاهدات السابقة التي قمت بها، وا
Bien. Prenez maintenant une des cartouches d'hydroxyde de lithium et laissez-moi vous indiquer quelle extrémité correspond à quelle autre. L'une des extrémités plates et ventilées est presque carrée; elle est munie d'une sangle et c'est celle que nous appelons le haut. L'e
双子座八号，双子座八号，这里是休斯顿指挥中心。随
أتساءل عما إذا كان ينب
Okay. Your back is up against the purse. All right. Now it's on top of the. Forward and up; now you are clear. Little bit toward me. Straight down, to your left a little bit. Plenty of room. Neil, you're lined up nicely. Toward me a 
Gemini 4, RKV CAP COM. RKV est en attente. Si vous terminez 
こんにちは、
En observant les alentours, le contraste est globalement dû à l'ombre portée par le soleil: un gris très clair, un halo autour de mon ombre et de celle de mon casque. En regardant au loin, le contraste est maximal car la couleur environnante reste assez claire. En regardant vers le soleil, une plus grande zone omb
水使用量のプロファイルを綿密に検討しており、現在は の電源を入れたまま の電源を切る方向に傾いていますが、後ほど詳細をお知らせします。また、就寝時​​は1人監視員を配置することをお勧めします。尿の投棄は、ゴミ問題
يبدو أنك تجاوزت زاوية الإزاحة المحددة بـ 15 درجة
كيف ت
Okay. What about your left Secondar
حسنًا يا برج الدلو. نحن هنا نعيد تنظيم صفوفنا، ونعمل على تحسين أنظمة التحكم لديك، ونحاول إعداد شيء ما، ونلقي نظرة على المواد الاستهلاكية بدلًا من خطة الطيران، وما إلى ذلك. وبمجرد حصولنا على كل هذه المعلومات، سنبلغك بها. لدينا أيضًا طاقم الدعم المكون من 14 فردًا في أجهزة المحاكاة، يراجعون عمليات الاحتراق عند الرسو، ويحاولون أيضًا معرفة إجراءات المحاذاة التي يمكنهم ابتكارها لرؤية
Sesto punto, ecco... Lovell ti ha detto
...Я этого не знал. Это доказывает, что у вас чуть больше 50 
가압 작업 진행 중이며, 케이블 마
П
That's correct. Okay, now we're going to
Rog
रॉजर। क्या वे आपके पास से गुजर रहे हैं या आपके साथ तैर र
Roger. 1, /: 62844 减 161，加 129，减 29840，加 02390，加 01053 000 200 005 01693，加 
Ok, abbiamo un record di 18-1 e un record di 21-4.
了解。そう提案します。1ページ
Wir hab
حسنًا. ذهبتُ إلى مركز PULSE لأنني أريد تحسين وضعيتي على المنصة. سأبقى على هذا الوضع
Человек, сидящий рядом с вами, отличается обтекаемым 
잠시만 기다려주
下一期节目中我们会公布更多关于电视节目的信息。我们不打算
Okay. H
Roger. Nous avons essayé d'obtenir ce réalignement. Nous avons besoin de... Auriez-vous une manœuvre pour nous permettre d'obtenir certains
ठीक है, VII. 
네, 짐. 알겠습니다. 잠시 기다려 주십시오. 아
Bene. Ora andiamo
Roger, compris, entre 18 et 22 heures. Lors de la révision 12 au-dessus de RKV, je recevrai les informations PLA et CLA. La révision
أود منك أن تنتقل إلى مستوى الكس
Roger, Jim. W
They've also looked at the results of your landmark tracking. The marks all apparently were very good, and we've got a full page of data here relative to the altitudes of the various site locations, which I won't read up to you, but I did wa
Nun, Jack, so steht es in der B
هذه مركبة فريندشيب 7. أتلقى بعض المؤشرات غير المنتظمة على جميع المحاور. عندما أقوم بمحاذاة كل شيء على وضع المدار باستخدام الأجهزة، أجد أنني بعيدٌ تم
アポロ8号、ヒューストン。低ビット
正解です。毎秒8フィート、
우리가 처음 그걸 봤을 때 얼마나 멀리 떨어져 있었다고 생각하세요? 제 생각엔
Noch eine kleine Lokalnachricht: Das Gerichtsgebäude in Huntsville brannte gestern vor Tagesanbruch nieder, daher wird dort wohl wieder gebaut. Weiter geht es mit den wartenden Familien. Dieser Bericht stammt von Ann James, Reporterin der Post. „Wir ruhen uns auf der Rückseite des Mondes aus“, sagte Valerie Anders am Heiligabend, während sie und ihre Familie darauf warteten, dass Apollo 8 die Mondumlaufbahn verließ und zur Erde zurückkehrte. Frau Anders war am Dienstag um Mitternacht dort gewesen, und die Nachbarn hatten gerade alle Kinder zusammengetrommelt, damit die Familie sich ausruhen konnte, während sich das Raumschiff hinter dem Mond befand und kein Kontakt mehr bestand. Das Haus von Colonel Frank Borman war draußen mit vier großen Tannenzweigen geschmückt, mit Puderschnee bestreut und mit roten Schleifen verziert. Ein Baum im Wohnzimmer wartet auf seine sichere Rückkehr, und seine hübsche blonde Frau Sue und seine kräftigen Söhne Frederick und Edw
オーロラセブン、
COMM ist plötz
लेकिन उससे पहले हमें प्लेटफॉर्म पैरेललिज़्म कर लेना चाहि
E, Jim, puoi fare un 400 più tutti zeri og
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous n'avons aucune objection à procéder dès maintenant au déversement d'urine. Pour information, le déversement des eaux usées est reporté à une date ultérieure, ce qui vous permettra de rem
Yes, I'm happy with the last updates we got, you know, in terms of what it did to our state vector. Still not altogether happy with the various procedures. If we could 
11, hier spricht Houston. Roger. Die Verbindung ist hergestellt; der Computer gehört Ihnen. Sie können zu BLOCK gehen, die Informationen
*** 今すぐパノラマ写真を
La stella 37 andrà bene per la calibrazione ottica. E non abbiamo ancora notato nulla dopo il nostro uplink del vettore di s
Ich stelle fest, dass im Cockpit viel weniger Platz ist, als ich erwar
रॉजर। और फिर अपशिष्ट प्रबंधन ओवरबोर्ड ड्रेन वाल्व को डंप स्थिति में डाल दें। समाप्
ठीक है, बिल, और हमारा BIOMED डेटा अभी भी थोड़ा गड़बड़ लग रहा है। अपने BIOMED हार्नेस पर नीले सिग्नल कंडीशनर की जाँच क्यों नहीं करते? आपके पास एक कनेक्टर है, जो शायद बीच वाला पैकेज है, 
Okay, and, Jim, we wonder whether you've attempted to get drinking water out of the command module po-ti [sic] tank yet. 
Ok.
أقوم أيضاً بالتقاط 
Gemini 4, это RKV. Подтверждаю. Если командир экипажа не проснул
D'accord, Jack. À première vue, je ne vois pas pourquoi on
इस समय फ्लाई-बाय-वायर लो मोड में 
I'm now starting to see the sunrise in the periscope. First light in the periscope during this particular orbit as a result of the night side. It is obvious that the periscope has no function whatsoever in retroattitude on the night side. First light that I get is right now at a of practically. The sunrise is coming in rather rapidly through the periscope. I do have the lighted objects that John mentioned, and I can create some by knocking them off. I definitely have a sensation of their being a field and varying in size from small to bright. The periscope itself is blinding me. I
フランク・ボーマンです。テレビ番組を楽しんで拝見しておりましたが、今後もぜひ番組をご覧いただきたいと思います。宇宙飛行やランデブー、地球周回軌道への着陸、そしてもち
Mein einziges Problem ist, 
好的。你给
Хорошо. У меня есть для вас несколько важных слов. Стираемая память была полностью разобрана и осмотрена, и, похоже, всё в порядке. Ваш способ не оказал никакого эффекта. Единственное, что может вызвать сомнения, это если вы использовали какой-либо способ при работе с дисплеем, вы можете обнаружить, что он работает ненадежно, и вы увидите сообщение об ошибке для W-матрицы. И вы, веро
それをやっている間に、ここで を実行して、自動で調整してみることをお勧めします。ジムはリゲルとシリウスを使用せざるを得ませんでしたが、それらはかなり近い距離に
Houston, this next is a little demonstration for the kids at home, all kids everywhere, for that matter. I was going to sh
这就是他们所说的非推进式排气
Понял. На широкоугольном автоматическом режиме используется антенна с высоким коэффици
1000 قد
站在一旁
GET RC 25 15 58; RET 400K; 20 加 15。RET RB 26 加 38
Roger, Jack. Damit ist dieser Vorgang abgeschlossen. Als Nächstes zeige ich Ihnen, wie Sie über das Kommandomodul die Hauptbusse vorübergehend mit Strom versorgen. Zunächst müssen wir sicherstellen, dass keine Lasten an den Hauptbussen anliegen, alles ausgeschaltet ist und die Busse in Ordnung sind. Anschließend schalten wir die
J'ai mal au côté droit de la tête à force de me frotter les cheveux dans le mauvais sens quand j'essaie de tourner la tête dans mon casque pour bien voir par la fenêtre. J'essaie d'avoir la m
В любом случае, ты собирался заста
Роджер. Повтори последнюю часть перед тем
रॉजर।
收到。Y 001，NA，加 00202 46420 547 46211 12 1383 327 023 上 172 左 22，加 1293，减 16500
बहुत बढ़िया, प्लस 30627, माइनस 00625, प्लस 00577 180 0
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티. 어느 쪽을
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। हमें पता चला है कि आपके EVAP O
分かりました、ジャック。それでは、こちらで対応します。ト
You've 
Roger. Deke, die Dunstschicht ist sehr hell. Ich würde sagen, sie liegt 8 bis 10 Grad über dem Horizont. Und ich würde sagen, sie ist etwa doppelt so hoch über dem Horizont wie das helle blaue Band bei Sonnenuntergang; sie ist doppel
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. +2 не
Okay, in the left margin, just below 105 hours , cross out the "0507" and the 
そ
Roger, TV circuit breaker's in, 
We had a ring in one of our books come loose. It looks like that would be pretty bad if they all got loose - if they all came o
Apollo 11, Apollo 11, this i
मुझे लगता है कि आप नहीं चाहते थे कि वे अनजाने में हिल
로
Ok. Stiamo cercando di effettuare alcune misurazioni stellari in questo momento,
जड़त्वीय पर रॉजर। और अब हम 2 पैड पर चलते हैं। 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, प्लस 166, माइनस 081; TIG 080 11 3603. संज्ञा 81: माइनस 01408, सभी गेंदों को घटाकर, माइनस 00743. सभी गेंदों को रोल करें, 196 359 00657, प्लस 00537. डेल्टा-VT 01592 017 01531. सेक्स्टेंट तारा 23 1160 138. पैड का शेष भाग अनुपलब्ध है। संरेखित करें, वेगा और डेनेब 243 183 012. उलेज, दो जेट 19 सेकंड। टिप्पणी: आपके लोड पर, हम उड़ान योजना में दिखाई देने वाले मान के बजाय R1 20101 चाहते हैं। सेक्स्टेंट स्टार चेक करते समय, यह 79:30:10 के बीच किया जाना चाहिए, जिस समय तारा क्षितिज के ऊपर आता है, और 79:52:10 के बीच, जो आपके स्थानीय सूर्योदय का समय है क्योंकि यह तारा सूर्य के अपेक्षाकृत निकट है। आपका बर्न ओरिएंटेशन हेड डाउन ह
Roger
휴스턴, 콜롬비아입니다. 이제 곧 첫 번째 착륙선 관측 시간이 다가오는데, 혹시 지형적인 단
알겠습
Роджер, Джим. Один вопрос — мы говори
로저. 현장 확인 완료. 데이
Columbia, Houston. Ihr müsst keine weitere Messung durchführen, es sei denn, ihr wollt. Pause. Und Colum
阿波罗8号，休斯顿。我
حسناً، كانت مؤشرات الرادار تتحرك بشكل عشوائي يا ديف. لا يمكنني التأكد تماماً. كنت - قدر 
Well, Frank, my thoughts are very similar. The vast loneli
إيجل، هيوستن في وضع العمى. جرب معدل بت منخفض
فيما يخص الكتب، أعتقد أننا بحاجة إلى مزيد من العناية بنوع الحلقات المستخدمة. واجهنا صعوبة في فتحها مرتين أو ثلاث مرات، كما أن الصفحات تتمزق ولا تثبت في مكانها. يجب أن نبحث في إمكانية تقوية الثقوب التي تُثبّت فيها الحلقات. أما بالنسبة لمسدس الماء، فإن الحلمة الصغيرة البارزة من نهايته، والتي تسمح بتدفق الماء، تب
जेमि
Roger. Je te le su
रॉजर, जिम। हम अब आपकी बात सुन रहे हैं। शुरू क
Ok, Houston. Il CMP sarà sveglio alle 18:00. Il LMP dormirà ora, e dormirà tutta la notte fino a quando non sarà il momento. Poi scaglionerò il sonno e cercherò di a
Roger. We agree wholeheartedly. And while you're starting on that, I'll read - just read these notes on. Call possible program alarm 5.6, range greater than 400 nautical miles, and then use the as described on 20. Take option 1 in NOUN 06, and use the no update mode. The rendezvous radar will lock on at about 25 degrees elevation above the horizon. If 503 alarm occurs, designate fail. Key a PROCEED and allow the rendezvous radar to search for the. And place the range altitude monitor switch in altitude/altit
我看到一些东西正在脱落，但看得不太清楚。现在到了0.05g，绿色区域。此时我完全放手。我处于速率控制模式，辅助阻尼也已开启。我已经启动了滚转速率控制。俯仰速率也略有变化，效果不错。不知何故，我终于能看到窗外的景色了。又一个长长的螺旋状装置消失了。在0.05g之后，我会再测量一次血压。所有速率都非常正常。我认为速
Хорошо, Билл. Думаю, я хочу повторить свой последний вопрос об использовании бортового вектора состояния для 4. После более тщательного изучения вопроса на земле, им нужно приступить к созданию и выполнению всех вычислений, и вместо того, чтобы откладывать это или делать дважды, мы будем использовать те процедуры, которые мы применяли все это время. Что касается лунной орбиты, мы изучали этот вопрос, и несколько ребят — Джек Шмитт и компания в задней комнате — изучают, какое влияние оказывают ваши окна. И, по сути, похоже, есть два варианта, которые повлияют на 2. Один из вариантов, конечно, будет заключаться в том, чтобы вы с Джимом поменялись местами, и Джим мог бы смотреть наружу и получать данные с зенитного ракетного комплекса таким образом, а другой вариант — перевернуть аппарат и позволить Джиму направить оптику как можно дальше вперед и получить данные с зенитного ракетного комплекса через телескоп. И я думаю, нам бы хотелось услышать ваши мысли о том, что, по вашему мнению, можно сделать с окнами; Если у вас есть какие-либо предложения, мы хотели бы учесть их при планировании и как можно 
Th
Par ailleurs, et à titre d'information générale, le soleil devrait se trouver 
Gemini 4, Houston 
ठीक है, अपोलो 8। यह - यह सही है। आप उच्च बिट दर पर हैं, और हमें डर है 
हां, हमने बचे हुए हिस्से को निकाल दिया था, लेकिन ऐसा लगता है कि समय के साथ वे हम पर 
ठ
الشيء الوحيد هو أننا لا نحتفظ بسجلات جيدة بشأن ذلك في الوقت الح
ठीक है। स्न
Не могли бы вы запустить программу PRELAUNCH на своем компьютере? Во
Auf einem Foto, aufgenommen rechts hinten im Raumschiff am Rand der Abstiegsstufe, ist eine deutliche Verdunkelung der Oberflächenfarbe zu erkennen, sowie nur geringe Anzeichen von Abtragung oder Erosion. Während des Abstiegs bemerkten wir beide, dass große Mengen feinster Staubpartikel aufwirbelten. Im Vorfeld war berichtet worden, dass nach dem Abschalten der Triebw
Роджер. Сейчас в Колумбии ничего особенного не проис
日落景色相当壮观，我觉得没必要花太多时间欣赏。它们本身就很有趣。还有一点很神奇，就是眼睛还没适应的时候，周围一片漆黑。我确实能看到窗户上有一些涂层。现在要回到超高频VOX模式进行发射。打开面罩擦拭右侧麦克风。我舔了一下。关上面罩。面罩立刻密封，以便宇航服电路开始工作。我可不想再被它弄脏。宇航服进气口的温度稳定在68度左右。所以穹顶又要升起来了。现在温度是76度，75度。看来这个更高的设置才是我们想要的。我想再往上加半格，应该就能锁定温
रॉजर। ये वो वीओजीएए है जिसे आप शोर कम करने के लिए लूप में सुनते हैं। शायद कोई रि
N
अपोलो 8, आग
Аполлон-8, Хьюстон. Принято. Я допустил од
風船が開きます。風船は飛び出しました。かなり遠くまで飛んでいるように見えますが、今はもうかなり遠くまで飛んでいて、どんどん遠ざかっているように思
بما أننا لسنا كذلك - ليس واضحًا لي أننا لم نواجه توقفات ميكانيكية لفترة من الوقت في المرة السابقة. قد يفسر ذلك 10 دقائق من تلك الـ 15 دقيقة، ولا جدوى من المخاطرة. أعتقد أنه يجب علينا - إذا بدأ الاتصال بالانقطاع مرة أخرى - أن نعيده إلى الوضع اليدوي ونعيده إلى مكانه الصحيح. ما زلنا بعيدين عن المنزل، وإذا تعطل مفتاح الهوائي، فسيتعطل وضع الكسب العالي، وهذا كل ما 
11, Houston. Our recommendation on the gear you got in the helmet bag - correction, hatch bag, would be to remove that stuff and put it in the sleep restraint under the right couch. The reason is that the hatch bag straps are only configured for zero g, and it is a pretty difficult job getting it lashe
Хорошо. Земля прошла — просто прошла примерно — чуть выше инде
मैंने सेक्स्टेंट पर हरे रंग का फ़िल्टर इस्तेमाल किया, और हरे रंग का फ़िल्टर बिना किसी फ़िल्टर के मुकाबले क्षितिज को ज़्यादा साफ़ और स्पष्ट दिखाता है। क्या आप
Roger, Gemelli 4. Potresti ripetere le
Stavo solo commentando: ho guardato i propulsori dei quad 1 e 4. Abbiamo una leggera scoloritura all'esterno della ca
रॉजर। 
आगे बढ़ो, सिग
Acquario, Hous
L
Хорошо, новая тема. Хотелось бы прервать разговор и сказать, что мы
Roger. Sehr gut. Und ich habe ein Update zu den Verbrauchsmaterialien für Sie, falls
حسنًا يا جيم، نحن نقدر أن لدينا ساعة أخرى على الخرطوشة الأساسية
استعدوا للاحتر
حسناً. سنمضي قدماً في فحص DAP
알겠습니다. 비행 계획에 대한 자세한 내용을 알려드리겠습니다. 물론 -3이 없으므로 중간 코스 3 관련 내용을 모두 삭
I'll need to holler across to you to get the mission timers on. Do we want to check and get
好吧——今天早上，我们来看看它与M线平行的程度。在我们第一次开始标记之前，这三个角度的计算似乎有些偏差，我浪费了很多燃料，先调整到这三个角度，然后再进行大幅度的姿态调整以使M线平行。在某些情况下，似乎只需要一个公认的姿态，但你们都说不需要。所以有些情况
收到。我们现在正等着有事可做。我们需要一个状态向量，也就是 REFSMMAT，才能继续进行 AGS 操作。另外，我们需要你观察一下我们的 
Die gesamte Prozedur schien einwandfrei zu funktionieren. Nur die Triebwerksaktivität war etwas merkwürdi
ट्रांसलेशनल कं
Okay. Rechts im Bild befindet sich ein Dreifachkrater mit einem kleinen Krater zwischen dem ersten und zweiten. Der Krater unten im Bild ist Schubert Y. Zoomen Sie hinein; Schubert Y hat einen Zentralberg. Genauer gesagt, mehrere, die Sie zusammen mit den Randkratern am unteren Bildschirmrand erkennen könn
Ta
غوايماس كاب كوم، غواي
Хорошо, Хьюс
और कॉलिन्स, स्माइथ सागर के 
好的。现在我们可以给你们展示一下，还有一个小惊喜。我们现在把减速伞放在弗雷德位于指挥舱的沙发上。我们暂时把它收起来，因为我们正在检查“水瓶座”探测器，探测器就收纳在他沙发底下。这玩意儿挺大挺笨重的，我们
Die Temperatur des Anzugs steigt jetzt noch leicht an, sie liegt bei etwa 72 G
Roger. On the TM here, we noticed some fluct
번역 컨트롤러에서 시계 
50-دلتا 55 للأمام، 85 للخلف. 1+31
Да уж, мне очень нравится эта невесомость. Это лучший способ перед
그리고 
अंतरिक्ष यान 0-90-0. ठीक है। हमने पहले ऐसा नहीं किया था। कोई बात नहीं। ठीक है, हमने इसे पूरा 
네, 이미 번 
لقد حلّ الظلام تقريباً الآن، ولا أصدق أنني في هذا المكان
Роджер. Он выдвинется вперед, и мы окажемся в ситуации, 
Sì, sono soddisfatto degli ultimi aggiornamenti che abbiamo ricevuto, sai, per quanto riguarda l'effetto sul nostro vettore di stato. Non sono ancora del tutto 
Celui-ci était beauc
好的，在烧毁卡上，第三行应 STAB/CONTROL CB 全部关闭，但 CB(11) 除外，打开；ABORT STAGE 打开；AELD 打开；CB (16)
Ricevuto. Confermiamo la buo
Сейчас в центре экрана находится кратер Уэбба. Мы смотрим на него прямо сверху примерно за 6 минут до начала спуска. У него относительно плоское дно, и вы можете увидеть, возможно, два или три кратера на его дне на западной стене, той стене, которая сейчас ближе всего к камере. В нижней части экрана мы видим небольшой кратер, расположенный чуть дальше от камеры. А затем, вернувшись к нижней части экрана и влево, вы можете увидеть ряд углублений. Именно такие соединенные кратеры вызывают у нас наибольший интерес, и нам интересно выяснить, почему они распол
ठीक है। मिड-पीएसी, 000152, 000;, 178; और आपको याद होगा कि यह चंद्रमा अस्त होने का समय और चंद्रमा-जांच अभिवृत्ति है। संज्ञ
프렌드십 세븐,
我们
لقد أخرجناها للتو. حاولنا للتو إخراج جميع أغراضنا من ا
Роджер. В Вашингтоне финансовый комитет Сената одобрил продление действия дополнительного подоходного налога, но голосование в Сенате по этому законопроекту пока кажется маловероятным. В Остине представитель штата Рэй Леммон из Хьюстона был выдвинут на должность национального директора Американского общества океанографии. Леммон предложил изучить возможность создания института океанографии в Техасе. Это был бы первый подобный институт в западной части Мексиканского залива. В Миннеаполисе, штат Миннесота, метеорологическое бюро, после подведения итогов сегодняшней погоды, показав максимальную температуру 88 градусов и минимальную 72, отметило: «снегопада нет». Из Сент-Петербурга, штат Флорида, поступило радиосообщение от норвежского исследователя Тора Хейердала, который сообщил, что экипаж его папирусного судна «Ра» прибудет в Бриджтаун, Барбадос, несмотря на повреждения от сильного шторма. Однако экипаж будет ночевать на борту сопровождающего судна. Норман Бейкер, штурман экспедиции, сообщил, что сегодня экипаж находился на борту «Ра», ремонтируя повреждения, полученные во время штормов на прошлой неделе, из-за которых треснуло основание мачты. Часть сломанной мачты была выброшена за борт, и судно находилось в 725 милях к востоку от Барбадоса. «Спать на борту «Ра» возможно, но неудобно», — сказал Бейкер в радиосообщении. «Но цель нашего путешествия — не проверка силы или выносливости». Именно поэтому экипаж проводил ночи на борту эскорт
Your altitude is 9 413; velocity is 6072; roll is 1 degree, 
收到。27区-BRAVO 分裂燃烧。前部76。后部94
Molto ben
わかりました、アポロ8号です。この7900フィート/秒が誤解のないように確認しておきたいのですが、これはフィート当たりの高速
Roger, v
제미니 4호, CSQ입니다. ECS O2 히터
Roger. Hast du die vorherige, 14 54 00 Horizon Scanner Sunset
ها! ها! ها! هيا، لنضع هذا جان
好的
알겠습니다. 프레드, 참고로 말씀드리자면, 기체 내 이산화탄소 측정값이 지상에서 측정한 값보다 약간 높습니다. 측정값이 15에 도달하면 보조 모드로 전환해 주십시오. 그리고 약 30분마다 상태를 알려주시면 감사하겠습니다. 자세한 사항은 전화드리겠습니다. 저희가 여전히 당신을 생각하고 있다는 것을 알려주시기 위해, 생물 
好的，格斯，我的状态良好；控制模式是电传
नकारात्मक। अ
Gemini 4
यह विकल्प 1 के रूप में किया जाएगा। कंप्यूटर के अंदर दूसरे विकल्प के होने का ए
Z Cal kommt jetzt du
Bene, al momento stiamo valutando la stabil
This is Friendship Seven
Roger bezüglich der Trägheitsnavigation. Und los geht's mit dem 2. PAD. 2, SPS/G&N: 38320, plus 166, minus 081; TIG 080 11 3603. NOUN 81: minus 01408, minus alle Kugeln, minus 00743. Alle Kugeln rollen, 196 359 00657, plus 00537. DELTA-VT 01592 017 01531. Sextant Stern 23 1160 138. Der Rest des PAD ist NA. Ausrichtung, Vega und Deneb 243 183 012. Füllstand, zwei Jets 19 Sekunden. Anmerkungen: Für Ihre Ladung wünschen wir einen R1 20101 anstelle des Wertes, der im Flugplan angegeben ist. Die Sextanten-Sternprüfung muss zwischen 79°30'10" (Aufgang des Sterns über dem Horizont) und 79°52'10" (Sonnenaufgang in Ihrer Region) erfolgen, 
Je
Roger. You gave u
프레드
Je vous recontacte après une pause d'environ 45 minutes. Nous avons remarqué que, concernant votre antenne à gain élevé, vous pourriez l'utiliser plus efficacement en passant de l'antenne OMNI à celle-ci lorsque l'angle de lacet est de 90 degrés et l'angle de tangage de -45 degrés. Nous constatons que vous restez 10 minutes de pl
रॉजर। अब म
Tout à fait, Buzz; et dernier point: nous vous demandons d'effectuer une correction de trajectoire, même si nous n'en prévoyons pas. Nous vous suggérons de vous en occuper une fois le déversement des eaux usées terminé. Nous avons
यह थोड़ा ज्यादा दाईं ओर झुक गया है। क्या आप इसे लगभग 4 या 5 डिग्री बाईं ओर वापस ल
اختفى اللون الأزرق لحذائي تمامًا الآن، وتحول إلى هذا اللون *** لا أعرف تحديدًا أي لون أصفه سوى لون الكاكاو الرمادي. يبدو أنه يغطي معظم الجزء الفاتح من الحذاء *** اللون *** جزيئات دقيقة ج
Neil, qui è Houston. Vorremmo che tutti voi riceveste due tubi del nucleo e l'esperimento sul vento solare; due tubi del nucleo e il vento solare.
Le roulis sera ici, mais le lacet sera dé
Ok. Devo scrivere un po' di log e altre cose del genere. Quindi tieni d'occhio i sistemi e gli angoli del gimbal, e andrà tutto be
База «Транквилити», это Хьюстон. Наша телеметрия показывает, что в данный момент автоматический выключатель цепи управления двигателем находится в положении «РАЗОМКНУТО». Просим вас о
姿勢は正常です。再突入姿勢までピッチを下げ、逆姿勢を修正します。再突入姿勢に留まる理由はありません。逆姿勢では視界が良好であるにもかかわらず、再突入姿勢に留まる理由はありません。そして、これこそがまさに飛行に必要な姿勢です。逆姿勢に近づい
好的。在第四行，我
Okay. CB RE
C'est exact. Juste la batterie 6, Jack. Et à la ligne suivante, vous aviez « BATTERY 1 et 3 ». Remplacez par « BATTERY 1, 2, 3 et 4 ». Ajoutez simplement les ba
だんだん暗くなってきた。ちょっと待って。いつか連絡してね。ああ、あ
Un petit air de « With Their Eyes on the Stars » p
حسنًا. هل تسمعون برج ال
わかりました。1行目の「そしてVHF-A」を消してください。2行目の「SIMPLEX動作」を消してください。3行目の「Prime」を消してください。これはPRIME POWER AMP、OFFを意味します。この
أتمنى أن تشاهدو
Oui. On va recouvrir celle-là avec du ruban adh
D'accord, compris, chér
알겠습니다. 목적은 Verb 37 ENTER, 23 ENTER를 입력하여 상태 벡터를 지구권으로 가져오는 것입니다. 1, 2, 3 레지스터에 다음 숫자를 입력합니다. 레지스터 1: 00002; 레지스터 2: 5개의 공; 레지스터 3: 00210. 3단계: 계속 진행합니다. 4단계: 계속 진행합니다. 25. 계속 진행하지 마십시오. 30초 동안 기다린 후 ENTER, 00 ENTER를 
... Ich hatte die Waffe allerdings nicht dabei, und die Verwendung des Sicherungsseils gestaltete sich aufgrund seiner Position an der Raumschifftür etwas schwieriger. Wie ein Sicherungsseil es ebe
هيوستن، هل هناك أي شيء آخر تحتاجونه بخصو
Sì. Credo che aspetterò che tornino prima di fare la pulizia. Okay? Perché, non so, forse vogliono che tutta quella roba venga fatta sul retr
— Дальше этого дело не 
제
لا، هذا الشيء، آه، لا توجد علي
알겠
了解しました。そして彼は、後にそれらが白い粒子のように見えるとき
حسناً. فهمت. انعطاف بطيء قليلاً إلى اليسار. بدأت تفقد السي
सभी डेल्टा थ्रस्टर्स मेन ए पर और सभी ब्रावो थ्रस्टर्
Roger, Neil. Pour commencer: les messages de félicitations pour la mission Apollo 11 affluent à la Maison-Blanche depuis ce matin, envoyés sans interruption par les dirigeants du monde entier. Parmi les derniers en date figurent des télégrammes du Premier ministre britannique Harold Wilson et du roi des Belges. La presse internationale est entièrement consacrée à Apollo 11. Certains journalistes estiment que plus de 60 % des articles parus aujourd’hui dans les journaux du pays concernent votre mission. Le New York Times, qui, comme nous l’avons déjà mentionné, a connu un tel succès pour son édition du jour (malgré un tirage de 950 000 exemplaires), a annoncé qu’il republierait l’intégralité du numéro jeudi, à titre d’édition spéciale. Le Premier ministre Alexeï Kossyguine vous a adressé ses félicitations, ainsi qu’au président Nixon, par l’intermédiaire de l’ancien vice-président Humphrey, actuellement en visite en Russie. Les cosmonautes ont également publié un 
Okay, the time of transfer to power was 57 hours, 11 minutes. For your information, we
Хорошо, Фрэнк. Что касается результатов матчей, ты получил информацию о сегодн
Okay, 11. Es hat sich herausgestellt, dass die Triebwerksleistung bei beiden Brennvorgängen dieser Mission bisher der Leistung bei den Triebwerksabnahmetests entsprochen hat. Der Messwert des Bordcomputers ist auf eine
알겠습니다. 그렇게 할게요. 아직 물에 염소 소독도 안 했고, 수산화리튬도 교체 안 했어요. 저
Non, je l'ai perdu. Il y avait comme de gros bras q
好的。入轨点 PAD 位于 MIDPAC 区域：359 153 001 194 46 03 267，加 1102，减 17203 067 36194 655 11875 36275 195 03 03 00 28；DL 和 VL，这四个参数均不适用；DO，4 00 02 10 00 18 03 38 08 21 44 2932 380；视轴星为天蝎座 θ，上 314，右 34，升力矢量向上。备注：入轨数据假设没有中途机动。
Yes. Yes, Jack, I'll answer him your question in a minute, but make Jack's first impression here, is that it's not near the intensity that it was right after our mishap. And I'll have to agree with that. I'd say - he said it was a half and I 
側面では、デッドバンドを最小のATT HOLDに設定していました。接触時にスラスターをプラスXに噴射したところ、その
Bene, l'analisi preliminare dei dati indica che il motore centrale S-II ha vibrato a
おはようございま
F：好的，Z倒下了
적절한 속도가 어느 정도인지 말하기는 어렵습니다. 제 생각에는 지금 제가 사용하는 속도가 
Bis jetzt funktioniert alles gut, Charlie. Wir haben einen an der Wasserpistole und den anderen am Wasserhahn unten installiert. Ein Problem ist, dass sie an der Verbindungsstelle zwischen Futterbeutel und Wasserfilter undicht sind. Abgesehen davon scheinen sie aber recht gut zu funktionieren. Anfangs kam etwas Gas durch, ich den
... वो बड़ा भारी सूट पहनकर जो आपको गिरते त
在其下方，划掉“继续目视观察”和“停止观察”。再往下，划掉“拍摄目标56，焦距8、250、无穷远、5”等等，直到该
تشغ
Roger. Wir sind fast abfahrbereit. Ed hat gerade einen seiner Handschuhe
調子はどうだ？ 彼はそれをひっくり返したのか？ 間違ってい
Ricevu
Отчет о состоянии работы двигателя: двигатель работал по расписанию; время работы двигателя
Oh, let me take a look outside... He's sticking his hea
ねえ、それはい
Roger, 11. Wir würden gerne in naher Zukunft bei Ihnen zu einem passenden Zeitpunkt eine Abwasserentsorgung durchführen. Es ist kein bestimmter Zeitpunkt vorgesehen. Zum Zeitpunkt der dritten Kurskorrektur (ca. 53:55 Uh
Roger. Before Bill falls asleep, we'd like to have him go ahead and do that secondary EVAP check now at any time at his convenience, and if we don't happen to be able to monitor it with high bit rate, just let u
रॉजर। यहाँ सब कुछ सामान्य लग रहा है। सब ठीक दिख रहा है। ऑटो फ्यूल 55 प्रतिशत है। 70,000 फीट, 65,000 फीट से गुजर रहा हूँ। स
这里是友谊七号。我脚下几乎全是云，放眼望去，四面八方都是云层。完毕
好的，我们一切换到自动
準備が整い次第、TX をお送りしたいと
Aff
C'est en cours, Houston. Di
혹시 잘못된 방향으
Houston, Verse
Bermuda Cap Com, Frien
रॉजर, ऑरोरा सेवन। पि
... bel ti
L'interrupteur est sur OFF. Sachez que j'ai réduit la 
C'est exact, Apollo 8. Et j'ai au
روجر. وستنتقل
Is it sleepy out down th
よかった。逆の結果になるかどうか
了解しました。
रॉजर, 11. नील, आपकी आवाज़ थोड़ी कट-कट कर आ रही है। आपके सिग्नल तेज़ हैं, लेकिन बीच-बीच में रुक रहे हैं। ज़मीन से देखने प
Bene. Per oggi, vorremmo che tu determinassi la deviazione del trunnion prima degli avvistamenti, come previsto dalle procedure, e
——然后他喝了他那杯美味的橙汁。或许我应该说他喝了他的橙汁。他平时没这么快。比尔今天真是赶时间。好了，这就是我们吃的东西。现在，航
Хорошо. Я нажму ENTER, удерживая кнопку MODE CONTROL ATT HOLD, а затем 30 раз поверну рул
前
مرحباً، كولومبيا، هيوستن. نود منك البدء في تنفيذ ق
Roger. D'après les dépêches du Bureau des affaires publiques: Apollo 11 continue de faire la une
好的。断路器 BATTERY B POWER ENTRY 和 POSTLANDING 也一样
Okay. Wir prognostizieren für den nominalen Zeitpunkt Ihres nächsten Mittelkurses, also zwei Stunden vor dem Eintritt in die Grenzfläche, eine Brenngeschwindigkeit von 1,4 Fuß pro Sekunde. Dadurch ändert sich Ihr Gammawert an der Grenzfläche um ein Zehntel Grad. Aktuell, ohne weitere Manöver, beträgt Ihr Gammawert -6,39 Grad. Wir werden ihn leicht erhöhen, um die Mitte der Ziellin
C'è un cratere molto scuro nel materiale di riempimento di questa valle di fronte a noi ora. È piuttosto insolito in quanto è ne
我们刚进来的时候感觉有点热或者有
我不知道，但它确实在 2 分钟时出现了一个小波动
खेल जगत की बात करें तो, चलिए देखते हैं। पिछले कुछ दिनों में जब आप व्यस्त थे, तब जो नामाथ और फुटबॉल कमिश्नर पीट रोज़ेल ने घोषणा की कि "ब्रॉडवे जो" ने बैचलर्स III रेस्टोरेंट में अपनी हिस्सेदारी बेचने और न्यूयॉर्क जेट्स में शामिल होने पर सहमति जताई है। जो आज जेट्स के ट्रेनिंग कैंप में पहुंचे और उन्होंने अपना पहला अभ्यास सत्र किया। जो के साथ कई अन्य जेट्स खिलाड़ी भी शामिल हुए, जिन्होंने पहले विरोध किया था। और जैक्सन, मिशिगन के डेवी हिल ने पिछले सप्ताह अपने तीसरे मेजर गोल्फ टूर्नामेंट में जीत हासिल की। ​​उन्होंने फिलाडेल्फिया क्लासिक जीता। हिल इस साल अब तक चार टूर्नामेंट जीत चुके हैं और 129,000 डॉलर की शानदार जीत के साथ इस साल सबसे ज्यादा पुरस्कार जीतने वाले खिलाड़ी हैं। बेसबॉल की बात करें तो, नेशनल लीग के पश्चिमी डिवीजन में कड़ी टक्कर जारी है। लॉस एंजिल्स और सैन फ्रांसिस्को लीग में शीर्ष पर चल रही अटलांटा से एक गेम पीछे हैं। एस्ट्रोस का रिकॉर्ड 48 जीत और 48 हार का है और वे अब पांचवें स्थान
左後方のデテントか
Le circuit de refroidissement secondaire était en excellent état. Le radiateur semblait bien étanche et tous les autres composants fonctionnaient parfaitement. Vos régulateurs d'oxygène principaux se sont remplis à 104 psi lors de notre vérification. Compte tenu de l'orbite lunaire, prévoyez une ébullition d'environ 450 grammes d'eau par heure, ce qui n'est qu'une approximation; les estimations des besoins en eau pour l'ébullition sont très variables, allant d'une ébullition importante à une ébullition nulle. La prochaine vidange d'eau aura lieu ensuite, vous n'avez donc pas à vous en soucier pour le moment. Les prévisions de communication sont bonnes, peut-être même un peu meilleures que prévu, et nous devrions obtenir un débit binaire élevé sur les antennes OMNI avec notre antenne de 64 mètres à Goldstone. Cela fonctionnera pour les premières rotations, puis nous changerons de site et nous utiliserons à nouveau les antennes OMNI pour un débit binaire élevé. La qualité vocale est bonne. Vos piles à combustible ont fo
Joe, abbiamo avuto un'interruzione del segnale a circa metà strada, ovvero a circa un quinto dell'inizio del tuo percorso, e Fred non l'ha ricev
好了，刚才被打断了一会儿。鲍勃·霍普又回到越南和他的部队一起演出了，一如既往地表现出色。新闻里提到的一个名字来自“新泽西”号战列舰。昨天——或者说是周三——鲍勃·霍普站在一个巨大的炮塔上开玩笑，逗乐了“新泽西”号战列舰上的1500名官兵，这已经是该舰连续第20年在海外慰问美军士兵过圣诞节了。霍普和他的27名成员组成的乐队在参加完“汉考克”号航空母舰上的圣诞弥撒后，来到“新泽西”号上为官兵们表演，两艘船都在越南附近海域。“这一定是世界上最大的克里斯·克拉夫特号了，”霍普对官兵们说，“它看起来像带舵的威克岛。” “我觉得他们特意把这艘船从封存状态中拿出来，就为了给我鸣放21响礼炮，真是太好了，”他说。霍普站在舰上的一座16英寸炮塔上开玩笑。水手们对随“希望号”登船的一群长腿女孩印象尤为深刻，其中包
ロジャー、フランク。フライトプランの今後数時間についてお伺いしたいのですが。ジムには先に寝かせて、午後11時
Gemini 4, Gemini 4, sobald Ihre OAMS-Brenngeschwindigkeit 120 ft/sec überschreitet, geben wir Ihnen eine geteilte Brenngeschwindigkeit: 84 Fuß aus den vorderen Triebwerken und den Rest aus den hinteren. Verstanden?
是的，
アポロ8号、ヒュースト
켄, 저도 그렇게 생각합니다. 이 띠는 M선과 평행한데, 외부에서 광학 장치로 들어오는 직사각형 입구, 즉 광학 장치 설계와 관련이 있는 것 같습니다. 이 특정 태양 각도에서는 띠가 정확히 가로지릅니다. 지구와 태양 모두 스캐닝 망원경에 이런 현상을 일으킨다는 것을 알게 되었습니다. 육분의에서도 같은 빛 띠가 나타나는데, 육분의 시야 전체를 가리지만 확대율 덕분에 별이 아주 잘 보이고 표시도 가능합니다. 하지만 스캐닝 망원경으로는 별을 식별하기가 매우 어렵습니다. 제가 발견한 광학 장치의 최적 관측 자세는 스캐닝 망원경으로 큰개자리와 오리온자리를 볼 수 있는 자세입니다. 지금처럼 우주선이 특정 각도에 있을 때는 띠가 사라지고 태양이 우리 뒤에 있어서 별을 꽤 많이 볼 수 있습니다. 어제는 어둠에 적응하고 나니 처음에는 보이지 않던 카시오페이아자리 주변의 별들을 꽤 많이 볼 수 있었습니다. 하지만 지금은 이 띠 때문에 아르크투루스 외에는 아무것도 보이지 않는데, 물론 우리가 지금 목표로 삼고 
로저. 알겠습니다. 참고로 말씀드리자면, 혹시 현장에서 직접 확인해 보셨나요? 저희가 항법에 사
わかった、ジ
Apollo 11, this is Houston. One minute to Ta
आरकेवी, जेमिनी 
Apoll
Roger, Cape. Wir lassen Sie den Treibstoffschalter eingeschaltet und führen den Texas-Burn durch. Wir beobachten dann Ihren Treibstoffverbrauch über den USA. Sollte das P
Questi maledetti bastardi hanno quasi sempre un 104 in fase 
Aqua
알
रॉजर। आखिरकार मैंने आपको ओम्नी डी पर वापस लाने में कामयाबी हासिल कर ली है। मैं आपको हाई गेन पर लाने की कोशिश कर रहा था, लेकिन नाकाम रहा, और मैंने COMMAND RESET का इस्तेमाल करके PROCESS मोड पर स्विच कर दिया है। अब आप मुझे कैसे सुन 
오로라 세븐, 선실 물 사용량을 줄이세요
Si vous vous posez la question, j'ai fou
Cens
حسنًا. الفولتية 39.5؛ الأمبير
Ok. Ne vuoi un po'? Sono circa 105. No, 1
हमें द
そして海岸線
罗杰。Delta
If you'll give i
My gloves don'
أنا أقف على بُعد ستة أقدام منه يا تشارلي، ويمكنك ق
충분한 공간을 확보해 주세요
了解、ビル。姿勢については、ピッチ角ゼロを要求しています。ピッチ角は約27度で、
Okay. On power 5, emergency powerd
... achte darauf, dass du da
Okay. The pitches up, acquires the service module and photographs it, and I should expect to find - might possibly see the service module out of window
Аполлон-13, Хьюстон. Мы хотим отправить вам вектор состояния. Запросите и ПРИМИТЕ его в удобное для ва
分かりました。バッテリーの充電に関する質問への回答ですが、計算上はフル充電のはずです。ただし、排水口と同じように操作してください。もし返却期限日が迫っているので、もっと早
네, 알겠습니다. 프레드, 감사합니다. 38.9와 1.9입니다. 그는 우리가 배터리에 다시 공급하는 암페어 양을 확인하기 위해 최대한 매끄러운 그래프를 만들고 있는 것입니다. 그래서 30분 간격으로 측정하려는 겁니다. 만약 그 측정 일정이 당신의 휴식 시간 등에 심각한 지
D'accord. Je suis juste à côté de l'an
Roger. Alles normal hier. Sieht gut aus. 55 % automatischer Treibstoff. Durchfliege 70.000 Fuß, 65.000 Fuß. Die Fluglage ist sehr stabil. Nähere mich auf 60.000 Fuß. Die Steigrate funktioniert sehr gut. Nähere mich auf 50.000 Fuß. Sieht super aus. Nähere mich auf 45.000 Fuß. Ich habe nur noch etwa 1 g. Bereite mich darauf vor, bei 40.000, 41.000 Fuß Vollgas zu geben. Ich gebe Vollgas, und die Triebwerke sind aus. Man kann sie hören; ich kann sie w
네, 저도 동감이에요, 잭. 잭 스위거트랑 저는 아까 위층에 올라가서 각각 통을 하나씩 가져왔어요. 재료를 찾다가 그걸 어떻게 활용할지 생각했죠. 사실 마실 물을 다 만들 때도 그 통이 들어있던 플라스틱 용기가 필요해서 그걸 꺼내 썼어요. 거기에 재료도 좀 넣고, 쓰레기 처리용으로 쓰
ठीक है, जो
Ici Sigma Seven. Test HF de 30 secondes, à 10 secondes de la fin. Il s'agit d'un test de 30 secondes, effectué pendant mon survol de la côte de Basse-Californie, en route vers l'Amérique du Sud. Tous les systèmes fonctionnent parfaitement. Il me reste 5 secondes de test. Fin du 
Roger. 30, SPS/G&N: 36691, minus 061, plus 066 135 23 4156, plus 32011, plus 06 818, minus 02650, 181 054 014; apogee NA, plus 00230 32836 228 32628 42 1511 357, NA three lines, plus 1103, minus 17237 11806 36275 195 04 52, Deneb and Vega, 242 172 012, two jet ullage, 16 seconds, horizon out of the window, 10 degrees, TIG minus 2 minutes, sextant star at
Hey, Houston, that may have seemed like a very long final phase. The AUTO targeting was taking us right into a football field size - football field sized crater, with a large number of big boulders and rocks for about... one or two crat
Je ne sais pas où le processus a planté, Vance. J'ai simplement dit que nous avons suivi la procédure à la lettre. Nous sommes dans la partie critique du SEP, là où j'ai dit: « Sélection
روجر. بالنسبة لـ... دلتا-في، فهي 42.5؛ زاوية ميل المحرك للأسفل الآن درجتان؛ النواة 25 هي 00425؛ 26 هي 00011. لدينا ما يبدو أنه انخفاض في حمل السياسة. معدل الرادار يتن
Voici Friendship Seven. Au démarrage, il passait en mode d'orientation en lacet, ce qui désorientait les autres axes. Il a continué ainsi un certain temps, dérivant lentement vers la droite, sans correction possible jusqu'à atteindre environ 20° d'écart. Il revenait alor
Okay, Jo
रॉजर, मुचेआ। मित्रता सात। मैंने तुम्हें साफ-साफ पढ़ लिय
Роджер. Мы видим, как солнце светит сквозь него позади него и наносит на карту
ヒューストン、コロンビア。もう一度言いますが、私は彼を見ることができませんでした。AUTOの光
衛星が見えました。とても高くて…まるで地上で星のように点在していました。ずっとずっと遠くでし
Roger. Notre stabilité thermique est-elle suffisante pour que 
मित्रता सात, सर्जन ज़ांज़ीबार। व्यायाम से पहले आपका रक्तचाप 136/80 था। व्यायाम के दौरान हमारे पास अच्छे इलेक्ट्रोकार्डियोग्राफिक ट्रेस हैं और अब आप
Roger. Nous avons également une bonne tension arté
Okay. There is a note here that says use dovetail on top of camera, rather than the side dovetail. Use the dovetail on the top of the camera for mounting to br
Apollo 11, 
Yes. It looks like it will be pretty good on the adapter, too, so that m
Okay. One more thing we want to update you on with a little detail. As we told you, the ascent SEP attitude was in plane and the JETT attitude 
Погода здесь, в это
Entenan
La pressione sanguigna è stata rilevata. Inizia l'esercizio al tuo post
CSQ، الجو
ゴダード会議（ネットワーク通信ループ）を聞いて私が理解したのはそう
Houston, Verseau. 
Gemini VI, Canary CAP COM. How do you read? O
杰克，
حسنًا يا جاك. هذه ه
If you don't eat them all, bring them back, and we'll polish them off her
Roger. Ascension PAD: TIG 124 22 00 00 00 NOUN 76 55349 00322, plus 0017; 47, plus 37104, moins 70470, plus 58604, plus 56936. Votre poids 10837. Votre T14 126, plus 20, plus 12. Termin
EMS and G&N CALS togeth
Ok. Potenza 6. Ok. La potenza 6 si riferisce al pannello 11. Dovresti seguire la tabella, ad eccezione degli interruttori che ho indicato. La prima riga è ok. O, diciamo, la prima riga. Seconda riga, QUAD 4, TCA, chiuso
मुझे लगता है शायद हाँ। आप कितनी देर तक रिवीजन 
बहुत ही दिलचस्प भू-भाग की तस्वीरें। मैं क्षितिज की एक तस्वीर हमेशा के लिए रख लूंगा। फिलहाल, वह तस्वीर A नंबर 12 थी, जिसे रीसेट करके B कर दिया है और अब B-1 
Ну, мы не можем определить это при низкой скорости передачи данн
Il semblerait que B n'ai
D'accord. Nous
「入学準備チェックリスト」に戻
How's old White, Bruce? Did he ever let you go get a cup of coffee when we were ov
CONTRÔLE DES ATTITUDES - DIREC
Bene. E siamo pronti a leggervi la prima parte della checklist. Questa... Quello che leggeremo sarà una cronologia, una cronologia, e le modifiche alla checklist
ハッチがしっかり固定
Es trifft sich gut, dass wir genau darüber gesprochen haben. Am äußeren Rand der Luke ist es etwas feucht, aber wirklich nur ganz leicht. Wir haben dort oben einen Schlauch, von dem wi
D'accord. 025:00, 5119, moins 165, 071:08; 035:00, 7733, moins 165, 070
रॉजर। कोलंबिया अंतरिक्ष यान के आप सभी निवासियों को यह जानकर शायद दिलचस्पी होगी कि आज कोलंबिया देश का स्वतंत्रता दिवस है। फिलीपींस की ग्लोरिया डियाज़ को कल रात मिस यूनिवर्स का ताज पहनाया गया। उन्होंने इस वैश्विक सौंदर्य खिताब के लिए 60 अन्य लड़कियों को हराया। मिस डियाज़ 18 वर्ष की हैं, उनके बाल और आंखें काली हैं, और उनका माप 34-1/2, 23, 34-1/2 है। प्रथम उपविजेता मिस ऑस्ट्रेलिया रहीं, उसके बाद मिस इज़राइल और मिस जापान रहीं। मंगलवार रात जब आप वापस लौट रहे होंगे, तब वाशिंगटन में अमेरिकन और नेशनल लीग ऑलस्टार्स का मैच होगा। यांकीज़ के मेल स्टॉटलमायर के अमेरिकन लीग के पहले पिचर होने की उम्मीद है। नेशनल लीग के पहले पिचर कौन होंगे, इस बारे में अभी तक कोई भविष्यवाणी नहीं की गई है। उनकी टीम में नौ पिचर हैं। हालांकि अंतरिक्ष कार्यक्रम में अनुसंधान से निश्चित रूप से लाभ हुआ है, लेकिन ऐसा लगता है कि अनुसंधान हमेशा सफल नहीं होता। वुडस्ट्रीम कॉर्पोरेशन, जो एनिमल ट्रैप कंपनी ऑफ अमेरिका की मूल कंपनी है और जिसने एक अरब से अधिक लकड़ी के स्प्रिंग वाले चूहेदानी बनाए हैं, का कहना है
روجر. احصل على B 1 34 37؛ دلتا-في، 2.9؛ زمن الاحتراق، 0 زائد 05؛ الانعراج 0، الميل 0؛ العنوان 25، 90029؛ العنوان 26، جميعها أصفار؛ العنوان 27، جميعها 
Okay. Thank you. You can go ahead with now
ठीक है। अंतरिक्ष यान से दोबारा संपर्क करने में कोई दिक्कत नहीं है। सब कुछ बहुत सहज है, खासकर अगर आप धीरे-धीरे आगे बढ़ें। मुझे य
22 è 
Ricevuto. Ecco gli orari di alba e tramonto. Alba, orbita uno: 1 più 21 più 00. Alba, orbita due: 2 più
No, Fred, non lo è. Abbiamo un punto luminoso
そして、ランドマークであるアルファ 1 について、ここ
是的。
Das ist Friendship Seven. A
好的，阿波罗8号。我们想更改一下，我们想使用26号星，也就是26；我们想让它作为近地地平线星，拍摄两组。然后我们想用16号星作为远地地平线星，拍摄一组。如果26号星作为近地地平线星不可行，那就用16号星作为远地地平线
Oka
Gemini VII, this is Gemini VI. We hav
알겠습니다. 다음 중간 지점, 즉 진입 인터페이스에서 2시간 전을 기준으로 초당 1.4피트의 연소 속도를 예상하고 있습니다. 이는 진입 인터페이스에서의 감마 값을 0.1도만큼 변화시킵니다. 현재 추가적인 기동이 없을 경우 감마 값은 -6.39도인데, 목표선의 중심을 맞추기
Le pi
Мы хотим пе
Apollo 11, Houston. Logikcheck. Sie könne
Va 
Das ist bestätigt. Bevor ich mit den Pads beginne, noch eine Anmerkung. Die allgemeinen Hinweise, die wir Ihnen zuvor bezüglich der Position der Sonne im Sichtfeld des Kommandanten und der Sterne gegeben haben – also die Hinweise, die Sie für Ihre Anflugrichtung nu
了解。そ
Wir hatten eigentlich vor, etwas Wasser aus dem Sekundärverdampfer abzulassen, um ihn zu überprüfen, einfach als Bauteilprüfung, etwas, das wir tun müssen;
سنحاول ذلك مرة أخرى لاحقا
여기는 케이프입
حسناً، لنبد
Et, incidemment, vous pouvez utiliser l'ombre que projette le bâton pour *
य
是的，差不多就是这样。阻力并没有发生剧烈变化。而且我注意到，当我取下那部分材料时，它被压得很紧实，颜色也深了很多，而且——它粘附在芯管上的方式让我明
罗杰，巴兹。第一条线路是A路公交车。这条线路一直延伸到高门。实际上，线路应该写成“——因为A路公交车禁止通行”。之后，两条线路都禁止通行。所以，如果你把从高门到两条线路的线路都画上去，这条
了解。少し矛盾があ
네, 맞습니다, 잭. 요청 사항은 다음과 같습니다. 전원을 끄기 전에 전압과 전류를 측정해 주시고, 전
حسنًا. أهز رأسي بعنف من جميع الجهات، وعيناي مغمضتان، للأعلى والأسفل، وللميلان والدوران والانحراف. لا شيء في معدتي؛ لا شيء في أي مكان. الآن... سأحاول الضغط على زر الصفر، زر الوقت صفر. حسنًا، لقد أخطأت. كنتُ مرتبكًا بعض الشيء بشأن مكان الأشياء بالضبط، لستُ متأكدًا مما تريد تحقيقه بالضبط من خلال هذا، ولكن لا توجد مشكلة في تحديد الاتجاه. أذناك الداخليتان وتقييمك العقلي للأفقي، أنت تتكيف مع هذه البيئة، كما لو... كما لو وُلد
Va bene
好
我知道只要
ر
Роджер. Еще одно 
हालांकि, हमारा मानना ​​है
حسناً يا هي
So 
Hey Mike, das Spiel fand in Cincinnati statt, und wir glauben, dass sie dort oben immer
유리 알
Roger, this is Friendship Seven. Out the window, c
Roger, mer
Je pense que le plus rapide est de parcourir page par page la première partie de la liste de contrôle d'entrée, celle qui contie
Ich weiß nicht, wen wir erreichen können. Lass mich nach
Хорошо. Я вам один высылаю. Режим управления: автоматическое реверсирование; гироскопы в обычном режиме; маневрирование отключено. Все системы работают в фоновом режиме. Если хотите, я могу показать вам показания куполов
不，那是个
Negativo. Noi... Roger. Siamo curiosi di sapere come sta andando il tuo volo, il tuo allineamento, visto che abbiamo ottenuto 2 piedi al secondo in più, che il nostro monitoraggio aveva indicato come ne
हाँ, जिम। आपका रवैया बिल्कुल सही है, और क्या आपको समझ आया कि 400
No, io...
And, Odyssey, request you coordinate with Aquarius on attitu
Natürlich. Kabinentemperatur – 92. Anzugtemperatur – 58. Kabinendruck 5,6. CO₂-Füllung des Anzugs 3/4
Friendship Seven, we have been reading an indication on the ground of segment 51, which is Landing Bag Deploy. We suspect this is a
Très 
Aquarius, Houston. Veuillez ouvrir le disjoncteur de l'amplificateur 
Je travaille sur le microphone. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5. V
Okay, Jim. Wir beobachten das Ganze ein bisschen. Fred hat uns verschiedene Perspektiven gezeigt, während wir am Erdmittelpunkt – dem Mondmittelpunkt – vorbeigeflogen sind. Uns ist aufgefallen, dass die Kommunikation etwas schlechter geworden ist, deshalb solltes
了解。1時間ほど前に、こちらでかなり激しい雷雨がありました。この辺りでは嵐がいくつか発生し
11, Houston. En résumé, si nous perdons le contrôle sur un axe avant la porte basse, nous recommandons d'interrompre la mission. Cela nécessiterait la perte de
わかりました。目的は、状態ベクトルと状態ベクトルを地球の球面の 37 に近づけることです。動詞 37 ENTER、23 ENTER。レジスタ1、
Roger. Visto il ritardo nella combustione, ti dispiace se facciamo uno s
Das freut mich sehr, aber könnten Sie ihnen vielleicht ein paar Grüße ausrichten? Sie 
好的。在第 15 页，我们将标题“CHECKOUT”更改为“验证以下开关”，这些开关是“GUIDAN
Roger. À Washington, la commission des finances du Sénat a approuvé la prolongation de la surtaxe sur le revenu, mais un vote du Sénat sur le projet de loi semble pour l'instant peu probable. À Austin, le représentant de l'État, Ray Lemmon, de Houston, a été nommé directeur national de la Société américaine d'océanographie. M. Lemmon a proposé une étude sur la possibilité de créer un institut d'océanographie au Texas. Ce serait le premier institut de ce type dans l'ouest du golfe du Mexique. À Minneapolis, dans le Minnesota, le service météorologique, après avoir dressé le bilan des températures du jour (maximum 31 °C et minimum 22 °C), a indiqué: « Aucune chute de neige. » De St. Petersburg, en Floride, un reportage radio de l'explorateur norvégien Thor Heyerdahl nous apprend que l'équipage de son bateau en papyrus, le Ra, rejoindra Bridgetown, à la Barbade, malgré les dégâts causés par la forte mer. L'équipage passera la nuit sur un navire d'escorte. Norman Baker, navigateur de l'expédition, a déclaré que l'équipage était à bord du Ra aujourd'hui pour réparer les dégâts causés par les tempêtes de la semaine dernière, qui ont fendu la base du mât. Une partie du mât brisé a été jetée par-dessus bord, et le navire se trouvait à 725 milles à l'est de la Barbade. « Il est possible, mais inconfortable, de dormir à bord du Ra », a déclaré Baker dans son rapport radio. « Mais le but de notre voyage n'est pas une épreuve de force ou d'endurance humaine. » C'est pourquoi l'équipage passait les nuits à bord du navire d'escorte
好的。我看看我是否都理解了。首先，为了进行会合操作，我们需要将断路器 16（逆变器 2）和断路器 11（交流母线 A 母线连接逆变器 2）都闭合。然后在控制面板 14 上，确认已选择逆变器 2。同时，确认断路器 11（会合雷达 2）也闭合。接下来，拉动会合雷达释放手柄。在控制面板 3 上，我们需要将会合雷达
ठीक है। हम सेकेंडरी ईवीएपी को उबाल रहे हैं, और तापमान स्थिर हो गया है, इसलिए हम ईवीएपी प्रेशर
You're weak 
Okay. Verstande
Roger. Die Differenz sollte 3 plus 15 03 betragen
Impossibile attenuare sufficientemente il reticolo per un'acquisizione notturna. MARK di nuovo Grus, cioè delle stelle stesse nella finestra... Thaurus sta arrivando proprio attraverso la linea centrale. Potrei imbardare a destra di circa 5 gradi, il che soddisferebbe la stima. Poi rollare a sinistra di circa 5 gradi, il che è piuttosto grafico. Per un'osservazione retrospettiva, questa sembra un'ottima configurazione. Non ci saranno problemi di assetto di volo qui con la luna luminosa... luce che sarebbe la luce dell'alba. Occasionalmente si può vedere una luce al 
تم إنجاز تلك البنود با
Хьюстон, Аполлон-11. К
D'accord. À vous de voir. Dès que Jack sera levé, je suggère qu'on s'attaque au démontage de ces bidons d'hydroxyde de lithium et qu'on en fabrique quelques-uns. Jack pourrait s'en c
Okay. Quell
Più 37746, meno 03299, più 00844 179 346 357, non applicabile, più 00176 37900 336 37705 42 1279 309, non applicabile tre volte, più 1350, meno 16500
알겠습니다. 잠시만 기다려 주세요, 짐
Apollo 8, this is Houston. Roger. Your burn was on time, 11 seconds; VGX was plus 0.2, VGY was minus 1.8, VGZ minus 0.2, C minus 9.4, apogee 
아니요, 저는 네 페이지 분량까지는 필요 없을 것 같고, 그 정도면 충분할 것 
Хорошо, Джек, я так и сделаю. Мы с Джимом смогли разглядеть созвездия из окон, когда вентиляция не работала. Не могли бы вы рассказать мне о времени использования этих расходных материалов, для чего, по вашим прогнозам, они пригодятся
Why don't you guys sl
2時19分13秒、わずかにピッチアップしています。今、ゼロにしておきます。フライ・バイ・ワイヤで、わずかにヨーが左に動
了解。分かり
いいえ、OAMS 逆噴射のレートには LOW を使用します
حسنًا يا جاك، فهمت. أغلق قواطع دائرة صمام REAC في خلية الوقود رقم 2. أوقف تشغيل العواكس. أوقف تشغيل ناقل مرحل البطارية. افصل روابط البطارية. شغّل مدخل الطاقة وقواطع الدائرة A وB وC. أوقف تشغيلها ج
And I'm standing by for altimeter off the peg. Cape, do you read yet? Altimeter is off the peg. 100 [1,000] ft
Exactement, Jack. Pour économiser de l'énergie, nous allons faire fonctionner le compresseur de la combinaison à -40 °C pendant une heure. Nous surveillerons le taux de PCO2; s'il fonctionne correctement, nous l'arrêterons dès que la température en cabine sera stable, et nous le laisserons éteint. En revanche, si le manomètre de 
Roger. Stan è preoccupato che la nostra attuale procedura,
هذا... إنه في 
Роджер, запуск «Аполлона-1»
Хорошо, сделаю. И ещё, позвольте задать вам вопрос. В этой конфигурации, в пристыкованном состоянии, нам нужно использовать управление тангажем и креном. И насколько сильно мы можем это использовать, не меняя траекторию? У нас всего 60 миль в запасе
Roger. On approche du but… Il va falloir larguer un peu d'urine par-dessus bord. Je me demande si ça va perturber ta trajectoire. Ou on peut le faire sans problè
Okay. Es ist durchgehend nicht verfügbar. Ihre geografische Breite bet
That's af
收到。告诉他们我也很担
Roger.
Bene. Tutto *** deve essere a 
روجر، ١١. هذا أمرٌ بالغ الأهم
そうです。最初の4時間睡眠を終えて袖を脱いだ時から
Esatto. Al termine del percorso 7, il velivolo si muoverà verso un assetto di separazione. Q
Bonjour, Indian Cap Com, Indian Cap Com, Aurora Seven.
肯
Ok. 
حسناً يا كين. لقد قمت بتخفيض مستوى اهت
ああ、あった。地平線を見失いかけていた
Ed è fuori comunicazione in questo momento. Sta cercando di riattaccare il co
В первом резервуаре с водородом включен криовентилятор
Frank, ich stelle mir immer wieder vor, was ich als einsamer Reisender von einem anderen Planeten
بينما كنتُ بالخارج، لاحظتُ وجود طبقة طلاء على نافذة جيم من الخارج. في إحدى المرات، عندما لامستها بكتفي أو ذراعي، تلطخت الطبقة تمامًا، حتى أنها غطت الجزء العلوي من الزجاج الأمامي، مما منعه من الرؤية. عندما أنظر من هنا، أرى أنها مغطاة بطبقة سميكة من مادة ما. عندما كنتُ أنظر من الخارج، بدت وكأنها طبقة دهنية تقريبًا. نافذتي لا تبدو مغطاة بنفس القدر. 
マイク
تم استخدام خاصية التجاوز، والضوء أ
روجر. مناورة 2، /: 467
Okay. Das ist richtig. Im letzten Schritt geht es darum, die Batteri
لا نعتقد أن هناك أي مشكلة. نرجو منك تشغيل مفتاح قراءة الكمية وتركه قيد ال
हम सहमत हैं। हम चाहते हैं कि आप ग्लाइकॉल तापमान इनलेट वा
... Zeit für 
هذا مدرج في قائمة
据塔斯社报道，莫斯科航天工程师阿纳托利·科
Okay. On the fourth row. Open - From the left, open the first five - correction - Close the first five, and open CABIN FAN 
Gemini 4, hier spricht
Ok, ho ottenuto 0,7; mi fermo qui e -
... 해킹 방법을 알려주세
Ciao, Apollo 11. Houston. Siamo pronti a monitorare la tua startup in qual
好的。我会记下来
Non ri
了解しました。現在、その作業に取り組んでいるチームがあります。ちなみに、彼らが知りたい情報の一つは、司令船内のどの水酸化リチウム容器が空になっているかということです。重量とバランスのためです。急
Okay, we have about 30 seconds to go on this
네, 마이크. 물론, 이건 G
好的。现在看起来——好的，地平线上的天气——云，图片左侧地平线上的云，我可以看到云一直延伸到大约中间的位置，在中间位置它
알겠습니다. 저희가 찾았습니다. 터미네이터 쪽으로 살짝 
روجر، هل يمكنك أ
ठीक है। मैं इन्हें तीन-चार क
Okay. Roger that, Jim. I want to verify 
안녕하세요, 짐! 저희는 잭이 컴퓨터를 켜고 대략적인 정렬을 할 때 당신이 서비스 모듈 SEP 자세에 있다는 가정하에 대략적인 짐벌 
はい。既に37 06という数字が表示されていると思います。もし表示されているなら、ENTERキーを押してください。すると、スタンバイ要求のコード00062が表示されます。そのコードが表示されたら、空欄になるまでPROCEE
Wie sieht es mit Ihren Fenstern aus
حسنًا. هل سنتخلى عن هذا الموقف؟ لا بأس. سأقو
当尼尔暂时将乙二醇辐射器
روجر، ما هي الإعدادات التي تنصح بها لرصد ه
Jim, nous avon
Х
Роджер. Это «Дружба Семь». Далее следует 30-минутный отчет: Движения головы не вызывают тошноты или каких-либо неприятных ощущений. Я
Хорошо. Показания 3 g, думаю, на этот раз придётся пропустить проверку демпфирования при входе
Похоже, популярность Out-Of-
嘿，我话音刚落，我们又收
هيا يا هيوستن. أبول
Houston, Eagle. Ihre Bitrate ist zu
네, 그리고 예전에는 지휘실을 침실이라고 불렀는데, 지금은 냉장고라고 부릅니다
نع
Нет. Сейчас переключусь на низкий уровень громкости, пока не потерял 
لا يعمل مسجل الشريط لا للتسجيل التلقائي ولا اليدوي، ويبدو أن الشريط قد نفد. يرجى
짐, 한 시간 전에 식사 시간을 예약해 드렸는데, 이미 드셨겠죠? 그리고
我不
月の色は、たく
चलिए देखते हैं। स्प्रिंगफील्ड, मिसौरी में, ब्रुकलिन डॉजर्स के दिग्गज कैचर मिकी ओवेन, जिन्होंने 1941 विश्व सीरीज में डॉजर्स पर न्यूयॉर्क यांकीज़ की जीत में तीसरा स्ट्राइक छोड़ने का रिकॉर्ड बनाया था, ने तय किया कि उन्हें सिर्फ उनके खेल रिकॉर्ड से ही नहीं, बल्कि किसी और चीज़ से भी याद किया जाएगा। उन्होंने 45 लड़के-लड़कियों को टट्टू भेंट किए। इन बच्चों से अनुरोध किया गया था कि वे पत्र लिखकर बताएं कि वे टट्टू की देखभाल कैसे करेंगे। जब ढेरों पत्र आए, तो उन्होंने अपने पहले से दिए गए 20 टट्टुओं में 5 और जोड़ दिए; और अन्य दानदाताओं ने 20 और टट्टू दान कर दिए। मिकी ओवेन ने कहा, "मुझे लगा था कि मुझे लगभग 45 पत्र मिलेंगे, लेकिन मुझे लगभग 900 पत्र मिले।" अब मुख्य पृष्ठ पर: वेलिंगटन, न्यूजीलैंड में, लगभग पचास लोग आज दक्षिणी ध्रुव पर पारंपरिक टर्की और क्रैनबेरी सॉस के साथ बैठे, लेकिन क्रिसमस में पूर्वी स्वाद भी था। इसमें अंटार्कटिक महाद्वीप पार कर रहे एक जापानी दल द्वारा पकाया गया सुकियाकी व्यंजन शामिल था, जो अमेरिकी नौसेना के ध्रुवीय अड्डे पर एक दिन के लिए रुका था। सैन डिएगो, कैलिफ़ोर्निया में, पकड़े गए खुफिया जहाज प्यूब्लो के चालक दल के सदस्यों ने अपनी पहली तनख्वाह सैन डिएगो के बाल्बोआ नौसेना अस्पताल के कर्मचारियों को दान कर दी। सैन डिएगो पहुँचने पर उन सभी को बीस-बीस डॉलर दिए गए थे, और उन्
Oh, Roger, Apollo 11. Ti abbiamo fatto raggiungere un assetto posigrado e ti vogliamo bene: questa accensione utiliz
ورقم 13، هيوستن. إذا رغبتم، يمك
了解、コロンビア。トランクウィリティは下に見えま
Думаю, я понял, Базз. Подтверждаю. Но когда он сделал это во второй раз, вы... СУЩЕ
Вперёд, Хьюс
Roger. Right now we're alining the platform and it's going 
درجات حرارتك جي
Ok, Acquario. Quando l'avrai messa in assetto, e sembrerà che siate vici
Да, в Далласе плачут. Результаты баскетбольных матчей: Хьюстон в эти выходные выступил не очень хорошо. Иллинойс обыграл Хьюстон со счетом 97:84. А Северная Каролина взяла верх над «Совами». Счет был 85:77. Фрэнк, в газете было несколько слов об «Ойлерз». «Ойлерз» признали Джорджа Вебстера самым ценным игроком, и хотя Хьюстон в этом году никого не включил в символическую сборную лучших атакующих игроков, они поместили Уолта Саггса и Хойла Грейнджера во вторую
休斯顿，阿波
好的。 Rigel Kentauri 就是其中之一。 ——Rigel K
حسنًا، ما أعرضه الآن يا جاك هو LEVVA، وقد سبق عرضه أيضًا. إنه غطاء رأس يُرتدى على سطح الأرض، وأنا - أحضر غطاء جيم هنا لأعرض بعض التعديلات. إحدى المشاكل السابقة هي عدم القدرة على
هيوستن، 
……线束…
Roger. Wenn ich mir den Flugplan ansehe, steht bei Punkt A ein weiterer Anflug an, und wir müssen zur Vorbereitung auf Punkt B einen weiteren Anflug durchführen. Es ist gemäß den Bodenverfahren zulässig, wenn Sie die Ausrichtung verschieben und sie entweder nur einmal bei Punkt A durchführen oder direkt an der im Flugplan angegebenen Position. Falls Sie die Ausrichtung überspringen möchten, können wir jetzt direkt mit dem f
Итак, отправляем TX прямо сейчас. И мы подтверждаем ваш TR —
11
Roger, Mike. Mentre aspettiamo che la sonda si avvicini alla Luna, vorrei sottolineare che, man mano che ci avvic
अपोलो 13, ह्यूस्टन। क्या आप कॉल करने की कोशिश कर र
Houston, Apollo 11. Gli angoli di coppia sono es
好的，杰克，我们有一个机动平台，一个可以自由返回的中段航线：；-0021.3，+
Родже
हम सुझाव दे रहे हैं कि रेट्रोपैकेज को, मैं फिर से दोहरा रहा हूँ, फेंका न जाए। इसका मतलब है कि आपको 0.05 ग्राम स्विच को ओवरराइड करना होगा, जो लगभग 4.5 मिनट बाद होने की उम्मीद है। इसका यह भी मतलब है कि आपको स्कोप को मैन्यु
実際、あなたは「ハンドルを折らないで！」と
Roger, Friendship Seven. This is Canton. We have TM solid; go ahead, Over
Affermativo, Jack, e poi se torni agli altri interruttori automat
Roger. Ho bisogno di una posizione molto precisa perché riesco a scansionare decentemente solo uno di quei quadrati della griglia alla volta. L'area che abbiamo esplorato ne c
Okay, Jack, ti ​​faremo sapere le ultime novità al più presto
了解。ウォーリー、君の態度はとても良いようだ。それに時計も5
«Дружба Семь
Tu das nicht, du willst doc
Roger, Neil. Le sujet suivant concerne les rayons émis par la zone de combustion du moteur. Nous nous demandons si les rayons provenant de la partie inférieure du moteur sont plus f
Хорошо. Начнём с минус 6,5 ча
了解。了解しました
Toujours en assiette relativement horizontale. La commande de vitesse fonctionne bien. Content qu'elle tienne le coup. Elle se comporte très bien. Montée à 5,5 g
双子座 4，卡那封 CAP COM
अपोलो 8, ह्यूस्टन। हम लगभग 5 फीट प्रति सेकंड की दर से मध्यमार्ग में सुधार कर रहे हैं। ट्रैकिंग बहुत अच्छी 
هذا سيجما سفن، أقرأك
了解しました。ビルさん、裏面の音声品質が非常に悪いです。使用できないと判断し、関連するコメントはすべて手作業で録音することをお勧めします。そうすれば、音声は失われません。低ビットレートの
Roger
Roger
알겠습니다. 제가 말씀드리려던 건, 저희는 달 반대편에 도착한 이후로 오수를
المعالم شديدة السطوع التي تراها هي فوهات صدمية حديثة، وكلما ط
حسنًا يا جيم. منصة المناورة: الغرض هو منتصف المسار - 7. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. غير متوفر. مدة الاحتراق، 0:39؛ 0:08؛ غير متوفر. الباقي غير متوفر. ستكون قو
هذا صحيح. قم بإجراء الفحص، الخطوة 32 من دفتر الإدخال،
3時26分33秒に、空に10個の粒子が見えることに気付きました。それらは間違いなく私には輝いて見えます。小さな霜のかけらのように見えました。しかし、中にはずっと遠くにあるように見えるものもあります。100ヤードほど離れているように見えるものが2つあります。しばらくスラスターを操作していません。こちらはもっと近いところに2つあります。さて、近くにあるものを密度計で測定してみましょう。5.5で消光し、経過時間は3時27分39秒です。この時間、黒い空には星は見えません。しかし、こ
Хьюстон, Ап
حسنًا. لقد درسنا جميع الاحتمالات الممكنة هنا. أسوأ سيناريو توصلنا إليه هو خ
Roger. Copie. Lu
ह्यूस्टन, यह अपोलो 8 है। हम 6 में से पहली खराबी पर 
ثم نود منك وضع الكاميرا على النافذة بحيث يكون مقدمتها خارج مجال الرؤية. بعد ذلك، نريد مجموعتين من الصور. نريدك أن تكون في وضع النبض وأن تكون المركبة الفضائية موجهة مباشرة نحو الأرض. سأعطيك الوقت لبدء التصوير. ستكون الكاميرا موجهة نحو الأرض السوداء على الجانب المظ
Credo che ci si
Das Zeug sieht alles so hellbraun und grau aus, wissen Sie, das ist die Farbe. Aber wenn man ganz nah rangeht und es sieht, dann i
アポロ8号、こちらヒューストン。パネル382の手動バルブを再確認。蒸発器の水
아폴로 11호, 휴스턴입니다. 중간 항로 이후 관측 결과 감마 값은 -6.57로 나타났습니다. 이는 
روجر، ب
로저. 에어리어 2 델타 시간, 에어리
Apollo 8,
Roger. Understand we're stay for T3. St
そこに何か見
أبولو 8، هيوستن. دقيقة واحدة متبقية. جميع الأنظمة جاهزة ل
Okay. Ich kann e
好的，吉姆。你的运气不错。跟踪数据显示，你的入射角已经上升到-6.24度。这是基于我们从中段到氦气罐启动前
Wenn man von oben auf die Sonne
Apollo 11, hier spricht Houston. Ich bin bereit mit Ihre
カノを越えるまではこれらのピン
Oui, je pense qu'il serait probablement préférable, vu qu'on a déjà fait la mise à jour, de le remettre au-dessus du tableau de bord plutôt que de 
Das ist ein schreckliches Fenster. Schade, dass wir da durchschießen müssen, aber – oh Mann, man könnte ei
Okay, ich hab's. Aber bevor ich Sterne fotografieren kann, muss ich das Zeug hinter mich bringen, sonst sehe ich keinen Stern. Wonach suchst du? Okay. Ich hab's so geneigt, und jetzt roll' 
केन, इस पैं
جميع الأوضاع تعمل بشكل ممتاز. درجة حرارة قبة بدلة الطيران حوالي 72 درجة، ودرجة حرارة مدخل البدلة حوالي 63 درجة، وهي تنخفض قليلاً. بالتأكيد هذا هو الإعداد الأمثل للطيران لهذه المركبة، حوالي 7.5 إلى 8. سأرفعه درجة
了解しました。あなたが起き上がって動いているのを見て、おそらく朝食でも食べているのだろうと思いました。大ま
嘿，迈克，比赛是在辛辛那提举行的，我们觉得他们那边还在用克罗
Хорошо. Сд
हम आपको कुछ समय बाद
They meant do not relieve overbo
휴스턴,
Fred, in about 4 mi
Роджер. Что касается индекса Доу Джонса, то с момента закрытия торгов во вторник днем, 15-го числа, до примерно 13:05 по хьюстонскому времени сегодня днем, наблюдаетс
والآن، كيف تسير الأمور فيما يتعلق بقائمة المهام؟ دعونا نتأكد من أننا لا نرتكب أي خطأ أو 
Roger, Mike. Ora ve
Вот углы подвеса. Командный модуль: 356,69, 163,42, 346,67
Это доводит результат до 
Roger, Mike. The trace on your respiration r
了解、バズ。ブラボー、オムニ、ハイゲイントラックをマニュアルに、ビームをワイド
हालांकि मैदान पर ऑयलर्स का प्रदर्शन उतना अच्छा नहीं रहा, लेकिन बॉक्स ऑफिस पर उन्होंने शानदार कमाई की। बड एडम्स, डॉन क्लॉस्टरमैन और वॉली लेम सभी इससे बेहद खुश थे। वैसे, वे मैच देखने के लिए केप स्ट
好的，杰克。明白了，你已经准备好进行交换机配置检查了。我面前有一份起飞配置表，L 1-1 页。你明白了吗？完
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴. 크고 또렷하게
ठीक 
समझ गया। REACQ,
收
शुभ प्रभात। कुछ देर के लिए हम आपकी कॉल का जवाब धीमी आवाज़ में देंगे ताकि कंट्रोलर को थोड़ी देर आरा
Oka
Okay, Gemini VIII. The SPC's are in. We have reset the Reset T
어머, 지
База Спокойствия, Хьюстон. Рекомендуем вам выйти ч
Somehow that didn't add up with the DE
Affermativo
ネズミを健康
Roger. Bereich 57-2 86. 1+49. 07 42 52. 7+12. 11+52. 58-2 94. 1+59. 09 16 42. 5+49. 10+41. Bereich 58-BRAVO geteilter Brenner, 55 vorn, 51 achtern. 1+
كنت أظن ذلك
جيميني 4، كا
Haben Sie die Zeitverzögerung von 
罗杰，11岁。我们——我刚刚被引导到另一个显示器，果然，在我们控制中心屏幕上显示的Eidephor显示
Okay, Vance, 
Beh, il naso sembra molto in ba
Okay, Apollo 8. Der erste Test ist abgeschlossen. Wir schalten jetzt in den Uplink-Modus auf „UPLINK COMMAND AND RANGING“ um und deaktivieren die Sprachübertragung. Wir bleiben 2,5 Minuten in diesem Modus und senden Testnachrichten. Dies hat keine Auswirkungen auf Ihren Computer oder die Kon
よし。もうすぐひっくり返るところだ。120
Ich halte die Kapsel in Wiedereintrittsposition an. Rollbewegung nach außen. Gieren ist null; Rollen nimmt zu. Ich möchte diese Position erfassen und dann beobachten. Rollen sieht gut aus. Nicken und Gieren nehmen zu. Auslöseraten und Lage sind gut,... eine kleine Anpassung der Schubkraft, und es läuft sehr gut. Ich werde den TR-10 vorheizen, um die G
Apollo 11, Houston. Nous avons reçu beaucoup de bruit. Pourr
Okay. Gierwinkel 271
まだだ。
罗杰，迈克。我们的信号轨迹出现了一些波动。你们的连接和断开状态都有所变
Ok. Quanto costa?
Salut Scott, je suis en vol stationnaire, mais j'ai activé le bus de climatisation. Il s'est parfaitement mis en marche. J'activerai les balises plus tard. Le mode de pilotage sélectionné est le pilotage électrique, même si je ne l'utilise pas. Le commutateur automatique est en position automatiq
抱歉，不是什么更重要
마크 30. 좋아. 연료도 괜찮고, 산소도 괜찮아. 모든 시스템이 정상 
Roge
テレビモニターに横縞が入っています。
水上に出たらすぐに
Bene. Se non c'è diminuzione nella quantità di liquido accumulatore secondario, glicole secondario alla valvola del radiatore su NORMALE. Passaggio successivo, pompa del circuito di raffreddamento secondario, AC 1 o AC 2. Dopo 3 minuti, verificare che la pressione secondaria di scarico del glicole sia compresa tra 39 e 51 psig. Verificare inoltre che la temperatura di uscita EVAP secondaria sia cambiata. Passaggio successivo, pompa
Okay, will do. And also, let me ask you a question. In this configuration, docked, w
そしてジェットフェアリング、ウォーリ
了解しました。Xは4.4、Z
Columbia, Houston. Wir sind mit d
It's the sun shining off of them, because we haven't used the 
Повтори ещё раз
«Дружба Семь», это «Стилхед». Всё оборудование работает в обычном режиме. Ожидай
Roger. Entrée MIDPAC PAD: 359 153 001 194 46 03 267, plus 1102, 
もちろんです。戻って全部やり直し
حسناً. فهمت. ويمكنك
No, è tutto sbagliato. Ora capisco che devo essere stato capovolto. L'orizzonte sta iniziando a comparire, e
لقد انتهينا من جميع الترتيبات ونبدأ العد التنازلي ق
Bene, l'analisi pr
Aurora Sev
ऐसा लगता है कि हम काफी सही दिशा में आग
تفتح الغلاف الخارجي، وتضع الغلاف الداخلي بداخله وتضغط عليه فينكسر، ثم عليك أن تأخذ... وتدخ
好了，噪音应
अपोलो 8, जब तक हमें उच्च लाभ नहीं मिल जाता, मैं प्रक्षेप पथ का सारांश जारी रखूंगा। हम तेरहवें बिंदु से मध्य-प्रशांत रेखा पर वापस आ सकते हैं, और 138 सेकंड के बर्न के बाद आप अपने मार्ग पर होंगे। 138 सेकंड में आप बटरफ्लाई क्षेत्र से बाहर निकल जाएंगे। हम 20 सेकंड के बाद प्रीइग्निशन या रीस्टार्ट न करने की सलाह देते हैं। यदि आप 20 सेकंड से आगे जाते हैं, तो इससे प्रक्षेप पथ सुधार से परे हो सकता है - जिससे आपको बिना किसी सहायता के वापस लौटना पड़ सकता है। रिकवरी क्षेत्र में मौसम अच्छा है। हमारे पास एक फॉलोइंग है और एक विदाउट है। बर्न के दौरान, स्टोरेज टैंक में ईंधन की कमी और उसके सम्प टैंक में जाने के कारण आपको चैम्बर प्रेशर और टैंक प्रेशर में थोड़ा बदलाव दिखाई दे सकता है। यह बर्न शुरू होने के लगभग 2 से 5 सेकंड के बीच हो सकता है। दोनों सिस्टम में प्रेशर में मामूली बदलाव होगा। सिस्टम की जांच करने पर, सभी सिस्टम ठीक से काम कर रहे हैं। प्रक्षेप पथ के लिए, हम पानी के उबलने को रोकना चाहते हैं। आपकी पानी निकालने की स्थिति अच्छी दिख रही है; आपको इससे अधिक के लिए तैयार रहना चाहिए। हम 5 बजे के बाद तक पानी डालने का काम टालने की कोशिश करेंगे। इसके बाद, हम क्रायो को हिलाना चाहेंगे - सुधार। ईंधन सेल पर अगला पर्ज लगभग होगा, और यह हाइड्रोजन बैटरी A 34.9, बैटरी B 39.1 और चार्ली 38.5 होगा। हमारे पास सिंगल टैंक क्रायो क्षमता है: पिछले बर्न के प्रदर्शन को देखते हुए, आप अनुमान लगा सकते हैं कि एक सामान्य बर्न में गणना किए गए मानों से लगभग 3.7 सेकंड अधिक समय लगेगा। इंजन का प्रदर्शन सामान्य है, और सभी पैरामीटर स्थिर रहे हैं। सब ठीक है; कंप्यू
Okay. And there's one other thing that I don't know whether you're aware of. We have no lithium hydroxide canisters in panel two fif- in - canisters now. So when we get ready to p
حسنًا، نحن نخطط لل
Okay, Jack. You remember everybody in the past has commented on seeing Moonset just a couple minutes prior to, and your horizon will probably be dark at the time that you get there; you're having an early morning entry; and coming 
Well, Ken, that just leaves you or I - how about you and I - did anything exciting ha
好的，万斯。我刚才听到一声轻微的闷响，听起来像是下
好的
Roger. Our COMM just seemed to clear up a good bit. 
弗雷德该开始寻找地球了，大概几分钟后
معدل بت PCM
ठीक है, चंद्रमा को देखने की स्थित
- - टीपीआई दृष्टिकोण। वाह, ये तो वाकई कमाल है; आपको इसे देखना चाहिए। आप
Gra
Le cala
好的。那么下一步是，电池 1、2、3 和 4
まあ、バズは
Oui, tout à fait. Purge de la pile à combustible O2 à 71 heures, et si vous souhaitez copier, j'ai une mise à jour du plan de vol contenant - je suppose que c'est cela et quelques autres élém
Toute cette procédure semblait fonctionner parfaitement. Le seul point un peu étrange concernait l'activité des propulseurs. J'avais
إيجابي. 142. 3+08. 17 20 00. 2+35. 8+4
रॉजर. / - यह 3 - 46427, माइनस 053, प्लस 141, प्लस 28960, माइनस 00456, प्लस 00720 180 021 002, NA, प्लस बाएँ 17, प्लस 00883, माइनस 16500 12955 3
太陽の角度が増すにつれ
わかりました。少し前に教えていただい
그는
Jim, nous allons bientôt procéder à un transfert de service ent
——运载火箭的制导系统看起来状态良好。我们估计运载火箭制导系统切断的概率超过99%。所以，一切似乎都进展顺利。另需告知，MLA接收到了大约1分钟的可用电视图像；因此，系统显然运行正常。您距离到达加那利群岛的视线还有一分多钟；到达塔那那利佛的AOS时间为2小时9分1
ठीक है। ठीक है, यह एक प्रारंभिक पैंतरेबाज़ी पीसी प्लस 2 है। आरंभ:; प
Jim, notre plan actuel est de ne pas corriger les données. On va accepter ce qu'on obtient et faire avec. On pourrait mieux suivre la situation si, lors de votre passage près de la Terre et du centre de la Lune, vous pouviez mesurer les angle
– – Da springen ein paar Partikel auf Ihrem Bildschirm herum. Das sind nur Staubpartikel, die vom Sonnenlicht, das durchs Fenster fällt, beleuchtet
Roger. Blood pressure is com
아니요, 저는 당신에
收到。我想
E non ne ho ancora uno, ma mi sento più vicino ad averlo ora che in qualsiasi altro momento. Credo sia questo maledetto ossigeno al 100%. Lo respiro e non credo di essere mai stato così asciutto. Con il peggior raffreddore che abbia mai avut
휴스턴, 트랭퀼리티입니다. 판독 결과를 보내주시면 감사하겠습
En comparant le vol d'Apollo 13 à celui d'Apollo 8, le décollage a généré des vibrations similaires à celles que j'avais ressenties lors d'Apollo 8, mais en début de vol, les mouvements latéraux étaient moins importants. La séparation du module de commande et de vol (S-IC) a été plus brutale sur Apollo 13 que sur Apollo 8, peut-être parce que j'étais assis à un autre endroit, je ne sais pas. Il y a eu environ trois brusques à-coups lors de la coupure et quelques fortes secousses où nous avons été projetés en arrière, retenus par nos harnais, avant l'allumage du S-II. Ce dernier était, bien sûr, tout aussi régulier sur Apollo 13 que sur Apollo 8, à l'exception du moteur n° 5. Nous n'avons pas ressenti les vibrations ressenties sur Apollo 8 vers la fin de la combustion du S-II. Et il y av
네, 맞
Bene. Segna la logica 1 e
Fred, wir haben die Story schon für dich, die ist ziemlich gut. Wir gehen sie gerade durch. Und ich würde die Frage gern auf später verschieben. Im Grunde schalten wir jetzt ab und nehmen die Ergebnisse. Wir haben einen Mittelkurs von maximal 1,5 Metern pro Sekunde, egal wo im Brennvorgang, um wieder in den freien Rückkehrmodus zu gelangen. Das 
キャビンの温
네, 맞습니다, 짐. 패널 11의 UPDATA LINK 회로 차단기가
При таком количестве солнечного света я совсем не вижу звёзд. Солнце слева от меня, и я приближаюсь к закату, примерно в 4
我会让比尔把它录
Put you to FREE here, and I'll 
All I was doing was working 
Roger. Verstanden. Nur zur Information, vielleicht
今はCLOSEDですが、VENTに行く前はCLOS
И, просто из любопытства, мы очень удачно избавились от радара. Он виси
And that is not correct either. The gyros are... are okay; but on ASCS standby. It may be an orientation problem. I'll orient visually and... see if that will help out the ASCS problem
Джерри, мы полу
Ok. Inserisci senza rilasciare il lampeggiante quanto
ठीक है, फ्रेड। ये अच्छे आंकड़े हैं, और हमें टीएम को बढ़ाने की ज़रूरत नहीं पड़ेगी। यही वो आंकड़ा है जिसकी हम
Stai dicendo che le celle a com
ロジャー、ヒューストン。トランクウィリティ基地
سأتحقق م
Apollo 8, Houston. Di
11号，休斯顿。我们收到你的消息了——你的亚空间站位于南美洲西海
روجر. لا توجد مشكلة فيما يتعلق بالوقود. المشكلة الوحيدة هي أن هناك 
Aurora Seven, hier spricht Indian Cap Com. Alle unsere Rücklaufzeiten
«Дружба Семь», это командование воздушного движения Гавайев, я вас хорошо слышу. Каков ваш отчет о текущем состо
Aspett
我们现在正忙着——嗯，要么是做三文鱼沙拉，要么是
Ok. Sì,
ठीक है। आप जब चाहें तब ये कॉन्फ़िगरेशन प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। अब अगला काम जो मैं आपको बताने जा रहा हूँ, वो है मेन 
حسنًا. ما نود فعله يا جيم هو أننا سنقوم بضبط المحاذاة التقريبية لزوايا المحور التي ستستخدمها، ثم سنجهز المنصة. وعندما تتصل وتستخدم برنامج PICAPAR، قد لا تكون الصورة قريبة بما يكفي لوضع النجم في السدس، ولكن إذا استطعت رؤية أي نجم ساط
نعم، إنه جميل جدًا. ليس سيئًا على الإطلاق. م
现在看不清楚，我们离得太近了。但你做紧急制动操作的时候，我
अरे, ऐसा नहीं होने वाला है कि हमें अचानक बाहर निकाल दिया 
Roger. Es ist ziemlich offensichtli
ठीक है। एजीसी का वोल्टेज स्तर घटकर उस स्तर पर आ गया जिसे हम
Гавайи. 
ठीक है। मुझे लगता है मैंने आपको वापस पकड़ लिया है। मेरा अनुमान है कि 
« - - Lorsque DELTA-VX est égal à la val
Verbraucht der TVC-Gimbalantrieb die 
Okay. A
Un
Aspetta un minuto, Jack, prima di entrare. FLIGHT ha un 
짐, 전원 공급 시작 시간에 대해 말씀하셨는데, 1시간 15분이면 충분할 것 같습니다. 물론 필요한 시간은 팀원들의 선호에 따라 달라질 수 있습니다. 저희는 1시간 15분
... इस समय दांव पर लगा ह
रॉजर, केप। हम आपसे कहेंगे कि आप अपना प्रोपेलेंट
Apollo 8, Houston. Nous sommes à votr
Ich hatte es sehr gut unter
Roger, Friendship Seven. This is Canaveral Com Tech. Copy you loud and clear, als
روجر. تم الا
あれはマセラティみたいに操縦できるの
好的，杰克。从上开始。好的。低温储罐；H2 1 和 H2 的读数都是 230。我们的 O2 低温储罐 1 看起来勉强维持在 300。低温储罐 2 的 H2 1 读数是 73，H2 2 是 74。在 O2 方面，我们读取到 O2 1 的量为 76；O2 的读数已达到满量程高位。辐射温度：主入口温度约为 55；辐射出口温度约为 30；次级出口温度为 52 度。蒸发出口温度为 45，蒸汽压力为 0.17，乙二醇排​​放压力为 48。宇航服压缩机读数为零。蓄压器
نعم. اسمع، واجهتُ مشكلةً كبيرةً في عينيّ في نهاية اليوم الأول. لم أكن متأكدًا من قدرتي على تحمّل الأمر. لكنهما تحسّنتا الآن. أعتقد أن مُبادل الحرارة في البدلة قد حلّ مشكلت
네. 지금 그녀
Ja. Wir – Sie meinen den Film, den wir heute Morgen aufg
Houston, Apollo 8. How are you reading o
Теперь отображается ретросеквенция, что означает, что вы можете продвинуть ее ровно на 1 минуту впе
ヒューストン、ア
好的。我想，除非你们还有其他类似的意见，否则我们或许应该让他们休息一下，我也在这儿躺一会儿。如果你们有什么要跟我汇报的，那就尽管说；但我希望我的回答仅限于“是”或“
Direi che potresti chiamarmi ogni tanto mentre cambiamo antenna, giusto per farmi sapere che sei ancora lì, o m
收到，吉姆。我们通过遥测数据向你展示了情况。新的姿态看起来很稳固。顺便一提，最新的跟踪数据显示，圆锥体高度在136英里以上，你的发射
简直难以置
了解。D-8実験 チェック1。57から開始。チェック2。01:30から開始。アイテム4、Rev 50、昇交点102°26。アイテム5：可能であれば、S-6のアポロランドマークラン7の西海岸沖の熱帯暴風雨の写真を削除。この
Roger. I take it, from what you said then, that you have confirmed that your faceplate is closed for the decision on
Unter mir zieht ein ziemlich großes Gewittergebiet auf. Es muss sich weit erstrecken, denn ich sehe Blitze bis weit rechts am Horizont. Auch hier, fast direkt unter mir, sind sie zu sehen. Nachts
- - بدءًا من الساعة 108:00 على الجانب الأيسر، قم بشطب "إيقاف معدل ORB عند وضعية ORB العلمية". عند - قم بشطب في العمود الأيسر قيمة "10101" و"11111". بالانتقال إلى ا
Okay. That was an Earth/Sun check, John. We're getting a little close to the Moon now. And the TC plus 2 maneuver still looks about 9
Gemini 4, sind Sie jetzt auf U
好的。
了解、フランク。近地点の予測がマイナス03137度であることに、問題やおかしな点は見当たりません。これはケプラーの予測であり、あまり正確ではありません。ダウンリンク
About 2 degrees off in the pi
Négatif, je ne le 
後方燃焼と前方燃焼のどちらを使
جميع أجهزة إعادة التشغيل تعمل تلقائيًا. يبدو أنها تعمل قبل دقيقة أو ثانية من العد التنازلي. ربما
晴空万里；32秒；
ジャイロは正常。姿勢制御はフライ・バイ・
لا. لا يمكننا قراءة الذاكرة القابلة للمسح المذهلة إذا اضطررنا إلى الدخول إلى البرنامج 01 
نعم. أظن أنه في مرحلة الإح
I'm going to stow the camera now for the check on the Durban light. As we did not hav
了解
안녕하세요, 카노 씨. 잘 들립니다
わかりました。G&Cチェックリストの2-1ページに従ってパワーアップを実行してく
Понял. Для окна номер 5. Это бу
我怀疑这片巨石区可能与我们最后下山时经过的那个边缘锋利的大型岩石环形山有关。昨天我说过它大概有一个足球场那么大，我得承认，当时测量起来有点困难。不过，我们经过的时候，我觉得它大概能装进太空穹顶体育馆。这个
快
알겠습니다. 제
حدث ذلك عندما كنا في وضعية المركبة الفضائية أجينا عند 0°، 180°، 0°، وكنا مستقرين عند 
Les deux pompes de 
मुझे लगता है बज़ शायद सही कह रहा है। दरअसल, एक बार मैंने एक निशान बनाया जो मुझे थोड़ा सा गलत ल
哦不。我们变了；我们现在在月球上的 0
كما أعلن الرئيس نيكسون يوم الاثنين عطلة رسمية لجميع موظفي الحكومة الفيدرالي
好的。采用机动动作 2+38。不采用机动动作 7+03
よし、ジム。そろそろコマンドモ
Attendez 1. Je ferai une prédiction à ce sujet. Au fait, j'espère que vous notez b
프랭크, 우리가 하려
罗杰。179 346 357，不适用，另加 00176 37900 336 
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 아직 연결이 안 됐습니다. 다시 말씀해 
Ok, Jim. Solo una sorta di introduzione alla procedura che useremo per la fase intermedia, che sarà un'accensione manuale. L'assetto sarà controllato manualmente; l'avvio/arresto del motore sarà controlla
そうです
Gémeaux VI, Houston. Comment lise
好的，杰克。为
Okay. In den letzten drei Reihen befinden sich die Schutzschalter für Hochwasser und Gleis (Reihe 2, offen); Logikstro
Хорошо. Небольшая информация. Мы разрабатываем для вас процедуру, позволяющую использовать баллоны с LiOH из командного модуля для подключения к вашим шлангам — выходным шлангам, — чтобы по мере выполнения миссии вы могли продолжать очищать атмосферу. Для этого потребуется модифицировать комплект, чтобы можно было подсоединить шланг, модифицировав баллон с LiOH. Поэтому в будущем мы предоставим вам эту процеду
Okay, aber Sie 
Okay. Will do. I don't see any constraint here, Charlie. I was just checking to make sure, because last time, I went f
ह्यूस्टन, क्या आपने सुन
आपको इस बात का ध्यान रखना होगा कि आप जिस दिशा में जाना चाहते हैं, उसी दिशा में झुकें, वरना आप थोड़े नशे में हो जाएंगे। दूसरे शब्दों मे
Хорошо, только не называйте это "рифером". Ладно. Примерно при -19 градусах мы возвращаемся к стандартному контрольному списку на ст
Contingency sample is in the poc
好吧，我一点也不惊讶…
Frank, wo wir gerade von der Checkliste für die Einreise sprechen, dieses Kaltbad
分
Roger,
Ok, Jack. L'aggiorname
Oui 
Maintenant, nous avons Sabine à 
我觉得并没有什么明显的信号；毫无疑问你在动，但要准确说
神は光を昼と呼び、闇を夜と呼ばれた。夕と朝があって、第一日となった。神
حسنًا. مايك، يمك
Gemini 4, Guaymas CAP COM. Der Flugbetrieb weist darauf hin, dass Treibstoff gespart werden soll. Sie werden über
حس
Hai contro
Roger. Abbiamo a
एक्वेरियस, 
Ich glaube, wir sind für Nummer 9 zuständig. Ungefähr um diese Uhrzeit ging die Kontrollleuchte Nr. 5 im S-II an, und es traten deutliche Vibrationen auf, die stärker waren als die üblichen hochfrequenten Vibrationen beim normalen S-IV-Lauf. Dann ging die Kontrollleuchte an. Ich rief an, sah auf die Uhr und merkte, dass es früh war. Kurz nachdem die Kontrollleu
Pendant que je relève les instruments, l'onduleur 250 affiche 145 degrés. L'onduleur 150 est à 105 degrés, l'onduleur de secours à 119 degrés et la température de rétro-turbo à 75 degrés. Lacet à droite: 100 degrés, lacet à gauche: 90 degrés, tangage à piquer: 96 degrés, tangage à cabre
...여기서
حسنًا. هذا صحيحٌ في الأساس. دعني أشرحها بإيجازٍ سريعٍ لدقيقة، ثم سأقرأ لك الخطوات. أعتقد أنها ستكون أوضح. الفكرة هي أن التلسكوب يمكنه التحليق إلى مجموعة من زوايا الكرة التي ستوجه عدساته نحو القمر. الآن، في أي وقت، وفي أي وضعية نكون فيها، إذا استطعت النظر في التلسكوب والتعرف على أنماط النجوم بشكلٍ كافٍ يجعلك تعتقد أنك قادر على إجراء المحاذاة بنفسك، فهذه هي النقطة التي نود أن نتوقف عندها ونترك لك مهمة المحاذاة بنفسك. مع ذلك، نحن نقدم لك إجراءً سيوفر لك أشياءً نعلم أنك تستطيع رؤيتها في التلسكوب دون القلق بشأن أي انعكاسات أو ما شابه، وليس المقصود أن تتبع هذا الإجراء بعد أن تتأكد من وضوح أنماط النجوم في تلسكوبك. إذا احتجتَ للمتابعة، سنقوم بالمناورة، ونلقي نظرة على القمر، ونضع علامة هناك، ثم نناور بالزوايا مرة أخرى ونلقي نظرة على الشمس، ونضع علامة أخرى عليها، وبذلك تكتمل عملية المحاذاة. الآن، تتمثل آلية المحاذاة في أننا سنعطيك مجموعة من الزوايا التي يمكنك من خلالها محاذاة الكرة بشكل تقريبي عندما يشير المؤشر نحو القمر. ستتوافق هذه المجموعة من الزوايا مع القيمة الاسمية التي لديك. يمكنك المحاذاة التقريبية وفقًا لذلك، وتعيين علامة الانحراف وعلامة REFSMMAT، وستحصل على منصة جيدة، وسنكون على بُعد درجتين من محاذاة جيدة. وإذا لزم الأمر، يمكننا التوقف عند هذه النقطة والمضي قدمًا في الدخول؛ ومع ذلك، في محاولة للحصول على منصة جيدة، سنطلب منك حينها تنفيذ الخي
로저. 확인해 주시겠어요?
不要报
أبولو 8، هذه هيوستن. 1، /: 462، تصحيح، 46728، ناقص 053، زائد 121، زائد 37746، ناقص
Come probabilmente saprai, abbiamo diversi gruppi che lavorano sulle procedure da qui in poi. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sulle correzioni di metà rotta per determinare un sistema, gli assetti, come eseguirle, le tecniche di allineamento e così via. Abbiamo un gruppo che lavora sull'ingresso,
फ्रैंक, अभी तक हमें को
ऑरोरा सेवन, ऑरोरा सेवन,
Okay. After PC plus 2, there are no trim requirements; and, if you have a shutdown during PC plus 2, subsequent midcourse maneuvers required with - Well, the earliest one would be PC plus 4. If you don't do a PC plus 2, but we still want to do one - later. At PC plus 4, the increase in DELT - in DELTA-V, or the penalty, wou
روجر. ما هي زاوية الميل المقبولة التي يمكننا الحصول عليها؟ يمكنني الانتقال إلى الوضع التلقائي في أي وقت الآن، وأنا أنظر 
Das ist schlimm, n
离开时，他们给了我们一些 REACQ
On aperçoit un cratère très sombre dans le matériau de remplissage de 
أفق رؤيتي واضح جدًا الآن. إنه فاتح نوعًا ما، ويتكون معظمه من غيوم. أستطيع رؤية الغيوم - النجوم وهي تبدأ بالغروب في وهج الهواء الرئيسي، لكن الغيوم تُضفي على الأفق مزيدًا من الإشراق. لا يبدو الأمر كذلك - ففي وقت سابق من الرحلة، رأينا أفقًا خاليًا من الغيوم وكان أكثر وضوحًا - كانت طبقة سميكة من وهج الهواء، وكان بالإمكان رؤية النجوم وهي تغيب من خلالها. أما في هذا الأفق
ठीक है, अब मुझे 
Roger, la prise de température buccale est
Questo indicatore oscilla intorno al 
Роджер. Понял; сейчас ты займешься несколькими делами. Мы думали, ты отдохнешь и с
كولومبيا، هيوستن. أولًا، نود أن تصل نسبة تصريف مياه الصرف الصحي إلى 10% في الجهة الخلفية. ثانيًا، لا يبدو أننا سنحتاج إلى أي تغيير في الطائرة في الوقت الحالي، لذلك لن نقوم 
Хорошо. На приборной панели отображается 22 процента. У
Хорошо, Чарли. Если ты так же сердился на 45-ю звезду — сетка смещена, скажем, на 30 градусов, и зв
Okay. Wir haben unsere Standorte jetzt auf Goldstone umgestellt. Ich weiß nicht, ob Sie
फोटो खींचने 
Ja, da stimme ich zu. Aber wir haben beschlossen, sicherheitshalber alles in einwandfreiem Zustand zu entfernen, falls es irgendwelche Problem
You
닐, 여기는 휴스턴입니다. 기록 샘플링에 약 10분 
Grazie, Signor Pres
Nous allons ê
Odyssey
मैंने पहला तारा 1:58 बजे देखा - सुधार: 2:58:30 बजे, दूसरे चक्कर के दौरान। ज़मीन अच्छी तरह से 
هذا سيجلب 
D'accord. Sur les disjoncteurs 1
روجر. يبدو الوضع جيداً من هنا. نحن نمر فو
ठीक है। अगले कुछ घंटों के लिए हमें आपकी उड़ान योजना के बारे में अपडेट च
여기는 프렌드십 세븐입니다. 좋은 질문입니다. 저도 알았으면 좋겠네요. 이 오류는 비행 내내 간헐적으로 발생했습니다. 자이로스코프를 케이지에 넣
わかりました。前方ダンプバルブ
알겠습니
尼尔，这里是休斯顿。我们正在拍照。你现在不在画面里。不过我们能看到巴兹正在移动那个
음, 다행이네요. 아마 속도를
I see a little old string hanging along d
حسنًا. الطاقة 6. حسنًا. الطاقة 6 تشير إلى اللوحة 11. يجب عليك اتباع المخطط باستثناء قواطع الدائرة التي أشرت إليها. السطر الأول سليم. أو لنقل، الصف الأول. الصف الثاني، QUAD 4، TCA، مغلق؛ QUAD 3، TCA، مغلق؛ QUAD 2، TCA، مغلق؛ وQUAD 1، TCA، مغلق. بقية هذا الصف سليمة. الصف 3، في منتصفه تقريبًا، ATCA (PGNS)، مغلق. حسنًا. بقية هذا السطر سليمة. السطر الرابع، السخان - وضع الاستعداد. حسنًا. هذا السطر سليم تمامًا باستثناء قواطع الدائرة الثلاثة الأخيرة، يا فريد، تحت ، وهي: وضع الاستعداد، وضع التشغيل. يجب أن تكون هذه الثلاثة مغلقة، على الأقل في الوقت الح
D'accord. Concernant la température du réservoir d'hélium: elle n'est pas enregistrée à faible débit binaire, et en consultant nos enregistrements de sauvegarde, la plupart des données au verso sont à faible débit binaire. Nous ne pourrons donc pas vous donner de valeur exacte, mais d'après les relevés effectués lorsque nous s
わかりました。確認ですが
Roger. How are you doing Gordo
حسنًا. قراءة جيدة. نتابع إلى أسفل الصفحة. مفتاح "مُوازنة الاقتران"، "مُوازنة الاقتران مُطفأة". حسنًا، نصل إلى السطر الأخير قبل دقيقتين ناقصتين - "خانق القائد، الحد الأدنى؛
Джим, мы хотели бы убед
Oui monsieur. Je suis ravi de cet appareil. Je suis en mode automatique, attitude rétro, gyroscopes en mode normal, manœuvres désactivées, tous les systèmes sont au vert. Comme vous le savez sans doute, le circuit de la combinaison est sous contrôle, et voici un c
उम्मीद है, आप देखेंगे - या हम यह
حسنًا يا فريد، لم أعد أسمعك جيدًا بسبب الضوضاء المحيطة. أعتقد أنني سمعت جاك يخبرك بما سنفع
…今頃放送開始ですね。0時30分
فرانك، أنت تمامًا كما توقعنا من قبل. ضوء رصيفك يطغى تمامًا عل
了解しました。AUTOモードでドッキングしたのですが、先ほど言ったように、接触の瞬間はよく分かりませんでした。ドッキングプローブのインジケーターを何度も確認しました。2本のバーバーポールが、3つのキャプチャラッチ ― キャプチャラッチではなく、3つの…ラッチが接触したことを示しています。そしてソフトドッキングしました。その時、状況は非常に安定しているように見えました。そこでFREEモードに切り替え、窓の外を見るとまだ安定しているように見えました。そこでプライマリ2のボンベを噴射しました。するとその時、2機の機体の間に回転が始まりました。原因はよく分かりません。おそらく推進力によるものか、あるいはそれ以前に蓄積されていて私が気づいていなかったのかもしれません。とにかく、プローブをRETRACTモードに切り替えている間に
大丈夫で
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. Когда вы уйдете в темноту примерно через 7 или 8 минут, у меня для вас несколько слов о фильтрах для широкоугольного объектива, для ваш
この時点で、電気系統の完全なチェックを行いました。すべての電気系統は緑色です。電流は約19ア
好的。Agena 看起来非常稳定。ACS 气体压力保持在 200 
حسنًا. سنؤج
Je ne l'ai pas retrouvé depuis la tombée de la nuit. Il… il… il flotte pas mal, Deke. Il n'est pas complètement gonflé et ne se tend pas sur la corde comme je l'espérais. Il rebondit et oscille de haut en bas et latéralement. Je n'ai pas encore de mesures fiables au tensiomè
Schöne Lac
Хорошо. Теперь те
And, Houston, we had a RESTART on our computer and we ha
Хор
오늘은 어제보다 일찍 자려고
We can see the umbilical connection quite well there, Buzz. We see you zooming in on one of the decals now. It's, "To reset, unlatch handle; latch behind grip and pu
250 градусов — это 143 (градуса). За последние 40 минут температура поднялась примерно на 2 градуса. 150 градусов — это примерно 105 (градусов). В режиме ожидания около, ха, 110 (градусов), я бы с
알겠습니다. 제가 거
حسنًا. أنا آسف، 1 - ن
روجر. انطلق يا هيو
Nein, wir haben kein
रॉजर, जिम। धन्यवाद, लेकिन मुझे अभी भी आपकी बात समझ नहीं आई। मैंने सामान्य रूप से 5 से शून्य तक गिनती की और फिर शून्य से नकारात्मक क्रम में गिनती जारी रखी, और अब यह -6.2 दिखा रहा है? क्या यह सह
Roger, on Rev 12 RKV will update your PLA and CLA time; Rev 13 Canary Islands will have a C-band track. And also there will be astro-orbital nav check-run. No propellant usage for ATTITUDE control. This is a g.e.t, of... or a G.m.t. time of 12 hours 16 minutes 00 seconds. Rev 13 tape dump over Carnarvon. Afte
أخرجت الظل إلى هناك. 250، أسفل عند 
Rog, e p
من
Параметр тангажа держится чуть больше 2; он колеблется примерно между 2 и 2,4. Параметр рыскания колеблется между минус 0,5 и нулем. Он просто бесцельно скачет туда-обратно между этими значениями. Коэффициенты скорости по-прежнему колеблются; они находятся в зоне нечувствительности по всем трем осям; они составляют
Здравствуйте, Zanzibar Com Tech. Friendship Seven на КВ. Вы меня слышите? К
フレンドシッ
알았
Шары номер 1 и номер 2 показывают точное значение. Выбросьте ноль, танг
이글,
是的，我同意。但为了以防万一出现任何故障，我们决定确保把它彻底清理干净
네. 패널 5에서 배터리 충전기 A 충전, 배터리
Roger. Area 55-DELTA 82. 04 34 10. 9+57. Area 55-3 split burn, 55 aft, 109 forward. 1+31. 2+17. 05 15 40. 02+3
Jerry, wie ich schon sagte: Ich habe versucht, die Heimreise zu beschleunige
अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। हमें आपके कमांड मॉड्यूल का दबाव नियंत्रण बहुत अच्छा लग रहा
खिड़की नंबर 1 से बाहर मत देखो। अगर आपको - अगर बाहर का नजारा वैसा ही दिखता है जैसा मुझे खिड़की नंबर 5 से दिखता है, तो आप उसे देखना नही
Bonjour, Apollo 11
哥伦比亚，休斯顿。关于P76焊
Non riesco a determinare l'altitudine guardando fuori dal finestrino. Non sapr
CSQ, Gémeaux 
नकारात्मक, मिथु
D'accord. Passons à la page suivante, la dernière. Jim, 34 ans. En haut de la page: 
C'est en plein 
一罐噪音持续了2小时35分钟。
尼尔，你知道录
我们认为对准没问题，所以不需要进行完全对准。我们认为检查也没
I could hear Watertown, Huntsville, and you, loud and clear a
Роджер. Кормовая 
Jim, you'll be splashing down about 560 miles southeast of Samoa at about 0800 local time. The weather forecast for the area is good; 1500, scattered, high broken, 10-mile visibility. The seas will be 5-foot waves, 15 knots, and you'll be going to Samoa by boat and/or aircraft. You'll spend either the night on the boat or in Samoa and return to E
它已开
صحيح. إنها وا
Roger, Jim; and copying about half yo
谢
로저. 서경 121도, G.m.t. 12시 35분 00초
«Аполлон-8», Хьюстон. В 15:00 мы передадим эстафету из Карна
ठीक है, अब मुझे जो दिख रहा है उसका आधा हिस्सा रोशन है और आधा अंधेरा। तो हम थोड़ा सा आगे की तरफ झ
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 슬링샷 자세 관측을 위한 기동을 완료했지만 아무것도 보이지 않습니다. 지
That's affirmative. On the right side, everything is ou
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 4분 40초 남았습니다. S-밴드 AUX 스위치가 아래쪽(음성 백업) 위치에 있는지 다시 한
روجر
Ok, Jack. Iniziamo dall'alto. Ok. I CRYO TANKS; H2 1 segna 230 e lo stesso per 2. Il nostro CRYO TANK 1 di O2 è - sembra che si mantenga a malapena a 3
रॉजर। कॉपी, बज़। आपकी सरफेस चेकलिस्ट में कुछ बदलाव हैं, और सामान्य तौर पर, हम चाहते हैं कि आप कमांड मॉड्यूल को ट्रैक करें ताकि आप वहां अपनी स्थिति का अंतिम बार जायजा ले 
حسناً، تشير التحليلات الأولية للبيانات إلى أن محرك S-II المركزي اهتز بسعة أعلى قليلاً مما لاحظناه في الرحلات السابقة، وقد بدأ ذلك بعد حوالي 160 ثانية من بدء ا
いいえ。キャリアが落ちた途端、なぜかあの角度に流れ込んでそこに留まりました。そして再び上昇
Okay, Jim. Könntest du bitte auf dein externes Kabel drücken? Hey, wir haben den Eindruck, dass du etwa 57 Gramm mehr verbrauchst, als wir für angemessen halten. Wir fragen uns, wo dein Anzugsband sitzt, o
جيد ج
Eh ben dis donc! Les scanners principaux fonctionne
I'm taking some general - normal lens on the 16-mm photographs of the water and the clouds at the present time. We've been having a lot o
ジャック、無重力の中でハンモックに入るのはちょっと難しいんだ。
Nein, nein, e
Близнецы 4. Хирург RKV. У нас хорошее кровяное давление. Мы готовы обеспечит
Okay. We're into the presleep checklist now. As far as the crew status report, as far as medication goes, we've had no medication. And we're all feeling really good. I've given you the onboard readouts. Jim is chlorinating the potable water now. I'm ready for an E-memory d
タイマーはマガジンに引っかかっているようです。どういうわけか、よく分かりませんが、6シリーズではイベ
了解。受信状態はだいぶ良くなりました、ウォーリー。非常に良好です。燃料は62～62パーセント、酸素は62～95パーセント
Er hat das verstanden. David ist da; er sagt, du hättest ihn
Apollo 8, Apollo 8, Houston. Il caricamento del vettore di stato è com
D'accord. Nous vous conseillons d'utiliser toute la pellicule. C'est votre dernière expérience. Utilisez toutes les pellicules dont vous disposez. Jim est là et nous aimerions discuter un peu de cette rentrée atmosphérique av
Хорошо. Мы предлагаем время начала, время окончания, и вы будете в режиме. Мы запрашиваем скорость крена влево, которую, как 
A 
Roger, 11. Ich habe einen aktualisierten Flugplan für dich, der dir die optimale Position für die Erde im Fenster Nr. 1 und den Mond im Fenster Nr. 5 anzeig
ロジャー。広報室の速報です。アポロ11号は今もなお世界中のニュースを賑わせています。中国共産党、北朝鮮、北ベトナム、アルバニアの4カ国だけが、まだあなた方の月面飛行と着陸について国民に知らせていません。ある記者は、あなた方の成功を言葉で表現する術がなくなったと語りました。今夜、ニクソン大統領はワシントンでオールスター野球の試合を観戦する予定です。試合後、太平洋回収地域へ出発します。水曜日の夜、ジョンストン島からヘリコプターで海軍通信艦アーリントンへ移動します。そして木曜日の朝、再びヘリコプターに乗り込み、ホーネットへ移動し、あなた方の着水を見届けます。大統領にはウィリアム・ロジャース国務長官とフランク・ボーマンが同行します。彼らは太平洋軍司令官ジョン・シドニー・マケイン・ジュニア提督と共に、回収艦のブリッジから着水を見届けます。大統領はホーネット号での滞在後、アジア歴訪と予定されていたルーマニア訪問に出発します。ルナ15号は昨日、月を52周した後、「危機の海」に墜落したとみられています。ソ連の通信社TASSは、「月近傍空間における科学的」「研究」が行われたと報じました。ジョドレルバンク天文台のバーナード・ラベル卿は、ルナ15号が時速約300マイル（約480キロメートル）の速度で月面に衝突したと述べました。ベトナムでは最近、比較的静穏な状況が続いています。パトロール中の米兵が、飛行中の航空機に同調するトランジスタラジオを携帯しているのが目撃されました。ベトナムの軍のラジオ・テレビネットワークは、このミッションを全面的に報道しました。スエズ運河沿いでは、エジプトとイスラエルの間で小競り合いが依然として続いています。国連監視団は、この動きを阻止しようとしています。ワシントンでは、下院歳入委員会が、27.5%の石油枯渇許容量を20%に削減することを決議しました。ここヒューストン地域では、何度か雨が降っています。今日は曇りで、にわか雨が降る見込みです。スポーツに関しては、先ほども述べたように、オールスター ゲームが今夜開催されます。昨日は試合がありませんでした。昨夜ニューヨークで、全米野球記者協会がベーブ ルースを史上最高の野球選手に、ジョー ディマジオを現存する最高の野球選手に選びました。選手たちを称える夕食会で、フランク ボーマンが発表を行いました。ジョー ネイマス選手は、ニューヨーク ジェッツのトレーニング キャンプで丸一日を過ごしました。ブロードウェイ ジョーに触ろうとした約 500 人の子供達を 5 人の警官が制止するのに苦労しました。彼は気分は良く、ウィーブ ユーバンク コーチの許可があれば 8 月 1 日のオールスター ゲームに出場すると述べました。カービルのオイラーズのキャンプは昨日雨になりましたが、トレーニングは続行されました。軽傷者は数名いましたが、大したことはありません。ウォーリー レム コーチは、これまでのトレーニングに満足しています。オイラーズはバッファローとのプレシーズンゲームに3万人以上の観客動員を見込んでいます。ドン・メレディスの引退発表も、特にここヒューストンではファンの熱狂に水を差すことはないようです。マリオ・アンドレッティは日曜日に行われたトレントン・オートレース2
حسنًا. يبدو أننا حصلنا على تثبيت محكم خلال الدقيقة الأخيرة تقريبًا، حيث كانت مؤشرات ضبط السرعة الق
Roger, 11. This is the original CAP COM. Congratulations on an ou
ح
«Аполлон-8», это Хьюстон. У меня для вас небольшой обзор ново
Okay, Jack, and your battery-charge termination procedure remains unchanged, but when we go t
好的，看起来我们大约 10 秒钟前看到了塞氏锥
Roger. Blutdruckmessung gestartet. Mein Zustand ist gut. Kapselzustand ist gut. Lungenfunktion: 99–98 %. Sauerstoffsättigung: 89–100 %. Kabinenlage stabil. Gleichstromversorgung in Ordnung. Wechselstromversorgung in Ordnung, 22 Ampere. Alles grün, und Sie sollten jetzt den Blutd
Roger, Jim. Concernant votre évaporateur, si vous rencontrez un problème similaire la prochaine fois, côté soleil, vérifiez la température de sortie
휴스턴, 아폴로 11호입니다. 이 자동 광학 기동(P23)이 항성 근접점에 도달하지 못하는 것 같습니다. 이 별(우리 태양계의 두 번째 별)의 항성 근접점에 대한 롤, 피치, 요 각도를 계산해 주시겠
ولا داعي للقلق بشأن مياه الشرب. اشرب ما تشاء، فهي متوفرة بكثرة. يوجد منها 38 رطلاً، وينصحك الطبيب أيضاً 
Роджер. Нам бы хотелось получить данные с высокой скоростью передачи, когда вы сможете зафиксировать их на высоком коэффициенте усиления. У нас у
रॉजर। कृपया ध्यान दें, हमने अभी-अभी एक HF टेस्ट 31 किया है और रेंज पर मौजूद किसी भी स्टेशन से कोई प्रतिक्रिया नहीं मिली है। क्या आपको पता है कि कोई स्टेश
تسربت إحدى أكياس الطعام من غطاء مدخل الماء حيث يتم وضع
Und Apollo 11, Houston. Wir bitten Sie, den O2-Lüfter eingeschaltet zu lassen. Er stellt die optimale Konfiguration vor dem Schlafengehen sicher. En
حسناً. يجب أن يكون ال
Now the crater that's in the center of the screen now is Webb. We'd be looking straight down on it at about 6 minutes before power descent. It has a relatively flat bottom to the crater, and you can see maybe two or three craters that are in the bottom of it on the western wall, the wall that's now nearest the - the camera. Near the bottom of the screen, we can see a dimple crater, just on the outside. And then coming back toward the bottom of the screen and to the left, you can see a series of depressions. It's this type of connected craters that give us most interest to discover why they're in the particular patt
네. 이 카트리지 두 개를 얼마나
离焊接开始还有20分钟。哦，不好意思，是10分钟——离
Okay. In tal cas
Mi dispiace. Sono il comandante. Io... Sono state 5 ore e mezza e direi che alm
두 버스
Sigma Se
من المثير للاهتم
Voilà le v
Und ich dachte, ich nehme mir hier nur kurz Zeit (ca. 5 Sekunden) und schaue, ob ich die 000 ent
Et cette fois, nous avons reçu une indication à bord, Houston
로저입니다. 하와이 통신 기술국 오로라 세븐입니다. 잘 들립니다. 어떻게
«Аполлон-11», это Хьюстон. Кажется, связь возобновилась. Мы сл
जिम ने अभी एक और उपग्रह देखा है
Ken, while we are just killing time here, there are a couple of anomalies we've noticed. The booties, you know, for the inflight coveralls; mine have frayed very badly, and I had to take t
Okay, Houston. Wir sind in der „Burn Attitude“-Phase. Jim 
حسنًا، أبولو 8. بذلك نكون قد انتهينا من اختبار الاتصالات. شكرًا لتعاونكم. لديّ تغيير هنا في مواقع الملاحة سيظهر عند... ونريد تغيير موقع ن
تشير فحوصات الرادار لدينا إلى اقتراب القمر من الأرض على ارتفاع 50,000 قدم. أما فحوصات الارتفاع البصرية فتشير إلى استقرار الارتفاع عند حوالي 53,000 قد
알겠습니다. 조종 가능한 안테나가 이륙 직후 제대로 작동하지 않으면, 전방 OMNI 안테나가 이륙 후 약 30초
ゆっくり話してください。そ
分かりました。ジャックが通信中、ここのドッキングウィンドウから外を見ていたら、サービスモジュールからまた大量の粒子が噴出しているのが見えました。今度は位置が反対側のようです。以前はいつもウィンドウ1から見えていましたが、ここから見ると、サービスモジュールのウィンドウ6の下あたりにあるようです。ジャックは上の階に行って、上の様
そうですね。あ
...Просто... Вот эти 13-20 у
Roger. Ist das Musik, die ich
Roger, 11 anni. Qui Houston. Abbiamo dovuto cambiare stazione. Non vi stavamo leggendo attraver
Gemini 4, CSQ. Обра
Nous avons payé n
Ро
غروب الشمس خلابٌ حقًا، لا أعتقد أنني بحاجة لإضاعة الكثير من ال
Siamo riusc
Penso che sia meglio esercitarsi finch
Okay. The only comment was that it has deteriorated to where the Moon is now coming through the overhead docking
はい。マスターアラームにサイレン装置を設置して、テストを
روجر، من فريق فريندشيب سفن، فهم أنظمة التحكم،
コロンビアです。こちらはヒューストンです。R2のロードでは、0と4つの1、つまり01111を要
ठीक है। आपके पास के दौरान हम यूएचएफ जांच करना चाहेंगे। मैं आपसे विशेष अनुरोध करता हूं - कम से कम ईंधन क
로저, 첫 번째는 11번이었고 GMT는 10 
아폴로 8호, 휴스턴입니다. 이전 기록에서 몇 가지 데이터가 필요합니다. 누락된 항목이 몇 개 있으니 치우
क्या आप समझ गए कि केप चाहता है कि आप अपनी घड़
That's okay; don't bother
로저, 11. 저희는 그런 기능이 없습니다. 정확한 위치를 파악하려면 M 라인이 수평선과 평행해야 합니다. 
Ich sehe nur die Radarnadeln. Mehr k
Apollo 13, Houston. Sie könne
ह्यूस्टन, ट्रै
И к вашему сведению, мы также организуем встречу в Tranquility Base, когда вы прид
Ok, abbiamo circa 18 minuti
好的，查理。谢谢。我们就在这里稍等
... ليس هذا موقفًا جيدًا على الإطلاق بالنسبة لـ COMM، وبمجرد
रॉजर, मैंने धुंध की परतें तो देखीं, लेकिन वैसी नहीं जो क्षितिज से अलग थीं, जैसा हमने सोचा था और जिसके बारे में
やってみたかったのは
ठीक है। एंटर दबाएँ, 333 एंटर दबाएँ, और फिर
是的。我把它
هذا صحيح يا جاك. لدينا الآن إجراءات مفصلة على شكل قائمة مراجعة، سنرسلها إليك. بعبارة أخرى، جدول زمني مع الإشارة إلى قائمة مراجعة المدخلات وأي تغييرات عليها. لذا، إذا كان لديك بعض الأوراق، فسنرسلها إليك في غضون س
Rog
एड, मुझे हमारे साथ-सा
Vo
11, ह्यूस्टन। रेट्रो टीम जानना चाहती थी कि क्या आप हमें हमारे पास मौजूद किसी भी गैर-मानक सामान के बारे में जानकारी दे सकते हैं। उन्हें बस स्थान और वजन के बारे में ही जानका
好的。然
我的天哪，看看那只毛奇；它是我最喜欢的……看看那家伙。你看到那些路了吗——那些三角形的道路都从它身
휴스턴, 여기는 아폴로 8호입니다. 15일에 두 세트를 더 하고, 16일에 한
Bene. Esatto. Quindi, per riconfigurare questa configurazione, Jack, vogliamo che tu lasci gli interruttori MAIN BUS TIE in posizione ON ed est
المحاذاة من 06 13 إلى 06 23 - دعون
"태양 코로나 및 태양 가장자리 밝아짐 사진"이라고 적힌 블록
Okay. Con
네, 창문 1번에서 환기가 되는 것을 보셨고, 은색의 4인치 정사각형 크기의 금속 조각이 떨어져 나온 것을 보셨다고 하셨는데, 환기는 아직도 되고 있나요
حسنًا. صحيح. هذا جيم لوفيل. ما فكرنا في فعله اليوم هو أن نُطلعكم على لمحة بسيطة عن الحياة داخل أبولو 8. لقد عرضنا لكم مشاهد القمر، ومشاهد الأرض، وفكرنا في دعوتكم إلى منزلنا. لقد كان منزلنا لمدة أربعة أيام على الأقل كما ترون على لوحة العدادات. نُعلّم كل يوم على لوحة العدادات. لقد مرّت أربعة أيام، ونعمل على اليوم الخامس. بالطبع، نتطلع جميعًا إلى الهبوط يوم الجمعة. هنا في الجزء السفلي من المركبة الفضائية الذي نسميه حجرة المعدات السفلية، لدينا مستشار الرئيس لشؤون اللياقة البدنية، الكابتن جيم لوفيل، على وشك الخضوع لبرنامج تمارين نقوم به 
Roger. We'd like to have you to put it in REACQ, and monitor. In about 2 minutes, we'll be c
좋아요,
Cia
Ok. Capisco che hai fatto il. Il prossimo punto del piano di volo dovrebbe essere un test di visibilità con il telescopio a scansione, ed è lo stesso che era sul tuo piano di volo in precedenza alle, e controlleremo che il sole a 70 gradi sia su Arturo. Dopo
As I look around the area, the contrast, in general, is *** comes about completely by virtue of the shadow *** down Sun... very light colored gray, light gray color, a halo around my own shadow, around the shadow of my helmet. Then, as I look off across *** the contrast becomes strongest in that the surrounding color is still fairly light. As you look down into the Sun *** a larger amount of *** shadowed area is looking toward us. The general color
我想是的。我
好的。10，/: 45597，减 040，加 157，加 35186，减 01512，减 00520 180 007 000，十一月阿尔法星，加 00186 35223 318 35018 42 0924 253；天蝎座δ星，下 069，左 45，加 0748，减 16500 12994 36300；主星天狼星，伴星参宿七，129 155 010；四组四边形，15 秒，空隙；地
好了，现在我可
حسنًا. إذًا أنت متأكد من أنها وحدة الخدمة، وبالطبع، ما يهمنا معرفته هو ما إذا كانت شيئًا متبقيًا من
Да. К твоему сведению, Джим, я не знаю, слышал ли ты это изначально, но этот участок с 2,5 до 1 часа там проезжали около трех раз, и он довольно плотный, поэт
Roger. This is Friendship Seven. I'm going on fly-by-wire so I can control more accurately. It just started as I got to Guaymas, and appears to be it drifts off in yaw, to the right at about 1° per second. It will go over to an attitude of about 20°, and hold at that and when
彼らは我々のところで何を測定したのでしょうか。V
ठीक है, फ्रेड। हमने अभी जो जानकारी दी है, उसमें बस दो बदलाव और टिप्पणियाँ हैं। पहली टिप्पणी सामने की ओर है - "माइनस 2-1/2 घंटे" वाले अनुभाग में, "नाल से बिजली 
On fait l'inventaire de nos réserves, on va peut-être envisager de rationner une partie. Il faut s'assurer d'en avoir assez pour tenir et de consommer suffisamment d'eau. Je serais vra
जी हां। यही वो पैड है जो हमने आपको दिया है, लेकिन हम बाद में अपना फैसला बदल सकते हैं। फिलहाल
罗杰。比尔，背面的录音质量极差，无法使用。
好的。我们要检查电脑在所有模式下的运行情况。这项检查分为三个步骤。首先，在所有 IVI 窗口中将速度设置为 10 英尺/秒。然后按下“故障重置”按钮。接着按下“启动电脑”按钮，观察电脑运行指示灯是否亮起。您需要在所有模式下都进行此操作。如果您没
حسنًا. اليوم، نود منك تحديد انحراف محور الدوران، قبل عمليات الرصد كما هو موضح في الإجراءات، ومرة ​​أخرى بعدها. هدفنا هنا هو التحقق من احتمال وجود تأثير حراري ما قد يُسبب أخطاءً في قراءة الزاوية في السدس. يجب تضمين الانحراف الذي تحصل عليه مسبقًا، أي المتابعة على NOUN 87 بعد الحصول على قياسين متتاليين متساويين في حدود 0.003 درجة. وبالطبع، حرك محور الدوران بضع درجات بين القياسين. من المفترض أن تكون الأرض أصغر بكثير في مجال رؤيتك اليوم. أنا متأكد من أنك أكثر تأهيلًا منا لإخبارنا بذلك، ولكن لضمان حصولك على قياس زاوية دقيق بين النجم وأفق الأرض، يجب أن يكون خط M في السدس، وهو الخط الذي يمر عبر العلامتين المائلتين ويكون عموديًا على خط R، موازيًا لأفق الأرض عند النقطة تحت النجم. وبعد ذلك، يمكن وضع النجم على الأفق في أي نقطة ضمن مجال رؤية السدس: أعلى، أسفل، أو على خط M. نوصي بوضع العلامات بأسرع ما يمكن بعد مناورة الوضع التلقائي. إذا شعرت أن الفترة الزمنية
И снова нам нужна небольшая корректировка положения. Наша Земля уход
Concernant les livres, il faudrait vraiment veiller à choisir des anneaux plus robustes. Nous avons rencontré des difficultés d'ouverture à deux ou trois reprises, et des pages se déchirent et ne restent plus en place. Il serait judicieux de renforcer les trous où les anneaux sont fixés. Quant au pistolet à eau, le petit embout qui permet à l'eau de s'éco
यह बहुत दिलचस्प है। सतह तो बहुत नरम है, लेकिन जहां-जहां मैं आकस्म
Roger, ho una correzione al piano di volo. Il
Gemini
了解。REPRESS P
了解。第二周回に向けて、ここからGOを出した。待機していてくれれば、2-1 TR
, minus 29837, plus 02390, plus 00994 000 200 005 01693, plus 00600 29949 402 29782 010 689 260, Persei Zeta, runter 048, links 05. Der Rest ist nicht anwendbar. Sirius, Rigel, 129 155 010. Kein Füllstand. Wir geben den Rest später w
Roger, Tranquility. We copy. Ove
Roger. Nous avons des nouvelles pour vous. Pourriez-vous également nous indiquer si vous souhaitez qu
Ja. Es lief wirklich super, bis auf wenige Au
Roger. Ich habe bereits 2 Minuten für H2 1 und 2 sowie O2 1 aufgewendet und habe gerade mit O2 2 beg
कोलंबिया, ह्यूस्टन। ऐसा लगता है कि आप लोग हमसे बहुत तेज़ हैं, इसलिए हम जेटिसन टाइम को बढ़ाकर लगभग 130 प्लस 30 करने के बारे में सोच रहे हैं, अगर आप सभी को 
弗雷德，如果非做不可，或许可以试试。目前，升华器里的水已经绰绰有余了。今天早上我们讨论过让你试试把水转移到上升水箱里，但我们决定不这么做，也不建议这么做，因为我们估计要花30个小时才能把一
私たちは廃水に
こんにちは、ケープ。フレンドシップセブン。受
로저. 기본 스
روجر، أنت تسير على الطريق الصحيح. لدينا معلم ب
로저, 휴스턴입니다. 육분의 정보, 즉 육분의 별
システムテストでバッテリーベント圧力を測定した結果、バッテリーベントバルブを開くとすぐに圧力が低下し、2ボルトの0.2～0.3ボルト程度でゼロになることがわかりました。バッテリーマニホールドではこの電圧はゼロになると考えております
Qu'en pensez-vou
No, prima devo mettermi in un atteggiamento migliore per te, Gus. In questo modo non servirà a ni
残念ながら、数値はここには掲載さ
Okay. Delete the section that says "Before un-docking o
नमस्कार, अपोलो 11, ह्यूस्टन। आपके लिए हमारे पा
Okay. If we go back to mode, s
This concerns the Zodiacal Light Experiment which i
أنا سعيد بذلك. هذا يعني أنك تتعقبنا أيضا
Okay, Jim. We would like to get anothe
Роджер. С
Roger. Esatto, Jim. Per rispondere a
Houston, Ap
제가 
Say again, pleas
- - Abbia
Friendshi
わかった、チャーリー。どうやら、マークする地点でレチクルが地平線に接線を描いていないといけないみたいだ。そうでないと、星下点にいないことになる。横方向にずれていて、本来よりも大きなトラニオン角を測っていることになる
Ok. Esatto. È Jim Lovell. Quello che abbiamo pensato di fare oggi è stato mostrarvi un po' della vita all'interno dell'Apollo 8. Vi abbiamo mostrato le scene della Luna, le scene della Terra, e abbiamo pensato di invitarvi a casa nostra. È stata casa nostra per almeno 4 giorni, come potete vedere sul pannello degli strumenti. Segnaliamo ogni giorno sul pannello degli strumenti. Siamo a quota quattro e stiamo lavorando al quinto giorno. Naturalmente, non vediamo l'ora che arrivi l'atterraggio di venerdì. Qui sotto, nella parte della navicella che chiamiamo stiva inferiore, abbiamo il consigliere del Presidente per la forma fisica, il Capitano Jim Lovell, che sta per sottoporsi a un programma di esercizi che svolgiamo ogni giorno. Notate che fluttua molto liberamente. Ha appena sbattuto la testa contro il sistema ottico, usato per la nostra navigazione. Sta lavorando con un attrezzo progettato per mantenere i muscoli in forma. Un'altra funzione molto importante della nostra navicella spaziale è il computer, e ho pensato che potesse interessarvi vedere cosa abbiamo qui, i display che ci forniscono tutte le informazioni sulla nostra combustione, sulla navigazione e sulla velocità che utilizziamo durante l'ingresso e il retro-fuoco nelle missioni orbitali terrestri. Potete vedere che
Mike, ich ha
好的，将两倍于最大功率点火提前角（MPL）的参数设置为：079、27、4013，加上 08144，减去 00443，减去 00226，不适用，加上 00205、08455、4，加上 20、268、261，加上 08155，减去 00443，减去 021、2187，不适用。GDA 应该没问题，希望螺距为 5.85，偏航角为 6.74。双喷管空载运行 10 秒，油门 10% 运行 5 秒，40% 运行 21 秒，剩余燃烧时间为 100%。这样应该能让我们
了解。ロックオン成功です。21時50分時点では射程距離が22.24海里でした。22時00分時点では射程距離が17.63海里で、まだロックオン成功です。51
我嗓子有点干，第一天快结束的时候我们的眼睛
Ja. Ich glaube nicht, dass wir tatsächlich Probleme mit der Kopffreiheit hatten. Ich hatte das Gefühl, genügend Kopffreiheit zu haben und konnte die Hunde g
Хорош
Ken, are
Но мы это сделали — мы определили район Эль-Пасо, и нам показалось, что там есть просвет в облаках, но мы посмотрели 
罗杰。如果您同意，我们倾向于建议您去参加这
Roger. I've started on the meal 1 of day 4. I've had about 8 swallows of water. I slept about an hour and a half in the last 4 hours' sleep per
حسنًا يا فريد. لم نشرح ذلك. تسلسل "،
Dice di eseguire le faccende domestiche, riporre i caschi, stivare le borse; disfare lo specchio, la lista di controllo e il gruppo di smaltimento. Stivare il gruppo di stivaggio provvisorio, disfare e configurare per l'uso 16 millimetri, HC-EX, f:4, 500, infinito, 6 fotogrammi al secondo. Questo è tutto ciò che d
मुझे यकीन है। अगर आपके पास और कोई काम नहीं है, तो आपकी तालिका में दो
好的，我们继续。好
أقرأ لك بصوت عالٍ - بصوت عالٍ 
이글, 휴스턴.
Buzz, du möch
Ce n'est pas vrai partout, mais il existe certainement des endroits où l'on observe une pente descen
在给出电池读数之前，您希望
吉姆，休斯顿。让他
ठीक है। पैनल 250 पर लगे
ठीक है। कृपया ध्यान दें कि जब हम एसीएमई पहुंचे तो... कुछ ही समय के लिए, बहुत धुंधली रोशनी दिखाई दी। फिर
嗯，我们真的不知道。通常舱里有
了解。アダプターについて。今はどう聞こえま
Avez-vous copié le RET 400 K
제미니 8호, CSQ CAP COM. Com 확인
Ho notato che nei punti morbidi i
さあ、1
Roger. Sigma Se
Вы хотите сказать, что топливные элементы 1
……大约在19分钟的时候，所有星空参照物都消失了。星星正在消失，而我……在下面
Roger. Répéte
D'accord. Une dernière chose concernant l'eau, Jack. Si vous ne purgez pas compl
좋습니다, 오디세이; 휴스턴. 
Roger. Nous observons le centre de la Terre depuis le vaisseau spatial dans l'est de l'océan Pacifique. Nous n'avons pas pu distinguer visuellement l'archipel d'Hawaï, mais nous voyons clairement la côte ouest de l'Amérique du Nord: les États-Unis, la vallée de San Joaquin, la Sierra Nevada, la Basse-Californie et le Mexique jusqu'à Acapulco, ainsi que la péninsule du Yucatán. On aperçoi
Roger. Continuiamo con il Maroon Bugle. Il Presidente Nixon ha sorpreso le vostre mogli con una telefonata da San Francisco poco prima di salire su un aereo per incontrarvi. Sono rimasti tutti molto colpiti dalla vostra trasmissione televisiva. Jan e Pat hanno guardato dal Controllo Missione qui. Il lancio di Intelsat da Città del Capo è stato rinviato per la quarta volta ieri sera. Si dice che il problema sia dovuto a un malfunzionamento del regolatore di azoto nel secondo stadio del Delta. Un nuovo tentativo di lancio verrà effettuato stasera. Il sottomarino di ricerca Ben Franklin, che studia la Corrente del Golfo, ha stabilito un record navigando alla deriva per 24 ore da 3 a 30 metri sopra il fondale oceanico a 400 metri di profondità al largo della costa della Georgia. La missione è guidata da Jacques Picard. Wally Schirra è stato eletto per un mandato di 5 anni nel consiglio di amministrazione del Detroit 
좋아. "크리스마스 이브 밤, 우주 저 멀리 아폴로 8호 승무원들
आगे 
オーロラセブン、オーロラセ
了解。少しクリスマスっぽい感じがし
Houston, stiamo cercando di estendere il tubo del comandante utilizzando 
아폴로 8호, 고이득을 기다리는 동안 궤적 요약을 계속하겠습니다. 13번째 지
प्रतीक्षा करें... मुझे दें -... मे
Va bene. Lo 
了解。プラス90：/G&N、63825、マイナス1.54、プラス1.32、マイナス0491.7、プラス0000.1、プラス6634.0、180、228、001。該当なし。プラス0017.9、6652.2、7:37、6626.5、26、155.4
Роджер
Roger. La nostra cabina ha retto bene. Sembra che non ci sia molto che possiamo fare. La pressione della bombola sale e questo è tutto. Stiamo effettivamente scaricando ossigeno in mare, cosa di cui
Okay, Fred. Since you went ahead and used the condensate contai
Jim, hier ist Houston. Zwei Dinge: Erstens, Ihre Datei sieht sehr gut aus und sollte Ihnen über die Nacht reichen; zweitens, ich habe eine Vorgehensweise für Sie, falls Sie zum Kopieren bereit sind. Wir möchten drei Bits im Computer einstellen, und ich erkläre Ihnen, 
ロジャー、
Roger. Lo invieremo e ora ti darò l'aggiornamento sui materiali di consumo. Per un periodo di 170 ore, il tuo totale è meno 3,5%, Alfa è meno 14,5, Bravo più 7, Charlie meno 4,5, Delta meno 3; il totale di idrogeno è meno 1 e il
जी हां, 
बि
नहीं। फिलहाल हमारे पास चंद्र सतह संबंधी पुस्तक के बारे में कोई अपडेट नहीं है। हमने इसे आपके पास रखने का फैसला किया 
...여기 물 좀 있어. 
Роджер. Напряжение батарей: основная — 24 В, первая — 25 В, вторая — 25 В, третья — 25 В. Резервная первая — 25 В, резервная вторая — 25 В, изолированная — 29 В. Амперметр — 22 В, вентиляторы — 112 В, ве
